{'en': 'Adversarial Multi-task Learning for Text Classification', 'ar': 'التعلم العدائي متعدد المهام لتصنيف النص', 'es': 'Aprendizaje contradictorio multitarea para la clasificación de textos', 'fr': 'Apprentissage multitâche contradictoire pour la classification de textes', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem multitarefa adversarial para classificação de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のための対抗的なマルチタスク学習', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रतिकूल बहु-कार्य सीखना', 'zh': '文本类对抗性多任务学', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ilthasc Sáraíochta le haghaidh Aicmiú Téacs', 'ru': 'Соперническое многозадачное обучение для классификации текста', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის კონპერაციალური მრავალური დავალება', 'el': 'Αντίθετα εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'hu': 'Adversariális többfeladatú tanulás a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'it': 'Apprendimento multiplo avverso per la classificazione del testo', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясының көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту', 'mk': 'Научување на непријатни мултизадачи за класификација на текст', 'ml': 'Text Classification', 'ms': 'Pelajaran berbilang-tugas bertentangan untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas kelių užduočių mokymasis teksto klasifikacijai', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Adversarju Multikompiti għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowe uczenie się przeciwnika dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'no': 'Rekursarialt fleire oppgåver- læring for tekstklassifikasjon', 'ro': 'Învățare adversară multi-sarcină pentru clasificarea textelor', 'mn': 'Текст классификацийн тусламжтай олон ажил суралцах', 'sr': 'Adversarialno učenje višezadataka za klasifikaciju teksta', 'si': 'පාළු ක්\u200dලාසිකේෂණය සඳහා වැඩි වැඩි කාර්ය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada shaqo badan oo kala duduwan', 'sv': 'Adversarial Multi-Task Learning för textklassificering', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு முன்னிருப்பு பல பணி படிப்பு', 'ur': 'Text Classification', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết về văn bản làm gương', 'bg': 'Обучение с множество задачи за класификация на текста', 'da': 'Adversarial Multi-Task Learning for Tekstklassifikation', 'de': 'Adversarial Multi-Task Learning für die Textklassifizierung', 'nl': 'Tegenstrijdig leren met meerdere taken voor tekstclassificatie', 'id': 'Pelajaran Multi-Tugas Adversarial untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'sw': 'Kufundisha kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya kutangaza maandishi', 'ko': '텍스트 분류 중의 대항식 다중 임무 학습', 'af': 'Adversariale Multi-Task Leer vir Teks Klassifikasie', 'tr': 'Metin Sınıflandyrmanyň üçin öwrenmek üçin näçe zady', 'hr': 'Adversarialno učenje višezadataka za klasifikaciju teksta', 'sq': 'Mësimi kundërshtar me shumë detyra për klasifikimin e tekstit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'M톛tn Klasifikasyonu 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'fa': 'یادگیری چندین کارهای مخالف برای کلاس متن', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ক্লাসিফেশনের জন্য প্রাথমিক বহুবার্তা কাজ শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'Aprendiment multitascat adversari per a la classificació del text', 'bs': 'Preporučno učenje mnogobrojnih zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta', 'cs': 'Víceúkolové učení pro klasifikaci textů', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoimete mitme ülesandega õppimine teksti klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Adversarial Multi-task Learning for Text Classification', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'לימוד מרובי משימות נוגדים לקסמון טקסט', 'sk': 'Neželeno večopravilno učenje za klasifikacijo besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྡེར་རིམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་སྣ་མང་བོར་སློབ་རྩོམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural network models have shown their promising opportunities for multi-task learning, which focus on learning the shared layers to extract the common and task-invariant features. However, in most existing approaches, the extracted shared features are prone to be contaminated by task-specific features or the noise brought by other tasks. In this paper, we propose an adversarial multi-task learning framework, alleviating the shared and private latent feature spaces from interfering with each other. We conduct extensive experiments on 16 different text classification tasks, which demonstrates the benefits of our approach. Besides, we show that the shared knowledge learned by our proposed model can be regarded as off-the-shelf knowledge and easily transferred to new tasks. The datasets of all 16 tasks are publicly available at.http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/.\n    ', 'es': 'Los modelos de redes neuronales han demostrado sus prometedoras oportunidades para el aprendizaje multitarea, que se centran en aprender las capas compartidas para extraer las características comunes e invariantes de la tarea. Sin embargo, en la mayoría de los enfoques existentes, las entidades compartidas extraídas tienden a contaminarse con características específicas de la tarea o el ruido provocado por otras tareas. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de aprendizaje multitarea contradictorio, que alivia los espacios de características latentes compartidos y privados de interferir entre sí. Llevamos a cabo experimentos exhaustivos en 16 tareas diferentes de clasificación de textos, lo que demuestra los beneficios de nuestro enfoque. Además, demostramos que el conocimiento compartido aprendido por nuestro modelo propuesto puede considerarse un conocimiento estándar y transferirse fácilmente a nuevas tareas. Los conjuntos de datos de las 16 tareas están disponibles públicamente en < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ar': 'أظهرت نماذج الشبكة العصبية فرصها الواعدة للتعلم متعدد المهام ، والتي تركز على تعلم الطبقات المشتركة لاستخراج الميزات المشتركة وغير المتغيرة للمهام. ومع ذلك ، في معظم الأساليب الحالية ، تكون الميزات المشتركة المستخرجة عرضة للتلوث بميزات خاصة بالمهمة أو الضوضاء التي تسببها المهام الأخرى. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا تعليميًا متعدد المهام عدائيًا ، مما يخفف مساحات الميزات الكامنة المشتركة والخاصة من التداخل مع بعضها البعض. نجري تجارب مكثفة على 16 مهمة تصنيف نصوص مختلفة ، مما يوضح فوائد نهجنا. إلى جانب ذلك ، نظهر أن المعرفة المشتركة المكتسبة من خلال نموذجنا المقترح يمكن اعتبارها معرفة جاهزة ويمكن نقلها بسهولة إلى مهام جديدة. مجموعات البيانات لجميع المهام الـ 16 متاحة للجمهور على <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>.', 'fr': "Les modèles de réseaux neuronaux ont montré leurs opportunités prometteuses pour l'apprentissage multitâche, qui se concentre sur l'apprentissage des couches partagées afin d'extraire les caractéristiques communes et invariantes des tâches. Cependant, dans la plupart des approches existantes, les entités partagées extraites sont susceptibles d'être contaminées par des fonctionnalités spécifiques à une tâche ou par le bruit généré par d'autres tâches. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre d'apprentissage multitâche contradictoire, qui évite aux espaces de fonctionnalités latentes partagés et privés d'interférer les uns avec les autres. Nous menons des expériences approfondies sur 16 tâches de classification de texte différentes, ce qui démontre les avantages de notre approche. En outre, nous montrons que les connaissances partagées apprises par notre modèle proposé peuvent être considérées comme des connaissances standard et facilement transférées vers de nouvelles tâches. Les ensembles de données des 16 tâches sont accessibles au public à l'adresse < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.", 'zh': '神经网络模形既见其所欲于多任务学者,侧重于学共之层以取其常任者也。 然多见法,取共特定易染于噪声。 本文中,发对抗性多任务学框架,解共享、私密潜相干。 博16异类之实验,明吾道之善也。 此外,我们说的模样学到共享知识可以成为现成的知识,并很容易移到新任中。 凡 16 任之数集均可于 <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/> 公取之。', 'ru': 'Нейросетевые модели показали свои многообещающие возможности для многозадачного обучения, которое фокусируется на изучении общих слоев для извлечения общих и задачно-инвариантных особенностей. Однако в большинстве существующих подходов извлеченные общие признаки могут быть загрязнены специфическими для задачи признаками или шумом, создаваемым другими задачами. В этой статье мы предлагаем состязательный многозадачный обучающий фреймворк, облегчающий совместное и частное пространство скрытых признаков от вмешательства друг в друга. Мы проводим обширные эксперименты по 16 различным задачам классификации текста, что демонстрирует преимущества нашего подхода. Кроме того, мы показываем, что общие знания, усвоенные нашей предлагаемой моделью, могут рассматриваться как готовые знания и легко переноситься на новые задачи. Наборы данных по всем 16 задачам находятся в открытом доступе по адресу<http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल ने बहु-कार्य सीखने के लिए अपने आशाजनक अवसर दिखाए हैं, जो सामान्य और कार्य-अपरिवर्तनीय विशेषताओं को निकालने के लिए साझा परतों को सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, अधिकांश मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों में, निकाली गई साझा सुविधाओं को कार्य-विशिष्ट सुविधाओं या अन्य कार्यों द्वारा लाए गए शोर से दूषित होने की संभावना है। इस पेपर में, हम एक प्रतिकूल बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक-दूसरे के साथ हस्तक्षेप करने से साझा और निजी अव्यक्त सुविधा रिक्त स्थान को कम करता है। हम 16 अलग-अलग पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर व्यापक प्रयोग करते हैं, जो हमारे दृष्टिकोण के लाभों को दर्शाता है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल द्वारा सीखे गए साझा ज्ञान को ऑफ-द-शेल्फ ज्ञान के रूप में माना जा सकता है और आसानी से नए कार्यों में स्थानांतरित किया जा सकता है। सभी 16 कार्यों के डेटासेट सार्वजनिक रूप से <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/> पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'pt': 'Os modelos de redes neurais mostraram suas oportunidades promissoras para o aprendizado multitarefa, que se concentram no aprendizado das camadas compartilhadas para extrair os recursos comuns e invariáveis de tarefa. No entanto, na maioria das abordagens existentes, os recursos compartilhados extraídos são propensos a serem contaminados por recursos específicos da tarefa ou pelo ruído trazido por outras tarefas. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa adversarial, aliviando os espaços de recursos latentes compartilhados e privados de interferirem uns nos outros. Realizamos extensos experimentos em 16 tarefas de classificação de texto diferentes, o que demonstra os benefícios de nossa abordagem. Além disso, mostramos que o conhecimento compartilhado aprendido pelo nosso modelo proposto pode ser considerado como conhecimento de prateleira e facilmente transferido para novas tarefas. Os conjuntos de dados de todas as 16 tarefas estão disponíveis publicamente em <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>.', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークモデルは、共通のタスク不変の機能を抽出するために共有レイヤーを学習することに焦点を当てたマルチタスク学習の有望な機会を示しています。しかしながら、ほとんどの既存のアプローチでは、抽出された共有特徴は、タスク固有の特徴または他のタスクによってもたらされるノイズによって汚染されやすい。本稿では，共有およびプライベートの潜在的な特徴空間が互いに干渉することを緩和する対抗的なマルチタスク学習フレームワークを提案する．私たちは、16の異なるテキスト分類タスクについて広範な実験を行い、私たちのアプローチの利点を示しています。さらに、提案されたモデルによって得られた共有知識は、既製の知識と見なされ、新しいタスクに簡単に転送されることが示されています。すべての16のタスクのデータセットは、で公開されてい<http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>ます。', 'ga': 'Thaispeáin samhlacha líonraí néaracha a ndeiseanna gealltanais don fhoghlaim ilthasc, a dhíríonn ar na sraitheanna comhroinnte a fhoghlaim chun na gnéithe comónta agus athróg tascanna a bhaint as. Mar sin féin, i bhformhór na gcur chuige atá ann cheana féin, is dóichí go mbeidh na gnéithe comhroinnte asbhainte truaillithe ag gnéithe tasc-shonracha nó ag an torann a eascraíonn as tascanna eile. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat foghlama il-tasc sáraíochta, a laghdóidh na spásanna gné folaigh roinnte agus príobháideacha ó chur isteach ar a chéile. Déanaimid turgnaimh fhairsing ar 16 thasc éagsúla aicmithe téacs, a léiríonn na buntáistí a bhaineann lenár gcur chuige. Ina theannta sin, léirímid gur féidir an t-eolas comhroinnte atá foghlamtha ag ár múnla molta a mheas mar eolas as an tseilf agus é a aistriú go héasca chuig tascanna nua. Tá tacair shonraí na 16 thasc ar fad ar fáil go poiblí ag <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>.', 'hu': 'A neurális hálózati modellek megmutatták a többfeladatos tanulás ígéretes lehetőségeit, amelyek a közös rétegek tanulására összpontosítanak, hogy kivonják a közös és feladatinvariáns funkciókat. A legtöbb meglévő megközelítésben azonban a kivont megosztott funkciók hajlamosak a feladatspecifikus jellemzők vagy a más feladatok által okozott zaj szennyeződésére. Ebben a tanulmányban egy ellentmondásos, többfeladatos tanulási keretrendszert javasolunk, amely megkönnyíti a megosztott és privát látens funkcióterek egymásba való beavatkozását. 16 különböző szövegosztályozási feladaton átfogó kísérleteket végezünk, amelyek bizonyítják megközelítésünk előnyeit. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy a javasolt modellünk által elsajátított megosztott tudás a polcon kívüli tudásnak tekinthető és könnyen átvihető új feladatokra. Mind a 16 feladat adatkészlete nyilvánosan elérhető < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων έχουν δείξει τις ελπιδοφόρες ευκαιρίες τους για εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών, τα οποία επικεντρώνονται στην εκμάθηση των κοινών στρωμάτων για να εξαγάγουν τα κοινά και αναλλοίωτα χαρακτηριστικά των εργασιών. Ωστόσο, στις περισσότερες υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις, τα εξαγόμενα κοινά χαρακτηριστικά είναι επιρρεπείς να μολυνθούν από ειδικά χαρακτηριστικά εργασίας ή τον θόρυβο που προκαλείται από άλλες εργασίες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα αντιφατικό πλαίσιο μάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών, που ανακουφίζει τους κοινόχρηστους και ιδιωτικούς λανθάνοντες χώρους χαρακτηριστικών από την παρεμβολή μεταξύ τους. Διεξάγουμε εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε 16 διαφορετικές εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένων, τα οποία αποδεικνύουν τα οφέλη της προσέγγισής μας. Επιπλέον, αποδεικνύουμε ότι η κοινή γνώση που αποκτάται από το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μας μπορεί να θεωρηθεί ως γνώση από το ράφι και να μεταφερθεί εύκολα σε νέα καθήκοντα. Τα σύνολα δεδομένων όλων των 16 εργασιών είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα στο < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები გამოჩვენეთ მრავალური მონაცემებების შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც მრავალური მონაცემებისთვის, რომლებიც კონუქტურებულია მრავალური სინაცემებ მაგრამ, უფრო მსგავსი დაწყებაში, ექსტრაქტირებული განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციები უნდა იყოს დაკავშირებული მოქმედების განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციებით ან სხვა მოქმედებების და ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გვეძლევა განსაკუთრებული მრავალური სასწავლობის ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ერთმანეთს გაგრძელებული და პირველური ლეტანტიური ფრამეტრის სივრცე გახსნა. ჩვენ 16 განსხვავებული ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მოქმედების გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც ჩვენი მოქმედების გამოიყენება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელზე მეტად ვისწავლილი მეცნიერება შეიძლება იყვანოთ როგორც ცნობიერები გარეშე და ადვილად გადატანა ახალი დავალებში. ყველა 16 დავალების მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია საშუალოდ გახსნა < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ - ეა.', 'it': "I modelli di rete neurale hanno mostrato le loro promettenti opportunità di apprendimento multi-task, che si concentrano sull'apprendimento dei livelli condivisi per estrarre le caratteristiche comuni e invarianti dei compiti. Tuttavia, nella maggior parte degli approcci esistenti, le caratteristiche condivise estratte sono soggette a contaminazione da caratteristiche specifiche del compito o dal rumore causato da altri compiti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework di apprendimento multi-task avversario, che allevia gli spazi latenti condivisi e privati dall'interferire l'uno con l'altro. Conduciamo esperimenti approfonditi su 16 diversi compiti di classificazione del testo, che dimostrano i vantaggi del nostro approccio. Inoltre, dimostriamo che la conoscenza condivisa appresa dal nostro modello proposto può essere considerata come conoscenza off-the-shelf e facilmente trasferita a nuovi compiti. I set di dati di tutte e 16 le attività sono disponibili pubblicamente su < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.", 'lt': 'Neuralinių tinklų modeliai parodė savo perspektyvias galimybes mokytis įvairiomis užduotimis, kuriose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama bendrų sluoksnių mokymuisi, siekiant išnaudoti bendras ir su užduotimis nesusijusias savybes. Tačiau daugumoje esamų metodų išgautos bendros savybės gali būti užterštos konkrečiomis užduoties savybėmis arba triukšmu, kurį sukelia kitos užduotys. Šiame dokumente siūlome priešingą daugiafunkcinį mokymosi sistemą, kuri palengvintų bendras ir privačias latentines savybes tarpusavyje kištis. Atliekame išsamius eksperimentus 16 skirtingų tekstų klasifikavimo užduočių, kurie rodo mūsų požiūrio naudą. Be to, mes rodome, kad mūsų pasiūlytame modelyje įgytos bendros žinios gali būti laikomos žiniomis, kurios nėra tinkamos, ir lengvai perduodamos naujoms užduotims. Visų 16 užduočių duomenų rinkiniai skelbiami < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық желі үлгілері көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқыту мүмкіндіктерін көрсетті. Осы қабаттарды ортақ қабаттарды оқыту үшін жалпы және тапсырмалард Бірақ көпшілігінде бөлінген бөлінген мүмкіндіктерді тапсырмалардың қасиеттері немесе басқа тапсырмалардың дыбысы бойынша жетілдіруге болады. Бұл қағазда біз көп тапсырманың оқыту бағдарламасын қарсы көп тапсырманың оқыту бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Ортақ және жеке қарсы қарсы бос орындарды бір-бірімен қатынау ү Біз 16 әртүрлі мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларында кеңейтілген тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Бұл өзіміздің пайдалануларын көрсетеді. Қосымша, біз өзіміздің үлгілерімізге үйренген ортақ білім білімізді қолданып, жаңа тапсырмаларга оңай ауыстырылады. Барлық 16 тапсырманың деректер қорлары ашық < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'mk': 'Неуралните мрежни модели ги покажаа своите ветувачки можности за мултизадачно учење, кое се фокусира на учењето на заедничките слоеви за извлекување на заедничките и инваријантни карактеристики. Сепак, во повеќето постоечки пристапи, екстрактираните заеднички карактеристики се навикнати да бидат kontaminирани со специфични карактеристики на задачите или бучавата што ја носат другите задачи. Во овој весник, предложуваме противничка рамка за учење на мултизадачи, олеснувајќи ги споделените и приватните тајни простори од мешање меѓусебно. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на 16 различни задачи за класификација на текст, кои покажуваат бенефиции од нашиот пристап. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека заедничкото знаење научено од нашиот предложен модел може да се смета за знаење надвор од полицијата и лесно да се префрли на нови задачи. Податоците на сите 16 задачи се јавно достапни на < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ms': 'Model rangkaian saraf telah menunjukkan peluang yang berjanji untuk belajar berbilang-tugas, yang fokus pada belajar lapisan terkongsi untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri yang umum dan tidak berfungsi tugas. Namun, dalam kebanyakan pendekatan yang ada, ciri-ciri terkongsi yang dikekstrak cenderung untuk dirampas oleh ciri-ciri tugas-khusus atau bunyi yang dibawa oleh tugas lain. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka pembelajaran berbagai tugas musuh, mengurangi ruang ciri terkongsi dan peribadi yang tersembunyi daripada mengganggu satu sama lain. Kami melakukan eksperimen luas pada 16 tugas kelasukan teks yang berbeza, yang menunjukkan keuntungan pendekatan kita. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa pengetahuan berkongsi yang dipelajari oleh model kami diusulkan boleh dianggap sebagai pengetahuan luar rak dan mudah dipindahkan ke tugas baru. Set data bagi semua 16 tugas tersedia secara awam pada < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'mt': 'Neural network models have shown their promising opportunities for multi-task learning, which focus on learning the shared layers to extract the common and task-invariant features.  Madankollu, fil-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi eżistenti, il-karatteristiċi kondiviżi estratti huma suxxettibbli li jiġu kkontaminati minn karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-kompiti jew mill-istorbju li jinġieb minn kompiti oħra. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas avversarju ta’ tagħlim multikompiti, li jtaffi l-ispazji ta’ karatteristiċi moħbija kondiviżi u privati milli jinterferixxu ma’ xulxin. Aħna nieħdu esperimenti estensivi fuq 16-il kompitu differenti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test, li juru l-benefiċċji tal-approċċ tagħna. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu evidenza li l-għarfien kondiviż imgħallem mill-mudell propost tagħna jista’ jitqies bħala għarfien barra mill-prattiċi u faċilment trasferit għal kompiti ġodda. Is-settijiet tad-dejta tas-16-il kompitu kollha huma disponibbli pubblikament fuq < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'mn': 'Цөмийн сүлжээний загварууд олон ажлын суралцах боломжтой байдлыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь нийтлэг, үйл ажиллагааны шалтгааныг гаргахад нийтлэг давхар суралцах боломжтой юм. Гэхдээ ихэнх ойлголтын тулд, хадгалагдсан хуваалцаагүй чадварууд нь ажлын тодорхой чадварууд эсвэл бусад ажлын дотор авсан чимээгүй байдлаар халдвар авдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон ажлын суралцах эсрэг үйлдвэрлэлийн системийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Хувь, хувийн хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой зайг багасгах. Бид 16 янз бүрийн текст хуваалтын ажил дээр маш их туршилт хийдэг. Энэ нь бидний ойлголтын ашиг үзүүлдэг. Үүнээс гадна бид бидний санал өгсөн загвараар сурсан хуваалцааг мэдлэг шинэ ажил руу амархан шилжүүлж чадна. Бүх 16 ажлын өгөгдлийн сангууд олон нийтэд < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അവസരം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പങ്കുള്ള layers പഠിക്കുന്നത എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള മിക്കവാറുകളില്\u200d, പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിക്കുള്ള പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മറ്റു ജോ In this paper, we propose an adversarial multi-task learning framework, alleviating the shared and private latent feature spaces from interfering with each other.  16 വ്യത്യസ്ത പദാവലിയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. അത് നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയുടെ ഉപകരണങ്ങളെ പ പിന്നെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d പഠിച്ച പങ്കാളിയുള്ള അറിവുകള്\u200d പുതിയ ജോലികളിലേക്ക് മാറ്റി മ എല്ലാ 16 ജോലികളുടെയും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമല്ല < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'no': 'Nøyrale nettverksmodeller har vist dei promiserende mulighetene for å lære fleire oppgåver, som fokuserer på læring av delte lag for å pakka ut dei vanlege og oppgåveinvariante funksjonane. I dei fleste eksisterande tilnærmingane er imidlertid dei ekstraherte delte funksjonane nærare å bli kontaminarte av funksjonarspesifiserte funksjonar eller støyen som vert henta av andre oppgåver. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit adversarist multioppgåver-læringsrammeverk, som alleviarer dei delte og private latente funksjonsmellomroma frå å interferanse med kvarandre. Vi gjer utvida eksperimenter på 16 forskjellige tekstklassifikasjonar, som viser fordelene til tilnærminga vår. I tillegg viser vi at den delte kunnskapen lærte av vårt foreslått modell kan verta kalla som kjennen frå hjelp og lett overført til nye oppgåver. Datasettane for alle 16 oppgåver er tilgjengelege i < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'pl': 'Modele sieci neuronowych pokazały swoje obiecujące możliwości uczenia się wielozadaniowego, które koncentrują się na uczeniu się wspólnych warstw w celu wyodrębnienia wspólnych i niezmiennych cech zadań. Jednak w większości istniejących podejść wyodrębnione funkcje współdzielone są podatne na zanieczyszczenie specyficznymi cechami zadania lub hałasem wynikającym z innych zadań. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy przeciwne wielozadaniowe ramy uczenia się, łagodzące wspólne i prywatne utajone przestrzenie funkcji przed ingerowaniem się nawzajem. Przeprowadzamy szeroko zakrojone eksperymenty na 16-ciu różnych zadaniach klasyfikacji tekstów, co pokazuje korzyści płynące z naszego podejścia. Ponadto pokazujemy, że dzielona wiedza zdobyta przez nasz proponowany model może być traktowana jako gotowa wiedza i łatwo przeniesiona na nowe zadania. Zestawy danych wszystkich 16-zadań są publicznie dostępne pod adresem < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය මොඩේලන් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනාවන් අවස්ථාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය සහ කාර්ය-අව නමුත්, ගොඩක් අවස්ථානයෙන් ඉන්න තියෙන අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ, බේරගත්ත අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් විශේෂ විශේ මේ පැත්තට, අපි විරෝධ විශ්වාසික වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් සැලසුම් සහ පෞද්ගලික විශ අපි වෙනස් පාළුවන් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණාවක් 16 වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙ ඒ වගේම, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගත්ත සමාගත දන්නම් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නි සියළු වැඩ 16 ගේ දත්ත සේට් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයි < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'ro': 'Modelele de rețea neurală și-au arătat oportunitățile promițătoare pentru învățarea multi-task, care se concentrează pe învățarea straturilor partajate pentru a extrage caracteristicile comune și invariante ale sarcinilor. Cu toate acestea, în majoritatea abordărilor existente, caracteristicile partajate extrase sunt predispuse să fie contaminate de caracteristici specifice sarcinilor sau de zgomotul adus de alte sarcini. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru adversar de învățare multi-sarcină, atenuând spațiile de caracteristici latente comune și private să interfereze unul cu celălalt. Realizăm experimente extinse pe 16 sarcini diferite de clasificare a textelor, ceea ce demonstrează beneficiile abordării noastre. În plus, arătăm că cunoștințele împărtășite învățate prin modelul propus pot fi considerate cunoștințe off-the-shelf și ușor transferate la noi sarcini. Seturile de date ale tuturor celor 16 sarcini sunt disponibile public la < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'sr': 'Neuralni modeli mreže pokazali su svoje obećavajuće mogućnosti za učenje multi task, koje se fokusiraju na učenje zajedničkih slojeva kako bi izvukli zajedničke i invariantne karakteristike. Međutim, u većini postojećih pristupa, izvučene zajedničke karakteristike su sklone da budu kontaminirane posebnim karakteristikama zadataka ili bukom koju donose drugi zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo neprijateljski okvir za učenje multizadataka, olakšavanje zajedničkih i privatnih latentnih prostora od ometanja međusobno. Provodimo široke eksperimente na 16 različitih zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, koji pokazuju koristi našeg pristupa. Osim toga, pokazujemo da zajedničko znanje koje je naučio naš predloženi model može biti smatrano znanjem izvan police i lako prebaceno na nove zadatke. Podaci svih 16 zadataka su javno dostupni na < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'so': 'Tusaalada shabakadda naadiga ah waxay tuseen fursado loo ballanqaaday barashada waxbarashada shaqada badan, kaas oo focus ku ah barashada qasnadaha kala duduwan si ay u soo bixiso tayada caadiga ah iyo shaqada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, meelaha badan ee ay jiraan waxaa lagu cadaynayaa inay ku wasakheeyaan tayada shaqada ama codka shaqaalaha kale soo saara. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa kooras waxbarasho oo ka gees ah oo shaqo badan, si aan u fududayno goobaha saacadaha loo qeybeeyo iyo gaarka loo leeyahay si aan iskula xiriirno. We conduct extensive experiments on 16 different text classification tasks, which demonstrates the benefits of our approach.  Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in aqoonta la qayb dhigay oo lagu baray modeleena la soo jeeday looga tirin karo aqoonta shabakada iyo si fudud loogu wareejiyo shaqada cusub. Shaqooyinka 16-shaqooyinka oo dhamaantood waxay si bayaan ah u heli karaan < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverksmodeller har visat sina lovande möjligheter till multi-task learning, som fokuserar på att lära sig de delade skikten för att extrahera de gemensamma och uppgiftsinvigerande funktionerna. I de flesta befintliga tillvägagångssätt är dock de extraherade delade funktionerna benägna att förorenas av uppgiftsspecifika egenskaper eller buller som orsakas av andra uppgifter. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi ett kontradiktoriskt multi-task lärande ramverk, som lindrar delade och privata latenta funktionsutrymmen från att störa varandra. Vi genomför omfattande experiment på 16 olika textklassificeringsuppgifter, vilket visar fördelarna med vårt tillvägagångssätt. Dessutom visar vi att den gemensamma kunskap som lärts av vår föreslagna modell kan betraktas som färdig kunskap och lätt överföras till nya uppgifter. Datauppsättningar för alla 16 uppgifter är offentligt tillgängliga på < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ur': 'نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل نے اپنے بہت سے دنیا کی تعلیم کے لئے اپنے وعدہ کی فرصت دکھائی ہیں، جو مشترک لائٹوں کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ مشترک اور تابع-غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ However, in most existing approaches, the extracted shared features are prone to be contaminated by task-specific features or the noise brought by other tasks. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مخالف مخالف multi-task learning framework پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، شریک اور خصوصی لاٹینٹ فائدہ جگہ کو ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ مشکل کرنے سے کم کر دیتے ہیں. ہم 16 مختلف ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفوں کے کاموں پر بڑے تجربے کرتے ہیں، جو ہمارے تقریبا کے فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے پیشنهاد مدل کے ذریعہ سے سکھائے ہوئے شریک علم کو غیر شالف علم بنا کر سمجھ سکتے ہیں اور نئے کاموں میں آسان طور پر انتقال کئے جاتے ہیں. سارے 16 ٹاکس کے ڈاٹ سٹ ظاہری طور پر موجود ہیں < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'ta': 'பொதுவான மற்றும் பணி- செயல் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தன்னுடைய வாக்குறுதியான வாய்ப்புகளை பார்த்துள்ளார்கள். However, in most existing approaches, the extracted shared features are prone to be contaminated by task-specific features or the noise brought by other tasks.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு எதிரிய பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பங்கிடப்பட்ட மற்றும் தனியார் பண்புக்கூட 16 வேறு வித்தியாசமான உரை வகுப்பு பணிகளில் நாம் விரிவான சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். இது எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் பயன்பா மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி படிக்கப்பட்ட பங்கிட்ட அறிவு என்பதைக் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் என எல்லா 16 பணிகளின் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, ko'pchilik mavjud boʻlgan holatlarda, tashqi hodisa xossalari yoki boshqa vazifalar orqali keladigan tovush bilan moslash mumkin. In this paper, we propose an adversarial multi-task learning framework, alleviating the shared and private latent feature spaces from interfering with each other.  Biz 16 boshqa matn classification vazifalarda ko'p imtiyozni bajaramiz. Bu usulning imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Ko'rib, biz প্রস রস i qilingan modelmiz bilan o'rganilgan qismlarni o'rganishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin va yangi vazifalarga o'zgartirish oson bo'ladi. Hamma 16 vazifalar maʼlumotlar toʻplami http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình mạng thần kinh đã cho thấy cơ hội được học nhiều nhiệm vụ đầy hứa hẹn, tập trung vào việc học các lớp chia sẻ để lấy ra các tính năng tổng hợp các nhiệm vụ. Tuy nhiên, trong hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại, các tính năng chia sẻ được chiết xuất có xu hướng bị ảnh hưởng bởi các đặc điểm đặc nhiệm hoặc bởi những tác động khác. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ sở học nhiều nhiệm vụ đối đầu, giảm bớt những khoảng trống tiềm năng riêng tư và chia sẻ khỏi làm phiền nhau. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm rộng rãi trên 16 các nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản khác nhau, chứng minh được lợi ích của phương pháp. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi cho thấy kiến thức chia sẻ được học bởi mẫu chúng tôi đã đề nghị có thể được coi là hiểu biết vượt trội và dễ dàng chuyển sang những nhiệm vụ mới. Các tập tin trên tất cả các nhiệm vụ 16 đã được công bố trên trang http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ -̀.', 'hr': 'Modeli neuronske mreže pokazali su svoje obećavajuće mogućnosti za učenje multizadataka, koje se fokusiraju na učenje zajedničkih slojeva kako bi izvukli zajedničke i invariantne karakteristike zadataka. Međutim, u većini postojećih pristupa, izvučene zajedničke karakteristike su sklone da se kontaminiraju posebnim karakteristikama zadataka ili bukom koju donose drugi zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo neprijateljski okvir učenja multizadataka, olakšavanje zajedničkih i privatnih latentnih prostora od mešavanja međusobno. Provodimo široke eksperimente na 16 različitih zadataka klasifikacije teksta, koji pokazuju koristi našeg pristupa. Osim toga, pokazujemo da zajedničko znanje koje je naučio naš predloženi model može se smatrati znanjem izvan police i lako prenijeti na nove zadatke. Podaci svih 16 zadataka javno su dostupni na < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'da': 'Neurale netværksmodeller har vist deres lovende muligheder for multi-opgave læring, som fokuserer på at lære de fælles lag for at udtrække de fælles og opgave-invariant funktioner. I de fleste eksisterende tilgange er de udvundne fælles funktioner imidlertid tilbøjelige til at blive forurenet af opgavespecifikke funktioner eller den støj, som andre opgaver medfører. I denne artikel foreslår vi en modstridende multi-task læringsramme, der afhjælper de delte og private latente funktionsrum fra at blande sig i hinanden. Vi udfører omfattende eksperimenter med 16 forskellige tekstklassifikationsopgaver, hvilket viser fordelene ved vores tilgang. Desuden viser vi, at den fælles viden, vi lærer af vores foreslåede model, kan betragtes som off-the-shelf viden og let overføres til nye opgaver. Datasættene for alle 16 opgaver er offentligt tilgængelige på < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'nl': 'Neurale netwerkmodellen hebben hun veelbelovende mogelijkheden getoond voor multitask leren, die zich richten op het leren van de gedeelde lagen om de gemeenschappelijke en taak-invariante kenmerken te extraheren. In de meeste bestaande benaderingen zijn de geëxtraheerde gedeelde functies echter gevoelig voor verontreiniging door taakspecifieke functies of het lawaai van andere taken. In dit artikel stellen we een tegenstrijdig multi-task leerframework voor, dat de gedeelde en private latente feature spaces ervan weerhoudt elkaar te interfereren. We voeren uitgebreide experimenten uit met 16 verschillende tekstclassificatietaken, wat de voordelen van onze aanpak aantoont. Daarnaast laten we zien dat de gedeelde kennis die door ons voorgestelde model wordt geleerd, kan worden beschouwd als off-the-shelf kennis en gemakkelijk kan worden overgedragen naar nieuwe taken. De datasets van alle 16-taken zijn openbaar beschikbaar op < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'bg': 'Моделите на невралните мрежи показват обещаващите си възможности за многозадачно обучение, което се фокусира върху изучаването на споделените слоеве, за да извлече общите и неизменните функции на задачите. Въпреки това, в повечето съществуващи подходи извлечените споделени функции са склонни да бъдат замърсени от специфични функции на задачата или шума, причинен от други задачи. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме рамка за многозадачи, която облекчава споделените и частните латентни функционални пространства от намеса помежду си. Провеждаме обширни експерименти върху 16 различни задачи за класификация на текста, което демонстрира ползите от нашия подход. Освен това, ние показваме, че споделените знания, придобити от нашия предложен модел, могат да бъдат разглеждани като познания от рафта и лесно прехвърлени към нови задачи. Наборите от данни за всичките 16 задачи са публично достъпни на адрес < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'id': 'Model jaringan saraf telah menunjukkan kesempatan yang berjanji mereka untuk belajar multi-tugas, yang fokus pada belajar lapisan berbagi untuk mengekstraksi fitur umum dan invarian tugas. Namun, dalam kebanyakan pendekatan yang ada, ciri-ciri yang dikeluarkan berbagi cenderung untuk kontaminasi oleh ciri-ciri khusus tugas atau kebisingan yang dibawa oleh tugas lain. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian pembelajaran multi-tugas yang bertentangan, mengurangi ruang karakteristik tersembunyi yang berbagi dan pribadi dari mengganggu satu sama lain. Kami melakukan eksperimen ekstensif pada 16 tugas klasifikasi teks yang berbeda, yang menunjukkan keuntungan pendekatan kita. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa pengetahuan berbagi yang dipelajari oleh model kami diusulkan dapat dianggap sebagai pengetahuan luar rak dan mudah dipindahkan ke tugas baru. Set data dari 16 tugas tersedia publik di < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'de': 'Neuronale Netzwerkmodelle haben ihre vielversprechenden Möglichkeiten für Multi-Task-Lernen gezeigt, bei denen es darum geht, die gemeinsamen Ebenen zu lernen, um die gemeinsamen und aufgabeninvarianten Merkmale zu extrahieren. In den meisten existierenden Ansätzen sind die extrahierten Shared Features jedoch anfällig, durch aufgabenspezifische Features oder durch das Rauschen anderer Aufgaben verunreinigt zu werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein kontroverses Multi-Task-Lernframework vor, das die geteilten und privaten latenten Feature-Räume davon abhält, sich gegenseitig zu stören. Wir führen umfangreiche Experimente zu 16-verschiedenen Textklassifizierungsaufgaben durch, die die Vorteile unseres Ansatzes verdeutlichen. Außerdem zeigen wir, dass das geteilte Wissen, das durch unser vorgeschlagenes Modell gelernt wird, als Standardwissen angesehen und leicht auf neue Aufgaben übertragen werden kann. Die Datensätze aller 16-Tasks sind öffentlich verfügbar unter < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ko': '신경 네트워크 모델은 다중 임무 학습에 좋은 기회를 제공했고 학습 공유층이 공공과 임무가 변하지 않는 특징을 추출하는 데 주목했다.그러나 기존의 대다수 방법에서 추출한 공유 특징은 임무의 특정한 특징이나 다른 임무가 가져오는 소음에 오염되기 쉽다.본고에서 우리는 공유와 사유의 잠재적 특징 공간 간의 상호 간섭을 줄이기 위해 대항적인 다중 임무 학습 구조를 제시했다.우리는 16가지 서로 다른 텍스트 분류 임무에 대해 대량의 실험을 진행하여 우리의 방법의 장점을 증명하였다.또한 우리의 모형을 통해 배운 공유 지식은 기존의 지식으로 간주되고 새로운 임무로 옮기기 쉽다는 것을 보여준다.모든 16개 작업의 데이터 세트는 <http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/>.', 'sw': 'Neural network models have shown their promising opportunities for multi-task learning, which focus on learning the shared layers to extract the common and task-invariant features.  Hata hivyo, katika mbinu nyingi zilizopo, vipengele vilivyosambazwa vinaonekana kuwa zinachapishwa na tabia maalum za kazi au sauti zinazoletwa na kazi nyingine. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza kazi mbalimbali, kupunguza nafasi zilizoshirikiana na zinazohusika binafsi za hivi karibuni kutokuingiliana. Tunafanya majaribio mengi katika kazi 16 tofauti za usambazaji wa maandishi, ambayo inaonyesha faida za mbinu zetu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba maarifa yanayoshirikishwa yaliyojifunzwa na muundo wetu wa pendekezo unaweza kuchukuliwa kama maarifa yanayotokana na maelezo ya kifua na kusafirishwa kwa urahisi katika kazi mpya. Taarifa za kazi zote 16 zinapatikana hadharani kwa < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'af': "Neurale netwerk modelles het hulle beloftende geleenthede vir multi-taak leer vertoon, wat fokus op die deelde laag te leer om die gemeenskaplike en taak-invariant funksies te uitpak. Maar in die meeste bestaande toegang is die uitgevoerde gedeelde funksies voorspoedig om deur opdragspesifieke funksies of die geluid wat deur ander opdragte gebring word. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n teenstandaarlike multi-taak leer raamwerk, wat die gedeelte en privaat latente funksie spasies van mekaar te verbygaan. Ons doen uitbreidige eksperimente op 16 verskillende teks klassifikasie taak wat die voordekens van ons toegang vertoon. Ons wys daarna dat die gedeelte kennis wat deur ons voorgestelde model geleer is, kan aangesien word as off the-shelf kennis en maklik na nuwe taak oordra word. Die datastelle van alle 16 taak is openlik beskikbaar by < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >", 'fa': 'مدلهای شبکه عصبی فرصت\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده خود را برای یادگیری بسیاری از کارها نشان داده\u200cاند که روی یادگیری لایه\u200cهای مشترک برای خروج ویژگی\u200cهای مشترک و مهلت\u200cدهنده\u200cها تمرکز می\u200cکنند. ولی در بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود، ویژه\u200cهای مشترک خارج شده\u200cاند که با ویژه\u200cهای مشترک کار یا صدای دیگری که توسط وظیفه\u200cهای دیگر آورده شده\u200cاند آلوده می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ما آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای را روی ۱۶ وظیفه\u200cهای مختلف تنظیم متن انجام می\u200cدهیم که سودهای دسترسی ما را نشان می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که دانش مشترک که توسط مدل پیشنهاد ما یاد گرفته شده، می تواند به عنوان دانش خارج از پناهگاه و به راحتی به وظیفه های جدید انتقال شود. مجموعه داده\u200cها از همه ۱۶ کار عمومی در < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ .', 'tr': 'Nural şebek modelleri birnäçe-täbli öwrenmek üçin olaryň söz berýän mümkinçiliklerini görkezilýär. Bu nusgalary jemi we täbli-täbli özellikleri açmak üçin paýlaşmalydyrlar. Ýöne köp bolan ýagdaýda, aşyly bölünen aýratyn çykyşlar işeňsiz özellikler ýa-da başga işleriň tarapyndan getirilen sesi bilen hasaplanýar. Bu kagyzda, bir näçe-täsirli multi-täzim öwrenme framyny teklip edýäris, bir-birimiziň aralygy bilen boşluşykdan we hususiz täsirleriň ýerlerini azaltmak üçin. Biz 16 dürli metin klasifikasiýasynda örän köp deneyler edýäris. Bu biziň metodamyzyň etkinleşigini görkez. Munuň ýagdaýda, biziň teklip eden nusganymyzdan öwrenen paylaşyk bilgilerimizi rafda bilim diýip aňsatly täze işlere göçürip biler görkezilip bileris. Hepsi 16 täbliriň veri setirleri publikat <at> http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'sq': 'Modelet e rrjetit nervor kanë treguar mundësitë e tyre premtuese për mësimin me shumë detyra, që përqëndrohen në mësimin e niveleve të përbashkëta për të nxjerrë karakteristikat e përbashkëta dhe të ndërprera nga detyra. Megjithatë, në shumicën e qasjeve ekzistuese, karakteristikat e përbashkëta të nxjerra janë të rrezikshme të kontaminohen nga karakteristikat specifike të detyrave apo zhurma e sjellura nga detyra të tjera. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër kundërshtar mësimi me shumë detyra, duke lehtësuar hapësirat e ndara dhe private të fshehta nga ndërhyrja me njëri-tjetrin. Ne kryejmë eksperimente të gjerë në 16 detyra të ndryshme klasifikimi i tekstit, që demonstron përfitimet e qasjes sonë. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se njohuria e përbashkët e mësuar nga modeli ynë i propozuar mund të konsiderohet si njohuri jashtë raftit dhe lehtë transferuar në detyra të reja. Të dhënat e të 16 detyrave janë në dispozicion publik në < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'am': 'የኔural network models ለብዙ ስራ ትምህርት የተስፋ ስጦታ ማግኘታቸውን አሳይተዋል፤ ይህም የተካፈሉትን ደረጃዎች ለመማር እና የስራ-ስራ ምርጫዎችን ለመውጣት ትክክል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በተገኘው በአካባቢዎች ውስጥ፣ በተለየው የስራ ምርጫዎች ወይም በሌላ ስራ የሚያመጣው ድምፅ እንዲረክሱ ይገልጻል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም በተቃዋሚ የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ፍሬም እና እርስ በርሳቸው ማግኘት የሚካፈለውን የቅርብ እና የብሔራዊ ምርጫዎችን ማግኘት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ 16 የተለያዩ የጽሑፍ ክፍል ስራዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የተማሩት እውቀት የሸለፍ እውቀት እና ወደ አዲስ ስራ እንዲለወጥ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ሁሉንም 16 ስራ የሚያስፈልጉት ዳታ ሰርቨሮች በ < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցի մոդելները ցույց են տալիս իրենց խոստացնող հնարավորությունները բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրելու համար, որոնք կենտրոնանում են ընդհանուր շերտերի ուսումնասիրելու վրա, որպեսզի ստանան ընդհանուր և անընդհատ However, in most existing approaches, the extracted shared features are prone to be contaminated by task-specific features or the noise brought by other tasks.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հակառակ բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության շրջանակ, որը նվազեցնում է ընդհանուր և մասնավոր թաքնված առանձնահատկությունների տարածքները միմյանց ներխուժելուց: Մենք կատարում ենք էքսպենսիվ փորձեր 16 տարբեր տեքստի դասակարգման առաջադրանքների վրա, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մեր մոտեցման առավելությունները: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելի միջոցով սովորված ընդհանուր գիտելիքները կարող են համարվել անտեղյակ գիտելիքներով և հեշտությամբ փոխանցվել նոր առաջադրանքների վրա: Բոլոր 16 խնդիրների տվյալների համակարգերը հասանելի են http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ ]:', 'bn': 'নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল অনেক কাজ শিক্ষার জন্য তাদের প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল সুযোগ প্রদর্শন করেছে, যা সাধারণ এবং কাজ-অভিযানের বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ However, in most existing approaches, the extracted shared features are prone to be contaminated by task-specific features or the noise brought by other tasks.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এক বিরোধী মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা কার্যক্রমের প্রস্তাব করছি, যা শেয়ার করা এবং ব্যক্তিগত সাম্প্রতিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্থান আমরা ১৬টি ভিন্ন টেক্সট বিভিন্ন কাজের উপর বিশাল পরীক্ষা করি, যা আমাদের পদক্ষেপের সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করে। তাছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের শেয়ার করা জ্ঞান শেয়ার করা হয়েছে তাদের জ্ঞান হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা যায় যে শ সকল ১৬ কাজের ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ্যে < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'az': 'Nöral şəbəkə modelləri çoxlu işin öyrənməsi üçün və ’ d verən fırsatlarını göstərdilər ki, paylaşılmış səviyyələri öyrənmək üçün ortaq və işin-istifadəçi fərqlərini çıxartmaq üçün çoxlu işin öyrənməsi üçün odaqlanırlar. Ancaq çox mövcuddur tərzlərində, çıxarılmış paylaşılmış xüsusiyyətlər başqa işlərdən çıxarılmış səslər tərəfindən təmizlənir. Bu kağızda, bir neçə-neçə işlər öyrənməsi framework ü təklif edirik, paylaşılan və xüsusi latent fərqli alanları birbirimizə qarışmaqdan azaltır. Biz 16 müxtəlif metin klasifikasyonu işlərində çox müxtəlif təcrübələr etdik ki, bu təcrübəmizin faydalarını göstərir. Biz də göstəririk ki, öyrəndiyimiz modellərlə öyrəndiyimiz paylaşılmış bilgilər qurbanlıq elmi olaraq və yeni işlərə asanlıqla daşınabilir. Bütün 16 işlərin veri qurğuları açıq-aşkar mövcuddur < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'bs': 'Neuralni modeli mreže pokazali su svoje obećavajuće mogućnosti za učenje multitaska, koje se fokusiraju na učenje zajedničkih slojeva kako bi izvukli zajedničke i invariantne karakteristike. Međutim, u većini postojećih pristupa, izvučene zajedničke karakteristike su sklone da se kontaminiraju posebnim karakteristikama zadataka ili bukom koju donose drugi zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo neprijateljski okvir za učenje multizadataka, olakšavanje zajedničkih i privatnih latentnih prostora od mešavanja međusobno. Provodimo široke eksperimente na 16 različitih zadataka klasifikacije teksta, koji pokazuju koristi našeg pristupa. Osim toga, pokazujemo da zajedničko znanje koje je naučio naš predloženi model može biti smatrano znanjem izvan police i lako prebaceno na nove zadatke. Podaci svih 16 zadataka su javno dostupni na < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ - Da.', 'cs': 'Modely neuronálních sítí ukázaly své slibné příležitosti pro víceúlohové učení, které se zaměřují na učení sdílených vrstev pro extrakci běžných a úlohově invariantních rysů. Ve většině existujících přístupů jsou však extrahované sdílené funkce náchylné k kontaminaci vlastnostmi specifickými pro úkoly nebo hlukem přinášeným jinými úkoly. V tomto článku navrhujeme protivníkový multi-úlohový učební rámec, který zmírňuje sdílené a soukromé latentní funkční prostory od vzájemného zasahování. Provádíme rozsáhlé experimenty na šestnácti různých úlohách klasifikace textů, což ukazuje výhody našeho přístupu. Kromě toho ukazujeme, že sdílené znalosti získané naším navrženým modelem lze považovat za standardní znalosti a snadno přenést na nové úkoly. Datové sady všech 16úkolů jsou veřejně dostupné na adrese < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'et': 'Närvivõrgu mudelid on näidanud oma paljutõotavaid võimalusi mitme ülesandega õppimiseks, mis keskenduvad jagatud kihtide õppimisele, et välja tuua ühised ja ülesande invariantsed funktsioonid. Enamiku olemasolevate lähenemisviiside puhul võivad eraldatud ühised funktsioonid siiski sattuda ülesandespetsiifiliste funktsioonide või muude ülesannete tekitatud müraga. Käesolevas töös pakume välja vastastikuse mitmeülesandelise õppe raamistiku, mis leevendab ühiste ja privaatsete latentsete funktsioonide ruumide omavahelist sekkumist. Teostame ulatuslikke eksperimente 16 erineva teksti klassifitseerimisülesandega, mis näitab meie lähenemisviisi eeliseid. Lisaks näitame, et meie kavandatud mudeliga omandatud jagatud teadmisi võib pidada olemasolevateks teadmisteks ja neid saab hõlpsasti uutele ülesannetele üle kanda. Kõigi 16 ülesande andmekogumid on avalikult kättesaadavad aadressil < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'fi': 'Neuroverkkomallit ovat osoittaneet lupaavia mahdollisuuksia monitehtäväoppimiseen, jossa keskitytään yhteisten tasojen oppimiseen yhteisten ja tehtäväinvarianttien ominaisuuksien poimimiseksi. Useimmissa nykyisissä lähestymistavoissa poimitut yhteiset ominaisuudet ovat kuitenkin alttiita tehtäväkohtaisille ominaisuuksille tai muiden tehtävien aiheuttamalle melulle. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kontradikaalista monitehtäväoppimiskehystä, joka helpottaa jaettujen ja yksityisten piilevien ominaisuustilojen häirintää toisistaan. Teemme laajoja kokeiluja 16 erilaisella tekstiluokittelutehtävällä, mikä osoittaa lähestymistapamme edut. Lisäksi osoitamme, että ehdotetulla mallilla opittua jaettua tietoa voidaan pitää käyttövalmiiksi tietona ja siirtää helposti uusiin tehtäviin. Kaikkien 16 tehtävän aineistot ovat julkisesti saatavilla osoitteessa < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'ca': "Neural network models have shown their promising opportunities for multi-task learning, which focus on learning the shared layers to extract the common and task-invariant features.  Tot i així, en la majoria dels enfocaments existents, les característiques compartides extraites són propensos a ser contaminades per característiques específices a les tasques o el soroll que provoquen altres tasques. En aquest article, proposem un marc adversari d'aprenentatge multitascat, aliviant els espais latents compartits i privats de interferir entre ells. Fem experiments extensos en 16 tasques de classificació de textos diferents, que demostren els beneficis del nostre enfocament. A més, demostram que el coneixement compartit aprengut pel nostre model proposat pot ser considerat com coneixement fora de la plataforma i fàcilment transferit a noves tasques. Els conjunts de dades de totes les 16 tasques estan disponibles en < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.", 'jv': 'Mobile politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pemilih iki, kita supoyo karo multi-task öyenge kuwi, iso ngejarakake karo mulasakno lan hukum sing ngejarakake Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk kanggo 16 ulih operasi nggambar textattr Nanging, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono hal-hal kuwi tindakan karo model sing nyimpen iki bakal terus nyimpen lagi layang-layang lan ingang langgar-sistem anyar iki luwih apik dhéwé. Start a data set of all 16 tasks http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >', 'ha': "Neural network models have shown their promising opportunities for multi-task learning, which focus on learning the shared layers to extract the common and task-invariant features.  Amma kuma, cikin masu ƙayyade masu buƙata, za'a iya ƙayyade wasu feature waɗanda aka raba su da shi ko sauri wanda aka zo da wasu aikin daban. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade firam masu karanta aiki masu motsi, kuma Muke sauƙaƙara filayen da aka raba shi da kuma masu shawarar da ɗayan a shekarar farkon. Munã samun jarrabi masu yawa a kan aikin sihirin misãlai 16an, wanda ke nũna wa amfani da hanyarmu. Babu, Muna nuna cewa, da ake samun ilmi wanda aka sanar da shi daga misalinmu wanda aka buɗa shi, za'a iya gane shi zuwa-bangon-shelf kuma an saka shi zuwa aikin sãbuwa. Ana sami tsarin aiki duk 16un su da bayyane a < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >", 'sk': 'Modeli živčnih omrežij so pokazali svoje obetavne priložnosti za večopravilno učenje, ki se osredotoča na učenje skupnih plasti, da bi izvlekli skupne in invariantne funkcije opravil. Vendar pa so pri večini obstoječih pristopov izvlečene skupne funkcije nagnjene k onesnaževanju značilnosti za posamezne naloge ali hrupa, ki ga povzročajo druge naloge. V prispevku predlagamo kontradikcijski večopravilni okvir učenja, ki olajšuje skupne in zasebne latentne funkcijske prostore pred vmešavanjem med seboj. Izvajamo obsežne eksperimente na 16 različnih nalogah klasifikacije besedil, kar dokazuje koristi našega pristopa. Poleg tega pokažemo, da se lahko skupno znanje, pridobljeno z našim predlaganim modelom, obravnava kot pripravljeno znanje in se zlahka prenese na nove naloge. Podatkovni nabori vseh 16 nalog so javno dostopni na spletni strani < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'he': 'דוגמני רשת נוירולית הראו את ההזדמנויות המבטיחות שלהם ללמוד במשימות רבות, אשר מתמקדים ללמוד את השכבות המשותפות כדי להוציא את המיוחדים המשותפים והמשותפים. בכל אופן, ברוב הגישויים הנוכחים, התחומים המשותפים הנוצאים נוטים לזיהום על ידי תכונות מסויימות למשימה או הרעש שהוביל על ידי משימות אחרות. In this paper, we propose an adversarial multi-task learning framework, alleviating the shared and private latent feature spaces from interfering with each other.  אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים רחבים על 16 משימות מסווג טקסטים שונות, שמוכיחים את היתרונות של הגישה שלנו. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מראים שהידע המשותף שנלמד על ידי המודל המוצע שלנו יכול להיחשב כמידע מחוץ למדף ולהעביר בקלות למשימות חדשות. קבוצת המידע של כל 16 המשימות זמינות לציבור ב < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >.', 'bo': 'དབུལ་མཐུད་དྲ་མ་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཁས་ལེན་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་འཆར་ཡོད་པ་རྟོགས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་མ་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དེ་ཚོ་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་དམིགས་ཁྱད་པར་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གཞན་པ་ཚོས་བློ་བས In this paper, we propose an adversarial multi-task learning framework, alleviating the shared and private latent feature spaces from interfering with each other. ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ཆོས་ཉིད་མེད་པའི་ལས་ཚོགས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྣམས་མཐུན་གྱིས་དྲན་སྐོར་བྱས་པ་ལས་སྦྱར་ཆོས་ཉིད་དུ་བླ < http://nlp.fudan.edu.cn/data/ >'}
{'en': 'Neural End-to-End Learning for Computational Argumentation Mining', 'ar': 'التعلم العصبي الشامل من أجل تعدين الحجج الحسابية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje neuronal integral para la minería de argumentación computacional', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Neural de Ponta a Ponta para Mineração de Argumentação Computacional', 'fr': "Apprentissage neuronal de bout en bout pour l'exploration d'argumentation computationnelle", 'ja': '計算論証マイニングのためのニューラルエンドツーエンド学習', 'zh': '以算论掘神经端就端学', 'ru': 'Нейронное сквозное обучение для майнинга вычислительной аргументации', 'hi': 'कम्प्यूटेशनल तर्क खनन के लिए तंत्रिका अंत-से-अंत सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Néarach ó Dheireadh go Ceann le haghaidh Mianadóireacht Argóint Ríomhaireachta', 'hu': 'Neurális End-to-End tanulás a számítástechnikai argumentációs bányászatban', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Компьютерлік аргументациялық бағалау үшін неврал аяқтау- аяқтау оқытуы', 'el': 'Νευρική εξ ολοκλήρου μάθηση για την εξόρυξη υπολογιστικών επιχειρημάτων', 'lt': 'Neuralinis mokymasis nuo galo iki galo kompiuterinės argumentacijos gavybai', 'it': "Apprendimento neurale end-to-end per l'estrazione di argomenti computazionali", 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Akhir-Akhir Neural untuk Menyembah Argumentasi Komputasi', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Newrali minn Tmiem sa Tmiem għall-Argumentazzjoni Komputazzjonali Mining', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн аргументацийн багасгалын мэдрэлийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл суралцах', 'pl': 'Neural End-to-End Learning dla górnictwa argumentacji obliczeniowych', 'mk': 'Неурално учење од крај до крај за минирање на компјутациска аргументација', 'ml': 'കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന അര്\u200dഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d മിനിങ്ങിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d അവസാനം മുതല്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്നു', 'sr': 'Neuralno završeno učenje za rudarstvo kompjuterske argumentacije', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණාත්මක වාර්තාකාරණය මනින් වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරල් අවසානයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada dhamaadka ee dhamaadka ee heshiiska xisaabinta', 'no': 'Neurale slutttil sluttlæring for datamaskiner- argumentasjonsmining', 'ro': 'Învățare neurală end-to-end pentru mineritul de argumentare computațională', 'sv': 'Neural End-to-End Learning för beräkningsargumentering', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'கணிப்புப் பொருள் குறைந்ததுக்கான நிரல் முடிவுக்கு முடிவு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chương trình học kết thúc thần kinh cho chương trình nghiên cứu vi tính', 'bg': 'Неврологично обучение от край до край за изчислителна аргументация минно дело', 'hr': 'Neuralno završeno učenje za rudarstvo računalnih argumentacija', 'da': 'Neural End-to-End Learning for Computational Argumentation Mining', 'nl': 'Neural End-to-End Leren voor Computational Argumentation Mining', 'de': 'Neuronales End-to-End-Lernen für Computational Argumentation Mining', 'ko': '계산 논증 발굴에 사용되는 신경단에서 단까지 학습', 'id': 'Belajar Neural End-to-End untuk Argumentation Mining', 'fa': 'یادگیری عصبی تا پایان برای ذخیره آرژومات کامپیوتری', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kusoma Ufunzi wa Kuchunguza Msingi wa Hesabu', 'tr': 'Stencils', 'sq': 'Mësimi nga fundi në fund neuron për minierën e argumenteve komputative', 'am': 'Neural End-to-End Learning for Computational Argumentation Mining', 'az': 'Bilgisayarl캼 Argumentasyon M톛lumat캼 칲칞칲n n칬ral son-to-end 칬yr톛nm톛', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային համոզմունքի հանքարարության համար նյարդային վերջ-վերջ սովորելը', 'bn': 'কম্পিউটিশনেশন আর্গুমেন্টেশন মিনিং এর জন্য নিউরেল শেখা', 'bs': 'Neuralno završeno učenje za rudarstvo kompjuterske argumentacije', 'ca': "Aprendiment neuronal final a final per a la mineria d'arguments computacionals", 'et': 'Neuraalne lõpp-lõpuni õppimine arvutusliku argumenteerimise kaevandamiseks', 'cs': 'Neurální End-to-End učení pro výpočetní argumentační dolování', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen end-to-end oppiminen laskennallisen argumentoinnin louhintaan', 'sk': 'Nevralno učenje od konca do konca za računalniško argumentacijo rudarjenje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הלימוד העצבי בסוף עד הסוף למכרת טיעון מחשבי', 'bo': 'Computational Argumentation Mining', 'jv': 'translation" means "shift" / "displacement'}
{'en': 'We investigate neural techniques for end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM). We frame AM both as a token-based dependency parsing and as a token-based sequence tagging problem, including a multi-task learning setup. Contrary to models that operate on the argument component level, we find that framing AM as dependency parsing leads to subpar performance results. In contrast, less complex (local) tagging models based on BiLSTMs perform robustly across classification scenarios, being able to catch long-range dependencies inherent to the AM problem. Moreover, we find that jointly learning ‘natural’ subtasks, in a multi-task learning setup, improves performance.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في التقنيات العصبية لتعدين الحجج الحسابية من طرف إلى طرف (AM). نقوم بتأطير AM على حد سواء كتحليل تبعية قائم على الرمز المميز وكمشكلة وضع علامات تسلسلية قائمة على الرمز المميز ، بما في ذلك إعداد التعلم متعدد المهام. على عكس النماذج التي تعمل على مستوى مكون الوسيطة ، نجد أن تأطير AM كتحليل تبعية يؤدي إلى نتائج أداء دون المستوى. في المقابل ، تعمل نماذج العلامات الأقل تعقيدًا (المحلية) المستندة إلى BiLSTMs بقوة عبر سيناريوهات التصنيف ، حيث تكون قادرة على التقاط التبعيات بعيدة المدى المتأصلة في مشكلة AM. علاوة على ذلك ، وجدنا أن التعلم المشترك للمهام الفرعية "الطبيعية" ، في إعداد تعلم متعدد المهام ، يحسن الأداء.', 'pt': "Investigamos técnicas neurais para mineração de argumentação computacional (AM) de ponta a ponta. Nós enquadramos o AM como uma análise de dependência baseada em token e como um problema de marcação de sequência baseado em token, incluindo uma configuração de aprendizado multitarefa. Ao contrário dos modelos que operam no nível do componente de argumento, descobrimos que enquadrar AM como análise de dependência leva a resultados de desempenho abaixo da média. Em contraste, modelos de marcação menos complexos (locais) baseados em BiLSTMs funcionam de forma robusta em cenários de classificação, sendo capazes de capturar dependências de longo alcance inerentes ao problema de AM. Além disso, descobrimos que o aprendizado conjunto de subtarefas 'naturais', em uma configuração de aprendizado multitarefa, melhora o desempenho.", 'es': 'Investigamos técnicas neuronales para la minería de argumentación computacional (AM) de extremo a extremo. Enmarcamos la AM como un análisis de dependencias basado en tokens y como un problema de etiquetado de secuencias basado en tokens, que incluye una configuración de aprendizaje multitarea. A diferencia de los modelos que operan en el nivel de componente de argumento, encontramos que enmarcar la AM como análisis de dependencias conduce a resultados de rendimiento deficientes. Por el contrario, los modelos de etiquetado (local) menos complejos basados en BILSTM funcionan de manera sólida en todos los escenarios de clasificación, pudiendo detectar dependencias de largo alcance inherentes al problema de AM. Además, descubrimos que el aprendizaje conjunto de subtareas «naturales», en una configuración de aprendizaje multitarea, mejora el rendimiento.', 'fr': "Nous étudions les techniques neuronales pour l'exploration d'argumentation computationnelle (AM) de bout en bout. Nous concevons AM à la fois comme une analyse de dépendance basée sur des jetons et comme un problème de marquage de séquence basé sur des jetons, y compris une configuration d'apprentissage multitâche. Contrairement aux modèles qui fonctionnent au niveau du composant d'argument, nous constatons que le tramage AM comme analyse de dépendance conduit à des résultats de performance inférieurs à la moyenne. En revanche, les modèles de marquage (locaux) moins complexes basés sur BILSTM fonctionnent de manière robuste dans tous les scénarios de classification, étant capables de détecter les dépendances à long terme inhérentes au problème de FA. De plus, nous constatons que l'apprentissage conjoint de sous-tâches «\xa0naturelles\xa0», dans une configuration d'apprentissage multitâche, améliore les performances.", 'ja': '私たちは、エンドツーエンドの計算引数マイニング（ AM ）のためのニューラルテクニックを調査します。私たちは、マルチタスク学習セットアップを含む、トークンベースの依存関係解析とトークンベースのシーケンスタグ付けの両方の問題としてAMをフレーム化します。引数コンポーネントレベルで動作するモデルとは逆に、依存関係解析としてAMをフレーミングすると、パフォーマンスが低下する結果につながることがわかります。対照的に、ＢｉＬＳＴＭに基づくより複雑でない（ローカル）タグ付けモデルは、分類シナリオ間で堅牢に実行し、Ａ Ｍ問題に固有の長距離依存性をキャッチすることができる。さらに、マルチタスク学習設定で「自然な」サブタスクを共同学習すると、パフォーマンスが向上することがわかります。', 'zh': '究其端到端计算论掘(AM)之神经术。 吾以AM为基令牌之恃解析与令牌之序,多任务学设之。 与参数组件等相反,则AM构为恃解析则性至下矣。 比之于 BiLSTM 者不甚杂()表于类而坚于类,能获 AM 者远程恃也。 此外见多任务学设中,共学自然子务。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем нейронные методы для сквозной вычислительной аргументации майнинга (AM). Мы создаем AM как синтаксический анализ зависимостей на основе токенов, так и проблему маркировки последовательностей на основе токенов, включая настройку многозадачного обучения. В отличие от моделей, которые работают на уровне компонента аргумента, мы находим, что фреймирование АП как синтаксический анализ зависимостей приводит к неполным результатам производительности. Напротив, менее сложные (локальные) модели маркировки, основанные на BiLSTM, работают надежно в различных сценариях классификации, будучи способными ловить зависимости на большие расстояния, присущие проблеме АП. Кроме того, мы обнаружили, что совместное обучение «естественным» подзадачам в многозадачной обучающей среде улучшает производительность.', 'hi': "हम एंड-टू-एंड कम्प्यूटेशनल तर्क खनन (एएम) के लिए तंत्रिका तकनीकों की जांच करते हैं। हम एएम को टोकन-आधारित निर्भरता पार्सिंग के रूप में और एक टोकन-आधारित अनुक्रम टैगिंग समस्या के रूप में फ्रेम करते हैं, जिसमें एक बहु-कार्य सीखने का सेटअप भी शामिल है। तर्क घटक स्तर पर काम करने वाले मॉडल के विपरीत, हम पाते हैं कि निर्भरता पार्सिंग के रूप में एएम को तैयार करना सबपर प्रदर्शन परिणामों की ओर जाता है। इसके विपरीत, BiLSTMs पर आधारित कम जटिल (स्थानीय) टैगिंग मॉडल वर्गीकरण परिदृश्यों में मजबूती से प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जो AM समस्या के लिए निहित लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं को पकड़ने में सक्षम होते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम पाते हैं कि संयुक्त रूप से 'प्राकृतिक' उप-कार्य सीखने के उप-कार्य सेटअप में, एक बहु-कार्य सीखने के सेटअप में, प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है।", 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar theicnící néaracha do mhianadóireacht argóinte ríomhaireachtúil (AM). Cuirimid AM mar pharsáil spleáchais atá bunaithe ar chomharthaí agus mar fhadhb chlibeála seichimh chomhartha-bhunaithe, lena n-áirítear socrú foghlama il-tasc. Murab ionann agus samhlacha a fheidhmíonn ar leibhéal an chomhpháirte argóinte, feicimid go dtagann torthaí feidhmíochta subpar as AM a chumadh mar pharsáil spleáchais. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, feidhmíonn samhlacha clibeála nach bhfuil chomh casta (áitiúil) atá bunaithe ar BiLSTManna go láidir thar chásanna aicmithe, agus iad in ann spleáchais fadraoin a bhaineann le fadhb AM a ghabháil. Ina theannta sin, feicimid go bhfeabhsaítear an fheidhmíocht trí chomhfhoghlaim subtas ‘nádúrtha’, i socrú foghlama il-tasc.', 'hu': 'Vizsgáljuk az end-to-end számítástechnikai argumentációs bányászat (AM) neurális technikáit. Az AM-t token alapú függőség-elemzésként és token alapú szekvencia-címkézési problémaként keretezzük be, beleértve a többfeladatos tanulási beállítást is. Az argumentum komponens szintjén működő modellekkel ellentétben úgy találjuk, hogy az AM keretezése függőség-elemzésként alulpáros teljesítményrendszerhez vezet. Ezzel szemben a BiLSTMs alapú kevésbé összetett (helyi) címkézési modellek robusztus teljesítményt nyújtanak az osztályozási forgatókönyvek között, képesek felismerni az AM problémával járó hosszú távú függőségeket. Ezenkívül úgy találjuk, hogy a "természetes" részfeladatok közös tanulása többfeladatos tanulási rendszerben javítja a teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε νευρωνικές τεχνικές για εξορυκτική υπολογιστική επιχειρηματολογία (ΑΜ). πλαισιώνουμε την ΑΜ τόσο ως ανάλυση εξαρτήσεων με βάση τα σήματα όσο και ως πρόβλημα επισήμανσης ακολουθίας με βάση τα σήματα, συμπεριλαμβανομένης μιας εγκατάστασης εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Σε αντίθεση με τα μοντέλα που λειτουργούν σε επίπεδο στοιχείων ορίσματος, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η πλαισίωση ως ανάλυση εξαρτήσεων οδηγεί σε κατώτερα αποτελέσματα απόδοσης. Αντίθετα, τα λιγότερο πολύπλοκα (τοπικά) μοντέλα σήμανσης που βασίζονται σε αποδίδουν εύρωστα σε όλα τα σενάρια ταξινόμησης, είναι σε θέση να πιάσουν εξαρτήσεις μεγάλης εμβέλειας εγγενείς στο πρόβλημα ΑΜ. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η κοινή εκμάθηση "φυσικών" υποτάξεων, σε μια μαθησιακή ρύθμιση πολλαπλών εργασιών, βελτιώνει την απόδοση.', 'ka': "ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ნეიროლური ტექნოგიები კომპუტაციალური არგუმენტიკაციის მინიერებაზე (AM). ჩვენ AM-ს გამოსახულებთ როგორც ტექნონის დასახულებული დასახულებელობის პარასტირება და როგორც ტექნონის დასახულებელი წერტილების პრობლემა, როგორც მრავალური დასწავლებ არგუმენტის კომპონენტების დონეზე მუშაობაში მოდელების შეცდომა, ჩვენ მივიღეთ, რომ AM-ის გამოყენება როგორც დადარჩენებულობა პარასუმენტის შეცდომა კონტრასტურად, ბიLSTMs-ის ბაზაზე უფრო კომპლექსიკური (ლოკალური) მოდელები კლასიფიკაციის სინარიოში გავაკეთებენ, რომლებიც ძალიან ძალიან გავაკეთებენ, რომლებიც AM პრობლე დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ `ნერიოლური' საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი სწავლობაში, უ", 'it': 'Investighiamo tecniche neurali per il mining di argomentazione computazionale end-to-end (AM). Incorniciamo AM sia come un\'analisi delle dipendenze basata su token che come un problema di tag di sequenza basato su token, inclusa una configurazione di apprendimento multi-task. Contrariamente ai modelli che operano a livello di componente argomento, troviamo che l\'framing AM come analisi delle dipendenze porta a risultati di prestazioni inferiori. Al contrario, modelli di tagging meno complessi (locali) basati su BiLSTMs funzionano in modo robusto in tutti gli scenari di classificazione, essendo in grado di rilevare dipendenze a lungo raggio inerenti al problema AM. Inoltre, scopriamo che l\'apprendimento congiunto di sottoattività "naturali", in una configurazione di apprendimento multi-task, migliora le prestazioni.', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame neurologinius metodus, skirtus galutiniam skaičiavimo argumentų gavybai (AM). Mes apibrėžiame AM kaip ženklais pagrįstą priklausomybės analizavimą ir kaip ženklais pagrįstą sekos žymėjimo problem ą, įskaitant daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistemą. Priešingai nei modeliai, kurie veikia argument ų komponentų lygmeniu, mes manome, kad AM nustatymas kaip priklausomybės analizė lemia dalinių rezultatų rezultatus. Priešingai, mažiau sudėtingi (vietiniai) ženklinimo modeliai, pagrįsti BiLSTM, atlieka tvirtai įvairiuose klasifikavimo scenarijuose ir gali nustatyti didelę priklausomybę nuo AM problemos. Be to, mes konstatuojame, kad bendras „natūralaus“ mokymasis įvairių užduočių mokymosi sistemoje gerina veiklos rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Біз компьютерлік аргументациялық бағдарламасының соңындағы невралдық техникаларын (ТМ) зерттеуді. Көп тапсырмаларды оқыту мәселесі болса, біз AM-ді токтен негізделген тәуелдік талдау ретінде және токтен негізделген тапсырмаларды тегтердің мәселесі ретінде қолданамыз. Аргументтің компоненттің деңгейінде жұмыс істейтін үлгілеріне қарсы, AM фреймінің тәуелсіздік талдау ретінде көмектесетін нәтижелерді жасайды. Осымен қарамастан, BiLSTMs негіздеген комплекс (жергілікті) тегтердің үлгілері классификациялық сценарияларында тәжірибеледі. Олар AM мәселесіне қатысты ұзындық аумағындағы тәуелдіктерді алу Көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін біріктіріміз, бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін әрекеттерді жақсарту.', 'mk': "Истражуваме нервни техники за производство на компјутациски аргументи од крај до крај (AM). Го рамкуваме AM како анализирање на зависноста базирана на знаци и како проблем со означување на секвенца базирана на знаци, вклучувајќи и поставување на учење со повеќе задачи. Во спротивност на моделите кои функционираат на нивото на компонентот на аргументот, откриваме дека рамките на АМ како анализирање на зависноста водат до резултати на резултатите на субпер. За разлика од тоа, помалку комплексните (локални) модели за означување базирани на BiLSTMs извршуваат силно низ сценаријата за класификација, со можност да се фатат долгорочни зависности кои се природни на проблемот со AM. Moreover, we find that jointly learning `natural' subtasks, in a multi-task learning setup, improves performance.", 'ms': "Kami menyelidiki teknik saraf untuk perlombongan argumen komputasi akhir-akhir (AM). Kami bingkai AM kedua-dua sebagai penghuraian dependensi berdasarkan token dan sebagai masalah penghuraian urutan berdasarkan token, termasuk seting belajar berbilang-tugas. Berlawan dengan model yang beroperasi pada aras komponen argumen, kami mendapati bahawa bingkai AM sebagai penghuraian dependensi membawa kepada keputusan prestasi subpar. Sebaliknya, model tag yang kurang kompleks (setempat) berdasarkan BiLSTM melakukan secara kuat melalui skenario klasifikasi, mampu menangkap dependensi jangkauan panjang yang ada pada masalah AM. Selain itu, kami mendapati bahawa pembelajaran bersama-sama 'natural' subtasks, dalam seting pembelajaran berbilang-tugas, meningkatkan prestasi.", 'ml': "We investigate neural techniques for end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM).  നമ്മള്\u200d എം രണ്ടുപേരെയും തെളിവുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്നു. അടയാളപ്പെട്ട സെക്കന്\u200dസ്  ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ് ഘടനയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ ആശ്രയിതമായ പാര്\u200dജ വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, ബിഎല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച് പ്രശ്നമായ (ലോക്കല്\u200d ടാഗിങ്ങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d, ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷ അതുകൊണ്ടും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ' ഉപാധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത്, പല ജോലികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കൂട്ടത്ത", 'mt': 'Aħna ninvestigaw tekniki newrali għat-tħaffir ta’ argumenti komputattivi minn tarf sa tarf (AM). Aħna nqabbdu l-AM kemm bħala analiżi tad-dipendenza bbażata fuq it-tokens kif ukoll bħala problem a tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza bbażata fuq it-tokens, inkluż struttura ta’ tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti. Għall-kuntrarju tal-mudelli li joperaw fuq il-livell tal-komponent tal-argument, isibu li l-framing AM bħala l-analiżi tad-dipendenza jwassal għal riżultati tal-prestazzjoni tas-subpar. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, mudelli ta’ tikkettar (lokali) anqas kumplessi bbażati fuq BiLSTMs iwettqu b’mod robust fix-xenarji ta’ klassifikazzjoni kollha, li jkunu jistgħu jaqbdu dipendenzi fuq medda twila inerenti għall-problema tal-AM. Barra minn hekk, isibu li t-tagħlim konġunt “naturali” jissottosfidi, f’struttura ta’ tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti, itejjeb il-prestazzjoni.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker nøyralteknikk for slutt-til-slutt datamaskinminering (AM). Vi rammer AM både som eit tolking av avhengighet basert på token og som eit problem med merking av rekkjefølgja, inkludert eit oppsett med fleire oppgåver. I motsetning til modeller som fungerer på argument-komponentsnivået, finn vi at ramma AM som tolking av avhengighet fører til underpar-resultat. I contrast, less complex (local) tagging models based on BiLSTMs perform robustly across classification scenarios, being able to catch long-range dependencies inherent to the AM problem. I tillegg finn vi at saman læring av «naturleg» underspørsmål, i eit oppsett av fleire oppgåver, forbetrar utviklinga.', 'pl': 'Badamy techniki neuronowe dla kompleksowego wydobywania argumentacji obliczeniowej (AM). Ramujemy AM zarówno jako parsowanie zależności oparte na tokenach, jak i jako problem tagowania sekwencji oparty na tokenach, w tym wielozadaniową konfigurację uczenia się. W przeciwieństwie do modeli działających na poziomie komponentów argumentu, stwierdzimy, że ramowanie AM jako parsowanie zależności prowadzi do niskich wyników wydajności. Natomiast mniej złożone (lokalne) modele tagowania oparte na BiLSTMach działają solidnie w różnych scenariuszach klasyfikacji, umożliwiając wyłapanie zależności dalekiego zasięgu związanych z problemem AM. Ponadto zauważamy, że wspólne uczenie się "naturalnych" podzadań, w wielozadaniowej konfiguracji uczenia się, poprawia wydajność.', 'ro': 'Investigăm tehnici neurale pentru mineritul de argumentare computațională end-to-end (AM). Încadram AM atât ca o analiză a dependențelor bazată pe token, cât și ca o problemă de etichetare a secvențelor bazată pe token, inclusiv o configurație de învățare multi-task. Contrar modelelor care operează la nivelul componentelor argumentului, constatăm că încadrarea AM ca analizare a dependenței duce la rezultate de performanță subterană. În schimb, modelele de etichetare mai puțin complexe (locale) bazate pe BiLSTMs funcționează robust în scenariile de clasificare, fiind capabile să prindă dependențele de rază lungă inerente problemei AM. Mai mult decât atât, constatăm că învățarea în comun a subactivităților "naturale", într-o configurație de învățare multi-sarcină, îmbunătățește performanța.', 'mn': "Бид тооцоолох аргументын хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд мэдрэлийн техникуудыг судалж байна. Бид AM-г хоёуланг тооны үндсэн хамааралтай хуваалцах болон тооны үндсэн дарааллын загварын асуудал болгож, олон ажлын суралцах сургалтын тусламжтай болгоно. Аргументийн компонентийн түвшинд ажиллаж байгаа загваруудын эсрэг бид АМ-г хамааралтай хуваалцааны хэлбэрээр дүрслэх нь үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүнд хүргэж байна. Харамсалтай нь, BiLSTMs дээр бага комплекс (орон нутгийн) маркингийн загварууд нь ангилалын хувилбар дээр маш бага байдаг. Тэд AM асуудлын тухай урт хувилбар хамааралтай хамааралтай байдаг. Мөн бид олон ажил суралцах сургалтын тусламжтайгаар `байгалийн' суралцах суралцах нь үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг.", 'sr': 'Istražujemo neuralne tehnike za rudarstvo računalnih argumentacija (AM). Smatramo AM kao analizu zavisnosti na tokeni i kao problem označavanja sekvence na tokeni, uključujući nastavu multi task učenja. Za suprotno modelima koji rade na nivou komponenta argumenta, smatramo da okviranje AM kao analizanje ovisnosti vodi do rezultata prednosti. Za razliku od toga, manje kompleksnih (lokalnih) modela označavanja na temelju BiLSTMs izvršavaju jak preko scenarija klasifikacije, u mogućnosti da uhvate dugogodišnje zavisnosti pod problemom AM. Osim toga, našli smo da zajednički učenje "prirodne" podatke, u multizadatku učenje, poboljšava učenje.', 'so': "Waxaannu baaraynaa qalabka neurada ee ugu dhammaadka dhamaadka qiimeynta xisaabinta (AM). Waxaannu qornaa AM oo ah baaritaanka ku xiran ee calaamad ku saleysan iyo dhibaato ku saabsan calaamad tagging, kuwaas oo ah koob waxbarasho badan. Isku xiriir tusaalooyinka ka shaqeeya heerka wadanka, waxaynu aragnaa in barxadda ku saleysan AM oo ah mid ku xiran baaritaanka ku saabsan, waxay ku leedahay resultada sameynta subpar. Taas ka duwan, samooyin ka yar (deegaan) oo ku saleysan BiLSTMs waxay ku sameyn karaan dhibaatada AM. Sidoo kale waxaynu helaynaa in iskuul ka barashada subaxyada `dabiicadda', taas oo lagu hagaajiyo waxbarashada shaqo badan.", 'sv': 'Vi undersöker neurala tekniker för end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM). Vi ramar AM både som en token-baserad beroendetolkning och som ett token-baserat sekvensmärkningsproblem, inklusive en multi-task inlärningsinställning. I motsats till modeller som fungerar på argumentkomponentnivå, finner vi att ramar in AM som beroendetolkning leder till resultat för underordnad prestanda. Däremot fungerar mindre komplexa (lokala) märkningsmodeller baserade på BiLSTMs robust över klassificeringsscenarier och kan fånga upp långdistansberoenden som är förknippade med AM-problemet. Dessutom finner vi att gemensamt lärande av "naturliga" underuppgifter, i en multi-task lärande setup, förbättrar prestanda.', 'si': "අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න න්\u200dයූරාල් තාක්ෂණය (AM). අපි AM දෙන්නම ටොකෙන් අධාරිත විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න හා ටොකෙන් අධාරිත විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ මොඩේල් එක්ක විරුද්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි හොයාගන්නේ AM ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂ ව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන්, බිල්ස්ට් වල අධිරූපයෙන් පරික්ෂිත (ස්ථානික) ටැග් නිර්මාණය කරන්න බිල්ස්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන තවත්, අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, `ස්වභාවික' විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ප්\u200dර", 'ta': "We investigate neural techniques for end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM).  நாம் AM இரண்டையும் ஒரு குறியீடு சார்ந்த சார்பு பாசிட்டு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு அடிப்படையான தொடர் குறியீடு பிரச்சனையாக அமை வார்ப்பு கூறு நிலையில் செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு தொடர்பு, சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாடலாக வரைதல் AM என்பதை தெரிந்து கொள்க மாறாக, பில்எஸ்டிஸ் அடிப்படையிலான குறைந்த சிக்கலான (உள்ளூர்ந்த) ஒட்டும் மாதிரிகள் வகைப்படுத்தல் காட்சியில் முழுவதுமாக செயல்படுகிறது,  மேலும் 'இயல்பான' உப பணிகளை ஒன்றாக கற்று கொள்வதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், பல பணிகள் கற்றல் அமைப்பில், செயல்பாட்டை மேம்பட", 'ur': 'ہم نے نئورل ٹیکنیک کی تحقیق کی آخر-پایان کامپیوٹریشن آرژومنٹ مینینگ (AM) کے لئے۔ ہم AM کو ٹوکین بنیادی dependency پارسینگ اور ٹوکین بنیادی ٹاگنگ مشکل کے طور پر فرم کریں، ایک multi-task learning setup شامل کریں. مدلکوں کے مقابلہ میں جو آرکوم کمونٹ سطح پر عمل کرتی ہیں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ا م م کی ڈرامینٹ پارسینٹ کی حالت میں کمانٹ پارسینٹ کے نتائج کی وجہ سے ہے. مقابلہ میں، کم پیچیدہ (محلی) ٹاگنگ موڈل جو BiLSTMs پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں کلاسپی سینارییوں میں زیادہ مضبوط عمل کرتے ہیں، جو AM مسئلہ کے باعث طویل مدینہ کے اعتباری کو پکڑ سکتے ہیں. اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ "طبیعی" سٹسٹسٹسٹسٹسٹسٹسٹ کی تعلیم ملی ٹسٹسٹ میں، عملکرد کو بہتر کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz kompyuterning oxirigi qiymatni (AM) qo'shish uchun neyural teknikalarni o'rganamiz. Biz AM ko'plab vazifa o'rganishni o'rganishni ko'plab o'rganish muammolari sifatida qo'llanmiz. @ info: whatsthis Ikkinchi darajada, BiLSTMs asosida yaratilgan murakkab (lokal) teglash modellari boshqa darajalashtirish imkoniyatlarida oddiy bajariladi, AM muammosiga murakkab boʻlgan uzun masofadan qoʻllash mumkin. Ko'p vazifalar o'rganish tugmasini bir necha vazifa o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz va bajarishni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi điều tra kỹ thuật thần kinh để khai thác các chương trình khai quật. Chúng tôi sắp xếp AM là phân tích phụ thuộc dựa trên biểu tượng... và là một vấn đề kích thích các chuỗi các chuỗi, bao gồm cả một cài đặt tập tin đa nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi thấy, trái với những mẫu dùng trên cấp bộ phận lập luận, đổ bộ dạng AM làm phân tích độ phụ thuộc dẫn đến kết quả siêu đẳng. Tuy nhiên, mô hình nhận dấu vết ít phức tạp (cục bộ) dựa trên BiLSTM thực hiện mạnh mẽ trong các mô- đun phân hạng, có khả năng bắt các tình huống thuộc cấp độ dài gắn liền với ma trận AM. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thấy việc học chung các chữ'tự nhiên'phụ đề cải thiện hiệu suất trong một thiết lập tập luyện đa nhiệm vụ.", 'bg': 'Изследваме невронни техники за изчислителна аргументация от край до край (АМ). Рамкираме както като анализ на зависимостта въз основа на символи, така и като проблем с етикетиране на последователност въз основа на символи, включително настройка за обучение с множество задачи. Противно на моделите, които работят на ниво компонент на аргумента, откриваме, че рамкирането на АМ като анализ на зависимостта води до подпочвени резултати от ефективността. За разлика от това, по-малко сложните (локални) модели за маркиране, базирани на БиЛСТМ, работят надеждно в различните сценарии за класификация, като могат да улавят зависимости от дълъг обхват, присъщи на проблема с АМ. Освен това откриваме, че съвместното учене на "естествени" подзадачи, в настройка за обучение с множество задачи, подобрява ефективността.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger neurale teknikker til end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM). Vi indrammer AM både som en token-baseret afhængighedsanalyse og som et token-baseret sekvensmærkningsproblem, herunder en multi-task learning opsætning. I modsætning til modeller, der opererer på argumentkomponentniveau, finder vi, at indramning af AM som afhængighedsanalyse fører til resultater af delvist ydeevne. I modsætning hertil fungerer mindre komplekse (lokale) taggmodeller baseret på BiLSTMs robust på tværs af klassifikationsscenarier, idet de er i stand til at fange langdistanceafhængigheder forbundet med AM-problemet. Desuden finder vi, at læring af naturlige underopgaver i fællesskab i en multi-task læring setup forbedrer ydeevnen.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo neuralne tehnike za rudarstvo računalnih argumentacija (AM). Smatramo AM kao analizu ovisnosti na tokeni i kao problem označavanja sekvence na tokeni, uključujući nastavu multizadataka učenja. Za suprotnost modelima koji djeluju na razini komponenta argumenta, smatramo da okviranje AM kao analizanje ovisnosti vodi do rezultata učinkovitosti. Za razliku od toga, manje kompleksnih (lokalnih) modela označavanja na temelju BiLSTMs-a izvršavaju snažno preko scenarija klasifikacije, u mogućnosti uhvatiti dugogodišnje zavisnosti pod problemom AM-a. Osim toga, mi smatramo da zajedno učenje prirodne podatke u multizadatku učenje poboljšava učenje.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen neuronale Techniken für End-to-End Computational Argumentation Mining (AM). Wir fassen AM sowohl als tokenbasiertes Dependency Parsing als auch als tokenbasiertes Sequenz-Tagging-Problem ein, einschließlich einer Multi-Task-Lerneinrichtung. Im Gegensatz zu Modellen, die auf der Ebene der Argumentkomponente arbeiten, stellen wir fest, dass das Framing AM als Abhängigkeitsparsing zu unterdurchschnittlichen Leistungsergebnissen führt. Im Gegensatz dazu funktionieren weniger komplexe (lokale) Tagging-Modelle, die auf BiLSTMs basieren, robust über Klassifikationsszenarien hinweg und können weitreichende Abhängigkeiten erfassen, die dem AM-Problem inhärent sind. Darüber hinaus stellen wir fest, dass das gemeinsame Lernen von "natürlichen" Teilaufgaben in einem Multi-Task-Lernaufbau die Leistung verbessert.', 'nl': "We onderzoeken neurale technieken voor end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM). We kaderen AM zowel als een token-based dependence parsing als als een token-based sequence tagging probleem, inclusief een multi-task learning setup. In tegenstelling tot modellen die werken op het niveau van argumentcomponenten, vinden we dat het framen van AM als afhankelijkheidsparsing leidt tot ondermaatse prestatieresultaten. Minder complexe (lokale) taggingmodellen op basis van BiLSTMs presteren daarentegen robuust in alle classificatiescenario's, waardoor ze afhankelijkheden op lange afstand kunnen opvangen die inherent zijn aan het AM-probleem. Bovendien zien we dat het gezamenlijk leren van 'natuurlijke' subtaken, in een multi-task leeropstelling, de prestaties verbetert.", 'id': "Kami menyelidiki teknik saraf untuk argumen komputasi akhir-akhir pertambangan (AM). Kami frame AM keduanya sebagai penghuraian dependensi berdasarkan token dan sebagai masalah penghuraian urutan berdasarkan token, termasuk seting belajar multi-tugas. Berbeda dengan model yang beroperasi pada tingkat komponen argumen, kami menemukan bahwa bingkai AM sebagai penghuraian dependensi membawa ke hasil prestasi subpar. Sebaliknya, model tagging (lokal) yang kurang kompleks berdasarkan BiLSTM melakukan secara robust di seluruh skenario klasifikasi, mampu menangkap dependensi jangkauan panjang yang inheren pada masalah AM. Selain itu, kami menemukan bahwa bersama-sama belajar 'alami' subtasks, dalam seting belajar multi-tugas, meningkatkan prestasi.", 'sw': 'Tunafanya uchunguzi wa mbinu za kisasa kwa ajili ya uchimbaji wa mazungumzo ya kompyuta wa mwisho (AM). Tunaitengeneza AM zote kama kitengo cha kutegemea kwa kutumia alama na kama tatizo la viungo kwa msingi, ikiwa ni pamoja na taasisi ya kujifunza kazi nyingi. Tofauti na mifano inayofanya kazi katika kiwango cha mazungumzo, tunagundua kuwa unyanyasaji wa chama cha AM kama vile unavyotegemea parsing unapelekea matokeo ya utendaji wa ubora. Tofauti na hilo, mitindo duni ya viungo vinavyotumiwa na BiLSTMs hufanya vibaya katika maeneo mbalimbali ya vifasi, na wanaweza kushika matumaini ya muda mrefu yanayohusu tatizo la AM. Zaidi ya hayo, tunagundua kuwa pamoja kujifunza majukumu ya “asilia”, katika mfumo wa kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi, huboresha utendaji.', 'tr': "Son-soňra hesaplamak madencisi (AM) üçin nöral teknikleri inceleýäris. Biz AM'i token tabanlı bağlılıklı ayırma şeklinde ve token tabanlı sıralama problemi olarak çeviririz. Bir çok görev öğrenmesi de dahil. Argüment komponent seviyesinde işleyen modellerin tersine, AM çizimlerini bağlılık ayırması olarak alt üstüne gösterir. BiLSTMs'lere daýanýar taýça karmaşık (ýerli) etiketleme nusgalary klasifikasyýa senaryýalarynda gaty edip, AM meselä ähmiýeti bilen uzak daýry baglanyşlaryny ele bilerler. Mundan soňra, biz `tebigy' alt soraglary bilen öwrenmek üçin birnäçe işi öwrenmek üçin eserlerni gowdurýarys.", 'fa': 'ما تکنیک\u200cهای عصبی برای خروج مجموعه\u200cهای کامپیوتری (AM) را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما AM را به عنوان پرداخت بستگی بر اساس علامت و به عنوان یک مشکل نقاشی بر اساس علامت قرار می دهیم، شامل یک تنظیم یادگیری چندین کار. بر خلاف مدل\u200cها که روی سطح رقم ارجمند عملکرد می\u200cکنند، می\u200cبینیم که فرم\u200cبندی AM به عنوان بررسی بستگی به نتیجه\u200cهای عملکرد زیر بررسی می\u200cکند. بر خلاف این، مدل\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cتر (محلی) بر اساس بیلس\u200cتس\u200cها در سیناریو\u200cهای مختلف عملی انجام می\u200cدهند، که می\u200cتوانند بستگی\u200cهای طولانی از مدت طولانی در مسئله\u200cی مشکل AM را بگیرند. علاوه بر این، ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که با همدیگر تحقیقات طبیعی را یاد می\u200cگیریم، در یک سازمان یادگیری زیادی کار، عملکرد را بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sq': "Ne hetojmë teknikat nervore për minierën e argumenteve kompjuterike (AM). We frame AM both as a token-based dependency parsing and as a token-based sequence tagging problem, including a multi-task learning setup.  Në kundërshtim me modelet që funksionojnë në nivelin e komponenteve të argumentit, ne gjejmë se korniza AM si analiza e varësisë çon në rezultatet e paraqitjes subpar. Në ndryshim, modelet më pak komplekse (lokale) të etiketave të bazuara në BiLSTMs kryejnë me forcë në skenarët e klasifikimit, duke qenë në gjendje të kapin varësitë e distancës së gjatë të lidhura me problemin AM. Përveç kësaj, gjejmë se mësimi i përbashkët i nëndetyrave `natyrore', në një sistem mësimi me shumë detyra, përmirëson performancën.", 'am': "የውጤት የውጤት አካባቢ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ መቆጣጠርን እናፈልጋለን፡፡ አሜን በተለያዩ የስራ ትምህርት ትምህርት ማግኘት እና የግንኙነት መቆጣጠር እና የግንኙነት መቆጣጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአውራሲ አካባቢ አካባቢ ደረጃ ላይ የሚሠራውን ምሳሌዎች በተቃራረበ አሜሪካን በመደገፍ የፓርቲ ማሳየት አካባቢ ፍሬዎችን ማሳየት እናገኘዋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ቢልSTMs በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ አካባቢ (lokal) የሚተካክሉ (ባሕላዊ) መተላለፊያዎች በክፍለ ግንኙነት ላይ በተመሳሳይ ማዕከላዊ ክፍል በሙሉ ይሠራሉ፡፡ ደግሞም `ፍጥረታዊ' ደብዳቤዎችን ለመማር በብዛት ስራ ትምህርት መሥራትን ያሳድጋል፡፡", 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջ-վերջ հաշվարկների բանավեճման նյարդային տեխնիկաները (ԱՄ). Մենք կառուցնում ենք ԱՄ-ը որպես նշաններով հիմնված կախվածության վերլուծում և որպես նշաններով հիմնված հաջորդականության նշանների խնդիր, ներառյալ բազմապատկած ուսուցման կառուցվածք: Հակառակ այն մոդելներին, որոնք գործում են բանավեճի բաղադրիչների մակարդակի վրա, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ կախվածության վերլուծումը համապատասխանում է ԱՄ-ի շրջանակների արդյունքներին: Ի հակառակ դրան, ավելի քիչ բարդ (տեղական) նշանների մոդելները, որոնք հիմնված են ԲիԼՍՏՄ-ների վրա, կարողանում են լավագույն դասակարգման սցենարներում, որպեսզի կարողանան բռնել ԱՄ-ի խնդիրը բնորոշ երկար տարած Ավելին, մենք գտնում ենք, որ միասին «բնական» ուսումնասիրությունը բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության կառուցվածքում բարելավում է արդյունքը:', 'af': "Ons ondersoek neurale teknike vir end- to- end rekenaarsie argumentasiemining (AM). Ons raam AM beide as 'n token-gebaseerde afhanklikheid verwerking en as 'n token-gebaseerde volgorde merking probleem, insluitend 'n multi-taak leer opstelling. In teenstelling met modele wat werk op die argument komponent vlak, vind ons dat raam van AM as afhanklikheid verwerking lei na subpar prestasie resultate. In contrast, minder kompleks (plaaslike) etiketing modele gebaseer op BiLSTMs uitvoer kragtig oor klassifikasie scenarios, wat in staat kan haal langomvang afhanklikhede wat inherent aan die AM probleme is. Maar ons vind dat joint leer 'natuurlike' subtaske, in 'n multi-taak leer opstelling, verbeter die prestasie.", 'az': 'Biz sona qədər bilgisayar argumentasyonu maddə etmək üçün nöral tekniklərini incidirik. Biz AM hər ikisini token-tabanlı bağımlılıq ayırması və token-tabanlı sıralama problemi olaraq, çoxlu işin öyrənməsi problemi də dahil edərik. Argüment komponentlərin səviyyəsində işləyən modellərə qadağan olun ki, AM-ni bağımlılıq ayırması kimi çarpılması sonuçlarına dəyişdirir. Daha az kompleks (yerli) etiketli modellər BiLSTMs-lərə dayanan klasifikasiya senaryoyların arasında möhkəm işlər edir. Onlar AM problemində olan uzun səviyyədə bağımlılıqları tutub saxlayarlar. Daha sonra, çoxlu işin öyrənməsində "təbiətli" subtasklarını birlikdə öyrənmək, performansını yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'শেষ পর্যন্ত গণনামূলক যুক্তির খনির জন্য আমরা নিউরেল কৌশল তদন্ত করি। আমরা এমনকে প্রত্যেকটি চিহ্নিত ভিত্তিক নির্ভর পার্সিং হিসেবে ফ্রেম করে দিচ্ছি এবং একটি চিহ্নিত সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং সমস্যা হিসেবে  আর্গুমেন্ট কম্পোনেন্টেন্ট পর্যায়ে কাজ করা মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে এম-এর বিরুদ্ধে নির্ভর পার্সিং হিসেবে  বিএলস্টিমিস ভিত্তিক কমপ্ল্যাক্স (স্থানীয়) ট্যাগিং মডেল বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বিভিন্ন ক্লাসাফিকেশনের বিভিন্ন স্থানীয় বিষয় এছাড়াও আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে একসঙ্গে ‘প্রাকৃতিক’ সাবট্যাক্স শিক্ষার্থীর শিক্ষা প্রদান করা, বহুক্ষেত্রের শিক্ষ', 'ko': "우리는 끝에서 끝까지 계산 논증 발굴(AM)에 쓰이는 신경 기술을 연구한다.우리는 AM을 다중 임무 학습 설정을 포함하여 영패 기반의 의존 해석과 영패 기반의 서열 표기 문제로 정의할 것이다.매개변수 어셈블리 레벨에서 실행되는 모델과 반대로 AM을 종속성 해석으로 사용하면 표준 성능 결과보다 낮은 결과를 얻을 수 있습니다.이에 비해 BILSTM을 바탕으로 하는 비교적 복잡하지 않은 (부분적) 표기 모델은 분류 장면에서 강세를 보이고 AM 문제의 고유한 장기 의존성을 포착할 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 다중 임무 학습 환경에서'자연'하위 임무를 연합하여 학습하면 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.", 'bs': 'Istražujemo neuralne tehnike za rudarstvo računalnih argumentacija (AM). Smatramo AM kao analizu ovisnosti na tokenima i kao problem označavanja sekvence na tokenima, uključujući nastavu multi task učenja. Za suprotno modelima koji rade na nivou komponenta argumenta, smatramo da okviranje AM kao analizanje ovisnosti vodi do rezultata prednosti. Za razliku od toga, manje kompleksnih (lokalnih) modela označavanja na temelju BiLSTMs izvode jače preko scenarija klasifikacije, u mogućnosti uhvatiti dugoročne zavisnosti pod problemom AM. Osim toga, smatramo da zajednički učenje "prirodne" podatke, u multizadatku učenje, poboljšava učenje.', 'ca': "Investiguem tècniques neuronals per a la mineria d'arguments computacionals (AM). Frametzem el AM tant com una analització de dependencies basada en fitxes com com un problem a d'etiquetar seqüències basada en fitxes, incloent una configuració d'aprenentatge multitasca. Contrary to models that operate on the argument component level, we find that framing AM as dependency parsing leads to subpar performance results.  En canvi, els models d'etiquetage menys complexes (locals) basats en BiLSTMs actuen de manera robusta en escenaris de classificació, tenint la capacitat de capturar dependencies a llarg distància inherents al problema AM. A més, trobem que aprendre conjuntament subtaskes `natural', en una estructura d'aprenentatge multitasca, millora el rendiment.", 'cs': 'Vyšetřujeme neuronové techniky pro end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM). AM zarámečujeme jak jako analýzu závislostí založený na tokenech, tak jako problém značení sekvencí založený na tokenech, včetně nastavení více úkolů učení. Na rozdíl od modelů, které pracují na úrovni komponent argumentů, zjišťujeme, že rámování AM jako analýza závislostí vede k podmírným výsledkům výkonu. Naproti tomu méně složité (lokální) modely značení založené na BiLSTMech fungují robustně napříč klasifikačními scénáři a jsou schopny zachytit dlouhodobé závislosti, které jsou součástí problému AM. Kromě toho zjišťujeme, že společné učení "přirozených" dílčích úkolů ve víceúkolovém učení zlepšuje výkon.', 'et': 'Uurime neurotehnikaid lõpp-lõpuni arvutusliku argumentatsiooni kaevandamiseks (AM). Raamime AM-i nii märgistuspõhise sõltuvuse parsimise kui märgistuspõhise jadapõhise sildistamise probleemina, sealhulgas mitme ülesandega õppe seadistusena. Erinevalt argumendikomponentide tasandil töötavatest mudelitest leiame, et AM raamimine sõltuvuspartsimisena toob kaasa alamväärtuste tulemused. Seevastu BiLSTMidel põhinevad vähem keerukad (kohalikud) märgistusmudelid toimivad klassifitseerimisstsenaariumides usaldusväärselt, võimaldades tuvastada AM probleemile omaseid pikaajalisi sõltuvusi. Lisaks leiame, et ühiselt õppida "loomulikke" alamülesandeid mitme ülesandega õppimise seadistuses parandab tulemuslikkust.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme neurotekniikoita end-to-end laskennallisen argumentoinnin louhintaan (AM). Kehitämme AM:n sekä token-pohjaiseksi riippuvuuden jäsentämiseksi että token-pohjaiseksi sekvenssi tagging-ongelmaksi, mukaan lukien monitehtävän oppimisen asetukset. Toisin kuin argumenttikomponenttitasolla toimivat mallit, huomaamme, että AM:n kehystäminen riippuvuuden jäsentämiseksi johtaa alimpiin suorituskykytuloksiin. Sen sijaan BiLSTMiin perustuvat vähemmän monimutkaiset (paikalliset) tagausmallit toimivat luotettavasti kaikissa luokitusskenaarioissa ja pystyvät havaitsemaan AM-ongelmaan liittyvät pitkän kantaman riippuvuudet. Lisäksi huomaamme, että "luonnollisten" alitehtävien oppiminen yhdessä monitehtäväoppimisessa parantaa suorituskykyä.', 'jv': "section We frame AM all as a token-basic diphensitive PASSing and as a token-basic sec tagging question, include a multi-task Learning setup. CURRENTCURRENT Tulung wigatining, model sing komplikasi (lokal) sing basa batasan BiLTT mruput gak nggawe senari diputasane senoro dianglarasi, iso nguasai perusahaan langgar-diangregani diputasane sing nggawe gerakan akeh dumadhi mengko AM senoro diangregani. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerti 'normal' tarjamahan, ning sampek multi-task sing mulai, njaluk kanggo ngerasakno", 'he': 'We investigate neural techniques for end-to-end computational argumentation mining (AM).  אנחנו מסגרים את אמ.איי. גם כבדיקת תלויות מבוססת על סימנים וכבעיה של סימנים מבוססת על סימנים, כולל ערכת למידה רבה משימות. בניגוד לדוגמנים שמפעילים ברמה של רכיבי הטיעון, אנו מוצאים שמסגרת אמ. בניגוד לזה, מודלים של תגים (מקומיים) פחות מורכבים מבוססים על BiLSTMs מבצעים חזקים ברחבי תרחישים מסווגים, להיות מסוגלים לתפוס תלויות לטווח ארוך הנכונות לבעיה AM. חוץ מזה, אנו מוצאים שלמדה משותפת "טבעית", במערכת למידה רבה משימות, משפר את ההופעה.', 'sk': 'Raziskujemo nevronske tehnike za računalniško argumentacijsko rudarjenje (AM) od konca do konca. AM okvirjamo tako kot razčlenjevanje odvisnosti na podlagi žetonov kot težavo z označevanjem zaporedja na podlagi žetonov, vključno z nastavitvijo učenja z več opravili. V nasprotju z modeli, ki delujejo na ravni komponente argumenta, ugotavljamo, da okvirjanje AM kot razčlenjevanje odvisnosti vodi do podčasnih rezultatov uspešnosti. Nasprotno pa manj kompleksni (lokalni) modeli označevanja, ki temeljijo na BiLSTMs, delujejo zanesljivo v različnih scenarijih razvrščanja, saj lahko ujamejo odvisnosti dolgega dosega, ki so povezane s problemom AM. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da skupno učenje "naravnih" podnalog v večopravilnem učenju izboljšuje učinkovitost.', 'ha': "Ina ƙidãya masu aikin hanyoyin neura da ke ƙara zuwa ƙari ga rabo da ake lissafa (AM). Mu frame AM dukansu kamar salon da aka banga bangi da ãyar ayuka da kuma kamar wata matsayin tagoging-bane da ãyoyin, da kuma a sami tsarin da aka sanar da masu aiki masu yawa. Tsariya da masallatan da ke yi amfani da kan girmar argument, za'a gane cewa misalin AM kamar parse da inganci, yana ƙara zuwa fassaran muhimmanci. In contrast, less complex (local) tagging models based on BiLSTMs perform robustly across classification scenarios, being able to catch long-range dependencies inherent to the AM problem.  Kayya, Munã sãmu cẽwa, a cikin an sami karatun task õkin `asayya' da aka sani, yana ƙaranci mafarinsa.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བརྟན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་AM་ལྟར་ཚགས་དང་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་ཊེ་ཀིར་གཞི་རྟེན་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་དཀའ Contrary to models that operate on the argument component level, we find that framing AM as dependency parsing leads to subpar performance results. In contrast, less complex (local) tagging models based on BiLSTMs perform robustly across classification scenarios, being able to catch long-range dependencies inherent to the AM problem. ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱིས་རང་རུང་བའི་རྗེས་སུ་ཤེས་འཇུག་པ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་ཤོས་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Neural Symbolic Machines : Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Weak Supervision', 'ar': 'الآلات الرمزية العصبية: تعلم المحللات الدلالية على Freebase مع إشراف ضعيف', 'pt': 'Máquinas simbólicas neurais: aprendendo analisadores semânticos em Freebase com supervisão fraca', 'fr': 'Machines symboliques neuronales\xa0: apprentissage des analyseurs sémantiques sur Freebase avec une faible supervision', 'es': 'Máquinas simbólicas neuronales: aprendizaje de analizadores semánticos en Freebase con supervisión débil', 'ja': 'ニューラルシンボリックマシン：弱い監視でフリーベースでセマンティックパーサーを学習する', 'zh': '神经符号机器:学语义解析器于弱监之Freebase', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका प्रतीकात्मक मशीनें: कमजोर पर्यवेक्षण के साथ Freebase पर शब्दार्थ पार्सर्स सीखना', 'ru': 'Нейронные символические машины: изучение семантических парсеров на свободной основе со слабым надзором', 'ga': 'Meaisíní Siombalacha Néaracha: Parsálaithe Séimeantacha a Fhoghlaim ar Freebase le Maoirseacht Lag', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური სიმბოლიკური მაქინები: სემანტიკური პერსერების შესწავლობა Freebase- ში', 'hu': 'Neurális szimbolikus gépek: Szemantikus parserek tanulása szabadban gyenge felügyelettel', 'el': 'Νευρικές Συμβολικές Μηχανές: Μάθηση Σημματικών Αναλυτών σε Ελεύθερη Βάση με αδύναμη Εποπτεία', 'it': 'Macchine simboliche neurali: imparare i parser semantici su Freebase con scarsa supervisione', 'kk': 'Невралдық символдық машиналар: Freebase бақылау үшін семантикалық парзерлерді оқыту', 'mk': 'Неурални симболички машини: Научи семантични анализатори на слободна база со слаба надзора', 'ms': 'Mesin Symbolik Neural: Mempelajari Penghurai Semantik pada Pangkalan Bebas dengan Supervisi Lemah', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d: സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dസ് ഫ്രീബാസില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ സൂപ്പര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл символын машинууд: Сэтгэл суралцах суралцах', 'mt': 'Magni Symboliċi Newrali: Tagħlim ta’ Parsers Semantiċi fuq bażi ħielsa b’Superviżjoni dgħajfa', 'no': 'Neurale symbolske maskiner: Læring av semantiske tolkar på Freebase med kraft oversikt', 'pl': 'Neuralne maszyny symboliczne: uczenie się parserów semantycznych na Freebase z słabym nadzorem', 'ro': 'Mașini simbolice neurale: Învățarea parserilor semantici pe bază liberă cu supraveghere slabă', 'sr': 'Neuralne simboličke mašine: učenje semantičkih roditelja na Freebase sa slabim nadzorom', 'sv': 'Neurala symboliska maskiner: Att lära sig semantiska tolkare på fri bas med svag övervakning', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාල් සංකේතික මැෂින්ස්: සෙමැන්ටික් පාර්සර්ස් ඉගෙනගන්න බ්\u200dරීබේස් එක්ක අවශ්\u200dය සාධා', 'so': 'Machinooyinka Neural Symbolic: Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Saw Supervision', 'ta': 'புதிய குறியீட்டு இயந்திரங்கள்:', 'ur': 'نیورال سیمبولیک ماشین: کمزور نظر کے ساتھ فریبیس پر سیمنٹی پارسر سکھائی', 'lt': 'Neuralinės simbolinės mašinos: Semantinių analizatorių mokymas laisvoje bazėje su silpna priežiūra', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name là:', 'bg': 'Нервни символични машини: изучаване на семантични парализатори на свободна база с слаб надзор', 'da': 'Neurale symbolske maskiner: Læring af semantiske fortolkere på freebase med svag overvågning', 'nl': 'Neurale Symbolische Machines: Semantische Parsers leren op Freebase met zwak toezicht', 'hr': 'Neuralne simboličke mašine: učenje semantičkih roditelja na slobodnoj bazi s slabim nadzorom', 'de': 'Neuronale symbolische Maschinen: Semantische Parser auf Freebase mit schwacher Überwachung lernen', 'id': 'Neural Symbolic Machines: Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Weak Supervision', 'fa': 'ماشین\u200cهای سیم\u200cبولیک عصبی: یاد گرفتن پزشک\u200cهای سیم\u200cمانتیک روی پایگاه\u200cهای Freebase با نظارت ضعیف', 'ko': '신경 기호기: 자유 기반 학습 의미 분석기', 'sw': 'Mashine ya Tamko: Kufundisha Wabunge wa Semantic kwenye Uhuru wa Uhuru', 'tr': 'unit-format', 'af': 'Neurale simboliese masjiene: Leer Semantiese verwerkers op Freebase met swak Supervisie', 'sq': 'Neural Symbolic Machines: Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Weak Supervision', 'am': 'Neural Symbolic Machines: Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Weak Supervision', 'az': 'N칬ral Simbolik Makinel톛r', 'hy': 'Նյարդային սիմբոլիկ մեքենաներ. Սեմանտիկ խմբագրողներ սովորելը ազատ հիմքում թույլ վերահսկողությամբ', 'bs': 'Neuralne simboličke mašine: učenje semantičkih roditelja na Freebase sa slabim nadzorom', 'cs': 'Neurální symbolické stroje: Učení sémantických parserů na Freebase se slabým dohledem', 'bn': 'নিউরেল প্রতীক মেশিন: দুর্বল সুপারিভিশনের সাথে ফ্রিবাসে সেমান্টিক প্যারাস শিক্ষা দেয়া', 'et': 'Närvisümboolsed masinad: semantiliste parsertide õppimine vababaasis nõrga järelevalvega', 'ca': 'Màquines neurològiques simbòliques: Aprendre analitzadors Semàtics a Freebase amb debilitat de supervisió', 'fi': 'Neurosymboliset koneet: Semanttisten parsereiden oppiminen Freebasella heikolla valvonnalla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Neural Symbolic Machines: Learning Semantic Parsers on Freebase with Weak Supervision', 'sk': 'Živčni simbolični stroji: učenje semantičnih razpravljalnikov na Freebase s slabim nadzorom', 'jv': 'Caret', 'bo': 'ནུས་པ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་Machines ། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་རང་དབང་རྩིས་གཞིའི་ནང་དུ་ཉམས་འཇོག་པ'}
{'en': 'Harnessing the statistical power of neural networks to perform language understanding and symbolic reasoning is difficult, when it requires executing efficient discrete operations against a large knowledge-base. In this work, we introduce a Neural Symbolic Machine, which contains (a) a neural programmer, i.e., a sequence-to-sequence model that maps language utterances to programs and utilizes a key-variable memory to handle compositionality (b) a symbolic computer, i.e., a Lisp interpreter that performs program execution, and helps find good programs by pruning the search space. We apply REINFORCE to directly optimize the task reward of this structured prediction problem. To train with weak supervision and improve the stability of REINFORCE, we augment it with an iterative maximum-likelihood training process. NSM outperforms the state-of-the-art on the WebQuestionsSP dataset when trained from question-answer pairs only, without requiring any feature engineering or domain-specific knowledge.', 'ar': 'يعد تسخير القوة الإحصائية للشبكات العصبية لأداء فهم اللغة والتفكير الرمزي أمرًا صعبًا ، عندما يتطلب تنفيذ عمليات منفصلة فعالة ضد قاعدة معرفية كبيرة. في هذا العمل ، نقدم آلة رمزية عصبية ، والتي تحتوي على (أ) "مبرمج" عصبي ، أي نموذج تسلسل إلى تسلسل يقوم بتعيين الكلمات اللغوية للبرامج ويستخدم ذاكرة متغيرة رئيسية للتعامل مع التركيب (ب) "كمبيوتر" رمزي ، أي مترجم Lisp الذي يقوم بتنفيذ البرنامج ، ويساعد في العثور على برامج جيدة عن طريق تشذيب مساحة البحث. نحن نطبق REINFORCE لتحسين مكافأة مهمة مشكلة التنبؤ المنظمة هذه بشكل مباشر. للتدريب مع إشراف ضعيف وتحسين استقرار REINFORCE ، قمنا بتزويده بعملية تدريب تكرارية ذات احتمالية قصوى. يتفوق NSM على أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في مجموعة بيانات WebQuestionsSP عندما يتم تدريبه من أزواج إجابات الأسئلة فقط ، دون الحاجة إلى أي هندسة للميزات أو معرفة خاصة بالمجال.', 'pt': 'Aproveitar o poder estatístico das redes neurais para realizar a compreensão da linguagem e o raciocínio simbólico é difícil, quando requer a execução de operações discretas eficientes em uma grande base de conhecimento. Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma Máquina Simbólica Neural, que contém (a) um “programador” neural, ou seja, um modelo sequência-a-sequência que mapeia enunciados da linguagem para programas e utiliza uma memória de variável-chave para lidar com a composicionalidade (b) um “computador” simbólico, ou seja, um interpretador Lisp que executa a execução do programa, e ajuda a encontrar bons programas, podando o espaço de busca. Aplicamos REINFORCE para otimizar diretamente a recompensa da tarefa deste problema de previsão estruturada. Para treinar com supervisão fraca e melhorar a estabilidade do REINFORCE, nós o aprimoramos com um processo de treinamento iterativo de máxima probabilidade. O NSM supera o que há de mais moderno no conjunto de dados WebQuestionsSP quando treinado apenas com pares de perguntas e respostas, sem exigir nenhum conhecimento específico de domínio ou engenharia de recursos.', 'fr': "Il est difficile d'exploiter la puissance statistique des réseaux de neurones pour effectuer une compréhension du langage et un raisonnement symbolique, lorsqu'il faut exécuter des opérations discrètes efficaces sur une base de connaissances étendue. Dans ce travail, nous présentons une machine symbolique neuronale, qui contient (a) un «\xa0programmeur\xa0» neuronal, c'est-à-dire un modèle séquence-séquence qui met en correspondance les énoncés de langage avec les programmes et utilise une mémoire de variable clé pour gérer la compositionalité (b) un «\xa0ordinateur\xa0» symbolique, c'est-à-dire un interpréteur Lisp qui exécute le programme exécution, et aide à trouver de bons programmes en réduisant l'espace de recherche. Nous appliquons REFORCE pour optimiser directement la récompense des tâches de ce problème de prédiction structurée. Pour s'entraîner avec une supervision faible et améliorer la stabilité de REFORE, nous l'ajoutons à un processus itératif de formation à maximum de vraisemblance. NSM surpasse les performances les plus récentes sur le jeu de données WebQuestionSSP lorsqu'il est formé à partir de paires question-réponse uniquement, sans nécessiter d'ingénierie des fonctionnalités ou de connaissances spécifiques au domaine.", 'es': 'Es difícil aprovechar el poder estadístico de las redes neuronales para llevar a cabo la comprensión del lenguaje y el razonamiento simbólico, cuando se requiere ejecutar operaciones discretas eficientes contra una gran base de conocimientos. En este trabajo, presentamos una máquina simbólica neuronal, que contiene (a) un «programador» neuronal, es decir, un modelo de secuencia a secuencia que mapea las expresiones del lenguaje a los programas y utiliza una memoria clave-variable para manejar la composicionalidad (b) un «ordenador» simbólico, es decir, un intérprete de Lisp que realiza el programa y ayuda a encontrar buenos programas recortando el espacio de búsqueda. Aplicamos REFORCE para optimizar directamente la recompensa de la tarea de este problema de predicción estructurada. Para entrenar con una supervisión débil y mejorar la estabilidad de REINFORCE, lo aumentamos con un proceso de entrenamiento iterativo de máxima probabilidad. NSM supera al estado de la técnica en el conjunto de datos WebQuestionSSP cuando se entrena solo a partir de pares de preguntas y respuestas, sin necesidad de ningún conocimiento de ingeniería de características o dominio específico.', 'ja': '大規模な知識ベースに対して効率的な離散操作を実行する必要がある場合、ニューラルネットワークの統計的な力を利用して言語理解と記号的推論を実行することは困難である。 この作業では、ニューラルシンボリックマシンを紹介します。これには、(a)ニューラルな「プログラマ」、すなわち、言語の発話をプログラムにマッピングし、キー変数のメモリを利用して構成性を処理するシーケンスツーシーケンスモデル、(b)シンボリックな「コンピュータ」、すなわち、プログラム実行を実行するLISPインタプリタが含まれ、検索スペースを枝刈りすることによって優れたプログラムを見つけるのに役立ちます。 この構造化された予測問題のタスク報酬を直接最適化するために、強化を適用します。 監督の弱いトレーニングを行い、補強の安定性を向上させるために、最大尤度トレーニングプロセスを繰り返して拡張します。 NSMは、機能エンジニアリングやドメイン固有の知識を必要とせず、質問応答ペアのみからトレーニングすると、WebQuestionsSPデータセットの最先端を上回ります。', 'zh': '用神经网络之数,以行言语符号之难,以其有大知识库离散也。 于此等事,引入一神经符号机器,含(a)一神经"程序员",即一序至序,映语言于序而用键变量存储器以处组合(b)一符号"计算机",即执行程序执行之Lisp解释器,因剪索以助之。 吾当以强化直优化结构化之。 教习于弱 REINFORCE 之稳定性,迭代之大者似然加焉。 NSM 在 WebQuestionsSP 数集上唯问对训练,性优先进,无所特征特定域。', 'hi': 'भाषा की समझ और प्रतीकात्मक तर्क करने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की सांख्यिकीय शक्ति का उपयोग करना मुश्किल है, जब इसे एक बड़े ज्ञान-आधार के खिलाफ कुशल असतत संचालन निष्पादित करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम एक तंत्रिका प्रतीकात्मक मशीन पेश करते हैं, जिसमें (ए) एक तंत्रिका "प्रोग्रामर" होता है, यानी, एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल जो कार्यक्रमों के लिए भाषा के उच्चारण को मैप करता है और रचनात्मकता को संभालने के लिए एक कुंजी-चर स्मृति का उपयोग करता है (बी) एक प्रतीकात्मक "कंप्यूटर", यानी, एक लिस्प दुभाषिया जो प्रोग्राम निष्पादन करता है, और खोज स्थान की छंटाई करके अच्छे कार्यक्रमों को खोजने में मदद करता है। हम सीधे इस संरचित भविष्यवाणी समस्या के कार्य इनाम को अनुकूलित करने के लिए सुदृढ़ लागू होते हैं। कमजोर पर्यवेक्षण के साथ प्रशिक्षित करने और सुदृढ़ की स्थिरता में सुधार करने के लिए, हम इसे एक पुनरावर्ती अधिकतम-संभावना प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के साथ बढ़ाते हैं। एनएसएम WebQuestionsSP डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक को मात देता है जब केवल प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े से प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, बिना किसी सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग या डोमेन-विशिष्ट ज्ञान की आवश्यकता के।', 'ru': 'Использование статистической мощности нейронных сетей для понимания языка и символического мышления является сложной задачей, когда для этого требуется выполнение эффективных дискретных операций против большой базы знаний. В этой работе мы представляем Нейронную Символическую Машину, которая содержит (а) нейронный «программист», то есть модель последовательности к последовательности, которая отображает языковые высказывания в программы и использует память с ключом-переменной для обработки композиционности (b) символический «компьютер», то есть интерпретатор Lisp, который выполняет выполнение программы и помогает находить хорошие программы, сокращая пространство поиска. Мы применяем УСИЛЕНИЕ, чтобы напрямую оптимизировать вознаграждение за задание этой задачи структурированного прогнозирования. Чтобы тренироваться со слабым надзором и улучшить стабильность АРМИРОВАНИЯ, мы дополняем его итеративным процессом обучения с максимальной вероятностью. NSM превосходит современный набор данных WebQuestionsSP при обучении только из пар вопросов и ответов, не требуя каких-либо знаний в области разработки функций или специфических для домена знаний.', 'ga': 'Is deacair leas a bhaint as cumhacht staitistiúil na líonraí néaracha chun tuiscint teanga agus réasúnaíocht shiombalach a dhéanamh, nuair a éilíonn sé oibríochtaí scoite éifeachtúla a dhéanamh i gcoinne bonn mór eolais. Sa saothar seo, tugaimid Meaisín Siombalach Néarach isteach, ina bhfuil (a) “ríomhchláraitheoir” néarach, i.e., samhail seicheamh go seicheamh a mhapálann cainteanna teanga chuig cláir agus a úsáideann cuimhne eochrach-athróg chun comhdhéanamh a láimhseáil (b) “ríomhaire” siombalach, i.e., ateangaire Lisp a dhéanann cur i gcrích clár, agus a chuidíonn le teacht ar chláir mhaithe tríd an spás cuardaigh a bhearradh. Cuirimid REINFORCE i bhfeidhm chun an luach saothair tasc a bhaineann leis an bhfadhb struchtúrtha tuartha seo a bharrfheabhsú go díreach. Chun oiliúint a chur faoi mhaoirseacht lag agus chun cobhsaíocht REINFORCE a fheabhsú, cuirimid leis le próiseas oiliúna atriallach uasta-dóchúlachta. Is fearr le NSM an tacar sonraí is déanaí ar WebQuestionsSP nuair a chuirtear oiliúint air ó phéirí ceisteanna-freagra amháin, gan aon ghá le haon innealtóireacht ghnéis nó eolas a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann.', 'ka': "ნეიროლური ქსელების სტატისტიკური ძალადობის გამოყენება ენების სხვადასხვა და სიმბოლოგიური პარამენტის შესაძლებლობა ძალიან რთულია, როდესაც ის უნდა გამოყენება ეფექტიური ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ნეიროლური სიმბოლოგიური მაქსინი, რომელიც a) ნეიროლური 'პროგრამირებელი', მაგალითად სიმბოლოგიური მოდელი, რომელიც პროგრამებში ენის სიტყვების შესახებ და გამოყენებს კომპოგრამის გაცვლელი მეხსინი, რომელიც სიმბოლოგიური 'კომპუტერი ჩვენ REINFORCE-ს გამოყენებთ ამ სტრუქტურაციული პრობლემების რაოდენობას პრობლემების პრობლემების პრობლემების პრობლემების დააკ რომელიც უფრო ძალიან დანარწმუნებელია და უფრო უფრო უფრო მუშაობელია REINFORCE-ის სტაბლიტურობას, ჩვენ მისი განვითარებით მაქსიმალური შესაძლებლობა NSM მხოლოდ WebQuestionsSP მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთან მხოლოდ, როცა მხოლოდ კითხვა-პასუხ", 'it': "Sfruttare il potere statistico delle reti neurali per eseguire la comprensione del linguaggio e il ragionamento simbolico è difficile, quando richiede l'esecuzione di operazioni discrete efficienti contro una vasta base di conoscenze. In questo lavoro introduciamo una Neural Symbolic Machine, che contiene (a) un 'programmatore' neurale, cioè un modello sequenza-sequenza che mappa le espressioni linguistiche ai programmi e utilizza una memoria variabile-chiave per gestire la compositità (b) un 'computer' simbolico, cioè un interprete Lisp che esegue l'esecuzione del programma, e aiuta a trovare buoni programmi potando lo spazio di ricerca. Applichiamo REINFORCE per ottimizzare direttamente la ricompensa delle attività di questo problema predittivo strutturato. Per allenarci con una supervisione debole e migliorare la stabilità di REINFORCE, lo ampliamo con un processo iterativo di allenamento con massima probabilità. NSM supera lo stato dell'arte del dataset WebQuestionsSP quando viene addestrato solo da coppie domanda-risposta, senza richiedere alcuna funzionalità ingegneristica o conoscenza specifica del dominio.", 'hu': 'A neurális hálózatok statisztikai erejének kihasználása a nyelvmegértés és a szimbolikus érvelés elvégzésére nehéz, amikor hatékony diszkrét műveletek végrehajtására van szükség egy nagy tudásbázis ellen. Ebben a munkában bemutatunk egy Neural Symbolic Machine-t, amely (a) egy neurális "programozót", azaz egy szekvencia-szekvencia modellt tartalmaz, amely leképezi a nyelvi kimondásokat programokhoz, és egy kulcsváltozó memóriát használ a kompozicionalitás kezelésére (b) egy szimbolikus "számítógépet", azaz egy Lisp tolmácsot, amely programvégrehajtást végez, és segít megtalálni a jó programokat a keresési terület metszésével. A REINFORCE segítségével közvetlenül optimalizáljuk a strukturált előrejelzési probléma feladatjutalmát. A REINFORCE gyenge felügyelet mellett történő edzéshez és stabilitásának javításához egy iteratív maximális valószínűségű edzési folyamattal bővítjük. Az NSM kizárólag kérdés-válasz párokból készült képzések esetén teljesíti a WebQuestionsSP adatkészleten található legkorszerűbb adatokat, anélkül, hogy szolgáltatásmérnöki vagy tartományspecifikus ismereteket igényelne.', 'el': "Η αξιοποίηση της στατιστικής δύναμης των νευρωνικών δικτύων για την κατανόηση της γλώσσας και τη συμβολική συλλογιστική είναι δύσκολη, όταν απαιτεί την εκτέλεση αποτελεσματικών διακριτών λειτουργιών σε μια μεγάλη βάση γνώσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια Νευρική Συμβολική Μηχανή, η οποία περιέχει (α) έναν νευρωνικό 'προγραμματιστή', δηλαδή ένα μοντέλο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας που χαρτογραφεί τις γλωσσικές εκφράσεις σε προγράμματα και χρησιμοποιεί μια μνήμη κλειδί-μεταβλητής για να χειριστεί τη σύνθεση (β) έναν συμβολικό 'υπολογιστή', δηλαδή έναν διερμηνέα που εκτελεί την εκτέλεση προγράμματος, και βοηθά στην εύρεση καλών προγραμμάτων κλαδεύοντας το χώρο αναζήτησης. Εφαρμόζουμε για να βελτιστοποιήσουμε άμεσα την ανταμοιβή εργασίας αυτού του δομημένου προβλήματος πρόβλεψης. Για να εκπαιδεύσουμε με αδύναμη επίβλεψη και να βελτιώσουμε τη σταθερότητα του το ενισχύουμε με μια επαναλαμβανόμενη διαδικασία εκπαίδευσης μέγιστης πιθανότητας. Το NSM ξεπερνά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων όταν εκπαιδεύεται μόνο από ζεύγη ερώτησης-απάντησης, χωρίς να απαιτείται μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών ή γνώσεις ειδικού τομέα.", 'kk': 'Тілді түсіндіру мен символдық түсіндіру үшін невралдық желінің статистикалық қуатын қолдану қиындығы қиын, бұл үлкен білім негізіне қарсы ефективні дискретті операцияларды орында Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз невралдық символдық машинаны таңдаймыз, бұл невралдық "бағдарламаны" бағдарламаларға тіл сөздерін картап, композициялық (b) символдық "компьютер" дегенді басқару үшін, яғни бағдарламаларды орындайтын лисп интерпретері болып, іздеу орынын басып жақсы бағдарламаларды табуға к Біз бұл құрылған тапсырма мәселесінің тапсырманы тәртіпті оптимизациялау үшін REINFORCE қолданамыз. Күліп қарау және ҚАЙТАР-қарау тәуелсіздігін жақсарту үшін оны қайталау мүмкіндігінің максималдық оқыту процесімен көтереміз. NSM тек сұрақ-жауаптар екеуінен оқылған кезде, WebQuestionsSP деректер қорларының орындалық күйін жасайды, ешқандай инженерлік не доменге ерекше білім керек болмаса.', 'mk': 'Искористувањето на статистичката моќ на невровните мрежи за да се изврши разбирање на јазикот и симболично размислување е тешко, кога бара извршување ефикасни дискретни операции против голема база на знаење. Во оваа работа, воведуваме неврална симболичка машина, која содржи (a) неврален „програмер“, т.е., модел од секвенца до секвенца кој ги мапира јазичките изрази на програмите и користи клучна-променлива меморија за да се справи со композицијалноста (b) симболичен „компјутер“, т.е., интерпретач на Lisp кој извршува извршување на програмата, и помага да се најдат добри програми со притискање на потр Ние аплицираме REINFORCE за директно оптимизирање на наградата за задачата на овој структуриран проблем со предвидување. За да тренираме со слаб надзор и да ја подобриме стабилноста на РЕИНФОРЦА, го додаваме со повторен процес на обука со максимална веројатност. NSM outperforms the state-of-the-art on the WebQuestionsSP dataset when trained from question-answer pairs only, without requiring any feature engineering or domain-specific knowledge.', 'ms': 'Harnessing the statistical power of neural networks to perform language understanding and symbolic reasoning is difficult, when it requires executing efficient discrete operations against a large knowledge-base.  Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan Mesin Symbolik Neural, yang mengandungi (a) pemrogram neural, iaitu model jujukan-ke-jujukan yang memetakan ungkapan bahasa kepada program dan menggunakan memori perubahan-kunci untuk mengendalikan komposisi (b) komputer simbolik, iaitu penerjemah Lisp yang melaksanakan pelaksanaan program, dan membantu mencari program yang baik dengan menggosok ruang gelintar. Kami melaksanakan REINFORCE untuk secara langsung optimize hadiah tugas masalah ramalan struktur ini. Untuk berlatih dengan pengawasan lemah dan meningkatkan kestabilan REINFORCE, kita menambahkannya dengan proses latihan maksimum kemungkinan berulang-ulang. NSM melampaui kemajuan pada set data WebQuestionsSP apabila dilatih dari pasangan soalan-jawapan sahaja, tanpa memerlukan sebarang teknik ciri atau pengetahuan domain-spesifik.', 'lt': 'Nervų tinklų statistinės galios panaudojimas kalbų supratimui ir simboliniam pagrįstumui atlikti yra sudėtingas, kai reikalaujama veiksmingų diskretinių operacijų vykdymo atsižvelgiant į didelę žinių bazę. Šiame darbe įdiegiame neurologinę simbolinę mašiną, kurioje yra a) neurologinis "programatorius", t. y. sekos-sekos modelis, kuriame program ų kalbos i šraiškos žemėlapizuojamos ir naudojamos pagrindinės kintamosios atminties kompozicijai tvarkyti; b) simbolinis "kompiuteris", t. y. Lisp vertėjas, kuris atlieka programų vykdymą, ir padeda rasti gerų programų suspausdindamas paieškos erdvę. We apply REINFORCE to directly optimize the task reward of this structured prediction problem.  Siekiant mokytis su silpna priežiūra ir pagerinti REINFORCE stabilumą, mes jį papildysime pakartotiniu mokymo procesu, kurio didžiausia tikimybė yra didesnė. NSM atlieka geriausią pažangą WebQuestionsSP duomenų rinkinyje, kai jis mokomas tik iš klausimų ir atsakymų porų, nereikalaujant jokių ypatybių inžinerijos ar konkrečios srities žinių.', 'ml': "ഭാഷയിലെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രീയ ശക്തിയുടെ സ്ഥിതികശക്തിയാണ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d ചിഹ്ന മെഷീന്\u200d നാം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതില്\u200d (a) ന്യൂറല്\u200d 'പ്രോഗ്രാമേറ്റര്\u200d' ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. അതില്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാമുകള്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രോഗ്രാമിന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു  നേരിട്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഈ പ്രവചന പ്രശ്നത്തിന്\u200dറെ ജോലിയുടെ പ്രതിഫലം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  ദുര്\u200dബലമായ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാനും റെയിന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dസിയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനും പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനും വേണ്ടി, അതിനെ കൂട വെബ്ക്വിഷന്\u200dസ്എസ്പി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d NSM പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യ-ഉത്തരം ജോടികളില്\u200d ന", 'mt': 'L-użu tas-setgħa statistika tan-netwerks newrali biex jitwettaq fehim lingwistiku u raġunament simboliku huwa diffiċli, meta jeħtieġ li jitwettqu operazzjonijiet diskreti effiċjenti kontra bażi kbira ta’ għarfien. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nintroduċu Makkinarju Symboliku Newrali, li fih (a) programmator newrali, jiġifieri mudell sekwenza-sekwenza li jimmappa l-espressjonijiet lingwistiċi għal programmi u juża memorja ewlenija-varjabbli biex jimmaniġġja l-kompożizzjonialità (b) kompjuter simboliku, jiġifieri interpretu Lisp li jwettaq l-e żekuzzjoni tal-programm, u jgħin isib programmi tajbin billi jnaqqas l-ispazju tat-tiftix. Aħna napplikaw IR-RIINFORZA biex noptimizzaw direttament il-premju tal-kompitu ta’ din il-problema strutturata ta’ tbassir. Biex inħarrġu b’superviżjoni dgħajfa u ntejbu l-istabbiltà tar-REINFORCE, aħna nżidu b’proċess ta’ taħriġ iterattiv ta’ probabbiltà massima. NSM iwettaq l-ogħla prestazzjoni fid-dataset WebQuestionsSP meta mħarreġ minn pari ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet biss, mingħajr ma jeħtieġ l-ebda karatteristika ta’ inġinerija jew għarfien speċifiku għad-dominju.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн ойлголт болон символын шалтгаан хийх мэдрэлийн сүлжээний статистикийн эрх мэдлийг ашиглах нь маш хэцүү. Энэ ажлын тулд бид мэдрэлийн символ машиныг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн програмчлагч (a) юм. Ийм учраас, хөтөлбөр дээр хэл хэлний хэлбэрийг газрын зураг зурж, компьютер (b) символ "компьютер" юм. Ийм учраас, программыг ажиллаж, хайх орон зайг удирдаж сайн программыг олоход тусалдаг. Бид эдгээр бүтээгдэхүүний даалгаварын шагналыг шууд сайжруулахын тулд REINFORCE хэрэглэдэг. Хүч байдлаар дасгал хөдөлгөөн, ДОХ-ын тогтвортой байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд бид үүнийг давтах магадлал дасгал хөдөлгөөн үйл ажиллагаагаар нэмэгдүүлнэ. NSM зөвхөн асуулт-хариулт хоороос суралцах үед WebQuestionsSP өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн хувьд хэрэгжүүлдэг. Ямар ч өөрчлөлт инженер, домены тодорхой мэдлэг шаардахгүй.', 'no': 'Det er vanskeleg å bruka statistiske kraft på neuralnettverk for å utføra språk forståking og symbolsk grunnlag når det krev å utføra effektiv diskrete operasjonar mot ein stor kunnskapsbasen. I denne arbeida introduserer vi ein neiralsymbolsk maskin, som inneheld ein neural program, t.d. ein sekvens- til- sekvensmodell som karterer språk- taler til programmer og bruker ein nøkkelvariabel minne for å handtera komposisjonalitet (b) ein symbolsk « datamaskin », t.d. ein Lisp- interpreter som utfører program- køyring, og hjelper å finna godt program ved å trykke søkjeområdet. Vi bruker REINFORCE til å optimalisera oppgåvevern av denne strukturerte foregåveproblemet direkte. For å trene med kraftig overvåking og forbetra stabiliteten av REINFORCE, auker vi det med ein gjentaktiv maksimum sannsynlighetskontrollprosess. NSM utfører kunstået på datasettet WebQuestionsSP når berre treng frå spørsmål-svarpar, utan å kreve nokon funksjonsengineering eller domenespesifikke kunnskap.', 'pl': "Wykorzystanie statystycznej mocy sieci neuronowych do rozumienia języka i rozumowania symbolicznego jest trudne, gdy wymaga wykonywania efektywnych operacji dyskretnych w oparciu o dużą bazę wiedzy. W niniejszej pracy wprowadzamy neuronową maszynę symboliczną, która zawiera (a) neuronowy 'programista', tj. model sekwencji-sekwencji, który mapuje wypowiedzi językowe do programów i wykorzystuje pamięć zmienną kluczowo do obsługi kompozycjonalności (b) symboliczny 'komputer', tj. interpreter Lispa, który wykonuje wykonywanie programu i pomaga znaleźć dobre programy poprzez przycinanie przestrzeni wyszukiwania. Stosujemy REINFORCE, aby bezpośrednio optymalizować nagrodę za zadanie tego ustrukturyzowanego problemu predykcyjnego. Aby trenować z słabym nadzorem i poprawić stabilność REINFORCE, rozszerzamy go o iteracyjny proces treningowy o maksymalne prawdopodobieństwo. NSM przewyższa najnowocześniejszy zestaw danych WebQuestionsSP, gdy jest przeszkolony tylko z par pytania-odpowiedzi, bez wymagania żadnych funkcji inżynierii lub wiedzy specyficznej dla domeny.", 'si': "භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න සහ සංකේතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ශක්තිය සම්බන්ධයක් අමාරුයි, ඒකට ලොකු දන්න බේසියට මේ වැඩේදී, අපි න්\u200dයුරාල් සිම්බලික මැෂින් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් (a) න්\u200dයුරාල් සිම්බලික මැෂින් 'ප්\u200dරෝග්\u200dරේමර්' කිරීමක්, ඉතින්, ක්\u200dරමණ- to- sequence මෝඩල් එකේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් විදිහට සැ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මේ සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. දුර්වල බලාපොරොත්තුවක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරධානයේ ස්ථිර වැඩ කරන්න, අපි ඒක ප්\u200dරධානයක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්  NSM ප්\u200dරශ්නය-ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සම්පූර්ණයේ වෙබ් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ස්පූර්ණ දත්ත සෙට් එකේ ස්ථානය-අංත්\u200dරාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විත", 'ro': 'Valorificarea puterii statistice a rețelelor neuronale pentru a efectua înțelegerea limbii și raționamentul simbolic este dificilă, atunci când este necesară executarea de operațiuni discrete eficiente împotriva unei baze de cunoștințe mari. În această lucrare, introducem o mașină simbolică neurală, care conține (a) un "programator" neural, adică un model secvență-la-secvență care cartografiază expresiile limbajului la programe și utilizează o memorie variabilă-cheie pentru a gestiona compoziționalitatea (b) un "computer" simbolic, adică un interpret Lisp care efectuează executarea programelor și ajută la găsirea programelor bune prin tăierea spațiului de căutare. Aplicăm REINFORCE pentru a optimiza direct recompensa sarcinii acestei probleme structurate de predicție. Pentru a ne antrena cu supraveghere slabă și pentru a îmbunătăți stabilitatea REINFORCE, îl extindem cu un proces iterativ de instruire cu probabilitate maximă. NSM depășește performanțele de ultimă oră din setul de date WebQuestionsSP atunci când este instruit numai din perechi de întrebări-răspuns, fără a necesita nicio inginerie de caracteristici sau cunoștințe specifice domeniului.', 'so': "Shabakada neurada waxaa ku adag in la sameeyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxgarashada luuqada iyo sababta calaamadaha ah, marka loo baahan yahay in lagu sameeyo shaqooyin faa’iido ah oo ka gees ah aqoonta aad u weyn. Shaqadan, waxaan ku soo bandhignaa Mashine Neural Symbolic, kaas oo ku jira (a) programka neural 'programka', tusaale ahaan sameynta qoraalka luqada ah oo u sawiraa programyada, waxaadna isticmaalaysaa xasuusta u bedelan si aad u xambaarto isbedelka (b) muusikada 'komputer', tusaale ahaan turjubaanka Lisp (Lisp) oo sameynaya dhaqdhaqaalaha programka, wuxuuna caawinayaa in uu helo programyo wanaagsan oo ku qorayo booska raadinta. Waxaynu ku dalbannaa REINFORCE si toos ah u hagaajinno abaalmarinta dhibaatadan la hor dhigo. Si aan ugu tababarinno ilaalinta itaaldarada iyo hagaajinta suurtagalka REINFORCE, waxaynu ku dareynaa baaritaanka waxbarashada ugu macquul badan. NSM wuxuu ka samaysaa xaaladda-art-ka bogga InternetQueonsSP marka laga baranayo koobo su'aal-jawaabta oo kaliya, iyadoon u baahnayn wax aqoon gaar ah oo engineering ama aqoon gaar ah oo domain.", 'sr': "Koristenje statističke moći neuralnih mreža za izvršavanje jezičkog razumevanja i simboličkog razuma je teško, kada zahteva izvršavanje efikasnih diskretnih operacija protiv velike baze znanja. U ovom poslu, predstavljamo neuronsku simboličku mašinu, koja sadrži a) neuralni programer, tj. sekvenčni model koji mapira govore jezika programima i koristi ključnu varijantnu pamćenje za rješavanje kompozicionalnosti (b) simboličnog 'kompjutera', tj. prevoditelja Lispa koji izvršava izvršenje programa i pomaže pronaći dobre programe praćenjem prostora pretraživanja. Primjenjujemo REINFORCE direktno optimizirati zadatak ovog strukturiranog problema predviđanja. Da bi se obučili slabim nadzorom i poboljšali stabilnost REINFORCE, povećali smo ga sa procesom treninga iterativne maksimalne verovatnosti. NSM je nadmašio stanje umjetnosti na setu podataka WebQuestionsSP kada je obučeno samo od parova odgovora na pitanje, a da ne zahteva nikakve funkcionalne inženjerstvo ili specifične znanje domena.", 'ta': 'பெரிய அறிவு அடிப்படை இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு நெருக்கல் குறியீட்டு இயந்திரத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அதில் ஒரு பின்னணி இருக்கும் தொடர் மாதிரி, அது நிரல்களுக்கு மொழியின் வார்த்தைகளை வரைகிறது மற்றும் நினைவகத்தை பயன்படுத்தும் விசை மாறிய நினைவகத்தை க நாங்கள் REINFORCE பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் நேரடியாக இந்த கட்டுப்பட்ட முன்னோட்டு பிரச்சனையின் பணிக்கூலி செயல் பலஹீனமான கண்காணிப்பு பயிற்சி மற்றும் REINFORCE நிலையை மேம்படுத்த, நாம் அதை ஒரு உறுதிப்படுத்தும் அதிகபட்ச உச்சரியமான பயிற்ச SP தகவல் அமைப்பில் NSM செயல்படுத்துகிறது, கேள்வி பதில் இருந்து ஜோடி மட்டும் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டால், எந்த பண்புப்பொறியின் பொறியியல் அல்லத', 'sv': "Att utnyttja den statistiska kraften i neurala nätverk för att utföra språkförståelse och symboliskt resonemang är svårt, när det kräver att utföra effektiva diskreta operationer mot en stor kunskapsbas. I detta arbete introducerar vi en Neural Symbolic Machine, som innehåller (a) en neural 'programmerare', d.v.s. en sekvens-till-sekvensmodell som kartlägger språkuttryck till program och använder ett nyckelvariabelt minne för att hantera kompositionalitet (b) en symbolisk 'dator', d.v.s. en Lisp-tolk som utför programkörning, och hjälper till att hitta bra program genom att beskära sökutrymmet. Vi använder REINFORCE för att direkt optimera uppgiftsbeloppet för detta strukturerade förutsägelseproblem. För att träna med svag övervakning och förbättra REINFORCE:s stabilitet utökar vi det med en iterativ träningsprocess med maximal sannolikhet. NSM överträffar den senaste tekniken i WebQuestionsSP-datauppsättningen när de utbildas enbart från fråga-svar par, utan att kräva någon funktionsteknik eller domänspecifik kunskap.", 'ur': "نیورل نیٹورک کی آمار قدرت کا استعمال کرنا زبان سمجھنے اور سیمبولیکی منطق کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے جب اسے ایک بڑے علم بنسس کے مقابلہ میں فعالیت اختلاف کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک نیورال سیمبولیک ماشین کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جس میں ایک نیورال کی پروگرامر ہے، یعنی ایک سیمہ سے سیمہ نمونڈل ہے جو پروگراموں کے لئے زبان کی باتوں کو مپ کرتا ہے اور ایک کلی ویرائل میموروں کو استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کامپیوتر (b) ایک سیمبولیک 'کمپیوٹر', یعنی ایک لیسپ تفسیر کرتا ہے جو پروگراموں کی عملکرد کرتا ہے، اور اچھی پروگراموں کو تلاش کی جگ ہم اس ساختہ پیش بینی مسئلہ کے کام کا اجر مستقیم کرنا چاہتے ہیں. کمزور نظر کے ساتھ آموزش کرنا اور استعمال کی ثابت قدم کو زیادہ کرنا، ہم اسے ایک دوبارہ تکرار کرنے والی بہترین احتمال کی آموزش کے ساتھ زیادہ کریں گے. NSM صرف سوال جوڑوں سے تعلیم کی جاتی ہے جب ویب سوال سپی ڈیٹ سٹ پر آرتی کی حالت کا استعمال کرتا ہے، بغیر کسی فرصت انجینر یا ڈومین کے معلوم علم کی ضرورت نہیں کرتی۔", 'vi': 'Việc nắm giữ sức mạnh thống kê của các mạng thần kinh để thực hiện hiểu biết ngôn ngữ và lý lẽ tượng biểu tượng là rất khó khăn, khi nó cần thực hiện các hoạt động riêng biệt hiệu quả trước một nguồn kiến thức lớn. Trong công việc này, chúng ta giới thiệu một máy tạo b i ểu tượng thần kinh, chứa (a) một "lập trình viên thần kinh", tức là một mô hình lặp đi lặp lại mà b ản đồ ngôn ngữ phát ra các chương trình và sử dụng một bộ nhớ biến năng chìa khóa để xử lý nội dung (b) một cái\'máy tính\'tượng trưng, tức là một phiên dịch viên Lisp thực hiện chương trình, và giúp tìm kiếm chương trình tốt bằng cách tỉa không gian tìm kiếm. Chúng tôi áp dụng REthê để tối ưu tiên trực tiếp phần thưởng nhiệm vụ của vấn đề dự đoán cấu trúc này. Để rèn luyện với sự giám sát yếu kém và cải thiện độ ổn định của RECOROP, chúng tôi nâng nó lên bằng một tiến trình huấn luyện theo tỉ lệ tối đa. Bộ An Ninh Quốc Gia hoàn thành các giải pháp hiện đại trên tập tin cá nhân WebQuestS SP khi được đào tạo chỉ bằng các cặp câu hỏi, không cần thiết kỹ sư hay kiến thức miền.', 'uz': 'Name Bu vazifani biz yangi neyural symbolik mashinasini ishlatamiz. Bu yerda yangi "dastur" dasturida bir nechta tarkibi model i (a) mavjud boʻladi. Dasturni ishga tushirish mumkin va qidirish фазsini boshqarish uchun tugma- oʻzgaruvchi xotira ishlatiladi. Biz quyidagi oldinga muammolarning vazifani aniqlash uchun REINFORCE qoʻllamiz. Oddiy taʼminlovchi va REINFORCE tashkilotlarini bajarish uchun biz buni eng eng eng muhimi taʼminlovchi vazifa bilan qo\'shimiz. Name', 'bg': 'Използването на статистическата сила на невронните мрежи за извършване на езиково разбиране и символично разсъждаване е трудно, когато изисква извършване на ефективни дискретни операции срещу голяма база от знания. В тази работа въвеждаме невронна символична машина, която съдържа (а) невронен "програмист", т.е. модел последователност към последователност, който картографира езиковите изказвания към програмите и използва ключова променлива памет за справяне със композицията (б) символичен "компютър", т.е. интерпретатор, който изпълнява изпълнението на програмите и помага за намирането на добри програми чрез подрязване на пространството за търсене. Ние прилагаме за директно оптимизиране на възнаграждението на задачата по този структуриран проблем за прогнозиране. За да тренираме със слаб надзор и да подобрим стабилността на РЕИНФОРС, ние го разширихме с итеративен процес на обучение с максимална вероятност. НСМ превъзхожда най-съвременните в набора от данни, когато се обучава само от двойки въпроси-отговори, без да изисква инженеринг на функции или специфични за домейна знания.', 'da': "Det er vanskeligt at udnytte den statistiske kraft af neurale netværk til at udføre sprogforståelse og symbolsk ræsonnement, når det kræver at udføre effektive diskrete operationer mod en stor videnbase. I dette arbejde introducerer vi en Neural Symbolic Machine, som indeholder (a) en neural 'programmør', dvs. en sekvens-til-sekvensmodel, der kortlægger sprogudtalelser til programmer og bruger en nøglevariabel hukommelse til at håndtere kompositionalitet (b) en symbolsk 'computer', dvs. en Lisp-tolk, der udfører programudførelse, og hjælper med at finde gode programmer ved at beskære søgerummet. Vi anvender REINFORCE til direkte at optimere opgavebelønningen af dette strukturerede forudsigelsesproblem. For at træne med svagt tilsyn og forbedre REINFORCE's stabilitet, øger vi det med en iterativ træningsproces med maksimal sandsynlighed. NSM overstiger den nyeste teknologi på WebQuestionsSP datasættet, når den kun trænes fra spørgsmål-svar par, uden at kræve nogen feature engineering eller domænespecifik viden.", 'nl': "Het benutten van de statistische kracht van neurale netwerken om taalbegrip en symbolische redenering uit te voeren is moeilijk, wanneer het nodig is efficiënte discrete operaties uit te voeren tegen een grote kennisbasis. In dit werk introduceren we een Neural Symbolic Machine, die (a) een neurale 'programmeur' bevat, d.w.z. een sequence-to-sequence model dat taaluitingen aan programma's toewijst en een key-variabele geheugen gebruikt om compositionaliteit te verwerken (b) een symbolische 'computer', d.w.z. een Lisp interpreter die programma's uitvoert, en helpt goede programma's te vinden door de zoekruimte te snoeien. We passen REINFORCE toe om de taakverronding van dit gestructureerde voorspellingsprobleem direct te optimaliseren. Om met zwakke supervisie te trainen en de stabiliteit van REINFORCE te verbeteren, breiden we het uit met een iteratief maximaal waarschijnlijkheidstrainingsproces. NSM presteert beter dan de state-of-the-art op de WebQuestionsSP-dataset wanneer alleen getraind wordt op basis van vraag-antwoord-paren, zonder enige feature engineering of domeinspecifieke kennis.", 'hr': "Iskoristiti statističku moć neuralnih mreža kako bi se izvršilo razumijevanje jezika i simboličko razumijevanje je teško, kada zahtijeva izvršavanje učinkovitih diskretnih operacija protiv velike baze znanja. U ovom poslu predstavljamo neuronski simbolički stroj, koji sadrži a) neuronski programer, tj. model sekvencije do sekvencije koji mapira jezičke izraze programima i koristi ključnu varijačnu pamćenje kako bi se obratio kompozicionalnosti (b) simbolički 'kompjuter', tj. Lisp interpreter koji izvodi program izvršavanje i pomagao pronaći dobre program e praćenjem prostora pretraživanja. Primjenjujemo REINFORCE direktno optimizirati zadatak ovog strukturiranog problema predviđanja. Da bi se obučili slabim nadzorom i poboljšali stabilnost REINFORCE, povećali smo je s procesom iterativnog treninga maksimalne vjerojatnosti. NSM je nadmašio stanje umjetnosti na setu podataka WebQuestionsSP kada je obučeno samo od parova odgovora na pitanje, bez zahtjeva bilo kakve opcije inženjerstva ili specifične znanja domena.", 'de': "Die statistische Macht neuronaler Netze für Sprachverständnis und symbolisches Denken zu nutzen, ist schwierig, wenn effiziente diskrete Operationen auf einer großen Wissensbasis durchgeführt werden müssen. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir eine neuronale Symbolische Maschine vor, die (a) einen neuronalen 'Programmierer' enthält, d.h. ein Sequenzmodell, das Sprachäußerungen auf Programme abbildet und einen Schlüssel-Variablen-Speicher verwendet, um Compositionalität zu handhaben (b) einen symbolischen 'Computer', d.h. einen Lisp-Interpreter, der Programmausführung durchführt, und hilft, gute Programme zu finden, indem er den Suchraum beschneidet. Wir wenden REINFORCE an, um die Aufgabenverlohnung dieses strukturierten Vorhersageproblems direkt zu optimieren. Um mit schwacher Supervision zu trainieren und die Stabilität von REINFORCE zu verbessern, erweitern wir es um einen iterativen Maximum-Likelihood Trainingsprozess. NSM übertrifft den Stand der Technik auf dem WebQuestionsSP-Datensatz, wenn es nur von Frage-Antwort-Paaren trainiert wird, ohne dass hierfür ein Feature Engineering oder domänenspezifisches Wissen erforderlich ist.", 'id': "Harnessing the statistical power of neural networks to perform language understanding and symbolic reasoning is difficult, when it requires executing efficient discrete operations against a large knowledge-base.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperkenalkan Mesin Symbolik Neural, yang mengandung (a) sebuah 'programmer' neural, i.e., sebuah model urutan-ke-urutan yang memetakan ungkapan bahasa ke program dan menggunakan memori-variabel kunci untuk menangani komposisionalitas (b) sebuah 'komputer' simbolik, i.e., interpreter Lisp yang melakukan eksekusi program, dan membantu menemukan program yang baik dengan menggosok ruang pencarian. We apply REINFORCE to directly optimize the task reward of this structured prediction problem.  Untuk melatih dengan pengawasan yang lemah dan meningkatkan stabilitas REINFORCE, kita menambahkannya dengan proses latihan maksimal kemungkinan yang berulang-ulang. NSM outperforms the state-of-the-art on the WebQuestionsSP dataset when trained from question-answer pairs only, without requiring any feature engineering or domain-specific knowledge.", 'ko': "대형 지식 라이브러리에 대한 효과적인 이산 조작이 필요할 때 신경 네트워크의 통계 능력을 이용하여 언어 이해와 기호 추리를 집행하는 것은 어렵다.이 작업에서 우리는 신경 기호기를 소개했다. 이것은 (a) 하나의 신경 '프로그래머', 즉 시퀀스 모델로 언어 문장을 프로그램에 비추고, 관건적인 변수 메모리를 이용하여 조합성 (b) 의 기호 '컴퓨터', 즉 실행 프로그램의Lisp 해석기를 처리하며, 검색 공간을 편집해서 좋은 프로그램을 찾는 데 도움을 준다.우리는 REINFORCE를 응용하여 이 구조화 예측 문제의 임무 보수를 직접 최적화시킨다.약한 감독 상황에서 훈련을 하고 안정성을 높이기 위해 우리는 가장 유사한 훈련 과정을 교체하여 이를 확충했다.문답으로만 훈련을 진행할 때 NSM은 WebQuestions SP 데이터 집합에서 최신 기술보다 우수하고 특징 공학이나 분야의 특정한 지식이 필요하지 않다.", 'fa': 'استفاده از قدرت آماری شبکه\u200cهای عصبی برای انجام درک زبان و دلیل\u200cهای سیمبلیک سخت است، زمانی که نیاز به اجرای عملیات مختلف موثرت در مقابل یک پایگاه دانش بزرگ است. در این کار، ما یک ماشین سیم\u200cبولیک عصبی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که شامل (a) یک برنامه\u200cکننده عصبی است، یعنی یک نمونه\u200cای که کلمات زبان را به برنامه\u200cها نقشه می\u200cدهد و یک حافظه\u200cی متغیر کلید برای کنترل سازی (b) یک سیم\u200cبولیک «کامپیوتر»، یعنی یک ترجمه\u200cکننده لیسپ که اجرا برنامه\u200cها می\u200cکند، و به پیدا کردن برنامه\u200cهای خوب ما REINFORCE را درخواست می کنیم تا مستقیماً پاداش عملی این مشکل پیش بینی ساخته را optimize کنیم. برای آموزش با نظارت ضعیف و استواری REINFORCE را بهتر کنیم، آن را با یک فرایند آموزش بیشترین احتمال تکرار می کنیم. NSM در مجموعه داده\u200cهای WebQuestionsSP موقع آموزش دادن فقط از جفت جواب سوال و جواب، بدون نیازی به مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه یا دانش ویژه\u200cهای ویژه انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Die statistiese krag van neuralnetwerke om taal verstanding en simboliese redening te uitvoer is moeilik, wanneer dit benodig effektief diskrete operasies teen 'n groot kennis-basis te uitvoer. In hierdie werk, introduseer ons 'n Neural e Simboliese Masjien, wat bevat (a) ' n neurale 'programmeerder', t.d. 'n volgorde- na- volgorde model wat kaart taal uitspraak na programme en gebruik 'n sleutel- veranderlike geheue om compositionaliteit (b) te hanteer 'n simboliese 'rekenaar', t.d. 'n Lisp-interpreter wat program uitvoer, en help om goeie programme te vind deur die soektog ruimte te druk. Ons wend REINFORCE aan om direk die taak vergelde van hierdie struktureerde voorskou probleem te optimaliseer. Om te oefen met swak supervisie en die stabiliteit van REINFORCE te verbeter, vergroot ons dit met 'n iteratiewe maksimum-waarskynlik onderwerking proses. NSM uitvoer die state-of-the-art op die WebQuestionsSP-datastel wanneer slegs van vraag-antwoord paar opgelei word, sonder om enige funksieingeniering of domein-spesifieke kennis te vereis.", 'sw': "Kushindwa nguvu ya takwimu ya mitandao ya ubongo ili kutekeleza kuelewa lugha na sababu za msingi ni vigumu, pale inapohitaji kutekeleza shughuli za ufanisi tofauti dhidi ya msingi mkubwa wa maarifa. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha mashine ya Symbolic Neural, ambayo ina (a) programu ya neural i, yaani, modeli ya mfululizo-kwa-mfululizo ambao hutumia mazungumzo ya lugha kwa programu na kutumia kumbukumbu muhimu ya kubadilika ili kukabiliana na muungano (b) ni alama ya 'kompyuta', yaani mfasiri wa Lisp anayefanya utekelezaji wa programu, na anasaidia kutafuta programu nzuri kwa kuelezea nafasi ya kutafuta. We apply REINFORCE to directly optimize the task reward of this structured prediction problem.  Kufundisha kwa ufuatiliaji dhaifu na kuboresha ustawi wa REINFORCE, tunaongeza kwa mchakato wa mafunzo yenye uwezekano mkubwa. NSM inaonyesha hali ya sanaa kwenye seti ya taarifa za maswaliSP ambapo imefunzwa kutoka kwa wanandoa wa swali pekee, bila kudai uhandisi wowote au maarifa maalum ya ndani.", 'am': "በቋንቋ ማስተዋል እና የባሕላዊ ምክንያት ለመፈጸም የናውራዊ መረብ ኃይል የሚያስጨንቀው በአውቀት-መቀመጫው ላይ የተለየ ጥያቄ ተግባር በመፈለግ ግድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የኔural Symbolic Machine እናስጠጋለን፣ (a) የኔural 'programmer' የሚኖር፣ የsequence-to-sequence model፣ ለፕሮግራሞች ቋንቋዎችን የሚያሳርፍ እና ለልዩ ማስታወቂያውን ለመቀበል የቁልፍ-variable ማስታወሻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የዚህን አካባቢ የመፍጠር ጉዳይ የስራ ዋጋ ቀጥተኛ ማሻለል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የREINFORCE ደካማነትን ለማስተማር እና ለማድረግ እናስጠጋታለን፡፡ የጥያቄ መልስ ሁለት ብቻ ሲያስተምር የ-የ-አርእስክሪንስ ወይም የdomain-specific እውቀት ሳይያስፈልግ የግንኙነት ኢንጂንጂንጂንጂር ወይም የድምፅ አዋቂ ስህተት በይነመረብ ድረ-አርእስክትSP ዳታተር ማሳየት ይቻላል።", 'hy': 'Դժվար է օգտագործել նյարդային ցանցերի վիճակագրական ուժը լեզվի հասկանալու և խորհրդանշության կատարելու համար, երբ այն պահանջում է արդյունավետ անհնար գործողություններ կատարելու մեծ գիտելիքների հիմքում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային սիմբոլիկ մեքենա, որը պարունակում է (a) նյարդային «ծրագրավորող», այսինքն՝ հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդել, որը քարտեզագրում է լեզվի արտահայտությունները ծրագրերի վրա և օգտագործում է կարևոր փոփոխական հիշողություն, որպեսզի կառավարի կառուցվածքը (b) սիմբոլիկ «համակարգիչ», այսինքն՝ Լիսպ Մենք օգտագործում ենք REININFNCE-ը, որպեսզի ուղղակիորեն օպտիմացնի այս կառուցվածքային կանխատեսման խնդիրը: To train with weak supervision and improve the stability of REINFORCE, we augment it with an iterative maximum-likelihood training process.  NSM-ը գերազանցում է վեբ-հարցերի SP տվյալների համակարգի ամենաբարձր արդյունքները միայն հարցերի-պատասխանների զույգերից, առանց որևէ հնարավորության ճարտարագիտության կամ բնագավառի կոնկրետ գիտելիքի պահանջելու:', 'az': "Dili anlama və simbolik fikirləşdirmək üçün nöral a ğların statistik gücünü istifadə etmək çox çətin idi, ki, böyük bilgi bazı ilə müvəffəqiyyətli diskrete işləri idarə etmək lazımdır. Bu i şdə, bir nöral Simbolik Makinesi təşkil edirik ki, bir nöral 'proqramcı' içərir, məsələn, proqramlara dil sözlərini haritalar edir və bir nöral-dəyişiklik yaddaşlarını (b) simbolik 'kompjuter' vasitəsilə istifadə edir, məsələn, proqramı işlədirən Lisp yorumlayıcısı və gözəl proqramları tapmağa yardım edir. Biz bu strukturlu tədbir probleminin işin mükafatını doğrudan optimizləmək üçün REINFORCE uygulayıq. Zayıf gözətçiliyi təhsil etmək və REINFORCE'nin stabiliyyətini düzəltmək üçün, onu yenidən mümkün olaraq təhsil etmək prosesi ilə artırırıq. NSM WebQuestionsSP veri qutusunda ancaq sual-cavab çiftlərindən təhsil edildiyi zaman, heç bir özellik inženjeri və domain-specific bilgi tələb etmədən çalışır.", 'tr': "Diller düşünmek we simbolik sebäplerini ýerine ýetirmek üçin näyral şebekeleriň statistikleri güýçlerini ýerleşdirmek kyn, haçand a ol uly bilim bazyna garşy etkinlik diskrete işlerini ýerine ýetirmeli bolsa. Bu i şde, biz Nural Simbolik Makiny girdirýäris, ol bir näyral 'program çi' (a) diýip programçi (sequencer-to-sequencer) düzümlerni programlere görkezýär we programlere sözlerini gowy programlere görkezýär we sambolik (b) bir simbolik 'kompýuter' diýip işleýän Lisp terjimelerinde, we gözlemekde seleňleri ýüze göze program tapmakda kömek edýär. Biz REINFORCE'i bu strukturly öňlenme meseleniň täbi täsirini düzetmek üçin uygulapdyk. Zayıf gözlemçi bilen otlamak we REINFORCE duralygyny gowdurmak üçin, muny iň üstünlikde azaltylyk mümkinçilik öwrenme prosesi bilen ekleýäris. NSM WebQuestionsSP veri setindeki sanatynyň durumyny diňe sorag-jogabat çiplerinden öwrenmedi, hiç hili özellikler inženjeriýa ýa-da domain hili bilgi gereksiz edip ýöredi.", 'sq': "Përdorimi i fuqisë statistike të rrjeteve nervore për të kryer kuptimin e gjuhës dhe arsyetimin simbolik është i vështirë, kur kërkon ekzekutimin e operacioneve të efektshme diskrete kundër një baze të madhe njohurie. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një Makinë Symbolike Neural e, e cila përmban (a) një 'programues' neural, që do të thotë, një model sekuencë-në-sekuencë që harton shprehjet gjuhësore në programe dhe përdor një kujtim të ndryshueshëm-kyç për të trajtuar kompozitivitetin (b) një 'kompjuter' simbolik, që do të thotë, një interpretues Lisp që kryen ekzekutimin e programit dhe ndihmon të gjejë programe të mira duke shkurtuar hapësirën e kërkimit. Ne aplikojmë REINFORCE për të optimizuar drejtpërdrejt shpërblimin e detyrës për këtë problem të strukturuar parashikimi. Për të stërvitur me mbikqyrje të dobët dhe për të përmirësuar stabilitetin e REINFORCE, ne e shtojmë atë me një proces të përsëritur të stërvitjes maksimale të mundësive. NSM ekziston më së miri në dataset WebQuestionsSP kur është stërvitur vetëm nga çifte pyetje-përgjigje, pa kërkuar ndonjë inxhinieri apo njohuri specifike në domeni.", 'ca': "Utilitzar el poder estatístic de les xarxes neurals per a fer entendre el llenguatge i raonament simbòlic és difícil, quan requereix executar operacions discretes eficients contra una gran base de coneixement. En aquest treball, introduim una màquina neurològica simbòlica, que conté a) un 'programador' neural, és a dir, un model secuencia a seqüència que mapeix les expressions lingüístices als programes i utilitza una memòria clau-variable per a gestionar la composicionalitat b) un 'ordinador' simbòlic, és a dir, un intérpret Lisp que fa execució del programa, i ajuda a trobar bons programes recorrent l'espai de cerca. Aplicam REINFORCE per optimitzar directament la recompensa de la tasca d'aquest problema estructurat de predicció. Per entrenar amb una supervisió dèbil i millorar l'estabilitat de REINFORCE, l'augmentem amb un procés iteratiu d'entrenament de màxima probabilitat. NSM supera l'actualitat del conjunt de dades WebQuestionsSP quan està entrenat només amb parells de preguntes-respostes, sense requerir cap enginyeria de característiques o coneixement específic de domini.", 'bs': "Koristenje statističke moći neuralnih mreža kako bi se izvršilo razumijevanje jezika i simboličko razumijevanje je teško, kada zahtijeva izvršavanje efikasnih diskretnih operacija protiv velike baze znanja. U ovom poslu, predstavljamo neuronsku simboličku mašinu, koja sadrži a) neuralni programer, tj. model sekvence do sekvence koji mapira govore jezika programima i koristi ključnu varijantnu pamćenje kako bi se obradila kompozicionalnost (b) simbolički 'kompjuter', tj. Lisp interpreter koji izvodi program izvršenje, i pomaže pronaći dobre programe praćenjem prostora pretraživanja. Primjenjujemo REINFORCE direktno optimizirati zadatak ovog strukturiranog problema predviđanja. Da bi se obučili slabim nadzorom i poboljšali stabilnost REINFORCE, povećali smo je sa procesom treninga iterativne maksimalne verovatnosti. NSM je nadmašio stanje umjetnosti na setu podataka WebQuestionsSP kada je obučeno samo od parova odgovora na pitanje, a da ne zahtijeva bilo kakve opcije inženjerstva ili znanja specifične domene.", 'bn': "ভাষা বুঝতে এবং প্রতীকের কারণ করার জন্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের পরিসংখ্যান ক্ষমতা কঠিন, যখন এটি বিশাল জ্ঞান-বেসের বিরুদ্ধে কার্যকর কার্যকল এই কাজে আমরা একটি নিউরেল প্রতীক মেশিন পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যার মধ্যে একটি (a) নিউরেল 'প্রোগ্রামার', যেখানে একটি সেকেন্ড-ব্যাক-সেকেন্ড মডেল, যা প্রোগ্রামের জন্য ভাষার ভাষার কথা মানচিত্র এবং একটি কী-ভারেবাল মেমরি ব্যবহার করে একটি প্রতীক 'কম্ আমরা রেইনফোর্সি প্রয়োগ করি এই গঠনের ভবিষ্যৎ সমস্যার কাজের পুরস্কার সরাসরি উন্নত করার জন্য। দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং রিনোফার্সির স্থিতির উন্নতি প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য, আমরা এটাকে বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছি একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যিক সম্ভাবনা প্রশিক্ প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জোড়া থেকে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষা করার সময় ওয়েব প্রশ্নের প্রযুক্তি-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি প্রদর্শন করে, কোন ব", 'cs': "Využití statistické síly neuronových sítí k provádění porozumění jazyků a symbolického uvažování je obtížné, když vyžaduje provádění efektivních diskrétních operací proti velké znalostní bázi. V této práci představujeme neuronový symbolický stroj, který obsahuje (a) neuronový 'programátor', tedy model sekvence-sekvence, který mapuje jazykové výroky programům a využívá paměť klíčových proměnných k zpracování kompozici (b) symbolický 'počítač', tj. Lisp interpret, který provádí provádění programu, a pomáhá najít dobré programy prořezáním vyhledávacího prostoru. Používáme REINFORCE k přímé optimalizaci odměny úkolů tohoto strukturovaného problému predikce. Abychom trénovali se slabým dohledem a zlepšili stabilitu REINFORCE, rozšířili jsme ji o iterativní tréninkový proces s maximální pravděpodobností. NSM překonává nejmodernější datovou sadu WebQuestionsSP, když je trénován pouze z párů otázek-odpověď, aniž by vyžadoval jakékoliv funkční inženýrství nebo znalosti specifické pro doménu.", 'et': 'Närvivõrkude statistilise jõu kasutamine keele mõistmiseks ja sümboolseks arutlemiseks on keeruline, kui see nõuab tõhusate diskreetsete operatsioonide teostamist suure teadmistebaasi vastu. Käesolevas töös tutvustame neurosümboolset masinat, mis sisaldab (a) neuraalset "programmeerijat", st jadast järjestusse mudelit, mis kaardistab keelelisi väljendeid programmidesse ja kasutab võtmemuustu kompositsioonilisuse käsitlemiseks (b) sümboolset "arvutit", st Lispi tõlget, mis teostab programmi täitmist ja aitab leida häid programme otsinguruumi kärpimise teel. Rakendame REINFORCE\'i, et optimeerida otseselt selle struktureeritud ennustusprobleemi ülesandetasu. Et treenida nõrga järelevalvega ja parandada REINFORCE stabiilsust, täiendame seda iteratiivse maksimaalse tõenäosusega treeningprotsessiga. NSM ületab WebQuestionsSP andmekogumi uusimaid tasemeid, kui seda koolitatakse ainult küsimuste ja vastuste paaridest, ilma et see nõuaks funktsioonide inseneri või domeenispetsiifilisi teadmisi.', 'fi': 'Neuroverkkojen tilastollisen voiman hyödyntäminen kielen ymmärtämiseen ja symboliseen päättelyyn on vaikeaa, kun se vaatii tehokkaita erillisiä operaatioita suurta tietopohjaa vastaan. Tässä työssä esitellään neurosymbolinen kone, joka sisältää (a) neuroohjelmoijan eli sekvenssimallin, joka kartoittaa kielilauseet ohjelmiin ja käyttää avainmuuttujan muistia kompositionaalisuuden käsittelyyn (b) symbolisen tietokoneen eli Lisp-tulkin, joka suorittaa ohjelman suorittamisen ja auttaa löytämään hyviä ohjelmia karsimalla hakutilaa. Sovellamme REINFORCE-menetelmää optimoidaksemme suoraan tämän strukturoidun ennusteongelman tehtävän palkitsemisen. Harjoitellaksemme heikolla valvonnalla ja parantaaksemme REINFORCE:n vakautta lisäämme sitä iteratiivisella maksimi-todennäköisyysharjoituksella. NSM suoriutuu WebQuestionsSP-aineiston viimeisintä tekniikkaa paremmin, kun se on koulutettu vain kysymys-vastaus-pareista, ilman että se vaatii ominaisuuksien suunnittelua tai toimialueekohtaista tietämystä.', 'ha': "Ina zartar da ƙarfin statistical power of taruwar neural to cika fahimta na harshe da sabon symbolic kwance mai nau'i, idan na so in tafiyar da aikin yin aiki masu da inganci ko wani basin ilmi mai girma. In this work, we introduce a Neural Symbolic Machine, which contains (a) a neural 'programmer', i.e., a sequence-to-sequence model that maps language utterances to programs and utilizes a key-variable memory to handle compositionality (b) a symbolic 'computer', i.e., a Lisp interpreter that performs program execution, and helps find good programs by pruning the search space.  Munã amfani da INFURCE wajen iyar aikin da aka cika wannan masu basĩri da aka baka. Yana ƙara shi da wani jarrabi na tsakanin mafaniki mai rauni. NSM yana tafiyar da state-of-the-art kan data set on Web-QSP idan an yi wa're-wa daga jibar-su kawai, kuma bã ya tambayar wani tsari masu inganci ko wani ilmi na guda.", 'he': 'להשתמש בכוח הסטטיסטי של רשתות עצביות כדי לבצע הבנה לשפה והגיון סימלי הוא קשה, כאשר זה דורש לבצע פעולות דיסקרטיות יעילות נגד בסיס ידע גדול. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים מכונת סימפולית נוירולית, שמכילה (a) תוכנית נוירולית, כלומר, מודל רצף-לרצף שמאפה את מילוי השפה לתוכניות ומשתמש בזיכרון משתנה-מפתח כדי לטפל במרכיבות (b) תורגם סימפולי "מחשב", כלומר, תורגם Lisp שמבצע ביצוע תוכנית, ומעזר למצוא תוכניות טובות על ידי לחתוך את מרחב החיפוש. אנו משתמשים בחזרה על מנת לאופטיזם ישירות את פרס המשימה של בעיית החזוי המבנה הזאת. כדי להתאמן עם פיקוח חלש ולשיפר את היציבות של REINFORCE, אנו מגדילים אותו עם תהליך אימון סיכוי מקסים חוזר. NSM מציג את המצב החדש במערכת הנתונים של WebQuestionsSP כאשר מאומנים רק מזוגי תשובות-שאלות, בלי לדרוש שום מהנדסה של תכונות או ידע ספציפי לתחום.', 'sk': "Izkoriščanje statistične moči nevronskih omrežij za izvajanje jezikovnega razumevanja in simboličnega razmišljanja je težko, kadar zahteva izvajanje učinkovitih diskretnih operacij na veliki bazi znanja. V tem delu predstavljamo nevronski simbolni stroj, ki vsebuje (a) nevronski 'programer', tj. model zaporedja do zaporedja, ki kartira jezikovne izraze v programe in uporablja ključno-spremenljiv pomnilnik za obvladovanje kompozicijske funkcije (b) simbolni 'računalnik', tj. interpretiralec Lisp, ki izvaja izvedbo programa in pomaga najti dobre programe z zmanjševanjem iskalnega prostora. REINFORCE uporabljamo za neposredno optimizacijo nagrade nalog tega strukturiranega problema napovedovanja. Za usposabljanje s šibkim nadzorom in izboljšanje stabilnosti REINFORCE ga dopolnjujemo z iterativnim procesom treninga z največjo verjetnostjo. NSM presega najsodobnejše v naboru podatkov WebQuestionsSP, če je usposobljen samo iz parov vprašanja-odgovorov, ne da bi zahteval kakršnega koli inženiringa funkcij ali znanja za domeno.", 'jv': "Where Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake sistem Neral simbolbar, sing sumungo (a) ngira 'program' Neral, dadi, sekondirno-to-sekondirno model sing mapaké kesalahan kanggo program nganggo sistem lan ngawehi sistem sing arep akeh perusahaan versi mburamu nggawe sistem simbolbar (b) sampilik 'komputer',dadi, akeh Lisp seneng operasi program nggawe program kang supoyo ngêngguna perusahaan sing apik. ain Rasané awak dhéwé nganggep sistem sing gak butuh gak lan luwih dumadhi KENMORKET, awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe ngubah sing gak dhéwé karo perusahaan langkung weruh gak dhéwé. NM iso nggawe state-of", 'bo': "སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྟོགས་དང་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་སྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། In this work, we introduce a Neural Symbolic Machine, which contains (a) a neural 'programmer', i.e., a sequence-to-sequence model that maps language utterances to programs and utilizes a key-variable memory to handle compositionality ང་ཚོས་གཞི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོད་དང་ཐད་ཀར་ཆེ་ཤོས་ལ་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To train with weak supervision and improve the stability of REINFORCE, we augment it with an iterative maximum-likelihood training process. NSM outperforms the state-of-the-art on the WebQuestionsSP dataset when trained from question-answer pairs only, without requiring any feature engineering or domain-specific knowledge."}
{'en': 'Neural Relation Extraction with Multi-lingual Attention', 'ar': 'استخراج العلاقة العصبية مع الانتباه متعدد اللغات', 'es': 'Extracción de relaciones neuronales con atención multilingüe', 'fr': 'Extraction de relations neuronales avec attention multilingue', 'pt': 'Extração de Relação Neural com Atenção Multilíngue', 'ja': '多言語注意を伴う神経関係抽出', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी ध्यान के साथ तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण', 'zh': '多言者神经取之', 'ru': 'Экстракция нейронной связи с многоязычным вниманием', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh an Chaidrimh Néaraigh le hAire Ilteangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα Νευρικής Σχέσης με Πολυγλωσσική Προσοχή', 'hu': 'Neurális kapcsolat extrakció többnyelvű figyelemmel', 'it': 'Estrazione della relazione neurale con attenzione multilingue', 'kk': 'Көптілік тілдермен нейралық қатынас тарқатуы', 'lt': 'Neuralinių santykių ekstrakcija su daugiakalbiu dėmesiu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural dengan Perhatian berbilang-bahasa', 'ml': 'Multi- ഭാഷയുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ട് നെയുറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл анхаарлын мэдрэлийн харилцаа хамаарах', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Newrali b’Attenzjoni Multilingwi', 'no': 'Neuralrelasjonsutpakking med fleirspråk merking', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji nerwowych z uwagą wielojęzyczną', 'ro': 'Extracția relației neurale cu atenție multilingvă', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa sa višejezičkim pažnjom', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'பல- மொழிகள் கவனத்துடன் புதிய உறவு வெளியேறுதல்', 'so': 'Kala saarista af badan', 'sv': 'Extraktion av neural relation med flerspråkig uppmärksamhet', 'ur': 'Multi-lingual Attention کے ساتھ نیورال رابطہ نکالنے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Rút thần kinh và đa ngôn ngữ chú ý', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa s višejezičkim pažnjom', 'bg': 'Екстракция на неврална връзка с многоезично внимание', 'nl': 'Neuronale Relatie Extractie met meertalige aandacht', 'da': 'Neural Relation Ekstraktion med flersproget opmærksomhed', 'id': 'Neural Relation Extraction with Multi-lingual Attention', 'ko': '다중 언어 주의에 기초한 신경 관계 추출', 'sw': 'Neural Relation Extraction with Multi-lingual Attention', 'fa': 'اخراج ارتباط عصبی با توجه زیادی زبان', 'tr': 'Birnäçe diller bilen näsaz baglanyşy açmak', 'de': 'Neuronale Beziehungsextraktion mit mehrsprachiger Aufmerksamkeit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Njerëzimi i marrëdhënieve nervore me vëmendje shumëgjuhëse', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil dikkati ilə nöral İlişkisi Çıqış', 'hy': 'Neural Relation Extraction with Multi-lingual Attention', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa sa višejezičkim pažnjom', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় মনোযোগ দিয়ে নিউরেল সম্পর্ক এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশন', 'ca': 'Extracció de relació neuronal amb atenció multillengua', 'cs': 'Extrakce nervových vztahů s vícejazyčnou pozorností', 'et': 'Neurosuhte ekstraheerimine mitmekeelse tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'Neurosuhteen poisto monikielisellä huomiolla', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'he': 'יציאה מערכת יחסים עצביים עם תשומת לב רבה שפותית', 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija živčnih odnosov z večjezično pozornostjo', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདྲ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་དབང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Relation extraction has been widely used for finding unknown relational facts from plain text. Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data for relation extraction, ignoring massive information from the texts in various languages. To address this issue, we introduce a multi-lingual neural relation extraction framework, which employs mono-lingual attention to utilize the information within mono-lingual texts and further proposes cross-lingual attention to consider the information consistency and complementarity among cross-lingual texts. Experimental results on real-world datasets show that, our model can take advantage of multi-lingual texts and consistently achieve significant improvements on relation extraction as compared with baselines.', 'ar': 'تم استخدام استخراج العلاقة على نطاق واسع للعثور على حقائق علائقية غير معروفة من نص عادي. تركز معظم الأساليب الحالية على استغلال البيانات أحادية اللغة لاستخراج العلاقة ، وتجاهل المعلومات الهائلة من النصوص بلغات مختلفة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقدم إطارًا متعدد اللغات لاستخراج العلاقة العصبية ، والذي يوظف اهتمامًا أحادي اللغة للاستفادة من المعلومات في نصوص أحادية اللغة ويقترح أيضًا الاهتمام عبر اللغات للنظر في اتساق المعلومات والتكامل بين النصوص متعددة اللغات . تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يستفيد من النصوص متعددة اللغات ويحقق باستمرار تحسينات مهمة في استخراج العلاقة مقارنة بالخطوط الأساسية.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations a été largement utilisée pour trouver des faits relationnels inconnus à partir de texte brut. La plupart des méthodes existantes se concentrent sur l'exploitation de données unilingues pour l'extraction de relations, en ignorant les informations massives des textes dans différentes langues. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous introduisons un cadre d'extraction de relations neuronales multilingues, qui utilise une attention unilingue pour utiliser les informations contenues dans des textes unilingues et propose en outre une attention multilingue pour tenir compte de la cohérence et de la complémentarité des informations entre les textes multilingues. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données réels montrent que notre modèle peut tirer parti de textes multilingues et obtenir constamment des améliorations significatives sur l'extraction des relations par rapport aux bases de référence.", 'pt': 'A extração de relações tem sido amplamente utilizada para encontrar fatos relacionais desconhecidos a partir de texto simples. A maioria dos métodos existentes se concentra na exploração de dados monolíngues para extração de relações, ignorando informações maciças dos textos em vários idiomas. Para resolver esse problema, introduzimos uma estrutura de extração de relação neural multilíngue, que emprega atenção monolíngue para utilizar as informações em textos monolíngues e propõe ainda atenção multilíngue para considerar a consistência e a complementaridade da informação entre textos multilíngues . Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados do mundo real mostram que nosso modelo pode tirar proveito de textos multilíngues e alcançar consistentemente melhorias significativas na extração de relações em comparação com as linhas de base.', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones se ha utilizado ampliamente para encontrar hechos relacionales desconocidos a partir de texto sin formato. La mayoría de los métodos existentes se centran en explotar los datos monolingües para la extracción de relaciones, ignorando la información masiva de los textos en varios idiomas. Para abordar este problema, introducimos un marco de extracción de relaciones neuronales multilingüe, que emplea la atención monolingüe para utilizar la información dentro de los textos monolingües y propone además la atención multilingüe para considerar la coherencia y complementariedad de la información entre los textos multilingües. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos del mundo real muestran que nuestro modelo puede aprovechar los textos multilingües y lograr consistentemente mejoras significativas en la extracción de relaciones en comparación con las líneas de base.', 'ja': '関係抽出は、プレーンテキストから未知の関係事実を見つけるために広く使用されてきた。ほとんどの既存の方法は、様々な言語のテキストからの大量の情報を無視して、関係抽出のために単一言語のデータを利用することに焦点を当てています。この問題に対処するために、私たちは多言語の神経関係抽出フレームワークを導入し、単一言語のテキスト内の情報を利用するために単一言語の注意を採用し、さらに、クロスリンガルテキスト間の情報の一貫性と相補性を考慮するためにクロスリンガル注意を提案します。現実のデータセットの実験結果は、当社のモデルが多言語テキストを利用し、ベースラインと比較して関係抽出で一貫して大幅な改善を達成できることを示しています。', 'zh': '博采已遍于纯文本中求未知之实。 大抵今法皆专于利用单语数,而忽于语言文本之大信。 凡此诸事,引入言语神经关取框架,框架用单语意力,以单语文本中息,更立跨语意,以思跨语言文本之间一致性互补性。 实验结果表明于实数,比之于基线,可以多语言文本,终始显改。', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण व्यापक रूप से सादे पाठ से अज्ञात संबंधपरक तथ्यों को खोजने के लिए उपयोग किया गया है। अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीके संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए मोनो-लिंगुअल डेटा का शोषण करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, विभिन्न भाषाओं में ग्रंथों से बड़े पैमाने पर जानकारी की अनदेखी करते हैं। इस मुद्दे को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक बहुभाषी तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण ढांचे का परिचय देते हैं, जो मोनो-भाषी ग्रंथों के भीतर जानकारी का उपयोग करने के लिए मोनो-लिंगुअल ध्यान को नियोजित करता है और आगे क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ग्रंथों के बीच सूचना स्थिरता और पूरकता पर विचार करने के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ध्यान का प्रस्ताव करता है। वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि, हमारा मॉडल बहुभाषी ग्रंथों का लाभ उठा सकता है और बेसलाइन की तुलना में संबंध निष्कर्षण पर लगातार महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Извлечение отношений широко используется для нахождения неизвестных реляционных фактов из обычного текста. Большинство существующих методов сосредоточены на использовании одноязычных данных для извлечения отношений, игнорируя обширную информацию из текстов на различных языках. Для решения этой проблемы мы вводим многоязычный каркас извлечения нейронных отношений, который использует одноязычное внимание для использования информации в одноязычных текстах и далее предлагает межязычное внимание для рассмотрения согласованности информации и взаимодополняемости между межязычными текстами. Экспериментальные результаты на реальных наборах данных показывают, что наша модель может использовать преимущества многоязычных текстов и последовательно достигать значительных улучшений в извлечении отношений по сравнению с базовыми линиями.', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid go forleathan as eastóscadh caidrimh chun fíricí coibhneasta anaithnid a aimsiú ó ghnáth-théacs. Díríonn an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann cheana féin ar shonraí aonteangacha a shaothrú le haghaidh eastóscadh caidrimh, gan aird a thabhairt ar fhaisnéis ollmhór ó na téacsanna i dteangacha éagsúla. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, tugaimid isteach creat ilteangach um eastóscadh caidreamh néaraigh, a tharraingíonn aird aonteangach chun an fhaisnéis a úsáid laistigh de théacsanna aonteangacha agus a mholann tuilleadh aird thrastheangach chun comhsheasmhacht agus comhlántacht na faisnéise i measc téacsanna tras-teangacha a mheas. . Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair sonraí ón bhfíorshaol gur féidir lenár múnla leas a bhaint as téacsanna ilteangacha agus feabhsuithe suntasacha a bhaint amach go seasta ar eastóscadh gaol i gcomparáid le bunlínte.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή σχέσεων έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί ευρέως για την εύρεση άγνωστων σχεσιακών γεγονότων από απλό κείμενο. Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι επικεντρώνονται στην αξιοποίηση μονογλωσσικών δεδομένων για εξαγωγή σχέσεων, αγνοώντας μαζικές πληροφορίες από τα κείμενα σε διάφορες γλώσσες. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, εισάγουμε ένα πολυγλωσσικό πλαίσιο εξαγωγής νευρωνικών σχέσεων, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί μονογλωσσική προσοχή για να χρησιμοποιήσει τις πληροφορίες μέσα σε μονογλωσσικά κείμενα και προτείνει περαιτέρω τη διασυνοριακή προσοχή για να εξετάσει τη συνοχή και τη συμπληρωματικότητα των πληροφοριών μεταξύ των γλωσσών κειμένων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να εκμεταλλευτεί πολυγλωσσικά κείμενα και να επιτύχει σταθερά σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων σε σύγκριση με τις γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'A relatív extrakciót széles körben használják ismeretlen relatív tények megtalálására egyszerű szövegből. A legtöbb meglévő módszer arra összpontosít, hogy az egynyelvű adatokat a kapcsolatok kinyeréséhez használják fel, figyelmen kívül hagyják a különböző nyelvű szövegekből származó tömeges információkat. Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldására egy többnyelvű neurális kapcsolat extrakciós keretrendszert vezetünk be, amely egynyelvű figyelmet alkalmaz az egynyelvű szövegekben található információk felhasználására, továbbá javaslatot tesz a többnyelvű szövegek információkövetkezetességének és kiegészítő jellegének figyelembevételére. A valós adatkészleteken végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk képes kihasználni a többnyelvű szövegeket, és következetesen jelentős javulást érni el a kapcsolatkivonás terén az alapvonalakhoz képest.', 'ka': 'Name მნიშვნელოვანი მეცედომები მონო-ენგური მონაცემების გამოყენებაზე გამოყენება, განსხვავებული ენგების ტექსტიდან დიდი ინფორმაცია იგნოგურაცია. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მრავალენგური ნეიროლური შესახებ ექსტრექციის ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მონო-ენგური შესახებ გამოყენება ინფორმაციის მონო-ენგური ტექსტის შორის და დამატებით მრავალენგური შესახებ ინ ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემები რეალური მსოფლიო მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება მრავალური ტექსტის გამოიყენება და მრავალური ტექსტის გამოსახულება და მუშაობელად', 'kk': 'Қатысушылық тарқату кәдімгінен беймәлім қатынастық факттерді табу үшін көп қолданылды. Бар әдістердің көпшілігі бірнеше тілде мәтіндерден маңызды мәліметті елемейді. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін біз көп тілдік невраллық қатынас шығару бағдарламасын келтіреміз. Бұл бір тілдік мәліметті монотілік мәтіндерінде пайдалану үшін монотілік қатынасын қолданады, және бірнеше тілдік мәліметтің қатынас Шын әлемдегі деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміз көп тілдік мәтіндерінің артықшылығын қолдануға болады және негізгі сызықтардан салыстыру қатынасының көп жақсарт', 'it': "L'estrazione delle relazioni è stata ampiamente usata per trovare fatti relazionali sconosciuti dal testo semplice. La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti si concentra sullo sfruttamento dei dati monolingue per l'estrazione delle relazioni, ignorando informazioni massicce dai testi in varie lingue. Per affrontare questo problema, introduciamo un framework di estrazione delle relazioni neurali multilingue, che impiega l'attenzione monolingue per utilizzare le informazioni all'interno di testi monolingue e propone inoltre l'attenzione cross-lingual per considerare la coerenza delle informazioni e la complementarità tra i testi cross-lingual. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati reali dimostrano che, il nostro modello può sfruttare i testi multilingui e ottenere costantemente miglioramenti significativi nell'estrazione delle relazioni rispetto alle linee di base.", 'lt': 'Santykių ištrauka buvo plačiai naudojama nustatant nežinomus santykinius faktus iš paprasto teksto. Daugumoje esamų metodų daugiausia dėmesio skiriama vienkalbių duomenų naudojimui santykiams išgauti, ignoruojant didžiulę informaciją iš tekstų įvairiomis kalbomis. To address this issue, we introduce a multi-lingual neural relation extraction framework, which employs mono-lingual attention to utilize the information within mono-lingual texts and further proposes cross-lingual attention to consider the information consistency and complementarity among cross-lingual texts.  Eksperimentiniai realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali pasinaudoti daugiakalbiais tekstais ir nuosekliai gerokai pagerinti santykių gavimą, palyginti su bazinėmis linijomis.', 'mk': 'Извлекувањето на врските е широко употребено за откривање непознати врски факти од обичен текст. Повеќето постоечки методи се фокусираат на искористување на монојазични податоци за извлекување на односи, игнорирајќи ги масовните информации од текстовите на различни јазици. За да го решиме ова прашање, воведуваме рамка за екстракција на мултијазични нервни односи, која користи монојазичко внимание за користење на информациите во монојазичните тексти и понатаму предложува прекујазичко внимание за разгледување на константноста и комплементарноста на информациите помеѓу прекујазичните Експерименталните резултати на реалните податоци покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да ги искористи мултијазичните тексти и константно да постигне значителни подобрувања во извлекувањето на односите во споредба со основните линии.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan telah digunakan secara luas untuk mencari fakta hubungan tidak diketahui dari teks biasa. Kebanyakan kaedah yang ada fokus pada mengeksploitasi data monobahasa untuk ekstraksi hubungan, mengabaikan maklumat besar dari teks dalam berbagai bahasa. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian ekstraksi hubungan saraf berbilang bahasa, yang menggunakan perhatian monobahasa untuk menggunakan maklumat dalam teks monobahasa dan melanjutkan melanjutkan melanjutkan perhatian saling bahasa untuk mempertimbangkan konsistensi maklumat dan komplementariti antara teks saling bahasa. Hasil percubaan pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa, model kita boleh mengambil keuntungan dari teks berbilang-bahasa dan secara konsisten mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan pada ekstraksi hubungan dibandingkan dengan garis dasar.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അപരിചിതമായ ബന്ധുക്കള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിനായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് വ്യ മിക്കവാറും നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d, ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മോണോ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വ To address this issue, we introduce a multi-lingual neural relation extraction framework, which employs mono-lingual attention to utilize the information within mono-lingual texts and further proposes cross-lingual attention to consider the information consistency and complementarity among cross-lingual texts.  യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന', 'mt': "L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni ntużat b’mod wiesa’ biex jinstabu fatti relattivi mhux magħrufa minn test sempliċi. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi eżistenti jiffukaw fuq l-isfruttament tad-dejta monolingwistika għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet, billi jinjoraw informazzjoni massiva mit-testi f’diversi lingwi. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, a ħna nintroduċu qafas ta' estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet newrali multilingwi, li juża attenzjoni monolingwi biex tuża l-informazzjoni fi ħdan testi monolingwi u tipproponi aktar attenzjoni translingwi biex tikkunsidra l-konsistenza u l-kumplimentarjetà tal-informazzjoni fost testi translingwi. Riżultati esperimentali fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li, il-mudell tagħna jista’ jieħu vantaġġ minn testi multilingwi u b’mod konsistenti jikseb titjib sinifikanti fl-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet meta mqabbel mal-linji bażi.", 'no': 'Ekstrasjon av relasjonar er breidd brukt for å finna ukjende relasjonelle faktar frå enkelt tekst. Dei fleste eksisterande metodane fokuserer på å bruka monospråk-data for utpakking av relasjonar, ignorerer massive informasjon frå tekstane i ulike språk. For å handtera dette problemet, introduserer vi eit fleirspråk neuralrelasjonsrammeverk for utpakking, som brukar monospråk oppmerksomhet for å bruka informasjonen i monospråk tekstar, og framleis foreslår krysspråk oppmerksomhet for å vurdere informasjonskonsistency og komplementaritet mellom krysspråk tekstar. Eksperimentale resultat på datasett for verkeleg verda viser at modellen vårt kan bruka fordel av fleire språk tekstar og konsekvent oppnå signifikante forbedringar på utpakking av relasjon som sammenlignet med baselinjer.', 'mn': 'Хариулт татах нь энгийн текстээс мэдэхгүй харилцааны үндсэн зүйлсийг олохын тулд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгдсэн. Ихэнх сургалтын арга нь нэг хэлний өгөгдлийн хэрэглээнд холбогдолтой хамааралтай мэдээллийг ашиглах, олон хэлний текстүүдийн маш олон мэдээллийг үгүй болгох юм. Энэ асуудлыг асуухын тулд бид олон хэлний мэдрэлийн тархины хамааралтын бүтцийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь ганц хэл хэлний текстүүдийн мэдээллийг ашиглах болон олон хэлний анхаарлын тухай мэдээллийг олон хэлний текстүүдийн тухай ойлгох, мөн олон хэлний текстүүдийн тухай нэмэгдүүлэлт Бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь олон хэл хэлний текстүүдийг ашиглаж, үндсэн шулуунтай харьцуулах харилцааны хамааралтай сайжруулалтыг үргэлжлүүлж чадна.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji jest szeroko stosowana do wyszukiwania nieznanych faktów relacyjnych z tekstu zwykłego. Większość istniejących metod skupia się na wykorzystaniu danych jednojęzycznych do ekstrakcji relacji, ignorując ogromne informacje z tekstów w różnych językach. Aby rozwiązać tę kwestię, wprowadzamy wielojęzyczny system ekstrakcji relacji neuronowych, który wykorzystuje uwagę jednojęzyczną do wykorzystania informacji w tekstach jednojęzycznych, a następnie proponuje uwagę między językami w celu uwzględnienia spójności i komplementarności informacji między tekstami wielojęzycznymi. Wyniki eksperymentalne na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasz model może korzystać z wielojęzycznych tekstów i konsekwentnie osiągać znaczące ulepszenia ekstrakcji relacji w porównaniu z liniami bazowymi.', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor a fost utilizată pe scară largă pentru a găsi fapte relaționale necunoscute din text simplu. Cele mai multe metode existente se concentrează pe exploatarea datelor monolingve pentru extragerea relațiilor, ignorând informații masive din texte în diferite limbi. Pentru a aborda această problemă, introducem un cadru multilingv de extracție a relațiilor neurale, care utilizează o atenție monolingvă pentru a utiliza informațiile în cadrul textelor monolingve și propune în continuare atenția translingvă pentru a lua în considerare coerența informațiilor și complementaritatea dintre textele translingve. Rezultatele experimentale pe seturi de date din lumea reală arată că modelul nostru poate profita de textele multilingve și poate obține în mod constant îmbunătățiri semnificative în extragerea relațiilor în comparație cu liniile de referință.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa se široko koristila za pronalaženje nepoznatih veznih činjenica iz prostog teksta. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na iskorištavanje monojezičkih podataka za ekstrakciju odnosa, ignoriranje masivnih informacija iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predstavljamo višejezički okvir izvlačenja neuralnih odnosa, koji koristi monojezičku pažnju da iskoristi informacije unutar monojezičkih tekstova i dalje predlaže cross-jezičku pažnju da razmotrimo konsekvenciju informacija i komplementarnost među međujezičkim tekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setovima podataka na stvarnom svetu pokazuju da naš model može iskoristiti višejezičke tekste i konsekventno postići značajne poboljšanje odnosa u usporedbi sa osnovnim linijama.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පාළු පාළුවන් නොදන්න සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය හොයාගන්න සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය ප්\u200dරය ගොඩක් විදියට තියෙන විදියට මොනෝ- භාෂාවික දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට, විවි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරන්න, අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් න්\u200dයූරාල් සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා, මොනෝ භාෂාවක් අවධානය කරනවා, මොනෝ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වල තොරතුර ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක විශ', 'ta': 'வெறும் உரையிலிருந்து தெரியாத இணைப்பு காரணிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. பெரும்பாலான இருக்கும் முறைமைகள் தொடர்பு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கான மொன்மொழியின் தகவலை பயன்படுத்துவதை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, பல இந்த பிரச்சனையை விளக்க, நாம் பல மொழிகளின் புதிய தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதல் சட்டத்தை முனையமாக்குகிறோம், அது மொன்மொழியில் உள்ள தகவலை பயன்படுத்தும் மொன்மொழிகளில் உள்ள தகவலை பயன்படுத்துகிறத உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களின் முடிவு', 'so': 'Soo saarista xiriirka waxaa loo isticmaalay si ballan ah in aad ka hesho waxyaabaha la xiriira oo aan aqoonin laga helo qoraalka saxda ah. Inta badan qaababka ay jiraan waxay ku nool yihiin isticmaalka macluumaadka afka noocyada ah ee la soo bixiyo xiriirka, waxayna ka tegayaan macluumaad aad u badan oo qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Si aan arrintan ula hadlno, waxaan u soo bandhignaynaa firaaqad kala duwan oo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, kaas oo u shaqeeyaa in aad macluumaadka u isticmaasho qoraalka afka noocyada ah gudahooda, waxaana kaloo uu soo jeedinayaa in aad macluumaadka kala duwan u fiirsato isku xirnaanta iyo iskutaarinta ah oo ku dhex jira qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka qaranka ee caalamiga ah waxay muuqan karaan in modellkayagu isticmaali karo qoraalka luuqadaha badan oo kala duduwan islamarkaasna aad u baahan karto hagaajiya soo bixinta xiriirka sida isbarbardhigga qoraalada hoose.', 'sv': 'Relationsextraktion har använts i stor utsträckning för att hitta okända relationella fakta från vanlig text. De flesta befintliga metoder fokuserar på att utnyttja enspråkiga data för relationsextraktion, bortse från massiv information från texterna på olika språk. För att ta itu med denna fråga introducerar vi ett flerspråkigt ramverk för extraktion av neurala relationer, som använder enspråkig uppmärksamhet för att utnyttja informationen i enspråkiga texter och föreslår vidare tvärspråkig uppmärksamhet för att beakta informationskonsekvensen och komplementariteten mellan korspråkiga texter. Experimentella resultat på verkliga dataset visar att vår modell kan dra nytta av flerspråkiga texter och konsekvent uppnå betydande förbättringar av relationsextraktion jämfört med baselines.', 'ur': 'رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے وسیع طور پر استعمال کئے گئے ہیں صریح متن سے ناپذیر رابطہ حقیقت تلاش کرنے کے لئے. اکثر موجود طریقے ہیں جو منو زبان کے ذریعے منو لینگ ڈیٹا استعمال کریں، اور مختلف زبانوں میں متن سے بہت سی معلومات کو نادانی کریں۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک بہت سی زبان کی نئورل رابطہ اٹھانے کا فرم پیش کریں گے، جو ایک زبان کی توجه کرتا ہے کہ ایک زبان کی متن کی اطلاعات کو استعمال کرے اور اس کے بعد بہت سی زبان کی توجه کرتا ہے کہ ان معلومات کی تعلق اور تعلق کی توجه کرے۔ حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا مدل بہت سی زبان متن کے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے اور اس کے مطابق بیس لین کے مقابلہ میں نسبت اضافہ کے معاملہ میں بہت اضافہ کرسکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info Ko'pchilik mavjud usullar aloqalarni ajratish uchun mono- tillar maʼlumotini foydalanish uchun foydalanadi, har xil tildagi matnlardan juda katta maʼlumot yoʻq. Bu muammo bilan boshqarish uchun biz bir necha tillar neyron aloqani ajratib chiqarishni anglatamiz. Bu bir tillar uchun o'zining ma'lumotlarini o'rganish uchun mono tillar matnlarida foydalanish uchun bir necha tildan foydalanadi, va bir necha tildagi ma'lumotlarni bir necha tildan foydalanish imkoniyat qiladi va bir necha tildagi ma'lumotni bir xil tildan bir Mavjud dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi taʼminot natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning modelimiz bir necha tillar matnlaridan foydalanishi mumkin va bir qanday bir necha tillar matnlaridan foydalanishimiz mumkin. Ulanish tuzilishiga asosiy satrlari bilan birga bog'liq yaxshi bajarishni ba", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác tương quan đã được sử dụng rộng rãi để tìm ra liên quan không rõ ràng. Hầu hết các phương pháp đã dùng để khai thác các dữ liệu ngôn ngữ đa để khai thác mối quan hệ, lờ đi các thông tin lớn từ các văn bản tại các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng ta sẽ tạo ra một bộ khung giải cứu dây thần kinh đa ngôn ngữ, nhờ đó có một sự chú ý độc ngôn để sử dụng thông tin trong các văn bản ngôn ngữ, và đề xuất thêm sự chú ý xuyên ngôn ngữ để xem xét sự đồng nhất và bổ sung thông tin giữa các văn bản ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên các tập tin trên thế giới thực cho thấy, mô hình của chúng ta có thể tận dụng các văn bản đa ngôn ngữ và luôn đạt được những cải tiến quan trọng về cách hấp thụ mối quan hệ so với các đường cơ bản.', 'bg': 'Извличането на отношенията е широко използвано за намиране на неизвестни релационни факти от обикновен текст. Повечето съществуващи методи се фокусират върху използването на едноезични данни за извличане на релации, пренебрегвайки масивна информация от текстовете на различни езици. За да се справим с този проблем, ние въвеждаме рамка за извличане на многоезични неврални взаимоотношения, която използва едноезично внимание за използване на информацията в едноезичните текстове и допълнително предлага междуезично внимание, за да се вземе предвид съгласуваността на информацията и взаимното допълване между междуезичните текстове. Експерименталните резултати на набори от данни от реалния свят показват, че нашият модел може да се възползва от многоезични текстове и последователно да постигне значителни подобрения в извличането на релации в сравнение с базовите линии.', 'da': 'Relation ekstraktion er blevet udbredt til at finde ukendte relationelle fakta fra almindelig tekst. De fleste eksisterende metoder fokuserer på at udnytte ensprogede data til relationsudtrækning og ignorere massive oplysninger fra teksterne på forskellige sprog. For at løse dette spørgsmål indfører vi en flersproget neural relation ekstraktion ramme, der anvender ensproget opmærksomhed til at udnytte oplysningerne i ensprogede tekster og yderligere foreslår tværsproget opmærksomhed for at overveje informationssammenhængen og komplementariteten mellem tværsprogede tekster. Eksperimentelle resultater på virkelige datasæt viser, at vores model kan drage fordel af flersprogede tekster og konsekvent opnå betydelige forbedringer i relation ekstraktion sammenlignet med baselines.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa se široko koristila za pronalaženje nepoznatih veznih činjenica iz prostog teksta. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na iskorištavanje monojezičkih podataka za ekstrakciju odnosa, ignoriranje masivnih informacija iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predstavljamo višejezički okvir izvlačenja neuroloških odnosa, koji koristi monojezičku pažnju za upotrebu informacija unutar monojezičkih tekstova i dalje predlaže cross-jezičku pažnju kako bi razmotrili konsekvenciju informacija i komplementarnost među međujezičkim tekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima realnog svijeta pokazuju da naš model može iskoristiti višejezičke tekste i konsekventno postići značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na ekstrakciju odnosa u usporedbi s početnim linijama.', 'de': 'Beziehungsextraktion ist weit verbreitet, um unbekannte relationale Fakten aus Klartext zu finden. Die meisten existierenden Methoden konzentrieren sich auf die Nutzung monolingualer Daten für die Beziehungsextraktion, wobei massive Informationen aus den Texten in verschiedenen Sprachen ignoriert werden. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, führen wir ein mehrsprachiges neuronales Beziehungsextraktionsframework ein, das monolinguale Aufmerksamkeit einsetzt, um die Informationen in monolingualen Texten zu nutzen, und weiter schlägt crosslinguale Aufmerksamkeit vor, um die Informationskonsistenz und Komplementarität zwischen crosslingualen Texten zu berücksichtigen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell mehrsprachige Texte nutzen und konsequent signifikante Verbesserungen bei der Beziehungsextraktion im Vergleich zu Baselines erzielen kann.', 'nl': 'Relatie extractie is veel gebruikt voor het vinden van onbekende relationele feiten uit platte tekst. De meeste bestaande methoden richten zich op het gebruik van mono-lingual data voor relatieontwikkeling, waarbij massale informatie uit de teksten in verschillende talen wordt genegeerd. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, introduceren we een meertalig neurale relatie extractie framework, dat mono-lingual aandacht gebruikt om de informatie in mono-lingual teksten te gebruiken en verder cross-lingual aandacht voorstelt om de informatie consistentie en complementariteit tussen cross-lingual teksten te overwegen. Experimentele resultaten op real-world datasets tonen aan dat ons model gebruik kan maken van meertalige teksten en consequent aanzienlijke verbeteringen kan bereiken op het gebied van relatieontwikkeling in vergelijking met baselines.', 'id': 'Ekstrasi hubungan telah digunakan secara luas untuk menemukan fakta hubungan tidak diketahui dari teks biasa. Kebanyakan metode yang ada fokus pada mengeksploitasi data monobahasa untuk ekstraksi hubungan, mengabaikan informasi besar dari teks dalam berbagai bahasa. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian ekstraksi hubungan saraf multibahasa, yang menggunakan perhatian monobahasa untuk menggunakan informasi dalam teks monobahasa dan melanjutkan melanjutkan melanjutkan perhatian interbahasa untuk mempertimbangkan konsistensi informasi dan komplementaritas antara teks interbahasa. Hasil eksperimental pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa, model kita dapat mengambil keuntungan dari teks berbagai bahasa dan secara konsisten mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan pada ekstraksi hubungan dibandingkan dengan garis dasar.', 'fa': 'اخراج ارتباط برای پیدا کردن حقیقت ارتباطی ناشناخته از متن ساده استفاده شده است. بیشتر روش\u200cهای موجود روی استفاده از داده\u200cهای mono-lingual برای اخراج ارتباط تمرکز می\u200cکند، و اطلاعات بزرگی از متن\u200cها در زبان\u200cهای مختلف نادیده می\u200cگیرند. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که، مدل ما می\u200cتواند از متن\u200cهای متعدد زبان استفاده کند و همیشه بهترین\u200cهای بزرگی در انتقال رابطه به مقایسه با خطوط\u200cهای پایین به دست آورد.', 'tr': 'Ilkinji gabdaly metin tapmak üçin ullanýar. Iň köp bar döwletler mono-dilli maglumatlary çekmek üçin harplary ulanmakda fokus edýär. Metinlerden gaty uly maglumatlary dürli dillerde ýok edip bilmeýär. Bu meselede çözmek üçin, biz birnäçe dilli näyral baglaýyşy a çmak üçin, bu da mono dilli metinlerin içinde maglumatlary ulanmak üçin bir üns alýar we ýene-de durmuş dillerden habarlaşmak üçin bilgi durmuşyny we ullanlygyny düşünmek üçin gurnalar diýip teklip edýäris. Gerçek dünýäde maglumat setirlerinde örän netijeleri görkezip bilýär, nusgymyz köp dilli metinlerin üstüne alyp bilýär we baz hatlaryň derejesi bilen golaýlaşyk bilen baglanşyk täsirlerini gowurap bilýär.', 'af': "Relasie uittrekking is vaste gebruik vir te vind onbekende relatiewe fakte van eenvoudige teks. Mees bestaande metodes fokus op die gebruik van mono-taal data vir verwanting van uittrekking, ignoreer massiewe inligting van die teks in verskeie tale. Om hierdie aandag te raak, introduseer ons 'n multi-tale neurale verwanting van uittrekking raamwerk, wat mono-tale aandag gebruik om die inligting binne mono-tale teks te gebruik en verder voorstel kruistale aandag om die inligting konsistensie en komplementariteit onder kruistale teks te beskou. Eksperimentale resultate op reël wêreld datastelle wys dat ons model kan voordeel van multi-tale teks neem en konsistentlik betalinge verbeteringe van verwanting uittrekking bereik soos vergelyk met basisline.", 'sw': 'Utoa wa uhusiano umetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa kutafuta ukweli wa mahusiano yasiyo na maandishi ya wazi. Njia nyingi zilizopo zinalenga kutumia taarifa za lugha za kimono kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa mahusiano, zinasahau taarifa kubwa kutoka maandishi ya lugha mbalimbali. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunaanzisha mfumo wa utekelezaji wa mahusiano ya lugha mbalimbali, ambao unatumia ufuatiliaji wa lugha kwa lugha moja kwa moja ili kutumia taarifa ndani ya maandishi ya lugha na pia tunapendekeza kusikiliza kwa lugha nyingine ili kutafakari umuhimu na uungwaji wa taarifa kati ya maandishi mbalimbali ya lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye taarifa za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kuwa, mtindo wetu unaweza kutumia manufaa ya maandishi ya lugha mbalimbali na kwa ujumla unaweza kupata maboresho makubwa kuhusu utoaji wa mahusiano kama ilivyolinganishwa na mistari ya msingi.', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i marrëdhënieve është përdorur gjerësisht për të gjetur fakte të panjohura të marrëdhënieve nga teksti i thjeshtë. Shumica e metodave ekzistuese përqëndrohen në shfrytëzimin e të dhënave monogjuhësore për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve, duke injoruar informacionin masiv nga tekstet në gjuhë të ndryshme. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne futim një kuadër nxjerrjeje të marrëdhënieve neuronale shumëgjuhëse, i cili përdor vëmendjen monogjuhësore për të përdorur informacionin brenda teksteve monogjuhësore dhe propozon më tej vëmendjen ndërgjuhësore për të konsideruar konsistencën e informacionit dhe komplementaritetin midis teksteve ndërgjuhësore. Rezultatet eksperimentale në të dhënat e botës reale tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të përfitojë nga tekstet shumëgjuhësore dhe të arrijë në mënyrë konsistente përmirësime të rëndësishme në nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve krahasuar me linjat bazë.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ለመጠቀም በብዙ ሥርዓቶች ላይ ማጠቃለያል፣ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች የጽሑፎችን የጥልቅ መረጃዎችን እየሳቱ፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች የኔural ግንኙነት የውጤት ፍሬም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ እውነተኛውን ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ የመፈተና ውጤቶች ማሳየቱ፣ ሞዴላያችን በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ጽሑፎችን ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաբերության բացահայտումը լայնորեն օգտագործվել է անհայտ հարաբերական փաստեր պարզ տեքստից գտնելու համար: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է միալեզու տվյալների օգտագործման հարաբերությունների վերացման համար, անտեսելով տարբեր լեզուներով տեքստների մեծ տեղեկատվությունը: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազլեզու նյարդային հարաբերությունների վերացման շրջանակ, որը օգտագործում է միալեզվի ուշադրություն միալեզվի տեքստերի մեջ տեղեկատվության օգտագործման համար և նաև առաջարկում է երկլեզվի ուշադրություն, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք տեղեկատվության կատարելիությունը և փոխլեզվի Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է օգտագործել բազմալեզու տեքստերը և մշտապես հասնել նշանակալի բարելավումների հարաբերությունների վերացման հարաբերություններում, համեմատած հիմնական գծերի', 'ko': '관계 추출은 순수한 텍스트에서 알 수 없는 관계 사실을 발견하는 데 광범위하게 사용된다.기존의 방법은 대부분 단어 데이터를 이용하여 관계 추출에 중심을 두었고 서로 다른 언어의 텍스트에서 온 대량의 정보를 소홀히 했다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 다중 언어 신경 관계 추출 프레임워크를 도입했다. 이 프레임워크는 단일 언어 주의를 이용하여 단일 언어 텍스트의 정보를 활용하고 다중 언어 주의를 제시하여 다중 언어 텍스트 간의 정보 일치성과 상호 보완성을 고려한다.실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 다중 언어 텍스트를 이용할 수 있고 기선에 비해 관계 추출에 현저한 개선을 얻었다.', 'bn': 'সাধারণ লেখা থেকে অজানা সম্পর্কের তথ্য খুঁজে পাওয়ার জন্য সংযোগ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতিগুলো সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য মোনো-ভাষায় তথ্য ব্যবহার করার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, বিভিন্ন ভাষায় লেখা  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করার জন্য আমরা বহুভাষী নিউরেল সম্পর্ক বের করার কার্যক্রম পরিচালনা করেছি, যা মোনো ভাষায় ভাষায় তথ্য ব্যবহার করার জন্য মনোভাষী ভাষায় মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষায় তথ বাস্তবতার তুলনায় আমাদের মডেল বহুভাষাভাষী টেক্সটের সুবিধা প্রদান করতে পারে এবং সম্পর্কের বেছে নিয়ে যাওয়ার তুলনায় আমাদের সম্পর্কের বিশেষ উন্নতি', 'az': 'İlişkilərin çıxarılması açıq metindən bilinməyən əlaqələr tapmaq üçün geniş işlədilər. Ən çox mövcuddur metodlar mono dil verilənlərini istifadə etməyə, müxtəlif dillərdə mətnlərdən böyük məlumatları görməyə çalışır. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, çox dilli nöral əlaqəsi çıxartma framework ünü təşkil edirik, ki, mono dilli textlərin məlumatlarını istifadə etmək üçün mono dilli ünvanı istifadə edir və daha çox dilli ünvanı daxil edir ki, məlumatların sürəkliyini və çox dilli məlumatların arasında tamamlanmasını düşünün. Gerçek dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları göstərir ki, modellərimiz çoxlu dil mətnlərindən fayda verə bilər və həmişəliklə bağlantı çıxarılması haqqında dəyişiklik düzəltmələri baseline ilə müqayisədə müəyyən edə bilər.', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions s'ha utilitzat ampliament per trobar fets relacionals desconeguts a partir de text senzill. La majoria dels mètodes existents es centren en l'explotació de dades monolingües per a l'extracció de relacions, ignorant informació massiva dels textos en diverses llengües. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, introduïm un marc d'extracció de relacions neurals multillengües, que emplega atenció monollengüe per utilitzar la informació dins els textos monollengües i proposa més atenció transllengüe per considerar la consistencia de la informació i la complementaritat entre els textos transllengües. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades del món real mostren que el nostre model pot aprofitar els textos multilingües i aconseguir millores significatives en l'extracció de relacions en comparació amb les línies de base.", 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů byla široce používána pro nalezení neznámých relačních faktů z prostého textu. Většina stávajících metod se zaměřuje na využití monojazyčných dat pro extrakci vztahů, přičemž ignoruje masivní informace z textů v různých jazycích. Pro řešení této problematiky představujeme vícejazyčný neuronový extrakční rámec, který využívá monojazyční pozornost k využití informací v monojazyčných textech a dále navrhuje mezijazyčnou pozornost k zohlednění konzistence a doplňkovosti informací mezi vícejazyčnými texty. Experimentální výsledky na reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš model může využít vícejazyčných textů a důsledně dosahovat významných zlepšení v extrakci vztahů oproti základním liniím.', 'et': 'Suhte ekstraheerimist on laialdaselt kasutatud tundmatute suhteliste faktide leidmiseks tavalisest tekstist. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid keskendub ühekeelsete andmete kasutamisele seoste ekstraheerimiseks, ignoreerides erinevates keeltes tekstudest pärit massilist teavet. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks tutvustame mitmekeelset närvisuhete ekstraheerimise raamistikku, mis kasutab ühekeelset tähelepanu ühekeelsete tekstide teabe kasutamiseks ning pakub edaspidi välja keeleülese tähelepanu, et kaaluda teabe järjepidevust ja vastastikust täiendavust keeleüleste tekstide vahel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused reaalmaailma andmekogumite kohta näitavad, et meie mudel võib kasutada ära mitmekeelseid tekste ja saavutada pidevalt olulisi parandusi seoste ekstraheerimisel võrreldes lähtejoontega.', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa se široko koristila za pronalaženje nepoznatih veznih činjenica iz prostog teksta. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na iskorištavanje monojezičkih podataka za ekstrakciju odnosa, ignoriranje masivnih informacija iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predstavljamo višejezički okvir izvlačenja neuralnih odnosa, koji koristi monojezičku pažnju da iskoristi informacije unutar monojezičkih tekstova i dalje predlaže cross-jezičku pažnju kako bi razmotrili konsekvenciju informacija i komplementarnost među međujezičkim tekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima stvarnog svijeta pokazuju da naš model može iskoristiti višejezičke tekstove i konsekventno postići značajne poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi s početnim linijama.', 'fi': 'Suhteen uuttamista on käytetty laajalti tuntemattomien suhdefaktojen löytämiseen yksinkertaisesta tekstistä. Useimmissa nykyisissä menetelmissä keskitytään hyödyntämään monikielistä dataa suhteessa poimimiseen, unohtamatta massiivista tietoa eri kielillä olevista teksteistä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi otamme käyttöön monikielisen neurosuhteiden poistokehyksen, jossa hyödynnetään monikielistä huomiota monikielisten tekstien informaation hyödyntämiseen ja ehdotetaan edelleen monikielistä huomiota monikielisten tekstien informaation johdonmukaisuuden ja täydentävyyden huomioon ottamiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset reaalimaailman aineistoista osoittavat, että mallimme voi hyödyntää monikielisiä tekstejä ja saavuttaa johdonmukaisesti merkittäviä parannuksia relaatioiden poimintaan verrattuna perusviivoihin.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Awak dhéwé sing isih perkoro kanggo nggunakake data Mono-nglanggar kanggo nggawe tanggal Ngawe nggunakake pergunakake iki, kita nggunakake karo akeh langkung sampeyan anyar tentang karo akeh tanggal, sing nggunakake tok-ingkang nggawe informasi ning katimbang kelangan tok sampeyan ingkang lan sumulakno langkung sampeyan luwih dumadhi kanggo ngubah ingkang sumulakno kanggo langgar sampeyan ingkang nggawe informasi nggawe coheres karo akeh bantuan ingkang bantuan. Reultihan langkung barang dataset sing nyimpen-uwong ngomong nik, modelo sing bisa nguasai perusahaan langkung sami multi-langkung arah akeh bantuan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan langkung arah sing katya karo tanggal sing bakal dumadhi.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje relacij se pogosto uporablja za iskanje neznanih relacijskih dejstev iz navadnega besedila. Večina obstoječih metod se osredotoča na izkoriščanje enojezičnih podatkov za ekstrakcijo relacij, pri čemer ignorira obsežne informacije iz besedil v različnih jezikih. Za reševanje tega vprašanja uvajamo večjezični okvir za ekstrakcijo nevronskih odnosov, ki uporablja enojezično pozornost za uporabo informacij v enojezičnih besedilih in nadalje predlaga večjezično pozornost za upoštevanje doslednosti informacij in dopolnjevanja med večjezičnimi besedili. Eksperimentalni rezultati na zbirkah podatkov v realnem svetu kažejo, da lahko naš model izkoristi večjezična besedila in dosledno doseže znatne izboljšave pri ekstrakciji relacij v primerjavi z osnovnimi črtami.', 'ha': "An amfani da shirin haɗi don a sami matsayin da ba'a sani ba daga matsayin plain. Babbansu da shiryoyin ayuka da ke jira ana fokus a kan yin amfani da data na lugha-linguin da aka nuna wa masu husũma, kuma yana ƙorin maɓalli daga rubutun cikin harshen daban. To, idan za mu yi magana ga wannan masu al'amarin, za mu introduce firam na Extracti na takardar neural masu yawa, wanda ke amfani da aikin muhimmanci a cikin linguin-lingui dõmin ka yi amfani da amfani da information cikin littafin takardar-harshe na mono-lingui kuma, ana ƙarfafa muhimmanci da harshe-na'ura dõmin ka yi tunãni ga masu kamid da kamfatawa na takarda cikin littafan-harshen. Matarin jarrabawa a kan data masu cikin duniya gaske yana nuna cewa, misalinmu yana iya amfani da misalin littafan mulki-lingui, kuma yana iya sami mafiya amfani da masu muhimmi ga zartarwa masu husũma kamar da aka sammeni da basasalin.", 'he': 'השימוש ברחבי היחסים למצוא עובדות מערכת יחסים לא ידועות מהטקסט הפשוט. Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data for relation extraction, ignoring massive information from the texts in various languages.  כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנחנו מכניסים מסגרת חיפוש מערכת יחסים עצביים רבות-שפותית, שמשתמשת תשומת לב מונה-שפותית להשתמש במידע בתוך טקסטים מונה-שפותיים תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראות שמודל שלנו יכול לנצל טקסטים רבים-שפותיים ולהשיג שיפורים משמעותיים בהוצאה מערכת יחסים בהשוואה לקווים הבסיסים.', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཕྱིར་བཤེར་སླེབས་པ་སྦྱར་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྟོགས་པ གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་ནི་སྤྱད་ནས་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། To address this issue, we introduce a multi-lingual neural relation extraction framework, which employs mono-lingual attention to utilize the information within mono-lingual texts and further proposes cross-lingual attention to consider the information consistency and complementarity among cross-lingual texts. ལག་འཚོལ་གྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་ཚོགས་ལས་བརྟན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་རིགས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པར་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Learning Structured Natural Language Representations for Semantic Parsing', 'pt': 'Aprendendo representações estruturadas de linguagem natural para análise semântica', 'fr': "Apprentissage des représentations structurées du langage naturel pour l'analyse sémantique", 'ar': 'تعلم تمثيلات اللغة الطبيعية المهيكلة للتحليل الدلالي', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representaciones estructuradas de lenguaje natural para el análisis semántico', 'ja': 'セマンティック解析のための構造化自然言語表現の学習', 'zh': '学以语义解析结构化自然语言', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए संरचित प्राकृतिक भाषा अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение структурированных представлений естественного языка для семантического анализа', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin Struchtúrtha Teanga Nádúrtha a Fhoghlaim le haghaidh Parsáil Shéimeantach', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურაციული ნაირადი ენერგიის გამოსახულებები სემანტიკური პასუხისთვის', 'el': 'Μάθηση δομημένων αναπαραστάσεων φυσικής γλώσσας για τη σημειακή ανάλυση', 'hu': 'Tanulás strukturált természetes nyelvi reprezentációk a szemantikus értelmezéshez', 'it': "Rappresentazioni strutturate del linguaggio naturale per l'analisi semantica", 'lt': 'Mokymasis struktūrizuotomis gamtinėmis kalbomis Semantinio analizavimo atstovybėmis', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған тәуелді тілді таңдау үшін үйрену', 'mk': 'Учење структурирани природни јазички претставувања за семантично анализирање', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Bahasa Semantic Terstruktur', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл суралцах суралцах', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Læring av strukturerte naturspråk- representasjonar for semiantisk tolking', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Rappreżentazzjonijiet Strutturati tal-Lingwa Naturali għall-Analiżi Semantika', 'sr': 'Učenje strukturiranog prirodnog jezika predstavljanja semantičkog razmatranja', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor structurate ale limbajului natural pentru interpretarea semantică', 'pl': 'Uczenie się ustrukturyzowanych reprezentacji języka naturalnego dla parsowania semantycznego', 'si': 'සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්ථාවිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் பாசிங்குக்கான இயல்பான மொழி பிரிவுகள்', 'so': 'Barista baaritaanka asalka ah', 'sv': 'Lärande strukturerade naturliga språkrepresentationer för semantisk tolkning', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے لئے ساخترائی طبیعی زبان کی روشنی کی تعلیم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên phân tích kỳ cục', 'bg': 'Учене на структурирани естествени езикови представи за семантична обработка', 'hr': 'Učenje strukturnih prirodnih jezika predstavljanja semantičkog razmatranja', 'nl': 'Het leren van gestructureerde natuurlijke taalrepresentaties voor semantisch parsen', 'da': 'Læringsstrukturerede natursprogrepræsentationer for semantisk fortolkning', 'de': 'Lernen strukturierter natürlicher Sprachrepräsentationen für Semantisches Parsing', 'id': 'Belajar Bahasa Alam Struktur Perwakilan untuk Analisasi Semantik', 'ko': '의미 분석을 위한 구조화된 자연 언어 표시 학습', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایندگان زبان طبیعی ساخته شده برای پرداخت سیمانتیک', 'tr': 'Semantik Taýýarlama üçin Structured Natural Language Representations öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer Struktuurde Natuurlike Taal Voorstellings vir Semantiese Toesteling', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të strukturuara të gjuhës natyrore për analizimin Semantik', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Maandamano ya Lugha ya asili kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Semantic', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Սովորել բնական լեզուների կառուցվածքային ներկայացումները սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'Semantik Parsing 칲칞칲n Structured Natural Language Representations 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধি', 'bs': 'Učenje strukturiranih prirodnih jezika predstavljanja semantičkog razmatranja', 'ca': "Aprendre representacions de llenguatges naturals estructurats per a l'analització Semàtica", 'cs': 'Výuka strukturovaných reprezentací přirozeného jazyka pro sémantické analýzy', 'et': 'Õppimine struktureeritud loodusliku keele esindused semantiliseks parsimiseks', 'fi': 'Oppiminen Strukturoidut luonnollisen kielen edustustot semanttiseen analyysiin', 'jv': 'Learning structural Language representations for semanti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'לימוד מייצגים של שפת טבעית מבוססת עבור בדיקת סמנטית', 'sk': 'Učenje strukturiranih naravnih jezikovnih predstavitev za semantično razpravo', 'bo': 'སྔོན་བསྡུས་ལྟར་འཛིན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་བའི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ།'}
{'en': 'We introduce a neural semantic parser which is interpretable and scalable. Our model converts natural language utterances to intermediate, domain-general natural language representations in the form of predicate-argument structures, which are induced with a transition system and subsequently mapped to target domains. The semantic parser is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denotations. We achieve the state of the art on SPADES and GRAPHQUESTIONS and obtain competitive results on GEOQUERY and WEBQUESTIONS. The induced predicate-argument structures shed light on the types of representations useful for semantic parsing and how these are different from linguistically motivated ones.', 'ar': 'نقدم محلل دلالي عصبي قابل للتفسير وقابل للتطوير. يحول نموذجنا النطق اللغوي الطبيعي إلى تمثيلات لغة طبيعية وسيطة عامة للمجال في شكل هياكل حجة أصلية ، يتم تحفيزها باستخدام نظام انتقالي ثم تعيينها لاحقًا إلى المجالات المستهدفة. يتم تدريب المحلل اللغوي من طرف إلى طرف باستخدام أشكال منطقية مشروحة أو دلالاتها. نحن نحقق أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية في SPADES و GRAPHQUESTIONS ونحصل على نتائج تنافسية على GEOQUERY و WEBQUESTIONS. تسلط هياكل الحجة المسند المستحثة الضوء على أنواع التمثيلات المفيدة للتحليل الدلالي وكيف تختلف عن تلك ذات الدوافع اللغوية.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos um analisador semântico neural que é interpretável e escalável. Nosso modelo converte enunciados de linguagem natural em representações intermediárias de linguagem natural de domínio geral na forma de estruturas predicado-argumento, que são induzidas com um sistema de transição e subsequentemente mapeadas para domínios de destino. O analisador semântico é treinado de ponta a ponta usando formas lógicas anotadas ou suas denotações. Alcançamos o estado da arte em SPADES e GRAPHQUESTIONS e obtemos resultados competitivos em GEOQUERY e WEBQUESTIONS. As estruturas predicado-argumento induzidas esclarecem os tipos de representações úteis para a análise semântica e como elas são diferentes das de motivação linguística.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un analyseur sémantique neuronal interprétable et évolutif. Notre modèle convertit les énoncés du langage naturel en représentations intermédiaires du langage naturel général du domaine sous la forme de structures prédicat-argument, qui sont induites par un système de transition et ensuite mappées aux domaines cibles. L'analyseur sémantique est entraîné de bout en bout à l'aide de formes logiques annotées ou de leurs dénotations. Nous atteignons l'état de l'art sur SPADES et GRAPHQUESTIONS et obtenons des résultats compétitifs sur GEOQUERY et WEBQUESTIONS. Les structures prédicat-argument induites éclairent les types de représentations utiles pour l'analyse sémantique et en quoi elles diffèrent des représentations motivées par la langue.", 'es': 'Presentamos un analizador semántico neuronal que es interpretable y escalable. Nuestro modelo convierte las expresiones del lenguaje natural en representaciones intermedias del lenguaje natural, de dominio general, en forma de estructuras de argumento predicado, que se inducen con un sistema de transición y, posteriormente, se asignan a los dominios objetivo. El analizador semántico se entrena de extremo a extremo utilizando formas lógicas anotadas o sus denotaciones. Logramos el estado del arte en SPADES y GRAPHQUESTIONS y obtenemos resultados competitivos en GEOQUERY y WEBQUESTIONS. Las estructuras de predicado-argumento inducidas arrojan luz sobre los tipos de representaciones útiles para el análisis semántico y en qué se diferencian de las motivadas lingüísticamente.', 'ja': '解釈可能でスケーラブルなニューラルセマンティック構文解析器を紹介します。私たちのモデルは、自然言語の発話を述語-引数構造の形式の中間的で一般的なドメイン自然言語表現に変換し、これは遷移システムで誘導され、その後ターゲットドメインにマッピングされます。セマンティックパーサーは、注釈付き論理フォームまたはその表記を使用してエンドツーエンドで訓練される。SPADSとGRAPHQUESTIONSで最先端を達成し、GEOQUERYとWEBQUESTIONSで競争力のある結果を得ています。誘導された述語論証構造は、意味解析に有用な表現の種類と、これらが言語学的に動機付けられたものとどのように異なるかを明らかにした。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим нейронный семантический парсер, который является интерпретируемым и масштабируемым. Наша модель преобразует произношения естественного языка в промежуточные представления естественного языка в виде предикатов-аргументов, которые индуцируются системой перехода и впоследствии отображаются в целевые домены. Семантический парсер обучают сквозным с использованием аннотированных логических форм или их обозначений. Достигаем высочайшего уровня по пикам и ГРАФОКВЕСТИОНАМ и получаем конкурентные результаты по ГЕОКВЕРИ и ВЕБКВЕСТИОНАМ. Наведенные структуры предикат-аргумент проливают свет на типы представлений, полезных для семантического синтаксического анализа, и на то, чем они отличаются от лингвистически мотивированных.', 'zh': '引入一神经语义解析器。 吾形以谓词参数结构自然语言语转为中域通用自然语言,示以转换系统诱而映射之也。 语义解析器用带注逻辑或表示法端到端训练。 吾于SPADESGRAPHQUESTIONS之上得先进之术,而得竞争力于GEOQUERY、WEBQUESTIONS之上。 诱谓词论结,语义解析有用之形,与言语动机何异。', 'hi': 'हम एक तंत्रिका शब्दार्थ पार्सर पेश करते हैं जो व्याख्या योग्य और स्केलेबल है। हमारा मॉडल प्राकृतिक भाषा उच्चारण को विधेय-तर्क संरचनाओं के रूप में मध्यवर्ती, डोमेन-सामान्य प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रतिनिधित्व में परिवर्तित करता है, जो एक संक्रमण प्रणाली के साथ प्रेरित होते हैं और बाद में लक्ष्य डोमेन में मैप किए जाते हैं। शब्दार्थ पार्सर को एनोटेटेड तार्किक रूपों या उनके डिनोटेशन का उपयोग करके एंड-टू-एंड प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हम SPADES और GRAPHQUESTIONS पर कला की स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं और GEOQUERY और WEBQUESTIONS पर प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। प्रेरित विधेय-तर्क संरचनाएं शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए उपयोगी प्रतिनिधित्व के प्रकारों पर प्रकाश डालती हैं और ये भाषाई रूप से प्रेरित लोगों से कैसे अलग हैं।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach parsálaí shéimeantach néaraigh atá inléirithe agus inscálaithe. Tiontaíonn ár samhail nathanna teanga nádúrtha go léiriúcháin idirmheánacha, fearainn-ghinearálta teanga nádúrtha i bhfoirm struchtúir tuartha-argóint, a tharlódh le córas trasdula agus a mhapáiltear ina dhiaidh sin chuig na réimsí sprice. Déantar an parsálaí shéimeantach a oiliúint ó cheann ceann ag baint úsáide as foirmeacha loighciúla anótáilte nó a sainchomharthaí. Bainimid scoth na céime amach maidir le SPADES agus GRAPHQUESTIONS agus faighimid torthaí iomaíocha ar GEOQUERY agus WEBQUESTIONS. Tugann struchtúir na hargóintí tuartha léargas ar na cineálacha léirithe atá úsáideach don pharsáil shéimeantach agus ar na difríochtaí atá eatarthu agus na cinn atá spreagtha ag teanga.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ნეიროლური სმენტიკური პანელიზერი, რომელიც ინტერპუქციურია და მარტივია. ჩვენი მოდელმა ჩვენი მოდელმა თავისუფალური ენის სიტყვების გადაცვლება საშუალოდ, დემომინის საერთო ნაირო ენის გამოსახულებების ფორმაში, რომლებიც გადატანა სისტემით და შემდეგ მისახულებული დემომინის სიმენტიკური პასენტორი დასრულებულია დასრულებული ლოგიკური ფორმების გამოყენებით ანოტაციების გამოყენებით. ჩვენ მივიღეთ სურათების სტადის და გრაფიკურების სტატის სტატის შესახებ და კონპექციური შესახებ მივიღეთ. სიმენტიკური პარასტისთვის გამოსახულებელი რესპეცენტაციების განსხვავება და როგორ ისინი ლენგურისტიკურად მოტივირებულებისგან განსხვავებულია.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε έναν νευρωνικό σημασιολογικό αναλυτή ο οποίος είναι ερμηνευτικός και κλιμακώσιμος. Το μοντέλο μας μετατρέπει τις εκφράσεις της φυσικής γλώσσας σε ενδιάμεσες, γενικές αναπαραστάσεις της φυσικής γλώσσας με τη μορφή δομών υπαρκτών-ορίων, οι οποίες προκαλούνται με ένα μεταβατικό σύστημα και στη συνέχεια χαρτογραφούνται στους στοχευόμενους τομείς. Ο σημασιολογικός αναλυτής εκπαιδεύεται από άκρη σε άκρη χρησιμοποιώντας σχολιασμένες λογικές μορφές ή τις δηλώσεις τους. Επιτυγχάνουμε την αιχμή της τεχνολογίας στις ΣΚΟΠΕΣ και ΓΡΑΜΜΑΤΙΚΕΣ ΕΡΩΤΗΣΕΙΣ και επιτυγχάνουμε ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα σε ΓΡΑΜΜΑΤΙΚΕΣ και ΓΡΑΜΜΑΤΙΚΕΣ ΕΡΩΤΗΣΕΙΣ. Οι επαγόμενες δομές προδιάθεσης-επιχειρήματος ρίχνουν φως στους τύπους αναπαραστάσεων χρήσιμων για τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση και πώς αυτές διαφέρουν από τις γλωσσικά υποκινούμενες.', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy neurális szemantikai elemzőt, amely értelmezhető és skálázható. Modellünk a természetes nyelvi kifejezéseket közepes, domain-általános természetes nyelvi reprezentációkká alakítja át-argumentum struktúrák formájában, amelyeket átmeneti rendszerrel indukálunk, majd céltartományokra térképezünk. A szemantikai elemzőt végtől végig tanítják jegyzetelt logikai formákkal vagy azok jelöléseivel. Elérjük a legkorszerűbb technológiát a SPADES és GRAPHQUESTIONS területén, és versenyeredményeket érünk el a GEOQUERY és a WEBBQUESTIONS területén. Az indukált predikát-argumentum struktúrák rávilágítanak a szemantikai elemzéshez hasznos reprezentációk típusaira, és ezek hogyan különböznek a nyelvi motivációktól.', 'it': "Introducemo un parser semantico neurale che è interpretabile e scalabile. Il nostro modello converte le espressioni del linguaggio naturale in rappresentazioni intermedie del linguaggio naturale generale di dominio sotto forma di strutture predicato-argomento, che vengono indotte con un sistema di transizione e successivamente mappate a domini target. Il parser semantico viene addestrato end-to-end utilizzando forme logiche annotate o le loro denotazioni. Raggiungiamo lo stato dell'arte su SPADE e GRAPHQUESTIONS e otteniamo risultati competitivi su GEOQUERY e WEB QUESTIONS. Le strutture indotte predicato-argomento fanno luce sui tipi di rappresentazioni utili per l'analisi semantica e su come queste siano diverse da quelle motivate linguisticamente.", 'kk': '袘褨蟹 褌爷褋褨薪褨泻褌褨 卸訖薪械 屑邪褋褕褌邪斜褌邪褍 屑爷屑泻褨薪写褨谐褨 斜芯谢邪褌褘薪 薪械胁褉邪谢写褘覜 褋械屑邪薪褌懈泻邪谢褘覜 褌邪谢写邪褍褕褘谢邪褉写褘 褌邪遥写邪泄屑褘蟹. 袘褨蟹写褨遥 爷谢谐褨屑褨蟹 褌邪斜懈覔懈 褌褨谢 褋萤蟹写械褉褨薪 芯褉褌邪褕邪, 写芯屑械薪谐械 卸邪谢锌褘 褌邪斜懈覔懈 褌褨谢写械褉写褨 邪谢写褘薪写邪覔褘 邪褉谐褍屑械薪褌褌褨遥 覜冶褉褘谢褘屑褘薪邪 邪褍褘褋褌褘褉褍 卸爷泄械褋褨 屑械薪 褋芯写邪薪 泻械泄褨薪 屑邪覜褋邪褌褌褘 写芯屑械薪谐械 褋訖泄泻械褋 械褌褨谢械写褨. Semantic parsing is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denominations. 袘褨蟹 小袩袗袛 卸訖薪械 袚袪袗肖 袣袝袥袝小孝袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝袪袛袝 小械屑邪薪褌懈泻邪谢褘覜 褌邪谢写邪褍 爷褕褨薪 锌邪泄写邪谢邪薪褍褕褘谢邪褉写褘遥 褌爷褉谢械褉褨 屑械薪 芯谢邪褉写褘遥 谢懈薪谐胁懈褋褌懈泻邪谢褘覜 屑芯褌懈胁邪褑懈褟谢褘覜 褌爷褉谢械褉褨薪械薪 覜邪谢邪泄 邪泄褘褉屑邪褕褘谢褘覔褘薪 褌爷褋褨薪写褨褉械写褨.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome nervinį semantinį analizatorių, kuris yra aiškinamas ir skaliuojamas. Mūsų modelis gamtinių kalbų išraiškas paverčia tarpiniais, bendrojo domeno gamtinių kalbų išraiškais, formuojant išankstinius argumentus, kurie yra sukelti pereinamojo laikotarpio sistema ir vėliau paversti tiksliniais domenais. Semantinis analizatorius mokomas nuo pabaigos naudojant anotuotas logines formas arba jų nuorodas. Mes pasiekiame pažangiausią pažangą SPADES ir GRAPHQUESTS srityje ir gauname konkurencinius rezultatus GEOQUERY ir WEBQUESTS srityje. Atsižvelgiant į sukeltas argumentavimo struktūras paaiškėjo, kokių tipų atstovavimai yra naudingi semantiniam analizavimui ir kaip jie skiriasi nuo kalbiniu būdu pagrįstų atstovavimų.', 'mk': 'Ние претставуваме нервен семантичен анализатор кој е интерпретабилен и скалиран. Нашиот модел ги претвора природните јазични изрази во меѓународни, генерални природни јазични претставувања во форма на предикатни аргументи структури, кои се индукционирани со транзициски систем и потоа мапирани во метни домени. Семантичкиот анализатор е трениран од крај до крај користејќи анотирани логични форми или нивни наведувања. Ние постигнуваме најдобра технологија за СПАДЕС и ГРАФКЕСТИЈА и добиваме конкурентни резултати за ГЕОКЕРИ и ВЕБКЕСТИЈА. Индукционираните структури на предикативни аргументи објаснуваат типови на претставувања корисни за семантичното анализирање и како се различни од јазички мотивираните.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan penghurai semantik saraf yang boleh diterjemahkan dan boleh diperbaiki. Model kami menukar ungkapan bahasa semulajadi ke mewakili bahasa semulajadi, domain-umum, dalam bentuk struktur argumen-predikat, yang diinduksi dengan sistem transisi dan kemudian dipetakan ke domain sasaran. Penghurai semantik dilatih akhir-akhir menggunakan bentuk logik anotasi atau denotasi mereka. Kami mencapai kemajuan pada SPADES dan GRAPHQUESTIONS dan mendapatkan keputusan kompetitif pada GEOQUERY dan WEBQUESTIONS. Struktur argumen-predikat yang disebabkan memberi cahaya kepada jenis perwakilan yang berguna untuk penghuraian semantik dan bagaimana ia berbeza dari yang bermotivasi bahasa.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu parser semantiku newrali li huwa interpretabbli u skalabbli. Il-mudell tagħna jikkonverti l-espressjonijiet lingwistiċi naturali f’rappreżentazzjonijiet lingwistiċi naturali intermedji u ġenerali tad-dominju fil-form a ta’ strutturi predikati-argumenti, li huma indotti b’sistema ta’ tranżizzjoni u sussegwentement immappjati għal dominji fil-mira. The semantic parser is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denotations.  Aħna niksbu l-aktar avvanzati dwar SPADES u GRAPHQUESTIONS u niksbu riżultati kompetittivi dwar GEOQUERY u WEBQUESTIONS. L-istrutturi ta’ argument predikat indotti qajmu dawl fuq it-tipi ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet utli għall-analiżi semantika u kif dawn huma differenti minn dawk motivati lingwistikament.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നതും കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d തമ്മിലുള്ള, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d -സാധാരണ ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധികളാക്കുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന സെമാന്റിക് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു അവസാനം അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും അവയുടെ ഡെനോട്ടേഷ സ്പാഡെസും ഗ്രാപ്ഫ്യൂഷനുമായുള്ള കലാകാര്യത്തിന്റെയും അവസ്ഥ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ജോക്യൂററിയിലെയും വിചാരകങ്ങളിലെയ The induced predicate-argument structures shed light on the types of representations useful for semantic parsing and how these are different from linguistically motivated ones.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн семантик хуваагч гэдэг нь ойлгомжтой, хэмжээтэй. Бидний загвар нь байгалийн хэл хэлний хэлбэрүүдийг дундаж, доминийн ерөнхий байгалийн хэл илэрхийлдэг аргументын бүтцийн хэлбэрээр шилжүүлэх системээс нөлөөлдөг, дараа нь зориулагдсан зориулагдсан зориулагдсан зориулагдсан Semantic parser is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denominations. Бид СПАДЕС, ГАРАФИХ СУРГАН Урлагийн байр сууриллагын төвшинд хүргэдэг. Мөн тэмцэх болон СУРГАН СУРГАН СУРГАН СУРГАН СУРГАН СУРГАН Д Эдгээр нь хэлний урам зориулагдсан хэлбэрээс хэрхэн ялгаатай харилцааны төрлүүд дээр гэрэл гаргасан.', 'ro': 'Introducem un parser semantic neural care este interpretabil și scalabil. Modelul nostru convertește pronunțările limbajului natural în reprezentări intermediare ale limbajului natural general de domeniu sub formă de structuri predicat-argument, care sunt induse cu un sistem de tranziție și apoi mapate la domenii țintă. Parserul semantic este instruit end-to-end folosind forme logice adnotate sau denotările lor. Realizăm ultimele tehnologii în domeniul SPADE și GRAPHQUESTIONS și obținem rezultate competitive în domeniul GEOQUERY și WEB QUESTIONS. Structurile induse predicat-argument fac lumină asupra tipurilor de reprezentări utile pentru analizarea semantică și modul în care acestea sunt diferite de cele motivate lingvistic.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo neuralni semantički analizator koji je interpretabilan i skalabilan. Naš model preobraća prirodne jezičke reči na prosječne, opće prirodne jezike domena u obliku predikatne strukture argumenta, koje su indukovane sa prelaznim sistemom i nakon toga mapirane na ciljne domene. Semantički analizator je obučen na kraju do kraja koristeći annotirane logičke oblike ili njihove denotacije. Postižemo stanje umjetnosti o SPADES i GRAPHQUESTIONSMA i dobijemo konkurentne rezultate na GEOQUERY i WEBQUESTIONS. Iniciacione predikatne argumentske strukture su svjetla na vrste predstavljanja korisnih za semantičko analizu i kako su to različite od jezički motiviranih.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy neuronowy parser semantyczny, który jest interpretowalny i skalowalny. Nasz model konwertuje wypowiedzi języka naturalnego na pośrednie, domenowo-ogólne reprezentacje języka naturalnego w postaci struktur predykatów-argumentów, które są indukowane za pomocą systemu przejściowego, a następnie mapowane do domen docelowych. Parser semantyczny jest trenowany od końca do końca za pomocą adnotacji form logicznych lub ich oznaczeń. Osiągamy najnowocześniejszy stan techniki w zakresie SPADES i GRAPHQUESTIONS oraz uzyskujemy konkurencyjne wyniki na GEOQUERY i WEBQUESTIONS. Indukowane struktury predykatów-argumentów rzucają światło na rodzaje reprezentacji przydatnych do parsowania semantycznego oraz na to, jak różnią się one od motywowanych językowo.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein neuralsemantisk tolkar som er tolkbar og skalerbar. Modellen vår konverterer naturspråk-uttrykk til gjennomsnitt, domene-generelle naturspråk-representasjonar i form av predikate-argument-strukturer, som er indusert med eit overgangssystem og etterpå kartert til måldområde. Semantisk tolkaren er trent til slutt- til- slutt ved å bruka markerte logiske skjemar eller sitt nevnning. Vi oppnår statusen på kunsten på SPADES og GRAPHQUESTION og får konkurentiv resultat på GEOQUESTION og WEBQUESTION. Den induserte predikative argumentstrukturen lagde lys på typane representasjonar som nyttig for semantisk tolking og korleis desse er ulike frå lingvisk motiverte.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en neural semantisk parser som är tolkningsbar och skalbar. Vår modell omvandlar naturliga språkuttryck till mellanliggande, domänövergripande naturliga språkrepresentationer i form av predikat-argumentstrukturer, som induceras med ett övergångssystem och därefter mappas till måldomäner. Den semantiska tolkaren tränas från början till slut med hjälp av kommenterade logiska former eller deras beteckningar. Vi uppnår det senaste inom SPADES och GRAPHFRÅGOR och uppnår konkurrenskraftiga resultat på GEOFRÅGOR och WEBBFRÅGOR. De inducerade predikat-argumentstrukturerna belyser vilka typer av representationer som är användbara för semantisk tolkning och hur dessa skiljer sig från språkligt motiverade representationer.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa baaritaanka neurada ah oo turjuman kara oo cajiibsan kara. Tusaale ahaan ayaa hadallada afka asalka ah u bedela si ay u kala soocaan luuqada hoose-dhexe, si ay u muuqato noocyo ka mid ah dhismaha xaajooyinka, taas oo lagu sameeyo nidaam ka soo wareega, waxaana dabadeedna loo sawiraa meelaha lagu hago. Parameerka semantika waxaa lagu tababaray dhammaadka ugu dambaysta iyo dhammaadka marka lagu isticmaalayo foomka la xiriiray ama deynta. Waxaynu gaadhnaa xaaladda farshaxanta ee SPADES iyo AQUUULTIyada, waxaana helaynaa resultada iskaashatada ah ee ku saabsan GEOQUERIA iyo WAQUARIyada. Tusaalada warqadda ee la sameeyay waxay ku iftiimiyaan noocyada qofka ah oo ay u faa’iido badan yihiin baarlamaanka semantika iyo sida ay u kala duwanyihiin kuwa luuqada ku hagaajiya.', 'si': 'අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂකයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් සහ ස්කේල් කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපේ මොඩල් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනස් කරනවා, domain-General ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂකය අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරන්න පුළුවන් අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි. අපි ස්පේඩ් සහ ග්\u200dරැෆ්කුසියෝන්ස් වලින් කල්ලාගේ ස්ථිතිය ලබාගන්නවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා. සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා මේවා භාෂාවික විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිදේශ වලින් ප්\u200dරතිදේශ', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய பெம்மான்டிக் பாடலை அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம். இது முடியும் மற்றும் scalable ஆகும். எங்கள் மாதிரி இயல்பான மொழி வார்த்தைகளை நடுத்தரமாக மாற்றுகிறது, உள்ளமைப்பு பொது இயல்பான மொழி பிரதிநிதிகள் முன்னிருப்பு வார்ப்பு அமைப்புகளில The semantic parameter is trained to end- to end using annotated logical forms or their denotations. நாங்கள் விளக்கச்சீட்டுகள் மற்றும் காராப்புக்கள் மற்றும் கலை நிலைமை பெறுகிறோம் மற்றும் பூக்கியம் மற்றும் விஷயங்கள் மீது போராடும்  முன்னேற்றும் வார்ப்பு உருவம்', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل سیمانتی پارچر کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو تفسیر قابل ہے اور مقدار قابل ہے ہمارا مدل طبیعی زبان کی باتوں کو میڈریس، ڈومین-عمومی طبیعی زبان کی نمایش کی صورت میں تبدیل کرتا ہے، جو ایک تغییر سیسٹم کے ساتھ پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں اور اس کے بعد موجود ڈومین کے لئے مکاپ کئے جاتے ہیں. سیمنٹی پارچر کی تعلیم آخر-to-end کی استعمال کی جاتی ہے انٹیٹ منطقی فرموں یا ان کی تعلیم کے مطابق۔ ہم اسپڈز اور گھاٹیوں کے معاملہ میں هنر کی موقعیت پہنچاتے ہیں اور جہاجوری اور سؤال کے معاملہ میں رقابت نتائج حاصل کرتے ہیں. سیمانٹی پارسینگ کے لئے فائدہ دکھانے کے لئے فائدہ دکھانے والی مثالیں بنائی گئی تھیں اور ان کی زبان سے کیسے مختلف ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz neyrolik semantik parametrlarini ko'rib chiqaramiz. Bu ma'lumot va skalab chiqarishi mumkin. Bizning modelimiz tabiiy tilning so'zlarini o'rtasida, domen- umumiy tilning tahrirlarini o'zgartiradi. Biz o'zgartirish tizimi bilan ishga tushirilgan va keyin keyin domenerga qaramaydi. Name Biz SPADES va GRAPHARMAL haqida saqlash holatini amalga oshamiz va GEOQUER va AQUDHAL haqida rivojlanish natijalarini olimiz. Ko'rsatilgan prepredicate argumentlar tuzuvlari semantik parsing turlarida ishlatiladi va bu tilni qanday o'zgarishga o'zgarishdir.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một vị cha phân biệt và có thể giải thích. Mẫu của chúng tôi chuyển đổi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thành biểu hiện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên phổ biến giữa các đại loại miền dưới dạng cấu trúc các biện pháp khó khăn được tạo ra bằng một hệ thống chuyển đổi và sau đó được vẽ thành miền đích. The semantics đã được đào tạo từ cuối cùng bằng các hoá đơn được ghi chú hoặc chỉ dẫn của chúng. Chúng ta đạt được trạng thái nghệ thuật trên các mặt nạ SỬ và vân tay và kiếm kết quả cạnh tranh bằng chứng về trí tuệ và bằng vũ khí. Các cấu trúc khó khăn dẫn đến làm sáng tỏ các kiểu biểu tượng có ích cho phân tích ngữ pháp và cách chúng khác với các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ học.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме неврален семантичен анализатор, който може да се интерпретира и мащабира. Нашият модел преобразува речите на естествения език в междинни, домейнно-общи природни представи под формата на предикатно-аргументни структури, които се индуцират с преходна система и впоследствие се картографират към целеви домейни. Сентичният анализатор се обучава от край до край, използвайки анотирани логически форми или техните обозначения. Постигаме най-съвременните технологии по СПАДИ и ГРАФВЪПРОСИ и получаваме конкурентни резултати по ГЕОКУРИИ и УЕБВЪПРОСИ. Индуктираните структури на предикат-аргументите хвърлят светлина върху видовете представителства, полезни за семантичното анализиране и как те се различават от лингвистично мотивираните.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en neural semantisk fortolker, som er fortolkbar og skalerbar. Vores model konverterer naturlige sprogudtalelser til mellemliggende, domænenordnede natursprogrepræsentationer i form af prædikat-argumentstrukturer, som induceres med et overgangssystem og efterfølgende kortlægges til måldomæner. Den semantiske fortolker trænes end-to-end ved hjælp af kommenterede logiske former eller deres betegnelser. Vi opnår det nyeste inden for SPADE og GRAPHQUESTIONS og opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på GEOQUERY og WEBSQUESTIONS. De inducerede prædikat-argumentstrukturer kaster lys over de typer af repræsentationer, der er nyttige for semantisk fortolkning, og hvordan disse adskiller sig fra sprogligt motiverede.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een neurale semantische parser die interpreteerbaar en schaalbaar is. Ons model zet natuurlijke taaluitingen om naar intermediaire, domein-algemene natuurlijke taalrepresentaties in de vorm van predicaat-argumentstructuren, die worden geïnduceerd met een overgangssysteem en vervolgens in kaart worden gebracht aan doeldomeinen. De semantische parser wordt end-to-end getraind met behulp van geannoteerde logische vormen of hun aanduidingen. Wij bereiken de state of the art op SPADES en GRAPHQUESTIONS en verkrijgen concurrerende resultaten op GEOQUERY en WEBQUESTIONS. De geïnduceerde predicaat-argument structuren werpen licht op de soorten representaties die nuttig zijn voor semantische parsing en hoe deze verschillen van taalkundig gemotiveerde representaties.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo neuralni semantički analizač koji je interpretabilan i skalabilan. Naš model preobraća prirodne jezičke izraze na prosječne, opće prirodne jezike domena u obliku predikatne strukture argumenta, koje su indukovane s prelaznim sustavom i nakon toga mapirane na ciljne domene. Semantički analizač je obučen kraj do kraja koristeći annotirane logičke oblike ili njihove denotacije. Postigli smo stanje umjetnosti o SPADES i GRAPHQUESTIONSMA i dobili konkurentne rezultate na GEOQUERY i WEBQUESTIONS. Inicirane predikatne argumentske strukture su svjetlo na vrste predstavljanja korisnih za semantičko razmatranje i kako su to različite od jezički motiviranih.', 'de': 'Wir führen einen neuronalen semantischen Parser ein, der interpretierbar und skalierbar ist. Unser Modell konvertiert natürliche Sprachäußerungen in intermediäre, domänengeschichtliche natürliche Sprachrepräsentationen in Form von Prädikat-Argument-Strukturen, die mit einem Übergangssystem induziert und anschließend auf Zieldomänen abgebildet werden. Der semantische Parser wird Ende-zu-Ende mit annotierten logischen Formen oder deren Denotationen trainiert. Wir erreichen den Stand der Technik bei SPADES und GRAPHQUESTIONS und erzielen wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse bei GEOQUERY und WEBQUESTIONS. Die induzierten Prädikat-Argument-Strukturen geben Aufschluss darüber, welche Arten von Repräsentationen für das semantische Parsen nützlich sind und wie diese sich von sprachlich motivierten unterscheiden.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan parser semantis saraf yang dapat diterjemahkan dan dapat diperbaiki. Model kita mengubah ungkapan bahasa alami menjadi representation bahasa alami, domain-umum, dalam bentuk struktur predikat-argumen, yang diinduksi dengan sistem transisi dan kemudian dipetakan ke domain sasaran. Analisasi semantis dilatih akhir-akhir menggunakan bentuk logis anotasi atau denotasi mereka. Kami mencapai state of the art pada SPADES dan GRAPHQUESTIONS dan mendapatkan hasil kompetitif pada GEOQUERY dan WEBQUESTIONS. Struktur predikat-argumen yang diduka memberikan cahaya pada tipe representation yang berguna untuk pemeriksaan semantis dan bagaimana ini berbeda dari yang bermotivasi bahasa.', 'fa': 'ما یک بازیگر سیمانتی عصبی را معرفی می کنیم که قابل تعبیر و مقیاس قابل است. مدل ما کلمات زبان طبیعی را تبدیل می\u200cکند تا نمایش\u200cهای زبان طبیعی در شکل ساختارهای مختلف حجت طبیعی، که با یک سیستم تغییر و بعدش به دامنهای هدف نقشه\u200cبندی می\u200cشوند. پاره\u200cکننده\u200cی semantic با استفاده از فرم\u200cهای منطقی یا نشانه\u200cهای آنها آموزش داده می\u200cشود. ما موقعيت هنر در مورد اسپادز و گراگويي رسيديم و نتيجه رقابتي در مورد قضاوت و بازجويي دريافت مي کنيم. ساختارهای مختلف حجت\u200cهای پیشینه\u200cای روشنی بر نوع\u200cهای نمایش\u200cهای مفید برای تجزیه\u200cهای semantic و چگونه این\u200cها با انگیزه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی متفاوت هستند.', 'ko': '우리는 해석 가능하고 확장 가능한 신경 의미 분석기를 소개했다.우리의 모델은 자연언어 언어를 술어-논원 구조 형식의 중간, 영역-통용 자연언어 표현으로 전환하는데 이런 표현은 전환 시스템에 의해 유도되고 그 다음에 목표 영역에 비친다.어의 해석기는 주석이 있는 논리 형식이나 표시를 사용하여 끝에서 끝까지 훈련한다.우리는 SPADES와 GRAPHQUESTIONS 분야에서 가장 선진적인 수준에 이르렀고 GEOQUERY와 WEBQUESTIONS 분야에서 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.귀납 술어 논원 구조는 의미 분석에서 유용한 표현 형식의 유형과 언어 동기의 표현 형식과의 차이를 보여준다.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mchambuzi wa sekta ya neura ambao unaweza kutafsiri na kudharauliwa. Mfano wetu unabadilisha maneno ya lugha ya asili ili kuwawakilisha lugha ya asili ya ndani kwa namna ya miundombinu ya hoja iliyopita, ambayo inazinduliwa na mfumo wa mpito na baadae ramani kwa ajili ya kuwalenga maeneo. Mpasuaji wa semantiki umefundishwa mwisho wa mwisho kwa kutumia mifumo ya kitaalamu au kurasa zao. Tumefanikiwa hali ya sanaa kwenye maswali ya SPADE na SHARI za KWA na kupata matokeo ya ushindani kuhusu UJUZI na MAHABU. Miundombinu yenye hoja zilizotengenezwa iliweka mwanga juu ya aina ya uwakilishi yenye manufaa kwa ajili ya kuimba kimapenzi na jinsi ambavyo haya ni tofauti na zile zinazohamasishwa kwa lugha.', 'tr': 'Biz nöral semantik çözümleyici ve ölçeklenebilir bir tanıtıyoruz. Biziň modelimiz tebigy dil sözlerini öň-öňündeki argum strukturlarynyň şeklinde orta çykarýar, we soňra maksadyň domaýlara gönderilýär. Semantik tansiçi sonunda nöbetli mantıklı formlarla ya da bildirimlerini kullanarak eğitildir. Biz SPADES we GRAPHUKYSIZIJAR hakynda sungatyň durumyny ýetip bilýäris we GEOKYSIZIJAR we BİKYSIZIJAR barada döwletli netijeleri elde etdik. Bu öňki-öňki argumlar sistemalary semantik parslamak üçin ullanýan ýagtylyga düşürdi we bunlar lingwistiki nähili motive edilýänlerden farklı bir şekilde üýtgedi.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një analizues semantik nervor që është i interpretueshëm dhe i shkallëzueshëm. Our model converts natural language utterances to intermediate, domain-general natural language representations in the form of predicate-argument structures, which are induced with a transition system and subsequently mapped to target domains.  Analizatori semantik është trajnuar nga fundi në fund duke përdorur formulare logjike të anotuara apo denotacionet e tyre. Ne arrijmë state of the art në SPADES dhe GRAPHQUESTIONS dhe fitojmë rezultate konkurruese në GEOQUERY dhe WEBQUESTIONS. Strukturat e induktuara të argumenteve të predikuara nxjerrin dritë mbi llojet e përfaqësimeve të dobishme për analizimin semantik dhe se si këto janë të ndryshme nga ato të motivuara gjuhësisht.', 'am': 'የneyural semantic ተርጓሚን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የፍጥረት ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን በመካከለኛ፣ የውይይት የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካባቢ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እንዲሆን ይለውጣል፡፡ The semantic parameter is trained to end-to-end using annotated logical forms or denotations. የድምፅ ጉዳይ እና የድምፅ ጉዳይ ላይ የዐርላዊውን ሁኔታ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት አካውንቶች የቋንቋ ተሟጋቾች እንዴት ይለዩበታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային սեմանտիկ վերլուծում, որը մեկնաբանելի է և ընդլայնելի: Մեր մոդելը փոխակերպում է բնական լեզվի արտահայտությունները բնական լեզվի միջին, ընդհանուր տիեզերքում գոյություն ունեցող բնական արտահայտությունների ձևով, որոնք արտադրվում են փոխանցման համակարգով և հետո քարտեզագրված են նպատակային տիեզերքների ձև Սեմանտիկ վերլուծողը վերջ-վերջ ուսուցանված է օգտագործելով annoted տրամաբանական ձևեր կամ դրանց նշումներ: Մենք հասնում ենք լավագույն տեխնոլոգիաներին սպեյդեսների և գրաֆեզիաների վրա և ստանում ենք մրցակցության արդյունքներ գեոկուրերի և վեբ-հարցերի վրա: Ինդուկտիվացված բարդ բանավեճերի կառուցվածքները լուսավորում են սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համար օգտակար ներկայացումների տեսակները և այն, թե ինչպես են դրանք տարբերվում լեզվաբանական մոտիվացված կառուցվածքներից:', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n neurale semantiese ontleerder wat vertaalbaar en skalerbaar is. Ons model omskakel natuurlike taal uitspraak na middel, domein-algemene natuurlike taal voorstellings in die vorm van predikaat-argument strukture, wat ingevolg word met 'n oorgang stelsel en volgende gekaarp word na doel domeine. Die semantiese ontleerder is opgelei end- to- end met gebruik van notateerde logiese vorms of hul uitleggings. Ons bereik die staat van die kuns op SPADES en GRAPHQUESTIONS en kry mededingsresultate op GEOQUESTIONS en WEBQUESTIONS. Die aangedrukte predikaat-argument-strukture het lig gegooi op die tipes van voorstellings wat gebruik is vir semantiese verwerking en hoe hierdie verskillend is van lingvisiese motiveerde.", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিউরেল সেম্যান্টিক বিশ্লেষক পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা ব্যাখ্যা এবং স্ক্যালেবাল। আমাদের মডেল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ভাষার ভাষার কথা মিশ্রিত করে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য, য সেম্পেন্টিক প্যালেজার প্রশিক্ষিত শেষ-শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে বিভিন্ন লোগিকাল ফর্ম বা ড আমরা স্পাডেস এবং গ্রাপ্ফুয়েশনের শিল্পের অবস্থা অর্জন করি এবং প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল পেতে পারি। প্রতিনিধিত্বের ধরনের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিষয়গুলোর উপর আলোক প্রকাশ করে এবং ভাষাভাষায় উদ্দেশ্য প্রচারিত কিভাবে এই', 'az': 'Biz nöral semantik parçacını təşkil edirik ki, çəkilir və çəkilir. Bizim modelimiz təbiətli dil sözlərini ortalamaq, domena-genel təbiətli dil göstəriciləri, dəyişiklik-arqümat qurularının forması ilə dəyişiklik sistemi ilə yaradılır və sonra da məqsəd domenalara mapa edilir. Semantik ayırıcısı məlumatlı logik formalarını və beləliklərini istifadə edərək sona-sona təhsil edilir. Biz SPADES və GRAPQUESTION məlumatının durumunu başa çatdıq və GEOQUESTION və BİQUESTION üzərində müqayisəçi sonuçlarını alırıq. Səmantik ayırmaq üçün faydalı nümunələrin və dilində motivatlı olanlardan necə fərqli olduğunu göstərən predikat argumenti qurulmuşdur.', 'ca': "Introduïm un analitzador semàntic neural que és interpretable i escalable. El nostre model converteix les expressions de llenguatge natural en representacions de llenguatge natural intermediàries i generals en domini en form a d'estructures predicates-argument, que es produeixen amb un sistema de transició i posteriorment es mapeixen a dominis alvo. The semantic parser is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denotations.  Obtenim l'actualitat en SPADES i GRAPHQUESTIONS i obtenim resultats competitius en GEOQUERY i WEBQUESTIONS. Les estructures de predicat-arguments induïdes donen llum als tipus de representacions útils per l'analització semàntica i com són diferents de les motivacions lingüístices.", 'et': 'Tutvustame neurosemantilist parserit, mis on tõlgendatav ja skaleeritav. Meie mudel muundab looduskeele väljendid keskmisteks, domeeniüldisteks looduskeele esindusteks predikaadi-argumendi struktuuridena, mis indutseeritakse üleminekusüsteemiga ja seejärel kaardistatakse sihtdomeenidesse. Semantiline parser koolitatakse otsast otsa, kasutades annoteeritud loogilisi vorme või nende tähistusi. Me saavutame tehnika taseme SPADES ja GRAPHQUESTIONS ning saavutame konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi GEOQUERY ja WEB QUESTIONS. Indueeritud predikaadi-argumendi struktuurid heidavad valgust semantiliseks parsimiseks kasulike representatsioonide tüüpidele ja kuidas need erinevad lingvistiliselt motiveeritud representatsioonidest.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme neurosemanttisen parserin, joka on tulkittavissa ja skaalautuva. Mallimme muuntaa luonnollisen kielen lauseet välitason, domeenin yleisiksi luonnonkielen esityksiksi predikaatti-argumenttirakenteiden muodossa, jotka indusoidaan siirtymäjärjestelmällä ja myöhemmin kartoitetaan kohdedomeeniin. Semanttinen jäsentäjä koulutetaan end-to-end käyttäen annotoituja loogisia muotoja tai niiden denotointeja. Saavutamme viimeisintä tekniikkaa SPADES- ja GRAPHQUESTIONS-kysymyksissä ja saamme kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia GEOQUERY- ja WEBQUESTIONS-kysymyksissä. Indusoidut predikaatti-argumenttirakenteet valaisevat semanttisen jäsentämisen kannalta hyödyllisiä esityksiä ja miten ne eroavat kielellisesti motivoituneista.', 'bs': 'Upoznajemo neuralni semantički analizač koji je interpretabilan i skalabilan. Naš model preobraća prirodne jezičke izraze na prosječne, opće prirodne jezike domena u obliku predikatne strukture argumenta, koje su indukovane sa prelaznim sistemom i nakon toga mapirane na ciljne domene. Semantički analitičar je obučen na kraju do kraja koristeći annotirane logičke oblike ili njihove denotacije. Postigli smo stanje umjetnosti na SPADES i GRAPHQUESTIONS i dobili konkurentne rezultate na GEOQUERY i WEBQUESTIONS. Iniciacione predikatne argumentske strukture su svjetlo na vrste predstavljanja korisnih za semantičko razmatranje i kako su to različite od jezički motiviranih.', 'cs': 'Představujeme neuronový sémantický parser, který je interpretovatelný a škálovatelný. Náš model převádí výroky přirozeného jazyka na střední, doménově obecné reprezentace přirozeného jazyka ve formě predikátových argumentů, které jsou indukovány přechodovým systémem a následně mapovány do cílových domén. Sémantický parser je trénován end-to-end pomocí anotovaných logických forem nebo jejich označení. Dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků na GEOQUERY a WEBQUESTIONS. Indukované predikátovo-argumentní struktury vrhají světlo na typy reprezentací užitečných pro sémantickou parsování a na to, jak se liší od lingvisticky motivovaných.', 'jv': 'Kernel We model convert normal language words to intermediate, domain semanti Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar tarjamah kanggo kelas depan karo pakan lan pakan-pakan iki dadi iki pakan langgar tarjamah pakan lan pakan-pakan . Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perbudhakan-argument sing gak bakal kelangan ning kelangan kelangan winih dhéwé basa sematik karo perbudhakan karo perusahaan kelangan kelangan karo perusahaan langkung sampek.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani salo na semantic na neura wanda yana fassarar da misalin. @ info: whatsthis An sanar da parser ɗin semantic na ƙari zuwa-ƙara, ana yi amfani da tsarin lokal da aka sanar da su ko sunotensu. Munã sami halin sanar da KSPADAS da MARUKAKI kuma Munã sami fassarar masu motsi a kan JUQUER da UQUESTI. Haka'in da aka samar da bakin jãyayya ya zasu haske kan nau'i-nau'i masu amfani da yin parse ga semantic kuma don ka sãɓã wa su daga masu motsi da aka mottar da harshen.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nevralni semantični razčlenjevalec, ki je razložljiv in razširljiv. Naš model pretvori izraze naravnega jezika v vmesne, domensko-splošne predstavitve naravnega jezika v obliki predikatno-argumentnih struktur, ki se inducirajo s prehodnim sistemom in nato preslikajo v ciljne domene. Semantični razčlenjevalec je usposobljen od konca do konca z uporabo označenih logičnih oblik ali njihovih denotacij. Dosegamo najsodobnejše na področju presledkov in grafičnih vprašanj ter pridobivamo konkurenčne rezultate na področju GEOQUERY in SPLETNIH Vprašanj. Induzirane predikatno-argumentne strukture osvetlijo vrste reprezentacij, ki so koristne za semantično razčlenjevanje in kako se te razlikujejo od jezikovno motiviranih.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מעבד סמנטי עצבי שאפשר לפרש ולהגדיל. המודל שלנו מעביר מילים שפת טבעיות לתצוגות שפת טבעיות בינותיות, גנרליות בתחום כללי בצורה של מבנים טיעון-מוקדים, שנגרמו עם מערכת מעבר ומפות לאחר מכן לתחום המטרה. הפרסם הסמנטי מאומן בסוף לסוף בשימוש בצורות הגיוניות המכתבות או הדינוטציות שלהם. אנו משיגים את המצב האמנותי על ספיידס ושאלות ולהשיג תוצאות תחרותיות על GEOQUERY ושאלות WEBQUESTIONS. המבנים הנוגעים לטיעון מוקדם השליכו אור על סוגי היציגות שימושיים לאבחן סמנטי ואיך אלה שונים מאלה שמוטיבים לשפתית.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་སེལ་ཅན་ཞིག Our model converts natural language utterances to intermediate, domain-general natural language representations in the form of predicate-argument structures, which are induced with a transition system and subsequently mapped to target domains. semantic parser is trained end-to-end using annotated logical forms or their denominations. ང་ཚོས་SPADES དང་GRAPHQUESTIONS་ནང་གི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གནས་སྟངས་དཔལ་འཛོམས་པ་དང་ རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་དང་ཚད་རྩ་བའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དགོས་པ་རེད། The induced predicate-argument structures shed light on the types of representations useful for semantic parsing and how these are different from linguistically motivated ones.'}
{'en': 'Morph-fitting : Fine-Tuning Word Vector Spaces with Simple Language-Specific Rules', 'ar': 'ملاءمة التحويل التدريجي: الضبط الدقيق لمسافات متجه الكلمات باستخدام قواعد بسيطة خاصة بلغة معينة', 'es': 'Ajuste de morph: ajuste fino de los espacios vectoriales de palabras con reglas simples específicas del lenguaje', 'fr': "Morph-fitting\xa0: affinement des espaces vectoriels de mots à l'aide de règles simples spécifiques au langage", 'ja': 'モーフフィッティング:単純な言語固有のルールでワードベクトル空間を微調整する', 'pt': 'Ajuste morfológico: ajuste fino de espaços vetoriais de palavras com regras simples específicas de linguagem', 'zh': '变形拟合:用特定言者微词向量间', 'hi': 'Morph-फिटिंग: सरल भाषा-विशिष्ट नियमों के साथ ठीक ट्यूनिंग वर्ड वेक्टर रिक्तियाँ', 'ru': 'Морфинг: точная настройка векторных пространств слов с помощью простых правил, специфичных для языка', 'ga': 'Feistiú moirf: Mionchoigeartú Spásanna Veicteoir Focal le Rialacha Simplí a bhaineann go sonrach le Teangacha', 'hu': 'Morph-illeszkedés: finomhangoló szóvektoros területek egyszerű nyelvspecifikus szabályokkal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μορφο-προσαρμογή: Βελτιστοποίηση των διανυσματικών χώρων λέξεων με απλούς γλωσσικούς κανόνες', 'kk': 'Морф сәйкестігі: Қарапайым тіл- ережелерімен керек сөздерді түзету векторының орындары', 'it': 'Adattamento morfologico: regolazione fine degli spazi vettoriali delle parole con regole semplici specifiche per il linguaggio', 'lt': 'Morfo įrengimas: nuodugniai pritaikytos žodžių vektorių erdvės su paprastomis kalbos specifinėmis taisyklėmis', 'mk': 'Морфско приспособување: Векторни простори со фино приспособување со едноставни правила специфични за јазик', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian-morf: Ruang Vektor Perkataan Penyesuaian Baik dengan Peraturan Khusus Bahasa Mudah', 'mt': 'It-twaħħil tal-morfu: Spazji tal-Vetturi tal-Kliem ta’ Aġġustament Fin b’Regoli Simpli Speċifiċi għal-Lingwi', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫ്- ഫിറ്റി: സുന്ദരിയ്ക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ്സുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Морф-хангалттай: Хялбар хэл-тодорхойлолтой дүрэм', 'sr': 'Morf-odgovarajući: prostora za vektor lijepe reči sa jednostavnim jezikom specifičnim pravilima', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Montare în formă: Reglare fină a spațiilor vectoriale Word cu reguli simple specifice limbajului', 'pl': 'Dopasowanie morf: Dostosowanie przestrzeni wektorowych słowa z prostymi regułami specyficznymi dla języka', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Fine-Tuning Word Vector Spaces with simple-language-specific Rules', 'ta': 'மார்ப்- பொருத்தம்:', 'sv': 'Morph-anpassning: Finjusterar Word Vector Spaces med enkla språkspecifika regler', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Morf-odgovarajući: prostora za dobar prilagođavanje riječi vektora s jednostavnim jezikom specifičnim pravilima', 'nl': 'Morph-fitting: het fine-tunen van woordvectorruimten met eenvoudige taal-specifieke regels', 'bg': 'Финно настройване на текстови векторни пространства с прости езикови специфични правила', 'da': 'Morph-tilpasning: Finindstilling af Word Vector Spaces med enkle sprogspecifikke regler', 'de': 'Morph-Fitting: Feinabstimmung von Wortvektorräumen mit einfachen sprachspezifischen Regeln', 'id': 'Penyesuaian-morf: Ruang Vektor Perkataan Penyesuaian Baik dengan aturan Spesifik Bahasa sederhana', 'sw': 'Matukio ya Morph: Sauti ya Utamaduni wa Hadithi yenye Sheria nyepesi ya Lugha', 'fa': 'جایگاههای ویکتور کلمه با قانون\u200cهای ویژه\u200cی زبان ساده\u200c', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i morfit: Rregullat e rregullimit të mirë të fjalëve për vektorët me rregulla të thjeshta specifike gjuhës', 'ko': '변형 의합: 간단한 언어의 특정 규칙을 사용하여 단어의 벡터 공간을 미세하게 조정한다.', 'tr': 'Morf gabdaly: Basit Diller bilen Taýdalanýan söz vektör seleňleri', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Morf-uyğulaması: Basit Dil-Özümlü Kuralları ilə Sözlü Vektör Aralıqları', 'bs': 'Morf-odgovarajući: prostora za dobar nastavljanje riječi vektora s jednostavnim jezikom specifičnim pravilima', 'bn': 'মোর্ফ- মিটিং: সাধারণ ভাষা- নির্দিষ্ট নিয়মের সাথে ভেক্টর স্পেস', 'am': 'Fine-Tuning Word Vector Spaces with Simple Language-Specific Rules', 'hy': 'Մորֆ-համակարգ. Լռերի վիկտորային տարածքները բարձրակարգված են պարզ լեզվի մասնավոր կանոններով', 'ca': 'Installació mòrfica: Espais de vectors de paraules amb regles senzilles específices de llenguatge', 'et': 'Ümberkujundamine: sõnavaktoriruumide peen häälestamine lihtsate keelespetsiifiliste reeglitega', 'fi': 'Muodonmuutos: Sanavektoritilojen hienosäätö yksinkertaisilla kielikohtaisilla säännöillä', 'cs': 'Přizpůsobení morph: jemné ladění vektorových prostorů slov s jednoduchými pravidly specifickými pro jazyk', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': '@ label: listbox', 'he': 'התאמה למורפים: מרחבי קוקטורים מילים מתאימים יפים עם חוקים פשוטים ספציפיים לשפה', 'sk': 'Preoblikovanje: natančno prilagajanje besednih vektorskih prostorov s preprostimi jezikovnimi pravili', 'bo': 'Morph-fitting: Fine-Tuning Word Vector Spaces with Simple Language-Specific Rules'}
{'en': 'Morphologically rich languages accentuate two properties of distributional vector space models : 1) the difficulty of inducing accurate representations for low-frequency word forms ; and 2) insensitivity to distinct lexical relations that have similar distributional signatures. These effects are detrimental for language understanding systems, which may infer that ‘inexpensive’ is a rephrasing for ‘expensive’ or may not associate ‘acquire’ with ‘acquires’. In this work, we propose a novel morph-fitting procedure which moves past the use of curated semantic lexicons for improving distributional vector spaces. Instead, our method injects morphological constraints generated using simple language-specific rules, pulling inflectional forms of the same word close together and pushing derivational antonyms far apart. In intrinsic evaluation over four languages, we show that our approach : 1) improves low-frequency word estimates ; and 2) boosts the semantic quality of the entire word vector collection. Finally, we show that morph-fitted vectors yield large gains in the downstream task of dialogue state tracking, highlighting the importance of morphology for tackling long-tail phenomena in language understanding tasks.', 'ar': 'تبرز اللغات الغنية شكليًا خاصيتين لنماذج الفضاء المتجهية التوزيعية: 1) صعوبة إحداث تمثيلات دقيقة لأشكال الكلمات منخفضة التردد ؛ و 2) عدم الحساسية للعلاقات المعجمية المتميزة التي لها تواقيع توزيعية متشابهة. هذه الآثار ضارة بأنظمة فهم اللغة ، والتي قد تستنتج أن كلمة "غير مكلفة" هي إعادة صياغة لمصطلح "مكلف" أو قد لا تربط "اكتساب" بـ "مقتنيات". في هذا العمل ، نقترح إجراءًا جديدًا مناسبًا للتركيب يتخطى استخدام المعاجم الدلالية المنسقة لتحسين مساحات ناقل التوزيع. بدلاً من ذلك ، تقوم طريقتنا بضخ القيود المورفولوجية التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام قواعد بسيطة خاصة باللغة ، مما يؤدي إلى سحب الأشكال التصريفية للكلمة نفسها من بعضها البعض ودفع المتضادات الاشتقاقية بعيدًا عن بعضها البعض. في التقييم الجوهري لأكثر من أربع لغات ، نظهر أن نهجنا: 1) يحسن تقديرات الكلمات منخفضة التردد ؛ و 2) يعزز الجودة الدلالية لمجموعة ناقلات الكلمات بأكملها. أخيرًا ، نوضح أن النواقل المجهزة بشكل متغير تحقق مكاسب كبيرة في المهمة النهائية لتتبع حالة الحوار ، مما يبرز أهمية التشكل لمعالجة الظواهر طويلة الذيل في مهام فهم اللغة.', 'es': 'Los lenguajes ricos morfológicamente acentúan dos propiedades de los modelos espaciales vectoriales de distribución: 1) la dificultad de inducir representaciones precisas para formas de palabras de baja frecuencia; y 2) la insensibilidad a las distintas relaciones léxicas que tienen firmas distribucionales similares. Estos efectos son perjudiciales para los sistemas de comprensión de idiomas, que pueden inferir que «barato» es una reformulación de «caro» o no puede asociar «adquirir» con «adquiere». En este trabajo, proponemos un procedimiento novedoso de ajuste de morph que deja atrás el uso de léxicos semánticos curados para mejorar los espacios vectoriales de distribución. En cambio, nuestro método inyecta restricciones morfológicas generadas mediante reglas simples específicas del lenguaje, acercando las formas de inflexión de la misma palabra y separando los antónimos derivacionales. En la evaluación intrínseca en cuatro idiomas, mostramos que nuestro enfoque: 1) mejora las estimaciones de palabras de baja frecuencia; y 2) aumenta la calidad semántica de toda la colección de vectores de palabras. Finalmente, mostramos que los vectores ajustados a morph producen grandes ganancias en la tarea posterior del seguimiento del estado del diálogo, destacando la importancia de la morfología para abordar los fenómenos de cola larga en las tareas de comprensión del lenguaje.', 'pt': "Linguagens morfologicamente ricas acentuam duas propriedades dos modelos de espaço vetorial distribucional: 1) a dificuldade de induzir representações precisas para formas de palavras de baixa frequência; e 2) insensibilidade a relações lexicais distintas que possuem assinaturas distributivas semelhantes. Esses efeitos são prejudiciais para sistemas de compreensão de linguagem, que podem inferir que 'barato' é uma reformulação para 'caro' ou pode não associar 'adquirir' com 'adquirir'. Neste trabalho, propomos um novo procedimento de ajuste de morfologia que ultrapassa o uso de léxicos semânticos com curadoria para melhorar espaços vetoriais de distribuição. Em vez disso, nosso método injeta restrições morfológicas geradas usando regras simples específicas da linguagem, aproximando formas flexionais da mesma palavra e afastando antônimos derivacionais. Na avaliação intrínseca de quatro idiomas, mostramos que nossa abordagem: 1) melhora as estimativas de palavras de baixa frequência; e 2) aumenta a qualidade semântica de toda a coleção de vetores de palavras. Finalmente, mostramos que vetores ajustados por morfologia geram grandes ganhos na tarefa de rastreamento de estado de diálogo, destacando a importância da morfologia para lidar com fenômenos de cauda longa em tarefas de compreensão de linguagem.", 'fr': "Les langages morphologiquement riches accentuent deux propriétés des modèles spatiaux vectoriels distributionnels\xa0: 1) la difficulté d'induire des représentations précises pour les formes de mots basse fréquence\xa0; et 2) l'insensibilité à des relations lexicales distinctes ayant des signatures distributionnelles similaires. Ces effets sont préjudiciables aux systèmes de compréhension de la langue, qui peuvent en déduire que «\xa0peu coûteux\xa0» est une reformulation pour «\xa0cher\xa0» ou ne pas associer «\xa0acquérir\xa0» à «\xa0acquérir\xa0». Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle procédure d'ajustement de morphing qui va au-delà de l'utilisation de lexiques sémantiques organisés pour améliorer les espaces vectoriels distributionnels. Au lieu de cela, notre méthode injecte des contraintes morphologiques générées à l'aide de règles simples spécifiques à une langue, rapprochant les formes flexionnelles d'un même mot et éloignant les antonymes dérivationnels. Dans l'évaluation intrinsèque de quatre langues, nous montrons que notre approche\xa0: 1) améliore les estimations de mots basse fréquence\xa0; et 2) améliore la qualité sémantique de l'ensemble de la collection de vecteurs de mots. Enfin, nous montrons que les vecteurs ajustés à la morphologie génèrent des gains importants dans la tâche en aval du suivi de l'état du dialogue, soulignant l'importance de la morphologie pour traiter les phénomènes de longue queue dans les tâches de compréhension du langage.", 'ja': '形態学的に豊富な言語は、分布ベクトル空間モデルの２つの特性を強調する： １ ）低周波数の単語形式の正確な表現を誘導することの困難性；及び２ ）類似した分布署名を有する異なる語彙関係に対する非感受性。 これらの影響は、言語理解システムにとって有害であり、「安価」は「高価」の言い換えであるか、「獲得」を「獲得」に関連付けない可能性があると推測されます。 この研究では、分布ベクトル空間を改善するために、キュレーションされた意味論的辞書の使用を超えて移動する新規の形態適合手順を提案します。 代わりに、私たちの方法は、単純な言語固有の規則を使用して生成された形態学的制約を注入し、同じ単語の屈折形を近づけ、派生対義語を遠く離して押します。 4つの言語にわたる本質的な評価では、私たちのアプローチが示されています： 1 ）低頻度の単語推定を改善し、2 ）単語ベクトルコレクション全体のセマンティック品質を向上させます。 最後に、形態素適合ベクトルは、対話状態追跡の下流タスクで大きな利得をもたらすことを示し、言語理解タスクにおけるロングテール現象に取り組むための形態学の重要性を強調する。', 'zh': '富言语向量空间二性:1)诱低频词型之难; 2)有相似者词汇不敏也。 言语解统者有害,言语解统者有推断出廉价,贵者有损,或不得者有得。 新形拟合事,超越谋画语义词典以善布向量间。 反此者,吾道入用约言特定则形约束,拉近同单词屈,而反义词推得远之。 于四语之内在评估中,明吾法:1)改善低频单词度。 与 2) 合词向量语义量。 最后,形合向量于下流之中生大益,出形态学于解言之要。', 'hi': "रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाएं वितरण वेक्टर स्पेस मॉडल के दो गुणों को बढ़ाती हैं: 1) कम आवृत्ति वाले शब्द रूपों के लिए सटीक प्रतिनिधित्व को प्रेरित करने की कठिनाई; और 2) अलग-अलग लेक्सिकल संबंधों के प्रति असंवेदनशीलता जिसमें समान वितरण हस्ताक्षर हैं। ये प्रभाव भाषा समझने वाली प्रणालियों के लिए हानिकारक हैं, जो यह अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि 'सस्ती' 'महंगी' के लिए एक पुनरावृत्ति है या 'अधिग्रहण' के साथ 'अधिग्रहण' को संबद्ध नहीं कर सकती है। इस काम में, हम एक उपन्यास मॉर्फ-फिटिंग प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो वितरण वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान में सुधार के लिए क्यूरेटेड सिमेंटिक लेक्सिकॉन के उपयोग से आगे बढ़ता है। इसके बजाय, हमारी विधि सरल भाषा-विशिष्ट नियमों का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न रूपात्मक बाधाओं को इंजेक्ट करती है, एक ही शब्द के प्रतिबिंबात्मक रूपों को एक साथ खींचती है और व्युत्पत्ति विलोम को बहुत दूर धकेलती है। चार भाषाओं पर आंतरिक मूल्यांकन में, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण: 1) कम आवृत्ति वाले शब्द अनुमानों में सुधार करता है; और 2) पूरे शब्द वेक्टर संग्रह की शब्दार्थ गुणवत्ता को बढ़ाता है। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि मॉर्फ-फिट वैक्टर संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग के डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य में बड़े लाभ प्राप्त करते हैं, जो भाषा समझने वाले कार्यों में लंबी पूंछ की घटनाओं से निपटने के लिए आकृति विज्ञान के महत्व को उजागर करते हैं।", 'ru': 'Морфологически богатые языки подчеркивают два свойства моделей дистрибутивного векторного пространства: 1) трудность индукции точных представлений для низкочастотных словоформ; и 2) нечувствительность к различным лексическим отношениям, которые имеют сходные дистрибутивные сигнатуры. Эти последствия пагубно сказываются на системах понимания языка, из чего можно сделать вывод, что «недорогой» является перефразированием «дорогой» или может не ассоциировать «приобрести» с «приобрести». В этой работе мы предлагаем новую процедуру морфофиттинга, которая проходит мимо использования курируемых семантических лексиконов для улучшения дистрибутивных векторных пространств. Вместо этого, наш метод вводит морфологические ограничения, сгенерированные с помощью простых языковых правил, сближая инфлекционные формы одного и того же слова и отдаляя производные антонимы далеко друг от друга. При внутренней оценке на четырех языках мы показываем, что наш подход: 1) улучшает низкочастотные оценки слов; и 2) повышает семантическое качество всей коллекции слов-векторов. Наконец, мы показываем, что морфологически подобранные векторы приносят большие выгоды при выполнении задачи отслеживания состояния диалога, подчеркивая важность морфологии для решения длиннохвостых явлений в задачах понимания языка.', 'ga': 'Cuireann teangacha ar mhórán moirfeolaíochta béim ar dhá airí atá ag samhlacha spáis veicteora dáileacháin: 1) an deacracht a bhaineann le huiríll cruinne a dhéanamh d’fhoirmeacha focal ar mhinicíocht íseal; agus 2) neamhíogaireacht i leith caidreamh foclóireachta ar leith a bhfuil sínithe dáileacháin comhchosúla acu. Tá na héifeachtaí seo díobhálach do chórais tuisceana teanga, rud a d’fhéadfadh a bheith le tuiscint go bhfuil ‘saor’ mar athfhriotal ar ‘daor’ nó b’fhéidir nach mbaineann siad ‘fáil’ le ‘faighteoirí’. Sa saothar seo, molaimid nós imeachta nua um fheistiú moirf a théann thar úsáid na bhfoclóirí shéimeantacha coimeádta chun spásanna veicteora dáileacháin a fheabhsú. Ina áit sin, cuireann ár modh isteach srianta moirfeolaíocha a ghintear trí úsáid a bhaint as rialacha simplí a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga, ag tarraingt foirmeacha infhillte den fhocal céanna gar dá chéile agus ag brú frithainmneacha díorthacha i bhfad óna chéile. Sa mheastóireacht intreach ar cheithre theanga, léirímid go bhfuil an méid seo a leanas inár gcur chuige: 1) feabhas ar mheastacháin focal ar mhinicíocht íseal; agus 2) treisíonn sé cáilíocht shéimeantach an bhailiúcháin veicteoir focal ar fad. Mar fhocal scoir, léirímid go n-eascraíonn veicteoirí moirf-fheistithe gnóthachain mhóra sa tasc iartheachtach de rianú stáit idirphlé, ag cur béime ar an tábhacht a bhaineann le moirfeolaíocht chun dul i ngleic le feiniméin fhad-eireaball i dtascanna tuiscint teanga.', 'el': 'Οι μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες τονίζουν δύο ιδιότητες των διανυσματικών διαστημικών μοντέλων: 1) τη δυσκολία της επαγωγής ακριβών αναπαραστάσεων για τις μορφές λέξεων χαμηλής συχνότητας. και 2) αναισθησία σε διακριτές λεξικές σχέσεις που έχουν παρόμοιες υπογραφές κατανομής. Αυτές οι επιπτώσεις είναι επιζήμιες για τα συστήματα κατανόησης γλωσσών, τα οποία μπορεί να συμπεράνουν ότι το "φθηνό" είναι μια αναδιατύπωση για το "ακριβό" ή μπορεί να μην συσχετίζει το "αποκτούν" με το "αποκτά". Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα διαδικασία προσαρμογής μορφών που ξεπερνά τη χρήση επιμελημένων σημασιολογικών λεξικών για τη βελτίωση των διανεμητικών χώρων. Αντίθετα, η μέθοδος μας εισάγει μορφολογικούς περιορισμούς που δημιουργούνται χρησιμοποιώντας απλούς γλωσσικούς κανόνες, τραβώντας τις καμπινές μορφές της ίδιας λέξης κοντά μεταξύ τους και σπρώχνοντας τα παράγωγα αντωνύμια μακριά. Στην εγγενή αξιολόγηση σε τέσσερις γλώσσες, αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας: 1) βελτιώνει τις εκτιμήσεις λέξεων χαμηλής συχνότητας. και 2) ενισχύει τη σημασιολογική ποιότητα ολόκληρης της συλλογής διανυσματικών λέξεων. Τέλος, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα διανυσματικά όργανα που ταιριάζουν με μορφές αποδίδουν μεγάλα κέρδη στο καθήκον παρακολούθησης κατάστασης διαλόγου, τονίζοντας τη σημασία της μορφολογίας για την αντιμετώπιση φαινομένων μακράς ουράς σε εργασίες κατανόησης γλωσσών.', 'it': 'I linguaggi morfologicamente ricchi accentuano due proprietà dei modelli di spazio vettoriale distributivo: 1) la difficoltà di indurre rappresentazioni accurate per forme di parole a bassa frequenza; e 2) insensibilità a relazioni lessicali distinte che hanno simili firme distributive. Questi effetti sono dannosi per i sistemi di comprensione linguistica, il che può dedurre che "poco costoso" è una riformulazione per "costoso" o non può associare "acquisire" a "acquisizioni". In questo lavoro, proponiamo una nuova procedura di adattamento morfico che supera l\'uso di lessici semantici curati per migliorare gli spazi vettoriali distributivi. Invece, il nostro metodo inietta vincoli morfologici generati utilizzando semplici regole specifiche del linguaggio, avvicinando le forme inflessionali della stessa parola e spingendo gli antonimi derivati lontano. Nella valutazione intrinseca in quattro lingue, dimostriamo che il nostro approccio: 1) migliora le stime di parole a bassa frequenza; e 2) migliora la qualità semantica dell\'intera collezione vettoriale di parole. Infine, mostriamo che i vettori dotati di morfe producono grandi guadagni nel compito a valle del monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo, evidenziando l\'importanza della morfologia per affrontare i fenomeni di coda lunga nei compiti di comprensione del linguaggio.', 'ka': "მორფოლოგიურად ღარილი ენები აკენტირებულია განსაზღვრებული გვექტორის სისტემა მოდელების ორი განსაზღვრება: 1) მარტივი განსაზღვრებების შესაძლებლობა მარტივი განსაზღვრებების სიტყ და 2) განსხვავებული ლექსიკური შესახებ, რომლებიც განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული განსხვავებული დასახებ. ეს ეფექტები ძალიან დაკავშირებელია ენის გაგრძნობის სისტემებისთვის, რომელიც შესაძლებელია გაგრძნობა, რომ `inexpensive' არის `expensive' ან შესაძლებელია `acquire' შესაძლებელია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდა პროგრამის მოპორფიკური დამატებული პროგრამის გამოყენებას, რომელიც გადავიწყება სუმენტიკური ლექსიკონის გამოყენებას განსაზღვრებული გვექტორის სივ მაშინ, ჩვენი მეტი მოპროლოგიური დარჩენება, რომელიც გამოიყენებულია სიტყვის განსაკუთრებული კონფიგური წესების გამოყენებით, იგივე სიტყვის ინფრექციონალური ფორმები დახურ ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა: 1) ჩვენი წარმოდგენების ცოტა სიტყვების განსაზღვრებას. და 2) ყველა სიტყვის ვექტორის კოლექციის სმენტიკური კალექტის უფრო დიდება. საბოლოოდ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მორფექტირებული გვექტორები უფრო დიალოგიური სახელმძღვრების მიღებაში დიალოგიური სახელმძღვრების მიღებაში დიალოგიური სახელმძღვრების გასანიშვნელ", 'hu': 'A morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek az eloszlási vektortérmodellek két tulajdonságát hangsúlyozzák: 1) az alacsony frekvenciájú szóformák pontos reprezentációinak nehézsége; és 2) érzéketlenség a különböző lexikai kapcsolatokra, amelyek hasonló eloszlási jelekkel rendelkeznek. Ezek a hatások károsak a nyelvértési rendszerek számára, amelyek arra a következtetésre juthatnak, hogy az "olcsó" a "drága" szövegre való átfogalmazás, vagy nem kapcsolódhatnak a "szerződésekhez". Ebben a munkában egy új morf-illesztési eljárást javasolunk, amely túllép a kurátorozott szemantikai lexikonok használatán az eloszlási vektorterek javítására. Módszerünk ehelyett egyszerű nyelvspecifikus szabályok segítségével létrehozott morfológiai korlátozásokat fecskendez be, közelebb húzva ugyanazon szó inflektuális formáit, és messze távolítva a derivatív antonimokat. Négy nyelven végzett belső értékelés során megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk: 1) javítja az alacsony frekvenciájú szóbecsléseket; és 2) javítja a teljes szó vektorgyűjtemény szemantikai minőségét. Végezetül megmutatjuk, hogy a morf-illesztett vektorok jelentős előnyöket hoznak a dialógus állapotkövetés downstream feladatában, kiemelve a morfológia fontosságát a hosszú farkú jelenségek kezelésében a nyelvértési feladatokban.', 'lt': 'Morfologiškai turtingos kalbos pabrėžia dvi paskirstymo vektorių erdvės modelių savybes: 1) sunkumus sukelti tikslias mažo dažnio žodžių formas; ir 2) jautrumas atskiriems leksiniams santykiams, turintiems panašius paskirstymo parašus. Šis poveikis kenkia kalbos supratimo sistemoms, kurios gali daryti išvadą, kad „brangus“ reiškia „brangus“ arba negali būti susijęs su „įsigyti“ įsigijimu. Šiame darbe siūlome naują morfo pritaikymo procedūrą, kuri pereina prie kuruojamų semantinių leksikonų naudojimo siekiant pagerinti paskirstymo vektorių erdves. Instead, our method injects morphological constraints generated using simple language-specific rules, pulling inflectional forms of the same word close together and pushing derivational antonyms far apart.  Įprastame keturių kalbų vertinime parodomi, kad mūsų požiūris: 1) gerina mažo dažnio žodžių įverčius; ir 2) didina semantinę visos žodžių vektorių rinkimo kokybę. Galiausiai parodome, kad prie morfo pritaikyti vektoriai duoda didelę naudą tolesnėje dialogo valstybės stebėsenos užduotyje, pabrėžiant morfologijos svarbą sprendžiant ilguoju uodegos reiškinius kalbų supratimo užduotyse.', 'ms': "Bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik menambah dua ciri-ciri model ruang vektor distribusi: 1) kesulitan untuk mengakibatkan perwakilan tepat bagi bentuk perkataan frekuensi rendah; dan 2) tidak sensitif kepada hubungan leksik yang berbeza yang mempunyai tandatangan distribusi yang sama. Kesan ini merugikan sistem pemahaman bahasa, yang boleh menyimpulkan bahawa `tidak mahal' adalah penggantian semula untuk `mahal' atau tidak berkaitan `acquire' dengan `acquires'. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan prosedur penyesuaian morf yang bergerak melewati penggunaan leksikon semantik yang dikurasi untuk meningkatkan ruang vektor distribusi. Sebaliknya, kaedah kita menyuntik kekangan morfologi yang dijana menggunakan peraturan bahasa-spesifik sederhana, menarik bentuk pengangkutan perkataan yang sama dekat bersama-sama dan mendorong antonim derivasi jauh. Dalam penilaian dalam dalam empat bahasa, kita menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita: 1) memperbaiki penilaian perkataan frekuensi rendah; dan 2) meningkatkan kualiti semantik seluruh koleksi vektor perkataan. Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahawa vektor yang dipasang-morf memberikan keuntungan besar dalam tugas turun dari pengesan keadaan dialog, menyatakan kepentingan morfologi untuk mengatasi fenomena ekor panjang dalam tugas pemahaman bahasa.", 'kk': "Марфологиялық баяны тілдер үлестірілген вектор бос орын үлгілерінің екі қасиеттерін акцентиру: 1) дұрыс жиілікті сөз пішімдерінің дұрыс көрсету қиындығы және 2) ұқсас үлестіру қолтаңбалары бар лексикалық қатынастарына көңіл емес. Бұл эффекттер тілдерді түсіндіру жүйелерінің қауіпсіздігі болады. Бұл `экспенсивті' деген `бағатты' деген немесе `acquires' дегенге қосылмайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, бөлімдеу векторлық бос орындарды жақсарту үшін өзгертілген семантикалық лекскондарды қолдану үшін романдық морф сәйкестік процедурын ұсынамыз. Осының орнына, біздің әдіміміз морфологиялық шектеулерді кәдімгі тіл ережелерімен құрылады, бір сөздің ақпараттық түрлерін бірге жақын және түрлендірілген антонимдерді бірге шекте Төрт тілдерден ішкі оқу үшін біз өзіміздің тәсілімізді көрсету: 1) жылдамдығының төмен жылдамдығының оқиғаларын жасайды. және 2) сөз векторының толық жинақтарының semantiкалық сапасын көтереді. Соңғы сәтте, морф сәйкесті векторлар диалог күйін қадағалау тапсырмасының төмендегі күйін қадағалау тапсырмасына үлкен жетістіктерді береді, тілдерді түсіну тапсырмаларында ұзын жұлдық панелд", 'mk': 'Морфолошки богатите јазици ги акцентираат двете сопствености на дистрибуционалните векторни вселенски модели: 1) тешкотијата за индукција на прецизни претставувања за форми на зборови со ниска фреквенција; и 2) нечувствителност кон различните лексикални односи кои имаат слични дистрибуционални потписи. Овие ефекти се штетни за системите за разбирање на јазикот, кои можат да заклучат дека „ нескапо “ е рефразирање за „ скапо “ или не може да се поврзува „ купи “ со „ купи “. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нова процедура за морф-прилагодување која поминува надвор од употребата на курирани семантични лексикони за подобрување на дистрибутивните векторни простори. Наместо тоа, нашиот метод инјектира морфолошки ограничувања генерирани користејќи едноставни јазички специфични правила, привлекувајќи ги инфекционалните форми на истиот збор блиску заедно и туркајќи ги дерименталните аноними далеку оддалечени. Во внатрешната проценка на четири јазици, покажуваме дека нашиот пристап: 1) ги подобрува проценките на зборовите со ниска фреквенција; и 2) го зголемува семантичкиот квалитет на целата векторна колекција на зборови. Конечно, покажуваме дека морф-приспособените вектори даваат големи профили во понатамошната задача на дијалогот за следење на државата, истакнувајќи ја важноста на морфологијата за решавање на феномените со долга опашка во задачите за разбирање на јазикот.', 'ml': "മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ ഭാഷകള്\u200d വിതരണ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ് മോഡലുകളുടെ രണ്ട് ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സെന്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു: 1) കുറഞ്ഞ fre 2) പോലെയുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അനുസരണമില്ല These effects are detrimental for language understanding systems, which may infer that `inexpensive' is a rephrasing for `expensive' or may not associate `acquire' with `acquires'.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫിറ്റ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് കുറഞ്ഞ സെമാന്\u200dറിക് ലെക്സിക്കോണു പകരം, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d സാധാരണ ഭാഷ-പ്രത്യേക നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഇഞ്ചെക്കുന്നു. അതേ വാ നാലു ഭാഷകളിലേക്കാള്\u200d അകത്തുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ നടപടി: 1) കുറഞ്ഞ ഫ്രെയിന്ററി വാ 2) വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സമ്മേളപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ഗുണവും ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നത് മോര്\u200dഫ് മതിയാക്കുന്ന വെക്ടറുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ അടുത്ത് വലിയ സമ്പാദം കൊണ്ട് വരുന്", 'pl': 'Języki bogate morfologicznie podkreślają dwie właściwości modeli przestrzeni wektorowej rozkładu: 1) trudność w indukowaniu dokładnych reprezentacji dla form słów o niskiej częstotliwości; i 2) niewrażliwość na odrębne relacje leksykalne, które mają podobne sygnatury dystrybucyjne. Efekty te są szkodliwe dla systemów rozumienia języka, które mogą wnioskować, że "niedrogie" jest przeformułowaniem na "drogie" lub nie może kojarzyć "nabywać" z "nabywać". W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowatorską procedurę dopasowania morf, która przesuwa się poza wykorzystanie kuratorowanych słowników semantycznych do poprawy przestrzeni wektorowej dystrybucji. Zamiast tego nasza metoda wstrzykuje ograniczenia morfologiczne generowane przy użyciu prostych reguł specyficznych dla języka, przyciągając formy inflekcji tego samego słowa blisko siebie i odpychając antonimy pochodne daleko od siebie. W ocenie wewnętrznej w czterech językach pokazujemy, że nasze podejście: 1) poprawia szacunki słów o niskiej częstotliwości; i 2) zwiększa jakość semantyczną całej kolekcji wektorów słowa. Wreszcie pokazujemy, że wektory dopasowane do morf przynoszą duże zyski w dalszym zadaniu śledzenia stanu dialogu, podkreślając znaczenie morfologii dla rozwiązywania zjawisk długiego ogona w zadaniach rozumienia języka.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwi morfoloġikament rikki jenfasizzaw żewġ karatteristiċi tal-mudelli tal-ispazju tal-vetturi distributtivi: 1) id-diffikultà li jiġu indotti rappreżentazzjonijiet preċiżi għall-forom tal-kliem bi frekwenza baxxa; u 2) insensittività għal relazzjonijiet lexiċi distinti li għandhom firem ta’ distribuzzjoni simili. Dawn l-effetti huma ta’ detriment għas-sistemi ta’ fehim tal-lingwa, li jistgħu jikkonkludu li “mhux għali” huwa frażi mill-ġdid għal “għali” jew ma jistgħux jassoċjaw “jakkwistaw” ma’ “akkwisti”. In this work, we propose a novel morph-fitting procedure which moves past the use of curated semantic lexicons for improving distributional vector spaces.  Minflok, il-metodu tagħna jinjetta restrizzjonijiet morfoloġiċi ġġenerati bl-użu ta’ regoli sempliċi speċifiċi għall-lingwa, li jiġbdu forom inflezzjonali tal-istess kelma qrib xulxin u jimbuttaw l-antonimi derivattivi ’l bogħod minn xulxin. F’evalwazzjoni intrinsika fuq erba’ lingwi, nuru li l-approċċ tagħna: 1) itejjeb l-istimi tal-kliem bi frekwenza baxxa; u 2) isaħħaħ il-kwalità semantika tal-ġbir kollu tal-kliem vettur. Fl-aħħar nett, nagħmlu evidenza li l-vetturi mgħammra bil-morfi jwasslu għal qligħ kbir fil-kompitu downstream ta’ traċċar tal-istat tad-djalogu, li jenfasizza l-importanza tal-morfoloġija biex jiġu indirizzati l-fenomeni tad-denb twil fil-kompiti ta’ fehim tal-lingwi.', 'ro': 'Limbajele bogate din punct de vedere morfologic accentuează două proprietăți ale modelelor de spațiu vectorial distribuțional: 1) dificultatea inducerii reprezentărilor precise pentru formele de cuvinte de joasă frecvență; şi 2) insensibilitatea la relaţii lexicale distincte care au semnături distribuţionale similare. Aceste efecte sunt dăunătoare sistemelor de înțelegere a limbilor străine, ceea ce poate deduce că "ieftin" este o reformulare a termenului "scump" sau că nu poate asocia "achiziționarea" cu "achizițiile". În această lucrare, propunem o nouă procedură de adaptare a morfilor care trece peste utilizarea lexicoanelor semantice curatoriate pentru îmbunătățirea spațiilor vectoriale distribuționale. În schimb, metoda noastră injectează constrângeri morfologice generate folosind reguli simple specifice limbajului, strângând formele inflexionale ale aceluiași cuvânt și împingând antonimele derivative departe de ele. În evaluarea intrinsecă în patru limbi, demonstrăm că abordarea noastră: 1) îmbunătățește estimările cuvintelor cu frecvență scăzută; și 2) sporește calitatea semantică a întregii colecții de vectori de cuvinte. În cele din urmă, arătăm că vectorii adaptați la morf produc câștiguri mari în sarcina din aval de urmărire a stării de dialog, subliniind importanța morfologiei pentru abordarea fenomenelor de coadă lungă în sarcinile de înțelegere a limbilor.', 'sr': "Morfološki bogati jezici akcentiraju dve vlasništvo distribucijskih vektorskih svemirskih modela: 1) teškoća induciranja tačnih predstavljanja za oblike riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) nedosetljivost na različite leksičke odnose koje imaju slične distribucijske potpise. Ovi efekati su štetni za sisteme razumevanja jezika, koji mogu uvjeriti da je `neiespenzivno' rephrasiranje za `skupo' ili ne može povezati `acquire' sa `acquires'. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu proceduru za odgovaranje morfija koja prelazi preko korištenja izloženih semantičkih leksiona za poboljšanje prostora distribucije vektora. Umjesto toga, naša metoda ubrizgava morfološke ograničenje koje su stvorene koristeći jednostavne pravila za specifične jezike, izvlačujući inflekcionalne oblike iste reči blizu zajedno i gurajući derivacijske antonime daleko. U unutrašnjoj procjeni na četiri jezika pokazujemo da naš pristup: 1) poboljšava procjenu riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) povećava semantičku kvalitet cele kolekcije vektora riječi. Konačno, pokazujemo da su vektori koji su uklopili morfologiju dobili velike dobitke u donjem zadatku praćenja države dijaloga, naglašavajući važnost morfologije za rješavanje fenomena dugog repa u zadatkima razumevanja jezika.", 'si': "මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විශේෂ වෙක්ටර් අවසානයේ විශේෂ වෙක්ටර් අවසානයේ විශේෂතාවක් දෙකක් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් වෙන සහ 2) ප්\u200dරතිශීල ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා. මේ පරීක්ෂණය භාෂාව තේරුම් පද්ධතිය සඳහා අනතුරු වෙනවා, ඒකෙන් `inexpensive' ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් `ගුරු මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානයක් විස්තර කරන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න. ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ විධානය මාර්ෆිකෝලික විශේෂ නියෝජිත විශේෂ නියෝජිත විධානයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, එකම වචනය සම් අපි භාෂාව හතරක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්නේ: 1) අඩු විශ්වාස වචන විශ්වාස කරනවා; සහ 2) සම්පූර්ණ වචන වෙක්ටර් සම්පූර්ණයේ සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් වැඩ කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මොර්ෆ් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ වෙක්ටර්ස් එක්ක ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා සංවාද ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය ගැන, භාෂාව", 'so': "Luqadaha hodanka ah ee Morphologically-rich waxay u isticmaalaan laba tayooyin oo kala duduwan noocyada cirka oo kala duduwan: 1) dhibaatada ku imaanshaha kooxo saxda ah oo u eg foomka word-frequency hoose; iyo 2) cilmi u lahaanshaha xiriirka leksikada oo kala duwan oo haysta saxiixyo isku mid ah. These effects are detrimental for language understanding systems, which may infer that `inexpensive' is a rephrasing for `expensive' or may not associate `acquire' with `acquires'.  Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tartanka qodob oo ku habboon, kaas oo horumarinta goobaha qeybaha ah. Isku bedelkeeda, qaabkeenkeennu wuxuu soo saaraa xaduudaha morphologiga ah oo ku soo dhashay sharciyada fudud ee luuqadaha, wuxuuna soo jiidaa noocyo saameyn ah oo isku hadal ku saabsan, wuxuuna ku tuuraa dhaqdhaqaaqyada dhaqdhaqaaqa. Qiimeynta gudaha ah oo afarta luqadood ka badan, waxaynu tusnaa in qaabilaadeenna ah: 1) uu kordhiyaa qiimeynta qiimaha dhaqdhaqaaqa; 2) wuxuu kordhiyaa qiimaha semantika ah ee dhamaan waxtarka Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu tusnaynaa in wadooyin ku habboon ay soo saaraan faa'iido badan oo ka mid ah shaqada hoose-hoose ee diyaarinta dowladda, waxaana tusinayaa muhiimka morphologka in la tacliiyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxyaabaha luuqada ku garashada.", 'mn': "Марфологикийн баян хэл нь хуваарилах векторын орон зайн загварын хоёр шинж чанарыг нэмэгдүүлдэг: 1) жижиг хэмжээний үгийг бага хэмжээний тодорхойлох хэцүү байдал юм. 2) төстэй хуваарилцааны үсэг баримтуудтай холбоотой хэлэлцээний харилцааны мэдрэмжгүй байх. Эдгээр нөлөө нь хэлний ойлголтын системүүдэд хохиромжтой. Энэ нь `тохиромжтой' гэдэг нь `үнэтэй' эсвэл `худалдаа' гэдэг нь `худалдаа' гэдгийг ойлгох боломжтой. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хуваарилцааны вектор орон зайг сайжруулахын тулд шинэ морф хангамжийн процедур гаргадаг. Үүний оронд бидний арга нь энгийн хэл тодорхойлолтой дүрмийг ашиглаж, ижил үгийн нөлөөлөл төрлийг хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа дарааллын антонимуудыг зайлсхийдэг. Дөрвөн хэл дээр доторх дүгнэлт хийхэд бид бидний арга зам нь 1) жижиг хэмжээний утгыг сайжруулдаг. 2) бүх үгний векторын цуглуулалтын semantic quality нэмэгдүүлдэг. Эцэст нь бид өөрчлөгдсөн векторууд диалог улсын дагаварын дагаварын дагаварын дагавар дээр том ашиг гаргаж, хэл ойлгох үйл явдлын тухай урт дагаварын явдлыг зогсоохын тулд морфологийг тодорхойлж байна.", 'no': 'Morphologisk rike språk aksenturer to eigenskapar av distribusjonelle vektorrommodeller: 1) vanskeligheten for å indusera nøyaktige representasjonar for låg frekvensordformar; Og 2) insensitivitet til ulike leksiske forhold som har liknande distribusjonssignaturar. Desse effektane er vanskeleg for språksforståkingssystemet, som kan gjera at «inexpensive» er ein rephrasing for «expensive» eller kanskje ikkje tilknytta «acquire» med «acquires». I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt morph-tilpassende prosedyr som flyttar forbi bruken av kurserte semantiske leksikoner for å forbetra distribusjonelle vektormellomrom. I staden kan metoden vårt injeksera morfologiske begrensningar som er generert med enkle språkspesifikske reglar, dra infleksjonelle formar av det same ordet lukka sammen og trykke derivasjonale antonymar langt apart. I intrinsisk evaluering over fire språk viser vi at tilnærminga vårt er 1) forbedrar låg frekvens ordestimalar. og 2) styrer semantiske kvaliteten til heile ordvektorsamlinga. Til slutt viser vi at vektorar som passar med morfologi gjer stor forståking i nedtrekkoppgåva av dialogtilstand-sporing, og markerer viktigheten til morfologien for å få lange hald-fenomenar i språk-forståking.', 'sv': 'Morfoliskt rika språk accentuerar två egenskaper hos distributionsvektorrymdsmodeller: 1) svårigheten att inducera exakta representationer för lågfrekventa ordformer; och 2) okänslighet för distinkta lexikala relationer som har liknande fördelningssiga signaturer. Dessa effekter är skadliga för språkförståelsesystem, vilket kan leda till att "billig" är en omformulering av "dyr" eller kanske inte associerar "förvärva" med "förvärva". I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny morfpassning procedur som går förbi användningen av kuraterade semantiska lexikon för att förbättra distributionella vektorrum. Istället injicerar vår metod morfologiska begränsningar som genereras med enkla språkspecifika regler, drar böjningsformer av samma ord nära varandra och trycker härledda antonymer långt ifrån varandra. I intern utvärdering över fyra språk visar vi att vårt tillvägagångssätt: 1) förbättrar lågfrekventa ordskattningar; och 2) ökar den semantiska kvaliteten på hela ordvektorsamlingen. Slutligen visar vi att morf-anpassade vektorer ger stora vinster i nedströmsuppgiften för dialog tillståndsspårning, vilket belyser betydelsen av morfologi för att hantera långsvansfenomen i språkförståelse uppgifter.', 'ta': 'மொழிபெரும் மொழிகள் பங்கீட்டு வெக்டர் வெக்டார் மாதிரிகளின் இரண்டு பண்புகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது: 1) குறைவான வார்த்தை வடிவங்களுக் 2) போன்ற பங்கீட்டு கையெழுத்துக் கொண்டிருக்கும் லெக்சிக்சியல் தொடர்புகளை வெவ்வேறுபடுத்தும இந்த விளைவு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய morph- பொருத்தமான செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பங்கீட்டு வெக்டர் இடைவெளிகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்க அதற்கு பதிலாக, எங்கள் முறைமையில் சுலபமான மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட விதிகளை பயன்படுத்தி உருவாக்கிய குறிப்பிட்ட கட்டுப்பாடுகளை உள்ளிடுகிறது, அதே  நான்கு மொழிகளுக்கு மேல் உள்ளிருக்கும் மதிப்பில், எங்கள் வழிமுறையை காண்பிக்கிறோம்: 1) குறைந்த frequency word estimates 2) முழு வார்த்தை தொகுப்பின் அரைப்புள்ளியை உயர்த்துகிறது. இறுதியில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மார்ப் பொருத்தமான வெக்டார்கள் மொழிய புரிந்து கொள்ளும் செயல்களில் பெரிய வெற்றியடைக்கும் உரையாடல் நாட்டு தொ', 'ur': "مارفولوژیکی پوری زبانیں تقسیم کرنے والی ویکتور فضائی موڈل کے دو گواہی اضافہ کرتی ہیں: 1) کم فرکانسی کلمات فرمول کے مطابق تصدیق کرنے کا مشکل ہے۔ اور 2) مختلف لکسیکی رابطہ کی غیر احساساتی جس کے مطابق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر یہ اثرات زبان سمجھنے کی سیستموں کے لئے نقصان ہیں، جو ممکن ہے کہ 'بغیر منفی' کے لئے 'خرچ' ہے یا 'خرچ' کے ساتھ 'خرچ' نہ کرے۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک نوم مورف فیٹنگ پردازش کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو تقسیم ویکتور جگہ کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے کورٹی سیمنٹی لکسونز کے استعمال سے پہلے چلتی ہے. اس کے بدلے، ہمارا طریقہ ایک دوسرے کے نزدیک ایک کلمہ کے مطابق ساده زبان کے خاص قوانین کے مطابق جوڑا ہوا مورفولوژیک محدودیتوں کو تزریق کرتا ہے، اور ایک دوسرے سے دور دریافت کرنے والی آنٹونیموں کو دھنساتا ہے۔ چار زبانوں پر داخلی ارزش میں ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ: 1) کم فرکانسی کلمات کی ارزش سے بہتر ہوتی ہے۔ اور 2) کل کلمات ویکتور کلکسیون کی سیمنٹی کیفیت کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ بالآخر، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مورف فیٹ ویکتوروں کو ڈونٹریٹ ٹراکینگ کے کام میں بہت بڑا فائدہ پہنچا دیتا ہے، زبان سمجھنے کے کاموں میں لمبی پڑے ہوئے دکھانے کے لئے مورفولوژی کا اہم تدبیر کرتا ہے.", 'uz': "Name va 2) bu bir xil tarqatish imkoniyatlari bilan ajratilgan leksikal aloqalariga yetishmaydi. Bu effektlar tilni tushunish tizimlari uchun zarur bo'ladi, ammo bu `qiymati' qiymati mumkin yoki olib tashlash mumkin. Bu ishda, biz bir novel morfga mos keladigan dasturni tahlil qilamiz. Bu semantik leksikaning foydalanishini o'zgartiradi. Instead, our method injects morphological constraints generated using simple language-specific rules, pulling inflectional forms of the same word close together and pushing derivational antonyms far apart.  4 tillardan ichki qiymatni ko'rsatishimiz shunday qilamiz: 1) cheksiz freym soʻzning qiymatlarini oshirish mumkin; va ikkinchi so'zning hamma so'zlar vektor toʻplami uchun semantik sifatini oshirish mumkin. Endi, biz qo'llab keladigan vectorlar quyidagi muloqat vazifasida katta muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatamiz, muloqat taʼminlovchi vazifani o'rganish uchun orfologiya muhimligini ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': "Ngôn ngữ giàu âm học nhấn mạnh hai tính chất của mô- đun vector: 1) sự khó khăn tạo ra biểu tượng chính xác cho dạng từ tần số thấp. và 2) vô cảm với mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ khác nhau có dấu hiệu phân phát tương tự. Những tác dụng này không có lợi cho hệ thống hiểu biết ngôn ngữ, mà có thể cho rằng'rẻ tiền'là một thuật ngữ'mắc tiền' hoặc có thể không liên quan'kiếm'với'mua được'. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một thủ tục phù hợp theo kiểu di chuyển qua việc sử dụng ngôn ngữ văn học tu sửa để cải thiện các không gian vector. Thay vào đó, phương pháp này tiêm các giới hạn lịch sử tạo ra bằng những quy tắc ngôn ngữ đơn giản, kéo các dạng ngẫu nhiên của cùng một từ gần nhau và đẩy nhau nhường chức khác xa nhau. Trong sự đánh giá nội bộ hơn bốn ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp: 1) cải thiện ước tính từ tần số thấp; và hai) nâng cao độ ngữ pháp của toàn bộ bộ bộ bộ tập hợp các từ vector. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy các cỗ máy biến hình mang lại lợi ích lớn trong việc theo dõi tình trạng đối thoại, và nhấn mạnh độ nhạy của quyết học quyết để đối phó với các hiện tượng đuôi dài trong các nhiệm vụ hiểu biết ngôn ngữ.", 'nl': "Morfologisch rijke talen accentueren twee eigenschappen van distributionele vectorruimtemodellen: 1) de moeilijkheid om nauwkeurige representaties voor laagfrequente woordvormen te induceren; en 2) ongevoeligheid voor verschillende lexicale relaties die vergelijkbare distributiehandtekeningen hebben. Deze effecten zijn schadelijk voor taalbegripssystemen, die kunnen concluderen dat 'goedkoop' een herformulering is voor 'duur' of 'verwerven' niet associeert met 'acquires'. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe morph-fitting procedure voor die verder gaat dan het gebruik van curated semantisch lexicons voor het verbeteren van distributionele vectorruimten. In plaats daarvan injecteert onze methode morfologische beperkingen die worden gegenereerd met behulp van eenvoudige taal-specifieke regels, trekt buigingsvormen van hetzelfde woord dicht bij elkaar en duwt afgeleide antoniemen ver uit elkaar. In intrinsieke evaluatie over vier talen laten we zien dat onze aanpak: 1) laagfrequente woordschattingen verbetert; en 2) verhoogt de semantische kwaliteit van de gehele woordvectorcollectie. Tot slot laten we zien dat morph-fitted vectoren grote voordelen opleveren in de downstream taak van dialoogstatus tracking, waarbij het belang van morfologie wordt benadrukt voor het aanpakken van long-tail fenomenen in taalbegrijpingstaken.", 'bg': 'Морфологично богатите езици акцентират върху две свойства на разпределителните векторни пространствени модели: 1) трудността за индуциране на точни изображения за нискочестотни словесни форми; и 2) безчувствие към отделни лексикални отношения, които имат сходни разпределителни подписи. Тези ефекти са вредни за системите за разбиране на езика, което може да заключи, че "евтино" е реформиране на "скъпо" или може да не свързва "придобиване" с "придобиване". В тази работа предлагаме нова процедура за морф-фитинг, която преминава извън използването на курирани семантични лексикони за подобряване на разпределителните векторни пространства. Вместо това нашият метод инжектира морфологични ограничения, генерирани чрез прости езикови специфични правила, дърпайки флексионните форми на една и съща дума близо един до друг и бутайки производните антоними далеч един от друг. При вътрешната оценка на четири езика, ние показваме, че нашият подход: 1) подобрява оценките на нискочестотните думи; и 2) повишава семантичното качество на цялата колекция от вектори на думи. На последно място, показваме, че преобразуваните вектори дават големи печалби в задачата надолу по веригата за проследяване на състоянието на диалога, подчертавайки значението на морфологията за справяне с явленията с дългата опашка в задачите за разбиране на езика.', 'de': 'Morphologisch reiche Sprachen betonen zwei Eigenschaften verteilter Vektorraummodelle: 1) die Schwierigkeit, genaue Repräsentationen niederfrequenter Wortformen herbeizuführen; und 2) Unempfindlichkeit gegenüber verschiedenen lexikalischen Beziehungen, die ähnliche Verteilungssignaturen haben. Diese Effekte sind schädlich für Sprachverständnissysteme, die darauf schließen können, dass "billig" eine Umformulierung für "teuer" ist oder "erwerben" nicht mit "acquires" assoziiert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges Morph-Fitting-Verfahren vor, das über die Verwendung kuratierter semantischer Lexikone zur Verbesserung von Verteilungsvektorräumen hinausgeht. Stattdessen injiziert unsere Methode morphologische Einschränkungen, die mit einfachen sprachspezifischen Regeln generiert werden, indem sie Flexionsformen des gleichen Wortes nahe beieinander zieht und abgeleitete Antonyme weit auseinander schiebt. In der intrinsischen Bewertung über vier Sprachen zeigen wir, dass unser Ansatz: 1) die niederfrequenten Wortschätzungen verbessert; und 2) erhöht die semantische Qualität der gesamten Wortvektorsammlung. Abschließend zeigen wir, dass morph-angepasste Vektoren große Vorteile in der nachgeschalteten Aufgabe des Dialogzustandstrackings erzielen und die Bedeutung der Morphologie für die Behandlung von Long-Tail-Phänomenen in Sprachverständnisaufgaben hervorheben.', 'id': "Bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis mengaktifkan dua properti model ruang vektor distribusional: 1) kesulitan untuk menginduksi represisi akurat untuk bentuk kata frekuensi rendah; dan 2) tidak sensitif untuk hubungan lexik yang berbeda yang memiliki tanda tangan distribusi yang sama. Efek-efek ini merugikan sistem pemahaman bahasa, yang dapat menyimpulkan bahwa `tidak mahal' adalah penggantian untuk `mahal' atau mungkin tidak berhubungan `acquire' dengan `acquires'. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan prosedur baru yang menyesuaikan morf yang bergerak melewati penggunaan leksikon semantis yang dikurasi untuk meningkatkan ruang vektor distribusi. Sebaliknya, metode kita menyuntik kebarangan morfologi yang dihasilkan menggunakan aturan sederhana bahasa-spesifik, menarik bentuk infleksional kata yang sama dekat bersama-sama dan mendorong antonim derivasi jauh terpisah. Dalam evaluasi intrinsik selama empat bahasa, kita menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita: 1) memperbaiki perkiraan kata frekuensi rendah; dan 2) meningkatkan kualitas semantis seluruh koleksi vektor kata. Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa vektor yang cocok dengan morf memberikan keuntungan besar dalam tugas turun dari pelacakan negara dialog, menandai penting morfologi untuk mengatasi fenomena ekor panjang dalam tugas pemahaman bahasa.", 'da': 'Morfologisk rige sprog fremhæver to egenskaber af fordelingsvektorrumsmodeller: 1) vanskeligheden ved at fremkalde nøjagtige repræsentationer for lavfrekvente ordformer; og 2) ufølsomhed over for forskellige lexikale relationer, der har lignende fordelingssignaturer. Disse virkninger er skadelige for sprogforståelsessystemer, hvilket kan udlede, at"billig"er en omformulering af"dyr"eller måske ikke forbinder"erhverve"med"erhvervelser. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny morph-fitting procedure, der bevæger sig forbi brugen af kuraterede semantiske leksikoner til forbedring af fordelingsvektorrum. I stedet indsprøjter vores metode morfologiske begrænsninger genereret ved hjælp af enkle sprogspecifikke regler, trækker bøjleformer af det samme ord tæt på hinanden og skubber afledte antonymer langt fra hinanden. Ved iboende evaluering over fire sprog viser vi, at vores tilgang: 1) forbedrer lavfrekvente ordestimater; og 2) øger den semantiske kvalitet af hele ordvektorsamlingen. Endelig viser vi, at morf-monterede vektorer giver store gevinster i downstream opgaven med dialog state tracking, hvilket understreger vigtigheden af morfologi for at tackle langhalefænomener i sprogforståelsesopgaver.', 'hr': "Morfološki bogati jezici akcentiraju dvije vlasništvo svemirskih modela distribucijskog vektora: 1) teškoća induciranja točnih predstavljanja za oblike riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) nesosjetljivost na različite leksičke odnose koje imaju slične distribucijske potpise. Ovi učinci su štetni za sustave razumijevanja jezika, koji mogu uvjeriti da je `nejeksenzivno' rephrasiranje za `skupo' ili ne može povezati `acquire' sa `acquires'. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu proceduru za uključivanje morfija koja prelazi preko korištenja krivenih semantičkih leksiona za poboljšanje distribucijskih prostora vektora. Umjesto toga, naša metoda ubrizgava morfološke ograničenja proizvedene s jednostavnim pravilima specifičnih jezika, povlačenjem inflekcionalnih oblika iste riječi blizu zajedno i guranjem derivacijskih antonima daleko. U unutrašnjoj procjeni na četiri jezika pokazujemo da naš pristup: 1) poboljšava procjenu riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) povećava semantičku kvalitet cijele kolekcije riječi vektora. Konačno, pokazujemo da morfološki vektori donose velike dobiće u donjem zadatku praćenja države dijaloga, naglašavajući važnost morfologije za rješavanje fenomena dugog repa u zadatkima razumijevanja jezika.", 'sw': 'Lugha zenye utajiri wa kimorphologically inaelezea vifaa viwili vya miundo mbili ya usambazaji wa sekta: 1) vigumu vya kutengeneza uwakilizaji sahihi kwa ajili ya aina za maneno ya chini ya frequency; na 2) usisitizo wa mahusiano tofauti ya lexico ambayo ina saini sawa na usambazaji. Matokeo haya yanaathirika kwa mfumo wa kuelewa lugha, ambao unaweza kuathiri kwamba ‘kupata bei yasiyoeleweka’ ni upya kwa ‘gharama’ au labda wasishiriki ‘kupata’ kwa ‘kupata’ na ‘kupata’. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mchakato wa kisasa unaoendelea kupita matumizi ya lexico ya sekondari kwa ajili ya kuboresha nafasi za usambazaji. Instead, our method injects morphological constraints generated using simple language-specific rules, pulling inflectional forms of the same word close together and pushing derivational antonyms far apart.  Katika tathmini za ndani zaidi ya lugha nne, tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu ni: 1) inaboresha maneno ya kiwango kidogo ya umeme; na 2) inaongeza ubora wa sekundi wa mkusanyiko mzima wa neno. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kwamba vectori zilizohitajika kwa morph zinaleta mafanikio makubwa katika kazi ya chini ya mto wa ufuatiliaji wa mazungumzo ya serikali, wakionyesha umuhimu wa kisemolojia kwa kukabiliana na hali ya muda mrefu katika kazi za kuelewa lugha.', 'tr': "Meňzeş baý diller döwürme vektör seleňleri üçin iki hasaplanyşyny akcentlaýarlar: 1) azalyk frekansiýa söz biçimlerini takyklaýan kynçylyk 2) daýlamak imzalaryna meňzeş lukmanlary beýleki hatlaryň aýratynlaşygyna duýumsuzlyk ýok. Bular eserler diller düşünüp sistemleri üçin iň näsirli. Bu ''gaçma' bolmady ýada `gymmat' üçin täzeden ýagdaýda `acquires' bilen syýalaşyp bilmez. Bu işde, bölünme vektör uzaklarını geliştirmek üçin önünden geçen roman örf uygulama prosedüsini teklif ediyoruz. Yýene-de biziň täzimimiz morfolojik çykyşlaryny basit diller takyklaýan kurallary ullanýar, meňzeş sözlerin ýakyn şeklinde etkileşimli şekillerini we derivsiýaly antonymlary uzaklaşdyrýar. Dört dillerden daşary çözümleşdirýän çözümlerde, özümiziň ýaryşymyzy 1) düşük frekanslaryň hasaplamalaryny üýtgedýäris; 2) bütün kelime vektör koleksiyonunun semantik kalitesini arttırır. Soňunda, morfolojik gabat vektörleriniň düşük zadynyň dijalog durumynyň gözlemeginiň iň uly gazandygyny görkezýäris. Dilleriň düşünme zadynyň ýüze durmuşy üçin morfologiýanyň wajyplygyny ýagtylamak üçin gurnalandyrýarys.", 'ko': "형태가 풍부한 언어는 분포 벡터 공간 모델의 두 가지 특성을 강조한다. 1) 저주파어 형식의 정확한 표현을 귀납하기 어렵다.2) 비슷한 분포 특징을 가진 서로 다른 어휘 관계에 민감하지 않다.이러한 영향은 언어 이해 시스템에 해롭다. '저렴한 값' 이 '비싼 값' 에 대한 재표현이라고 추정할 수도 있고, '얻는 것' 과 '얻는 것' 을 연결시키지 않을 수도 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 새로운 변형 의합 프로그램을 제기했는데, 이것은 정성스럽게 기획된 의미 어휘를 사용하여 분포 벡터 공간을 개선하는 방법을 초월했다.반대로 우리의 방법은 간단한 언어의 특정한 규칙을 사용하여 생성된 형태학적 제약을 주입하여 같은 단어의 굴절 형식을 긴밀하게 연결시키고 파생 반의어를 분리한다.네 가지 언어에 대한 내재적인 평가에서 우리는 우리의 방법을 증명했다. 1) 저주파어 평가를 개선했다.2) 전체 어향량 집합의 의미의 질을 향상시킨다.마지막으로 우리는 변형 의합방향량이 대화 상태 추적의 하류 임무에서 커다란 수익을 창출하고 형태학이 언어 이해 임무를 처리하는 데 있어 긴 꼬리 현상의 중요성을 강조했다.", 'af': "Morphologies ryk tale aksentueer twee eienskappe van verspreidingsvektor spasiemodele: 1) die moeilikheid van die voorkoms van presies voorstellings vir lae- frekwensiewoord vorms; 2 en 2) onbevestigheid tot verskillende leksiese verwantings wat gelykbaar verspreidingsonderskrifte het. Hierdie effekte is verkeerd vir taal verstaan stelsels, wat dalk kan infer dat `inexpensive' is 'n herfrysing vir `koste' of dalk mag nie `acquire' met `acquires' toesluit nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n roman morph-fitting prosedure wat verbygaan verby die gebruik van gekuierde semantiese leksies vir verbetering van verspreidingsvektorspasies. In plaas, ons metode inprop morfologiese beheinings wat genereer word deur eenvoudige taal-spesifieke reëls, wat infleksionele vorms van dieselfde woord saam toe en afgeleide antonyms ver afdruk. In intrinsiese evaluering oor vier tale, wys ons dat ons toegang: 1) verbeter die lae-frekwensiewoord estimaties; en 2) versterk die semantiese kwaliteit van die hele woord vektorversameling. Eindelik, ons wys dat morfologiese vektore groot verskaffings in die onderstreem taak van dialoog staat navolg verkry, verlig die belangrikheid van morfologie vir die taks van lang-tail fenomene in taal verstaande taak.", 'fa': 'زبانهای پولدار مورفولاژی دو ویژگی از مدل فضای ویکتور تقسیم می\u200cکنند: ۱) مشکلی که تولید نمایش\u200cهای دقیق برای شکل\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای فرکانس پایین است. و ۲) احساس ناپذیری به رابطه\u200cهای زبانی متفاوتی که امضای تقسیم مشابه دارند. این اثرات برای سیستم\u200cهای درک زبانی خطرناک است، که می\u200cتواند تأثیر دهد که «غیر منفی» برای «گرون» یا ممکن است «acquire» با «acquires» تأثیر دهد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش تازه\u200cای که از طریق استفاده از زبان\u200cهای طبیعی متفاوت برای بهبود فضای ویکتورهای تقسیم می\u200cکند. به جای این، روش ما محدودیت مورفولوژیکی را تزریق می کند که با استفاده از قوانین ویژه\u200cی زبان ساده تولید می\u200cشود، فرم\u200cهای اثراتی از یک کلمه با هم نزدیک می\u200cشوند و به اندازه\u200cهای آنتونیم\u200cهای derivational دور می\u200cکند. در ارزیابی داخلی از چهار زبان نشان می دهیم که دستور ما: ۱) تقدیم کلمات پایین فرکانس را بهتر می کند. و ۲) کیفیت سیمانتی کل جمع\u200cآوری ویکتور کلمه را افزایش می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که ویکتورهای متصل شده به صورت مرغ، در کار پایین\u200cترین دنبال ایالت دیalog، سود بزرگی می\u200cگیرند، و مهمترین مورفولوژی برای حل پدیده\u200cهای طولانی در کار\u200cهای درک زبان را مشخص می\u200cکند.', 'am': 'በሞርፎሎጂ ባለጠጋ ቋንቋዎች ሁለት የክፍለ ቦታ ሜትሮክ ሞዴላዎችን ያስቸጋሉ፤ 1) የዝግታ መልዕክቶች የሚያሳየው ጭንቀት 2) በተለያዩ የሌክሲካዊ ግንኙነት የልዩ ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልጋቸው ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እነዚህ የቋንቋዎች ማስተዋል ስርዓቶች የሚያስጨንቁባቸው ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የሜኑባዊ የሞርፊ ሥርዓት ለመጠቀም የሚቻለውን የስሜንቲካ ሌክሲኮንን ለመጠቀም የሚዘጋጀውን የሜኑባዊ ቦታዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በፋንታ፣ የሞፎሎጂ ግንኙነታችንን ቀላል ቋንቋ-specific ሥርዓቶች በመጠቀም ያስወግዳል፣ በአንድ ቃላት የተጠቃሚ ፎርማቶችን በመጠቀም እና ለርቀት የተለየ የድፍረት አናውንቶችን መጨመሩ፡፡ በአራቱ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ባለው ግንኙነት እናሳየዋለን፡ እና (2) የቃላት የዌctor ሰብስብ የsemantic quality በመጨረሻው፣ የሞርፍ ተቃራኒ vectors በአውራው ፈሳሽ ስራ የጥልቅ ሀብት እንዲያሳየው እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներն ուշադրություն են տալիս բաշխման տարածական մոդելների երկու հատկություններին. 1) ցածր հաճախականությամբ բառերի ձևերի ճշգրիտ ներկայացումների առաջացման դժվարությունը, և 2) անզգայունություն տարբեր լեքսիկական հարաբերությունների նկատմամբ, որոնք ունեն նման բաշխման նշաններ: These effects are detrimental for language understanding systems, which may infer that `inexpensive' is a rephrasing for `expensive' or may not associate `acquire' with `acquires'.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր փոխակերպման գործընթաց, որը անցնում է կորտերացված սեմանտիկ լեքսիկոնների օգտագործման մեջ՝ տարածական տարածքների բարելավման համար: Փոխարենը, մեր մեթոդը ներարտադրում է մորֆոլոգիական սահմանափակումներ, որոնք ստեղծվում են օգտագործելով պարզ լեզվով հատուկ կանոններ, միավորելով նույն բառի ազդեցության ձևերը և հեռու տարբերելով տարբերակային անտոնիմները: Չորս լեզուների ընդհանուր գնահատման մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը 1) բարելավում է ցածր հաճախականության բառերի գնահատումները, և 2) բարձրացնում է վեկտորների ամբողջ բառերի հավաքածուի սեմանտիկ որակը: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ վերափոխակերպված վեկտորները մեծ շահույթ են ստանում երկրորդ պոչյուրի երևույթների լուծման համար լեզվի հասկանալու խնդիրներում, որոնք ներկայացնում են երկրորդ պոչյուրի երևույթների կարևորությունը:", 'bn': "মরোফোলজিক্যাল ভাষা বিতরণের ভেক্টরের স্পেস মডেলের দুটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য: ১) নিম্ন ফ্রেক্সি শব্দের ফর্মের জন্য সঠ এবং ২) লেক্সিক্যাল সম্পর্ক বিভিন্ন স্বাক্ষরের উদ্বেগ নেই। এই প্রভাব ভাষা বুঝতে পারে ভাষার ব্যবস্থার জন্য ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত, যেগুলোর মধ্যে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হতে পারে যে 'অসম্ভব' হচ্ছে 'দামী' এর জন্য পুনরায় প্রতিরোধ করা  এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের মানুষের প্রস্তাব করি যা বিতরণের ভেক্টরের স্থান উন্নয়নের জন্য সেমেন্টিক লেক্সিকোন ব্যবহারের অতীতে চলে। তার পরিবর্তে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণ ভাষার নির্দিষ্ট নিয়ম ব্যবহার করে নির্ধারণ করে, একই শব্দের প্রভাবিক ধরনের কাছাকাছি থেকে কাছাকাছি করে এবং দূর চার ভাষার বেশী ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া: ১) নিম্ন ফ্রাইভেন্সি শব্দের হি এবং ২) পুরো শব্দ ভেক্টর সংগ্রহের সেমেন্টিক মান বৃদ্ধি করে। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মোর্ফ-যথাযথ ভেক্টর নীচে ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রের ট্র্যাকিং করার কাজে বিশাল অর্জন প্রদান করে, যা ভাষায় বুঝতে পারে দীর্ঘ টেইলের বি", 'bs': "Morfološki bogati jezici akcentiraju dvije vlasništvo svemirskih modela distribucijskog vektora: 1) teškoća induciranja tačnih predstavljanja za oblike riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) nesosjetljivost na različite leksičke odnose koje imaju slične distribucijske potpise. Ovi učinci su opasni za sisteme razumijevanja jezika, koji mogu uvjeriti da je `nejeksenzivno' rephrasiranje za `skupo' ili ne može povezati `acquire' sa `acquires'. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu proceduru za uključenje morfija koja prelazi preko korištenja izloženih semantičkih leksiona za poboljšanje prostora distribucije vektora. Umjesto toga, naša metoda ubrizgava morfološke ograničenje koje su stvorene koristeći jednostavne pravila za specifične jezike, povlačenje inflekcionalnih oblika iste riječi blizu zajedno i guranje derivacijskih antonima daleko. U unutrašnjoj procjeni na četiri jezika pokazujemo da naš pristup: 1) poboljšava procjenu riječi niske frekvencije; i 2) povećava semantičku kvalitet cijele kolekcije vektora riječi. Konačno, pokazujemo da morfološki vektori dobijaju velike dobitke u donjem zadatku praćenja država dijaloga, naglašavajući važnost morfologije za rješavanje fenomena dugog repa u zadatkima razumijevanja jezika.", 'sq': "Gjuhat e pasura morfologikisht theksojnë dy pronësi të modeleve të hapësirës vectore shpërndarëse: 1) vështirësinë për të induktuar përfaqësime të sakta për format e fjalëve me frekuencë të ulët; dhe 2) pa ndjeshmëri ndaj marrëdhënieve të veçanta lexike që kanë nënshkrime të ngjashme shpërndarëse. Këto efekte janë dëmtuese për sistemet e kuptimit të gjuhës, të cilat mund të shpjegojnë se `i papërkushtueshëm' është një shfaqje për `të shtrenjtë' ose nuk mund të lidhin `të fitojnë' me `të fituarat'. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një procedurë të re të përshtatjes së morfit që kalon përdorimin e lexikoneve semantike të kuruara për përmirësimin e hapësirave të vektorëve shpërndarës. Në vend të kësaj, metoda jonë injekton kufizime morfologjike të gjeneruara duke përdorur rregulla të thjeshta specifike gjuhës, duke tërhequr forma të përziera të të njëjtit fjalë të afërt së bashku dhe duke shtyrë Antonimet derivative larg. Në vlerësimin e brendshëm mbi katër gjuhë, ne tregojmë se qasja jonë: 1) përmirëson vlerësimet e fjalëve me frekuencë të ulët; dhe 2) rrit cilësinë semantike të gjithë koleksionit të fjalëve vektor. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se vektorët e pajisur me morfë japin fitime të mëdha në detyrën më poshtë të ndjekjes së dialogut shtetërore, duke theksuar rëndësinë e morfologjisë për trajtimin e fenomeneve të bishtit të gjatë në detyrat e kuptimit të gjuhës.", 'ca': "Les llengües rics morfològicament accentuen dues propietats dels models d'espai vector distribuïble: 1) la dificultat d'induir representacions exactes per formes de paraules de baixa freqüència; i 2) insensibilitat a relacions lècsiques diferents que tenen signatures distribucionals similars. Aquests efectes són perjudicials per als sistemes de comprensió del llenguatge, que poden deduir que `poc costós' és una reformulació per `cara' o potser no associa `adquirir' amb `adquirir'. En aquest treball, proposem un nou procediment de adaptació a la morfia que passa més enllà de l'ús de lexicòns semàntics curats per millorar els espais de distribució de vectors. En comptes d'això, el nostre mètode injecte restriccions morfològiques generades fent servir normes senzilles específices de llenguatge, atraint formes inflexionals de la mateixa paraula juntes i empenyant els antonims derivats molt més enllà. En una evaluació intrínseca sobre quatre llengües, demostram que el nostre enfocament: 1) millora estimacions de paraules de baixa freqüència; i 2) augmenta la qualitat semàntica de tota la col·lecció de paraules vectors. Finalment, demostram que els vectors adaptats a la morfia produeixen grans guanys en la tasca avall del diàleg de seguiment de l'estat, destacant l'importància de la morfologia per abordar fenomens de llarga cola en tasques de comprensió del llenguatge.", 'cs': 'Morfologicky bohaté jazyky zdůrazňují dvě vlastnosti distribučních vektorových modelů prostoru: 1) obtížnost indukování přesných reprezentací nízkofrekvenčních slovních forem; a 2) necitlivost na odlišné lexikální vztahy, které mají podobné distribuční podpisy. Tyto účinky jsou škodlivé pro systémy porozumění jazyků, což může vyvodit, že "levné" je přeformulování pro "drahé" nebo nemusí spojovat "akvizice" s "akvizice". V této práci navrhujeme nový postup přizpůsobení morph, který se pohybuje přes použití kurátovaných sémantických lexikonů pro zlepšení distribučních vektorových prostorů. Místo toho naše metoda vstřikuje morfologická omezení generovaná pomocí jednoduchých jazykově specifických pravidel, tahuje flexiální formy stejného slova blízko k sobě a tlačí derivační antonymy daleko od sebe. Při vnitřním hodnocení ve čtyřech jazycích ukazujeme, že náš přístup: 1) zlepšuje nízkofrekvenční odhady slov; a 2) zvyšuje sémantickou kvalitu celé sbírky vektorů slov. Nakonec ukazujeme, že morph-fitované vektory přinášejí velké zisky v následném úkolu sledování stavu dialogu, což zdůrazňuje význam morfologie pro řešení long-tail jevů v úkolech porozumění jazyků.', 'et': 'Morfoloogiliselt rikkalikud keeled rõhutavad jaotusvektoriruumi mudelite kahte omadust: 1) raskus indutseerida täpseid esitusi madalsageduslikele sõnavormidele; ja 2) tundetus erinevate leksikaalsete suhete suhtes, millel on sarnased jaotussignatuurid. Need mõjud on kahjulikud keelte mõistmise süsteemidele, mis võivad järeldada, et "odav" on "kalli" ümbersõnastamine või ei pruugi seostada "omandamist" omandamisega. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse morfide sobivuse protseduuri, mis liigub kaugemale kureeritud semantiliste leksikonide kasutamisest jaotusvektoriruumide parandamiseks. Selle asemel süstitakse meie meetod morfoloogilisi piiranguid, mis tekivad lihtsate keelespetsiifiliste reeglite abil, tõmmates sama sõna paindvormid kokku ja lükates tuletatud antonüümid kaugele. Sisemises hindamises neljas keeles näitame, et meie lähenemisviis: 1) parandab madala sagedusega sõna hinnanguid; ja 2) parandab kogu sõnavaktorikogu semantilist kvaliteeti. Lõpuks näitame, et morfidega varustatud vektorid annavad dialoogi oleku jälgimise järgnevas ülesandes suurt kasu, rõhutades morfoloogia tähtsust pikasaba nähtuste lahendamisel keelte mõistmise ülesannetes.', 'az': "Morphologically rich languages accentuate two properties of distributional vector space models: 1) the difficulty of inducing accurate representations for low frequency word forms; v…ô 2) b…ônz…ôr b√∂l√ľnm…ô imzalarńĪ olan m√ľxt…ôlif dilsiz iliŇükil…ôrin hiss…ôsi olmayan. Bu t…ôsirl…ôr dill…ôrin anlama sisteml…ôrin…ô …ôziyy…ôt verir. Bu t…ôsirl…ôrin `x…ôrcl…ôm…ôz' v…ô ya `acquire' il…ô `acquires' il…ô birlikl…ônm…ôsini anlayabilir. Bu iŇüd…ô, dańüńĪtńĪŇü vekt√∂r m…ôsaf…ôl…ôrini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn ke√ßirilmiŇü semantik leksikl…ôrinin istifad…ôsind…ôn ke√ß…ôn yeni morph-fitn…ô prosed√ľsini t…ôklif edirik. Bunun yerin…ô, bizim metodumuz morfolojik m√ľ…ôyy…ônl…ôŇüdirirl…ôr, sad…ôc…ô dil m√ľ…ôyy…ônl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü kurallar vasit…ôsil…ô yaradńĪlńĪr, eyni s√∂z√ľn etkileŇüimli formlarńĪnńĪ birlikd…ô yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪr v…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik antoniml…ôri uzaqlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. D√∂rd dill…ôrin i√ßind…ô √ß…ôkilm…ôsind…ô, bizim t…ôr…ôfimiz: 1) d√ľŇü√ľk frekans s√∂zl…ôrin t…ôr…ôfimizi yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. v…ô 2) b√ľt√ľn s√∂z vektoru koleksiyonunun semantik keyfiyy…ôtini artńĪrar. Sonunda, morph-fitn…ô vekt√∂rl…ôr dill…ôrin anlama iŇül…ôrind…ô √ßox y√ľks…ôk q…ônim…ôtl…ôrini d…ôyiŇüdirir.", 'fi': 'Morfologisesti rikkaat kielet korostavat jakaumavektoriavaruuden mallien kahta ominaisuutta: 1) vaikeus tuottaa tarkkoja esityksiä matalataajuuksisille sanamuodoille; ja 2) tunteettomuus erillisille sanastosuhteille, joilla on samanlaiset jakeluallekirjoitukset. Nämä vaikutukset ovat haitallisia kielenkäyttöjärjestelmille, joiden perusteella voidaan päätellä, että "edullinen" on sanamuoto "kalliille" tai että se ei välttämättä liity "hankkimaan" ja "hankkimaan". Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta morfien sovitusmenetelmää, joka ohittaa kuratoidun semanttisen sanaston käytön jakeluvektoriavaruuksien parantamiseksi. Sen sijaan menetelmämme ruiskuttaa morfologisia rajoituksia, jotka syntyvät yksinkertaisilla kielikohtaisilla säännöillä, vetämällä saman sanan taivutusmuodot lähelle toisiaan ja työntämällä johdannaisantonyymit kauas toisistaan. Neljän kielen sisäisessä arvioinnissa osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme: 1) parantaa matalataajuuksisia sanaarvioita; ja 2) parantaa koko sanavektorikokoelman semanttista laatua. Lopuksi osoitamme, että morfioidut vektorit tuottavat suuria hyötyjä dialogin tilan seurannan loppupään tehtävässä, korostaen morfologian merkitystä pitkähäntäilmiöiden torjunnassa kielitaitotehtävissä.', 'he': 'שפות עשירות מורפולוגית מבטטות שני תכונות של דוגמני חלל ויקטורים מתפזרים: 1) הקשה להוציא מייצגים מדויקים לצורות מילים מתדר נמוך; 2) חוסר רגישות ליחסים לקסיים הבודדים שיש להם חתימות פיצוציות דומות. ההשפעות האלה הן נזקוקות למערכות הבנה לשפה, אשר יכולות להוציא כי ‘ לא יקר’ הוא שינוי של ‘ יקר’ או שאולי לא מחובר ‘ להשיג’ עם ‘ להשיג’. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים תהליך חדש מתאים למורפים שמעביר את השימוש של לקסיקונים סמנטיים מרופאים לשיפור מרחבי ויקטורים המפזרים. במקום זאת, השיטה שלנו מזריקה מחסומות מורפולוגיות שנוצרו באמצעות חוקים פשוטים ספציפיים לשפה, מושך צורות שליליות של אותו המילה להתקרב יחד ולדחוף אנטונימים הנגזרים רחוקים. בערכה פנימית מעל ארבעה שפות, אנו מראים שהגישה שלנו: 1) משפר הערכות מילים בתדר נמוך; ושני) מגביר את איכות הסמנטית של כל אוסף ווקטורים המילים. סוף סוף, אנו מראים שהווקטורים המתאימים למורפים נותנים רווחות גדולות במשימה המאוחרת של מעקב דיאלוג של מדינה, ומדגישים את חשיבות המורפולוגיה לטפל בתופעות זנב ארוך במשימות הבנה לשפה.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness 2) Sensitif kanggo langgambar luwih hayo nggambar luwih-luwih iso nggambar tarjamahan Efek nyong ngomong deweke nggo sistem nggunakake banget, sing bisa ngomong sekang kelas \'indeksensive\' kuwi mbatalungane soko \'kosong\' or a bisa dianggo kelas \'kok ngerewake\' In this job, we proposal a new shift text-tool-action Iso cah-cah sing paling-cah lanjuré supoyo urip saiki, kéné ngerasah dadi kaluwargane ujaran kanggo ngerasah barang langgar: 1) iso nggawe ujaran ujaran langgar sapa kut ujaran langgar, akeh onh uwis saiki: Display boxes"), ("Display boxes instead of paths only"), "paths windows-action', 'ha': "Zimanki masu tajiri da harshen marofologi, sunã samun properties biyu na shiryoyin shiryoyin fili na daban-daban: 1) mai ƙunci wa ka induce masu tsari wa tsari wa tsaro na sauran-Frequency; and 2) insensitivity to distinct lexical relations that have similar distributional signatures.  Waccan Effekt yana da amfani wa masu fahimta cikin harshen, ko yana kasancẽwa ana ƙara wa `abubuwa' da ake yi wa rabo wa`arziki' ko kuma bã ya iya haɗa `sami' da`adana'. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani jararin morf mai daidai da matsayi wanda ke tafiya ta bayan amfani da mai amfani da littafin eliki na curated don ya kyautata filayen shiryarwa. Kayyansa, hanyoyinmu na injista tsarin morfologi da aka ƙãga kowanta da wasu shiryoyin masu sauƙi cikin harshen, yana ƙara fomat masu yin hushi da shi samu'in da aka rufe shi kuma yana ƙara surori masu tsakanin da ke tsakanin. Ina ƙidãya a cikin kashi kowane harshe huɗu, Munã nũna cewa hanyoyinmu: 1) yana ƙara kalmar da ya kamata sauri; kuma ya ƙara sifar da ke cikin kashi na komai. Haƙĩƙa, Munã nũna wa masu shiryi da ke daidai da morf, suna fitar da rabo mai girma a cikin aikin bayani na bayani na bayani na mazaɓa, kuma Yana bayyana muhimmin morfolojiya wa ka yi danganta abu mai tsawo cikin aikin yin fahimta na harshe.", 'sk': "Morfološko bogati jeziki poudarjajo dve lastnosti distribucijskih vektorskih prostorskih modelov: 1) težavnost induciranja natančnih predstavitev nizkofrekvenčnih besednih oblik; in 2) neobčutljivost do različnih leksikalnih razmerij, ki imajo podobne distribucijske podpise. Ti učinki so škodljivi za sisteme razumevanja jezikov, ki lahko sklepajo, da je ‚poceni' preoblikovanje za ‚drago' ali pa ne povezujejo ‚pridobivanje' s ‚pridobivanje'. V tem delu predlagamo nov postopek prilagajanja morfov, ki prekorači uporabo kuriranih semantičnih leksikonov za izboljšanje distribucijskih vektorskih prostorov. Namesto tega naša metoda vbrizga morfološke omejitve, ustvarjene s preprostimi jezikovnimi pravili, pri čemer povleče inflekcijske oblike iste besede blizu in potiska izpeljane antonime daleč narazen. Pri notranjem vrednotenju v štirih jezikih pokažemo, da naš pristop: 1) izboljšuje nizkofrekvenčne ocene besed; in 2) povečuje semantično kakovost celotne zbirke besednih vektorjev. Na koncu pokažemo, da vektorji, prilagojeni s preoblikovanjem, prinašajo velike koristi pri nadaljnji nalogi sledenja stanja dialoga, pri čemer poudarjamo pomen morfologije pri reševanju pojavov dolgerepa pri razumevanju jezika.", 'bo': 'Morphologically rich languages accentuate two properties of distributional vector space models: 1) the difficulty of inducing accurate representations for low-frequency word forms; a དེ་ལས་(2)ཆ་འཕྲིན་རྩིས་མེད་པ་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་དབང་ཆ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་མེད། ནུས་ཚོད་འདི་དག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག In this work, we propose a novel morph-fitting procedure which moves past the use of curated semantic lexicons for improving distributional vector spaces. དེ་ལས། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དམིགས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་བྱེད་ན་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་ སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་བཞིན་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འཚོལ་བཞིན་ཡིན། (2) སྐད་ཆ་ཚིག་གི་ཚང་མའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་རིམ་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད། Finally, we show that morph-fitted vectors yield large gains in the downstream task of dialog state tracking, highlighting the importance of morphology for tackling long-tail phenomena in language understanding tasks.'}
{'en': 'Skip-Gram   Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'ar': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = جمع المتجهات', 'fr': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf+Uniforme = Additivité vectorielle', 'es': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf+ Uniforme = Aditividad vectorial', 'pt': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf + Uniforme = Aditividade Vetorial', 'ja': 'Skip - Gram − Zipf + Uniform =ベクトル加法性', 'zh': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf + Uniform = 向量相加性', 'hi': 'छोड़ें-ग्राम − Zipf + वर्दी = वेक्टर Additivity', 'ru': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf + Uniform = Векторная аддитивность', 'ga': 'Skip-Gram − Zipf + Uniform = Breiseán Veicteoir', 'ka': 'Skip- Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'hu': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'el': 'Παράλειψη Gram- Zipf- Uniform- Vector Additivity', 'lt': 'Skip-Gram – Zipf + Uniform = Vektoriaus priedyvumas', 'it': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniforme = Additività vettoriale', 'mk': 'Skip- Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'kk': 'Грамманы өткізу - Zipf + бірнеше түрі = вектордың қосымшалығы', 'ms': 'Langkah-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Tambahan Vektor', 'ml': 'ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുക - സിപ്ഫ് + യൂണിഫോമ് = വെക്റ്റര്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Additività tal-Vettur', 'mn': 'Өгөрсөн грамм - Zipf + нэг хэлбэр = вектор нэмэлт', 'no': 'Hopp over - Zipf + Uniform = vektoradditivitet', 'pl': 'Pomiń Gram- Zipf- Jednolity i Dodatkowość wektorów', 'so': 'Jiid-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'ro': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniformă = Additivitate vectorială', 'sr': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vektorska dodatnost', 'si': 'Skip- Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Addtivity', 'sv': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'ta': 'வரைபடத்தை விட்டுவிடு - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'ur': 'Skip- Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'vi': 'Nhảy- Gram - Zipf +đồng phục tố véc- tơ', 'uz': 'OĘ»chirish', 'bg': 'Прескочи Грам - Зип + униформа = Векторна добавка', 'nl': 'Skip-Gram-Zipf voor uniforme vectoradditiviteit', 'hr': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vektorska dodatnost', 'da': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'de': 'Skip-Gram, Zipf, Uniform, Vector Additivity', 'ko': 'Skip Gram-Zipf+Uniform = 벡터 가중성', 'id': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'fa': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Additivity Vector', 'sw': 'Tofauti-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Upatikanaji wa Vector', 'tr': 'Atla', 'af': 'Spring- Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'am': 'undo-type', 'sq': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vektor Additivity', 'hy': 'Բաց-Գրամ - Զիպֆ + Նիֆորմ = Վեկտորի ադիտիվություն', 'bn': 'গ্রাম - জিপফ + ইউনিফর্ম = ভেক্টরের সংযোগ', 'az': 'Gram atlayın - Zipf + Uniform = Vektor Əlaviyyəti', 'ca': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Additivitat del vector', 'bs': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vektorska dodatnost', 'cs': 'Přeskočit Gram, Zipf, Uniform a Vector Additivity', 'et': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'fi': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'he': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Additivity Vector', 'sk': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = vektorska dodatnost', 'bo': 'Skip-Gram - Zipf + Uniform = Vector Additivity', 'jv': 'tips-locale:de', 'ha': '@ action'}
{'en': 'In recent years word-embedding models have gained great popularity due to their remarkable performance on several tasks, including word analogy questions and caption generation. An unexpected side-effect of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., man + royal = king. This work provides a theoretical justification for the presence of additive compositionality in word vectors learned using the Skip-Gram model. In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus. As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies. When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby : the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies. This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.adding\n\ntwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., “man” + “royal” = “king”. This work provides a theoretical justification for the presence of additive compositionality in word vectors learned using the Skip-Gram model. In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus. As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies. When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies. This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models. ', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، اكتسبت نماذج تضمين الكلمات شعبية كبيرة نظرًا لأدائها الرائع في العديد من المهام ، بما في ذلك أسئلة تشابه الكلمات وإنشاء التسميات التوضيحية. من "الآثار الجانبية" غير المتوقعة لمثل هذه النماذج أن نواقلها غالبًا ما تظهر تكوينًا ، أي أن إضافة متجهين للكلمات ينتج عنه متجه لا يكون سوى زاوية صغيرة بعيدًا عن متجه الكلمة التي تمثل المركب الدلالي للكلمات الأصلية ، على سبيل المثال ، "man" + "royal" = "king". يقدم هذا العمل تبريرًا نظريًا لوجود التركيب الإضافي في متجهات الكلمات التي تم تعلمها باستخدام نموذج Skip-Gram. على وجه الخصوص ، يُظهر أن التركيب الإضافي يحمل معنى أكثر صرامة (مسافة صغيرة بدلاً من زاوية صغيرة) في ظل افتراضات معينة حول العملية التي تولد الجسم. كنتيجة طبيعية ، يشرح نجاح حساب المتجهات في حل تشابهات الكلمات. عندما لا تصمد هذه الافتراضات ، يصف هذا العمل عامل التكوين غير الخطي الصحيح. أخيرًا ، ينشئ هذا العمل ارتباطًا بين نموذج Skip-Gram وإطار الحد الكافي من الأبعاد (SDR) الخاص بـ Globerson و Tishby: يمكن الحصول على معلمات نماذج SDR من نماذج نماذج Skip-Gram ببساطة عن طريق إضافة معلومات عن ترددات الرموز. يوضح هذا أن حفلات الزفاف في Skip-Gram هي الأمثل بمعنى Globerson و Tishby ، علاوة على ذلك ، يشير ضمنيًا إلى أنه يمكن استخدام الأساليب التجريبية المستخدمة بشكل شائع لتلائم نماذج Skip-Gram تقريبًا لتناسب نماذج SDR.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, les modèles d'intégration de mots ont gagné en popularité en raison de leurs performances remarquables sur plusieurs tâches, y compris les questions d'analogie de mots et la génération de sous-titres. Un «\xa0effet secondaire\xa0» inattendu de tels modèles est que leurs vecteurs présentent souvent une compositionalité, c'est-à-dire que l'ajout de deux vecteurs-mots produit un vecteur qui n'est éloigné que d'un petit angle par rapport au vecteur d'un mot représentant la composition sémantique des mots originaux, par exemple «\xa0homme\xa0» + «\xa0royal\xa0» = «\xa0roi\xa0». Ce travail fournit une justification théorique de la présence d'une compositionalité additive dans les vecteurs de mots appris à l'aide du modèle Skip-Gram. En particulier, il montre que la compositionalité additive tient dans un sens encore plus strict (faible distance plutôt qu'angle faible) dans certaines hypothèses sur le processus de génération du corpus. En corollaire, elle explique le succès du calcul vectoriel dans la résolution d'analogies de mots. Lorsque ces hypothèses ne sont pas valables, ce travail décrit l'opérateur de composition non linéaire correct. Enfin, ce travail établit un lien entre le modèle Skip-Gram et le cadre de réduction de dimensionnalité suffisante (SDR) de Globerson et Tishby\xa0: les paramètres des modèles SDR peuvent être obtenus à partir de ceux des modèles Skip-Gram simplement en ajoutant des informations sur les fréquences des symboles. Cela montre que les intégrations Skip-Gram sont optimales au sens de Globerson et Tishby et, en outre, implique que les heuristiques couramment utilisées pour ajuster approximativement les modèles Skip-Gram peuvent être utilisées pour ajuster les modèles SDR.", 'es': 'En los últimos años, los modelos de incrustación de palabras han ganado gran popularidad debido a su notable desempeño en varias tareas, incluidas las preguntas de analogía de palabras y la generación de subtítulos. Un «efecto secundario» inesperado de estos modelos es que sus vectores a menudo exhiben composicionalidad, es decir, añadir dos vectores de palabras da como resultado un vector que está a solo un ángulo pequeño del vector de una palabra que representa la composición semántica de las palabras originales, por ejemplo, «man» + «royal» = «king». Este trabajo proporciona una justificación teórica de la presencia de composicionalidad aditiva en los vectores de palabras aprendidos mediante el modelo Skip-Gram. En particular, muestra que la composicionalidad aditiva se mantiene en un sentido aún más estricto (distancia pequeña en lugar de ángulo pequeño) bajo ciertas suposiciones sobre el proceso que genera el cuerpo. Como corolario, explica el éxito del cálculo vectorial en la resolución de analogías de palabras. Cuando estas suposiciones no son válidas, este trabajo describe el operador de composición no lineal correcto. Finalmente, este trabajo establece una conexión entre el modelo Skip-Gram y el marco de Reducción de Dimensionalidad Suficiente (SDR) de Globerson y Tishby: los parámetros de los modelos SDR se pueden obtener de los de los modelos Skip-Gram simplemente agregando información sobre las frecuencias de los símbolos. Esto demuestra que las incrustaciones de Skip-Gram son óptimas en el sentido de Globerson y Tishby y, además, implica que las heurísticas comúnmente utilizadas para ajustar aproximadamente los modelos de Skip-Gram se pueden usar para adaptarse a los modelos SDR.', 'ja': '近年、単語埋め込みモデルは、単語のアナロジーの質問やキャプションの生成など、いくつかのタスクで卓越したパフォーマンスを発揮しているため、大きな人気を得ています。 そのようなモデルの予期しない「副作用」は、それらのベクターがしばしば組成性を示すことであり、すなわち、２つの単語ベクターを加えると、元の単語の意味複合体を表す単語のベクターから離れた小さな角度、例えば、「人」＋「王家」＝「王」であるベクターが生じる。 この研究は、Skip - Gramモデルを使用して学習されたワードベクトルにおける加法的組成性の存在の理論的な正当性を提供する。 特に、それは、コーパスを生成するプロセスの特定の仮定の下で、加法的組成性がさらに厳密な意味で（小さな角度ではなく小さな距離）保持されることを示している。 必然的な結果として、ベクトル微積分が単語類推を解くことに成功したことを説明している。 これらの仮定が成立しない場合、本作業は正しい非線形組成演算子を記述する。 最後に、この研究は、Skip - GramモデルとGlobersonとTishbyの十分な次元縮小（ SDR ）フレームワークとの間のつながりを確立します。記号周波数の情報を追加するだけで、Skip - GramモデルからSDRモデルのパラメータを得ることができます。 これは、Skip - Gramの埋め込みがGlobersonとTishbyの意味で最適であることを示し、さらに、Skip - Gramモデルにほぼ適合するために一般的に使用されるヒューリスティックをSDRモデルに適合させるために使用できることを意味します。', 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, os modelos de incorporação de palavras ganharam grande popularidade devido ao seu desempenho notável em várias tarefas, incluindo questões de analogia de palavras e geração de legendas. Um “efeito colateral” inesperado de tais modelos é que seus vetores geralmente exibem composicionalidade, ou seja, adicionar dois vetores de palavras resulta em um vetor que está apenas a um pequeno ângulo de distância do vetor de uma palavra que representa a composição semântica das palavras originais, por exemplo, “homem” + “real” = “rei”. Este trabalho fornece uma justificativa teórica para a presença de composicionalidade aditiva em vetores de palavras aprendidos usando o modelo Skip-Gram. Em particular, mostra que a composicionalidade aditiva vale em um sentido ainda mais estrito (pequena distância ao invés de pequeno ângulo) sob certas suposições sobre o processo gerador do corpus. Como corolário, explica o sucesso do cálculo vetorial na resolução de analogias de palavras. Quando essas suposições não são válidas, este trabalho descreve o correto operador de composição não linear. Por fim, este trabalho estabelece uma conexão entre o modelo Skip-Gram e o framework Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) de Globerson e Tishby: os parâmetros dos modelos SDR podem ser obtidos a partir dos modelos Skip-Gram simplesmente adicionando informações sobre as frequências dos símbolos. Isso mostra que os embeddings Skip-Gram são ótimos no sentido de Globerson e Tishby e, além disso, implica que as heurísticas comumente usadas para ajustar aproximadamente os modelos Skip-Gram podem ser usadas para ajustar os modelos SDR.', 'zh': '近年以来,词嵌模形,因数事而广受欢迎,单词类字幕成。 一不意之副作用,其向量常合,加两词向量则向量与原始单词语义复合者单词向量有小角,如"man"+"royal"="king"。 其事为用Skip-Gram学词向量有加法成性以给理论依据。 特为明语料库之设,加法成性于严义(小距离非小角度)立也。 推而论之,其说向量微积分于词类之成也。 当此不立时,此事非线性算符。 其终于Skip-Gram与GlobersonTishby之降维(SDR)框架,SDR其参数,以益其号Skip-Gram。 此明 Skip-Gram 嵌 Globerson Tishby 之义最佳,而益以近拟合 Skip-Gram 之启发式施于拟合 SDR 也。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में शब्द-एम्बेडिंग मॉडल ने कई कार्यों पर अपने उल्लेखनीय प्रदर्शन के कारण बहुत लोकप्रियता हासिल की है, जिसमें शब्द सादृश्य प्रश्न और कैप्शन पीढ़ी शामिल हैं। इस तरह के मॉडल का एक अप्रत्याशित "साइड-इफेक्ट" यह है कि उनके वैक्टर अक्सर रचनात्मकता प्रदर्शित करते हैं, यानी, दो शब्द-वैक्टर को जोड़ने के परिणामस्वरूप एक वेक्टर होता है जो मूल शब्दों के शब्दार्थ समग्र का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले शब्द के वेक्टर से केवल एक छोटा कोण दूर होता है, उदाहरण के लिए, "आदमी" + "शाही" = "राजा"। यह काम छोड़ें-ग्राम मॉडल का उपयोग करके सीखे गए शब्द वैक्टर में additive compositionality की उपस्थिति के लिए एक सैद्धांतिक औचित्य प्रदान करता है। विशेष रूप से, यह दिखाता है कि additive compositionality एक और भी सख्त अर्थ में रखती है (छोटे कोण के बजाय छोटी दूरी) कॉर्पस उत्पन्न करने की प्रक्रिया पर कुछ मान्यताओं के तहत। एक उप-सिद्धांत के रूप में, यह शब्द उपमाओं को हल करने में वेक्टर कैलकुलस की सफलता की व्याख्या करता है। जब ये धारणाएँ नहीं होती हैं, तो यह कार्य सही गैर-रैखिक संरचना ऑपरेटर का वर्णन करता है। अंत में, यह काम स्किप-ग्राम मॉडल और ग्लोबरसन और टिशबी के पर्याप्त आयामी कमी (एसडीआर) ढांचे के बीच एक संबंध स्थापित करता है: एसडीआर मॉडल के पैरामीटर को स्किप-ग्राम मॉडल के उन लोगों से प्राप्त किया जा सकता है, बस प्रतीक आवृत्तियों पर जानकारी जोड़कर। इससे पता चलता है कि स्किप-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग ग्लोबरसन और टिशबी के अर्थ में इष्टतम हैं और, आगे, इसका तात्पर्य यह है कि आमतौर पर स्किप-ग्राम मॉडल को फिट करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का उपयोग एसडीआर मॉडल को फिट करने के लिए किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы словообразующие модели приобрели большую популярность благодаря своим замечательным показателям по нескольким задачам, включая вопросы аналогии слов и генерацию подписей. Неожиданным «побочным эффектом» таких моделей является то, что их векторы часто проявляют композиционность, то есть добавление двух слово-векторов приводит к тому, что вектор находится только на небольшом углу от вектора слова, представляющего семантический состав исходных слов, например, «человек» + «королевский» = «король». Данная работа дает теоретическое обоснование наличия аддитивной композиционности в векторах слов, изученных с использованием модели Скипа-Грама. В частности, он показывает, что аддитивная композиционность сохраняется в еще более строгом смысле (небольшое расстояние, а не небольшой угол) при определенных допущениях о процессе, генерирующем корпус. Как следствие, это объясняет успех векторного исчисления в решении словесных аналогий. Когда эти допущения не выдерживают, эта работа описывает правильный оператор нелинейного состава. Наконец, эта работа устанавливает связь между моделью Скипа-Грама и структурой достаточного уменьшения размерности (SDR) Глоберсона и Тишби: параметры моделей SDR могут быть получены из моделей Скипа-Грама просто путем добавления информации о частотах символов. Это показывает, что вложения Skip-Gram являются оптимальными в смысле Globerson и Tishby и, кроме того, подразумевает, что эвристика, обычно используемая для приближенного соответствия моделям Skip-Gram, может быть использована для соответствия моделям SDR.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá an-tóir ar mhúnlaí leabaithe focal mar gheall ar a bhfeidhmíocht iontach ar roinnt tascanna, lena n-áirítear ceisteanna faoi analaí focal agus giniúint fotheideal. “Fo-iarmhairt” den sórt sin gan choinne is ea gur minic a thaispeánann a veicteoirí comhdhéanamh, i.e., nuair a chuirtear dhá veicteoir focal, bíonn veicteoir nach bhfuil ach uillinn bheag ar shiúl ó veicteoir an fhocail a sheasann do chomhshuíomh shéimeantach na bhfocal bunaidh, m.sh., “fear” + “ríoga” = “rí”. Soláthraíonn an obair seo fírinniú teoiriciúil le comhshuíomh breise a bheith i veicteoirí focal a foghlaimíodh ag baint úsáide as an tsamhail Skip-Gram. Go háirithe, taispeánann sé go bhfuil comhdhéanamh breiseán i gciall níos déine fós (achar beag seachas uillinn bheag) faoi thoimhdí áirithe maidir leis an bpróiseas a ghineann an corpas. Mar atoradh, míníonn sé an rath a bhí ar chacalas veicteora i réiteach analógacha focal. Nuair nach bhfuil na boinn tuisceana seo i bhfeidhm, déanann an saothar seo cur síos ar an oibreoir comhdhéanamh neamhlíneach ceart. Ar deireadh, bunaítear leis an obair seo nasc idir an tsamhail Skip-Gram agus an creat Laghdú Toise Leordhóthanach (SDR) de Globerson agus Tishby: is féidir paraiméadair na samhlacha SDR a fháil ó pharaiméadair na samhlacha Skip-Gram go simplí trí fhaisnéis a chur leis ar mhinicíochtaí siombailí. Léiríonn sé seo go bhfuil leabaithe Skip-Gram optamach i gciall Globerson agus Tishby agus, thairis sin, tugann sé le tuiscint gur féidir úsáid a bhaint as an heuristics a úsáidtear go coitianta chun samhlacha Skip-Gram a fheistiú go garbh chun samhlacha SDR a fheistiú.', 'ka': "ბოლო წლის შემდეგ სიტყვების მოდელები გავიღეთ დიდი პოლუგარიტება, რამდენიმე დავალების შესახებ მათი შესანიშნავი მუშაობა, ანალოგიური კითხვები და შესახებ შესა ასეთი მოდელების განსაზღვრებულ 'ბოლო-ეფექტი' არის რომ მათი გვეკტორიები ბოლო გამოიყენებს კომპოციაციალურობას, მაგალითად, ორი სიტყვა-გვეკტორის დამატება, რომელიც მხოლოდ პატარა კუთხი ვაკტორიდან გარეშე სიტყვას, რომელიც გამოყენებს სიმ ეს სამუშაო დამატებული კომპოციოციალობის სახელსაწყისთვის ტეორეტიკური განსაზღვრება სიტყვების გვექტორებში, რომელიც სწავლილი გამოყენებით Skip-Gram მოდელ განსაკუთრებით, ის ჩვენებს, რომ დამატებული კომპოზიციალობა კომპოზიციალობაში უფრო სტრიქტური სიგრძნობაში (პატარა distancა, უფრო პატარა კუთხეზე) განსაკუთრებული წარმო როგორც კოლოლარია, ის განახსენებს გვექტორის კალკულის წარმატება სიტყვას ანალოგიების განსახლებაში. როდესაც ეს წარმოდგენები არ შეიძლება, ეს სამუშაო აღწერს მარტივი არლინური კომპოზიციის პროცენტერი. საბოლოოდ, ეს სამუშაო მუშაო მოდელის Skip-Gram მოდელის და მსგავსი განზომილება (SDR) ფრამეტრების კონფიგურაცია შექმნა: SDR მოდელის პარამეტრები შეიძლება გაიღება Skip-Gram მოდელის მონაცემებისგან მხოლოდ სიმბოლობის ფრეკვე ეს ჩვენებს, რომ Skip-Gram მოდულებები პოტიმალურია გლობერსონის და ტიქბის სიგრძნობაში, და დამატებით, იგივეა, რომ ჰერისტიკა, რომელიც მხოლოდ გამოყენებულია სკიპ-გრამის მოდელების შესაძლებლობად გამოყენება", 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων έχουν κερδίσει μεγάλη δημοτικότητα λόγω της αξιοσημείωτης απόδοσής τους σε διάφορες εργασίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ερωτήσεων αναλογίας λέξεων και της δημιουργίας λεζάντων. Μια απροσδόκητη "παρενέργεια" τέτοιων μοντέλων είναι ότι τα διανύσματά τους συχνά παρουσιάζουν συνθηματικότητα, δηλαδή η προσθήκη δύο διανύσματα λέξης οδηγεί σε ένα διάνυσμα που βρίσκεται μόνο μια μικρή γωνία μακριά από το διάνυσμα μιας λέξης που αντιπροσωπεύει τη σημασιολογική σύνθεση των αρχικών λέξεων, π.χ. "άνθρωπος" + "βασιλικός" = "βασιλιάς". Η παρούσα εργασία παρέχει μια θεωρητική αιτιολόγηση της παρουσίας πρόσθετης σύνθεσης σε διανύσματα λέξεων που μαθαίνονται χρησιμοποιώντας το μοντέλο Skip-Gram. Ειδικότερα, δείχνει ότι η πρόσθετη συνθηματικότητα διατηρείται με ακόμη αυστηρότερη έννοια (μικρή απόσταση και όχι μικρή γωνία) υπό ορισμένες υποθέσεις σχετικά με τη διαδικασία παραγωγής του σώματος. Ως συνέπεια, εξηγεί την επιτυχία του διανυσματικού λογισμού στην επίλυση των αναλογιών λέξεων. Όταν αυτές οι παραδοχές δεν ισχύουν, αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει τον σωστό μη γραμμικό χειριστή σύνθεσης. Τέλος, η παρούσα εργασία δημιουργεί μια σύνδεση μεταξύ του μοντέλου Skip-Gram και του πλαισίου επαρκούς μείωσης διαστασιμότητας (SDR) των Globerson και Tishby: οι παράμετροι των μοντέλων SDR μπορούν να ληφθούν από αυτές των μοντέλων Skip-Gram απλά προσθέτοντας πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις συχνότητες συμβόλων. Αυτό δείχνει ότι οι ενσωματώσεις Skip-Gram είναι βέλτιστες με την έννοια των Globerson και Tishby και, επιπλέον, υποδηλώνει ότι οι heuristics που χρησιμοποιούνται συνήθως για να ταιριάξουν περίπου τα μοντέλα Skip-Gram μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να ταιριάξουν τα μοντέλα SDR.', 'hu': 'Az utóbbi években a szóbeágyazási modellek nagy népszerűséget szereztek a figyelemre méltó teljesítményüknek köszönhetően számos feladatban, beleértve a szóanalógia kérdéseket és a feliratok generálását. Az ilyen modellek váratlan mellékhatása, hogy vektoraik gyakran kompozicionálisak, azaz két szóvektor hozzáadása olyan vektort eredményez, amely csak egy kis szögben van az eredeti szavak szemantikai összetételét képviselő szó vektorától, pl. "ember" + "király" ="király". Ez a munka elméleti indokolást nyújt az additív kompozicionalitás jelenlétére a Skip-Gram modellel megtanult szóvektorokban. Különösen azt mutatja, hogy az additív összetétel még szigorúbb értelemben érvényes (kis távolság, nem kis szög) a korpusz létrehozására vonatkozó bizonyos feltételezések alapján. Korolláriumként elmagyarázza a vektoros kalkulus sikerét a szóanalógiák megoldásában. Ha ezek a feltételezések nem érvényesek, ez a munka leírja a megfelelő nemlineáris kompozíciós operátort. Végül ez a munka kapcsolatot teremt a Skip-Gram modell és a Globerson és Tishby elégséges dimenziócsökkentési (SDR) keretrendszere között: az SDR modellek paraméterei a Skip-Gram modellek paramétereiből egyszerűen a szimbólumfrekvenciákra vonatkozó információk hozzáadásával érhetők el. Ez azt mutatja, hogy a Skip-Gram beágyazások a Globerson és Tishby értelmében optimálisak, továbbá azt is jelenti, hogy a Skip-Gram modellek hozzávetőlegesen illeszkednek az SDR modellekhez.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылда сөздерді ендіру үлгілері бірнеше тапсырмалардың белгілі істеу үшін, сөздерді аналогиялық сұрақтарды және айдарларды құру үшін көптеген мәліметті жетті. Бұл үлгілердің күтпеген \'жалғыз эффекті\' дегені - олардың векторлары көбінесе композициялықты көрсетеді, яғни екі сөз- векторды қосу үшін тек бастапқы сөздердің семантикалық композитін көрсетеді, мысалы, \'man\' + \'royal\' = \'king\' деген сөздің векторының шегін шегін бұр Бұл жұмыс Skip- Gram моделі арқылы оқылған векторлардың қосымша композициялығын теоретикалық түзету үшін болады. Есінікте, ол қосымша құрылғысы корпус жасайтын процестің кейбір тапсырмаларында (кішкентай бұрыштың орнына кішкентай қашықтығы) дегенді көрсетеді. Сөзді аналогияларды шешу үшін вектор калькуласының сәттігін түсіндіреді. Бұл тапсырмалар жоқ болса, бұл жұмыс сызық емес композициялық операторын анықтайды. Соңында, бұл жұмыс Глоберсон және Tishby бағдарламасының Skip-Gram моделі мен жеткілікті өлшемдердің (SDR) қоршауын орнатады: SDR моделдерінің параметрлері Skip-Gram моделдерінен бірақ символдық жиіліктері туралы мәліметті қосып алуға болады. Бұл "Skip-Gram" ендіруді Globerson және Tishby түсініктерінде оптималдық деп көрсетеді. Көбірек, SDR үлгілеріне сәйкес келтіру үшін қолданылатын хюристик үлгілері қолданылады.', 'it': 'Negli ultimi anni i modelli di incorporazione di parole hanno guadagnato grande popolarità grazie alle loro notevoli prestazioni in diversi compiti, tra cui domande sull\'analogia di parole e la generazione di didascalie. Un inatteso "effetto collaterale" di tali modelli è che i loro vettori mostrano spesso compositività, cioè aggiungendo due vettori di parole si traduce in un vettore che è solo un piccolo angolo lontano dal vettore di una parola che rappresenta il composito semantico delle parole originali, ad esempio, \'uomo\' + \'regale\' = \'re\'. Questo lavoro fornisce una giustificazione teorica per la presenza di compositività additiva nei vettori di parole appresi utilizzando il modello Skip-Gram. In particolare, mostra che la compositività additiva si mantiene in un senso ancora più stretto (piccola distanza piuttosto che piccolo angolo) sotto certe ipotesi sul processo che genera il corpo. Come corollario, spiega il successo del calcolo vettoriale nella risoluzione delle analogie di parole. Quando queste ipotesi non sono valide, questo lavoro descrive l\'operatore di composizione non lineare corretto. Infine, questo lavoro stabilisce una connessione tra il modello Skip-Gram e il framework Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) di Globerson e Tishby: i parametri dei modelli SDR possono essere ottenuti da quelli dei modelli Skip-Gram semplicemente aggiungendo informazioni sulle frequenze dei simboli. Ciò dimostra che le incorporazioni Skip-Gram sono ottimali nel senso di Globerson e Tishby e, inoltre, implica che l\'euristica comunemente utilizzata per adattarsi approssimativamente ai modelli Skip-Gram può essere utilizzata per adattarsi ai modelli SDR.', 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais žodžių įtraukimo modeliai pasiekė didelę populiarumą, nes jie atliko nemažai užduočių, įskaitant žodžių analogijos klausimus ir antraščių kūrimą. Netikėtinas tokių modelių šalutinis poveikis yra tas, kad jų vektoriai dažnai rodo sudėtingumą, t. y. pridėjus du žodži ų vektorius sukuriamas vektorius, kuris yra tik nedidelis kampas nuo žodžio vektoriaus, atstovaujančio semantiniam originalių žodžių kompozitui, pvz., "man" + "royal" = "king". Šis darbas teoriškai pagrindžia, kad žodžių vektoriuose, įgytuose naudojant Skip-Gram model į, yra papildomo sudėtingumo. In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus.  As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies.  When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator.  Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  Tai rodo, kad Skip-Gram įdėjimai yra optimal ūs Globerson ir Tishby prasme ir taip pat reiškia, kad heuristikai, paprastai naudojami maždaug Skip-Gram modeliams pritaikyti, gali būti naudojami SDR modeliams pritaikyti.', 'mk': "In recent years word-embedding models have gained great popularity due to their remarkable performance on several tasks, including word analogy questions and caption generation.  An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  Оваа работа обезбедува теоретска оправдување за присуството на додатна композицијалност во зборовите вектори научени користејќи го моделот Skip-Gram. Посебно, истата покажува дека додатната композиционалност се држи во уште строга смисла (мала оддалеченост наместо мал агол) под одредени претпоставки за процесот на генерирање на корпусот. As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies.  Кога овие претпоставувања не се одржуваат, оваа работа го опишува правилниот нелинијарен оператор на композиција. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  Ова покажува дека вградувањата на Скип-Грам се оптимални во смисла на Глоберсон и Тишби и, понатаму, имплицира дека хеористиката обично користена за приближно да се совпаѓа со Скип-Грам моделите може да се користи за да се совпаѓа со СДР моделите.", 'mt': 'In recent years word-embedding models have gained great popularity due to their remarkable performance on several tasks, including word analogy questions and caption generation.  "Effett sekondarju" mhux mistenni ta\' mudelli bħal dawn huwa li l-vetturi tagħhom spiss juru l-kompożizzjoni, jiġifieri ż-żieda ta\' żewġ vetturi tal-kliem tirriżulta f\'vettur li huwa biss angolu żg ħir \'il bogħod mill-vettur ta\' kelma li tirrappreżenta l-kompożizzjoni semantika tal-kliem oriġinali, pereżempju, \'il-bniedem\' + \'royal\' = \'king\'. Dan ix-xogħol jipprovdi ġustifikazzjoni teoretika għall-preżenza ta’ kompożizzjoni addittiva f’vetturi tal-kliem li jitgħallmu bl-użu tal-mudell Skip-Gram. B’mod partikolari, juri li l-kompożizzjoni addittiva tinsab f’sens saħansitra aktar strett (distanza żgħira minflok angolu żgħir) taħt ċerti suppożizzjonijiet dwar il-proċess li jiġġenera l-korpus. As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies.  When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator.  Fl-a ħħar nett, dan ix-xogħol jistabbilixxi konnessjoni bejn il-mudell Skip-Gram u l-qafas ta’ Tnaqqis Suffiċjenti tad-Dimensjonalità (SDR) ta’ Globerson u Tishby: il-parametri tal-mudelli SDR jistgħu jinkisbu minn dawk tal-mudelli Skip-Gram sempliċement billi tiżdied informazzjoni dwar il-frekwenzi tas-simboli. Dan juri li l-inkorporazzjonijiet Skip-Gram huma ottimali fis-sens ta’ Globerson u Tishby u, barra minn hekk, jimplika li l-ġewristiċi użati b’mod komuni għal mudelli Skip-Gram li jaqblu bejn wieħed u ieħor jistgħu jintużaw biex jaqblu ma’ mudelli SDR.', 'ml': "കഴിഞ്ഞ വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വാക്ക് അകത്തുകൊണ്ടുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ് അവരുടെ പല ജോലികളിലും വാക്കുകള്\u200d അനാലജിക്കുന്ന ച പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത 'side-effect' എന്നതാണ് അവരുടെ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രാവശ്യം കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത്, അതായത് രണ്ട് വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത്, ആദ്യ വാക്കുകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് കോ ഈ ജോലി സ്കിപ്പ്-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പഠിച്ച വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dത്തയുടെ സ In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus.  വെക്റ്റര്\u200d കാല്\u200dക്കൂളുസിന്റെ വിജയം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു വാക്ക് അനാലജികള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നത്. ഈ ഊഹം പിടിച്ചിട്ടില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലി ശരിയായ കോമ്പോഷന്\u200d ഓപ്പറേറ്റര്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം, ഈ ജോലി സ്കിപ്പ്- ഗ്രാമിന്റെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഇടയില്\u200d ഒരു ബന്ധം സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. അത്രയും മതിയായ ഡിമെന്\u200dസിയലിറ്റി കുറച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നതും (SDR) ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറിനും ഗ്ലോബെര്\u200dസണിനും ടിഷ ഇത് കാണിക്കുന്നു സ്കിപ്പ്-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ പ്രവേശനങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്ലോബര്\u200dസണിന്റെയും ടിഷ്ബിയുടെയും മനസ്സില്\u200d മാന്യമാണെന്ന്. അതിനുമുമ്പ്, സ്കിപ്പ്-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ മോഡലുകള", 'ms': "In recent years word-embedding models have gained great popularity due to their remarkable performance on several tasks, including word analogy questions and caption generation.  An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  Kerja ini menyediakan alasan teori untuk kehadiran komposisi aditif dalam vektor perkataan yang belajar menggunakan model Skip-Gram. Secara khusus, ia menunjukkan bahawa komposisi aditif mengandungi dalam makna yang lebih ketat (jarak kecil daripada sudut kecil) di bawah asumsi tertentu pada proses yang menghasilkan korpus. As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies.  Apabila asumsi ini tidak memegang, kerja ini menggambarkan operator komposisi bukan linear yang betul. Akhirnya, kerja ini menentukan sambungan antara model Skip-Gram dan kerangka Penurangan Dimensionaliti Sufficient (SDR) Globerson and Tishby: parameter model SDR boleh dicapai dari model Skip-Gram hanya dengan menambah maklumat mengenai frekuensi simbol. Ini menunjukkan bahawa penerbangan Skip-Gram adalah optimal dalam arti Globerson dan Tishby dan, lebih lanjut, menunjukkan bahawa heuristik biasanya digunakan untuk kira-kira muat model Skip-Gram boleh digunakan untuk muat model SDR.", 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилийн дотор хэдэн ажил дээр гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнд хэд хэдэн арга барилгын адилхан асуултууд болон дуудлагын үеэр нэр хүндрэлтэй болсон. Эдгээр загварын "тал нөлөө" гэдэг нь тэдний векторууд ихэвчлэн бүтэцтэй байдлыг харуулдаг, яг л хоёр үг-векторуудыг нэмэх нь зөвхөн жижиг өнцөг нь эхний үгийнхээ semantic бүтэцтэй байдлыг илэрхийлж байгаа вектор юм. Энэ ажил нь Skip-Gram загварыг ашиглан сурсан векторуудын нэмэлт хэмжээсүүдийн байрлалын теоретикийн баталгаа өгдөг. Ялангуяа энэ нь нэмэлт төлөвлөгөө нь корпус үүсгэдэг үйл явцын тухай зарим тодорхойлолтуудын дотор бага зай (жижиг өнцөгээс илүү) илүү хатуу ойлголттой байдаг. Энэ нь вектор математикийн амжилтыг аналогийг шийдэхэд тайлбарладаг. Эдгээр тодорхойлолтууд байхгүй байхад энэ ажил шулуун биш байдлын операторыг тайлбарладаг. Эцэст нь энэ ажил Глоберсон болон Тишби хоорондын Skip-Gram загварын хоорондох холбоотой байгууллага болон хангалттай хэмжээст багасгах (SDR) хэмжээсүүд хоорондох холбоотой: SDR загварын параметрыг Skip-Gram загварын загварын хоорондоо зөвхөн тэмдэгтийн давхар дав Энэ нь Skip-Gram-ын оролцоо нь Globerson, Tishby-ын ойлголтын хувьд сайн сайн байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүнээс илүү хэлбэрээр, Skip-Gram загварууд нь SDR загваруудын тулд ойролцоогоор хэрэглэгддэг хиуристик юм.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, modelele de încorporare a cuvintelor au câștigat o mare popularitate datorită performanțelor remarcabile pe mai multe sarcini, inclusiv întrebări de analogie cu cuvinte și generarea de titluri. Un "efect secundar" neașteptat al unor astfel de modele este că vectorii lor prezintă adesea compoziționalitate, adică adăugarea a doi vectori de cuvânt rezultă într-un vector care se află la doar un unghi mic distanță de vectorul unui cuvânt care reprezintă compoziția semantică a cuvintelor originale, de exemplu, "om" + "regal" = "rege". Această lucrare oferă o justificare teoretică a prezenței compoziționalității aditive în vectorii de cuvinte învățați folosind modelul Skip-Gram. În special, arată că compoziționalitatea aditivă se menține într-un sens și mai strict (distanță mică mai degrabă decât unghi mic) în anumite ipoteze privind procesul de generare a corpului. Ca corolar, explică succesul calculului vectorial în rezolvarea analogiilor cuvintelor. Atunci când aceste ipoteze nu sunt valabile, această lucrare descrie operatorul corect de compoziție neliniară. În cele din urmă, această lucrare stabilește o legătură între modelul Skip-Gram și cadrul SDR (Suficient Dimensionality Reduction) al Globerson și Tishby: parametrii modelelor SDR pot fi obținuți de la cei ai modelelor Skip-Gram pur și simplu adăugând informații despre frecvențele simbolurilor. Acest lucru arată că încorporările Skip-Gram sunt optime în sensul Globerson și Tishby și, în plus, implică că euristica utilizată în mod obișnuit pentru a se potrivi aproximativ modelelor Skip-Gram pot fi utilizate pentru a se potrivi modelelor SDR.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har ordinnbyggingsmodeller fått stor popularitet på grunn av dei merkelige utviklingane på fleire oppgåver, inkludert ord analogiske spørsmål og tittelgenerasjon. Ein uventa «side-effekt» av slike modeller er at vektorane sine ofte viser komposisjonalitet, t.d. legg til to ord-vektorar resultat i e in vektor som berre er ein liten vinkel bort frå vektoren av eit ord som representerer den semantiske kompositet av original e ord, f.eks. «man»+ «royal»= «king». Dette arbeidet gjev ein teoretisk justering for tilstand til additiv samansetting i ordvektorar som er lært med hopp- grammodellen. Dette viser spesielt at additive compositionality holds i ein even strenger følelse (små avstanden i staden for små vinkel) under visse antar på prosessen som generer korpusen. Som ein korollar forklarer den suksessen på vektorkalkulen i løysing av ordanalogiar. Når desse antalene ikkje held, beskriver denne arbeiden den rette ikkje-lineære komponentsoperatoren. Etter slutt, denne arbeidet oppretter eit tilkopling mellom Skip-Gram-modellen og det tilgjengelege dimensjonalmodellen (SDR) av Globerson og Tishby: Parametrane for SDR-modellen kan få frå dei som har Skip-Gram-modellen enkelt ved å leggja til informasjon om symbolske frekvenser. Dette viser at innbygginga av Skip-Gram er optimal i følelsen av Globerson og Tishby, og framover impliserer at heuristica som vanleg brukar for tilpassa Skip-Gram-modeller kan brukast for å passa med SDR-modeller.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach modele osadzania słów zyskały dużą popularność ze względu na ich niezwykłą wydajność w kilku zadaniach, w tym pytania analogiczne słów i generowanie napisów. Nieoczekiwanym efektem ubocznym takich modeli jest to, że ich wektory często wykazują kompozycyjność, tj. dodanie dwóch wektorów słowa powoduje, że wektor znajduje się zaledwie o niewielki kąt od wektora słowa reprezentującego semantyczny złożony oryginalnych słów, np. "człowiek" + "królewski" = "król". Niniejsza praca dostarcza teoretycznego uzasadnienia obecności kompozycyjności addytywnej w wektorach słowa nauczonych przy użyciu modelu Skip-Gram. W szczególności pokazuje, że kompozycyjność dodatkowa utrzymuje się w jeszcze bardziej rygorystycznym znaczeniu (mała odległość niż mały kąt) pod pewnymi założeniami dotyczącymi procesu generowania ciała. Jako konsekwencja wyjaśnia sukces rachunku wektorowego w rozwiązywaniu analogii słów. W przypadku gdy te założenia nie mają zastosowania, niniejsza praca opisuje prawidłowy nieliniowy operator składu. Wreszcie praca ustanawia powiązanie pomiędzy modelem Skip-Gram a frameworkiem Wystarczającej Redukcji Wymiarowości (SDR) Globersona i Tishby: parametry modeli SDR można uzyskać z parametrów modeli Skip-Gram po prostu dodając informacje o częstotliwości symbolów. Pokazuje to, że osadzenia Skip-Gram są optymalne w sensie Globersona i Tishby, a ponadto oznacza, że heurystyka powszechnie stosowana do przybliżenia modeli Skip-Gram może być używana do dopasowania modeli SDR.', 'si': "අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින් වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුනා විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, වචනය සහ කැප් A unxpected 'side-Efection' of this Model is that the vets oft exhibit composination, i.e., add Two word-Vectors scores in a Vector that is just a short angle from the vettor of a word that presents the semantic composite of the first word, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'King'. මේ වැඩේ සිප්ප්-ග්\u200dරාම් මොඩල් භාවිතයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත වෙක්ටර් වචන වෙක්ටර් වලින් සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණය ස විශේෂයෙන්, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ අයිති සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා කොර්පුස් නිර්මාණය කරපු විදිහට (පුංචි කෝණ් කෝරෝලාරියෙක් විදියට, ඒක වෙක්ටර් කැල්කුලුස්ගේ සාර්ථක විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි. මේ විශ්වාස අල්ලගන්නේ නැති වෙලාවේ, මේ වැඩේ හරිම නොලින් සංයෝජනය වැඩකරණය විස්තර කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි, මේ වැඩ ස්ථාපිත කරනවා Skip-Gram මොඩේල් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විදියට සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා ස් මේක පෙන්වන්නේ Skip-Gram සංවිධානය ග්ලෝබර්සන් සහ ටිෂ්බි වලට හොඳයි කියලා, ඒ වගේම, ඉතින්, හෙයුරිස්ටික් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට භාවිත වෙන්නේ ස්ක", 'sr': "Za poslednje godine modeli uključujući riječi dobili su veliku popularnost zbog njihove izvanredne izvedbe na nekoliko zadataka, uključujući pitanja analogije riječi i generaciju kapcija. Neoèekivan 'side-effect' takvih modela je da njihovi vektori često pokazuju kompozicionalnost, tj. dodavanje dva reèi-vektora rezultuje vektoru koji je samo mali ugao udaljen od vektora reèi koja predstavlja semantički kompozit originalnih reèi, na primer, 'čovek' + 'kraljevski' = 'kralj'. Ovaj rad pruža teoretsku opravdanje prisustva kompozicionalnosti dodatnih slučajeva u rečnim vektorima naučenim korištenjem modela Skip-Gram. Posebno pokazuje da dodatna kompozicija drži u još strogim smislu (mala udaljenost umjesto malog ugla) pod određenim pretpostavkama o procesu koji stvara korpus. Kao korollar, objašnjava uspeh vektorskog kalkula u rešavanju analogija riječi. Kada te pretpostavke ne održavaju, ovaj rad opisuje pravi ne-linearni operator kompozicije. Na kraju, ovaj rad uspostavlja vezu između model a Skip-Gram i dovoljno smanjenja dimenzionalnosti (SDR) okvira Globersona i Tishby: parametri modela SDR mogu biti dobiti iz modela Skip-Gram jednostavno dodajući informacije o frekvenciji simbola. To pokazuje da su integracije Skip-Gram optimalne u smislu Globersona i Tishby i dalje impliciraju da se heuristika koja se uobičajeno koristi za približno uklapanje modela Skip-Gram može koristiti za uklapanje modela SDR-a.", 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har ordinbäddningsmodeller vunnit stor popularitet på grund av deras anmärkningsvärda prestanda på flera uppgifter, inklusive ordanalogifrågor och bildtext generation. En oväntad "bieffekt" av sådana modeller är att deras vektorer ofta uppvisar kompositionalitet, d.v.s. att lägga till två ordvektorer resulterar i en vektor som bara ligger en liten vinkel bort från vektorn för ett ord som representerar den semantiska sammansättningen av de ursprungliga orden, t.ex. "man" + "kunglig" = "kung". Detta arbete ger en teoretisk motivering för förekomsten av additiv kompositionalitet i ordvektorer lärda med hjälp av Skip-Gram-modellen. Framför allt visar den att additiv kompositionalitet håller i ännu strängare mening (litet avstånd snarare än liten vinkel) under vissa antaganden om processen som genererar korpus. Som en följd förklarar det framgången med vektorberäkning i att lösa ordanalogier. När dessa antaganden inte håller beskriver detta arbete den korrekta icke-linjära kompositionsoperatorn. Slutligen etablerar detta arbete en koppling mellan Skip-Gram-modellen och Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) ramverket för Globerson och Tishby: parametrarna för SDR-modeller kan erhållas från dem för Skip-Gram-modeller helt enkelt genom att lägga till information om symbolfrekvenser. Detta visar att Skip-Gram-inbäddningar är optimala i betydelsen Globerson och Tishby och innebär vidare att heuristiken som vanligtvis används för att ungefär passa Skip-Gram-modeller kan användas för att passa SDR-modeller.', 'ur': "اگلے سالوں میں کلمات انڈینگ موڈل بہت زیادہ مشهور ہوگئے ہیں ان کے بہت سے کاموں پر اثبات کی وجہ سے، کلمات انڈیلوژی سوال اور کپٹن کی نسل میں شامل ہوگئے۔ ایسے موڈل کی ناامید 'side-effect' یہ ہے کہ ان کے ویکتروں کی اکثریت اکثریت پیدا کرتی ہے، یعنی دو لفظ ویکتروں کو اضافہ کرتی ہے کہ ایک ویکتور سے صرف ایک چھوٹا زاویہ ہے جو ایک لفظ کے ویکتروں سے چھوڑا ہوا ہے جو اصلی لفظ کی سیمنٹی پیدا کرتی ہے، یعنی 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'. یہ کام اسپیپ-گرم موڈل کے مطابق علم ہونے والی ویکتروں میں اضافہ ترکیب کی موجودگی کے لئے ایک نظریہ تعریف دیتا ہے. مخصوصاً یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ اضافہ ترکیب کی تعبیر کورپوس کی پیدائش کے ذریعے ایک بھی زیادہ تنگ سمجھ میں ہے۔ ایک کرولاری کے طور پر، یہ ویکتور کلکول کے کامیابی کو واضح کر رہا ہے کلمات آنلوژی کے حل میں. جب یہ فرض نہیں ہوتے، یہ کام درست غیر لینیاری کامپیوتر کو توصیح دیتا ہے. آخر میں، یہ کام اسکیپ-گرم موڈل کے درمیان ایک اتصال مقرر کرتا ہے اور گلوبرسون اور تیشبی کے اندازے کافی اندازے کے ذخیره (SDR) فرمود کے فرمود کے درمیان ایک اتصال کرتا ہے: اسکیپ-گرم موڈل کے پارامیٹوں کو صرف نشانیوں فرکونس کے بارے میں اطلاعات اضافہ کر کر سکتا ہے. یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ Skip-Gram ایمبڈینگ گلوبرسون اور تیشبی کی سمجھ میں بہترین ہیں اور اس کے بعد، اس کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ اسپی-گرم موڈل کے مطابق اچھے مطابق استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ اسپی-گرم موڈل کے مطابق SDR موڈل کے مطابق استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں.", 'ta': "அண்மைய ஆண்டுகளில் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகள் பெரிய জনப்பாக பெரியதாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சொல்லை ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகள் மற்று எதிர்பாராத 'பக்க விளைவு' என்பது என்னவென்றால் நெறிகள் பெரும்பாலாக இருக்கும் உருவாக்கத்தை காட்டுகிறது, அதாவது, கூட்டுதல் இரண்டு வார்த்து நெறிகள் ஒரு சிறிய கோணத்தை வெக்டரில் இருந்து மட்டும் தான் மூ வார்த்தை நெறிகளில் கூடுதல் கூடுதல் கூடுதல் தொகுப்பு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி கற்று குறிப்பிட்டு, கூடுதல் கூட்டுதல் கூடுதல் கூடுதல் கூடுதல் கடுமையான உணர்வில் இருக்கிறது (சிறிய தூரத்தை விட சிறிய கோணத்திற்கு பதில வெக்டர் கல்கூலஸ் வெற்றிகரமான வெற்றியை விளக்குகிறது, வார்த்தை ஆராய்ச்சிகளை தீர்வு செய்யும். இந்த எண்ணங்கள் பிடிக்கவில்லையென்றால், இந்த வேலை சரியான கூட்டு இயக்கியை விளக்குகிறது. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  இது காண்பிக்கிறது கிளோப்பர்சன் மற்றும் டிஷ்பி உணர்ச்சியில் ஸ்கிப்- கிராம் பொருத்தமான மாதிரிகளை SDR மாதிரிகளுக்கு பொருத்தமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படும் ஹிரிசிக்ஸ", 'so': "Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey modelalka hadalka ku qoran ayaa dad aad u badan ku helay, sababtoo ah falimahooda aad u yaaba badan, kuwaas oo ah su’aalo kaleemeysiga iyo farshaxanka kaleemeysiga. Tusaalooyinka aan la filayn 'side-effect' waa in wadooyinkooda marar badan ay muujiyaan kooxo, taas oo ay ku daraan laba hadal-vector waxay sababtaa vector oo keliya ka fog wadanka ereyga oo ka mid ah kooxda erayada asalka ah, tusaale, 'man'+ 'royal' = 'king'. Shaqodanku wuxuu sabab u yeelan karaa in ay joogo qalabka kaleba ah oo ay ku baran yihiin tusaale ahaan Skip-Gram. In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus.  Sida qoraal ah, waxay u caddaysaa guulaysta kalkulus oo ku saabsan baahida hadalka. Markii aan haysan malaha, shaqadaas ayaa qoraya qofka saxda ah ee xarunta saxda ah oo aan linear ahayn. Ugu dambaysta, shuqulkaas wuxuu dhisaa xiriir u dhexeeya modelka Skip-Gram iyo sawirada ku filan ee Globerson iyo Tishby: parameters of SDR models waxaa laga heli karaa tusaalaha Skip-Gram si fudud ah, waxayna ku dari kartaa macluumaad ku saabsan frequencies symbolka. Tan waxay muuqataa in dareecadaha Skip-Gram ay ku habboon yihiin habka Globerson iyo Tishby, waxaa loola jeedaa in tusaalaha SDR oo ugu haboon karo tusaalaha sawir-gram lagu isticmaali karo.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, các mô hình ghép từ đã trở nên nổi tiếng nhờ những thành quả đáng chú ý của chúng trong nhiều nhiệm vụ, bao gồm câu hỏi từ so sánh và sản xuất từ. Một hiệu ứng "phụ" bất ngờ của các mô- đun này là các véc- tơ của chúng thường có tính cách hợp tác, tức là thêm hai từ có kết quả thành một véc- tơ chỉ là một g óc nhỏ nằm ngoài véc- tơ của một từ đại diện cho tổng hợp chữ gốc, ví dụ như\'man\'\'hoàng gia\' =\'king\'. Công trình này cung cấp một lý do lý thuyết về sự có mặt của sự hợp tác phụ trong các môi trường chữ được học qua mẫu Skip-Gram. Đặc biệt, nó cho thấy hàm lượng bổ sung có ý nghĩa còn chặt chẽ hơn (góc nhỏ hơn góc nhỏ) theo một số giả thuyết về tiến trình tạo ra tập thể. Như một hệ quả, nó giải thích sự thành công của các tính toán vector trong giải quyết các từ tương tự. Khi những giả định này không giữ được, công việc này miêu tả tổng hợp không tuyến tính đúng. Cuối cùng, công việc này tạo ra sự kết nối giữa mô hình Skip-Gram và một bộ phận hỗ trợ sự giảm tập trung chiều (SDR) đủ cho Globson và Tishka: các thông số của mô hình SDR có thể được lấy từ các mô hình Skip-Gram đơn giản bằng cách thêm thông tin về tần số biểu tượng. Điều này cho thấy khả năng tác động của Skip-Gram là tối ưu theo ý nghĩa của Globson và Tishrey và, thêm nữa, ngụ ý rằng thần kinh thường được dùng để độ chuẩn của mẫu Skip-Gram có thể được dùng để phù hợp các mô hình SDR.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ichida so'z tuzilishi modellari, bir necha vazifalar uchun juda yaxshi narsa topildi. Bu so'zlar analog savollari va sarlavhalar generasi sababi. Ushbu modelning kutilmagan 'side- effekti' huddi ularning vectorlari ko'proq kompyuterni ko'rsatadi, balki ikkita so'z- vektori qoʻshish natijasida kelib asl so'zlarining semantik kompyuterga e g a boʻlgan so'z vektoridan bir kichkina burchak keladi, misol, 'man' + 'royal' = 'king' kabi so'zlar. Name Ko'rsatganda, qo'shish tuzilishi juda qisqa qisqa munosabatlarni ko'rsatadi. Bu jarayonni kichkina burchak yaratish haqida ko'rsatadi. Vaktor kalkulus muvaffaqiyatini o'rganadi, so'z analoglarini o'zgartirish. Bu g'oyalar yoʻq boʻlmaganda, bu ishni notoʻgʻri bogʻ'liq kompyuterning operatorini anglatadi. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  Bu ko'rsatadi, Skip-Gram tuzilishi Globerson va Tishby g'oyida optik bo'lganligini ko'rsatish mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan heuristik huddi Skip-Gram modellari SDR modellariga moslash mumkin.", 'bg': 'През последните години моделите за вграждане на думи придобиха голяма популярност поради забележителното си изпълнение на няколко задачи, включително въпроси за аналогия на думи и генериране на надписи. Неочакван "страничен ефект" на такива модели е, че техните вектори често проявяват композиционалност, т.е. добавянето на две думи-вектори води до вектор, който е само на малък ъгъл от вектора на дума, представляваща семантичния композит на оригиналните думи, напр. "човек" + "крал" = "крал". Тази работа предоставя теоретична обосновка за наличието на добавкна композиционна способност в речни вектори, научени с помощта на модела Скип-Грам. По-специално, той показва, че добавката композиционна способност съществува в още по-строг смисъл (по-скоро малка дистанция, отколкото малък ъгъл) при определени предположения за процеса, генериращ корпуса. Като следствие, тя обяснява успеха на векторното изчисление в решаването на думични аналогии. Когато тези предположения не се държат, тази работа описва правилния нелинеен композиционен оператор. Накрая, тази работа установява връзка между модела Скип-Грам и рамката за достатъчно намаляване на измеренията на Глоборсън и Тишби: параметрите на моделите могат да бъдат получени от тези на моделите Скип-Грам просто чрез добавяне на информация за честотите на символите. Това показва, че вгражданията на Скип-Грам са оптимални в смисъла на Глуберсън и Тишби и освен това предполага, че евристиката, често използвана за приблизително прилягане на модели Скип-Грам, може да бъде използвана за прилягане на модели SDR.', 'da': 'I de seneste år har ordindlejringsmodeller fået stor popularitet på grund af deres bemærkelsesværdige ydeevne på flere opgaver, herunder ordanalogi spørgsmål og billedtekst generation. En uventet \'bivirkning\' af sådanne modeller er, at deres vektorer ofte udviser kompositionalitet, dvs. tilføjelse af to ordvektorer resulterer i en vektor, der kun er en lille vinkel væk fra vektoren af et ord, der repræsenterer den semantiske sammensætning af de oprindelige ord, f.eks. "mand" + "royal" ="konge". Dette arbejde giver en teoretisk begrundelse for tilstedeværelsen af additiv kompositionalitet i ordvektorer lært ved hjælp af Skip-Gram modellen. Især viser den, at additiv sammensætning gælder i endnu strengere forstand (lille afstand snarere end lille vinkel) under visse antagelser om den proces, der genererer corpus. Som en følge heraf forklarer det succesen med vektorberegning i at løse ordanalogier. Når disse antagelser ikke holder, beskriver dette arbejde den korrekte ikke-lineære sammensætning operator. Endelig etablerer dette arbejde en forbindelse mellem Skip-Gram-modellen og Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) rammerne for Globerson og Tishby: parametrene for SDR-modeller kan fås fra parametrene for Skip-Gram-modeller blot ved at tilføje oplysninger om symbolfrekvenser. Dette viser, at Skip-Gram-indlejringer er optimale i Globerson og Tishby forstand, og derudover indebærer, at den heuristik, der almindeligvis anvendes til omtrent at passe Skip-Gram-modeller, kan bruges til at passe SDR-modeller.', 'id': "Pada tahun-tahun terakhir model penyembedding kata telah mendapatkan popularitas besar karena prestasi luar biasa mereka pada beberapa tugas, termasuk pertanyaan analogi kata dan generasi caption. Sebuah 'efek sampingan' yang tidak terduga' dari model seperti itu adalah bahwa vektor mereka sering menunjukkan komposisi, i.e., menambahkan dua vektor kata berasal dari vektor yang hanya sudut kecil jauh dari vektor kata yang mewakili komposisi semantis dari kata-kata asli, misalnya, 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.. Kerja ini memberikan alasan teori untuk kehadiran komposisionalitas aditif dalam vektor kata yang belajar menggunakan model Skip-Gram. Terutama, itu menunjukkan bahwa komposisionalitas aditif memiliki dalam arti bahkan lebih ketat (jarak kecil daripada sudut kecil) di bawah asumsi tertentu pada proses menghasilkan tubuh. Sebagai corollary, itu menjelaskan sukses kalkulus vektor dalam memecahkan analogi kata. Ketika asumsi ini tidak memegang, pekerjaan ini menggambarkan operator komposisi bukan linear yang benar. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  Ini menunjukkan bahwa penerbangan Skip-Gram adalah optimal dalam arti Globerson dan Tishby dan, lebih lanjut, menunjukkan bahwa heuristik biasanya digunakan untuk sekitar cocok Skip-Gram model dapat digunakan untuk cocok model SDR.", 'nl': "In de afgelopen jaren hebben woord-embedding modellen grote populariteit gewonnen vanwege hun opmerkelijke prestaties op verschillende taken, waaronder woord analogie vragen en ondertiteling generatie. Een onverwacht 'neveneffect' van dergelijke modellen is dat hun vectoren vaak compositionaliteit vertonen, d.w.z. het toevoegen van twee woordvectoren resulteert in een vector die slechts een kleine hoek verwijderd is van de vector van een woord dat de semantische samenstelling van de oorspronkelijke woorden vertegenwoordigt, bijvoorbeeld 'man' + 'royal' = 'koning'. Dit werk biedt een theoretische rechtvaardiging voor de aanwezigheid van additieve compositionaliteit in woordvectoren geleerd met behulp van het Skip-Gram model. Het toont met name aan dat additieve compositionaliteit in nog striktere zin (kleine afstand in plaats van kleine hoek) onder bepaalde veronderstellingen over het proces dat het corpus genereert, geldt. Als gevolg hiervan verklaart het het succes van vectorberekening bij het oplossen van woordanalogieën. Wanneer deze aannames niet kloppen, beschrijft dit werk de juiste niet-lineaire compositieoperator. Tot slot wordt in dit werk een verband gelegd tussen het Skip-Gram model en het SDR framework van Globerson en Tishby: de parameters van SDR modellen kunnen worden verkregen uit die van Skip-Gram modellen door simpelweg informatie over symbolfrequenties toe te voegen. Dit toont aan dat Skip-Gram embeddings optimaal zijn in de zin van Globerson en Tishby en, verder, impliceert dat de heuristiek die gewoonlijk wordt gebruikt om ongeveer Skip-Gram modellen te passen, kan worden gebruikt om SDR modellen te passen.", 'hr': "Za poslednje godine modeli uključujući riječi dobili su veliku popularnost zbog njihove izvanredne učinke na nekoliko zadataka, uključujući pitanja analogije riječi i generaciju kapcija. Neočekivan 'side-effect' takvih modela je da njihovi vektori često pokazuju kompozicionalnost, tj. dodavanje dvije riječi-vektori rezultira vektora koji je samo mali ugao udaljen od vektora riječi koja predstavlja semantički kompozit originalnih riječi, npr., 'čovjek' + 'kraljevski' = 'kralj'. Ovaj rad pruža teorijsko opravdanje prisutnosti kompozicionalnosti additiva u riječima vektorima naučenim koristeći model Skip-Gram. Posebno pokazuje da kompozicija additiva drži u još strogim smislu (mala udaljenost umjesto malog ugla) pod određenim pretpostavkama o procesu koji proizvodi korpus. Kao korollar, objašnjava uspjeh vektorskog kalkula u rješavanju analogija riječi. Kada te pretpostavke ne održavaju, ovaj rad opisuje pravi ne-linearni operator kompozicije. Na kraju, ovaj rad utvrđuje povezanost između model a Skip-Gram i dovoljno smanjenja dimenzionalnosti (SDR) okvira Globersona i Tishby: parametri modela SDR mogu dobiti iz modela Skip-Gram jednostavno dodajući informacije o frekvenciji simbola. To pokazuje da su integracije Skip-Gram optimalne u smislu Globersona i Tishby te, dalje, impliciraju da se heuristika koja se često koristi za približno uklapanje modela Skip-Gram može koristiti za uklapanje modela SDR-a.", 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren haben Wort-Einbettungsmodelle aufgrund ihrer bemerkenswerten Leistung bei mehreren Aufgaben, einschließlich Wort-Analogie Fragen und Untertitel-Generierung, große Popularität gewonnen. Ein unerwarteter "Nebeneffekt" solcher Modelle ist, dass ihre Vektoren oft Kompositionalität aufweisen, d.h. wenn zwei Wortvektoren addiert werden, ergibt sich ein Vektor, der nur einen kleinen Winkel vom Vektor eines Wortes entfernt ist, der den semantischen Verbund der ursprünglichen Wörter darstellt, z.B. "man" + "royal" = "König". Diese Arbeit liefert eine theoretische Begründung für das Vorhandensein additiver Kompositionalität in Wortvektoren, die mit dem Skip-Gram-Modell gelernt wurden. Insbesondere zeigt sie, dass additive Kompositionalität in einem noch engeren Sinne (kleiner Abstand statt kleiner Winkel) unter bestimmten Annahmen über den Prozess, der den Korpus erzeugt, gehalten wird. Als Konsequenz erklärt es den Erfolg der Vektorrechnung bei der Lösung von Wortanalogien. Wenn diese Annahmen nicht zutreffen, beschreibt diese Arbeit den korrekten nichtlinearen Kompositionsoperator. Schließlich stellt diese Arbeit eine Verbindung zwischen dem Skip-Gram-Modell und dem Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) Framework von Globerson und Tishby her: Die Parameter von SDR-Modellen können aus denen von Skip-Gram-Modellen einfach durch Hinzufügen von Informationen über Symbolfrequenzen gewonnen werden. Dies zeigt, dass Skip-Gram Einbettungen im Sinne von Globerson und Tishby optimal sind und impliziert ferner, dass die Heuristiken, die üblicherweise verwendet werden, um ungefähr Skip-Gram Modelle zu passen, verwendet werden können, um SDR Modelle zu passen.', 'tr': "Soňky ýyllar içinde söz taýýarlanmasy nusgalary birnäçe işiň üstüne täsir etmäniň sebäbi, söz analogiýa soraglary we käpşenler döredilmesinde has ünsli gazandy. Böyle modellerin beklenmedik bir 'yan etkisi' yani, vektörleri sık sık şekilde bir şekilde oluşan vektöre ekleyen, yani 'man' + 'kral' = 'kral' vektöründen uzak bir küçük angle ekleyen vektöre benziyor. Bu çalışma vektörlerin Skip-Gram modelini kullanarak öğrenmiş kelimelerde toplam kompozisyonalitet olması için teorik bir hakkı verir. Özellikle, toplam kompozisyonu korpusu oluşturan işlemde belli tahmin eden kiçik bir şekilde daha çift bir duygu içinde tutuyor. Korunlar olarak, analojiler için vektör kalkuların başarısını anlatır. Bu pikirler tutmadykda, bu işe çyzgyly däl terjime operatöri tanyýar. Soňunda, bu işe Globerson we Tishby'iň ýeterli Dimensiýat Azaltylyk (SDR) çerçevesiniň arasynda bir baglaýyşy düzəlýär: SDR modelleri Skip-Gram modellerinden bu sahypa sembol frekwensiýasynda maglumat goşup biler. Bu ýerde Skip-Gram ködlemeleri Globerson we Tişby duýgularynda optimal bolýandygyny görkezýär. Diňe soňra, SDR modellerine golaýlaşjak şekilde ulanýan heuristikleriň üstüne golaýlaşyk üçin ullanylýar.", 'fa': "در سال های اخیر مدل\u200cهای پیدا کردن کلمه\u200cها به دلیل عملکرد فوق\u200cالعاده\u200cای که در چندین وظیفه\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهند، به عنوان سوال\u200cهای شبیه\u200cشناسی کلمه\u200cها و نسل عنوان کلمه\u200cها، شهرت بزرگی را یک منتظر غیر منتظره\u200cای از این مدل این است که ویکتورهای آنها اغلب ترکیبی را نمایش می\u200cدهند، یعنی اضافه کردن دو ویکتورهای کلمه به یک ویکتور نتیجه می\u200cدهد که تنها یک زاویه کوچک از ویکتور یک کلمه است که نمایش می\u200cدهد ترکیب semantic از کلمات اصلی، مثال ،'مرد' + 'سلطنتی' = 'پادشاه'. این کار یک تعریف نظریه برای موجودات ترکیب اضافه در ویکتورهای کلمه یاد گرفته از مدل Skip-Gram را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. مخصوصاً نشان می\u200cدهد که ترکیب اضافه\u200cای در یک حس سخت\u200cتر (فاصله کوچک به جای زاویه کوچک) تحت فرضیه\u200cهای خاصی بر فرایند تولید کورپوس است. به عنوان یک مرکز، موفقیت موفقیت شماره\u200cهای ویکتور را در حل الگوهای کلمه توضیح می\u200cدهد. وقتی این فرضیه\u200cها نگه دارند، این کار عملکرد سازی غیر خط را توصیف می\u200cکند. بالاخره، این کار ارتباطی بین مدل Skip-Gram و چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار این نشان می\u200cدهد که ابتدایی Skip-Gram در حس Globerson و Tishby optimal هستند و، در این صورت، اضافه می\u200cکند که هیوریست\u200cها معمولاً برای تقریباً مناسب مدل\u200cهای Skip-Gram استفاده می\u200cشوند برای اندازه\u200cگیری مدل SDR استفاده می\u200cشوند.", 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 단어 삽입 모델은 여러 가지 임무에서 뛰어난 활약을 하여 널리 환영을 받았는데, 이는 단어 유형 비교 문제와 제목 생성을 포함한다.두 벡터 중 한 벡터와 다른 벡터 사이의 협각은 보통 두 벡터의 결과이다.이 작업은 Skip-Gram 모형을 사용하여 학습한 어향량에 가성 성분이 존재하는 데 이론적 근거를 제공했다.특히 어료 라이브러리의 생성 과정에 대한 일부 가설에서 가성 성분은 더욱 엄격한 의미에서 성립되었다(작은 각도가 아니라 작은 거리).추론으로, 그것은 벡터 연산이 단어의 비례를 해결하는 데 성공한 것을 설명했다.이러한 가설이 성립되지 않을 때, 이 작업은 정확한 비선형 복합산자를 묘사하였다.마지막으로 이 작업은 Skip-Gram 모델과 Globerson과Tishby의 충분한 비트레이트(SDR) 프레임워크 간의 관계를 구축했다. SDR 모델의 매개 변수는 기호 주파수 정보를 추가하여 Skip-Gram 모델의 매개 변수에서 얻을 수 있다.이는 Globerson과 Tishby의 관점에서 볼 때 Skip-Gram 삽입이 가장 우수하다는 것을 보여준다. 또한 통상적으로 Skip-Gram 모델을 의합하는 데 사용되는 계발식 방법은 SDR 모델을 의합하는 데 사용할 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.', 'af': "In onlangse jaar het woord-inbetering modele groot populariteit ontvang vanweë hulle merkelike prestasie op verskeie opdragte, insluitend woord analogie vrae en opskriftegenerasie. 'n Onverwagte 'syeffek' van sodanige modele is dat hulle vektore dikwels komposiasionaliteit uitbied, t.d. twee woord- vektore resultaat in 'n vektor wat slegs 'n klein hoek weg is van die vektor van 'n woord wat die semantiese komposiet van die oorspronklike woorde verteenwoordig, bv., 'man' + 'koninklike' = 'koning'. Hierdie werk verskaf 'n teorieese opregting vir die voorsiening van additive compositionaliteit in woord vektore geleer deur te gebruik die Skip- Gram model. In besonderhede, dit wys dat additive compositionality hou in 'n selfs strenger sin (klein afstand eerder as klein hoek) onder sekere aanvaardes op die proses wat die korpus genereer. As 'n korollaar, verduidelik dit die sukses van vektor kalkulus in die oplossing van woord analogies. Wanneer hierdie voorstellings nie hou nie, hierdie werk beskrywe die korrek nie- lineêre opstellingsoperator. Eindelik, hierdie werk stel 'n verbinding tussen die Skip-Gram model en die Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) raamwerk van Globerson en Tishby: die parameters van SDR models kan eenvoudig verkry word van die Skip-Gram models deur inligting oor simboolfrekwensies te voeg. Hierdie vertoon dat Skip-Gram inbettings optimal is in die sens van Globerson en Tishby en, verder, impliseer dat die heuristiek wat gewoonlik gebruik word om omtrent passende Skip-Gram modelles te pas kan gebruik word om SDR modelles te pas.", 'sw': "Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, mitindo ya maneno yanayochapishwa yamekuwa yakipata umaarufu mkubwa kwa sababu ya utendaji wao wa ajabu kwenye kazi kadhaa, ikiwa ni pamoja na maswali ya uchambuzi na kizazi cha maoni. An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  Kazi hii inatoa uhakika wa msingi wa kuwepo kwa muungano wa ziada katika vectors wa maneno yaliyojifunza kwa kutumia mifano ya Skip-Gram. Kwa hakika, inaonyesha kuwa muungano wa ziada unashikilia katika hisia kali zaidi (umbali mdogo kuliko mwelekeo mdogo) chini ya dhana fulani kuhusu mchakato unaotengeneza barafu. Kama mwandishi, inaeleza mafanikio ya kalculus ya vector katika kutatua mabadiliko ya maneno. Wakati dhana hizi hazijaweza kusimamia, kazi hii inaelezea mwendeshaji sahihi wa ubunifu wa msingi. Mwisho, kazi hii inaweka uhusiano kati ya modeli ya Skip-Gram na mfumo wa Upunguzi wa Utawala wa kutosha (SDR) wa Globerson na Tishby: parameters of SDR can be obtained from those of the models of Skip-Gram simply by adding information on frequency symbol. This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.", 'sq': "Në vitet e fundit modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve kanë fituar popullaritet të madh për shkak të performancës së tyre të shquar në disa detyra, duke përfshirë pyetje analogjike fjalësh dhe gjeneratë e titujve. Një 'efekt anësor' i papritur i modeleve të tilla është se vektorët e tyre shpesh ekspozojnë kompozitivitet, pra, shtimi i dy vektorëve të fjalës rezulton në një vektor që është vetëm një kënd i vogël larg vektorit të një fjale që përfaqëson kompozitin semantik të fjalëve origjinale, për shembull, 'njeri' + 'mbretëror' = 'mbret'. Kjo punë ofron një justifikim teorik për praninë e kompozitivitetit shtesë në vektorët e fjalës mësuar duke përdorur model in Skip-Gram. Në veçanti, ajo tregon se kompozitiviteti shtesë mban në një kuptim edhe më të rreptë (distancë e vogël në vend të këndës së vogël) nën disa supozime mbi procesin që gjeneron trupin. Si korollar, shpjegon suksesin e kalkullit të vektorit në zgjidhjen e analogjive të fjalëve. Kur këto supozime nuk mbajnë, ky punë përshkruan operatorin korrekt të përbërjes jo-lineare. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.", 'am': 'In recent years word-embedding models have gained great popularity due to their remarkable performance on several tasks, including word analogy questions and caption generation.  እንደነዚህ ዓይነቶች “side-effect” ያልተስፋ ነው፡፡ vectors ብዙ ጊዜ የተሰናከሉትን አካባቢ ያሳያል፣ አዲስ ሁለት ቃላት-vectors የሚጨምር የዌር ክፍል ብቻ ነው፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ በተማሩት ቃላት vectors በSkip-Gram ሞዴል የተማሩ ሲሆን የtheoretical justification ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ (ከትንሽ ክፍል ይልቅ ታናሽ ክፍል) በተመሳሳይ ክፍል ቆርጦ ቆርጦ ይኖራል፡፡ አካባቢ፣ የዌctor ካልኩሎስ የድል መንግሥት መፍታትን በመፍታት ይናገራል፡፡ እነዚህም ስሕተት ባይኖሩ ጊዜ ይህ ሥራ እውነተኛውን ክፍተት አካባቢውን ይናገራል፡፡ በመጨረሻው ይህ ሥራ በGloberson እና ቲሽቢ መካከል በSkip-Gram model መካከል ግንኙነትን ያስተካክላል (SDR) እና በኩል ልዩ ልዩናዊነትን አካሄድ ያስተካክላል፤ የSDR ዓይነቶች ምርጫዎች በጽሑፍ-ግራም ምሳሌዎች ላይ መረጃ በመጨመር ይችላል፡፡ This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.', 'az': "Son il içində söz inşalları modelləri bir neçə işlər üzərində müəyyən bir performans olaraq böyük məşhurluq əldə etdilər, söz analogisi sualları və başlıq nəsilləri də dahil oldular. Bütün modellərin g özləməmiş 'təsirli' bir şey, vektörlərinin sık-sık kompoziciyyətini göstərməsi, məsələn, iki söz vektörlərini birləşdirmək üçün bir vektörə müvəffəq edir ki, sadəcə orijinal sözlərin semantik kompozitəsini göstərən küçük bir hektördən uzaq olan bir söz vektörünün, məsələn, 'man' + 'kral' = 'kral'. Bu iş, Skip-Gram modeli ilə öyrəndiyi vektorların əlavə edilməsi üçün teoriki təsdiqlənməyi təsdiqləyir. Özellikle, bu da artıqlıq kompozisyonluğu korpus yaratdığı procesin bəzi zənnələrində daha şiddətli bir anlamda saxlanır. Korolar kimi, bu vektor kalkuların başarısızlığını sözlərin analogilərini çəkməsində anlayır. Bu zənnələr tutmadığı zaman, bu işin do ğru olmayan kompozisyon operatörünü tanımar. Sonunda bu işin Globerson və Tishby'nin Yetersi Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) frameworku arasında bir bağlantı qurular: SDR modellərin parametroları Skip-Gram modellərindən ancaq simbol freqvanları barəsində məlumatları əlavə edərək alınabilir. Bu, Skip-Gram in şalları Globerson və Tishby hissəsində optimal olduğunu göstərir və, daha da, SDR modellərinə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün genellik istifadə edilən heuristik modellərin istifadə edilməsini göstərir.", 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রশ্ন ও শিরোনাম প্রজন্মের কারণে তাদের চমৎকার কাজের কারণে বেশ জনপ্রিয় হয়েছে। এই ধরনের মডেলের একটি অপ্রত্যাশিত 'পার্শ্ব-প্রভাব' হচ্ছে যে তাদের ভেক্টর প্রায়শই তাদের একত্রিতিকতা প্রদর্শন করে, যার ফলে দুই শব্দ-ভেক্টর যোগ করে একটি ভেক্টরের ফলে যোগ করে যায় যা কেবল মূল শব্দের সেম্পেন এই কাজ স্কিপ-গ্রাম মডেল ব্যবহার করে শিখিয়েছে শব্দ ভেক্টরের সাথে অতিরিক্ত সংযোগের উপস্থিতির জন্য একটি ততিত্তিত্বিক ব বিশেষ করে, এটি দেখাচ্ছে যে অতিরিক্ত সংস্থা এমনকি কঠোর বোঝায় (ছোট দূরত্বের পরিবর্তে) কিছু ধারণার অধীনে করপাস তৈরি করার প্রক্রিয়ার ব কোরোলারি হিসেবে এটা ভেক্টর ক্যালকুলাসের সফলতা ব্যাখ্যা করেছে শব্দ বিশ্লেষণের সমাধানে। যখন এই ধারণাগুলো ধরে না থাকে, তখন এই কাজ সঠিক নয়-লাইনিয়ার বৈশিষ্ট্য অপারেটর বর্ণনা করে। শেষ পর্যন্ত, এই কাজ স্কিপ-গ্রাম মডেল এবং গ্লোবার্সন এবং টিশ্বির যথেষ্ট ডিমেন্সিয়েশনিলিটি কমানোর (এসডিআর) ফ্রেমের মধ্যে একটি সংযোগ স্থাপন করেছে: স্কিপ- গ্রাম মডেলের প্যারামিটার এটি দেখাচ্ছে যে গ্লোবার্সন এবং টিশ্বির অনুভূতিতে স্কিপ-গ্রাম বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন স্কিপ-গ্রাম মডেলগুলো সাধারণত এসডিআর মডেলের মাধ্যমে যোগাযোগ করা হয়", 'bs': "Za poslednje godine modeli uključujući riječi dobili su veliku popularnost zbog njihovih izvanrednih učinka na nekoliko zadataka, uključujući pitanja analogije riječi i generaciju kapcija. Neočekivani 'side-effect' takvih modela je da njihovi vektori često pokazuju kompozicionalnost, tj. dodavanje dvije riječne vektore rezultira vektoru koji je samo mali ugao udaljen od vektora riječi koja predstavlja semantički kompozit originalnih riječi, na primjer, 'čovjek' + 'kraljevski' = 'kralj'. Ovaj rad pruža teoretičko opravdanje prisutnosti kompozicionalnosti additiva u riječima vektorima naučenim korištenjem modela Skip-Gram. Posebno pokazuje da kompozicionalnost additiva drži u još strogim smislu (mala udaljenost umjesto malog ugla) pod određenim pretpostavkama o procesu stvaranja korpusa. Kao korollar, objašnjava uspjeh vektorskog kalkula u rješavanju analogije riječi. Kada te pretpostavke ne održavaju, ovaj rad opisuje pravi ne-linearni operator kompozicije. Na kraju, ovaj rad uspostavlja vezu između model a Skip-Gram i dovoljno smanjenja dimenzionalnosti (SDR) okvira Globersona i Tishby: parametri modela SDR mogu biti dobiti iz modela Skip-Gram jednostavno dodajući informacije o frekvenciji simbola. To pokazuje da su integracije Skip-Gram optimalne u smislu Globersona i Tishby, a dalje, impliciraju da se heuristika koja se uobičajeno koristi za približno uklapanje modela Skip-Gram može koristiti za uklapanje modela SDR-a.", 'ca': "En els últims anys els models d'incorporació de paraules han guanyat gran popularitat a causa del seu notable desempeny en diverses tasques, incloent preguntes d'analògia de paraules i generació de títulos. Un 'efecte secundari' inesperat d'aquests models és que els seus vectors sovint mostran composicionalitat, és a dir, afegir dos vectors de paraules resulta en un vector que és només un petit angle lluny del vector d'una paraula que representa el composit semàntic de les paraules originals, per exemple, 'home' + 'royal' = 'king'. Aquesta obra proporciona una justificació teòrica per la presença de composicionalitat aditiva en vectors de paraules aprenguts fent servir el model Skip-Gram. En particular, mostra que la composicionalitat aditiva es manté en un sentit encara més estricte (distància petita en comptes d'un angle petit) sota certes suposicions sobre el procés que genera el corpus. Com a corollari, explica l'èxit del càlcul vector en resoldre analogies de paraules. Quan aquestes suposicions no tenen, aquesta feina descriu l'operador correcte de composició no linear. Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  Això mostra que les incorporacions Skip-Gram són optimals en el sentit de Globerson i Tishby i, més enllà, implica que les heurístiques comunament utilitzades per aproximadament ajustar models Skip-Gram poden ser utilitzades per ajustar models SDR.", 'cs': 'V posledních letech modely pro vložení slov získaly velkou popularitu díky jejich pozoruhodnému výkonu na několika úkolech, včetně otázek analogie slov a generování titulků. Neočekávaným "vedlejším efektem" takových modelů je, že jejich vektory často vykazují kompozicionalitu, tj. přidánídvou slovních vektorů vede k vektoru, který je jen malý úhel od vektoru slova reprezentujícího sémantický složení původních slov, např. "člověk" + "royal" = "král". Tato práce poskytuje teoretické zdůvodnění přítomnosti aditivní kompozicionality ve slovních vektorech naučených pomocí Skip-Gram modelu. Zejména ukazuje, že aditivní kompozicionalita drží v ještě přísnějším smyslu (malá vzdálenost spíše než malý úhel) za určitých předpokladů o procesu tvorby korpusu. V důsledku toho vysvětluje úspěch vektorového počtu při řešení slovních analogií. Pokud tyto předpoklady neplatí, tato práce popisuje správný nelineární kompoziční operátor. Nakonec tato práce navazuje na propojení mezi Skip-Gram modelem a rámcem dostatečné redukce dimenzality (SDR) Globersona a Tishby: parametry SDR modelů lze získat z parametrů Skip-Gram modelů jednoduchým přidáním informací o frekvencích symbolů. To ukazuje, že vložení Skip-Gram jsou optimální ve smyslu Globersona a Tishbyho a dále naznačuje, že heuristika běžně používaná k přibližnému odpovídání Skip-Gram modelů lze použít k přizpůsobení SDR modelů.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on sõnamudelid saanud suure populaarsuse tänu märkimisväärsele jõudlusele mitmetes ülesannetes, sealhulgas sõnamanaloogiaküsimustes ja pealdiste genereerimisel. Selliste mudelite ootamatuks kõrvalmõjudeks on see, et nende vektorid esindavad sageli koostisvõimet, st kahe sõnavektori lisamisel tekib vektor, mis on ainult väikese nurga kaugusel sõna vektorist, mis esindab algsete sõnade semantilist koostist, nt "man" + "royal" = "kuningas". Käesolev töö annab teoreetilise põhjenduse aditiivse koostisvõime esinemisele sõnavaktorites Skip-Gram mudeli abil. Eelkõige näitab see, et lisanduv koostisosa kehtib veelgi rangemas tähenduses (pigem väike kaugus kui väike nurk) teatavate eelduste alusel korpuse loomise protsessi kohta. Järgnevalt selgitab see vektori arvutuse edukust sõnaloogiate lahendamisel. Kui need eeldused ei vasta, kirjeldatakse käesolevas töös õiget mittelineaarset kompositsioonioperaatorit. Lõpuks loob töö seose Skip-Grami mudeli ja Globersoni ja Tishby piisava dimensioonilisuse vähendamise (SDR) raamistiku vahel: SDR mudelite parameetreid saab saada Skip-Grami mudelite parameetritest lihtsalt lisades infot sümbolite sageduste kohta. See näitab, et Skip-Grami manustamine on optimaalne Globersoni ja Tishby mõttes ning lisaks viitab see, et heuristikat, mida tavaliselt kasutatakse Skip-Grami mudelite ligikaudseks sobimiseks, saab kasutada SDR mudelite sobimiseks.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina sana-upotusmallit ovat saaneet suurta suosiota, koska ne ovat onnistuneet erinomaisesti useissa tehtävissä, kuten sanaanalogiakysymyksissä ja tekstityksen luomisessa. Tällaisten mallien odottamaton sivuvaikutus on se, että niiden vektorit ovat usein koostumuksellisia, eli kahden sanavektorin lisääminen johtaa vektoriin, joka on vain pienen kulman päässä alkuperäisen sanan semanttista yhdistelmää edustavan sanan vektorista, esim. "mies" + "royal" = "kuningas". Tässä työssä esitetään teoreettinen perustelu Skip-Gram-mallilla opituissa sanavektoreissa esiintyvälle additiiviselle koostumukselle. Erityisesti se osoittaa, että additiivinen koostumus on vieläkin tiukemmassa merkityksessä (pieni etäisyys eikä pieni kulma) tietyissä oletuksissa, jotka koskevat korpusta muodostuvaa prosessia. Tämän seurauksena se selittää vektorilaskennan menestyksen sanaanalogian ratkaisemisessa. Kun nämä oletukset eivät pidä paikkaansa, tässä työssä kuvataan oikea epälineaarinen koostumus operaattori. Lopuksi tässä työssä muodostetaan yhteys Skip-Gram-mallin ja Globersonin ja Tishbyn Riittävän Dimensionaliteetin Reduction (SDR) -viitekehyksen välille: SDR-mallien parametrit saadaan Skip-Gram-mallien parametreista yksinkertaisesti lisäämällä tietoa symbolitaajuuksista. Tämä osoittaa, että Skip-Gram-upotukset ovat optimaalisia Globersonin ja Tishbyn kannalta ja lisäksi tarkoittaa, että heuristiikkaa, jota yleisesti käytetään Skip-Gram-malleihin, voidaan käyttää SDR-malleihin.', 'hy': "Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում բառերի ներդրման մոդելները շատ հայտնի են դառնում, քանի որ դրանք արտահայտում են բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքներում, ներառյալ բառերի նմանատիպ հարցեր և գրական սերունդ: An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  Այս աշխատանքը տրամադրում է տեսական արդարացում ավելացիվ բաղադրամասիրության գոյության համար բառերի վեկտորներում, որոնք սովորել են օգտագործելով Բաց-Գրամ մոդելը: Այն հատկապես ցույց է տալիս, որ ավելացիվ բաղադրամասականությունը նույնիսկ ավելի խիստ իմաստում է (փոքր հեռավորություն, ոչ թե փոքր անկյուն) մարմնի ստեղծման գործընթացի որոշ ենթադրություններում: As a corollary, it explains the success of vector calculus in solving word analogies.  When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator.  Վերջապես, այս աշխատանքը ստեղծում է կապ Գլոբերսոնի և Թիսբի մոդելների բավարար չափսերի կրճատման (ՍԴՌ) շրջանակի միջև: ՍԴՌ մոդելների պարամետրերը կարելի է ստանալ Գլոբերսոնի և Թիսբի մոդելների մոդելներից պարզապես սիմվոլների հաճախականությունների մասին տեղեկատվություն ավելացնելով: This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.", 'jv': 'In recent year, the word-embedding model has been populared with the goal of their immersive task, listing words The unbeketed \'side-effect\' of so modells is that their vectors often represent komputerity, i.e. Adding2 word-vectors output in a vector that is only a small angle off from the vector of a word representing the semanti c kompute of the first words, e.g. \'man\'+ \'king\' This job offrs a theoretial justification for the presence of additional kompationsality in word vectors Learned by the Skip-Gram model. ngomong, wong-wong ki, politenessoni tambah saiki akeh dumateng kapan titig lan tambah bantuan (sithik dislukan liyane apik) ning ngerasahan piye aturan sing beraksi iki o perusahaan oleh dumateng. Wulkorolar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Eremul Iki ngomong nik akeh basa Skip-Gram sing paling apik dhéwé ning sarêt Global Person lan Tish by lan, supoyo, dadi nambah akeh heuristik dhéwé iso nguasai model Skip-Gram sing bisa ngejarakake model SER dumadhi.', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko, misãlai masu cikin maganar-da-faɗi sun ci mafiya yawan umakinci, saboda haka da aikin su mai kyãwo a kan wasu aikin, kamar masu tambayar kalmõmin da kuma kizafi na sarrafa. An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  Wannan aikin yana da wani justification na keɓata wa presence da composition mai ƙaranci cikin shiryoyi na magana wanda aka sanar da shi da amfani da motel na skiip-Gram. Kayyan da shi, yana nũna cewa, samurancin da ke iya cikin wani abu mai tsanani (tsakiya ƙarami ko kalmar ƙarami) a cikin zato masu zafi a kan jarrabar zartar da jini. Ina bayyana babban rabo na kalkulus a cikin masu fassarar kallojiya. Idan waɗannan zato ba su tsare shi ba, wannan aikin yana bayyana shirin afareta mai gaske na-lissafi. Haƙĩƙa, wannan aikin yana samar da wata haɗi tsakanin Shirin-Gram da shirin Reduciya da Aka Shirin Di'awa (SDR) na Gcolorson da Tishby: za'a iya samar da parameters na SDR daga wasu misãlai na skiip-Gram, don a ƙara bayani kawai, da kuma ka ƙara information on misforranin ayuka. Wannan yana nũna cewa da aka samar da skiip-Gram masu kyauta cikin ma'anar Gcolorson da Tishby, kuma, yana da amfani da cewa, heuristics da aka yi amfani da daidai misalin skiip-Gram za'a yi amfani da su daidai da misãlai SDR.", 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih so modeli vključevanja besed pridobili veliko priljubljenost zaradi izjemne uspešnosti pri več opravilih, vključno z vprašanji besedne analogije in ustvarjanjem napisov. Nepričakovan stranski učinek takih modelov je, da njihovi vektorji pogosto kažejo sestavljivost, tj. dodajanje dveh besednih vektorjev povzroči vektor, ki je le majhen kot oddaljen od vektorja besede, ki predstavlja semantično sestavo izvirnih besed, npr. "man" + "royal" = "kralj". To delo predstavlja teoretično utemeljitev prisotnosti aditivne kompozicionalnosti v besednih vektorjih, ki se učijo z uporabo modela Skip-Gram. Zlasti kaže, da je aditivna kompozicija še strožja (majhna razdalja in ne majhen kot) pod določenimi predpostavkami o procesu ustvarjanja korpusa. Kot posledica pojasnjuje uspeh vektorskega računa pri reševanju besednih analogij. Če te predpostavke ne veljajo, to delo opisuje pravilni nelinearni operater kompozicije. Nazadnje je v tem delu vzpostavljena povezava med modelom Skip-Gram in okvirom za dovolj dimenzionalno redukcijo (SDR) Globerson in Tishby: parametre modelov SDR je mogoče dobiti iz modelov Skip-Gram preprosto z dodajanjem informacij o simbolnih frekvencah. To kaže, da so vdelave Skip-Gram optimalne v smislu Globersona in Tishbyja in nadalje pomeni, da se heuristika, ki se običajno uporablja za približno prileganje modelov Skip-Grama, lahko uporablja za prilagajanje modelov SDR.', 'bo': "དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལོ་ངོ་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་བརྗོད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'. This work provides a theoretical justification for the presence of additive compositionality in word vectors learned using the Skip-Gram model. In particular, it shows that additive compositionality holds in an even stricter sense (small distance rather than small angle) under certain assumptions on the process generating the corpus. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཏེ། དེ་གིས་ཐོག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གལ་སྲིད་འདི་དག་ཚང་མ་ཡོད་དུས་ན་ལས་ཀ་འདིས་འགོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད་པ་དང་འགོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies. This shows that Skip-Gram embeddings are optimal in the sense of Globerson and Tishby and, further, implies that the heuristics commonly used to approximately fit Skip-Gram models can be used to fit SDR models.", 'he': "בשנים האחרונות, דוגמנים של מילים קיבלו פופולריות גדולה בגלל ההופעה המדהימה שלהם על מספר משימות, כולל שאלות אנלוגיות מילים ודור כתיבה. An unexpected 'side-effect' of such models is that their vectors often exhibit compositionality, i.e., addingtwo word-vectors results in a vector that is only a small angle away from the vector of a word representing the semantic composite of the original words, e.g., 'man' + 'royal' = 'king'.  העבודה הזו מספקת סידוק תיאורטי לנוכחות של התרכבות תוספת בוקטורים מילים ללמודים באמצעות מודל Skip-Gram. במיוחד, הוא מראה כי המרכיבות המשוספת מחזיקה במובן אפילו יותר קשה (מרחק קטן במקום זווית קטנה) תחת הניחושות מסוימות על התהליך לייצר את הקורפוס. בתור קורולרי, זה מסביר את הצלחתו של חישוב ווקטור בפתרון אנלוגיות מילים. When these assumptions do not hold, this work describes the correct non-linear composition operator.  Finally, this work establishes a connection between the Skip-Gram model and the Sufficient Dimensionality Reduction (SDR) framework of Globerson and Tishby: the parameters of SDR models can be obtained from those of Skip-Gram models simply by adding information on symbol frequencies.  זה מראה שהקישורים של סקיפ-גרם הם אופטימיים במובן של גלוברסון וטיסבי, ויותר מזה, מרמזים שהאוריסטיקה שנמשכת בדרך כלל למודלים של סקיפ-גרם ניתן להשתמש כדי להתאים לדוגמאות SDR."}
{'en': 'The State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'ar': 'حالة الفن في التمثيل الدلالي', 'pt': 'O estado da arte na representação semântica', 'es': 'El estado del arte en la representación semántica', 'fr': "L'état de l'art en matière de représentation sémantique", 'ja': 'セマンティック表現における最先端技術', 'zh': '语义示艺见', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व में कला की स्थिति', 'ru': 'Современное семантическое представление', 'ga': 'An Staid Nua sa Léiriú Séimeantach', 'ka': 'სურათის ქვეყნება სემანტიკური გამოსახულებაში', 'hu': 'A művészet állása a szemantikus képviseletben', 'el': 'Η κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στη Σημαντική Αντιπροσωπεία', 'it': "Lo stato dell'arte nella rappresentazione semantica", 'mk': 'Државата на уметноста во семантична претстава', 'lt': 'Mokslo pažanga Semantinėje atstovybėje', 'kk': "Semantic Representation's Art State", 'ms': 'State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധിയിലെ കലാകാരത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ', 'mt': 'L-Istat tal-Art fir-Rappreżentanza Semantika', 'mn': 'Semantic Representation-ын урлагийн улс', 'no': 'Tilstand til kunsten i semiantisk representasjon', 'pl': 'Stan sztuki w reprezentacji semantycznej', 'ro': 'Situația actuală în reprezentarea semantică', 'sr': 'Država umjetnosti u semantičkom predstavljanju', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයේ කිරීමේ රාජ්\u200dය', 'so': 'Wadamada farshaxanka ee u soo jeeda Semantic', 'sv': 'Utvecklingen av den semantiska representationen', 'ta': 'செமான்டிக் பிரதிநிதியில் கலையின் நிலை', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی نمایش میں هنر کی امریت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'The State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'bg': 'Състоянието на изкуството в семантичното представяне', 'nl': 'De stand van de techniek in de semantische vertegenwoordiging', 'hr': 'Država umjetnosti u semantičkom predstavljanju', 'da': 'Den nuværende udvikling i den semantiske repræsentation', 'de': 'Der Stand der Technik in der semantischen Repräsentation', 'id': 'State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'ko': '어의 표징의 연구 현황', 'fa': 'State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'af': 'Die Staat van die Kuns in Semantiese voorstelling', 'sq': 'Shteti i artit në përfaqësimin Semantik', 'tr': 'Semantik represiýasy Durumy', 'am': 'የዐርድ አርእስት ግዛት', 'hy': 'Արվեստի վիճակը սեմանտիկ ներկայացումում', 'az': 'Semantik Representasyonda Sanat Eyaleti', 'bn': 'The State of the Art in Semantic Representation', 'bs': 'Država umjetnosti u semantičkom predstavljanju', 'ca': "L'estat de l'art en la representació Semàtica", 'sw': 'Serikali ya sanaa katika Representation of Semantic Art', 'cs': 'Stav umění v sémantickém zastoupení', 'et': 'Kunsti seisund semantilises esindamises', 'fi': 'Semanttisen edustuksen nykytila', 'jv': 'Genjer-Genjer Artis nang repréntasi semanti', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Stanje umetnosti v semantičnem predstavništvu', 'he': 'מצב האומנות במייצג סמנטי', 'bo': 'Semantic Representation(State of the Art in Semantic Representation)ནང་གི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གནས་སྟངས་'}
{'en': 'Semantic representation is receiving growing attention in NLP in the past few years, and many proposals for semantic schemes (e.g., AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) have been put forth. Yet, little has been done to assess the achievements and the shortcomings of these new contenders, compare them with syntactic schemes, and clarify the general goals of research on semantic representation. We address these gaps by critically surveying the state of the art in the field.', 'ar': 'يحظى التمثيل الدلالي باهتمام متزايد في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في السنوات القليلة الماضية ، وقد تم طرح العديد من المقترحات للمخططات الدلالية (على سبيل المثال ، AMR ، UCCA ، GMB ، UDS). ومع ذلك ، لم يتم عمل الكثير لتقييم إنجازات وأوجه قصور هؤلاء المتنافسين الجدد ، ومقارنتها بالمخططات النحوية ، وتوضيح الأهداف العامة للبحث في التمثيل الدلالي. نعالج هذه الثغرات من خلال إجراء مسح نقدي لأحدث التطورات في هذا المجال.', 'es': 'La representación semántica está recibiendo cada vez más atención en la PNL en los últimos años, y se han presentado muchas propuestas de esquemas semánticos (por ejemplo, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Sin embargo, poco se ha hecho para evaluar los logros y las deficiencias de estos nuevos contendientes, compararlos con los esquemas sintácticos y aclarar los objetivos generales de la investigación sobre la representación semántica. Abordamos estas brechas analizando críticamente el estado del arte en el campo.', 'pt': 'A representação semântica está recebendo atenção crescente na PNL nos últimos anos, e muitas propostas para esquemas semânticos (por exemplo, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) foram apresentadas. No entanto, pouco foi feito para avaliar as conquistas e as deficiências desses novos candidatos, compará-los com esquemas sintáticos e esclarecer os objetivos gerais da pesquisa sobre representação semântica. Abordamos essas lacunas examinando criticamente o estado da arte no campo.', 'fr': "La représentation sémantique fait l'objet d'une attention croissante dans la PNL ces dernières années, et de nombreuses propositions de schémas sémantiques (par exemple, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) ont été avancées. Pourtant, peu de choses ont été faites pour évaluer les réalisations et les lacunes de ces nouveaux concurrents, les comparer aux schémas syntaxiques et clarifier les objectifs généraux de la recherche sur la représentation sémantique. Nous comblons ces lacunes en examinant de manière critique l'état de l'art dans ce domaine.", 'ja': 'セマンティック表現は、ここ数年でNLPでますます注目されており、セマンティックスキームのための多くの提案（例えば、AMR、UCCA、GMB、UDS ）が提示されている。しかしながら、これらの新しい競争者の成果と欠点を評価し、それらを構文スキームと比較し、意味論的表現に関する研究の一般的な目標を明確にするためにはほとんど何も行われていない。私たちは、この分野の最先端技術を批判的に調査することによって、これらのギャップに対処します。', 'zh': '于往数年之中,语义示NLP益多,且已多建语义方(如AMR,UCCAGMB,UDS)之议。 然估竞争者成败,比之句法方,澄语义示总体目标,殆无所为。 吾因批判性求最新术以补其差。', 'ru': 'В последние несколько лет семантическое представление привлекает все большее внимание в NLP, и было выдвинуто много предложений по семантическим схемам (например, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Тем не менее, мало что было сделано для оценки достижений и недостатков этих новых претендентов, сравнения их с синтаксическими схемами и уточнения общих целей исследований по семантическому представлению. Мы устраняем эти пробелы, критически изучая современное состояние дел в данной области.', 'hi': 'पिछले कुछ वर्षों में एनएलपी में शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व पर बढ़ते ध्यान प्राप्त हो रहे हैं, और शब्दार्थ योजनाओं (जैसे, एएमआर, यूसीसीए, जीएमबी, यूडीएस) के लिए कई प्रस्ताव रखे गए हैं। फिर भी, इन नए दावेदारों की उपलब्धियों और कमियों का आकलन करने के लिए बहुत कम किया गया है, उनकी तुलना वाक्यात्मक योजनाओं के साथ करें, और शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व पर अनुसंधान के सामान्य लक्ष्यों को स्पष्ट करें। हम गंभीर रूप से क्षेत्र में कला की स्थिति का सर्वेक्षण करके इन अंतरालों को संबोधित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá aird mhéadaitheach á tabhairt ar ionadaíocht shéimeantach sa NLP le blianta beaga anuas, agus tá go leor moltaí le haghaidh scéimeanna shéimeantacha (m.sh., AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) curtha amach. Mar sin féin, is beag atá déanta chun gnóthachtálacha agus easnaimh na n-iomaitheoirí nua seo a mheas, iad a chur i gcomparáid le scéimeanna comhréire, agus soiléiriú a dhéanamh ar spriocanna ginearálta an taighde ar ionadaíocht shéimeantach. Tugaimid aghaidh ar na bearnaí sin trí shuirbhé chriticiúil a dhéanamh ar an úrscothacht sa réimse.', 'ka': 'Semantic representation is receiving increasing attention in NLP in the past few years, and many proposals for semantic schemes (e.g. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) have been made. მაგრამ, ცოტა გავაკეთებული ამ ახალ კონტაქტიკური სქემებით და განსაზღვრების საერთო მიზეზები სემენტიკური გამოყენებაზე. ჩვენ კრიტიკურად შევხედავთ ამ განსხვავებების სახელის სტატურის სტატურაზე.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια η σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση λαμβάνει αυξανόμενη προσοχή στο NLP και έχουν διατυπωθεί πολλές προτάσεις για σημασιολογικά σχήματα (π.χ. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Ωστόσο, ελάχιστα έχουν γίνει για να αξιολογηθούν τα επιτεύγματα και οι ελλείψεις αυτών των νέων ανταγωνιστών, να συγκριθούν με συντακτικά σχήματα και να αποσαφηνιστούν οι γενικοί στόχοι της έρευνας για τη σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα κενά ερευνώντας κριτικά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στον τομέα.', 'hu': 'A szemantikus reprezentáció az elmúlt években egyre nagyobb figyelmet kapott az NLP-ben, és számos szemantikai rendszerre vonatkozó javaslat (pl. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) került előterjesztésre. Mégis keveset tettünk az új versenyzők eredményeinek és hiányosságainak felmérésére, a szintaktikus sémákkal való összehasonlítására és a szemantikai reprezentáció kutatásának általános céljainak tisztázására. Ezeket a hiányosságokat a terület korszerű állásának kritikus felmérésével orvosoljuk.', 'it': "La rappresentazione semantica sta ricevendo crescente attenzione nel PNL negli ultimi anni, e molte proposte di schemi semantici (ad esempio, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) sono state presentate. Tuttavia, poco è stato fatto per valutare i risultati e le carenze di questi nuovi concorrenti, confrontarli con schemi sintattici e chiarire gli obiettivi generali della ricerca sulla rappresentazione semantica. Affrontiamo queste lacune analizzando criticamente lo stato dell'arte nel campo.", 'kk': 'Сіздің бірнеше жылдары NLP-де Semantic representation is growing attention in the past few years, and many proposals for semantic schemes (e.g. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) have been made. Бірақ, осы жаңа қатынасшылардың жетістіктерін және жетістіктерді оқу үшін, оларды синтактикалық сұлбалармен салыстырып, семантикалық қатынасшыларды зерттеу жалпы мақсаттарын анықтау үшін кішкентай жасалған Біз бұл заттарды өрістегінің орындағы суреттердің күйін тәжірибелеп тұрамыз.', 'ms': 'Perwakilan semantik menerima perhatian semakin meningkat dalam NLP dalam beberapa tahun terakhir, dan banyak cadangan untuk skema semantik (contohnya AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) telah diletakkan. Namun, sedikit yang telah dilakukan untuk menilai kemajuan dan kekurangan pembalap baru ini, membandingkannya dengan skema sintaktik, dan menjelaskan tujuan umum penelitian mengenai perwakilan semantik. Kami mengatasi kekacauan ini dengan mengkaji secara kritikal keadaan seni di lapangan.', 'mk': 'Семантичкото претставување добива сé поголемо внимание во НЛП во изминатите неколку години, и се поднесени многу предлози за семантичките шеми (на пример АМР, УККА, ГМБ, УДС). Сепак, малку е направено за да се проценат постигнувањата и недостатоците на овие нови кандидати, да се споредат со синтактичките шеми и да се објаснат генералните цели на истражувањето за семантичното претставување. Ние ги решаваме овие празнини критично испитувајќи ја техничката состојба на теренот.', 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius kelerius metus NLP vis daugiau dėmesio skiriama Semantiniam atstovavimui ir pateikta daug pasiūlymų dėl semantinių schemų (pvz., AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Yet, little has been done to assess the achievements and the shortcomings of these new contenders, compare them with syntactic schemes, and clarify the general goals of research on semantic representation.  Mes sprendžiame šiuos trūkumus kritiškai ištirdami šios srities pažangą.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d NLP-ല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വളരെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുകയാണ്. സെമാന്റിക് പദ്ധതികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പല പ്രോദ്യ എന്നിട്ടും ഈ പുതിയ വിവാദികളുടെ വിജയങ്ങളെയും കുറച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ചെയ്തിട്ടുണ്ട്, അവരെ സിനിട്ടിക്ക് പദ്ധതിയോട് താരതമ്യം ചെയ്ത കാട്ടിലെ കലാകാര്യത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ വേര്\u200dപാടുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കും.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэдэн жилийн дотор NLP-д анхаарлын төвлөрөмж нэмэгддэг бөгөөд semantic schemes (жишээ нь AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) олон санал гаргасан. Гэхдээ эдгээр шинэ өрсөлдөгчдийн амжилтыг, бусадлыг тодорхойлдохын тулд бага зэрэг хийгдсэн, синтактик төлөвлөгөөтэй харьцуулж, semantic representation дээрх судалгааны ерөнхий зорилго тодорхойлдог. Бид эдгээр заагуудыг салбарт урлагийн байдлыг шинжлэх ухааныг судалж байна.', 'no': 'Semantisk representasjon mottar økt oppmerksomhet i NLP i de siste få år, og mange forslag for semantiske skjemar (f.eks. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) er utført. Det er likevel litt gjort for å vurdere oppgåvene og feilmengda av desse nye medlemsstatene, samanlikne dei med syntaktiske skjemar, og klargjere det generelle målene for forskning om semantisk representasjon. Vi adresserer desse avstandane ved å kritisk undersøke statusen på kunsten i feltet.', 'mt': "Ir-rappreżentanza semantika qed tirċievi attenzjoni dejjem akbar fil-NLP f’dawn l-aħħar snin, u tressqu ħafna proposti g ħal skemi semantiċi (pereżempju AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Madankollu, ftit sar biex jiġu vvalutati l-kisbiet u n-nuqqasijiet ta’ dawn il-kandidati ġodda, jitqabblu ma’ skemi sintetiċi, u jiġu ċċarati l-għanijiet ġenerali tar-riċerka dwar ir-rappreżentanza semantika. Aħna nindirizzaw dawn in-nuqqasijiet billi nistħarrġu b'mod kritiku l-aktar avvanzati fil-qasam.", 'pl': 'Reprezentacja semantyczna cieszy się coraz większą uwagą w NLP w ostatnich latach, a wiele propozycji schematów semantycznych (np. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Niewiele jednak zrobiono, aby ocenić osiągnięcia i niedociągnięcia tych nowych konkurentów, porównać je ze schematami składni i wyjaśnić ogólne cele badań nad reprezentacją semantyczną. Rozwiązujemy te luki poprzez krytyczną analizę stanu techniki w tej dziedzinie.', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea semantică primește o atenție tot mai mare în PNL în ultimii ani, și multe propuneri de scheme semantice (de exemplu, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) au fost prezentate. Cu toate acestea, s-a făcut puțin pentru a evalua realizările și deficiențele acestor noi concurenți, a le compara cu schemele sintactice și a clarifica obiectivele generale ale cercetării privind reprezentarea semantică. Abordăm aceste lacune prin analizarea critică a stadiului tehnologiei în domeniu.', 'so': 'AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) waxaa la soo saaray suurtagal badan oo loo soo jeedo qorshaha semantic (e.g. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa la sameeyay wax yar in la qiimeeyo guulaysta iyo gaalimka muranka cusub, isbarbardhig qorshaha isbitaalka, si loo caddeeyo goal caadiga ah oo waxbarashada ku saabsan wakiilka semantika. Waxaannu si muhiim ah ugu baahan nahay xaalada farshaxanka ee duurka.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය තමයි අවුරුදු කීපයක් ඇතුලේ NLP වලට අවධානය ලැබෙනවා, සහ සෙමැන්ටික් සැලසුම් සැලසුම් සඳහා ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතින නමුත්, පොඩ්ඩක් වැඩ කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවන් සහ අවස්ථාවන්ගේ අවස්ථාවන් සහ අවස්ථාවන්ගේ අවස්ථාවන්ගේ අවස්ථාවන් සහ සම් අපි මේ අවස්ථාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාසයෙන් ඉන්න විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'sr': 'Semantička predstavljanja prima veću pažnju u NLP u proteklih nekoliko godina, a isplanirano je mnogi prijedlogi za semantičke shme (npr. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Ipak, malo je urađeno da proceni postignuće i nedostatke tih novih tvrdoglava, usporedi ih sa sintaktičkim šemom, i pojasniš generalne ciljeve istraživanja o semantičkom predstavljanju. Rešimo te praznine kritično istražujući stanje umjetnosti na terenu.', 'sv': 'Semantisk representation har fått allt större uppmärksamhet inom NLP under de senaste åren, och många förslag till semantiska system (t.ex. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) har lagts fram. Ändå har lite gjorts för att bedöma resultaten och bristerna hos dessa nya deltagare, jämföra dem med syntaktiska system och klargöra de allmänna målen för forskningen om semantisk representation. Vi tar itu med dessa luckor genom att kritiskt kartlägga det senaste inom området.', 'ta': 'கடந்த சில ஆண்டுகளில் NLP-ல் செமான்டிக் பிரதிநிர்வாக கவனத்தை பெறுகிறது, மற்றும் பெமான்டிக் திட்டத்திற்கான பல பரிந்துரைகள் (உதாரணமாக AMR, UCCA,  ஆனாலும், இந்த புதிய விருப்பங்களின் வெற்றியையும் குறைவையும் பார்க்க சிறிய செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, அவர்களை ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் திட்டங்கள நாம் இந்த இடைவெளிகளை புலத்தில் கலையின் நிலையைச் சரிபார்த்து இந்த இடைவெளியில் பேசுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی نمایش NLP میں اگلوں کے چند سالوں میں اضافہ ہوتی ہے، اور بہت سی نمایش (جیسے AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) کے لئے بہت سی پیشنهاد (جیسے AMR, UCCA، GMB، UDS) پیشنهاد کیا جاتا ہے۔ لیکن بہت کم کامیابی اور نئی مخالفت کرنے والوں کی کوتاہی کے لئے کیا گیا ہے، ان کو سینکٹیک طریقوں سے مقایسہ کریں، اور سیمانٹی طریقوں کے معاملہ میں تحقیق کی عمومی هدف کو واضح کریں۔ ہم ان گھوٹوں کو کھیتی میں هنر کی حالت کی تحقیق کرنے کے ذریعہ مشورہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Oxirgi necha yil davomida Semantik taqdimoti NLP dasturidan foydalanishi mumkin, va semantik qoliplari (m.g. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) uchun ko'p talab qilinadi. Lekin, bu yangi rivojlanuvchilarning muvaffaqiyatlarini qidirish uchun juda kichik qilingan, ularni syntactik qoliplariga kamaytirish va semantik representing umumiy maqolalarini aniqlash. We address these gaps by critically surveying the state of the art in the field.", 'vi': 'Trong vài năm qua, đại diện hoá chất chất bắt đầu nhận được sự chú ý của chọc dò truyền thống, và rất nhiều đề xuất về các phương pháp theo ngữ pháp (ví dụ như: AMR, UCCA, GHB, UDS). Tuy nhiên, chưa được làm gì để đánh giá thành tựu và thiếu sót của những ứng viên mới, so sánh họ với các phương pháp cấu hình cộng, và làm rõ các mục tiêu chung của nghiên cứu về phân biệt ngữ pháp. Chúng ta giải quyết những khoảng trống này bằng cách quan sát tình hình hiện đại trên thực địa.', 'bg': 'Семантичното представяне получава все по-голямо внимание в НЛП през последните няколко години и много предложения за семантични схеми (например АМР, UCCA, GMB, UDS) са направени. Въпреки това, малко е направено, за да се оценят постиженията и недостатъците на тези нови претенденти, да се сравнят със синтактичните схеми и да се изяснят общите цели на изследванията за семантичното представяне. Ние преодоляваме тези пропуски чрез критично проучване на състоянието на техниката в областта.', 'hr': 'Semantička predstavljanja prima rastuću pažnju u NLP u proteklih nekoliko godina, a isplanirano je mnoge prijedloge za semantičke shme (npr. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Ipak, malo je učinilo za procjenu postignuća i nedostatka tih novih tvrditelja, uspoređivanje ih sa sintaktičkim shēmama, te objašnjavanje općih ciljeva istraživanja o semantičkoj predstavi. Riješavamo te praznine kritično istražujući stanje umjetnosti na terenu.', 'nl': "Semantische representatie krijgt de afgelopen jaren steeds meer aandacht in NLP en er zijn veel voorstellen gedaan voor semantische schema's (bijv. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Er is echter weinig gedaan om de prestaties en tekortkomingen van deze nieuwe kandidaten te beoordelen, ze te vergelijken met syntactische schema's en de algemene doelstellingen van onderzoek naar semantische representatie te verduidelijken. We verhelpen deze lacunes door kritisch onderzoek te doen naar de stand van de techniek in het veld.", 'da': 'Semantisk repræsentation har fået voksende opmærksomhed i NLP i de seneste par år, og mange forslag til semantiske ordninger (f.eks. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) er blevet fremsat. Alligevel er der ikke gjort meget for at vurdere resultaterne og manglerne ved disse nye konkurrenter, sammenligne dem med syntaktiske ordninger og præcisere de generelle mål for forskningen om semantisk repræsentation. Vi afhjælper disse huller ved kritisk at undersøge den nyeste teknologi på området.', 'ko': '지난 몇 년 동안 의미는 NLP에서 점점 더 많은 관심을 받고 많은 의미 방안(예를 들어 AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS)이 제기되었다.그러나 이런 새로운 경쟁자들의 성과와 단점을 평가하고 문법 모델과 비교하며 의미 표징 연구의 총체적 목표를 밝히는 데 있어 아무것도 한 적이 없다.우리는 이 분야의 최신 기술을 비판적으로 조사함으로써 이러한 격차를 해결한다.', 'fa': 'در چند سال گذشته، نمایش سیمانتیک توجه افزایش در NLP دارد و بسیاری از پیشنهاد برای برنامه\u200cهای سیمانتیک (مثال AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) پیشنهاد داده شده است. با این حال، کمی برای ارزیابی موفقیت\u200cها و shortcomings این مجادله\u200cکننده\u200cهای جدید انجام شده است، آنها را با نقشه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک مقایسه کنید، و هدف\u200cهای عمومی تحقیقات در مورد نمایش semantic را روشن کنید. ما این فاصله\u200cها را با تحقیق وضعیت هنر در زمینه با انتظار تحقیق می\u200cکنیم.', 'de': 'Die semantische Repräsentation wird in den letzten Jahren im NLP zunehmend beachtet, und viele Vorschläge für semantische Schemata (z.B. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) wurden vorgelegt. Dennoch wurde wenig getan, um die Errungenschaften und Mängel dieser neuen Konkurrenten zu bewerten, sie mit syntaktischen Schemata zu vergleichen und die allgemeinen Ziele der Forschung zur semantischen Repräsentation zu klären. Wir schließen diese Lücken, indem wir den Stand der Technik kritisch hinterfragen.', 'id': 'Perwakilan semantis menerima perhatian semakin tumbuh di NLP dalam beberapa tahun terakhir, dan banyak proposisi untuk skema semantis (misalnya AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) telah dibuat. Namun, sedikit yang telah dilakukan untuk mempertimbangkan pencapaian dan kekurangan dari kontesten baru ini, membandingkan mereka dengan skema sintaksi, dan menjelaskan tujuan umum penelitian tentang representation semantis. Kami mengatasi celah-celah ini dengan meninjau kritis keadaan seni di lapangan.', 'tr': "Semantik meýdançalar g e çen birnäçe ýylda NLP'da üns gelýän we semantik şemalar üçin köp teklip berildi. Yine de, bu täze tartışçylaryň ýetip bolanlaryny we iň puşluklaryny değerlendirmek üçin biraz edildi, olary syntaktik taslamlar bilen karşılaştırılýar we semantik temsilleşmeler hakynda araştırma maksadlarını aydınlatmak üçin küçük bir şekilde edildi. Biz bu gaplary alanda sungatyň durumyny barlap çykaryp barýarys.", 'af': 'Semantiese voorstelling ontvang groei aandag in NLP in die verlede paar jaar, en baie voorstellings vir semantiese skeme (bv. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) is uitgevoer. Maar, klein is gedoen om die berekeninge en die kortpaaklikhede van hierdie nuwe verspreidings te vergelyk, hulle vergelyk met sintaktieke skeme, en die algemene doels van verwerking op semantiese verspreiding te duidelik. Ons adres hierdie gapte deur kritiese ondersoek van die staat van die kuns in die veld.', 'sq': "Përfaqësuesja semantike po merr vëmendje në rritje në NLP në vitet e fundit dhe janë paraqitur shumë propozime për skemat semantike (për shembull AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Megjithatë, pak është bërë për të vlerësuar arritjet dhe mungesat e këtyre konkurruesve të rinj, për t'i krahasuar ato me skemat sintaktike dhe për të sqaruar qëllimet e përgjithshme të kërkimit mbi përfaqësimin semantik. Ne i trajtojmë këto mungesa duke shqyrtuar kritikisht gjendjen e teknologjisë në fushë.", 'hy': 'Semantic representation is receiving growing attention in NLP in the past few years, and many proposals for semantic schemes (e.g., AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) have been put forth.  Այնուամենայնիվ, քիչ է արվել այս նոր մրցակցությունների հաջողությունները և թերությունները գնահատելու համար, համեմատելու դրանք սինտակտիկ ծրագրերի հետ և պարզաբանելու համար սեմանտիկ ներկայացման ուսումնասիրության ընդհանուր նպատակները: Մենք լուծում ենք այս բացառությունները, քննադատաբար ուսումնասիրելով այս ոլորտի տեխնոլոգիայի կարգավիճակը:', 'az': "Son neçə il içində NLP'da çox g özəl göstəricisi artırmaq istəyir və semantik schemlar üçün çox tədbirlər (məsələn, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) təyin edilmişdir. Ancaq bu yeni mübahisə edənlərin başarılarına və küfrlərinə baxmayaraq, onları sintaktik taslaqlarla qarşılaşdırmaq və semantik göstəricisi barəsindəki araştırma nəticələrini açıqlamaq üçün çox az işlədilər. Biz bu boşluqları sahədə sanatın vəziyyətini mütləq gözləyirik.", 'am': 'ባለፉት ጥቂት ዓመታት በNLP ጥያቄ እየጨመረ ጥያቄ እየተቀበል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የአዲስ ተቃዋሚዎች ግንኙነትንና የአንድነት ግንኙነትን ለማስተዋል ጥቂት ተደርጎአል፣ በተስናታፊ ፕሮግራም እና የሴሜንቲክ መልዕክት የመጠንቀቂያውን ትምህርት አቃውሞ ለመግለጥ፡፡ በሜዳ ውስጥ የዐርብ ሥርዓት በመጠየቅ እናስቸግረዋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Semantička predstavljanja prima rastuću pažnju u NLP u proteklih nekoliko godina, a isplanirano je mnoge prijedloge za semantičke shme (npr. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Ipak, malo je učinilo za procjenu postignuća i nedostatka ovih novih tvrdoglava, uspoređivanje ih sa sintaktičkim šemima, te objašnjavanje općih ciljeva istraživanja o semantičkoj predstavi. Riješavamo te praznine kritično istražujući stanje umjetnosti na terenu.', 'ca': "La representació semàntica està rebint cada cop més atenció en NLP en els últims anys, i moltes proposacions per esquemes semàntics (per exemple AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) han estat proposades. No obstant això, no s'ha fet gaire per avaluar els èxits i les deficiències d'aquests nou candidats, comparar-los amb esquemes sinàctics i aclarar els objectius generals de la recerca sobre la representació semàntica. Ignorem aquestes diferències estudiant críticament l'estat de l'art en aquest camp.", 'cs': 'Sémantická reprezentace získává v NLP v posledních letech rostoucí pozornost a bylo předloženo mnoho návrhů na sémantická schémata (např. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Přesto bylo učiněno málo pro posouzení úspěchů a nedostatků těchto nových uchazečů, jejich srovnání se syntaktickými schématy a objasnění obecných cílů výzkumu sémantické reprezentace. Tyto mezery řešíme kritickým zkoumáním stavu techniky v oboru.', 'sw': 'Uwakilishaji wa kimapenzi unapokea kuongezeka kwa NLP katika miaka michache iliyopita, na mapendekezo mengi ya mipango ya kimapenzi (kwa mfano, AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) yametolewa. Hata hivyo, vimefanywa kidogo ili kutathmini mafanikio na ukosefu wa wapinzani hawa wapya, kuwalinganisha na mipango ya pamoja, na kuelezea malengo ya utafiti mkuu kuhusu uwakilishi wa kimapenzi. We address these gaps by critically surveying the state of the art in the field.', 'et': 'Semantiline esindamine on NLP-s viimastel aastatel järjest rohkem tähelepanu pälvinud ning esitatud on palju ettepanekuid semantiliste skeemide kohta (nt AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Kuid vähe on tehtud nende uute kandidaatide saavutuste ja puuduste hindamiseks, nende võrdlemiseks süntaktiliste skeemidega ning semantilise esindamise uuringute üldeesmärkide selgitamiseks. Nende lünkade kõrvaldamiseks uurime kriitiliselt valdkonna tehnika taset.', 'fi': 'Semanttinen edustus on saanut viime vuosina yhä enemmän huomiota NLP:ssä, ja monia ehdotuksia semanttisista järjestelmistä (esim. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) on esitetty. Näiden uusien kilpailijoiden saavutusten ja puutteiden arvioimiseksi, niiden vertailuksi syntaktisiin järjestelmiin ja semanttisen edustuksen tutkimuksen yleistavoitteiden selventämiseksi on kuitenkin tehty vähän. Korjaamme näitä aukkoja kartoittamalla kriittisesti alan nykytilaa.', 'bn': 'গত কয়েক বছরে এনএলপিতে সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব বৃদ্ধি পাচ্ছে এবং সেম্যান্টিক ক্রিমের জন্য অনেক প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা হয়েছে। তবে এই নতুন প্রতিনিধিত্বে গবেষণার সাধারণ লক্ষ্য পরিষ্কার করার জন্য সামান্য করা হয়েছে এবং এই নতুন প্রতিনিধিত্বের সমাপ্তি এবং সামান্য প্রতিনিধিত ক্ষেত্রের শিল্পের অবস্থা পরীক্ষা করে আমরা এই বিভ্রান্তিগুলোকে সমালোচনার মাধ্যমে কথা বলি।', 'jv': 'semanti dipunasaben kelas telu nggawe aturan NLP dumadhi kapan dumadhi, lan akeh supoyo sing nyimpen kanggo sematik (adil. amR, UKA, NGB, UTS) iki dipunasaben. Simay, akeh durung ono wektu nglanggar sampeyan gawe lan kelas telu nggawe barang iki luwih dumadhi, ngregani karo hal-hal layang siktik, lan kelas-kelas ngendaho perusahaan kelas pangan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan winih dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo hal-hal kanggo ngilanggar kanggo ngerasakno durung karo seni lan didasakno.', 'sk': 'Semantna reprezentacija je v NLP v zadnjih nekaj letih deležna vse večje pozornosti, zato so bili predstavljeni številni predlogi za semantične sheme (npr. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS). Vendar pa je bilo storjeno malo, da bi ocenili dosežke in pomanjkljivosti teh novih kandidatov, jih primerjali s sintaktičnimi shemami in pojasnili splošne cilje raziskav semantične reprezentacije. Te vrzeli odpravljamo s kritičnim pregledom stanja tehnike na tem področju.', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu A lokacin da, an yi aiki kaɗan dõmin an ƙaddara mafaniki da mangawarar waɗannan masu sãbuwa, kuma a sammenliki su da kwamfyutan syntactic, kuma a bayyana takardar tafinin masu ƙaranci a kan wakilishi na semantic. We address these gaps by critically surveying the state of the art in the field.', 'he': 'מייצג סמנטי מקבל תשומת לב גדולה ב-NLP בשנים האחרונות, והצעות רבות לתוכניות סמנטיות (למשל AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) הוציאו. עם זאת, מעט נעשה כדי להעריך את ההישגים והחסרות של המעמדים החדשים האלה, להשוות אותם עם תכניות סינטאקטיות, ולברר את המטרות הכלליות של מחקר על מייצג סמנטי. אנחנו מתמודדים עם הפערים האלה על ידי סקר ביקורתי את מצב האמנות בשטח.', 'bo': 'Semantic representation is receiving attention in NLP in the past few years, and many proposals for semantic schemes (e.g. AMR, UCCA, GMB, UDS) have been put forward. ཡིན་ནའང་། གྲུབ་འབྲས་དང་གནད་མེད་སྔོན་མེད་པར་བཟོ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ས་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བལྟ་སྟངས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་འདི་དག་ལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Joint Learning for Event Coreference Resolution', 'ar': 'التعلم المشترك لقرار Coreference الأحداث', 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto para la resolución de correferencias de eventos', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Conjunta para Resolução de Correferência de Eventos', 'fr': 'Apprentissage conjoint pour la résolution de coréférence', 'ja': 'イベントコアレファレンス解決のための共同学習', 'ru': 'Совместное обучение для разрешения событий', 'zh': '共谋者合学', 'hi': 'घटना Coreference संकल्प के लिए संयुक्त शिक्षा', 'ga': 'Comhfhoghlaim le haghaidh Taifeach Croítheachta Imeachta', 'ka': 'მოვლენების კონფიგურაციის რეზოციონისთვის დამატებული სწავლება', 'hu': 'Közös tanulás a rendezvénykorferencia-rendezéshez', 'el': 'Κοινή μάθηση για το ψήφισμα της συνέλευσης εκδηλώσεων', 'it': 'Apprendimento congiunto per la risoluzione della Coreferenza degli eventi', 'kk': 'Оқиға қасиеттері айырмашылығының біріктіру', 'mk': 'Joint Learning for Event Coreference Resolution', 'lt': 'Bendras mokymasis renginių koreferencijos rezoliucijai', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Berkongsi untuk Resolusi Kesempatan Peristiwa', 'ml': 'അവസ്ഥ കോരിഫെന്\u200dസ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dഷന്\u200dറെ പഠനം ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'mt': 'Riżoluzzjoni Konġunta ta’ Tagħlim għal Koreferenza ta’ Avvenimenti', 'mn': 'Өөрчлөлтийн сайхан шийдвэрлэлийн суралцах', 'no': 'Kopla til læring for oppløysing av hendingar', 'pl': 'Wspólne uczenie się na rzecz współpracy z wydarzeniami', 'ro': 'Învățare comună pentru rezoluția corefenței evenimentelor', 'sr': 'Joint Learning for Event Coreference Resolution', 'so': 'Waxbarashada wadajirka ah', 'si': 'අවස්ථාව ප්\u200dරමාණ විශේෂණය සඳහා ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Gemensamt lärande för resolution av konferenser', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு மேற்கோள் திரைத்திறனுக்கான பயிற்சியை சேர்', 'ur': 'ایڈینٹ فورفانس ریزیزول کے لئے سیکھنے کے ساتھ ملے', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Phát ngôn chung cho ví dụ nhất', 'bg': 'Съвместно обучение за решаване на съвкупността от събития', 'da': 'Fælles læring med henblik på løsning af begivenhedskoreferencer', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijk leren voor de Resolutie van de Coreferentie van evenementen', 'hr': 'Zajedničko učenje za rezoluciju korisnosti događaja', 'de': 'Gemeinsames Lernen für die Beschlussfassung der Coreferenz', 'fa': 'همکاری یادگیری برای حل پیشرفت رویداد', 'id': 'Joint Learning for Event Coreference Resolution', 'sw': 'Kujifunza pamoja kwa ajili ya Huduma ya Matokeo', 'ko': '사건은 모두 해소된 연합 학습을 가리킨다', 'tr': 'Vaqialar üstine çykarmak üçin öwrenmek üçin gabdaly', 'af': 'Gekoppel Leer vir Gebeurtenis Hoeferende Resolusie', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përbashkët për zgjidhjen e bashkëkonferencës së ngjarjeve', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Միացյալ սովորելը իրադարձությունների կորֆերանսի լուծումների համար', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'ca': "Enseny Conjunt per a la Resolució de la Coreferència d'Events", 'bn': 'ইউন্টেন্ট কোরিফেন্সের রিপশনের জন্য শিক্ষা যুক্ত করুন', 'bs': 'Zajedničko učenje za rezoluciju korisnosti događaja', 'cs': 'Společné učení pro řešení společné konference akcí', 'fi': 'Yhteinen oppiminen tapahtumaCoreference-päätöslauselmaa varten', 'et': 'Ühine õppimine ürituste korralduse lahendamiseks', 'jv': 'Join', 'sk': 'Skupno učenje za resolucijo Coreference dogodkov', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'למידה משותפת לפתרון שידור האירועים', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྐོར་ཚད་ལ་བསྡུས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'While joint models have been developed for many NLP tasks, the vast majority of event coreference resolvers, including the top-performing resolvers competing in the recent TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection and Coreference task, are pipeline-based, where the propagation of errors from the trigger detection component to the event coreference component is a major performance limiting factor. To address this problem, we propose a model for jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity. Our joint model is novel in its choice of tasks and its features for capturing cross-task interactions. To our knowledge, this is the first attempt to train a mention-ranking model and employ event anaphoricity for event coreference. Our model achieves the best results to date on the KBP 2016 English and Chinese datasets.', 'ar': 'بينما تم تطوير النماذج المشتركة للعديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، فإن الغالبية العظمى من أدوات حل مرجع الأحداث ، بما في ذلك المحللون الأفضل أداءً الذين يتنافسون في مهمة TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection and Coreference الأخيرة ، تعتمد على خطوط الأنابيب ، حيث تنتشر الأخطاء من يعد مكون اكتشاف الزناد لمكون مرجع الحدث عاملاً رئيسيًا يحد من الأداء. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذجًا للتعلم المشترك لإحداثيات الأحداث ، واكتشاف الزناد ، ونبذ الحدث. يعتبر نموذجنا المشترك جديدًا في اختياره للمهام وخصائصه لالتقاط تفاعلات المهام المشتركة. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي المحاولة الأولى لتدريب نموذج تصنيف الإشارة واستخدام بهجة الحدث لتوثيق الحدث. يحقق نموذجنا أفضل النتائج حتى الآن على مجموعات البيانات الإنجليزية والصينية KBP 2016.', 'es': 'Si bien se han desarrollado modelos conjuntos para muchas tareas de PNL, la gran mayoría de los solucionadores de correferencias de eventos, incluidos los solucionadores de mayor rendimiento que compiten en la reciente tarea de detección de pepitas de eventos y correferencia de TAC KBP 2016, están basados en tuberías, donde la propagación de errores de la detección de disparadores componente del componente de correferencia de eventos es un factor importante que limita el rendimiento. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un modelo para aprender conjuntamente la correferencia de eventos, la detección de desencadenantes y la anaforicidad de eventos. Nuestro modelo conjunto es novedoso en cuanto a su elección de tareas y sus características para capturar interacciones entre tareas. Hasta donde sabemos, este es el primer intento de entrenar un modelo de clasificación de menciones y emplear la anaforicidad de eventos para la correferencia de eventos. Nuestro modelo logra los mejores resultados hasta la fecha en los conjuntos de datos en inglés y chino de KBP 2016.', 'pt': 'Embora os modelos conjuntos tenham sido desenvolvidos para muitas tarefas de PNL, a grande maioria dos resolvedores de correferência de eventos, incluindo os resolvedores de melhor desempenho que competem na recente tarefa de detecção de nugget e correferência de eventos TAC KBP 2016, são baseados em pipeline, onde a propagação de erros de o componente de detecção de gatilho para o componente de correferência de eventos é um fator limitante de desempenho importante. Para resolver este problema, propomos um modelo para o aprendizado conjunto de correferência de eventos, detecção de gatilhos e anaforicidade de eventos. Nosso modelo conjunto é inovador em sua escolha de tarefas e seus recursos para capturar interações entre tarefas. Até onde sabemos, esta é a primeira tentativa de treinar um modelo de classificação de menção e empregar anaforicidade de eventos para correferência de eventos. Nosso modelo alcança os melhores resultados até o momento nos conjuntos de dados KBP 2016 em inglês e chinês.', 'fr': "Alors que des modèles conjoints ont été développés pour de nombreuses tâches de PNL, la grande majorité des résolveurs de coréférence d'événements, y compris les résolveurs les plus performants concourant dans la récente tâche de détection et de coréférence de pépites d'événements TAC KBP 2016, sont basés sur des pipelines, où la propagation des erreurs à partir de la détection du déclencheur au composant de coréférence d'événement est un facteur limitant majeur de performance. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un modèle d'apprentissage conjoint de la coréférence des événements, de la détection des déclencheurs et de l'anaphoricité des événements. Notre modèle conjoint est novateur dans son choix de tâches et ses fonctionnalités permettant de saisir les interactions entre les tâches. À notre connaissance, il s'agit de la première tentative d'entraînement d'un modèle de classement des mentions et d'utilisation de l'anaphoricité d'événement pour la coréférence d'événements. Notre modèle obtient les meilleurs résultats à ce jour sur les ensembles de données KBP 2016 en anglais et en chinois.", 'ja': '多くのNLPタスクのためにジョイントモデルが開発されているが、最近のTAC KBP 2016イベントナゲット検出およびコアレファレンスタスクで競合するトップパフォーマンスリゾルバを含むイベントコアレファレンスリゾルバの大部分は、パイプラインベースであり、トリガ検出コンポーネントからイベントコアレファレンスコンポーネントへのエラーの伝播は、パフォーマンスを制限する主要な要因である。この問題に対処するために、イベントコアリファレンス、トリガー検出、イベントアナフォリシティを共同で学習するためのモデルを提案します。私たちのジョイントモデルは、タスクの選択とクロスタスクインタラクションをキャプチャするための機能において斬新です。私たちの知る限りでは、これは言及順位モデルをトレーニングし、イベントコアリファレンスにイベントアナフォリシティを採用する最初の試みです。当社のモデルは、KBP 2016英語と中国語のデータセットでこれまでの最高の結果を達成しています。', 'ru': 'Хотя совместные модели были разработаны для многих задач NLP, подавляющее большинство решателей ядра событий, включая наиболее эффективные решающие устройства, конкурирующие в недавней задаче TAC kbp 2016 Обнаружение самородков событий и Coreference, основаны на конвейере, где распространение ошибок от компонента обнаружения триггера к компоненту ядра событий является основным фактором, ограничивающим производительность. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы предлагаем модель совместного изучения ядра события, обнаружения триггера и анафоричности события. Наша совместная модель является новой в выборе задач и ее особенностей для захвата межзадачных взаимодействий. Насколько нам известно, это первая попытка обучить модель ранжирования упоминания и использовать анафоричность события для ориентации на событие. Наша модель достигает наилучших на сегодняшний день результатов в наборах данных KBP 2016 на английском и китайском языках.', 'zh': '虽合模为多 NLP 之务,而绝大多数事协引解析器(在近 TAC KBP 2016 之事,检与理争者最佳解析器)皆本于管道,其谬自触发器检组件传于事协理组件性之限也。 为此者,举一共学共推理、触发器检、异端。 吾曹联形于任,与获交者,新也。 以吾所知,此训练提排名模形而用事之初试也。 吾形于KBP 2016中英文数集上得迄今为止之最也。', 'hi': 'जबकि कई एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए संयुक्त मॉडल विकसित किए गए हैं, हाल ही में टीएसी केबीपी 2016 इवेंट नगेट डिटेक्शन और कोरफेरेंस कार्य में प्रतिस्पर्धा करने वाले शीर्ष-प्रदर्शन वाले रिज़ॉल्वर सहित ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्वरों के विशाल बहुमत पाइपलाइन-आधारित हैं, जहां ट्रिगर डिटेक्शन घटक से ईवेंट कोरफेरेंस घटक तक त्रुटियों का प्रसार एक प्रमुख प्रदर्शन सीमित कारक है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम संयुक्त रूप से घटना coreference सीखने के लिए एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव, ट्रिगर का पता लगाने, और घटना anaphoricity. हमारा संयुक्त मॉडल कार्यों की अपनी पसंद और क्रॉस-टास्क इंटरैक्शन को कैप्चर करने के लिए इसकी विशेषताओं में उपन्यास है। हमारे ज्ञान के लिए, यह एक उल्लेख-रैंकिंग मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने और घटना कोरेफ़रेंस के लिए ईवेंट एनाफोरिकिटी को नियोजित करने का पहला प्रयास है। हमारा मॉडल KBP 2016 अंग्रेजी और चीनी डेटासेट पर आज तक के सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Cé gur forbraíodh samhlacha comhpháirteacha le haghaidh go leor tascanna NLP, tá formhór mór na réititheoirí croí-chomhdhála imeachtaí, lena n-áirítear na réiteoirí is fearr atá san iomaíocht sa tasc Braith agus Croílár Imeachta TAC KBP 2016 le déanaí, bunaithe ar phíblíne, áit a bhfuil iomadú earráidí ó is mórfhachtóir teorannaithe feidhmíochta é an chomhpháirt braite truicear don chomhpháirt croítheagmhais imeachta. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, molaimid múnla le haghaidh comhfhoghlama maidir le croíchomhdháil imeachtaí, braite truicear, agus anaphoricity imeachtaí. Tá ár samhail chomhpháirteach nua ina rogha tascanna agus ina gnéithe chun idirghníomhaíochtaí tras-tascanna a ghabháil. Go bhfios dúinn, is é seo an chéad iarracht chun samhail rangú lua a oiliúint agus anaphoricity imeachtaí a úsáid le haghaidh croí-imeachtaí. Baineann ár múnla amach na torthaí is fearr go dtí seo ar thacair sonraí KBP 2016 Béarla agus Síneach.', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი მოდელები განვითარებულია ბევრი NLP დავალებისთვის, მაგრამ მოვლენების უფრო დიდი ბევრი გადაწყვეტილებელი, რომლებიც უფრო მეტი გავაკეთებული რესოლუქტორები, რომლებიც ახალი TAC KBP 2016 მოვლენების Nugget განვითარება და Coreference დავალებისთვის მოვლენების მოვლენების მოვლენების მოვლენების მოვლენები ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ჩვენ მუშაობით ერთადერთი სწავლისთვის მოდელის შესაძლებლობა, განახლება და მოვლენის ანაფორიცია. ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელი პრომენტია მისი მონიშნულებაში და მისი ფუნქციები კრისტრაქტური ინტერქექციების შესახებ. ჩვენი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს არის პირველი მოცდილობა, რომელიც ამოხსენებული მოდელის მოწყობილობა და გამოყენება მოვლენების ანაფორიკულობა მოვლენების შესაძლებლობისთვის. ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება საუკეთესი შედეგი შედეგი KBP 2016 ინგლისური და ჩინეთის მონაცემების შედეგი.', 'hu': 'Míg a közös modelleket számos NLP-feladathoz fejlesztették ki, az eseménycoreferencia-feloldók túlnyomó többsége, beleértve a TAC KBP 2016 Eseménynugget észlelés és Coreference-feladatban versenyző legmagasabb teljesítményű feloldókat, pipeline-alapú, ahol a hibák terjedése a trigger detektor összetevőtől az eseménycoreferencia összetevőig fontos teljesítménykorlátozó tényező. Ennek a problémának a megoldása érdekében egy modellt javasolunk az eseménycoreferencia, a trigger detektálás és az eseményanafória közös tanulására. Közös modellünk újszerű feladatválasztásában és a feladatok közötti interakciók rögzítésében. Tudomásunk szerint ez az első kísérlet egy említés-rangsorolási modell kiképzésére és esemény anafóricitására az esemény coreferenciájára. Modellünk az eddigi legjobb eredményeket érte el a KBP 2016 angol és kínai adatkészletein.', 'el': 'Ενώ έχουν αναπτυχθεί κοινά μοντέλα για πολλές εργασίες η συντριπτική πλειοψηφία των επιλυτών συγχορήγησης συμβάντων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των επιλυτών υψηλής απόδοσης που ανταγωνίζονται στην πρόσφατη Ανίχνευση πυρήνων συμβάντων και την εργασία είναι βασισμένα σε αγωγούς, όπου η διάδοση σφαλμάτων από το στοιχείο ανίχνευσης πυροδότησης στο στοιχείο συγχορήγησης συμβάντων αποτελεί σημαντικό παράγοντα περιορισμού της απόδοσης. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο για την κοινή εκμάθηση της συγχορήγησης συμβάντων, της ανίχνευσης πυροδοτήσεων και της αναφορικότητας συμβάντων. Το κοινό μας μοντέλο είναι νέο στην επιλογή των εργασιών και τα χαρακτηριστικά του για την καταγραφή αλληλεπιδράσεων μεταξύ των εργασιών. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη προσπάθεια να εκπαιδευτεί ένα μοντέλο κατάταξης αναφορών και να χρησιμοποιηθεί η αναφορικότητα γεγονότων για τη συγχαρήγηση γεγονότων. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα μέχρι σήμερα στα αγγλικά και κινέζικα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "Sebbene i modelli congiunti siano stati sviluppati per molte attività NLP, la stragrande maggioranza dei resolver di coreferenza di eventi, inclusi i resolver più performanti concorrenti nel recente task TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection e Coreference, sono basati su pipeline, dove la propagazione degli errori dal componente di rilevamento trigger al componente di coreferenza di eventi è un fattore di limitazione delle prestazioni importante. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un modello per imparare congiuntamente la coreferenza degli eventi, il rilevamento dei trigger e l'anaforicità degli eventi. Il nostro modello comune è nuovo nella sua scelta di compiti e nelle sue caratteristiche per catturare interazioni cross-task. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questo è il primo tentativo di formare un modello di classificazione delle menzioni e utilizzare l'anaforicità degli eventi per la coreferenza degli eventi. Il nostro modello raggiunge i migliori risultati finora sui set di dati KBP 2016 in inglese e cinese.", 'lt': 'Nors daugeliui NLP užduočių parengti bendri modeliai, didžioji dauguma įvykių atitikties nustatymo priemonių, įskaitant geriausius rezultatus atitinkančius sprendimus, konkuruojančius neseniai atliktame TAC KBP 2016 m. įvykių atitikties nustatymo ir atitikties nustatymo uždavinyje, yra pagrįsti vamzdynais, kai klaidų plitimas nuo paleidimo nustatymo komponento iki įvykių atitikties komponento yra pagrindinis veiksnys, ribojantis veiklos rezultatus. To address this problem, we propose a model for jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity.  Mūsų bendras model is yra naujas pasirinkus užduotis ir jos ypatumus, susijusius su tarpusavio sąveikos sugalvojimu. Mūsų žiniomis tai pirmasis bandymas treniruoti paminėtiną model į ir panaudoti įvykių anaforiškumą renginių koreferencijai. Mūsų modelis iki šiol pasiekia geriausius KBP 2016 anglų ir Kinijos duomenų rinkinių rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Оқиғалардың көп NLP тапсырмалары үшін біріктірілген үлгілер жасалғанда, оқиғалардың көпшілігі жасаушыларының көпшілігі, жаңа TAC KBP 2016 оқиғалардың тапсырмасын анықтау және қайшылық тапсырмасының жоғары жасаушыларының жоғары жасаушыларының көпшілігі қателерді тапсырм Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін оқиғаларды біріктіру үшін, оқиғаларды таңдау, оқиғаларды анықтау және оқиғаларды анафорикалық үлгілерді ұсынамыз. Біздің жалпы моделіміз тапсырмаларды таңдау және оның бірнеше тапсырмаларды қабылдау үшін романдық. Біздің білімімізге, бұл бірінші реттеу үлгісін оқу үшін оқиғалардың анафорикалығын жұмыс істеу әрекеті. Біздің үлгіміз KBP 2016 ағылшын және қытайша деректер жиындарының ең жақсы нәтижелерін жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Sementara model kongsi telah dikembangkan untuk kebanyakan tugas NLP, kebanyakan penyelesaian persamaan peristiwa, termasuk penyelesaian paling berkesan yang bersaing dalam tugas pengesan dan penyelesaian peristiwa TAC KBP 2016 yang baru-baru ini, adalah berdasarkan baris paip, di mana penyebaran ralat dari komponen pengesan pemicu ke komponen persamaan peristiwa adalah faktor pembatasan prestasi utama. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan model untuk belajar secara kongsi peristiwa, pengesan pemicu, dan anaforasi peristiwa. Model bersama kita adalah baru dalam pilihan tugas dan cirinya untuk menangkap interaksi tugas salib. Menurut pengetahuan kita, ini adalah percubaan pertama untuk melatih model peringkat sebutan dan menggunakan anaforasi peristiwa untuk persamaan peristiwa. Model kami mencapai keputusan terbaik hingga kini pada set data bahasa Inggeris dan Cina KBP 2016.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li mudelli konġunti ġew żviluppati għal ħafna kompiti tal-NLP, il-maġġoranza l-kbira tar-riżoluturi tal-koreferenza tal-avvenimenti, inklużi r-riżoluturi tal-aqwa prestazzjoni li jikkompetu fil-kompitu riċenti tat-TAC KBP 2016 dwar id-Detezzjoni tal-Avvenimenti Nugget u l-Koreferenza, huma bbażati fuq il-pipeline, fejn il-propagazzjoni ta’ żbalji mill-komponent ta’ detezzjoni tal-attivatur għall-komponent ta’ koreferenza tal-avvenimenti hija Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, nipproponu mudell għal koerenza ta’ avvenimenti ta’ tagħlim konġunt, detezzjoni ta’ attivaturi, u anaforiċità ta’ avvenimenti. Il-mudell konġunt tagħna huwa ġdid fl-għażla tiegħu ta’ kompiti u l-karatteristiċi tiegħu biex jinqabdu interazzjonijiet bejn kompiti differenti. Għall-għarfien tagħna, dan huwa l-ewwel tentattiv biex jitħarreġ mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ referenza u tiġi impjegata l-anaforiċità tal-avvenimenti għall-koreferenza tal-avvenimenti. Il-mudell tagħna jilħaq l-aħjar riżultati sal-lum fuq is-settijiet tad-dejta Ingliż u Ċiniż tal-KBP 2016.', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങളുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി സഹജമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിജയിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ ടാസി കെബിപി 2016 ന്യൂഗെറ്റ് ഡിറ്റക്റ്റീഷനും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ജോലിയില്\u200d  To address this problem, we propose a model for jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity.  നമ്മുടെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dന്ന മോഡല്\u200d അതിന്റെ ജോലികള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിലും അതിന്റെ സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ക്രോസ്ക നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന് ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ ശ്രമിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനും ഒരു സംഭവത്തിന്റെ അനാഫ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കെബിപി 2016 ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ചൈനീസ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയെടുക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Олон NLP ажлын хувьд нийлбэр загваруудыг хөгжүүлсэн ч ихэнх үйл явдлын тухай шийдвэрлэгчүүдийн ихэнх нь хамгийн саяхан үйл явдлын шийдвэрлэгчүүд болон 2016 оны TAC KBP-ийн үйл явдлын Nugget Detection болон Coreference ажил дээр өрсөлдөг үйл явдлын тухай хоолойн дээр суурилуулагч байдаг. Эдгээр үйл явдлын тухай ойлголты Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид холбогдолтой суралцах үйл явдлын тааламжтай, шийдвэрлэх, үйл явдлын тааламжтай загварыг санал болгоно. Бидний холбоотой загвар нь ажлын сонголт болон олон ажлын харилцааны хамааралтай холбоотой шинэчлэл юм. Бидний мэдлэг дээр энэ бол анхны нэг хэмжээний загварыг суралцаж, үйл явдлын зөвхөн зөвшөөрөл байдлыг хэрэглэх зорилго юм. Бидний загвар нь 2016 оны KBP Англи болон Хятад өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Selv om fleire NLP-oppgåver har blitt utvikla i samanhengsmodeller, er dei store fleste av hendingsregelser, inkludert dei øvste oppløysingane som konkurrer i den siste TAC-oppgåva for hendingar i KBP 2016 for oppdaging av Nugget-oppgåva og Coreference-oppgåva. Dette er pipeline-basert, der utviklinga av feil frå utviklarkomponenten til hendingsregelseskomponenten er ein stor faktor for å avgrensa oppgåver. For å setja opp dette problemet, foreslår vi eit modell for å lære saman hendingsreferanse, utløyse oppdaging og hendingshanformitet. Det samlede modellet vårt er novel i valet av oppgåver og eigenskapane til å henta kryssamband. Dette er det første forsøket å trenja ein minningsverkingsmodell og bruka hendingsverktøy for hendingsverktøy. Modellen vårt oppnår dei beste resultatene til dag på KBP 2016-engelske og kinesiske datasett.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy opracowano wspólne modele dla wielu zadań NLP, zdecydowana większość rozwiązań współdziałania zdarzeń, w tym najlepiej wydajne rozwiązania konkurujące w ostatnim TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection i Coreference, są oparte na rurociągu, gdzie propagowanie błędów z komponentu wykrywania wyzwalaczy do komponentu współdziałania zdarzeń jest głównym czynnikiem ograniczającym wydajność. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy model wspólnego uczenia się wspólnej koreferencji zdarzeń, wykrywania triggerów i anaforyczności zdarzeń. Nasz wspólny model jest nowatorski pod względem wyboru zadań i funkcji rejestrowania interakcji między zadaniami. Z naszej wiedzy jest to pierwsza próba wyszkolenia modelu rankingu wspomnień i wykorzystania anaforyczności wydarzeń do współdziałania wydarzeń. Nasz model osiąga najlepsze dotychczasowe wyniki na zbiorach danych KBP 2016 w języku angielskim i chińskim.', 'ro': 'În timp ce modelele comune au fost dezvoltate pentru multe sarcini NLP, marea majoritate a rezolvătorilor de corefență a evenimentelor, inclusiv rezolvătorilor de performanță superioară care concurează în recenta activitate TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection și Coreference, sunt bazate pe pipeline, unde propagarea erorilor de la componenta de detectare a declanșatorului la componenta de corefență a evenimentelor este un factor major de limitare a performanței. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un model pentru învățarea comună a corefenței evenimentelor, detectarea declanșărilor și anaforicitatea evenimentelor. Modelul nostru comun este nou în alegerea sarcinilor și caracteristicile sale pentru captarea interacțiunilor între sarcini. Din câte ştim, aceasta este prima încercare de a instrui un model de menţionare şi de a utiliza anaforicitatea evenimentelor pentru corefenţa evenimentelor. Modelul nostru obține cele mai bune rezultate până în prezent pe seturile de date KBP 2016 în limba engleză și chineză.', 'sr': 'Iako su se zajednički modeli razvili za mnoge zadatke NLP-a, većina rezolutora dobrodošlosti događaja, uključujući najveće rezolucije koji se konkuruju u nedavnom zadatku TAC KBP-a 2016. za otkrivanje događaja i koreferenciju, su temeljeni na naftu, gdje je propagacija grešaka iz komponenta detekcije okidača do komponenta koreferencije događaja veliki faktor ograničavanja učinka. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo model za zajedničku pristojnost učenja događaja, otkrivanje okidača i anaforičnost događaja. Naš zajednički model je roman u svom izboru zadataka i njegovih karakteristika za uhvatanje interakcija prekršnih zadataka. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi pokušaj da treniramo model spominjanja i da upotrebimo anaforičnost događaja za pristojnost događaja. Naš model postiže najbolji rezultat do sada na KBP engleskim i kineskim podacima 2016.', 'mk': 'Иако заедничките модели се развиени за многу НЛП задачи, огромното мнозинство на решителите за соодветност на настаните, вклучувајќи ги и најдобрите решители кои се натпреваруваат во неодамнешната задача за детекција на настаните КБП 2016 и соодветност на настаните, се базирани на нафтоводот, каде проширувањето на грешки од компонентот за детекција на активаторите до компонентот за соодветност на За да го решиме овој проблем, предлагаме модел за заеднички учење на современост на настаните, детекција на активаторите и анафоричност на настаните. Нашиот заеднички модел е нов во неговиот избор на задачи и нејзините карактеристики за заземање на интеракции на крстозадачи. Според нашето знаење, ова е првиот обид за обука на модел со рангирање на спомените и за употреба на анафоричност на настаните за соодветност на настаните. Нашиот модел достигнува најдобри резултати досега на КБП 2016 англиски и кинески податоци.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ මොඩේල් විදිහට NLP වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් විකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සිද්ධ විශාල විශාල විදිහට සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, සිද්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ තුළු විදිහට පරී මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය, සහ සැකසු අපේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණය තමයි එයාගේ වැඩක් තෝරාගන්න සහ එයාගේ විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂතාව අල්ලගන්න. අපේ දන්නවට, මේක තමයි පළමු උත්සාහ කරනවා කියලා කියන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පිළිගන්න සහ සිද්ධානයක් සඳහා සිද්ධ විශ්ව අපේ මෝඩේල් එකේ KBP 2016 ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ චීනි දත්ත සේට් එකේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Inta lagu sameynayo samooyin wadajir ah oo loo hormariyey shaqaalaha NLP, qaar badan oo ka mid ah qaybta dhacdooyinka, kuwaas oo ku saabsan dhamaadka ugu dambeeyay TAC KBP 2016, waxay ku qoran yihiin dhaqanka nugget Detection iyo Coreference, meesha lagu soo bandhigi karo qalabka laga helay xafiiska dhaqdhaqaalaha ilaa qaybaha qaybta dhacda ee dhamaadka ah waa wax muhiim ah oo ku saabsan. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa tusaale u sameynta iskuulka dhacdooyinka wadajirka ah, baaritaanka iyo bandhigyada dhacdooyinka. Tusaalka wadajirka ah waa saxda doorashada shaqada iyo tababarada la qabsashada iskutallaabta shaqada. Aqoonsheenna, taasi waa isku dayada ugu horeysa in lagu tababariyo tusaale-qaab lagu soo jeedo iyo in loo shaqeeyo cilmi-qaab dhacdooyinka. Tusaale ahaan waxaa sameyn kara arimaha ugu wanaagsan ee ku saabsan KBP 2016 Ingiriis iyo Shiino.', 'sv': 'Medan gemensamma modeller har utvecklats fﾃｶr mﾃ･nga NLP-uppgifter, ﾃ､r de allra flesta hﾃ､ndelsecoreferensresolvers, inklusive de topppresterande resolvers som konkurrerar i den senaste aktiviteten TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection och Coreference, pipeline-baserade, dﾃ､r spridning av fel frﾃ･n triggerdetekteringskomponenten till hﾃ､ndelsecoreferencekomponenten ﾃ､r en viktig prestandabegrﾃ､nsande faktor. Fﾃｶr att lﾃｶsa detta problem fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en modell fﾃｶr gemensamt lﾃ､rande av hﾃ､ndelsecoreferens, triggerdetektering och hﾃ､ndelseanaforicitet. Vﾃ･r gemensamma modell ﾃ､r ny i sitt val av uppgifter och dess funktioner fﾃｶr att fﾃ･nga cross-task interaktioner. Sﾃ･vitt vi vet ﾃ､r detta det fﾃｶrsta fﾃｶrsﾃｶket att trﾃ､na en omnﾃ､mnande-ranking modell och anvﾃ､nda hﾃ､ndelseanaforicitet fﾃｶr hﾃ､ndelsekorreferens. Vﾃ･r modell uppnﾃ･r de bﾃ､sta resultaten hittills pﾃ･ KBP 2016 engelska och kinesiska datauppsﾃ､ttningar.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான நிகழ்வு குறிப்புக்கான மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது To address this problem, we propose a model for jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity.  எங்கள் இணைய மாதிரி அதன் பணிகள் தேர்வு மற்றும் அதன் தன்னுடைய குணங்கள் கிடைக்கும் இடைவெளி செயல்களை பெறுவதற்கு. எங்கள் அறிவிற்கு, இது ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரியை பயிற்சி முதல் முயற்சி மற்றும் நிகழ்வு குறிப்பிட்ட நிகழ்வு ஒழுங்குப் எங்கள் மாதிரி KBP 2016 ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் சீனா தரவு அமைப்புகளில் தேதியில் சிறந்த முடிவுகள் பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ اکثر NLP تاسکیوں کے لئے joint models ایجاد کئے گئے ہیں، اکثر ایجاد کریفورن رئسولور کی اکثریت، شامل ہے کہ اچھے TAC KBP 2016 ایڈیونٹ ناگٹ شناسایی اور Coreference تاسکیوں میں مسابقه کرنے والے رئسولور، پیپ لین کی بنیاد ہے، جہاں ٹریگر شناسایی رئوٹ سے ٹریگر کی خطاؤں کا پھیلانا ہے ایجاد کریفورن رئسو اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک ساتھ حادثہ کی مہربانی سکھانے کے لئے ہے، حادثہ کا پیدا کرنا، اور حادثہ نافوریشی کے لئے۔ ہمارا ملک موڈل اس کے اختیار میں نومین ہے اور اس کے اختیار کرسٹ-ٹاکس کی تعاملات کو پکڑنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے علم کے لئے یہ پہلی کوشش ہے کہ ایک ذکر رینگ موڈل کی تعلیم کریں اور اتفاق کی مہربانی کے لئے اتفاق نافریقی کا استعمال کریں. ہمارا موڈل KBP 2016 انگلیسی اور چینی ڈیٹ سٹ میں بہترین نتائج پہنچاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info Bizning birlashtirish modelimiz vazifalarni tanlash va uning vazifa interfeyslarini olish uchun xossalarimiz. Bizning bilganimizga, bu taʼminlovchi modelni o'rganish uchun birinchi harakat qiladi va hodisa shaxsiyatlarni o'rganadi. Bizning modelimiz KBP 2016 Ingliz va Xitoycha maʼlumotlar tarkibida eng yaxshi natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Trong khi các mô hình chung được phát triển cho nhiều nhiệm vụ Nchọc, đa số các biện pháp hỗ trợ hỗ trợ sự kiện, bao gồm các giải quyết có chức năng cao đang cạnh tranh trong các các các các các giải pháp gần đây của TAC KBP bây giờ và Coreference, đều được thực hiện, nơi việc phát hiện lỗi từ thành phần phát hiện ra kích hoạt đến thành phần tử có khả năng hạn tối đa. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình về sự tham dự tập luyện hợp, khả năng phát hiện sự kiện, và sự mạo hiểm. Cơ chế chung của chúng ta mới tinh vi lựa chọn các công việc và tính năng nắm bắt các tương tác chéo nhiệm vụ. Theo như chúng tôi biết, đây là nỗ lực đầu tiên để đào tạo một mô hình có thứ được nhắc đến và tuyển dụng sự kiểm soát sự kiện cho sự kiện khả năng hạn chót. Mẫu của chúng tôi đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trong các tập tin mẫu của KBP vượt qua trê Anh và Trung Quốc.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че съвместните модели са разработени за много задачи на НЛП, по-голямата част от решенията за ядрена референция на събития, включително най-ефективните решаващи устройства, конкуриращи се в последните задачи за откриване на ядрена информация на събития, са базирани на тръбопроводи, където разпространението на грешки от компонента за откриване на спусъка към компонента за ядрена референция на събития е основен ограничаващ фактор за ефективността. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме модел за съвместно изучаване на кореференцията на събитията, откриването на спусъка и анафоричността на събитията. Нашият съвместен модел е нов в избора на задачи и характеристиките си за улавяне на междузадачи взаимодействия. Доколкото знаем, това е първият опит да се обучи модел за класиране на споменавания и да се използва анафоричността на събитията за кореференция на събитията. Нашият модел постига най-добрите резултати до момента по английски и китайски набори от данни.', 'da': 'Mens fælles modeller er blevet udviklet til mange NLP-opgaver, er langt de fleste hændelsescoreference resolvere, herunder de topydende resolvere, der konkurrerer i den seneste TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection og Coreference-opgave, pipeline-baserede, hvor udbredelsen af fejl fra triggerdetektionskomponenten til hændelsescoreferencekomponenten er en vigtig ydeevnebegrænsende faktor. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en model for fælles læring af begivenhedskoreference, trigger detection og begivenhedskoreference. Vores fælles model er ny i sit valg af opgaver og dets funktioner til at fange cross-task interaktioner. Så vidt vi ved, er dette det første forsøg på at træne en omtale-ranking model og anvende begivenhedsanaforicitet til begivenhedskoreference. Vores model opnår de hidtil bedste resultater på KBP 2016 engelske og kinesiske datasæt.', 'hr': 'Iako su se zajednički modeli razvili za mnoge zadatke NLP-a, većina rezolutora prilagođavanja događaja, uključujući najvišeg rezolutora koji se natječu u nedavnom zadatku TAC KBP-a 2016. za otkrivanje događaja Nugget i koreferenciju, temeljiti su na cijevima, gdje je propagacija grešaka iz komponenta otkrivanja okidača do komponenta koreferencije događaja veliki faktor ograničavanja učinka. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo model za zajedničku pristojnost učenja događaja, otkrivanje okidača i anaforičnost događaja. Naš zajednički model je roman u svom izboru zadataka i njegovih karakteristika za uhvaćenje interakcija preko zadataka. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi pokušaj trenirati model spominjanja i zapošljavati anaforičnost događaja za pristojnost događaja. Naš model postiže najbolji rezultati do sada na KBP engleskim i kineskim podacima 2016.', 'nl': 'Hoewel gezamenlijke modellen zijn ontwikkeld voor veel NLP-taken, zijn de overgrote meerderheid van de event coreference-resolvers, waaronder de best presterende resolvers die concurreren in de recente TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection en Coreference-taak, gebaseerd op pijpleidingen, waarbij de verspreiding van fouten van het triggerdetectiecomponent naar het event coreference-component een belangrijke prestatiebeperkende factor is. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een model voor voor het gezamenlijk leren van gebeurteniscoreferentie, triggerdetectie en gebeurtenisanaforiciteit. Ons gezamenlijk model is nieuw in de keuze van taken en zijn functies voor het vastleggen van cross-task interacties. Voor zover wij weten, is dit de eerste poging om een vermelding-ranking model te trainen en event anaforicity te gebruiken voor event coreference. Ons model behaalt de beste resultaten tot nu toe op de KBP 2016 Engelse en Chinese datasets.', 'id': 'Sementara model kongsi telah dikembangkan untuk banyak tugas NLP, kebanyakan penyelesaian koreferensi peristiwa, termasuk penyelesaian paling berpengaruh yang berkompetisi dalam tugas baru-baru ini TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection dan Coreference, adalah berdasarkan pipeline, di mana propagasi kesalahan dari komponen deteksi pemicu ke komponen koreferensi peristiwa adalah faktor pembatasan prestasi utama. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model untuk bersama belajar kejadian koreferensi, deteksi pemicu, dan kejadian anafora. Model bersama kita adalah novel dalam pilihan tugas dan fitur untuk menangkap interaksi tugas salib. Menurut pengetahuan kita, ini adalah percobaan pertama untuk melatih model peringkat menyebut dan menggunakan anaforasi peristiwa untuk persamaan peristiwa. Model kami mencapai hasil terbaik sehari-hari pada KBP 2016 dataset Inggris dan Cina.', 'de': 'Während gemeinsame Modelle für viele NLP-Aufgaben entwickelt wurden, sind die überwiegende Mehrheit der Event-Coreferenz-Resolver, einschließlich der leistungsstärksten Resolver, die in der jüngsten TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection und Coreference-Aufgabe konkurrieren, pipeline-basiert, wobei die Ausbreitung von Fehlern von der Trigger-Erkennungskomponente zur Event-Coreferenz-Komponente ein wichtiger Leistungsbegrenzer ist. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein Modell für gemeinsames Lernen von Ereigniskoreferenz, Triggererkennung und Ereignisanaphorizität vor. Unser gemeinsames Modell ist neu in der Auswahl von Aufgaben und seinen Funktionen zur Erfassung von aufgabenübergreifenden Interaktionen. Nach unserem Wissen ist dies der erste Versuch, ein Erwähnungs-Ranking-Modell zu trainieren und Event-Anaphorie für die Event-Coreferenz einzusetzen. Unser Modell erzielt die bisher besten Ergebnisse auf den englischen und chinesischen KBP 2016 Datensätzen.', 'sw': 'Wakati mitindo ya pamoja yameandaliwa kwa ajili ya kazi nyingi za NLP, makundi mengi ya tukio hujadili, ikiwa ni pamoja na washinda wa juu walioshindwa katika jukumu la tukio la hivi karibuni la TAC KBP 2016 la Utafiti na Usafiri wa Matokeo, ni kwa kutumia picha, ambapo kutangaza makosa kutoka sehemu ya uchunguzi wa msingi hadi kipengele cha tukio hilo ni sababu kubwa ya utendaji. Ili kushughulikia tatizo hili, tunapendekeza mfano wa kituo cha pamoja cha kujifunza tukio hilo, kutengeneza uchunguzi, na utambulisho wa tukio hilo. Our joint model is novel in its choice of tasks and its features for capturing cross-task interactions.  Kwa ufahamu wetu, hili ni jaribio la kwanza la kufundisha muundo wa rangi unaotajwa na kutumikia utaratibu wa tukio kwa ajili ya tukio hilo. Mfano wetu unafanikiwa matokeo bora zaidi ya siku ya KBP 2016 na seti za data za Kiingereza na China.', 'fa': 'در حالی که مدلهای مشترک برای بسیاری از کارهای NLP توسعه داده شده\u200cاند، اکثریت مشترک\u200cکننده\u200cهای پیشرفت رویداد، شامل حل\u200cکننده\u200cهای بالاترین انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cها در کارهای تاسیس KBP ۲۰۱۶ بازیچه\u200cکننده\u200cای که روی پایه\u200cهای لوله\u200cای است، در حالی که گسترش خطاهای از بخش شناسایی ماشه\u200cها به بخش\u200cهای پیشرفت\u200cهای رویداد یک بخش محدودیت عملکرد بزرگی است. برای حل این مشکل، ما یک مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای رضایت یادگیری اتفاق، شناسایی ماشه\u200cها و نافوریکی اتفاق. مدل مشترک ما در انتخاب وظیفه\u200cهایش و ویژه\u200cهایش برای گرفتن تعامل\u200cهای مختلف کار است. برای دانش ما این اولین تلاش برای آموزش یک مدل درجه یادآوری است و استفاده از نافوریک رویداد برای رضایت رویداد است. مدل ما بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای تازگی را در مجموعه\u200cهای انگلیسی و چینی KBP 2016 می\u200cرساند.', 'tr': 'Birleşik nusgalar NLP görevleri üçin döredilen bolsa hem bolan çykyş nusgalaryň köp bölegi, ýokary edilen iň üsti çykyşçylar hem iň üsti çykyşçylar (TAC KBP) 2016 Oýun Nugget Detek we Koreference görevi(Event Nugget Detection and Coreference görevi) pipeline tabanly, we bu ýerde itik tanyş komponentinden hatalaryň üýtgedilişi täsir etkinlik komponentäre görkezilýän Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, bir nusga öwrenmek üçin bir nusga teklip edip otyrys. Haýdança närazlyklary öwrenmek üçin, başlamak üçin tetikleyär we çykyş etmek üçin nusga teklip edýäris. Biziň birleşik nusgymyz görevlerini saýlamak we çyz-täsirleri çekmek üçin romandyr. Bilgimize göre bu iň birinji çykyş düzenleme nusgasyny öwretmek we çykyş howpsuzlygyny etmäge başlamak synanyşdyr. Biziň modelimiz KBP 2016-nji Iňlisçe we Çinçe veri setirlerinde iň gowy netijeleri başarýar.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa modelet e përbashkëta janë zhvilluar për shumë detyra të NLP-së, shumica e zgjidhësve të koreferencës së ngjarjeve, duke përfshirë zgjidhësit më të mirë që konkurojnë në detyrën e fundit të TAC KBP 2016 për zbulimin e ngjarjeve të Nugget dhe Korferencën, janë bazuar në tubacione, ku shpërndarja e gabimeve nga komponenti i zbulimit të këmbëzës në komponentin e koreferencës së ngjarjeve është një faktor kryesor kufizues i performancës. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne propozojmë një model për të mësuar së bashku ngjarje koreferencë, nxitjen e zbulimit, dhe anaforinë e ngjarjeve. Modeli ynë i përbashkët është i ri në zgjedhjen e tij të detyrave dhe karakteristikave të tij për kapjen e ndërveprimeve ndër-detyrat. Për njohurinë tonë, kjo është përpjekja e parë për të trajnuar një model të renditjes së përmendur dhe për të përdorur anaforinë e ngjarjeve për korreferencën e ngjarjeve. Modeli ynë arrin rezultatet më të mira deri tani në KBP 2016 të dhënave angleze dhe kineze.', 'af': "Terwyl joint models is ontwikkeld vir baie NLP opdragte, is die groot meeste van gebeurtenis koreference oplosserers, insluitend die bo-uitvoerde oplosserers wat in die onlangse TAC Kpp 2016 Event Nugget Deteksie en Coreference opdrag, pipeline-gebaseer, waar die propagasie van foute van die trigger-oplossing komponent na die gebeurtenis koreference komponent is 'n groot prestasie beperking faktor. Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n model vir jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity. Ons joint model is roman in sy keuse van opdragte en sy eienskappe vir kruistaak interaksies te vang. Op ons kennis, dit is die eerste probeer om 'n bepaalde rangering model te trek en gebeurtenis anaforisiteit te gebruik vir gebeurtenis. Ons model bereik die beste resultate tot dag op die Kb 2016 Engels en Sjinese datastel.", 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների համար ստեղծվել են միասին մոդելներ, իրադարձությունների կորֆերենսիայի լուծողների մեծ մասը, ներառյալ ամենաբարձր լուծողները, ովքեր մրցում են վերջին ԿԲՊ 2016-ի իրադարձությունների կորֆերենսիայի հայտնաբերման և կորֆերենսիայի առաջադրանքներում, խողովակաշարերի հիմքում են, որտեղ սխալների տարածումը Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որպեսզի միասին սովորենք իրադարձությունների համապատասխանությունը, ազդակների հայտնաբերումը և իրադարձությունների անաֆորիզմը: Մեր ընդհանուր մոդելը նորարար է իր հանձնարարությունների ընտրության մեջ և իր հատկությունների մեջ, որպեսզի կազմեն փոխազդեցություններ: To our knowledge, this is the first attempt to train a mention-ranking model and employ event anaphoricity for event coreference.  Մեր մոդելը մինչ այժմ ամենալավ արդյունքներ է ստանում 2016-ի անգլերեն և չինական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա:', 'az': 'Birleşik modellər NLP işləri üçün təhsil edilmiş halda, çoxluğu olaraq yaxşı işlər çəkənlərin, həmçin in son TAC KBP 2016 Vaqiyyət Nugget Detection və Coreference işləri ilə müharibə edən ən yüksək çətinlikləri ilə birləşdirilmiş olaraq, pipeline-based tədbirlərdir. Bu tədbirli tanıma komponentsindən xətaların propagasyonu olaraq olaraq qarşılıqların müəyyən edilməsi komponentsinə qədər böy Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, birlikdə öyrənmək üçün bir modeli təklif edirik. Bizim birlikdə modellərimiz öz işlərinin seçilməsində və çox işlər müxtəlif əlaqələrini almaq üçün romandır. Bizim elmimizə, bu ilk dərəcəli modeli təhsil etmək və olaraq təhsil etmək üçün olaraq anaforik işləmək üçün çalışmaqdır. Bizim modelimiz KBP 2016-ci İngilizce və Çin veri qurularında ən yaxşı sonuçlarını başarır.', 'am': 'ብዙዎች የNLP ሥርዓቶች ተዘጋጅተው ሳለ፣ ብዙዎቹ የኢንተርኔት ኮርፌንስ አካባቢዎች፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ TAC KBP 2016 ውስጥ የሚቻኮሉትን የላይኛውን ተቃውሞዎች እና የኮርፌንስ ስርዓት፣ የስሕተት አካባቢ እና የኮርፌንስ ስርዓት የተደረገ ስህተት ማሳየት የሚደረግ ጥቅምት ነው፡፡ To address this problem, we propose a model for jointly learning event coreference, trigger detection, and event anaphoricity.  የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን ለመያዝ የአጠቃላይ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ እውቀታችን ይህ የመጀመሪያ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በKBP 2016 እንግሊዘኛ እና ቻይና ዳታተር ላይ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'ko': '이미 많은 NLP 임무를 위해 연합 모델을 개발했지만 절대 다수의 이벤트 공동 인용 해석기는 최근의 TACKBP 2016 이벤트 용해 검측과 공동 인용 임무에서 경쟁하는 성능이 가장 좋은 해석기를 포함하는데 모두 파이프라인을 바탕으로 한다. 그 중에서 트리거 검측 그룹에서 이벤트 공동 인용 구성 요소까지의 오류 전파는 주요한 성능 제한 요소이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 연합 학습 사건의 공지, 촉발 검측과 사건의 반지 모델을 제시했다.우리의 연합 모델은 임무 선택과 포획의 크로스 임무 상호작용에 있어서 모두 참신하다.순위모델을 언급하고 사건 반지를 사건 공지에 활용하는 훈련은 이번이 처음인 것으로 알려졌다.우리 모델은 KBP 2016 영문 데이터 세트에서 지금까지 가장 좋은 결과를 얻었다.', 'bn': 'এনএলপি কাজের জন্য যোগাযোগ মডেল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে, সেখানে সাম্প্রতিক টাসি কেবিপি ২০১৬ সালের অনুষ্ঠানে প্রতিযোগিতার মধ্যে বেশীরভাগ অনুষ্ঠানের কোরেফারেন্স কর্মসূচী সমাধান করেছে, যার মধ্যে সাম্প্রতিক অনুষ্ঠানের নাগেট এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে আমরা একত্রিত অনুষ্ঠান শিখতে পারি, ত্রিগার আবিষ্কার এবং অনুষ্ঠানে আমাদের যৌথ মডেল হচ্ছে তার কাজের বেছে নিয়ে যাওয়া এবং তার বৈশিষ্ট্য ক্রস-কাজের মাধ্যমে নিয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য। আমাদের জ্ঞানের জন্য, এটাই প্রথম প্রচেষ্টা আমাদের মডেল কেবিপি ২০১৬ সালের ইংরেজি এবং চীনা তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের সেরা ফলাফল পেয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Zatímco společné modely byly vyvinuty pro mnoho úkolů NLP, drtivá většina řešitelů událostí, včetně nejvýkonnějších řešitelů konkurujících v nedávných TAC KBP 2016 Detekce nuggetů událostí a Coreference úlohách, jsou založeny na potrubí, kde šíření chyb ze složky detekce spouštěče na komponentu koreference událostí je hlavním faktorem omezujícím výkon. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme model společného učení koreference událostí, detekce triggerů a anaforicity událostí. Náš společný model je nový ve svém výběru úkolů a vlastnostech pro zachycení interakcí mezi úkoly. Podle našeho vědomí je to první pokus trénovat model řazení zmínek a využít anaforicitu událostí pro koreferenci událostí. Náš model dosahuje dosud nejlepších výsledků na datových sadách KBP 2016 v angličtině a čínštině.', 'et': 'While joint models have been developed for many NLP tasks, the vast majority of event coreference resolvers, including the top-performing resolvers competing in the recent TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection and Coreference task, are pipeline-based, where the propagation of errors from the trigger detection component to the event coreference component is a major performance limiting factor.  Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja mudeli ühiseks õppimiseks sündmuste kortereferentsi, käivituse tuvastamiseks ja sündmuste anafoorsuse. Meie ühine mudel on uudne oma ülesannete valiku ja funktsioonide poolest ülesannetevaheliste interaktsioonide jäädvustamiseks. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on see esimene katse koolitada märkimisväärtuse mudelit ja kasutada sündmuste anafoorset sündmuste koreferentsiks. Meie mudel saavutab seni parimad tulemused KBP 2016 inglise ja hiina andmekogumites.', 'ca': "Mentre que s'han desenvolupat models conjunts per moltes tasques del NLP, la gran majoria dels resoldors de coreferença d'esdeveniments, inclosos els resoldors de millor rendiment que competeixen en la recent tasca TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection i Coreference, estan basats en pipeline, on la propagació d'errors del component de detecció de desencadenadors al component de coreferença d'esdeveniments és un factor major de limitació del rendiment. Per abordar aquest problem a, proposem un model de coreferença d'esdeveniments d'aprenentatge conjunt, detecció de desencadenament i anafòria d'esdeveniments. El nostre model conjunt és nou en la seva elecció de tasques i característiques per capturar interaccions cruzades. Segons el nostre coneixement, aquest és el primer intent d'entrenar un model de classificació de mencions i empregar anafòria d'eventos per a la coreferència d'eventos. El nostre model aconsegueix els millors resultats fins ara en els conjunts de dades anglès i xinès KBP 2016.", 'bs': 'Iako su se zajednički modeli razvili za mnoge zadatke NLP-a, većina rezolutora prilagođavanja događaja, uključujući najvišeg rezolutora koji se natječu u nedavnom zadatku TAC KBP-a 2016. za otkrivanje događaja i koreferenciju, su temeljeni na cjevi, gdje je propagacija grešaka iz komponenta otkrivanja okidača do komponenta koreferencije događaja veliki faktor ograničavanja učinka. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo model za zajedničku pristojnost učenja događaja, otkrivanje okidača i anaforičnost događaja. Naš zajednički model je roman u svom izboru zadataka i njegovih karakteristika za hvatanje interakcija prekršnih zadataka. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi pokušaj trenirati model spominjanja i zapošljavati anaforičnost događaja za pristojnost događaja. Naš model postiže najbolji rezultat do sada na KBP engleskim i kineskim podacima 2016.', 'fi': 'Vaikka yhteisiä malleja on kehitetty moniin NLP-tehtäviin, suurin osa tapahtumakoreferenssin ratkaisijoista, mukaan lukien viimeisimmässä TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection- ja Coreference-tehtävässä kilpailevat huippusuorituskykyiset ratkaisijat, ovat putkipohjaisia, joissa virheiden leviäminen laukaisijan tunnistuskomponentista tapahtumakoreferenssin komponenttiin on merkittävä suorituskykyä rajoittava tekijä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme mallia tapahtumakoreferenssin, triggerin havaitsemisen ja tapahtumaanaforisuuden yhteiseen oppimiseen. Yhteismallimme on uudenlainen tehtävävalinnassaan ja ominaisuuksissaan tehtävien välisen vuorovaikutuksen kuvaamisessa. Tietojemme mukaan tämä on ensimmäinen yritys kouluttaa mainintojen ranking-mallia ja käyttää tapahtumaanaforisuutta tapahtumakoreferenssiin. Mallimme tuottaa tähän mennessä parhaat tulokset KBP 2016 englannin ja kiinan aineistoissa.', 'jv': 'Mungkin model sing dibenalke nggawe akeh NLP dadi, akeh pipilihan bakal terus Resolutioning, nambah nambah Resolusi layaraning nggawe ngubah dhéwé, terus wis nambah sing bakal terus ono jipember nggawe tanggal PACKA MbP nyang sumulai tanggal nggawe jipember Nyong ngomong mengko boten iki, kita supoyo model kanggo nggawe coreferarung eventune, kang disenyong, lan akeh anaforik eventune. joint model Awakdhéwé, iki kuwi angkang mbégat kanggo luwih-urip model kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe aksi iki ngono nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerayakno. model dhéwé iso nggoleki dadi sing paling dhéwé nang dadi sabanjuré kélan kbP Inggris lan dataset sing Cheyene ngéwé.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko so bili za številna opravila NLP razviti skupni modeli, velika večina reševalcev jedrske reference dogodkov, vključno z najbolj uspešnimi reševalci, ki tekmujejo v nedavni opravili TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection in Coreference, temelji na cevovodu, kjer je širjenje napak iz komponente zaznavanja sprožilca na komponento jedrske reference dogodkov glavni omejevalni dejavnik zmogljivosti. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo model za skupno učenje koreference dogodkov, zaznavanje sprožilca in anaforičnosti dogodkov. Naš skupni model je nov pri izbiri nalog in funkcijah za zajemanje mednaložnih interakcij. Po našem znanju je to prvi poskus usposabljanja modela uvrstitve omenjanj in uporabe anaforičnosti dogodkov za koreferenco dogodkov. Naš model dosega najboljše dosedanje rezultate v angleškem in kitajskem naboru podatkov KBP 2016.', 'ha': "A lokacin da aka buɗe misãlai masu haɗi wa masu aikin NLP, masu yawa na fassarar masu motsi, kamar kuma masu ƙaranci masu yin tsoron cikin a yanzu TAC KBP 2016, masu buɗa ɗa cikin masu nuna da al'amarin Nuchet KBP 2016, za'a ƙayyade pipe-based, a inda sifarwa masu ɓarna daga mazaɓan da za'a gane shi zuwa compound na ƙarshen babban performance mai ƙaranci ne. Ga mu buɗa wannan masu zartar da, sai mu buƙata wani motel wa kwamfyuta da za'a sanar da shirin ayuka da ke haɗa, za'a yi gano, kuma masu motsi. Tuduniyarmu da ke haɗi da shirinmu yana cikin hanyarsa daga aikin aiki da ke sami tsarin su masu sami-interaction. Ga saninmu, wannan ne jarrabi na farkon ya yi wa'anar wani misãli mai tunãni da kuma ya yi aiki da surori wa masu hushi. Tuddalinmu ya sami mafi kyaun matsala a yanzu KBP 2016 na Ingiriya da China.", 'he': 'למרות שדוגמנים משותפים פותחו עבור משימות רבות של NLP, רוב הפתרונים העצומים של אפשרויות, כולל הפתרונים המופעילים ביותר שמתחרים במשימת גילוי אפשרויות של TAC KBP 2016 ומשימה של אפשרויות מוגבלת, הם מבוססים על צינורות, שבו ההתפשטות של שגיאות מרכיב גילוי ההפעלה לרכיב אפשרויות מוגבלת ביצועים גדולה. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזו, אנו מציעים מודל ללמוד יחד אירועים מתאימים, גילוי ההדקים, ואנופוריות אירועים. המודל המשותף שלנו הוא חדש בבחירה שלו במשימות והתכונות שלו לתפוס אינטראקציות בין משימות. לדעתנו, זו הניסיון הראשון לאמן מודל מדרגת הזכרות ולהשתמש באירועים אנפוריות לתואר האירועים. המודל שלנו משיג את התוצאות הטובות ביותר עד היום בקבוצות נתונים אנגלית וסינית KBP 2016.', 'bo': 'While joint models have been developed for many NLP tasks, the vast majority of event coreference resolvers, including the top-performing resolvers competing in the recent TAC KBP 2016 Event Nugget Detection and Coreference task, are pipeline-based, where the propagation of errors from the trigger detection component to the event coreference component is a major performance limiting factor. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་མཐུན་གྱི་མིག་ཆས་གཅིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་ནི་དེའི་གདམ་ཁ་ལས་ཀ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མཐུན་དུ་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཤེས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་འདི་ནི་བྱ་བ་གཟུགས་འགོར་གྱི་མིག ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་པའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཚད་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལེ'}
{'en': 'Generating and Exploiting Large-scale Pseudo Training Data for Zero Pronoun Resolution', 'es': 'Generación y explotación de datos de pseudo entrenamiento a gran escala para la resolución de pronombres cero', 'pt': 'Gerando e explorando dados de pseudotreinamento em larga escala para resolução de pronome zero', 'fr': 'Générer et exploiter des données de pseudo-entraînement à grande échelle pour une résolution nulle des pronoms', 'ar': 'توليد واستغلال بيانات تدريب زائفة واسعة النطاق لحل الضمائر الصفرية', 'ja': 'ゼロ代名詞解像度のための大規模な擬似トレーニングデータの生成と利用', 'hi': 'शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर छद्म प्रशिक्षण डेटा उत्पन्न करना और शोषण करना', 'ru': 'Создание и использование крупномасштабных псевдоучебных данных для нулевого разрешения местоимений', 'zh': '生成大用伪练数以成零代词解析', 'ga': 'Sonraí Traenála Pseudo ar Mhórscála a Ghiniúint agus a Bhaint as do Thaifeach Nialasach Forainm', 'ka': 'უფრო დიდი მაგალითი Pseudo Training Data for Zero Pronoun Resolution', 'hu': 'Nagyléptékű pszeudo képzési adatok generálása és kihasználása a nulla névmások felbontásához', 'el': 'Δημιουργία και αξιοποίηση μεγάλης κλίμακας δεδομένων κατάρτισης Ψευδώδους για μηδενική ανάλυση προφορών', 'it': 'Generare e sfruttare dati di formazione pseudologica su larga scala per una risoluzione zero dei pronomi', 'kk': 'Үлкен масштабтағы псейдо оқыту деректері нөл белгілі айырмашылығының құру және эксплуаттау', 'lt': 'Didelio masto pseudo mokymo duomenų, skirtų nuliniam prievadų išskyrimui, kūrimas ir naudojimas', 'mk': 'Генерирање и искористување на големи податоци за псевдо обука за резолуција на нула проимени', 'ms': 'Menjana dan mengeksploitasi Data Pelatihan Pseudo Skala Besar untuk Resolusi Pronoun Zero', 'ml': 'പ്രോനോണ്\u200d റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d വിജയത്തിനായി വലുതായ പെയുഡോ പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni u l-Isfruttar ta’ Dejta dwar it-Taħriġ Psewdo fuq skala kbira għal Riżoluzzjoni ta’ Pronoun Zero', 'mn': 'Том хэмжээний Pseudo Training Data for Zero Pronoun Resolution', 'no': 'Lagar og eksploderer store oppløysingsdata for pseudo- trening for null- oppløysing', 'sr': 'Generacija i eksplozija velikih podataka Pseudo obuke za rezoluciju nule prognoze', 'pl': 'Generowanie i wykorzystywanie dużych danych treningowych Pseudo do zerowej rozdzielczości zamówień', 'ro': 'Generarea și exploatarea datelor de formare Pseudo la scară largă pentru rezoluția zero a pronunțelor', 'si': 'සීරෝ ප්\u200dරධානය විශේෂණය සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න', 'so': 'Generation and Exploding Large scale Pseudo Training Data for Zero Pronoun Resolution', 'sv': 'Generera och utnyttja storskalig pseudoutbildningsdata för noll pronomen upplösning', 'ta': 'பெரிய அளவுகோல் பின்சுடோ பயிற்சி தகவலை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் வெளியேறுகிறது சூழ்நிலை திரைத்திறனுக்கான தக', 'ur': 'صفر پرنائن روشنی کے لئے بڑی اسکیل Pseudo ٹرینینگ ڈاٹا ایجاد اور پھیلائی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát ra và kích hoạt dữ liệu huấn luyện giả thần kinh lớn cho giải quyết con robot Zero', 'hr': 'Generiranje i eksplodiranje velike skale podataka za obuku psihotika za nulu proizvodnju rezolucije', 'nl': 'Het genereren en exploiteren van grootschalige Pseudo-trainingsgegevens voor zero pronoun resolutie', 'bg': 'Генериране и използване на широкомащабни данни за псевдо обучение за нулева резолюция на местоименията', 'da': 'Generering og udnyttelse af store pseudotræningsdata til nul udtalelse', 'id': 'Membuat dan mengeksploitasi Data Pelatihan Pseudo pada skala besar untuk Resolusi Pronoun Zero', 'de': 'Generierung und Nutzung großer Pseudo-Trainingsdaten für Null-Pronomen-Auflösung', 'ko': '제로 대명사 해상도 기반의 대규모 위조 훈련 데이터의 생성과 이용', 'fa': 'ایجاد و انفجار داده\u200cهای آموزش روانشناسی بزرگ برای حل\u200cسازی صفر', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza na kutengeneza taarifa za mafunzo ya Pseudo kwa ajili ya Uwezeshaji wa Zero', 'tr': 'Ullakan Sened Bejerme Derjesi Zero Öňlemek üçin Ullakan', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi dhe shfrytëzimi i të dhënave të stërvitjes së Pseudo në shkallë të madhe për zgjidhjen e përcaktimit zero', 'af': 'Genereer en uitvoer groot- skaal Pseudo- oefening data vir Nuwe Pronoun Resolusie', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Զերոյի պրոնումների լուծումների համար մեծ մասշտաբով սովորեցման տվյալներ ստեղծելը և օգտագործելը', 'bn': 'প্রধান রিসিউটির জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য তৈরি এবং প্রস্থান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Generacija i eksplozija velikih podataka Pseudo obuke za rezoluciju nule prognoze', 'ca': "generar i aprofitar dades d'entrenament psicològic a gran escala per a resoldre zero pronom", 'az': 'B칲y칲k 칬l칞칲d톛 Pseudo t톛hsil m톛lumat캼 S캼f캼r t톛hsil 칞칬z칲n칲rl칲y칲 칲칞칲n yarad캼l캼r v톛 Exploit', 'cs': 'Generování a využívání rozsáhlých Pseudo tréninkových dat pro nulové rozlišení zájmenů', 'fi': 'Laajamittaisten pseudoharjoitustietojen luominen ja hyödyntäminen nollapronominin resoluutiota varten', 'et': 'Laiaulatuslike pseudokoolituse andmete genereerimine ja kasutamine nullpunkti resolutsiooni saavutamiseks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje in izkoriščanje obsežnih podatkov za psevdo usposabljanje za ničelno ločljivost zaimka', 'he': 'מייצר ומשתמש נתונים לאימונים פסיודו במידה גדולה לפתרון אפס', 'jv': 'job', 'bo': 'Zero Pronoun Resolution་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་དང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Most existing approaches for zero pronoun resolution are heavily relying on annotated data, which is often released by shared task organizers. Therefore, the lack of annotated data becomes a major obstacle in the progress of zero pronoun resolution task. Also, it is expensive to spend manpower on labeling the data for better performance. To alleviate the problem above, in this paper, we propose a simple but novel approach to automatically generate large-scale pseudo training data for zero pronoun resolution. Furthermore, we successfully transfer the cloze-style reading comprehension neural network model into zero pronoun resolution task and propose a two-step training mechanism to overcome the gap between the pseudo training data and the real one. Experimental results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art systems with an absolute improvements of 3.1 % F-score on OntoNotes 5.0 data.', 'pt': 'A maioria das abordagens existentes para resolução de pronome zero depende muito de dados anotados, que geralmente são divulgados por organizadores de tarefas compartilhadas. Portanto, a falta de dados anotados torna-se um grande obstáculo no progresso da tarefa de resolução de pronome zero. Além disso, é caro gastar mão de obra na rotulagem dos dados para um melhor desempenho. Para aliviar o problema acima, neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem simples, mas inovadora, para gerar automaticamente dados de pseudotreinamento em larga escala para resolução de pronome zero. Além disso, transferimos com sucesso o modelo de rede neural de compreensão de leitura no estilo cloze para a tarefa de resolução de pronome zero e propomos um mecanismo de treinamento de duas etapas para superar a lacuna entre os dados de pseudotreinamento e o real. Os resultados experimentais mostram que a abordagem proposta supera significativamente os sistemas de última geração com melhorias absolutas de 3,1% F-score nos dados do OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ar': 'تعتمد معظم الأساليب الحالية لتحليل ضمير الصفر بشكل كبير على البيانات المشروحة ، والتي غالبًا ما يتم إصدارها بواسطة منظمي المهام المشتركة. لذلك ، يصبح نقص البيانات المشروحة عقبة رئيسية في تقدم مهمة حل ضمير الصفر. أيضًا ، من المكلف إنفاق القوى العاملة على تصنيف البيانات للحصول على أداء أفضل. للتخفيف من المشكلة المذكورة أعلاه ، في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا بسيطًا ولكنه جديد لإنشاء بيانات تدريب زائفة واسعة النطاق تلقائيًا لتحليل ضمير الصفر. علاوة على ذلك ، نجحنا في نقل نموذج الشبكة العصبية لفهم القراءة بأسلوب cloze إلى مهمة دقة ضمير صفري ونقترح آلية تدريب من خطوتين للتغلب على الفجوة بين بيانات التدريب الزائفة والبيانات الحقيقية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن النهج المقترح يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأنظمة مع تحسينات مطلقة بنسبة 3.1٪ F على بيانات OntoNotes 5.0.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los enfoques existentes para la resolución de pronombres cero se basan en gran medida en datos anotados, que a menudo publican los organizadores de tareas compartidas. Por lo tanto, la falta de datos anotados se convierte en un obstáculo importante en el progreso de la tarea de resolución de pronombres cero. Además, es caro gastar mano de obra en etiquetar los datos para obtener un mejor rendimiento. Para aliviar el problema anterior, en este artículo, proponemos un enfoque simple pero novedoso para generar automáticamente datos de pseudo entrenamiento a gran escala para la resolución de pronombres cero. Además, transferimos con éxito el modelo de red neuronal de comprensión lectora estilo cloze a una tarea de resolución de pronombres cero y proponemos un mecanismo de entrenamiento de dos pasos para superar la brecha entre los datos de pseudo entrenamiento y los reales. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el enfoque propuesto supera significativamente a los sistemas de última generación con mejoras absolutas del 3,1% de puntuación F en los datos de OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ja': '代名詞ゼロ解決のための既存のアプローチのほとんどは、多くの場合、共有タスクオーガナイザーによってリリースされる注釈付きデータに大きく依存しています。したがって、注釈付きデータの欠如は、ゼロ代名詞解決タスクの進行の大きな障害となる。また、より良いパフォーマンスのためにデータのラベル表示に人手を費やすのは高価です。上記の問題を緩和するために、代名詞解像度ゼロのための大規模な擬似トレーニングデータを自動的に生成するための、単純でありながら斬新なアプローチを提案します。さらに、クローススタイルの読み取り理解ニューラルネットワークモデルをゼロ代名詞解像度タスクに転送し、擬似トレーニングデータと実際のトレーニングデータとのギャップを克服するための2段階トレーニングメカニズムを提案します。実験結果は、提案されたアプローチが、OntoNotes 5.0データで3.1 ％のFスコアの絶対的な改善により、最先端のシステムを大幅に上回ることを示しています。', 'fr': "La plupart des approches existantes pour la résolution zéro du pronom reposent largement sur des données annotées, qui sont souvent publiées par des organisateurs de tâches partagés. Par conséquent, le manque de données annotées devient un obstacle majeur à la progression de la tâche de résolution du pronom zéro. En outre, il est coûteux de dépenser de la main-d'œuvre pour étiqueter les données afin d'améliorer les performances. Pour pallier le problème ci-dessus, nous proposons dans cet article une approche simple mais novatrice pour générer automatiquement des pseudo-données d'entraînement à grande échelle pour une résolution de pronom nulle. En outre, nous avons réussi à transférer le modèle de réseau neuronal de compréhension de lecture de style rapproché dans une tâche de résolution de pronom zéro et proposons un mécanisme d'entraînement en deux étapes pour surmonter l'écart entre les données de pseudo-entraînement et les données réelles. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que l'approche proposée surpasse largement les systèmes de pointe avec une amélioration absolue de 3,1% du score F sur les données OnToNotes 5.0.", 'zh': '大抵零代词解析法皆重依注数,常以共享组织者行。 故阙注数为零代词解析务进展之要。 此外,费人力标记数据以得善性亦贵。 所以缓此者,本条简而新法,所以自成零代词分辨率之大练数也。 此外将 cloze 式读解神经网络模样转换为零代词解析务,并立两步训练机制,以克伪练数与真练数之间相去。 实验结果表明,所上法明优先进之统,于OntoNotes 5.0数绝增3.1%F分数。', 'ru': 'Большинство существующих подходов к разрешению нулевого местоимения в значительной степени зависят от аннотированных данных, которые часто публикуются организаторами общих задач. Таким образом, отсутствие аннотированных данных становится серьезным препятствием на пути решения задачи с нулевым местоимением. Кроме того, дорогостояще тратить людские ресурсы на маркировку данных для лучшей производительности. Чтобы облегчить проблему выше, в этой статье, мы предлагаем простой, но новый подход, чтобы автоматически генерировать крупномасштабные псевдо обучающие данные для нулевого разрешения местоимения. Кроме того, мы успешно переносим модель нейронной сети в стиле «Cloze» в задачу разрешения нулевого местоимения и предлагаем двухэтапный обучающий механизм для преодоления разрыва между псевдоучебными данными и реальными. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый подход значительно превосходит современные системы с абсолютным улучшением на 3,1% F-балла по данным OntoNotes 5.0.', 'hi': 'शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए अधिकांश मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण एनोटेट किए गए डेटा पर भारी निर्भर हैं, जो अक्सर साझा कार्य आयोजकों द्वारा जारी किया जाता है। इसलिए, एनोटेट किए गए डेटा की कमी शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन कार्य की प्रगति में एक बड़ी बाधा बन जाती है। इसके अलावा, बेहतर प्रदर्शन के लिए डेटा लेबलिंग पर जनशक्ति खर्च करना महंगा है। उपरोक्त समस्या को कम करने के लिए, इस पेपर में, हम शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर छद्म प्रशिक्षण डेटा स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक सरल लेकिन उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम सफलतापूर्वक क्लोज़-स्टाइल रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन न्यूरल नेटवर्क मॉडल को शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन टास्क में स्थानांतरित करते हैं और छद्म प्रशिक्षण डेटा और वास्तविक एक के बीच के अंतर को दूर करने के लिए दो-चरणीय प्रशिक्षण तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण OntoNotes 5.0 डेटा पर 3.1% एफ-स्कोर के पूर्ण सुधार के साथ अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Tá an chuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana maidir le réiteach forainm nialasach ag brath go mór ar shonraí anótáilte, a scaoileann eagraithe tasc roinnte go minic. Mar sin, bíonn easpa sonraí anótáilte ina chonstaic mhór ar dhul chun cinn tasc réitigh forainm nialasach. Chomh maith leis sin, tá sé costasach daonchumhachta a chaitheamh ar lipéadú na sonraí le haghaidh feidhmíochta níos fearr. Chun an fhadhb thuas a mhaolú, sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige simplí ach nua chun sonraí oiliúna bréige ar scála mór a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch do réiteach forainm nialasach. Ina theannta sin, aistrímid go rathúil an tsamhail líonra néar-léitheoireachta cloze-stíl cloze go tasc réitigh forainm nialasach agus molaimid meicníocht oiliúna dhá chéim chun an bhearna idir na sonraí oiliúna bréige agus an ceann fíor a shárú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe go mór na córais úrscothacha le feabhas iomlán de 3.1% ar scór F ar shonraí OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ka': 'უფრო მხოლოდ არსებობს პრონუმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის უფრო ძალიან დარწმუნდება მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც ზოგიერთად განსაზღვრებული დავალების ორგანიზა ამიტომ, ანოტირებული მონაცემების არსებობა უფრო ძალიან გახდება ნულ წინასწორებული მონაცემების პროგრესი. ასევე, უკეთესი მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ამოცანებთ პრობლემების გახსნა, ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ახლა პრობლემების გახსნა, მაგრამ პრობლემების გახსნა, რომ ავტომატურად დიდი მაგალითი პესეუდო განა დამატებით, ჩვენ წარმატებით წარმატებით კლოზის სტილის კითხვის ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელეში ნულ წარმატების გადაწყვეტილების მოდელში გადატანა და მუშაობით ორ-კვადრატური განაკლების მექანსი, რომ პე ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ მოწყობინებული პროგრამა მნიშვნელოვანად გავამუშავებს სისტემის სისტემის განმავლობაში, რომელიც აბსოლუტური დაახლოებით 3.1% F-', 'hu': 'A nulla névmások felbontásának legtöbb meglévő megközelítése nagymértékben a jegyzetelt adatokra támaszkodik, amelyeket gyakran a megosztott feladatszervezők adnak ki. Ezért a jegyzetelt adatok hiánya jelentős akadályt jelent a nulla névmások feloldásának előrehaladásában. Továbbá drága munkaerőt költeni az adatok címkézésére a jobb teljesítmény érdekében. A fenti probléma enyhítése érdekében ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű, de új megközelítést javasolunk, amely automatikusan nagyszabású pszeudo képzési adatokat generál a nulla névmások felbontása érdekében. Ezenkívül sikeresen átvisszük a cloze-stílusú olvasásértő neurális hálózati modellt nulla névmások felbontására, és javasoljuk egy kétlépcsős edzési mechanizmust a pszeudo edzési adatok és a valódi közötti szakadék leküzdésére. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés jelentősen felülmúlja a korszerű rendszereket, abszolút 3,1%-os F-pontszám javulásával az OntoNotes 5.0 adatokon.', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την ανάλυση μηδενικής αντωνυμίας βασίζονται σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε σχολιασμένα δεδομένα, τα οποία συχνά απελευθερώνονται από τους κοινόχρηστους διοργανωτές εργασιών. Ως εκ τούτου, η έλλειψη σχολιασμένων δεδομένων καθίσταται ένα σημαντικό εμπόδιο στην πρόοδο της εργασίας επίλυσης μηδενικής αντωνυμίας. Επίσης, είναι ακριβό να δαπανηθεί το ανθρώπινο δυναμικό για την επισήμανση των δεδομένων για καλύτερη απόδοση. Για την ανακούφιση του παραπάνω προβλήματος, στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά καινοτόμα προσέγγιση για την αυτόματη παραγωγή δεδομένων ψευδοεκπαίδευσης μεγάλης κλίμακας για μηδενική επίλυση αντωνυμίας. Επιπλέον, μεταφέρουμε επιτυχώς το μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου κατανόησης ανάγνωσης σε εργασία ανάλυσης αντωνυμίας μηδενικού τύπου και προτείνουμε έναν μηχανισμό κατάρτισης δύο βημάτων για να ξεπεραστεί το χάσμα μεταξύ των ψευδο-προπονητικών δεδομένων και του πραγματικού. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα με απόλυτες βελτιώσεις 3,1% σκορ σε δεδομένα 5.0.', 'it': "La maggior parte degli approcci esistenti per la risoluzione di pronomi zero si basano fortemente su dati annotati, che sono spesso rilasciati dagli organizzatori di attività condivise. Pertanto, la mancanza di dati annotati diventa un ostacolo importante nel progresso del compito di risoluzione zero pronomi. Inoltre, è costoso spendere manodopera per etichettare i dati per migliorare le prestazioni. Per alleviare il problema di cui sopra, in questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio semplice ma innovativo per generare automaticamente dati di pseudo allenamento su larga scala per risoluzione zero pronomi. Inoltre, trasferiamo con successo il modello di rete neurale di comprensione della lettura in stile cloze nel compito di risoluzione zero pronomi e proponiamo un meccanismo di allenamento in due fasi per superare il divario tra i dati pseudo di allenamento e quello reale. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che l'approccio proposto supera significativamente i sistemi all'avanguardia con un miglioramento assoluto del 3,1% F-score sui dati OntoNotes 5.0.", 'lt': 'Dauguma esamų metodų, skirtų nulinei aiškiai išspręsti problemą, labai remiasi anotuotais duomenimis, kuriuos dažnai skelbia bendri užduočių organizatoriai. Todėl anotuotų duomenų trūkumas tampa pagrindine kliūtimi, trukdančia įgyvendinti nulinę aiškią pertvarkymo užduotį. Be to, brangu išleisti darbuotojus ženklinant duomenis, kad jie galėtų geriau veikti. Siekiant sušvelninti pirmiau minėtą problem ą, šiame dokumente siūlome paprastą, bet naują požiūrį, kad būtų automatiškai sukurti didelio masto pseudomokymo duomenys, kad būtų galima išspręsti nulinę reikšmę. Be to, mes sėkmingai perkeliame užduotį „cloze“ skaitymo būdu supratimo neuralinio tinklo model į į nulinės aiškios pertvarkos užduotį ir siūlome dviejų etapų mokymo mechanizmą, skirtą pašalinti spragą tarp pseudomokymo duomenų ir tikrojo. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gerokai viršija pažangiąsias sistemas, o OntoNotes 5.0 duomenų absoliutus 3,1 % F balas pagerėjo.', 'kk': 'Нөл айырмашылығының көпшілігі нөл айырмашылығының көпшілігі келтірілген деректеріне сеніп тұрады, бұл көпшілікті ортақ тапсырмалар бағдарламаларының Сондықтан белгіленген деректер жоқ нөл айырмашылық тапсырманың бағдарламасында негізгі бәлкім болады. Сонымен қатар, мәліметтерді жақсы істеу үшін мәліметтерді жарлықтау үшін бағатты. Жоғардағы мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін, бұл қағазда қарапайым, бірақ қарапайым, бірақ қарапайым жағдай, нөл мәліметтің айырмашылығы үлкен псевдо оқыту деректерін автомат Қосымша, біз псевдо оқыту деректерінің арасындағы кеңістіктерді шешу тапсырмасына сәтті оқу стилінің түсініктемесін нөл желіне аударып, екі қадам оқыту механизмін ұсынып, псевдо оқыту деректерінің арасындағы Эксперименталдық нәтижелер OntoNotes 5.0 деректерінде 3.1% F- нәтижесінің абсолютті жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Повеќето постоечки пристапи за нуларна резолуција многу се потпираат на анотирани податоци, кои честопати се објавуваат од заедничките организатори на задачи. Затоа, недостатокот на анотирани податоци станува главна пречка во напредокот на задачата со нула резолуција. Исто така, скапо е да се троши работна сила на етикетирање на податоците за подобра перформанса. За да го олесниме проблемот горе, во овој документ предложуваме едноставен но нов пристап за автоматски генерирање на големи псевдо обуки податоци за нула резолуција. Покрај тоа, успешно го трансферираме моделот на неурална мрежа за читање во стил на клоз во задача со нула резолуција и предложуваме двочекорен механизам за обука за надминување на празнината помеѓу псевдо обуката податоци и вистинската. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот пристап значително ги надминува најсовремените системи со апсолутно подобрување на 3,1 отсто Ф-оценка на податоците од OntoNotes 5,0.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan pendekatan yang wujud untuk resolusi tombol sifar bergantung dengan data yang dicatat, yang sering dilepaskan oleh pengatur tugas berkongsi. Oleh itu, kekurangan data yang dicatat menjadi halangan utama dalam kemajuan tugas resolusi bernama sifar. Juga, ia mahal untuk menghabiskan kuasa kerja untuk mengetikkan data untuk prestasi yang lebih baik. Untuk mengurangi masalah di atas, dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan mudah tetapi baru untuk secara automatik menghasilkan data latihan pseudo skala besar untuk resolusi tombol sifar. Lagipun, kami berjaya memindahkan model rangkaian saraf pemahaman pembacaan gaya-cloze ke tugas resolusi kosong dan melamar mekanisme latihan dua langkah untuk mengatasi jarak antara data latihan pseudo dan yang sebenar. Keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan jauh melebihi sistem state-of-the-art dengan peningkatan mutlak 3.1% skor F pada data OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ തീരുമാനത്തിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വിഷമമായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നു. അത് പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്ക അതുകൊണ്ട്, വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കുറവ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ തീരുമാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രോഗത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാന തടസ്സ അതുകൊണ്ടും, നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഡേറ്റാ ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200dറെ ശക്തി ചെലവഴിക മുകളിലുള്ള പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണപരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള വലിയ പെയുഡോ പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ട അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചു ക്ലോസ് സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നത് പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലിലേക്ക് പ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമ്പാദിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് 3', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi eżistenti għar-riżoluzzjoni żero b’mod pront jiddependu ħafna fuq dejta annotata, li spiss tiġi rilaxxata minn organizzaturi ta’ kompiti kondiviżi. Therefore, the lack of annotated data becomes a major obstacle in the progress of zero pronoun resolution task.  Barra minn hekk, huwa għali li l-ħaddiema jintefqu fuq it-tikkettar tad-dejta għal prestazzjoni aħjar. Biex ittaffi l-problem a ta’ hawn fuq, f’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ sempliċi iżda ġdid biex jiġġenera awtomatikament dejta psewdo ta’ taħriġ fuq skala kbira għal riżoluzzjoni żero pronoun. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nieħdu b’suċċess it-trasferiment tal-mudell tan-netwerk newrali ta’ komprensjoni tal-qari bl-istil tal-għeluq f’kompitu ta’ riżoluzzjoni żero pronoun u nipproponu mekkaniżmu ta’ taħriġ f’żewġ stadji biex jingħeleb id-distakk bejn id-dejta psewdo ta’ taħriġ u dik reali. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ propost jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti s-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati b’titjib assolut ta’ 3.1% punteġġ F fuq dejta OntoNotes 5.0.', 'mn': 'Нэг хэлбэрийн шийдвэрлэлийн ихэнх арга барилга нь анзаарсан өгөгдлийг маш их хамаарна. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн хуваалцааны зохион байгуулагчид гаргадаг. Тиймээс, тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн алдаагүй нь тэгш хэлбэрийн шийдвэрлэлийн ажлын хөгжлийн том саад болж байна. Мөн хүн төрөлхтний эрх мэдлийг илүү сайн үйл ажиллагаанд тэмдэглэх нь үнэтэй. Үүний асуудлыг багасгахын тулд, энэ цаасан дээр бид энгийн гэхдээ шинэ арга зам автоматжуулахын тулд том хэмжээний псевдо сургалтын өгөгдлийг 0 хэмжээний шийдвэрлэлд бий болгодог. Дараа нь бид цусны хэлбэрийн унших мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг 0-р шийдвэрлэх үйл ажилд амжилттай шилжүүлж, pseudo сургалтын өгөгдлийн болон бодит мэдээллийн хоорондын ялгааг даван алдагдахын тулд хоёр дахь дасгал сургалтын механизм Үүний туршилтын үр дүн нь OntoNotes 5.0 өгөгдлийн F-score 3.1% нь тодорхойлолтой байдал дээр урлагийн тогтолцооны тогтолцоог үнэхээр илүү сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Dei fleste eksisterande tilnærmingane for null-oppløysing er kraftig på annoterarte data, som ofte vert lagt ut av delte oppgåveljarar. Det er derfor mangelen av notata data blir ein stor hindring i framdringa av null oppløysing. Det er også dykka å bruka menneskreft på å merke data for betre utvikling. For å redusera problemet over, i denne papiret foreslår vi ein enkel, men nytt tilnærming for å automatisk laga stor pseudo øvingsdata for null oppløysing. I tillegg, vi overfører klosistikken for lesing av forståking av neuralnettverksmodellen til null oppløysingsmodul og foreslår ein to steg opplæringsmekanisme for å overføra mellomrommet mellom pseudoopplæringsdata og den verkelege. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga utfører systemet med absolutte forbedringar av 3,1% F- poeng på OntoNotes 5.0- data.', 'pl': 'Większość istniejących podejść do zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków w dużej mierze opiera się na adnotacjach danych, które są często publikowane przez organizatorów zadań współdzielonych. W związku z tym brak adnotacji danych staje się główną przeszkodą w postępie zadania zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków. Ponadto kosztuje się wydawanie siły roboczej na etykietowanie danych dla lepszej wydajności. Aby złagodzić powyższy problem, w niniejszym artykule proponujemy proste, ale nowatorskie podejście do automatycznego generowania dużej skali danych pseudo treningowych dla zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków. Ponadto z powodzeniem przenosimy model sieci neuronowej w stylu cloze do zadania zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków i proponujemy dwustopniowy mechanizm treningowy, aby przezwyciężyć lukę między pseudotrainowymi danymi treningowymi a rzeczywistymi. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane podejście znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy z absolutną poprawą 3,1% F-score na danych OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe abordări existente pentru rezoluția pronumelor zero se bazează în mare măsură pe date adnotate, care sunt adesea lansate de organizatorii de sarcini partajate. Prin urmare, lipsa datelor adnotate devine un obstacol major în progresul sarcinii de rezoluție zero a pronumelor. De asemenea, este costisitor să cheltuiți forța de muncă pe etichetarea datelor pentru o performanță mai bună. Pentru a atenua problema de mai sus, în această lucrare, propunem o abordare simplă, dar nouă, pentru a genera automat date pseudo-instruire la scară largă pentru rezoluția zero a pronumelor. Mai mult decât atât, transferăm cu succes modelul de rețea neurală de înțelegere a lecturii în stil cloze în sarcina de rezoluție zero a pronumelor și propunem un mecanism de instruire în doi pași pentru a depăși decalajul dintre datele pseudo de instruire și cele reale. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea propusă depășește semnificativ sistemele de ultimă generație, cu o îmbunătățire absolută de 3,1% F-scor pe datele OntoNotes 5.0.', 'sr': 'Većina postojećih pristupa za nulu rezoluciju pronouna teško se oslanja na annotirane podatke, koje često objavljuju zajednički organizatori zadataka. Stoga nedostatak annotiranih podataka postaje velika prepreka u napretku zadatka rezolucije nule pronoun. Takođe, skupo je potrošiti ljudsku moć na označavanju podataka za bolju izvršnost. Da bismo ublažili problem iznad toga, u ovom papiru predložili jednostavan ali novi pristup da automatski proizvedemo velike pseudo obuku podataka za nulu rezoluciju pronoun. Osim toga, uspešno prebacujemo model razumevanja neuronske mreže na nulu rezoluciju pronoun a i predlažemo mehanizam treninga za dva koraka da prebacimo prazninu između podataka pseudo obuke i pravih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi državni umjetni sistem sa apsolutnom poboljšanjem 3,1% F-rezultata na podacima OntoNotes 5.0.', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaalaha ugu badnaan waxyaabaha ay jiraan oo ay u baahan yihiin go'aanka nuurka ah, waxay ku xiran yihiin macluumaad dhibaataysan, taas oo inta badan la soo saaraa qabanqaabiyaha shaqaalaha. Sidaas darteed, baahida macluumaadka la dhibaataysan wuxuu noqon karaa obstac weyn oo horumarinta shaqada qiimo-qaynuunka ah. Waxaa sidoo kale qaali ah in aad ku bixiso xoogga dadka la xiriira baaritaanka macluumaadka si aad u samayso. Si loo fududeeyo dhibaatada kor, warqadan ayaannu u soo jeedaynaa qaab fudud laakiin saxda ah si aan automatic u soo saarno macluumaad waxbarasho oo aad u weyn, si aan u sameynno go’aan. Waxaa kaloo succeeded ah, waxaynu u beddelinaynaa qaababka hoose-hoose ee akhrinta daboolka neurada ah oo u beddelinaynaa shuqul la saaro zero ah, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa meymisyo waxbarasho oo laba dabar ah si aan uga adkayno gaf u dhexeeya macluumaadka waxbarashada ee rasmiga ah iyo tan runta ah. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday uu si muhiim ah u sameeyo nidaamka qoraalka farshaxanka, kaas oo leh hagaajinta kooxda 3.1% F-score ee OntoNotes 5.0.", 'sv': 'De flesta befintliga tillvägagångssätt för noll pronomen upplösning är starkt beroende av kommenterade data, som ofta släpps av delade uppgiftsorganisationer. Avsaknaden av kommenterade data blir därför ett stort hinder för att lösa noll pronomen. Det är också dyrt att spendera arbetskraft på att märka data för bättre prestanda. För att lindra problemet ovan föreslår vi i denna uppsats ett enkelt men nytt tillvägagångssätt för att automatiskt generera storskalig pseudoträningsdata för noll pronomen upplösning. Dessutom överför vi framgångsrikt den cloze-stil läsförståelse neurala nätverksmodellen till noll pronomen upplösning uppgift och föreslår en tvåstegs träningsmekanism för att övervinna gapet mellan pseudo träningsdata och den verkliga. Experimentella resultat visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet avsevärt överträffar de senaste systemen med en absolut förbättring på 3,1% F-poäng på OntoNotes 5.0 data.', 'ta': 'பூஜ்ஜியத்திற்கான பெரும்பாலான தெளிவுத்திறன் இருக்கும் முறைகள் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தகவல்களின் மீது கடுமையாக நம்பி ஆகையால், குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் குறைப்பிட்டது பூஜ்ஜியமான தெளிவுத்திறன் பணியின் முன்னேற்றத்தில் ஒரு மிகப்பெர மேலும், சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கான தரவை விளக்கச் செலவு செய்ய விலை செலவாகும். மேலே உள்ள பிரச்சனையை எளிதாக்க, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் புதிய வழிமுறையை தானாகவே பெரிய புள்ளியின் தெளிவுத்தி அதற்கும், நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக குளிர் பாணி படிக்கும் கூட்டத்தை புள்ளிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி மாதிரியாக மாற்றி பூஜ்ஜியமான தெளிவுத்திறன் பணிய முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு முறைமையாக 3. 1% F- score on OntoNotes 5. 0 data.', 'si': 'ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන් ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ දත්ත නැති වෙනුවෙන් ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා. ඒවගේම, මිනිස්සුන්ගේ බලය හොඳ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සඳහා දත්ත ලේබිල් කරනවා කියලා. මෙහෙ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩුවෙන්න, මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ ඉතින්, අපි සමහර විශේෂයෙන් ක්\u200dලෝස් විදියට පැහැදිලි න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ මොඩේලය සුන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පැහැදිලි කරනවා සහ ප පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක', 'ur': 'زیادہ موجود مطابق صفر کی روشنی کے لئے بہت سی موجود مطابق اظہار کیا گیا ہے، جو اکثر مشترک کام سازمان کے ذریعے آزاد ہوتی ہے. لہٰذا، انٹیٹ ڈیٹا کے ناکام صفر کے حل کے کام کی پیشرفت میں ایک بڑی بازداشت ہو جاتا ہے. اور اس سے بھی بہتر عملکرد کے لئے مردوں کی طاقت خرچ کرنا ہے۔ اوپر کے مسئلہ کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ساده لیکن روانی طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ صفر کی روشنی کے لئے بہت سی اسکیل پسئوڈو ٹرینگ ڈیٹے کو اپنا سادھا پیدا کریں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے کلوز-استیل پڑھنے کے مطابق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو صفر کے ذریعہ روشنی کے کام میں انتقال کر دیا اور ایک دوسٹے تطابق مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ pseudo تطابق ڈیٹا اور واقعی ڈیٹا کے درمیان فاصلہ کو غالب آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا بہت اچھی طریقہ پر OntoNotes 5.0 ڈاٹوں پر 3.1% F-score کی مطلوب تغییرات کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Шундай қилиб, таърифланган маълумотлар камбағал маълумотлар аниқ ҳалқи вазифаси равишда катта қизиқлик бўлиши керак. Also, it is expensive to spend manpower on labeling the data for better performance.  Yuqorida muammolarni yoqish uchun, bu qogʻozdagi oddiy, lekin novel tilini avtomatik foydalanish uchun katta taʼminlovchi soʻzni qo'yish uchun qoʻllanmalar. Keyin, biz muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli o'qishni o'qituvchi neyrol tarmoqning modelini hech narsa o'zgartiraymiz va o'sha narsalarning o'rganishga ikkita qadam trening mechanisiyatini o'zgartirish uchun foydalanishimiz mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, talab qilingan holatning holatini muhim bajaradi. OntoNotes 5. 0 maʼlumot bilan 3.1% F scorning muhimligini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết các phương pháp hiện có để giải quyết đại từ không dựa vào các dữ liệu ghi chú, thường được phát tán bởi các tổ chức tác vụ chung. Do đó, sự thiếu dữ liệu ghi chú trở thành một trở ngại lớn trong việc tiến hành giải quyết từ không. Cũng rất đắt tiền khi chi tiêu nhân lực để mô tả dữ liệu để đạt hiệu suất tốt hơn. Để giảm bớt vấn đề trên, trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng mới để tự động tạo ra các dữ liệu giả học trên diện lớn để giải quyết không đại từ. Hơn nữa, chúng ta chuyển thành công phương pháp đọc đồng bằng hệ thống thần kinh thành nhiệm vụ phân giải đại từ bằng không và đề xuất một cơ chế đào tạo hai bước để vượt qua khoảng cách giữa các dữ liệu nghiên cứu giả và thực tế. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị đạt hiệu quả cao hơn hệ thống hiện đại với một số cải tiến tuyệt đối của 3.1=$F-số trên dữ liệu OntoNotes 5.0.', 'bg': 'Повечето съществуващи подходи за нулева резолюция на местоименията силно разчитат на анотирани данни, които често се издават от организатори на споделени задачи. Следователно липсата на анотирани данни се превръща в основна пречка в напредъка на задачата за резолюция на нулево местоимение. Също така е скъпо да се харчат работна ръка за етикетиране на данните за по-добра производителност. За да облекчим горния проблем, в тази статия предлагаме прост, но нов подход за автоматично генериране на широкомащабни псевдо-тренировъчни данни за нулева резолюция на местоименията. Освен това успешно прехвърляме модела на невронната мрежа за разбиране на четене в стил клозе в задача с нулева резолюция на местоименията и предлагаме двустепенен тренировъчен механизъм за преодоляване на разликата между псевдо-тренировъчните данни и реалните. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният подход значително превъзхожда най-съвременните системи с абсолютни подобрения от 3,1% при данните от ОнтоБележки 5.0.', 'nl': 'De meeste bestaande benaderingen voor zero pronoon resolutie zijn sterk afhankelijk van geannoteerde gegevens, die vaak worden vrijgegeven door gedeelde taakomganisaties. Daarom wordt het ontbreken van geannoteerde gegevens een groot obstakel in de voortgang van zero pronoun resolution taak. Ook is het duur om mankracht te besteden aan het labelen van de gegevens voor betere prestaties. Om het bovenstaande probleem te verlichten, stellen we in dit artikel een eenvoudige maar nieuwe aanpak voor om automatisch grootschalige pseudo trainingsgegevens te genereren voor nul voornaamwoorden resolutie. Verder zetten we met succes het neuronale netwerkmodel van cloze-stijl leesbegrip over in nul voornaamwoorden resolutie en stellen we een trainingsmechanisme voor in twee stappen om de kloof tussen de pseudo trainingsgegevens en de echte te overbruggen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak significant overtreft de state-of-the-art systemen met een absolute verbetering van 3,1% F-score op OntoNotes 5.0 data.', 'hr': 'Većina postojećih pristupa rezoluciji nule pronoun teško se oslanja na annotirane podatke, koje često objavljuju zajednički organizatori zadataka. Stoga nedostatak annotiranih podataka postaje velika prepreka u napretku zadatka rezolucije nule pronoun. Također, skupo je potrošiti ljudsku moć na označavanju podataka za bolju učinku. Da bismo ublažili problem iznad toga, u ovom papiru predložili jednostavan ali nov pristup automatski stvoriti velike pseudo obuke podatke za nulu rezoluciju pronoun. Osim toga, uspješno prebacujemo model razumijevanja neuralne mreže u zadatak rezolucije nule pronoun i predlažemo mehanizam za dvokoraka obuku kako bi se prevazili praznina između podataka pseudo obuke i pravih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava s apsolutnom poboljšanjem 3,1% F-rezultata na podacima OntoNotes 5.0.', 'da': 'De fleste eksisterende tilgange til nul pronomen løsning er stærkt afhængige af annoterede data, som ofte frigives af delte opgavearrangører. Derfor bliver manglen på annoterede data en stor hindring i udviklingen af nul pronomen opløsning opgave. Det er også dyrt at bruge arbejdskraft på at mærke dataene for bedre ydeevne. For at afhjælpe ovenstående, foreslår vi i denne artikel en enkel, men ny tilgang til automatisk at generere store pseudo træningsdata til nul pronomen opløsning. Desuden overfører vi kloze-stil læseforståelse neurale netværk model til nul pronomen opløsning opgave og foreslår en todrins træningsmekanisme for at overvinde kløften mellem pseudo træningsdata og den virkelige. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede tilgang betydeligt overgår de state-of-the-art systemer med en absolut forbedring på 3,1% F-score på OntoNotes 5.0 data.', 'de': 'Die meisten existierenden Ansätze zur Auflösung von Nullpronomen beruhen stark auf annotierten Daten, die häufig von gemeinsamen Aufgabenorganisationen veröffentlicht werden. Daher wird der Mangel an annotierten Daten zu einem großen Hindernis im Fortschritt der Nullpronomen Auflösung Aufgabe. Außerdem ist es teuer, Arbeitskräfte für die Kennzeichnung der Daten für eine bessere Leistung auszugeben. Um das obige Problem zu lindern, schlagen wir in diesem Beitrag einen einfachen, aber neuartigen Ansatz vor, um automatisch groß angelegte Pseudo-Trainingsdaten für Nullpronomen-Auflösung zu generieren. Darüber hinaus übertragen wir erfolgreich das neuronale Netzwerkmodell im Cloze-Stil in die Nullpronomen-Auflösung und schlagen einen zweistufigen Trainingsmechanismus vor, um die Lücke zwischen den Pseudo-Trainingsdaten und den realen zu überwinden. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz die modernsten Systeme deutlich übertrifft, mit einer absoluten Verbesserung von 3,1% F-Score auf OntoNotes 5.0 Daten.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan pendekatan yang ada untuk resolusi tombol nol sangat bergantung pada data anotasi, yang sering dilepaskan oleh organisasi tugas berbagi. Oleh karena itu, kekurangan data yang dicatat menjadi halangan besar dalam kemajuan tugas resolusi kosong. Juga, mahal untuk menghabiskan kekuatan untuk mengetikkan data untuk prestasi yang lebih baik. Untuk mengurangi masalah di atas, dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan sederhana tetapi baru untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan data pelatihan pseudo skala besar untuk resolusi kosong. Furthermore, we successfully transfer the cloze-style reading comprehension neural network model into zero pronoun resolution task and propose a two-step training mechanism to overcome the gap between the pseudo training data and the real one.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan jauh melebihi sistem state-of-the-art dengan peningkatan mutlak 3,1% skor F pada data OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ko': '대부분의 기존 0대명사 해석 방법은 주석 데이터에 심각하게 의존하는데 이런 데이터는 보통 공유 임무 조직자가 발표한다.따라서 표기 데이터의 부족은 제로 대명사 해소 임무의 주요 장애가 된다.더 좋은 성능을 얻기 위해 인력 표기 데이터도 비싸다.상술한 문제를 완화하기 위해 본고는 제로대사 해상도를 자동으로 생성하는 대규모 위조훈련 데이터를 간단하고 새로운 방법을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 완형 빈칸식 읽기 이해 신경 네트워크 모델을 0대명사 분별 임무로 성공적으로 전환시키고 위조 훈련 데이터와 실제 데이터 간의 차이를 극복하는 2단계 훈련 메커니즘을 제시했다.실험 결과 제시된 방법이 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 현저히 우수했고 OnNotes 5.0 데이터에서 F 점수가 3.1% 절대적으로 높아졌다.', 'fa': 'بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود برای حل\u200cسازی صفر بسیار زیادی بر داده\u200cهای مشخص شده، که اغلب توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان کار مشترک آزاد می\u200cشود. بنابراین، ناتوانی داده\u200cهای نوشته شده در پیشرفت کار حل صفر یک مانع بزرگی می\u200cشود. همچنین، برای خرج قدرت مردان برای برچسب داده ها برای انجام بهتر گرون است. برای آسان کردن مشکل بالا، در این کاغذ، ما یک روش ساده ولی نویس پیشنهاد می کنیم تا اطلاعات آموزش pseudo بسیار بزرگ برای حل صفر را تولید کنیم. ما با موفقیت مدل خواندن شبکه عصبی را به کار حل\u200cسازی صفر انتقال می\u200cکنیم و یک مکانیسم آموزش دو قدم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا فاصله بین داده\u200cهای آموزش\u200cسازی pseudo و واقعی را غلبه کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که این دستور پیشنهاد بسیار بیشتر از سیستم\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را با توسعه\u200cهای کامل 3.1 درصد F-score در داده\u200cهای OntoNotes 5.0 انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Matokeo mengi yanayopo kwa ajili ya suluhisho lisiloeleweka yanategemea sana taarifa zinazoudhiwa, ambazo mara nyingi huachiwa huru na waandaaji wa kazi za kushirikiana. Kwa hiyo, ukosefu wa takwimu zinazoudhuriwa unakuwa vikwazo kikubwa katika maendeleo ya kazi zisizo sahihi. Pia, ni gharama kutumia nguvu za binadamu kwa kutuma taarifa kwa ajili ya utendaji mzuri. Ili kupunguza tatizo hilo hapo juu, katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia rahisi lakini za riwaya ili kutengeneza taarifa za mafunzo makubwa kwa ajili ya suluhisho lisilo sahihi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya mafanikio kuhamisha mtindo wa kusoma mfumo wa mfumo wa mfumo wa mtandao wa neura kuwa jukumu la utambulisho na kupendekeza mfumo wa mafunzo ya hatua mbili ili kushinda tofauti kati ya taarifa za mafunzo ya udanganyifu na ile halisi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa na mifumo ya sanaa yenye maboresho ya vipindi 3.1% F kwenye takwimu za OntoNotes 5.0.', 'sq': 'Shumica e qasjeve ekzistuese për zgjidhjen zero të shprehura mbështeten shumë në të dhënat e anotuara, të cilat shpesh lëshohen nga organizatorët e ndarë të detyrave. Prandaj, mungesa e të dhënave të shënuara bëhet një pengesë e madhe në përparimin e detyrës së rezolutës zero të shprehur. Gjithashtu, është e shtrenjtë të shpenzosh fuqinë e punës për të etiketuar të dhënat për performancë më të mirë. To alleviate the problem above, in this paper, we propose a simple but novel approach to automatically generate large-scale pseudo training data for zero pronoun resolution.  Furthermore, we successfully transfer the cloze-style reading comprehension neural network model into zero pronoun resolution task and propose a two-step training mechanism to overcome the gap between the pseudo training data and the real one.  Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja e propozuar tejkalon ndjeshëm sistemet më të larta me një përmirësim absolut prej 3.1% rezultati F në të dhënat OntoNotes 5.0.', 'tr': 'Nusga açylyk üçin köp bar ýakynlaşyklaryň görkezilişi maglumatlara baglanýar. Bu iş düzenleyicileriň köplenç boşadylýar. Şol sebäpli, ýazyklanan maglumatlaryň ýok bolmagy nul a ýlama täblisiniň öňündeki meseleleri bolar. Munuň ýagdaýda, adamlary gowy etmäge hatlary etiketlemek üçin harcamak has gymmat. Bu kagyzda meseläni azaltmak üçin basit bir ýagdaý teklip edýäris emma novel ýagdaýy nul a ýlamak üçin uly ölçekli pseudo okuwçy maglumatlary otomatik bilen döretmäge rugsat berýäris Munuň üçin, kloz stiliniň naklamasynyň näyral şebeke nusgasyny nul çözümleme meselesine geçirip, pseudo okuwçylygyň we hakyky maglumatyň arasynyň gapyny üstden çykmak üçin iki ýoluň dermesini teklip edýäris. Aramanyň netijeleri görkezilýän ýagdaýyň "OntoNotes 5.0 data" üstünde çykyş 3.1% F अंश dygyny çykarýar.', 'af': "Die meeste bestaande toegange vir nul pronoun oplossing word swaar vertrou op annotateerde data, wat dikwels verlos word deur deelde taak organiseerders. Daarom, die ontbreek van aanmerkte data word 'n groot hinders in die vordering van nul pronoun oplossing taak. Dit is ook koste om mankrag te spel op die etiket van die data vir beter prestasie. Om die probleem bo te verminder, in hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige maar novele toegang om automaties groot-skaal pseudo-onderwerking data te genereer vir nul voorwerp-oplossing. Verder, ons het suksesvol die klose-styl lees verstandigheid van neuralnetwerk-model na nul oplossing opdrag en voorgestel 'n twee-stap opvoeringsmekanisme om die gap tussen die pseudo opvoeringsdata en die reël een te oorwin. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde toegang betekenlik die staat-van-kuns-stelsels met 'n absolute verbeteringe van 3.1% F-telling op OntoNotes 5.0 data uitvoer.", 'am': 'ብዙዎቹ የክፍለ መልስ አካሄዱ በክፍለ ሥርዓት ላይ የሚደረጉትን አካባቢ ዳራዎችን በመጠቀም ይደሰታሉ፡፡ ስለዚህም የአስቸጋሪው የዳታ ጉዳይ የቁጥጥር መልስ ስራ በማድረግ መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ደግሞም ዳራዎችን ለማሳመር በሚሻል ስርዓት ለመጠቀም ሀብት ነው፡፡ በላይ ያለውን ችግር ለማቅረብ፣ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ለክፍለ ትልቅ ነገር ግን የአሁኑን መንገድ ለክፍለ ትልቅ ትልቅ የpseudo ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን ለክፍለ ትልቅ ትልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ እናስጀምራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቁልፍ-style የጠቅላላ መረብ ማተሚያ ሞዴል በክፍለ መልዕክት እና በክፍለ ትምህርት ማድረግ እና በሥርዓት ማህበረሰብ እና እውነተኛውን ማስተማር መካከል ክፍተትን ለመሸከም የሁለት ደረጃዎች ተማሪ ማሰናከል ማሰናከል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች በ3.1% F-score በOntoNotes 5.0 ዳታዎች ላይ የተፈቀደ የሥርዓቱን ሥርዓት ግንኙነት በሙሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Most existing approaches for zero pronoun resolution are heavily relying on annotated data, which is often released by shared task organizers.  Այսպիսով, գրված տվյալների բացակայությունը դառնում է հիմնական խոչընդոտ զրոյի արտահայտված լուծումների առաջընթացքում: Ավելին, շատ թանկ է ծախսել մարդկային ուժը ավելի լավ արդյունավետության համար տվյալներ պիտակելու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ խնդիրը նվազեցնելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ, բայց նոր մոտեցում, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծենք մեծ մասշտաբով կեղծ ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ զրոյի արտահայտության համար: Ավելին, մենք հաջողությամբ փոխանցում ենք նյարդային ցանցի ընկալումների ընկալումների մոդելը զրոյի արտահայտության առաջադրանքին և առաջարկում ենք երկու քայլ ուսուցման մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք կեղծ ուսուցման տվյալների և իրական տվյալների միջև եղ Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր համակարգերը, որոնք բացարձակ բարելավում են 3.1 տոկոսի F-գնահատականը Օնտոնոտեսի 5.0 տվյալների վրա:', 'az': 'Sıfır söz çözünürlüyü üçün çox mövcuddur məlumatların üzərində ağır təvəkkül edir. Bu, çox zaman paylaşılmış işlər organizatorları tarafından yayınlanır. Beləliklə, məlumatların yox olması sıfır pronoun çözünürlü işlərinin sürətində böyük bir engel olur. Ayrıca, daha yaxşı performans üçün məlumatları etiketləmək üçün insanların gücünü sərf etmək xərcləyir. Üstündəki problemi yüngülləşdirmək üçün, bu kağızda basit, ancaq yeni bir tərzim təklif etdik ki, nul pronoun çözünürlüyü üçün böyük ölçülü pseudo təhsil məlumatlarını otomatik olaraq yaratmaq üçün böyük təhsil təhsil məlumatla Daha sonra, kloz stili oxuyan nöral a ğ modelini nul çözünüş işinə göndərdik və pseudo təhsil məlumatının arasındakı boşluğu üstün etmək üçün iki adım təhsil mehanizmini təklif edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş metodların OntoNotes 5.0 verilənlərin 3.1% F-score ilə mütləq daha yaxşılıqlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'শুধুমাত্র সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য বেশীরভাগ বিদ্রোহীত উপায় নির্ভর করছে, যা প্রায়শ শেয়ার কর্মসূচীদের মুক্তি দেয়া হয়। যার ফলে বিরক্তিকর তথ্যের অভাব শুধুমাত্র সিদ্ধান্তের কাজের অগ্রগতিতে প্রধান বাধা হিসেবে পরিণত হয়। এছাড়াও, ভালো প্রদর্শনের জন্য তথ্য লেবেল করার জন্য মানুষের ক্ষমতা ব্যয় করার জন্য দাম। উপরের সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য, এই কাগজে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য একটি সাধারণ কিন্তু বর্ণ এছাড়াও, আমরা ক্লোজ-স্টাইলে সফলভাবে পাঠ করি সম্পূর্ণ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলটি শূন্য সিদ্ধান্তের কাজে পরিবর্তন করা এবং প্রযুক্তির প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প ব্যবস্থা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ব্যবস্থা প্রদর্শন করে যার ফলে অনটনোট ৫.', 'bs': 'Većina postojećih pristupa rezoluciji nule pronoun teško se oslanja na annotirane podatke, koje često objavljuju zajednički organizatori zadataka. Stoga nedostatak annotiranih podataka postaje velika prepreka u napretku zadatka rezolucije nule pronoun a. Također, skupo je potrošiti ljudsku moć na označavanju podataka za bolju izvršnost. Da bismo ublažili problem iznad toga, u ovom papiru predložili jednostavan ali novi pristup automatskom stvaranju velike pseudo obuke podataka za nulu rezoluciju pronoun. Osim toga, uspješno prebacujemo model razumijevanja neuralne mreže u zadatak rezolucije nule pronoun i predlažemo mehanizam treninga dva koraka kako bi prebacili prazninu između podataka pseudo obuke i pravih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava sa apsolutnom poboljšanjem 3,1% F-rezultata na podacima OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ca': "La majoria dels enfocaments existents per a resoldre res pronunciat s'estan molt basant en dades anotates, que sovint són alliberades per organitzadors compartits de tasques. Per tant, la manca de dades anotates esdevé un obstacle major en el progrés de la tasca de resolució zero pronunciada. També és cara gastar la mano en etiquetar les dades per a millor rendiment. Per aliviar el problem a d'arriba, en aquest paper, proposem un enfocament senzill però nou per generar automàticament dades de pseudo entrenament a gran escala per a resolució zero pronunciada. A més, vam transferir amb èxit el model de la xarxa neural de comprensió de lectura d'estil cloze en tasca de resolució de zero i vam proposar un mecanisme de formació de dos passos per superar la diferència entre les dades de pseudoformació i la real. Els resultats experimentals mostren que l'enfocament proposat supera significativament els sistemes més moderns amb una millora absoluta del 3,1% de puntuació F a les dades d'OntoNotes 5,0.", 'cs': 'Většina existujících přístupů k nulovému rozlišení zájmen se silně spoléhá na anotovaná data, která jsou často vydávána organizátory sdílených úkolů. Nedostatek anotovaných dat se proto stává hlavní překážkou v postupu úlohy nulového řešení zájmen. Také je drahé utrácet pracovní sílu na označování dat pro lepší výkon. Pro zmírnění výše uvedeného problému navrhujeme v tomto článku jednoduchý, ale nový přístup k automatickému generování velkých pseudo tréninkových dat pro nulové řešení zájmen. Dále úspěšně přenášíme model neuronové sítě cloze-style porozumění čtení do úlohy nulového rozlišení zájmen a navrhujeme dvoustupňový tréninkový mechanismus, který překoná mezeru mezi pseudotréninkovými daty a reálnými. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený přístup výrazně předčí nejmodernější systémy s absolutním zlepšením 3,1% F-skóre na údajích OntoNotes 5.0.', 'et': 'Enamik olemasolevaid lähenemisviise nullpoolse resolutsiooni jaoks tugineb suurel määral annoteeritud andmetele, mida sageli avaldavad jagatud ülesannete korraldajad. Seetõttu muutub märgitud andmete puudumine peamiseks takistuseks nullpoolse resolutsiooni ülesande edenemisel. Samuti on kulukas kulutada tööjõudu andmete märgistamisele parema jõudluse tagamiseks. Ülaltoodud probleemi leevendamiseks pakume käesolevas dokumendis välja lihtsa, kuid uudse lähenemisviisi, et automaatselt genereerida laiaulatuslikke pseudokoolitusandmeid nullpool resolutsiooniks. Lisaks kandsime me edukalt üle kloze-stiilis lugemise mõistmise neurovõrgu mudeli nullpronoomi resolutsiooni ülesandesse ja pakume välja kaheastmelise treeningmehhanismi, et ületada lõhe pseudotreeningu andmete ja reaalsete andmete vahel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid süsteeme, parandades absoluutselt 3,1% F-skoori OntoNotes 5.0 andmetel.', 'fi': 'Useimmat nykyiset lähestymistavat nollapronominin resoluutioon perustuvat suurelta osin annotoituihin tietoihin, jotka usein julkaistaan jaettujen tehtävien järjestäjien toimesta. Huomattujen tietojen puuttuminen on siis merkittävä este nollapronominin resoluutiotehtävän etenemiselle. Lisäksi on kallista käyttää työvoimaa tietojen merkitsemiseen paremman suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi. Edellä olevan ongelman lievittämiseksi ehdotamme tässä artikkelissa yksinkertaista mutta uutta lähestymistapaa, jolla luodaan automaattisesti laajamittaisia pseudoharjoitustietoja nollapronominin resoluutiota varten. Lisäksi siirrymme onnistuneesti cloze-tyylisen lukuymmärryksen neuroverkkomallin nollapronominin resoluutiotehtävään ja ehdotamme kaksivaiheista harjoitusmekanismia pseudoharjoitusdatan ja todellisen datan välisen kuilun poistamiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa on merkittävästi parempi kuin uusimmat järjestelmät, sillä OntoNotes 5.0 -tiedoissa on absoluuttinen parannus 3,1% F-score.', 'jv': 'Go Kaya, ora ono data anyari mbugal dadi wis ana dadi kanggo ngilangno nggawe gerakan ning ora ono Resolusi Nomo Mangkin, akeh luwih akeh mengkin kanggo nggawe layang beraksi dadi kanggo ngilangno ngono sing luwih apik. Mbok ngejarakke perkoro sing paling apik, ning kene dhéwé kuwi, nggunakake kuwi sadil karo nganggo dolanan sing otomatik ngejarakke pseudhakan kuwi ora bisa nguasakno Label Refirming', 'sk': 'Večina obstoječih pristopov za ničelno ločljivost zaimkov se močno opira na podatke z oznakami, ki jih pogosto izdajo organizatorji opravil v skupni rabi. Zato pomanjkanje označenih podatkov postane glavna ovira pri napredku opravila ničelne ločljivosti zaimkov. Prav tako je drago porabiti delovno silo za označevanje podatkov za boljšo učinkovitost. Za ublažitev zgoraj navedenega problema v tem prispevku predlagamo preprost, a nov pristop za samodejno ustvarjanje obsežnih psevdo podatkov o usposabljanju za ničelno ločljivost zaimkov. Poleg tega smo uspešno prenesli model nevronskega omrežja razumevanja bralnega sloga v nalogo ničelne ločljivosti zaimkov in predlagali dvostopenjski mehanizem usposabljanja za premagovanje vrzeli med psevdo podatki o treningu in resničnim. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani pristop bistveno presega najsodobnejše sisteme z absolutnimi izboljšavami 3,1% F-score na podatkih OntoNotes 5.0.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawan hanyõyin da ke ƙunsa wa buƙata na sifanci, sun yi ƙayyade kan data da aka yi wa zartar da shi, wanda ake sakar da shi ofte da mãsu haɗuwa da aikin aiki. Saboda haka, managin data da aka yi cũtarwa yana da wata hanzari mai girma a tafiyar da aikin da za'a bayyana shi ba. Kayya, ana fi kyauta a sami mutane a sami mutanen da za'a sami mutane. Domin sauƙi ga matsayin a saman, cikin wannan takarda, muna buƙata wata matsayi mai sauƙi, kuma amma yanzu zuwa ta ƙiƙiro hanyoyi wa ɗabi'a ɗabi'a ta ƙiƙiro data masu amfani da ɗin mai girma wa rabo na sifiri. Furan haka, muna saka misalin karatun-kullumai da ke karãtun karatun na ƙarfe zuwa misalin jerin neural zuwa wani aikin mai nuna wa'azi na sifuri kuma Muke buƙata wani mekanin wa muhalli na dabam-biyu dõmin ya rinjãye gakiya tsakanin danne na tsari na ɗin da gaskiyar. Matarin jarrabawa ya nuna cewa hanzarin da aka buƙata yana mai girma outta halin-na-the-art system da yana da gyãra mai cikakken gyaranta na 3.1% F-score kan OntoNotes 5.0.", 'he': 'רוב הגישויים הנוכחים לרזולוציה אפס תלויים בכבדות על נתונים מצוינים, אשר לעתים קרובות משוחררים על ידי מארגני משימות משותפים. לכן, חוסר נתונים מצוינים הופך למכשול גדול בהתקדמות של משימה פיתרון אפס. בנוסף, זה יקר להוציא כוח אדם על תיקון המידע עבור ביצועים טובים יותר. כדי להקל על הבעיה מעל, בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה פשוטה אבל חדשה כדי ליצור אוטומטית נתוני אימון פסודו בקנה מידה גדולה לפתרון אפס. Furthermore, we successfully transfer the cloze-style reading comprehension neural network model into zero pronoun resolution task and propose a two-step training mechanism to overcome the gap between the pseudo training data and the real one.  תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהגישה המוצעת יוצאת משמעות יותר ממערכות המיוחדות עם שיפור מוחלט של 3.1% נקודת F על נתונים OntoNotes 5.0.', 'bo': 'མིང དེར་བརྟེན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཕོག་སྟོན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་ཡང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཤིག་ཏུ་གཏོང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། སྐྱེས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་སྟངས་བཀལ་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་མིན་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད། འོག Furthermore, we successfully transfer the cloze-style reading comprehension neural network model into zero pronoun resolution task and propose a two-step training mechanism to overcome the gap between the pseudo training data and the real one. Experimental results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art systems with an absolute improvement of 3.1% F-score on OntoNotes 5.0 data.'}
{'en': 'Discourse Mode Identification in Essays', 'fr': 'Identification du mode discours dans les essais', 'pt': 'Identificação do Modo de Discurso em Ensaios', 'es': 'Identificación del modo discursivo en los ensayos', 'ar': 'تحديد وضع الخطاب في المقالات', 'zh': '论文语模式识别', 'hi': 'प्रवचन मोड निबंध में पहचान', 'ja': 'エッセイにおける論考モードの識別', 'ru': 'Идентификация режима дискурса в очерках', 'ga': 'Aithint Modh Dioscúrsa in Aistí', 'ka': 'დისკურსის რეჟიმის ინდიდიტიფიკაცია აღებში', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση τρόπου ομιλίας σε δοκίμια', 'hu': 'Beszédmód azonosítása esszékben', 'lt': 'Diskurso režimo identifikavimas bandymais', 'mk': 'Discourse Mode Identification in Essays', 'it': 'Identificazione della modalità Discorso nei saggi', 'kk': 'Іздеу режімінің идентификациясы', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni tal-Mod ta’ Diskors fl-Essays', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Mod Berlaku Dalam Ujian', 'ml': 'Discourse Mode Identification in Essays', 'no': 'Oppdagingsmodus- identifisering i Essays', 'mn': 'Хайлтын горим тодорхойлолт', 'ro': 'Identificarea modului discurs în eseuri', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja trybu dyskursu w esejach', 'sr': 'Identifikacija režima diskursa u Essays', 'si': 'ස්ථානයෙන් හොයාගන්න ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය', 'ta': 'எஸ்கீஸில் உள்ள வடிவ முறை அடையாளம்', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga qaabka heshiiska', 'sv': 'Identifiering av diskursläge i essäer', 'ur': 'ڈسکورس موڈ شناسایی اسٹیج میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm cách xác định trong Essays', 'nl': 'Identificatie van de discoursmodus in essays', 'bg': 'Идентификация на дискурсния режим в есетата', 'da': 'Identifikation af diskurstilstand i essays', 'hr': 'Identifikacija režima diskursa u Essays', 'de': 'Identifikation des Diskursmodus in Essays', 'id': 'Discourse Mode Identification in Essays', 'ko': '산문 중의 언어 패턴 식별', 'fa': 'شناسایی حالت صحبت در جامعه\u200cها', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa Utafiti katika Essays', 'af': 'Diskursie Modus Identifikasie in Essays', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i Modit të diskutimit në provë', 'tr': 'Legt', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Խոսագրելու ռեժի հայտնաբերումը փորձարկումներում', 'bn': 'Essay-এ ডিসার্স মোড পরিচয়', 'ca': 'Identificació del mód de discurs en els exàmens', 'az': 'Görüş Modu İşləndirici', 'bs': 'Identifikacija režima diskursa u Essays', 'cs': 'Identifikace diskurzního režimu v esejích', 'et': 'Diskurssrežiimi identifitseerimine essees', 'fi': 'Diskurssitilan tunnistus esseissä', 'sk': 'Identifikacija načina diskurza v esejih', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Discourse Mode Identification in Essays', 'jv': 'buddy', 'bo': 'བཅུད་དོན་ཐོག་པའི་རྣམ་པའི་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Discourse modes play an important role in writing composition and evaluation. This paper presents a study on the manual and automatic identification of narration, exposition, description, argument and emotion expressing sentences in narrative essays. We annotate a corpus to study the characteristics of discourse modes and describe a neural sequence labeling model for identification. Evaluation results show that discourse modes can be identified automatically with an average F1-score of 0.7. We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES). The impacts of discourse modes for AES are also discussed.', 'ar': 'تلعب أنماط الخطاب دورًا مهمًا في كتابة التأليف والتقييم. تقدم هذه الورقة دراسة حول التعريف اليدوي والآلي للسرد والعرض والوصف والحجة والعاطفة التي تعبر عن الجمل في المقالات السردية. قمنا بتعليق مجموعة لدراسة خصائص أنماط الخطاب ووصف نموذج تصنيف التسلسل العصبي لتحديد الهوية. تظهر نتائج التقييم أنه يمكن تحديد أوضاع الخطاب تلقائيًا بمتوسط درجة F1 يبلغ 0.7. نوضح كذلك أنه يمكن استخدام أوضاع الخطاب كميزات تعمل على تحسين تسجيل المقالات تلقائيًا (AES). وتناقش أيضا آثار أنماط الخطاب ل AES.', 'fr': "Les modes de discours jouent un rôle important dans la composition et l'évaluation de l'écriture. Cet article présente une étude sur l'identification manuelle et automatique de la narration, de l'exposition, de la description, de l'argumentation et de l'émotion exprimant des phrases dans des essais narratifs. Nous annotons un corpus pour étudier les caractéristiques des modes de discours et décrivons un modèle de marquage de séquences neuronales pour l'identification. Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent que les modes de discours peuvent être identifiés automatiquement avec un score F1 moyen de 0,7. Nous démontrons également que les modes de discours peuvent être utilisés comme fonctionnalités qui améliorent la notation automatique des dissertations (AES). Les impacts des modes de discours pour les AES sont également discutés.", 'es': 'Los modos de discurso desempeñan un papel importante en la composición y evaluación de la escritura. Este artículo presenta un estudio sobre la identificación manual y automática de frases de narración, exposición, descripción, argumento y expresión de emociones en ensayos narrativos. Anotamos un corpus para estudiar las características de los modos del discurso y describir un modelo de marcaje de secuencias neuronales para su identificación. Los resultados de la evaluación muestran que los modos de discurso se pueden identificar automáticamente con una puntuación F1 promedio de 0.7. Además, demostramos que los modos de discurso se pueden utilizar como características que mejoran la puntuación automática de ensayos (AES). También se discuten los impactos de los modos de discurso para AES.', 'pt': 'Os modos de discurso desempenham um papel importante na composição e avaliação da escrita. Este artigo apresenta um estudo sobre a identificação manual e automática de frases de narração, exposição, descrição, argumento e emoção em ensaios narrativos. Anotamos um corpus para estudar as características dos modos de discurso e descrevemos um modelo de rotulagem de sequência neural para identificação. Os resultados da avaliação mostram que os modos de discurso podem ser identificados automaticamente com um F1-score médio de 0,7. Demonstramos ainda que os modos de discurso podem ser usados como recursos que melhoram a pontuação automática de redação (AES). Os impactos dos modos de discurso para AES também são discutidos.', 'zh': '语模在文评中起有要用。 叙事性言、述、述、论、情、自动识别。 注一语料库以究语体,并叙识神经序。 论结果表明,语式可自动识别,均F1分为0.7。 臣等更证,语式可以改善自论文评分(AES)之功。 又论语言模式,AES相染染。', 'ru': 'Режимы дискурса играют важную роль в написании композиции и оценке. В данной статье представлено исследование по ручной и автоматической идентификации повествования,экспозиции, описания, аргументации и эмоций, выражающих предложения в повествовательных очерках. Мы аннотируем корпус для изучения характеристик режимов дискурса и описываем модель маркировки нейронной последовательности для идентификации. Результаты оценки показывают, что режимы дискурса могут быть идентифицированы автоматически со средним баллом F1 0,7. Мы далее демонстрируем, что режимы дискурса могут быть использованы в качестве функций, которые улучшают автоматическую оценку эссе (AES). Обсуждается также влияние режимов дискурса для AES.', 'ja': 'ディスコーズモードは、構成と評価を書く上で重要な役割を果たす。本稿では，物語エッセイにおける文章を表現するナレーション，説明，記述，議論，感情の手動および自動識別に関する研究を紹介する．私たちは、話題モードの特徴を研究するためにコーパスに注釈を付け、識別のための神経配列標識モデルを記述します。評価結果は、話題モードが平均F 1スコア0.7で自動的に識別できることを示しています。私たちはさらに、論述モードが自動小論文スコアリング（ AES ）を改善する機能として使用できることを実証します。また、AESに対する言説モードの影響についても考察した。', 'hi': 'प्रवचन मोड रचना और मूल्यांकन लिखने में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। यह पेपर कथा निबंधों में वाक्यों को व्यक्त करने वाले कथन, प्रदर्शनी, विवरण, तर्क और भावनाओं की मैनुअल और स्वचालित पहचान पर एक अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करता है। हम प्रवचन मोड की विशेषताओं का अध्ययन करने और पहचान के लिए एक तंत्रिका अनुक्रम लेबलिंग मॉडल का वर्णन करने के लिए एक कॉर्पस एनोटेट करते हैं। मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रवचन मोड को 0.7 के औसत F1-स्कोर के साथ स्वचालित रूप से पहचाना जा सकता है। हम आगे प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि प्रवचन मोड का उपयोग उन विशेषताओं के रूप में किया जा सकता है जो स्वचालित निबंध स्कोरिंग (एईएस) में सुधार करते हैं। एईएस के लिए प्रवचन मोड के प्रभावों पर भी चर्चा की जाती है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag modhanna dioscúrsa maidir le comhdhéanamh agus meastóireacht a scríobh. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair staidéar ar aithint láimhe agus uathoibríoch na haithrise, na nochta, na tuairisce, na hargóintí agus na mothúcháin a chuireann abairtí in aistí insinte in iúl. Déanaimid anótáil ar chorpas chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar thréithe modhanna dioscúrsa agus chun cur síos a dhéanamh ar shamhail lipéadaithe seicheamh néaraigh lena shainaithint. Léiríonn torthaí meastóireachta gur féidir modhanna dioscúrsa a aithint go huathoibríoch le meánscór F1 de 0.7. Léirímid freisin gur féidir modhanna dioscúrsa a úsáid mar ghnéithe a fheabhsaíonn scóráil uathoibríoch aistí (AES). Pléitear freisin an tionchar a bhíonn ag modhanna dioscúrsa ar AES.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési módok fontos szerepet játszanak a kompozíció és az értékelés írásában. A tanulmány bemutatja a narráció, expozíció, leírás, érvelés és érzelmek kifejezésének kézi és automatikus azonosítását narratív esszékben. Egy korpuszt jegyzetelünk a diskurzusmódok jellemzőinek tanulmányozására és egy neurális szekvencia címkézési modellt írunk le azonosításra. Az értékelési eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a diskurzusmódok automatikusan azonosíthatók egy átlagos F1 pontszámmal 0,7. Bemutatjuk továbbá, hogy a diskurzusmódok olyan funkcióként használhatók, amelyek javítják az automatikus esszé pontozást (AES). Az AES diskurzusmódjainak hatásait is megvitatjuk.', 'el': 'Οι τρόποι ομιλίας διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο στη συγγραφή της σύνθεσης και της αξιολόγησης. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια μελέτη για τον χειρωνακτικό και αυτόματο προσδιορισμό της αφήγησης, έκθεσης, περιγραφής, επιχειρηματολογίας και συναισθημάτων που εκφράζουν προτάσεις σε αφηγηματικά δοκίμια. Σχολιάζουμε ένα σώμα για να μελετήσουμε τα χαρακτηριστικά των τρόπων ομιλίας και περιγράφουμε ένα μοντέλο σήμανσης νευρωνικής ακολουθίας για αναγνώριση. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι οι τρόποι ομιλίας μπορούν να εντοπιστούν αυτόματα με ένα μέσο δείκτη F1 0,7. Επιδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω ότι οι τρόποι ομιλίας μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν ως χαρακτηριστικά που βελτιώνουν την αυτόματη βαθμολογία δοκίμων (ΑΕS). Επίσης συζητούνται οι επιπτώσεις των τρόπων ομιλίας για την ΑΕΣ.', 'it': "Le modalità di discorso svolgono un ruolo importante nella scrittura della composizione e della valutazione. Questo articolo presenta uno studio sull'identificazione manuale e automatica della narrazione, dell'esposizione, della descrizione, dell'argomento e dell'emozione esprimendo frasi in saggi narrativi. Annotamo un corpus per studiare le caratteristiche delle modalità di discorso e descrivere un modello di etichettatura della sequenza neurale per l'identificazione. I risultati della valutazione mostrano che le modalità di discorso possono essere identificate automaticamente con un punteggio F1 medio di 0,7. Dimostriamo inoltre che le modalità di discorso possono essere utilizzate come caratteristiche che migliorano il punteggio automatico dei saggi (AES). Vengono inoltre discussi gli impatti delle modalità di discorso per AES.", 'ka': 'დისკურსის რეჟიმი გასანიშვნელოვანი პროლის კომპოზიცია და განსაზღვრებაში იყო. ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს მანქანური და ავტომატური ინდენტიფიკაციის შესახებ, გამოსახულების, გამოსახულების, არგუმენტის და ემოციების გამოსახულების სიტყვების შესახებ. ჩვენ კორპუსს მონიტურებთ, რომ განვიცნობისთვის განსაკუთრებულ რეჟიმის პროგრატიკების განსაკუთრება და განსაკუთრებულია ნეიროლური წერტილების მოდელი. განსაზღვრებული შედეგი ჩვენებს, რომ დისკურსების რეჟიმი შეიძლება ავტომატურად იდენტიფიკაცია 0. 7- ის განსაზღვრებით. ჩვენ უფრო მეტად გამოყენებთ, რომ დისკურსური რეჟიმი შეიძლება გამოყენება როგორც ფუნქციები, რომლებიც ავტომატიკური ესესის სკურაციას ( AES-ის კოსურსების მოვლენების შემდეგ აღმოჩნდება.', 'kk': 'Дискурс режімдері композициялық және бағалау үшін маңызды роль орындалады. Бұл қағаз сөйлемелерді қолмен, автоматты түрде анықтау, көрсету, сипаттамасы, аргументті және емоцияларды оқиғаларда көрсетеді. Біз корпусты дискурс режімдерінің қасиеттерін зерттеп, идентификациялау үшін невралдық реттеу үлгісін анықтап береміз. Дискурстардың нәтижелері 0. 7 деген орташа F1- нәтижесімен автоматты түрде анықталмайды. Біз басқа дискурстардың режімдері автоматты ессей сұрауын (AES) жақсарту мүмкіндіктері ретінде қолданылатынын көрсетедік. АЕС үшін дискурстар режімдерінің әсері де талқылады.', 'mk': 'Режимите на дискурс играат важна улога во пишувањето на композицијата и евалуацијата. This paper presents a study on the manual and automatic identification of narration,exposition, description, argument and emotion expressing sentences in narrative essays.  Ние анотираме корпус за да ги проучуваме карактеристиките на дискурсните режими и да опишеме модел за идентификација на нервната секвенца. Резултатите од евалуацијата покажуваат дека дискурсните режими може да се идентификуваат автоматски со просечна оценка F1 од 0,7. We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES).  Исто така, се дискутира и влијанието на дискурсните режими за АЕС.', 'ms': 'Mod bercakap bermain peran penting dalam menulis komposisi dan penilaian. Kertas ini memperkenalkan kajian mengenai pengenalan manual dan automatik cerita, eksposisi, keterangan, argumen dan emosi yang mengekspresikan kalimat dalam esei cerita. Kami menyatakan sebuah korpus untuk mempelajari ciri-ciri mod pembicaraan dan menggambarkan model label urutan saraf untuk pengenalan. Hasil penilaian menunjukkan bahawa mod diskors boleh dikenalpasti secara automatik dengan nilai F1 rata-rata 0.7. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa mod diskors boleh digunakan sebagai ciri-ciri yang meningkatkan skor esai automatik (AES). Kesan mod diskors untuk AES juga dibahas.', 'mt': 'Il-modi ta’ diskors għandhom rwol importanti fil-kompożizzjoni bil-miktub u l-evalwazzjoni. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta studju dwar l-identifikazzjoni manwali u awtomatika ta’ narrazzjoni, espożizzjoni, deskrizzjoni, argument u emozzjoni li jesprimu sentenzi f’essaji narrattivi. Aħna nnotaw korpus biex nistudjaw il-karatteristiċi tal-modi ta’ diskors u niddeskrivu mudell ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza newrali għall-identifikazzjoni. Evaluation results show that discourse modes can be identified automatically with an average F1-score of 0.7.  Aħna nippruvaw ukoll li l-modi ta’ diskors jistgħu jintużaw bħala karatteristiċi li jtejbu l-punteġġ awtomatiku tal-essay (AES). L-impatti tal-modi ta’ diskors għall-AES huma diskussi wkoll.', 'ml': 'ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് മോഡുകള്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതിന്റെയും വിലാസങ്ങളിലും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ്ക് കളിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന കൈകൊണ്ടും സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെയും സ്വയമായി പരിചയപ് സംസാര ര രീതികളുടെ സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസിനെ പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ഒരു പ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന മോഡുകള്\u200d സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയായി എഫ്\u200c1- സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 7- ല്\u200d നിന്നും കാണിക്കുന്നു സംസാരിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d സ്വയം എസ്സ് സ്കോര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിശേഷങ്ങളായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന എസിന്റെ സംസാര ര രീതികളുടെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളും സംസാരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Дууссан хэлбэрүүд бичих болон үнэлгээнд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Энэ цаас нь өгүүлэлт, илэрхийлэл, тайлбарлалт, аргумент, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өгүүлэлт дээр илэрхийлэх өгүүллийг гарын, автоматик тодорхойлолтын тухай судалгааг харуулдаг. Бид корпус илтгэл загварын чанарыг судалж, мэдрэлийн дарааллын загварыг тодорхойлдог. Дүгнэлтийн үр дүнд дундаж F1-тоо 0.7-тэй автоматаар тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид дахиад хэлэлцүүлэх загварууд автоматик эссийн сүлжээг (AES) сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. AES-ын ярианы төрлийн нөлөөлөл мөн ярилцдаг.', 'no': 'Speler ein viktig rolle i skriving av samtale og evaluering. Denne papiret viser ein studie om manuelt og automatisk identifisering av narrasjon, eksponering, beskriving, argument og emosjon som uttrykker setningar i narrativ essay. Vi annoterar ein korpus for å studera karakteristikaren av diskursmodus og beskriva ein neuralsekvensmerkelapp for identifikasjon. Evalueringsresultat viser at diskursmodus kan identifiserast automatisk med gjennomsnittsfarge med 0, 7. Vi viser meir at diskursmodus kan brukast som funksjonar som forbedrar automatisk essessorskjering (AES). Utviklingane av diskursmodus for AES er også diskutert.', 'pl': 'Tryby dyskusji odgrywają ważną rolę w pisaniu kompozycji i oceny. W artykule przedstawiono badanie nad ręczną i automatyczną identyfikacją narracji, ekspozycji, opisu, argumentu i emocji wyrażających zdania w esejach narracyjnych. Opisujemy korpus, aby zbadać charakterystykę trybów dyskursu i opisać model etykietowania sekwencji neuronowej do identyfikacji. Wyniki oceny pokazują, że tryby dyskursu można zidentyfikować automatycznie przy średnim wyniku F1 0,7. Ponadto pokazujemy, że tryby dyskursu mogą być wykorzystywane jako funkcje poprawiające automatyczne oceny esejów (AES). Omówiono również wpływ trybów dyskursu na AES.', 'ro': 'Modurile de discurs joacă un rol important în scrierea compoziției și evaluării. Lucrarea prezintă un studiu privind identificarea manuală și automată a narațiunii, expunerii, descrierii, argumentului și exprimării emoțiilor propozițiilor în eseuri narative. Adnotăm un corpus pentru a studia caracteristicile modurilor de discurs și pentru a descrie un model de etichetare a secvențelor neurale pentru identificare. Rezultatele evaluării arată că modurile de discurs pot fi identificate automat cu un scor mediu F1 de 0,7. De asemenea, demonstrăm că modurile de discurs pot fi folosite ca caracteristici care îmbunătățesc scorul automat al eseurilor (AES). Impactul modurilor de discurs pentru AES sunt, de asemenea, discutate.', 'lt': 'Diskusijos būdai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį rašant sudėtį ir vertinimą. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas tyrimas dėl rašytinių egzaminų rašymo, parodymo, aprašymo, argument ų ir emocijų, išreiškiančių sakinius, nustatymo rankiniu ir automatiniu būdu. We annotate a corpus to study the characteristics of discourse modes and describe a neural sequence labeling model for identification.  Vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad diskurso režimai gali būti nustatyti automatiškai, o vidutinis F1 balas yra 0,7. Be to, įrodome, kad diskurso režimai gali būti naudojami kaip savybės, gerinančios automatinį egzaminų vertinimą (AES). The impacts of discourse modes for AES are also discussed.', 'si': 'හොයාගන්න විදියට වැදගත් භාවිතාවක් ලියන්න සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ කරනවා. මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තියෙනවා කතාවය, ප්\u200dරදේශනය, විස්තරණය, වාර්තාවය සහ භාවිතාවය සම්බන්ධ කතාවයේ ප්\u200dරදේශනය සහ ස් අපි කෝර්පුස් එකක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කතාවක් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරාල ක්\u200dරමයක් ලේබිල් ම විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා කතා විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම F1- ප්\u200dරත අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ කතාවක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ස්කෝරින් විශේෂ AEට කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'sr': 'Režimi diskursa imaju važnu ulogu u pisanju kompozicije i procjeni. Ovaj papir predstavlja studiju o ručnom i automatskom identifikaciji priče, izloženosti, opisu, argumentu i emocijama koji izražavaju rečenice u priče. Notiramo korpus da prouči karakteristike režima diskursa i opišemo model označavanja neuralne sekvence za identifikaciju. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da se režimi diskursa automatski identifikuju s prosječnim F1 rezultatima 0,7. Dalje pokazujemo da se režimi diskursa mogu iskoristiti kao karakteristike koje poboljšavaju automatski osvajanje (AES). Takođe se raspravljaju utjecaj režima diskursa za AES.', 'sv': 'Diskurslägen spelar en viktig roll i skrivandet av komposition och utvärdering. Denna uppsats presenterar en studie om manuell och automatisk identifiering av berättande, exposition, beskrivning, argument och känslor uttryckande meningar i narrativa essäer. Vi kommenterar en korpus för att studera egenskaperna hos diskurslägen och beskriva en neural sekvensmärkningsmodell för identifiering. Utvärderingsresultat visar att diskurslägen kan identifieras automatiskt med en genomsnittlig F1-poäng på 0,7. Vi visar vidare att diskurslägen kan användas som funktioner som förbättrar automatisk uppsatspoäng (AES). Effekterna av diskurssätt för AES diskuteras också.', 'so': 'Noocyada baaritaanku waxay leeyihiin qayb muhiim ah oo ku qoran qoraalka sameynta iyo qiimeynta. Qoraalkan waxaa lagu qoraa waxbarasho ku saabsan aqoonsiga qoraalka, caddeynta, warqadda, dooda iyo fikradda oo ku qoran qoraal taariikhda. Waxaynu sharciga ku qornaa qaababka hadalka si aan u barano qaababka hadalka, waxaana u qornaa tusaale baaritaanka neurada ee aqoonsiga. Midhaha kaartaynta waxaa laga muujin karaa in qaababka hadalka lagu aqoonsan karo iskuulka F1-kooxda 0.7. We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES).  AES waxaa sidoo kale saamayn loogu talagalay qaababka hadalka.', 'ta': 'வடிவமைப்பு முறைகள் எழுதுதல் மற்றும் மதிப்பீட்டில் முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. இந்த தாள் கைமுறையாக மற்றும் தானாகவே அறிவிப்பு, வெளிப்பாடு, விவரிப்பு, தருமதி மற்றும் உணர்வு வாக்கியங்களை கூறும் சொல்லும்  பேச்சு வகைகளின் தன்மைகளை படிப்பதற்கு நாம் ஒரு குறியீட்டை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் அடையாளத்திற்கான ஒரு புதிய வரிசை வரிசை பேச்சு வகைகளை தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் என்பதை பார்க்கவும் சராசரி F1- score of 0. 7. நாம் மேலும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பேச்சு வகைகள் தானியங்கி எழுத்து மதிப்பை மேம்படுத்தும் தன்னியக்கமாக பயன்படுத்தும்  AES-க்கான பேச்சு வகைகளின் விளைவுகளும் விவாதத்தில் கொண்டிருக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'محاسبہ موڈ لکھنے اور ارزیابی میں ایک اہم رول لکھتے ہیں. یہ کاغذ کاغذ تعریف، تعریف، توضیح، دلیل اور احساسات کے ذریعہ ایک مطالعہ کی تعریف کرتا ہے جو مطالعہ کے مطالعہ کے ذریعہ اور اتوماتیک تعریف کے ذریعہ ہے. ہم ایک کورپوس کو اظہار دیتے ہیں کہ بحث موڈ کے خصوصے پڑھے اور پہچان کرنے کے لئے نئورل سطح لابلینگ موڈل کو توصیح دیتے ہیں. ارزیابی نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ڈیکورس موڈز 0.7 کے متوسط F1-اسکور کے ساتھ اپنا معلوم کر سکتے ہیں. ہم اس سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ صحبت موڈ کو اٹوٹ سئی سکونگ (AES) کے ساتھ استعمال کر سکتے ہیں۔ AES کے مطابق صحبت کے مطابق بھی جھگڑے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu qog\xa0Ľoz ta\xa0ľminotni qo\xa0Ľlbola va avtomatik ravishda aniqlash, ta\xa0ľrifi, ta\xa0ľrif, argumentlar va hissiyotni tahrirlash mumkin. Biz suhbat usullarning xususiyatlarini o'rganish va identifikatsiya uchun neyural seksiyatli modelini anglatamiz. @ info We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES).  AES uchun gapiruvchi usullarning effektlari ham boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Các chế độ Discourse đóng vai trò quan trọng trong việc ghi lại cấu trúc và đánh giá. Tờ giấy này cung cấp một nghiên cứu về sách hướng dẫn và tự động nhận dạng thuật ngữ, trình bày, mô tả, tranh luận và cảm xúc diễn tả trong các bài văn. Chúng tôi ghi chú vào một tập thể để nghiên cứu các đặc trưng của các chế độ ngôn ngữ và mô tả mô hình phân tích dây thần kinh để nhận dạng. Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy các chế độ ngôn ngữ có thể được xác định tự động với điểm số trung bình F1 của 0.7. Chúng tôi còn chứng minh rằng các chế độ ngôn ngữ có thể được dùng như các tính năng nâng cao độ ghi bằng văn bản tự động (AES). Tác động của các chế độ thuyết trình của AES cũng được thảo luận.', 'nl': 'Discoursmodi spelen een belangrijke rol bij het schrijven van compositie en evaluatie. Dit artikel presenteert een studie over de handmatige en automatische identificatie van vertelling, belichting, beschrijving, argument en emotie expressie zinnen in narratieve essays. We annoteren een corpus om de kenmerken van discoursmodi te bestuderen en beschrijven een neurale sequentie labeling model voor identificatie. Uit evaluatieresultaten blijkt dat discoursmodi automatisch kunnen worden geïdentificeerd met een gemiddelde F1-score van 0,7. We tonen verder aan dat discoursmodi kunnen worden gebruikt als functies die automatische essay scoren (AES) verbeteren. Ook de effecten van discoursmodi voor AES worden besproken.', 'da': 'Diskurstilstande spiller en vigtig rolle i skrivning af komposition og evaluering. Denne artikel præsenterer en undersøgelse af manuel og automatisk identifikation af fortælling, eksponering, beskrivelse, argument og følelsesudtrykkende sætninger i narrative essays. Vi annoterer et korpus for at studere karakteristika ved diskurstilstande og beskrive en neural sekvensmærkningsmodel til identifikation. Evalueringsresultater viser, at diskurstilstande automatisk kan identificeres med en gennemsnitlig F1-score på 0,7. Vi demonstrerer endvidere, at diskurstilstande kan bruges som funktioner, der forbedrer automatisk essay scoring (AES). Effekterne af diskurstilstande for AES diskuteres også.', 'bg': 'Режимите на дискурса играят важна роля в писането на композицията и оценката. Настоящата статия представя изследване на ръчното и автоматично идентифициране на изречения, експозиция, описание, аргументи и емоции, изразяващи изречения в разказателни есета. Анотираме корпус за изследване на характеристиките на дискурсните режими и описваме модел за етикетиране на невронни последователности за идентификация. Резултатите от оценката показват, че дискурсните режими могат да бъдат идентифицирани автоматично със средна оценка от 0,7. Освен това демонстрираме, че дискурсните режими могат да се използват като функции, които подобряват автоматичното оценяване на есе (ЕЙ). Обсъждат се и въздействието на дискурсните режими за ЕЙ И ЕС.', 'hr': 'Režimi diskursa imaju važnu ulogu u pisanju sastanka i procjene. Ovaj papir predstavlja studiju o ručnom i automatskom identifikaciji priče, izloženosti, opisu, argumentu i emocijama koji izražavaju rečenice u priče. Notiramo korpusa kako bi proučavali karakteristike režima diskursa i opisali model označavanja neuralne sekvence za identifikaciju. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da se režimi diskusija mogu automatski identificirati s prosječnim F1 rezultatom od 0,7. Dalje pokazujemo da se režimi diskusija mogu iskoristiti kao karakteristike koje poboljšavaju automatski izvlačenje eseja (AES). Također se raspravljaju utjecaj režima diskursa za AES.', 'id': 'Mod diskursus bermain peran penting dalam menulis komposisi dan evaluasi. Kertas ini mempersembahkan sebuah studi tentang identifikasi manual dan otomatis cerita, eksposisi, deskripsi, argumen dan emosi yang mengekspresikan kalimat dalam esei cerita. Kami menyatakan sebuah korpus untuk mempelajari karakteristik mode diskors dan menggambarkan sebuah model label urutan saraf untuk identifikasi. Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa mode diskors dapat dikenal secara otomatis dengan nilai F1 rata-rata 0,7. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa mode diskors dapat digunakan sebagai fitur yang meningkatkan skor esai otomatis (AES). Impak dari mode diskors untuk AES juga didiskusikan.', 'de': 'Diskursmodi spielen eine wichtige Rolle beim Schreiben von Komposition und Evaluation. Diese Arbeit stellt eine Studie zur manuellen und automatischen Identifikation von Erzählung, Exposition, Beschreibung, Argumentation und Emotion in narrativen Essays vor. Wir kommentieren einen Korpus, um die Eigenschaften von Diskursmodi zu untersuchen und beschreiben ein neuronales Sequenzmodell zur Identifikation. Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen, dass Diskursmodi mit einem durchschnittlichen F1-Score von 0,7 automatisch identifiziert werden können. Weiterhin zeigen wir, dass Diskursmodi als Features genutzt werden können, die das automatische Essay-Scoring (AES) verbessern. Auch die Auswirkungen von Diskursmodi auf AES werden diskutiert.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa maneno unacheza jukumu muhimu katika kuandika ujenzi na kutathmini. Makala hii inaonyesha utafiti kuhusu utambulisho wa mkono na kujitegemea wa habari, maelezo, maelezo, hoja na hisia zinazoelezea hukumu katika mafunzo ya simulizi. Tunatangaza makampuni ya kutafiti sifa za namna za mazungumzo na kuelezea modeli ya utambulisho wa neura. Matokeo ya uthibitisho yanaonyesha kuwa namna za mazungumzo yanaweza kutambuliwa automatically kwa kiwango cha wastani cha F1 cha 0.7. Tunaonyesha zaidi kuwa namna za mazungumzo inaweza kutumika kama vipengele vinavyoweza kuboresha kurasa za fasihi za kujitegemea (AES). Matokeo ya namna za mazungumzo kwa AES pia yanajadiliwa.', 'tr': "Gezgini çykmak we çykarmak üçin wajyp roli oýnap. Bu kagyz sözleri kellän we otomatik bilen a ýdyşy, görüntüleme, tassyýa, argüm we duýgular hakynda sözleriň kelläni aýdyşy bilen okaýar. Biz bir korpusu tartışma modlerinin özelliklerini öğrenmek için Annotate and describe a neural sequence labelling model for identification. Ýardamçylyk netijesi diskurs modleri 0.7'iň orta sany bilen otomatik tanap biljekdigini görkez. Biz indi diskusiýa modleri otomatik essaýy golaýyny geliştirmek üçin ullanylabilir. AES üçin diskusiýa taryşyklaryň etkisi hem gepleşýär.", 'sq': 'Modalitetet e diskutimit luajnë një rol të rëndësishëm në shkrimin e përbërjes dhe vlerësimit. Ky dokument paraqet një studim mbi identifikimin manual dhe automatik të tregimit, ekspozimit, përshkrimit, argumentit dhe emocioneve që shprehin fjalë në esej treguese. Ne anotojmë një korpus për të studiuar karakteristikat e modaliteteve të diskursit dhe për të përshkruar një modelin e shënimit të sekuencës nervore për identifikimin. Rezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë se modalitetet diskursore mund të identifikohen automatikisht me një rezultat mesatar F1 0.7. Ne demonstrojmë më tej se modalitetet diskursore mund të përdoren si funksione që përmirësojnë shënimin automatik të eseve (AES). Ndikimet e modaliteteve diskursore për AES diskutohen gjithashtu.', 'af': "Speel 'n belangrike rol in skryf opstelling en evaluering. Hierdie papier stel 'n studie op die handboek en outomatiese identifikasie van verkondiging, eksponisie, beskrywing, argument en emosie wat uitdruk setinge in verkondigings. Ons annoteer 'n korpus om die karakteristieke van diskurse modus te onderskryf en beskryf 'n neurale volgorde etiketting model vir identifikasie. Evalueer resultate vertoon dat diskursie modus outomaties kan wees identifiseer met 'n gemiddelde F1- telling van 0. 7. Ons vertoon verder dat diskursie modus gebruik kan word as funksies wat automatiese essy skoring (AES) verbeter. Die impakte van diskurse modus vir AES word ook gespreek.", 'ko': '언어 모델은 작문과 평가에서 중요한 역할을 한다.본고는 서사 산문 중의 서술문, 논술문, 묘사문, 논증문과 감정표현문의 인공식별과 자동식별에 대해 연구를 진행하였다.우리는 표기 어료 라이브러리를 통해 언어 모델의 특징을 연구하고 식별에 사용되는 신경 서열 표기 모델을 묘사했다.평가 결과 이 방법은 자동적으로 언어 패턴을 식별할 수 있어 F1은 평균 0.7점으로 나타났다.우리는 언어 패턴이 자동작문 평점(AES)을 높이는 특징이 될 수 있음을 한층 더 증명했다.AES에 대한 언어 패턴의 영향에 대해 논의했습니다.', 'hy': 'Դեսուրսը կարևոր դեր է խաղում կառուցվածքի և գնահատման գրման մեջ: Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ուսումնասիրություն պատմությունների, արտահայտությունների, նկարագրությունների, բանավեճերի և զգացմունքների ձեռավարական և ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման մասին պատմություններում: Մենք նկարագրում ենք մարմին, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք խոսակցության մեդի առանձնահատկությունները և նկարագրենք նյարդային հաջորդականության նշանակման մոդել: Արժեքի արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ խոսակցության մոդելները կարող են ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերվել 0.7 միջին F1-գնահատականով: We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES).  ԱԵՍ-ի դեպքում քննարկվում են նաև խոսակցության մեթոդների ազդեցությունները:', 'am': "መልዕክት ይህም ገጽ በተሪካ ትምህርት ቋንቋዎች፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ ትርጓሜ፣ ክርክር እና እውቀት በሚናገሩት ገጽ በሐሳብ እና በራሱ ማውቀት ላይ የሚያሳውቀውን ትምህርት ያሳያል፡፡ የንግግር መልዕክቶችን ለማስተምር እና ለግንኙነት የደዌብ የጽሑፍ ማተሚያ model እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s We further demonstrate that discourse modes can be used as features that improve automatic essay scoring (AES).  የአሜሪካ ሥርዓት ላይ የንግግር ሥርዓት ደግሞ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡", 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای گفتگو نقش مهمی در نوشتن و ارزیابی دارند. این کاغذ یک مطالعه در مورد شناسایی دستی و اتوماتیک داستان، توضیح، توضیح، دلیل و احساسات که جمله\u200cها را در داستان\u200cهای داستان نشان می\u200cدهند را نشان می\u200cدهد. ما یک کورپوس را مشخص می\u200cکنیم تا ویژگی\u200cهایی از راه\u200cهای گفتگو را مطالعه کند و یک مدل نقاشی نوری برای شناسایی توصیف می\u200cکنیم. نتایج ارزیابی نشان می\u200cدهد که راه\u200cهای گفتگو می\u200cتوانند با نمونه\u200cهای متوسط F1 از 0.7 خودکار شناسایی شوند. ما هم نشان می دهیم که مدت صحبت می تواند به عنوان ویژه\u200cهایی استفاده شود که آزمایش\u200cهای خودکار را بهتر می\u200cکند. تاثیرات روش صحبت برای AES هم در مورد صحبت می\u200cشوند.', 'az': "Səfv moduları yazmaq və değerlendirməkdə möhüm rol oynayır. Bu kağıt, sözlərin əlavə və avtomatik təsdiqlənməsi haqqında bir təhsil göstərir. Biz bir korpusu danışmaq modunun xüsusiyyətlərini öyrənmək və tanımlamaq üçün nöral sequence etiketləmə modelini təsdiqləyirik. Qıymet sonuçları müəyyən edir ki, diskurs modları 0.7'in ortalama F1 dəyişdirilməsi ilə avtomatik olaraq tanınabilir. Biz daha da göstəririk ki, söhbət moduları automatik essay scoring (AES) ilə təmizlənən fərqli olaraq istifadə edilə bilər. AES üçün müzakirə metodların də müzakirə edilir.", 'bn': 'Discourse modes play an important role in writing composition and evaluation.  এই প্রবন্ধে একটি গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করা হয়েছে বিস্তারিত ভাষায় যারা বাক্য প্রকাশ করেছে তাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয় এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় পরিচিতির কথোপকথন মোডের চরিত্র পড়ার জন্য আমরা একটি কোর্পাসের বিষয়টিকে উল্লেখ করি এবং পরিচয়ের জন্য নিউরেল সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং মডেল বর্ণনা  পরিবর্তনের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে কথোপকথন মোড স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত করা যাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ০. ৭ স্কোর দ্বারা। আমরা আরো প্রদর্শন করি যে কথোপকথন মোড ব্যবহার করা যাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পাঠানোর স্কোরের (এয়েস)। এয়েসের কথোপকথন মোডের প্রভাব নিয়ে আলোচনা করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Diskusní režimy hrají důležitou roli při psaní kompozice a hodnocení. Příspěvek představuje studii o manuální a automatické identifikaci vyprávění, expozice, popisu, argumentu a emocí vyjadřujících věty v narativních esejích. Anotujeme korpus ke studiu charakteristik diskurzních režimů a popisujeme model značení neuronové sekvence pro identifikaci. Výsledky hodnocení ukazují, že diskurzní režimy lze identifikovat automaticky s průměrným F1 skóre 0,7. Dále ukazujeme, že diskurzní režimy mohou být použity jako funkce, které zlepšují automatické skórování esejů (AES). Dále jsou diskutovány dopady diskurzních režimů na AES.', 'bs': 'Režimi diskursa imaju važnu ulogu u pisanju kompozicije i procjeni. Ovaj papir predstavlja studiju o ručnom i automatskom identifikaciji priče, izloženosti, opisu, argumentu i emocijama koji izražavaju rečenice u priče. Napisamo korpus da prouči karakteristike režima diskursa i opisujemo model označavanja neuralne sekvence za identifikaciju. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da se modi diskursa mogu automatski identificirati s prosječnim F1 rezultatom 0,7. Dalje pokazujemo da se režimi diskursa mogu iskoristiti kao karakteristike koje poboljšavaju automatski izvlačenje eseja (AES). Također se raspravljaju utjecaj režima diskursa za AES.', 'ca': "Els mods de discurs juguen un paper important en l'escriptura de la composició i l'evaluació. Aquest article presenta un estudi sobre l'identificació manual i automàtica de la narració, exposició, descripció, arguments i emocions expressant frases en essais narrativs. Anotem un cos per estudiar les característiques dels mods de discurs i descriure un model d'etiqueta de seqüència neuronal per identificar-se. Els resultats de l'evaluació mostran que els mods de discurs es poden identificar automàticament amb una puntuació F1 mitjana de 0,7. Ens demostrem que els mods de discurs poden utilitzar com a característiques que milloren la puntuació automàtica dels assaig (AES). També es discuten els impactes dels mods de discurs de l'AES.", 'et': 'Diskursuse režiimid mängivad olulist rolli kompositsiooni ja hindamise kirjutamisel. Käesolev töö tutvustab jutustuse, ekspositsiooni, kirjelduse, argumentide ja emotsioonide käsitsi ja automaatset identifitseerimist narratiivsetes esseetes. Anoteerime korpuse, et uurida diskursusrežiimide omadusi ja kirjeldada neurojada märgistamise mudelit identifitseerimiseks. Hindamise tulemused näitavad, et diskursusrežiime saab automaatselt tuvastada keskmise F1-skooriga 0,7. Lisaks näitame, et diskursuse režiime saab kasutada funktsioonidena, mis parandavad automaatset essee skoorimist (AES). Arutatakse ka aruteluviiside mõju AESi jaoks.', 'fi': 'Diskurssitavoilla on tärkeä rooli säveltämisen ja arvioinnin kirjoittamisessa. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään tutkimus kerronnan, eksposiation, kuvauksen, argumentin ja tunteiden ilmaisulauseiden manuaalisesta ja automaattisesta tunnistamisesta narratiivisissa esseissä. Annotoimme korpusen tutkiaksemme diskurssimuotojen ominaisuuksia ja kuvaamaan neurosekvenssin merkintämallia tunnistamista varten. Arviointitulokset osoittavat, että diskurssitilat voidaan tunnistaa automaattisesti keskimääräisellä F1-pisteellä 0,7. Lisäksi osoitamme, että diskurssimuotoja voidaan käyttää ominaisuuksina, jotka parantavat automaattista esseen pisteytystä (AES). Keskustelussa käsitellään myös keskustelutapojen vaikutuksia AES:ään.', 'sk': 'Načini diskurza imajo pomembno vlogo pri pisanju kompozicije in vrednotenju. V prispevku je predstavljena študija ročne in avtomatske identifikacije pripovedovanja, izpostavljanja, opisa, argumentov in čustev, ki izražajo stavke v pripovedovalnih esejih. Opisujemo korpus za preučevanje značilnosti diskurznih načinov in opis modela označevanja nevronskega zaporedja za identifikacijo. Rezultati vrednotenja kažejo, da je mogoče načine diskurza samodejno identificirati s povprečnim rezultatom F1 0,7. Dodatno dokazujemo, da se diskurzni načini lahko uporabljajo kot funkcije, ki izboljšajo avtomatsko ocenjevanje esejev (AES). Obravnavani so tudi učinki diskurzivnih načinov za AES.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Perintah iki gunakake karo akeh stirip kanggo ngawe manut lan penyandigowisi otomatik kanggo nguasara, nggambaran, pawarno karo empresan sing nggawe barang kelas nang titipun apakno. Anyone bookmark Awak dhéwé éntukno ngono nggawe modo Diskurasi iki dipoleh kanggo ngerasai perusahaan maneh dumadhi tarjamahan (AESS). gagal menehi iki bakal luwih dumadhi kanggo AESa iki dadi.', 'ha': "Tsarin Farawa na yi amfani da kima mai muhimu a cikin rubutun da yin takarda. Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani fitina kan shaidar da hannun aiki da farat ɗaya da ke faɗi, shirin ayuka, buƙata, buƙata, da takarda da hisani da ke cikin fassarar lãbãrai. Tuna sanar da wani nau'in da za'a karanta karatun masu tsarin ayuka da ake yi wa magana kuma mu bayyana wani misãlin mai rubutun neural wa zafi. @ info: status Tuna ƙara bayani, za'a iya amfani da shirin ayukan ayuka kamar misalin mutane da ke canza tsarin littafan farat ɗaya (AES). Haƙĩƙa, an yi musu musamman da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka na AES.", 'he': 'מצבי דיסקורס משחקים תפקיד חשוב בכתיבה של מייצב ובערכה. העיתון הזה מציג מחקר על הזהות הידית והאוטומטית של סיפור, חשיפה, תיאור, טיעון ורגשות שמביעים משפטים במאמרים סיפורים. אנו מצביעים על קורפוס כדי ללמוד את האופיינים של מצבי דיבור ולתיאר דוגמא תווית רצף עצבי לזהות. תוצאות הערכה מראות שאפשר לזהות אוטומטית את מצבי דיבורים עם ציון F1 ממוצע של 0.7. אנו גם מראים שדרכים דיבורים יכולים להשתמש בתור תכונות שמשתפר את נקודת המאמרים האוטומטית (AES). השפעות של מצבי דיבור עבור AES גם נדון.', 'bo': 'སྙིགས་སྣོད་མ་དབྱིབས་འབྲི་རིམ་དང་རྩིས་ཐང་ནང་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་ཁག་ཅིག་གཏོང་བ This paper presents a study on the manual and automatic identification of narration,exposition, description, argument and emotion expressing sentences in narrative essays. We annotate a corpus to study the characteristics of discourse modes and describe a neural sequence labeling model for identification. དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་འོད་སྡུད་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ངོས་འཛིན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་ཚད་0.7 ཡི་གྲངས ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་བཤེར་ཚད་ལྟར་སྟངས་པར་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པའི་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་པ་ལས། AES ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཚོའི་གནོད་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འབད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deep Neural Machine Translation with Linear Associative Unit', 'ar': 'ترجمة الآلة العصبية العميقة مع الوحدة الترابطية الخطية', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal profunda con unidad asociativa lineal', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale profonde avec unité associative linéaire', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural profunda com unidade associativa linear', 'ja': '線形結合ユニットを備えた深層神経機械翻訳', 'zh': '有线性关单元深度神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Глубокий нейронный машинный перевод с линейным ассоциативным блоком', 'hi': 'रैखिक साहचर्य इकाई के साथ गहरी तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Deep Neural le Aonad Líneach Comhthiomsaitheach', 'ka': 'ძალიან ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასაგრძელება Linear Associative Unit- ით', 'el': 'Βαθιά νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση με γραμμική συσχετιστική μονάδα', 'hu': 'Mélyidegi gépi fordítás lineáris asszociatív egységgel', 'lt': 'Gilus neurologinis mašinos vertimas linijiniu asocijaciniu vienetu', 'kk': 'Сызықты ассоциативті бірлігімен түйінгі невралдық машинаның аударуы', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale profonda con unità associativa lineare', 'ml': 'ലൈനൈല്\u200d സസ്റ്റീവ് യൂണിറ്റിനുമായി ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mk': 'Deep Neural Machine Translation with Linear Associative Unit', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural Dalam Dengan Unit Assosiatif Linear', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni profonda tal-Magna Newrali b’Unit à Assoċjattiva Lineari', 'mn': 'Гүнзгий мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө шугам холбоотой нэгжтэй', 'pl': 'Głębokie neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe z liniową jednostką asocjacyjną', 'no': 'Djupne neuralmaskineomsetjing med lineær assosiativ eining', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală profundă cu unitate asociativă liniară', 'si': 'ලිනියර් සමාධික එක්කයෙන් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය', 'so': 'Turjubaan deegaan ee mashiinka Neural la xiriira ururka Linear', 'sr': 'Duboka neuronska prevoda sa linarnom asocijativnom jedinicom', 'ur': 'لینیر شرکت یونیٹ کے ساتھ عمیق نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'sv': 'Djupneural maskinöversättning med linjär associativ enhet', 'ta': 'Linear Associative Unit உடன் ஆழமான புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch sâu máy thần kinh với đơn vị giống tuyến', 'da': 'Dyb neural maskinoversættelse med lineær associativ enhed', 'hr': 'Duboka neuronska prevoda s linearnom asocijativnom jedinicom', 'nl': 'Diepe neurale machinevertaling met lineaire associatieve eenheid', 'bg': 'Дълбок неврален машинен превод с линейна асоциативна единица', 'de': 'Tiefe neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit linearer assoziativer Einheit', 'id': 'Transliasi Mesin Neural Dalam Dengan Unit Assosiatif Linear', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی عمیق با واحد مشترک خط', 'ko': '선형 연상 단원을 가진 심층 신경', 'tr': 'Hat Ortaky Birliki bilen gaty Neural Maşynyň terjimesi', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kichini na Kitengo cha Chama cha Linear', 'af': 'Deep Neurale Masjien Vertaling met Linear Associative Unit', 'am': 'Translation with Linear Associative Unit', 'hy': 'Ջուր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն գծային ասոցիացիվ միավորով', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i thellë i makinës nervore me njësinë lidhëse lineare', 'az': 'Linear Associative Unit ilə Deep Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Duboka neuronska prevoda sa linearnom asocijativnom jedinicom', 'ca': "Una traducció profunda de màquines neuronals amb una unitat d'associació linear", 'bn': 'লাইনের অ্যাসোসিটিভ ইউনিটের সঙ্গে গভীর নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'cs': 'Hluboký neuronový strojový překlad s lineární asociační jednotkou', 'et': 'Sügav neuraalne masintõlge lineaarse assotsiatsiooniüksusega', 'fi': 'Deep Neural Machine Translation with Linear Associative Unit', 'jv': 'deep', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'ha': 'translation', 'sk': 'Globoko nevronsko strojno prevajanje z linearno asociativno enoto', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་མཚྲངས་པ་དང་ལྡོམ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་མཚུངས་པའི་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNNs) have provably enhanced the state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) with its capability in modeling complex functions and capturing complex linguistic structures. However NMT with deep architecture in its encoder or decoder RNNs often suffer from severe gradient diffusion due to the non-linear recurrent activations, which often makes the optimization much more difficult. To address this problem we propose a novel linear associative units (LAU) to reduce the gradient propagation path inside the recurrent unit. Different from conventional approaches (LSTM unit and GRU), LAUs uses linear associative connections between input and output of the recurrent unit, which allows unimpeded information flow through both space and time The model is quite simple, but it is surprisingly effective. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting. On WMT14 English-German task and a larger WMT14 English-French task, our model achieves comparable results with the state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'لقد عززت الشبكات العصبية العميقة (DNNs) الترجمة الآلية العصبية الحديثة (NMT) مع قدرتها على نمذجة الوظائف المعقدة والتقاط الهياكل اللغوية المعقدة. ومع ذلك ، فإن NMT ذات البنية العميقة في وحدة التشفير أو وحدة فك التشفير الخاصة بها غالبًا ما تعاني من انتشار التدرج الشديد بسبب التنشيطات المتكررة غير الخطية ، مما يجعل التحسين أكثر صعوبة في كثير من الأحيان. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة نقترح وحدات ربط خطية جديدة (LAU) لتقليل مسار انتشار التدرج داخل الوحدة المتكررة. تختلف عن الأساليب التقليدية (وحدة LSTM و GRU) ، تستخدم LAU اتصالات ارتباطية خطية بين المدخلات والمخرجات للوحدة المتكررة ، مما يسمح بتدفق المعلومات دون عوائق عبر كل من المكان والزمان. النموذج بسيط للغاية ، لكنه فعال بشكل مدهش. تُظهر دراستنا التجريبية حول الترجمة الصينية-الإنجليزية أن نموذجنا مع التكوين المناسب يمكن أن يتحسن بمقدار 11.7 BLEU عند جرذ الأرض وأفضل تقرير عن النتائج في نفس الإعداد. في مهمة WMT14 الإنجليزية-الألمانية ومهمة WMT14 الإنجليزية-الفرنسية الأكبر ، يحقق نموذجنا نتائج مماثلة مع أحدث التقنيات.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais profundas (DNNs) comprovadamente aprimoraram a tradução automática neural (NMT) de última geração com sua capacidade de modelar funções complexas e capturar estruturas linguísticas complexas. No entanto NMT com arquitetura profunda em seu codificador ou decodificador RNNs muitas vezes sofrem de difusão de gradiente severa devido às ativações recorrentes não lineares, o que muitas vezes torna a otimização muito mais difícil. Para resolver este problema, propomos uma nova unidade linear associativa (LAU) para reduzir o caminho de propagação do gradiente dentro da unidade recorrente. Diferente das abordagens convencionais (unidade LSTM e GRU), as LAUs utilizam conexões associativas lineares entre entrada e saída da unidade recorrente, o que permite um fluxo de informação desimpedido tanto no espaço quanto no tempo. O modelo é bastante simples, mas surpreendentemente eficaz. Nosso estudo empírico sobre a tradução chinês-inglês mostra que nosso modelo com configuração adequada pode melhorar em 11,7 BLEU em relação à Groundhog e os melhores resultados relatados na mesma configuração. Na tarefa WMT14 inglês-alemão e em uma tarefa maior WMT14 inglês-francês, nosso modelo alcança resultados comparáveis com o estado-da-arte.', 'fr': "Les réseaux neuronaux profonds (DNN) ont amélioré la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) de pointe grâce à sa capacité à modéliser des fonctions complexes et à capturer des structures linguistiques complexes. Cependant, le NMT avec une architecture profonde dans son codeur ou son décodeur RNN souffre souvent d'une diffusion de gradient sévère en raison des activations récurrentes non linéaires, ce qui rend souvent l'optimisation beaucoup plus difficile. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons de nouvelles unités associatives linéaires (UAL) pour réduire le chemin de propagation du gradient à l'intérieur de l'unité récurrente. Contrairement aux approches classiques (unité LSTM et GRU), les UAL utilisent des connexions associatives linéaires entre l'entrée et la sortie de l'unité récurrente, ce qui permet un flux d'informations sans entrave à la fois dans l'espace et dans le temps. Le modèle est assez simple, mais il est étonnamment efficace. Notre étude empirique sur la traduction chinois-anglais montre que notre modèle avec une configuration appropriée peut s'améliorer de 11,7 UEBL sur Groundhog et les meilleurs résultats rapportés dans le même contexte. Sur une tâche WMT14 anglais-allemand et une tâche plus importante WMT14 anglais-français, notre modèle obtient des résultats comparables avec les technologies de pointe.", 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que las redes neuronales profundas (DNN) han mejorado la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) de última generación con su capacidad para modelar funciones complejas y capturar estructuras lingüísticas complejas. Sin embargo, la NMT con arquitectura profunda en sus RNN de codificador o decodificador a menudo sufre una difusión de gradiente severa debido a las activaciones recurrentes no lineales, lo que a menudo hace que la optimización sea mucho más difícil. Para abordar este problema, proponemos una novedosa unidad asociativa lineal (LAU) para reducir la trayectoria de propagación del gradiente dentro de la unidad recurrente. A diferencia de los enfoques convencionales (unidad LSTM y GRU), los LAU utilizan conexiones asociativas lineales entre la entrada y la salida de la unidad recurrente, lo que permite el flujo de información sin impedimentos a través del espacio y el tiempo. El modelo es bastante simple, pero sorprendentemente efectivo. Nuestro estudio empírico sobre la traducción chino-inglés muestra que nuestro modelo con la configuración adecuada puede mejorar en 11.7 BLEU en Groundhog y los mejores resultados informados en el mismo entorno. En la tarea de inglés y alemán del WMT14 y en una tarea más grande de inglés y francés del WMT14, nuestro modelo logra resultados comparables con los más avanzados.', 'ja': 'ディープニューラルネットワーク（ DNN ）は、複雑な機能をモデリングし、複雑な言語構造を取り込むその能力によって、最先端のニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）を確実に強化してきました。 しかしながら、エンコーダまたはデコーダＲＮＮに深いアーキテクチャを有するＮＭＴは、多くの場合、非線形反復活性化のために激しい勾配拡散に苦しみ、これにより最適化がはるかに困難になることが多い。 この問題に対処するために、繰り返し単位の内部の勾配伝播経路を減少させるための新規の線形連想単位（ LAU ）を提案する。 従来のアプローチ（ LSTMユニットとGRU ）とは異なり、LAUはリカレントユニットの入力と出力の間の線形連想接続を使用しており、空間と時間の両方を通る情報の流れを妨げません。モデルはかなり単純ですが、驚くほど効果的です。 中国語と英語の翻訳に関する実証的な研究では、適切な構成を持つ当社のモデルは、グラウンドホッグ時に11.7 BLEUを向上させ、同じ環境での結果に関する最高の報告を得ることができることが示されています。 WMT 14イングリッシュ・ドイツ・タスクとより大きなWMT 14イングリッシュ・フランス・タスクでは、当社のモデルは最先端のものと同等の結果を達成します。', 'zh': '深神经网络(DNN)因其功能建模与获杂语结构之能,可以明先进之神经机器翻译(NMT)。 然编码器解码器RNNs之有深架构者NMT非线性循环激活而常大散梯度,此常难优化也。 为此一线性单元(LAU)以损循环单元内梯度传道。 与旧法(LSTM单元与GRU)不同,LAU于循环单元输输之间用线性相连,此许信息空时通流非常简单,然其效甚也。 吾于中英译之实,土拨鼠之基,吾法以正11.7 BLEU,而同设之至善。 WMT14英语-德语任大WMT14英语-法语,吾形得与先进相当。', 'hi': 'डीप न्यूरल नेटवर्क (डीएनएन) ने जटिल कार्यों को मॉडलिंग और जटिल भाषाई संरचनाओं पर कब्जा करने में अपनी क्षमता के साथ अत्याधुनिक न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) को बढ़ाया है। हालांकि अपने एन्कोडर या डिकोडर RNNs में गहरी वास्तुकला के साथ NMT अक्सर गैर-रैखिक आवर्तक सक्रियणों के कारण गंभीर ढाल प्रसार से पीड़ित होते हैं, जो अक्सर अनुकूलन को और अधिक कठिन बनाते हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए हम आवर्तक इकाई के अंदर ग्रेडिएंट प्रसार पथ को कम करने के लिए एक उपन्यास रैखिक साहचर्य इकाइयों (LAU) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण (LSTM इकाई और GRU) से अलग, LAUs आवर्तक इकाई के इनपुट और आउटपुट के बीच रैखिक साहचर्य कनेक्शन का उपयोग करता है, जो अंतरिक्ष और समय दोनों के माध्यम से निर्बाध जानकारी प्रवाह की अनुमति देता है मॉडल काफी सरल है, लेकिन यह आश्चर्यजनक रूप से प्रभावी है। चीनी-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर हमारे अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन से पता चलता है कि उचित विन्यास के साथ हमारा मॉडल ग्राउंडहॉग पर 11.7 BLEU द्वारा सुधार कर सकता है और एक ही सेटिंग में परिणामों पर सबसे अच्छा रिपोर्ट किया गया है। WMT14 अंग्रेजी-जर्मन कार्य और एक बड़े WMT14 अंग्रेजी-फ्रेंच कार्य पर, हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक के साथ तुलनीय परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Глубокие нейронные сети (DNN) доказано улучшили современный нейронный машинный перевод (NMT) с его способностью моделировать сложные функции и захватывать сложные лингвистические структуры. Однако NMT с глубокой архитектурой в своем кодере или декодере RNN часто страдают от сильной диффузии градиента из-за нелинейных рекуррентных активаций, что часто значительно затрудняет оптимизацию. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем новую линейную ассоциативную единицу (LAU) для уменьшения пути распространения градиента внутри повторяющейся единицы. В отличие от обычных подходов (блок LSTM и GRU), LAU использует линейные ассоциативные связи между входом и выходом рекуррентного блока, что позволяет беспрепятственно пропускать информацию как через пространство, так и во времени Модель довольно проста, но удивительно эффективна. Наше эмпирическое исследование китайско-английского перевода показывает, что наша модель с правильной конфигурацией может улучшиться на 11,7 BLEU на Groundhog и наилучшим образом отчитаться о результатах в тех же условиях. Что касается англо-немецкой задачи WMT14 и более крупной англо-французской задачи WMT14, то наша модель достигает результатов, сопоставимых с самыми современными.', 'ga': 'Is léir gur chuir Líonraí Néaracha Deep (DNNanna) feabhas ar an Neural Machine Translation (NMT) úrscothach lena chumas feidhmeanna casta a shamhaltú agus struchtúir chasta theangeolaíocha a ghabháil. Mar sin féin NMT le hailtireacht dhomhain ina ionchódóir nó díchódóir RNNs ag fulaingt go minic ó idirleata grádán mór mar gheall ar na gníomhachtaithe athfhillteach neamh-líneach, a dhéanann an leas iomlán a bhaint i bhfad níos deacra go minic. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo molaimid aonaid chomhthiomsaitheacha líneacha núíosacha (LAU) chun cosán iomadaithe an ghrádáin laistigh den aonad athfhillteach a laghdú. Difriúil ó chur chuige traidisiúnta (aonad LSTM agus GRU), úsáideann LAUanna naisc chomhtháite líneacha idir ionchur agus aschur an aonaid athfhillteach, rud a ligeann do shreabhadh faisnéise gan srian tríd an spás agus an t-am araon. Tá an tsamhail simplí go leor, ach tá sé ionadh éifeachtach. Léiríonn ár staidéar eimpíreach ar aistriúchán Sínis-Béarla gur féidir feabhas a chur ar ár múnla le cumraíocht cheart faoi 11.7 BLEU ar Groundhog agus an tuairisc is fearr ar thorthaí sa suíomh céanna. Ar thasc Béarla-Gearmáinis WMT14 agus ar thasc Béarla-Fraincis níos mó WMT14, baintear amach ár múnla torthaí inchomparáide leis an stát-de-aimseartha.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელები (DNN) პროგრამიურად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მექსინური მაქსინური განაცვლა ( მაგრამ NMT, რომელიც მისი კოდირებში ან რეკოდერებულია RNN-ების ძალიან დისფუზეციის გამოცდილობა, რომელიც არ-ლინიური რეკოდერენტური აკტივიციების გამოცდილობა, რომელიც ხშირად ოპ ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის ჩვენ პრობლემას პრობლემა რეკურენტის ერთეულის შორის პროპრაგაციის გეზის შემცირებად პრობლემაციის გადაწყვეტისთვის. რომელიც განსხვავებულია კონტრაციონალური დაწყებებიდან (LSTM ერთეული და GRU), LAUs გამოყენებს ლინიერი დაკავშირებული დაკავშირებების შესახებ და რეკურენტის ერთეულის გამოსახულებაზე, რომელიც შეუძლებელია გადასრულებული ინფორმაცი ჩვენი ემპერიკური კითხვა-ანგლისური გადაწყვეტილების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი სწორედ კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებელია 11.7 BLEU-ზე გაუკეთება Groundhog-ზე და ყველაზე საუკეთეს WMT14 ინგლისურ-გერმანური სამუშაოში და უფრო დიდი WMT14 ანგლისურ-ფრანგური სამუშაოში, ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებელი წარმოდგენა შემდგომარებელი', 'el': 'Τα βαθιά Νευρικά Δίκτυα (DNN) έχουν αποδεδειγμένα ενισχύσει την υπερσύγχρονη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT) με την ικανότητά της στη μοντελοποίηση σύνθετων λειτουργιών και την καταγραφή σύνθετων γλωσσικών δομών. Ωστόσο, με βαθιά αρχιτεκτονική στον κωδικοποιητή ή αποκωδικοποιητή συχνά υποφέρουν από σοβαρή διάχυση κλίσης λόγω των μη γραμμικών επαναλαμβανόμενων ενεργοποιημάτων, γεγονός που συχνά καθιστά τη βελτιστοποίηση πολύ πιο δύσκολη. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του προβλήματος προτείνουμε μια νέα γραμμική συσχετιστική μονάδα (LAU) για τη μείωση της διαδρομής διάδοσης κλίσης μέσα στην επαναλαμβανόμενη μονάδα. Διαφορετικά από τις συμβατικές προσεγγίσεις (μονάδα και GRU), οι ΟΤ χρησιμοποιούν γραμμικές συσχετιστικές συνδέσεις μεταξύ εισόδου και εξόδου της επαναλαμβανόμενης μονάδας, γεγονός που επιτρέπει την απρόσκοπτη ροή πληροφοριών τόσο στο χώρο όσο και στο χρόνο. Το μοντέλο είναι αρκετά απλό, αλλά είναι εκπληκτικά αποτελεσματικό. Η εμπειρική μας μελέτη για την κινεζική-αγγλική μετάφραση δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο μας με την κατάλληλη διαμόρφωση μπορεί να βελτιωθεί κατά 11.7 και να αναφερθεί καλύτερα στα αποτελέσματα στο ίδιο περιβάλλον. Στην αγγλο-γερμανική εργασία και σε μια μεγαλύτερη αγγλο-γαλλική εργασία, το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει συγκρίσιμα αποτελέσματα με την τελευταία τεχνολογία.', 'hu': 'A Deep Neural Networks (DNN) bizonyíthatóan továbbfejlesztette a legkorszerűbb Neural Machine Translation (NMT) funkciókat komplex funkciók modellezésére és komplex nyelvi struktúrák rögzítésére. Azonban az útmérőben vagy dekódolójában mély architektúrával rendelkező NMT-k gyakran súlyos gradiens diffúzióban szenvednek a nemlineáris visszatérő aktiválások miatt, ami gyakran sokkal nehezebbé teszi az optimalizálást. A probléma megoldására új lineáris asszociatív egységeket (LAU) javasolunk, amelyek csökkentik a gradiens terjedési útvonalát a visszatérő egységen belül. A hagyományos megközelítésektől (LSTM egység és GRU) eltérő LAU-k lineáris asszociatív kapcsolatokat használnak a visszatérő egység bemenete és kimenete között, ami akadálymentes információáramlást tesz lehetővé mind a téren, mind az időn keresztül. A kínai-angol fordítással kapcsolatos empirikus tanulmányunk azt mutatja, hogy a megfelelő konfigurációval rendelkező modellünk 11,7 BLEU-val fejlődhet a Groundhog-on és a legjobb eredményeket ugyanabban a környezetben jelentettük. A WMT14 angol-német feladat és egy nagyobb WMT14 angol-francia feladat esetén modellünk a legkorszerűbb eredményekkel összehasonlítható eredményeket ér el.', 'it': "Deep Neural Networks (DNN) hanno dimostrato di aver migliorato la traduzione automatica neurale all'avanguardia (NMT) con la sua capacità di modellare funzioni complesse e catturare strutture linguistiche complesse. Tuttavia NMT con architettura profonda nel suo encoder o decoder RNN spesso soffrono di forte diffusione gradiente a causa delle attivazioni ricorrenti non lineari, che spesso rendono l'ottimizzazione molto più difficile. Per affrontare questo problema proponiamo una nuova unità associativa lineare (LAU) per ridurre il percorso di propagazione del gradiente all'interno dell'unità ricorrente. Diversamente dagli approcci convenzionali (unità LSTM e GRU), LAU utilizza connessioni associative lineari tra ingresso e uscita dell'unità ricorrente, che consente un flusso di informazioni senza ostacoli sia nello spazio che nel tempo. Il nostro studio empirico sulla traduzione cinese-inglese mostra che il nostro modello con una corretta configurazione può migliorare di 11,7 BLEU su Groundhog e i migliori risultati riportati nello stesso ambiente. Con il compito inglese-tedesco WMT14 e un compito inglese-francese più ampio WMT14, il nostro modello raggiunge risultati comparabili con lo stato dell'arte.", 'mk': 'Длабоките неврални мрежи (ДНН) најверојатно ја зајакнаа најновата неврална машинска транслекција (НМТ) со својата способност за моделирање комплексни функции и заземање комплексни јазички структури. Сепак, НМТ со длабока архитектура во својот кодер или декодер РНН честопати страдаат од сериозна дифузија на градиенти поради нелинијарните рецидентни активации, што честопати ја отежнува оптимизацијата. За да го решиме овој проблем предлагаме нова линијарна асоцијативна единица (LAU) за намалување на патот на пропагација на градијантите во рецидентната единица. Различно од конвенционалните пристапи (LSTM единица и GRU), LAU користи линијарни асоцијативни врски помеѓу внесувањето и излезот на рецидентната единица, што овозможува неограничен тек на информации низ просторот и времето Моделот е прилично едноставен, но е изненадувачки ефикасен. Нашата емпирична студија за кинеско-англиски превод покажува дека нашиот модел со соодветна конфигурација може да се подобри за 11,7 БЛЕ на Groundhog и најдобрите извештаи за резултатите во истото место. Во врска со ВМТ14 англиско-германска задача и поголема ВМТ14 англиско-француска задача, нашиот модел постигнува споредливи резултати со најновите резултати.', 'lt': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNNs) have provably enhanced the state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) with its capability in modeling complex functions and capturing complex linguistic structures.  Tačiau NMT, turintis gilią architektūrą koduotoje arba dekoderinėse RNN, dažnai patiria sunkią gradient ų difuziją dėl nelinijinės pakartotinės aktyvacijos, o tai dažnai apsunkina optimizaciją. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą siūlome naujus linijinius asocijacinius vienetus (LAU), kad būtų sumažintas gradient ų dauginimo kelias pasikartojančiame vienete. Skirtingai nuo įprastų metodų (LSTM vienetas ir GRU), LAU naudoja linijinius asocijacinius ryšius tarp pakartotinio vieneto įvedimo ir išėjimo, kurie leidžia neribotą informacijos srautą tiek per erdvę, tiek per laiką Modelis gana paprastas, bet nuostabiai veiksmingas. Mūsų empirinis Kinijos ir anglų vertimo tyrimas rodo, kad mūsų modelis su tinkama konfigūracija gali pagerinti 11,7 BLEU po Groundhog ir geriausiai pranešta apie rezultatus toje pačioje aplinkoje. Dėl WMT14 anglų ir vokiečių užduoties ir didesnės WMT14 anglų ir prancūzų užduoties mūsų modelis pasiekia panašius rezultatus kaip naujausias.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Neural Dalam (DNN) telah kemungkinan meningkatkan Penerjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) yang terbaik dengan kemampuannya dalam memmodelkan fungsi kompleks dan menangkap struktur bahasa kompleks. Namun NMT dengan arkitektur dalam dalam pengekodnya atau RNN pengekodnya sering menderita penyebaran gradien yang berat disebabkan aktivasi berulang bukan linear, yang sering membuat optimasi jauh lebih sukar. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan unit asosiatif linear (LAU) yang baru untuk mengurangi laluan pelebaran gradien di dalam unit berulang. Berbeza dari pendekatan konvensional (unit LSTM dan GRU), LAU menggunakan sambungan sekutif linear diantara input dan output unit berulang, yang membolehkan aliran maklumat tidak terhalang melalui ruang dan masa Model agak mudah, tetapi ia sangat berkesan. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting.  Pada tugas WMT14 Bahasa Inggeris-Jerman dan tugas WMT14 Bahasa Inggeris-Perancis yang lebih besar, model kami mencapai keputusan yang boleh dibandingkan dengan state-of-the-art.', 'kk': 'Қалыпты невралдық желілер (DNN) комплексті функцияларды моделдеу және комплексті лингвистикалық құрылғыларды алу мүмкіндігімен өзінің күйінің невралдық машинаның аударуын (NMT) күйіне көтеріп жасады. Бірақ NMT оның кодерінде немесе RNN декодеріндегі терең архитектурасы бар, сызық қайталанбаған белсенділіктердің сияқты градиенттің диффесиясынан көбірек өтеді. Бұл көбінде оптимизациялауды көбірек Бұл мәселені шешу үшін, қайталанатын бірлігінің ішінде градиенттің пропагациясын азайту үшін романдық сызық бірліктерді (ЛАУ) келтіреміз. Кәдімгі жағдайда (LSTM бірлігі және GRU) айырмашылық, ЛАУ қайталанатын бірлігінің кіріс мен шығыс арасындағы сызық қосылымдар қолданылады. Бұл бірлігі бос орындар мен уақыттар арасында бұл мәліметтер көмектесмейтін бол Қытай-ағылшын аудармасының империялық зерттеулеріміздің моделіміз дұрыс конфигурациялау үшін Groundhog дегенде 11,7 BLEU және бір нәтижесінде ең жақсы хабарлаған нәтижелерді жақса WMT14 ағылшын- неміс тапсырмасында және WMT14 ағылшын- французша тапсырмасында, біздің үлгіміз өзгерту күйіне салыстырылатын нәтижелерді жеткізеді.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d (DNNS) നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് പ്രാധാന്യം വളര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്\u200dറെ സാധ്യതയില എന്നാലും NMT അതിന്റെ കോഡെര്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കുറച്ചുകൂടി ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കെക്ടെക്കോഡിക്ടര്\u200d RNNs പ്രാവശ്യം ഗ്രേഡിയന്\u200d ഡിഫ്ഫ്ഷഷനില്\u200d നിന് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ലൈനറില്\u200d യൂണിറ്റിയുള്ള യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d (LAU) നിര്\u200dവഹിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ളില്\u200d ഗ്രേഡ സാധാരണ നടപടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും (LSTM യൂണിറ്റും GRU), ലാവുസ് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റിനും ഇടയില്\u200d ലൈനിയര്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.  ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ശാസ്ത്രീയ പഠിക്കുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്നു, ശരിയായ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളുടെ മൊഡല്\u200d  WMT14 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ജോലിയിലും വലിയ WMT14 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ജോലിയിലും ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലിന് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്-ആർട്ടില', 'mt': 'In-Netwerks Newrali Profondi (DNNs) probabbilment tejbu t-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali (NMT) l-aktar avvanzata bil-kapaċità tagħha fl-immudellar ta’ funzjonijiet kumplessi u l-qbid ta’ strutturi lingwistiċi kumplessi. Madankollu NMT b’arkitettura profonda fil-kodifikatur jew id-dekoder RNNs tagħha spiss isofru minn diffużjoni severa ta’ gradjenti minħabba l-attivazzjonijiet rikorrenti mhux lineari, li spiss jagħmlu l-ottimizzazzjoni ħafna aktar diffiċli. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a nipproponu unitajiet assoċjattivi lineari ġodda (LAU) biex inaqqsu l-mogħdija tal-propagazzjoni tal-gradjenti ġewwa l-unit à rikorrenti. Differenti mill-approċċi konvenzjonali (unit à LSTM u GRU), il-LAUs jużaw konnessjonijiet assoċjattivi lineari bejn l-input u l-output tal-unità rikorrenti, li jippermettu fluss ta’ informazzjoni mingħajr xkiel kemm fl-ispazju kif ukoll fil-ħin Il-mudell huwa pjuttost sempliċi, iżda huwa sorprendentement effettiv. L-istudju empiriku tagħna dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniż-Ingliż juri li l-mudell tagħna b’konfigurazzjoni xierqa jista’ jitjieb b’11.7 BLEU fuq Groundhog u l-aħjar irrappurtat dwar ir-riżultati fl-istess ambjent. Dwar il-kompitu WMT14 Ingliż-Ġermaniż u kompitu akbar WMT14 Ingliż-Franċiż, il-mudell tagħna jikseb riżultati komparabbli mal-aktar avvanzati.', 'no': 'Djupne neuralnettverk (DNN) har utvikla tilstanden av kunstnettomsetjinga (NMT) med den kapasiteten i modellering av komplekse funksjonar og henting av komplekse lingviske strukturar. Men NMT med dyp arkitektur i koderen eller dekoder av RNN-ane har ofte alvorleg lyst frå kraftige fargeovergangar på grunn av ikkje-lineære gjentakingar, som ofte gjer optimaliseringa mykje vanskeleg. For å oppretta dette problemet, foreslår vi eit nytt lineær assositiv eining (LAU) for å redusera fargeovergangspunktet i gjentakingseininga. Forskjellig frå konvensjonelle tilnærmingar (LSTM-eining og GRU), LAU brukar lineære tilknyttingar mellom inndata og utdata av rekurseininga, som tillater ikkje komprimerte informasjonsflytting gjennom både mellomrom og tid Modellen er ganske enkelt, men det er overraska effekt. Vårt empirisk studie om kinesisk-engelsk omsetjing viser at vårt modell med rett oppsett kan forbetra med 11,7 BLEU på Groundhog og den beste rapporterte om resultatet i det same innstillinga. På WMT14-engelsk-tysk oppgåve og eit større WMT14-engelsk-fransk oppgåve, er modellen vårt nådd sammenlignbare resultat med kunsttilstanden.', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээлүүд (DNN) комплекс функцүүдийг модельчлэх болон комплекс хэлний бүтээгдэхүүнийг барьж, урлагийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) байдлыг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Гэхдээ NMT нь коддогч эсвэл шинэчлэгч RNN-ийн гүнзгий архитектуртай ихэвчлэн шулууны дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин хөдөлгөөн биш болохоор хатуу градиентийн шинэчлэлээс өвчнөдөг. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид шинэ шулууны холбоотой нэгжүүдийг (ЛАУ) дахин дахин дахин нэгжийн дотор градиентын хөгжүүлэх замыг багасгах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Олон төрлийн ойлголтын ялгаатай (LSTM нэгж болон GRU), ЛАУ-ын оролцооны болон дахин дахин гарах нэгжээний хооронд шулуун холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байгууллага ашигладаг. Энэ нь мэдээлэл хоёр орон зайд, цаг хоёр хоорондоо холбоотой боломж Бидний Хятад-Англи хэлний орчуулалтын үндсэн судалгаагаар бидний загвар зөв загвар дээр Groundhog дээр 11.7 BLEU-г нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. WMT14 Англи-Германы ажлын тухай, WMT14-н англи-французтай том ажлын тухай бидний загвар нь урлагийн төвшинд харьцуулагддаг үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Głębokie sieci neuronowe (DNN) udowodnione wzmocniły najnowocześniejsze tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronowe (NMT) dzięki swojej zdolności do modelowania złożonych funkcji i przechwytywania złożonych struktur językowych. Jednak NMT z głęboką architekturą w koderze lub dekoderze RNN często cierpią z powodu ciężkiej dyfuzji gradientów ze względu na nieliniowe powtarzające się aktywacje, co często utrudnia optymalizację. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy nowe jednostki asocjacyjne liniowe (LAU) zmniejszające ścieżkę propagacji gradientu wewnątrz jednostki powtarzającej. W odróżnieniu od konwencjonalnych podejść (LSTM unit i GRU), LAU wykorzystuje liniowe połączenia asocjacyjne między wejściem a wyjściem jednostki powtarzającej, co pozwala na niezakłócony przepływ informacji zarówno w przestrzeni, jak i czasie Model jest dość prosty, ale zaskakująco skuteczny. Nasze badanie empiryczne dotyczące tłumaczenia chińsko-angielskiego pokazuje, że nasz model z odpowiednią konfiguracją może ulepszyć się o 11.7 BLEU na Groundhog i najlepiej raportować wyniki w tym samym otoczeniu. W przypadku zadania angielsko-niemieckiego WMT14 oraz większego zadania angielsko-francuskiego WMT14, nasz model osiąga porównywalne wyniki z najnowocześniejszymi technologiami.', 'si': 'Deep neural Netwarks (DNNs) have challenged the state-of-the-art neural machine translation (NMT) with its captivity in Modelling Complicate Function and Catching of Complicate Linguist Designs. නමුත් NMT ගොඩක් ස්ථාපනය තියෙන්නේ ඒකේ කෝඩර් නැත්තම් රෙන්කෝඩර් නැත්තම් රෙන්කෝඩර් නැත්තම් සක්\u200dරියාවක් නැත්තම් සාමාන්\u200dය මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් ලිනියර් සම්බන්ධ යුනිටිය (LAU) කිරීමේ  වෙනස් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට (LSTM යුනිටිය හා GRU), LAU යුනිට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක යුනිටියේ ඇතුළුම සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා, ඒකෙන්  අපේ චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව ගැන අධ්\u200dයානය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක හොඳ සැකසුම් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ග්\u200dරූන්ඩොග් ව WMT14 ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ජර්මන් වැඩේ සහ WMT14 වැඩි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරත', 'sr': 'Duboke neuronske mreže (DNN) provocirale su state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) sa svojom sposobnošću u modeliranju kompleksnih funkcija i uhvativanju kompleksnih jezičkih struktura. Međutim, NMT sa dubokom arhitekturom u svom koderu ili dekoderu RNN često pati od teške diffuzije gradienta zbog nelinearnih rekonstruacija, što često čini optimizaciju mnogo težim. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo novu linearnu asocijativnu jedinicu (LAU) da smanji put propagacije gradienta unutar ponovne jedinice. Drugačije od konvencionalnih pristupa (LSTM jedinica i GRU), LAU koristi linearne asocijativne veze između ulaska i izlaza rekonstruntne jedinice, što omogućava nepromišene informacije prolaze kroz prostor i vrijeme Model je prilično jednostavan, ali iznenađujuće je efikasno. Naša empirička studija o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuje da naš model sa odgovarajućom konfiguracijom može poboljšati od 11,7 BLEU na Groundhogu i najbolji izveštaj o rezultatima u istom stanju. Na WMT14 engleski-nemački zadatak i veći zadatak WMT14 engleski-francuski, naš model postiže usporedni rezultati sa državnim umjetničkim stanjem.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale profunde (DNN) au îmbunătățit în mod evident traducerea automată neurală de ultimă generație (NMT) cu capacitatea sa de a modela funcții complexe și de a capta structuri lingvistice complexe. Cu toate acestea, NMT cu arhitectură profundă în encoder sau decodor, RNN suferă adesea de difuzie gradientă severă datorită activărilor recurente non-liniare, ceea ce face adesea optimizarea mult mai dificilă. Pentru a aborda această problemă propunem o nouă unitate asociativă liniară (LAU) pentru a reduce calea de propagare a gradientului în interiorul unității recurente. Diferit de abordările convenționale (unitatea LSTM și GRU), unitățile LAU utilizează conexiuni asociative liniare între intrarea și ieșirea unității recurente, ceea ce permite fluxul de informații fără obstacole atât prin spațiu, cât și prin timp Modelul este destul de simplu, dar este surprinzător de eficient. Studiul nostru empiric privind traducerea chineză-engleză arată că modelul nostru cu configurație corectă se poate îmbunătăți cu 11.7 BLEU pe Groundhog și cele mai bune raportate rezultate în același cadru. Pentru activitatea WMT14 engleză-germană și o sarcină mai mare WMT14 engleză-franceză, modelul nostru obține rezultate comparabile cu cele de ultimă generație.', 'sv': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNN) har bevisligen förbättrat den senaste Neural Machine Translation (NMT) med dess förmåga att modellera komplexa funktioner och fånga komplexa språkliga strukturer. Men NMT med djup arkitektur i sin encoder eller dekoder lider ofta av svår gradientdiffusion på grund av icke-linjära återkommande aktiveringer, vilket ofta gör optimeringen mycket svårare. För att lösa detta problem föreslår vi en ny linjär associativ units (LAU) för att minska gradientförökningsbanan inuti den återkommande enheten. Till skillnad från konventionella tillvägagångssätt (LSTM enhet och GRU), använder LAU linjära associativa kopplingar mellan input och output av den återkommande enheten, vilket möjliggör obehindrat informationsflöde genom både rum och tid Modellen är ganska enkel, men den är förvånansvärt effektiv. Vår empiriska studie om kinesisk-engelsk översättning visar att vår modell med korrekt konfiguration kan förbättras med 11,7 BLEU på Groundhog och de bäst rapporterade resultaten i samma miljö. På WMT14 engelsk-tysk uppgift och en större WMT14 engelsk-fransk uppgift uppnår vår modell jämförbara resultat med den senaste tekniken.', 'so': 'Shabakadda hoose Neural (DNNs) waxay si fiican u kordhiyeen xaalada-the-art-the-art machine Translation (NMT) iyadoo awooddiisa ku sameynaya sameynta functionimo complex ah iyo qabsashada structuro complex oo luqada ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee NMT waxay ku jiraan dhismo aad u dheer oo ay ku qoran tahay codsigiisa ama codsiga RNNs inta badan waxay ku xanuunsadaan difaac aad u daran, sababtoo ah waxqabadka soo degitaanka ee aan linear ahayn, taas oo inta badan ka sii adag tixgelinta. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan waxaan u soo jeedinayaa qaybaha iskuulka qoriga ah (LAU) si uu uga hoosaysiiyo waddada ogeysiiska ee ku qoran qaybta soo socda. Qoriga caadiga ah (LSTM iyo GRU), LAU wuxuu isticmaalaa xiriir linear ah oo u dhexeeya input iyo soo bixinta qaybta kirada ah, taasoo u ogolaada in macluumaad aan la xiriirin la dhex maro cirka iyo xilliga, balse waa mid aad u fudud, laakiin waa wax caqli leh. Waxbarashada ku saabsan turjumista Shiino-Ingiriis wuxuu muujiyaa in qaababka ku habboon uu qaabilsan yahay uu ku kordhin karo 1.7 BLEU ku yaalo Groundhog iyo waxa ugu fiican lagu soo sheegay arimaha isla qaabilsan. Shaqada WMT14 ee Ingiriis-Jarmal iyo shaqada WMT14 ka weyn Ingiriis-Faraansiis, modellkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa resultooyin siman oo la mid ah dowladda farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் (DNNS) சிக்கலான மொழிமாற்றங்களை மாற்றும் சிக்கல் செயல்பாடுகளை மாற்றும் மற்றும் சிக்கலான மொழிமாற்றங்களை பெற்றுக் கொண் However NMT with deep architecture in its encoder or decoder RNNs often suffer from severe gradient diffusion due to the non-linear recurrent activations, which often makes the optimization much more difficult.  இந்த பிரச்சினையை முகவரிக்க நாம் நிகழ்வு அலகுக்குள் ஒரு புதிய கோட்டு இணைப்பு அலகுகள் (LAU) தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் நிலையி @ info சீன- ஆங்கிலத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் எங்கள் மாதிரி சரியான வடிவமைப்புடன் 11. 7 பிலியு முன்னேற்றலாம் மற்றும் அதே அமைப்ப WMT14 ஆங்கிலம்- ஜெர்மன் பணியில் மற்றும் WMT14 பெரிய ஆங்கிலம்- பிரெஞ்சு பணி', 'ur': 'عمیق نیورال نیٹورک (DNN) نے آرتی نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کی حالت کو اس کے قابلیت کے ساتھ پیچیدہ فعالیتوں کی مدل کرنا اور پیچیدہ زبان ساختار کو پکڑنے کے لئے اضافہ کیا ہے۔ اگرچہ NMT اس کے کوڈر یا ڈیکوڈر RNN میں عمیق معماری کے ساتھ سخت گراڈیٹ ڈھیفس کے باعث غیر لینیاری دوبارہ فعالیت کے باعث مشکل ہوتا ہے، جو اچھی فعالیت کو بہت مشکل بناتا ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک نئی لینار شریک یونیٹ (LAU) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ گریڈینٹ پراپاژن مسیر کو دوبارہ یونیٹ کے اندر کم کر دیں۔ (LSTM یونیٹ اور GRU) سے متفاوت، لائوس اس یونیٹ کے اندر لینیاری اتصال کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو دوبارہ اتصال کرنے والے یونیٹ کے درمیان غیر معلومات کی جگہ اور زمانہ کے ذریعہ بہانے کی اجازت دیتا ہے، موڈل بہت ساده ہے، لیکن یہ عجیب طور پر فعال ہے. ہمارے چین-انگلیسی ترجمہ کے بارے میں اپنا مطالعہ مطالعہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا موڈل ٹھیک ترجمہ کے ساتھ 11.7 بلیوس کے ذریعہ Groundhog پر بہترین ترجمہ کر سکتا ہے اور اسی طرح کے نتائج پر بہترین ترجمہ کیا جاتا WMT14 انگلیسی-جرمنی کام پر اور ایک بڑی WMT14 انگلیسی-فرانسوی کام پر، ہماری موڈل نے آرتی کے ساتھ برابر نتیجے حاصل کئے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name However NMT with deep architecture in its encoder or decoder RNNs often suffer from severe gradient diffusion due to the non-linear recurrent activations, which often makes the optimization much more difficult.  @ info: whatsthis @ info Xitoycha- Ingliz tarjima tarjima uchun mukamilik tahrirlarimizni koʻrsatish mumkin, bizning modelmiz, Groundhog'da 11.7 BLEU yordamida ko'paytirish mumkin, va bir moslama natijalariga eng yaxshi hisobot beradi. WMT14 Ingliz-Olmoncha vazifani va WMT14 Ingliz- Fransuzcha vazifasi katta, modelimizning davlat sohasida bir xil natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sâu Neural Networks (DNS) đã hiển nhiên tăng cường cấu trúc Thần kinh (NMB) hiện đại (NMB) với khả năng tạo ra các chức năng phát triển các chức năng phức tạp và bắt giữ các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ phức tạp. Tuy nhiên công nghệ NMT với kiến trúc sâu trong bộ mã hóa hay mã giải RNN thường bị phát triển dốc nặng nề nhờ vào hoạt động không tuyến tính thường xuyên, mà thường làm cho việc tối đa khó khăn hơn. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một đơn vị đa dạng mới (LAU) để giảm con đường truyền dốc trong đơn vị thường xuyên. Khác với các phương pháp truyền thống (LSTM đơn vị và GRU), LAU sử dụng các kết nối liên kết cấu hình tuyến giữa nhập và kết xuất của các thiết bị chạy lại, điều đó cho phép không bị ảnh hưởng thông tin qua không gian và thời gian. Mô- đun này rất đơn giản, nhưng nó rất hiệu quả. Nghiên cứu của chúng tôi về dịch ngữ pháp Trung Quốc cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi với cấu hình thích hợp có thể cải thiện qua 11.7 bleU trên Chuột chũi và kết quả được báo cáo tốt nhất trong cùng một môi trường. Về một nhiệm vụ Anh-Đức WRT14 và một công việc lớn hơn WRTT14 Anh-French, mẫu của chúng tôi đã đạt được kết quả tương đương với thời đại.', 'da': "Deep Neural Networks (DNN'er) har bevisligt forbedret den avancerede Neural Machine Translation (NMT) med dens evne til at modellere komplekse funktioner og indfange komplekse sproglige strukturer. Men NMT med dyb arkitektur i sin encoder eller dekoder RNN'er lider ofte af alvorlig gradient diffusion på grund af de ikke-lineære tilbagevendende aktiveringer, hvilket ofte gør optimeringen meget vanskeligere. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en ny lineær associativ enhed (LAU) for at reducere gradient formeringsvejen inde i den tilbagevendende enhed. Forskellig fra konventionelle tilgange (LSTM enhed og GRU), bruger LAU'er lineære associative forbindelser mellem input og output af den tilbagevendende enhed, hvilket tillader uhindret informationsstrøm gennem både rum og tid Modellen er ganske enkel, men den er overraskende effektiv. Vores empiriske undersøgelse af kinesisk-engelsk oversættelse viser, at vores model med korrekt konfiguration kan forbedres med 11,7 BLEU på Groundhog og de bedst rapporterede resultater i samme ramme. På WMT14 engelsk-tysk opgave og en større WMT14 engelsk-fransk opgave opnår vores model sammenlignelige resultater med state-of-the-art.", 'hr': 'Duboke neuronske mreže (DNN) provocirale su state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) s svojom sposobnošću u modeliranju kompleksnih funkcija i uhvaćenju kompleksnih jezičkih struktura. Međutim, NMT s dubokom arhitekturom u svom koderu ili dekoderu RNN često pati od teške diffuzije gradienta zbog neolinearnih rekonstruiranih aktivacija, što često čini optimizaciju mnogo težim. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo novu linearnu asocijativnu jedinicu (LAU) da smanji put propagacije gradienta unutar ponovne jedinice. Drugačije od konvencionalnih pristupa (LSTM jedinica i GRU), LAU koristi linearne asocijativne veze između ulaska i izlaza rekonstruirane jedinice, što omogućava nepromijenjene informacije tekući kroz prostor i vrijeme Model je prilično jednostavan, ali iznenađujuće je učinkovito. Naša empirička ispitivanja o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuje da naš model s odgovarajućom konfiguracijom može poboljšati od 11,7 BLEU na Groundhogu i najbolji izvještaj o rezultatima u istom stanju. Na WMT14 engleski-njemačkom zadatku i većem zadatku WMT14 engleski-francuski, naš model postiže usporedbene rezultate s državom umjetnosti.', 'nl': "Deep Neural Networks (DNN's) hebben aantoonbaar de state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) verbeterd met zijn vermogen om complexe functies te modelleren en complexe taalstructuren vast te leggen. Echter NMT met diepe architectuur in zijn encoder of decoder RNN's lijden vaak aan ernstige gradiënt diffusie als gevolg van de niet-lineaire terugkerende activeringen, wat de optimalisatie vaak veel moeilijker maakt. Om dit probleem aan te pakken stellen we een nieuwe lineaire associatieve eenheden (LAU) voor om het gradiënt propagatiepad binnen de recidiverende eenheid te verminderen. In tegenstelling tot conventionele benaderingen (LSTM unit en GRU), maakt LAU's gebruik van lineaire associatieve verbindingen tussen input en output van de terugkerende eenheid, waardoor onbelemmerde informatiestroom door zowel ruimte als tijd mogelijk is. Het model is vrij eenvoudig, maar het is verrassend effectief. Onze empirische studie naar Chinees-Engels vertaling toont aan dat ons model met de juiste configuratie kan verbeteren met 11.7 BLEU op Groundhog en de best gerapporteerde resultaten in dezelfde setting. Op WMT14 Engels-Duitse taak en een grotere WMT14 Engels-Franse taak bereikt ons model vergelijkbare resultaten met de state-of-the-art.", 'bg': 'Дълбоките неврални мрежи (ДНН) доказано са подобрили най-съвременния неврален машинен превод (НМТ) с способността си за моделиране на сложни функции и улавяне на сложни лингвистични структури. Въпреки това НМТ с дълбока архитектура в своя кодер или декодер РНН често страдат от тежка градиентна дифузия поради нелинейните повтарящи се активирания, което често прави оптимизацията много по-трудна. За решаване на този проблем предлагаме нови линейни асоциативни единици (ЛАУ) за намаляване на пътя на градиентното разпространение вътре в повтарящата се единица. Различни от конвенционалните подходи (ЛТМ единица и ГРУ), ЛАУ използват линейни асоциативни връзки между входа и изхода на повтарящото се устройство, което позволява безпрепятстван поток на информация през пространството и времето Моделът е доста прост, но е изненадващо ефективен. Нашето емпирично изследване на китайско-английски превод показва, че нашият модел с правилна конфигурация може да се подобри с 11.7 и най-добре докладван за резултати в същата обстановка. При англо-германската задача и по-голямата англо-френска задача нашият модел постига сравними резултати с най-съвременните.', 'id': 'Jaringan Neural Dalam (DNN) telah mungkin meningkatkan terjemahan Mesin Neural yang terbaik (NMT) dengan kemampuannya dalam memmodelir fungsi kompleks dan menangkap struktur bahasa kompleks. Namun NMT dengan arsitektur dalam dalam dalam pengekoder atau dekoder RNN sering menderita dari diffusion gradien berat karena aktivasi rekuren non-linear, yang sering membuat optimisasi jauh lebih sulit. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini kami mengusulkan unit asosiasi linear (LAU) yang baru untuk mengurangi laluan propagasi gradien di dalam unit recurrent. Berbeda dari pendekatan konvensional (LSTM unit dan GRU), LAU menggunakan koneksi asosiatif linear antara input dan output dari unit recurrent, yang memungkinkan aliran informasi yang tidak terhalang melalui ruang dan waktu Model cukup sederhana, tetapi sangat efektif. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting.  Dalam tugas Inggris-Jerman WMT14 dan tugas Inggris-Perancis WMT14 yang lebih besar, model kami mencapai hasil yang dibandingkan dengan state-of-the-art.', 'de': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNNs) haben die hochmoderne Neural Machine Translation (NMT) nachweislich verbessert, um komplexe Funktionen zu modellieren und komplexe linguistische Strukturen zu erfassen. NMT mit tiefer Architektur in ihrem Encoder oder Decoder RNNs leiden jedoch häufig unter einer starken Gradientendiffusion aufgrund der nicht-linearen wiederkehrenden Aktivierungen, was die Optimierung oft erheblich erschwert. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir eine neuartige lineare assoziative Einheit (LAU) vor, um den Gradientenausbreitungsweg innerhalb der wiederkehrenden Einheit zu reduzieren. Anders als herkömmliche Ansätze (LSTM-Einheit und GRU) verwenden LAUs lineare assoziative Verbindungen zwischen Ein- und Ausgang der wiederkehrenden Einheit, was einen ungehinderten Informationsfluss durch Raum und Zeit ermöglicht. Unsere empirische Studie zur Chinesisch-Englischen Übersetzung zeigt, dass unser Modell mit korrekter Konfiguration um 11.7 BLEU auf Groundhog verbessert werden kann und die besten Ergebnisse in der gleichen Einstellung berichtet werden. Bei WMT14 Englisch-Deutsch und einer größeren WMT14 Englisch-Französisch Aufgabe erzielt unser Modell vergleichbare Ergebnisse mit dem Stand der Technik.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya Nchini ya Neural (DNNN) imeongeza kwa kiasi kikubwa hali ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa (NMT) yenye uwezo wake katika kutengeneza kazi tatizo na kuchukua miundombinu muhimu ya lugha. Hata hivyo, NMT yenye ujenzi wa ndani katika kodi yake au kupunguza RNN mara nyingi huwa wanakabiliwa na utofauti mkubwa kwa sababu ya vitendo vinavyoendelea kisasa, ambavyo mara nyingi hufanya matumaini makubwa zaidi. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili tunapendekeza vitengo vya ushirika wa riwaya (LAU) kupunguza njia ya propaganda za kisasa ndani ya kituo kinachoendelea. Tofauti na mbinu za kawaida (Kitengo cha LSTM na GRU), LAU hutumia uhusiano wa kimasa kati ya kituo cha habari na kinachoendelea, ambacho kinaruhusu usafiri wa taarifa kupitia nafasi na wakati wote. Mfano ni rahisi sana, lakini ni yenye ufanisi mkubwa. Utafiti wetu wa muhimu kuhusu tafsiri ya Kichina-Kiingereza unaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu wenye ubunifu sahihi unaweza kuboresha na BLEU 11.7 kwenye Groundhog na taarifa bora zaidi kuhusu matokeo hayo yanayotokana na mazingira haya. Katika kazi ya WMT14 ya Kiingereza-Ujerumani na kazi kubwa zaidi ya WMT14 kwa Kiingereza na Kifaransa, mtindo wetu unafanikiwa na matokeo yanayofanana na hali ya sanaa.', 'tr': "Gurhan Neural Aýtlar (DNN) Ýöne NMT ködleme ýa-da RNN ködlemelerinde gaty arhitektura baglanýan bolsa, kän hatda gaty bir arhitektura baglanmaýan eserleşmeleriň sebäbi köplenç optimizasiýany has kyndyrýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, bir täze çyzgyly bir baglaýyş birlikleri (LAU) teklip etmek üçin dégradyñ ýokaryny çalyşmak üçin teklip edýäris. Däpli ýagdaýlardan üýtgeşik (LSTM birimi we GRU), LAUlar giriş we gaýd etmek birimi arasynda çyzgyly bir baglaýyşy ulanýar. Bu sistemden çykyş bolmadyk maglumat ikisi we wagtyň arasynda aklanmagy mümkin edýär. Modeli gaty basit, ýöne geýinç bir ýagdaýdyr Çin çe-Iňlis terjimelerinde öwrenmegimiz munuň nusgymyz dogry konfigurasiýa bilen 11.7 BLEU Groundhog'da gowurap biler we munuň üstine görkezilýän netijelerimiz bardygyny görkezýär. WMT14 Iňlisçe-nemesçe zada we WMT14 iňlisçe-fransuzça uly zada nusgasymyzda, biziň modelimiz sungat döwletleri bilen ýakynlaşyp bilýär.", 'ko': '심층신경망(DNN)은 복잡한 함수를 모델링하고 복잡한 언어 구조를 포착하는 능력으로 최첨단 신경기계번역(NMT) 기술을 현저히 강화했다.그러나 인코더나 디코더 RNN에서 심층 구조를 가진 NMT는 비선형 순환이 활성화되면서 심각한 사다리 확산을 겪기 때문에 최적화가 더욱 어렵다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 선형 연상 단원(LAU)을 제기하여 귀속 단원 내의 사다리 전파 경로를 줄였다.전통적인 방법(LSTM 단원과 GRU)과 달리 LAUs는 순환 단원의 입력과 출력 사이에 선형 관련 연결을 사용하여 정보가 공간과 시간에 막힘없이 통할 수 있다. 이 모델은 매우 간단하지만 의외로 효과적이다.우리가 한영 번역에 대한 실증 연구에 따르면 우리의 모델은 적당한 배치를 통해 토박이쥐에게 11.7BLEU를 높일 수 있고 같은 환경에서 보고한 결과가 가장 좋다고 한다.WMT14 영어-독일어 임무와 더 큰 WMT14 영어-프랑스어 임무에서 우리의 모델은 최신 수준과 비슷한 결과를 얻었다.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق (DNN) به صورت اثبات ترجمه ماشین عصبی هنری (NMT) با توانایی خود در مدل\u200cسازی funkcionهای پیچیده و گرفتن ساختارهای زبان\u200cشناسی پیچیده افزایش داده\u200cاند. به هر حال NMT با معماری عمیق در آن کودهر یا دکوردر RNN اغلب از تفاوت گراده شدید به دلیل فعالیت های بازگشت غیر خطی رنج می گیرد، که اغلب فعالیت optimization را بسیار سخت می کند. برای حل این مشکل ما یک واحد متحد خطی (LAU) جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا مسیر گسترش گیاه در واحد دوباره کاهش دهد. متفاوت از دستورات معمولی (LSTM unit and GRU) LAUs از ارتباطات خطی بین ورودی و خروج واحد تکرار استفاده می\u200cکند، که اجازه می\u200cدهد که اطلاعات بی\u200cپایان از طریق فضا و زمان این مدل بسیار ساده است، ولی فوق\u200cالعاده موثر است. مطالعه امپراتیک ما در مورد ترجمه\u200cهای چین-انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما با پیکربندی مناسب می\u200cتواند با ۱۱.۷ BLEU روی Groundhog و بهترین گزارش\u200cهای نتیجه در یک تنظیمات بهتر شود. در مورد کار انگلیسی و آلمانی WMT14 و کار فرانسوی WMT14 بزرگتر، مدل ما نتایج قابل مقایسه با وضعیت هنر را می رساند.', 'af': "Deep Neurale Netwerke (DNN) het voorspoedig die state- of- the- art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) verbeter met sy kapasiteit in modellering komplekse funksies en opgeneem komplekse lingwisiese strukture. Maar NMT met diep arkitektuur in sy enkoderer of dekoderer RNN afgelyk lyk van swaar gradient diffusie vanweë die nie-lineêre herhaalde aktiwiteite, wat dikwels maak die optimizasie baie moeilik. Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n roman lineêre assosief eenhede (LAU) om die gradient propagasie pad binne in die herhaalde eenhede te reduseer. Verskillende van konvensionele toegang (LSTM eenheid en GRU), Laus gebruik lineêre asosiaatyf verbindings tussen invoer en uitvoer van die herhaalde eenheid, wat toelaat onverdrukte inligting vloei deur beide spasie en tyd Die model is heeltemal eenvoudig, maar dit is verwonderbaar effektief. Ons empiriese studie oor Sjinese-Engels vertaling vertoon dat ons model met regte konfigurasie kan verbeter deur 11.7 BLEU op Groundhog en die beste verkondig op resultate in dieselfde instelling. Op WMT14 Engels-Duits-taak en 'n groter WMT14 Engels-Frans-taak, ons model bereik vergelykbare resultate met die staat van die kuns.", 'sq': 'Rrjetet e thella neuronale (DNNs) kanë rritur ndoshta përkthimin e makinave neuronale (NMT) me aftësinë e saj në modelimin e funksioneve komplekse dhe kapjen e strukturave gjuhësore komplekse. Megjithatë NMT me arkitekturë të thellë në koduesin apo dekoderin e tij RNN shpesh vuajnë nga diffuzioni i rëndë gradient për shkak të aktiviteteve jo-lineare të përsëritura, gjë që shpesh e bën optimizacionin shumë më të vështirë. Për të trajtuar këtë problem ne propozojmë një njësi të re lineare shoqëruese (LAU) për të reduktuar rrugën e përhapjes së gradient ëve brenda njësisë së përsëritur. Diferent from conventional approaches (LSTM unit and GRU), LAUs uses linear associative connections between input and output of the recurrent unit, which allows uncompeded information flow through both space and time The model is quite simple, but it is surprisingly effective. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting.  Në detyrën anglo-gjermane WMT14 dhe një detyrë më të madhe anglo-franceze WMT14, modeli ynë arrin rezultate të krahasueshme me state-of-the-art.', 'am': 'የጥልቅ ኔural networks (DNNs) የ-art-የኔural machine ትርጉም (NMT) በሥርዓት አበጅቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የNMT ጥልቅ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት ወይም የድምፅ ቀዳሚ RNNs በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት በመቀስቀስ ምክንያት በብርቱ ቀዳሚ ጥፍረት ይታመሳሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመግለጽ የመረጃ አቀማመጥ የመስመር ክፍተቶችን (LAU) በመደጋገፍ ውስጥ ያለውን የግልፅ አካባቢ መንገድ እንዲያጎድል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በተለየ ግንኙነት (LSTM ክፍል እና GRU) የLAU የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተለየ፣ የግንኙነት እና የአደጋጋሚ ክፍል መካከል የመግቢያ ግንኙነት ይጠቅማል፡፡ ይህም በተለየ መረጃ ማቀናቀፍ እና ሰዓት በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ላይ የቻይና-ኢንጂልኛ ትርጓሜያችን ማስታወቂያውን የሚያሳየው ሞዴላታችን በመሬት ላይ 11.7 ቢሊዩን እና በተለያዩ ፍሬዎች ላይ የተሻለ የተዘጋጀ ነው፡፡ በWMT14 እንግሊዘኛ-ጀርመን ስራ እና ትልቅ WMT14 እንግሊዘኛ-ፈረንሳይ ስራ ላይ ሞዴሌያችን በሀገር-የ-አርእስት ላይ ትክክል ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'az': "Deep Neural Networks (DNN) musiqi Neural Machine Translation (NMT) müxtəlif fəaliyyətləri modelləşdirmək və kompleks dil yapılarını yakalamaq üçün qabiliyyətini art ırdı. Lakin NMT kodlayıcı ya da dekoder RNN'lərinin derin arhitektüsü ilə çox sıxıntılı fəaliyyətlər olmayan fəaliyyətlər üzündən çox çətin səbəb çəkir, bu da optimizasyonu çox çətin edər. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün yeni linear birlikçi birlikləri (LAU) təklif edirik ki, gradient propagasyon yolunu yenidən bir birlikdə azaltsın. Zümrəli tərəflərdən (LSTM birimi və GRU) müxtəlif tərəflər, LAUlar yenidən bir birimin girişi ilə çıxarılması arasında linear bağlantıları istifadə edir, bu da dəyişiklik məlumatların hər ikisindən və zaman arasından hərəkət edilməyən məlumatların hərəkətini sağlar Model çox asandır, amma bu təəccübl Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi haqqında impirik təhsil etməmiz göstərir ki, modellərimiz düzgün yapılandırması ilə Groundhog üstündə 11.7 BLEU ilə yaxşılaşdırılabilir və eyni təhsil üçün ən yaxşı xəbər verilmiş sonuçları. WMT14 İngilizce-Almanca işində və daha böyük WMT14 İngilizce-Fransız işində modellərimiz sanatın vəziyyəti ilə qarşılaşdırılabilir.", 'hy': 'ԴՆԹ-ները հավանաբար բարձրացրել են նորագույն նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) իր հնարավորության հետ կապված բարդ ֆունկցիաների մոդելավորման և լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքների ձայնագրման մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, NMT-ը, որի խորը ճարտարապետություն ունի իր կոդավորում կամ կոդավորում է ՌՆՆ-ները, հաճախ տառապում է խիստ դիֆուզիայից ոչ գծային կրկնվող ակտիվացիաների պատճառով, ինչը շատ ավելի դժվարանում է օպտիմացիան: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր գծային ասոցացիոն միավորներ (LAU), որոնք նվազեցնում են կրկնվող միավորի մեջ գծային տարածման ճանապարհը: Different from conventional approaches (LSTM unit and GRU), LAUs uses linear associative connections between input and output of the recurrent unit, which allows unimpeded information flow through both space and time The model is quite simple, but it is surprisingly effective.  Մեր չինական-անգլերեն թարգմանության էմպրիկական ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր ճիշտ կառուցվածքով մոդելը կարող է բարելավվել 11.7 անգամ ԲԼԵՎ-ով GrownPig-ի վրա և լավագույնը, որը հայտարարվել է նու On WMT14 English-German task and a larger WMT14 English-French task, our model achieves comparable results with the state-of-the-art.', 'bn': 'গভীর নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (ডিএনএন) সম্ভবত নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) রাষ্ট্রের ক্ষমতা বৃদ্ধি করেছে যার ফলে তারা কমপ্লাক্স ফাংশন মডেল করে এবং কমপ্লিক্স ভাষার তবে এনএমটি এর এনকোডারে গভীর আর্কিকেটের মাধ্যমে কিংবা ডিকোডার রিএনএন-এর প্রায়শই গ্রেডিয়েন্ড ড ডিফিউশনের কারণে কঠিন ভুগছে, যা প্রায়শই বেশী কঠ এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি পুনরায় রেখার ইউনিটের ভেতরে গ্রেডিয়েন্ড প্রচারণার পথ কমানোর জন্য একটি নভেল ল লাইনিয়ার Different from conventional approaches (LSTM unit and GRU), LAUs uses linear associative connections between input and output of the recurrent unit, which allows unimpeded information flow through both space and time The model is quite simple, but it is surprisingly effective.  চীনা-ইংরেজি অনুবাদের উপর আমাদের সামরিক গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সঠিক কনফিগারেশনের মডেল গ্রাউন্ডহোগে ১১. WMT14 ইংরেজী জার্মান কাজ এবং বৃহত্তর উইএমটি১৪ ইংরেজী ফ্রেঞ্চ কাজে আমাদের মডেল রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের সাথে তুলনার ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Duboke neuronske mreže (DNN) provocirale su state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) sa svojom sposobnošću u modeliranju kompleksnih funkcija i uhvativanju kompleksnih jezičkih struktura. Međutim, NMT sa dubokom arhitekturom u svom koderu ili dekoderu RNN često pati od teške diffuzije gradienta zbog neolinearnih rekonstruiranih aktivacija, što često čini optimizaciju mnogo težim. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo novu linearnu asocijativnu jedinicu (LAU) da smanji put propagacije gradienta unutar ponovne jedinice. Drugačije od konvencionalnih pristupa (LSTM jedinica i GRU), LAU koristi linearne asocijativne veze između ulaska i izlaza rekonstruntne jedinice, što omogućava nepromijenjene informacije tekući kroz prostor i vrijeme Model je prilično jednostavan, ali iznenađujuće je efikasno. Naša empirička studija o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuje da naš model sa odgovarajućom konfiguracijom može poboljšati od 11,7 BLEU na Groundhogu i najbolji izvještaj o rezultatima u istom stanju. Na WMT14 engleski-njemačkom zadatku i većem zadatku WMT14 engleski-francuski, naš model postiže usporedbene rezultate sa državom umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Les Redes Neurals Profundes (DNN) han millorat probablement la traducció de màquines neurals (NMT) amb la seva capacitat de modelar funcions complexes i capturar estructures lingüístices complexes. Tanmateix, els NMT amb arquitectura profunda en el seu codificador o descodificador RNN sovint pateixen una difusió severa de gradients degut a l'activació recurrent no linear, que sovint dificulta l'optimització. Per abordar aquest problem a proposem una nova unitat associativa linear (LAU) per reduir el camí de propagació del gradient dins l'unitat recurrent. Diferent d'enfocaments convencionals (LSTM unit i GRU), els LAU utilitzen connexions associatives linears entre entrada i sortida de l'unitat recurrent, que permet flux d'informació sense dificultats tant a través de l'espai com del temps El model és bastant simple, però sorprenentment efectiu. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting.  En la tasca anglo-alemanya WMT14 i en una tasca anglo-francesa WMT14 més gran, el nostre model aconsegueix resultats comparables amb l'última.", 'cs': 'Hluboké neuronové sítě (DNN) prokazatelně zlepšily nejmodernější neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) svou schopností modelovat složité funkce a zachycovat složité jazykové struktury. Nicméně NMT s hlubokou architekturou ve svém kodéru nebo dekodéru RNN často trpí těžkou gradientovou difúzí v důsledku nelineárních rekurentních aktivací, což často ztěžuje optimalizaci. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme nové lineární asociativní jednotky (LAU) ke snížení dráhy gradientu uvnitř recidivující jednotky. Na rozdíl od konvenčních přístupů (LSTM jednotka a GRU), LAU využívají lineární asociativní spojení mezi vstupem a výstupem recidivující jednotky, což umožňuje neomezený tok informací prostorem i časem. Model je poměrně jednoduchý, ale překvapivě efektivní. Naše empirická studie čínsko-anglického překladu ukazuje, že náš model se správnou konfigurací se může zlepšit o 11.7 BLEU na Groundhog a nejlépe vykazovat výsledky ve stejném prostředí. U anglicko-německého úkolu WMT14 a většího anglicko-francouzského úkolu WMT14 dosahuje náš model srovnatelných výsledků s nejmodernějšími.', 'et': 'Sügavad neuraalsed võrgud (DNN) on tõestavalt parandanud kaasaegset neuraalset masintõlket (NMT) oma võimega modelleerida keerukaid funktsioone ja jäädvustada keerukaid keelestruktuure. Kuid sügava arhitektuuriga NMT kodeerija või dekooder RNN-id kannatavad sageli raske gradientdifusiooni tõttu mittelineaarsete korduvate aktiveerimiste tõttu, mis sageli muudab optimeerimise palju raskemaks. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja uued lineaarsed assotsiatsiooniüksused (LAU), et vähendada gradientide leviku teed korduva ühiku sees. Erinevalt tavapärastest lähenemisviisidest (LSTM üksus ja GRU), kasutavad LAU lineaarsed assotsiatsiooniühendused korduva üksuse sisendi ja väljundi vahel, mis võimaldab takistamatult infovoolu läbi ruumi ja aja Mudel on üsna lihtne, kuid üllatavalt efektiivne. Meie empiiriline uuring hiina-inglise tõlke kohta näitab, et meie mudel koos nõuetekohase konfiguratsiooniga võib parandada 11,7 BLEU võrra Groundhogi puhul ja parim on esitatud tulemuste kohta samas tingimuses. WMT14 inglise-saksa ülesande ja suurema WMT14 inglise-prantsuse ülesande puhul saavutab meie mudel võrreldavaid tulemusi kaasaegse tehnikaga.', 'fi': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNN) on todistetusti parantanut huippuluokan neurokonekäännöstä (NMT) sen kyvyllä mallintaa monimutkaisia toimintoja ja vangita monimutkaisia kielellisiä rakenteita. Kuitenkin NMT, jolla on syvä arkkitehtuuri kooderi- tai dekooderiRNN:issä, kärsivät usein vaikeasta gradientdiffuusiosta epälineaaristen toistuvien aktivointien vuoksi, mikä usein vaikeuttaa optimointia. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uusia lineaarisia assosiatiivisia yksiköitä (LAU), jotka vähentävät gradientin etenemispolkua toistuvan yksikön sisällä. Perinteisistä lähestymistavoista (LSTM-yksikkö ja GRU) poiketen LAU:t käyttävät lineaarisia assosiatiivisia yhteyksiä toistuvan yksikön syötön ja tuotoksen välillä, mikä mahdollistaa esteettömän tiedonkulun sekä tilan että ajan läpi Malli on melko yksinkertainen, mutta se on yllättävän tehokas. Empiirinen tutkimus kiina-englanti käännöksestä osoittaa, että mallimme oikealla kokoonpanolla voi parantaa 11,7 BLEU:lla Groundhogin kohdalla ja parhaiten raportoitu tuloksista samassa ympäristössä. WMT14 englanti-saksa tehtävässä ja suuremmassa WMT14 englanti-ranska tehtävässä mallimme saavuttaa vertailukelpoisia tuloksia huipputekniikan kanssa.', 'jv': 'deep Neral Network (DNNs) politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness To Address this question we proposal a rome linear Associate Units (LAU) to cut the gradient profiigation path in the recurring unit. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kita wektu kelas empirhik kanggo tarjamahan ning cara-ingles sing bisa ngerasai model nyeneng dhéwé nggunakake supoyo barang mabur kanggo 11.7 B Nang WWT 14 Bidak Inggris-German lan singgal kuwi Mungkin-Perancis WWT 14, model nambah sing bisa suparahan kanggo kalagayaan kanggo kalagayaan-kanggo Artis.', 'ha': "@ info: status A lokacin da NMT na da matsakan mai ƙari cikin kode ko da na kode RNNS, ko da yawa, za'a yi cũtar da diffusyon daraja mai tsanani, saboda haka da aikin na'urar da ba'a lissafa, wannan yana da amfani da ya fi tsanani. Domin da za'a yi addu'a ga wannan mataimaki, sai mu buƙata wata jama'a masu ƙaranci cikin shirin da aka lokace (LaU) don a ƙarantar hanyari na watangar da za'a yi amfani da shi. Diff-sãɓãni na masu haɗi na haɗi (LTRM unit da GRU), LaU na yi amfani da haɗi masu lissafa a tsakanin shiga da fitarwa da kuma ƙarshen shirin da aka sake ranar da, wanda yana yarda da shirin da ba'a haɗi da shi ba a sami duk fili da lokaci, Ana yi amfani da shirin ayuka ya zama mai sauƙi, amma yana mai amfani da shi. Tayyar da fassarar aiki na China-Ingiriya yana nũna cẽwa misalinmu da tsari mai daidai, yana iya ƙaranci da 11.7 BLEU kan Ground hog kuma mafi kyaun wanda aka bai wa fassarar matsayin da ke daidaita. Ga WMT14 na aikin Inglizi-Jarman da kuma babban WMT14 na Inglizi-French, misalinmu yana sami fassarar da-the-art.", 'sk': 'Globoka živčna omrežja (DNN) so dokazno izboljšala najsodobnejšo nevralno strojno prevajanje (NMT) s svojo zmožnostjo modeliranja kompleksnih funkcij in zajemanja kompleksnih jezikovnih struktur. Vendar pa NMT z globoko arhitekturo v kodirnih ali dekodirnih RNN-jih pogosto trpi zaradi nelinearnih ponavljajočih se aktivacij, kar pogosto otežuje optimizacijo. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo nove linearne asociativne enote (LAU) za zmanjšanje poti razmnoževanja gradienta znotraj ponavljajoče se enote. Z razliko od običajnih pristopov (LSTM enota in GRU), LAU uporabljajo linearne asociativne povezave med vhodom in izhodom ponavljajoče se enote, kar omogoča neoviran pretok informacij skozi prostor in čas Model je precej preprost, vendar je presenetljivo učinkovit. Naša empirična študija kitajsko-angleškega prevoda kaže, da se lahko naš model z ustrezno konfiguracijo izboljša za 11,7 BLEU na Groundhog in najbolje poroča o rezultatih v istem okolju. Pri angleško-nemški nalogi WMT14 in večji angleško-francoski nalogi WMT14 naš model dosega primerljive rezultate z najsodobnejšimi.', 'he': 'רשתות עצביות עמוקות (DNN) בטח השתפרו את התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT) המוקדם ביותר עם היכולת שלה לדוגמא תפקידים מורכבים ולתפוס מבנים שפתיים מורכבים. בכל אופן, NMT עם ארכיטקטורה עמוקה במקודד או פיקוד RNN לעתים קרובות סובלים מפיצוץ גרדיינט חמור בגלל הפעילות לא לינרית חוזרת, מה שעושה לעתים קרובות את האופטימיזציה הרבה יותר קשה. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזו אנו מציעים יחידות שותפות לינריות (LAU) חדשות כדי להפחית את מסלול ההתפתחות של גרדיינט בתוך יחידה חוזרת. שונה מהגישות קונבנציונליות (יחידת LSTM ו GRU), LAUs משתמשים בקשרים שותפים לינריים בין הכניסה והיציאה של יחידת המחזרה, אשר מאפשר זרימת מידע בלתי מוגבלת דרך גם חלל וגם זמן המודל הוא די פשוט, אבל זה יעיל באופן מפתיע. Our empirical study on Chinese-English translation shows that our model with proper configuration can improve by 11.7 BLEU upon Groundhog and the best reported on results in the same setting.  על משימה WMT14 אנגלית-גרמנית ומשימה גדולה יותר WMT14 אנגלית-צרפתית, המודל שלנו משיג תוצאות שוויות עם המדינה המאומנת.', 'bo': 'Deep Neural Networks (DNNs) have provably enhanced the state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) with its capability in modeling complex functions and capturing complex linguistic structures. However NMT with deep architecture in its encoder or decoder RNNs often suffer from severe gradient diffusion due to the non-linear recurrent activations, which often makes the optimization much more difficult. To address this problem we propose a novel linear associative units (LAU) to reduce the gradient propagation path inside the recurrent unit. Different from conventional approaches (LSTM unit and GRU), LAUs uses linear associative connections between input and output of the recurrent unit, which allows unimpeded information flow through both space and time The model is quite simple, but it is surprisingly effective. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་བརྡ་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག On WMT14 English-German task and a larger WMT14 English-French task, our model achieves comparable results with the state-of-the-art.'}
{'en': 'Neural AMR : Sequence-to-Sequence Models for Parsing and Generation', 'ar': 'العصبية AMR: نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل للتحليل والتوليد', 'es': 'AMR neuronal: modelos de secuencia a secuencia para análisis y generación', 'pt': 'AMR neural: modelos de sequência a sequência para análise e geração', 'fr': "RAM neuronale\xa0: modèles séquence à séquence pour l'analyse et la génération", 'ja': 'ニューラルAMR ：構文解析と生成のためのシーケンスツーシーケンスモデル', 'zh': '神经 AMR:解析序', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका एएमआर: पार्सिंग और पीढ़ी के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल', 'ru': 'Нейронные AMR: модели последовательности к последовательности для разбора и генерации', 'ga': 'AMR Néarach: Samhlacha Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh le haghaidh Parsála agus Giniúna', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური AMR: წაშლა და შექმნა მოდელები', 'el': 'Νευρική ΑΜΡ: Μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία για ανάλυση και δημιουργία', 'hu': 'Neurális AMR: Szekvencia-szekvencia modellek az értelmezéshez és a generáláshoz', 'it': "AMR neurale: modelli sequenziali per l'analisi e la generazione", 'mk': 'Неурална АМР: Модели од секвенција до секвенција за анализирање и генерација', 'kk': 'Нейрондық AMR: талдау және жасау үшін реттеу үлгілері', 'lt': 'Neuralinė AMR: iš eilės į eilę analizuojami ir generuojami modeliai', 'ms': 'AMR Neural: Model Sequence-to-Sequence for Parsing and Generation', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d AMR: പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങും ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സെക്കന്റ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'AMR newrali: Mudelli minn Sekwenza għal Sekwenza għall-Analiżi u l-Ġenerazzjoni', 'mn': 'АМР: Тайлбарлах болон бүтээлтийн дараагийн загвар', 'no': 'Neurale AMR: Sekvensmodeller for tolking og generering', 'sr': 'Neuralni AMR: Modeli sekvence do sekvence za analizu i generaciju', 'pl': 'Neuronal AMR: Modele sekwencji do sekwencji do parsowania i generowania', 'ro': 'Neural AMR: Modele secvență-la-secvență pentru analizare și generare', 'so': 'AMR: Sequence-to-Sequence Models for Parsing and Generation', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල AMR: විශ්ලේෂණය සහ නිර්මාණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Neural AMR: Sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller för tolkning och generering', 'ta': 'நெருக்கமான AMR: பாடல் மற்றும் உருவாக்கத்திற்கான தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'نیورال AMR: پارچینگ اور پیدائش کے لئے سکونس- تا- سکونس موڈل', 'uz': 'Umumiy AMR: Saqlash va yaratish usuli', 'vi': 'Thần kinh AMR: Chế độ lặp đến dãy số cho chế độ phân tích', 'bg': 'Неврозна АМР: Модели последователност към последователност за анализ и генериране', 'hr': 'Neuralni AMR: Modeli sekvence do sekvence za analizu i generaciju', 'da': 'Neural AMR: Sekvens-til-Sekvens modeller til fortolkning og generering', 'nl': 'Neural AMR: Sequence-to-Sequence modellen voor Parsing en Generatie', 'id': 'AMR Neural: Model Sequence-to-Sequence for Parsing and Generation', 'de': 'Neuronale AMR: Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Modelle für Parsing und Generierung', 'fa': 'AMR عصبی: Models sequence- to- sequence for Parsing and Generation', 'ko': '신경 AMR: 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델로 해석 및 생성하기', 'tr': 'Nöral AMR: Çözümleme ve Düzenleme için sıralama modelleri', 'sw': 'AMR: Mradi wa Kuzungumzia na Uzalishaji', 'sq': 'AMR neuronale: Modele sekuence-to-sequence për analizimin dhe gjenerimin', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Nurale AMR: Sequence- to- sequence Models for Parsing and Generation', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ԱՄՌ. Հաշվի առնելու և գեներացման հաջորդականության մոդելներ', 'az': 'N칬ral AMR: S톛hifl톛m톛 v톛 Generasiya Sequence-to-Sequence Modell톛ri', 'bs': 'Neuralni AMR: Modeli sekvence do sekvence za analizu i generaciju', 'ca': 'AMR neuronal: Models de seqüència a seqüència per analitzar i generar', 'cs': 'Neurální AMR: Modely sekvence na sekvenci pro analýzu a generování', 'et': 'Neuraalne AMR: järjestuse-järjestuse mudelid parsimiseks ja genereerimiseks', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen AMR: Sequence-to-Sequence Models for Parsing and Generation', 'bn': 'নিউরেল AMR: পার্সিং এবং জেনারেশনের জন্য সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্সের মোডেল', 'jv': 'stretchtextattr', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'AMR עצבי: דוגמנים רצף-לרצף לפרסם וגנרציה', 'sk': 'Živčni AMR: modeli zaporedja v zaporedje za razčlenitev in ustvarjanje', 'bo': 'Neural AMR: Sequence-to-Sequence Models for Parsing and Generation'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-sequence models have shown strong performance across a broad range of applications. However, their application to parsing and generating text using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) has been limited, due to the relatively limited amount of labeled data and the non-sequential nature of the AMR graphs. We present a novel training procedure that can lift this limitation using millions of unlabeled sentences and careful preprocessing of the AMR graphs. For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources. For AMR generation, our model establishes a new state-of-the-art performance of BLEU 33.8. We present extensive ablative and qualitative analysis including strong evidence that sequence-based AMR models are robust against ordering variations of graph-to-sequence conversions.', 'ar': 'أظهرت نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل أداءً قويًا عبر مجموعة واسعة من التطبيقات. ومع ذلك ، فإن تطبيقها لتحليل وإنشاء نص باستخدام تمثيل المعنى المجرد (AMR) كان محدودًا ، نظرًا للكمية المحدودة نسبيًا من البيانات المصنفة والطبيعة غير المتسلسلة لرسومات AMR البيانية. نقدم إجراء تدريب جديدًا يمكنه رفع هذا القيد باستخدام ملايين الجمل غير المسماة والمعالجة المسبقة الدقيقة لرسومات AMR البيانية. لتحليل AMR ، يحقق نموذجنا نتائج تنافسية تبلغ 62.1 SMATCH ، وهي أفضل درجة حالية تم الإبلاغ عنها دون استخدام كبير للموارد الدلالية الخارجية. بالنسبة لجيل AMR ، يؤسس نموذجنا أداءً جديدًا متطورًا لـ BLEU 33.8. نقدم تحليلًا نوعيًا وجذريًا شاملاً بما في ذلك دليل قوي على أن نماذج AMR القائمة على التسلسل قوية في مواجهة الاختلافات في ترتيب التحويلات من الرسم البياني إلى التسلسل.', 'es': 'Los modelos de secuencia a secuencia han demostrado un rendimiento sólido en una amplia gama de aplicaciones. Sin embargo, su aplicación para analizar y generar texto mediante Representación de Significado Abstracto (AMR) ha sido limitada, debido a la cantidad relativamente limitada de datos etiquetados y a la naturaleza no secuencial de los gráficos AMR. Presentamos un novedoso procedimiento de entrenamiento que puede eliminar esta limitación utilizando millones de oraciones sin etiqueta y un preprocesamiento cuidadoso de los gráficos AMR. Para el análisis de AMR, nuestro modelo logra resultados competitivos de 62.1 SMATCH, la mejor puntuación actual informada sin un uso significativo de recursos semánticos externos. Para la generación de AMR, nuestro modelo establece un nuevo rendimiento de vanguardia de BLEU 33.8. Presentamos un extenso análisis ablativo y cualitativo que incluye pruebas sólidas de que los modelos de AMR basados en secuencias son robustos frente a las variaciones de orden de las conversiones de gráfico a secuencia.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de sequência a sequência mostraram um forte desempenho em uma ampla gama de aplicações. No entanto, sua aplicação para analisar e gerar texto usando a Representação de Significado Abstrato (AMR) tem sido limitada, devido à quantidade relativamente limitada de dados rotulados e à natureza não sequencial dos gráficos AMR. Apresentamos um novo procedimento de treinamento que pode eliminar essa limitação usando milhões de sentenças não rotuladas e pré-processamento cuidadoso dos gráficos AMR. Para análise AMR, nosso modelo alcança resultados competitivos de 62,1 SMATCH, a melhor pontuação atual relatada sem uso significativo de recursos semânticos externos. Para a geração AMR, nosso modelo estabelece um novo desempenho de última geração do BLEU 33.8. Apresentamos uma extensa análise ablativa e qualitativa, incluindo fortes evidências de que os modelos AMR baseados em sequência são robustos contra variações de ordenação de conversões de gráfico para sequência.', 'fr': "Les modèles séquence à séquence ont démontré de bonnes performances dans un large éventail d'applications. Cependant, leur application à l'analyse et à la génération de texte à l'aide de la représentation abstraite de signification (AMR) a été limitée, en raison de la quantité relativement limitée de données étiquetées et de la nature non séquentielle des graphes AMR. Nous présentons une nouvelle procédure de formation qui peut lever cette limitation en utilisant des millions de phrases non étiquetées et un prétraitement minutieux des graphes AMR. Pour l'analyse AMR, notre modèle atteint des résultats compétitifs de 62,1 SMATCH, le meilleur score actuel rapporté sans utilisation significative de ressources sémantiques externes. Pour la génération d'AMR, notre modèle établit une nouvelle performance de pointe de BLEU 33.8. Nous présentons une analyse ablative et qualitative approfondie, y compris des preuves solides que les modèles de RAM basés sur des séquences sont robustes contre les variations d'ordre des conversions graphique-séquence.", 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、幅広い用途にわたって強力なパフォーマンスを示している。しかしながら、ラベル付けされたデータの量が比較的限られており、AMRグラフの非逐次的な性質により、抽象意味表現(AMR)を使用したテキストの解析及び生成へのそれらの応用は限定されている。私たちは、何百万ものラベル付けされていない文章とAMRグラフの慎重な前処理を使用して、この制限を解除することができる新規のトレーニング手順を提示します。AMR解析では、当社のモデルは62.1 SMATCHの競合結果を達成します。これは、外部のセマンティックリソースを大幅に使用することなく報告された現在のベストスコアです。AMR世代では、当社のモデルはBLEU 33.8の最新性能を確立しています。我々は、配列ベースのAMRモデルが、グラフから配列への変換の順序変動に対して堅牢であるという強力な証拠を含む、広範なアブレーション分析および定性分析を提示する。', 'ru': 'Модели последовательности к последовательности показали высокую производительность в широком диапазоне применений. Однако их применение для разбора и генерации текста с использованием абстрактного смыслового представления (АМР) было ограниченным из-за относительно ограниченного объема помеченных данных и непоследовательного характера графиков АМР. Мы представляем новую процедуру обучения, которая может снять это ограничение, используя миллионы немеченных предложений и тщательную предварительную обработку графиков AMR. Для AMR парсинга наша модель достигает конкурентных результатов 62,1 SMATCH, текущий лучший результат сообщается без существенного использования внешних семантических ресурсов. Для генерации AMR наша модель устанавливает новую современную производительность BLEU 33.8. Мы представляем обширный абляционный и качественный анализ, включая убедительные доказательства того, что основанные на последовательности модели AMR устойчивы против упорядочивания вариаций преобразований от графа к последовательности.', 'zh': '序于序于广用之中。 然则标数据量有限及AMR图之非顺序性,其用抽象之义(AMR)解析与生成文本之宜限也。 臣等条上新训练程序,可用未标数百万句,与AMR图细预处理以解其限。 其于 AMR 解析也, 62.1 SMATCH 之争也,未有大用语义资源之分也。 于AMR一代,BLEU 33.8之全新。 敷烧蚀定性分析,包强证明,基于序列之AMR图到转易之序,其变安矣。', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल ने अनुप्रयोगों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में मजबूत प्रदर्शन दिखाया है। हालांकि, सार अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (एएमआर) का उपयोग करके पाठ को पार्स करने और उत्पन्न करने के लिए उनका आवेदन सीमित हो गया है, लेबल किए गए डेटा की अपेक्षाकृत सीमित मात्रा और एएमआर ग्राफ की गैर-अनुक्रमिक प्रकृति के कारण। हम एक उपन्यास प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो लाखों अनलेबल वाक्यों और एएमआर ग्राफ के सावधानीपूर्वक प्रीप्रोसेसिंग का उपयोग करके इस सीमा को उठा सकती है। एएमआर पार्सिंग के लिए, हमारा मॉडल 62.1 SMATCH के प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणामों को प्राप्त करता है, जो बाहरी शब्दार्थ संसाधनों के महत्वपूर्ण उपयोग के बिना रिपोर्ट किया गया वर्तमान सबसे अच्छा स्कोर है। एएमआर पीढ़ी के लिए, हमारा मॉडल BLEU 33.8 के एक नए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन को स्थापित करता है। हम व्यापक ablative और गुणात्मक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसमें मजबूत सबूत शामिल हैं कि अनुक्रम-आधारित एएमआर मॉडल ग्राफ-टू-सीक्वेंस रूपांतरणों की विविधताओं के आदेश के खिलाफ मजबूत हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá feidhmíocht láidir léirithe ag samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh thar raon leathan feidhmchlár. Mar sin féin, tá teorainn lena gcur i bhfeidhm ar pharsáil agus ar ghiniúint téacs trí úsáid a bhaint as Léiriú Brí Teibí (AMR) mar gheall ar mhéid sách teoranta na sonraí lipéadaithe agus nádúr neamhsheicheamhach na ngraf AMR. Cuirimid nós imeachta oiliúna nua i láthair a fhéadfaidh an teorannú seo a ardú trí úsáid a bhaint as na milliúin abairtí gan lipéad agus trí réamhphróiseáil chúramach a dhéanamh ar na graif AMR. Maidir le parsáil AMR, baineann ár múnla torthaí iomaíocha amach de 62.1 SMATCH, an scór is fearr faoi láthair a tuairiscíodh gan úsáid shuntasach a bhaint as acmhainní séimeantacha seachtracha. Maidir le giniúint AMR, bunaíonn ár múnla feidhmíocht úrscothach de BLEU 33.8. Cuirimid i láthair anailís fhairsing ablative agus cáilíochtúil lena n-áirítear fianaise láidir go bhfuil múnlaí AMR seicheamh-bhunaithe láidir i gcoinne éagsúlachtaí a ordú tiontaithe graf-go-seicheamh.', 'ka': 'პროგრამების მოდელები ჩვენებულია ძალიან პროგრამების განმავლობაში. მაგრამ, მათი პროგრამა აბსტრაქტიკური განსაზღვრების გამოყენებით ტექსტის პარალიზაციას და დავიწყებას (AMR) განსაზღვრებული იყო, რადგან განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების და AMR გრაფიკის განსაზღვრებული ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პროგრამის განაკეთება, რომელიც შეგვიძლია ამ განაკეთებას გამოყენებთ მილიონი არაკეთებული სიტყვები და დარწმუნელად გადაწყენება AMR გრაფიკაში. AMR პანსტირებისთვის, ჩვენი მოდელი 62.1 SMATCH-ის კონკენტებური წარმოდგენა, მიმდინარე უკეთესი წარმოდგენა გარეშე სემონტიკური რესურსების გამოყენება უფ AMR წარმოდგენისთვის ჩვენი მოდელი ახალი სახელსაწარმოდგენისთვის BLEU 33.8. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ დიდი აბრატიგური და კვალიტატიგური ანალიზი, რომელიც ძალიან წარმოდგენება, რომ მოდელები, რომლებიც მინდომის მოდელები, უფრო ძალიან დავწყებენ გრაფიკ', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία έχουν δείξει ισχυρή απόδοση σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εφαρμογών. Ωστόσο, η εφαρμογή τους στην ανάλυση και τη δημιουργία κειμένου με τη χρήση της αναπαράστασης αφηρημένης έννοιας (ΑΜR) έχει περιοριστεί, λόγω της σχετικά περιορισμένης ποσότητας επισημασμένων δεδομένων και της μη διαδοχικής φύσης των γραφημάτων ΑΜR. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα εκπαιδευτική διαδικασία που μπορεί να άρει αυτόν τον περιορισμό χρησιμοποιώντας εκατομμύρια μη επισήμαντες προτάσεις και προσεκτική προεπεξεργασία των γραφημάτων ΑΜR. Για την ανάλυση AMR, το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα 62.1 της τρέχουσας καλύτερης βαθμολογίας που αναφέρεται χωρίς σημαντική χρήση εξωτερικών σημασιολογικών πόρων. Για τη γενιά AMR, το μοντέλο μας καθιερώνει μια νέα υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση του BLEU 33.8. Παρουσιάζουμε εκτενή αφαιρετική και ποιοτική ανάλυση, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ισχυρών αποδεικτικών στοιχείων ότι τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε ακολουθίες είναι ανθεκτικά ενάντια στις διαταγές παραλλαγών μετατροπών γραφής σε ακολουθία.', 'hu': 'A szekvencia-szekvencia modellek nagy teljesítményt mutattak az alkalmazások széles körében. Azonban alkalmazásuk az Absztrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) segítségével történő szöveg elemzésére és generálására korlátozott volt, mivel a címkézett adatok viszonylag korlátozott mennyisége és az AMR grafikonok nem szekvenciális jellege miatt. Bemutatunk egy új képzési eljárást, amely ezt a korlátozást több millió címke nélküli mondatot és az AMR grafikonok gondos előfeldolgozását segíti. Az AMR elemzéséhez modellünk 62,1 SMATCH versenyképes eredményt ér el, ami a jelenlegi legjobb pontszámot jelentette külső szemantikai erőforrások jelentős felhasználása nélkül. Az AMR generáció számára modellünk a BLEU 33.8 új, korszerű teljesítményét hozza létre. Széleskörű ablatív és minőségi elemzést mutatunk be, beleértve azt is, hogy a szekvencia alapú AMR modellek megbízhatóak a gráf-szekvencia konverziók rendezési variációival szemben.', 'it': "I modelli sequenziali hanno mostrato prestazioni elevate in un'ampia gamma di applicazioni. Tuttavia, la loro applicazione all'analisi e alla generazione di testo utilizzando Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) è stata limitata, a causa della quantità relativamente limitata di dati etichettati e della natura non sequenziale dei grafici AMR. Presentiamo una nuova procedura di formazione che può sollevare questa limitazione utilizzando milioni di frasi non etichettate e un attento preelaborazione dei grafici AMR. Per l'analisi AMR, il nostro modello raggiunge risultati competitivi di 62,1 SMATCH, il miglior punteggio attualmente riportato senza un uso significativo di risorse semantiche esterne. Per la generazione AMR, il nostro modello stabilisce una nuova performance all'avanguardia di BLEU 33.8. Presentiamo un'ampia analisi ablativa e qualitativa che include prove forti che i modelli AMR basati su sequenza sono robusti contro variazioni di ordine delle conversioni grafico-sequenza.", 'lt': 'Nuosekos į seką modeliai parodė didelį veiksmingumą įvairiose taikomosiose srityse. Tačiau jų taikymas teksto analizei ir kūrimui naudojant Abstraktinę reikšmę (Abstract Meaning Representation, AMR) buvo ribotas dėl santykinai riboto žymėtų duomenų kiekio ir nepaeiliusio AMR grafikų pobūdžio. Pateikiame naują mokymo procedūrą, kuri gali panaikinti šį apribojimą naudojant milijonus nenurodytų sakinių ir atidžiai apdorojant AMR grafikus. Atliekant AMR analizę, mūsų modelis pasiekia 62,1 SMATCH konkurencinius rezultatus, o dabartinis geriausias rezultatas, apie kurį pranešta, labai nepanaudojant išorinių semantinių išteklių. Mūsų modelis nustato naujausius BLEU 33.8 rezultatus AMR generacijai. Pateikiame išsamią ablatinę ir kokybinę analizę, įskaitant tvirtus įrodymus, kad sekos pagrindu pagrįsti AMR modeliai yra tvirti prieš tvarkant grafikų pokyčius iš eilės.', 'mk': 'Моделите од секвенца до секвенца покажаа силни резултати низ широк опсег на апликации. Сепак, нивната апликација за анализирање и генерирање текст користејќи Апстрактно значење претставување (АМР) е ограничена, поради релативно ограничената количина на обележани податоци и несеквенцијалната природа на графиките на АМР. Презентираме нова процедура на обука која може да ја укине оваа ограничување со користење на милиони необележани реченици и внимателно преработување на графиките на АМР. За анализирањето на АМР, нашиот модел постигнува конкурентни резултати од 62,1 СМАТХ, моменталната најдобра оценка објавена без значителна употреба на надворешни семантични ресурси. За генерацијата АМР, нашиот модел воспоставува нова најнова изведба на БЛЕУ 33,8. Презентираме експензивна аблативна и квалитетна анализа вклучувајќи силни докази дека моделите на АМР базирани на секвенца се силни против наредувањето на варијации на графички конверзии.', 'kk': 'Қолданбалардың көпшілік аумағында қатты ықтималдығын көрсету үлгілері. Бірақ олардың қолданбалары Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) арқылы мәтінді талдау және құру үшін мәтінді шектеп тұрған, мәтінді AMR графиктерінің салыстырып шектелген деректер мен келесі қасиеттерінің қасиеттері бойынша Біз бұл шектеулерді миллиондардың мәліметтері мен AMR графиктерінің алдын- ала өзгертуге болады. AMR талдау үшін, біздің моделіміз 62,1 SMATCH бағытты нәтижелерін жеткізеді. Қолданыстағы ең жақсы нәтижелер сыртқы семантикалық ресурстарды қолданбаған. AMR құрылымыз үшін, біздің моделіміз BLEU 33.8 деген жаңа күй- жайындағы жұмыс істеу жасайды. Біз кеңейтілген көбекті және квалификациялық анализ келтіріп тұрамыз, сондай-ақ кеңейтілген AMR үлгілері графикалық түрлендірудің түрлендіріліктерін реттеу үшін дұрыс бол', 'ms': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan telah menunjukkan prestasi yang kuat melalui julat luas aplikasi. Namun, aplikasi mereka untuk menghurai dan menghasilkan teks menggunakan Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt (AMR) telah terbatas, kerana jumlah data yang ditabel relatif terbatas dan sifat bukan-sekuensi graf AMR. Kami memperkenalkan prosedur latihan baru yang boleh membatalkan keterangan ini menggunakan jutaan kalimat yang tidak berlebihan dan mempersiapkan grafik AMR dengan berhati-hati. For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources.  Untuk generasi AMR, model kami menetapkan prestasi terbaru BLEU 33.8. Kami mempersembahkan analisis ablatif dan kualitatif yang luas termasuk bukti yang kuat bahawa model AMR berasaskan jujukan adalah kuat melawan mengatur variasi konversi graf-ke-jujukan.', 'ml': 'പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ വിശാലമുള്ള പരിധികളില്\u200d ശക്തമായ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ (AMR) ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പദാവലി പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുകയും ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിധിയിലാ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പരിശീലന പ്രക്രിയയെ കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഇതിന്റെ പരിധിയെ ഉയര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. കോടികണക്കിന് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപ AMR പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന് വേണ്ടി, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 62. 1 SMATCH നേരെ മത്സരമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സ്കോര്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ AMR തലമുറയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബില്യൂ 33.8-ന്റെ പുതിയ സ്ഥാനം സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. സെക്കന്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള AMR മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫിലേക്ക് മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരെ നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതിനെതിരാ', 'mt': "Il-mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza wrew prestazzjoni qawwija f’firxa wiesgħa ta’ applikazzjonijiet. Madankollu, l-applikazzjoni tagħhom għall-analizzazzjoni u l-ġenerazzjoni tat-test bl-użu tar-Rappreżentanza tat-Tip Abstrat (AMR) kienet limitata, minħabba l-ammont relattivament limitat ta’ dejta ttikkettata u n-natura mhux sekwenzjali tal-graffi AMR. Aħna nippreżentaw proċedura ġdida ta' taħriġ li tista' tneħħi din il-limitazzjoni bl-użu ta' miljuni ta' sentenzi mingħajr tikketta u l-ipproċessar bir-reqqa tal-grafiċi AMR. Għall-analiżi tal-AMR, il-mudell tagħna jikseb riżultati kompetittivi ta’ 62.1 SMATCH, l-aħjar punteġġ attwali rrappurtat mingħajr użu sinifikanti ta’ riżorsi semantiċi esterni. Għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-AMR, il-mudell tagħna jistabbilixxi prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata ġdida tal-BLEU 33.8. Aħna nippreżentaw analiżi estensiva ablativa u kwalitattiva li tinkludi evidenza qawwija li mudelli AMR ibbażati fuq is-sekwenza huma robusti kontra l-ordni ta’ varjazzjonijiet ta’ konverżjonijiet minn graff għal sekwenza.", 'mn': 'Дараагийн дарааллын загварууд маш олон програм дахь хүчтэй ажиллагааг харуулсан. Гэхдээ тэдний Абстрактын утгын үзүүлэлт (AMR) ашиглан текст хуваалцах болон бий болгох хэрэгсэл нь хязгаарлагдсан. АМР графикийн харьцангуй хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн хэмжээ болон дараагийн биш байдлын шалтгаан. Бид энэ хязгаарыг сая сая өгүүлбэргүй өгүүлбэрийг ашиглаж, АМР графикийг анхаарлаа зохицуулж чадна. АМР хуваалцахын тулд бидний загвар 62.1 СМАТХ-ын өрсөлдөөний үр дүнг гаргадаг. Гэвч одоогийн хамгийн сайн тоо нь гадаад хэмжээний баялаг ашиглахгүй байдаг. АМР үеийн загварын хувьд бидний загвар нь BLEU 33.8-ийн шинэ урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг зохион байгуулдаг. Бид дарааллын AMR загваруудыг график дарааллын өөрчлөлтүүдийг дарааллаар шалгах эсрэг хүчтэй болон чадвартай шинжилгээ үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Sekvens- til- sekvensmodeller har vist sterk utvikling over eit brett område av program. Dette programmet for tolking og generering av tekst med abstrakt middelrepresentasjon (AMR) er imidlertid begrenset på grunn av relativt begrenset mengden av merkelige data og ikkje-sekvensisk natur av AMR- grafene. Vi presenterer eit nytt opplæringsprosedyr som kan løfte denne grensen med millioner av ulike setningar og forsiktig forhandtering av AMR-grafene. For AMR-tolking, vår modell når sammenhengige resultat av 62,1 SMATCH, har den beste poeng rapportert utan signifikante bruk av eksterne semantiske ressursar. For AMR-generasjon er modellen vårt oppretta eit nytt tilstand for kunstfullføring av BLEU 33.8. Vi presenterer ekstra ablativ og kvalitativ analyse, inkludert sterke beviser at sekvensbaserte AMR-modeller er styrke mot rekkjefølgjande variasjonar av graf-til-sekvens-konvertasjonar.', 'pl': 'Modele sekwencji-sekwencji wykazały dużą wydajność w szerokim zakresie zastosowań. Jednak ich zastosowanie do parsowania i generowania tekstu przy użyciu Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) jest ograniczone ze względu na stosunkowo ograniczoną ilość etykietowanych danych oraz niesekwencyjny charakter wykresów AMR. Przedstawiamy nowatorską procedurę szkoleniową, która może znieść to ograniczenie za pomocą milionów nieoznakowanych zdań i starannego wstępnego przetwarzania wykresów AMR. Dla parsowania AMR nasz model osiąga konkurencyjne wyniki 62.1 SMATCH, aktualnie najlepszego wyniku raportowanego bez znaczącego wykorzystania zewnętrznych zasobów semantycznych. Dla generacji AMR, nasz model ustanawia nową, najnowocześniejszą wydajność BLEU 33.8. Przedstawiamy obszerną analizę ablacyjną i jakościową obejmującą silne dowody na to, że modele AMR oparte na sekwencji są solidne w porządkowaniu wariantów konwersji wykresu na sekwencję.', 'ro': 'Modelele secvență-secvență au demonstrat performanțe puternice într-o gamă largă de aplicații. Cu toate acestea, aplicarea lor la analizarea și generarea textului utilizând reprezentarea abstractă a semnificației (AMR) a fost limitată, din cauza cantității relativ limitate de date etichetate și a naturii non-secvențiale a graficelor AMR. Vă prezentăm o nouă procedură de instruire care poate ridica această limitare folosind milioane de propoziții neetichetate și prelucrarea atentă a graficelor AMR. Pentru analizarea AMR, modelul nostru obține rezultate competitive de 62,1 SMATCH, cel mai bun scor actual raportat fără utilizarea semnificativă a resurselor semantice externe. Pentru generația AMR, modelul nostru stabilește o nouă performanță de ultimă generație a BLEU 33.8. Vă prezentăm o analiză ablativă și calitativă extinsă, inclusiv dovezi puternice că modelele AMR bazate pe secvență sunt robuste împotriva variațiilor de ordine ale conversiilor graf-la-secvență.', 'sr': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence pokazali su snažnu funkciju širom niza aplikacija. Međutim, njihova aplikacija za analizu i proizvodnju teksta koristeći Abstrakt Meaning Representative (AMR) je ograničena zbog relativno ograničene količine označenih podataka i neosekvencije prirode AMR grafika. Predstavljamo novu proceduru obuke koja može da podigne ovu ograničenje koristeći milione neopisivanih rečenica i pažljivo preobrađivanje grafika AMR-a. Za analizu AMR, naš model postiže konkurentne rezultate od 62,1 SMATCH, trenutni najbolji rezultat koji je prijavljen bez značajne upotrebe vanjskih semantičkih resursa. Za generaciju AMR, naš model uspostavlja novi nastup umjetnosti BLEU 33.8. Predstavljamo široku ablativnu i kvalitativnu analizu uključujući jake dokaze da su modeli AMR na sekvenciji robni protiv naređenja varijacija razgovora grafika do sekvencije.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න. නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝගය අවස්ථාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ නිර්මාණය කරන්න පාළුව (AMR) භාවිත විශ්වාස කරන්න සීමාවිත වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ඇම්ර අපි පිළිගන්නේ නොවැඩක් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂණා විධානයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් මේ සීමාව මිලියන් වාර්තාවක් සහ පරිස්සම් ප්\u200dරක AMR විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා, අපේ මොඩල් 62.1 SMATCH ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ් AMR පරිමාණයෙන්, අපේ මොඩල් ස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ අළුත් ජාතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරිමාණය BLUE 33.8 ගැන. අපි විශේෂ අක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය සමඟ ශක්තිමත් සාක්ෂියක් තියෙනවා කියලා ඇම්රි මොඩේල්ස් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂණය', 'sv': 'Sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller har visat stark prestanda inom ett brett spektrum av applikationer. Dock har deras tillämpning på tolkning och generering av text med hjälp av abstrakt betydelserepresentation (AMR) varit begränsad på grund av den relativt begränsade mängden märkta data och AMR-grafernas icke-sekventiella karaktär. Vi presenterar ett nytt utbildningsförfarande som kan lyfta denna begränsning med miljontals omärkta meningar och noggrann förbehandling av AMR-graferna. För AMR-analys uppnår vår modell konkurrenskraftiga resultat på 62,1 SMATCH, den nuvarande bästa poängen rapporterad utan betydande användning av externa semantiska resurser. För AMR-generationen etablerar vår modell en ny toppmodern prestanda för BLEU 33.8. Vi presenterar omfattande ablativ och kvalitativ analys inklusive starka belägg för att sekvensbaserade AMR-modeller är robusta mot beställningsvariationer av graf-till-sekvensomvandlingar.', 'so': "Tusaale-qaab-soo-socodka waxaa lagu muujiyey tababar xoog leh oo codsiyada kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee codsigooda ku baaraandegista iyo soo saaridda qoraalka lagu isticmaalayo Abstract (AMR) waa xaday, sababtoo ah qiyaastii aad u xadan tahay iyo dabiicadda AMR-ka xilliga ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa habka waxbarashada ee warqada ah oo ay u qaadan karaan xadhiggan, sida ay u isticmaalaan milliaal milyan imtixaan aan la aqoonsan iyo si taxadar ah uga baaraandegista sawirada AMR. Jardinka AMR, modellkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa resulto iskutallaabta ah 62.1 SMATCH, scoraha ugu wanaagsan ee la soo sheegay iyadoon isticmaalin isticmaalka dibadda ee semantic. Maxaa yeelay AMR qarnigeena ayaa sameynaya xaalad cusub oo farshaxan ah BLEU 33.8. Anagaa sameynaya wax faa'iido dheer oo qiimeyn ah, kuwaas oo ku jira caddeynta xoogga leh in qaababka AMR-ku saleysan lagu tuuraa si ay u ordaan bedelka bedelka xarafta-ilaa-xilliga.", 'ur': 'سکوئنس-سے-سکوئنس نمڈل ایک گھیری سینڈر میں مضبوط فعالیت دکھائی گئی ہے۔ However, their application to parse and generate text using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) has been limited due to the relatively limited amount of labeled data and the non-sequence nature of the AMR graphs. ہم نے ایک نوی تدریس پردازی پیش کیے جو اس کی محدودیت کو میلیونوں بغیر قابل تعلیم کے مطابق بلند کر سکتی ہے اور AMR گراف کی پردازی سے اچھی طرح کرسکتی ہے۔ AMR پارسینگ کے لئے، ہماری مدل 62.1 SMATCH کے مسابقات نتیجے پہنچ جاتے ہیں، جو موجود بہترین اسکو باہر سیمنٹی سراسروں کے مطابقت کے بغیر معمول استعمال کیا گیا ہے. AMR کی نسل کے لئے، ہماری مدل نے BLEU 33.8 کی نئی حالت کی عملکرد کی بنائی ہے. ہم مضبوط شہادت کے ساتھ وسیع غیر قابل تحقیقات اور قابل تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کو پیش کریں گے کہ سطح پر آمریکا موڈل گراف سے سطح کی تغییرات کے بارے میں سخت ہیں.', 'ta': 'விரிவான பயன்பாடுகள் முழுவதும் தொடர் மாதிரிகள் வலிமையான செயல்பாட்டை காட்டியுள்ளது. However, their application to parsing and generating text using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) has been limited, due to the relatively limited amount of labeled data and the non-sequential nature of the AMR graphs.  நாம் இந்த வரம்பை உயர்த்த முடியும் புதிய பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மில்லியன் வரைபடங்களை பயன்படுத்தி முன்னோக AMR பாடலுக்கு, எங்கள் மாதிரி 62. 1 SMATCH விளைவுகளை பெறுகிறது, தற்போதைய சிறந்த மதிப்பெண் அறிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, வெளி பொருள் பாதுகாப்பு ம AMR தலைமுறைக்கு, எங்கள் மாதிரி பிலியு 33.8 ஒரு புதிய நிலையின் கலை செயல்பாட்டை உருவாக்குகிறது. நாம் விரிவாக ஆற்றல் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கம் கொண்டு இருக்கிறோம் உறுதியான தெளிவுகள் உள்ளன, வரைபடம் வரைபடம் மாறுதல் மாறுபாடு', 'uz': "Dasturlar tarkibi cheksiz modellari qoʻllangan dasturlarda katta ishlatiladi. Lekin, Abstract Representation (AMR) yordamida matnni ajratish va yaratish uchun dastur chegara, biz AMR grafikning qisqacha cheksiz maʼlumot va keyingi xil tarkibi sababi. Biz bu chegarani millionlab hech qanday so'zlar yordamida olib tashlash va AMR grafiklarini taqdim qilish mumkin. For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources.  AMR generasi uchun modelmiz 33.8 BLEU 33.8 haqida yangi holatni boshlaydi. Biz ajoyib va kvlitativ analyzerni hozir qilamiz, cheksiz asosiy AMR modellari grafik-to-seksirlik aylantirishni amalga oshirish uchun ko'proq hujjatlar bor.", 'vi': "Các mô- đun dãy lặp đã cho thấy hiệu quả mạnh trên một loạt các ứng dụng rộng. Tuy nhiên, ứng dụng của họ với phân tích và phát điện văn bản bằng'Abstract meaning Representation (AMR) đã bị hạn chế, nhờ vào một số lượng nhỏ các dữ liệu được dán nhãn và tính chất không theo chuỗi của các biểu đồ AMR. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một thủ tục đào tạo mới có thể nâng cấp giới hạn này bằng hàng triệu câu chưa được trả lời và xử lý cẩn thận các biểu đồ AMR. Đối với phân tích AMR, kiểu mẫu đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh của 62.1 SMSCH, điểm số tốt hiện nay được báo cáo mà không cần sử dụng các nguồn gốc ngoại ngữ. Trong thời đại AMR, mô hình của chúng tôi lập ra một màn trình diễn hoàn toàn mới. Chúng tôi đưa ra các phân tích cẩn thận và về năng lượng, gồm chứng cứ mạnh mẽ rằng các mô hình AMR dựa trên dãy số không đủ mạnh để đặt các biến đổi trong lịch trình.", 'nl': 'Sequence-to-sequence modellen hebben sterke prestaties laten zien in een breed scala aan toepassingen. Hun toepassing op het parsen en genereren van tekst met behulp van Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) is echter beperkt, vanwege de relatief beperkte hoeveelheid gelabelde gegevens en het niet-sequentiële karakter van de AMR grafieken. We presenteren een nieuwe trainingsprocedure die deze beperking kan opheffen met behulp van miljoenen ongelabelde zinnen en zorgvuldige voorbewerking van de AMR grafieken. Voor AMR parsing bereikt ons model concurrerende resultaten van 62.1 SMATCH, de huidige beste score gerapporteerd zonder significant gebruik van externe semantische bronnen. Voor de AMR generatie introduceert ons model een nieuwe state-of-the-art performance van BLEU 33.8. We presenteren uitgebreide ablatieve en kwalitatieve analyses met sterk bewijs dat sequentie-gebaseerde AMR modellen robuust zijn tegen het ordenen van variaties van grafiek-naar-sequentie conversies.', 'bg': 'Моделите последователност към последователност показват силна производителност в широк спектър от приложения. Въпреки това, тяхното приложение при анализиране и генериране на текст с помощта на абстрактна представа на значението (АМР) е ограничено, поради относително ограниченото количество етикетирани данни и несеквенциалния характер на АМР графиките. Представяме нова процедура за обучение, която може да премахне това ограничение с помощта на милиони незабелязани изречения и внимателна предварителна обработка на графиките. За анализа на АМР нашият модел постига конкурентни резултати от 62.1 Най-добрият резултат, докладван в момента без значително използване на външни семантични ресурси. За поколението на АМР нашият модел установява ново най-съвременно представяне на БЮ 33.8. Представяме обширен аблативен и качествен анализ, включващ силни доказателства, че моделите, базирани на последователност, са здрави срещу подреждащите вариации на конверсиите от графика към последователност.', 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvens modeller har vist stærk ydeevne på tværs af en bred vifte af applikationer. Men deres anvendelse på parsing og generering af tekst ved hjælp af abstrakt betydning repræsentation (AMR) har været begrænset på grund af den relativt begrænsede mængde mærkede data og den ikke-sekventielle karakter af AMR graferne. Vi præsenterer en ny træningsprocedure, der kan løfte denne begrænsning ved hjælp af millioner af ikke-mærkede sætninger og omhyggelig forbehandling af AMR graferne. Til AMR-analyse opnår vores model konkurrencedygtige resultater på 62,1 SMATCH, den nuværende bedste score rapporteret uden signifikant brug af eksterne semantiske ressourcer. Til AMR-generationen etablerer vores model en ny state-of-the-art ydeevne af BLEU 33.8. Vi præsenterer omfattende ablative og kvalitative analyser, herunder stærke beviser for, at sekvensbaserede AMR-modeller er robuste mod bestillingsvariationer af graf-til-sekvenskonverteringer.', 'de': 'Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modelle haben eine starke Leistung in einem breiten Spektrum von Anwendungen gezeigt. Ihre Anwendung auf das Parsen und Generieren von Text mittels Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) war jedoch aufgrund der relativ begrenzten Menge an markierten Daten und der nicht sequenziellen Natur der AMR Graphen begrenzt. Wir stellen ein neuartiges Trainingsverfahren vor, das diese Begrenzung mit Millionen von ungestempelten Sätzen und sorgfältiger Vorverarbeitung der AMR-Graphen aufheben kann. Für AMR Parsing erzielt unser Modell wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse von 62.1 SMATCH, dem aktuellen Bestscore, der ohne signifikanten Einsatz externer semantischer Ressourcen berichtet wird. Für die AMR-Generation etabliert unser Modell eine neue State-of-the-Art Performance von BLEU 33.8. Wir präsentieren umfangreiche ablative und qualitative Analysen, einschließlich starker Belege dafür, dass sequenzbasierte AMR-Modelle robust gegen Ordnungsvarianten von Graph-zu-Sequenz-Konvertierungen sind.', 'id': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan telah menunjukkan prestasi yang kuat melalui jangkauan luas aplikasi. Namun, aplikasi mereka untuk menghurai dan menghasilkan teks menggunakan Representasi Arti Abstrakt (AMR) telah terbatas, karena jumlah data yang disebut relatif terbatas dan sifat tidak sekuensional grafik AMR. Kami mempersembahkan prosedur latihan baru yang dapat mengangkat batasan ini menggunakan jutaan kalimat tanpa label dan mempersiapkan grafik AMR dengan hati-hati. Untuk pemeriksaan AMR, model kami mencapai hasil kompetitif dari 62,1 SMATCH, skor terbaik saat ini dilaporkan tanpa penggunaan signifikan sumber daya semantis luar. Untuk generasi AMR, model kami mendirikan pertunjukan terbaru dari BLEU 33.8. Kami mempersembahkan analisis ekstensif ablatif dan kualitatif termasuk bukti yang kuat bahwa model AMR berdasarkan urutan kuat melawan memerintahkan variasi dari konversi grafik ke urutan.', 'ko': '서열 간 모델은 광범위한 응용에서 강력한 성능을 나타냈다.그러나 태그 데이터의 양이 상대적으로 제한되고 AMR 그림의 비순서성 때문에 추상적 의미 표현(AMR)을 사용하여 텍스트를 해석하고 생성하는 데 사용이 제한되었다.우리는 수백만 개의 표기되지 않은 문장과 AMR 그림의 꼼꼼한 예처리를 통해 이러한 제한을 없앨 수 있는 새로운 훈련 과정을 제시했다.AMR 해석에 있어 우리 모델은 62.1 SMATCH의 경쟁 결과를 얻었는데 이것은 외부의 의미 자원을 대량으로 사용하지 않은 상황에서 보고한 현재 가장 좋은 점수이다.AMR 세대의 경우 BLEU 33.8의 최신 성능을 모델로 구축했습니다.시퀀스에 기반한 AMR 모델이 그림에서 시퀀스로 변환되는 순서 변화에 대해 루팡성을 가진다는 강력한 증거를 포함해 광범위한 소식과 정성 분석을 제시했다.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfululizo wa mfululizo umeonyesha ufanisi mkubwa katika maeneo mengi ya matumizi. Hata hivyo, matumizi yao ya kuuza na kutengeneza ujumbe wa maandishi yanayomaanisha Representation (AMR) yamekuwa vizuizi, kwa sababu ya kiasi kidogo cha taarifa zilizowekwa na asili ya picha za AMR. Tunaweza kuweka hatua ya mafunzo ya riwaya inayoweza kuondoa vizuizi hiki kwa kutumia mamilioni ya hukumu zisizo na vizuri vya picha za AMR. Kwa ajili ya wimbo wa AMR, mwelekeo wetu unafanikiwa matokeo ya ushindani wa mashindano ya 62.1 SMATCH, score bora ya sasa iliripotiwa bila matumizi makubwa ya vyanzo vya sekunde vya nje. Kwa kizazi cha AMR, mwelekeo wetu unatengeneza hali mpya ya utendaji wa sanaa wa BLEU 33.8. We present extensive ablative and qualitative analysis including strong evidence that sequence-based AMR models are robust against ordering variations of graph-to-sequence conversions.', 'tr': "Diňe hatlaryň hatlary ýagdaýda görkezilýän ýagdaýy ukyp görkezildi. Ýöne, Abstrakt Aralygy Representation (AMR) bilen metin ayırmak we janlaşmak üçin olaryň uygulamalaryny AMR grafikleriň relativ çykyş hasaplanýan hasaplanjak we netijesi üçin çykardy. Biz bu çykyşy milliyonlaryň ýazylmaz sözlerini ulanyp, AMR grafikleriniň öňünden ünsli işleýän täze bir taýýarlama procedesini görkezip bileris. AMR analizi üçin, modelimiz 62.1 SMATCH'yň rekabetçi netijelerini başarar. Şimdiki esasy semantik çeşmelerinin kullanımıyla möhüm şekilde bildirilen iň gowy nokat. AMR döwletlerimiz üçin biziň nusgamyz BLEU 33.8-niň täze möhüm taýýarlanmagyny bejerýär. Biz çöplü etkinlik we kwalitet analizi görkezýäris. Diňe tabanly AMR modelleriniň grafik we dizi üýtgeşmeleriniň düzenlemelerine garşy düzenlemesine garşy döwürlü.", 'hr': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence pokazali su snažnu učinku u širokom rasponu aplikacija. Međutim, njihova primjena za analizu i proizvodnju teksta koristeći Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) bila je ograničena zbog relativno ograničene količine označenih podataka i neosekvenog prirode grafika AMR-a. Predstavljamo novu proceduru obuke koja može podnijeti ovu ograničenje koristeći milijune nezabeliranih rečenica i pažljivo preobrađivanje grafika AMR-a. Za analizu AMR-a, naš model postiže konkurentni rezultati od 62,1 SMATCH-a, trenutni najbolji rezultat prijavljen bez značajne upotrebe vanjskih semantičkih resursa. Za generaciju AMR, naš model uspostavlja novi postupak umjetnosti BLEU 33.8. Predstavljamo ogromnu ablativnu i kvalitativnu analizu uključujući jake dokaze da su modeli na sekvenciji temeljeni AMR roboti protiv naređenja varijacija konverzija grafika do sekvencije.', 'sq': 'Modelet sekuence-to-sequence kanë treguar performancë të fortë nëpër një gamë të gjerë aplikimesh. Megjithatë, aplikimi i tyre për analizimin dhe gjenerimin e tekstit duke përdorur përfaqësimin e kuptimit abstrakt (AMR) ka qenë i kufizuar, për shkak të sasisë relativisht të kufizuar të të dhënave të etiketuara dhe natyrës jo sekuenciale të grafikave AMR. Ne paraqesim një procedurë të re stërvitjeje që mund ta heqim këtë kufizim duke përdorur miliona fjalësh pa etiketë dhe përgatitje të kujdesshme të grafikave AMR. For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources.  Për gjeneratën AMR, modeli ynë krijon një shfaqje të re më të lartë të BLEU 33.8. Ne paraqesim analiza të gjerë ablative dhe kualitative duke përfshirë prova të forta se modelet AMR bazuar në sekuencë janë të forta kundër urdhërimit të variacioneve të konversioneve nga grafi në sekuencë.', 'af': "Sequence- to- sequence models het sterk prestasie deur 'n breë reek van toepassings vertoon. Maar hulle toepassing om teks te verwerk en genereer deur abstrakte betekening voorstelling (AMR) te gebruik is beperk, vanweë die relativies beperk hoeveelheid etiketeerde data en die ongevolgende natuur van die AMR grafieke. Ons stel 'n nuwe onderwerp prosedure wat hierdie beperking kan verhef deur die gebruik van miljoene ongeabelde setnings en versigtige voorbereiding van die AMR grafieke. Vir AMR verwerking, ons model bereik mededingsresultate van 62. 1 SMATCH, die huidige beste aantal verkondig sonder betekende gebruik van eksterne semantiese hulpbronne. Vir AMR generasie, ons model stel 'n nuwe state-of-the-art performance van BLEU 33.8. Ons stel uitbreidige ablatiewe en kvalitatiewe analisie, insluitend sterk getuienis dat sekwensiegebaseerde AMR modele sterk is teen ordening van veranderinge van graf-na-sekwensieomskakels.", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ በተለያዩ ፕሮግራሞች አጠቃላይ ኃይለኛ ድምፅ አሳየዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የጽሑፉን ማቀናጃ እና መፍጠር በመጠቀም አካባቢ (AMR) በመጠቀም አካባቢ የጽሑፍ ማድረግ እና የአሜሪካ ቀለሞች በተለየ ጥሩ ቁጥር የተደረገ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ግንኙነት ለመሊዮን ሚሊዮን ያልታወቀው ፍርድ እና የአሜሪካ ቀፎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል የኖሮው ትምህርት ሥርዓት እናቀርባለን፡፡ ለAMR ማኅበረሰቢያ፣ ሞዴላያችን የ62.1 SMATCH ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ለAMR ትውልድ፣ ሞዴላያችን የBLEU 33.8 የ አዲስ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የዓላማ ሥርዓት መግለጫ ያስተካክላል፡፡ በቁጥጥር አካባቢ እና ቁጥጥር የሚያስተምር እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Sequence-to-sequence modelləri geniş proqramların arasında güclü performansını göstərdilər. Ancaq, onların Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) vasitəsilə mə'lumatı ayırmaq və ürəkləmək üçün mə'lumatı müəyyən edilmiş mə'lumatı və AMR grafiklərinin sonrakı təbiəti sayəsində müəyyən edilmişdir. Biz bu limiti milyonlarca yazılmadan cümlələr və AMR grafiklərinin öndə işləməsini mühafizə edə bilən yeni təhsil prosedüsini göstəririk. AMR analizi üçün modellərimiz 62.1 SMATCH'in müqayisədi sonuçlarına nail olur. Şimdiki ən yaxşı nöqtəsi, daxili semantik resursların istifadəsi olmadan bildirilmiş. AMR nəsili üçün modellərimiz BLEU 33.8-nin yeni məlumatı yaratdı. Biz çox qüvvətli və qüvvətli analizi göstəririk ki, sequence-based AMR modellərinin grafik-sequence dönüşünün dəyişikliklərini əmr etməyə qarşı qüvvətlidir.", 'hy': 'Sequence-to-sequence models have shown strong performance across a broad range of applications.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանց ծրագիրը վերլուծելու և ստեղծելու տեքստ օգտագործելով Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացումը (AMR) սահմանափակ է, քանի որ AMR գրաֆիկների համեմատաբար սահմանափակ քանակությամբ պիտակուցված տվյալներ են և ոչ հաջորդականորեն բ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր ուսուցման գործընթաց, որը կարող է վերացնել այս սահմանափակումները օգտագործելով միլիոնավոր անգծված նախադասություններ և ուշադիր վերլուծելով AMR գրաֆիկները: ԱՄՌ-ի վերլուծության համար մեր մոդելը հասնում է 62.1 ՍՄԱԹՉ-ի մրցակցության արդյունքներին, ներկայիս լավագույն գնահատականը, որը հայտարարվել է առանց արտաքին սեմանտիկ ռեսուրսների նշանակալի օգտագործման: ԱՄՌ սերունդի համար մեր մոդելը ստեղծում է նոր ամենահետաքրքիր ներկայացումներ ԲԼԵՎ 33.8-ի համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք էքսպանցիոնալ աբլատիվ և որակային վերլուծություն, ներառյալ ուժեղ ապացույցներ, որ հաջորդականության հիմնված AMR մոդելները ուժեղ են հակառակ գծագրի հաջորդականության տարբերությունների կարգավորման:', 'bn': 'সেকেন্ড-থেকে সেকেন্সের মডেল বিস্তৃত অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের ব্যাপারে শক্তিশালী প্রদর্শন করেছে। কিন্তু তাদের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনটি ব্যবহার করে আপস্ট্রাক্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে পার্সিং এবং তৈরি করার জন্য পার্সিং এবং তৈরি করার জন্য সীমিত হয়েছে, যার ফলে তার আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়া উপস্থাপন করেছি যা কোটি লক্ষ লক্ষ অলাইনের শাস্তি এবং এমআর গ্রাফের সতর্ক প্রক্রিয়ার ব্যবহার করে এই এএমআর পার্জিং এর জন্য, আমাদের মডেল ৬২. ১ এসমাটিচের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করে, বর্তমান সেরা সংক্রান্ত স্কোর প্রতিবেদন কর এএমআর প্রজন্মের জন্য, আমাদের মডেল বিলিউ ৩৩. আমরা বিস্তৃত সক্রিয় এবং পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণের উপস্থাপন করছি যার মধ্যে শক্তিশালী প্রমাণ রয়েছে যে সেকেন্স ভিত্তিক AMR মডেল গ্রাফ-থেকে সেকে', 'bs': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence pokazali su jaku učinku u širokom nizu aplikacija. Međutim, njihova aplikacija za analizu i proizvodnju teksta koristeći Abstrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) je ograničena zbog relativno ograničene količine označenih podataka i neosekvencijalne prirode grafika AMR-a. Predstavljamo novu proceduru obuke koja može podnijeti ovu ograničenje koristeći milijune neopisivanih rečenica i pažljivo preobrađivanje grafika AMR-a. Za analizu AMR, naš model postiže konkurentni rezultati 62,1 SMATCH-a, trenutni najbolji rezultat prijavljen bez značajne upotrebe vanjskih semantičkih resursa. Za generaciju AMR, naš model uspostavlja novi postupak umjetnosti BLEU 33.8. Predstavljamo široku ablativnu i kvalitativnu analizu uključujući jake dokaze da su modeli AMR na sekvenciji robni protiv naređenja varijacija razgovora grafika do sekvencije.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای سطح به سطح نشان داده\u200cاند که عملکرد قوی در یک مجموعه فراوانی از کاربردها نشان داده\u200cاند. با این حال، کاربردهای آنها برای تقسیم و تولید متن با استفاده از نمایش معنی Abstract (AMR) محدود شده\u200cاند، به دلیل مقدار نسبتا محدود از داده\u200cهای نقاشی و طبیعت غیر تعریف گرافهای AMR. ما یک روش آموزش روانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند این محدودیت را با استفاده از میلیون\u200cها جمله\u200cهای غیرقابل نوشته و پیش\u200cپردازی دقتی از گرافهای AMR بالا برد. برای بررسی AMR، مدل ما نتایج مسابقه 62.1 SMATCH را می رساند، بهترین امتیاز فعلی که بدون استفاده از منابع های semantic بیرون گزارش شده است. برای نسل AMR، مدل ما یک عملکرد جدید هنر BLEU 33.8 را تشکیل می دهد. ما تحلیل بسیار قابل فعالیت و کیفیت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، شامل مدارک قوی که مدارک\u200cهای AMR بر روی دستور تغییرات گراف به رده\u200cها سخت هستند.', 'ca': "Els models de seqüència a seqüència han demostrat un fort rendiment a través d'una amplia gama d'aplicacions. No obstant això, la seva aplicació a l'analització i generació de textos usant la Representació Abstracta del Significat (AMR) ha estat limitada, degut a la quantitat relativament limitada de dades etiquetades i la naturalesa no seqüencial dels gràfics AMR. Presentam un nou procediment d'entrenament que pot eliminar aquesta limitació fent servir milions de frases sense etiqueta i elaborar cuidadosament els gràfics AMR. For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources.  For AMR generation, our model establishes a new state-of-the-art performance of BLEU 33.8.  Presentam una anàlisi ablativa i qualitativa extensa, incloent fortes evidències de que els models AMR basats en seqüències són robustos en contra d'ordenar variacions de conversió gràfica a seqüència.", 'fi': 'Sekvenssi-sekvenssimallit ovat osoittaneet vahvaa suorituskykyä monenlaisissa sovelluksissa. Niiden soveltaminen abstraktin merkityksen representaation (AMR) avulla tekstin jäsentämiseen ja tuottamiseen on kuitenkin ollut rajallista johtuen suhteellisen rajallisesta määrästä merkittyä dataa ja AMR-kaavioiden ei-sekvenssiaalisesta luonteesta. Esittelemme uuden koulutusmenetelmän, jolla tämä rajoitus voidaan poistaa miljoonilla merkitsemättömillä lauseilla ja AMR-kaavioiden huolellisella esikäsittelyllä. AMR-parsauksessa mallimme saavuttaa kilpailukykyiset tulokset 62,1 SMATCH, joka on tällä hetkellä paras tulos ilman ulkoisten semanttisten resurssien merkittävää käyttöä. AMR-sukupolven mallimme luo BLEU 33.8:n uuden huipputason suorituskyvyn. Esitämme laajan ablatiivisen ja kvalitatiivisen analyysin, johon sisältyy vahvaa näyttöä siitä, että sekvenssipohjaiset AMR-mallit ovat vankkoja graafisten muunnosten järjestysvariaatioita vastaan.', 'et': 'Järjest järjestusse mudelid on näidanud suurt jõudlust paljudes rakendustes. Samas on nende rakendus teksti parsimisel ja genereerimisel abstraktse tähenduserepresentatsiooni (AMR) abil olnud piiratud, kuna märgistatud andmeid on suhteliselt piiratud ja AMR graafikud ei ole järjestikused. Esitame uudse koolitusprotseduuri, mis võib selle piirangu kõrvaldada, kasutades miljoneid märgistamata lauseid ja AMR graafikute hoolikat eeltöötlemist. AMR parsimisel saavutab meie mudel konkurentsivõimelised tulemused 62,1 SMATCH, mis on praegune parim tulemus ilma väliste semantiliste ressursside märkimisväärse kasutamiseta. AMR põlvkonna jaoks kehtestab meie mudel BLEU 33.8 uue tipptasemel jõudluse. Esitame ulatusliku ablatiivse ja kvalitatiivse analüüsi, sealhulgas tugevaid tõendeid selle kohta, et järjestuspõhised AMR mudelid on graafikute teisendamise järjestuste variatsioonide vastu tugevad.', 'cs': 'Modely sekvence na sekvenci prokázaly silný výkon v široké škále aplikací. Jejich aplikace pro analýzu a generování textu pomocí Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) byla však omezena kvůli relativně omezenému množství označených dat a nesekvenční povaze AMR grafů. Představujeme nový tréninkový postup, který může toto omezení zrušit pomocí milionů neoznačených vět a pečlivého předzpracování AMR grafů. Pro AMR parsing dosahuje náš model konkurenčních výsledků 62.1 SMATCH, aktuálního nejlepšího skóre hlášeného bez významného využití externích sémantických zdrojů. Pro generaci AMR představuje náš model nový nejmodernější výkon BLEU 33.8. Předkládáme rozsáhlou ablativní a kvalitativní analýzu včetně silných důkazů, že sekvenční AMR modely jsou robustní vůči uspořádání variací grafů na sekvenci.', 'jv': 'Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe ngubah ujian sing paling milion dolang awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang-ujaran kanggo ngerasakno diagram AM R Kernel kanggo ngilangno AM R, model sing nungsak mo dumadhi perusahaan anyar-perusahaan sing dibenalke CLUE 32.8 Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh-akeh lan akeh-akeh basa gambar ngono nggawe barang gambar perusahaan model sing basa gambar ne Dino mênêmên, éwé iso nggawe Warianaké Dino mênêmên, sing basa gambar nêmên.', 'he': 'דוגמני רצף לרצף הראו ביצועים חזקים ברחבי מגוון רחב של שימושים. עם זאת, היישומים שלהם למחקר ויוצר טקסט באמצעות מייצגת משמעות אבסטרטה (Abstract Meaning Representation, AMR) הוגבלו, בגלל כמות המגובלת יחסית של נתונים מסוימים והטבע לא רצופי של הגרפים AMR. אנחנו מציגים תהליך אימון חדש שיכול להוריד את ההגבלה הזו באמצעות מיליוני משפטים ללא סימנים ותעבירה זהירה של הגרפים AMR. עבור בדיקת AMR, המודל שלנו משיג תוצאות תחרותיות של 62.1 SMATCH, התוצאה הנוכחית הטובה ביותר דווחת ללא שימוש משמעותי משאבים סמנטיים חיצוניים. לדור AMR, המודל שלנו מקים ביצועים חדשים של BLEU 33.8. אנו מציגים ניתוח אפלטיבי ואיכותי רחב כולל ראיות חזקות כי דוגמני AMR מבוססים על רצף הם חזקים נגד להזמין וירציות של שינויים גרף לרצף.', 'ha': "@ action: button Amma, shirin ayukansu wa yin parse da kuma ya ƙãga matsayin da ake amfani da AMR, aka ƙayyade shi, saboda da gwargwadon tsari na tsarin da aka rubũta shi kuma da tsarin wanda bã ya daban na grafyutan AMR. Tuna halatar da wani jarrabo na zaman shawara wanda zai iya sarrafa wannan grensa, yana amfani da millions na cire da ba'a rubutu ba da kuma masu taƙaita da taƙaitãwa na AMR. Ga parse ga AMR, misalinmu yana sãmun matsalar masu yin competiti na 65.1 SMATK, ko da kyauta yanzu a yanzu da aka bai da amfani da mutane na ƙarƙashin. Ga kiyayen AMR, misalinmu yana samar da wani halin-mai-sanawa na BLEU 33.8. Tuna kai yanzu, Ana ƙidãya mai girma da lissafi, kamar bayanin tabbatarwa da za'a goge misãlai na AMR a kan sakan-daban.", 'sk': 'Modeli od zaporedja do zaporedja so pokazali močno zmogljivost v širokem spektru aplikacij. Vendar pa je njihova uporaba pri razčlenjevanju in ustvarjanju besedila z uporabo abstraktne predstavitve pomena (AMR) omejena zaradi relativno omejene količine označenih podatkov in nezaporedne narave AMR grafov. Predstavljamo nov postopek usposabljanja, ki lahko odpravi to omejitev z uporabo milijonov neoznačenih stavkov in skrbnega predobdelave grafov AMR. Za razčlenitev AMR naš model dosega konkurenčne rezultate 62,1 SMATCH, trenutno najboljši rezultat poročanja brez pomembne uporabe zunanjih semantičnih virov. Za generacijo AMR naš model vzpostavlja novo vrhunsko delovanje BLEU 33.8. Predstavljamo obsežno ablativno in kvalitativno analizo, vključno z močnimi dokazi, da so modeli AMR, ki temeljijo na zaporedju, robustni proti različicam naročanja pretvorb grafov v zaporedje.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གིས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་རྒྱ་འཕགས་པ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ However, their application to parsing and generating text using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) has been limited, due to the relatively limited amount of labeled data and the non-sequential nature of the AMR graphs. ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་གཏོང་གི་སྒྲུབ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་ལས་རིམ་ཅིག་སྟོན་ཚུགས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ For AMR parsing, our model achieves competitive results of 62.1 SMATCH, the current best score reported without significant use of external semantic resources. AMR མི་རབས་པའི་སྔོན་ལྟར་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྩལ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་རྫུན་བྱས་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་མཁན་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་sequence་གཞི་AMR་དཔེ་གཞི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོ་'}
{'en': 'Automatically Generating Rhythmic Verse with Neural Networks', 'ar': 'توليد آية إيقاعية تلقائيًا باستخدام الشبكات العصبية', 'es': 'Generación automática de versos rítmicos con redes neuronales', 'pt': 'Gerando versos rítmicos automaticamente com redes neurais', 'fr': 'Génération automatique de vers rythmiques avec des réseaux de neurones', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークで自動的にリズミカルヴァースを生成', 'zh': '用神经网络自生节奏诗', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ लयबद्ध कविता उत्पन्न', 'ru': 'Автоматическая генерация ритмического стиха с помощью нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'Rann Rithimeach a Ghiniúint go hUathoibríoch le Neural Networks', 'ka': 'რიტმიკური ვერსი ნეირალური ქსელებით ავტომატურად შექმნა', 'el': 'Αυτόματη δημιουργία ρυθμικού στίχου με Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'hu': 'Ritmikus vers automatikus generálása ideghálózatokkal', 'kk': 'Неврал желілерден ритмикалық нұсқаларды автоматты түрде құру', 'lt': 'Automatiškai generuojama ritminė versija su nerviniais tinklais', 'it': 'Generazione automatica di strofe ritmiche con reti neurali', 'mk': 'Автоматски генерирање на ритмички верзии со неврални мрежи', 'ms': 'Menjana Versi Ritmik secara Automatik dengan Rangkaian Neural', 'mn': 'Шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээтэй ритмик хэлбэрийг автоматаар үүсгэх', 'no': 'Lagar automatisk ritmisk versjon med nøyrale nettverk', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി രൈത്തിമിക്ക് തെളിവുകള്\u200d സ്വയം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ Verżjoni Ritmika b’Netwerks Newrali', 'ro': 'Generarea automată a versetelor ritmice cu rețele neurale', 'sr': 'Automatski proizvodi ritamsku verziju sa neuronskim mrežama', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් රිතමික සංවිධානය නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'pl': 'Automatyczne generowanie wersetu rytmicznego z sieciami neuronowymi', 'so': 'Automatically Generating Rhythmic Verse with Neural Networks', 'ur': 'نئورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ ریٹمیک ورز خود پیدا کی جاتی ہے', 'sv': 'Generera rytmisk vers automatiskt med neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tự động tạo ra giai điệu với mạng thần kinh', 'bg': 'Автоматично генериране на ритмичен стих с неврални мрежи', 'nl': 'Automatisch ritmische verzen genereren met neurale netwerken', 'hr': 'Automatski proizvedenje ritmičke verzije sa neuronskim mrežama', 'da': 'Automatisk generering af rytmisk vers med neurale netværk', 'de': 'Automatische Generierung rhythmischer Verse mit neuronalen Netzwerken', 'fa': 'تولید نسخه ریتمیک با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی خودکار', 'id': 'Membuat Versi Ritmik secara otomatis dengan Rangkaian Neural', 'ko': '신경 네트워크로 운율시를 자동으로 생성하다', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Ishara za Rhythmic yenye Mtandao wa Neural', 'tr': 'Neural aňladarlar bilen ritmik nusgalary otomatik üýtget', 'sq': 'Automatically Generating Rhythmic Verse with Neural Networks', 'af': 'Automaties Genereer Rhythmic Versie met Neural Netwerke', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերի միջոցով ավտոմատ ստեղծում է ռիթմիկ տարբերակը', 'az': 'Nöral Ağları ilə Rhythmic Versyon Avtomatik Yapılır', 'bn': 'নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে Rhythmic বাণীসমূহ তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Automatski proizvedenje ritmičkih verzija sa neuronskim mrežama', 'ca': 'generar automàticament versos rítmics amb xarxes neurals', 'cs': 'Automatické generování rytmického verše s neuronovými sítěmi', 'et': 'Rütmilise salmi automaatne genereerimine neurovõrkudega', 'fi': 'Rytmisen jakeen luominen automaattisesti hermoverkoilla', 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'Samodejno ustvarjanje ritmičnega verza z nevralnimi omrežji', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מייצר אוטומטית Verse ריתמי עם רשתות נוירוליות', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་Neural དྲ་བ་དང་Rhythmic ཐོག་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose two novel methodologies for the automatic generation of rhythmic poetry in a variety of forms. The first approach uses a neural language model trained on a phonetic encoding to learn an implicit representation of both the form and content of English poetry. This model can effectively learn common poetic devices such as rhyme, rhythm and alliteration. The second approach considers poetry generation as a constraint satisfaction problem where a generative neural language model is tasked with learning a representation of content, and a discriminative weighted finite state machine constrains it on the basis of form. By manipulating the constraints of the latter model, we can generate coherent poetry with arbitrary forms and themes. A large-scale extrinsic evaluation demonstrated that participants consider machine-generated poems to be written by humans 54 % of the time. In addition, participants rated a machine-generated poem to be the best amongst all evaluated.', 'pt': 'Propomos duas novas metodologias para a geração automática de poesia rítmica em uma variedade de formas. A primeira abordagem usa um modelo de linguagem neural treinado em uma codificação fonética para aprender uma representação implícita tanto da forma quanto do conteúdo da poesia inglesa. Este modelo pode efetivamente aprender dispositivos poéticos comuns, como rima, ritmo e aliteração. A segunda abordagem considera a geração de poesia como um problema de satisfação de restrições onde um modelo de linguagem neural generativa é encarregado de aprender uma representação de conteúdo, e uma máquina de estado finito ponderada discriminativa o restringe com base na forma. Ao manipular as restrições do último modelo, podemos gerar poesia coerente com formas e temas arbitrários. Uma avaliação extrínseca em larga escala demonstrou que os participantes consideram que poemas gerados por máquina são escritos por humanos 54% das vezes. Além disso, os participantes classificaram um poema gerado por máquina como o melhor entre todos os avaliados.', 'ar': 'نقترح منهجيتين جديدتين للتوليد التلقائي للشعر الإيقاعي بأشكال متنوعة. يستخدم الأسلوب الأول نموذجًا للغة العصبية مُدرَّبًا على ترميز صوتي لتعلم تمثيل ضمني لشكل ومحتوى الشعر الإنجليزي. يمكن لهذا النموذج أن يتعلم بشكل فعال الأدوات الشعرية الشائعة مثل القافية والإيقاع والجناس. يعتبر النهج الثاني توليد الشعر كمشكلة رضا قيد حيث يتم تكليف نموذج اللغة العصبية التوليدي بتعلم تمثيل للمحتوى ، وتقيده آلة الحالة المحدودة التمييزية على أساس الشكل. من خلال التلاعب بقيود النموذج الأخير ، يمكننا توليد شعر متماسك بأشكال وموضوعات عشوائية. أظهر تقييم خارجي واسع النطاق أن المشاركين يعتبرون القصائد المُنشأة آليًا يكتبها البشر بنسبة 54٪ من الوقت. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، صنف المشاركون القصيدة التي تم إنشاؤها آليًا على أنها الأفضل بين جميع القصائد التي تم تقييمها.', 'fr': "Nous proposons deux nouvelles méthodologies pour la génération automatique de poésie rythmique sous diverses formes. La première approche utilise un modèle de langage neuronal formé sur un codage phonétique pour apprendre une représentation implicite de la forme et du contenu de la poésie anglaise. Ce modèle peut apprendre efficacement des dispositifs poétiques courants tels que la rime, le rythme et l'allitération. La seconde approche considère la génération de poésie comme un problème de satisfaction de contrainte dans lequel un modèle de langage neuronal génératif est chargé d'apprendre une représentation du contenu, et une machine à états finis pondérée discriminative la contraint sur la base de la forme. En manipulant les contraintes de ce dernier modèle, nous pouvons générer une poésie cohérente avec des formes et des thèmes arbitraires. Une évaluation extrinsèque à grande échelle a démontré que les participants considèrent les poèmes générés par des machines comme étant écrits par des humains 54\xa0% du temps. De plus, les participants ont évalué un poème généré par une machine comme étant le meilleur parmi tous ceux évalués.", 'es': 'Proponemos dos metodologías novedosas para la generación automática de poesía rítmica en una variedad de formas. El primer enfoque utiliza un modelo de lenguaje neuronal entrenado en una codificación fonética para aprender una representación implícita de la forma y el contenido de la poesía inglesa. Este modelo puede aprender eficazmente los dispositivos poéticos comunes como la rima, el ritmo y la aliteración. El segundo enfoque considera la generación de poesía como un problema de satisfacción de restricciones en el que un modelo de lenguaje neuronal generativo tiene la tarea de aprender una representación del contenido, y una máquina de estados finitos ponderada discriminativa lo restringe en función de la forma. Al manipular las limitaciones de este último modelo, podemos generar poesía coherente con formas y temas arbitrarios. Una evaluación extrínseca a gran escala demostró que los participantes consideran que los poemas generados por máquinas son escritos por humanos el 54% de las veces. Además, los participantes calificaron un poema generado por máquina como el mejor de todos los evaluados.', 'zh': '二新之方法论,以文自生节奏诗。 一曰语音编码神经言以学英语诗之隐式。 有效于诗,有押韵于节。 二术以诗为约束,其成神经言为学,而别加权有限状态机约束于文。 因操后一模,可以成文章。 大外在评估,参与者谓机器诗在54%时。 此外,参与者以机器成诗为最。', 'hi': 'हम विभिन्न रूपों में लयबद्ध कविता की स्वचालित पीढ़ी के लिए दो उपन्यास पद्धतियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पहला दृष्टिकोण अंग्रेजी कविता के रूप और सामग्री दोनों का एक अंतर्निहित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए ध्वन्यात्मक एन्कोडिंग पर प्रशिक्षित एक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करता है। यह मॉडल प्रभावी रूप से कविता, ताल और अनुप्रास जैसे सामान्य काव्य उपकरणों को सीख सकता है। दूसरा दृष्टिकोण कविता पीढ़ी को एक बाधा संतुष्टि समस्या के रूप में मानता है जहां एक उत्पादक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल को सामग्री के प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने का काम सौंपा जाता है, और एक भेदभावपूर्ण भारित परिमित राज्य मशीन इसे रूप के आधार पर बाधित करती है। बाद के मॉडल की बाधाओं में हेरफेर करके, हम मनमाने ढंग से रूपों और विषयों के साथ सुसंगत कविता उत्पन्न कर सकते हैं। एक बड़े पैमाने पर बाह्य मूल्यांकन ने प्रदर्शित किया कि प्रतिभागी मशीन से उत्पन्न कविताओं को मनुष्यों द्वारा 54% समय तक लिखे जाने पर विचार करते हैं। इसके अलावा, प्रतिभागियों ने एक मशीन-जनित कविता को मूल्यांकन किए गए सभी मूल्यांकनों में से सर्वश्रेष्ठ होने का मूल्यांकन किया।', 'ja': 'リズム詩を様々な形で自動生成するための2つの斬新な方法論を提案します。第一のアプローチは、音声符号化で訓練された神経言語モデルを使用して、英語詩の形式と内容の両方の暗黙の表現を学習する。このモデルは、韻律、リズム、重複などの一般的な詩的装置を効果的に学ぶことができます。第二のアプローチは、詩の生成を制約充足問題とみなし、生成的ニューラル言語モデルはコンテンツの表現を学習することを課題とし、識別的加重有限状態機械はそれを形式に基づいて制約する。後者のモデルの制約を操作することで、恣意的な形態とテーマを持つ一貫した詩を生成することができる。大規模な外因的評価は、参加者が機械生成された詩を人間が54%の時間で書くと考えることを示した。さらに、参加者は機械生成された詩を評価されたすべての詩の中で最高であると評価した。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем две новые методологии автоматического генерации ритмической поэзии в различных формах. Первый подход использует модель нейронного языка, обученную на фонетическом кодировании, чтобы узнать неявное представление как формы, так и содержания английской поэзии. Эта модель может эффективно изучать распространенные поэтические устройства, такие как рифма, ритм и аллитерация. Второй подход рассматривает генерацию поэзии как проблему удовлетворенности ограничениями, когда генеративной нейронной языковой модели поручается изучение представления содержания, а дискриминирующая взвешенная конечная машина состояния ограничивает ее на основе формы. Манипулируя ограничениями последней модели, мы можем генерировать согласованную поэзию с произвольными формами и темами. Масштабная внешняя оценка показала, что участники считают созданные машиной стихи написанными людьми 54% времени. Кроме того, участники оценили созданное машиной стихотворение как лучшее среди всех оцениваемых.', 'ga': 'Molaimid dhá mhodh nua-aimseartha chun filíocht rithimeach a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch i bhfoirmeacha éagsúla. Úsáideann an chéad chur chuige múnla néartheanga atá oilte ar ionchódú foghraíochta chun léiriú intuigthe d’fhoirm agus d’ábhar filíochta an Bhéarla a fhoghlaim. Is féidir leis an tsamhail seo gléasanna coitianta fileata ar nós rím, rithim agus ailliteartha a fhoghlaim go héifeachtach. Breathnaítear sa dara cur chuige ar ghiniúint na filíochta mar fhadhb shrianta sásaimh nuair a chuirtear de chúram ar mhúnla ginideach néartheanga léiriú ábhair a fhoghlaim, agus cuireann meaisín stáit chríochnaithe ualaithe idirdhealaitheach srian uirthi ar bhonn foirme. Trí shrianta an mhúnla deiridh a láimhseáil, is féidir linn filíocht chomhleanúnach a ghiniúint le foirmeacha agus téamaí treallach. Léiríodh le meastóireacht eistreach ar mhórscála go measann rannpháirtithe gur dánta meaisín-ghinte a scríobh daoine 54% den am. Ina theannta sin, mheas rannpháirtithe dán meaisínghinte a bheith ar an gceann is fearr i measc gach duine a ndearnadh meastóireacht air.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε δύο νέες μεθοδολογίες για την αυτόματη παραγωγή ρυθμικής ποίησης σε ποικίλες μορφές. Η πρώτη προσέγγιση χρησιμοποιεί ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής γλώσσας εκπαιδευμένο σε φωνητική κωδικοποίηση για να μάθει μια σιωπηρή αναπαράσταση τόσο της μορφής όσο και του περιεχομένου της αγγλικής ποίησης. Αυτό το μοντέλο μπορεί να μάθει αποτελεσματικά κοινές ποιητικές συσκευές όπως ρίμα, ρυθμό και αλληλασία. Η δεύτερη προσέγγιση θεωρεί την παραγωγή ποίησης ως πρόβλημα ικανοποίησης περιορισμού, όπου ένα γενετικό μοντέλο νευρωνικής γλώσσας έχει ως αποστολή να μάθει μια αναπαράσταση περιεχομένου, και μια διακριτική σταθμισμένη μηχανή πεπερασμένης κατάστασης το περιορίζει βάσει της μορφής. Χειριζόμενοι τους περιορισμούς του τελευταίου μοντέλου, μπορούμε να δημιουργήσουμε συνεκτική ποίηση με αυθαίρετες μορφές και θέματα. Μια μεγάλης κλίμακας εξωτερική αξιολόγηση έδειξε ότι οι συμμετέχοντες θεωρούν ότι τα μηχανικά ποιήματα είναι γραμμένα από ανθρώπους 54% του χρόνου. Επιπλέον, οι συμμετέχοντες αξιολόγησαν ένα μηχανικό ποίημα ως το καλύτερο μεταξύ όλων που αξιολογήθηκαν.', 'hu': 'Két új módszertant javasolunk a ritmikus költészet automatikus generálására különböző formákban. Az első megközelítés egy fonetikus kódolásra képzett neurális nyelvi modellt használ, hogy megtanulják az angol költészet formájának és tartalmának implicit ábrázolását. Ez a modell hatékonyan megtanulhatja a közös költői eszközöket, mint például rím, ritmus és alliteráció. A második megközelítés a költészet generációját kényszerkielégítő problémának tekinti, ahol egy generációs neurális nyelvmodell feladata a tartalom ábrázolása, és egy diszkriminatív súlyozott véges állapotú gép formája alapján korlátozza. Az utóbbi modell korlátainak manipulálásával önkényes formákkal és témákkal koherens költészetet tudunk létrehozni. Egy nagyszabású külső értékelés kimutatta, hogy a résztvevők az esetek 54%-ában emberek írták a gépi verseket. Ezenkívül a résztvevők egy gép által generált verset értékeltek a legjobbak közül.', 'it': "Proponiamo due nuove metodologie per la generazione automatica della poesia ritmica in varie forme. Il primo approccio utilizza un modello di linguaggio neurale addestrato su una codifica fonetica per imparare una rappresentazione implicita sia della forma che del contenuto della poesia inglese. Questo modello può efficacemente imparare dispositivi poetici comuni come rima, ritmo e alliterazione. Il secondo approccio considera la generazione della poesia come un problema di soddisfazione dei vincoli in cui un modello generativo di linguaggio neurale ha il compito di imparare una rappresentazione dei contenuti, e una macchina a stato finito ponderata discriminante la vincola sulla base della forma. Manipolando i vincoli di quest'ultimo modello, possiamo generare poesia coerente con forme e temi arbitrari. Una valutazione estrinseca su larga scala ha dimostrato che i partecipanti considerano poesie generate dalla macchina come scritte dagli esseri umani il 54% delle volte. Inoltre, i partecipanti hanno valutato una poesia generata dalla macchina come la migliore tra tutte valutate.", 'lt': 'Siūlome dvi naujas įvairių formų ritminės poezijos automatinės generacijos metodikas. Pirmasis metodas naudoja nervinės kalbos model į, mokomą fonetiniu kodavimu, siekiant išmokti netiesioginį anglų poezijos formos ir turinio atstovavimą. Šis modelis gali veiksmingai išmokti bendrų poetinių prietaisų, pvz., ritmo, ritmo ir aliteracijos. Antrasis požiūris laiko poezijos kūrimą ribojančia patenkinimo problem a, kai generaciniam neurokalbiniam modeliui tenka užduotis mokytis atstovauti turinį, o diskriminuojanti svertinė ribotos būklės mašina ją riboja pagal form ą. Manipuluodami pastarojo modelio apribojimus, galime sukurti nuoseklią poeziją su savavališkomis formomis ir temomis. Didelio masto ekstrinzinis vertinimas parodė, kad dalyviai mano, kad mašinomis sukurti poemai yra rašomi žmonių 54 proc. laiko. Be to, dalyviai įvertino mašina sukurtą poem ą kaip geriausią iš visų įvertintų poemų.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме две нови методологии за автоматска генерација на ритмичка поезија во различни форми. Првиот пристап користи нервен јазик модел трениран на фонетска кодирање за да научи имплицитна претстава на формата и содржината на англиската поезија. Овој модел може ефикасно да научи заеднички поетички уреди како рима, ритам и алитерација. Вториот пристап ја смета генерацијата на поезија за проблем на задоволство со ограничување, каде генеративниот модел на нервен јазик е задолжен со учење на претставување на содржината, а дискриминативната тежирана ограничена државна машина го ограничува на основа на формата. Со манипулирање на ограничувањата на последниот модел, можеме да генерираме кохерентна поезија со арбитрални форми и теми. Голема екстринзичка проценка покажа дека учесниците сметаат дека машинските поеми се напишани од луѓето 54 отсто од времето. In addition, participants rated a machine-generated poem to be the best amongst all evaluated.', 'kk': 'Біз бірнеше түрлі формаларда ритмикалық поезияны автоматты түрде құру үшін екі романдық методологияларды ұсынамыз. Бірінші тәсілі ағылшын поэтиясының пішімі мен мазмұнын оқыту үшін фонетикалық кодтамасындағы невралдық тіл үлгісін қолданады. Бұл үлгі рим, ритм және алитерация секілді жалпы поэтикалық құрылғыларды үйрене алады. Екінші жағдайда поэтика құрылуын шектеу мәселесі деп ойлайды. Бұл невралдық тіл үлгісін мазмұның көрінісін оқыту үшін тапсырмалар болады, және дискриминациялық тең аяқталған күй компьютері оны піші Соңғы үлгісінің шектеулерін өзгерту арқылы, біз тәуелсіз пішімдер мен нақыштар менеджерімен сәйкестік поэтияны құруға болады. Үлкен масштабтағы экстринзикалық оқиға қатысушылар машиналық құрылған шүлдерді адамдардың 54% уақытта жазылатын деп ойлайды. Қатысушыларды қосымша, компьютердің құрылған қызметін бағалау үшін, барлық бағалаған қызметтердің ең жақсы болу үшін бағалады.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan dua metodologi baru untuk generasi automatik puisi ritmik dalam berbagai bentuk. pendekatan pertama menggunakan model bahasa saraf dilatih pada pengekodan fonetik untuk belajar mewakili implicit bagi bentuk dan kandungan puisi Inggeris. Model ini dapat mempelajari peranti puisi biasa seperti rima, ritma dan aliterasi. Pendekatan kedua menganggap generasi puisi sebagai masalah kegembiraan kegembiraan dimana model bahasa saraf generatif ditugaskan untuk belajar perwakilan kandungan, dan mesin keadaan tertentu berlebihan diskriminatif mengharamkannya berdasarkan bentuk. Dengan memanipulasi keterangan model terakhir, kita boleh menghasilkan puisi yang konsisten dengan bentuk dan tema arbitrari. A large-scale extrinsic evaluation demonstrated that participants consider machine-generated poems to be written by humans 54% of the time.  Selain itu, peserta menilai puisi yang dijana oleh mesin menjadi yang terbaik diantara semua yang diteliti.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d സ്വയം തലമുറപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ട് നോവല്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യ ആദ്യത്തെ സംവിധാനം ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കവിത്രത്തിന്റെ രൂപത്തിന്റെയും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന്റെയും പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള ഒരു പ ഈ മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണ കവിത ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ സാധ്യതയോടെ കഴിയും, റൈത്ത് പോലെയുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d. രണ്ടാമത്തെ സംവിധാനം കവിത തലമുറയെ നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായി തൃപ്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളായി കരുതുന്നു. അവിടെ ഒരു ജനററല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉള്ളടക്കം പഠ അവസാനത്തെ മോഡലിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമുക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d കവിത ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കാം ഒരു വലിയ സ്കാലിന്റെ പുറത്തുള്ള വിലാസം പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു പങ്കാളികള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ കവിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d വ കൂടാതെ പങ്കാളികള്\u200d ഒരു യന്ത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്ന കവിതം വിലയിച്ചു എല്ലാവരിലും ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചതായിരിക്കും.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu żewġ metodoloġiji ġodda għall-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ poeżija ritmika f’varjetà ta’ forom. L-ewwel approċċ juża mudell tal-lingwa newrali mħarreġ fuq kodifikazzjoni fonetika biex jitgħallem rappreżentazzjoni impliċita kemm tal-forma kif ukoll tal-kontenut tal-poezija Ingliża. Dan il-mudell jista’ effettivament jitgħallem apparat poetiku komuni bħar-rima, ir-ritmu u l-alliterazzjoni. It-tieni approċċ iqis il-ġenerazzjoni tal-poeżija bħala problem a ta’ sodisfazzjon ta’ restrizzjoni fejn mudell ġenerattiv tal-lingwa newrali għandu l-kompitu li jitgħallem rappreżentazzjoni tal-kontenut, u magna tal-istat finit peżata diskriminatorja tirrestrinġiha abbażi tal-forma. Billi nimanipulaw ir-restrizzjonijiet tal-mudell tal-aħħar, nistgħu niġġeneraw poeżija koerenti b’forom u temi arbitrarji. Evalwazzjoni esterna fuq skala kbira wriet li l-parteċipanti jqisu li poemi ġġenerati mill-magni għandhom jiġu miktuba mill-bniedem 54% tal-ħin. Barra minn hekk, il-parteċipanti kklassifikaw poem a ġġenerata mill-magna bħala l-a ħjar fost dawk kollha evalwati.', 'mn': 'Бид өөр хэлбэрээр ритмын шүлэг автоматжуулах хоёр шинэ методологийг санал болгож байна. Эхний арга нь мэдрэлийн хэл загварыг Фонетик кодлонгоор суралцаж Англи шүлэгийн хэлбэр болон соёлын тодорхойлолтыг суралцах боломжтой мэдрэлийн загварыг ашигладаг. Энэ загвар нь үндсэн шүлэгч төхөөрөмж, ритм, алитераци шиг нийтлэг шүлэгч төхөөрөмж сурах боломжтой. Хоёр дахь арга нь шүлэг үеийнхөө сэтгэл хөдлөлийн асуудал гэж үздэг. Эдгээр нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загвар бүтээгдэхүүний төлөвлөгөөг сурахад ажилладаг. Харин шийдвэрлэх хэмжээний төлөвлөгөө Эцсийн загварын хязгаарлалтыг засаж, бид өөрсдийгөө зөв хэлбэртэй, сэтгэл зүйлтэй холбоотой шүлэг бий болгож чадна. Ихэнх хэмжээний гадна дүгнэлт нь оролцогчид машины гаргасан шүлэг хүмүүсийн хугацааны 54% нь бичигдсэн гэдгийг харуулсан. Үүнээс гадна оролцогчдын хувьд машин бүтээсэн шүлэг бүх оюутнуудын хамгийн сайн байх гэж үзсэн.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy dwie nowe metody automatycznego generowania poezji rytmicznej w różnych formach. Pierwsze podejście wykorzystuje neuronowy model języka przeszkolony na kodowaniu fonetycznym, aby nauczyć się ukrytej reprezentacji zarówno formy, jak i treści angielskiej poezji. Model ten może skutecznie uczyć się powszechnych instrumentów poetyckich, takich jak rym, rytm i aliteracja. Drugie podejście uważa generowanie poezji za problem satysfakcji ograniczeń, w którym generacyjny model języka neuronowego ma za zadanie nauczyć się reprezentacji treści, a dyskryminacyjna maszyna stanu skończonego ogranicza ją na podstawie formy. Manipulując ograniczeniami tego ostatniego modelu, możemy generować spójną poezję z dowolnymi formami i tematami. Szeroko zakrojona ocena zewnętrzna wykazała, że uczestnicy uważają wiersze generowane maszynowo za pisane przez ludzi 54% czasu. Ponadto uczestnicy ocenili wiersz generowany maszynowo jako najlepszy ze wszystkich ocenianych.', 'ro': 'Propunem două metodologii noi pentru generarea automată a poeziei ritmice într-o varietate de forme. Prima abordare folosește un model de limbaj neural instruit pe o codificare fonetică pentru a învăța o reprezentare implicită atât a formei, cât și a conținutului poeziei engleze. Acest model poate învăța eficient dispozitive poetice comune, cum ar fi rime, ritm și aliterație. A doua abordare consideră generarea poeziei ca o problemă de satisfacție a constrângerilor, în cazul în care un model generativ de limbaj neural este însărcinat cu învățarea unei reprezentări a conținutului, iar o mașină ponderată discriminatorie a stării finite constrânge pe baza formei. Prin manipularea constrângerilor modelului din urmă, putem genera poezie coerentă cu forme și teme arbitrare. O evaluare extrinsă la scară largă a demonstrat că participanții consideră poeziile generate de mașină ca fiind scrise de oameni 54% din timp. În plus, participanții au evaluat un poem generat de mașină ca fiind cel mai bun dintre toți evaluați.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორი პრომენტიური მეტოლოგია რიტიმიური poeziის ავტომატური წარმოდგენისთვის განსხვავებული ფორმებში. პირველი პროგრამის გამოყენება ნეიროლური ენის მოდელს, რომელიც ფონეტიკური კონდირებაზე აკეთებულია, რომ ინგლისური ოჲეტიკის ფორმა და ინგლისური შემდგომარების ინ ეს მოდელი შეიძლება ეფექტიურად გავისწავლა საერთო პოეტიკური მოწყობილობა, როგორც რიმი, რიტიმ და ალიტერაცია. მეორე პროგორმა იფიქრობს პოეციის განვითარება როგორც შესაძლებლობის პრობლემა, სადაც გენერაციური ნეიროლური ენის მოდელის მოდელის შესაძლებლობით შესწავლობით შემდგომარება, და დისკრიმინაციური განვი შეგვიძლია შემდეგ მოდელის შერძლებელების მანთპულაციას, რომ შეგვიძლია გავაქმნოთ კონდენტური პორმებით და ტემებით. დიდი განზომილებული ექსტრინიური განზომილება მომხმარებელი იფიქრობენ, რომ მანქანის შექმნილი სუმები ადამიანებისგან 54% დროს დაწერა. დამატებით, მოწყობინებელი მაქინის შექმნილი პემეტი იყო ყველაზე საუკეთესო განსაზღვრებაში.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo dve nove metode za automatsku generaciju ritmičke poezije u raznim oblicima. Prvi pristup koristi neuralni jezik model obučen na fonetičkom kodiranju kako bi naučio implicitno predstavljanje oblika i sadržaja engleske poezije. Ovaj model može učiti zajedničke poezijske uređaje poput rima, ritma i aliteracije. Drugi pristup smatra poezijskom generacijom kao problem ograničenja zadovoljstva u kojem se generični neuralni jezik zadužava učenjem zastupanja sadržaja, a diskriminacijska težina ograničava ga na osnovu forme. Manipulirajući ograničenja poslednjeg modela, možemo stvoriti saslušnu poeziju sa proizvodnim oblicima i temama. Velika izvanzemalna procjena pokazala je da učesnici smatraju pesmom proizvedenim mašinama da napišu ljudi 54% vremena. Osim toga, učesnici su procenili pesmu od mašine da bude najbolja od svih procjena.', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට රිත්මික කාර්යාගේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට අවස්ථාව දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජ පළමුවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්නේ ෆෝනෙටික් සංකේතනයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ මන්ද්\u200dරය ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය කාවික උපකරණය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් රිම්, රිත්ම් සහ අයිතිරේෂණය දෙවෙනි විදියට කායිති පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට බලාපොරොත්තු විදියට බලාපොරොත්තු විදියට තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය භා අන්තිම මොඩල් එක්ක අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් අපිට පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයා විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා මිනිස්සු 54% කාලයෙන් ලියලා තියෙනවා කියලා. ඒ වගේම, සහයෝගිකරුවන්ට මැෂින් නිර්මාණය කවුරුවක් ගැන සිද්ධ වුනා හැමෝම විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් හො', 'no': 'Vi foreslår to roman metodar for automatisk generasjon av ritmisk poesier i mange form. Den første tilnærminga brukar eit neuralspråk-modell trent på ein fonetisk koding for å lære eit implisitt representasjon av både form og innhaldet i engelsk poesier. Denne modellen kan effektivt lære vanlege poesiske einingar som rhyme, ritm og alliterasjon. Den andre tilnærminga ser poesigenerering som eit begrensningstilfredsstillingspunkt der ein generert neuralspråk-modell vert oppgåve med å lære eit representasjon av innhaldet, og ein diskriminasjon vekt avslutta tilstandmaskin begrenser det på grunnlag av skjema. Ved å manipulere begrensningane av den siste modellen kan vi laga samanlig poesie med vilkårleg form og tema. Ein stor ekstrinsic evaluering demonstrerte at deltakarane ser ut for å skriva av menneske 54% av tida med maskinelaga poemar. I tillegg bestemte deltakarar raterte ein maskinelaga poem for å vera den beste mellom alle evaluerte.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa laba qaabab oo sawir ah oo ay u dhashaan shahaadada asalka ah oo kala duduwan. Xaalkii ugu horeeyay wuxuu isticmaalaa tusaale afka neurada ah oo lagu baray kaararka telefoonka si uu u barto qaab ku saabsan qaabka iyo waxyaabaha ku jira shahaadada Ingiriiska. Tusaaladan wuxuu si faa’iido ah u baran karaa qalabka shahaadada ee caadiga ah, tusaale ahaan hiwaayadaha, rytmada iyo xiriirka. Dhaqdhaqaaqa labaad ayaa ka muuqata qarniga shahaadada sida dhibaato adag oo raalli ka ah, meesha lagu sameeyo tusaale afka neurada ee geneeral ah oo lagu barto kooxo ku qoran waxyaabaha, iyo mashiinka takoorista miisaanka dowladda oo deynta ah ayaa ku qasba foomka. Si aan u maamulno xadida modelka ugu dambeeya, waxaynu u sameyn karnaa shahaado wadajir ah, waxaana ku sameyn karnaa noocyo caadi ah iyo maadooyin. Qiimeynta dibadda ee aad u weyn waxay muuqatay in kuwa ka qayb galay ay ka fikiraan gabayo dhashay mashiinka in lagu qoro boqolkiiba dadka 54. Intaas waxaa dheer in dadka ka qeybqaaday ay qiimeeyeen gabay laga abuuray oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår två nya metoder för automatisk generering av rytmisk poesi i olika former. Den första metoden använder sig av en neural språkmodell utbildad på fonetisk kodning för att lära sig en implicit representation av både formen och innehållet i engelsk poesi. Denna modell kan effektivt lära sig vanliga poetiska anordningar som rim, rytm och alliteration. Den andra metoden betraktar poesi generation som ett restriction satisfaction problem där en generativ neural språkmodell har till uppgift att lära sig en representation av innehåll, och en diskriminerande viktad finit state maskin begränsar det på grundval av form. Genom att manipulera begränsningarna i den senare modellen kan vi skapa sammanhängande poesi med godtyckliga former och teman. En storskalig extern utvärdering visade att deltagarna anser maskingenererade dikter vara skrivna av människor 54% av tiden. Dessutom betygsatte deltagarna en maskingenererad dikt som den bästa bland alla utvärderade.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک طرح طرح طرح طرح کی ریسمیک شعر کی آٹوٹی نسل کے لئے دو روانوی طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. The first approach uses a neural language model trained on a phonetic encoding to learn an implicit representation of both the form and content of English poetry. یہ مدل اثبات کے ساتھ شاعری دستگاه سکھائی سکتی ہے جیسے ریم، ریتم اور الیٹریٹر۔ دوسرا طریقہ شعری نسل کو ایک محدودیت کی راضی مسئلہ سمجھتا ہے جہاں ایک پیدا کرنے والی نئورل زبان مدل کو منزل کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کے ساتھ کام کیا جاتا ہے، اور ایک مختلف وزن کی محدودیت موجود موجود اسے فرم کے بنیاد پر محدودیت کرتا ہے. آخرین مدل کی محدودیت کو بدل کر، ہم آپس میں مشترک شعر پیدا کر سکتے ہیں بصیرت فرموں اور تیموں کے ساتھ. ایک بڑی مقدار خارجی ارزیابی نے دکھایا کہ شرکت کرنے والوں نے ماشین کے پیدا کئے ہوئے شعر کو اس وقت کی 54% انسان کے ذریعہ لکھا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ شرکت کرنے والوں نے ایک ماشین پیدا کیا ہوا شعر سب کے سب سے بہترین مقرر کیا۔', 'ta': 'நாம் இரண்டு புதிய முறைமைகளை தானாகவே உருவாக்குவதற்கு தானாகவே திருத்தம் கவிதியின் தலைமுறைகளை முன்நிர்ணயிக்க முதல் செயல்பாடு ஒரு போன்டெட்டிக் குறியீட்டில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட புதிய மொழி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறது ஆங்கிலத்தின்  இந்த மாதிரி பொதுவான புதிய கவிதி கருவிகளைப் பொறுத்து கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும் இரண்டாவது செயல்பாடு கவிதி தலைமுறை ஒரு கட்டுப்பாட்டு திருப்தி பிரச்சினையாக கருதுகிறது அதில் ஒரு பொதுவான நிரல் மொழி மாதிரி உள்ளடக்கத்தின் பிரதிநிதி கடைசி மாதிரியின் கட்டுப்பாட்டின் கட்டுப்பாடுகளை செயல்படுத்துவதற்காக, நாம் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட கவிதியை உருவாக ஒரு பெரிய அளவு வெளியீட்டு மதிப்பு காண்பிக்கப்பட்டது பங்கீட்டாளர் கூடுதலாக, பங்கீட்டாளர்கள் ஒரு இயந்திரம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட কবையை விகிதமாக அனைத்து மதிப்புகளிலும் சிறந்தது.', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik raytma poesining avtomatik avtomatik foydalanish uchun ikkita novel metodini boshqaramiz. Birinchi usul ingliz poesining shakli va tarkibi tarkibini o'rganish uchun fonetik kodlash usulini foydalanadi. Bu model qo'shimcha shaxsiy uskunalarni o'rganish mumkin, o'rim, rytma va alliteratsiya kabi. Ikkinchi usul poesi avval shaklga murakkablik muammolari deb hisoblanadi. Bu yerda generativ neyrol modeli mavzuni o'rganishni o'rganish bilan ishlaydi, va juda qisqarli yuqori davlat mashinasi bu shaklning asosida yaratadi. Keyingi modelning chegaralarini boshqarish orqali, biz bir xil shakli va mavzu bilan yaratish mumkin. Katta taʼminlovchi qiymatni ko'rsatish mumkin, o'qituvchilar vaqtning 54% odamning o'ziga yozilishini o'ylashadi. Ko'pchilik, o'qituvchilar buning eng yaxshi qiymatlariga o'zgartirdi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất hai phương pháp mới cho việc sản xuất tự động chất ca theo nhịp điệu trong nhiều dạng khác nhau. Cách tiếp cận đầu tiên sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh được đào tạo trên một mã ngữ âm để học cách đại diện riêng của cả hình dạng và nội dung của thơ Anh. Cách này có thể học được các thiết bị thi vị phổ biến như vần điệu, nhịp điệu và độ mới. Cách tiếp cận thứ hai coi thế hệ thơ là một vấn đề về sự hài lòng của giới hạn khi một mô hình thức thần kinh mang tính sản sinh ra được giao tiếp với công thức chứa đựng nội dung, và một cỗ máy ước tính được cân nhắc đã trói buộc nó dựa trên hình dạng. Bằng cách thao túng giới hạn của chế cuối cùng, chúng ta có thể tạo ra thơ văn phù hợp với các sắc thái và chủ đề tuỳ ý. Một đánh giá chân trời lớn cho thấy các diễn viên xem những bài thơ được tạo ra máy được viết bởi con người 54. Thêm vào đó, những người tham gia đánh giá một bài thơ được tạo ra cỗ máy là tốt nhất.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo dvije nove metode za automatsku generaciju ritmičke poezije u raznim oblicima. Prvi pristup koristi model neuralnog jezika obučen na fonetičkom kodiranju kako bi naučio implicitno predstavljanje oblika i sadržaja engleske poezije. Ovaj model može učiti zajedničke poezijske uređaje poput rima, ritma i aliteracije. Drugi pristup smatra poezijskom generacijom kao problem ograničenog zadovoljstva u kojem je generični model neuralnog jezika zadužen učenjem zastupanja sadržaja, a diskriminacijska težina ograničava ga na osnovu oblika. Manipulirajući ograničenja posljednjeg modela, možemo stvoriti saslušanu poeziju s proizvodnim oblicima i temama. Velika izvanzemalna procjena pokazala je da učesnici smatraju pjesmom proizvođenim strojem da napišu ljudi 54% vremena. Osim toga, učesnici su procijenili pjesmu od strojeva kako bi bili najbolji od svih procijenjenih.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår to nye metoder til automatisk generering af rytmisk poesi i forskellige former. Den første tilgang bruger en neural sprogmodel trænet på en fonetisk kodning for at lære en implicit repræsentation af både form og indhold af engelsk poesi. Denne model kan effektivt lære almindelige poetiske enheder som rim, rytme og allitteration. Den anden fremgangsmåde betragter poesi generation som et begrænset tilfredshedsproblem, hvor en generativ neural sprogmodel har til opgave at lære en repræsentation af indhold, og en diskriminerende vægtet finite state maskine begrænser det på grundlag af form. Ved at manipulere begrænsningerne i sidstnævnte model, kan vi generere sammenhængende poesi med vilkårlige former og temaer. En omfattende ekstrensisk evaluering viste, at deltagerne anser maskingenererede digte for at være skrevet af mennesker 54% af tiden. Derudover vurderede deltagerne et maskingenereret digt som det bedste blandt alle evaluerede.', 'nl': "We stellen twee nieuwe methodologieën voor voor het automatisch genereren van ritmische poëzie in verschillende vormen. De eerste benadering maakt gebruik van een neuraal taalmodel getraind op een fonetische codering om een impliciete representatie van zowel de vorm als de inhoud van de Engelse poëzie te leren. Dit model kan effectief gemeenschappelijke poëtische apparaten leren zoals rijm, ritme en alliteratie. De tweede benadering beschouwt het genereren van poëzie als een constitution tevredenheidsprobleem waarbij een generatief neuraal taalmodel wordt belast met het leren van een representatie van inhoud, en een discriminatief gewogen eindige state machine beperkt deze op basis van vorm. Door de beperkingen van dit laatste model te manipuleren, kunnen we coherente poëzie genereren met willekeurige vormen en thema's. Een grootschalige extrinsieke evaluatie toonde aan dat deelnemers denken dat machinaal gegenereerde gedichten door mensen geschreven zijn 54% van de tijd. Daarnaast beoordeelden deelnemers een machinaal gegenereerd gedicht als het beste van alle geëvalueerde.", 'ko': '우리는 두 가지 새로운 방법을 제시하여 각종 형식의 운율시를 자동으로 생성하였다.첫 번째 방법은 음성 인코딩 훈련을 받은 신경 언어 모델을 이용하여 영어 시의 형식과 내용의 은식 표현을 배운다.이 모델은 압운, 리듬, 두운 등 자주 사용하는 시가 수단을 효과적으로 배울 수 있다.두 번째 방법은 시의 생성을 하나의 구속 만족 문제로 간주한다. 그 중에서 생성성 신경 언어 모델은 학습 내용의 표시를 책임지고 판별 가중 유한 상태기는 형식에 따라 이를 구속한다.조종 후 모델의 제약을 통해 우리는 임의의 형식과 주제를 가진 일관된 시를 만들 수 있다.대규모 외부 평가에 따르면 참가자들은 기계가 만든 시가의 54%가 인류가 쓴 것이라고 주장했다.그 밖에 참가자들은 기계적으로 만들어진 시를 모든 평가된 시 중 가장 좋은 것으로 평가했다.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen zwei neue Methoden zur automatischen Erzeugung rhythmischer Poesie in verschiedenen Formen vor. Der erste Ansatz verwendet ein neuronales Sprachmodell, das auf einer phonetischen Kodierung trainiert wurde, um eine implizite Repräsentation sowohl der Form als auch des Inhalts der englischen Poesie zu erlernen. Dieses Modell kann gängige poetische Mittel wie Reim, Rhythmus und Alliteration effektiv erlernen. Der zweite Ansatz betrachtet die Erzeugung von Poesie als ein Zwangszufriedenheitsproblem, bei dem ein generatives neuronales Sprachmodell mit der Aufgabe betraut ist, eine Repräsentation von Inhalten zu erlernen, und eine diskriminierende gewichtete Finite State Machine sie auf der Grundlage der Form einschränkt. Durch die Manipulation der Einschränkungen des letzteren Modells können wir kohärente Poesie mit beliebigen Formen und Themen erzeugen. Eine groß angelegte extrinsische Auswertung zeigte, dass die Teilnehmer die maschinell erzeugten Gedichte 54% der Zeit für Menschen halten. Darüber hinaus bewerteten die Teilnehmer ein maschinell generiertes Gedicht als das beste unter allen bewerteten.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan dua metodologi baru untuk generasi otomatis puisi ritmik dalam berbagai bentuk. Pendekatan pertama menggunakan model bahasa saraf yang dilatih dalam pengekodan fonetik untuk belajar representation implicit dari bentuk dan isi puisi Inggris. Model ini dapat mempelajari perangkat puisi umum seperti rima, ritme dan aliterasi. The second approach considers poetry generation as a constraint satisfaction problem where a generative neural language model is tasked with learning a representation of content, and a discriminative weighted finite state machine constrains it on the basis of form.  Dengan memanipulasi batas model terakhir, kita dapat menghasilkan puisi yang konsisten dengan bentuk dan tema yang arbitrar. Evaluasi ekstrinsik skala besar menunjukkan bahwa peserta menganggap puisi yang dibuat oleh mesin ditulis oleh manusia 54% dari waktu. Selain itu, peserta menilai puisi yang dibuat oleh mesin menjadi yang terbaik diantara semua yang diteliti.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме две нови методологии за автоматично генериране на ритмична поезия в различни форми. Първият подход използва невронен езиков модел, обучен върху фонетично кодиране, за да научи имплицитно представяне както на формата, така и на съдържанието на английската поезия. Този модел може ефективно да научи общи поетични устройства като рима, ритъм и алитерация. Вторият подход разглежда генерирането на поезия като проблем за задоволяване на ограниченията, при който генеративен невронен езиков модел е натоварен с изучаване на представяне на съдържанието, а дискриминационна претеглена машина за крайно състояние го ограничава въз основа на формата. Чрез манипулиране на ограниченията на последния модел можем да генерираме съгласувана поезия с произволни форми и теми. Широкомащабна външна оценка показа, че участниците считат машинно генерирани стихове за писани от хора 54% от времето. Освен това участниците оцениха машинно генерираната поема като най-добрата сред всички оценени.', 'fa': 'ما دو روش نویسی برای نسل خود شعر ریتمیک در مختلف شکل پیشنهاد می کنیم. اولین روش از یک مدل زبان عصبی استفاده می\u200cکند که روی یک رمزبندی تلفنی آموزش یاد می\u200cگیرد تا یک نمایش معمولی از شکل و محتوای شعر انگلیسی یاد بگیرد. این مدل می تواند به طور تاثیر دستگاه شاعری معمولی مثل ریم، ریتم و الیتراتر یاد بگیرد. دستور دوم نسل شعر را به عنوان مشکل راضی محدودیت محدودیت می\u200cبیند که یک مدل زبان عصبی ژنتیک با یادگرفتن نمایش محتویات کار می\u200cشود، و یک ماشین وزن محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت آن را بر اساس فرم محدودیت می\u200cکند. با تغییر کردن محدودیت آخرین مدل، می\u200cتوانیم شعر با شکل\u200cهای تصادفی و عنوان\u200cهای مشترک را تولید کنیم. یک ارزیابی بزرگ از مقیاس خارجی نشان داد که شرکت کنندگان شعرهای ساخته شده ماشین را به عنوان ۴۴ درصد انسان از زمان نوشته می کنند. علاوه بر این، شرکتگران یک شعر تولید ماشین را ارزیابی کردند تا بهترین از همه ارزیابی باشند.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mbinu mbili za riwaya kwa kizazi cha kujitegemea cha ushairi wa michezo katika namna mbalimbali. Mfumo wa kwanza unatumia muundo wa lugha ya asili ulioelekezwa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa simu ili kujifunza uwakilishi wa wazi wa aina na maudhui ya ushairi wa Kiingereza. Mfano huu unaweza kujifunza vifaa vya mashairi kwa ufanisi kama vile hisia, maneno na ushirikiano. Mtakatifu wa pili unachukulia kizazi cha mashairi kama tatizo la kutia furaha ambapo muundo wa lugha ya uboreshaji unafanya kazi kwa kujifunza uwakilizaji wa maudhui, na mashine yenye ubaguzi yenye uzito wa taifa linalozungumzia kwa kutumia mfumo. Kwa kudhibiti vikwazo vya mifano ya pili, tunaweza kutengeneza ushairi wa pamoja kwa njia za kiholela na mada. Utafiti mkubwa wa nje ulionyesha kuwa washiriki wanafikiri shairi zilizotengenezwa kwa mashine kuandikwa na asilimia 54 ya wakati huo. Zaidi ya hayo, washiriki waliongeza shairi iliyotengenezwa na mashine kuwa ni bora zaidi miongoni mwa yote yanayopitiwa.', 'tr': 'Biz ritmik poeziň awtomatik döwletleriniň birnäçe şeklinde iki roman methodologiýany teklip edip görýäris. Ilkinji ýalaýyş, iňlis poeziniň şekliniň we maksadynyň suratyny öwrenmek üçin fonetik ködlemelerde bilinen neiral dil nusgasyny ulanýar. Bu nusga rhyme, ritm we aliatersiýa ýaly orta şawiýat cihazlary öwrenip biler. Ikinji ýagdaýda poezi döwletlerini, nähili täsirli neural dil modeliniň maksadynyň täsirini öwrenmek üçin buýruk çykýan mesele diýip pikir edýär. Soňky nusganyň mümkinçiliklerini üýtgeden, biz özümizde nähili bir şair we temalar bilen düşünjeli şair döredip bileris. Büyük ölçekli bir ekstrinsici değerlendirme iştirakçiler, zamanın 54%-i insan tarafından yazıldığını düşündüklerini gösterdi. Ayrıca iştirakçiler makine üretildiği bir şiir bütün değerlendirilen en iyi şekilde değerlendirdi.', 'af': "Ons voorstel twee nuwe metodologies vir die outomatiese generasie van ritmiske poedie in 'n verskillende vorms. Die eerste toegang gebruik 'n neurale taal model wat op 'n fonetiese enkodering onderwerp is om' n inplisite voorstelling te leer van beide die vorm en inhoud van Engelske poedie. Hierdie model kan effektief gemeenskaplike poetiese toestelle leer soos rym, ritm en alliterasie. Die tweede toegang beskou poesie generasie as 'n beperkende versadiging probleem waar 'n genereerde neurale taal model is met die leer van 'n voorstelling van inhoud, en 'n diskriminasiewe geweeg beperkende staatsmasjien beperk dit op die basis van vorm. Deur die beheininge van die laaste model te manipuleer, kan ons koherente poedie genereer met willekeurige vorms en tema. 'n Groot-skaal ekstrinsiese evaluasie het bevestig dat deelnaders besluit masjien genereerde dame om deur mense 54% van die tyd te skryf. In addition, participants rated a machine-generated poem to be the best among all evaluated.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë dy metodologji të reja për gjeneratën automatike të poezisë ritmike në një shumëllojshmëri formash. Përqasja e parë përdor një model gjuhësh nervore të stërvitur në një kodim fonetik për të mësuar një përfaqësim implicit të si form ës dhe përmbajtjes së poezisë angleze. Ky model mund të mësojë në mënyrë efektive pajisje poetike të përbashkëta të tilla si ritmi, ritmi dhe aliteracioni. Përqasja e dytë konsideron gjeneratën e poezisë si një problem të kënaqësisë të kufizuar ku një model gjenerativ i gjuhës nervore është i ngarkuar me mësimin e një përfaqësimi të përmbajtjes dhe një makinë shtetërore e kufizuar me peshë diskriminuese e kufizon atë në bazë të form ës. Duke manipuluar kufizimet e modelit të fundit, ne mund të gjenerojmë poezi koherente me forme dhe temat arbitrare. Një vlerësim ekstrinzik në shkallë të madhe tregoi se pjesëmarrësit konsiderojnë poemat e prodhuara nga makina të shkruara nga njerëzit 54% të kohës. Përveç kësaj, pjesëmarrësit vlerësuan një poezi të gjeneruar nga makina të jetë më e mira midis të gjithë të vlerësuarve.', 'am': 'ሁለትን አረንጓዴዎች ለራሳቸው የሪትምያ ባለ ቅኔን በተለያዩ ፎርማዎች እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ሥርዓት የፊደል ቋንቋ ሞዴል የኢንዝርኛ ባለ ቅኔ እና የግልፅ ባለ ቅጂ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለመማር የፎንnetic encoding የተማረ ነው፡፡ ይሄ ምሳሌ የተለየ የቅኔ ዕውይት፣ የሪትማ፣ የሪትማ እና ተሳታፊነት እንዲማር ይችላል፡፡ ሁለተኛው ሥርዓት የባለ ቅኔ ትውልድ የነዌብ ቋንቋ ሞዴል የሆኑን መልዕክት በማስተማርበት እና የተለየ ጥያቄ የሀገር መሳሳይ በመሠረት ይግለጻል፡፡ የመጨረሻይቱን ዓይነት ግንኙነት በመግለጽ፣ በተርታዊ ፎርማቶች እና ጉዳዮች ጋር ባለው ቅኔን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ትልቅ የውጭ ውጤት ተጋሪዎቹ በጊዜው 54 በመቶ የሚጻፉ መሣሪያዎች የሆኑት የጃንደረባ ቅኔዎች ይመለከታሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ተጋሪዎቹ የሆኑት የሐሳብ ባለ ቅኔ ከሁሉም የተሻለ እንዲሆን አስቀድሞ ነበር፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու նոր մեթոդոլոգիա ռիթմիկ պոեզիայի ավտոմատիկ սերունդի համար տարբեր ձևերով: Առաջին մոտեցումը օգտագործում է նյարդային լեզվի մոդել, որը սովորում է անգլերենի պոեզիայի ձևի և պարունակության ենթարկված ներկայացումը: Այս մոդելը կարող է արդյունավետ սովորել ընդհանուր պոետական սարքեր, ինչպիսիք են ռիմը, ռիթմը և ալիտերացիան: Երկրորդ մոտեցումը դիտարկում է պոեզիայի սերունդը որպես սահմանափակ բավարարման խնդիր, որտեղ սերունդային նյարդային լեզվի մոդելը պարտադիր է սովորել պարունակության ներկայացումը, և խտրականորեն կենտրոնացված սահմանափակ պետական մեքենան է սահման Վերջին մոդելի սահմանափակումները վերահսկելով, մենք կարող ենք ստեղծել համապատասխան պոեզիա կամավոր ձևերի և թեմաների հետ: Մեծ ծավալի արտաքին գնահատումը ցույց տվեց, որ մասնակիցները կարծում են, որ մեքենայի ստեղծված բանաստեղծությունները մարդկանց կողմից գրված են 54 տոկոսով: Ավելին, մասնակիցները մեքենայով ստեղծված բանաստեղծություն գնահատեցին որպես ամենալավ գնահատված բանաստեղծություն:', 'bn': 'We propose two novel methodologies for the automatic generation of rhythmic poetry in a variety of forms.  প্রথম পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করে একটি ফোনেটিক এনকোডিং এ প্রশিক্ষিত নিউরুল ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে ইংরেজি কবিতার প্রতিনিধিত্ব ও বিষ এই মডেলটি কার্যকর ভাবে সাধারণ কবিতা যন্ত্র শিখতে পারে, যেমন রাইম, রাইথ এবং সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে। দ্বিতীয় পদ্ধতি কবিতা প্রজন্মের বিবেচনা করে একটি সীমাবদ্ধ সন্তুষ্ট সমস্যা হিসেবে যেখানে একটি জেনারেটিভ নিউরেল ভাষার মডেল বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব শি পরবর্তী মডেলের নিয়ম নিয়ন্ত্রণের মাধ্যমে আমরা তৈরি করতে পারি কৌতুক কবিতা এবং বৈচিত্র্যময় বিষয়বস্তু দিয়ে। বিশাল পর্যায়ের এক বিদায় মূল্য প্রদর্শন করেছে যে অংশগ্রহণকারীরা মেশিন তৈরি করা কবিতা বিবেচনা করে মানুষের ৫৪% সময়ের লেখার জন্য এছাড়াও অংশগ্রহণকারীরা একটি মেশিন তৈরি কবিতা হারিয়ে দিয়েছে যারা সবার মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ভালো মূল্যায়ন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Predlažemo dvije nove metode za automatsku generaciju ritmičke poezije u raznim oblicima. Prvi pristup koristi neuralni jezički model obučen na fonetičkom kodiranju kako bi naučio implicitnu predstavu oblika i sadržaja engleske poezije. Ovaj model može učiti zajedničke poezijske uređaje poput rima, ritma i aliteracije. Drugi pristup smatra poezijskom generacijom kao problem ograničenog zadovoljstva u kojem je generični model neuralnog jezika zadužen učenjem zastupanja sadržaja, a diskriminativna težina ograničava ga na osnovu forme. Manipulirajući ograničenja posljednjeg modela, možemo stvoriti saslušanu poeziju sa proizvodnim oblicima i temama. Velika izvanzemalna procjena pokazala je da učesnici smatraju pesmom proizvođenim mašinama da napišu ljudi 54% vremena. Osim toga, učesnici su procenili pesmu iz mašine da bude najbolja od svih procjena.', 'az': 'Biz müxtəlif formlarda ritmik poezinin otomatik nəsili üçün iki yeni metodoloji təklif edirik. İlk tərzim İngilizə şiir şəriətinin və məlumatının imkansız tərzini öyrənmək üçün fonetik kodlaması üzerində təhsil edilmiş nöral dil modelini istifadə edir. Bu modellər Rim, Rim və Aliterasyon kimi ortaq şair avadanlıqlarını öyrənə bilər. İkinci tərzim poezi nəslini sıxıntılı təhlükəsizlik problemi kimi hesab edir. Nəyral dil modelinin məlumatı öyrənməsi ilə məlumatı öyrənməsi və diskriminasiya çəkilən müəyyən müddətli vəziyyət maşınının formu üzərində onu sıkışdırır. Son modelinin müəyyənləşdirilməsi ilə, müvafiq şəir və temalar ilə müvafiq şəir yarada bilərik. Büyük ölçüdə extrinsic değerlendirmə göstərildi ki, iştirakçilər maşın yaratdığı şiirləri zamanın 54%-i insanlar tarafından yazılacaqlarını düşünürlər. Bəlkə, iştirakçilər maşın yaratdığı şiir bütün değerlənənlərin ən yaxşısı olmaq üçün müəyyən etdilər.', 'ca': "Proposem dues metodologies noves per a la generació automàtica de poesia ritmica en diverses formes. El primer enfocament utilitza un model de llenguatge neural entrenat en una codificació fonètica per aprendre una representació implícita de la form a i el contingut de la poesia anglesa. Aquest model pot aprendre efectivament dispositius poètics comuns com rím, ritme i alliteració. El segon enfocament considera la generació de poesia un problem a de satisfacció limitada en el qual un model de llenguatge neural generador té la tasca d'aprendre una representació del contingut, i una màquina d'estat finit ponderada discriminatoria la limita basada en la forma. Manipulant les restriccions d'aquest últim model, podem generar poesia coherent amb formes i temes arbitràries. Una avaluació extrínsica a gran escala va demostrar que els participants consideraven que els poemes generats per màquina seran escrits pels humans el 54% del temps. A més, els participants van classificar un poem a generat per màquina com el millor de tots.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme dvě nové metodiky automatického generování rytmické poezie v různých formách. První přístup používá neuronový jazykový model trénovaný na fonetickém kódování, aby se naučil implicitní reprezentaci formy i obsahu anglické poezie. Tento model se může efektivně naučit běžné poetické prostředky, jako je rým, rytmus a aliterace. Druhý přístup považuje generování poezie za problém spokojenosti s omezením, kdy generativní neuronový jazykový model má za úkol naučit se reprezentaci obsahu a diskriminační vážený stroj konečného stavu ho omezuje na základě formy. Manipulací s omezeními druhého modelu můžeme generovat koherentní poezii s libovolnými formami a tématy. Rozsáhlé extrinsické hodnocení ukázalo, že účastníci považují strojově generované básně za napsané lidmi 54% času. Kromě toho účastníci hodnotili strojově generovanou báseň jako nejlepší ze všech hodnocených.', 'et': 'Pakume välja kaks uut metoodikat rütmilise luule automaatseks genereerimiseks erinevates vormides. Esimene lähenemine kasutab foneetilisel kodeerimisel koolitatud neurokeele mudelit, et õppida kaudset esitust nii inglise luule vormist kui sisust. See mudel suudab tõhusalt õppida tavalisi poeetilisi seadmeid nagu riim, rütm ja alliteratsioon. Teine lähenemine käsitleb luule genereerimist piirava rahulolu probleemina, kus generatiivse neurokeele mudeli ülesanne on õppida sisu esindamist ja diskrimineeriv kaalutud piiratud oleku masin piirab seda vormi alusel. Viimase mudeli piirangutega manipuleerides saame luua sidusat luuletust meelevaldsete vormide ja teemadega. Laiaulatuslik välishindamine näitas, et osalejad peavad masinaga loodud luuletusi inimese poolt 54% ajast. Lisaks hindasid osalejad masinagenereeritud luuletust kõigi hinnatud hulgas parimaks.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme kahta uutta menetelmää rytmisen runouden automaattiseen tuottamiseen eri muodoissa. Ensimmäisessä lähestymistavassa käytetään foneettiseen koodaukseen koulutettua neurokielimallia oppiakseen implisiittisen edustuksen englantilaisen runouden muodosta ja sisällöstä. Tämä malli voi tehokkaasti oppia yleisiä runollisia laitteita, kuten riimi, rytmi ja alliteraatio. Toisessa lähestymistavassa runouden syntymistä pidetään rajoittavana tyytyväisyysongelmana, jossa generatiivinen neurokielimalli opettelee sisällön esittämistä ja diskriminatiivinen painotettu finiittisen tilan kone rajoittaa sitä muodon perusteella. Manipuloimalla jälkimmäisen mallin rajoituksia voimme luoda johdonmukaista runoutta mielivaltaisilla muodoilla ja teemoilla. Laajamittainen ulkoinen arviointi osoitti, että osallistujien mielestä koneella tuotettuja runoja on kirjoitettu ihmisten toimesta 54% ajasta. Lisäksi osallistujat arvioivat koneella luodun runon parhaaksi arvioitujen joukossa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing nyenengaké kabèh kanggo ngerasakno éntuk winih sing liwat apik. Awakdhéwé tanggal tualah gunaké model sing nggawe oleh nggo kuwi nggo koder parangan sing dirangkat oleh nggambar kuwi tindakan sampeyan ingkang. model iki iso nggambar kelas kuwi alam kuwi bagian, dadi, baliter karo ngono alam. Ndoleh sing wis digawe, kuwi nggunakake kapan budhakan kelas nggawe kesempatan kanggo nguasai nggawe modèl kuwi ngregani urip kuwi tindah-urip, lan kelas sistem sing apik dhéwé, sampeyan kuwi macem sing paling apik dhéwé. Ngawe ngubah maneh dumateng modèl sing dumateng, kéné iso nglanggar biasane sampek karo hal-hal layar lan tema. @title: group Nambah, sawetara wong liyane wis ditambah bantayan kelas nang sampeyan ingkang angka sing luwih apik sing luwih apik.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים שתי מטודולוגיות חדשות לדור האוטומטי של שירה קצבית בצורות שונות. הגישה הראשונה משתמשת במודל שפת עצבית מאומן על קידוד פונטי כדי ללמוד מייצג משמעותי של צורה ובתוכן השירה האנגלית. הדוגמא הזאת יכולה ללמוד במיוחד מכשירים שירים משותפים כמו קצב, קצב ואליטרציה. הגישה השנייה מחשיבה את דור השירה כבעיית סיפוק מוגבלת שבו מודל שפת עצבית דורשת מועמד ללמוד מייצג של תוכן, ומכונת מדינה מוגבלת במשקל דיסקרטיבי מוגבלת אותו על בסיס צורה. על ידי מניפולציה של המגבלות של המודל האחרון, אנו יכולים ליצור שירה קבועה עם צורות ובנושאים רציניים. הערכה מחוץ למידה גדולה הראה שהמשתתפים חושבים שירים שנוצרים מהמכונה נכתבים על ידי בני אדם 54% מהזמן. בנוסף, השתתפים ערכו שיר שנוצר מכונות להיות הכי טוב בין כולם.', 'ha': "Tune buƙata hanyoyin biyu na nowaya wa zaɓen farat-farat hairi na rayim cikin wasu forms. @ info: whatsthis Wannan misalin yana iya iya amfani da amfani da shaidar karãtun mutane kamar yin mutane, yin ytme da allitarwa. Tsarin na biyu na ƙaddara kiyãyen shairi kamar wata masĩfa mai yarda da shi mai ƙunci a inda an aiki wani misalin harshen neural da ake yi wa karatun wani mai tsari da maɓallin ciki, kuma an sami wani kafin da aka naƙasa shi a kan wani tsari. Yana iya ƙididdige tsarin misãlai na ƙarshe, za mu iya iya ƙiƙiro shaidar da baka, da bakarãriya da maɓalli. Ana ƙaddara mai girma na ƙaranci ya nuna cewa mãsu haɗuwa sun yi bincike da shaini wanda aka haife shi na kafin da za'a rubũta shi na mutum 54% daga lokacin. In addition, participants rated a machine-generated poem to be the best amongst all evaluated.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo dve novi metodologiji za avtomatsko generiranje ritmične poezije v različnih oblikah. Prvi pristop uporablja nevronski jezikovni model, usposobljen na fonetičnem kodiranju, da se nauči implicitne reprezentacije oblike in vsebine angleške poezije. Ta model se lahko učinkovito nauči skupnih poetičnih naprav, kot so rima, ritem in aliteracija. Drugi pristop obravnava generiranje poezije kot problem zadovoljstva z omejitvijo, kjer je generativni nevronski jezikovni model naložen učenju reprezentacije vsebine, diskriminativno utežen stroj končnega stanja pa ga omejuje na podlagi oblike. Z manipulacijo omejitev slednjega modela lahko ustvarimo koherentno poezijo s poljubnimi oblikami in temami. Obsežna ekstrinzična ocena je pokazala, da udeleženci menijo, da strojno ustvarjene pesmi napišejo ljudje 54% časa. Poleg tega so udeleženci strojno ustvarjeno pesem ocenili kot najboljšo med vsemi ocenjenimi.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་རིགས་མིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མི་འདྲ་བར་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་གཉིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The first approach uses a neural language model trained on a phonetic encoding to learn an implicit representation of both the form and content of the English poet. སྔོན་དབྱིབས་འདིས་ཕན་ཚུན་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྙན་ངག་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱས་ཆོག་འདུག འདྲི་ཚིག་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་སྟངས་འཛིན་པའི་སྙན་ཚིག་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འཆར་བརྟན་བཀོད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་རྒྱུ་དང་། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དབུགས་གྱི་ཚད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་སྙན་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་གཏོང་ཐུབ། ཞེས་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་རྒྱ་ནག་ཏུ་འཇུག་རྟེན་འདིའི་དུས་ཚོད་གྲངས་སུ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་སྙན་ངག་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ ཞུགས་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་མ་ལག་གིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་སྙན་ངག་ཅིག་རྙེད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Creating Training Corpora for NLG Micro-Planners', 'ar': 'إنشاء هيئة تدريب لمخططي NLG الجزئي', 'pt': 'Criação de Corpora de Treinamento para Micro-Planejadores NLG', 'fr': 'Création de corpus de formation pour les micro-planificateurs de GNL', 'es': 'Creación de cuerpos de formación para microplanificadores de NLG', 'ja': 'NLGマイクロプランナーのためのトレーニングコーポラの作成', 'zh': '为NLG微型规划师创培训语料库', 'hi': 'NLG माइक्रो-प्लानर्स के लिए प्रशिक्षण निगम बनाना', 'ru': 'Создание учебных корпусов для микропланировщиков NLG', 'ga': 'Corpora Oiliúna a Chruthú do Mhicrea-Phleanálaithe NLG', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δημιουργία σώματος κατάρτισης για μικροπρογραμματιστές NLG', 'hu': 'Képzési Corpora létrehozása az NLG mikrotervezők számára', 'it': 'Creazione di Corpora di Formazione per Micro-Planner NLG', 'kk': 'NLG микро планерлер үшін оқыту бағдарламасы құрылды', 'lt': 'Creating Training Corpora for NLG Micro-Planners', 'mk': 'Создавање на корпора за обука за микропланувачи на NLG', 'ms': 'Mencipta Korpora Latihan untuk Micro-Planners NLG', 'mt': 'Il-ħolqien ta’ Korpora ta’ Taħriġ għall-Mikroplanaturi NLG', 'ml': 'NLG മൈക്രോ- പദ്ധതികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിശീലന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'NLG микро-төлөвлөгчийн дасгал хөдөлгөөн үүсгэх', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Tworzenie korpusu szkoleniowego dla mikroplanistów NLG', 'ro': 'Crearea Corpora de Formare pentru Microplanificatorii NLG', 'sr': 'Stvaranje treninga korpore za NLG mikroplanjere', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'abuurista korpora waxbarasho for NLG Micro-Planners', 'sv': 'Skapa utbildningsCorpora för NLG mikroplanerare', 'ta': 'Creating Training Corpora for NLG Micro-Planners', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Creating Training Corpora for NLG Micro-Planners', 'vi': 'Tạo tập đoàn huấn luyện cho Micro Planners NLG', 'nl': 'Training Corpora aanmaken voor microplanners van NLG', 'bg': 'Създаване на корпорация за обучение за микро-планиране на НЛГ', 'da': 'Oprettelse af træningskorpora for NLG mikroplanlæggere', 'de': 'Erstellung von Schulungskorpora für NLG-Mikroplaner', 'ko': 'NLG 미시 기획사를 위한 교육 자료 라이브러리 만들기', 'fa': 'ایجاد شرکت آموزش برای نقشه\u200cهای مایکروبرنامه\u200cکنندگان NLG', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Mafunzo ya Shirika la Mikro la NLG', 'tr': 'NLG Micro-Planleriň üçin Ewezam Ewezam Goşuny Bejer', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Krijimi i Korporas së Treinimit për Mikroplanuesit NLG', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hr': 'Stvaranje treninga korpore za NLG mikroplanjere', 'hy': 'ՆԼԳ-ի միկրոպլանավորողների ուսուցման կորպորա ստեղծելը', 'az': 'NLG Mikro-Planners üçün təhsil Korporu yaradılır', 'id': 'Membuat Korpora Pelatihan untuk Micro-Planners NLG', 'bn': 'NLG মাইক্রো- প্ল্যানারের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ কর্পোরা তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Stvaranje treninga korpore za NLG mikroplanjere', 'cs': 'Vytvoření školícího sboru pro mikroplánovače NLG', 'ca': "Crear una Corporació d'Formació per a Microplanificadors de NLG", 'et': 'NLG mikroplaneerijate koolituskorpora loomine', 'fi': 'Koulutuskorpusen luominen NLG:n mikrosuunnittelijoille', 'jv': 'Gagal Cocopo-Colopo kanggo NLG mikro-Organiser', 'he': 'יצירת תאגיד אימונים למיקרותכננים NLG', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje korpuse usposabljanja za mikronačrtovalce NLG', 'bo': 'NLG Micro-Planners ལ་སློབ་གྲྭས་གཙོ་སྡུད་མཁན་གསར་འཛུགས་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a novel framework for semi-automatically creating linguistically challenging micro-planning data-to-text corpora from existing Knowledge Bases. Because our method pairs data of varying size and shape with texts ranging from simple clauses to short texts, a dataset created using this framework provides a challenging benchmark for microplanning. Another feature of this framework is that it can be applied to any large scale knowledge base and can therefore be used to train and learn KB verbalisers. We apply our framework to DBpedia data and compare the resulting dataset with Wen et al. 2016’s. We show that while Wen et al.’s dataset is more than twice larger than ours, it is less diverse both in terms of input and in terms of text. We thus propose our corpus generation framework as a novel method for creating challenging data sets from which NLG models can be learned which are capable of handling the complex interactions occurring during in micro-planning between lexicalisation, aggregation, surface realisation, referring expression generation and sentence segmentation. To encourage researchers to take up this challenge, we made available a dataset of 21,855 data / text pairs created using this framework in the context of the WebNLG shared task.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم إطارًا جديدًا لإنشاء مجموعات تخطيطية دقيقة من بيانات التخطيط الجزئي ذات التحديات اللغوية بشكل شبه تلقائي من قواعد المعرفة الحالية. نظرًا لأن طريقتنا تجمع البيانات ذات الأحجام والشكل المتفاوتة مع النصوص التي تتراوح من الجمل البسيطة إلى النصوص القصيرة ، فإن مجموعة البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام هذا الإطار توفر معيارًا صعبًا للتخطيط المصغر. ميزة أخرى لهذا الإطار هي أنه يمكن تطبيقه على أي قاعدة معرفية واسعة النطاق وبالتالي يمكن استخدامه لتدريب وتعلم مترجمي قاعدة المعارف. نطبق إطار عملنا على بيانات DBpedia ونقارن مجموعة البيانات الناتجة مع Wen et al. 2016. نوضح أنه في حين أن مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بـ Wen et al. أكبر بمرتين من مجموعتنا ، إلا أنها أقل تنوعًا من حيث الإدخال ومن حيث النص. لذلك نقترح إطار عمل إنشاء الجسم كطريقة جديدة لإنشاء مجموعات بيانات صعبة يمكن من خلالها تعلم نماذج NLG والتي تكون قادرة على التعامل مع التفاعلات المعقدة التي تحدث أثناء التخطيط الجزئي بين المعجم والتجميع وإدراك السطح والإشارة إلى توليد التعبير والجمل تجزئة. لتشجيع الباحثين على مواجهة هذا التحدي ، وفرنا مجموعة بيانات مكونة من 21،855 زوجًا من البيانات / النصوص تم إنشاؤها باستخدام إطار العمل هذا في سياق مهمة WebNLG المشتركة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova estrutura para a criação semiautomática de corpora de dados para texto de microplanejamento linguisticamente desafiador a partir de Bases de Conhecimento existentes. Como nosso método combina dados de tamanho e formato variados com textos que variam de cláusulas simples a textos curtos, um conjunto de dados criado usando essa estrutura fornece uma referência desafiadora para o microplanejamento. Outra característica desta estrutura é que ela pode ser aplicada a qualquer base de conhecimento em larga escala e, portanto, pode ser usada para treinar e aprender verbalizadores de KB. Aplicamos nossa estrutura aos dados da DBpedia e comparamos o conjunto de dados resultante com Wen et al. de 2016. Mostramos que, embora o conjunto de dados de Wen et al. seja mais de duas vezes maior que o nosso, é menos diversificado tanto em termos de entrada quanto em termos de texto. Assim, propomos nossa estrutura de geração de corpus como um novo método para criar conjuntos de dados desafiadores a partir dos quais modelos NLG podem ser aprendidos, capazes de lidar com as interações complexas que ocorrem durante o microplanejamento entre lexicalização, agregação, realização de superfície, geração de expressão de referência e sentença segmentação. Para incentivar os pesquisadores a aceitar esse desafio, disponibilizamos um conjunto de dados de 21.855 pares de dados/texto criados usando esse framework no contexto da tarefa compartilhada do WebNLG.', 'es': "En este artículo, presentamos un marco novedoso para la creación semiautomática de corpus de datos a texto de microplanificación lingüísticamente desafiantes a partir de bases de conocimiento existentes. Debido a que nuestro método combina datos de diferentes tamaños y formas con textos que van desde cláusulas simples hasta textos cortos, un conjunto de datos creado con este marco proporciona un punto de referencia desafiante para la microplanificación. Otra característica de este marco es que se puede aplicar a cualquier base de conocimiento a gran escala y, por lo tanto, se puede utilizar para capacitar y aprender a los verbalizadores de KB. Aplicamos nuestro marco a los datos de DBpedia y comparamos el conjunto de datos resultante con el de Wen et al. 2016. Mostramos que mientras que Wen et al. ' El conjunto de datos es más de dos veces más grande que el nuestro, es menos diverso tanto en términos de entrada como de texto. Por lo tanto, proponemos nuestro marco de generación de corpus como un método novedoso para crear conjuntos de datos desafiantes a partir de los cuales se pueden aprender modelos de NLG que son capaces de manejar las complejas interacciones que se producen durante la microplanificación entre lexicalización, agregación, realización de superficie, expresión de referencia generación y segmentación de frases. Para animar a los investigadores a aceptar este desafío, pusimos a disposición un conjunto de datos de 21 855 pares de datos/texto creado con este marco en el contexto de la tarea compartida de WebNLG.", 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un nouveau cadre pour la création semi-automatique de corpus de données en texte de micro-planification complexes sur le plan linguistique à partir de bases de connaissances existantes. Parce que notre méthode associe des données de taille et de forme variables à des textes allant de simples clauses à des textes courts, un ensemble de données créé à l'aide de ce cadre constitue un point de référence difficile pour la microplanification. Une autre caractéristique de ce framework est qu'il peut être appliqué à n'importe quelle base de connaissances à grande échelle et peut donc être utilisé pour former et apprendre les verbaliseurs de la base de connaissances. Nous appliquons notre cadre aux données DBpedia et comparons l'ensemble de données résultant avec Wen et al. 2016. Le jeu de données est plus de deux fois plus grand que le nôtre, il est moins diversifié tant en termes d'entrée qu'en termes de texte. Nous proposons donc notre cadre de génération de corpus comme une nouvelle méthode pour créer des ensembles de données difficiles à partir desquels des modèles de GNL peuvent être appris, capables de gérer les interactions complexes survenant au cours d'une micro-planification entre lexicalisation, agrégation, réalisation de surface, expression de référence génération et segmentation de phrases. Pour encourager les chercheurs à relever ce défi, nous avons mis à disposition un ensemble de données de 21 855 paires données/texte créées à l'aide de ce framework dans le cadre de la tâche partagée WebNLG.", 'ja': "本稿では、既存のナレッジベースから言語的に困難なマイクロプランニングデータからテキストへのコーパスを半自動的に作成するための新規フレームワークを提示する。 当社のメソッドは、さまざまなサイズと形状のデータを単純な条項から短いテキストまでのテキストとペアリングするため、このフレームワークを使用して作成されたデータセットは、マイクロプランニングのための挑戦的なベンチマークを提供します。 このフレームワークのもう1つの特徴は、あらゆる大規模な知識ベースに適用できるため、KB言語化のトレーニングと学習に使用できます。 私たちは、フレームワークをDBpediaデータに適用し、結果のデータセットをWen et al. 2016 'sと比較します。 Wenらのデータセットは私たちのデータセットよりも2倍以上大きい一方で、入力とテキストの両方で多様性が低いことが示されています。 したがって、私たちは、辞書化、集約、表面実現、参照表現生成、文セグメンテーションの間のミクロプランニングで発生する複雑な相互作用を処理することができるNLGモデルを学ぶことができる挑戦的なデータセットを作成するための新しい方法として、コーパス生成フレームワークを提案します。 研究者がこの課題に取り組むことを奨励するために、WebNLG共有タスクのコンテキストで、このフレームワークを使用して作成された21,855のデータ/テキストペアのデータセットを利用可能にしました。", 'zh': '于本文中,发一新框架,用于见知识库中半自动创造语言挑战性微观规画数语料库。 吾法以大小形数与从简子句至短文本配对,故用此框架创数集为微观规为挑战性准。 其框架一也,可施于大知识库,故可施于培训学知识库。 宜用吾框架于DBpedia数,集与Wen等2016年之数校之。 臣等虽Wen等之数集比臣等两倍集大以上,其输文本多样性皆小。 故发吾语料库以成框架为创挑战性之数,可以学NLG,可以处词汇化,合而阳成,引表达式成句分之间微观规中杂用。 劝人受战,共WebNLG之背景,供一包21,855数/文本对之数集, 当数集是用此框架创。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम मौजूदा नॉलेज बेस से भाषाई रूप से चुनौतीपूर्ण माइक्रो-प्लानिंग डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट कॉर्पोरेट बनाने के लिए अर्ध-स्वचालित रूप से एक उपन्यास ढांचा प्रस्तुत करते हैं। क्योंकि हमारी विधि सरल खंडों से लेकर छोटे ग्रंथों तक के ग्रंथों के साथ अलग-अलग आकार और आकार के डेटा को जोड़ती है, इसलिए इस ढांचे का उपयोग करके बनाया गया डेटासेट माइक्रोप्लानिंग के लिए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण बेंचमार्क प्रदान करता है। इस ढांचे की एक और विशेषता यह है कि इसे किसी भी बड़े पैमाने पर ज्ञान आधार पर लागू किया जा सकता है और इसलिए इसका उपयोग KB verbalisers को प्रशिक्षित करने और सीखने के लिए किया जा सकता है। हम DBpedia डेटा के लिए हमारे ढांचे को लागू करते हैं और वेन एट अल के साथ परिणामी डेटासेट की तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि जबकि वेन एट अल का डेटासेट हमारी तुलना में दो बार से अधिक बड़ा है, यह इनपुट के मामले में और पाठ के मामले में कम विविध है। इस प्रकार हम चुनौतीपूर्ण डेटा सेट बनाने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि के रूप में अपने कॉर्पस जनरेशन फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें से एनएलजी मॉडल सीखा जा सकता है जो लेक्सिकलाइजेशन, एकत्रीकरण, सतह प्राप्ति, अभिव्यक्ति पीढ़ी और वाक्य विभाजन का उल्लेख करने के बीच माइक्रो-प्लानिंग के दौरान होने वाली जटिल इंटरैक्शन को संभालने में सक्षम हैं। शोधकर्ताओं को इस चुनौती को लेने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए, हमने WebNLG साझा कार्य के संदर्भ में इस ढांचे का उपयोग करके बनाए गए 21,855 डेटा / पाठ जोड़े का डेटासेट उपलब्ध कराया।', 'ru': "В этой статье мы представляем новую структуру для полуавтоматического создания лингвистически сложных корпусов микропланирования данных в текст из существующих баз знаний. Поскольку наш метод соединяет данные различного размера и формы с текстами, варьирующимися от простых пунктов до коротких текстов, набор данных, созданный с помощью этого фреймворка, обеспечивает сложный эталон для микропланирования. Другой особенностью этой структуры является то, что она может быть применена к любой крупномасштабной базе знаний и, следовательно, может быть использована для обучения и обучения вербализаторов КБ. Мы применяем нашу структуру к данным DBpedia и сравниваем полученный набор данных с Wen et al. 2016's. Мы показываем, что, хотя датасет Wen et al. более чем в два раза больше, чем наш, он менее разнообразен как с точки зрения ввода, так и с точки зрения текста. Таким образом, мы предлагаем нашу структуру генерации корпусов в качестве нового метода для создания сложных наборов данных, из которых могут быть извлечены модели NLG, способные обрабатывать сложные взаимодействия, происходящие во время микропланирования между лексикализацией, агрегацией, поверхностной реализацией, генерацией экспрессии и сегментацией предложений. Чтобы побудить исследователей принять этот вызов, мы предоставили набор данных из 21 855 пар данных/текста, созданных с использованием этого фреймворка в контексте совместной задачи WebNLG.", 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair creat nua chun corpora sonraí go téacs a chruthú go leath-uathoibríoch atá dúshlánach ó thaobh teanga de ó Bhunáit Eolais atá ann cheana féin. Toisc go ndéanann ár modhanna sonraí de mhéideanna agus de chruthanna éagsúla a chomhcheangal le téacsanna ó chlásail shimplí go téacsanna gearra, soláthraíonn tacar sonraí a cruthaíodh ag baint úsáide as an gcreat seo tagarmharc dúshlánach don mhicriphleanáil. Gné eile den chreat seo is ea gur féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm ar aon bhunachar eolais ar scála mór agus mar sin gur féidir é a úsáid chun briathraoirí KB a oiliúint agus a fhoghlaim. Cuirimid ár gcreat i bhfeidhm ar shonraí DBpedia agus cuirimid i gcomparáid leis an tacar sonraí dá bharr le Wen et al. 2016. Léirímid cé go bhfuil tacar sonraí Wen et al. breis agus dhá uair níos mó ná mar atá againne, nach bhfuil sé chomh héagsúil ó thaobh ionchuir agus ó thaobh téacs de. Molaimid mar sin ár gcreat giniúna corpais mar mhodh nua chun tacair shonraí dhúshlánacha a chruthú ónar féidir samhlacha NLG a fhoghlaim a bheidh in ann déileáil leis na hidirghníomhaíochtaí casta a tharlaíonn le linn na micriphleanála idir foclóireacht, comhiomlánú, réadú dromchla, giniúint na habairte agus tagairtí. deighilt. Chun taighdeoirí a spreagadh chun tabhairt faoin dúshlán seo, chuireamar ar fáil tacar sonraí de 21,855 péire sonraí/téacs a cruthaíodh ag baint úsáide as an gcreat seo i gcomhthéacs an taisc chomhroinnte WebNLG.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új keretrendszert mutatunk be a már meglévő Tudásbázisokból származó, nyelvi szempontból kihívást jelentő mikrotervezési korpuszok félautomatikus létrehozására. Mivel módszerünk különböző méretű és alakú adatokat párosít az egyszerű záradéktól a rövid szövegekig terjedő szövegekkel, az e keretrendszer használatával létrehozott adatkészlet kihívást jelent a mikrotervezés szempontjából. A keretrendszer másik jellemzője, hogy bármilyen nagyszabású tudásbázisra alkalmazható, ezért felhasználható KB verbalizálók képzésére és tanulására. Keretrendszerünket DBpedia adatokra alkalmazzuk és összehasonlítjuk a kapott adatkészletet Wen és mások 2016 adataival. Megmutatjuk, hogy bár Wen és mások adatkészlete több mint kétszer nagyobb, mint a miénk, de kevésbé változatos mind a bevitel, mind a szöveg tekintetében. Ezért új módszerként javasoljuk korpusz generálási keretrendszerünket olyan kihívást jelentő adathalmazok létrehozására, amelyekből olyan NLG modellek tanulhatók, amelyek képesek kezelni a lexikalizáció, aggregáció, felületi megvalósítás, hivatkozó kifejezések generálása és mondatszegmentáció közötti mikrotervezés során bekövetkező komplex interakciókat. Annak érdekében, hogy a kutatókat arra ösztönözzük, hogy vállalják ezt a kihívást, a WebNLG megosztott feladatának keretében 21 855 adat/szövegpárból álló adatkészletet bocsátottunk rendelkezésre.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο για την ημιαυτόματη δημιουργία γλωσσικά προκλητικών σωμάτων μικροσχεδιασμού δεδομένων-κειμένου από υπάρχουσες βάσεις γνώσης. Επειδή η μέθοδος μας συνδυάζει δεδομένα διαφορετικού μεγέθους και σχήματος με κείμενα που κυμαίνονται από απλές ρήτρες έως σύντομα κείμενα, ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που δημιουργήθηκε χρησιμοποιώντας αυτό το πλαίσιο παρέχει ένα απαιτητικό σημείο αναφοράς για τον μικροσχεδιασμό. Ένα άλλο χαρακτηριστικό αυτού του πλαισίου είναι ότι μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε οποιαδήποτε βάση γνώσεων μεγάλης κλίμακας και ως εκ τούτου μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την εκπαίδευση και την εκμάθηση των σχολιαστών ΚΒ. Εφαρμόζουμε το πλαίσιο μας στα δεδομένα και συγκρίνουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων που προκύπτει με το Δείχνουμε ότι ενώ το σύνολο δεδομένων είναι περισσότερο από δύο φορές μεγαλύτερο από το δικό μας, είναι λιγότερο διαφορετικό τόσο από την άποψη εισαγωγής όσο και από την άποψη κειμένου. Έτσι προτείνουμε το πλαίσιο δημιουργίας σωμάτων μας ως μια νέα μέθοδο για τη δημιουργία προκλητικών συνόλων δεδομένων από τα οποία μπορούν να διδαχθούν μοντέλα που είναι ικανά να χειριστούν τις πολύπλοκες αλληλεπιδράσεις που συμβαίνουν κατά τη διάρκεια του μικροσχεδιασμού μεταξύ λεξικισμού, συγκέντρωσης, επιφανειακής υλοποίησης, δημιουργίας αναφορών και κατακερματισμού προτάσεων. Για να ενθαρρύνουμε τους ερευνητές να αναλάβουν αυτή την πρόκληση, διαθέσαμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων από ζεύγη δεδομένων/κειμένου 21.855 που δημιουργήθηκαν χρησιμοποιώντας αυτό το πλαίσιο στο πλαίσιο της κοινής εργασίας του WebNLG.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრომენტიკური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც პრომენტიკურად ახალგაზრდებით ენგურისტიკურად გამოსახულებელია, რომელიც მიკროპლანეციის მონაცემების იმიტომ, რომ ჩვენი მეტი განსხვავებული ზომის და ფორმის მონაცემები განსხვავებული ტექსტის განსხვავებული ზომის და ფორმის განსხვავებული ტექსტის განსხვავებული კლასებიდან კი ტექსტის განსხვავებული მონაც ამ ფრამეტრის სხვა ფუნქცია არის, რომ ის შეიძლება აყენება ყველა დიდი მეცნიერების ბაზაზე და შეიძლება გამოყენება KB გერბალიზერების გასწავლად და გასწავლად. ჩვენ DBpedia მონაცემებისთვის გამოყენებთ და შემდეგ მონაცემების შესახებ Wen et al. 2016-ის. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ Wen et al. მონაცემების შესახებ უფრო მეტია ორჯერ მეტია ვიდრე ჩვენი მონაცემებისთვის, ეს უფრო მე ამიტომ ჩვენ ჩვენი კორპოსური წარმოდგენის ფრამეტრი როგორც ნომალური მეტი, რომელიც NLG მოდელების შესაძლებელია გავისწავლა, რომელიც შეუძლებელია კომპლექციური ინტერექციას, რომელიც წარმოდგენა ლექქსიკალიზაციის, ადგრე რომ მსწავლობელი ამ გამოცდილებას გავაკეთოთ, ჩვენ 21 855 მონაცემები/ტექსტის კონტექსტის მონაცემების კონტექსტი, რომელიც გამოყენებული ამ ფრამეტრის გამოყენება WebNLG დაყოფილი', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo framework per la creazione semi-automatica di corpora di micro-pianificazione data-to-text da basi di conoscenza esistenti. Poiché il nostro metodo associa dati di dimensioni e forma variabili a testi che vanno da semplici clausole a brevi testi, un set di dati creato utilizzando questo framework fornisce un punto di riferimento impegnativo per la micropianificazione. Un'altra caratteristica di questo framework è che può essere applicato a qualsiasi base di conoscenze su larga scala e può quindi essere utilizzato per formare e imparare i verbalizzatori KB. Applichiamo il nostro framework ai dati DBpedia e confrontiamo il set di dati risultante con quello di Wen et al. 2016. Mostriamo che mentre il set di dati di Wen et al. è più del doppio più grande del nostro, è meno diversificato sia in termini di input che in termini di testo. Proponiamo quindi il nostro framework di generazione di corpus come nuovo metodo per creare set di dati impegnativi da cui è possibile apprendere modelli NLG in grado di gestire le complesse interazioni che si verificano durante la micro-pianificazione tra lessicalizzazione, aggregazione, realizzazione superficiale, generazione di espressioni di riferimento e segmentazione di frasi. Per incoraggiare i ricercatori ad affrontare questa sfida, abbiamo messo a disposizione un set di dati di 21.855 coppie dati/testo creati utilizzando questo framework nel contesto dell'attività condivisa WebNLG.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naują pusiau automatiškai lingvistiškai sunkių mikroplanavimo duomenų ir tekstų korporacijų kūrimo sistemą iš esamų žinių bazių. Kadangi mūsų metodas sutampa skirtingo dydžio ir formos duomenis su tekstais, kurie svyruoja nuo paprastų nuostatų iki trumpų tekstų, duomenų rinkinys, sukurtas naudojant šią sistemą, yra sunkus mikroplanavimo lyginamasis rodiklis. Kita šios sistemos ypatybė yra ta, kad ji gali būti taikoma bet kuriai didelės apimties žinių bazei ir todėl gali būti naudojama mokymui ir mokymui KB verbalizatoriams. Mes taikome savo sistemą DBpedia duomenims ir palyginame gautą duomenų rinkinį su 2016 m. Wen et al. duomenimis. Mes rodome, kad nors Wen et al. duomenų rinkinys yra daugiau kaip du kartus didesnis nei mūs ų, jis yra mažiau įvairus tiek įvedimo, tiek teksto požiūriu. Taigi siūlome savo korpuso generacijos sistemą kaip naują metodą kurti sudėtingus duomenų rinkinius, iš kurių galima išmokti NLG modelius, galinčius valdyti sudėtingą sąveiką mikroplanuojant lexikalizaciją, agregaciją, paviršiaus realizaciją, nuorodą į išraiškos generaciją ir sakinių segmentaciją. Siekdami paskatinti mokslo darbuotojus prisiimti šį uždavinį, pateikėme 21 855 duomenų ir (arba) teksto poros duomenų rinkinį, sukurtą naudojant šią sistemą vykdant bendrą WebNLG užduotį.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник претставуваме нова рамка за полуавтоматско создавање јазички предизвикувачки микропланирање на податоци кон текст од постојните бази на знаење. Бидејќи нашиот метод ги спојува податоците од различна големина и форма со текстите кои се движат од едноставни клаузули до кратки тексти, компјутерот на податоци создаден со користење на оваа рамка обезбедува предизвикувачка референца за микропланирање. Друга карактеристика на оваа рамка е дека може да се примени на било која голема база на знаење и затоа може да се користи за обука и наука на вербалисерите на КБ. Ние ја применуваме нашата рамка на податоците на DBpedia и го споредуваме резултатот на податоците со Wen et al. 2016-тите. Ние покажуваме дека додека податоците на Wen et al. се повеќе од двапати поголеми од нашите, тие се помалку различни во однос на влог и текст. Така ја предложуваме нашата рамка за генерација на корпус како нов метод за создавање предизвикувачки податоци од кои може да се научи НЛГ модели кои се способни да се справат со комплексните интеракции кои се случуваат за време на микропланирањето помеѓу лексикализацијата, агрегацијата, површината реализација, референцијата на гене За да ги охрабриме истражувачите да го преземат овој предизвик, дадовме достапни податоци од 21.855 податоци/текст парови создадени користејќи ја оваа рамка во контекст на заедничката задача на WebNLG.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз білім негізінен микро жоспарлау деректер мен мәтін корпорасын жарты автоматты түрде құру үшін жалпы-автоматты түрде жасайтын жалпы қоршауын таңдаймыз. Өйткені біздің әдіміміз кәдімгінен қысқа мәтінде мәтінді түрлі өлшемі мен пішімінің деректерін біріктіреді. Бұл фреймді қолдану арқылы құрылған деректер жиыны микропландау үшін кө Бұл фреймінің басқа мүмкіндігі - ол кез келген үлкен мәлімет негізіне қолдануға болады, сондықтан KB вербализаторын оқып үйренуге болады. Біз қоршауымызды DBpedia деректеріне қолданып, нәтижесі деректерді Wen et al. 2016 жылдарымызмен салыстырып, келтіріп, Wen et al. деректер жиыны біздің деректер жиынымызға екіншіден артық болғанда, ол келтірілген және мәтін жазуына қара Біз корпус құрылымызды жасау бағдарламасын жаңа әдіс ретінде NLG үлгілерін үйрене алатын, олар лексикализациялау, агрегация, поверхностық реализациясы, өрнектерді жасау және сөз сегментациясы арасындағы комплекс интерфейстерді қамтамасыз ету мүмкінд Сынақтаушыларды бұл шақырымды алу үшін, біз WebNLG ортақ тапсырманың контексті қолданылатын 21 855 деректер/мәтін жиілігін жасадық.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kerangka baru untuk mencipta secara semi-automatik secara bahasa menantang mikro-merancang data-ke-teks korpra dari Pangkalan Pengetahuan yang ada. Kerana kaedah kita pasang data saiz dan bentuk yang berbeza dengan teks yang berlainan dari klawsul sederhana hingga teks pendek, set data yang dicipta menggunakan kerangka ini menyediakan tanda referensi yang mencabar untuk penjanaan mikro. Ciri-ciri lain kerangka ini ialah ia boleh dilaksanakan pada mana-mana pangkalan pengetahuan skala besar dan boleh digunakan untuk melatih dan belajar pembicara KB. Kami melaksanakan kerangka kami kepada data DBpedia dan membandingkan s et data yang berkaitan dengan Wen et al. 2016. Kami menunjukkan bahawa walaupun set data Wen et al. lebih daripada dua kali lebih besar daripada kita, ia kurang berbeza dalam terma input dan dalam terma teks. Oleh itu, kami melamar kerangka generasi corpus kami sebagai kaedah baru untuk mencipta set data yang menantang dari mana model NLG boleh belajar yang mampu mengendalikan interaksi kompleks yang berlaku semasa dalam perencanaan-mikro antara leksikalisasi, agregasi, realisasi permukaan, merujuk generasi ungkapan dan segmentasi kalimat. Untuk mendorong penyelidik untuk menerima cabaran ini, kami membuatkan set data 21,855 pasangan data/teks yang dicipta menggunakan kerangka ini dalam konteks tugas berkongsi WebNLG.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw qafas ġdid għall-ħolqien semiawtomatiku ta’ mikroppjanar ta’ sfida lingwistika korpora minn dejta għal test minn Bażijiet ta’ Għarfien eżistenti. Minħabba li l-metodu tagħna jqabbel id-dejta ta’ daqs u forma differenti ma’ testi li jvarjaw minn klawżoli sempliċi għal testi qosra, sett ta’ dejta maħluq bl-użu ta’ dan il-qafas jipprovdi punt ta’ riferiment ta’ sfida għall-mikroppjanar. Karatteristika oħra ta’ dan il-qafas hija li tista’ tiġi applikata għal kwalunkwe bażi ta’ għarfien fuq skala kbira u għalhekk tista’ tintuża għat-taħriġ u t-tagħlim tal-verbalizzaturi KB. Aħna napplikaw il-qafas tagħna għad-dejta tad-DBpedia u nqabblu s-sett tad-dejta li jirriżulta ma’ Wen et al. tal-2016. Aħna nuru li filwaqt li s-sett tad-dejta ta’ Wen et al. huwa aktar mid-doppju akbar minn tagħna, huwa inqas diversifikat kemm f’termini ta’ input kif ukoll f’termini ta’ test. Għalhekk qed nipproponu l-qafas tal-ġenerazzjoni korpus tagħna bħala metodu ġdid għall-ħolqien ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta li jisfidaw li minnhom jistgħu jitgħallmu mudelli NLG li huma kapaċi jimmaniġġjaw l-interazzjonijiet kumplessi li jseħħu matul il-mikroppjanar bejn il-lexikalizzazzjoni, l-aggregazzjoni, ir-realizzazzjoni tal-wiċċ, ir-referenza għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-espressjoni u s-segmentazzjoni Biex in ħeġġu lir-riċerkaturi biex ilaħħqu ma’ din l-isfida, għamilna disponibbli sett ta’ dejta ta’ 21 855 par ta’ dejta/test maħluqa bl-użu ta’ dan il-qafas fil-kuntest tal-kompitu kondiviż tal-WebNLG.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മൈക്രോ പ്ലാന്\u200dഗ്ലാനിങ്ങളുടെ ഡേറ്റ-ലേക്സ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d നിന്നും  കാരണം നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ രണ്ടു ജോട്ടി വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വലിപ്പമും രൂപത്തിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പദാവലികളുമായി മാറുന്ന പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d ചെറുതായി മാറുന് ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ മറ്റൊരു ഗുണവിശേഷത്തിന്റെയെങ്കിലും വലിയ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ബേസില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡിബിപിഡിയ വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ വെന്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d 2016-ലേക്ക് അനുഭവിച്ച ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ താരതമ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു.  അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് തലമുറന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നോവല്\u200d രീതിയായിരിക്കുന്നു. അത വെബ്നെന്\u200dഎല്\u200dജി പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് 21,85', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний төлөвлөгөөс бичил төлөвлөгөө болон текст корпоратаас хагас автоматжуулан бүтээх шинэ хэлбэрийг тайлбарлаж байна. Учир нь бидний арга нь олон хэмжээний, хэлбэрийн мэдээллийг жижиг хэлбэрээс хойш богино текст хүртэл бичиг хэлбэрээс холбогдож байна. Энэ хэлбэрээр үүсгэсэн өгөгдлийн сангууд бичил төлөвлөгөөний тулд хэ Энэ хэлбэрийн өөр нэг чадвар нь энэ нь ямар ч том хэмжээний мэдлэг суурь дээр хэрэглэгдэж болох бөгөөд үүнийг КБ-ын хэлбэрүүдийг сурахад хэрэглэгдэж болох юм. Бид DBpedia өгөгдлийн системийг ашиглаж, үр дүнтэй өгөгдлийн санг 2016 оны Wen et al-тай харьцуулж байна. Иймээс бид корпус үеийн бүтээлтийн системийг шинэ арга зам болгож, NLG загваруудын загваруудыг суралцах боломжтой. Энэ нь лексикализацийн, нийлүүлэлт, гадаргуу бодит байдал, илэрхийллийн бүтээл болон өгүүлбэрийн загваруудын хоорондын микрос төлөвлөлтийн хоорондын комп Судлаачид энэ сорилтыг хүлээж авахын тулд бид 21.855 өгөгдлийн/текст холбоотой өгөгдлийн санг ашиглан WebNLG хуваалцсан ажлын тулд үүнийг ашиглан бүтээсэн.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowe ramy do półautomatycznego tworzenia wymagających językowo mikroplanowania korpusów danych-tekstowych z istniejących baz wiedzy. Ponieważ nasza metoda łączy dane o różnej wielkości i kształcie z tekstami, od prostych klauzul po krótkie teksty, zbiór danych stworzony za pomocą tego frameworku stanowi wymagający punkt odniesienia dla mikroplanowania. Kolejną cechą tego frameworku jest to, że można go zastosować do każdej dużej skali bazy wiedzy i dlatego może być wykorzystywany do szkolenia i nauki verbalizatorów KB. Stosujemy nasze ramy do danych DBpedii i porównujemy wynikający zbiór danych z Wen et al. 2016. Pokazujemy, że chociaż zbiór danych Wen et al. jest ponad dwa razy większy od naszego, jest mniej zróżnicowany zarówno pod względem wejścia, jak i tekstu. Proponujemy zatem nasz framework generowania korpusów jako nową metodę tworzenia trudnych zbiorów danych, z których można nauczyć się modeli NLG, które są w stanie poradzić sobie ze złożonymi interakcjami występującymi w mikroplanowaniu między leksykalizacją, agregacją, realizacją powierzchni, generowaniem wyrażeń odsyłających i segmentacją zdań. Aby zachęcić naukowców do podjęcia tego wyzwania, udostępniliśmy zbiór danych 21,855 par danych/tekstowych stworzonych przy użyciu tego frameworku w kontekście wspólnego zadania WebNLG.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit nytt rammeverk for halvautomatisk oppretting av språkbaser som utfordrer data-til-tekstkorpora frå eksisterande kjennebaser. Fordi metoden vårt parer data av ulike storleik og forma med tekstar frå enkle klausar til korte tekstar, vil eit datasett laga med dette rammeverket gje eit vanskeleg benchmark for mikropplanlegging. Eit anna funksjon av dette rammeverket er at det kan brukast på alle stor skala kunnskapsbasen og derfor kan brukast til å trenja og læra KB-verbaliserande. Vi bruker rammeverket vårt til DBpedia-data og sammenlignar resultatet av datasettet med Wen et al. 2016. Vi viser at mens datasettet Wen et al er meir enn to ganger større enn våre, er det mindre forskjellig både med inndata og tekst. Vi foreslår derfor rammeverket vårt for å generera korpus som eit nytt metode for å laga vanskeleg datasett frå kva NLG-modeller kan lærast som kan handtera komplekse samarbeid som skjer under mikropplanlegging mellom leksikalisering, aggregasjon, overflate, referanse til uttrykk og setningsssegmentasjon. For å oppfordre forskere å ta opp denne utfordringen, gjorde vi tilgjengeleg ein dataset med 21.855 data/tekstpar som er laga med dette rammeverket i konteksten av delt oppgåva i WebNLG.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un nou cadru pentru crearea semi-automată de corpore de micro-planificare date-text provocatoare lingvistic din bazele de cunoștințe existente. Deoarece metoda noastră asociază date de dimensiuni și forme diferite cu texte variind de la clauze simple la texte scurte, un set de date creat folosind acest cadru oferă un punct de referință provocator pentru microplanare. O altă caracteristică a acestui cadru este că poate fi aplicat la orice bază de cunoștințe la scară largă și, prin urmare, poate fi folosit pentru a instrui și a învăța verbalizatori KB. Aplicăm cadrul nostru la datele DBpedia și comparăm setul de date rezultat cu cel al lui Wen et al. 2016. Aratăm că, în timp ce setul de date Wen et al. este mai puțin divers atât în ceea ce privește introducerea, cât și textul. Astfel, propunem cadrul nostru de generare a corpurilor ca o metodă nouă pentru crearea seturilor de date provocatoare din care pot fi învățate modele NLG capabile să gestioneze interacțiunile complexe care apar în timpul micro-planificării între lexicalizare, agregare, realizarea suprafeței, generarea expresiei referitoare și segmentarea frazelor. Pentru a încuraja cercetătorii să accepte această provocare, am pus la dispoziție un set de date format din 21.855 de perechi de date/text create folosind acest cadru în contextul sarcinii partajate WebNLG.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi okvir za polu-automatski stvorenje jezičkog izazovnog mikroplaniranja podataka na tekst korpore iz postojeće baze znanja. Jer naša metoda pare podatke o različitim veličinama i obliku sa tekstima od jednostavnih klauzula do kratkih tekstova, kompleta podataka stvorena koristeći ovaj okvir pruža izazovnu kritiku za mikroplaniranje. Još jedna karakteristika ovog okvira je da se može primjenjivati na bilo koju veliku znanstvenu bazu i stoga se može koristiti za obuku i nauku verbalisere KB-a. Mi primjenjujemo naš okvir na podatke DBpedia i uspoređujemo rezultatnu setu podataka sa Wen et al. 2016. pokazujemo da dok je seta podataka Wen et al. više od dvaput veća od naših, to je manje različita i u vezi ulaska i teksta. Stoga predlažemo naš okvir generacije korpusa kao nov metod za stvaranje izazovnih kompleta podataka iz kojih se mogu naučiti modeli NLG-a koji su sposobni da se rješavaju kompleksnim interakcijama koji se dešavaju tokom mikroplaniranja između leksikalizacije, aggregacije, realizacije površine, odnose na generaciju izraza i segmentaciju rečenica. Da bismo potaknuli istraživače da podnese ovaj izazov, dostavili smo skup podataka od 21.855 parova podataka/teksta koji su stvorili koristeći ovaj okvir u kontekstu zajedničkog zadatka WebNLG-a.', 'so': 'In this paper, we present a novel framework for semi-automatically creating linguistically challenging micro-planning data-to-text corpora from existing Knowledge Bases.  Maxaa yeelay qaabkayaga labada noocyo oo ku saabsan tirada iyo qaabka kala duduwan iyo qoraalka ay ka soo duwan yihiin qoraal fudud ilaa qoraal gaaban, sawirada lagu sameeyo isticmaalka framelkan waxay ka heleysaa bangiga qiimo adag. Shaqooyinkan kale waxaa lagu codsan karaa aasaaska aqoonta oo waaweyn, sababtaas darteed waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa waxbarashada iyo barashada warbaariyayaasha KB. Shaqooyiga DBpedia ayaannu u isticmaalaynaa, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa macluumaadka resultinta ee Wen et al. 2016. Waxaynu tusaynaa in marka wargelinta Wen et al ay ka weyn tahay laba jeer, waa wax kala duduwan marka laga eego qoraalka. Sidaa darteed waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qalabka qofkeena oo ah qaab warqad ah oo ah abuuridda danbiyada dhibaataysan, taas oo laga barto modellada NLG oo awoodda in la qabsado qalabka adag oo ka dhexeeya qorshaha qorshaha qalloocan oo ka dhexeeya leksikaliska, goglaanshaha, xaqiiqshada surfa, in lagu soo jeedo qarniga expression iyo qeybinta ciqaabka. Si aan u dhiirrigelino cilmi-baaritaanka si ay u qaadaan dhibaatadan, waxaynu u sameynnay macluumaad oo ah 21,855 data/text noocyo ah oo lagu sameeyay noocyadan sameynta shuqulka loo qaybsaday WebNLG.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt ramverk för att semiautomatiskt skapa språkligt utmanande mikroplaneringskorpor från befintliga kunskapsbaser. Eftersom vår metod kombinerar data av varierande storlek och form med texter som sträcker sig från enkla satser till korta texter, utgör en datauppsättning som skapats med hjälp av detta ramverk ett utmanande riktmärke för mikroplanering. Ett annat inslag i detta ramverk är att det kan tillämpas på vilken storskalig kunskapsbas som helst och därför kan användas för att träna och lära sig KB verbalisers. Vi tillämpar vårt ramverk på DBpedia data och jämför den resulterande datauppsättningen med Wen et al. 2016. Vi visar att även om Wen et al. datauppsättningen är mer än dubbelt större än vår, är den mindre varierande både när det gäller indata och text. Vi föreslår därför vårt ramverk för korpusgenerering som en ny metod för att skapa utmanande datauppsättningar från vilka NLG-modeller kan läras sig som klarar av att hantera de komplexa interaktioner som uppstår under mikroplanering mellan lexikalisering, aggregering, ytrealisering, refererande uttrycksgenerering och meningssegmentering. För att uppmuntra forskare att ta sig an denna utmaning har vi gjort en datauppsättning med 21 855 data/textpar tillgängliga med hjälp av detta ramverk inom ramen för WebNLG delade uppgift.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ බාධාර්ථික විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදියට ප මොකද අපේ විධානය වෙනස් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සූර්ණයෙන් පරික්ෂණයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පරික්ෂණයෙන් පරික්ෂණයෙන් පරික්ෂණයෙන් ප මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ වෙන විශේෂතාවක් තමයි ඒක හැම ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ම දැනගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒ නිසා කිබී වර්බල අපි DBpedia දත්තට අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා භාවිත කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සඳහා වෙන් එට් අල්. 2016 වල. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ Wen et al' ගේ දත්ත සඳහා අපිට වඩා දෙකක් වඩා වැඩි වෙනස් ව අපි ඉතින් අපේ කොර්පස් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් NLG මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා  පරීක්ෂකයන්ට මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, අපි දත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් 21,855 දත්ත/පාළුවක් සම්බන්ධයක් ලැබුණා මේ පරීක්ෂ", 'ur': "ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک نوی فرمود پیش کرتے ہیں جو نصف-اتحادیہ زبان کی پیدائش سے مائیکروپ لینٹ ڈیٹ-سے-ٹیکسٹ-ٹیکسٹ کورپور سے ہے۔ کیونکہ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف اندازے اور شکل کے ڈاٹ کو ایک جوڑا کرتا ہے جو ساده کلاس سے چھٹے ٹیکسٹ تک پہنچ رہا ہے، ایک ڈاٹ سٹ اس فرم کے مطابق پیدا کیا گیا ہے جو میکروپ پلانٹ کے لئے مشکل بانچم مارک ہے۔ اس فرم کے ایک دوسرے فرصت یہ ہے کہ اسے ہر بڑے مقدار علم بنسٹ پر لازم کر سکتا ہے اور اس لئے KB وربلیزر کی تعلیم اور سیکھنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے فرمیٹ ڈی بپیڈیا ڈاٹ پر لازم کیا ہے اور نتیجۂ ڈاٹ سٹ کو Wen et al کے ساتھ مقایسہ کر دیا ہے. ہم نے دکھایا ہے کہ جب وین et al's ڈاٹ سٹ ہمارے سے دو بار زیادہ بڑی ہے، یہ دونوں اندازے کے اندر اور متن کے اندر کم مختلف ہے. ہم اسی طرح اپنے کورپوس کی نسل فرمود کو ایک نو طریقہ بناتے ہیں کہ ان سے NLG موڈلوں کو سیکھ سکتے ہیں جو لکس کالیزی، جمع کرنا، سطح واقع کرنا، expression generation اور sentence segmentation کے درمیان موجود پیچیدہ تعاملات کی حفاظت کرنے کے قابل ہیں. اس چالوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو رغبت دینے کے لئے ہم نے 21.855 ڈیٹ/ٹیکسٹ جوڑوں کا ایک ڈیٹ سٹ موجود کر دیا ہے جو WebNLG مشترک کام کے بارے میں پیدا کیا گیا ہے.", 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை தற்போதைய அறிவு அடிப்படைகளில் இருந்து மைக்ரோ திட்டமிட்ட தகவல் முதல் உரை நிறுவனத்திற்கு தானா ஏனென்றால், எங்கள் முறைமையில் பல்வேறு அளவு மற்றும் வடிவத்தில் இருந்து சிறிய உரைகள் வரையில் இருந்து வரையும் உரைகளின் ஜோடி தகவல்கள், இந்த சட்டத்த இந்த சட்டத்தின் மற்றொரு குணங்கள் என்னவென்றால் அது எந்த பெரிய அளவு அறிவு தளத்திற்கும் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் மற்றும் அதனால் KB வார்ப நாம் DBpedia தரவுக்கு எங்கள் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி வென் மற்றும் அல் 2016 விளைவு தகவல் அமைப்பை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். வென் மற்றும் அல் தகவல் அமைப்பு எங்களை விட இருமுறை பெரியதாக இருக்க அதனால் நாம் எங்கள் கோர்பாஸ் உருவாக்கும் புதிய முறைமையாக பரிந்துரைக்கும் சவாலிக்க தகவல் அமைப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களை இந்த சவால் எடுத்துக் கொள்வதற்கு, நாங்கள் 21,855 தரவு/உரை ஜோடிகளை உருவாக்கிய இந்த சட்டத்தின் பகிர்ந்த பணியின் மூலம்', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz juda mavjud ilmiy asosidagi micro-planlangan maʼlumot xabarlardan matn kompaniyasini avtomatik rivojlanish uchun novel freymini yaratdik. Chunki bizning usuli oʻlchami va shakllar bilan bir xil maʼlumot yordamida oddiy klangan matnlarning qisqa matnlarda yaratilgan matnlar bilan o'zgartirish mumkin. Ushbu freymdan foydalanadigan maʼlumotlar satri microplanish uchun qisqarli benchmark yaratadi. Ushbu freymning boshqa imkoniyatlarini bu juda katta maʼlumot bazasini qoʻllash mumkin va shunday qilib KB verbaliserlarini o'rganish uchun foydalanish mumkin. Biz freymizni DBpedia maʼlumotga qoʻllamiz va natijalarimizni Wen et al. 2016 yilda kamaytamiz. Biz Wen et al'ning maʼlumotlar sohasini bizdan ikki marta katta ko'proq ko'proq, bu yozuvchi va matn sohasida ikki xil turli. Шундай қилиб, biz corpus таркибида таркиб қилиш таркибидаги маълумотларни яратиш усули деб тақдим этамиз, унда NLG modellarini o'rganish mumkin, leksikikalikliklik, guruhlashtirish, surface haqiqiqatga ega, ifodalarning yaratish va gaplarning bir qismlarini boshqarish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': "Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở mới để tạo ra một hệ thống thiết lập ngôn ngữ đầy thử thách, từ cơ sở tri thức tồn tại. Bởi vì phương pháp của chúng tôi ghép các dữ liệu có kích thước và hình dạng khác nhau với các văn bản, từ các đơn giản đến các văn bản ngắn, một bộ dữ liệu được tạo ra nhờ bộ khung này là một tiêu chuẩn thử thách cho việc cấy ghép. Một yếu tố khác của bộ khung này là nó có thể được áp dụng cho bất kỳ căn cứ kiến thức lớn nào và có thể được sử dụng để huấn luyện và học các kết văn học của KB. Chúng tôi áp dụng hệ thống của chúng tôi cho dữ liệu của BND và so s ánh với bộ dữ liệu kết quả với bộ dữ liệu của Wen et al's. Chúng tôi cho thấy bộ dữ liệu của Văn phòng còn lớn gấp đôi so với chúng tôi, nhưng nó ít khác nhau về nội dung và về văn bản. Chúng tôi đề xuất hệ thống sản xuất tập thể như một phương pháp mới để tạo ra các bộ dữ liệu đầy thử thách, từ đó có thể học được các mô hình về LG, có khả năng xử lý các tương tác phức tạp xảy ra trong quy trình vi tính từ, tập hợp, quy trình lên bề mặt, phân loại các biểu tượng. Để khuyến khích các nhà nghiên cứu chấp nhận thử thách này, chúng tôi đã cung cấp một tập tin đầy đủ của 21,85, các dữ liệu/các cặp văn bản được tạo ra sử dụng trong ngữ cảnh này", 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny ramme for semi-automatisk oprettelse af sprogligt udfordrende mikroplanlægning data-to-tekst korpora fra eksisterende vidensbaser. Fordi vores metode kombinerer data af varierende størrelse og form med tekster, der spænder fra enkle sætninger til korte tekster, er et datasæt skabt ved hjælp af denne ramme et udfordrende benchmark for mikroplanning. Et andet træk ved denne ramme er, at den kan anvendes til enhver stor videnbase og derfor kan bruges til at træne og lære KB verbalisere. Vi anvender vores ramme på DBpedia data og sammenligner det resulterende datasæt med Wen et al. 2016'erne. Vi viser, at mens Wen et al. datasæt er mere end dobbelt større end vores, er det mindre forskelligartet både med hensyn til input og tekst. Vi foreslår derfor vores korpusgenereringsramme som en ny metode til at skabe udfordrende datasæt, hvorfra NLG-modeller kan læres, som er i stand til at håndtere de komplekse interaktioner, der opstår under mikroplanlægning mellem leksikalisering, aggregering, overfladebehandling, referenceudtryksgenerering og sætningssegmentering. For at opfordre forskerne til at tage denne udfordring op, stillede vi et datasæt på 21.855 data/tekst par til rådighed, der blev skabt ved hjælp af denne ramme i forbindelse med WebNLG delte opgave.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuw raamwerk voor het semi-automatisch creëren van taalkundig uitdagende micro-planning data-to-text corpora's uit bestaande Knowledge Bases. Omdat onze methode gegevens van verschillende grootte en vorm koppelt met teksten variërend van eenvoudige clausules tot korte teksten, biedt een dataset gemaakt met behulp van dit framework een uitdagende benchmark voor microplanning. Een ander kenmerk van dit framework is dat het kan worden toegepast op elke grootschalige kennisbank en dus kan worden gebruikt om KB verbalisers te trainen en te leren. We passen ons framework toe op DBpedia data en vergelijken de resulterende dataset met Wen et al. 2016's. We laten zien dat Wen et al. de dataset meer dan twee keer groter is dan die van ons, maar minder divers is zowel qua input als qua tekst. Daarom stellen we ons corpus generation framework voor als een nieuwe methode voor het creëren van uitdagende datasets waaruit NLG modellen kunnen worden geleerd die in staat zijn om de complexe interacties te verwerken die optreden tijdens microplanning tussen lexicalisatie, aggregatie, oppervlakterealisatie, refererende expressie generatie en zinssegmentatie. Om onderzoekers aan te moedigen om deze uitdaging aan te gaan, hebben we een dataset beschikbaar gesteld van 21.855 data/text paren gemaakt met behulp van dit framework in het kader van de gedeelde WebNLG taak.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi okvir za polu-automatski stvorenje jezičkog izazovnog mikroplaniranja podataka na tekst tijela iz postojeće znanstvene baze. Jer naša metoda pare podatke o različitim veličinama i obliku s tekstima iz jednostavnih klauzula do kratkih tekstova, kompleta podataka stvorena koristeći ovaj okvir pruža izazovnu kritiku za mikroplaniranje. Još jedna karakteristika ovog okvira je da se može primjenjivati na bilo koju veliku znanstvenu bazu i stoga se može koristiti za obuku i učiti verbalisere KB-a. Primjenjujemo naš okvir na podatke DBpedia i uspoređujemo rezultatnu setu podataka s Wen et al. 2016. godinama. Pokazujemo da dok je seta podataka Wen et al. više od dvaput veća od naših, manje je različita kako u smislu ulaska, tako i u smislu teksta. Stoga predlažemo naš okvir generacije korpusa kao nov metod za stvaranje izazovnih kompleksa podataka iz kojih se mogu naučiti modeli NLG-a koji su sposobni za rješavanje kompleksnih interakcija koji se događa tijekom mikroplaniranja između leksikalizacije, aggregacije, realizacije površine, odnošenje na generaciju izraza i segmentaciju rečenica. Da bismo potaknuli istraživače da podnese ovaj izazov, učinili smo dostupnu skupu podataka od 21.855 podataka/tekstnih par stvorenih koristeći ovaj okvir u kontekstu zajedničkog zadatka WebNLG-a.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нова рамка за полуавтоматично създаване на лингвистично предизвикателни микро-планирани корпуси от данни към текст от съществуващи бази знания. Тъй като методът ни съчетава данни с различен размер и форма с текстове, вариращи от прости клаузи до кратки текстове, набор от данни, създаден с помощта на тази рамка, осигурява предизвикателство за микропланиране. Друга особеност на тази рамка е, че тя може да бъде приложена към всяка широкомащабна база от знания и следователно може да се използва за обучение и учене на вербализатори на КБ. Ние прилагаме нашата рамка към данните и сравняваме получения набор от данни с тези на Показваме, че докато наборът от данни на Вен и др. е повече от два пъти по-голям от нашия, той е по-малко разнообразен както по отношение на входящата информация, така и по отношение на текста. По този начин предлагаме нашата рамка за генериране на корпуси като нов метод за създаване на предизвикателни набори от данни, от които могат да се научат модели, способни да се справят със сложните взаимодействия, възникващи по време на микропланирането между лексикализация, агрегиране, повърхностна реализация, генериране на референтни изрази и сегментация на изречения. За да насърчим изследователите да се заемат с това предизвикателство, ние предоставихме набор от данни от 21 855 двойки данни/текст, създадени с помощта на тази рамка в контекста на споделената задача на WebNLG.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan cadangan baru untuk semi-otomatis menciptakan secara lingwistik tantangan mikro-rencana data-ke-teks korpora dari Pangkalan Pengetahuan yang ada. Karena metode kita memperpasangkan data ukuran dan bentuk yang berbeda dengan teks yang berasal dari klausul sederhana hingga teks pendek, sebuah set data yang diciptakan menggunakan kerangka ini menyediakan benchmark tantangan untuk mikrorencana. Karakteristik lainnya dari kerangka ini adalah bahwa ia dapat diterapkan pada setiap dasar pengetahuan skala besar dan oleh itu dapat digunakan untuk melatih dan belajar KB verbaliser. Kami menerapkan rangkaian kami untuk data DBpedia dan membandingkan data s et hasilnya dengan Wen et al. 2016-an. Kami menunjukkan bahwa sementara dataset Wen et al lebih dari dua kali lebih besar dari kita, itu kurang beragam baik dalam terma input maupun dalam terma teks. We thus propose our corpus generation framework as a novel method for creating challenging data sets from which NLG models can be learned which are capable of handling the complex interactions occurring during in micro-planning between lexicalisation, aggregation, surface realisation, referring expression generation and sentence segmentation.  To encourage researchers to take up this challenge, we made available a dataset of 21,855 data/text pairs created using this framework in the context of the WebNLG shared task.', 'de': "In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Framework für die semi-automatische Erstellung linguistisch anspruchsvoller Mikroplanungs-Daten-zu-Text-Korpora aus bestehenden Wissensbasen vor. Da unsere Methode Daten unterschiedlicher Größe und Form mit Texten kombiniert, die von einfachen Klauseln bis hin zu kurzen Texten reichen, bietet ein mit diesem Framework erstellter Datensatz eine herausfordernde Benchmark für die Mikroplanung. Ein weiteres Merkmal dieses Frameworks ist, dass es auf jede große Wissensbasis angewendet werden kann und somit zum Trainieren und Erlernen von KB-Verbalissern verwendet werden kann. Wir wenden unser Framework auf DBpedia-Daten an und vergleichen den resultierenden Datensatz mit Wen et al. 2016's. Wir zeigen, dass Wen et al. zwar mehr als doppelt so groß ist wie unser Datensatz, aber sowohl in Bezug auf Eingabe als auch in Bezug auf Text weniger vielfältig ist. Wir schlagen daher unser Korpusgenerierungsframework als neuartige Methode zur Erstellung anspruchsvoller Datensätze vor, aus denen NLG-Modelle gelernt werden können, die in der Lage sind, die komplexen Wechselwirkungen zu bewältigen, die während der Mikroplanung zwischen Lexikalisierung, Aggregation, Oberflächenrealisierung, Generierung referenzierender Ausdrücke und Satzsegmentierung auftreten. Um Forscher zu ermutigen, sich dieser Herausforderung anzunehmen, haben wir einen Datensatz von 21.855 Daten/Text Paaren zur Verfügung gestellt, der mit diesem Framework im Rahmen der gemeinsamen Aufgabe WebNLG erstellt wurde.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب نویسی برای ساختن نیمه\u200cخودکار زبان\u200cنویسی که در برابر ساختن داده\u200cهای میکروبرنامه\u200cسازی به متن از پایگاه\u200cهای دانش موجود مشکل می\u200cکند را نشان می\u200cدهیم. چون روش ما اطلاعات تغییر اندازه و شکل با متن های ساده تا متن کوتاه را جفت می دهد، یک مجموعه داده ای که با استفاده از این چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ویژگی دیگر از این چهارچوب این است که می\u200cتواند به هر پایگاه علمی بزرگ کاربرد شود و به همین دلیل می\u200cتواند برای آموزش و یاد گیرند کلمات کلمات KB استفاده شود. ما چهارچوب\u200cمون را به داده\u200cهای DBpedia ارائه می\u200cدهیم و مجموعه داده\u200cهای نتیجه را با Wen et al. سال ۲۰۰۶ مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که در حالی که مجموعه داده\u200cهای Wen et al. بیش از دو بار بزرگتر از اطلاعات ما هستند، این به اندازه ورودی و متن فرق بنابراین ما چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارمون را به عنوان یک روش تازه برای ایجاد مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سخت\u200cگیری که از آن مدل\u200cهای NLG می\u200cتوانند یاد گیرند که قادر به کنترل تعاملات پیچیده\u200cای در طول برنامه\u200cبندی میکروکروکروکروژی بین لیکسکالیزان، جم برای تشویق محققان برای این چالش، ما مجموعه داده ای از ۲۱.85۵ جفت داده/متن را در دسترس دادیم که با استفاده از این چهارچوب در محیط کار مشترک WebNLG ایجاد شده است.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we present a novel framework for semi-automatically creating linguistically challenging micro-planning data-to-text corpora from existing Knowledge Bases.  Kwa sababu takwimu zetu za mbinu zinazotofautiana na ubora na maandishi yenye maandishi yanayotofautiana na vifaa rahisi hadi ujumbe mfupi, seti ya taarifa iliyotengenezwa kwa kutumia mfumo huu inatoa bendera yenye changamoto kwa ajili ya kupambana na simu. Tamko lingine la mfumo huu ni kwamba inaweza kutumika kwenye msingi wowote wa maarifa makubwa na kwa hiyo inaweza kutumika kufundisha na kujifunza vibaliano vya KB. Tunatumia mfumo wetu kwenye takwimu za DBpedia na kulinganisha taarifa za matokeo kwa Wen et al. 2016. Tunaonyesha kwamba wakati takwimu za Wen et al ni zaidi ya mara mbili kubwa kuliko sisi, ni tofauti zaidi kwa ajili ya input na kwa namna ya maandishi. Kwa hiyo tunapendekeza mfumo wa kizazi chetu cha makampuni kama njia ya riwaya kwa kutengeneza seti za taarifa zinazochanganyika kutoka ambazo mifano ya NLG inaweza kujifunza ambazo wanaweza kushughulikia mahusiano magumu yanayotokea wakati wa mipango ya uchochezi mikubwa kati ya ukosekanaji, uvunjaji, ukweli wa hisia, ikirejea kizazi cha kujieleza na sehemu ya adhabu. Ili kuwahamasisha watafiti kuchukua changamoto hili, tulitengeneza seti ya takwimu ya wanandoa 21,855 data/text zilizotengenezwa kwa kutumia mfumo huu katika mukhtadha wa kazi zilizoshirikishwa na WebNLG.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 기존의 지식 라이브러리에서 언어의 도전성을 가진 미시적 기획 데이터를 텍스트 자료 라이브러리로 반자동으로 만드는 새로운 구조를 제시했다.우리의 방법은 서로 다른 크기와 모양의 데이터를 간단한 문장에서 짧은 텍스트까지의 텍스트와 조합하기 때문에 이 프레임워크를 이용하여 만든 데이터 집합을 사용하여 미시적인 계획에 도전적인 기준을 제공한다.이 프레임워크의 또 다른 특징은 그 어떠한 대규모 지식 라이브러리에도 적용될 수 있기 때문에 지식 라이브러리 대화자를 양성하고 학습하는 데 쓰일 수 있다는 것이다.DBpedia 데이터에 Google 프레임워크를 적용하고 결과 데이터 세트를 Wen 등의 2016년 데이터 세트와 비교한 결과, Wen 등의 데이터 세트는 Google 데이터 세트보다 두 배 이상 크지만 입력과 텍스트의 다양성은 적다는 것을 알 수 있습니다.따라서 우리는 우리의 어료 라이브러리 생성 구조를 제시했다. 도전적인 데이터 집합을 만드는 새로운 방법으로 NLG모델을 배울 수 있다. 이런 모델은 미시적인 기획 과정에서 발생하는 어휘화, 집합, 표면 실현, 인용 표현식 생성과 문장 분할 간의 복잡한 상호작용을 처리할 수 있다.연구원들이 이 도전을 받아들이도록 격려하기 위해 우리는 웹NLG가 임무를 공유하는 배경에서 21855개의 데이터/텍스트 쌍으로 구성된 데이터 집합을 제공했다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, biz esasy Bilim Başlaryndan ýarym-awtomatik bir roman çerçevesini bar. Çünkü bizim yöntemimiz, basit klauslardan kısa metinlere göre farklı boyutlardan ve biçimden gelen metinler ile çift veriler, bu çerçevesi kullanarak oluşturduğu veriler mikro planlama için zor bir benchmark sağlar. Bu çerýäniň başga bir özelligi, bu ýerde her uly ölçekli bilim üssüne uygulanabilir we şonuň üçin KB werkalizerlerini öwrenmek üçin ulanylýar. Biz öz çerçewçimizi DBpedia maglumatyna uygulaýarys we netijeli maglumaty çykaryp Wen et al bilen karşılaýarys. 2016-nji ýyllar. Wen et al'iň maglumaty setigimiziň biziň içimizden iki gezek öň ulydygyny görkezýäris, bu ikisiniň girdi we metin hökmünde birnäçe üýtgeşik d Şol sebäpli biz corpus jenaýatymyzyň çerşitlerini deň çözümli data düzümlerini bejermek üçin täze bir nusga görkezip teklip edip, NLG modelleriň bu mekdeplerden öwrenip bilýär ki mikro-planlaşdyrylmagyň, toplantylygyň, yüzeysel realisasiň, ifade döredilmesini we sözlem segmentasiýasynda geçirip biljek karma Araştyranlara bu kynçylygy çözmek üçin, biz 21.855 veri/metin çift sistemini WebNLG paylaşyk görevinin içinde oluşturduğu veri setini kullandık.", 'sq': 'In this paper, we present a novel framework for semi-automatically creating linguistically challenging micro-planning data-to-text corpora from existing Knowledge Bases.  Sepse metoda jonë bashkon të dhënat e madhësisë dhe formës të ndryshme me tekstet që shkojnë nga klauzula të thjeshta deri në tekste të shkurtra, një grup i të dhënave të krijuara duke përdorur këtë kuadër ofron një referencë sfiduese për mikroplanifikimin. Një karakteristikë tjetër e këtij kuadri është se ai mund të aplikohet në çdo bazë njohurie në shkallë të madhe dhe mund të përdoret për të trajnuar dhe mësuar verbalizuesit e KB. Ne aplikojmë kuadrin tonë ndaj të dhënave të DBpedia dhe krahasojmë të dhënat që rezultojnë me Wen et al. 2016. Ne tregojmë se ndërsa të dhënat e Wen et al. janë më shumë se dy herë më të mëdha se tonat, ajo është më pak e ndryshme si në termat e hyrjes, ashtu edhe në termat e tekstit. Kështu propozojmë kuadrin tonë të gjenerimit korpus si një metodë e re për krijimin e grupeve të dhënash sfiduese nga të cilat modelet NLG mund të mësohen që janë në gjendje të trajtojnë ndërveprimet komplekse që ndodhin gjatë mikroplanifikimit midis lexikalizimit, agregimit, realizimit të sipërfaqes, referimit të gjenerimit të shprehjes dhe segmentimit të fjalëve. Për të inkurajuar kërkuesit për të marrë këtë sfidë, ne kemi bërë në dispozicion një sërë të dhënash prej 21,855 çiftesh të dhënash/teksti të krijuara duke përdorur këtë kuadër në kontekstin e detyrës së përbashkët WebNLG.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր շրջանակ, որը կիսաավտոմատիկ կերպով ստեղծում է լեզվաբանական բարդ միկրոպլանավորման տվյալներ տեքստի կորպորա գոյություն ունեցող գիտելիքների հիմքերից: Քանի որ մեր մեթոդը զուգավորում է տարբեր չափերի և ձևերի տվյալները հաղորդագրությունների հետ, որոնք սկսում են պարզ բառերից մինչև կարճ հաղորդագրություններ, այս շրջանակի օգնությամբ ստեղծված տվյալների համակարգը տալիս է մարտահրավեր համեմա Այս շրջանակի մեկ այլ հատկություն այն է, որ այն կարող է կիրառվել ցանկացած մեծ գիտելիքի հիմքի վրա, և հետևաբար այն կարող է կիրառվել ԿԲ-ի բերբալիզացիչների ուսուցանման և սովորելու համար: Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր կառուցվածքը DBpeda-ի տվյալների համար և համեմատում ենք արդյունքում ստացված տվյալների համակարգը 2016-ականների հետ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մինչ Վենի և այլների տվյալների համակարգը ավելի քան երկու անգամ մեծ է, այն ավելի քիչ տարբեր է, ինչպես ներմուծի և տեքստի առումով: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք մեր կորպոս սերունդի շրջանակը որպես նոր մեթոդ ստեղծելու համար մարտահրավեր տվյալների համակարգեր, որոնց միջոցով կարող ենք սովորել ՆԼԳ մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են վերահսկել բարդ փոխազդեցությունները, որոնք տեղի են ունենում միկրոպլանավորման ժամանակ լեքսիկալիզացիայի, ագրե To encourage researchers to take up this challenge, we made available a dataset of 21,855 data/text pairs created using this framework in the context of the WebNLG shared task.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n nuwe raamwerk vir semi-automaties die skep van lingwisies wat die mikro-planning data-na-teks-korpora van bestaande kennis-basies is. Omdat ons metode paar data van verskillende grootte en vorm met teks af van eenvoudige klauses tot kort teks, 'n datastel geskep deur hierdie raamwerk te gebruik verskaf 'n pragtige benchmark vir mikropplanning. En 'n ander funksie van hierdie raamwerk is dat dit kan aanwend word na enige groot skaal kennis basis en dan kan gebruik word om Kb verbalisers te trein en leer. Ons wend ons raamwerk aan DBpedia data en vergelyk die resulteerde datastel met Wen et al. 2016 se. Ons wys dat terwyl Wen et al 's datastel meer as twee keer groter as ons is, is dit minder verskeie beide in terms van invoer en in terms van teks. Ons voorstel hierdie ons korpusgenerasie raamwerk as 'n nuwe metode vir die skep van challende data stelle van waarvan NLG modele kan leer word wat is in staat om die komplekse interaksies te behandel wat voorgekom in mikro-planning tussen leksikalisasie, aggregasie, oorspronklike realisasie, verwysing van uitdrukking generasie en sentence segmentasie. Om resekers te bevestig om hierdie uitdrukking te neem, het ons 'n datastel van 21.855 data/text paar beskikbaar gemaak deur hierdie raamwerk te gebruik in die konteks van die WebNLG gedeelde taak.", 'am': "በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋውን ለራሱ አቀናቅልናል፡፡ ምክንያቱም የሥርዓታችን ሁለት ዓይነቶች የልዩ መጠን እና መልክ ከቀላል ጽሑፎች ወደ አነስተኛ ጽሑፎች የሚለዩ የጽሑፎችን መልዕክት፣ ይህ ፍሬም በተጠቃሚ የዳታ መስመር አቅራቢ የሜክሮፕላን መክፈት የሚችል የbenchmark ነው፡፡ የዚህ ፍሬም ሌላ ምርጫዎች ይህ ትልቅ እውቀት መቀመጫውን ሁሉ ለመጠቀም ይችላል ስለዚህም KB verbaliserን ለማስተማርና ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የድምፅ ሥርዓታችንን ወደ DBpedia ዳታዎች እና ፍሬታውን ከWen et al. 2016 ጋር እናስተያየዋለን። Wen et al's ዳታደር ከኛ ሁለት እጥፍ የበለጠ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የኮርፓስ ትውልድ ፍሬማችን የዳታ ማዕከላዊ ሥርዓት ለመፍጠር የዘላለም ልማድ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ትምህርት ተማሪዎችን ለመያበረታት፣ በWebNLG በተካፈለው ስራ ውስጥ የዳታ/ጽሑፍ ሁለት ሁለት ሁለት አካባቢ ሰጥተናል፡፡", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi okvir za polu-automatski stvaranje jezičkog izazovnog mikroplaniranja podataka na tekst korporacije iz postojeće baze znanja. Jer naša metoda pare podatke o različitim veličinama i obliku sa tekstima od jednostavnih klauzula do kratkih tekstova, kompleta podataka stvorena koristeći ovaj okvir pruža izazovnu kritiku za mikroplaniranje. Druga karakteristika ovog okvira je da se može primjenjivati na bilo koju veliku znanstvenu bazu i stoga se može koristiti za treniranje i naučenje verbalisera KB-a. Mi primjenjujemo naš okvir na podatke DBpedia i uspoređujemo rezultativnu setu podataka s Wen et al. 2016. pokazujemo da dok je seta podataka Wen et al. više od dvaput veća od naših, to je manje različita kako u smislu ulaska i teksta. Stoga predlažemo naš okvir generacije korpusa kao nova metoda za stvaranje izazovnih kompleksa podataka iz kojih se mogu naučiti modeli NLG-a koji su sposobni da se rješavaju kompleksnim interakcijama koji se dešavaju tokom mikroplaniranja između leksikalizacije, aggregacije, realizacije površine, odnose na generaciju izraza i segmentaciju rečenica. Da bismo poticali istraživače da podnese ovaj izazov, učinili smo dostupnu skupu podataka od 21.855 podataka/tekstnih par stvorenih koristeći ovaj okvir u kontekstu zajedničkog zadatka WebNLG-a.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, biz həmin Bilim Başlarından mikro planlama verilər-məlumatları ilə mətn korporasından yarı-avtomatik olaraq yaratmaq üçün yeni bir çerçive göstəririk. Çünki bizim metodumuz, çoxluğumuz və şəklimizin məlumatlarını, basit klauzulardan qısa məlumatlara çevrilən məlumatlarla birlikdə cütlər verir, bu frameworklə yaratdığı verilənlər mikroplanlama üçün çətin bir benchmark təklif edir. Bu çerçivesinin başqa bir özelliği, büyük ölçüdə bilgi bazına uygulanabilir və buna görə də KB verbaliserini öyrənmək və təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilir. Biz frame-ımızı DBpedia verilənlərə uygulayıq və sonuçlarında verilən verilənlər qurğunu 2016-ci ilə Wen et al. ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Wen et al'in verilənlərin qurğusu bizimdən iki dəfə daha böyükdüyünü göstəririk, bu hər ikisinin girdi və metin şəkilində daha az müxtəlif olduğunu göstəririk. Beləliklə, korpus nəslimizin çerçevesini yeni bir yol olaraq, NLG modellərinin öyrəndiyi çətinlikli məlumatlar yaratmaq üçün təklif edirik ki, leksikalizasyon, aggregasyon, üzərin reaksiyonu, ifadəsi nəsili və cümlələr segmentasiyası arasındakı mikro planlama sırasında olan kompleks etkileşikləri idarə edə bilər. Araştırmacılara bu səbəbi almaq üçün, WebNLG paylaşılan işlərin kontekstündə yaratdığı 21.855 məlumat/məlumat çift verilənlərin qurmasını müvəffəq etdik.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভাষায় সৃষ্টি করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাসের কার্যক্রম উপস্থাপন করছি বিদ্যমান জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে মাইক্রো পরিকল্পনা  কারণ আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন আকার এবং আকৃতি বিভিন্ন ধরনের জোড়ার তথ্য, যা সাধারণ ক্লাউস থেকে সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট পর্যন্ত লেখা থেকে বিভিন্ এই ফ্রেমের আরেকটি বৈশিষ্ট্য হচ্ছে যে এটি বিশাল স্ক্যালের জ্ঞানের বেসে প্রয়োগ করা যাবে এবং তাই কেবি ভার্বালেলাইজারের প আমরা ডিবিপিডিয়ার তথ্যের কাছে আমাদের ফ্রেম প্রয়োগ করি এবং ফলাফলের ডাটাসেট উইন এনেট আল. ২০১৬ সালের সাথে তুলনা করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে উইন এনেট আলের ডাটাসেট আমাদের চেয়ে দুইব এভাবে আমরা আমাদের কোর্পাস প্রজন্মের কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি চ্যালেঞ্জের ডাটা সেট তৈরি করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাস হিসেবে, যেখান থেকে এনএলজি মডেল শিখতে পারে যে মাইক্রো পরিকল্পনার মধ্যে যে সমস্ত গবেষকদের এই চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে উৎসাহ প্রদান করার জন্য আমরা ওয়েব এনএলজি শেয়ার কর্মের প্রেক্ষাপটের মাধ্যমে ২১,৮৫৫ ডাটার/টেক্সট জোড়', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nový rámec pro poloautomatické vytváření lingvisticky náročných mikroplánovacích dat-textových korpusů ze stávajících znalostních bází. Protože naše metoda spáruje data různé velikosti a tvaru s texty od jednoduchých vět až po krátké texty, datová sada vytvořená pomocí tohoto frameworku představuje náročné měřítko pro mikroplánování. Dalším rysem tohoto frameworku je, že může být aplikován na libovolnou velké znalostní bázi a může být použit k tréninku a učení KB verbalizátorů. Aplikujeme náš framework na data DBpedie a porovnáváme výslednou sadu dat s daty Wen et al. 2016. Ukazujeme, že i když je datová sada Wen et al. více než dvakrát větší než ta naše, je méně rozmanitá jak z hlediska vstupu, tak textu. Proto navrhujeme náš rámec generace korpusů jako novou metodu pro tvorbu náročných datových sad, ze kterých lze naučit NLG modely, které jsou schopny zvládnout komplexní interakce vznikající při mikroplánování mezi lexikalizací, agregací, povrchovou realizací, generací referenčních výrazů a segmentací vět. Abychom povzbudili výzkumné pracovníky k přijetí této výzvy, zpřístupnili jsme datovou sadu 21,855 datových/textových párů vytvořených pomocí tohoto frameworku v kontextu sdíleného úkolu WebNLG.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi viitekehys, jonka avulla voidaan luoda puoliautomaattisesti kielellisesti haastavia mikrosuunnittelukorpusia olemassa olevista tietokantoista. Koska menetelmämme yhdistää erikokoisen ja muotoisen datan tekstiin yksinkertaisista lauseista lyhyihin teksteihin, tämän kehyksen avulla luotu aineisto tarjoaa haastavan vertailukohdan mikrosuunnittelulle. Tämän viitekehyksen toinen ominaisuus on se, että sitä voidaan soveltaa mihin tahansa laajamittaiseen tietokantaan ja sitä voidaan siten käyttää KB-sanalyyttien kouluttamiseen ja oppimiseen. Sovellamme viitekehystä DBpedia-aineistoon ja vertaamme sitä Wen et al. 2016:n aineistoon. Osoitamme, että vaikka Wen et al.:n aineisto on yli kaksi kertaa suurempi kuin meidän, se on vähemmän monipuolinen sekä syötteen että tekstin suhteen. Näin ollen ehdotamme korpusenmuodostuskehystä uudenlaiseksi menetelmäksi luoda haastavia tietokokonaisuuksia, joista voidaan oppia NLG-malleja, jotka pystyvät käsittelemään mikrosuunnittelussa esiintyviä monimutkaisia vuorovaikutuksia leksikalisoinnin, aggregoinnin, pintarealisoinnin, viittaavan ilmaisun tuottamisen ja lausesegmentoinnin välillä. Kannustaaksemme tutkijoita tarttumaan tähän haasteeseen, annoimme saataville 21 855 dataparia, jotka on luotu tätä kehystä käyttäen WebNLG:n yhteisen tehtävän yhteydessä.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un nou marc per crear semi-automàticament corpores lingüísticament desafiants de microplanificació de dades a text de les bases de coneixements existents. Perquè el nostre mètode parella dades de mida i forma diferents amb textos que van de clàusules senzilles a textos curts, un conjunt de dades creat fent servir aquest marc proporciona un punt de referència difícil per a la microplanificació. Una altra característica d'aquest marc és que es pot aplicar a qualsevol base de coneixements a gran escala i, per tant, es pot utilitzar per formar i aprendre verbalitzadors KB. We apply our framework to DBpedia data and compare the resulting dataset with Wen et al. 2016's. We show that while Wen et al.'s dataset is more than twice larger than ours, it is less diverse both in terms of input and in terms of text.  Proposem així el nostre marc de generació de corpus com un mètode nou per crear conjunts de dades desafiants a partir dels quals es poden aprendre models NLG capaços de manejar les complexes interaccions que ocorren durant la microplanificació entre la lexicalització, l'agregació, la realització de la superfície, la referència a la generació d'expressions i la segmentació de frases. Per animar els investigadors a afrontar aquest repte, vam fer disponible un conjunt de dades de 21.855 parells de dades/text creats utilitzant aquest marc en el context de la tasca compartida de WebNLG.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame uudse raamistiku poolautomaatseks keeleliselt keerukate mikroplaneerimise korpuste loomiseks olemasolevatest teadmistebaasidest. Kuna meie meetod ühendab erineva suuruse ja kujuga andmed tekstidega alates lihtsatest klauslitest kuni lühikesteni, pakub selle raamistiku abil loodud andmekogum väljakutseid mikroplaneerimiseks. Selle raamistiku veel üks omadus on see, et seda saab rakendada mis tahes ulatusliku teadmistebaasi suhtes ning seetõttu saab seda kasutada KB sõnalisaatorite koolitamiseks ja õppimiseks. Rakendame oma raamistikku DBpedia andmetele ja võrdleme saadud andmekogumit Wen et al. 2016. aasta andmetega. Näitame, et kuigi Wen et al. andmekogum on rohkem kui kaks korda suurem kui meie omad, on see nii sisendi kui ka teksti poolest vähem mitmekesine. Seega pakume välja oma korpuse genereerimise raamistiku kui uudse meetodi loomiseks keerukate andmekogumite loomiseks, millest saab õppida NLG mudeleid, mis suudavad käsitleda mikroplaneerimise käigus tekkivaid keerukaid interaktsioone leksikaliseerimise, agregatsiooni, pinnarealiseerimise, viitavate väljendite genereerimise ja lausete segmenteerimise vahel. Selleks et julgustada teadlasi sellele väljakutsele vastu võtma, tegime kättesaadavaks 21 855 andme/teksti paari andmekogumi, mis on loodud selle raamistiku abil WebNLG ühise ülesande kontekstis.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita nyibagi perusahaan kanggo kelas ramik kanggo ngilanggar langkung-nggawe barang nggawe data-nggawe text ora kebebasan "Learn basic". Soalé awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sistem dadi kapat-kapat karo nggambar kelangan yèng text sampeyan nggambar kelangan seneng nggambar kelangan section Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem dhéwé kanggo DBpedia data lan ngregani martanyar data sing berarti karo wen et al. Deweke kalah-2013. Awak dhéwé ngomong nik wen et al \'s dataset dadi luwih apik dhéwé sing luwih katé awak dhéwé, kuwi wis diwuot dilambang langgar sampeyan input lan tèks mengko. Awak dhéwé éngawe ndhukung akeh sampeyan mrogram dumadhi kaya nguasai perusahaan data sing nggawe barang nggawe nguasai model NLG iso dipoleh iki iso nguasai perusahaan karo iso nggawe interaksi kelangan sampeyan mrogram nggawe nguasai tindakan lekhialaman, ngregasi, réaksiyon ngéwé, ngregasi perusahaan, iso nggawe pawaran karo seg Ngawe ngubah cerêter kanggo sampek punika ingkang sampek iki, awak dhéwé ngewehke dataset sing nyimpen podho data/text nang konjur sing nggawe barang iki ning acara sampek sebera web NLG', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, muna halatar da wani firam na nowaya farat-farat ɗaya na ƙiƙiro linguin da ke ƙaranci da tarakin data-zuwa-text-yin-shirin micro daga Base na Cilmi. Kwamba da kuma, hanyoyinmu biyu masu tsarin girma da tsarin mutane da matsayi masu rangi daga karatun masu sauƙi zuwa rubutu masu ƙaranci, wani danne da aka halitta kwamfyutan wannan firam, yana da wani bangon ƙaranci wa microlancin. Babu wani tayari na wannan firam shine ya iya amfani da shi ga duk salon ilmi mai girma, kuma don haka ana iya amfani da shi dõmin ya sanar da kuma ya sanar da masu tsari na KB. Munã samun firam zuwa DBpediya data kuma munã sambata danne masu fasahan da aka haɗa na Wen et al. 2016. Muna nuna cewa, a lokacin da shirin ayuka na Wen et al'2016 yana ƙaranci sau biyu mafi girma daga kanmu, kuma yana ƙaranci daban-daban, cikin masu shiga da kuma in rubutun matsayi. Kamar wannan ne Muke ƙayyade firam-firam na Corbas kamar wata hanyoyi wa ƙiƙiro tsarin da za'a sanar da misãlai masu tsõratar da data daga gare shi, wanda za'a iya iya iya yin amfani da masu husũma masu adadi wanda ke samu'a cikin shirin micro-yi tsakanin lokacin lissafi, kiyaye, gaskiya, masu tsari da bakar filayen, kuma yana gaya zazaɓen magana da kuma sesegment of azãba. Dõmin ya kwaɗaitar da watani su sami wannan tsohon, mun sami wani danne na danganta na 21,855 data/matsayi wanda aka halitta mazaɓa da wannan firam cikin mazan aiki da WebNLG wanda aka raba shi.", 'he': 'In this paper, we present a novel framework for semi-automatically creating linguistically challenging micro-planning data-to-text corpora from existing Knowledge Bases.  מכיוון שהשיטה שלנו זוג נתונים בגודל וצורה שונה עם טקסטים שמגיעים מ פסקים פשוטים לטקסטים קצרים, קבוצת נתונים שנוצרה באמצעות המסגר הזה מספקת רמז מאתגר למיקרותכנון. תכונה נוספת של המסגרת הזו היא שהיא יכולה להיות שימושית לכל בסיס ידע בקנה מידה גדול ולכן יכולה להיות שימושית לאימון וללמד מילים KB. אנחנו משתמשים במסגרת שלנו למידע DBpedia ולהשוות את קבוצת המידע הנוצאה עם Wen et al. 2016. אנחנו מראים כי בעוד קבוצת המידע של Wen et al יותר מפעמיים גדולה משלנו, הוא פחות מגוון גם במונחים של הכניסה וגם במונחים של טקסט. ככה אנו מציעים את המסגרת של דור הקורפוס שלנו כשיטה חדשה לייצור קבוצות נתונים מאתגרים מאיפה ניתן ללמוד דוגמנים NLG שמסוגלים לטפל באינטראקציות מורכבות שמתרחשות במהלך מיקרו-תכנון בין לקסיקליזציה, אגרגרגיה, התבנות על פני השטח, התייחסות לדור ביטוי ומ כדי לעודד מחקרים להתמודד עם האתגר הזה, הפכנו פנויים קבוצת נתונים של 21,855 נתונים/זוגות טקסט שנוצרו באמצעות המסגרת הזאת בתוך הקשר של משימה משותפת WebNLG.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo nov okvir za polavtomatsko ustvarjanje jezikosloško zahtevnih mikronačrtovalnih korpusov podatkov v besedilo iz obstoječih baz znanja. Ker naša metoda združuje podatke različnih velikosti in oblik z besedili, ki segajo od preprostih klavzul do kratkih besedil, nabor podatkov, ustvarjen s tem okvirom, zagotavlja zahtevno merilo za mikroplaniranje. Druga značilnost tega okvira je, da ga je mogoče uporabiti za katero koli obsežno bazo znanja in se zato lahko uporablja za usposabljanje in učenje besedilcev KB. Naš okvir uporabljamo za podatke DBpedia in primerjamo nastale nabor podatkov z Wen et al. 2016. Pokazamo, da je nabor podatkov Wen et al. več kot dvakrat večji od našega, vendar je manj raznolik tako glede vnosa kot glede besedila. Zato predlagamo naš okvir za generiranje korpusov kot novo metodo za ustvarjanje zahtevnih podatkovnih nizov, iz katerih se lahko naučimo NLG modelov, ki so sposobni obvladovati kompleksne interakcije med leksikalizacijo, agregacijo, površinsko realizacijo, generiranjem referenčnih izrazov in segmentacijo stavkov. Da bi raziskovalce spodbudili k temu izzivu, smo dali na voljo 21.855 parov podatkov/besedila, ustvarjenih s tem okvirom v okviru skupne naloge WebNLG.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་གྲངས་སུ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་འབྲེལ གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སླ་བསྡད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆུང་ཐང་ཀར་ཡིག Another feature of this framework is that it can be applied to any large scale knowledge base and can be used to train and learn KB verbalisers. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We thus propose our corpus generation framework as a novel method for creating challenging data sets from which NLG models can be learned which are capable of handling the complex interactions occurring during in micro-planning between lexicalisation, aggregation, surface realisation, referring expression generation and sentence segmentation. The first step is the horizontal axis. དབྱངས་མཁན་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལེན་སྤྱད་པར་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks for Reading Comprehension and Question Answering', 'pt': 'Redes de autocorrespondência fechadas para compreensão de leitura e resposta a perguntas', 'es': 'Redes cerradas de autocorrespondencia para la comprensión lectora y la respuesta a preguntas', 'ar': 'شبكات المطابقة الذاتية ذات البوابات لفهم القراءة والرد على الأسئلة', 'fr': 'Réseaux auto-appariés fermés pour la compréhension en lecture et la réponse aux questions', 'ja': '理解と質問への回答を読むためのゲーテッドセルフマッチングネットワーク', 'zh': '以读解问答门控自匹网络', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ और प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए गेटेड स्व-मिलान नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks for Reading Compstandingsion and Question Answering (Автоматизированные самосопоставительные сети для понимания прочитанного и ответов на вопросы)', 'ga': 'Líonraí Féinmheaitseála Gated le haghaidh Léamhthuiscint agus Freagra Ceisteanna', 'el': 'Συγκεντρωμένα δίκτυα αυτοαντιστοίχισης για την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης και την απάντηση ερωτήσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Kapcsolt önegyező hálózatok az olvasáshoz és a kérdések megválaszolásához', 'kk': 'Сұрақтарды оқу және сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін желілерді біріктіру', 'it': 'Reti di auto-corrispondenza Gated per la comprensione della lettura e la risposta alle domande', 'lt': 'Gated self-matching networks for reading comprehension and Question Answering', 'mk': 'Вратени соодветни мрежи за читање на разбирање и одговор на прашања', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതിനും പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനും ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനും സ്വയം പൊരുത്തുന്ന ശൃംഖലകള', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Berpadan Sendiri Gated untuk membaca Pemahaman dan Jawapan soalan', 'mt': 'Netwerks Gated Self-Matching għall-qari tal-Komprensjoni u t-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet', 'pl': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks do czytania zrozumienia i odpowiedzi na pytania', 'mn': 'Бүгдээрээ өөртөө холбогдох сүлжээг унших, асуулт хариулт', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Skupljene samostalne mreže za čitanje kompresije i odgovor na pitanja', 'ro': 'Rețele de auto-potrivire Gated pentru înțelegerea citirii și răspunsul la întrebări', 'si': 'සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් කියවන්න සඳහා ස්වයංග සම්පූර්ණ ජාලය', 'so': 'Gated Self-Matching Network for Reading Comprehension and Question answers', 'sv': 'Gated självmatchande nätverk för läsförståelse och frågesvar', 'ta': 'படித்தல் முடித்தல் மற்றும் கேள்வி பதில்', 'ur': 'سؤال جواب کے لیے پڑھنے اور پڑھنے کے لئے خود مطابق نیٹورک جمع کئے گئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đóng các mạng lưới tự kết nối đến Đọc toàn trầm và trả lời câu hỏi', 'bg': 'Затворени самосъвпадащи мрежи за разбиране на четенето и отговор на въпроси', 'da': 'Gated Self-Matching Netværk til læseforståelse og spørgsmål besvarelse', 'nl': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks voor het lezen van begrip en het beantwoorden van vragen', 'hr': 'Skupljene samostalne mreže za čitanje kompresije i odgovor na pitanja', 'de': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks für Leseverständnis und Beantwortung von Fragen', 'ko': '읽기 이해와 문답의 문 제어 자동 일치 네트워크', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Rangkaian Berpasang Sendiri Gated untuk membaca Kompresi dan Jawaban Pertanyaan', 'sw': 'Ikiwa imekusanyika mitandao yenye kujishabika kwa ajili ya kusoma Kukamilika na Jawabu la swali', 'tr': 'Syýahat we Sorag jogap okamak üçin özi-eşleýän Aýtlar', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks for Reading Comprehension and Question Answering', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'T톛r톛fl톛m톛 v톛 sual cavab캼 oxumaq 칲칞칲n 칐z칲m칲zl칲 S톛nl톛r', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks for Reading Comprehension and Question Answering', 'ca': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks for Reading Comprehension and Question Answering', 'cs': 'Gated Self-Matching Networks pro čtení porozumění a zodpovězení otázek', 'et': 'Väravad isesobivad võrgud lugemiseks arusaamiseks ja küsimustele vastamiseks', 'bs': 'Skupljene samostalne mreže za čitanje kompresije i odgovor na pitanja', 'fi': 'Suljetut omatoimiset verkot lukuymmärtämiseen ja kysymyksiin vastaamiseen', 'he': 'רשתות מתאימות עצמיות משולבות לקרוא בינה וענות שאלות', 'sk': 'Zaprta samoujemajoča se omrežja za branje razumevanja in odgovarjanje na vprašanja', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མཐའ་འཁོར་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་ལ་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present the gated self-matching networks for reading comprehension style question answering, which aims to answer questions from a given passage. We first match the question and passage with gated attention-based recurrent networks to obtain the question-aware passage representation. Then we propose a self-matching attention mechanism to refine the representation by matching the passage against itself, which effectively encodes information from the whole passage. We finally employ the pointer networks to locate the positions of answers from the passages. We conduct extensive experiments on the SQuAD dataset. The single model achieves 71.3 % on the evaluation metrics of exact match on the hidden test set, while the ensemble model further boosts the results to 75.9 %. At the time of submission of the paper, our model holds the first place on the SQuAD leaderboard for both single and ensemble model.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم شبكات المطابقة الذاتية ذات البوابات للإجابة على أسئلة أسلوب الفهم القرائي ، والتي تهدف إلى الإجابة على أسئلة من فقرة معينة. نقوم أولاً بمطابقة السؤال والمقطع بالشبكات المتكررة القائمة على الانتباه للحصول على تمثيل المرور المدرك للأسئلة. ثم نقترح آلية انتباه ذاتية المطابقة لتحسين التمثيل عن طريق مطابقة المقطع مع نفسه ، مما يؤدي بشكل فعال إلى تشفير المعلومات من المقطع بأكمله. أخيرًا ، قمنا بتوظيف شبكات المؤشرات لتحديد مواقع الإجابات من المقاطع. نجري تجارب مكثفة على مجموعة بيانات SQuAD. يحقق النموذج الفردي 71.3٪ من مقاييس التقييم للمطابقة التامة في مجموعة الاختبار المخفية ، بينما يعزز نموذج المجموعة النتائج إلى 75.9٪. في وقت تقديم الورقة ، احتل نموذجنا المركز الأول في لوحة صدارة SQuAD لكل من نموذج فردي ومجموعة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos as redes de autocorrespondência fechadas para responder perguntas no estilo de compreensão de leitura, que visa responder a perguntas de uma determinada passagem. Primeiro combinamos a pergunta e a passagem com redes recorrentes baseadas em atenção fechada para obter a representação da passagem consciente da pergunta. Em seguida, propomos um mecanismo de atenção de autocorrespondência para refinar a representação comparando a passagem com ela mesma, que efetivamente codifica a informação de toda a passagem. Finalmente empregamos as redes de ponteiros para localizar as posições das respostas das passagens. Conduzimos experimentos extensivos no conjunto de dados SQuAD. O modelo único atinge 71,3% nas métricas de avaliação de correspondência exata no conjunto de teste oculto, enquanto o modelo de conjunto aumenta ainda mais os resultados para 75,9%. No momento da submissão do artigo, nosso modelo ocupa o primeiro lugar na tabela de classificação SQuAD para o modelo único e conjunto.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos las redes cerradas de auto-emparejamiento para responder a preguntas de estilo de comprensión lectora, que tiene como objetivo responder preguntas de un pasaje dado. Primero hacemos coincidir la pregunta y el pasaje con redes recurrentes cerradas basadas en la atención para obtener la representación del pasaje sensible a las preguntas. Luego, proponemos un mecanismo de atención autocoincidente para refinar la representación haciendo coincidir el pasaje contra sí mismo, lo que codifica efectivamente la información de todo el pasaje. Finalmente, empleamos las redes de punteros para localizar las posiciones de las respuestas de los pasajes. Realizamos experimentos exhaustivos en el conjunto de datos sQuad. El modelo único alcanza el 71,3% en las métricas de evaluación de concordancia exacta en el conjunto de pruebas ocultas, mientras que el modelo conjunto aumenta aún más los resultados al 75,9%. En el momento de la presentación del artículo, nuestra modelo ocupa el primer lugar en la tabla de clasificación de sQuad tanto para modelo individual como para conjunto.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons les réseaux d'auto-appariement fermés pour répondre aux questions de style compréhension en lecture, qui visent à répondre aux questions d'un passage donné. Nous faisons d'abord correspondre la question et le passage avec des réseaux récurrents basés sur l'attention fermée pour obtenir la représentation du passage sensible à la question. Ensuite, nous proposons un mécanisme d'attention auto-apparié pour affiner la représentation en faisant correspondre le passage contre lui-même, ce qui code efficacement les informations du passage entier. Enfin, nous utilisons les réseaux de pointeurs pour localiser les positions des réponses dans les passages. Nous menons des expériences approfondies sur le jeu de données Squad. Le modèle unique atteint 71,3\xa0% sur les mesures d'évaluation de la correspondance exacte sur l'ensemble de tests cachés, tandis que le modèle d'ensemble augmente encore les résultats à 75,9\xa0%. Au moment de la soumission de l'article, notre modèle occupe la première place dans le classement SQuad, tant pour le modèle solo que pour le modèle d'ensemble.", 'zh': '于本文,发读解式问答之门控自匹网络,所以答给定段落中也。 先以段落门控之循环网络匹,以感知段落。 然后设自匹之机,以段落其身优化之,以效编码段落之信。 最后,因指针网络以定位段落中对案之位。 博实验于SQuAD数集上。 隐而试之集上精配之评指标成其 71.3%,而成其 75.9%。 凡交论,则SQuAD排行榜上单一、集成第一。', 'ja': '本稿では，与えられた一節からの質問に答えることを目的とした，理解スタイルの質問回答を読むためのゲート付き自己マッチングネットワークを提示する．まず、質問と通過をゲート化された注意に基づく繰り返しネットワークと照合して、質問認識通過表現を得る。そして、通路全体からの情報を効果的に符号化する通路自体と照合することで表現を精緻化する自己照合的な注意メカニズムを提案する。最後に、ポインタネットワークを使用して、通路から回答の位置を特定します。SQuADデータセットについて広範な実験を行っています。単一モデルは、隠しテストセット上の完全一致の評価指標で71.3 ％を達成し、アンサンブルモデルはさらに結果を75.9 ％にブーストします。論文提出時点で、当社のモデルは、シングルモデルとアンサンブルモデルの両方でSQuADランキングの1位を保持しています。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем закрытые самосопоставительные сети для чтения ответов на вопросы в стиле понимания, которые направлены на ответы на вопросы из данного отрывка. Сначала мы сопоставляем вопрос и отрывок с закрытыми рекуррентными сетями, основанными на внимании, чтобы получить представление осознанного отрывка. Затем мы предлагаем механизм самосопоставления внимания для уточнения представления путем сопоставления отрывка с самим собой, который эффективно кодирует информацию из всего отрывка. Наконец, мы используем указательные сети, чтобы найти позиции ответов из отрывков. Мы проводим обширные эксперименты на датасете SQuAD. Единая модель достигает 71,3% по оценочным показателям точного совпадения на скрытом тестовом наборе, в то время как ансамблевая модель дополнительно повышает результаты до 75,9%. На момент представления статьи наша модель занимает первое место в рейтинге SQuAD как для одиночной, так и для ансамблевой модели.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम समझ शैली के प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए गेटेड स्व-मिलान नेटवर्क प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए मार्ग से प्रश्नों का उत्तर देना है। हम पहले प्रश्न-जागरूक मार्ग प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए गेटेड ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक नेटवर्क के साथ प्रश्न और मार्ग से मेल खाते हैं। फिर हम अपने खिलाफ मार्ग का मिलान करके प्रतिनिधित्व को परिष्कृत करने के लिए एक आत्म-मिलान ध्यान तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो पूरे मार्ग से जानकारी को प्रभावी ढंग से एन्कोड करता है। हम अंत में मार्ग से उत्तरों की स्थिति का पता लगाने के लिए पॉइंटर नेटवर्क को नियोजित करते हैं। हम SQuAD डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोग करते हैं। एकल मॉडल छिपे हुए परीक्षण सेट पर सटीक मैच के मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पर 71.3% प्राप्त करता है, जबकि पहनावा मॉडल परिणामों को 75.9% तक बढ़ा देता है। पेपर प्रस्तुत करने के समय, हमारा मॉडल एकल और पहनावा मॉडल दोनों के लिए SQuAD लीडरबोर्ड पर पहला स्थान रखता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair na líonraí féinmheaitseála geataí chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt i stíl léamhthuisceana, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm leo ceisteanna a fhreagairt as sliocht ar leith. Déanaimid an cheist agus an sliocht a mheaitseáil ar dtús le líonraí athfhillteacha aird-bhunaithe chun an sliocht atá feasach ar cheist a fháil. Ansin molaimid meicníocht aird féin-mheaitseála chun an léiriú a bheachtú tríd an sliocht a mheaitseáil lena aghaidh féin, a dhéanann ionchódú éifeachtach ar fhaisnéis ón sliocht iomlán. Ar deireadh bainimid úsáid as na líonraí pointeoir chun suímh na bhfreagraí ó na sleachta a aimsiú. Déanaimid turgnaimh fhairsing ar thacar sonraí SQuAD. Baineann an tsamhail aonair 71.3% amach ar an méadracht mheastóireachta ar mheaitseáil chruinn ar an tacar tástála folaithe, agus ardaíonn an tsamhail ensemble na torthaí go 75.9%. Agus an páipéar á chur isteach, tá an chéad áit ag ár múnla ar chlár ceannairí an SQuAD don mhúnla singil agus don ghrúpa ensemble.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აღწერეთ თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან ქსელების შესახებ კითხვა სტილის გასაგ ჩვენ პირველად კითხვის და გადასვლის გადასვლა აღმოჩენების რეკურენტი ქსელებით, რომლებიც კითხვის შესახებ გადასვლა. შემდეგ ჩვენ მინდომა თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან თავისთან საბოლოოდ ჩვენ მონექტორის ქსელები დავყენებთ, რომ პასუხების პოზაციების პოზაციაციას დაიძებნა. ჩვენ SQuAD მონაცემების სექსპერიმენტების გავაკეთებთ. ერთი მოდელი მიიღება 71.3% წარმოდგენით წარმოდგენითი ტესტის შესაძლებლობის მეტრიკაში, მაგრამ მოდელის შესაძლებლობის მოდელის შესაძლებლობა 75.9%-ში. ჩვენი მოდელეც SQuAD ლიდერბორდის პირველი ადგილი აქვს, რომელიც ერთადერთი და ინსტებლური მოდელზე.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az olvasásértési stílusú kérdések megválaszolására szolgáló zárt önegyező hálózatokat, amelyek egy adott szakaszból származó kérdések megválaszolására irányulnak. Először a kérdést és az áthaladást zárt figyelem alapú visszatérő hálózatokkal egyeztetjük össze, hogy megszerezzük a kérdés-tudatos áthaladást. Ezután javasolunk egy önegyező figyelem mechanizmust, amely finomítja a reprezentációt azáltal, hogy összehasonlítja a folyosót önmagával, ami hatékonyan kódolja az egész folyosóból származó információkat. Végül a mutató hálózatokat alkalmazzuk, hogy megtaláljuk a válaszok helyzetét a részekből. Széleskörű kísérleteket végzünk az SQUAD adatkészleten. Az egyetlen modell 71,3%-ot ér el a rejtett tesztkészleten a pontos egyezés értékelési mutatóinak értékelésében, míg az együttes modell tovább növeli az eredményeket 75,9%-ra. A tanulmány benyújtásának időpontjában modellünk az első helyet foglalja el az SQUAD ranglistáján mind az egyszeres, mind az egyszeres modell esetében.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε τα κλειστά δίκτυα αυτοαντιστοίχισης για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων στυλ κατανόησης ανάγνωσης, τα οποία στοχεύουν στην απάντηση ερωτήσεων από ένα δεδομένο απόσπασμα. Πρώτα αντιστοιχούμε την ερώτηση και το πέρασμα με κλειστά επαναλαμβανόμενα δίκτυα προσοχής για να αποκτήσουμε την αναπαράσταση του περάσματος με επίγνωση των ερωτήσεων. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε έναν αυτο-συμβατό μηχανισμό προσοχής για να βελτιώσουμε την αναπαράσταση ταιριάζοντας το πέρασμα με τον εαυτό του, ο οποίος κωδικοποιεί αποτελεσματικά πληροφορίες από ολόκληρο το πέρασμα. Επιτέλους χρησιμοποιούμε τα δίκτυα δεικτών για να εντοπίσουμε τις θέσεις των απαντήσεων από τα περάσματα. Διεξάγουμε εκτεταμένα πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων του SQuAD. Το ενιαίο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει 71.3% στις μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης της ακριβούς αντιστοιχίας στο κρυφό σετ δοκιμών, ενώ το μοντέλο συνόλου αυξάνει περαιτέρω τα αποτελέσματα στα 75.9%. Κατά την υποβολή της εργασίας, το μοντέλο μας κατέχει την πρώτη θέση στον πίνακα βαθμολογίας τόσο για ενιαίο όσο και για σύνολο μοντέλο.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo le reti gated auto-matching per la risposta alle domande in stile di comprensione della lettura, che mira a rispondere alle domande di un dato passaggio. Per prima cosa abbiniamo la domanda e il passaggio con reti ricorrenti basate sull'attenzione gated per ottenere la rappresentazione del passaggio consapevole della domanda. Poi proponiamo un meccanismo di attenzione auto-matching per affinare la rappresentazione abbinando il passaggio a se stesso, che codifica efficacemente le informazioni provenienti dall'intero passaggio. Impieghiamo infine le reti di puntatori per individuare le posizioni delle risposte dai passaggi. Conduciamo ampi esperimenti sul set di dati SQUAD. Il singolo modello raggiunge il 71,3% sulle metriche di valutazione della corrispondenza esatta sul set di test nascosto, mentre il modello ensemble aumenta ulteriormente i risultati al 75,9%. Al momento della presentazione dell'articolo, il nostro modello detiene il primo posto nella classifica SQUAD sia per il modello singolo che per il modello ensemble.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз сәйкесті желілерді оқу стилінің сұрақтарын оқу үшін көрсетедік. Бұл келтірілген жолдан сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін мақсатты. Біз біріншіден сұрақ мен жүгірткімізді қайталау желілерімен біріншіден сұрақтарды қайталау үшін сұрақ мен жүгірткімізге сәйкес келеді. Содан кейін біз өзімізге сәйкес келетін қызметті өзімізге сәйкес келетін механизмін таңдап береміз. Бұл өзіміздің мәліметті толық пайдасынан кодтамыз. Соңғы уақытта мәліметтердің жауаптарын табу үшін меңзер желілерін қолданамыз. SQuAD деректер жиынында кеңейтілген тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Бір үлгі жасырылған сынақтар жинақтағы дұрыс сәйкестік метрикаларының 71, 3% дегенге жеткізеді, жұмыс үлгісінің нәтижесін 75, 9% дегенге көтереді. Қағазды жіберу кезінде, біздің үлгіміз SQuAD лидер бордындағы бірінші жерді жалғыз, жалғыз үлгілер үшін болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome vartus atitinkančius tinklus skaityti supratimo stiliui atsakyti į klausimus, kuriais siekiama atsakyti į klausimus iš tam tikros dalies. Pirmiausia mes sutampame su klausimu ir perėjimu su perėjimu prie vartų grindžiamais nuolatiniais tinklais, kad gautume klausimu žinomą perėjimo atstovavimą. Tada pasiūlysime savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmą, kad būtų patobulintas atstovavimas, suderinant perėjimą su savimi, kuris veiksmingai koduoja informaciją iš viso perėjimo. Galiausiai naudojame rodytuvų tinklus, kad rastume atsakymų iš kelių vietas. We conduct extensive experiments on the SQuAD dataset.  Vienas modelis pasiekia 71,3 % tikslios atitikties slepiamame bandymų rinkinyje vertinimo rodiklių, o komplekso modelis toliau didina rezultatus iki 75,9 %. Dokumento pateikimo metu mūsų modelis pirmą vietą užima SQuAD pavyzdyje tiek vieno modelio, tiek ensemblio modelio atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ги претставуваме отворените мрежи за самоодговарање за читање одговори на прашањата во стилот на разбирање, кои имаат за цел одговор на прашањата од одреден премин. Прво го совпаѓаме прашањето и преминот со повторни мрежи базирани на внимание за да добиеме представување на преминот со свесност за прашања. Потоа предложуваме механизам на внимание кој ќе го пофинира претставувањето со споредување на преминот против себе, кој ефикасно ги кодира информациите од целиот премин. Конечно ги користиме мрежите за покажување за да ги лоцираме позициите на одговорите од премините. Правиме експерименти на SQuAD податоците. Единствениот модел постигнува 71,3 отсто од проценките на метриката на точната одговараност на скриениот тестовен сет, додека моделот на ансемблот понатаму ги зголемува резултатите на 75,9 отсто. Во времето на поднесувањето на весникот, нашиот модел е на прво место на водечката табла на СКАД за моделот на единствениот и ансемблот.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian yang sepadan dengan diri untuk membaca jawapan soalan gaya pemahaman, yang bertujuan untuk menjawab soalan dari satu laluan tertentu. Pertama kita sepadan soalan dan laluan dengan rangkaian berkurang berdasarkan perhatian gerbang untuk mendapatkan perwakilan laluan yang sedar soalan. Kemudian kita cadangkan mekanisme perhatian yang sepadan dengan diri sendiri untuk memperbaiki perwakilan dengan sepadan dengan laluan melawan diri sendiri, yang secara efektif mengekodkan maklumat dari seluruh laluan. Akhirnya kami menggunakan rangkaian penunjuk untuk mencari kedudukan jawapan dari laluan. Kami melakukan eksperimen luas pada set data SQuAD. Model tunggal mencapai 71.3% pada metrik penilaian persamaan pada set ujian tersembunyi, sementara model ensemble meningkatkan keputusan ke 75.9%. Pada masa penghantaran kertas, model kita memegang tempat pertama di papan pemimpin SQuAD untuk model tunggal dan ensemble.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം പൊരുത്തുന്ന നെറ്ററുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന് വായിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ് സ്വയം പൊരുതുന്ന ചോദ്യങ We first match the question and passage with gated attention-based recurrent networks to obtain the question-aware passage representation.  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം പൊരുത്തുന്ന ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമിനെ പ്രതിനിധിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്ഥ അവസാനം നമ്മള്\u200d പോയിന്റര്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പാസ്സേജില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d. എസ്കുവാഡ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. ഒറ്റയ്ക്കുള്ള ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d കൃത്യമായ മെറ്റിക്ക് മെറ്റിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഏകദേശം 71. 3% പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. ഈ മ പേപ്പറിനെ കീഴ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്ക്വാഡ് നേതാവിന്റെ ആദ്യ സ്ഥലം എസ്ക്വാഡിന്റെ നേതാവിന്റെ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрсдийгөө холбоотой сүлжээг уншиж, ойлголтын хэлбэрийн асуултын хариултын тулд хариулт өгөх зорилготой. Бид анхны дараа асуулт, дахин дахин анхаарлаа хандуулсан дахин дахин анхаарлаа хандуулсан сүлжээнд холбоотой. Тэгээд бид өөрсдийгөө тэнцүү анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийг санал болгоно. Энэ нь өөрсдийгөө өөрсдийгөө тэнцүү байдлаар илэрхийлж байгаа. Энэ нь бүх цаашаас мэдээллийг шинэчлэх боломжтой. Эцэст нь бид заагуудын хариултыг олж мэдэх заагуудын сүлжээг ашигладаг. Бид SQuAD өгөгдлийн сан дээр маш их туршилтыг хийдэг. Нэг загвар нь нуугдаж буй шалгалтын тооцоололтын метриктикийн 71.3%-д хүрээдэг. Харин загвар нь үр дүнг 75.9%-д нэмэгдүүлдэг. Цаг дамжуулах үед бидний загвар нь SQuAD удирдагч буудалд хамгийн анхны загвар нь нэг болон загварын загварын хувьд байдаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy gated self-matching sieci do odpowiedzi na pytania w stylu zrozumienia czytania, których celem jest odpowiedź na pytania z danego fragmentu. Najpierw dopasowujemy pytanie i przejście do sieci powtarzających opartych na uwadze, aby uzyskać reprezentację przejścia świadomego pytania. Następnie proponujemy samodzielnie dopasowujący się mechanizm uwagi, aby udoskonalić reprezentację poprzez dopasowanie fragmentu do siebie, który skutecznie koduje informacje z całego fragmentu. W końcu używamy sieci wskaźników, aby zlokalizować pozycje odpowiedzi z fragmentów. Przeprowadzamy szerokie eksperymenty na zbiorze danych SQuAD. Pojedynczy model osiąga 71,3% na wskaźnikach oceny dokładnego dopasowania na ukrytym zestawie testowym, podczas gdy model zespołu dodatkowo zwiększa wyniki do 75,9%. W momencie składania artykułu nasz model zajmuje pierwsze miejsce w rankingu SQuAD zarówno dla modelu pojedynczego, jak i zespołowego.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi samsvarande nettverk for å lesa forstålsstilspørsmål, som mål svara på spørsmål frå eit gitt passage. Vi passar først med spørsmålet og passasjonen med oppmerksbaserte rekurserande nettverk for å få opp representasjonen av passasjonen frå spørsmålet. Så foreslår vi ein selvpassende oppmerksmekanisme for å refinera representasjonen ved å passa mot seg selv, som effektivt koder informasjon frå heile passaget. Vi bruker til slutt peikarnettverket for å finna posisjonane på svara frå passagene. Vi gjev ekstra eksperimenter på SQuAD- datasettet. Den enkelte modellen oppnår 71,3% av evalueringsmetrikane med nøyaktig treff på den gøymde testsettet, mens modellen for ensemblen framover aukar resultatet til 75,9%. Når papiret vert sendt, har modellen vårt første plass på SQuAD-lederbordet for både enkelt og ensembelt modell.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm rețelele gated auto-potrivire pentru răspunsul la întrebări în stil de înțelegere a citirii, care își propune să răspundă la întrebări dintr-un pasaj dat. Mai întâi potrivim întrebarea și pasajul cu rețele recurente bazate pe atenție închisă pentru a obține reprezentarea pasajului conștient de întrebare. Apoi propunem un mecanism de atenție auto-potrivit pentru a rafina reprezentarea prin potrivirea pasajului cu el însuși, care codifică eficient informația din întregul pasaj. În cele din urmă folosim rețelele indicatoare pentru a localiza pozițiile răspunsurilor din pasaje. Efectuăm experimente extinse pe setul de date SQUAD. Modelul unic atinge 71,3% din valorile de evaluare a potrivirii exacte pe setul de test ascuns, în timp ce modelul ansamblu mărește rezultatele la 75,9%. La momentul depunerii lucrării, modelul nostru ocupă primul loc în clasamentul SQUAD atât pentru modelul single, cât și pentru ansamblu.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo samostalne mreže za èitanje odgovora na stil razumevanja, koja je cilj da odgovori na pitanja iz odreðenog prolaza. Prvo odgovaramo pitanju i prolazu sa povratnim mrežama na temelju pažnje da bi dobili predstavu prolaza svjesnog pitanja. Onda predlažemo mehanizam pažnje koji odgovara samostalnoj pažnji kako bi refinirao zastupanje odgovarajući prolazu protiv sebe, koji efektivno kodira informacije iz cijelog prolaza. Konačno zapošljavamo mreže pokazivača da pronađemo pozicije odgovora iz prolaza. Provodimo široke eksperimente na SQuAD dataset. Jedini model postiže 71,3% na procenacijskoj metrici taènog poklapanja na skrivenom setu testova, dok model ensemble dodatno povećava rezultate na 75,9%. U vreme podnošenja papira, naš model drži prvo mesto na vodećoj tabli SQuAD i za jednostavan i ensemble model.', 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu keenaynaa shabakado isku mid ah si aan u akhriyo jawaabta su'aalaha hoose, taas oo looga jeediyo su'aalaha ka jawaaba baasabka la siiyey. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu la xiriirnaa su'aalka iyo baaritaanka sida loo soo jeedo shabakado dib u soo socda si aan u helno wadashada baaritaanka la aqoonsan. Markaas waxaynu horumarinaynaa meyminimo isu eg, in lagu hagaajiyo baasabka ka geesta ah, taasoo si faa’iido leh uga kooban macluumaadka baasabka oo dhan. Ugu dambaysta waxaan shaqaynaynaa shabakada hagaha si aan uga helno meelaha jawaabaha baasaboorada. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo badan oo ku saabsan SQuAD-ka. Tusaale kaliya wuxuu gaadhaa 71.3% qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta isku mid ah oo ku qoran saxda imtixaanka qarsoon, marka midowga samoolku wuxuu kordhiyaa midhihiisa 75,9 boqolkiiba. Marka la soo dhiibo warqadda, modellkayagu wuxuu ugu horeeyaa hogaamiyaha SQuAD ee hal iyo mid kamid ah.", 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පිළිබඳින් කියවන්න සඳහා ස්වයංග සම්බන්ධ ජාලය පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200d අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ ඊට පස්සේ අපි ස්වාමිකයෙන් සම්බන්ධ අවධාන පද්ධතියක් සැකසුම් කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විසින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සම්බන්ධ ක අපි අන්තිමේදී පොයින්ටර් ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න. අපි SQuAD දත්ත සෙට් එකේ විශාල පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ. එකම නිර්මාණය 71.3% පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා හැංගුණු පරීක්ෂණ සෙට්ටුවේ සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනව පැත්තට පිළිගන්න වෙලාවට, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්කෙන් සහ සංවිධානය සඳහා SQuAD ප්\u200dරධානයේ පළමු තැන තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi gated self-matchning nätverk för läsförståelse stil frågesvar, som syftar till att besvara frågor från en given passage. Vi matchar först frågan och passagen med gated uppmärksamhetsbaserade återkommande nätverk för att få den frågemedvetna passagerrepresentationen. Sedan föreslår vi en självmatchande uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att förfina representationen genom att matcha passagen mot sig själv, vilket effektivt kodar information från hela passagen. Vi använder slutligen pekarnätverken för att lokalisera positionerna för svar från passagerna. Vi genomför omfattande experiment på SQUAD datauppsättningen. Enkla modellen uppnår 71,3% av utvärderingsmåtten för exakt matchning på den dolda testuppsättningen, medan ensemblemodellen ytterligare ökar resultaten till 75,9%. Vid tidpunkten för inlämning av uppsatsen innehar vår modell första plats på SQUAD leaderboard för både singel- och ensemblemodell.', 'mt': "In this paper, we present the gated self-matching networks for reading comprehension style question answering, which aims to answer questions from a given passage.  L-ewwel nagħmlu tqabbil mal-mistoqsija u l-passaġġ man-netwerks rikorrenti bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni miftuħa biex inkisbu r-rappreżentanza tal-passaġġ konxju mill-mistoqsijiet. Imbagħad nipproponu mekkaniżmu ta' attenzjoni li jixbah lilu nnifsu biex ir-rappreżentazzjoni tiġi raffinata billi l-passaġġ jitqabbel ma' lilu nnifsu, li effettivament jikkodifika l-informazzjoni mill-passaġġ kollu. Fl-aħħar nett aħna nużaw in-netwerks tal-indikaturi biex jinstabu l-pożizzjonijiet tat-tweġibiet mill-passaġġi. Aħna nieħdu esperimenti estensivi fuq is-sett tad-dejta SQuAD. Il-mudell uniku jilħaq 71.3% fuq il-metriċi tal-evalwazzjoni ta’ tqabbil eżatt fuq is-sett tat-test moħbi, filwaqt li l-mudell tal-ensemble ikompli jsaħħaħ ir-riżultati għal 75.9%. Fil-mument tal-preżentazzjoni tal-karta, il-mudell tagħna għandu l-ewwel post fuq it-tabella ewlenija tal-SQuAD kemm għall-mudell uniku kif ukoll għall-mudell ensemble.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கடவுச்சோதனையில் இருந்து கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ள பாணியில் உள்ள த நாங்கள் முதலில் கேள்வி மற்றும் கடவுச் செல்லும் பொருத்தம் கேள்வி அறிந்து கொள்ளும் கடவுச் செல்லும் பொருட் பின்னர் நாம் தன்னை எதிராக பொருந்தும் கடவுச் செல்லும் பொருத்து தன்னை ஒத்திசைக்கும் கவனம் முறைமையை புதுப்பிக்க ஒரு தி இறுதியாக நாம் புள்ளியிடும் வலைப்பின்னல்களை வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும் கடவுச்செல்லும் பதில்களின் நிலை We conduct extensive experiments on the SQuAD dataset.  ஒற்றை மாதிரி மறைந்த சோதனை அமைப்பில் சரியான பொருத்தத்தின் மதிப்பின் முறைகளில் 71. 3% பெறுகிறது, ஆனால் ஒட்டும் மாதிரி முடிவுகளை 75. 9 காகிதத்தை ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் போது, எங்கள் மாதிரி முதல் இடத்தை SQuAD தலைப்பில் இருவரும் ஒற்றை மற்றும் ஒற்றை மாதிரிக்', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے سمجھنے کے سبب سؤال کے جواب کے لئے گھیرے ہوئے خود مطابق نیٹ ورک کو پیش کیا ہے، جس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک مقررہ مسافر سے سوال جواب دیں۔ ہم پہلی بار سوال اور مسافرت کے ساتھ مسافرتے ہیں کہ سوال سے بے خبر مسافرت کی تصویر حاصل کریں۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک اپنا مکانیسم پیش کریں گے کہ اپنے خلاف مسافر کے مطابق نمایش کو دفع کریں، جو تمام مسافر سے اطلاعات کو اثبات کے ساتھ کوڈ کرتا ہے. ہم بالآخر پینٹر نیٹورک کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ مسافروں سے جواب کے موقعیت کو تلاش کریں. ہم SQuAD ڈیٹ سٹ پر بڑی آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ ایک موڈل نے 71.3% کو پوشیدہ تست سٹ کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مطابق پہنچ لیا ہے، حالانکہ اننسامبل موڈل اس سے زیادہ نتائج 75.9% تک اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ کاغذ کے تحویل کے وقت، ہماری مدل پہلی جگہ SQuAD لیڈربورڈ کے لئے ایک اور انامبل موڈل کے لئے ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz o'qishga o'xshagan o'xshash tarmoqni o'qish uchun o'zgarib kelamiz. Bu gapiradigan maxfiy soʻzlardan javob berishi mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Keyin biz o'zimga o'xshash paydo bo'lgan o'zgarishni tasavvur qilamiz. Bu hamma maxfiy soʻzdagi maʼlumot yordamida qo'llanmagan. Endi biz yozish tarmoqlarini ishlayapmiz va maxfiy soʻzlardan javoblarni topish uchun. Biz SQuAD maʼlumotlar sohasida katta eksport qilamiz. The single model achieves 71.3% on the evaluation metrics of exact match on the hidden test set, while the ensemble model further boosts the results to 75.9%.  Qogʻoz joʻnatish vaqtida, bizning modelmiz SQuAD boshqaruvchidagi birinchi marta birinchi boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu các mạng lưới tự thân gắn kết với nhau để đọc câu hỏi kiểu hiểu rộng để trả lời câu hỏi, nhằm mục đích trả lời câu hỏi từ một đoạn nào đó. Trước tiên chúng ta kết hợp câu hỏi và thông qua với hệ thống thông tin thông thường được dán kín để có được sự phân phối thông tin. Rồi chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ chế tập trung tương ứng để lọc mẫu bằng cách so sánh đoạn đi ngược lại chính nó, nó thực sự mã hóa thông tin từ to àn bộ đoạn. Chúng ta cuối cùng cũng dùng mạng đèn rọi để xác định vị trí các câu trả lời từ các đoạn đó. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên bộ dữ liệu SQurAD. Mô hình duy nhất đạt được 71.3=)) so với tỷ lệ đánh giá chính xác tương ứng trên bộ thử ẩn, trong khi mô hình chung kết hợp nâng cao kết quả lên 75.9=. Vào thời điểm đăng ký giấy, mẫu của chúng ta là mẫu đầu tiên trên bảng lãnh đạo SQurAD cho cả mô hình đơn và kết hợp.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме затворените мрежи за самосъвпадение за четене стил отговор на въпроси, които имат за цел да отговорят на въпроси от даден пасаж. Първо сравняваме въпроса и пасажа с затворени, базирани на вниманието повтарящи се мрежи, за да получим представление за пасажа, осъзнаващо въпросите. След това предлагаме механизъм за самосъвпадение на вниманието, който да усъвършенства представянето чрез съвпадение на пасажа със самия него, който ефективно кодира информацията от целия пасаж. Най-накрая използваме насочващите мрежи, за да открием позициите на отговорите от пасажите. Провеждаме обширни експерименти върху набора от данни SQuAD. Единичният модел постига 71.3% от показателите за оценка на точното съвпадение на скрития тест комплект, докато ансамбълният модел допълнително повишава резултатите до 75.9%. Към момента на подаване на доклада нашият модел заема първото място в класацията както за единичен, така и за ансамбъл модел.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we de gated self-matching netwerken voor het beantwoorden van vragen in leesbegripsstijl, die gericht is op het beantwoorden van vragen uit een bepaalde passage. We matchen eerst de vraag en passage met gated attention-based recurrent networks om de vraagbewuste passage representatie te verkrijgen. Vervolgens stellen we een zelfovereenkomend aandachtsmechanisme voor om de voorstelling te verfijnen door de passage tegen zichzelf te matchen, wat effectief informatie van de hele passage codeert. We gebruiken tenslotte de pointernetwerken om de posities van antwoorden uit de passages te lokaliseren. We voeren uitgebreide experimenten uit op de SQuAD dataset. Het enkelvoudige model bereikt 71,3% op de evaluatiestatistieken van de exacte match op de verborgen testset, terwijl het ensemblemodel de resultaten verder verhoogt tot 75,9%. Op het moment van indiening van de paper, heeft ons model de eerste plaats op het SQuAD leaderboard voor zowel single als ensemble model.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi de gated self-matchende netværk til læseforståelse stil spørgsmål besvarelse, som har til formål at besvare spørgsmål fra en given passage. Vi matcher først spørgsmålet og passagen med gated opmærksomhedsbaserede tilbagevendende netværk for at opnå den spørgsmålsbevidste passagerrepræsentation. Så foreslår vi en selvmatchende opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at forfine repræsentationen ved at matche passagen mod sig selv, som effektivt koder information fra hele passagen. Vi anvender endelig pointer netværket til at lokalisere positionerne af svar fra passagererne. Vi udfører omfattende eksperimenter på SQUAD datasættet. Den enkelte model opnår 71,3% på evalueringsmålene for nøjagtig match på det skjulte testsæt, mens ensemblemodellen øger resultaterne yderligere til 75,9%. På tidspunktet for indsendelse af papiret har vores model førstepladsen på SQUAD leaderboard for både enkelt og ensemble model.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo prikupljene vlastite mreže za čitanje pitanja na stilu razumijevanja, koja je cilj odgovoriti na pitanja iz određenog prolaza. Prvo odgovaramo pitanju i prolazu s povratnim mrežama na temelju pažnje kako bi dobili zastupanje prolaza svjesnog pitanja. Onda predlažemo mehanizam pažnje koji odgovara samostalnom odgovarajućem prema zastupanju odgovarajući prolazu protiv sebe, koji učinkovito kodira informacije iz cijelog prolaza. Konačno zapošljavamo mreže pokazatelja kako bi pronašli pozicije odgovora iz prolaza. Provodimo široke eksperimente na SQuAD dataset. Jedini model postiže 71,3% na procjenama metrika to čnog poklapanja na skrivenim testovima, dok model ensemble dodatno povećava rezultate na 75,9%. U vrijeme podnošenja papira, naš model drži prvo mjesto na vodećoj ploči SQuAD-a i za jednostavan i ensemble model.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die Gated Self-Matching Netzwerke zur Beantwortung von Fragen im Leseverständnisstil vor, die darauf abzielen, Fragen aus einer bestimmten Passage zu beantworten. Zunächst gleichen wir die Frage und Passage mit Gated aufmerksamkeitsbasierten wiederkehrenden Netzwerken ab, um die fragebewusste Passage-Repräsentation zu erhalten. Dann schlagen wir einen selbstpassenden Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus vor, um die Darstellung zu verfeinern, indem wir die Passage mit sich selbst abgleichen, wodurch Informationen aus der gesamten Passage effektiv kodiert werden. Schließlich verwenden wir die Zeigernetzwerke, um die Positionen der Antworten aus den Passagen zu lokalisieren. Wir führen umfangreiche Experimente am SQuAD Datensatz durch. Das Einzelmodell erreicht 71,3% auf die Bewertungsmetriken der exakten Übereinstimmung auf dem versteckten Testset, während das Ensemblemodell die Ergebnisse weiter auf 75,9% steigert. Zum Zeitpunkt der Einreichung des Beitrags belegt unser Modell den ersten Platz in der SQuAD-Rangliste sowohl für Einzel- als auch für Ensemble-Modell.', 'id': 'In this paper, we present the gated self-matching networks for reading comprehension style question answering, which aims to answer questions from a given passage.  Pertama kita cocok pertanyaan dan laluan dengan jaringan rekuren berdasarkan perhatian gerbang untuk mendapatkan perwakilan jalan yang sadar pertanyaan. Kemudian kita mengusulkan mekanisme perhatian yang cocok dengan diri sendiri untuk memperbaiki representation dengan cocok dengan laluan melawan dirinya sendiri, yang secara efektif mengkode informasi dari seluruh laluan. Akhirnya kita menggunakan jaringan penunjuk untuk menemukan posisi jawaban dari jalur. Kami melakukan eksperimen ekstensif pada set data SQuAD. Model tunggal mencapai 71,3% pada metrik evaluasi persis cocok pada set tes tersembunyi, sementara model ensemble meningkatkan hasilnya ke 75,9%. Pada saat pengiriman kertas, model kami memegang tempat pertama di papan pemimpin SQuAD untuk model tunggal dan ensemble.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 읽기 이해식 문답의 문 제어 자동 일치 네트워크를 제기하여 주어진 문장에 대한 질문에 대답하고자 한다.우리는 먼저 문제와 문장을 문 제어 주의를 바탕으로 하는 순환 네트워크와 일치시켜 문제의 감지를 얻는 문장 표시를 한다.그 다음에 우리는 문장을 자신과 일치시켜 표징을 세분화함으로써 전체 문장의 정보를 효과적으로 인코딩하는 자기 일치 주의 메커니즘을 제시했다.마지막으로, 우리는 지침 네트워크를 사용하여 단락의 답안의 위치를 정한다.우리는 단체 데이터 집합에서 대량의 실험을 진행하였다.단일 모델은 숨겨진 테스트 집합에서 정확하게 일치하는 평가 지표에서 71.3%에 달했고 집적 모델은 결과를 75.9%로 높였다.논문을 제출할 때 우리의 모델은 단일체와 전체 모델의 단체 랭킹에서 모두 1위를 차지했다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما شبکه\u200cهای خودسازی را برای خواندن جواب سوال\u200cهای سبک درک را نشان می\u200cدهیم، که هدف می\u200cدهد جواب سوال\u200cها از یک مسیر داده شود. اولین بار با این سوال و مسیر با شبکه\u200cهای دوباره\u200cای که بر روی توجه بسته\u200cاند، مسابقه می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش مسیر آگاهی از سوال را بدست بیاوریم. سپس ما یک مکانیسم توجه خود را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش را با هماهنگ با گذشته بر خلاف خودش تغییر دهیم، که عملاً اطلاعات را از کل گذشته رمز می\u200cکند. بالاخره شبکه اشاره\u200cکننده\u200cها را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا موقعیت جواب\u200cها از مسیر\u200cها را پیدا کنیم. ما آزمایشات زیادی روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای SQuAD انجام می\u200cدهیم. تنها مدل 71.3 درصد از متریک ارزیابی دقیقاً مسابقه\u200cای در مجموعه آزمایش مخفی می\u200cرسد، در حالی که مدل آزمایش بیشتر نتیجه\u200cها را به 75.9 درصد افزایش می\u200cدهد. در زمان تحویل کاغذ، مدل ما اولین جایی را در بورد رهبر SQuAD برای هر مدل تک و انجمل نگه می دارد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mitandao yenye kujifananisha kwa kusoma swali la msingi la msingi la kujibu, ambalo linakusudia kujibu maswali kutoka kwa upatikanaji ulio pewa. Kwanza tunaunganisha swali na upatikanaji kwa mitandao yanayohusiana na hisia za mara kwa mara ili kupata uwakilishi wa upatikanaji wa swali unaoeleweka. Kisha tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujiunganisha kujilinda ili kurekebisha uwakilishi kwa kuunganisha upatikanaji dhidi ya nafsi yake, ambao kwa ufanisi unajumuisha taarifa kutoka kwa njia nzima. Hatimaye tunatumia mitandao ya pointer ili kuweka nafasi ya majibu kutoka kwenye njia. Tunafanya majaribio mengi kwenye seti ya data ya SQuAD. Mradi mmoja unaweza kufikia asilimia 71.3 kuhusu mbinu za uchunguzi sahihi kwenye seti ya jaribio lililofichikana, wakati mfumo huo unaongeza matokeo ya asilimia 75.9. At the time of submission of the paper, our model holds the first place on the SQuAD leaderboard for both single and ensemble model.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim rrjetet e portave të vetëpërshtatshme për leximin e pyetjeve të stilit të kuptimit, që synojnë të përgjigjen pyetjeve nga një pasazh i caktuar. Ne së pari përputhemi me pyetjen dhe pasazhin me rrjetet e përsëritura të mbështetura në vëmendje për të marrë përfaqësimin e pasazhit të ndërgjegjshëm në pyetje. Pastaj propozojmë një mekanizëm vetëpërshtatjeje vëmendjeje për të përmirësuar përfaqësimin duke përshtatur pasazhin kundër vetes, i cili efektivisht kodon informacionin nga e gjithë pasazhi. Ne përfundimisht përdorim rrjetet tregues për të gjetur pozicionet e përgjigjeve nga pasazhet. Ne bëjmë eksperimente të gjera në sistemin e të dhënave SQuAD. Modeli i vetëm arrin 71.3% në metrikat e vlerësimit të përputhjes ekzakte në grupin e fshehtë të testit, ndërsa modeli i ansamblit rrit më tej rezultatet në 75.9%. Në kohën e paraqitjes së gazetës, modeli ynë mban vendin e parë në bordin kryesor të SQuAD për modelin e vetëm dhe të ensembleve.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የራሳቸውን ተቃውሞ የማነብ ጥያቄን ለመቀበል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ We first match the question and passage with gated attention-based recurrent networks to obtain the question-aware passage representation.  ከዚህም በኋላ የራሳችን ተቃውሞ አካሄዱን በተቃወመ ማሳየት ማሰናከል እናስባለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም የመግቢያውን ቦታዎች ለመግኘት የጥያቄውን መረብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በSQuAD ዳታተር ላይ ብዙ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ አንድ ሞዴል በተሰወረ ፈተና ማሰቃየት ላይ ያሳያል 71.3 በመቶ ማድረግ ይደረጋል፡፡ የሕልመት ወቅት በመስጠት ጊዜ ምሳሌያችን በSQuAD መሪ ላይ የመጀመሪያውን ቦታ ለብቻው እና በሙሉ ሞዴል ይይዛል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz ähli ýerleşýän şebekeleri düşünme stili soraglarynyň jogaplaryny okamak üçin görkezip berýäris, bu bolup berilen geçişden soraglary jogaplamaga maksady. Biz ilk defa sorgulara ve geçmesine göz kulak alan tekrarlı ağlarla eşleşiyoruz. Sonra biz özüne eşleşen bir üns meýdançası teklif edip, geçişi özüne eşleşen şekilde ifade etmek üçin bu şekilde bütün geçişden bilgi kodlaýar. Biz soňunda çykyşlaryň jogabynyň ýerlerini tapmak üçin işaretçi aňlaryny ulanýarys. SQuAD veri setinde örän çarpyş bardyk. Tek nusga ajaýyp testiň düzeninde diňe meýdança metriklerinde 71.3% tapyldy we ensembleme nusgasyny 75.9% artdyr. Kagyzyň üýtgetmeginiň wagtynda, biziň modelimiz SQuAD liderboarda ilkinji gezek hem bir nusga üçin bar.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ինքնահամապատասխանող ցանցերը ընթերցանելու համար ընկալումների ոճի հարցերի պատասխաններ տալու համար, որոնք նպատակով են պատասխանել հարցերին որոշ հատվածից: Առաջին հերթին մենք համապատասխանում ենք հարցին և անցումին ուշադրության վրա հիմնված հաճախորդ ցանցերի հետ, որպեսզի ստանանք հարցերով գիտակցած անցումի ներկայացումը: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք ինքնահամապատասխանող ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի բարելավենք ներկայացումը՝ համապատասխանելով իր հակառակ հատվածը, որը արդյունավետ կոդավորում է տեղեկատվությունը ամբողջ հատվածից: Մենք վերջապես օգտագործում ենք ցուցադրող ցանցերը, որպեսզի գտնենք պատասխանների դիրքերը անցքերից: Մենք կատարում ենք SQUADի տվյալների համակարգի մեծ փորձարկումներ: Միայն մոդելը ստանում է 71.3 տոկոսը թաքնված փորձարկումների համապատասխանության գնահատման չափումների վրա, մինչդեռ համակարգչային մոդելը ավելի շատ բարձրացնում է արդյունքները մինչև 75.9 տոկոսը: Թղթի ներկայացման ժամանակ մեր մոդելը առաջին հերթին է գտնվում SQUADի առաջնորդների մոդելի վրա միայն մեկ մոդելի, ինչպես նաև ամբողջ մոդելի համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, biz özümüzə uyuşan a ğları anlama stillərinin cavabı vermək üçün göstərdik, bu da verilən keçmişdən sorulara cavab vermək istəyirik. Biz ilk dəfə soruşmağı və keçməsini soruşmağı bilmədiyimiz keçmə göstəricisi ilə dəstəkləndirilən məlumatlarla birlikdə eşidirik. Sonra özümüzə qarşı keçiş ilə, bütün keçmişdən məlumatları kodlamaq üçün özümüzə uyğun tərzi ilə təmizlənmək üçün özümüzə uyğun tərzini təklif edirik. Sonunda, yolların cevaplarını tapmaq üçün göstərici ağlarını istifadə edirik. SquAD veri quruluğunda geniş təcrübələr etdik. Tek modellər gizli sınama qutusunda tam uyğunluğun metriklərinin 71.3%-ini qəbul edir, çünki ensemble modeli sonuçlarını 75.9%-ə artırar. Kağıt təsdiqlənməsi vaxtında, modellərimiz SQuAD liderbordlarının ilk yerini hər ikisinin və ensemble modeli üçün tutar.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশ্নের উত্তর পাঠানোর জন্য গেটেড নেটওয়ার্ক উপস্থাপন করছি, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি প্রযুক্ত পা প্রশ্নের প্রথমে আমরা প্রশ্ন এবং পাসেজের সাথে প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করার জন্য প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদা তারপর আমরা নিজের বিরুদ্ধে প্যাসেজের সাথে মিলিত করার মাধ্যমে নিজেদের প্রতিনিধির প্রতিনিধিত্ব সুস্পষ্ট করার একটি আত্মসমর্থ শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা পয়েন্টার নেটওয়ার্ক চাকরি পাসপেজ থেকে উত্তরের অবস্থান খুঁজে বের করার জন্য। আমরা SQuAD ডাটাসেটে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা করি। একটি মডেল গোপন পরীক্ষা সেটে সঠিক ম্যাচের মূল্যের মেট্রিকে ৭১. ৩% অর্জন করে, এবং এনএমবেল মডেলের ফলাফল ৭৫. ৯%। কাগজপত্র প্রদান করার সময়, আমাদের মডেল স্কুয়াড নেতৃবোর্ডে প্রথম স্থান রয়েছে এক এবং একান্ত মডেলের জন্য।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo samostalne mreže za čitanje pitanja na stilu razumijevanja, koja je cilj odgovoriti na pitanja iz određenog prolaza. Prvo odgovaramo pitanju i prolazu sa povratnim mrežama na temelju pažnje kako bi dobili predstavu prolaza svjesnog pitanja. Onda predlažemo mehanizam pažnje koji odgovara samostalnoj pažnji kako bi refinirao zastupanje odgovarajući prolazu protiv sebe, koji efektivno kodira informacije iz cijelog prolaza. Konačno zapošljavamo mreže pokazivača da pronađemo pozicije odgovora iz prolaza. Provodimo široke eksperimente na SQuAD dataset. Jedini model postiže 71,3% na procjenama metrika to čnog poklapanja na skrivenom setu testova, dok model ensemble dodatno povećava rezultate na 75,9%. U vrijeme podnošenja papira, naš model drži prvo mjesto na vodećoj tabli SQuAD-a za jednostavan i ensemble model.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme gated self-matching sítě pro odpověď na otázky ve stylu porozumění čtení, která si klade za cíl odpovědět na otázky z dané pasáže. Nejprve porovnáme otázku a pasáž s opakovanými sítěmi založenými na pozornosti, abychom získali reprezentaci pasáže vědomé otázky. Následně navrhujeme samoodpovídající mechanismus pozornosti, který upřesňuje reprezentaci tím, že pasáž porovnává se sebou, což efektivně kóduje informace z celého pasáže. Nakonec používáme ukazovací sítě k nalezení pozic odpovědí z pasáží. Provádíme rozsáhlé experimenty na datové sadě SQuAD. Jednotlivý model dosahuje 71,3% hodnotících metrik přesné shody na skryté testovací sadě, zatímco souborový model dále zvyšuje výsledky na 75,9%. V době předložení příspěvku zaujímá náš model první místo v žebříčku SQuAD jak pro jednotlivý, tak pro souborový model.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame suletud isesobivuse võrgustikke lugemise mõistmise stiilis küsimustele vastamiseks, mille eesmärk on vastata antud lõigu küsimustele. Esmalt sobitame küsimuse ja läbipääsu suletud tähelepanu põhinevate korduvate võrkudega, et saada küsimusteadlik läbipääsu esitus. Seejärel pakume välja isesobiva tähelepanumehhanismi, et täpsustada esitust, sobitades läbipääsu enda vastu, mis tõhusalt kodeerib kogu läbipääsu informatsiooni. Lõpuks kasutame osutajate võrgustikke, et leida punktidest vastuste positsioonid. Me teeme ulatuslikke katseid SQuAD andmekogumiga. Üksikmudel saavutab varjatud testikomplekti täpse sobivuse hindamise näitajate osas 71,3%, samas kui ansambli mudel tõstab tulemusi veelgi 75,9%ni. Töö esitamise ajal on meie mudel esimene koht SQuAD edetabelis nii ühe- kui ansamblimudeli puhul.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem les xarxes portades d'auto-comparació per llegir respostes a preguntes d'estil de comprensió, que busquen respondre a preguntes d'un passatge determinat. Primer encaixem la pregunta i el passatge amb xarxes recurrents basades en atenció portada per obtenir la representació del passatge conscient de preguntes. Llavors proposem un mecanisme d'atenció auto-equivalent per refinar la representació equivalent el passatge amb ell mateix, que codifica eficaçment la informació de tot el passatge. Finalment utilitzem les xarxes d'indicadors per localitzar les posicions de les respostes dels passatges. Fem experiments extensos en el conjunt de dades SQuAD. El model únic aconsegueix el 71,3% en les mètriques d'evaluació de la coincidencia exacta en el conjunt ocult de prova, mentre que el model d'ensemble augmenta més els resultats al 75,9%. En el moment de la presentació del paper, el nostre model té el primer lloc en la taula de líder de la SQuAD tant per a un model únic com per a un ensemble.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään suljetut itsevastaavuusverkostot lukuymmärrystyyliin kysymyksiin vastaamiseen, joiden tavoitteena on vastata tietyn kohdan kysymyksiin. Ensin vastaamme kysymystä ja läpikulkua suljettuihin huomiopohjaisiin toistuviin verkostoihin saadaksemme kysymystietoisen läpikulkuesityksen. Sitten ehdotamme omatoimista huomiomekanismia, jolla tarkennetaan esitystä sovittamalla kulku itseään vastaan, joka tehokkaasti koodaa koko kulkueen tiedot. Lopuksi käytämme osoitinverkostoja löytääksemme kohtien vastausten sijainnit. Teemme laajoja kokeita SQuAD-aineistolla. Yksittäinen malli saavuttaa 71,3% tarkan vastaavuuden arviointimetriikassa piilotetussa testisarjassa, kun taas ensemble-malli nostaa tuloksia edelleen 75,9 prosenttiin. Työn jättämisen yhteydessä mallimme on SQuAD:n ykkössijalla sekä single- että ensemble-mallissa.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons die gated self-ooreenstemmende netwerke voorsien vir die lees van verstandige styl vraag antwoord, wat doel om vrae te antwoord van 'n gegewe pad. Ons het eerste ooreenstem met die vraag en verbygegang met aandag gebaseerde herhaalde netwerke om die vraagbevestig verbygegang te kry. Toe voorstel ons 'n self-ooreenstemmende aandagmekanisme om die voorstelling te herstel deur die ooreenstemming teen homself te ooreenstem, wat effektief inligting kodeer van die hele pad. Ons het eindelik die wysernetwerke gebruik om die posisies van antwoordes van die wagte te vind. Ons doen uitbreidige eksperimente op die SQuAD datastel. Die enkele model bereik 71.3% op die evaluering metries van presies ooreenstem op die verborge toets stel, terwyl die ensemble model verder die resultate tot 75.9%. Op die tyd van die ondersteuning van die papier, hou ons model die eerste plek op die SQuAD leierbord vir beide enkele en ensemble model.", 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé nambah tanggal sampeyan tambah sing mengko perusahaan lan ijol-ijolan winih sing apik, iki dadi panggayon sing apik dhéwé Awak dhéwé nambah perusahaan lan pasar tentang karo nganggo netawak dhéwé Amarok tambah kita mbukak perusahaan nganggo sak tentang kanggo nguasai pawaran iso nggawe nguasai pasar iki, lan padha mengko informasi nggawe pasar kapot. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tambah sing mesthi nang limian perusahaan mrambah. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk esteks nang dataset sêftar sêftar Defs Tanggal kanggo ngomongke pisan tapir, dadi model sing ngendalikne tualah banjur dadi bintang dadi, dadi model sekulatan pangan.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da zanen haɗi da masu daidaita da kujifaka wa karãtun su tambayi cikin salon da aka samu da shi, wanda yana nufin ya karɓa wa tambayar su daga wata shawara wanda aka ba. @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan kuma muna buɗa wani mekanin masu kami da aikin kansa dõmin ya gyara uwarsa game da shirin bayani na kansa, wanda ke sami tsari daga duk tafarki. We finally employ the pointer networks to locate the positions of answers from the passages.  Munã samun jarrabi masu yawa kan tsarin SQuAD. Yi motel guda ya sãmu 71.3% a kan evaluation metric mai daidaita matsayin da aka ɓõye a tsarin jarraba, kuma a ƙara motel ɗin fanel yana ƙara matsalan zuwa asilimin 71.9. A lokacin da za'a gaskata takardar, misalinmu yana da farkon kwanza a kan shaidar SQuAD zuwa duk misali guda da guda.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo zaprte samoujemalne mreže za odgovarjanje na vprašanja v slogu bralnega razumevanja, katerih cilj je odgovor na vprašanja iz danega odlomka. Najprej primerjamo vprašanje in prehod z zaprtimi ponavljajočimi se mrežami, ki temeljijo na pozornosti, da bi dobili predstavitev prehodov, ki se zaveda vprašanj. Nato predlagamo samoujemajoč se mehanizem pozornosti za izboljšanje reprezentacije z ujemanjem prehoda proti sebi, ki učinkovito kodira informacije iz celotnega prehoda. Končno uporabljamo kazalniške mreže za iskanje položajev odgovorov iz odlomkov. Izvajamo obsežne poskuse na naboru podatkov SQuAD. Posamezni model doseže 71,3% na meritvah ocenjevanja natančnega ujemanja na skritem testnem kompletu, medtem ko model ansamble dodatno poveča rezultate na 75,9%. V času oddaje prispevka je naš model prvo mesto na lestvici SQuAD za enojni in ansambelni model.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את הרשתות המתאימות עצמיות שעולות לקרוא עניין על שאלות בסגנון הבנה, שמתכוונת לענות על שאלות ממעבר מסוים. ראשית אנחנו מתאימים את השאלה והמעבר עם רשתות שמבוססות על תשומת לב מתחזרות כדי להשיג מייצג מעבר מודע לשאלות. ואז אנחנו מציעים מנגנון תשומת לב מתאים לעצמנו כדי לשפר את היציגה על ידי להתאים את המעבר נגד עצמו, אשר בעצם קוד מידע מכל המעבר. אנחנו סוף סוף משתמשים ברשתות המצבים כדי לאתר את עמדות התשובות מהמעברים. אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים רחבים על קבוצת מידע SQuAD. המודל היחיד משיג 71.3% על מטריות ההערכה של התאמה מדויקת על קבוצת הבדיקות החבויה, בעוד מודל האנסמבל מגביר את התוצאות עוד ל-75.9%. בזמן ההעברה של העיתון, המודל שלנו מחזיק את המקום הראשון על לוח המנהיגה של SQuAD עבור מודל יחיד וגם אנסמבל.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལ་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཁ་ཤས་ལ་ལན་གསལ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོར་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བྲི་ཚིག་དང་དུས་ཚོད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གདོང་སྙམ་པ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ཡིག མཐའ་མར་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་དྲ་དམངས་སྤྱད་ནས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་SQuAD གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ལ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་པུར་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ཉིད་ཡོད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་71.3% At the time of submission of the paper, our model holds the first place on the SQuAD leaderboard for both single and ensemble model.'}
{'en': 'Generating Natural Answers by Incorporating Copying and Retrieving Mechanisms in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ar': 'توليد إجابات طبيعية من خلال دمج آليات النسخ والاسترجاع في التعلم من التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'es': 'Generación de respuestas naturales mediante la incorporación de mecanismos de copia y recuperación en el aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia', 'pt': 'Gerando Respostas Naturais Incorporando Mecanismos de Cópia e Recuperação no Aprendizado de Sequência a Sequência', 'fr': "Générer des réponses naturelles en incorporant des mécanismes de copie et de récupération dans l'apprentissage séquence-à-séquence", 'ja': 'シーケンス間学習にコピーと検索のメカニズムを組み込むことで、自然な回答を生成する', 'zh': '因序入复制检机以成自然答案', 'ru': 'Генерирование естественных ответов путем включения механизмов копирования и извлечения в последовательное обучение', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम अधिगम में प्रतिलिपि बनाने और पुनर्प्राप्ति तंत्र को शामिल करके प्राकृतिक उत्तर उत्पन्न करना', 'ga': 'Freagraí Nádúrtha a Ghiniúint Trí Mheicníochtaí Cóipeála agus Aisghabhála a Ionchorprú i bhFoghlaim ó Sheichimh go Seicheamh', 'ka': 'შექმნა ჩემი პარამეტრების შექმნა მაქანიზმის კოპორტირება და მიღება', 'hu': 'Természetes válaszok generálása a másolási és visszaszerzési mechanizmusok beépítésével a szekvencia-szekvencia tanulásba', 'el': 'Δημιουργία φυσικών απαντήσεων με την ενσωμάτωση μηχανισμών αντιγραφής και ανάκτησης στη διαδοχική μάθηση', 'it': "Generare risposte naturali incorporando meccanismi di copia e recupero nell'apprendimento sequenziale", 'lt': 'Gamtinių atsakymų kūrimas įtraukiant kopijavimo ir gavimo mechanizmus į mokymąsi iš eilės į eilę', 'kk': 'Көшірмелеу және алу механизмтері реттеу- және реттеу оқыту арқылы табиғи жауаптарды құру', 'mk': 'Генерирање природни одговори со вклучување на копирање и преземање механизми во училиште од секвенција до секвенција', 'ms': 'Menjana Jawapan Semulajadi dengan memasukkan Mekanisme Penulisan dan Pemulihan dalam Pelajaran Sejuwen-ke-Sejuwen', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഉത്തരം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് സെക്കന്റ് മുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хариултуудыг дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах болон хадгалах Механизмүүд', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Tweġibiet Naturali billi jinkorporaw Mekkaniżmi ta’ Kopjar u Kbir fit-Tagħlim minn Sekwenza għal Sekwenza', 'no': 'Lagar naturlege svarar ved å inkorporera kopiering og henta mekanisme i sekvens- til- sekvenslæring', 'pl': 'Generowanie naturalnych odpowiedzi poprzez włączenie mechanizmów kopiowania i odzyskiwania do uczenia się sekwencyjnego', 'ro': 'Generarea de răspunsuri naturale prin încorporarea mecanismelor de copiere și recuperare în învățarea secvență-la-secvență', 'sr': 'Generiranje prirodnih odgovora uključujući mehanizme kopiranja i osvajanja u učenje sekvence do sekvence', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචිත කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිචිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචිත විදිහට පර', 'so': 'Generating jawaabaha asalka ah by Incorporing Copying and Retrieving mechanisms in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'sv': 'Generera naturliga svar genom att införliva kopierings- och hämtningsmekanismer i sekvens-till-sekvensinlärning', 'ta': 'சாதாரண பதில்களை உருவாக்குதல் மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து வரிசையில் படிக்கும் மாற்றங்களை உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'سکوئنس-تا-سکوئنس سیکھنے کے ذریعہ کاپی اور پھیرنے مکانیسم کے ذریعہ سکوئنس کا جواب پیدا کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tạo phản ứng tự nhiên bằng việc lắp ghép các cơ chế sao chép và thu hồi', 'bg': 'Генериране на естествени отговори чрез включване на механизми за копиране и извличане в последователно обучение', 'da': 'Generere naturlige svar ved at indarbejde kopierings- og hentningsmekanismer i sekvens-til-sekvens læring', 'nl': 'Natuurlijke antwoorden genereren door kopieer- en terugwinningsmechanismen in sequentie-to-sequentie leren op te nemen', 'hr': 'Generiranje prirodnih odgovora uključujući mehanizme kopiranja i uzdržavanja u učenju sekvence do sekvence', 'de': 'Generierung natürlicher Antworten durch Einbeziehung von Kopier- und Retrieving-Mechanismen in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'id': 'Menjana Jawaban Alami dengan Memasukkan Mekanisme Penulisan dan Penerimaan dalam Pelajaran Sequence-to-Sequence', 'ko': '순서 학습 중의 복제와 검색 메커니즘을 통해 자연 답안을 생성하다', 'fa': 'تولید جواب طبیعی با تولید تولید مکانیسم\u200cهای کاپیتان و بازیابی در تعلیم سطح و سطح', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza majibu ya asili na Kupima nakala na Kurudisha Mifumo ya Kufuatilia', 'tr': 'Täbiýet jogabalary sıralanjak-tä-sıralanjak öwrenmesinde Nusgala we Alyma Meýdançalary tarapından döredildi', 'af': 'Genereer Natuurlike Antwoordes deur Inkorporeer Kopiëring en Herhaal Mekanisme in Sequence- to- Sequence Leer', 'am': 'Generating Natural Answers by Incorporating Copying and Retrieving Mechanisms in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'hy': 'Բնական պատասխաններ ստեղծելով՝ ներառելով կոպիայի և վերցնելու մեխանիզմները հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության մեջ', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i përgjigjeve natyrore duke përfshirë mekanizmat e kopjimit dhe marrjes në mësimin pas pas pas pas pas', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক উত্তর তৈরি করা হচ্ছে সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্সের শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থা অনুলিপি এবং পুনরুদ্ধার করার মাধ্যমে।', 'bs': 'Generiranje prirodnih odgovora uključujući mehanizme kopiranja i uzdržavanja u učenju sekvence do sekvence', 'az': 'Sequence-to-Sequence 칐yr톛nm톛si il톛 T톛bi톛tli Cevaplar Yap캼land캼r캼l캼r', 'ca': "generar respostes naturals incorporant mecanismes de copia i recuperació a l'aprenentatge secuencial", 'et': 'Loomulike vastuste genereerimine kopeerimis- ja tagasiv├Ątmismehhanismide lisamisega j├żrjestikusele ├Ąppimisele', 'cs': 'Generování přirozených odpovědí zahrnutím kopírovacích a získávacích mechanismů do sekvenčního učení', 'fi': 'Luodaan luonnollisia vastauksia sisällyttämällä kopiointi- ja palautusmekanismeja sekvenssi-sekvenssi-oppimiseen', 'jv': 'Gjer-Ngerawat Ingkang respont Daerah Perangkat Sistem Ngubah Nkopi lan Rusak Mehanisms nang Seyense-to-Seyense Ingkang layang', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje naravnih odgovorov z vključevanjem mehanizmov kopiranja in pridobivanja v učenje zaporedja v zaporedje', 'he': 'Generating Natural Answers by Incorporating Copying and Retrieving Mechanisms in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Generating Natural Answers by Incorporating Copying and Retrieving Mechanisms in Sequence-to-Sequence Learning'}
{'en': 'Generating answer with natural language sentence is very important in real-world question answering systems, which needs to obtain a right answer as well as a coherent natural response. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end question answering system called COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, which incorporates copying and retrieving mechanisms to generate natural answers within an encoder-decoder framework. Specifically, in COREQA, the semantic units (words, phrases and entities) in a natural answer are dynamically predicted from the vocabulary, copied from the given question and/or retrieved from the corresponding knowledge base jointly. Our empirical study on both synthetic and real-world datasets demonstrates the efficiency of COREQA, which is able to generate correct, coherent and natural answers for knowledge inquired questions.', 'ar': 'يعد إنشاء إجابة باستخدام جملة لغة طبيعية أمرًا مهمًا للغاية في أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة في العالم الحقيقي ، والتي تحتاج إلى الحصول على إجابة صحيحة بالإضافة إلى استجابة طبيعية متماسكة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نظامًا للإجابة على الأسئلة من طرف إلى طرف يسمى COREQA في التعلم من التسلسل إلى التسلسل ، والذي يشتمل على آليات النسخ والاسترجاع لتوليد إجابات طبيعية ضمن إطار عمل وحدة فك التشفير. على وجه التحديد ، في COREQA ، يتم التنبؤ ديناميكيًا بالوحدات الدلالية (الكلمات والعبارات والكيانات) في الإجابة الطبيعية من المفردات ، ونسخها من السؤال المحدد و / أو استردادها من قاعدة المعرفة المقابلة بشكل مشترك. توضح دراستنا التجريبية على كل من مجموعات البيانات الاصطناعية والواقعية كفاءة COREQA ، القادرة على توليد إجابات صحيحة ومتماسكة وطبيعية للأسئلة المعرفية.', 'fr': "Générer une réponse avec une phrase en langage naturel est très important dans les systèmes de réponse aux questions du monde réel, qui doivent obtenir une réponse correcte ainsi qu'une réponse naturelle cohérente. Dans cet article, nous proposons un système de réponse aux questions de bout en bout appelé COREQA dans l'apprentissage séquence-à-séquence, qui intègre des mécanismes de copie et de récupération pour générer des réponses naturelles dans un cadre encodeur-décodeur. Plus précisément, dans COREQA, les unités sémantiques (mots, phrases et entités) d'une réponse naturelle sont prédites dynamiquement à partir du vocabulaire, copiées à partir de la question donnée et/ou extraites conjointement de la base de connaissances correspondante. Notre étude empirique sur des ensembles de données synthétiques et réels démontre l'efficacité de COREQA, qui est capable de générer des réponses correctes, cohérentes et naturelles aux questions de connaissances demandées.", 'es': 'Generar respuestas con frases en lenguaje natural es muy importante en los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas del mundo real, que necesitan obtener una respuesta correcta, así como una respuesta natural coherente. En este artículo, proponemos un sistema de respuesta a preguntas de extremo a extremo llamado COREQA en el aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia, que incorpora mecanismos de copia y recuperación para generar respuestas naturales dentro de un marco de codificador-decodificador. Específicamente, en COREQA, las unidades semánticas (palabras, frases y entidades) de una respuesta natural se predicen dinámicamente a partir del vocabulario, se copian de la pregunta dada y/o se recuperan de la base de conocimiento correspondiente de forma conjunta. Nuestro estudio empírico sobre conjuntos de datos sintéticos y del mundo real demuestra la eficiencia de COREQA, que es capaz de generar respuestas correctas, coherentes y naturales para las preguntas de conocimiento.', 'pt': 'Gerar resposta com sentença em linguagem natural é muito importante em sistemas de resposta a perguntas do mundo real, que precisam obter uma resposta correta, bem como uma resposta natural coerente. Neste artigo, propomos um sistema de resposta a perguntas de ponta a ponta chamado COREQA no aprendizado de sequência a sequência, que incorpora mecanismos de cópia e recuperação para gerar respostas naturais dentro de uma estrutura de codificador-decodificador. Especificamente, no COREQA, as unidades semânticas (palavras, frases e entidades) em uma resposta natural são preditas dinamicamente a partir do vocabulário, copiadas da questão dada e/ou recuperadas conjuntamente da base de conhecimento correspondente. Nosso estudo empírico em conjuntos de dados sintéticos e do mundo real demonstra a eficiência do COREQA, que é capaz de gerar respostas corretas, coerentes e naturais para perguntas de conhecimento.', 'ja': '自然言語の文章で回答を生成することは、正しい回答と一貫した自然な回答を得る必要がある現実の質問回答システムでは非常に重要です。本稿では，シーケンス間学習におけるCOREQAと呼ばれるエンドツーエンドの質問応答システムを提案し，エンコーダデコーダフレームワーク内で自然な答えを生成するためのコピーと検索のメカニズムを組み込んでいる．具体的には、ＣＯＲＥＱＡにおいて、自然な答えにおける意味単位（単語、フレーズ、及び実体）は、語彙から動的に予測され、所与の質問からコピーされ、及び／または対応する知識ベースから共同で取得される。合成データセットと現実世界のデータセットの両方に関する経験的研究は、知識の問いかけられた質問に対して正しい、一貫性のある、自然な答えを生成することができるCOREQAの効率性を実証しています。', 'zh': '世界问答系统,以自然语言句成对案甚重,须得正对及连贯自然答案。 本文,我们出了一种序列到序列学习中称为COREQA的端到端问答系统,该系统合了复制和检索机制,以在编码器 - 解码器框架内生成自然答案。 具体来说在COREQA中,自然对案之语义单元(单词,短语与实体)从词汇表中动占,从给定中复制与/相应知识库中共检索。 合成与现实世界数据集证COREQA效率,能为知识问成正,贯与自然。', 'ru': 'Генерация ответа с помощью предложения на естественном языке очень важна в реальных системах ответов на вопросы, которые должны получить правильный ответ, а также согласованный естественный ответ. В этой статье мы предлагаем комплексную систему ответов на вопросы под названием COREQA в последовательном обучении, которая включает в себя механизмы копирования и извлечения для генерации естественных ответов в рамках кодировщика-декодера. В частности, в COREQA семантические единицы (слова, фразы и сущности) в естественном ответе динамически предсказываются из словаря, копируются из заданного вопроса и/или извлекаются из соответствующей базы знаний совместно. Наше эмпирическое исследование как синтетических, так и реальных наборов данных демонстрирует эффективность COREQA, которая способна генерировать правильные, последовательные и естественные ответы на интересующие знания вопросы.', 'hi': 'वास्तविक दुनिया के प्रश्न उत्तर प्रणालियों में प्राकृतिक भाषा वाक्य के साथ उत्तर उत्पन्न करना बहुत महत्वपूर्ण है, जिसे सही उत्तर के साथ-साथ एक सुसंगत प्राकृतिक प्रतिक्रिया प्राप्त करने की आवश्यकता है। इस पेपर में, हम अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने में COREQA नामक एक एंड-टू-एंड प्रश्न उत्तर प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें एन्कोडर-डिकोडर फ्रेमवर्क के भीतर प्राकृतिक उत्तर उत्पन्न करने के लिए नकल और पुनर्प्राप्ति तंत्र शामिल हैं। विशेष रूप से, COREQA में, एक प्राकृतिक उत्तर में शब्दार्थ इकाइयों (शब्दों, वाक्यांशों और संस्थाओं) को शब्दावली से गतिशील रूप से भविष्यवाणी की जाती है, दिए गए प्रश्न से कॉपी की जाती है और / या संयुक्त रूप से संबंधित ज्ञान आधार से पुनर्प्राप्त की जाती है। सिंथेटिक और वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट दोनों पर हमारा अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन COREQA की दक्षता को दर्शाता है, जो ज्ञान के लिए सही, सुसंगत और प्राकृतिक उत्तर उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है।', 'ga': 'Tá sé an-tábhachtach freagra a ghiniúint le habairt teanga nádúrtha i gcórais fhreagraí ceisteanna sa saol fíor, ar gá dóibh freagra ceart a fháil chomh maith le freagairt nádúrtha chomhleanúnach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid córas freagartha ceisteanna ó cheann ceann ar a dtugtar COREQA san fhoghlaim seicheamh go seicheamh, a ionchorpraíonn meicníochtaí cóipeála agus aisghabhála chun freagraí nádúrtha a ghiniúint laistigh de chreat ionchódóra-díchódóra. Go sonrach, in COREQA, déantar na haonaid shéimeantacha (focail, frásaí agus eintitis) i bhfreagra nádúrtha a thuar go dinimiciúil ón stór focal, iad a chóipeáil ón gceist a tugadh agus/nó a aisghabháil ón mbonn eolais comhfhreagrach i gcomhpháirt. Léiríonn ár staidéar eimpíreach ar thacair thacair shonraí shintéiseacha agus fhíorshaolacha araon éifeachtacht COREQA, atá in ann freagraí cearta, comhleanúnacha agus nádúrtha a ghiniúint do cheisteanna fiosraithe.', 'ka': 'პასუხის შექმნა თავისუფალური ენის წესებით ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია რეალური მსოფლიოს კითხვის სისტემებში, რომელიც უნდა მიიღოთ სწორი პასუხი, რომელიც მნიშვნელ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა კითხვის გადასწორება სისტემა, რომელიც კოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკოდენტიკ COREQA-ში, სიმმანტიკური ერთეულები (სიტყვები, ფრაზები და ინტერტიები) სახური პასუხში დინამიკურად წარმოიდგინდება სიტყვებლიდან, რომლებიც მითითებული კითხვის და/ან შეიძლება შემდეგ კონფიგურაციის ჩვენი ემპერიკალური განსწავლება სინტეტიკური და რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესაძლებლობად COREQA-ს ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც შეუძლებელია წარმოადგენოთ სწორი, კონექენტური და ნა', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvű mondattal történő válasz generálása nagyon fontos a valós világban lévő kérdésválaszadó rendszerekben, amelyeknek helyes választ és koherens természetes választ kell kapniuk. Ebben a tanulmányban egy COREQA nevű, szekvencia-szekvencia tanulási rendszert javasolunk, amely magában foglalja a másolási és visszahívási mechanizmusokat, hogy természetes válaszokat generáljon egy kódoló-dekóder keretrendszeren belül. Konkrétan a COREQA-ban a természetes válaszban lévő szemantikai egységek (szavak, kifejezések és entitások) dinamikusan előrejelzésre kerülnek a szókincsből, az adott kérdésből másolják és/vagy a megfelelő tudásbázisból közösen kerülnek sor. A szintetikus és valós adatkészleteken végzett empirikus tanulmányunk bizonyítja a COREQA hatékonyságát, amely képes helyes, koherens és természetes válaszokat generálni a tudással kapcsolatos kérdésekre.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία απαντήσεων με πρόταση φυσικής γλώσσας είναι πολύ σημαντική στα συστήματα απαντήσεων σε πραγματικές ερωτήσεις, τα οποία πρέπει να λάβουν μια σωστή απάντηση καθώς και μια συνεκτική φυσική απάντηση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα απάντησης ερωτήσεων που ονομάζεται στη μάθηση ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας, το οποίο ενσωματώνει μηχανισμούς αντιγραφής και ανάκτησης για τη δημιουργία φυσικών απαντήσεων μέσα σε ένα πλαίσιο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή. Συγκεκριμένα, στην COREQA, οι σημασιολογικές μονάδες (λέξεις, φράσεις και οντότητες) σε μια φυσική απάντηση προβλέπονται δυναμικά από το λεξιλόγιο, αντιγράφονται από τη δεδομένη ερώτηση ή/και ανακτώνται από κοινού από την αντίστοιχη βάση γνώσεων. Η εμπειρική μας μελέτη τόσο σε συνθετικά όσο και σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων καταδεικνύει την αποτελεσματικότητα της COREQA, η οποία είναι σε θέση να παράγει σωστές, συνεκτικές και φυσικές απαντήσεις για ερωτήματα γνώσης.', 'it': "Generare una risposta con frasi in linguaggio naturale è molto importante nei sistemi di risposta alle domande del mondo reale, che devono ottenere una risposta corretta e una risposta naturale coerente. In questo articolo, proponiamo un sistema end-to-end di risposta alle domande chiamato COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, che incorpora meccanismi di copia e recupero per generare risposte naturali all'interno di un framework encoder-decoder. Nello specifico, in COREQA, le unità semantiche (parole, frasi ed entità) in una risposta naturale sono dinamicamente predette dal vocabolario, copiate dalla domanda data e/o recuperate congiuntamente dalla base di conoscenza corrispondente. Il nostro studio empirico su set di dati sintetici e reali dimostra l'efficienza di COREQA, che è in grado di generare risposte corrette, coerenti e naturali alle domande richieste dalla conoscenza.", 'kk': 'Тәуелді тіл сөйлемесімен жауап жасау - шын әлемді жауап беру жүйелерінде өте маңызды. Бұл дұрыс жауап және тәуелді жауап беру керек. Бұл қағазда COREQA деген соңындағы сұрақ жауап беру жүйесін келтіреміз. Бұл кодер- декодер қоршауындағы табиғи жауаптарды құру және көшірмелеу механизмтерін қолданады. Сәйкес, COREQA дегенде, табиғи жауаптың семантикалық бірліктері (сөздер, сөздер мен бірліктері) сөздерден динамикалық алдын алады, келтірілген сұрақтан көшірілген және/немесе сәйкес білім негізінен біріктірілген Біздің импирикалық зерттеулеріміз синтетикалық және шын әлемдегі деректер жиындарының COREQA- ның ефективдігін көрсетеді. Бұл білім сұрақтарының дұрыс, сәйкес және табиғи жауаптарын қ', 'lt': 'Atsakymų gamtiniu kalbiniu sakiniu kūrimas yra labai svarbus realiame pasaulyje atsakymo į klausimus sistemose, kurios turi gauti teisingą atsakymą ir nuoseklų gamtinį atsakymą. Šiame dokumente siūlome atsakymo į klausimus sistemą, vadinamą COREQA, mokymosi iš eilės į eilę sistemoje, kurioje įtraukiami kopijavimo ir surinkimo mechanizmai, kuriais užtikrinami natūralūs atsakymai pagal kodavimo kodavimo sistemą. Konkrečiai COREQA gamtiniame atsakyme esantys semantiniai vienetai (žodžiai, frazės ir subjektai) dinamiškai prognozuojami iš žodyno, kopijuojami iš atitinkamo klausimo ir (arba) gaunami kartu iš atitinkamos žinių bazės. Mūsų empirinis tyrimas dėl sintetinių ir realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių rodo COREQA veiksmingumą, kuris gali sukurti teisingus, nuoseklius ir natūralius atsakymus į klausimus, susijusius su žiniomis.', 'mk': 'Генерирањето одговор со природна реченица на јазикот е многу важно во системите на одговор на прашања во реалниот свет, кои мора да добијат вистински одговор како и кохерентен природен одговор. Во овој весник предложуваме систем на одговори на прашања од крај до крај наречен COREQA во училиште од секвенца до секвенца, кој вклучува копирање и преземање механизми за генерирање природни одговори во рамка на кодер-декодер. Специфично, во COREQA, семантичките единици (зборови, фрази и ентитети) во природен одговор се динамично предвидени од речникот, копирани од даденото прашање и/или обезбедени заедно од соодветната база на знаење. Нашата емпирична студија на синтетичките и реалните податоци ја покажува ефикасноста на COREQA, која е способна да генерира коректни, кохерентни и природни одговори за прашањата на знаењето.', 'ms': 'Menjana jawapan dengan kalimat bahasa semulajadi adalah sangat penting dalam sistem jawapan soalan dunia nyata, yang perlu mendapatkan jawapan yang betul serta jawapan semulajadi yang konsisten. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end question answering system called COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, which incorporates copying and retrieving mechanisms to generate natural answers within an encoder-decoder framework.  Secara khusus, dalam COREQA, unit semantik (perkataan, frasa dan entiti) dalam jawapan semulajadi dijangka secara dinamik dari vokbulari, disalin dari soalan yang diberi dan/atau dicapai dari dasar pengetahuan yang sepadan bersama-sama. Ujian empirik kita pada set data sintetik dan dunia nyata menunjukkan keefektivitas COREQA, yang mampu menghasilkan jawapan yang betul, konsisten dan semulajadi untuk soalan yang ditanyai pengetahuan.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഉത്തരം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, കോരെക്ക് എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് കോഡോര്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഉത്തരം ഉണ Specifically, in COREQA, the semantic units (words, phrases and entities) in a natural answer are dynamically predicted from the vocabulary, copied from the given question and/or retrieved from the corresponding knowledge base jointly.  നമ്മുടെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണതയിലും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുമുള്ള നമ്മുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ചോദ്യങ', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ risposta b’sentenza lingwistika naturali hija importanti ħafna fis-sistemi ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fid-dinja reali, li jeħtieġ li tinkiseb risposta tajba kif ukoll risposta naturali koerenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu sistema ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet minn tarf għal tarf imsejħa COREQA fit-tagħlim minn sekwenza għal sekwenza, li tinkorpora mekkaniżmi ta’ kopja u rkupru biex jiġġeneraw tweġibiet naturali fi ħdan qafas ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder. B’mod speċifiku, fil-COREQA, l-unitajiet semantiċi (kliem, frażi u entitajiet) f’risposta naturali huma mbassra dinamikament mill-vokabulari, ikkopjati mill-mistoqsija mogħtija u/jew miġbura mill-bażi ta’ għarfien korrispondenti b’mod konġunt. L-istudju empiriku tagħna kemm dwar settijiet ta’ dejta sintetiċi kif ukoll tad-dinja reali juri l-effiċjenza tal-COREQA, li hija kapaċi tiġġenera tweġibiet korretti, koerenti u naturali għall-mistoqsijiet mistoqsija dwar l-għarfien.', 'pl': 'Generowanie odpowiedzi za pomocą zdania języka naturalnego jest bardzo ważne w rzeczywistych systemach odpowiedzi na pytania, które muszą uzyskać właściwą odpowiedź, a także spójną naturalną odpowiedź. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy kompleksowy system odpowiedzi na pytania o nazwie COREQA w uczeniu się sekwencji do sekwencji, który obejmuje mechanizmy kopiowania i pobierania do generowania naturalnych odpowiedzi w ramach kodera-dekodera. W szczególności w COREQA jednostki semantyczne (słowa, frazy i jednostki) w naturalnej odpowiedzi są dynamicznie przewidywane ze słownictwa, kopiowane z danego pytania lub wspólnie pobierane z odpowiedniej bazy wiedzy. Nasze badania empiryczne dotyczące zarówno syntetycznych, jak i rzeczywistych zbiorów danych pokazują skuteczność COREQA, która jest w stanie generować poprawne, spójne i naturalne odpowiedzi na pytania o wiedzę.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл өгүүлбэртэй хариулт бий болгох нь бодит ертөнцийн асуулт хариултын системд маш чухал. Энэ нь зөв хариулт болон байгалийн хариулт гаргах хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид COREQA гэдэг асуултуудын дарааллаар дарааллаар суралцах үйл ажиллагааны төгсгөлийн асуулт асуудлын системийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь байгалийн хариулт үүсгэх болон гаргах механизмуудыг коддогч хэлбэрээр гаргадаг. Тодорхой хэлбэл, COREQA-д байгалийн хариултын семантик нэгж (үг, хэлбэрүүд, бүтээлүүд) нь өгүүлбэрээс динамик хэлбэрээр таамаглаж, өгүүлсэн асуултын хууль болон/эсвэл хамааралтай мэдлэгийн суурь дээр авсан юм. Бидний шинжлэх ухаан болон бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангуудын тухай эзэмшигтэй судалгаа COREQA-ын үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулдаг. Энэ нь мэдлэг асуудалд зөв, нийгмийн, байгалийн хариултыг гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Generarea unui răspuns cu frază în limbaj natural este foarte importantă în sistemele de răspuns la întrebări din lumea reală, care trebuie să obțină un răspuns corect, precum și un răspuns natural coerent. În această lucrare, propunem un sistem end-to-end de răspuns la întrebări numit COREQA în învățare secvență-la-secvență, care încorporează mecanisme de copiere și recuperare pentru a genera răspunsuri naturale într-un cadru codificator-decoder. În mod specific, în COREQA, unitățile semantice (cuvinte, fraze și entități) dintr-un răspuns natural sunt prezise dinamic din vocabular, copiate din întrebarea dată și/sau recuperate în comun din baza de cunoștințe corespunzătoare. Studiul nostru empiric privind seturile de date sintetice și reale demonstrează eficiența COREQA, care este capabil să genereze răspunsuri corecte, coerente și naturale pentru întrebările cerute de cunoaștere.', 'no': 'Oppretting av svar med naturspråkssetning er svært viktig i realske verdensspørsmålsystemet, som må få ein rett svar og ein konsekvent natursvar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit sluttspørsmålsystem som vert kalla COREQA i læring av sekvens-til-sekvens, som inkluderer kopieringsmetodar og henting til å laga naturlege svar i eit koderingsrammeverk. Spesielt i COREQA vert semantiske einingar (ord, fraser og einingar) i eit naturleg svar dynamisk foregåve frå ordboka, kopiert frå den oppgjevne spørsmålet og/eller henta frå den tilsvarande kunnskapsbasen. Vårt empirisk studie om både syntetiske og verdsdatasett demonstrerer effektiviteten av COREQA, som kan laga rette, koherente og naturske svar for kunnskap spørsmål.', 'sr': 'Generiranje odgovora sa prirodnom jezikom rečenicom je veoma važno u realnim svetskim sistemima odgovora na pitanje, koji mora dobiti pravi odgovor, kao i sasvim prirodan odgovor. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistem odgovora na kraj do kraja pitanja koji se zove COREQA u učenju sekvence do sekvence, koji uključuje mehanizam kopiranja i uzdržavanja prirodnih odgovora u okviru kodera. Posebno u COREQA, semantičke jedinice (reči, rečenice i entitate) u prirodnom odgovoru dinamički predviđaju se iz rečnika, kopirajući iz određenog pitanja i/ili dobijani od odgovarajuće baze znanja zajedno. Naša empirička studija o sintetičkim i realnim podacima na svijetu pokazuje učinkovitost COREQA-a, koja je u mogućnosti da stvori ispravne, saslušne i prirodne odgovore za pitanja pitanja o znanju.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියෙන් ගොඩක් වැදගත් උත්තර පද්ධතියෙන්, ඒකෙන් හර මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා COREQA කියලා පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියට පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ඉගෙන විශේෂයෙන්, COREQA වලින්, සෙමැන්ටික් යුනිටික් (වචන, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, වචන වලින්) ස්වභාවික උත්තර වලින් භාවිතාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළ අපේ සංවේදනය සහ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සැකසුම් ගැන සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා COREQA ගේ ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතියක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා, ඒක හරි, සංවේදනය සහ ස', 'so': "Isticmaalka jawaabta afka asalka ah waa mid aad u muhiim ah nidaamka jawaabta nolosha ee dhabta ah, taas oo u baahan in la helo jawaab saxda ah iyo jawaab asalka ah. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end question answering system called COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, which incorporates copying and retrieving mechanisms to generate natural answers within an encoder-decoder framework.  Si gaar ah marka COREQA lagu qoro qaybaha semantika (erayada, hadallada iyo waxyaabaha) jawaabta asalka ah waxaa si dhab ah looga sii sheegaa hadalka, waxaa looga qoray su'aalaha la qoray iyo/ama waxaa looga soo qaaday aasaaska aqoonta si isku mid ah. Baaritaankeenna jimicsan ee labada danbiyada ee caalamiga ah iyo si dhab ah waxay muujiyaan awoodda COREQA, taasoo awoodda in uu soo saaro jawaabo saxda ah, isku xiran iyo jawaabo dabiicadda ah ee su'aalaha la weydiinay.", 'sv': 'Att generera svar med naturligt språk mening är mycket viktigt i verkliga frågesvarssystem, som behöver få ett rätt svar och ett konsekvent naturligt svar. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett heltäckande frågesvarssystem som kallas COREQA i sekvens-till-sekvens lärande, vilket innefattar kopierings- och hämtningsmekanismer för att generera naturliga svar inom ett encoder-dekoder ramverk. I COREQA förutses de semantiska enheterna (ord, fraser och entiteter) i ett naturligt svar dynamiskt från ordförrådet, kopieras från den givna frågan och/eller hämtas från motsvarande kunskapsbas gemensamt. Vår empiriska studie av både syntetiska och verkliga datauppsättningar visar effektiviteten hos COREQA, som kan generera korrekta, sammanhängande och naturliga svar på kunskapsfrågade frågor.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி வாக்கியத்துடன் விடையை உருவாக்குவது உண்மையான உலக க கேள்விகளில் மிகவும் முக்கியமானது, அது சரியான விடையை பெற வே இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் கோரிக்கா என்ற பதில் கேள்வி முடிவு அமைப்பின் முறைமையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். இது குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டாளர் சட்டத்தில் உள்ள நகல் மற்று குறிப்பிட்ட கோரிக்காவில், இயற்கையான விடை நம்முடைய முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி இருவரும் கூட்டிணைப்பு மற்றும் உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளத்தை காண்பிக்கிறது, அது அறிவு கேட்ட கேள்விகளுக்கு சரி', 'ur': 'جواب طبیعی زبان کے ساتھ جواب پیدا کرنے کا بہت اہم ہے حقیقی دنیا کی سؤال جواب دینے کے سیستم میں، جو حق جواب حاصل کرنے کی ضرورت ہے اور ایک اتنی طبیعی جواب حاصل کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک پایان-پایان سؤال کی جواب سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کریں جو COREQA نامیدہ سیسٹم کی تعلیم میں ہے، جس میں ایک کوڈر-ڈاکوڈر فرم کے اندر طبیعی جواب پیدا کرنے اور پکڑنے کے مکانیزوں میں شامل ہے۔ خاص طور پر، COREQA میں، ایک طبیعی جواب میں سیمنٹی یونیٹ (کلمات، کلمات اور ایٹنیٹ) لفظ سے سیمنٹی طور پر پیش بینی کی جاتی ہے، ایک سوال سے کپیل کی جاتی ہے اور/یا ملنے والی علم بنسس سے اٹھائی جاتی ہے۔ ہماری امپراتیکی تحقیقات سینٹیسیک اور حقیقی دنیاوی ڈاٹیسٹ کے بارے میں COREQA کی فعالیت دکھاتی ہے، جو علم کے سوال کے لئے ٹھیک، مہربان اور طبیعی جواب پیدا کرسکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Natalik so'zlar bilan javob yaratish haqiqiqiy dunyo soʻzlariga javob berish juda muhim. Bu muammolar javob topishi kerak va bir xil tabiiy javob topishi kerak. Bu qogʻozda, biz COREQA deb nomlangan oxirigi soʻrov tizimga javob berishni davom etishni istaysiz. Bu qodqaruvchi cheksiz chegarasidan nusxa olish va qayta olish imkoniyatini yaratish uchun oddiy javoblarni yaratish uchun. Koʻrsatilgan, COREQA'da, tabiiy javobladagi semantik birlik (so'zlar, ибодатлар ва мавжудларда) so'zlardan dynamik kutilgan so'zlardan, koʻrsatilgan savol va/yoki bir necha xil maʼlumot asosidan olingan. Bizning imkoniyatli o'qituvchimiz tizim va haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida COREQA ta'siri imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Bu ilmiy soʻrovlari soʻrovlari uchun to ʻgʻri, yetarli va tabiiy javoblarni yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phát ra câu trả lời bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên là rất quan trọng trong các hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi trên thế giới thực, cần có một câu trả lời đúng và một câu trả lời tự nhiên phù hợp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống đáp trả câu hỏi tận cùng gọi là COERQA theo trình học lặp lại, gồm cả máy copy và câu trả lời tự nhiên trong bộ mã hóa. Cụ thể, trong COERQA, các đơn vị theo ngữ pháp (từ, cụm từ và thực thể) trong một câu trả lời tự nhiên được dự đoán theo động từ từ từ từ từ từ từ từ từ từ từ, sao chép từ câu hỏi đã đưa ra và/hoặc rút về từ cơ sở kiến thức tương ứng. Nghiên cứu kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi về các tập tin về nhân tạo và thế giới thực chứng minh hiệu quả của COERQA, nó có khả năng tạo ra câu trả lời chính xác, phù hợp và tự nhiên cho câu hỏi được hỏi hỏi.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на отговор с естествен език изречение е много важно в реалните системи за отговор на въпроси, които трябва да получат правилен отговор, както и съгласуван естествен отговор. В настоящата статия предлагаме система за отговор на въпроси от край до край, наречена в последователно обучение, която включва механизми за копиране и извличане за генериране на естествени отговори в рамките на кодер-декодер рамка. По-конкретно, в Корека семантичните единици (думи, фрази и образувания) в естествен отговор са динамично прогнозирани от речника, копирани от зададения въпрос и/или извлечени съвместно от съответната база знания. Нашето емпирично проучване на синтетични и реални набори от данни показва ефективността на която е в състояние да генерира правилни, съгласувани и естествени отговори на запитаните от знания въпроси.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van antwoorden met een zin in een natuurlijke taal is erg belangrijk in reële vragenantwoordsystemen, die zowel een goed antwoord als een coherent natuurlijk antwoord moeten krijgen. In dit artikel stellen we een end-to-end vragenbeantwoordingssysteem voor, COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, dat kopieer- en terugwinningsmechanismen omvat om natuurlijke antwoorden te genereren binnen een encoder-decoder framework. Concreet worden in COREQA de semantische eenheden (woorden, zinnen en entiteiten) in een natuurlijk antwoord dynamisch voorspeld uit de woordenschat, gekopieerd uit de gegeven vraag en/of gezamenlijk opgehaald uit de bijbehorende kennisbank. Ons empirische onderzoek naar zowel synthetische als real-world datasets toont de efficiëntie van COREQA aan, dat in staat is om correcte, coherente en natuurlijke antwoorden te genereren op kennisvragen.', 'da': 'At generere svar med naturligt sprog sætning er meget vigtigt i virkelighedens spørgsmål besvarelsessystemer, som skal opnå et rigtigt svar såvel som et sammenhængende naturligt svar. I denne artikel foreslår vi et end-to-end spørgsmål besvarelsessystem kaldet COREQA i sekvens-til-sekvens læring, som inkorporerer kopierings- og hentningsmekanismer for at generere naturlige svar inden for en encoder-dekoder ramme. Specielt i COREQA forudsiges de semantiske enheder (ord, sætninger og enheder) i et naturligt svar dynamisk fra ordforrådet, kopieres fra det givne spørgsmål og/eller hentes fra den tilsvarende videnbase i fællesskab. Vores empiriske undersøgelse af både syntetiske og virkelige datasæt viser effektiviteten af COREQA, som er i stand til at generere korrekte, sammenhængende og naturlige svar på vidensspørgsmål.', 'hr': 'Generiranje odgovora sa prirodnom jezičkom rečenicom vrlo je važno u sustavima odgovora na pitanje realnog svijeta, koji mora dobiti pravi odgovor kao i sasvim prirodan odgovor. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistem odgovora na kraj do kraja pitanja koji se zove COREQA u učenju sekvence do sekvence, koji uključuje mehanizam kopiranja i povratka kako bi stvorili prirodne odgovore u okviru kodera. Posebno u COREQA, semantičke jedinice (riječi, rečenice i entitate) u prirodnom odgovoru dinamički predviđaju se iz rečnika, kopirajući iz određenog pitanja i/ili dobijani od odgovarajuće baze znanja zajedno. Naša empirička studija o sintetičkim i realnim podacima na svijetu pokazuje učinkovitost COREQA-a, koja je u mogućnosti stvoriti ispravne, usklađene i prirodne odgovore za pitanja pitanja o znanju.', 'de': 'Die Generierung von Antworten mit natürlichen Sätzen ist sehr wichtig in realen Fragebeantworterungssystemen, die sowohl eine richtige Antwort als auch eine kohärente natürliche Antwort erhalten müssen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein End-to-End Fragebeantworungssystem namens COREQA im Sequenz-to-Sequenz-Lernen vor, das Kopier- und Retrieving-Mechanismen beinhaltet, um natürliche Antworten innerhalb eines Encoder-Decoder-Frameworks zu generieren. Konkret werden in COREQA die semantischen Einheiten (Wörter, Phrasen und Entitäten) einer natürlichen Antwort dynamisch aus dem Vokabular vorhergesagt, aus der gegebenen Frage kopiert und/oder gemeinsam aus der entsprechenden Wissensdatenbank abgerufen. Unsere empirische Studie an synthetischen und realen Datensätzen zeigt die Effizienz von COREQA, das in der Lage ist, korrekte, kohärente und natürliche Antworten auf wissensbezogene Fragen zu generieren.', 'fa': 'جواب با جمله زبان طبیعی بسیار مهم در سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cجواب سوال دنیای واقعی است که باید جواب درست و پاسخ طبیعی را دریافت کند. در این کاغذ، ما یک سیستم پاسخ پایان و پایان سوال را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به نام COREQA در یادگیری\u200cهای رده و رده، که شامل مکانیسم\u200cهای کاپیتان و بازیابی برای تولید جواب طبیعی در یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار مخصوصاً در COREQA، واحدهای semantic (کلمات، عبارت و واحدهای طبیعی) در پاسخ طبیعی از کلمات طبیعی پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cشوند، از سؤال داده شده و/یا از پایگاه دانش مشترک با هم پیدا می\u200cشوند. مطالعه امپراتیک ما در مورد مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سینتاتیک و دنیای واقعی موثرت COREQA را نشان می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند جواب\u200cهای درست، هماهنگ و طبیعی برای سوال\u200cهای پرسیده\u200cشده\u200cاند.', 'ko': '현실의 퀴즈 시스템에서 자연 언어 문장을 사용하여 답을 만드는 것은 매우 중요하기 때문에 정확한 답안과 일관된 자연 반응을 얻어야 한다.본고에서 우리는 서열에서 서열 학습까지의 COREQA를 제시했다. 이것은 복제와 검색 메커니즘을 결합시켜 인코더-디코더 프레임워크에서 자연스러운 답안을 생성한다.구체적으로 말하면COREQA에서 자연답안의 의미 단원(단어, 단어와 실체)은 어휘표에서 동태적으로 예측하고 주어진 문제에서 복제하거나 해당하는 지식 라이브러리에서 연합하여 검색한다.우리는 합성 데이터 집합과 실제 데이터 집합에 대한 실증 연구를 통해 COREQA의 유효성을 증명했고 지식 조회 문제에 정확하고 일관되며 자연스러운 답안을 생성할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Menjana jawaban dengan kalimat bahasa alami sangat penting dalam sistem menjawab pertanyaan dunia nyata, yang perlu mendapatkan jawaban yang tepat serta jawaban alami yang konsisten. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem jawaban pertanyaan dari akhir ke akhir yang disebut COREQA dalam pembelajaran dari urutan ke urutan, yang mengandung mekanisme penyalinan dan penghasilan untuk menghasilkan jawaban alami dalam rangkaian pengekode. Secara spesifik, di COREQA, unit semantis (kata, frasa dan entitas) dalam jawaban alami dinamik diprediksi dari vokabular, disalin dari pertanyaan yang diberikan dan/atau dicapai dari dasar pengetahuan yang sama. Studi empirik kita pada set data sintetis dan dunia nyata menunjukkan efisiensi COREQA, yang mampu menghasilkan jawaban yang benar, konsisten dan alami untuk pengetahuan yang ditanyai pertanyaan.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza jibu kwa hukumu ya lugha ya asili ni muhimu sana katika maswali ya kimataifa ya majibu, ambayo inahitaji kupata jibu sahihi pamoja na jibu la asili. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mwisho wa swali la mwisho la kujibu mfumo unaoitwa COREQA katika kujifunza kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo, ambayo inajumuisha nakala na kupata mbinu za kutengeneza majibu ya asili ndani ya mfumo wa kodi. Tafsiri, katika COREQA, vitengo vya semantic (maneno, maneno na vifaa) katika jibu halisi vinavyotabiriwa vibaya kutoka kwenye lugha hiyo, vilichotolewa na swali hilo na/au kupewa kutoka kwenye msingi wa maarifa yanayofanana kwa pamoja. Utafiti wetu wa msisitizo wa taarifa za pamoja na halisi za dunia unaonyesha ufanisi wa COREQA, ambao unaweza kutengeneza majibu sahihi, pamoja na asili kwa maswali yaliyohojiwa.', 'af': "Gegenereer van antwoord met natuurlike taal seting is baie belangrik in regte wêreld vraag antwoord stelsels, wat nodig om 'n regte antwoord te kry en 'n koerende natuurlike antwoord te kry. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n einde-na-einde vraag antwoord stelsel genoem Korekja in sekwensie-na-sekwensie leer, wat inkorpreer kopiëring en onttrek mekanisme om natuurlike antwoordes binne 'n enkoder-dekoder raamwerk te genereer. Spesifieke, in Korekja, die semantiese eenhede (woorde, frase en einhede) in 'n natuurlike antwoord word dinamies voorskou van die woordeboek, gekopieer van die gegewe vraag en/of ontvang van die ooreenstemmende kennisbasis saamstig. Ons empiriese studie op beide sintetiese en reël wêreld datastelle vertoon die effektiviteit van COREQA, wat in staat kan genereer korrekte, koherente en natuurlike antwoordes vir kennis gevrae vrae.", 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i përgjigjes me fjalën natyrore në gjuhë është shumë i rëndësishëm në sistemet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve në botën reale, të cilat duhet të marrin një përgjigje të drejtë si dhe një përgjigje koherente natyrore. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një sistem përgjigjesh të pyetjeve të fundit në fund të quajtur COREQA në mësim sekuencë-sekuencë, i cili përfshin mekanizma kopjimi dhe marrje për të gjeneruar përgjigje natyrore brenda një kuadri kodifikues-dekoder. Veçanërisht, në COREQA, njësitë semantike (fjalë, fraza dhe njësi) në një përgjigje natyrore parashikohen dinamikisht nga fjalorin, kopjuan nga pyetja e dhënë dhe/ose marrin së bashku nga baza e njohurive korrespondente. Studimi ynë empirik mbi të dhënat sintetike dhe të botës reale tregon efektshmërinë e COREQA, e cila është në gjendje të gjenerojë përgjigje të sakta, koherente dhe natyrore për pyetjet e pyetura të njohurive.', 'tr': "Doýal dil sözlemegi bilen jogaby döretmäge hakyky dünýäde jogabat sistemalarynda örän wajypdyr. Dogru jogaby we kohereket tebigy jogaby bolmaly. Bu kagyzda COREQA diýilip soňra soňra bir soragy jogap sistemini teklip edýäris. Bu sistemi ködleme-dekoder çerçevesinde tebigy jogaplary döretmek we nusgasyny birleştirir. Adatça, COREQA'da, bir tebigat jogabynda semantik unamalar (sözler, sözler we entiler) sözlerinden dinamik önlenýär, berilen soragdan kop edilýär we/ýä edilen bilim paýasyndan kop berilýär Biziň empirik öwrenmegimiz hem sintetik hem hakyky dünýä veri setirleri barada COREQA'nyň etkinlik ukyplygyny görkezip bilgi soraglaryna dogry, kohereket we tebigy jogablary döredip bilýär.", 'am': 'በአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ፍርድ መግለጫ መፍጠር እውነተኛ ዓለም ጥያቄን በመቀበል ስርዓት በጣም አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ COREQA በሚሉት የፍጻሜ የመጨረሻ ጥያቄ መልስ ስርዓት በክፍለ ግንኙነት ትምህርት ውስጥ እናሳስባለን፣ ይህም የፍጥረቱ መልስ አካባቢዎችን በመፍጠር እና በመስጠት ማቅረብ እና ማግኘት አካሄድ ነው፡፡ በተለይ፣ COREQA፣ በአፍሪካዊ መልስ (ቃላት፣ ቃላት እና አካባቢዎች) በተለየ ቃላት፣ በተሰጠው ጥያቄ እና/ወይም በተለየው እውቀት መሠረት ከታጋሽነት የተለየ አዋቂው እውቀት መሠረት ይታወቃል፡፡ በተጨማሪው እና እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዊ ጥያቄዎች የCOREQA ጥያቄን የሚያሳየው፣ ጥሩ፣ አብራዊ እና ፍጥረት የጠይቁትን እውቀት ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার শাস্তি দিয়ে উত্তর তৈরি করা বাস্তবতা সিস্টেমের উত্তরের প্রশ্নে খুবই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যা সঠিক উত্তর পাওয়া উচ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশ্নের উত্তরের প্রস্তাব করছি যার নাম কোরিকুয়া নামের ক্ষেত্রে প্রাকৃতিক কোডার-ডেকোডার ফ্রেম্যাকের মধ্যে প্রাকৃতিক উত্তর তৈরি  বিশেষ করে কোরেকুয়াতে প্রাকৃতিক উত্তরে সেমেন্টিক ইউনিট (শব্দ, বাক্য এবং বস্তুগুলো) এই শব্দভাণ্ডার থেকে ধারণা করা হয়েছে, যা প্রশ্নের কপি করা হয়েছে এবং/অথবা সংশ্লিষ সিন্টেটিক এবং বাস্তব বিশ্বের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের ব্যাপারে আমাদের সম্মানিত গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে কোরেকার কার্যক্রম, যা জ্ঞানের প্রশ্নে', 'az': "Təbiətli dil cümlələri ilə cavab təhsil etmək həqiqət dünyanın cavab verən sual sistemlərində çox möhümdür, bu da doğru cavab və təbiətli cavab almaq lazımdır. Bu kağızda, COREQA adlı sonun-sonun soruşma sistemini, sequence-to-sequence öyrənmək üçün təbiətli cavablar yaratmaq və təbiətli cəzaları kodlayıcı frameworklərin içində təbiətli təşkil etmək və alınmaq mehanizmilərini təklif edirik. Özellikle, COREQA'da, təbiətli cavabda semantik birimler (sözlər, sözlər və entitələr) sözlərdən dinamik tədbir edilir, verilən sual tərəfindən kopyalanır və/yaxud müqayisədə bilgi base tərəfindən alınırlar. Bizim sintetik və həqiqi dünya veri qurularımızın impirik təhsil edilməsi də COREQA'nın faydallığını göstərir. Bu elm soruşduğu sualların doğru, müvafiq və təbiətli cavablarını yarada bilər.", 'hy': 'Պատասխան ստեղծել բնական լեզվի նախադասությամբ շատ կարևոր է իրական աշխարհի հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգերում, որոնք պետք է ճիշտ պատասխան ստանան, ինչպես նաև համապատասխան բնական պատասխան: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք COREQA կոչվող վերջ-վերջ հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգ հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության մեջ, որը ներառում է կոդիր-կոդերի շրջանում բնական պատասխաններ ստեղծելու մեխանիզմներ: Հատկապես, COREQA-ում սեմանտիկ միավորները (բառեր, արտահայտություններ և էակներ) բնական պատասխանում դինամիկ կանխատեսվում են բառարանից, որոնք կրկնօրինակվում են տվյալ հարցից և (կամ) միասին վերցվում են համապատասխան գիտելիքների հիմքից: Մեր էմպրիկական ուսումնասիրությունը սինթետիկ և իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա ցույց է տալիս COREQA-ի արդյունավետությունը, որը կարող է ճիշտ, համապատասխան և բնական պատասխաններ ստեղծել գիտելիքների հարցերի համար:', 'ca': "Generar resposta amb frases de llenguatge natural és molt important en els sistemes de resposta a preguntes del món real, que necessiten obtenir una resposta correcta i una resposta natural coherent. En aquest paper, proposem un sistema de resposta a preguntes de final a final anomenat COREQA en aprenentatge secuencial, que incorpora mecanismes de còpia i recuperació per generar respostes naturals dins un marc de codificador-decoder. Specifically, in COREQA, the semantic units (words, phrases and entities) in a natural answer are dynamically predicted from the vocabulary, copied from the given question and/or retrieved from the corresponding knowledge base jointly.  El nostre estudi empíric sobre conjunts de dades sintètiques i del món real demostra l'eficiència de COREQA, que és capaç de generar respostes correctes, coherents i naturals a les preguntes interrogades.", 'bs': 'Generiranje odgovora sa prirodnom jezikom rečenicom je vrlo važno u realnom svetskom odgovornom sistemu odgovora na pitanje, koji mora dobiti pravi odgovor, kao i sasvim prirodan odgovor. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistem odgovora na kraj do kraja pitanja koji se zove COREQA u učenju sekvence do sekvence, koji uključuje mehanizam kopiranja i povratka kako bi stvorili prirodne odgovore u okviru kodera. Posebno u COREQA, semantičke jedinice (riječi, rečenice i entitate) u prirodnom odgovoru dinamički predviđaju se iz rečnika, kopirajući iz određenog pitanja i/ili zajedno iz odgovarajuće baze znanja. Naša empirička studija o sintetičkim i realnim podacima na svijetu pokazuje učinkovitost COREQA-a, koja može stvoriti ispravne, saslušne i prirodne odgovore za pitanja pitanja o znanju.', 'cs': 'Generování odpovědi s přirozeným jazykem je velmi důležité v reálném světě systémů odpovědí na otázky, které potřebují získat správnou odpověď a soudržnou přirozenou odpověď. V tomto článku navrhujeme komplexní systém odpovědí na otázky s názvem COREQA v sekvenčním učení, který zahrnuje kopírování a načítání mechanismů pro generování přirozených odpovědí v rámci kodéru-dekodéru. Konkrétně v COREQA jsou sémantické jednotky (slova, fráze a entity) v přirozené odpovědi dynamicky předpovídány ze slovní zásoby, zkopírovány z dané otázky a/nebo společně získány z odpovídající znalostní báze. Naše empirická studie na syntetických i reálných datových sadách ukazuje efektivitu COREQA, která je schopna generovat správné, koherentní a přirozené odpovědi na dotazované znalosti.', 'et': 'Vastuse genereerimine looduskeelse lausega on väga oluline reaalmaailma küsimustele vastamise süsteemides, mis vajavad nii õiget vastust kui ka sidusat loomulikku vastust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lõpp-otsa küsimustele vastamise süsteemi nimega COREQA järjestusest järjestuseni õppimises, mis sisaldab kopeerimis- ja hankimismehhanisme loomulike vastuste genereerimiseks kodeerija-dekooderi raamistikus. Täpsemalt COREQA-s prognoositakse loomulikus vastuses olevaid semantilisi ühikuid (sõnad, fraasid ja olemid) dünaamiliselt sõnavarast, kopeeritakse antud küsimusest ja/või saadakse vastavast teadmistebaasist ühiselt. Meie empiiriline uuring nii sünteetiliste kui ka reaalsete andmekogumitega näitab COREQA tõhusust, mis suudab luua õigeid, sidusaid ja loomulikke vastuseid teadmistega seotud küsimustele.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen vastauksen luominen on erittäin tärkeää reaalimaailman kysymysjärjestelmissä, joiden on saatava oikea vastaus sekä johdonmukainen luonnollinen vastaus. Tässä työssä ehdotamme end-to-end-kysymysvastausjärjestelmää nimeltä COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, joka sisältää kopiointi- ja hakumekanismeja luontaisten vastausten tuottamiseksi kooderi-dekooderikehyksessä. COREQA:ssa luonnollisen vastauksen semanttiset yksiköt (sanat, lauseet ja entiteetit) ennustetaan dynaamisesti sanastosta, kopioidaan annetusta kysymyksestä ja/tai haetaan vastaavasta tietokannasta yhdessä. Empiirinen tutkimuksemme sekä synteettisistä että reaalimaailman aineistoista osoittaa COREQAn tehokkuuden, joka pystyy tuottamaan oikeita, johdonmukaisia ja luonnollisia vastauksia tietokysymyksiin.', 'jv': 'Mbok repakan karo perusahaan langkung iku dianggap luwih apik ing sakjane saking sistem sing rawisan ning dunya, sing kudu ngetakake repakan sing apik lan tambah pakek sabanjuré. Nan pepulan iki, kita supoyo perusahaan tanggal ngganti sistem sing nganggo coret-to-sekondi kanggo langgar kuwi "coret". echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Awakdhéwé éntuk empireksi barêng-barêng senetik lan dataset sing mungkane mungkane mungkasi nggawe barang nggawe corekya, sing bisa iso ngéwangaké adalah, coherent lan saiki éwangaké awak dhéwé kanggo ngerajah seneng pisan.', 'he': 'יצירת תשובה עם משפט שפה טבעי חשובה מאוד במערכות לענות על שאלות בעולם האמיתי, שצריכות להשיג תשובה נכונה כמו גם תגובה טבעית תואם. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מערכת עניין על שאלות סוף-סוף שנקראת COREQA בתור לימוד רצף-רצף, שמכילה מעתקים עותקים ולהשיג מנגנונים כדי ליצור תשובות טבעיות בתוך מסגרת קודד-קודד. במיוחד, ב COREQA, היחידות הסמנטיות (מילים, ביטויים ואישויות) בתשובה טבעית נצפות דינמית מהמילים, עותקות מהשאלה הנתונה ו/או משוחררות מבסיס הידע המתאים ביחד. המחקר האמפריקלי שלנו על קבוצות נתונים סינטטיות וגם בעולם האמיתי מראה את היעילות של COREQA, שהיא מסוגלת ליצור תשובות נכונות, קבועות וטבעיות למדע שאלות.', 'ha': "Mai ƙiƙira majibu da cewa na lugha na natura yana da muhimu a cikin maswali na masu cikin duniya da tsayi, da yana kasancẽwa ta sami jawab da jibi madaidaici. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata tambaya ta ƙara-dawo da za'a karɓi tsarin majibu wanda ake kiran COERQA a cikin shirin rabo-dubi'in-sequence, wanda yana ƙunsa da kodiki da kuma za'a sami masu motsa masu cikin firam na kode-koda. A ƙayyade, cikin COERQA, masu motsi na kima cikin jabu mai natura, za'a yi amfani da shi daga maganar, an sami kofi daga tambayar da aka ba da kuma/kõ an sami daga Basin Sann da ke daidaita sami ɗaya. Kayan karatunmu na samun data masu haɗatiki da masu halin duniya sun nuna fikancin COERQA, wanda ya iya iya iya ƙiƙira majiɓintan da ke tambaya masu sani.", 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje odgovorov z naravnim jezikom stavka je zelo pomembno v realnih sistemih za odgovarjanje na vprašanja, ki potrebujejo pravi odgovor in skladen naravni odgovor. V prispevku predlagamo celovit sistem odgovarjanja na vprašanja COREQA v učenju od zaporedja do zaporedja, ki vključuje mehanizme kopiranja in pridobivanja za ustvarjanje naravnih odgovorov znotraj okvira kodirnika-dekoderja. V COREQA so semantične enote (besede, fraze in entitete) v naravnem odgovoru dinamično napovedane iz besedišča, kopirane iz danega vprašanja in/ali skupaj pridobljene iz ustrezne baze znanja. Naša empirična študija tako sintetičnih kot realnih naborov podatkov kaže učinkovitost COREQA, ki je sposoben ustvariti pravilne, skladne in naravne odgovore na vprašanja po znanju.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག In this paper, we propose an end-to-end question answering system called COREQA in sequence-to-sequence learning, which incorporates copying and retrieving mechanisms to generate natural answers within an encoder-decoder framework. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་ COREQA་ནང་དུ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་ཚིག་ལས་(ཚིག་, phrases དང་entities)མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ནང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་ཚོང་ཁག་ལས་བྱུང་སོང་། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་སྦྱོར་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པར་མཐུན་གྱི་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྐྱེན་ཚུལ་དུ་གཏ'}
{'en': 'An End-to-End Model for Question Answering over Knowledge Base with Cross-Attention Combining Global Knowledge', 'ar': 'نموذج شامل للإجابة على الأسئلة عبر قاعدة المعرفة مع الانتباه المتقاطع الذي يجمع بين المعرفة العالمية', 'pt': 'Um modelo de ponta a ponta para resposta a perguntas sobre base de conhecimento com atenção cruzada combinando conhecimento global', 'fr': 'Un modèle de bout en bout pour répondre aux questions sur une base de connaissances avec une attention croisée combinant les connaissances mondiales', 'es': 'Un modelo integral para responder preguntas a través de la base de conocimientos con atención cruzada que combina el conocimiento global', 'zh': '一端到端者,所以对知识库,合全球知也', 'ja': 'グローバルな知識を組み合わせたクロスアテンションを備えた、ナレッジベース上で質問に答えるためのエンドツーエンドのモデル', 'ru': 'Сквозная модель ответа на вопросы по базе знаний с перекрестным вниманием, объединяющим глобальные знания', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-अटेंशन संयोजन वैश्विक ज्ञान के साथ नॉलेज बेस पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल', 'ga': 'Samhail ó cheann ceann le haghaidh Freagraí ar Cheisteanna thar Bhonn Eolais le Trasaire a Chomhcheanglaíonn Eolas Domhanda', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egy teljes körű modell a tudásbázison keresztüli kérdések megválaszolására és a globális tudás kombinálására', 'el': 'Ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων μέσω της Γνωσιακής βάσης με τον συνδυασμό παγκόσμιας γνώσης', 'it': 'Un modello end-to-end per rispondere alle domande sulla Knowledge Base con attenzione incrociata che combina conoscenze globali', 'kk': 'Жалпы білім мәліметтерді білім негізінде жауап беру сұрақ аяқтау- аяқтау үлгісі', 'mk': 'Модел од крај до крај за одговори на прашања во врска со базата на знаење со вкрстен внимание во комбинација на глобално знаење', 'lt': 'Nuo galo į galą atsakymo į klausimus, susijusius su žinių baze, modelis su kryžminiu dėmesiu derinant visuotines žinias', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ മറുപടിയ്ക്കുള്ള ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ അവസാനം- അവസാനിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudell minn tmiem sa tmiem għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-Bażi tal-Għarfien b’Attenzjoni Konġunta ta’ Għarfien Globali', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн үндсэн талаар асуултын төгсгөл-төгсгөлийн загвар дэлхийн мэдлэг холбоотой олон анхаарлын төгсгөл-төгсгөл загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Kompleksowy model odpowiedzi na pytania za pośrednictwem bazy wiedzy z łączeniem globalnej wiedzy', 'ro': 'Un model end-to-end pentru răspunsurile la întrebări în baza de cunoștințe cu atenția încrucișată combinând cunoștințele globale', 'sr': 'Model kraja do kraja za odgovor na pitanje o bazi znanja sa povezanim svetskim znanjem', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En heltäckande modell för att besvara frågor via kunskapsbas med korsuppmärksamhet som kombinerar global kunskap', 'so': 'A End-to-End Model of Questions over Knowledge Base with Cross-Attention Combining Global Knowledge', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையின் மீது பதில் கேள்விக்கான முடிவு- இறுதி முடிவு மாதிரி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một chương trình kết thúc-đến-cuối cho câu hỏi đáp trả về Nhà tri thức bằng sự kết hợp to àn cầu tri thức', 'bg': 'Модел от край до край за отговор на въпроси в базата данни с кръстосано внимание, съчетаващ глобално знание', 'hr': 'Model kraja do kraja za odgovor na pitanje o bazi znanja s povezanim svetskim znanjem', 'nl': 'Een end-to-end model voor het beantwoorden van vragen via Knowledge Base met Cross-Attention Combinatie van wereldwijde kennis', 'da': 'En end-to-end model til spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbase med krydsopmærksomhed, der kombinerer global viden', 'de': 'Ein End-to-End-Modell zur Beantwortung von Fragen über Knowledge Base mit Cross-Attention-Kombination von globalem Wissen', 'ko': '전역 지식의 교차와 결합하여 지식 라이브러리에서 끝까지 문답 모형을 주의하다', 'id': 'Name', 'fa': 'یک مدل پایان و پایان برای سوال جواب دادن بر پایه علم با دانش جهانی متصل کردن توجه', 'tr': 'Bilim sistemi bilen birleşýän bilgi bilen soragy üçin bir ahyrdan soňra bir nusga', 'sw': 'Utawala wa mwisho wa mwisho wa swali kwa jibu la msingi wa maarifa na Kushirikisha Ujuzi wa Kimataifa', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një model nga fundi në fund për përgjigjet e pyetjeve mbi bazën e njohurive me vëmendje të ndërsjelltë që kombinon njohuritë globale', 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանի վերջ-վերջ մոդել գիտելիքի հիմքի վերաբերյալ համընդհանուր ուշադրության հետ համադրելով գլոբալ գիտելիքը', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিতে প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি শেষ- থেকে শেষ মডেল', 'az': 'Bilim bazı ilə birləşdirilən küresel bilgi ilə birləşdirilən sual üçün son-to-end modeli', 'am': 'An End-to-End Model for Question Answering over Knowledge Base with Cross-Attention Combining Global Knowledge', 'ca': 'Un model final a final de resposta a preguntes sobre la base del coneixement amb una atenció cruzada combinant el coneixement global', 'bs': 'Model kraja do kraja za odgovor na pitanje o bazi znanja s povezanim svetskim znanjem', 'cs': 'End-to-End model pro zodpovězení otázek prostřednictvím znalostní báze s křížovou pozorností kombinující globální znalosti', 'et': 'Üldine mudel küsimustele vastamiseks teabebaasi üle ja ülemaailmsete teadmiste ühendamiseks tähelepanu pööravate küsimustega', 'fi': 'Kokonaisvaltainen malli tietotietokannan kysymyksiin vastaamiseen ja maailmanlaajuisen tietämyksen yhdistämiseen', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'An End-to-End Model for Question Answering over Knowledge Base with Cross-Attention Combining Global Knowledge', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Celovit model za odgovarjanje na vprašanja v zbirki znanja z navzkrižno pozornostjo, ki združuje globalno znanje', 'bo': 'An End-to-End Model for Question Answering over Knowledge Base with Cross-Attention Combining Global Knowledge'}
{'en': 'With the rapid growth of knowledge bases (KBs) on the web, how to take full advantage of them becomes increasingly important. Question answering over knowledge base (KB-QA) is one of the promising approaches to access the substantial knowledge. Meanwhile, as the neural network-based (NN-based) methods develop, NN-based KB-QA has already achieved impressive results. However, previous work did not put more emphasis on question representation, and the question is converted into a fixed vector regardless of its candidate answers. This simple representation strategy is not easy to express the proper information in the question. Hence, we present an end-to-end neural network model to represent the questions and their corresponding scores dynamically according to the various candidate answer aspects via cross-attention mechanism. In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers. As a result, it could alleviates the out-of-vocabulary (OOV) problem, which helps the cross-attention model to represent the question more precisely. The experimental results on WebQuestions demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach.', 'ar': 'مع النمو السريع لقواعد المعرفة (KBs) على الويب ، تزداد أهمية كيفية الاستفادة الكاملة منها. تعد الإجابة عن الأسئلة على قاعدة المعرفة (KB-QA) أحد الأساليب الواعدة للوصول إلى المعرفة الجوهرية. وفي الوقت نفسه ، مع تطور الأساليب المستندة إلى الشبكة العصبية (المستندة إلى NN) ، حققت KB-QA المستندة إلى NN بالفعل نتائج رائعة. ومع ذلك ، لم يركز العمل السابق بشكل أكبر على تمثيل الأسئلة ، ويتم تحويل السؤال إلى متجه ثابت بغض النظر عن إجابات المرشح. ليس من السهل أن تعبر إستراتيجية التمثيل البسيطة هذه عن المعلومات الصحيحة في السؤال. ومن ثم ، نقدم نموذج شبكة عصبية شاملة لتمثيل الأسئلة والنتائج المقابلة لها ديناميكيًا وفقًا لجوانب الإجابة المختلفة للمرشح عبر آلية الانتباه المتبادل. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإننا نستفيد من المعرفة العالمية داخل قاعدة المعارف الأساسية ، بهدف دمج معلومات قاعدة المعارف الغنية في تمثيل الإجابات. نتيجة لذلك ، يمكن أن يخفف من مشكلة عدم استخدام المفردات (OOV) ، مما يساعد نموذج الانتباه المتبادل على تمثيل السؤال بشكل أكثر دقة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على WebQuestions فعالية النهج المقترح.', 'pt': 'Com o rápido crescimento das bases de conhecimento (KBs) na web, como aproveitá-las ao máximo se torna cada vez mais importante. A resposta a perguntas sobre a base de conhecimento (KB-QA) é uma das abordagens promissoras para acessar o conhecimento substancial. Enquanto isso, à medida que os métodos baseados em rede neural (baseados em NN) se desenvolvem, o KB-QA baseado em NN já alcançou resultados impressionantes. No entanto, trabalhos anteriores não colocaram mais ênfase na representação da pergunta, e a pergunta é convertida em um vetor fixo independentemente de suas respostas candidatas. Esta estratégia de representação simples não é fácil de expressar a informação adequada na pergunta. Assim, apresentamos um modelo de rede neural de ponta a ponta para representar as perguntas e suas pontuações correspondentes dinamicamente de acordo com os vários aspectos da resposta do candidato por meio do mecanismo de atenção cruzada. Além disso, aproveitamos o conhecimento global dentro da KB subjacente, visando integrar as informações ricas da KB na representação das respostas. Como resultado, poderia aliviar o problema de falta de vocabulário (OOV), o que ajuda o modelo de atenção cruzada a representar a pergunta com mais precisão. Os resultados experimentais no WebQuestions demonstram a eficácia da abordagem proposta.', 'fr': "Avec la croissance rapide des bases de connaissances (KB) sur le Web, il devient de plus en plus important de savoir comment en tirer pleinement parti. La réponse aux questions sur la base de connaissances (KB-QA) est l'une des approches prometteuses pour accéder aux connaissances substantielles. Pendant ce temps, à mesure que les méthodes basées sur les réseaux de neurones (basées sur NN) se développent, le KB-QA basé sur NN a déjà obtenu des résultats impressionnants. Cependant, les travaux précédents n'ont pas mis davantage l'accent sur la représentation des questions, et la question est convertie en un vecteur fixe quelles que soient les réponses des candidats. Cette stratégie de représentation simple n'est pas facile pour exprimer les informations appropriées dans la question. Par conséquent, nous présentons un modèle de réseau neuronal de bout en bout pour représenter dynamiquement les questions et leurs scores correspondants en fonction des différents aspects de réponse des candidats via un mécanisme d'attention croisée. En outre, nous tirons parti des connaissances globales contenues dans la base de connaissances sous-jacente, dans le but d'intégrer les informations riches de la base de connaissances dans la représentation des réponses. En conséquence, cela pourrait atténuer le problème de hors vocabulaire (OOV), ce qui aide le modèle d'attention croisée à représenter la question plus précisément. Les résultats expérimentaux sur WebQuestions démontrent l'efficacité de l'approche proposée.", 'es': 'Con el rápido crecimiento de las bases de conocimiento (KB) en la web, la forma de aprovecharlas al máximo se vuelve cada vez más importante. La respuesta a preguntas sobre la base de conocimientos (KB-QA) es uno de los enfoques prometedores para acceder al conocimiento sustancial. Mientras tanto, a medida que se desarrollan los métodos basados en redes neuronales (basados en CN), el KB-QA basado en CN ya ha logrado resultados impresionantes. Sin embargo, el trabajo anterior no puso más énfasis en la representación de las preguntas, y la pregunta se convierte en un vector fijo independientemente de las respuestas de sus candidatos. Esta simple estrategia de representación no es fácil de expresar la información adecuada en la pregunta. Por lo tanto, presentamos un modelo de red neuronal de extremo a extremo para representar las preguntas y sus puntuaciones correspondientes de forma dinámica de acuerdo con los diversos aspectos de las respuestas candidatas a través del mecanismo de atención cruzada Además, aprovechamos el conocimiento global dentro de la base de conocimiento subyacente, con el objetivo de integrar la rica información de la base de conocimientos en la representación de las respuestas. Como resultado, podría aliviar el problema de la falta de vocabulario (OOV), lo que ayuda al modelo de atención cruzada a representar la pregunta con mayor precisión. Los resultados experimentales en WebQuestions demuestran la eficacia del enfoque propuesto.', 'ja': 'ウェブ上の知識ベース（ KB ）の急速な成長に伴い、それらをどのようにフルに活用するかがますます重要になります。 ナレッジベース（ KB - QA ）上で質問に答えることは、実質的な知識にアクセスするための有望なアプローチの1つです。 一方、ニューラルネットワークベース（ NNベース）の手法が発達するにつれて、NNベースのKB - QAはすでに印象的な結果を達成している。 しかし、前作では質問表現をより重視しておらず、候補者の答えに関わらず質問は固定ベクトルに変換されている。 この単純な表現戦略は、問題の適切な情報を表現するのは簡単ではありません。 したがって、エンドツーエンドのニューラルネットワークモデルを提示して、クロスアテンションメカニズムを介して様々な候補回答の態様に従って、質問とそれらの対応するスコアを動的に表現する。 さらに、基礎となるKB内のグローバルな知識を活用し、豊富なKB情報を回答の表現に統合することを目指します。 その結果、語彙外（ OOV ）問題を緩和することができ、クロスアテンションモデルが質問をより正確に表現するのに役立ちます。 WebQuestionsの実験結果は、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示しています。', 'zh': '随 Web 上知识库 (KB) 快速增长,何以充转重。 以知识库对(KB-QA)大得知之道也。 又随其神经网络( NN)之术,基于 NN KB-QA 已得其象矣。 然前事未尝更强,且其选对如何,转为定向量。 此策未易得也。 故立端到端之神经网络,因交而制之,以候选应对之分。 又因基础知识库全球,集知识库信于答案。 故其可以解词汇量外(OOV),此助交体之精也。 WebQuestions上实验验其有效性。', 'ru': 'С быстрым ростом баз знаний (БЗ) в Интернете, как в полной мере использовать их становится все более важным. Одним из перспективных подходов к доступу к существенным знаниям является ответ на вопрос по базе знаний (KB-QA). Между тем, по мере развития нейросетевых (NN-based) методов, KB-QA на основе NN уже достиг впечатляющих результатов. Однако в предыдущей работе больше внимания не уделялось представлению вопросов, и вопрос преобразуется в фиксированный вектор независимо от его ответов-кандидатов. Эта простая стратегия представления нелегко выразить надлежащую информацию в вопросе. Следовательно, мы представляем сквозную модель нейронной сети для динамического представления вопросов и их соответствующих оценок в соответствии с различными аспектами ответов кандидатов с помощью механизма перекрестного внимания. Кроме того, мы используем глобальные знания внутри базового КБ, стремясь интегрировать богатую информацию КБ в представление ответов. В результате, это может облегчить проблему вне лексики (OOV), что помогает модели перекрестного внимания представить вопрос более точно. Экспериментальные результаты по WebQuestions демонстрируют эффективность предлагаемого подхода.', 'hi': 'वेब पर ज्ञान के आधार (केबी) के तेजी से विकास के साथ, उनका पूरा लाभ कैसे उठाया जाए, यह तेजी से महत्वपूर्ण हो जाता है। नॉलेज बेस (KB-QA) पर उत्तर देने वाला प्रश्न पर्याप्त ज्ञान तक पहुंचने के लिए आशाजनक दृष्टिकोणों में से एक है। इस बीच, जैसा कि तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित (एनएन-आधारित) विधियां विकसित होती हैं, एनएन-आधारित केबी-क्यूए ने पहले से ही प्रभावशाली परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, पिछले काम ने प्रश्न प्रतिनिधित्व पर अधिक जोर नहीं दिया, और प्रश्न को अपने उम्मीदवार के उत्तरों की परवाह किए बिना एक निश्चित वेक्टर में परिवर्तित कर दिया गया है। यह सरल प्रतिनिधित्व रणनीति प्रश्न में उचित जानकारी व्यक्त करना आसान नहीं है। इसलिए, हम क्रॉस-अटेंशन तंत्र के माध्यम से विभिन्न उम्मीदवार उत्तर पहलुओं के अनुसार प्रश्नों और उनके संबंधित स्कोर का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल नेटवर्क मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अंतर्निहित KB के अंदर वैश्विक ज्ञान का लाभ उठाते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य उत्तरों के प्रतिनिधित्व में समृद्ध KB जानकारी को एकीकृत करना है। नतीजतन, यह आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली (ओओवी) समस्या को कम कर सकता है, जो क्रॉस-अटेंशन मॉडल को प्रश्न को अधिक सटीक रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व करने में मदद करता है। WebQuestions पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'De réir mar a thagann fás tapa ar bhoinn eolais (KBanna) ar an ngréasán, éiríonn níos tábhachtaí fós conas leas iomlán a bhaint astu. Tá freagra ceisteanna thar an mbonn eolais (KB-QA) ar cheann de na cineálacha cur chuige a bhfuil gealladh fúthu chun teacht ar an eolas substaintiúil. Idir an dá linn, de réir mar a fhorbraíonn modhanna néaracha líonra-bhunaithe (NN-bhunaithe), tá torthaí suntasacha bainte amach cheana féin ag KB-QA atá bunaithe ar NN. Níor chuir obair roimhe seo níos mó béime ar léiriú ceisteanna, áfach, agus déantar an cheist a thiontú ina veicteoir seasta beag beann ar fhreagraí na n-iarrthóirí. Níl an straitéis ionadaíochta simplí seo éasca an t-eolas cuí a chur in iúl sa cheist. Mar sin, cuirimid i láthair samhail líonra néarúil deireadh go deireadh chun na ceisteanna agus a gcuid scóir comhfhreagracha a léiriú go dinimiciúil de réir na ngnéithe éagsúla freagra iarrthóra trí mheicníocht tras-aire. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid giaráil ar an eolas domhanda laistigh den KB bhunúsach, agus é mar aidhm againn an t-eolas saibhir KB a chomhtháthú i léiriú na bhfreagraí. Mar thoradh air sin, d’fhéadfadh sé an fhadhb lasmuigh den stór focal (OOV) a mhaolú, rud a chabhraíonn leis an múnla tras-aire an cheist a léiriú ar bhealach níos cruinne. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar WebQuestions éifeachtacht an chur chuige atá beartaithe.', 'el': 'Με την ταχεία ανάπτυξη των βάσεων γνώσης στο διαδίκτυο, ο τρόπος αξιοποίησης αυτών γίνεται ολοένα και πιο σημαντικός. Η απάντηση ερωτήσεων μέσω της βάσης γνώσης (ΚΒ-QA) είναι μια από τις ελπιδοφόρες προσεγγίσεις για την πρόσβαση στην ουσιαστική γνώση. Εν τω μεταξύ, καθώς αναπτύσσονται οι μέθοδοι με βάση το νευρωνικό δίκτυο (με βάση το ΝΝ), η ΚΒ-QA με βάση το ΝΝ έχει ήδη επιτύχει εντυπωσιακά αποτελέσματα. Ωστόσο, η προηγούμενη εργασία δεν έδωσε μεγαλύτερη έμφαση στην αναπαράσταση των ερωτήσεων, και η ερώτηση μετατρέπεται σε σταθερό φορέα ανεξάρτητα από τις υποψήφιες απαντήσεις της. Αυτή η απλή στρατηγική εκπροσώπησης δεν είναι εύκολο να εκφράσει τις κατάλληλες πληροφορίες στο ερώτημα. Ως εκ τούτου, παρουσιάζουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου για την αναπαράσταση των ερωτήσεων και των αντίστοιχων βαθμολογιών τους δυναμικά σύμφωνα με τις διάφορες πτυχές των υποψήφιων απαντήσεων μέσω μηχανισμού διασταυρούμενης προσοχής. Επιπλέον, αξιοποιούμε την παγκόσμια γνώση μέσα στην υποκείμενη ΚΒ, με στόχο την ενσωμάτωση των πλούσιων πληροφοριών ΚΒ στην αναπαράσταση των απαντήσεων. Ως αποτέλεσμα, θα μπορούσε να ανακουφίσει το πρόβλημα εκτός λεξιλογίου (OOV), το οποίο βοηθά το μοντέλο διασταυρούμενης προσοχής να αναπαριστά το ερώτημα με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στις ερωτήσεις αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης.', 'hu': 'Az interneten lévő tudásbázisok gyors növekedésével egyre fontosabbá válik, hogy hogyan lehet teljes mértékben kihasználni azokat. A tudásbázis (KB-QA) feletti kérdések megválaszolása az egyik ígéretes megközelítés a lényeges tudás hozzáféréséhez. Eközben a neurális hálózat alapú (NN alapú) módszerek fejlődésével az NN alapú KB-QA már lenyűgöző eredményeket ért el. Az előző munka azonban nem helyezett nagyobb hangsúlyt a kérdésreformációra, és a kérdés fix vektorrá alakul, függetlenül a jelöltek válaszaitól. Ez az egyszerű képviseleti stratégia nem könnyű kifejezni a megfelelő információkat a kérdésben. Ezért bemutatunk egy end-to-end neurális hálózati modellt, amely dinamikusan reprezentálja a kérdéseket és azokhoz kapcsolódó pontszámokat a különböző jelölt válasz aspektusainak megfelelően keresztfigyelem mechanizmuson keresztül. Ezenkívül kihasználjuk az alapul szolgáló KB-n belüli globális tudást, azzal a céllal, hogy a gazdag KB-információkat integráljuk a válaszok ábrázolásába. Ennek eredményeképpen enyhítheti a szókincsen kívüli (OOV) problémát, ami segít a keresztfigyelem modellnek pontosabban megjeleníteni a kérdést. A WebQuestions kísérleti eredményei bizonyítják a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების ბაზების (კიბი) ბრძნობითი გაზრდებით, როგორ გამოიყენება მათ ყველა გამოიყენება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. კითხვა, რომელიც მეცნიერების ბაზის შესახებ (KB-QA) იგივეა, რომელიც გვეყვებულია გასაღებისთვის გასაღებისთვის. Meanwhile, as the neural network based (NN-based) methods develop, NN-based KB-QA has already achieved impressive results. მაგრამ წინა სამუშაო მუშაობა კითხვის გამოსახულებაზე უფრო მეტი აღმოჩენა, და კითხვა იქნება განსახულებული ვექტორიში გადაცვლა, regardless of its candidate answers. ეს მარტივი გამოსახულების სტრატიგია კითხვაში მარტივი ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება არ არის ადვილი. ამიტომ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი, რომელიც კითხვები და მათი შესაბამისი წერტილებები დინამიკურად განსხვავებული კანდიდენტის განსხვავებების განსხვავება განსხვავებების განსხვავებ დამატებით, ჩვენ გლობალური ცნობილებას KB-ის შორის ჩვენებთ, რომელიც მინდომარებული KB ინფორმაციის ინტერგურაციას გამოყენებაში. შესაძლებელია გარეშე სიტყვებლის (OOV) პრობლემა, რომელიც უფრო მართლად გარეშე მოდელს გარეშე კითხვა. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები WebQuestions-ზე გამოჩვენებენ წარმოიდგინული პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა.', 'it': "Con la rapida crescita delle basi di conoscenza (KBs) sul web, diventa sempre più importante come sfruttarle appieno. La risposta alle domande sulla base di conoscenze (KB-QA) è uno degli approcci promettenti per accedere alla conoscenza sostanziale. Nel frattempo, man mano che si sviluppano i metodi basati sulla rete neurale (basati su NN), KB-QA basati su NN ha già ottenuto risultati impressionanti. Tuttavia, il lavoro precedente non ha posto maggiore enfasi sulla rappresentazione delle domande, e la domanda è convertita in un vettore fisso indipendentemente dalle sue risposte candidate. Questa semplice strategia di rappresentazione non è facile esprimere le informazioni corrette nella domanda. Quindi, presentiamo un modello end-to-end di rete neurale per rappresentare le domande e i loro punteggi corrispondenti dinamicamente secondo i vari aspetti della risposta candidata tramite meccanismo di cross-attention. Inoltre, sfruttiamo la conoscenza globale all'interno della KB sottostante, con l'obiettivo di integrare le ricche informazioni KB nella rappresentazione delle risposte. Di conseguenza, potrebbe alleviare il problema fuori dal vocabolario (OOV), che aiuta il modello di attenzione incrociata a rappresentare la domanda in modo più preciso. I risultati sperimentali su WebQuestions dimostrano l'efficacia dell'approccio proposto.", 'ms': 'Dengan pertumbuhan cepat pangkalan pengetahuan (KB) di web, bagaimana untuk mengambil keuntungan penuh daripada mereka menjadi semakin penting. Jawapan soalan atas pangkalan pengetahuan (KB-QA) adalah salah satu pendekatan yang berjanji untuk mengakses pengetahuan yang penting. Sementara itu, semasa kaedah berdasarkan rangkaian saraf (berdasarkan NN) berkembang, KB-QA berdasarkan NN telah mencapai keputusan yang mengesankan. Namun, kerja terdahulu tidak meletakkan lebih fokus pada perwakilan soalan, dan soalan diubah ke vektor tetap tidak kira-kira jawapan calon. Strategi perwakilan sederhana ini tidak mudah untuk mengekspresikan maklumat yang betul dalam soalan ini. Oleh itu, kami memperkenalkan model rangkaian saraf akhir-akhir untuk mewakili soalan dan skor sepadan mereka secara dinamik mengikut aspek jawapan calon berbeza melalui mekanisme perhatian salib. In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers.  As a result, it could alleviates the out-of-vocabulary (OOV) problem, which helps the cross-attention model to represent the question more precisely.  Hasil percubaan soalan sesawang menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan yang diusulkan.', 'lt': 'Dėl spartaus žinių bazių (KB) augimo internete vis svarbesnis būdas visapusiškai pasinaudoti jomis. Atsakymas į klausimus dėl žinių bazės (KB-QA) yra vienas iš perspektyvių būdų naudotis esminėmis žiniomis. Tuo tarpu, plėtojant nervų tinklu pagrįstus (NN pagrįstus) metodus, NN pagrįsto KB-QA jau pasiekė įspūdingų rezultatų. Tačiau ankstesniame darbe daugiau dėmesio nebuvo skiriama klausimų pateikimui ir klausimas tampa fiksuotu veiksniu, neatsižvelgiant į kandidato atsakymus. Ši paprasta atstovavimo strategija nėra lengva išreikšti tinkamą informaciją šiuo klausimu. Hence, we present an end-to-end neural network model to represent the questions and their corresponding scores dynamically according to the various candidate answer aspects via cross-attention mechanism.  In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers.  As a result, it could alleviates the out-of-vocabulary (OOV) problem, which helps the cross-attention model to represent the question more precisely.  Eksperimentiniai internetinių klausimų rezultatai rodo siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі білім бағдарламалардың (КБ) жылдам өсімінен, олардың толық пайдалануын қалай көп маңызды болады. Білім негізінде (KB-QA) жауап беру сұрақ - маңызды мәліметтерге қатынау үшін үлкен жағдайлардың бірі. Осы уақытта, NN- негіздеген желінің (NN- негіздеген) әдістері жасағанда, KB- QA негіздеген KB- QA нәтижелері бар ғой. Бірақ, алдыңғы жұмыс сұрақтар көрсетіліміне көбірек маңызды болмады, және сұрақ кандидаттарының жауаптарына қарамастан, тұрақты векторға аударылады. Бұл қарапайым келтіру стратегиясы сұрақтағы дұрыс мәліметті көрсету оңай емес. Сондықтан біз сұрақтарды және оның сұрақтарды динамикалық түрлі кандидаттардың жауап аспектеріне сәйкес беру үшін невралдық желі үлгісін таңдаймыз. Қосымша, біз КБ-нің астындағы жүйелік білімдерді көмектесеміз. Бұл КБ мәліметін жауаптарды көрсетуге көмектесеміз. Сонымен бұл сөздердің сыртқы мәселесін көмектесе алады. Бұл сұрақты дұрыс көрсетуге көмектеседі. ВебСұрақтардың тәжірибелі нәтижелері келтірілген тәжірибенің эффектілігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Со брзиот раст на базите на знаење (КБ) на интернетот, како да се искористи целосно од нив станува сé важно. Одговорот на прашањата во врска со базата на знаење (КБ-КА) е еден од ветувачките пристапи за пристап до значителното знаење. Во меѓувреме, додека се развиваат методите на нервната мрежа (базирани на НН), КБ-КА базирани на НН веќе постигна импресивни резултати. Сепак, претходната работа не стави поголем акцент на претставувањето на прашањата и прашањето се претвора во фиксен вектор без оглед на неговите кандидатски одговори. This simple representation strategy is not easy to express the proper information in the question.  Hence, we present an end-to-end neural network model to represent the questions and their corresponding scores dynamically according to the various candidate answer aspects via cross-attention mechanism.  Покрај тоа, го искористуваме глобалното знаење во основната КБ, со цел да ги интегрираме богатите информации за КБ во претставувањето на одговорите. Како резултат на тоа, тоа би можело да го олесни проблемот надвор од речникот (ООВ), кој му помага на моделот на крстовнимание да го претставува прашањето попрецизно. Експерименталните резултати на веб прашањата ја покажуваат ефикасноста на предложениот пристап.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэлийн суурь (КБ) хурдан өсөлтэй вэб дээр хэрхэн бүрэн ашиг ашиглах нь илүү чухал болдог. Мэдлэгийн суурь дээр хариулт өгсөн асуулт бол хамгийн чухал мэдлэгтэй хүрэх амлалтай ойлголт юм. Энэ үед мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан (NN-based) аргыг хөгжүүлэхэд NN-based KB-QA нь аль хэдийн гайхалтай үр дүнг гаргасан. Гэхдээ өмнөх ажил асуулт илтгэлийн талаар илүү их анхаарал тавьж чадахгүй. Тэгээд асуулт нь түүний шагналын хариултаас хамаагүй тогтмол вектор болно. Энэ энгийн үзүүлэлтийн стратеги асуултын зөв мэдээллийг илэрхийлэх нь амархан биш. Иймээс бид асуултуудыг харуулахын тулд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний төгсгөлийн загварыг харуулж, тэдний харьцангуй тоогуудыг олон анхаарлын механизм аргаар дүрслэн хариултын асуудлыг харуулж байна. Мөн бид КБ-ын дотор дэлхийн мэдлэгийг ашиглаж, баян КБ-ын мэдээллийг хариултын төлөвлөгөөнд нэгтгэх зорилготой. Үүний үр дүнд энэ асуудлыг илүү тодорхой харуулахад тусалдаг үгүйсгэлийн асуудлыг багасгаж болно. Веб асуултуудын туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга замын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'വെബിലുള്ള അറിവുകളുടെ (കെബിഐ) വേഗത്തിലുള്ള വൃദ്ധിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, അവയെ എങ്ങനെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d  അറിവുകളുടെ ബേസില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യം (കെബി- ക്യൂഎ) എന്നതാണ് ഏറ്റവും വലിയ അറിവുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിക ഇപ്പോള്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ (NN-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ) രീതികള്\u200d വളര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, NN-അടിസ് However, previous work did not put more emphasis on question representation, and the question is converted into a fixed vector regardless of its candidate answers.  ഈ ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d ശരിയായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമൊന്നുമല്ല. അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കാന്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അവരുടെ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്ക കെബിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ലോക ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അകത്തുള്ള അറിവ് നമ്മള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നു. സമ്പന്നര്\u200d കെബിയുടെ ഉത്തരങ്ങളുടെ  അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി, അത് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുപോകാത്ത പ്രശ്നം (OOV) ലളിതമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അത് ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മോഡ വെബ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധ്യതയുടെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Permezz tat-tkabbir mgħaġġel tal-bażijiet tal-għarfien (KBs) fuq l-internet, kif wieħed jieħu vantaġġ sħiħ minnhom isir dejjem aktar importanti. It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-bażi tal-għarfien (KB-QA) hija waħda mill-approċċi promettenti għall-aċċess għall-għarfien sostanzjali. Sadanittant, hekk kif jiżviluppaw metodi bbażati fuq in-netwerk newrali (ibbażati fuq NN), KB-QA bbażat fuq NN diġà kisbet riżultati impressjonanti. Madankollu, ix-xogħol preċedenti ma poġġax aktar enfasi fuq ir-rappreżentanza tal-mistoqsijiet, u l-mistoqsija tinbidel f’vettur fiss irrispettivament mit-tweġibiet kandidati tagħha. Din l-istrateġija sempliċi ta’ rappreżentanza mhijiex faċli biex tiġi espressa l-informazzjoni xierqa fil-kwistjoni. Għalhekk, qed nippreżentaw mudell ta’ netwerk newrali minn tarf sa tarf biex jirrappreżenta l-mistoqsijiet u l-punteġġi korrispondenti tagħhom b’mod dinamiku skont id-diversi aspetti tat-tweġibiet kandidati permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ kontro-attenzjoni. In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers.  B’riżultat ta’ dan, dan jista’ jtaffi l-problem a barra mill-vokabulari (OOV), li tgħin lill-mudell ta’ attenzjoni inkroċjata biex jirrappreżenta l-kwistjoni b’mod aktar preċiż. Ir-riżultati sperimentali dwar il-mistoqsijiet fuq l-internet juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost.', 'no': 'Med raskt vekst av kunnskapsbaser (KBs) på nettet blir korleis det skal bruka fullstendig fordel av dei større viktig. Spørsmålet som svarar over kunnskapsbasen (KB-QA) er ein av dei promiserande tilnærmingane til å få tilgang til den store kunnskapen. NN-basert KB-QA har allereie oppnådd uttrykkelige resultat, sidan den neirale nettverksbaserte metodane (NN-baserte) utviklar. Førre arbeid har imidlertid ikkje sett meir oppmerking på spørsmålsrepresentasjonen, og spørsmålet vert konvertert til ein fast vektor uansett av kandidatsvara. Dette enkle representasjonsstrategien er ikkje lett å uttrykke den rette informasjonen i spørsmålet. Derfor presenterer vi ein neuralnettverksmodell til slutten til slutten for å representera spørsmålene og deres tilsvarande poeng dynamisk etter dei ulike kandidate svaraspektane via fleire oppmerksmekanisme. I tillegg leverer vi den globale kunnskapen i den underliggende KB-en, som målet å integrera rike KB-informasjonen i representasjonen av svara. Som resultat kan det alleviare problem med utrykke ordliste (OOV), som hjelper kryss-oppmerksområdet til å representera spørsmålet meir nøyaktig. Eksperimentale resultatene på WebQuestions viser effektiviteten av den foreslåde tilnærminga.', 'pl': 'Wraz z szybkim rozwojem baz wiedzy (KBs) w sieci, coraz ważniejsze staje się, jak w pełni z nich wykorzystać. Odpowiadanie na pytania przez bazę wiedzy (KB-QA) jest jednym z obiecujących podejść do uzyskania dostępu do znaczącej wiedzy. Tymczasem w miarę rozwoju metod opartych na sieci neuronowej (opartych na NN), oparty na NN KB-QA osiągnął już imponujące rezultaty. Jednak poprzednie prace nie położyły większego nacisku na reprezentację pytań, a pytanie jest przekształcane na stały wektor niezależnie od odpowiedzi kandydatów. Ta prosta strategia reprezentacji nie jest łatwa do wyrażenia właściwej informacji w pytaniu. W związku z tym przedstawiamy kompleksowy model sieci neuronowej, aby dynamicznie reprezentować pytania i odpowiadające im wyniki według różnych aspektów odpowiedzi kandydatów za pomocą mechanizmu cross-attention. Ponadto wykorzystujemy globalną wiedzę wewnątrz bazowej KB, mając na celu zintegrowanie bogatych informacji KB w reprezentacji odpowiedzi. W rezultacie może to złagodzić problem poza słownictwem (OOV), co pomaga modelowi uwagi krzyżowej precyzyjniej reprezentować pytanie. Wyniki eksperymentalne na WebQuestions pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia.', 'ro': 'Odată cu creșterea rapidă a bazelor de cunoștințe (KBs) de pe web, modul de a profita pe deplin de acestea devine din ce în ce mai important. Răspunsul la întrebări privind baza de cunoștințe (KB-QA) este una dintre abordările promițătoare pentru a accesa cunoștințele substanțiale. Între timp, pe măsură ce se dezvoltă metodele bazate pe rețele neurale (bazate pe NN), KB-QA bazate pe NN a obținut deja rezultate impresionante. Cu toate acestea, lucrările anterioare nu au pus mai mult accent pe reprezentarea întrebărilor, iar întrebarea este transformată într-un vector fix indiferent de răspunsurile candidatului. Această strategie simplă de reprezentare nu este ușor de exprimat informațiile corespunzătoare în întrebare. Prin urmare, prezentăm un model end-to-end de rețea neurală pentru a reprezenta întrebările și punctajele corespunzătoare acestora dinamic în funcție de diferitele aspecte ale răspunsului candidat prin intermediul mecanismului de atenție încrucișată. În plus, valorificăm cunoștințele globale din interiorul KB-ului subiacent, având ca scop integrarea informațiilor KB bogate în reprezentarea răspunsurilor. Ca rezultat, ar putea atenua problema out-of-vocabular (OOV), care ajută modelul de atenție încrucișată să reprezinte întrebarea mai precis. Rezultatele experimentale pe WebQuestions demonstrează eficacitatea abordării propuse.', 'so': "Webiga, sida loo isticmaalayo faa'iidada dhamaantood, sida ay ugu muhiimsan tahay koritaanka aasaaska aqoonta (KBs). su'aalaha ka jawaabta aasaasiga aqoonta (KB-QA) waa mid ka mid ah kuwa loo ballanqaaday inuu helo aqoonta muhiimka ah. Wakhtigaas, marka qaababka neural network ku saleysan (NN-based) ay horumariyaan, waxaa horay u helay resulto wanaagsan oo ku saleysan KB-QA. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shuqulkii hore wax badan oo ku saabsan wakiilka su'aalaha, su'aalkuna waxay u beddelaysaa wado saxda ah, haba kastoo ay ka jawaabeyso jawaabaha kandida ah. Qoraalkan qaabilaadda ee fudud ma fudud in lagu caddeeyo macluumaadka saxda ah. Sidaa darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa model shabakadda neurada ugu dambaysta ah si aan u represento su'aalaha iyo iskuullada ay u dhigto si farxad leh sida ay u qabtaan jawaabta waqtiyada kala duduwan ee kandidadu ku qoran meymisyada iskuulka. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu aqoonta caalamiga ah ku qoraynaa KB hoose, taas oo loogu talo galay in macluumaadka taajirka KB lagu soo wadayo qaabka jawaabaha. As a result, it could alleviates the out-of-vocabulary (OOV) problem, which helps the cross-attention model to represent the question more precisely.  Midhaha imtixaanka ee ku saabsan su'aalaha Web-Questiyadu waxay muujiyaan effektada qaababka la soo jeeday.", 'sv': 'Med den snabba tillväxten av kunskapsbaser på webben blir det allt viktigare att dra full nytta av dem. Frågeställning över kunskapsbas (KB-QA) är ett av de lovande tillvägagångssätten för att få tillgång till den omfattande kunskapen. Samtidigt som de neurala nätverksbaserade (NN-baserade) metoderna utvecklas har NN-baserade KB-QA redan uppnått imponerande resultat. Tidigare arbete har dock inte lagt större vikt vid frågerepresentation, och frågan omvandlas till en fast vektor oavsett kandidatens svar. Denna enkla representationsstrategi är inte lätt att uttrycka korrekt information i frågan. Därför presenterar vi en end-to-end neural nätverksmodell för att representera frågorna och deras motsvarande poäng dynamiskt enligt de olika kandidatsvarsaspekterna via korsuppmärksamhetsmekanism. Dessutom utnyttjar vi den globala kunskapen inuti den underliggande KB och syftar till att integrera den rika KB-informationen i representationen av svaren. Som ett resultat kan det lindra problemet med out-of-vokabulär (OOV), vilket hjälper korsuppmärksamhetsmodellen att representera frågan mer exakt. De experimentella resultaten på WebQuestions visar hur effektivt det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet är.', 'sr': 'Sa brzom rastom baza znanja (KBs) na internetu, kako da iskoristite punu korist od njih postaje sve važnije. Pitanje na odgovor na bazu znanja (KB-QA) je jedan od obećavajućih pristupa pristupu znanju. U međuvremenu, kako se metode na neuralnoj mreži (na NN-baziranoj) razvijaju, KB-QA na NN-baziranoj je već ostvarila impresivne rezultate. Međutim, prethodni rad nije stavio više naglaska na zastupanje pitanja, a pitanje se pretvara u fiksni vektor bez obzira na odgovore na kandidate. Ova jednostavna strategija predstavljanja nije lako izraziti odgovarajuće informacije na pitanju. Stoga predstavljamo model neuralne mreže na kraju do kraja kako bi predstavili pitanja i njihove odgovarajuće rezultate dinamično prema različitim aspektima odgovora kandidata preko mehanizma prekršne pažnje. Osim toga, uvećavamo globalno znanje unutar temeljnog KB-a, ciljanje integrisanja bogatih KB informacija u predstavljanje odgovora. Kao rezultat toga, moglo bi ublažiti problem izvan rečnika (OOV), koji pomaže model prekršne pažnje da predstavi pitanje tačnije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na WebQuestionima pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa.', 'si': 'වෙබ් එකේ දැනගන්න බේස් එක්ක ඉක්මනින් වැඩ කරන්න, ඔවුන්ගේ පුරුදු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වැඩි වැඩියි. ප්\u200dරශ්න දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (KB-QA) අධ්\u200dයානයට ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල දැනගන්න. අනුවෙන් වෙලාවෙන්, න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ අධාරිත (NN- අධාරිත) විධාන විදියට, NN- අධාරිත KB- QA දැනටමත් ප්\u200dරශ නමුත්, කලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගැන තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නෑ, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්ථිර වෙක්ටර්  මේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ හොඳ තොරතුරු පිළිබඳ කරන්න ලේසි නෑ. ඉතින්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණයක ඒ වගේම, අපි ජාතික දැනගන්නේ KB ඇතුලට, ප්\u200dරශ්ණ KB තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත කරන්න. ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැතිවෙන්න පුළුවන් (OOv) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වෙබ් ප්\u200dරශ්නේ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්', 'ta': 'வலையமைப்பில் அறிவு அடிப்படைகளின் விரைவாக வளர்ச்சியுடன், அவற்றை முழு பயன்படுத்துவது எப்படி முக்கியமாக முக்கியமானது. அறிவு அடிப்படையின் மீது கேள்வி பதில் (KB- QA) என்பது முக்கியமான அறிவிப்பை அணுகுவதற்கு ஒரு வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட நெருங இப்போது, புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையில் (NN- அடிப்படையில்) முறைகள் உருவாக்கும் போது, NN- அடிப்படையில் உள்ள KB- QA ஏற்கனவே சுவார ஆனால் முந்தைய வேலை கேள்வி குறிப்பிடுதல் மேலும் குறிப்பிடாது, கேள்வி ஒரு நிலையான வெக்டராக மாற்றப்படுகிறது, அதன் வார் கேள்வியில் சரியான தகவலை வெளிப்படுத்த இந்த சுலபமான குறிப்பிடும் திட்டம் எளிதாக இல்லை. அதனால், நாம் கேள்விகளை குறிக்க முடியும் முடிவு புதிய பிணையத்தின் மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய பொருத்தமான மதிப்புகளை வி கூடுதலாக, நாம் கீழே உள்ள KB உள்ளே உலக அறிவை ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறோம், அந்த பணக்கார KB தகவலை பதில்களின் குறிப்பிட்டில் சேர்க முடிவினால், அது சொல்வளத்தின் வெளியேற்றத்தை (OOV) பிரச்சனையை எளிதாக்கும், அது கேள்வியை மேலும் சரியாக குறிக்க உதவும். The experimental results on WebQuestions demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach.', 'ur': 'ان سے کامل فائدہ اضافہ کرنا بہت اہم ہوتا ہے۔ علم base (KB-QA) کے بارے میں جواب دینے والی سوال یہ ہے کہ ایک وعدہ دینے والی چیزوں میں سے ایک بڑے علم کے پاس پہنچ جاتا ہے۔ یہاں تک کہ نیورال نیٹ ورک (NN-based) طریقے پیش آتے ہیں، NN-based KB-QA پہلے ہی اثر انگیز نتیجے پہنچ چکے ہیں۔ لیکن اگلے کام سؤال کی نمایش پر زیادہ تسبیح نہیں کیا گیا، اور سؤال ایک ثابت ویکتور میں تبدیل کیا جاتا ہے اگرچہ اس کے کنڈیٹ جواب سے بھی۔ یہ ساده نمایش استراتژی سوال میں ٹھیک معلومات کی تعریف کرنے کے لئے آسان نہیں ہے۔ اسی وجہ سے ہم نے سوالوں اور ان کے مطابق پوچھنے کے لئے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل پیش کیا ہے جو مختلف کنڈیٹ کے جواب الگوں کے مطابق مختلف دکھانے کے مکانیسم کے ذریعہ مطابق ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم کلوبی علم کے اندر استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو کمزور کیب کی اطلاعات کو جواب کے نمونہ میں جمع کرنے کے لئے مطابق ہے. اس کے نتیجے میں یہ بات بات کے باہر مشکل (OOV) کو کمزور کر سکتا ہے، جو اس سؤال کو زیادہ دقیق دکھانے کے لئے مختلف توجه کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ ویب سوالوں کے آزمائش نتیجے پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے مثبت کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Veb- sahifaning tez maʼlumot asosiy (KBs) sohasini ko'paytirish bilan ularning butun foydalanishi qanday muhim bo'ladi. Ogohlantirish asosida javob berish (KB- QA) muhim maʼlumotga murojaat qilish imkoniyatlaridan biri. Meanwhile, as the neural network-based (NN-based) methods develop, NN-based KB-QA has already achieved impressive results.  Lekin oldingi ishni savol taqdimotiga qo'yishmaydi, va savol kandida javoblar bo'lmasa va savol qo'shiladi. Bu oddiy representation strategiya savol haqiqida maʼlumotni koʻrsatish oson emas. Ho'sh, biz savollarni ko'rib chiqarish uchun oxirigi neyron tarmoq modelini ko'rsamiz va ularning qisqarli qiymatlarining boshqa qiymatiga bog'liqchi javob qiymatlari bilan ishlab chiqarishimiz. Ko'pchilik, biz asosiy KB'ning ichida dunyo obʼlumotni qo'llayapmiz, hozir KB haqidagi javoblarni tashkilotga qo'yish uchun yordam beramiz. Natijada, bu soʻzni o'zgartirib chiqarishini (OOV) muammolarini yoqish mumkin. Bu savollarni ko'proq aniqlashga yordam beradi. Name", 'vi': 'Với sự phát triển nhanh của các căn cứ kiến thức (KB) trên mạng, làm thế nào để tận dụng nó thì càng trở nên quan trọng hơn. Câu hỏi trả lời về căn cứ kiến thức (KB-QA) là một trong những phương pháp hứa hẹn để truy cập vào kiến thức thực sự. Trong khi đó, khi các phương pháp dựa vào mạng lưới thần kinh (NNT-căn cứ) phát triển, NNn-based KB-QA đã đạt được rất nhiều kết quả. Tuy nhiên, công việc trước đó không nhấn mạnh hơn về việc phân biệt vấn đề, và câu hỏi được chuyển thành một véc- tơ cố định bất kể câu trả lời ứng cử viên. Đây không phải là một chiến lược đơn giản để diễn tả những thông tin thích đáng trong câu hỏi. Do đó, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mạng thần kinh kết thúc để đại diện cho các câu hỏi và điểm số tương ứng theo một cách động động động theo các khía cạnh ứng cử viên câu trả lời qua cơ quan gây chú ý. Thêm vào đó, chúng ta sẽ thúc đẩy kiến thức toàn cầu bên trong các KB tiềm ẩn, nhằm hướng vào sự khai thác các thông tin giàu có của KB vào các câu trả lời. Kết quả là, nó có thể giảm bớt vấn đề "ngoài từ vựng (OOOV) và giúp cho mô hình gây chú ý hơn là đại diện cho câu hỏi. Các kết quả thử nghiệm về WebQuest chứng minh hiệu quả của kế hoạch này.', 'bg': 'С бързия растеж на базите от знания (КБ) в интернет, как да се възползваме максимално от тях става все по-важно. Отговарянето на въпроси върху базата от знания е един от обещаващите подходи за достъп до съществените знания. Междувременно, с развитието на методите, базирани на невронна мрежа (базирани на NN), вече постигна впечатляващи резултати. Предишната работа обаче не поставя повече акцент върху представянето на въпросите и въпросът се превръща в фиксиран вектор, независимо от отговорите на кандидатите. Тази проста стратегия за представяне не е лесно да се изрази правилната информация във въпроса. Ето защо представяме модел на невронна мрежа от край до край, който да представя въпросите и съответните им оценки динамично според различните аспекти на отговора на кандидатите чрез механизъм за кръстосано внимание. В допълнение, ние използваме глобалното знание в базовия КБ, целейки интегрирането на богатата КБ информация в представянето на отговорите. В резултат на това това може да облекчи проблема извън речника, който помага на модела на кръстосаното внимание да представи въпроса по-точно. Експерименталните резултати на УебВъпроси демонстрират ефективността на предложения подход.', 'da': 'Med den hurtige vækst af vidensbaser (KBs) på nettet bliver det stadig vigtigere at udnytte dem fuldt ud. Spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbase (KB-QA) er en af de lovende tilgange til at få adgang til den betydelige viden. Mens de neurale netværksbaserede (NN-baserede) metoder udvikler sig, har NN-baserede KB-QA allerede opnået imponerende resultater. Tidligere arbejde lagde imidlertid ikke større vægt på spørgsmål repræsentation, og spørgsmålet omdannes til en fast vektor uanset kandidatens svar. Denne enkle repræsentationsstrategi er ikke let at udtrykke de rette oplysninger i spørgsmålet. Derfor præsenterer vi en end-to-end neural netværksmodel til at repræsentere spørgsmålene og deres tilsvarende scorer dynamisk i henhold til de forskellige kandidatsvar aspekter via cross-opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Derudover udnytter vi den globale viden inde i den underliggende KB og sigter mod at integrere den rige KB information i repræsentationen af svarene. Som følge heraf kan det lindre problemet uden for ordforråd (OOV), hvilket hjælper cross-opmærksomhedsmodellen til at repræsentere spørgsmålet mere præcist. De eksperimentelle resultater på WebQuestions viser effektiviteten af den foreslåede tilgang.', 'nl': 'Met de snelle groei van kennisbases (KBs) op het web wordt het steeds belangrijker om er optimaal van te profiteren. Vragen beantwoorden via kennisbank (KB-QA) is een van de veelbelovende benaderingen om toegang te krijgen tot de substantiële kennis. Terwijl de neurale netwerkgebaseerde (NN-gebaseerde) methoden zich ontwikkelen, heeft NN-gebaseerde KB-QA al indrukwekkende resultaten behaald. Eerder werk legde echter niet meer nadruk op vragenrepresentatie, en de vraag wordt omgezet in een vaste vector ongeacht de kandidaat antwoorden. Deze eenvoudige representatiestrategie is niet gemakkelijk om de juiste informatie in de vraag uit te drukken. Daarom presenteren we een end-to-end neuraal netwerkmodel om de vragen en hun bijbehorende scores dynamisch weer te geven volgens de verschillende kandidaat antwoord aspecten via cross-attentie mechanisme. Daarnaast maken we gebruik van de wereldwijde kennis binnen de onderliggende KB, met als doel de rijke KB-informatie te integreren in de weergave van de antwoorden. Als gevolg hiervan zou het out-of-vocabulary (OOV) probleem kunnen verlichten, waardoor het cross-attentie model de vraag nauwkeuriger kan weergeven. De experimentele resultaten op WebQuestions tonen de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde aanpak aan.', 'hr': 'S brzom rastom baza znanja (KBs) na internetu, kako se iskoristiti punu korist od njih postaje sve važnije. Pitanje na odgovor na bazu znanja (KB-QA) je jedan od obećavajućih pristupa pristupu značajnom znanju. U međuvremenu, kako se metode na neuralnoj mreži (bazirane na NN) razvijaju, KB-QA na NN-u već postigle su impresivne rezultate. Međutim, prethodni rad nije naglasio više naglaska na zastupanje pitanja, a pitanje se pretvara u fiksni vektor bez obzira na odgovore kandidata. Ova jednostavna strategija predstavljanja nije lako izraziti odgovarajuće informacije na pitanju. Stoga predstavljamo model neuralne mreže kraja do kraja kako bi predstavljali pitanja i njihove odgovarajuće rezultate dinamički prema različitim aspektima odgovora kandidata preko mehanizma prekršne pažnje. Osim toga, uključujemo globalno znanje unutar temeljnog KB-a, ciljanje integriranja bogatih KB informacija u predstavljanje odgovora. Kao rezultat toga, moglo bi olakšati problem izvan riječnika (OOV), koji pomaže model prekršne pažnje da preciznije predstavi pitanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na WebQuestions pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa.', 'de': 'Mit dem rasanten Wachstum von Wissensbasen (KBs) im Web wird es immer wichtiger, wie man diese optimal nutzen kann. Die Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasis (KB-QA) ist einer der vielversprechenden Ansätze, um auf das substanzielle Wissen zuzugreifen. Während sich die neuronalen netzwerkbasierten (NN-basierten) Methoden weiterentwickeln, hat die NN-basierte KB-QA bereits beeindruckende Ergebnisse erzielt. Bisherige Arbeiten legten jedoch keinen größeren Schwerpunkt auf die Fragerepräsentation, und die Frage wird unabhängig von ihren Kandidaten-Antworten in einen festen Vektor umgewandelt. Diese einfache Repräsentationsstrategie ist nicht einfach, die richtigen Informationen in der Frage auszudrücken. Daher stellen wir ein End-to-End neuronales Netzwerkmodell vor, um die Fragen und ihre zugehörigen Scores dynamisch nach den verschiedenen Kandidatenanantwortaspekten mittels Cross-Attention Mechanismus darzustellen. Darüber hinaus nutzen wir das globale Wissen innerhalb der zugrunde liegenden KB, um die reichhaltigen KB-Informationen in die Darstellung der Antworten zu integrieren. Dadurch könnte das Out-of-Vokabelproblem (OOV) gelindert werden, was dem Cross-Attention-Modell hilft, die Frage genauer darzustellen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse auf WebQuestions zeigen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes.', 'ko': '인터넷상의 지식 라이브러리가 급속히 증가함에 따라 어떻게 그것들을 충분히 이용하는가가 점점 중요해지고 있다.Knowledgebase Q&amp;A(KB-QA)는 많은 양의 지식을 얻을 수 있는 효과적인 방법 중 하나입니다.아울러 신경망(NN) 기반 접근법이 발전함에 따라 NN 기반 KB-QA는 이미 인상적인 성과를 거뒀다.그러나 이전의 작업에서 문제를 더 이상 강조하지 않았기 때문에 후보의 답이 무엇이든지 문제는 고정된 벡터로 전환될 것이다.이런 간단한 표현 전략은 문제의 정확한 정보를 표현하기가 쉽지 않다.따라서 우리는 끝까지 신경 네트워크 모델을 제시했고 교차 주의 메커니즘을 통해 후보 답안의 다양한 측면에 따라 문제와 그에 상응하는 점수를 동태적으로 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리는 밑바닥 지식 라이브러리의 전역 지식을 이용하여 풍부한 지식 라이브러리 정보를 답안의 표시에 통합시키는 데 목적을 둔다.따라서 어휘표 외(OOV) 문제를 완화시켜 교차 주의 모델이 문제를 더욱 정확하게 나타내는 데 도움이 된다.인터넷 문제의 실험 결과는 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'id': 'Dengan pertumbuhan cepat dari dasar pengetahuan (KB) di web, bagaimana mengambil keuntungan penuh dari mereka menjadi semakin penting. Pertanyaan menjawab atas dasar pengetahuan (KB-QA) adalah salah satu pendekatan yang berjanji untuk mengakses pengetahuan yang besar. Sementara itu, saat metode berdasarkan jaringan saraf (berdasarkan NN) berkembang, KB-QA berdasarkan NN telah mencapai hasil yang mengesankan. Namun, pekerjaan sebelumnya tidak menaruh lebih enfasi pada perwakilan pertanyaan, dan pertanyaan ini diubah menjadi vektor tetap tidak peduli jawaban kandidatnya. Strategi representation sederhana ini tidak mudah untuk mengekspresikan informasi yang tepat dalam pertanyaan. Oleh karena itu, kami mempersembahkan model jaringan saraf akhir-akhir untuk mewakili pertanyaan dan skor yang sesuai dengan mereka secara dinamik menurut berbagai aspek jawaban kandidat melalui mekanisme perhatian salib. Selain itu, kita menggunakan pengetahuan global di dalam KB yang didasarkan, bertujuan untuk mengintegrasikan informasi KB kaya ke dalam perwakilan jawaban. Sebagai hasilnya, hal ini bisa mengurangi masalah luar dari vokbulari (OOV), yang membantu model perhatian salib untuk mewakili pertanyaan dengan lebih tepat. Hasil eksperimen dalam pertanyaan web menunjukkan efektif pendekatan yang diusulkan.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na ongezeko la haraka la misingi ya maarifa (KBs) kwenye mtandao, jinsi ya kutumia matumizi kamili yanavyozidi kuwa muhimu zaidi. Swali la kujibu juu ya msingi wa maarifa (KB-QA) ni moja ya mbinu zinazoahidi kupata ufahamu mkubwa. Wakati huo huo, kama mbinu zilizoko kwenye mtandao wa neura (NN-based) zinavyoendelea, KB-QA anayeishi NN tayari imepata matokeo mazuri. Hata hivyo, kazi iliyopita haikuweka msisitizo zaidi juu ya uwakilishi wa maswali, na swali lilibadilishwa kuwa vector moja bila kujali majibu ya wagombea wake. Mradi huu wa uwakilizaji rahisi si rahisi kuelezea taarifa sahihi katika swali hili. Kwa hiyo, tunaweka mtindo wa mitandao ya mwisho wa neura kuwakilisha maswali na vipimo vyao vinavyosimamia vibaya kwa mujibu wa masuala mbalimbali ya wagombea kupitia mfumo wa kutangaza. In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers.  Matokeo yake, inaweza kupunguza tatizo la kutokuwepo kwa lugha (OOV), ambalo linasaidia muundo wa kutangaza ulimwengu kwa uhakika zaidi. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye maswali ya Web yanaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua hiyo inayopendekezwa.', 'fa': 'با سرعت رشد پایگاه دانش (کِب) روی وب، چگونه استفاده از آنها کامل استفاده کنیم، به شدت مهم می\u200cشود. سؤال پاسخ بر پایگاه علم (KB-QA) یکی از نزدیک\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده برای دسترسی به دانش زیادی است. در این صورت، به عنوان روش\u200cهای شبکه عصبی (بنیاد NN) توسعه می\u200cکند، KB-QA بنیاد NN از قبل نتیجه\u200cهای تحت تاثیر قرار گرفته است. ولی کار قبلی بیشتر بر نمایش سوال تسبیح نکرده است، و سوال به یک vektor ثابت می شود به هر حال از پاسخهای کاندیداتش تغییر داده می شود. این استراتژی نمایش ساده برای تعریف اطلاعات مناسب در این سوال آسان نیست. بنابراین، ما یک مدل شبکه عصبی از پایان به پایان نشان می دهیم تا سوالات و امتیاز مربوط به آنها را دینامیک به توجه به عنوان نقطه\u200cهای پاسخ مختلف کاندیداتی از طریق مکانیزم متفاوت توجه کند. در addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming to integrate the rich KB information into the representation of the answers. به نتیجه، می\u200cتواند مشکل خارج از کلمات (OOV) را کمک کند که به مدل متصل توجه کمک می\u200cکند تا دقیقاً این سوال را نمایش دهد. نتایج آزمایشی روی سوال\u200cهای وب نشان می\u200cدهد که موثیت روش پیشنهاد را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Bilim bazlarynyň (KB) ýokary tiz ýokary bilen olaryň dolysyny nähili gowy ulanmaklaryny has baglanýar. Bilim sistemi üzerinden jogap bermek (KB-QA) uly bilgi ýerine ýetirmek üçin söz berýän nusgalaryň biri. Bu arada, näyral şebeke tabanly (NN-tabanly) yöntemler gelişirip ýolda, NN-tabanly KB-QA eýýäm üçin täsirli netijeler ýetip geldi. Ancak önceki çalışma soru temsiline daha önemli göstermedi ve soru ise sabit vektöre dönüştürüler. Bu basit temsil stratejisi soragynda dogry maglumatlary ifade etmek aňsat däl. Şol sebäpli, biz soňunda näral şebeke nusgasyny soraglary we olaryň meňzeşli notlaryny dinamik şeklinde görkezmäge görýäris. Diňe näçe kandidyň üýtgetmegi meýdançasynda görä görnüşdürýäris. Ayrıca, KB'nin altında küresel bilgileri yaratmak için hedefimiz var. Sonuçta bu sözleriň daşarydaky meselelerini azaltyp biler, bu sebäbi cross-attention nusgasyna dykkatly soragy görkezmek üçin kömek edip biler. WebSoraglaryň barlag netijesi teklip eden ýagdaýyň täsirini görkezýär.", 'sq': 'Me rritjen e shpejtë të bazave të njohurive (KB) në internet, si të përfitosh plotësisht nga ato bëhet gjithnjë e më e rëndësishme. Përgjigja e pyetjeve lidhur me bazën e njohurive (KB-QA) është një nga metodat premtuese për të hyrë në njohuritë thelbësore. Ndërkohë, ndërsa metodat e rrjetit nervor (me bazë në NN) zhvillohen, KB-QA me bazë në NN ka arritur tashmë rezultate mbresëlënëse. Megjithatë, puna e mëparshme nuk vuri më shumë theks në përfaqësimin e pyetjeve dhe pyetja kthehet në një vektor fiks pavarësisht nga përgjigjet e kandidatit të saj. This simple representation strategy is not easy to express the proper information in the question.  Kështu, ne paraqesim një model rrjeti nervor nga fundi në fund për të përfaqësuar pyetjet dhe rezultatet e tyre korrespondente dinamikisht sipas aspekteve të ndryshme të përgjigjes së kandidatëve nëpërmjet mekanizmit të vëmendjes së kryqëzuar. Përveç kësaj, ne përdorim njohuritë globale brenda KB-së themelore, duke synuar integrimin e informacionit të pasur KB-së në përfaqësimin e përgjigjeve. Si rezultat, kjo mund të lehtësojë problemin jashtë fjalorit (OOV), i cili ndihmon modelin e vëmendjes së kryqëzuar për të përfaqësuar pyetjen më saktësisht. Rezultatet eksperimentale në pyetjet e internetit tregojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes së propozuar.', 'af': "Met die vinnige groei van kennis bases (Kb) op die web, hoe om volle voordeel van hulle te neem, word groter belangrik. Vrag antwoord oor kennis basis (KB-QA) is een van die beloftende toegang om toegang te kry tot die betekende kennis. Die middeltyd, as die neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde (NN-gebaseerde) metodes ontwikkel, het NN-gebaseerde KB-QA reeds inpresief resultate bereik. Maar die vorige werk het nie meer bekyk op vraag voorstelling gegee nie, en die vraag is omgeskakel in 'n vaste vektor ongeag van sy kandidate antwoorde. Hierdie eenvoudige verskyning strategie is nie maklik om die regte inligting in die vraag te uitdruk nie. Daarom, ons stel 'n einde-tot-einde neuralnetwerk model om die vraagte en hulle ooreenstemmende telling dinamies te stel volgens die verskillende kandidate antwoord aspekte deur kruis-aandag mekanisme. In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers. As 'n resultaat, kan dit die uit-woordeboek (OOV) probleem alleviaat, wat die kruis-aandag model help om die vraag meer presies te verteenwoordig. Die eksperimentale resultate op Webvrae vertoon die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde toegang.", 'am': 'በአውቀት መቀመጫዎች (KBs) ፈጥኖ እውቀት ማድረግ፣ የሙሉ ጥቅምት እንዴት መቀበል ይጨመርበታል፡፡ ጥያቄ በእውቀት መቀመጫው (KB-QA) የተስፋ እውቀትን ለመግኘት የሚደርስ አንዱ ነው፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የኔሩኤል መረብ-based (NN-based) ዘዴዎች እንደሚዘጋጁ፣ የNN-based KB-QA ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የቀድሞው ሥራ የጥያቄ መልስ ምንም እንኳ ቢሆን ጥያቄው ወደ ጥረት መቆጣጠር አላደረገም፡፡ This simple representation strategy is not easy to express the proper information in the question.  ስለዚህም የዘላለም የኔርያ መረብ ሞዴል የጥያቄዎቹን እና የተቀናቀሉትን scores በተለያዩ የፓርላማውያን መልስ በመስጠት ማሰናከል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ዋይኛው KB ውስጥ ያሉትን ሀብታሞችን የKB መረጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይሄንን ምክንያት ከ-የ-vocabulary (OOV) ጉዳይ ማቅረብ ይችላል፣ ይህም የመስመር ምርጫውን በጥያቄ እንዲያስፈልግ ይችላል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቶች በዌብ ጠይቃዎች ላይ የተዘጋጀውን የሥርዓት ጥያቄን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Համացանցի գիտելիքի հիմքերի արագ աճի միջոցով, դրանց ամբողջ առավելությունը դառնում է ավելի կարևոր: Question answering over knowledge base (KB-QA) is one of the promising approaches to access the substantial knowledge.  Միևնույն ժամանակ, երբ զարգանում են նյարդային ցանցում հիմնված (ՆՆ-հիմնված) մեթոդները, ՆՆ-հիմնված ՔԲ-ՔԱ-ն արդեն տպավորիչ արդյունքներ է ստացել: However, previous work did not put more emphasis on question representation, and the question is converted into a fixed vector regardless of its candidate answers.  Այս պարզ ներկայացման ռազմավարությունը հեշտ չէ արտահայտել հարցում ճիշտ տեղեկատվությունը: Այսպիսով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի վերջ-վերջ նյարդային ցանցի մոդել, որը դինամիկ ներկայացնում է հարցերը և դրանց համապատասխան գնահատականները ըստ թեկնածու պատասխանների տարբեր ասպեկտների միջոցով փոխուշադրության մեխանիզմի: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք գլոբալ գիտելիքները հիմնական ԿԲ-ի մեջ, որոնք նպատակում են ինտեգրել հարուստ ԿԲ-ի տեղեկատվությունը պատասխանների ներկայացման մեջ: Արդյունքում այն կարող է նվազեցնել բառարանից դուրս գտնվող խնդիրը, որը օգնում է խաչը ուշադրության մոդելը ավելի ճշգրիտ ներկայացնել հարցը: Վեբ հարցերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը:', 'bn': 'ওয়েবে জ্ঞানের বেসের দ্রুত বৃদ্ধির সাথে কিভাবে তাদের সম্পূর্ণ সুবিধা নিতে পারে তা বাড়তে পারে। জ্ঞানের বেস (কেবি-কিউএ) সম্পর্কে প্রশ্নের উত্তর হচ্ছে এই প্রতিশ্রুতিপূর্ণ জ্ঞান প্রবেশের প্রতিশ্রুতির মধ্যে  এদিকে, নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক (এনএন ভিত্তিক) পদ্ধতি উন্নয়ন করার পর এনএন-ভিত্তিক কেবি-কিউএ ইতোমধ্যে চমৎকার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে। তবে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্বের উপর আরো জোর দিয়েনি এবং প্রশ্ন তাদের প্রার্থীর উত্তর না হোক না কেন, তারা প্রশ্নে প্রশ্নের সঠিক তথ্য প্রকাশের জন্য এই সহজ প্রতিনিধিত্বের কৌশল সহজ নয়। তাই আমরা প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল উপস্থাপন করি এবং তাদের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট স্কোর বিভিন্ন প্রার্থীর উত্ In addition, we leverage the global knowledge inside the underlying KB, aiming at integrating the rich KB information into the representation of the answers.  এর ফলে এটি শব্দভাণ্ডারের বাইরের সমস্যা কমিয়ে দিতে পারে, যা প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য সাহায্য করে। ওয়েব প্রশ্নের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে।', 'az': "İnternetdə elm üssələrinin tez artıqlığı ilə, onlardan tam faydalanmasının necə daha böyüklüyünü artırdı. Bilim bazı haqqında cavab verən sual (KB-QA) əsas bilənə yetişmək üçün və ’ d verilən yaxınlıqlardan biridir. Bu arada, nöral ağ tabanlı (NN-tabanlı) metodların gelişməsi üçün NN-tabanlı KB-QA artıq təsirli sonuçlarını başa düşdü. Ancaq əvvəlki işlər sual göstəricisinə daha çox təsirləndirmədi, və sual kandidátların cavablarına baxmayaraq fikir bir vektor dönüşür. Bu basit temsil stratejisi sualında uyğun məlumatları ifadə etmək kolay deyil. Beləliklə, biz sualları və onların müəyyən müxtəlif kanadidatlı cavab aspektlərinə görə dinamik müəyyən edilən nöral ağ modelini göstəririk. Bütün bunlardan sonra, KB-in altındakı küresel bilgiləri müəyyən edirik, baxış KB məlumatlarını cevapların göstəricisinə qatmağa niyyət edirik. Sonuç olaraq, bu sözlərin dışı problemini azaltır, bu sualın daha doğrudan göstərməsinə kömək edir. WebQuestions'in eksperimentli sonuçları təbliğ edilmiş tərzimin etkinliğini göstərir.", 'cs': 'S rychlým růstem znalostních bází (KBs) na webu se stává stále důležitější, jak je plně využít. Odpověď na otázky přes znalostní bázi (KB-QA) je jedním z slibných přístupů k přístupu k podstatným znalostem. S rozvojem metod založených na neuronových sítích (NN-založených) již dosáhl působivých výsledků KB-QA založených na NN. Předchozí práce však nekladla větší důraz na reprezentaci otázek a otázka je převedena na pevný vektor bez ohledu na její kandidátské odpovědi. Tato jednoduchá strategie reprezentace není snadné vyjádřit správné informace v otázce. Proto představujeme model end-to-end neuronové sítě, který dynamicky reprezentuje otázky a jejich odpovídající skóre podle různých aspektů odpovědi kandidáta pomocí mechanismu cross-pozornosti. Kromě toho využíváme globální znalosti uvnitř základní KB s cílem integrovat bohaté informace KB do reprezentace odpovědí. V důsledku toho by to mohlo zmírnit problém mimo slovní zásobu (OOV), což pomáhá modelu křížové pozornosti přesněji reprezentovat otázku. Experimentální výsledky na WebQuestions ukazují efektivitu navrženého přístupu.', 'ca': "Amb el ràpid creixement de les bases de coneixement (KB) a la Web, com aprofitar-se plenament d'elles esdevé cada cop més important. La resposta a preguntes sobre la base del coneixement (KB-QA) és un dels enfocaments prometedors d'accedir al coneixement substancial. Mentrestant, a mesura que es desenvolupen els mètodes basats en la xarxa neural (basats en NN), KB-QA basat en NN ja ha aconseguit resultats impressionants. No obstant això, el treball anterior no va fer més hincapié en la representació de preguntes, i la pregunta es converteix en un vector fixe independentment de les seves respostes candidates. Aquesta estratègia simple de representació no és fàcil d'expressar la informació adequada en aquesta qüestió. Hence, we present an end-to-end neural network model to represent the questions and their corresponding scores dynamically according to the various candidate answer aspects via cross-attention mechanism.  A més, aprofitem el coneixement global dins el KB subjacent, mirant a integrar la informació rica de KB en la representació de les respostes. Com a resultat, podria alleviar el problema fora de vocabulari (OOV), que ajuda al model d'atenció cruzada a representar la pregunta de manera més precisa. Els resultats experimentals en WebQuestions demostren l'eficacia de l'enfocament proposat.", 'bs': 'S brzom rastom baza znanja (KBs) na internetu, kako da ih iskoristi punu korist postaje sve važnije. Pitanje na odgovor na bazu znanja (KB-QA) je jedan od obećavajućih pristupa pristupu znanstvenim znanjima. U međuvremenu, kako se metode na neuralnoj mreži (bazirane na NN) razvijaju, KB-QA na NN-u već ostvarila je impresivne rezultate. Međutim, prethodni rad nije naglasio više naglaska na zastupanje pitanja, a pitanje se pretvara u fiksni vektor bez obzira na odgovore na kandidate. Ova jednostavna strategija predstavljanja nije lako izraziti odgovarajuće informacije na pitanju. Stoga predstavljamo model neuralne mreže na kraju do kraja kako bi predstavljali pitanja i njihove odgovarajuće rezultate dinamično prema različitim aspektima odgovora kandidata preko mehanizma prekršne pažnje. Osim toga, uključujemo globalno znanje unutar temeljnog KB-a, ciljanje integriranja bogatih KB informacija u predstavljanje odgovora. Kao rezultat toga, moglo bi ublažiti problem izvan riječnika (OOV), koji pomaže model prekršne pažnje da preciznije predstavi pitanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na WebQuestions pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa.', 'fi': 'Verkossa olevien tietokantojen nopean kasvun myötä niiden täysimääräinen hyödyntäminen on yhä tärkeämpää. Kyselyyn vastaaminen tietopohjassa (KB-QA) on yksi lupaavista lähestymistavoista merkittävän tiedon saamiseen. Neuroverkkopohjaisten (NN-pohjaisten) menetelmien kehittyessä NN-pohjaisten KB-QA on jo saavuttanut vaikuttavia tuloksia. Aiemmassa työssä ei kuitenkaan painotettu enemmän kysymyksen esittämistä, ja kysymys muunnetaan kiinteäksi vektoriksi riippumatta sen ehdokkaan vastauksista. Tällä yksinkertaisella edustusstrategialla ei ole helppoa ilmaista oikeaa tietoa kysymyksessä. Tämän vuoksi esitämme end-to-end neuroverkkomallin, joka edustaa kysymyksiä ja niiden vastaavia pisteitä dynaamisesti eri ehdokasvastausnäkökohtien mukaisesti ristihuomiomekanismin avulla. Lisäksi hyödynnämme pohjatietoaineiston sisältämää maailmanlaajuista tietoa ja pyrimme integroimaan monipuoliset tietoaineistot vastausten esittämiseen. Tämän seurauksena se voisi lievittää sanaston ulkopuolista ongelmaa (OOV), mikä auttaa ristihuomiomallia esittämään kysymystä tarkemmin. WebQuestionsin kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistavan tehokkuuden.', 'et': 'Teadmistebaaside kiire kasvu tõttu veebis muutub üha olulisemaks, kuidas neid täielikult ära kasutada. Küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaasi kaudu (KB-QA) on üks paljutõotavaid lähenemisviise olulistele teadmistele juurdepääsuks. Kuna neurovõrgul põhinevad (NN-põhised) meetodid arenevad, on NN-põhine KB-QA juba saavutanud muljetavaldavaid tulemusi. Kuid eelmine töö ei pannud rohkem rõhku küsimuste esitamisele ja küsimus muudetakse fikseeritud vektoriks olenemata selle kandidaadi vastustest. Seda lihtsat esindusstrateegiat ei ole lihtne väljendada asjakohast teavet küsimuses. Seetõttu esitame otsast otsani neurovõrgu mudeli, mis esitab küsimusi ja nende vastavaid skoore dünaamiliselt vastavalt erinevatele kandidaadi vastuste aspektidele risttähelepanu mehhanismi kaudu. Lisaks võimendame ülemaailmseid teadmisi aluseks olevas KB-s, mille eesmärk on integreerida rikas KB-teave vastuste esitamisse. Selle tulemusena võib see leevendada sõnavara väljastpoolt (OOV) probleemi, mis aitab risttähelepanu mudelil küsimust täpsemalt esitada. WebQuestionsi katsetulemused näitavad kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust.', 'jv': 'Rasané awakdhéwé éntuk sistem punika (K) lan web, piye ngerasakno sistem sing gak nggawe barang awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak nggawe barang awak dhéwé. Galian responsing banjur sak ngerti nang ngerasara sistem (kb-qA) iki sing nganggo perusahaan kanggo gabung bantuan ingkang dianggap bantuan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Tulungan sampeyan seneng kuwi alam-alam kuwi bisa ngegampang kanggo wong informasi sing apik kanggo cejane. Nambah, kita mulai model sing tambah banter-sistem sing gak bukane dadi bisa ngubah werong karo perusahaan sing dumadhi, dadi sing dumadhi sing nganggo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan langkung sampek. Nambah, awak dhéwé mengko awak dhéwé ning kejahatan global nang kB sing bakal mlaku, nik awak dhéwé mulai informasi kB barêr-barêr kanggo nyelaraké gambar respont. Yo wis dipoleh, lak iso nglanggar kelapa ora ono kelapa-pergambar (OOOKA), iki dadi nggawe modèl pakan-ingkang diapakan kanggo ngubah perspekaan sing apik dhéwé. Rejalaké sing paling pancen ning webquestion gambaran nggawe efekat nang aksi sing pawartos', 'sk': 'S hitro rastjo baz znanja (KB) na spletu postaja vse pomembnejše, kako jih v celoti izkoristiti. Odgovarjanje na vprašanja o bazi znanja (KB-QA) je eden od obetavnih pristopov za dostop do bistvenega znanja. Medtem ko se razvijajo metode, ki temeljijo na nevronskem omrežju (na NN), je KB-QA, ki temeljijo na NN, že dosegla impresivne rezultate. Vendar predhodno delo ni dalo večjega poudarka na predstavitvi vprašanj, vprašanje pa se ne glede na kandidatne odgovore pretvori v fiksni vektor. Ta preprosta strategija predstavitve ni enostavna izraziti ustreznih informacij v vprašanju. Zato predstavljamo model nevronskega omrežja od konca do konca, ki dinamično predstavlja vprašanja in njihove ustrezne rezultate glede na različne vidike kandidatnih odgovorov prek mehanizma navzkrižne pozornosti. Poleg tega izkoristimo globalno znanje znotraj osnovne KB, s čimer želimo vključiti bogate KB informacije v reprezentacijo odgovorov. Rezultat tega bi lahko olajšal problem izven besedišča (OOV), kar pomaga modelu navzkrižne pozornosti, da natančneje predstavi vprašanje. Poskusni rezultati WebQuestions kažejo učinkovitost predlaganega pristopa.', 'ha': "Ga da kashi ya ƙara bayan ilmi (KBs) kan web, yadda za a yi amfani da su cikakken su yana ƙara muhimu. Da tambayar a kan basin ilmi (KB-QA) yana daga cikin wa'adin wanda ake yi wa'adi zuwa ga gaskiyar ilmi. A lokacin da, kamar an buɗe hanyõyin neural-based (NN-based) zance-zane, KB-QA ya riga ya sami fassara mai kyau. Kayya, aikin da ya gabata ba ya ƙayyade wani muhimmi a kan wakilishi masu tambaya, kuma aka musanya tambayar ta zuwa wani gari mai daidaita, kõ da kuma an sami mayukansa. @ action: button To, don haka, muna halatar da wani misali na jerin neura zuwa ƙari don ka sami masĩfun su da matsayinsu yana daidai da inganci ga masu jayayi masu buƙata daban-daban Ina ƙaranci, Munã cika sanin duniya a cikin KB guda, don ya yi amfani da in haɗa ma'anar KB masu riki zuwa uwar masĩfun. Tayyar da shi, yana iya sauƙa ƙara matsalar masu fita na-maganar (OOV), wanda yana taimakon misalin-sura-sura, ya nuna tambayar ta kafin ƙayyade. Matarin jarrabawa a kan Web Issues sun nuna sharrin ta'ura da ake bukãta.", 'he': 'עם הצמיחה מהירה של בסיסי הידע (KBs) ברשת, איך לנצל אותם מלא הופך להיות חשוב יותר ויותר. תשובה לשאלות על בסיס הידע (KB-QA) היא אחת מהגישות המבטיחות לגשת לידע משמעותי. בינתיים, בזמן שהשיטות המבוססים ברשת העצבית (NN-based) מתפתחות, KB-QA המבוסס על NN כבר השיגה תוצאות מרשים. However, previous work did not put more emphasis on question representation, and the question is converted into a fixed vector regardless of its candidate answers.  This simple representation strategy is not easy to express the proper information in the question.  לכן, אנחנו מציגים מודל רשת עצבית סוף-סוף כדי לייצג את השאלות והנקודות המתאימות שלהם דינמית לפי השפעות של התשובה המועמדים השונים באמצעות מנגנון תשומת לב צלב. בנוסף, אנו מנצלים את הידע הגלובלי בתוך KB המרכזי, המטרה להשתלב במידע KB העשיר לתוך מייצג התשובות. כתוצאה מכך, זה יכול להקל על הבעיה מחוץ למילים (OOV), אשר עוזר למודל תשומת לב צלב לייצג את השאלה יותר מדויקת. תוצאות הניסויים על שאלות אינטרנט מראות את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת.', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་རང་ཉིད་གཙོ་རིམ་(KBs)དཔག་མེད་གྱིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞི་རྟེན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གཅིག་རེད། དུས་ནའང་དྲ་བ་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན། NN་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་KB-QA་ཡིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནད་འགའ་ ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལས་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་མ་གཏོང་གི་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་མེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་སྟབས་བདེ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྟོན་པར་མི་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་end-to-end neural network model to represent the questions and their corresponding scores dynamically according to the various candidate answer aspects via cross-attention mechanism. འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གཞི་རྩ་བའི་KB ནང་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་ཤེས་ཚོར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་དོན་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ཚོའི་ཐ་སྙད་མི་ཚིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདྲེན་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཝེབ་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་གླེང་སྣེ་ཐོག་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Translating Neuralese', 'ar': 'ترجمة Neuralese', 'es': 'Traduciendo Neuralese', 'fr': 'Traduire Neuralese', 'pt': 'Traduzindo Neuralês', 'ja': '神経言語の翻訳', 'hi': 'न्यूरलीज़ का अनुवाद करना', 'zh': '译神经言', 'ru': 'Перевод невралгийского языка', 'ga': 'Neuralese á aistriú', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μετάφραση Νευραλικών', 'hu': 'Neuraléz fordítása', 'it': 'Tradurre il nevralese', 'lt': 'Vertimo neurozė', 'kk': 'Нералдық аудару', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Menerjemahkan Neuralese', 'ml': 'നെയൂറലേസ് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mt': 'Newrależi li jittraduċu', 'mn': 'Цөмийн сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'no': 'Omsetjing av neuralsk', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie języka neuralskiego', 'ro': 'Traducere neuraleză', 'sr': 'Превод невралских', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාලිස් අවවාද කරන්න', 'so': 'Turjumista Neural', 'sv': 'Översätt neuralesiska', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'نیورال کی ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch thần kinh', 'bg': 'Превод на невралски', 'hr': 'Prevodeći neurološki', 'da': 'Oversætter neuralesisk', 'nl': 'Neurales vertalen', 'id': 'Translating Neuralese', 'ko': '신경 언어를 번역하다', 'fa': 'ترجمه عصبی', 'de': 'Neurales übersetzen', 'sw': 'Utafsiri', 'tr': 'Näralesçe terjime edýär', 'af': 'Vertaling', 'sq': 'Translates Neuralese', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Nöral', 'bn': 'নিউরেলেস অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Prevodeći neurološki', 'ca': 'Translating Neuralese', 'cs': 'Překlad neuralštiny', 'et': 'Neuralese tõlkimine', 'fi': 'K채채nnet채채n neuralesia', 'jv': 'Nyambut Nerisi', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י', 'sk': 'Prevajanje nevraleščine', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'ནུས་ཡུན་དབྱིབས་སྒྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Several approaches have recently been proposed for learning decentralized deep multiagent policies that coordinate via a differentiable communication channel. While these policies are effective for many tasks, interpretation of their induced communication strategies has remained a challenge. Here we propose to interpret agents’ messages by translating them. Unlike in typical machine translation problems, we have no parallel data to learn from. Instead we develop a translation model based on the insight that agent messages and natural language strings mean the same thing if they induce the same belief about the world in a listener. We present theoretical guarantees and empirical evidence that our approach preserves both the semantics and pragmatics of messages by ensuring that players communicating through a translation layer do not suffer a substantial loss in reward relative to players with a common language.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح العديد من الأساليب مؤخرًا لتعلم السياسات اللامركزية العميقة متعددة الوكالات التي تنسق عبر قناة اتصال مختلفة. في حين أن هذه السياسات فعالة للعديد من المهام ، إلا أن تفسير استراتيجيات الاتصال المستحثة ظل يمثل تحديًا. نقترح هنا تفسير رسائل الوكلاء من خلال ترجمتها. على عكس مشاكل الترجمة الآلية النموذجية ، ليس لدينا بيانات موازية لنتعلم منها. بدلاً من ذلك ، نقوم بتطوير نموذج ترجمة بناءً على البصيرة القائلة بأن رسائل الوكيل وسلاسل اللغة الطبيعية تعني نفس الشيء إذا كانت تحفز نفس الاعتقاد حول العالم لدى المستمع. نقدم ضمانات نظرية وأدلة تجريبية على أن نهجنا يحافظ على الدلالات والبراغماتية للرسائل من خلال ضمان ألا يعاني اللاعبون الذين يتواصلون من خلال طبقة الترجمة من خسارة كبيرة في المكافأة بالنسبة للاعبين الذين يتحدثون لغة مشتركة.', 'es': 'Recientemente se han propuesto varios enfoques para el aprendizaje de políticas descentralizadas de múltiples agentes profundas que se coordinan a través de un canal de comunicación diferenciable. Si bien estas políticas son eficaces para muchas tareas, la interpretación de sus estrategias de comunicación inducida sigue siendo un desafío. Aquí proponemos interpretar los mensajes de los agentes traduciéndolos. A diferencia de los problemas típicos de traducción automática, no tenemos datos paralelos de los que aprender. En cambio, desarrollamos un modelo de traducción basado en la idea de que los mensajes de los agentes y las cadenas de lenguaje natural significan lo mismo si inducen a un oyente a creer lo mismo sobre el mundo. Presentamos garantías teóricas y evidencia empírica de que nuestro enfoque preserva tanto la semántica como la pragmática de los mensajes al garantizar que los jugadores que se comunican a través de una capa de traducción no sufran una pérdida sustancial de recompensa en relación con los jugadores con un idioma común.', 'pt': 'Recentemente, várias abordagens foram propostas para aprender políticas multiagentes profundas descentralizadas que coordenam por meio de um canal de comunicação diferenciável. Embora essas políticas sejam eficazes para muitas tarefas, a interpretação de suas estratégias de comunicação induzidas continua sendo um desafio. Aqui propomos interpretar as mensagens dos agentes traduzindo-as. Ao contrário dos problemas típicos de tradução automática, não temos dados paralelos para aprender. Em vez disso, desenvolvemos um modelo de tradução baseado na percepção de que as mensagens do agente e as strings de linguagem natural significam a mesma coisa se induzirem a mesma crença sobre o mundo em um ouvinte. Apresentamos garantias teóricas e evidências empíricas de que nossa abordagem preserva tanto a semântica quanto a pragmática das mensagens, garantindo que os jogadores que se comunicam por meio de uma camada de tradução não sofram uma perda substancial de recompensa em relação aos jogadores com uma linguagem comum.', 'fr': "Plusieurs approches ont récemment été proposées pour l'apprentissage de politiques multi-agents profondes décentralisées qui se coordonnent via un canal de communication différenciable. Bien que ces politiques soient efficaces pour de nombreuses tâches, l'interprétation de leurs stratégies de communication induites reste un défi. Nous proposons ici d'interpréter les messages des agents en les traduisant. Contrairement aux problèmes de traduction automatique classiques, nous n'avons pas de données parallèles dont nous pouvons tirer des leçons. Au lieu de cela, nous développons un modèle de traduction basé sur l'idée que les messages des agents et les chaînes en langage naturel ont la même signification s'ils induisent la même croyance sur le monde chez un auditeur. Nous présentons des garanties théoriques et des preuves empiriques que notre approche préserve à la fois la sémantique et la pragmatique des messages en veillant à ce que les joueurs communiquant via une couche de traduction ne subissent pas une perte de récompense substantielle par rapport aux joueurs ayant une langue commune.", 'ja': '最近、差別化可能なコミュニケーションチャネルを介して調整する分散型の深いマルチエージェントポリシーを学習するためのいくつかのアプローチが提案されています。これらの方針は多くのタスクに効果的ですが、誘導されたコミュニケーション戦略の解釈は依然として課題です。ここでは、エージェントのメッセージを翻訳して解釈することを提案します。典型的な機械翻訳の問題とは異なり、私たちは学ぶべきパラレルデータを持っていません。代わりに、エージェントメッセージと自然言語の文字列がリスナーの世界について同じ信念を誘発する場合、同じことを意味するという洞察に基づいて、翻訳モデルを開発します。私たちは、翻訳レイヤーを介してコミュニケーションをとるプレイヤーが、共通言語を持つプレイヤーと比較して報酬に大きな損失を被らないようにすることによって、私たちのアプローチがメッセージの意味論と実用論の両方を保持するという理論的保証と経験的証拠を提示します。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में विकेंद्रीकृत गहरी मल्टीएजेंट नीतियों को सीखने के लिए कई दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं जो एक अलग संचार चैनल के माध्यम से समन्वय करते हैं। हालांकि ये नीतियां कई कार्यों के लिए प्रभावी हैं, उनकी प्रेरित संचार रणनीतियों की व्याख्या एक चुनौती बनी हुई है। यहां हम एजेंटों के संदेशों का अनुवाद करके उनकी व्याख्या करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशिष्ट मशीन अनुवाद समस्याओं के विपरीत, हमारे पास सीखने के लिए कोई समानांतर डेटा नहीं है। इसके बजाय हम इस अंतर्दृष्टि के आधार पर एक अनुवाद मॉडल विकसित करते हैं कि एजेंट संदेश और प्राकृतिक भाषा के तारों का मतलब एक ही बात है यदि वे श्रोता में दुनिया के बारे में एक ही विश्वास को प्रेरित करते हैं। हम सैद्धांतिक गारंटी और अनुभवजन्य सबूत प्रस्तुत करते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण यह सुनिश्चित करके संदेशों के शब्दार्थ और व्यावहारिकता दोनों को संरक्षित करता है कि अनुवाद परत के माध्यम से संवाद करने वाले खिलाड़ियों को एक सामान्य भाषा वाले खिलाड़ियों के सापेक्ष इनाम में पर्याप्त नुकसान नहीं होता है।', 'zh': '近建数术以学散深多代理策,微分信道以调之。 虽有效于众,而诱通之说犹一也。 于此,请因译解之。 与典刑机器翻译异,吾无并行数可学。 若代理消息与自然语言字符串于听众中诱导出对世界同念,则其味同。 吾等建论保验,证吾法以重译交流玩家对于共同语言者玩家不遭大赏,以存语义实用性。', 'ru': 'Недавно было предложено несколько подходов к изучению децентрализованной многоагентской политики, которая координируется по дифференцированному каналу связи. Хотя эта политика эффективна для решения многих задач, ее толкование, как и прежде, сопряжено с трудностями. Здесь мы предлагаем интерпретировать сообщения агентов, переводя их. В отличие от типичных проблем машинного перевода, у нас нет параллельных данных для изучения. Вместо этого мы разрабатываем модель перевода, основанную на понимании того, что сообщения агента и строки на естественном языке означают одно и то же, если они вызывают одинаковую веру в мир у слушателя. Мы представляем теоретические гарантии и эмпирические доказательства того, что наш подход сохраняет как семантику, так и прагматику сообщений, гарантируя, что игроки, общающиеся через слой перевода, не понесут существенной потери в вознаграждении по отношению к игрокам с общим языком.', 'ga': 'Moladh go leor cineálacha cur chuige le déanaí chun beartais dhomhain ilghníomhaithe díláraithe a fhoghlaim a chomhordaíonn trí mhodh cumarsáide difreálach. Cé go bhfuil na beartais seo éifeachtach do go leor tascanna, is dúshlán fós é léirmhíniú a dhéanamh ar a straitéisí cumarsáide spreagtha. Molaimid anseo teachtaireachtaí gníomhairí a léirmhíniú trína n-aistriú. Murab ionann agus gnáthfhadhbanna aistriúcháin mheaisín, níl aon sonraí comhthreomhara againn le foghlaim uathu. Ina áit sin forbraimid múnla aistriúcháin bunaithe ar an léargas go gciallaíonn teachtaireachtaí gníomhairí agus teaghráin nádúrtha teanga an rud céanna má chothaíonn siad an creideamh céanna faoin domhan in éisteoir. Cuirimid ráthaíochtaí teoiriciúla agus fianaise eimpíreach i láthair go gcaomhnaíonn ár gcur chuige an tséimeantaic agus pragmatach na dteachtaireachtaí araon trína chinntiú nach gcaillfidh imreoirí a dhéanann cumarsáid trí shraith aistriúcháin mórán luach saothair i gcomparáid le himreoirí a bhfuil teanga choiteann acu.', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ განსხვავებული კომუნიკაციის კანალისთვის კონტრალიზებული მლიტიადენტის პოლიტიკის გასწავლებისთვის რამდენიმე დახმარება იყო. მაგრამ ეს პოლიტიკები ძალიან ეფექტიურია ბევრი დავალებისთვის, მათი კომუნიკაციის სტრატეგიების ინტერპუქცია დარჩენა გამოცდილება. აქ ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ ადვნენტის შეტყობინებების შეტყობინებას გარგუნდეთ. ჩვენ არ გვაქვს პარალელური მონაცემების განმავლობაზე. შემდეგ ჩვენ განვითარებთ შეცვლის მოდელი, რომელიც ადვნენტის შეტყობინებები და თავისუფალური ენის სიტყვებები იგივე რამ ნიშნავს, თუ ისინი მსოფლიოს შესახებ იგივე მწო ჩვენ თეორეტიკური დარანტები და იმპერიკური წარმოდგენება, რომ ჩვენი დახმარება შესახებ სემანტიკური და პრაგმატიკური შესახებ დავუწყებთ, რომ თამაშვები, რომელიც კომუნიკაცია თამაშვების ნაწილის გარეშე', 'hu': 'A közelmúltban számos megközelítést javasoltak a decentralizált, mély multiagent politikák tanulására, amelyek egy differenciálható kommunikációs csatornán keresztül koordinálódnak. Bár ezek a politikák számos feladatra hatékonyak, az indukált kommunikációs stratégiáik értelmezése továbbra is kihívást jelent. Itt azt javasoljuk, hogy az ügynökök üzeneteit fordítva értelmezzük. A tipikus gépi fordítási problémákkal ellentétben nincs párhuzamos adatunk, amiből tanulhatnánk. Ehelyett olyan fordítási modellt dolgozunk ki, amely arra a betekintésre épül, hogy az ügynöki üzenetek és a természetes nyelvi karakterláncok ugyanazt jelentik, ha a hallgatóban ugyanazt a hitet idézik elő a világról. Elméleti garanciákat és empirikus bizonyítékokat mutatunk be arra vonatkozóan, hogy megközelítésünk megőrzi az üzenetek szemantikáját és pragmatikáját, biztosítva, hogy a fordítási rétegen keresztül kommunikáló játékosok ne szenvedjenek jelentős jutalmveszteséget a közös nyelvű játékosokhoz képest.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα έχουν προταθεί διάφορες προσεγγίσεις για την εκμάθηση αποκεντρωμένων πολιτικών βαθέων πολλαπλών παραγόντων που συντονίζονται μέσω ενός διαφοροποιημένου καναλιού επικοινωνίας. Παρόλο που οι πολιτικές αυτές είναι αποτελεσματικές για πολλά καθήκοντα, η ερμηνεία των στρατηγικών επικοινωνίας τους παρέμεινε πρόκληση. Εδώ προτείνουμε να ερμηνεύσουμε τα μηνύματα των πρακτόρων μεταφράζοντάς τα. Σε αντίθεση με τα τυπικά προβλήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης, δεν έχουμε παράλληλα δεδομένα από τα οποία μπορούμε να μάθουμε. Αντίθετα, αναπτύσσουμε ένα μεταφραστικό μοντέλο βασισμένο στην κατανόηση ότι τα μηνύματα των πρακτόρων και οι συμβολοσειρές φυσικής γλώσσας σημαίνουν το ίδιο πράγμα αν προκαλούν την ίδια πίστη για τον κόσμο σε έναν ακροατή. Παρουσιάζουμε θεωρητικές εγγυήσεις και εμπειρικές αποδείξεις ότι η προσέγγισή μας διατηρεί τόσο τη σημασιολογία όσο και την πραγματιστική των μηνυμάτων διασφαλίζοντας ότι οι παίκτες που επικοινωνούν μέσω ενός μεταφραστικού στρώματος δεν θα υποστούν σημαντική απώλεια ανταμοιβής σε σχέση με τους παίκτες με κοινή γλώσσα.', 'it': "Diversi approcci sono stati recentemente proposti per l'apprendimento di politiche decentralizzate multiagente profonde che si coordinano attraverso un canale di comunicazione differenziabile. Sebbene queste politiche siano efficaci per molti compiti, l'interpretazione delle loro strategie di comunicazione indotte è rimasta una sfida. Qui proponiamo di interpretare i messaggi degli agenti traducendoli. A differenza dei tipici problemi di traduzione automatica, non abbiamo dati paralleli da cui imparare. Sviluppiamo invece un modello di traduzione basato sull'intuizione che messaggi di agente e stringhe di linguaggio naturale significano la stessa cosa se inducono la stessa convinzione sul mondo in un ascoltatore. Presentiamo garanzie teoriche e prove empiriche che il nostro approccio preserva sia la semantica che la pragmatica dei messaggi assicurando che i giocatori che comunicano attraverso uno strato di traduzione non subiscano una sostanziale perdita di ricompensa rispetto ai giocatori con un linguaggio comune.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы бірнеше қатынас децентрализацияланған көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген мәліагенттер саясаттарын бағыттау арнасы арқылы координацияланған. Бұл саясаттар көптеген тапсырмалар үшін эффективні болса да, олардың көпшілікті коммуникациялық стратегияларының түсінімі бұл мәселе болды. Мұнда агенттердің хабарламаларын аударып түсініп тұрады. Қалыпты машинаның аудару мәселелеріне сәйкес, біздің оқыту үшін параллель деректеріміз жоқ. Осының орнына біз агенттің хабарламаларды және табиғи тілдер тілінің мәліметтері, егер олар әлемді тыңдаушылардың бір сеніміне көмектесетін болса, бірнеше нәрсе деп ойлаймыз. Біз теоретикалық гарантиялар мен импирикалық құлақтарды таңдаймыз, біздің тәсіліміздің семантикалық және хаттардың прагматикалығын қалдырып, аудармалық қабатты арқылы байланысты ойнатушыларға жалпы тіл арқылы байланысты көмект', 'ms': 'Several approaches have recently been proposed for learning decentralized deep multiagent policies that coordinate via a differentiable communication channel.  Sementara kebijakan ini berkesan untuk banyak tugas, interpretasi strategi komunikasi mereka telah terus menjadi tantangan. Di sini kami melamar untuk menerjemahkan mesej ejen dengan menerjemahkannya. Unlike in typical machine translation problems, we have no parallel data to learn from.  Sebaliknya kita mengembangkan model terjemahan berdasarkan pandangan bahawa mesej ejen dan tali bahasa semulajadi bermakna perkara yang sama jika mereka mengakibatkan kepercayaan yang sama tentang dunia dalam pendengar. Kami mempersembahkan jaminan teori dan bukti empirik bahawa pendekatan kita menyimpan semantik dan pragmatik mesej dengan memastikan bahawa pemain berkomunikasi melalui lapisan terjemahan tidak menderita kehilangan hadiah yang besar berbanding pemain dengan bahasa umum.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചാനലിലൂടെ ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്ന മള്\u200dട്ടിജെന്\u200dറ് പോലീസുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി കുറച്ച ഈ പോലീസുകള്\u200d പല ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാണെങ്കില്\u200d, അവരുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭാവം ഒരു വ ഇവിടെ നമ്മള്\u200d എജന്\u200dറുകളുടെ സന്ദേശങ്ങളെ പരിഭാഷിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യുന്നു. സാധാരണ യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷപ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, നമുക്കിതില്\u200d നിന്ന് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു പാര അതിനു പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഏജന്\u200dറ് സന്ദേശങ്ങളും സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ സ്ട്രിങ്ങുകളും സ്വാഭാവികമായ നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം സന്ദേശങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്കും പ്രാഗ്രാമിക്കും സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് നമ്മുടെ സാക്ഷ്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഒരു പരിഭാഷയിലൂട', 'lt': 'Neseniai buvo pasiūlyti keli metodai, kaip mokytis decentralizuotos gilios daugiaagentinės politikos, kurios koordinuojamos naudojant diferencijuotą ryšių kanalą. Nors šios politikos priemonės veiksmingos daugeliui užduočių, jų sukeltų komunikacijos strategijų aiškinimas išliko iššūkis. Čia mes siūlome interpretuoti agentų pranešimus vertdami juos. Skirtingai nuo įprastų mašin ų vertimo problemų, neturime lygiagrečių duomenų, iš kurių mokytis. Vietoj to sukuriame vertimo model į, pagrįstą supratimu, kad agent ų pranešimai ir natūralios kalbos juostos reiškia tą patį, jei jie skatina tą patį tikėjimą pasauliu klausytojui. Mes pateikiame teorines garantijas ir empirinius įrodymus, kad mūsų požiūris išsaugo tiek semantiką, tiek pranešimų pragmatiką užtikrinant, kad per vertimo sluoksnį bendraujantys žaidėjai nepakenktų dideliam atlygio praradimui, palyginti su bendra kalba besinaudojančiais žaidėjais.', 'mk': 'Неодамна се предложени неколку пристапи за учење децентрализирани длабоки мултиагентски политики кои се координираат преку различен комуникациски канал. Иако овие политики се ефикасни за многу задачи, интерпретацијата на нивните индукционирани комуникациски стратегии остана предизвик. Овде предлагаме да ги интерпретираме пораките на агентите преку преведување. За разлика од типичните проблеми со машинскиот превод, немаме паралелни податоци од кои да научиме. Наместо тоа, развиваме модел за превод базиран на сфаќањето дека пораките на агентите и природните јазични линии значат исто ако го индукционираат истото верување во светот во слушачот. Презентираме теоретски гаранции и емпириски докази дека нашиот пристап ја зачувува семантиката и прагматиката на пораките со осигурување дека играчите кои комуницираат преку слој на превод не страдаат значителна загуба на наградата во однос на играчите со заеднички јазик.', 'no': 'Ein fleire tilnærmingar er nyleg foreslått for å lære decentraliserte dype multiagent-politikk som koordinerer gjennom ein forskjellig kommunikasjonskanal. Selv om desse politikkene er effektive for mange oppgåver, er tolkinga av sine induserte kommunikasjonsstrategi fortsatt eit utfordring. Her foreslår vi å tolka meldingane til agentar ved å oversette dei. I motsetning av typiske maskinsomsetjingsproblasjonar har vi ingen parallelle data å læra frå. I staden utviklar vi eit omsetjingsmodul basert på innsyninga at agent-meldingar og naturspråk-strengar betyr det samme dersom dei induserer same trod om verden i ein lytter. Vi presenterer teoretiske garantiar og empiriske bevise at tilnærminga vårt beholder både semantiske og pragmatiske meldingar ved å sikre at spelare som kommuniserer gjennom eit omsetjingslag ikkje får ein stor tap i løpet relativt til spelare med eit felles språk.', 'mn': 'Саяхан хэд хэдэн арга зам нь өөр өөр харилцааны арга замаар координацийн гүн гүнзгий олон агентын засгийн газрыг сурах боломжтой болсон. Эдгээр бодлогууд олон даалгаварын тулд үр дүнтэй байхдаа, тэдний сэргээгдсэн харилцааны стратегийг тодорхойлох нь зорилго үлдсэн. Энд бид агентуудын захирагдлыг илэрхийлэхийг санал болгож байна. Ихэвчлэн машины орчуулалтын асуудалтай адил бидэнд сурах параллел өгөгдлийг байхгүй. Үүний оронд бид агент болон байгалийн хэл хэлний утгыг сонсогчид дэлхийн тухай ижил итгэл үнэмшилтэй гэсэн ойлголт дээр хөгжүүлэх загварыг хөгжүүлнэ. Бид теоретикийн баталгаа болон эмперикийн баталгаа өгдөг. Бидний арга баримтууд нь хоёулаа, хоёулаа зэрэг мэдээлэл болон прагматикийг хадгалдаг гэдгийг ойлгоход тоглогчдын хөгжлийн давхар аргаар харилцаж байгаа тоглогчдын нийтлэг хэл дээр харь', 'pl': 'Ostatnio zaproponowano kilka podejść do uczenia się zdecentralizowanych głębokich polityk wieloagentowych, które koordynują się za pomocą zróżnicowalnego kanału komunikacji. Chociaż polityka ta jest skuteczna dla wielu zadań, interpretacja ich inicjowanych strategii komunikacji pozostaje wyzwaniem. Tutaj proponujemy interpretację komunikatów agentów poprzez ich tłumaczenie. W przeciwieństwie do typowych problemów z tłumaczeniem maszynowym, nie mamy równoległych danych, z których można się uczyć. Zamiast tego opracowujemy model tłumaczenia oparty na wniosku, że komunikaty agentów i łańcuchy języka naturalnego oznaczają to samo, jeśli wywołują one u słuchacza tę samą wiarę o świecie. Przedstawiamy teoretyczne gwarancje i empiryczne dowody na to, że nasze podejście zachowuje zarówno semantykę, jak i pragmatykę komunikatów, zapewniając, że gracze komunikujący się za pośrednictwem warstwy tłumaczeniowej nie ponoszą znacznej straty nagrody w stosunku do graczy posiadających wspólny język.', 'mt': 'Several approaches have recently been proposed for learning decentralized deep multiagent policies that coordinate via a differentiable communication channel.  Filwaqt li dawn il-politiki huma effettivi għal ħafna kompiti, l-interpretazzjoni tal-istrateġiji ta’ komunikazzjoni indotti tagħhom baqgħet sfida. Hawnhekk nipproponu li jiġu interpretati l-messaġġi tal-aġenti billi jiġu tradotti. Għall-kuntrarju tal-problemi tipiċi tat-traduzzjoni bil-magni, m’għandna l-ebda dejta parallela li titgħallem minnha. Minflok niżviluppaw mudell ta’ traduzzjoni bbażat fuq l-għarfien li messaġġi ta’ a ġenti u strings lingwistiċi naturali jfissru l-istess ħaġa jekk jinduċu l-istess twemmin dwar id-dinja f’min jisma’. Aħna nippreżentaw garanziji teoretiċi u evidenza empirika li l-approċċ tagħna jippreserva kemm is-semantika kif ukoll il-pragmatika tal-messaġġi billi niżguraw li l-atturi li jikkomunikaw permezz ta’ saff ta’ traduzzjoni ma jbatux telf sostanzjali fil-premju meta mqabbel mal-atturi b’lingwa komuni.', 'ro': 'Mai multe abordări au fost propuse recent pentru învățarea politicilor descentralizate profunde multiagenți care se coordonează printr-un canal de comunicare diferențiabil. Deși aceste politici sunt eficiente pentru multe sarcini, interpretarea strategiilor lor de comunicare indusă a rămas o provocare. Aici propunem interpretarea mesajelor agenților prin traducerea lor. Spre deosebire de problemele tipice de traducere automată, nu avem date paralele din care să învățăm. În schimb, dezvoltăm un model de traducere bazat pe înțelegerea că mesajele agenților și șirurile de limbaj natural înseamnă același lucru dacă induc aceeași credință despre lume într-un ascultător. Prezentăm garanții teoretice și dovezi empirice că abordarea noastră păstrează atât semantica, cât și pragmatica mesajelor, asigurându-ne că jucătorii care comunică printr-un strat de traducere nu suferă o pierdere substanțială în recompensă față de jucătorii cu un limbaj comun.', 'so': 'Dhab ahaantii waxaa la soo jeeday in lagu barto siyaasadaha aad u dheer oo kala duduwan oo lagu kooxeeyo kanal xiriir kala duwan. Inta lagu jiro siyaasadu ay tayo u leeyihiin shaqaalaha badan, turjumidda qoraalka xiriirka laga sameeyo waxay noqotay mid adag. Halkan waxaan ku talo galaynaa in aan turjumno farriinka shaqaalaha. Si ka duwan dhibaatooyinka turjumista maskinada oo caadiga ah, ma hayno macluumaad isku mid ah oo aan wax ka barno. Isku badalta waxaynu horumarinaynaa model turjumista oo ku saleysan aragtida, in agagaarka farshaxanka iyo luqada dabiicadda ah ay micnahoodu tahay isku mid haddii ay ku sameeyaan rumaysadka isku mid ah ee dunida dhegta. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa garashada cilmiga ah iyo markhaatiyada tiyaatarka ah in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu ilaaliyo labada isbedelka iyo isticmaalka farriinka, si aan kuwa ciyaaraha ku xiriira darafka turjumaanka ugu xanuunsan khasaaro weyn mushaar ku saabsan kuwa luqada caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Flera tillvägagångssätt har nyligen föreslagits för att lära sig decentraliserade djupa multiagentstrategier som samordnas via en differentierad kommunikationskanal. Även om dessa strategier är effektiva för många uppgifter, har tolkningen av deras inducerade kommunikationsstrategier fortsatt vara en utmaning. Här föreslår vi att man tolkar agenternas budskap genom att översätta dem. Till skillnad från vanliga maskinöversättningsproblem har vi inga parallella data att lära av. Istället utvecklar vi en översättningsmodell baserad på insikten att agentmeddelanden och naturliga språksträngar betyder samma sak om de framkallar samma tro om världen hos en lyssnare. Vi presenterar teoretiska garantier och empiriska bevis för att vårt tillvägagångssätt bevarar både semantiken och pragmatiken i meddelanden genom att säkerställa att spelare som kommunicerar via ett översättningsskikt inte drabbas av betydande förluster i belöning jämfört med spelare med ett gemensamt språk.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் சில முன்னேற்றங்கள் ஒரு வேறுபாடு தொடர்பு வாய்க்காலை வழியாக ஒரு ஆய்ந்து கொள்ளும் ஆழமான பல்வேறு கொள்கைகளை  இந்த கொள்கைகள் பல பணிகளுக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக இருக்கும் போது, அவர்களின் தொடர்பு துறைகளின் விளக்கம் சவால் இருக்கிறது. இங்கே நாம் முகவரிகளின் செய்திகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பிடுவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இயல்பான இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பிரச்சனைகளில் இருந்து மாறுபடாது, நாங்கள் இதிலிருந்து கற்று  அதற்கு பதிலாக நாம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறோம் செய்திகள் மற்றும் இயற்கையான மொழி சரங்கள் என்பது ஒரே மொழிபெயர்ப்ப விளையாடுபவர்கள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அடுக்கு மூலம் தொடர்பு கொள்ளும் விளையாடுபவர்கள் பொதுவான மொழியில் விளையாடுபவர்களுக்கு கொடுக்கும் கூலி செய்யும் பொருட', 'ur': 'بہت سی تقریبیں اچھے سے ڈیسنٹرالیز ملیٹ ایجنٹ پولیس کی تعلیم کے لئے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں جو ایک متفاوت کامنیک چانال کے ذریعے تفریق کرتی ہیں. اگرچہ یہ سیاست بہت سے کاموں کے لئے مفید ہیں، ان کے پیدا ہوئے ارتباط طریقوں کی تعبیر ایک چال رہی ہے۔ یہاں ہم اگنٹوں کے پیغامات کی تعبیر کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ان کو ترجمہ کریں۔ معمولی مشین ترجمہ مشکلات کے بغیر، ہمارے پاس اس سے سیکھنے کے لئے کوئی پارال ڈیٹا نہیں ہے۔ اس کے عوض ہم ایک ترجمہ موڈل کو ایجاد کریں گے کہ اگنٹ پیغام اور طبیعی زبان استرینگ ایک ہی بات کا مطلب ہے اگر وہ دنیا کے بارے میں ایک ہی ایمان لے آئیں۔ ہم تئوریٹی گارانتیاں اور امپریٹی دلیلیں پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ہماری تقریبا پیغام کے سیمانٹیکوں اور پراگنٹیکوں کو حفظ کرتا ہے اس کے مطابق کہ کھیلانے والوں کو ترجمہ لائٹ کے ذریعے ارتباط دیتے ہیں اور کھیلانے والوں کے معاملہ میں بہت زیادہ خسارہ نہیں پاتے۔', 'sr': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko pristupa za učenje decentralizirane duboke politike multiagenata koje koordiniraju putem diferencijalnog komunikacijskog kanala. Iako su ta politika efikasna za mnoge zadatke, interpretacija njihovih indukovanih komunikacijskih strategija ostala je izazov. Ovde predlažemo da interpretiramo poruke agenata prevodeći ih. Za razliku od tipičnih problema sa prevodom mašine, nemamo paralelne podatke od kojih treba naučiti. Umjesto toga razvijamo model prevoda na osnovu uvida da da poruke agent a i prirodnih jezika znaèi isto ako izazivaju isto verovanje o svetu u slušatelju. Predstavljamo teorijske garancije i empiričke dokaze da naš pristup sačuva i semantiku i pragmatiku poruka osiguravajući da igrači koji komuniciraju kroz prevod sloj ne pate od značajnog gubitka nagrade u odnosu na igrače sa zajedničkim jezikom.', 'si': 'වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සංවිධානයක් විසින් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් කිය මේ ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරධාන සම්බන් මෙතන අපි නියෝජිතයන්ගේ පණිවිඩය අනුවර්තන කරන්න පුළුවන් කරනවා ඔවුන්ව වාර්තන කරන්න. සාමාන්\u200dය මැෂින් වාර්ථාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපිට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නෑ. ඒ වෙනුවෙන් අපි වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා නියෝජිත පණිවිඩය සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස් එකම දේවල් කියනවා  අපි සාධාරණික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂි දෙන්නම් අපේ විදියට පණිවිඩය සහ පණිවිඩයේ සිමාන්තික සහ ප්\u200dරාග්මැටික් දෙන්නම් සුරක්ෂා කරනවා කියල', 'vi': 'Một số phương pháp gần đây đã được đề nghị để học các chính sách đa đặc biệt lớn hơn, được phối hợp qua một kênh liên lạc khác nhau. Trong khi những chính sách này có hiệu quả trong nhiều nhiệm vụ, thì việc giải thích các chiến lược thông tin từ họ vẫn còn là một thách thức. Ở đây chúng tôi đề nghị phiên dịch tin nhắn của các đặc vụ bằng cách dịch. Không giống như các vấn đề dịch thuật máy điển hình, chúng tôi không có dữ liệu song để học hỏi. Thay vào đó, chúng ta phát triển một mô hình dịch dựa trên sự hiểu biết rằng thông điệp và dây ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có cùng ý nghĩa nếu chúng tạo ra niềm tin tương tự về thế giới trong một người lắng nghe. Chúng tôi đưa ra sự đảm bảo lý thuyết và bằng chứng thực tế rằng phương pháp của chúng tôi bảo vệ khái niệm và thực dụng của các thông điệp bằng cách đảm bảo những người chơi thông qua lớp dịch thuật không phải chịu mất mát lớn về phần thưởng so với những người chơi có ngôn ngữ chung.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik murakkab aloqa kanal orqali o'rganish qoidalarini o'rganish uchun boshqa usullar talab qilindi. Bu qoidalar ko'p vazifalar uchun ishlaydigan paydo bo'lganda, ularning ishga tushirilgan aloqa strategiyasini tahrirlash muvaffaqiyatli bo'ladi. Bu yerda biz agentlarning xabarlarini tarjima qilish uchun talab qilamiz. @ info Keyin biz bir tarjima modelni taʼminlovchi xabarlar va tabiiy tilning tarjimalari asosida yaratishmiz, agar улар tinglovchi dunyoning bir bir ishni ishga tushirish mumkin. Biz tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz va imkoniyatlarning imkoniyatlarimiz xabarlarning semantik va pragmatiklarni saqlaydi va tarjima qatlam orqali aloqa qiladigan odamlar bir necha tillar bilan bog'liq boʻlgan paytda juda katta yo'qotmaydi.", 'bg': 'Наскоро бяха предложени няколко подхода за изучаване на децентрализирани политики за дълбоки мултиагенти, които координират чрез диференцируем комуникационен канал. Въпреки че тези политики са ефективни за много задачи, тълкуването на техните индуцирани комуникационни стратегии остава предизвикателство. Тук предлагаме да интерпретираме посланията на агентите чрез превод. За разлика от типичните проблеми с машинния превод, ние нямаме паралелни данни, от които да се поучим. Вместо това разработваме модел на превод, базиран на прозрението, че посланията на агентите и низовете на естествения език означават едно и също нещо, ако те предизвикват една и съща вяра за света в слушателя. Представяме теоретични гаранции и емпирични доказателства, че нашият подход запазва както семантиката, така и прагматиката на посланията, като гарантира, че играчите, комуникиращи чрез преводачески слой, не претърпяват значителна загуба на възнаграждение спрямо играчите с общ език.', 'da': 'Flere tilgange er for nylig blevet foreslået til at lære decentraliserede dybe multiagent politikker, der koordinerer via en differentieret kommunikationskanal. Selv om disse politikker er effektive til mange opgaver, er fortolkningen af deres inducerede kommunikationsstrategier fortsat en udfordring. Her foreslår vi at fortolke agenternes budskaber ved at oversætte dem. I modsætning til typiske maskinoversættelsesproblemer har vi ingen parallelle data at lære af. I stedet udvikler vi en oversættelsesmodel baseret på indsigten i, at agentmeddelelser og natursprogstrenge betyder det samme, hvis de fremkalder den samme tro om verden hos en lytter. Vi præsenterer teoretiske garantier og empiriske beviser for, at vores tilgang bevarer både semantikken og pragmatikken af budskaber ved at sikre, at spillere, der kommunikerer gennem et oversættelseslag, ikke lider et betydeligt tab i belønning i forhold til spillere med et fælles sprog.', 'nl': 'Recent zijn verschillende benaderingen voorgesteld voor het leren van gedecentraliseerd diep multiagentenbeleid dat coördineert via een differentieerbaar communicatiekanaal. Hoewel dit beleid effectief is voor veel taken, is de interpretatie van hun geïnduceerde communicatiestrategieën een uitdaging gebleven. Hier stellen we voor om de boodschappen van agenten te interpreteren door ze te vertalen. In tegenstelling tot typische machinevertaalproblemen hebben we geen parallelle gegevens om van te leren. In plaats daarvan ontwikkelen we een vertaalmodel gebaseerd op het inzicht dat agentberichten en natuurlijke taalstrings hetzelfde betekenen als ze bij een luisteraar hetzelfde geloof over de wereld opwekken. We presenteren theoretische garanties en empirisch bewijs dat onze aanpak zowel de semantiek als de pragmatiek van berichten behoudt door ervoor te zorgen dat spelers die communiceren via een vertaallaag geen aanzienlijk verlies in beloning lijden ten opzichte van spelers met een gemeenschappelijke taal.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko pristupa za učenje decentralizirane duboke politike multiagenata koje koordiniraju putem diferencijalnog komunikacijskog kanala. Iako su te politike učinkovite za mnoge zadatke, interpretacija njihovih indukovanih komunikacijskih strategija ostala je izazov. Ovdje predlažemo interpretirati poruke agenata prevodeći ih. Za razliku od tipičkih problema sa prevodom stroja, nemamo paralelne podatke od kojih bismo naučili. Umjesto toga razvijemo model prevoda na temelju uvida da poruke agent a i prirodne jezičke žice znače isto ako izazivaju isto vjerovanje o svijetu u slušatelju. Predstavljamo teorijske garancije i empiričke dokaze da naš pristup sačuva i semantiku i pragmatiku poruka osiguravajući da igrači koji komuniciraju kroz prevod sloj ne pate značajan gubitak nagrade u odnosu na igrače s zajedničkim jezikom.', 'de': 'Kürzlich wurden mehrere Ansätze vorgeschlagen, um dezentrale Deep-Multiagent-Richtlinien zu erlernen, die sich über einen differenzierbaren Kommunikationskanal koordinieren. Während diese Politiken für viele Aufgaben effektiv sind, bleibt die Interpretation ihrer induzierten Kommunikationsstrategien eine Herausforderung. Hier schlagen wir vor, die Botschaften der Agenten durch Übersetzung zu interpretieren. Anders als bei typischen maschinellen Übersetzungsproblemen haben wir keine Paralleldaten, aus denen wir lernen können. Stattdessen entwickeln wir ein Übersetzungsmodell, das auf der Erkenntnis basiert, dass Agentenmeldungen und natürliche Sprachstrings dasselbe bedeuten, wenn sie beim Zuhörer den gleichen Glauben über die Welt hervorrufen. Wir präsentieren theoretische Garantien und empirische Beweise dafür, dass unser Ansatz sowohl die Semantik als auch die Pragmatik von Botschaften bewahrt, indem sichergestellt wird, dass Spieler, die über eine Übersetzungsschicht kommunizieren, keinen erheblichen Verlust an Belohnung erleiden im Vergleich zu Spielern mit einer gemeinsamen Sprache.', 'ko': '최근 마이크로 통신 채널을 통해 조화를 이룰 수 있는 분산식 심층 다중지능체 전략을 배우는 몇 가지 방법이 제기됐다.비록 이러한 전략은 많은 임무에 효과가 있지만, 그 유도 소통 전략을 어떻게 해석하는지는 여전히 도전이다.여기서, 우리는 번역을 통해 대리인의 소식을 해석할 것을 건의합니다.전형적인 기계 번역 문제와 달리 우리는 배울 수 있는 평행 데이터가 없다.반대로 우리는 번역 모델을 개발했다. 이 모델은 이러한 인식을 바탕으로 한다. 만약에 프록시 메시지와 자연 언어 문자열이 청자들에게 세계에 대한 같은 신념을 불러일으키면 똑같은 것을 의미한다.우리는 이론적 보증과 경험적 증거를 제공하여 우리의 방법은 번역층을 통해 교류하는 유저가 공통언어를 사용하는 유저에 비해 실질적인 보상 손실을 입지 않도록 함으로써 정보의 의미와 언어를 보존하고 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'اخیراً چند دسترسی برای یادگیری سیاست های عمیق چندین ماموریت پیشنهاد شده است که با یک کانال ارتباطی متفاوت تغییر دهند. در حالی که این سیاست\u200cها برای بسیاری از کارها موثر هستند، تعبیر استراتژی\u200cهای رابطه\u200cهای پیوسته آنها یک چالش باقی مانده است. اینجا پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم پیغام ماموران را با ترجمه کردن آنها تعبیر کنیم. برخلاف مشکلات ترجمه ماشین معمولی، ما هیچ اطلاعاتی متفاوتی برای یاد گرفتن از آن نداریم. به جای این، ما یک مدل ترجمه را بر اساس بفهمیم که پیغام های مامور و زبانهای طبیعی معنی یک چیز است اگر آنها باور کردند در مورد دنیا در یک گوش دهنده همان باور کنند. ما تضمين تئوري و مدرک امپريتي رو پيشنهاد مي کنيم که دستور ما هم بيماري و پراگرماتيک پيغام ها رو حفظ ميکنه با اطمينان اينکه بازيزان ها با طبق طبق طبقه ترجمه ارتباط برقرار کنند در پاداش زيادي در نسبت به بازيزان با زبان مشترک به دست نميدن', 'id': 'Several approaches have recently been proposed for learning decentralized deep multiagent policies that coordinate via a differentiable communication channel.  Sementara kebijakan ini efektif untuk banyak tugas, interpretasi strategi komunikasi mereka telah tetap tantangan. Di sini kami mengusulkan untuk menerjemahkan pesan agen dengan menerjemahkannya. Tidak seperti dalam masalah terjemahan mesin biasa, kita tidak punya data paralel untuk belajar dari. Sebaliknya kita mengembangkan model terjemahan berdasarkan pengetahuan bahwa pesan agen dan tali bahasa alami berarti hal yang sama jika mereka mendorong keyakinan yang sama tentang dunia dalam pendengar. Kami mempersembahkan jaminan teori dan bukti empiris bahwa pendekatan kita memelihara semantik dan pragmatik pesan dengan memastikan bahwa pemain berkomunikasi melalui lapisan terjemahan tidak menderita kehilangan besar dalam hadiah berbanding pemain dengan bahasa umum.', 'sw': 'Matokeo kadhaa hivi karibuni yamependekezwa kwa ajili ya kujifunza sera za mambo yenye msimamo mkali ambazo huratibu kupitia chaneli cha mawasiliano tofauti. While these policies are effective for many tasks, interpretation of their induced communication strategies has remained a challenge.  Hapa tunapendekeza kutafsiri ujumbe wa watumishi kwa kutafsiri. Tofauti na matatizo ya kutafsiri mashine ya kawaida, hatuna taarifa za usawa wa kujifunza kutoka. Badala yake tunatengeneza muundo wa tafsiri kwa msingi wa mtazamo kwamba ujumbe na misingi ya lugha asili yanamaanisha jambo hilo kama wataanzisha imani sawa kuhusu dunia kwa msikilizaji. Tunawasilisha uhakika wa nadharia na ushahidi wa msisitizo kwamba mbinu zetu zinahifadhi maeneo ya ujumbe kwa kuhakikisha kuwa wachezaji wanawasiliana kupitia daraja la kutafsiri hawaathiriki hasara kubwa katika malipo yanayohusiana na wachezaji wenye lugha ya kawaida.', 'tr': 'Soňra birnäçe golaý görnüşdirilýän gaty bir multi-agentäk politikalary görkezmek üçin teklip edildi. Bu politikalar köp zada üçin täsirli bolsa bolsa, olaryň täsirli komunikasy strategiýalarynyň yorumy kynçylyk bolup geçdi. Bu ýerde ajaýyrlaryň mesajlaryny terjime edip terjime etmegi teklip edýäris. Adatça maşynyň terjime etmek meselelerine meňzeş, ondan öwrenmek üçin parallel maglumatymyz ýok. Ynha mesajlaryň we tebigy dil düzgünleriniň görnüşine daýan bir terjime modelini geliştirdik. Eger olar dünýäde diňleýän adamlaryň bardygyna bir ynamyny täsirleýän bolsa, Biz teoriýaly garantiýalary we empiriýaly kanaglary görkeýäris, meýdançalaryň hem semantika hem pragmatiki hem mesajlaryň terjime düzlügini bilen habarlaşyp bilen oýunçylara orta dil bilen täsirli ýitirmeklerinden boýunça ýitilmeýändigini garaşyrýarys.', 'af': "Verskeie toegange is onlangs voorgestel vir die leer van decentraliseerde diep multiagent beleid wat koordineer deur 'n verskillende kommunikasie kanaal. Alhoewel hierdie beleid effektief is vir baie opdragte, het die uitlegging van hul induseerde kommunikasiestrategies 'n uitdrukking bly. Hier stel ons voorstel om agente se boodskappe te interpreteer deur hulle te vertaling. Ongelik soos in tipiese masjien vertaling probleme, het ons geen parallele data om van te leer nie. In plaas van ons ontwikkel 'n vertaling model gebaseer op die insig dat agent boodskappe en natuurlike taal strengs dieselfde beteken as hulle dieselfde geloof aanbring oor die wêreld in 'n luister. Ons stel teorieese garanties en empiriese bevestigheid dat ons toegang behou beide die semantieke en pragmatike van boodskappe deur te verseker dat spelers wat deur 'n vertaling laag kommunikasieer, nie 'n betekende verloor in verloor relatief tot spelers met 'n gemeenskaplike taal.", 'sq': "Disa qasje janë propozuar kohët e fundit për mësimin e politikave të decentralizuara të thella multiagjente që bashkërendojnë nëpërmjet një kanali të ndryshëm komunikimi. Ndërsa këto politika janë efektive për shumë detyra, interpretimi i strategjive të tyre të nxitura të komunikimit ka mbetur një sfidë. Here we propose to interpret agents' messages by translating them.  Ndryshe nga problemet tipike të përkthimit të makinave, nuk kemi të dhëna paralele nga të cilat duhet mësuar. Në vend të kësaj ne zhvillojmë një model përkthimi bazuar në kuptimin se mesazhet e agjentëve dhe litarët e gjuhës natyrore do të thotë të njëjtën gjë në qoftë se ata nxisin të njëjtin besim rreth botës në një dëgjues. Ne paraqesim garanci teorike dhe prova empirike se qasja jonë ruan si semantikën ashtu edhe pragmatikën e mesazheve duke siguruar se lojtarët që komunikojnë nëpërmjet një shtrese përkthimi nuk vuajnë një humbje thelbësore në shpërblim në krahasim me lojtarët me një gjuhë të përbashkët.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ዘመን በተለያዩ የግንኙነት ቻይሎችን በማስተማር ጥልቅ የብዙ ፖለቲያዎችን ለመማር ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ እነዚህ ፖለቲካዎች ለብዙ ስራ የሚጠያየቁ ሲሆኑ፣ የመግለጫቸው የግንኙነት ዘጠኝነት መተርጉም ጥላቻ ሆኖአል፡፡ ይሄ፣ የኢንተርኔት መልዕክቶች በመተርጓሜ እናስተራርጉት፡፡ በተለየ ማሻሻሻል ትርጉም ጉዳይ ላይ፣ ከ ለመማር የተለየ ዳታ የለንም፡፡ በመስረጃዎች እና የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት በዓለም ላይ አንድ እምነትን በመስጠት የሚያስፈልጉ እንደሆነ እንደዚህ ነው፡፡ በተርጓሚው ደረጃዎች እንዲያካክሉ እና በተርጓሚው ደረጃዎች እንዲያካክሉ የtheoretical guarantees እና የማስተካከለኛ ማስረጃዎችን እና የመልእክትን ስሜት እና ስህተት እንዲጠብቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս որոշ մոտեցումներ են առաջարկվել, որպեսզի սովորենք քաղաքականություններ, որոնք համախմբվում են տարբեր հաղորդակցման կանոնների միջոցով: Մինչդեռ այս քաղաքականությունը արդյունավետ է շատ խնդիրների համար, նրանց առաջացած հաղորդակցման ռազմավարությունների մեկնաբանությունը դեռևս մարտահրավեր է մնացել: Այստեղ մենք առաջարկում ենք թարգմանել գործիչների հաղորդագրությունները թարգմանելով դրանք: Ի տարբերություն տիպիկ մեքենայի թարգմանման խնդիրներին, մենք չունենք զուգահեռ տվյալներ սովորելու համար: Փոխարենը մենք ստեղծում ենք թարգմանման մոդել, որը հիմնված է այն հասկացության վրա, որ գործակալի հաղորդագրությունները և բնական լեզվի լարերը նշանակում են նույն բանը, եթե նրանք ստեղծում են նույն հավատը աշխարհի մասին լսողի մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տեսական երաշխավորություններ և էմպրիկական ապացույցներ, որ մեր մոտեցումը պահպանում է նաև սեմանտիկան, նաև հաղորդագրությունների պրագմատիկան, վստահելով, որ թարգմանման շերտի միջոցով հաղորդակցվող խաղացողները չեն տառապում նշանակալի պարգևի', 'az': 'Son zamanlarda bir neçə tərəflər müxtəlif komunikasyon kanalı vasitəsilə birlikdə müəyyən edilən çoxlu milyoagent politikalarını öyrənmək üçün təklif edilmişdir. Bu siyasətlər çoxlu işlər üçün etkili olsa da, onların ürəkləndirilmiş komunikasyon stratejilərinin yorumluğu çətinliklərə səbəb qalmışdır. Burada agentların ismarışlarını tercümə edərək təklif edirik. Tipik mašin çeviri problemlərinin bənzəri, öyrənmək üçün paralel məlumatlarımız yoxdur. Əgər onlar dünya haqqında aynı inancını dinləyənlərdə dəyişdirirlərsə, a ģent ismarışları və təbiətli dil səhifələrinin anlaşılmasına dayanan bir modeli təhsil edirik. Biz teorik garantiləri və empirik kanıtları göstəririk ki, tərzimiz həmçin in ismarışların semantik və pragmatiklərini qoruyur və oyuncuların bir çeviri səviyyəsi ilə iletişim edərək oyuncuların orta dillə əlaqəsində böyük bir zərər çəkməsinlər.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি বেশ কয়েকটি পদক্ষেপ প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে গভীর মাল্টিজেন্টের নীতি শিখার জন্য যা একটি বিভিন্ন যোগাযোগ চ্যানেলের ম While these policies are effective for many tasks, interpretation of their induced communication strategies has remained a challenge.  এখানে আমরা এজেন্টের বার্তা অনুবাদের মাধ্যমে ব্যাখ্যা করতে প্রস্তাব করি। সাধারণ মেশিন অনুবাদের সমস্যাগুলোর মধ্যে অন্তর্ভুক্ত, আমাদের কোন প্যারালেল ডাটা থেকে শিখার নেই। এর পরিবর্তে আমরা একটি অনুবাদ মডেল তৈরি করি যে এজেন্ট বার্তা এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার স্ট্রিঙ্গের উপর ভিত্তিক ভাবে তৈরি করা হয়েছে যদি তারা  আমরা তত্ত্বিক নিশ্চিত নিশ্চিত এবং সামরিক প্রমাণ উপস্থাপন করছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বার্তার সেম্যান্টিক এবং ব্যাক্তিক সংরক্ষণ করে যাচ্ছে যে অনুবাদ স্তরে যোগা', 'ca': "Recentment s'han proposat diversos enfocaments per aprendre polítiques decentralitzades i profundes que s'coordinan a través d'un canal diferenciable de comunicació. Mentre que aquestes polítiques són efectives per a moltes tasques, l'interpretació de les seves estratègies de comunicació induïdes ha sigut un repte. Aquí proposem interpretar els missatges dels agents traduïnt-los. A diferència dels típics problemes de traducció de màquines, no tenim dades paralleles d'on aprendre. En canvi desenvolupem un model de traducció basat en la comprensió que els missatges d'agent i les cadenes naturals de llenguatge significan el mateix si indueixen la mateixa creença sobre el món en un escoltant. Presentam garancies teòriques i evidències empíriques que el nostre enfocament conserva tant la semàntica com la pragmàtica dels missatges assegurant que els jugadors que comunican a través d'una capa de traducció no pateixen una pèrdua substancial de recompensa en comparació amb els jugadors amb un llenguatge comú.", 'cs': 'V poslední době bylo navrženo několik přístupů pro učení decentralizovaných hlubokých multiagentních politik, které koordinují prostřednictvím diferencovatelného komunikačního kanálu. Zatímco tyto politiky jsou účinné pro mnoho úkolů, interpretace jejich indukovaných komunikačních strategií zůstává výzvou. Zde navrhujeme interpretaci poselství agentů jejich překladem. Na rozdíl od typických problémů strojového překladu nemáme žádná paralelní data, z kterých bychom se mohli učit. Místo toho vyvíjíme překladový model založený na poznatku, že agentská sdělení a řetězce přirozeného jazyka znamenají totéž, pokud vyvolávají stejnou víru o světě u posluchače. Předkládáme teoretické záruky a empirické důkazy, že náš přístup zachovává jak sémantiku, tak pragmatiku sdělení tím, že zajišťuje, aby hráči komunikující prostřednictvím překladové vrstvy netrpěli podstatnou ztrátu odměny ve srovnání s hráči se společným jazykem.', 'et': 'Hiljuti on välja pakutud mitmeid lähenemisviise detsentraliseeritud mitme agendi poliitika õppimiseks, mis koordineerivad erinevate kommunikatsioonikanalite kaudu. Kuigi need poliitikad on paljude ülesannete täitmiseks tõhusad, on nende esilekerkitud kommunikatsioonistrateegiate tõlgendamine jäänud väljakutseks. Siin teeme ettepaneku tõlgendada agentide sõnumeid tõlkides. Erinevalt tüüpilistest masintõlke probleemidest ei ole meil paralleelseid andmeid, millest õppida. Selle asemel töötame välja tõlkemudeli, mis põhineb arusaamal, et agentide sõnumid ja looduskeele stringid tähendavad sama asja, kui nad tekitavad kuulajas sama usku maailma kohta. Esitame teoreetilisi garantiisid ja empiirilisi tõendeid, et meie lähenemisviis säilitab nii sõnumite semantika kui ka pragmaatika, tagades, et tõlkekihi kaudu suhtlevad mängijad ei kannata märkimisväärset tasukaotust võrreldes ühise keelega mängijatega.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina on ehdotettu useita lähestymistapoja hajautetun moniagenttipolitiikan oppimiseen, joka koordinoi hajautetun viestintäkanavan kautta. Vaikka nämä politiikat ovat tehokkaita monissa tehtävissä, niiden aikaansaamien viestintästrategioiden tulkinta on edelleen haaste. Ehdotamme, että agenttien viestejä tulkitaan kääntämällä ne. Toisin kuin tyypillisissä konekäännösongelmissa, meillä ei ole rinnakkaisia tietoja, joista oppia. Sen sijaan kehitämme käännösmallin, joka perustuu käsitykseen siitä, että agenttiviestit ja luonnolliset kielet merkitsevät samaa asiaa, jos ne herättävät kuulijassa saman uskomuksen maailmasta. Esitämme teoreettisia takeita ja empiirisiä todisteita siitä, että lähestymistapamme säilyttää viestien semantiikan ja pragmatiikan varmistamalla, että käännöskerroksen kautta kommunikoivat pelaajat eivät kärsi huomattavaa palkkionmenetystä verrattuna pelaajiin, joilla on yhteinen kieli.', 'bs': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko pristupa za učenje decentralizirane duboke politike multiagenata koje koordiniraju putem diferencijalnog komunikacijskog kanala. Iako su te politike učinkovite za mnoge zadatke, interpretacija njihovih indukovanih komunikacijskih strategija ostala je izazov. Ovdje predlažemo da interpretiramo poruke agenata prevodeći ih. Za razliku od tipičnih problema sa prevodom mašine, nemamo paralelne podatke od kojih treba naučiti. Umjesto toga razvijamo model prevođenja na osnovu uvida da poruke agent a i prirodne jezičke žice znače istu stvar ako izazovu istu verovanje o svijetu u slušatelju. Predstavljamo teorijske garancije i empiričke dokaze da naš pristup sačuva i semantiku i pragmatiku poruka osiguravajući da igrači koji komuniciraju kroz prevod sloj ne pate od značajnog gubitka nagrade u odnosu na igrače s zajedničkim jezikom.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nanging ketoke politik iki dadi efek kanggo akeh operasi, akeh tolungkur banjur kelas komunikasi sing bisa basa sing apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Tulung banget ing panjenengan kelas telibut, dhewe ora ono data nganggo coral Tanian olèhku, awak dhéwé nggawe model tarjamahan sing basa saben nglarangan berarti Messahan lan luwih basa sing berarti kuwi, lan uga iso ngregani kuwi cah-cah saben kuwi lanjut sing luwih apik lan tambah kuwi ngregani saben kuwi duluran. Awak dhéwé éntuk theoretik sing ngerasai lan akeh dumadhi iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé sematik lan pragmulalah sing berarti alam kuwi nggawe dolanan surat kuwi nggawe tarjamahan gak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé', 'sk': 'Pred kratkim je bilo predlaganih več pristopov za učenje decentraliziranih politik več agentov, ki se usklajujejo prek različnega komunikacijskega kanala. Čeprav so te politike učinkovite pri številnih nalogah, je razlaga njihovih spodbujenih komunikacijskih strategij ostala izziv. Tukaj predlagamo tolmačenje sporočil agentov s prevajanjem. Za razliko od običajnih težav s strojnim prevajanjem nimamo vzporednih podatkov, iz katerih bi se lahko učili. Namesto tega razvijamo prevajalski model, ki temelji na vpogledu, da agentska sporočila in nizi naravnega jezika pomenijo isto, če pri poslušalcu sprožijo isto prepričanje o svetu. Predstavljamo teoretična jamstva in empirične dokaze, da naš pristop ohranja tako semantiko kot pragmatiko sporočil, saj zagotavlja, da igralci, ki komunicirajo preko prevajalskega sloja, ne utrpijo bistvene izgube nagrade v primerjavi z igralci s skupnim jezikom.', 'ha': "A yanzu, an buƙata wasu hanyõyin da aka sanar wa masu danganta na-danganta, siyafai masu bakin multi-mutane da ke yin tasgaro a tsakanin kommuni mai bambanci. A lokacin da waɗannan siyafai sun kasance mafiya amfani ga aikin mãsu yawa, sai fassararsu ga tunikin kommuni da za'a gabatar da su bada wata musamma. @ action: button Unlike in typical machine translation problems, we have no parallel data to learn from.  Kayyansa, Munã buɗe wani misali da fassarar a kan jinin da ake faɗa ma'anar maganar da ma'anar mutane da misalin harshe na natsi idan sun ƙara imani da ke cikin duniya cikin mai saurãre. Tuna halatar da masu inganci na takardar da ma'anar gaskiya cẽwa hanyarmu yana tsare duk masu sakan da mazaɓa na message, kuma lalle ne, masu yin saurãre da su yi magana a kan runduna fassarar ba su zartar da hasara mai girma ga sakamakon mãsu danganta da ke da harshe na ɗabi'a.", 'he': "לאחרונה הציעו מספר גישות ללמוד מדיניות עמוקות ומרבות סוכנים שמתאימות באמצעות ערוץ תקשורת שונה. למרות שהמדיניות האלה יעילות עבור משימות רבות, הפרשנות של אסטרטגיות התקשורת המונעות שלהן נשארה אתגר. Here we propose to interpret agents' messages by translating them.  בניגוד לבעיות טיפוסיות בתרגום מכונות, אין לנו מידע מקביל ללמוד ממנו. במקום זה אנחנו מפתחים מודל תרגום מבוסס על ההבנה שההודעות הסוכנים וחברות שפה טבעיות משמעות אותו הדבר אם הם מעוררים את אותה אמונה על העולם במקשיב. אנחנו מציגים הבטחות תיאורטיות והראיות האמפריות שהגישה שלנו שומרת את הסמנטיקה והפרגמטיקה של ההודעות על ידי להבטיח ששחקנים מתקשרים דרך שכבת תרגום לא סובלים אבדן משמעותי בפרס בנוגע לשחקנים עם שפה משותפת.", 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བར་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུད་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟངས་བསྡུར་བ་སྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་ཆགས་པ་ཡིན་ དེ་དག་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱོན་རུང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་དུས་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོའི་སྒོ་འབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དོན་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་གཏོང་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཆོག་ཡིན་པ་རེད། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག དེ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཆ་དང་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྟོགས་ཁང་དང་ནུས་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་གི་འཕྲིན་རིམ་དང་བློ་གཏད་རྩེས་ཐོ་གཉིས་ལས་ཉར་ཡོད་མིན་པར་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Obtaining referential word meanings from visual and distributional information : Experiments on object naming', 'ar': 'الحصول على معاني الكلمات المرجعية من المعلومات المرئية والتوزيعية: تجارب على تسمية الأشياء', 'pt': 'Obtendo significados de palavras referenciais a partir de informações visuais e distributivas: experimentos sobre nomeação de objetos', 'fr': "Obtenir des significations de mots référentiels à partir d'informations visuelles et distributionnelles\xa0: expériences sur la dénomination d'objets", 'es': 'Obtención de significados de palabras referenciales a partir de información visual y distribucional: Experimentos sobre la denominación de objetos', 'ja': '視覚情報と分布情報から参照語の意味を得る：オブジェクトの命名に関する実験', 'zh': '取指涉词目、布信涉词名实验', 'hi': 'दृश्य और वितरण संबंधी जानकारी से संदर्भित शब्द अर्थ प्राप्त करना: ऑब्जेक्ट नामकरण पर प्रयोग', 'ru': 'Получение ссылочных значений слов из визуальной и распределительной информации: Эксперименты по именованию объектов', 'ga': 'Ag fáil bríonna tagarthacha focal ó fhaisnéis amhairc agus dáileacháin: Turgnaimh ar ainmniú réad', 'hu': 'Referenciális szójelentések beszerzése vizuális és disztribúciós információkból: Objektumnevezési kísérletek', 'el': 'Λήψη αναφορητικών εννοιών λέξεων από οπτικές και διανεμητικές πληροφορίες: Πειράματα σχετικά με την ονομασία αντικειμένων', 'ka': 'რეფერენციალური სიტყვას ვიზუალური და განსაზღვრებული ინფორმაციის განსაზღვრება: ექსპერიმენტები სახელი', 'it': 'Ottenere significati di parole referenziali da informazioni visive e distributive: Esperimenti sulla denominazione degli oggetti', 'lt': 'Referencinių žodžių reikšmių gavimas iš vizualinės ir platinamosios informacijos: objektų pavadinimo eksperimentai', 'mk': 'Добивање референцијални зборови од визуелни и дистрибуционални информации: Експерименти за именуваое на објекти', 'kk': 'Көрініс және тарату мәліметінен сілтеменің мәліметтері: нысандар атауының тәжірибелері', 'mt': 'Il-kisba ta’ tifsiriet ta’ kliem referenzjali minn informazzjoni viżwali u distributtiva: Esperimenti dwar l-isem ta’ oġġetti', 'mn': 'Дүрслэл болон хуваарилцааны мэдээллээс илэрхийлэлтэй үгний утгыг гаргах: объектын нэр гэх туршилт', 'ms': 'Obtaining referential word meanings from visual and distributional information: Experiments on object naming', 'ml': 'കാഴ്ച വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിതരണ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും റെഫറന്\u200dസില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Hentar referansielle ordmeaningar frå visual og distribusjonsinformasjon: Experiments on object name', 'pl': 'Uzyskiwanie referencyjnych znaczeń słów z informacji wizualnych i dystrybucyjnych: Eksperymenty nad nazywaniem obiektów', 'ro': 'Obținerea semnificațiilor referitoare la cuvinte din informații vizuale și distribuționale: Experimente privind denumirea obiectelor', 'sr': 'Uzimajući referencijske značenje riječi iz vizuelnih i distribucijskih informacija: Eksperimenti o imenovanju objekata', 'si': 'දර්ශණය සහ විදුලි තොරතුරු වචන අදහස් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන්: ප්\u200dරතිකාර නාමයේ පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Få referensordbetydelser från visuell och distribuerad information: Experiment på objektnamngivning', 'so': 'Aqbalka hadalka reference ee macluumaadka muuqashada iyo qeybinta: Imtixaanka la xiriira magaca', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'visual and distributional information from referential word meanings: object name experimentations', 'uz': 'Experiments on object name', 'vi': 'Lấy được ý nghĩa từ liên quan từ thông tin thị giác và phân phát: Thử nghiệm tên đối tượng', 'bg': 'Получаване на референтни значения на думата от визуална и дистрибуционна информация: Експерименти по назоваване на обекти', 'nl': 'Referentiële woordbetekenissen verkrijgen uit visuele en distributionele informatie: Experimenten met objectnaamgeving', 'de': 'Beziehen von referenziellen Wortbedeutungen aus visuellen und verteilten Informationen: Experimente zur Objektbenennung', 'id': 'Menerima makna kata referensi dari informasi visual dan distribusi: Eksperimen mengenai nama objek', 'ko': '시각과 분포 정보에서 지칭어의 의미 얻기: 물체 명명 실험', 'fa': 'تعریف معنی کلمه\u200cهای تفصیل از اطلاعات بینایی و تقسیم: تجربه\u200cها در مورد نام objektu', 'da': 'Opnå referentielle ordbetydninger fra visuel og distribuerende information: Eksperimenter med objektnavngivning', 'hr': 'Uzimajući referencijske značenje riječi iz vizuelnih i distribucijskih informacija: iskustva o imenovanju objekata', 'af': 'Verwysing van verwysing van woord betekening van visuele en verspreiding inligting: Experiments on object name', 'sq': 'Duke marrë kuptime fjalësh referenciale nga informacioni vizual dhe shpërndarës: Eksperimente mbi emërimin e objekteve', 'sw': 'Kupatia maana ya neno linalomaanisha kutoka kwa taarifa za kuona na usambazaji: Majaribu kuhusu kitu kinachoitwa', 'am': 'Experiments on object name', 'az': 'Görünül və dağıtılma məlumatından referenci sözlərin anlamı alınması: Objekt adı ilə sınaqlar', 'hy': 'Վիզուալ և տարածական ինֆորմացիայից ստանալը բառի նշաններ. օբյեկտների անունների փորձեր', 'bs': 'Uzimajući referencijske značenje riječi iz vizuelnih i distribucijskih informacija: Eksperimenti o imenovanju objekata', 'ca': "Obtenir significats de paraules referencials a partir d'informació visual i distribucional: Experiments sobre el nom d'objectes", 'tr': 'Görsel ve dağıtım bilgilerinden referans kelime anlamları:', 'cs': 'Získání referenčních slovních významů z vizuálních a distribučních informací: Experimenty na jmenování objektů', 'et': 'Viitesõna tähenduste saamine visuaalsest ja leviinfost: Objektide nimetamise eksperimendid', 'fi': 'Viitesanamerkitysten saaminen visuaalisesta ja levinneisyydestä: Objektin nimeämiskokeita', 'bn': 'দৃশ্যমান এবং বিতরণ তথ্য থেকে রেফেনেন্টিল শব্দের মান: বস্তুর নামের পরীক্ষা', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'Obtaining referential word meanings from visual and distributional information: Experiments on object naming', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje referenčnih besednih pomenov iz vizualnih in distribucijskih informacij: Poskusi poimenovanja objektov', 'he': 'קיבלת משמעות מילים רפורנציאליות מידע ויזואלי ומפיצה: ניסויים על שמות אובייקטים', 'bo': 'Obtaining referential word meanings from visual and distributional information: Experiments on object naming'}
{'en': 'We investigate object naming, which is an important sub-task of referring expression generation on real-world images. As opposed to mutually exclusive labels used in object recognition, object names are more flexible, subject to communicative preferences and semantically related to each other. Therefore, we investigate models of referential word meaning that link visual to lexical information which we assume to be given through distributional word embeddings. We present a model that learns individual predictors for object names that link visual and distributional aspects of word meaning during training. We show that this is particularly beneficial for zero-shot learning, as compared to projecting visual objects directly into the distributional space. In a standard object naming task, we find that different ways of combining lexical and visual information achieve very similar performance, though experiments on model combination suggest that they capture complementary aspects of referential meaning.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في تسمية الكائنات ، وهي مهمة فرعية مهمة للإشارة إلى توليد التعبير في صور العالم الحقيقي. على عكس التسميات الحصرية المستخدمة في التعرف على الكائنات ، فإن أسماء الكائنات أكثر مرونة ، وتخضع للتفضيلات التواصلية وترتبط مع بعضها البعض ارتباطًا وثيقًا. لذلك ، نقوم بالتحقيق في نماذج لمعنى الكلمة المرجعية التي تربط المعلومات المرئية بالمعلومات المعجمية التي نفترض أنها تُعطى من خلال تضمين الكلمة التوزيعية. نقدم نموذجًا يتعلم المتنبئين الفرديين لأسماء الكائنات التي تربط الجوانب المرئية والتوزيعية لمعنى الكلمة أثناء التدريب. نظهر أن هذا مفيد بشكل خاص للتعلم بدون طلقة ، مقارنة بإسقاط الكائنات المرئية مباشرة في الفضاء التوزيعي. في مهمة تسمية كائن قياسية ، وجدنا أن الطرق المختلفة للجمع بين المعلومات المعجمية والمرئية تحقق أداءً مشابهًا للغاية ، على الرغم من أن التجارب على مجموعة النماذج تشير إلى أنها تلتقط الجوانب التكميلية للمعنى المرجعي.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le nommage des objets, qui est une sous-tâche importante pour référencer la génération d'expressions sur des images du monde réel. Contrairement aux étiquettes mutuellement exclusives utilisées dans la reconnaissance d'objets, les noms d'objets sont plus flexibles, soumis à des préférences de communication et liés sémantiquement les uns aux autres. Par conséquent, nous étudions des modèles de signification de mots référentiels qui relient les informations visuelles aux informations lexicales que nous supposons être fournies par des intégrations de mots distributionnelles. Nous présentons un modèle qui apprend des prédicteurs individuels pour les noms d'objets qui relient les aspects visuels et distributionnels de la signification des mots pendant la formation. Nous montrons que cela est particulièrement bénéfique pour l'apprentissage sans plan, par rapport à la projection d'objets visuels directement dans l'espace de distribution. Dans une tâche de dénomination d'objet standard, nous constatons que différentes manières de combiner des informations lexicales et visuelles permettent d'obtenir des performances très similaires, bien que des expériences sur la combinaison de modèles suggèrent qu'elles capturent des aspects complémentaires de la signification référentielle.", 'pt': 'Investigamos a nomeação de objetos, que é uma subtarefa importante da geração de expressões de referência em imagens do mundo real. Ao contrário dos rótulos mutuamente exclusivos usados no reconhecimento de objetos, os nomes dos objetos são mais flexíveis, sujeitos a preferências comunicativas e semanticamente relacionados entre si. Portanto, investigamos modelos de significado referencial de palavras que vinculam informações visuais a lexicais que assumimos serem fornecidas por meio de embeddings distribucionais de palavras. Apresentamos um modelo que aprende preditores individuais para nomes de objetos que ligam aspectos visuais e distributivos do significado das palavras durante o treinamento. Mostramos que isso é particularmente benéfico para o aprendizado de tiro zero, em comparação com a projeção de objetos visuais diretamente no espaço de distribuição. Em uma tarefa padrão de nomenclatura de objetos, descobrimos que diferentes maneiras de combinar informações lexicais e visuais atingem um desempenho muito semelhante, embora experimentos de combinação de modelos sugiram que elas capturam aspectos complementares do significado referencial.', 'es': 'Investigamos la denominación de objetos, que es una subtarea importante de referir la generación de expresiones en imágenes del mundo real. A diferencia de las etiquetas mutuamente excluyentes utilizadas en el reconocimiento de objetos, los nombres de objetos son más flexibles, están sujetos a preferencias comunicativas y están relacionados semánticamente entre sí. Por lo tanto, investigamos modelos de significado de palabras referenciales que vinculan la información visual con la léxica que suponemos que se proporciona a través de incrustaciones de palabras distributivas. Presentamos un modelo que aprende predictores individuales para nombres de objetos que vinculan los aspectos visuales y distributivos del significado de las palabras durante el entrenamiento. Demostramos que esto es particularmente beneficioso para el aprendizaje de tiro cero, en comparación con proyectar objetos visuales directamente en el espacio de distribución. En una tarea estándar de denominación de objetos, encontramos que las diferentes formas de combinar información léxica y visual logran un rendimiento muy similar, aunque los experimentos sobre la combinación de modelos sugieren que capturan aspectos complementarios del significado referencial.', 'ja': '現実世界の画像上の表現生成を参照する重要なサブタスクであるオブジェクトの命名を調査します。 オブジェクト認識で使用される相互排他的ラベルとは対照的に、オブジェクト名は、より柔軟であり、コミュニケーションの好みに従い、互いに意味的に関連している。 したがって、分布的な単語埋め込みを通じて与えられると仮定した視覚的な情報と語彙的な情報を結びつける参照的な単語意味のモデルを調査する。 私たちは、トレーニング中に単語意味の視覚的側面と分布的側面を結びつけるオブジェクト名の個々の予測因子を学習するモデルを提示します。 これは、視覚物体を分布空間に直接投影するのと比較して、ゼロショット学習に特に有益であることを示しています。 標準的なオブジェクト命名タスクでは、語彙情報と視覚情報を組み合わせるさまざまな方法が非常に類似したパフォーマンスを達成することがわかりますが、モデルの組み合わせの実験では、参照意味の相補的な側面を捉えることが示唆されています。', 'zh': '吾论所命,此真实世界图引表达式成之要务也。 所用之相排者反之,所名者反之,受制于交际偏好语义上相关。 故论指涉词之义,系于词汇,设此以分布词嵌之也。 立一模形,学名因子,变量系单词目。 明与所视直投影空中,于零镜头学尤有益也。 所谓命者,词法与视息相似也,虽对模型实验明,其得引义之互补也。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем именование объектов, что является важной подзадачей, связанной с генерацией выражения на изображениях реального мира. В отличие от взаимоисключающих меток, используемых при распознавании объектов, имена объектов являются более гибкими, зависят от коммуникативных предпочтений и семантически связаны друг с другом. Поэтому мы исследуем модели ссылочного слова, означающие, что визуальная информация связана с лексической информацией, которую мы предполагаем получить через вложения в дистрибутивные слова. Мы представляем модель, которая изучает отдельные предикторы для названий объектов, которые связывают визуальные и распределительные аспекты значения слова во время обучения. Показано, что это особенно полезно для обучения с нулевым выстрелом по сравнению с проекцией визуальных объектов непосредственно в распределительное пространство. В стандартной задаче именования объектов мы обнаруживаем, что различные способы сочетания лексической и визуальной информации достигают очень сходной производительности, хотя эксперименты по комбинации моделей предполагают, что они захватывают взаимодополняющие аспекты ссылочного значения.', 'hi': 'हम ऑब्जेक्ट नामकरण की जांच करते हैं, जो वास्तविक दुनिया की छवियों पर अभिव्यक्ति पीढ़ी को संदर्भित करने का एक महत्वपूर्ण उप-कार्य है। ऑब्जेक्ट मान्यता में उपयोग किए जाने वाले पारस्परिक रूप से अनन्य लेबल के विपरीत, ऑब्जेक्ट नाम अधिक लचीले होते हैं, संचार प्राथमिकताओं के अधीन होते हैं और शब्दार्थ रूप से एक-दूसरे से संबंधित होते हैं। इसलिए, हम संदर्भित शब्द के मॉडल की जांच करते हैं जिसका अर्थ है कि दृश्य को लेक्सिकल जानकारी से जोड़ता है जिसे हम वितरण शब्द एम्बेडिंग के माध्यम से दिए जाने के लिए मानते हैं। हम एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो ऑब्जेक्ट नामों के लिए व्यक्तिगत भविष्यवाणियों को सीखता है जो प्रशिक्षण के दौरान शब्द अर्थ के दृश्य और वितरण पहलुओं को जोड़ता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह विशेष रूप से शून्य-शॉट सीखने के लिए फायदेमंद है, दृश्य वस्तुओं को सीधे वितरण स्थान में पेश करने की तुलना में। एक मानक वस्तु नामकरण कार्य में, हम पाते हैं कि लेक्सिकल और दृश्य जानकारी के संयोजन के विभिन्न तरीके बहुत समान प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं, हालांकि मॉडल संयोजन पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि वे संदर्भित अर्थ के पूरक पहलुओं को कैप्चर करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar ainmniú réad, ar fo-thasc tábhachtach é chun giniúint slonn a thagairt ar íomhánna ón bhfíorshaol. I gcomparáid le lipéid chomheisiatach a úsáidtear chun oibiachtaí a aithint, tá ainmneacha réad níos solúbtha, faoi réir roghanna cumarsáideacha agus gaolmhar go séimeantach lena chéile. Mar sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar shamhlacha de bhrí focal tagartha a nascann faisnéis amhairc le heolas foclóireachta a measaimid a thugtar trí leabú focal dáileacháin. Cuirimid múnla i láthair a fhoghlaimíonn tuaróirí aonair d’ainmneacha réad a nascann gnéithe amhairc agus dáileacháin de bhrí focal le linn na hoiliúna. Léirímid go bhfuil sé seo tairbheach go háirithe d’fhoghlaim náid, i gcomparáid le réadamharc a theilgean go díreach isteach sa spás dáileacháin. I dtasc caighdeánach um ainmniú réad, feicimid go n-éiríonn go han-chosúil le bealaí éagsúla chun faisnéis léacsach agus amhairc a chomhcheangal, cé go dtugann turgnaimh ar chomhcheangal samhlacha le tuiscint go mbaineann siad gnéithe comhlántacha den bhrí tagartha.', 'hu': 'Az objektumok elnevezését vizsgáljuk, ami a valós képeken történő kifejezés generálásának fontos alfeladata. Az objektumfelismerésben használt, kölcsönösen kizáró címkékkel szemben az objektumnevek rugalmasabbak, kommunikációs preferenciáknak megfelelően és szemantikusan kapcsolódnak egymáshoz. Ezért olyan referenciális szó modelleket vizsgálunk, amelyek vizuális és lexikális információkat kapcsolnak össze, amelyeket feltételezünk disztribúciós szóbeágyazásokkal. Bemutatunk egy olyan modellt, amely megtanulja az objektumnevek egyéni előrejelzőit, amelyek összekapcsolják a szó jelentésének vizuális és eloszlási aspektusait az edzés során. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez különösen hasznos a nulla lövéses tanulás számára, mint a vizuális objektumok közvetlenül az elosztási térbe vetítése. Egy szabványos objektumnevezési feladatban azt találjuk, hogy a lexikai és vizuális információk kombinációjának különböző módjai nagyon hasonló teljesítményt érnek el, bár a modellkombinációs kísérletek arra utalnak, hogy a referencia jelentés kiegészítő aspektusait rögzítik.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε την ονομασία αντικειμένων, η οποία αποτελεί σημαντικό δευτερεύον καθήκον αναφοράς της δημιουργίας εκφράσεων σε πραγματικές εικόνες. Σε αντίθεση με τις αμοιβαία αποκλειστικές ετικέτες που χρησιμοποιούνται στην αναγνώριση αντικειμένων, τα ονόματα αντικειμένων είναι πιο ευέλικτα, υπόκεινται σε επικοινωνιακές προτιμήσεις και σημασιολογικά συνδέονται μεταξύ τους. Ως εκ τούτου, ερευνούμε μοντέλα αναφορητικών λέξεων που συνδέουν οπτικές με λεξικές πληροφορίες που υποθέτουμε ότι δίνονται μέσω κατανεμητικών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο που μαθαίνει μεμονωμένους προγνωστές για ονόματα αντικειμένων που συνδέουν οπτικές και διανεμητικές πτυχές της έννοιας λέξεων κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό είναι ιδιαίτερα ωφέλιμο για τη μάθηση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού, σε σύγκριση με την προβολή οπτικών αντικειμένων απευθείας στον κατανεμητικό χώρο. Σε μια τυπική εργασία ονοματολογίας αντικειμένων, διαπιστώνουμε ότι διαφορετικοί τρόποι συνδυασμού λεξικών και οπτικών πληροφοριών επιτυγχάνουν πολύ παρόμοια απόδοση, αν και τα πειράματα σε συνδυασμό μοντέλων υποδηλώνουν ότι συλλαμβάνουν συμπληρωματικές πτυχές της αναφορικής έννοιας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებთ სახელი სახელი, რომელიც არის მნიშვნელოვანი სახელი გამოსახულების შესახებ გამოსახულების შესახებ. როგორც ერთადერთად გამოიყენებული ელექსკულიური ნიშანების განმავლობაში გამოყენებული, ობიექტის სახელები უფრო გრძნობელია, როგორც კომუნიკაციური პრეფიკაციების და სმენტიკ ამიტომ, ჩვენ შევხედავთ რეფერენციალური სიტყვის მოდელები, რომელიც ნიშნავს, რომ ვიზუალური ლექსიკალური ინფორმაციას დაკავშირება, რომელიც ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ გა ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მოდელს, რომელიც ინდიველური პროგრამეტრები მისწავლის სახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას სტანდარტული სახელის სახელის სახელის მოქმედებაში ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ განსხვავებული გზები ლექსიკალური და ვიზუალური ინფორმაციის შეერთება ძალიან განსხვავებული გამოყენება, მაგრამ მოდელური კომბუნი', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame objektų pavadinimą, kuris yra svarbus uždavinys - nukreipti išraiškos kartą į realaus pasaulio vaizdus. Priešingai nei tarpusavyje išimtinės etiketės, naudojamos objektų pripažinimui, objektų pavadinimai yra lankstesni, atsižvelgiant į ryšių lengvatas ir semantiškai tarpusavyje susiję. Todėl mes tiriame referencinio žodžio modelius, kurie susieja vizualinę su leksikine informacija, kuri, mūsų manymu, bus teikiama per paskirstymo žodžių įdėjimus. Pateikiame model į, kuriame mokomi atskiri objektų vardų prognozatoriai, kurie mokymo metu susieja vaizdinius ir platinamuosius žodžio reikšmės aspektus. Mes rodome, kad tai ypač naudinga nuliniam mokymuisi, palyginti su vizualių objektų tiesiai į paskirstymo erdvę projektavimu. Įprastoje objekto pavadinimo užduotyje nustatome, kad skirtingi būdai derinti lexinę ir vizualinę informaciją užtikrina labai panašius rezultatus, nors modelio derinio eksperimentai rodo, kad jie apima papildomus referencinės reikšmės aspektus.', 'it': "Investighiamo il nome di oggetti, che è un importante sottocompito di riferimento della generazione di espressioni sulle immagini del mondo reale. A differenza delle etichette reciprocamente esclusive utilizzate nel riconoscimento degli oggetti, i nomi degli oggetti sono più flessibili, soggetti a preferenze comunicative e semanticamente correlati tra loro. Pertanto, esaminiamo modelli di parola referenziale che collegano le informazioni visive a quelle lessicali che presumiamo siano fornite attraverso incorporazioni distributive di parole. Presentiamo un modello che apprende i singoli predittori per i nomi di oggetti che collegano aspetti visivi e distributivi del significato delle parole durante l'allenamento. Mostriamo che questo è particolarmente utile per l'apprendimento zero-shot, rispetto alla proiezione di oggetti visivi direttamente nello spazio distributivo. In un compito standard di denominazione di oggetti, troviamo che diversi modi di combinare informazioni lessicali e visive raggiungono prestazioni molto simili, anche se gli esperimenti sulla combinazione di modelli suggeriscono che catturano aspetti complementari del significato referenziale.", 'kk': 'Біз нысандардың атауын зерттеп, бұл шын әлемдегі кескіндерде өрнегі құру үшін маңызды ішкі тапсырма. Нысанды анықтау үшін қолданылатын жарлықтардың бір-біріне қарсы, нысандардың атаулары бір-біріне байланысты параметрлер мен semantiкалық жарлықтарына қарсы болады. Сондықтан, біз референциялық сөздің үлгілерін зерттеп тұрамыз, бұл үлгілер үлгілерін дистрибуттық сөздерді ендіру арқылы көрінетін лексикалық мәліметтерге сілтемеледі Біз тіркелген таңдау үлгісін көрсету мен тарату үлгісін көрсету үлгісін таңдаймыз. Көрініс нысандарды директивті тарату орынға салыстыру үшін, бұл нөл түрлі оқыту үшін пайдалы екенін көрсетеді. Стандартты нысандарды атау тапсырмасында, лексикалық және визуалдық мәліметтерді біріктіру әртүрлі түрлері ұқсас істейді, бірақ үлгі біріктіру тәжірибесінде тәжірибелері референциялық мәлімет', 'mk': 'Истражуваме именуваое на објекти, што е важна подзадача да се посочи генерација на изрази на слики од реалниот свет. Во спротивност на взаемно ексклузивните етикети кои се користат за признавање на објекти, имињата на објектите се пофлексибилни, под предмет на комуникациските преференции и семантично поврзани меѓусебно. Затоа, ги истражуваме моделите на референцијалниот збор кои значат дека врзуваат визуелни со лексични информации кои претпоставуваме дека се дадени преку дистрибуционални зборови вградени. Презентираме модел кој научи индивидуални предвидувачи за имиња на објекти кои поврзуваат визуелни и дистрибуционални аспекти на зборот значење за време на обуката. Ние покажуваме дека ова е особено корисно за нуларно учење, во споредба со проектирање визуелни објекти директно во дистрибутивниот простор. Во стандардната задача за именување на објекти, откриваме дека различните начини на комбинација на лексикални и визуелни информации достигнуваат многу слични резултати, иако експериментите на комбинација на модели покажуваат дека тие заземаат комплементарни аспекти на', 'ms': 'Kami menyelidiki nama objek, yang merupakan sub-tugas penting untuk merujuk generasi ungkapan pada imej dunia nyata. Daripada label eksklusif yang digunakan dalam pengenalan objek, nama objek lebih fleksibel, subjek keutamaan komunikatif dan berkaitan semantik dengan satu sama lain. Oleh itu, kita menyelidiki model perkataan referensi yang bermakna pautan visual kepada maklumat leksikal yang kita anggap diberikan melalui penyebaran perkataan. We present a model that learns individual predictors for object names that link visual and distributional aspects of word meaning during training.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa ini sangat berguna untuk pembelajaran 0-shot, dibandingkan dengan projek objek visual langsung ke ruang distribusi. Dalam tugas nama objek piawai, kami dapati cara yang berbeza untuk menggabungkan maklumat leksikal dan visual mencapai prestasi yang sama, walaupun eksperimen pada kombinasi model menunjukkan bahawa mereka menangkap aspek komplementari makna referensi.', 'mt': 'Aħna ninvestigaw l-isem tal-oġġetti, li huwa sottokompitu importanti li tirreferi l-ġenerazzjoni tal-espressjoni fuq immaġni tad-dinja reali. Għall-kuntrarju tat-tikketti reċiprokament esklużivi użati fir-rikonoxximent tal-oġġetti, l-ismijiet tal-oġġetti huma aktar flessibbli, soġġetti għal preferenzi komunikattivi u relatati semantikament ma’ xulxin. Għalhekk, ninvestigaw mudelli ta’ kliem referenzjali li jfisser li jorbtu informazzjoni viżwali ma’ informazzjoni lexikali li tassumi li tingħata permezz ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem distribuzzjonali. Aħna nippreżentaw mudell li jitgħallem predikaturi individwali għall-ismijiet tal-oġġetti li jgħaqqdu l-aspetti viżivi u distributtivi tat-tifsira tal-kelma matul it-taħriġ. Aħna nuru li dan huwa partikolarment ta’ benefiċċju għat-tagħlim mingħajr skop, meta mqabbel mal-projezzjoni ta’ oġġetti viżivi direttament fl-ispazju ta’ distribuzzjoni. F’kompitu standard ta’ l-isem ta’ oġġett, isibu li modi differenti ta’ kombinazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni lexika u viżwali jiksbu prestazzjoni simili ħafna, għalkemm l-esperimenti fuq kombinazzjoni ta’ mudell jissuġġerixxu li dawn jaqbdu aspetti kumplimentari ta’ tifsira referenzjali.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker objektnamnet, som er ein viktig underoppgåve for å referera uttrykk på verkelege bilete. I motsetjing til mutuelt eksklusiv merkelapp brukt i objektgjenkjenning, er objektnamn fleksibel, subject to communicative preferences and semantically related to each other. Det er derfor vi undersøker modeller av referansielle ord som betyr at lenkjer visual til leksiske informasjon som vi antar å verta gitt gjennom distribusjonelle ordinnbygging. Vi presenterer eit modell som lærer individuelle forhåndsvisingar for objektnamn som lenkjer visuelle og distribusjonelle aspektar av ord som betyr ved opplæring. Vi viser at dette er spesielt nyttig for læring av null-bilete, sammenlignet med å prosjektera visuelle objekt direkte i distribusjonsplassen. I eit standard objekt med namn på oppgåve finn vi at forskjellige måtar å kombinere leksiske og visuelle informasjon gjer veldig liknande utviklingar, men eksperimenter på modellekombinasjonen tyder på at dei hentar komplementare aspektar av referansielle mening.', 'ro': 'Investigăm denumirea obiectelor, care este o subsarcină importantă a trimiterii generației expresiei pe imaginile din lumea reală. Spre deosebire de etichetele reciproc exclusive utilizate în recunoașterea obiectelor, numele obiectelor sunt mai flexibile, supuse preferințelor comunicative și legate semantic unul cu celălalt. Prin urmare, investigăm modele de cuvânt referenţial care leagă informaţia vizuală de informaţia lexicală, pe care presupunem că o dăm prin încorporarea distribuţională a cuvintelor. Prezentăm un model care învață predictori individuali pentru numele obiectelor care leagă aspectele vizuale și distribuționale ale semnificației cuvintelor în timpul antrenamentului. Arătăm că acest lucru este deosebit de benefic pentru învățarea zero-shot, în comparație cu proiectarea obiectelor vizuale direct în spațiul distribuțional. Într-o sarcină standard de denumire a obiectelor, constatăm că diferitele modalități de combinare a informațiilor lexicale și vizuale obțin performanțe foarte similare, deși experimentele privind combinațiile de modele sugerează că acestea capturează aspecte complementare ale semnificației referențiale.', 'mn': 'Бид объектийн нэр гэдгийг судалж байна. Энэ бол бодит ертөнцийн зураг дээр илэрхийллийн бичлэгийг илэрхийлэх чухал суб-даалгавар юм. Объектын танихдаа ашиглаж буй хамтран ялгаатай тэмдэглэлүүдийн эсрэг, объектын нэр нь илүү урсгалттай, харилцааны сонголтууд болон semantic холбоотой байдаг. Тиймээс бид үнэлгээний үгийн загварыг судалж байна. Энэ нь бидний бодит мэдээллийг хуваарилуулах үгийг нэмэгдүүлэхээр холбоотой. Бид өөрсдийн тодорхойлогчдыг суралцах үед харагдах, хуваарлах хэмжээсүүдийг холбоотой объектын нэрлүүдийн хувьд суралцах загварыг үзүүлнэ. Бид үүнийг шууд тархалтын орон зайд харьцуулахтай харьцуулахад үүнийг нууц зураг суралцах хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Стандарт объектийн нэрлэх үйл ажил дээр бид лексикийн болон харааны мэдээллийг нэгтгэх өөр арга зам нь ижил төстэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Гэхдээ загварын нэгтгэх туршилтууд тэдний нэмэлт хэмжээний нэмэлт хэмжээсүүдийг нь', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പേര് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ചിത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക് വസ്തുത തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരസ്പരം പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ലേബുകളുടെ വിരോധമാണ്, വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പേരുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഫ്ലാക അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന രേഖ വാക്കുകളുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുട നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം കാഴ്ചയും വിഭാഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപകാരമാണെന്നാണ്, നേരെ വിതരണ സ്ഥലത്തേക്ക് കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d പ് ഒരു സാധാരണ വസ്തുവിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d, ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം പ്രാപിക', 'pl': 'Badamy nazwy obiektów, które są ważnym podzadaniem generowania wyrażeń na obrazach rzeczywistych. W przeciwieństwie do wzajemnie wykluczających się etykiet stosowanych w rozpoznawaniu obiektów, nazwy obiektów są bardziej elastyczne, podlegające preferencjom komunikacyjnym i semantycznie ze sobą powiązane. W związku z tym badamy modele słowa referencyjnego, które łączą wizualne z informacjami leksykalnymi, które zakładamy, że są podane poprzez osadzenia słów dystrybucyjnych. Przedstawiamy model, który uczy się indywidualnych predyktorów nazw obiektów łączących wizualne i dystrybucyjne aspekty znaczenia słowa podczas treningu. Pokazujemy, że jest to szczególnie korzystne dla uczenia się zero-shot, w porównaniu z projekcją obiektów wizualnych bezpośrednio w przestrzeń dystrybucyjną. W standardowym zadaniu nazywania obiektów odkrywamy, że różne sposoby łączenia informacji leksykalnych i wizualnych osiągają bardzo podobną wydajność, choć eksperymenty na kombinacji modeli sugerują, że uwzględniają one komplementarne aspekty znaczenia referencyjnego.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker objektnamngivning, vilket är en viktig underuppgift för att hänvisa uttryck generation på verkliga bilder. Till skillnad från ömsesidigt uteslutande etiketter som används vid objektigenkänning är objektnamn mer flexibla, föremål för kommunikativa preferenser och semantiskt relaterade till varandra. Därför undersöker vi modeller av referensord som länkar visuell till lexikal information som vi antar ges genom distributionella ordinbäddningar. Vi presenterar en modell som lär sig individuella prediktorer för objektnamn som länkar visuella och distributiva aspekter av ordmening under träning. Vi visar att detta är särskilt fördelaktigt för noll-skott lärande, jämfört med att projicera visuella objekt direkt i distributionsrummet. I en vanlig objektnamnsuppgift finner vi att olika sätt att kombinera lexikal och visuell information uppnår mycket liknande prestanda, även om experiment på modellkombinationer tyder på att de fångar kompletterande aspekter av referensmässig mening.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo imenovanje objekata, što je važan podzadatak da se odnosi na generaciju izraza na slike realnog svijeta. Za suprotnost međusobno ekskluzivnim etiketama koje se koriste u priznanju objekata, imena objekata su fleksibilniji, pod uslovom komunikacijskih preferencija i semantički povezanih jedni sa drugima. Stoga istražujemo modele referencijske reči koja znači da povezuje vizualnu vezu sa leksičkim informacijama koje pretpostavljamo da će se dati kroz distribucijske reči. Predstavljamo model koji uči individualne predviđatelje za imena objekata koji povezuju vizuelne i distribucionalne aspekte riječi značenja tokom treninga. Pokazujemo da je ovo posebno korisno za učenje od nule pucnjave, u usporedbi sa projekcijom vizuelnih objekata direktno u distribucijski prostor. U standardnom zadatku imenovanja objekata, nalazimo se da različiti načini kombinacije leksičkih i vizualnih informacija postignu veoma slične funkcije, iako eksperimenti na kombinaciji model a sugeriraju da uhvate komplementarne aspekte referencijskog značenja.', 'si': 'අපි පිළිබඳ නාමක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒක ඇත්ත ලෝක පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ලේබල් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නම් තරම් විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන්, සම් ඉතින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණ වචනයේ මොඩල් වචනයේ අදහස් කරනවා කියලා අපි හිතන්නේ විශේෂ වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහ අපි පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේක විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්නේ ශූන්ය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජ ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරකාරයක් නම් කාර්ය, අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ලෙක්සිකල් සහ දර්ශන තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා, ඒත් ම', 'so': 'Waxaynu baaraynaa macluumaadka magaca, taas oo ah maamul muhiim ah oo lagu sheego qarniga expression ku qoran sawirada dunida ee dhabta ah. Si ka gees ah oo ka gees ah calaamada aqoonsiga alaabta islamarkaasna la isticmaalay, magacyada wax lagu aqoonsado waa ka sii flexilsan yihiin, waxaa laga yaabaa doorashooyin la xiriira islamarkaasna la xiriira midba midka kale. Sidaa darteed waxaynu baaraynaa tusaalaha ereyga reference ee micnaheedu waa in lagu xiriiraa macluumaadka leksikada ee aan u malaynayno in lagu siiyo hadalka qaybsan. Tusaale ah oo baranaya qof gaar ah magacyada wax lagu sheego oo ku xiriira dhinacyada muuqashada iyo kala qaybsan waxyaabaha hadalka marka lagu baranayo. We show that this is particularly beneficial for zero-shot learning, as compared to projecting visual objects directly into the distributional space.  Shaqada caadiga ah ee la magacaabay waxaynu ka helaynaa in qaab kala duduwan oo la isku daro macluumaadka la xiriira lexicka iyo aragga ay gaadhaan farxad la mid ah, in kastoo imtixaanka muusikada lagu sameeyo muusikada waxaa looga jeedaa in ay qabsadaan qaybaha ku saabsan waxyaabaha la jeedo.', 'ur': 'ہم اُبوٹک نام کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جو واقعی دنیا کی تصاویروں پر مثالیں پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک اہم زیب تابع ہے. ایک دوسرے کے علاوہ ایک دوسرے کے خالص لابلوں کے مقابلہ میں جسم کی شناسایی میں استعمال کی جاتی ہے، object وں کا نام زیادہ ہلکا ہوتا ہے، آپس میں ایک دوسرے کے معاملہ میں رابطہ کرنے والی ترجیح کے مطابق اور ایک دوسرے کے سات لہٰذا، ہم نے سرگوشی لفظ کی مدلکوں کی تحقیق کی جو مطلب یہ ہے کہ لفظ کی معلومات کے ذریعہ بینائل لینکسی لینکسی لینکسی لینکسی لینکسی لینکسی کرتی ہے جسے ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ تقسی ہم ایک موڈل کو پیش آتے ہیں جو ایک شخصی پیش آگاہ کرنے والوں کو آگاہ کرتا ہے جو کلمات کی تعلیم کے وقت تصویر اور تقسیم الگوں کی نسبت کرتی ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم کے لئے مخصوصا فائدہ ہے، جیسا کہ visual objects projecting directly into the distribution space. ایک استاندارڈ اتوبیٹ کے نام کا تابع میں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ لکسیکل اور بصیرت معلومات کی مختلف طریقوں میں بہت برابر عمل حاصل کرتی ہیں، اگرچہ موڈل اتوبیٹ کے آزمائش کی آزمائش یہ بات کرتی ہے کہ انہوں نے نسبت کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کی تعبی', 'ta': 'நாம் பொருளின் பெயரை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், அது உண்மையான உலக உருவங்களில் கூற்று உருவாக்கத்தை குறிப்பிடு பொருள் அடையாளத்தில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் தனிப்பட்ட சிட்டைகளுக்கு எதிராக, பொருள் பெயர்கள் மிகவும் flexible, தொடர்பு முன்னுரிமைகள் மற அதனால், நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தையின் மாதிரிகளை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் என்றால் லெக்சியல் தகவலுக்கு இணைப்பு என்று தெர நாம் ஒரு மாதிரி கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் பொருள் பெயர்களுக்கு தனிப்பட்ட முன்காட்சிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம் பயிற்சி பூஜ்ஜியத்தை கற்றுக்கு இது முக்கியமாக பயனுள்ளது என்று நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம், பார்வையுடைய பொருட்களை நேரடியாக பங்கீட In a standard object naming task, we find that different ways of combining lexical and visual information achieve very similar performance, though experiments on model combination suggest that they capture complementary aspects of referential meaning.', 'uz': "Biz obʼekt nomini qidirishimiz, bu haqiqiqiy dunyo rasmlaridagi ifodalarning bir muhim tub vazifa. Obʼektlarni aniqlash uchun boshqa tugmalar tartibi boʻyicha, obʼekt nomlari eng fleksibligi, aloqa parametrlar va birлари bilan bogʻliq boʻlgan. Шундай қилиб, биз фойдаланадиган сўзнинг манфаатларини кўриб чиқамиз, leksik маълумотларга bog'lash mumkin, деб ўйлаймиз. Biz bir modelni o'rganamiz, obʼekt nomlari uchun bir necha prediktlar o'rganadi. Bu so'zlar taʼminlovchi soʻzning ko'rinishi va tarqatish qismlarini bogʻlash mumkin. Biz bu narsalarni o'rganish uchun juda foydali, ko'rinish obʼektlarini o'zgartirib tasavvur qilishdan ham ishlatish mumkin. Andoza obʼekt nomli vazifani o'ylab, biz leksikal va ko'zlik maʼlumotini birlashtirish uchun boshqa usullarni ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Chunki model kombinatsiyani taʼminlovchi tizimlar esa ularni qo'shimcha ma'nosini qabul qilishini anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi điều tra tên đối tượng, một công việc phụ quan trọng là ám chỉ thế hệ biểu thức trên ảnh thế giới thực. Thay vì dùng nhãn độc đối với nhau trong việc nhận dạng đối tượng, các tên đối tượng có thể mềm dẻo hơn, tùy thuộc vào quan điểm giao tiếp và ngữ pháp liên kết với nhau. Do đó, chúng tôi điều tra các mô hình từ liên tục, nghĩa là kết nối hình ảnh với các thông tin văn bản mà chúng tôi cho rằng được cung cấp qua sự nhúng vào từ phân phát. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình học dự đoán cá nhân về tên vật thể liên kết các khía cạnh hình ảnh và phân phát của từ có nghĩa trong khi tập luyện. Chúng tôi cho thấy điều này đặc biệt có lợi cho việc học không bắn, so với việc chiếu trực tiếp các vật thể trực tiếp vào phân phối. Trong một nhiệm vụ đặt tên đối tượng tiêu chuẩn, chúng tôi tìm thấy các cách khác nhau để kết hợp các thông tin ngôn ngữ văn học và hình ảnh đạt hiệu quả rất giống nhau, mặc dù các thí nghiệm trên mô hình kết hợp cho thấy chúng thu thập các khía cạnh bổ sung của ý nghĩa dị tật.', 'bg': 'Изследваме наименованието на обекти, което е важна подзадача за позоваване на генериране на изрази върху реални изображения. За разлика от взаимно изключващите се етикети, използвани в разпознаването на обекти, имената на обекти са по-гъвкави, подлежат на комуникативни предпочитания и семантично свързани помежду си. Затова изследваме модели на референтно значение на думата, които свързват визуалната с лексикалната информация, която предполагаме, че е дадена чрез дистрибуционно вграждане на думи. Представяме модел, който изучава индивидуални предсказатели за имена на обекти, които свързват визуални и разпределителни аспекти на значението на думата по време на обучение. Показваме, че това е особено полезно за нулево обучение в сравнение с прожектирането на визуални обекти директно в разпределителното пространство. При стандартна задача за назоваване на обекти откриваме, че различните начини за комбиниране на лексикална и визуална информация постигат много сходни резултати, въпреки че експериментите с моделна комбинация предполагат, че те улавят допълващи се аспекти на референтното значение.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo imenovanje objekata, što je važan podzadatak navedenja generacije izraza na slike stvarnog svijeta. Za suprotnost međusobno ekskluzivnim etiketama korištenim u priznanju objekata, imena objekata su fleksibilniji, pod uslovom komunikacijskih preferencija i semantički povezanih jedni s drugima. Stoga istražujemo modele referencijskih riječi koje znači povezati vizualnu vezu sa leksičkim informacijama koje smatramo dati kroz distribucijske riječi. Predstavljamo model koji uči individualne predviđa če imena objekata koji povezuju vizuelne i distribucionalne aspekte riječi značenja tijekom obuke. Pokazujemo da je to posebno korisno za učenje nula pucnjava u usporedbi s projekcijom vizuelnih objekata direktno u distribucijski prostor. U standardnom zadatku imenovanja objekata, nalazimo se da različiti načini kombinacije leksičkih i vizualnih informacija postignu vrlo slične funkcije, iako eksperimenti na kombinaciji model a ukazuju na to da uključuju komplementne aspekte referencijskog značenja.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger objektnavngivning, som er en vigtig underopgave for at henvise udtryksgenerering på virkelige billeder. I modsætning til gensidigt udelukkende etiketter, der anvendes i objektgenkendelse, er objektnavne mere fleksible, underlagt kommunikative præferencer og semantisk relateret til hinanden. Derfor undersøger vi modeller af referential word betydning, der linker visuel til leksikal information, som vi antager at være givet gennem distributionsmæssige ordindlejringer. Vi præsenterer en model, der lærer individuelle forudsigere for objektnavne, der forbinder visuelle og fordelingsmæssige aspekter af ordbetydning under træning. Vi viser, at dette er særligt gavnligt for nul-shot læring, sammenlignet med at projicere visuelle objekter direkte ind i distributionsrummet. I en standard objektnavngivningsopgave opdager vi, at forskellige måder at kombinere leksikal og visuel information opnår meget ens ydeevne, selvom eksperimenter med modelkombination tyder på, at de fanger komplementære aspekter af referentiel betydning.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Objektbenennung, die eine wichtige Teilaufgabe der Verweisung von Ausdrücken auf reale Bilder ist. Im Gegensatz zu sich ausschließenden Labels, die in der Objekterkennung verwendet werden, sind Objektnamen flexibler, unterliegen kommunikativen Präferenzen und sind semantisch miteinander in Beziehung gesetzt. Daher untersuchen wir Modelle der referenziellen Wortbedeutung, die visuelle mit lexikalischen Informationen verknüpfen, die wir durch verteilte Worteinbettungen annehmen. Wir präsentieren ein Modell, das individuelle Prädiktoren für Objektnamen lernt, die visuelle und verteilte Aspekte der Wortbedeutung während des Trainings verknüpfen. Wir zeigen, dass dies im Vergleich zur Projektion visueller Objekte direkt in den Verteilungsraum besonders vorteilhaft für Zero-Shot-Lernen ist. In einer Standardaufgabe zur Objektbenennung stellen wir fest, dass verschiedene Methoden der Kombination lexikalischer und visueller Informationen eine sehr ähnliche Leistung erzielen, obwohl Experimente mit Modellkombinationen darauf hindeuten, dass sie komplementäre Aspekte der referenziellen Bedeutung erfassen.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki nama objek, yang merupakan sub-tugas penting untuk merujuk generasi ekspresi pada gambar dunia nyata. Berbeda dengan label eksklusif satu sama lain yang digunakan dalam pengenalan objek, nama objek lebih fleksibel, subjek keutamaan komunikatif dan secara semantis berhubungan satu sama lain. Oleh karena itu, kami menyelidiki model kata referensi yang berarti bahwa menghubungkan visual dengan informasi leksikal yang kami anggap diberikan melalui penerbangan kata distribusi. We present a model that learns individual predictors for object names that link visual and distributional aspects of word meaning during training.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa hal ini sangat berguna untuk belajar tanpa tembakan, dibandingkan dengan proyeksi objek visual langsung ke ruang distribusi. Dalam tugas nama objek standar, kami menemukan bahwa cara yang berbeda untuk menggabungkan informasi lexik dan visual mencapai prestasi yang sangat mirip, meskipun eksperimen pada kombinasi model menunjukkan bahwa mereka menangkap aspek komplementari dari arti referensi.', 'ko': '우리 연구 대상의 명칭은 중요한 하위 임무의 인용 표현이 현실 세계에서 생성된 이미지이다.물체 식별에 사용되는 서로 배척하는 라벨과 달리 물체의 명칭은 더욱 유연하고 교제 선호의 영향을 받으며 의미적으로 서로 관련된다.따라서 우리는 시각적 정보와 어휘 정보를 연결하는 지칭어의 모델을 연구했고 이러한 정보는 분포어를 통해 삽입되어 제공된다고 가정했다.우리는 이 모델 학습 대상 명칭의 개체 예측 인자를 제시했는데 이런 예측 인자는 훈련 과정에서 의미의 시각과 분포 방면을 연결시켰다.우리는 시각 대상을 분포 공간에 직접 투사하는 것보다 제로 렌즈 학습에 특히 유리하다는 것을 보여준다.하나의 표준적인 대상 명명 임무에서 우리는 어휘와 시각적 정보를 결합하는 서로 다른 방식이 매우 비슷한 성능을 얻었다는 것을 발견했다. 비록 모델 조합의 실험은 그들이 지칭적 의미의 상호 보완 방면을 포착했음에도 불구하고.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu kitu kinachoitwa, ambacho ni jukumu muhimu la kutangaza kizazi cha kujieleza katika picha za kweli duniani. Tofauti na maabara pekee yanayotumiwa katika kutambua vitu, majina ya vitu vinginevyo vizuri zaidi, na vinatolewa vipaumbele vya mawasiliano na kwa kiasi kikubwa yanayohusiana nayo. Kwa hiyo, tunachunguza mifano ya neno la kutangaza maana kwamba unaunganisha visivyo na taarifa za lexico ambazo tunadhani inatupwa kwa njia ya ujumbe wa usambazaji. Tunawasilisha mtindo ambao unajifunza watabiri binafsi kwa majina ya vitu ambavyo huunganisha vipengele vya kuona na usambazaji wa maana ya neno wakati wa mafunzo. Tunaonyesha kuwa hii ina faida kwa kujifunza kwa sifa, kama ilivyolinganisha na kuandaa vitu vya kuona moja kwa moja kwenye nafasi ya usambazaji. Katika kibiashara cha kawaida kinachoitwa jina, tunagundua kuwa njia tofauti za kuunganisha taarifa za lexico na kuona zinafanana na utendaji huo, ingawa majaribio kwenye muungano wa model yanaonyesha kuwa wanachukua vipande fulani vya maana ya maoni.', 'tr': 'Biz zadyň adyny barlap çykarýarys. Bu örän möhüm sub-zady çykarýan surat dünýäde suratlar barada çykarýan. zady tanamada ulanylan meňzeş etiketleriň garşy bilen, zadyň adlary has gowy fleksibdir, nusga tercihleri we semantik bir-birleri bilen baglanýarlar. Şol sebäpli biz Referanslar sözleriniň nusgalaryny çykarýarys, bölüm sözleriniň daňlap görkezilýän leksiýaly maglumatlara baglaýarys diýip pikir edýän. Biz zadyň adyny görsel we daýratyn suratlaryny çarpyş wagtynda bir nusga öwredýäris. Görsel zadlary daýlamak üçin bu işiň ýüzüne bir faydalydygyny görkezýäris. Standart zadyň adyny taýýarlamak üçin, leksiýal we görsel maglumatlary birleştirmek üçin farklı ýoly çykaryp barýar. Model kombinatsiyasynda test edip referensiýaly wajyplaryň täzeliklerini taýýarlandygyny düşünýäris.', 'fa': 'ما به نام اشیاء تحقیق می کنیم، که یک کار زیر مهم است که نسل اشیاء را بر تصاویر جهانی واقعی ارائه می دهد. در مقابل برچسب\u200cهای مختلف با هم استفاده می\u200cشود در شناسایی جسم، نام\u200cهای جسم\u200cها بیش flexible\u200cتر هستند، در مقابل برچسب\u200cهای ارتباطی و نسبت به همدیگر به semantically ارتباط دارند. بنابراین، ما مدل\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای منظوری را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که به اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی ارتباط می\u200cدهد که ما تصور می\u200cکنیم از طریق ارتباط کلمه\u200cهای منظوری داده شود. ما یک مدل را نشان می دهیم که پیش بینی\u200cکننده\u200cهای فردی را برای نام\u200cهای شیء یاد می\u200cگیرد که نقطه\u200cهای دیده\u200cای و تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cای از کلمات معنی در طول تمرین ارتباط می\u200cدهد. ما نشان می دهیم که این ویژه برای یادگیری صفر فشار سودمندانه است، در مقایسه با پروژه\u200cسازی اشیاء دیده مستقیم به فضای تقسیم. در یک کار نام شیء استاندارد، ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که راه\u200cهای متفاوتی از ترکیب اطلاعات زبانی و دیده\u200cای بسیار مشابه می\u200cشوند، اگرچه آزمایش\u200cها در ترکیب مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که آن\u200cها نسبت\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای از معنی تفصیل را گرفتند.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek voorwerp naam, wat is 'n belangrike subtaak van verwysing uitdrukking generasie op reël- wêreld beelde. Soos teen mekaar eksklusiewe etikette gebruik word in voorwerp herken, is objekte name meer fleksibel, onderwerp na kommunikasiewe voorkeure en semantiese verwante met mekaar. Daarom, ons ondersoek modele van verwysing woord beteken dat skakel visuele na leksiese inligting wat ons aanvaar om deur verspreidingswoord inbettings gegee te word. Ons stel 'n model wat individuele voorskouers leer vir voorwerp name wat visuale en verspreidingse aspekte van woord beteken tydens onderwerp skakel. Ons wys dat dit besonderlik nuttig is vir zero-skoot leer, as vergelyk met die projeksie van visuele objekte direk in die verspreidingsruimte. In 'n standaard voorwerp met die naam van taak, vind ons dat verskillende maniere van die kombinasie van leksiese en visuele inligting baie gelykbaar effektuur bereik, alhoewel eksperimente op model kombinasie voorstel dat hulle komplementare aspekte van verwysing beteken opneem.", 'nl': 'We onderzoeken objectnaamgeving, een belangrijke deeltaak van het doorverwijzen van expressie generatie op echte beelden. In tegenstelling tot elkaar uitsluitende labels die worden gebruikt bij objectherkenning, zijn objectnamen flexibeler, afhankelijk van communicatieve voorkeuren en semantisch met elkaar verbonden. Daarom onderzoeken we modellen van referentiële woordbetekenis die visuele aan lexicale informatie koppelen waarvan we aannemen dat deze wordt gegeven door middel van distributionele woordinsluitingen. We presenteren een model dat individuele voorspellers leert voor objectnamen die visuele en distributionele aspecten van woordbetekenis koppelen tijdens de training. We laten zien dat dit vooral gunstig is voor zero-shot learning, in vergelijking met het projecteren van visuele objecten rechtstreeks in de distributieruimte. In een standaard object nameing taak, vinden we dat verschillende manieren om lexicale en visuele informatie te combineren zeer vergelijkbare prestaties bereiken, hoewel experimenten met modelcombinatie suggereren dat ze complementaire aspecten van referentiele betekenis vastleggen.', 'sq': 'Ne hetojmë emërimin e objekteve, që është një nëndetyrë e rëndësishme për të referuar gjeneratën e shprehjeve në imazhet e botës reale. Në kundërshtim me etiketat përjashtuese të përdorura në njohjen e objekteve, emrat e objekteve janë më fleksible, subjekt i preferimeve komunikuese dhe lidhur semantikisht me njëri-tjetrin. Therefore, we investigate models of referential word meaning that link visual to lexical information which we assume to be given through distributional word embeddings.  Ne paraqesim një model që mëson parashikues individuale për emrat e objekteve që lidhin aspektet vizuale dhe shpërndarëse të kuptimit të fjalës gjatë trajnimit. Ne tregojmë se kjo është veçanërisht e dobishme për mësimin zero-shot, krahasuar me projektimin e objekteve vizuale drejtpërdrejt në hapësirën shpërndarëse. In a standard object naming task, we find that different ways of combining lexical and visual information achieve very similar performance, though experiments on model combination suggest that they capture complementary aspects of referential meaning.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք օբյեկտների անունները, որոնք իրական աշխարհի նկարների վրա արտահայտության սերունդը վերաբերելու կարևոր ենթախնդիր են: Ի հակադրություն օբյեկտների ճանաչման համար օգտագործվող միմյանց բացառիկ պիտակներին, օբյեկտների անունները ավելի ճկուն են, ենթարկվում են հաղորդակցման նախընտրություններին և սեմանտիկապես կապված միմյանց հետ: Therefore, we investigate models of referential word meaning that link visual to lexical information which we assume to be given through distributional word embeddings.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոդել, որը սովորում է առանձին կանխատեսողներ օբյեկտների անունների համար, որոնք կապում են բառի իմաստի տեսողական և տարածական ասպեկտները վարժեքի ընթացքում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սա հատկապես օգտակար է զրոյի ուսումնասիրության համար, համեմատած վիզուալ օբյեկտների պրոյեկցիայի հետ ուղղակի դիսպրոյեկցիոն տարածքում: Ստանդարտ օբյեկտի անվանելու խնդրում մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ լեքսիկական և վիզուալ ինֆորմացիայի համադրման տարբեր ձևերը հասնում են շատ նման արդյունք, չնայած, որ մոդելի համադրման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ դրանք ներառում են հանրային ի', 'am': 'አካባቢውን ስም እናመረምር፣ ይህ አካባቢ የዓለም ምስሎች የሙሉ ትውልድ ትውልድ ማሳሳያ ነው፡፡ በአካባቢው ማውቀት በተለየ የተለየ ምልክቶች በተቃወመ፣ የአካባቢው ስም አብልጦ አካባቢ ነው፣ የግንኙነት ምርጫዎች እና እርስ በርሳቸው በተለየ ግንኙነት ይታሰራሉ፡፡ ስለዚህ፣ የህዝብ ቃላት ምሳሌዎችን ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአካባቢው ስም የሚጠይቁ የቃላትን ራእይ እና የክፍል ክፍሎች በሚያስተምሩ ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ ለ0-ፎቶ ትምህርት የሚጠቅመው ነው፡፡ በተለያዩ አካባቢ ስራ ላይ የተባለው የሌክሲካዊ እና የራእይ መረጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል የሚደረገውን እንደገና እናገኛለን፤ ምንም እንኳ በሞዴል ማሰናከል ፈተናዎች የሕዝባዊ አካላዊ ጉዳይ እንዲያሳስቡ የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'bs': 'Istražujemo imenovanje objekata, što je važan podzadatak da se odnosi na generaciju izraza na slike realnog svijeta. Za suprotnost međusobno ekskluzivnim etiketama koje se koriste u priznanju objekata, imena objekata su fleksibilnije, pod uslovom komunikacijskih preferencija i semantički povezanih jedni sa drugima. Stoga istražujemo modele referencijske riječi koje znači da povezuje vizualnu vezu sa leksičkim informacijama koje pretpostavljamo da će se dati kroz distribucijske riječi. Predstavljamo model koji uči individualne predvidače za imena objekata koji povezuju vizuelne i distribucionalne aspekte riječi značenja tijekom treninga. Pokazujemo da je to posebno korisno za učenje nula pucnjava, u usporedbi s projekcijom vizuelnih objekata direktno u distribucijski prostor. U standardnom zadatku imenovanja objekata, smatramo da različiti načini kombinacije leksičkih i vizualnih informacija postignu veoma slične funkcije, iako eksperimenti na kombinaciji model a sugeriraju da uhvate komplementne aspekte referencijskog značenja.', 'bn': 'আমরা বস্তুর নাম অনুসন্ধান করি, যা প্রকৃত প্রজন্মের বাস্তব প্রজন্মের কথা উল্লেখ করার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সাব-কাজ। বস্তুকে স্বীকৃতির জন্য ব্যবহার করা একেবারে একেবারে বিশেষ লেবেলের বিপরীত, বস্তুর নাম বেশী flexible, যোগাযোগের পছন্দ এবং একে অপরের সা তাই আমরা গণনাল শব্দের মডেল অনুসন্ধান করি যার অর্থ হচ্ছে যে লেক্সিক্যাল তথ্যের সাথে লিঙ্ক দেখা যাচ্ছে যা আমরা ধারণা করছি বিতরণে আমরা একটি মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা বস্তুর নামের ব্যক্তিগত ভবিষ্যদ্বাণীকে শিক্ষা দেয় যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় শব্দের দৃশ্য এবং বিতরণ We show that this is particularly beneficial for zero-shot learning, as compared to projecting visual objects directly into the distributional space.  একটি স্থান্ডার্ড অবজেক্টের নাম নামে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে লেক্সিক্যাল এবং দৃশ্য তথ্য যুক্ত করার বিভিন্ন উপায় খুব একই ধরনের প্রভাব অর্জন করে, যদিও মডেল কমিউন', 'az': 'Biz objektu ismarını incidirik, bu, həqiqət dünya görüntülərində ifadə etmək üçün vacib bir sub-task. Objekt tanımasında istifadə edilən müxtəlif etiketlərə qarşı objektlər adları daha fleksibildir, elçi seçimləri və semantik olaraq bir-birinə ilişkilər istifadə edirlər. Beləliklə, biz səviyyətli sözlərin modellərini araşdırırıq ki, bizim iddia etdiyimiz leksik məlumatların şəklinə bağlanması lazımdır. Biz təhsil sırasında ifadə edilən sözlərin vizuali və dağıtıcı aspektlərini birləşdirən təhsil adlarını öyrənən bir modeli göstəririk. Biz göstəririk ki, bu səfərə sıfır-shot öyrənməsi üçün faydalıdır. Görüş objekləri müəyyən edilməsi ilə dağıtış alanına qarşı. Standardlı objektın adı çəkilməsi üçün, leksik və göyli məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün müxtəlif yollar çox bənzər performanslıqlarına nail olacaqlarını görürük. Lakin modellərin birləşdirilməsi təcrübələrinin sıxıntılarını sıxıntılıq məlumatının papildu aspektlərini tutma', 'ca': "Investiguem el nom d'objectes, que és una subtasca important de referir la generació d'expressions a imatges del món real. Al contrari de les etiquetes mutuament exclusives que s'utilitzen en el reconeixement d'objectes, els noms d'objectes són més flexibles, subjectes a preferències comunicatives i semànticament relacionats entre ells. Per tant, investigam models de paraula referencial que enllaqueixen la informació visual a la lexical que suposem ser donat a través d'incorporacions de paraules distribucionals. We present a model that learns individual predictors for object names that link visual and distributional aspects of word meaning during training.  Mostrem que això és particularment beneficiós per l'aprenentatge de fotografies zero, comparat amb la projecció d'objectes visuals directament a l'espai de distribució. En una tasca de noms d'objectes estàndard, trobem que diferents maneres de combinar informació lècsica i visual aconsegueixen un desempeny molt similar, encara que experiments en combinació de models suggereixen que capturen aspectes complementars del significat referencial.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme kohteiden nimeämistä, joka on tärkeä osatehtävä viittaamalla ilmaisun syntymiseen reaalimaailman kuvissa. Toisin kuin objektitunnistuksessa käytettävät toisiaan sulkevat tunnisteet, objektinimet ovat joustavampia, kommunikatiivisten mieltymysten alaisia ja semanttisesti toisiinsa liittyviä. Tämän vuoksi tutkimme viitteellisen sanan merkityksen malleja, jotka yhdistävät visuaalisen ja leksikaalisen tiedon, jonka oletamme saaneen jakelusanaupotusten kautta. Esitämme mallin, joka oppii yksittäisiä ennustimia objektinimille, jotka yhdistävät sanan merkityksen visuaaliset ja jakautumisen näkökohdat harjoittelun aikana. Osoitamme, että tämä on erityisen hyödyllistä nollashot-oppimiseen verrattuna visuaalisten objektien projisointiin suoraan jakelutilaan. Tavallisessa objektinimitehtävässä havaitsimme, että eri tavoilla yhdistää leksikaalista ja visuaalista tietoa saavutetaan hyvin samanlainen suorituskyky, vaikka malliyhdistelmäkokeilut viittaavat siihen, että ne kuvaavat viitemerkityksen toisiaan täydentäviä näkökohtia.', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme pojmenování objektů, což je důležitý dílčí úkol referovat generování výrazů na reálných obrazech. Na rozdíl od vzájemně vylučujících štítků používaných při rozpoznávání objektů jsou názvy objektů flexibilnější, podléhají komunikačním preferencím a vzájemně vzájemně vzájemně vztahují. Proto zkoumáme modely referenčního slova významu, které propojují vizuální s lexikálními informacemi, které předpokládáme, že jsou dány prostřednictvím distribučních slov vložení. Představujeme model, který se učí jednotlivé prediktory pro názvy objektů, které propojují vizuální a distribuční aspekty významu slova během tréninku. Ukazujeme, že je to obzvláště výhodné pro nulové učení ve srovnání s promítáním vizuálních objektů přímo do distribučního prostoru. Ve standardní úloze pojmenování objektů zjišťujeme, že různé způsoby kombinace lexikálních a vizuálních informací dosahují velmi podobného výkonu, ačkoli experimenty na kombinaci modelů naznačují, že zachycují doplňkové aspekty referenčního významu.', 'et': 'Uurime objektide nimetamist, mis on oluline allülesanne viidata väljenduse genereerimisele reaalmaailma piltidel. Erinevalt objektituvastuses kasutatavatest vastastikku välistavatest sildistest on objektinimed paindlikumad, suhtluseelistustele vastavad ja omavahel semantiliselt seotud. Seetõttu uurime viitesõna tähenduse mudeleid, mis seovad visuaalse leksikaalse informatsiooniga, mida eeldame olevat antud distributsioonisõna manustamise kaudu. Esitame mudeli, mis õpib individuaalseid prognoose objektinimedele, mis seovad sõna tähenduse visuaalseid ja jaotuslikke aspekte treeningu ajal. Näitame, et see on eriti kasulik null-shot õppe puhul, võrreldes visuaalsete objektide projitseerimisega otse jaotusruumi. Standardse objektinime ülesande puhul leiame, et erinevad leksikaalse ja visuaalse informatsiooni kombineerimise viisid saavutavad väga sarnase jõudluse, kuigi mudelikombinatsiooni katsed näitavad, et need hõlmavad viitetähenduse täiendavaid aspekte.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nyongguna nambah obèh, iki dadi wis nggawe Sub-task kang pisan kelompok oleh nyimpen gambar apa-uwong. tab-style Kaya, awak dhéwé nyukaké model sing rawengan tur dhéwé, merksi ngono nggawe informasi luwih hayo nggawe lan tambah kuwi wis disebarke Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing nêmên ngeremu perbudhakan kanggo nganggo gambaran anyar Awak dhéwé éntuk ngomong nik kabèh nggambar kanggo ngilangno nul-ot, dadi nambah karo ngono nggawe bagian object Visual seneng kabèh basa-basa sing dikarolakan Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing nggambar object, kita luwih-luwih ngerasakno karo pakem nggawe informasi layang lan video kuwi nggawe barang sampeyan luwih apik, tho sapa éntuk mulasakno karo konbungan model sing bisalahan nyebutuha dhéwé ngerasakno karo permaneh sing berarti.', 'ha': "Munã jãyayya abun sunan, wannan yana da muhimu mai bincike wa a gaya kizayen magana a kan zanen-duniya. Fara wa alama masu husu'a cikin sunan abun da aka yi amfani da su, sunayen abun sun fi fleksa, ana sami da zafi da shiryoyin ayuka da kuma masu haɗi da ɗayan. Saboda haka, munã ƙidãya misãlan kalma na Reference, ma'anar cẽwa, za'a haɗa idãnun zuwa ma'luman leksisi da za'a gaura da shi a cikin kalmar da za'a gaura. Tuna gabatar da wani misali wanda yake iya sanar da ɗai masu bashiri wa sunayen abun da ke haɗa sunayen da gane da rarrabẽwa masu fassarar maganar a lokacin da ake amfani da shi. Tuna nũna cewa wannan yana da amfani ga sanar da sifiri, kamar da aka sammeni abubuwa da gannai zuwa filin da ake gauraya. Kuma a cikin wani abu na daidaita sunan abun, munã sãmu, hanyõyi dabam-daban da za'a haɗa information na leksisi da gane, za'a sami aikin mai kama da shi, kuma kõ dã jarrabãwa na komai da misalin misalin ya zaɓi cẽwa, su sami masu kamfata masu cikin ma'anin Reference.", 'sk': 'Raziskujemo poimenovanje objektov, ki je pomembna podnaloga sklicevanja na generiranje izrazov na slikah realnega sveta. V nasprotju z medsebojno izključujočimi oznakami, ki se uporabljajo pri prepoznavanju objektov, so imena objektov bolj fleksibilna, predmet komunikacijskih preferenc in semantično povezana med seboj. Zato raziskujemo modele referenčnega pomena besed, ki povezujejo vizualno z leksikalnimi informacijami, za katere domnevamo, da jih dajemo preko distribucijskih vgradnj besed. Predstavljamo model, ki se uči posameznih napovedovalcev za imena objektov, ki med treningom povezujejo vizualne in distribucijske vidike besednega pomena. Pokazali smo, da je to še posebej koristno za učenje brez strela v primerjavi s projiciranjem vizualnih objektov neposredno v distribucijski prostor. V standardni nalogi poimenovanja objektov ugotavljamo, da različni načini kombiniranja leksikalnih in vizualnih informacij dosegajo zelo podobno zmogljivost, čeprav eksperimenti kombinacije modelov kažejo, da zajemajo komplementarne vidike referenčnega pomena.', 'he': 'אנו חוקרים שמות אובייקטים, שזה משימה חשובה של התייחסות לדור ביטוי על תמונות עולם אמיתי. בניגוד לתוויות בלעדיות אחד לשני שמשתמשות בזיהוי אובייקטים, שמות אובייקטים הם גמישים יותר, מונחים להעדיפות תקשורת וקשורות סמנטית אחד לשני. לכן, אנו חוקרים דוגמנים של מילה רפורנציאלית שמשמעות שקשור מידע ויזואלי למידע לקסיקלי שאנחנו מניחים שנותן באמצעות מילים פיצוציות. אנחנו מציגים מודל שלמד צפים בודדים לשמות אובייקטים שמקשרים היבטים ויזואליים והפיצוצים של משמעות מילה במהלך האימון. אנו מראים שזה מועיל במיוחד ללימוד אפס יריות, בהשוואה לפרייקציה של אובייקטים ויזואליים ישירות לתוך החלל ההפצה. במשימה סטנדרטית בשם אובייקט, אנו מוצאים שדרכים שונות של שילוב מידע לקסי ויזואלי משיגים ביצועים דומים מאוד, למרות שניסויים על שילוב מודל מציעים שהם תופסים את היבטים המלאים של משמעות רפורנציאלית.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དངོས་པོ་མིང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ཏེ། དངོས་པོ་མིང་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་རྣམས་ལས་ དངོས་པོ་མིང་ཚོ་ནི་ཧ་གོ་བ་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་དངོས་པོ་མིང་ལ་མཐོང་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་ཁྱད་པར་རྟོགས་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྟོང་ཐད་ཀར་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་མིན་འདུག སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དངོས་པོ་མིང་བཀོད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་མཐུན་ཐབས་མ་འདྲ་བ་བསྡུར་བ་དང་མཐོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'FOIL it ! Find One mismatch between Image and Language caption', 'es': '¡FOIL! Encontrar una discrepancia entre la leyenda de la imagen y el idioma', 'pt': 'FOLHA-o! Localizar uma incompatibilidade entre a legenda da imagem e do idioma', 'ar': 'احبطها! ابحث عن عدم تطابق واحد بين تسمية توضيحية للصورة واللغة', 'fr': "FOIL\xa0! Discordance entre l'image et la légende de la langue", 'hi': 'इसे विफल! छवि और भाषा कैप्शन के बीच एक बेमेल ढूँढें', 'ru': 'FOIL it! Найти одно несоответствие между изображением и языком подписи', 'ja': 'フォイルしてください！画像と言語のキャプションの間に一致しないものを見つける', 'zh': '烫伤之! 查图像和语言标题之间一个不匹配', 'ga': 'FOIL é! Aimsigh Mímheaitseáil amháin idir fotheideal Íomhá agus Teanga', 'ka': 'ოსჟნთ დჲ! გამოსახულება და ენის თარიღების ერთი არსებობა', 'el': 'FOIL το! Εύρεση μιας ασυμφωνίας μεταξύ εικόνας και γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Csapd le! Egy eltérés keresése a kép és a nyelv felirat között', 'it': 'Toglilo! Trova una disallineazione tra immagine e lingua didascalia', 'kk': 'ҚАЙЫ! Кескін мен тіл айдарының бір сәйкестігін табу', 'lt': 'Išpildyk! Rasti vieną nuotraukos ir kalbos antraštės neatitikimą', 'mk': 'Пушти го! Најди едно несогласување помеѓу насловот на сликата и јазикот', 'ms': 'FOIL ia! Cari Satu ketidakpadanan antara tajuk Imej dan Bahasa', 'ml': 'FOIL it!  ചിത്രത്തിനും ഭാഷയുടെ തലക്കെട്ടിനും ഇടയില്\u200d ഒരു തെറ്റുപോയി കണ്ടെത്തുക', 'mt': 'FOLJA! Sib diskrepanza waħda bejn l-intestatura tal-immaġni u l-lingwa', 'mn': 'Хөлгөн! Зураг болон хэл нэр хоорондоо нэг тэнцүү байх', 'no': 'FLOIL det! Finn ei ikkje samsvar mellom biletet og språk', 'pl': 'FOLIJ to! Znajdź jedną niezgodność między napisem obrazu a językiem', 'ro': 'Dă-i drumul! Găsește o neconcordanță între imagine și limbă', 'so': 'Fiiriya! Raadi hal isku mid ah oo u dhexeeya sawir iyo mid la isku mid ah', 'si': 'වැඩ කරන්න! පින්තූරය සහ භාෂා කැප්ටන් අතර එකක් සැකසුම් හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'Slå den! Hitta en missmatchning mellan bildtext och språk', 'sr': 'Pusti ga! Naðite jednu neskladu izmeðu naslova slike i jezika', 'ta': 'விடு! பிம்பம் மற்றும் மொழி தலைப்புகளுக்கிடையில் ஒரு பொருத்தமான ஒன்றை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும்', 'ur': 'ڈال دو! تصویر اور زبان کے شاپ کے درمیان ایک غلط پیدا کریں', 'uz': 'FILE! Rasm va tillar sarlavhasida oĘ»xshash boĘ»lgan bitta qidirish', 'vi': 'Đẩy đi! Tìm không phù hợp giữa đánh giá ảnh và ngôn ngữ', 'hr': 'Pusti ga! Nađite jednu neskladu između naslova slike i jezika', 'da': 'Slå den! Find én mismatch mellem billedtekst og sprog', 'nl': 'FOIL het! Zoek één mismatch tussen afbeelding en taal bijschrift', 'bg': 'Фолирай го! Намерете едно несъответствие между изображението и езика надпис', 'de': 'FOIL it! Eine Abweichung zwischen Bild- und Sprachbeschriftung finden', 'id': 'FOIL itu! Cari Satu ketidakcocok antara tajuk gambar dan bahasa', 'ko': '그것을 꺾어라!이미지와 언어 제목 사이의 일치하지 않는 항목 찾기', 'sw': 'UKINI! Tafuta Kitu kimoja kinachofanana kati ya tasnia ya Picha na Lugha', 'af': 'Voel dit! Soek een nie ooreenstemmende tussen Beeld en Taal titel', 'fa': 'بزنش! پیدا کردن یک متفاوت بین عنوان تصویر و زبان', 'sq': 'Zbrisni! Find One mismatch between Image and Language caption', 'am': 'ፋይል! Find One mismatch between Image and Language caption', 'tr': 'Uçurun! Resim we Dil käpşeni arasynda ýene täze tap', 'hy': 'Հեռացրեք դա: Find One mismatch between Image and Language caption', 'az': 'Böyüt! Rəsm və Dil başlığı arasında bir uyğun tap', 'bn': 'ফিল! ছবি এবং ভাষা শিরোনামের মধ্যে একটি ভুল মিল খুঁজুন', 'cs': 'FOLI to! Najít jednu nesouladu mezi popiskem obrázku a jazyka', 'fi': 'Kaada se! Etsi yksi epäsuhta kuvan ja kielen tekstityksen välillä', 'ca': "FOIL it!  Trobar una incompatibilitat entre el títol d'imatge i llenguatge", 'et': 'Löö see ära! Otsi üks ebakõla pildi ja keele pealdise vahel', 'bs': 'Pusti ga! Nađite jednu neskladu između naslova slike i jezika', 'jv': 'PANDAN ! FindOK', 'sk': 'Prelisiči jo! Poišči eno neskladje med napisom slike in jezika', 'ha': 'Ka yi damƙara! @ action', 'he': 'תוריד אותו! מצא אי התאמה אחת בין תואר התמונה לשפה', 'bo': 'རྒྱག་པོ! བརྙན་རིས་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཁ་པར་ལ་མཚུངས་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we aim to understand whether current language and vision (LaVi) models truly grasp the interaction between the two modalities. To this end, we propose an extension of the MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, which associates images with both correct and ‘foil’ captions, that is, descriptions of the image that are highly similar to the original ones, but contain one single mistake (‘foil word’). We show that current LaVi models fall into the traps of this data and perform badly on three tasks : a) caption classification (correct vs. foil) ; b) foil word detection ; c) foil word correction. Humans, in contrast, have near-perfect performance on those tasks. We demonstrate that merely utilising language cues is not enough to model FOIL-COCO and that it challenges the state-of-the-art by requiring a fine-grained understanding of the relation between text and image.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نهدف إلى فهم ما إذا كانت نماذج اللغة والرؤية الحالية (LaVi) تدرك حقًا التفاعل بين الطريقتين. تحقيقًا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح امتدادًا لمجموعة بيانات MS-COCO ، FOIL-COCO ، والتي تربط الصور بكل من التسميات التوضيحية الصحيحة و "الرقيقة" ، أي أوصاف الصورة التي تشبه إلى حد كبير الصور الأصلية ، ولكنها تحتوي على واحدة خطأ واحد ("كلمة احباط"). نظهر أن نماذج LaVi الحالية تقع في مصائد هذه البيانات وتؤدي بشكل سيئ في ثلاث مهام: أ) تصنيف التسمية التوضيحية (صحيح مقابل احباط) ؛ ب) كشف كلمة احباط. ج) تصحيح الكلمات احباط. في المقابل ، يتمتع البشر بأداء شبه مثالي في تلك المهام. نوضح أن مجرد استخدام الإشارات اللغوية لا يكفي لنمذجة FOIL-COCO وأنه يتحدى أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم من خلال طلب فهم دقيق للعلاقة بين النص والصورة.', 'pt': "Neste artigo, pretendemos entender se os modelos atuais de linguagem e visão (LaVi) realmente compreendem a interação entre as duas modalidades. Para tanto, propomos uma extensão do conjunto de dados MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, que associa imagens com legendas corretas e 'foil', ou seja, descrições da imagem que são muito semelhantes às originais, mas contêm uma único erro ('palavra foil'). Mostramos que os modelos atuais de LaVi caem nas armadilhas desses dados e têm um desempenho ruim em três tarefas: a) classificação de legendas (correta vs. folha); b) detecção de palavra foil; c) correção de palavras de folha. Os humanos, em contraste, têm um desempenho quase perfeito nessas tarefas. Demonstramos que a mera utilização de dicas de linguagem não é suficiente para modelar o FOIL-COCO e que desafia o estado da arte ao exigir uma compreensão refinada da relação entre texto e imagem.", 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous cherchons à comprendre si les modèles actuels du langage et de la vision (LaVI) saisissent réellement l'interaction entre les deux modalités. À cette fin, nous proposons une extension du jeu de données MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, qui associe des images avec des légendes correctes et des légendes «\xa0foil\xa0», c'est-à-dire des descriptions de l'image qui sont très similaires aux images originales, mais qui contiennent une seule erreur («\xa0mot foil\xa0»). Nous montrons que les modèles LaVI actuels tombent dans les pièges de ces données et fonctionnent mal sur trois tâches\xa0: a) classification des sous-titres (correct contre foil)\xa0; b) détection des mots fleuret\xa0; c) correction des mots fleuret. Les humains, en revanche, accomplissent presque parfaitement ces tâches. Nous démontrons que le simple fait d'utiliser des indices de langage ne suffit pas pour modéliser FOIL-COCO et qu'il remet en question l'état de la technique en exigeant une compréhension fine de la relation entre le texte et l'image.", 'es': 'En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es comprender si los modelos actuales de lenguaje y visión (LaVi) realmente captan la interacción entre las dos modalidades. Con este fin, proponemos una ampliación del conjunto de datos de MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, que asocia las imágenes con subtítulos correctos y «foil», es decir, descripciones de la imagen que son muy similares a las originales, pero contienen un solo error («palabra foil»). Demostramos que los modelos LAvi actuales caen en las trampas de estos datos y funcionan mal en tres tareas: a) clasificación de subtítulos (correcto frente a foil); b) detección de palabras foil; c) corrección de palabras foil. Los humanos, por el contrario, tienen un desempeño casi perfecto en esas tareas. Demostramos que la mera utilización de señales del lenguaje no es suficiente para modelar FOIL-COCO y que desafía el estado de la técnica al requerir una comprensión profunda de la relación entre el texto y la imagen.', 'ja': '本稿では，現在の言語と視覚（ LaVi ）モデルが2つのモダリティの相互作用を真に把握しているかどうかを理解することを目指す．このために、MS - COCOデータセットの拡張FOIL - COCOを提案します。これは、画像を正しいキャプションと「箔」キャプションの両方、つまり元のものと非常に似ているが、1つの間違い（「箔の単語」）が含まれている画像の説明に関連付けるものです。現在のLaViモデルは、このデータのトラップに陥り、次の3つのタスクで不十分なパフォーマンスを示しています。a ）キャプション分類（正しい対ホイル） ； b ）ホイルワード検出； c ）ホイルワード修正。対照的に、人間はそれらのタスクでほぼ完璧なパフォーマンスを持っています。言語の手がかりを利用するだけでは、FOIL - COCOをモデル化するには不十分であり、テキストと画像の間の関係を細かく理解する必要があることによって、最先端に挑戦することを実証します。', 'zh': '在本文中,要知言语视听(LaVi)真得此二模之用。 议广MS-COCO数集FOIL-COCO,系以"箔"题,即与原始高相似者,而包一误("箔词")。 今LaVi模入陷阱,而于三务不佳:a)标类(正与箔)。 b) 箔字检测。 c) 筠字更正。 比之于人,近乎美矣。 吾徒以语言线索不足建模于FOIL-COCO,且求细粒度于文本、图像之间以挑战最先进之术。', 'hi': "इस पेपर में, हम यह समझने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं कि क्या वर्तमान भाषा और दृष्टि (LaVi) मॉडल वास्तव में दो तौर-तरीकों के बीच बातचीत को समझते हैं। इस अंत तक, हम एमएस-कोको डेटासेट, फॉइल-कोको के विस्तार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो छवियों को सही और 'फॉइल' कैप्शन दोनों के साथ जोड़ता है, अर्थात, छवि का विवरण जो मूल लोगों के समान है, लेकिन इसमें एक ही गलती ('पन्नी शब्द') शामिल है। हम दिखाते हैं कि वर्तमान LaVi मॉडल इस डेटा के जाल में आते हैं और तीन कार्यों पर बुरी तरह से प्रदर्शन करते हैं: ए) कैप्शन वर्गीकरण (सही बनाम पन्नी); ख) पन्नी शब्द का पता लगाने; ग) पन्नी शब्द सुधार. मनुष्य, इसके विपरीत, उन कार्यों पर निकट-पूर्ण प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि केवल भाषा संकेतों का उपयोग करना FOIL-COCO को मॉडल करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं है और यह पाठ और छवि के बीच संबंध की एक अच्छी समझ की आवश्यकता के द्वारा अत्याधुनिक को चुनौती देता है।", 'ru': 'В этой статье мы стремимся понять, действительно ли нынешние модели языка и видения (LaVi) понимают взаимодействие между этими двумя способами. С этой целью мы предлагаем расширить набор данных MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, который связывает изображения как с правильными, так и с «фольжными» надписями, то есть описаниями изображения, которые очень похожи на исходные, но содержат одну единственную ошибку («слово фольги»). Показано, что текущие модели LaVi попадают в ловушки этих данных и плохо выполняют три задачи: а) классификация надписей (правильная по сравнению с фольгой); б) обнаружение слов в фольге; в) коррекция слов в фольге. Люди, напротив, почти идеально справляются с этими задачами. Мы демонстрируем, что простого использования языковых подсказок недостаточно для моделирования FOIL-COCO и что он бросает вызов современному уровню, требуя тонкого понимания взаимосвязи между текстом и изображением.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn a thuiscint an dtuigeann samhlacha reatha teanga agus fís (LaVi) an t-idirghníomhú idir an dá mhódúlacht. Chuige sin, molaimid síneadh a chur le tacar sonraí MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, a chomhcheanglaíonn íomhánna le fotheidil chearta agus `scragall’ araon, is é sin, cur síos ar an íomhá atá an-chosúil leis na cinn bhunaidh, ach ina bhfuil ceann amháin. botún aonair (`focal scragall'). Léirímid go dtagann samhlacha reatha LaVi isteach i gaistí na sonraí seo agus go ndéanann siad go dona ar thrí thasc: a) aicmiú fotheideal (ceart vs scragall); b) scragall focal a bhrath; c) ceartú scragall focal. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, tá feidhmíocht beagnach foirfe ag daoine ar na tascanna sin. Léirímid nach leor leideanna teanga a úsáid chun SOILE-COCO a shamhaltú agus go dtugann sé dúshlán don stát is nua-aimseartha trí thuiscint mhínitheach a éileamh ar an ngaol idir téacs agus íomhá.", 'ka': "ჩვენ მინდომით გავიგოთ თუ არა მიმდინარე ენის და ხედვის მოდელები მართლად შევხედავთ ორი მოდელეობის განმავლობა. ამ მიზეზით, ჩვენ მინდა MS-COCO მონაცემების მონაცემების გაფართვა, FOIL-COCO, რომელიც გამოსახულებს ორივე მარტივი და `foil' შესახებით, ეს არის, გამოსახულების გამოსახულება, რომელიც ძალიან განსხვავებულია ორივე განსხვავებას,  ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მიმდინარე ლაVi მოდელები ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში დავწყებენ და სამი დავალებაში ცოტა გავაკეთებენ: a) შესახებ კლასიფიკაცია (b) ტულის სიტყვების განახლება; c) სიტყვების რედაქტირება. ადამიანები, კონტრასტურად, უფრო მსოფლიო პროცექტის შესახებ. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მხოლოდ ენახის სიმბოლოების გამოყენება FOIL-COCO-ის მოდელისთვის არ უფრო მხოლოდ არ არის და რომ ის განწყენებს სიმბოლოების სტატის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ტექსტის და სურათის", 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban arra törekszünk, hogy megértsük, hogy a jelenlegi nyelvi és látásmód (LaVi) modellek valóban felfogják-e a két módszer közötti interakciót. Ennek érdekében javasoljuk az MS-COCO adatkészlet, a FOIL-COCO kiterjesztését, amely a képeket helyes és "fólia" feliratokkal társítja, azaz a kép leírásait, amelyek nagyon hasonlóak az eredetiekhez, de egyetlen hibát tartalmaznak ("fólia szó"). Megmutatjuk, hogy a jelenlegi LaVi modellek ezen adatok csapdájába esnek, és három feladaton rosszul teljesítenek: a) feliratosztályozás (helyes vs. fólia); b) fóliás szó felismerése; c) fólia szó korrekció. Az emberek ezzel szemben majdnem tökéletesen teljesítik ezeket a feladatokat. Bemutatjuk, hogy a FOIL-COCO modellezéséhez nem elegendő a nyelvi utak pusztán használata, és a szöveg és kép viszonyának finom megértésével kihívja a korszerűséget.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, στόχος μας είναι να κατανοήσουμε αν τα σημερινά μοντέλα γλώσσας και οράματος (LaVi) κατανοούν πραγματικά την αλληλεπίδραση μεταξύ των δύο μορφών. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε μια επέκταση του συνόλου δεδομένων που συνδέει εικόνες τόσο με σωστές όσο και με λεζάντες "folie", δηλαδή περιγραφές της εικόνας που είναι ιδιαίτερα παρόμοιες με τις αρχικές, αλλά περιέχουν ένα μόνο λάθος ("λέξη φύλλων"). Δείχνουμε ότι τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα πέφτουν στις παγίδες αυτών των δεδομένων και αποδίδουν άσχημα σε τρεις εργασίες: α) ταξινόμηση λεζάντων (σωστή έναντι φύλλων αλουμινίου)· β) ανίχνευση λέξεων φύλλων αλουμινίου· γ) διόρθωση λέξεων φύλλων αλουμινίου. Οι άνθρωποι, αντίθετα, έχουν σχεδόν τέλεια απόδοση σε αυτά τα καθήκοντα. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η απλή χρήση γλωσσικών υποδειγμάτων δεν αρκεί για να μοντελοποιηθεί και ότι αμφισβητεί την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας απαιτώντας μια λεπτή κατανόηση της σχέσης μεταξύ κειμένου και εικόνας.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда, біз қазіргі тіл мен көрініс үлгілерін түсінуге мақсат береміз. Екі әдістер арасындағы қатынасын түсінуге болады. Бұл үшін біз MS-COCO деректер қорларының, FOIL-COCO, кескіндерді дұрыс және `foil' айдарының қосымшасына қосымша кескіндердің кеңейтуін ұсынамыз, мысалы, бастапқы кескіндерге ұқсас болған, бірақ бір қате бар (`foil word'). Біз назардағы LaVi моделдері бұл деректердің қалқандарына қалды және үш тапсырма үшін жаман істеп, а) айдарлардың классификациясы (дұрыс қарсы қарсы); b) тұмандық сөзді анықтау; amount in units (real) c) тұтас сөздерді түзету. Адамдар, қарамастан, бұл тапсырмаларды жақын әсер етеді. Біз тек тіл белгілерін қолдану үшін FOIL-COCO үлгісін үлгілеу үшін жеткілікті емес деп көрсетедік. Бұл мәтін мен кескіндер арасындағы қатынастың қатынасын түсінуге қажет етеді.", 'it': 'In questo articolo vogliamo capire se i modelli attuali di linguaggio e visione (LaVi) colgono veramente l\'interazione tra le due modalità. A tal fine, proponiamo un\'estensione del dataset MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, che associa le immagini a didascalie corrette e "foil", cioè descrizioni dell\'immagine che sono molto simili a quelle originali, ma contengono un unico errore (\'foil word\'). Mostriamo che gli attuali modelli LaVi cadono nelle trappole di questi dati e si comportano male su tre compiti: a) classificazione delle didascalie (corretto vs. foglio); b) rilevamento di parole stagnole; c) correzione di parole di foglio. Gli esseri umani, al contrario, hanno prestazioni quasi perfette in questi compiti. Dimostriamo che il semplice utilizzo di spunti linguistici non è sufficiente per modellare FOIL-COCO e che sfida lo stato dell\'arte richiedendo una comprensione fine della relazione tra testo e immagine.', 'lt': "Šiame dokumente siekiame suprasti, ar dabartiniai kalbos ir vizijos (LaVi) modeliai iš tikrųjų supranta abiejų būdų sąveiką. To this end, we propose an extension of the MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, which associates images with both correct and `foil' captions, that is, descriptions of the image that are highly similar to the original ones, but contain one single mistake (`foil word').  We show that current LaVi models fall into the traps of this data and perform badly on three tasks: a) caption classification (correct vs. foil);  b) folijos žodžių aptikimas; c) folijos žodžio pataisymas. Priešingai, žmonės šiose užduotyse atlieka beveik tobulai. Mes demonstruojame, kad vien kalbinių ženklų naudojimas nepakanka modeliuoti FOIL-COCO ir kad jis iššūkia naujausios pažangos, reikalaudamas išsamaus teksto ir vaizdo ryšio supratimo.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ние имаме за цел да разбереме дали сегашните јазици и визии (Lavi) модели навистина ја сфаќаат интеракцијата помеѓу двете модели. За оваа цел, предложуваме продолжување на наборот на податоци на MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, кој ги поврзува сликите со точни и „ фоил “ наслови, тоа е, описи на сликата кои се многу слични на оригиналните, но содржат една грешка ( „ фоил збор “). Ние покажуваме дека актуелните модели на LaVi паднуваат во стапите на овие податоци и лошо извршуваат три задачи: a) класификација на насловот (точна против фолија); b) детекција на зборови на фолија; c) корекција на зборот на фолија. Луѓето, на разлика од тоа, имаат речиси совршена изведба на овие задачи. Демонстрираме дека само користењето на јазичките знаци не е доволно за да се модели ФОИЛ-КОКО и дека тоа го предизвикува современото ниво со барање на фино разбирање на односот помеѓу текстот и сликата.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kita bermaksud untuk memahami sama ada bahasa semasa dan model penglihatan (LaVi) benar-benar memahami interaksi antara kedua-dua modaliti. Untuk tujuan ini, kami cadangkan sambungan set data MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, yang mengaitkan imej dengan kedua-dua tajuk yang betul dan tajuk `foil', iaitu, deskripsi imej yang sangat mirip dengan yang asli, tetapi mengandungi satu kesilapan (`kata foil'). Kami menunjukkan bahawa model LaVi semasa jatuh ke dalam perangkap data ini dan melakukan buruk pada tiga tugas: a) kelasukan tajuk (betul vs. foil); b) pengesan perkataan foil; c) penyesuaian perkataan foil. Manusia, sebaliknya, mempunyai prestasi hampir sempurna pada tugas tersebut. Kami menunjukkan bahawa hanya menggunakan isyarat bahasa tidak cukup untuk model FOIL-COCO dan bahawa ia menantang state-of-the-art dengan memerlukan pemahaman yang baik tentang hubungan antara teks dan imej.", 'mn': "Энэ цаасан дээр бид одоогийн хэл болон харагдах загварууд хоёр загварын хоорондын харилцааныг үнэхээр ойлгохыг хүсч байна. Энэ төгсгөлд бид MS-COCO өгөгдлийн сангийн нэмэлт, FOIL-COCO-г санал дэвшүүлнэ. Энэ нь зөв болон 'томоохон' цэгтэй зураг хоёуланг холбоотой. Энэ нь эхний зургийн тодорхойлолтуудын тодорхойлолт, гэхдээ ганц алдаа ('томоохон үг') байдаг. Бид одоогийн Лави загварын загварууд энэ өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд орж, гурван даалгавар дээр маш муу ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. (b) тосны үгнүүдийг олох; (c) Тосны үг зөв. Хүн төрөлхтний эсрэгээр нь эдгээр ажил дээр ойролцоогоор төгс үйлдэл хийдэг. Бид зөвхөн хэл тэмдэглэгчийг ашиглах нь FOIL-COCO-ын загварын загварын тулд хангалттай биш ба урлагийн байр сууриллагын тулд мөн зураг болон зураг хоорондын харилцааны тухай сайн ойлгох шаардлагатай гэдгийг харуулж байна.", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li nifhmu jekk il-mudelli attwali tal-lingwa u l-viżjoni (LaVi) humiex verament li jifhmu l-interazzjoni bejn iż-żewġ modalitajiet. Għal dan il-għan, nipproponu estensjoni tas-sett tad-dejta MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, li tassoċja l-immaġni kemm mal-intestaturi korretti kif ukoll mal-intestaturi tal-'fojl', jiġifieri, deskrizzjonijiet tal-immaġni li huma simili ħafna għal dawk oriġinali, iżda li fihom żball wieħed ('kelma tal-fojl'). Aħna nuru li l-mudelli LaVi attwali jaqgħu fis-nases ta’ din id-dejta u jwettqu ħa żin fuq tliet kompiti: a) klassifikazzjoni tal-intestatura (korretta vs. fojl); b) detezzjoni tal-kliem tal-fojl; c) korrezzjoni tal-kliem tal-fojl. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, il-bnedmin għandhom prestazzjoni kważi perfetta fuq dawk il-kompiti. Aħna nuru li sempliċement l-użu ta’ sinjali lingwistiċi mhuwiex biżżejjed biex nimmudellaw il-FOIL-COCO u li dan jisfida l-aktar avvanzat billi jeħtieġ fehim fin tar-relazzjoni bejn it-test u l-immaġni.", 'ml': "In this paper, we aim to understand whether current language and vision (LaVi) models truly grasp the interaction between the two modalities.  ഈ അവസാനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എസ്സ്-CO ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ വിശേഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഫോള്\u200d- CO, അത് ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായിരിക്കുന്നു 'ഫോയില്\u200d' തലക്കെട്ടുകളുമായി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കു നിലവിലുള്ള ലാവി മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ഡേറ്റാകളുടെ ചവറുകളില്\u200d വീഴുകയും മൂന്നു ജോലികളില്\u200d മോശമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു b) ഫോയില്\u200d വാക്ക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക; c) ഫോയില്\u200d വാക്ക് ശരിയാക്കുക. മനുഷ്യര്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പില്\u200d ആ ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് അടുത്ത് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ഉണ്ട്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d FIL-CO മാത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഭാഷ ക്യൂസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ എന്നും അത് പദാവലിയുടെയും ഇമേജിനുമി", 'no': 'I denne papiret må vi forstå om gjeldande språk og vising (LaVi) modeller virkelig forstår interaksjonen mellom dei to modulene. I denne slutten foreslår vi eit utviding av datasettet MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, som tilknyttar bilete med både rette og «foil»-tittel, t.d. skildringar av biletet som er svært liknande til originalene, men inneheld ein enkel feil («foil word»). Vi viser at gjeldande LaVi-modeller fallar i felta av denne dataen og utfører slik ut på tre oppgåver: a) tittelklassifikasjon (rett vs. fol); b) oppdaging av filordet; og c) foilordretting. Menneske har i contrast nær perfekt utvikling på desse oppgåvene. Vi demonstrerer at bare å bruka språkkområde er ikkje nok til å modellere FOIL-COCO og at det utfordrer kunstheten ved å påkrava ein fint forståelse av forholdet mellom tekst og biletet.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule chcemy zrozumieć, czy obecne modele języka i wizji (LaVi) rzeczywiście pojmują interakcję między tymi dwoma modalnościami. W tym celu proponujemy rozszerzenie zestawu danych MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, które kojarzy obrazy zarówno z poprawnymi, jak i "foilowymi" podpisami, czyli opisami obrazu, które są bardzo podobne do oryginalnych, ale zawierają jeden błąd ("foilowe słowo"). Pokazujemy, że aktualne modele LaVi wpadają w pułapki tych danych i źle wykonują trzy zadania: a) klasyfikację napisów (poprawna vs. folia); b) wykrywanie słów foliowych; c) korekta słowa folii. Ludzie, natomiast, mają prawie doskonałe wykonywanie tych zadań. Pokazujemy, że samo wykorzystanie wskazówek językowych nie wystarczy do modelowania FOIL-COCO i że kwestionuje najnowocześniejszą technologię poprzez dokładne zrozumienie relacji między tekstem a obrazem.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, ne propunem să înțelegem dacă modelele actuale de limbaj și viziune (LaVi) înțeleg cu adevărat interacțiunea dintre cele două modalități. În acest scop, propunem o extensie a setului de date MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, care asociază imaginile atât cu titluri corecte, cât și cu "folie", adică descrieri ale imaginii care sunt foarte asemănătoare cu cele originale, dar conțin o singură greșeală (\'folie word\'). Aratăm că modelele LaVi actuale cad în capcanele acestor date și se descurcă prost în trei sarcini: a) clasificarea subtitrării (corect vs. folie); b) detectarea cuvintelor din folie; c) corectarea cuvintelor din folie. Oamenii, în contrast, au performanțe aproape perfecte în aceste sarcini. Demonstrăm că simpla utilizare a indiciilor lingvistice nu este suficientă pentru a modela FOIL-COCO și că provoacă stadiul de ultimă generație prin necesitatea unei înțelegeri fine a relației dintre text și imagine.', 'sr': "U ovom papiru imamo cilj da shvatimo da li trenutni jezik i vizijski modeli stvarno shvataju interakciju između dva moda. Za taj cilj predlažemo produženje kompleta podataka MS-COCO-a, FOIL-COCO, koja povezuje slike sa pravim i 'folijskim' kapijama, to je opisa slike koja su veoma slična originalnim, ali sadrži jednu grešku („folijska riječ“). Pokazujemo da trenutni LaVi modeli padaju u zamke ovih podataka i loše izvršavaju na tri zadatka: a) klasifikaciju naslova (tačno protiv folije); b) otkrivanje rijeèi folije; c) korekcija reèi folije. Ljudi, suprotno, imaju savršenu predstavu na tim zadacima. Pokazujemo da samo korištenje jezičkih znakova nije dovoljno da modeli FOIL-COCO i da izaziva stanje umjetnosti zahtevajući dobro razumevanje odnosa između teksta i slike.", 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa inaannu garanayno in dhaqanka afka iyo muuqashada (Lavi) ay si dhab ah u qabsadaan isku xiriirka labada qaab. Sababtaas darteed waxaynu soo fidinaynaa kordhiska macluumaadka xafiiska SMS-CO, FOIL-CO, kaas oo la wadata sawirada saxda iyo `foil', taas oo ah sawir sawir u eg sawirada sawirada asalka, laakiin waxaa ku jira hal khalad (`foil word'). Waxaynu muujinnaa in modellada Lavi ee joogta ah ay ku dhacaan xadhka taariikhdan oo ay si xun ugu sameeyaan saddex shaqooyin: a) kalajarida iskuulka (saxda vs. foil). b) Aqoonsashada hadalka fuushan; c) hagaajinta hadalka fuushan. Dadka si ka duwan ayaa shuqulladaas ku sameeya dhamaan. Waxaynu muujinnaa in isticmaalidda cudurada luuqada oo kaliya aysan ku filnayn FOIL-COCO, taasuna waxay dhibaataysaa xaaladda farshaxanta, si ay u baahan tahay garashada sawirka iyo sawirka.", 'sv': "I denna uppsats syftar vi till att förstå om nuvarande språk- och visionsmodeller verkligen förstår samspelet mellan de två modaliteterna. För detta ändamål föreslår vi en förlängning av MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, som associerar bilder med både korrekta och `folie'-bildtexter, det vill säga beskrivningar av bilden som i hög grad liknar de ursprungliga, men innehåller ett enda misstag (`folie word'). Vi visar att nuvarande LaVi-modeller faller i fällorna för dessa data och presterar dåligt på tre uppgifter: a) bildtext klassificering (korrekt vs. folie); b) detektering av folieord. c) Korrigering av ord i folie. Människan, däremot, har nästan perfekt prestanda på dessa uppgifter. Vi visar att det inte räcker med att enbart använda språkledtrådar för att modellera FOIL-COCO och att det utmanar toppmodern genom att kräva en finkornig förståelse av förhållandet mellan text och bild.", 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், தற்போதைய மொழி மற்றும் பார்வைகள் (லாவி) மாதிரிகள் உண்மையில் இரு வகைகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள இடைவெளிப் இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் MS- CO தகவல் அமைப்பின் விரிவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது பிம்பங்களை சரியாக மற்றும் 'foil' தலைப்புகளுடன் இணைக்கிறது, அது மூலத்திற்கு போன்ற பிம்பத்தின் வ நாம் தற்போதைய லாவி மாதிரிகள் இந்த தரவுகளின் குப்பைகளில் விழுந்து மூன்று பணிகளில் மோசமாக செய்யும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். a)  b) கோப்பு வார்த்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பு; c) கோப்பு வார்த்தை திருத்தம். மனிதர்கள், மாறாக, அந்த வேலைகள் மீது நெருங்கிய முழுமையான செயல் இருக்கிறது. நாம் மொழி வடிவமைப்பை மட்டுமே பயன்படுத்தும் போதுமானது FOIL-CO வடிவமைக்க முடியாது மற்றும் அது உரை மற்றும் பிம்பத்திற்கும் இடையே தொடர்பு தேவைப்படும", 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපිට තේරුම් ගන්න තියෙනවා දැන් භාෂාව සහ දර්ශනය (ලාවී) මොඩේල් ඇත්තටම ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් අතර අතර අනුව මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි MS-COCO දත්ත සැට, FOIL-COCO ගැන පින්තූරය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වගේම පින්තූරය හරියට සහ `foil' කැප්සන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වගේම, පින්තූරයේ විස් අපි පෙන්වන්නේ දැන් ලැවී මොඩේල්ස් මේ දත්තේ පැත්තට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට ඇතුලට b) ෆෝල් වචන හොයාගන්න; c) ෆෝයිල් වචන හරියට. මිනිස්සුන්, විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, ඒ වැඩේ ගොඩක් සම්පූර්ණයි. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විතරයි භාෂාව අක්ෂර ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි FOIL-COCO නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ඒක පිළිබඳය සහ පිළිබඳය අතර සම", 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں ہم سمجھنے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں کہ آیا موجود زبان اور آنکھ (لاوی) موڈل دونوں موڈلیتوں کے درمیان تعامل کو حقیقت سمجھتے ہیں۔ اس لئے ہم MS-COCO ڈاٹ سٹ (FOIL-COCO) کی ایک اضافہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو تصاویروں کو درست اور 'foil' کپٹوں کے ساتھ شریک کرتا ہے، یعنی تصویر کی توصیفہ جو اصلی باتوں کے ساتھ بہت برابر ہیں، لیکن ایک اشتباہ ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود لاوی موڈل اس ڈیٹ کے تلے میں گر پڑتے ہیں اور تین کاموں پر بد عمل کرتے ہیں: a) کاپٹ کلیسی (b) فائل لفظ پڑھنا; c) فائل لفظ اصلاح. انسانوں کے مقابلہ میں ان کاموں پر نزدیک کامل عمل ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ صرف زبان نشانیاں استعمال کرنے کے لئے FOIL-COCO کی مدل کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے اور یہ آهنگ کی حالت پر چلنے لگتا ہے کہ اس کے لئے ایک متن اور تصویر کے درمیان رابطہ کا بہترین سمجھنا چاہتا ہے۔", 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz ҳозирги тил ва кўриниш modellari ikki usullar orasidagi interfektni o'rganishni tushunamiz. Shunday qilib, biz SMS- CO maʼlumotlar tarkibini kengaytirishni talab qilamiz, bu rasmlar to ʻgʻri va `foil' sarlavhasida bogʻliq boʻlgan rasmni taʼrifi qiladi, lekin bir xato mavjud (`foil soʻz'). Biz Joriy Lavi modellari bu maʼlumotning chiqindilar qutisiga qo'yiladi va uchta vazifalarga juda yomon bajaramiz: a) sarlavhasi classification (toʻgʻri vs. foil). b) foil word detection;  (c) foydalanuvchi soʻzni toʻgʻrilash. Bu vazifalarga ko'p ko'rinishini ko'rib turadi. Biz faqat til xususiyatlaridan foydalanishni faqat FOIL-CO modelini ishlatishga yetarli emas, va u matn va rasm orasidagi bogʻ'liqni tasavvur qilishini talab qiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi muốn hiểu liệu các mô hình ngôn ngữ và tầm nhìn hiện tại (LaVi) thực sự nắm bắt được giao tiếp giữa hai phương thức. Vì thế, chúng tôi đề nghị mở rộng tập tin của xơ rải rác, FOL-COCO, mà ghép các hình ảnh với các dòng chính xác và chữ « giấy ». Chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình LaVi hiện thời rơi vào bẫy của dữ liệu này và thực hiện không tốt trong ba nhiệm vụ: a) phân loại tiêu đề (đúng v. giấy bạc). b) phát hiện từ khóa trên nhôm và) chỉnh sửa từ kim loại. Loài người, ngược lại, có khả năng hoàn hảo với những việc đó. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng sử dụng các tác giả ngôn ngữ không đủ để mô tả FOL-CO và nó thách thức trạng thái hiện đại bằng cách yêu cầu hiểu sâu sắc về mối quan hệ giữa văn bản và hình ảnh.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия се стремим да разберем дали съвременните модели на език и визия (ЛаВи) наистина схващат взаимодействието между двете модали. За тази цел предлагаме разширение на набора от данни който свързва изображенията както с правилните, така и с "фолио", т.е. описания на изображението, които са силно сходни с оригиналните, но съдържат една единствена грешка (\'фолио дума\'). Показваме, че настоящите модели попадат в капаните на тези данни и се представят зле по три задачи: а) класификация на надписите (правилно спрямо фолио); б) откриване на думи от фолио; в) коригиране на думите във фолио. Хората, за разлика от това, имат почти перфектно изпълнение на тези задачи. Ние демонстрираме, че само използването на езикови знаци не е достатъчно за моделиране на ФОЙЛ-КОКО и че предизвиква най-съвременните технологии, като изисква фино разбиране на връзката между текст и изображение.', 'da': "I denne artikel forsøger vi at forstå, om nuværende sprog- og visionsmodeller virkelig forstår samspillet mellem de to modaliteter. Til dette formål foreslår vi en udvidelse af MS-COCO datasættet, FOIL-COCO, som forbinder billeder med både korrekte og `folie'-billedtekster, dvs. beskrivelser af billedet, der ligner de oprindelige, men indeholder en enkelt fejl (`folie ord'). Vi viser, at nuværende LaVi modeller falder i fælderne af disse data og udfører dårligt på tre opgaver: a) billedtekst klassificering (korrekt vs. folie); b) detektering af folieord c) ordkorrektion i folie. Mennesker, derimod, har næsten perfekt ydeevne på disse opgaver. Vi demonstrerer, at det ikke er nok blot at bruge sprogsignaler til at modellere FOIL-COCO, og at det udfordrer det nyeste ved at kræve en finkornet forståelse af forholdet mellem tekst og billede.", 'nl': "In dit artikel willen we begrijpen of de huidige taal- en visiemodellen (LaVi) de interactie tussen de twee modaliteiten echt begrijpen. Hiertoe stellen we een uitbreiding voor van de MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, die afbeeldingen associeert met zowel correcte als 'foil' ondertitels, dat wil zeggen beschrijvingen van de afbeelding die sterk lijken op de originele, maar één enkele fout bevatten ('foil word'). We laten zien dat de huidige LaVi modellen in de val vallen van deze gegevens en slecht presteren op drie taken: a) onderschriftclassificatie (correct vs. folie); b) detectie van foliewoorden; c) folie woordcorrectie. Mensen daarentegen hebben bijna perfecte prestaties voor die taken. We tonen aan dat het louter gebruiken van taalsignalen niet voldoende is om FOIL-COCO te modelleren en dat het de state-of-the-art uitdaagt door een gedetailleerd begrip van de relatie tussen tekst en beeld te vereisen.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru imamo cilj razumjeti da li trenutni modeli jezika i vizije (LaVi) zaista shvataju interakciju između dva načina. Za taj cilj predlažemo produženje kompleta podataka MS-COCO-a, FOIL-COCO, koja povezuje slike sa ispravnim i 'folijskim' kapijama, to je opisa slike koja su vrlo slična originalnim, ali sadrži jednu grešku („riječ folije“). Pokazujemo da trenutni LaVi modeli padaju u zamke tih podataka i loše izvršavaju na tri zadatka: a) klasifikaciju naslova (točno protiv folije); b) otkrivanje riječi folije; c) isprava riječi folije. Ljudi, suprotno, imaju savršenu predstavu na tim zadatkima. Pokazujemo da samo korištenje jezičkih znakova nije dovoljno da modelira FOIL-COCO i da izaziva stanje umjetnosti zahtijevajući dobro razumijevanje odnosa između teksta i slike.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wollen wir verstehen, ob aktuelle Sprach- und Visionmodelle (LaVi) die Interaktion zwischen den beiden Modalitäten wirklich erfassen. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir eine Erweiterung des MS-COCO Datensatzes FOIL-COCO vor, die Bilder sowohl mit korrekten als auch mit "Folien"-Beschriftungen assoziiert, d.h. Beschreibungen des Bildes, die dem Original sehr ähnlich sind, aber einen einzigen Fehler enthalten ("Folienwort"). Wir zeigen, dass aktuelle LaVi-Modelle in die Fallen dieser Daten geraten und drei Aufgaben schlecht erfüllen: a) Untertitelklassifizierung (korrekt vs. Folie); b) Folienworterkennung; c) Folienwortkorrektur. Der Mensch hingegen erfüllt diese Aufgaben nahezu perfekt. Wir zeigen, dass die bloße Verwendung von Sprachsignalen nicht ausreicht, um FOIL-COCO zu modellieren, sondern dass es den Stand der Technik herausfordert, indem es ein feines Verständnis des Verhältnisses von Text und Bild erfordert.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami bermaksud untuk memahami apakah bahasa dan penglihatan (LaVi) model benar-benar memahami interaksi antara dua modalitas. To this end, we propose an extension of the MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, which associates images with both correct and `foil' captions, that is, descriptions of the image that are highly similar to the original ones, but contain one single mistake (`foil word').  Kami menunjukkan bahwa model LaVi saat ini jatuh ke dalam jebakan data ini dan melakukan buruk pada tiga tugas: a) klasifikasi caption (benar vs. foil); b) deteksi kata folio; c) Koreksi kata foil. Manusia, sebaliknya, memiliki prestasi hampir sempurna pada tugas tersebut. Kami menunjukkan bahwa hanya menggunakan isyarat bahasa tidak cukup untuk model FOIL-COCO dan bahwa itu menantang state-of-the-art dengan membutuhkan pemahaman yang baik tentang hubungan antara teks dan gambar.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 현재의 언어와 시각(LaVi) 모델이 이 두 모델 간의 상호작용을 진정으로 파악하고 있는지 알아보는 데 목적을 둔다.이를 위해 MS-COCO 데이터 세트 FOIL-COO의 확장을 제안했습니다. 이 데이터 세트는 이미지를 원본 이미지와 높이가 비슷하지만 오류 하나만 포함합니다("FOIL word").우리는 현재의 LaVi 모델이 이러한 데이터의 함정에 빠졌고 세 가지 임무에서 좋지 않은 모습을 보였다. a) 자막 분류(정확 여부).b) 박사 검출;c) 단어를 수정합니다.그에 비해 인간의 임무는 완벽에 가깝다.우리는 언어 단서만으로는 FOIL-COCO를 모의할 수 없으며 텍스트와 이미지 간의 관계를 세밀하게 이해해야 하기 때문에 가장 선진적인 기술에 도전했다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': "Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga kuelewa kama mifano ya lugha na maono ya sasa (Lavi) kweli inaelezea mahusiano kati ya njia mbili. Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza kuongezeka kwa kituo cha taarifa cha MS-CO, FOIL-CO, ambacho kinashirikisha picha kwa maelezo sahihi na 'foil' ambacho ni maelezo yanayofanana sana na zile za asili, lakini ina makosa moja ('neno la kifo'). Tunaonyesha kwamba mifano ya sasa ya Lavi huanguka katika vifaa vya taarifa hizi na kufanya kazi mbaya zaidi katika kazi tatu: a) uchanganyiko wa habari (sahihi dhidi ya foil); b) Ugunduzi wa neno la kifo; c) sahihi ya maneno ya foleni. Kwa upande mwingine, wanadamu wanafanya kazi hizo karibu kabisa. Tunaonyesha kuwa kutumia misuli ya lugha haitoshi kuonyesha FOIL-CO na kwamba inachanganya hali ya sanaa kwa kutaka uelewa mzuri wa uhusiano kati ya maandishi na picha.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, häzirki dil we görnüş nusgalarynyň (LaVi) iki nusgalaryň arasynda täsirini çykarmagyny amaçladyk. Bu üçin MS-COCO veri setiriniň, FOIL-COCO-yň ýagdaýyny teklip edýäris. Bu suratlaryň hem dogry we hem 'foil' käpşenleri bilen ýagdaýlaşýar diýip görkezilýän suratyň özüne birnäçe ýalňyş bar emma ýeke bir ýalňyş bar ('foil word'). Şimdiki LaVi modellerinin bu verilerin tuzağına düştüğünü ve üç görevde kötü yaptığını gösteriyoruz. b) eýik sözleri tanamak; c) naplyk sözi düzeldirmek. İnsanlar, aksine, bu görevlerde çok yakın bir performanslar var. Biz diňe dil hatlaryny ulanmak FOIL-COCO nusgasyna ýeterlik däldigini görkeýäris we bu sanat durumyny metin we surat arasynyň baglaşygynyň düzgün düşünmesine kynçylyk edip görkeýäris.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons doen doel om te verstaan of huidige taal en visie (LaVi) modele werklik die interaksie tussen die twee modaliteite verstaan. Op hierdie einde voorstel ons 'n uitbreiding van die MS-COCO datastel, FOIL-COCO, wat beelde asosialiseer met korrekte en 'foil' titels, dit is, beskrywings van die beeld wat baie gelyk is aan die oorspronklike, maar bevat een enkele fout (`foil word'). Ons wys dat huidige LaVi modele val in die trappe van hierdie data en verkeerd uitvoer op drie opdragte: a) titel klasifikasie (korrek teen voel); (b) voëlwoord ontdekking; c) voëlwoord korreksie. Mense, in kontras, het naby-perfekte prestasie op daardie taak. Ons wys dat net die gebruik van taal tekens is nie genoeg om FOIL-COCO te model en dat dit die staat-van-kuns uitdruk deur 'n fyn-koring verstanding van die verwanting tussen teks en beeld te vereis nie.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما قصد داریم بفهمیم آیا مدل\u200cهای زبان و دید فعلی (لاوی) واقعاً تعامل بین دو روش را دریافت کنند. برای این قسمت، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که افزایش داده\u200cهای MS-COCO، FOIL-COCO، که تصاویر را با عنوان درست و صفحه\u200cهای «فول» متصل می\u200cکند، یعنی توضیح تصویر که بسیار شبیه به عنوان اصلی هستند، اما یک اشتباه است («کلمه فول»). ما نشان می دهیم که مدل\u200cهای لاوی فعلی در تله\u200cهای این داده\u200cها فرو می\u200cافتند و در سه کار بدی انجام می\u200cدهند: a) کلیسازی عنوان (درست vs. فول); (b) شناسایی کلمه\u200cهای تند; c) اصلاح کلمات فولی. انسان، در مقابل، عملکرد نزدیک کامل در این کار دارند. ما نشان می دهیم که تنها استفاده از نشانه\u200cهای زبانی کافی نیست که برای مدل FOIL-COCO و آن با نیازی به فهمیدن رابطه بین متن و تصویر به حالت هنر چالش می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të kuptojmë nëse modelet aktuale të gjuhës dhe vizionit (LaVi) kuptojnë me të vërtetë ndërveprimin midis dy modaliteteve. Për këtë qëllim, propozojmë një zgjerim të kompletit të të dhënave MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, i cili lidh imazhet si me titujt e saktë ashtu edhe me titujt e `foil', që do të thotë, përshkrimin e imazhit që janë shumë të ngjashëm me ato origjinale, por përmban një gabim të vetëm (`fjalë foil'). Ne tregojmë se modelet aktuale LaVi bien në kurth të këtyre të dhënave dhe kryejnë keq në tre detyra: a) klasifikimi i titullit (korrekt vs. foil); b) foil word detection;  c) korrigjimi i fjalës së fojllit. Njerëzit, në ndryshim, kanë performancë pothuajse të përsosur në këto detyra. Ne demonstrojmë se thjesht përdorimi i shenjave gjuhësore nuk mjafton për të modeluar FOIL-COCO dhe se ai sfidon gjendjen e teknologjisë duke kërkuar një kuptim të hollë të lidhjes midis tekstit dhe imazhit.", 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք հասկանալ, թե արդյոք ներկայիս լեզուն և տեսողությունը (Լավիի) մոդելները իսկապես հասկանում են երկու միջոցների փոխազդեցությունը: To this end, we propose an extension of the MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, which associates images with both correct and `foil' captions, that is, descriptions of the image that are highly similar to the original ones, but contain one single mistake (`foil word').  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներկայիս Լավիի մոդելները ընկնում են այս տվյալների թակարդների մեջ և վատ կատարում են երեք խնդիր. a) վերնագրի դասակարգում (ճիշտ համեմատած ֆոյլ), b) թղթի բառերի հայտնաբերումը, c) թղթի բառի ուղղությունը: Մարդիկ, հակառակը, ունեն մոտ կատարյալ ներկայացում այդ խնդիրների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ պարզապես լեզվի նշանների օգտագործումը բավարար չէ ֆոյլ-կոկոկոյի մոդելի համար, և որ այն մարտահրավեր է տալիս տեխնոլոգիայի վերջին հատվածին՝ պահանջելով լավ հասկանալ տեքստի և պատկերի միջև կապը:", 'am': "በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአሁኑ ቋንቋ እና ራእይ (ላቪ) ምሳሌዎች በሁለቱ ዓይነት መካከል ግንኙነት እንዲያሰናከል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ወደዚህም ምክንያት የኢሜስኮ ዳታ ማተሚያ፣ FOIL-CO እና ምስሎችን በማስተካከል እና `foil' አርእስቶች የሚያጋርሙትን እና የአንድ ስህተት ግን አንድ ስህተት ይኖራል፡፡ አሁን ላዊ ሞላዎችን በዚህ ዳታ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ እንዲወድቁ እና በሦስት ስራዎች ላይ ክፋት እንዲያደርጉ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ a) ክፍል (እውነተኛ vs. foil) b) የፊደል ቃላት ማግኘት; (c) የፊደል ቃላት ማቀናጃ በአንድ ተቃዋሚ ሰዎች እነዚህን ስራ ለመፈጸም ፍጹም ያደርጋሉ። የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ቋንቋዎች ብቻ በመጠቀም የFOIL-CO ማሳየት አይበቃንም እና የልዩ-አርእስት ግንኙነትን በጽሑፍ እና ምስል መካከል ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም ጥሩ ማስተዋል እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡", 'az': "Bu kağızda, həmin dil və görüş modellərinin iki modül arasındakı müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif olduğunu anlamaq istəyirik. Bu səbəbdə, MS-COCO verilən qutusu FOIL-COCO'nun uzantılmasını təbliğ edirik. Bu şəkillərin hər ikisini doğru, həmçinin 'foil' yazıları ilə birləşdirir. Bu da, orijinal şəkillərə bənzəyən şəkillərin tərzlərinə bənzəyir, amma tək bir hatası barəsindədir. Şimdiki LaVi modellərinin bu məlumatların tuzaklarına düşəcəyini göstəririk və üç işdə pis işlər edirik: a) başlıq klasifikasyonu (b) sağlam sözləri tanıma; (c) sağlam sözlərini düzəltmək. İnsanlar bu işlərdə yaxın münasibətlər var. Biz sadəcə dil əlamətlərini istifadə etmək FOIL-COCO modeli üçün kifayət deyildir və o, məktub və surat arasındakı bağlılığı çox dəyişiklik anlamaq istəyirik.", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকায় আমরা বুঝতে চাই বর্তমান ভাষা এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি (লাভি) মডেল সত্যিই এই দুটি মোডেলের মধ্যে যে কোন ধরনের সংযোগ গ এই পর্যন্ত আমরা এমএস- কমো ডাটাসেট, ফিআই-CO-এর এক্সটেশন প্রস্তাব করি, যা ছবিগুলো সঠিক এবং 'ফোয়াল' শিরোনামের সঙ্গে অংশীদার করে, যা ছবির ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে যা মূল চিত্রের মতো অনেক সমান, কিন্তু  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বর্তমান লাভি মডেল এই তথ্যের আটকে পড়ে এবং তিন কাজে খুব খারাপ পরিচালনা করে (a) শিরোনাম বিভক্ত (সঠিক বিভিন্ন ফয়ল b) ফয়লা শব্দ সনাক্ত করা; c) ফোইল শব্দ সংশোধন। বিপরীতে মানুষ এই কাজের উপর কাছাকাছি সম্পূর্ণ প্রদর্শন করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শুধুমাত্র ভাষা কুয়া ব্যবহার করে ফোআইল-সিকোর মডেল করার যথেষ্ট নয় এবং এটা শিল্পের অবস্থার চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে লেখা এবং ছবির মধ্যে সম্পর্কের সম্পর", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se snažíme porozumět tomu, zda současné modely jazyka a vize (LaVi) skutečně chápou interakci mezi oběma modalitami. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme rozšíření datové sady MS-COCO FOIL-COCO, která sdružuje obrázky jak se správnými, tak s "foilovými" titulky, tj. popisy obrázků, které jsou velmi podobné původním, ale obsahují jednu chybu ("foilové slovo"). Ukazujeme, že současné modely LaVi spadají do pastí těchto dat a provádějí špatně tři úkoly: a) klasifikaci titulků (správná vs. fólie); b) detekce slov z fólie; c) korekce slova fólií. Lidé naproti tomu mají téměř dokonalý výkon těchto úkolů. Ukazujeme, že pouhé využití jazykových návodů k modelování FOIL-COCO nestačí a že zpochybňuje state-of-the-art tím, že vyžaduje jemné porozumění vztahu mezi textem a obrazem.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, busquem entendre si els models actual de llenguatge i visió (LaVi) entenen realment la interacció entre les dues modalitats. A aquest efecte, proposem una extensió del conjunt de dades MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, que associa imatges amb títulos correctes i 'foil', és a dir, descripcions de la imatge molt semblants als originals, però contenen un únic error ('paraula foil'). Mostrem que els models LaVi actuals cauen en les trampes d'aquestes dades i desempenyen malament tres tasques: a) classificació del títol (correcta vs. fòlia); b) detecció de paraules de foil; c) correcció de les paraules de foil. Els humans, en canvi, tenen un desempeny gairebé perfecte en aquestes tasques. Demonstrem que només utilitzar indicacions de llenguatge no és suficient per a modelar FOIL-COCO i que desafia l'última tecnologia exigint una comprensió fina de la relació entre text i imatge.", 'et': "Käesolevas dokumendis püüame mõista, kas praegused keele- ja visioonimudelid (LaVi) tõeliselt mõistavad nende kahe mudeli vastastikust mõju. Selleks teeme ettepaneku laiendada MS-COCO andmekogumit FOIL-COCO, mis seostab pildid nii õigete kui ka fooliumiga, st pildi kirjeldustega, mis on algsetega väga sarnased, kuid sisaldavad ühte viga ('fooliumsõna'). Näitame, et praegused LaVi mudelid langevad nende andmete lõksudesse ja toimivad halvasti kolmes ülesandes: a) pealdise klassifitseerimine (õige vs foolium); b) fooliumsõna tuvastamine; c) fooliumsõna parandamine. Inimestel on aga nende ülesannete täitmisel peaaegu täiuslik tulemus. Näitame, et FOIL-COCO modelleerimiseks ei piisa vaid keeleliste vihjete kasutamisest ning et see seab väljakutse kaasaegsele tasemele, nõudes täpset arusaamist teksti ja kujutise vahelisest seosest.", 'bs': "U ovom papiru imamo cilj da shvatimo da li trenutni modeli jezika i vizije (LaVi) zaista shvataju interakciju između dva modaliteta. Za taj cilj predlažemo produženje kompleta podataka MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, koja povezuje slike sa ispravnim i 'folijskim' kapijama, to je, opisima slike koja su veoma slična originalnim, ali sadrže jednu grešku ('folijska riječ'). Pokazujemo da trenutni LaVi modeli padaju u zamke ovih podataka i loše izvršavaju na tri zadatka: a) klasifikaciju naslova (točno protiv folije); b) otkrivanje riječi folije; c) korekcija riječi folije. Ljudi, suprotno, imaju savršenu predstavu na tim zadacima. Pokazujemo da samo korištenje jezičkih znakova nije dovoljno da modelira FOIL-COCO i da izaziva državu umjetnosti zahtijevajući dobro razumijevanje odnosa između teksta i slike.", 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme ymmärtämään, ymmärtävätkö nykyiset kieli- ja näkömallit todella näiden kahden muodon vuorovaikutuksen. Tätä varten ehdotamme MS-COCO-aineiston laajennusta, FOIL-COCO-aineistoa, joka yhdistää kuvat sekä oikeisiin että 'foil'-kuvateksteihin eli kuvan kuvauksiin, jotka ovat hyvin samanlaisia kuin alkuperäiset, mutta sisältävät yhden ainoan virheen ('foil word'). Osoitamme, että nykyiset LaVi-mallit putoavat tämän datan ansaan ja suoriutuvat huonosti kolmessa tehtävässä: a) tekstityksen luokittelu (oikea vs. folio); b) foliosonin tunnistus; c) folion sanakorjaus. Ihmisillä sen sijaan on lähes täydellinen suorituskyky näissä tehtävissä. Osoitamme, että pelkkä kielivihjeiden hyödyntäminen ei riitä FOIL-COCOn mallintamiseen ja että se haastaa nykytekniikan vaatimalla tarkkaa ymmärrystä tekstin ja kuvan välisestä suhteesta.", 'jv': "Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo akeh luwih lan ngerasakno (LaV) sing apik dhéwé kuwi iki. Ngomongke iki, kita enyester tambah karo dataset, FOil-COMO sing nambah gambar karo ibuh gambar lan 'Foil' sampeyan, sih-sih kelangan surat sing kelangan kelangan sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan karo akeh dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe barang sampeyan sampeyan gak dhéwé. section b) FindOK paper size Olèh-olèh, digawesa, njuk tenan-uwong nganggo layang-uwong sing apik jèh dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasai perusahaan kelangan bangsa kuwi ora cukup kanggo model FOil-COMCOM lan nganggep kuwi diangkat dhéwé iso ngubah perusahaan-perusahaan langkung arah sing bisa pasar awak dhéwé kuwi nggo langkung wigatiné teka lan sesilhan.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתכוונים להבין אם הדוגמנים לשפה והחזון הנוכחים (Lavi) באמת מבינים את האינטראקציה בין שני המודיאליות. למטרה זו, אנו מציעים התאריך של קבוצת נתונים של MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, אשר מחובר תמונות עם כתיבות נכונות ו ' foil ', כלומר, תיאורים של התמונה שנדומים מאוד לאותם המקוריים, אך מכילים טעות אחת ('מילת foil'). אנחנו מראים שדוגמנים LaVi הנוכחים נופלים לתוך המלכודות של הנתונים האלה ולבצע רע בשלושה משימות: a) מסווג כותר (נכון נגד פויל); b) זיהוי מילים של סרט; c) תיקון מילים של סרט. בני אדם, בניגוד לכך, יש ביצועים כמעט מושלמים על המשימות האלה. אנו מוכיחים שרק השימוש בסימנים לשפה לא מספיק לדוגמא FOIL-COCO ושהוא מאתגר את המצב המאוכלי על ידי דרישה להבין מוצק של היחסים בין טקסט לתמונה.", 'sk': "V prispevku želimo razumeti, ali sedanji modeli jezika in vizije (LaVi) resnično razumejo interakcijo med obema modalitetama. V ta namen predlagamo razširitev nabora podatkov MS-COCO, FOIL-COCO, ki povezuje slike s pravilnimi in `folijskimi' napisi, to je opisi slike, ki so zelo podobni prvotnim, vendar vsebujejo eno samo napako (`folijska beseda'). Pokazujemo, da sedanji LaVi modeli padejo v pasti teh podatkov in slabo delujejo pri treh nalogah: a) klasifikaciji napisov (pravilno v primerjavi s folijo); b) odkrivanje besed iz folije; c) popravek besed iz folije. Ljudje, nasprotno, imajo skoraj popolno uspešnost pri teh nalogah. Dokazujemo, da zgolj uporaba jezikovnih namigov ni dovolj za modeliranje FOIL-COCO in da izziva najsodobnejše razumevanje odnosa med besedilom in sliko.", 'ha': "In this paper, we aim to understand whether current language and vision (LaVi) models truly grasp the interaction between the two modalities.  To, don haka, muna ƙayyade faɗaɗawa na ma'aunin bayani na MA-CO, FIL-CO, wanda ke yi shirin zane da sunayen suna daidaita da kuma `foil' duk, misãlai na zanen da ke daidaita da masu farko, kuma suna ƙunsa da wata ɓata guda (`maganar foil'). Muna nuna misalin LaMu da ake kai yanzu su shiga hanyõyin wannan data kuma Mu yi aiki mai kyau a kan aikin aiki uku: a) mai fassarar sunaye (daidaita versa foil). b) Zaɓi kalmar foil; c) Salon maganar foil. An cika aikinsu a sãɓãni. Mun nuna cewa ba zai iya amfani da nau'in lugha kawai ba ya is a ga shirin FIL-CO kuma yana kange halin-sanar da idan ana tambayi wani fahimci mai kyau ga haɗi tsakanin matsayi da zane.", 'bo': "འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོས་དངོས་ཡོད་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་དབར To this end, we propose an extension of the MS-COCO dataset, FOIL-COCO, which associates images with both correct and `foil' captions, that is, descriptions of the image that are highly similar to the original ones, but contain one single mistake (`foil word'). We show that current LaVi models fall into the traps of this data and perform badly on three tasks: a) caption classification (correct vs. foil); and b) ཕྱིར་ཐིག་གི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་དང་། c) ཐག་མིག་གི་ཚིག་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་རེད། གདོང་དངོས་འགྱུར་བའི་མི་རྣམས་ལ་བྱ་བ་འདི་དག་ལ་ཐད་ཀར་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་མ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས"}
{'en': 'Verb Physics : Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'ar': 'فيزياء الفعل: المعرفة الفيزيائية النسبية للأفعال والأشياء', 'fr': 'Physique des verbes\xa0: Connaissance physique relative des actions et des objets', 'es': 'Física verbal: conocimiento físico relativo de acciones y objetos', 'pt': 'Física dos Verbos: Conhecimento Físico Relativo de Ações e Objetos', 'ja': '動詞物理学：行動と物体の相対的な物理的知識', 'zh': '动词物理:动与物相知', 'hi': 'क्रिया भौतिकी: क्रियाओं और वस्तुओं का सापेक्ष भौतिक ज्ञान', 'ru': 'Физика глаголов: Относительное физическое знание действий и объектов', 'ga': 'Fisic Briathartha: Eolas Fisiciúil Coibhneasta ar Ghníomhartha agus ar Oibiachtaí', 'ka': 'გერბის ფიზიკა: მოქმედების და საქმედების Relative Physical Knowledge', 'el': 'Φυσική ρήμων: Σχετική φυσική γνώση ενεργειών και αντικειμένων', 'it': 'Fisica dei verbi: Conoscenza fisica relativa delle azioni e degli oggetti', 'hu': 'Ige fizika: A cselekvések és objektumok relatív fizikai ismerete', 'lt': 'Žodžių fizika: santykinė fizinė veiksmų ir objektų žinia', 'mk': 'Словна физика: Релативно физичко знаење на дејствата и објектите', 'kk': 'Верб физика: Әрекеттер мен нысандардың Relative Physical Knowledge', 'ml': 'വെര്\u200dബ് ഫിസിക്സ്: പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെയും വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും സംബന്ധിച്ച ഫിസിക്കല്\u200d അറിവുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Fizik Verb: Pengetahuan Fizik Relatif bagi Tindakan dan Objek', 'mt': 'Verb Physics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'mn': 'Физик: Ажлын, объектын харьцаатай физик мэдлэг', 'pl': 'Fizyka czasownika: Względna fizyczna wiedza działań i obiektów', 'no': 'Verb Physics: Relativ fysisk kjenning av handlingar og objekt', 'si': 'ව්\u200dයාක්\u200dෂික භාතික: සම්බන්ධ භාතික දැනගන්න', 'sv': 'Verbfysik: Relativ fysisk kunskap om handlingar och objekt', 'sr': 'Verba Fizika: Relativna fizička znanja akcija i objekata', 'ro': 'Fizica verbului: Cunoașterea fizică relativă a acțiunilor și obiectelor', 'so': 'Fiysics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'ta': 'செயல்கள் மற்றும் பொருள்களின் தொடர்புடைய இயல்பியல் அறிவிப்பு', 'ur': 'حرکت فیزیک: اقدامات اور Objekتوں کی نسبتی فیزیک علم', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Vật lý hình thể tương đối về dạng hành động và đối tượng', 'bg': 'Физика на глаголите: относително физическо познаване на действията и обектите', 'hr': 'Verba fizika: Relativna fizička znanja djelovanja i objekata', 'da': 'Verbfysik: Relativ fysisk viden om handlinger og objekter', 'nl': 'Woordenboek Fysica: Relatieve Fysische Kennis van Acties en Objecten', 'de': 'Verbphysik: Relative physikalische Kenntnisse von Handlungen und Objekten', 'ko': '동사 물리학: 동작과 물체의 상대 물리 지식', 'id': 'Verb Physics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'sw': 'Physics Verb: Ujuzi wa Physical Relatives of Actions and Objects', 'tr': 'Fizika: Hereketleriň we zadlaryň Relatik Fiziksel Bilgi', 'sq': 'Fzika e verbit: njohuria relative fizike e veprimeve dhe objekteve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'fa': 'فیزیک فزیک: دانش فیزیکی نسبت به فعالیت و اشیاء', 'bn': 'ভার্ব ফিজিক্স: কার্যকলাপ এবং বস্তুর সম্পর্কিত শারীরিক জ্ঞান', 'af': 'Verb Physiek: Relatiewe Physiese kennis van Aksies en Objekte', 'ca': 'Verb Physics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'az': 'Verb Fiziksi: ńįŇül…ôri v…ô Objektl…ôrin ńįliŇükili Fizik Bilm…ôsi', 'hy': 'Verb Physics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'fi': 'Verbifysiikka: Suhteellinen fyysinen tietämys teoista ja esineistä', 'cs': 'Slovesní fyzika: Relativní fyzická znalost akcí a objektů', 'et': 'Verbifüüsika: tegevuste ja objektide suhtelised füüsilised teadmised', 'bs': 'Verba Fizika: Relativna fizička znanja djelovanja i objekata', 'sk': 'Fizika glagolov: relativno fizično znanje dejanj in predmetov', 'he': 'פיזיקה מילים: ידע פיזי יחסי של פעולות ואבייקטים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Verb Physics: Relative Physical Knowledge of Actions and Objects', 'jv': 'Verb Prisik: Relatif Bilih Pisik kanggo Aksi lan Obyek'}
{'en': 'Learning commonsense knowledge from natural language text is nontrivial due to reporting bias : people rarely state the obvious, e.g., My house is bigger than me. However, while rarely stated explicitly, this trivial everyday knowledge does influence the way people talk about the world, which provides indirect clues to reason about the world. For example, a statement like, Tyler entered his house implies that his house is bigger than Tyler. In this paper, we present an approach to infer relative physical knowledge of actions and objects along five dimensions (e.g., size, weight, and strength) from unstructured natural language text. We frame knowledge acquisition as joint inference over two closely related problems : learning (1) relative physical knowledge of object pairs and (2) physical implications of actions when applied to those object pairs. Empirical results demonstrate that it is possible to extract knowledge of actions and objects from language and that joint inference over different types of knowledge improves performance.', 'ar': 'تعلم المعرفة المنطقية من نصوص اللغة الطبيعية أمر غير بديهي بسبب الإبلاغ عن التحيز: نادرًا ما يذكر الناس ما هو واضح ، على سبيل المثال ، "منزلي أكبر مني". ومع ذلك ، على الرغم من أنه نادرًا ما يُذكر صراحةً ، فإن هذه المعرفة اليومية التافهة تؤثر على الطريقة التي يتحدث بها الناس عن العالم ، والتي توفر أدلة غير مباشرة للتفكير حول العالم. على سبيل المثال ، تشير عبارة مثل "دخل تايلر إلى منزله" إلى أن منزله أكبر من منزله. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا لاستنتاج المعرفة المادية النسبية للأفعال والأشياء على طول خمسة أبعاد (مثل الحجم والوزن والقوة) من نص لغة طبيعية غير منظمة. نحن نؤطر اكتساب المعرفة كاستدلال مشترك على مشكلتين وثيقتي الصلة: التعلم (1) المعرفة المادية النسبية لأزواج الكائنات و (2) الآثار المادية للإجراءات عند تطبيقها على أزواج الكائنات هذه. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه من الممكن استخلاص المعرفة بالأفعال والأشياء من اللغة وأن الاستدلال المشترك على أنواع مختلفة من المعرفة يحسن الأداء.', 'pt': 'Aprender o conhecimento do senso comum a partir do texto em linguagem natural não é trivial devido ao viés de reportagem: as pessoas raramente afirmam o óbvio, por exemplo, “Minha casa é maior que eu”. No entanto, embora raramente declarado explicitamente, esse conhecimento cotidiano trivial influencia a maneira como as pessoas falam sobre o mundo, o que fornece pistas indiretas para raciocinar sobre o mundo. Por exemplo, uma afirmação como “Tyler entrou na casa dele” implica que sua casa é maior que Tyler. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem para inferir conhecimento físico relativo de ações e objetos ao longo de cinco dimensões (por exemplo, tamanho, peso e força) a partir de texto em linguagem natural não estruturado. Enquadramos a aquisição de conhecimento como inferência conjunta sobre dois problemas intimamente relacionados: aprendizagem (1) conhecimento físico relativo de pares de objetos e (2) implicações físicas de ações quando aplicadas a esses pares de objetos. Resultados empíricos demonstram que é possível extrair conhecimento de ações e objetos da linguagem e que a inferência conjunta sobre diferentes tipos de conhecimento melhora o desempenho.', 'es': 'Aprender conocimientos de sentido común a partir de textos en lenguaje natural no es trivial debido al sesgo informativo: la gente rara vez dice lo obvio, por ejemplo, «Mi casa es más grande que yo». Sin embargo, aunque rara vez se afirma explícitamente, este conocimiento trivial de todos los días influye en la forma en que la gente habla del mundo, lo que proporciona pistas indirectas para razonar sobre el mundo. Por ejemplo, una declaración como «Tyler entró en su casa» implica que su casa es más grande que Tyler. En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque para inferir el conocimiento físico relativo de acciones y objetos en cinco dimensiones (por ejemplo, tamaño, peso y fuerza) a partir de textos en lenguaje natural no estructurados. Enmarcamos la adquisición de conocimiento como una inferencia conjunta sobre dos problemas estrechamente relacionados: aprender (1) el conocimiento físico relativo de los pares de objetos y (2) las implicaciones físicas de las acciones cuando se aplican a esos pares de objetos. Los resultados empíricos demuestran que es posible extraer conocimiento de acciones y objetos del lenguaje y que la inferencia conjunta sobre diferentes tipos de conocimiento mejora el rendimiento.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage de connaissances de bon sens à partir d'un texte en langage naturel n'est pas anodin en raison du biais de signalement\xa0: les gens disent rarement l'évidence, par exemple, «\xa0Ma maison est plus grande que moi\xa0». Cependant, bien que rarement explicites, ces connaissances quotidiennes insignifiantes influencent la façon dont les gens parlent du monde, ce qui fournit des indices indirects pour raisonner sur le monde. Par exemple, une déclaration comme «\xa0Tyler est entré dans sa maison\xa0» implique que sa maison est plus grande que Tyler. Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche permettant de déduire la connaissance physique relative des actions et des objets selon cinq dimensions (par exemple, la taille, le poids et la force) à partir d'un texte non structuré en langage naturel. Nous définissons l'acquisition de connaissances comme une inférence conjointe sur deux problèmes étroitement liés\xa0: (1) la connaissance physique relative des paires d'objets et (2) les implications physiques des actions lorsqu'elles sont appliquées à ces paires d'objets. Les résultats empiriques montrent qu'il est possible d'extraire la connaissance des actions et des objets du langage et que l'inférence conjointe sur différents types de connaissances améliore les performances.", 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ से सामान्य ज्ञान सीखना रिपोर्टिंग पूर्वाग्रह के कारण गैर-लाभकारी है: लोग शायद ही कभी स्पष्ट रूप से बताते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, "मेरा घर मुझसे बड़ा है। हालांकि, जबकि शायद ही कभी स्पष्ट रूप से कहा गया है, यह तुच्छ रोजमर्रा का ज्ञान लोगों को दुनिया के बारे में बात करने के तरीके को प्रभावित करता है, जो दुनिया के बारे में तर्क करने के लिए अप्रत्यक्ष सुराग प्रदान करता है। उदाहरण के लिए, एक बयान जैसे, "टायलर ने अपने घर में प्रवेश किया" का तात्पर्य है कि उसका घर टायलर से बड़ा है। इस पेपर में, हम असंरचित प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ से पांच आयामों (जैसे, आकार, वजन और ताकत) के साथ कार्यों और वस्तुओं के सापेक्ष भौतिक ज्ञान का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम दो निकटता से संबंधित समस्याओं पर संयुक्त अनुमान के रूप में ज्ञान अधिग्रहण को फ्रेम करते हैं: सीखना (1) ऑब्जेक्ट जोड़े का सापेक्ष भौतिक ज्ञान और (2) उन ऑब्जेक्ट जोड़े पर लागू होने पर क्रियाओं के भौतिक निहितार्थ। अनुभवजन्य परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि भाषा से क्रियाओं और वस्तुओं का ज्ञान निकालना संभव है और विभिन्न प्रकार के ज्ञान पर संयुक्त अनुमान प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है।', 'ja': '自然言語のテキストから常識的な知識を学ぶことは、報告バイアスのために重要ではありません。人々が明らかなことを述べることはほとんどありません。たとえば、「私の家は私よりも大きいです。「しかし、明示的に述べられることはほとんどありませんが、この些細な日常の知識は、人々が世界について話す方法に影響を与えます。これは、世界についての理性に間接的な手がかりを提供します。 たとえば、「タイラーが彼の家に入った」というような記述は、彼の家がタイラーよりも大きいことを意味します。 本稿では、非構造化自然言語のテキストから、5つの次元（例えば、サイズ、重量、強度）に沿ってアクションとオブジェクトの相対的な物理的知識を推論するアプローチを提示する。 私たちは、知識の獲得を、次の2つの密接に関連する問題の共同推論としてフレームワークします。学習（ 1 ）オブジェクトペアの相対的な物理的知識（ 2 ）それらのオブジェクトペアに適用されたときの行動の物理的な意味合い。 実証結果は、言語からアクションやオブジェクトの知識を抽出することが可能であり、異なるタイプの知識に対する共同推論がパフォーマンスを向上させることを示している。', 'zh': '以告偏见,学常识于自然语言并非易事:人罕言显见之实,如"吾屋大于我"。 然虽鲜明言,而琐碎之知,诚动人言世界,这为推理世界间接线也。 如"泰勒入其室"者,大比泰勒也。 于本文中,发一从非结构化自然语言本中循五维度(,大小重量,与强度)推动与物理相知之法。 合而推之:学(1)所对物理,及(2)所宜用对时动作之义。 结果表明言取动与所知可也,而推异类以益性也。', 'ru': 'Изучение здравого смысла из текста на естественном языке является нетривиальным из-за предвзятости в сообщении: люди редко заявляют очевидное, например, «Мой дом больше, чем я.« Однако, хотя об этом редко прямо говорится, это тривиальное повседневное знание влияет на то, как люди говорят о мире, что дает косвенные подсказки для рассуждения о мире. Например, такое утверждение, как «Тайлер вошел в свой дом», подразумевает, что его дом больше, чем Тайлер. В этой статье мы представляем подход к выводу относительных физических знаний о действиях и объектах в пяти измерениях (например, размер, вес и сила) из неструктурированного текста на естественном языке. Мы формулируем приобретение знаний как совместный вывод по двум тесно связанным задачам: обучение (1) относительным физическим знаниям о парах объектов и (2) физическим последствиям действий, когда они применяются к этим парам объектов. Эмпирические результаты показывают, что можно извлечь знания о действиях и объектах из языка и что совместный вывод о различных типах знаний улучшает производительность.', 'ga': 'Ní fánach eolas ciallmhar a fhoghlaim ó théacs teanga nádúrtha mar gheall ar chlaonadh tuairiscithe: is annamh a luann daoine an rud soiléir, m.sh., “Is mó mo theach ná mise.” Mar sin féin, cé gur annamh a luaitear go sainráite é, imríonn an t-eolas fánach laethúil seo tionchar ar an mbealach a labhraíonn daoine faoin domhan, rud a thugann leideanna indíreacha maidir le réasúnaíocht faoin domhan. Mar shampla, tugann ráiteas cosúil le "Tyler isteach a theach" le tuiscint go bhfuil a theach níos mó ná Tyler. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair cur chuige chun eolas fisiciúil coibhneasta a fháil ar ghníomhartha agus ar rudaí feadh cúig thoise (m.sh., méid, meáchan, agus neart) ó théacs teanga nádúrtha neamhstruchtúrtha. Déanaimid sealbhú eolais a fhrámú mar chomhthátal ar dhá fhadhb a bhfuil dlúthbhaint acu leo: foghlaim (1) eolas fisiciúil coibhneasta ar phéirí oibiachta agus (2) impleachtaí fisiceacha gníomhartha nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar na péirí réad sin. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha gur féidir eolas ar ghníomhartha agus ar rudaí a bhaint as teanga agus go gcuirtear feabhas ar an bhfeidhmíocht i gcomhthátal ar chineálacha éagsúla eolais.', 'ka': 'ჩემი სახლის ტექსტიდან მეცნიერების მეცნიერების შესწავლობა არატრივიულია. ადამიანები არაფერად აღწევენ წარმოიდგინული, მაგალითად "ჩემი სახლია მეტიდან უფრო დიდია." მაგრამ, მაგრამ არაფერად განსაზღვრებულია, ეს საკუთარი ყოველდღე ცნობიერების შესახებ ადამიანები მსოფლიოს შესახებ, რომელიც მსოფლიოს შესახებ მუშაობის შესახებ მაგალითად, რაილერი მისი სახლიდან დაიწყება, რომ სახლის უფრო დიდ იყო რაილერზე. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პროგრამა, რომელიც აქციების და ობიექტის პირობილური ფიზიკური ცნობიერების შესახებ (მაგალითად, ზომი, ძალი და ძალი) არსტრუქტურებული ენერგიის ტე ჩვენ მივიღეთ ცნობიერების მიღება როგორც ერთადერთი ინფრენცია ორი ძალიან დაკავშირებული პრობლემებზე: სწავლობა (1) პირობიური ფიზიკური ცნობიერების მიღება და (2) ფიზიკური ინფ იმპერიკალური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ შესაძლებელია მოქმედების და სახელიდან საერთო ინფექცია განსხვავებული ცნობილების ტიპების შესაძლებელია გაუქმედება მოქმედების', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvű szövegből való közérzeti ismeretek tanulása nem triviális, mivel a bejelentések elfogultak: az emberek ritkán állítják a nyilvánvalót, pl. "A házam nagyobb nálam". Bár ritkán kifejezetten kimondják, ez a triviális mindennapi tudás befolyásolja az emberek beszélgetését a világról, ami közvetett nyomokat ad a világról. Például egy olyan állítás, mint "Tyler belépett a házába", azt sugallja, hogy a háza nagyobb, mint Tyler. Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk egy olyan megközelítést, amely a strukturálatlan természetes nyelvű szövegből származó, öt dimenzió mentén (pl. méret, súly és erősség) viszonylagos fizikai ismereteket következtet le. A tudásszerzést közös következtetésként fogjuk fel két szorosan kapcsolódó problémára: az objektumpárok relatív fizikai ismeretének tanulása (1) és (2) a cselekvések fizikai vonatkozásai ezekre az objektumpárokra. Az empirikus eredmények azt mutatják, hogy lehetséges kivonni a cselekvések és tárgyak ismeretét a nyelvből, és hogy a különböző típusú ismeretek közös következtetése javítja a teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση κοινής λογικής γνώσης από κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας δεν είναι ασήμαντη λόγω της προκατάληψης αναφοράς: οι άνθρωποι σπάνια δηλώνουν το προφανές, π.χ. "Το σπίτι μου είναι μεγαλύτερο από μένα". Ωστόσο, ενώ σπάνια αναφέρεται ρητά, αυτή η ασήμαντη καθημερινή γνώση επηρεάζει τον τρόπο που οι άνθρωποι μιλούν για τον κόσμο, γεγονός που παρέχει έμμεσα στοιχεία για τη λογική για τον κόσμο. Για παράδειγμα, μια δήλωση όπως "ο Τάιλερ μπήκε στο σπίτι του" υποδηλώνει ότι το σπίτι του είναι μεγαλύτερο από τον Τάιλερ. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για να συναχθεί σχετική φυσική γνώση των ενεργειών και των αντικειμένων κατά μήκος πέντε διαστάσεων (π.χ. μέγεθος, βάρος και δύναμη) από το μη δομημένο κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας. Περιγράφουμε την απόκτηση γνώσης ως κοινό συμπέρασμα για δύο στενά συνδεδεμένα προβλήματα: την εκμάθηση (1) της σχετικής φυσικής γνώσης των ζευγών αντικειμένων και (2) των φυσικών επιπτώσεων των ενεργειών όταν εφαρμόζονται σε αυτά τα ζεύγη αντικειμένων. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν ότι είναι δυνατή η εξαγωγή γνώσεων πράξεων και αντικειμένων από τη γλώσσα και ότι η κοινή εξαγωγή συμπερασμάτων πάνω από διαφορετικούς τύπους γνώσης βελτιώνει την απόδοση.', 'it': "Imparare la conoscenza del senso comune dal testo del linguaggio naturale non è banale a causa della segnalazione di pregiudizi: la gente raramente afferma l'ovvio, ad esempio, 'La mia casa è più grande di me.' Tuttavia, sebbene raramente dichiarato esplicitamente, questa banale conoscenza quotidiana influenza il modo in cui le persone parlano del mondo, che fornisce indizi indiretti per ragionare sul mondo. Ad esempio, una dichiarazione come 'Tyler è entrato in casa sua' implica che la sua casa è più grande di Tyler. In questo articolo, presentiamo un approccio per dedurre la conoscenza fisica relativa di azioni e oggetti lungo cinque dimensioni (ad esempio, dimensione, peso e forza) dal testo non strutturato del linguaggio naturale. Incoraggiamo l'acquisizione della conoscenza come inferenza congiunta su due problemi strettamente correlati: apprendimento (1) conoscenza fisica relativa delle coppie di oggetti e (2) implicazioni fisiche delle azioni quando applicate a quelle coppie di oggetti. I risultati empirici dimostrano che è possibile estrarre la conoscenza di azioni e oggetti dal linguaggio e che l'inferenza congiunta su diversi tipi di conoscenza migliora le prestazioni.", 'kk': 'Табиғи тілден көптеген білім оқыту көпшілікті мәтінді білмейді: адамдар көптеген, мысалы, "Менің үйім мен артында үлкен." Бірақ күнделік білім әлем туралы сөйлесу әрекетіне әсер етеді. Бұл әлем туралы тұрақты түрде тұрақты таңбаларды көрсетеді. Мысалы, "Тайлер үйіне кірген" деген мәліметі оның үйі Тайлерден үлкен деп ойлайды. Бұл қағазда, біз бес өлшемі (мысалы, өлшемі, қатты және қатты) құрылмаған табиғи тілдің мәтінінен қатынасыз физикалық әрекеттерді және нысандарды (мысалы, өлшемі, қатты және кү Біз білім алуын екі жақын сәйкестік мәселелерден біріктіру ретінде қосымша көмектеседі: оқыту (1) нысандардың екеуінің қатынасыз физикалық білім және (2) нысандардың екеуіне қолд Эмпериялық нәтижелер әрекеттер мен нысандарды тілден білім беру мүмкін екенін көрсетеді және әртүрлі білім түрлерінде біріктіру мүмкін болады.', 'mk': 'Учењето на заедничко знаење од текстот на природниот јазик не е тривијално поради известувањето на предрасуди: луѓето ретко го кажуваат очигледното, на пример, "Мојата куќа е поголема од мене". Сепак, иако ретко се вели експлицитно, ова тривијално секојдневно знаење влијае на начинот на кој луѓето зборуваат за светот, што дава индиректни траги за разумот за светот. На пример, изјавата како "Тајлер влезе во неговата куќа" имплицира дека неговата куќа е поголема од Тајлер. Во оваа хартија, претставуваме пристап за да се заклучи релативно физичко знаење на акциите и објектите долж пет димензии (на пример, големина, тежина и сила) од неструктурираниот текст на природниот јазик. We frame knowledge acquisition as joint inference over two closely related problems: learning (1) relative physical knowledge of object pairs and (2) physical implications of actions when applied to those object pairs.  Империските резултати покажуваат дека е можно да се извлече знаење за активностите и објектите од јазикот и дека заедничката конференција околу различните видови на знаење ја подобрува перформансата.', 'lt': 'Paprastų žinių mokymas iš natūralaus kalbos teksto nėra triviškas dėl pranešimo apie šališkumą: žmonės retai teigia akivaizdžiai, pvz., "Mano namai yra didesni už mane". Vis dėlto, nors retai aiškiai nurodyta, šios triviškos kasdienės žinios daro įtaką žmonių kalbai apie pasaulį, o tai suteikia netiesioginius įrodymus apie pasaulį. Pavyzdžiui, teiginys "Taileris pateko į savo namus" reiškia, kad jo namai yra didesni už Tailerį. Šiame dokumente pristatome požiūrį į santykines fizines žinias apie veiksmus ir objektus penkių matmenų (pvz., dydį, svorį ir stiprumą) išvadą iš neinstruktūrizuoto natūralios kalbos teksto. Mes vertiname žinių įgijimą kaip bendrą išvadą dėl dviejų glaudžiai susijusių problemų: mokymosi (1) santykinių fizinių objektų poros žinių ir (2) fizinių veiksmų padarinių, kai taikomi toms objektų poroms. Empirijos rezultatai rodo, kad įmanoma išgauti žinias apie veiksmus ir objektus iš kalbos ir kad bendra išvada apie įvairių tipų žinias gerina veiklos rezultatus.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പിശാചുക്കള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കാരണമാണ്: ആളുകള എന്നാലും വളരെ കുറച്ചു പ്രകടമായി പറയുമ്പോഴും, ഈ വിശിഷ്ടമായ ജ്ഞാനം എല്ലാ ദിവസവും ലോകത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ആളുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് പ്ര ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, ടെയിലര്\u200d തന്\u200dറെ വീട്ടിലേക്ക് കടന്നു എന്ന ഒരു പ്രസ്താവം ടൈലറിനെക്കാള്\u200d വലുതാണെന്നാണ് അവന്\u200d In this paper, we present an approach to infer relative physical knowledge of actions and objects along five dimensions (e.g., size, weight, and strength) from unstructured natural language text.  രണ്ടു അടുത്ത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയുടെ ജോലിയെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയുടെ ജോലി ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവൃത്തികളുടെയും അറിവുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ്ടെന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്ര', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл бичсэн мэдлэгтэй мэдлэг сурах нь буруу байдлыг тайлбарлах шаардлагатай. Хүмүүс ойлгомжтой байдлыг хэлэхдээ "Миний гэр надаас илүү том байна" гэсэн үг. Гэхдээ ховор тодорхой хэлэхдээ энэ өдөр тутмын мэдлэг хүмүүсийн дэлхийн тухай ярих талаар нөлөөлдөг. Энэ нь дэлхийн тухай шалтгааныг буруу ойлголт өгч чадна. Жишээлбэл, "Тайлер гэртээ орж ирсэн" гэдэг нь түүний гэртээ Тайлерээс илүү том гэсэн үг юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бүтээгдсэн байгалийн хэлний текстээс харьцаатай бодит мэдлэг, үйл явц, объектүүдийг таван хэмжээсүүд (жишээ, хэмжээ, хүч, хүч) дамжуулах арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид мэдлэгийг хоёр ойролцоогоор холбоотой асуудал дээр холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой мэдлэг болон (2) эдгээр объектын холбоотой холбоотой бодит нөлөөлөл гэж үзүүл Эзэмшигийн үр дүнд нь үйл ажиллагааны, объектын мэдлэг хэлээс гаргах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн өөр төрлийн мэдлэгтэй холбоотой халдвар нь үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг.', 'ms': 'Mempelajari pengetahuan biasa dari teks bahasa semulajadi bukan trivial kerana laporan bias: orang jarang menyatakan yang jelas, misalnya, \'Rumah saya lebih besar daripada saya.\' Namun, walaupun jarang dikatakan secara eksplicit, pengetahuan harian trivial ini mempengaruhi cara orang bercakap tentang dunia, yang memberikan petunjuk langsung untuk alasan tentang dunia. Contohnya, pernyataan seperti, "Tyler masuk ke rumahnya" menunjukkan bahawa rumahnya lebih besar dari Tyler. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk menyimpulkan pengetahuan fizik relatif tindakan dan objek sepanjang lima dimensi (contohnya saiz, berat badan, dan kekuatan) dari teks bahasa alam yang tidak terstruktur. We frame knowledge acquisition as joint inference over two closely related problems: learning (1) relative physical knowledge of object pairs and (2) physical implications of actions when applied to those object pairs.  Hasil empirik menunjukkan bahawa ia adalah mungkin untuk mengekstrak pengetahuan tindakan dan objek dari bahasa dan bahawa kesimpulan bersama atas jenis pengetahuan yang berbeza meningkatkan prestasi.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim ta\' g ħarfien komuni mit-test tal-lingwa naturali mhuwiex trivjali minħabba l-preġudizzju tar-rappurtar: in-nies rarament jiddikjaraw l-ovvju, pereżempju, "Id-dar tiegħi hija akbar minn lili." However, while rarely stated explicitly, this trivial everyday knowledge does influence the way people talk about the world, which provides indirect clues to reason about the world.  Pereżempju, dikjarazzjoni bħal, "Tyler daħal fid-dar tiegħu" timplika li d-dar tiegħu huwa akbar minn Tyler. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ biex niinferu g ħarfien fiżiku relattiv ta’ azzjonijiet u oġġetti tul ħames dimensjonijiet (pereżempju d-daqs, il-piż, u s-saħħa) minn test tal-lingwa naturali mhux strutturat. Aħna nqabbdu l-akkwist tal-għarfien bħala inferenza konġunta fuq żewġ problemi relatati mill-qrib: tagħlim (1) għarfien fiżiku relattiv ta’ pari ta’ oġġetti u (2) implikazzjonijiet fiżiċi ta’ azzjonijiet meta applikati għal dawk il-pari ta’ oġġetti. Ir-riżultati empiriċi juru li huwa possibbli li l-għarfien ta’ azzjonijiet u oġġetti jiġi estratt mil-lingwa u li l-inferenza konġunta fuq tipi differenti ta’ għarfien ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni.', 'no': 'Å lære vanleg kunnskap frå naturspråksteksten er ikkje trivial på grunn av rapportering av forsiktighet: folk ofte tilgjer det åpenbart, f.eks. «Heimet min er større enn me g». Men, mens ofte uttrykk, denne trivialne kvardag kunnskapen påvirkar måten folk snakker om verden, som tilbyr indirekte kluser til å forstå verden. For eksempel, eit uttrykk som «Tyler oppgav huset hans» impliserer at huset hans er større enn Tyler. I denne papiret viser vi ein tilnærming til å gjere relativt fysisk kunnskap av handlingar og objekt langs fem dimensjonar (f.eks. storleik, vekt og styrke) frå utstrukturerte naturspråktekst. Vi rammer fram å henta kunnskapen som felles infeksjon over to nærare relaterte problemar: læring (1) relativt fysisk kunnskap av objektparer og (2) fysiske implikasjonar av handlingar når det er brukt på desse objektparene. Empiriske resultat viser at det er mogleg å pakka ut kunnskap om handlingar og objekt frå språk og at kopla infeksjon over ulike typar kunnskap forbetrar utviklingar.', 'sr': "Naučenje uobièajenog znanja iz teksta prirodnog jezika nije trivialno zbog izveštaja predrasude: ljudi retko kažu oèigledno, na primer, 'Moja kuæa je veæa od mene.' Međutim, iako je rijetko jasno izjavljeno, ova trivialna svakodnevna znanja utiče na način na koji ljudi govore o svetu, koji pruža nepreksne tragove razuma o svetu. Na primer, izjava kao 'Tajler je ušao u svoju kuæu' implicira da je njegova kuæa veæa od Tajlera. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup infekciji relativnog fizičkog znanja akcija i objekata duž pet dimenzija (npr. veličina, težina i snaga) iz nestrukturiranog teksta prirodnog jezika. Smatramo prikupljanje znanja kao zajedničku infekciju preko dva bliskog povezanog problema: učenje (1) relativno fizičko znanje par objekata i (2) fizičke implikacije akcija kada se primjenjuje na te objekte. Impirički rezultati pokazuju da je moguće izvući znanje akcija i objekata iz jezika i da zajednička infekcija nad različitim vrstama znanja poboljšava učinkovitost.", 'pl': 'Uczenie się zdrowego rozsądku wiedzy z tekstu języka naturalnego nie jest trywialne ze względu na raportowanie uprzedzeń: ludzie rzadko stwierdzają oczywiste, np. "Mój dom jest większy ode mnie". Jednak choć rzadko mówiono wyraźnie, ta trywialna codzienna wiedza wpływa na sposób, w jaki ludzie mówią o świecie, co dostarcza pośrednich wskazówek do rozumu o świecie. Na przykład, oświadczenie takie jak: "Tyler wszedł do jego domu" sugeruje, że jego dom jest większy od Tylera. W artykule przedstawiono podejście do wnioskowania względnej fizycznej wiedzy działań i obiektów wzdłuż pięciu wymiarów (np. wielkości, wagi i siły) z nieustrukturyzowanego tekstu języka naturalnego. Ujmujemy nabywanie wiedzy jako wspólne wnioski dotyczące dwóch ściśle powiązanych problemów: uczenia się (1) względnej fizycznej wiedzy par obiektów i (2) fizycznych implikacji działań stosowanych do tych par obiektów. Wyniki empiryczne pokazują, że możliwe jest wydobycie wiedzy o działaniach i obiektach z języka oraz że wspólne wnioskowanie na różne rodzaje wiedzy poprawia wydajność.', 'ro': 'Învățarea cunoștințelor de bunăvoință din textul limbajului natural nu este trivială datorită raportării părtinitoare: oamenii rareori afirmă evidentul, de exemplu, "Casa mea este mai mare decât mine". Cu toate acestea, deși rareori declarată explicit, această cunoaștere banală de zi cu zi influențează modul în care oamenii vorbesc despre lume, ceea ce oferă indicii indirecte pentru a raționa despre lume. De exemplu, o declarație de genul "Tyler a intrat în casa lui" implică că casa lui este mai mare decât Tyler. În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare pentru a deduce cunoașterea fizică relativă a acțiunilor și obiectelor de-a lungul a cinci dimensiuni (de exemplu, dimensiune, greutate și forță) din textul nestructurat al limbajului natural. Încadram dobândirea cunoștințelor ca deducție comună asupra a două probleme strâns legate: învățarea (1) cunoașterea fizică relativă a perechilor de obiecte și (2) implicațiile fizice ale acțiunilor atunci când sunt aplicate acestor perechi de obiecte. Rezultatele empirice demonstrează că este posibilă extragerea cunoștințelor despre acțiuni și obiecte din limbaj și că deducerea comună asupra diferitelor tipuri de cunoștințe îmbunătățește performanța.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවාද පාළුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය දන්නවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි විදිහක් නැහැ: මිනිස්සුන්ට පැහැදිලි විදිහට කියන්න බැර නමුත්, පැහැදිලි විදිහට කියලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, මේ විදිලි හැමදාම දන්නවම මිනිස්සු ලෝකය ගැන කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා  උදාහරණයෙන්, ටායිලර් ඔහුගේ ගෙදර ඇතුලට ගියා කියලා, ඔහුගේ ගෙදර ටායිලර් වඩා ලොකු කියලා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නැති ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පාළුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ භාවිතාත්මක දැනගන්න සම්බන්ධ භාවි අපි දැනගැනීම සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙනෙක් වගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා: ඉග ඉම්පිරිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා භාෂාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දැනගන්න සහ භාෂාවෙන් ප්\u200dරති', 'so': 'Waxbarashada aqoonta farsamada ah e e laga baro qoraalka afka dabiiciga ah waa mid aan suurtagal ahayn in la wargeliyo khilaafka: dadku si yar ayey u sheegaan sida muuqashada, tusaale, "Gurigaygu waa iga weyn yahay". Si kastaba ha ahaatee, marka aad u yaraan la yidhaahdo, aqoontan maalin walba ayaa saameyn ku yeelanaya sida dadku u kala hadlo caalamka, kaas oo siiya hagaagyo si toos ah oo ay ugu sababto arimaha dunida. Tusaale ahaan hadal la mid ah, Tyler gurigiisuu galay wuxuu u jeedaa in gurigiisu ka weyn yahay Tyler. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo bandhignaa qaabab aan ka fekerno aqoonta jimicsiga iyo waxyaabaha la sameeyo shan dhinac (tusaale ahaan size, weight, iyo xoog) oo laga sameeyo qoraalka afka asalka ah. Waxbarashada (1) ee ku saabsan aqoonta labada labo iyo labada dhibaatooyin ee la xiriira, waxaynu ka sameynaa dhibaatooyin wadajir ah oo ka tirsan aqoonta aqoonta jimicsiga iyo saamaynta waxqabashada marka lagu codsaday labadaas. Abaalka xiiso ah waxay muuqataa in macquul ah in la soo saaro aqoonta falimaha iyo waxyaabaha la xiriira luqada, isla markaasna la’aanta wadajirka ah oo ka sareeya noocyo aqoonta kala duduwan oo aqoontu ay kordhiso sameynta.', 'sv': 'Att lära sig allmännyttiga kunskaper från naturligt språk text är inte trivialt på grund av att rapportera bias: folk säger sällan det uppenbara, t.ex. "Mitt hus är större än mig". Men även om den sällan uttryckligen anges, påverkar denna triviala vardagskunskap hur människor talar om världen, vilket ger indirekta ledtrådar till resonemang om världen. Ett uttalande som "Tyler gick in i sitt hus" innebär till exempel att hans hus är större än Tyler. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att härleda relativ fysisk kunskap om handlingar och objekt längs fem dimensioner (t.ex. storlek, vikt och styrka) från ostrukturerad naturlig språktext. Vi ramar in kunskapsförvärv som gemensam slutsats över två närbesläktade problem: lärande (1) relativ fysisk kunskap om objektpar och (2) fysiska konsekvenser av handlingar när de tillämpas på dessa objektpar. Empiriska resultat visar att det är möjligt att extrahera kunskap om handlingar och objekt från språket och att gemensam slutsats över olika typer av kunskap förbättrar prestationen.', 'ta': 'இயற்கையான மொழி உரையிலிருந்து பொதுவான அறிவிப்பு கற்றுக் கொள்வது தீவில்லை பியாஸ் அறிக்கையினால்: மக்கள் குறைவாகவே தெளிவாக ஆனால், குறைவாக கூறிய போது, இந்த முக்கியமான அறிவு ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் உலகைப் பற்றி மக்கள் பேசும் வழியில் பாதிக்கும், அது உலகை பற்றி தெரி எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, "டைலர் தன் வீட்டிற்குள் நுழைந்தது" என்று ஒரு கூற்று என்று கூறுகிறது அவருடைய வீடு டை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வடிவமைக்கப்படாத இயல்பான மொழி உரையிலிருந்து செயல்கள் மற்றும் பொருள்களை ஐந்து பரிமாணத்தில் குறைந்த அறிவிப்பு  பொருள் ஜோடிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பொருளின் தொடர்புடைய பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு மேல் இணைய குறைவான அறிவு பெறுவதை நாம் வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம். வெறுமையான முடிவு', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان کے متعلق علم کی تعلیم کی تعلیم غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر حالانکہ بہت کم واضح طور پر بیان کیا گیا ہے، یہ بہت کم علم دنیا کے بارے میں بات کرنے کی تاثیر دیتا ہے جو دنیا کے بارے میں غلط نشانیاں دیتا ہے۔ مثال، ایک ایسی بات ہے کہ "تایلر اپنے گھر میں داخل ہوا" یعنی اس کا گھر تایلر سے بڑا ہے اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو غیر ساختہ طبیعی زبان کے متن سے کاموں اور اشیاء کے معاملہ میں پینچ اندازے کے ساتھ مقابلہ جسمانی علم کے ذریعہ سے کمزور کریں۔ ہم علم حاصل کرنے کو دو مشکلات کے درمیان مشترک مشکلات کے متعلق مشترک بناتے ہیں: تعلیم (1) اتحادیوں کی نسبت فیزیکی علم اور (2) اتحادیوں کا فیزیکی اثرات جب ان جسموں پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ امپراتیکی نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ عمل اور موجودات کی علم زبان سے نکالنے کی امکان ہے اور یہ مختلف طریقوں علم کے ذریعہ مشترک آزمائش کے ذریعہ سے کامیابی اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Natalik tildan o\'rganish taʼminoti o\'rganish bizni taʼrif qilish sababchi emas: odamlar odamlar juda oddiy emas, masalan, "Mening uyga mendan katta" deb aytadi. Lekin ko\'pchilik aytganda, bu ko\'plab har kuni ma\'lumot dunyo haqida gapirayotganda odamlar dunyo haqida gapirayotganda ishga tayyorlaydi. Bu dunyo haqida ma\'lumotni ko\'paytirish uchun haqida qo\'llanmalar beradi. Masalan, Tyler uyga kirib, uning uy Tyler dan katta. Bu qogʻozda biz quyidagi tabiiy til matnning 5 yonida amallar va obʼektlarni qisqartirish uchun qo\'llanmiz. Biz ikki yaxshi bog\'liq muammolarning bir bir xil muvaffaqiyatlarini o\'rganishni qo\'yishimiz mumkin: 1, obʼekt ikkita qo\'llarini o\'rganish (1) va (2) bu obʼekt qo\'llarini qo\'llashda qo\'llashda qo\'llangan amallar Empirical results demonstrate that it is possible to extract knowledge of actions and objects from language and that joint inference over different types of knowledge improves performance.', 'vi': 'Học thức thông minh từ văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên không tầm thường vì báo cáo thiên kiến: người ta ít khi nói rõ ràng, ví dụ như: "Nhà tôi lớn hơn tôi." Tuy nhiên, trong những trường hợp hiếm khi được nói rõ, sự hiểu biết hằng ngày tầm thường này có ảnh hưởng đến cách người ta nói về thế giới, nó là manh mối trực tiếp dẫn đến lý lẽ về thế giới. Ví dụ, một câu nói như "Tyler đã vào nhà anh ta" ngụ ý rằng nhà anh ta lớn hơn Tyler. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp để phủ nhận kiến thức vật lý tương đối về hành động và các vật thể dọc theo năm chiều cao (v. d. kích thước, trọng lượng và sức mạnh) từ văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên không xây dựng. Chúng tôi xem khả năng nhận thức là kết luận đồng bộ hơn hai vấn đề liên quan: học (1) kiến thức vật lý tương đối của các cặp đối tượng và (2) tác động vật lý khi được áp dụng vào cặp đối tượng đó. Các kết quả của công nghệ chứng minh rằng có thể lấy được kiến thức về hành động và đối tượng từ ngôn ngữ và cộng tác về các dạng kiến thức khác nhau cải thiện hiệu quả.', 'bg': 'Научаването на разумни познания от текста на естествения език е нетривиално поради предразсъдъка на докладването: хората рядко заявяват очевидното, например: "Моят дом е по-голям от мен". Въпреки това, макар и рядко изрично да се посочва, това тривиално всекидневно знание оказва влияние върху начина, по който хората говорят за света, което дава косвени улики за разума за света. Например твърдение като "Тайлър е влязъл в къщата си" предполага, че къщата му е по-голяма от Тайлър. В настоящата статия представяме подход за извеждане на относителни физически познания за действията и обектите по пет измерения (например размер, тегло и сила) от неструктуриран текст на естествен език. Придобиването на знания е съвместно заключение по два тясно свързани проблема: учене (1) относително физическо познание на двойките обекти и (2) физически последици от действията, когато се прилагат към тези двойки обекти. Емпиричните резултати показват, че е възможно да се извличат знания за действията и обектите от езика и че съвместното заключение за различните видове знания подобрява ефективността.', 'da': 'At lære almindelig viden fra natursprogtekst er ikke trivielt på grund af rapportering af bias: folk siger sjældent det indlysende, f.eks. "Mit hus er større end mig." Men selvom det sjældent er sagt eksplicit, påvirker denne trivielle hverdagsviden den måde, folk taler om verden på, hvilket giver indirekte spor til fornuft om verden. For eksempel antyder en erklæring som \'Tyler kom ind i hans hus\' at hans hus er større end Tyler. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en tilgang til at udlede relativ fysisk viden om handlinger og objekter langs fem dimensioner (f.eks. størrelse, vægt og styrke) fra ustruktureret natursprogtekst. Vi rammer viden erhvervelse som fælles konklusion over to tæt beslægtede problemer: læring (1) relativ fysisk viden om objektpar og (2) fysiske implikationer af handlinger, når de anvendes på disse objektpar. Empiriske resultater viser, at det er muligt at udtrække viden om handlinger og objekter fra sproget, og at fælles konklusion over forskellige typer viden forbedrer ydeevnen.', 'de': 'Das Erlernen von gesundem Menschenverstand aus natursprachlichem Text ist nicht trivial aufgrund von Vorurteilen: Menschen sagen selten das Offensichtliche, z.B. "Mein Haus ist größer als ich". Dieses triviale Alltagswissen beeinflusst die Art und Weise, wie Menschen über die Welt sprechen, und liefert indirekte Hinweise auf Vernunft über die Welt. Zum Beispiel deutet eine Aussage wie "Tyler betrat sein Haus" darauf hin, dass sein Haus größer ist als Tyler. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Ansatz vor, das relative physische Wissen von Handlungen und Objekten entlang von fünf Dimensionen (z.B. Größe, Gewicht und Stärke) aus unstrukturiertem natursprachlichem Text abzuleiten. Wir fassen Wissenserwerb als gemeinsame Schlussfolgerung über zwei eng verwandte Probleme ein: Lernen (1) relativer physikalischer Kenntnisse von Objektpaaren und (2) physischer Implikationen von Handlungen, wenn sie auf diese Objektpaare angewendet werden. Empirische Ergebnisse zeigen, dass es möglich ist, Wissen über Handlungen und Objekte aus Sprache zu extrahieren und dass gemeinsame Schlussfolgerungen über verschiedene Wissenstypen die Leistung verbessern.', 'id': 'Mempelajari pengetahuan umum dari teks bahasa alami tidak trivial karena laporan bias: orang jarang menyatakan yang jelas, misalnya, \'Rumahku lebih besar dari saya.\' Namun, meskipun jarang dikatakan secara eksplicit, pengetahuan harian trivial ini mempengaruhi cara orang berbicara tentang dunia, yang menyediakan petunjuk indirekt untuk alasan tentang dunia. Contohnya, sebuah pernyataan seperti, "Tyler masuk ke rumahnya" menunjukkan bahwa rumahnya lebih besar dari Tyler. In this paper, we present an approach to infer relative physical knowledge of actions and objects along five dimensions (e.g., size, weight, and strength) from unstructured natural language text.  Kami membentuk pengakuan pengetahuan sebagai kesimpulan kongsi atas dua masalah yang berhubungan dekat: belajar (1) pengetahuan fisik relatif pasangan objek dan (2) implikasi fisik aksi ketika diterapkan pada pasangan objek tersebut. Hasil kerajaan menunjukkan bahwa mungkin untuk mengekstrak pengetahuan tindakan dan objek dari bahasa dan bahwa kesimpulan kongsi atas jenis pengetahuan yang berbeda meningkatkan prestasi.', 'hr': "Naučenje uobičajenog znanja iz teksta prirodnog jezika je neobično zbog izvještaja predrasude: ljudi rijetko kažu očito, na primjer, 'Moja kuća je veća od mene.' Međutim, iako je rijetko jasno izjavljeno, ova trivialna svakodnevna znanja utječe na način na koji ljudi govore o svijetu, koji pruža nepreksne tragove razuma o svijetu. Na primjer, izjava poput 'Tyler je ušao u svoju kuću' implicira da je njegova kuća veća od Tylera. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup inficiranju relativnog fizičkog znanja djelovanja i objekata duž pet dimenzija (npr. veličina, težina i snaga) iz neostrukturiranog teksta prirodnog jezika. Učitanje znanja kao zajednička infekcija preko dva bliskog povezanog problema: učenje (1) relativno fizičko znanje par objekata i (2) fizičke implikacije djelovanja kada se primjenjuje na te objekata. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da je moguće izvući znanje djelovanja i objekata iz jezika i da zajednička infekcija nad različitim vrstama znanja poboljšava učinkovitost.", 'nl': "Het leren van gezond verstand van teksten in natuurlijke taal is niet triviaal vanwege het rapporteren van vooroordelen: mensen zeggen zelden het voor de hand liggende, bijvoorbeeld: 'Mijn huis is groter dan ik.' Echter, hoewel zelden expliciet gezegd, beïnvloedt deze triviale alledaagse kennis wel de manier waarop mensen over de wereld praten, wat indirecte aanwijzingen geeft om over de wereld te redeneren. Een uitspraak als 'Tyler kwam zijn huis binnen' impliceert bijvoorbeeld dat zijn huis groter is dan Tyler. In dit artikel presenteren we een benadering om relatieve fysieke kennis van handelingen en objecten in vijf dimensies (bijv. grootte, gewicht en sterkte) uit ongestructureerde natuurtaaltekst te halen. We kaderen kennisverwerving als gezamenlijke conclusie over twee nauw verwante problemen: leren (1) relatieve fysieke kennis van objectparen en (2) fysieke implicaties van acties wanneer toegepast op die objectparen. Empirische resultaten tonen aan dat het mogelijk is om kennis van handelingen en objecten uit taal te halen en dat gezamenlijke conclusie over verschillende soorten kennis de prestaties verbetert.", 'ko': "보도의 편견 때문에 자연 언어의 텍스트에서 상식 지식을 배우는 것은 매우 중요하다. 사람들은 뻔한 것을 거의 말하지 않는다. 예를 들어'내 집이 나보다 크다'는 것이다.그러나 명확한 표현은 드물지만 이런 자질구레한 일상 지식은 사람들이 세계를 이야기하는 방식에 영향을 주고 세계에 대한 이성에 간접적인 단서를 제공한다.예를 들어'타일러가 그의 집에 들어왔다'는 진술은 그의 집이 타일러보다 크다는 것을 의미한다.본고에서 우리는 비구조화된 자연 언어 텍스트에서 다섯 가지 차원(예를 들어 크기, 무게와 강도)을 따라 동작과 대상을 추정하는 상대적인 물리 지식을 제시했다.우리는 지식 획득을 두 가지 밀접한 관련 문제에 대한 연합 추리로 간주할 것이다. 학습 (1) 대상이 맞는 상대적인 물리 지식과 (2) 대상이 시간에 맞는 동작에 응용되는 물리적 의미이다.실증 결과 언어에서 동작과 대상의 지식을 추출하는 것은 가능하며 서로 다른 유형의 지식에 대한 연합 추리는 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.", 'tr': 'Do첵al dilden bilim 철wrenmek tebigat dilinden a첵dy힊y흫 t채sirini a첵tmak 체챌in wajyp d채ldir: adamlar az wagt a첵dy힊yny a첵d첵arlar, mesel창, \'Meni흫 철첵체m menden uly.\'" Adamlar d체n첵채 barada g체rr체흫le첵채n 첵aly k철p d체힊체ndiril첵채n bolsa, bu wajyp g체nl체k bilim adamlary흫 d체n첵채 barada g체rr체흫le첵채n 첵aly t채sirini et첵채r. Mesela, \'Tyler 철첵체ne girdi\' di첵ip 첵aly s철zlem bol첵ar 철첵체ni흫 Tylerden ulydygyny a 첵d첵ar. Bu kagyzda, biz 철z체mizde strukturmadyk tebigy dil metini흫 eden emelleri흫 we zadlary흫 (mesel창, ululyk, ki챌ilik we g 체첵챌leri) relative bilgilerini 챌ykarmak 체챌in bir nusga g철rke첵채ris. Biz bilgi almany iki 첵akyn meselelerin arasynda bir a힊yk hasaplanjak di첵ip 챌aplan첵arys: 철wrenme (1) zady흫 챌iftleri흫 relative bilimi we (2) zady흫 챌iftlere 체첵tgedil첵채n netijesi 체챌in. Impirik netijeler bolup, dilden eylemler we zatlary흫 bilgilerini 챌ykarmak m체mkin챌i bolandygyny we bilim n채챌e g철rn체힊lerini흫 birle힊igini gowla힊dyr첵andygyny g철rkez.', 'fa': 'تعلیم علم معمولی از متن زبان طبیعی به دلیل گزارش دادن طبیعی غیر معمولی است: مردم کم کم به معنی مشخص می گویند، مثال، "خونه من از من بزرگتر است." با این حال، در حالی که کمی واضح توضیح می\u200cشود، این دانش\u200cهای کوچک روزانه تاثیر می\u200cدهد که مردم راجع به دنیا صحبت می\u200cکنند، که نشانه\u200cهای کوچک را برای دلیل جهان می\u200cدهد. برای مثال، یک گزارش مانند «تایلر وارد خونه\u200cاش شد» معرفی می\u200cکند که خانه\u200cاش بزرگتر از تایلر است. در این کاغذ، ما طریقی را برای تحلیل علم فیزیکی نسبت به حرکت و اشیاء در طول پنج بعدی (مثل اندازه، وزن و قدرت) از متن زبان طبیعی غیرساخته نشان می دهیم. ما به عنوان دریافت دانش را به عنوان آلودگی مشترک بر دو مشکل رابطه به نزدیک قرار می دهیم: یاد گرفتن (1) دانش فیزیکی نسبت به جفت\u200cهای شیء و (2) اثرات فیزیکی فعالیت هنگامی که بر این جفت\u200cها کاربرد می\u200cشود. نتایج امپراطوری نشان می دهد که ممکن است دانش عمل و اشیاء را از زبان خارج کنیم و این آلودگی مشترک بر نوع دانش مختلف عملکرد را بهتر می کند.', 'af': 'Die leer van gemeenskaplike kennis van natuurlike taal teks is ontriviaal vanweë rapportering van voorspoedige: mense het selfs die oorspoedige staat, bv. "My huis is groter as ek." Maar terwyl selfs gereeld uitduidelik gesê het, het hierdie triviale elke dag kennis influens op die manier waarop mense oor die wêreld praat, wat indirekte kloue verskaf om rede oor die wêreld te rede. Byvoorbeeld, \'n uitdrukking soos \'Tyler in sy huis ingegaan het\' implies dat sy huis groter is as Tyler. In hierdie papier stel ons \'n toegang voor om relatiewe fisiese kennis van aksies en objekte onder vyf dimensies (bv. grootte, gewig, en sterkte) van onstruktureerde natuurlike taal teks te verwyder. Ons raam kennis aanvang as joint inferensie oor twee naby verwante probleem: leer (1) relatiewe fisiese kennis van voorwerp paar en (2) fisiese inplikasies van aksies wanneer toegewend word na dié voorwerp paar. Enigeriese resultate bevestig dat dit moontlik is om kennis van aksies en objekte uit taal uit te trek en dat joint inferensie oor verskillende tipes van kennis die prestasie verbeter.', 'am': "Learning commonsense knowledge from natural language text is nontrivial due to reporting bias: people rarely state the obvious, e.g., 'My house is bigger than me.'  ነገር ግን ጥቂት ጊዜ ሳይገለጥ፣ ይህ የዕለት ዕለቱ እውቀት የዓለምን ላይ የሚናገሩትን መንገድ ያስጨንቃቸዋል፤ በዓለማዊ ምክንያት የሚገልጹትን የግልፅ ጉዳይ ያሳስፋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ እንዲህ ሲል ጢሌር ወደ ቤቱ ገባ፤ ቤቱም ከጢሌር ይበልጣል ማለት ይናገራል። በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአካባቢ ቋንቋ ጽሑፍ እና አካባቢዎችን በአምስት አካባቢ እና አካላዊ ማውቀትን እናስቀራለን፡፡ እውቀትን በሁለት ተቃራኒ ጉዳዮች ላይ የተጠቃሚ ነጥብ እንደሆነ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የፍሬው ውጤቶች የልዩ ዓይነት እውቀት የሥራ እና ዕቃዎችን ከቋንቋ ማውጣት እንዲችል ይችላል፡፡", 'sw': "Kujifunza maarifa ya umma kutoka maandishi ya lugha ya asili haina maana yoyote kwa sababu ya kuripoti upendeleo: watu nadra sana wanasema wazi, kwa mfano, 'nyumba yangu ni kubwa zaidi kuliko mimi.' Hata hivyo, wakati ambapo nadra sana ilieleza wazi, maarifa haya ya kila siku yanaathiri jinsi watu wanavyozungumzia dunia, ambayo hutoa nukuu za moja kwa moja za kuelewa kuhusu ulimwengu. Kwa mfano, tamko kama 'Tyler aliingia nyumbani kwake' inamaanisha kuwa nyumba yake ni kubwa kuliko Tyler. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu za kufikia maarifa ya kimwili yanayohusiana na vitendo na vitu vilivyotokana na vipengele mitano (kwa mfano, ukubwa, uzito na nguvu) kutoka kwenye maandishi ya lugha ya asili. Tunajaribu kupata maarifa kama maambukizi ya pamoja zaidi ya matatizo mawili yanayohusiana na karibu: kujifunza (1) kuhusu uelewa wa kimwili wa vitu viwili na (2) matokeo ya vitendo vya kimwili pale yalivyotumika kwa ajili ya vitu hivyo viwili. Matokeo ya matumaini yanaonyesha kwamba inawezekana kuondoa maarifa ya vitendo na vitu vya habari kutoka lugha na kwamba ugonjwa wa pamoja zaidi ya aina tofauti za maarifa inaboresha utendaji wa ufanisi.", 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի տեքստից ընդհանուր գիտելիքներ սովորելը ոչ փոքրիկ է, որովհետև մարդիկ հազվադեպ են ասում ակնհայտ բաները, օրինակ, "Իմ տունը մեծ է ինձնից": However, while rarely stated explicitly, this trivial everyday knowledge does influence the way people talk about the world, which provides indirect clues to reason about the world.  Օրինակ, Թայլերը մտել է իր տունը նշանակում է, որ իր տունը Թայլերից մեծ է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հարաբերական ֆիզիկական գիտելիքներ գործողությունների և առարկաների մասին հինգ չափերի երկարությամբ (օրինակ, չափսեր, կշիռ և ուժ) անկառուցված բնական լեզվի տեքստից: We frame knowledge acquisition as joint inference over two closely related problems: learning (1) relative physical knowledge of object pairs and (2) physical implications of actions when applied to those object pairs.  Empirical results demonstrate that it is possible to extract knowledge of actions and objects from language and that joint inference over different types of knowledge improves performance.', 'sq': "Learning commonsense knowledge from natural language text is nontrivial due to reporting bias: people rarely state the obvious, e.g., 'My house is bigger than me.'  However, while rarely stated explicitly, this trivial everyday knowledge does influence the way people talk about the world, which provides indirect clues to reason about the world.  For example, a statement like, 'Tyler entered his house' implies that his house is bigger than Tyler.  In this paper, we present an approach to infer relative physical knowledge of actions and objects along five dimensions (e.g., size, weight, and strength) from unstructured natural language text.  Ne kornizojmë fitimin e njohurive si përfundim të përbashkët mbi dy probleme të lidhura me afërsi: mësimin (1) njohuri relative fizike të çifteve të objekteve dhe (2) pasoja fizike të veprimeve kur aplikohen në ato çifte objekteve. Empirical results demonstrate that it is possible to extract knowledge of actions and objects from language and that joint inference over different types of knowledge improves performance.", 'az': 'Təbiətli dildən elm öyrənmək məlumatı raportlama təsirlərinə g örə qədər kiçik deyildir: insanlar az da açıq-aydın deyirlər, məsələn, evim məndən daha böyükdür. Halbuki, az da açıq-aydın belə deyildikdə, bu küçük günlük bilgi insanların dünya haqqında danışdığı kimi təsir edir, bu dünya haqqında haqqında ədalətli nişanələr təmin edir. Məsələn, "Tyler evinə daxil oldu" kimi bir ifadə is ə evinin Tylerdən daha böyükdüyünü göstərir. Bu kağızda, müəyyən edilməmiş doğal dil mətnlərindən əlaqəli fizik bilgi və məsələlər barəsində beş ölçüdə (böyüklük, ağırlıq və qüvvət) tərəfindən istifadə etmək üçün bir yaxınlıq g östəririk. Biz elm almasını iki yaxın olan problemlərin üstündə müxtəlif bir infeksiya olaraq bildiririk: öyrənmək (1) objektlər çiftlərinin qohum fiziki bilgi və (2) bu cütlərə istifadə edildikdə fiziki təsirlərin etkisi olaraq. İmpariqlıq sonuçları, dildən eylemlərin və objektlərin bilgisini çıxartmaq və müxtəlif bilgi növlərinin birləşdirilməsi mümkün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bs': "Naučenje uobičajenog znanja iz teksta prirodnog jezika je neobično zbog izvještaja predrasude: ljudi rijetko kažu očito, na primjer, 'Moja kuća je veća od mene.' Međutim, iako je rijetko jasno izjavljeno, ova trivialna svakodnevna znanja utiče na način na koji ljudi govore o svijetu, koji pruža nepreksne tragove razuma o svijetu. Na primjer, izjava kao 'Tajler je ušao u svoju kuću' implicira da je njegova kuća veća od Tajlera. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup infekciji relativnog fizičkog znanja akcija i objekata duž pet dimenzija (npr. veličina, težina i snaga) iz nestrukturiranog teksta prirodnog jezika. Učitanje znanja kao zajednička infekcija preko dva bliskog povezanog problema: učenje (1) relativno fizičko znanje par objekata i (2) fizičke implikacije djelovanja kada se primjenjuje na te objekte. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da je moguće izvući znanje akcija i objekata iz jezika i da zajednička infekcija u različitim vrstama znanja poboljšava učinkovitost.", 'bn': "প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার লেখা থেকে কমিউনেন্সেন্সের জ্ঞান শিক্ষা প্রকৃতির বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করার কারণে অশ্লীল: মানুষ খুব কম বল তবে যখন কমপক্ষে স্পষ্ট ভাবে বলা হয়, তখন প্রতিদিন এই ত্রিভিয়াল জ্ঞান মানুষ বিশ্ব সম্পর্কে যে ভাবে কথা বলে তার প্রভাব ফেলবে, যা বিশ্বের কারণ For example, a statement like, 'Tyler entered his house' implies that his house is bigger than Tyler.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পাঁচটি মাত্রা থেকে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, আকার, ওজন এবং শক্তি) প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা লেখা থেকে আত্মিক শারীরিক জ্ঞান এবং বস্তুর বিষ আমরা জ্ঞানের সাথে যোগাযোগ সংক্রান্ত সমস্যার ব্যাপারে জ্ঞান পাওয়া যাচ্ছি: বস্তুর জোড়ার ব্যাপারে শিক্ষা শিক্ষা (১) এবং (২) কাজের শা সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে ভাষা থেকে কাজ এবং বস্তুর জ্ঞান বের করা সম্ভব এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের জ্ঞানের বিভিন্ন ধরনের ক্ষেত্রে যৌথ", 'ca': "Aprendre coneixements comuns a partir del text del llenguatge natural no és trivial degut a la notificació de bias: la gent rarament diu l'òbvia, per exemple, 'La meva casa és més gran que jo'. Tot i així, tot i que rarament es diu explícitament, aquest coneixement cotidià trivial influeix en la manera en què la gent parla sobre el món, que proporciona indicis indicis per a raonar sobre el món. For example, a statement like, 'Tyler entered his house' implies that his house is bigger than Tyler.  En aquest paper, presentem un enfocament per deduir el coneixement físic relativ d'accions i objectes al llarg de cinc dimensions (per exemple, mida, pes i força) del text no estructurat del llenguatge natural. We frame knowledge acquisition as joint inference over two closely related problems: learning (1) relative physical knowledge of object pairs and (2) physical implications of actions when applied to those object pairs.  Empirical results demonstrate that it is possible to extract knowledge of actions and objects from language and that joint inference over different types of knowledge improves performance.", 'et': 'Üldmõistlike teadmiste õppimine looduskeelsest tekstist on mittetiviaalne aruandluse eelarvamuse tõttu: inimesed ütlevad harva ilmselget, nt: "Minu maja on suurem kui mina." Kuigi harva öeldakse selgesõnaliselt, mõjutab see tühine igapäevane teadmine seda, kuidas inimesed maailmast räägivad, mis annab kaudseid vihjeid maailma mõistmiseks. Näiteks väide nagu "Tyler sisenes oma majja" viitab sellele, et tema maja on suurem kui Tyler. Käesolevas töös esitame lähenemisviisi tegevuste ja objektide suhteliste füüsiliste teadmiste järeldamiseks viies mõõtmes (nt suurus, kaal ja tugevus) struktureerimata looduskeelsest tekstist. Me kujundame teadmiste omandamist ühise järeldusena kahest tihedalt seotud probleemist: õppimine (1) objektipaaride suhtelised füüsilised teadmised ja (2) tegevuste füüsilised tagajärjed nende objektipaaride suhtes rakendatuna. Empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et keelest on võimalik välja võtta teadmisi tegevustest ja objektidest ning et erinevat tüüpi teadmiste ühine järeldus parandab tulemuslikkust.', 'fi': 'Yleisen järkevyyden oppiminen luonnollisen kielen tekstistä ei ole triviaalia raportoinnin ennakkoluulon vuoksi: ihmiset harvoin toteavat ilmiselvää, esim. "Taloni on minua suurempi." Vaikka harvoin nimenomaisesti todetaan, tämä arkipäiväinen tieto vaikuttaa siihen, miten ihmiset puhuvat maailmasta, mikä antaa epäsuoria vihjeitä järkeilyyn maailmasta. Esimerkiksi lause "Tyler tuli kotiinsa" viittaa siihen, että hänen talonsa on suurempi kuin Tyler. Tässä työssä esitellään lähestymistapa, jolla voidaan päätellä suhteellinen fyysinen tietämys toimista ja esineistä viiden ulottuvuuden (esim. koko, paino ja vahvuus) avulla jäsentämättömästä luonnollisesta tekstistä. Kehitämme tiedonhankintaa yhteiseksi johtopäätökseksi kahdesta läheisesti toisiinsa liittyvästä ongelmasta: oppimisesta (1) objektiparien suhteellisesta fyysisestä tiedosta ja (2) toimintojen fyysisistä vaikutuksista, kun niitä sovelletaan näihin objektipareihin. Empiiriset tulokset osoittavat, että on mahdollista poimia tietoa teoista ja esineistä kielestä ja että yhteinen päätelmä erityyppisestä tiedosta parantaa suorituskykyä.', 'cs': 'Učení se znalostí zdravého rozumu z textu přirozeného jazyka není triviální kvůli předsudkům hlášení: lidé jen zřídka uvádějí zřejmé, např. "Můj dům je větší než já." Nicméně, i když jen zřídka explicitně řečeno, tato triviální každodenní znalost ovlivňuje způsob, jakým lidé mluví o světě, což poskytuje nepřímé vodítko k rozumu o světě. Například tvrzení jako "Tyler vstoupil do jeho domu" naznačuje, že jeho dům je větší než Tyler. V tomto článku představujeme přístup k odvození relativní fyzické znalosti akcí a objektů v pěti dimenzích (např. velikost, hmotnost a síla) z nestrukturovaného textu přirozeného jazyka. Získávání znalostí považujeme za společný závěr dvou úzce souvisejících problémů: učení se (1) relativní fyzické znalosti objektových párů a (2) fyzické implikace akcí při aplikaci na tyto objektové páry. Empirické výsledky ukazují, že je možné extrahovat znalosti o akcích a objektech z jazyka a že společné odvození z různých typů znalostí zlepšuje výkon.', 'sk': 'Učenje splošnega znanja iz besedila naravnega jezika ni trivialno zaradi pristranskosti poročanja: ljudje redko navajajo očitno, npr. "Moja hiša je večja od mene". Vendar, čeprav redko izrecno navedeno, to trivialno vsakdanje znanje vpliva na način, kako ljudje govorijo o svetu, kar daje posredne namige k razumu o svetu. Na primer, izjava, kot je "Tyler vstopil v hišo", pomeni, da je njegova hiša večja od Tylerja. V prispevku predstavljamo pristop k sklepanju relativnega fizičnega znanja dejanj in objektov v petih dimenzijah (npr. velikost, teža in moč) iz nestrukturiranega besedila v naravnem jeziku. Pridobivanje znanja oblikujemo kot skupno sklepanje o dveh tesno povezanih problemih: učenju (1) relativnega fizičnega znanja objektnih parov in (2) fizičnih posledicah dejanj pri uporabi teh objektnih parov. Empirični rezultati kažejo, da je mogoče iz jezika izvleči znanje o dejanjih in objektih in da skupna sklepanja o različnih vrstah znanja izboljšuje učinkovitost.', 'ha': 'Akwai karatun kommuni sanin daga littãfin harshen na natura, bã ya kamid da yin faɗi ga hasãra: mutane bã da sauri sai su faɗi abin da ke bayyanawa, misali, "gida na fi girma daga kaina." Amma da abu kaɗan ya faɗi, wannan littãfi da ake bayana, a yinin da aka sani, yana shagala a kan hanyar mutane da ke faɗa a kan duniya, da abin da ke gaurar da marubuci da ke fahimta a kan duniya. Misali, wani magana kamar, "Tsyller ya shiga gidansa" yana madawwama cewa, gidansa yana mafi girma daga Taler. Daga wannan takardan, Munã gaura wani hanyoyi wa masu ƙaranci ga ma\'anar aikin da kuma abubuwa da ke samun duk hanyõyi shan, misali, girgije, da ƙarfi) daga matsayin harshen wanda ba\'a gina shi ba. Ba mu sami sanin da sanin da aka sami mutane a kan matabbata biyu masu hushi: Learnin (1) mai danganta ma\'anar nau\'in abun biyu da (2) matsayin aikin aiki da ke applied a kan nau\'i biyu. Mataimakin Empirical na nuna cewa, za\'a iya iya nuna kunnuwa masu aikin aiki da abubuwa daga harshen, kuma da kuma an haɗe kwamfyuta kodi kan nau\'i-nau\'in ilmi na ƙara mafarinsa.', 'he': 'ללמוד ידע רגיל מהטקסט לשפה הטבעית הוא לא טריוויאלי בגלל דיווח חיוני: אנשים לעיתים נדירות מציינים את הברור, למשל, "הבית שלי גדול ממני." בכל אופן, בעוד נדירות נצהיר באופן ברור, הידע היומי השתני הזה משפיע על הדרך בה אנשים מדברים על העולם, אשר מספק רמזים אינדריים לגיון על העולם. For example, a statement like, \'Tyler entered his house\' implies that his house is bigger than Tyler.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים גישה כדי להוציא ידע פיזי יחסי של פעולות וחפצים לאורך חמש מימדים (למשל גודל, משקל וכוח) מטקסט שפה טבעי לא מבושל. אנו מסגרים את הרכישה של ידע כתוצאה משותפת על שתי בעיות קשורות קרובות: למידה (1) ידע פיזי יחסי של זוגות אובייקטים (object pairs) ו (2) השלכות פיזיות של פעולות כאשר הופעלה לזוגות אובייקטים אלה. תוצאות אימפריות מראות שאפשר להוציא ידע על פעולות ואבייקטים מהשפה והתוצאה המשותפת על סוגים שונים של ידע משפר את ההופעה.', 'bo': "སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཐབས་མེད་པར། ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་མང་གིས་འཛམ་གླིང་སྐོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདི་གིས་མི་མང་གི་དབྱིབས་འཛམ་གླིང་སྐོར་བཤད་པའི་ དཔེར་ན། དཔེར་ན། 'Tyler entered his house!' འཛམ་གླིང་འདི་ཁང་པ་ལས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་། དངོས་པོ་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ནས་ཕན་ཚུན་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ལེན་པའི་རྗེས་སུ་མཐུན་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་བཀོད་པ་ཡིན། གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་པོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྱིར་འཐེན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ", 'jv': "Ngerti luwih apik bener yèn ngerasahan kanggo teks pribadi, kuwi ora triyang awak dhéwé: wong liya sing ngejaraké awak dhéwé, isih, 'Omahmu uwis seneng luwih apik sing katêpakan karo aku.' Kamih, manggad akeh pisan diangkat dhéwé, akeh diangkat awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé, kuwi nggawe barang awak dhéwé, sing nyimpen basa sing beraksi awak dhéwé. Rasane, dadi kelalaman koyo, 'tyler tahun utawa' sing sumelan karo adhine sing luwih karo Tiler Nang paper iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno langkung banjuré tindang karo nggawe barang sampek lima (ex, ukuran, warno, lan susahé) sak teka-sak anyar luwih basa. Anyone Rejalaké pratike sing bisalahan ngomong nik iso nggawe kesempatan karo pawaran karo alêh lan barang nggawe barang nggo ngerasakno karo akeh sistem Panjenengan sak ngerasakno"}
{'en': 'A * CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'ar': 'A * تحليل CCG باستخدام نموذج عامل التبعية والعلامة الفوقية', 'pt': 'A* Análise CCG com um Modelo Fatorado de Supertag e Dependência', 'es': 'Análisis de CCG A* con superetiqueta y modelo factorizado por dependencia', 'fr': 'A* Analyse de la GCC avec un Supertag et un modèle Factorisé par Dépendance', 'ja': '*スーパータグと依存関係モデルを使用したCCG解析', 'zh': 'A* CCG 用超级表与依赖分解析', 'hi': 'एक Supertag और निर्भरता Factored मॉडल के साथ एक * सीसीजी पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ * CCG с супертегом и моделью, основанной на зависимости', 'ga': 'A* Parsáil CCG le Sárchlib agus Múnla Fachtóirí Spleáchais', 'ka': 'A* CCG პანელიზაცია სუპერტაგი და განსაზღვრებული მოდელზე', 'el': 'Α* Ανάλυση CCG με ένα μοντέλο υπερετικετών και εξαρτησιμότητας', 'hu': 'A* CCG értelmezés Supertag és függőségtényező modellel', 'it': 'A* CCG Parsing con un Supertag e un Modello Fattore di Dipendenza', 'kk': 'A* CCG талдау супертег мен тәуелдік факторияланған моделімен', 'lt': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'mk': 'A* CCG анализирање со модел со супер тег и фактори на зависност', 'ms': 'Penghuraian CCG A* dengan Model Supertag dan Bergantung', 'mt': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'ml': 'A* സൂപ്പര്\u200dടാഗും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുമായി സിസിജി പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'mn': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'no': 'A* CCG- tolking med ein Supertag og Avhengighet- faktorert modell', 'pl': 'A* CCG Parsing z supertagiem i modelem zależności', 'ro': 'A* CCG Parsing cu un Supertag și un Model Factor de Dependență', 'sr': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'si': 'A* CCG Parsing with a superTag and Dependency Factored Model', 'sv': 'A* CCG Parsing med en Supertagg och beroendefaktor modell', 'so': 'A* Parsing with a Supertag and Dependence Factored Model', 'ta': 'A* சிசிஜி பாடல் மேல் ஒட்டு மற்றும் சார்ந்த மாதிரி', 'ur': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A* CCG phân tích với mô hình « Thay thế và độ phụ thuộc ».', 'bg': 'А* анализиране с модел със супертаг и фактор на зависимостта', 'nl': 'A* CCG Parsing met een supertag en afhankelijkheidsfactor model', 'hr': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'da': 'A * CCG Parsing med en Supertag og afhængighedsfaktor model', 'de': 'A* CCG Parsing mit einem Supertag- und AbhĂ¤ngigkeitsfaktormodell', 'id': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'fa': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'ko': 'Supertag 및 종속 계수 모델의 *CCG 해석 사용', 'sw': 'A* Hifadhi ya CCG yenye alama ya Supertag na Utegemea', 'sq': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factory Model', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'A* CCG ማተሚያ with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'hy': 'A*', 'az': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'bs': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'cs': 'A* CCG Parsing s supertagem a modelem závislosti', 'ca': 'A* Analització CCG amb un model de superetiqueta i dependencia', 'tr': 'A', 'fi': 'A* CCG-jäsentely Supertag- ja Riippuvuuskertoimella varustetulla mallilla', 'bn': 'A* সুপার্ট্যাগ এবং নির্ভরিত ফ্যাক্টরি মোডেল দিয়ে সিসিজি পার্সিং', 'et': 'A* CCG parsimine supersilti ja sõltuvusteguriga mudeliga', 'ha': 'A* Tsariya na CCG da wata shirin Fabrita da Baƙaitacce', 'he': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model', 'sk': 'A* CCG razvrščanje s superoznako in modelom z dejavnikom odvisnosti', 'jv': 'A*', 'bo': 'A* CCG Parsing with a Supertag and Dependency Factored Model'}
{'en': 'We propose a new A * CCG parsing model in which the probability of a tree is decomposed into factors of CCG categories and its syntactic dependencies both defined on bi-directional LSTMs. Our factored model allows the precomputation of all probabilities and runs very efficiently, while modeling sentence structures explicitly via dependencies. Our model achieves the state-of-the-art results on English and Japanese CCG parsing.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا لتحليل A * CCG حيث يتحلل احتمال الشجرة إلى عوامل من فئات CCG وتبعياتها النحوية المحددة على LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه. يسمح نموذجنا المحسوب بالحساب المسبق لجميع الاحتمالات ويعمل بكفاءة عالية ، أثناء نمذجة تراكيب الجملة بشكل صريح عبر التبعيات. يحقق نموذجنا أحدث النتائج في تحليل CCG باللغتين الإنجليزية واليابانية.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'analyse A* CCG dans lequel la probabilité d'un arbre est décomposée en facteurs de catégories CCG et ses dépendances syntaxiques toutes deux définies sur des LSTM bidirectionnels. Notre modèle factoriel permet le précalcul de toutes les probabilités et fonctionne très efficacement, tout en modélisant les structures de phrases explicitement via des dépendances. Notre modèle permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe en matière d'analyse CCG en anglais et en japonais.", 'es': 'Proponemos un nuevo modelo de análisis de CCG A* en el que la probabilidad de un árbol se descompone en factores de las categorías de CCG y sus dependencias sintácticas, ambas definidas en LSTM bidireccionales. Nuestro modelo factorizado permite el cálculo previo de todas las probabilidades y se ejecuta de manera muy eficiente, al tiempo que modela las estructuras de las oraciones explícitamente a través de dependencias. Nuestro modelo logra los resultados más avanzados en el análisis CCG en inglés y japonés.', 'pt': 'Propomos um novo modelo de análise sintática A* CCG no qual a probabilidade de uma árvore é decomposta em fatores de categorias CCG e suas dependências sintáticas definidas em LSTMs bidirecionais. Nosso modelo fatorado permite a pré-computação de todas as probabilidades e é executado de forma muito eficiente, enquanto modela estruturas de sentenças explicitamente por meio de dependências. Nosso modelo alcança os resultados de última geração na análise de CCG em inglês e japonês.', 'ja': '私たちは、ツリーの確率がCCGカテゴリの要因と、双方向LSTMで定義されたその構文依存性に分解される新しいA * CCG構文解析モデルを提案します。我々の因数分解されたモデルは、すべての確率の事前計算を可能にし、非常に効率的に実行する一方で、依存関係を介して明示的に文章構造をモデリングします。当社のモデルは、英語と日本語のCCG構文解析で最先端の結果を達成します。', 'zh': '建一新A * CCG解析,其树概率分解CCG因子及定义于双向LSTM者语法赖之。 吾因子分解模形许以计概率,而运行甚效,兼因显式以结句建模。 形于英语日语CCG解析,先进于后。', 'ru': 'Предложена новая модель парсинга A* CCG, в которой вероятность дерева декомпозируется на факторы категорий CCG и его синтаксические зависимости, как определенные на двунаправленных LSTM. Наша факторизованная модель позволяет предварительно вычислить все вероятности и работает очень эффективно, моделируя структуры предложений явно через зависимости. Наша модель достигает самых современных результатов в английском и японском парсинге CCG.', 'hi': 'हम एक नए ए * सीसीजी पार्सिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें एक पेड़ की संभावना सीसीजी श्रेणियों के कारकों में विघटित हो जाती है और इसकी वाक्यात्मक निर्भरताएं दोनों द्वि-दिशात्मक एलएसटीएम पर परिभाषित होती हैं। हमारा फैक्टर्ड मॉडल सभी संभावनाओं के पूर्व-गणना की अनुमति देता है और बहुत कुशलता से चलता है, जबकि निर्भरताओं के माध्यम से स्पष्ट रूप से वाक्य संरचनाओं को मॉडलिंग करता है। हमारा मॉडल अंग्रेजी और जापानी सीसीजी पार्सिंग पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid múnla nua parsála A* CCG ina ndíscaoilfear an dóchúlacht go dtarlóidh crann i bhfachtóirí de chatagóirí CCG agus ina spleáchais chomhréire arna sainiú ag LSTM déthreocha. Ligeann ár múnla fachtóirithe do gach dóchúlacht a réamh-ríomh agus ritheann sé go han-éifeachtach, agus struchtúir phianbhreithe á samhaltú go sainráite trí spleáchais. Baineann ár múnla amach na torthaí úrscothacha ar pharsáil CCG an Bhéarla agus na Seapáine.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ ახალი A* CCG პანსტირების მოდელი, რომელიც ხელის შესაძლებლობა CCG კატეგორიების ფაქტორებში და მისი სინტაქტიური დაახლოებით ორივე განსაზღვრებული LSTMs-ზე. ჩვენი ფოქტურებული მოდელი მოძლია ყველა შესაძლებლობების წინაკომპუტურაციას და ძალიან ეფექტურად მუშაობს, როცა მოდელირება სტრუქტურაციის სტრუქტ ჩვენი მოდელის მონაცემები გავაკეთება ინგლისური და იაპონური CCG პასუზაციაზე.', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy új A* CCG elemzési modellt, amelyben egy fa valószínűsége CCG kategóriák tényezőire és szintaktikus függőségeire bontható fel, mindkettő kétirányú LSTMs-ekkel definiált. A faktorozott modellünk lehetővé teszi az összes valószínűség előkomputálását és nagyon hatékonyan fut, miközben a mondatszerkezetek explicit modellezése függőségeken keresztül. Modellünk az angol és japán CCG elemzés legkorszerűbb eredményeit éri el.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο ανάλυσης στο οποίο η πιθανότητα ενός δέντρου αποσυντίθεται σε παράγοντες των κατηγοριών και των συντακτικών εξαρτήσεων που καθορίζονται σε αμφίδρομη ανάλυση. Το παραγόμενο μοντέλο μας επιτρέπει τον προεκτίμηση όλων των πιθανοτήτων και λειτουργεί πολύ αποτελεσματικά, ενώ μοντελοποιεί τις δομές προτάσεων ρητά μέσω εξαρτήσεων. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στην αγγλική και ιαπωνική ανάλυση CCG.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo modello di analisi CCG A* in cui la probabilità di un albero è scomposta in fattori delle categorie CCG e le sue dipendenze sintattiche definite su LSTMs bidirezionali. Il nostro modello fattorizzato consente la precomputazione di tutte le probabilità e funziona in modo molto efficiente, mentre modellano esplicitamente le strutture di frase tramite dipendenze. Il nostro modello raggiunge i risultati all'avanguardia sull'analisi CCG inglese e giapponese.", 'kk': 'Біз жаңа A* CCG талдау үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұтақ құрылғыны CCG санаттарының факторларына және оның синтактикалық тәуелдіктері екі бағытты LSTMs- ге анықталды. Біздің факторлық үлгіміз барлық мүмкіндіктерді алдын- ала толтыруға мүмкіндік береді және әсер ететінді жұмыс істейді. Сөздің құрылымдарын тәуелдіктермен түсінікт Біздің үлгіміз ағылшын және жапон CCG талдау үшін әртүрлі нәтижелерін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują A* CCG analizavimo model į, kuriame medžio tikimybė yra suskirstyta į CCG kategorijų veiksnius ir jo sintaksinę priklausomybę, apibrėžiamą dvikrypčiais LSTM. Mūsų faktorių modelis leidžia iš anksto apskaičiuoti visas tikimybes ir veikia labai veiksmingai, modeliuojant sakinių struktūras tiesiogiai pagal priklausomybę. Mūsų modelis pasiekia pažangiausius anglų ir japonų CCG analizės rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме нов модел на анализирање на A* CCG во кој веројатноста на дрво е декомпозирана во фактори на CCG категории и нејзините синтактички зависности и двете дефинирани на двоправни LSTM. Нашиот факториран модел овозможува прекомпutaција на сите веројатности и функционира многу ефикасно, додека моделира структури на речениците експлицитно преку зависности. Нашиот модел ги постигнува најдобрите резултати на англиското и јапонското анализирање на CCG.', 'ms': 'We propose a new A* CCG parsing model in which the probability of a tree is decomposed into factors of CCG categories and its syntactic dependencies both defined on bi-directional LSTMs.  Model faktor kami membolehkan precomputasi semua kemungkinan dan berjalan dengan sangat efisien, sementara memmodelkan struktur kalimat secara eksplicit melalui dependensi. Model kami mencapai keputusan terbaik dalam penghuraian CCG bahasa Inggeris dan Jepun.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ A* സിസിജി പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു മരത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d സിസിജി വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ഫാക്ടറുകളിലേക്ക് മാറ്റി നമ്മുടെ ഫാക്കേഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d എല്ലാ സാധ്യതകളുടെയും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്ഥിതികള്\u200d വ്യക ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ജപ്പാനീസും സിസിജി പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിലും സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഫ', 'mt': 'A ħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ analiżi tas-CCG A* li fih il-probabbiltà ta’ siġar tiġi dekomposta f’fatturi tal-kategoriji tas-CCG u d-dipendenzi sintetiċi tagħha t-tnejn definiti fuq LSTMs bidirezzjonali. Il-mudell fatturat tagħna jippermetti l-prekomputazzjoni tal-probabbiltà kollha u jaħdem b’mod effiċjenti ħafna, filwaqt li jimmudellaw l-istrutturi tas-sentenzi espliċitament permezz tad-dipendenzi. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar l-analiżi tas-CCG Ingliża u Ġappuniża.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ A* CCG хуваалцах загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ загварын магадлал CCG категорийн факторууд болон синтактикийн хамаарал нь хоёр талын LSTMs дээр тодорхойлж байгаа юм. Бидний бүтээгдэхүүний загвар бүх магадлалыг дахин тодорхойлох боломжтой ба маш үр дүнтэй ажиллах боломжтой. Үүний загвар нь хамааралтай байдлын аргаар тодорхойлох боломжтой. Бидний загвар Англи болон Японы CCG хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнд хүргэж байна.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt A* CCG- tolkingsmodul der sannsynligheten for ei treet er dekomprimert i faktorer av CCG- kategoriar og sine syntaktiske avhengighet både definerte på to retning LSTMs. Det faktorerte modellet vårt tillèt førekomprimeringa av alle sannsynlighetane og køyrer veldig effektivt, mens modeller setningsstrukturar eksplisisk gjennom avhengighet. Modellen vårt oppnår kunsttilstanden for å tolka anglesk og japansk CCG.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowy model parsowania A* CCG, w którym prawdopodobieństwo wystąpienia drzewa jest rozkładane na czynniki kategorii CCG i jego zależności składniowe zdefiniowane na dwukierunkowych LSTMach. Nasz model faktorowy umożliwia wstępne obliczanie wszystkich prawdopodobieństw i działa bardzo efektywnie, jednocześnie modelując struktury zdań wyraźnie poprzez zależności. Nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki analizy CCG w języku angielskim i japońskim.', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou model de analizare A* CCG în care probabilitatea unui copac este descompusă în factori din categoriile CCG și dependențele sale sintactice definite pe LSTMs bidirecționale. Modelul nostru factored permite precomputarea tuturor probabilităților și rulează foarte eficient, în timp ce modelarea structurilor propozițiilor explicit prin dependențe. Modelul nostru obține rezultate de ultimă oră în analizarea CCG engleză și japoneză.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi model analize A* CCG u kojem se verovatnoća drveta raspoređuje u faktore kategorija CCG-a i njegove sintaktične zavisnosti oboje definisane na dvosmjerne LSTMs-e. Naš faktorirani model omogućava predkomputiranje svih mogućnosti i vrlo efikasno funkcioniše, dok modelira strukture rečenica izravno putem ovisnosti. Naš model postiže rezultate umjetnosti na analizu engleskog i japanskog CCG-a.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model cusub oo baaritaanka A* CCG, kaas oo laga yaabaa in geed laga koobo qeybaha CCG iyo sidoo kale ay ku xiran tahay islamarkaasna ay ku xiran tahay qoraal-toos LSTMs. Tusaalkayaga horumarinta ah wuxuu u ogolaadaa tusaale ahaan u sameynta suurtagalka oo dhan, wuxuuna si fiican u shaqeeyaa, marka uu si cad u sameynayo dhismaha xukunka ee ku xiran. Tusaale ahaan waxaa sameynaya arimaha xaaladda farshaxanka ee Ingiriis iyo jardiinada CCG ee Japanese.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny A * CCG-tolkningsmodell där sannolikheten för ett träd delas upp i faktorer för CCG-kategorier och dess syntaktiska beroenden båda definierade på tvåriktade LSTMs. Vår faktorerade modell möjliggör förkomputation av alla sannolikheter och körs mycket effektivt, samtidigt som man modellerar meningsstrukturer explicit via beroenden. Vår modell uppnår toppmoderna resultat på engelska och japanska CCG-tolkning.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய A* CCG பாடல் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அதில் ஒரு மரத்தின் சாத்தியம் CCG வகுப்புகளின் காரணிகளாக மற்றும் அதன் ஒத்திசைவு சார்புகள் இரு த எங்கள் காரணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி அனைத்து சாத்தியங்களையும் முன்னோட்டமைக்கு அனுமதிக்கிறது மற்றும் மிகவும் நன்றாக இயக்குகிறது, சார்ந்த எங்கள் மாதிரி ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் ஜப்பானிய CCG பாசிங் மீது நிலையில் கலை முடிவு பெறுகிறது.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් A* CCG විශ්ලේෂණ මොඩේලයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වලින් ගස්සක් විශ්ලේෂණය CCG වර්ගයක් සහ ඒකේ සංකේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය දෙන්නම අපේ විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ම නිර්මාණය කරන්න සහ හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ම නිර්මාණය කරන්න සහ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් දුන් අපේ නිර්මාණය ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානිස් CCG විශ්ලේෂණයේ ස්ථානයේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානිස් වි', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی A* CCG پارسینگ موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس میں ایک درخت کا احتمال CCG کاٹیوریوں کے فاکتوروں میں تقسیم کیا جاتا ہے اور اس کی سینٹکتیک اعتماد دونوں دوسری دقیق LSTMs پر مقرر کیا جاتا ہے ہمارے فاکتورڈ موڈل تمام احتمالات کی پیش کامل کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے اور بہت اثرات سے چلتا ہے، اور جماعت کی ساختاری مثالیں مثالی طور پر اعتباری کے ذریعہ مضبوط طور پر مضبوط کر رہی ہیں. ہماری مدل انگلیسی اور جاپانی سی جی پارسینگ کے ذریعے انگلیسی اور آرٹی کا نتیجہ پہنچتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz yangi A* CCG parsing modelini talab qilamiz. Bu yerda, daraxtning imkoniyatlarini CCG turlarining faqatlariga qo'yish mumkin va uning syntactik qoidalari ikkita xil LSTMsga aniqlangan. Bizning asosiy modelimiz hamma oddiy narsalarni tajribalashga ruxsat beradi va juda effektiv ishlaydi, va maxfiy soʻzning tuzuvlarini tasdiqlash mumkin. Bizning modelimiz ingliz va Yaponcha CCG parsing davlat natijasi natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình phân tích A* CCG mới mà khả năng xác định của một cây bị phân hủy thành các nhân tố chung chung chung với các phân loại theo cấu trúc cấu tạo cấu tạo cấu tạo cấu tạo cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu tạo lẫn nhau. Nhân bản của chúng tôi cho phép hiệu chỉnh trước tất cả khả năng và chạy rất hiệu quả, trong khi cấu trúc bản án mô tả rõ ràng nhờ sự phụ thuộc. Mẫu của chúng tôi đạt được kết quả tối tân về phân tích CCG Anh và Nhật Bản.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов модел за анализ, в който вероятността за едно дърво да се разгражда на фактори от категориите и синтактичните му зависимости, дефинирани на двупосочни ЛТМ. Нашият факториран модел позволява предварително изчисляване на всички вероятности и работи много ефективно, докато моделира структурите на изреченията изрично чрез зависимости. Нашият модел постига най-съвременните резултати при английски и японски анализ.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny A * CCG parsing model, hvor sandsynligheden for et træ er opdelt i faktorer af CCG kategorier og dets syntaktiske afhængigheder begge defineret på to-retningsbestemte LSTMs. Vores faktorerede model tillader prækomputation af alle sandsynligheder og kører meget effektivt, mens modellering af sætningsstrukturer eksplicit via afhængigheder. Vores model opnår de avancerede resultater på engelsk og japansk CCG parsing.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi model analize CCG-a u kojem se vjerojatnost drveta raspoređuje u faktore kategorija CCG-a i njegove sintaktičke zavisnosti obje definirane na dvosmjerne LSTMs-e. Naš faktorirani model omogućava predkomputaciju svih mogućnosti i vrlo učinkovito funkcioniše, dok modelira strukture rečenice jasno putem ovisnosti. Naš model postiže rezultate umjetnosti na analizu engleskog i japanskog CCG-a.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw A* CCG parsing model voor waarin de waarschijnlijkheid van een boom wordt afgebroken in factoren van CCG categorieën en zijn syntactische afhankelijkheden beide gedefinieerd op bi-directionele LSTMs. Ons factored model maakt de precomputatie van alle waarschijnlijkheden mogelijk en loopt zeer efficiënt, terwijl zinsstructuren expliciet worden gemodelleerd via afhankelijkheden. Ons model bereikt de state-of-the-art resultaten op Engels en Japans CCG parsing.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 a*CCG 해석 모델을 제시했는데 그 중에서 나무의 확률은 CCG 유형의 인자와 쌍방향 LSTM에 정의된 문법적 의존으로 분해된다.우리의 인자모델은 모든 확률을 미리 계산할 수 있고 운행이 매우 효율적이며 의존 관계를 통해 문장 구조를 현저하게 모델링할 수 있다.우리의 모델은 영어와 일본어 CCG 해석의 최신 결과를 실현하였다.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neues A* CCG Parsing Modell vor, bei dem die Wahrscheinlichkeit eines Baumes in Faktoren von CCG Kategorien und deren syntaktischen Abhängigkeiten zerlegt wird, die beide auf bidirektionalen LSTMs definiert sind. Unser Faktormodell ermöglicht die Vorkomputation aller Wahrscheinlichkeiten und läuft sehr effizient, während Satzstrukturen explizit über Abhängigkeiten modelliert werden. Unser Modell erzielt die neuesten Ergebnisse auf Englisch und Japanisch CCG Parsing.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model penghuraian A* CCG baru di mana kemungkinan pohon dikomposisi menjadi faktor dari kategori CCG dan dependensi sintaksnya berdua didefinisikan pada LSTM bidireksi. Model faktor kami memungkinkan precomputasi semua kemungkinan dan berjalan dengan sangat efisien, sementara model struktur kalimat secara eksplicit melalui dependensi. Model kami mencapai hasil terbaik dalam pemeriksaan CCG Inggris dan Jepang.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک مدل جدید A* CCG تحلیل که احتمال یک درخت در آن به عنوان کاربردهای کلاسی CCG و بستگی\u200cهای سنتاکتیک آن هر دو بر LSTMs دو مسیر تعریف شده است. Model factored ما اجازه می دهد که پیش از تعمیر همه احتمالات را اجازه می دهد و بسیار موثر است، در حالی که ساختارهای جمله را با توجه به طور وابستگی مدل می کند. مدل ما نتیجه\u200cهای هنر انگلیسی و ژاپنی ویرایش CCG را دریافت می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Biz Täze bir A* CCG tanyşdyrma modelini teklip edip görýäris we bir agaç kanunlarynyň CCG kategoriýasynyň faktörlerine we onuň sintaktik baglyklarynyň ikisi hem-de iki yönde tanyşdyrylýar Biziň faktörlerimiz hat sanlyklaryň öňünden bejerilmesine mümkin edýär we sözlem strukturlaryny daňardan örän täsirli işleýär. Biziň modelimiz iňlisçe we Japonça CCG tarapyndan gelen ýagdaýyň durumyny ýetip barýar.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe A* CCG verwerking model waarin die waarskynlikheid van 'n boom in faktore van CCG kategories en sy sintaktieke afhanklikheid beide gedefinieer word op bi- rigting LSTMs. Ons faktoreerde model laat toe die voorkompetering van alle waarskynlikheite en hardloop baie effektief, terwyl die modellering van setstrukture uitduidelik deur afhanklikhede. Ons model bereik die staat van die kuns resultate op Engels en Japanse CCG-verwerking.", 'am': 'አዲስ አ* CCG ፓርቲ ሞዴል እና የዛፍ ምናልባት የCCG ክፍተሮችን እና የሲንተርካቲ ደጋፊዎች ሁለቱም በሀይዳራዊ LSTMs ላይ የሚታወቁትን እና አዲስ አዲስ አካባቢ እና አዲስ የCCG ፓርቲ ምሳሌ እናሳስባለን፡፡ የግንኙነት ዓይነታችን የሁሉን ምሳሌ እንዲፈቅድ እና በተግባር ይሄዳል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በንግግሊዝና በጃፓንኛ CCG ማኅበረሰቢያ ላይ የሀገር የዓላማ ውጤት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz yeni A* CCG ayırma modeli təbliğ edirik ki, a ğacın mümkünlüyü CCG kategoriyalarının faktörlərinə və sintaktik bağlılıqlarına ikisi tərəfli LSTMs ilə tanımlıdır. Bizim fabrikatlı modelimiz bütün mümkünlüklərin ön-kompleksiyasına müvəffəqiyyəti verir və çox etkili işlər edir, sözlərin quruluşlarını müvəffəqiyyəti vasitəsilə modellendirir. Bizim modellərimiz İngilizce və Japonca CCG ayrılışdırması üçün sanat sonuçlarına yetişir.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন A* সিসিজি পার্গিং মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে একটি গাছের সম্ভাবনা সিসিজি বিভাগের কারখানায় নির্ধারণ করা হয় এবং তার সিন্ট্যাকটিক্টিক নির্ভর করা  আমাদের ফ্যাক্টরেড মডেল সকল সম্ভাবনার উপস্থাপনা এবং খুব কার্যকর করে চালানোর অনুমতি দেয়, যদিও বাক্যের কাঠামো স্পষ্ট ভাবে নির্ভর করে। আমাদের মডেল ইংরেজি এবং জাপানী সিসিজি পার্গিং নিয়ে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'sw': 'Tunapendekeza modeli mpya ya wimbo wa CCG ambapo uwezekano wa mti umejikita katika sababu za makundi ya CCG na kitendo chake kinategemea kwa ajili ya LSTMs binafsi. Our factored model allows the precomputation of all probabilities and runs very efficiently, while modeling sentence structures explicitly via dependencies.  Mfano wetu unafanikiwa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye wimbo wa Kiingereza na Kijapani wa CCG.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të ri analizimi të A* CCG në të cilin probabiliteti i një peme është shpërndarë në faktorë të kategorive CCG dhe varësitë e saj sintaktike të dyja të përcaktuara në LSTMs dy-drejtuese. Modeli ynë i faktorizuar lejon parallogaritjen e të gjitha probabiliteteve dhe funksionon shumë efektivisht, ndërsa modelon strukturat e fjalëve jashtëzakonisht nëpërmjet varësive. Modeli ynë arrin rezultatet më të mëdha në analizën angleze dhe japoneze të CCG.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր A*CNG-ի վերլուծության մոդել, որտեղ ծառի հավանականությունը բաժանվում է ԿԿԳ-ի կատեգորիաների գործոններով և նրա սինտակտիկ կախվածություններով, որոնք երկու ուղղություններով են սահմանվում: Մեր գործոնային մոդելը թույլ է տալիս բոլոր հավանականությունների նախահաշվարկը և աշխատում է շատ արդյունավետ, մինչ նախադասությունների կառուցվածքների մոդելը բացահայտորեն կախվածությունների միջոցով է: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին անգլերենի և ճապոնացի համակարգչային խմբագրության վերլուծության վրա:', 'ca': "Proposem un nou model d'analització de la GCC A* en el qual la probabilitat d'un arbre està descomposta en factors de categories de GCC i les seves dependencies sinàctiques, ambdós definides en LSTM bidireccionals. El nostre model fet permet la precomputació de totes les probabilitats i funciona molt eficientment, modelant explícitament les estructures de frases a través de dependencies. El nostre model aconsegueix els resultats més avançats en l'analització anglesa i japonesa de la CCG.", 'et': 'Pakume välja uue A* CCG parsimismudeli, kus puu tõenäosus laguneb CCG kategooriate teguriteks ja selle süntaktilised sõltuvused on mõlemad määratletud kahesuunalistel LSTMdel. Meie faktoriga mudel võimaldab eelkõige arvutada kõiki tõenäosusi ja töötab väga tõhusalt, samas modelleerides lausestruktuure selgesõnaliselt sõltuvuste kaudu. Meie mudel saavutab kaasaegsed tulemused inglise ja jaapani CCG parsimisel.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta A* CCG-jäsennysmallia, jossa puun todennäköisyys jakautuu CCG-kategorioiden tekijöihin ja sen syntaktiset riippuvuudet määritellään kaksisuuntaisissa LSTMs:issä. Faktorimallimme mahdollistaa kaikkien todennäköisyyksien esikomputaation ja toimii erittäin tehokkaasti, samalla kun lauserakenteet mallinnetaan nimenomaisesti riippuvuuksien kautta. Mallimme saavuttaa uusimmat tulokset englannin ja japanin CCG-jäsentämisessä.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi model analize A* CCG-a u kojem se vjerojatnost drveta raspoređuje u faktore kategorija CCG-a i njegove sintaktičke zavisnosti oboje definisane na dvosmjerne LSTMs-e. Naš faktorirani model omogućava predkomputiranje svih mogućnosti i vrlo efikasno funkcioniše, dok modelira strukture rečenice jasno putem ovisnosti. Naš model postiže rezultate umjetnosti na analizu engleskog i japanskog CCG-a.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový A* CCG parsovací model, ve kterém je pravděpodobnost stromu rozložena na faktory CCG kategorií a jeho syntaktické závislosti definované na obousměrných LSTMech. Náš faktorový model umožňuje předem vypočítat všechny pravděpodobnosti a běží velmi efektivně, zatímco modelování větových struktur explicitně prostřednictvím závislostí. Náš model dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na anglickém a japonském CCG parsování.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov A* CCG razčlenjevalni model, v katerem se verjetnost drevesa razdeli na faktorje kategorij CCG in njegove sintaktične odvisnosti, ki so opredeljene na dvosmernih LSTMs. Naš faktorski model omogoča predračunavanje vseh verjetnosti in teče zelo učinkovito, medtem ko modelira stavkovne strukture eksplicitno preko odvisnosti. Naš model dosega najsodobnejše rezultate pri angleškem in japonskem razčlenjevanju CCG.', 'ha': "We propose a new A* CCG parsing model in which the probability of a tree is decomposed into factors of CCG categories and its syntactic dependencies both defined on bi-directional LSTMs.  Misalinmu na fasalin shi yana yarda da misãlai ga duk masu yiwuwa kuma yana tafiyar da shi mai fasahan, alhãli kuwa yana motsar tsaro masu tsari da kuma a baya da ɗabi'a. Tuddalinmu yana sãmun fassarar-al'amarin-art kan parse na Ingiriya da Jabaniya CCG.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל מחקר A* CCG חדש בו הסבירות של עץ מתפרקת לגורמים של קטגוריות CCG והתלויות הסינטקטיות שלה שניהם מוגדרות על LSTMs ביכיווניים. המודל המפועל שלנו מאפשר את החישוב הקדמי של כל הסבירות והפעל באופן יעיל מאוד, בזמן שדוגמנים מבני משפטים באופן ברור דרך תלויות. המודל שלנו משיג את התוצאות החדשות ביותר באנגלית והיפנית על בדיקת CCG.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem anyar A* Kernel Kamahé iku kelompok barang kelas-karbote pancen kanggo ngilangno lan kelas barang japancen', 'bo': 'We propose a new A* CCG parsing model in which the probability of a tree is decomposed into factors of CCG categories and its syntactic dependencies both defined on bi-directional LSTMs. ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱས་པར་ཆོས་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་པ་དང་ནུས་ཡོད་ལག་ལེན་སྐྱོང་བ་ཡིན་པས།  ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་སྣང་དང་སྒྲ་བརྙན་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གནང་བ་རྣམས་མངོན་ཡོད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'A Full Non-Monotonic Transition System for Unrestricted Non-Projective Parsing', 'ar': 'نظام انتقال كامل غير رتيب للتحليل غير المقيد غير الإسقاطي', 'fr': 'Un système de transition non monotone complet pour une analyse non projective sans restriction', 'es': 'Un sistema de transición no monótono completo para el análisis no proyectivo sin restricciones', 'pt': 'Um sistema de transição não monotônico completo para análise não projetiva irrestrita', 'ja': '無制限の非プロジェクト構文解析のための完全な非単調遷移システム', 'zh': '用于无限非射影解析者全非单转系统', 'hi': 'अप्रतिबंधित गैर-प्रोजेक्टिव पार्सिंग के लिए एक पूर्ण गैर-मोनोटोनिक संक्रमण प्रणाली', 'ru': 'Полная немонотонная система перехода для неограниченного нецелевого анализа', 'ga': 'Córas Aistrithe Iomlán Neamh-mhonatónach le haghaidh Parsáil Neamhtheilgeanta Neamhshrianta', 'ka': 'უფრო მნონოტონიური გადაწყვეტილების სისტემა, რომელიც არ დასაზღვრული არ- პროექტიური გადაწყვეტილებისთვის', 'el': 'Ένα πλήρες μη μονοτονικό σύστημα μετάβασης για απεριόριστη μη προβολική ανάλυση', 'hu': 'Teljes, nem monotón átmeneti rendszer a korlátlan, nem projektív értelmezéshez', 'kk': 'Шектелмеген жоқ талдау үшін толық монотониялық аудару жүйесі', 'mk': 'Цел немонотонички транзициски систем за неограничено непроективно анализирање', 'it': "Un sistema di transizione non monotonica completo per un'analisi non proiettiva illimitata", 'lt': 'Visa ne monotoninė pereinamojo laikotarpio sistema neribotam neprojektyviam analizavimui', 'ms': 'Sistem Transisi Tidak Monotonik Penuh untuk Penghuraian Tidak Projektif Tidak Terhadir', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാക്കാത്ത പ്രോജക്ടിവ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള മുഴുവന്\u200d മോണോട്ടോണിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റം സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': 'A Full Non-Monotonic Transition System for Unrestricted Non-Projective Parsing', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдсан биш төсөөллийн шинжилгээний бүрэн монотоны шинжилгээгүй систем', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Pełny niemonotoniczny system przejścia do nieograniczonego nieprojekcyjnego parowania', 'ro': 'Un sistem complet de tranziție non-monotonică pentru analizarea nelimitată non-proiectivă', 'sr': 'Полни немонотични транзиционни систем за неограничено непроективно пројективно проанализиране', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ නොමොනෝටෝනික් සංවිධානය පද්ධතියName', 'so': 'Xiriiriga aan la xadeyn', 'sv': 'Ett fullständigt icke-monotoniskt övergångssystem för obegränsat icke-projektiv tolkning', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படாத த திட்டப்பணி பாசிங்குக்கான முழுமையான ஒற்றுமாற்றம் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'غیرمحدود غیر پروژیٹیو پارسینگ کے لئے ایک پول غیر مونوٹنیک ٹرانسیٹ سیسٹم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống chuyển đổi hoàn toàn không có kết quả', 'nl': 'Een volledig niet-monotoon overgangssysteem voor onbeperkte niet-projectieve parsing', 'bg': 'Пълна немотонична преходна система за неограничено непроективно анализиране', 'da': 'Et fuldt ikke-monotonisk overgangssystem til ubegrænset ikke-projektiv fortolkning', 'hr': 'Potpuni ne-monotonski prelazni sustav za neograničeno neprojektivno razmatranje', 'id': 'Sistem Transisi Tidak Monotonik Penuh untuk Penganalisan Tidak Proyektif Tidak Terbatas', 'ko': '무제한 비투사 문법 분석의 전 비단조 변환 시스템', 'de': 'Ein vollständiges nicht monotonisches Übergangssystem für uneingeschränktes nicht-projektives Parsing', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Upitiaji wa Kitamaduni wa Kitamaduni wa Kuchapisha Kipindi', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Hesablanmaýan Projektyz Taýýarlama üçin Doly Monotonik Hejim Sistemi', 'sq': 'Një sistem i plotë transicioni jo monotonik për analizimin jo të kufizuar jo projektiv', 'bn': 'নির্ধারিত প্রজেক্টিভ পার্সিং এর জন্য পুরো অমনোটোনিক পরিবর্তন সিস্টেম', 'hy': 'Ամբողջ ոչ մոնոտոնիկ հաղորդակցման համակարգը առանց սահմանափակումների պրոյեկտիվ վերլուծության համար', 'bs': 'Potpuni ne-monotonski prelazni sistem za neograničeno neprojektivno razmatranje', 'az': 'Qısırılmamış qeyri-proyektiv ayırma sistemi', 'ca': "Un sistema de transició no monotònic complet per a l'analització no restringida", 'fi': 'Täysi ei-monotoninen siirtymäjärjestelmä rajoittamattomaan ei-projektiiviseen parsaukseen', 'et': 'Täielik mittemonotooniline üleminekusüsteem piiramatu mitteprojektiivse parsimise jaoks', 'cs': 'Úplný non-monotonický přechodový systém pro neomezené neprojekční analýzy', 'jv': 'Full No-Monotonik Tarjamahan Sistem kanggo Gak Beograt', 'he': 'מערכת העברה מלאה לא מונטונית עבור מחקר לא מוגבל', 'sk': 'Popoln nemonotonični prehodni sistem za neomejeno neprojektivno razporejanje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འཆར་བཤེར་མེད་པའི་ཁ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚོད་ལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་འཆར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་'}
{'en': 'Restricted non-monotonicity has been shown beneficial for the projective arc-eager dependency parser in previous research, as posterior decisions can repair mistakes made in previous states due to the lack of information. In this paper, we propose a novel, fully non-monotonic transition system based on the non-projective Covington algorithm. As a non-monotonic system requires exploration of erroneous actions during the training process, we develop several non-monotonic variants of the recently defined dynamic oracle for the Covington parser, based on tight approximations of the loss. Experiments on datasets from the CoNLL-X and CoNLL-XI shared tasks show that a non-monotonic dynamic oracle outperforms the monotonic version in the majority of languages.', 'pt': 'A não-monotonicidade restrita mostrou-se benéfica para o analisador de dependência projetivo arc-eage em pesquisas anteriores, pois decisões posteriores podem reparar erros cometidos em estados anteriores devido à falta de informação. Neste artigo, propomos um novo sistema de transição totalmente não monotônico baseado no algoritmo não projetivo de Covington. Como um sistema não monotônico requer a exploração de ações errôneas durante o processo de treinamento, desenvolvemos várias variantes não monotônicas do oráculo dinâmico recentemente definido para o analisador Covington, com base em aproximações apertadas da perda. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados das tarefas compartilhadas CoNLL-X e CoNLL-XI mostram que um oráculo dinâmico não monotônico supera a versão monotônica na maioria das linguagens.', 'es': 'La no monotonicidad restringida ha demostrado ser beneficiosa para el analizador de dependencias proyectivas entusiastas de arco en investigaciones anteriores, ya que las decisiones posteriores pueden reparar errores cometidos en estados anteriores debido a la falta de información. En este artículo, proponemos un sistema de transición novedoso, totalmente no monótono, basado en el algoritmo no proyectivo de Covington. Como un sistema no monótono requiere la exploración de acciones erróneas durante el proceso de entrenamiento, desarrollamos varias variantes no monótonas del oráculo dinámico recientemente definido para el analizador de Covington, basadas en aproximaciones ajustadas de la pérdida. Experimentos en conjuntos de datos de las tareas compartidas de Conll-x y Conll-xi muestran que un oráculo dinámico no monótono supera a la versión monótona en la mayoría de los idiomas.', 'ru': 'Ограниченная немонотонность оказалась полезной для анализатора зависимостей проективной дуги в предыдущих исследованиях, поскольку последующие решения могут исправить ошибки, допущенные в предыдущих состояниях из-за отсутствия информации. В данной работе мы предлагаем новую, полностью немонотонную переходную систему, основанную на непроективном алгоритме Ковингтона. Поскольку немонотонная система требует исследования ошибочных действий в процессе обучения, мы разрабатываем несколько немонотонных вариантов недавно определенного динамического оракула для парсера Ковингтона, основанных на жестких приближениях потерь. Эксперименты над наборами данных из общих задач CoNLL-X и CoNLL-XI показывают, что немонотонный динамический оракул превосходит монотонный вариант на большинстве языков.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن عدم الرتابة المقيدة مفيد لمحلل التبعية الإسقاطي المتلهف في البحث السابق ، حيث يمكن للقرارات اللاحقة إصلاح الأخطاء التي حدثت في الحالات السابقة بسبب نقص المعلومات. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نظام انتقال جديد غير رتيب بالكامل يعتمد على خوارزمية كوفينجتون غير الإسقاطية. نظرًا لأن النظام غير الرتيب يتطلب استكشاف الإجراءات الخاطئة أثناء عملية التدريب ، فإننا نطور العديد من المتغيرات غير الرتيبة للوراكل الديناميكي الذي تم تحديده مؤخرًا لمحلل Covington ، بناءً على تقريب دقيق للخسارة. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعات البيانات من المهام المشتركة CoNLL-X و CoNLL-XI أن أوراكل ديناميكي غير رتيب يتفوق على النسخة الرتيبة في غالبية اللغات.', 'zh': '前论,受限非单调性已验射影弧渴赖解析器益,以后验决策可修复前失也。 本文建一种基于非射影科文顿算法的新型全非单调过渡系统。 非单调系统须于训练中探索错误动作,所以我们基于损耗的紧密近似,为Covington解析器开发了近定义的动态预言机的几个非单调变体。 凡CoNLL-X、CoNLL-XI共事之数实验,非独调动机在多优于单调版本。', 'hi': 'प्रतिबंधित गैर-मोनोटोनिकता को पिछले शोध में प्रोजेक्टिव आर्क-उत्सुक निर्भरता पार्सर के लिए फायदेमंद दिखाया गया है, क्योंकि पीछे के निर्णय जानकारी की कमी के कारण पिछले राज्यों में की गई गलतियों की मरम्मत कर सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, पूरी तरह से गैर-मोनोटोनिक संक्रमण प्रणाली गैर-प्रोजेक्टिव कोविंगटन एल्गोरिथ्म के आधार पर। चूंकि एक गैर-मोनोटोनिक प्रणाली को प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के दौरान गलत कार्यों की खोज की आवश्यकता होती है, इसलिए हम नुकसान के तंग सन्निकटन के आधार पर कोविंगटन पार्सर के लिए हाल ही में परिभाषित गतिशील ओरेकल के कई गैर-मोनोटोनिक रूपों को विकसित करते हैं। CoNLL-X और CoNLL-XI साझा कार्यों से डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक गैर-मोनोटोनिक गतिशील ओरेकल अधिकांश भाषाओं में मोनोटोनिक संस्करण को मात देता है।', 'fr': "La non-monotonie restreinte s'est avérée bénéfique pour l'analyseur de dépendance projective désireux d'arc dans des recherches antérieures, car des décisions postérieures peuvent réparer des erreurs commises dans des états précédents en raison du manque d'informations. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau système de transition totalement non monotone basé sur l'algorithme non projectif de Covington. Comme un système non monotone nécessite l'exploration d'actions erronées pendant le processus d'apprentissage, nous développons plusieurs variantes non monotones de l'oracle dynamique récemment défini pour l'analyseur de Covington, basées sur des approximations précises de la perte. Des expériences sur des ensembles de données provenant des tâches partagées ConLL-X et ConLL-xi montrent qu'un oracle dynamique non monotone surpasse la version monotone dans la plupart des langues.", 'ja': '制限された非単調性は、情報の欠如により以前の状態で行われた間違いを修復する可能性があるため、以前の研究で射影的アークイーガー依存性解析器に有益であることが示されている。本稿では、非投影的コビントン・アルゴリズムに基づいた、完全に非単調な新規の遷移系を提案する。非単調システムは、トレーニングプロセス中の誤ったアクションの探索を必要とするため、損失の厳密な近似に基づいて、最近定義されたCovingtonパーサーの動的オラクルのいくつかの非単調な変形を開発します。CoNLL - XおよびCoNLL - XI共有タスクのデータセットの実験では、非単調な動的オラクルは、ほとんどの言語で単調なバージョンよりも優れていることが示されています。', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go bhfuil neamh-monotonicity srianta tairbheach don pharsálaí spleáchais stua-eagrán réamh-mheasta i dtaighde roimhe seo, toisc gur féidir le cinntí posterior botúin a rinneadh i stáit roimhe seo a dheisiú mar gheall ar an easpa faisnéise. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid córas trasdula úrnua, iomlán neamh-mhónónach bunaithe ar algartam neamhtheilgeach Covington. Toisc go dteastaíonn iniúchadh ar ghníomhartha earráideacha le linn an phróisis oiliúna de bharr córas neamh-mhonatóiceach, forbraímid roinnt malairtí neamh-mhonatócha den oracle dinimiciúil a sainíodh le déanaí don pharsálaí Covington, bunaithe ar mheastacháin dochta ar an gcaillteanas. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair thacair ó thascanna comhroinnte CoNLL-X agus CoNLL-XI go sáraíonn oracle dinimiciúil neamh-mhonatónach an leagan monotonach i dtromlach na dteangacha.', 'ka': 'პროექტიური arc-eager dependency parser წინა შესწავლობაში, როგორც შემდეგ გადასწავლობა შეცდომილებები წინა სტატიურ სტატიულებში შეუძლებელია. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ პროექტიური, უფრო მონოტონიური გადაცვლის სისტემა, რომელიც არ არის პროექტიური კოვინგტონის ალგორიტიმზე დაბაზიან. როგორც არ მონოტონიული სისტემა უნდა შეცდომა მოქმედების განსხვავება განსხვავებული პროცესის დროში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ რამდენიმე არ მონოტონიული გარიანტები, რომელიც ახლა განსაზღვრებული დინამიკური ორაკულის მო CoNLL-X და CoNLL-XI დაყოფილი საქმედების მონაცემების გამოცდილობა ჩვენებს, რომ არ მონოტონიური დინამიკური ორაკული მონოტონიური ვერსია უფრო დინამიკური ენების უფრო დინამიკური ვერსია გა', 'hu': 'A korábbi kutatásokban a korlátozott nem monotonitás előnyösnek bizonyult a projektív ív-lelkes függőségi elemző számára, mivel a későbbi döntések az információhiány miatt a korábbi államokban elkövetett hibákat javíthatják. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új, teljesen nem monoton átmeneti rendszert javasolunk, amely a nem projektív Covington algoritmuson alapul. Mivel egy nem monoton rendszer téves tevékenységek feltárását igényli az edzési folyamat során, a Covington parser nemrégiben definiált dinamikus orákulumának számos nem monoton variánsát fejlesztjük ki, a veszteség szoros közelítése alapján. A CoNLL-X és CoNLL-XI megosztott feladatok adathalmazain végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a nem monoton dinamikus orákulum a nyelvek többségében felülmúlja a monoton változatot.', 'el': 'Η περιορισμένη μη μονοτονία έχει αποδειχθεί ευεργετική για τον προβολικό αναλυτή εξάρτησης τόξου σε προηγούμενη έρευνα, καθώς οι μεταγενέστερες αποφάσεις μπορούν να διορθώσουν λάθη που έγιναν σε προηγούμενες καταστάσεις λόγω της έλλειψης πληροφοριών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο, πλήρως μη μονοτονικό μεταβατικό σύστημα βασισμένο στον μη προβολικό αλγόριθμο Κόβινγκτον. Καθώς ένα μη μονοτονικό σύστημα απαιτεί διερεύνηση λανθασμένων ενεργειών κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαιδευτικής διαδικασίας, αναπτύσσουμε αρκετές μη μονοτονικές παραλλαγές του πρόσφατα καθορισμένου δυναμικού μαντείου για τον αναλυτή Κόβινγκτον, με βάση αυστηρές προσεγγίσεις της απώλειας. Πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων από τις κοινές εργασίες CoNLL-X και CoNLL-XI δείχνουν ότι ένα μη μονοτονικό δυναμικό μαντείο ξεπερνά την μονοτονική έκδοση στις περισσότερες γλώσσες.', 'mk': 'Ограничен немонотонитет се покажа корисен за проективниот анализатор на зависноста со желба за арк во претходните истражувања, бидејќи задните одлуки можат да ги поправат грешките направени во претходните држави поради недостатокот на информации. Во овој весник предложуваме нов, целосно немонотонски транзициски систем базиран на непроективниот алгоритм Ковингтон. Како што не-монотонички систем бара истражување на грешни дејства за време на процесот на обука, развиваме неколку немонотонички варијанти од неодамна дефинираниот динамичен оракл за Ковингтон анализатор, базиран на тесни приближувања на загубата. Експериментите на датотеките од заедничките задачи CoNLL-X и CoNLL-XI покажуваат дека не-монотоничкиот динамичен оракл ја надминува монотоничката верзија во повеќето јазици.', 'it': "La non monotonicità limitata è stata dimostrata vantaggiosa per il parser di dipendenza proiettivo desideroso di arco nelle ricerche precedenti, in quanto le decisioni posteriori possono riparare gli errori commessi negli stati precedenti a causa della mancanza di informazioni. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo sistema di transizione completamente non monotonico basato sull'algoritmo non proiettivo Covington. Poiché un sistema non monotonico richiede l'esplorazione di azioni erronee durante il processo di allenamento, sviluppiamo diverse varianti non monotoniche dell'oracolo dinamico recentemente definito per il parser Covington, sulla base di strette approssimazioni della perdita. Esperimenti su set di dati dei compiti condivisi CoNLL-X e CoNLL-XI mostrano che un oracolo dinamico non monotonico supera la versione monotonica nella maggior parte delle lingue.", 'lt': 'Buvo įrodyta, kad ankstesnių tyrimų metu prognozuojamam priklausomybės analizatoriui naudingas ribotas monotoniškumas, nes vėlesni sprendimai gali ištaisyti klaidas, padarytas ankstesnėse valstybėse dėl informacijos trūkumo. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują visiškai monotoninę pereinamojo laikotarpio sistemą, pagrįstą neprjektyviu Kovingtono algoritmu. As a non-monotonic system requires exploration of erroneous actions during the training process, we develop several non-monotonic variants of the recently defined dynamic oracle for the Covington parser, based on tight approximations of the loss.  Experiments on datasets from the CoNLL-X and CoNLL-XI shared tasks show that a non-monotonic dynamic oracle outperforms the monotonic version in the majority of languages.', 'ml': 'പ്രോജക്റ്റീവ് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനായി പരിഹരിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രോജക്റ്റിവ് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പരിശോധനത്തിന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രോജക്ടീവ് കോവിങ്ടണ്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിതം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും മോണോട്ടോണിക്ക് അല്ലാത്ത പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d തെറ്റായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു മോണോട്ടിനിക്ക് സിസ്റ്റം ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് അടുത്തുതന കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d- എക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d- എക്സിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'In-nuqqas ta’ monotoniċità ristretta ntwera li hija ta’ benefiċċju għall-analizzatur proġettiv tad-dipendenza ark-eager fir-riċerka preċedenti, peress li deċiżjonijiet posterjuri jistgħu jsewwu żbalji li saru fi stati preċedenti minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ informazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu sistema ta’ tranżizzjoni ġdida, kompletament mhux monotonika bbażata fuq l-algoritmu Covington mhux proġettiv. Billi sistema mhux monotonika teħtieġ esplorazzjoni ta’ azzjonijiet żbaljati matul il-proċess ta’ taħriġ, a ħna niżviluppaw diversi varjanti mhux monotoniċi tal-oraklu dinamiku definit reċentement għall-analizzatur Covington, ibbażat fuq approssimazzjonijiet stretti tat-telf. L-esperimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta mill-kompiti kondiviżi CoNLL-X u CoNLL-XI juru li oraklu dinamiku mhux monotoniku jaqbeż il-verżjoni monotonika fil-maġġoranza tal-lingwi.', 'ms': 'Bukan-monotoniti terbatas telah dipaparkan bermanfaat untuk penghurai dependensi projektif-arc-eager dalam kajian terdahulu, kerana keputusan belakang boleh memperbaiki kesilapan yang dilakukan di negara terdahulu disebabkan kekurangan maklumat. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan sebuah sistem transisi yang tidak monotonik berdasarkan algoritma Covington yang tidak projektif. As a non-monotonic system requires exploration of erroneous actions during the training process, we develop several non-monotonic variants of the recently defined dynamic oracle for the Covington parser, based on tight approximations of the loss.  Eksperimen pada set data dari tugas kongsi CoNLL-X dan CoNLL-XI menunjukkan bahawa orakul dinamik bukan monotonik melampaui versi monotonik dalam kebanyakan bahasa.', 'pl': 'Ograniczona niemonotoniczność okazała się korzystna dla projektywnego parsera zależności łukowej w poprzednich badaniach, ponieważ tylne decyzje mogą naprawić błędy popełnione w poprzednich stanach z powodu braku informacji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy, w pełni niemonotoniczny system przejściowy oparty na nieprojekcyjnym algorytmie Covingtona. Ponieważ system niemonotoniczny wymaga eksploracji błędnych działań podczas procesu treningowego, opracowujemy kilka niemonotonicznych wariantów niedawno zdefiniowanej dynamicznej wyroczni dla parsera Covingtona, opartych na ścisłych przybliżeniach straty. Eksperymenty na zbiorach danych ze wspólnych zadań CoNLL-X i CoNLL-XI pokazują, że niemonotoniczna dynamiczna wyrocznia przewyższa wersję monotoniczną w większości języków.', 'no': 'Avgrensa ikkje-monotonitet er vist nyttig for den prosjektive båkeønske avhengighetsanalyseren i tidlegare forskning, sidan etter avgjøringar kan retta feil gjeven i tidlegare tilstandar på grunn av manglar informasjon. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit novel, fullstendig ikkje-monotonisk overgangssystem basert på ikkje-projektiv Covington-algoritmen. Som eit ikkje-monotonisk system krev utforsking av feil handlingar under opplæringsprosessen, utviklar vi fleire ikkje-monotoniske variantar av den nyleg definerte dynamiske orakelen for Covington-tolkaren, basert på sterke tilnærmingar av tapen. Eksperimentar på datasett frå CoNLL-X og CoNLL-XI delte oppgåver viser at ein ikkje-monotonisk dynamisk orakel utfører monotonisk versjon i dei fleste språka.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх судалгаанд хязгаарлагдсан ганц байдалгүй байдлыг хэрэгжүүлсэн. Учир нь дараагийн шийдвэр мэдээлэл байхгүй учраас өмнөх орнуудад алдаа гаргасан алдаа засаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Covington алгоритмын үндсэн шилжүүлэлтийн шилжүүлэлтийн шилжүүлэлтийн шилжүүлэлтийн системийг санал болгож байна. Боловсролын үйл явцын үед буруу үйл явдлыг судлах шаардлагатай учраас бид Covington хуваалцагчийн саяхан тодорхойлогдсон динамик хэлбэрүүдийн олон хэлбэрүүдийг хөгжүүлдэг. CoNLL-X болон CoNLL-XI-ын хуваалцсан ажил дээрх өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд нь монотон биш орвал хэлний ихэнх хэл дээр монотон хувилбарыг илүүтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Restricționarea non-monotonicității s-a dovedit benefică pentru parserul dependenței proiectiv dornic de arc în cercetările anterioare, deoarece deciziile posterioare pot repara greșelile făcute în statele anterioare din cauza lipsei de informații. În această lucrare, propunem un nou sistem de tranziție complet non-monotonic bazat pe algoritmul non-proiectiv Covington. Deoarece un sistem non-monotonic necesită explorarea acțiunilor eronate în timpul procesului de instruire, dezvoltăm mai multe variante non-monotonice ale oracolului dinamic definit recent pentru parserul Covington, pe baza aproximărilor strânse ale pierderii. Experimentele pe seturi de date din sarcinile comune CoNLL-X și CoNLL-XI arată că un oracol dinamic non-monotonic depășește versiunea monotonică în majoritatea limbilor.', 'si': 'සීමාවිත නොමොනොටෝනිසිත්වය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පසුගිය පරීක්ෂණාවේ ප්\u200dරයෝජිතය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200d මේ පැත්තේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නොවින්ටන් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක නොමොනොටෝනික වෙනස් පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. නොමොනොටෝනික් පද්ධතියක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලාවේ වැරදි ක්\u200dරියාවක් පරීක්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට, අපි නොමොනොටෝනික වෙනස් විදිහට විශ්ව CoNLL-X සහ CoNLL-XI භාවිත වැඩක් නොමොනෝටෝනික වාර්තාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට මොනෝටෝනික වාර්තාවක් නොමොනෝටෝනි', 'kk': 'Бірінші зерттеулерде шектелген монотониялық емес болу үшін проективті бұрыш зерттеулерде тәуелдік талдаушы үшін пайдалы көрсетілді, себебі кейінгі шешімдері мәліметті жоқ себебі алдыңғы күйде қателер Бұл қағазда, біз проективті жоқ Ковингтон алгоритміне негізделген романдық, толық монотон емес ауыстыру жүйесін ұсынамыз. Монотон емес жүйесінде оқыту процесінде қате әрекеттерді зерттеу керек болса, біз Kovington парзерінің жаңа анықталған динамикалық оракулардың бірнеше параметрлерін өзгертеміз, жоғалтылығының жақын жақындау негізінде. CoNLL-X және CoNLL-XI ортақтастырылған тапсырмалардың деректер қорларының тәжірибесі, монотониялық динамикалық оракулы тілдердің көпшілігінде монотониялық нұсқасын жасайды.', 'so': "Sida darteed go'aanka dambeeya ayaa hagaajin kara qalabka lagu sameeyay wadamada hore sababtoo ah baahida macluumaadka la’aanta darteed. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal-warqad oo dhan oo aan monotonik ahayn oo ku saleysan algoritka aan wax dhaqan ee Covington. Sida uu nidaamka aan monotonic aheyn u baahan yahay baaritaan shaqooyin qalloocan ah xiliga waxbarashada, waxaynu horumarinnaa qaar ka duwan oo aan monotonic ah oo ugu dhowaan qoraalka qoyska ee loo yaqaan qoraalka daboolka, iyadoo ku saleysan qiyaastii khasaarada. Imtixaanka ku saabsan kooNLL-X iyo CoNLL-XI waxey muuqataa in qofka qofka aan mas’uulka aheyn uu soo bandhigo qoraalka mantonika oo ku qoran luuqadaha badan.", 'sr': 'Ограничена немонотоничност показана је полезна за проективни анализер зависимости који жели да се зависи у предишним исследованијима, посколико последње решеније могу поправити грешке изведене у предишним штатима заради недостатка информације. U ovom papiru predlažemo roman, potpuno ne-monotonski prelazni sistem na osnovu neprojektivnog kovingtona algoritma. Kao non-monotonski sistem zahteva istraživanje grešnih akcija tokom treninga, razvijamo nekoliko ne-monotonskih varianta nedavno definiranog dinamičnog oraka za kovington analizatora, na temelju čvrsti približavanja gubitka. Eksperimenti o setima podataka iz CoNLL-X i CoNLL-XI zajedničkih zadataka pokazuju da ne-monotonski dinamični orakl iznosi monotonsku verziju većine jezika.', 'sv': 'Begränsad icke-monotonitet har visat sig vara fördelaktig för den projektiva bågslängtande beroendetolkaren i tidigare forskning, eftersom senare beslut kan reparera misstag som gjorts i tidigare tillstånd på grund av brist på information. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt, helt icke-monotoniskt övergångssystem baserat på den icke-projektiva Covington algoritmen. Eftersom ett icke-monotoniskt system kräver utforskning av felaktiga handlingar under träningsprocessen, utvecklar vi flera icke-monotoniska varianter av det nyligen definierade dynamiska oraklet för Covington parser, baserat på snäva approximationer av förlusten. Experiment på datauppsättningar från CoNLL-X och CoNLL-XI delade uppgifter visar att ett icke-monotoniskt dynamiskt orakel överträffar den monotoniska versionen på de flesta språk.', 'ur': 'محدود غیر monotonicity کے لئے پہلے تحقیقات میں پروژیکٹیوں کی آرک-خواہش اعتماد پارچر کے لئے فائدہ دکھائی گئی ہے، کیونکہ پیچھے فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے پہلے ایالات میں خطاؤں کی اصلاح کر سکتے ہیں جو معلومات غیر معلومات کے سبب کیا گیا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک روانی، کامل غیر منوٹونی تغییرات سیستم کی پیشنهاد کریں جو غیر پروژیکٹین الگوریتم پر بنیاد ہے. ایک غیر منوٹونی سیستم کی وجہ سے تدریس پر غلط عمل کی تعقیب کی ضرورت ہے، ہم نے بہت سی غیر منوٹونی الفاظت کو کوینگٹن پارچر کے لئے پہلے مقرر کیا گیا ہے، جو خسارہ کی مضبوط تقرب پر بنیاد ہے. CoNLL-X اور CoNLL-XI کے ساتھ شریک ٹاکسٹ کے ڈیٹ سٹوں کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ایک غیر مونوٹنی ڈیٹنیک ڈیٹنیک اوراکل بہت سی زبانوں میں مونوٹنیک نسخہ کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'திட்டமிடப்பட்ட சார்பு ஆர்க் சார்பு முந்தைய ஆய்வில் பரிசுத்தமுடியாத முறையான திட்டத்திற்கு நன்மையாக காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஏனெனில் பின்வரிசை  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் திட்டமிட்ட காப்டிங்டன் அல்லது அடிப்படையில் முழுமையான மாற்று அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டில் தவறான செயல்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டுமானால், நாம் சமீபத்தில் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மாறுபாடுகளின் சில மாறுபாடு CoNLL- X மற்றும் CoNLL- XI பகிர்ந்த பணிகளில் இருந்து தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் பெரும்பாலான மொழிகளில் உள்ள மொனோடானிக் பதிப்பை வெளியேற்றுகிறத', 'uz': "Name In this paper, we propose a novel, fully non-monotonic transition system based on the non-projective Covington algorithm.  Taʼminlovchi vazifa davomida noto'g'ri amallarni qidirish kerak. Biz yaqinda ko'pchilik aniqlangan Dynak orasidagi ko'pchilikni o'rganish kerak, qobiliyatning qisqacha qisqartmalarini yaratib boʻlmadi. KoNLL-X va CoNLL-XI ishlaridan bajarilgan maʼlumotlar tizimlarini ko'pchilik tillarda monotonik versiyasini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sự hạn chế không đơn điệu đã được cho thấy có lợi cho cha xứ bị ảnh hưởng bởi những nghiên cứu trước, vì những quyết định sau có thể sửa chữa lỗi lầm do thiếu thông tin. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống chuyển đổi hoàn toàn không đơn điệu dựa trên thuật toán Covington không dự bị. Do hệ thống không đơn điệu đòi hỏi khám phá những hành động sai lầm trong quá trình đào tạo, chúng tôi phát triển vài biến thể không đơn điệu của nhà tiên tri động mới được xác định, dựa trên phương pháp tỉ mỉ của mất mát. Thí nghiệm trên các tập tin từ hai công việc chia sẻ Coyl-XI cho thấy rằng một nhà tiên tri động phi-monoonic vượt qua phiên bản độc động ở hầu hết các ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Ограничената немонотонност е показана полезна за проективния аргожаден анализатор на зависимост в предишни изследвания, тъй като последващите решения могат да поправят грешки, направени в предишни състояния поради липсата на информация. В тази статия предлагаме нова, напълно немонотонична преходна система, базирана на непроективния алгоритъм на Ковингтън. Тъй като една немонотонична система изисква проучване на погрешни действия по време на процеса на обучение, ние разработваме няколко немонотонични варианта на наскоро дефинирания динамичен оракул за Ковингтън анализатор, базирани на тесни приблизителни стойности на загубата. Експерименти с набори от данни от споделените задачи на CoNLL-X и CoNLL-XI показват, че не-монотоничен динамичен оракул превъзхожда монотоничната версия в повечето езици.', 'nl': 'Beperkte niet-monotoniciteit is gunstig gebleken voor de projectieve arc-eager afhankelijkheidsparser in vorig onderzoek, omdat latere beslissingen fouten kunnen herstellen die in eerdere staten zijn gemaakt vanwege het gebrek aan informatie. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw, volledig niet-monotoon overgangssysteem voor gebaseerd op het niet-projectieve Covington algoritme. Omdat een niet-monotoon systeem verkenning vereist van foutieve acties tijdens het trainingsproces, ontwikkelen we verschillende niet-monotone varianten van het recent gedefinieerde dynamische orakel voor de Covington parser, gebaseerd op nauwe benaderingen van het verlies. Experimenten met datasets van de gedeelde taken CoNLL-X en CoNLL-XI tonen aan dat een niet-monotoon dynamisch orakel de monotone versie in de meeste talen overtreft.', 'da': 'Begrænset ikke-monotonitet har vist sig gavnligt for den projektive bue-ivrige afhængighedsfortolker i tidligere forskning, da efterfølgende beslutninger kan reparere fejl begået i tidligere stater på grund af manglen på information. I denne artikel foreslår vi et nyt, fuldt ud ikke-monotonisk overgangssystem baseret på den ikke-projektive Covington algoritme. Da et ikke-monotonisk system kræver udforskning af fejlagtige handlinger under træningsprocessen, udvikler vi flere ikke-monotoniske varianter af det nyligt definerede dynamiske orakel for Covington-fortolkeren, baseret på stramme tilnærmelser af tabet. Eksperimenter med datasæt fra CoNLL-X og CoNLL-XI delte opgaver viser, at et ikke-monotonisk dynamisk orakel overstiger den monotoniske version på de fleste sprog.', 'de': 'Eingeschränkte Nicht-Monotonizität hat sich in früheren Forschungen als vorteilhaft für den projektiven Arc-Eager Dependency Parser erwiesen, da spätere Entscheidungen Fehler beheben können, die in früheren Zuständen aufgrund fehlender Informationen gemacht wurden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges, vollständig nichtmonotonisches Übergangssystem vor, das auf dem nicht-projektiven Covington-Algorithmus basiert. Da ein nicht-monotones System die Erforschung fehlerhafter Handlungen während des Trainingsprozesses erfordert, entwickeln wir mehrere nicht-monotone Varianten des kürzlich definierten dynamischen Orakels für den Covington Parser, basierend auf engen Näherungen des Verlustes. Experimente an Datensätzen der gemeinsamen Aufgaben CoNLL-X und CoNLL-XI zeigen, dass ein nicht-monotones dynamisches Orakel die monotone Version in den meisten Sprachen übertrifft.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je korisno ograničeno ne-monotoničnost za projektivni analitičar ovisnosti o arhitektu u prethodnim istraživanjima, jer posljednje odluke mogu popraviti greške koje su napravile u prethodnim državama zbog nedostatka informacija. U ovom papiru predlažemo roman, potpuno ne-monotonski sustav premještaja na temelju neprojektivnog kovingtona algoritma. Kao non-monotonski sustav zahtijeva istraživanje grešnih akcija tijekom procesa obuke, razvijamo nekoliko ne-monotonskih varianta nedavno definiranog dinamičnog oraka za analizatora Covington a na temelju čvrsti približavanja gubitka. Iskusi na podacima CoNLL-X i CoNLL-XI zajedničkih zadataka pokazuju da ne monotonski dinamični orakl nadmašuje monotonsku verziju većine jezika.', 'id': 'Non-monotonisitas terbatas telah menunjukkan manfaat untuk proyektif arc-eager dependency parser dalam penelitian sebelumnya, karena keputusan belakang dapat memperbaiki kesalahan yang dilakukan di negara sebelumnya karena kekurangan informasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah novel, sistem transisi sepenuhnya tidak monotonik berdasarkan algoritma Covington yang tidak proyektif. Sebagai sistem non-monotonik membutuhkan eksplorasi aksi yang salah selama proses latihan, kami mengembangkan beberapa varian non-monotonik dari orakul dinamik yang baru-baru ini didefinisikan untuk Covington parser, berdasarkan pendekatan ketat kehilangan. Eksperimen pada dataset dari CoNLL-X dan CoNLL-XI tugas berbagi menunjukkan bahwa orakul dinamik bukan monotonik melebihi versi monotonik dalam kebanyakan bahasa.', 'fa': 'محدودیت غیر monotonicity محدودیت برای ویرایشگر بستگی\u200cهای پروژه\u200cآور در تحقیقات قبلی به سودی نشان داده شده است، زیرا تصمیمات پشت سر می\u200cتواند اشتباهی که در ایالات قبلی انجام شده را به دلیل غیر اطلاعات درست کند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روزنامه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سیستم تغییر غیر منطقه\u200cای بر اساس الگوریتم غیر پروژه\u200cدهنده کووینگتون است. به عنوان یک سیستم غیر monotonic نیاز به تحقیقات فعالیت اشتباهی در طول فرایند آموزش، ما چندین متفاوت غیر monotonic را توسعه می\u200cدهیم که اخیراً واژه\u200cهای داینامیک تعریف شده برای ویژه\u200cکننده کووینگتون، بر اساس نزدیک شدن خسارت است. تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای CoNLL-X و CoNLL-XI کارهای مشترک نشان می\u200cدهند که یک اوراکل غیر monotonic داینامیک نسخه monotonic را بیشتر زبان\u200cها بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kushindwa kutokuwa na upendo umeonekana kuwa na faida kwa mradi wa kutegemea mradi wa mradi katika utafiti uliopita, kwa sababu maamuzi ya baadae yanaweza kurekebisha makosa yaliyofanywa katika nchi zilizopita kutokana na ukosefu wa taarifa. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza riwaya, mfumo wa mpito usio wa kimapenzi ulio na msingi wa algorithi isiyo ya mradi wa Covington. Kama mfumo usio na mantiki unahitaji kuchunguza vitendo vibaya wakati wa mchakato wa mafunzo, tunaendelea tofauti kadhaa isiyo na mantiki za hivi karibuni za michezo ya kimapenzi kwa ajili ya chama cha Covington, kwa kutumia takribani kupoteza kwa kiasi kikubwa. Majaribio kwenye seti za taarifa kutoka kazi za CoNLL-X na CoNLL-XI zinaonyesha kuwa neno lisilo la kimapenzi linaonyesha toleo la utamaduni kwa lugha nyingi.', 'tr': 'Ýagtymly gabdalyk-monotoniýaty öňki araştyrymda faýllary ýok bolmagy sebäpli öňki döwletlerde ýalňyşlary bejermek üçin bir faydaly görkezildi. Bu kagyzda, biz tamamen monotoniýa-döwürme sistemasyna daşary Kovington algoritmi döwletlendirdik. Monotonik sistemada eğitim prosesiniň ýagdaýynda ýalňyş işlerini keşif etmesi gerek bolýar. Biz Kovington parsadçynyň ýagdaýynda soňra tanyş edilen dinamik a ýratynyň birnäçe üýtgeşmelerini döredip gelip bilýäris. CoNLL-X we CoNLL', 'af': "Begrenseerde nie-monotonisiteit is gebruiklik getoon vir die projektiewe boog-eager afhanklikheidspanseerder in vorige ondersoek, omdat posteriore besluite kan herstel foute gemaak in vorige staatste vanweë die ontbreek van inligting. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n roman, volledig nie-monotoniese oorgang stelsel gebaseer op die nie-projektiewe Covington algoritme. As 'n non-monotoniese stelsel benodig uitsoek van foute aksies tydens die onderwerp proses, ontwikkel ons verskeie nie-monotoniese variante van die onlangs gedefinieerde dinamike orakel vir die Covington ontleerder, gebaseer op tige toekoms van die verlies. Eksperimente op datastelle van die CoNLL-X en CoNLL-XI gedeelde taak vertoon dat 'n non-monotoniese dinamiese orakel die monotoniese weergawe in die meeste taal uitvoer.", 'ko': '이전의 연구에서 비단조성을 제한하는 것은 투영호가 해석기에 의존하는 데 유리하다는 것이 증명되었다. 왜냐하면 백업 결정은 정보 부족으로 인해 이전의 상태에서 범한 오류를 복구할 수 있기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 비투영 코빙톤 알고리즘을 바탕으로 한 신형 완전 비단조 과도 시스템을 제시했다.비단조 시스템은 훈련 과정에서 잘못된 행위를 탐색해야 하기 때문에 우리는 손실에 대한 엄격한 근사성을 바탕으로 Covington 해석기를 위해 최근에 정의된 동적 예언의 몇 가지 비단조 변체를 개발했다.CoNLL-X와 CoNLL XI 공유 작업의 데이터 집합에서 진행된 실험에 따르면 대부분의 언어에서 비단조로운 동적oracle의 성능은 단조로운 버전보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Jo-monotoniteti i kufizuar është treguar i dobishëm për analizuesin projektiv të varësisë ark-dëshiruar në kërkimet e mëparshme, pasi vendimet e mëparshme mund të riparojnë gabimet e bërë në shtetet e mëparshëm për shkak të mungesës së informacionit. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një sistem të ri, krejtësisht jo-monotonik tranzicion bazuar në algoritmin jo-projektiv Kovington. Si një sistem jo-monotonik kërkon eksplorimin e veprimeve të gabuara gjatë procesit të stërvitjes, ne zhvillojmë disa variante jo-monotonike të orakullit dinamik të përcaktuar kohët e fundit për analizuesin e Covington, bazuar në përafërsime të ngushta të humbjes. Eksperimentet mbi grupet e të dhënave nga detyrat e përbashkëta CoNLL-X dhe CoNLL-XI tregojnë se një orakul dinamik jo monotonik ekziston në version in monotonik në shumicën e gjuhëve.', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ սահմանափակված ոչ մոնոտոնիզմը օգտակար է նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունների ընթացքում նախատեսված անկախվածության պրոեկտիվ հաշվի առնելու համար, քանի որ հետագա որոշումները կարող են վերականգնել նախորդ նահանգներում արված սխալները տեղեկատվության Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր, ամբողջովին ոչ մոնոտոնիկ հաղորդակցման համակարգ, որը հիմնված է ոչ պրոեկտիվ Կովինգտոնի ալգորիթմի վրա: Որովհետև ոչ մոնոտոնիկ համակարգը պահանջում է սխալ գործողությունների ուսումնասիրելու ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում, մենք զարգանում ենք մի քանի ոչ մոնոտոնիկ տարբերակներ Կովինգտոնի վերջերս սահմանված դինամիկ խոսքի համար, հիմնված կորստի խիստ մոտեցումների վրա: Experiments on datasets from the CoNLL-X and CoNLL-XI shared tasks show that a non-monotonic dynamic oracle outperforms the monotonic version in the majority of languages.', 'am': 'የተከለከለው ስህተት ሳይኖር ለፕሮጀክት-አርክስ-ፈቃድ ተሟጋቾች ለመጠቀም ተገልጦአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮጀክት፣ ፕሮጀክት ካውንቲንቶን አልጎሪትምን በተመሳሳይ፣ የሞቶኒ ያልሆነውን የክፍለ ጥምቀት ስርዓት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በጥያቄው ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ የስሕተት ሥራ መግለጫ እንደሚፈልግ፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ የተለየ የክቡንቲንቶን አካላቢ የጥያቄ ክፍል፣ የጥፋት አካባቢ በተመሳሳይ የተደረገውን ብዙዎችን የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ከCoNLL-X እና CoNLL-XI ስራ የተሰራጨውን ዳታተር ፈተናዎች በአብዛኞቹ ቋንቋዎች የሞቶኒካዊ ዲያናክል የሞቶኒክ ክፍተት እንዲያወጣ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণায় প্রকল্পের প্রজেক্টিভ আর্ক-ইচ্ছা নির্ভর করার জন্য প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবস্থা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, কারণ পোস্টারের সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছে য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রজেক্টিভ কভিঙ্টন অ্যালগরিদমের উপর ভিত্তি করে একটি উপন্যাস, পুরোপুরি অমনোটোনিক প্রতিবেদন সিস্টেম। প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়ার সময় একটি অমনোটোনিক সিস্টেমের বিভ্রান্ত কাজের সন্ধানের প্রয়োজন, আমরা সাম্প্রতিক নির্দিষ্ট প্রক্রিয়ার বেশ কিছু অমনোটিনিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি কএনএল-এক্স এবং কনএল-এক্সি-এর ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে একটি অমনোটোনিক ডায়াম্যানিক চিত্রের বেশীরভাগ ভাষায় মোটোনিক সংস্করণ প্রকাশ করে।', 'ca': "La no monotonitat restringida ha estat beneficiosa per l'analitzador de dependencies projeccional ansiosa en recerca anterior, com que les decisions posteriors poden reparar els errors fets en estats anteriors a causa de la falta d'informació. En aquest article, proposem un nou sistema de transició completament no monotònic basat en l'algoritme no projectiu de Covington. Com que un sistema no monotònic requereix explorar accions errònies durant el procés d'entrenament, desenvolupem diverses variants no monotòniques de l'oracle dinàmic recentment definit per l'analitzador Covington, basat en aproximacions estretes de la pèrdua. Els experiments en conjunts de dades de les tasques compartides CoNLL-X i CoNLL-XI mostren que un oracle dinàmic no monotònic supera la versió monotònica en la majoria de llengües.", 'cs': 'V předchozím výzkumu byla prokázána, že omezená non-monotonicita je přínosná pro projektivní parser závislosti na oblouku, protože pozdější rozhodnutí mohou opravit chyby udělané v předchozích stavech kvůli nedostatku informací. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový, plně monotonický přechodový systém založený na non-projektivním Covingtonově algoritmu. Protože nemonotonický systém vyžaduje zkoumání chybných akcí během tréninkového procesu, vyvíjíme několik nemonotonických variant nedávno definovaného dynamického věštění pro Covingtonský parser, založených na úzkých aproximacích ztráty. Experimenty na datových sadách ze sdílených úloh CoNLL-X a CoNLL-XI ukazují, že ve většině jazyků nenomotonické dynamické orákulo předčí monotonickou verzi.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki araştırmalarda projektiv arc-eager bağımlılıq ayırıcısı üçün mənfəətli göstərildi, çünki sonrakı kararlar əvvəlki durumlarda xətaları təmizləyən məlumatlar yoxdur. Bu kağızda, yeni, tamamilə monotonik olmayan keçiş sistemini projektiv olmayan Covington algoritmi üzərində təklif edirik. Monotonik olmayan sistemin təhsil sürətində hata işləri keşfetməsi lazımdır. Biz Covington ayırıcısı üçün yeni tanımlanmış dinamik oraqlığın çoxlu monotonik variablarını təhsil edirik, yoxsulların yaxınlıqlarına dayanan. CoNLL-X və CoNLL-XI paylaşdığı işlərdə verilən verilənlər barəsindəki təcrübələr, monotonik olmayan dinamik oraklı dillərin çoxluğunda monotonik versiyonunu daha üstün etdiyini göstərər.', 'et': 'Piiratud mittemonotoonsus on varasemates uuringutes näidanud kasulikku projektiivse kaareaegse sõltuvuse parserile, kuna hilisemad otsused võivad parandada varasemates seisundites tehtud vigu teabe puudumise tõttu. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse, täielikult mittemonotoonilise üleminekusüsteemi, mis põhineb mitteprojektiivsel Covingtoni algoritmil. Kuna mitte-monotooniline süsteem nõuab ekslike toimingute uurimist koolitusprotsessi ajal, töötame välja mitu mitte-monotoonilist varianti hiljuti määratletud dünaamilisest oraaklist Covingtoni parserile, mis põhinevad kao tihedal lähenemisel. CoNLL-X ja CoNLL-XI jagatud ülesannete andmekogumitega tehtud katsed näitavad, et mittemonotooniline dünaamiline oraakel ületab monotoonilise versiooni enamikus keeltes.', 'bs': 'Pokazano je korisno ograničeno ne-monotonicitet za projektivni analitičar ovisnosti arhitekta u prethodnim istraživanjima, jer poslednje odluke mogu popraviti greške koje su napravile u prethodnim državama zbog nedostatka informacija. U ovom papiru predlažemo roman, potpuno ne-monotonski prelazni sistem na osnovu neprojektivnog kovingtona algoritma. Kao non-monotonski sistem zahtijeva istraživanje grešnih akcija tijekom procesa obuke, razvijamo nekoliko ne-monotonskih varianta nedavno definiranog dinamičnog oraka za analizatora Kovingtona, na temelju čvrsti približavanja gubitka. Eksperimenti o setima podataka iz podijeljenih zadataka CoNLL-X i CoNLL-XI pokazuju da ne-monotonski dinamični orakl iznosi monotonsku verziju većine jezika.', 'fi': 'Rajoitettu ei-monotonisuus on osoittautunut hyödylliseksi projektiiviselle kaari-innokkaalle riippuvuuden parserille aiemmissa tutkimuksissa, koska myöhemmät päätökset voivat korjata aikaisemmissa osavaltioissa tehtyjen virheiden puutteesta johtuen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta, täysin ei-monotonista siirtymäjärjestelmää, joka perustuu ei-projektiiviseen Covingtonin algoritmiin. Koska ei-monotoninen järjestelmä vaatii virheellisten toimien tutkimista koulutusprosessin aikana, kehitämme useita ei-monotonisia muunnelmia hiljattain määritellystä dynaamisesta oraakkelista Covington parserille, jotka perustuvat häviön tiukkoihin approksimaatioihin. Kokeet CoNLL-X:n ja CoNLL-XI:n yhteisistä tehtävistä osoittavat, että ei-monotoninen dynaaminen oraakkeli ylittää monotonisen version useimmilla kielillä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé Gak-Monotoni sing wis nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Panser nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerarané perusahaan dumadhi, kaya sampek iso dianggawe kamu dhéwé Nang pemilih iki, kita nyusri kanggo nyusri, sampeyan sistem kebijakan pasar sing bisa basa nang aligorit sing gak perusahaan CoWinton. Taning ing Peringatan kanggo dataset sing suku CoNLL-X karo CoNLL-XI ndelok sawar ngomong nik oras inuk-Monotonik sing gagal kuwi versi Monotonik kanggo kalaha uga bangsane', 'he': 'לא מונוטוניות מוגבלת הוכחה שימושית למחקר התלויות הקודם של פרויקטיבי ארק-נלהב, כיוון שההחלטות האחוריות יכולות לתקן טעויות שעשויות במדינות הקודמות בגלל חוסר מידע. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מערכת מעבר חדשה, לא מונטונית לחלוטין מבוססת על אלגוריתם קובינגטון לא פרויקטיבי. כאשר מערכת לא מונטונית דורשת חקירה של פעולות שגויות במהלך תהליך האימון, אנחנו מפתחים כמה שונים לא מונטוניים של האורקל הדינמיקלי המוגדר לאחרונה למחקר קובינגטון, בהתבסס על התקרבות צמודות של האובדן. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים מהמשימות המשותפות של CoNLL-X ו-CoNLL-XI מראים שאורקל דינמי לא מונטוני מוביל את הגרסה המונטונית ברוב השפות.', 'ha': "An nuna wani amfani da shirin jarrabo-arc-asper-ɗin da aka danne a cikin research na zaman, kamar da gareta poster can kure makosa wanda aka aikata a cikin mataifan da suka gaba, saboda da kuma bã ya kasancẽwa ga maɓalli. In this paper, we propose a novel, fully non-monotonic transition system based on the non-projective Covington algorithm.  Kama da wani na-monotoni ya ƙayyade yin ƙidãya ga aikin ɓata a lokacin da aka yi wa aikin shirin na aikin aiki, za'a buɗe wasu variants na daban-monotoni na da aka buƙata kallon dangane na kwanan da aka ƙayyade na kwanan-bayani ga the Quington, a kan karatun masu ƙari na hasara. Tajararin da ke samar da tsarin aiki na CoNLL-X da CoNLL-XI za'a nuna cewa, wata kalma na-monotoni na nuna versiyar kiman da ke cikin masu yawa na harshen.", 'sk': 'Omejena nemonotoničnost se je v prejšnjih raziskavah pokazala koristna za projektivni analizator odvisnosti, saj lahko kasnejše odločitve popravijo napake v prejšnjih stanjih zaradi pomanjkanja informacij. V prispevku predlagamo nov, popolnoma nemonotonični tranzicijski sistem, ki temelji na neprojektivnem Covingtonovem algoritmu. Ker nemonotonični sistem zahteva raziskovanje napačnih dejanj med procesom usposabljanja, razvijamo več nemonotoničnih variant nedavno definiranega dinamičnega orakla za Covingtonov parser, ki temelji na tesnih približkih izgub. Eksperimenti na naborih podatkov iz skupnih nalog CoNLL-X in CoNLL-XI kažejo, da nemonotonični dinamični orakel presega monotonično različico v večini jezikov.', 'bo': 'ཚད་གཞི་མིན་monotonity་ཡིན་པ་ལས་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་རིམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཏུ་སྟོན་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་གཏོད་པ་ཞིག་འཇུག་སྣོད་ལ་ཆ་ཚང་མ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། As a non-monotonic system requires exploration of errors actions during the training process, we develop several non-monotonic variants of the recently defined dynamic oracle for the Covington parser, based on tight approximations of the loss. CoNLL-X དང CoNLL'}
{'en': 'Multi-space Variational Encoder-Decoders for Semi-supervised Labeled Sequence Transduction', 'ar': 'أجهزة فك التشفير المتغيرة متعددة المساحات لنقل التسلسل المسمى شبه الخاضع للإشراف', 'pt': 'Codificadores-Decodificadores Variacionais Multiespaço para Transdução de Sequência Marcada Semi-supervisionada', 'es': 'Codificadores-decodificadores variacionales multiespacio para la transducción semisupervisada de secuencias etiquetadas', 'fr': 'Codeurs-décodeurs variationnels multi-espaces pour la transduction de séquences marquées semi-supervisée', 'ja': '半監督ラベル付きシーケンストランスダクションのための多空間バリエーションエンコーダ-デコーダ', 'zh': '以半监标序转导多间变分编码器-解码器', 'hi': 'बहु-अंतरिक्ष परिवर्तनीय एन्कोडर-अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित लेबल अनुक्रम ट्रांसडक्शन के लिए डिकोडर', 'ru': 'Многопространственные вариационные кодер-декодеры для полуконтролируемой трансдукции меченых последовательностей', 'ga': 'Ionchódóirí Athrógacha Ilspáis le haghaidh Aistriú Seicheamh Lipéadaithe Leath-mhaoirsithe', 'ka': 'მრავალური სამყარო განსხვავებული კოდირების დეკოდერები სამყარო დანარჩენებული მართლის განსხვავება', 'el': 'Πολυδιαστημικοί κωδικοποιητές-αποκωδικοποιητές παραλλαγών για ημι-εποπτευόμενη μεταγραφή ετικετών ακολουθίας', 'hu': 'Többtérbeli variációs kódoló-dekódolók félig felügyelt címkézett sorozatátvitelhez', 'it': 'Encoder-Decoder Variazionali multi-spazio per trasduzione di sequenze etichettate semi-supervisionate', 'kk': 'Көп бос орын айнымалы кодер- декодерлері жарым- қарау жарлығын белгілеу ретінде аудару үшін', 'lt': 'Daugiaerdviniai variaciniai kodatoriai puskontroliuojamai žymėtos sekos perdavimui', 'mk': 'Мулти- просторски кодери- декодирачи за пола- надгледувана трансдукција на означена секвенца', 'ms': 'Pengekod-Pengubahsuaian-Ruang-berbilang untuk Penjelmaan Sekuensi Ditandatangani Semi', 'ml': 'സെമി- സൂക്ഷ്മമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ലേബിള്\u200dട്ട് സെക്കന്റ് സെക്കന്റ് ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്യൂഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Kodifikaturi varjazzjonali multispazjali għall-Kodifikaturi għat-Traduzzjoni tas-Sekwenza Semi-Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Бид олон орон зай өөрчлөлтийн коддогч-шинжлэх ухаан шинжлэх ухаан', 'no': 'Fleirmellomrom variasjonal koder for halvoversikt merkelige sekvensoverføring', 'pl': 'Wieloprzestrzenne kodery wariancyjne dla pół-nadzorowanej transdukcji sekwencji etykietowanych', 'ro': 'Encoder-decodoare variaționale multi-spațiu pentru transducerea secvențelor etichetate semi-supravegheate', 'sr': 'Višeprostorni varijantni koder-dekoder za prenošenje polu nadzorne sekvence', 'si': 'ගොඩක් තැනක් වෙනස්ථානය ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dෂිත සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර්ස්', 'so': 'Qodeynta badbaadada kala duwan ee Semi-supervised Labeled Sequence Transfer', 'sv': 'Variationskodare för flera rymder för halvövervakad sekvenstransduktion', 'ta': 'பாது- கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட விளக்கச்சீட்டு மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'ملتی-جگہ ویریشن اکڈر-ڈیکوڈر', 'uz': 'Kodlash usuli', 'vi': 'Truyền mã hóa Pha theo nhãn được giám sát nhiều khoảng không', 'bg': 'Многопространствени вариационни кодери-декодери за полунадзорно етикетирано последователно предаване', 'hr': 'Višeprostorni variacionalni koder-dekoder za prenošenje polovično nadziranog određenog sekvence', 'nl': 'Multi-space variatie encoder-decoders voor semi-supervised gelabelde sequentie transductie', 'ko': '반감시 표기 시퀀스 변환에 사용되는 다공간 디코더', 'da': 'Variationskoder-dekodere med flere rum til halvovervåget mærket sekvenstransduktion', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çoklu alan Çeşitli Çeşitli Ködlemeler', 'de': 'Multi-Space Variational Encoder-Decoder für semi-überwachte beschriftete Sequenz Transduktion', 'id': 'Multi-space Variational Encoder-Decoders for Semi-supervised Labelled Sequence Transduction', 'sq': 'Kodifikuesit Variacional Multi-Space për Transduction të Sekuencës së Etiketuar Gjysmë-mbikqyrur', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Բազմատարածական բազմատարածական կոդավորիչներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են կես-վերահսկվող նշանների հաջորդականության հաղորդակցման համար', 'sw': 'Kufungua kodi kwa ajili ya mfumo wa kufuatiliwa kwa ngono', 'az': 'Çoxlu-uzay variasiya kodlayıcı-kodlayıcı yarı-gözləyirli Etiket Sıradan Dönüşü', 'bn': 'Semi- পর্যবেক্ষণ করা লেবেলের সেকেন্স ট্রান্সট্রান্সট্রান্সকশনের জন্য বহুবার্তা এনকোডার- ডিকোডার', 'bs': 'Višeprostorni variacionalni koder za prenošenje polu nadzorne navedene sekvence', 'ca': 'Codificadors multiespacials de codificació variacional per a la transducció de seqüències semi-supervisada', 'cs': 'Víceprostorové variační dekodéry pro poloprostorové štítkové sekvenční přenosy', 'et': 'Mitme ruumi variatsioonilised kodeerijad pooljärelevalvega märgistatud järjestuse transduktsiooniks', 'fi': 'Moniavaruuden variaatiokooderit puolivalvottuun sarjasiirtoon', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'מסדרי קודד שינוי מרובים למספר מקומות לתרגיל רצף שמשומר בחצי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Večprostorski variacijski kodirni dekodirji za polnadzorovano označeno zaporedje transdukcije', 'bo': 'ལྟ་རྒྱབ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་བར་སྟོང་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཨིན་ཀྱིས་འདྲེན་པ'}
{'en': 'Labeled sequence transduction is a task of transforming one sequence into another sequence that satisfies desiderata specified by a set of labels. In this paper we propose multi-space variational encoder-decoders, a new model for labeled sequence transduction with semi-supervised learning. The generative model can use neural networks to handle both discrete and continuous latent variables to exploit various features of data. Experiments show that our model provides not only a powerful supervised framework but also can effectively take advantage of the unlabeled data. On the SIGMORPHON morphological inflection benchmark, our model outperforms single-model state-of-art results by a large margin for the majority of languages.', 'ar': 'تحويل التسلسل المسمى هو مهمة تحويل تسلسل إلى تسلسل آخر يلبي رغبات محددة بواسطة مجموعة من الملصقات. في هذا البحث نقترح مفكك تشفير متنوع متعدد المساحات ، نموذج جديد لنقل التسلسل المسمى مع التعلم شبه الخاضع للإشراف. يمكن للنموذج التوليدي استخدام الشبكات العصبية للتعامل مع المتغيرات الكامنة المنفصلة والمستمرة لاستغلال الميزات المختلفة للبيانات. تُظهر التجارب أن نموذجنا لا يوفر إطار عمل قويًا خاضعًا للإشراف فحسب ، بل يمكنه أيضًا الاستفادة بشكل فعال من البيانات غير المصنفة. وفقًا لمعيار SIGMORPHON للانعطاف الصرفي ، يتفوق نموذجنا في الأداء على أحدث نتائج النموذج الفردي بهامش كبير لمعظم اللغات.', 'es': 'La transducción de secuencias marcadas es una tarea de transformar una secuencia en otra secuencia que satisfaga los deseos especificados por un conjunto de marcadores. En este artículo proponemos codificadores-decodificadores variacionales multiespacio, un nuevo modelo para la transducción de secuencias marcadas con aprendizaje semisupervisado. El modelo generativo puede utilizar redes neuronales para manejar variables latentes discretas y continuas para aprovechar las diversas características de los datos. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo no solo proporciona un poderoso marco supervisado, sino que también puede aprovechar eficazmente los datos no etiquetados. En el punto de referencia de inflexión morfológica de SIGMORPHON, nuestro modelo supera los resultados de vanguardia de un solo modelo por un amplio margen para la mayoría de los idiomas.', 'pt': 'A transdução de sequência rotulada é uma tarefa de transformar uma sequência em outra sequência que satisfaça os desideratos especificados por um conjunto de rótulos. Neste artigo propomos codificadores-decodificadores variacionais multi-espaço, um novo modelo para transdução de sequências rotuladas com aprendizado semi-supervisionado. O modelo generativo pode usar redes neurais para lidar com variáveis latentes discretas e contínuas para explorar vários recursos de dados. Experimentos mostram que nosso modelo fornece não apenas uma estrutura supervisionada poderosa, mas também pode aproveitar efetivamente os dados não rotulados. No benchmark de inflexão morfológica SIGMORPHON, nosso modelo supera os resultados de última geração de modelo único por uma grande margem para a maioria das linguagens.', 'fr': "La transduction de séquences marquées est une tâche consistant à transformer une séquence en une autre séquence qui satisfait les desiderata spécifiés par un ensemble d'étiquettes. Dans cet article, nous proposons des encodeurs-décodeurs variationnels multi-espaces, un nouveau modèle pour la transduction de séquences marquées avec apprentissage semi-supervisé. Le modèle génératif peut utiliser des réseaux neuronaux pour traiter à la fois des variables latentes discrètes et continues afin d'exploiter diverses caractéristiques des données. Les expériences montrent que notre modèle fournit non seulement un cadre supervisé puissant, mais qu'il peut également tirer parti efficacement des données non étiquetées. Sur le banc d'essai d'inflexion morphologique SIGMORPHON, notre modèle surpasse largement les résultats de pointe d'un modèle unique pour la majorité des langues.", 'ja': '標識配列形質導入は、標識のセットによって指定された必要条件を満たす、ある配列を別の配列に形質転換するタスクである。この論文では、半監視学習を伴うラベル付けされた配列変換のための新しいモデルである多空間変形エンコーダデコーダを提案した。生成モデルは、ニューラルネットワークを使用して、データの様々な特徴を利用するために、離散的かつ連続的な潜在的変数の両方を扱うことができる。実験は、当社のモデルが強力な監視対象フレームワークを提供するだけでなく、ラベル付けされていないデータを効果的に利用できることを示しています。SIGMORPHONの形態変形ベンチマークでは、当社のモデルは、大部分の言語で単一モデルの最先端の結果を大幅に上回っています。', 'ru': 'Меченая трансдукция последовательности представляет собой задачу преобразования одной последовательности в другую последовательность, которая удовлетворяет desiderata, заданную набором меток. В данной работе мы предлагаем мультипространственные вариационные кодер-декодеры, новую модель для трансдукции меченых последовательностей с полуконтролируемым обучением. Генеративная модель может использовать нейронные сети для обработки как дискретных, так и непрерывных скрытых переменных, чтобы использовать различные особенности данных. Эксперименты показывают, что наша модель не только обеспечивает мощную контролируемую структуру, но и может эффективно использовать немеченые данные. На уровне морфологического перегиба SIGMORPHON наша модель превосходит одномодельные результаты современного состояния по большому запасу для большинства языков.', 'hi': 'लेबल अनुक्रम ट्रांसडक्शन एक अनुक्रम को दूसरे अनुक्रम में बदलने का एक कार्य है जो लेबल के एक सेट द्वारा निर्दिष्ट desiderata को संतुष्ट करता है। इस पेपर में हम बहु-अंतरिक्ष परिवर्तनीय एन्कोडर-डिकोडर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के साथ लेबल किए गए अनुक्रम ट्रांसडक्शन के लिए एक नया मॉडल है। उत्पादक मॉडल डेटा की विभिन्न विशेषताओं का शोषण करने के लिए असतत और निरंतर अव्यक्त चर दोनों को संभालने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर सकता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल न केवल एक शक्तिशाली पर्यवेक्षित ढांचा प्रदान करता है, बल्कि बिना लेबल वाले डेटा का प्रभावी ढंग से लाभ भी उठा सकता है। SIGMORPHON रूपात्मक मोड़ बेंचमार्क पर, हमारा मॉडल अधिकांश भाषाओं के लिए एक बड़े अंतर से एकल-मॉडल राज्य-कला परिणामों को मात देता है।', 'zh': '标序者转导转一为足也。 本文多间变分编码器-解码器,盖半监之标序转导也。 生成模型可以神经网络治离变量,以用数也。 实验明,非唯资一强监框架,亦有效于未标之数。 SIGMORPHON形拐点准试,吾形多言大优于最新也。', 'ga': "Is éard atá i gceist le haistriú seicheamh lipéadaithe ná seicheamh amháin a thiontú ina sheicheamh eile a shásaíonn desiderata atá sonraithe ag sraith lipéad. Sa pháipéar seo molaimid ionchódóirí athraitheacha ilspáis, samhail nua d'aistriú seichimh lipéadaithe le foghlaim leath-mhaoirsithe. Is féidir leis an tsamhail ghiniúna líonraí néaracha a úsáid chun athróga folaigh scoite agus leanúnacha araon a láimhseáil chun gnéithe éagsúla sonraí a shaothrú. Léiríonn turgnaimh go soláthraíonn ár múnla ní hamháin creat cumhachtach maoirsithe ach freisin gur féidir leas éifeachtach a bhaint as na sonraí neamhlipéadaithe. Ar thagarmharc infhilleadh moirfeolaíoch SIGMORPHON, tá ár samhail i bhfad níos fearr ná torthaí aon-samhail den scoth d’fhormhór na dteangacha.", 'el': 'Η μεταγωγή ετικετών ακολουθιών είναι μια εργασία μετατροπής μιας ακολουθίας σε μια άλλη ακολουθία που ικανοποιεί τις επιθυμίες που καθορίζονται από ένα σύνολο ετικετών. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε πολυδιαστημικούς κωδικοποιητές-αποκωδικοποιητές παραλλαγών, ένα νέο μοντέλο για μεταγραφή σημασμένων ακολουθιών με ημι-εποπτευόμενη μάθηση. Το παραγωγικό μοντέλο μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσει νευρωνικά δίκτυα για να χειριστεί και τις διακριτές και συνεχείς λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές για να εκμεταλλευτεί τα διάφορα χαρακτηριστικά των δεδομένων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας δεν παρέχει μόνο ένα ισχυρό εποπτικό πλαίσιο, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να εκμεταλλευτεί αποτελεσματικά τα δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα. Στο σημείο αναφοράς μορφολογικής κάμψης, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα αποτελέσματα ενός μοντέλου τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την πλειοψηφία των γλωσσών.', 'hu': 'A címkézett szekvencia átalakítása az egyik szekvencia egy másik szekvennyé alakítása, amely kielégíti a címkék által meghatározott kívánságokat. Jelen tanulmányban többtéres variációs kódoló-dekódereket javasolunk, egy új modellt a feliratozott szekvencia átalakítására félig felügyelt tanulással. A generációs modell neurális hálózatokat használhat diszkrét és folyamatos látens változók kezelésére az adatok különböző jellemzőinek kihasználására. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk nemcsak erőteljes felügyeleti keretet biztosít, hanem hatékonyan kihasználhatja a címke nélküli adatokat is. A SIGGMRPHON morfológiai inflexiós referenciaérték alapján modellünk a nyelvek többségében jelentős mértékben felülmúlja az egymodelles korszerű eredményeket.', 'ka': 'შენიშვნელოვანი წერტილის გადატანაცია არის ერთი წერტილის გადატანაცია სხვა წერტილიში, რომელიც შეუძლებელია desiderata, რომელიც წერტილის წერტილით განსაკუთრებულია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მრავალური სამყარო განსხვავებული კოდერის განსხვავებელი კოდერის განსხვავებელი, ახალი მოდელი, რომელიც მინიშნული წერტილის განსხვავებელი სამყარო დანახვავებ გენერაციური მოდელი შეიძლება გამოყენოთ ნეიროლური ქსელები, რომლებიც დისკრეტური და მუშაობელი განცვლელების გამოყენება, რომ გამოყენოთ განსხვავებული მონა ექსპერიმენტები გაჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი არა მხოლოდ ძალიან მონაცემებული ფრამეტრი, მაგრამ ექსპერიმენტიურად შეიძლება გამოიყენოთ არაფერი SIGMORPHON მორპოლოგიური ინფლექციის ბენქმარკში ჩვენი მოდელი ერთ-მოდელური წარმოდგენების შედეგი დიდი მარტინით ენების უფრო დიდი მარტინით.', 'it': "La trasduzione di sequenza etichettata è un compito di trasformare una sequenza in un'altra sequenza che soddisfa i desideri specificati da un insieme di etichette. In questo articolo proponiamo encoder-decoder variazionali multi-spazio, un nuovo modello per trasduzione di sequenza etichettata con apprendimento semi-supervisionato. Il modello generativo può utilizzare le reti neurali per gestire sia variabili latenti discrete che continue per sfruttare varie caratteristiche dei dati. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello fornisce non solo un potente framework supervisionato, ma può anche sfruttare efficacemente i dati non etichettati. Sul benchmark di flessione morfologica SIGGMRPHON, il nostro modello supera di gran lunga i risultati dello stato dell'arte del singolo modello per la maggior parte delle lingue.", 'lt': 'Etiketės sekos transdukcija yra užduotis pakeisti vieną seką į kitą seką, atitinkančią etiketėse nurodytą desideratą. Šiame dokumente siūlome įvairių erdvių variacinius kodatorius, naują model į, skirtą pažymėtai sekos transdukcijai su pusprižiūrimu mokymusi. The generative model can use neural networks to handle both discrete and continuous latent variables to exploit various features of data.  Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis ne tik suteikia galingą prižiūrimą sistemą, bet ir gali veiksmingai pasinaudoti nepažymėtais duomenimis. Remiantis SIGMORPHON morfologinio poveikio lyginamuoju rodikliu, mūsų modelis pasiekia vienintelio modelio pažangiausius rezultatus didele daugumos kalbų marža.', 'kk': 'Белгіленген реттерді аудару - бір реттерді басқа реттерге аудару тапсырмасы, келтірілген жарлықтар жиынына сәйкес келетін desiderata тізімі. Бұл қағазда біз көп бос орын айнымалы кодерлерді декодерлерді ұсынамыз, жаңа реттеу үлгісін жарты бақылау үшін жаңа модель. Жасау үлгісі деректердің әртүрлі мүмкіндіктерін қолдану үшін дискретті және тұрақты келесі айнымалылықтарын басқару үшін неврал желілерін қолдана алады. Тәжірибелер біздің моделіміздің тек күшті бақылау қоршауын емес, сондай-ақ бұл мәліметтердің артықшылығын қолдануға болады. SIGMORPHON морфологиялық инфлекциялық бағдарламасында, біздің үлгіміз бір үлгілі өзгерту күйінің көпшілігі үлкен тілдердің көпшілігі үлкен шегіне арналады.', 'mk': 'Трансдукција на означена секвенца е задача за трансформирање на една секвенца во друга секвенца која ја задоволува дезидерата спецификувана од множина означувања. Во оваа хартија предложуваме мултипросторни варијационални кодери, нов модел за означена трансдукција на секвенца со полунадгледувано учење. Генеративниот модел може да користи неврални мрежи за да се справи со дискретни и континуирани лантни променливи за да се искористат различни карактеристики на податоците. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот модел не само обезбедува моќна надгледувана рамка, туку и може ефикасно да ги искористи неозначените податоци. Во однос на СИГМОРФОН морфолошкиот резултат за инфекција, нашиот модел ги надминува најдобрите резултати од еден модел со голема маргина за мнозинството јазици.', 'ms': 'Transduksi urutan yang ditabel adalah tugas untuk mengubah satu urutan ke urutan lain yang memenuhi desiderata yang dinyatakan oleh set label. Dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan pengekod-dekoder variasi berbilang-ruang, model baru untuk penerbangan urutan yang ditabel dengan pembelajaran semi-mengawasi. Model generatif boleh guna rangkaian saraf untuk mengendalikan pembolehubah rahasia dan terus-menerus untuk mengeksploitasi pelbagai ciri-ciri data. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kami tidak hanya menyediakan kerangka yang terkawal kuat tetapi juga dapat mengambil keuntungan dari data yang tidak ditanda. Pada nilai benchmark penyebaran morfologik SIGMORPHON, model kita melampaui hasil state-of-art model tunggal dengan margin besar untuk kebanyakan bahasa.', 'mt': 'It-trasduzzjoni tas-sekwenza ttikkettata hija kompitu li tittrasforma sekwenza waħda f’sekwenza oħra li tissodisfa d-desiderata speċifikata minn sett ta’ tikketti. F’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu dekodifikaturi varjazzjonali multispazjali, mudell ġdid għat-trasduzzjoni tas-sekwenza ttikkettata b’tagħlim semisuperviż. Il-mudell ġenerattiv jista’ juża netwerks newrali biex jimmaniġġja kemm varjabbli diskreti kif ukoll kontinwi moħbija biex jisfrutta karatteristiċi varji tad-dejta. Experiments show that our model provides not only a powerful supervised framework but also can effectively take advantage of the unlabeled data.  Dwar il-punt ta’ riferiment morfoloġiku ta’ inflezzjoni SIGMORPHON, il-mudell tagħna jirriżulta b’mudell wieħed ta’ l-a ħħar riżultati b’marġini kbir għall-maġġoranza tal-lingwi.', 'ml': 'ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയ ഒരു സെക്കന്\u200dസിനെ മറ്റൊരു സെക്കന്\u200dസിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവൃത്തി ആണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല-സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് വേരിയറല്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ലേബിള്\u200dഡ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ്  ഡേറ്റാ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ജനറവന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് മാത്രമേ നല്\u200dകുന്നുള്ളൂ. സിഗ്മോര്\u200dഫോണ്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാകാര്യത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പി', 'mn': 'Тэмдэглэгдсэн дарааллын орлуулалт нь нэг дарааллыг өөр дарааллаар шилжүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа юм. Энэ нь тэмдэглэгдсэн дарааллын орлуулалт юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон орон зайн шинжлэх ухааны шинэ хэлбэрийн коддогчийг санал болгож байна. Бүтээлтийн загвар нь мэдээллийн өөр өөрчлөлтийг ашиглах боломжтой мэдээллийн шинж тэмдэглэх мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж болно. Эмчилгээ нь бидний загвар зөвхөн хүчирхэг удирдлагатай хэлбэрээр хангаж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бидний загвар нь зөвхөн хүчтэй удирдлагатай хэлбэрээр ч мөн СИГМОРФОН-ын морфологик нөлөөлөлтийн багц дээр бидний загвар нь нэг загварын урлагийн төвшин нөлөөлөлтийг ихэнх хэлний ихэнх загварын том загвараар гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Merka sekvensoverføring er ei oppgåve for å transformera ein sekvens til ein annan sekvens som tilfredsstiller desiderata spesifisert av eit sett merkelappar. I denne papiret foreslår vi fleire mellomrom variasjonale koderingskodingar, eit nytt modell for merkelige sekvensoverføring med semioversikt læring. Generativ modellen kan bruka neuralnettverk for å handtera både diskrete og kontinuerlege latente variabler for å bruka ulike funksjonar av data. Eksperimentar viser at modellen vår tilbyr ikkje berre eit kraftig oversikt rammeverk, men også kan bruka nyttighet av dei ukjende data. På SIGMORPHON-morfologiske infleksjonsbenchmarket utfører modellen vårt enn enkelmodelltilstanden av kunst resultatet med ein stor margin for dei fleste språk.', 'pl': 'Transdukcja sekwencji etykietowanej jest zadaniem przekształcenia jednej sekwencji w inną sekwencję spełniającą desideraty określone przez zestaw etykiet. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wieloprzestrzenne kodery-dekodery wariancyjne, nowy model transdukcji sekwencji etykietowanej z nauką pół-nadzorowaną. Model generatywny może wykorzystywać sieci neuronowe do obsługi zarówno dyskretnych, jak i ciągłych zmiennych utajonych w celu wykorzystania różnych cech danych. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz model zapewnia nie tylko potężne nadzorowane ramy, ale także może skutecznie wykorzystać nieoznakowane dane. W odniesieniu do wskaźnika zmiany morfologicznej SIGMORPHON, nasz model przewyższa w większości języków najnowocześniejsze wyniki pojedynczego modelu.', 'ro': 'Transducția secvențelor etichetate este o sarcină de transformare a unei secvențe în altă secvență care satisface cerințele specificate de un set de etichete. În această lucrare propunem encoder-decodoare variaționale multi-spațiu, un nou model pentru traducerea secvențelor etichetate cu învățare semi-supravegheată. Modelul generativ poate utiliza rețele neurale pentru a gestiona atât variabilele latente discrete, cât și continue pentru a exploata diferite caracteristici ale datelor. Experimentele arată că modelul nostru oferă nu numai un cadru supravegheat puternic, ci și poate profita eficient de datele fără etichete. Pe criteriul de referință al inflexiunii morfologice SIGGMRPHON, modelul nostru depășește rezultatele de ultimă generație cu un singur model cu o marjă mare pentru majoritatea limbilor.', 'sr': 'Prevod označene sekvence je zadatak transformacije jedne sekvence u drugu sekvencu koja zadovoljava desideratu određenu grupom etiketa. U ovom papiru predlažemo višeprostorne varijantne kodere, novi model za prevedenje označene sekvence sa polu-nadzornim učenjem. Generativni model može koristiti neuralne mreže kako bi se obrađivala diskretne i kontinualne latentne varijante kako bi iskoristila različite karakteristike podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model obezbeđuje ne samo moćni nadzorni okvir, već i efikasno može iskoristiti neizbežne podatke. Na morfološkoj referenciji inflekcije SIGMORPHON, naš model iznosi jedinstveno modelne rezultate umjetnosti velikom marginom za većinu jezika.', 'so': 'Labeled sequence transduction is a task of transforming one sequence into another sequence that satisfies desiderata specified by a set of labels.  Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa koordiyuhu kala duwan yahay oo kala duduwan, kaas oo ah model cusub oo lagu soo qorayo barashada semi-ilaalisan. Tusaalada geneeral wuxuu isticmaali karaa shabakado neurada ah si ay u xambaaraan isbedelka kala duwan iyo kuwa sii socda si uu ugu isticmaalo noocyo kala duduwan oo macluumaadka. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in modellkayagu uusan dhaqdhaqaaq oo kaliya oo ilaaliya, laakiin sidoo kale waxqabad buu ku isticmaali karaa macluumaadka aan la garanayn. Isku saabsan sawiraadka asalka ah ee SIGMORPHON, modelkayagu wuxuu ka muujiyaa midhaha hal-model-state-of-art midhaha ugu badnaan luqadaha badan.', 'si': 'ලේබෙල් ක්\u200dරමාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනය තමයි ලේබෙල් සැටෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරපු ක්\u200dරමයක්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනස්ථානයක් කෝඩාර් කිරීම් කිරීම් කරනවා, අළුත් මොඩේලයක් ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන අවශ්\u200dය වි ප්\u200dරභාවිත මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් දත්තේ වෙනස් අවශ්\u200d පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නෙවෙයි බලවත් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ ඒත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක SIGMORPHON මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් ප්\u200dරශ්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වල, අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක මොඩල් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න', 'sv': 'Märkt sekvenstransduktion är en uppgift att omvandla en sekvens till en annan sekvens som uppfyller önskningar specificerade av en uppsättning etiketter. I denna uppsats föreslår vi multi-space variational encoder-dekodrar, en ny modell för märkt sekvenstransduktion med semi-övervakad inlärning. Den generativa modellen kan använda neurala nätverk för att hantera både diskreta och kontinuerliga latenta variabler för att utnyttja olika funktioner i data. Experiment visar att vår modell inte bara ger ett kraftfullt övervakat ramverk utan också effektivt kan dra nytta av de omärkta data. På SIGGMORPHON morfologiska böjningsriktmärke överträffar vår modell med stor marginal de senaste resultaten av en modell för de flesta språk.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட தொடர் மாற்றுதல் ஒரு தொடர்ச்சியை மற்றொரு வரிசையாக மாற்ற வேண்டிய செயல் இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பல- இடைவெளி மாறிகள் குறியீட்டாளர்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி குறியீட்டு வரிசையில் மாற் பொதுவான மாதிரி தரவின் தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்த வேறு மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து வரும் மாறிகளையும் கையாள முடியும். Experiments show that our model provides not only a powerful supervised framework but also can effectively take advantage of the unlabeled data.  SIGMORPHON மொழிபெரும்பாலான தொடர்பு பெங்குப்பாட்டில், எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒற்றை மாதிரி நிலையில் கலை முடிவு', 'ur': 'لیبل کڑھی ٹرنڈوٹ ایک کڑھی کو دوسری کڑھی میں تبدیل کرنے کے لئے ایک کام ہے جو ایک لئبل کے مجموعہ سے مقرر کیا گیا desiderata کو مطمئن کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی فضا کے متغیر انکوڈر-ڈیکوڈر کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، نیوی مدل لیبل کی سطح کے متغیر جانے کے لئے نیوی مدل ہے۔ جنرائیٹ موڈل نیورل نیٹورک کا استعمال کر سکتا ہے کہ دونوں مختلف ڈاٹر کے متفاوتوں کو استعمال کرے۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل صرف ایک طاقتور تحقیق کی فرمود نہیں دیتا بلکہ وہ بھی غیر قابل تحقیق کی دکھائی کے مطابق فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ SIGMORPHON morphological inflection benchmark پر، ہماری مدل ایک مدل کی هنر کی حالت کا نتیجہ اکثر زبانوں کے لئے ایک بڑے مقدار سے نکلتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis In this paper we propose multi-space variational encoder-decoders, a new model for labeled sequence transduction with semi-supervised learning.  Umumiy modeli maʼlumot bazasining turlarini ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Imtizolar esa modelimiz faqat maktab qo'llangan freymlarni qo'llamaydi, balki hech qanday emas maʼlumotdan foydalanishi mumkin. SIGMORPHON morfologik inflektoriyasi benchmark bilan modelimiz ko'pchilik tillarning ko'pchiligi bir model holati sohasi natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chế độ chuyển tiếp theo nhãn là một nhiệm vụ biến một chuỗi thành một chuỗi khác có thể đáp ứng yêu cầu được chỉ ra bởi một nhóm nhãn. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi đề xuất mã hóa đa số không gian, một mô hình mới cho việc chuyển đổi chuỗi nhãn với việc học được giám sát. Hệ thống tạo ra có thể sử dụng các mạng thần kinh để điều khiển các biến số ẩn riêng biệt và liên tục để khai thác các tính năng khác nhau của dữ liệu. Thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta không chỉ cung cấp một cơ sở giám sát mạnh mẽ mà còn có thể tận dụng lợi dụng dữ liệu không được bảo vệ. Trên tiêu chuẩn chuẩn chuẩn biến đổi lịch sử SIGIMAMOPHO, mẫu của chúng ta đạt được kết quả hiện đại nhất kiểu mô phỏng với số lượng lớn ngôn ngữ.', 'da': 'Mærket sekvenstransduktion er en opgave at omdanne en sekvens til en anden sekvens, der opfylder ønsker specificeret af et sæt etiketter. I denne artikel foreslår vi multi-space variational encoder-dekodere, en ny model for mærket sekvenstransduktion med semi-supervised learning. Den generative model kan bruge neurale netværk til at håndtere både diskrete og kontinuerlige latente variabler for at udnytte forskellige funktioner i data. Eksperimenter viser, at vores model ikke kun giver en kraftfuld overvåget ramme, men også effektivt kan drage fordel af de ikke-mærkede data. På SIGGMORPHON morfologisk bøjning benchmark overgår vores model single-model state-of-art resultater med en stor margin for de fleste sprog.', 'nl': 'Transductie van gelabelde sequentie is een taak om een sequentie om te zetten in een andere sequentie die voldoet aan desiderata gespecificeerd door een set labels. In dit artikel stellen we multi-space variatiele encoder-decoders voor, een nieuw model voor gelabelde sequentie transductie met semi-supervised learning. Het generatieve model kan neurale netwerken gebruiken om zowel discrete als continue latente variabelen te behandelen om verschillende kenmerken van gegevens te exploiteren. Uit experimenten blijkt dat ons model niet alleen een krachtig supervised framework biedt, maar ook effectief gebruik kan maken van de ongelabelde data. Op de morfologische flexie benchmark van SIGMORPHON presteert ons model voor de meerderheid van de talen ruimschoots beter dan de resultaten van een enkel model state-of-art.', 'bg': 'Трансдукцията на етикетираната последователност е задача за трансформиране на една последователност в друга последователност, която удовлетворява желанието, определено от набор от етикети. В настоящата статия предлагаме мулти-пространствени вариационни кодери-декодери, нов модел за етикетирана последователност трансдукция с полу-надзорно обучение. Генеративният модел може да използва невронни мрежи, за да обработва както дискретни, така и непрекъснати латентни променливи, за да експлоатира различни характеристики на данните. Експериментите показват, че нашият модел осигурява не само мощна надзорна рамка, но и ефективно може да се възползва от незабелязаните данни. По отношение на морфологичната инфлекция нашият модел надминава най-съвременните резултати от един модел с голяма разлика за повечето езици.', 'hr': 'Prevod označene sekvence je zadatak transformiranja jedne sekvence u drugu sekvencu koja zadovoljava desideratu određenu skupom etiketa. U ovom papiru predlažemo višeprostorne variacijske kodere, novi model za prevedenje označene sekvence s polu nadzornim učenjem. Generativni model može koristiti neuralne mreže kako bi se obrađivala diskretne i kontinuirane latentne varijante kako bi iskoristila različite karakteristike podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model pruža ne samo moćni nadzorni okvir, nego također može učinkovito iskoristiti neizbiljne podatke. Na morfološkoj mjeri utjecaja SIGMORPHON, naš model iznosi jedinstveno modelne rezultate umjetnosti velikom marginom za većinu jezika.', 'de': 'Die Transduktion von beschrifteter Sequenz ist eine Aufgabe, eine Sequenz in eine andere Sequenz umzuwandeln, die die von einer Gruppe von Labels angegebenen Desiderata erfüllt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir Multi-Space Variational Encoder-Decoder vor, ein neues Modell für beschriftete Sequenz Transduktion mit semi-überwachten Lernen. Das generative Modell kann neuronale Netze verwenden, um sowohl diskrete als auch kontinuierliche latente Variablen zu verarbeiten, um verschiedene Merkmale von Daten auszunutzen. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell nicht nur ein leistungsfähiges überwachtes Framework bietet, sondern auch die Vorteile der nicht beschrifteten Daten effektiv nutzen kann. Auf dem morphologischen Flexionsbenchmark SIGMORPHON übertrifft unser Modell die Einzelmodell-State-of-Art-Ergebnisse bei den meisten Sprachen erheblich.', 'id': 'Transduksi urutan yang dicetak adalah tugas untuk mengubah satu urutan ke urutan lain yang memuaskan desiderata yang dinyatakan oleh set label. In this paper we propose multi-space variational encoder-decoders, a new model for labeled sequence transduction with semi-supervised learning.  Model generatif dapat menggunakan jaringan saraf untuk menangani variabel rahasia dan terus-menerus untuk mengeksploitasi berbagai ciri-ciri data. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita tidak hanya menyediakan rangka yang kuat yang diawasi tetapi juga dapat mengambil keuntungan dari data yang tidak ditandai. Pada benchmark infleksi morfologi SIGMORPHON, model kita melebihi hasil modern model tunggal dengan margin besar untuk kebanyakan bahasa.', 'ko': '태그 시퀀스 전도는 한 시퀀스를 다른 시퀀스로 바꾸는 작업입니다. 이 시퀀스는 탭이 지정한 요구를 충족시킵니다.본고는 반감독 학습을 바탕으로 하는 다공간 변분 코딩 표기 서열 전환 모델을 제시했다.생성 모델은 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 이산과 연속의 잠재적인 변수를 처리하여 데이터의 각종 특징을 이용할 수 있다.실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 강력한 감독 구조를 제공할 뿐만 아니라 표시되지 않은 데이터를 효과적으로 이용할 수 있다.SIGMORPHON 형태학적 굴절 기준 테스트에서 우리의 모델은 대다수 언어에서 단일 모델의 최신 결과보다 큰 장점을 가진다.', 'fa': 'ترجمه\u200cی ترجمه\u200cهای برگزیده\u200cشده یک کار از تغییر یک ترجمه به ترجمه\u200cی دیگر است که با یک مجموعه برگزیده\u200cهای برگزیده\u200cشده desiderata را satisfactory می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل جدید برای تبدیل کردن رده\u200cهای نقاشی با یادگیری نیمه تحت نظر قرار گرفته باشد. مدل تولید می\u200cتواند از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی استفاده کند تا از تغییرات مختلف و متفاوت متفاوت\u200cهای مختلف داده استفاده کند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما فقط یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار در مقدار تأثیر مورفولوژیکی SIGMORPHON، مدل ما نتیجه\u200cهای یک مدل هنری را با یک مقدار بزرگ برای بیشتر زبان انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mfumo unaoelekezwa ni jukumu la kubadilisha mfululizo mmoja katika mfululizo mwingine ambao unaridhia maendeleo yaliyoelezwa na seti za alama. Katika karatasi hii tunapendekeza mabadiliko mbalimbali ya anga mbalimbali, mtindo mpya wa usambazaji wa mfululizo unaofanywa na elimu inayofuatiliwa na sekondari. Mradi wa jenerali unaweza kutumia mitandao ya neura ili kukabiliana na mabadiliko yanayoendelea na kuendelea ili kutumia vipengele mbalimbali vya taarifa. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu haitoi mifumo yenye nguvu inayofuatiliwa lakini pia inaweza kutumia ufanisi wa taarifa zisizoeleweka. Katika mfumo wa ushawishi wa kimaadili wa SIGMORPHON, mwelekeo wetu unaonyesha matokeo ya hali ya sanaa pekee kwa ajili ya lugha nyingi.', 'tr': 'etiket edilen sıralar terjime edilmesi bir etiket bilen berilen desiderata üçin bir terjime üýtgetmek üçin bir täblidir. Bu kagyzda birnäçe-seleňsiz ködleme kodçularyny teklip edip görýäris. Janlaşdyrma modeli diskretli we daşary çykan üýtgewleri ulanmak üçin neiral aňlary ulanyp biler. Experiimentlerimiz biziň modelimiz diňe güýçli gözlemýän çerýädä däl, ýöne bu ýagdaýyň üstüne çykyp bilmedikleri maglumatlaryň faydasyny ulanyp biler. SIGMORPHON morfolojik infleksiýanyň takmynasynda, biziň nusgamyz dili köpüsi üçin ýeke nusga çykýar.', 'af': "Gemerkte volgorde vertaling is 'n taak van om een volgorde te verander na 'n ander volgorde wat verskaf desiderate gespesifiseer deur' n stel van etikette. In hierdie papier voorstel ons multi-spasie variasionale enkoder-dekodere, 'n nuwe model vir etiketeerde volgorde oordrag met semi-superviseer leer. Die genereer model kan neurale netwerke gebruik om beide diskrete en voortdurende latente veranderlikes te hanteer om verskillende funksies van data te gebruik. Eksperimente vertoon dat ons model nie slegs 'n kragtige ondersoekte raamwerk verskaf nie, maar ook kan effektief voordeel van die ongeabelde data neem. Op die SIGMORPHON morfologiese inflekking-benchmark, ons model uitvoer enkel-model-state-of-art resultate deur 'n groot marge vir die meeste taal.", 'sq': 'Transduksioni i sekuencës së etiketuar është një detyrë për të transformuar një sekuencë në një sekuencë tjetër që përmbush desideratën e specifikuar nga një set etiketash. Në këtë letër propozojmë koduesit variacionalë të shumëhapësirës, një model të ri për transdukimin e sekuencës së etiketuar me mësim gjysmë-mbikqyrur. Modeli gjenerativ mund të përdorë rrjetet neuronale për të trajtuar si të diskrete ashtu edhe të vazhdueshme të ndryshueshme të fshehta për të shfrytëzuar karakteristika të ndryshme të të dhënave. Eksperimentet tregojnë se modeli ynë ofron jo vetëm një kuadër të fuqishëm të mbikqyrur, por gjithashtu mund të përfitojë efektivisht nga të dhënat pa shenjë. Në pikëpamjen morfologjike të SIGMORPHON-it, modeli ynë mbivlerëson rezultatet me një model të vetëm të state-of-art me një margin të madh për shumicën e gjuhëve.', 'am': 'ቦታ በዚህ ፕሮግራም በብዙ-space-variable encoder-decoders እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የውይይት ሞዴል የተለያዩ የዳታ ምርጫዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል የነዌብ መረብ እና የሚቀጥለውን ለውጦች ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ ፈተናዎች ምሳሌያችን በኃይለኛ የተጠበቀው ፍሬም ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን ከሌሎች ያልታወቀውን ዳራዎችን በጥቅም ሊጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በSIGMORPHON ሞርፎሎጂ ማቀናጃ ላይ እና ሞዴላታችን ለብዙዎቹ ቋንቋዎች ብዛት የፊደል የአንዲት የዐርድ ሥርዓት ፍሬዎችን ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'az': 'Etilmiş seçmə təkrarlaması bir seçmə başqa seçmə olaraq təkrarlanan etiketlərlə beləliklə təkrarlanan desideratı təmizləyən bir işdir. Bu kağızda çoxlu uzay variasiyonlu kodlayıcı-kodlayıcıları təklif edirik, yarı-gözləyirli öyrənmə ilə etiketli seçmə üçün yeni modeli. Generativ modeli müxtəlif məlumatların fərqli tərzlərini istifadə etmək üçün nöral ağlarını istifadə edə bilər. Həqiqətən, təcrübələrimiz modellərimizin güclü təhlükəsizli bir frameworku təmin edir, lakin həmçinin yazılmadığı məlumatlardan faydalanır. SIGMORPHON morfolojik infleksyon benchmarkində modellərimiz tək modellü sanat sonuçlarını çoxluğu dillərə böyük bir margin olaraq göstərir.', 'hy': 'Տեղադրված հաջորդականության հաջորդականությունը մի հաջորդականություն վերածելու խնդիր է, որը բավարարում է պիտակների կողմից նշված դեսերատային հաջորդականությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմատարածական բազմատարածական կոդավորիչներ, մի նոր մոդել, որն օգտագործում է կես-վերահսկված ուսումնասիրությամբ նշանակված հաջորդականության հաղորդակցման համար: Սկզբնական մոդելը կարող է օգտագործել նյարդային ցանցեր, որպեսզի կառավարի անընդհատ և անընդհատ թաքնված փոփոխականները տվյալների տարբեր հատկությունների օգտագործման համար: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը պարունակում է ոչ միայն հզոր վերահսկվող շրջանակներ, այլ նաև կարող է արդյունավետ օգտագործել անսահմանափակ տվյալները: Սիգմորֆոնի մորֆոլոգիական ազդեցության հարաբերականի վրա մեր մոդելը առավել լավագույն արդյունքներ ունի մեկ մոդել լեզուների մեծամասնության համար:', 'bs': 'Prevod označene sekvence je zadatak transformiranja jedne sekvence u drugu sekvencu koja zadovoljava desideratu određenu grupom etiketa. U ovom papiru predlažemo višeprostorne varijantne kodere, novi model za prevedenje označene sekvence sa polu-nadzornim učenjem. Generativni model može koristiti neuralne mreže kako bi se obrađivala diskretne i kontinualne latentne promjene kako bi iskoristila različite karakteristike podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model obezbeđuje ne samo moćni nadzorni okvir, već i učinkovito može iskoristiti nepoznati podaci. Na morfološkoj mjeri utjecaja SIGMORPHON, naš model iznosi jedinstveno modelne rezultate umjetnosti velikom marginom za većinu jezika.', 'cs': 'Transdukce popisované sekvence je úkol transformace jedné sekvence do jiné sekvence, která splňuje desiderata specifikované sadou štítků. V tomto článku navrhujeme multi-prostorové variační kodéry-dekodéry, nový model pro značené sekvenční transdukce s semi-supervizorovaným učením. Generativní model může použít neuronové sítě pro zpracování diskrétních i kontinuálních latentních proměnných k využití různých funkcí dat. Experimenty ukazují, že náš model poskytuje nejen výkonný monitorovaný rámec, ale také může efektivně využít neznačkovaných dat. Na morfologickém deformačním měřítku SIGMORPHON náš model výrazně překonává výsledky jednotlivých modelů pro většinu jazyků.', 'ca': "La transducció de seqüència etiquetada és una tasca de transformar una seqüència en una altra que satisfa desiderats especificats per un conjunt d'etiquetes. In this paper we propose multi-space variational encoder-decoders, a new model for labeled sequence transduction with semi-supervised learning.  El model generador pot utilitzar xarxes neurals per manejar variables latents discretes i constants per explotar diverses característiques de les dades. Els experiments demostren que el nostre model no només proporciona un marc supervisat poderós, sinó també pot aprofitar efectivament les dades no marcades. On the SIGMORPHON morphological inflection benchmark, our model outperforms single-model state-of-art results by a large margin for the majority of languages.", 'bn': 'লেবেলেট সেকেন্ড ট্রান্ডক্যান্ডুকেশন হচ্ছে একটি সেকেন্ড পরিবর্তনের কাজ যা কিছু লেবেল দ্বারা নির্দিষ্ট ধারণ করেছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বহুস্পেসের বিভিন্ন কোডার-ডেকোডারের প্রস্তাব করি, যা লেবেলের সেকেন্স ট্রান্ড্রান্ডাকেশনের জন্য একটি নতুন ম জেনারেটিভ মডেল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করতে পারে বিভিন্ন তথ্য বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য বিভিন্ন ব Experiments show that our model provides not only a powerful supervised framework but also can effectively take advantage of the unlabeled data.  সিগমর্পফোনের মোর্ফোলিক প্রভাব বেনম্যার্কে আমাদের মডেল এক মডেলের রাষ্ট্র-অফ শিল্পের ফলাফলের মাধ্যমে বেশীরভাগ ভাষার জন্য একটি বিশাল', 'et': 'Märgistatud jada transduktsioon on ülesanne muuta üks jada teiseks jadaks, mis vastab märgiste komplektiga määratud soovile. Käesolevas töös pakume välja multiruumilised variatsioonilised kodeerijad-dekoodrid, uus mudel märgistatud jada transduktsiooniks pooljuhitatud õppega. Generatiivne mudel võib kasutada närvivõrke, et käsitleda nii diskreetseid kui ka pidevaid latentseid muutujaid andmete erinevate omaduste ärakasutamiseks. Katsed näitavad, et meie mudel ei paku mitte ainult võimsat järelevalveraamistikku, vaid suudab ka märgistamata andmeid tõhusalt ära kasutada. SIGMORPHONi morfoloogilise paindlikkuse võrdlusaluse puhul on meie mudel suurem kui ühe mudeli tipptasemel tulemused enamiku keelte puhul.', 'fi': 'Etiketty sekvenssi transduktio on tehtävä muuntaa yksi sekvenssi toiseen sekvenssiin, joka täyttää tarrojen joukon määrittämän toiveen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme moniavaruuden variaatiokooderi-dekooderia, uutta mallia merkittyyn sekvenssisuodostukseen puoliohjatulla oppimisella. Generatiivinen malli voi käyttää neuroverkkoja käsittelemään sekä erillisiä että jatkuvia latentteja muuttujia hyödyntäen datan eri ominaisuuksia. Kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme tarjoaa tehokkaan valvotun kehyksen lisäksi myös tehokkaan hyödyn merkitsemättömästä datasta. SIGMORPHON-morfologisessa taipumusvertailussa mallimme suoriutuu suurilla marginaaleilla useimpien kielten kohdalla yhden mallin huippuluokan tuloksista.', 'jv': 'first Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo akeh koder-akeh liyane karo perusahaan multi-space AllProgressBar Name Ngawe modèl iso nggawe sistem sing perusahaan modèl, iso nggawe sistem sing perusahaan sistem singular-of-arts dadi sing nyimpen bantuan kanggo kalagayet terus kanggo langutan kanggo kalagayet terus.', 'sk': 'Pretvorba označenega zaporedja je naloga pretvorbe enega zaporedja v drugo zaporedje, ki izpolnjuje željo, določeno z nizom označb. V prispevku predlagamo večprostorski variacijski kodirni dekoderji, nov model za označeno transdukcijo zaporedja s polnadzorovanim učenjem. Generativni model lahko uporablja nevronska omrežja za obvladovanje diskretnih in neprekinjenih latentnih spremenljivk za izkoriščanje različnih značilnosti podatkov. Poskusi kažejo, da naš model ne zagotavlja le močnega nadzorovanega okvira, temveč lahko učinkovito izkoristi neoznačene podatke. Pri merilu morfoloških infleksij SIGMORPHON naš model za večino jezikov precej presega najsodobnejše rezultate enega modela.', 'ha': "Sura tarakin da aka rubũta shi yana wani aikin ya musanya sau guda zuwa wani sequence wanda ke yarda da desdesdesdesdesdesdesidarata da aka ƙayyade wasu alama. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa masu buƙata kode-kode-multi-space, wata shekara na samu'a wa transduyon sequence da aka tsare shi na ƙari-tsare. @ info: whatsthis Tajarakin na nuna cewa misalinmu yana bãyar da firam mai ƙarfi kawai da aka tsare shi, kuma yana iya amfani da amfani da bayani ga danne da ba'a rubutu ba. Ga fanget na mutfologi na SGMORPHY, misalinmu yana samar da matsalar-state-of-art guda-motsi mai girma wa masu yawa na harshen.", 'he': '砖讬谞讜讬 专爪祝 诪住讜诪谉 讛讜讗 诪砖讬诪讛 砖诇 砖讬谞讜讬 专爪祝 讗讞讚 诇专爪祝 讗讞专 砖诪转讗讬诐 讗转 desiderata 讛诪讜讙讚专 注诇 讬讚讬 拽讘讜爪讛 砖诇 转讜讜讬讜转. 讘注讬转讜谉 讛讝讛 讗谞讜 诪爪讬注讬诐 拽讜讚诐-拽讜讚诐 砖讜讜讬专爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬讜谞爪讬 讛讚讜讙诪谞讬转 讛讚讜专转讬转 讬讻讜诇讛 诇讛砖转诪砖 讘专砖转讜转 注爪讘讬讜转 讻讚讬 诇讟驻诇 讘砖讬谞讜讬讬诐 讚讬住拽专讟讬讬诐 讜诪诪砖讬讻讬诐 诪讜住转专讬诐 讻讚讬 诇谞爪诇 转讻讜谞讜转 砖讜谞讜转 砖诇 谞转讜谞讬诐. 谞讬住讜讬讬诐 诪专讗讬诐 砖讛诪讜讚诇 砖诇谞讜 诪住驻拽 诇讗 专拽 诪住讙专转 驻讜拽讞转 讞讝拽讛, 讗诇讗 讙诐 讬讻讜诇讬诐 诇谞爪诇 讘讗讜驻谉 讬注讬诇 讗转 讛谞转讜谞讬诐 讛诇讗 专砖讜诪讬诐. 讘谞拽讜讚转 讛讛砖驻注讛 讛诪讜专驻讜诇讜讙讬转 砖诇 住讬讙诪讜专驻讜谉, 讛诪讜讚诇 砖诇谞讜 诪讜驻讬注 注诇 转讜爪讗讜转 讞讚-诪讜讚诇 诪爪讘-讗诪谞讜转 注诇 讬讚讬 讙讘讜诇 讙讚讜诇 诇专讜讘 讛砖驻讜转.', 'bo': 'Labeled sequence transduction is a task of transforming one sequence into another sequence that satisfies desiderata specified by a set of labels. In this paper we propose multi-space variational encoder-decoders, a new model for labeled sequence transduction with semi-supervised learning. The generative model can use neural networks to handle both discrete and continuous latent variables to exploit various features of data. Experiments show that our model provides not only a powerful supervised framework but also can effectively benefit from the unlabeled data. On the SIGMORPHON morphological inflection benchmark, our model outperforms single-model state-of-art results by a large margin for the majority of languages.'}
{'en': 'Topically Driven Neural Language Model', 'ar': 'نموذج اللغة العصبية المدفوع موضعيًا', 'ja': '局所駆動神経言語モデル', 'pt': 'Modelo de linguagem neural orientado por tópicos', 'es': 'Modelo de lenguaje neuronal impulsado por temas', 'fr': 'Modèle de langage neuronal piloté par sujet', 'ru': 'Тематически управляемая модель нейронного языка', 'zh': '局部驱动神经语言模样', 'hi': 'Topically संचालित तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल', 'ga': 'Múnla Teanga Néar-Thiomanta go hÁbhar', 'hu': 'Aktuálisan vezérelt neurális nyelvi modell', 'kk': 'Жоғарғы драйвер нейралық тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'Teminis vairuotojo nervinės kalbos modelis', 'mk': 'Модел на нервен јазик', 'el': 'Τοπικά οδηγημένο Νευρικό Μοντέλο Γλώσσας', 'ka': 'Name', 'ms': 'Topically Driven Neural Language Model', 'it': 'Modello linguistico neurale guidato topicamente', 'mt': 'Mudell tal-Lingwa Newrali Mħaddem Topikament', 'pl': 'Model języka neuronowego napędzanego topicznie', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хамгийн гол хөдөлгөөн мэдрэлийн хэл загвар', 'ml': 'സ്വയമായി ഡ്രൈവ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d', 'sr': 'Topično vozan neuralni jezik', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපිත භාෂා මොඩේල්', 'ro': 'Modelul limbajului neural condus topic', 'so': 'Midabka luqada guud ee guud', 'sv': 'Aktuellt driven neural språkmodell', 'ta': 'பொதுவாக இயக்கப்பட்ட நெயுரல் மொழி மாதிரி', 'ur': 'توپ سے ڈرائین نیورال زبان موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình nền văn học', 'bg': 'Модел на локално задвижван неврален език', 'hr': 'Topično vođeni neuralni jezik', 'nl': 'Topically Driven Neural Language Model', 'da': 'Aktuelt drevet neural sprogmodel', 'id': 'Topically Driven Neural Language Model', 'de': 'Topisch angetriebenes neuronales Sprachmodell', 'fa': 'مدل زبان عصبی مستقیم', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Lugha ya Kiurali', 'tr': 'Durum Saýlaw', 'sq': 'Modeli i gjuhës nervore', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Տեսագրական նյարդային լեզվի մոդել', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Üstündə sürücü nöral Dil Modeli', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষা মোডেল', 'ko': '국부 구동 신경 언어 모델', 'bs': 'Topično vođeni neuralni jezik', 'ca': 'Model de llenguatge neural conduït tòpicament', 'cs': 'Lokálně řízený neuronový jazykový model', 'et': 'Kohapealselt juhitud närvikeele mudel', 'fi': 'Paikallisesti ohjattu hermokielen malli', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודל שפה נוירולית מונעת באופן נושאי', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Topično poganjen model živčnega jezika', 'bo': 'Topically Driven Neural Language Model'}
{'en': 'Language models are typically applied at the sentence level, without access to the broader document context. We present a neural language model that incorporates document context in the form of a topic model-like architecture, thus providing a succinct representation of the broader document context outside of the current sentence. Experiments over a range of datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms a pure sentence-based model in terms of language model perplexity, and leads to topics that are potentially more coherent than those produced by a standard LDA topic model. Our model also has the ability to generate related sentences for a topic, providing another way to interpret topics.', 'ar': 'يتم تطبيق نماذج اللغة عادةً على مستوى الجملة ، دون الوصول إلى سياق المستند الأوسع. نقدم نموذجًا للغة العصبية يتضمن سياق المستند في شكل بنية تشبه نموذج الموضوع ، مما يوفر تمثيلًا موجزًا لسياق المستند الأوسع خارج الجملة الحالية. توضح التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعة من مجموعات البيانات أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على النموذج القائم على الجملة الخالص من حيث الارتباك في نموذج اللغة ، ويؤدي إلى موضوعات يحتمل أن تكون أكثر تماسكًا من تلك التي ينتجها نموذج موضوع LDA قياسي. يتمتع نموذجنا أيضًا بالقدرة على إنشاء جمل ذات صلة بموضوع ما ، مما يوفر طريقة أخرى لتفسير الموضوعات.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques sont généralement appliqués au niveau de la phrase, sans accès au contexte plus large du document. Nous présentons un modèle de langage neuronal qui intègre le contexte du document sous la forme d'une architecture de type modèle thématique, fournissant ainsi une représentation succincte du contexte plus large du document en dehors de la phrase actuelle. Des expériences sur une gamme d'ensembles de données démontrent que notre modèle surpasse un modèle purement basé sur la phrase en termes de perplexité du modèle linguistique et conduit à des sujets potentiellement plus cohérents que ceux produits par un modèle de sujet LDA standard. Notre modèle a également la capacité de générer des phrases associées pour un sujet, offrant ainsi une autre façon d'interpréter les sujets.", 'pt': 'Os modelos de linguagem são normalmente aplicados no nível da sentença, sem acesso ao contexto mais amplo do documento. Apresentamos um modelo de linguagem neural que incorpora o contexto do documento na forma de uma arquitetura semelhante ao modelo de tópico, fornecendo assim uma representação sucinta do contexto mais amplo do documento fora da frase atual. Experimentos em uma variedade de conjuntos de dados demonstram que nosso modelo supera um modelo baseado em sentenças puro em termos de perplexidade do modelo de linguagem e leva a tópicos que são potencialmente mais coerentes do que aqueles produzidos por um modelo de tópicos LDA padrão. Nosso modelo também tem a capacidade de gerar sentenças relacionadas a um tópico, fornecendo outra maneira de interpretar tópicos.', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos se aplican normalmente a nivel de oración, sin acceso al contexto más amplio del documento. Presentamos un modelo de lenguaje neuronal que incorpora el contexto del documento en forma de una arquitectura similar a un modelo de tema, proporcionando así una representación sucinta del contexto más amplio del documento fuera de la oración actual. Los experimentos realizados en una variedad de conjuntos de datos demuestran que nuestro modelo supera a un modelo basado en oraciones puramente en términos de perplejidad del modelo lingüístico y conduce a temas que son potencialmente más coherentes que los producidos por un modelo de tema estándar de LDA. Nuestro modelo también tiene la capacidad de generar oraciones relacionadas para un tema, proporcionando otra forma de interpretar los temas.', 'ja': '言語モデルは、通常、より広範な文書コンテキストにアクセスすることなく、文章レベルで適用されます。私たちは、トピックモデルのようなアーキテクチャの形で文書コンテキストを組み込んだニューラル言語モデルを提示し、それにより、現在の文章の外側にあるより広範な文書コンテキストの簡潔な表現を提供します。一連のデータセットに関する実験は、私たちのモデルが言語モデルの複雑さの観点から純粋な文ベースのモデルよりも優れており、標準的なLDAトピックモデルによって生成されるものよりも一貫性のあるトピックにつながる可能性があることを示しています。当社のモデルには、トピックに関連する文章を生成する機能もあり、トピックを解釈する別の方法を提供します。', 'zh': '言语模形常用于句级,无法访问更广文档上下文。 立一神经言,以类合文档上下文,以广文档上下文之约。 列数之实验,困于言语,优于句法,而题或连于准LDA题连于题。 我们的模样还能为主题生成相关句子,供给另一种解释主题的方法。', 'ru': 'Языковые модели обычно применяются на уровне предложений, без доступа к более широкому контексту документа. Мы представляем нейронную языковую модель, которая включает контекст документа в виде тематической модельной архитектуры, таким образом обеспечивая краткое представление более широкого контекста документа за пределами текущего предложения. Эксперименты по целому ряду наборов данных показывают, что наша модель превосходит чистую модель, основанную на предложениях, с точки зрения недоумения языковой модели и приводит к темам, которые потенциально более последовательны, чем те, которые производятся стандартной моделью топиков LDA. Наша модель также имеет возможность генерировать связанные предложения для темы, предоставляя другой способ интерпретации тем.', 'hi': 'भाषा मॉडल आमतौर पर व्यापक दस्तावेज़ संदर्भ तक पहुंच के बिना, वाक्य स्तर पर लागू होते हैं। हम एक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एक विषय मॉडल जैसी वास्तुकला के रूप में दस्तावेज़ संदर्भ को शामिल करता है, इस प्रकार वर्तमान वाक्य के बाहर व्यापक दस्तावेज़ संदर्भ का एक संक्षिप्त प्रतिनिधित्व प्रदान करता है। डेटासेट की एक श्रृंखला पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल भाषा मॉडल की उलझन के मामले में एक शुद्ध वाक्य-आधारित मॉडल को मात देता है, और उन विषयों की ओर जाता है जो संभावित रूप से एक मानक एलडीए विषय मॉडल द्वारा उत्पादित लोगों की तुलना में अधिक सुसंगत हैं। हमारे मॉडल में एक विषय के लिए संबंधित वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करने की क्षमता भी है, जो विषयों की व्याख्या करने का एक और तरीका प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Go hiondúil cuirtear múnlaí teanga i bhfeidhm ag leibhéal na habairte, gan rochtain ar chomhthéacs níos leithne an doiciméid. Cuirimid múnla néartheanga i láthair a ionchorpraíonn comhthéacs doiciméad i bhfoirm ailtireachta atá cosúil le múnla topaicí, rud a sholáthraíonn léiriú gonta ar chomhthéacs níos leithne an doiciméid lasmuigh den abairt reatha. Léiríonn turgnaimh thar raon tacar sonraí go n-éiríonn lenár múnla ná samhail íon bunaithe ar phianbhreith i dtéarmaí aimhréiteach na samhla teanga, agus go n-eascraíonn topaicí a d’fhéadfadh a bheith níos comhleanúnaí ná iad siúd a tháirgtear ag múnla caighdeánach topaicí LDA. Tá an cumas ag ár múnla freisin abairtí gaolmhara a ghiniúint le haghaidh ábhar, ag soláthar bealach eile chun topaicí a léirmhíniú.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi modelleket általában mondatszinten alkalmazzák, anélkül, hogy hozzáférnénk a szélesebb dokumentumkörnyezethez. Egy olyan neurális nyelvi modellt mutatunk be, amely egy téma modellszerű architektúra formájában magába foglalja a dokumentumkontextust, így tömör ábrázolást biztosít a jelenlegi mondaton kívüli szélesebb dokumentumkontextusról. A különböző adatkészleteken végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk a nyelvi modell zavarósága tekintetében felülmúlja a tiszta mondat alapú modellt, és potenciálisan koherensebb témákhoz vezet, mint egy standard LDA témakészítmény. Modellünk képes arra is, hogy kapcsolódó mondatokat generáljon egy témához, ami más módot biztosít a témák értelmezésére.', 'ka': 'ენის მოდელები ტიპოლურად გამოყენებულია სიტყვების დონეში, უფრო დიდი დოკუმენტის კონტექსტის გახსნა. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური ენის მოდელს, რომელიც დოკუმენტის კონტექსტის ფორმაში გამოყენებული ტემენტის მოდელური აქტიქტიქტურის ფორმაში, რომელიც მიმდინარე სიტყვების გარეშე უფრო მონაცემების განსხვავებების განსხვავებაში გამოცდილობენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი განსხვავებული სიტყვების მოდელზე უფრო მუშაობელი მოდელზე გამოცდილობენ ენის მოდელს, რომელიც უფრო მუშაობელია, რომელიც სტანდარტ ჩვენი მოდელი აქვს ასევე შესაძლებლობა გავიქმნა შესახებ შესახებ საქმენო ტექმიისთვის, რომელიც სხვა გზა გავიქმნა თემენტებისთვის.', 'el': 'Τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα εφαρμόζονται συνήθως σε επίπεδο προτάσεων, χωρίς πρόσβαση στο ευρύτερο πλαίσιο του εγγράφου. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής γλώσσας που ενσωματώνει το πλαίσιο του εγγράφου με τη μορφή μιας αρχιτεκτονικής που μοιάζει με μοντέλο θέματος, παρέχοντας έτσι μια συνοπτική αναπαράσταση του ευρύτερου πλαισίου του εγγράφου εκτός της παρούσας πρότασης. Τα πειράματα σε μια σειρά συνόλων δεδομένων καταδεικνύουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά ένα καθαρό μοντέλο βασισμένο σε προτάσεις από την άποψη της σύγχυσης του γλωσσικού μοντέλου και οδηγεί σε θέματα που είναι δυνητικά πιο συνεκτικά από αυτά που παράγονται από ένα τυποποιημένο μοντέλο θέματος. Το μοντέλο μας έχει επίσης τη δυνατότητα να παράγει σχετικές προτάσεις για ένα θέμα, παρέχοντας έναν άλλο τρόπο ερμηνείας θεμάτων.', 'it': "I modelli linguistici sono tipicamente applicati a livello di frase, senza accesso al contesto più ampio del documento. Presentiamo un modello di linguaggio neurale che incorpora il contesto documentale sotto forma di un'architettura modello-argomento, fornendo così una rappresentazione succinta del contesto documentale più ampio al di fuori della frase corrente. Esperimenti su una serie di set di dati dimostrano che il nostro modello supera un modello basato su frasi puro in termini di perplessità del modello linguistico e porta a argomenti potenzialmente più coerenti di quelli prodotti da un modello LDA standard. Il nostro modello ha anche la capacità di generare frasi correlate per un argomento, fornendo un altro modo di interpretare argomenti.", 'mk': 'Моделите на јазик обично се применуваат на нивото на речениците, без пристап до поширокиот контекст на документот. Презентираме нервен јазик модел кој вклучува документски контекст во форма на тематска архитектура слична на модел, со што ќе обезбеди кратко претставување на поширокиот документски контекст надвор од сегашната реченица. Експериментите врз голем број податоци покажуваат дека нашиот модел го надминува чистиот модел базиран на реченици во поглед на збунетоста на јазичкиот модел, и води до теми кои се потенцијално покохерентни од оние што се произведени од стандардниот модел на LDA тема. Нашиот модел, исто така, има способност да генерира поврзани реченици за една тема, обезбедувајќи друг начин за интерпретација на темите.', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгілері әдетте сөз деңгейінде қолданылады, кеңейтілген құжат контекстіне қатынау мүмкін емес. Біз құжаттың контексті тақырыпты үлгі сияқты архитектураның түріне енгізген невралдық тіл үлгісін келтіреміз, сондықтан қазіргі сөздің сыртындағы кеңейтілген құжаттың контекстігін көрсету ке Деректер жиындарының арасындағы тәжірибелері біздің үлгіміз тіл үлгісінің тәуелсіздікті түрлі үлгісінің арқылы тәуелсіздігін көрсетеді, және стандартты LDA нақыштың үлгісінен жасалған нақыштардан арқылы ба Біздің үлгімізде мәтін үшін сілтемелерді құру мүмкіндігі бар, тақырыптарды толыптау үшін басқа жолын беру мүмкіндігі бар.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa biasanya dilaksanakan pada aras kalimat, tanpa akses ke konteks dokumen yang lebih luas. Kami memperkenalkan model bahasa saraf yang memasukkan konteks dokumen dalam bentuk arkitektur model topik, dengan menyediakan perwakilan singkat bagi konteks dokumen yang lebih luas diluar kalimat semasa. Eksperimen di atas julat set data menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui model berasaskan kalimat secara murni dalam terma kekacauan model bahasa, dan membawa kepada topik yang berpotensi lebih konsisten daripada yang dicipta oleh model topik LDA piawai. Model kita juga mempunyai kemampuan untuk menghasilkan kalimat berkaitan untuk topik, menyediakan cara lain untuk menerangkan topik.', 'lt': 'Kalbos modeliai paprastai taikomi sakinių lygiu, neturint galimybės susipažinti su platesniu dokumento kontekstu. Pateikiame nervinės kalbos model į, kuriame įtraukiamas dokumentų kontekstas į teminę model in ę architektūrą, taip sutrumpintas platesnio dokumento konteksto vaizdas už dabartinio sakinio ribų. Įvairių duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis atitinka gryną sakiniais pagrįstą model į kalbos modelio perplexumo atžvilgiu ir lemia temas, kurios gali būti nuoseklesnės nei standartinio MTA teminio modelio. Mūsų modelis taip pat turi galimybę sukurti susijusius sakinius tam tikrai temai, suteikiant kitą būdą aiškinti temas.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi huma tipikament applikati fil-livell tas-sentenza, mingħajr aċċess għall-kuntest usa’ tad-dokument. We present a neural language model that incorporates document context in the form of a topic model-like architecture, thus providing a succinct representation of the broader document context outside of the current sentence.  L-esperimenti fuq firxa ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta juru li l-mudell tagħna jipproduċi mudell pur ibbażat fuq sentenzi f’termini ta’ perplessità tal-mudell lingwistiku, u jwassal għal suġġetti li potenzjalment huma aktar koerenti minn dawk prodotti minn mudell ta’ suġġett standard LDA. Il-mudell tagħna għandu wkoll il-kapaċità li jiġġenera sentenzi relatati għal suġġett, li jipprovdi mod ieħor biex jiġu interpretati suġġetti.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്ക് നിലയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, വിശാലമായ രേഖയുടെ കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സെക്റ്റിലേക് ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d നാം കാണിക്കുന്നു. പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ പോലുള്ള ഒരു പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d രേഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രേഖകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക് ഒരുപാട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രശ്നമായ ഒരു ശുദ്ധ വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു എന്ന് വ Our model also has the ability to generate related sentences for a topic, providing another way to interpret topics.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice sunt de obicei aplicate la nivelul propoziției, fără acces la contextul documentului mai larg. Prezentăm un model de limbaj neural care încorporează contextul documentelor sub forma unei arhitecturi asemănătoare subiectului, oferind astfel o reprezentare succintă a contextului documentului mai larg în afara propoziției curente. Experimentele pe o gamă largă de seturi de date demonstrează că modelul nostru depășește un model pur bazat pe propoziții în ceea ce privește perplexitatea modelului lingvistic și duce la subiecte care sunt potențial mai coerente decât cele produse de un model standard de subiect LDA. Modelul nostru are, de asemenea, capacitatea de a genera propoziții conexe pentru un subiect, oferind o altă modalitate de interpretare a subiectelor.', 'mn': 'Холбооны загварууд илүү өргөн баримт орчинд хүрэхгүй өгүүлбэр дээр ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Бид баримт орчин үеийн загвар шиг архитектурын хэлбэрээр баримт байдлыг нэгтгэдэг мэдрэлийн хэл загварын загварыг илэрхийлэх болно. Иймээс орчин үеийн гадна илүү өргөн баримт байдлыг илэрхийлэх болно. Бидний загвар нь хэл загварын загварын тухай цэвэр өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн загварын тухай цэвэр өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй загварыг дамжуулж, стандарт LDA сэдвийн загвараас илүү хамааралтай сэдвүүдэд хүргэж байна. Бидний загварын загвар нь мөн сэдэв дээр холбоотой үг бий болгох боломжтой, сэдэв дээр илэрхийлэх өөр арга хангалттай.', 'sr': 'Jezikovi modeli se obično primjenjuju na nivou rečenice, bez pristupa širom kontekstu dokumenta. Predstavljamo model neuralnog jezika koji uključuje kontekst dokumenta u oblik arhitekture slične na temu, tako pružajući potpunu predstavu širokog konteksta dokumenta izvan trenutne rečenice. Eksperimenti preko niza podataka pokazuju da naš model izvršava čist model na rečenici u smislu perpleksije jezičkog model a i vodi do teme koje su potencijalno saskaņotne od onih koji su proizvedeni standardnim modelom LDA-a. Naš model takođe ima sposobnost da stvori povezane rečenice za temu, pružajući drugi način da tumači teme.', 'no': 'Språk- modeller vert vanlegvis bruka på setningsnivået utan tilgang til breidde dokumentkontekst. Vi presenterer eit neuralspråk-modell som inkluderer dokumentkontekst i form av eit temamodell-liknande arkitektur, slik at det gjer ein sjølvsagt representasjon av den bredere dokumentkonteksten utenfor det gjeldande setninga. Eksperimentar over eit rekke datasett viser at modellen vårt utfører eit rein setningsbasert modell i uttrykk av språk-modellen, og fører til emner som er potensielt meir koherent enn dei som er produsert av eit standardmodell LDA. Modellen vårt har også kapasitet til å laga relaterte setningar for eit emne, og tilbyr ein annan måte å tolka emne.', 'pl': 'Modele językowe są zazwyczaj stosowane na poziomie zdań, bez dostępu do szerszego kontekstu dokumentu. Przedstawiamy neuronowy model języka, który uwzględnia kontekst dokumentu w postaci architektury modelowej tematu, zapewniając zwięzłą reprezentację szerszego kontekstu dokumentu poza aktualnym zdaniem. Eksperymenty na szeregu zbiorów danych pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa model oparty na czystych zdaniach pod względem zagadnień modelu językowego i prowadzi do tematów, które są potencjalnie bardziej spójne niż te produkowane przez standardowy model tematów LDA. Nasz model ma również możliwość generowania powiązanych zdań na temat, zapewniając inny sposób interpretacji tematów.', 'si': 'භාෂා මොඩල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම වාක්ය ස්තූතියේදී, වැඩි ලිපින්ත සංවේදනයට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නෑ. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් භාෂාවක් මොඩල් එකක් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් භාෂාව මොඩල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වි අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක තියෙනවා විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය නිර්මාණය කරන්න, විදිහට අනුවෙන් විදිහට අභිවාද කරන්න.', 'sv': 'Språkmodeller tillämpas vanligtvis på meningsnivå, utan tillgång till det bredare dokumentsammanhanget. Vi presenterar en neural språkmodell som inkorporerar dokumentkontext i form av en ämnesmodellliknande arkitektur, vilket ger en kortfattad representation av det bredare dokumentkontextet utanför den aktuella meningen. Experiment över en rad datauppsättningar visar att vår modell överträffar en ren meningsbaserad modell när det gäller språkmodellförvirring, och leder till ämnen som potentiellt är mer sammanhängande än de som produceras av en standard LDA-ämnesmodell. Vår modell har också förmågan att generera relaterade meningar för ett ämne, vilket ger ett annat sätt att tolka ämnen.', 'so': 'Tusaalada luuqada waxaa lagu codsadaa heerka erayga, iyadoon helin warqadda buuxda. Tusaale ahaan afka nooca ah oo ku qoran qoraalka qoraalka, taasoo ku qoran qaabka dhismaha sawir u eg, taasoo sababtaas darteed u fidinaya mid ka mid ah muuqashada dukumentiga ballaadhan oo ka baxsan qoraalka joogta. Imtixaanka ka badan ee kooxaha macluumaadku waxay muujiyaan in modellkayagu uu sameeyo qaab daahir ah oo ku qoran qaabka muuqashada luuqada, wuxuuna keenaa maadooyin ay ka mid yihiin kuwa suurtowda ka mid ah muusikada maamulka caadiga ah ee LDA. Tusaale ahaan waxaa sidoo kale awood u leh in uu sameyn karo hadal la xiriira, kaasoo bixiya qaab kale oo lagu turjumo maadooyinka.', 'ur': 'زبان نمڈلوں معمولاً مجلس سطح پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے، بغیر پھیلائی ڈیکومٹ کنٹکس کے دسترسی. ہم ایک نئورل زبان مدل کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک ٹیپ مدل کی طرح ایک ٹیپ مدل کی صورت میں ڈیموکسٹ کنٹنس میں شامل ہوتا ہے، اس طرح موجود جماعت کے بغیر ایک گھیرے ڈیموکسٹ کنٹنس کا ایک معجزہ پیش کرتا ہے۔ ڈاٹ سٹ کے مختلف آزمائش کے ذریعے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل ایک پاکیزہ جماعت موڈل کو زبان موڈل کی مختلف بات کے مطابق کامل کرتا ہے اور اس موضوع کو پہنچاتا ہے جو استاندارڈ الڈا موڈل کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے موضوع سے زیادہ مشترک ہیں۔ ہمارے مدل میں بھی ایک موضوع کے لئے ارتباط کے کلمات پیدا کرنے کے قابل ہے، اور موضوع کا تعبیر کرنے کے لئے دوسرا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரிகள் வழக்கமாக வாக்கு நிலையில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகின்றன, அதிகப்பட்ட ஆவணத்தின் மூலம் அணுகாமல். நாம் தற்போதைய வாக்கியத்திற்கு வெளியே உள்ள ஒரு புதிய மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரியை சேர்க்கும் பொருள் மாதிரி உருவாக்கத்தின் வடிவத்தில் உள் மொழி மாதிரி குழப்பத்திற்கு மேல் உள்ள பல தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கு முன்னோட்டம் சுத்தமான வாக்கு மாதிரியை செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது மேலும் மொழி மாதிரி ச எங்கள் மாதிரி தலைப்புகளை விளக்க முடியும் வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்க முடியும், மற்றொரு வழியைக் கொடுக்கிறது.', 'uz': "Tilning modellari oddiy maxfiy soʻzda qoʻllaniladi. Koʻproq hujjatning konteksosiga murojaat yoʻq. Biz mavzu modeli kabi arxituvchi shaklida yangi til modelni qoʻshish mumkin. Bu sababda, joriy soʻzning orasidagi katta hujjatning muzdalarini qoʻllash mumkin. Ko'pchilik maʼlumotlar tarkibida taʼminlovchilar esa modelmiz tilning modeli muvaffaqiyatli modelini bajaradi. Bu mavzularga juda ko'paytirilgan mavzularga ega bo'ladi. Bizning modelimizda ma'lumot uchun bog'liq so'zlarni yaratish imkoniyatini ega bo'ladi, mavzularni tarjima qilish uchun boshqa usul qiladi.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ thường được áp dụng ở mức án, không có quyền truy cập vào hoàn cảnh văn bản rộng hơn. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh có chứa đầy ngữ cảnh tài liệu trong dạng kiến trúc kiểu mẫu chủ đề, cung cấp một sự đại diện ngắn gọn của văn bản rộng hơn ngoài phạm vi hiện thời. Thí nghiệm trên một loạt các tập tin cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn thiện một mô hình đơn thuần dựa trên các mô hình ngôn ngữ, và dẫn đến các chủ đề có khả năng phù hợp hơn những gì sản xuất bởi mô hình mẫu chuyên đề kiểu LDAP tiêu chuẩn. Cũng có khả năng tạo ra các câu liên quan cho một chủ đề, cung cấp một cách khác để giải thích các chủ đề.', 'nl': 'Taalmodellen worden meestal toegepast op zinsniveau, zonder toegang tot de bredere documentcontext. We presenteren een neuraal taalmodel dat documentcontext integreert in de vorm van een topic model-achtige architectuur, waardoor een beknopte weergave van de bredere documentcontext buiten de huidige zin wordt geboden. Experimenten met een reeks datasets tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan een zuiver zinsgebaseerd model in termen van taalmodel verwarring, en leidt tot onderwerpen die potentieel coherenter zijn dan die van een standaard LDA-topic model. Ons model heeft ook de mogelijkheid om verwante zinnen voor een onderwerp te genereren, wat een andere manier biedt om onderwerpen te interpreteren.', 'hr': 'Jezički modeli se obično primjenjuju na razini rečenica bez pristupa širom kontekstu dokumenta. Predstavljamo model neuralnog jezika koji uključuje kontekst dokumenta u oblik arhitekture slične na temu model a, tako pružajući potpunu predstavu širokog konteksta dokumenta izvan trenutne rečenice. Eksperimenti preko niza podataka pokazuju da naš model iznosi čisti model na temelju rečenice u smislu neprijatnosti jezičkog model a i vodi do teme koje su potencijalno saskaņovije od onih koji su proizvedeni standardnim modelom LDA-a. Naš model također ima sposobnost stvoriti povezane rečenice za temu, pružajući drugi način za tumačenje teme.', 'de': 'Sprachmodelle werden typischerweise auf Satzebene angewendet, ohne Zugriff auf den breiteren Dokumentenkontext. Wir präsentieren ein neuronales Sprachmodell, das Dokumentenkontext in Form einer themenmodellartigen Architektur einbezieht und so eine prägnante Darstellung des breiteren Dokumentenkontextes außerhalb des aktuellen Satzes liefert. Experimente über eine Reihe von Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell ein reines satzbasiertes Modell in Bezug auf Sprachmodellverwirrung übertrifft und zu Themen führt, die möglicherweise kohärenter sind als diejenigen, die von einem Standard-LDA-Themenmodell produziert werden. Unser Modell hat auch die Fähigkeit, verwandte Sätze für ein Thema zu generieren, was eine andere Möglichkeit bietet, Themen zu interpretieren.', 'da': 'Sprogmodeller anvendes typisk på sætningsniveau uden adgang til den bredere dokumentkontekst. Vi præsenterer en neural sprogmodel, der inkorporerer dokumentkontekst i form af en emneomodel-lignende arkitektur, hvilket giver en kortfattet repræsentation af den bredere dokumentkontekst uden for den nuværende sætning. Eksperimenter over en række datasæt viser, at vores model overgår en ren sætningsbaseret model med hensyn til sprogmodel forvirring og fører til emner, der potentielt er mere sammenhængende end dem, der produceres af en standard LDA emnemodel. Vores model har også evnen til at generere relaterede sætninger til et emne, hvilket giver en anden måde at fortolke emner på.', 'id': 'Model bahasa biasanya diterapkan pada tingkat kalimat, tanpa akses ke konteks dokumen yang lebih luas. We present a neural language model that incorporates document context in the form of a topic model-like architecture, thus providing a succinct representation of the broader document context outside of the current sentence.  Eksperimen melalui jangkauan dataset menunjukkan bahwa model kita melampaui model yang berdasarkan kalimat yang murni dalam terma perplexi model bahasa, dan mengarah ke topik yang potensial lebih konsisten daripada yang diproduksi oleh model topik LDA standar. Model kita juga memiliki kemampuan untuk menghasilkan kalimat terkait untuk topik, menyediakan cara lain untuk menerjemahkan topik.', 'bg': 'Езиковите модели обикновено се прилагат на ниво изречение, без достъп до по-широк контекст на документа. Представяме невронен езиков модел, който включва контекста на документа под формата на тематична архитектура, подобна на модел, като по този начин предоставя кратко представяне на по-широкия контекст на документа извън текущото изречение. Експериментите върху редица набори от данни показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда чисто базиран на изречения модел по отношение на езиковата смущения на модела и води до теми, които са потенциално по-съгласувани от тези, произведени от стандартен тематичен модел. Нашият модел също така има способността да генерира свързани изречения за дадена тема, осигурявайки друг начин за интерпретиране на темите.', 'ko': '언어 모델은 일반적으로 문장 차원에 적용되기 때문에 더욱 광범위한 문서의 상하문에 접근할 수 없다.우리는 신경 언어 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 주제 모델(예를 들어 체계 구조)의 형식으로 문서의 상하문을 결합시켜 현재 문장 외에 더욱 광범위한 문서 상하문의 간결한 표현을 제공했다.일련의 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 언어 모델의 복잡도 측면에서 순수한 문장 기반 모델보다 우수하고 발생하는 주제는 표준 LDA 주제 모델이 발생하는 주제보다 더욱 일관될 수 있다.우리의 모델은 한 주제에 관련된 문장을 생성하고 다른 주제를 해석하는 방법을 제공할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل زبان معمولاً در سطح جمله کاربرد می\u200cشوند، بدون دسترسی به محیط سند گسترده\u200cتر. ما یک مدل زبان عصبی را نشان می دهیم که محیط سند را در شکل یک معماری مانند مدل موضوع شامل می کند، بنابراین یک نمایش عصبی از محیط سند گسترده\u200cتر بیرون محیط فعلی است. تجربه\u200cهای مختلف مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما یک مدل پاکیزه بر اساس جمله\u200cهای پاکیزه با توجه به مدل مختلف زبان انجام می\u200cدهد و به عنوان موضوع\u200cهایی که احتمالاً بیشتر از موضوع تولید از مدل موضوع LDA استاندارد هماهنگ\u200cتر هستند. مدل ما همچنین توانایی برای تولید جمله\u200cهای مرتبط برای یک موضوع دارد، و راه دیگر برای تولید موضوع را ارائه می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa lugha mara nyingi hutumiwa katika kiwango cha hukumu, bila kupata huduma ya kitabu kikubwa. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa lugha ya asili ambao unajumuisha muktadha wa nyaraka katika namna ya ujenzi wa mifano inayofanana na mada, kwa hiyo inatoa uwakilishi wa kina kwenye muktadha mkubwa wa nyaraka nje ya hukumu ya sasa. Majaribio zaidi ya seti za data yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu inafanya mtindo mzuri wa sentensi yenye msingi wa lugha kwa namna ya utata wa lugha, na yanapelekea mada ambazo zinaweza kuwa na ushirikiano zaidi kuliko zile zilizotengenezwa na mtazamo wa LDA wa kawaida. Mfano wetu pia una uwezo wa kutengeneza hukumu zinazohusiana kwa mada, na kutoa njia nyingine ya kutafsiri mada.', 'af': "Taal modelles word tipies toewend op die setvlak, sonder toegang tot die breideer dokument konteks. Ons stel 'n neurale taal model wat dokument konteks in die vorm van 'n onderwerp model-soos arkitektuur inkorpreer, sodat daardie verskaf 'n seker voorstelling van die breideer dokument konteks buite van die huidige seting. Eksperimente oor 'n reek van datastelle bevestig dat ons model 'n rein setgebaseerde model uitvoer in terms van taal model perpleksie, en lei na onderwerpe wat potensieel meer koherent is as wat deur 'n standaard LDA onderwerp model geproduseer is. Ons model het ook die moontlik om verwante setinge vir 'n onderwerp te genereer en 'n ander manier te verskaf om onderwerpe te interpreteer.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በተጠቃሚ በንግድ ደረጃው ላይ ይደረጋሉ፥ የሰፊው ሰነድ ክፍል ሳይገባ። አዲስ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል፣ ሰነዱን አካባቢ እናስገባለን፡፡ ብዙ ዳታተሮች ፈተናዎች ምሳሌያችን በቋንቋ ሞዴል በተቃወመ የንጹሕ የፊደል ቃላት ምሳሌ እንዲያሳየው እና በተቻለበት የLDA መሠረት ሞዴል ከዘረፋው የበለጠ መሆኑን ይሄዳል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ደግሞ የግንኙነት ቃል ለመፍጠር መችሎታችን አለበት፣ ለጉዳዮችን ለመተረጉም ሌላ መንገድ አለበት፡፡', 'sq': 'Modelet gjuhësore zakonisht aplikohen në nivelin e fjalëve, pa akses në kontekstin më të gjerë të dokumentit. Ne paraqesim një model gjuhësh neurale që përfshin kontekstin e dokumentit në form ën e një arkitekture tematike të ngjashme me model in, duke ofruar kështu një përfaqësim të shkurtër të kontekstit më të gjerë të dokumentit jashtë fjalisë aktuale. Eksperimentet mbi një gamë të të dhënave demonstrojnë se modeli ynë ekziston në një model të pastër bazuar në fjalë në termat e ndërlikueshmërisë së modelit gjuhësor dhe çon në temë që janë potencialisht më koherente se a to të prodhuara nga një model standard temësh LDA. Modeli ynë ka gjithashtu aftësinë për të gjeneruar fjalë të lidhura për një temë, duke ofruar një mënyrë tjetër për të interpretuar temat.', 'tr': 'Dil nusgalary adatça sözlem derejesinde ullanylýar, geniş sened kontekstine erişmeden. Biz senediň kontekstini meňzeş bir tema ýaly arhitektura görkezilýän nural dili nusgasyny görkeýäris, şonuň üçin häzirki sözläniň daşynda döwletli senediň kontekstyny nähili bir şekilde üýtgedýäris. Birnäçe datajyk düzümleriniň üstünde örnekler gurnalýar, biziň modelimiz dil nusgasyna daýan bir sözleň daýan nusgasyny çykarýar we standart LDA nusgasyna görýän temalaryň üstüne mümkin bir hereket edip bilen meňzeýän temalary çykarýar. Biziň nusgamyz hem tema üçin ýaly sözleri döretmäge başga bir ýoly saýlamaga başarýar.', 'hy': 'Լեզու մոդելները սովորաբար կիրառվում են նախադասության մակարդակում, առանց հասանելիության ավելի լայն փաստաթղթի կոնտեքստին: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային լեզվի մոդել, որը ներառում է փաստաթղթի կոնտեքստը թեմային մոդելի նման ճարտարապետության տեսքով, այնպես որ տրամադրում է ավելի լայն փաստաթղթի կոնտեքստը ներկայիս նախադասությունից դուրս: Տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի տարբեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը արտադրում է մաքուր նախադասությունների հիմնված մոդել լեզվի մոդելի խառնաշփոթության տեսանկյունից, և հանգեցնում է թեմաներին, որոնք պոտենցիալ ավելի համապատասխանատու են, քան այն թեման Մեր մոդելը ունի նաև հնարավորություն ստեղծել հարաբեր նախադասություններ թեմայի համար, ապահովելով մեկ այլ միջոց թեմայի մեկնաբանելու համար:', 'az': 'Dil modelləri genellikle cümlələr seviyesində istifadə edilir, geniş dökümət məlumatına istifadə etmədən. Biz məsələnin modeli kimi bir arhitektir şəkildə məsələn məsələsini daxil edən nöral dil modelini göstəririk, bu səbəbdən artıq sözlərin dışında genişliyi döküm məsələsinin dəyişikliyi göstəririk. Bir çox verilən qurğular arasında təcrübələrimiz dil modeli müxtəlif bir modeli ilə təmiz cümlələrə dayandığını göstərir və standart LDA məsələsi modeli ilə ürəklənənlərdən daha münasibətli məsələlərə yol göstərir. Bizim modelimiz də məsələlərə bağlı cümlələr yaratmağa qadirdir, başqa məsələlərə təfsil etmək üçün başqa yol vermək.', 'bn': 'ভাষার মডেল সাধারণত বাক্য স্তরে প্রয়োগ করা হয়, ব্যাপক নথির প্রেক্ষাপটে প্রবেশ না করে। We present a neural language model that incorporates document context in the form of a topic model-like architecture, thus providing a succinct representation of the broader document context outside of the current sentence.  বেশ কিছু তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল ভাষার মডেলের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক একটি পরিষ্কার মডেল প্রদর্শন করে এবং এর ফলে ভাষার মডেলের প্র আমাদের মডেলের সাথে বিষয়টির জন্য সম্পর্কিত বাক্য তৈরি করার ক্ষমতা আছে, যারা বিষয়গুলোর ব্যাখ্যা করার অন্য উপায় দ', 'bs': 'Jezički modeli se obično primjenjuju na nivou rečenice, bez pristupa širom kontekstu dokumenta. Predstavljamo model neuralnog jezika koji uključuje kontekst dokumenta u oblik arhitekture slične na temu model a, tako pružajući potpunu predstavu širokog konteksta dokumenta izvan trenutne rečenice. Eksperimenti preko niza podataka pokazuju da naš model izvršava čist model na rečenici u smislu perpleksije jezičkog model a i vodi do teme koje su potencijalno saskaņovije od onih koji su proizvedeni standardnim modelom LDA-a. Naš model također ima sposobnost stvoriti povezane rečenice za temu, pružajući drugi način da tumači teme.', 'ca': "Els models lingüístics s'aplican típicament a nivell de frases, sense accés al context més ampli del document. We present a neural language model that incorporates document context in the form of a topic model-like architecture, thus providing a succinct representation of the broader document context outside of the current sentence.  Els experiments d'una gama de conjunts de dades demostren que el nostre model supera un model basat en frases en termes de perplexitat del model lingüístic, i porta a temes que són potencialment més coherents que els produïts per un model de tema standard LDA. El nostre model també té l'habilitat de generar frases relacionades per a un tema, proporcionant una altra manera d'interpretar els temes.", 'cs': 'Jazykové modely se obvykle používají na úrovni vět, bez přístupu k širšímu kontextu dokumentu. Představujeme neuronový jazykový model, který zahrnuje kontext dokumentu ve formě architektury podobné tématickému modelu, čímž poskytuje stručnou reprezentaci širšího kontextu dokumentu mimo aktuální větu. Experimenty v řadě datových sad ukazují, že náš model překonává čistě větový model, pokud jde o zmatenost jazykového modelu, a vede k tématům, která jsou potenciálně koherentnější než ta vytvořená standardním LDA tématickým modelem. Náš model má také schopnost generovat související věty k tématu, což poskytuje další způsob interpretace témat.', 'et': 'Keelemudeleid rakendatakse tavaliselt lausetasemel, ilma et oleks juurdepääs laiemale dokumendikontekstile. Esitleme närvikeele mudelit, mis hõlmab dokumendikonteksti teemamudeli sarnase arhitektuuri kujul, pakkudes seega lühidalt esitust laiemast dokumendikontekstist väljaspool praegust lauset. Mitmesuguste andmekogumitega läbiviidud eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudel on keelemudeli segaduse osas üle puhta lausepõhise mudeli ning toob kaasa teemad, mis on potentsiaalselt sidusamad kui standardne LDA teemamudel. Meie mudelil on ka võime genereerida seotud lauseid teema jaoks, pakkudes teist viisi teemade tõlgendamiseks.', 'fi': 'Kielimalleja sovelletaan tyypillisesti lausetasolla ilman pääsyä laajempaan asiakirjakontekstiin. Esitämme neurokielimallin, joka sisältää dokumentin kontekstin teemamallimaisen arkkitehtuurin muodossa ja tarjoaa näin tiiviin esityksen laajemmasta dokumenttikontekstista nykyisen lauseen ulkopuolella. Kokeet useilla aineistoilla osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu kielimallin hämmennyksen kannalta puhtaasta lausepohjaisesta mallista ja johtaa mahdollisesti johdonmukaisempiin aiheisiin kuin LDA-mallissa tuotetut aiheet. Mallillamme on myös kyky luoda aiheeseen liittyviä lauseita, mikä tarjoaa toisen tavan tulkita aiheita.', 'jv': 'Language Awak dhéwé nambah model sing urip ning tarjamahan nggawe Dokumen kang nggawe sistem model sing dumadhi karo architecture, dadi nyimpen dhéwé iso nggawe cara-cara sing dimulakno ning kontèks ngrebut sing paling dhéwé. Gederambungan karo akeh akeh dadi sing paling-akeh dumateng kita model sing bisalahan nggawe modèl sing nyimpen nggagal kuwi model sing perpliksi, lan uga dhéwé ngerasah cara-cara sing ngerasakno sing paling dhéwé nggawe modèl dumateng dhéwé. Model sing ngenggo iso nggawe kelas kuwi nggawe pawartos nggawe ngeralakno temu, supoyo iso nggawe tarjamahan sing apik.', 'ha': '@ action: inmenu Tuna nuna wani motsi na harshen ƙarani da ke shigar da mazaɓa na takardar takardar, cikin tsari, mai kama da muhalli, madaidaici, don haka yana ƙara wani matsayi mai succan wakin takardar da ke saman mazaɓa wanda ke bayan maganar wannan. Fijararin da ke cikin wasu masu tsari na danne ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da wata salon mai tsari a cikin muhalli wa misalin harshen, kuma yana ƙara zuwa maɓallin da ke kasancẽwa mafiya haɗi daga waɗanda aka samar da shi da wani misali na LDA na daidaita. Tuddanmu yana da awon ya ƙãga zartar da cire masu husũma zuwa wani madaidaici, kuma yana da wani hanya na fassarar da maɓalli.', 'sk': 'Jezikovni modeli se običajno uporabljajo na ravni stavka, brez dostopa do širšega konteksta dokumenta. Predstavljamo nevronski jezikovni model, ki vključuje dokumentni kontekst v obliki tematskemu modelu podobne arhitekture, s čimer zagotavlja kratko predstavitev širšega dokumentskega konteksta zunaj trenutnega stavka. Eksperimenti na različnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da naš model presega čisto stavkovni model v smislu zmedenosti jezikovnega modela in vodi do teme, ki so potencialno bolj koherentne od tistih, ki jih proizvaja standardni LDA tematski model. Naš model ima tudi sposobnost ustvarjanja povezanih stavkov za temo, kar zagotavlja drug način interpretacije teme.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת מתאימים בדרך כלל ברמת המשפטים, ללא גישה לקונקסט המסמך הגבוה יותר. אנחנו מציגים מודל שפה עצבית שמכיל קשר מסמכים בצורה של ארכיטקטורה דומה לנושא, כך מספקים מייצג קצר של הקשר המסמכים הגבוה יותר מחוץ למשפט הנוכחי. ניסויים מעל מגוון של קבוצות נתונים מראים שהדוגמא שלנו עולה על דוגמא טהור מבוססת משפטים במונחים של מודל שפה מעורבות, ומובילים לנושאים שאפשר להיות יותר koherenטים מאלה שנוצרים על ידי מודל נושא LDA סטנדרטי. למודל שלנו יש גם את היכולת ליצור משפטים קשורים לנושא, מספק דרך אחרת לפרש נושאים.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚིག་གི་གནས་རིམ་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་པ ང་ཚོས་ཡིག Experiments over a range of datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms a pure sentence-based model in terms of language model perplexity, and leads to topics that are potentially more coherent than those produced by a standard LDA topic model. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཁྲོད་ཀྱིས་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཚིག་རྐང་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ན་ཆོག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'ar': 'تعلم الميزات المعرفية من بيانات النظرة لتصنيف المشاعر والسخرية باستخدام الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de las características cognitivas de los datos de la mirada para la clasificación de sentimientos y sarcasmos mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'fr': "Apprentissage des caractéristiques cognitives à partir des données du regard pour la classification des sentiments et des sarcasmes à l'aide d'un réseau", 'pt': 'Aprendendo recursos cognitivos de dados de olhar para classificação de sentimento e sarcasmo usando rede neural convolucional', 'zh': '用卷积神经网络从凝视数中学识,以行情刺之类', 'ja': '畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した感情と皮肉の分類のための視線データからの認知機能の学習', 'ru': 'Изучение когнитивных особенностей на основе данных Гейза для классификации сентиментов и сарказма с использованием сверточной нейронной сети', 'hi': 'Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर भावना और व्यंग्य वर्गीकरण के लिए टकटकी डेटा से संज्ञानात्मक विशेषताएं सीखना', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Gnéithe Cognaíocha ó Shonraí Gaze le haghaidh Aicmiú Meon agus Sarcasm ag baint úsáide as Líonra Néarach Comhtháite', 'ka': 'გასწავლის კონგენტიგური ფუტურები გასწავლისგან გეზის მონაცემებისთვის და სერკასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციაში', 'el': 'Μάθηση γνωστικών χαρακτηριστικών από δεδομένα βλέψης για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων και σαρκασμού χρησιμοποιώντας το καμπυλωτό Νευρικό Δίκτυο', 'hu': 'Kognitív jellemzők tanulása az érzelmi és szarkazmus osztályozására vonatkozó gazadatokból konvolúciós neurális hálózat segítségével', 'it': 'Imparare le caratteristiche cognitive dai dati dello sguardo per la classificazione del sentimento e del sarcasmo utilizzando la rete neurale convoluzionale', 'kk': 'Қосымша невралдық желі арқылы жұмыс және сарказм классификациясының Gaze деректерінен білмеу', 'lt': 'Naudojant konvolucinį nervinį tinklą, iš jautrumo ir sarkazmo klasifikavimo Gazos duomenų gaunamų pažintinių požymių mokymasis', 'mk': 'Учење на Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'ml': 'സെന്റീമെന്റും സര്\u200dക്കാസം ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഗാസ് ഡേറ്റായുള്ള കോഗ്രിനിവ് വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Belajar Ciri-ciri Pengetahuan Dari Data Gaze untuk Pengesahan dan Klasifikasi Sarkasma menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional', 'mt': 'Learning Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'mn': 'Сонголтын мэдрэлийн сүлжээ ашиглан Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification', 'no': 'Læring av kognitiv funksjonar frå Gaze-data for sentralklassifikasjon og sarkasm med konvolusjonell neiralnettverk', 'pl': 'Uczenie się cech poznawczych z danych spojrzenia dla klasyfikacji sentymentów i sarkazmu przy użyciu konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej', 'sr': 'Naučenje kognitivnih karakteristika iz podataka o Gazi za klasifikaciju sentimenta i sarkasma koristeći konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu', 'ro': 'Învățarea caracteristicilor cognitive din datele de privire pentru clasificarea sentimentelor și sarcasmului folosind Rețeaua Neurală Convoluțională', 'si': 'සංවේදනය සහ සාර්කාස් ක්\u200dලාසික්ෂණය සඳහා ගේස් දත්තෙන් සැක්නිතික විශේෂතාවක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolution Neural Network', 'ta': 'சென்டெண்ட் மற்றும் சார்காஸ் வகைப்படுத்தும் காஜ் தரவிலிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட சிறப்புகளை தொடர்புடைய பிணையத்தை', 'sv': 'Att lära sig kognitiva egenskaper från Gaze Data för Sentiment och Sarkasm Klassificering med hjälp av Konvulutionellt Neural Network', 'ur': 'سنٹیمینٹ اور سارکاسم کلاسیفٹ کے لئے گاز ڈیٹے سے Cognitive Features کی تعلیم کی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học thức động tác từ Lưu Tinh Dữ liệu tình cảm và đánh giá tử', 'bg': 'Изучаване на когнитивни характеристики от данните от погледа за класификация на сентимента и сарказма чрез конвелуционна неврална мрежа', 'hr': 'Naučenje kognitivnih karakteristika iz podataka o Gazi za klasifikaciju osjetljivosti i sarkasma koristeći konvolucionalnu Neuralnu mrežu', 'de': 'Lernen kognitiver Merkmale aus Blickdaten für die Sentiment- und Sarkasmus-Klassifizierung mit Hilfe des Convolutional Neuroral Network', 'nl': 'Het leren van cognitieve kenmerken van Gaze Data voor Sentiment en Sarcasme Classificatie met behulp van Convolutional Neural Network', 'id': 'Belajar Features Cognitive dari Data Gaze untuk Klasifikasi Sentiment dan Sarkasme menggunakan Jaringan Neural Konvelusional', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Tamko za Kihafidhina kutoka Taarifa za Gazeti kwa ajili ya Wakatili na Uchaguzi wa Sarcasm kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای شناخته\u200cای از داده\u200cهای گاز برای کلاس\u200cسازی حس و سارکاسم با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی', 'da': 'Læring af kognitive egenskaber fra Gaze Data til Sentiment og Sarkasme Klassificering ved hjælp af Convolutional Neural Network', 'af': 'Leer kognitiewe eienskappe van Gaze Data vir Sentiment en Sarcasm Klassifikasie deur gebruik van Konvolutiewe Neurale Netwerk', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ko': '권적 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 응시 데이터에서 인지적 특징을 학습하여 감정과 풍자 분류를 하다', 'hy': 'Learning Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'az': '䭯湶潬畣楯湡氠仃뙲慬⁁쒟⁶慳楴즙獩泉餠䝡稠噥物泉饲椠盉餠卡牫慳洠䭬慳楦楫慳楹慳쒱湤慮⁃潧湩瑩癥⁆敡瑵牥猠쎶祲즙湭즙權', 'bn': 'সেন্টিমেন্ট এবং সার্কাস্ম ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য গ্যাজ ডাটা থেকে কোনো ক্যাগনিটিভ বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখা যাচ্ছে কনভোল', 'tr': 'Gaze Maglumaty Sentiment we Sarkasm Sözgütlerini Öwrenmek üçin Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'bs': 'Naučenje kognitivnih karakteristika iz podataka o Gazi za klasifikaciju sentimenta i sarkasma koristeći konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu', 'ca': 'Aprendre característiques cognitives a partir de les dades de Gaza per la classificació del sentiment i del sarcasme utilitzant la xarxa neuronal convolucional', 'cs': 'Učení kognitivních vlastností z pohledových dat pro klasifikaci sentimentů a sarkasmu pomocí konveluční neuronové sítě', 'et': 'Tunne- ja sarkasmi klassifitseerimise kognitiivsete omaduste õppimine vaatlusandmetest konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu abil', 'sq': 'Mësimi i karakteristikave njohëse nga të dhënat e gazës për klasifikimin e ndjenjave dhe sarkazmit duke përdorur rrjetin nervor konvolutiv', 'fi': 'Kognitiivisten ominaisuuksien oppiminen tunteiden ja sarkasmin luokittelusta katsetietojen avulla konvolutionaalisen hermoverkon avulla', 'jv': 'Kowe ngerasai Cogn Attribute nang Gez data kanggo Sentiment lan Sarkasm CLSSIBLIKA gambar Konvolution Neral Network', 'he': 'ללמוד תמונות מזהה ממידע גז לסימון רגשות וסרקזם באמצעות רשת נוירולית משתנה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje kognitivnih značilnosti iz podatkov gledanja za klasifikacijo sentimenta in sarkazma z uporabo konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja', 'bo': 'Learning Cognitive Features from Gaze Data for Sentiment and Sarcasm Classification using Convolutional Neural Network'}
{'en': 'Cognitive NLP systems- i.e., NLP systems that make use of behavioral data-augment traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. We contend that manual extraction of features may not be the best way to tackle text subtleties that characteristically prevail in complex classification tasks like Sentiment Analysis and Sarcasm Detection, and that even the extraction and choice of features should be delegated to the learning system. We introduce a framework to automatically extract cognitive features from the eye-movement / gaze data of human readers reading the text and use them as features along with textual features for the tasks of sentiment polarity and sarcasm detection. Our proposed framework is based on Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). The CNN learns features from both gaze and text and uses them to classify the input text. We test our technique on published sentiment and sarcasm labeled datasets, enriched with gaze information, to show that using a combination of automatically learned text and gaze features often yields better classification performance over (i) CNN based systems that rely on text input alone and (ii) existing systems that rely on handcrafted gaze and textual features.', 'ar': 'أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المعرفية - أي أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي تستفيد من البيانات السلوكية - تزيد من الميزات التقليدية القائمة على النص بميزات معرفية مستخرجة من أنماط حركة العين وإشارات مخطط كهربية الدماغ وتصوير الدماغ وما إلى ذلك. عادةً ما يكون استخراج الميزات يدويًا. نؤكد أن الاستخراج اليدوي للميزات قد لا يكون أفضل طريقة لمعالجة التفاصيل الدقيقة للنص التي تسود بشكل مميز في مهام التصنيف المعقدة مثل تحليل المشاعر واكتشاف السخرية ، وأنه حتى الاستخراج واختيار الميزات يجب تفويضها إلى نظام التعلم. نقدم إطارًا لاستخراج الميزات المعرفية تلقائيًا من بيانات حركة العين / النظرة للقراء البشريين الذين يقرؤون النص واستخدامها كميزات جنبًا إلى جنب مع ميزات نصية لمهام قطبية المشاعر واكتشاف السخرية. يعتمد إطار العمل المقترح لدينا على الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN). تتعلم CNN الميزات من كل من النظرة والنص وتستخدمها لتصنيف نص الإدخال. نحن نختبر أسلوبنا على مجموعات البيانات الموصوفة بالمشاعر والسخرية المنشورة ، المخصبة بمعلومات النظرة ، لإظهار أن استخدام مزيج من ميزات النص والنظرة المكتسبة تلقائيًا غالبًا ما ينتج عنه أداء تصنيف أفضل على (1) الأنظمة القائمة على CNN التي تعتمد على إدخال النص وحده و ( ب) الأنظمة الحالية التي تعتمد على النظرة اليدوية والميزات النصية.', 'es': 'Los sistemas cognitivos de PNL, es decir, los sistemas de PNL que utilizan datos de comportamiento, aumentan las características tradicionales basadas en texto con características cognitivas extraídas de patrones de movimiento ocular, señales de EEG, imágenes cerebrales, etc. Esta extracción de características suele ser manual. Sostenemos que la extracción manual de características puede no ser la mejor manera de abordar las sutilezas del texto que predominan de forma característica en tareas de clasificación complejas, como el análisis de sentimientos y la detección de sarcasmo, y que incluso la extracción y la elección de características deben delegarse al sistema de aprendizaje. Introducimos un marco para extraer automáticamente las características cognitivas de los datos de movimiento ojo/mirada de los lectores humanos que leen el texto y las utilizamos como características junto con características textuales para las tareas de detección de polaridad de sentimientos y sarcasmo. Nuestro marco propuesto se basa en la Red Neural Convolucional (CNN). La CNN aprende las características tanto de la mirada como del texto y las usa para clasificar el texto de entrada. Probamos nuestra técnica en conjuntos de datos publicados con etiquetas de sentimiento y sarcasmo, enriquecidos con información sobre la mirada, para demostrar que el uso de una combinación de texto aprendido automáticamente y funciones de mirada a menudo produce un mejor rendimiento de clasificación en comparación con (i) los sistemas basados en CNN que se basan solo en la entrada de texto y (ii) sistemas que se basan en características textuales y de mirada hechas a mano.', 'pt': 'Sistemas cognitivos de PNL - ou seja, sistemas de PNL que fazem uso de dados comportamentais - aumentam recursos tradicionais baseados em texto com recursos cognitivos extraídos de padrões de movimento dos olhos, sinais de EEG, imagens cerebrais etc. Essa extração de recursos é tipicamente manual. Defendemos que a extração manual de recursos pode não ser a melhor maneira de lidar com sutilezas de texto que caracteristicamente prevalecem em tarefas de classificação complexas como Análise de Sentimentos e Detecção de Sarcasmo, e que mesmo a extração e escolha de recursos devem ser delegadas ao sistema de aprendizado. Introduzimos uma estrutura para extrair automaticamente recursos cognitivos dos dados de movimento dos olhos/olhar de leitores humanos lendo o texto e usá-los como recursos junto com recursos textuais para as tarefas de polaridade de sentimento e detecção de sarcasmo. Nosso framework proposto é baseado em Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN). A CNN aprende recursos do olhar e do texto e os usa para classificar o texto de entrada. Testamos nossa técnica em conjuntos de dados rotulados de sentimento e sarcasmo publicados, enriquecidos com informações de olhar, para mostrar que o uso de uma combinação de texto aprendido automaticamente e recursos de olhar geralmente produz melhor desempenho de classificação em (i) sistemas baseados em CNN que dependem apenas de entrada de texto e ( ii) sistemas existentes que contam com olhar artesanal e recursos textuais.', 'fr': "Les systèmes cognitifs de PNL - c'est-à-dire les systèmes de PNL qui utilisent des données comportementales - augmentent les caractéristiques textuelles traditionnelles avec des caractéristiques cognitives extraites de modèles de mouvements oculaires, de signaux EEG, d'imagerie cérébrale, etc. Cette extraction de caractéristiques est généralement manuelle. Nous soutenons que l'extraction manuelle des caractéristiques n'est peut-être pas la meilleure façon de traiter les subtilités du texte qui prévalent généralement dans les tâches de classification complexes telles que l'analyse des sentiments et la détection des sarcasmes, et que même l'extraction et le choix des fonctionnalités devraient être délégués au système d'apprentissage. Nous introduisons un cadre permettant d'extraire automatiquement les caractéristiques cognitives des données relatives aux mouvements oculaires et au regard des lecteurs humains lisant le texte et de les utiliser comme caractéristiques avec des caractéristiques textuelles pour les tâches de détection de la polarité des sentiments et du sarcasme. Le cadre que nous proposons est basé sur le réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN). Le CNN apprend les caractéristiques du regard et du texte et les utilise pour classer le texte saisi. Nous testons notre technique sur des ensembles de données publiés sur le sentiment et le sarcasme, enrichis d'informations sur le regard, afin de montrer que l'utilisation d'une combinaison de texte appris automatiquement et de caractéristiques du regard donne souvent de meilleures performances de classification que (i) les systèmes basés sur CNN qui reposent uniquement sur la saisie de texte et (ii) les systèmes existants systèmes qui s'appuient sur un regard et des caractéristiques textuelles fabriqués à la main.", 'ja': '認知的NLPシステム、すなわち、行動データを利用するNLPシステムは、眼球運動パターン、脳波信号、脳画像などから抽出された認知的特徴を備えた従来のテキストベースの特徴を増強する。 このような機能の抽出は、通常、手動で行われます。 我々は、感情分析や皮肉検出のような複雑な分類タスクで特徴的に優勢なテキストの微妙さに取り組むためには、特徴の手動抽出が最善の方法ではないかもしれないと主張し、特徴の抽出と選択さえも学習システムに委任すべきであると主張している。 私たちは、テキストを読む人間の読者の目の動き/視線データから認知機能を自動的に抽出し、感情の極性や皮肉検出のタスクのためのテキスト機能とともにそれらを機能として使用するためのフレームワークを紹介します。 提案されたフレームワークは、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）に基づいています。 CNNは、視線とテキストの両方から機能を学習し、それらを使用して入力テキストを分類します。 私たちは、公開されたセンチメントおよび皮肉ラベル付きデータセットで、視線情報を豊富に使用して、自動学習されたテキスト機能と視線機能の組み合わせを使用すると、多くの場合、(i)テキスト入力のみに依存するCNNベースのシステム、および(ii)手作りの視線およびテキスト機能に依存する既存のシステムよりも優れた分類パフォーマンスが得られることを示します。', 'ru': 'Когнитивные системы NLP - то есть, системы NLP, которые используют поведенческие данные - дополняют традиционные текстовые функции когнитивными функциями, извлеченными из моделей движения глаз, сигналов ЭЭГ, визуализации мозга и т. д. Такое извлечение признаков, как правило, осуществляется вручную. Мы утверждаем, что ручное извлечение признаков может быть не лучшим способом решения тонкостей текста, которые характерно преобладают в сложных задачах классификации, таких как анализ сентиментов и обнаружение сарказма, и что даже извлечение и выбор признаков должны быть делегированы системе обучения. Введем фреймворк для автоматического извлечения когнитивных признаков из данных движения глаз/взгляда читателей, читающих текст, и использования их в качестве признаков наряду с текстовыми признаками для задач полярности чувств и обнаружения сарказма. Предлагаемая нами структура основана на сверточной нейронной сети (CNN). Си-эн-эн изучает функции как из взгляда, так и из текста и использует их для классификации вводимого текста. Мы тестируем нашу технику на опубликованных наборах данных, помеченных настроениями и сарказмом, обогащенных информацией о взгляде, чтобы показать, что использование комбинации автоматически изученных функций текста и взгляда часто дает лучшую производительность классификации по сравнению с (i) системами на основе CNN, которые полагаются только на ввод текста, и (ii) существующими системами, которые полагаются на ручной взгляд и текстовые функции.', 'hi': 'संज्ञानात्मक एनएलपी सिस्टम- यानी, एनएलपी सिस्टम जो व्यवहार डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं - आंखों के आंदोलन पैटर्न, ईईजी संकेतों, मस्तिष्क-इमेजिंग आदि से निकाली गई संज्ञानात्मक विशेषताओं के साथ पारंपरिक पाठ-आधारित सुविधाओं को बढ़ाते हैं। सुविधाओं का ऐसा निष्कर्षण आमतौर पर मैनुअल होता है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि सुविधाओं का मैनुअल निष्कर्षण पाठ सूक्ष्मताओं से निपटने का सबसे अच्छा तरीका नहीं हो सकता है जो भावना विश्लेषण और व्यंग्य का पता लगाने जैसे जटिल वर्गीकरण कार्यों में विशिष्ट रूप से प्रबल होते हैं, और यहां तक कि निष्कर्षण और सुविधाओं की पसंद को सीखने की प्रणाली को सौंपा जाना चाहिए। हम पाठ पढ़ने वाले मानव पाठकों के आंख-आंदोलन / टकटकी डेटा से संज्ञानात्मक सुविधाओं को स्वचालित रूप से निकालने के लिए एक रूपरेखा पेश करते हैं और भावना ध्रुवीयता और व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के कार्यों के लिए पाठ्य सुविधाओं के साथ सुविधाओं के रूप में उनका उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा प्रस्तावित ढांचा Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) पर आधारित है। सीएनएन टकटकी और पाठ दोनों से सुविधाओं को सीखता है और इनपुट टेक्स्ट को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए उनका उपयोग करता है। हम प्रकाशित भावना और व्यंग्य लेबल डेटासेट पर हमारी तकनीक का परीक्षण करते हैं, जो टकटकी की जानकारी से समृद्ध है, यह दिखाने के लिए कि स्वचालित रूप से सीखे गए पाठ और टकटकी सुविधाओं के संयोजन का उपयोग करके अक्सर (i) सीएनएन आधारित प्रणालियों पर बेहतर वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन होता है जो अकेले पाठ इनपुट पर भरोसा करते हैं और (ii) मौजूदा सिस्टम जो हस्तनिर्मित टकटकी और पाठ्य सुविधाओं पर भरोसा करते हैं।', 'zh': '识NLP系统-即用行数者NLP系统-从目运式,EEG信号,脑成像等提取认知特征以增旧本。 其取常手动也。 臣愚以为手动取特非情析刺检之普遍存在,文本微妙之最,至于取择亦宜委之学统。 引入一框架,读者目动/视数自取,并起情极性刺检之任。 臣等所建框架基于卷积神经网络(CNN)。 CNN从注视、文本中学特征,而用之对输文本分类。 吾于已发之情,刺标之数集上试吾术,而丰其信息,以明自学之文与凝视之组(i)惟赖文本所输之基于CNN之统,(ii)赖于手工凝视、文本之见有系统者也。', 'ga': 'Córais chognaíoch NLP - ie, córais NLP a bhaineann úsáid as sonraí iompraíochta - cuireann siad le gnéithe traidisiúnta téacs-bhunaithe le gnéithe cognaíocha a bhaintear as patrúin gluaiseachta súl, comharthaí EEG, íomháú inchinne etc. Is gnách go ndéantar gnéithe den sórt sin a bhaint de láimh. Áitímid go mb’fhéidir nach é eastóscadh láimhe gnéithe an bealach is fearr chun dul i ngleic le subtleties téacs a bhíonn i réim go tipiciúil i dtascanna casta aicmithe ar nós Anailís Mothúchán agus Brath Sarcasm, agus gur cheart fiú eastóscadh agus rogha gnéithe a tharmligean chuig an gcóras foghlama. Tugaimid creat isteach chun gnéithe cognaíocha a bhaint go huathoibríoch ó shonraí gluaiseachta súl/gamharc na léitheoirí daonna a léann an téacs agus úsáidimid iad mar ghnéithe mar aon le gnéithe téacsúla le haghaidh tascanna polaraíocht meon agus searbhas a bhrath. Tá an creat atá beartaithe againn bunaithe ar Líonra Néarach Comhtháite (CNN). Foghlaimíonn an CNN gnéithe ó amharc agus ó théacs agus úsáideann sé iad chun an téacs ionchuir a rangú. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár dteicníc ar thacair shonraí lipéadaithe sentiment agus searbhas foilsithe, atá saibhrithe le faisnéis gaze, chun a thaispeáint gur minic go mbíonn feidhmíocht aicmithe níos fearr ag baint úsáide as meascán de ghnéithe a fhoghlaimítear go huathoibríoch agus go mbíonn feidhmíocht aicmithe níos fearr i gcomparáid le (i) córais CNN-bhunaithe a bhraitheann ar ionchur téacs amháin agus ( ii) córais atá ann cheana féin a bhíonn ag brath ar shúil lámhdhéanta agus ar ghnéithe téacsúla.', 'hu': 'A kognitív NLP rendszerek – azaz a viselkedési adatokat felhasználó NLP rendszerek – kiegészítik a hagyományos szövegalapú funkciókat a szemmozgási mintákból, EEG jelekből, agyi képalkotásból stb. kinyert kognitív funkciókkal. Azt állítjuk, hogy a funkciók manuális kinyerése nem a legjobb módja annak, hogy kezeljük a szöveg finomságait, amelyek jellemzően uralkodnak az olyan komplex osztályozási feladatokban, mint az érzelmek elemzése és a szarkazmus felismerése, és hogy még a funkciók kinyerését és kiválasztását is a tanulási rendszerre kell delegálni. Bevezetünk egy olyan keretet, amely automatikusan kivonja a kognitív jellemzőket a szöveget olvasó emberi olvasók szemmozgás/tekintet adataiból, és szöveges jellemzőkként használja azokat az érzelmek polaritásának és szarkazmusának felismeréséhez. Javasolt keretrendszerünk a Convolucional Neural Network (CNN) alapján készül. A CNN mind a tekintetből, mind a szövegből tanul jellemzőket, és ezeket használja a bevitt szöveg osztályozására. Technikánkat tekintési információkkal gazdagított, publikált érzelmekkel és szarkazmussal jelölt adathalmazokon teszteljük annak megmutatására, hogy az automatikusan megtanult szöveg és tekintési funkciók kombinációjának használata gyakran jobb osztályozási teljesítményt eredményez (i) CNN alapú rendszerekkel szemben, amelyek kizárólag a szövegbevitelre támaszkodnak, és (ii) a meglévő rendszerekkel szemben, amelyek kézzel készített tekintetre és szöveges funkciókra támaszkodnak.', 'el': 'Τα γνωστικά συστήματα δηλαδή τα συστήματα που χρησιμοποιούν δεδομένα συμπεριφοράς ενισχύουν τα παραδοσιακά χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται στο κείμενο με γνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγονται από μοτίβα κίνησης ματιών, σήματα εγκεφαλικής απεικόνισης κ.λπ. Τέτοια εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών είναι συνήθως χειρωνακτική. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η χειρωνακτική εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών μπορεί να μην είναι ο καλύτερος τρόπος για να αντιμετωπιστούν οι λεπτομέριες κειμένου που επικρατούν χαρακτηριστικά σε πολύπλοκες εργασίες ταξινόμησης όπως η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και η ανίχνευση σαρκασμού, και ότι ακόμη και η εξαγωγή και η επιλογή των χαρακτηριστικών θα πρέπει να ανατεθεί στο μαθησιακό σύστημα. Εισάγουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την αυτόματη εξαγωγή γνωστικών χαρακτηριστικών από τα δεδομένα κίνησης ματιών/βλέμματος των ανθρώπινων αναγνωστών που διαβάζουν το κείμενο και τη χρήση τους ως χαρακτηριστικών μαζί με κειμενικά χαρακτηριστικά για τα καθήκοντα της πόλωσης συναισθημάτων και της ανίχνευσης σαρκασμού. Το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο βασίζεται στο Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο (ΚΝΝ). Το CNN μαθαίνει χαρακτηριστικά τόσο από το βλέμμα όσο και από το κείμενο και τα χρησιμοποιεί για να ταξινομήσει το κείμενο εισόδου. Δοκιμάζουμε την τεχνική μας σε δημοσιευμένα σύνολα δεδομένων συναισθημάτων και σαρκασμού, εμπλουτισμένα με πληροφορίες βλέμματος, για να δείξουμε ότι η χρήση ενός συνδυασμού αυτόματα μαθημένων χαρακτηριστικών κειμένου και βλέμματος συχνά αποδίδει καλύτερη απόδοση ταξινόμησης σε σχέση με (i) συστήματα βασισμένα στο ΚΝΝ που βασίζονται μόνο στην εισαγωγή κειμένου και (ii) υπάρχοντα συστήματα που βασίζονται στο χειροποίητο βλέμμα και τα χαρακτηριστικά κειμένου.', 'ka': 'Cognitive NLP systems- i.e., NLP systems that make use of behavioral data - augment traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ ფუნქციების მანქანური ექსტრექცია შეიძლება არ იყოს ყველაზე საუკეთესო გზა, რომელიც კომპლექტიკური კლასიფიკაციის მოქმედებში გადავიწყება, როგორც Sentiment Analysis და Sarcasm Detection, და რომ კიდევ ფუნქციების ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ადამიანის კითხველების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების ავტომატურად კონციგური ფუნქციების გამოყენებას და გამოყენებას ტექსტულ ფუნქციების განსა ჩვენი საზოგადოებული ფრამეტრი კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელის (CNN) დაბაზია. CNN იღებს მონაცემები და ტექსტიდან და გამოყენებს მონაცემების ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენი ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება განსხვავებული სინტემისტის და საპკასტის შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც აღმოჩენებული ინფორმაციის შესახებ, რომ ავტომატურად სწავლილი ტექნექტის და დანახების სინტემისტის კომბინექტიკის გამოყენება ზოგიერთი', 'lt': 'Cognitive NLP systems - i.e., NLP systems that make use of behavioral data - augment traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. Mes tvirtiname, kad rankinis savybių išgavimas gali būti ne geriausias būdas spręsti teksto subtilumo klausimus, kurie būdingi sudėtingose klasifikavimo užduotyse, pvz., jutimo analizėje ir sarkazmo nustatyme, ir kad net savybių išgavimas ir pasirinkimas turėtų būti perduoti mokymosi sistemai. Įdiegiame sistemą, kuria automatiškai ištraukiame pažintines savybes iš žmonių skaitytojų, skaitančių tekstą, akių judėjimo ir žvilgsnio duomenų ir naudojame juos kaip savybes, taip pat tekstines savybes jautrumo poliarumo ir sarkazmo nustatymo užduotims. Mūsų siūloma sistema grindžiama konvoliuciniu nervų tinklu (CNN). The CNN learns features from both gaze and text and uses them to classify the input text.  Bandome savo metodą su paskelbtais jausmais ir sarkazmu pažymėtais duomenų rinkiniais, praturtintais žvilgsnio informacija, siekiant parodyti, kad naudojant automatiškai i šmokto teksto ir žvilgsnio charakteristikų derinį dažnai užtikrinamas geresnis klasifikavimo veiksmingumas, palyginti su i) CNN pagrįstomis sistemomis, kurios grindžiamos vien tik teksto įvedimu, ir ii) esamomis sistemomis, kurios grindžiamos rankiniu žvilgsniu ir tekstinėmis charakteristikomis.', 'it': "I sistemi cognitivi NLP, cioè i sistemi NLP che fanno uso di dati comportamentali, aumentano le caratteristiche testuali tradizionali con caratteristiche cognitive estratte da schemi di movimento oculare, segnali EEG, immagini cerebrali ecc. Tale estrazione di caratteristiche è tipicamente manuale. Sosteniamo che l'estrazione manuale delle funzionalità potrebbe non essere il modo migliore per affrontare le sottigliezze testuali che prevalgono tipicamente in attività di classificazione complesse come l'analisi dei sentimenti e il rilevamento del sarcasmo, e che anche l'estrazione e la scelta delle funzionalità dovrebbero essere delegate al sistema di apprendimento. Introduciamo un framework per estrarre automaticamente le caratteristiche cognitive dai dati del movimento degli occhi/sguardo dei lettori umani che leggono il testo e utilizzarle come caratteristiche insieme a caratteristiche testuali per i compiti di polarità sentimentale e rilevazione del sarcasmo. Il nostro framework proposto si basa sulla Rete Neurale Convoluzionale (CNN). La CNN apprende le caratteristiche sia dallo sguardo che dal testo e le usa per classificare il testo in ingresso. Testiamo la nostra tecnica su set di dati pubblicati etichettati con sentiment e sarcasmo, arricchiti con informazioni sullo sguardo, per dimostrare che l'utilizzo di una combinazione di testo e caratteristiche dello sguardo apprese automaticamente produce spesso migliori prestazioni di classificazione rispetto a (i) sistemi basati sulla CNN che si basano solo sull'input del testo e (ii) sistemi esistenti che si basano su sguardo e caratteristiche testuali artigianali.", 'kk': 'Бұл NLP жүйелері - мысалы, әрекет деректерін қолданатын NLP жүйелері - көзді жылжыту үлгілерінен, EEG сигналдардан, мидын кескінілерінен шығарылған кәдімгі мәтіннің негізінде тәртіпсіздік мүмкіндіктерді көзді жылжыту Біз қолмен қатынау мүмкіндіктерін қолмен тарқату мүмкіндігі Sentiment Analysis және Sarcasm Detection сияқты комплекс классификациялық тапсырмаларда көмектесетін мәтін астындарының ең жақсы жолы болуы мүмкін емес, сондай-ақ сондай-ақ қатынау Мәтінді оқу оқушыларының көзді жылжыту/қарау деректерінен автоматты түрде конифициялық мүмкіндіктерді автоматты түрде тартып, мәтінді оқу және оларды мәтінді оқу үшін мәтіндік пішімдерінің мәтінді Біздің таңдалған фрейміміз Конверсионалды нейралық желіне негізделген. CNN қарау мен мәтіннің қасиеттерін оқып, келтірілген мәтінді классификациялау үшін қолданады. Біз жарияланған мәтін және қарау мүмкіндіктерін автоматты түрде үйренген мәтін және қарау мүмкіндіктерін қолдану үшін CNN негіздеген мәтін енгізіміне тәуелді жүйелерді жақсы түрлендіру жүйелерді жақсы түрлендіреді.', 'mk': 'Когнитивните НЛП системи - т.е., НЛП системи кои користат однесувачки податоци - ги зголемуваат традиционалните текстови-базирани карактеристики со когнитивните карактеристики извадени од шеми на движење на очите, ЕГ сигнали, мозочни слики итн. Такво извадување на карактеристики е обично ра Ние тврдиме дека рачното извлекување на карактеристичките карактеристики можеби не е најдобриот начин за решавање на текстовите суптелии кои карактеристички преовладуваат во комплексни класификациски задачи како што се анализа на чувствата и детективирање на сарказмот, и дека дури и извлекувањето и изборот на карактеристиките Вклучуваме рамка за автоматски извлекување на когнитивните карактеристики од податоците за движење на очите/погледот на човечките читачи кои го читаат текстот и ги користат како карактеристики заедно со текстуалните карактеристики за задачите на сентименталната поларитет и детекција на сарказ Нашата предложена рамка е базирана на конволуционалната неврална мрежа (CNN). CNN научи карактеристики од поглед и текст и ги користи за класификување на внатрешниот текст. We test our technique on published sentiment and sarcasm labeled datasets, enriched with gaze information, to show that using a combination of automatically learned text and gaze features often yields better classification performance over (i) CNN based systems that rely on text input alone and (ii) existing systems that rely on handcrafted gaze and textual features.', 'mt': 'Sistemi konjittivi NLP - jiġifieri sistemi NLP li jagħmlu użu minn dejta ta’ mġiba - i żidu l-karatteristiċi tradizzjonali bbażati fuq it-test b’karatteristiċi konjittivi estratti minn mudelli ta’ moviment tal-għajnejn, sinjali EEG, immaġni tal-moħħ e ċċ. Tali estrazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi hija tipikament manwali. Aħna nindirizzaw li l-estrazzjoni manwali tal-karatteristiċi tista’ ma tkunx l-aħjar mod biex jiġu indirizzati s-subtleti tat-test li karatteristikament jipprevalu f’kompiti kumplessi ta’ klassifikazzjoni bħall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment u d-Detezzjoni tas-Sarkazmu, u li anke l-estrazzjoni u l-għażla tal-karatteristiċi għandhom jiġu delegati lis-sistema tat-tagħlim. We introduce a framework to automatically extract cognitive features from the eye-movement/gaze data of human readers reading the text and use them as features along with textual features for the tasks of sentiment polarity and sarcasm detection.  Il-qafas propost tagħna huwa bbażat fuq in-Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN). Is-CNN titgħallem karatteristiċi kemm mill-għajn kif ukoll mit-test u tużahom biex tikklassifika t-test tal-input. We test our technique on published sentiment and sarcasm labeled datasets, enriched with gaze information, to show that using a combination of automatically learned text and gaze features often yields better classification performance over (i) CNN based systems that rely on text input alone and (ii) existing systems that rely on handcrafted gaze and textual features.', 'ml': 'സ്വഭാവിക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന NLP സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d, കണ്ണുനീക്കം മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെടുന്ന പാഠമായ വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു സെന്റിമെന്റ് അനാലസിയും സര്\u200dക്കാസം ഡിറ്റിക്ടറിനും പോലുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കൈകൊണ്ട് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതും പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രത്യേ മനുഷ്യരുടെ വായിക്കുന്ന വായിക്കുന്നവരുടെ കണ്ണുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കണ്ണുനോക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയിക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വിചാരപ്രശ നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാ കണ്ണും വാചകത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും CNN വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാചകത്തെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കു നമ്മുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമാക്കിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രസിദ്ധമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഞങ്ങളുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. നോക്കിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് സമ്പന്നരായിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Sistem NLP yang dikenali - iaitu sistem NLP yang menggunakan data perilaku - meningkatkan ciri-ciri tradisional berdasarkan teks dengan ciri-ciri kognitif yang dikeluarkan dari corak pergerakan mata, isyarat EEG, imej-otak dll. Ekstrasi ciri-ciri tersebut biasanya manual. Kami menegaskan bahawa ekstraksi manual ciri-ciri mungkin bukan cara terbaik untuk menangani halus teks yang secara karakteristik berkuasa dalam tugas klasifikasi kompleks seperti Analisi Sentiment dan Deteksi Sarkasm, dan bahkan ekstraksi dan pilihan ciri-ciri patut dipindahkan ke sistem belajar. We introduce a framework to automatically extract cognitive features from the eye-movement/gaze data of human readers reading the text and use them as features along with textual features for the tasks of sentiment polarity and sarcasm detection.  Our proposed framework is based on Convolutional Neural Network (CNN).  CNN belajar ciri-ciri dari kedua-dua pandangan dan teks dan menggunakannya untuk mengklasifikasikan teks input. Kami menguji teknik kami pada set data yang diterbitkan dengan perasaan dan sarkasma, yang diperiksa dengan maklumat pandangan, untuk menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan kombinasi dari ciri-ciri teks dan pandangan yang belajar secara automatik sering memberikan prestasi klasifikasi yang lebih baik atas (i) sistem berasaskan CNN yang bergantung pada input teks sahaja dan (ii) sistem yang wujud yang bergantung pada pandangan buatan tangan dan ciri-ciri teks.', 'no': 'Cognitive NLP systems - t.d. NLP systems that make use of behavioral data - augment traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. Vi tvar at manuelt utpakking av funksjonar kan ikkje vera den beste måten å handsama tekstsubtletikk som eigentleg overfører i komplekse klassifikasjonar som Sentiment Analysis and Sarcasm Detection, og at selv utpakking og val av funksjonar bør delegerast til læringssystemet. Vi introduserer eit rammeverk for å automatisk pakka ut kognitiv funksjonar frå øybevegelsen/lysaren av menneskelesarar som lesar teksten og brukar dei som funksjonar saman med tekstfunksjonar for oppgåva av sentiment-polaritet og sarkasm-oppdaging. Vårt foreslått rammeverk er basert på Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). CNN lærer funksjonar frå både utsjånad og tekst og brukar dei for å klassifisera inndatateksten. Vi testar teknikken vårt på utgjeven sentiment og sarkasm med merkelappe datasett, røyd med opplysningsinformasjon, for å vise at bruk av ein kombinasjon av automatisk lærte tekst og opplysningsfunksjonar ofte gjer betre klassifikasjonsfunksjon over i) CNN-baserte systemar som rely på tekstinndata alene og ii) eksisterande systemar som rely på handkrafte utsjånad og tekstfunksjonar.', 'ro': 'Sistemele cognitive NLP – adică sistemele NLP care utilizează date comportamentale – sporesc caracteristicile tradiționale bazate pe text cu caracteristici cognitive extrase din modele de mișcare a ochilor, semnale EEG, imagistică a creierului etc. O astfel de extragere a caracteristicilor este de obicei manuală. Susținem că extragerea manuală a caracteristicilor poate să nu fie cea mai bună modalitate de a aborda subtilitățile textului care predomină caracteristic în sarcini complexe de clasificare, cum ar fi Analiza sentimentelor și detectarea sarcasmului, și că chiar extragerea și alegerea caracteristicilor ar trebui delegate sistemului de învățare. Introducem un cadru pentru extragerea automată a caracteristicilor cognitive din datele privind mișcarea ochilor/privirea cititorilor umani care citesc textul și utilizarea lor ca caracteristici împreună cu caracteristici textuale pentru sarcinile de detectare a polarității sentimentelor și sarcasmului. Cadrul nostru propus se bazează pe Rețeaua Neurală Convoluțională (CNN). CNN învață caracteristici atât din privire, cât și din text și le folosește pentru a clasifica textul de intrare. Testăm tehnica noastră pe seturi de date etichetate cu sentiment și sarcasm publicate, îmbogățite cu informații privind, pentru a arăta că utilizarea unei combinații de caracteristici text și privire învățate automat oferă adesea performanțe mai bune de clasificare față de (i) sistemele bazate pe CNN care se bazează doar pe introducerea textului și (ii) sistemele existente care se bazează pe privire manuală și caracteristici textuale.', 'pl': 'Poznawcze systemy NLP – tj. systemy NLP, które wykorzystują dane behawioralne, rozszerzają tradycyjne cechy tekstowe o cechy poznawcze uzyskane z wzorców ruchów oczu, sygnałów EEG, obrazowania mózgu itp. Taka ekstrakcja cech jest zazwyczaj ręczna. Twierdzimy, że ręczna ekstrakcja cech może nie być najlepszym sposobem na rozwiązanie subtelności tekstu, które charakterystycznie dominują w złożonych zadaniach klasyfikacyjnych, takich jak analiza sentymentów i wykrywanie sarkazmu, a nawet ekstrakcja i wybór cech powinny być delegowane do systemu uczenia się. Wprowadzamy framework automatycznego wyodrębniania cech poznawczych z danych dotyczących ruchu oczu/spojrzenia czytelników czytających tekst i wykorzystywania ich jako cech wraz z cechami tekstowymi do zadań polaryzacji sentymentów i wykrywania sarkazmu. Proponowane przez nas ramy oparte są na Konwolucyjnej Sieci Neuralnej (CNN). CNN uczy się cech zarówno ze spojrzenia, jak i tekstu i używa ich do klasyfikacji tekstu wejściowego. Testujemy naszą technikę na opublikowanych zbiorach danych sentymentów i sarkazmu, wzbogaconych o informacje o spojrzenie, aby pokazać, że kombinacja automatycznie uczonych funkcji tekstu i spojrzenia często daje lepszą wydajność klasyfikacji w porównaniu z systemami opartymi na CNN, które opierają się samo na wprowadzaniu tekstu oraz (ii) istniejącymi systemami, które opierają się na ręcznym spojrzeniu i funkcjach tekstowych.', 'mn': 'НLP систем - т.е., хөдөлгөөний мэдээллийг ашигладаг NLP систем - нүдний хөдөлгөөн загвараас, EEG сигналууд, тархины төсөөллөө, т.д. үүнийг ашигладаг уламжлалтын текст дээр нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой байгууллага. Ийм төсөөлөл нь ихэвчлэн барилга юм. Бид гарын шинжлэх ухаан болон саркассмын шинжлэх ухаан болон сонголт нь суралцах системд хамгийн сайн арга болох боломжгүй гэдгийг хэлсэн. Бид хүний уншигчийн нүдний хөдөлгөөн/харах өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс автоматаар мэдээллийг автоматаар гаргаж, мэдрэмжтэй байдал болон саркассмын мэдээллийн үйл ажиллагаанд textual features болгон ашиглаж байна. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээсүүд нь Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) дээр суурилсан. CNN нь харж, текст хоёулаас харагдаж, өгөгдлийн текстийг ангилах үед ашигладаг. Бид хэвлэгдсэн мэдрэмж, саркассм гэдэг мэдээллийн санааг шалгаж, харааны мэдээллээр баян автоматаар сурсан текст болон харааны шинжлэх ухааныг ашиглах нь ихэвчлэн CNN-д ганц текст орлуулах системээс хамаарч, i i) гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй системээс хамаарч байгааг харуулах боломжтой.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka NLP-da e e isticmaalaya macluumaadka dabeecada- ku kordhiya tababarka asalka ah oo ay leedahay aqoonta qalabka dhaqaalaha, calaamada EEG, sawirada maskaxda etc. Isticmaalka waxyaabaha la soo saaray waa mid caadi ah. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in laga yaabaa in la soo saaro qalabka waxyaabaha dhaqdhaqaaqa ah aan ahayn habka ugu wanaagsan in la qabsado tababarida qoraalka oo si gaar ah ugu guulaysta shaqaalaha fasaxda oo ka mid ah baaritaanka fasaxda, sida shahaadada fasaxda iyo xisaabta sarcasm, iyo in xataa doorasho iyo doorasho tayabar lagu sameeyo nidaamka waxbarashada. Waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa sawir aan si automatic ah uga soo saarno dhaqdhaqaaqa indhaha/aragtida macluumaadka dadka akhriyaya oo akhriyaya taariikhda, waxaana u isticmaalnaa goobaha dhaqdhaqaalaha oo la xiriira shaqooyinka xisaabta xaaladda iyo baaritaanka. Shaqooyinkayada la soo jeeday waxay ku saleysan yihiin shabakadda Neural Network (CNN). CNN wuxuu ka baraa aragtida iyo qoraalka, wuxuuna u isticmaalaa si ay u fasaxaan qoraalka input. Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa teknikadeedii lagu qoray fikrada iyo sarcasm, taajirka macluumaadka indhaha, si aan u muujinno in isticmaalka kooxa macluumaadka aad u baratay qoraalka iyo tababarada aad u badan ayaa ka muuqata fasaxa farsamada (i) nidaamka ku saleysan CNN oo ku tiirsan qoraalka oo kaliya iyo (ii) nidaamka heysta oo isku halleeya aragga gacanta iyo tababarka qoriga ah.', 'sv': 'Kognitiva NLP-system – dvs NLP-system som använder beteendedata – förstärker traditionella textbaserade funktioner med kognitiva funktioner som extraheras från ögonrörelsemönster, EEG-signaler, hjärnavbildning etc. Sådan extraktion av funktioner är vanligtvis manuell. Vi hävdar att manuell extraktion av funktioner kanske inte är det bästa sättet att hantera textsubtiliteter som karakteristiskt råder i komplexa klassificeringsuppgifter som Sentiment Analysis och Sarkasm Detection, och att även extraktion och val av funktioner bör delegeras till inlärningssystemet. Vi introducerar ett ramverk för att automatiskt extrahera kognitiva funktioner från ögonrörelser/blickdata från mänskliga läsare som läser texten och använda dem som funktioner tillsammans med textfunktioner för uppgifterna sentimentpolaritet och sarkasm detektering. Vårt föreslagna ramverk är baserat på Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). CNN lär sig funktioner från både blick och text och använder dem för att klassificera inmatningstexten. Vi testar vår teknik på publicerade sentiment- och sarkasm-märkta datauppsättningar, berikade med blickinformation, för att visa att en kombination av automatiskt lärda text- och blickfunktioner ofta ger bättre klassificeringsprestanda jämfört med (i) CNN-baserade system som förlitar sig på enbart textinmatning och (ii) befintliga system som förlitar sig på handgjorda blickar och textfunktioner.', 'sr': 'Kognitivni NLP sistemi - tj., NLP sistemi koji koriste podatke o ponašanju - povećanje tradicionalnih tekstskih karakteristika sa kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz obrazaca pokreta oèi, EEG signala, mozga zamišljanja itd. Takve ekstrakcije karakteristike su obično ruène. Sumnjali smo da ručna izvlačenja karakteristika možda nije najbolji način da se rješava suptilnosti teksta koji karakteristično prevladaju složenim klasifikacijskim zadacima poput otkrivanja Sentimenta Analize i Sarkasma, i da bi čak i izvlačenje i izbor karakteristika trebalo biti delegirano u sistem učenja. Predstavljamo okvir da automatski izvučemo kognitivne karakteristike iz podataka o pokretu očiju/pogledu ljudskih čitača koji čitaju tekst i koristimo ih kao karakteristike zajedno sa tekstualnim karakteristikama za zadatke osećanja polarnosti i sarkazma. Naš predloženi okvir je baziran na konvolucionalnoj neuronskoj mreži (CNN). CNN nauèi karakteristike iz pogleda i teksta i koristi ih za klasifikaciju teksta. Testiramo našu tehniku o objavljenim osećanjima i sarkazama označenim podacima, obogaćenim informacijama o pogledu, kako bi pokazali da korištenje kombinacije automatski naučenog teksta i karakteristika pogleda često pruža bolju klasifikaciju nad i) sistemima baziranim na CNN-u koji se oslanjaju na ulaz teksta sam i ii) postojećim sistemima koji se oslanjaju na poglede i tekstualne karakteristike.', 'si': 'Coknowtive NLP systems- i.e., NLP systems that make use of Behavioral Data - booment පද්ධතිය පාළුවන් පාළුවන් පාළුවන් පාළුවන් පාළුවන් පාළුවන් පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරිත්වය සඳහා පරික්ෂිත විශේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කළා තියෙන්නේ මැනුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නොහැකි විදියට පැත්තක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න හොඳම විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි මිනිස්සු කියවන්නේ කියවන්නේ මිනිස්සු කියවන්නේ දත්තේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් පිළිබඳු අවස්ථාවක් නිකාල අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සිටියේ. CNN දෙන්නම් බලන්න සහ පාළ සහ පාළ සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සහ ඔවුන්ව භාවිත කරනවා ඇතුළු පාළුව විශ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු දේවල් සහ සර්කාස් ලේබල් කරපු දේවල් සම්බන්ධ විදියට අපේ තාක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, බලන්න තොරතුරු සමඟ සම්බන්ධ විදියට, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ඉගෙන ගත්ත පා', 'ta': 'NLP அமைப்புகள்- அதாவது, நடத்தை தரவை பயன்படுத்தும் NLP அமைப்புகள் - கண் நகர்த்தல் முறைமைகளிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்டுள்ள பாரமான உரை குணங்களுடன் கூடுதல் பாரம்பரிய பண்புகள், EEG குறிகள், மூள நாம் விரும்புகிறோம் என்றால் கைமுறை பிரித்தல் உரை துணை துணைப்புகளை எதிர்பார்க்க முடியாது சிறந்த வழியாக இருக்கலாம் அது சிக்கலான வகுப்பு பணிகளில் மேலாக முடியும் சென்டெண நாம் ஒரு சட்டத்தை தானாகவே கண் நகர்வு/பார்வை தரவை மனித படிப்பவர்களின் கண்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றுவதற்காகவும் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் உணர்வு தீவிரம் மற்றும் பரிசு நம்முடைய திருத்தப்பட்ட சட்டம் தொகுதியான நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN) அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. CNN பார்வையும் உரையிலிருந்தும் தன்மைகளை கற்று உள்ளீட்டு உரையை வகைப்படுத்த பயன்படுத்துகிறது. நாங்கள் வெளியிட்ட உணர்வுகள் மற்றும் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் தொழில்நுட்பம் சோதிக்கிறோம், பார்வை தகவல்களுடன் வளர்ந்தது, தானாகவே கற்றப்பட்ட உரையை மற்றும் பார்வை குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு சேர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Cognitive NLP systems- i.e., NLP systems that use behavioral data - increase traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. ہم نے جھگڑا تھا کہ فرضیوں کے ہاتھ سے اٹھانے کا بہترین طریقہ نہیں ہو سکتا ہے کہ متن کے بصیرت کے مطابق پیچیدہ فرضیوں کے کاموں میں زیادہ قابل ہے جیسے Sentiment Analysis اور Sarcasm Detection، اور یہ کہ اٹھانے اور فرضیوں کا انتخاب بھی سیستم کی طرف منتخب ہونا چاہیے۔ ہم نے ایک فرمود پیش کرتا ہے کہ انسان کے پڑھنے والوں کی آنکھوں کی حرکت/نگاہ کے ڈیٹے سے پہنچا سکتا ہے اور ان کو متن پڑھنے والوں کے لئے متن کی خصوصیات کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا فرمود Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) پر بنیاد ہے۔ سی ان کی نگاہ اور پیغام سے روشنی سکھائی جاتی ہے اور ان کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ان کے پیغام کو کلاس کریں. ہم نے اپنی تخصیل کو محفوظ سمجھ اور سارکاسم پر آزمائش کی ہے جو لکھی ہوئی ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ ثروت رکھا گیا ہے، تاکہ دکھائیں کہ اپنے ساتھ سیکھے ہوئے متن اور نگاہ کی تخصیل کے مطابق اچھی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کا فعالیت i) سی ان کی بنیاد پر اچھی طرح کا فعالیت پیدا کرتا ہے جو ایک ہی ٹی', 'uz': "Name Biz murakkab qilamiz, xossalarni qoʻlbola olib tashlash mumkin, ma'lumotga murakkab darajalashtirish vazifalarda murakkab muvaffaqiyatlarni boshqarish uchun eng yaxshi yo'l emas, va Sentiment Analysis va Sarkasm aniqlash imkoniyatlarini o'rganish tizimga qayta qilish kerak. Biz o'quvchilar matnni o'qish uchun o'qituvchi ko'zning ko'zlarini avtomatik koʻk-koʻk maʼlumotidan foydalanamiz va ularni hisoblash uchun matn xususiyatlari bilan foydalanamiz. Aniqlanadigan freymmiz CNN (Konvolution Neural Network) asosida asoslangan. Name We test our technique on published sentiment and sarcasm labeled datasets, enriched with gaze information, to show that using a combination of automatically learned text and gaze features often yields better classification performance over (i) CNN based systems that rely on text input alone and (ii) existing systems that rely on handcrafted gaze and textual features.", 'vi': 'Về hệ thống ngôn ngữ khôn ngoan lập trình NLP. Các hệ thống lập trình NLP dùng các dữ liệu vi hành vi. Tăng các tính năng văn bản truyền thống với các tính năng nhận thức chiết xuất từ các mô hình giao động mắt, tín hiệu đi ện não, chụp hình não, vân vân. Chúng tôi tranh luận rằng khai thác bằng tay các tính năng có thể không phải cách tốt nhất để xử lý các chi tiết văn bản thường chiếm lĩnh các công việc phân loại phức tạp như Sơ đồ Bước và Phát hiện Sarcasm, và cả việc khai thác và chọn các tính năng cũng nên được phân phối vào hệ thống học. Chúng ta sẽ tạo ra một cơ sở để tự động trích các tính năng nhận thức từ các dữ liệu chuyển động mắt và nhìn của người đọc văn bản và sử dụng chúng như các tính năng kết cấu cho các công việc pha chế tính tình cảm và phát hiện mỉa mai. Hệ thống hình thái của chúng ta dựa trên kênh thần kinh xuyên suốt (CNN). CNN lấy các tính năng từ cả cái nhìn lẫn đoạn, và sử dụng chúng để phân loại đoạn nhập. Chúng tôi kiểm tra kỹ thuật của chúng tôi dựa trên các tập tin có biểu cảm và mỉa mai được đánh dấu, làm đầy những thông tin về ánh nhìn, để cho thấy rằng sử dụng một sự kết hợp của văn bản học và nét nhìn tự động sẽ giúp hiệu quả phân loại tốt hơn (i) hệ thống dựa vào chỉ nhập văn bản và (II) hệ thống tồn tại dựa trên nét nhìn và cấu hình của bản.', 'da': 'Kognitive NLP-systemer - dvs. NLP-systemer, der gør brug af adfærdsdata - øger traditionelle tekstbaserede funktioner med kognitive funktioner udvundet fra øjenbevægelsesmønstre, EEG-signaler, hjernebilledning osv. En sådan udtrækning af funktioner er typisk manuel. Vi hævder, at manuel udtrækning af funktioner måske ikke er den bedste måde at tackle tekstfinesser, der karakteristisk dominerer i komplekse klassifikationsopgaver som følelsesanalyse og Sarkasm Detection, og at selv udtrækning og valg af funktioner bør delegeres til læringssystemet. Vi introducerer en ramme til automatisk at udtrække kognitive funktioner fra øjenbevægelses-/blikdata af menneskelige læsere, der læser teksten, og bruger dem som funktioner sammen med tekstfunktioner til opgaverne med sentimentpolaritet og sarkasme detektion. Vores foreslåede ramme er baseret på Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). CNN lærer funktioner fra både blik og tekst og bruger dem til at klassificere input tekst. Vi tester vores teknik på offentliggjorte følelsesmærkede og sarkasme-mærkede datasæt, beriget med blikinformation, for at vise, at ved hjælp af en kombination af automatisk lærte tekst- og blikfunktioner ofte giver bedre klassificeringsydelse i forhold til (i) CNN-baserede systemer, der er afhængige af tekstinput alene og (ii) eksisterende systemer, der er afhængige af håndlavede blikfunktioner og tekstfunktioner.', 'nl': 'Cognitieve NLP-systemen – d.w.z. NLP-systemen die gebruik maken van gedragsgegevens versterken traditionele tekst-gebaseerde kenmerken met cognitieve kenmerken die worden geëxtraheerd uit oogbewegingspatronen, EEG-signalen, hersenafbeelding enz. Dergelijke extractie van kenmerken is meestal handmatig. We stellen dat handmatige extractie van functies misschien niet de beste manier is om subtiliteiten van tekst aan te pakken die kenmerkend zijn voor complexe classificatietaken zoals Sentiment Analysis en Sarcasme Detection, en dat zelfs de extractie en keuze van functies moeten worden gedelegeerd aan het leersysteem. We introduceren een framework om automatisch cognitieve kenmerken te extraheren uit de oogbewegingen/blikgegevens van menselijke lezers die de tekst lezen en deze samen met tekstuele kenmerken te gebruiken voor de taken van sentimentpolariteit en sarcasme detectie. Ons voorgestelde raamwerk is gebaseerd op Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). Het CNN leert kenmerken van zowel blik als tekst en gebruikt ze om de invoertekst te classificeren. We testen onze techniek op gepubliceerde sentiment- en sarcasme gelabelde datasets, verrijkt met kijkinformatie, om aan te tonen dat het gebruik van een combinatie van automatisch aangeleerde tekst- en kijkfuncties vaak betere classificatieprestaties oplevert ten opzichte van (i) CNN-gebaseerde systemen die alleen op tekstinvoer vertrouwen en (ii) bestaande systemen die vertrouwen op handgemaakte blik en tekstfuncties.', 'bg': 'Когнитивните системи за НЛП, т.е. системи за НЛП, които използват поведенчески данни, увеличават традиционните текстово-базирани функции с когнитивни характеристики, извлечени от модели на движение на очите, ЕЕГ сигнали, мозъчно изображение и т.н. Такова извличане на функции обикновено е ръчно. Ние твърдим, че ръчното извличане на функции може да не е най-добрият начин за справяне с тънкостите на текста, които преобладават характерно в сложни задачи за класификация като анализ на чувствата и откриване на сарказъм, и че дори извличането и изборът на функции трябва да бъдат делегирани на учебната система. Въвеждаме рамка за автоматично извличане на когнитивни характеристики от данните за движението на очите/погледа на човешките читатели, които четат текста и ги използват като функции заедно с текстови характеристики за задачите по сентиментална полярност и откриване на сарказъм. Нашата предложена рамка се основава на Конволюционна неврална мрежа (CNN). Научава функции както от погледа, така и от текста и ги използва, за да класифицира входния текст. Тестваме техниката си върху публикувани сентименти и сарказъм набори от данни, обогатени с информация за погледа, за да покажем, че използването на комбинация от автоматично научен текст и функции за поглед често води до по-добра класификация в сравнение с (базирани системи, които разчитат само на въвеждане на текст и (съществуващи системи, които разчитат на ръчно изработен поглед и текстови характеристики.', 'hr': 'Kognitivni NLP sustavi - tj., NLP sustavi koji koriste podatke o ponašanju - povećanje tradicionalnih tekstskih karakteristika s kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz obrazaca pokreta očiju, EEG signala, mozga slikanja itd. Takve ekstrakcije karakteristika su obično ručne. Svjedočili smo da ručna izvlačenja karakteristika možda nije najbolji način za rješavanje tekstskih suptilata koji karakteristično prevladaju složenim zadacima klasifikacije kao što su otkrivanje Sentiment Analize i Sarkasma, te da čak i izvlačenje i izbor karakteristika treba delegirati u sustav učenja. Predstavljamo okvir za automatski izvlačenje kognitivnih karakteristika iz podataka o pokretu očiju/pogledu ljudskih čitača čitanja teksta i koristimo ih kao karakteristike zajedno s tekstualnim karakteristikama za zadatke osjećanja polarnosti i otkrivanja sarkazma. Naš predloženi okvir je temeljen na konvolucionalnoj neuronskoj mreži (CNN). CNN nauči karakteristike iz pogleda i teksta i koristi ih za klasifikaciju teksta ulaza. Testiramo našu tehniku o objavljenim osjećajima i sarkazama označenim podacima, obogaćenim informacijama o pogledu, kako bi pokazali da korištenje kombinacije automatski naučenog teksta i karakteristika pogleda često pruža bolji učinkovit klasifikacije nad i) sustavima temeljenim na CNN-u koji se oslanjaju na samo ulaz teksta i ii) postojećim sustavima koji se oslanjaju na poglede i tekstualne funk', 'id': 'Sistem NLP yang dikenal - i.e., sistem NLP yang menggunakan data perilaku - meningkatkan ciri-ciri tradisional berdasarkan teks dengan ciri-ciri kognitif yang diekstraksi dari pola pergerakan mata, sinyal EEG, gambar otak dll. ekstraksi ciri-ciri seperti biasanya manual. Kami menegaskan bahwa ekstraksi manual dari fitur mungkin bukan cara terbaik untuk mengatasi halus teks yang secara karakteristik prevail dalam tugas klasifikasi kompleks seperti Analisi Sentiment dan Deteksi Sarkasme, dan bahkan ekstraksi dan pilihan fitur harus didelegasi ke sistem belajar. Kami memperkenalkan sebuah rangkaian untuk secara otomatis mengekstraksi fitur kognitif dari data pergerakan mata/tatapan pembaca manusia membaca teks dan menggunakannya sebagai fitur bersama dengan fitur teks untuk tugas dari polaritas sentimen dan deteksi sarkasme. Cadangan yang diusulkan kami berdasarkan Jaringan Neural Konvelusional (CNN). CNN belajar ciri-ciri dari pandangan dan teks dan menggunakannya untuk mengklasifikasi teks masukan. Kami menguji teknik kami pada set data yang diterbitkan dengan sentimen dan sarkasme, diperiksa dengan informasi pandangan, untuk menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan kombinasi dari teks dan fitur pandangan yang belajar secara otomatis sering memberikan prestasi klasifikasi yang lebih baik atas (i) sistem berdasarkan CNN yang bergantung pada input teks sendiri dan (ii) sistem yang ada yang bergantung pada pandangan yang dibuat tangan dan fitur teks.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa utambulisho wa NLP - yaani, mfumo wa NLP unaotumia data za tabia - kuongeza vipengele vya kitamaduni vya kitamaduni na vipengele vya ujuzi vilivyotolewa kutoka kwenye mitindo ya harakati za macho, ishara za EEG, picha za ubongo etc. Uteuzi wa aina hiyo ni manufaa. Tunagombana kuwa uteuzi wa vifaa vya mikononi hauwezi kuwa njia bora ya kukabiliana na misingi ya maandishi ambayo hususani inashinda katika kazi tatizo kama vile Uchunguzi wa Wakatima na Uchunguzi wa Kisarcasm, na kwamba hata uteuzi na uchaguzi wa tabia lazima kuchukuliwa katika mfumo wa kujifunza. Tunawasilisha mfumo wa kutengeneza vipengele vya utambulisho kutoka kwenye macho ya macho/tahadhari ya wasomaji wa binadamu wakisoma ujumbe wa maandishi na kuitumia kama alama za msingi kwa ajili ya kazi za kugundua hisia za uchafuzi na kejeli. Mfumo wetu unapendekezwa unategemea kwenye Mtandao wa Neural (CNN). The CNN learns features from both gaze and text and uses them to classify the input text.  Tunajaribu teknolojia yetu kuhusu seti za taarifa zilizochapishwa na kejeli zilizotajwa, zilizotajiriwa kwa macho, ili kuonyesha kuwa kwa pamoja na mfumo wa maandishi yanayojifunza kwa kujitegemea na tabia za kuona mara nyingi huleta ufanisi bora wa usambazaji katika mfumo wa CNN unaotegemea kujiweka kwa ujumbe wa maandishi pekee na (i i) mifumo inayotegemea macho na vifaa vya maandishi.', 'de': 'Kognitive NLP-Systeme – d.h. NLP-Systeme, die Verhaltensdaten nutzen, verstärken traditionelle textbasierte Merkmale mit kognitiven Merkmalen, die aus Augenbewegungsmustern, EEG-Signalen, Gehirnbildungen usw. extrahiert werden. Eine solche Extraktion von Merkmalen erfolgt typischerweise manuell. Wir vertreten die Auffassung, dass die manuelle Extraktion von Merkmalen möglicherweise nicht der beste Weg ist, um Textsubtilitäten anzugehen, die in komplexen Klassifizierungsaufgaben wie Sentiment Analysis und Sarkasmus Detection charakteristisch vorherrschen, und dass selbst die Extraktion und Auswahl von Merkmalen an das Lernsystem delegiert werden sollte. Wir führen ein Framework ein, das kognitive Merkmale automatisch aus den Augen-/Blickdaten menschlicher Leser extrahiert und diese zusammen mit textuellen Merkmalen für die Aufgaben der Sentiment-Polarität und Sarkasmus-Erkennung als Merkmale verwendet. Unser vorgeschlagener Rahmen basiert auf Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). Das CNN lernt Merkmale sowohl vom Blick als auch vom Text und verwendet sie, um den eingegebenen Text zu klassifizieren. Wir testen unsere Technik an veröffentlichten Sentiment- und Sarkasmus-markierten Datensätzen, angereichert mit Blickinformationen, um zu zeigen, dass die Verwendung einer Kombination von automatisch erlernten Text- und Blickfunktionen oft bessere Klassifizierungsleistungen liefert als (i) CNN-basierte Systeme, die allein auf Texteingabe angewiesen sind und (ii) bestehende Systeme, die auf handgefertigten Blick- und Textfunktionen basieren.', 'ko': '인지 NLP 시스템, 즉 행위 데이터를 이용한 NLP 시스템-눈동자 모드, EEG 신호, 대뇌 영상 등에서 추출한 인지 특징을 사용하여 전통적인 텍스트 기반 특징을 강화한다. 이런 특징 추출은 보통 수동적이다.우리는 수동 추출 특징이 텍스트의 미묘성을 해결하는 가장 좋은 방법이 아닐 수도 있고 이런 미묘성은 감정 분석과 풍자 검측 등 복잡한 분류 임무에서 주도적인 위치를 차지하며 심지어 특징의 추출과 선택도 학습 시스템에 의뢰해야 한다고 생각한다.우리는 텍스트를 읽는 인류 독자의 눈동자/응시 데이터에서 인지적 특징을 자동으로 추출하고 이를 텍스트 특징과 함께 감정의 극성과 풍자 검측 임무로 활용하는 구조를 도입했다.우리가 제시한 프레임워크는 볼륨신경망(CNN)에 기반을 두고 있다.CNN은 응시와 텍스트에서 특징을 배우고 입력된 텍스트를 분류한다.우리는 이미 발표된 감정과 풍자 표기 데이터 집합에서 우리의 기술을 테스트했다. 이 데이터 집합에는 응시 정보가 풍부하여 자동으로 학습된 텍스트와 응시 특징의 조합을 사용하는 것이 (i) 텍스트 입력에만 의존하는 CNN 기반 시스템과 (ii) 수공 응시와 텍스트 특징에 의존하는 기존 시스템보다 분류 성능이 더 좋다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای NLP شناخته - یعنی سیستم\u200cهای NLP که از داده\u200cهای رفتاری استفاده می\u200cکنند - افزایش ویژگی\u200cهای متن سنتی با ویژگی\u200cهای شناخته\u200cای که از الگوهای حرکت چشم\u200cها، سیگنال\u200cهای EEG، تصویر مغز و غیر از آن استفاده می\u200cکنند - افزایش ویژگی\u200cهای مغز\u200cها معمو ما توضیح می\u200cکنیم که اخراج دستی از ویژه\u200cها شاید بهترین راه برای حل کردن متن\u200cها نیست که ویژه\u200cای در وظایفه\u200cهای گروه\u200cشناسی پیچیده\u200cای مانند آزمایش سنتی\u200cشناسی و شناسایی سارکاسم پیچیده می\u200cشود، و حتی اخراج و انتخاب ویژه\u200cها باید به سیستم یادگیری ما یک چهارچوب را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا ویژه\u200cهای شناخته\u200cای را به طور خودکار از داده\u200cهای چشم-حرکت/نگاه\u200cکننده\u200cهای خواننده\u200cهای انسان که متن را می\u200cخوانند و از آن استفاده کنیم به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای متن با ویژه\u200cهای متن برای وظایفه\u200cهای مشخص\u200cهای چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما بر روی شبکه عصبی (CNN) معمولی است. CNN ویژگی\u200cهایی از نگاه\u200cها و متن یاد می\u200cگیرد و از آن استفاده می\u200cکند تا متن ورودی را کلاس کند. ما تکنیک خود را در مورد احساسات و سارکاسم که با اطلاعات نگاه دارند، آزمایش می کنیم تا نشان دهیم که استفاده از یک ترکیب از متن یاد گرفته و ویژه های نگاه اغلب عملکرد بهترین ترکیب بر سیستم\u200cهای بنیاد CNN که تنها بر ورود متن و (i i) سیستم\u200cهای موجود که بر روی ویژه\u200cهای دستی و متن\u200cسازی بستگی دارند.', 'am': 'የNLP ስርዓቶች የጽሑፍ አካባቢዎችን ለመቀናቀል የሚደረገው እና የሰርካም ምርጫ እና ምርጫዎች ወደ ትምህርት ስርዓት መክፈት የሚደረገውን በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት እና በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት ላይ የሚደረገውን የጽሑፍ አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል የሚሻል መንገድ እንዳይሆን እንከራከራለን፡፡ ጽሑፉን የሚያነቡ ከሰው አነባቢዎች ጽሑፉን ለሚያነቡ እና የጽሑፍ ምርጫዎች ለስሜት የፖለቲካዊ ስርዓት እና ስርዓት ማግኘት ስርዓቶችን ለመግለጥ የሚችሉትን የዓይን/የዓይን ማቀናቀሚያ ዳታዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የነፃ መረብ (CNN) መሠረት ነው፡፡ የCNN ጥያቄዎችን ከዓይን እና ጽሑፍ ያስተማራል እና የጥያቄውን ጽሑፍ ለመለፍ ይጠቅማቸዋል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ጥያቄ ብቻውን እና (i i) በተመሳሳይ የጽሑፍ እና የጽሑፍ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የተማሩ የጽሑፍ እና የዓይነት ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የተሻለ ትክክል ማድረግ እና በጽሑፍ ጥያቄዎችን ብቻውን በሚታመኑ (i) CNN-based ስርዓቶች ብቻውን እና (ii) በተገኘው ስርዓት እና በጽሑፍ ኃይሎች ላይ የሚታመኑ የሥርዓተ ሥርዓቶችን በመጠቀም እና በተገኘው የጽሑፍ ጥ', 'tr': "NLP sistemleri- mysal bolsa, NLP sistemleri davranış maglumatlaryny ulanýarlar - göz hereket aňlama şartlaryndan, EEG signallerden, beyin-imajlama we böleklerden açan tansiýetler bilen tansiýetlere goldadır. Biz esaslaşdyrýarys ki, elimizden çykmak üçin metin altlyklaryny çözmek iň gowy ýoly däldir diýip pikir edýäris. Şu şekilde Sentiment Analizi we Sarkasm Deteksi ýaly karmaşdyrma uzmanlarynda, hatda hatda öwrenme sistemasyna taýýarlanmaly we özellikleriň seçgisi ýok edip biler. Biz insan okuwçylaryň göz-hereket/göz önünde habarlaryny otomatik çykarmak üçin bir çerýädçi guruldyrýarys we olary duýgym polaritet we sarkasm tanyşynyň görevleri üçin tekst özellikleri bilen birleşdirmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň teklip eden frameworkymyz (CNN) Birleşik Neural Network'a daýanýar. CNN bakış we metin üçin özelliklerini öwrenýär we ony giriş metini klasifika etmek üçin ullanyr. Biz teknikimizi basyp edilen duýgular we sarkasm diýilmeginde, gazet maglumatyndan baglanýan, otomatik öwrenen metin we gözleme özellikleriniň birleşmesini (i) CNN-da ýeke täk giriş sistemlerine we (ii) elimizde ýa şan gözleme we tekst özelliklerine güýçlän sistemlerimizi test edip bilýäris.", 'hy': 'Կոգնիտիվ ՆԼՊ համակարգերը, այսինքն, ՆԼՊ համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են վարքագծային տվյալներ, աճեցնում են ավանդական տեքստի հիմնված հատկանիշները, որոնք հանվում են աչքի շարժման կաղապարներից, ԷԷԳ ազդանշաններից, ուղեղի պատկերացումից և այլն: Նման հատկանիշ Մենք պնդում ենք, որ առանձնահատկությունների ձեռքի վերացումը հնարավոր չէ, որ լավագույն միջոցը լինի վերաբերել տեքստի նրբագեղեցկություններին, որոնք առանձնահատկությամբ հաղթահարում են բարդ դասակարգման խնդիրներում, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը և սարկազմի հայ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շրջանակ, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար հանենք ճանաչողական հատկությունները մարդկային ընթերցողների աչքերի շարժման և հայացքի տվյալներից, որոնք կարդում են տեքստը և օգտագործում են դրանք որպես հատկություններ, միասին տեքստային հատկությունների հետ զգաց Մեր առաջարկած շրջանակը հիմնված է Կանվոլյուցիոն Նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) վրա: CNN-ը սովորում է առանձնահատկություններ նայելով և տեքստից և օգտագործում է դրանք ներմուծի տեքստի դասակարգում: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր տեխնիկան հրատարակված զգացմունքների և սարկազմի վրա, որոնք նշանակում են հայացքներով հարստացված տվյալներ, ցույց տալու համար, որ օգտագործելով ավտոմատ սովորված տեքստի և հայացքների առանձնահատկությունների համակցությունը հաճախ ավելի լավ դասակարգման արդյունք է տալիս i) CNN-ի հիմնված համակարգերի վրա, որոնք միայն հիմն', 'af': "Kognitiewe NLP stelsels - t.d., NLP stelsels wat gebruik van gedrag data maak - vergroot tradisionele teks-gebaseerde funksies met kognitiewe funksies uitgevoer van oë-beweging patrone, EEG-signale, brein-beelde ensfh. Soos uitpakking van funksies is tipies hand. Ons het gespreek dat hand uitpakking van funksies dalk nie die beste manier om teks subtleties te trek wat karakteristiese in kompleks klasifikasie taak oorvloedig soos Sentiment Analysis en Sarcasm Deteksie, en dat selfs die uitpakking en kies van funksies moet na die leersysteem uitgewys word. Ons introduseer 'n raamwerk om kognitiewe funksies outomaties uit die oë-beweging/kyk data van menslike lesers wat die teks lees en gebruik hulle as funksies saam met tekstuele funksies vir die opdragte van sentimente polariteit en sarkasme-opdekking. Ons voorgestelde raamwerk is gebaseer op Convolutional Neural Network (CNN). Die CNN leer funksies van beide kyk en teks en gebruik hulle om die invoer teks te klassifiseer. Ons toets ons tekniks op gepubliseer sentiment en sarkasm gemerkte datastelle, verryk met kyk inligting, om te wys dat die gebruik van 'n kombinasie van outomaties leer teks en kyk funksies dikwels beter klasifikasie uitvoer oor (i) CNN-gebaseerde stelsels wat op teks invoer alleen en (ii) bestaande stelsels wat op handkruipende kyk en tekstuele funksies vertrou.", 'bn': 'এনএলপি সিস্টেম- যেমন এনএলপি সিস্টেম, যারা আচরণের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে - ঐতিহ্যবাহী টেক্সট ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য, চোখ-আন্দোলনের প্রান্ত থেকে বেরিয়ে নেওয়া বৈশিষ্ট্য, ইজিজি সিগ আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে বৈশিষ্ট্যের নির্বাচনের মাধ্যমে বিশেষ উপায় নয় যা বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ্লেষণ এবং সার্কাস্ম ডিটেক্টরেশনের মত কমপ্ল্যাক্সেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিনি আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানুষের পাঠকদের চোখ-আন্দোলন/দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তথ্য থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করি এবং অনুভূতির দূর্নীতি এবং বিদ্রূপ সন আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেমে কনভোলেশনের নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) ভিত্তিক। সিএনএন দৃষ্টি এবং টেক্সট থেকে বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখে এবং ইনপুট ট টেক্সট ব্যবহার করে। আমরা আমাদের প্রকাশিত অনুভূতি এবং বিদ্রূপের লেবেল লেখা তথ্যের উপর প্রযুক্তি পরীক্ষা করি, চোখের সাথে সমৃদ্ধ, দেখানোর জন্য যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শিক্ষিত লেখা এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ব্যবহার করে প্রায়শই সিএনএন ভিত্', 'sq': 'Sistemet e njohura NLP - i.e., sistemet NLP që përdorin të dhënat e sjelljes - rritin karakteristikat tradicionale të bazuara në tekst me karakteristikat e njohura të nxjerra nga modelet e lëvizjes së syve, sinjalet EEG, imazhet e trurit, etj. Të tilla nxjerrje e karakteristikave është tipikisht manuale. Ne pretendojmë se nxjerrja manuale e karakteristikave mund të mos jetë mënyra më e mirë për të trajtuar subtilitetin e tekstit që karakteristikisht mbizotërojnë në detyra komplekse klasifikuese si Analiza e Sentimenteve dhe Detektimi i Sarkazmit dhe se edhe nxjerrja dhe zgjedhja e karakteristikave duhet të delegohet në sistemin e mësimit. Ne futim një kuadër për të nxjerrë automatikisht karakteristikat kognitive nga të dhënat e lëvizjes/shikimit të shikuesve njerëzor duke lexuar tekstin dhe duke i përdorur a to si karakteristika së bashku me karakteristikat tekstuale për detyrat e polaritetit të ndjenjave dhe zbulimit të sarkazmit. Korniza jonë e propozuar është bazuar në Rrjetin Neural Konveolutiv (CNN). CNN mëson karakteristika nga shikimi dhe teksti dhe i përdor për të klasifikuar tekstin e hyrjes. Ne testojmë teknikën tonë në grupet e të dhënave të botuara të ndjenjave dhe sarkazmit, të pasur me informacione të shikimit, për të treguar se përdorimi i një kombinimi të tekstit të mësuar automatikisht dhe funksioneve të shikimit shpesh jep performancë më të mirë klasifikimi mbi (i) sistemet e bazuara në CNN që mbështeten vetëm në hyrjen e tekstit dhe (ii) sistemet ekzistuese që mbështeten në shikimin me dorë dhe funksionet tekstuale.', 'bs': 'Kognitivni NLP sistemi - tj., NLP sistemi koji koriste podatke o ponašanju - povećanje tradicionalnih tekstskih karakteristika sa kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz obrazaca pokreta oči, EEG signala, mozga zamišljanja itd. Takve ekstrakcije karakteristika je obično ručno. Svjedočili smo da ručno izvlačenje karakteristika možda nije najbolji način za rješavanje tekstskih suptilata koji karakteristično prevladaju složenim zadacima klasifikacije poput otkrivanja Sentimenta Analize i Sarkasma, i da čak i izvlačenje i izbor karakteristika treba delegirati na učenje sistemu. Predstavljamo okvir da automatski izvučemo kognitivne karakteristike iz podataka o pokretu očiju/pogledu ljudskih čitača koji čitaju tekst i koristimo ih kao karakteristike zajedno sa tekstualnim karakteristikama za zadatke osjećanja polarnosti i otkrivanja sarkazma. Naš predloženi okvir je baziran na konvolucionalnoj neuronskoj mreži (CNN). CNN nauči karakteristike iz pogleda i teksta i koristi ih za klasifikaciju teksta ulaska. Testiramo našu tehniku o objavljenim osjećajima i sarkazama označenim podacima, obogaćenim informacijama o pogledu, kako bi pokazali da korištenje kombinacije automatski naučenog teksta i karakteristika pogleda često pruža bolji učinkovit klasifikacije preko i) sustava baziranih na CNN-u koji se oslanjaju na ulaz teksta sam i ii) postojećih sustava koji se oslanjaju na poglede i tekstualne funkcije.', 'ca': "Sistemes de NLP cognitius - és a dir, sistemes NLP que utilitzen dades comportamentals - augmenten les característiques tradicionals basades en text amb característiques cognitives extraites de patrons de moviment ocular, senyals EEG, imatge cerebral, etc. Aquesta extracció de característiques és normalment manual. Afirmem que l'extracció manual de característiques potser no és la millor manera de tractar subtlets de text que prevalen característicament en tasques de classificació complexes com l'anàlisi del sentiment i la detecció del sarcasme, i que fins i tot l'extracció i l'elecció de característiques haurien de ser delegades al sistema d'aprenentatge. We introduce a framework to automatically extract cognitive features from the eye-movement/gaze data of human readers reading the text and use them as features along with textual features for the tasks of sentiment polarity and sarcasm detection.  El nostre marc proposat està basat en la Red Neural Convolutiva (CNN). El CNN aprene característiques tant de mirada com de text i les utilitza per classificar el text d'entrada. Testem la nostra tècnica en conjunts de dades amb etiquetes de sentiment i sarcasme publicats, enriqueguts amb informació sobre mirances, per demostrar que utilitzar una combinació de característiques automàticament aprenguts de text i mirances sovint produeix millor rendiment de classificació sobre (i) sistemes basats en CNN que confien en entrada de text sola i (ii) sistemes existents que confien en mirances manuals i característiques textuals.", 'fi': 'Kognitiiviset NLP-järjestelmät – eli käyttäytymisdataa hyödyntävät NLP-järjestelmät – lisäävät perinteisiä tekstipohjaisia ominaisuuksia kognitiivisilla ominaisuuksilla, jotka on erotettu silmien liikkeistä, EEG-signaaleista, aivojen kuvantamisesta jne. Tällainen ominaisuuksien poisto on tyypillisesti manuaalista. Väitämme, että ominaisuuksien manuaalinen poiminta ei ehkä ole paras tapa käsitellä tekstin hienovaraisuuksia, jotka tyypillisesti vallitsevat monimutkaisissa luokitustehtävissä, kuten tunteiden analysointi ja sarkasmin tunnistus, ja että jopa ominaisuuksien poiminta ja valinta tulisi delegoida oppimisjärjestelmään. Kehitämme automaattisesti kognitiivisia ominaisuuksia tekstin lukijoiden silmien liike- ja katsetietoista ja käytämme niitä tekstiominaisuuksina tunteiden polariteetin ja sarkasmin havaitsemisen tehtävissä. Ehdotettu viitekehys perustuu konvolutional neural network (CNN). CNN oppii ominaisuuksia sekä katseesta että tekstistä ja käyttää niitä syötetyn tekstin luokitteluun. Testaamme tekniikkaamme julkaistuilla tunteilla ja sarkasmilla merkityillä datakokonaisuuksilla, jotka on rikastettu katsetietoilla, osoittaaksemme, että automaattisesti opittujen tekstin ja katseen ominaisuuksien yhdistelmä tuottaa usein paremman luokituksen verrattuna (i) pelkästään tekstinsyöttöön perustuviin CNN-järjestelmiin ja (ii) olemassa oleviin järjestelmiin, jotka perustuvat käsityönä tehtyihin katseisiin ja tekstiominaisuuksiin.', 'az': 'NLP sistemləri - məsələn, davranış məlumatlarını istifadə edən NLP sistemləri - göz hərəkətindən çıxarılmış bilikli fərqli fərqli fərqli məlumatların üstünlüyünü artırar, EEG sinyalləri, beyin imajini və ya da. Bütün bu fərqli fərqli fərqli əlavə olunur. Biz mübahisə edirik ki, əlavə özelliklərin əlavə çıxarılması mətn altlıqlarını çəkmək üçün ən yaxşı yolu olmayabilir ki, bənzər Sentiment Analizi və Sarkasm Keşfetməsi kimi kompleks klasifikasyon işlərində üstün gəlir, hətta özelliklərin çıxarılması və seçimləri öyrənmə sisteminə daxil olmalı. Biz insan oxuyanlarının göz-hərəkətindən və baxışların məktubu oxuyan məlumatı avtomatik əlamətlərini çıxartmaq üçün bir framework ü təşkil edirik və onları duygusallıq və sarkasm keşfetməsi üçün textual özelliklərlə birlikdə istifadə edirik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz qurğumuz Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) üzərində dayanılır. CNN baxımından və mətndən xüsusiyyətlər öyrənir və giriş mətnlərini dəyişdirmək üçün istifadə edir. Bizim teknikimizi seçilmiş hisslər və sarkasm etiket edilmiş veri setləri ilə dövlətli təhsil edirik ki, öz-özünə öyrənmiş metin və bax fəaliyyətlərinin birləşdirilməsi çox zaman CNN-in tək giriş sistemlərinə təvəkkül edən daha yaxşı klasifikasiya performansını və i i-dən istifadə edən məlumat sistemlərinə təvəkkül edir.', 'cs': 'Kognitivní NLP systémy – tj. NLP systémy, které využívají behaviorálních dat, rozšiřují tradiční textové funkce o kognitivní funkce extrahované ze vzorů pohybu očí, EEG signálů, zobrazování mozku atd. Taková extrakce funkcí je typicky manuální. Tvrdíme, že manuální extrakce funkcí nemusí být nejlepším způsobem, jak řešit jemnosti textu, které charakteristicky převažují při složitých klasifikačních úkolech, jako je analýza sentimentů a detekce sarkasmu, a že i extrakce a výběr funkcí by měly být delegovány do učebního systému. Představujeme rámec, který automaticky extrahuje kognitivní prvky z údajů o pohybu očí/pohledu lidských čtenářů čítajících text a používá je jako prvky spolu s textovými prvky pro úkoly detekce polarity sentimentu a sarkasmu. Náš navržený rámec je založen na Convolucionální neuronové síti (CNN). CNN se učí rysy jak z pohledu, tak z textu a používá je k klasifikaci vstupního textu. Testujeme naši techniku na publikovaných datových sadách označených sentimentem a sarkasmem, obohacených o informace o pohled, abychom ukázali, že použití kombinace automaticky učených textových a pohledových funkcí často přináší lepší klasifikační výkon oproti (i) systémům založeným na CNN, které jsou založeny na samotném vstupu textu a (ii) existujícím systémům, které spoléhají na ručně vytvořený pohled a textové prvky.', 'et': 'Kognitiivsed NLP-süsteemid – st käitumisandmeid kasutavad NLP-süsteemid – täiendavad traditsioonilisi tekstipõhiseid funktsioone silmade liikumise mustritest, EEG-signaalidest, ajukujutistest jne saadud kognitiivsete funktsioonidega. Me väidame, et funktsioonide käsitsi ekstraheerimine ei pruugi olla parim viis lahendada teksti peeneid, mis iseloomulikult valitsevad keerukates klassifitseerimisülesannetes, nagu Sentiment Analysis ja Sarkasm Detection, ning et isegi funktsioonide ekstraheerimine ja valik tuleks delegeerida õppesüsteemile. Tutvustame raamistikku, mis võimaldab automaatselt ekstraheerida teksti lugevate inimlugejate silmade liikumise/pilgu andmetest kognitiivseid funktsioone ning kasutab neid funktsioonidena koos tekstiliste funktsioonidega sentimentaalse polaarsuse ja sarkasmi tuvastamise ülesanneteks. Meie kavandatud raamistik põhineb konvolutsioonilisel närvivõrgul (CNN). CNN õpib funktsioone nii pilgu kui ka teksti ning kasutab neid sisendteksti klassifitseerimiseks. Testime oma tehnikat avaldatud sentimentaalse ja sarkasmi märgistusega andmekogumitel, mis on rikastatud pilguteabega, näitamaks, et automaatselt õppitud teksti ja pilgufunktsioonide kombinatsiooni kasutamine annab sageli parema klassifitseerimisjõudluse kui (i) CNN-põhised süsteemid, mis tuginevad ainult teksti sisestamisele, ja (ii) olemasolevad süsteemid, mis tuginevad käsitsi valmistatud pilgule ja tekstifunktsioonidele.', 'jv': 'Cogn NLP sistem- i.e. NLP sistem that make use of manipulation data - ampment Traditional text-supported parameters with knowative parameters extract from oko-movement patterns, ETG Signales, braille-image, and msg. So extract of settings is often Manual Awak dhéwé éntuk manual extraksi karo aturan sing gak bêng nggawe nguasai bener kanggo basa gambaran sentiment Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing perusahaan karo akeh nggambar aturan tanggal sing nggawe ngubah winih-ngêngêngêng ngêngêng weruh gawe ngubah perusahaan seneng kebutuhan karo perusahaan seneng ngêngêng langkung pawaran kebutuhan seneng winih-perusahaan lan kedangêngêng langkung uwong. Kita pergunakake sing dibutungan ning konvolution Neral Network (MT). Multimedia menu Awak dhéwé éntuk teknik awak dhéwé ngéwé Sensitil lan sarkasm sing beraksi dataset, ndéwé nggawe informasi layar, ngéwong kuwi kesempatan gambar sistem sing automatik dhéwé. Perintah dhéwé éntuk dhéwé kuwi:', 'sk': 'Kognitivni sistemi NLP, tj. sistemi NLP, ki uporabljajo vedenjske podatke, dopolnjujejo tradicionalne besedilne funkcije s kognitivnimi značilnostmi, pridobljenimi iz vzorcev gibanja oči, signalov EEG, slikanja možganov itd. Takšno ekstrakcijo značilnosti je običajno ročno. Trdimo, da ročno ekstrakcijo funkcij morda ni najboljši način za reševanje subtilnosti besedila, ki značilno prevladujejo v kompleksnih klasifikacijskih nalogah, kot sta analiza čustev in zaznavanje sarkazma, in da je treba celo ekstrakcijo in izbiro funkcij prenesti na učni sistem. Predstavljamo okvir za samodejno ekstrakcijo kognitivnih značilnosti iz podatkov o gibanju oči/pogledu človeških bralcev, ki berejo besedilo, in jih uporabljamo kot značilnosti skupaj z besedilnimi značilnostmi za naloge sentimentalne polarnosti in zaznavanja sarkazma. Naš predlagani okvir temelji na konvolucionalnem živčnem omrežju (CNN). CNN uči funkcije iz pogleda in besedila in jih uporablja za razvrščanje vhodnega besedila. Našo tehniko preizkušamo na objavljenih množicah podatkov, označenih s sarkazmom, obogatenih z informacijami o pogledu, da bi pokazali, da uporaba kombinacije samodejno učenih besedil in funkcij pogleda pogosto prinaša boljšo klasifikacijsko učinkovitost kot (i) sistemi, ki temeljijo na CNN, ki se zanašajo samo na vnos besedila, in (ii) obstoječi sistemi, ki se zanašajo na ročno izdelane pogled in besedilne funkcije.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name We contend that manual extraction of features may not be the best way to tackle text subtleties that characteristically prevail in complex classification tasks like Sentiment Analysis and Sarcasm Detection, and that even the extraction and choice of features should be delegated to the learning system.  Mu ƙara firam don ka nuna kognitive farat ɗaya daga shirin ido/surori na mutane da ke karatun karãtun littãfin kuma ke amfani da su kamar misfealum da takardar littafin da ke sami ga aikin na gane na haske da sarki. Firam da muka ƙayyade KCharselect unicode block name Tuna jarraba kanyaikinmu a kan da aka yi wa fassarar hisãbi da sarkasm, aka wadãtar da bayani, ko kuma mu nuna cewa, idan an yi amfani da komai da littãfin da aka sanar da shi farat ɗaya, ko da yawa, za'a bãyar da mafi kyau ga fassarar fassarar (i) a kan tsarin CNN da ke dõgara a cikin tsarin matsayi kaɗan da (ii) da wasu na'ura waɗanda ke dõgara ga filayen da hannayen da hannayen hannayen hanyoyi.", 'he': 'מערכות NLP קוניטיביות - כלומר, מערכות NLP שמשתמשות בנתונים התנהגותיים - מגדילות תכונות מסורתיות מבוססת טקסט עם תכונות קוניטיביות שמוצאות מדפוסי תנועת עין, אותות EEG, דמיון מוח וכו"כ. חוטף כזה של תכונות הוא בדרך כלל ידני. אנו טוענים שהחיטוף ידני של תכונות אולי לא הדרך הטובה ביותר להתמודד עם עדינות טקסט ששולטות באופן אופייני במשימות מסורות מסובכות כמו ניתוח רגשות וגילוי סרקזם, ואפילו החוטוף והבחירה של תכונות צריכים להעביר למערכת הלימוד. אנחנו מציגים מסגרה כדי להוציא אוטומטית תכונות קוגניטיביות ממידע עין-תנועת/מבט של קוראים אנושיים קוראים את הטקסט ולהשתמש בהם כתכונות יחד עם תכונות טקסטיות למשימות של קוטביות רגשות וגילוי סרקזם. המסגרת המוצעת שלנו מבוססת על רשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN). CNN לומד תכונות מהמבט והטקסט ומשתמשים בהם כדי להקליף את הטקסט של הכניסה. אנו בודקים את הטכניקה שלנו על תחושות ופורסמות מסומנות סארקזם, שמעשרות עם מידע מבט, כדי להראות כי השימוש בשילוב של טקסט ללמוד באופן אוטומטי והמבט מוביל לעתים קרובות ביצועים מסווגים טובים יותר מעל (i) מערכות מבוססת CNN שמתלויות על הכניסה טקסטית לבד ו (ii) מערכות קיימות שמתלויות על מבט ומ', 'bo': 'Cognitive NLP systems- i.e., NLP systems that make use of behavioral data - augment traditional text-based features with cognitive features extracted from eye-movement patterns, EEG signals, brain-imaging etc. Such extraction of features is typically manual. ང་ཚོས་རང་བཟོས་ཁང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ལག་ཐོག་ལས་ཕར་རྟགས་བཀོད་ན་མེད་པར་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡིག་གནད་དོན་དག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་མིའི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྦྲེལ་རུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས། ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་ནི་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་མེད་དྲ་བ(CNN)དང་གཞི་རྟེན་འདུག CNN ཡིས་མཐོང་དང་ཡི་གེའི་ཆ་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནས་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེ We test our technique on published sentiment and sarcasm labeled datasets, enriched with gaze information, to show that using a combination of automatically learned text and gaze features often yields better classification performance over (i) CNN based systems that rely on text input alone and (ii) existing systems that rely on handcrafted gaze and textual features.'}
{'en': 'An Unsupervised Neural Attention Model for Aspect Extraction', 'pt': 'Um modelo de atenção neural não supervisionado para extração de aspecto', 'fr': "Un modèle d'attention neuronale non supervisé pour l'extraction d'aspects", 'ar': 'نموذج الانتباه العصبي غير الخاضع للرقابة لاستخراج الجانب', 'es': 'Un modelo de atención neuronal no supervisado para la extracción de aspectos', 'zh': '取无监督神经谨模形', 'ja': 'アスペクト抽出のための監督されていないニューラルアテンションモデル', 'hi': 'पहलू निष्कर्षण के लिए एक असुरक्षित तंत्रिका ध्यान मॉडल', 'ru': 'Модель неконтролируемого нейронного внимания для извлечения аспекта', 'ga': 'Múnla Airde Néarach Gan Maoirseacht le haghaidh Eastóscadh Gné', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli idegi figyelemmel kísérő modell az aspektus extrakcióhoz', 'el': 'Ένα μη εποπτευμένο μοντέλο νευρωνικής προσοχής για την εξαγωγή πτυχών', 'it': "Un modello di attenzione neurale non sorvegliato per l'estrazione degli aspetti", 'kk': 'Аспектті тарқату үшін сақталмаған невралдық назар үлгісі', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas neutralaus dėmesio ekstrakcijos modelis', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуван модел на неурално внимание за екстракција на аспект', 'ml': 'പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡല്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്തത്', 'ms': 'Model Perhatian Neural Tidak Dikawal untuk Ekstraksi Aspekt', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Attenzjoni Newrali Mhux Sorveljat għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Aspett', 'mn': 'Аспект хайлтын сэтгэл санааны загвар', 'ro': 'Un model de atenție neurală nesupravegheat pentru extragerea aspectelor', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowany model uwagi neuronowej dla ekstrakcji aspektów', 'sr': 'Neuralni model pažnje za ekstrakciju aspekta', 'so': 'Model for Aspect Extraction', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En icke övervakad neural uppmärksamhetsmodell för aspektextraktion', 'ta': 'வெளியேறுதலுக்கான ஒரு கண்காணிக்கப்படாத நெயுரல் கவனிப்பு மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình chú ý thần kinh không giám sát để tháo hạt nhân', 'bg': 'Модел на невронно внимание без надзор за екстракция на аспекта', 'nl': 'Een onbewaakt neurale attentie model voor aspect extractie', 'da': 'En ukontrolleret neural opmærksomhedsmodel til Aspect Extraction', 'hr': 'Nepotrebni model neurološke pažnje za izvlačenje aspekta', 'de': 'Ein unbeaufsichtigtes neuronales Aufmerksamkeitsmodell für die Aspektextraktion', 'ko': '방면으로 추출된 무감독 신경 주의 모형', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'An Unsupervised Neural Attention Model for Aspect Extraction', 'tr': 'Aýry Açmak üçin Saýlanmadyk Näral Attention nusgasy', 'af': 'Name', 'id': 'An Unsupervised Neural Attention Model for Aspect Extraction', 'sq': 'Një model i vëmendjes neurale të pazgjidhur për nxjerrjen e aspekteve', 'hy': 'Անվերահսկված նյարդային ուշադրության մոդելը հարաբերությունների արտահանման համար', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'bn': 'প্রত্যাশিত এক্সপ্রেক্টরের জন্য নিউরাল মনোযোগ মোডেল', 'bs': 'Model neuralne pažnje za ekstrakciju aspekta', 'ca': "Un model d'atenció neuronal no supervisat per l'extracció de aspecte", 'az': 'Aspect Extraction üçün təhlükəsizlənməmiş Nöral Attention Modeli', 'cs': 'Model neurální pozornosti bez dohledu pro extrakci aspektů', 'et': 'Järelevalveta närvitähelepanu mudel aspekti ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon hermohuomion malli aspektin poistoa varten', 'jv': 'Aspect extract', 'sk': 'Model nevrološke pozornosti za ekstrakcijo aspektov', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'Model for Aspect Extracti', 'bo': 'Aspect Extraction་ལ་ཉར་ཡོད་མེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྟོགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་'}
{'en': 'Aspect extraction is an important and challenging task in aspect-based sentiment analysis. Existing works tend to apply variants of topic models on this task. While fairly successful, these methods usually do not produce highly coherent aspects. In this paper, we present a novel neural approach with the aim of discovering coherent aspects. The model improves coherence by exploiting the distribution of word co-occurrences through the use of neural word embeddings. Unlike topic models which typically assume independently generated words, word embedding models encourage words that appear in similar contexts to be located close to each other in the embedding space. In addition, we use an attention mechanism to de-emphasize irrelevant words during training, further improving the coherence of aspects. Experimental results on real-life datasets demonstrate that our approach discovers more meaningful and coherent aspects, and substantially outperforms baseline methods on several evaluation tasks.', 'ar': 'يعتبر استخراج الجانب مهمة مهمة وصعبة في تحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب. تميل الأعمال الحالية إلى تطبيق متغيرات من نماذج الموضوعات على هذه المهمة. في حين أن هذه الأساليب ناجحة إلى حد ما ، إلا أنها عادة لا تنتج جوانب متماسكة للغاية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا عصبيًا جديدًا بهدف اكتشاف جوانب متماسكة. يعمل النموذج على تحسين التماسك من خلال استغلال توزيع تكرارات الكلمات من خلال استخدام تداخلات الكلمات العصبية. على عكس نماذج الموضوعات التي تفترض عادةً كلمات مُنشأة بشكل مستقل ، تشجع نماذج تضمين الكلمات الكلمات التي تظهر في سياقات متشابهة لتكون قريبة من بعضها البعض في مساحة التضمين. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نستخدم آلية الانتباه للتخلص من الكلمات غير ذات الصلة أثناء التدريب ، مما يؤدي إلى زيادة تحسين تماسك الجوانب. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نهجنا يكتشف جوانب أكثر تماسكًا وذات مغزى ، ويتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب الأساسية في العديد من مهام التقييم.', 'es': 'La extracción de aspectos es una tarea importante y desafiante en el análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos. Los trabajos existentes tienden a aplicar variantes de modelos temáticos en esta tarea. Si bien son bastante exitosos, estos métodos no suelen producir aspectos altamente coherentes. En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque neuronal novedoso con el objetivo de descubrir aspectos coherentes. El modelo mejora la coherencia al explotar la distribución de coocurrencias de palabras mediante el uso de incrustaciones de palabras neuronales. A diferencia de los modelos de temas que normalmente asumen palabras generadas de forma independiente, los modelos de incrustación de palabras fomentan que las palabras que aparecen en contextos similares se ubiquen cerca unas de otras en el espacio de incrustación. Además, utilizamos un mecanismo de atención para dejar de enfatizar las palabras irrelevantes durante el entrenamiento, mejorando aún más la coherencia de los aspectos. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos de la vida real demuestran que nuestro enfoque descubre aspectos más significativos y coherentes, y supera sustancialmente a los métodos de referencia en varias tareas de evaluación.', 'pt': 'A extração de aspectos é uma tarefa importante e desafiadora na análise de sentimentos baseada em aspectos. Os trabalhos existentes tendem a aplicar variantes de modelos de tópicos nesta tarefa. Embora bastante bem-sucedidos, esses métodos geralmente não produzem aspectos altamente coerentes. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova abordagem neural com o objetivo de descobrir aspectos coerentes. O modelo melhora a coerência explorando a distribuição de coocorrências de palavras por meio do uso de embeddings de palavras neurais. Ao contrário dos modelos de tópicos que normalmente assumem palavras geradas independentemente, os modelos de incorporação de palavras encorajam palavras que aparecem em contextos semelhantes a serem localizadas próximas umas das outras no espaço de incorporação. Além disso, usamos um mecanismo de atenção para desenfatizar palavras irrelevantes durante o treinamento, melhorando ainda mais a coerência dos aspectos. Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados da vida real demonstram que nossa abordagem descobre aspectos mais significativos e coerentes e supera substancialmente os métodos de linha de base em várias tarefas de avaliação.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'aspects est une tâche importante et difficile dans l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects. Les œuvres existantes ont tendance à appliquer des variantes de modèles thématiques à cette tâche. Bien qu'assez efficaces, ces méthodes ne produisent généralement pas d'aspects très cohérents. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle approche neuronale dans le but de découvrir des aspects cohérents. Le modèle améliore la cohérence en exploitant la distribution des cooccurrences de mots grâce à l'utilisation d'intégrations neuronales de mots. Contrairement aux modèles thématiques qui supposent généralement des mots générés indépendamment, les modèles d'intégration de mots encouragent les mots qui apparaissent dans des contextes similaires à être situés à proximité les uns des autres dans l'espace d'intégration. De plus, nous utilisons un mécanisme d'attention pour minimiser l'importance des mots non pertinents pendant la formation, améliorant ainsi la cohérence des aspects. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données réels démontrent que notre approche permet de découvrir des aspects plus significatifs et cohérents, et qu'elle surpasse largement les méthodes de base pour plusieurs tâches d'évaluation.", 'ja': 'アスペクト抽出は、アスペクトベースのセンチメント分析における重要で困難なタスクです。 既存の作品は、このタスクにトピックモデルのバリアントを適用する傾向がある。 かなり成功しているが、これらの方法は通常、非常に一貫した態様を生み出さない。 本稿では、一貫性のある側面を発見することを目的とした、新規のニューラルアプローチを提示する。 このモデルは、ニューラルワード埋め込みの使用を通じて、単語の共起の分布を利用することによって一貫性を向上させる。 典型的に独立して生成された単語を仮定するトピックモデルとは異なり、単語埋め込みモデルは、類似のコンテキストに出現する単語が埋め込み空間内で互いに近接して位置することを奨励する。 さらに、注意メカニズムを使用して、トレーニング中に無関係な単語を強調しなくし、側面の一貫性をさらに向上させます。 実際のデータセットの実験結果は、私たちのアプローチがより有意義で一貫した側面を発見し、いくつかの評価タスクのベースライン方法を実質的に上回っていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'पहलू निष्कर्षण पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण में एक महत्वपूर्ण और चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। मौजूदा कार्य इस कार्य पर विषय मॉडल के संस्करणों को लागू करते हैं। जबकि काफी सफल, ये तरीके आमतौर पर अत्यधिक सुसंगत पहलुओं का उत्पादन नहीं करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम सुसंगत पहलुओं की खोज के उद्देश्य से एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। मॉडल तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग के उपयोग के माध्यम से शब्द सह-घटनाओं के वितरण का शोषण करके सुसंगतता में सुधार करता है। विषय मॉडल के विपरीत जो आमतौर पर स्वतंत्र रूप से उत्पन्न शब्दों को मानते हैं, शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल उन शब्दों को प्रोत्साहित करते हैं जो समान संदर्भों में दिखाई देते हैं ताकि एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में एक-दूसरे के करीब स्थित हो सकें। इसके अलावा, हम प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अप्रासंगिक शब्दों पर जोर देने के लिए एक ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग करते हैं, पहलुओं की सुसंगतता में और सुधार करते हैं। वास्तविक जीवन डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण अधिक सार्थक और सुसंगत पहलुओं की खोज करता है, और कई मूल्यांकन कार्यों पर बेसलाइन विधियों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है।', 'zh': '情之所在,一举而挑战性务也。 今文归于此,宜用题模之变体。 虽颇成功,常不生高贯。 本文中,有新神经法,指在连贯。 其用神经词嵌单词共现以崇一致性。 与常单词异,单词嵌劝上下文见者单词嵌空相近。 用意机以消不关单词,以进一步提高其一致性。 于今数集上之实验结果表明,吾道见更有意义贯,而大优于基线。', 'ru': 'Извлечение аспектов является важной и сложной задачей в анализе настроений на основе аспектов. Существующие работы имеют тенденцию применять варианты тематических моделей к этой задаче. Хотя эти методы являются довольно успешными, они, как правило, не обеспечивают весьма последовательных аспектов. В этой статье мы представляем новый нейронный подход с целью обнаружения когерентных аспектов. Модель улучшает согласованность за счет использования распределения совмещений слов за счет использования вложений нейронных слов. В отличие от тематических моделей, которые обычно предполагают независимо сгенерированные слова, модели встраивания слов поощряют слова, которые появляются в похожих контекстах, быть расположенными близко друг к другу в пространстве встраивания. Кроме того, мы используем механизм внимания, чтобы снять акцент с ненужных слов во время обучения, еще больше повышая согласованность аспектов. Экспериментальные результаты наборов данных из реальной жизни показывают, что наш подход обнаруживает более значимые и согласованные аспекты и существенно превосходит базовые методы по ряду задач оценки.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach agus dúshlánach é eastóscadh gnéithe in anailís aireachtála bunaithe ar ghnéithe. Is gnách go gcuireann saothair atá ann faoi láthair leaganacha de shamhlacha topaicí i bhfeidhm ar an tasc seo. Cé go n-éiríonn go maith leo, de ghnáth ní tháirgeann na modhanna seo gnéithe an-chomhleanúnacha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid cur chuige néarúil nua i láthair agus é mar aidhm aige gnéithe comhleanúnacha a aimsiú. Feabhsaíonn an tsamhail comhleanúnachas trí leas a bhaint as dáileadh comhtharlaithe focal trí úsáid a bhaint as neadaithe focal néaracha. Murab ionann agus samhlacha topaice a ghlacann go hiondúil focail a ghintear go neamhspleách, spreagann samhlacha leabú focal focail a fheictear i gcomhthéacsanna comhchosúla a bheith suite gar dá chéile sa spás neadaithe. Ina theannta sin, bainimid úsáid as meicníocht aird chun focail nach mbaineann le hábhar a dhí-bhéim le linn na hoiliúna, ag feabhsú comhleanúnachas gnéithe a thuilleadh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair shonraí an fhíorsaoil go dtagann ár gcur chuige ar ghnéithe níos bríonna agus níos soiléire, agus go sáraíonn sé go substaintiúil modhanna bonnlíne ar roinnt tascanna meastóireachta.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή πτυχών είναι μια σημαντική και προκλητική εργασία στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων βάσει πτυχών. Τα υπάρχοντα έργα τείνουν να εφαρμόζουν παραλλαγές μοντέλων θεμάτων σε αυτή την εργασία. Αν και αρκετά επιτυχημένες, αυτές οι μέθοδοι συνήθως δεν παράγουν ιδιαίτερα συνεκτικές πτυχές. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα νευρωνική προσέγγιση με στόχο την ανακάλυψη συνεκτικών πτυχών. Το μοντέλο βελτιώνει τη συνοχή με την αξιοποίηση της κατανομής των συνεμφανισμών λέξεων μέσω της χρήσης των ενσωματωμένων νευρωνικών λέξεων. Σε αντίθεση με τα μοντέλα θεμάτων που συνήθως υποθέτουν ανεξάρτητα παραγόμενες λέξεις, τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων ενθαρρύνουν λέξεις που εμφανίζονται σε παρόμοια πλαίσια να βρίσκονται κοντά μεταξύ τους στο χώρο ενσωμάτωσης. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής για να μην τονίσουμε άσχετες λέξεις κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, βελτιώνοντας περαιτέρω τη συνοχή των πτυχών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων καταδεικνύουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας ανακαλύπτει πιο σημαντικές και συνεκτικές πτυχές και ουσιαστικά ξεπερνά τις μεθόδους βάσης σε διάφορες εργασίες αξιολόγησης.', 'hu': 'Az aspektus kitermelése fontos és kihívást jelentő feladat az aspektus alapú érzelmek elemzésében. A már meglévő munkák általában a témamodellek változatait alkalmazzák erre a feladatra. Bár meglehetősen sikeresek, ezek a módszerek általában nem eredményeznek nagyon koherens szempontokat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új neurális megközelítést mutatunk be, amelynek célja koherens aspektusok felfedezése. A modell javítja a koherenciát azáltal, hogy kihasználja a szótárs-előfordulások eloszlását neurális szóbeágyazások használatával. A témamodellekkel ellentétben, amelyek általában függetlenül generált szavakat feltételeznek, a szóbeágyazási modellek arra ösztönzik a hasonló környezetben megjelenő szavakat, hogy a beágyazási térben egymáshoz közel helyezzék el. Ezenkívül figyelemfelkeltő mechanizmust használunk a lényegtelen szavak kiküszöbölésére a képzés során, tovább javítva a szempontok koherenciáját. A valós életben végzett adatkészletek kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk értelmesebb és koherensebb szempontokat fedez fel, és lényegesen felülmúlja az alapvető módszereket számos értékelési feladat esetében.', 'ka': 'აპექტიკური ექსპექცია მნიშვნელოვანი და შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა აპექტიმენტის ანალიზში. მიმდინარე სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო ტემიკის მოდელების განრავლების გამოყენება ამ სამუშაოში. მაგრამ მხოლოდ წარმატებით, ეს მეტი უბრალოდ არ გამოვიყენებს ძალიან შესაძლებელი აპექტები. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში პრომენტის ნეიროლური დახმარებას მიზეზით, რომ კონდენტური აპექტირების აღმოჩენა. მოდელის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გამოყენებით ნეიროლური სიტყვების გამოყენებით გამოიყენება. ტემების მოდელების განმავლობაში, რომლებიც ტიპოლურად განახლებული სიტყვების შესახებ, სიტყვების მოდელების შესახებ სიტყვები, რომლებიც მსგავსი კონტექსტებში ჩვენ ერთმანეთს და დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ აღნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების მექანსი, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების განმავლობაში გამოყენება, და აღნიშვნელოვანი აღმოჩენ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები რეალური ცხოვრების მონაცემების შესახებ აღმოჩნდება, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა აპექტირე', 'it': "L'estrazione degli aspetti è un compito importante e impegnativo nell'analisi dei sentimenti basata sugli aspetti. I lavori esistenti tendono ad applicare varianti di modelli di argomento a questo compito. Pur avendo abbastanza successo, questi metodi di solito non producono aspetti molto coerenti. In questo articolo presentiamo un nuovo approccio neurale con l'obiettivo di scoprire aspetti coerenti. Il modello migliora la coerenza sfruttando la distribuzione delle co-occorrenze di parole attraverso l'uso di embedding di parole neurali. A differenza dei modelli di argomenti che generalmente assumono parole generate in modo indipendente, i modelli di incorporazione di parole incoraggiano le parole che appaiono in contesti simili a trovarsi vicine l'una all'altra nello spazio di incorporazione. Inoltre, utilizziamo un meccanismo di attenzione per de-enfatizzare parole irrilevanti durante la formazione, migliorando ulteriormente la coerenza degli aspetti. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati reali dimostrano che il nostro approccio scopre aspetti più significativi e coerenti e supera sostanzialmente i metodi di base in diversi compiti di valutazione.", 'lt': 'Aspect extraction is an important and challenging task in aspect-based sentiment analysis.  Esami darbai paprastai taiko teminių modelių variantus šioje užduotyje. Nors šie metodai yra gana sėkmingi, jie paprastai nesuteikia labai nuoseklių aspektų. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują neurologinį požiūrį siekiant nustatyti nuoseklius aspektus. Modelis didina nuoseklumą naudojant žodžių pasiskirstymą naudojant neurologinius žodžių įdėjimus. Skirtingai nuo teminių modelių, kurie paprastai laikosi savarankiškai sukurtų žodžių, žodžių įterpimo modeliai skatina žodžius, kurie panašiose aplinkybėse atsiranda, būti artimi vienas kitam įterpimo erdvėje. Be to, mes naudojame dėmesio mechanizmą, skirtą pabrėžti nereikšmingus žodžius mokymo metu ir toliau gerinti aspektų nuoseklumą. Eksperimentiniai realiojo gyvenimo duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris nustato prasmingesnius ir nuoseklesnius aspektus ir iš esmės viršija pagrindinius metodus keliose vertinimo užduotyse.', 'kk': 'Перспекті тарқату - аспекті негізделген сезімдер анализиясында маңызды және әсер ететін тапсырма. Бар жұмыстар осы тапсырманың нақыштар үлгілерін қолданады. Бұл әдістер әдімгі сәтті болғанда, әдетте бұл әдістер көптеген аспекттерді өзгертпейді. Бұл қағазда, біз соғысты аспекттерді табу мақсатымен романдық невралдық тәртібін таңдаймыз. Бұл үлгі невралдық сөздерді ендіру арқылы сөздерді біріктіру үшін біріктірімін жақсартады. Тәуелсіз құрылған сөздер деген нақыштар үлгілерінің қасиеті болмаса, сөздерді ендіру үлгілері ұқсас контексттерде бір-біріне жақын орында көрсетеді. Қосымша, біз оқыту кезінде маңызды сөздерді бағыттау үшін, аспекттердің соғыстығын жақсарту үшін назарды қолданамыз. Шын өмірдің деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміздің маңызды және тәуелді аспекттерді табу дегенді көрсетеді, және бірнеше оқу тапсырмаларында негізгі жолдарды к', 'mk': 'Екстракција на аспекти е важна и предизвикувачка задача во аспектна анализа на чувствата. Постојаните дела имаат тенденција да аплицираат варијанти на темски модели на оваа задача. Иако прилично успешни, овие методи обично не создаваат високо кохерентни аспекти. Во овој весник, претставуваме нов нервен пристап со цел откривање на кохерентни аспекти. The model improves coherence by exploiting the distribution of word co-occurrences through the use of neural word embeddings.  За разлика од темските модели кои обично претпоставуваат независно генерирани зборови, моделите на вградба на зборови охрабруваат зборови кои се појавуваат во слични контексти да се лоцираат блиску еден до друг во вставниот простор. Покрај тоа, користиме механизам на внимание за да ги деистакнеме нерелевантните зборови за време на обуката, понатаму подобрувајќи ја кохеренцијата на аспектите. Експерименталните резултати на базите на податоци за реалниот живот покажуваат дека нашиот пристап открива позначителни и кохерентни аспекти и значително ги надминува основните методи за неколку евалуациски задачи.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi aspek adalah tugas penting dan mencabar dalam analisis perasaan berdasarkan aspek. Kerja yang wujud cenderung untuk melaksanakan varian model topik pada tugas ini. Walaupun cukup berjaya, kaedah ini biasanya tidak menghasilkan aspek yang sangat konsisten. In this paper, we present a novel neural approach with the aim of discovering coherent aspects.  Model meningkatkan kesehatan dengan mengeksploitasi distribusi sambungan perkataan melalui penggunaan penyambungan perkataan saraf. Tidak seperti model topik yang biasanya menganggap perkataan yang dijana secara independen, model penyembedding perkataan menyokong perkataan yang muncul dalam konteks yang sama untuk ditempatkan berhampiran satu sama lain dalam ruang penyembedding. Selain itu, kami menggunakan mekanisme perhatian untuk menekankan kata-kata yang tidak relevan semasa latihan, meningkatkan lebih konsistens aspek. Hasil percubaan pada set data kehidupan sebenar menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita menemukan aspek yang lebih bermakna dan konsisten, dan secara berasaskan melebihi kaedah dasar pada beberapa tugas penilaian.', 'ml': 'ആസ്പിക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതും വിലാലിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയാണ്. വിഭാഗത്തിലുള്ള ആശയ നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകളുടെ വേറ വളരെ വിജയിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ഈ രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d അടുത്തുവരുത്തുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം. ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ സഹജമാക്കുന്നതിനെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dഡ് എംബെഡിങ്ങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പോലെ പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്ന വാ കൂടാതെ, പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമുക്കൊരു ശ്രദ്ധ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നാം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ സം Experimental results on real-life datasets demonstrate that our approach discovers more meaningful and coherent aspects, and substantially outperforms baseline methods on several evaluation tasks.', 'mn': 'Харин асуудлыг татах нь асуудлын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд чухал, хэцүү ажил юм. Ингээд байгаа ажиллууд энэ ажил дээр сэдвийн загваруудыг ашигладаг. Эцэст нь амжилттай ч эдгээр аргыг ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн нийгмийн талаар бий болгодоггүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийг харуулах зорилгоор шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөл өгдөг. Энэ загвар нь сэтгэл зүй үгийнхэвлэлийн хэрэглээнээс илүү хамааралтай байдлыг ашиглаж байдаг. Олон сэдвийн загваруудын ялангуяа өөрсдийгөө бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие биенээ бие бие би Мөн бид дасгал хөдөлгөөн үеийнхаа хамааралтай үгсийг буцаахын тулд анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийг ашигладаг. Бодит амьдралын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь илүү утгатай, нийгмийн асуудлыг олж мэднэ. Мөн олон үнэлгээний даалгаварын үндсэн арга замыг үндсэн хэмжээний үйлдвэрлэлд үндсэн арга замыг илүү', 'mt': "Aspect extraction is an important and challenging task in aspect-based sentiment analysis.  Xogħlijiet eżistenti għandhom it-tendenza li japplikaw varjanti ta’ mudelli tematiċi f’dan il-kompitu. Filwaqt li huma pjuttost ta’ suċċess, dawn il-metodi normalment ma jipproduċux aspetti koerenti ħafna. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ newrali ġdid bil-għan li jinstabu aspetti koerenti. Il-mudell itejjeb il-koerenza billi jisfrutta d-distribuzzjoni tal-ko-okkorrenzi tal-kliem permezz tal-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem newrali. Għall-kuntrarju ta’ mudelli tematiċi li tipikament jassumu kliem iġġenerat b’mod indipendenti, mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem jinkoraġġixxu kliem li jidhru f’kuntesti simili biex jinsabu qrib xulxin fl-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, aħna nużaw mekkaniżmu ta' attenzjoni biex nixfu l-enfasi fuq il-kliem irrelevanti waqt it-taħriġ, filwaqt li nkomplu ntejbu l-koerenza tal-aspetti. Riżultati esperimentali dwar settijiet ta’ dejta tal-ħajja reali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jiskopri aspetti aktar sinifikanti u koerenti, u b’mod sostanzjali jaqbeż il-metodi ta’ bażi fuq diversi kompiti ta’ evalwazzjoni.", 'no': 'Ekstraksjonen er ein viktig og vanskeleg oppgåve i aspektbasert sentimentanalyse. Dei eksisterande arbeida har vanleg å bruka variantar av emnemodular på denne oppgåva. Mens denne metodane er ganske suksessfulle, generelt produserer ikkje stor samanlig aspekt. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein novel neuraltilnærming med målet å oppdage samanlige aspektar. Modellen forbetrar koherens ved å bruka distribusjonen av ordsammenhendingar gjennom bruken av neuralordinnbygging. I motsetjing til emnemodular som normalt antar uavhengig genererte ord, vil ordinnbæringsmodeller forstørra ord som vert vist i liknande kontekstar som vert plassert nær kvarandre i innbæringsrommet. I tillegg bruker vi eit oppmerksmekanisme for å understreka uavhengige ord under opplæring, forbetra konsekvensen av aspektar. Eksperimentale resultat på datasett for verkeleg liv viser at tilnærminga vårt oppdager meir betydelige og konsekvente aspektar, og utfører substituelt baseline metodar på fleire evalueringsoppgåver.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja aspektów jest ważnym i wymagającym zadaniem w analizie sentymentów opartych na aspektach. Istniejące prace mają tendencję do stosowania wariantów modeli tematycznych do tego zadania. Chociaż metody te są dość skuteczne, zazwyczaj nie produkują wysoce spójnych aspektów. W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorskie podejście neuronowe w celu odkrycia spójnych aspektów. Model poprawia spójność poprzez wykorzystanie dystrybucji współwystępowań słowa poprzez zastosowanie osadzeń słów neuronowych. W przeciwieństwie do modeli tematycznych, które zazwyczaj zakładają niezależnie generowane słowa, modele osadzania słów zachęcają do umieszczania słów, które pojawiają się w podobnych kontekstach, blisko siebie w przestrzeni osadzania. Ponadto wykorzystujemy mechanizm uwagi, aby podczas treningu odkreślić nieistotne słowa, co jeszcze bardziej poprawia spójność aspektów. Wyniki eksperymentalne na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasze podejście odkrywa bardziej znaczące i spójne aspekty i znacznie przewyższa metody bazowe w kilku zadaniach oceny.', 'ro': 'Extragerea aspectelor este o sarcină importantă și provocatoare în analiza sentimentului bazată pe aspecte. Lucrările existente tind să aplice variante de modele de subiect la această sarcină. Deși destul de reușite, aceste metode nu produc, de obicei, aspecte foarte coerente. În această lucrare, prezentăm o nouă abordare neurală cu scopul de a descoperi aspecte coerente. Modelul îmbunătățește coerența prin exploatarea distribuției co-evenimentelor de cuvinte prin utilizarea încorporărilor neurale de cuvinte. Spre deosebire de modelele de subiecte care presupun în mod obișnuit cuvinte generate independent, modelele de încorporare a cuvintelor încurajează cuvintele care apar în contexte similare să fie amplasate aproape unul de celălalt în spațiul de încorporare. În plus, folosim un mecanism de atenție pentru a de-sublinia cuvintele irelevante în timpul antrenamentului, îmbunătățind în continuare coerența aspectelor. Rezultatele experimentale asupra seturilor de date din viața reală demonstrează că abordarea noastră descoperă aspecte mai semnificative și mai coerente și depășește substanțial metodele de bază în mai multe sarcini de evaluare.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija aspekta je važan i izazovan zadatak u analizi sentimenta na aspektu. Postojeći radovi obično primjenjuju variante temskih modela na ovom zadatku. Iako su prilično uspješni, ove metode obično ne proizvode vrlo sasvim sasvim sasvim sporedne aspekte. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi neuralni pristup ciljem otkrivanja sasluženih aspekta. Model poboljšava konsekvenciju iskorištavanjem distribucije saradnjih događaja rijeèima kroz korištenje neuralnih reèi. Za razliku od modela tema koji obično pretpostavljaju nezavisno proizvedene reči, modeli uključenih reči ohrabruju reči koje se pojavljuju u sličnim kontekstima da se nalaze blizu jedno drugom u svemiru uključenog. Osim toga, koristimo mehanizam pažnje da se oslanjamo na nevažne reči tokom treninga, i dalje poboljšamo saskaņost aspekta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka o stvarnom životu pokazuju da naš pristup otkriva smisleniji i saslušaniji aspekti, i značajno iznosi početne metode na nekoliko zadataka za procjenu.', 'so': 'Fiiritaanka waa shaqada muhiim iyo dhibaatooyin ku saabsan baaritaanka fikrada. Shaqooyinka la joogo waxay shaqadan ku codsadaan noocyo kala duwan oo mada ah. Inta ay si fiican u liibaantahay, qaababkan sida caadiga ah ma soo saaraan dhinac aad u adag. Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa qaab cilmi ah oo ku habboon in aan la ogaano dhinacyada labaad. Tusaalada waxaa hagaajiya isku dayn marka lagu isticmaalo isticmaalka qoraalka kooxaha ah. Tusaalada mada oo si kala duwan ah oo sida caadiga ah u malaynaya hadal si xor ah oo u dhalay, hadalka ku qoran sameynta ayaa dhiirrigeliya hadal ka muuqata qoraalka isku mid ah si ay isugu dhowaadaan meelaha uu ku hoydo. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu isticmaalnaa meymisyo aan ku boorrinayno hadal aan cilmi lahayn xilliga waxbarashada, horumarinta wadanka. Imtixaanka arimaha nololeedka ee runta ah waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu ay ka muuqato dhinacyo ka faa’iido badan oo la xiriira, wuxuuna si badan u muujiyaa qaababka hoose ee lagu sameeyo shaqaalaha qiimeynta.', 'sv': 'Aspektutvinning är en viktig och utmanande uppgift i aspektbaserad sentimentalanalys. Befintliga arbeten tenderar att tillämpa varianter av ämnesmodeller på denna uppgift. Även om dessa metoder är ganska framgångsrika ger de vanligtvis inte mycket sammanhängande aspekter. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt neuralt tillvägagångssätt med syfte att upptäcka sammanhängande aspekter. Modellen förbättrar samstämmigheten genom att utnyttja fördelningen av ordförekomster genom användning av neurala ordinbäddningar. Till skillnad från ämnesmodeller som vanligtvis antar självständigt genererade ord uppmuntrar ordinbäddningsmodeller ord som visas i liknande sammanhang att placeras nära varandra i inbäddningsutrymmet. Dessutom använder vi en uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att avbetona irrelevanta ord under utbildningen, vilket ytterligare förbättrar samstämmigheten i aspekter. Experimentella resultat på reala datauppsättningar visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt upptäcker mer meningsfulla och sammanhängande aspekter och väsentligt överträffar basmetoder på flera utvärderingsuppgifter.', 'si': 'Aspect extraction is a vital and challentful job in the aspects-based sensation testing. මේ වැඩේ තියෙන්නේ විද්\u200dයාපෘති මොඩල් වර්ගයක් භාවිත කරන්න. සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්  මේ පැත්තට, අපි නියම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අදහස් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොයාගන්න. මොඩේල් එක්ක සංවේදනය වැඩ කරනවා වචන සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා වචන සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සිද්ධියෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු වචන වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන්, වචන සංවේදනය සමාන සංවේදනයෙන් පෙනු ඒ වගේම, අපි අවධානයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා ප්\u200dරධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා ඇත්ත ජීවිතේ දත්ත සේට් වල පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව තරම් අදහස් සහ සංවිධාන ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් හොයාගන', 'ta': 'காண வெளியீடு ஒரு முக்கியமான மற்றும் சவாலிக்கும் செயல் தற்போதைய செயல்கள் இந்த பணியில் உள்ள தலைப்பு மாதிரிகளின் மாறிகளை பயன்படுத்தும். மிகவும் வெற்றியடைந்த போது, இந்த முறைகள் வழக்கமாக மிகவும் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்படாது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதுபாதுகாப்பு நெருக்கம் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் இக்காரணத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க Name பொருள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை பொருத்தமாக எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும் பொருள் குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகள், ஒத்த போன்ற முறையில் உள்ள இடைவெளி பயிற்சியில் நாம் ஒரு கவனம் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் பயிற்சியில் நிலையான வார்த்தைகளை உயர்த்திக் கொள்கிறோம்,  Experimental results on real-life datasets demonstrate that our approach discovers more meaningful and coherent aspects, and substantially outperforms baseline methods on several evaluation tasks.', 'ur': 'آسپٹ اٹھانے کا ایک اہم اور مشکل کام ہے اس طرح پر بنیادی احساسات تحلیل میں۔ اس کام پر موجود موجود موجود موڈل کے متغیروں کو لازم کرنا چاہتا ہے. اگرچہ انصاف کے ساتھ موفق ہوتے ہیں، یہ طریقے معمولاً بہت اچھی طریقے نہیں پیدا کرتے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نور نیورال طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ اس کے مطابق مشترک طریقوں کو آشکار کریں۔ Model improves coherence by exploiting the distribution of words co-occurrences through the use of neural word embeddings. ٹوپیٹ موڈل کے مطابق جو معمولاً اپنے ساتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے لفظے سمجھتے ہیں، لفظے مڈیلڈ کے مطابق لفظوں کی تدبیر دیتے ہیں جو ایک دوسرے کے نزدیک ہونے کی جگہ میں ظاہر ہوتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک توجه مکانیسم کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ تعلیم کے وقت غیر اہم کلمات کو دفع کریں، اور اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر حقیقی زندگی ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ بہت معنی اور مہربانی کے اثرات دیکھتا ہے، اور بہت زیادہ بنیادین طریقے سے بہت زیادہ تحقیق کے کاموں پر اثرات کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Aniqlik ajratish muhim va murakkab vazifani o'zgartiradi. Mavjud vazifalar bu vazifaning mavzu modellarining oʻzgarishlarini qoʻllanadi. Agar muvaffaqiyatli bo'lsa, bu usullar odatda juda ko'p narsalar emas. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha aspektlarni aniqlash uchun novel neyron tilini anglatamiz. Name Ushbu mavzu modellariga o'xshash tuziladigan so'zlarni o'zgartirish turi. Ushbu soʻzni quyidagi soʻzlarni bir-бирлариdagi joyda joylashtirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz tajriba sohasida hech qanday so'zlarni qo'llash uchun foydalanamiz, hamma narsalarning biroz narsalarni oshirish uchun. Mavjud hayoti maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning qiymatlarimizning bir necha qiymatlar vazifalarda ko'proq narsalarni ko'rsatadi va ko'proq qiymatlar vazifalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phân tích khía cạnh là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng và khó khăn trong phân tích cảm xúc. Các công trình tồn tại có xu hướng áp dụng các biến thể về chủ đề. Tuy rằng khả năng cao, nhưng các phương pháp này thường không đưa ra những khía cạnh bền vững. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp thần kinh mới với mục đích khám phá các khía cạnh phù hợp. Mô hình này cải thiện sự đồng loạt của các từ bằng cách sử dụng các từ nhân tạo từ thần kinh. Không giống các mô hình chủ đề mà thường sử dụng các từ được tạo ra riêng, các mô hình ghép từ khuyến khích các từ xuất hiện trong các mặt tương tự để đặt gần nhau trong khoảng cách lắp ghép. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi dùng một cơ chế tập trung để loại bỏ những từ không liên quan trong khi huấn luyện, cải thiện sự phù hợp giữa các khía cạnh. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên các dữ liệu đời thực chứng minh rằng phương pháp của chúng ta khám phá ra các khía cạnh có ý nghĩa và liên quan hơn và thực hiện các phương pháp cơ bản trong nhiều nhiệm vụ đánh giá.', 'da': 'Aspect ekstraktion er en vigtig og udfordrende opgave i aspektbaseret sentiment analyse. Eksisterende værker har tendens til at anvende varianter af emnemodeller på denne opgave. Selv om disse metoder er temmelig vellykkede, giver de normalt ikke særlig sammenhængende aspekter. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny neural tilgang med det formål at opdage sammenhængende aspekter. Modellen forbedrer sammenhængen ved at udnytte fordelingen af ord co-forekomster gennem brug af neurale ord embeddings. I modsætning til emnemodeller, der typisk antager uafhængigt genererede ord, opfordrer ordindlejringsmodeller ord, der vises i lignende sammenhænge, til at være placeret tæt på hinanden i indlejringsrummet. Derudover bruger vi en opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at aflægge irrelevante ord under træningen, hvilket yderligere forbedrer sammenhængen mellem aspekter. Eksperimentelle resultater på virkelige datasæt viser, at vores tilgang opdager mere meningsfulde og sammenhængende aspekter og overgår grundlæggende metoder på flere evalueringsopgaver.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija aspekta je važan i izazovan zadatak u analizi osjećaja na aspektu. Postojeći radovi često primjenjuju variante temnih modela na ovom zadatku. Iako su prilično uspješni, te metode obično ne proizvode vrlo pristojne aspekte. U ovom papiru predstavljamo nov neurološki pristup ciljem otkrivanja sasluženih aspekta. Model poboljšava konsekvenciju iskorištavanjem distribucije istodobnih događaja riječi kroz korištenje neuralnih riječi. Za razliku od modela teme koji obično preuzimaju nezavisno proizvedene riječi, modeli uključujući riječi ohrabruju riječi koje se pojavljuju u sličnim kontekstima koji se nalaze blizu jedni druge u uključujućem prostoru. Osim toga, koristimo mehanizam pažnje kako bi se naglasili na nevažne riječi tijekom obuke, i dalje poboljšali usklađenost aspekta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka o stvarnom životu pokazuju da naš pristup otkriva smisleniji i usklađeniji aspekti i značajno iznosi početne metode na nekoliko procjenskih zadataka.', 'nl': 'Aspect extractie is een belangrijke en uitdagende taak in aspect-based sentiment analyse. Bestaande werken hebben de neiging om varianten van topic modellen op deze taak toe te passen. Hoewel deze methoden vrij succesvol zijn, produceren ze meestal geen zeer coherente aspecten. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe neurale benadering met als doel coherente aspecten te ontdekken. Het model verbetert de samenhang door gebruik te maken van de verdeling van woordco-incidenten door gebruik te maken van neurale woord embeddings. In tegenstelling tot topic modellen die meestal onafhankelijk gegenereerde woorden aannemen, moedigen woord inbeddingsmodellen woorden die in vergelijkbare contexten voorkomen aan dicht bij elkaar te staan in de inbeddingsruimte. Daarnaast gebruiken we een aandachtsmechanisme om irrelevante woorden tijdens de training de nadruk te leggen, waardoor de samenhang van aspecten verder wordt verbeterd. Experimentele resultaten op real-life datasets tonen aan dat onze aanpak meer betekenisvolle en coherente aspecten ontdekt, en aanzienlijk beter presteert dan baseline methodes bij verschillende evaluatietaken.', 'de': 'Aspektextraktion ist eine wichtige und herausfordernde Aufgabe in der aspektbasierten Stimmungsanalyse. Bestehende Arbeiten neigen dazu, Varianten von Themenmodellen auf diese Aufgabe anzuwenden. Obwohl diese Methoden recht erfolgreich sind, produzieren sie in der Regel keine sehr kohärenten Aspekte. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen neuartigen neuronalen Ansatz vor, mit dem Ziel kohärente Aspekte zu entdecken. Das Modell verbessert die Kohärenz, indem es die Verteilung von Wort-Co-Vorkommen durch die Verwendung von neuronalen Wort-Einbettungen ausnutzt. Im Gegensatz zu Themenmodellen, die typischerweise unabhängig generierte Wörter annehmen, ermutigen Worteinbettungsmodelle Wörter, die in ähnlichen Kontexten erscheinen, nahe beieinander im Einbettungsraum zu liegen. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir einen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um irrelevante Wörter während des Trainings zu entbetonen und die Kohärenz der Aspekte weiter zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz aussagekräftigere und kohärentere Aspekte entdeckt und die Basismethoden bei mehreren Evaluierungsaufgaben deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi aspek adalah tugas penting dan menantang dalam analisis sentimen berbasis aspek. Existing works tend to apply variants of topic models on this task.  Meskipun cukup sukses, metode ini biasanya tidak menghasilkan aspek yang sangat konsisten. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan saraf yang baru dengan tujuan untuk menemukan aspek yang konsisten. Model ini meningkatkan konsistensi dengan mengeksploitasi distribusi kata-kata co-occurrences melalui penggunaan penyambungan kata-kata saraf. Tidak seperti model topik yang biasanya menganggap kata-kata yang dibuat secara independen, model penyembedding kata mendorong kata-kata yang muncul dalam konteks yang sama untuk ditempatkan dekat satu sama lain dalam ruang penyembedding. Selain itu, kami menggunakan mekanisme perhatian untuk menekankan kata-kata yang tidak relevan selama latihan, meningkatkan lebih lanjut koherensi aspek. Hasil eksperimen pada set data kehidupan nyata menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita menemukan aspek yang lebih berarti dan konsisten, dan secara konsisten melebihi metode dasar pada beberapa tugas evaluasi.', 'ko': '방면의 감정 분석을 바탕으로 방면 추출은 중요하고 도전적인 임무이다.기존의 연구는 이 임무에서 서로 다른 주제 모델을 응용하는 경향이 있다.비록 이런 방법들은 상당히 성공적이지만, 통상적으로 고도의 일치 방면은 생기지 않는다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 신경 방법을 제시했는데 그 목적은 일관된 방면을 발견하는 것이다.이 모델은 신경 단어를 삽입하여 단어의 공통된 분포를 이용하여 일관성을 높인다.일반적으로 단어를 독립적으로 생성하는 주제 모델을 가정하는 것과 달리 단어 삽입 모델은 비슷한 상하문에 나타난 단어가 삽입 공간에서 서로 가까워지도록 장려한다.그 밖에 우리는 훈련 과정에서 주의 메커니즘을 이용하여 무관한 단어를 강조하여 방면의 일관성을 한층 높였다.실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 더욱 의미와 일관성을 가진 측면을 발견했고 여러 평가 임무에서 기선 방법보다 현저히 우수했다.', 'sw': 'Uteuzi wa mtazamo ni kazi muhimu na yenye changamoto katika uchambuzi wa hisia kwa mtazamo. Kazi zilizopo zinatumia mabadiliko ya mifano ya mada katika kazi hii. Wakati mafanikio makubwa, mbinu hizi mara nyingi hazitolei mambo yenye ushirikiano mkubwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu za kitaifa za kisasa kwa lengo la kugundua masuala ya pamoja. Mfano huu unaboresha mshikamano kwa kutumia usambazaji wa neno linalotokea kwa kutumia matumizi ya neno la neura. Tofauti na mifano ya mada ambayo kwa kawaida hudhani maneno yaliyotengenezwa huru, maneno yanayoingia yanahamasisha maneno yanayoonekana katika mikakati kama hiyo ili kuwepo karibu na moja kwa moja katika anga la kuingia. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatumia mfumo wa kutangaza maneno yasiyo na msingi wakati wa mafunzo, kuboresha muungano wa mambo. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye taarifa za maisha halisi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inagundua mambo mengi zaidi na yenye ushirikiano, na kwa kweli hufanya mbinu za msingi katika kazi kadhaa za uchunguzi.', 'tr': 'Açmak aspekt çykmak aspektlerde duýgular analyzasynda möhüm we çözümli zadyr. Öň bar işleri bu zada meýdança nusgalaryň üýtgetmegine meňzeýär. Adatça üstünlikli bolsa bu yöntemler adatça ylalaşykly aspektler bolmaýar. Bu kagyzda, kohereket aspektlerini a çmak amalymyzda bir nural ýazşyny görkeýäris. Model näyral söz gabdalyklary ulanarak ylalaşyklygyny gowaşýar Täze modelleriň birnäçe özi janlaşdyrylýan sözleri ýaly, sözleri ekleýän modlerde birnäçe ýakyn sözleri baglaşdyrýar. Mundan soňra, okuwçy wagtlary nähili sözleri ukyp almak üçin üns meýdançasyny ulanýarys, aspektlaryň ýerleşigini gowylaşdyrmak üçin. Gerçek-durmuş veri setirlerinde örän netijeleri biziň ýaryşymyzyň has möhüm we ýerleşýän aspektlerini tapýandygyny kanıtlaýar we birnäçe değerlendirme zadynda baseli ýoly çözýär.', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i aspekteve është një detyrë e rëndësishme dhe sfiduese në analizën e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte. Punët ekzistuese tenderojnë të aplikojnë variante të modeleve tematike në këtë detyrë. Ndërsa mjaft të suksesshme, këto metoda zakonisht nuk prodhojnë aspekte shumë koherente. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë të re nervore me qëllim zbulimin e aspekteve koherente. Modeli përmirëson koherencën duke shfrytëzuar shpërndarjen e bashkëndodhjeve të fjalëve nëpërmjet përdorimit të përfshirjeve nervore të fjalëve. Ndryshe nga modelet tematike që zakonisht supozojnë fjalë të gjeneruara në mënyrë të pavarur, modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve inkurajojnë fjalë që shfaqen në kontekste të ngjashme që të gjenden pranë njëri-tjetrit në hapësirën e përfshirjes. In addition, we use an attention mechanism to de-emphasize irrelevant words during training, further improving the coherence of aspects.  Experimental results on real-life datasets demonstrate that our approach discovers more meaningful and coherent aspects, and substantially outperforms baseline methods on several evaluation tasks.', 'bg': 'Извличането на аспекти е важна и предизвикателна задача в анализ на сентимента въз основа на аспекти. Съществуващите произведения са склонни да прилагат варианти на тематични модели върху тази задача. Макар и доста успешни, тези методи обикновено не произвеждат силно съгласувани аспекти. В настоящата статия представяме нов невронен подход с цел откриване на съгласувани аспекти. Моделът подобрява съгласуваността чрез използване на разпределението на думичните съвпадения чрез използване на невронни словесни вграждания. За разлика от тематичните модели, които обикновено приемат самостоятелно генерирани думи, моделите за вграждане на думи насърчават думите, които се появяват в подобни контексти, да се намират близо една до друга в пространството за вграждане. Освен това използваме механизъм за внимание, за да деподчертаем незначимите думи по време на обучението, като допълнително подобряваме съгласуваността на аспектите. Експерименталните резултати на набори от данни от реалния живот показват, че нашият подход открива по-смислени и съгласувани аспекти и значително превъзхожда базовите методи при няколко задачи за оценка.', 'af': "Aspek uittrekking is 'n belangrike en pragtige taak in aspektgebaseerde sentimentanalisie. Bestaande werke tendeer na aanwend variante van onderwerp modele op hierdie taak. Alhoewel regtig suksesvol, hierdie metodes het gewoonlik nie baie koerende aspekte produseer nie. In hierdie papier is ons 'n nuwe neurale toegang voorsien met die doel om koherente aspekte te ontdek. Die model verbeter koherens deur die verspreiding van woord-voorkoms te gebruik deur die gebruik van neurale woord inbêding. Ongelyks van onderwerp modele wat tipies onvolledig genereerde woorde aanvaar, word inbêerde modele bevestig woorde wat in gelyke kontekste verskyn moet word naby mekaar in die inbêerde spasie. In addition, we use an attention mechanism to de-emphasize irrelevant words during training, further improving the coherence of aspects. Eksperimentale resultate op reël-lewe datastelle bevestig dat ons toegang meer betekenlike en koherende aspekte ontdek, en betekenlik uitvoer baselyn metodes op verskeie evalueringstaak.", 'hy': 'Սպեկտի վերացումը կարևոր և դժվար խնդիր է ասպեկտի հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության մեջ: Գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքները հակված են կիրառել թեմային մոդելների տարբերակները այս խնդրի վրա: Մինչդեռ բավականին հաջողակ է, այս մեթոդները սովորաբար չեն ստեղծում շատ համապատասխան ասպեկտներ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր նյարդային մոտեցում, որպեսզի բացահայտենք համապատասխան ասպեկտներ: The model improves coherence by exploiting the distribution of word co-occurrences through the use of neural word embeddings.  Ի տարբերություն թեմային մոդելներին, որոնք սովորաբար ենթադրում են անկախ ստեղծված բառեր, բառերի ներառման մոդելները խրախուսում են բառեր, որոնք հայտնվում են նման կոնտեքստներում, գտնվում միմյանց մոտ ներառման տարածքում: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի վերականգնենք անկարևոր բառերը ուսուցման ընթացքում, շարունակելով բարելավելով ասպեկտների համապատասխանությունը: Իրական կյանքի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը բացահայտում է ավելի իմաստալից և համապատասխան ասպեկտներ, և հիմնականում գերազանցում է հիմնական մեթոդները մի քանի գնահատման խնդիրների համար', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ। বর্তমান কাজ এই কাজে বিষয়বস্তু মডেলের ভেরিয়েন্ট প্রয়োগ করে। যতদিন সফল হলেও এই পদ্ধতিগুলো সাধারণত খুব সাধারণত প্রাপ্ত কিছু তৈরি করে না। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নিউরেল প্রতিক্রিয়া উপস্থাপন করি যার উদ্দেশ্যে একত্রিত বিষয় আবিষ্কার করা। নিউরেল শব্দ ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে শব্দের সংঘর্ষের বিতরণ ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে মোডেলের সাথে একাত্মতা উন্নত করে। বিষয়বস্তু মডেলের মধ্যে যা সাধারণত স্বাধীনভাবে সৃষ্টি করা হয়েছে, শব্দ বিভিন্ন মডেল উৎসাহিত করে যা একই রকম প্রতিযোগিতায় দেখা যাচ্ছে যে  In addition, we use an attention mechanism to de-emphasize irrelevant words during training, further improving the coherence of aspects.  বাস্তব জীবনের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বেশী অর্থহীন এবং সম্পূর্ণ প্রতিক্রিয়া আবিষ্কার করে এবং বেশ কয়েকটি মূ', 'fa': 'اخراج نقطه یک کار مهم و سخت\u200cگیری در تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نقطه است. کارهای موجود در این وظیفه متغیر مدل\u200cهای موضوع را اجرا می\u200cکنند. در حالی که کاملا موفق باشد، این روش\u200cها معمولاً نسبت به اندازه\u200cهای بسیار هماهنگی نمی\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش عصبی نو را با هدف کشف نقطه\u200cهای هماهنگ پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این مدل با استفاده از تقسیم اتفاقات کلمات با استفاده از استفاده از کلمات عصبی بیشتر می\u200cشود. برخلاف مدلهای موضوع که معمولاً کلمات تولید شده را به طور مستقل قبول می کنند، مدلهای تولید کردن کلمات را تشویق می کنند که در موضوع مشابه به همدیگر نزدیک باشند در فضای تولید می کنند. به علاوه، ما از یک مکانیسم توجه استفاده می کنیم تا کلمات بی اهمیت را در طول تمرین تأثیر دهیم، و بیشتر تأثیر تعلق منابع را بهتر کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای واقعی زندگی را نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما نقطه\u200cهای معنی\u200cتر و هماهنگ\u200cتر را کشف می\u200cکند، و زیادی روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط روی چندین وظیفه\u200cای ارزیابی را بیشتر انجام می\u200c', 'am': 'የመስመር ውጤት የባሕላዊ እና የመቃወሚያ ስራ ነው፡፡ ቦታ በትክክል በተከናወን ጊዜ፣ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች በተመሳሳይ የበለጠ ጉዳይ አያደርጉም፡፡ በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ የጠቅላላ አካባቢ ጉዳይ ለመግለጥ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የናቡር ቃላት በጠቅላላ ቃላት በመጠቀም የቃላትን አካባቢ መግለጫ በመጠቀም የሞዴል ግንኙነት ያሳድጋል፡፡ በተለየ የውይይት ዓይነቶች በተለየ ቃላት በአጠቃላይ የተፈጠሩ ቃላት፣ የቃላት አካባቢ ሞዴል በተለያዩ ቃላት በአካባቢው ቦታ ውስጥ እርስ በርሳቸው የሚቆጠሩ ቃላትን ያሞክራሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የጥያቄ ቃላትን በማስማማት እናስቀምጣለን፣ የጉዳዩን ግንኙነት እናሳድጋለን፡፡ Experimental results on real-life datasets demonstrate that our approach discovers more meaningful and coherent aspects, and substantially outperforms baseline methods on several evaluation tasks.', 'az': 'Aspect extraction - aspect-based sentiment analizi üçün vacib və çətin bir iş. Bütün işlər bu işdə məsələn modellərin variablarını uygular. Bu metodlar çox müvəffəqiyyətli olaraq çox müxtəlif aspektlər yaratmaz. Bu kağızda, biz yeni nöral yaxınlıq göstəririk ki, birləşdirilmiş aspektləri keşf etmək niyyətində. Model nöral sözlərin istifadəsi ilə sözlərin birlikdə dağıtılışını istifadə edərək birlikdə müəyyən edir. Məsələn modellərə bənzər məsələlərdə bənzər məsələlərdə bənzər məsələlər içində bir-birinə yaxın olduğu sözlərə bənzər məsələlərdə görünən sözləri təşkil edir. Əvvəlcə, təhsil sırasında möhtac deyilən sözləri tədricləmək üçün gözləmə mehanizmisini istifadə edirik, aspektlərin müvafiqliyini daha da yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. Gerçek həyat verilənlərin təcrübələrində təcrübə sonuçları bizim təcrübəmizin daha anlamlı və daha coherentli aspektlərini keşfettiyini göstərər və çox çətin metodlarını çox çəkir.', 'cs': 'Extrakce aspektů je důležitým a náročným úkolem v aspektové analýze sentimentů. Stávající práce mají tendenci aplikovat varianty tématických modelů na tento úkol. I když jsou tyto metody poměrně úspěšné, obvykle nevytvářejí vysoce soudržné aspekty. V tomto článku představujeme nový neuronový přístup s cílem objevit koherentní aspekty. Model zlepšuje koherenci tím, že využívá distribuce společných výskytů slov pomocí vložení neuronových slov. Na rozdíl od tématických modelů, které obvykle předpokládají nezávisle generovaná slova, modely vkládání slov podporují, aby slova, která se objevují v podobných kontextech, byla umístěna blízko sebe v vloženém prostoru. Kromě toho používáme mechanismus pozornosti k oddůraznění irelevantních slov během tréninku, což dále zlepšuje soudržnost aspektů. Experimentální výsledky na reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš přístup objevuje smysluplnější a soudržnější aspekty a podstatně překonává základní metody u několika hodnotících úkolů.', 'ca': "L'extracció de aspectes és una tasca important i desafiadora en l'an àlisi del sentiment basat en aspectes. Els treballs existents tendeixen a aplicar variants de models temàtics en aquesta tasca. Tot i que tenen èxit, aquests mètodes normalment no produeixen aspectes molt coherents. En aquest paper, presentem un nou enfocament neuronal amb l'objectiu de descobrir aspectes coherents. El model millora la coherencia explotant la distribució de les coincidències de paraules mitjançant l'ús d'incorporacions neuronals de paraules. A diferència dels models temàtics que normalment suposen paraules generades de manera independent, els models d'incorporació de paraules estimulan que les paraules que apareixen en contextes similars es troben a prop dels altres a l'espai d'incorporació. A més, utilitzem un mecanisme d'atenció per desenfatizar paraules irrelevants durant l'entrenament, millorant més la coherencia dels aspectes. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades de vida real demostren que el nostre enfocament descobre aspectes més significatius i coherents i supera substancialment els mètodes de base en diverses tasques d'evaluació.", 'fi': 'Aspektin poimiminen on tärkeä ja haastava tehtävä aspektipohjaisessa tunteiden analyysissä. Olemassa olevissa teoksissa on taipumus soveltaa teemamallien muunnelmia tähän tehtävään. Vaikka nämä menetelmät ovat melko menestyksekkäitä, ne eivät yleensä tuota kovin johdonmukaisia näkökohtia. Tässä työssä esittelemme uudenlaista neurolähestymistapaa, jonka tavoitteena on löytää johdonmukaisia näkökohtia. Malli parantaa koherenssia hyödyntämällä sanayhtymien jakautumista neurosanaupotusten avulla. Toisin kuin aihemallit, joissa tavallisesti oletetaan itsenäisesti luotuja sanoja, sanojen upotusmallit kannustavat samankaltaisissa yhteyksissä esiintyviä sanoja sijoittamaan toisiinsa upotustilassa. Lisäksi käytämme huomiomekanismia epäolennaisten sanojen korostamiseen koulutuksen aikana, mikä parantaa näkökohtien johdonmukaisuutta entisestään. Kokeelliset tulokset tosielämän aineistoista osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme löytää merkityksellisempiä ja johdonmukaisempia näkökohtia ja että se ylittää merkittävästi perusmenetelmät useissa arviointitehtävissä.', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija aspekta je važan i izazovan zadatak u analizi osjećaja na aspektu. Postoje radovi često primjenjuju variante temnih modela na ovom zadatku. Iako su prilično uspješni, te metode obično ne proizvode vrlo saslušane aspekte. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi neuralni pristup ciljem otkrivanja sasluženih aspekta. Model poboljšava konsekvenciju iskorištavanjem distribucije saradnje riječi kroz korištenje neuralnih riječi. Za razliku od modela teme koji obično preuzimaju nezavisno proizvedene riječi, modeli uključenih riječi ohrabruju riječi koje se pojavljuju u sličnim kontekstima koji se nalaze blizu jedno drugog u uključenom prostoru. Osim toga, koristimo mehanizam pažnje da se oslanjamo na nevažne riječi tijekom treninga, i dalje poboljšamo usklađenost aspekta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka o stvarnom životu pokazuju da naš pristup otkriva smisleniji i sasluženiji aspekti, i značajno iznosi početne metode na nekoliko procjenskih zadataka.', 'et': 'Aspekti ekstraheerimine on oluline ja keeruline ülesanne aspektipõhises sentimentaalüüsis. Olemasolevad tööd kipuvad sellele ülesandele rakendama teemamudelite variante. Kuigi need meetodid on üsna edukad, ei too need tavaliselt väga sidusaid aspekte. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset närvilähenemisviisi eesmärgiga avastada sidusaid aspekte. Mudel parandab sidusust, kasutades ära sõnade koosesinemissageduste levikut neurosõnade manustamise kaudu. Erinevalt teemamudelitest, mis tavaliselt eeldavad iseseisvalt genereeritud sõnu, julgustavad sõnade manustamise mudelid sarnastes kontekstides ilmuvaid sõnu asuma manustamisruumis üksteise lähedal. Lisaks kasutame tähelepanumehhanismi ebaoluliste sõnade rõhutamiseks koolituse ajal, parandades aspektide sidusust veelgi. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused reaalsete andmekogumite kohta näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis avastab tähenduslikumaid ja sidusamaid aspekte ning saavutab oluliselt üle algmeetodite mitmete hindamisülesannete.', 'jv': 'Language structural navigation Sing luwih apik, sira lak ngomong nik pakan bener-pakan seneng kesempatan. Nanging mapun iki, kita sadhaya dadi pawaran kuwi nggolang kuwi nggawe jenis-jenis kuwi nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan. model politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno pergambar kanggo nguasai pawaran sing ora nggawe gerakan, nglanggar nggawe gerakan kanggo nggalakno iki luwih apik. R', 'ha': "Extractin Anani yana da wani aikin muhimu da mai gaugawa a cikin anarwa na baka-baka. Yi amfani da aikin da ke gaba, yana amfani da wasu masu shiryuwa na madaidaita kan wannan aikin. A lokacin da hakki masu cin nasara, waɗannan hanyõyin ko da kawaici ba su sami daɓan da bakwai. Ga wannan takardan, Munã zo da wata matsayi na takarda da za'a gane masu bakwai. @ info: whatsthis @ label: listbox Da wannan, za mu yi amfani da wani aikin muhimmanci zuwa-emphasis ga maganar da ba'a yi na taƙaita a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma za mu ƙara kodi da masu sakan. Matarin jarrabai a kan data masu halin rãyuwa na gaske sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana gane masu da muhimmi da masu haɗi, kuma yana samar hanyoyin baƙaƙƙe a kan wasu aikin evaluation.", 'sk': 'Pridobivanje vidikov je pomembna in zahtevna naloga pri analizi vidikov sentimenta. Obstoječa dela običajno uporabljajo različice tematskih modelov za to nalogo. Čeprav so te metode dokaj uspešne, običajno ne prinašajo zelo skladnih vidikov. V prispevku predstavljamo nov nevronski pristop s ciljem odkrivanja koherentnih vidikov. Model izboljšuje koherenco z izkoriščanjem porazdelitve sočasnih besed z uporabo nevronskih besednih vdelav. Za razliko od tematskih modelov, ki običajno predvidevajo neodvisno ustvarjene besede, modeli za vdelavo besed spodbujajo besede, ki se pojavijo v podobnih kontekstih, da se v prostoru za vdelavo nahajajo med seboj. Poleg tega uporabljamo mehanizem pozornosti za odpravo poudarka nepomembnih besed med usposabljanjem in nadaljnje izboljšanje skladnosti vidikov. Poskusni rezultati na zbirkah podatkov v realnem življenju kažejo, da naš pristop odkriva smiselnejše in skladnejše vidike ter bistveno presega osnovne metode pri več nalogah ocenjevanja.', 'he': 'החילוץ האינטרנט הוא משימה חשובה ומתאימה בניתוח רגשות מבוסס באינטרנט. עבודות קיימות נוטות להפעיל שונות של דוגמנים נושאיים על המשימה הזאת. למרות שהשיטות האלה מצליחות למדי, בדרך כלל לא יוצרים היבטים הקשורים ביותר. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים גישה עצבית חדשה במטרה לגלות היבטים הקשורים. הדוגמא משפר את התקבילות על ידי ניצלון ההפצה של התרחשות מילים משותפות באמצעות השימוש במילים עצביות. בניגוד לדוגמנים הנושאים שמניחים בדרך כלל מילים יוצרות באופן עצמאי, דוגמנים להכניסת מילים מעודדים מילים שמופיעות בקשר דומה להתמקד קרוב אחד לשני בחלל ההכניסה. בנוסף, אנו משתמשים במנגנון תשומת לב כדי להפסיק להדגיש מילים לא רלוונטיות במהלך האימונים, לשפר עוד את הקשורות של היבטים. תוצאות ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים של חיים אמיתיים מראות שהגישה שלנו מגלה היבטים משמעותיים יותר ויותרים יותר, ויוציא יותר משמעותיות שיטות בסיסיות על מספר משימות הערכה.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚུལ་ཕྱིར་བཤེར་ནི་གལ་ཆེན་དང་གནད་དོན་ཁག་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐོར་བློ་གཏོང་རེད། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱོད་པ་ནི་གནད་དོན་དཔེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ ཆེས་ཉིད་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱུང་མེད་པར། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཉུང་བ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད་ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་གཞུང་གི་ཐོག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཚིག་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད། Unlike topic models which typically assume independently generated words, word embedding models encourage words that appear in similar contexts to be located close to each other in the embedding space. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གླེང་སྡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱད་ནས། ངའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསལ་བཤད་དང་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད'}
{'en': 'Other Topics You May Also Agree or Disagree : Modeling Inter-Topic Preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization', 'ar': 'مواضيع أخرى قد توافق عليها أو لا توافق عليها أيضًا: نمذجة التفضيلات بين المواضيع باستخدام التغريدات وعوامل المصفوفة', 'es': 'Otros temas en los que también puede estar de acuerdo o en desacuerdo: Modelado de preferencias intertemáticas mediante tuits y factorización', 'pt': 'Outros tópicos que você também pode concordar ou discordar: modelagem de preferências entre tópicos usando tweets e fatoração de matriz', 'fr': "Autres sujets que vous pouvez également être d'accord ou non\xa0: Modélisation des préférences inter-sujets à l'aide de Tweets et de la factorisation", 'hi': 'अन्य विषय आप भी सहमत या असहमत हो सकते हैं: ट्वीट्स और मैट्रिक्स फैक्टराइजेशन का उपयोग करके इंटर-टॉपिक वरीयताओं को मॉडलिंग करना', 'ja': '同意または反対の可能性のあるその他のトピック：ツイートとマトリックス係数化を使用したトピック間の好みのモデリング', 'zh': '或从之,用推文与矩阵分间首选项建模之', 'ru': 'Другие темы, с которыми вы также можете согласиться или не согласиться: моделирование межтематических предпочтений с использованием твитов и матричной факторизации', 'ga': 'Ábhair Eile Is Féidir Leat a Aontú nó Easaontú Chomh maith leis sin: Sainroghanna Idir-Ábhair a Shamhaltú ag úsáid Tweets agus Fachtóiriú Maitrís', 'el': 'Άλλα θέματα Μπορεί επίσης να συμφωνήσετε ή να διαφωνείτε: μοντελοποίηση των προτιμήσεων μεταξύ θεμάτων χρησιμοποιώντας Τουίτ και παράγοντα μήτρας', 'hu': 'További témák Ön is egyetérthet vagy nem érthet egyet: Témaközi beállítások modellezése tweetek és mátrixfaktorozás használatával', 'ka': 'სხვა საზოგადოება შეგიძლიათ ასევე მიღებთ ან განსხვავება: მოდელირება საზოგადომის პარამეტრების გამოყენება Tweets და Matrix ფაქტორიზაცია', 'kk': 'Басқа тақырыптарды сондай-ақ келмеуге болады: Tweets мен Matrix факторизациясын қолдану үшін нақыштың интерфейсінің баптаулары', 'it': "Potresti anche essere d'accordo o di disaccordo: modellare le preferenze inter-topic utilizzando Tweet e Fattorizzazione Matrix", 'mk': 'Other Topics You May Also Agree or Disagree: Modeling Inter-Topic Preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization', 'lt': 'Kitos temos taip pat gali sutikti arba nesutikti: tarpteminių preferencijų modeliavimas naudojant Tweets ir Matrix faktorizaciją', 'ms': 'Topik Lain-lain Anda juga boleh setuju atau tidak setuju: Memodelkan Keutamaan Antara-Topik menggunakan Pemfaktorisasi Tweets dan Matriks', 'ml': 'മറ്റുള്ള വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും സമ്മതിക്കുകയോ അംഗീകരിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Temi Oħrajn Tista’ wkoll taqbel jew ma taqbilx: Mudellar tal-Preferenzi Intertematiċi bl-użu ta’ Tweets u Fattorizzazzjoni tal-Matrix', 'mn': 'Өөр сэдвүүд Мөн зөвшөөрөх эсвэл зөвшөөрөх боломжтой: Tweets болон Matrix Factorization ашиглах интерфейс-сэдвийн тохиолдол', 'no': 'Andre emne Du kan òg godta eller ikkje samsvara: Modeleringsinnstillingar for mellomtema ved å bruka Tweets og Matrix-faktorisering', 'pl': 'Inne tematy Możesz się również zgadzać lub nie zgadzać: Modelowanie preferencji między tematami za pomocą tweetów i faktoryzacji macierzy', 'ro': 'Alte subiecte Puteți, de asemenea, să fiți de acord sau să nu fiți de acord: Modelarea preferințelor inter-subiecte utilizând Tweeturi și factorizarea matricei', 'sr': 'Druge teme možete takođe pristati ili neshvatiti: Modeliranje međutemnih preferencija koristeći Tweets i Matrix Factorization', 'si': 'වෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඔබ සමහරවෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ නැත්නම්: විශ්වාසය සහ මැට්\u200dරික්ස් විශ්වාසය භාවිත වි', 'so': 'Madaxaha kale ee aad ka heshiin kartid ama ka heshiin kartid: Modeling Inter-subject preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization', 'ur': 'اور دوسری موضوع آپ بھی قبول کرسکتے ہیں یا ناقبول کرسکتے ہیں: ٹویٹ اور ماٹریکس فکتوریزی کے استعمال سے انٹر-ٹیپٹیکس غورائش مدل کرنا', 'ta': 'மற்ற தலைப்பு', 'sv': 'Andra ämnen Du kanske också håller med eller inte håller med: Modellera inställningar mellan ämnen med hjälp av tweets och matrisfaktorisering', 'uz': 'Boshqa mavzular@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Các chủ đề khác Bạn cũng có thể chấp nhận hoặc không chấp nhận: Ưu tiên nội tiết kiểu cách dùng Tweet và Nhà máy tính ma trận', 'nl': 'Andere onderwerpen Je kunt het ook eens zijn of het niet eens zijn: Modelen van inter-topic voorkeuren met behulp van Tweets en Matrix Factorization', 'bg': 'Други теми, които също може да сте съгласни или да не сте съгласни: Моделиране на интертематичните предпочитания с помощта на туитове и матрична факторизация', 'hr': 'Druge teme možete također pristati ili neshvatiti: modeliranje međutemnih preferencija koristeći Tweets i Matrix Factorization', 'da': 'Andre emner Du kan også være enig eller uenig: Modellering af indstillinger mellem emner ved hjælp af tweets og Matrix Factorisering', 'id': 'Other Topics You May Also Agree or Disagree: Modeling Inter-Topic Preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization', 'de': 'Andere Themen, denen Sie auch zustimmen oder widersprechen können: Modellierung von themenübergreifenden Präferenzen mithilfe von Tweets und Matrixfaktorisierung', 'ko': '귀하도 동의하거나 동의하지 않을 수 있는 다른 테마: 트위터와 행렬을 사용하여 모델링 테마 간의 선호도를 분해합니다', 'fa': 'موضوع دیگری که می\u200cتوانید همچنین موضوع موافقت یا ناموافقت کنید: ترجیح\u200cهای بین\u200cعنوان با استفاده از Tweets و Matrix Factorization', 'sw': 'Mada mengine Unaweza Pia kukubaliana au kukubaliana: Utoaji Uchaguzi wa Maudhui ya Kimataifa kwa kutumia Twita na Matrix Factorization', 'af': 'Ander onderwerpe Jy kan ook ooreenstem of ongeregtig: Modelering Inter-onderwerp voorkeure gebruik Tweets en Matrix Faktorisasie', 'am': 'ሌሎች ጉዳዮች ደግሞ ትቀበሉ ወይም ትክክል ማድረግ ይቻላል: የጦማር ጉዳይ ምርጫዎች በTweets and Matrix Factorization', 'tr': 'Başka Temalar Ayrıca onaylaşabilirsiniz veya onaylaşabilirsiniz: Tweets ve Matrix Fabrikaları kullanarak örneklendirilen Inter-Toplar Seçenekleri', 'sq': 'Tema të tjera që mund të pranoni ose të mos jeni dakord: Modelimi i Preferimeve Intertematike duke përdorur Tweets dhe Matrix Factorization', 'bs': 'Druge teme možete također pristati ili neshvatiti: Modeliranje međutemnih preferencija koristeći Tweets i Matrix Factorization', 'hy': 'Մյուս թեմաներ, որոնք նույնպես կարող եք համաձայնվել կամ չեք համաձայնվել: Մոդելավորել միջթեմային նախընտրությունները օգտագործելով թվիթեր և մատրիքսի ֆակտորիզացիա', 'ca': 'Other Topics You May Also Agree or Disagree: Modeling Inter-Topic Preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization', 'bn': 'অন্যান্য বিষয়গুলো তুমি একমত অথবা একমত: টুইট এবং ম্যাট্রিক্স ফ্যাক্টরিশন ব্যবহার করে মডেলিং ইন্টারনেট বিষয়ের পছন্দ', 'cs': 'Můžete také souhlasit nebo nesouhlasit: Modelování mezitématických preferencí pomocí tweetů a maticové faktorizace', 'fi': 'Muut aiheet, joista saatat myös olla samaa mieltä tai olla eri mieltä: Aiheiden välisten asetusten mallintaminen tweeteillä ja matriisifaktorisoinnilla', 'az': 'Başqa məsələlər Tövtlər və Matrix Faktorisiyası ilə İşləndirilən və İşləndirilən Məsələn Qurğuları', 'et': 'Muud teemad, millega võite samuti nõustuda või mitte nõustuda: teemadevaheliste eelistuste modelleerimine tweetide ja maatriksi faktoriseerimise abil', 'sk': 'Druge teme, s katerimi se lahko strinjate ali se ne strinjate: Modeliranje nastavitev med temi z uporabo tweetov in matrične faktorizacije', 'he': 'נושאים אחרים אפשר גם להסכים או לא להסכים: מודל עדיפות בין נושאים באמצעות טוויטים ופקטריזציה של מטריקס', 'ha': '@ action: button', 'jv': 'Tema Anyar', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་དང་མི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་བཟོ་ཐུབ། Modeling Inter-Topic Preferences using Tweets and Matrix Factorization'}
{'en': 'We presents in this paper our approach for modeling inter-topic preferences of Twitter users : for example, those who agree with the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) also agree with free trade. This kind of knowledge is useful not only for stance detection across multiple topics but also for various real-world applications including public opinion survey, electoral prediction, electoral campaigns, and online debates. In order to extract users’ preferences on Twitter, we design linguistic patterns in which people agree and disagree about specific topics (e.g., A is completely wrong). By applying these linguistic patterns to a collection of tweets, we extract statements agreeing and disagreeing with various topics. Inspired by previous work on item recommendation, we formalize the task of modeling inter-topic preferences as matrix factorization : representing users’ preference as a user-topic matrix and mapping both users and topics onto a latent feature space that abstracts the preferences. Our experimental results demonstrate both that our presented approach is useful in predicting missing preferences of users and that the latent vector representations of topics successfully encode inter-topic preferences.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذه الورقة نهجنا لنمذجة التفضيلات بين الموضوعات لمستخدمي تويتر: على سبيل المثال ، "أولئك الذين يتفقون مع الشراكة عبر المحيط الهادئ (TPP) يوافقون أيضًا على التجارة الحرة". هذا النوع من المعرفة مفيد ليس فقط لاكتشاف الموقف عبر مواضيع متعددة ولكن أيضًا للعديد من التطبيقات الواقعية بما في ذلك استطلاع الرأي العام والتنبؤ بالانتخابات والحملات الانتخابية والمناقشات عبر الإنترنت. من أجل استخلاص تفضيلات المستخدمين على تويتر ، نصمم أنماطًا لغوية يتفق فيها الناس ويختلفون حول موضوعات محددة (على سبيل المثال ، "أ خاطئ تمامًا"). من خلال تطبيق هذه الأنماط اللغوية على مجموعة من التغريدات ، فإننا نستخرج عبارات تتفق وتتعارض مع مواضيع مختلفة. مستوحى من العمل السابق على توصية العنصر ، قمنا بإضفاء الطابع الرسمي على مهمة نمذجة التفضيلات بين الموضوعات كعامل مصفوفة: تمثيل تفضيلات المستخدمين كمصفوفة موضوع المستخدم وتعيين كل من المستخدمين والموضوعات على مساحة ميزة كامنة تلخص التفضيلات. توضح نتائجنا التجريبية أن نهجنا المقدم مفيد في توقع التفضيلات المفقودة للمستخدمين وأن تمثيلات المتجه الكامنة للموضوعات تعمل على ترميز التفضيلات بين الموضوعات بنجاح.', 'es': 'Presentamos en este artículo nuestro enfoque para modelar las preferencias intertemáticas de los usuarios de Twitter: por ejemplo, «aquellos que están de acuerdo con el Acuerdo Transpacífico (TPP) también están de acuerdo con el libre comercio». Este tipo de conocimiento es útil no solo para la detección de posturas en múltiples temas, sino también para diversas aplicaciones del mundo real, como encuestas de opinión pública, predicción electoral, campañas electorales y debates en línea. Para extraer las preferencias de los usuarios en Twitter, diseñamos patrones lingüísticos en los que las personas están de acuerdo y en desacuerdo sobre temas específicos (por ejemplo, «A está completamente mal»). Al aplicar estos patrones lingüísticos a una colección de tuits, extraemos declaraciones en las que estamos de acuerdo y en desacuerdo con varios temas. Inspirados por el trabajo anterior sobre la recomendación de artículos, formalizamos la tarea de modelar las preferencias intertópicas como factorización matricial: representar las preferencias de los usuarios como una matriz de temas de usuario y mapear tanto a los usuarios como a los temas en un espacio de características latente que abstrae las preferencias. Nuestros resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro enfoque presentado es útil para predecir las preferencias ausentes de los usuarios y que las representaciones vectoriales latentes de los temas codifican con éxito las preferencias intertópicas.', 'fr': "Nous présentons dans cet article notre approche pour modéliser les préférences interthématiques des utilisateurs de Twitter\xa0: par exemple, «\xa0ceux qui sont d'accord avec le Partenariat transpacifique (TPP) sont également d'accord avec le libre-échange\xa0». Ce type de connaissances est utile non seulement pour la détection de positions sur de multiples sujets, mais également pour diverses applications du monde réel, notamment les sondages d'opinion publique, les prévisions électorales, les campagnes électorales et les débats en ligne. Afin d'extraire les préférences des utilisateurs sur Twitter, nous concevons des modèles linguistiques dans lesquels les personnes sont d'accord et en désaccord sur des sujets spécifiques (par exemple, «\xa0A est complètement faux\xa0»). En appliquant ces modèles linguistiques à une collection de tweets, nous extrayons des déclarations d'accord et de désaccord avec divers sujets. Inspirés par des travaux antérieurs sur la recommandation d'éléments, nous formalisons la tâche de modélisation des préférences interthématiques sous forme de factorisation matricielle\xa0: représenter les préférences des utilisateurs sous forme de matrice de sujets utilisateur et mapper les utilisateurs et les sujets sur un espace de caractéristiques latentes qui fait abstraction des préférences. Nos résultats expérimentaux démontrent à la fois que notre approche présentée est utile pour prédire les préférences manquantes des utilisateurs et que les représentations vectorielles latentes des sujets encodent avec succès les préférences interthématiques.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos neste artigo nossa abordagem para modelar as preferências intertópicos dos usuários do Twitter: por exemplo, “aqueles que concordam com a Parceria Trans-Pacífico (TPP) também concordam com o livre comércio”. Esse tipo de conhecimento é útil não apenas para detecção de postura em vários tópicos, mas também para várias aplicações do mundo real, incluindo pesquisa de opinião pública, previsão eleitoral, campanhas eleitorais e debates online. Para extrair as preferências dos usuários no Twitter, criamos padrões linguísticos nos quais as pessoas concordam e discordam sobre tópicos específicos (por exemplo, “A está completamente errado”). Ao aplicar esses padrões linguísticos a uma coleção de tweets, extraímos declarações que concordam e discordam de vários tópicos. Inspirados em trabalhos anteriores sobre recomendação de itens, formalizamos a tarefa de modelar preferências entre tópicos como fatoração de matrizes: representando a preferência dos usuários como uma matriz de tópicos de usuários e mapeando usuários e tópicos em um espaço de recursos latentes que abstrai as preferências. Nossos resultados experimentais demonstram que nossa abordagem apresentada é útil na previsão de preferências ausentes de usuários e que as representações vetoriais latentes de tópicos codificam com sucesso preferências entre tópicos.', 'ja': 'この論文では、Twitterユーザーのトピック間の嗜好をモデル化するためのアプローチを紹介しています。たとえば、「太平洋横断的パートナーシップ（ TPP ）に同意する人々は、自由貿易にも同意します」。 このような知識は、複数のトピックにまたがるスタンス検出だけでなく、世論調査、選挙予測、選挙キャンペーン、オンラインディベートなど、さまざまな現実のアプリケーションにも役立ちます。 Twitterでユーザーの好みを抽出するために、人々が特定のトピックについて同意したり反対したりする言語パターンを設計します（例：「Aは完全に間違っています」）。 これらの言語パターンを一連のツイートに適用することで、さまざまなトピックに賛成または反対する記述を抽出します。 アイテムの推奨に関する以前の作業に触発されて、私たちは、トピック間の好みをマトリックス因子分解としてモデリングするタスクを形式化します。これは、ユーザーの好みをユーザートピックマトリックスとして表し、ユーザーとトピックの両方を好みを抽象化する潜在的な特徴空間にマッピングします。 我々の実験結果は、提示されたアプローチがユーザの欠落した嗜好を予測するのに有用であり、トピックの潜在的なベクトル表現がトピック間の嗜好をうまく符号化することの両方を実証する。', 'zh': '本文引对Twitter用户跨主题偏好建模法:如"其可跨太平洋伙伴关系(TPP)者亦许自由贸易"。 非徒可以立场检测,又可以施于世界,兼民意调查选占,竞选活动与在线辨。 为Twitter上取用户偏好,设言语模样,使人特定题有一同不同(如"A全误")。 因将此语模推文用,提取从违众主题。 受前启,将主题间偏好建模为矩阵分解形式化:将用户偏好表示为用户主题矩阵,并将用户和主题映射到抽象偏好的潜在特征空间。 吾实验结果表明,吾道有用用户缺失之偏善,而题在向量成功编码跨题偏好。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе мы представляем наш подход к моделированию межтематических предпочтений пользователей Twitter: например, «те, кто согласен с Транстихоокеанским партнерством (ТТП), также согласны с свободной торговлей». Этот вид знаний полезен не только для определения позиции по нескольким темам, но и для различных реальных приложений, включая опрос общественного мнения, предсказание выборов, избирательные кампании и онлайн-дебаты. Чтобы извлечь предпочтения пользователей в Twitter, мы разрабатываем лингвистические шаблоны, в которых люди согласны и не согласны с конкретными темами (например, «А - это совершенно неправильно»). Применяя эти языковые паттерны к коллекции твитов, мы извлекаем утверждения, соглашающиеся и не соглашающиеся с различными темами. Вдохновленные предыдущей работой над рекомендацией по пункту, мы формализуем задачу моделирования межтематических предпочтений как матричной факторизации: представление предпочтений пользователей в качестве пользовательской тематической матрицы и отображение пользователей и тем в латентном функциональном пространстве, которое абстрагируется от предпочтений. Наши экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют как то, что представленный нами подход полезен в прогнозировании отсутствующих предпочтений пользователей, так и то, что скрытые векторные представления тем успешно кодируют межтематические предпочтения.', 'hi': 'हम इस पेपर में ट्विटर उपयोगकर्ताओं की अंतर-विषय वरीयताओं के मॉडलिंग के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण को प्रस्तुत करते हैं: उदाहरण के लिए, "जो लोग ट्रांस-पैसिफिक पार्टनरशिप (टीपीपी) से सहमत हैं, वे भी मुक्त व्यापार से सहमत हैं"। इस तरह का ज्ञान न केवल कई विषयों में रुख का पता लगाने के लिए उपयोगी है, बल्कि सार्वजनिक राय सर्वेक्षण, चुनावी भविष्यवाणी, चुनावी अभियानों और ऑनलाइन बहस सहित विभिन्न वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों के लिए भी उपयोगी है। ट्विटर पर उपयोगकर्ताओं की प्राथमिकताओं को निकालने के लिए, हम भाषाई पैटर्न डिजाइन करते हैं जिसमें लोग विशिष्ट विषयों के बारे में सहमत और असहमत होते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, "ए पूरी तरह से गलत है")। ट्वीट्स के संग्रह में इन भाषाई पैटर्न को लागू करके, हम विभिन्न विषयों से सहमत और असहमत बयानों को निकालते हैं। आइटम सिफारिश पर पिछले काम से प्रेरित होकर, हम मैट्रिक्स फैक्टराइजेशन के रूप में अंतर-विषय प्राथमिकताओं को मॉडलिंग करने के कार्य को औपचारिक रूप देते हैं: उपयोगकर्ता-विषय मैट्रिक्स के रूप में उपयोगकर्ताओं की वरीयता का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं और उपयोगकर्ताओं और विषयों दोनों को एक अव्यक्त सुविधा स्थान पर मैप करते हैं जो वरीयताओं को अमूर्त करता है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दोनों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तुत दृष्टिकोण उपयोगकर्ताओं की लापता प्राथमिकताओं की भविष्यवाणी करने में उपयोगी है और विषयों के अव्यक्त वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व सफलतापूर्वक अंतर-विषय वरीयताओं को एन्कोड करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair sa pháipéar seo ár gcur chuige maidir le samhaltú roghanna idir-ábhair úsáideoirí Twitter: mar shampla, “aontaíonn iad siúd a aontaíonn leis an gComhpháirtíocht Tras-Aigéan Ciúin (TPP) le saorthrádáil freisin”. Tá an cineál seo eolais úsáideach ní amháin chun seasamh a bhrath thar topaicí iolracha ach freisin le haghaidh feidhmeanna éagsúla sa saol fíor lena n-áirítear suirbhé ar thuairimí an phobail, tuar toghcháin, feachtais toghcháin, agus díospóireachtaí ar líne. Chun roghanna úsáideoirí a bhaint as Twitter, déanaimid patrúin teangeolaíochta a dhearadh ina n-aontaíonn agus nach n-aontaíonn daoine faoi thopaicí ar leith (m.sh., “tá A go hiomlán mícheart”). Trí na patrúin teanga seo a chur i bhfeidhm ar chnuasach tweets, bainimid amach ráitis a aontaíonn agus a easaontaíonn le hábhair éagsúla. Arna spreagadh ag obair roimhe seo ar mholadh míre, déanaimid an tasc de shainroghanna idir-ábhair a shamhaltú mar fhachtóiriú maitrís: rogha na n-úsáideoirí mar mhaitrís ábhar úsáideora a léiriú agus úsáideoirí agus topaicí araon a mhapáil ar spás gné folaigh a achoimríonn na roghanna. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil an cur chuige a chuirtear i láthair againn úsáideach chun roghanna úsáideoirí atá in easnamh a thuar agus go n-ionchódaíonn léirithe folaigh veicteoirí na dtopaicí roghanna idir-ábhair go rathúil.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენი პროგორმაცია Twittersის მომხმარებისთვის შორის ტემების პროგორმაციების მოდელისთვის: მაგალითად, ისინი, რომლებიც ტრანსი-ოფიციკური პონტერნეციის (TPP) თა ამ სახელ ცნობილების გამოსახულება არა მხოლოდ სტანციის განახლებისთვის, მაგრამ განსხვავებული რეალური მსოფლიო პროგრამებისთვის, სახელსაწყობოლო სახელსაწყობოლობა, მონიშნული კამ გამოყენებელების პროგრამეტრები Twitter-ში გამოვაკექტრებისთვის, ჩვენ ვიყენებთ ლენგურისტიკური მონაცემები, რომელსაც ადამიანები თავისწორებენ და არასწორებენ განსაკუთრებული ტემე ამ ლენგურისტიკური მონაცემების კოლექციაში ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განახლებები, რომლებიც განსხვავებულია და განსხვავებულია განსაკუთრებულია. პირველი სამუშაო ელემენტების შესახებ მომუშაობის შესახებ, ჩვენ მომუშაობით თემენტების პრეფისტრაციების მოდელი როგორც მარტიკის ფაქტორიზაცია: მომხმარების პრეფისტრაცია როგორც მომხმარებელი-ტემიკის მარტი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ექსპერიმენტიური გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებელი პროგრამეტრებისთვის გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებელი და რომ ტემე', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Twitter felhasználók témaközi preferenciáinak modellezésére vonatkozó megközelítésünket: például "akik egyetértenek a Transz-Pacific Partnerséggel (TPP), szintén egyetértenek a szabadkereskedelemmel". Ez a fajta ismeret nemcsak a több témában történő álláspont felismeréséhez hasznos, hanem különböző valós alkalmazásokhoz is, beleértve a közvélemény felmérést, a választási előrejelzést, a választási kampányokat és az online vitákat. Annak érdekében, hogy kivonjuk a felhasználók beállításait a Twitteren, olyan nyelvi mintákat tervezünk, amelyekben az emberek egyetértenek és nem értenek egyet bizonyos témákkal kapcsolatban (pl. "A teljesen téves"). Ezeket a nyelvi mintákat egy tweetgyűjteményre alkalmazva kivonjuk a különböző témákkal egyetértő és nem értő nyilatkozatokat. Az elemek ajánlásával kapcsolatos korábbi munkák inspirálva formalizáljuk a témaközi preferenciák modellezését mátrixfaktorizációként: a felhasználók preferenciáinak felhasználói-témaként történő ábrázolását, valamint a felhasználók és témák egy látens funkciótérbe történő leképezését, amely elvonta a preferenciákat. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy bemutatott megközelítésünk hasznos a felhasználók hiányzó preferenciáinak előrejelzésében, és hogy a témák látens vektoros reprezentációi sikeresen kódolják a témaközi preferenciákat.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε σε αυτό το έγγραφο την προσέγγισή μας για τη μοντελοποίηση των διατυπωτικών προτιμήσεων των χρηστών του Twitter: για παράδειγμα, "όσοι συμφωνούν με τη Διακυβερνητική Εταιρική Σχέση (TPP) συμφωνούν επίσης με το ελεύθερο εμπόριο". Αυτή η γνώση είναι χρήσιμη όχι μόνο για την ανίχνευση στάσεων σε πολλά θέματα, αλλά και για διάφορες εφαρμογές πραγματικού κόσμου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της έρευνας κοινής γνώμης, της εκλογικής πρόβλεψης, των εκλογικών εκστρατειών και των διαδικτυακών συζητήσεων. Προκειμένου να εξαχθούν οι προτιμήσεις των χρηστών στο Twitter, σχεδιάζουμε γλωσσικά πρότυπα στα οποία οι άνθρωποι συμφωνούν και διαφωνούν σχετικά με συγκεκριμένα θέματα (π.χ. "Το Α είναι εντελώς λάθος"). Εφαρμόζοντας αυτά τα γλωσσικά πρότυπα σε μια συλλογή tweets, εξάγουμε δηλώσεις που συμφωνούν και διαφωνούν με διάφορα θέματα. Εμπνευσμένοι από προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με τη σύσταση στοιχείων, επισημοποιούμε το έργο της μοντελοποίησης των προτιμήσεων μεταξύ θεμάτων ως παράγοντα μήτρας: αναπαράσταση της προτίμησης των χρηστών ως μήτρα θέματος χρήστη και χαρτογράφηση τόσο των χρηστών όσο και των θεμάτων σε έναν λανθάνοντα χώρο χαρακτηριστικών που αφαιρεί τις προτιμήσεις. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν τόσο ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγισή μας είναι χρήσιμη για την πρόβλεψη ελλείψεων προτιμήσεων των χρηστών όσο και ότι οι λανθάνουσες διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις των θεμάτων κωδικοποιούν επιτυχώς τις διατυπωμένες προτιμήσεις.', 'it': 'In questo articolo presentiamo il nostro approccio per modellare le preferenze inter-topic degli utenti di Twitter: ad esempio, "coloro che sono d\'accordo con la Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) concordano anche con il libero scambio". Questo tipo di conoscenza è utile non solo per rilevare posizioni su più argomenti, ma anche per varie applicazioni del mondo reale, tra cui sondaggi di opinione pubblica, previsioni elettorali, campagne elettorali e dibattiti online. Al fine di estrarre le preferenze degli utenti su Twitter, progettiamo modelli linguistici in cui le persone sono d\'accordo e non sono d\'accordo su argomenti specifici (ad esempio, "A è completamente sbagliato"). Applicando questi modelli linguistici a una raccolta di tweet, estraiamo dichiarazioni che concordano e non concordano su vari argomenti. Ispirati dal lavoro precedente sulla raccomandazione degli elementi, formalizziamo il compito di modellare le preferenze inter-topic come fattorizzazione della matrice: rappresentare le preferenze degli utenti come matrice utente-topic e mappare sia gli utenti che gli argomenti in uno spazio di funzionalità latente che astrae le preferenze. I nostri risultati sperimentali dimostrano sia che il nostro approccio presentato è utile nel prevedere le preferenze mancanti degli utenti sia che le rappresentazioni vettoriali latenti di argomenti codificano con successo le preferenze inter-topic.', 'kk': 'Біз бұл қағазда Твиттер пайдаланушылардың интерфейсті тақырыптарды моделдеу үшін өзіміздің тәсілімізді таңдаймыз: мысалы, "Тынзикалық Тынзикалық партнерлік (TPP) бағдарламасына қаты Бұл түрлі білім тек бірнеше тақырыптарды анықтау үшін пайдалы емес, сондай-ақ әлемдегі әлемдегі қолданбалар үшін көпшілік оқыту, сайлау прогнозы, сайлау кампаниялары және онлайн диску Твиттерде пайдаланушылардың параметрлерін тарқату үшін, адамдар келесі нақыштар туралы түсініп келмейді (мысалы, \'А толық қате\') лингвистикалық үлгілерін құрамыз. Бұл лингвистикалық үлгілерді tweet жинағына қолдану үшін біз түрлі нақыштармен келістіріп келістіріп, келістіріп келмейді. Мәтіндердің рекомендациясының алдыңғы жұмысын түсіндіріп, матрица факторизациясы ретінде нақыштардың параметрлерін моделдеу тапсырмасын официалдық: пайдаланушылардың қасиеттерін пайдаланушының мақылауы матрицасы ретінде көрсету және пайдалану Тәжірибелік нәтижелеріміз қолданылған тәсіліміз пайдаланушылардың қасиеттерін бақылау үшін пайдаланушылардың параметрлерін таңдау үшін және нақыштардың соңғы вектордың таңдауылары с', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo požiūrį į tarpteminių Twitter naudotojų preferencijų modeliavimą: pavyzdžiui, "tie, kurie sutinka su Ramiojo vandenyno partneryste (TPP), taip pat sutinka su laisvąja prekyba". Tokios žinios yra naudingos ne tik įvairioms temoms nustatyti pozicijas, bet ir įvairioms realaus pasaulio programoms, įskaitant viešosios nuomonės apklausą, rinkimų prognozes, rinkimų kampanijas ir internetines diskusijas. Siekiant išnaudoti naudotojų pageidavimus Twitter, kuriame kalbinius modelius, kuriuose žmonės sutinka ir nesutinka dėl konkrečių temų (pvz., "A visiškai neteisinga"). Taikydami šiuos kalbinius modelius tweetų rinkimui, ištraukiame pareiškimus, kurie sutinka ir nesutinka su įvairiomis temomis. Įkvėptas ankstesniu darbu dėl punkto rekomendacijos, mes formalizuojame užduotį modeliuoti tarptemines preferencijas kaip matricos faktorizaciją: atstovauti naudotojų preferencijai kaip naudotojų-teminės matricos ir žemėlapizuoti naudotojus ir temas į latenčią savybių erdvę, kuri apibendrina preferencijas. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų pristatytas metodas yra naudingas prognozuojant trūkstamus vartotojų pageidavimus ir kad latentiniai temų vektoriai sėkmingai koduoja tarpteminius pageidavimus.', 'ms': "Kami memperkenalkan dalam kertas ini pendekatan kami untuk memmodelkan keutamaan antar-topik pengguna Twitter: misalnya, 'orang-orang yang setuju dengan Persekutuan Trans-Pasifik (TPP) juga setuju dengan perdagangan bebas'. Pengetahuan semacam ini berguna bukan hanya untuk pengesan kedudukan melalui beberapa topik tetapi juga untuk pelbagai aplikasi dunia nyata termasuk penyelidikan pendapat awam, ramalan pemilihan, kampanye pemilihan, dan debat online. Untuk mengekstrak keutamaan pengguna di Twitter, kami merancang corak bahasa yang mana orang setuju dan tidak setuju mengenai topik tertentu (contohnya, 'A adalah benar-benar salah'). Dengan melaksanakan corak bahasa ini pada koleksi tweet, kami mengekstrak pernyataan setuju dan tidak setuju dengan berbagai topik. DiInspirasikan oleh kerja terdahulu mengenai rekomendasi item, kami formalisasi tugas untuk modelkan keutamaan antar-topik sebagai faktorisasi matriks: mewakili keutamaan pengguna sebagai matriks topik-pengguna dan memetakan kedua-dua pengguna dan topik ke ruang ciri yang tersembunyi yang menyerap keutamaan. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan kedua-dua bahawa pendekatan yang kita persembahkan berguna dalam meramalkan keutamaan hilang pengguna dan bahawa persembahan vektor tersembunyi topik berjaya mengekodkan keutamaan antar-topik.", 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസ്-പാസിഫിക്ക് പങ്കുള്ള പങ്കാളികളുടെ (ടിപിപി) സംബന്ധിച്ച് സമ്മതിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും സ്വതന്ത്രമായ വ്യാപാര്\u200dത്തകത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ  ഇത്തരം അറിവുകള്\u200d പല വിഷയങ്ങളിലും സ്ഥിരമായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗപ്പെടുന്നുള്ളൂ പക്ഷെ പൊതുവായ അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200d, തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന പ്ര ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ്ട്രീതിക രീതികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ആളുകള്\u200d സമ് ഈ ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ രീതികള്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ ഒരു സംഘത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഷയങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം സമ്മതിക്കു ഇമെയിന്റ് ശുദ്ധീകരണത്തില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയാല്\u200d മാറ്റിക്സ് ഫാക്ട്രിക്സ് ഫാക്ടറിഷഷനായി മാറ്റിക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണന മാറ്റം നാം രൂപി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരും കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്മാനം ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനകളെ പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഉപയോ', 'mt': 'F\'dan id-dokument nippreżentaw l-approċċ tagħna għall-immudellar tal-preferenzi intertematiċi tal-utenti ta\' Twitter: pereżempju, "dawk li jaqblu mas-Sħubija Transpaċifika (TPP) jaqblu wkoll mal-kummerċ ħieles". Dan it-tip ta’ għarfien huwa utli mhux biss għad-detezzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet f’diversi suġġetti iżda wkoll għal diversi applikazzjonijiet fid-dinja reali inklużi stħarriġ tal-opinjoni pubblika, tbassir elettorali, kampanji elettorali, u dibattiti onlajn. Sabiex jiġu estratti l-preferenzi tal-utenti fuq Twitter, aħna niddisinjaw mudelli lingwistiċi li fihom in-nies jaqblu u ma jaqblux dwar suġġetti speċifiċi (pereżempju, \'A hija kompletament ħażina\'). Permezz tal-applikazzjoni ta’ dawn ix-xejriet lingwistiċi għal ġabra ta’ tweets, a ħna nġibdu dikjarazzjonijiet li jaqblu u ma jaqblux ma’ diversi suġġetti. Inspirat minn ħidma preċedenti dwar ir-rakkomandazzjoni tal-punt, a ħna nifformalizzaw il-kompitu li nimmudellaw il-preferenzi inter-suġġetti bħala fatturizzazzjoni tal-matriċi: nirrappreżentaw il-preferenza tal-utenti bħala matriċi utent-suġġett u nimmappjaw kemm l-utenti kif ukoll is-suġġetti fuq spazju ta’ karatteristiċi moħbija li jastratti l-preferenzi. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru kemm li l-approċċ ippreżentat tagħna huwa utli fit-tbassir tal-preferenzi nieqsa tal-utenti u li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet latenti tal-vetturi ta’ suġġetti jikkodifikaw b’suċċess il-preferenzi inter-suġġetti.', 'mk': "Во овој документ го претставуваме нашиот пристап за моделирање на меѓутемските преференции на корисниците на Твитер: на пример, „оние кои се согласуваат со Транс-Пацифичкото партнерство (ТПП), исто така, се согласуваат со слободната трговија“. Овој вид на знаење е корисно не само за детективирање на ставови во повеќе теми, туку и за различни апликации во реалниот свет, вклучително и истражување на јавното мислење, изборни предвидувања, изборни кампањи и онлајн дебати. За да ги извадиме преференциите на корисниците на Твитер, дизајнираме јазични шаблони во кои луѓето се согласуваат и не се согласуваат за специфични теми (на пример, „А е сосема погрешно“). Со аплицирање на овие јазички шаблони на колекција твитови, ги извадуваме изјавите кои се согласуваат и не се согласуваат со различни теми. Inspired by previous work on item recommendation, we formalize the task of modeling inter-topic preferences as matrix factorization: representing users' preference as a user-topic matrix and mapping both users and topics onto a latent feature space that abstracts the preferences.  Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека нашиот презентиран пристап е корисен во предвидувањето на недостасувачките преференции на корисниците и дека тајните представувања на векторите на теми успешно ги кодираат меѓутемските преференции.", 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasze podejście do modelowania preferencji międzythematycznych użytkowników Twittera: na przykład "ci, którzy zgadzają się z Partnerstwem Transpacyficznym (TPP), również zgadzają się z wolnym handlem". Tego rodzaju wiedza jest przydatna nie tylko do wykrywania stanowiska w wielu tematach, ale także do różnych rzeczywistych zastosowań, w tym do badań opinii publicznej, przewidywania wyborów, kampanii wyborczych i debat online. Aby wyodrębnić preferencje użytkowników na Twitterze, projektujemy wzorce językowe, w których ludzie zgadzają się i nie zgadzają się na konkretne tematy (np. "A jest całkowicie błędna"). Stosując te wzorce językowe do zbioru tweetów, wydobywamy stwierdzenia zgadzające się i nie zgadzające się z różnymi tematami. Zainspirowani poprzednimi pracami nad rekomendacją elementów formalizujemy zadanie modelowania preferencji międzythematowych jako faktoryzacja macierzy: reprezentowanie preferencji użytkowników jako macierzy tematycznej użytkowników i mapowanie zarówno użytkowników, jak i tematów na utajoną przestrzeń funkcji abstrakującą preferencje. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują zarówno, że przedstawione podejście jest przydatne w przewidywaniu brakujących preferencji użytkowników, jak i że ukryte reprezentacje wektorowe tematów z powodzeniem kodują preferencje między tematami.', 'mn': "Бид энэ цаасан дээр Twitter хэрэглэгчдийн интернэт сэдвийн сонголтуудыг загварчлах арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Жишээлбэл, Транс-Төмөр хэмжээний Нийгмийн Холбооны Холбооны Холбооны Холбооны Холбооны Х Энэ төрлийн мэдлэг нь зөвхөн олон сэдэв дээр байдлыг олох боломжтой биш, мөн олон бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээнд олон нийтийн санааны судалгаа, сонгуулийн таамаглал, сонгуулийн кампанийг, онлайн талаар ярилцдаг. Хэрэглэгчийн сонголтуудыг Твиттерт гаргахын тулд бид хүмүүс тодорхой сэдвийн тухай зөвшөөрсөн хэлний загваруудыг загварчлахад (жишээ нь 'А нь бүрэн буруу'). Энэ хэлний хэлбэрийн загваруудыг tweets цуглуулахад бид олон сэдэв дээр зөвшөөрсөн болон буруу зүйлсийг гаргадаг. Өмнөх ажлын талаар тодорхойлолтын тулд бид матриксын тодорхойлолтын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын талаар илэрхийлэх хэрэглэгчийн сонголтыг хэрэглэгчийн матрикс болгон, хэрэг Бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь хэрэглэгчдийн алдагдсан сонголтуудыг таамаглах болон сэдвийн сүүлийн векторын үзүүлэлт амжилттай олон сэдвийн сонголтуудыг шинэчлэхэд ашигтай гэдгийг харуулж байна.", 'no': 'Vi presenterer i denne papiret tilnærminga vårt for å modellere mellomtemainnstillingar av Twitter-brukarar: for eksempel, "dei som samsvarar med Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) er også samsvarande med fri handel". Denne typen kunnskap er nyttig ikkje bare for oppdaging av stasjonar på fleire emner, men også for ulike verkelege programmer, inkludert offentlige oppdaging av meningsområde, valgforhåndsvising, valgkampanjonar og internetdebatar. For å pakka ut brukarar-innstillingar på Twitter, design me linguistic patterns in which people agree and disagree about specific topics (for example \'A is completely wrong\'). Ved å bruka desse lingviske mønsterene til eit samling av tweeter, ekstraherer vi uttrykk som er tilsvarande og ikkje tilsvarande med ulike emner. I førre arbeid på tilrådd av elementet, formaliserer vi oppgåva for modellering av mellomtemainnstillingar som matrisefaktorisering: representerer brukarar innstillingar som ein matris for brukarar og karterer både brukarar og emner på ein latent funksjonsplass som abstrarer innstillingane. Eksperimentale resultat våre viser begge at vårt presentert tilnærming er nyttig i forventing av manglende innstillingar av brukarar og at latente vektorrepresentasjonane av emner er fullført koda mellomtemainnstillingar.', 'si': 'අපි මේ පත්තරයේ අපේ විදිහට ට්විටර් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ අන්තර්ජ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ අන්තර්ජ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ අන්තර්ජ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ අන්තර්ජ මේ වර්ගයේ දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විතරයි විතරයි විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් විදිහට හොයාගන්න බැරි විදිහට නෙවෙයි නමුත් විදිහට භාවිත කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් ට්විටර් වලින්, අපි භාෂාත්මක පෙට්ටර් සැකසුම් කරනවා, මිනිස්සුන් එකඟින් විශ මේ භාෂාත්මක පැට්ටර් එක්ක ට්විට් එක්ක සම්මූතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, අපි විවිධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමඟ සම පිළිබඳු වැඩ සඳහා අයිති ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200d අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර කර', 'ro': 'Prezentăm în această lucrare abordarea noastră pentru modelarea preferințelor inter-topice ale utilizatorilor Twitter: de exemplu, "cei care sunt de acord cu Parteneriatul Trans-Pacific (TPP) sunt de acord și cu liberul schimb". Acest tip de cunoștințe este util nu numai pentru detectarea poziției pe mai multe subiecte, ci și pentru diverse aplicații din lumea reală, inclusiv sondaje de opinie publică, predicții electorale, campanii electorale și dezbateri online. Pentru a extrage preferințele utilizatorilor pe Twitter, proiectăm modele lingvistice în care oamenii sunt de acord și nu sunt de acord cu privire la anumite subiecte (de exemplu, "A este complet greșit"). Prin aplicarea acestor modele lingvistice la o colecție de tweet-uri, extragem declarații de acord și de dezacord cu diferite subiecte. Inspirați de lucrările anterioare privind recomandarea elementelor, formalizăm sarcina modelării preferințelor inter-topice ca factorizare matrice: reprezentând preferințele utilizatorilor ca matrice user-topic și mapând atât utilizatorii cât și subiectele într-un spațiu de caracteristici latent care abstractează preferințele. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează atât că abordarea noastră prezentată este utilă în predicția preferințelor lipsă ale utilizatorilor, cât și că reprezentările vectoriale latente ale subiectelor codifică cu succes preferințele inter-topice.', 'so': 'Waxaannu warqaddan uga soo bandhignaa qaabilaada tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan kuwa ku heshiiya shirkadda gaadiidka-Pacific (TPP) waxay ku heshiiyaan ganacsi xor ah. Aqoonta caynkaas ah waxey faa’iido u leedahay in la ogaado suurtogal badan oo kaliya, laakiin sidoo kale waxaa loo isticmaalaa codsiyadaha caalamiga ah oo kala duduwan, baaritaanka dadweynaha, bandhigyada doorashada, kampeni doorashada iyo debaashooyinka internetka ah. Si aan u soo saarno doorashooyinka isticmaalayaasha Twitterka, waxaynu qoraynaa noocyo luuqada ah oo ay dadku ku heshiiyaan islamarkaasna ka qisoonaan arrimaha gaarka ah (tusaale ahaan ‘A waa dhamaan khalad’). Noocyadaas luuqadaha ah ayaannu u soo bixinnaa warqado aan ku heshiinno islamarkaasna ka qisoonaynno mada kala duduwan. Shaqo hore oo ku saabsan arimaha arimaha, waxaynu u formalisnaa shaqada sameynta doorashooyinka Inter-mada u dhexeeya sida matrix factorization: representing preferences of users as a topic matrix and mapping labada isticmaalayaal iyo madaxa on a recent feature that abstracts preferences. Abaalkayaga jirrabka ah waxay muujiyaan labadayada in qaababkayaga la soo jeedo ay faa’iido u leedahay in uu horumarinayo doorashooyinka isticmaalayaasha iyo in wadanka ugu dambeeya oo macluumaadka ku saabsan uu ku qorayo khilaafka arimaha dhexdooda.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo u ovom papiru naš pristup modelima međutemnih preferencija korisnika Twitter-a: na primjer, "oni koji se slažu sa Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) takođe slažu sa slobodnom trgovinom". Takvo znanje je korisno ne samo za otkrivanje stanja u raznim temama, već i za različite realne aplikacije, uključujući istraživanje javnog mišljenja, predviđenje izbora, izborne kampanje i internetske debate. Da bismo izvadili preferencije korisnika na Twitter, dizajnirali smo jezičke obrasce u kojima se ljudi slažu i ne slažu se u vezi specifičnih tema (npr. „A je potpuno pogrešna“). Primjenjujući te jezičke obrasce na kolekciju tweeta, izvlačimo izjave koje se slažu i ne slažu sa različitim temama. Pod inspiracijom prethodnog rada o preporuki predmeta, formaliziramo zadatak modeliranja međutemnih preferencija kao faktorizacija matrice: predstavljajući preferenciju korisnika kao matricu tema korisnika i mapiranje korisnika i tema na latentni prostor karakteristike koji apstrašuje preferencije. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju kako je naš predstavljeni pristup korisan u predviđanju nestalih preferencija korisnika i da latentne predstave vektora teme uspešno kodiraju međutemne preferencije.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt tillvägagångssätt för modellering av preferenser mellan olika ämnen för Twitter-användare: till exempel "de som håller med om Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) håller också med om frihandel". Denna typ av kunskap är användbar inte bara för att upptäcka ståndpunkter över flera ämnen utan också för olika verkliga tillämpningar, inklusive opinionsundersökning, valprognoser, valkampanjer och onlinedebatter. För att extrahera användarnas preferenser på Twitter utformar vi språkliga mönster där människor är överens om och inte håller med om specifika ämnen (t.ex. "A är helt fel"). Genom att tillämpa dessa språkliga mönster på en samling tweets extraherar vi uttalanden som överensstämmer med och inte håller med om olika ämnen. Inspirerad av tidigare arbete med artikelrekommendation formaliserar vi uppgiften att modellera preferenser mellan olika ämnen som matrisfaktorisering: representera användares preferenser som en användarämnesmatris och kartlägga både användare och ämnen i ett latent funktionsutrymme som abstraherar preferenserna. Våra experimentella resultat visar både att vårt presenterade tillvägagångssätt är användbart för att förutsäga saknade preferenser hos användare och att latenta vektorrepresentationer av ämnen framgångsrikt kodar inter-topic preferenser.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் இந்த காகிதத்தில் தெரிவிக்கிறோம் தொடர்பு பயனர்களின் இடையேற்பொருள் முன்னுரிமைகளை மாற்றுவதற்கான நம் வழிமுறையை கூறுகிறோம்: உதா இந்த வகையான அறிவு பலவிதமான தலைப்புகளில் மட்டுமே நிலைபெறுவதற்கு பயன்படவில்லை ஆனால் பொது குறிப்புப் பார்வை பரிசோதி, தேர்ந்தெடு Twitter ல் பயனரின் முன்னுரிமைகளை வெளியேற்ற வேண்டுமானால், நாம் மொழியில் வடிவமைக்கிறோம், அதில் மக்கள் ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறார் By applying these linguistic patterns to a collection of tweets, we extract statements agreeing and disagreeing with various topics.  பொருள் பரிந்துரையில் முந்தைய வேலை வழங்கப்பட்டது, நாம் மாதிரிக்ஸ் காரணியின் முன்னுரிமைகளை உருவாக்கும் இடையில் முன்னுரிமைகளை வடிவமைக்கும்: பயனரின் முன்னுரிமையை ஒரு பய எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் இரண்டையும் காண்பிக்கிறது நமது முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமைகளை காணாமல் இருக்கும் என்பது பயனுள்ளது பயனர்களின் முன்னுர', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنے طریقے کو توئیٹر کارساز کے متوسط ٹوئیٹر کی ترجیح کے لئے نمودل کرنے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں، مثال یہ ہے کہ "جن لوگوں نے Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) کے ساتھ موافق ہوتے ہیں، آزاد تجارت کے ساتھ موافق ہوتے ہیں". یہ طرح علم صرف بہت سی موضوع کے متعلق نہیں ہے بلکہ مختلف حقیقی دنیاوی کاروباروں کے لئے بھی مفید ہے جن میں عمومی نظر نظر آزمائش، انتخابات کی پیش بینی، انتخابات کی کمپینگ اور آنلاین کی بحث ہے. تاکہ توئیٹر پر کارساز کی ترجیح اٹھانے کے لئے ہم زبان شناسی پٹرنوں کی طراحی کرتے ہیں جن میں لوگوں نے مختلف موضوع کے بارے میں موافقت اور اختلاف نہیں کی ہے (جیسے \'A کامل غلط ہے\'). یہ زبان پٹرنوں کو ٹویٹوں کی جمع کرنی کے ذریعہ استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم مختلف موضوع کے ساتھ موافق اور مختلف باتوں کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں. ابتداء کی تعلیم کے بارے میں پہلے کام کے ذریعے ہم نے ماٹریکس فاکتوریزی کے مطابق ماڈلینگ-ٹوپ کی ترجیح کے مطابق موڈلینگ کی ترجیح کی تابع کی تابع کی تعلیم کی: یوسٹر-ٹوپ ماٹریکس کے مطابق یوسٹر-ٹوپ ماٹریکس کے مطابق کارساز ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دونوں کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیش آئی طریقہ کارساز کے گم ہونے کی ترجیح کی پیش آزمائش میں فائدہ ہے اور یہ کہ ٹوپیٹوں کی لاٹینٹ ویکتور نمایش موفق طور پر بین ٹوپیٹ کی ترجیح کو قائم کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Bu takarda biz Twitter foydalanuvchilarining inter-mavzu parametrlarini modellashimizni taqdim qilamiz. Masalan, "Trans-Pacific Participation (TPP) bilan bog\'liqchilar bilan birlashtirilganlarni boshqa buyruq bilan birlashtiramiz". Bu ma\'lumot ko\'plab mavzularni aniqlash uchun faqat foydalanuvchi emas, balki har xil dunyodagi dasturlarda, public opinion survey, electoral predictions, electoral campaigns va har bir nechta diskuter uchun foydalanadi. Twitterda foydalanuvchilarning parametrlarini chiqarish uchun, biz tillar tugmalarini yaratishmiz va odamlar hodisa mavzu haqida murojaat qiladi (масалан, \'A xato\'). Ushbu tillar shakllarini Twitter ta\'plamlariga qoʻllashda, biz har xil mavzu bilan birlashtirish va bir qanchalik mavzu bilan murakkab qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz yordam berilganimiz foydalanuvchilarning parametrlarini koʻrsatishda foydalanishimiz mumkin va eng oxirgi vektor taʼminlovchilari muvaffaqiyatli mavzu interfeys parametrlarini kodlash mumkin.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra bài báo này phương pháp tạo mẫu cho những người dùng trên Twitter, ví dụ như "những người đồng ý với Hiệp hội giao thông Thái Bình Dương (TPP) cũng đồng ý với thỏa thuận buôn bán tự do." Thứ kiến thức này có ích không chỉ cho việc phát hiện lập trường trên nhiều chủ đề mà còn cho nhiều ứng dụng thực tế khác nhau, bao gồm cuộc khảo sát, dự đoán cử tri, chiến dịch bầu cử, và các cuộc tranh luận trực tuyến. Để trích các sở thích của người dùng trên Twitter, chúng tôi thiết kế các mô hình ngôn ngữ mà người ta đồng ý và bất đồng về các chủ đề cụ thể (v.d.,\'A"hoàn to àn sai). Bằng cách áp dụng những mô hình ngôn ngữ này vào một tập trên Twitter, chúng tôi trích xuất những lời đồng ý và bất đồng với các chủ đề khác nhau. Lấy cảm hứng từ những nghiên cứu về mục tiêu trước đó, chúng tôi chính thức hoá nhiệm vụ tạo mẫu các ưu tiên nội địa như là phân tích ma trận: đại diện sự ưu tiên của người dùng làm ma trận chủ đề người dùng và phân loại cả người dùng và chủ đề vào một không gian tiềm ẩn mà rút các sở thích. Các kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy phương pháp được trình bày có ích trong việc dự đoán sai lệch của người dùng và rằng các biểu tượng vector tiềm ẩn của các chủ đề đã mã hóa thành công', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нашия подход за моделиране на междутематичните предпочитания на потребителите на Туитър: например, "онези, които са съгласни с Транстихоокеанското партньорство (ТПП), също са съгласни със свободната търговия". Този вид знания са полезни не само за откриване на позиции в различни теми, но и за различни приложения в реалния свят, включително проучване на общественото мнение, предизборни прогнози, изборни кампании и онлайн дебати. За да извлечем предпочитанията на потребителите в Туитър, ние проектираме езикови модели, в които хората са съгласни и не са съгласни по конкретни теми (напр. "А е напълно погрешно"). Като прилагаме тези езикови модели към колекция от туитове, извличаме твърдения, съгласни и несъгласни с различни теми. Вдъхновени от предишна работа по препоръка на елементи, ние формализираме задачата за моделиране на междутематичните предпочитания като матрична факторизация: представяне на предпочитанията на потребителите като матрица потребителска тема и картографиране както на потребителите, така и на темите върху латентно пространство за функции, което абстрактува предпочитанията. Нашите експериментални резултати показват както, че представеният ни подход е полезен за прогнозиране на липсващите предпочитания на потребителите, така и че латентните векторни изображения на темите успешно кодират интертематични предпочитания.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer i denne artikel vores tilgang til modellering af tværgående emnepræferencer for Twitter-brugere: for eksempel, "dem, der er enige i Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), er også enige i frihandel". Denne form for viden er nyttig ikke kun til holdningsdetektering på tværs af flere emner, men også til forskellige virkelige applikationer, herunder offentlig opinionsundersøgelse, valgprognose, valgkampagner og online debatter. For at udtrække brugernes præferencer på Twitter designer vi sproglige mønstre, hvor folk er enige og uenige om specifikke emner (f.eks. "A er helt forkert"). Ved at anvende disse sproglige mønstre på en samling tweets udtrækker vi erklæringer, der er enige og uenige i forskellige emner. Inspireret af tidligere arbejde med emneanbefaling formaliserer vi opgaven med at modellere præferencer mellem emner som matrixfaktorisering: repræsentere brugernes præferencer som en bruger-emne matrix og kortlægge både brugere og emner på et latent funktionsrum, der abstraherer præferencerne. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser både, at vores præsenterede tilgang er nyttig til at forudsige manglende præferencer for brugere, og at de latente vektorrepræsentationer af emner med succes koder inter-emne præferencer.', 'hr': "Predstavljamo u ovom papiru naš pristup modeliranju međutemnih preferencija korisnika Twitter-a: na primjer, 'oni koji se slažu s partnerstvom Trans-Pacific (TPP) također slažu s slobodnom trgovinom'. Ova vrsta znanja je korisna ne samo za otkrivanje stanja u raznim temama, već i za različite primjene stvarnog svijeta uključujući istraživanje javnog mišljenja, predviđanje izbora, izborne kampanje i internetske rasprave. Da bismo izvadili preferencije korisnika na Twitter, dizajnirali smo jezičke obrasce u kojima se ljudi slažu i ne slažu se o specifičnim temama (npr. „A je potpuno pogrešno“). Primjenjujući te jezičke obrasce na kolekciju tweeta, izvlačimo izjave koje se slažu i ne slažu sa različitim temama. Uhvaćeni prethodnim radom o preporuki predmeta, formaliziramo zadatak modeliranja međutemnih preferencija kao faktorizacija matrice: predstavljajući preferenciju korisnika kao matricu teme korisnika i mapiranje korisnika i teme na latentni prostor karakteristike koji apstrašuje preferencije. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju kako je naš predstavljeni pristup korisan u predviđanju nestalih preferencija korisnika i da su latentne predstave vektora tema uspješno kodirane međutemne preferencije.", 'ko': "우리는 이 논문에서 트위터 사용자들의 화제 사이의 선호도를 모델링하는 방법을 제시했다. 예를 들어'태평양경제동반자관계(TPP)에 동의하는 사람들도 자유무역에 동의한다'는 것이다.이런 지식은 여러 주제를 뛰어넘는 입장 검측에 유용할 뿐만 아니라 각종 실제 세계의 응용에도 유용하다. 여론조사, 선거 예측, 선거 활동과 온라인 변론을 포함한다.사용자가 트위터에서 선호하는 것을 추출하기 위해 우리는 언어 모델을 설계했다. 이런 모델에서 사람들이 특정한 주제에 대한 동의와 동의하지 않는다(예를 들어'A는 완전히 잘못된 것이다').이러한 언어 모델을 하나의 트위터에 적용함으로써 우리는 각종 주제에 동의하고 동의하지 않는 진술을 추출할 수 있다.기존의 프로젝트 추천 작업의 계발을 받아 우리는 주제 간 선호 모델링의 작업 형식을 매트릭스로 분해했다. 사용자의 선호를 사용자 테마 매트릭스로 표시하고 사용자와 테마를 잠재적인 특징 공간에 비추어 추상적인 선호를 나타낸다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 방법은 사용자의 선호도를 예측하는 데 유용하고 주제의 잠재적 벡터는 주제 간의 선호도를 성공적으로 인코딩한 것을 나타낸다.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we onze aanpak voor het modelleren van inter-topic voorkeuren van Twitter gebruikers: bijvoorbeeld 'degenen die het eens zijn met het Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) zijn het ook eens met vrije handel'. Dit soort kennis is niet alleen nuttig voor het detecteren van standpunten over meerdere onderwerpen, maar ook voor verschillende toepassingen in de praktijk, waaronder opinieonderzoek, verkiezingsprognoses, verkiezingscampagnes en online debatten. Om de voorkeuren van gebruikers op Twitter te extraheren, ontwerpen we taalpatronen waarin mensen het eens zijn en het oneens zijn over specifieke onderwerpen (bijvoorbeeld: 'A is volledig verkeerd'). Door deze taalpatronen toe te passen op een verzameling tweets, extraheren we verklaringen die het met verschillende onderwerpen eens zijn en niet eens zijn. Geïnspireerd door eerder werk over artikelaanbeveling formaliseren we de taak van het modelleren van inter-topic voorkeuren als matrix factorization: het vertegenwoordigen van gebruikersvoorkeuren als een user-topic matrix en het toewijzen van zowel gebruikers als onderwerpen aan een latente feature ruimte die de voorkeuren abstraheert. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde aanpak nuttig is bij het voorspellen van ontbrekende voorkeuren van gebruikers en dat de latente vectorrepresentaties van onderwerpen succesvol inter-topic voorkeuren coderen.", 'fa': 'ما در این کاغذ طریق خود را برای مدل کردن ترجیح\u200cهای بین\u200cموضوع از کاربران توئیتر نشان می\u200cدهیم: برای مثال، کسانی که با شرکت Trans-Pacific (TPP) موافق هستند، با تجارت آزاد موافق هستند. این نوع دانش، نه تنها برای شناسایی موضوع در موضوع چندین موضوع مفید است، بلکه برای کاربردهای مختلف دنیای واقعی که شامل تحقیقات نظر عمومی، پیش بینی انتخابات، کمپانی انتخابات و بحث آنلاین است. برای خارج کردن ترجیح\u200cهای کاربر روی توئیتر، ما الگوهای زبان\u200cشناسی را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که مردم در آن موافق می\u200cشوند و در مورد موضوع خاص اختلاف نمی\u200cکنند (مثال «A کاملا اشتباه است»). با استفاده از این الگوهای زبان\u200cشناسی به مجموعه\u200cای از تویتها، ما گزارش\u200cهایی را که با موافقت و اختلاف با موضوع مختلف قرار می\u200cگیریم خارج می\u200cکنیم. توسط کارهای قبلی روی پیشنهاد توصیف عنوان، ما وظیفه\u200cی مدل\u200cسازی ترجیح\u200cهای بین عنوان تعداد ماتریکس را فرستادیم: نمایش ترجیح\u200cهای کاربران به عنوان ماتریکس مورد کاربر و نقشه\u200cسازی هر دو کاربران و عنوان را به فضای ویژه\u200cهای latent که ترجیح\u200cها را نابود نتایج آزمایشی ما هر دو نشان می دهند که دستور پیشنهاد ما در پیش\u200cبینی گزینه\u200cهای ناپدید شده از کاربران مفید است و که نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور latent از موضوع موفق به طور موفق ترجیح\u200cهای بین\u200cموضوع را پیدا می\u200cکند.', 'id': "Kami memperlihatkan dalam kertas ini pendekatan kami untuk memmodelir keutamaan intertopik pengguna Twitter: misalnya, 'orang-orang yang setuju dengan Partnersi Trans-Pasifik (TPP) juga setuju dengan perdagangan bebas'. Pengetahuan semacam ini berguna bukan hanya untuk deteksi posisi di berbagai topik tetapi juga untuk berbagai aplikasi dunia nyata termasuk survei pendapat publik, prediksi pemilihan, kampanye pemilihan, dan debat online. Untuk mengekstrak keutamaan pengguna di Twitter, kami merancang pola bahasa yang mana orang setuju dan tidak setuju tentang topik khusus (contohnya, 'A benar-benar salah'). By applying these linguistic patterns to a collection of tweets, we extract statements agreeing and disagreeing with various topics.  Terinspirasi oleh pekerjaan sebelumnya pada rekomendasi item, kami formalisasikan tugas untuk memmodelir keutamaan intertopik sebagai faktorisasi matriks: mewakili keutamaan pengguna sebagai matriks topik-pengguna dan memetakan kedua pengguna dan topik ke ruang karakteristik tertutup yang menyerap keutamaan. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan kedua pendekatan yang kami persembahkan berguna dalam memprediksi keutamaan yang hilang dari pengguna dan bahwa represisi vektor latent dari topik berhasil mengkode keutamaan intertopik.", 'sw': "Tunawasilisha katika gazeti hili mbinu yetu kwa kutengeneza vipaumbele vya watumiaji wa mtandao wa Twita: kwa mfano, 'wale ambao wanakubaliana na ushirikiano wa Trans-Pacific (TPP) pia wanakubaliana na biashara huru'. Jambo hili la maarifa si tu kwa kutambua msimamo katika mada mbalimbali pia kwa matumizi mbalimbali ya dunia ikiwa ni pamoja na utafiti wa maoni ya umma, utabiri wa uchaguzi, kampeni za uchaguzi na mijadala ya mtandaoni. Ili kuweka upendeleo wa watumiaji kwenye mtandao wa Twita, tunaunda mitindo ya lugha ambapo watu wanakubaliana na kutokubaliana na mada maalum (kwa mfano, 'A ni makosa kamili'). Kwa kutumia mbinu hizi za lugha kwa mkusanyiko wa twiti, tunatoa kauli zinazokubaliana na kutokubaliana na mada mbalimbali. Tulihamishwa na kazi iliyopita kuhusu mapendekezo ya bidhaa, tunatengeneza jukumu la kutengeneza vipaumbele vya mada baina ya maudhui kama viwanda vya viwanda: wakiwakilisha upendeleo wa watumiaji kama utaratibu wa mada na kutengeneza mada za watumiaji na mada kwenye nafasi ya kipindi cha hivi karibuni ambacho kinakataa vipaumbele. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu iliyotolewa inafaa kutabiri upendeleo wa watumiaji wa mtandao wa karibuni na kwamba uwakilishi wa vector wa mada kwa mafanikio yanajumuisha vipaumbele vya mada.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Ansatz zur Modellierung von themenübergreifenden Präferenzen von Twitter-Nutzern vor: Zum Beispiel: "Wer mit der Transpazifischen Partnerschaft (TPP) einverstanden ist, stimmt auch dem Freihandel zu". Diese Art von Wissen ist nicht nur für die Positionserkennung über mehrere Themen nützlich, sondern auch für verschiedene reale Anwendungen, einschließlich Meinungsumfragen, Wahlvorhersagen, Wahlkampagnen und Online-Debatten. Um die Präferenzen der Nutzer auf Twitter zu extrahieren, entwerfen wir sprachliche Muster, in denen sich Menschen über bestimmte Themen einigen und uneins sind (z.B. "A ist völlig falsch"). Indem wir diese sprachlichen Muster auf eine Sammlung von Tweets anwenden, extrahieren wir Aussagen, die verschiedenen Themen zustimmen und widersprechen. Inspiriert von früheren Arbeiten zur Artikelempfehlung formalisieren wir die Aufgabe der Modellierung von themenübergreifenden Präferenzen als Matrixfaktorisierung: die Präferenz der Benutzer als User-Topic Matrix darzustellen und sowohl Benutzer als auch Themen auf einen latenten Feature Space abzubilden, der die Präferenzen abstrahiert. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen sowohl, dass unser vorgestellter Ansatz nützlich ist, um fehlende Präferenzen von Nutzern vorherzusagen, als auch, dass die latenten Vektorrepräsentationen von Themen erfolgreich interthematische Präferenzen kodieren.', 'tr': "Biz bu kagyzda Twitter qullanıcılaryň arasyndaky tema tercihlerini örän örän nusgalarymyzy görkeýäris: meselâ, 'Pazifik Pazifik Ortakylygy (TPP) bilen ylalaşýanlar boş ticare ylalaşýarlar'. Bu ýaly bilim diňe birnäçe temalarda tanyş etmek üçin ýok, ýöne dürli dünýä üýtgeşmeleri hem halk pikir araştyrmalary hem, saýlaw öngörümleri, saýlaw kampanýalary hem online debatlary hem üçin ullanýar. Ullançylaryň tercihlerini Twitter'da açmak üçin, adamlar onuň için e ylalaşyk we paýlaşyk meýdanlary barada ylalaşyk diýip tasarlýarys (meselâ 'A doly ýalňyş'). Bu lingwistiki nusgalary tweets toplumyna uygulap, dürli temalary ylalaşyp we ylalaşyp bilmeýän. Önceki çalışma teklifi üzerine geldi, matris seçenekleri olarak örneklendirmek görevini formüle ederiz: qullanıcıların seçenekleri bir matris olarak temsil edip hem qullanıcılary hem temalary hem de geçici özellikleri boşaltmak için mapalar yapıyoruz. Biziň deneysel netijelerimiz hem tanyş edilen metodymyz ullanýan nusgalaryň önlemesinde faydaly bolandygyny görkezýär we olaryň soňky vektörler temalaryň täze tercihlerini üstüne kodlaýandygyny görkezýär.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim në këtë letër qasjen tonë për modelimin e preferimeve ndërtematike të përdoruesve të Twitterit: për shembull, "ata që janë dakord me Partneritetin Trans-Paqësor (TPP) janë dakord gjithashtu me tregtinë e lirë". Ky lloj njohuri është i dobishëm jo vetëm për zbulimin e qëndrimeve nëpër shumë temë por gjithashtu për aplikime të ndryshme të botës reale duke përfshirë sondazhin e opinionit publik, parashikimin zgjedhor, fushatat zgjedhore dhe debatet në internet. Me qëllim që të nxjerrim preferimet e përdoruesve në Twitter, ne dizajnojmë modele gjuhësore në të cilat njerëzit janë dakord dhe nuk janë dakord rreth temave të posaçme (për shembull, \'A është krejtësisht gabim\'). Duke aplikuar këto modele gjuhësore në një koleksion të tweeteve, nxjerrim deklarata që janë dakord dhe nuk janë dakord me temat e ndryshme. Inspiruar nga puna e mëparshme mbi rekomandimin e objekteve, ne formalizojmë detyrën e modelimit të preferimeve ndër-tematike si faktorizimin e matricës: përfaqësimin e preferimeve të përdoruesve si një matricë përdoruesi-tematike dhe hartimin si të përdoruesve dhe temave në një hapësirë të fshehtë me karakteristika që abstrakton preferimet. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale demonstrojnë të dy se qasja jonë e paraqitur është e dobishme në parashikimin e preferimeve të munguara të përdoruesve dhe se përfaqësimet e vektorëve të fshehura të temave kodojnë me sukses preferimet ndërtematike.', 'az': "Biz bu kağıtda Twitter istifadəçilərinin müxtəlif məsələləri modelləşdirmək üçün tərzimizi göstəririk: Məsələn, Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) ilə razılaşanlar da özgür ticarət ilə razılaşırlar. Bu tür bilgi çoxlu məsələlər arasında istifadə etmək üçün faydalı deyil, həmçinin halkı fikir araştırması, seçmə tədbirləri, seçmə kampanyaları və onlayn müzakirələri də dahil olmaqla müxtəlif reallı dünya uyğulamaları üçün faydalanır. İstifadəçilərin seçimlərini Twitter'da çıxartmaq üçün, insanların müəyyən məsələlər barəsində razılaşmaq və mübahisə etmək üçün dilli modelləri tasarlayırıq. Bu dil modelləri twet koleksiyonuna uygulayaraq, müxtəlif məsələlərə razılıq və razılıq verməyə razılıq edir. Əvvəlki işin məsələlərin tövsiyəsini təsdiqlədiyi təqdirdə, matriks fəaliyyəti olaraq modelləşdirmək məsələsini formalizə edirik: istifadəçilərin seçimlərini istifadəçi-məsələlərin matriksi olaraq təsdiqləyici və istifadəçilərin və məsələlərin hər ikisini də latent fəaliyyətlərin Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız hər ikisini göstərir ki, bizim təcrübəmiz istifadəçilərin yox seçimlərini təcrübə etmək üçün faydalıdır və məsələlərin latent vektör təcrübələrinin müvəffəqiyyəti müvəffəqiyyətlə müxtəlif tərz", 'bn': "We presents in this paper our approach for modeling inter-topic preferences of Twitter users: for example, 'those who agree with the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) also agree with free trade'.  এই ধরনের জ্ঞান শুধুমাত্র বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে প্রতিষ্ঠান সনাক্ত করার জন্য কার্যকর নয়, কিন্তু পাবলিক মতামত জরিপ, নির্বাচনী ভবিষ্যত, নির্বাচনী প্রচারণা এবং অ টুইটারে ব্যবহারকারীদের পছন্দ বের করার জন্যে আমরা ভাষাগত প্যাটার নকশা করি যেখানে লোকেরা একমত এবং নির্দিষ্ট বিষয় সম্পর্কে অস্বীকার করে (যেমন ‘এ প টুইটের সংগ্রহের কাছে এই ভাষাভাষিক প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করার মাধ্যমে আমরা বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের সাথে একমত এবং বিচিত্রের সাথে একমত। বস্তুর পরামর্শে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা ম্যাট্রিক্স ফ্যাক্টারিজেশন হিসেবে মডেল করার কাজ গঠন করি: ব্যবহারকারীর পছন্দ ব্যবহারকারী বিষয়ের ম্যাট্রিক্স হিসেবে প্রতিন আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের উপস্থিতির ক্ষেত্রে আমাদের উপস্থিতি ব্যবহারকারীদের পছন্দের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণের জন্যে উপকার রয়েছে এবং বিষয়ের", 'af': 'Ons stel in hierdie papier ons toegang vir die modellering van onderwerp-voorkeure van Twitter gebruikers: byvoorbeeld, "die wat ooreenkomstig met die Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) ook ooreenkomstig met vry handel". Hierdie soort kennis is nuttig nie alleen vir staatsonderskrywing oor veelvuldige onderwerpe nie, maar ook vir verskeie regte wêreld toepassings insluitend publieke opisieonderskrywing, keuse voorskou, keuse kampanje en online debate. In order to extract users\' preferences on Twitter, we design linguistic patterns in which people agree and disagree about specific topics (e.g. "A is completely wrong"). Deur die toepassing van hierdie lingvisse patrone na \'n versameling van tweets uitpak ons uitdrukkings wat ooreenkomstig en nie ooreenkomstig met verskillende onderwerpe. Inspireer deur vorige werk op item aanbeveling, ons formaliseer die taak van modellering inter-tema voorkeure as matriks faktoriseering: verteenwoordigheid van gebruikers se voorkeure as \'n gebruiker-tema matriks en mapeer beide gebruikers en onderwerpe na \'n latente funksie spasie wat die voorkeure aftrek. Ons eksperimentale resultate wys beide dat ons voorgestelde toegang is nuttig in voorskou van ontbrekende voorkeure van gebruikers en dat die latente vektor voorstellings van onderwerpe suksesvol inter-onderwerp voorkeure kodeer.', 'hy': "We presents in this paper our approach for modeling inter-topic preferences of Twitter users: for example, 'those who agree with the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) also agree with free trade'.  This kind of knowledge is useful not only for stance detection across multiple topics but also for various real-world applications including public opinion survey, electoral prediction, electoral campaigns, and online debates.  In order to extract users' preferences on Twitter, we design linguistic patterns in which people agree and disagree about specific topics (e.g., 'A is completely wrong').  Այս լեզվաբանական կաղապարները կիրառելով թվիթերի հավաքածուի վրա, մենք հանում ենք հայտարարություններ, որոնք համաձայն են և չեն համաձայնում տարբեր թեմաների հետ: Inspired by previous work on item recommendation, we formalize the task of modeling inter-topic preferences as matrix factorization: representing users' preference as a user-topic matrix and mapping both users and topics onto a latent feature space that abstracts the preferences.  Our experimental results demonstrate both that our presented approach is useful in predicting missing preferences of users and that the latent vector representations of topics successfully encode inter-topic preferences.", 'am': 'በዚህ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የቴዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች የጣቢያ ምርጫዎችን ማሳየት የደረጃችንን ሥርዓት እናቀርባታለን፤ ለምሳሌ፣ ‘የቴፕዩክ ተካክሎችን (TPP) በተስማማማሙ ነጻ ንግድ ደግሞ ይስማማማሉ’፡፡ ይህ ዓይነት እውቀት በብዙ ጉዳዮች ላይ ብቻ ለመቆጣጠር አይጠቅምም፥ ነገር ግን የህዝብ የጉዳይ ጉዳይ፣ የመረጥ ውይይት፣ የመረጫ ዘመቻ እና በመስመር የተቃውሞ ውይይቶችን እና በመስመር ውይይይት ውስጥ ያሉ የቅርብ ዓለም ፕሮግራሞች ደግሞ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በትዊተር ላይ የተጠቃሚዎችን ምርጫዎች ለማውጣት፣ ሰዎች በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ ይስማማማሉ እና የሚቃወሙበትንም የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህን ቋንቋዊ ምሳሌዎች ወደ ትዊተር ሰብስብ በመጠቀም፣ በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ጋር ተስማምተን እናካክለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ጉዳይ በማስታወቂያው ላይ በማስተካከል የጉዳዩ ምርጫዎችን ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Our experimental results demonstrate both that our presented approach is useful in predicting missing preferences of users and that the latent vector representations of topics successfully encode inter-topic preferences.', 'ca': "We presents in this paper our approach for modeling inter-topic preferences of Twitter users: for example, 'those who agree with the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) also agree with free trade'.  Aquest tipus de coneixement és útil no només per la detecció de postures en múltiples temes, sinó també per diverses aplicacions del món real, incloent l'enquesta de l'opinió pública, la predicció electoral, campanyes electorals i debats en línia. Per extreure les preferències dels usuaris a Twitter, dissenyem patrons lingüístics en els quals la gent està d'acord i no està d'acord sobre temes específics (per exemple, 'A està totalment equivocat'). By applying these linguistic patterns to a collection of tweets, we extract statements agreeing and disagreeing with various topics.  Inspired by previous work on item recommendation, we formalize the task of modeling inter-topic preferences as matrix factorization: representing users' preference as a user-topic matrix and mapping both users and topics onto a latent feature space that abstracts the preferences.  Our experimental results demonstrate both that our presented approach is useful in predicting missing preferences of users and that the latent vector representations of topics successfully encode inter-topic preferences.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme lähestymistapamme Twitter-käyttäjien aihepiirien välisten mieltymysten mallintamiseen: esimerkiksi ne, jotka ovat samaa mieltä Tyynenmeren alueen kumppanuuden kanssa, ovat samaa mieltä myös vapaakaupasta. Tällainen tieto on hyödyllistä paitsi kannanottojen havaitsemisessa useissa eri aiheissa, myös erilaisissa reaalimaailman sovelluksissa, kuten mielipidetutkimuksessa, vaalien ennustamisessa, vaalikampanjoissa ja verkkokeskusteluissa. Jotta voimme poimia käyttäjien mieltymykset Twitterissä, suunnittelemme kielellisiä malleja, joissa ihmiset ovat samaa mieltä ja eri mieltä tietyistä aiheista (esim. "A on täysin väärä"). Sovelltamalla näitä kielikuvioita twiittikokoelmaan otamme esiin väitteitä, jotka ovat eri aiheista samaa mieltä ja eri mieltä. Aiemman kohdesuositustyön innoittamana virallistamme aihepiirien välisten mieltymysten mallintamisen matriisifaktorisointina: käyttäjien mieltymysten esittäminen käyttäjän aihepiirimatriisiksi ja käyttäjien ja aiheiden kartoittaminen piilevään ominaisuustilaan, joka abstraktoi mieltymykset. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että esitelty lähestymistapamme on hyödyllinen käyttäjien puuttuvien mieltymysten ennustamisessa ja että aihepiirien piilevät vektoriesitykset koodaavat onnistuneesti aihepiirien välisiä mieltymyksiä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame oma lähenemisviisi Twitteri kasutajate teemadevaheliste eelistuste modelleerimiseks: näiteks "need, kes nõustuvad Vaikse ookeani piirkonna partnerlusega, nõustuvad ka vabakaubandusega". Sellised teadmised on kasulikud mitte ainult seisukohtade tuvastamiseks mitmes teemas, vaid ka mitmesuguste reaalsete rakenduste jaoks, sealhulgas avaliku arvamuse uuringute, valimiste prognoosimise, valimiskampaaniate ja online-debattide jaoks. Kasutajate eelistuste väljavõtmiseks Twitteris kujundame keelelisi mustreid, milles inimesed nõustuvad konkreetsetes teemades ja ei nõustu nendega (nt "A on täiesti vale"). Rakendades neid keelelisi mustreid säutsude kogumile, võtame välja avaldused, mis nõustuvad ja ei nõustu erinevate teemadega. Eelmisest objektisoovituse tööst inspireerituna vormistame teemadevaheliste eelistuste modelleerimise ülesande maatriksi faktorisatsioonina: esitame kasutajate eelistusi kasutaja-teema maatriksina ning kaardistame nii kasutajad kui teemad latentsesse funktsiooniruumi, mis võtab eelistusi kokku. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie esitatud lähenemisviis on kasulik kasutajate puuduvate eelistuste prognoosimisel ja et latentsed vektorikujutused teemadest kodeerivad edukalt teemadevahelisi eelistusi.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš přístup k modelování mezitématických preferencí uživatelů Twitteru: například "ti, kteří souhlasí s Transpacifickým partnerstvím (TPP), také souhlasí s volným obchodem". Tento druh znalostí je užitečný nejen pro detekci postojů napříč různými tématy, ale také pro různé reálné aplikace, včetně průzkumu veřejného mínění, předpovědi voleb, volebních kampaní a online debat. Abychom získali preference uživatelů na Twitteru, navrhujeme jazykové vzorce, ve kterých se lidé shodují a nesouhlasí na konkrétních tématech (např. "A je zcela špatně"). Použitím těchto jazykových vzorů na sbírku tweetů extrahujeme prohlášení, která souhlasí a nesouhlasí s různými tématy. Inspirováni předchozí prácí na doporučení položek formalizujeme úlohu modelování preferencí mezi tématy jako maticové faktorizace: reprezentovat preference uživatelů jako matice uživatelského tématu a mapovat uživatele i témata na latentní funkční prostor, který abstrahuje preference. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš prezentovaný přístup je užitečný při predikci chybějících preferencí uživatelů a že latentní vektorové reprezentace témat úspěšně kódují mezi tématy preference.', 'bs': "Predstavljamo u ovom papiru naš pristup modelima međutemnih preferencija korisnika Twitter-a: na primjer, 'oni koji se slažu sa partnerstvom Trans-Pacific (TPP) također slažu sa slobodnom trgovinom'. Takvo znanje je korisno ne samo za otkrivanje stanja u raznim temama, već i za različite realne aplikacije, uključujući istraživanje javnog mišljenja, predviđenje izbora, izborne kampanje i internetske debate. Da bismo izvadili preferencije korisnika na Twitter, dizajnirali smo jezičke obrasce u kojima se ljudi slažu i ne slažu se u vezi specifičnih tema (npr. 'A je potpuno pogrešna'). Primjenjujući te jezičke obrasce na kolekciju tweeta, izvlačimo izjave koje se slažu i ne slažu sa različitim temama. Uhvaćen prethodnim radom o preporuki predmeta, formaliziramo zadatak modeliranja međutemnih preferencija kao faktorizacija matrice: predstavljajući preferenciju korisnika kao matricu tema korisnika i mapiranje korisnika i tema na latentni prostor karakteristike koji apstrašuje preferencije. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju kako je naš predstavljeni pristup korisan u predviđanju nestalih preferencija korisnika i da latentne predstave vektora teme uspješno kodiraju međutemne preferencije.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo naš pristop k modeliranju medtematskih preferenc uporabnikov Twitterja: na primer, "tisti, ki se strinjajo s transpacifiškim partnerstvom (TPP), se strinjajo tudi s prosto trgovino". Ta vrsta znanja je uporabna ne le za odkrivanje stališč v več temah, temveč tudi za različne aplikacije v realnem svetu, vključno z anketo javnega mnenja, napovedovanjem volitev, volilnimi kampanjami in spletnimi debatami. Da bi izvlekli nastavitve uporabnikov na Twitterju, oblikujemo jezikovne vzorce, v katerih se ljudje strinjajo in se ne strinjajo glede določenih tem (npr. "A je popolnoma narobe"). Z uporabo teh jezikovnih vzorcev v zbirki tweetov izvlečemo izjave, ki se strinjajo in se ne strinjajo z različnimi temami. Na podlagi predhodnega dela o priporočilu postavk formaliziramo nalogo modeliranja medtematskih preferenc kot matrična faktorizacija: predstavljanje uporabnikovih preferenc kot matrično matriko uporabnikov in preslikavanje uporabnikov in teme na latentni funkcijski prostor, ki povzema preference. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš predstavljen pristop koristen pri napovedovanju manjkajočih preferenc uporabnikov in da latentne vektorske reprezentacije teme uspešno kodirajo intertematske preference.', 'ha': 'Munã bãyar da hanyoyinmu a cikin wannan takarda don mu sami misãlai masu amfani da masu amfani da Twitter: misali, "waɗanda suke yarda da Shiryarwa na Trans-Pasific (TPP) kuma suna yarda da fatauci na buɗaɗe". Wannan sani bai da amfani ba fãce dõmin gano stance a cikin madaidaita masu yawa, kuma amma dõmin shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin duniya masu gaskiya kamar surawi na mazaɓa, kuma abin da ake yi wa hisãbi na ɗabi\'a, da basĩri na takarda kura, da jãyayai masu shawara da ke cikin shirin Online. Dõmin ka nuna zaɓen masu amfani da shi kan Twitter, za mu ƙayyade misãlai na lingui wanda mutane ke yarda da su kuma bã su yin jãyayya a cikin masu buƙata (misali, "A\'a wata ɓata kawai"). Ga ku sami waɗannan misãlai cikin harshen zuwa mai haɗa jumuiya na Twitter, Munã fitar kauli da yin yarda da kuma bã da sãɓãni da wasu madaidaita. An Inspire aikin da ya gabãta a kan shawarar abun, muna shawarar aikin ka motsi masu motsi masu cikin-madaidaita kamar fabrikarin matrix: wakin fancy wa mai amfani da shi kamar matriks na-maɓallin mai amfani da kuma za\'a karya duk masu amfani da mazaɓa a kan wani space na takarda na ƙarani wanda ke kange zaɓen. MatariyinMu na jarrabi sun nuna duk cewa hanyarmu da ba ta iya amfani ba a gabatar wa\'anar masu amfani da kuma a sani cẽwa masu shiryuwa na ƙarshen hanyoyi na madaidaita ta sami babban rabo da zaɓen-masu buƙata.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé nggunakake karo paper iki dadi kanggo nggawe perspeknan karo temalan gambaran pengguna-temalan tuwih Tutuk: bisa Mesang, 'kuwi arkahané sing beraksi karo PNG-Pasika (PPP) iki dadi kegayatan negori wis bebas. Awakdhéwé iki kabèh tenan ngéwé kanggo nglanggar ngéwé ngerasakno karo paké sing apik tur maning, mengko aplikasi sing nggawe barang-sistem sing gawe kamulakno, ndhek-ndhek dhéwé, ndhek-ndhek dhéwé, tambah diumbang-tambah lan tambah ngé bisa nggolaké nggawe pengguna-pengguna nang Tutter, kéné disimpen iso nggambar tarjamahan ingkang sing rumangsa lan nganggo cara-cara sing nêmêr Ngawe ngubah aplikasi sistem lenggunaké iki ning kegambar tuwit, awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan lan nganggo-nggawe barang akeh tema. Coverage Rejection", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים בעיתון הזה את הגישה שלנו לדוגמא העדיפות בין נושאים של משתמשים בטוויטר: לדוגמא, "אלו שמסכימים עם השותפות Trans-Pacific (TPP) מסכימים גם עם סחר חופשי". סוג זה של ידע שימושי לא רק לגלות עמדות ברחבי נושאים רבים, אלא גם עבור שימושים שונים בעולם האמיתי כולל סקר דעת ציבורית, חיזוי בחירות, קמפייניות בחירות, ודיונים באינטרנט. כדי להוציא את העדיפות של המשתמשים בטוויטר, אנחנו מעצבים דפוסים שפתיים שבהם אנשים מסכימים ולא מסכימים בנושאים מסוימים (למשל, \'A הוא לגמרי טועה\'). על ידי שימוש בדפוסים שפתיים אלה לאספת טוויטים, אנו מוציאים הצהרות מסכימות ולא מסכימות עם נושאים שונים. בהשראה על ידי עבודה קודמת על המלצה של פריטים, אנו פורשמים את המשימה של הדוגמה של העדיפות בין נושאים בתור פעילות מטריקס: מייצג העדיפות של המשתמשים בתור מטריקס נושא משתמש ומפות גם משתמשים וגם נושאים למרחב תכונות חבוי שמאסטרקטיב את העדיפות. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שגישתנו המוצגת היא שימושית בחזוי העדיפות הנעדרות של משתמשים ושייצוגי הוקטורים הלאונטים של נושאים קודים בהצלחה העדיפות בין נושאים.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཌིས་ཌིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ཚོ་རྣམས་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་མེད་པར་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྲན་སྐོར་ལས་མང་ཆོག་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་སྤེལ་བ་དང་། ཌིས་ཌིར་ཐོག་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཕྱིར་འདོན་དགོས་ན་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་གཟུགས་རིས་འདོགས་དགོས་པ་མིན་འདོད། སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཞན་གཏོང་། Inspired by previous work on item recommendation, we formalize the task of modeling inter-topic preferences as matrix factorization: representing users' preference as a user-topic matrix and mapping both users and topics onto a latent feature space that abstracts the preferences. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་འཚོལ་བྱ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བ་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག"}
{'en': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'es': 'Generación de datos etiquetados automáticamente para la extracción de eventos a gran escala', 'ar': 'إنشاء البيانات المسمى تلقائيًا لاستخراج الأحداث على نطاق واسع', 'pt': 'Geração de dados rotulados automaticamente para extração de eventos em grande escala', 'fr': "Génération automatique de données étiquetées pour l'extraction d'événements à", 'ja': '大規模イベント抽出のための自動ラベル付けされたデータ生成', 'hi': 'बड़े पैमाने पर ईवेंट निष्कर्षण के लिए स्वचालित रूप से लेबल डेटा जनरेशन', 'zh': '自标数生,以大其事', 'ru': 'Автоматическое создание помеченных данных для извлечения крупномасштабных событий', 'ga': 'Giniúint Sonraí Lipéadaithe Uathoibríoch le haghaidh Eastóscadh Imeachta ar Mhórscála', 'ka': 'დიდი მოვლენის ექსტრაქციისთვის ავტომატურად ჩატვირთვალის მონაცემების შექმნა', 'el': 'Αυτόματη επισημασμένη παραγωγή δεδομένων για την εξαγωγή γεγονότων μεγάλης κλίμακας', 'hu': 'Automatikusan címkézett adatgyártás nagyméretű események kivonásához', 'it': "Generazione di dati etichettati automaticamente per l'estrazione di eventi su larga scala", 'kk': 'Үлкен масштабтау оқиғаны тарқату үшін автоматты түрде белгіленген деректерді құру', 'mk': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'lt': 'Automatiškai pažymėtų duomenų generavimas didelio masto įvykių ekstrakcijai', 'ms': 'Penjanaan Data Label Automatik untuk Ekstraksi Peristiwa Skala Besar', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത ഡേറ്റാ സംവിധാനം', 'mt': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'mn': 'Том хэмжээний үйл явдлын хайлтын автоматаар белгилсэн өгөгдлийн үүсгэл', 'ro': 'Generarea automată de date etichetate pentru extragerea evenimentelor la scară largă', 'no': 'Generering av automatisk merkelige data for stor skalering av hendingar', 'pl': 'Automatyczne generowanie danych etykietowanych do ekstrakcji zdarzeń na dużą skalę', 'sr': 'Автоматично назначена генерација дана за извуку великих масштаба случаја', 'ta': 'பெரிய அளவு நிகழ்வு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கு தானாகவே விளக்கப்பட்ட தரவு உருவாக்கம்', 'so': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Big Scale Event Extraction', 'si': 'ලොකු ස්කේල් සිද්ධ වෙන්න සිද්ධිය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලේබෙල් තිය', 'sv': 'Automatiskt märkt datagenerering för extraktion av stora händelser', 'ur': 'بزرگ اسکیل ایڈینٹ اکسٹرک کے لئے اپنا ذکر لیبل کیا گیا ہے', 'uz': 'Avtomatik yorliq maʼlumot Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'vi': 'Tự động Nhãn Đường Truyền dữ liệu cho việc tháo gỡ đại kiện vảy lớn', 'hr': 'Automatično označeno generiranje podataka za izvlačenje velike skale događaja', 'nl': 'Automatisch gelabelde gegevensgeneratie voor grootschalige gebeurtenisextractie', 'da': 'Automatisk mærket datagenerering til udtrækning af hændelser i stor skala', 'bg': 'Автоматично етикетирано генериране на данни за извличане на големи събития', 'de': 'Automatisch beschriftete Datengenerierung für die Ereignisextraktion in großem Maßstab', 'ko': '대규모 이벤트 추출에 사용되는 자동 태그 데이터 생성', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Generasi Data Label Otomatis untuk Ekstraksi Kejadian Skala Besar', 'sw': 'Generation of Data For Scale Event Extraction', 'tr': 'Ullakan Görniş Opşenler üçin otomatik etilen Maglumat Janlaşdyrmasy', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi automatik i të dhënave me etiketë për nxjerrjen e ngjarjeve me shkallë të madhe', 'az': 'Büyük ölçü Vaqialar Çıqışması üçün Avtomatik Etilmiş Veri Yenilməsi', 'bn': 'Automatically Labeled Data Generation for Large Scale Event Extraction', 'bs': 'Generacija podataka automatski označena za izvlačenje velikih događaja', 'cs': 'Automaticky označené generování dat pro extrakci událostí ve velkém měřítku', 'ca': 'Generació de dades etiquetades automàticament per extrair eventos a gran escala', 'fi': 'Automaattisesti merkitty tietojen generointi suuren mittakaavan tapahtumien purkamista varten', 'et': 'Automaatselt märgistatud andmete genereerimine suurte sündmuste ekstraheerimiseks', 'sk': 'Samodejno označeno ustvarjanje podatkov za ekstrakcijo dogodkov velikega obsega', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Automatically Labeled data Generation for big scale events extract', 'he': 'יצירת מידע מסוממת באוטומטית עבור יצירת אירועים ברמה גדולה', 'bo': 'Large Scale Event Extraction'}
{'en': 'Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data. However, hand-labeled training data is expensive to produce, in low coverage of event types, and limited in size, which makes supervised methods hard to extract large scale of events for knowledge base population. To solve the data labeling problem, we propose to automatically label training data for event extraction via world knowledge and linguistic knowledge, which can detect key arguments and trigger words for each event type and employ them to label events in texts automatically. The experimental results show that the quality of our large scale automatically labeled data is competitive with elaborately human-labeled data. And our automatically labeled data can incorporate with human-labeled data, then improve the performance of models learned from these data.', 'ar': 'تعتمد النماذج الحديثة لاستخراج الأحداث لمهام مثل ACE على التعلم الخاضع للإشراف للأحداث من البيانات الصغيرة المسمى يدويًا. ومع ذلك ، يعد إنتاج بيانات التدريب الموصوفة يدويًا مكلفًا ، في تغطية منخفضة لأنواع الأحداث ومحدودة الحجم ، مما يجعل الأساليب الخاضعة للإشراف من الصعب استخراج نطاق واسع من الأحداث لسكان قاعدة المعرفة. لحل مشكلة تصنيف البيانات ، نقترح تسمية بيانات التدريب تلقائيًا لاستخراج الأحداث عبر المعرفة العالمية والمعرفة اللغوية ، والتي يمكنها اكتشاف الحجج الرئيسية وتشغيل الكلمات لكل نوع حدث وتوظيفها لتسمية الأحداث في النصوص تلقائيًا. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أن جودة البيانات ذات التصنيف الواسع النطاق لدينا قادرة على المنافسة مع البيانات ذات العلامات البشرية المتقنة. ويمكن أن تتكامل بياناتنا المصنفة تلقائيًا مع البيانات التي تحمل علامات بشرية ، ثم تحسن أداء النماذج المستفادة من هذه البيانات.', 'pt': 'Modelos modernos de extração de eventos para tarefas como ACE são baseados no aprendizado supervisionado de eventos a partir de pequenos dados rotulados à mão. No entanto, os dados de treinamento rotulados à mão são caros para produzir, com baixa cobertura de tipos de eventos e limitados em tamanho, o que dificulta a extração de eventos em grande escala para a população da base de conhecimento por métodos supervisionados. Para resolver o problema de rotulagem de dados, propomos rotular automaticamente os dados de treinamento para extração de eventos via conhecimento de mundo e conhecimento linguístico, que pode detectar argumentos-chave e palavras-chave para cada tipo de evento e empregá-los para rotular eventos em textos automaticamente. Os resultados experimentais mostram que a qualidade de nossos dados rotulados automaticamente em grande escala é competitiva com dados rotulados elaboradamente por humanos. E nossos dados rotulados automaticamente podem ser incorporados a dados rotulados por humanos e, em seguida, melhorar o desempenho dos modelos aprendidos com esses dados.', 'es': 'Los modelos modernos de extracción de eventos para tareas como ACE se basan en el aprendizaje supervisado de eventos a partir de pequeños datos etiquetados a mano. Sin embargo, los datos de capacitación etiquetados a mano son costosos de producir, tienen poca cobertura de los tipos de eventos y tienen un tamaño limitado, lo que hace que los métodos supervisados sean difíciles de extraer a gran escala de eventos para la población de la base de conocimiento. Para resolver el problema del etiquetado de datos, proponemos etiquetar automáticamente los datos de entrenamiento para la extracción de eventos a través del conocimiento mundial y el conocimiento lingüístico, que pueden detectar argumentos clave y palabras de activación para cada tipo de evento y emplearlos para etiquetar eventos en textos automáticamente. Los resultados experimentales muestran que la calidad de nuestros datos etiquetados automáticamente a gran escala es competitiva con los datos elaborados con etiquetas humanas. Y nuestros datos etiquetados automáticamente se pueden incorporar con datos etiquetados por humanos y, a continuación, mejorar el rendimiento de los modelos aprendidos de estos datos.', 'fr': "Les modèles modernes d'extraction d'événements pour des tâches telles que ACE sont basés sur l'apprentissage supervisé des événements à partir de petites données étiquetées manuellement. Cependant, les données de formation étiquetées manuellement sont coûteuses à produire, avec une faible couverture des types d'événements et une taille limitée, ce qui rend les méthodes supervisées difficiles à extraire des événements à grande échelle pour la population de la base de connaissances. Pour résoudre le problème de l'étiquetage des données, nous proposons d'étiqueter automatiquement les données de formation pour l'extraction d'événements via la connaissance du monde et la connaissance linguistique, qui peuvent détecter des arguments clés et des mots déclencheurs pour chaque type d'événement et les utiliser pour étiqueter automatiquement les événements dans des textes. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que la qualité de nos données étiquetées automatiquement à grande échelle est compétitive par rapport aux données labellisées par l'homme. Nos données étiquetées automatiquement peuvent s'intégrer à des données étiquetées par des humains, puis améliorer les performances des modèles tirés de ces données.", 'ja': 'ACEのようなタスクのイベント抽出の現代的なモデルは、小さな手書きラベルデータからのイベントの監視学習に基づいています。しかしながら、手書きラベルのトレーニングデータは作成に費用がかかり、イベントタイプのカバレッジが低く、サイズが制限されているため、監視対象の方法は知識ベースの集団のために大規模なイベントを抽出することが困難である。データラベリングの問題を解決するために、ワールドナレッジと言語知識を介してイベント抽出のためのトレーニングデータを自動的にラベル付けすることを提案します。これは、キー引数を検出し、各イベントタイプの単語をトリガーし、テキスト内のイベントを自動的にラベル付けするために使用することができます。実験結果は、当社の大規模な自動ラベリングデータの品質が、精緻に人間がラベリングしたデータと競合していることを示しています。自動的にラベル付けされたデータは人間がラベル付けしたデータと組み込むことができ、これらのデータから学習したモデルのパフォーマンスを向上させることができます。', 'zh': '若 ACE 者,取模形于小手动表数监学。 然手动标数之生成成本高昂,事之覆盖率下,而大小有限,是使督法难以为知识库群体取大事也。 以数纪之,请因世知言语自标练数以取之,此可以检其要参数而发其单词,而用其自标文本也。 实验结果表明,吾大自标数与精心制作人工标数有竞争力。 吾自标数,可与人工标记之数合之,然后从而学之。', 'hi': 'एसीई जैसे कार्यों के लिए घटना निष्कर्षण के आधुनिक मॉडल छोटे हाथ से लेबल किए गए डेटा से घटनाओं के पर्यवेक्षित सीखने पर आधारित हैं। हालांकि, हाथ से लेबल किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा का उत्पादन करना महंगा है, घटना प्रकारों के कम कवरेज में, और आकार में सीमित है, जो ज्ञान के आधार आबादी के लिए घटनाओं के बड़े पैमाने पर निकालने के लिए पर्यवेक्षित तरीकों को कठिन बनाता है। डेटा लेबलिंग समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम विश्व ज्ञान और भाषाई ज्ञान के माध्यम से घटना निष्कर्षण के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा को स्वचालित रूप से लेबल करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो प्रत्येक घटना प्रकार के लिए महत्वपूर्ण तर्कों का पता लगा सकता है और शब्दों को ट्रिगर कर सकता है और उन्हें स्वचालित रूप से ग्रंथों में घटनाओं को लेबल करने के लिए नियोजित कर सकता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे बड़े पैमाने पर स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए गए डेटा की गुणवत्ता विस्तृत रूप से मानव-लेबल डेटा के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है। और हमारे स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए गए डेटा को मानव-लेबल डेटा के साथ शामिल किया जा सकता है, फिर इन डेटा से सीखे गए मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'Современные модели извлечения событий для таких задач, как Ace, основаны на контролируемом изучении событий из небольших данных, помеченных вручную. Тем не менее, при низком охвате типов событий и ограниченном размере, меченые вручную учебные данные являются дорогостоящими для производства, что затрудняет извлечение контролируемых методов из крупномасштабных событий для популяции базы знаний. Чтобы решить проблему разметки данных, мы предлагаем автоматически разметить обучающие данные для извлечения событий через мировые знания и лингвистические знания, которые могут обнаруживать ключевые аргументы и запускать слова для каждого типа событий и использовать их для автоматической разметки событий в текстах. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что качество наших крупномасштабных автоматически помеченных данных является конкурентоспособным по отношению к тщательно помеченным человеком данным. И наши автоматически помеченные данные могут включать в себя данные, помеченные человеком, а затем улучшать производительность моделей, изученных на основе этих данных.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha nua-aimseartha astarraingthe imeachtaí do thascanna ar nós ACE bunaithe ar fhoghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht ó shonraí beaga lipéadaithe. Mar sin féin, tá sé costasach sonraí oiliúna lámh-lipéadaithe a tháirgeadh, i gclúdach íseal ar chineálacha imeachtaí, agus teoranta ó thaobh méide de, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé deacair modhanna maoirsithe a bhaint as imeachtaí ar scála mór don daonra bonn eolais. Chun an fhadhb lipéadaithe sonraí a réiteach, tá sé beartaithe againn sonraí oiliúna a lipéadú go huathoibríoch le haghaidh eastóscadh imeachtaí trí eolas domhanda agus eolas teanga, ar féidir leo príomhargóintí agus focail a spreagadh le haghaidh gach cineál imeachta a bhrath agus iad a úsáid chun imeachtaí a lipéadú go huathoibríoch i dtéacsanna. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil cáilíocht ár sonraí ar mhórscála lipéadaithe go huathoibríoch iomaíoch le sonraí a bhfuil lipéadú daonna orthu go mionchruinn. Agus is féidir ár sonraí lipéadaithe go huathoibríoch a ionchorprú le sonraí lipéadaithe daonna, ansin feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht na samhlacha a foghlaimíodh ó na sonraí seo.', 'ka': 'მოვლენების გამოყენების მოდელები, როგორც ACE მოქმედებისთვის, დაბაზეულია მოვლენების მონაცემებისთვის მარტივი ხელის მონაცემებისთვის. მაგრამ მარტივი განათლების მონაცემები ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებელია, რომელიც მოვლენების ტიპების მარტივი დაახლოებით და ზომის ზომის შესახებ, რომელიც მონაცემების მეტყვების გა მონაცემების მარტივის პრობლემას გადაუწყვება, ჩვენ მინდა მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემების გამოყენება მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის ავტომატურად მარტივის მონაცემებისთვის, რომელი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი დიდი მანქანის საფუძველი მონაცემების კონპექტიური მონაცემები ადამიანის მონაცემებით კონპექტიურია და ჩვენი ავტომატურად მარტივი მონაცემები შეიძლება ადამიანის მარტივის მონაცემებით შეიყვანოთ, შემდეგ მარტივის მონაცემების მუშაობა, რომელიც ამ', 'hu': 'Az olyan feladatok eseménykivonásának modern modelljei, mint az ACE, az események felügyelt tanulásán alapulnak, kis kézzel jelölt adatokból. Azonban a kézzel jelölt képzési adatok előállítása költséges, az eseménytípusok alacsony lefedettsége mellett és korlátozott méretű, ami megnehezíti a felügyelt módszereket a tudásbázis populációja számára a nagyszabású események kivonását. Az adatcímkézési probléma megoldása érdekében azt javasoljuk, hogy a képzési adatokat automatikusan címkézzük az események kinyeréséhez világtudás és nyelvtudás segítségével, amely képes felismerni a kulcsfontosságú argumentumokat és kiváltó szavakat minden eseménytípushoz, és automatikusan feliratozni az eseményeket a szövegben. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a nagyméretű automatikusan címkézett adataink minősége versenyképes a kidolgozott emberi címkézett adatokkal. Az automatikusan címkézett adataink beépíthetők az emberi címkével ellátott adatokkal, majd javíthatják az ezekből az adatokból tanult modellek teljesítményét.', 'el': 'Τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα εξαγωγής συμβάντων για εργασίες όπως είναι η επιτηρημένη μάθηση συμβάντων από μικρά, χειρόγραφα δεδομένα. Ωστόσο, τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης που φέρουν το χέρι είναι ακριβά στην παραγωγή, με χαμηλή κάλυψη των τύπων γεγονότων και περιορισμένο σε μέγεθος, γεγονός που καθιστά τις εποπτευόμενες μεθόδους δύσκολο να εξαχθούν μεγάλης κλίμακας συμβάντα για τον πληθυσμό της βάσης γνώσης. Για την επίλυση του προβλήματος επισήμανσης δεδομένων, προτείνουμε να επισημάνουμε αυτόματα τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης για εξαγωγή γεγονότων μέσω παγκόσμιας γνώσης και γλωσσικής γνώσης, τα οποία μπορούν να ανιχνεύσουν βασικά επιχειρήματα και να ενεργοποιήσουν λέξεις για κάθε τύπο συμβάντος και να τα χρησιμοποιήσουν για να επισημάνουν αυτόματα γεγονότα σε κείμενα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η ποιότητα των μεγάλης κλίμακας αυτόματα επισημασμένων δεδομένων μας είναι ανταγωνιστική με τα λεπτομερώς επισημασμένα ανθρώπινα δεδομένα. Και τα αυτόματα επισημασμένα δεδομένα μας μπορούν να ενσωματώσουν με δεδομένα με ανθρώπινη σήμανση, στη συνέχεια να βελτιώσουν την απόδοση των μοντέλων που μαθαίνονται από αυτά τα δεδομένα.', 'it': "Modelli moderni di estrazione di eventi per attività come ACE si basano sull'apprendimento supervisionato degli eventi da piccoli dati etichettati a mano. Tuttavia, i dati di formazione etichettati a mano sono costosi da produrre, con scarsa copertura dei tipi di eventi e dimensioni limitate, il che rende difficile estrarre i metodi supervisionati su larga scala di eventi per la popolazione della base di conoscenze. Per risolvere il problema dell'etichettatura dei dati, proponiamo di etichettare automaticamente i dati di formazione per l'estrazione degli eventi tramite conoscenza mondiale e conoscenza linguistica, in grado di rilevare argomenti chiave e innescare parole per ogni tipo di evento e utilizzarli per etichettare automaticamente gli eventi nei testi. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che la qualità dei nostri dati etichettati automaticamente su larga scala è competitiva con i dati elaborati etichettati sull'uomo. E i nostri dati etichettati automaticamente possono essere incorporati con i dati etichettati dall'uomo, quindi migliorare le prestazioni dei modelli appresi da questi dati.", 'kk': 'ACE секілді тапсырмалар үшін әзіргі оқиғаларды тарқату үлгілері кішкентай қолмен жарлық деректерден оқиғаларды бақылау үшін негізделген. Бірақ қол жарлығындағы оқиғаның түрлері мен өлшеміне шектелген оқиғаның үлкен масштабын тартыру үшін, қол жарлығындағы оқиғалардың көп масштабын жасау үшін қиын болады. Деректерді жарлықтау мәселесін шешу үшін, әлемдік білім мен лингвистикалық білім арқылы оқиғаларды тарқату үшін оқиғаларды автоматты түрде белгілеу мәселесін қолданамыз. Бұл кілттер аргументтерін табу және әр Тәжірибелі нәтижелер автоматты түрде жазылған деректердің үлкен масштабының сапасы адамдардың жазылған деректерімен тәжірибелі. Біздің автоматты түрде жазылған деректеріміз адамдардың жазылған деректерімен біріктіре алады, содан кейін бұл деректерден үйренген үлгілердің істеуін жақсарту үшін.', 'mk': 'Модерните модели на екстракција на настани за задачи како ACE се базирани на надгледувано учење на настани од мали рачно означени податоци. Сепак, рачно означени податоци за обука се скапи за производство, со ниско покривање на типовите на настани и ограничена големина, што ги прави тешки надгледуваните методи да се извлечат големи настани за популацијата на базата на знаење. За да го решиме проблемот со означувањето на податоците, предлагаме автоматски да ги означиме податоците за обука за извлекување на настани преку светско знаење и јазичко знаење, кои може да ги детектираат клучните аргументи и да ги активираат зборовите за секој тип на настан и да ги користат за автоматски Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека квалитетот на нашите автоматски обележани податоци е конкурентен со тешко обележани податоци. И нашите автоматски означени податоци можат да се вклучат со податоци означени со човек, а потоа да се подобри резултатот на моделите научени од овие податоци.', 'ml': 'ACE പോലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചെറിയ കൈകൊടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സംഭവിക്കുന്നതി എന്നിട്ടും കൈകൊടുത്ത ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ട്രെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റായിട്ടുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിലയുണ്ട്, സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ തരത്തില്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ കറയും അത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, ലോകത്തിന്റെ അറിവും ഭാഷയിലുള്ള അറിവുമായി സംഭവിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ വലിയ സ്കേലിന്റെ സ്വയമായി കുറിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത്  നമ്മുടെ സ്വയമായി ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ലേബിള്\u200d ഡേറ്റായി ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, പിന്നീട് ഈ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudelli moderni ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti għal kompiti bħal ACE huma bbażati fuq tagħlim sorveljat ta’ avvenimenti minn dejta żgħira bit-tikketta bl-idejn. Madankollu, id-dejta tat-taħriġ bit-tikketta bl-idejn hija għalja biex tiġi prodotta, f’kopertura baxxa ta’ tipi ta’ avvenimenti, u limitata fid-daqs, li tagħmilha diffiċli li jiġu estratti metodi superviżi fuq skala kbira ta’ avvenimenti għall-popolazzjoni tal-bażi tal-għarfien. Biex issolvi l-problema tat-tikkettar tad-dejta, qed nipproponu li tikkettaw awtomatikament id-dejta tat-taħriġ għall-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti permezz tal-għarfien dinji u l-għarfien lingwistiku, li jistgħu jidentifikaw l-argumenti ewlenin u jiskattaw il-kliem għal kull tip ta’ avveniment u jużawhom biex tikkettaw l-avvenimenti fit-testi Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-kwalità tad-dejta ttikkettata awtomatikament fuq skala kbira tagħna hija kompetittiva ma’ dejta ttikkettata b’mod elaborat mill-bniedem. U d-dejta awtomatikament ittikkettata tagħna tista’ tinkorpora b’dejta ttikkettata mill-bniedem, imbagħad ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli li jitgħallmu minn din id-dejta.', 'ms': 'Model modern ekstraksi peristiwa untuk tugas seperti ACE berdasarkan pembelajaran yang diawasi peristiwa dari data yang ditabel tangan kecil. Namun, data latihan ditabel tangan mahal untuk dihasilkan, dalam perlindungan rendah jenis peristiwa, dan terhad saiz, yang menjadikan kaedah mengawasi sukar untuk mengekstrak skala besar peristiwa untuk populasi asas pengetahuan. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah label data, kami cadangkan untuk automatik label data latihan untuk ekstraksi peristiwa melalui pengetahuan dunia dan pengetahuan bahasa, yang boleh mengesan argumen kunci dan memicu perkataan untuk setiap jenis peristiwa dan menggunakannya untuk label peristiwa dalam teks secara automatik. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan kualiti data yang ditabel secara automatik pada skala besar kita adalah bersaing dengan data yang ditabel secara teliti manusia. Dan data yang ditabel secara automatik kita boleh memasukkan dengan data yang ditabel manusia, kemudian meningkatkan prestasi model yang belajar dari data ini.', 'lt': 'Moderni renginių gavimo modeliai tokioms užduotims kaip ACE grindžiami prižiūrimu renginių mokymu iš mažų rankomis pažymėtų duomenų. Tačiau rankiniu būdu paženklinti mokymo duomenys yra brangūs rengiant mažai aprėpiančius renginių tipus ir jų dydis yra ribotas, todėl prižiūrimi metodai sunku išgauti didelio masto renginius žinių bazės gyventojams. Siekiant išspręsti duomenų ženklinimo problem ą, siūlome automatiškai ženklinti renginių paieškos mokymo duomenis naudojant pasaulines žinias ir kalbines žinias, kurios gali nustatyti pagrindinius argumentus ir įjungti kiekvieno renginio tipo žodžius ir juos naudoti, kad renginiai būtų ženklinami tekstuose automatiškai. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų didelio masto automatiškai pažymėtų duomenų kokybė yra konkurencinga su išsamiai pažymėtais žmonėmis duomenimis. Mūsų automatiškai paženklinti duomenys gali būti įtraukti į žmogaus paženklintus duomenis, o vėliau pagerinti modelių, išmoktų iš šių duomenų, veiksmingumą.', 'mn': 'ACE шиг үйл ажиллагаанд орчин үеийн үйл явдлын загвар жижиг гараар нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн үйл явдлыг удирдах сургалтын үндсэн. Гэхдээ гараар нэрлэгдсэн дасгал өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг мэдлэг суурь хүн амын төрөлхтний маш их хэмжээний үйл явдлыг гаргахад үнэтэй. Бид өгөгдлийн лакетингийн асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд дэлхийн мэдлэг болон хэлний мэдлэг ашиглах үйл явдлын сургалтын өгөгдлийг автоматаар тэмдэглэх боломжтой санал болгож байна. Энэ нь чухал аргументуудыг олж, үйл явдлын төрлийн үг бүрт Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний том хэмжээний автоматаар нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн сайн чанар хүн төрөлхтний нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн талаар өрсөлдөг. Бидний автоматаар нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн хувьд нэмэгдүүлж, дараа нь эдгээр өгөгдлийн сурсан загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг сайжруулж болно.', 'no': 'Moderne modeller for hendingar- ekstrahering for oppgåver som ACE er basert på oversikt av læring av hendingar frå små håndmerket data. Dette er imidlertid håndmerket opplæringsdata for å produsere, i låg omdekking av hendingar og begrenset i storleik, som gjer overvakte metodar vanskeleg for å pakka ut stor skala av hendingar for kunnskapsbasepopulasjonen. For å løyse problemet med merkelappen, foreslår vi å automatisk merkelappe opplæringsdata for hendingar ved hjelp av verdenskunnskap og språk, som kan oppdaga nøkkelargumenter og utløysa ord for kvar hendingstype og bruka dei for å merkelappe hendingar i tekst automatisk. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at kvaliteten til store skala våre automatisk merkelige data er konkurrentivt med utviklare menneskelige data. Og våre automatisk merkelige data kan inkludere med menneskelige data, så forbedre utviklinga av modeller lært frå disse data.', 'ro': 'Modelele moderne de extragere a evenimentelor pentru sarcini precum ACE se bazează pe învățarea supravegheată a evenimentelor din date mici etichetate manual. Cu toate acestea, datele de formare etichetate manual sunt costisitoare de produs, în condiții de acoperire scăzută a tipurilor de evenimente și limitate ca dimensiune, ceea ce face ca metodele supravegheate să fie greu de extras la scară largă de evenimente pentru populația bazei de cunoștințe. Pentru a rezolva problema etichetării datelor, propunem etichetarea automată a datelor de instruire pentru extragerea evenimentelor prin intermediul cunoștințelor mondiale și al cunoștințelor lingvistice, care pot detecta argumentele cheie și pot declanșa cuvinte pentru fiecare tip de eveniment și le pot folosi pentru etichetarea automată a evenimentelor în texte. Rezultatele experimentale arată că calitatea datelor noastre etichetate automat la scară largă este competitivă cu datele etichetate pe om elaborat. Iar datele noastre etichetate automat pot fi încorporate cu datele etichetate de om, apoi pot îmbunătăți performanța modelelor învățate din aceste date.', 'sr': 'Moderni modeli izvlačenja događaja za takve zadatke kao što je ACE bazirani su na nadzornom učenju događaja iz malih podataka na rukama. Međutim, podaci o obuci na rukama su skupi za proizvodnju, u niskom pokrivanju vrsta događaja, i ograničene veličine, što čini nadzorne metode teškom izvlačenju velike skale događaja za populaciju baze znanja. Da bi riješili problem označavanja podataka, predlažemo automatski označiti podatke o obuci za ekstrakciju događaja kroz svetsko znanje i jezičko znanje, koji mogu otkriti ključne argumente i pokrenuti reči za svaki tip događaja i koristiti ih da označe događaje u tekstima automatski. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je kvalitet naše velike skale automatski označene podatke konkurentna sa detaljno ljudskim označenim podacima. Naši automatski označeni podaci mogu uključiti sa podacima označenim ljudima, a zatim poboljšati izvođenje modela naučenih iz ovih podataka.', 'si': 'ACE වගේ වැඩසටහන් සඳහා අධ්\u200dයානික විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පොඩි අත් ලෙබෙල් තොරතුරු වලින් සැකසුම් සිදු නමුත්, අත් ලේබල් කරපු ප්\u200dරධානය දත්ත ගොඩක් වැඩියි, සිද්ධ විදියට අඩු ආවරණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සීමාවිත විදියට දත්ත ලේබිල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලබිල් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලෝකය දන්න සහ භාෂ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත අපේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත තියෙන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සු ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත සමග, ඊට පස්සේ ම', 'pl': 'Nowoczesne modele ekstrakcji zdarzeń dla zadań takich jak ACE opierają się na nadzorowanej nauce zdarzeń z małych, ręcznie etykietowanych danych. Jednakże ręcznie oznakowane dane szkoleniowe są kosztowne w produkcji, przy niskim zasięgu rodzajów zdarzeń i ograniczonym rozmiarze, co sprawia, że nadzorowane metody utrudniają wydobycie dużej skali zdarzeń dla populacji bazy wiedzy. Aby rozwiązać problem etykietowania danych, proponujemy automatyczne etykietowanie danych szkoleniowych do ekstrakcji zdarzeń za pomocą wiedzy światowej i wiedzy językowej, które mogą wykryć kluczowe argumenty i wyzwalać słowa dla każdego typu zdarzenia i wykorzystać je do automatycznego etykietowania zdarzeń w tekstach. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że jakość naszych automatycznie etykietowanych danych na dużą skalę jest konkurencyjna z wyrafinowanymi danymi oznakowanymi przez człowieka. Nasze automatycznie etykietowane dane mogą łączyć się z danymi oznakowanymi przez człowieka, a następnie poprawić wydajność modeli wyciągniętych z tych danych.', 'sv': 'Moderna modeller för händelseutvinning för uppgifter som ACE bygger på övervakad inlärning av händelser från små handmärkta data. Handmärkta träningsdata är dock dyrt att producera, med låg täckning av evenemangstyper och begränsad till storlek, vilket gör övervakade metoder svåra att utvinna storskaliga händelser för kunskapsbaspopulationen. För att lösa problemet med datamärkning föreslår vi att utbildningsdata automatiskt märks för händelseutvinning via världskunskap och språklig kunskap, som kan identifiera nyckelargument och utlösa ord för varje händelsetyp och använda dem för att märka händelser i texter automatiskt. De experimentella resultaten visar att kvaliteten på våra storskaliga automatiskt märkta data är konkurrenskraftig med utförligt mänskligt märkta data. Och våra automatiskt märkta data kan integreras med mänskligt märkta data och sedan förbättra prestandan för modeller som lärts sig från dessa data.', 'ta': 'Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data.  ஆயினும், கையில் குறைந்த பயிற்சி தரவு, நிகழ்வு வகைகளின் குறைந்த coverage, மற்றும் அளவில் வரம்பு உள்ளது, அது அறிவு தளத்தின் மக்களுக்கு பெரிய நிகழ்வுகளை  @ info: whatsthis முயற்சி முடிவு எங்கள் தானாகவே குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல்களை மனித குறிப்பிட்ட தரவுடன் சேர்க்க முடியும், பின்னர் இந்த தரவிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட மா', 'so': 'Tusaale-qaabka dhaqdhaqaaqa dhacdooyinka sida ACE waxay ku saleysan yihiin barashada dhacdooyinka macluumaadka yar ee lagu qoray. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadka waxbarashada ee gacanta lagu qoro waa qaali in la soo bixiyo daboolka dhaqdhaqaaqa dhaqdhaqaalaha hoose iyo qiyaas, taasoo ka dhigaya qaabab la ilaaliyo oo aad u adag in la soo bixiyo dhacdooyin badan oo ku saabsan dadka aasaaska aqoonta ah. Si aan u xallino dhibaatada lagu qoro macluumaadka, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa in loo soo qoro macluumaadka waxbarashada dhacdooyinka sida loo soo saarayo aqoonta dunida iyo aqoonta luqada, taasoo awoodi karta argumentada furan iyo soo saari karo hadal kasta oo dhac ah nooc kasta ah iyo si automatic ah loogu isticmaali karo dhacdooyinka qoraalka. resultinta imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in taxadrada aad u weyn ee macluumaadkayaga lagu calaamayay ay is-khilaaf ku leedahay macluumaadka la qoray dadka. And our automatically labeled data can incorporate with human-labeled data, then improve the performance of models learned from these data.', 'ur': 'ACE جیسی کاروں کے لئے اخراج کے امروزی موڈل چھوٹے ہاتھ لکڑے دیٹے کے ذریعے حادثوں کی تعلیم پر بنیاد ہیں. لیکن ہاتھ لکھی ہوئی تطارین ڈیٹا بہت گران ہے کہ ایمنٹ کی طرح کے کم پورے میں اور اندازے کے اندر محدود ہوتے ہیں، جو علم بنسس جماعت کے لئے بہت بڑے اندازے کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے نظارت کی طریقوں کو مشکل بناتا ہے. ہم نے دنیا علم اور زبان علم کے ذریعے دنیا کے علم کے ذریعے دکھانے کے لئے دکھانے کے لئے ڈیٹا لیبلی مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو کلی ارجментوں کو پہچان سکتا ہے اور ہر ایڈیٹ ٹائپ کے لئے کلمات کو ترجیح کرسکتا ہے اور اسے متن میں اٹکل آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے بڑے اسکیل کی کیفیت اپنے ساتھ لیبل کیا گیا ڈاٹا مطابق انسان کے لیبل ڈاٹے کے ساتھ مطابق ہے اور ہماری خپلکاری لکھی ہوئی ڈیٹا انسان لکھی ہوئی ڈیٹا کے ساتھ شامل ہو سکتا ہے پھر ان ڈیٹوں سے سیکھی ہوئی نمونڈلوں کی عمدت کو بہتر کر سکتا ہے', 'uz': "Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data.  Lekin, qo'llangan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar, hodisa turlarining kichkina qarshi va oʻlchamini yaratish juda qiymati. Bu ta'lim asosiy sohalar sohasini ajratish uchun katta shakllarni ajratish usullarini boshqarish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Tekshirish natijalari esa bizning katta balandligimizning sifatida avtomatik qo'llangan maʼlumotning sifatida oddiy inson lab qolgan maʼlumot bilan rivojlanishga murakkab beradi. Va bizning avtomatik yozilgan maʼlumotlarimiz inson tuzilgan maʼlumotlar bilan birlashtirish mumkin, keyin bu maʼlumotdan o'rganilgan modellarning bajarishini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Mô hình hiện đại về việc khai thác các sự kiện cho các nhiệm vụ như ACE được dựa trên việc học giám sát các sự kiện từ các dữ liệu được dán nhãn bằng tay nhỏ. Tuy nhiên, dữ liệu huấn luyện được đánh dấu bằng tay rất đắt tiền để cung cấp, với mức độ thấp của các dạng sự kiện, và chỉ có kích thước nhỏ, làm cho các phương pháp giám sát khó khai thác quy mô lớn của các sự kiện dựa trên người dân. Để giải quyết vấn đề mô tả dữ liệu, chúng tôi đề nghị hiệu chỉnh các dữ liệu đào tạo sự kiện bằng kiến thức về các sự kiện trên thế giới và kiến thức ngôn ngữ, có thể phát hiện các lý luận chủ chốt và kích hoạt các từ cho mỗi kiểu các sự kiện và sử dụng chúng để tự động nhãn các sự kiện trong văn bản. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy chất lượng của quy mô lớn của chúng tôi tự động dán nhãn dữ liệu cạnh tranh với dữ liệu được đánh dấu con người. Và các dữ liệu được dán nhãn tự động của chúng ta có thể kết hợp với các dữ liệu được đánh dấu bằng con người, sau đó cải thiện hiệu suất của các mẫu học từ dữ liệu này.', 'bg': 'Модерните модели на извличане на събития за задачи като АСЕ се основават на контролирано обучение на събития от малки ръчно маркирани данни. Въпреки това, ръчно обозначените данни за обучение са скъпи за изготвяне, при ниско покритие на типовете събития и ограничени по размер, което прави надзорните методи трудно да се извлекат големи мащаби от събития за населението от базата на знания. За решаване на проблема с етикетирането на данни предлагаме автоматично етикетиране на обучителните данни за извличане на събития чрез световно познание и езиково познание, което може да открива ключови аргументи и да задейства думи за всеки тип събитие и да ги използва за автоматично етикетиране на събития в текстовете. Експерименталните резултати показват, че качеството на нашите широкомащабни автоматично маркирани данни е конкурентно на подробно маркирани от човека данни. И нашите автоматично обозначени данни могат да се включат с обозначени от човека данни, след което да подобрят ефективността на моделите, научени от тези данни.', 'da': 'Moderne modeller for hændelsesudtrækning til opgaver som ACE er baseret på overvåget læring af hændelser fra små håndmærkede data. Håndmærkede træningsdata er imidlertid dyre at producere, når der er lav dækning af begivenhedstyper og begrænset i størrelse, hvilket gør overvågede metoder vanskelige at udtrække store omfang af begivenheder for vidensbasens befolkning. For at løse problemet med datamærkning foreslår vi automatisk at mærke træningsdata til udtrækning af begivenheder via verdenskendskab og sproglig viden, som kan registrere nøgleargumenter og udløse ord for hver begivenhedstype og anvende dem til automatisk at mærke begivenheder i tekster. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at kvaliteten af vores store, automatisk mærkede data er konkurrencedygtig med udførligt menneskeligt mærkede data. Og vores automatisk mærkede data kan indarbejdes med menneskelige mærkede data og derefter forbedre ydeevnen af modeller, der læres ud fra disse data.', 'hr': 'Moderni modeli izvlačenja događaja za zadatke poput ACE bazirani su na nadzornom učenju događaja iz malih podataka označenih na rukama. Međutim, podaci o obuci na rukama su skupi za proizvodnju, u niskom pokrivanju vrsta događaja i ograničene veličine, što čini nadzorne metode teškom izvlačenju velike skale događaja za populaciju baze znanja. Da bi riješili problem označavanja podataka, predlažemo automatski označiti podatke o obuci za izvlačenje događaja putem svetskog znanja i jezičkog znanja, koji mogu otkriti ključne argumente i pokrenuti riječi za svaki tip događaja i koristiti ih da označe događaje u tekstima automatski. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je kvalitet naše velike skale automatski označene podatke konkurentna s detaljno ljudskim podacima. Naši automatski označeni podaci mogu uključiti s podacima označenim ljudima, a zatim poboljšati učinkovitost modela naučenih iz tih podataka.', 'id': 'Model modern ekstraksi peristiwa untuk tugas seperti ACE berdasarkan pembelajaran yang diawasi peristiwa dari data kecil yang ditabel tangan. Namun, data pelatihan ditabel tangan mahal untuk diproduksi, dalam menutupi rendah jenis peristiwa, dan batas dalam ukuran, yang membuat metode yang diawasi sulit untuk mengekstrak skala besar peristiwa untuk populasi dasar pengetahuan. Untuk memecahkan masalah label data, kami mengusulkan untuk otomatis label data latihan untuk ekstraksi peristiwa melalui pengetahuan dunia dan pengetahuan bahasa, yang dapat mendeteksi argumen kunci dan memicu kata-kata untuk setiap jenis peristiwa dan menggunakannya untuk label peristiwa dalam teks secara otomatis. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa kualitas dari skala besar kita yang otomatis ditabel data kompetitif dengan data yang secara elaborasi ditabel manusia. Dan data yang otomatis ditabel kita dapat memasukkan dengan data yang ditabel manusia, kemudian meningkatkan prestasi model yang belajar dari data ini.', 'ko': 'ACE 등 임무의 현대 이벤트 추출 모델은 작은 손으로 데이터를 표시하는 이벤트에 대한 감독 학습을 바탕으로 한다.그러나 수동으로 표시된 훈련 데이터의 제작 원가가 높고 사건 유형의 범위가 낮으며 규모가 제한되어 감독하는 방법이 지식 라이브러리 단체를 위해 대규모 사건을 추출하기 어렵다.데이터 표기 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 세계지식과 언어지식 자동 표기 훈련 데이터를 통해 이벤트 추출을 하고 모든 이벤트 유형의 관건적인 매개 변수와 촉발어를 검측하며 이를 이용하여 텍스트의 이벤트를 자동으로 표기할 수 있음을 제시했다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 대규모 자동 표기 데이터의 질과 정성들여 만든 인공 표기 데이터는 경쟁력이 있다.우리의 자동 표기 데이터는 인류가 표기한 데이터와 결합하여 이러한 데이터에서 배운 모델의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای مدرنی اخراج رویداد برای کارهای مانند ACE بر روی یادگیری تحت نظر گرفته از رویداد\u200cهای کوچک از داده\u200cهای یادگیری دستی است. با این حال، داده های آموزشی با برچسب\u200cهای دستی برای تولید کردن، در حفاظت پایین از نوع\u200cهای رویداد و اندازه\u200cای محدود است، که روش\u200cهای نظارت را سخت می\u200cسازد تا مقیاس بزرگی از رویداد\u200cها برای جمعیت\u200cهای بنیادی دانش خارج کنند برای حل مشکل برچسب داده\u200cها، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که داده\u200cهای آموزشی برای اخراج رویداده\u200cها از طریق دانش\u200cهای جهانی و دانش\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی را با خودکار برچسب کنیم، که می\u200cتواند ارجمندهای کلید را شناسایی کند و کلمات کلید را برای هر نوع رویداده\u200cها آغاز نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که کیفیت مقیاس بزرگ ما داده های خودکار برچسب شده با داده های مفصل با برچسب انسان مسابقه است. و داده\u200cهای خودکار برچسبیده شده ما می\u200cتوانند با داده\u200cهای انسان برچسبیده شده باشند، سپس فعالیت مدل\u200cهای یاد گرفته از این داده\u200cها را بهبود دهند.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa sasa wa utekelezaji wa tukio kwa kazi kama vile ACE unategemea kujifunza matukio yanayotokana na takwimu ndogo zilizowekwa kwa mkono. Hata hivyo, takwimu za mafunzo yanayowekwa mikononi ni gharama ya kutengeneza, kwa matukio ya chini ya aina ya matukio, na kwa kiwango kikubwa, ambayo inafanya njia zilizofuatiliwa vigumu kuondoa kiwango kikubwa cha matukio kwa ajili ya watu wa msingi wa maarifa. To solve the data labeling problem, we propose to automatically label training data for event extraction via world knowledge and linguistic knowledge, which can detect key arguments and trigger words for each event type and employ them to label events in texts automatically.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba kiwango cha takwimu kikubwa kinachoonyesha kwa kujitegemea ni ushindani na taarifa zinazoonyesha binadamu. Na takwimu zetu zilizoonyeshwa kwa faragha zinaweza kuunganisha na taarifa za binadamu, kisha kuboresha ufanisi wa mifano inayojifunza kutoka kwenye taarifa hizi.', 'nl': 'Moderne modellen van gebeurtenisextractie voor taken zoals ACE zijn gebaseerd op begeleid leren van gebeurtenissen uit kleine hand gelabelde gegevens. Handgelabelde trainingsgegevens zijn echter duur om te produceren, met een lage dekking van evenementen types en beperkt in omvang, waardoor begeleide methoden moeilijk zijn om grootschalige gebeurtenissen voor kennisbasepopulatie te extraheren. Om het gegevenslabelprobleem op te lossen, stellen we voor om trainingsgegevens automatisch te labelen voor gebeurtenisextractie via wereldkennis en taalkennis, die belangrijke argumenten kunnen detecteren en woorden kunnen triggeren voor elk gebeurtenistype en deze kunnen gebruiken om gebeurtenissen automatisch in teksten te labelen. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de kwaliteit van onze grootschalige automatisch gelabelde data concurrerend is met uitvoerig door mensen gelabelde data. En onze automatisch gelabelde gegevens kunnen worden geïntegreerd met menselijke gelabelde gegevens, en dan de prestaties van modellen die uit deze gegevens zijn geleerd, verbeteren.', 'de': 'Moderne Modelle der Ereignisextraktion für Aufgaben wie ACE basieren auf dem überwachten Erlernen von Ereignissen aus kleinen handbeschrifteten Daten. Allerdings sind handgekennzeichnete Trainingsdaten teuer in der Herstellung, bei geringer Abdeckung von Ereignistypen und begrenzter Größe, was es schwierig macht, überwachte Methoden zu extrahieren große Mengen von Ereignissen für die Wissensdatenbank Population. Um das Problem der Datenbeschriftung zu lösen, schlagen wir vor, Trainingsdaten für die Ereignisextraktion automatisch über Weltwissen und Sprachwissen zu kennzeichnen, die Schlüsselargumente erkennen und Wörter für jeden Ereignistyp auslösen und diese verwenden können, um Ereignisse in Texten automatisch zu kennzeichnen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Qualität unserer großflächig automatisch markierten Daten mit aufwändig human-labeled Daten konkurriert. Und unsere automatisch gekennzeichneten Daten können mit menschlich gekennzeichneten Daten integriert werden und dann die Leistung von Modellen verbessern, die aus diesen Daten gelernt werden.', 'tr': 'ACE ýaly zadlar üçin modern nusgalar taýýarlanmasy kiçi el etilgeli maglumatdan gelen öwrenmeleriň üstine dayanýar. Ýöne elimde etilen okuwçylyk maglumatlary düşürmek üçin gaty gymmatlydyr. Etrap tipleri düşürmek üçin ýok ýagdaýda ýok ýagdaýda hasaplanýar. Bu näme üçin gözetleýän ýagdaýlary bilgi esasy üçin uly çykmak kyn ýagdaýdyr. Maglumat etiketlemesi meseläni çözmek üçin, dünýäde bilgi we dillerini açmak üçin verileri otomatik olarak etiketlemegi teklif edip, bu nusgalary açyp biler we her evet türüne sözleri tetikleyip, olaryny tekstlerde olaryň etiketlemesini otomatik olarak işleýäris. Deneysel netijeler öz uly derejesimiziň hasaplanýan maglumatyň howpsyzlygyny ukyp görkezýär. Bizim otomatik etiket edilen verimiz insan etiket edilen verilerle birleşebilir we soňra bu verilerden öğrenmiş modellerin eserini geliştirebilir.', 'sq': "Modelet moderne të nxjerrjes së ngjarjeve për detyra si ACE janë bazuar në mësimin e mbikqyrur të ngjarjeve nga të dhënat e vogla me etiketë dore. Megjithatë, të dhënat e trajnimit me etiketë dore janë të shtrenjta për të prodhuar, në mbulim të ulët të llojeve të ngjarjeve dhe të kufizuar në madhësi, gjë që i bën metodat e mbikqyrura të vështira për të nxjerrë shkallë të madhe ngjarjesh për popullsinë e bazës së njohurive. Për të zgjidhur problem in e etiketave të të dhënave, propozojmë të etiketojmë automatikisht të dhënat e trajnimit për nxjerrjen e ngjarjeve nëpërmjet njohurive botërore dhe njohurive gjuhësore, të cilat mund të zbulojnë argumentet kyçe dhe të nxjerrin fjalë për çdo lloj ngjarje dhe t'i përdorin ato për të etiketuar ngjarjet në tekst Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se cilësia e të dhënave tona të shënuara automatikisht në shkallë të madhe është konkurruese me të dhënat e shënuara me njerëz. Dhe të dhënat tona të etiketuara automatikisht mund të përfshihen me të dhënat me etiketë njerëzore, pastaj të përmirësojnë performancën e modeleve të mësuara nga këto të dhëna.", 'af': 'Moderne modele van gebeurtenis uitvoer vir opdragte soos ACE is gebaseer op die ondersoekte leer van gebeurtenis van klein hand- label data. Name Maar, die hand-etiketeerde onderwerp data is koste om te produseer, in lae dekking van gebeurtenis tipes, en beperk in grootte, wat die onderwerp metodes moeilik maak om groot skaal van gebeurtenis vir kennis basis bevolking te uittrek. Om die data etiket probleem te los, voorstel ons om outomatiese etiket te label onderwerp data vir gebeurtenis uittrek deur wêreld kennis en lingwisiese kennis, wat sleutel argumente kan beskry en uittrek woorde vir elke gebeurtenis tipe en gebruik hulle om gebeurtenis in teks outomaties te etiket. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat die kwaliteit van ons groot skaal automaties gemerkte data is kompetief met uitwerklik menslike gemerkte data. En ons outomatiese etiketeerde data kan inkorporeer met mens-etiketeerde data, dan verbeter die prestasie van modele wat van hierdie data geleer het.', 'am': 'አዲስ የኢሜይል ምርጫዎች ከታናሽ እጁ-labeled ዳታ የሁኔታ ምርጫዎችን በመጠበቅ ላይ የተደረገ የአዲስ የሁኔታ ዓይነቶች አካባቢ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እጁ ተማርኮ ዳታ፣ የጉዳዩ ዓይነቶች ትንሽ እና መጠን አካባቢ እና መጠን አዋጅ ነው፡፡ የዳታ መግለጫ መፍታትን ለመፍታት፣ የዓለም እውቀት እና የቋንቋዊ እውቀት ማውቀትን ለጉዳዩ ማህበረሰብ ማቀናቀል እና ለሁሉም ጉዳይ ዓይነት ቃላትን ለማግኘት እና በጽሑፎች ውስጥ ጉዳዮችን ማቀናቀል እና በሐሳብ ለመስጠት እና ቃላትን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ የፈተናው ውጤቶች ትልቁ ቁመታችንን በራሱ የተለየ የዳታ ጥያቄ በአካባቢ የሰው አካባቢ መረጃዎች ጋር ይዋጋል፡፡ እናም በራሱ የተለየ መረጃችንን በሰው ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን ይጨምር ዘንድ ይችላል፣ ከዚያም ከዚህ ዳታዎች የተማሩትን የሞዴል ውጤት ያበጃል፡፡', 'hy': 'Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data.  Այնուամենայնիվ, ձեռքով նշված ուսումնասիրության տվյալները թանկ են ստեղծելու, ցածր պատահականության տեսակների ներկայացման և սահմանափակ չափերի մեջ, ինչը դժվարանում է վերահսկված մեթոդները գիտելիքի հիմնական բնակչության համար բազմաթիվ պատահ Տվյալների պիտակավորման խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք ինքնաբերաբար պիտակավորել իրադարձությունների վերացման ուսուցման տվյալները աշխարհային գիտելիքների և լեզվաբանական գիտելիքների միջոցով, որոնք կարող են հայտնաբերել կարևոր բանավեճերը և խթանել բառերը յուրաքանչյուր իրադարձություններ Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեծ մասշտաբի ավտոմատ պիտակուցված տվյալների որակը մրցակցում է մարդկային պիտակուցով զարգացած տվյալների հետ: Եվ մեր ավտոմատ պիտակուցված տվյալները կարող են ներառվել մարդկային պիտակուցված տվյալների հետ, հետո բարելավել այս տվյալներից սովորված մոդելների արդյունքը:', 'bs': 'Moderni modeli izvlačenja događaja za takve zadatke kao što je ACE bazirani su na nadzornom učenju događaja iz malih podataka na rukama. Međutim, podaci o obuci na rukama su skupi za proizvodnju, u niskom pokrivanju vrsta događaja, i ograničene veličine, što čini nadzorne metode teškom izvlačenju velike skale događaja za populaciju baze znanja. Da bi riješili problem označavanja podataka, predlažemo automatski označiti podatke o obuci za izvlačenje događaja putem svetskog znanja i jezičkog znanja, koji mogu otkriti ključne argumente i pokrenuti riječi za svaki tip događaja i koristiti ih da označe događaje u tekstima automatski. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je kvalitet naše velike skale automatski označene podatke konkurentna s detaljno ljudskim podacima. Naši automatski označeni podaci mogu uključiti s podacima označenim ljudima, a zatim poboljšati učinkovitost modela naučenih iz tih podataka.', 'az': 'ACE kimi işlər üçün modern modüllər olaraq çıxarılması kiçik əl etiketli məlumatlardan olan olaraq öyrənməyə dayanılır. Ancaq əl etiketli təhsil məlumatları, təhsil növlərinin düşük örtüklərində və böyüklüyündə sınırlı təhsil etmək üçün xərcləndirilən təhsil məlumatlarının böyük dəyişikliyini elm nüfusu üçün çəkməsi çətin edər. Məlumatları etiketləmə problemlərini çəkmək üçün, dünya elmi və dil bilimi vasitəsilə olaraq təhsil məlumatlarını avtomatik etiketləmək üçün təhsil edirik, ki anahtar argumentlərini keşf edər və hər vaxt növü üçün sözləri təşkil edər və onları məlumatlarda olaraq etiketləmək üçün istifadə edər Müxtəlif sonuçlar, böyük ölçülərimizin özünüzə etiketlənmiş məlumatların keyfiyeti insan etiketlənmiş məlumatları ilə müqayisədir. Və avtomatik etiketlənmiş məlumatlarımız insan etiketlənmiş məlumatları ilə birləşdirə bilər, sonra bu məlumatlardan öyrənmiş modellərin performansını yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'ca': "Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data.  Tanmateix, les dades d'entrenament etiquetades a mà són costoses per produir, amb baixa cobertura de tipus d'esdeveniments, i limitades en mida, i això dificulta l'extracció de mètodes supervisats a gran escala d'esdeveniments per a la població basada en coneixements. Per resoldre el problema d'etiquetar les dades, proposem etiquetar automàticament les dades d'entrenament per a l'extracció d'events mitjançant el coneixement mundial i el coneixement lingüístic, que poden detectar arguments clau i desencadenar paraules per cada tipus d'eventos i utilitzar-les per etiquetar events en textos automàticament. Els resultats experimentals mostren que la qualitat de les nostres dades etiquetades automàticament a gran escala és competitiva amb dades etiquetades elaboradament amb humans. I les nostres dades etiquetades automàticament poden incorporar-se amb dades etiquetades per humans, i millorar el rendiment dels models aprenguts d'aquestes dades.", 'cs': 'Moderní modely extrakce událostí pro úkoly, jako je ACE, jsou založeny na kontrolovaném učení událostí z malých ručně označených dat. Ručně označená školicí data jsou však nákladná na vytváření, při nízkém pokrytí typů událostí a omezené velikosti, což znamená, že kontrolované metody jsou obtížné extrahovat velké množství událostí pro populaci znalostní báze. Pro řešení problému označování dat navrhujeme automatické označení tréninkových dat pro extrakci událostí prostřednictvím znalostí světa a jazykových znalostí, které dokážou detekovat klíčové argumenty a spouštět slova pro každý typ události a použít je k automatickému označování událostí v textech. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že kvalita našich rozsáhlých automaticky označených dat je konkurenceschopná s detailně označenými lidmi. A naše automaticky označená data mohou začlenit s daty označenými lidmi a pak zlepšit výkon modelů získaných z těchto dat.', 'bn': 'ACE-এর মতো কাজের জন্য অনুষ্ঠানের উদ্দেশ্য মডেলটি ছোট হাত-লেবেলেড ডাটা থেকে অনুষ্ঠানের উপর নজর র রাখা হয়েছে। তবে হাতের লেবেলেড প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ব্যয়বহুল, অনুষ্ঠানের ধরনের কম কাভারেজে এবং আকারের সীমিত, যা জ্ঞানের বেসের জনসংখ্যার জন্য বিশাল পরিম বিশ্ব জ্ঞান এবং ভাষাগত জ্ঞানের মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সমাধান করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি, যা প্রত্যেক অনুষ্ঠানের ধরনের ক্ষেত্রে গুরুত্বপূ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের বিশাল পর্যায়ের মান স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত তথ্যের মান স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানুষে এবং আমাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত তথ্য মানুষের লেবেল ডাটার সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে, তারপর এই তথ্য থেকে শিক্ষিত মডেল', 'fi': 'ACE:n kaltaisiin tehtäviin perustuvat tapahtumien ohjattuun oppimiseen pienistä käsin merkityistä tiedoista. Käsin merkittyjen koulutustietojen tuottaminen on kuitenkin kallista, koska tapahtumatyypit ovat vähäisiä ja niiden koko on rajallinen, minkä vuoksi valvottuja menetelmiä on vaikea saada selville tietopohjaväestön suurista tapahtumista. Datan merkintäongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme, että koulutustiedot merkitään automaattisesti maailmantuntemuksen ja kielellisen tietämyksen avulla, mikä tunnistaa kunkin tapahtumatyypin keskeiset argumentit ja laukaisee sanat ja käyttää niitä merkitsemään tapahtumia automaattisesti teksteihin. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että suuren mittakaavan automaattisesti merkityn datamme laatu kilpailee yksityiskohtaisesti ihmismerkityn datan kanssa. Automaattisesti merkitty tietomme voidaan yhdistää ihmisen merkitsemiin tietoihin ja parantaa näistä tiedoista opittujen mallien suorituskykyä.', 'et': 'Kaasaegsed mudelid sündmuste ekstraheerimiseks selliste ülesannete jaoks nagu ACE põhinevad sündmuste järelevalvel väikeste käsitsi märgistatud andmete põhjal. Käsitsi märgistatud koolitusandmete koostamine on siiski kallis, kuna sündmuste tüüp on väike ja suurus on piiratud, mistõttu on teadmistebaasi populatsiooni jaoks raske välja tuua järelevalvemeetodeid. Andmete märgistamise probleemi lahendamiseks teeme ettepaneku märgistada automaatselt koolitusandmed sündmuste ekstraheerimiseks maailma- ja keeleteadmiste kaudu, mis suudab tuvastada iga sündmuse tüübi põhiargumendid ja käivitada sõnad ning kasutada neid sündmuste automaatseks märgistamiseks tekstides. Katsetulemused näitavad, et meie suuremahuliste automaatselt märgistatud andmete kvaliteet konkureerib põhjalikult inimmärgistatud andmetega. Ja meie automaatselt märgistatud andmed võivad ühendada inimmärgistatud andmetega ja seejärel parandada nendest andmetest õppitud mudelite jõudlust.', 'jv': 'Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness To lembane data label Rejaleng kapan sing paling nggambar kuwi nggambar kuwi adalah dhéwé, dadi sing beraksi karo data sing beraksi amben Kita pernik-pernik uwong sing dirangkalakno dadi sing isa gambaran karo data sing berarti dadi, lan mulai nggawe barang model sing nyimpen karo data sing iki.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin shirin nuna wa masu nuna wa aikin da ake yi wa shirin kai yanzu a kan tsare wa masu sani daga data ƙarami da aka rubũta shi. A lokacin da aka yi wa tsarin da hannayen da aka rubũta shi, yana da nau'in zartar da shi, kuma yana da girma, da kuma yana da ƙwaɗawa, wanda za'a yi tsaron shiryoyin da aka tsare shi, ya zama mai ƙunci dõmin ya fitar girma girma wa halin wahalar wa maɓallin ilmi. To, don mu buɗe wa masu shiryin matsayin da aka rubũta, za'a buƙata umarni farat ɗaya da za'a rubutu data wa masu shiryarwa wa masu shiryuwa da shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka a bayan kunan duniya da ilmi na linguistic, wanda yana iya gane argument masu buƙata kuma za'a fara magana wa nau'in duk birane kuma ke amfani da su zuwa ayukan ayuka na takardan Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa, sifar data na girma farat ɗaya da aka rubũta shi, yana yin ƙiyayya da data da aka rubũta na mutum. Kuma data na da aka rubũta farat ɗaya yana iya haɗi da data na da mutum, sa'an nan kuma ya kyautata aikin misãlai da aka sanar daga wannan data.", 'he': 'דוגמנים מודרניים של חיפוש אירועים למשימות כמו ACE מבוססים על למידה מבוקשת של אירועים ממידות קטנות. עם זאת, נתוני האימונים עם תווית יד יקרים לייצור, בכיסוי נמוך של סוגי אירועים, ומגבול בגודל, מה שמקשה לשיטות מבוקשות להוציא מידה גדולה של אירועים לאוכלוסיית בסיס הידע. כדי לפתור את בעיית תווית המידע, אנו מציעים לתייג אוטומטית את נתוני האימונים לחלץ אירועים דרך ידע עולמי וידע שפתי, שיכולים לגלות טיעונים מפתחיים ולהפעיל מילים לכל סוג אירועים ולהשתמש בהם לתייג אירועים בטקסטים באוטומטית. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות כי איכות המידע הגדול שלנו המתווים אוטומטית הוא תחרותי עם נתונים המתווים בני אדם. והנתונים המתוויקים באוטומטית שלנו יכולים להכיל עם נתונים המתוויקים על האדם, ואז לשפר את ההופעה של דוגמנים שלמדו מהנתונים האלה.', 'sk': 'Sodobni modeli ekstrakcije dogodkov za naloge, kot je ACE, temeljijo na nadzorovanem učenju dogodkov iz majhnih ročno označenih podatkov. Vendar pa je priprava ročno označenih podatkov o usposabljanju draga, saj so vrste dogodkov nizko pokriti in so omejeni, zaradi česar je nadzorovane metode težko pridobiti velik obseg dogodkov za populacijo baze znanja. Za rešitev problema označevanja podatkov predlagamo samodejno označevanje podatkov o usposabljanju za pridobivanje dogodkov prek svetovnega znanja in jezikovnega znanja, ki lahko zazna ključne argumente in sproži besede za vsako vrsto dogodka ter jih uporabi za samodejno označevanje dogodkov v besedilih. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da je kakovost naših obsežnih samodejno označenih podatkov konkurenčna z natančno označenimi podatki. Naši samodejno označeni podatki lahko vključijo s podatki, označenimi s človekom, in nato izboljšajo učinkovitost modelov, pridobljenih iz teh podatkov.', 'bo': 'Modern models of event extraction for tasks like ACE are based on supervised learning of events from small hand-labeled data. However, hand-labeled training data is expensive to produce, in low coverage of event types, and limited in size, which makes supervised methods hard to extract large scale of events for knowledge base population. To solve the data labeling problem, we propose to automatically label training data for event extraction via world knowledge and linguistic knowledge, which can detect key arguments and trigger words for each event type and employ them to label events in texts automatically. experimental results show that the quality of our large scale automatically labeled data is competitive with elaborate human-labeled data. ང་ཚོའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Time Expression Analysis and Recognition Using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'ar': 'تحليل تعبيرات الوقت والتعرف عليها باستخدام أنواع الرموز النحوية والقواعد الإرشادية العامة', 'fr': "Analyse et reconnaissance des expressions temporelles à l'aide de types de jetons syntaxiques et de règles heuristiques générales", 'es': 'Análisis y reconocimiento de expresiones de tiempo mediante tipos de tokens sintácticos y reglas heurísticas generales', 'pt': 'Análise e reconhecimento de expressão de tempo usando tipos de token sintático e regras heurísticas gerais', 'ja': '構文トークンタイプと一般的なヒューリスティックルールを使用した時間表現分析と認識', 'zh': '以句法表类,与凡启发式则之时表达式分别之', 'hi': 'समय अभिव्यक्ति विश्लेषण और वाक्यात्मक टोकन प्रकार और सामान्य ह्युरिस्टिक नियमों का उपयोग करके मान्यता', 'ru': 'Анализ и распознавание выражений времени с использованием типов синтаксических маркеров и общих эвристических правил', 'ga': 'Anailís agus Aithint Slonn Ama ag Úsáid Cineálacha Comhartha Comhréire agus Rialacha Ginearálta Heorastúla', 'ka': 'დროის გამოსახულების ანალიზი და განახულების გამოყენება სინტაქტიკური ტოკენის ტიპები და გენერალური ჰერისტიკური წესები', 'el': 'Ανάλυση και Αναγνώριση Χρόνου με τη χρήση Συντονικών Τύπων Σημάτων και Γενικών Χειριστικών Κανόνων', 'hu': 'Időkifejezés elemzés és felismerés szintaktikus tokentípusok és általános heurisztikai szabályok használatával', 'kk': 'Синтактикалық токен түрлерін және жалпы жұмыс ережелерді қолданатын уақыт өрнектерін анализ және анықтау', 'it': "Analisi e riconoscimento dell'espressione del tempo utilizzando tipi di token sintattici e regole euristiche generali", 'lt': 'Laiko išraiškos analizė ir pripažinimas naudojant sintaktinius požymių tipus ir bendrąsias heuristines taisykles', 'mk': 'Анализа и признавање на временски експрес користејќи синтактички типови на токени и генерални хеуристички правила', 'ms': 'Analisi dan Pengenalan Ekspresi Masa Menggunakan Jenis Token Sintaktik dan Peraturan Heuristik Umum', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്ക് ടോക്കെന്\u200d തരം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സമയം എക്സ്പ്രഷന്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'Analiżi u Rikonoxximent tal-Espressjoni tal-Ħin bl-Użu tat-Tipi Sintattiċi tat-Token u r-Regoli Ġenerali tal-Eristika', 'mn': 'Хугацааны илэрхийллийн шинжилгээ болон танилцуулалт Синтактик Токен төрлүүд болон Ерөнхийлөгчийн Эуристик дүрмийг ашиглах', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Analiza i rozpoznawanie wyrażeń czasu za pomocą typów tokenów syntaktycznych i ogólnych reguł heurystycznych', 'ro': 'Analiza și recunoașterea expresiei timpului utilizând tipuri de jetoane sintactice și reguli euristice generale', 'sr': 'Analiza i prepoznavanje vremenskog izraza korištenje sintaktičkih tokenih tipova i generalnih Heurističkih pravila', 'si': 'වෙලාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය හෙයුරිස්ටික් නීතිය භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Analysis and Recognition using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'sv': 'Analys och igenkänning av tidsuttryck med hjälp av syntaktiska tokentyper och allmänna heuristiska regler', 'ta': 'நேரம் வெளிப்பாடு ஆராய்வு மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு தொகுதி வகைகள் மற்றும் பொது உயரமான விதிகளை பயன்படுத்து', 'ur': 'Time Expression Analysis and Recognition Using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình phân tích và nhận dạng Từ vựng theo cấu trúc tâm pháp và luật pháp phổ biến', 'bg': 'Анализ и разпознаване на времеви изрази с помощта на типове синтактични токени и общи евристични правила', 'nl': 'Analyse en herkenning van tijdexpressie met behulp van syntactische tokentypen en algemene heuristische regels', 'da': 'Analyse og genkendelse af tidsudtryk ved hjælp af syntaktiske tokentyper og generelle heuristiske regler', 'hr': 'Analiza i prepoznavanje vremenskog izraza za upotrebu sintaktičkih tipa tokena i generalnih Heurističkih pravila', 'de': 'Zeitausdrücksanalyse und -erkennung unter Verwendung syntaktischer Tokentypen und allgemeiner heuristischer Regeln', 'id': 'Time Expression Analysis and Recognition Using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'fa': 'تحلیل و شناسایی واژه\u200cهای زمان با استفاده از نوع\u200cهای توکین\u200cهای سنتاکتیک و قانون\u200cهای حیریت ژنرال', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Time Expression and Recognition using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'ko': '문법 표기 유형과 일반 계발식 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 시간 표현식 분석과 식별', 'af': 'Tyd Uitdrukking Analiseer en Herkenning gebruik Sintaktieke Token Tipe en Algemene Heuristiese Reëls', 'tr': 'Wagtyň Görniş Taýýarlama we Tanamak Sentaktik Token Taýplary we Umumy Heuristik Därleri ullanýar', 'am': 'የመስኮት አቀማመጥ እና ማስታወቂያ', 'sq': 'Analiza dhe njohje e ekspresionit të kohës duke përdorur llojet sintaktike të tokës dhe rregullat e përgjithshme heuristike', 'hy': 'Ժամանակի արտահայտության վերլուծությունը և ճանաչելը, օգտագործելով սինտակտիկ նշաններ և ընդհանուր հուրիստիկ կանոններ', 'az': 'Vaxt 캻fad톛si Analizi v톛 Tan캼ma Sintaktik Token T칲rl톛ri v톛 General Heuristik Kurallar캼', 'bn': 'সময় এক্সপ্রেশন বিশ্লেষণ এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক টোকেন টাইপ এবং সাধারণ হিউরিস্টিক নীতি ব্যবহার করে স্বীকার করুন', 'bs': 'Analiza i prepoznavanje vremenskog izraza korišćenja sintaktičkih tokenih tipova i generalnih Heurističkih pravila', 'fi': 'Aikailmaisun analysointi ja tunnistaminen synteettisten merkkien tyyppien ja yleisten heurististen sääntöjen avulla', 'cs': 'Analýza a rozpoznávání časového výrazu pomocí syntaktických typů tokenů a obecných heuristických pravidel', 'ca': "Anàlisi i reconeixement de l'expressió del temps utilitzant tipus de toques sintàtics i regles heurístiques generals", 'et': 'Ajaavalduste analüüs ja tuvastamine süntaktiliste tokenite tüüpide ja üldiste heuristiliste reeglite abil', 'jv': 'Time Expression', 'sk': 'Analiza in prepoznavanje časovnih izrazov z uporabo sintaktičnih vrst žetonov in splošnih heurističnih pravil', 'he': 'Analysis and Recognition of Time Expression Using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules', 'ha': 'Analyze and Recognition', 'bo': 'Time Expression Analysis and Recognition Using Syntactic Token Types and General Heuristic Rules'}
{'en': 'Extracting time expressions from free text is a fundamental task for many applications. We analyze the time expressions from four datasets and find that only a small group of words are used to express time information, and the words in time expressions demonstrate similar syntactic behaviour. Based on the findings, we propose a type-based approach, named SynTime, to recognize time expressions. Specifically, we define three main syntactic token types, namely time token, modifier, and numeral, to group time-related regular expressions over tokens. On the types we design general heuristic rules to recognize time expressions. In recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions. As a light-weight rule-based tagger, SynTime runs in real time, and can be easily expanded by simply adding keywords for the text of different types and of different domains. Experiment on benchmark datasets and tweets data shows that SynTime outperforms state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'يعد استخراج تعابير الوقت من النص الحر مهمة أساسية للعديد من التطبيقات. نقوم بتحليل تعبيرات الوقت من أربع مجموعات بيانات ووجدنا أنه يتم استخدام مجموعة صغيرة فقط من الكلمات للتعبير عن معلومات الوقت ، وتوضح الكلمات في تعبيرات الوقت سلوكًا نحويًا مشابهًا. بناءً على النتائج ، نقترح نهجًا قائمًا على النوع ، يسمى SynTime ، للتعرف على تعبيرات الوقت. على وجه التحديد ، نحدد ثلاثة أنواع رئيسية من الرموز النحوية ، وهي رمز الوقت والمعدِّل والأرقام لتجميع التعبيرات العادية المرتبطة بالوقت على الرموز المميزة. فيما يتعلق بالأنواع ، نصمم قواعد إرشادية عامة للتعرف على تعبيرات الوقت. في التعرف ، يحدد SynTime أولاً الرموز الزمنية من النص الخام ، ثم يبحث في المناطق المحيطة بها عن المعدلات والأرقام لتشكيل مقاطع الوقت ، وأخيراً يدمج مقاطع الوقت مع تعبيرات الوقت. بصفته أداة تمييز تستند إلى قواعد خفيفة الوزن ، يتم تشغيل SynTime في الوقت الفعلي ، ويمكن توسيعه بسهولة عن طريق إضافة كلمات رئيسية لنص من أنواع مختلفة ونطاقات مختلفة. تُظهر التجربة على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية وبيانات التغريدات أن SynTime يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'expressions temporelles à partir de texte libre est une tâche fondamentale pour de nombreuses applications. Nous analysons les expressions temporelles de quatre ensembles de données et constatons que seul un petit groupe de mots est utilisé pour exprimer des informations temporelles, et que les mots dans les expressions temporelles présentent un comportement syntaxique similaire. Sur la base de ces résultats, nous proposons une approche basée sur le type, nommée SynTime, pour reconnaître les expressions temporelles. Plus précisément, nous définissons trois principaux types de jetons syntaxiques, à savoir le jeton temporel, le modificateur et le numéral, pour regrouper les expressions régulières liées au temps sur les jetons. Pour les types, nous concevons des règles heuristiques générales pour reconnaître les expressions temporelles. En reconnaissance, SynTime identifie d'abord les jetons temporels à partir du texte brut, puis recherche dans leur environnement des modificateurs et des chiffres pour former des segments temporels, puis fusionne les segments temporels avec des expressions temporelles. En tant que tagger léger basé sur des règles, SynTime fonctionne en temps réel et peut être facilement développé en ajoutant simplement des mots-clés pour le texte de différents types et de différents domaines. Des expériences sur des ensembles de données de référence et des données de tweets montrent que SynTime surpasse les méthodes de pointe.", 'es': 'La extracción de expresiones temporales del texto libre es una tarea fundamental para muchas aplicaciones. Analizamos las expresiones temporales de cuatro conjuntos de datos y descubrimos que solo se utiliza un pequeño grupo de palabras para expresar la información horaria, y que las palabras de las expresiones temporales demuestran un comportamiento sintáctico similar. Basándonos en los hallazgos, proponemos un enfoque basado en tipos, denominado SynTime, para reconocer las expresiones de tiempo. Específicamente, definimos tres tipos principales de tokens sintácticos, a saber, token de tiempo, modificador y numeral, para agrupar expresiones regulares relacionadas con el tiempo sobre tokens. En los tipos, diseñamos reglas heurísticas generales para reconocer expresiones de tiempo. En reconocimiento, SynTime primero identifica los símbolos de tiempo del texto sin procesar, luego busca en sus alrededores modificadores y números para formar segmentos de tiempo y, finalmente, fusiona los segmentos de tiempo con expresiones de tiempo. Como un etiquetador ligero basado en reglas, SynTime se ejecuta en tiempo real y se puede expandir fácilmente simplemente agregando palabras clave para el texto de diferentes tipos y dominios. Experimentos con conjuntos de datos de referencia y datos de tweets muestran que SynTime supera a los métodos más avanzados.', 'pt': 'Extrair expressões de tempo de texto livre é uma tarefa fundamental para muitas aplicações. Analisamos as expressões de tempo de quatro conjuntos de dados e descobrimos que apenas um pequeno grupo de palavras é usado para expressar informações de tempo, e as palavras em expressões de tempo demonstram comportamento sintático semelhante. Com base nos resultados, propomos uma abordagem baseada em tipos, chamada SynTime, para reconhecer expressões de tempo. Especificamente, definimos três tipos principais de token sintático, ou seja, token de tempo, modificador e numeral, para agrupar expressões regulares relacionadas ao tempo sobre tokens. Nos tipos, projetamos regras heurísticas gerais para reconhecer expressões de tempo. Em reconhecimento, o SynTime primeiro identifica os tokens de tempo do texto bruto, depois pesquisa seus arredores em busca de modificadores e numerais para formar segmentos de tempo e, finalmente, mescla os segmentos de tempo com expressões de tempo. Como um tagger leve baseado em regras, o SynTime é executado em tempo real e pode ser facilmente expandido simplesmente adicionando palavras-chave para o texto de diferentes tipos e domínios. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados de benchmark e dados de tweets mostram que o SynTime supera os métodos de última geração.', 'ja': 'フリーテキストから時間表現を抽出することは、多くのアプリケーションの基本的な作業です。 4つのデータセットから時間表現を分析すると、時間情報を表現するために使用される単語のグループはわずかであり、時間表現の単語は同様の構文行動を示していることがわかります。 調査結果に基づいて、時間式を認識するためのSynTimeという名前のタイプベースのアプローチを提案します。 具体的には、時間に関連する正規表現をトークン上にグループ化するために、時間トークン、修飾子、および数値の3つの主な構文トークンタイプを定義します。 時間表現を認識する一般的なヒューリスティックルールを設計します。 認識するために、SynTimeはまず生のテキストから時間トークンを識別し、その周囲の修飾子と数字を検索して時間セグメントを形成し、最後に時間セグメントを統合して時間式を生成します。 軽量ルールベースのタグとして、SynTimeはリアルタイムで実行され、さまざまなタイプとさまざまなドメインのテキストにキーワードを追加するだけで簡単に拡張できます。 ベンチマークデータセットとツイートデータの実験では、SynTimeが最先端の方法よりも優れていることが示されています。', 'ru': 'Извлечение выражений времени из свободного текста является фундаментальной задачей для многих приложений. Мы анализируем выражения времени из четырех наборов данных и обнаруживаем, что только небольшая группа слов используется для выражения информации о времени, а слова в выражениях времени демонстрируют аналогичное синтаксическое поведение. Основываясь на выводах, мы предлагаем основанный на типе подход, называемый SynTime, для распознавания выражений времени. В частности, мы определяем три основных типа синтаксических маркеров, а именно маркер времени, модификатор и число, для группировки связанных с временем регулярных выражений по маркерам. На типах мы разрабатываем общие эвристические правила для распознавания выражений времени. При распознавании SynTime сначала идентифицирует маркеры времени из необработанного текста, затем ищет в их окружении модификаторы и цифры для формирования временных сегментов и, наконец, объединяет временные сегменты с временными выражениями. В качестве легкого тегера, основанного на правилах, SynTime работает в режиме реального времени и может быть легко расширен, просто добавляя ключевые слова для текста различных типов и различных доменов. Эксперимент с эталонными наборами данных и данными твитов показывает, что SynTime превосходит современные методы.', 'hi': 'मुक्त पाठ से समय अभिव्यक्तियों को निकालना कई अनुप्रयोगों के लिए एक मौलिक कार्य है। हम चार डेटासेट से समय अभिव्यक्तियों का विश्लेषण करते हैं और पाते हैं कि समय की जानकारी व्यक्त करने के लिए शब्दों के केवल एक छोटे समूह का उपयोग किया जाता है, और समय अभिव्यक्तियों में शब्द समान वाक्यात्मक व्यवहार प्रदर्शित करते हैं। निष्कर्षों के आधार पर, हम समय अभिव्यक्तियों को पहचानने के लिए SynTime नामक एक प्रकार-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम तीन मुख्य वाक्यात्मक टोकन प्रकारों को परिभाषित करते हैं, अर्थात् समय टोकन, संशोधक, और अंक, टोकन पर समय से संबंधित नियमित अभिव्यक्तियों को समूहित करने के लिए। प्रकारों पर हम समय अभिव्यक्तियों को पहचानने के लिए सामान्य ह्युरिस्टिक नियमों को डिजाइन करते हैं। मान्यता में, SynTime पहले कच्चे पाठ से समय टोकन की पहचान करता है, फिर समय खंड बनाने के लिए संशोधक और अंकों के लिए अपने परिवेश की खोज करता है, और अंत में समय खंडों को अभिव्यक्तियों को समय में मर्ज करता है। एक हल्के वजन नियम आधारित टैगर के रूप में, SynTime वास्तविक समय में चलता है, और आसानी से विभिन्न प्रकार के पाठ और विभिन्न डोमेन के लिए खोजशब्दों को जोड़कर विस्तारित किया जा सकता है। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट और ट्वीट्स डेटा पर प्रयोग से पता चलता है कि SynTime अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'zh': '取时自由表达式多应用程序之本务也。 论四集之时表达式,见一小组单词以达时息,而时表达式之单词相似句法行。 此之谓SynTime,以识时表达式。 具体来说三要句法表者,时饰符数,以时正则表达式分朋也。 凡此类,设常启发式以识时表达式。 SynTime先识时,然后搜其周围环境饰符数以成时间段,合时间段于时表达式。 轻量级之纪器,SynTime 可实时行,但需为异类异域之文关键字而疏广之。 明于集推文之实验,SynTime优于先进之法。', 'ga': "Tasc bunúsach do go leor feidhmchlár is ea nathanna ama a bhaint as saorthéacs. Déanaimid anailís ar na habairtí ama ó cheithre thacar sonraí agus aimsímid nach n-úsáidtear ach grúpa beag focal chun faisnéis ama a chur in iúl, agus léiríonn na focail i nathanna ama iompar comhréire cosúil leis. Bunaithe ar na torthaí, molaimid cur chuige cineál-bhunaithe, darb ainm SynTime, chun nathanna ama a aithint. Go sonrach, sainímid trí phríomhchineál comhartha comhréire, eadhon comhartha ama, modhnóir, agus uimhir, chun nathanna rialta a bhaineann le ham a ghrúpáil thar chomharthaí. Ar na cineálacha déanaimid dearadh ar rialacha heorastúla ginearálta chun nathanna ama a aithint. Mar aitheantas, sainaithníonn SynTime na comharthaí ama ó théacs amh ar dtús, déanann sé cuardach ar a dtimpeallacht le haghaidh mionathruithe agus uimhreacha chun teascáin ama a fhoirmiú, agus ar deireadh cumasc na míreanna ama le habairtí ama. Mar chlibeálaí éadrom-mheáchan-bhunaithe rialacha, ritheann SynTime i bhfíor-am, agus is féidir é a leathnú go héasca trí eochairfhocail a chur leis do théacs de chineálacha éagsúla agus d'fhearann éagsúla. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair thacair thacair thacair agus ar shonraí tweets go n-éiríonn le SynTime modhanna úrscothacha.", 'ka': 'თავისუფალი ტექსტიდან დროის გამოსახულების გამოყენება არის ფუნდამეტური დავალება ბევრი პროგრამებისთვის. ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ოთხი მონაცემების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრება და აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მხოლოდ ცოტა სიტყვების ჯგუფი გამოყენება დროის ინფორმაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის და სიტყვების ჩვენ განსაზღვრებების მიხედვით, რომელიც ტიპის დაბაზეული მიზეზი, სახელი SynTime, სახელის განსაზღვრებისთვის. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ სამი მნიშვნელოვანი სინტაქტიური ტიპების განსაზღვრებით, როგორც დროის ტოკენ, რედაქტორი და რიცხვი, როგორც დროის განსაზღვრებული რედალური გამოსახულები რომლებიც ჩვენ განვიყენებთ დროის გამოსახულებას. SynTime პირველად განაცნობაში სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის სინტექსტის გარეშე და სინტექსტის გარეშე სინტექსტის გარე როგორც სინამდვილეების მარცხლეების მარცხლეების მარცხლეები, სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების და განსხვავებული დიომენების ტექსტის გადამატებით ბენქმარკის მონაცემების და ტევიტის მონაცემების გამოცდილობა ჩვენებს, რომ SynTime უფრო გამოცდილობს სტატურის მეტოვები.', 'hu': 'Az időkifejezések kivonása szabad szövegből sok alkalmazás számára alapvető feladat. Az időkifejezéseket négy adathalmazból elemezzük, és megállapítjuk, hogy az időinformációk kifejezésére csak kis szócsoportot használnak, az időkifejezésekben szereplő szavak hasonló szintaktikus viselkedést mutatnak. Az eredmények alapján egy típusalapú megközelítést javasolunk, SynTime néven, az időkifejezések felismerésére. Konkrétan három fő szintaktikus tokentípust definiálunk, nevezetesen időtokent, módosítót és számot, hogy az idővel kapcsolatos reguláris kifejezéseket tokenekkel csoportosítsuk. A típusokon általános heurisztikai szabályokat tervezünk az időkifejezések felismerésére. Felismerésként a SynTime először azonosítja a nyers szövegből származó időtokeneket, majd a környezetükben keresi a módosítókat és számokat, hogy időszegmenseket alkossanak, majd végül az időszegmenseket időkifejezésekkel egyesíti. Könnyű szabályalapú címkézőként a SynTime valós időben fut, és könnyen bővíthető a különböző típusú és különböző tartományok szövegének kulcsszavaival. A benchmark adatkészletekkel és tweetekkel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a SynTime felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket.', 'it': "Estrarre espressioni temporali dal testo libero è un compito fondamentale per molte applicazioni. Analizziamo le espressioni temporali di quattro set di dati e scopriamo che solo un piccolo gruppo di parole viene utilizzato per esprimere informazioni sul tempo, e le parole nelle espressioni temporali dimostrano un comportamento sintattico simile. Sulla base dei risultati, proponiamo un approccio basato sul tipo, denominato SynTime, per riconoscere le espressioni temporali. Nello specifico, definiamo tre tipi principali di token sintattici, vale a dire time token, modificatore e numerico, per raggruppare espressioni regolari correlate al tempo su token. Sui tipi progettiamo regole euristiche generali per riconoscere espressioni temporali. In riconoscimento, SynTime identifica prima i token di tempo dal testo grezzo, quindi cerca nell'ambiente circostante modificatori e numeri per formare segmenti di tempo e infine fonde i segmenti di tempo con espressioni temporali. Come tag leggero basato su regole, SynTime viene eseguito in tempo reale e può essere facilmente ampliato semplicemente aggiungendo parole chiave per il testo di diversi tipi e domini. Esperimenti su set di dati di benchmark e dati di tweet mostrano che SynTime supera i metodi più avanzati.", 'kk': 'Бос мәтіннен уақыт өрнегін тарқату - көп қолданбалардың негізгі тапсырмасы. Біз төрт деректер қорларындағы уақыт өрнектерін анализ және уақыт мәліметін көрсету үшін тек кішкентай топ сөздер қолданылады және уақыт өрнектерінің сөздері ұқсас синтактикалық әрекетін көрсетеді. Табуларға негізделген, уақыт өрнектерін анықтау үшін түрлі негізделген тәсілді, SynTime деп аталатын қасиеттерді таңдаймыз. Ескерілікті, біз үш негізгі синтактикалық белгілер түрін анықтаймыз: уақыт белгісі, өзгертуші және санды, топтардың арасындағы үлгі өрнектерін топтастырып тастаймыз. Уақыт өрнектерін анықтау үшін жалпы геуристикалық ережелерді құрамыз. Бірінші қадамдастыру уақыт белгілерін таңдайды, содан кейін өзгертушілер мен сандарды уақыт сегменттерін құру үшін орналасқан уақыт сегменттерді уақыт өрнектеріне біріктіреді. Өткінші ережелерді негіздеген тегтері ретінде, қадамдастыру уақыты шын уақытта жұмыс істейді, және әртүрлі түрлер мен әртүрлі домендердің кілт сөздерін қосып оңай кеңейту мүмкін. Белгі деректер және tweet деректерінің тәжірибесі Қадамдастыру уақытын орындау әдістерінің күйі жоқ дегенді көрсетеді.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή εκφράσεων χρόνου από ελεύθερο κείμενο είναι μια θεμελιώδης εργασία για πολλές εφαρμογές. Αναλύουμε τις εκφράσεις χρόνου από τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων και διαπιστώνουμε ότι μόνο μια μικρή ομάδα λέξεων χρησιμοποιείται για να εκφράσει πληροφορίες χρόνου, και οι λέξεις σε εκφράσεις χρόνου παρουσιάζουν παρόμοια συντακτική συμπεριφορά. Με βάση τα ευρήματα, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση τύπου, που ονομάζεται για την αναγνώριση εκφράσεων χρόνου. Συγκεκριμένα, καθορίζουμε τρεις κύριους τύπους συντακτικών συμβολαίων, δηλαδή το συμβολικό χρόνου, τον τροποποιητή και τον αριθμητικό, για να ομαδοποιήσουμε κανονικές εκφράσεις σχετιζόμενες με το χρόνο πάνω από τα συμβολικά. Για τους τύπους σχεδιάζουμε γενικούς heuristικούς κανόνες για την αναγνώριση εκφράσεων χρόνου. Σε αναγνώριση, το αναγνωρίζει πρώτα τα σήματα χρόνου από ακατέργαστο κείμενο, στη συνέχεια αναζητά το περιβάλλον τους για τροποποιητές και αριθμούς για να σχηματίσει τμήματα χρόνου και, τέλος, συγχωνεύει τα τμήματα χρόνου σε εκφράσεις χρόνου. Ως ελαφρύ πρόγραμμα ετικετών βασισμένο σε κανόνες, το λειτουργεί σε πραγματικό χρόνο και μπορεί εύκολα να επεκταθεί προσθέτοντας απλά λέξεις-κλειδιά για το κείμενο διαφορετικών τύπων και διαφορετικών τομέων. Το πείραμα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς και δεδομένα tweets δείχνει ότι το SynTime ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'mk': 'Извадувањето на временски изрази од слободен текст е фундаментална задача за многу апликации. Ние ги анализираме временските изрази од четири податоци и откриваме дека само мала група зборови се користат за изразување на временски информации, а зборовите во временските изрази демонстрираат слично синтактичко однесување. На основа на откритието, предложуваме типов-базиран пристап, наречен SynTime, за препознавање на временски изрази. Специфично, дефинираме три главни синтактички типови на знаци, имено временски знак, модификатор и броеви, за групирање на регуларни изрази поврзани со времето преку знаци. За типовите кои ги дизајнираме генералните хеористички правила за да ги препознаеме временските изрази. За признавање, SynTime прво ги идентификува временските знаци од суровиот текст, потоа ги пребара нивните околини за модификатори и броеви за да формира временски сегменти, и конечно ги спојува временските сегменти со временските изрази. Како лесен тагер базиран на правила, SynTime работи во реално време и може лесно да се прошири со едноставно додавање клучни зборови за текстот на различни типови и различни домени. Експериментот на наборот на податоци за споредба и твитови покажува дека SynTime ги надминува најсовремените методи.', 'lt': 'Ištraukti laiko išraiškas iš laisvo teksto yra pagrindinė užduotis daugeliui taikomųjų programų. Analizuojame laiko išraiškas iš keturių duomenų rinkinių ir nustatome, kad tik nedidelė žodžių grupė naudojama laiko informacijai išreikšti, o žodžiai laiko išraiškose rodo panašų sintaksinį elgesį. Remiantis išvadomis, siūlome taikyti tipu pagrįstą metodą, pavadintą SynTime, kad būtų galima pripažinti laiko išraiškas. Specifically, we define three main syntactic token types, namely time token, modifier, and numeral, to group time-related regular expressions over tokens.  Kalbant apie tipus, kuriame bendrąsias heuristines taisykles laiko išraiškoms pripažinti. Pripažįstant SynTime pirmiausia nustato laiko ženklus iš žaliavinio teksto, tada ieško jų aplinkoje modifikatorių ir skaitmenų, kad būtų sudaryti laiko segmentai, ir galiausiai sujungia laiko segmentus su laiko išraiškais. Kaip lengvas taisyklėmis pagrįstas žymeklis SynTime veikia realiuoju laiku ir jį galima lengvai išplėsti tiesiog pridėdamas raktinius žodžius skirtingų tipų ir skirtingų domenų tekstui. Eksperimentas su lyginamųjų duomenų rinkiniais ir Twitter duomenimis rodo, kad SynTime viršija moderniausius metodus.', 'ms': 'Mengekstrak ungkapan masa dari teks bebas adalah tugas asas bagi banyak aplikasi. Kami menganalisis ungkapan masa dari empat set data dan mencari bahawa hanya kumpulan kecil perkataan digunakan untuk ungkapan maklumat masa, dan perkataan dalam ungkapan masa menunjukkan perilaku sintaktik yang sama. Berdasarkan penemuan, kami cadangkan pendekatan berdasarkan jenis, bernama SynTime, untuk mengenali ungkapan masa. Secara khusus, kita takrifkan tiga jenis token sintaktik utama, iaitu token masa, pengubahsuai, dan nombor, untuk kumpulkan ungkapan biasa berkaitan dengan masa melalui token. Pada jenis kita merancang peraturan heuristik umum untuk mengenali ungkapan masa. Dalam pengenalan, SynTime pertama mengenalpasti tanda masa dari teks mentah, kemudian mencari persekitaran mereka untuk pengubahsuai dan nombor untuk membentuk segmen masa, dan akhirnya gabungkan segmen masa kepada ungkapan masa. Sebagai tag berasaskan peraturan berat ringan, SynTime berjalan dalam masa sebenar, dan boleh mudah dikembangkan dengan menambah kata kunci untuk teks jenis berbeza dan domain berbeza. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark dan data tweet menunjukkan bahawa SynTime melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art.', 'ml': 'സ്വതന്ത്ര പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സമയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് പല പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമ നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സമയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ചെറിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സമയവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രമ Based on the findings, we propose a type-based approach, named SynTime, to recognize time expressions.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക് ടോക്ക്, മാറ്റിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സമയത്തിന്റെ അടയാളം, മാറ് സമയത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പൊതുവായ ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്ക് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d, സിന്\u200dടൈമിന്\u200d ആദ്യം ചുരുക്കിയ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സമയത്തിന്റെ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു. പിന്നീട് മോഡിഫയര്\u200d  വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുമുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സിന്\u200dടൈമിന്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയത്ത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. സ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും ടൂട്ടിറ്റുകളിലും പരീക്ഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നത് സിന്\u200dടൈമിന്\u200d സിന്\u200dട്ടൈമിന', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tal-espressjonijiet tal-ħin mit-test ħieles hija kompitu fundamentali għal ħafna applikazzjonijiet. Aħna nianalizzaw l-espressjonijiet tal-ħin minn erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta u nsibu li biss grupp żgħir ta’ kliem jintuża biex jesprimi l-informazzjoni dwar il-ħin, u l-kliem fl-espressjonijiet tal-ħin juri mġiba sintetika simili. Abbażi tas-sejbiet, qed nipproponu approċċ ibbażat fuq it-tip, imsejjaħ SynTime, biex nirrikonoxxu l-espressjonijiet tal-ħin. B’mod speċifiku, niddefinixxu tliet tipi ewlenin ta’ tokens sintattiċi, jiġifieri token tal-ħin, modifikatur, u numerali, biex nagħmlu espressjonijiet regolari relatati mal-ħin fuq tokens. Dwar it-tipi li niddisinjaw regoli ġenerali ġewristiċi biex nirrikonoxxu l-espressjonijiet tal-ħin. Bħala rikonoxximent, SynTime l-ewwel jidentifika t-tokens tal-ħin mit-test mhux ipproċessat, imbagħad ifittex l-ambjent tagħhom għal modifikaturi u numerali biex jiffurmaw segmenti tal-ħin, u fl-aħħar mill-aħħar jgħaqqad is-segmenti tal-ħin mal-espressjonijiet tal-ħin. Bħala tagger ħafif ibbażat fuq ir-regoli, SynTime jaħdem f’ħin reali, u jista’ jiġi faċilment estiż billi sempliċement jiżdiedu kliem ewlieni għat-test ta’ tipi differenti u ta’ dominji differenti. Experiment on benchmark datasets and tweets data shows that SynTime outperforms state-of-the-art methods.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч текстээс цаг илэрхийллийг татах нь олон програмын үндсэн ажил юм. Бид дөрвөн өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс цаг илэрхийллийг шинжилгээд цаг хугацааны мэдээллийг илэрхийлэх зөвхөн жижиг хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Үүний үндсэн зүйлд бид цаг хугацааны илэрхийллийг танихын тулд төрлийн үндсэн арга замыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид гурван гол синтактик тооны төрлийг тодорхойлдог. Яг л цаг хугацааны тоон, өөрчлөгч болон тооны тоонуудыг тодорхойлдог. Бид цаг хугацааны илэрхийллийг хүлээн зөвшөөрөхийн тулд ерөнхий хэлбэрүүдийг бүтээж байна. Тодорхойлолтоор SynTime нь анх цаг хугацааны тэмдэгтийг цэвэр текстээс тодорхойлж, дараа нь цаг хугацааны загваруудыг хугацааны илэрхийллийн тулд өөрчлөгчид болон тоонуудыг хайж байна. Хялбар жингийн дүрэм суурилсан тегжер болгон SynTime бодит цаг хугацаанд ажиллаж, өөр төрлийн, өөр хэлбэрүүдийн текст болон түлхүүр үгийг нэмж амархан нэмэгдүүлж болно. Бенхмарк өгөгдлийн сан болон tweet өгөгдлийн туршилт нь SynTime-ын урлагийн төвшин арга замыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Extragerea expresiilor timpului din text liber este o sarcină fundamentală pentru multe aplicații. Analizăm expresiile timpului din patru seturi de date și constatăm că doar un grup mic de cuvinte sunt folosite pentru a exprima informațiile timpului, iar cuvintele din expresiile timpului demonstrează comportament sintactic similar. Pe baza constatărilor, propunem o abordare bazată pe tip, numită SynTime, pentru a recunoaște expresiile timpului. În mod specific, definim trei tipuri principale de token sintactice, și anume time token, modificator și numeral, pentru a grupa expresiile regulate legate de timp peste token. Pe tipuri proiectăm reguli euristice generale pentru a recunoaște expresiile timpului. Ca recunoaștere, SynTime identifică mai întâi simbolurile de timp din text brut, apoi caută în jurul lor modificatori și numerale pentru a forma segmente de timp și, în cele din urmă, fuzionează segmentele de timp cu expresii de timp. Ca un etichetor bazat pe reguli ușoare, SynTime rulează în timp real și poate fi extins cu ușurință prin simpla adăugare de cuvinte cheie pentru text de diferite tipuri și domenii diferite. Experimentele privind seturile de date de referință și datele tweet arată că SynTime depășește metodele de ultimă oră.', 'no': 'Pakk ut tidsstrykk frå fritt tekst er ein grunnleggjande oppgåve for mange program. Vi analyserer tidsstrykkene frå fire datasett og finn at berre ei lite gruppe ord vert brukt til å uttrykke tidsinformasjon, og ord i tidsstrykkene viser liknande syntaksiske atferd. Basert på oppfinningane, foreslår vi ein type-basert tilnærming med namn SynTime for å gjenkjenne tidsstrykk. Spesielt definerer vi tre hovudsyntaksiske teiknstypar, t.d. tidspunkt, endringar og tal, for å gruppa tidspunkt regulære uttrykk over teikn. På typane vi design generelle heuristiske reglar for å gjenkjenna tidsstrykk. I gjenkjenning identifiserer SynTime først tidspunktet frå råtekst, så søker omgivningane sine for modifikatorar og tall for å laga tidspunktet, og slutt saman tidspunktet til tidspunktet. Som eit lett regelbasert merkelapp køyrer SynTime i verkeleg tid, og kan enkelt utvidast ved å leggja til nøkkelord for teksten av ulike typar og ulike domene. Name', 'pl': 'Wyodrębnianie wyrażeń czasu z wolnego tekstu jest podstawowym zadaniem dla wielu aplikacji. Analizujemy wyrażenia czasu z czterech zbiorów danych i stwierdzimy, że tylko niewielka grupa słów służy do wyrażenia informacji czasu, a słowa w wyrażeniach czasu wykazują podobne zachowanie składni. Na podstawie wyników proponujemy podejście typowe o nazwie SynTime do rozpoznawania wyrażeń czasu. W szczególności definiujemy trzy główne typy tokenów składni, a mianowicie token czasu, modyfikator i liczba, aby grupować wyrażenia regularne związane z czasem nad tokenami. Na typach projektujemy ogólne reguły heurystyczne do rozpoznawania wyrażeń czasu. W rozpoznaniu SynTime najpierw identyfikuje tokeny czasu z tekstu surowego, następnie przeszukuje ich otoczenie w poszukiwaniu modyfikatorów i cyfr w celu utworzenia segmentów czasu, a na koniec łączy segmenty czasu do wyrażeń czasu. Jako lekki tager oparty na regułach, SynTime działa w czasie rzeczywistym i może być łatwo rozszerzony poprzez dodanie słów kluczowych dla tekstu różnych typów i różnych domen. Eksperyment na zbiorach danych referencyjnych i danych tweetów pokazuje, że SynTime przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody.', 'si': 'නිදහස් පාළුවෙන් වෙලාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය නිකාලනය කරන්නේ වෙලාවක් වෙනුවෙන් මූලික වැඩක්. අපි දත්ත සෙට් හතරක් විස්තර කරන්න වෙලාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා වචන සම්පූර්ණයක් විතරයි වෙලාව තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන් සොයාගැනීමේ අධාරිත, අපි වර්ගයක් අධාරිත වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, Syntime කියලා, වෙලාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අඳ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන සංකේතික ටොකන් වර්ගයක් තුනක් වෙනස් කරනවා, කාලය ටොකන්, වෙනස් කරනවා, සහ අංක, ටොකන්ස් වලට අපි සාමාන්\u200dය හෙයුරිස්ටික් නීතියක් සැකසුම් කරනවා වෙලාව ප්\u200dරකාරයක් අඳුරගන්න. Syntime පළමුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් වෙලාව ටෝකන්ස්ව හඳානවා, ඊට පස්සේ ඔවුන්ගේ ආවරණය සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාවක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙලාවේ වෙනස් සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාව සින්ටායිම් ඇත්ත වෙලාවේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සඳහා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාර වචන වචන වචන සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරය ස බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැටුම් සහ ට්විට් දත්ත පෙන්වන්නේ Syntime කියලා ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට වැඩ කරන්න', 'sr': 'Izvlačenje vremenskih izraza iz slobodnog teksta je osnovni zadatak za mnoge aplikacije. Analiziramo izraze vremena iz četiri seta podataka i otkrijemo da se koristi samo mala grupa riječi za izražavanje vremenskih informacija, a riječi u vremenskim izrazima pokazuju slično sintaktično ponašanje. Na osnovu nalaza, predlažemo pristup na tipu, po imenu SynTime, da prepoznamo izraze vremena. Posebno definišemo tri glavne tipa sintaktičkih znakova, a to je znak vremena, modifikator i broj, za grupiranje redovnih izraza povezanih sa vremenom preko znakova. Na vrste koje dizajniramo generalna heuristička pravila da bi prepoznali izraz vremena. U priznanju, SynTime prvo identifikuje znakove vremena sa sirovog teksta, zatim pretražuje okruženje za modifikatore i brojeve kako bi formirali vremenske segmente, i konačno povezuje vremenske segmente na vremenske izraze. Kao lagano-težinski znakovnik na pravilima, SynTime vodi u pravo vreme i može se lako proširiti dodajući ključne reči za tekst različitih vrsta i različitih domena. Eksperiment o setima podataka i podacima o bitovima pokazuje da SynTime nadmašuje metode umetnosti.', 'ur': 'زمان مثالیں کھولنے کے لئے بہت سی کاربریوں کے لئے ایک بنیادی ٹاکس ہے. ہم چار ڈاٹ سٹ سے زمان کے مثالیں تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ صرف ایک چھوٹی گروپ لکھ کر زمان معلومات کے مطابق استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں، اور زمان مثالیں میں لکھ دیتے ہیں جیسا سینکٹیک رفتار دکھاتے ہیں. پیدا کرنے پر، ہم ایک ٹائپ بنیادی طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، اسے SynTime نامی، تایمے کی تعریف پہچان کرنے کے لئے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم تین اصلی سینٹاکٹیک ٹوکنوں کی طرح مقرر کرتے ہیں، یعنی زمان ٹوکنے، modifier، اور شمار، ٹوکنوں پر زمان رابطہ دار منظورات کے لئے۔ ہم اس طرح کی طرح طراحی کرتے ہیں کہ زمانہ کی تعریفیں پہچان سکیں۔ پہلے سینٹیمز کی پہلی بار ٹیمٹ سے ٹیمٹ کو پہچان دیتا ہے، پھر ان کے اطراف کو ٹیمٹر اور شمارل کے لئے تلاش کرتا ہے تایمٹ سپٹ بنانے کے لئے، اور بالآخر ٹیمٹ سپٹ کو ٹیمٹ کے مثالوں میں ملحق کرتا ہے. ایک ہلکا وزن قانون بنیادی ٹاگر کے طور پر، SynTime واقعی وقت میں چلتا ہے، اور اسے آسان طور پر پھیلا سکتا ہے کہ صرف مختلف طریقوں اور مختلف ڈومین کے لئے کلیدورڈ جمع کریں۔ بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ اور ٹویٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ پر تجربہ دکھاتا ہے کہ SynTime شرکت کے طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha la’aanta ka soo bixinta wakhtiga la’aanta ah waa shaqada aasaasiga ah ee codsiga badan. Waxaynu kala fakaraynaa xilliga afarta databases, waxaynu aragnaa in koox yar oo kaliya ayaa loo isticmaalaa si ay u muujiyaan macluumaad waqti ah, hadalka xilliga lagu yidhaahdo waxay muujiyaan dabeecada isku mid ah. Sida lagu saleynayo heshiiska, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab nooc ah oo la magacaabay SynTime, si aan u aqoonsanno muuqashada waqtiga. Si gaar ah, waxaan u qoraynaa saddex noocyo oo caadiga ah, calaamada waqtiga, beddelka, iyo tirada, si aan ugu koobanno calaamada waqtiga la xiriira. Noocyada aan ku qorno sharciyada guud ee heuristiga si aan u aqoonsanno hadalka waqtiga. Aqoonsashada marka ugu horeysa Sintida ayaa calaamada xiliga ah ka muuqata qoraalka xunxun, kadibna wuxuu u raadinaa hareeraha isbedelka iyo lambarada si ay u sameeyaan qeybaha waqtiga, ugu dambaystana wuxuu ku qeybiyaa xiliga waqtiga. Sida qoraal fudud oo sharciga miisaanka ah, SynTime wuxuu waqti dhab ah u socdaa, wuxuuna si fudud u sii kordhi karaa qoraalka qoraalka noocyada kala duduwan iyo meelo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka ku saabsan taariikhda benchmark iyo macluumaadka tweetka waxaa tusaya in SynTime outperforms state-of-the-art methods.', 'sv': 'Att extrahera tidsuttryck från fritext är en grundläggande uppgift för många applikationer. Vi analyserar tidsuttryck från fyra dataset och finner att endast en liten grupp ord används för att uttrycka tidsinformation, och orden i tidsuttryck uppvisar liknande syntaktiskt beteende. Baserat på resultaten föreslår vi en typbaserad metod, kallad SynTime, för att känna igen tidsuttryck. Specifikt definierar vi tre huvudsakliga syntaktiska tokenstyper, nämligen tidstokens, modifieraren och siffran, för att gruppera tidsrelaterade reguljära uttryck över tokens. På typerna utformar vi allmänna heuristiska regler för att känna igen tidsuttryck. SynTime identifierar först tidstokens från obehandlad text, söker sedan i omgivningen efter modifikatorer och siffror för att bilda tidssegment och sammanfogar slutligen tidssegmenten till tidsuttryck. Som en lätt regelbaserad taggare körs SynTime i realtid och kan enkelt utökas genom att helt enkelt lägga till nyckelord för text av olika typer och domäner. Experiment på benchmarkdata och tweetdata visar att SynTime presterar bättre än de senaste metoderna.', 'ta': 'இலவச உரையிலிருந்து நேரத்தின் கூற்றை வெளியேற்றுதல் பல பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு ஒரு அடிப்படையான செயல். நாம் நான்கு தரவுத்தளங்களில் இருந்து நேரத்தின் வெளிப்பாட்டை ஆராய்ந்து ஒரு சிறிய வார்த்தைகள் மட்டும் நேரத்தை வெளிப்படுத்த பயன கண்டுபிடிப்புகளை அடிப்படையில், நாம் ஒத்திசைநேரம் பெயரிடப்பட்ட ஒரு வகையான முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்,  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் மூன்று முக்கிய ஒத்திசைவு குறியீட்டு வகைகளை வரையறு நாம் நேர கூற்றுகளை அறிந்து கொள்ள பொதுவான உயரமான விதிகளை வடிவமைக்கும் வகைகளில். ஒத்திசைவு நேரம் முதலில் குறியீட்டு உரையிலிருந்து நேரத்தை குறிப்பிடும், பின்னர் மாற்றிகள் மற்றும் எண்களை உருவாக்குவதற்கு அவற்றின் சுற்ற ஒளி எடை விதிமுறையில் அடிப்படையிலான ஒத்திசைநேரம் உண்மையான நேரத்தில் இயங்குகிறது, மற்றும் வெவ்வேறு வகைகள் மற்றும் வேறு தளங்களின்  பென்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்கள் மற்றும் துவக்க தகவல்கள் மீது சோதனை தெரியும் ஒத்திசைநேரம் செயல்படுத்தும் நிலைம', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz to'rtta maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi vaqtni analyzmaymiz va faqat bir kichkina so'zlar vaqt maʼlumotini anglatish uchun ishlatiladi va vaqtda ifodalarning bir xil so'zlari bir xil bir necha soʻzni bir xil xil xususiyatlarni ko'rsata @ info: whatsthis Koʻrsatilgan, biz uchta asosiy syntaktik tegi turlarini aniqlamamiz, vaqt belgilari, oʻzgartirish va raqamlarni guruhlash uchun vaqt bilan bogʻliq qoiday ifodalar. Vaqt ifodalarni aniqlash uchun umumiy heuristik qoidalarini yaratish mumkin. In recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions.  @ info: whatsthis Name", 'vi': 'Việc rút dạng thời gian khỏi văn bản tự do là nhiệm vụ cơ bản cho nhiều ứng dụng. Chúng tôi phân tích biểu hiện thời từ bốn bộ dữ liệu và thấy rằng chỉ một nhóm nhỏ các từ được dùng để biểu lộ thông tin thời gian, và các từ trong biểu hiện thời gian biểu hiện tương tự hành vi cú pháp. Dựa trên kết quả, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp dựa vào kiểu, tên là SynTime, để nhận diện biểu hiện thời gian. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi định nghĩa ba dạng biểu tượng cấu tạo cú pháp chính, cụ thể là biểu tượng thời gian, sửa đổi, và chữ số, để các biểu thức theo thời gian. Về các loại chúng tôi thiết kế các quy tắc thần kinh chung để nhận ra biểu hiện thời gian. Để thừa nhận, Synequanon lần đầu tiên xác định các dấu hiệu thời gian từ văn bản thô, sau đó tìm kiếm các môi trường xung quanh để tìm các thay đổi và các chữ số để hình thành phân khúc thời gian, và cuối cùng hợp các phân đoạn thời gian thành biểu thức thời gian. Với tư cách một giải câu dựa trên trọng lượng ánh sáng, SynTime chạy trong thời gian thực, và có thể dễ mở rộng bằng cách đơn giản thêm từ khoá cho văn bản của các loại khác nhau và của mỗi miền khác nhau. Thí nghiệm trên các dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn và tweet cho thấy rằng Synequanon vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'da': 'Udtrækning af tidsudtryk fra fritekst er en grundlæggende opgave for mange applikationer. Vi analyserer tidsudtrykkene fra fire datasæt og finder ud af, at kun en lille gruppe ord bruges til at udtrykke tidsinformation, og ordene i tidsudtryk viser lignende syntaktisk adfærd. Baseret på resultaterne foreslår vi en typebaseret tilgang, kaldet SynTime, til at genkende tidsudtryk. Specielt definerer vi tre vigtigste syntaktiske token typer, nemlig tidstoken, modifikator og tal, for at gruppere tidsrelaterede regulære udtryk over tokens. På de typer designer vi generelle heuristiske regler for at genkende tidsudtryk. Som genkendelse identificerer SynTime først tidsmærkerne fra rå tekst, søger derefter deres omgivelser efter modifikatorer og tal for at danne tidssegmenter og til sidst sammenfletter tidssegmenterne med tidsudtryk. Som en let regelbaseret tagger kører SynTime i realtid og kan nemt udvides ved blot at tilføje søgeord til teksten af forskellige typer og af forskellige domæner. Eksperimenter med benchmark datasæt og tweets data viser, at SynTime overgår state-of-the-art metoder.', 'de': 'Das Extrahieren von Zeitausdrücken aus Freitext ist für viele Anwendungen eine grundlegende Aufgabe. Wir analysieren die Zeitausdrücke aus vier Datensätzen und stellen fest, dass nur eine kleine Gruppe von Wörtern verwendet wird, um Zeitinformationen auszudrücken, und die Wörter in Zeitausdrücken zeigen ein ähnliches syntaktisches Verhalten. Basierend auf den Ergebnissen schlagen wir einen typbasierten Ansatz namens SynTime vor, um Zeitausdrücke zu erkennen. Konkret definieren wir drei syntaktische Tokentypen, nämlich Time Token, Modifikator und Number, um zeitbezogene reguläre Ausdrücke über Token zu gruppieren. Für die Typen entwerfen wir allgemeine heuristische Regeln, um Zeitausdrücke zu erkennen. Als Erkennung identifiziert SynTime zunächst die Zeitmarken aus Rohtext, durchsucht dann ihre Umgebung nach Modifikatoren und Ziffern, um Zeitsegmente zu bilden, und führt schließlich die Zeitsegmente zu Zeitausdrücken zusammen. Als leichtgewichtiger regelbasierter Tagger läuft SynTime in Echtzeit und kann einfach durch einfaches Hinzufügen von Keywords für den Text verschiedener Typen und verschiedener Domains erweitert werden. Experimente mit Benchmark-Datensätzen und Tweets zeigen, dass SynTime modernste Methoden übertrifft.', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje vremenskih izraza iz slobodnog teksta je osnovni zadatak za mnoge aplikacije. Analiziramo izraze vremena iz četiri podataka i otkrijemo da se koristi samo mala grupa riječi kako bi izrazili informacije o vremenu, a riječi u vremenskim izrazima pokazuju slično sintaktično ponašanje. Na temelju nalaza, predlažemo pristup na tipu pod nazivom SynTime, kako bi prepoznali izraze vremena. Posebno, definiramo tri glavne tipa sintaktičkih znakova, a to je znak vremena, modifikator i broj, za skupinu redovne izraze povezane s vremenom preko znakova. Na vrste koje dizajniramo opće heurističke pravila kako bi prepoznali izraze vremena. U priznanju, SynTime prvo identificira vrijeme znakove sirovog teksta, zatim pretražuje okruženje modifikatora i brojeva kako bi stvorili vrijeme segmente, i konačno uključuje vrijeme segmente na vrijeme izraze. Kao mješavica na temelju svetlosti pravila, SynTime vodi u pravo vrijeme i može se lako proširiti dodajući ključne riječi za tekst različitih vrsta i različitih domena. Eksperiment na setama podataka o referenciji i podacima o tweetima pokazuje da SynTime nadmašuje metode stanja umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Извличането на времеви изрази от свободен текст е основна задача за много приложения. Анализираме времевите изрази от четири набора данни и откриваме, че само малка група думи се използват за изразяване на времева информация, а думите във времеви изрази демонстрират подобно синтактично поведение. Въз основа на констатациите предлагаме типов подход, наречен СинТайм, за разпознаване на времеви изрази. По-конкретно, ние дефинираме три основни синтактични типа символи, а именно времеви символи, модификатори и числа, за да групираме регулярни изрази, свързани с времето, върху символи. На типовете проектираме общи евристични правила за разпознаване на времеви изрази. За разпознаване първо идентифицира времевите символи от суров текст, след това търси в околността модификатори и цифри, за да образува времеви сегменти и накрая слива времевите сегменти с времеви изрази. Като лек етикетер, базиран на правила, работи в реално време и може лесно да бъде разширен чрез просто добавяне на ключови думи за текста от различни типове и от различни домейни. Експериментът с базови набори от данни и данни от туитове показва, че превъзхожда най-съвременните методи.', 'nl': 'Het extraheren van tijduitdrukkingen uit vrije tekst is een fundamentele taak voor veel toepassingen. We analyseren de tijdsuitdrukkingen uit vier datasets en vinden dat slechts een kleine groep woorden wordt gebruikt om tijdsinformatie uit te drukken, en de woorden in tijdsuitdrukkingen vertonen soortgelijk syntactisch gedrag. Op basis van de bevindingen stellen we een type-based benadering voor, genaamd SynTime, om tijduitdrukkingen te herkennen. Specifiek definiëren we drie belangrijkste syntactische tokentypen, namelijk time token, modifier en numeriek, om tijd-gerelateerde reguliere expressies over tokens te groeperen. Op de types ontwerpen we algemene heuristische regels om tijdsuitdrukkingen te herkennen. Ter herkenning identificeert SynTime eerst de tijdtokens uit ruwe tekst, zoekt vervolgens hun omgeving naar modifiers en cijfers om tijdssegmenten te vormen en voegt de tijdsegmenten tot tijdsuitdrukkingen samen. Als lichtgewicht regelgebaseerde tagger werkt SynTime in realtime en kan eenvoudig worden uitgebreid door simpelweg trefwoorden toe te voegen voor de tekst van verschillende typen en van verschillende domeinen. Experimenten met benchmark datasets en tweets data laten zien dat SynTime beter presteert dan state-of-the-art methoden.', 'sw': 'Kutoa hisia za muda kutoka kwa maandishi huru ni kazi ya msingi kwa matumizi mengi. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa muda huo kutoka kwenye seti za takwimu nne na tunagundua kuwa kundi dogo tu linatumiwa kuelezea taarifa za muda, na maneno ya wakati yanaonyesha tabia za pamoja. Kutokana na matokeo hayo, tunapendekeza njia ya aina ya aina inayoitwa SynTime, ili kutambua maoni ya muda. Kwa ujumla, tunaelezea aina tatu za ushirikiano mkuu, ikiwa ni alama ya muda, mabadiliko na idadi, ili kuonyesha hisia za mara kwa mara juu ya alama. Katika aina tunazounda sheria za ujumla za heuristi kutambua hisia za muda. Katika kutambua, SynTime kwa mara ya kwanza hugundua alama za muda kutoka kwenye maandishi yasiyo ya kawaida, kisha hutafuta maeneo yao kwa ajili ya mabadiliko na idadi ili kutengeneza sehemu za muda, na hatimaye huunganisha vipengele vya muda kwa hisia za muda. Kama bendera yenye kanuni za uzito, SynTime huendesha kwa wakati halisi, na inaweza kuongezeka kwa urahisi kwa kuongeza maneno ya ufunguo kwa maandishi ya a in a tofauti na maeneo mbalimbali. Jaribio la taarifa za benchmark na taarifa za twita zinaonyesha kwamba SynTime inatoa mbinu za-sanaa.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi ekspresi waktu dari teks bebas adalah tugas dasar bagi banyak aplikasi. We analyze the time expressions from four datasets and find that only a small group of words are used to express time information, and the words in time expressions demonstrate similar syntactic behaviour.  Berdasarkan penemuan, kami mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan tipe, bernama SynTime, untuk mengenali ekspresi waktu. Secara spesifik, kita mendefinisikan tiga tipe token sintaksi utama, yaitu token waktu, modifier, dan numeral, untuk mengumpulkan ekspresi regular berkaitan dengan waktu melalui token. Pada tipe-tipe kami merancang aturan heuristik umum untuk mengenali ekspresi waktu. In recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions.  Sebagai Tagger berdasarkan peraturan berat ringan, SynTime berjalan dalam waktu nyata, dan dapat mudah dikembangkan dengan hanya menambah kata kunci untuk teks dari jenis berbeda dan domain berbeda. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark dan data tweet menunjukkan bahwa SynTime melebihi metode state-of-the-art.', 'fa': 'استخراج توضیح زمانی از متن آزاد یک کار بنیادی برای بسیاری از کاربردها است. ما توضیح زمان را از چهار مجموعه داده\u200cها تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و می\u200cبینیم که فقط یک گروه کلمه کوچک برای توضیح اطلاعات زمان استفاده می\u200cشود، و کلمه\u200cهای توضیح زمان رفتار سنتاکتیک مشابه می\u200cکنند. بر اساس نتیجه\u200cها، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش بنیاد نوع، به نام SynTime، برای شناختن نمایش\u200cهای زمان. به طور خاصی، ما سه نوع نشانه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک اصلی را تعریف می\u200cکنیم، یعنی نشانه\u200cهای زمان، تغییردهنده و عدد، تا نشانه\u200cهای معمولی با زمان بر روی نشانه\u200cها گروه کنیم. در مورد نوع\u200cهایی که ما قانون ژنرال حوریستیک را طراحی می\u200cکنیم برای تشخیص عبارت زمان. در تشخیص، SynTime اول نشانه\u200cهای زمان را از متن خالی شناسایی می\u200cکند، سپس محیط\u200cهایشان را برای تغییردهندگان و تعداد برای شکل بخش\u200cهای زمانی جستجو می\u200cکند، و بالاخره بخش\u200cهای زمان را به عبارت زمانی جستجو می\u200cکند. به عنوان یک نقاشی بر اساس قانون سبک، SynTime در زمان واقعی اجرا می\u200cکند، و می\u200cتواند با افزودن کلید کلید برای متن نوع مختلف و دامنهای مختلف به آسانی گسترش داده شود. تجربه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنگ\u200cمارک و داده\u200cهای توئیت نشان می\u200cدهد که SynTime روش\u200cهای هنری را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i shprehjeve të kohës nga teksti i lirë është një detyrë themelore për shumë aplikime. Ne analizojmë shprehjet kohore nga katër grupe të dhënash dhe zbulojmë se vetëm një grup i vogël fjalësh përdoren për të shprehur informacion kohor, dhe fjalët në shprehjet kohore demonstrojnë sjellje të ngjashme sintaktike. Bazuar në gjetjet, ne propozojmë një metodë bazuar në lloj, të quajtur SynTime, për të njohur shprehjet kohore. Veçanërisht, ne përcaktojmë tre lloje të tokenave sintaktike kryesore, veçanërisht token kohore, modifikues dhe numërues, për të grupuar shprehjet e rregullta lidhur me kohën mbi tokenat. Në tipet ne dizajnojmë rregulla të përgjithshme heuristike për të njohur shprehjet kohore. In recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions.  Si një tag me peshë të lehtë bazuar në rregulla, SynTime funksionon në kohë reale dhe mund të zgjerohet lehtë duke thjesht shtuar fjalë kyçe për tekstin e llojeve të ndryshme dhe të domeneve të ndryshme. Eksperimenti mbi bazat e të dhënave dhe të dhënat e tweeteve tregon se SynTime ekziston më shumë se metodat më të larta.', 'ko': '자유 텍스트에서 시간 표현식을 추출하는 것은 많은 응용 프로그램의 기본 작업입니다.우리는 네 개의 데이터가 집중된 시간 표현식을 분석한 결과 단지 일부분의 단어만이 시간 정보를 표현하는 데 사용되고 시간 표현식 중의 단어는 비슷한 문법 행위를 나타내는 것을 발견했다.이러한 발견을 바탕으로 우리는 시간 표현식을 식별하는 데 사용되는 유형을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 세 가지 주요 문법 표기 유형, 즉 시간 표기, 수식어와 숫자를 정의하고 시간과 관련된 정규 표현식을 표기에 분류했다.유형에 있어서, 우리는 시간 표현식을 식별하기 위해 통용되는 계발식 규칙을 설계했다.식별에서 SynTime은 먼저 원시 텍스트에서 시간 표시를 식별한 다음에 그 주변에서 수식자와 숫자를 검색하여 시간대를 형성하고 마지막으로 시간대를 시간표현식에 통합시킨다.SynTime은 규칙 기반 경량 플래그로서 실시간으로 실행되며 다양한 유형과 도메인의 텍스트에 키워드를 간단하게 추가하여 쉽게 확장할 수 있습니다.기준 데이터 세트와 트위터 데이터에 대한 실험은 SynTime의 성능이 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'tr': '횜zg체r metin 체챌in zaman ifadelerini a 챌mak birn채챌e program 체챌in esasy t채blidir. Biz d철rt sanatdan wagt ifadelerini 챌철z체mle첵채ris we di흫e ki챌i bir grup s철zleri wagt maglumaty a 첵dyrmak 체챌in ullan첵arys we wagt ifadelerindeki s철zler 첵aly sintaktik hereketi g철rkez첵채ris 횉aplanja da힊ary g철r채, SynTime adynda wagt ifadelerini tanamak 체챌in bir hili tabanly approach teklip edip g철r첵채ris Adat챌a, biz 3 sany sintaktik t채pleri, zamany token, 체첵tgedici we saylawy takykla첵arys Zamany ifadelerini tanamak 체챌in umumy heuristik kurallary tasarla첵arys. Bu tan캇mada, SynTime ilk defa hatdan zaman캇 i힊aretleyicisini tan캇t캇r, sonra 챌evresini de휓i힊tiriciler ve say캇lar i챌in zaman segmentleri olu힊turmak i챌in arar ve sonunda zaman캇 segmentleri zaman ifadelerine bir araya getirir. A챌yk bir d체zg체n tabanly etiket챌i bolsa, SynTime hakyky wagtynda i힊le첵채r we birn채챌e d체zg체n noktalary흫 we farkl캇 noktalary흫 metini 체챌in a 챌arak a흫satlyk geni힊letip biler. benchmark veri setirlerinde we tweet maglumatynda synzamany흫 durumyny 체st체n ed첵채ndigini g철rkez첵채r.', 'af': "Name Ons analyseer die tyd uitdrukkings van vier datastelle en vind dat slegs 'n klein groep woorde gebruik word om tyd inligting te uitdruk, en die woorde in tyd uitdrukkings verskyn gelyke sintaktiewe gedrag. Ons voorstel 'n tipe gebaseerde toegang, genaamd SynTime, om tyd uitdrukkings te herken. Spesifieke, ons definieer drie hoof sintaktieke token tipes, naamlik tyd token, verander en getal, na groep tyd-verwante gewone uitdrukkings oor tokens. Op die tipes ontwerp ons algemene heuristiese reëls om tyd uitdrukkings te herken. In herken, SynTime eerste identifiseer die tydstekens van rooi teks, dan soek hulle omgewing vir veranderers en getalle om tydssegmente te formeer, en eindelik saamgevlans die tydssegmente na tydsuitdrukkings. As 'n liggewig reël- gebaseerde etiket, loop Syntime in regte tyd, en kan maklik uitbrei word deur eenvoudig sleutelwoorde byvoeg vir die teks van verskillende tipes en van verskillende domeine. Name", 'bn': 'মুক্ত টেক্সট থেকে সময় প্রকাশ করা হচ্ছে অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য একটি মৌলিক কাজ। আমরা চার তথ্য সংক্রান্ত সময়ের বিষয়টি বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং খুঁজে বের করি যে শুধুমাত্র একটি ছোট শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে সময়ের তথ্য প্রকাশ করার জন্য এবং  এর ফলাফলের ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি ধরনের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যার নাম সিন্টাইমটাইম, সময়ের মত প্রকাশের জন্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা তিনটি প্রধান সিন্ট্যাক্টিক চিহ্নের ধরন ন নির্ধারণ করি, যেমন সময়ের চিহ্ন, পরিবর্তন এবং সংখ্যায়, টাইমের সাথে যোগাযোগ করা  On the types we design general heuristic rules to recognize time expressions.  In recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions.  হাল্কাভিত্তিক নিয়ম-ভিত্তিক ট্যাগার হিসেবে সিন্টাইম বাস্তব সময়ে চালিয়ে যায় এবং শুধুমাত্র ভিন্ন ধরনের লেখা এবং বিভিন্ন ডোমে বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট এবং টুইটের তথ্যের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে সিন্টাইমটি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধত', 'hy': 'Ժամանակի արտահայտությունները ազատ տեքստից դուրս հանելը շատ ծրագրերի հիմնական խնդիր է: Մենք վերլուծում ենք ժամանակային արտահայտությունները չորս տվյալների համակարգերից և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ժամանակային տեղեկատվությունը արտահայտելու համար օգտագործվում է միայն մի փոքր խումբ բառեր, և ժամանակային արտահայտությունների բառերը ցույց են տալիս նման սինտակտի Ըստ արդյունքների, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի տեսակի հիմնված մոտեցում, որը կոչվում է ՍինԹայմս, ժամանակի արտահայտումների ճանաչելու համար: Հատկապես, մենք սահմանում ենք երեք հիմնական սինտակտիկ նշաններ, հատկապես ժամանակի նշաններ, փոփոխիչներ և թվային նշաններ, որպեսզի խմբավորենք ժամանակի հետ կապված նորմալ արտահայտությունները նշանների վրա: Այն տեսակների վրա, որոնք մենք ստեղծում ենք ընդհանուր հորիստիկ կանոններ ժամանակի արտահայտումների ճանաչելու համար: Անհայտելով, ՍինԹայմը առաջին անգամ հայտնաբերում է ժամանակային նշանները աղբ տեքստից, հետո փնտրում է իրենց շրջապատը փոփոխիչների և թվերի համար, որպեսզի ձևավորի ժամանակային սեգմերներ, և վերջապես միավորում է ժամանակային սեգմերները ժամանակ As a light-weight rule-based tagger, SynTime runs in real time, and can be easily expanded by simply adding keywords for the text of different types and of different domains.  Համեմարկ տվյալների համակարգերի և թվիթերի փորձը ցույց է տալիս, որ ՍինԹայմը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր մեթոդները:', 'am': "ነፃ ጽሑፍ ማውጣት የዘመን ድረ ገጽ ለማውጣት በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች የመሠረት ስራ ነው፡፡ ከአራቱ ዳታተሮች የዘመኑን መልዕክት እናስተምር እና ጥቂት የቃላት ጉዳይ ብቻ የጊዜውን መረጃ ለማሳየት እና በጊዜው እና ቃላት የተሰናከሉትን ተግባር የሚያሳልፉትን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹን በመሠረት፣ ሰዓትን ለማወቅ የሚባል የዓይነት ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለያይነት ሦስት የዋነኛው መስኮት ዓይነቶች፣ ሰዓት፣ አዲስ እና ቁጥር፣ በተጨማሪው ሰዓት በተለየ ግንኙነቶች ላይ የተደላደለ የግንኙነት አካላትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በ ዓይነቶች የዘመኑን መልዕክት ለማወቅ የሀርሲ ሕግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሲንሰዓት በመጀመሪያ ጊዜ ከጥሩ ጽሑፍ የተሰራውን ምልክቶች ያስታውቃል፣ ከዚያም በኋላ የአካባቢዎች እና ቁጥር ለጊዜው እቅድ እንዲያደርጉ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ብርሃን-ሚዛን የሥርዓት መዝገብ ማሰሪያ እንደሚደረግ SynTime በreal time ይሮጣል፣ ለልዩ ዓይነት እና ለልዩ domain ጽሑፎችን በመጨመር ቀላል ቃላትን ለመጨመር ይችላል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bs': 'Izvlačenje vremenskih izraza iz slobodnog teksta je osnovni zadatak za mnoge aplikacije. Analiziramo izraze vremena iz četiri seta podataka i otkrijemo da se koristi samo mala grupa riječi za izražavanje vremenskih informacija, a riječi u vremenskim izrazima pokazuju slično sintaktično ponašanje. Na temelju nalaza, predlažemo pristup na tipu pod nazivom SynTime da prepoznamo izraze vremena. Posebno definišemo tri glavne tipa sintaktičkih znakova, a to je znak vremena, modifikator i broj, za grupiranje redovnih izraza povezanih sa vremenom preko znakova. Na vrste koje dizajniramo generalna heuristička pravila da bi prepoznali izraze vremena. U priznanju, SynTime prvo identificira znakove vremena sa sirovog teksta, zatim pretražuje okruženje njihovih modifikatora i brojeva kako bi formirali vremenske segmente, i konačno povezuje vremenske segmente na vremenske izraze. Kao značka na temelju svetlosti pravila, SynTime vodi u pravo vrijeme i može se lako proširiti dodajući ključne riječi za tekst različitih vrsta i različitih domena. Eksperiment na setama podataka o referenciji i podacima o tweetu pokazuje da SynTime nadmašuje metode umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Extraer expressions de temps del text lliure és una tasca fonamental per a moltes aplicacions. We analyze the time expressions from four datasets and find that only a small group of words are used to express time information, and the words in time expressions demonstrate similar syntactic behaviour.  Based on the findings, we propose a type-based approach, named SynTime, to recognize time expressions.  En concret, definim tres tipus principals de fitxes sinàctiques, a saber, fitxes de temps, modificadores i números, per grupar expressions regulars relacionades amb el temps sobre fitxes. En els tipus que dissenyem regles heurístiques generals per reconèixer expressions del temps. En reconeixement, SynTime primer identifica les fitxes de temps del text brut, després busca modificadors i números al seu entorn per formar segments de temps, i finalment fusiona els segments de temps a expressions de temps. Com a etiquetador lliure basat en regles, SynTime funciona en temps real i es pot expandir fàcilment afegint paraules clau al text de diferents tipus i dominis. L'experiment en conjunts de dades de referència i en tweets mostra que SynTime supera els mètodes més avançats.", 'cs': 'Extrahování časových výrazů z volného textu je základním úkolem mnoha aplikací. Analyzujeme časové výrazy ze čtyř datových sad a zjišťujeme, že k vyjádření časových informací se používá pouze malá skupina slov a slova v časových výrazech vykazují podobné syntaktické chování. Na základě zjištěných poznatků navrhujeme typový přístup s názvem SynTime k rozpoznání časových výrazů. Konkrétně definujeme tři hlavní syntaktické typy tokenů, konkrétně časový token, modifikátor a číselný, abychom seskupovali časově související regulární výrazy nad tokeny. Na typech navrhujeme obecná heuristická pravidla pro rozpoznání časových výrazů. Při rozpoznání SynTime nejprve identifikuje časové tokeny ze surového textu, poté vyhledává jejich okolí modifikátory a číslice pro vytvoření časových segmentů a nakonec sloučí časové segmenty do časových výrazů. Jako lehký tagger založený na pravidlech běží SynTime v reálném čase a lze ho snadno rozšířit jednoduchým přidáním klíčových slov pro text různých typů a různých domén. Experiment na referenčních datových sadách a tweetech ukazuje, že SynTime překonává nejmodernější metody.', 'et': 'Ajaavaldiste ekstraheerimine vabast tekstist on paljude rakenduste jaoks oluline ülesanne. Analüüsime nelja andmekogumi ajaavaldiseid ja leiame, et ajainfo väljendamiseks kasutatakse ainult väikest sõnarühma ning ajaavaldises olevad sõnad näitavad sarnast süntaktilist käitumist. Tulemuste põhjal pakume välja tüübipõhise lähenemisviisi nimega SynTime, et ära tunda ajaväljendeid. Täpsemalt määratleme kolm peamist süntaktilist märki tüüpi, nimelt ajamärki, modifikaatorit ja numbrit, et rühmitada ajaga seotud regulaaravaldised märkide üle. Tüüpidele kujundame üldised heuristilised reeglid ajaväljendite äratundmiseks. Tundmiseks tuvastab SynTime kõigepealt toortekstist ajamärgid, seejärel otsib nende ümbruses ajasegmentide moodustamiseks muudajaid ja numbreid ning lõpuks ühendab ajasegmendid ajaavaldisteks. Kerge reeglipõhise sildistajana töötab SynTime reaalajas ja seda saab lihtsalt laiendada, lisades märksõnad erinevat tüüpi ja erinevate domeenide tekstile. Võrdlusandmekogumite ja säutsude andmete eksperiment näitab, et SynTime ületab kaasaegseid meetodeid.', 'fi': 'Aikalausekkeiden purkaminen vapaasta tekstistä on monien sovellusten perustehtävä. Analysoimme neljän aineiston aikalausekkeita ja havaitsemme, että vain pieni joukko sanoja käytetään aikatiedon ilmaisemiseen ja sanat aikalausekkeissa osoittavat samankaltaista syntaktista käyttäytymistä. Löydösten perusteella ehdotamme tyyppipohjaista lähestymistapaa, nimeltään SynTime, aikalausekkeiden tunnistamiseen. Määrittelemme kolme keskeistä syntaktista merkkityyppiä, nimittäin aikamerkkiä, modifiointia ja numeroa, ryhmittelemään aikasidonnaiset säännölliset lausekkeet merkkien päälle. Tyypeihin suunnittelemme yleisiä heuristisia sääntöjä aikalausekkeiden tunnistamiseksi. Tunnistukseksi SynTime tunnistaa ensin aikamerkit raakatekstistä, etsii sitten ympäristöstään muuttujia ja numeroita aikasegmenttien muodostamiseksi ja lopuksi yhdistää aikasegmentit aikalausekkeiksi. SynTime toimii kevyenä sääntöpohjaisena tagaajana reaaliajassa, ja sitä voidaan helposti laajentaa lisäämällä avainsanoja erityyppisille teksteille ja eri toimialueille. Vertailutietosarjojen ja twiittitietojen kokeilu osoittaa SynTimen suoriutuvan huippuluokan menetelmistä.', 'az': 'Özgür metindən vaxt ifadələrini çıxartmaq çoxlu proqramlar üçün fundamental bir iş. Biz dörd veri qurularından vaxt ifadələrini analiz edirik və ancaq kiçik bir qrup sözlərin vaxt məlumatlarını ifadə etmək üçün istifadə edilir, və vaxt ifadələrində sözlər də eyni sintaktik davranışı göstərir. Çətirlərə baxmayaraq, zamanı ifadələrini tanıtmaq üçün növ tabanlı bir tərzim təklif edirik. Özellikle, üç ana sintaktik token türünü belə tanımlıyıq, o zaman token, dəyişiklik və sayı, zaman-bağlı düzgün ifadələri token üzerində. Zaman ifadələrini tanıtmaq üçün genel heuristik kurallarını tasarlayırıq. Bilinməkdə, SynTime ilk dəfə səviyyədən vaxt işaretlərini belə tanıyır, sonra onların ətrafını dəyişdirənlər və sayılar üçün axtarır, vaxt segmentlərini vaxt ifadələrinə birləşdirir. Aşıq-a ğırlıq kural tabanlı etiketçi kimi, SynTime həqiqət zamanda çalışır, və sadəcə fərqli növ və fərqli domenin mətnlərinin anahtar sözlərini əlavə edərək asanlıqla genişlənir. Benchmark verilənlərin və tweet verilənlərinin sınaqlarının SynTime-in-art metodlarından daha üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'he': 'הוציאה של ביטוי זמן מהטקסט חופשי היא משימה יסודית עבור שימושים רבים. אנו מנתחים את הבטאות הזמן מארבעה קבוצות נתונים ומצאים שרק קבוצה קטנה של מילים משתמשות כדי להביע מידע הזמן, והמילים בבטאות הזמן מראות התנהגות סינטקטית דומה. בהתבסס על הממצאים, אנו מציעים גישה מבוססת בסוג, בשם SynTime, כדי לזהות ביטויים זמן. במיוחד, אנחנו מגדירים שלושה סוגי סינטקטיקים עיקריים, כלומר סימן זמן, מודידור ומספרי, כדי לקבוע ביטויים קבועים קשורים לזמן על סימנים. על הסוגים שאנחנו מעצבים חוקים אוריסטיים כללים כדי לזהות ביטויים בזמן. בתור זיהוי, SynTime קודם מזהה את סימני הזמן מן טקסט ראשון, ואז מחפש את סביבתם למופעים ומספרים כדי ליצור סגמנים זמנים, ולבסוף מבלבל את סגמני הזמן לבטאות הזמן. As a light-weight rule-based tagger, SynTime runs in real time, and can be easily expanded by simply adding keywords for the text of different types and of different domains.  ניסוי על קבוצות נתונים ושוויטים מראה שסינטיים עולה על שיטות חדשות.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje časovnih izrazov iz prostega besedila je temeljna naloga za številne aplikacije. Analiziramo časovne izraze iz štirih naborov podatkov in ugotovimo, da se za izražanje časovnih informacij uporablja le majhna skupina besed, besede v časovnih izrazih pa kažejo podobno sintaktično vedenje. Na podlagi ugotovitev predlagamo pristop, ki temelji na tipu, imenovan SynTime, za prepoznavanje časovnih izrazov. Natančneje določamo tri glavne vrste sintaktičnih žetonov, in sicer časovni žeton, spreminjevalnik in številka, za združevanje časovno povezanih regularnih izrazov nad žetoni. Pri tipih oblikujemo splošna heuristična pravila za prepoznavanje časovnih izrazov. V prepoznavanju SynTime najprej identificira časovne žetone iz surovega besedila, nato išče v okolici spremenjevalnike in številke, da oblikuje časovne segmente, in končno združi časovne segmente v časovne izraze. Kot lahek označevalnik, ki temelji na pravilih, SynTime teče v realnem času in ga je mogoče enostavno razširiti s preprosto dodajanjem ključnih besedil za besedilo različnih vrst in različnih domen. Eksperiment na referenčnih naborih podatkov in podatkih tweetov kaže, da SynTime presega najsodobnejše metode.', 'ha': "Fitarwa da magana na lokaci daga matsayin da aka huru, yana da wani aikin muhimmi wa masu shiryoyin ayuka masu yawa. Tuna anarari maganar lokaci daga bakin database huɗu kuma munã gane cewa ana amfani da jama'a kaɗan kawai ga su bayyana ma'anar lokaci, da kalmõmi da ke cikin magana, sunã nuna aikin haɗiya. Basan da masu motsi, muna buƙata wata hanyoyi mai ƙayyade sunTime, dõmin ka gane magana na lokaci. A ƙayyade, za'a ƙayyade nau'i uku masu main syntactic, kamar alama na lokaci, mai gyare, da yawan da, zuwa filinaikin da aka yi danganta da wa lokaci masu haɗuwa a kan alama. Daga irin da Muke ƙayyade Rubuwan heuristic da za'a gane magana na lokaci. In da za'a gane, Time na farkon ya gane alarmun lokaci daga matsayin raw, sa'an nan na search a mazaɗa su dõmin gyare-gyare da yawan launin da za'a danna rabon lokaci, kuma yana ƙara haɗin sunan lokaci zuwa bayanin lokaci. Kama wata tagger mai inganci na rubutun nau'i, SinTime na tafiyar da shi a lokaci na gaske, kuma za a iya faɗa shi mai sauƙi kawai dõmin a ƙara kalmõmi wa matsayin nau'in da wasu daban-daban. Ƙaramiwa na tsari na bangbangon ayuka da data na Twitter yana nuna cewa shirin ayukan-da-art", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éngleksi pergambar kapan kelas nang sampek dadi sampek karo nganggo kuwi kelas telu kelas kuwi nggawe informasi layar, lan kelas kuwi arep nguasai pawaran ning aku sawar mungkasi sinaksi sing koyok Ngawe kang nggunakake bukalat, kita supoyatan layakno sing basa-layakno, tapi "SenTime", kanggo ngerasakno layakno string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Genjer-genjer esuk bukane Display boxes Sampeyan rule-gewich sing wis dipunangke ditambah, sinau timer iso dianggawe ngupakan anyar, lan iso diandelak ngewehi lagi nambah kelas-kelas kanggo oleh Tipe sampeyan lan sak sampeyan sampeyan. Name', 'bo': 'རང་དབང་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ན་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་པོ་ལ་རྨས་གཞི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་བཞིན་ནས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་དུས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རྙེད་པ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་དེ། ང་ཚོས་རིགས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཞིག་བྱེད་དགོས། མིང་འདོགས SynTime དང་དུས་ཚ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་པར་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟར་བཀོད་པ། བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་དབྱིབས འདི་recognition, SynTime first identifies the time tokens from raw text, then searches their surroundings for modifiers and numerals to form time segments, and finally merges the time segments to time expressions. As a light-weight rule-based tagger, SynTime runs in real time, and can be easily expanded by simply adding keywords for the text of different types and of different domains. benchmark གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་Tweets་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ནི་SynTime་དུས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་ལྟ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'A Syntactic Neural Model for General-Purpose Code Generation', 'ar': 'نموذج عصبي نحوي لإنشاء كود للأغراض العامة', 'fr': 'Un modèle neuronal syntaxique pour la génération de code à usage général', 'es': 'Un modelo neuronal sintáctico para la generación de código de uso general', 'pt': 'Um modelo neural sintático para geração de código de propósito geral', 'ja': '汎用コード生成のための構文ニューラルモデル', 'zh': '通用代码生句法神经模', 'hi': 'सामान्य प्रयोजन कोड पीढ़ी के लिए एक वाक्यात्मक तंत्रिका मॉडल', 'ru': 'Синтаксическая нейронная модель для генерации кодов общего назначения', 'ga': 'Samhail Néarchóras Syntactic do Ghiniúint Cóid Ghinearálta', 'ka': 'სინტექტიკური ნეირალური მოდელი საერთო მიზეზი კოდის შექმნა', 'el': 'Ένα συντακτικό Νευρικό Μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία κώδικα γενικού σκοπού', 'hu': 'Szintaktikus neurális modell az általános célú kód generálására', 'kk': 'Жалпы- мақсат кодын құру синтактикалық неврал моделі', 'lt': 'Bendrojo tikslo kodų generavimo sintaktinis neurologinis modelis', 'it': 'Un modello neurale sintattico per la generazione di codici generici', 'ms': 'Model Neural Sintaktik untuk Jenerasi Kod Tujuan Umum', 'ml': 'A Syntactic Neural Model for General-Purpose Code Generation', 'mt': 'Mudell Newrali Sintattiku għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Kodiċi ta’ Għan Ġenerali', 'mn': 'Жалпы-Цагаан Код үүсгэх синтактикийн мэдрэлийн загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Syntaktyczny model neuronowy do generowania kodu ogólnego przeznaczenia', 'sr': 'Синтактичен неврален модел за генерално- целево код', 'ro': 'Un model neutral sintactic pentru generarea codurilor generale', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය- ප්\u200dරකාරණ කෝඩ් නිර්මාණය සඳහා සංවිධානයක් නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'En syntaktisk neural modell för generering av allmän kod', 'so': 'Model of Syntactic Neural for General-Purpose Code Generation', 'ta': 'பொது தொடர்பு குறியீடு உருவாக்கத்திற்கான ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு நெயுரு மாதிரி', 'mk': 'Name', 'ur': 'General-Purpose Code Generation کے لئے سینٹاکتیک نیورال موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thần kinh pháp cho tạo ra mã chung', 'bg': 'Синтактичен неврален модел за генериране на код с общо предназначение', 'nl': 'Een syntactisch neuraal model voor algemene codegeneratie', 'da': 'En syntaktisk neural model til generering af generelle koder', 'hr': 'Sintaktični neuronski model generacije generalnog ciljnog koda', 'de': 'Ein syntaktisches neuronales Modell zur Generierung allgemeiner Codes', 'ko': '유니버설 코드로 생성된 문법 신경 모형', 'id': 'Model Neural Sintaktik untuk Generasi Kode Tujuan Umum', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'A Syntactic Neural Model for General-Purpose Code Generation', 'tr': 'Umumy-Mazmunlar Ködleme üçin Sintaktik Näral Modeli', 'sq': 'Një model neuronal sintaktik për gjenerimin e kodit me qëllim të përgjithshëm', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Սինտակտիկ նյարդային մոդել ընդհանուր նպատակի կոդի ստեղծման համար', 'az': 'General-Purpose Kod Ünvanı üçün Sintaktik Nöral Modeli', 'bs': 'Sintaktični neuronski model generacije generalnog ciljnog koda', 'bn': 'সাধারণ-পুরস্কার কোড জেনারেশনের জন্য একটি সিন্ট্যাক্টিক নিউরেল মডেল', 'ca': 'Un model neuronal sintàctic per a generar codis de propòsit general', 'cs': 'Syntaktický neuronový model pro generování všeobecného kódu', 'et': 'Üldotstarbelise koodi genereerimise süntaktiline neuraalmudel', 'fi': 'Syntaktinen hermomalli yleiskäyttöisen koodin luomiseen', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Sintatični nevralni model za generiranje splošnih kod', 'bo': 'General-Purpose Code Generation དབྱིབས་སྟངས་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་རིགས', 'jv': 'model Senaksi Nyural kanggo General-Purposition Generation', 'he': 'Name'}
{'en': 'We consider the problem of parsing natural language descriptions into source code written in a general-purpose programming language like Python. Existing data-driven methods treat this problem as a language generation task without considering the underlying syntax of the target programming language. Informed by previous work in semantic parsing, in this paper we propose a novel neural architecture powered by a grammar model to explicitly capture the target syntax as prior knowledge. Experiments find this an effective way to scale up to generation of complex programs from natural language descriptions, achieving state-of-the-art results that well outperform previous code generation and semantic parsing approaches.', 'ar': 'نحن نعتبر مشكلة تحليل أوصاف اللغة الطبيعية في الكود المصدري المكتوب بلغة برمجة للأغراض العامة مثل Python. تتعامل الطرق الحالية التي تعتمد على البيانات مع هذه المشكلة على أنها مهمة إنشاء لغة دون النظر إلى البنية الأساسية للغة البرمجة الهدف. بناءً على العمل السابق في التحليل الدلالي ، نقترح في هذه الورقة بنية عصبية جديدة مدعومة بنموذج نحوي لالتقاط البنية الهدف بوضوح كمعرفة سابقة. تجد التجارب أن هذه طريقة فعالة لتوسيع نطاق إنشاء برامج معقدة من أوصاف اللغة الطبيعية ، وتحقيق أحدث النتائج التي تتفوق بشكل جيد على أساليب إنشاء الكود والتحليل الدلالي السابقة.', 'es': 'Consideramos el problema de analizar las descripciones de lenguaje natural en código fuente escrito en un lenguaje de programación de uso general como Python. Los métodos basados en datos existentes tratan este problema como una tarea de generación de lenguaje sin considerar la sintaxis subyacente del lenguaje de programación de destino. Informado por trabajos anteriores en análisis semántico, en este artículo proponemos una arquitectura neuronal novedosa impulsada por un modelo gramatical para capturar explícitamente la sintaxis objetivo como conocimiento previo. Los experimentos encuentran que esta es una forma eficaz de escalar a la generación de programas complejos a partir de descripciones en lenguaje natural, logrando resultados de vanguardia que superan con creces los enfoques anteriores de generación de código y análisis semántico.', 'pt': 'Consideramos o problema de analisar descrições de linguagem natural em código-fonte escrito em uma linguagem de programação de uso geral como Python. Os métodos orientados a dados existentes tratam esse problema como uma tarefa de geração de linguagem sem considerar a sintaxe subjacente da linguagem de programação de destino. Informado por trabalhos anteriores em análise semântica, neste artigo propomos uma nova arquitetura neural alimentada por um modelo gramatical para capturar explicitamente a sintaxe de destino como conhecimento prévio. Os experimentos consideram isso uma maneira eficaz de escalar até a geração de programas complexos a partir de descrições de linguagem natural, alcançando resultados de última geração que superam em muito a geração de código anterior e as abordagens de análise semântica.', 'fr': "Nous examinons le problème de l'analyse des descriptions en langage naturel dans du code source écrit dans un langage de programmation généraliste tel que Python. Les méthodes pilotées par les données existantes traitent ce problème comme une tâche de génération de langage sans tenir compte de la syntaxe sous-jacente du langage de programmation cible. Inspirés par des travaux antérieurs en analyse sémantique, nous proposons dans cet article une nouvelle architecture neuronale alimentée par un modèle de grammaire pour capturer explicitement la syntaxe cible en tant que connaissance préalable. Les expériences ont trouvé qu'il s'agissait d'un moyen efficace de passer à la génération de programmes complexes à partir de descriptions en langage naturel, obtenant des résultats de pointe qui surpassent largement les approches précédentes de génération de code et d'analyse sémantique.", 'ja': '自然言語の記述をPythonのような汎用プログラミング言語で書かれたソースコードに構文解析する問題を考える。既存のデータ駆動メソッドは、ターゲットプログラミング言語の基礎となる構文を考慮せずに、この問題を言語生成タスクとして扱う。セマンティック構文解析の先行研究から情報を得て、この論文では、文法モデルを動力源とし、ターゲット構文を事前知識として明示的に取り込む新規のニューラルアーキテクチャを提案している。実験では、これは自然言語の記述から複雑なプログラムを生成するための効果的な方法であり、以前のコード生成およびセマンティック構文解析アプローチを上回る最先端の結果を達成します。', 'zh': '臣等思述自然语言解析为用Python等通用编程语言所撰源代码。 今数驱之以为言,而不虑编程语言之基语法。 先于语义解析,后于本文,发一语法之新型神经架构,以显式获语法为先验知。 实验见有效之道,可以广自然语言述生杂之序,以致先进,优于前代码生语义解析术也。', 'hi': 'हम पायथन जैसी सामान्य उद्देश्य प्रोग्रामिंग भाषा में लिखे गए स्रोत कोड में प्राकृतिक भाषा विवरणों को पार्स करने की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं। मौजूदा डेटा-संचालित विधियाँ इस समस्या को लक्ष्य प्रोग्रामिंग भाषा के अंतर्निहित वाक्यविन्यास पर विचार किए बिना भाषा पीढ़ी के कार्य के रूप में मानती हैं। शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में पिछले काम से सूचित, इस पेपर में हम एक व्याकरण मॉडल द्वारा संचालित एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि स्पष्ट रूप से पूर्व ज्ञान के रूप में लक्ष्य वाक्यविन्यास पर कब्जा किया जा सके। प्रयोगों को प्राकृतिक भाषा के विवरण से जटिल कार्यक्रमों की पीढ़ी तक स्केल करने का एक प्रभावी तरीका लगता है, जो अत्याधुनिक परिणामों को प्राप्त करता है जो पिछली कोड पीढ़ी और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग दृष्टिकोणों को अच्छी तरह से बेहतर बनाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы рассматриваем проблему синтаксического анализа описаний естественного языка в исходный код, написанный на языке программирования общего назначения, таком как Python. Существующие методы, основанные на данных, рассматривают эту проблему как задачу генерации языка без учета основного синтаксиса целевого языка программирования. Основываясь на предыдущей работе в семантическом синтаксическом разборе, в этой статье мы предлагаем новую нейронную архитектуру, основанную на грамматической модели, чтобы явно зафиксировать целевой синтаксис в качестве предварительного знания. Эксперименты считают это эффективным способом масштабирования до генерации сложных программ из описаний естественного языка, достижения самых современных результатов, которые превосходят предыдущие подходы к генерации кода и семантическому синтаксическому разбору.', 'ga': 'Breathnaímid ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le tuairiscí teanga nádúrtha a pharsáil isteach sa chód foinse atá scríofa i dteanga ríomhchláraithe ghinearálta mar Python. Déileálann modhanna atá bunaithe ar shonraí faoi láthair leis an bhfadhb seo mar thasc giniúna teanga gan smaoineamh ar chomhréir bhunúsach na sprioctheanga ríomhchlárúcháin. Ar an eolas ag obair roimhe seo ar pharsáil shéimeantach, molaimid sa pháipéar seo ailtireacht néarúil úr a thiomáintear le múnla gramadaí chun an sprioc-chomhréir a ghabháil go sainráite mar réamheolas. Is dóigh leis na turgnaimh seo gur bealach éifeachtach é seo chun cláir chasta a mhéadú go dtí glúin ó chur síos ar theanga nádúrtha, ag baint amach torthaí den scoth a sháraíonn cur chuige giniúna cód agus parsála shéimeantach roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პრობლემების პროგრამის სახელი, როგორც Python. მიმდინარე მონაცემების მიღებული მონაცემები ამ პრობლემას ენის წარმოიქმნის რაოდენობაში არაფერად დავუდგინოთ მიმდინარე პროგრამირების სინტაქსი. წინა სამუშაო სემონტიკური პარაზიციაში ინფორმაცია, ამ დონტში ჩვენ პრომენტიკური ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტიქტიკატი, რომელიც გრამიმარიური მოდელზე ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებული, რომ მი ექსპერიმენტები იძებენ ეს ეფექტიური გზა, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ კომპლექტური პროგრამების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ კოდენტიკური განაზღვ', 'hu': 'Figyelembe vesszük a természetes nyelvleírások elemzésének problémáját egy általános célú programozási nyelven, mint a Python. A meglévő adatvezérelt módszerek ezt a problémát nyelvgenerálási feladatként kezelik, anélkül, hogy figyelembe vennék a célnyelv alapjául szolgáló szintaxist. Korábbi szemantikai elemzéssel kapcsolatos munkák alapján ebben a tanulmányban egy nyelvtani modellel működő új neurális architektúrát javasolunk, amely kifejezetten rögzíti a célszintaxist előzetes tudásként. A kísérletek szerint ez hatékony módja annak, hogy komplex programokat generáljunk a természetes nyelvleírásokból, és olyan korszerű eredményeket érjünk el, amelyek jól felülmúlják a korábbi kódképzési és szemantikai elemzési megközelítéseket.', 'it': "Consideriamo il problema dell'analisi delle descrizioni del linguaggio naturale in codice sorgente scritto in un linguaggio di programmazione generale come Python. I metodi data-driven esistenti trattano questo problema come un'attività di generazione del linguaggio senza considerare la sintassi sottostante del linguaggio di programmazione di destinazione. Informati da precedenti lavori di analisi semantica, in questo articolo proponiamo una nuova architettura neurale alimentata da un modello grammaticale per catturare esplicitamente la sintassi di destinazione come conoscenza preliminare. Gli esperimenti trovano questo un modo efficace per scalare fino alla generazione di programmi complessi dalle descrizioni del linguaggio naturale, ottenendo risultati all'avanguardia che ben superano i precedenti approcci di generazione di codice e analisi semantica.", 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της ανάλυσης περιγραφών φυσικής γλώσσας σε πηγαίο κώδικα γραμμένο σε μια γλώσσα προγραμματισμού γενικής χρήσης όπως το Python. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι που βασίζονται σε δεδομένα αντιμετωπίζουν αυτό το πρόβλημα ως εργασία δημιουργίας γλωσσών χωρίς να λαμβάνουν υπόψη την υποκείμενη σύνταξη της γλώσσας προγραμματισμού προορισμού. Ενημερωμένοι από προηγούμενες εργασίες στη σημασιολογική ανάλυση, στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια νέα νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική που τροφοδοτείται από ένα γραμματικό μοντέλο για να συλλάβει ρητά τη σύνταξη του στόχου ως προηγούμενη γνώση. Τα πειράματα βρίσκουν αυτό έναν αποτελεσματικό τρόπο για να κλιμακωθούν μέχρι τη δημιουργία σύνθετων προγραμμάτων από περιγραφές φυσικής γλώσσας, επιτυγχάνοντας αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας που ξεπερνούν την προηγούμενη παραγωγή κώδικα και τις προσεγγίσεις σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης.', 'lt': 'Mes svarstome problem ą, susijusią su gamtinių kalbų aprašymų analizavimu į šaltinio kodą, užrašytą bendros paskirties programavimo kalba, pvz., Python. Esami duomenų pagrindu grindžiami metodai šią problem ą vertina kaip kalbų kūrimo užduotį, neatsižvelgiant į tikslinės programavimo kalbos sintaksą. Paskelbta ankstesniu semantinio analizavimo darbu, šiame dokumente siūlome naują nervų architektūrą, pagrįstą gramatiniu modeliu, kad tikslinė sintaksija būtų aiškiai apibūdinta kaip ankstesnės žinios. Eksperimentai mano, kad tai yra veiksmingas būdas iki sudėtingų programų gamtinių kalbų aprašymų sukūrimo, siekiant pažangiausių rezultatų, kurie gerai viršija ankstesnės kodų sukūrimo ir semantinio analizavimo metodus.', 'kk': 'Біз Python секілді жалпы мақсатты бағдарлама тілінде жазылған көзінің түсініктемелерін талдау мәселесін ойлаймыз. Бар деректерді басқару әдістері бұл мәселеді тілді құру тапсырмасы мақсатты бағдарламаның тілінің астындағы синтаксисін қарастырмайды. Семантикалық талдау үшін алдыңғы жұмыс бойынша мәлімет берілген, бұл қағазда біз алдыңғы білім ретінде мақсатты синтаксисін түсініктіру үшін грамматикалық моделі қолданылатын жаңа невралдық Тәжірибелер, табиғи тілдердің сипаттамасынан комплексті бағдарламаларды құру үшін әсер ететін әрекетті табу, алдыңғы код құрылымынан және semantiкалық талдау жағдайларының күйін жеткізу үшін әсер', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dക്കാനുള്ള പ്രശ്നം പൈത്തോന്\u200d പോലുള്ള ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ് കോഡിലേക്ക് എഴുതിയിരി നിലവിലുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ നടത്തുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ് ഭാഷയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിനാക്സ് ചെയ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി അറിയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഗ്രാമാറിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ വിവരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രോഗ്രാമങ്ങളുടെ തലമുറയിലേക്ക് മുകളിലേക്ക് വരുന്നതിനായി ഇത് പ്രാവര', 'mk': 'Го разгледуваме проблемот со анализирањето на описите на природниот јазик во изворниот код напишан на јазик на програмирање со општи цели како Python. Постојачките методи на податоци го третираат овој проблем како задача за генерација на јазик без да се земе предвид основната синтакса на јазикот на програмирање на метата. Информирани од претходната работа во семантичното анализирање, во овој весник предложуваме нова нервна архитектура која се поттикнува од граматичен модел за експлицитно да ја фати целната синтакса како претходно знаење. Експериментите го сметаат ова за ефикасен начин за проширување до генерација на комплексни програми од природни јазични описи, постигнување на најсовремени резултати кои добро ги надминуваат претходните генерации на кодови и семантични пристапи на анализирање.', 'ms': 'Kami mempertimbangkan masalah huraian bahasa alami ke dalam kod sumber yang ditulis dalam bahasa pemrograman-tujuan umum seperti Python. Kaedah pemacu data yang wujud memperlakukan masalah ini sebagai tugas generasi bahasa tanpa mempertimbangkan sintaks as as bahasa program sasaran. Dimaklumkan oleh kerja sebelumnya dalam penghuraian semantik, dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan arkitektur saraf baru yang berkuasa oleh model grammar untuk menangkap secara eksplicit sintaks sasaran sebagai pengetahuan sebelumnya. Eksperimen menemukan ini cara yang efektif untuk skala sehingga generasi program kompleks dari deskripsi bahasa semulajadi, mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art yang lebih baik daripada generasi kod terdahulu dan pendekatan penghuraian semantik.', 'mt': 'Aħna nqisu l-problem a tal-analiżi tad-deskrizzjonijiet tal-lingwi naturali fil-kodiċi tas-sors miktuba f’lingwa ta’ programmazzjoni b’għan ġenerali bħal Python. Il-metodi eżistenti mmexxija mid-dejta jittrattaw din il-problem a bħala kompitu ta’ ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi mingħajr ma jikkunsidraw is-sintaks sottostanti tal-lingwa tal-ipprogrammar fil-mira. Informat minn ħidma preċedenti fl-analiżi semantika, f’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu arkitettura newrali ġdida mħaddma minn mudell grammatiku biex tinqabad espliċitament is-sintaks fil-mira bħala għarfien preċedenti. L-esperimenti jsibu dan mod effettiv biex jiżdiedu sa ġenerazzjoni ta’ programmi kumplessi mid-deskrizzjonijiet naturali tal-lingwi, biex jinkisbu r-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati li jaqbżu sew il-ġenerazzjoni tal-kodiċi preċedenti u l-approċċi semantiċi tal-analiżi.', 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл тодорхойлолтын асуудлыг Python шиг ерөнхий зорилготой програмчлалын хэл дээр бичигдсэн эх код руу хуваалцах асуудлыг бодож байна. Ингээд байгаа өгөгдлийн удирдлагатай арга нь энэ асуудлыг хэл төрүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа болгон зорилготой програмчлалын хэлний үндсэн синтаксисийг ойлгохгүй байдаг. Өмнөх ажлын шинжлэх ухааны тухай мэдээлэл, энэ цаасан дээр бид грамматын загвараар зориулагдсан шинэ сэтгэл зүйн архитектурыг өмнөх мэдлэг гэж тодорхой ойлгохын тулд зориулагдсан шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан Үүнийг туршилт нь байгалийн хэл тодорхойлдог комплекс програмуудын түвшинд нэмэгдүүлэх эффективны арга юм. Өмнөх кодын бүтээлч болон semantic хуваалцааны арга барилгыг илүү сайхан гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Considerăm problema analizării descrierilor limbajului natural în codul sursă scris într-un limbaj de programare general precum Python. Metodele existente bazate pe date tratează această problemă ca o activitate de generare a limbajului fără a lua în considerare sintaxa de bază a limbajului de programare țintă. Informați de lucrările anterioare în analizarea semantică, în această lucrare propunem o arhitectură neurală nouă alimentată de un model gramatical pentru a capta în mod explicit sintaxa țintă ca cunoștințe anterioare. Experimentele găsesc acest lucru o modalitate eficientă de a se extinde la generarea de programe complexe din descrieri de limbaj natural, obținând rezultate de ultimă oră care depășesc cu bine abordările anterioare de generare a codului și analizare semantică.', 'no': 'Vi ser på problemet med tolking av naturspråkkskildringar i kjeldekoden skriven i eit generelt program-språk som Python. Den eksisterande datadrivte metodane behandler dette problemet som språk- oppgåve utan å forstå underliggende syntaks for målspråket. Informert av førre arbeid i semantisk tolking, i denne papiret foreslår vi ein novel neuralarkitektur som er styrt av eit grammatisk modell for å eksplisisere henta målsyntaksen som førre kunnskap. Eksperiment finn dette ein effektiv måte å skalera opp til generering av komplekse program frå naturspråksbeskrivelser, og når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten resultater som godt utfører førre kodeogenerering og semantiske tolking tilnærmingar.', 'pl': 'Rozważamy problem parsowania opisów języka naturalnego do kodu źródłowego napisanego w języku programowania ogólnego przeznaczenia, takim jak Python. Istniejące metody oparte na danych traktują ten problem jako zadanie generowania języka bez uwzględnienia podstawowej składni docelowego języka programowania. Na podstawie wcześniejszych prac nad parsowaniem semantycznym, w niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową architekturę neuronową opartą na modelu gramatycznym, aby wyraźnie uchwycić składnię docelową jako wiedzę wcześniejszą. Eksperymenty uznają to za skuteczny sposób skalowania do generowania złożonych programów z opisów języka naturalnego, osiągając najnowocześniejsze wyniki, które znacznie przewyższają poprzednie generowanie kodu i podejścia parsowania semantycznego.', 'sr': 'Razmišljamo o problemu analize prirodnog jezika opisa u izvornog koda napisanog na jeziku programiranja kao što je Python. Postoje metode koje vode podatke tretiraju ovaj problem kao zadatak za generaciju jezika bez razmišljanja o temeljnoj sintaksi jezika ciljnog programiranja. Obaviješteni prethodnim radom u semantičkom analizu, u ovom papiru predlažemo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja je moćna gramatičkim modelom da objašnjava ciljnu sintaksu kao prethodno znanje. Eksperimenti to smatraju efikasnim načinom da se širi do generacije kompleksnih programa iz prirodnog jezika opisa, postigne rezultate stanja umjetnosti koje dobro iznose prethodnu generaciju kodova i semantičke pristupe analize.', 'si': 'අපි පයිතන් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරපු භාෂාව විශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හිතනවා. ඉතින් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති විදියට මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය භාෂා විදියට වැඩක් විදියට හිතන්නේ ඉලක්ක ව්\u200dයාප්ති භාෂ සෙමාන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණයේ පසුගිය වැඩේ තොරතුරු කරලා තියෙන්නේ, මේ පැත්තේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් විදි පරීක්ෂණයක් මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්නවා ස්වභාවික භාෂාව විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන', 'so': 'Dhibaatada ku saabsan baaritaanka qoraalka afka asalka ah ee ugu qoran qoraalka qoraalka qoraalka luqada qoraalka qoraalka ah oo u eg Python. Qaadooyinka taariikhda lagu wado ayaa dhibaatadan u macaamilooda sida shaqada qaranka luuqada, iyadoon ka fikirin canshuuraha hoose ee luqada programka goalka ah. Wargeliyey shaqadii hore oo ku qoran baarlamaanka semantic, warqadan ayaannu ka soo jeedaynaa dhismaha neurada ee ku xoogaysay model grammar si bayaan loogu qabsado kaalmada la-dhigo sida hore aqoonta. Imtixaanka waxaa laga helaa qaab faa’iido ah in loo koriyo barbaarinta barnaamijyada complex ah oo laga soo qoro qoraalka afka dabiicadda ah, oo uu helo arimaha farshaxanka, taasoo si fiican u samaysta qarniga hore iyo baaritaanka semantika.', 'sv': 'Vi överväger problemet med att tolka naturliga språkbeskrivningar i källkod skriven i ett allmänt programmeringsspråk som Python. Befintliga datadrivna metoder behandlar detta problem som en språkgenereringsuppgift utan att beakta målprogrammets underliggande syntax. Utifrån tidigare arbete inom semantisk tolkning föreslår vi i denna uppsats en ny neural arkitektur som drivs av en grammatisk modell för att uttryckligen fånga målsyntax som förkunskaper. Experiment anser att detta är ett effektivt sätt att skala upp till generering av komplexa program från naturliga språkbeskrivningar och uppnå toppmoderna resultat som överträffar tidigare kodgenerering och semantisk tolkning.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி விவரிப்புகளை பைதான் போன்ற மொழியில் எழுதப்பட்ட மூலத்தின் குறியீட்டில் பாக்குவதின் பிரச்சனை இருக்கும் தரவு இயக்கி முறைமைகள் இந்த பிரச்சனையை மொழி உருவாக்கும் செயலாக பார்க்கவும், இலக்கு நிரல் மொழியின் அடி பெமான்டிக் பாடலில் முந்தைய வேலையால் அறிவிக்கப்பட்டது, இந்த தாளில் நாம் ஒரு கிராமார் மாதிரி முன்னால் தெரிவாக இலக்கு ஒத்திசைவை பிடிக்க முயற்சிகள் இயல்பான மொழி விவரிப்பிலிருந்து சிக்கலான நிரல்களை உருவாக்கத்திற்கு உயர்த்த வேண்டிய முறையான வழியை கண்டுபிடிக்கும், முந்தைய கு', 'ur': 'ہم نے طبیعی زبان کی توصیف کے بارے میں سورج کوڈ میں لکھی ہوئی ایک عمومی هدف پروگرامینگ زبان کی مثال پارس کرنا کی مشکل سمجھ لیا ہے۔ Existing data-driven methods treat this problem as a language generation task without considering the underlying syntax of the target programming language. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئورل معماری معمار کے ذریعہ ایک نئورل معمار کے ذریعہ مضبوط کر رہے ہیں کہ پہلے علم کے مطابق ہدایت سینٹکس کو پکڑے۔ تجربے یہ ایک اثبات طریقہ پاتے ہیں کہ پیچیدہ پروگراموں کی نسل کو طبیعی زبان کی توصیف سے بڑھنے کے لیے، ایٹیٹ کی نتیجے پہنچ سکتے ہیں جو پہلے کی کوڈ کی نسل سے بہت اثبات کرتی ہیں اور سیمانٹی پارسینگ کی تقریب سے بہت اثبات', 'uz': "Biz asosiy tilning taʼriflarini o'zgartirish muammolari Python kabi umumiy qanday dastur tilida yozilgan manba kodi. Name Semantik parsing uchun oldingi ish haqida maʼlumot beradi, bu hujjatda biz grammatik modeli tomonidan qo'shilgan novel neural arxituvchisini tahrirlashni oldin ilmiy deb tasavvur qilamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề phân tích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thành mã nguồn được viết trong một ngôn ngữ lập trình phổ biến như Python. Phương pháp dựa trên dữ liệu hiện có xem vấn đề này như một nhiệm vụ sản xuất ngôn ngữ mà không xem xét cú pháp căn bản của ngôn ngữ chương trình đích. Thông báo từ những tác phẩm trước đây về phân tích ngữ pháp, trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc thần kinh mới được cung cấp bởi một mô hình ngữ pháp để ghi rõ cú pháp đích. Các thử nghiệm tìm ra cách hiệu quả để mở rộng đến hệ thống các chương trình phức tạp từ mô tả ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, đạt được những kết quả hiện đại vượt trội các phương pháp phân tích chữ trước.', 'bg': 'Ние разглеждаме проблема с анализирането на описанията на естествените езици в изходен код, написан на език за програмиране с общо предназначение като Питон. Съществуващите методи, управлявани от данни, третират този проблем като задача за генериране на език, без да се отчита основният синтаксис на целевия език за програмиране. Информирани от предишна работа по семантичен анализ, в настоящата статия предлагаме нова невронна архитектура, захранвана от граматически модел, за да улови изрично целевия синтаксис като предишно познание. Експериментите смятат, че това е ефективен начин за мащабиране до генериране на сложни програми от описания на естествения език, постигайки най-съвременни резултати, които добре превъзхождат предишното генериране на код и семантичен анализ подходи.', 'da': 'Vi overvejer problemet med at fortolke naturlige sprogbeskrivelser i kildekode skrevet i et generelt programmeringssprog som Python. Eksisterende datadrevne metoder behandler dette problem som en sproggenereringsopgave uden at tage hensyn til målprogrammeringssprogets underliggende syntaks. Baseret på tidligere arbejde i semantisk parsing, foreslår vi i denne artikel en ny neural arkitektur drevet af en grammatisk model til eksplicit at fange målsyntaksen som forudgående viden. Eksperimenter finder dette en effektiv måde at skalere op til generering af komplekse programmer fra naturlige sprogbeskrivelser og opnå state-of-the-art resultater, der godt overgår tidligere kodegeneration og semantisk parsing tilgange.', 'nl': "We beschouwen het probleem van het parsen van natuurlijke taalbeschrijvingen in broncode geschreven in een algemene programmeertaal zoals Python. Bestaande datagestuurde methoden behandelen dit probleem als een taak voor het genereren van talen zonder rekening te houden met de onderliggende syntaxis van de doelprogrammeertaal. Geïnformeerd door eerder werk in semantische parsing, stellen we in dit artikel een nieuwe neurale architectuur voor die wordt aangedreven door een grammatica model om de doelsyntaxis expliciet vast te leggen als voorkennis. Experimenten vinden dit een effectieve manier om op te schalen tot het genereren van complexe programma's op basis van beschrijvingen van natuurlijke talen, waardoor state-of-the-art resultaten worden bereikt die de vorige codegeneratie en semantische parsing benaderingen goed overtreffen.", 'hr': 'Smatramo problem razmatranja prirodnog jezika opisa u izvornog koda napisanog na jeziku programiranja općeg cilja poput Python a. Postoje metode koje vode podatke tretiraju ovaj problem kao zadatak generacije jezika bez razmišljanja o temeljnoj sintaksi jezika ciljnog programiranja. Obavijestili smo prethodnim radom u semantičkom analizu, u ovom papiru predlažemo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja je moćna gramatičkim modelom kako bi se pojasno uhvatila ciljna sintaksa kao prije znanja. Eksperimenti to smatraju učinkovitim načinom za proširenje do generacije kompleksnih programa iz prirodnog jezika opisa, ostvarivanje rezultata stanja umjetnosti koji dobro nadmađuju prethodnu generaciju kodova i semantičke pristupe analize.', 'de': 'Wir betrachten das Problem, natürliche Sprachbeschreibungen in Quellcode zu parsen, der in einer universellen Programmiersprache wie Python geschrieben wurde. Bestehende datengetriebene Methoden behandeln dieses Problem als Sprachgenerierungsaufgabe, ohne die zugrunde liegende Syntax der Zielprogrammiersprache zu berücksichtigen. Basierend auf früheren Arbeiten im semantischen Parsing schlagen wir in diesem Beitrag eine neuartige neuronale Architektur vor, die auf einem Grammatikmodell basiert, um die Zielsyntax explizit als Vorwissen zu erfassen. Experimente finden dies einen effektiven Weg, um komplexe Programme aus natürlichen Sprachbeschreibungen zu generieren und so State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse zu erzielen, die die bisherige Codegenerierung und semantische Parsing-Ansätze deutlich übertreffen.', 'id': 'We consider the problem of parsing natural language descriptions into source code written in a general-purpose programming language like Python.  Metode data-driven yang ada memperlakukan masalah ini sebagai tugas generasi bahasa tanpa mempertimbangkan sintaks dasar dari bahasa program sasaran. Diinformasikan oleh pekerjaan sebelumnya dalam penghuraian semantis, di kertas ini kami mengusulkan arsitektur saraf novel yang didorong oleh model gramatika untuk secara eksplicit menangkap sintaks sasaran sebagai pengetahuan sebelumnya. Eksperimen menemukan ini cara yang efektif untuk meningkat ke generasi program kompleks dari deskripsi bahasa alam, mencapai hasil terbaik yang lebih baik dari generasi kode sebelumnya dan pendekatan penganalisis semantis.', 'ko': '우리는 자연 언어 설명을 파이톤 등 일반적인 프로그래밍 언어로 작성된 원본 코드로 해석하는 문제를 고려하고 있다.기존의 데이터 구동 방법은 이 문제를 언어 생성 임무로 간주하고 목표 프로그래밍 언어의 밑바닥 문법을 고려하지 않는다.어의 분석 분야의 연구 성과에 따라 본고는 문법 모델을 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시하여 목표 문법을 명확하게 얻는 것을 선험지식으로 삼았다.실험에 의하면 이것은 효과적인 방법으로 자연 언어 묘사에서 복잡한 프로그램의 생성으로 확대할 수 있으며 이전의 코드 생성과 의미 해석 방법보다 더 좋은 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل توضیح زبان طبیعی را به کد منبع نوشته شده\u200cایم که در زبان برنامه\u200cریزی عمومی مثل پایتون نوشته شده است. روش\u200cهای موجود روی داده\u200cها این مشکل را به عنوان یک کار تولید زبان بدون توجه به سینتکس زیر زبان برنامه\u200cریزی هدف دریافت می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک معماری عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توسط یک مدل گراماری قدرت می\u200cدهد تا به طور کاملاً سنتاکس هدف را به عنوان دانش قبلی بگیریم. تجربه\u200cها این راهی موثری را پیدا می\u200cکنند تا نسل برنامه\u200cهای پیچیده از توضیح زبان طبیعی بالا برد، تا نتایج\u200cهای موجود هنر را رسیده باشد که به نسل کد پیشین و نزدیک\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی نسل\u200cهای semantic انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Ons besluit die probleem van verwerking van natuurlike taal beskrywings in bronkode geskryf in 'n algemene-doel programeertaal soos Python. Bestaande data-gedrywe metodes behandel hierdie probleem as 'n taal generasie taak sonder om die ondersteunde sintaks van die doel program taal te neem. Gekennis deur vorige werk in semantiese verwerking, in hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe neurale arkitektuur wat deur 'n grammatiese model gestuur is om die doel sintaks as vooraf kennis te vang. Eksperimente vind hierdie 'n effektief manier om die generasie van komplekse programme te skaleer van natuurlike taal beskrywings, die staat-van-die-kuns-resultate te bereik wat goed voortgaan vorige kode generasie en semantiese verwerking toeganklikhede uitvoer.", 'sw': 'Tunafahamu tatizo la kuandika maelezo ya lugha ya asili katika kanuni ya vyanzo vilivyoandikwa kwa lugha ya programu ya jumla kama vile Python. Utawala wa taarifa unaoendelea wanakabiliwa na tatizo hili kama kazi ya kizazi cha lugha bila kuzingatia kodi halisi ya lugha ya programu. Imetangazwa na kazi iliyopita katika mabadiliko ya kimapenzi, katika gazeti hili tunapendekeza ujenzi wa riwaya wa kisasa uliotengenezwa na modeli ya grammari ili kuweka hadharani kama ilivyojua kabla. Majaribio haya ni njia yenye ufanisi wa kupanda mpaka kizazi cha programu muhimu kutoka maelezo ya asili ya lugha, kupata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa ambayo yanafanya vizuri katika uzalishaji wa kodi uliopita na mbinu za kujenga mabadiliko ya kimapenzi.', 'tr': 'Biz tebigy dil deskriplerini Python ýaly umumy meýdança programlama dilinde ýazylan köde analyz etmek üçin mesele pikir edýäris. Öň bar maglumatlar önünde durulýan yöntemler bu meseleni dili döredilmesi üçin maksady programlemek diliniň altyndaky syntaksini düşünmedik. Semantik analyzasynda öňki işiň görä baglanýan, bu kagyzda öňki bilgi hökmünde bu maksadyň üstüne almak üçin gramatik nusgasy tarapyndan güýçli bir nusgasy teklip edip barýarys. Testler tebigy dil tassymlardan karmaşık programlerden bejermek üçin täsirli bir ýol tapýar. Öňki köd döwletlerini we semantik analytik ýarymlaryň golaýyndan gowy çykýar.', 'sq': 'Ne konsiderojmë problem in e analizimit të përshkrimeve të gjuhës natyrore në kodin burimor të shkruar në një gjuhë programimi me qëllim të përgjithshëm si Python. Metodat ekzistuese të drejtuara nga të dhënat e trajtojnë këtë problem si një detyrë gjenerimi gjuhësh pa konsideruar sintaksin themelor të gjuhës së programimit të objektivit. I informuar nga puna e mëparshme në analizimin semantik, në këtë letër ne propozojmë një arkitekturë neurale të re të fuqizuar nga një model gramatik për të kapur eksplicitisht sintaksin e objektivit si njohuri të mëparshme. Experiments find this an effective way to scale up to generation of complex programs from natural language descriptions, achieving state-of-the-art results that well outperform previous code generation and semantic parsing approaches.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን ለመለጠፍ ጉዳይ እንደ Python በሚመስል የዕድሜ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተጽፎ እንደተጻፈ እናስባለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ዳታ-driven ዘዴዎች ይህን ጉዳይ የቋንቋ ትውልድ አድራሻ ሲንካስታው የዕቅድ ፕሮግራም ቋንቋ ሳይመለስ ይጠቅማሉ። በsemantic parsing ውስጥ ባለፉት ሥራ በማስታወቂያው እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች ይህ የቀድሞውን የኮድ ትውልድ እና የsemantic ፓርቲካ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን አካባቢ የቋንቋ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን አካባቢ ፕሮግራሙቶችን ለመወለድ የሚችል ጥሩ መንገድ ያገኛሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք համարում ենք բնական լեզվի նկարագրությունների վերլուծության խնդիրը աղբյուր կոդի մեջ, որը գրված է ընդհանուր նպատակով ծրագրավորող լեզվով, ինչպիսին է Պատոնը: Գոյություն ունի տվյալներով հիմնված մեթոդներ, որոնք այս խնդիրը վերաբերում են որպես լեզվի ստեղծման խնդիր առանց հաշվի առնելու նպատակային ծրագրավորման լեզվի հիմնական սինտաքսին: Ինֆորմացված նախորդ աշխատանքով սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մեջ, այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որը հիմնված է գրամական մոդելի օգնությամբ, որպեսզի բացահայտորեն ընկալենք նպատակային սինտաքսին որպես նախո Տարբերությունները սա արդյունավետ միջոց են գտնում բարդ ծրագրերի ստեղծման համար բնական լեզվի նկարագրություններից, հասնելով բարձրագույն արդյունքներին, որոնք շատ ավելի լավ են արտադրում նախորդ կոդի ստեղծման և սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մոտեցումներին:', 'az': 'Biz təbiətli dil tanımlaması problemini Python kimi genel məqsəd programlama dilində yazılmış mənbə kodu ayırmaq problemini düşünürük. Məlumatlar tərəfindən daxil olunan metodlar bu problemi məlum programlama dilinin altındakı sintaksini düşünmədən dil nəzəriyyəti kimi təmin edirlər. Bu kağızda əvvəlki işin semantik analizi ilə bildirilmiş, əvvəlki bilgi kimi məqsəd sintaksini a çıq-aydın almaq üçün bir grammatik modeli ilə qüvvətləndirilən yeni nöral arhitektir təklif edirik. Təbiətli dil tanımlamalarından kompleks proqramların nəsillərinə böyüklənməsi üçün, əvvəlki kodu nəsillərindən və semantik ayırma yaxınlıqlarından daha yaxşı mümkün olduğu təcrübələrin müvəffəqiyyətinə nail olacağı təcrübələr bunun etkili bir yolu tapır.', 'bs': 'Smatramo problem razmatranja prirodnog jezika opisa u izvornog koda napisanog na jeziku programiranja generalne svrhe poput Python a. Postoje metode podataka tretiraju ovaj problem kao zadatak generacije jezika bez razmatranja temeljne sintakse jezika ciljnog programiranja. Obavijestili smo prethodnim poslom u semantičkom analizu, u ovom papiru predlažemo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja je moćna gramatičkim modelom kako bi se pojasno uhvatila ciljna sintaksa kao prethodno znanje. Eksperimenti to smatraju efikasnim načinom za proširenje do generacije kompleksnih programa iz prirodnog jezika opisa, ostvarivanje rezultata stanja umjetnosti koji dobro nadmađuju prethodnu generaciju kodova i semantičke pristupe analize.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বর্ণনা পার্স করার সমস্যা বিবেচনা করি যে সোর্স কোডে লেখা হয়েছে সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যে প্রোগ্রামিং  বিদ্যমান ডাটা চালানো পদ্ধতি এই সমস্যাকে একটি ভাষা প্রজন্ম কাজ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে লক্ষ্য প্রোগ্রামিং ভাষার অন্তর্ভুক্ সেম্পেন্টিক পার্জিং এ পূর্ববর্তী কাজ সম্পর্কে তথ্য প্রদান করেছে, এই কাগজে আমরা একটি গ্রামার মডেল দ্বারা ক্ষমতাশালী নিউরেল কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করছি য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বর্ণনা থেকে জটিল প্রোগ্রামের প্রজন্মের কার্যকর উপায় খুঁজে পাওয়া যায়, যা পূর্ববর্তী কোড প্রজন্ম এবং সেম্পেন্টিক পার্সিং প্', 'fi': 'Käsittelemme luonnollisen kielen kuvausten jäsentämistä lähdekoodiksi, joka on kirjoitettu yleiskäyttöisellä ohjelmointikielellä, kuten Pythonilla. Nykyiset datapohjaiset menetelmät käsittelevät tätä ongelmaa kielen luontitehtävänä ottamatta huomioon kohdeohjelmointikielen taustalla olevaa syntaksia. Aiemman semanttisen jäsentämisen työn pohjalta tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta neuroarkkitehtuuria, joka perustuu kielioppimalliin, jotta kohdesyntaksi saadaan nimenomaisesti talteen aikaisempana tietona. Kokeiden mukaan tämä on tehokas tapa skaalata monimutkaisia ohjelmia luonnollisen kielen kuvauksista ja saavuttaa huipputason tuloksia, jotka ylittävät hyvin aiemmat koodinluonnin ja semanttisen jäsentämisen lähestymistavat.', 'ca': "Considerem el problem a d'analitzar les descripcions de llenguatges naturals en codi de font escrit en un llenguatge de programació de propòsit general com Python. Els mètodes existents basats en dades tracten aquest problem a com una tasca de generació de llenguatges sense considerar la síntaxi subjacente del llenguatge de programació. Informats per la feina anterior en l'analització semàntica, en aquest article proposem una nova arquitectura neuronal alimentada per un model gramàtic per capturar explícitament la sintaxi alvo com coneixement anterior. Els experiments ho troben una manera eficaç d'escalar fins a generar programes complexes a partir de descripcions de llenguatges naturals, aconseguint resultats més avançats que la generació de codis anterior i els enfocaments semàntics d'analització.", 'cs': 'Zvažujeme problém analýzy popisů přirozeného jazyka do zdrojového kódu napsaného v univerzálním programovacím jazyce, jako je Python. Stávající datově řízené metody považují tento problém za úkol generování jazyka bez ohledu na základní syntaxi cílového programovacího jazyka. V příspěvku navrhujeme novou neuronovou architekturu poháněnou gramatickým modelem, která explicitně zachytí cílovou syntaxi jako předchozí znalosti. Experimenty považují za efektivní způsob, jak škálovat až na generaci složitých programů z popisů přirozeného jazyka, dosáhnout nejmodernějších výsledků, které výrazně překonávají předchozí generování kódu a sémantické parsování přístupů.', 'et': 'Me kaalume looduskeele kirjelduste parsimise probleemi lähtekoodiks, mis on kirjutatud üldotstarbelises programmeerimiskeeles nagu Python. Olemasolevad andmepõhised meetodid käsitlevad seda probleemi keele genereerimise ülesandena, arvestamata sihtprogrammeerimiskeele aluseks olevat süntaksit. Eelmise semantilise parsimise töö põhjal pakume käesolevas töös välja uudse neuraalarhitektuuri, mida toetab grammatika mudel, et selgesõnaliselt jäädvustada sihtsüntaks eelnevate teadmistena. Eksperimentid leiavad, et see on tõhus viis laiendada keerukate programmide genereerimiseks looduskeele kirjeldustest, saavutades kaasaegseid tulemusi, mis ületavad hästi eelmise koodi genereerimise ja semantilise parsimise lähenemisviise.', 'jv': 'Anyone Ngawe Perintah kang data-drived kuwi nggawe perbudhakan iki dadi nggawe perbudhakan langkung saé gawe ngupakan seneng sistem sing perbudhakan kanggo nguasai cilbeng program. Informs Name', 'sk': 'Obravnavamo problem razčlenjevanja opisov naravnega jezika v izvorno kodo, napisano v splošnem programskem jeziku, kot je Python. Obstoječe podatkovno usmerjene metode obravnavajo to težavo kot opravilo ustvarjanja jezika, ne da bi upoštevale osnovno sintakso ciljnega programskega jezika. Na podlagi predhodnega dela semantičnega razčlenjanja v prispevku predlagamo novo nevronsko arhitekturo, ki jo poganja slovnični model, ki eksplicitno zajema ciljno sintakso kot predhodno znanje. Eksperimenti ugotavljajo, da je to učinkovit način za razširitev do generacije kompleksnih programov iz opisov naravnega jezika in doseganje najsodobnejših rezultatov, ki dobro presegajo prejšnje generacije kod in semantične pristope razčlenjanja.', 'ha': "Munã ƙaddara wa masu yin parse da fassarar tsarin harshen asiyya cikin kode na rubutu cikin wata lugha na shiryoyin da jumla kamar Python. @ action: button An sanar da aikin da ya gabãta a cikin parse na semantic, cikin wannan takarda, Munã buƙata wani matsayin neural wanda aka yi ƙarfi da wani motel na grammar dõmin ya kiyaye sigarin da ake gabatar da bayani kamar ilimi na gaba. Kayan jarrabai, za'a gane wannan hanya mai amfani da ya samu zuwa zabuwa na shiryoyin ayuka masu adadi daga fassaran harshen asili, da su sami fassarar-state-the-art da za'a sami kodi na gabanin kodi da hanyoyin parse na semantic.", 'he': 'אנחנו שוקלים את הבעיה של חקירת תיאורים של שפה טבעית לקוד מקור שנכתב בשפה תוכנית למטרה כללית כמו Python. שיטות הנוכחות על ידי נתונים מתייחסות לבעיה הזאת כמשימה ליצור שפות מבלי לשקול את הסינטקס הנוכחי של שפת התכנות המטרה. מודיע על ידי עבודה קודמת באבחנה סמנטית, בעיתון הזה אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה עצבית חדשה שמכוננת על ידי מודל גרמטי כדי לתפוס באופן ברור את סינטקס המטרה כידע קודם. Experiments find this an effective way to scale up to generation of complex programs from natural language descriptions, achieving state-of-the-art results that well outperform previous code generation and semantic parsing approaches.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་Python དང་མཚུངས་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིབ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ། Existing data-driven methods treat this problem as a language generation task without considering the underlying syntax of the target programming language. Informed by previous work in semantic parsing, in this paper we propose a novel neural architecture powered by a grammar model to explicitly capture the target syntax as prior knowledge. Experiments find this an effective way to scale up to generation of complex programs from natural language descriptions, to achieve state-of-the-art results that result from the previous code generation and semantic parsing approaches.'}
{'en': 'Abstract Meaning Representation Parsing using LSTM Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ar': 'تحليل المعنى المجرد التمثيل باستخدام الشبكات العصبية المتكررة LSTM', 'fr': "Analyse de représentation de signification abstraite à l'aide de réseaux de neurones récurrents LST", 'pt': 'Análise de representação de significado abstrato usando redes neurais recorrentes LSTM', 'es': 'Análisis de representación de significado abstracto mediante redes neuronales recurrentes LSTM', 'ja': 'LSTMリカレントニューラルネットワークを使用した抽象意味表現解析', 'hi': 'अमूर्त अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व LSTM आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर पार्सिंग', 'zh': '用 LSTM 递归神经网络抽象义示解析', 'ru': 'Абстрактный анализ представления значений с использованием рекуррентных нейронных сетей LSTM', 'ga': 'Léiriú Teibí Brí Parsáil ag baint úsáide as Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha LSTM', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Περίληψη Σημαίνει Ανάλυση αναπαράστασης με χρήση επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων LSTM', 'hu': 'Absztrakt Jelentés Reprezentációs Elemzés LSTM ismétlődő neurális hálózatokkal', 'lt': 'Abstract Meaning Representation Parsing using LSTM Recurrent Neural Networks', 'it': 'Analisi della rappresentazione utilizzando reti neurali ricorrenti LSTM', 'kk': 'LSTM қайталанатын невралдық желілерді қолданатын абстракты мәліметті таңдау', 'mk': 'Апстрактна репрезентација со значење за анализирање со LSTM рецидентни неврални мрежи', 'ms': 'Menghurai Perwakilan Maksud Abstrakt menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Berulang LSTM', 'mt': 'Analiżi tar-Rappreżentanza b’Sinjal Abstrat bl-użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti LSTM', 'ml': 'LSTM ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ', 'mn': 'LSTM дахин дахин мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж Abstract Meaning Representation Parsing', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Analiza reprezentării analizei prin utilizarea rețelelor neurale recurente LSTM', 'pl': 'Streszczenie Znaczenie Parsowanie reprezentacji przy użyciu LSTM Recurrent Neuroral Networks', 'sr': 'Apstraktivno značajno predstavljanje obrazovanja koristeći ponovne neurone mreže LSTM', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Abstrakt mening Representation Parsing med LSTM återkommande neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'LSTM மீண்டும் திரும்ப புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Heshiiska u soo guurista ee looga jeedo isticmaalka shabakadda Neural ee LSTM', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo tác ý nghĩa trừu tượng dùng hệ thần kinh phục hồi LSTM', 'bg': 'Абстрактно анализиране на представянето на значението чрез повтарящи се неврални мрежи на LSTM', 'da': 'Abstrakt Betydning Repræsentation Parsing ved hjælp af LSTM tilbagevendende neurale netværk', 'hr': 'Abstraktična srednja predstava za razmatranje koristeći LSTM ponovne neurone mreže', 'nl': 'Abstract Betekenis Representatie Parsing met behulp van LSTM Recurrent Neural Networks', 'de': 'Abstract Bedeutung Repräsentation Parsing mit LSTM Recurrent Neural Networks', 'id': 'Analisasi Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Recurrent LSTM', 'sw': 'Kuondoa maana ya Kuchapisha Uzungumzo kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Karibu wa LSTM', 'fa': 'استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره LSTM', 'tr': 'Saýlaw', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': 'LSTM 귀속 신경 네트워크의 추상적 의미 표현에 근거하여 분석', 'sq': 'Analizimi i përfaqësimit abstrakt me kuptim duke përdorur rrjetet neurale të përsëritura LSTM', 'hy': 'Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացման վերլուծում LSMT-ի վերադարձ նյարդային ցանցերով', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'LSTM yenidən nöral ağlarını istifadə edən Abstrakt İmzalı Təşkil', 'bn': 'LSTM পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে প্রতিনিধি পার্সিং এর মানে আবশ্যক', 'ca': 'Analització de la representació abstracta amb les xarxes neurals recurrents LSTM', 'bs': 'Apstraktivno značajno predstavljanje obrazovanja koristeći ponovne neurone mreže LSTM', 'cs': 'Abstrakt Význam Reprezentační analýza pomocí LSTM Recidivních neuronových sítí', 'et': 'Tähenduse esinduse parsimine LSTM korduvate neurovõrkude abil', 'fi': 'Abstract Meaning Representation Parsing using LSTM Recorrent Neural Networks', 'jv': 'Sample rate', 'he': 'מחקר מייצג משמעות אבסטרטית באמצעות רשתות נוירוליות חוזרות LSTM', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Povzetek predstavništva pomena z uporabo ponavljajočih se živčnih omrežij LSTM', 'bo': 'Abstract Meaning Representation Parsing using LSTM Recurrent Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'We present a system which parses sentences into Abstract Meaning Representations, improving state-of-the-art results for this task by more than 5 %. AMR graphs represent semantic content using linguistic properties such as semantic roles, coreference, negation, and more. The AMR parser does not rely on a syntactic pre-parse, or heavily engineered features, and uses five recurrent neural networks as the key architectural components for inferring AMR graphs.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا يوزع الجمل إلى تمثيلات المعنى المجردة ، مما يؤدي إلى تحسين النتائج الحديثة لهذه المهمة بأكثر من 5٪. تمثل الرسوم البيانية AMR المحتوى الدلالي باستخدام الخصائص اللغوية مثل الأدوار الدلالية ، المرجع ، النفي ، والمزيد. لا يعتمد محلل AMR على التحليل المسبق النحوي ، أو الميزات المصممة بشكل كبير ، ويستخدم خمس شبكات عصبية متكررة كمكونات معمارية رئيسية لاستنتاج رسوم AMR الرسومية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système qui analyse les phrases en représentations de signification abstraites, améliorant ainsi les résultats de pointe pour cette tâche de plus de 5\xa0%. Les graphes AMR représentent le contenu sémantique à l'aide de propriétés linguistiques telles que les rôles sémantiques, la coréférence, la négation, etc. L'analyseur AMR ne repose pas sur une pré-analyse syntaxique ou sur des fonctionnalités fortement conçues, et utilise cinq réseaux neuronaux récurrents comme composants architecturaux clés pour inférer des graphes AMR.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema que analisa sentenças em Representações de Significado Abstrato, melhorando os resultados do estado da arte para esta tarefa em mais de 5%. Os gráficos AMR representam o conteúdo semântico usando propriedades linguísticas, como funções semânticas, correferência, negação e muito mais. O analisador AMR não depende de uma pré-análise sintática ou de recursos de engenharia pesada e usa cinco redes neurais recorrentes como os principais componentes de arquitetura para inferir gráficos AMR.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema que analiza las oraciones en Representaciones de Significado Abstracto, mejorando los resultados de última generación para esta tarea en más de un 5%. Los gráficos AMR representan el contenido semántico utilizando propiedades lingüísticas como roles semánticos, correferencia, negación y más. El analizador AMR no se basa en un pre-análisis sintáctico ni en funciones altamente diseñadas, y utiliza cinco redes neuronales recurrentes como componentes arquitectónicos clave para inferir gráficos AMR.', 'ja': '抽象意味表現に文を解析し、このタスクの最先端の結果を5%以上改善するシステムを提示します。AMRグラフは、セマンティックロール、コアレフィケーション、否定などの言語的特性を使用してセマンティックコンテンツを表す。AMRパーサーは、構文解析前の機能、または高度に設計された機能に依存せず、AMRグラフを推論するための主要なアーキテクチャコンポーネントとして5つの再帰ニューラルネットワークを使用します。', 'zh': '建一句解析为抽象之义,最新增5%以上。 AMR 图用言语属性(如语义角色、共指、否)示语义义。 AMR 解析器不赖于语法预解析多工程化之功,而以五递归神经网络为推 AMR 图之要架构组件。', 'hi': 'हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वाक्यों को अमूर्त अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व में पार्स करती है, इस कार्य के लिए 5% से अधिक के अत्याधुनिक परिणामों में सुधार करती है। एएमआर ग्राफ भाषाई गुणों जैसे कि शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं, सह-सम्मेलन, नकार, और अधिक का उपयोग करके शब्दार्थ सामग्री का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं। एएमआर पार्सर एक वाक्यात्मक पूर्व-पार्स, या भारी इंजीनियर सुविधाओं पर भरोसा नहीं करता है, और एएमआर ग्राफ का अनुमान लगाने के लिए प्रमुख वास्तुशिल्प घटकों के रूप में पांच आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем систему, которая анализирует предложения в абстрактных смысловых представлениях, улучшая современные результаты для этой задачи более чем на 5%. Графы AMR представляют семантический контент с использованием лингвистических свойств, таких как семантические роли, ядро, отрицание и многое другое. Анализатор AMR не полагается на синтаксический предварительный анализ или сильно сконструированные признаки и использует пять рекуррентных нейронных сетей в качестве ключевых архитектурных компонентов для вывода графиков AMR.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair córas a pharsálann abairtí ina Léirithe Brí Teibí, ag feabhsú torthaí den scoth don tasc seo faoi níos mó ná 5%. Léiríonn graif AMR ábhar shéimeantach agus úsáid á baint as airíonna teangeolaíocha mar róil shéimeantacha, croí-chomhdháil, diúltú, agus go leor eile. Níl an parsálaí AMR ag brath ar réamhpharsáil chomhréire, ná ar ghnéithe a ndearnadh innealtóireacht mhór orthu, agus úsáideann sé cúig líonra néaracha athfhillteacha mar na príomhchodanna ailtireachta chun graif AMR a bhaint amach.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ სისტემა, რომელიც აბსტრაქტიკური განსაზღვრებულებაში წერტილებების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ამ დავალების შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა 5%-ზე მეტი. AMR გრაფიკები გამოყენებენ სიმენტიკური შემდგომარები, როგორც სიმენტიკური პროლები, წარმოდგომარება, ნექცია და სხვა. AMR პანსერტი არ იყენებს სინტექტიკური პროპასუტის, ან ძალიან ინეზინერიური ფუნქციების შესახებ, და გამოყენებს ხუთი განმეორეული ნეიროლური ქსელები როგორც კლავის არქიტექტური კო', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy olyan rendszert, amely a mondatokat absztrakt jelentési reprezentációkba elemezi, és több mint 5%-kal javítja a legkorszerűbb eredményeket ehhez a feladathoz. Az AMR-grafikonok nyelvi tulajdonságokkal, mint például szemantikai szerepek, coreferencia, negatív stb. használatával képviselik a szemantikai tartalmakat. Az AMR elemző nem támaszkodik szintaktikus előfeldolgozásra, vagy erősen tervezett funkciókra, és öt visszatérő neurális hálózatot használ, mint a kulcsfontosságú architektúra komponensek az AMR gráfok következtetéséhez.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα που αναλύει προτάσεις σε αναπαραστάσεις αφηρημένης έννοιας, βελτιώνοντας τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για αυτό το έργο κατά περισσότερο από 5%. Τα γραφήματα αντιπροσωπεύουν σημασιολογικό περιεχόμενο χρησιμοποιώντας γλωσσικές ιδιότητες όπως σημασιολογικοί ρόλοι, συνάφεια, άρνηση και άλλα. Ο αναλυτής δεν βασίζεται σε μια συντακτική προ-ανάλυση, ή σε ιδιαίτερα σχεδιασμένα χαρακτηριστικά, και χρησιμοποιεί πέντε επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα ως τα βασικά αρχιτεκτονικά συστατικά για την εξαγωγή γραφήσεων.', 'it': "Presentiamo un sistema che analizza le frasi in Rappresentazioni di significato astratte, migliorando i risultati all'avanguardia per questo compito di oltre il 5%. I grafici AMR rappresentano contenuti semantici utilizzando proprietà linguistiche come ruoli semantici, coreferenza, negazione e altro ancora. Il parser AMR non si basa su un pre-parse sintattico, o caratteristiche fortemente ingegnerizzate, e utilizza cinque reti neurali ricorrenti come componenti architettonici chiave per dedurre i grafici AMR.", 'kk': 'Біз сөздерді абстракт мәліметтеріне талдау жүйесін таңдаймыз. Бұл тапсырманың күйін 5%-ден артық түрде жақсарту жүйесін таңдаймыз. AMR графикалары семантикалық мазмұнын семантикалық қасиеттерді, мысалы, семантикалық рольдер, сәйкестік, негативтік және көмегімен қолданады. AMR талдаушысы синтактикалық алдын- талдау не үлкен инженерлік мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді емес және AMR графиктерін келтіру үшін бес қайталанатын невралдық желілерді архитектуралық компоненттер ретінде қолданады.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame sistemą, pagal kurią sakiniai suskirstomi į abstrakčias reikšmes atstovaujančias atstovybes, gerinant šiuolaikinius šios užduoties rezultatus daugiau kaip 5 proc. AMR grafikai rodo semantinį turinį, naudojantį kalbines savybes, pvz., semantines funkcijas, koreferenciją, neigiamą reikšmę ir daugiau. AMR analizatorius nesikliauja sintetiniais ikianaliziniais arba griežtai suprojektuotais požymiais ir naudoja penkis pasikartojančius nervinius tinklus kaip pagrindinius architektūrinius komponentus AMR grafikams daryti.', 'mk': 'Презентираме систем кој ги анализира речениците во Апстрактни претставувања со значење, подобрувајќи ги најдобрите резултати за оваа задача за повеќе од 5 отсто. АМР графиците претставуваат семантична содржина користејќи јазични сопствености како што се семантичните улоги, кореференција, негативност и повеќе. The AMR parser does not rely on a syntactic pre-parse, or heavily engineered features, and uses five recurrent neural networks as the key architectural components for inferring AMR graphs.', 'ml': 'അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധികളിലേക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിക്കുള AMR graphs represent semantic content using linguistic properties such as semantic roles, coreference, negation, and more.  AMR പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് മുന്\u200dപ് പാര്\u200dസ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കഠിനമായി എഞ്ചിനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷതകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നില്', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan sistem yang menghurai kalimat ke Perwakilan Maksud Abstrakt, meningkatkan keputusan state-of-the-art untuk tugas ini dengan lebih dari 5%. Graf AMR mewakili kandungan semantik menggunakan ciri-ciri bahasa seperti peranan semantik, koreferensi, negati, dan lebih. Penghurai AMR tidak bergantung pada pra-hurai sintaktik, atau ciri-ciri yang direka secara berat, dan menggunakan lima rangkaian saraf berulang sebagai komponen arkitektur kunci untuk menyimpulkan graf AMR.', 'mn': 'Бид өгүүлбэрийг Abstract Meaning Representations руу хуваалцдаг системийг харуулж байна. Энэ үйл ажиллагаанд урлагийн үр дүнг 5%-аас илүү сайжруулж байна. АМР график нь хэлний өөрчлөлтийг ашиглан semantic content гэдэг. Жишээ нь semantic roles, coreference, эсрэг болон олон зүйлсийг ашигладаг. АМР парсар синтактик эсвэл маш хүнд инженерчлэл дээр хамаарч байгаагүй. АМР графикийг цуглуулахад 5 дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээний чухал архитектур компонентүүдийг ашигладаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw sistema li tanalizza s-sentenzi f’Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Sinjal Abstrat, u ttejjeb ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati għal dan il-kompitu b’aktar minn 5 %. AMR graphs represent semantic content using linguistic properties such as semantic roles, coreference, negation, and more.  Il-analizzatur AMR ma jiddependix fuq karatteristiċi sintetiċi ta’ qabel l-analizzazzjoni, jew inġinerizzati ħafna, u juża ħames netwerks newrali rikorrenti bħala komponenti arkitettoniċi ewlenin għall-inferiment ta’ grafiċi AMR.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy system, który analizuje zdania na abstrakcyjne reprezentacje znaczenia, poprawiając najnowocześniejsze wyniki dla tego zadania o ponad 5%. Wykresy AMR reprezentują treść semantyczną przy użyciu właściwości językowych, takich jak role semantyczne, koreferencja, negacja i inne. Parser AMR nie opiera się na składni wstępnej analizy lub silnie zaprojektowanych funkcjach i używa pięciu powtarzających się sieci neuronowych jako kluczowych komponentów architektonicznych do wnioskowania wykresów AMR.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit systemet som tolkar setningar i abstrakt medlemssrepresentasjonar, forbetrar status-of-the-art resultatet for denne oppgåva med mer enn 5%. AMR- grafen representerer semantisk innhald ved å bruka lingviske eigenskapar som semantiske roller, koreferanse, negasjon og meir. AMR-tolkaren bruker ikkje ein syntaksisk før-tolking, eller sterk ingenjerne funksjonar, og bruker fem rekurserte neuralnettverk som nøkkelarkitekturkomponentane for å sletta AMR-grafen.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un sistem care analizează propozițiile în reprezentări abstracte ale semnificației, îmbunătățind rezultatele de ultimă generație pentru această sarcină cu peste 5%. Graficele AMR reprezintă conținut semantic folosind proprietăți lingvistice, cum ar fi roluri semantice, corefență, negație și multe altele. Analizorul AMR nu se bazează pe o pre-parsare sintactică sau caracteristici puternic proiectate și utilizează cinci rețele neurale recurente ca componente arhitecturale cheie pentru deducerea graficelor AMR.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sistem koji analizira rečenice u abstraktne značajne predstave, poboljšava rezultate stanja umjetnosti za ovaj zadatak za više od 5%. AMR grafike predstavljaju semantički sadržaj koristeći jezičke vlasništvo kao što su semantičke uloge, dobrodušnost, negacija i više. AMR analizator se ne oslanja na sintaktičnu predparsu ili teško inženjeriranu karakteristiku i koristi pet rekonstruiranih neuralnih mreža kao ključne arhitekture komponente za inficiranje AMR grafika.', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධතියක් පෙන්වන්නේ වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වලට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා කියලා, මේ වැඩට 5% වඩා වඩා වැඩියි. AMR ග්\u200dරාෆ්ස් සෙමාන්ටික් සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත විශේෂය සඳහා සෙමාන AMR පරීක්ෂකයා සංවිධානයක් නැහැ, නැත්තම් සංවිධානයක් නැහැ, නැත්තම් සංවිධානයක් නැහැ, සහ AMR ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානයක් පහක්', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nidaam lagu soo bandhigi karaa xuquuqda Abstract macnaheedka, horumarinta arimaha farshaxanka shaqada waxaa lagu beddelaa in ka badan 5 boqolkiiba. Shaqooyinka AMR waxay ka muuqataa wax ku qoran qoraal ah oo isticmaalaya qalabka luuqadaha, sida qaybaha semantika, koreference, negation iyo wax ka badan. AMR baaritaankiisu wuxuu ku xiran maayo heerar ka horraysa, ama tayooyin aad u qallafsan, wuxuuna isticmaalaa shan shabakado oo neurada ah oo ku soo socda sida kooxaha hiwaayadaha dhismaha ee ugu horeeya ee uu ku dhibo sawirada AMR.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett system som tolkar meningar till abstrakta meningsrepresentationer, vilket förbättrar de senaste resultaten för denna uppgift med mer än 5%. AMR-grafer representerar semantiskt innehåll med språkliga egenskaper som semantiska roller, coreferens, negation med mera. AMR-parsern förlitar sig inte på en syntaktisk pre-parsning, eller tungt konstruerade funktioner, och använder fem återkommande neurala nätverk som de viktigaste arkitektoniska komponenterna för att härleda AMR-grafer.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். இது செயல்பாட்டிற்கு மேலும் 5 சதவிகிதத்திற்கு வாக்கியங்களை சேர்க்கும் பொருளாக மாற் AMR வரைபடங்கள் பெம்மான்டிக் உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி குறிக்கும் மொழிக்குறிப்புகள் போன்ற semantic பங்கள், குறிப்பு, எதிர் AMR பகுதி ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு முன் தொகுதி அல்லது கடுமையான பொறியிடப்பட்ட பண்புகளை நம்புவதில்லை மறுநிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணையத்தை AMR வரைபடங்களை பாதிக்கும் விசை ப', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سیسٹم کو پیش کرتے ہیں جس نے کلمات کو بغیر معنی معنی نمایش میں تقسیم کرتا ہے، اس کام کے لئے 5% سے زیادہ استعمال کرتا ہے۔ AMR گراف سیمنٹی موتوں کو زبان کی خصوصیات کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں جیسے سیمنٹی رول، مہربانی، ناپسند، اور زیادہ. AMR پارچر ایک سینٹاکتیک پیش پارچس پر بھروسہ نہیں کرتا، یا بھاری انجینر کی فکرات پر، اور پانچ دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کو AMR گراف کے ذریعہ ڈالنے کے لئے کلی آرکیٹیکٹورل رغتوں کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống phân tích câu truyện thành "cốt truyện" đại diện, cải thiện kết quả hiện đại cho nhiệm vụ này nhiều hơn là 5. Các biểu đồ AMR tượng trưng cho nội dung ngữ, sử dụng các đặc trưng ngôn ngữ như các vai thì ngữ pháp, hạn hạn, tiêu cực, và nhiều hơn. Bộ phân tích AMR không dựa vào tiền sử chế pháp hay tính năng được cải tạo kỹ lưỡng, và sử dụng năm mạng thần kinh liên tục như các thành phần kiến trúc chủ yếu để ám ảnh các biểu đồ AMR.', 'uz': 'We present a system which parses sentences into Abstract Meaning Representations, improving state-of-the-art results for this task by more than 5%.  Name AMR параметри синтаксис аввалги парламент ёки зийнатилган хусусиятларга ишонмас, ва такрорланган бечора таркиб тармоқларини AMR grafiklarini tasdiqlash учун фойдаланади.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een systeem dat zinnen analyseert in abstracte betekenisrepresentaties, waardoor de state-of-the-art resultaten voor deze taak met meer dan 5%. AMR-grafieken vertegenwoordigen semantische inhoud met behulp van linguïstische eigenschappen zoals semantische rollen, coreferentie, negatie en meer. De AMR parser is niet afhankelijk van een syntactische pre-parse, of zwaar ontwikkelde functies, en gebruikt vijf terugkerende neurale netwerken als de belangrijkste architecturale componenten voor het afleiden van AMR grafieken.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sustav koji analizira rečenice u apstraktne značajne predstave, poboljšava rezultate stanja umjetnosti za ovaj zadatak za više od 5%. Grafiji AMR predstavljaju semantički sadržaj koristeći jezičke vlasništvo kao što su semantičke uloge, dobrodušnost, negacija i više. AMR analitičar se ne oslanja na sintaktičnu predanalizu ili teško inženjeriranu funkciju i koristi pet rekonstruiranih neuralnih mreža kao ključne arhitekture komponente za inficiranje AMR grafika.', 'bg': 'Представяме система, която анализира изреченията в Абстрактни представи на значението, подобрявайки най-съвременните резултати за тази задача с повече от 5%. Графите представляват семантично съдържание, използвайки лингвистични свойства като семантични роли, кореференция, отрицание и др. АМР анализаторът не разчита на синтактичен предварителен анализ или силно проектирани функции и използва пет повтарящи се невронни мрежи като ключови архитектурни компоненти за извеждане на АМР графики.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et system, der fortolker sætninger i abstrakte meningsrepræsentationer, hvilket forbedrer state-of-the-art resultater for denne opgave med mere end 5%. AMR grafer repræsenterer semantisk indhold ved hjælp af sproglige egenskaber som semantiske roller, coreference, negation og meget mere. AMR-fortolkeren er ikke afhængig af en syntaktisk præfortolkning eller stærkt konstruerede funktioner, og bruger fem tilbagevendende neurale netværk som de vigtigste arkitektoniske komponenter til at udlede AMR-grafer.', 'ko': '우리는 문장을 추상적 의미 표시로 해석하는 시스템을 제시하여 이 임무의 최신 결과를 5% 이상 높였다.AMR 그림은 의미 역할, 공지, 부정 등의 언어 속성을 사용하여 의미 내용을 나타낸다.AMR 파서는 구문이 미리 해석되거나 엄격하게 설계된 기능에 의존하지 않고 AMR 그림을 추정하는 핵심 구조 구성 요소로 5개의 역귀신경 네트워크를 사용한다.', 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cها را به عنوان نمایش\u200cهای معنی بی\u200cاستراکت تقسیم می\u200cکند، بهتر نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری برای این کار به بیشتر از ۵ درصد. گرافهای AMR با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی که نقش\u200cهای semantic، احترام، منفی و بیشتر نشان می\u200cدهند. ویرایشگر AMR بر یک پیش\u200cویرایش سنتاکتیک یا ویرایشگر مهندسی بسیار سنتاکتیک استفاده نمی\u200cکند، و از پنج شبکه عصبی دوباره به عنوان بخش\u200cهای معماری کلید برای وارد کردن گرافهای AMR استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'de': 'Wir stellen ein System vor, das Sätze in abstrakte Bedeutungsdarstellungen parst und die aktuellen Ergebnisse für diese Aufgabe um mehr als 5%. AMR-Graphen repräsentieren semantische Inhalte mit linguistischen Eigenschaften wie semantische Rollen, Koreferenz, Negation und mehr. Der AMR-Parser basiert nicht auf einer syntaktischen Pre-Parse oder stark entwickelten Features und verwendet fünf wiederkehrende neuronale Netzwerke als die wichtigsten architektonischen Komponenten für die Ableitung von AMR-Graphen.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem yang menguji kalimat ke Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt, meningkatkan hasil state-of-the-art untuk tugas ini dengan lebih dari 5%. Graf AMR mewakili isi semantis menggunakan properti bahasa seperti peran semantis, koreferensi, negati, dan lebih. The AMR parser does not rely on a syntactic pre-parse, or heavily engineered features, and uses five recurrent neural networks as the key architectural components for inferring AMR graphs.', 'tr': 'Biz s철zleri Abstrakt di첵ip a 첵dyl첵an bir sisteme 체첵tged첵채ris, bu i힊i흫 durumyny 5%-den k철p 체첵tged첵채ris. AMR grafikleri semantik roller, terbiyelik, negasyon ve daha fazla dil 철zelliklerini kullanarak semantik i챌erikleri temsil ediyor. AMR t채zele챌isi AMR grafiklerini d철wletlendirmek 체챌in bir syntaktik 철흫-anal첵힊ine, 첵a-da gaty in탑enjerilmi힊 철zelliklere ynamly d채l.', 'af': "Ons voorsien 'n stelsel wat sodanige in abstrakte betekening voorstellings verwerk, verbetering van state-of-the-art resultate vir hierdie taak met meer as 5%. AMR grafieke verteenwoordig semantiese inhoud met gebruik van lingvisse eienskappe soos semantiese roles, koreferensie, negasie en meer. Die AMR-ontleerder vertrou nie op 'n sintaktieke voor-verwerking of swaar inženierde funksies nie, en gebruik vyf herhaalde neuralnetwerke as die sleutel arkitektuurkomponente vir die inligting van AMR grafieke.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një sistem që analizon fjalët në përfaqësime Abstract Meaning, duke përmirësuar rezultatet më të larta për këtë detyrë me më shumë se 5%. Grafiket AMR përfaqësojnë përmbajtjen semantike duke përdorur pronësitë gjuhësore të tilla si rolet semantike, koreferencë, negativë dhe më shumë. Analizatori AMR nuk mbështetet në një paraanalizim sintaktik apo karakteristika të ndërtuar rëndë dhe përdor pesë rrjete neurale të përsëritura si komponente kryesore arkitekturale për përfundimin e grafikave AMR.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mfumo ambao unaweza kuhamasisha hukumu hiyo katika maana ya kuharibiwa, kwa kuboresha matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kazi hii kwa zaidi ya asilimia 5. Graphia za AMR inawakilisha maudhui ya kimapenzi kwa kutumia vifaa vya lugha kama vile jukumu la kimapenzi, mabadiliko, na zaidi. Mchambuzi wa AMR hawategemea kwenye mazingira ya zamani, au vipengenezo vikubwa, na hutumia mitandao mitano ya kijamii yanayoendelea kama vipengele muhimu vya ujenzi kwa ajili ya kuathiri ramani za AMR.', 'am': 'ይህንን ስርዓት የ-አርእስት ውጤቶችን በአምስት በመቶ የሚያበዛ የሥርዓት ውጤቶችን ለማሳመር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የአሜሪካ ቀለሞች የቋንቋዊ የግንኙነት አርእስት፣ ክሮፊንስ፣ ሽብር እና አብዛኛዎችን በመጠቀም የሚቆጠሩ የsemantic ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ The AMR parser does not rely on a syntactic pre-parse, or heavily engineered features, and uses five recurrent neural networks as the key architectural components for inferring AMR graphs.', 'az': 'Biz sözləri Abstrakt mean Representations olaraq ayıran bir sistemi göstəririk, bu işin stat-of-the-art sonuçlarını 5%-dən art ırmaq üçün daha yaxşı göstəririk. AMR grafikləri semantik rollər, mərhəmət, negasyon və daha çox dil özelliklərini istifadə edir. AMR analizcisi sintaktik ön analizə və ya a ğır inženjerlənmiş xüsusiyyətlərə təvəkkül etmirdi və AMR grafiklərini indirmək üçün beş tekrarlı nöral ağlarını anahtar arhitektür komponentlərə istifadə edir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի համակարգ, որը վերլուծում է նախադասությունները Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացումների մեջ, բարելավելով այս խնդրի ամենակարևոր արդյունքները ավելի քան 5 տոկոսով: AMR գրաֆիկները ներկայացնում են սեմանտիկ պարունակություն, օգտագործելով լեզվաբանական հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են սեմանտիկ դերերը, կորեֆերենսը, բացասականությունը և այլն: ԱՄՌ-ի վերլուծումը չի հիմնված սինտակտիկ նախավերլուծության կամ խիստ ճարտարագիտական հատկությունների վրա, և օգտագործում է հինգ հաճախորդ նյարդային ցանց որպես AMR-ի գրաֆիկների հիմնական ճարտարապետական բաղադրիչներ:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করি যেটি আবট্রাক্টের মানে প্রতিনিধিত্ব পার্সিট করে, যার ফলে এই কাজের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল উন্নতি করে ৫ এএমআর-এর গ্রাফ প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছে সেমেন্টিক বিষয়বস্তু ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে যেমন সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা, কোরেফেন্ এএমআর প্যারাস্টিক পূর্ব পার্স, বা ভারী ইঞ্জিনিয়ার বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে না, এবং পাঁচটি পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে এমআর গ্রাফ আক্রান্ত কর', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sistem koji analizira rečenice u abstraktne značajne predstave, poboljšava rezultate stanja umjetnosti za ovaj zadatak za više od 5%. Grafiji AMR predstavljaju semantički sadržaj koristeći jezičke vlasti kao što su semantičke uloge, dobrodušnost, negacija i više. AMR analitičar se ne oslanja na sintaktičnu predanalizu ili teško inženjeriranu karakteristiku i koristi pet rekonstruiranih neuralnih mreža kao ključne arhitekture komponente za inficiranje AMR grafika.', 'ca': "Presentam un sistema que analitza frases en representacions de significat abstract, millorant els resultats més avançats d'aquesta tasca en més del 5%. Els gràfics AMR representan continguts semàntics utilitzant propietats lingüístices com els rols semàntics, la coreferència, la negatió, i més. L'analitzador AMR no es basa en una pré-analització sinàctica o en característiques molt enginyerades, i utilitza cinc xarxes neurals recurrents com els components arquitectònics clau per inferir gràfics AMR.", 'cs': 'Představujeme systém, který analyzuje věty do abstraktních významných reprezentací a zlepšuje nejmodernější výsledky pro tento úkol o více než 5%. Grafy AMR představují sémantický obsah pomocí jazykových vlastností, jako jsou sémantické role, koreference, negace a další. Parser AMR nespoléhá na syntaktickou pre-parsu nebo silně vyvinuté funkce a používá pět recidivujících se neuronových sítí jako klíčové architektonické komponenty pro odvozování grafů AMR.', 'et': 'Esitame s羹steemi, mis parsib laused abstraktseteks t瓣hendusrepresentatsioonideks, parandades selle 羹lesande uusimaid tulemusi rohkem kui 5%. AMR-graafikud kujutavad semantilist sisu, kasutades keelelisi omadusi, nagu semantilised rollid, kaasviide, eitamine jne. AMR parser ei tugine s羹ntaktilisele eelpartsimisele ega tugevalt projekteeritud funktsioonidele ning kasutab AMR graafikute j瓣reldamisel viit korduvat n瓣rviv繭rku.', 'fi': 'Esitämme järjestelmän, joka jäsentää lauseet abstrakteiksi merkitysten representaatioiksi ja parantaa tämän tehtävän viimeisimpiä tuloksia yli 5%. AMR-kaaviot edustavat semanttista sisältöä käyttäen kielellisiä ominaisuuksia, kuten semanttisia rooleja, koreferenssiä, kieltämistä ja paljon muuta. AMR-parser ei perustu syntaktiseen esiparsaukseen tai raskaasti suunniteltuihin ominaisuuksiin, ja käyttää viittä toistuvaa hermoverkkoa keskeisinä arkkitehtonisina komponentteina AMR-graafien päättelyssä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah sistem sing perusahaan juara sing dikarepréntasi apa perusahaan alé, akeh basa state-of-the-arts barang nggawe barang 5% luwih apik. graphs Format autodetect', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem, ki razčlenjuje stavke v abstraktne predstavitve pomena in izboljša najsodobnejše rezultate te naloge za več kot 5%. Grafi AMR predstavljajo semantično vsebino z uporabo jezikovnih lastnosti, kot so semantične vloge, koreferenca, negacija in še več. Razčlenitelj AMR se ne zanaša na sintaktično predračunavanje ali močno inženirane funkcije in uporablja pet ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij kot ključne arhitekturne komponente za sklepanje AMR grafov.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani na'ura wanda ke parse sonar zuwa Reposition, yana ƙara 5%. KCharselect unicode block name Parser ɗin AMR bai dõgara a kan wani na-parse ta gabã ɗaya, ko kuma yana amfani da wasu shiryoyin neural wanda aka lissafa ya yi nau'i, kuma yana amfani da waɗanan neural masu saka tara shan kamar maɓallin matsayi masu tsarin da za'a yi amfani da fassarar AMR.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מערכת שמעבירת משפטים למציגות משמעות מוחלטת, משפר את התוצאות המאומנות של המשימה הזאת בעוד יותר מ-5%. גרפים AMR מייצגים תוכן סמנטי באמצעות תכונות שפתיים כמו תפקידים סמנטיים, צדק, שליטה, וכמה יותר. The AMR parser does not rely on a syntactic pre-parse, or heavily engineered features, and uses five recurrent neural networks as the key architectural components for inferring AMR graphs.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ལ་ཅིག་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་འཆར་བཀོལ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་ཚོར་བ་སྟོན་པ་ཅིག་དང་ལྡོག་སྔ AMR རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་དག་སྐད་ཡིག་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ། semantic roles, coreference, negation and more. AMR དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་ཆས་འདིས་སྦྱོར་བ་སྔར་མིང་ལ་འཛིན་པའམ། ཡང་ན་ཉེ་འཁོར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་ཡང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱས་ཆོས་ལ་ཉིད་མཉམ་འབ'}
{'en': 'Deep Semantic Role Labeling : What Works and What’s Next', 'ar': 'تصنيف الدور الدلالي العميق: ما الذي يعمل وماذا بعد', 'es': 'Etiquetado semántico profundo de roles: qué funciona y qué sigue', 'pt': 'Rotulagem de papéis semânticos profundos: o que funciona e o que vem a seguir', 'fr': 'Étiquetage sémantique approfondi des rôles\xa0: ce qui fonctionne et ce qui va suivre', 'ja': '深いセマンティックロールのラベル付け：何が機能し、何が次に起こるか', 'ru': 'Глубокая семантическая ролевая маркировка: что работает и что дальше', 'ga': 'Lipéadú Róil Shéimeantach Dhomhain: Cad a Oibríonn agus Cad atá Ar Aghaidh', 'zh': '深度语义角色标签:何效何效,何下一步?', 'hi': 'गहरी शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग: क्या काम करता है और अगला क्या है', 'hu': 'Mély szemantikus szerep címkézés: Mi működik és mi a következő', 'el': 'Βαθιά σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων: Τι λειτουργεί και τι ακολουθεί', 'ka': 'ძალიან სემანტიკური პროლის ნაწილი: რა მუშაობს და რა არის შემდეგ', 'it': 'Etichettatura semantica profonda dei ruoli: cosa funziona e cosa succede dopo', 'kk': 'Қалыпты семантикалық рөл жарлығы: Жұмыс және келесі не', 'ms': 'Label Rol Semantik Dalam: Apa yang Bekerja dan Apa Berikutnya', 'mk': 'Длабоко семантичко означување на улогата: Што работи и што следно', 'lt': 'Gilus semantinis vaidmens ženklinimas: kas veikia ir kas bus toliau', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലാബിലിംഗ്: എന്ത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'Głębokie oznaczanie ról semantycznych: co działa i co dalej', 'ro': 'Etichetarea profundă a rolurilor semantice: Ce funcționează și ce urmează', 'mn': "Гүнзгий Semantic Role Labeling: What Works and What's Next", 'no': 'Djup semiantisk rolletiketting: Kva arbeid og Kva er neste', 'mt': 'Tikkettar tar-Rwol Semantiku Profond: X’jaħdem u X’jmiss', 'si': 'ගොඩක් සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරදේශ ලේබිලින්: මොකද වැඩ කරන්නේ හා ඊළඟ මොකද්ද?', 'so': 'Deep Semantic Role Labeling: What Works and What Next', 'ta': 'ஆழம் செமாண்டிக் பங்கு', 'ur': "Deep Semantic Role Labeling: What Works and What's Next", 'sr': 'Duboko semantičko označavanje uloge: šta radi i šta sledeće', 'sv': 'Djup semantisk rollmärkning: Vad fungerar och vad är nästa', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đánh dấu cơ quan bóng bầu dục s âu sắc:', 'hr': 'Duboko semantičko označavanje uloge: Što radi i što je sljedeće', 'nl': 'Diepe semantische rollabeling: wat werkt en wat volgt', 'da': 'Dyb semantisk rollemærkning: Hvad virker og hvad er det næste', 'bg': 'Етикетиране на дълбока семантична роля: Какво работи и какво следва', 'de': 'Deep Semantic Role Labeling: Was funktioniert und was kommt als nächstes', 'id': 'Label Rol Semantik Dalam: Apa yang Berhasil dan Apa Berikutnya', 'fa': 'برچسب نقشه\u200cهای عمیق: چه کار می\u200cکند و چه بعدی است', 'ko': '심층어의 역할 표기: 무엇이 유효하고 다음 단계는 무엇입니까', 'sw': 'Kipindi cha Semantic Labeling: Kipi kinafanya kazi na Kinachofuata', 'af': 'Deep Semantiese roletiket: Wat werk en Wat is Volgende', 'sq': 'Etiketimi i thellĂ« i rolit Semantik: Ă‡farĂ« funksionon dhe Ă§farĂ« do tĂ« ndodhĂ« mĂ« pas', 'hy': 'Ջուր սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ. Ի՞նչ է աշխատում և ի՞նչ է հաջորդը', 'am': "What Works and What's Next", 'tr': 'Sabit Rol Etiketleri:Ne İş ve Neler Sonraki', 'az': "Deep Semantic Role Labeling: What Works and What's Next", 'bn': 'গভীর সেম্যান্টিক রোল লাবেলিং: কি কাজ এবং পরবর্তী কি কাজ', 'bs': 'Duboko semantičko označavanje uloge: šta radi i šta je sljedeće', 'ca': 'Etiqueta del paper Semàtic Profund: Què funciona i què següent', 'cs': 'Hluboké sémantické označování rolí: Co funguje a co bude dál', 'et': 'Sügav semantiline rolli märgistus: mis toimib ja mis järgmine', 'fi': 'Deep Semantic Role Labelling: Mikä toimii ja mitä seuraavaksi', 'jv': 'Label', 'sk': 'Označevanje globoke semantične vloge: Kaj deluje in kaj sledi', 'ha': "What works and What's next", 'he': 'תווית תפקיד סמנטי עמוקה: מה עובד ומה הבא', 'bo': "ཕལ་ཚུན་མཁན་གྱི་ལས་འཆར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། What Works and What's Next"}
{'en': 'We introduce a new deep learning model for semantic role labeling (SRL) that significantly improves the state of the art, along with detailed analyses to reveal its strengths and limitations. We use a deep highway BiLSTM architecture with constrained decoding, while observing a number of recent best practices for initialization and regularization. Our 8-layer ensemble model achieves 83.2 F1 on theCoNLL 2005 test set and 83.4 F1 on CoNLL 2012, roughly a 10 % relative error reduction over the previous state of the art. Extensive empirical analysis of these gains show that (1) deep models excel at recovering long-distance dependencies but can still make surprisingly obvious errors, and (2) that there is still room for syntactic parsers to improve these results.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا للتعلم العميق لوصف الأدوار الدلالية (SRL) الذي يعمل على تحسين حالة الفن بشكل كبير ، إلى جانب التحليلات التفصيلية للكشف عن نقاط القوة والقيود الخاصة به. نحن نستخدم بنية BiLSTM للطرق السريعة العميقة مع فك تشفير مقيد ، مع ملاحظة عدد من أفضل الممارسات الحديثة للتهيئة والتنظيم. نموذجنا المكون من 8 طبقات يحقق 83.2 F1 في مجموعة اختبار CoNLL 2005 و 83.4 F1 في CoNLL 2012 ، تقريبًا 10٪ تقليل للخطأ النسبي مقارنة بالحالة السابقة. يُظهر التحليل التجريبي الشامل لهذه المكاسب أن (1) النماذج العميقة تتفوق في استعادة التبعيات بعيدة المدى ولكن لا يزال بإمكانها ارتكاب أخطاء واضحة بشكل مدهش ، و (2) لا يزال هناك مجال للمحللين النحويين لتحسين هذه النتائج.', 'es': 'Presentamos un nuevo modelo de aprendizaje profundo para el etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) que mejora significativamente el estado del arte, junto con análisis detallados para revelar sus fortalezas y limitaciones. Utilizamos una arquitectura BilsTM de carretera profunda con decodificación restringida, al tiempo que observamos una serie de mejores prácticas recientes para la inicialización y regularización. Nuestro modelo de conjunto de 8 capas alcanza 83,2 F1 en el conjunto de pruebas del Conll 2005 y 83,4 F1 en el ConLL 2012, aproximadamente una reducción del error relativo del 10% con respecto al estado de la técnica anterior. Un análisis empírico exhaustivo de estas ganancias muestra que (1) los modelos profundos se destacan en la recuperación de dependencias de larga distancia, pero aún pueden cometer errores sorprendentemente obvios, y (2) que todavía hay espacio para que los analizadores sintácticos mejoren estos resultados.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un nouveau modèle d'apprentissage profond pour l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL) qui améliore considérablement l'état de l'art, ainsi que des analyses détaillées pour révéler ses forces et ses limites. Nous utilisons une architecture profonde BilsTM avec décodage contraint, tout en observant un certain nombre de bonnes pratiques récentes en matière d'initialisation et de régularisation. Notre modèle d'ensemble à 8 couches atteint 83,2 F1 sur le banc d'essai ConLL 2005 et 83,4 F1 sur ConLL 2012, soit une réduction d'erreur relative d'environ 10\xa0% par rapport à l'état de la technique précédent. Une analyse empirique approfondie de ces gains montre que (1) les modèles profonds excellent pour récupérer les dépendances à longue distance mais peuvent toujours faire des erreurs étonnamment évidentes, et (2) que les analyseurs syntaxiques peuvent encore améliorer ces résultats.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo modelo de aprendizado profundo para rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL) que melhora significativamente o estado da arte, juntamente com análises detalhadas para revelar seus pontos fortes e limitações. Usamos uma arquitetura BiLSTM de rodovia profunda com decodificação restrita, enquanto observamos várias práticas recomendadas recentes para inicialização e regularização. Nosso modelo de conjunto de 8 camadas atinge 83,2 F1 no conjunto de testes CoNLL 2005 e 83,4 F1 no CoNLL 2012, aproximadamente uma redução de erro relativo de 10% em relação ao estado da arte anterior. A análise empírica extensa desses ganhos mostra que (1) modelos profundos são excelentes na recuperação de dependências de longa distância, mas ainda podem cometer erros surpreendentemente óbvios e (2) que ainda há espaço para analisadores sintáticos melhorarem esses resultados.', 'ja': '私たちは、セマンティックロールラベリング（ SRL ）のための新しいディープラーニングモデルを導入し、その強みと制限を明らかにするための詳細な分析とともに、最先端の状態を大幅に改善します。私たちは、初期化と規則化のための最近のベストプラクティスのいくつかを観察しながら、制約されたデコードを備えた深いハイウェイBiLSTMアーキテクチャを使用します。当社の8層アンサンブルモデルは、CoNLL 2005試験器で83.2 F 1、CoNLL 2012試験器で83.4 F 1を達成し、従来の最先端技術よりも相対的に約10%の誤差低減を達成しています。これらの利得の広範な実証的分析は、（ １ ）深いモデルは長距離の依存関係を回復することに長けているが、それでも驚くほど明らかなエラーを犯す可能性があること、及び（ ２ ）構文解析器がこれらの結果を改善する余地がまだあることを示す。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим новую модель глубокого обучения для семантической ролевой маркировки (SRL), которая значительно улучшает состояние техники, наряду с детальным анализом, чтобы выявить ее сильные стороны и ограничения. Мы используем архитектуру глубокого шоссе BiLSTM с ограниченным декодированием, соблюдая при этом ряд последних передовых практик для инициализации и регуляризации. Наша 8-слойная модель ансамбля достигает 83,2 F1 на наборе испытаний CoNLL 2005 и 83,4 F1 на CoNLL 2012, что примерно на 10% меньше по сравнению с предыдущим уровнем техники. Широкий эмпирический анализ этих достижений показывает, что (1) модели глубокого анализа превосходят в восстановлении зависимостей на расстоянии, но все еще могут делать удивительно очевидные ошибки, и (2) что синтаксические парсеры все еще могут улучшить эти результаты.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach múnla nua domhainfhoghlama do lipéadú róil shéimeantach (SRL) a fheabhsaíonn go mór an úrscothacht, mar aon le hanailísí mionsonraithe chun a láidreachtaí agus a srianta a nochtadh. Bainimid úsáid as ailtireacht BiLSTM domhain mhórbhealaigh le díchódú srianta, agus ag an am céanna breathnaítear ar roinnt dea-chleachtas le déanaí maidir le tosú agus rialtacht. Baineann ár múnla ensemble 8-ciseal amach 83.2 F1 ar thacar tástála CoNLL 2005 agus 83.4 F1 ar CoNLL 2012, laghdú thart ar 10% ar earráid choibhneasta ar an úrscothacht roimhe seo. Léiríonn anailís eimpíreach fhairsing ar na gnóthachain seo go bhfuil (1) múnlaí doimhin barr feabhais ar ghnóthú spleáchais fad-achair ach is féidir a dhéanamh fós earráidí iontach soiléir, agus (2) go bhfuil spás fós do parsálaithe comhréire feabhas a chur ar na torthaí.', 'zh': '引入一新语义角色标记(SRL)深度模范,显著改善技术水平,详细分析以见势局限性。 用解码之深高速公路 BiLSTM 架构,观近初始化、正则化之最。 吾 8 成形于 CoNLL 2005 试集上得 83.2 F1,成 83.4 F1于 CoNLL 2012 ,比于前术,差减约 10%。 博证分析表明,(1)深长距离赖,犹有明非,(2)句法解析器有改之。', 'hi': 'हम शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) के लिए एक नया गहरा सीखने का मॉडल पेश करते हैं जो कला की स्थिति में काफी सुधार करता है, साथ ही इसकी ताकत और सीमाओं को प्रकट करने के लिए विस्तृत विश्लेषण करता है। हम सीमित डिकोडिंग के साथ एक गहरे राजमार्ग BiLSTM वास्तुकला का उपयोग करते हैं, जबकि प्रारंभिककरण और नियमितीकरण के लिए हाल ही में कई सर्वोत्तम प्रथाओं का अवलोकन करते हैं। हमारे 8-परत पहनावा मॉडल को CoNLL 2005 परीक्षण सेट पर 83.2 F1 और CoNLL 2012 पर 83.4 F1 प्राप्त होता है, जो कला के पिछले राज्य पर लगभग 10% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी है। इन लाभों के व्यापक अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि (1) गहरे मॉडल लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं को पुनर्प्राप्त करने में उत्कृष्टता प्राप्त करते हैं, लेकिन फिर भी आश्चर्यजनक रूप से स्पष्ट त्रुटियां कर सकते हैं, और (2) इन परिणामों को बेहतर बनाने के लिए वाक्यात्मक पार्सर के लिए अभी भी जगह है।', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy új mélytanulási modellt a szemantikai szerepkörcímkézésre (SRL), amely jelentősen javítja a technika állapotát, valamint részletes elemzéseket annak erősségeinek és korlátainak feltárására. Mély autópálya BiLSTM architektúrát használunk korlátozott dekódolással, miközben számos legújabb gyakorlatot figyelünk meg az inicializálásra és a regularizálásra. A 8 rétegű együttesmodellünk 83,2 F1-t ér el a CoNLL 2005 tesztkészleten és 83,4 F1-t a CoNLL 2012-en, ami körülbelül 10%-os relatív hibacsökkenést jelent a korábbi technológia állapotához képest. Az eredmények kiterjedt empirikus elemzése azt mutatja, hogy (1) a mély modellek kiválóak a hosszú távú függőségek helyreállításában, de még mindig meglepően nyilvánvaló hibákat okozhatnak, és (2) hogy még mindig van hely a szintaktikus elemzőknek, hogy javítsák ezeket az eredményeket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ შევაჩვენეთ ახალი შამანტიკური პროლის ნიშვნელობის მოდელი, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანია წლის სტატის სტატის შესაძლებლობა, და დარწმუნებული ანალიზების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მისი ძ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ძალიან ძალიან საზოგადო BiLSTM აქტიქტურაციას, რომელიც შეუძლებელია განზომილებული რედალურაციას და ინციალიზაციისთვის უკეთესი პრაქტიკების რაო ჩვენი 8-layer ensemble მოდელის მოდულიდან 83.2 F1 იქნება CoNLL 2005 ტესტის შესაძლებლობაში და 83.4 F1 CoNLL 2012-ში, პირდაპირად 10% შეცდომის შეცდომის შესაძლებლობას წინ შესაძლებლობაზე. ამ მიღებების უფრო დიდი ემპერიკალური ანალიზია, რომ (1) ძალიან დიდი მოდელეები უფრო დიდი განმავლობაში განმავლობაში, მაგრამ შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ განსაკუთრებული შეცდომები და (2) რომ სინტაქტიური პარასერების სა', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης για τη σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (που βελτιώνει σημαντικά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας, μαζί με λεπτομερείς αναλύσεις για να αποκαλύψει τα δυνατά και τα όριά του. Χρησιμοποιούμε μια βαθιά αρχιτεκτονική αυτοκινητοδρόμων με περιορισμένη αποκωδικοποίηση, ενώ παρατηρούμε μια σειρά από πρόσφατες βέλτιστες πρακτικές για την αρχικοποίηση και την νομιμοποίηση. Το 8-στρώμα μοντέλο συνόλου μας επιτυγχάνει 83.2 F1 στο σύνολο δοκιμής και 83.4 F1 στο σύνολο δοκιμής περίπου 10% σχετικά μείωση σφάλματος σε σχέση με την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Η εκτεταμένη εμπειρική ανάλυση αυτών των κερδών δείχνει ότι (1) βαθιά μοντέλα υπερέχουν στην ανάκτηση μεγάλων αποστάσεων εξαρτήσεων, αλλά εξακολουθούν να κάνουν εκπληκτικά προφανή λάθη, και (2) ότι υπάρχει ακόμα χώρος για συντακτικούς αναλυτές για να βελτιώσουν αυτά τα αποτελέσματα.', 'it': "Introducemo un nuovo modello di deep learning per l'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL) che migliora significativamente lo stato dell'arte, insieme ad analisi dettagliate per svelarne i punti di forza e i limiti. Utilizziamo una profonda architettura BiLSTM autostradale con decodifica limitata, osservando una serie di recenti best practice per l'inizializzazione e la regolarizzazione. Il nostro modello di ensemble a 8 strati raggiunge 83,2 F1 sul set di test CoNLL 2005 e 83,4 F1 sul CoNLL 2012, una riduzione di errore relativa di circa il 10% rispetto al precedente stato dell'arte. Un'ampia analisi empirica di questi guadagni mostra che (1) i modelli profondi eccellono nel recupero delle dipendenze a lunga distanza, ma possono ancora fare errori sorprendentemente evidenti, e (2) che c'è ancora spazio per i parser sintattici per migliorare questi risultati.", 'kk': 'Семантикалық роль жарлығының (SRL) жаңа терең оқыту үлгісін келтіреміз. Бұл өзінің күштерін және шектеулерін көрсету үшін оның тегжейлі анализацияларын жасайды. Біз BiLSTM архитектурасын шектелген декодтау архитектурасы қолданып, инициализациялау және регулярлау үшін жаңа жақсы әрекеттердің бірнеше деңгейін қарай аламыз. Біздің 8 қабаттық үлгіміз CoNLL 2005 сынақтарында 83,2 F1 және CoNLL 2012 жылында 83,4 F1 және 10% қатенің алдыңғы күйіне қатынау үшін жеткізеді. Бұл жетістіктердің кеңейтілген импирикалық анализ (1) ұзындық қашықтық тәуелдіктерді қалпына келтіру үшін (1) терең үлгілер, бірақ әлі әлі білмей қателерді жасай алады, және (2) синтактикалық талдаушылардың', 'mk': '袧懈械 胁芯胁械写褍胁邪屑械 薪芯胁 屑芯写械谢 薪邪 写谢邪斜芯泻芯 褍褔械褮械 蟹邪 褋械屑邪薪褌懈褔泻芯 芯蟹薪邪褔褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 褍谢芯谐邪褌邪 (小袪袥) 泻芯褬 蟹薪邪褔懈褌械谢薪芯 褬邪 锌芯写芯斜褉褍胁邪 褌械褏薪懈褔泻邪褌邪 褋芯褋褌芯褬斜邪, 蟹邪械写薪芯 褋芯 写械褌邪谢薪懈 邪薪邪谢懈蟹懈 蟹邪 芯褌泻褉懈胁邪褮械 薪邪 褋胁芯懈褌械 褋懈谢懈 懈 芯谐褉邪薪懈褔褍胁邪褮邪. 袣芯褉懈褋褌懈屑械 写谢邪斜芯泻邪 邪褉褏懈褌械泻褌褍褉邪 薪邪 邪胁褌芯锌邪褌芯褌 袘懈LSTM 褋芯 芯谐褉邪薪懈褔械薪芯 写械泻芯写懈褉邪褮械, 锌褉懈 褕褌芯 薪邪斜褭褍写褍胁邪屑械 薪械泻芯谢泻褍 薪械芯写邪屑薪械褕薪懈 薪邪褬写芯斜褉懈 锌褉邪泻褌懈泻懈 蟹邪 懈薪懈褑懈褬邪谢懈蟹邪褑懈褬邪 懈 褉械谐褍谢邪褉懈蟹邪褑懈褬邪. 袧邪褕懈芯褌 8-褋谢芯械胁械薪 邪薪褋械屑斜谢 屑芯写械谢 锌芯褋褌懈谐薪褍胁邪 83,2 肖1 薪邪 褌械褋褌芯褌 CoNLL 2005 懈 83,4 肖1 薪邪 CoNLL 2012, 锌褉懈斜谢懈卸薪芯 10 芯褌褋褌芯 褉械谢邪褌懈胁薪芯 薪邪屑邪谢褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 谐褉械褕泻懈褌械 胁芯 芯写薪芯褋 薪邪 锌褉械褌褏芯写薪邪褌邪 褌械褏薪懈褔泻邪 褋芯褋褌芯褬斜邪. 袝泻褋褌械薪蟹懈胁薪邪褌邪 械屑锌懈褉懈褔薪邪 邪薪邪谢懈蟹邪 薪邪 芯胁懈械 写芯斜懈胁泻懈 锌芯泻邪卸褍胁邪 写械泻邪 (1) 写谢邪斜芯泻懈褌械 屑芯写械谢懈 褋械 懈蟹胁芯薪褉械写薪懈 胁芯 胁褉邪褱邪褮械褌芯 薪邪 写芯谢谐懈褌械 蟹邪胁懈褋薪芯褋褌懈, 薪芯 褋茅 褍褕褌械 屑芯卸邪褌 写邪 薪邪锌褉邪胁邪褌 懈蟹薪械薪邪写褍胁邪褔泻懈 芯褔懈谐谢械写薪懈 谐褉械褕泻懈, 懈 (2) 写械泻邪 褋茅 褍褕褌械 懈屑邪 屑械褋褌芯 蟹邪 褋懈薪褌邪泻褌懈褔泻懈 邪薪邪谢懈蟹邪褌芯褉懈 蟹邪 锌芯写芯斜褉褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 芯胁懈械 褉械蟹褍谢褌邪褌懈', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame naują gilaus mokymosi model į, skirtą semantiniam vaidmeniui žymėti, kuris gerokai pagerina pažangą, taip pat išsamią analizę, siekiant atskleisti jo stiprumus ir apribojimus. We use a deep highway BiLSTM architecture with constrained decoding, while observing a number of recent best practices for initialization and regularization.  Mūsų 8 sluoksnių komplekso modelis pasiekia 83,2 F1 CoNLL 2005 bandymų rinkinyje ir 83,4 F1 CoNLL 2012 bandymų rinkinyje, t. y. maždaug 10 % santykinio klaidų sumažėjimo, palyginti su ankstesne pažangiąja technika. Išsami empirinė šių laimėjimų analizė rodo, kad (1) gilūs modeliai puikiai padeda atkurti priklausomybę nuo ilgo atstumo, tačiau vis dar gali padaryti stebuklingai akivaizdžius klaidas, ir (2) kad dar yra galimybių sintaktiniams analizatoriams pagerinti šiuos rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model belajar dalam baru untuk label peranan semantik (SRL) yang meningkatkan keadaan seni secara signifikan, bersama dengan analisis terperinci untuk mengungkapkan kekuatan dan keterangan. Kami menggunakan arkitektur BiLSTM Jalan Terjauh dengan penyahkodan terhalang, sementara mengamati beberapa praktek terbaik baru-baru ini untuk awalkan dan mengatur. Model ensemble 8 lapisan kami mencapai 83.2 F1 pada set ujian CoNLL 2005 dan 83.4 F1 pada CoNLL 2012, kira-kira pengurangan ralat relatif 10% atas keadaan kemajuan sebelumnya. Analisis empirik yang luas untuk keuntungan ini menunjukkan bahawa (1) model dalam mengagumkan pemulihan dependensi jarak jauh tetapi masih boleh membuat ralat yang mengejutkan yang jelas, dan (2) bahawa masih ada ruang untuk penghurai sintaktik untuk meningkatkan keputusan ini.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കലാകൃത്യത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴമുള്ള ഹൈവേ ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റമിന്റെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായി നിര്\u200dബന്ധമാക്കുന്നു. അടുത്തുള്ള ച ഞങ്ങളുടെ 8-layer ensemble model 83. 2 F1 ന്റെ കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d 2005 പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റിലും 83. 4 F1 കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d 2012-ല്\u200d എത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള കലാകൃത്യത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d 10% ക ഈ സമ്പത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു (1) നീണ്ട ദൂരത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ആഴമുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഉത്തമമാണ് എന്നാലും അത്ഭുതകരമായ പിശകുകള', 'mn': 'Бид semantic role labelling (SRL) шинэ гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь урлагийн байр суурь байдлыг илүү сайжруулдаг. Маш нарийн шинжилгээ нь өөрийн хүчтэй болон хязгаарлалтыг илэрхийлдэг. Бид BiLSTM архитектурын гүн гүнзгий зам ашиглаж, хязгаарлагдсан загвар, саяхан эхлүүлэх, шууд байдлын сайн дасгал үйл ажиллагааг ажиглаж байна. Бидний 8 давхар загварын загвар CoNLL 2005 тестийн багц болон CoNLL 2012 оны 83.4 F1 болон урлагийн өмнөх нөхцөл байдлыг 10% багасгах болно. Эдгээр хүмүүсийн нэмэгдсэн үндсэн шинжилгээ нь (1) урт зай хамааралтай байдлыг эргүүлэхэд гайхалтай алдаа гаргаж чадна.', 'mt': 'We introduce a new deep learning model for semantic role labeling (SRL) that significantly improves the state of the art, along with detailed analyses to reveal its strengths and limitations.  Aħna nużaw arkitettura profonda tal-BiLSTM tal-awtostrada b’dekodifikazzjoni ristretta, filwaqt li nużaw għadd ta’ a ħjar prattiki reċenti għall-inizjalizzazzjoni u r-regolarizzazzjoni. Il-mudell ta’ ensemble tagħna b’8 saffi jilħaq 83.2 F1 fuq is-sett tat-test CoNLL 2005 u 83.4 F1 fuq CoNLL 2012, madwar tnaqqis ta’ żball relattiv ta’ 10% fuq l-a ħħar avvanz. Analiżi empirika estensiva ta’ dawn il-kisbiet turi li (1) mudelli profondi jeżistu fl-irkupru tad-dipendenzi fuq distanzi twal iżda xorta jistgħu jagħmlu żbalji sorprendentement ovvji, u (2) li għad hemm lok għal analizzaturi sintetiċi biex itejbu dawn ir-riżultati.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nowy model głębokiego uczenia do semantycznego oznaczania roli (SRL), który znacząco poprawia stan wiedzy, wraz ze szczegółowymi analizami ujawniającymi jego mocne i ograniczenia. Wykorzystujemy głęboką architekturę autostradową BiLSTM z ograniczonym dekodowaniem, przy jednoczesnym obserwowaniu szeregu najlepszych praktyk inicjalizacji i regularyzacji. Nasz 8-warstwowy model zespołu osiąga 83.2 F1 na zestawie testowym CoNLL 2005 i 83.4 F1 na CoNLL 2012, mniej więcej 10% względnej redukcji błędów w porównaniu z poprzednim stanem techniki. Obszerna empiryczna analiza tych zysków pokazuje, że (1) głębokie modele są doskonałe w odzyskiwaniu zależności na odległość, ale nadal mogą popełniać zaskakująco oczywiste błędy i (2) że nadal istnieje miejsce dla parserów składni, aby poprawić te wyniki.', 'ro': 'Introducem un nou model de învățare profundă pentru etichetarea rolurilor semantice (SRL), care îmbunătățește semnificativ starea tehnologiei, alături de analize detaliate pentru a dezvălui punctele forte și limitările sale. Folosim o arhitectură adâncă BiLSTM autostradă cu decodare constrânsă, observând în același timp o serie de bune practici recente pentru inițializare și regularizare. Modelul nostru de ansamblu cu 8 straturi atinge 83,2 F1 pe setul de testare CoNLL 2005 și 83,4 F1 pe CoNLL 2012, o reducere relativă a erorilor de aproximativ 10% față de starea anterioară a tehnologiei. Analiza empirică amplă a acestor câștiguri arată că (1) modelele profunde excelează în recuperarea dependențelor la distanțe lungi, dar pot face încă erori surprinzător de evidente, și (2) că există încă loc pentru parserele sintactice pentru a îmbunătăți aceste rezultate.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer eit nytt dyp læringsmodell for semantisk rolletiketting (SRL), som betydelig forbedrar kunststanden, saman med detaljerte analyser for å oppdaga styrkene og begrensningar. Vi bruker ein dyp motorvei BiLSTM- arkitektur med begrenset dekoding, mens vi observerer fleire nyleg beste praksisar for oppstarting og regulering. Vårt 8-lag-ensemble-modell når det gjer 83,2 F1 på CoNLL 2005-testsettet og 83,4 F1 på CoNLL 2012, er omtrent ei relativt feilreduksjon i 10 % over det førre tilstanden av kunsten. Ekstra empirisk analyse av disse forskjellingane viser at (1) dype modeller overstyrer på å gjenoppretta lang avstandavhengighet, men kan fortsatt gjera overraska åpenleg feil, og (2) at det finst framleis rom for syntaktiske tolkarar for å forbedra desse resultatene.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novi model dubokog učenja za etiketiranje semantičkih uloga (SRL), koji značajno poboljšava stanje umjetnosti, zajedno sa detaljnim analizama kako bi otkrili svoju snagu i ograničenja. Koristimo duboku arhitekturu BiLSTM-a sa ograničenim dekodiranjem, dok posmatramo broj nedavnih najboljih prakse za inicijalizaciju i regularizaciju. Naš model oslobađanja oslobađanja ostvario je 83,2 F1 na testu CoNLL 2005 i 83,4 F1 na CoNLL 2012, otprilike smanjenje relativne greške od 10% preko prethodnog stanja umjetnosti. Ekstensivna empirička analiza tih dobitnika pokazuje da (1) duboki modeli iznosi na oporavak ovisnosti iz daleke udaljenosti, ali još uvek mogu da čine iznenađujuće oèigledne greške, i (2) da još uvek postoji mjesta za sintaktičke parsere da poboljšaju te rezultate.', 'si': 'අපි අලුත් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලේබිල් එක්ක (SRL) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, ඒක ගොඩක් විස්තර විශේ අපි බිල්ස්ටිම් විස්තරයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සීමාවිත විස්තරයක් සමග, අන්තිම විස්තරය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරය සඳහා අන් අපේ 8-layer ensEmble මොඩල් 83.2 F1 සඳහා CoNLL 2005 පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා 83.4 F1 සඳහා CoNLL 2012 සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වැරැද්දක් 10% සම්බන්ධ වැරැද්දක් පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන විශ්ලේෂණය (1) ගොඩක් මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒත් තවමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': "Tusaale cusub oo aad u dheer oo waxbarashada (SRL) ah oo aad u hagaajiya xaaladda farshaxanka, iyo baaritaanka faa'iidada si loo muujiyo xooggooda iyo xaduudaha. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa dhismaha aad u weyn ee BiLSTM, iyadoo aan qasab ka dhigno wax la qoro, iyadoo aan arkayno habab aad u wanaagsan ee la bilaabo iyo la soo dejiyo. Tusaalka 8-layere waxay gaadhaa 83.2 F1 oo ku qoran tijaabada CoNLL 2005 iyo 83.4 F1 oo ku qoran CoNLL 2012, qiyaastii 10% khalad saameyn ah ayaa ka dhacay xaaladdii hore. Baaritaanka faa'iido dheer ee waxyaabahan waxay muuqataa (1) modelal mool dheer oo ka fiican in la soo celiyo iskala xiriirta fog, laakiin weli wuxuu ka dhigi karaa qaladyo bayaan ah, iyo (2) in badnaan baarlamayaasha la soconayo ay leedahay meel ay ku hagaajiyaan matooyinkaas.", 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en ny djupinlärningsmodell för semantisk rollmärkning (SRL) som avsevärt förbättrar den senaste tekniken, tillsammans med detaljerade analyser för att avslöja dess styrkor och begränsningar. Vi använder en djup motorväg BiLSTM arkitektur med begränsad avkodning, samtidigt som vi observerar ett antal senaste bästa metoder för initiering och regularisering. Vår 8-lagers ensemblemodell uppnår 83,2 F1 på CoNLL 2005 testset och 83,4 F1 på CoNLL 2012, ungefär 10% relativ felminskning jämfört med tidigare state of the art. Omfattande empirisk analys av dessa vinster visar att (1) djupa modeller utmärker sig på att återställa fjärrberoenden men fortfarande kan göra förvånansvärt uppenbara fel, och (2) att det fortfarande finns utrymme för syntaktiska tolkare för att förbättra dessa resultat.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது கலைகளின் நிலையை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, அதில் அதன் வலிமைகளையும் எல்லைகளையும நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான பைல்ஸ்டிஎம் கட்டுப்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தி கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, சமீபத்தில் துவக்கத்தையும் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற் எங்கள் 8 அடுக்கு ஒதுக்கும் மாதிரி கோன்எல் 2005 சோதனை அமைப்பில் 83. 2 F1 பெறுகிறது மற்றும் கோன்எல் 2012 ல் 83. 4 F1 பெறுகிறது, முந்தைய கலைப்பாட்டின் மீது சா இந்த வெற்றிகளின் விரிவான உச்சரிப்பு ஆய்வு காட்டுகிறது. (1) தூரத்தில் சார்ந்த சார்புகளை மீட்டுவதில் ஆழமான மாதிரிகள் அதிகமாக இருக்கிறது ஆனால் இன்னும் ஆச்சரி', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی عمیق سیکھنے کی مدل کو معلوم کرتا ہے کہ اس کی طاقت اور محدودیت کو ظاہر کرنے کے لئے آزمائش کی حالت بہترین کرتا ہے۔ ہم ایک عمیق ہیٹ وی BiLSTM معماری استعمال کرتے ہیں جو محدودہ ڈیکوڈینگ کے ساتھ ہے، حالانکہ بہت اچھی اچھی آزمائش کی تعداد کی نظر رکھتے ہیں کہ آغاز اور قانونی کے لئے۔ ہمارے 8 لائر انسمبل موڈل کو CoNLL 2005 ٹیسٹ سٹ پر 83.2 F1 پہنچ سکتا ہے اور CoNLL 2012 پر 83.4 F1، تقریباً ایک 10% مقابلہ خطا کم کرتا ہے۔ ان غنیمتوں کی گھیری امپریسی تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ (1) عمیق نمڈلے بہت زیادہ دور دور کی تعلقات کو پہنچانے کے لئے لیکن اب بھی صریح خطائیں بنا سکتے ہیں، اور (2) کہ ان نتائج کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے ابھی سینٹکتیک پارسوں کے لئے جگہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz Sanatning holatini juda muhimiy yaxshi ko'proq o'rganish uchun yangi o'rganish modelini (SRL) yaratdik. va uning kuchlarini va chegaralarini ko'rsatish uchun taʼrif tarjimalarni bajaramiz. Biz juda katta yuqori BiLSTM strukturesi bilan ishlatamiz, cheksiz ravishda ishlab chiqarish va boshqarish uchun bir necha yaxshi narsalarni ko'rib turamiz. Bizning 8 qatlam modelimizning 83.2 F1 tizimi 2005 ta'lim sohasida amalga oshadi va KNLL 2012 yilda 83.4 F1 yilgan 83.4 F1 yilgan, aslida oldingi holatda qiziqarli xato kamaytirish mumkin. Bu muvaffaqiyatlarning kengaytmalari analyzeri ko'rsatadi (1) uzun masofadan ishlatuvchilarni qayta olishda juda ko'p modellar ko'rinadi, lekin bu natijalarni yaxshi ko'ra ko'ra oladi, va (2) bu natijalarni yaxshi ko'ra oladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình học sâu sắc mới về mô phỏng các vai trò theo ngữ pháp (SLOL) có thể cải thiện quan điểm hiện đại của nghệ thuật, cùng với các phân tích chi tiết để bộc lộ điểm mạnh và giới hạn của nó. Chúng tôi sử dụng một kiến trúc đường cao tốc rộng lớn BiLSTM với việc giải mã giới hạn, trong khi quan sát một số cách thức tốt nhất gần đây để khởi động và chỉnh sửa. The 8-lớp kiểm soát của cái kiểm soát bước 82 của chúng ta bằng 3.2 F1 trên chuỗi kiểm kiểm tra CAN rồ. Sự phân tích thực tế rộng lớn của những lợi thế này cho thấy rằng(1) các mô- đun sâu sắc vượt trội trong việc phục hồi quan hệ phụ thuộc xa xôi nhưng vẫn có thể tạo ra những sai sót ngạc nhiên, và (2) rằng vẫn còn chỗ cho các phân tích cú pháp để cải thiện kết quả này.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме нов модел за дълбоко учене за семантично етикетиране на роли, който значително подобрява състоянието на техниката, заедно с подробни анализи, за да разкрие неговите силни страни и ограничения. Използваме дълбока магистрална архитектура с ограничено декодиране, като същевременно спазваме редица най-добри практики за инициализация и регламентиране. Нашият 8-слоен ансамбъл модел постига 83,2 на тестовия комплект КоНЛ 2005 и 83,4 на КоНЛ 2012, приблизително 10% относително намаление на грешките спрямо предишното състояние на техниката. Обширният емпиричен анализ на тези печалби показва, че (1) дълбоките модели се отличават в възстановяването на зависимости на дълги разстояния, но все още могат да направят изненадващо очевидни грешки, и (2) че все още има място за синтактични анализатори да подобрят тези резултати.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een nieuw deep learning model voor semantische rollabeling (SRL) dat de stand van de techniek aanzienlijk verbetert, samen met gedetailleerde analyses om de sterke en beperkingen ervan te onthullen. We gebruiken een diepe snelweg BiLSTM architectuur met beperkte decodering, terwijl we een aantal recente best practices voor initialisatie en regularisatie in acht nemen. Ons 8-laags ensemble model bereikt 83.2 F1 op de CoNLL 2005 testset en 83.4 F1 op CoNLL 2012, ongeveer een 10% relatieve foutreductie ten opzichte van de vorige stand van de techniek. Uitgebreide empirische analyse van deze winsten toont aan dat (1) diepe modellen uitblinken in het herstellen van langeafstandsafhankelijkheden, maar nog steeds verrassend duidelijke fouten kunnen maken, en (2) dat er nog ruimte is voor syntactische parsers om deze resultaten te verbeteren.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novi model dubokog učenja za označavanje semantičke uloge (SRL), koji značajno poboljšava stanje umjetnosti, zajedno s detaljnim analizima kako bi otkrili svoju snagu i ograničenja. Koristimo duboku arhitekturu BiLSTM-a s ograničenim dekodiranjem, dok posmatramo broj nedavnih najboljih prakse za inicijalizaciju i regularizaciju. Naš model osnovnih slojeva ostvario je 83,2 F1 na testu CoNLL 2005-a i 83,4 F1 na CoNLL 2012-u, približno smanjenje relativne greške od 10% prema prethodnom stanju umjetnosti. Proširena empirička analiza tih dobića pokazuje da (1) duboki modeli iznosi na oporavku ovisnosti iz daleke udaljenosti ali još uvijek mogu napraviti iznenađujuće očitne greške, a (2) da još uvijek postoji mjesta za sintaktičke parsere kako bi poboljšali te rezultate.', 'de': 'Wir führen ein neues Deep Learning Modell für semantische Rollenbeschriftung (SRL) ein, das den Stand der Technik signifikant verbessert, zusammen mit detaillierten Analysen, um seine Stärken und Grenzen aufzudecken. Wir verwenden eine tiefe Highway-BiLSTM-Architektur mit eingeschränkter Dekodierung und beachten dabei eine Reihe aktueller Best Practices für Initialisierung und Regularisierung. Unser 8-Lagen-Ensemblemodell erreicht 83.2 F1 auf dem CoNLL 2005 Testset und 83.4 F1 auf CoNLL 2012, ungefähr eine 10% relative Fehlerreduktion gegenüber dem bisherigen Stand der Technik. Umfangreiche empirische Analysen dieser Gewinne zeigen, dass (1) tiefe Modelle hervorragend bei der Wiederherstellung von Fernabhängigkeiten sind, aber immer noch überraschend offensichtliche Fehler machen können, und (2) dass es noch Raum für syntaktische Parser gibt, diese Ergebnisse zu verbessern.', 'ko': '우리는 의미 역할 표시(SRL)를 위해 새로운 심도 있는 학습 모델을 도입했는데 이 모델은 기술 수준을 현저히 향상시켰고 상세한 분석을 통해 그 장점과 한계를 제시했다.우리는 제약 디코딩이 있는 deep highway BilSTM 체계 구조를 사용하고 최근 초기화와 정규화에 사용된 최선의 실천을 관찰했다.우리의 8층 통합 모델은 CoNLL 2005 테스트 세트에서 83.2F1, CoNLL 2012 테스트 세트에서 83.4F1로 이전의 기술 수준에 비해 상대적인 오차가 약 10% 낮아졌다.이러한 수익에 대한 대량의 실증 분석에 따르면 (1) 깊이 모델은 장거리 의존을 회복하는 데 뛰어나지만 놀랄만한 뚜렷한 오류가 발생할 수 있다. (2) 문법 분석기는 이러한 결과를 개선할 공간이 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha modeli mpya ya kujifunza kwa jukumu la kimapenzi (SRL) ambalo linaboresha hali ya sanaa, pamoja na uchambuzi wa kina ili kuonyesha nguvu na mipaka yake. Tunatumia ujenzi mkubwa wa barabara kuu wa BiLSTM ukiwa umezuiwa, wakati tunatazama mazingira kadhaa ya hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya kuanzisha na kudhibiti. Mfano wetu wa vipande 8 unafanikiwa kufikia 83.2 F1 kwenye mtihani wa jaribio la CoNLL 2005 na 83.4 F1 kwenye CoNLL 2012, takribani asilimia 10 ya makosa yanayohusiana na kupungua kwa hali iliyopita ya sanaa. Uchambuzi mkubwa wa mafanikio haya unaonyesha kuwa (1) mifano ya kina bora zaidi katika kutafuta kutegemea kwa umbali mrefu lakini bado inaweza kufanya makosa ya kushangaza, na (2) kwamba bado kuna nafasi ya mabunge wa ushirikiano ili kuboresha matokeo haya.', 'fa': 'ما مدل یادگیری عمیق جدید برای برچسب نقشه\u200cهای semantic (SRL) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که موقعیت هنر را به طور معنی بهتر می\u200cکند، همراه با تحلیل\u200cهای جزئیات برای نشان دادن قدرت و محدودیت\u200cهایش. ما از یک معماری جاده عمیق BiLSTM استفاده می کنیم با دکوندن محدودیت، در حالی که مراقبت تعدادی از بهترین تجارت اخیر برای آغاز و سازمان کردن است. Model 8-layer ensemble ما 83.2 F1 را در مجموعه آزمایش CoNLL 2005 و 83.4 F1 را در CoNLL 2012 می\u200cرساند، تقریباً کمتر خطای نسبت به 10% در حالت پیشین هنر. تحلیل عمومی عمومی از این پیروزی نشان می دهد که (۱) مدل عمیق در بازیابی بستگی های فاصله طولانی بیشتر است ولی هنوز می تواند اشتباهی معلوم کنند، و (۲) که هنوز جایی برای بازیابی\u200cکنندگان سنتاکتیک وجود دارد تا این نتایج را بهتر کنند.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en ny deep learning model for semantisk rollemærkning (SRL), der markant forbedrer den nye teknologi, sammen med detaljerede analyser for at afsløre dens styrker og begrænsninger. Vi bruger en dyb motorvejsBiLSTM arkitektur med begrænset afkodning, samtidig med at vi observerer en række nylige bedste praksis for initialisering og regulering. Vores 8-lags ensemble model opnår 83,2 F1 på CoNLL 2005 testsættet og 83,4 F1 på CoNLL 2012, nogenlunde en relativ fejlreduktion på 10% i forhold til den tidligere state of te art. Omfattende empirisk analyse af disse gevinster viser, at (1) dybe modeller udmærker sig til at gendanne langdistanceafhængigheder, men stadig kan lave overraskende åbenlyse fejl, og (2) at der stadig er plads til syntaktiske fortolkere til at forbedre disse resultater.', 'tr': 'Semantik rol etiketlemesi (SRL) üçin täze derin öwrenmek nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys we sungatyň durumyny gowurak bilen detayly analyzlary we güýçlerini we çärelerini a çmak üçin täze bir nusgasyny çykarýarys. Ýakynda başlamak we düzenlemek üçin iň gowy praktika gözleýän bir BiLSTM arhitektura ulanýarys. Biziň 8-katlak nusgasymyz CoNLL 2005-nji synagda 83.2 F1 we CoNLL 2012-nji ýylda test düzüldi. Bu gazançlaryň uly döwletleri (1) ýuwaşlyk nusgalary uzakdan baglanşyklary ýitirmekde öňünde täsirli döwletleri görkezip bilýär ýöne hala şaşırtıcı ýalňyşlary edip bilýär we (2) syntaktik tanyşlaryň bu netijelerini geliştirmek üçin heniz ýere bar.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan model belajar dalam baru untuk label peran semantis (SRL) yang meningkatkan keadaan seni secara signifikan, bersama dengan analisis terperinci untuk mengungkapkan kekuatannya dan batasan. We use a deep highway BiLSTM architecture with constrained decoding, while observing a number of recent best practices for initialization and regularization.  Model ensemble 8 lapisan kami mencapai 83,2 F1 pada set tes CoNLL 2005 dan 83,4 F1 pada CoNLL 2012, sekitar 10% pengurangan kesalahan relatif atas keadaan seni sebelumnya. Analisis empirik yang luas dari keuntungan ini menunjukkan bahwa (1) model yang dalam mengagumkan pemulihan dependensi jarak jauh tetapi masih dapat membuat kesalahan yang sangat jelas, dan (2) bahwa masih ada ruang untuk parser sintaksi untuk meningkatkan hasil ini.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model të ri mësimi të thellë për etiketën e rolit semantik (SRL) që përmirëson ndjeshëm gjendjen e artit, së bashku me analizat e detajuara për të zbuluar fuqitë dhe kufizimet e saj. Ne përdorim një arkitekturë të thellë BiLSTM me dekodim të kufizuar, duke vëzhguar një numër praktikësh më të mira të kohëve të fundit për inicializimin dhe rregullimin. Modeli ynë 8-shtresësh i ansamblit arrin 83.2 F1 në grupin e testit CoNLL 2005 dhe 83.4 F1 në CoNLL 2012, rreth 10% reduktim i gabimeve relativë në krahasim me gjendjen e mëparshme të artit. Analiza e gjerë empirike e këtyre fitimeve tregon se (1) modelet e thella mbizotërojnë në rimëkëmbjen e varësive të distancave të gjata por ende mund të bëjnë gabime të jashtëzakonshme surprizuese dhe (2) se ende ka vend për analizuesit sintaktikë për të përmirësuar këto rezultate.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n nuwe diep leer model vir semantiese roletiketting (SRL) wat betekenlik die staat van die kuns verbeter, saam met gedetale analiserings om sy sterkte en beperkings te vertoon. Ons gebruik 'n diep grootpad BiLSTM-arkitektuur met beheinde dekodering, terwyl ons 'n aantal onlangse beste praksies vir inisialisering en regularisasie aanhou. Ons 8-laag ensemble model bereik 83.2 F1 op die CoNLL 2005 toets stel en 83.4 F1 op CoNLL 2012, omtrent 'n 10% relatiewe fout reduksie oor die vorige staat van die kuns. Ekstensiewe empiriese analisie van hierdie verskaffings vertoon dat (1) diep modele oorsaak by die herstelling van langafstand afhanklikhede, maar kan nog oorsaaklik duidelike foute maak, en (2) dat daar nog steeds kamer vir sintaktieke verwerkers is om hierdie resultate te verbeter.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ տալու նոր խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որը նշանակալիորեն բարելավում է արվեստի կարգավիճակը, ինչպես նաև մանրամասն վերլուծություններ, որպեսզի բացահայտենք դրա ուժեղությունները և սահմանափակումները: We use a deep highway BiLSTM architecture with constrained decoding, while observing a number of recent best practices for initialization and regularization.  Մեր 8 շերտ համակարգչային մոդելը հասնում է 2005ԿոՆԼ փորձարկումների ընթացքում 832.2 Ֆ1 և 2012ԿոՆԼ փորձարկումների ընթացքում 834.4 Ֆ1, մոտավորապես 10 տոկոսով համեմատական սխալների կրճատմանը նախորդ արդյունքում: Այս շահույթի ընդլայնված էմպիրիկական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ (1) խորը մոդելները լավ են ընդունում երկար հեռավորության կախվածությունների վերականգնումը, բայց միևնույն է կարող են զարմանալի ակնհայտ սխալներ անել, և (2) որ դեռևս տեղ կա սինտակտիկ վերլուծումների համար', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novi model dubokog učenja za etiketiranje semantičke uloge (SRL), koji značajno poboljšava stanje umjetnosti, zajedno sa detaljnim analizima kako bi otkrili svoju snagu i ograničenja. Koristimo duboku arhitekturu BiLSTM-a sa ograničenim dekodiranjem, dok posmatramo broj nedavnih najboljih prakse za inicijalizaciju i regularizaciju. Naš model oslobađanja oslobađanja ostvario je 83,2 F1 na testu CoNLL 2005 i 83,4 F1 na CoNLL 2012, otprilike smanjenje relativne greške od 10% prema prethodnom stanju umjetnosti. Provećana empirička analiza tih dobitnika pokazuje da (1) duboki modeli iznosi na oporavak ovisnosti iz daleke udaljenosti, ali još uvijek mogu napraviti iznenađujuće očite greške, i (2) da još uvijek postoji mjesta za sintaktičke parsere da poboljšaju te rezultate.', 'ca': "Introduïm un nou model d'aprenentatge profund per etiquetar el paper semàntic (SRL) que millora significativament l'estat de l'art, juntament amb anàlisis detallats per revelar les seves fortaleses i limitacions. Utilitzem una arquitectura profunda de BiLSTM amb decodificació restringida, observant una sèrie de pràctiques millors recents d'inicialització i regularizació. El nostre model d'ensemble de 8 capes aconsegueix 83,2 F1 en el CoNLL 2005 i 83,4 F1 en CoNLL 2012, aproximadament una reducció d'errors relativs del 10% en comparació amb l'estat d'art anterior. Una extensa anàlisi empírica d'aquests guanys demostra que (1) models profunds excelen en recuperar dependencies a llargues distàncies però encara poden cometre errors sorprenentment òbvias, i (2) que encara hi ha espai per a analitzadors sinàctics per millorar aquests resultats.", 'am': 'አዲስ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ምሳሌ (SRL) የጥልቅ ትምህርት እናሳውቃለን፤ አካላነትንና ግንኙነትን ለመግለጥ ትክክለኛዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ ለመጀመሪያ እና ለመዘጋጀት የበለጠ ጥያቄዎችን ለማየት እናስቀናለን፡፡ Our 8-layer ensemble model achieves 83.2 F1 on theCoNLL 2005 test set and 83.4 F1 on CoNLL 2012, roughly a 10% relative error reduction over the previous state of the art.  የዚህን አዳራሽ ስህተት የሚያስፈልገው (1) ጥልቅ ዓይነቶች የሩቅ ተማሪዎችን በመመለስ ነገር ግን ገና የሚያስደነግጥ ስህተቶችን ለማድረግ ይሻላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz semantik rol etiketi (SRL) üçün yeni dərin öyrənmə modelini təşkil edirik ki, sanatın durumunu çox yaxşılaşdırır, onun gücünü və sınırlarını göstərmək üçün detaylı analizi ilə birlikdə. Biz sıxıntılı kodlama ilə qaranlıq BiLSTM arhitektarını istifadə edirik, yenidən başlatmaq və düzgünlük üçün çox yaxşı praktikalar görməkdə. Bizim 8-layer ensemble modelimiz CoNLL 2005 sınama qutusunda 83.2 F1 və CoNLL 2012-də 83.4 F1 nəticəsində, sanatın əvvəlki durumunda 10% haqq yoldan xəta düşürmüşdür. Bu qazandıqların genişliyi empirik analizi göstərir ki (1) uzun uzaq bağlılıqlarını geri almaq üçün dərin modellər çox yüksək, amma hələ də təəccüblü açıq xətaları olar, və (2) sintaktik analizi ilə bu sonuçları yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün hələ də yer var.', 'bn': 'আমরা সেম্পেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেলিং এর জন্য একটি নতুন গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল পরিচালনা করেছি যা শিল্পের অবস্থাকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিশ্লেষণের সাথে বিস্তার আমরা একটি গভীর হাইওয়েতে বিএলস্টিমের কাঠামো ব্যবহার করি নিয়ন্ত্রণের সাথে নিষিদ্ধ করা হয়েছে, আর সাম্প্রতিক কিছু সেরা কাজের দেখা করছে প্ আমাদের ৮-টায়ের এনস্পেল মডেল থিকোএনএল ২০০৫ সালের পরীক্ষা সেটে ৮৩. ২ এফ১ পায় এবং কনএল ২০১২ সালে ৮৩. ৪ এফ১ প্রায় ১০% আত্মিক ত্রুটির সাথে পূর এই অর্জনের বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে (১) দীর্ঘ দূরবর্তী নির্ভর করার জন্য গভীর মডেলের চেয়ে বেশী ভালো কিন্তু এখনো বিস্ময়কর ভুল হতে পারে এবং (২) যে সিন্টাক', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden semanttisen roolimerkinnän (SRL) syväoppimisen mallin, joka parantaa merkittävästi tekniikan tasoa, sekä yksityiskohtaisia analyyseja sen vahvuuksien ja rajoitusten paljastamiseksi. Käytämme syvää BiLSTM-maantiearkkitehtuuria, jossa on rajoitettu dekoodaaminen, samalla kun noudatamme useita viimeisimpiä parhaita käytäntöjä alustamiseen ja laillistamiseen. 8-kerroksinen kokoonpanomalli saavuttaa 83,2 F1:n CoNLL 2005 -testisarjassa ja 83,4 F1:n CoNLL 2012 -testisarjassa, mikä tarkoittaa noin 10% suhteellista virhevähennystä edelliseen huippuunsa verrattuna. Laaja empiirinen analyysi näistä tuloksista osoittaa, että (1) syvämallit ovat erinomaisia pitkän matkan riippuvuuksien palauttamisessa, mutta voivat silti tehdä yllättävän ilmeisiä virheitä, ja (2) että syntaktisille parsereille on vielä tilaa parantaa näitä tuloksia.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nový model hlubokého učení pro sémantické označování rolí (SRL), který výrazně zlepšuje stav techniky, spolu s detailními analýzami odhalujícími jeho silné a omezení. Používáme hlubokou architekturu BiLSTM dálnice s omezeným dekódováním, přičemž dodržujeme řadu nedávných osvědčených postupů pro inicializaci a regularizaci. Náš 8-vrstvý souborový model dosahuje 83.2 F1 na testovací sadě CoNLL 2005 a 83.4 F1 na CoNLL 2012, zhruba o 10% relativní snížení chyb oproti předchozímu stavu techniky. Rozsáhlá empirická analýza těchto zisků ukazuje, že (1) hluboké modely vynikají v obnově dálkových závislostí, ale stále mohou dělat překvapivě zřejmé chyby, a (2) že stále existuje prostor pro syntaktické parsery pro zlepšení těchto výsledků.', 'et': 'Tutvustame uut sügavõppe mudelit semantilise rolli märgistamiseks (SRL), mis parandab oluliselt tehnika taset, koos detailsete analüüsidega, et paljastada selle tugevused ja piirangud. Kasutame piiratud dekodeerimisega sügavat BiLSTM maantee arhitektuuri, jälgides samas mitmeid hiljutisi parimaid tavasid initsialiseerimiseks ja regulariseerimiseks. Meie 8-kihiline ansambli mudel saavutab 83,2 F1 CoNLL 2005 testikomplektis ja 83,4 F1 CoNLL 2012, mis on umbes 10% suhtelise vea vähenemine võrreldes eelmise tehnika tasemega. Nende kasumite ulatuslik empiiriline analüüs näitab, et (1) sügavad mudelid on suurepärased pikamaa sõltuvuste taastamisel, kuid võivad siiski teha üllatavalt ilmseid vigu, ja (2) et süntaktilistel parseritel on veel ruumi nende tulemuste parandamiseks.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 ng챕w챕 챕ntuk model sing gawe nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe sistem semantar dumadhi (SSL) sing berarti bant챗r suaran챕 kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing dibenalk챕, lan didalakno sing ngerasakno ng챕w챕 nggawe geraran챕 s챗ng챕 awak dh챕w챕. Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk akeh bar챗ng-bar챗ng BiLTT karo nguasai decoding metin챗t, ngono nggawe barang penggunan sing dibenakake nggo nguasai karo perangkat sistem sing gak dh챕w챕. We 8-layer ensembedle model success AllProgressBar', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל למידה עמוקה חדש לתווית תפקידים סמנטיים (SRL) שמשתפר באופן משמעותי את מצב האמנות, יחד עם ניתוחים מפורטים כדי לחשוף את כוחותיו ומגבלותיו. אנו משתמשים בארכיטקטורת BiLSTM כביש כביש עמוק עם פיקוד מוגבל, בזמן שמציפים במספר תרגילים טובים לאחרונה לאתחילה ולקביל. מודל אנסמבל 8 שכבות שלנו משיג 83.2 F1 על קבוצת הבדיקות CoNLL 2005 ו 83.4 F1 על CoNLL 2012, בערך 10% שינוי שגיאות יחסית על מצב האמנות הקודם. ניתוח אמפירית רחב של הרווחים האלה מראה כי (1) דוגמנים עמוקים מצליחים לשחזר תלויות במרחק ארוך אבל עדיין יכולים לעשות טעויות ברורות באופן מפתיע, ו (2) שעדיין יש מקום עבור חוקרי סינטקטיקה לשפר את התוצאות הללו.', 'ha': "Tuna introdutar da wata shekara mai ƙidãya wa muhimmin aikin na semantic (SRL) wanda ke ƙarfafa halin sanar da shi mai girma, da kuma an sami, fassarar da fassarar da fassararsa dõmin ya bayyana ƙarfinsa da sararin. Tuna yi amfani da matsakan bayani na BiLStM da an ƙudura kodi, alhãli kuwa munã ganin wasu masu kyakkyawan aikin kwanan farko wa fara-fara da ruɓanci. Shirin tudun 8 ya sãmu 83.2 F1 a kan jarrabar 2005 da 83.4 F1 a CoNLL 2012, taki 10% na dangantar ɓarnar da ya danganta a kan halin da ya gaba. Ana ƙidãya mai amfani da wannan fanati na nuna (1) misãlai masu ƙaranci sun fi fi girma a sami da za'a sami masu dõgara ga wuri mai nĩsa, kuma yana iya iya ƙidãya karkacin bayani, kuma (2) cẽwa there are bada wani wuri wa parsarki na samuraci dõmin su kyautata matsalatan.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov model globokega učenja za semantično označevanje vlog (SRL), ki bistveno izboljšuje stanje tehnike, skupaj s podrobnimi analizami, ki razkrivajo njegove prednosti in omejitve. Uporabljamo globoko avtocestno arhitekturo BiLSTM z omejenim dekodiranjem, hkrati pa upoštevamo številne najnovejše najboljše prakse za inicializacijo in regularizacijo. Naš 8-slojni model ansambla doseže 83,2 F1 na testnem kompletu CoNLL 2005 in 83,4 F1 na CoNLL 2012, kar pomeni približno 10% relativno zmanjšanje napak v primerjavi s prejšnjim stanjem tehnike. Obsežna empirična analiza teh dobičkov kaže, da (1) globoki modeli odlično obnavljajo odvisnosti na dolge razdalje, vendar lahko še vedno naredijo presenetljivo očitne napake, in (2) da je še vedno prostora za sintaktični razčlenjevalci za izboljšanje teh rezultatov.', 'bo': 'We introduce a new deep learning model for semantic role labeling (SRL) that significantly improves the state of the art, along with detailed analyses to reveal its strengths and limitations. With detailed analyses to reveal its strengths and limitations, we introduce a new deep learning model for semantic role labeling (SRL) We use a deep highway BiLSTM architecture with constrained decoding, while observing a number of recent best practices for initialization and regularization. ང་ཚོའི་བང་རིམ་ལྡན་རྣམ་པ་གྱིས་83.2 F1 སྐོར་ཡོད།CoNLL 2005་བརྟག་ཞིབ་སྒྲིག་པ་དང་། CoNLL 2012་ལུ་ 83.4 F1 སྒྲིག་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ Extensive empirical analysis of these gains show that (1) deep models excel at recovering long-distance dependencies but can still make surprisingly obvious errors, and (2) that there is still room for syntactic parsers to improve these results.'}
{'en': 'Towards End-to-End Reinforcement Learning of Dialogue Agents for Information Access', 'ar': 'نحو التعلم التعزيزي الشامل لوكلاء الحوار للوصول إلى المعلومات', 'pt': 'Em direção ao aprendizado de reforço de ponta a ponta dos agentes de diálogo para acesso à informação', 'es': 'Hacia un aprendizaje de refuerzo integral de los agentes de diálogo para el acceso a', 'fr': "Vers un apprentissage renforcé de bout en bout des agents de dialogue pour l'accès à l'information", 'ja': '情報アクセスのための対話エージェントのエンドツーエンドの強化学習に向けて', 'hi': 'सूचना पहुँच के लिए संवाद एजेंटों के एंड-टू-एंड सुदृढीकरण सीखने की ओर', 'zh': '向语摄端到端强学,以获取信息', 'ru': 'На пути к всестороннему обучению участников диалога методам доступа к информации', 'ga': 'I dtreo Neartú Deireadh go Deireadh Foghlaim Gníomhairí Idirphlé maidir le Rochtain Faisnéise', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის მისამართებისთვის დიალოგის ადვნენტების სწავლების დასრულება', 'hu': 'Az információhoz való hozzáféréshez szükséges párbeszédügynökök tanulásának megerősítése felé', 'el': 'Προς την ολοκλήρωση της ενίσχυσης Μάθηση των παραγόντων διαλόγου για την πρόσβαση στις πληροφορίες', 'mk': 'Напред кон крајот на зајакнувањето на учењето на агентите за дијалог за пристап до информации', 'it': "Verso l'apprendimento completo degli agenti di dialogo per l'accesso alle informazioni", 'lt': 'Prieigos prie informacijos dialogo agentų mokymosi stiprinimas', 'kk': 'Мәлімет қатынау үшін диалог агенттерін оқыту', 'ms': 'Ke arah Pengesahan Pengesahan Akhir-Akhir Pelajaran Agen Dialog untuk Akses Maklumat', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്മതിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് ഏജന്റുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Towards End-to-End Reinforcement Learning of Dialogue Agents for Information Access', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн нэвтрүүлэх диалог агентуудын суралцах хөгжлийн төгсгөлд', 'no': 'Til slutt til slutt- størring av læring av dialogagentar for tilgang til informasjon', 'pl': 'W kierunku kompleksowego wzmacniania uczenia się agentów dialogu na rzecz dostępu do informacji', 'ro': 'Către consolidarea continuă a învățării agenților de dialog pentru accesul la informații', 'sr': 'Do kraja do kraja pojačanja učenja agenata dijaloga za pristup informacijama', 'so': 'Towards-to-End Reinforcement Learning of Dialog Agents for Information Access', 'sv': 'På väg mot en heltäckande förstärkning av dialogagenternas lärande för informationstillgång', 'ta': 'தகவல் அணுகலுக்கான உரையாடல் மேல் முடிவுக்கு முடிவு', 'si': 'තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා සංවාදය නියෝජිත සංවාදය අවස්ථාවක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ur': 'انڈیلوگ اگنٹ کے لئے انڈیلوگ اگنٹوں کی سیکھنے کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới kết thúc thúc tăng cường học vấn đối thoại mật vụ truy cập thông tin', 'bg': 'Към цялостно укрепване на обучението на агентите в диалога за достъп до информация', 'hr': 'Prema učenju agenata dijaloga za pristup informacijama do kraja pojačanja', 'nl': 'Naar end-to-end versterking Leren van dialoogagenten voor toegang tot informatie', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu umfassender Verstärkung Lernen von Dialogagenten für den Informationszugang', 'da': 'På vej mod end-to-end styrkelse af dialogagenternes læring med henblik på adgang til oplysninger', 'ko': '단말기부터 단말기까지의 정보 접근 대화 에이전트 강화 학습', 'id': 'Ke arah Penyelesaian Penuh-ke-Akhir Belajar Agen Dialog untuk Akses Informasi', 'fa': 'به سمت استوار یادگیری از ماموران گفتگو برای دسترسی اطلاعات', 'sw': 'Kufikia Kupitia Mafuriko ya Kumaliza Kujifunza Mitandao ya Ujadala wa Habari', 'af': 'Gaan na Einde- na- einde Versterking Leer van Dialoog Agente vir Informasie Toegang', 'tr': 'Malümat Girişi üçin Dialog Ajänçileriniň Koplemegini Köwrenmesi', 'sq': 'Për përforcimin nga fundi në fund të mësimit të agjentëve të dialogut për aksesin e informacionit', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Malümatı İşləmək üçün Dialoog Ajanlarının Öyrənməsini son-to-end-to-end-reinforcement Öyrənməsinə tərəf', 'hy': 'Ինֆորմացիայի հասանելիության միջոցների դասախոսության վերջ-վերջ ուժեղացման ուղղությամբ', 'bn': 'তথ্য প্রবেশের জন্য ডায়ালগ এজেন্টের শিক্ষা পুনরায় শেখা', 'bs': 'Prema učenju agenata dijaloga za pristup informacijama do kraja pojačanja', 'ca': "Vers el reforç de l'aprenentatge d'agents de diàleg per a l'accés a la informació", 'et': 'Dialoogi vahendajate teabele juurdepääsu tagamiseks täieliku tugevdamise suunas', 'cs': 'Směrem k komplexnímu posílení učení agentů dialogu pro přístup k informacím', 'fi': 'Vuoropuhelun toimijoiden tiedonsaantia koskeva oppiminen kokonaisvaltaisesti', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'K celovitemu učenju agentov za dialog za dostop do informacij', 'bo': 'མཇུག་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ཞབས་ཞུ་བ་ཀློག་ནུས', 'jv': 'Fin-to-End', 'he': 'לכיוון גיבוי של סוכני דיאלוג לגישה למידע'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes KB-InfoBot-a multi-turn dialogue agent which helps users search Knowledge Bases (KBs) without composing complicated queries. Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge. Previous systems achieved this by issuing a symbolic query to the KB to retrieve entries based on their attributes. However, such symbolic operations break the differentiability of the system and prevent end-to-end training of neural dialogue agents. In this paper, we address this limitation by replacing symbolic queries with an induced soft posterior distribution over the KB that indicates which entities the user is interested in. Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users. We also present a fully neural end-to-end agent, trained entirely from user feedback, and discuss its application towards personalized dialogue agents.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة KB-InfoBot - وكيل حوار متعدد الأدوار يساعد المستخدمين على البحث في قواعد المعرفة (KBs) دون كتابة استفسارات معقدة. يحتاج وكلاء الحوار الموجه نحو الهدف عادةً إلى التفاعل مع قاعدة بيانات خارجية للوصول إلى المعرفة الواقعية. حققت الأنظمة السابقة ذلك من خلال إصدار استعلام رمزي إلى قاعدة المعارف لاسترداد الإدخالات بناءً على سماتها. ومع ذلك ، فإن مثل هذه العمليات الرمزية تكسر تمايز النظام وتمنع التدريب الشامل لوكلاء الحوار العصبي. في هذه الورقة ، نعالج هذا القيد من خلال استبدال الاستعلامات الرمزية بتوزيع لاحق "ناعم" مستحث على قاعدة المعارف التي تشير إلى الكيانات التي يهتم بها المستخدم. يؤدي دمج عملية الاسترجاع الناعمة مع المتعلم المعزز إلى ارتفاع معدل نجاح المهمة والمكافأة في كل من عمليات المحاكاة وضد المستخدمين الحقيقيين. نقدم أيضًا وكيلًا شاملًا عصبيًا بالكامل ، تم تدريبه بالكامل من ملاحظات المستخدم ، ومناقشة تطبيقه تجاه وكلاء الحوار المخصص.', 'fr': "Cet article propose KB-Infobot, un agent de dialogue multi-tours qui aide les utilisateurs à effectuer des recherches dans les bases de connaissances (KB) sans rédiger de requêtes compliquées. Ces agents de dialogue orientés vers des objectifs doivent généralement interagir avec une base de données externe pour accéder à des connaissances du monde réel. Les systèmes précédents y parvenaient en envoyant une requête symbolique à la base de connaissances pour récupérer les entrées en fonction de leurs attributs. Cependant, de telles opérations symboliques cassent la différenciabilité du système et empêchent l'entraînement de bout en bout des agents de dialogue neuronal. Dans cet article, nous abordons cette limitation en remplaçant les requêtes symboliques par une distribution postérieure «\xa0souple\xa0» induite sur la base de connaissances qui indique les entités qui intéressent l'utilisateur. L'intégration du processus de récupération souple avec un apprenant renforcé permet d'augmenter le taux de réussite et la récompense des tâches, à la fois dans les simulations et par rapport aux utilisateurs réels. Nous présentons également un agent de bout en bout entièrement neuronal, entièrement formé à partir des commentaires des utilisateurs, et discutons de son application aux agents de dialogue personnalisés.", 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe o KB-InfoBot - um agente de diálogo multi-turno que ajuda os usuários a pesquisar Bases de Conhecimento (KBs) sem compor consultas complicadas. Esses agentes de diálogo orientados a objetivos geralmente precisam interagir com um banco de dados externo para acessar o conhecimento do mundo real. Os sistemas anteriores conseguiram isso emitindo uma consulta simbólica ao KB para recuperar entradas com base em seus atributos. No entanto, tais operações simbólicas quebram a diferenciabilidade do sistema e impedem o treinamento fim-a-fim dos agentes de diálogo neural. Neste artigo, abordamos essa limitação substituindo consultas simbólicas por uma distribuição posterior “soft” induzida sobre o KB que indica em quais entidades o usuário está interessado. em ambas as simulações e contra usuários reais. Também apresentamos um agente de ponta a ponta totalmente neural, treinado inteiramente a partir do feedback do usuário, e discutimos sua aplicação para agentes de diálogo personalizados.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone KB-Infobot, un agente de diálogo multi-turno que ayuda a los usuarios a buscar en las bases de conocimientos (KB) sin redactar consultas complicadas. Estos agentes de diálogo orientados a objetivos normalmente necesitan interactuar con una base de datos externa para acceder al conocimiento del mundo real. Los sistemas anteriores lo lograban mediante la emisión de una consulta simbólica a la KB para recuperar entradas en función de sus atributos. Sin embargo, estas operaciones simbólicas rompen la diferenciabilidad del sistema e impiden el entrenamiento de principio a fin de los agentes de diálogo neuronal. En este artículo, abordamos esta limitación sustituyendo las consultas simbólicas por una distribución posterior «suave» inducida sobre la base de conocimientos que indica en qué entidades está interesado el usuario. La integración del proceso de recuperación suave con un alumno de refuerzo conduce a una mayor tasa de éxito de las tareas y a una mayor recompensa tanto en las simulaciones como en contra de los usuarios reales. También presentamos un agente de extremo a extremo totalmente neuronal, entrenado completamente a partir de los comentarios de los usuarios, y discutimos su aplicación a los agentes de diálogo personalizados.', 'ja': 'KB - InfoBotは、複雑なクエリを作成せずにナレッジベース（ KB ）を検索するのに役立つマルチターンダイアログエージェントです。 このような目標指向の対話エージェントは、通常、現実の知識にアクセスするために外部データベースとやり取りする必要があります。 以前のシステムは、KBにシンボリッククエリを発行して、その属性に基づいてエントリを取得することによってこれを達成しました。 しかしながら、そのような象徴的な動作は、システムの微分可能性を破り、神経対話剤のエンドツーエンドの訓練を防止する。 本稿では、シンボリッククエリを、ユーザーが関心を持つエンティティを示すKB上の誘導された「ソフト」後方分布に置き換えることで、この制限に対処する。 ソフト検索プロセスを強化学習者と統合することは、シミュレーションと実際のユーザーの両方において、より高いタスク成功率と報酬につながります。 また、完全なニューラルエンドツーエンドのエージェントを提示し、ユーザーのフィードバックからトレーニングを受け、パーソナライズされた対話エージェントへの適用について説明します。', 'zh': '本文发KB-InfoBot-一种多番次对话代摄,可助用户搜索知识库(KB),而无编次杂问。 此面向目标言摄常须与外数据库交接乃能访世。 前统问知识库以属性检索条目。 然此符操作破统之可微性,而止神经对话摄端之端。 本文以符号询代 KB 软后验分布以决之,当分布指示用户感其实体。 软检索学器成,拟用户成功率奖。 又言全神经化之端,一以用户反馈教之,而论其个性化言摄之用。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर KB-InfoBot का प्रस्ताव करता है - एक बहु-बारी संवाद एजेंट जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को जटिल प्रश्नों की रचना के बिना नॉलेज बेस (KBs) खोजने में मदद करता है। इस तरह के लक्ष्य-उन्मुख संवाद एजेंटों को आमतौर पर वास्तविक दुनिया के ज्ञान तक पहुंचने के लिए बाहरी डेटाबेस के साथ बातचीत करने की आवश्यकता होती है। पिछले सिस्टम ने अपनी विशेषताओं के आधार पर प्रविष्टियों को प्राप्त करने के लिए KB को एक प्रतीकात्मक क्वेरी जारी करके इसे प्राप्त किया। हालांकि, इस तरह के प्रतीकात्मक संचालन प्रणाली की भिन्नता को तोड़ते हैं और तंत्रिका संवाद एजेंटों के अंत-से-अंत प्रशिक्षण को रोकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम केबी पर एक प्रेरित "नरम" पश्च वितरण के साथ प्रतीकात्मक प्रश्नों को बदलकर इस सीमा को संबोधित करते हैं जो इंगित करता है कि उपयोगकर्ता किन संस्थाओं में रुचि रखता है। एक सुदृढीकरण शिक्षार्थी के साथ नरम पुनर्प्राप्ति प्रक्रिया को एकीकृत करने से सिमुलेशन और वास्तविक उपयोगकर्ताओं दोनों में उच्च कार्य सफलता दर और इनाम होता है। हम एक पूरी तरह से तंत्रिका अंत-से-अंत एजेंट भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिक्रिया से पूरी तरह से प्रशिक्षित होता है, और व्यक्तिगत संवाद एजेंटों की ओर इसके आवेदन पर चर्चा करता है।', 'ru': 'В данной статье предлагается KB-InfoBot - агент многооборотного диалога, который помогает пользователям искать базы знаний (БЗ) без создания сложных запросов. Такие целевые участники диалога, как правило, должны взаимодействовать с внешней базой данных для получения доступа к реальным знаниям. Предыдущие системы достигли этого, отправив символический запрос в KB для получения записей на основе их атрибутов. Однако такие символические операции нарушают дифференцируемость системы и препятствуют сквозному обучению агентов нейронного диалога. В этой статье мы рассматриваем это ограничение, заменяя символические запросы на индуцированное «мягкое» апостериорное распределение по КБ, которое указывает, какие сущности интересуют пользователя. Интеграция процесса мягкого поиска с обучающимся подкреплением приводит к более высокому уровню успешности задач и вознаграждению как в моделировании, так и против реальных пользователей. Мы также представляем полностью нейронный сквозной агент, обученный полностью на основе отзывов пользователей, и обсуждаем его применение к персонализированным агентам диалога.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo KB-InfoBot - gníomhaire comhphlé il-casadh a chuidíonn le húsáideoirí cuardach a dhéanamh ar Bhunáití Eolais (KBanna) gan ceisteanna casta a chumadh. Is gnách go mbíonn ar ghníomhairí comhphlé spriocdhírithe den sórt sin idirghníomhú le bunachar sonraí seachtrach chun rochtain a fháil ar eolas ón bhfíorshaol. Bhain córais roimhe seo é seo amach trí cheist siombalach a eisiúint don KB chun iontrálacha a aisghabháil bunaithe ar a dtréithe. Mar sin féin, briseann oibríochtaí siombalacha den sórt sin difreálacht an chórais agus cuireann siad cosc ar oiliúint deireadh le deireadh ar ghníomhairí néar-phlé. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an teorannú seo trí dháileadh posterior “bog” spreagtha thar an KB a chur in ionad fiosruithe siombalacha a thaispeánann cé na heintitis a bhfuil suim ag an úsáideoir iontu. Má dhéantar an próiseas bog aisghabhála le foghlaimeoir athneartaithe a chomhtháthú, beidh rath ar thasc níos airde agus luach saothair. sa dá insamhaltaí agus i gcoinne úsáideoirí fíor. Cuirimid i láthair freisin gníomhaire ceann-go-deireadh iomlán néarach, oilte go hiomlán ó aiseolas ó úsáideoirí, agus plé a dhéanamh ar a chur i bhfeidhm i leith gníomhairí comhphlé pearsantaithe.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει έναν παράγοντα διαλόγου πολλαπλών στροφών που βοηθά τους χρήστες να αναζητούν βάσεις γνώσεων χωρίς να συνθέτουν περίπλοκα ερωτήματα. Τέτοιοι στοχοθετημένοι παράγοντες διαλόγου συνήθως πρέπει να αλληλεπιδρούν με μια εξωτερική βάση δεδομένων για να έχουν πρόσβαση σε γνώσεις πραγματικού κόσμου. Τα προηγούμενα συστήματα το πέτυχαν αυτό με την έκδοση συμβολικού ερωτήματος στην ΚΒ για την ανάκτηση καταχωρήσεων με βάση τα χαρακτηριστικά τους. Ωστόσο, τέτοιες συμβολικές λειτουργίες διακόπτουν τη διαφοροποίηση του συστήματος και αποτρέπουν την πλήρη εκπαίδευση των παραγόντων νευρικού διαλόγου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτόν τον περιορισμό αντικαθιστώντας συμβολικά ερωτήματα με μια επαγόμενη "μαλακή" οπίσθια κατανομή στο ΚΒ που υποδεικνύει για ποιες οντότητες ενδιαφέρεται ο χρήστης. Η ενσωμάτωση της διαδικασίας μαλακής ανάκτησης με έναν εκπαιδευτή ενίσχυσης οδηγεί σε υψηλότερο ποσοστό επιτυχίας εργασίας και ανταμοιβής τόσο σε προσομοιώσεις όσο και σε βάρος πραγματικών χρηστών. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης έναν πλήρως νευρωνικό παράγοντα, εκπαιδευμένο εξ ολοκλήρου από τα σχόλια των χρηστών, και συζητάμε την εφαρμογή του σε εξατομικευμένους πράκτορες διαλόγου.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a KB-InfoBotot javasolja, amely egy többfordulós párbeszédügynök, amely segít a felhasználóknak a tudásbázisok (KBs) keresésében bonyolult lekérdezések készítése nélkül. Az ilyen célorientált párbeszédügynököknek általában egy külső adatbázissal kell interakcióba lépniük, hogy hozzáférjenek a valós tudáshoz. A korábbi rendszerek ezt úgy érték el, hogy szimbolikus lekérdezést bocsátottak ki a KB-nak, hogy a bejegyzéseket az attribútumok alapján lehívják. Az ilyen szimbolikus műveletek azonban megszakítják a rendszer megkülönböztethetőségét és megakadályozzák a neurális párbeszédanyagok végponttól végpontig képzését. Ebben a tanulmányban ezt a korlátozást azzal foglalkozunk, hogy a szimbolikus lekérdezéseket lecseréljük egy indukált "puha" hátsó eloszlással a KB-n, amely jelzi, hogy mely entitások iránt érdeklődik a felhasználó. A lágy visszakeresési folyamat integrálása a megerősítő tanulóval magasabb feladatsikerességi arányt és jutalmat eredményez mind a szimulációkban, mind a valós felhasználókkal szemben. Bemutatunk egy teljesen neurális end-to-end ügynököt is, amely teljes mértékben felhasználói visszajelzésekből képzett, és megvitatjuk annak alkalmazását a személyre szabott párbeszédügynökök felé.', 'ka': "Name ასეთი მიზეზების განსაზღვრებული დიალოგის ადვნენტები, როგორც ტიპულად, უნდა გამოყენება გარეშე ბაზეზის დანაწილებით, რომ მიღება რეალური მსოფლიო პირველი სისტემები იქნება ამ სიმბოლოგიური კითხვა KB-ზე, რომ მისი ატრიბუტების ბაზედ ჩემი წიგების მიღება. მაგრამ, ასეთი სიმბოლოგიური პერაციები სისტემის განსხვავებულობას გადაწყვეტის და გადაწყვეტის ნეიროლური დიალოგის ადვნენტების განსხვავებას. ჩვენ ამ წერტილის შესაძლებელად ამ შესაძლებელობის შეცვლით სიმბოლოგიური კითხვების შეცვლით, რომელიც KB-ის შესაძლებელად 'მარტივი' მოსტერიო გაყოფილი, რომელსაც მომხმარებელი ინტერეს სწავლებელი უფრო მეტად მიღებული პროცესის ინტერგურაცია, რომელიც უფრო მეტად მიღებს სამუშაო სიმულაციაში და რეალურ მომხმარებისთვის. ჩვენ ასევე უბრალოდ ნეიროლური დასრულებული ადვნენტი, რომელიც ყველაფერად მომხმარებელი გადასრულებული გამოყენებაზე და დავუბრუნეთ მისი პროგრამის პორციალური დიალ", 'it': "Questo articolo propone KB-InfoBot - un agente di dialogo multi-turno che aiuta gli utenti a cercare Knowledge Base (KBs) senza comporre query complicate. Tali agenti di dialogo orientati agli obiettivi devono tipicamente interagire con un database esterno per accedere alla conoscenza del mondo reale. I sistemi precedenti hanno ottenuto questo risultato inviando una query simbolica alla KB per recuperare le voci in base ai loro attributi. Tuttavia, tali operazioni simboliche rompono la differenziabilità del sistema e impediscono l'addestramento end-to-end degli agenti di dialogo neurale. In questo articolo, affrontiamo questa limitazione sostituendo le query simboliche con una distribuzione posteriore 'soft' indotta sulla KB che indica quali entità l'utente è interessato. L'integrazione del processo di recupero morbido con uno studente di rinforzo porta a un tasso di successo e ricompense più elevato sia nelle simulazioni che contro gli utenti reali. Presentiamo anche un agente end-to-end completamente neurale, formato interamente dal feedback degli utenti, e discutiamo la sua applicazione verso agenti di dialogo personalizzati.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas KB- InfoBot - daugiasluoksnis dialogo agentas, kuris padeda naudotojams ieškoti žinių bazių (KB) nesukuriant sudėtingų klausimų. Tokie į tikslus orientuoti dialogo agentai paprastai turi sąveikauti su išorine duomenų baze, kad galėtų naudotis realiomis žiniomis. Ankstesnės sistemos tai pasiekė pateikdamos simbolinį klausimą KB, kad būtų gaunami įrašai, pagrįsti jų požymiais. Tačiau tokios simbolinės operacijos pažeidžia sistemos diferencijavimą ir užkerta kelią neuralinio dialogo veiksnių mokymui nuo pabaigos. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame šį apribojimą pakeičiant simbolinius klausimus sukeltu "minkštu" galiniu pasiskirstymu per KB, kuris rodo, kuriems subjektams vartotojas yra suinteresuotas. Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users.  Mes taip pat pristatome visiškai nervinį tarpusavio veiksnį, visiškai apmokytą iš vartotojų atsiliepimų, ir aptariame jo taikymą individualiems dialogo veiksniams.', 'ms': "Kertas ini melamar KB- InfoBot - ejen dialog berbilang pusingan yang membantu pengguna mencari Pangkalan Pengetahuan (KBs) tanpa mengkomposisi pertanyaan rumit. Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge.  Sistem terdahulu mencapai ini dengan mengeluarkan pertanyaan simbolik ke KB untuk mendapatkan masukan berdasarkan atribut mereka. Namun, operasi simbolik seperti ini memecahkan perbezaan sistem dan mencegah latihan akhir-akhir ejen dialog saraf. Dalam kertas ini, kita alami keterangan ini dengan menggantikan pertanyaan simbolik dengan distribusi belakang 'lembut' yang disebabkan atas KB yang menunjukkan entiti mana pengguna berminat. Menyempurnakan proses pemulihan lembut dengan pembelajar kuasa mengarah kepada kadar kesuksesan tugas yang lebih tinggi dan hadiah dalam kedua-dua simulasi dan terhadap pengguna sebenar. Kami juga memperkenalkan ejen akhir-akhir saraf sepenuhnya, dilatih sepenuhnya dari maklum pengguna, dan membincangkan aplikasinya kepada ejen dialog pribadi.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз KB- InfoBot - көпшілік аудару диалог агентін ұсынады. Бұл пайдаланушылардың білім негізін (Кб) іздеу көмегімен көпшілікті сұрақтарды құрамайды. Бұл мақсат бағытталған диалог агенттері әдетте шын әлемдегі білімдерге қатынау үшін сыртқы деректер қорымен байланысу керек. Алдыңғы жүйелер бұл параметрлерді атрибуттарына негізделген жазуларды алу үшін КБ- ге символдық сұраныс шығару арқылы жеткізді. Бірақ бұл символдық операциялар жүйеңіздің айырмашылығын бұғаттап, невралдық диалог агенттерінің аяқталуын бұғаттайды. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл шектеулерді, пайдаланушының қайсы нысандарына көмектесетін 'жабысқа' деген келесі KB- ден алмастырып, символдық сұрауларды алмастырамыз. Бағдарламалы қабылдау процесін көмектесу оқытушысы көмектесетін оқытушымен бірге тапсырмалардың сәттілігін және симуляциялардың, және шын пайдаланушыларға қарсы жоғары кө Сонымен қатар, пайдаланушылардың қайталануынан толық оқылған невралдық соңындағы агентті таңдап, оның қолданбасын өзгертілген диалог агенттеріне ауыстырып тұрмыз.", 'mk': 'Овој документ предложува KB- InfoBot - агент за дијалог со повеќе свртувања кој им помага на корисниците да бараат бази на знаење (KBs) без композирање комплицирани прашања. Таквите агенти на дијалог ориентирани кон целите обично мора да интерактираат со надворешна база на податоци за пристап до знаење во реалниот свет. Претходните системи го постигнаа ова со издавање симболично прашање на КБ за да се добијат записи базирани на нивните атрибути. Сепак, ваквите симболични операции ја прекршуваат разликата на системот и го спречуваат обуката од крај до крај на агентите на нервниот дијалог. Во овој документ, го решаваме ова ограничување заменувајќи ги симболичките прашања со индуцирана „мека“ задна дистрибуција над КБ која покажува во кои ентитети е заинтересиран корисникот. Интегрирањето на мекиот процес на преземање со ученикот за зајакнување води до повисока стапка на успех на задачите и награда во симулациите и против вистинските корисници. Ние, исто така, претставуваме целосен нервен агент од крај до крај, обучен целосно од кориснички реакции, и дискутираме за неговата апликација кон персонализирани агенти на дијалог.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi KB-InfoBot - a ġent ta’ djalogu b’diversi dawriet li jgħin lill-utenti jfittxu l-Bażijiet tal-Għarfien (KBs) mingħajr ma jikkomponu mistoqsijiet ikkumplikati. Dawn l-aġenti tad-djalogu orjentati lejn l-għanijiet tipikament jeħtieġu li jinteraġixxu ma’ bażi ta’ dejta esterna biex jaċċessaw l-għarfien fid-dinja reali. Is-sistemi preċedenti kisbu dan billi ħarġu mistoqsija simbolika lill-KB biex jiksbu entrati bbażati fuq l-attributi tagħhom. Madankollu, operazzjonijiet simboliċi bħal dawn jiksru d-differenzjabbiltà tas-sistema u jipprevjenu t-taħriġ minn tarf għal tarf ta’ aġenti tad-djalogu newrali. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw din il-limitazzjoni billi nissostitwixxu mistoqsijiet simboliċi b’distribuzzjoni posterjuri ‘soft’ indotta fuq il-KB li tindika liema entitajiet l-utent huwa interessat fihom. L-integrazzjoni tal-proċess ta’ rkupru dgħajjef ma’ student ta’ rinfurzar twassal għal rata ogħla ta’ suċċess u premju tal-kompiti kemm fis-simulazzjonijiet kif ukoll kontra l-utenti reali. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll a ġent kompletament newrali minn tarf sa tarf, imħarreġ kompletament mill-feedback tal-utent, u niddiskutu l-applikazzjoni tiegħu lejn aġenti ta’ djalogu personalizzat.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കെബി- വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d തെരയുന്നതി ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്കുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി ഒരു പുറത്തുള്ള ഡാറ്റാബേസുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടേണ്ടതാണ്. യഥാര്\u200d @ info എങ്കിലും ഇത്തരം ചിഹ്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസവും തകര്\u200dക്കുകയും ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ഏജന്\u200dറുകളു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന് താല്പര്യമുണ്ടെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോക്താവിന് ആരാണ് താല്പര്യമുള്ളതെന്ന് കെബിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പ Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users.  പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു പുരുഷന്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറിനെയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ ഫിഡിബാക്കില്\u200d ന', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас KB-InfoBot - олон эргэлтэй диалог агентын санал болгодог. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид мэдлэг суурь (КБ) ийг хайх боломжгүй олон эргэлтэй диалог агент. Ийм зорилготой диалог агентууд ерөнхийдөө бодит ертөнцийн мэдлэгтэй хүрэх боломжтой гадаад өгөгдлийн сан дээр харилцах хэрэгтэй. Өмнөх системүүд үүнийг KB-д символ квери өгөхөд тэдний атрибутын үндсэн орнуудыг авах гэсэн юм. Гэвч ийм тодорхой үйл ажиллагаа системийн өөрчлөлтийг бууруулж, мэдрэлийн диалог агентуудын төгсгөлд суралцах боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэхүү хязгаарыг КБ-ийн хамгийн сонирхолтой хэрэглэгчдийн ямар нэгж сонирхолтой вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бага зэрэг хүлээж авах процессийг багтаах сурагчид нь ажлын амжилтын хувьд өндөр болон шагналыг шинжлэх ухаан болон жинхэнэ хэрэглэгчидтэй холбоотой. Мөн бид хэрэглэгчдийн хариултаас бүрэн сургалтын мэдрэлийн төгсгөл сэтгэл хөтөлбөрийн агентийг илтгэдэг. Мөн өөрийн хэрэглэгчдийн хариултаар ажиллаж, хувийн диалог агентуудын туха', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano KB-InfoBot, wielokrotny agent dialogowy, który pomaga użytkownikom wyszukiwać bazy wiedzy (KBs) bez tworzenia skomplikowanych zapytań. Takie zorientowane na cel agenci dialogu zazwyczaj muszą współdziałać z zewnętrzną bazą danych, aby uzyskać dostęp do wiedzy rzeczywistej. Poprzednie systemy osiągnęły to poprzez wydanie symbolicznego zapytania do KB w celu pobierania wpisów na podstawie ich atrybutów. Jednak takie operacje symboliczne łamią różnicowalność systemu i uniemożliwiają kompleksowe szkolenie agentów dialogu neuronowego. W artykule zajmujemy się tym ograniczeniem poprzez zastąpienie zapytań symbolicznych indukowanym "miękkim" tylnym rozkładem nad KB, który wskazuje, jakimi podmiotami jest zainteresowany użytkownik. Integracja procesu miękkiego odzyskiwania z uczniem wzmacniającym prowadzi do wyższego wskaźnika sukcesu zadania i nagrody zarówno w symulacjach, jak i wobec rzeczywistych użytkowników. Prezentujemy również w pełni neuronowego agenta end-to-end, przeszkolonego w całości na podstawie opinii użytkowników, oraz omawiamy jego zastosowanie w kierunku spersonalizowanych agentów dialogowych.', 'no': 'Name Desse målsorienterte dialogagentar treng vanlegvis interaksjon med ein ekstern database for å få tilgang til verkeleg kunnskap. Førre systemer oppnådd dette ved å senda ein symbolsk spørjing til KB for å henta oppføringar basert på attributtane sine. Desse symbolske operasjonane bryter imidlertid forskjelligheten av systemet og forebyr uttrykking av neiraldialogagentar til slutt til slutt. I denne papiret adresserer vi denne avgrensinga ved å byta ut symbolske spørjingar med ein indusert « soft » posterior- distribusjon over KB som viser kva eininga brukaren er interessert i. Integrering av måk hentingsprosessen med ein forstørringsforslærar fører til høgare oppgåvesuksess og rekning i både simulasjonar og mot faktiske brukarar. Vi presenterer også ein fullstendig neuralt sluttagent, trent fullstendig frå tilbakemelding av brukarar, og diskuterer programmet til personaliserte dialogagentar.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune KB-InfoBot - un agent de dialog multi-turn care ajută utilizatorii să caute baze de cunoștințe (KBs) fără a compune interogări complicate. Astfel de agenți de dialog orientați spre obiective trebuie, de obicei, să interacționeze cu o bază de date externă pentru a accesa cunoștințele din lumea reală. Sistemele anterioare au realizat acest lucru prin emiterea unei interogări simbolice către KB pentru a recupera intrările bazate pe atributele lor. Cu toate acestea, astfel de operațiuni simbolice rup diferențialitatea sistemului și previn formarea end-to-end a agenților de dialog neural. În această lucrare, abordăm această limită prin înlocuirea interogărilor simbolice cu o distribuție posterioară indusă "moale" peste KB care indică entitățile de care este interesat utilizatorul. Integrarea procesului de recuperare soft cu un elev de armare duce la o rată mai mare de succes a sarcinilor și recompense atât în simulări, cât și în fața utilizatorilor reali. De asemenea, prezentăm un agent complet neural end-to-end, instruit în întregime pe baza feedback-ului utilizatorilor și discutăm aplicarea acestuia către agenții de dialog personalizați.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår KB-InfoBot - en dialogagent med flera varv som hjälper användare att söka i kunskapsdatabaser (KBs) utan att komponera komplicerade frågor. Sådana målinriktade dialogagenter behöver vanligtvis interagera med en extern databas för att få tillgång till verklig kunskap. Tidigare system uppnådde detta genom att utfärda en symbolisk fråga till KB för att hämta poster baserat på deras attribut. Sådana symboliska operationer bryter emellertid systemets differentierbarhet och förhindrar end-to-end träning av neurala dialogagenter. I denna uppsats behandlar vi denna begränsning genom att ersätta symboliska frågor med en inducerad "mjuk" bakre fördelning över KB som indikerar vilka entiteter användaren är intresserad av. Att integrera den mjuka hämtningsprocessen med en förstärkningselev leder till högre framgångsgrad och belöning i både simuleringar och mot verkliga användare. Vi presenterar också en helt neural end-to-end agent, utbildad helt från användarfeedback, och diskuterar dess tillämpning mot personliga dialogagenter.', 'so': "Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu ka soo jeedaa KB-InfoBot - dhaqaale dialog oo kala duduwan, kaas oo caawinaya isticmaalayaasha basaaska aqoonta (KBs) iyadoon sameyn su'aalo complicsan. Qoraalka diyaarinta ee la jeedo waxay u baahan yihiin inay la xiriiraan basaaska macluumaadka dibadda ah si ay u helo aqoonta runta ah ee adduunka. Tirtii hore ayaa soo gaadhay iyadoo lagu soo dirayo warqad calaamad ah KB in lagu soo celiyo soo galitaankooda gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee hawlahaas sawir ah waxay burburiyaan kala duwanaanshaha nidaamka iyo ka hortagga waxbarashada dhammaadka ee dawlada bulshada. Warqadan, waxaynu ku sheekaynaa nidaamkan, si aan looga beddelo warqadaha sawir ah, waxaana lagu qaybsanayaa qaybsiga ka horeeya 'soft' kadibna ku qoran KB, kaas oo muuqanaya qofka isticmaalaha uu xiiseynayo. Isku qabsashada baaritaanka qabsashada saxda ah iyo barashada kordhiska ayaa ku socda badnaanta shaqada iyo abaalmarinta sawirada iyo isticmaalayaasha runta ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa dhakhtarka ugu dhammaadka neuro-ku-dhamaadka, si buuxda ah ayaannu uga tababarinnay feedback a isticmaalaha, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa codsigiisa xagga dhakhtarka dialogue gaarka ah.", 'ta': "@ info இத்தகைய இலக்கு- சார்ந்த உரையாடல் முகவர்கள் வழக்கமாக ஒரு வெளி தரவுத்தளத்தில் இணைக்க வேண்டும் உண்மையான- உலக அறிவை அண @ info எனினும், இத்தகைய குறியீட்டு செயல்பாடுகள் கணினியின் வேறுபாட்டை முறித்து புதிய உரையாடல் செயல்பாடுகளின் முடிவு  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் குறியீட்டு கேள்விகளை மாற்றுவதற்கு கேபிக்கு மேலே மென்னு' பின்னோரியர் பங்கீட்டிற்கு மேல் மாற்றுவதால்  Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users.  நாம் முழுமையான புதிய முடிவு முடிவு முதல் முகவர், பயிற்சி முழுவதும் பயிற்சி செய்து, தனிப்பட்ட உரையாடல் முகவர்களுக்கு அரட", 'sr': "Ovaj papir predlaže KB- InfoBot - agent dijaloga koji pomaže korisnicima da pretražuju bazu znanja (KB) bez komplikovanih pitanja. Takvi agenti za cilj orientirani dijalog obično moraju interakciju s vanjskim bazama podataka kako bi pristupili znanju stvarnog sveta. Prethodni sistemi su to postigli izdavanjem simboličkog pitanja KB-u da bi dobili ulazak na temelju njihovih atributa. Međutim, takve simboličke operacije prekidaju diferencijalnost sistema i sprječavaju trening neuralnih agenata dijaloga do kraja. U ovom papiru, mi obraćamo ovu ograničenje zamjenom simboličkih ispitivanja sa indukovanom 'mekom' poslednjem distribucijom preko KB-a koja ukazuje na koje entitate korisnik interesuje. Integracija mekog procesa povlačenja učenikom pojačanja vodi do višeg stopa uspeha zadataka i nagrade u simulaciji i protiv pravih korisnika. Također predstavljamo potpuno neuralni agent do kraja, obučen potpuno od povratka korisnika, i razgovaramo o njenoj aplikaciji prema osobnim dijalogskim agentima.", 'si': "Name මෙච්චර අරමුණ සංවාදය නියෝජිතයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පසුගින් පද්ධතිය මේක KB වලට සංකේතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාවට අධිරූපයෙන් ඇතුළු නමුත්, ඒ වගේම සංකේතික ක්\u200dරියාපණය පද්ධතියේ වෙනස් විදියට අවසානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම න්\u200dයූරාල සංවාද නියෝ මේ පත්තරේ අපි මේ සීමාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සංකේතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් KB වල සිද්ධිත 'සොෆ්ට්' පොස්ටරියර් විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනව සම්බන්ධ පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වැඩි වැඩේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ ඇත්ත ප්\u200dර අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම අවසාන නියෝජිතයක් පෙන්වන්න, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙන් පිළිගත්", 'ur': 'This paper proposes KB- Infobot - a multi turn dialog agent that helps users search Knowledge Bases (KBs) without composing complicated queries. اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح پہلے سیسٹم نے اس کو کیب کے لئے ایک سیمبولیکی کیوری کے ذریعہ پہنچایا کہ ان کے اثرات پر بنیاد آنے کے لئے وارد حاصل کریں. However, such symbolic operations break the differentiability of the system and prevent end-to-end training of neural dialog agents. اس کاغذ میں ہم اس محدودیت کو تبدیل کریں گے کہ اس کے ذریعہ کس چیزوں کو استعمال کرنے والا علاقہ رکھتا ہے۔ نرم پھیرنے کے پرسس کی تدریج کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے والی تعلیم کے ساتھ بہت بڑے کام کے کامیابی رقم اور ثواب دونوں سیمولٹیوں میں اور حقیقی کارساز کے مقابلہ میں ہے. ہم نے بھی ایک کامل نئورل آخر-آخر ایجنٹ کو پیش کیا ہے، جو کامل طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے کارساز فیڈ پک سے، اور اس کے کارسازی کو شخصی دیالوگ اگنٹوں کے ساتھ بحث کریں۔', 'uz': "Name Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge.  @ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu xuddi amallar tizimning o'zgarishlarini o'zgartiradi va neyrol dialog taʼminlovchilarining oxirigi taʼminotini oldin. Ushbu qogʻozda, biz bu cheksiz chegarani KB'da 'soft' tarkibini almashtirish mumkin va foydalanuvchi qanday qiziqarli boʻlgan soʻzlarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Name Шунингдек, биз бутун фойдаланувчи жавоб беришдан таълим бўлган ва шахс муколама таҳдидлари учун унинг дастурини талаб қиламиз.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất KB\'InfoBot- một trợ lý đối thoại đa lượt tìm kiếm giúp người dùng tìm kiếm Nhà thông tin (KBs) mà không soạn các câu hỏi phức tạp. Những đặc vụ đối thoại hướng mục tiêu như thế thường cần tương tác với một cơ sở dữ liệu bên ngoài để truy cập kiến thức thế giới thực. Những hệ thống trước đạt được điều này bằng cách gửi một yêu cầu tượng trưng cho KB để lấy lại các mục dựa trên các thuộc tính của nó. Tuy nhiên, các hoạt động tượng trưng như vậy sẽ phá vỡ sự khác biệt của hệ thống và ngăn chặn việc huấn luyện kết thúc của các điệp viên hội thoại thần kinh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải quyết giới hạn này bằng cách thay thế các câu hỏi tượng trưng bằng các điểm phân phối sau "mềm" dẫn đầu trên KB để chỉ ra các thực thể mà người dùng quan tâm. Sự khai thác mềm bằng một tay đệ có khả năng tăng cường sẽ làm tăng tỷ lệ thành công của nhiệm vụ và phần thưởng cho cả hai giả lập lẫn với người dùng thực sự. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra một chất gây mê hoàn to àn thần kinh, được huấn luyện hoàn toàn từ người dùng phản hồi, và thảo luận về ứng dụng của nó với các điệp viên cuộc đối thoại cá nhân.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предлага агент на диалогов диалог с няколко завъртания, който помага на потребителите да търсят бази от знания (КБ), без да съставят сложни заявки. Такива целенасочени диалогови агенти обикновено трябва да взаимодействат с външна база данни за достъп до знания от реалния свят. Предишните системи постигнаха това чрез издаване на символична заявка към КБ за извличане на записи въз основа на техните атрибути. Такива символични операции обаче нарушават диференциалността на системата и предотвратяват цялостното обучение на агентите на невронния диалог. В тази статия разглеждаме това ограничение, като заменим символичните заявки с индуцирано "меко" задно разпределение върху КБ, което показва кои обекти потребителят се интересува. Интегрирането на процеса на меко извличане с подсилване на обучаващия води до по-висок процент на успех на задачите и награда както при симулации, така и срещу реални потребители. Представяме и напълно невронен агент от край до край, обучен изцяло от обратната връзка на потребителите, и обсъждаме приложението му към персонализирани диалогови агенти.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir predlaže KB- InfoBot - agent dijaloga koji pomaže korisnicima pretražiti bazu znanja (KB) bez komplikovanih pitanja. Takvi objektivni dijalogski agenti obično moraju interakciji s vanjskim bazama podataka kako bi pristupili znanju stvarnog svijeta. Prethodni sustavi su to postigli izdajući simbolički zahtjev KB-u kako bi dobili ulazak na temelju njihovih atributa. Međutim, takve simboličke operacije prekidaju diferencijalnost sustava i sprječavaju trening agenta neuralnog dijaloga do kraja. U ovom papiru obraćamo ovu ograničenje zamjenom simboličkih ispitivanja s induciranom 'mekom' posljednjem distribucijom preko KB-a koja ukazuje na koje entitate korisnik zanima. Integracija mekog procesa povlačenja učenikom pojačanja vodi do višeg stopa uspjeha zadataka i nagrade u simulaciji i protiv pravih korisnika. Također predstavljamo potpuno neuralni agent do kraja, obučen potpuno od povratka korisnika, i razgovaramo o njenoj primjeni prema osobnim dijalogskim agentima.", 'da': "Dette dokument foreslår KB-InfoBot - en dialogagent med flere ture, der hjælper brugere med at søge i Knowledge Bases (KBs) uden at skrive komplicerede forespørgsler. Sådanne målorienterede dialogagenter skal typisk interagere med en ekstern database for at få adgang til den virkelige verden viden. Tidligere systemer opnåede dette ved at udsende en symbolsk forespørgsel til KB for at hente poster baseret på deres attributter. Men sådanne symbolske operationer bryder forskelligheden af systemet og forhindrer end-to-end træning af neurale dialogagenter. I denne artikel tager vi fat på denne begrænsning ved at erstatte symbolske forespørgsler med en induceret 'blød' efterfølgende fordeling over KB, der angiver, hvilke enheder brugeren er interesseret i. Integrering af den bløde hentningsproces med en forstærkningselev fører til højere succesrate og belønning i både simuleringer og mod rigtige brugere. Vi præsenterer også en fuldt neural end-to-end agent, uddannet udelukkende fra brugerfeedback, og diskuterer dens anvendelse til personaliserede dialogagenter.", 'nl': "In dit artikel wordt KB-InfoBot voorgesteld, een dialoogagent met meerdere keren die gebruikers helpt zoeken in Knowledge Bases (KBs) zonder ingewikkelde query's te maken. Dergelijke doelgerichte dialoogagenten moeten meestal communiceren met een externe database om toegang te krijgen tot echte kennis. Eerdere systemen bereikten dit door een symbolische query uit te voeren naar de KB om items op te halen op basis van hun attributen. Dergelijke symbolische operaties breken echter de differentieerbaarheid van het systeem en voorkomen een end-to-end training van neurale dialoogagenten. In dit artikel gaan we deze beperking aan door symbolische queries te vervangen door een geïnduceerde 'zachte' posteriore verdeling over de KB die aangeeft in welke entiteiten de gebruiker geïnteresseerd is. Het integreren van het soft retrieval proces met een versterking learner leidt tot een hoger succespercentage en beloning van taken in zowel simulaties als tegen echte gebruikers. We presenteren ook een volledig neurale end-to-end agent, volledig getraind op basis van gebruikersfeedback, en bespreken de toepassing ervan naar gepersonaliseerde dialoogagenten.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag wird KB-InfoBot vorgeschlagen, ein Multi-Turn Dialog Agent, der Benutzern hilft, Wissensbasen (KBs) zu durchsuchen, ohne komplizierte Abfragen zu verfassen. Solche zielgerichteten Dialogagenten müssen typischerweise mit einer externen Datenbank interagieren, um auf reales Wissen zuzugreifen. Frühere Systeme erreichten dies durch eine symbolische Abfrage an die KB, um Einträge basierend auf ihren Attributen abzurufen. Solche symbolischen Operationen brechen jedoch die Differenzierbarkeit des Systems und verhindern ein durchgängiges Training neuronaler Dialogagenten. In diesem Beitrag adressieren wir diese Einschränkung, indem wir symbolische Abfragen durch eine induzierte 'weiche' posteriore Verteilung über die KB ersetzen, die angibt, an welchen Entitäten der Benutzer interessiert ist. Die Integration des Soft Retrieval-Prozesses mit einem Verstärkungslerner führt zu einer höheren Erfolgsquote und Belohnung von Aufgaben sowohl in Simulationen als auch gegenüber realen Benutzern. Wir stellen auch einen vollständig neuronalen End-to-End-Agenten vor, der vollständig aus Benutzerfeedback geschult ist, und diskutieren seine Anwendung auf personalisierte Dialogagenten.", 'id': "Kertas ini mengusulkan KB-InfoBot - agen dialog berbilang putaran yang membantu pengguna mencari Pangkalan Pengetahuan (KBs) tanpa membuat pertanyaan rumit. Agen dialog orientasi tujuan seperti ini biasanya perlu berinteraksi dengan database luar untuk mengakses pengetahuan dunia nyata. Sistem sebelumnya mencapai ini dengan mengeluarkan pertanyaan simbolik ke KB untuk mendapatkan entri berdasarkan atribut mereka. Namun, operasi simbolik seperti itu merusak perbedaan sistem dan mencegah latihan akhir-akhir agen dialog saraf. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengatasi batasan ini dengan menggantikan pertanyaan simbolik dengan distribusi posterior 'lembut' yang disebabkan atas KB yang menunjukkan entitas mana pengguna tertarik. Integrating soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users. Kami juga memperkenalkan seorang agen dari akhir ke akhir saraf, terlatih sepenuhnya dari feedback pengguna, dan mendiskusikan aplikasinya ke agen dialog pribadi.", 'ko': "본고는 복잡한 조회를 작성하지 않고 사용자가 지식 라이브러리를 검색할 수 있도록 도와주는 다중 라운드 대화 에이전트(KBInfoBot)를 제시했다.이런 목표를 향한 대화 에이전트는 보통 외부 데이터베이스와 상호작용을 통해 실제 세계에 접근하는 지식을 필요로 한다.이전의 시스템은 지식 라이브러리에 기호 조회를 보내서 이 점을 실현하여 항목의 속성에 따라 항목을 검색했다.그러나 이런 기호 조작은 시스템의 가미성을 파괴하고 신경 대화 에이전트의 끝에서 끝까지의 훈련을 막았다.본고에서 우리는 기호 조회를 KB의 유도'소프트'백업 분포로 바꾸어 이 제한을 해결하고 이 백업 분포는 사용자가 흥미를 느끼는 실체를 가리킨다.소프트 검색 과정과 강화 학습기를 결합시켜 시뮬레이션과 실제 사용자들 사이에서 더욱 높은 임무 성공률과 보답을 얻을 수 있다.우리는 또한 사용자 피드백으로 완전히 훈련된 완전 신경단에서 단까지의 에이전트를 제시했고 개성화된 대화 에이전트에서의 응용을 토론했다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ KB- Infobot را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند - یک مامور محاورۀ محاورۀ چندین برعکس که به کاربر کمک می\u200cکند به جستجوی پایگاه دانش (KB) بدون ترکیب سوالات پیچیده\u200cها. این ماموران راهنمایی با هدف\u200cها معمولاً باید با یک داده\u200cبان خارجی برای دسترسی به دانش دنیای واقعی در ارتباط برقرار کنند. سیستم\u200cهای قبلی این را با اخراج یک سؤال سیمبلیک به کیب رسید تا وارد\u200cها را بر اساس ویژگی\u200cهایشان برگیرد. ولی این عملیات سیم\u200cبولیک متفاوتی سیستم را شکسته و جلوگیری آموزش\u200cهای ماموران گفتگوی عصبی را از پایان بردارد. در این کاغذ، ما این محدودیت را با جایگزینش سؤال\u200cهای نمادی با یک توزیع پشتیبانی » نرم « بر روی کیب » نشان می\u200cدهیم که نشان می\u200cدهد به کدام عنوان کاربر علاقه دارد. تعداد فرایند بازیابی نرم با یک دانش آموزش پشتیبانی به نرخ موفقیت و پاداش عملی بالاتر در شبیه\u200cسازی و علیه کاربران واقعی می\u200cرسد. ما همچنین یک مامور کاملاً پایان عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که کاملاً از پشتیبانی کاربر آموزش می\u200cدهد، و درباره کاربردهای آن به عنوان ماموران گفتگوی شخصی صحبت می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza KB-InfoBot - Mjadala wa mazungumzo mbalimbali ambao unawasaidia watumiaji kutafuta Msingi wa Elimu (KBs) bila kuchangia maswali magumu. Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge.  Previous systems achieved this by issuing a symbolic query to the KB to retrieve entries based on their attributes.  Hata hivyo, shughuli kama hizi zinavunja tofauti ya mfumo na kuzuia mafunzo ya mwisho ya mazungumzo ya kijamii. Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia vizuizi hiki kwa kubadilisha maswali ya alama kwa kusambaza usambazaji wa mabango ya ‘mymyatu’ juu ya KB kinachoonyesha njia gani mtumiaji anavutiwa. Kuunganisha mchakato wa upatikanaji mwepesi na mwandishi wa kujiunga mkono unapelekea kiwango kikubwa cha mafanikio na malipo katika simulizi na dhidi ya watumiaji halisi. Pia tunamweka ajenda wa mwisho wa kiserikali, tukifundisha ujumla kutoka kwenye maombi ya mtumiaji, na kujadili matumizi yake kwa ajili ya maafisa wa mazungumzo binafsi.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz KB-Infobot - karmaşık soraglary ýazmakdan kömek edip Ullanma Başyny (KB) gözlemek üçin bir multi-dönüş dialog ajaýyny teklip edýär. Bütin maksadyň gollanşy mümkinçilikleri düýbünden çykyş databank bilen gerçek dünýä bilgileri girmek üçin bir hereket etmeli. Öňki sistemler KB'e simbolik soragy a çarak çykyp gitdiler. Ýöne bu simbolik işleri sistemiň üýtgeşigini döwürýär we näyral dialog agnostlarynyň soňky okuwçysyny çykarýar. Bu kagyzda, biz bu mehdutçiliki simbolik soraglary KB-iň üstünde 'ýumuş' posterior daýratyny almak üçin ylalaşýarys. Eýik almak prosesini güçlendirmek öwrenicisi bilen birleşdirmek hem iş başarnygynyň ýokarynda, hem simulasynda hem hakyky ulananlara garşy täsirleýär. Biz hem doly neural iňe soňra näme ajaýyny görkezip, doly wužiwarlaryň feedbackyndan öwrenmeli we onuň uygulamasyny şahsy диалог ajamlaryna görä gürrüň edýäris.", 'af': "Hierdie papier stel KB- Infobot voorstel 'n multi- turn dialoog agent wat hulp gebruikers soek kennis Basies (Kb) sonder om kompliseerde vraagte te stel. Soos doel-orienteerde dialoog agente moet tipies interaksie met 'n eksterne databasis om toegang te kry op reël-wêreld kennis. Vorige stelsels het hierdie bereik deur 'n simboliese navraag uitgevoer na die Kb om inskrywings op hul eienskappe te kry. Maar sodanige simboliese operasies breek die verskilligheid van die stelsel en voorkom die einde-tot-einde onderwerking van neurale dialoog agente. In hierdie papier, ons adres hierdie beperking deur te vervang simboliese vraagte met 'n aangedruk 'sagte' posterior verspreiding oor die Kb wat wys watter entiteite die gebruiker is interesseer in. In die integrasie van die sagte ontvang proses met 'n versterking leerder lei na hoër taak sukses tempo en loon in beide simulasies en teen regte gebruikers. Ons het ook 'n volledige neurale einde-tot-einde agent voorgestel, volledig onderrig van gebruiker terugkeer, en bespreek sy aansoek teenoor persoonlike dialoog agente.", 'sq': "Ky dokument propozon KB-InfoBot - një agjent dialog me shumë kthesa që ndihmon përdoruesit të kërkojnë bazat e njohurive (KBs) pa përbërë pyetje të komplikuara. Të tillë agjentë të dialogut të orientuar në qëllim zakonisht duhet të ndërveprojnë me një bazë të dhënash të jashtme për të hyrë në njohuritë e botës reale. Sistemet e mëparshëm e arritën këtë duke lëshuar një pyetje simbolike në KB për të marrë entrata bazuar në atributet e tyre. Megjithatë, operacionet e tilla simbolike thyejnë dallimin e sistemit dhe parandalojnë trajnimin përfundimtar të agjentëve të dialogut nervor. Në këtë letër, ne e trajtojmë këtë kufizim duke zëvendësuar pyetjet simbolike me një shpërndarje të induktuar 'të butë' posteriore mbi KB që tregon në cilat njësi përdoruesi është i interesuar. Integrimi i procesit të zbulimit të butë me një nxënës të përforcimit çon në një normë më të lartë suksesi dhe shpërblimi në simulime si kundër përdoruesve të vërtetë. Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu një agjent plotësisht nervor nga fundi në fund, i trajnuar plotësisht nga përgjigjet e përdoruesve dhe diskutojmë aplikimin e tij drejt agjentëve të dialogut personalizuar.", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ KB-InfoBot - የተጨማሪው ጥያቄዎችን ሳትሰራ የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፈለግ የሚችል የጥያቄ እውቀት መቀመጫዎችን (KBs) ያስረዳል፡፡ Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge.  የቀድሞው ስርዓቶች በጥያቄ ላይ በጥያቄ ለመስጠት የKB ጥያቄዎችን በመስጠት አግኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እንደዚህ ምልክት ተግባር የስርዓቱን መለያየት ይቆርጣሉ እናም የኒውራዊ dialog አካባቢዎችን ለመጨረሻ ትምህርት ይከለክላሉ፡፡ In this paper, we address this limitation by replacing symbolic queries with an induced 'soft' posterior distribution over the KB that indicates which entities the user is interested in.  ቀላል ማግኘት ፕሮጀክት በመጠቀም አበረታዊ ተማሪ ይሄዳል፡፡ ደግሞም የደኅንነት መጨረሻ መጨረሻ የሚያደርገውን አካባቢ እናቀርባለን፣ በተጠቃሚው መልዕክት አስተማርተናል እና ፕሮግራሙን ለብሔራዊ ጥያቄ አካባቢዎች እናውቃለን፡፡", 'hy': "Այս թղթին առաջարկում է K- ինֆորմաբոտ՝ բազմահատվածային գործակալ, որը օգնում է օգտագործողներին գտնել գիտելիքի հիմքերը (ԿԲ) առանց բարդ հարցեր կազմելու: Այս նպատակով ուղղված հաղորդակցման գործիչները սովորաբար պետք է հաղորդակցվեն արտաքին բազայի հետ, որպեսզի հասնեն իրական աշխարհի գիտելիքներին: Անցյալ համակարգերը սա հասան, տալով ԿԲ-ին սիմվոլիկ հարց, որպեսզի ստանան իրենց առանձնահատկությունների վրա հիմնված տեղեկատվություններ: Այնուամենայնիվ, նման սիմվոլիկ գործողությունները խախտում են համակարգի տարբերակությունը և կանխում են նյարդային երկխոսային գործոնների վերջ-վերջ վարժեցման: In this paper, we address this limitation by replacing symbolic queries with an induced 'soft' posterior distribution over the KB that indicates which entities the user is interested in.  Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users.  Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք մի ամբողջովին նյարդային գործակալ, ով ամբողջովին պատրաստված է օգտագործողների արձագանքից, և քննարկում է դրա կիրառումը անձնական հաղորդակցված գործակալների նկատմամբ:", 'az': "Bu kağıt KB-InfoBot - çoxlu dönüş dialoq a ģentəsini təklif edir ki, istifadəçiləri bilgi bazları (KB) aramasına kömək edir. Bütün məqsədilə tərəf-tərəf danışmaq aģentləri, dünya elmi ilə istifadə etmək üçün dış veritabanı ilə əlaqə etmək lazımdır. Əvvəlki sistemlər bunu KB-ə simbolik soruşma təbliğ edib özlərinin xüsusiyyətlərinə dayanan giriş alırlar. Ancaq bu simbolik işləri sistemin fərqliyini çəkir və nöral dialoğu agentların sona-sona təhsil etməsini engel edir. Bu kağızda, bu limiti, sinbolik soruşmaları KB-in üstündə 'yumuşaq' posterior dağıtımları ilə əvəz edirik ki, istifadəçinin hansı məlumatların interesini göstərir. Yaxınlıq alma prosesini artırmaq öyrənən öyrənmək üçün daha yüksək işin başarısızlığına və simulasyonlarda və həqiqət istifadəçilərə qarşı mükafat verər. Biz də tamamilə istifadəçilərin reaksiyonundan təhsil edilmiş və onun uyğulamasını kişisel dialoq agentlarına mübahisə edirik.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি কে- বি- তথ্য প্রস্তাব করেছে - একটি বহু পরিবর্তিত ডায়ালগ এজেন্ট, যা জটিল প্রশ্ন সম্পূর্ণ করা ছাড়া ব্যবহারকারীদের তথ্য বেস অন এই উদ্দেশ্যের মুখোমুখি ডায়ালগ এজেন্ট সাধারণত একটি বাইরের ডাটাবেসের সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে হবে বিশ্ব জ্ঞান প্রবেশ করতে। Previous systems achieved this by issuing a symbolic query to the KB to retrieve entries based on their attributes.  তবে এই ধরনের প্রতীক কার্যকলাপ সিস্টেমের বৈষম্য ভেঙ্গে দেয় এবং নিউরেল ডায়ালগ এজেন্টের শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রতিরোধ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই সীমাবদ্ধতার সাথে প্রতীক প্রশ্নের প্রতিস্থাপনের মাধ্যমে প্রতীক প্রশ্নের বিনিময়ে প্রতিস্থাপন করি যা কেবির বিভাগে উৎ Integrating the soft retrieval process with a reinforcement learner leads to higher task success rate and reward in both simulations and against real users.  আমরা পুরোপুরি নিউরেল শেষ পর্যন্ত এজেন্ট উপস্থাপন করি, ব্যবহারকারীদের ফিডব্যাক থেকে পুরোপুরি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছি এবং ব্যক্তিগত', 'ca': 'Aquest article proposa KB-InfoBot - un agent de diàleg de múltiples voltants que ajuda als usuaris a buscar bases de coneixements (KBs) sense composar preguntes complicades. Aquests agents de diàleg orientats cap als objectius normalment necessiten interactuar amb una base de dades externa per accedir al coneixement del món real. Els sistemes anteriors ho van aconseguir fent una consulta simbòlica al KB per obtenir entrades basades en els seus atributs. Tot i així, aquestes operacions simbòlicas trenquen la diferenciabilitat del sistema i evitan l\'entrenament final a final d\'agents de diàleg neuronal. En aquest article, abordem aquesta limitació substituint les preguntes simbòlicas per una distribució posterior induïda "suau" sobre el KB que indica en quines entitats l\'usuari està interessat. Integrar el procés de recuperació suau amb un aprenent de reforç porta a una tasa d\'èxit i recompensa més alta en simulacions i en contra dels usuaris reals. També presentem un agent completament neural de cap a cap, entrenat integralment amb el feedback de l\'usuari, i discutem la seva aplicació cap a agents de diàleg personalitzats.', 'cs': "Tento článek navrhuje KB-InfoBot,multi-turn dialogový agent, který pomáhá uživatelům vyhledávat znalostní báze (KBs) bez komplikovaných dotazů. Takoví cílově orientovaní dialogoví agenti obvykle musí komunikovat s externí databází, aby získali přístup k reálným znalostem. Předchozí systémy toho dosáhly vydáním symbolického dotazu KB k načtení položek na základě jejich atributů. Takové symbolické operace však narušují rozdílnost systému a zabraňují komplexnímu tréninku neuronových dialogových agentů. V tomto článku řešíme toto omezení nahrazením symbolických dotazů indukovaným 'měkkým' posteriorním rozdělením nad KB, které naznačuje, o které entity uživatel má zájem. Integrace procesu měkkého vyhledávání s učitelem posilování vede k vyšší míře úspěšnosti úkolů a odměny jak v simulacích, tak proti skutečným uživatelům. Představujeme také plně neuronového end-to-end agenta, vyškoleného výhradně na základě zpětné vazby uživatelů, a diskutujeme jeho aplikaci k personalizovaným dialogovým agentům.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis pakutakse välja KB-InfoBot – mitmekäiguline dialoogiagent, mis aitab kasutajatel otsida teabebaasi (KB) ilma keeruliste päringute koostamiseta. Sellised eesmärgile orienteeritud dialoogi esindajad peavad tavaliselt suhtlema välise andmebaasiga, et pääseda ligi reaalmaailma teadmistele. Eelmised süsteemid saavutasid selle, saates KB-le sümboolse päringu nende atribuutidel põhinevate kirjete hankimiseks. Sellised sümboolsed operatsioonid murravad aga süsteemi eristatavuse ja takistavad närvidialoogi agentide täielikku koolitust. Käesolevas töös käsitleme seda piirangut, asendades sümboolsed päringud indutseeritud "pehme" tagasijaotusega KB-s, mis näitab, millistest üksustest kasutaja on huvitatud. Pehme taastamise protsessi integreerimine tugevdatud õppijaga toob kaasa suurema ülesannete edukuse määra ja tasu nii simulatsioonides kui ka reaalsete kasutajate vastu. Samuti tutvustame täielikult neuraalset end-to-end agenti, mis on täielikult koolitatud kasutajate tagasisidest ning arutame selle rakendamist personaalsete dialoogiagentide suhtes.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan KB-InfoBotia, monimutkaista dialogia, joka auttaa käyttäjiä etsimään tietokantoja (KB) kirjoittamatta monimutkaisia kyselyjä. Tällaiset tavoitteelliset vuoropuhelun toimijat tarvitsevat yleensä vuorovaikutusta ulkoisen tietokannan kanssa päästäkseen käsiksi todelliseen tietoon. Aiemmat järjestelmät saavuttivat tämän tekemällä symbolisen kyselyn KB:lle noutamaan merkintöjä attribuuttien perusteella. Tällaiset symboliset toiminnot kuitenkin rikkovat järjestelmän erilaistuvuutta ja estävät hermodialogiagenttien kokonaisvaltaista koulutusta. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme tätä rajoitusta korvaamalla symboliset kyselyt indusoidulla "pehmeällä" posteriorijakaumalla KB:n kautta, joka osoittaa, mistä entiteeteistä käyttäjä on kiinnostunut. Softnoutoprosessin integrointi vahvistusoppijaan johtaa suurempaan onnistumisasteeseen ja palkkioon sekä simulaatioissa että todellisia käyttäjiä vastaan. Esittelemme myös täysin neuraalisen end-to-end agentin, joka on koulutettu kokonaan käyttäjän palautteesta, ja keskustelemme sen soveltamisesta personoituihin dialogiagentteihin.', 'bs': "Ovaj papir predlaže KB-InfoBot - agent dijaloga koji pomaže korisnicima pretražiti bazu znanja (KB) bez komplikovanih pitanja. Takvi agenti dijaloga koji su orientirani na ciljeve obično moraju interakciji s vanjskim bazama podataka kako bi pristupili znanju realnog svijeta. Prethodni sistemi su to postigli izdavanjem simboličkog pitanja KB-u kako bi dobili ulaznice na temelju njihovih atributa. Međutim, takve simboličke operacije prekidaju diferencijalnost sustava i sprječavaju trening agenta neurološkog dijaloga do kraja. U ovom papiru, mi obraćamo ovu ograničenje zamjenom simboličkih ispitivanja sa indukovanom 'mekom' poslednjem distribucijom preko KB-a koja ukazuje na koje entitete je korisnik zainteresovan. Integracija mekog procesa povlačenja učenikom pojačanja vodi do višeg stopa uspjeha zadataka i nagrade u simulaciji i protiv pravih korisnika. Također predstavljamo potpuno neuralni agent do kraja, obučen u potpunosti od povratka korisnika, i razgovaramo o njenoj aplikaciji prema osobnim dijalogskim agentima.", 'jv': "Pawiti iki supoyata K-Infobot - populer dialog multi-round ProgressBarUpdates Dijejer-sistem sing wis dianggap iki nang sampeyan simbolbar kang K Nanging, perangkat simbol sing wis ngerasakno karo sistem sing perusahaan mruput karo nganggo dolanan karo hal-layaan dialog Nang pebuk iki, kita dadi limiting iki dipunanggap oleh simbol sing bagian podho kelompok 'software' nggawe sekunduh dianggap kb mungkun efet badasakno Jejaring Awak dhéwé éntuk mulai perusahaan anyar mên, lan ijol-ijolan ngono nggawe barang pengguna kuwi, lan ijol-ijolan aplikasi kanggo ngerasakno dagatan dialog perusahaan.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה KB- InfoBot - סוכן דיאלוג במספר פעמים שעוזר למשתמשים לחפש בסיסי ידע (KBs) בלי לחבר שאלות מסובכות. Such goal-oriented dialogue agents typically need to interact with an external database to access real-world knowledge.  מערכות קודמות השיגו את זה בכך שהוציאו בקשה סימלית לקי.בי.איי כדי להשיג קובצים מבוססים על תכונותיהם. עם זאת, פעולות סמליות כאלה שוברות את הדפירנציאליות של המערכת וממנעות מהאימון סוף-סוף של סוכני דיאלוג עצבי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים למגבלה הזו על ידי החלפת שאלות סימליות עם פיצוץ מאחורי "רכה" מעורר על KB שילוב תהליך השיגור הרך עם לומד תגבורת מוביל לקצב הצלחה במשימה גבוה יותר, וגמול בשתי סימולציות ובנגד משתמשים אמיתיים. אנחנו גם מציגים סוכן עצבי מלא סוף-סוף, מאומן לחלוטין ממחזור משתמש, ודיונים על היישומים שלה כלפי סוכני דיאלוג אישיים.', 'sk': "Ta članek predlaga KB-InfoBot - večobratni pogovorni agent, ki uporabnikom pomaga iskati zbirke znanja (KB), ne da bi sestavljali zapletene poizvedbe. Takšni ciljno usmerjeni akterji dialoga običajno morajo interakcijo z zunanjo bazo podatkov za dostop do znanja iz realnega sveta. Prejšnji sistemi so to dosegli z izdajo simbolne poizvedbe KB za pridobivanje vnosov na podlagi njihovih atributov. Vendar pa takšne simbolične operacije prekinejo razlikovanje sistema in preprečujejo celovito usposabljanje agentov nevronskega dialoga. V tem prispevku obravnavamo to omejitev tako, da simbolne poizvedbe nadomestimo z inducirano 'mehko' posteriorno porazdelitvijo preko KB, ki označuje, katere entitete uporabnika zanimajo. Integriranje procesa mehkega pridobivanja z okrepitvijo učenca vodi do višje stopnje uspešnosti opravil in nagrade v simulacijah in proti resničnim uporabnikom. Predstavljamo tudi popolnoma nevronsko sredstvo od konca do konca, ki je v celoti usposobljeno iz povratnih informacij uporabnikov, in razpravljamo o njegovi uporabi pri osebnih dialognih sredstvih.", 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke buƙata KB-info Bot - wani ajali na zauren akwatin bayani na daban-daba'a mai yawa, wanda yana taimako da masu amfani da yin nẽman Bayani San'ar KBs (KBs) bã da samun tambayi masu lissafa ba. Madagaskiyar zauren akwatin bayanin da aka origina ta cikin shirin akwatin bayani na taga, ana ƙayyade su yi haɗi da wani bango na bakin bayani na fita dõmin su iya haɗi kunyar duniya gaske. @ action: button A lokacin da, shirin waɗannan da ke cikin shirin ayuka, za'a jefa rarrabẽwa na'urar da kuma ya kange tsarin zuwa ƙarami na zauren zauren akwatin neura. Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambayar wannan tsarin da za'a bada tambayar symbolic game da an gabatar da rabo 'buɗari' mai gabatar da bayani na KB, kuma yana nũna da wanne masu da amfani da shi yana da amfani da. Ka haɗa aikin motsi na mutane da wani mai amfani da ƙaranci, yana ƙara wa mafanici wa aikin da za'a iya ƙaranci kuma yana da sakamako a cikin misãlai da kuma a kan masu amfani da gaskiyar. Kayya, Munã halatar da wani mai dawo na ƙari zuwa ƙari, an sanar da shi kawai daga baka mai amfani da shi, kuma Mu yi jayayya da shiryoyinsa zuwa masu zauren akwatin bayani masu fara ɗaya.", 'bo': "This paper proposes KB-InfoBot - a multi-turn dialog agent which helps users search Knowledge Bases (KBs) without composing complicated queries. དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་གོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་པ་དེ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་ཕྱིར་ཡིག་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་དང་མཉ སྔོན་མ་ལག་གིས་དེ་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་བ་ཞིག་KB་ལ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་བྱས་ནས་དེ་ཚོའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་དག་གི་མཚོན་རྟགས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་འགུལ་སྐྱོད་པའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་བློ་ In this paper, we address this limitation by replacing symbolic queries with an induced 'soft' posterior distribution over the KB that indicates which entities the user is interested in མཛོད་ཁང་གི་ནད་རིམ་ཕར་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་ཕར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ནི་ཕན་ཚོར་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཚད་ལྷན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མཐར་མོའི་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་བསྡུར་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'Sequential Matching Network : A New Architecture for Multi-turn Response Selection in Retrieval-Based Chatbots', 'ar': 'شبكة المطابقة المتسلسلة: بنية جديدة لتحديد الاستجابة متعددة الأدوار في روبوتات المحادثة القائمة على الاسترداد', 'fr': "Réseau d'appariement séquentiel\xa0: une nouvelle architecture pour la sélection de réponses multitours dans les chatbots basés sur la récupération", 'es': 'Red de correspondencia secuencial: una nueva arquitectura para la selección de respuestas multivueltas en chatbots basados en recuperación', 'pt': 'Sequential Matching Network: Uma Nova Arquitetura para Seleção de Resposta Multi-turn em Chatbots Baseados em Recuperação', 'ja': 'シーケンシャルマッチングネットワーク：検索ベースのチャットボットにおけるマルチターン応答選択のための新しいアーキテクチャ', 'zh': '次匹网络:基于检索机器人中多轮应新架构', 'hi': 'अनुक्रमिक मिलान नेटवर्क: पुनर्प्राप्ति-आधारित Chatbots में बहु-बारी प्रतिक्रिया चयन के लिए एक नई वास्तुकला', 'ru': 'Сеть последовательного сопоставления: новая архитектура для выбора многооборотного ответа в чат-ботах на основе извлечения', 'ga': 'Líonra Meaitseála Seicheamhach: Ailtireacht Nua le haghaidh Roghnú Freagartha Il-iompaithe i Chatbots Aisghabhála-Bhunaithe', 'ka': 'შემდეგ შესაბამისი ქსელი: ახალი არქიტექტურა მრავალური პარამეტრების მონიშნელებისთვის შესაბამისი ფარბოტებში', 'hu': 'Szekvenciális egyezési hálózat: Új architektúra a többfordulós válasz kiválasztásához a visszahívásalapú csevegőbotokban', 'el': 'Δίκτυο διαδοχικής αντιστοίχισης: Μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική για επιλογή απόκρισης πολλαπλών στροφών σε ρομπότ με βάση την ανάκτηση', 'it': 'Rete di corrispondenza sequenziale: una nuova architettura per la selezione della risposta a più turni nei chatbot basati su recupero', 'lt': 'Pakrečiamasis derinimo tinklas: Nauja daugiasluoksnio atsako atrankos architektūra gavimo pagrindu grindžiamuose pokalbiuose', 'mk': 'Секвенцијална мрежа за совпаѓање: Нова архитектура за избор на повеќето одговори во бази за разговори со основа на добивање', 'kk': 'Келесі сәйкесті желі: Көпбұрышты жауап беруді таңдау архитектурасы қалпына негізделген шатботтардың жаңа архитектурасы', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'വീണ്ടും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ചാറ്റ്ബോട്ടുകളില്\u200d പല- തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന മറുപടി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Tqabbil Sekwenzjali: Arkitettura Ġdida għall-Għażla ta’ Rispons b’Ħafna Toroq f’Boċċi ta’ Tqabbil Ibbażati fuq l-Irkupru', 'pl': 'Sieć dopasowywania sekwencyjnego: Nowa architektura wyboru odpowiedzi wielokrotnej w chatbotach opartych na odzyskiwaniu', 'ro': 'Rețeaua de potrivire secvențială: O nouă arhitectură pentru selectarea răspunsului la mai multe rânduri în chatboții bazați pe recuperare', 'mn': 'Дараагийн хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо', 'sr': 'Sekvencijalna odgovarajuća mreža: Nova arhitektura za izbor odgovora na više okretanja na osnovu otkupljanja Chatbota', 'so': 'Shabakadda Matching: A New Architecture for Multi-turn Response Selection in Retrieval-Based Chatbots', 'si': 'පස්සේ සම්බන්ධ ජාලය: ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව තෝරණය සඳහා අළුත් සංවිධානය', 'sv': 'Sekventiellt matchande nätverk: En ny arkitektur för val av svarsvaror i flera omgångar i hämtningsbaserade chattrobotar', 'ta': 'பின்வரும் பொருத்தும் வலைப்பின்னல்: மீட்டெடுப்பு அடிப்படையான அரட்டைகளில் ஒரு புதிய புதிய ஆவணம்', 'ur': 'سکوئنسیل متصل نیٹ ورک: ایک نئی آرکیٹ ورک انتخاب کے لئے ایک نئی آرکیٹر', 'no': 'Sekvensjonal tilsvarande nettverk: Eit ny arkitektur for utval av svar på fleire område i uthendingsbaserte samtaler', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mạng lưới xung quanh lặp đi lặp lại: Một kiến trúc mới cho phần chọn phản ứng đa lượt trong việc câu trả lời', 'bg': 'Редовна мрежа за съвпадение: Нова архитектура за избор на отговор с няколко завъртания в базирани на извличане чатботи', 'nl': 'Sequentieel Matching Netwerk: Een nieuwe architectuur voor Multi-turn Response Selectie in Retrieval-based Chatbots', 'hr': 'Sekvencijalna odgovarajuća mreža: Nova arhitektura za izbor odgovora na više okretanja u otkupljavanju na osnovu Chatbota', 'da': 'Sekventielt matchingsnetværk: En ny arkitektur til valg af flere ture respons i hentningsbaserede chatbots', 'de': 'Sequential Matching Network: Eine neue Architektur für Multi-Turn Response Selection in Retrieval-basierten Chatbots', 'id': 'Rangkaian Penyesuaian Secuensional: Arkitektur Baru untuk Pemilihan Respon Berputar-Berputar dalam Bot Bicara Berdasarkan Penerimaan', 'ko': '순서 매칭 네트워크: 검색 기반의 채팅 로봇 다중 응답 선택의 새로운 구조', 'fa': 'شبکه اتفاق\u200cافزایش بعدی: یک معمار جدید برای انتخاب پاسخ\u200cافزایش چندین برعکس در Chatbots Based on Retrieval', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Matukio: Mpya Mpya wa Uchaguzi wa Mumbalimbali wa Jibu katika Chatbots za Kurejesha', 'tr': 'T채ze I흫le첵힊en A 첵ry: Bir n채챌e arhitektura G철rni힊 Op힊enler Sa첵lamak 체챌in T채ze arhitektura', 'af': "Volgende ooreenstemmende netwerk: ' n Nuwe arkitektuur vir veelvuldige omdraai antwoord keuse in Herhaal- Baseerde Chatbots", 'sq': 'Rrjeti i Përkatësimit Sekuencial: Një arkitekturë e re për zgjedhjen e përgjigjeve me shumë kthesa në biseda të bazuara në marrje', 'hy': 'Հաշվի առնելու հաջորդական ցանց: Նոր արխեկտություն բազմապտտվող պատասխանների ընտրության համար ստացման հիմնված զրույցներում', 'am': 'Sequential Matching Network: A New Architecture for Multi-turn Response Selection in Retrieval-Based Chatbots', 'az': 'Sequential Eşleşmiş Şablon: Çoxlu Dönüş cavab Seçimi üçün Yeni Arhitektura', 'bn': 'পরবর্তীতে মিল্টিং নেটওয়ার্ক: পুনরুদ্ধার- ভিত্তিক চ্যাটবোটে বহুবার প্রতিক্রিয়া নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি নতুন আর্কিটে', 'cs': 'Sekvenční odpovídající síť: Nová architektura pro výběr víceotáčkové odezvy v chatbotech založených na vyhledávání', 'bs': 'Sekvencijalna odgovarajuća mreža: Nova arhitektura za izbor odgovora na više okretanja na osnovu otkupljanja Chatbota', 'et': 'Järjestikuse sobitamise võrk: uus arhitektuur mitmekäigulise vastuse valimiseks päringupõhistes jutubotides', 'ca': "Rede d'ajustament secuencial: Una nova arquitectura per seleccionar respostes múltiples en converses basades en recuperació", 'fi': 'Sequential Matching Network: Uusi arkkitehtuuri monivuoroisen vasteen valintaan hakupohjaisissa chatboteissa', 'jv': 'Sekondêr Match Network: Una Arkertur Baro kanggo Kelangan Multi-Tawaran responsi Dino Ribek-Batal', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Zaporedno ujemanje omrežja: nova arhitektura za izbiro več obratov odziva v klepetalnih botih, ki temeljijo na pridobivanju', 'he': 'רשת התאמה רצופית: ארכיטקטורה חדשה לבחירה של תגובה רבה סיבובים בשיחות מבוססות על קיבלה', 'bo': 'རྗེས་མའི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དྲ་བ། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཞིག་པ།'}
{'en': 'We study response selection for multi-turn conversation in retrieval based chatbots. Existing work either concatenates utterances in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the utterances or important information in the context. We propose a sequential matching network (SMN) to address both problems. SMN first matches a response with each utterance in the context on multiple levels of granularity, and distills important matching information from each pair as a vector with convolution and pooling operations. The vectors are then accumulated in a chronological order through a recurrent neural network (RNN) which models relationships among the utterances. The final matching score is calculated with the hidden states of the RNN. Empirical study on two public data sets shows that SMN can significantly outperform state-of-the-art methods for response selection in multi-turn conversation.', 'ar': 'ندرس اختيار الاستجابة للمحادثات متعددة الأدوار في روبوتات المحادثة القائمة على الاسترجاع. العمل الحالي إما يربط بين الكلمات المنطوقة في السياق أو يطابق الاستجابة مع متجه سياق شديد التجريد أخيرًا ، مما قد يفقد العلاقات بين الكلمات المنطوقة أو المعلومات المهمة في السياق. نقترح شبكة مطابقة متسلسلة (SMN) لمعالجة كلتا المشكلتين. يطابق SMN أولاً الاستجابة مع كل كلام في السياق على مستويات متعددة من التفاصيل ، ويستخلص معلومات مطابقة مهمة من كل زوج كمتجه مع عمليات الالتفاف والتجميع. يتم بعد ذلك تجميع المتجهات بترتيب زمني من خلال شبكة عصبية متكررة (RNN) والتي تشكل العلاقات بين الأقوال. يتم حساب نتيجة المطابقة النهائية بالحالات المخفية لـ RNN. تظهر الدراسة التجريبية على مجموعتين من البيانات العامة أن SMN يمكن أن يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأساليب لاختيار الاستجابة في محادثة متعددة الأدوار.', 'fr': "Nous étudions la sélection des réponses pour les conversations à tours multiples dans les chatbots basés sur la récupération. Le travail existant concatène des énoncés dans leur contexte ou associe une réponse à un vecteur de contexte très abstrait, ce qui peut perdre les relations entre les énoncés ou des informations importantes dans le contexte. Nous proposons un réseau d'appariement séquentiel (SMN) pour résoudre ces deux problèmes. SMN fait d'abord correspondre une réponse à chaque énoncé dans le contexte à plusieurs niveaux de granularité, puis distille les informations de correspondance importantes de chaque paire sous forme de vecteur avec des opérations de convolution et de regroupement. Les vecteurs sont ensuite accumulés dans un ordre chronologique par l'intermédiaire d'un réseau neuronal récurrent (RNN) qui modélise les relations entre les énoncés. Le score de correspondance final est calculé avec les états cachés du RNN. Une étude empirique sur deux ensembles de données publiques montre que le SMN peut largement surpasser les méthodes de pointe pour la sélection des réponses dans les conversations à tours multiples.", 'es': 'Estudiamos la selección de respuestas para conversaciones de varios turnos en chatbots basados en recuperación. El trabajo existente concatena enunciados en contexto o finalmente hace coincidir una respuesta con un vector de contexto altamente abstracto, lo que puede perder relaciones entre los enunciados o información importante en el contexto. Proponemos una red de correspondencia secuencial (SMN) para abordar ambos problemas. SMN primero hace coincidir una respuesta con cada enunciado en el contexto en múltiples niveles de granularidad y destila información de correspondencia importante de cada par como un vector con operaciones de convolución y agrupación. Los vectores se acumulan luego en orden cronológico a través de una red neuronal recurrente (RNN) que modela las relaciones entre las expresiones. La puntuación final de coincidencia se calcula con los estados ocultos de la RNN. Un estudio empírico sobre dos conjuntos de datos públicos muestra que SMN puede superar significativamente a los métodos más avanzados para la selección de respuestas en conversaciones de varios turnos.', 'pt': 'Estudamos a seleção de respostas para conversas multi-turn em chatbots baseados em recuperação. O trabalho existente concatena enunciados no contexto ou combina uma resposta com um vetor de contexto altamente abstrato, que pode perder relações entre os enunciados ou informações importantes no contexto. Propomos uma rede de correspondência sequencial (SMN) para resolver ambos os problemas. O SMN primeiro combina uma resposta com cada enunciado no contexto em vários níveis de granularidade e destila informações de correspondência importantes de cada par como um vetor com operações de convolução e agrupamento. Os vetores são então acumulados em ordem cronológica por meio de uma rede neural recorrente (RNN) que modela as relações entre os enunciados. A pontuação final correspondente é calculada com os estados ocultos do RNN. O estudo empírico em dois conjuntos de dados públicos mostra que o SMN pode superar significativamente os métodos de última geração para seleção de resposta em conversação multi-turn.', 'ja': '検索ベースのチャットボットでのマルチターン会話の応答選択を研究しています。既存の作業は、コンテキスト内の発話を連結するか、最後に非常に抽象的なコンテキストベクトルと応答を一致させ、コンテキスト内の発話間の関係または重要な情報を失う可能性がある。両方の問題に対処するためのシーケンシャルマッチングネットワーク（ SMN ）を提案します。SMNはまず、複数の粒度レベルでコンテキスト内の各発話と応答を一致させ、畳み込みおよびプーリング操作を伴うベクトルとして各ペアから重要なマッチング情報を抽出する。次いで、ベクトルは、発話間の関係をモデル化する再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＲＮＮ ）を通じて時系列で蓄積される。最終マッチングスコアは、ＲＮＮの隠れた状態で計算される。2つの公開データセットの実証研究は、SMNがマルチターン会話における応答選択のための最先端の方法を大幅に上回ることができることを示している。', 'zh': '究其检索之聊天机器人中多轮次之应择。 今事或连语于上下文,或终于应高抽象之上下文向量,或失语之际,或上下文之要信。 举次第网络(SMN)以决二者。 SMN 先于数粒度之上,将应上下文之语,取其重者以为卷积池化之向量。 然后循环神经网络 (RNN) 以时积向量,神经网络言建模之。 终于匹配分数,用 RNN 之隐数也。 两公据集之实,多轮次对,SMN可以显优先进之应。', 'hi': 'हम पुनर्प्राप्ति आधारित चैटबॉट्स में बहु-बारी वार्तालाप के लिए प्रतिक्रिया चयन का अध्ययन करते हैं। मौजूदा काम या तो संदर्भ में उच्चारण को concatenates या अंत में एक अत्यधिक अमूर्त संदर्भ वेक्टर के साथ एक प्रतिक्रिया से मेल खाता है, जो संदर्भ में उच्चारण या महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी के बीच संबंधों को खो सकता है। हम दोनों समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए एक अनुक्रमिक मिलान नेटवर्क (एसएमएन) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। SMN पहले ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के कई स्तरों पर संदर्भ में प्रत्येक कथन के साथ एक प्रतिक्रिया से मेल खाता है, और कनवल्शन और पूलिंग संचालन के साथ एक वेक्टर के रूप में प्रत्येक जोड़ी से महत्वपूर्ण मिलान जानकारी को डिस्टिल करता है। वैक्टर तब एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (आरएनएन) के माध्यम से एक कालानुक्रमिक क्रम में जमा होते हैं जो कथनों के बीच संबंधों को मॉडल करते हैं। अंतिम मिलान स्कोर RNN के छिपे हुए राज्यों के साथ गणना की जाती है। दो सार्वजनिक डेटा सेटों पर अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन से पता चलता है कि एसएमएन बहु-बारी वार्तालाप में प्रतिक्रिया चयन के लिए अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем выбор ответа для многооборотного разговора в чат-ботах на основе поиска. Существующая работа либо объединяет высказывания в контексте, либо, наконец, сопоставляет ответ с весьма абстрактным вектором контекста, который может потерять связь между высказываниями или важной информацией в контексте. Мы предлагаем последовательную сеть сопоставления (SMN) для решения обеих проблем. SMN сначала сопоставляет ответ с каждым высказыванием в контексте на нескольких уровнях детализации и отбирает важную информацию для сопоставления из каждой пары в виде вектора с операциями свертки и объединения. Затем векторы накапливаются в хронологическом порядке через рекуррентную нейронную сеть (RNN), которая моделирует отношения между высказываниями. Окончательная оценка соответствия рассчитывается со скрытыми состояниями RNN. Эмпирическое исследование двух открытых наборов данных показывает, что SMN может значительно превосходить современные методы отбора ответов в многооборотном разговоре.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar roghnú freagartha do chomhrá iliompaithe i chatbots bunaithe ar aisghabháil. Comhcheanglaíonn saothar atá ann faoi láthair nathanna cainte i gcomhthéacs nó meaitseálann sé freagra le veicteoir comhthéacs an-teibí ar deireadh, rud a d’fhéadfadh caidreamh idir nathanna cainte nó faisnéis thábhachtach sa chomhthéacs a chailleadh. Molaimid líonra meaitseála seicheamhach (SMN) chun dul i ngleic leis an dá fhadhb. Meaitseálann SMN freagra ar dtús le gach focal sa chomhthéacs ar leibhéil iolracha gráinneachta, agus déanann sé faisnéis mheaitseála thábhachtach ó gach péire a dhriogadh mar veicteoir le hoibríochtaí conbhlóide agus comhthiomsaithe. Ansin carntar na veicteoirí in ord croineolaíoch trí líonra néarach athfhillteach (RNN) a mhúnlaíonn gaolmhaireachtaí idir na cainte. Ríomhtar an scór meaitseála deiridh le stáit fholaithe an RNN. Léiríonn staidéar eimpíreach ar dhá thacar sonraí poiblí gur féidir le SMN sárobair a dhéanamh ar mhodhanna úrscothacha maidir le roghnú freagraí i gcomhrá il-uaine.', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a válasz kiválasztását a többfordulós beszélgetéshez a visszahívás alapú chatbotokban. A meglévő munka vagy összekapcsolja a kijelentéseket kontextusban, vagy végül egy igen absztrakt kontextusvektorral egyezteti a választ, ami elveszítheti a kapcsolatot a kijelentések vagy a kontextusban lévő fontos információk között. Mindkét probléma kezelésére javasoljuk a szekvenciális megfelelő hálózatot (SMN). Az SMN először a kontextusban lévő minden egyes kimondással egyezteti a választ, több szintű granulációs szinten, és vektorként lepárolja a fontos megfelelő információkat az egyes párokból. A vektorok ezután kronológiai sorrendben halmozódnak fel egy visszatérő neurális hálózaton (RNN), amely modellezi a kimondások közötti kapcsolatokat. A végső egyezési pontszámot az RNN rejtett állapotával számítjuk ki. Két nyilvános adatkészleten végzett empirikus tanulmány azt mutatja, hogy az SMN jelentősen felülmúlhatja a legkorszerűbb válaszkiválasztási módszereket a többfordulós beszélgetésben.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε την επιλογή απόκρισης για συζήτηση πολλαπλών στροφών σε chatbots βασισμένα στην ανάκτηση. Το υπάρχον έργο είτε συνδέει τις εκφράσεις στο πλαίσιο είτε αντιστοιχεί μια απάντηση με ένα άκρως αφηρημένο διάνυσμα περιβάλλοντος τελικά, το οποίο μπορεί να χάσει σχέσεις μεταξύ των εκφράσεων ή σημαντικές πληροφορίες στο πλαίσιο. Προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο διαδοχικής αντιστοίχισης (SMN) για την αντιμετώπιση και των δύο προβλημάτων. Το SMN αντιστοιχεί πρώτα μια απάντηση με κάθε έκφραση στο πλαίσιο σε πολλαπλά επίπεδα κοκκοποίησης και αποσταλεί σημαντικές πληροφορίες αντιστοίχισης από κάθε ζεύγος ως διάνυσμα με λειτουργίες σύγχυσης και συγκέντρωσης. Στη συνέχεια, τα διανύσματα συσσωρεύονται με χρονολογική σειρά μέσω ενός επαναλαμβανόμενου νευρικού δικτύου (RNN) το οποίο μοντελοποιεί τις σχέσεις μεταξύ των εκφωνήσεων. Η τελική βαθμολογία αντιστοίχισης υπολογίζεται με τις κρυφές καταστάσεις του RNN. Εμπειριακή μελέτη σε δύο δημόσια σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνει ότι η SMN μπορεί να ξεπεράσει σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους επιλογής απόκρισης σε συζητήσεις πολλαπλών στροφών.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ განახლების მონიშნულება, რამდენიმე შემდეგ პარამეტრებისთვის, რომელიც მივიღებთ საუბოტში. Existing work either concatenates words in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the words or important information in the context. ჩვენ შევძლებით სკენტიური შესაბამისი ქსელი (SMN) ორივე პრობლემების გარეშე. Name ვიქტორები შემდეგ კრონოლოგიური წესთან გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ქსელის (RNN) გამოყენებაში, რომელიც მოდელური შესახებ გამოყენებაში. ბოლო შესაბამისი წერტილის შესაბამისი წერტილის შესაბამისი პროგრამის შესაბამისი წერტილის შესაბამისი. მეორე საზოგადო მონაცემების შესახებ იგივე, რომ SMN შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანად გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებელი განსხვავებელი განსხვავებელი განსხვავებელი განსხვავებელი მრავალ', 'it': "Studiamo la selezione delle risposte per la conversazione multi-turno nei chatbot basati sul recupero. Il lavoro esistente o concatena le parole nel contesto o abbina una risposta con un vettore di contesto altamente astratto, che può perdere relazioni tra le parole o informazioni importanti nel contesto. Proponiamo una rete di corrispondenza sequenziale (SMN) per affrontare entrambi i problemi. SMN prima abbina una risposta ad ogni pronuncia nel contesto su più livelli di granularità e distilla importanti informazioni di corrispondenza da ogni coppia come vettore con operazioni di convoluzione e pooling. I vettori vengono poi accumulati in ordine cronologico attraverso una rete neurale ricorrente (RNN) che modella le relazioni tra le espressioni. Il punteggio finale di corrispondenza viene calcolato con gli stati nascosti del RNN. Uno studio empirico su due set di dati pubblici mostra che SMN può superare significativamente i metodi all'avanguardia per la selezione delle risposte nella conversazione a più turni.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame atsako pasirinkimą daugkartiniam pokalbiui paimti pagrįstus chatbotus. Esamas darbas arba sutrumpina išraiškas kontekste, arba galiausiai atitinka atsaką su labai abstraktu konteksto vektoriumi, kuris gali prarasti santykius tarp išraiškų arba svarbią informaciją kontekste. Mes siūlome nuoseklų derinimo tinklą (SMN), kad būtų išspręstos abi problemos. SMN pirmiausia atitinka atsaką su kiekvienu išraišku, atsižvelgiant į daugelį granuliarumo lygių, ir distiliuoja svarbią kiekvienos poros derinamąją informaciją kaip vektorių su konvoliucijos ir sujungimo operacijomis. Po to vektoriai kaupiami chronologine tvarka per pakartotinį nervinį tinklą (RNN), kuris modeliuoja santykius tarp žodžių. Galutinis atitikties rezultatas apskaičiuojamas su paslėptomis RNN būklėmis. Empirinis dviejų viešų duomenų rinkinių tyrimas rodo, kad MVĮ daugkartinio pokalbio metu gali gerokai viršyti pažangiausius atsako atrankos metodus.', 'kk': 'Біз көп айналысу сұрақтарының жауап таңдауын зерттейміз. Бар жұмыс сөздерді контекстікте сәйкес келеді немесе соңында абстракты контексті векторымен сәйкес келеді. Бұл сөздер мен маңызды мәліметтер арасындағы қатынастарды жоғалуға болады. Екі мәселелерді шешуге сәйкес келетін желі (SMN) жұмысын таңдаймыз. SMN біріншіден бірнеше грануляриялық деңгейіндегі әрбір сөздермен жауап сәйкес келетін және әрбір екеуінен кейінгі кейінгі мәліметтерді біріктіру және біріктіру операциялары болатын вектор Векторлар қайталанатын невралдық желі (RNN) арқылы хронологиялық ретінде құрылады. Бұл сөздердің қатынасын үлгілеу үшін. Соңғы сәйкестік нәтижесі RNN жасырылған күйлерімен есептеледі. Екі көпшілік деректер жиынында империялық зерттеу SMN көпшілікті сұрақтарда жауап таңдау арқылы көпшілікті өзгертуге болады.', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме изборот на одговор за мултиобратен разговор во базирани chatbots. Постојаната работа или ги концентрира изразите во контекст или се совпаѓа со одговорот со високоапстрактен контекстен вектор конечно, кој може да изгуби врски меѓу изразите или важни информации во контекст. Ние предложуваме секвенцијална мрежа за совпаѓање (SMN) за решавање на двата проблеми. SMN прво одговара на одговорот со секој израз во контекст на многуте нивоа на грануларност, и дестилира важни одговарачки информации од секој пар како вектор со операции на конволуција и спојување. Векторите потоа се акумулираат во хронолошки ред преку рецидентна нервна мрежа (РНН) која моделира врски меѓу изразите. The final matching score is calculated with the hidden states of the RNN.  Импирската студија на двата јавни податоци покажува дека СМН може значително да ги надмине најсовремените методи за избор на одговор во мултиобратен разговор.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari pemilihan balas untuk perbualan berbilang pusingan dalam pemilihan chatbot berdasarkan. Kerja yang wujud sama ada menyatukan ungkapan dalam konteks atau sepadan dengan balasan dengan vektor konteks yang sangat abstrak akhirnya, yang mungkin kehilangan hubungan antara ungkapan atau maklumat penting dalam konteks. Kami cadangkan rangkaian berkurunan yang sepadan (SMN) untuk mengatasi kedua-dua masalah. SMN pertama padan jawapan dengan setiap ungkapan dalam konteks pada tahap berbilang granulariti, dan membentuk maklumat penting yang sepadan dari setiap pasangan sebagai vektor dengan operasi konvolusi dan pengumpulan. Vektor kemudian dikumpulkan dalam tertib kronologi melalui rangkaian saraf berulang (RNN) yang mana model hubungan antara ungkapan. The final matching score is calculated with the hidden states of the RNN.  kajian empirik pada dua set data awam menunjukkan bahawa SMN boleh melampaui secara signifikan kaedah state-of-the-art untuk pemilihan balas dalam perbualan berbilang pusingan.', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ പ്രതികരണത്തിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു Existing work either concatenates utterances in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the utterances or important information in the context.  നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെയും വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്ന നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രായശ ആദ്യം എസ്എംഎന്\u200d ഓരോ വാക്കിന്റെയും പ്രതികരണത്തോടും ഒരു പ്രതികരണത്തോടും പൊരുതുന്നു. പല നിലകളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഓരോ ജോടില്\u200d നിന് പിന്നീട് വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രം ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു ക്രോണോളജിക്കല്\u200d ക്രോണോളജിക്കല്\u200d ഉത്തരവില്\u200d ശ അവസാനത്തെ പൊരുത്തുന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d രണ്ടു പൊതുവിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d എംഎന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു മാറ്', 'mt': "Aħna nistudjaw l-għażla tar-rispons għal konverżjoni b’diversi dawriet f’chatbots ibbażati fuq l-irkupru. Xogħol eżistenti jew jikkonċentra dikjarazzjonijiet fil-kuntest jew jaqbel ma’ rispons ma’ vettur ta’ kuntest astratt ħafna fl-a ħħar mill-aħħar, li jista’ jitlef ir-relazzjonijiet bejn il-dikjarazzjonijiet jew informazzjoni importanti fil-kuntest. Aħna nipproponu netwerk sekwenzjali ta' tqabbil (SMN) biex nindirizzaw iż-żewġ problemi. L-SMN l-ewwel taqbel ma’ rispons ma’ kull espressjoni fil-kuntest dwar livelli multipli ta’ granularità, u tiddistilla informazzjoni importanti ta’ tqabbil minn kull par bħala vettur b’operazzjonijiet ta’ konvoluzzjoni u ta’ ġbir flimkien. Il-vetturi mbagħad jiġu akkumulati f’ordni kronoloġika permezz ta’ netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN) li jimmudella r-relazzjonijiet fost il-frażijiet. The final matching score is calculated with the hidden states of the RNN.  Studju empiriku fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta pubbliċi juri li l-SMN jista’ jwettaq metodi avvanzati b’mod sinifikanti għall-għażla tar-rispons f’konverżjoni b’diversi drabi.", 'pl': 'Badamy selekcję odpowiedzi dla rozmowy wielokrotnej w chatbotach opartych na odzyskiwaniu. Istniejąca praca łączy wypowiedzi w kontekście lub dopasowuje odpowiedź do bardzo abstrakcyjnego wektora kontekstu, który może utracić relacje między wypowiedziami lub ważne informacje w kontekście. Proponujemy sekwencyjną sieć dopasowania (SMN), aby rozwiązać oba problemy. SMN najpierw dopasowuje odpowiedź do każdej wypowiedzi w kontekście na wielu poziomach granularności i destyluje ważne dopasowanie informacji z każdej pary jako wektor z operacjami zwijania i łączenia. Wektory są następnie gromadzone w porządku chronologicznym za pośrednictwem powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej (RNN), która modeluje relacje między wypowiedziami. Ostateczny wynik dopasowania obliczany jest z ukrytymi stanami RNN. Badania empiryczne na dwóch publicznych zbiorach danych pokazują, że SMN może znacznie przewyższyć najnowocześniejsze metody selekcji odpowiedzi w rozmowie wielokrotnej.', 'ro': 'Studiem selecția răspunsurilor pentru conversația multi-turn în chatbots bazate pe recuperare. Lucrarea existentă fie concatenează cuvintele în context, fie potrivește un răspuns cu un vector context extrem de abstract, care poate pierde relațiile dintre cuvinte sau informații importante în context. Propunem o rețea de potrivire secvențială (SMN) pentru a aborda ambele probleme. SMN potrivește mai întâi un răspuns cu fiecare pronunțare în context pe mai multe niveluri de granularitate și distilează informații importante de potrivire din fiecare pereche ca un vector cu operațiuni de convoluție și pooling. Vectorii sunt apoi acumulați în ordine cronologică printr-o rețea neurală recurentă (RNN), care modelează relațiile dintre pronunțări. Scorul final de potrivire este calculat cu stările ascunse ale RNN. Studiul empiric privind două seturi de date publice arată că SMN poate depăși semnificativ metodele de ultimă generație pentru selectarea răspunsurilor în conversația cu mai multe rânduri.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක තෝරාගැනීමට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් අධාරිත කතා කරන්න. ඉතින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් එක අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම විසඳන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. Name වෙක්ටර්ස් පස්සේ ක්\u200dරෝනෝලෝජික ක්\u200dරමයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාලය (RNN) වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය අන්තිම සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරමාණය RNN ගේ හැංගුණු ස්ථානය සමඟ ගණන් කරලා තියෙනවා. සාමාජික දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් ගැන අධ්\u200dයානය පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ SMN විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික', 'sr': 'Proučavamo izbor odgovora za višeokretan razgovor u prikupljanju baziranih razgovora. Postojeći rad ili potvrđuje reči u kontekstu ili odgovara odgovoru sa veoma abstraktnim kontekstskim vektorom konačno, koji može izgubiti veze među rečenicama ili važnim informacijama u kontekstu. Predlažemo sekvencijalnu mrežu (SMN) da riješimo obe probleme. SMN prvo odgovara svakom rečenju u kontekstu o višestrukim nivoima granularnosti i destilava važne odgovarajuće informacije od svakog par kao vektor sa konvolucijom i okupljanjem operacija. Vektori se onda okupljaju kronološkim redom kroz recidivnu neuralnu mrežu (RNN), koja modeluje odnose među rečenicama. Posljednji rezultat odgovara se računa sa skrivenim državama RNN-a. Empiričko ispitivanje o dva seta javnih podataka pokazuje da SMN može značajno nadmašiti metode stanja umjetnosti za izbor odgovora u razgovoru sa mnogim okretanjem.', 'so': 'Waxaynu baranaynaa doorashooyinka jawaabta ee hadalka kala duduwan oo ku qoran baaraandegista. Shaqo joogtada ah wuxuu ku qoran yahay hadal, ama wuxuu ku habboon yahay jawaab aad u weyn oo ka mid ah wado qalabka hoose, taasoo ugu dambaysta lumin kara xiriirka hadallada ama macluumaad muhiim ah oo ku qoran. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda la isku xiriira (SMN) si aan u qabno labada dhibaato. SMN first matches a response with each utterance in the context on multiple levels of granularity, and distills important matching information from each pair as a vector with convolution and pooling operations.  Sidaa darteed wadooyinka waxaa lagu soo ururiyaa nidaamka qoyskologiga ah oo lagu soo ururiyaa shabakadda neurada ee soo socda (RNN), kaas oo ku sameynaya xiriirka hadallada dhexdooda. Iskaasrada ugu dambeeya ee isku mid ah waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa wadamada qarsoon ee RNN. Waxbarashada jimicsiga ah oo ku qoran labo taariikhda dadweynaha waxaa tusaya in SMN si muhiim ah u sameyn karo qaababka ku saabsan doorashada jawaabta oo kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar svarsval för multi-turn konversation i hämtningsbaserade chatbots. Befintligt arbete sammanfaller antingen yttranden i sammanhang eller matchar ett svar med en mycket abstrakt kontextvektor slutligen, vilket kan förlora relationer mellan yttrandena eller viktig information i sammanhanget. Vi föreslår ett sekventiellt matchningsnätverk (SMN) för att ta itu med båda problemen. SMN matchar först ett svar med varje uttryck i sammanhanget på flera nivåer av granularitet, och destillerar viktig matchande information från varje par som en vektor med konvulution och pooling operationer. Vektorerna ackumuleras sedan i kronologisk ordning genom ett återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN) som modellerar relationer mellan yttrandena. Den slutliga matchningspoängen beräknas med RNN:s dolda tillstånd. Empirisk studie på två offentliga datauppsättningar visar att SMN avsevärt kan överträffa state-of-the-art metoder för svarsval i multi-turn konversation.', 'mn': 'Бид олон эргэлтийн ярилцлагын хариултын сонголтыг судалж байна. Existing work either concatenate words in context or matches a response with an extreme abstract context vector finally, which may lose the relationship between the words or important information in context. Бид хоёр асуудлыг хоорондоо зохицуулахын тулд дараагийн холбоотой сүлжээг (SMN) зөвлөж байна. SMN эхлээд олон хэмжээний гранулалын хариулттай хариулттай холбогдож, хоёр бүрийн хоорондоо холбогдох, холбогдох үйл ажиллагаатай вектор болно. Тэгээд векторууд хронологийн дарааллаар дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ (RNN) дээр цуглуулагддаг. Энэ нь илтгэлийн холбоотой модель юм. Хамгийн сүүлийн тохиолдол нь RNN-ийн нууцтай байдалтай тооцоолж байна. Хоёр олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн багц дээр эзэмшигтэй судалгаа нь SMN нь олон өөрчлөлт ярианд хариу үйлдэл сонголтын тулд үнэхээр урлагийн арга замыг ашиглаж чадна.', 'no': 'Vi studerer utval av svar for fleire område i samtalen som er basert på å henta samtaler. Det eksisterande arbeidet samsvarar anten uttrykk i kontekst eller passar til ein svar med ein ekstra abstrakt kontekstvektor til slutt, som kan mista forholdet mellom uttrykket eller viktig informasjon i konteksten. Vi foreslår ein sekvent tilsvarande nettverk (SMN) for å handsama begge problemar. SMN passar først med ein svar med kvar uttrykk i konteksten på fleire granularitet, og distiller viktige tilsvarande informasjon frå kvar par som vektor med konvolusjon og samlingar. Vektorane blir derfor akumulerte i ein kronologisk rekkjefølgje gjennom ein gjentaande neuralnettverk (RNN) som modeller forholdet mellom uttalene. Den siste passende poeng er rekna ut med skjulte tilstandane i RNN. Empirical study on to public data sets shows that SMN can significantly outperform state-of-the-art methods for response selection in multi turn conversation.', 'ur': 'ہم بہت سی تبر کی باتوں کے لئے جواب کا انتخاب پڑھتے ہیں۔ Existing work either concatenates words in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector, which may lose relationships among the words or important information in the context. ہم دونوں مشکلوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے ایک سکوئنسیل متصل نیٹ ورک (SMN) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ SMN پہلی بار ایک جواب کے ساتھ ہر کلمات کے ساتھ ملے گا، اور ہر جوڑے سے مطابق مطابق معلومات کو کانلوٹ اور پولینگ عملیات کے ساتھ ویکتور کے طور پر جدا کرتا ہے. اس کے بعد ویکتروں کو ایک کرونولوژیک نظام میں جمع کیا جاتا ہے ایک دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹورک (RNN) کے ذریعہ جو کلمات کے درمیان رابطہ نمونڈل کرتے ہیں. آخری مطابق اسکور RNN کے مخفی حالت کے ساتھ شمار کی جاتی ہے. دو عمومی ڈیٹا سٹ پر مصنوعی تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ SMN بہت سی باتوں میں جواب دینے کے لئے استیٹ-آرت طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتا ہے.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பல திரும்ப பேச்சின் பேச்சை மீட்டெடுப்பு அடிப்படையான அரட்டைப் பேச்சில் பதில் தேர்வ தற்போதைய வேலை சொற்களை சூழலில் கூட்டும் அல்லது ஒரு மிகவும் வெற்றிடும் சூழ்நிலை வெக்டாருடன் பொருந்தும் அல்லது முக்கியமான வார்த்தை நாம் தொடர்ந்து பொருந்தும் வலைப்பின்னலை (SMN) இரு பிரச்சனைகளையும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவேண்டும். SMN முதலில் ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் பொருத்தும் பலவிதமான நிலைகளில் உள்ள ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் பொருந்தும், ஒவ்வொரு ஜோடியிலிருந்தும் ப The vectors are then accumulated in a chronological order through a recurrent neural network (RNN) which models relationships among the utterances.  The final matching score is calculated with the hidden state of the RNN. இரண்டு பொது தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் வெறுமையான ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது எஸ்எம்என்பது பல மாற்று உரையாடலில் பதில் தேர்வு தேர்வு செய', 'uz': "Biz bir necha turli chatbotlarni olib tashlash uchun javob tanlanishni o'rganamiz. Name Biz ikkita muammolarni boshqarish uchun keyingi qisqa tarmoq (SMN) talab qilamiz. @ info Keyin vectorlar tarmoq (RNN) bilan bir so'zlar bilan bogʻ'liqlar tarmoqda qo'yiladi. The final matching score is calculated with the hidden states of the RNN.  @ info", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu kết quả cho cuộc đối thoại nhiều lần trong việc tìm ra chat. Việc tồn tại hoặc được liên kết từ ngữ cảnh hoặc kết hợp một phản ứng với một véc- tơ hoàn cảnh cực kỳ trừu tượng, mà có thể mất đi mối quan hệ giữa những từ ngữ hay thông tin quan trọng trong ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới tương ứng nhau (SMN) để giải quyết cả hai vấn đề. Trước tiên SMB khớp với phản ứng với mỗi phát âm trong ngữ cảnh về đa trình độ hạt, và chưng cất những thông tin quan trọng ăn khớp từ mỗi cặp với mỗi véc- tơ với các thao tác xoắn ốc và hợp tác. Các véc- tơ được tích lũy theo thứ tự thời gian thông qua mạng thần kinh liên tục (RNN) mô tả các mối quan hệ giữa các bề mặt. Điểm số khớp cuối cùng được tính toán với trạng thái ẩn của RNN. Các nghiên cứu quét từ chính sách về hai bộ dữ liệu công cộng cho thấy SMB có thể hiện hiệu quả tối đa hơn phương pháp lựa chọn phản ứng trong cuộc trò chuyện nhiều lần.', 'da': "Vi studerer responsvalg til multi-turn samtale i hentningsbaserede chatbots. Eksisterende værker sammenkæder enten udtalelser i kontekst eller matcher endelig et svar med en meget abstrakt kontekstvektor, som kan miste relationer mellem udtalelserne eller vigtige oplysninger i konteksten. Vi foreslår et sekventielt matchingsnetværk (SMN) for at løse begge problemer. SMN matcher først et svar med hver udtalelse i konteksten på flere niveauer af granularitet, og destillerer vigtige matchende oplysninger fra hvert par som en vektor med konvulution og pooling operationer. Vektorerne akkumuleres derefter i kronologisk rækkefølge gennem et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk (RNN), som modellerer relationer mellem udtalelserne. Den endelige matchende score beregnes med RNN's skjulte tilstande. Empirisk undersøgelse af to offentlige datasæt viser, at SMN i høj grad kan overgå state-of-the-art metoder til responsvalg i multi-turn samtale.", 'bg': 'Ние изучаваме избора на отговор за многократен разговор в базирани на извличане чатботи. Съществуващата работа или конкатенира изказванията в контекста, или съвпада отговор с изключително абстрактен контекстен вектор накрая, който може да загуби взаимоотношения между изказванията или важна информация в контекста. Предлагаме последователна мрежа за съвпадение (СМН) за решаване и на двата проблема. SMN първо съвпада с отговор с всяка реч в контекста на множество нива на гранулираност и дестилира важна съвпадаща информация от всяка двойка като вектор с операции на конволюция и обединяване. След това векторите се натрупват в хронологичен ред чрез повтаряща се невронна мрежа (РНН), която моделира взаимоотношенията между изказванията. Крайният резултат за съвпадение се изчислява със скритите състояния на RNN. Емпирично проучване на два обществени набора от данни показва, че може значително да превъзхожда най-съвременните методи за подбор на отговор в многократен разговор.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen responsselectie voor multi-turn conversatie in retrieval gebaseerde chatbots. Bestaand werk brengt uitingen in context aan elkaar of koppelt uiteindelijk een reactie aan een zeer abstracte contextvector, die relaties tussen de uitingen of belangrijke informatie in de context kan verliezen. We stellen een sequential matching network (SMN) voor om beide problemen aan te pakken. SMN matcht eerst een reactie met elke uitspraak in de context op meerdere niveaus van granulariteit, en distilleert belangrijke overeenkomende informatie van elk paar als een vector met convolutie en pooling operaties. De vectoren worden vervolgens in chronologische volgorde verzameld via een recidivierend neuraal netwerk (RNN) dat relaties tussen de uitingen modelleert. De uiteindelijke matching score wordt berekend met de verborgen toestanden van de RNN. Empirisch onderzoek naar twee publieke datasets toont aan dat SMN de state-of-the-art methoden voor responsselectie in multi-turn conversaties aanzienlijk kan overtreffen.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo izbor odgovora za višeokretan razgovor u prikupljanju baziranim razgovorom. Postojeći rad ili potvrđuje izraze u kontekstu ili odgovara odgovoru sa visoko apstraktnim kontekstskim vektorom konačno, koji može izgubiti odnose između izraza ili važnih informacija u kontekstu. Predlažemo sekvencijalnu odgovarajuću mrežu (SMN) da riješi oba problema. SMN prvo odgovara na odgovor sa svakim izrazom u kontekstu o višestrukim razinama granularnosti i destilava važne odgovarajuće informacije od svakog par kao vektor sa konvolucijom i okupljanjem operacija. Vektori se onda okupljaju kronološkim redom kroz rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN), koja modeluje odnose između izraza. Posljednji rezultat odgovarajućeg se računa sa skrivenim državama RNN-a. Empirička ispitivanja o dva seta javnih podataka pokazuje da SMN može značajno nadmašiti metode stanja umjetnosti za izbor odgovora u višestrukom razgovoru.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Antwortauswahl für Multi-Turn-Gespräche in Retrieval-basierten Chatbots. Bestehende Arbeiten verketten Äußerungen entweder im Kontext oder matchen schließlich eine Antwort mit einem hochabstrakten Kontextvektor, der Beziehungen zwischen Äußerungen oder wichtige Informationen im Kontext verlieren kann. Wir schlagen ein sequentielles Matching-Netzwerk (SMN) vor, um beide Probleme zu lösen. SMN vergleicht zunächst eine Antwort mit jeder Äußerung im Kontext auf mehreren Granularitätsebenen und destilliert wichtige übereinstimmende Informationen von jedem Paar als Vektor mit Faltungs- und Pooling-Operationen. Die Vektoren werden dann in chronologischer Reihenfolge durch ein wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerk (RNN) akkumuliert, das Beziehungen zwischen den Äußerungen modelliert. Der endgültige Matching Score wird mit den versteckten Zuständen des RNN berechnet. Empirische Untersuchungen an zwei öffentlichen Datensätzen zeigen, dass SMN moderne Methoden zur Antwortauswahl in Mehrturngesprächen deutlich übertreffen kann.', 'ko': '우리는 검색 기반의 채팅 로봇 중 다륜 대화의 반응 선택을 연구했다.기존의 연구는 언어 환경의 말을 연결하거나 최종적으로 하나의 응답을 고도의 추상적인 언어 환경의 양과 일치시키면 언어 간의 관계나 언어 환경의 중요한 정보를 잃어버릴 수 있다.우리는 이 두 문제를 해결하기 위해 순차적 일치망(SMN)을 제시했다.SMN은 우선 여러 입도 단계에서 하나의 응답을 상하문에 있는 모든 언어와 일치하게 하고, 권적과 연못 연산을 통해 모든 언어에서 중요한 일치 정보를 추출하여 벡터로 삼는다.그리고 벡터는 역귀신경망(RNN)을 통해 시간순으로 누적되며 이 네트워크는 대화어 간의 관계를 모델링한다.최종 일치 점수는 RNN의 숨겨진 상태를 기준으로 계산됩니다.두 개의 공공 데이터 집합에 대한 실증 연구에 따르면 다중 라운드 대화에서 SMN은 최신 반응 선택 방법보다 현저히 우수할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari seleksi respon untuk percakapan multi-putaran dalam repot-repot chatbot. Pekerjaan yang ada sama ada menyatukan ucapan dalam konteks atau cocok dengan respon dengan vektor konteks yang sangat abstrak akhirnya, yang mungkin kehilangan hubungan antara ucapan atau informasi penting dalam konteks. Kami mengusulkan jaringan sekwensial yang cocok (SMN) untuk mengatasi kedua masalah. SMN pertama cocok dengan respon dengan setiap ucapan dalam konteks pada berbagai tingkat granularitas, dan mencoba mencoba informasi penting yang cocok dari setiap pasangan sebagai vektor dengan operasi konvolusi dan pengumpulan. Vektor kemudian dikumpulkan dalam urutan kronologi melalui jaringan saraf (RNN) yang berulang-ulang yang model hubungan antara ungkapan. Skor terakhir yang cocok dihitung dengan keadaan tersembunyi RNN. Penelitian imperial pada dua set data publik menunjukkan bahwa SMN dapat melampaui batas yang signifikan dari metode state-of-the-art untuk seleksi respon dalam percakapan berbeda-berbeda.', 'tr': "Biz birnäçe gezek sohbetleri üçin jogap saýlawy çekip otyrys. Existen işe ya da sözleri bir kontekstde ylalaýar ya da üstüne abstrakt kontekst vektöre eşleýär. Bu sözler arasynda ýada möhüm maglumaty ýitir. Biz indiki meseleleri çözmek üçin yzarlanýan şebeke (SMN) teklip edip görýäris. SMN ilkinji gezek granularlyk derejesinde her sözleri bilen bir cevap eşleýär we konvolusiýa we pooling operasyonlary bilen her çiftden möhüm eşleşen malümaty tanyşdyrýar. Vektörler, tekrarlanan bir nöral a ğ (RNN) tarafından kronolojik sıralarda toplanırlar. Bu, ifadeler arasında örnekler. Iň soňky metin sany RNN'iň gizli durumlary bilen hasaplanýar İki jemi maglumat düzümlerinde empirik öwrenme SMN köp çarpyşynda jogap saýlamak üçin möhüm bir şekilde çykyp biljekdigini görkez.", 'fa': 'ما انتخاب پاسخ را برای صحبت چندین بار در صحبت\u200cهای بنیاد گیری مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. کاری که وجود دارد یا سخنرانی را در محیط مشترک می کند یا با پاسخ با یک ویکتور محیط بسیار مطلق مشترک می کند، که ممکن است رابطه بین سخنرانی یا اطلاعات مهم در محیط از دست داد. ما یک شبکه (SMN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا به هر دو مشکل حل کند. SMN اول با هر سخنرانی در محیط بسیاری از سطح granularity با پاسخ می\u200cگیرد و از هر جفت اطلاعات مسابقه مهم را به عنوان ویکتور با عملیات ترکیب و ترکیب جدا می\u200cکند. بعدش ویکتورها در یک دستور کرونولوژیکی با یک شبکه عصبی (RNN) بازگشت جمع می\u200cشوند که رابطه\u200cهای مربوط به کلمات مدل می\u200cکند. امتیاز نهایی که با وضعیت مخفی RNN برخورد می\u200cکند محاسبه می\u200cشود. مطالعه امپراتیک در دو مجموعه داده عمومی نشان می دهد که SMN می تواند به طور کلی از روش\u200cهای اولیه هنری برای انتخاب پاسخ در مکالمه\u200cهای مختلف تبدیل کند.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek antwoord kies vir veelvuldige draai gesprekslys in herhaal gebaseerde gesprekslys. Bestaande werk beteken of beteken uitspraak in konteks of ooreenstem met 'n antwoord met' n baie abstrakte konteksvektor eindelik, wat dalk mag verloor relasies onder die uitspraak of belangrike inligting in die konteks. Ons voorstel 'n sekwensiele ooreenstemmende netwerk (SMN) om beide probleme te adres. SMN eerste ooreenstem 'n antwoord met elke uitdrukking in die konteks op veelvuldige vlakke van granulariteit, en distiliseer belangrik ooreenstemmende inligting van elke paar as 'n vektor met konvolusie en pooling operasies. Die vektore word dan in 'n chronologiese volgorde opgemaak deur 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk (RNN) wat model verhouding onder die uitdrukkings is. Die eindelike ooreenstemmende telling is bereken met die versteke staatste van die RNN. Enige studie op twee openbare data stelle vertoon dat SMN betekeurig kan uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes vir antwoord keuse in multi-turn gesprek.", 'sw': 'Tunafundisha uchaguzi wa majibu kwa mazungumzo mengi katika mazungumzo yanayotokana na upya. Existing work either concatenates utterances in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the utterances or important information in the context.  Tunazipendekeza mtandao unaohusiana na mfululizo (SMN) kuhusiana na matatizo yote. Kwanza SMN hufanana na majibu ya kila hotuba katika muktadha wa ngazi mbalimbali za ukarimu, na anachambua taarifa muhimu zinazofanana na kila wawili kama vector yenye vurugu na shughuli za uchunguzi. Vectors are then accumulated in order of chronology through a recurrence network of neural neural (RNN) which models relations among the words. Kiwango cha mwisho kinachofanana kinahesabiwa na majimbo ya siri ya RNN. Utafiti wa kipekee katika seti mbili za takwimu za umma unaonyesha kwamba SMN inaweza kufanya mazungumzo makubwa ya hali ya sanaa ya uchaguzi wa majibu katika mazungumzo mengi.', 'am': 'We study response selection for multi-turn conversation in retrieval based chatbots.  የአሁኑ ሥራ በንግግር ወይም በአካባቢው መረጃ መካከል ግንኙነትን ያሳርፋል፡፡ በሁለቱ ጉዳዮች ላይ ለመጠየቅ የሚቀጥለው መረብ (SMN) እናሳልጋለን፡፡ SMN በመጀመሪያ በአካባቢ ደረጃዎች ላይ ከሁሉም ንግግር ጋር በአካባቢ ደረጃዎች ጋር በመስጠት ይተካክላል፤ እና ከሁለቱም ጋር የሚያስተካክል መረጃዎችን ከዋና በመጠቀም እና በጉዳይ አካባቢ እና በመጠቀም ማቀናጃ ያስተካክላል። ከዚህም በኋላ vectors በክሮኖሎጂ ክፍል ላይ የተሰበሰቡ ናቸው፤ በንግግር መካከል ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልጋቸው የነዌብ መረብ (RNN) የመጨረሻው የmatch score with the hidden state of the RNN. በሁለት የህዝብ ዳታ ማህበረሰብ ላይ ትምህርት ማስታወቂያውን SMN በብዙ ልዩ ልዩ ንግግር ውስጥ የመስመር ሥርዓት-የ- art ሥርዓት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք արձագանքների ընտրությունը բազմահատուկ զրույցի համար վերադարձնելու հիմնված շաթբոտների մեջ: Existing work either concatenates utterances in context or matches a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the utterances or important information in the context.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք հաջորդական համապատասխանող ցանց (SMN) երկու խնդիրների լուծման համար: SMN first matches a response with each utterance in the context on multiple levels of granularity, and distills important matching information from each pair as a vector with convolution and pooling operations.  Այնուհետև վեկտորները հավաքվում են քրոնոլոգիական հաջորդականությամբ մի կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի (ՌՆՆ) միջոցով, որը մոդելավորում է արտահայտությունների միջև հարաբերությունները: Վերջին համապատասխանման գնահատականը հաշվարկվում է ՌՆԹ-ի թաքնված վիճակների հետ: Երկու հանրային տվյալների համակարգի կայսրական ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ SMN-ը կարող է շատ ավելի բարձր մեթոդներ կատարել պատասխանների ընտրության համար բազմահատված խոսակցության ժամանակ:', 'sq': 'We study response selection for multi-turn conversation in retrieval based chatbots.  Puna ekzistuese ose përmbush shprehjet në kontekst ose përputhet me një përgjigje me një vektor konteksti shumë abstrakt më në fund, i cili mund të humbasë marrëdhëniet midis shprehjeve apo informacionit të rëndësishëm në kontekst. Ne propozojmë një rrjet të përshtatshëm sekuencial (SMN) për të trajtuar të dy problemet. SMN së pari përputhet me një përgjigje me çdo shprehje në kontekst mbi nivele të shumta granulariteti dhe distillon informacion të rëndësishëm përputhje nga çdo çift si një vektor me operacione konvolutie dhe bashkimi. Vektorët akumulohen në një rend kronologjik nëpërmjet një rrjeti neural të përsëritur (RNN) që modelon marrëdhëniet midis shprehjeve. Rezultati përfundimtar i përputhjes llogaritet me gjendjet e fshehta të RNN. Studimi perandor mbi dy grupe të dhënash publike tregon se SMN mund të kalojë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme metodat më të larta për zgjedhjen e përgjigjes në bisedë me shumëkthesa.', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu dönüş söhbətlərinin cavab seçməsini təhsil edirik. Əvvəlki işdə ya sözləri məlumatlarda birləşdirir ya da yüksək abstrakt kontekst vektoru ilə birləşdirir, bu sözlərin və ya möhüm məlumatların arasındakı ilişkisini itirər. Biz hər ikisinin problemlərini çəkmək üçün sevgili şəbəkə (SMN) təklif edirik. SMN ilk dəfə granuların çoxlu səviyyələrində hər sözlə cavab verir və hər çift ilə birləşdirilmiş və birləşdirilmiş işləri olan vektor olaraq möhüm məlumatları ayırır. Sonra vektorilər, sözlərin arasındakı bağlantıları modelləşdirən bir nöral a ğ (RNN) vasitəsilə kronolojik səviyyədə toplanılır. Sonuncu eşitmə nöqtəsi RNN gizli durumları ilə hesablanır. İki halkı məlumat quruluğunda İmpariki təhsil göstərir ki, SMN çoxlu dönüş müzakirələrində cavab seçmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş müzakirə metodlarını çox üstün edə bilər.', 'bn': 'আমরা পুনরুদ্ধারের ভিত্তিক চ্যাট্বটগুলোতে অনেক প্রতিক্রিয়া নির্বাচনের প্রতিক্রিয়া গবেষণা করছি। বিদ্যমান কাজের ক্ষেত্রে কোন ভাষার কথাবার্তা একত্রিত করে অথবা অত্যন্ত অস্বীকৃতির প্রতিক্রিয়ার সাথে একটি প্রতিক্রিয়ার মিলে যায়, যা শব্দে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি দুটো সমস্যার ব্যাপারে পরবর্তী মিলিয়ে যাওয়া নেটওয়ার্ক (এসএমএন)। এসএমএন প্রথমে প্রত্যেক বক্তৃতার সাথে প্রতিটি প্রতিক্রিয়ার সাথে প্রতিক্রিয়ার সাথে মিলে যায়, এবং প্রত্যেক জোড়ার সাথে মিলে যায় গুরুত্ এরপর ভেক্টররা পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN) মাধ্যমে একটি ক্রোনোলজিক আদেশে একত্রিত হয়, যা শব্দের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের মডেল করে। RNN এর গোপন রাষ্ট্রের সাথে চূড়ান্ত মিলিয়ে স্কোর গণনা করা হয়েছে। দুই পাবলিক ডাটা সেটে সামাজিক গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে এসএমএন অনেক প্রতিক্রিয়া নির্বাচনের জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া নির্বাচনের জন্য স্ট', 'ca': "Estudem la selecció de respostes per a conversar múltiples vegades en chatbots basats en recuperació. El treball existent concatena les expressions en el context o coincideix amb un vector de context molt abstract, que pot perdre relacions entre les expressions o informació important en el context. Proposem una xarxa seqüencial de combinació (SMN) per abordar ambdós problemes. SMN primer coincideix amb cada expressió en el context de múltiples nivells de granularitat, i destilla informació important que coincideix de cada parell com un vector amb operacions de convolució i agrupament. Els vectors s'acumulen en ordre cronològic a través d'una xarxa neural recurrent (RNN) que modela les relacions entre les expressions. La puntuació final es calcula amb els estats ocults del RNN. Un estudi empíric sobre dos conjunts de dades públices mostra que la SMN pot superar significativament els mètodes més avançats per a seleccionar resposta en converses múltiples.", 'bs': 'Proučavamo izbor odgovora za višeokretan razgovor u prikupljanju baziranih razgovora. Postojeći rad ili potvrđuje izraze u kontekstu ili odgovara odgovoru sa visoko abstraktivnim kontekstskim vektorom konačno, koji može izgubiti odnose među izrazima ili važnim informacijama u kontekstu. Predlažemo sekvencijalnu odgovarajuću mrežu (SMN) da riješi oba problema. SMN prvo odgovara na odgovor sa svakim izrazom u kontekstu o višestrukim nivoima granularnosti i destilava važne odgovarajuće informacije od svakog par kao vektor sa konvolucijom i okupljanjem operacija. Vektori se onda okupljaju kronološkim redom kroz rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN), koja modeluje odnose između izraza. Posljednji rezultat odgovara se računa sa skrivenim državama RNN-a. Empirička ispitivanja o dva seta javnih podataka pokazuje da SMN može značajno nadmašiti metode stanja umjetnosti za izbor odgovora u razgovoru s mnogim okretanjem.', 'cs': 'Studujeme výběr odpovědí pro multi-turn konverzaci v retrieval založených chatbotech. Existující práce buď řetězí výroky v kontextu nebo nakonec srovnává odpověď s vysoce abstraktním kontextovým vektorem, který může ztratit vztahy mezi výroky nebo důležité informace v kontextu. Pro řešení obou problémů navrhujeme sekvenční matching síť (SMN). SMN nejprve porovnává odpověď s každým výrokem v kontextu na více úrovních granularity a destiluje důležité shodné informace z každého páru jako vektor s operacemi konvoluce a sdružení. Vektory jsou pak akumulovány v chronologickém pořadí prostřednictvím rekurentní neuronové sítě (RNN), která modeluje vztahy mezi výroky. Konečné skóre shody se vypočítá se skrytými stavy RNN. Empirická studie na dvou veřejných datových sadách ukazuje, že SMN může výrazně překonat nejmodernější metody výběru odpovědí v konverzaci s více otáčkami.', 'et': 'Uurime reaktsioonide valikut mitmekäiguliseks vestluseks otsingupõhistes chatbotides. Olemasolev töö kas konkateneerib väljendeid kontekstis või sobib lõpuks vastuse väga abstraktse kontekstivektoriga, mis võib kaotada väljendite vahelised seosed või olulise informatsiooni kontekstis. Me pakume välja järjestikuse sobitamise võrgu (SMN), et lahendada mõlemad probleemid. SMN vastab kõigepealt iga väljendiga mitme granulaarsuse taseme kontekstis ja destilleerib iga paari olulise sobitamise teabe vektorina koos konvolutsiooni- ja ühendustoimingutega. Vektorid akumuleeritakse kronoloogilises järjekorras läbi korduva närvivõrgu (RNN), mis modelleerib väljendite vahelisi suhteid. Lõplik vastavuskoor arvutatakse varjatud olekutega RNN. Kahe avaliku andmekogumi empiiriline uuring näitab, et SMN suudab märkimisväärselt ületada kaasaegseid meetodeid vastuse valimiseks mitmekäigulises vestluses.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme vastausten valintaa monimutkaiseen keskusteluun hakupohjaisissa chatboteissa. Olemassa oleva työ joko yhdistää lauseet kontekstissa tai yhdistää vasteen erittäin abstraktiin kontekstivektoriin, mikä voi menettää lauseiden väliset suhteet tai tärkeän tiedon kontekstissa. Ehdotamme peräkkäistä vastaavuusverkkoa (SMN) molempien ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi. SMN vastaa ensin kunkin lauseen vastetta kontekstissa useilla granulaarisuustasoilla ja tislaa tärkeät täsmäytystiedot jokaisesta parista vektorina konvoluatio- ja yhdistämistoiminnoilla. Tämän jälkeen vektorit kerääntyvät kronologisessa järjestyksessä toistuvan hermoverkon (RNN) kautta, joka mallintaa lauseiden välisiä suhteita. Lopputulos lasketaan RNN:n piilotetuilla tiloilla. Empiirinen tutkimus kahdesta julkisesta aineistosta osoittaa, että SMN voi merkittävästi päihittää uusimmat vastevalintamenetelmät monivuoroisessa keskustelussa.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé milih tanggal nggambar kanggo tukang batal Saying Monday Name vectors Open langgar langgar sampeyan karo data Publik iki bakal dumadhi iki bakal seneng pisan SMN iso dianggawe barang langgar stad-sampeyan kanggo langgar langgar banter', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים בחירת תגובה לשיחה במספר פעמים בשיחות על בסיס השיגור. עבודה קיימת או משתלבת ביטויים בקשר או מתאימה לתגובה עם וקטור הקשר מאוד אוסטרקטי סוף סוף, שיכול לאבד מערכות יחסים בין ביטויים או מידע חשוב בקשר. We propose a sequential matching network (SMN) to address both problems.  SMN מתאים קודם לתגובה עם כל מבטה בקשר על רמות רבות של granularity, ומדחף מידע משותף חשוב מכל זוג כווקטור עם פעילות משתובבות ובריכוב. ואז הוקטורים אוספים בסדר כרונולוגי באמצעות רשת עצבית חוזרת (RNN) שמדוגמת מערכות יחסים בין המילים. נקודת התאמה האחרונה נחשבת עם המצבים החבויים של RNN. מחקר אימפריקלי על שני קבוצות נתונים ציבוריים מראה ש SMN יכול להעביר באופן משמעותי את שיטות המיוחדות למבחרת תגובה במהלך שיחה במספר פעמים.', 'ha': "Munã karatun zaɓen majibu wa mazaɓa na dabam-daban a cikin gareshi masu bastara. Yin aikin da ke gaba, ko ya haɗi magana cikin mazaɓa, ko ya yi daidai da jibo da mai cire matsayi mai girma na kanana, da ƙarshen, yana iya kusa ya ɓace danganta tsakanin maganar ko kuma ma'abũcin muhimma cikin muhimmada. Tuna goyyar da wata shirin bayani da ke daidaita (SMN) don su address abubuwa biyu. SMN first matches a response with each utterance in the context on multiple levels of granularity, and distills important matching information from each pair as a vector with convolution and pooling operations.  Ana haɗa sakan hanya cikin wani taɓa na chronogi da wata shirin neural mai daɗi (RNN) wanda motsi ke samu'a da danganiyar magana. Ana ƙidãya scori ta ƙara mai daidaita yana da halin da aka ɓõye na RNN. Empirical research on data-set biyu na ɗabi'a yana nuna cewa SMN can mai significant outdo halin-the-art-metode wa zaɓen ajibu cikin mazaɓan-daban-daban.", 'sk': 'Preučujemo izbiro odzivov za večobratni pogovor v chatbotih, ki temeljijo na iskanju. Obstoječe delo bodisi povezuje izjave v kontekstu ali končno ujema odziv z zelo abstraktnim kontekstnim vektorjem, ki lahko izgubi odnose med izjavami ali pomembne informacije v kontekstu. Predlagamo zaporedno ujemanje omrežja (SMN) za reševanje obeh težav. SMN najprej ujema odziv z vsakim izgovorom v kontekstu na več ravneh granularnosti in destilira pomembne ujemajoče informacije iz vsakega para kot vektor z operacijami konvolucije in združevanja. Vektorji se nato kopičijo v kronološkem vrstnem redu skozi ponavljajočo se nevronsko omrežje (RNN), ki modelira odnose med izrazi. Končni rezultat ujemanja se izračuna s skritimi stanji RNN. Empirična študija na dveh javnih naborih podatkov kaže, da lahko SMN bistveno presega najsodobnejše metode za izbiro odzivov v več obratih.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་འཚོལ་བའི་གླེང་མོལ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་གཏོང་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་ལ་གནད་སྤེལ་བརྗོད་པ། Existing work either concatenate the utterances in context or match a response with a highly abstract context vector finally, which may lose relationships among the utterances or important information in the context. ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲངས་མེད་དྲ་བ(SMN)ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། SMN དང་པོ་དེ་ཚོར་མཐུན་དང་ཐུབ་རྗེས་ཐོག་དང་མཉམ་ཕྱོགས་སུ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན། དབྱེ་རིས་འདི་ཚོང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་རྣམས་མཐུད་པའི་གོ་རིམ་ལྟར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་ཡོད། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་མིན་གྲངས་ནི་RNN ཡི་ཡིབ་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་ཚད་དང་རྩིས་བཏུབ་ཡོད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ནང་དུ་SMN་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་བཀོད་ཐུབ་'}
{'en': 'Found in Translation : Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translations', 'ar': 'وجدت في الترجمة: إعادة بناء أشجار لغة النشوء والتطور من الترجمات', 'pt': 'Encontrado em Tradução: Reconstruindo Árvores de Linguagem Filogenética a partir de Traduções', 'es': 'Encontrado en la traducción: Reconstrucción de árboles lingüísticos filogenéticos a partir de traducciones', 'fr': 'Trouvé dans Translation\xa0: Reconstruction des arbres de langage phylogénétiques à partir de traductions', 'ja': '翻訳で見つかった：翻訳からの系統言語ツリーの再構築', 'zh': '在译中发现的,从译中重建系统发育言语树', 'ru': 'Найдено в переводе: Реконструкция филогенетических деревьев языка из переводов', 'hi': 'अनुवाद में पाया गया: अनुवाद से Phylogenetic भाषा के पेड़ों का पुनर्निर्माण', 'ga': 'Aimsíodh in Aistriúchán: Crainn Teanga Phylogenetic a Athchruthú ó Aistriúcháin', 'ka': 'Translation: Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translations', 'hu': 'Talált a fordításban: Phylogenetic Language Trees rekonstrukciója a fordításokból', 'el': 'Βρέθηκε στη μετάφραση: Ανασυγκρότηση Φυλογητικών Γλωσσικών Δέντρων από Μεταφράσεις', 'it': 'Trovato in traduzione: Ricostruire alberi di linguaggio filogenetico dalle traduzioni', 'kk': 'Аударуда табылған: Филогетикалық тіл бұтақтарын аудармалардан қайта құру', 'lt': 'Rasta vertimo raštu: Filogenetinių kalbų medžių rekonstrukcija iš vertimų', 'mk': 'Најдено во превод: реконструкција на филогенетски јазички дрвја од преводи', 'ms': 'Ditemukan dalam Terjemahan: Membangun Semula Pohon Bahasa Filogenetik Dari Terjemahan', 'mt': 'Misjuba fit-Traduzzjoni: Ir-Rikostruzzjoni tas-Siġar tal-Lingwa Filoġenetika mit-Traduzzjonijiet', 'ml': 'Found in Translation: Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translations', 'mn': 'Үүнийг орчуулан: Филогетикийн хэл модыг орчуулан', 'ro': 'Găsit în traducere: Reconstruirea copacilor limbajului filogenetic din traduceri', 'no': 'Fann i omsetjinga: Gjenopprettar filogenetiske språkttre frå omsetjingar', 'pl': 'Znalezione w tłumaczeniu: Rekonstrukcja drzew językowych filogenetycznych z tłumaczeń', 'sr': 'Našli su u prevodu: Rekonstrukcija filogenetičkih jezičkih drveta iz prevoda', 'sv': 'Hittade i översättning: Rekonstruera fylogenetiska språkträd från översättningar', 'si': 'වාර්ථාවේ හොයාගත්තා: Phylgenetical language Trees from translation', 'so': 'Turjumista', 'ta': '@ info', 'ur': 'Translation: Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translation', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Tìm thấy trong dịch: Reconstruction Phylogenetic language Trees from Translations', 'bg': 'Намерено в превод: Възстановяване на филогенетични езикови дървета от преводи', 'nl': 'Gevonden in vertaling: Het reconstrueren van fylogenetische taalbomen uit vertalingen', 'da': 'Fundet i oversættelse: Genopbygning af fylogenetiske sprogtræer fra oversættelser', 'hr': 'Našli su u prevodu: Rekonstrukcija filogenitskih jezičkih drveta iz prevoda', 'id': 'Ditemukan dalam Translation: Membangun kembali Pohon Bahasa Filogenetik dari Translations', 'de': 'Gefunden in Übersetzung: Rekonstruktion phylogenetischer Sprachbäume aus Übersetzungen', 'fa': 'در ترجمه پیدا شده: بازسازی درختهای زبان فیلوژنتیکی از ترجمه\u200cها', 'af': 'Vertaling gevind in Vertaling: Herkonstruksie Phylogeneese Taal Boom van Vertaling', 'ko': '번역 중 발견: 번역에서 시스템 발육 언어 트리 재구성', 'sw': 'Imepatikana katika Tafsiri: Kujenga tena mti wa lugha ya Phylogenetic kutoka Tafsiri', 'tr': 'Terjime edip tapyldy: Faýlogenetik diller täze terjime eden', 'sq': 'E gjetur në Traktat: Rindërtimi i pemëve filogjenetike të gjuhës nga Traktatet', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Գտնվում է թարգմանության մեջ. թարգմանության ֆիլոգետիկ լեզվի ծառերի վերականգնումը', 'az': '呥牣쎼淉饤즙⁴慰쒱汭쒱얟㨠呥牣쎼淉饬즙牤즙渠晩汯来湥瑩欠摩氠懄齡捬慲쒱滄넠祥湩擉饮ⁱ畲懅齤쒱牭愊', 'bn': 'অনুবাদে পাওয়া গেছে: অনুবাদ থেকে ফিলোজেন্টিক ভাষা বৃক্ষ পুনরায় নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Našli su u prevodu: Rekonstrukcija filogenitskih jezičkih drveta iz prevoda', 'cs': 'Nalezeno v překladu: Rekonstrukce fylogenetických jazykových stromů z překladů', 'et': 'Leitud tõlkes: Fülogeneetiliste keelepuude rekonstrueerimine tõlketest', 'ca': 'Found in Translation: Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translations', 'fi': 'Löydetty käännöksessä: Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translations', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'sk': 'Najdeno v prevodu: Rekonstrukcija filogenetičnih jezikovnih dreves iz prevodov', 'bo': 'Found in Translation: Reconstructing Phylogenetic Language Trees from Translation', 'he': 'מוצאת בתרגום: שיקום עצי שפת פילוגנטית מתרגמים'}
{'en': 'Translation has played an important role in trade, law, commerce, politics, and literature for thousands of years. Translators have always tried to be invisible ; ideal translations should look as if they were written originally in the target language. We show that traces of the source language remain in the translation product to the extent that it is possible to uncover the history of the source language by looking only at the translation. Specifically, we automatically reconstruct phylogenetic language trees from monolingual texts (translated from several source languages). The signal of the source language is so powerful that it is retained even after two phases of translation. This strongly indicates that source language interference is the most dominant characteristic of translated texts, overshadowing the more subtle signals of universal properties of translation.', 'ar': 'لعبت الترجمة دورًا مهمًا في التجارة والقانون والتجارة والسياسة والأدب لآلاف السنين. لقد حاول المترجمون دائمًا أن يكونوا غير مرئيين ؛ يجب أن تبدو الترجمات المثالية كما لو كانت مكتوبة في الأصل باللغة الهدف. نظهر أن آثار اللغة المصدر تظل في منتج الترجمة إلى الحد الذي يمكن فيه الكشف عن تاريخ اللغة المصدر من خلال النظر فقط في الترجمة. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم تلقائيًا بإعادة بناء أشجار لغة النشوء والتطور من نصوص أحادية اللغة (مترجمة من عدة لغات مصدر). إشارة اللغة المصدر قوية للغاية بحيث يتم الاحتفاظ بها حتى بعد مرحلتين من الترجمة. يشير هذا بقوة إلى أن تداخل لغة المصدر هو السمة الأكثر شيوعًا للنصوص المترجمة ، مما يلقي بظلاله على الإشارات الأكثر دقة للخصائص العالمية للترجمة.', 'fr': "La traduction joue un rôle important dans le commerce, le droit, le commerce, la politique et la littérature depuis des milliers d'années. Les traducteurs ont toujours essayé d'être invisibles\xa0; les traductions idéales devraient avoir l'air d'avoir été écrites à l'origine dans la langue cible. Nous montrons que des traces de la langue source restent dans le produit de traduction dans la mesure où il est possible de découvrir l'historique de la langue source en regardant uniquement la traduction. Plus précisément, nous reconstruisons automatiquement des arbres de langues phylogénétiques à partir de textes monolingues (traduits à partir de plusieurs langues sources). Le signal de la langue source est si puissant qu'il est conservé même après deux phases de traduction. Cela indique clairement que l'interférence de la langue source est la caractéristique la plus dominante des textes traduits, éclipsant les signaux plus subtils des propriétés universelles de la traduction.", 'pt': 'A tradução tem desempenhado um papel importante no comércio, no direito, no comércio, na política e na literatura há milhares de anos. Os tradutores sempre tentaram ser invisíveis; as traduções ideais devem parecer que foram escritas originalmente no idioma de destino. Mostramos que vestígios da língua de partida permanecem no produto tradutório na medida em que é possível desvendar a história da língua de partida olhando apenas para a tradução. Especificamente, reconstruímos automaticamente árvores filogenéticas de linguagem a partir de textos monolíngues (traduzidos de vários idiomas de origem). O sinal do idioma de origem é tão poderoso que é mantido mesmo após duas fases de tradução. Isso indica fortemente que a interferência do idioma de origem é a característica mais dominante dos textos traduzidos, ofuscando os sinais mais sutis das propriedades universais da tradução.', 'es': 'La traducción ha desempeñado un papel importante en el comercio, el derecho, el comercio, la política y la literatura durante miles de años. Los traductores siempre han intentado ser invisibles; las traducciones ideales deberían parecer escritas originalmente en el idioma de destino. Demostramos que quedan rastros del idioma de origen en el producto de traducción en la medida en que es posible descubrir la historia del idioma de origen mirando solo la traducción. Específicamente, reconstruimos automáticamente árboles lingüísticos filogenéticos a partir de textos monolingües (traducidos de varios idiomas de origen). La señal del idioma de origen es tan potente que se mantiene incluso después de dos fases de traducción. Esto indica claramente que la interferencia del idioma fuente es la característica más dominante de los textos traducidos, eclipsando las señales más sutiles de las propiedades universales de la traducción.', 'hi': 'अनुवाद ने हजारों वर्षों से व्यापार, कानून, वाणिज्य, राजनीति और साहित्य में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाई है। अनुवादकों ने हमेशा अदृश्य होने की कोशिश की है; आदर्श अनुवाद ों को ऐसा दिखना चाहिए जैसे कि वे मूल रूप से लक्षित भाषा में लिखे गए थे। हम दिखाते हैं कि स्रोत भाषा के निशान अनुवाद उत्पाद में इस हद तक बने रहते हैं कि केवल अनुवाद को देखकर स्रोत भाषा के इतिहास को उजागर करना संभव है। विशेष रूप से, हम स्वचालित रूप से मोनोलिंगुअल ग्रंथों (कई स्रोत भाषाओं से अनुवादित) से फाइलोजेनेटिक भाषा के पेड़ों का पुनर्निर्माण करते हैं। स्रोत भाषा का संकेत इतना शक्तिशाली है कि अनुवाद के दो चरणों के बाद भी इसे बनाए रखा जाता है। यह दृढ़ता से इंगित करता है कि स्रोत भाषा हस्तक्षेप अनुवादित ग्रंथों की सबसे प्रमुख विशेषता है, जो अनुवाद के सार्वभौमिक गुणों के अधिक सूक्ष्म संकेतों को ढंकता है।', 'ja': '翻訳は、貿易、法律、商業、政治、文学において数千年にわたって重要な役割を果たしてきました。翻訳者は常に見えないようにしようとしてきました。理想的な翻訳は、ターゲット言語で書かれたもののように見える必要があります。翻訳を見るだけでソース言語の歴史を明らかにすることができる程度に、翻訳製品にソース言語の痕跡が残っていることを示しています。具体的には、単一言語のテキスト（いくつかのソース言語から翻訳）から系統言語の木を自動的に再構築します。ソース言語の信号は非常に強力で、2段階の翻訳後も保持されます。これは、ソース言語の干渉が翻訳されたテキストの最も支配的な特徴であり、翻訳の普遍的な特性のより微妙なシグナルを覆していることを強く示しています。', 'ru': 'Перевод играл важную роль в торговле, праве, торговле, политике и литературе на протяжении тысяч лет. Переводчики всегда старались быть невидимыми; идеальные переводы должны выглядеть так, как если бы они были изначально написаны на целевом языке. Показано, что следы исходного языка остаются в переводе настолько, что раскрыть историю исходного языка можно только взглядом на перевод. В частности, мы автоматически реконструируем филогенетические языковые деревья из одноязычных текстов (переведенных с нескольких исходных языков). Сигнал исходного языка настолько мощный, что он сохраняется даже после двух этапов перевода. Это четко указывает на то, что интерференция исходного языка является наиболее доминирующей характеристикой переведенных текстов, затмевая более тонкие сигналы универсальных свойств перевода.', 'zh': '数千年间,译在贸易、法律、商业、政治、文学之中。 翻译人员辄隐形。 译者宜似其初用语也。 我们表明,源语的痕迹存在译产物中,至于可以仅看译来揭示源语的史书。 具体来说,从单语文本(译数源)重建系统育语树。 其强如此,至于两译之后亦得存焉。 此强言干者,译本之大体,掩译者之更微也。', 'ga': 'Bhí ról tábhachtach ag an aistriúchán sa trádáil, sa dlí, sa tráchtáil, sa pholaitíocht agus sa litríocht leis na mílte bliain. Rinne aistritheoirí iarracht i gcónaí a bheith dofheicthe; ba cheart go mbeadh cuma ar aistriúcháin idéalacha gur sa sprioctheanga a scríobhadh iad ar dtús. Léirímid go bhfanann rianta den teanga foinse i dtáirge an aistriúcháin chomh fada agus is féidir stair na teanga foinse a nochtadh trí bhreathnú ar an aistriúchán amháin. Go sonrach, déanaimid crainn teanga fhileigineacha a athchruthú go huathoibríoch ó théacsanna aonteangacha (aistrithe ó roinnt teangacha foinseacha). Tá comhartha na teanga foinse chomh cumhachtach go gcoinnítear í fiú tar éis dhá chéim den aistriúchán. Tugann sé seo le fios go láidir gurb é trasnaíocht teanga foinse an tréith is suntasaí de théacsanna aistrithe, agus é ag scáthú na gcomharthaí níos caolchúisí a bhaineann le hairíonna uilíocha an aistriúcháin.', 'ka': 'სამყარო, საკუთარი, სამყარო, პოლიტიკატი და ლიტურატია ათასი წლის განმავლობაში იყო მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია. შეცვლელები ყოველთვის უნდა იყოს ჩვენებელი. იდეალური გადაწყვეტილებები უნდა იყოს, როგორც ისინი დაწერა სამყარო ენაში. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მხოლოდ შესაძლებელია გაგრძელება პროდისტში, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია, რომ ისტორია მხოლოდ შესაძლებელია გააკვიროთ მხოლოდ გაგრძელებას. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ავტომატურად ფილოგენეტიკური ენების ხეები მონოლენგური ტექსტიდან შევქმნით (რამდენიმე მხოლოდ ენებიდან შეცვლა). სიგნალის სახელის სიგნალია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან იყო, რომ ის დარჩენა ორი ფაზების შემდეგ. ეს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ სამყარო ენის ინტერფერენცია არის სამყარო დომინტური ტექსტის პროგრამეტური პროგრამეტური, რომელიც უფრო სამყარო სიგნალების უფრო', 'hu': 'A fordítás évezredek óta fontos szerepet játszik a kereskedelemben, a jogban, a kereskedelemben, a politikában és az irodalomban. A fordítók mindig is próbáltak láthatatlanok lenni. Az ideális fordításoknak úgy kell kinézniük, mintha eredetileg a célnyelven írták volna őket. Megmutatjuk, hogy a forrásnyelv nyomai olyan mértékben maradnak a fordítási termékben, hogy a forrásnyelv történetét csak a fordításra tekintve lehetséges felfedni. Konkrétan automatikusan rekonstruáljuk a filogenetikai nyelvfákat egynyelvű szövegekből (több forrásnyelvről fordítva). A forrásnyelv jele olyan erőteljes, hogy a fordítás két fázisa után is megmarad. Ez erősen jelzi, hogy a fordított szövegek forrásnyelvi beavatkozása a legdominánsabb jellemzője, amely árnyékolja a fordítás univerzális tulajdonságainak finomabb jeleit.', 'el': 'Η μετάφραση έχει διαδραματίσει σημαντικό ρόλο στο εμπόριο, το δίκαιο, το εμπόριο, την πολιτική και τη λογοτεχνία για χιλιάδες χρόνια. Οι μεταφραστές πάντα προσπαθούσαν να είναι αόρατοι. Οι ιδανικές μεταφράσεις πρέπει να φαίνονται σαν να έχουν γραφτεί αρχικά στη γλώσσα-στόχο. Δείχνουμε ότι ίχνη της γλώσσας προέλευσης παραμένουν στο μεταφραστικό προϊόν στο βαθμό που είναι δυνατόν να αποκαλυφθεί η ιστορία της γλώσσας προέλευσης εξετάζοντας μόνο τη μετάφραση. Συγκεκριμένα, αναπαράγουμε αυτόματα φυλλογενικά γλωσσικά δέντρα από μονογλωσσικά κείμενα (μεταφρασμένα από διάφορες γλώσσες προέλευσης). Το σήμα της γλώσσας προέλευσης είναι τόσο ισχυρό που διατηρείται ακόμη και μετά από δύο φάσεις μετάφρασης. Αυτό δείχνει έντονα ότι η παρεμβολή της πηγής γλώσσας είναι το πιο κυρίαρχο χαρακτηριστικό των μεταφρασμένων κειμένων, επισκιάζοντας τα πιο λεπτά σήματα των καθολικών ιδιοτήτων της μετάφρασης.', 'kk': 'Аудару мұсыздар жыл бойы салым, заң, торговла, саясатты және әдебиеттің маңызды роли болды. Аударушылар әрқашан көрінбейтін болу әрекетін көрсетілді; Translators are always trying to be invisible; otherwise, just like in your language. Идеалдық аудармалар мақсатты тілде жазылған сияқты көрсетіледі. Біз көздегі тілдің іздеулері аудармалардың жазуында қана аудармаларды қарап, көздегі тілдің журналын ашу мүмкіндігін көрсетедік. Ескерінде, біз филогенетикалық тілдер ағаштарын монолингі мәтіндерден автоматты түрде құрамыз (бірнеше көзінің тілдерінен аударылған). Көзінің тілінің сигналы толық күшті, сондықтан ол екі аудармалардан кейін де сақталмайды. Бұл көздегі тіл интерфейсі аударылған мәтіндердің ең доминистік қасиеттері деп белгілейді. Бұл аударылған мәтіндердің әлемдік қасиеттерінің әдімгінің артық сигналдарының артық', 'lt': 'Vertimas vertimu atlieka svarbų vaidmenį prekybos, teisės, prekybos, politikos ir literatūros srityje tūkstančius metų. Vertėjai visada bandė būti nematomi; ideal ūs vertimai turėtų būti panašūs į tai, kad jie iš pradžių buvo parašyti tiksline kalba. Mes rodome, kad vertimo produkte lieka šaltinio kalbos pėdsakai tiek, kiek įmanoma atskleisti šaltinio kalbos istoriją tik žiūrint į vertimą. Konkrečiai, mes automatiškai rekonstruojame filogenetiškus kalbų medžius iš vienakalbių tekstų (išverstų iš kelių šaltinių kalbų). Šaltinės kalbos signalas yra toks galingas, kad jis išlieka net po dviejų vertimo etapų. Tai akivaizdžiai rodo, kad vertimo tekstais būdingiausias šaltinio kalbos kišimasis yra labiausiai dominuojantis vertimo tekstų požymis, o vertimo universaliųjų savybių signalai yra subtilesni.', 'it': "La traduzione ha svolto un ruolo importante nel commercio, nel diritto, nel commercio, nella politica e nella letteratura per migliaia di anni. I traduttori hanno sempre cercato di essere invisibili; Le traduzioni ideali dovrebbero apparire come se fossero state scritte originariamente nella lingua di destinazione. Mostriamo che tracce della lingua di origine rimangono nel prodotto di traduzione nella misura in cui è possibile scoprire la storia della lingua di origine guardando solo la traduzione. Nello specifico, ricostruiamo automaticamente gli alberi filogenetici del linguaggio da testi monolingue (tradotti da diverse lingue di origine). Il segnale della lingua di origine è così potente che viene mantenuto anche dopo due fasi di traduzione. Ciò indica fortemente che l'interferenza della lingua sorgente è la caratteristica più dominante dei testi tradotti, oscurando i segnali più sottili delle proprietà universali della traduzione.", 'mk': 'Преведувањето игра важна улога во трговијата, законот, трговијата, политиката и литературата илјадници години. Преведувачите секогаш се обидоа да бидат невидливи; ideal translations should look as if they were written originally in the target language.  Ние покажуваме дека трагите на изворниот јазик остануваат во преводниот производ во степен во кој е можно да се открие историјата на изворниот јазик само со поглед на преводот. Специфично, автоматски реконструираме дрвја на филогенетски јазик од монојазични тексти (преведени од неколку изворни јазици). Сигналот на изворниот јазик е толку моќен што се задржува дури и по две фази на превод. Ова силно укажува на тоа дека влијанието на изворниот јазик е најдоминантната карактеристика на преведените тексти, прекривајќи ги посуптилните сигнали на универзалните власти на преведувањето.', 'ml': 'ആയിരക്കണക്കിനുള്ള വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളായി വ്യാപാരം, നിയമം, കച്ചവടത്തില്\u200d, രാഷ്ട്രീയം, സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d വ്യാപാര്\u200dത്ഥ്യം  പരിഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d എപ്പോഴും അദൃശ്യമായിരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു; ideal translations should look as if they were written originally in the target language.  നാം കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷയുടെ ട്രാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെ ചരിത്രത പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയമായി ഫൈലോജെന്റിക് ഭാഷ വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d മോണോളിലുള്ള പദാവലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക ഉറവിട ഭാഷയുടെ സിഗ്നല്\u200d വളരെ ശക്തിയുള്ളതാണ് അതിനെ പരിഭാഷയുടെ രണ്ടു പ്രയാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ശേഷം സൂക്ഷിക്കുക ഇത് ഉറപ്പായും കാണിക്കുന്നു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ പദാവലികളുടെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്വ', 'mn': 'Комчуулга нь худалдаа, хууль, худалдаа, улс төр, уран зохиолд мянга мянган жилийн турш чухал үүрэг тоглож байна. Комчуулагчид үргэлж харагдахгүй байх гэж оролдсон. Идеал хэлбэрээр бичигдсэн шиг харагдах хэрэгтэй. Бид эх үүсвэрийн хэл нь хөрөнгө оруулалтын бүтээгдэхүүнд байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ эх үүсвэрийн хэл нь зөвхөн хөрөнгө оруулалтын тухай түүхийг олох боломжтой. Ялангуяа бид нэг хэлний текстээс филогенетик хэлний модыг автоматаар бүтээж чадна (олон эх үүсвэрийн хэлнээс орчуулсан). Мөн эх үүсвэрийн хэлний сигнал маш хүчирхэг бөгөөд үүнийг хоёр давхарлалтын дараа ч хадгалдаг. Энэ нь эх үүсвэрийн хэл оролцол нь орчуулагдсан текстүүдийн хамгийн давамгайлагч чанар юм. Энэ нь орчуулагдсан ертөнцийн хувьд орчуулагдсан илүү доромжтой сигналуудыг харуулсан.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan telah bermain peran penting dalam perdagangan, undang-undang, perdagangan, politik, dan literatur selama ribuan tahun. Penerjemah sentiasa cuba untuk tidak terlihat; Terjemahan ideal patut kelihatan seolah-olah ia ditulis awalnya dalam bahasa sasaran. Kami menunjukkan jejak bahasa sumber kekal dalam produk terjemahan sehingga ia mungkin untuk mengungkap sejarah bahasa sumber dengan melihat hanya terjemahan. Secara khusus, kita secara automatik membina semula pokok bahasa filogenetik dari teks monobahasa (diterjemahkan dari beberapa bahasa sumber). Isyarat bahasa sumber begitu kuat sehingga ia disimpan walaupun selepas dua tahap terjemahan. This strongly indicates that source language interference is the most dominant characteristic of translated texts, overshadowing the more subtle signals of universal properties of translation.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni ilha rwol importanti fil-kummerċ, il-liġi, il-kummerċ, il-politika u l-letteratura għal eluf ta’ snin. It-tradutturi dejjem ippruvaw ikunu inviżibbli; it-traduzzjonijiet ideali għandhom jidhru li kieku kienu miktuba oriġinarjament fil-lingwa fil-mira. Aħna nuru li traċċi tal-lingwa tas-sors jibqgħu fil-prodott tat-traduzzjoni sal-punt li huwa possibbli li tiġi skoperta l-istorja tal-lingwa tas-sors billi wieħed iħares biss lejn it-traduzzjoni. Speċifikament, irrikostruzzjonaw awtomatikament siġar filoġenetiċi tal-lingwi minn testi monolingwi (tradotti minn diversi lingwi tas-sors). Is-sinjal tal-lingwa tas-sors huwa tant qawwi li jinżamm anke wara żewġ fażijiet ta’ traduzzjoni. Dan jindika b’mod qawwi li l-interferenza fil-lingwa tas-sors hija l-karatteristika l-aktar dominanti tat-testi tradotti, u b’hekk jinqerdu s-sinjali aktar sottili tal-proprjetajiet universali tat-traduzzjoni.', 'no': 'Omsetjinga har spelt ein viktig rolle i handel, lov, komerce, politikk og literatur i tusenvis av år. Omsetjarane har alltid prøvd å vera ukjende; Translators have always tried to be invisible; see http: // edu. kde. org/ kturtle/ translator. php to learn how to properly translate it. ideale omsetjingar skal sjå ut som om dei vart skriven opphavleg i målspråket. Vi viser at spor på kjeldespråket blir i omsetjingsproduktet til storleiken at det er mogleg å opna historien på kjeldespråket ved å sjå berre på omsetjinga. Spesifikke, vi automatisk gjenoppretter filogenetiske språkstemer frå monospråk (omsett frå fleire kjeldespråk). Signalen til kjeldespråket er så kraftig at den vert lagra sjølv etter to fasar av omsetjinga. Dette viser sterkt at kjeldespråk-grensesnittet er den mest dominerende karakteristikaren av omsette tekstar, over dei meir subtelle signalene av universelle omsetjingseigenskapane.', 'pl': 'Od tysięcy lat tłumaczenie odgrywa ważną rolę w handlu, prawie, handlu, polityce i literaturze. Tłumacze zawsze starali się być niewidzialni; Idealne tłumaczenia powinny wyglądać tak, jakby zostały napisane oryginalnie w języku docelowym. Pokazujemy, że ślady języka źródłowego pozostają w produkcie tłumaczeniowym do tego stopnia, w jakim możliwe jest odkrycie historii języka źródłowego poprzez patrzenie tylko na tłumaczenie. W szczególności automatycznie rekonstruujemy drzewa językowe filogenetyczne z tekstów jednojęzycznych (tłumaczonych z kilku języków źródłowych). Sygnał języka źródłowego jest tak silny, że jest zachowany nawet po dwóch fazach tłumaczenia. To mocno wskazuje na to, że zakłócenia języka źródłowego są najbardziej dominującą cechą przetłumaczonych tekstów, zacieniając bardziej subtelne sygnały o uniwersalnych właściwościach tłumaczenia.', 'ro': 'Traducerea a jucat un rol important în comerț, drept, comerț, politică și literatură timp de mii de ani. Traducătorii au încercat întotdeauna să fie invizibili; Traducerile ideale ar trebui să arate ca și cum ar fi fost scrise inițial în limba țintă. Noi arătăm că urmele limbii sursă rămân în produsul de traducere în măsura în care este posibil să se descopere istoria limbii sursă privind doar traducerea. Mai exact, reconstruim automat arborii limbajului filogenetic din texte monolingve (traduse din mai multe limbi sursă). Semnalul limbii sursă este atât de puternic încât este reținut chiar și după două faze de traducere. Acest lucru indică puternic faptul că interferența limbii sursă este caracteristica cea mai dominantă a textelor traduse, umbrind semnalele mai subtile ale proprietăților universale ale traducerii.', 'sv': 'Översättning har spelat en viktig roll inom handel, juridik, handel, politik och litteratur i tusentals år. Översättare har alltid försökt vara osynliga. ideala översättningar bör se ut som om de ursprungligen skrevs på målspråket. Vi visar att spår av källspråket finns kvar i översättningsprodukten i den mån det är möjligt att avslöja källspråkets historia genom att bara titta på översättningen. Specifikt rekonstruerar vi automatiskt fylogenetiska språkträd från enspråkiga texter (översatta från flera källspråk). Källspråkets signal är så kraftfull att den behålls även efter två faser av översättning. Detta tyder starkt på att källspråksstörning är det mest dominerande kännetecknet hos översatta texter, vilket överskuggar de mer subtila signalerna om universella egenskaper hos översättning.', 'sr': 'Prevod je igrao važnu ulogu u trgovini, zakonu, trgovini, politiku i literaturi hiljadama godina. Prevoditelji su uvek pokušali da budu nevidljivi. idealni prevodi bi trebali izgledati kao da su napisani prvo na ciljnom jeziku. Pokazujemo da tragovi izvornog jezika ostaju u prevodnom proizvodu do te mjere da je moguće otkriti povijest izvornog jezika gledajući samo prevod. Posebno, automatski rekonstruiramo filogenetičke jezičke drveće iz monojezičkih tekstova (prevedeno iz nekoliko izvorskih jezika). Signal izvornog jezika je tako moćan da se zadrži čak i nakon dve faze prevoda. To tvrdo ukazuje na to da je interferencija izvornog jezika najdominantnija karakteristika prevedenih tekstova, preko podignutih signala univerzalnih vlasništva prevoda.', 'si': 'අවුරුද්ධයෙන් ව්\u200dයාපාර, නීතිය, ව්\u200dයාපාර, රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක, සහ සාධාරණය අවුරුදු දහස්සෙන් වැදගත් ව පරිවර්තකයෝ හැමවෙලේම අදැක්කම් වෙන්න උත්සාහ කරලා තියෙනවා; ඔවුන් මුලින් ලක්ෂණ භාෂාවට ලියලා තියෙනවා වගේ අදහස් භාෂාවක් වගේ. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මුළු භාෂයේ පරික්ෂණය පරික්ෂණයේ තියෙනවා කියලා භාෂයේ ඉතිහාසය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම phylog enetic language Trees from one language texts (translation from a number of source language). මුළු භාෂයේ සංඥානය ගොඩක් ශක්තිමත් වෙනවා ඒක අවවාද දෙකට පස්සේ තියෙන්නේ. මේක බලාපොරොත්තු පෙන්වන්නේ මුළු භාෂාව අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් වාර්තාවක් ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂතාවක් කියලා, අනුවාර්', 'ta': 'ஆயிரக்கணக்கான ஆண்டுகளுக்கான மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, வியாபாரத்து, அரசியல், மற்றும் எழுத்தாக்கத்தில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் எப்போதும் தெரியாத முயற்சிக்கின்றனர். ideal translations should look as if they were written originally in the target language.  மூல மொழியின் அடிச்சுவடுகள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் இருக்கும் மொழியின் வரலாற்றை தெரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் என்பதை மொழிமொழிய குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் தானாகவே மொழி மரங்களை மொழிமொழிகளிலிருந்து மாற்றும் (பல மூல மொழிகளிலிருந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்படும மூல மொழியின் குறிகை மூல மொழி இடைவெளி மொழிகளின் மொழிப்பெயர்ப்பு உரைகளின் மிக மேலான தன்மையாகும், மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் மொழிப்பெயர்ப்புகளின் மேலும', 'ur': 'ترجمہ ہزاروں سال تک تجارت، قانون، تجارت، سیاست اور ادبیات میں ایک اہم رول ہے۔ Translators have always tried to be invisible; ideal translations should look like they were originally written in the target language. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سورج زبان کی پیچھے ترجمہ محصولات میں رہتے ہیں اس قدر کہ سورج زبان کی تاریخ کو صرف ترجمہ کی طرف دیکھتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ایک زبان کے متن سے فیلوگنیٹیک زبان درختوں کو دوبارہ ساخت کرتے ہیں (بہت سی سراسر زبانوں سے ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے)۔ سورج زبان کی سیگنال بہت طاقتور ہے کہ اسے دو مرحلے کے بعد بھی نگہ رکھا جاتا ہے. یہ مضبوط طور پر نشان دیتا ہے کہ سورس زبان اختلاف ترجمہ کے متن کے سب سے زیادہ سردار خصوصی ہے، جو ترجمہ کے زیادہ زیادہ سردار سیگنالوں پر چھوڑ رہے ہیں۔', 'so': 'Turjumiddu waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan ganacsiga, sharciga, ganacsiga, siyaasada iyo farshaxanka kumanyaalka sano ah. Translators have always tried to be invisible;  Turjumaadda fikrada ah waa in la eegaa sida marka ugu horeysa lagu qoray luqada goalka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in luqada asalka ah ay ku jiraan dhaqaalaha turjumista, sida ay u suurtowdo in la muujiyo taariikhda afka asalka ah si aad u fiirintid turjumista oo kaliya. Si gaar ah, waxaan si rasmi ah u dhisnaa geedaha afka filogenetka ah oo laga soo qoray qoraalka noocyada ah (lagu turjumay luuqado kala duduwan). Signada afka asalka ah waa xoog badan tahay in lagu haysto xitaa laba fasax turjumaan kadib. Tan si adag ayaa looga jeedaa in luqada sourceed ay leedahay mid ugu sarreeya xarafta qoraalka la turjumay, oo ay hoos u leedahay calaamado fudud oo xirfadaha caalamiga ah ee turjumaadda.', 'vi': 'Phiên dịch đã đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong kinh doanh, luật pháp, thương mại, chính trị và văn học hàng ngàn năm. Bộ dịch luôn cố gắng tàng hình; dịch lý tưởng nên trông như thể nó được viết ngay từ đầu trong ngôn ngữ đích. Chúng tôi cho thấy dấu vết của ngôn ngữ nguồn vẫn còn trong sản phẩm dịch chuyển trong mức độ có thể khám phá lịch sử của ngôn ngữ nguồn bằng cách chỉ nhìn vào bản dịch. Cụ thể, chúng tôi tự động tái tạo lại các cây ngôn ngữ di truyền từ các văn bản độc ngôn ngữ (dịch từ nhiều ngôn ngữ gốc). Tín hiệu của ngôn ngữ nguồn mạnh đến nỗi vẫn được lưu lại ngay cả sau hai giai đoạn dịch. Điều này cho thấy sự can thiệp ngôn ngữ nguyên bản là đặc trưng nổi bật nhất của các văn bản dịch đã dịch, che dấu những tín hiệu tinh tế hơn của tính chất phổ biến.', 'uz': "Tafsilotlar minglab yil davomida shifokorlik, qanday, tizim, politika va littatiyatga muhim rol qo'yilgan. Tarjima davom etishni istaysizmi? g'oyalar tarjimalari asl tilda yozilgan deb o'xshaydi. Biz manba tillarining qismlari tarjima produkidagi tarjima qilish mumkin, manba tillarining tarixini aniqlashni faqat tarjima qilish mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan, biz monolingual matnlardan foydalanuvchi daraxtlarni avtomatik qaytadan qaytadan olib tashlamiz (bir necha manba tillardan tarjima qilamiz). Manba tilning signali juda katta, ikki darajada tarjima qilishdan keyin uni qo'yish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis", 'bg': 'Преводът играе важна роля в търговията, правото, търговията, политиката и литературата от хиляди години. Преводачите винаги са се опитвали да бъдат невидими; идеалните преводи трябва да изглеждат така, сякаш са написани първоначално на целевия език. Показваме, че следи от изходния език остават в преводния продукт, доколкото е възможно да се разкрие историята на изходния език, като се гледа само на превода. По-конкретно, ние автоматично реконструираме филогенетични езикови дървета от едноезични текстове (преведени от няколко езика на произход). Сигналът на изходния език е толкова мощен, че се запазва дори след две фази на превода. Това силно показва, че интерференцията на изходния език е най-доминиращата характеристика на преведените текстове, засенчвайки по-фините сигнали за универсалните свойства на превода.', 'da': 'Oversættelse har spillet en vigtig rolle i handel, jura, handel, politik og litteratur i tusinder af år. Oversættere har altid forsøgt at være usynlige. ideelle oversættelser skal se ud, som om de oprindeligt var skrevet på målsproget. Vi viser, at spor af kildesproget forbliver i oversættelsesproduktet i det omfang, at det er muligt at afdække kildesprogets historie ved kun at se på oversættelsen. Specielt rekonstruerer vi automatisk fylogenetiske sprogtræer ud fra ensprogede tekster (oversat fra flere kildesprog). Kildesprogets signal er så kraftfuld, at det bevares selv efter to faser af oversættelsen. Dette tyder stærkt på, at kildesprogsindblanding er det mest dominerende kendetegn ved oversatte tekster, hvilket overskygger de mere subtile signaler om universelle egenskaber ved oversættelse.', 'nl': 'Vertaling speelt al duizenden jaren een belangrijke rol in handel, recht, handel, politiek en literatuur. Vertalers hebben altijd geprobeerd onzichtbaar te zijn; Ideale vertalingen moeten eruit zien alsof ze oorspronkelijk in de doeltaal zijn geschreven. We tonen aan dat sporen van de brontaal in het vertaalproduct blijven voor zover het mogelijk is om de geschiedenis van de brontaal te ontdekken door alleen naar de vertaling te kijken. Specifiek reconstrueren we automatisch fylogenetische taalbomen uit eentalige teksten (vertaald uit meerdere brontalen). Het signaal van de brontaal is zo krachtig dat het zelfs na twee vertaalfasen behouden blijft. Dit geeft sterk aan dat brontaalinterferentie het meest dominante kenmerk is van vertaalde teksten, die de subtielere signalen van universele eigenschappen van vertaling overschaduwt.', 'hr': 'Prevod je igrao važnu ulogu u trgovini, zakonu, trgovini, politiku i literaturi tisućama godina. Prevoditelji su uvijek pokušali biti nevidljivi; idealni prevodi bi trebali izgledati kao da su napisani originalno na ciljnom jeziku. Pokazujemo da tragovi izvornog jezika ostaju u proizvodu prevođenja do te mjere da je moguće otkriti povijest izvornog jezika gledajući samo prevođenje. Posebno, automatski rekonstruiramo filogenetičke jezičke drveće iz monojezičkih tekstova (prevedeno iz nekoliko izvorskih jezika). Signal izvornog jezika je tako moćan da se zadrži čak i nakon dvije faze prevoda. To tvrdo ukazuje na to da je interferencija izvornog jezika najdominantnija karakteristika prevedenih tekstova, preko potpunih signala univerzalnih vlasništva prevoda.', 'id': 'Terjemahan telah bermain peran penting dalam perdagangan, hukum, perdagangan, politik, dan literatur selama ribuan tahun. Penerjemah selalu mencoba untuk tidak terlihat; terjemahan ideal harus terlihat seolah-olah mereka ditulis awalnya dalam bahasa sasaran. We show that traces of the source language remain in the translation product to the extent that it is possible to uncover the history of the source language by looking only at the translation.  Secara khusus, kita secara otomatis membangun kembali pohon bahasa filogenetik dari teks monobahasa (diterjemahkan dari beberapa bahasa sumber). The signal of the source language is so powerful that it is retained even after two phases of translation.  Ini sangat menunjukkan bahwa gangguan bahasa sumber adalah karakteristik paling dominan dari teks terjemahan, melewati sinyal yang lebih halus dari properti universal terjemahan.', 'de': 'Übersetzung spielt seit Jahrtausenden eine wichtige Rolle in Handel, Recht, Handel, Politik und Literatur. Übersetzer haben immer versucht, unsichtbar zu sein; Ideale Übersetzungen sollten so aussehen, als wären sie ursprünglich in der Zielsprache geschrieben. Wir zeigen, dass Spuren der Ausgangssprache im Übersetzungsprodukt verbleiben, soweit es möglich ist, die Geschichte der Ausgangssprache nur anhand der Übersetzung aufzudecken. Insbesondere rekonstruieren wir phylogenetische Sprachbäume automatisch aus einsprachigen Texten (übersetzt aus mehreren Ausgangssprachen). Das Signal der Ausgangssprache ist so stark, dass es auch nach zwei Phasen der Übersetzung beibehalten wird. Dies deutet stark darauf hin, dass die Störung der Ausgangssprache das dominantste Merkmal übersetzter Texte ist und die subtileren Signale universeller Übersetzungseigenschaften überschattet.', 'fa': 'ترجمه یک نقش مهمی در تجارت، قانون، تجارت، سیاست و ادبیات برای هزاران سال داشته است. ترجمه\u200cکنندگان همیشه تلاش می\u200cکنند غیب\u200cبینی باشند. ترجمه\u200cهای ایده\u200cای باید به نظر بیایند که انگار اول در زبان هدف نوشته شده\u200cاند. ما نشان می دهیم که ردیابی زبان منبع در محصول ترجمه به اندازه ای که ممکن است تاریخ زبان منبع را با نگاه کردن تنها به ترجمه باز کنیم. به طور خاص، ما به طور خودکار درختان زبان فیلوژنتیکی از متن های یک زبان (از چند زبان منبع ترجمه می\u200cکنیم). سیگنال زبان منبع خیلی قوی است که حتی بعد از دو مرحله ترجمه نگه دارد. این به شدت نشان می دهد که اختلاف زبان منبع بزرگترین ویژگی از متن ترجمه\u200cها است، که بر اساس سیگنال\u200cهای زیباترین ویژگی\u200cهای جهانی ترجمه می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri imechukua nafasi muhimu katika biashara, sheria, biashara, siasa na fasihi kwa maelfu ya miaka. Watafsiri wamejaribu kuwa haionekani; Tafsiri za kiitikadi zinapaswa kuonekana kama ziliandikwa kwa lugha ya msingi. Tunaonyesha kuwa alama za lugha ya chanzo bado zinabaki katika uzalishaji wa tafsiri kwa kiwango ambacho inawezekana kugundua historia ya lugha ya vyanzo kwa kuangalia tafsiri tu. Kwa ujumla, tunajijenga mti wa lugha za kiutaalamu wa lugha (kutafsiriwa kutoka lugha kadhaa za lugha). Alama ya lugha ya vyanzo ni yenye nguvu sana kwamba imebaki hata baada ya hatua mbili ya tafsiri. Hii inaonyesha vizuri kwamba kuzuiliwa kwa lugha ya asili ni maarufu zaidi ya maandishi yanayotafsiriwa, yanavuka kwa alama nyepesi zaidi za utafsiri wa ulimwengu.', 'ko': '수천 년 동안 번역은 무역, 법률, 상업, 정치와 문학에서 중요한 역할을 발휘해 왔다.통역사는 항상 은형을 시도한다.이상적인 번역은 최초로 목표 언어로 쓴 것처럼 보일 것이다.우리는 원본 언어의 흔적이 여전히 번역 제품에 존재하기 때문에 번역을 보기만 하면 원본 언어의 역사를 밝힐 수 있다.구체적으로 말하면, 우리는 단어 텍스트 (여러 가지 원시 언어에서 번역된 것) 에서 시스템 발육 언어 트리를 자동으로 재구성한다.원시 언어의 신호는 매우 강해서 두 단계의 번역을 거쳐도 보존될 것이다.이는 원시 언어의 간섭이 번역 텍스트의 가장 주요한 특징이고 번역의 보편성을 덮는 더욱 미묘한 신호임을 유력하게 보여준다.', 'tr': 'Terjime etmek müňlerçe ýyldan bäri ticaret, hukuklary, komersiýa, syýasatlar we edebiýatynda wajyp rol oýnady. Terjimeler hemişe görünmez bolmagy synanyşýardy; terjimeler hemişe ideal terjimeler munuň başlangyç dilde ýazylýan ýaly görünmeli. Biz çeşme diliniň izimlerini diňe terjime edeniň taryhyny açmak mümkin däldir. Adatça, biz filogenetik dili agaçlary monolingüň metinden ýene-täze inşa edýäris (birnäçe çeşme dilinden terjime edilýäris). Çeşme diliniň sinyali örän güýçlidir we ol terjime edilen iki phaseden so ňra hem saklanmaýar. Bu çeşme diliniň aralygyny terjime edilen tekstleriň iň dominanty karakterleridir we uniwersal terjime häsiýetleriniň iň alty sygnallaryny üstine alyp gitýär.', 'sq': 'Trakthimi ka luajtur një rol të rëndësishëm në tregti, ligj, tregti, politikë dhe letërsi për mijëra vjet. Përkthyesit kanë provuar gjithmonë të jenë të padukshëm; përkthimet ideale duhet të duken sikur janë shkruar fillimisht në gjuhën objektive. Ne tregojmë se gjuha e burimit mbetet në prodhimin e përkthimit në mënyrë që është e mundur të zbulohet historia e gjuhës së burimit duke parë vetëm përkthimin. Veçanërisht, ne automatikisht rindërtojmë pemët filogenetike të gjuhës nga tekstet monogjuhësore (përkthyer nga disa gjuhë burimi). Sinjali i gjuhës burimore është kaq i fuqishëm që mbahet edhe pas dy fazave të përkthimit. Kjo tregon me forcë se ndërhyrja në gjuhën e burimit është karakteristika më e mbizotërueshme e teksteve të përkthyer, duke mbuluar sinjalet më të holla të pronave universale të përkthimit.', 'am': 'ትርጓሜ በሺሕዎች ዓመታት በንግድ፣ ሕግ፣ ንግድ፣ ፖለቲካ እና ሐሳብረት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ትርጉም ሁልጊዜ የማይታይ ሊሆኑ ሞክሮአል፤ የሐሳብ ትርጉም በመጀመሪያ በተቃውሞ ቋንቋ እንደ ተጻፈ ይመስላል፡፡ የመድረክ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት በተርጓሚው ዕቅድ ውስጥ ይኖራል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የፊሎogenetic ቋንቋ ዛፎችን ከሞሎልቋል ጽሑፎች (ከሌሎች ቋንቋዎች የተዘረጉን) የመድረክ ቋንቋ ሲግለጽ ከሁለት ደረጃዎች በኋላ እንኳ እንዲተርጉም ይችላል፡፡ ይህም የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት በተርጉም ጽሑፎች ላይ የተለየ ትርጉም ጽሑፎችን ማቀናቀል እና ትርጉም በማስተካከል የበለጠ ትንሽ ስልክ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Թարգմանությունը հազարավոր տարիներ շարունակ կարևոր դեր է խաղում առևտրի, օրենքի, առևտրի, քաղաքականության և գրականության մեջ: Թարգմանիչները միշտ փորձել են անտեսանելի լինել, իդեալական թարգմանությունները պետք է տեսնեն, կարծես նախկինում գրված են նպատակային լեզվով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ աղբյուր լեզվի հետքերը մնում են թարգմանման արտադրանքում այնքան, որ հնարավոր է բացահայտել աղբյուր լեզվի պատմությունը միայն թարգմանման վրա նայելով: Մասնավորապես, մենք ինքնաբերաբար վերականգնում ենք ֆիլոգենետիկ լեզվի ծառերը միալեզվով տեքստներից (թարգմանված բազմաթիվ աղբյուր լեզվով): Առաջին լեզու ազդանշանը այնքան ուժեղ է, որ այն պահպանվում է նույնիսկ թարգմանման երկու փուլում հետո: Սա ուժեղ ցույց է տալիս, որ աղբյուր լեզվի ներխուժումը թարգմանված տեքստերի ամենագերիշխող հատկությունն է, որը թարգմանվում է թարգմանման համաշխարհային հատկությունների առավել նրբագեղ ազդանշաններով:', 'af': "Vertaling het 'n belangrike rol gespeel in handel, wet, komersie, politiek en literaat vir duisende jaar. Vertalings het altyd probeer om ongesigbaar te wees; Translators have always tried to be invisible; see http: // edu. kde. org/ kturtle/ translator. php to learn how to properly translate it. ideale vertalings moet kyk asof hulle oorspronklik in die doel taal geskryf is. Ons wys dat spore van die bron taal in die vertaling produkt bly tot die exten dat dit moontlik is om die geskiedenis van die bron taal te ontdek deur slegs na die vertaling te kyk. Spesifieke, ons automaties herkonstrukeer phylogenetic taal bome van monolinglike teks (vertaal van verskeie bron tale). Die sein van die bron taal is so kragtig dat dit selfs na twee fase van vertaling behou word. Hierdie vertoon sterk dat bron taal interferensie is die mees dominante karakteristiek van vertaalde teks, wat die meer subtiles seinale van universele eienskappe van vertaalde eienskappe oorslaan het.", 'az': 'Tercümə milyonlarca il ərzində ticarət, ticarət, siyasət və ədəbiyyət içində möhüm bir rol oynadı. Tərcümcülər həmişə görünməz olmağa çalışırlar; ideal tercümələr məqsəd dilində yazılmış kimi görünməlidir. Biz mənbə dilinin izləri tərcümə məhsullarında saxlanmaq mümkün olduğu qədər mənbə dilinin keçmişini yalnız tərcümə baxıb açmaq üçün göstəririk. Özellikle, biz filogenetik dil ağaclarını monodil metinlərdən (çoxlu mənbə dillərindən çevirildik) avtomatik olaraq yenidən inşa edirik. Qaynaq dilinin sinyali bu qədər güclüdür ki, onu iki fərz tərcümə etdikdən sonra saxlanılır. Bu çox möhkəm göstərir ki, mənbə dillərin interferensiyası, çevirilmiş mətnlərin ən dominant ı karakteristik olaraq, çevirilmək üniversal özelliklərinin daha alçaltı sinyallərinin üstündə.', 'bn': 'অনুবাদ হাজার বছর ধরে বাণিজ্য, আইন, ব্যবসা, রাজনীতি এবং সাহিত্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করেছে। অনুবাদকরা সবসময় অদৃশ্য হতে চেষ্টা করেছে; চিন্তার অনুবাদ দেখা উচিত যেন তাদের প্রথমে লক্ষ্য ভাষায় লিখা হয়েছে। We show that traces of the source language remain in the translation product to the extent that it is possible to uncover the history of the source language by looking only at the translation.  বিশেষ করে, আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মোনোলিভাল লেখা থেকে ফ্লিজেনেটিক ভাষা গাছ পুনর্গঠন করি (বেশ কয়েকটি উৎস ভাষা থেকে অন সূত্র ভাষার সিগন্যাল এত শক্তিশালী যে অনুবাদের দুই প্যাসের পরেও এটি রাখা যায়। এটি শক্তিশালী নির্দেশ দেয় যে সোর্স ভাষার বিরুদ্ধে অনুবাদের টেক্সটের সবচেয়ে বেশী ক্ষমতাশালী বৈশিষ্ট্য, অনুবাদের বৈশ্বি', 'bs': 'Prevod je igrao važnu ulogu u trgovini, zakonu, trgovini, politiku i literaturi tisućama godina. Prevoditelji su uvijek pokušali biti nevidljivi; idealni prevodi bi trebali izgledati kao da su napisani originalno na ciljnom jeziku. Pokazujemo da tragovi izvornog jezika ostaju u prevodnom proizvodu do te mjere da je moguće otkriti povijest izvornog jezika gledajući samo prevod. Posebno, automatski rekonstruiramo filogenetičke jezičke drveće iz monojezičkih tekstova (prevedeno iz nekoliko izvorskih jezika). Signal izvornog jezika je tako moćan da se zadrži čak i nakon dvije faze prevoda. To tvrdo ukazuje na to da je interferencija izvornog jezika najdominantnija karakteristika prevedenih tekstova, preko subtilnijih signala univerzalnih vlasništva prevoda.', 'ca': "La traducció ha jugat un paper important en el comerç, la llei, el comerç, la política i la literatura durant milers d'anys. Els traductors sempre han intentat ser invisibles; les traduccions ideals haurien de semblar com si fossin escrites originalment en la llengua alvo. Ens mostren que els rastres de la llengua d'origen segueixen al producte de traducció en la medida en que és possible descobrir la història de la llengua d'origen només mirant la traducció. Concretament, reconstruim automàticament arbres de llengües filògenètiques a partir de textos monolingües (traduits de diverses llengües fonts). El senyal del llenguatge de font és tan poderós que es conserva fins i tot després de dues fases de traducció. Això indica fortament que la interferència del llenguatge de fonts és la característica més dominant dels textos traduits, sobreviuent els senyals més subtils de les propietats universals de la traducció.", 'cs': 'Překlady hrají důležitou roli v obchodu, právu, obchodu, politice a literatuře po tisíce let. Překladatelé se vždy snažili být neviditelní; ideální překlady by měly vypadat, jako by byly napsány původně v cílovém jazyce. Ukazujeme, že stopy zdrojového jazyka zůstávají v překladovém produktu do té míry, že je možné odhalit historii zdrojového jazyka pouze pohledem na překlad. Konkrétně automaticky rekonstruujeme fylogenetické jazykové stromy z jednojzyčných textů (přeložených z několika zdrojových jazyků). Signál zdrojového jazyka je natolik silný, že je zachován i po dvou fázích překladu. To silně naznačuje, že rušení zdrojového jazyka je nejvíce dominantní charakteristikou přeložených textů, která zastíní jemnější signály univerzálních vlastností překladu.', 'et': 'Tõlkel on olnud oluline roll kaubanduses, õiguses, kaubanduses, poliitikas ja kirjanduses juba tuhandeid aastaid. Tõlkijad on alati püüdnud olla nähtamatud; Ideaalsed tõlked peaksid välja nägema, nagu need oleks kirjutatud algselt sihtkeeles. Näitame, et algkeele jäljed jäävad tõlketoodetesse niivõrd, kuivõrd lähtekeele ajalugu on võimalik avastada ainult tõlget vaadates. Täpsemalt rekonstrueerime automaatselt fülogeneetilised keelepuud ühekeelsetest tekstidest (tõlgitud mitmest lähtekeelest). Lähtekeele signaal on nii võimas, et see säilib ka pärast kahte tõlke etappi. See näitab tugevalt, et lähtekeele sekkumine on tõlgitud tekstide kõige domineerivam omadus, mis varjab tõlke universaalsete omaduste peenemaid signaale.', 'fi': 'Kääntämisellä on ollut tärkeä rooli kaupassa, oikeudessa, kaupassa, politiikassa ja kirjallisuudessa tuhansia vuosia. Kääntäjät ovat aina yrittäneet olla näkymättömiä. Ihanteellisten käännösten tulisi näyttää siltä, että ne on kirjoitettu alun perin kohdekielellä. Osoitamme, että lähdekielen jäljet jäävät käännöstuotteeseen siinä määrin, että lähdekielen historia on mahdollista selvittää vain käännöstä tarkastelemalla. Erityisesti rekonstruoimme automaattisesti fylogeeniset kielipuut monikielisistä teksteistä (käännetyinä useilta lähdekieliltä). Lähtökielen signaali on niin voimakas, että se säilyy jopa kahden käännösvaiheen jälkeen. Tämä osoittaa vahvasti, että lähdekielen interferenssi on käännettyjen tekstien hallitsevin ominaisuus, joka varjostaa kääntämisen yleismaailmallisten ominaisuuksien hienovaraisempia signaaleja.', 'jv': 'Terjamahan kelas barang nggawe barang kanggo tukang, hukum, komersi, politik lan basa sing sepisan luwih-wong liyane. Jejaring ide-terjamahan kang gadoh koyo meh sira oleh bantuan ing gagal Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ng langkung sampeyan bakal dumadhi ing pirsak neng sampeyan pancening nggawe kapan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kebebasan langkung sampeyan winih, iso ngubah dhéwé ngertarjamahan. user profileSpanish Seneng kang angkang kelas bangsa luwih apik tur angel gawe nguasai iki sak duluran sampek duwé. Ngomongke punika-punika sing ngerasakno ning tarjamahan banget kuwi nggawe cara-cara sing luwih apik kanggo tarjamahan textin, nglanggar nggambar cara-tarjamahan luwih basa sing ngerasakno karo ngregani cara-tarjamahan.', 'ha': "Translation has played an important role in trade, law, commerce, politics, and literature for thousands of years.  @ info: tooltip Tsarin fassarori ya kamata kamar an rubuta su a farkon harshen aimakin. Tuna nũna musamman lugha na source yana cikin birnin fassarar, inda za'a iya iya iya buɗe historin maganar source da ya yi dũbi kawai zuwa fassarar. Ina ƙayyade, za'a iya rekarin itãcen lugha na ɗabi'a daga littafan misalin ayuka na rubutu (an fassar daga wasu harshen source). Simbolin harshen source is so mai ƙarfi that an riƙe shi ingawa bayan fassara biyu na fassarar. Wannan yana nũna wa cewa, intercetser harshen na source shi ne mafi domin muhimmin characteristic of translation text, oversidi na ƙari da sauri na fassarar properties of universal translation.", 'sk': 'Prevajanje je imelo pomembno vlogo v trgovini, pravu, trgovini, politiki in literaturi že tisoče let. Prevajalci so vedno poskušali biti nevidni; Idealni prevodi bi morali izgledati, kot da bi bili napisani izvirno v ciljnem jeziku. Pokazujemo, da sledi izvornega jezika ostanejo v prevajalskem produktu v obsegu, v katerem je mogoče odkriti zgodovino izvornega jezika samo s pregledom prevoda. Natančneje samodejno rekonstruiramo filogenetska jezikovna drevesa iz enojezičnih besedil (prevedenih iz več izvornih jezikov). Signal izvornega jezika je tako močan, da se ohrani tudi po dveh fazah prevajanja. To močno kaže, da je interferenca izvornega jezika najbolj prevladujoča značilnost prevedenih besedil in zasenči bolj subtilne signale univerzalnih lastnosti prevoda.', 'he': 'התרגום שיחק תפקיד חשוב בסחר, חוק, סחר, פוליטיקה וספרות במשך אלפי שנים. התרגמים תמיד ניסו להיות בלתי נראים. התרגשות אידיאליות צריכות להיראות כאילו הן נכתבו במקור בשפה המטרה. אנחנו מראים שרידים של שפת המקור נשארים במוצר התרגום למידה שאפשר לחשוף את ההיסטוריה של שפת המקור על ידי להסתכל רק על התרגום. במיוחד, אנו מבנים אוטומטית עצי שפת פילוגנטית מתוך טקסטים מונושפתיים (מתרגמים מכמה שפות מקורות). The signal of the source language is so powerful that it is retained even after two phases of translation.  זה מצביע באופן חזק על ההפרעה בשפה המקורית היא האופיינת הכי דומייננטית של טקסטים מתרגמים, שמחבאים את האותים העדינים ביותר של תכונות אוניברסליים של התרגום.', 'bo': 'གཞུང་སྤྲོད་ཅིག་ལ་གཏམ་་འབྲེལ་དང་། སྤྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས། དཔལ་འབྱོར། ཆབ་སྲིད་དང་། མིག་རྩོམ་པ་སྟོང་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་བཅུ་སོ ཡིག་ཚོགས་འདིས་རྟག་པར་མི་མངོན་པ་ཞིག་བྱེད་འདོད་ཡོད། ideal translations should look like they were originally written in the target language. འུ་ཅག་གིས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག The signal of the source language is so powerful that it is retained even after two phases of translation. This strongly indicates that source language interference is the dominant characteristic of translated texts, overshadowing the more subtle signals of universal properties of translation.'}
{'en': 'Predicting Native Language from Gaze', 'ar': 'توقع اللغة الأصلية من النظرة', 'es': 'Predecir el idioma nativo a partir de la mirada', 'pt': 'Prevendo o idioma nativo a partir do olhar', 'fr': 'Prédire la langue maternelle à partir du regard', 'ja': '視線から母国語を予測する', 'zh': '从凝视测母语', 'hi': 'टकटकी से मूल भाषा की भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование родного языка из взгляда', 'ga': 'Teanga Dúchais a Thuar ó Ghae', 'ka': 'დაზიზიდან მსოფლიო ენერგია', 'hu': 'Az anyanyelv előrejelzése a gazéból', 'el': 'Προβλεπόμενη μητρική γλώσσα από το βλέμμα', 'it': 'Predire la lingua nativa dallo sguardo', 'kk': 'Gaze- ден жергілікті тілді таңдау', 'lt': 'Gazos giminės kalbos prognozavimas', 'mk': 'Predicting Native Language from Gaze', 'mt': 'It-Tbassir tal-Lingwa Nativa minn Gaża', 'ms': 'Mengimbas Bahasa asli dari Gaze', 'mn': 'Газээс төрөлхтний хэл', 'ml': 'ഗാസില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വഭാവ ഭാഷ മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തുന്നു', 'sr': 'Predviđanje porodičnog jezika iz Gaze', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av følgjande språk frå Gaze', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie języka ojczystego z gazy', 'ro': 'Prezicerea limbii native din priviri', 'si': 'ජේසියෙන් ප්\u200dරදේශ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා', 'sv': 'Att förutsäga ursprungsspråk från Gaze', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழியிலிருந்து முன்னேற்றப்படுகிறது', 'so': 'Ka diyaarinta afka hooyo ee Gaze', 'ur': 'جیز سے ملک کی زبان کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Natija tilni tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Định trước Ngôn ngữ bản địa', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на родния език от поглед', 'hr': 'Predviđanje domaćeg jezika iz Gaze', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van moedertaal vanuit blik', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af modersmål fra Gaze', 'ko': '응시하여 모국어를 보다', 'de': 'Prediction Native Language from Gaze', 'fa': 'ЩңЫЊШөвЂЊШЁЫЊЩ†ЫЊ ШІШЁШ§Щ† Ш·ШЁЫЊШ№ЫЊ Ш§ШІ ЪҮШ§ШІ', 'sw': 'Kujiandaa lugha ya asili kutoka Gazesi', 'tr': 'Gazeden ýerli dil bejermek', 'id': 'Memprediksikan bahasa asli dari Gaze', 'af': 'Voorskou Natuurlike Taal van Gaze', 'sq': 'Duke parashikuar gjuhën vendase nga Gaza', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Գազից ծննդյան լեզու կանխատեսելը', 'az': 'Gazadan doƒüum dili t…ômin edir', 'bn': 'গ্যাজ থেকে নিজের ভাষা প্রেকশন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Predicting Native Language from Gaze', 'bs': 'Predviđanje rodnog jezika iz Gaze', 'cs': 'Předpověď rodného jazyka z pohledu', 'et': 'Emakeele ennustamine vaatlusest', 'fi': 'Natiivikielen ennustaminen Gazesta', 'jv': 'Layang kelas Seneng Kasama', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje maternega jezika iz pogleda', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'צפוי שפה מקומית מגיז', 'bo': 'GazeName'}
{'en': 'A fundamental question in language learning concerns the role of a speaker’s first language in second language acquisition. We present a novel methodology for studying this question : analysis of eye-movement patterns in second language reading of free-form text. Using this methodology, we demonstrate for the first time that the native language of English learners can be predicted from their gaze fixations when reading English. We provide analysis of classifier uncertainty and learned features, which indicates that differences in English reading are likely to be rooted in linguistic divergences across native languages. The presented framework complements production studies and offers new ground for advancing research on multilingualism.', 'ar': 'يتعلق السؤال الأساسي في تعلم اللغة بدور اللغة الأولى للمتحدث في اكتساب اللغة الثانية. نقدم منهجية جديدة لدراسة هذا السؤال: تحليل أنماط حركة العين في قراءة اللغة الثانية للنص الحر. باستخدام هذه المنهجية ، نوضح لأول مرة أنه يمكن التنبؤ باللغة الأم لمتعلمي اللغة الإنجليزية من خلال تركيز نظرهم عند قراءة اللغة الإنجليزية. نحن نقدم تحليلاً لعدم اليقين في المصنف والميزات المكتسبة ، مما يشير إلى أن الاختلافات في قراءة اللغة الإنجليزية من المحتمل أن تكون متجذرة في الاختلافات اللغوية عبر اللغات الأصلية. يُكمل الإطار المقدم دراسات الإنتاج ويوفر أرضية جديدة لتطوير البحث في التعددية اللغوية.', 'fr': "Une question fondamentale dans l'apprentissage des langues concerne le rôle de la première langue d'un locuteur dans l'acquisition de la langue seconde. Nous présentons une nouvelle méthodologie pour étudier cette question\xa0: l'analyse des mouvements oculaires dans la lecture en langue seconde de texte libre. En utilisant cette méthodologie, nous démontrons pour la première fois que la langue maternelle des apprenants d'anglais peut être prédite à partir de leur fixation du regard lorsqu'ils lisent l'anglais. Nous fournissons une analyse de l'incertitude des classificateurs et des caractéristiques apprises, ce qui indique que les différences de lecture en anglais sont susceptibles d'être enracinées dans les divergences linguistiques entre les langues maternelles. Le cadre présenté complète les études de production et offre de nouvelles pistes pour faire avancer la recherche sur le multilinguisme.", 'pt': 'Uma questão fundamental na aprendizagem de línguas diz respeito ao papel da primeira língua de um falante na aquisição de uma segunda língua. Apresentamos uma nova metodologia para estudar esta questão: análise dos padrões de movimento dos olhos na leitura de um texto de forma livre na segunda língua. Usando essa metodologia, demonstramos pela primeira vez que a língua nativa dos alunos de inglês pode ser prevista a partir de suas fixações de olhar ao ler inglês. Fornecemos análise da incerteza do classificador e dos recursos aprendidos, o que indica que as diferenças na leitura em inglês provavelmente estão enraizadas em divergências linguísticas entre os idiomas nativos. A estrutura apresentada complementa os estudos de produção e oferece novas bases para o avanço da pesquisa sobre o multilinguismo.', 'es': 'Una pregunta fundamental en el aprendizaje de idiomas se refiere al papel del primer idioma del hablante en la adquisición de un segundo idioma. Presentamos una metodología novedosa para estudiar esta cuestión: el análisis de los patrones de movimiento ocular en la lectura de textos de forma libre en un segundo idioma. Con esta metodología, demostramos por primera vez que el idioma nativo de los estudiantes de inglés se puede predecir a partir de la fijación de sus miradas cuando leen inglés. Proporcionamos un análisis de la incertidumbre del clasificador y las características aprendidas, lo que indica que es probable que las diferencias en la lectura del inglés se basen en divergencias lingüísticas entre los idiomas nativos. El marco presentado complementa los estudios de producción y ofrece nuevas bases para avanzar en la investigación sobre el multilingüismo.', 'ja': '言語学習における基本的な質問は、第二言語習得における話者の第一言語の役割に関するものである。この問題を研究するための新たな方法論を提示している。すなわち、自由形式テキストの第二言語読み取りにおける目の動きのパターンの分析である。この方法論を用いて、英語を読む際の視線の固定から、英語学習者の母国語が予測できることを初めて実証した。私たちは、分類子の不確実性と学習された特徴の分析を提供します。これは、英語の読み方の違いが、ネイティブ言語間の言語の乖離に根ざしている可能性が高いことを示しています。提示されたフレームワークは、生産研究を補完し、多言語の研究を進めるための新しい基盤を提供する。', 'zh': '言学一本,言者第一语在第二语言习得中。 论此新法:析自由文本第二语言读中眼球动模样。 用此术者,吾首证之,观英语之时,可从其视中占英语学者之母语。 供分类器不确定性学之分,明英语读之异,盖出于母语言之异也。 所建框架者,生治之补也,所以进多语文者,所以资新域也。', 'ru': 'Основополагающий вопрос в изучении языка касается роли первого языка говорящего в освоении второго языка. Представляем новую методику изучения этого вопроса: анализ закономерностей движения глаз при чтении свободного текста на втором языке. Используя эту методологию, мы впервые демонстрируем, что родной язык изучающих английский язык можно предсказать по их взглядам при чтении английского языка. Мы даем анализ неопределенности классификатора и изученных особенностей, что указывает на то, что различия в английском чтении, вероятно, коренится в языковых расхождениях между родными языками. Представленные рамки дополняют производственные исследования и открывают новые возможности для продвижения исследований в области многоязычия.', 'hi': 'भाषा सीखने में एक मौलिक प्रश्न दूसरी भाषा अधिग्रहण में एक वक्ता की पहली भाषा की भूमिका से संबंधित है। हम इस प्रश्न का अध्ययन करने के लिए एक उपन्यास पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं: मुक्त-फॉर्म पाठ की दूसरी भाषा पढ़ने में आंख-आंदोलन पैटर्न का विश्लेषण। इस पद्धति का उपयोग करते हुए, हम पहली बार प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि अंग्रेजी पढ़ने वाले शिक्षार्थियों की मूल भाषा को अंग्रेजी पढ़ते समय उनके टकटकी निर्धारण से भविष्यवाणी की जा सकती है। हम क्लासिफायर अनिश्चितता और सीखी गई विशेषताओं का विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं, जो इंगित करता है कि अंग्रेजी पढ़ने में अंतर मूल भाषाओं में भाषाई विचलन में निहित होने की संभावना है। प्रस्तुत ढांचा उत्पादन अध्ययनों का पूरक है और बहुभाषावाद पर अनुसंधान को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए नई जमीन प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Baineann ceist bhunúsach i bhfoghlaim teanga le ról chéad teanga an chainteora i sealbhú an dara teanga. Cuirimid modheolaíocht nua i láthair chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar an gceist seo: anailís ar phatrúin gluaiseachta súl i léamh an dara teanga ar théacs saorfhoirme. Ag baint úsáide as an modheolaíocht seo, léirímid den chéad uair gur féidir teanga dhúchais fhoghlaimeoirí an Bhéarla a thuar óna gcuid socruithe gaze agus iad ag léamh an Bhéarla. Cuirimid anailís ar neamhchinnteacht an aicmitheora agus ar ghnéithe foghlamtha, a thugann le fios gur dócha go mbeidh difríochtaí sa léitheoireacht Bhéarla fréamhaithe in éagsúlachtaí teanga trasna teangacha dúchais. Comhlánaíonn an creat a thíolactar staidéir táirgthe agus cuireann sé talamh nua ar fáil chun taighde ar an ilteangachas a chur chun cinn.', 'ka': 'ფუნდამენტური კითხვა ენის სწავლების პირველი ენის პირველი პროლია მეორე ენის მიღებაში. ჩვენ ამ კითხვის შესწავლობისთვის პრომენური მეტოლოგია ჩვენ აჩვენებთ: ახლა მოძრაობის მოძრაობის ანალიზი მეორე ენაში თავისუფალი ტექსტის კითხვა. ამ მეტოდოლოგიის გამოყენება, ჩვენ პირველად დავიწყებთ, რომ ანგლისური სწავლებელების დედამიწარმოდგენება შეიძლება იყოს მათი დანახმარებისგან, როდესაც ინგლისური კითხვაში ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციური უცნობიერების ანალიზაცია და სწავლილი განსხვავებების ანალიზაცია, რომლებიც აჩვენებს, რომ ინგლისური წაკითხვის განსხვავებები შეიძლება იყოს ენგლისტიკურ მომხმარებული პარამეტრები კომპლექტირებს პროექტირებული სწავლებების შესაძლებლობა და ახალი მიზეზი მულტილენგურაციის შესაძლებლობა.', 'hu': 'A nyelvtanulás alapvető kérdése a beszélő első nyelvének a második nyelvtanulásban betöltött szerepét érinti. Egy új módszertant mutatunk be ennek a kérdésnek a tanulmányozására: a szemmozgási minták elemzése a szabad formájú szöveg második nyelvű olvasásában. Ezzel a módszerrel első alkalommal mutatjuk be, hogy angol nyelvű tanulók anyanyelve előre megjósolható az angol nyelvű olvasás során. Az osztályozók bizonytalanságának és tanult jellemzőinek elemzését végezzük, ami azt jelzi, hogy az angol olvasás különbségei valószínűleg az anyanyelvek közötti nyelvi eltérésekben gyökereznek. A bemutatott keret kiegészíti a termelési tanulmányokat, és új terepet kínál a többnyelvűséggel kapcsolatos kutatás előmozdításához.', 'el': 'Ένα θεμελιώδες ερώτημα στην εκμάθηση γλωσσών αφορά το ρόλο της πρώτης γλώσσας ενός ομιλητή στην απόκτηση δεύτερης γλώσσας. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μεθοδολογία για τη μελέτη αυτού του ερωτήματος: ανάλυση των μοτίβων κίνησης των ματιών στη δεύτερη γλώσσα ανάγνωσης κειμένου ελεύθερης μορφής. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτή τη μεθοδολογία, καταδεικνύουμε για πρώτη φορά ότι η μητρική γλώσσα των μαθητών της αγγλικής γλώσσας μπορεί να προβλεφθεί από τις εμμονές τους στο βλέμμα όταν διαβάζουν αγγλικά. Παρέχουμε ανάλυση της αβεβαιότητας των ταξινομητών και των μαθημένων χαρακτηριστικών, γεγονός που δείχνει ότι οι διαφορές στην αγγλική ανάγνωση είναι πιθανό να ριζωθούν σε γλωσσικές αποκλίσεις μεταξύ των μητρικών γλωσσών. Το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο συμπληρώνει τις μελέτες παραγωγής και προσφέρει νέο έδαφος για την προώθηση της έρευνας σχετικά με την πολυγλωσσία.', 'kk': 'Тілді оқыту үшін негізгі сұрақ екінші тілінің алғашқы тілінің рөлін жасайды. Бұл сұрақты оқу үшін романдық методология келтіріп тұрмыз: бос түрлі мәтін оқу үшін екінші тілде көзді жылжыту үлгілерін анализ. Бұл методологияны қолдану үшін бірінші рет ағылшын тілінің негізгі тілі ағылшын тіліні оқу үшін бақылау тәртібінен көрсетіледі. Біз классификациялық тәуелсіздік және үйренген мүмкіндіктерді анализ береміз. Бұл ағылшын оқу үшін әртүрлі тілдер тілдерінің тілдерінің тілдерінің тілдерінде түсірілген болуы Келтірілген қоршау жасалған зерттеулерді доғару және көптеген тілдік зерттеулерді жаңа зерттеулерді қолданады.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinis kalbų mokymosi klausimas susijęs su kalbėtojo pirmosios kalbos vaidmeniu antrosios kalbos įgijimo srityje. Pateikiame naują šio klausimo tyrimo metodiką: akių judėjimo modelių analizę antrojoje kalboje skaitant laisvos formos tekstą. Taikant šią metodiką pirmą kartą įrodome, kad anglų kalba gali būti prognozuojama skaitant anglų kalbą. Pateikiame klasifikuotojų neapibrėžtumo ir išmoktų savybių analizę, kuri rodo, kad anglų kalbos skaitymo skirtumai greičiausiai atsiranda dėl kalbų skirtumų tarp gimtųjų kalbų. Ši sistema papildo gamybos tyrimus ir suteikia naujų pagrindų daugiakalbystės moksliniams tyrimams tobulinti.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ചോദ്യം രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d സ്പീക്ടരുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രഭാഷണത ഈ ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു: സ്വതന്ത്രമായ പദാവലിയുടെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഭാഷയില ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പഠിക്കുന്നവരുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വായിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവരുടെ കണ്ണുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവചിക്കാ നമ്മള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറ്റില്ലാത്തതും പഠിക്കാത്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും അന്വേഷണം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വായിക്കു പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dട്ട്രെക്ക് പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതികള്\u200d പുതിയ ഭൂമിയില്\u200d കൊടുക', 'it': "Una questione fondamentale nell'apprendimento delle lingue riguarda il ruolo della prima lingua di un parlante nell'acquisizione della seconda lingua. Presentiamo una nuova metodologia per studiare questa domanda: analisi dei modelli di movimento oculare nella lettura in seconda lingua del testo libero. Utilizzando questa metodologia, dimostriamo per la prima volta che la lingua madre degli studenti di inglese può essere predetta dalle loro fissazioni dello sguardo quando leggono l'inglese. Forniamo analisi dell'incertezza del classificatore e delle caratteristiche apprese, il che indica che le differenze nella lettura inglese sono probabilmente radicate nelle divergenze linguistiche tra le lingue native. Il quadro presentato integra gli studi di produzione e offre nuove basi per far progredire la ricerca sul multilinguismo.", 'mn': 'Холын суралцах сургалтын үндсэн асуулт нь хэлэгчийн эхний хэл хоёр дахь хэлний худалдан авах үүрэг юм. Бид энэ асуултыг судлах шинэ аргыг тайлбарлаж байна: нүдний хөдөлгөөн загварын талаар хоёр дахь хэлний үнэгүй хэлбэрийн текст унших хэлбэрийн шинжилгээ. Энэ методологийг ашиглан бид англи хэлний сурагчидын эх хэл Англи хэлний унших үед англи хэлний судалгаанаас англи хэлний судалгаанаас таамаглаж болно. Бид англи уншихад өөрчлөлт нь үндэсний хэл дээр хэлний өөрчлөлттэй байх боломжтой хэлбэрээр ангид унших боломжтой тодорхойгүй байдлын шинжилгээг өгдөг. Олон хэлний судалгааны тухай судалгааг дэмжиж, олон хэлний судалгааны тухай шинэ шалтгаан нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Eit grunnleggjande spørsmål i språk-læring gjer området til den første språket i andre språk. Vi presenterer ein roman metodologi for å studera dette spørsmålet: analyse av øybevegelsmønsteret i andre språk lesing av friforma tekst. Bruk denne metodologien, viser vi for første gong at den første språket av engelske lærarane kan foregå frå sine gjennomsiktsrettingar når det leser engelsk. Vi gjev analyse av klassifiserte usikkerhet og lærte funksjonar, som viser at forskjeller i engelsk lesing er sannsynlegvis rotert i språkstiske forskjeller over dei følgjande språka. Det presenterte rammeverket complementerer produksjonsstudiar og tilbyr nye grunn for å forbedra forskning om fleirlingvism.', 'pl': 'Podstawowe pytanie w nauce języków dotyczy roli pierwszego języka mówcy w nabywaniu drugiego języka. Przedstawiamy nowatorską metodologię badania tego pytania: analizę wzorców ruchów oczu w drugim języku tekstu wolnej formy. Wykorzystując tę metodologię, po raz pierwszy pokazujemy, że język ojczysty uczących się angielskiego można przewidzieć z ich fiksacji wzroku podczas czytania angielskiego. Przeprowadzamy analizę niepewności klasyfikatora i nauczonych cech, co wskazuje, że różnice w czytaniu angielskim prawdopodobnie wynikają z rozbieżności językowych między językami ojczystymi. Przedstawione ramy uzupełniają badania produkcyjne i oferują nowe podstawy do postępu badań nad wielojęzycznością.', 'mt': "A fundamental question in language learning concerns the role of a speaker's first language in second language acquisition.  Aħna nippreżentaw metodoloġija ġdida għall-istudju ta’ din il-kwistjoni: analiżi ta’ xejriet ta’ moviment tal-għajnejn fit-tieni qari tal-lingwa tat-test b’form a ħielsa. Bl-użu ta’ din il-metodoloġija, għall-ewwel darba nippruvaw li l-lingwa nattiva ta’ dawk li jitgħallmu l-Ingliż tista’ tiġi mbassra mill-fissazzjonijiet tal-għajnejn tagħhom meta jaqraw l-Ingliż. Aħna nipprovdu analiżi tal-in ċertezza tal-klassifikatur u l-karatteristiċi mitgħallma, li tindika li d-differenzi fil-qari bl-Ingliż x’aktarx ikunu għeruq fid-diverġenzi lingwistiċi bejn il-lingwi nattivi. Il-qafas ippreżentat jikkumplimenta l-istudji tal-produzzjoni u joffri bażi ġdida għall-avvanz tar-riċerka dwar il-multilingwiżmu.", 'ro': 'O întrebare fundamentală în învățarea limbilor străine se referă la rolul primei limbi a unui vorbitor în dobândirea limbii a doua. Prezentăm o metodologie nouă pentru studierea acestei întrebări: analiza modelelor de mișcare a ochilor în lectura în limba a doua a textului în formă liberă. Folosind această metodologie, demonstrăm pentru prima dată că limba maternă a cursanților de engleză poate fi prezisă din fixările privirii lor atunci când citesc limba engleză. Oferim o analiză a incertitudinii clasificatorului și a caracteristicilor învățate, ceea ce indică faptul că diferențele în lectura engleză sunt probabil înrădăcinate în divergențele lingvistice dintre limbile materne. Cadrul prezentat completează studiile de producție și oferă un teren nou pentru progresul cercetării privind multilingvismul.', 'sr': 'Osnovno pitanje jezičkog učenja se odnosi na ulogu prvog jezika govornika u prihvatanju drugih jezika. Predstavljamo novu metodologiju za proučavanje ovog pitanja: analiza obrazaca pokreta očiju u drugom jeziku èitanja slobodnog teksta. Koristeći ovu metodologiju, prvi put pokazujemo da se jezik engleskih učenika može predvidjeti iz njihovih fiksiranja pogleda kada čitamo engleski. Mi pružamo analizu klasifikacijske nesigurnosti i naučenih karakteristika, koja ukazuje na to da su razlike u čitanju engleskog jezika verovatno korijenjene u jezičkim razlikama na rodnim jezicima. Predstavljeni okvir dopunjava proizvodnje ispitivanja i nudi novu temu za napredovanje istraživanja o multilingvismu.', 'si': 'භාෂාව ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙවෙනි භාෂාව අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාසයක් පෙන්වනවා: දෙවෙනි භාෂාව කියවන්නේ නිදහස් විද්\u200dයාස මේ විද්\u200dයාව පාවිච්චි කරන්න, අපි පළමු වතාව පෙන්වන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ශීෂකයන්ගේ ඉත්තිම භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉන්ග්\u200dරී අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණය අනිශ්වාසය සහ ඉගෙන ගත්ත විශ්වාසය, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි කියවන්නේ වෙනස් වලින්  පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා නිර්මාණය පරීක්ෂණය සහ අළුත් පැත්තක් අරගෙන ඉදි', 'so': "Saabi aasaasi ah oo ku saabsan barashada luqada, waxaa laga yaabaa in ay leeyihiin qayb ku saabsan luqada ugu horeysa ee hadalka ku hadla oo ku qoran barashada luqada labaad. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaabab sawir ah oo lagu baranayo su'aalkan: baaritaanka noocyada dhaqdhaqaaqa ee luqada labaad oo ku qoran qoraal lacag la'aan ah. Isku isticmaalka qaababkan, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu muujinnaa in afka ingiriisiga wax barashada afkiisa hooyo looga hor dhigi karo qalabka indhaha marka la akhriyo Ingiriis. Anagaa sameynaya baaritaanka aqoonta iyo waxyaabaha la bartay, taas oo caddaynaya in kala duwanaanshaha afka ingiriisiga lagu akhriyo looga dhigi karo kala duwan luuqadaha afka hooyo oo dhan. Waxbarashada dhaqaalaha ee iskuullada soo saara waxaa lagu bixiyaa dhul cusub oo la hormariyo waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan.", 'ms': "A fundamental question in language learning concerns the role of a speaker's first language in second language acquisition.  We present a novel methodology for studying this question: analysis of eye-movement patterns in second language reading of free-form text.  Dengan menggunakan metodologi ini, kita menunjukkan untuk pertama kalinya bahasa asli pelajar Inggeris boleh dijangka dari fixasi pandangan mereka apabila membaca bahasa Inggeris. Kami menyediakan analisis ketidakpastian klasifikasi dan ciri-ciri belajar, yang menunjukkan bahawa perbezaan dalam pembacaan bahasa Inggeris mungkin menjadi punca dalam perbezaan bahasa melalui bahasa asli. Bingkai persembahan ini menambahkan kajian produksi dan menawarkan dasar baru untuk melangkah kajian tentang kebanyakan bahasa.", 'mk': 'Фундаментално прашање во учењето на јазиците се однесува на улогата на првиот јазик на говорникот во купувањето на вториот јазик. Презентираме нова методологија за проучување на ова прашање: анализа на моделите на движење на очите во вториот јазик на слободен текст. Користејќи ја оваа методологија, за прв пат демонстрираме дека родниот јазик на англиските ученици може да се предвидува од нивните фиксации на погледот кога читаат англиски. We provide analysis of classifier uncertainty and learned features, which indicates that differences in English reading are likely to be rooted in linguistic divergences across native languages.  Презентираната рамка ги комплиментира производските студии и нуди нова основа за напредок на истражувањето за мултијазизмот.', 'sv': 'En grundläggande fråga i språkinlärning handlar om den roll som talarens första språk spelar i andraspråksförmåga. Vi presenterar en ny metod för att studera denna fråga: analys av ögonrörelsemönster i andraspråksläsning av friformstext. Med hjälp av denna metod visar vi för första gången att modersmålet för engelska elever kan förutses från deras blickfixeringar när de läser engelska. Vi ger analys av klassificeringsosäkerhet och lärda funktioner, vilket tyder på att skillnader i engelsk läsning sannolikt kommer att bero på språkliga skillnader mellan modersmål. Den presenterade ramen kompletterar produktionsstudier och erbjuder ny grund för att främja forskningen om flerspråkighet.', 'ur': 'زبان کی تعلیم میں ایک بنیادی سوال دوسری زبان حاصل میں ایک صحبت کرنے والے کی پہلی زبان کی رول پر ہے۔ ہم نے اس سوال کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک نئی روشن طریقہ پیش کیا ہے: آزاد فرم کے متن کی دوسری زبان میں آنکھوں کی حرکت پھیلانے کی تحلیل. اس طریقے سے ہم پہلی بار انگلیسی تعلیم کرنے والوں کی ملک کی زبان سے انگلیسی پڑھنے کے وقت اپنی نگاہ کی تعلیم سے پیش بینی کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم کلیسٹر غیر یقینی اور سیکھی ویژگی کا تحلیل دیتے ہیں، جو نشان دیتا ہے کہ انگلیسی پڑھنے میں اختلاف ممکن ہے کہ ملک زبانوں میں زبان اختلاف میں پڑھے جائیں۔ پیش کیے ہوئے فرمود نے پیدائش کی تحقیقات کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور بہت سی زبان تعلیم کے بارے میں تحقیقات کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے نئی زمین پیش کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'மொழியில் கற்றுக் கொள்ள முக்கியமான கேள்வி இரண்டாவது மொழியில் பேசுபவரின் முதல் மொழியின் பங்கை பற்றியது. இந்த கேள்வியை படிப்பதற்கான புதிய முறைமையை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம்: இலவச வடிவத்தை படிக்க இரண்டாவது மொழியில் கண் நகர் இந்த முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி முதல் முறையாக நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் கற்றுக்கொள்பவர்களின் மூலம் மொழியிலிருந்து மு நாம் வகுப்பாளர் அறியாத மற்றும் கற்றப்படாத குணங்களை ஆய்வு வழங்குகிறோம், அது ஆங்கிலத்தில் படிக்கும் வேறுபாடுகள் மொழியில் மொழியில கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தின் சிக்கல் உறுப்புபடுத்தல் ஆய்வு', 'vi': 'Một câu hỏi quan trọng trong việc học ngôn ngữ là vai trò của ngôn ngữ đầu tiên trong việc giành lấy ngôn ngữ thứ hai. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để nghiên cứu vấn đề này: phân tích cách di chuyển mắt trong lần đọc chữ thứ hai trong văn bản tự do. Sử dụng phương pháp này, chúng tôi lần đầu tiên chứng minh ngôn ngữ bản xứ của người học tiếng Anh có thể được dự đoán qua sự chú ý của họ khi đọc tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi cung cấp phân tích về sự mơ hồ phân loại và các tính năng học tập, cho thấy sự khác biệt trong cách đọc tiếng Anh có thể bám rễ trong sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ. Giới hạn được trình bày hoàn thiện các nghiên cứu sản xuất và tạo ra một nền tảng mới để tiến hành nghiên cứu đa dạng.', 'uz': "Tilni o'rganish asosiy savol gapiruvchi ikkinchi tillardan birinchi tilning joyini o'zgartiradi. Biz bu savollarni o'rganish uchun novel metodini hozir qilamiz: bilan birinchi tilda o'qish uchun ko'k harakat tugmalarini analyzer. Bu usulni ishlatish uchun birinchi marta biz ingliz tili o'rganishlarning native tili o'rganishlari ingliz tilini o'qishda o'zgarishni o'rganish mumkin. Biz nashfiy haqiqiylik va o'rganish xossalarini bajaramiz. Bu haqida ingliz tilida o'qishga o'xshash o'xshash o'ylaydi, o'sha tilda o'zgarishlar natijadagi tillardan o'zgarishlar tarjima qilishi mumkin. Name", 'bg': 'Основен въпрос в изучаването на езици се отнася до ролята на първия език на говорителя при придобиването на втори език. Представяме нова методология за изучаване на този въпрос: анализ на моделите на движението на очите при четене на втори език на свободен текст. Използвайки тази методология, ние демонстрираме за първи път, че родният език на обучаемите английски език може да бъде предсказан от фиксирането на погледа им при четене на английски език. Предлагаме анализ на несигурността на класификатора и научените характеристики, което показва, че разликите в английското четене вероятно ще се коренят в лингвистичните различия между родните езици. Представената рамка допълва производствените проучвания и предлага нова основа за напредване на научните изследвания в областта на многоезичието.', 'da': 'Et grundlæggende spørgsmål inden for sprogindlæring vedrører den rolle, en talers første sprog spiller i indlæringen af andet sprog. Vi præsenterer en ny metode til at studere dette spørgsmål: analyse af øjenbevægelsesmønstre i andetsproget læsning af friform tekst. Ved hjælp af denne metode demonstrerer vi for første gang, at engelsklæreres modersmål kan forudsiges ud fra deres blikfæstninger, når de læser engelsk. Vi leverer analyse af klassificeringsusikkerhed og lærte funktioner, hvilket indikerer, at forskelle i engelsk læsning sandsynligvis vil være rodfæstet i sproglige forskelle på tværs af modersmål. De fremlagte rammer supplerer produktionsundersøgelser og giver nye muligheder for at fremme forskningen om flersprogethed.', 'nl': 'Een fundamentele vraag bij het leren van talen betreft de rol van de eerste taal van een spreker bij het verwerven van een tweede taal. We presenteren een nieuwe methodologie voor het bestuderen van deze vraag: analyse van oogbewegingspatronen in tweede taal lezen van vrije vorm tekst. Met deze methodologie laten we voor het eerst zien dat de moedertaal van Engelstaligen voorspeld kan worden vanuit hun blikfixaties bij het lezen van Engels. We bieden een analyse van classificatieonzekerheid en aangeleerde kenmerken, wat aangeeft dat verschillen in het lezen in het Engels waarschijnlijk geworteld zijn in taalverschillen tussen moedertalen. Het voorgestelde kader vormt een aanvulling op productiestudies en biedt nieuwe mogelijkheden om onderzoek naar meertaligheid te bevorderen.', 'hr': 'Osnovno pitanje jezičkog učenja se odnosi na ulogu prvog jezika govornika u prikupnji drugih jezika. Predstavljamo novu metodologiju za proučavanje ovog pitanja: analiza obrazaca pokreta očima u drugom jeziku čitanja slobodnog teksta. Koristeći ovu metodologiju, prvi put pokazujemo da se jezik engleskih učenika može predvidjeti iz njihovih fiksiranja pogleda kada čitamo engleski. Mi pružamo analizu klasifikacijske nesigurnosti i naučenih karakteristika, što ukazuje na to da će razlike u čitanju engleskog jezika vjerojatno biti korijenjene u jezičkim razlikama na rodnim jezicima. Predstavljeni okvir dopunjava proizvodnje ispitivanja i nudi novo područje za napredovanje istraživanja o multilingvismu.', 'de': 'Eine grundlegende Frage beim Sprachenlernen betrifft die Rolle der Muttersprache eines Sprechers beim Erwerb einer zweiten Sprache. Wir stellen eine neue Methodik zur Untersuchung dieser Frage vor: Analyse von Augenbewegungsmustern im Zweitsprachenlesen von Freiformtext. Mit dieser Methodik zeigen wir erstmals, dass die Muttersprache von Englischlernenden anhand ihrer Blickfixationen beim Lesen von Englisch vorhergesagt werden kann. Wir bieten eine Analyse der Klassifizierungsunsicherheit und der erlernten Merkmale, die darauf hindeutet, dass Unterschiede im Englischen wahrscheinlich in sprachlichen Divergenzen zwischen Muttersprachen wurzeln. Das vorgestellte Rahmenwerk ergänzt Produktionsstudien und bietet neue Wege zur Weiterentwicklung der Forschung zur Mehrsprachigkeit.', 'ko': '언어 학습 중의 기본적인 문제는 말하는 사람의 첫 번째 언어가 두 번째 언어 습득에서의 작용과 관련된다.우리는 이 문제를 연구하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다. 바로 자유 텍스트 제2 언어 읽기에서의 눈동자 모델 분석이다.이런 방법을 통해 우리는 처음으로 영어 학습자들이 영어를 읽을 때 그들의 모국어를 예측할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 양사의 불확실성과 습득 특징을 분석한 결과 영어 읽기에서의 차이는 서로 다른 모국어의 언어 차이에서 비롯될 수 있음을 나타냈다.제시된 틀은 생산 연구를 보충하고 다언어 연구를 추진하기 위해 새로운 기초를 제공했다.', 'id': 'Pertanyaan dasar dalam belajar bahasa berkaitan dengan peran bahasa pertama seorang pembicara dalam pengakuan bahasa kedua. Kami mempersembahkan metodologi baru untuk mempelajari pertanyaan ini: analisis pola pergerakan mata dalam bahasa kedua membaca teks bentuk bebas. Menggunakan metodologi ini, kita menunjukkan untuk pertama kalinya bahasa asli para pelajar Inggris dapat diprediksi dari fixasi pandangan mereka ketika membaca bahasa Inggris. Kami menyediakan analisis ketidakpastian klasifikasi dan ciri-ciri belajar, yang menunjukkan bahwa perbedaan dalam pembacaan Inggris mungkin berasal dari perbedaan bahasa melalui bahasa asli. Kerja yang ditemukan menambahkan studi produksi dan menawarkan dasar baru untuk meningkatkan penelitian multibahasa.', 'fa': "یک سوال بنیادی در یادگیری زبان concerns the role of a speaker's first language in second language acquisition. ما روش نویسی برای مطالعه این سوال را پیشنهاد می کنیم: تحلیل الگوهای حرکت چشم در زبان دوم از متن آزاد فرم است. با استفاده از این روش\u200cشناسی، برای اولین بار نشان می\u200cدهیم که زبان مادری دانش\u200cآموزان انگلیسی می\u200cتوانند در زمان خواندن انگلیسی از تأثیرات نگاهشان پیش بینی شود. ما تحلیل uncertainty محرمانه\u200cتری و ویژه\u200cهای یاد گرفته\u200cتری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که نشان می\u200cدهد که تفاوت در خواندن انگلیسی احتمالاً در اختلاف زبان\u200cهای متمادی ریشه می\u200cشوند. این چهارچوب پیشنهاد تحقیقات تولید را اضافه می کند و زمینی جدید برای تحقیقات بیشتر زبان\u200cشناسی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند.", 'sw': 'Swali la msingi kwa kujifunza lugha linahusu jukumu la lugha ya kwanza kwa lugha ya pili. Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu ya riwaya kwa ajili ya kusoma swali hili: uchambuzi wa namna za harakati za macho kwa lugha ya pili kwa kusoma ujumbe wa bure. Kwa kutumia mbinu hii, tunaonyesha kwa mara ya kwanza kuwa lugha ya wanafunzi wa Kiingereza ya asili inaweza kutabiriwa kutoka kwenye magereza ya macho yao wakati wa kusoma Kiingereza. Tunatoa uchambuzi wa utambulisho usio na ukweli na unaofahamika, ambao unaonyesha kuwa tofauti za kusoma Kiingereza zinaweza kuangaliwa katika tofauti za lugha mbalimbali katika lugha za wenyeji. Tafiti za uzalishaji zilizotolewa na utafiti mpya wa utafiti wa lugha mbalimbali.', 'tr': 'Dil öwrenmesinde esasy soragy 2-nji dilde s özleýän diliniň ilkinji täbligini alada edýär. Biz bu soragy öwrenmek üçin roman metodologiýany görkeýäris: 2-nji dilde boş-biýik metin okamak üçin göz önünde nusgalaryň analizi. Bu methodologiýany ulanarak, iňlisçe öwrenmeleriň ene dilini iňlisçe okaýanda gözleriniň taýýarlaryndan öňünden öňünde durup biler. Biz klasifik kesinliklerini we öwrenmeli özellikleri analyz edip görýäris. Bu iňlis okamagynda lingwistiki dillerin arasynda dürli üýtgeşiklerini belli edip bilýäris. Şol framda üretim öwrenmelerini tamamlaýar we multilingüjilik barynda araştyrmalary täze ýere täze ýer berýär.', 'af': "'n Basiese vraag in taal leer betrokke die rol van 'n sprekker se eerste taal in tweede taal aanvang. Ons stel 'n nuwe metodologie voor die ondersoek van hierdie vraag: analisie van oë-beweging patrone in tweede taal lees van vry-vorm teks. Deur hierdie metodologie te gebruik, wys ons vir die eerste keer dat die moedertaal van Engelske leerners voorskou kan word van hul kyk regstellings wanneer Engels lees. Ons verskaf analiseer van klassifiseerder onbevestigheid en geleerde funksies, wat wys dat verskille in Engelske lees waarskynlik in lingwisiese verskillinge oor natuurlike tale moet word. Die voorgestelde raamwerk complementeer produksiestudies en stel nuwe grond voor te versterk ondersoek oor multilingvisme.", 'sq': 'Një pyetje thelbësore në mësimin e gjuhës ka të bëjë me rolin e gjuhës s ë parë të një folësi në blerjen e gjuhës së dytë. Ne paraqesim një metodologji të re për studimin e kësaj pyetjeje: analiza e modeleve të lëvizjes sysh në gjuhën e dytë leximi i tekstit me form ë të lirë. Duke përdorur këtë metodologji, ne demonstrojmë për herë të parë se gjuha natyrore e mësuesve të anglishtit mund të parashikohet nga fiksimi i shikimit të tyre kur lexojnë anglishtin. Ne japim analizë të pasigurisë klasifikuese dhe karakteristikave të mësuara, që tregon se dallimet në leximin anglez ka gjasa të jenë të rrënjësuara në dallimet gjuhësore nëpër gjuhët e lindjes. Korniza e paraqitur komplementon studimet e prodhimit dhe ofron bazë të re për përparimin e kërkimit mbi shumëgjuhësimin.', 'am': 'በቋንቋ ትምህርት መጀመሪያ ጥያቄ በሁለተኛ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የመጀመሪያ ቋንቋን መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጥያቄ ለማንበብ የዘላለም ዘዴ እናቀርባለን፤ የዓይን-መንቀሳቀስ ምሳሌዎችን በሁለተኛው ቋንቋ የነፃ ጽሑፍ በማንበብ እናስተምር፡፡ ይህንን ማቀናጃ በተጠቀምን፣ ለመጀመሪያ ጊዜ እንግሊዘኛ ተማሪዎቹ የግልፅ ቋንቋ በንግግሊዝኛ ሲያነብ ከዓይኖቻቸው ፍጥረት መሆኑን ለማስታወቅ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ልዩ ልዩነት እንዲነካ ይቻላል፡፡ The presented framework complements production studies and offers new ground for advancing research on multilingualism.', 'bn': 'ভাষা শিক্ষার মৌলিক প্রশ্ন দ্বিতীয় ভাষায় একজন ভাষার প্রথম ভূমিকা নিয়ে উদ্বিগ্ন। আমরা এই প্রশ্ন পড়ার জন্য একটি উপন্যাসের পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছি: দ্বিতীয় ভাষায় মুক্ত ফর্মের লেখা পড়ার বিশ্লেষণ। এই পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে আমরা প্রথমবার প্রদর্শন করি যে ইংরেজী শিক্ষার্থীদের স্থানীয় ভাষা থেকে তাদের চোখের সংক্রান্ত সংস্কারের আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি নিশ্চিতভাবে এবং শিক্ষিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশ্লেষণ, যা নির্দেশ করে যে ইংরেজি ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ভাষায় ভিন্ন ভাষা প্রদত্ত ফ্রেমের কাঠামো সম্পূর্ণ গবেষণা এবং বহুভাষায় উন্নত গবেষণার জন্য নতুন ভূমিকা প্রদান করে।', 'az': 'Dil öyrənməsində əsl sual ikinci dil alınmasında danışanların ilk dilinin rolünü məhv edir. Biz bu sualın öyrənməsi üçün yeni bir metodolojiyi göstəririk: göz-hərəkət modellərinin ikinci dildə boş formlu metinlərin oxuması analizi. Bu metodika istifadə edirək, ilk dəfə İngilizə öyrənənənlərin anası dilinin İngilizə oxuyarkən gözlərinin fikrindən tədbir edilməsini göstəririk. Biz sadəcə olaraq təhlükəsizlik və öyrənməli fərqlər analizi təyin edirik ki, İngilis oxumasında fərqli olaraq dil dillərinin arasındakı fərqli fərqli olaraq kökü olar. Beləliklə göstərilən çerçive ürək təhsilələrini tamamlayır və çoxlu dil təhsilələrində araştırmalarını artırmaq üçün yeni bir yer təklif edir.', 'hy': "Լեզու սովորելու հիմնական հարցը կապված է խոսացողի առաջին լեզվի դերի հետ երկրորդ լեզվի ձեռք բերման մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս հարցի ուսումնասիրելու նոր մեթոդոլոգիա' անվճար տեքստի երկրորդ լեզվի ընթերցման աչքերի շարժման կաղապարների վերլուծություն: Օգտագործելով այս մեթոդոլոգիան, մենք առաջին անգամ ցույց ենք տալիս, որ անգլերենի ուսանողների մայրիկ լեզուն կարելի է կանխատեսել անգլերեն կարդալու ժամանակ: Մենք տրամադրում ենք դասակարգչային անորոշության և սովորված հատկությունների վերլուծություն, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ անգլերենի կարդալու տարբերությունները հավանաբար հիմնված են լեզվաբանական տարբերությունների միջև բնիկ լեզուներում: Պատրաստված շրջանակը համալրացնում է արտադրության ուսումնասիրությունները և նոր հիմք է տալիս բազմալեզվության ուսումնասիրությունների զարգացման համար:", 'bs': 'Osnovno pitanje jezičkog učenja se tiče uloge prvog jezika govornika u prihvatanju drugih jezika. Predstavljamo novu metodologiju za proučavanje ovog pitanja: analiza obrazaca pokreta očiju u drugom jeziku čitanja slobodnog teksta. Koristeći ovu metodologiju, prvi put pokazujemo da se jezik engleskih učenika može predvidjeti iz njihovih fiksiranja pogleda kada čitamo engleski. Mi pružamo analizu klasifikacijske nesigurnosti i naučenih karakteristika, koja ukazuje na to da su razlike u čitanju engleskog jezika vjerojatno korijenjene u jezičkim razlikama na rodnim jezicima. Predstavljeni okvir dopunjava proizvodnje ispitivanja i nudi novu temu za unapređenje istraživanja o multilingvismu.', 'ca': "Una pregunta fonamental en l'aprenentatge de llenguatges es tracta del paper de la primera llengua d'un parlant en l'adquisició de segona llengua. Presentam una nova metodologia per estudiar aquesta pregunta: anàlisi de patrons de moviment ocular en la segona lectura de llenguatge del text lliure. Utilitzant aquesta metodologia, demostrem per primera vegada que la llengua materna dels aprenents d'anglès pot ser predita a partir de les seves fixacions de mirada quan llegeixen anglès. Oferem anàlisis de l'incertitud del classificador i de les característiques aprendides, que indica que les diferències en lectura anglesa probablement estan arrelats en divergències lingüístices entre les llengües natives. El marc presentat complementa estudis de producció i ofereix un nou terreny per avançar la recerca sobre el multilingüisme.", 'cs': 'Základní otázka ve výuce jazyků se týká role mluvčího prvního jazyka při osvojování druhého jazyka. Představujeme novou metodiku pro studium této otázky: analýzu vzorů pohybu očí ve druhém jazyce čtení volného textu. Pomocí této metodiky poprvé demonstrujeme, že rodný jazyk žáků angličtiny lze předpovědět z jejich fixace pohledu při čtení angličtiny. Poskytujeme analýzu nejistoty klasifikátorů a naučených vlastností, což naznačuje, že rozdíly ve čtení angličtiny budou pravděpodobně zakořeněny v jazykových divergencích mezi rodnými jazyky. Prezentovaný rámec doplňuje výrobní studie a nabízí nové půdy pro pokrok výzkumu mnohojazyčnosti.', 'et': 'Keeleõppe põhiküsimus puudutab kõneleja esimese keele rolli teise keele omandamisel. Esitleme uudse metoodika selle küsimuse uurimiseks: silmade liikumise mustrite analüüs vabakujulise teksti teise keele lugemisel. Selle metoodika abil näitame esmakordselt, et inglise keele õppijate emakeelt saab ennustada nende pilgufikseerimisest inglise keele lugemisel. Analüüsime klassifitseerijate ebakindlust ja õppinud omadusi, mis näitab, et inglise keele lugemise erinevused põhinevad tõenäoliselt emakeelte keelelistel erinevustel. Esitatud raamistik täiendab tootmise uuringuid ja pakub uut alust mitmekeelsuse uuringute edendamiseks.', 'fi': 'Kielten oppimisen peruskysymys koskee puhujan ensimmäisen kielen roolia toisen kielen oppimisessa. Esitämme uudenlaisen menetelmän tämän kysymyksen tutkimiseen: silmänliikkeiden analyysin vapaamuotoisen tekstin toisessa kielessä. Tämän menetelmän avulla osoitamme ensimmäistä kertaa, että englannin kielen oppijoiden äidinkieli voidaan ennustaa heidän katseensa kiinnittymisestä englantia lukiessa. Analysoimme luokittelijoiden epävarmuutta ja opittuja ominaisuuksia, mikä osoittaa, että englanninkielisen lukemisen erot johtuvat todennäköisesti äidinkielen kielieroista. Esitetty viitekehys täydentää tuotantotutkimuksia ja tarjoaa uutta pohjaa monikielisyyden tutkimuksen edistämiselle.', 'jv': 'Sugar sing sabên bangsa nêmêng urip kuwi, ngregani kuwi tindang tuangan sing apik bangsa sapa asla. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing rawut kanggo jewêrung kuwi: kalih banjuré sistem kanggo ngilangno sistem sing wis ana luwih apik. Ngawe ngubah sistem iki, awake dhéwé ngeremusi kanggo sabanjuré tanggal ingkang kelas barang kanggo ngerasahan seneng pisan winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nyebuté karo hal-hal sing ngerasakno karo akeh sing ngerasakno lan kelas, sing ngomong nik kabèh kalaman karo hal basa Inggris kang ngerasakno ning limo sing luwih apik. Nambah ono nggawe nambah sing tukang mruput kanggo ngilanggar alih luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan luwih.', 'ha': "Wata tambayi na bincike da za'a karanta harshe yana da rolin mai farkon mai mai magana cikin kunyar harshe na biyu. Tuna halatar da wani hanyoyi na yanzu wa karanta wannan tambayi: Ana yi anayyar da shiryoyin idãnun-motsi cikin harshen na'ura na karãtun matsayin da aka huru. Yin amfani da wannan hanyoyi, za mu nuna wa farkon lõkaci na Ingiriya, za'a iya gabatar da bakin ayukan su da ke karãtun Ingiriya. Munã bãyar da rabo ga fassarar da ba'a sani ba da kuma da aka sanar, wannan yana madaidaita cẽwa diffuka masu karatun cikin Ingiriya ana yiwuwa an danne a cikin littafan-harshe kowane. The presented framework complements production studies and offers new ground for advancing research on multilingualism.", 'sk': 'Temeljno vprašanje pri učenju jezikov zadeva vlogo govornikovega prvega jezika pri pridobivanju drugega jezika. Predstavljamo novo metodologijo za preučevanje tega vprašanja: analizo vzorcev gibanja oči pri branju prostovoljnega besedila v drugem jeziku. S to metodologijo prvič dokazujemo, da je materni jezik učencev angleščine mogoče predvideti iz njihove fiksacije pogleda pri branju angleščine. Zagotavljamo analizo negotovosti klasifikatorja in učenih značilnosti, kar kaže, da bodo razlike v angleškem branju verjetno izkoreninjene v jezikovnih razlikah med maternimi jeziki. Predstavljeni okvir dopolnjuje proizvodne študije in ponuja novo podlago za napredek raziskav večjezičnosti.', 'he': 'שאלה בסיסית ללמוד שפות קשורה לתפקיד השפה הראשונה של רופא בהרכשת שפות שנייה. אנחנו מציגים מטודולוגיה חדשה ללמוד את השאלה הזאת: ניתוח של דפוסי תנועת עיניים בקריאה בשפה השנייה של טקסט בצורה חופשית. בשימוש במטדולוגיה הזאת, אנחנו מראים בפעם הראשונה ששפת הלידה של לומדים אנגליים ניתן לחזות מתקנות המבט שלהם כשקוראים אנגלית. We provide analysis of classifier uncertainty and learned features, which indicates that differences in English reading are likely to be rooted in linguistic divergences across native languages.  המסגרת המוצגת ממלאת מחקרי יצירה ומציעה בסיס חדש להתקדם מחקר על רבות שפויות.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་དུ་གཞི་རྩལ་བའི་འདྲི་བ་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་པ་ཅིག་གནང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་གཏོད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཞིག་འཆར་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། རྣམ་པ་མེད་པའི་མིང་ཚིག་གཟུགས་རི དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་འདི་སྤྱད་ནས། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོར་ཐོག་མའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མིང་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་མི་རྟོགས་དང་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ནི་ཨིན་རིའི་ཀློག་འཇུག་ནང་གི་ས སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་གིས་བཟོ་བ་དང་སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'MORSE : Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ar': 'مورس: دلالة الحليف Drive-n MORpheme SEEMER-er', 'fr': 'MORSE\xa0: Segment Morphème Drive-N sémantique', 'es': 'MORSE: Segmento de morfema Drive-n semántico-aliado', 'pt': 'MORSE: Semântico-aliado Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ja': 'MORSE:セマンティック-アリードライブ- n MORpheme SEgment - er', 'hi': 'MORSE: शब्दार्थ-सहयोगी ड्राइव-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'zh': 'MORSE： Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ru': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ga': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme deighleog', 'el': 'Σημαντικός-σύμμαχος Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'hu': 'Szemantikus hajtás-n MORpheme SEGMENT-er', 'ka': 'ჟვმანრთფვჟკთ ეპაიგ-ნ MORpheme SEgment-er', 'it': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEGMENT-ER', 'lt': 'MORSE: Semantinio vairuotojo n MORpheme segmentas', 'mk': 'Семантично вози-n MORpheme сегмент-ер', 'kk': 'ДОРФЕМ: Драйвер- n MORpheme SEgment- er', 'ms': 'Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'mn': 'Драйвчлан-н MORpheme SEgment-er', 'mt': 'MORSE: Semantikament Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക്-ആലിയന്\u200d ഡ്രൈവ്-n മൊര്\u200dഫെമി സെഗ്മെന്\u200dറ്-er', 'ro': 'Semantic-aliat Drive-n MORpheme SEGMENT-er', 'no': 'MORSE: Semantisk drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'sr': 'Semantički vožnja-n MORFEM SEGMENT-er', 'pl': 'MORSE: Semantyczno-sojuszniczy Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'so': 'MORFEM SEgment-er', 'sv': 'Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEGMENT-er', 'ta': 'மார்ச்: செமாண்டிக்- ஆல் இயக்கி- n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ur': 'اورٹی: سیمنٹی سے ڈرائین-ن MORpheme SEgment-er', 'si': 'සෙමාන්ටික් සාමාන්තික විදියට Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'uz': 'Uzoh: Semantik uskunasi- n MORFEM SEgment-er', 'vi': '-Sao thế nhỉ?', 'bg': 'Семантично-съюзник Драйв-н Морфем Сегмент-ер', 'da': 'Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEGMENT-er', 'hr': 'Semantički vozitelj-n MORFEM SEgment-er', 'nl': 'MORSE: Semantisch-alliant Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'de': 'MORSE: Semantisch-alliant Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ko': 'MORSE: 의미 구동 n 어소 세그먼트er', 'fa': 'سیمانتیک با رانندگی-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'id': 'Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'tr': 'MORSE: Semantik-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sq': 'Semantikisht Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'sw': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'am': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'hy': 'ՄՕՌՍ՝ Սեմանտիկ Մորֆեմի Սեկմենտիկ', 'az': 'MORSE: Semantik-qüvvətli Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'bn': 'মৃত্যু: সেম্যান্টিক-অ্যালিক ড্রাইভ- n মর্ফেম সেগমেন্ট-er', 'ca': 'MORSE: Semàticament Drive-n MORpheme Segment-er', 'cs': 'Sémanticky-alicky Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'fi': 'Semanttinen liittolainen Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'bs': 'Semantički vozač-n MORFEM SEGMENT-er', 'et': 'Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'he': 'סמנטי-סמנטי-n MORpheme סגמנט-', 'jv': 'MORfme SEgment-er', 'sk': 'Semantno-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'MORSE: Semantic-ally Drive-n MORpheme SEgment-er'}
{'en': 'We present in this paper a novel framework for morpheme segmentation which uses the morpho-syntactic regularities preserved by word representations, in addition to orthographic features, to segment words into morphemes. This framework is the first to consider vocabulary-wide syntactico-semantic information for this task. We also analyze the deficiencies of available benchmarking datasets and introduce our own dataset that was created on the basis of compositionality. We validate our algorithm across datasets and present state-of-the-art results.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذا البحث إطارًا جديدًا لتجزئة المورفيم والذي يستخدم الانتظام الصرفي النحوي المحفوظ بواسطة تمثيلات الكلمات ، بالإضافة إلى السمات الإملائية ، لتقسيم الكلمات إلى صيغ. هذا الإطار هو الأول من نوعه الذي يأخذ في الاعتبار المعلومات النحوية-الدلالية على مستوى المفردات لهذه المهمة. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل أوجه القصور في مجموعات البيانات المعيارية المتاحة وتقديم مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا التي تم إنشاؤها على أساس التكوين. نحن نتحقق من صحة الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا عبر مجموعات البيانات ونقدم أحدث النتائج.', 'es': 'Presentamos en este artículo un marco novedoso para la segmentación de morfemas que utiliza las regularidades morfosintácticas preservadas por las representaciones de palabras, además de las características ortográficas, para segmentar las palabras en morfemas. Este marco es el primero en considerar la información sintáctico-semántica de todo el vocabulario para esta tarea. También analizamos las deficiencias de los conjuntos de datos de evaluación comparativa disponibles e introducimos nuestro propio conjunto de datos que se creó sobre la base de la composicionalidad. Validamos nuestro algoritmo en todos los conjuntos de datos y presentamos resultados de última generación.', 'fr': "Nous présentons dans cet article un nouveau cadre de segmentation de morphèmes qui utilise les régularités morpho-syntaxiques préservées par les représentations de mots, en plus des caractéristiques orthographiques, pour segmenter les mots en morphèmes. Ce cadre est le premier à prendre en compte les informations syntaxico-sémantiques à l'échelle du vocabulaire pour cette tâche. Nous analysons également les lacunes des ensembles de données d'étalonnage disponibles et introduisons notre propre ensemble de données créé sur la base de la compositionalité. Nous validons notre algorithme à travers des ensembles de données et présentons des résultats de pointe.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos neste artigo um novo framework para segmentação de morfemas que usa as regularidades morfossintáticas preservadas por representações de palavras, além de características ortográficas, para segmentar palavras em morfemas. Esta estrutura é a primeira a considerar informações sintático-semânticas de todo o vocabulário para esta tarefa. Também analisamos as deficiências dos conjuntos de dados de benchmarking disponíveis e apresentamos nosso próprio conjunto de dados que foi criado com base na composicionalidade. Validamos nosso algoritmo em conjuntos de dados e apresentamos resultados de última geração.', 'ja': '本稿では，モルフェームセグメンテーションのための新たな枠組みを提示する．この枠組みは，正書法的特徴に加えて，単語表現によって保存されたモルフォシンタクティック規則性を用いて単語をモルフェームにセグメンテーションする．このフレームワークは、このタスクのために語彙全体の構文セマンティック情報を考慮した最初のフレームワークです。また、利用可能なベンチマークデータセットの不備を分析し、構成性に基づいて作成された独自のデータセットを紹介します。データセット間でアルゴリズムを検証し、最先端の結果を提示します。', 'zh': '于本文中,发一种于语素割新框架,除正字特征之外,用单词存形句法法分单词为语素。 其框架首虑此词汇之语法语义信息之框架。 又析其可据之不足,而介其基于结性之数集。 我们跨数据集验我们的算法,并呈现最先进的。', 'hi': 'हम इस पेपर में मॉर्फीम विभाजन के लिए एक उपन्यास रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व द्वारा संरक्षित मॉर्फो-सिंटैक्टिक नियमितताओं का उपयोग करता है, ऑर्थोग्राफिक विशेषताओं के अलावा, शब्दों को मॉर्फीम में विभाजित करने के लिए। यह ढांचा इस कार्य के लिए शब्दावली-व्यापी वाक्यात्मक-शब्दार्थ जानकारी पर विचार करने वाला पहला है। हम उपलब्ध बेंचमार्किंग डेटासेट की कमियों का भी विश्लेषण करते हैं और अपने स्वयं के डेटासेट को पेश करते हैं जो रचनात्मकता के आधार पर बनाया गया था। हम डेटासेट में अपने एल्गोरिथ्म को मान्य करते हैं और अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем в этой работе новую структуру сегментации морфем, которая использует морфо-синтаксические закономерности, сохраненные представлениями слов, в дополнение к орфографическим признакам, для сегментации слов в морфемы. Этот каркас является первым, который рассматривает синтаксико-семантическую информацию для этой задачи. Мы также анализируем недостатки имеющихся наборов данных бенчмаркинга и вводим собственный набор данных, который был создан на основе формальности. Мы проверяем наш алгоритм по всем наборам данных и представляем самые современные результаты.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair sa pháipéar seo creat nua do dheighilt moirféime a úsáideann na rialtachtaí moirfó-chomhréire a chaomhnaítear trí léiriú focal, chomh maith le gnéithe ortagrafacha, chun focail a dheighilt ina mhoirféimí. Is é an creat seo an chéad cheann a rinne machnamh ar fhaisnéis chomhréire-shéimeantach uile-foclóra don tasc seo. Déanaimid anailís freisin ar easnaimh na dtacar sonraí tagarmharcála atá ar fáil agus tugtar isteach ár dtacar sonraí féin a cruthaíodh ar bhonn comhdhéanamh. Déanaimid ár n-algartam a bhailíochtú thar thacair sonraí agus cuirimid na torthaí úrscothacha i láthair.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ გვერდში პრომენტიური ფრამეტრი მორფემების სეგმენტაციისთვის, რომელიც მორფემების სინტაქტიური რეგულაციას გამოყენებს სიტყვებით გამოყენებული სიტყვებით გამოყენებული, პორტოგრა ეს ფრამეტრი არის პირველი, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის სიტყვალური სინტაქტიკო-სმენტიკური ინფორმაცია აღმოჩენა. ჩვენ ასევე გავაანალიზებთ ხელსახური ბენქმარიკაციის მონაცემების განსახულებების და ჩვენი მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც შექმნა კომპოზიციალობის ბაზაზე. ჩვენ ალგორიტიმს გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში და მიმდინარე მონაცემების შედეგი.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban a morfém szegmentáció új keretét mutatjuk be, amely a szóreprezentációk által megőrzött morfo-szintaktikus szabályosságokat használja fel ortográfiai jellemzők mellett a szavak morfémákká történő szegmentálására. Ez a keretrendszer az első, amely figyelembe veszi az egész szókincsre kiterjedő szintaktikus-szemantikai információkat ehhez a feladathoz. Elemezzük továbbá a rendelkezésre álló benchmarking adatkészletek hiányosságait, és bemutatjuk saját, kompozíciós adatkészletünket. Algoritmusunkat az adatkészletek között validáljuk és korszerű eredményeket mutatunk be.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε στην παρούσα εργασία ένα νέο πλαίσιο για την τμηματοποίηση μορφωμάτων, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί τις μορφοσυντακτικές κανονικότητες που διατηρούνται από τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων, εκτός από τα ορθογραφικά χαρακτηριστικά, για την τμηματοποίηση λέξεων σε μορφώματα. Αυτό το πλαίσιο είναι το πρώτο που εξετάζει συντακτικό-σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες για το συγκεκριμένο έργο. Αναλύουμε επίσης τις ελλείψεις των διαθέσιμων συνόλων δεδομένων συγκριτικής αξιολόγησης και εισάγουμε το δικό μας σύνολο δεδομένων που δημιουργήθηκε με βάση τη σύνθεση. Επικυρώνουμε τον αλγόριθμο μας σε σύνολα δεδομένων και παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'it': "Presentiamo in questo articolo un nuovo framework per la segmentazione dei morfemi che utilizza le regolarità morfo-sintattiche conservate dalle rappresentazioni delle parole, oltre alle caratteristiche ortografiche, per segmentare le parole in morfemi. Questo framework è il primo a considerare le informazioni sintattico-semantiche a livello di vocabolario per questo compito. Analizziamo anche le carenze dei set di dati di benchmarking disponibili e introduciamo il nostro set di dati creato sulla base della composizione. Convalidiamo il nostro algoritmo in tutti i set di dati e presentiamo risultati all'avanguardia.", 'ms': 'Kami mempersembahkan dalam kertas ini kerangka baru untuk segmen morfen yang menggunakan regularitas morfo-sintaktik yang disimpan oleh perwakilan perkataan, selain ciri-ciri ortografik, untuk segmen perkataan ke morfen. Bingkai ini adalah yang pertama untuk mempertimbangkan maklumat sintaksiko-semantik lebar vocabulari untuk tugas ini. Kami juga menganalisis kekurangan set data benchmarking yang tersedia dan memperkenalkan set data kami sendiri yang dicipta berdasarkan komposisi. Kami sahkan algoritma kami melalui set data dan kini hasil state-of-the-art.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naują morfo segmentacijos sistemą, kuri naudoja morfo-sintaksinius reguliarumus, išsaugotus žodžių reprezentacijomis, be ortografinių savybių, siekiant segmentuoti žodžius į morfo. Šioje sistemoje pirmą kartą atsižvelgiama į viso žodyno sintaksinę ir semantinę informaciją šioje užduotyje. Taip pat analizuojame turimų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių trūkumus ir įvedame savo duomenų rinkinį, sukurtą remiantis sudėtingumu. Patvirtiname savo algoritmą įvairiuose duomenų rinkiniuose ir esame naujausi rezultatai.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник претставуваме нова рамка за сегментација на морфемите која ги користи морфо-синтактичките регуларности зачувани од репрезентациите на зборовите, покрај ортографските карактеристики, за сегментирање на зборовите во морфемите. Оваа рамка е првата што ја разгледува синтактичко-семантичната информација за оваа задача. Ние, исто така, ги анализираме недостатоците на достапните набори на податоци за benchmarking и воведуваме нашиот сопствен набор на податоци кој беше создаден врз основа на композицијалноста. Го валидираме нашиот алгоритм низ податоци и ги претставуваме најдобрите резултати.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw qafas ġdid għas-segmentazzjoni tal-morfi li juża r-regolaritajiet morfosintattiċi ppreservati mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem, minbarra l-karatteristiċi ortografiċi, biex jissegraw il-kliem f’morfi. Dan il-qafas huwa l-ewwel li jikkunsidra informazzjoni sintattika-semantika mifruxa mal-vokabulari għal dan il-kompitu. Aħna nianalizzaw ukoll in-nuqqasijiet tas-settijiet ta’ dejta disponibbli ta’ benchmarking u nintroduċu s-sett ta’ dejta tagħna stess li nħoloq abbażi tal-kompożizzjoni. Aħna nivvalidaw l-algoritmu tagħna fis-settijiet tad-dejta u nippreżentaw riżultati l-aktar avvanzati.', 'kk': 'Біз осы қағазда морфем сегментациясының романдық фреймін таңдаймыз. Бұл морфосинтактикалық үлгіліктерді сөздерді таңдау үшін, ортографикалық мүмкіндіктерді қосып, морфемдерге сәйкес сөздерді се Бұл тапсырма үшін сөздік жалпы синтактикалық- семантикалық мәліметті бірінші қарастыру. Біз сондай-ақ қол жеткізетін банкмаркинг деректер жиындарының жоғалығын анализ және композициялық негізінде құрылған деректер жиынымызды келтіреміз. Алгоритімізді деректер жиындарының арасында тексеріп, әртүрлі нәтижелерінің күйін тексеріп тұрмыз.', 'mn': 'Бид энэ цаасан дээр морфо-синтактикийн загварын шинэ хэлбэрийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ морфо-синтактикийн загварыг үг илэрхийллээр хадгалагдаж байгаа морфо-синтактикийн загваруудыг ашиглаж байна. Энэ хэлбэр нь энэ ажлын үгийн шинжлэх ухааны мэдээллийг анхны ойлгох юм. Мөн бид хэрэглэгддэг банкмаркингийн өгөгдлийн сангийн бус байдлыг шинжилгээд өөрсдийн өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн бүтээгдэхүүний үндсэн үндсэн хэмжээг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид өгөгдлийн сангуудын алгоритмыг баталж, урлагийн төвшин үр дүнг үзүүлдэг.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy nowe ramy segmentacji morfemów, które wykorzystują regularności morfoskładni zachowane przez reprezentacje słów, oprócz cech ortograficznych, do segmentowania słów na morfemy. Rama ta jest pierwszą, która uwzględnia informacje składnikowo-semantyczne dla tego zadania. Analizujemy również braki dostępnych zbiorów danych porównawczych i wprowadzamy własny zestaw danych, który powstał w oparciu o kompozycję. Weryfikujemy nasz algorytm w zestawach danych i prezentujemy najnowocześniejsze wyniki.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെന്റ് സെഗ്മെന്റിനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളാല്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോര്\u200dഫ ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പദവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിശേഷിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യമാണിത്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമായ ബെന്\u200dമെങ്കിങ്ങ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ കുറവും അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. കൂട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d സൃ നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവില', 'no': 'Vi presenterer i denne papiret eit nytt rammeverk for morpheme-segmentasjon som brukar morpho-syntaktiske regularisitet som er lagra av ordrepresentasjonar, i tillegg til ortografiske funksjonar, til å segmentera ord i morphemer. Dette rammeverket er det første som skal betra ordboka- wide syntactico- semantisk informasjon for denne oppgåva. Vi analyserer også feil av tilgjengelege databaser for benchmarking og introduserer våre eigne datasett som er lagt på grunn av komposisjonalitet. Vi validerer algoritmen vårt over datasett og gjeldande tilstand av kunsten.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo u ovom papiru nov okvir za morfijumsku segmentaciju koji koristi morfosintaktične regularnosti koje sačuvaju riječima predstavljanja, osim ortografskih karakteristika, da segmentiraju riječi u morfijume. Ovaj okvir je prvi koji razmatra reč širom rečenika sintaktiko-semantičke informacije za ovaj zadatak. Takođe analiziramo nedostatke dostupnih standardnih seta podataka i predstavljamo našu sopstvenu setu podataka koji je stvoren na osnovu kompozicionalnosti. Potvrđujemo algoritam preko seta podataka i predstavljamo rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku qoran qodob qodob ah, kaas oo isticmaalaya qaynuunnada morpho-syntactic oo ay ku qoran yihiin qodob qoys oo ay ku qoran yihiin qodoqof, si ay u kala qeybiso hadalka morpheem. Kanu waa marka ugu horeysa in loo fiirsado macluumaad la xiriira qoraalka oo ballaadhan ee la xiriira hal-semantic. Sidoo kale waxaynu u baaraynaa dhamaanka bangitaanka oo la isticmaalayo, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa sawirkayada oo lagu abuuray sawirida. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa algorithimadeenna ku dhex yaal databaseyada iyo arimaha la soo jeedo arimaha farshaxanka.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm în această lucrare un nou cadru de segmentare morfomă care utilizează regularitatea morfo-sintactică păstrată de reprezentările cuvintelor, pe lângă caracteristicile ortografice, pentru a segmenta cuvintele în morfeme. Acest cadru este primul care ia în considerare informații sintactico-semantice la nivel vocabular pentru această sarcină. De asemenea, analizăm deficiențele seturilor de date de benchmarking disponibile și introducem propriul set de date creat pe baza compoziționalității. Validăm algoritmul nostru în seturi de date și prezentăm rezultate de ultimă oră.', 'si': 'අපි මේ පත්තරයේ මෝර්ෆෙම් සෙග්මේක්ටර් සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙනවා මොර්ෆෝපෝසින්ට්\u200dරේක්ටික සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට භාවිත කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dර මේ සංකේතය තමයි මේ වැඩ සඳහා භාෂාවික සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු පළමුවෙන් හිතන්නේ. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් සේට් ගැන අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා සහ අපේ පුළුවන් තොරතුරු සේ අපි අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් විශ්වාස කරනවා දත්ත සේට් වල සහ ප්\u200dරතිදේශ ප්\u200dරතිදේශය.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை மர்பெம் பிரிவுகளுக்கு காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது வார்த்தை குறிப்பிட்டுள்ள ஒத்திசைவு விதிமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்த இந்த சட்டத்தில் சொல்வளத்தின் அகலமான ஒத்திசைவு- semantic தகவலை பார்க்க முதலில் உள்ளது. நாங்கள் கிடைக்கும் தகவல் தளங்களின் குறைவை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் மற்றும் கூட்டும் அடிப்படையில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட நம் சொ நாங்கள் தரவு அமைப்புகள் முழுவதும் எங்கள் ஆல்பரிட்டம் சரிபார்க்கிறோம் மற்றும் தற்போதைய நிலையில் கலை ம', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک نئی فرم ڈال دیتے ہیں کہ مورفو سینکٹیک سینکٹیک روبریٹی کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو کلمات کی روبریٹی کے ذریعہ حفاظت کی جاتی ہے، اورٹوگرافیک ویژگی کے علاوہ، کلمات کو morphemes میں ٹکڑے کرتا ہے. یہ چوکاٹ اس کام کے لئے پہلی بار لکھی ہوئی سینکٹیکو-سیمانٹیک معلومات کی نظر کرنا ہے. ہم نے بھی موجود بنچم مارکینگ ڈاٹ سٹ کے کمزوریں کا تحقیق کرلیا ہے اور اپنے ڈاٹ سٹ کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جو کامپیوتنی کے بنیاد پر پیدا کیا گیا ہے. ہم نے اپنے الگوریتم کو ڈیٹ سٹ میں ثابت کرلیا ہے اور موجود آرتی کا نتیجہ ہے۔', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar i denna uppsats ett nytt ramverk för morfemsegmentering som använder de morfosyntaktiska regelverk som bevaras av ordrepresentationer, förutom ortografiska egenskaper, för att segmentera ord i morfomer. Detta ramverk är det första att överväga syntaktisk-semantisk information för hela ordförrådet för denna uppgift. Vi analyserar också bristerna i tillgängliga benchmarking datauppsättningar och introducerar vår egen datauppsättning som skapats utifrån kompositionalitet. Vi validerar vår algoritm över datauppsättningar och presenterar toppmoderna resultat.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra trong tờ giấy này một bộ khung mới cho phân tách morphine mà sử dụng các quy tắc morphine-pháp thuật được bảo quản bởi các biểu hiện từ, ngoài các tính năng cụ thể, để phân đoạn từ thành morphine. Đây là cơ sở đầu tiên xem xét các thông tin liên tế-ngữ cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích các thiếu sót của các bộ dữ liệu định giá và giới thiệu một bộ dữ liệu riêng được tạo ra dựa trên lập trường. Chúng tôi xác nhận thuật toán xuyên qua các dữ liệu và có kết quả hiện đại.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozdagi novel freymi morpheme bo'lishi uchun ishlatamiz. Bu so'zlar tashkilotlarini ortografik xususiyatlaridan qo'llanilgan morpho-syntactic qoidalardan foydalanadi. Ushbu vazifa uchun maxfiy soʻzni koʻp- semantik maʼlumotini tasavvur qilish uchun birinchi freym. Mavjud benchmarking maʼlumotlar tizimlarining manbalarini analyzemiz va kompyuterning asosida yaratilgan bizning o'zimiz maʼlumotlarimizni anglatamiz. Maʼlumotlar tarkibida algorithimizni toʻgʻrilamiz va hozir shaxsiy natijalarini bajaramiz.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия е представена нова рамка за сегментация на морфемите, която използва морфосинтактичните редовности, запазени от слово представяне, в допълнение към ортографските особености, за сегментиране на думи в морфеми. Тази рамка е първата, която разглежда цялата речника синтактично-семантична информация за тази задача. Анализираме и недостатъците на наличните сравнителни набори от данни и въвеждаме наш собствен набор от данни, създаден въз основа на композицията. Ние валидираме нашия алгоритъм в набори от данни и представяме най-съвременни резултати.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo u ovom papiru nov okvir za morfijsku segmentaciju koji koristi morfosintaktične regularnosti koje očuvaju riječima, osim ortografskih karakteristika, da segmentiraju riječi u morfije. Ovaj okvir je prvi koji razmatra riječ širom sintaktičkog semantičkog informacija za ovaj zadatak. Također analiziramo nedostatke dostupnih standardnih podataka i predstavljamo naš sopstveni podatak koji je stvoren na temelju kompozicionalnosti. Potvrđujemo naš algoritam preko podataka i predstavljamo rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'nl': 'We presenteren in dit artikel een nieuw raamwerk voor morfeme segmentatie dat de morfosyntactische regulariteiten gebruikt die behouden blijven door woordrepresentaties, naast orthografische kenmerken, om woorden in morfemen te segmenteren. Dit framework is het eerste dat vocabulaire-brede syntactisch-semantische informatie voor deze taak overweegt. Daarnaast analyseren we de tekortkomingen van beschikbare benchmarking datasets en introduceren we onze eigen dataset die is gecreëerd op basis van compositionaliteit. We valideren ons algoritme over datasets heen en presenteren state-of-the-art resultaten.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer i denne artikel en ny ramme for morfemsegmentering, der bruger de morfosyntaktiske regelmæssigheder bevaret af ordrepræsentationer, ud over ortografiske træk, til at segmentere ord i morfemer. Denne ramme er den første til at overveje ordforråd-dækkende syntaktisk-semantisk information til denne opgave. Vi analyserer også manglerne ved tilgængelige benchmarking datasæt og introducerer vores eget datasæt, der er skabt ud fra kompositionalitet. Vi validerer vores algoritme på tværs af datasæt og præsenterer state-of-the-art resultater.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Framework für Morphemsegmentierung vor, das neben orthographischen Merkmalen auch die morphosyntaktischen Regularitäten nutzt, die durch Wortrepräsentationen erhalten werden, um Wörter in Morpheme zu segmentieren. Dieses Framework ist das erste, das vokabelweite syntaktisch-semantische Informationen für diese Aufgabe berücksichtigt. Außerdem analysieren wir die Mängel verfügbarer Benchmarking-Datensätze und führen einen eigenen Datensatz ein, der auf Basis der Compositionalität erstellt wurde. Wir validieren unseren Algorithmus über Datensätze hinweg und präsentieren aktuelle Ergebnisse.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 어소 절분 구조를 제시했는데 정교 특징을 제외하고 어휘 표징이 보존한 형태 문법 규칙을 이용하여 어휘를 어소로 절분했다.이 프레임워크는 이 임무를 위해 어휘 범위 내의 문법적 의미 정보를 고려하는 첫 번째 프레임워크이다.우리는 또한 기존 기준 데이터 집합의 부족을 분석하고 우리 자신의 데이터 집합을 소개했는데 이 데이터 집합은 조합성을 바탕으로 만들어진 것이다.우리는 데이터 집합을 통해 우리의 알고리즘을 검증하고 최신 결과를 제시했다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan dalam kertas ini sebuah rangkaian baru untuk segmentasi morpheme yang menggunakan regularitas morpho-syntactic yang disimpan oleh rappresentasi kata, selain ciri-ciri ortografik, untuk segmentasi kata-kata menjadi morphemes. This framework is the first to consider vocabulary-wide syntactico-semantic information for this task.  Kami juga menganalisis kekurangan dataset benchmarking tersedia dan memperkenalkan dataset kami sendiri yang diciptakan berdasarkan komposisi. Kami mengkvalifikasi algoritma kami melalui dataset dan hasil state-of-the-art.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka katika gazeti hili ni mfumo wa riwaya kwa ajili ya kutenganisha maneno yanayotumia sheria za simu za mkononi zinazohifadhiwa na uwakilishi wa maneno, pamoja na vipengele vya kiorthografia, ili kugawanya maneno katika vifo. Mfumo huu ni wa kwanza wa kuangalia taarifa za ushirikiano wa lugha kwa ujumla mkubwa kwa ajili ya kazi hii. Pia tunachambua ukosefu wa seti za taarifa zinazopatikana na kutangaza seti zetu wenyewe za taarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa msingi wa uundaji. Tunaweza kuhakikisha utaratibu wetu katika seti za data na matokeo ya sasa ya sanaa.', 'af': "Ons voorsien in hierdie papier 'n roman raamwerk vir morfome segmentasie wat gebruik die morfosintaktieke regulariseite wat deur woord verteenwoordes bewaar is, in addition to orthographic features, to segment words in morphemes. Hierdie raamwerk is die eerste om woordeboek-wye sintaktiko-semantiese inligting vir hierdie taak te beskou. Ons analiseer ook die ontbreidings van beskikbaar benchmarking datastelle en introduseer ons eie datastel wat op die basis van komposiasionaliteit geskep is. Ons geldigheid ons algoritme oor datastelle en voorneem staat-van-kuns-resultate.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim në këtë letër një kuadër të ri për segmentimin e morfemës që përdor rregullalitetet morfo-sintaktike të ruajtura nga përfaqësimet e fjalëve, përveç karakteristikave ortografike, për të segmentuar fjalët në morfema. Ky kuadri është i pari që konsideron informacionin sintaktiko-semantik për këtë detyrë. Ne analizojmë gjithashtu mungesat e grupeve të dhënash të paraqitjes së disponueshme dhe futim grupin tonë të dhënash që u krijua në bazë të kompozitivitetit. Ne vlerësojmë algoritmin tonë nëpërmjet të dhënave dhe rezultatet aktuale.', 'am': 'We present in this paper a novel framework for morpheme segmentation which uses the morpho-syntactic regularities preserved by word representations, in addition to orthographic features, to segment words into morphemes.  ይህ ፍሬም የመጀመሪያ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ሰፊ Syntactic-semantic መረጃ ለዚህ ስራ ነው፡፡ የአገኘው የbenchmarking ድህነትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አሌጎራሽነታችንን በዳታ ማዕከላዊ እና የአሁኑን የዐርድ ፍሬዎችን እናስተካክላለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մորֆեմային սեգրեմացիայի նոր շրջանակներ, որոնք օգտագործում են մորֆոսինտակտիկ կարգավորությունները, որոնք պահպանվում են բառերի ներկայացումների կողմից, բացի օրտոգրաֆիկ հատկություններից, որպեսզի բառերը բառերի բա This framework is the first to consider vocabulary-wide syntactico-semantic information for this task.  Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք հասանելի համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի բացակայությունները և ներկայացնում ենք մեր սեփական տվյալների համակարգը, որը ստեղծվել է կառուցվածքի հիմքում: Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր ալգորիթմը տվյալների համակարգերի միջև և ներկայիս ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքները:', 'fa': 'ما در این کاغذ یک چهارچوب نوی برای جدایی مورفیم را نشان می دهیم که از قانونی\u200cهای مورفو-سنتاکتیک که توسط نمایش\u200cدهندگان کلمات محافظت می\u200cشود، به علاوه بر ویژگی\u200cهای orthographic، برای جدایی کلمات به مورفیم استفاده می\u200cکند. این چهارچوب اولین کسیه که اطلاعات سنتاکتیکو-semantic برای این کار در کلمه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای را در نظر بگیرد. ما همچنین ضعیفه\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای برچسب داده\u200cهای موجود را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و مجموعه داده\u200cهای خودمان را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس ترکیب ترکیب ایجاد شده است. ما الگوریتم\u200cمان را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و نتیجه\u200cهای موجود هنر تایید می\u200cکنیم.', 'bn': 'আমরা এই প্রবন্ধটিতে একটি উপন্যাসের কার্যক্রম উপস্থাপন করছি মর্ফেম বিভাগের জন্য যা শব্দের প্রতিনিধিদ্বারা সংরক্ষিত মর্ফো-সিন্ট্যাক্টিক নিয়ম ব্যবহার করে, যা অর এই কাজের জন্য শব্দভাণ্ডার- বিস্তারিত সামেন্টিক তথ্য বিবেচনা করার প্রথম। আমরা বিদ্যমান বেনম্যাঙ্কিং ডাটাসেটের অভাব বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং আমাদের নিজেদের ডাটাসেটের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যা তৈরি করা হয়েছে তার স আমরা ডাটাসেটের মাধ্যমে আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম বৈধ করি এবং বর্তমান পরিস্থিতি শিল্পের ফলাফল।', 'tr': 'Bu kağıt içinde morfüm segmentasyonu için roman bir çerçevesini gösteriyoruz. Bu şekilde kelime ifadeleri tarafından korunan morpho-sintaktik düzenlemeleri kullanır. Bu çerçew bu zady üçin sözlük-geniş sintaktik-semantik maglumatlary düşünmeklidir. Biz hem bar benchmarking veri setirleriniñ ucyslaryny çözüp, we öz veri setlerimizi kompozisyonalitäge dayandırılýar. Biz öz algoritmüzü veri düzümlerini we şu wagt möhüm netijelerimizi barlaýarys.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo u ovom papiru nov okvir za morfijsku segmentaciju koji koristi morfosintaktične regularnosti koji su sačuvali riječima predstavljanja, osim ortografskih karakteristika, da segmentiraju riječi u morfije. Ovaj okvir je prvi koji razmatra riječ širom sintaktičkog semantičkog informacija za ovaj zadatak. Također analiziramo nedostatke dostupnih standardnih seta podataka i predstavljamo našu sopstvenu setu podataka koji je stvoren na temelju kompozicionalnosti. Potvrđujemo algoritam preko seta podataka i predstavljamo rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'ca': 'En aquest paper presentem un nou marc per a la segmentació de morfes que utilitza les regularitats morfosinàctiques conservades per representacions de paraules, a més de les característiques ortogràfiques, per segmentar les paraules en morfes. Aquest marc és el primer a considerar la informació sinàctico-semàntica a tot el vocabulari per aquesta tasca. També analitzem les deficiències dels conjunts de dades disponibles de comparació i introduïm el nostre propi conjunt de dades creat sobre la base de la composicionalitat. Validim el nostre algoritme a través de conjunts de dades i els resultats actuals.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nový rámec segmentace morfémů, který kromě ortografických rysů využívá morfosyntaktické pravidelnosti zachované slovními reprezentacemi k segmentování slov do morfémů. Tento rámec je první, který pro tento úkol uvažuje o syntakticko-sémantických informacích pro celou slovní zásobu. Dále analyzujeme nedostatky dostupných srovnávacích datových sad a představujeme vlastní datovou sadu, která byla vytvořena na základě kompozici. Ověřujeme náš algoritmus napříč datovými sadami a prezentujeme nejmodernější výsledky.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame morfeemide segmenteerimise uudset raamistikku, mis kasutab lisaks ortograafilistele omadustele sõnade segmenteerimiseks morfosüntaktilisi korrektsusi, mis on säilitatud sõnade esitamisel morfeemideks. See raamistik on esimene, kes kaalub selle ülesande jaoks sõnavara-semantilist teavet. Analüüsime ka olemasolevate võrdlusandmekogumite puudusi ja tutvustame enda andmekogumit, mis on loodud koostisvõime alusel. Valideerime oma algoritmi läbi andmekogumite ja esitame tipptasemel tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään morfeemien segmentoinnin uusi viitekehys, joka käyttää ortografisten ominaisuuksien lisäksi sanaesitysten säilyttämiä morfosyntaktisia säännöllisyyksiä segmentoidakseen sanoja morfeemeiksi. Tämä viitekehys on ensimmäinen, joka ottaa huomioon koko sanaston syntaktikosemanttisen tiedon tätä tehtävää varten. Analysoimme myös saatavilla olevien vertailuaineistojen puutteita ja esittelemme oman aineistomme, joka on luotu koostumuksen perusteella. Validoimme algoritmimme eri tietosarjoissa ja esitämme huippuluokan tuloksia.', 'az': 'Biz bu kağızda morpheme segmentasiyası üçün yeni bir çerçive göstəririk ki, sözlərin göstərilmələrindən qorunub saxlanılan morpho-sintaktik düzgünlükləri, ortografik fəaliyyətlərinin əlavəsində, morphemlərə segment sözləri istifadə edər. Bu çerçive bu işlər üçün sözlü-geniş sintaktik-semantik məlumatı ilk düşünəndir. Biz də mümkün benchmarking verilənlərin zəifliklərini analiz edirik və öz verilənlərimizi kompoziciyyətə dayandırırıq. Biz algoritmümüzü verilən qurğular arasında təsdiqləyirik və həqiqətən də, sanat sonuçlarını təsdiqləyirik.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים בעיתון הזה מסגרת חדשה עבור סגרטציה של מורפו-סינטקטיקה אשר משתמשת ברצינות מורפו-סינטקטיקה שמשמורות על ידי מילים מייצגים, בנוסף לתחומים אורטוגרפיים, כדי לחלק מילים למורפומים. המסגרת הזו היא הראשונה ששוקלת מידע סינטאקטי-סמנטי ברחבי המילים למשימה הזאת. אנו גם מנתחים את חסרונות של קבוצות נתונים הנוכחיות לנקודת השוואה והציגנו את קבוצת נתונים משלנו שנוצרה על בסיס המרכיבות. אנחנו מאשרים את האלגוריתם שלנו ברחבי קבוצות נתונים ומציגים תוצאות חדשות.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wannan takardan wani firam na nowaya wa segment of morfeme, wanda ke amfani da Rubuwan morfo-syntactic da aka tsare da masu tsari da maganar, da kuma da tsari masu ortografi, zuwa raba magana zuwa morfeme. @ info Tuna ƙayyade ƙaranci da za'a iya amfani da tsari na tsari na tsari, kuma mu ƙara kanmu da aka halitta shi a kan composition. Tuna gaskata algorityinmu a kowace set of data and yanzu-state-of-art.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo nov okvir segmentacije morfomev, ki poleg ortografskih značilnosti uporablja morfosentaktične pravilnosti, ohranjene z besednimi reprezentacijami, za segment besed v morfeme. Ta okvir je prvi, ki upošteva sintaktično-semantične informacije v celotnem besedišču za to nalogo. Analiziramo tudi pomanjkljivosti razpoložljivih referenčnih naborov podatkov in predstavljamo lastni nabor podatkov, ki je bil ustvarjen na osnovi kompozicionalnosti. Naš algoritem preverjamo preko naborov podatkov in predstavljamo najsodobnejše rezultate.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk ning basa iki dadi aturan kaendakno kanggo nggawe segmentation nggawe structural navigation Awak dhéwé énjelisaké angkang dipesno kanggo ngilanggar dataset nggawe gerakan kanggo nyelarakno dataset sing nggawe barang nggampang section', 'bo': 'We present in this paper a novel framework for morpheme segmentation which uses the morpho-syntactic regularities preserved by word representations, in addition to orthographic features, to segment words into morphemes. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་vocabulary-wide syntactico-semantic information for this task་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་དང་པོ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ལག་ལེན་པའི་བྱུང་མཛོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མ་ཆ་གནད་དོན་ང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deep Pyramid Convolutional Neural Networks for Text Categorization', 'ar': 'الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية العميقة لتصنيف النص', 'pt': 'Redes neurais convolucionais de pirâmide profunda para categorização de texto', 'es': 'Redes neuronales convolucionales piramidales profundas para la categorización de textos', 'fr': 'Réseaux de neurones convolutifs pyramidaux profonds pour la catégorisation de', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のための深層ピラミッド畳み込みニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '文本分类深金字塔卷积神经网络', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए डीप पिरामिड कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Сверточные нейронные сети глубокой пирамиды для категоризации текста', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Comhráiteacha Deep Pirimid le haghaidh Chatagóiriú Téacs', 'el': 'Νευρικά δίκτυα βαθιάς πυραμίδας για την κατηγοριοποίηση κειμένου', 'hu': 'Mély piramis konvolúciós ideghálózatok a szövegkategóriához', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კატეგორიზაციისთვის ძალიან პირამიდის კონვალური ნეიროლური ქსელი', 'it': 'Reti neurali conveluzionali della piramide profonda per la categorizzazione del testo', 'lt': 'Gilūs piramidiniai konvoluciniai neurologiniai tinklai teksto kategorijai', 'kk': 'Мәтін санаттары үшін терең пирамидтің көңіл нейрондық желі', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Neural Perubahan Piramid Dalam untuk Kategori Teks', 'mk': 'Длабоки пирамидски конволуционални неурални мрежи за категоризација на текст', 'ml': 'പദാവലി വിഭാഗവിഭാഗത്തിനുള്ള ആഴത്തിലെ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali tal-Piramidi Profondi għall-Kategorizzazzjoni tat-Test', 'no': 'Deep pyramid konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk for tekstkategorisering', 'mn': 'Текст хэлбэрийн гүнзгий пирамид', 'ro': 'Rețele neuronale convoluționale profunde ale piramidei pentru categorizarea textelor', 'pl': 'Głębokie piramidy Konwolucyjne Sieci Neuralne dla Kategorizacji tekstu', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පිරාමිඩ් සම්පූර්ණ නිර්මාණය ජාලය', 'sr': 'Duboka piramidna konvolucionalna neuronska mreža za kategoriju teksta', 'so': 'Shabakada Neural Network Deep Pyramid Convolution Neural Network for Text Categorization', 'sv': 'Djupa pyramidens konvulutiva neurala nätverk för textkategorisering', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ کاٹی کے لئے عمیق پیرامیڈ کنویرول نیورال نیٹورک', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Sâu Kim tự tháp Có liên hệ thần kinh cho phân loại văn bản', 'da': 'Dybe pyramide konvulutive neurale netværk til tekstkategorisering', 'nl': 'Diepe Piramide Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken voor Tekst Categorisatie', 'bg': 'Дълбока пирамида конвелуционни неврални мрежи за категоризация на текста', 'hr': 'Duboke piramidne konvolucionalne neurone mreže za kategoriju teksta', 'de': 'Deep Pyramid Convolutional Neuronal Networks für die Textkategorisierung', 'ko': '텍스트 분류에 사용되는 깊은 피라미드 권적 신경 네트워크', 'id': 'Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional Piramid dalam untuk Kategori Teks', 'tr': 'Metin Kategoriýasy üçin derin pyramid Maýyklyk Jawanlar', 'fa': 'شبکه های عصبی عمیق پیرامید برای تقسیم متن', 'sq': 'Rrjete neuronale të thella të piramidës konvolutive për kategorizimin e tekstit', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'az': 'Metin Kategoriyasiyası üçün qaranlıq Piramid Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural wa Kujitoleza kwa Kikundi cha Maandishi', 'af': 'Deep piramide Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke vir Teks Kategoriseering', 'bn': 'টেক্সট বিভাগের জন্য গভীর পিরামিদের কনভোলেশন নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': 'Redes neuronals conversionals de piràmides profundes per a la categorització del text', 'cs': 'Hluboké pyramidové konveluční neuronové sítě pro textovou kategorizaci', 'hy': 'Comment', 'et': 'Sügav püramiid konvolutsioonilised neuraalsed võrgud teksti kategoriseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Syvän pyramidin konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot tekstin luokittelua varten', 'bs': 'Duboke piramidne konvolucione neurone mreže za kategoriju teksta', 'jv': 'Purple Marble', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'Deep Pyramid Convolutional Neural Networks for Text Categorization', 'sk': 'Globoko piramidno konvolucijsko živčno omrežje za kategorizacijo besedila', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་Pyramid སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a low-complexity word-level deep convolutional neural network (CNN) architecture for text categorization that can efficiently represent long-range associations in text. In the literature, several deep and complex neural networks have been proposed for this task, assuming availability of relatively large amounts of training data. However, the associated computational complexity increases as the networks go deeper, which poses serious challenges in practical applications. Moreover, it was shown recently that shallow word-level CNNs are more accurate and much faster than the state-of-the-art very deep nets such as character-level CNNs even in the setting of large training data. Motivated by these findings, we carefully studied deepening of word-level CNNs to capture global representations of text, and found a simple network architecture with which the best accuracy can be obtained by increasing the network depth without increasing computational cost by much. We call it deep pyramid CNN. The proposed model with 15 weight layers outperforms the previous best models on six benchmark datasets for sentiment classification and topic categorization.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone una arquitectura de red neuronal convolucional profunda (CNN) a nivel de palabras de baja complejidad para la categorización de textos que puede representar eficazmente asociaciones de largo alcance en el texto. En la literatura, se han propuesto varias redes neuronales profundas y complejas para esta tarea, suponiendo la disponibilidad de cantidades relativamente grandes de datos de entrenamiento. Sin embargo, la complejidad computacional asociada aumenta a medida que las redes se profundizan, lo que plantea serios desafíos en las aplicaciones prácticas. Además, recientemente se ha demostrado que las CNN poco profundas a nivel de palabras son más precisas y mucho más rápidas que las redes muy profundas de última generación, como las CNN a nivel de personaje, incluso en el contexto de grandes datos de entrenamiento. Motivados por estos hallazgos, estudiamos cuidadosamente la profundización de las CNN a nivel de palabras para capturar representaciones globales de texto, y encontramos una arquitectura de red simple con la que se puede obtener la mejor precisión al aumentar la profundidad de la red sin aumentar demasiado el costo computacional. La llamamos CNN de pirámide profunda. El modelo propuesto con 15 capas de ponderación supera a los mejores modelos anteriores en seis conjuntos de datos de referencia para la clasificación de opiniones y la categorización de temas.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة بنية شبكة عصبية تلافيفية عميقة على مستوى الكلمات منخفضة التعقيد لتصنيف النص والتي يمكن أن تمثل بكفاءة ارتباطات طويلة المدى في النص. في الأدبيات ، تم اقتراح العديد من الشبكات العصبية العميقة والمعقدة لهذه المهمة ، بافتراض توفر كميات كبيرة نسبيًا من بيانات التدريب. ومع ذلك ، يزداد التعقيد الحسابي المصاحب مع تعمق الشبكات ، مما يفرض تحديات خطيرة في التطبيقات العملية. علاوة على ذلك ، فقد تبين مؤخرًا أن شبكات CNN على مستوى الكلمات الضحلة أكثر دقة وأسرع بكثير من أحدث الشبكات العميقة جدًا مثل شبكات CNN على مستوى الشخصيات حتى في إعداد بيانات التدريب الكبيرة. بدافع من هذه النتائج ، درسنا بعناية تعميق شبكات CNN على مستوى الكلمات لالتقاط تمثيلات عالمية للنص ، ووجدنا بنية شبكة بسيطة يمكن من خلالها الحصول على أفضل دقة من خلال زيادة عمق الشبكة دون زيادة التكلفة الحسابية كثيرًا. نسميها CNN بالهرم العميق. يتفوق النموذج المقترح المكون من 15 طبقة وزن على أفضل النماذج السابقة في ستة مجموعات بيانات معيارية لتصنيف المشاعر وتصنيف الموضوعات.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe uma arquitetura de rede neural convolucional profunda (CNN) de nível de palavra de baixa complexidade para categorização de texto que pode representar eficientemente associações de longo alcance no texto. Na literatura, várias redes neurais profundas e complexas têm sido propostas para esta tarefa, assumindo a disponibilidade de quantidades relativamente grandes de dados de treinamento. No entanto, a complexidade computacional associada aumenta à medida que as redes se aprofundam, o que representa sérios desafios em aplicações práticas. Além disso, foi mostrado recentemente que as CNNs de nível de palavra superficial são mais precisas e muito mais rápidas do que as redes muito profundas de última geração, como CNNs de nível de caractere, mesmo no cenário de grandes dados de treinamento. Motivados por essas descobertas, estudamos cuidadosamente o aprofundamento de CNNs em nível de palavra para capturar representações globais de texto e encontramos uma arquitetura de rede simples com a qual a melhor precisão pode ser obtida aumentando a profundidade da rede sem aumentar muito o custo computacional. Chamamos isso de pirâmide profunda CNN. O modelo proposto com 15 camadas de peso supera os melhores modelos anteriores em seis conjuntos de dados de referência para classificação de sentimentos e categorização de tópicos.', 'fr': "Cet article propose une architecture de réseau neuronal convolutionnel profond (CNN) de faible complexité au niveau du mot pour la catégorisation de texte qui peut représenter efficacement des associations à longue portée dans le texte. Dans la littérature, plusieurs réseaux de neurones profonds et complexes ont été proposés pour cette tâche, en supposant la disponibilité de quantités relativement importantes de données d'entraînement. Cependant, la complexité informatique associée augmente à mesure que les réseaux s'approfondissent, ce qui pose de sérieux défis dans les applications pratiques. De plus, il a été démontré récemment que les CNN de niveau mot superficiel sont plus précis et beaucoup plus rapides que les réseaux très profonds de pointe tels que les CNN au niveau des caractères, même dans le cadre de données d'entraînement volumineuses. Motivés par ces résultats, nous avons soigneusement étudié l'approfondissement des CNN au niveau des mots pour capturer des représentations globales de texte, et avons trouvé une architecture de réseau simple avec laquelle la meilleure précision peut être obtenue en augmentant la profondeur du réseau sans augmenter considérablement les coûts de calcul. Nous l'appelons Deep Pyramid CNN. Le modèle proposé avec 15 couches de pondération surpasse les meilleurs modèles précédents sur six ensembles de données de référence pour la classification des sentiments et la catégorisation des sujets.", 'ja': 'テキストの長距離関連を効率的に表現できるテキスト分類のための低複雑性ワードレベルディープ畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）アーキテクチャを提案した。 文献では、比較的大量の訓練データの可用性を仮定して、このタスクのためにいくつかの深く複雑なニューラルネットワークが提案されている。 しかしながら、関連する計算複雑性は、ネットワークがより深くなるにつれて増加し、これは、実用的なアプリケーションにおいて深刻な課題をもたらす。 さらに、最近では、浅い単語レベルのCNNは、大規模なトレーニングデータの設定であっても、文字レベルのCNNのような最先端の非常に深いネットよりも正確で、はるかに高速であることが示された。 これらの知見をきっかけに、テキストのグローバル表現を捉えるためのワードレベルCNNの深化を慎重に検討し、計算コストを大幅に増加させることなく、ネットワークの深さを増大させることで最高の精度を得ることができるシンプルなネットワークアーキテクチャを発見しました。 私たちはそれをCNNの深いピラミッドと呼んでいます。 15ウェイトレイヤーを備えた提案されたモデルは、センチメント分類とトピック分類のための6つのベンチマークデータセットで以前のベストモデルを上回っています。', 'zh': '本文举一种用文本分类的低复杂度字级深度卷积神经网络(CNN)架构,可以有效地表示文本中的长距离关联。 文献之中,已建深神经网络数事,设有训练可用者。 然随网络之深入,计复杂性益多,此其实宜挑战也。 此外近证,虽大练数设,浅字级CNN亦较最先进者网络(如字符级CNN)更确,其速愈速。 推此以下,详论单词级CNN者深化以获全局,得一简网络架构,因其架构,可以益网络深获得最佳精度,而不益多计算成本。 谓之深金字塔CNN。 情类主题,15权重六准集上优于前之最。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए एक कम जटिलता वाले शब्द-स्तरीय गहरे कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करता है जो पाठ में लंबी दूरी के संघों का कुशलतापूर्वक प्रतिनिधित्व कर सकता है। साहित्य में, इस कार्य के लिए कई गहरे और जटिल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं, जो अपेक्षाकृत बड़ी मात्रा में प्रशिक्षण डेटा की उपलब्धता मानते हैं। हालांकि, संबंधित कम्प्यूटेशनल जटिलता बढ़ जाती है क्योंकि नेटवर्क गहरा हो जाता है, जो व्यावहारिक अनुप्रयोगों में गंभीर चुनौतियां पैदा करता है। इसके अलावा, यह हाल ही में दिखाया गया था कि उथले शब्द-स्तर के CNN बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटा की सेटिंग में भी चरित्र-स्तर के CNN जैसे अत्याधुनिक बहुत गहरे जाल की तुलना में अधिक सटीक और बहुत तेज़ हैं। इन निष्कर्षों से प्रेरित होकर, हमने पाठ के वैश्विक प्रतिनिधित्व को कैप्चर करने के लिए शब्द-स्तरीय CNN की गहराई का सावधानीपूर्वक अध्ययन किया, और एक सरल नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर पाया जिसके साथ कम्प्यूटेशनल लागत को बहुत अधिक बढ़ाए बिना नेटवर्क की गहराई को बढ़ाकर सबसे अच्छी सटीकता प्राप्त की जा सकती है। हम इसे डीप पिरामिड सीएनएन कहते हैं। 15 वजन परतों के साथ प्रस्तावित मॉडल भावना वर्गीकरण और विषय वर्गीकरण के लिए छह बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर पिछले सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается низкосложная архитектура глубокой сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) на уровне слов для категоризации текста, которая может эффективно представлять в тексте ассоциации на большие расстояния. В литературе для этой задачи было предложено несколько глубоких и сложных нейронных сетей, предполагающих наличие относительно больших объемов обучающих данных. Однако связанная с этим вычислительная сложность возрастает по мере углубления сетей, что создает серьезные проблемы в практических приложениях. Более того, недавно было показано, что неглубокие CNN на уровне слов более точны и намного быстрее, чем самые современные очень глубокие сети, такие как CNN на уровне символов, даже при установке больших данных для обучения. Основываясь на этих выводах, мы тщательно изучили углубление CNN на уровне слов, чтобы захватить глобальные представления текста, и нашли простую сетевую архитектуру, с помощью которой можно получить лучшую точность, увеличив глубину сети без увеличения вычислительной стоимости на много. Мы называем это глубокой пирамидой CNN. Предлагаемая модель с 15 весовыми слоями превосходит предыдущие лучшие модели по шести эталонным наборам данных для классификации настроений и категоризации тем.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo ailtireacht líonra néarlíonra doimhinbhreathnaitheach (CNN) ar leibhéal íseal-castachta le haghaidh catagóiriú téacs ar féidir leo cumainn fadraoin sa téacs a léiriú go héifeachtach. Sa litríocht, tá roinnt líonraí néaracha domhain agus casta molta don tasc seo, ag glacadh leis go mbeadh fáil ar mhéideanna sách mór sonraí oiliúna. Mar sin féin, méadaítear ar an gcastacht ríomhaireachta a bhaineann leis de réir mar a théann na líonraí níos doimhne, rud a chruthaíonn dúshláin thromchúiseacha maidir le feidhmeanna praiticiúla. Ina theannta sin, léiríodh le déanaí go bhfuil CNNanna éadomhain ar leibhéal na bhfocal níos cruinne agus i bhfad níos tapúla ná na líonta an-domhain nua-aimseartha mar CNNanna ar leibhéal carachtar fiú agus sonraí oiliúna móra á socrú. Spreagtha ag na torthaí seo, rinneamar staidéar cúramach ar dhoimhniú CNN ag leibhéal na bhfocal chun léiriúcháin dhomhanda de théacs a ghabháil, agus thángamar ar ailtireacht líonra shimplí lenar féidir an cruinneas is fearr a fháil trí dhoimhneacht an líonra a mhéadú gan costas ríomhaireachta a mhéadú mórán. Tugaimid CNN pirimid dhomhain air. Feidhmíonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe le 15 shraith meáchain ná na samhlacha is fearr roimhe sin ar sé thacar sonraí tagarmharcála maidir le haicmiú meon agus catagóiriú topaicí.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები აზრიქტირება ტექსტის კატეგორიზაციაზე, რომელიც ტექსტში ძალიან დიდი განზომილებების აზრიქტირებას შესაძლებელია ცოტა კომპლექციური სიტყვების სიტყვების ლიტერტურაში, რამდენიმე დიდი და კომპლექსი ნეიროლური ქსელები ამ რაოდენობისთვის იყენებულია, რომლებიც შესაძლებლობად დიდი მონაცემების მონაცემების მისა მაგრამ, დაკავშირებული კომპუტექციალური კომპლექსიტეტი იზრდება, როდესაც ქსელები უფრო დიდი ხდება, რომელიც პრაქტიკური პროგრამეტში серьезные შემდეგ ახლა ჩვენებულია, რომ სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვები უფრო უფრო სიმართლედ და უფრო სიმართლედ ვიდრე სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების მოტივირული ამ შესაძლებებით, ჩვენ ყურადღებული სიტყვების დონე CNN-ის გარჩევა, რომ ტექსტის გლობალური გამოსახულებების შესახებ, და აღმოჩნეთ უფრო მხოლოდ ქსელის აქტიქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც ყველაზე საუკეთესო წე ჩვენ ამას ძალიან პირამიდი CNN. პროგრამების მოდელი 15 გონის სინამდვილეებით უფრო მეტი მოდელეების შესაძლებელია, რომლებიც ექვსი ბენქმარკის მონაცემების კლასიფიკაცია და ტემიკის კატეგორიზ', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány egy kis komplexitású szószintű mély konvuluációs neurális hálózat (CNN) architektúrát javasol a szövegkategorizáláshoz, amely hatékonyan képes képviselni a hosszú távú asszociációkat a szövegben. A szakirodalomban számos mély és komplex neurális hálózatot javasoltak erre a feladatra, feltételezve, hogy viszonylag nagy mennyiségű edzési adat áll rendelkezésre. Azonban a kapcsolódó számítástechnikai komplexitás növekszik, ahogy a hálózatok mélyebbülnek, ami komoly kihívásokat jelent a gyakorlati alkalmazásokban. Ezenkívül a közelmúltban kimutatták, hogy a sekély szószintű CNN pontosabbak és sokkal gyorsabbak, mint a korszerű, nagyon mély hálók, mint például karakterszintű CNN, még nagy edzési adatok beállítása esetén is. Ezekre az eredményekre ösztönzve gondosan tanulmányoztuk a szószintű CNN-ek elmélyítését a szöveg globális reprezentációjának rögzítése érdekében, és találtunk egy egyszerű hálózati architektúrát, amellyel a legjobb pontosságot a hálózati mélység növelésével anélkül, hogy sokkal növelnénk a számítási költségeket. Mély piramis CNN-nek hívjuk. A 15 súlyrétegű javasolt modell hat referenciaadatkészleten felülmúlja a korábbi legjobb modelleket az érzelmek osztályozására és a témakörök kategorizálására.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια αρχιτεκτονική χαμηλής πολυπλοκότητας σε επίπεδο λέξεων για την κατηγοριοποίηση κειμένου που μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να αντιπροσωπεύει σχέσεις μεγάλης εμβέλειας στο κείμενο. Στη βιβλιογραφία, έχουν προταθεί αρκετά βαθιά και σύνθετα νευρωνικά δίκτυα για το έργο αυτό, υποθέτοντας τη διαθεσιμότητα σχετικά μεγάλων ποσοτήτων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Ωστόσο, η σχετική υπολογιστική πολυπλοκότητα αυξάνεται καθώς τα δίκτυα προχωρούν βαθύτερα, γεγονός που θέτει σοβαρές προκλήσεις στις πρακτικές εφαρμογές. Επιπλέον, πρόσφατα αποδείχθηκε ότι τα ρηχά CNN σε επίπεδο λέξεων είναι πιο ακριβή και πολύ ταχύτερα από τα σύγχρονα πολύ βαθιά δίχτυα, όπως τα CNN σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, ακόμη και στη ρύθμιση μεγάλων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Με κίνητρο από αυτά τα ευρήματα, μελετήσαμε προσεκτικά την εμβάθυνση των λέξεων για να συλλάβουμε παγκόσμιες αναπαραστάσεις του κειμένου, και βρήκαμε μια απλή αρχιτεκτονική δικτύου με την οποία η καλύτερη ακρίβεια μπορεί να επιτευχθεί αυξάνοντας το βάθος του δικτύου χωρίς να αυξηθεί το υπολογιστικό κόστος κατά πολύ. Το λέμε βαθιά πυραμίδα CNN. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο με 15 στρώματα βάρους ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα καλύτερα μοντέλα σε έξι σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων και κατηγοριοποίηση θεμάτων.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un'architettura di rete neurale convoluzionale profonda (CNN) a bassa complessità per la categorizzazione del testo che può rappresentare efficacemente associazioni a lungo raggio nel testo. In letteratura sono state proposte diverse reti neurali profonde e complesse per questo compito, assumendo la disponibilità di quantità relativamente grandi di dati di formazione. Tuttavia, la complessità computazionale associata aumenta man mano che le reti diventano più profonde, il che pone gravi sfide nelle applicazioni pratiche. Inoltre, è stato recentemente dimostrato che le CNN a livello di parola poco profondo sono più accurate e molto più veloci delle reti molto profonde all'avanguardia come le CNN a livello di carattere anche nell'impostazione di grandi dati di allenamento. Motivati da questi risultati, abbiamo studiato attentamente l'approfondimento delle CNN a livello di parola per catturare rappresentazioni globali del testo, e abbiamo trovato una semplice architettura di rete con la quale la migliore precisione può essere ottenuta aumentando la profondità della rete senza aumentare di molto il costo computazionale. La chiamiamo CNN piramidale profonda. Il modello proposto con 15 strati di peso supera i migliori modelli precedenti su sei set di dati benchmark per la classificazione dei sentiment e la categorizzazione degli argomenti.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūloma nedidelio sudėtingumo žodžių lygio giliojo konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo (CNN) architektūra, skirta tekstų klasifikacijai, kuri gali veiksmingai atstovauti ilgalaikėms asociacijoms tekste. Literatūroje buvo pasiūlyti keli gilūs ir sudėtingi neurologiniai tinklai šiam uždaviniui atlikti, darant prielaidą, kad turima palyginti didelių mokymo duomenų. Tačiau su tuo susijęs skaičiavimo sudėtingumas didėja, nes tinklai gilėja, o tai kelia rimtų iššūkių praktinėse taikymo srityse. Be to, neseniai buvo įrodyta, kad žemo žodžio CNN yra tikslesni ir daug greitesni nei naujausi labai gilieji tinklai, pvz., charakteristikų CNN, net rengiant didelius mokymo duomenis. Atsižvelgdami į šiuos faktus, atidžiai išnagrinėjome žodžių lygio CNN gilinimą, kad būtų galima rasti visuotinius teksto rodymus, ir nustatėme paprastą tinklo architektūrą, kuria būtų galima pasiekti geriausią tikslumą didinant tinklo gilumą, o skaičiavimo išlaidos nebūtų gerokai padidintos. Mes tai vadiname gilia piramide CNN. Siūlomas 15 svorio sluoksnių modelis atitinka ankstesnius geriausius šešių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių modelius, skirtus jautrumo klasifikacijai ir temų klasifikacijai.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз мәтін санаттарының үлкен ауқымды мәтінде ұзындық ауқымдық құрылғыларды таңдауға мүмкіндік беретін мәтін санаттарының архитектурасын ұсынады. Әдебиеттерде, бұл тапсырма үшін бірнеше түсті және комплекс невралдық желілер ұсынылды. Осы тапсырма үшін салыстырылық үлкен мәліметтердің жеткізілікті деп ойла Бірақ бұл компьютердің компьютерлік тәжірибесі, желілер көтеріп жатқанда, бұл практикалық қолданбаларда маңызды мәселелерді өзгертеді. Қосымша, соңғы уақытта CNN сөздер деңгейіндегі сөздер деңгейінде дұрыс және өте тез желілерден, сондай-ақ, таңбалар деңгейіндегі CNN деңгейіндегі үлкен оқыту деректерін орнату үшін, әрі д Бұл тапсырмалар бойынша жылжытылады, біз CNN сөздер деңгейін жалпы мәтіннің түсініктерін түсініп, жұмыс желінің архитектурасын таптық, бұл желінің дұрыстығын өзгертіп, компьютерлік бағаларын көп өзгертпей, желінің Біз оны CNN терең пирамиді деп аталамыз. 15 қабаттық қабаттар үлгісінің алты кеңістік деректер қорларының алдыңғы ең жақсы үлгілерін жасайды.', 'mk': 'Овој документ предложува архитектура на длабока конволуционална нервна мрежа (СНН) со ниско сложеност за категоризација на текст, која може ефикасно да претставува здруженија на долго растојание во текстот. Во литературата, неколку длабоки и комплексни нервни мрежи се предложени за оваа задача, претпоставувајќи ја достапноста на релативно големи количини податоци за обука. Сепак, поврзаната компликационална комплексност се зголемува со тоа што мрежите одат подлабоко, што претставува сериозни предизвици во практичните апликации. Покрај тоа, неодамна се покажа дека ниското ниво на зборови ЦНН се попрецизни и многу побрзи од најсовремените многу длабоки мрежи како што се ЦНН на ниво на карактер дури и во поставувањето на големи податоци за обука. Мотивирани од овие откритија, внимателно ги проучувавме длабочините на CNN на зборно ниво за да ги фатиме глобалните претставувања на текстот, и најдовме едноставна мрежна архитектура со која најдобрата точност може да се добие со зголемување на мрежната длабочина без зголемување на компјутациските трошоци Ја нарекуваме длабока пирамида ЦНН. Предложениот модел со 15 слоеви на тежина ги надминува претходните најдобри модели на шест бази на податоци за класификација на чувствата и категоризација на темата.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പദാവലിയിലുള്ള വാക്കിന്റെ ആഴത്തിലെ ആഴത്തിലെ ക്രമീകരണ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു  സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിക്കായി കുറച്ച് ആഴങ്ങളും കുറച്ച് കഠിനമായ പ്രശ്നമുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d ശേഖരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ എന്നാലും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട കണക്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നെറ്റ അതുകൊണ്ട് അടുത്ത് കാണിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d കഠിനമായ വാക്ക് നിലനില സിഎന്\u200dഎനികള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതും കൂടുതല്\u200d വേഗത്തിലാകുന്നു. ക ഈ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചു പഠിച്ചു ലേഖന പ്രതിനിധികളെ പിടികൂടാന്\u200d വാക്ക് നില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ആഴത്തിലാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സാധാരണ നമ്മള്\u200d അതിനെ CNN എന്ന് ആഴമുള്ള പിരിമിഡ് എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്നു. 15 ഭാരം തടാക്കുകളുള്ള പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ആറു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan arkitektur rangkaian saraf konvolusi dalam tingkat perkataan-kompleksiti rendah (CNN) untuk kategorisasi teks yang boleh mewakili persekutuan jangkauan panjang dalam teks. Dalam literatur, beberapa rangkaian saraf yang dalam dan kompleks telah diusulkan untuk tugas ini, menganggap kebebasan jumlah data latihan relatif besar. Namun, kompleksiti pengiraan yang berkaitan meningkat semasa rangkaian semakin mendalam, yang menimbulkan cabaran serius dalam aplikasi praktik. Selain itu, baru-baru ini dipaparkan bahawa CNN aras perkataan rendah lebih tepat dan jauh lebih cepat daripada rangkaian yang sangat dalam seperti CNN aras aksara walaupun dalam tetapan data latihan besar. Motivated by these findings, we carefully studied deepening of word-level CNNs to capture global representations of text, and found a simple network architecture with which the best accuracy can be obtained by increasing the network depth without increasing computational cost by much. Kami menyebutnya piramid dalam CNN. Model yang diusulkan dengan 15 lapisan berat melebihi model terbaik terdahulu pada enam set data benchmark untuk klasifikasi sentimen dan kategorisasi topik.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хэвлэгдэх хэмжээний гүн гүнзгий хэмжээний мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектур (CNN) нь текст хэвлэгдэх хэмжээний урт хэмжээний холбоотой байгууллагуудыг үр дүнтэй илэрхийлж чадна. Энэ ажил дээр олон гүнзгий, комплекс мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хувьд харьцангуй том хэмжээний сургалт өгөгдлийн хэрэглээ гэж бодож байна. Гэвч холбоотой компьютерийн цогц байдал нь сүлжээлүүд илүү гүнзгий болж нэмэгддэг. Энэ нь практикийн хэрэглээнд маш чухал сорилтуудыг бий болгодог. Үүнээс ч саяхан ДНХ-ын үг хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний мэдээллээс илүү зөв болон хурдан байдаг гэдгийг харуулсан. Эдгээр ололтуудын хувьд хөдөлгөөнтэй, бид өөрсдийгөө дэлхийн хэмжээний хэмжээний CNN-г гүн гүнзгий судалж, дэлхийн хэмжээний үзүүлэлтийг барьж, хамгийн энгийн сүлжээний архитектур олсон бөгөөд тооцооллын үнэ нэмэгдэхгүй сүлжээний гүн г Бид үүнийг гүнзгий пирамид CNN гэж нэрлэдэг. 15 жингийн давхартай загвар нь мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцах болон сэдэв категорийн зургаан давхар өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн загварыг дамжуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali fond (CNN) ta’ livell ta’ kliem ta’ kumplessità baxxa għall-kategorizzazzjoni tat-test li tista’ tirrappreżenta b’mod effiċjenti assoċjazzjonijiet fuq medda twila fit-test. Fil-letteratura, diversi netwerks newrali profondi u kumplessi ġew proposti għal dan il-kompitu, billi wieħed jassumi d-disponibbiltà ta’ ammonti relattivament kbar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Madankollu, il-kumplessità komputattiva assoċjata tiżdied hekk kif in-netwerks imorru aktar fil-fond, li toħloq sfidi serji fl-applikazzjonijiet prattiċi. Barra minn hekk, dan l-aħħar intwera li CNNs b’livell baxx ta’ kliem huma aktar preċiżi u ħafna aktar mgħaġġla mill-aktar netwerks avvanzati fil-fond bħal CNNs b’livell ta’ karattru anke fl-istabbiliment ta’ dejta kbira ta’ taħriġ. Motivati minn dawn is-sejbiet, studjajna bir-reqqa l-approfondiment tas-CNNs fil-livell tal-kliem biex jinqabdu rappreżentazzjonijiet globali tat-test, u sabu arkitettura sempliċi tan-netwerk li biha tista’ tinkiseb l-a ħjar preċiżjoni billi tiżdied il-fond tan-netwerk mingħajr ma tiżdied l-ispiża komputattiva b’ħafna. Aħna nsemmuha piramide profonda CNN. Il-mudell propost b’15-il saff ta’ piż jaqbeż l-aħjar mudelli preċedenti fuq sitt settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti u l-kategorizzazzjoni tas-suġġetti.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje niskiej złożoności architekturę głębokiej konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej (CNN) na poziomie słowa do kategoryzacji tekstu, która może skutecznie reprezentować skojarzenia dalekiego zasięgu w tekście. W literaturze zaproponowano kilka głębokich i złożonych sieci neuronowych do tego zadania, zakładając dostępność stosunkowo dużych ilości danych treningowych. Jednak związana z tym złożoność obliczeniowa zwiększa się wraz z pogłębieniem sieci, co stawia poważne wyzwania w praktycznych zastosowaniach. Ponadto ostatnio wykazano, że płytkie CNN na poziomie słów są dokładniejsze i znacznie szybsze niż nowoczesne, bardzo głębokie sieci, takie jak CNN na poziomie znaków, nawet w ustawieniu dużych danych treningowych. Motywowani tymi odkryciami dokładnie zbadaliśmy pogłębienie CNN na poziomie słów w celu uchwycenia globalnych reprezentacji tekstu i znaleźliśmy prostą architekturę sieci, dzięki której można uzyskać najlepszą dokładność poprzez zwiększenie głębokości sieci bez znacznego zwiększenia kosztów obliczeniowych. Nazywamy to głęboką piramidą CNN. Proponowany model z 15-tymi warstwami wagowymi przewyższa poprzednie najlepsze modele na sześciu zestawach danych referencyjnych dla klasyfikacji sentymentów i kategoryzacji tematów.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår ein lite kompleksitet ord-nivå dyp konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN) for tekstkategorisering som kan effektivt representera langområde tilknytingar i tekst. I litteraturen har fleire dype og komplekse nøyralnettverk foreslått for denne oppgåva, ved å anta at det er tilgjengeleg relativt stor mengda opplæringsdata. Den tilhøyrande datakompleksiteten aukar imidlertid når nettverkene går dypere, som fører alvorleg utfordringar i praktiske program. I tillegg har det nyleg vist at fleire ord-nivå CNN er meir nøyaktige og mykje raskare enn kunsttilstanden svært dype nettverk, som teiknsnivå CNN, selv i innstillinga av store treningsdata. Av disse opplysningane har vi forstått dyppa av ordnivået CNN for å henta globale representasjonar av tekst, og funne ein enkel nettverksarkitektur som den beste nøyaktigheten kan henta ved å auka nettverksdyppa utan å auka datamaskinen med mykje. Vi kallar det dypt pyramid CNN. Den foreslåde modellen med 15 vektlag utfører dei førre beste modelane på seks benchmarkdatasett for sentimentklassifikasjon og temakategorisasjon.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune o arhitectură de rețea neuronală convoluțională profundă (CNN) cu complexitate redusă pentru clasificarea textului, care poate reprezenta eficient asociațiile de rază lungă în text. În literatura de specialitate, mai multe rețele neuronale profunde și complexe au fost propuse pentru această sarcină, presupunând disponibilitatea unor cantități relativ mari de date de formare. Cu toate acestea, complexitatea computațională asociată crește pe măsură ce rețelele merg mai adânc, ceea ce reprezintă provocări serioase în aplicațiile practice. Mai mult decât atât, s-a demonstrat recent că CNN-urile la nivel de cuvânt superficial sunt mai precise și mult mai rapide decât rețelele foarte profunde de ultimă generație, cum ar fi CNN-urile la nivel de caractere chiar și în setările de date mari de antrenament. Motivați de aceste constatări, am studiat cu atenție aprofundarea CNN-urilor la nivel de cuvânt pentru a capta reprezentări globale ale textului și am găsit o arhitectură simplă de rețea cu care se poate obține cea mai bună precizie prin creșterea adâncimii rețelei fără a crește costul de calcul cu mult. Noi o numim piramidă adâncă CNN. Modelul propus cu 15 straturi de greutate depășește cele mai bune modele anterioare pe șase seturi de date de referință pentru clasificarea sentimentului și categorizarea subiectelor.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙළුවන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්න සාක්ෂිත්\u200dරයෙන්, ගොඩක් ගොඩක් හා සංශ්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙන් මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරලා තියෙනවා, සාමා නමුත්, සම්බන්ධ පණිවිඩය සම්බන්ධතාවක් වැඩි වෙනවා ජාලය ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් වැඩි වෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ ඒ වගේම, අවස්ථානයෙන් ඒක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වුනේ වාර්තාවක් CNNs වඩා හරියට වඩා හරියට වඩා ඉක්මන් වගේම ඉක්මන් වගේම ඉක්මන් වෙන්නේ අක් මේ හොයාගන්න, අපි පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාර්තාවක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න ලෝක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්න, සරල ජාල සංවිධානයක් හොයාගත්තා ඒ අපි ඒක ගොඩක් පිරාමිඩ් CNN කියනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් 15 ගැන විශේෂ ස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු හොඳ මොඩල් 6 බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට ප්\u200d', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže arhitekturu duboke konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za kategorizaciju teksta koja može efikasno predstavljati dugogodišne asocijacije u tekstu. U literaturi je predloženo nekoliko dubokih i kompleksnih neuralnih mreža za ovaj zadatak, s obzirom na dostupnost relativno velikih količina podataka o obuci. Međutim, povećana kompleksnost računala se povećava dok mreže budu dublje, što predstavlja ozbiljne izazove u praktičnim aplikacijama. Osim toga, nedavno se pokazalo da su plitki CNN-ovi nivo riječi precizniji i mnogo brži od države umjetnosti veoma dubokih mreža poput CNN-ovih nivoa karaktera čak i u postavljanju velikih podataka o obuci. Pokrenuli smo ovim nalazima, pažljivo smo proučavali dubljenje CNN-a na riječima kako bi uhvatili globalne predstave teksta, i pronašli jednostavnu mrežnu arhitekturu s kojom se najbolja tačnost može dobiti povećanjem dubine mreže bez povećanja računalnih troškova. Zovemo ga duboka piramida CNN. Predloženi model sa 15 slojeva težine iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na šest standardnih seta podataka za klasifikaciju sentimenta i kategoriju tema.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa xarunta hoos-complex ah oo ku qoran shabakad aad u dheer oo diiwaanka neurada (CNN) oo ku qoran qoraalka, kaas oo si fiican u representi kara ururo aad u dheer. In the literature, several deep and complex neural networks have been proposed for this task, assuming availability of relatively large amounts of training data.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee, xiriirka la xidhiidha waxaa korodhsan dhibaatooyinka xisaabta, marka shabakadu aad u sii dheeraadaan, taasoo ka dhigaya dhibaatooyin aad u adag ee codsiga caadiga ah. Weliba waxaa la muujiyey in xarunta CNNNs ay si aad u saxdaan iyo aad u dhaqso badan yihiin shabakado aad u dheer sida shabakada xarafka ah ee CNNNs xittaa marka lagu sameynayo macluumaad waxbarasho oo weyn. Dhaqdhaqaaqsan baaritaankaas, waxaynu si aad ah u barbaarinnay qoraal-heerka CNNs si aan u qabsato macluumaadka caalamiga ah, waxaana helnay dhismo sahlan oo shabakad ah oo aad u sahlan, taasoo lagu heli karo kordhiya moolka shabakadda iyadoon kordhin kharashka xisaabta badan. Waxaynu ugu magacaabnaa CNN. Tusaale la soo jeeday oo ku qoran 15-qolo miisaanka ayaa soo saara tusaalooyinkii hore ee ugu fiican ee ku qoran lix bangmooyinka kaleemeysiga iyo kalajarida.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en låg komplexitet word-level deep convolutional neural network (CNN) arkitektur för textkategorisering som effektivt kan representera långdistansassociationer i text. I litteraturen har flera djupa och komplexa neurala nätverk föreslagits för denna uppgift, förutsatt att det finns relativt stora mängder träningsdata. Den tillhörande beräkningskomplexiteten ökar dock i takt med att nätverken går djupare, vilket innebär allvarliga utmaningar i praktiska tillämpningar. Dessutom visade det sig nyligen att CNN på grund ordnivå är mer exakta och mycket snabbare än de allra senaste mycket djupa näten såsom CNN på teckenivå även vid inställning av stora träningsdata. Motiverade av dessa resultat studerade vi noggrant fördjupning av CNN på ordnivå för att fånga globala representationer av text, och hittade en enkel nätverksarkitektur med vilken bästa noggrannhet kan erhållas genom att öka nätverksdjupet utan att öka beräkningskostnaderna med mycket. Vi kallar det Deep Pyramid CNN. Den föreslagna modellen med 15 viktlager överträffar de tidigare bästa modellerna på sex referensdatauppsättningar för sentimentklassificering och ämneskategorisering.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான உரை பிரிவுகளுக்கான ஒரு குறைந்த சிக்கலான சொல்ல- மட்டத்தில் ஆழமான தொழில்நுட்பமான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN)  இந்த பணிக்கு பல ஆழம் மற்றும் சிக்கலான புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சார்ந்த பெரிய பயிற்சி தர ஆனால், இணைந்த கணக்கீட்டு சிக்கல்கள் அதிகரிக்கும் பொழுது வலைப்பின்னல்கள் ஆழமாக செல்கின்றன, இது செயல்பாட்டில் த மேலும், சமீபத்தில் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பெரிய பயிற்சி தரவை அமைப்பில் கூட எழுத்து- நிலையை விட சுருக்கிய சொல்- மட்டத்தில் CNNs மிகவும் சரியாக இந்த கண்டுபிடிப்புகளால் மாற்றப்பட்டது, நாங்கள் சொல்ல- நிலையில் CNNs ஆழமாக ஆராய்ந்து உரையின் பொதுவான பங்குகளை பிடிக்க, ஒரு சுலபமான வலைப்பின்னல் அமைப்புகளை கண்டுப நாம் அதை CNN ஆழமான பிரிமிட் என்று அழைக்கிறோம். 15 எடை அடுக்குகளுடன் முந்தைய மாதிரி உணர்வு வகைப்பு மற்றும் தலைப்பு வகைப்புக்கான ஆறு பென்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் முந்த', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a low-complexity word-level deep convolutional neural network (CNN) architecture for text categorization that can efficiently represent long-range associations in text. اس کام کے لئے بہت سی عمیق اور پیچیدہ نیورل نیورل نیٹورک پیشنهاد کی گئی ہیں، اس کے مطابق نسبتا بہت زیادہ تعلیم دیٹوں کے موجود موجود ہیں. لیکن مشترک کمپیوٹریشن پیچیدگی زیادہ ہوتی ہے جب نیٹورک عمیق ہو جاتی ہے، جسے عملی کاربرد میں سخت چالیں بناتا ہے. اور اچھا دکھائی گئی تھی کہ کلمات سطح CNN اس سے بہت سیدھی اور بہت سیدھی سیدھی نیٹوں سے بھی بہت سیدھی ہے جیسے شخصت سطح CNN، اگرچہ بہت سیدھی آموزش دیٹوں کے اندر بھی. یہ نتیجے کے ذریعہ چلتے ہیں، ہم نے کلمات-سطح CNN کی عمیقی مطالعہ لیا ہے کہ متن کی جگہ کی تصویر کو پکڑیں، اور ایک ساده نیٹ ورک معماری پایا ہے جس سے بہترین دقیق حاصل کر سکتا ہے نیٹ ورک depth کو زیادہ اضافہ کرنے کے بغیر کمپیوٹر کی قیمت کے. ہم اسے عمیق پیرامیڈ سی ان کے نام کرتے ہیں. 15 وزن لہروں کے ساتھ پیشنهاد کی موڈل چھ بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے چھ بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ سے پہلے بہترین موڈل عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz matn kattalashtirish uchun juda katta murakkablik soʻz- darajada murakkab muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli neyron tarmoq (CNN) yaratadi. Tahriyotda, bu vazifa uchun bir necha murakkab va murakkab neyron tarmoqlar talab qilindi, juda katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bajarayonligini tasavvur qilish mumkin. Lekin, bog'liq kompyuterga murakkablik qo'shiladi, tarmoqlar muvaffaqiyatlarni koʻchirib chiqishda, bu asosiy dasturlarda juda qiziqarli muammolar bo'ladi. Ko'rib chiqishni ko'rsatadi, CNNNs soʻzning chegarasi juda qisqa va soʻzda juda tezroq tarmoq, huddi katta taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlarni saqlash imkoniyatini ham qo'llab yuqori tarmoqchidan ham. Bu natijalar bilan ishga tushirilgan, biz matnning global tashkilotlarini qabul qilish uchun so'z CNNs' soʻzni eng yaxshi o'rganishni o'rgangan va bir tarmoq architektorini topdik. Ularning tarmoqning qismini ko'paytirish qiymatini ko'paytirish uchun eng yaxshi aniqlash mumkin. Biz buni CNN'ning yuqori pyramida deb ataymiz. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất một kiến trúc nơ-te-te-worn-cấp thấp, sâu kết cấu dây thần kinh (CNN) cho việc phân loại văn bản có thể đại diện hiệu quả các liên kết dài độ trong văn bản. Trong văn học, nhiều mạng thần kinh sâu và phức tạp đã được đề xuất cho nhiệm vụ này, giả sử có lượng dữ liệu đào tạo tương đối lớn. Tuy nhiên, sự phức tạp tính toán liên quan gia tăng khi các mạng đi sâu hơn, và nó đặt ra những thử thách nghiêm trọng trong các ứng dụng thực tế. Hơn nữa, gần đây đã được chứng minh rằng đài CNN cấp thấp có độ chính xác và nhanh hơn nhiều so với bộ lưới cấp cao, như kênh này, kể cả khi đặt các dữ liệu tập luyện lớn. Nhờ những kết quả này, chúng tôi đã nghiên cứu cẩn thận việc khai thác các kênh CNN từ cấp trên để thu thập các biểu tượng văn bản trên to àn cầu, và tìm ra một kiến trúc mạng đơn giản mà có thể lấy được sự chính xác tốt nhất bằng cách tăng độ sâu mạng mà không tăng giá trị tính bằng nhiều. Chúng tôi gọi nó là kênh CNN. The proposed model with 15 weight lớp outdung the previous best models on six tiêu chuẩn dataset for feeling classification and topic classification.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предлага архитектура на дълбока конволюционна невронна мрежа с ниска сложност за категоризация на текста, която може ефективно да представлява дългосрочни асоциации в текста. В литературата са предложени няколко дълбоки и сложни невронни мрежи за тази задача, като се предполага наличието на сравнително големи количества данни за обучение. Съответната компютърна сложност обаче се увеличава с задълбочаването на мрежите, което поставя сериозни предизвикателства в практическите приложения. Нещо повече, напоследък беше показано, че плитките думи са по-точни и много по-бързи от най-съвременните много дълбоки мрежи, като например символи, дори при обстановката на големи данни за обучение. Мотивирани от тези открития, ние внимателно проучихме задълбочаването на словно ниво за улавяне на глобални представи на текст и открихме проста мрежова архитектура, с която най-добрата точност може да бъде получена чрез увеличаване на дълбочината на мрежата, без да се увеличават изчислителните разходи с много. Наричаме я дълбока пирамида CNN. Предложеният модел с 15 слоя тегло надминава предишните най-добри модели на шест базови набора данни за класификация на сентимента и категоризация на темата.', 'nl': "Dit document stelt een low-complexity word-level deep convolutional neural network (CNN) architectuur voor voor tekstcategorisering die efficiënt langeafstandsverbindingen in tekst kan weergeven. In de literatuur zijn verschillende diepe en complexe neurale netwerken voor deze taak voorgesteld, uitgaande van de beschikbaarheid van relatief grote hoeveelheden trainingsgegevens. De bijbehorende computationele complexiteit neemt echter toe naarmate de netwerken dieper gaan, wat ernstige uitdagingen in praktische toepassingen met zich meebrengt. Bovendien is recent aangetoond dat ondiepe CNN's op woordniveau nauwkeuriger en veel sneller zijn dan de state-of-the-art zeer diepe netten zoals CNN's op tekenniveau, zelfs bij het opstellen van grote trainingsgegevens. Gemotiveerd door deze bevindingen, bestudeerden we zorgvuldig de verdieping van woordniveau CNN's om wereldwijde representaties van tekst vast te leggen, en vonden een eenvoudige netwerkarchitectuur waarmee de beste nauwkeurigheid kan worden verkregen door de netwerkdiepte te verhogen zonder de rekenkosten met veel te verhogen. We noemen het diepe piramide CNN. Het voorgestelde model met 15 gewichtslagen presteert beter dan de vorige beste modellen op zes benchmark datasets voor sentimentclassificatie en topic categorisering.", 'da': "Denne artikel foreslår en lav kompleksitet ordniveau dyb convolutional neural netværk (CNN) arkitektur til tekstkategorisering, der effektivt kan repræsentere langdistance associationer i tekst. I litteraturen er flere dybe og komplekse neurale netværk blevet foreslået til denne opgave, idet der antages, at der er relativt store mængder træningsdata til rådighed. Men den tilknyttede beregningsmæssige kompleksitet stiger efterhånden som netværket går dybere, hvilket udgør alvorlige udfordringer i praktiske applikationer. Desuden blev det for nylig vist, at lavvandede CNN'er på ordniveau er mere nøjagtige og meget hurtigere end de avancerede meget dybe net såsom CNN'er på karakterniveau selv i indstillingen af store træningsdata. Motiveret af disse resultater undersøgte vi omhyggeligt uddybning af ord-niveau CNN'er for at fange globale repræsentationer af tekst, og fandt en simpel netværksarkitektur, hvormed den bedste nøjagtighed kan opnås ved at øge netværksdybden uden at øge beregningsomkostningerne med meget. Vi kalder det dyb pyramide CNN. Den foreslåede model med 15 vægtlag overgår de tidligere bedste modeller på seks benchmark datasæt for sentiment klassificering og emnekategorisering.", 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže arhitekturu duboke konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za kategorizaciju teksta koja može učinkovito predstavljati dugoročne udruženje teksta. U književnosti je predloženo nekoliko dubokih i složenih neuralnih mreža za taj zadatak, s obzirom na dostupnost relativno velikih količina podataka o obuci. Međutim, povećana kompleksnost računala se povećava dok mreže budu dublje, što predstavlja ozbiljne izazove u praktičnim primjenama. Nadalje, nedavno se pokazalo da su plitki CNN-ovi razini riječi precizniji i mnogo brži od države umjetnosti jako duboke mreže poput razine znakova CNN-a čak i u postavljanju velikih podataka o obuci. Pokrenuti ovim nalazima, pažljivo smo proučavali dubljenje CNN-a na riječima kako bi uhvatili globalne predstave teksta, i pronašli jednostavnu mrežnu arhitekturu s kojom se najbolja tačnost može dobiti povećanjem dubine mreže bez povećanja računalnih troškova. Zovemo ga duboka piramida CNN. Predloženi model s 15 slojeva težine iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na šest standardnih podataka za klasifikaciju osjećaja i kategoriju tema.', 'ko': '본고는 복잡도가 낮은 단어급 심층권적신경망(CNN) 텍스트 분류 체계 구조를 제시하여 텍스트 중의 장거리 관련을 효과적으로 나타낼 수 있다.문헌에서 상대적으로 많은 훈련 데이터를 사용할 수 있다고 가정하면 이 임무를 위해 몇 가지 깊이가 복잡한 신경 네트워크를 제시했다.그러나 네트워크가 깊어지면서 관련 계산의 복잡도가 증가하여 실제 응용에 심각한 도전을 가져왔다.또 최근의 연구에 따르면 큰 훈련 데이터 설정에서도 가장 선진적인 극심한 네트워크(예를 들어 문자급 CNN)보다 얕은 단어급 CNN이 더 정확하고 빠르다고 한다.이러한 발견을 토대로 우리는 단어급 CNN의 심화를 꼼꼼히 연구하여 텍스트의 전체적인 표시를 포획하였으며, 네트워크 깊이를 늘리면 계산 비용을 많이 증가시키지 않고 최상의 정밀도를 얻을 수 있는 간단한 네트워크 구조를 발견하였다.우리는 깊은 피라미드 CNN이라고 부른다.감정 분류와 주제 분류의 6개 기준 데이터 집합에서 이 모델은 15개의 권중층을 가지고 그 성능은 이전의 가장 좋은 모델보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt eine Low-Komplexität Word-Level Deep Convolutional Neuronal Network (CNN) Architektur (Deep Convolutional Neuronal Network) für die Textkategorisierung vor, die effizient langfristige Assoziationen im Text darstellen kann. In der Literatur wurden mehrere tiefe und komplexe neuronale Netze für diese Aufgabe vorgeschlagen, wobei die Verfügbarkeit relativ großer Mengen an Trainingsdaten vorausgesetzt wird. Die damit verbundene Rechenkomplexität steigt jedoch mit zunehmender Tiefe der Netzwerke, was in der praktischen Anwendung große Herausforderungen mit sich bringt. Darüber hinaus wurde kürzlich gezeigt, dass flache CNNs auf Wortebene genauer und viel schneller sind als die hochmodernen sehr tiefen Netze wie CNNs auf Zeichenebene, auch bei großen Trainingsdaten. Motiviert durch diese Erkenntnisse, haben wir sorgfältig die Vertiefung von CNNs auf Wortebene untersucht, um globale Repräsentationen von Text zu erfassen, und eine einfache Netzwerkarchitektur gefunden, mit der die beste Genauigkeit erreicht werden kann, indem die Netzwerktiefe erhöht wird, ohne den Rechenkosten um viel zu erhöhen. Wir nennen es tiefe Pyramide CNN. Das vorgeschlagene Modell mit 15-Gewichtsschichten übertrifft die bisherigen besten Modelle auf sechs Benchmark-Datensätzen für Stimmungsklassifizierung und Themenkategorisierung.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan arkitektur jaringan saraf konvolusi dalam tingkat kata yang rumit rendah (CNN) untuk kategorisasi teks yang dapat mewakili dengan efisien asosiasi jangkauan panjang dalam teks. Dalam literatur, beberapa jaringan saraf yang mendalam dan kompleks telah diusulkan untuk tugas ini, menganggap kebebasan jumlah data pelatihan relatif besar. Namun, kompleksitas komputasi yang terkait meningkat saat jaringan lebih dalam, yang menimbulkan tantangan serius dalam aplikasi praktis. Selain itu, baru-baru ini ditunjukkan bahwa CNN tingkat kata rendah lebih akurat dan jauh lebih cepat dari jaringan yang paling teratas seperti CNN tingkat karakter bahkan dalam pengaturan data latihan besar. Dimotifkan oleh penemuan-penemuan ini, kami berhati-hati mempelajari kedalaman CNN-tingkat kata untuk menangkap represensi global teks, dan menemukan arsitektur jaringan sederhana dengan mana akurasi terbaik dapat diperoleh dengan meningkatkan kedalaman jaringan tanpa meningkatkan biaya komputasi dengan banyak. Kami menyebutnya piramid dalam CNN. Model yang diusulkan dengan 15 lapisan berat badan melebihi model terbaik sebelumnya pada enam set data benchmark untuk klasifikasi sentimen dan kategorisasi topik.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که یک معماری شبکه عصبی (CNN) عمیق در سطح کلمات پیچیدگی کم است برای تنظیم متن که می\u200cتواند به طور تاثیر ارتباطات طولانی در متن را نشان دهد. در ادبیات، چند شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق و پیچیده برای این کار پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند، با فرض موجود موجودات داده\u200cهای آموزش نسبتا بزرگ است. با این حال، پیچیدگی محاسبات ارتباط به طور عمیق تر از شبکه\u200cها افزایش می\u200cکند، که در کاربردهای عملی چالش جدی می\u200cکند. اخیراً نشان داده شد که CNN سطح کلمات زیادی دقیق تر و سریع تر از شبکه های عمیق هنری مانند سطح شخصیت CNN حتی در تنظیم داده های آموزش بزرگ هستند. توسط این نتیجه\u200cها حرکت کرده\u200cایم، ما به دقت تحقیق عمیق سطح کلمه\u200cهای CNN برای گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای جهانی متن را مطالعه کردیم، و یک معماری شبکه ساده پیدا کردیم که بهترین دقیق می\u200cتواند با افزایش عمیق شبکه بدون افزایش هزینه\u200cهای کامپیوتری به زیادی برسد. ما بهش ميگيم پيراميد عميق سين اي مدل پیشنهاد با ۱۵ طبقه وزن بیشتر از آن بهترین مدل گذشته در ۶ مجموعه داده\u200cهای سنجیره برای گروه\u200cبندی احساسات و مجموعه\u200cهای موضوع را اجرا می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një arkitekturë të rrjetit nervor konvolutiv të thellë (CNN) me nivel të ulët kompleksiteti për kategorizimin e tekstit që mund të përfaqësojë në mënyrë të efektshme shoqatat me distancë të gjatë në tekst. Në letërsinë, disa rrjete të thella dhe komplekse nervore janë propozuar për këtë detyrë, duke supozuar dispozicionin e sasive relativisht të mëdha të të dhënave të trainimit. Megjithatë, kompleksiteti kompjuterik i lidhur rritet ndërsa rrjetet shkojnë më thellë, gjë që paraqet sfida serioze në aplikimet praktike. Përveç kësaj, u tregua kohët e fundit se CNN të nivelit të lartë të fjalëve janë më të sakta dhe shumë më të shpejtë se rrjetet më të thella të gjendjes së fundit të tilla si CNN të nivelit të karakterit edhe në vendosjen e të dhënave të mëdha të trainimit. Motivuar nga këto gjetje, ne studiuam me kujdes thellimin e CNN-ve të nivelit të fjalës për të kapur përfaqësimet globale të tekstit dhe gjetëm një arkitekturë të thjeshtë rrjeti me të cilën saktësia më e mirë mund të arrihet duke rritur thellësinë e rrjetit pa rritur koston llogaritës me shumë. E quajmë piramidë e thellë CNN. Modeli i propozuar me 15 shtresa peshe paraqet modelet më të mira të mëparshëm në gjashtë baza të dhënash për klasifikimin e ndjenjave dhe kategorizimin e temave.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza ujenzi wa mtandao wa kikatili wa maneno yenye utata wa kiwango cha chini cha kina cha kina cha kikatili cha ubongo wa neura (CNN) kwa ajili ya makundi ya maandishi yanayoweza kuwakilisha mashirika ya muda mrefu kwa maandishi. Katika fasihi, mitandao kadhaa ya kina na yenye utata ya neura imependekezwa kwa ajili ya kazi hii, kwa kudhani upatikanaji wa taarifa kubwa za mafunzo. Hata hivyo, changamoto zinazohusiana na kompyuta zinaongezeka kwani mitandao yanaendelea zaidi, ambazo zinaleta changamoto kubwa katika matumizi ya uhalisia. Zaidi ya hayo, ilionyeshwa hivi karibuni kwamba watu wa CNNN wa ngazi mbaya ni sahihi na haraka zaidi ya mitandao ya sanaa yenye hali ya juu kama vile viwango vya CNN hata katika kutengeneza takwimu kubwa za mafunzo. Hatua ya matokeo haya, tulisoma kwa makini ya kina cha CNN kwa ajili ya kushika uwakilishi wa ujumbe wa kimataifa, na tukakuta ujenzi rahisi wa mtandao ambao unaweza kupatikana kwa kiwango kikubwa zaidi kwa kuongeza kina cha mtandao bila kuongeza gharama za hesabu kwa kiasi kikubwa. Tunaita pyramidi ya ndani ya CNN. Mfano wa pendekezo wenye vipande 15 vya uzito unaonyesha mifano bora ya zamani kwenye seti sita za taarifa za benchmark kwa ajili ya kutanganisha hisia na kutenganisha mada.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz gaty kelläp gaty düzümlenmiş sözleriň derinliki ahyrlyk netwaral şebekesi (CNN) metin kategoriýasiýasy üçin metin içinde ýerleşýän bir arhitekturlygy teklip edýär. edebiýatda, bu zada birnäçe gaty uly we karmaşık şebekeler görä birnäçe çukur we karmaşık şebekeler üýtgedildi we görä birnäçe uly adam maglumaty bar diýip pikir edýärler. Ýöne, syýasatyň karmaşıklygy şebekeleri düzümlendirir we bu şekilde pratik uygulamalarda çözümler örän kynçylyklary bar. Soňky wagtlarda CNN iň gowy sözleriň derejesi gaty dogry we ýigrimiň ýigrimi görkezilýän şebekeleriň derejesinde (karakter-level CNN) ullanyşynda hatda gaty uly okuwçylyk maglumaty düzenlemekde hem gaty çalt boldygyny görkezildi. Bu tapylar tarapyndan görkezilişi, biz CNN sözleriň derinliklerini araşdyryp dünýädäki metin suratlaryny almak üçin we a ňry has diňlik arhitekturlygy tapdyk we şebek derinliklerini kän bir arhitekturlygy ýüzelendirip bilýäris. Biz muny CNN-iň derin piramidi diýip atlandyrýarys. 15 golat kalamlary bilen teklip eden nusga sentiment klasifikasyýasy we tema kategoriýasy üçin öňki iň gowy nusgalary üstine çykar.', 'am': 'ይህ የጽሑፍ ጉዳይ የረጅም ጉዳይ ጉዳዮች በጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል የሚችል የጽሑፍ ክፍተት የጥልቅ ቃላት-ደረጃ ጥልቅ ጥልቅ የኔትራዊ መረብ (CNN) መሠረት ይፈልጋል፡፡ በጸሐፊው፣ ብዙ ጥልቅ እና ተጨማሪ የኒሮግራዊ መረብ ለዚህ ስራ ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን የተገኘው አካውንቲካዊ ድካም ጥልቅ ሲሄድ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ ከቅርብ ዘመን ደግሞ የCNN ቃላት-ደረጃ ጥቁር እና የፍጥረት ጥልቅ የመረብ መረብ እንደሆነ የCNNNs ትልቅ ትምህርት ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እንደተጨማሪ ጥልቅ ነው፡፡ Motivated by these findings, we carefully studied deepening of word-level CNNs to capture global representations of text, and found a simple network architecture with which the best accuracy can be obtained by increasing the network depth without increasing computational cost by much.  በCNN ውስጥ ጥልቅ pyramid እናስባለን ። የ15 ሚዛን ደረጃዎች አካባቢ የነበረውን የስድስት የbenchmark ዳታዎችን በመስመር ክፍተት እና የጉዳይ ክፍተት ላይ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ያሳያል።', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n lae- kompleksiteit woord- vlak diep convolusionele neuralnetwerk (CNN) architecture vir teks kategorisasie wat kan effektief voorstel langomvang assosiasies in teks. In die leeteratur is verskeie diep en kompleks neuralnetwerke voorgestel vir hierdie taak, aangeneem dat beskikbaarheid van relativies groot hoeveelheid onderwerp data is. Maar die geassosieerde rekenaar kompleksiteit vergroot as die netwerke dieper gaan, wat ernstige uitdagings in praktiese toepassings stel. Ook, dit was onlangs vertoon dat slag woord-vlak CNN is meer presies en baie vinniger as die staat-van-die-kuns baie diep netwerke soos karaktervlak CNN selfs in die opstelling van groot onderwerp data. Gemotiveer deur hierdie gevindings, het ons versigtig onderwerp van woord-vlak CNN om globale voorstellings van teks te vang, en gevind 'n eenvoudige netwerk-arkitektuur waarmee die beste presisie kan ontvang word deur die netwerk-diepte te vergroot sonder die vergroot rekenaar koste deur baie te vergroot. Ons noem dit diep pyramid CNN. Die voorgestelde model met 15 gewig laag uitvoer die vorige beste modele op ses benchmark datastelle vir sentimentklassifikasie en onderwerp kategorisasie.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি লেখা বিভাগের জন্য একটি নিম্নলিখিত শব্দ-স্তরের গভীরভাবে বিশ্বাসী নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করেছে যা লেখায় দ সাহিত্যে এই কাজের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি গভীর এবং জটিল নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যেখানে প্রশিক্ষণের পরিমাণ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য তবে যোগাযোগী গণনামূলক জটিলতা বেড়ে যায় যখন নেটওয়ার্ক গভীরে যায়, যা ব্যাক্তিগত অ্যাপলিকেশনে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্য Moreover, it was shown recently that shallow word-level CNNs are more accurate and much faster than the state-of-the-art very deep nets such as character-level CNNs even in the setting of large training data.  এই পরিস্থিতির মাধ্যমে আমরা শব্দ-স্তরে সিএনএন-এর গভীরভাবে গবেষণা করি বিশ্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব গ্রহণের জন্য এবং একটি সাধারণ নেটওয়ার্ক কেট কাঠামো পেয়েছি যার সাথে নেটওয়ার্কের গভীর আমরা এটাকে সিএনএন-এর গভীর পিরামিড ড ডাকি। প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের মোড ১৫টি ওজনের ক্ষেত্রে পূর্ববর্তী সেরা মডেল বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের জন্য বিশেষ বিভাগ এবং বিষয় বিভা', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže arhitekturu duboke konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za kategorizaciju teksta koja može učinkovito predstaviti dugogodišne asocijacije u tekstu. U književnosti je predloženo nekoliko dubokih i kompleksnih neuronskih mreža za ovaj zadatak, s obzirom na dostupnost relativno velikih količina podataka o obuci. Međutim, povećana kompleksnost računala se povećava dok mreža budu dublje, što predstavlja ozbiljne izazove u praktičnim aplikacijama. Nadalje, nedavno se pokazalo da su plitki CNN-ovi nivo riječi precizniji i mnogo brži od države umjetnosti jako duboke mreže poput CNN-ovih nivoa karaktera čak i u postavljanju velikih podataka o obuci. Pokrenuli smo ovim nalazima, pažljivo smo proučavali dubljenje CNN-a na riječima kako bi uhvatili globalne predstave teksta, i pronašli jednostavnu mrežnu arhitekturu s kojom se najbolja tačnost može dobiti povećanjem dubine mreže bez povećanja računalnih troškova. Zovemo ga duboka piramida CNN. Predloženi model sa 15 slojeva težine iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na šest standardnih podataka za klasifikaciju osjećaja i kategoriju tema.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է ցածր բարդություն բառերի մակարդակի խորը կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) ճարտարապետություն տեքստի կատեգորիզացիայի համար, որը կարող է արդյունավետ ներկայացնել հեռավոր կապերը տեքստում: Գրագրության մեջ մի քանի խորը և բարդ նյարդային ցանցեր են առաջարկվել այս խնդրի համար, ենթադրելով, որ հարաբերականորեն մեծ քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ կան: Այնուամենայնիվ, կապված հաշվարկների բարդությունը աճում է, երբ ցանցերը ավելի խորը գնում են, ինչը լուրջ մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում պրակտիկ ծրագրերում: Ավելին, վերջերս ցույց է տվել, որ մակերեսային բառերի մակարդակի CNN-ները ավելի ճշգրիտ են և շատ ավելի արագ են, քան ամենաբարձր ցանցերը, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ բնության մակարդակի CNN-ները նույնիսկ մեծ ուսուցման տվյալների ընթացքում: Այս բացահայտումների միջոցով մենք ուշադիր ուսումնասիրեցինք բառերի մակարդակի CNN-ների խորացմանը տեքստի գլոբալ ներկայացումների նկատմամբ և գտանք մի պարզ ցանցի ճարտարապետություն, որի օգնությամբ լավագույն ճշգրտությունը կարող է ստանալ ցանցի խորությունը աճելով առանց շատ ա Մենք այն անվանում ենք խորը բուրգի CNN: 15 կշռության շերտերով առաջարկված մոդելը գերազանցում է նախորդ լավագույն մոդելները վեց համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերում զգացմունքների դասակարգման և թեմայի դասակարգման համար:', 'az': "Bu kağıt mətn kategoriyasiyası üçün düşük-kompleksitə söz-seviyyəti derin konvolucional nöral a ğ (CNN) arhitektarını təklif edir ki, mətndə uzun-səviyyədə bağlantıları göstərə bilər. Bu iş üçün bir neçə derin və kompleks nöral ağları təklif edilmişdir ki, çox böyük təhsil məlumatlarının faydalanmasını təmin edir. Halbuki, əlaqəsizli kompleksiyal kompleksitə şəbəkələr daha derin gəldiyi zaman artırar, ki bu, praktik proqramlarda ciddi çətinliklər yaradır. Daha sonra, çox qısa söz səviyyəsi CNN-lərin daha doğru və daha hızlı mövcuddur, hətta böyük təhsil məlumatlarının qurmasında, karakter səviyyəsi CNN-lər kimi çox dərin ağılardan daha yüksək və daha hızlı olduğunu göstərildi. Bu tapılar tarafından dəyişdirilmiş, söz seviyyəsi CNN'lərin dəyişdirilməsini araşdırdıq ki, küresel məlumatların məlumatlarını almaq üçün, sadə a ğ arhitektarını tapdıq ki, ağ derinliklərini çox artırmaq üçün ən yaxşı dəyişiklik alınabilir. Biz onu derin piramidə CNN adlandırırıq. 15 ağırlıq düzümləri ilə təbliğ edilən modellər hisslərin klasifikasyonu və məsələlərin kategoriyasiyası üçün altı benchmark veri qurğularının əvvəlki ən yaxşı modellərini seçir.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö pakub välja väikese keerukusega sõnatasemel sügava konvolutsioonivõrgu (CNN) arhitektuuri teksti kategoriseerimiseks, mis suudab tõhusalt esindada pikaajalisi seoseid tekstis. Kirjanduses on selle ülesande jaoks välja pakutud mitmeid sügavaid ja keerukaid neurovõrke, eeldades suhteliselt suurte koolitusandmete kättesaadavust. Kuid sellega seotud arvutuslik keerukus suureneb, kui võrgud lähevad sügavamale, mis tekitab praktilistes rakendustes tõsiseid probleeme. Lisaks näidati hiljuti, et madalad sõnatasemel CNN-d on täpsemad ja palju kiiremad kui kaasaegsed väga sügavad võrgud, näiteks märgitasemel CNN-d isegi suurte treeningandmete korral. Nende tulemuste põhjal uurisime hoolikalt sõnatasemel CNN-ide süvendamist, et jäädvustada teksti globaalseid esitusi, ning leidsime lihtsa võrguarhitektuuri, mille abil on võimalik saavutada parima täpsuse suurendades võrgusügavust ilma arvutuskulusid palju suurendamata. Me kutsume seda sügavaks püramiidiks CNN. Kavandatud 15 kaalukihiga mudel ületab varasemaid parimaid mudeleid kuue sentimentaalse klassifitseerimise ja teemakategooriate võrdlusandmekogumi puhul.', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon una arquitectura de la xarxa neural convolucional profunda (CNN) de baixa complexitat per a la categorització de textos que pot representar eficientment associacions a llarg rango en el text. A la literatura s'han proposat diverses xarxes neurals profundes i complexes per aquesta tasca, suposant la disponibilitat de dades relativament grans d'entrenament. Tot i així, la complexitat computacional associada augmenta a mesura que les xarxes s'aprofunden, cosa que pose reptes seriosos en aplicacions pràctiques. A més, fa poc s'ha demostrat que els CNN de nivell superficial de paraules són més precisos i molt més ràpids que les xarxes molt profundes d'última generació, com els CNN de nivell de caràcter, fins i tot en la configuració de grans dades d'entrenament. Motivats per aquests descobriments, vam estudiar cuidadosament l'aprofundament de les CNN de nivell de paraules per capturar representacions mundials del text, i vam trobar una arquitectura de xarxa senzilla amb la qual es pot obtenir la millor precisió augmentant la profunditat de la xarxa sense augmentar el cost de computació. Ho anomenem piràmide profunda CNN. El model proposat amb 15 capes de pes supera els millors models anteriors en sis conjunts de dades de referència per la classificació del sentiment i la categorització del tema.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan matalan monimutkaisuuden sanatason syvän konvolutionaalisen neuroverkon (CNN) arkkitehtuuria tekstin kategorisointiin, joka voi tehokkaasti edustaa pitkän kantaman yhteyksiä tekstissä. Kirjallisuudessa tähän tehtävään on ehdotettu useita syviä ja monimutkaisia neuroverkkoja olettaen, että käytettävissä on suhteellisen suuria määriä harjoitusdataa. Siihen liittyvä laskennallinen monimutkaisuus kuitenkin kasvaa verkkojen syventyessä, mikä asettaa vakavia haasteita käytännön sovelluksiin. Lisäksi hiljattain osoitettiin, että matalat sanatason CNN-verkot ovat tarkempia ja paljon nopeampia kuin huipputekniset erittäin syvät verkot, kuten merkkitason CNN-verkot, jopa suurissa harjoitustiedoissa. Näiden löydösten motivoimana tutkimme huolellisesti sanatason CNN:ien syventämistä tekstin maailmanlaajuisten esitysten ottamiseksi ja löysimme yksinkertaisen verkkoarkkitehtuurin, jolla paras tarkkuus voidaan saavuttaa lisäämällä verkon syvyyttä ilman, että laskennalliset kustannukset nousisivat paljon. Kutsumme sitä CNN:ksi. Ehdotettu 15 painokerrosta sisältävä malli ylittää aiemmat parhaat mallit kuudessa tunteiden luokittelun ja aiheluokittelun vertailuaineistossa.', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje architekturu hluboké konvoluční neuronové sítě (CNN) s nízkou složitostí pro kategorizaci textu, která může efektivně reprezentovat asociace dlouhého rozsahu v textu. V literatuře bylo pro tento úkol navrženo několik hlubokých a komplexních neuronových sítí za předpokladu dostupnosti relativně velkého množství tréninkových dat. Související výpočetní složitost se však zvyšuje s hloubkou sítí, což představuje vážné výzvy v praktických aplikacích. Kromě toho bylo v poslední době ukázáno, že mělké CNN na úrovni slov jsou přesnější a mnohem rychlejší než moderní velmi hluboké sítě, jako jsou CNN na úrovni znaků, i při nastavení velkých tréninkových dat. Motivováni těmito poznatky jsme pečlivě studovali prohloubení CNN na úrovni slov, abychom zachytili globální reprezentace textu, a nalezli jsme jednoduchou síťovou architekturu, se kterou lze dosáhnout nejlepší přesnosti zvýšením hloubky sítě bez výrazného zvýšení výpočetních nákladů. Říkáme tomu hluboká pyramida CNN. Navržený model s patnácti hmotnostními vrstvami překonává předchozí nejlepší modely na šesti referenčních datových sadách pro klasifikaci sentimentů a kategorizaci témat.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki supoyata akeh-akeh basa gambar luwih-akeh basa gambar, dadi tanggal Njuar (MT) architecture kanggo kategorisi teks sing bisa nguasai akeh operasi tambahan nang teks. Nang aliteratur, sing sampeyan deep karo pakeh tambah alah sing arep nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe iki, supoyo iso ngejarakake kuwi tindakan akeh dhéwé Wonten, komplikasi komplikasi sing paling-komplikasi sing luwih dumateng kapan tambah sing katêpakan, sing supoyo perbudhakan sing apik lan aplikasi pratiki. Label Ngawe mesthi mobile nggambar kuwi, awak dhéwé isih beraksi sak aturan kelas nang kelas telu " Awak dhéwé nyengke deep pirahid-ping ping. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Wannan littafin yana bukãtar da wani jerin-nau'in magana-daraja mai rufe jerin na'ural (CNN) mai ƙidãya wa categorization na matsayi, wanda zai iya iya wakilisha associations masu tsawo cikin matsayin. In littafin, an buƙata wasu mitandao masu rufe da murakku na neural dõmin wannan aikin, ana yi zaton a sami'a da gwargwadon mutane na ƙidãya. Haƙĩƙa, masu husũma da haɗi na lissafi yana ƙara kamar shirin ayuka sun yi ƙari, wanda ke ƙara musamman masu cikin shiryoyin ayuka masu husũma. Da haka, a yanzu, an nuna cewa CNNS-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane ne mafi taƙaita kuma mafi gaggawa daga halin-kunna masu ƙaranci mai girma kamar da tsarin-daraja na CNNNs ko cikin daidaita data mai girma. An Motsar da waɗannan fassarar gannai, mun karanta muhimmin tsari na CNNN da magana-daraja dõmin su kãma masu kimar matsayi, kuma mun sãmi wani matsayi mai sauƙi na garwaya tarayyan, wanda za'a sãmu da mafi tsaro da shi da za'a ƙãra inuwanta mitandaki ko kuma ba za'a ƙara ko ko da kyautar lissafi. Ina kirãye ta a kan CNN. @ action: button", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga nizko kompleksno arhitekturo globokega konvolucionalnega nevronskega omrežja (CNN) besedila za kategorizacijo besedila, ki lahko učinkovito predstavlja dolgoročne asociacije v besedilu. V literaturi je bilo za to nalogo predlaganih več globokih in kompleksnih nevronskih omrežij, pri čemer je bilo predvidenih razpoložljivosti relativno velikih količin podatkov o usposabljanju. Vendar pa se s tem povezana računalniška kompleksnost povečuje z globljenjem omrežij, kar predstavlja resne izzive pri praktičnih aplikacijah. Poleg tega je bilo nedavno dokazano, da so plitve CNN na ravni besed natančnejše in veliko hitrejše od najsodobnejših zelo globokih mrež, kot so CNN na ravni znakov, tudi pri velikih podatkih o usposabljanju. Na podlagi teh ugotovitev smo skrbno preučili poglobitev besednih CNN-jev za zajem globalnih predstavitev besedila in našli preprosto omrežno arhitekturo, s katero je mogoče najboljšo natančnost doseči s povečanjem globine omrežja brez velikega povečanja računalniških stroškov. Temu pravimo globoka piramida CNN. Predlagani model s 15 plastmi teže presega prejšnje najboljše modele na šestih referenčnih naborih podatkov za klasifikacijo sentimenta in kategorizacijo teme.', 'he': 'This paper proposes a low-complexity word-level deep convolutional neural network (CNN) architecture for text categorization that can efficiently represent long-range associations in text.  בספרות, מספר רשתות עצביות עמוקות וממורכבות הציעו למשימה הזאת, בהנחה שהם זמינים כמויות גדולות יחסית של נתוני אימון. עם זאת, המורכבות החישובית הקשורה מגבילה כשהרשתות מתעמקות יותר, מה שמעמיד אתגרים רציניים באימונים מעשיים. חוץ מזה, הוראה לאחרונה ש CNN רמה מילים גבוהה יותר מדויקת ומהירות הרבה יותר מהרשתות העמוקות ביותר כמו CNN רמת אופי אפילו בסיס נתוני אימונים גדולים. מוטיבציה על ידי הממצאים האלה, למדנו בזהירות את העמוקים של CNN ברמה מילים כדי לתפוס מייצגים גלובליים של טקסט, ומצאנו ארכיטקטורה רשתית פשוטה שאפשר להשיג את הדיוקת הטובה ביותר על ידי העומק של הרשת ללא העלות מחשבית גדולה על הרבה. אנחנו קוראים לזה פירמידה עמוקה CNN. הדוגמא המוצעת עם 15 שכבות משקל מגבילה את הדוגמאות הטובות ביותר הקודמות על שש קבוצות נתונים של רמזים לסימון רגשות והקטגוריזציה נושאית.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་འདིའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཉུང་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་ལས་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་གཞན་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ(CNN)སྒྲིག འདིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྨང་བ་དང་སྦྱོར་བའི་དྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་འཇུག་སྤྲོད་འདོད་ཡོད། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཆེད་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆེད་དུ་ཇུས་ཟབ་ཇུས་གཏོང་ཡོད། Moreover, it was shown recently that shallow word-level CNNs are more accurate and much faster than the state-of-the-art very deep nets such as character-level CNNs even in the setting of large training data. Motivated by these findings, we carefully studied deepening of word-level CNNs to capture global representations of text, and found a simple network architecture with which the best accuracy can be obtained by increasing the network depth without increasing computational cost by much. ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཟབ་བའི་piramida-CNN ཞེས་འབོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལྡན་པར15ཡིན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཤོས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་ག'}
{'en': 'Improved Neural Relation Detection for Knowledge Base Question Answering', 'ar': 'تحسين الكشف عن العلاقات العصبية للإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعرفة', 'pt': 'Detecção de Relação Neural Aprimorada para Resposta a Perguntas da Base de Conhecimento', 'es': 'Detección mejorada de relaciones neuronales para responder preguntas de la base de conocimientos', 'fr': 'Détection améliorée des relations neuronales pour répondre aux questions de la base', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの質問への回答のための改善された神経関係検出', 'zh': '改入知识库问答神经检', 'ru': 'Улучшенное обнаружение нейронной связи для ответа на вопрос базы знаний', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए बेहतर तंत्रिका संबंध का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Brath Feabhsaithe ar Chaidreamh Néarach le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna ar Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების ბაზის პასუხისთვის განსახულებული ნეიროლური დაკავშირება', 'el': 'Βελτιωμένη ανίχνευση νευρωνικών σχέσεων για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων της βάσης γνώσης', 'hu': 'Javított idegrendszeri kapcsolat felismerése a tudásbázis kérdéseinek megválaszolásához', 'it': 'Migliorato il rilevamento delle relazioni neurali per la risposta alle domande della Knowledge Base', 'mk': 'Подобрено детективирање на нервните односи за одговори на прашањата на базата на знаење', 'kk': 'Білім негізгі сұрақтардың жауап беру үшін көңіл қатынасын анықтау', 'lt': 'Improved Neural Relation Detection for Knowledge Base Question Answering', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Hubungan Neural Terbaik untuk Jawapan soalan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിച', 'mt': 'Sejbien imtejjeb tar-Relazzjoni Newrali għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq l-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь асуулт хариултын тулд сэтгэл санааны харилцаа олох', 'ro': 'Detectarea relațiilor neurale îmbunătățită pentru răspunsul la întrebările din baza de cunoștințe', 'pl': 'Poprawiono wykrywanie relacji nerwowych dla odpowiedzi na pytania bazy wiedzy', 'no': 'Utbedra oppdaging av neurorelasjonar for å svara på kjennebasespørsmål', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje otkrivanja neuroloških odnosa za odgovor na pitanje baze znanja', 'si': 'දැනගැනීම් මූල ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ලැබීමට හොයාගන්න', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha aasaasiga ah ee la xiriira qoyska", 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் கேள்வி பதில் முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட புதிய தொடர்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'sv': 'Förbättrad detektering av neural relation för svar på kunskapsbasen', 'ur': 'علم Base سوال جواب کے لئے نیورال رابطہ کا اثبات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện liên quan thần kinh học về câu hỏi cơ bản', 'bg': 'Подобрено откриване на неврална връзка за отговор на въпроси от базата знания', 'da': 'Forbedret Neural Relation Detection for Knowledge Base Spørgsmål Besvarelse', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje otkrivanja neuroloških odnosa za odgovor na pitanja baze znanja', 'nl': 'Verbeterde detectie van neurale relaties voor het beantwoorden van vragen in de kennisbank', 'de': 'Verbesserte Erkennung neuronaler Beziehungen für die Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال بنیادی علم', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 문답에서 개선된 신경 관계 검측', 'id': 'Menembak Deteksi Hubungan Neural untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Basa Pengetahuan', 'af': 'Geverbeterde neurale verwanting beskrywing vir kennis basis vraag antwoord', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Kuhusiana na Msingi wa Ujuzi ulioboreshwa', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i marrëdhënieve nervore për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të bazuara në dijeni', 'tr': 'Bilim tabasy soragy jogapy üçin gelişmiş närasal ilişkisi tapylmak', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'Bilim temel sualının cavab verməsi üçün nöral əlaqələri keşif', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য উন্নত নিউরেল সম্পর্ক সন্ধান', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմնական հարցերի պատասխանի համար բարելավված նյարդային հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերումը', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje otkrivanja neuroloških odnosa za odgovor na pitanje baze znanja', 'ca': 'millor detecció de relacions neuronals per respondre a preguntes basades en el coneixement', 'cs': 'Vylepšená detekce nervových vztahů pro zodpovězení otázek znalostní báze', 'fi': 'Parannettu hermosuhteiden tunnistus Knowledge Base Kysymyksiin vastaamisessa', 'et': 'Täiustatud neurosuhete tuvastamine teabebaasi küsimustele vastamise jaoks', 'jv': 'Gebah nambah urip penting alat kanggo saben urip punika', 'sk': 'Izboljšano zaznavanje nevronskih odnosov za odgovore na vprašanja zbirke znanja', 'he': 'גילוי מערכת יחסים עצביים משתפר עבור תשובת שאלות על בסיס ידע', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་རྟོགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཟེར་བ་དེ་ལ།'}
{'en': 'Relation detection is a core component of many NLP applications including Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). In this paper, we propose a hierarchical recurrent neural network enhanced by residual learning which detects KB relations given an input question. Our method uses deep residual bidirectional LSTMs to compare questions and relation names via different levels of abstraction. Additionally, we propose a simple KBQA system that integrates entity linking and our proposed relation detector to make the two components enhance each other. Our experimental results show that our approach not only achieves outstanding relation detection performance, but more importantly, it helps our KBQA system achieve state-of-the-art accuracy for both single-relation (SimpleQuestions) and multi-relation (WebQSP) QA benchmarks.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف العلاقة مكونًا أساسيًا للعديد من تطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية بما في ذلك الإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعرفة (KBQA). في هذه الورقة ، نقترح شبكة عصبية متكررة هرمية معززة بالتعلم المتبقي والتي تكتشف علاقات KB في ضوء سؤال الإدخال. تستخدم طريقتنا LSTMs ثنائية الاتجاه العميقة المتبقية لمقارنة الأسئلة وأسماء العلاقات عبر مستويات مختلفة من التجريد. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح نظام KBQA بسيطًا يدمج ربط الكيانات وكاشف العلاقة المقترح لدينا لجعل المكونين يعززان بعضهما البعض. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن نهجنا لا يحقق فقط أداءً متميزًا في اكتشاف العلاقات ، ولكن الأهم من ذلك ، أنه يساعد نظام KBQA لدينا على تحقيق دقة عالية لكل من معايير QA للعلاقة الواحدة (SimpleQuestions) والعلاقات المتعددة (WebQSP) .', 'pt': 'A detecção de relação é um componente central de muitos aplicativos de PNL, incluindo o Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). Neste artigo, propomos uma rede neural recorrente hierárquica aprimorada por aprendizado residual que detecta relações KB a partir de uma pergunta de entrada. Nosso método usa LSTMs bidirecionais residuais profundos para comparar perguntas e nomes de relações por meio de diferentes níveis de abstração. Além disso, propomos um sistema KBQA simples que integra a vinculação de entidades e nosso detector de relação proposto para fazer os dois componentes melhorarem um ao outro. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem não apenas alcança excelente desempenho de detecção de relação, mas, mais importante, ajuda nosso sistema KBQA a obter precisão de última geração para benchmarks de QA de relação única (SimpleQuestions) e multi-relação (WebQSP). .', 'fr': "La détection des relations est un composant essentiel de nombreuses applications de PNL, y compris la réponse aux questions de la base de connaissances (KBQA). Dans cet article, nous proposons un réseau neuronal récurrent hiérarchique amélioré par un apprentissage résiduel qui détecte les relations KB en fonction d'une question d'entrée. Notre méthode utilise des LSTM bidirectionnels résiduels profonds pour comparer les questions et les noms de relations via différents niveaux d'abstraction. De plus, nous proposons un système KBQA simple qui intègre la liaison d'entités et notre détecteur de relations proposé pour que les deux composants s'améliorent mutuellement. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche permet non seulement d'obtenir des performances exceptionnelles de détection des relations, mais surtout qu'elle aide notre système KBQA à atteindre une précision de pointe pour les tests d'assurance qualité à relation unique (SimpleQuestions) et multi-relation (WebQSP).", 'es': 'La detección de relaciones es un componente fundamental de muchas aplicaciones de PNL, incluida la respuesta a preguntas de la base de conocimientos (KBQA) En este artículo, proponemos una red neuronal recurrente jerárquica mejorada por el aprendizaje residual que detecta las relaciones de KB a partir de una pregunta de entrada. Nuestro método utiliza LSTM bidireccionales residuales profundos para comparar preguntas y nombres de relaciones a través de diferentes niveles de abstracción. Además, proponemos un sistema KBQA simple que integra la vinculación de entidades y nuestro detector de relaciones propuesto para que los dos componentes se mejoren entre sí. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque no solo logra un rendimiento sobresaliente en la detección de relaciones, sino que, lo que es más importante, ayuda a nuestro sistema KBQA a lograr una precisión de vanguardia para los parámetros de control de calidad de relación única (SimpleQuestions) y multirelación (WebQSP).', 'ja': 'リレーション検出は、ナレッジベースクエスチョンアンサー（ KBQA ）を含む多くのNLPアプリケーションのコアコンポーネントです。本稿では，入力された質問に対して， KB関係を検出する残留学習によって強化された階層的再帰ニューラルネットワークを提案する．私たちの方法は、異なるレベルの抽象化を介して質問と関係名を比較するために深い残差双方向LSTMを使用します。さらに、エンティティリンクと提案されている関係検出器を統合して、2つのコンポーネントを互いに強化する簡単なKBQAシステムを提案します。当社の実験結果は、当社のアプローチが卓越した関係検出パフォーマンスを達成するだけでなく、より重要なことに、当社のKBQAシステムが、シングルリレーション（ SimpleQuestions ）とマルチリレーション（ WebQSP ）のQAベンチマークの両方で最先端の精度を達成するのに役立つことを示しています。', 'hi': 'संबंध पता लगाना नॉलेज बेस प्रश्न उत्तर (KBQA) सहित कई NLP अनुप्रयोगों का एक मुख्य घटक है। इस पेपर में, हम अवशिष्ट सीखने द्वारा बढ़ाया गया एक पदानुक्रमित आवर्ती तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इनपुट प्रश्न को देखते हुए केबी संबंधों का पता लगाता है। हमारी विधि अमूर्तता के विभिन्न स्तरों के माध्यम से प्रश्नों और संबंध नामों की तुलना करने के लिए गहरे अवशिष्ट द्विदिश LSTMs का उपयोग करती है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम एक साधारण KBQA प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इकाई लिंकिंग और हमारे प्रस्तावित संबंध डिटेक्टर को एकीकृत करता है ताकि दो घटक एक-दूसरे को बढ़ा सकें। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण न केवल उत्कृष्ट संबंध का पता लगाने के प्रदर्शन को प्राप्त करता है, बल्कि अधिक महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि यह हमारे KBQA सिस्टम को एकल-संबंध (SimpleQuestions) और बहु-संबंध (WebQSP) QA बेंचमार्क दोनों के लिए अत्याधुनिक सटीकता प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है।', 'zh': '多所 NLP 应用程序组件,兼知识库问 (KBQA)。 于本文中,立一因残差学增递归神经网络,当网络给定输问检测KB。 吾法用深度残差双向 LSTM 以抽象级别较其名。 此外条上一简KBQA系统,当系统集成实体链接与我言检测器,以增两组件。 吾实验结果表明之道,非徒得色检性也,助吾KBQA系于单(SimpleQuestions)多(WebQSP)QA准试先进之准确性。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение связей является ключевым компонентом многих приложений NLP, включая ответы на вопросы базы знаний (KBQA). В этой статье мы предлагаем иерархическую рекуррентную нейронную сеть, усиленную остаточным обучением, которая обнаруживает отношения KB при заданном входном вопросе. Наш метод использует глубокие остаточные двунаправленные LSTM для сравнения вопросов и имен отношений через различные уровни абстракции. Кроме того, мы предлагаем простую систему KBQA, которая интегрирует связывание сущностей и наш предлагаемый детектор отношений, чтобы заставить два компонента усиливать друг друга. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход не только достигает выдающейся производительности обнаружения отношений, но, что более важно, он помогает нашей системе KBQA достичь самой современной точности как для одиночных (SimpleQuestions), так и для мультиреляционных (WebQSP) контрольных показателей QA.', 'ga': 'Is cuid lárnach de go leor feidhmchlár NLP é braite caidrimh, lena n-áirítear Freagra ar Cheisteanna ar Bhonn Eolais (KBQA). Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid gréasán néarach athfhillteach ordlathach arna fheabhsú ag foghlaim iarmharach a bhraitheann caidreamh KB nuair a thugtar ceist ionchuir. Úsáideann ár modh LSTM déthreocha iarmharacha domhain chun ceisteanna a chur i gcomparáid agus ainmneacha caidrimh trí leibhéil éagsúla astarraingthe. Ina theannta sin, molaimid córas simplí KBQA a chomhtháthaíonn nascadh eintiteas agus an brathadóir caidrimh atá beartaithe againn chun an dá chomhpháirt a fheabhsú. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha, ní hamháin go mbaineann ár gcur chuige sárfheidhmíocht braite caidrimh amach, ach níos tábhachtaí fós, go gcabhraíonn sé lenár gcóras KBQA cruinneas den scoth a bhaint amach do thagarmharcanna QA gaol-aonair (SimpleQuestions) agus ilghaol (WebQSP). .', 'ka': 'Relative detection is a core component of many NLP applications including Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ მინდა იერაქტიკური რეკურაციული ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც განვიხსენებს KB შესახებ, რომელიც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ შესახებ კითხვა. ჩვენი მეთოდი გამოყენება ძალიან დარჩენებული LSTMs, რომ კითხვები და შესახებ სახელებები განსხვავებული აბსტრაქციის დონეებით შემდგომარებათ. დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ერთადერთი KBQA სისტემა, რომელიც ინტერგურაცია ინტერგურაცია ინტერგურაციას, და ჩვენი მინდომის კონპონტექტორის განახლება, რომ ორი კო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა არა მხოლოდ განსხვავებული შესახებ განსხვავებას, მაგრამ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ ჩვენი KBQA სისტემა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანს ერთი შესახებ და მრავალური შესახებ QA ბანქმებების', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση σχέσεων αποτελεί βασικό συστατικό πολλών εφαρμογών συμπεριλαμβανομένης της Απάντησης Ερωτήσεων Βάσης Γνώσης (KBQA). Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο ενισχυμένο από υπολειμματική μάθηση, το οποίο ανιχνεύει σχέσεις ΚΒ με βάση μια ερώτηση εισόδου. Η μέθοδος μας χρησιμοποιεί βαθιά υπολείμματα δικατεύθυνσης για να συγκρίνει ερωτήματα και ονόματα σχέσεων μέσω διαφορετικών επιπέδων αφαίρεσης. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε ένα απλό σύστημα που ενσωματώνει τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων και τον προτεινόμενο ανιχνευτή σχέσης μας για να κάνει τα δύο συστατικά να ενισχύουν το ένα το άλλο. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνει εξαιρετική απόδοση ανίχνευσης σχέσεων, αλλά το σημαντικότερο, βοηθά το σύστημά μας να επιτύχει ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας τόσο για τα κριτήρια αξιολόγησης ποιότητας μίας σχέσης (SimpleQuestions) όσο και για τις πολλαπλές σχέσεις (WebQSP).', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatészlelés számos NLP alkalmazás alapvető összetevője, beleértve a Tudásbázis kérdések megválaszolását (KBQA). Jelen tanulmányban egy olyan hierarchikus visszatérő neurális hálózatot javasolunk, amely a bemeneti kérdésben adott KB kapcsolatokat detektálja. Módszerünk mély maradék kétirányú LSTMeket használ a kérdések és kapcsolatnevek összehasonlítására különböző absztrakciós szinteken keresztül. Továbbá egy egyszerű KBQA rendszert javasolunk, amely integrálja entitáskötést és javasolt kapcsolatérzékelőt, hogy a két komponens javítsa egymást. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk nemcsak kiemelkedő kapcsolatészlelési teljesítményt ér el, hanem ami még fontosabb, hogy segít KBQA rendszerünk elérni a legkorszerűbb pontosságot mind az egykapcsolatos (SimpleQuestions), mind a többkapcsolatos (WebQSP) minőségi referenciaértékek esetében.', 'it': "Il rilevamento delle relazioni è un componente fondamentale di molte applicazioni NLP, tra cui la risposta alle domande della Knowledge Base (KBQA). In questo articolo, proponiamo una rete neurale ricorrente gerarchica potenziata dall'apprendimento residuo che rileva le relazioni KB date una domanda di input. Il nostro metodo utilizza LSTMs bidirezionali residui profondi per confrontare domande e nomi di relazione attraverso diversi livelli di astrazione. Inoltre, proponiamo un semplice sistema KBQA che integra il collegamento di entità e il nostro rivelatore di relazione proposto per far sì che i due componenti si migliorino a vicenda. I nostri risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro approccio non solo raggiunge prestazioni eccezionali di rilevamento delle relazioni, ma, cosa ancora più importante, aiuta il nostro sistema KBQA a raggiungere una precisione all'avanguardia per i benchmark QA a singola relazione (SimpleQuestions) e multi-relazione (WebQSP).", 'lt': 'Santykių nustatymas yra pagrindinis daugelio NLP programų komponentas, įskaitant žinių bazinius klausimų atsakymus (KBQA). Šiame dokumente siūlome hierarchinį pakartotinį nervinį tinklą, sustiprintą likutiniu mokymusi, nustatančiu KB santykius pagal įėjimo klausimą. Our method uses deep residual bidirectional LSTMs to compare questions and relation names via different levels of abstraction.  Be to, siūlome paprastą KBQA sistemą, kurioje integruojami subjektai, jungiantys ryšius ir mūsų siūlomas ryšių detektorius, kad šie du komponentai vienas kitą sustiprintų. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris ne tik pasiekia nepaprastus santykių nustatymo rezultatus, bet ir svarbiau, jis padeda mūsų KBQA sistemai pasiekti naujausią tikslumą tiek vieno santykio (paprastųjų klausimų) , tiek kelių santykių (WebQSP) QA lyginamuosiuose rodikliuose.', 'kk': 'Қатысушыларды анықтау - білім негізгі сұрақ жауап (KBQA) деген NLP қолданбаларының негізгі компоненті. Бұл қағазда біз КБ қатынасын келтірілген сұрақты анықтайтын иерархикалық қайталанатын невралды желіне көтеріп жатқан иерархикалық қайталанатын невралды желіне ұсынамыз. Біздің әдіміміз қалдырылған қалдырылған LSTMs сұрақтарды және қатынастарды түрлі абстрактациялық деңгейі арқылы салыстыру үшін қолданылады. Сонымен қарапайым KBQA жүйесі бір-біріне қосылу және қосымша байланысты анықтаушысызды бір-біріне көтеру үшін бір-біріне қосымша қосымша көмектеседі. Біздің тәжірибелікті нәтижеміз тек бір қатынасызды анықтау мүмкіндігін жеткізбейді, бірақ ең маңызды, KBQA жүйесіміздің бір қатынасыз (Simple Questions) мен көп қатынасыз (WebQSP) QA бақылау үшін көмектеседі.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan hubungan adalah komponen utama bagi banyak aplikasi NLP termasuk Jawapan soalan Pangkalan Pengetahuan (KBQA). Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian saraf berkurang hierarkis yang diperbaiki oleh pembelajaran sisa yang mengesan hubungan KB diberikan soalan input. Kaedah kami menggunakan LSTM bidireksi yang tersisa dalam untuk membandingkan soalan dan nama hubungan melalui aras abstraksi yang berbeza. Selain itu, kami melamar sistem KBQA sederhana yang menyertai penghubung entiti dan pengesan hubungan kami yang dilamar untuk membuat kedua-dua komponen meningkatkan satu sama lain. Our experimental results show that our approach not only achieves outstanding relation detection performance, but more importantly, it helps our KBQA system achieve state-of-the-art accuracy for both single-relation (SimpleQuestions) and multi-relation (WebQSP) QA benchmarks.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на врските е главен компонент на многу НЛП апликации, вклучително и одговорот на прашањата на основата на знаењето (KBQA). Во овој весник, предложуваме хиерархична рецидентна нервна мрежа подобрена со резултатно учење кое детектира односи со КБ под ставање прашање. Нашиот метод користи длабоки резултати од две дирекционални ЛСТМ за да ги спореди прашањата и имињата на врските преку различни нивоа на апстракција. Покрај тоа, предложуваме едноставен KBQA систем кој интегрира врзување на ентитетите и нашиот предложен детектор за врски за да ги направи двете компоненти да се подобрат меѓусебно. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап не само што постигнува извонредни резултати за детекција на односи, туку и поважно, тоа им помага на нашиот систем на КБКА да постигне најсовремена точност за односите на еден (SimpleQuestions) и мултиодносите (WebQSP) QA.', 'mt': 'Id-detezzjoni tar-relazzjoni hija komponent ewlieni ta’ ħafna applikazzjonijiet NLP inklużi t-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq l-għarfien (KBQA). F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu netwerk newrali rikorrenti ġerarkiku msaħħa ħ mit-tagħlim residwu li jidentifika r-relazzjonijiet KB mogħtija mistoqsija ta’ input. Il-metodu tagħna juża LSTMs bidirezzjonali residwi profondi biex iqabbel mistoqsijiet u ismijiet ta’ relazzjoni permezz ta’ livelli differenti ta’ astrazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu sistema KBQA sempliċi li tintegra l-entità li torbot u d-detettur tar-relazzjoni propost tagħna biex iż-żewġ komponenti jsaħħu lil xulxin. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li l-approċċ tagħna mhux biss jikseb prestazzjoni eċċellenti ta’ detezzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet, iżda aktar importanti, jgħin lis-sistema KBQA tagħna tikseb preċiżjoni avvanzata kemm għall-punti ta’ riferiment tal-QA b’relazzjoni waħda (Mistoqsijiet Simpli) kif ukoll għal relazzjonijiet multipli (WebQSP).', 'no': 'Oppdaging av relasjonar er ein kjernekomponent av mange NLP- program, inkludert svaring av kjennebasespørsmål (KBQA). I denne papiret foreslår vi eit hierarkisk gjentakelig neuralnettverk, forbetra av læring som oppdagar KB- forhold som gjev eit innspørsmål. Metoden vårt bruker dyp residual bidireksjonal LSTMs for å samanlikna spørsmål og relasjonsnamn via forskjellige nivå av abstraksjon. I tillegg foreslår vi eit enkel KBQA- systemet som integrerer einingar som lenkjer og vår foreslått relasjonsdetektor for å gjera dei to komponentane forbetra hverandre. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser at tilnærminga vårt ikkje berre gjer utgåande oppdaging av relasjonar, men meir viktig, hjelper det vårt KBQA-systemet til å gjere nøyaktighet for både enkelte relasjonar (enkelte spørsmål) og fleire relasjonar (WebQSP) QA-benchmarker.', 'mn': 'Хариулт олох нь олон NLP програмын үндсэн компонент юм. Мэдлэг суурь асуулт хариулт (KBQA) гэх мэт. Энэ цаасан дээр бид КБ-ын харилцааны асуултыг олж мэддэг үлдсэн сургалтын улам дээр дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг санал болгож байна. Бидний арга нь асуулт, харилцааны нэрлүүдийг өөр хэмжээнд харьцуулахын тулд гүн гүнзгий хэмжээний LSTMs ийг ашигладаг. Мөн бид энгийн KBQA системийг нэгтгэх, хоорондоо холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байгуулагч хоёр элементүүдийг нэгтгэх гэсэн санал өгдөг. Бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь зөвхөн харилцааны олон харилцааны үйл ажиллагааг олох биш, гэхдээ илүү чухал нь энэ нь бидний KBQA системийн нэг харилцааны (энгийн асуулт) болон олон харилцааны (WebQSP) QA багц багцлагуудын төвшин байдлын зөв байдлыг олох тулд тусалдаг.', 'ml': 'Relation detection is a core component of many NLP applications including Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA).  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d ശിക്ഷ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d ശേഷിക്കുന്ന LSTMs ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു ചോദ്യങ്ങളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും വ്യത്യസ്ത നിലങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ കെബിക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് വസ്തുവിനെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് മാത്രമല്ല, അതിനാല്\u200d അത് നമ്മുടെ കെബിക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റം ഒര', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie relacji jest podstawowym elementem wielu aplikacji NLP, w tym odpowiedzi na pytania z bazy wiedzy (KBQA). W niniejszym artykule proponujemy hierarchiczną powtarzającą się sieć neuronową wzmocnioną o naukę resztkową, która wykrywa relacje KB podane przez pytanie wejściowe. Nasza metoda wykorzystuje głębokie rezydualne dwukierunkowe LSTMy do porównywania pytań i nazw relacji za pomocą różnych poziomów abstrakcji. Dodatkowo proponujemy prosty system KBQA, który integruje łączenie jednostek z proponowanym detektorem relacji, aby oba komponenty się wzajemnie wzmacniały. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście nie tylko osiąga wyjątkową wydajność wykrywania relacji, ale co ważniejsze, pomaga naszemu systemowi KBQA osiągnąć najnowocześniejszą dokładność zarówno dla pojedynczych relacji (SimpleQuestions), jak i wielu relacji (WebQSP).', 'ro': 'Detectarea relațiilor este o componentă esențială a multor aplicații PNL, inclusiv răspunsul la întrebări din baza de cunoștințe (KBQA). În această lucrare, propunem o rețea neurală recurentă ierarhică îmbunătățită de învățare reziduală care detectează relațiile KB date o întrebare de intrare. Metoda noastră folosește LSTMs-uri bidirecționale reziduale profunde pentru a compara întrebările și numele relațiilor prin diferite niveluri de abstracție. În plus, propunem un sistem KBQA simplu care integrează legătura entităților și detectorul nostru de relații propus pentru a face cele două componente să se îmbunătățească reciproc. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră nu numai că atinge performanțe remarcabile de detectare a relațiilor, ci și mai important, ajută sistemul nostru KBQA să obțină o precizie de ultimă generație atât pentru referințe de calitate unică (SimpleQuestions), cât și pentru referințe multiple (WebQSP).', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje odnosa je osnovna komponenta mnogih NLP aplikacija uključujući odgovor na pitanja baze znanja (KBQA). U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhičku povratnu neuralnu mrežu poboljšanu od ostatka učenja koja otkriva KB odnose s obzirom na ulazno pitanje. Naša metoda koristi duboko ostatke bidirektivne LSTMs kako bi usporedila pitanja i imena veza putem različitih nivoa apstrakcije. Osim toga, predlažemo jednostavan KBQA sistem koji integriše povezanje entiteta i naš predloženi detektor veza da se dva komponenta pojačaju jedno drugo. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup ne samo postiže izvanrednu uspješnost otkrivanja odnosa, već važnije, to pomaže našim KBQA sistemom da ostvarimo tačnost stanja umjetnosti i jednostavnih odnosa (jednostavna pitanja) i mnogim odnosama (WebQSP) QA.', 'sv': 'Relationsdetektering är en kärnkomponent i många NLP-program, inklusive Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett hierarkiskt återkommande neuralt nätverk förstärkt av kvarvarande lärande som detekterar KB-relationer givet en indatafråga. Vår metod använder djupa kvarvarande tvåriktade LSTMs för att jämföra frågor och relationsnamn via olika abstraktionsnivåer. Dessutom föreslår vi ett enkelt KBQA-system som integrerar entitetslänkning och vår föreslagna relationsdetektor för att få de två komponenterna att förbättra varandra. Våra experimentella resultat visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt inte bara uppnår enastående prestanda för relationsdetektering, utan ännu viktigare är att det hjälper vårt KBQA-system att uppnå toppmodern noggrannhet för både single-relations (SimpleQuestions) och multi-relations (WebQSP) QA benchmarks.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි NLP වැඩසටහන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරතික මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නිර්මාණික නිර්මාණික ජාලයෙක් විශේෂය කරනවා කිබී සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ද අපේ විධානය භාවිතා කරනවා ගොඩක් ඉතිරික්ෂිත LSTMs ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ සම්බන්ධ නම් වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳ තවත්, අපි සරල KBQA පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපේ සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සහ අපේ සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිකය අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය විතරක් නෙවෙයි ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය විතරක්, ඒක අපේ KBQA පද්ධතියේ එක්ක සම්බන්ධ', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை கேள்வி பதில் (KBQA) உள்ள பல NLP பயன்பாடுகளின் தொடர்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பு ஒரு மூல பகுதியாகும். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மீண்டும் மீண்டும் திரும்ப வேண்டிய புதிய வலைப்பின்னலை மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது, அது கேபி தொடர்புகளை கண் எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஆழமான மீதமான LSTMs பயன்படுத்துகிறது கேள்விகள் மற்றும் தொடர்பு பெயர்களை வெவ்வேறு நிலைகளில் ஒப் கூடுதலாக, நாம் ஒரு எளிய KBQA அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பொருள் இணைப்பை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் மற்றும் எங்கள் திருப்பப்பட்ட தொடர எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் அணுக்கம் மிகவும் முக்கியமான தொடர்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு மட்டுமல்ல, ஆனால் முக்கியமாக, அது நம்முடைய KBQA அமைப்பு ஒற்றைத்தொடர்புகளுக்', 'so': "Aqoonsashada xiriirka waa qayb kamid ah oo ka mid ah codsiga badan ee NLP, kuwaas oo ku jira jawaabta su'aalaha aasaasiga ah ee aqoonta (KBQA). Warqaddan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa shabakadda neurada ee soo socda oo lagu kordhiyey waxbarashada joogtada ah, kaas oo soo ogaanaya xiriirka KB ee lagu siiyo su'aalo input. Midabkayagu wuxuu ku isticmaalaa LSTMs oo aad u deegaan si ay isbarbardhigto su'aalaha iyo magacyada xiriirka ee heerarka kala duduwan. Sidoo kale, waxaan soo jeedaynaa nidaam fudud oo KBQA ah oo wada ururiya dhamaan isku xiriirka iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha xiriirka, si ay labada kooxood isbedelaan. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ma gaadho sameynta xiriirka oo kaliya, laakiin si muhiim ah ayay u caawinaysaa in systemkeenna KBQA uu gaadho saxda-farshaxanka labada isku-xiriir (Simple Questions) iyo qaramado badan (WebQSP) QA.", 'ur': 'رابطہ شناسایی بہت سی NLP کاربریوں کی اصلی رقم ہے جو علم Base سوال جواب (KBQA) کے شامل ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ہیرآرکیٹ ریٹرنٹ نئورل نیٹورک کی پیشنهاد کریں جو باقی رہنے والی تعلیم کے ذریعے زیادہ اضافہ کی جاتی ہے جو KB رابطہ کو پہچان سکتا ہے جو ایک سوال دی جاتی ہے. ہمارا طریقہ عمیق باقی رہنے والی لس ٹی مز کے استعمال کرتا ہے کہ سوال اور ارتباط ناموں کو مختلف سطح کے ذریعہ مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے. اور زیادہ، ہم ایک ساده KBQA سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس نے اتنی اتصال اور ہماری پیشنهاد ارتباط ڈاکٹر کو ایک دوسرے کو بڑھاتا ہے۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ صرف بہت اچھا ارتباط پیدا کرنے کے کام نہیں پہنچتا، بلکہ بہت اہم ہے کہ یہ ہمارے KBQA سیستم کو ایک ارتباط اور بہت سے ارتباط کے QA بانچمارک کے لئے موجود ہے.', 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện tương ứng là một phần lõi của nhiều ứng dụng NLP trong đó có Nhà câu hỏi bẩm sinh (KBQA). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng thần kinh lập cấp được tăng cường nhờ học còn tồn tại, phát hiện quan hệ của KB khi đưa ra câu hỏi nhập. Phương pháp của chúng tôi dùng hàm răng giả sâu để so sánh các câu hỏi và tên liên hệ qua các mức độ trừu tượng khác nhau. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống KBQA đơn giản, bao gồm cả việc kết nối thực thể và máy phát hiện quan hệ đề xuất để làm cho hai thành phần nâng cao nhau. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy phương pháp không chỉ đạt được hiệu quả phát hiện mối quan hệ tuyệt vời, nhưng quan trọng hơn, nó giúp hệ thống KBQA đạt được độ chính xác cao nhất cho cả mối quan hệ đơn lẻ (Simple-đặt) và nhiều mối liên hệ (WebQSP) QA.', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda, biz davom etilgan tarmoqni davom etishni davom etishimiz mumkin. Kiritish savol bilan KB murakkablarini aniqlaydi. Bizning usuli boshqa darajadagi avval va bog'liq nomlarini kamaytirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz quyidagi tizimni birga bogʻ'lash uchun oddiy KBQA tizimni boshqarishimiz va yaxshi bogʻ'liq tuzuvchimiz, ikkita komponentlarni birga oshirish uchun. Bizning tajriba natijalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, balki faqat yaxshi bog'liq aniqlashni bajarishimiz mumkin, balki bizning KBQA tizimimizni bir bir munosabatlar (Simple саволлар) va bir necha bog'liq QSP (WebQSP) imkoniyatlariga yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Откриването на връзките е основен компонент на много приложения за НЛП, включително отговор на въпроси от базата на знания (KBQA). В настоящата статия предлагаме йерархична повтаряща се невронна мрежа, подсилена от остатъчно учене, която открива връзките на КБ при зададен въпрос. Нашият метод използва дълбоки остатъчни двупосочни ЛСТМ за сравняване на въпроси и имена на релации чрез различни нива на абстракция. Освен това предлагаме проста система, която интегрира свързването на обекти и нашия предложен детектор за връзка, за да накара двата компонента да се подобрят един друг. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че нашият подход не само постига изключителни резултати за откриване на взаимоотношения, но и по-важното, той помага на нашата система да постигне най-съвременна точност както за показатели за качество с единична връзка (SimpleQuestions), така и за многовръзка (WebQSP).', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje odnosa je osnovna komponenta mnogih NLP aplikacija uključujući odgovor na pitanja baze znanja (KBQA). U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhičku povratnu neuralnu mrežu poboljšanu ostatkom učenja koja otkriva KB odnose s obzirom na ulazno pitanje. Naša metoda koristi duboko ostatke bidirektivne LSTMs kako bi usporedila pitanja i imena veza s različitim razinama apstraktacije. Osim toga, predlažemo jednostavan KBQA sustav koji integrira povezanje entiteta i naš predloženi detektor veza kako bi se dva komponenta povećala. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup ne samo postiže izvanrednu uspješnost otkrivanja odnosa, već važnije, to pomaže našem KBQA sustavu ostvariti tačnost stanja umjetnosti i jednostavnih odnosa (jednostavna pitanja) i višeodnosa (WebQSP) QA kriterija.', 'da': 'Relationsdetektering er en kernekomponent i mange NLP-programmer, herunder Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). I denne artikel foreslår vi et hierarkisk tilbagevendende neuralt netværk forbedret af restlæring, som detekterer KB-relationer givet et input spørgsmål. Vores metode bruger dybe resterende bidirektionelle LSTMs til at sammenligne spørgsmål og relationsnavne via forskellige niveauer af abstraktion. Derudover foreslår vi et simpelt KBQA-system, der integrerer entity linking og vores foreslåede relationsdetektor for at få de to komponenter til at forbedre hinanden. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang ikke kun opnår fremragende relationsdetektering ydeevne, men endnu vigtigere, det hjælper vores KBQA system med at opnå state-of-the-art nøjagtighed for både single-relations (SimpleQuestions) og multi-relations (WebQSP) QA benchmarks.', 'nl': 'Relatiedetectie is een kernonderdeel van veel NLP-toepassingen, waaronder Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). In dit artikel stellen we een hiërarchisch terugkerend neuraal netwerk voor, versterkt door residueel leren, dat KB relaties detecteert bij een invoervraag. Onze methode maakt gebruik van diepe residuele bidirectionele LSTMs om vragen en relatienamen te vergelijken via verschillende abstractieniveaus. Daarnaast stellen we een eenvoudig KBQA-systeem voor dat entiteitskoppeling en onze voorgestelde relatiedetector integreert om de twee componenten elkaar te laten verbeteren. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak niet alleen uitstekende relatiedetectieprestaties behaalt, maar vooral ons KBQA-systeem helpt om state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid te bereiken voor zowel single-relation (SimpleQuestions) als multi-relation (WebQSP) QA benchmarks.', 'id': 'Deteksi hubungan adalah komponen utama dari banyak aplikasi NLP termasuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan (KBQA). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan saraf yang berkurang hierarkis yang diperbaiki oleh belajar sisa yang mendeteksi hubungan KB diberikan pertanyaan input. Metode kami menggunakan LSTM bidireksi yang tersisa dalam untuk membandingkan pertanyaan dan nama hubungan melalui tingkat abstraksi yang berbeda. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan sistem KBQA sederhana yang mengintegrasi entitas yang menghubungkan dan detektor hubungan kami yang diusulkan untuk membuat dua komponen meningkatkan satu sama lain. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita tidak hanya mencapai prestasi deteksi hubungan yang luar biasa, tetapi yang lebih penting, itu membantu sistem KBQA kita mencapai akurasi state-of-the-art untuk kedua-dua tanda QA hubungan tunggal (SimpleQuestions) dan multi-relation (WebQSP).', 'de': 'Die Beziehungserkennung ist eine Kernkomponente vieler NLP-Anwendungen, einschließlich der Wissensdatenbank-Fragebeantworterung (KBQA). In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein hierarchisches rezidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk vor, das durch Residual Learning erweitert wird, das KB-Beziehungen bei einer Eingabefrage detektiert. Unsere Methode verwendet tiefe residuale bidirektionale LSTMs, um Fragen und Beziehungsnamen über verschiedene Abstraktionsebenen zu vergleichen. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir ein einfaches KBQA-System vor, das Entitätenverknüpfung und unseren vorgeschlagenen Beziehungsdetektor integriert, um die beiden Komponenten gegenseitig zu verbessern. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz nicht nur eine herausragende Beziehungserkennung erreicht, sondern vor allem unserem KBQA-System hilft, sowohl für Single-Relations (SimpleQuestions) als auch Multi-Relations (WebQSP) QA-Benchmarks auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik zu erreichen.', 'fa': 'شناسایی رابطه یک بخش اصلی از کاربردهای NLP است که شامل پاسخ سوال بنیاد علم (KBQA). در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با یادگیری باقی مانده\u200cای بیشتر شده است که رابطه\u200cهای KB را شناسایی می\u200cکند که سوال ورودی داده شده است. روش ما از LSTMs\u200cهای دوره\u200cای عمیق استفاده می\u200cکند تا سوال\u200cها و نام\u200cهای ارتباط را با سطح\u200cهای متفاوت از استفاده کند. به اضافه، ما یک سیستم KBQA ساده پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با ارتباط ارتباط و کارآگاه ارتباط پیشنهاد\u200cمون برای اینکه دو بخش\u200cها یکدیگر را بهتر کند. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که دستور ما نه تنها اجرای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای زیادی را می\u200cرساند، بلکه مهمتر تر، این به سیستم KBQA ما کمک می\u200cکند که دقیق وضعیت هنری را برای یک رابطه (ساده\u200cسوال) و یک رابطه\u200cهای زیادی (WebQSP) QA بررسی کند.', 'ko': '관계식은 Knowledgebase Q&amp;A(KBQA)를 비롯한 많은 NLP 애플리케이션의 핵심 구성 요소입니다.본고에서 우리는 잔차 학습을 통해 강화된 층별 귀속 신경 네트워크를 제시했는데 이것은 입력 문제에 대한 지식 라이브러리 관계를 측정할 수 있다.우리의 방법은 깊이가 남은 양방향 LSTM을 사용하여 서로 다른 추상적인 단계를 통해 문제와 관계 이름을 비교한다.그 밖에 우리는 간단한 KBQA 시스템을 제시했는데 이 시스템은 실체 링크와 우리가 제시한 관계 검측기를 통합시켜 이 두 구성 요소가 서로 강화되도록 한다.우리의 실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 뛰어난 관계 검측 성능을 실현할 뿐만 아니라, 더욱 중요한 것은 우리의 KBQA 시스템이 단관계(Simple Questions)와 다중관계(WebQSP) QA 기준의 최신 정밀도를 실현하도록 도와준다는 것이다.', 'sw': 'Kugundua uhusiano ni sehemu muhimu ya matumizi mengi ya NLP ikiwa ni pamoja na jibu la swali la Msingi wa Elimu (KBQA). Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtandao wa neura unaoendelea upya unaoendelea na kujifunza kwa msimamo ambao unagundua mahusiano ya KB iliyotolewa na swali la input. Utawala wetu unatumia vizuri vya LSTMs wakilinganisha maswali na majina ya mahusiano kupitia ngazi tofauti za kujitenga. Kwa kuongezea, tunapendekeza mfumo rahisi wa KBQA ambao unaunganisha entity pamoja na mtazamaji wetu wa mahusiano ili kutengeneza vifaa viwili vinavyoonekana. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu siyo tu zinafanikiwa ufanisi mzuri wa kutambua mahusiano, lakini ni muhimu zaidi, inasaidia mfumo wetu wa KBQA kufikia uhakika wa hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya moja kwa moja (Maswali ya Simu) na misingi mengi (WebQSP) ya QA.', 'af': "Relasie beskrywing is 'n korrekomponent van baie NLP toepassings insluitend kennis basis vraag antwoord (KQA). In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n hierarkies herhaalde neuralnetwerk wat verhoog word deur oorblyfstelike leer wat Kie verwante wat gegee is 'n invoer vraag. Ons metode gebruik diep oorblyfstandige bidireksjonale LSTMs om vrae en verwante name te vergelyk deur verskillende vlakke van abstraksie. In addition, we propose a simple KBQA system that integrates entity linking and our proposed relation detector to make the two components enhance each other. Ons eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons toegang nie alleen ondersteunde verwante verwanting beskrywing prestasie bereik nie, maar meer belangrik, dit help ons KQA stelsel bereik staat-of-die-kuns presies vir beide enkele verwanting (Eenvoudige Vrades) en multi-verwanting (WebQSP) QA benchmarke.", 'tr': 'Ilmi Basit soragy jogaplamak (KBQA) dahil edilen NLP programleriniň esasy komponenti. Bu kagyzda, KB ilişkilerini girdi soragy bilen tanyşdyran ýerleşdirilýän bir iýerarhiýa teklip edip teklip edýäris. Bizim yöntemimiz derin kalan iki düýbündeki LSTMsleri, soraglary we ilişkileri farklı derejeler içerisinde karşılaştırmak üçin ullanýar. Munuň üstine, bir KBQA sistemini bir zat baglaýyşlygyny we golaýlaýyşymyz detektoryny bir-birini bejermek üçin ýeňil bir KBQA sistemini teklip edýäris. Biziň experimental netijelerimiz diňe çykan baglaýyşyň tapylygyny başarmaýandygyny görkezýär, ýöne wajyp bolsa, bu biziň KBQA sistemimiziň hem ýeke-baglaýyşyň (basit soraglary) hem birnäçe-baglaýyşyň (WebQSP) QA sebäpli derejesini çykarmagyna kömek edýär.', 'am': 'የውይይት መሳሪያ ጥያቄ (KBQA) ውስጥ ብዙዎች የNLP ፕሮግራሞች አካባቢ ክፍል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የKB ግንኙነት ጥያቄ ጥያቄን በሚያሳየው የጥያቄ ትምህርት የተደገመ የኔርያዊ መረብ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጥያቄዎችን እና ግንኙነትን በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ አካባቢ እና የግንኙነትን ስም ለማስተካከል ጥልቅ የቀረበ LSTMs ይጠቅማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አካባቢውን ማጠቃቀሚያ እና የተዘጋጀውን ግንኙነት አካባቢ እና ሁለቱን ሰንቨሮች እርስ በርሳቸው እንዲያበዛ ቀላል KBQA ሲስተካከል እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማግኘት ብቻ አይደለም፣ ነገር ግን አብልጦ የበለጠ ነው፣ የKBQA ስርዓታችንን የአንድ ግንኙነት (ቀላል ጥያቄዎች) እና ብዙ ግንኙነት (WebQSP) የQA benchmark ማግኘት ይረዳል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաբերությունների հայտնաբերումը բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ ծրագրերի հիմնական բաղադրիչն է, ներառյալ գիտելիքի հիմնական հարցերի պատասխանը (KQA). Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հիերարխիկ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց, որը բարելավվում է մնացած ուսումնասիրությամբ, որը հայտնաբերում է ԿԲ հարաբերությունները, որոնք տվյալ հարց են տալիս: Մեր մեթոդը օգտագործում է խորը երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT-ներ հարցերի և հարաբերությունների անունների համեմատելու համար վերացման տարբեր մակարդակների միջոցով: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ ԿԲՔԱ համակարգ, որը ինտեգրում է միավորների կապը և մեր առաջարկված հարաբերությունների դետեկտորը, որպեսզի երկու բաղադրիչները իրար բարելավեն: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը ոչ միայն հասնում է հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման զարմանահրաշ արդյունքներին, այլ նաև ավելի կարևոր է, այն օգնում է մեր ԿԲՔԱ համակարգին հասնել ամենաբարձր ճշգրտությունը միակ հարաբերությունների (Պարզագույն հարցեր) և բազմահարաբերությունների (ՎեբՔՍP', 'sq': "Zbulimi i marrëdhënieve është një komponent thelbësor i shumë aplikacioneve NLP duke përfshirë përgjigjet e pyetjeve të bazës së njohurive (KBQA). Në këtë letër, propozojmë një rrjet hierarkik neural të përsëritur të përmirësuar nga mësimi i mbetur që zbulon marrëdhëniet KB duke dhënë një pyetje të hyrjes. Metoda jonë përdor LSTM të thella dy drejtuese për të krahasuar pyetjet dhe emrat e lidhjeve nëpërmjet niveleve të ndryshme abstrakte. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një sistem të thjeshtë KBQA që integron lidhjen e njësisë dhe detektorin tonë të propozuar të marrëdhënieve për t'i bërë të dy komponentet të përmirësohen njëri-tjetrit. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë jo vetëm arrin performancë të jashtëzakonshme të zbulimit të marrëdhënieve, por edhe më e rëndësishme, ajo ndihmon sistemin tonë KBQA të arrijë saktësinë më të lartë për pikëpamjet QA të njëjtës-marrëdhënie (Pyetje të thjeshta) dhe shumë-marrëdhënie (WebQSP).", 'az': "İlişkil tanıdırması Bilim Basi sual cevapı (KBQA) dahil olan çox NLP proqramların ilk komponenti. Bu kağızda, KB ilişkilerini girdi sualına verilən hiyerarşik yenidən tekrarlı nöral a ğ təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz çətinliklə qalan LSTMs'ləri müxtəlif səviyyələr istifadə etmək üçün sualları və ilişkilərin adlarını ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edir. Əvvəlcə, birbirimizi birləşdirmək üçün sadəcə KBQA sistemini təklif edirik və təklif etdiyimiz bağlantı detektörü ilə iki komponenti birbirimizi daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız ancaq müxtəlif əlaqələr keşfetməsi performansını başa çatdırır, amma daha önemlidir ki, bu, KBQA sistemimizin yalnız əlaqələr və çoxlu əlaqələr QA benchmarklərinin eyni təcrübəsini başa çatdırmağa kömək edir.", 'cs': 'Detekce vztahů je základní součástí mnoha aplikací NLP, včetně odpovědi na otázky znalostní báze (KBQA). V tomto článku navrhujeme hierarchickou recidivující neuronovou síť rozšířenou reziduálním učením, které detekuje vztahy KB při vstupní otázce. Naše metoda používá hluboké reziduální obousměrné LSTMy k porovnání otázek a názvů vztahů prostřednictvím různých úrovní abstrakce. Navíc navrhujeme jednoduchý systém KBQA, který integruje propojení entit a náš navržený detektor vztahů, aby se obě komponenty navzájem zlepšily. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup nejen dosahuje vynikajícího výkonu detekce vztahů, ale co je důležitější, pomáhá našemu systému KBQA dosáhnout nejmodernější přesnosti jak pro jednoduché (SimpleQuestions) tak pro více vztahů (WebQSP).', 'bn': 'Relation detection is a core component of many NLP applications including Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA).  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বাকি শিক্ষা দ্বারা বাড়িয়ে যাওয়া নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক যা কেবি সম্পর্কের একটি ইনপুট প্রশ্ন দিয়েছে। আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ের মাধ্যমে প্রশ্ন এবং সম্পর্কের নামের তুলনা করার জন্য গভীর বাকী বিদ্যমান এলস্টিএমস ব্ তাছাড়াও, আমরা একটি সহজ কেবিকিউএ সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি যা বস্তুকে যুক্ত করে এবং আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত সম্পর্ক ডিটেক্টর একে অপরকে বাড়িয়ে দেয়া আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা শুধুমাত্র অসাধারণ সম্পর্ক সন্ধানের কার্যক্রম অর্জন করে না, কিন্তু আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, এটা আমাদের কেবিকিউএ সিস্টেম একাত্মতা সম্পর্ক', 'et': 'Seoste tuvastamine on paljude NLP rakenduste, sealhulgas teabebaasi küsimustele vastamise (KBQA) põhikomponent. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hierarhilise korduva närvivõrgu, mida täiustab jääkõpe, mis tuvastab KB suhted sisendküsimuse korral. Meie meetod kasutab sügavaid kahesuunalisi LSTMsid küsimuste ja seoste nimede võrdlemiseks erinevate abstraktsiooni tasandite kaudu. Lisaks pakume välja lihtsa KBQA süsteemi, mis ühendab olemite sidumise ja meie kavandatud seosdetektori, et kaks komponenti üksteist täiustaksid. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis ei saavuta mitte ainult silmapaistvat seoste tuvastamise jõudlust, vaid mis veelgi tähtsam, aitab see meie KBQA süsteemil saavutada tipptasemel täpsust nii ühe seose (SimpleQuestions) kui ka mitme seose (WebQSP) kvaliteedikontrolli võrdlusnäitajate puhul.', 'fi': 'Suhteiden tunnistus on keskeinen osa monia NLP-sovelluksia, kuten Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). Tässä työssä ehdotamme hierarkkista toistuvaa neuroverkkoa, jota tehostaa jäännösoppiminen, joka havaitsee KB-suhteet syötekysymyksen perusteella. Menetelmämme käyttää syvää jäännöstä kaksisuuntaista LSTM:tä kysymysten ja suhteiden nimien vertailuun eri abstraktiotasoilla. Lisäksi ehdotamme yksinkertaista KBQA-järjestelmää, joka integroi entiteettilinkityksen ja ehdotetun suhdeilmaisimen, jotta komponentit paranisivat toisiaan. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme ei ainoastaan saavuta erinomaista suhdetunnistusta, vaan mikä tärkeintä, se auttaa KBQA-järjestelmäämme saavuttamaan huipputason tarkkuuden sekä yhden suhteen (SimpleQuestions) että useamman suhteen (WebQSP) laadunvarmistuksen vertailuarvoissa.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje odnosa je osnovna komponenta mnogih NLP aplikacija uključujući odgovor na pitanja baze znanja (KBQA). U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhičku povratnu neuralnu mrežu unaprijeđenu ostatkom učenja koja otkriva KB odnose s obzirom na ulazno pitanje. Naša metoda koristi duboko ostatak bidirektivnih LSTMs kako bi usporedila pitanja i imena veza preko različitih nivoa apstraktacije. Osim toga, predlažemo jednostavan KBQA sistem koji integrira povezanje entiteta i naš predloženi detektor veza da se dva komponenta pojačaju jedni druge. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup ne samo postiže izvanrednu uspješnost otkrivanja odnosa, već važnije, pomaže našem KBQA sistemu da postigne tačnost stanja umjetnosti i jednostavnih odnosa (jednostavna pitanja) i višeodnosa (WebQSP) QA kriterija.', 'ca': "La detecció de les relacions és un component central de moltes aplicacions de NLP, incloent la resposta a preguntes basades en el coneixement (KBQA). In this paper, we propose a hierarchical recurrent neural network enhanced by residual learning which detects KB relations given an input question.  El nostre mètode utilitza LSTMs bidireccionals residuals profunds per comparar preguntes i noms de relació a través de diferents nivells d'abstracció. A més, proposem un sistema KBQA senzill que integri l'enllaç d'entitats i el nostre detector de relacions proposat per fer que els dos components s'milloren els uns als altres. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament no només aconsegueix un rendiment excepcional de detecció de relacions, sinó, més important, ajuda al nostre sistema KBQA a aconseguir la precisió més avançada tant per als punts de referència QA d'una sola relació (SimpleQuestions) com per a la multirelació (WebQSP).", 'ha': "Zaɓi da shirin Haƙĩƙa yana da kima cikin wasu shiryoyin NLP masu amfani da jibar da Jarrabi'in San'a (KBQA). Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata shirin neural wanda aka sake a karo na hierrrchical da aka ƙara da bakin da aka baka kara ta da tsarin da ke gane da danganta na KB da wani tambayi na shiga. @ info: tooltip Ina ƙaranci, za mu buɗa wata na'ura na KBQA mai sauƙi wanda ke haɗa ma'anar gaskiyar da za'a sami da zane da wajen haɗi da mazaɓa da kwamfyutan da aka buƙata wa'urar da su dõmin ya ƙara ƙananan biyu. Matarinmu za'a nũna cẽwa hanyarmu bã zai iya sãmu mafiya kyakkyawan mazaɓa ba kawai, kuma amma yana da muhimu, sai yana taimako da tsarin KBQA ta sãmu halin-da-sanawa ga masu haɗi da sauri (masu sakan da suka yi daidai) da misalin mutane (WebQSP) QA.", 'sk': 'Zaznavanje relacij je osrednja sestavina številnih aplikacij NLP, vključno z odgovorom na vprašanja zbirke znanja (KBQA). V tem prispevku predlagamo hierarhično ponavljajoče se nevronsko omrežje, okrepljeno s preostalim učenjem, ki zazna odnose KB ob vhodnem vprašanju. Naša metoda uporablja globoke ostanke dvosmernih LSTMs za primerjavo vprašanj in imen relacij prek različnih stopenj abstrakcije. Poleg tega predlagamo preprost sistem KBQA, ki združuje povezovanje entitet in naš predlagani detektor relacij, da bi se obe komponenti med seboj izboljšali. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop ne dosega le izjemne zmogljivosti zaznavanja relacij, temveč kar je še pomembneje, pomaga našemu sistemu KBQA doseči najsodobnejšo natančnost za referenčne vrednosti kvalitete z enim relacijo (SimpleQuestions) in več relacijami (WebQSP).', 'he': 'זיהוי מערכות יחסים הוא חלק מרכזי של שימושים רבים של NLP כולל תשובות על שאלות בסיסית ידע (KBQA). בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים רשת עצבית היררכית חוזרת ששותפת על ידי לימוד שאריות שמגלה מערכות יחסים KB נתנה שאלה כניסה. השיטה שלנו משתמשת בשאריות LSTM עמוקות שתי כיוונים לשוות שאלות ושמות מערכת יחסים דרך רמות שונות של אסטראקציה. Additionally, we propose a simple KBQA system that integrates entity linking and our proposed relation detector to make the two components enhance each other.  התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שהגישה שלנו לא רק משיגה ביצועי זיהוי יחסים יוצאים מן הכלל, אלא וחשוב יותר, היא עוזרת למערכת KBQA שלנו להשיג מדויקת חד-אומנות עבור נקודות יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים רבים (WebQSP).', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Nang pemilih iki, kita mulalah sistem menehi perusahaan Neralah sing luwih basa gambar nggawe barang urip bantuan sing isingan kB kebuturan isakno sing bisa input sakjane Perintah dhéwé éntuk sistem dhéwé durung urip tarjamahan kanggo nggawe gerakan gambaran lan nggawe barang urip kuwi wis dipunangé. Mungkin, awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem "K-KiB" sing beraksi karo sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan karo awak dhéwé nggawe barang-perusahaan tanggal sampeyan iki komparasi sing beraksi. Rejalaké awake sing paling-perintasi punika mlebu nang dianggap dhéwé ora ono nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo mbang nggawe gerakan, njuk ngomong susahé awake sistem dhéwé kêb-teka sing bisalakno perusahaan-perusahaan (Simplequestion) lan uga-perusahaan (webqP) XA.', 'bo': 'Relation detection is a core component of many NLP applications including Knowledge Base Question Answering (KBQA). ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་KB་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་དང་། Our method uses deep residual bidirectional LSTMs to compare questions and relation names via different levels of abstraction. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབང་ཆ་མཐུད་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་རྟོགས་པ་གཉིས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་སྐབས་སླ་བས ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལས་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་རྟོགས་པ་ལས་འཕགས་དགོས་མེད་པར། དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་KBQA་མ་ལག་གི་དུས་ཡུན་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་འབ'}
{'en': 'Deep Keyphrase Generation', 'es': 'Generación profunda de palabras clave', 'ar': 'جيل عميق Keyphrase', 'pt': 'Geração de frase-chave profunda', 'fr': 'Génération approfondie de phrases clés', 'zh': '深要短语成', 'ja': 'ディープキーフレーズ生成', 'hi': 'गहरी Keyphrase पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Глубокая генерация ключевых фраз', 'ga': 'Giniúint Deep Keyphrase', 'ka': 'გასაღების გასაღების შექმნა', 'el': 'Δημιουργία βαθιάς φράσης κλειδιού', 'hu': 'Mély kulcskifejezések generálása', 'it': 'Generazione di frasi chiave profonde', 'kk': 'Қалың кілттің сөздерін құру', 'lt': 'Gilių raktų frazių generavimas', 'mk': 'Deep Keyphrase Generation', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Frasa Kekunci Dalam', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത്', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni profonda ta’ frażi ewlenija', 'mn': 'Гүн түлхүүр өгүүлбэр үүсгэх', 'no': 'Generering av dypt nøkkelfrasar', 'pl': 'Głębokie generowanie fraz kluczowych', 'sr': 'Generacija ključne fraze', 'ro': 'Generare profundă de fraze cheie', 'si': 'ගොඩක් යතුරු ප්\u200dරකාශ සිද්ධානය', 'so': 'Generation of luqada hoose', 'sv': 'Generation av djupa nyckelfraser', 'ta': 'ஆழமான விசைப்பலகை உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'عمیق کیفریز پیدائش', 'uz': 'Maxfiy soĘ»z yaratish', 'vi': 'Tạo từ khoá sâu', 'bg': 'Дълбоко генериране на ключови фрази', 'da': 'Generation af dybe nøglesætninger', 'nl': 'Diepe sleutelzin genereren', 'de': 'Deep Keyphrase Generierung', 'id': 'Generasi Frasa Kunci Dalam', 'ko': '심층 키워드 생성', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji', 'tr': 'Gaýd Ullançy fraým', 'af': 'Deep sleutelfrase Genereer', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i frazës kyçe të thella', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hr': 'Generacija ključne fraze', 'hy': 'Գործել խորը ստեղծագործական արտահայտություն', 'az': 'Q캼sqa n칬qt톛si M톛xluqat캼', 'bn': 'গভীর কীবোর্ড উৎপাদন', 'bs': 'Generacija ključne fraze', 'ca': 'Deep Keyphrase Generation', 'fa': 'تولید کلید عمیق', 'et': 'Sügava klahvifraasi genereerimine', 'cs': 'Hluboké generování klíčových frází', 'fi': 'Syvän avainlauseen luominen', 'jv': 'Generation', 'he': 'יצירת משפט מפתח עמוק', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje globokih ključnih fraz', 'bo': 'སྒོ་གཙོ་ཚིག་འདི་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Keyphrase provides highly-summative information that can be effectively used for understanding, organizing and retrieving text content. Though previous studies have provided many workable solutions for automated keyphrase extraction, they commonly divided the to-be-summarized content into multiple text chunks, then ranked and selected the most meaningful ones. These approaches could neither identify keyphrases that do not appear in the text, nor capture the real semantic meaning behind the text. We propose a generative model for keyphrase prediction with an encoder-decoder framework, which can effectively overcome the above drawbacks. We name it as deep keyphrase generation since it attempts to capture the deep semantic meaning of the content with a deep learning method. Empirical analysis on six datasets demonstrates that our proposed model not only achieves a significant performance boost on extracting keyphrases that appear in the source text, but also can generate absent keyphrases based on the semantic meaning of the text. Code and dataset are available at.deep keyphrase generation since it\n      attempts to capture the deep semantic meaning of the content with a deep\n      learning method. Empirical analysis on six datasets demonstrates that our\n      proposed model not only achieves a significant performance boost on\n      extracting keyphrases that appear in the source text, but also can\n      generate absent keyphrases based on the semantic meaning of the text. Code\n      and dataset are available at https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase.\n    ', 'ar': 'توفر Keyphrase معلومات تلخيصية للغاية يمكن استخدامها بشكل فعال لفهم محتوى النص وتنظيمه واسترجاعه. على الرغم من أن الدراسات السابقة قدمت العديد من الحلول العملية لاستخراج العبارة الرئيسية تلقائيًا ، إلا أنها قسمت المحتوى الذي سيتم تلخيصه إلى أجزاء نصية متعددة ، ثم صنفت واخترت أكثرها أهمية. لا يمكن لهذه الأساليب تحديد العبارات الرئيسية التي لا تظهر في النص ، ولا التقاط المعنى الدلالي الحقيقي وراء النص. نقترح نموذجًا توليديًا للتنبؤ بعبارة المفاتيح باستخدام إطار عمل لوحدة فك التشفير ، والذي يمكنه التغلب بشكل فعال على العيوب المذكورة أعلاه. نطلق عليه اسم إنشاء عبارة مفاتيح عميقة لأنه يحاول التقاط المعنى الدلالي العميق للمحتوى بطريقة تعلم عميقة. يوضح التحليل التجريبي على مجموعات البيانات الست أن نموذجنا المقترح لا يحقق فقط زيادة كبيرة في الأداء في استخراج العبارات الرئيسية التي تظهر في النص المصدر ، ولكن يمكنه أيضًا إنشاء جمل مفاتيح غائبة بناءً على المعنى الدلالي للنص. يتوفر الرمز ومجموعة البيانات على <https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>.', 'pt': 'A frase-chave fornece informações altamente somativas que podem ser usadas efetivamente para entender, organizar e recuperar conteúdo de texto. Embora estudos anteriores tenham fornecido muitas soluções viáveis para extração automatizada de frases-chave, eles geralmente dividiam o conteúdo a ser resumido em vários blocos de texto e, em seguida, classificavam e selecionavam os mais significativos. Essas abordagens não conseguiram identificar frases-chave que não aparecem no texto, nem capturar o real significado semântico por trás do texto. Propomos um modelo generativo para previsão de frase-chave com uma estrutura codificador-decodificador, que pode efetivamente superar as desvantagens acima. Chamamos isso de geração de frase-chave profunda, pois tenta capturar o significado semântico profundo do conteúdo com um método de aprendizado profundo. A análise empírica em seis conjuntos de dados demonstra que nosso modelo proposto não apenas alcança um aumento significativo de desempenho na extração de frases-chave que aparecem no texto de origem, mas também pode gerar frases-chave ausentes com base no significado semântico do texto. O código e o conjunto de dados estão disponíveis em <https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>.', 'es': 'Keyphrase proporciona información altamente sumativa que se puede utilizar eficazmente para comprender, organizar y recuperar el contenido del texto. Aunque estudios anteriores han proporcionado muchas soluciones viables para la extracción automatizada de frases clave, normalmente dividen el contenido que se va a resumir en varios fragmentos de texto, y luego clasifican y seleccionan los más significativos. Estos enfoques no podían identificar frases clave que no aparecen en el texto ni captar el verdadero significado semántico detrás del texto. Proponemos un modelo generativo para la predicción de frases clave con un marco de codificador-decodificador, que puede superar eficazmente los inconvenientes anteriores. La llamamos generación profunda de frases clave, ya que intenta capturar el significado semántico profundo del contenido con un método de aprendizaje profundo. El análisis empírico de seis conjuntos de datos demuestra que nuestro modelo propuesto no solo logra un aumento significativo del rendimiento en la extracción de frases clave que aparecen en el texto de origen, sino que también puede generar frases clave ausentes en función del significado semántico del texto. El código y el conjunto de datos están disponibles en < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'fr': "Keyphrase fournit des informations hautement sommatives qui peuvent être utilisées efficacement pour comprendre, organiser et récupérer du contenu textuel. Bien que des études précédentes aient fourni de nombreuses solutions pratiques pour l'extraction automatisée de phrases clés, elles divisaient généralement le contenu à résumer en plusieurs blocs de texte, puis classaient et sélectionnaient les plus significatifs. Ces approches ne pouvaient ni identifier des phrases clés qui n'apparaissent pas dans le texte, ni saisir la véritable signification sémantique du texte. Nous proposons un modèle génératif pour la prédiction de phrases clés avec une structure encodeur-décodeur, qui peut surmonter efficacement les inconvénients ci-dessus. Nous l'appelons génération de phrases clés profondes car elle tente de saisir la signification sémantique profonde du contenu avec une méthode d'apprentissage en profondeur. L'analyse empirique de six ensembles de données démontre que le modèle que nous proposons permet non seulement d'améliorer considérablement les performances d'extraction des phrases clés qui apparaissent dans le texte source, mais qu'il peut également générer des phrases clés absentes en fonction de la signification sémantique du texte. Le code et l'ensemble de données sont disponibles sur < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.", 'zh': '要短语高概括性信息,可以解检文本。 虽前所研究密钥短语多取可行之解决方案,然率分待总结为数本,然后排名选择之最义者。 此既不能识文本之未见,亦不能得文本之真义。 吾举编码器-解码器框架生成式密钥短语占之,有效而胜之。 命之曰深度键短语生,试图用深学之深层语义也。 6数集之实证分析表明,非止取源文本之键短语,显而升之,盖文本之语义成缺失之机也。 代码数集可在<https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>。', 'ja': 'キーフレーズは、テキストコンテンツを理解、整理、取得するために効果的に使用できる高度に要約された情報を提供します。 以前の研究では、自動キーフレーズ抽出のための多くの実行可能なソリューションが提供されていましたが、一般的には、要約されるコンテンツを複数のテキストチャンクに分割し、最も有意義なものをランク付けして選択しました。 これらのアプローチは、テキストに現れないキーフレーズを識別することも、テキストの背後にある本当の意味を捉えることもできなかった。 上記の欠点を効果的に克服できる、エンコーダデコーダフレームワークを備えたキーフレーズ予測のための生成モデルを提案します。 ディープラーニング法でコンテンツの深い意味を捉えようとするので、ディープキーフレーズ生成と名付けます。 6つのデータセットに関する実証的な分析は、提案されたモデルがソーステキストに表示されるキーフレーズを抽出する際にパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させるだけでなく、テキストの意味に基づいて不在のキーフレーズを生成することができることを示しています。 コードとデータセットは、で入手でき<https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>ます。', 'hi': 'Keyphrase अत्यधिक-योगात्मक जानकारी प्रदान करता है जिसका उपयोग पाठ सामग्री को समझने, व्यवस्थित करने और पुनर्प्राप्त करने के लिए प्रभावी ढंग से किया जा सकता है। हालांकि पिछले अध्ययनों ने स्वचालित कीफ्रेज़ निष्कर्षण के लिए कई व्यावहारिक समाधान प्रदान किए हैं, उन्होंने आमतौर पर टू-बी-सारांशित सामग्री को कई टेक्स्ट चंक्स में विभाजित किया है, फिर सबसे सार्थक लोगों को रैंक और चुना है। ये दृष्टिकोण न तो पाठ में दिखाई देने वाले कीफ़्रेज़ की पहचान कर सकते हैं, न ही पाठ के पीछे वास्तविक शब्दार्थ अर्थ को कैप्चर कर सकते हैं। हम एक एनकोडर-डिकोडर फ्रेमवर्क के साथ कीफ्रेज भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक उत्पादक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो उपरोक्त कमियों को प्रभावी ढंग से दूर कर सकता है। हम इसे गहरी कीफ्रेज़ पीढ़ी के रूप में नाम देते हैं क्योंकि यह एक गहरी सीखने की विधि के साथ सामग्री के गहरे शब्दार्थ अर्थ पर कब्जा करने का प्रयास करता है। छह डेटासेट पर अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण दर्शाता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल न केवल स्रोत पाठ में दिखाई देने वाले कीफ्रेज़ को निकालने पर एक महत्वपूर्ण प्रदर्शन बढ़ावा प्राप्त करता है, बल्कि पाठ के शब्दार्थ अर्थ के आधार पर अनुपस्थित कीफ्रेज़ भी उत्पन्न कर सकता है। कोड और डेटासेट <https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase> पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Ключевая фраза предоставляет высокорезультативную информацию, которая может быть эффективно использована для понимания, организации и извлечения текстового контента. Хотя предыдущие исследования предоставили много работоспособных решений для автоматического извлечения ключевых фраз, они, как правило, разделили подлежащий суммированию контент на несколько текстовых кусков, а затем ранжировали и выбирали наиболее значимые. Эти подходы не смогли ни выявить ключевые фразы, которые не встречаются в тексте, ни запечатлеть реальное семантическое значение, лежащее в основе текста. Предложена генеративная модель для прогнозирования ключевых фраз с каркасом кодер-декодер, которая может эффективно преодолеть вышеуказанные недостатки. Мы называем его генерацией глубоких ключевых фраз, так как он пытается захватить глубокий семантический смысл контента с помощью метода глубокого обучения. Эмпирический анализ шести наборов данных показывает, что предлагаемая нами модель не только достигает значительного повышения производительности при извлечении ключевых фраз, которые появляются в исходном тексте, но и может генерировать отсутствующие ключевые фразы на основе семантического значения текста. Код и набор данных доступны по адресу<https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>.', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn eochairfhrása faisnéis an-suimitheach ar féidir a úsáid go héifeachtach chun ábhar téacs a thuiscint, a eagrú agus a aisghabháil. Cé gur chuir staidéir roimhe seo go leor réitigh inoibrithe ar fáil maidir le heastóscadh uathoibrithe eochairfhrása, roinn siad go hiondúil an t-ábhar a bhí le hachoimriú ina shleachta téacs iolracha, ansin rangaithe agus roghnaigh siad na cinn is brí. Ní fhéadfadh na cineálacha cur chuige seo eochairfhrásaí nach bhfuil sa téacs a aithint, ná an bhrí shéimeantach cheart taobh thiar den téacs a ghabháil. Molaimid múnla giniúna do thuar eochairfhrása le creat ionchódóra-díchódóra, ar féidir leis na míbhuntáistí thuas a shárú go héifeachtach. Ainmnímid é mar ghiniúint eochairfhrása domhain toisc go ndéanann sé iarracht brí shéimeantach dhomhain an ábhair a ghabháil le modh foghlama domhain. Léiríonn anailís eimpíreach ar shé thacar sonraí go mbaineann ár múnla molta ní hamháin treisiú feidhmíochta suntasach ar bhaint na n-eochairfhrásaí atá sa bhuntéacs, ach gur féidir léi eochairfhrásaí neamhláithreacha a ghiniúint bunaithe ar bhrí shéimeantach an téacs. Tá cód agus tacar sonraí ar fáil ag <https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>.', 'hu': 'A kulcskifejezés rendkívül összefoglaló információkat nyújt, amelyek hatékonyan felhasználhatók a szövegtartalom megértéséhez, rendszerezéséhez és lekéréséhez. Bár a korábbi tanulmányok számos működőképes megoldást nyújtottak az automatizált kulcskifejezések kivonására, általában több szövegdarabra osztották az összefoglalandó tartalmat, majd rangsorolták és kiválasztották a legjelentősebbeket. Ezek a megközelítések nem tudták azonosítani azokat a kulcskifejezéseket, amelyek nem jelennek meg a szövegben, és nem tudták megragadni a szöveg mögötti valódi szemantikai jelentést. Javasolunk egy generációs modellt a kulcskifejezések előrejelzésére egy kódoló-dekóder keretrendszerrel, amely hatékonyan leküzdheti a fenti hátrányokat. Mély kulcsszavak generációjának nevezzük el, mivel a tartalom mély szemantikai jelentését egy mély tanulási módszerrel próbálja megragadni. Hat adatkészleten végzett empirikus elemzés azt mutatja, hogy javasolt modellünk nemcsak a forrásszövegben megjelenő kulcskifejezések kibontásában ér el jelentős teljesítményt, hanem a szöveg szemantikai jelentése alapján hiányzó kulcskifejezéseket is generálhat. A kód és az adatkészlet a <címen érhető el https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'el': 'Η φράση κλειδί παρέχει εξαιρετικά συνοπτικές πληροφορίες που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν αποτελεσματικά για την κατανόηση, την οργάνωση και την ανάκτηση περιεχομένου κειμένου. Αν και προηγούμενες μελέτες έχουν παράσχει πολλές λειτουργικές λύσεις για την αυτοματοποιημένη εξαγωγή φράσεων κλειδιού, συνήθως χώρισαν το προς σύνοψη περιεχόμενο σε πολλαπλά κομμάτια κειμένου, στη συνέχεια ταξινομήθηκαν και επέλεξαν τα πιο σημαντικά. Αυτές οι προσεγγίσεις δεν μπορούσαν ούτε να εντοπίσουν φράσεις κλειδιά που δεν εμφανίζονται στο κείμενο, ούτε να συλλάβουν την πραγματική σημασιολογική έννοια πίσω από το κείμενο. Προτείνουμε ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο πρόβλεψης φράσεων κλειδιού με ένα πλαίσιο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή, το οποίο μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να ξεπεράσει τα παραπάνω μειονεκτήματα. Το ονομάζουμε ως δημιουργία βαθιάς φράσης κλειδιού καθώς προσπαθεί να συλλάβει τη βαθιά σημασιολογική σημασία του περιεχομένου με μια μέθοδο βαθιάς μάθησης. Η εμπειρική ανάλυση σε έξι σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνει ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνει σημαντική αύξηση απόδοσης στην εξαγωγή φράσεων κλειδιά που εμφανίζονται στο αρχικό κείμενο, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να δημιουργήσει ελλείψεις φράσεων κλειδιά με βάση τη σημασιολογική σημασία του κειμένου. Ο κώδικας και το σύνολο δεδομένων είναι διαθέσιμοι στο < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ka': 'გასაღების ფრაზა ძალიან სუმიტიური ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება ეფექტიურად გამოყენება ტექსტის შემდგომარებისთვის, ორგანიზაციისთვის და და მაგრამ წინა კვლევები ავტომატიკური კლავიფრაზის ექსტრექციისთვის მუშაობელი გასაკეთებელი გასაკეთებელი გასაკეთებელი გასაკეთებელი მხოლოდ გაყოფილი მხოლოდ ტექსტის ფანჯრებში, შემდეგ და ეს დახმარება არ შეიძლება იდენტიფიკაცია კლავიფრაზები, რომლებიც ტექსტში არ ჩვენებენ, არა ტექსტში ჩვენებენ, არა ტექსტის შემდეგ რეალური სმენტიკური ნი ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ წარმოიდგინეთ კლავიფრაზის წარმოდგინების მოდელი, რომელიც შეიძლება ეფექტიურად გადავიწყვებოთ საზოგადოება. ჩვენ მისი სახელსაწყობოლო კლავიფრესის წარმოიქმნა, რადგან ის ცდილობა გადავიტანოთ მხოლოდ სიმენტიკური სიმანტიკური ნიშნავს სახელსაწყობოლო ს ექვსი მონაცემების ანალიზაციაში ჩვენი მოდელი არა მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანი გამოყენება კლავიფრაზების გამოყენებაში, რომლებიც წარმოიდგინენ ტექსტში, მაგრამ შეიძლება შექმნა არსებული კლავიფრაზები ტექსტი < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase - ეა.', 'kk': 'Кілттің сөз мәтіннің мазмұнын түсіндіру, реттеу және алу үшін қолданатын жоғары жұмыс мәліметін береді. Алдыңғы зерттеулері автоматты түрде кілттерді тарқату үшін көп жұмыс істей алатын шешімдерді бергенде, олар көпшілік мәтін бөлшектеріне бөліп, содан кейін ең маңызды мәтін бөлшектеріне реттеп,  Бұл жағдайлар мәтінде көрсетілмеген кілттерді анықтай алмайды, мәтіндің артындағы шын семантикалық мәліметін анықтай алмайды. Біз кілттің сөздерді бақылау үшін енгізу үлгісін қолданып, кодер- декодер қоршауымен қолданып, жоғардағы суреттерді көтеруге болады. Біз оны түсінікті кілттерді құру ретінде аталамыз, өйткені ол мазмұның терең семантикалық мазмұнын түсініктіру әдісімен түсініп көреді. Алты деректер қорларындағы империялық анализ келтірілген үлгіміздің тек көзінің мәтінде көрсетілген пернелерді тарқату үшін, бірақ мәтіндің semantic мазмұнына негізделген кездескен пернелерді жасай алады дегенді көрсетеді. Код мен деректер жинағы < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'it': "Keyphrase fornisce informazioni altamente riassuntive che possono essere utilizzate efficacemente per comprendere, organizzare e recuperare contenuti di testo. Sebbene studi precedenti abbiano fornito molte soluzioni praticabili per l'estrazione automatica delle keyphrase, comunemente hanno diviso il contenuto da riassumere in più blocchi di testo, quindi classificato e selezionato quelli più significativi. Questi approcci non hanno potuto identificare frasi chiave che non appaiono nel testo, né catturare il significato semantico reale dietro il testo. Proponiamo un modello generativo per la previsione delle keyphrase con un framework encoder-decoder, che può efficacemente superare gli inconvenienti di cui sopra. La chiamiamo generazione di keyphrase profonde poiché tenta di catturare il significato semantico profondo del contenuto con un metodo di deep learning. L'analisi empirica su sei set di dati dimostra che il nostro modello proposto non solo ottiene un significativo incremento delle prestazioni nell'estrazione delle frasi chiave che appaiono nel testo di origine, ma può anche generare frasi chiave assenti basate sul significato semantico del testo. Codice e set di dati sono disponibili su < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinėje frazėje pateikiama labai apibendrinta informacija, kuri gali būti veiksmingai naudojama teksto turiniui suprasti, organizuoti ir gauti. Nors ankstesniuose tyrimuose buvo pateikta daug tinkamų sprendimų automatizuotai raktų frazės išgavimui, jie paprastai padalijo apibendrintą turinį į kelis teksto gabalus, tada suskirstyti ir pasirinkti svarbiausius. Šie metodai negalėjo nei nustatyti tekste nenurodytų pagrindinių frazių, nei sugalvoti tikros semantinės reikšmės už teksto. Siūlome generacinį pagrindinių frazių prognozavimo model į su kodavimo kodavimo sistema, kuri veiksmingai padėtų pašalinti pirmiau nurodytus trūkumus. Mes ją vadiname giliąja frazės karta, nes ji bando įgyti gilią semantinę turinio reikšmę taikant gilaus mokymosi metodą. Empirinė šešių duomenų rinkinių analizė rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis ne tik pasiekia reikšmingą efektyvumo didinimą ištraukiant pagrindines frazes, kurios pateikiamos pradiniame tekste, bet ir gali sukelti trūkstamas pagrindines frazes, pagrįstas semantine teksto prasme. Kodas ir duomenų rinkinys pateikiami < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ms': 'Keyphrase provides highly-summative information that can be effectively used for understanding, organizing and retrieving text content.  Walaupun kajian terdahulu telah menyediakan banyak penyelesaian yang boleh dilakukan untuk pengekstrakan frasa kunci automatik, mereka biasanya membahagi kandungan yang akan dikira-ringkasan kepada potongan teks berbilang, kemudian ditangkap dan memilih yang paling bermakna. pendekatan ini tidak dapat mengenalpasti frasa kunci yang tidak muncul dalam teks, atau menangkap makna semantik sebenar di belakang teks. Kami cadangkan model generatif untuk ramalan frasa kunci dengan kerangka pengekod-pengekod, yang dapat mengatasi kelemahan di atas. Kami menyebutnya sebagai generasi frasa kunci dalam kerana ia cuba untuk menangkap makna semantik dalam kandungan dengan kaedah belajar dalam. Analisis empirik pada enam set data menunjukkan bahawa model kami diusulkan tidak hanya mencapai meningkatkan prestasi yang signifikan pada mengekstrak frasa kunci yang muncul dalam teks sumber, tetapi juga boleh menghasilkan frasa kunci hilang berdasarkan makna semantik teks. Kod dan set data tersedia di < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്, വിവേകത്തിന്, സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുകയും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുകയും ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ ഉപയ മുമ്പുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ സ്വയം കീവോര്\u200dട്ട്രേഷന്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരുപാട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കാവുന്ന പരിഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയിട് പദാവലിയില്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനോ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം പിടിക്കാനോ ഈ അടുത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പിന്നില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. നമ്മള്\u200d അതിനെ ആഴമുള്ള കീവ്രേഷന്\u200d തലമുറയാക്കി പേരിടുന്നു. അത് ആഴമുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള അർഥം പ Empirical analysis on six datasets demonstrates that our proposed model not only achieves a significant performance boost on extracting keyphrases that appear in the source text, but also can generate absent keyphrases based on the semantic meaning of the text.  < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'mt': 'Il-frażi ewlenija tipprovdi informazzjoni sommarja ħafna li tista’ tintuża b’mod effettiv għall-fehim, l-organizzazzjoni u l-kisba tal-kontenut tat-test. Għalkemm studji preċedenti pprovdew ħafna soluzzjonijiet li jistgħu jitħaddmu għall-estrazzjoni awtomatizzata tal-frażi ewlenija, dawn ġeneralment qasmu l-kontenut li jrid jiġi sommarjat f’biċċiet ta’ testi multipli, imbagħad ikklassifikati u għażlu dawk l-aktar sinifikanti. Dawn l-approċċi la jistgħu jidentifikaw frażijiet ewlenin li ma jidhrux fit-test, u lanqas ma jaqbdu t-tifsira semantika reali wara t-test. Aħna nipproponu mudell ġenerattiv għat-tbassir tal-frażi ewlenija b’qafas ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder, li jista’ effettivament jegħleb l-iżvantaġġi ta’ hawn fuq. Aħna nagħtuha l-isem ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ frażi ewlenija profonda peress li tipprova taqbad it-tifsira semantika profonda tal-kontenut b’metodu ta’ tagħlim profond. Analiżi empirika fuq sitt settijiet ta’ dejta turi li l-mudell propost tagħna mhux biss jikseb spinta sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni fl-estrazzjoni tal-frażijiet ewlenin li jidhru fit-test tas-sors, iżda jista’ jiġġenera wkoll frażijiet ewlenin assenti bbażati fuq it-tifsira semantika tat-test. Il-kodiċi u s-sett tad-dejta huma disponibbli fuq < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'no': 'Nøkkelfrase gjev høg summativ informasjon som kan brukast til å forstå, organisera og henta tekstinnhald. Selv om tidlegare studier har tilgjengelege mange arbeidsbare løysing for automatisk utpakking av nøkkelfrasar, deler dei vanlegvis innhaldet som skal vera samansert til fleire tekstpunkt, så rankert og vald dei mest meningste. Desse tilnærmingane kunne ikkje berre identifisera nøkkelfrasar som ikkje dukkar opp i teksten, eller ta opp den verkelege semantiske betydninga bak teksten. Vi foreslår ein generelt modell for forhåndsvising av nøkkelfrasar med eit koder- dekoderrammeverk, som kan overføra dei øvste teikningane. Vi namnar det som dyppa nøkkelfrasar sidan han prøver å henta den dyppa semantiske meningen til innhaldet med ein dyppa læringsmetode. Empirical analysis on six datasets demonstrates that our proposed model not only achieves a significant performance boost on extracting keyphrases that appear in the source text, but also can create absent keyphrases based on the semantic meaning of the text. Kode og datasett er tilgjengeleg på < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'mk': 'Клучната фраза обезбедува високо сумативни информации кои можат ефикасно да се користат за разбирање, организација и преземање на текстова содржина. Иако претходните студии обезбедија многу успешни решенија за автоматизирано извлекување на клучната фраза, тие често ја поделија содржината која ќе биде резултирана во повеќе делови од текстот, потоа ги рангираа и ги избраа најзначајните. Овие пристапи не можеа ниту да ги идентификуваат клучните фрази кои не се појавуваат во текстот, ниту да го фатат вистинското семантично значење зад текстот. Предложуваме генеративен модел за предвидување на клучната фраза со рамка за кодер-декодер, која може ефикасно да ги надмине наведените недостатоци. Ја нарекуваме генерација на длабоки клучни фрази бидејќи се обидува да го фати длабокото семантично значење на содржината со метод на длабоко учење. Империската анализа на шест датотеки покажува дека нашиот предложен модел не само што постигнува значителен поттик на резултатите на извлекувањето на клучните фрази кои се појавуваат во изворот, туку и може да генерира отсутни клучни фрази базирани на семантичното значење на текстот. Код и датотеки се достапни на < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'mn': 'Текст бүхнийг ойлгох, зохион байгуулах, авах үед ашиглаж болох маш их дээд хэмжээний мэдээлэл гаргадаг. Өмнөх судалгаанууд автоматжуулсан түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг автоматжуулах боломжтой олон шийдэлүүд өгсөн ч, ихэвчлэн хэдэн текст хэсэгт хувааж, дараа нь хамгийн чухал зүйлсийг сонгосон. Эдгээр арга барилгууд текст дээр харагдахгүй түлхүүр үгийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй, мөн текстийн ард жинхэнэ semantic утгыг ойлгохгүй. Бид түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийн таамаглалтын төлөвлөлтийн загварыг коддогч-декодер хэлбэрээр гаргаж чадна. Энэ нь дээрх зурагтаа эерэг үзүүлж чадна. Бид үүнийг гүн гүнзгий хэлбэрээр нэрлэдэг. Яагаад гэвэл үүнийг гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга замаар бий болгох гэсэн үг. 6 өгөгдлийн сангийн эзэмшил шинжилгээ нь бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь зөвхөн эх үүсвэрийн текст дээр харагдаж буй түлхүүр үгийг авах үед чухал үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Код болон өгөгдлийн сангууд < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'pl': 'Fraza kluczowa zapewnia wysoce sumatywne informacje, które mogą być skutecznie wykorzystywane do zrozumienia, organizowania i pobierania treści tekstowych. Chociaż poprzednie badania dostarczyły wielu sprawnych rozwiązań do automatycznej ekstrakcji fraz kluczowych, zwykle podzielono treść, która ma być podsumowana na wiele fragmentów tekstu, a następnie rankingowały i wybrały najbardziej znaczące. Takie podejścia nie mogły ani zidentyfikować fraz kluczowych, które nie pojawiają się w tekście, ani uchwycić rzeczywistego znaczenia semantycznego stojącego za tekstem. Proponujemy generatywny model predykcji fraz kluczowych z frameworkiem koder-dekoder, który może skutecznie przezwyciężyć powyższe wady. Nazywamy ją głębokim generowaniem fraz kluczowych, ponieważ próbuje uchwycić głębokie znaczenie semantyczne treści metodą głębokiego uczenia się. Analiza empiryczna na sześciu zbiorach danych pokazuje, że proponowany model nie tylko osiąga znaczący wzrost wydajności w ekstrakcji fraz kluczowych pojawiających się w tekście źródłowym, ale także może generować nieobecne frazy kluczowe w oparciu o semantyczne znaczenie tekstu. Kod i zestaw danych są dostępne pod adresem < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ro': 'Fraza cheie oferă informații foarte sumative care pot fi utilizate eficient pentru înțelegerea, organizarea și recuperarea conținutului text. Deși studiile anterioare au oferit multe soluții funcționale pentru extragerea automată a frazelor cheie, acestea au împărțit în mod obișnuit conținutul care urmează să fie rezumat în mai multe bucăți de text, apoi le-au clasificat și selectat pe cele mai semnificative. Aceste abordări nu au putut identifica fraze cheie care nu apar în text și nici să surprindă semnificația semantică reală din spatele textului. Propunem un model generativ pentru predicția frazelor cheie cu un cadru codificator-decodor, care poate depăși efectiv dezavantajele de mai sus. Îl numim ca generație profundă de fraze cheie deoarece încearcă să capteze sensul semantic profund al conținutului cu o metodă de învățare profundă. Analiza empirică a șase seturi de date demonstrează că modelul nostru propus nu numai că obține un impuls semnificativ de performanță în extragerea frazelor cheie care apar în textul sursă, ci și poate genera fraze cheie absente bazate pe semnificația semantică a textului. Codul și setul de date sunt disponibile la < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'so': 'Luqada furayaashu waxay ka heleysaa macluumaad aad u xagaan, kaas oo si faa’iido leh loogu isticmaali karo waxgarashada, hagaajinta iyo helitaanka waxyaabaha qoraalka ah. In kastoo waxbarashooyinkii hore ay samaysteen xalalyo badan oo shaqaalaha ah oo ay ka soo saaraan kalimada, waxay inta badan qeybiyeen waxyaabaha loo soo qoray si loo soo qoro, markaasna waxay doorteen kuwo ugu muhiimsan. Waxqabadkaasu ma aqoonsan karaan hadallada aan ku muuqan qoraalka, waxna ma qabsan karo micneheeda rasmiga ah ee qoraalka dabadiisa. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model geneeral ah oo wax u sii sheegi karo hadal kaliya, kaasoo si faa’iido ah uga adkaan kara dhabarka sare. Waxaynu ugu magacaabnaa farshaxan aad u dheer, sababtoo ah waxay isku dayaysaa in uu qabsado micnaha hoos u dheer oo ay ku jirto qaab aad u dheer waxbarasho. Empirical analysis on six datasets demonstrates that our proposed model not only achieves a significant performance boost on extracting keyphrases that appear in the source text, but also can generate absent keyphrases based on the semantic meaning of the text.  Codeynta iyo sawirada waxaad ka heleysaa < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'sv': 'Nyckelfras ger mycket summativ information som effektivt kan användas för att förstå, organisera och hämta textinnehåll. Även om tidigare studier har gett många användbara lösningar för automatiserad nyckelfrasutvinning, delade de vanligtvis upp det sammanfattade innehållet i flera textbitar, sedan rangordnade och valde ut de mest meningsfulla. Dessa tillvägagångssätt kunde varken identifiera nyckelfraser som inte visas i texten, eller fånga den verkliga semantiska innebörden bakom texten. Vi föreslår en generativ modell för nyckelfrasprediktion med ett encoder-dekoder ramverk, som effektivt kan övervinna ovanstående nackdelar. Vi kallar det för djup nyckelfrasgenerering eftersom det försöker fånga den djupa semantiska innebörden av innehållet med en djupinlärningsmetod. Empirisk analys av sex datauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna modell inte bara uppnår en betydande prestandaförbättring när det gäller extraktion av nyckelfraser som visas i källtexten, utan också kan generera saknade nyckelfraser baserat på textens semantiska betydelse. Kod och dataset finns tillgängliga på < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'sr': 'Ključna fraza pruža visoko summativne informacije koje se mogu efikasno iskoristiti za razumevanje, organizaciju i prikupljanje sadržaja teksta. Iako su prethodne studije pružile mnoge funkcionalne rješenja za automatsku ekstrakciju ključne fraze, obično su podijelili sadržaj koji će biti sažetan u višestruke tekstske dijelove, zatim su postavili i odabrali najznačajnije. Ovi pristupi nisu mogli ni da identifikuju ključne fraze koje se ne pojavljuju u tekstu, ni da uhvate pravo semantičko značenje iza teksta. Predlažemo generativni model za predviđanje ključne fraze sa okvirom kodera-dekodera, koji može efektivno prevladati iznad prestanka. Mi ga nazivamo kao veliku generaciju ključne fraze jer pokušava da uhvati duboko semantičko značenje sadržaja dubokim metodom učenja. Empirička analiza na šest seta podataka pokazuje da naš predloženi model ne samo postiže značajno povećanje učinka na izvlačenju ključnih fraza koje se pojavljuju u izvornom tekstu, nego takođe može stvoriti odsutne ključne fraze na temelju semantičkog značenja teksta. Kod i seta podataka su dostupni na < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'si': 'Keyword කලින් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වාර්තා කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර දෙන්න තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයෙන් පරික්ෂණය මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පාළුවට පෙනෙන්නේ නැති යතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය අඳුන්නේ නැහැ, පාළුවට ඇත්ත සැමැන්තික අදහසක් අඳු අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මුළු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා සංකේතකය- ඩිකොඩර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ් අපි ඒක ගොඩක් යතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට නම් නම් නම් කරනවා ඒක ගොඩක් සෙමැන්ටික් අදහස් කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා ගොඩක්  තොරතුරු සටහන් හතර විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නෙවෙයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dර < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'ta': 'Keyphrase provides highly-summative information that can be effectively used for understanding, organizing and retrieving text content.  முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் தானியங்கி விசைச்சொற்றொடர் பிரித்தலுக்கு பல வேலை தீர்வுகள் வழங்கியிருந்தாலும், அவை பொதுவாக சுருக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளடக்கத் இந்த அணுகுகள் உரையில் தோன்றாத விசைகளை அடையாளமுடியாது, உரையின் பின்னால் இருக்கும் உண்மையான அரைப்பொருளை பிடிக் நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரியை முன்னோட்டமைக்கும் குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டாளர் சட்டத்துடன் முன்னோட்டமைக்கும், அது மேலே  நாம் அதை ஆழமான விசைச்சொற்றொடர் தலைமுறையாக பெயரிடுகிறோம் அது ஆழமான கற்றல் முறைமையில் உள்ளடக்கத்தின் ஆழமான அர்த்தம்  ஆறு தரவுத்தளங்களில் வெறுமையான ஆராய்ச்சி தெரியும் மூல உரையில் தெரியும் விசைச்சொற்றொடர்களை வெளியேற்றுவதில் மட்டும் முக்கியமான செயல்படுத்தும் முறைய < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ur': 'Keyphrase provides highly-summative information that can be effectively used for understanding, organizing and retrieving text content. اگرچہ پہلے مطالعہ نے اٹوٹ کیفریز اٹھانے کے لئے بہت سے کام کرنے کے قابل حل پیش کئے ہیں، انہوں نے معلوم ہوا کہ ان کی تعداد تعداد کی تعداد تعداد کے ٹکڑے میں تقسیم کیے جاتے ہیں، پھر رقم کیے جاتے ہیں اور سب سے معلوم ہیں یہ تقریبا نہیں پہچان سکتے کیفی فریزوں جو متن میں ظاہر نہیں ہوتے اور نہ متن کے پیچھے واقعی سیمانٹی معنی کو پکڑ سکتے ہیں. ہم ایک کلیف فریز پیش بینی کے لئے ایک پیدائش موڈل پیش بینی کے لئے پیش بینی کریں جو ایک کوڈر-ڈاکوڈر فریمیٹ کے ساتھ ہے، جو عمدہ طور پر اوپر ڈاکوپک پر غالب آسکتا ہے۔ ہم اسے گہرے کلیف فریز کی نسل کے طور پر نام دیتے ہیں اس کے بعد کہ وہ ایک عمیق سیمانٹیک معنی کے ذریعہ سے پکڑنے کی کوشش کرتا ہے۔ چھ ڈاٹ سٹ پر امپریکل تحلیل دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے پیش فرض کی مدل صرف ایک اثر فعالیت اضافہ نہیں کرتی جو سورس ٹیکسٹ میں ظاہر ہوتی ہے لیکن اس کے متعلق سمانتریک مطلب پر بنیاد چھ ڈاٹ سٹ کے بغیر چھوٹے کیفی فریز بھی پیدا کرسک <پر کوڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ موجود ہیں https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'vi': 'Từ khoá cung cấp thông tin có tính toán cao có thể được dùng để hiểu, sắp xếp và thu hồi nội dung văn bản. Mặc dù các nghiên cứu trước đã cung cấp nhiều giải pháp thuận lợi cho việc khai thác các cụm từ tự động, họ thường chia nội dung cần tổng hợp thành nhiều phần văn bản, rồi xếp hạng và chọn những phần có ý nghĩa nhất. Các phương pháp này không thể xác định các cụm từ không xuất hiện trong văn bản, cũng không thể nắm bắt được khái niệm ngữ nghĩa thực sự đằng sau văn bản. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình tác động để tiên đoán các cụm từ khoá bằng một bộ mã hóa, có thể thực sự vượt qua những trở ngại trên. Chúng tôi đặt tên nó là một thế hệ từ khoá sâu sắc vì nó cố gắng nắm bắt ý nghĩa theo ngữ pháp sâu sắc của nội dung bằng một phương pháp học sâu sắc. Ý phân tích tích tích tích từ sáu bộ dữ liệu cho thấy kiểu mẫu của chúng ta không chỉ đạt được một bước tiến lớn trong việc trích ra các cụm từ trong văn bản nguồn, mà còn có thể tạo ra các cụm từ không có dựa trên ngữ nghĩa. Mật mã và bộ dữ liệu có sẵn ở https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase -̀.', 'uz': "Name Agar oldingi o'rganishlar avtomatik bir qiymatni aniqlash uchun ko'p ishlash imkoniyatlarini yaratadi, ular oddiy tarkibini bir necha matn qismlariga qaytadi, keyin bir necha matn qismlariga kiritilgan va eng muhim narsalarni tanlang. Ushbu tugmalar matnni koʻrsatilmagan imkoniyatlarni aniqlab boʻlmaydi, matnning ортидан koʻrsatilgan haqiqiqiy semantik ma'nosini olib tashlab boʻlmadi. Biz bir generativ modelni taqdimot qilamiz. Kodlash usuli yordamida, bu yuqori suhbat orqali yordam beradi. Biz buni eng yuqori kalit foydalanishimiz deb nomlanamiz chunki u tarkibini juda qiyin o'rganish usuli bilan yuqori semantik ma'nosini qabul qilishni harakat qiladi. Name Code and dataset are available at < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.", 'nl': 'Keyphrase biedt zeer summatieve informatie die effectief kan worden gebruikt voor het begrijpen, organiseren en ophalen van tekstinhoud. Hoewel eerdere studies veel werkbare oplossingen hebben geleverd voor geautomatiseerde extractie van sleutelzinnen, deelden ze meestal de te samenvatten inhoud in meerdere tekstblokken, waarna ze de meest betekenisvolle exemplaren hebben gerangschikt en geselecteerd. Deze benaderingen konden geen sleutelzinnen identificeren die niet in de tekst voorkomen, noch de werkelijke semantische betekenis achter de tekst vastleggen. We stellen een generatief model voor keyfrase voorspelling voor met een encoder-decoder framework, dat de bovenstaande nadelen effectief kan overwinnen. We noemen het deep keyfrase generatie omdat het probeert de diepe semantische betekenis van de inhoud vast te leggen met een deep learning methode. Empirische analyse op zes datasets toont aan dat ons voorgestelde model niet alleen een aanzienlijke prestatieboost bereikt bij het extraheren van sleutelzinnen die in de brontekst voorkomen, maar ook afwezige sleutelzinnen kan genereren op basis van de semantische betekenis van de tekst. Code en dataset zijn beschikbaar op < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'da': 'Nøglesætning giver meget summerende oplysninger, der effektivt kan bruges til at forstå, organisere og hente tekstindhold. Selvom tidligere undersøgelser har givet mange brugbare løsninger til automatiseret nøglesætningsudtrækning, opdelte de ofte det sammenfattede indhold i flere tekststykker, hvorefter de rangerede og valgte de mest meningsfulde. Disse tilgange kunne hverken identificere nøglesætninger, der ikke vises i teksten, eller fange den reelle semantiske betydning bag teksten. Vi foreslår en generativ model til nøglesætningsforudsigelse med en encoder-dekoder ramme, som effektivt kan overvinde ovenstående ulemper. Vi kalder det som dyb keyphrase generation, da det forsøger at fange den dybe semantiske betydning af indholdet med en dyb læringsmetode. Empirisk analyse af seks datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede model ikke kun opnår en betydelig ydeevne boost ved at udtrække nøglesætninger, der vises i kildeteksten, men også kan generere manglende nøglesætninger baseret på tekstens semantiske betydning. Kode og datasæt er tilgængelige på < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'hr': 'Ključna fraza pruža visoko summativne informacije koje se mogu učinkovito koristiti za razumijevanje, organizaciju i prikupljanje sadržaja teksta. Iako su prethodne ispitivanja pružile mnoge funkcionalne rješenja za automatsku ekstrakciju ključne fraze, obično su podijelili sadržaj koji će biti sažetan u višestruke dijelove teksta, zatim su rankirani i odabrali najznačajnije. Ovi pristupi nisu mogli ni identificirati ključne fraze koje se ne pojavljuju u tekstu niti uhvatiti pravo semantičko značenje iza teksta. Predlažemo generativni model za predviđanje ključne fraze s okvirom kodera-dekodera, koji može učinkovito prevaziti iznad prestanka. Mi ga nazivamo kao veliku generaciju ključne fraze jer pokušava uhvatiti duboko semantičko značenje sadržaja dubokim metodom učenja. Empirička analiza na šest podataka pokazuje da naš predloženi model ne samo postiže značajno povećanje učinkovitosti na izvlačenju ključnih fraza koje se pojavljuju u izvornom tekstu, nego također može stvoriti odsutne ključne fraze na temelju semantičkog značenja teksta. Kod i seta podataka su dostupni na < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'bg': 'Ключовата фраза предоставя високо обобщена информация, която може ефективно да се използва за разбиране, организиране и извличане на текстово съдържание. Въпреки че предишните проучвания са предоставили много работещи решения за автоматизирано извличане на ключови фрази, те обикновено разделят съдържанието, което трябва да бъде обобщено, на няколко текстови парчета, след което класират и избират най-значимите. Тези подходи не могат нито да идентифицират ключови фрази, които не се появяват в текста, нито да уловят истинското семантично значение зад текста. Предлагаме генеративен модел за прогнозиране на ключови фрази с рамка за кодер-декодер, който може ефективно да преодолее горепосочените недостатъци. Наричаме го като генериране на дълбоки ключови фрази, тъй като се опитва да улови дълбокото семантично значение на съдържанието с метод за дълбоко обучение. Емпиричният анализ на шест набора от данни показва, че предложеният модел не само постига значително повишаване на производителността при извличането на ключови фрази, които се появяват в изходния текст, но и може да генерира отсъстващи ключови фрази въз основа на семантичното значение на текста. Код и набор от данни са достъпни на < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'de': 'Keyphrase liefert hochsummative Informationen, die effektiv zum Verstehen, Organisieren und Abrufen von Textinhalten verwendet werden können. Obwohl frühere Studien viele praktikable Lösungen für die automatisierte Keyphrase-Extraktion geliefert haben, teilten sie häufig den zusammenzufassenden Inhalt in mehrere Textbausteine auf, rangierten dann die aussagekräftigsten und wählten sie aus. Diese Ansätze konnten weder Schlüsselphrasen identifizieren, die nicht im Text vorkommen, noch die eigentliche semantische Bedeutung hinter dem Text erfassen. Wir schlagen ein generatives Modell für Keyphrasen-Vorhersage mit einem Encoder-Decoder-Framework vor, das die oben genannten Nachteile effektiv überwinden kann. Wir nennen es als Deep Keyphrase Generation, da es versucht, die tiefe semantische Bedeutung des Inhalts mit einer Deep Learning Methode zu erfassen. Die empirische Analyse von sechs Datensätzen zeigt, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell nicht nur eine signifikante Leistungssteigerung bei der Extraktion von Schlüsselphrasen erzielt, die im Quelltext erscheinen, sondern auch abwesende Schlüsselphrasen basierend auf der semantischen Bedeutung des Textes generieren kann. Code und Datensatz sind verfügbar unter < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'id': 'Frasa kunci menyediakan informasi yang sangat ringkasan yang dapat digunakan secara efektif untuk memahami, mengatur dan mengambil isi teks. Meskipun penelitian sebelumnya telah menyediakan banyak solusi yang dapat dilakukan untuk ekstraksi frasa kunci otomatis, mereka biasanya membagi isi yang harus disambungkan menjadi beberapa bagian teks, kemudian ditangkap dan memilih yang paling berarti. These approaches could neither identify keyphrases that do not appear in the text, nor capture the real semantic meaning behind the text.  Kami mengusulkan model generatif untuk prediksi frasa kunci dengan rangkaian koder-dekoder, yang dapat mengatasi kesalahan di atas. Kami menyebutnya sebagai generasi frasa kunci dalam karena mencoba untuk menangkap arti semantis dalam konten dengan metode belajar dalam. Analisis imperial pada enam set data menunjukkan bahwa model kami diusulkan tidak hanya mencapai meningkatkan prestasi yang signifikan pada ekstraksi frasa kunci yang muncul dalam teks sumber, tetapi juga dapat menghasilkan frasa kunci yang tidak ada berdasarkan arti semantis teks. Kode dan set data tersedia di < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ko': '키워드는 고도의 총괄적인 정보를 제공하여 텍스트 내용을 이해하고 조직하며 검색하는 데 효과적으로 사용할 수 있다.비록 이전의 연구는 자동 키워드 추출에 많은 실행 가능한 해결 방안을 제공했지만, 그들은 통상적으로 정리할 내용을 여러 개의 텍스트 블록으로 나누어 가장 의미 있는 텍스트 블록을 정렬하고 선택한다.이런 방법들은 텍스트에 나타나지 않은 관건적인 단어를 식별할 수 없을 뿐만 아니라 텍스트 뒤의 진정한 의미도 포착할 수 없다.우리는 디코더 프레임워크를 바탕으로 하는 키워드 예측 생성 모델을 제시하여 상술한 단점을 효과적으로 극복할 수 있다.우리는 이를 심층 키워드 생성이라고 명명한다. 왜냐하면 심층 학습 방법을 통해 내용의 심층 의미를 포착하려고 하기 때문이다.여섯 개의 데이터 집합에 대한 실증 분석에 따르면 우리가 제시한 모델은 원본 텍스트에 나타난 관건적인 단어를 추출하는 데 현저한 성능 향상을 얻었을 뿐만 아니라 텍스트의 의미에 따라 부족한 관건적인 단어를 생성할 수 있다.코드 및 데이터 세트는 <https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase>.', 'sw': 'Tamko hilo linatoa taarifa za muhtasari sana ambazo zinaweza kutumika kwa ufanisi wa kuelewa, kuandaa na kupata maudhui ya maandishi. Though previous studies have provided many workable solutions for automated keyphrase extraction, they commonly divided the to-be-summarized content into multiple text chunks, then ranked and selected the most meaningful ones.  Hatua hizi hazikuweza kutambua maneno yanayoonekana kwenye maandishi, wala kuchukua maana ya kweli ya maana yanayotokea nyuma ya maandishi. Tunazipendekeza muundo wa kizalendo wa utabiri wa maneno ya ufunguo na mfumo wa kudhibiti kodi, ambao unaweza kushinda kwa ufanisi wa upande wa juu. Tunaitwa kama kizazi kikubwa cha maneno tangu inajaribu kukutana na maana ya kina ya kisasa yenye njia ya kujifunza kwa kina. Uchambuzi wa mifano ya takwimu sita unaonyesha kwamba muundo wetu unapendekezwa sio tu unaweza kupata ongezeko la utendaji mkubwa kwa kutengeneza maneno yanayoonekana kwenye maandishi ya vyanzo, lakini pia inaweza kutengeneza maneno yasiyo na maana ya simu ya maandishi. Kodi na seti ya taarifa zinapatikana kwenye < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'fa': 'عبارت کلید اطلاعات بسیار جمع\u200cآوری را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند برای درک، سازمان و برگیری محتوای متن به طور موثر استفاده شود. اگرچه تحقیقات قبلی برای اخراج کلید\u200cهای خودکار بسیاری از راه\u200cحل\u200cهای کار قابل انجام می\u200cشود، آنها معمولاً محتوای جمع\u200cآوری را به بخش\u200cهای متن چندین تقسیم می\u200cکنند، سپس به صف\u200cها و انتخاب می\u200cکنند مهمترین\u200cها. این روش\u200cها نمی\u200cتوانند کلید\u200cهای کلید را شناسایی کنند که در متن ظاهر نمی\u200cشوند، و نمی\u200cتوانند معنی سیمانی واقعی را پشت متن بگیرند. ما یک مدل ژنترافی برای پیش\u200cبینی کلید عبارت را با یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما آن را به عنوان نسل کلید کلید اسم می\u200cدهیم از زمانی که سعی می\u200cکند معنی عمیق semantic عمیق محتویات را با روش یادگیری عمیق بگیرد. تحلیل امپراطوری در شش مجموعه داده نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد ما نه تنها یک افزایش عملکرد مهم بر اخراج کردن فرض کلید که در متن منبع ظاهر می شود، بلکه می تواند فرض کلید ناپدید را بر اساس معنی semantic از متن تولید کند. کید و مجموعه داده\u200cها در < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase .', 'tr': 'Ki챌i fra첵m d체힊체nmek, tertiblemek we metin maglumaty ga첵d etmek 체챌in ullanylabilir 첵okarky ki챌ijek maglumaty temin ed첵채r. 횜흫ki aramalar awtomatik m철h체m frazleri a챌mak 체챌in i힊le첵biljek 챌철z체mleri t채ze et첵채n bir n채챌e 챌철z체mler beripdirler. Olar k철plen챌 hasaplanjak 체챌in birn채챌e metin b철l체mine b철l첵채rler we so흫ra s체첵tgediler we i흫 m철h체m bolanlaryny sa첵l첵arlar. Bu golla힊yklar metin i챌inde g철r체nmeyen a챌 frazleri tanamazdy, we metin arkasynda ger챌ek semantik a흫lamasyny tapmady. Biz a 챌 frazleri흫 철nlemesi 체챌in janla첵yn bir nusgasyny teklip edip g철r첵채ris. Bu nusgasyny 체stine 챌ykaryp biler. Biz muny gaty kellfraz d철redigini al흫y힊 철wrenmek taryhy bilen al흫y힊 semantik a 흫satyny almaga synany힊첵arys. Alty datasetlerde empirik analizi bizi흫 teklip eden nusgymyzy흫 di흫e 챌e힊me metinde g철r체n첵채n kluplary a 챌makda m철h체m netijesi ba힊aryp bilme첵채ndigini g철rkez첵채r, emma ony hem 챌ykyp kluplary metin semantik a흫lamasynda d철redip biler. _Mazmunlar we veri setirli bar <at> https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'af': "Sleutelfrase verskaf baie- summatiewe inligting wat effektief gebruik kan word vir verstanding, organiseer en onttrek teks inhoud. Alhoewel die vorige studie baie werkbare oplossing vir outomatiese sleutelfrase uittrekking verskaf het, het hulle gewoonlik die to- be- summarized inhoud in veelvuldige teksblokke, dan rangeer en gekies die mees betekende. Hierdie toegang kon nie sleutelfrase identifiseer wat nie in die teks verskyn nie, of die regte semantiese betekening agter die teks neem nie. Ons voorstel 'n genereerbare model vir sleutefrase voorskou met' n enkoder- dekoder raamwerk, wat kan effektief die bo-teken oorweeg. Ons noem dit as diep sleutelfrase generasie sedert dit probeer om die diep semantiese betekening van die inhoud te haal met 'n diep leer metode. Enigeriese analisie op ses datastelle bevestig dat ons voorgestelde model nie net 'n betekende prestasie booster bereik op uitpakking van sleutelfrase wat in die bron teks verskyn word nie, maar ook kan genereer absent sleutelfrase gebaseer op die semantiese betekening van die teks. Kode en datastel is beskikbaar by < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >", 'sq': 'Fraza kyçe ofron informacion shumë-summativ që mund të përdoret efektivisht për të kuptuar, organizuar dhe marrë përmbajtjen e tekstit. Megjithëse studimet e mëparshme kanë dhënë shumë zgjidhje të funksionueshme për nxjerrjen e frazës kyçe automatike, ato zakonisht ndajnë përmbajtjen që do të përmbledhet në pjesë të shumta teksti, pastaj renditën dhe zgjedhën ato më të kuptueshme. Këto qasje nuk mund as të identifikojnë frazat kyçe që nuk shfaqen në tekst, as të kapin kuptimin e vërtetë semantik prapa tekstit. We propose a generative model for keyphrase prediction with an encoder-decoder framework, which can effectively overcome the above drawbacks.  Ne e quajmë atë si një gjeneratë të thellë fraze kyçe pasi ajo përpiqet të kapë kuptimin semantik të thellë të përmbajtjes me një metodë mësimi të thellë. Analiza imperiale në gjashtë grupe të dhënash tregon se modeli ynë i propozuar jo vetëm arrin një rritje të rëndësishme performance në nxjerrjen e frazave kyçe që shfaqen në tekstin e burimit, por gjithashtu mund të gjenerojë frazat kyçe të munguara bazuar në kuptimin semantik të tekstit. Kodi dhe grupi i të dhënave janë në dispozicion në < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'am': 'የፊደል ቃል ማስታወቂያ፣ ማስረጃ እና ጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና ማግኘት የሚችል መረጃዎችን ያስተካክላል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ምንም እንኳን ለራሳቸው የቁልፍ ቃላት ማውጣት ብዙ የሚሠራ መፍትሄቶችን አቀረበ፣ በተለየ ጊዜ የሚታየውን የጽሑፍ ማውጣት በብዙ እጥፍ ክፍል አድርገዋል፡፡ ይህቺ ደረጃዎች በጽሑፉ ውስጥ ያልታዩ የቁልፎችን መክፈት ማግኘት አይችሉም፥ ከጽሑፉ በኋላ እውነተኛውን የsemantic አእምሮዎች ማግኘት አይችሉም። የፊደል አቋራጭ የፊደል ቃላትን ለመፍጠር አቀናቅላታል፡፡ ጥልቅ የፊደል ቃላት ትውልድ እናስባለን የጥልቅ ትምህርት ማውቀትን በመያዝ ከሞከረ በኋላ፡፡ የስድስት ዳታተርሚክ ትምህርት በጽሑፉ ውስጥ የሚታየው የፊደል ቃላትን ለማውጣት ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን የጽሑፉን እውቀት በሚያሳየው የቁልፎችን ቃላት በመጠቀም የሚችል የቁልፍ ቃላት መፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ኮድ https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'hy': 'Հիմնական արտահայտությունը տրամադրում է շատ համառոտացիոն տեղեկատվություն, որը կարող է արդյունավետ օգտագործվել տեքստի պարունակության հասկանալու, կազմակերպման և վերադարձման համար: Չնայած նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունները շատ գործելի լուծումներ են տրամադրել ավտոմատիկ բառերի արտահայտության համար, նրանք սովորաբար բաժանեցին համառոտագրվող պարունակությունը բազմաթիվ տեքստի մասերի, հետո դասավորեցին և ընտրեցին ամենակարևոր պարունակությունները: Այս մոտեցումները չեն կարողանում ոչ միայն հայտնաբերել տեքստում չհայտնվող բառերը, ոչ էլ ընկալել տեքստի ետևի իրական սեմանտիկ իմաստը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք հիմնական արտահայտությունների կանխատեսման սերունդային մոդել, որն ունի կոդեր-կոդեր կառուցվածք, որը կարող է արդյունավետ հաղթահարել վերևի թերությունները: Մենք այն անվանում ենք խորը ստեղծագործական արտահայտությունների սերունդ, քանի որ այն փորձում է ընկալել պարունակության խորը սեմանտիկ իմաստը խորը սովորելու մեթոդով: Վեց տվյալների կայսրական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մոդելը ոչ միայն նշանակալի արդյունավետություն է բարձրացնում աղբյուր տեքստում հայտնվող բառերի վերացման վրա, այլ նաև կարող է ստեղծել բացակայ բառեր, հիմնված տեքստի սեմանտիկ իմաստով: Կոդը և տվյալների համակարգը հասանելի են https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase ]:', 'bn': 'কীবাক্ষরের তথ্য অত্যন্ত সংক্ষিপ্ত তথ্য প্রদান করে যা বুঝতে পারে, সংগঠিত এবং টেক্সটের বিষয়বস্তু পুনরুদ্ধা যদিও পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কীবোর্ড বের করার জন্য অনেক কার্যকর সমাধান দিয়েছে, তারা সাধারণত সংক্ষিপ্ত বিষয়গুলোকে বিভিন্ন টে এই প্রতিক্রিয়াগুলো টেক্সটের মধ্যে দেখা যাচ্ছে না এবং লেখার পেছনে প্রকৃত সেমেন্টিক মান ধরা যায় না। আমরা কীবাক্ষরের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণীর জন্য একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল প্রস্তাব করি একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার ফ্রেমের সাথে যা উপরের পিঠের উপরে  আমরা এটাকে গভীর কী বাক্যের প্রজন্ম হিসেবে নাম দিয়েছি যেহেতু এটি গভীর শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি দিয়ে গভীর সেমেন্টিক মানে গ্রহণ কর ছয়টি ডাটাসেটে সামার্কিক বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল শুধুমাত্র কীবোর্ড বের করার ব্যাপারে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৃদ্ধি পায় না, যা উৎসের লেখায় প <এ কোড এবং ডাটাসেট পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'az': 'Mətn məzmunlarını anlamaq, organizasyonu və alınmaq üçün istifadə edilən çox toplamlı məlumatları təmin edir. Əvvəlki təcrübələr automatlı anahtar sözlərini çıxartmaq üçün çox işlənə bilən çətinliklər təyin etdiklərinə baxmayaraq, bu məlumatı çoxlu mətn parçalarına bölüşdürülər, sonra səf çəkilər və ən anlamlı olanları seçirlər. Bu yaxınlıqlar mətndə görünməyən anahtar sözlərini tanıma bilməz və mətnin arxasında gerçek semantik anlamı tuta bilməzlər. Biz anahtar frazlərin önlənməsi üçün bir modeli təklif edirik ki, üstündəki çəkilmələrdən üstün olar. Biz onu dərin bir öyrənmə metodu ilə məlumatın derin semantik anlamını tutmağa çalışırdıq. Altı verilən qurduğu inperik analizi göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin sadəcə mənbə mətndə görünən anahtar frazlərini çıxartmaq üçün mövcuddur, lakin mətnin semantik anlamına dayanan uzaq anahtar frazlərini də təşkil edə bilər. Kod və veri qurğuları < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'ca': "La frase clau proporciona informació molt sumativa que es pot utilitzar efectivament per entendre, organitzar i recuperar continguts de text. Encara que estudis anteriors han proporcionat moltes solucions viables per a l'extracció automatitzada de frases clau, comunament dividien el contingut que s'ha de resumir en múltiples trossos de text, després van classificar i seleccionar els més significatius. Aquests enfocaments ni podrien identificar frases clau que no apareixen al text ni capturar el significat semàntic real darrere del text. Proposem un model generador de predicció de frases clau amb un marc de codificador-decodificador, que pot superar efectivament els desvantatges d'arriba. L'anomenem generació de frases clau profundes perquè intenta capturar el sentit semàntic profund del contingut amb un mètode d'aprenentatge profund. L'anàlisi empíric de sis conjunts de dades demostra que el nostre model proposat no només aconsegueix un augment significatiu de rendiment en l'extracció de frases clau que apareixen al text de font, sinó també pot generar frases clau ausents basades en el significat semàntic del text. El codi i el conjunt de dades estan disponibles a < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.", 'bs': 'Ključna fraza pruža visoko summativne informacije koje se mogu učinkovito koristiti za razumijevanje, organizaciju i prikupljanje sadržaja teksta. Iako su prethodne ispitivanja pružile mnoge funkcionalne rješenja za automatsku ekstrakciju ključne fraze, obično su podijelili sadržaj koji će biti sažetan u višestruke dijelove teksta, zatim su rankirani i odabrali najznačajnije. Ovi pristupi nisu mogli ni identificirati ključne fraze koje se ne pojavljuju u tekstu, ni uhvatiti pravo semantičko značenje iza teksta. Predlažemo generativni model za predviđanje ključne fraze sa okvirom kodera-dekodera, koji može efektivno prevladati iznad prestanka. Mi ga nazivamo kao veliku generaciju ključne fraze jer pokušava uhvatiti duboko semantičko značenje sadržaja dubokim metodom učenja. Empirička analiza na šest podataka pokazuje da naš predloženi model ne samo postiže značajno povećanje učinkovitosti na izvlačenju ključnih fraza koje se pojavljuju u izvornom tekstu, već i može stvoriti odsutne ključne fraze na temelju semantičkog značenja teksta. Kod i seta podataka su dostupni na < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase - Da.', 'cs': 'Klíčová fráze poskytuje vysoce souhrnné informace, které lze efektivně použít pro porozumění, organizaci a načítání textového obsahu. Přestože předchozí studie poskytly mnoho proveditelných řešení pro automatizovanou extrakci klíčových frází, obvykle rozdělily obsah, který má být shrnut do několika kusů textu, pak zařadily a vybraly ty nejvýznamnější. Tyto přístupy nedokázaly identifikovat klíčové fráze, které se v textu neobjevují, ani zachytit skutečný sémantický význam textu. Navrhujeme generativní model pro predikci klíčových frází s kodérem-dekodérem frameworkem, který může efektivně překonat výše uvedené nevýhody. Pojmenujeme ji jako generování hlubokých klíčových frází, protože se snaží zachytit hluboký sémantický význam obsahu metodou hlubokého učení. Empirická analýza na šesti datových sadách ukazuje, že náš navržený model nejen dosahuje významného zvýšení výkonu extrakce klíčových frází, které se objevují ve zdrojovém textu, ale také může generovat chybějící klíčové fráze na základě sémantického významu textu. Kód a datová sada jsou k dispozici na adrese < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'et': 'Märksõnad annavad väga kokkuvõtlikku teavet, mida saab tõhusalt kasutada tekstisisu mõistmiseks, korraldamiseks ja hankimiseks. Kuigi varasemad uuringud on pakkunud palju toimivaid lahendusi automatiseeritud võtmerfraaside ekstraheerimiseks, jagasid nad tavaliselt kokkuvõtliku sisu mitmeks tekstitükiks, seejärel järjestasid ja valisid kõige tähtsamad. Need lähenemisviisid ei suutnud tuvastada võtmevahendeid, mis tekstis ei esine, ega jäädvustada teksti taga olevat tegelikku semantilist tähendust. Pakume välja generatiivse mudeli võtmefraaside ennustamiseks kodeerija-dekooderi raamistikuga, mis suudab tõhusalt ületada eespool nimetatud puudused. Nimetame selle sügava klahvifraasi genereerimiseks, kuna see püüab sügavõtmeõppe meetodiga sisu sügavat semantilist tähendust tabada. Kuue andmekogumi empiiriline analüüs näitab, et meie pakutud mudel ei saavuta mitte ainult märkimisväärset jõudlust lähtetekstis ilmuvate võtmevahendite ekstraheerimisel, vaid võib tekitada ka puuduvaid võtmevahendeid teksti semantilise tähenduse põhjal. Kood ja andmekogum on saadaval aadressil < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'fi': 'Avainsana tarjoaa erittäin summatiivista tietoa, jota voidaan tehokkaasti käyttää tekstin sisällön ymmärtämiseen, järjestämiseen ja hakemiseen. Vaikka aikaisemmat tutkimukset ovat tarjonneet monia toimivia ratkaisuja automaattiseen avainlauseiden poimintaan, ne yleensä jakoivat tiivistettävän sisällön useisiin tekstiosiin, minkä jälkeen järjestivät ja valitsivat merkityksellisimmät. Nämä lähestymistavat eivät pystyneet tunnistamaan avainlauseita, jotka eivät näy tekstissä, eivätkä vangitsemaan tekstin taustalla olevaa todellista semanttista merkitystä. Ehdotamme generatiivista mallia avainlauseiden ennustamiseen kooderi-dekooderikehyksellä, joka pystyy tehokkaasti voittamaan edellä mainitut haitat. Nimeämme sen syväksi avainlauseeksi, koska se yrittää vangita sisällön syvän semanttisen merkityksen syväoppimismenetelmällä. Empiirinen analyysi kuudesta aineistosta osoittaa, että ehdotettu malli ei ainoastaan paranna merkittävästi suorituskykyä lähdetekstissä esiintyvien avainlauseiden purkamisessa, vaan voi myös luoda puuttuvia avainlauseita tekstin semanttisen merkityksen perusteella. Koodi ja aineisto ovat saatavilla osoitteessa < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nambah sing iki ora bisa nêdên langgar saben-saben sing ora bisa nêdên langgar sampeyan teks, nêmên ngeruhake sematik dhéwé seneng pisan kelangan langgar sampeyan teks. Awak dhéwé nggunakake model sing generic kanggo Ketokrangke nggawe barang koder-decoder, sing iso nggawe barang nggawe drawbacks Awak dhéwé nambah kuwi nggambar kelas nang pisan seneng pisan sedhaya dumadhi, semanti kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan kelas kuwi padha apik. Validity echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >', 'sk': 'Ključna fraza zagotavlja visoko seštevne informacije, ki jih je mogoče učinkovito uporabiti za razumevanje, organiziranje in pridobivanje besedilne vsebine. Čeprav so prejšnje študije zagotovile številne izvedljive rešitve za avtomatizirano ekstrakcijo ključnih fraz, so vsebino, ki jo je treba povzeti, običajno razdelile na več kosov besedila, nato pa razvrstile in izbrale najpomembnejše. Ti pristopi niso mogli niti prepoznati ključnih fraz, ki se ne pojavljajo v besedilu, niti zajeti resničnega semantičnega pomena besedila. Predlagamo generativni model za napovedovanje ključnih fraz z okvirom kodirnika-dekoderja, ki lahko učinkovito premaga zgoraj navedene pomanjkljivosti. Imenujemo ga kot generacijo globokih ključnih fraz, saj poskuša z metodo globokega učenja ujeti globok semantični pomen vsebine. Empirična analiza na šestih naborih podatkov kaže, da naš predlagani model ne le doseže znatnega povečanja učinkovitosti pri ekstrakciji ključnih fraz, ki se pojavijo v izvornem besedilu, temveč lahko ustvari tudi odsotne ključne fraze na podlagi semantičnega pomena besedila. Koda in nabor podatkov sta na voljo na < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'ha': "@ action: button Haƙĩƙa da akan da aka riga, sun gaura masu yin aiki da yawa wa cire masu amfani da cire-na-ɗabi'a, sun raba lokacin-zuwa-yanzu zuwa bakin rubutun masu yawa, sa'an nan kuma suka zaɓi masu da inganci. Wannan durowa ba za su iya gane maɓalli waɗanda ba su iya cikin littãfi ba, kuma bã su iya kãma ma'anar gaske bakin littãfi. Tuna goyyar da wani motsi mai ɗabi'a wa kungiyar kalma da wani firam na kode-kode, wanda zai iya iya yin amfani da idan yana iya rinjãya bayani na saman. Tuna sune shi kamar kizazi mai girma wa kalmõmi, daga lokacin da yake jarraba ta kãma ma'anar ƙarami mai girma da shirin da aka sani. Anayi na Empirical kan tsarin sitan da aka nuna cewa misalinmu wanda aka buƙata, bã zai iya sãmu wani marubuci mai muhimmi ba kawai kan ya iya nuna kalmõmi wanda ke nuna cikin matsayin kwanan, kuma amma yana iya iya ƙiƙiro kalmõmi da ba'a gane shi ba kan muhimmin matsayin. Ana iya amfani da kodi da tsarin bayani na < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >", 'he': 'ביטוי מפתח מספק מידע סכם ביותר שיכול להשתמש באופן יעיל להבין, לארגן ולהשיג תוכן טקסט. Though previous studies have provided many workable solutions for automated keyphrase extraction, they commonly divided the to-be-summarized content into multiple text chunks, then ranked and selected the most meaningful ones.  הגישויים האלה לא יכולים לזהות ביטויים מפתחים שלא מופיעים בטקסט, ולא לתפוס את המשמעות הסמנטית האמיתית מאחורי הטקסט. אנו מציעים מודל דולרי לחזוי ביטוי מפתח עם מסגרת קודד-קודד, שיכולה להתגבר באופן יעיל על החסרונות העליונה. אנחנו קוראים לזה דור מילים מפתחים עמוקים מאז שהוא מנסה לתפוס את המשמעות הסמנטית העמוקה של התוכן עם שיטת לימוד עמוקה. ניתוח אימפריקלי על שש קבוצות נתונים מראה שהמודל המוצע שלנו לא רק משיג דחף ביצועים משמעותי על החולץ משפטים מפתחים שמופיעים בטקסט המקור, אלא גם יכול ליצור משפטים מפתחים נעדרים בהתבסס על המשמעות הסמנטית של הטקסט. קוד וסט נתונים זמינים ב < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >.', 'bo': 'གཙོ་ཚིག་མིང་ཚིག་གིས་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་མང་ཙམ་མཁན་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་གྱི་བརྡ་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གཙོ་ཚིག་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད་ནའང་དེ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཁྱད་དུ་བཅུག་དགོས་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཡི འདྲི་ཞིབ་འདི་དག་གིས་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་དུ་མངོན་འཆར་མི་ཐུབ་པའི་གཙོ་ཚིག We propose a generative model for keyphrase prediction with an encoder-decoder framework, which can effectively overcome the above drawbacks. Biz onu derin bir keyphrase generasyonu olarak adlandırıyoruz. Bu da derin semantik anlamını derin bir öğrenci metodu ile yakalamaya çalışıyor. གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཁོ་ན་ཏུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྩོམ་འབྲི་ནང་ཤར་བའི་ཚིག་རྟ < https://github.com/memray/seq2seq-keyphrase >'}
{'en': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks for Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'الشبكات العصبية التي تزيد من الانتباه والفهم القرائي', 'fr': 'Réseaux de neurones attention-sur-attention pour la compréhension de la lecture', 'pt': 'Redes neurais de atenção sobre atenção para compreensão de leitura', 'es': 'Redes neuronales de atención sobre atención para la comprensión lectora', 'ja': '読解のための注意過剰ニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '读解者,神经网络也', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ के लिए ध्यान-अधिक ध्यान तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Внимание! Нейронные сети для понимания прочитанного', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Airde-Ró-Aire don Léamhthuiscint', 'el': 'Νευρικά δίκτυα για την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης', 'ka': 'უფრო დაახლოებით ნეიროლური ქსელი კომპრენციის კითხვისთვის', 'it': 'Reti neurali per la comprensione della lettura', 'mk': 'Неурални мрежи за читање на разбирање', 'hu': 'Figyelem felett figyelem Neurális hálózatok az olvasási értékeléshez', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai tinklai, skirti supratimui skaityti, per daug dėmesio', 'kk': 'Қосымша оқу үшін назарлық нейралық желіComment', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Netwerks newrali għall-qari ta’ komprensjoni b’attenzjoni eċċessiva', 'no': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Nettverk for lesing av komprehension', 'ms': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks for Reading Comprehension', 'pl': 'Uwaga nad uwagą Sieci neuronowe dla zrozumienia czytania', 'ro': 'Atenție-peste-Atenție Rețele neurale pentru înțelegerea citirii', 'mn': 'Унших шинжлэх ухааны сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ', 'so': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Network for reading Completion', 'sr': 'Neuralne mreže za čitanje kompresije', 'ta': 'படித்தல் முடிப்பதற்கான கவனம்- மேலாளர் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்கள்', 'sv': 'Attention-over-Attention Neurala nätverk för läsförståelse', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کے لئے اظہار زیادہ اظہار نائرل نیٹورک', 'si': 'අවධානය අවධානය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය කියවන්න', 'uz': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks for Reading Comprehension', 'vi': 'Chú ý hệ thần kinh chú ý', 'bg': 'Внимание над внимание неврални мрежи за разбиране на четенето', 'nl': 'Attentie-over-Attentie Neurale Netwerken voor leesbegrip', 'da': 'Attention-over-Attention Neurale netværk til læseforståelse', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeits-über-Aufmerksamkeit Neuronale Netzwerke für Leseverständnis', 'id': 'Perhatian-lebih-perhatian Rangkaian Neural untuk membaca Komprensi', 'ko': '주의 기반의 신경 네트워크 읽기 이해', 'hr': 'Neuralne mreže za čitanje kompresije', 'af': 'Aangaande-oor-Aangaande neurale netwerke vir lees van komprehensie', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Kiurali kwa ajili ya kusoma Kufunguliwa', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی برای خواندن تأکید', 'tr': 'Derjesi okamak için dikkati aşağı dikkatli näral ağlar', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'az': 'Qısqa oxumaq üçün Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks', 'sq': 'Rrjetet neuronale për leximin e kuptimit', 'hy': 'Ուշադրություն դարձնելու համար ընկալումն ընկալում գտնվող նեյրոնային ցանցերը', 'cs': 'Pozornost nad pozornost Neurální sítě pro porozumění čtení', 'ca': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks for Reading Comprehension', 'et': 'Tähelepanu üle tähelepanu Neuraalsed võrgud lugemise mõistmiseks', 'bn': 'পাঠ করার জন্য নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'fi': 'Huomio yli huomion neuroverkot lukemisen ymmärtämiseksi', 'bs': 'Neuralne mreže za čitanje kompresije', 'jv': 'Attention-all-Attention Neral Network for Reading Compréncion', 'sk': 'Pozornost nad pozornostjo nevronske mreže za razumevanje branja', 'he': 'תשומת לב על רשתות נוירוליות לקרוא בינה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Attention-over-Attention Neural Networks for Reading Comprehension'}
{'en': 'Cloze-style reading comprehension is a representative problem in mining relationship between document and query. In this paper, we present a simple but novel model called attention-over-attention reader for better solving cloze-style reading comprehension task. The proposed model aims to place another attention mechanism over the document-level attention and induces attended attention for final answer predictions. One advantage of our model is that it is simpler than related works while giving excellent performance. In addition to the primary model, we also propose an N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance. Experimental results show that the proposed methods significantly outperform various state-of-the-art systems by a large margin in public datasets, such as CNN and Children’s Book Test.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم القراءة بأسلوب Cloze مشكلة تمثيلية في علاقة التعدين بين المستند والاستعلام. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذجًا بسيطًا ولكنه جديد يسمى قارئ الانتباه المفرط من أجل حل مهمة فهم القراءة بأسلوب cloze بشكل أفضل. يهدف النموذج المقترح إلى وضع آلية اهتمام أخرى على مستوى الاهتمام بالوثيقة ويحث "انتباه الحضور" على توقعات الإجابة النهائية. تتمثل إحدى ميزات نموذجنا في أنه أبسط من الأعمال ذات الصلة مع توفير أداء ممتاز. بالإضافة إلى النموذج الأساسي ، نقترح أيضًا استراتيجية إعادة تصنيف N-best لمضاعفة التحقق من صحة المرشحين وزيادة تحسين الأداء. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن الأساليب المقترحة تتفوق بشكل كبير على مختلف الأنظمة الحديثة بهامش كبير في مجموعات البيانات العامة ، مثل CNN و Children\'s Book Test.', 'fr': "La compréhension à la lecture de type Cloze est un problème représentatif dans l'exploration de la relation entre un document et une requête. Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle simple mais nouveau appelé lecteur attention-sur-attention pour mieux résoudre les tâches de compréhension de lecture rapprochée. Le modèle proposé vise à placer un autre mécanisme d'attention sur l'attention au niveau du document et à susciter une «\xa0attention soutenue\xa0» pour les prédictions de réponse finale. L'un des avantages de notre modèle est qu'il est plus simple que les travaux connexes tout en offrant d'excellentes performances. En plus du modèle principal, nous proposons également une stratégie de reclassement N-best afin de vérifier la validité des candidats et d'améliorer encore les performances. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que les méthodes proposées surpassent largement les différents systèmes de pointe dans les ensembles de données publics, tels que CNN et Children's Book Test.", 'es': "La comprensión lectora al estilo Cloze es un problema representativo en la relación minera entre el documento y la consulta. En este artículo, presentamos un modelo simple pero novedoso llamado lector de atención sobre atención para resolver mejor la tarea de comprensión lectora de estilo cloze. El modelo propuesto tiene como objetivo colocar otro mecanismo de atención sobre la atención a nivel de documento e induce una «atención atenta» para las predicciones de respuestas finales. Una ventaja de nuestro modelo es que es más simple que los trabajos relacionados, a la vez que ofrece un rendimiento excelente. Además del modelo primario, también proponemos una estrategia de re-clasificación N-best para verificar la validez de los candidatos y mejorar aún más el rendimiento. Los resultados experimentales muestran que los métodos propuestos superan significativamente a varios sistemas de última generación por un amplio margen en los conjuntos de datos públicos, como CNN y Children's Book Test.", 'pt': "A compreensão de leitura no estilo Cloze é um problema representativo na mineração de relacionamento entre documento e consulta. Neste artigo, apresentamos um modelo simples, mas inovador, chamado leitor de atenção sobre atenção para melhor resolver a tarefa de compreensão de leitura no estilo cloze. O modelo proposto visa colocar outro mecanismo de atenção sobre a atenção em nível de documento e induz “atenção assistida” para previsões de respostas finais. Uma vantagem do nosso modelo é que ele é mais simples do que os trabalhos relacionados, proporcionando excelente desempenho. Além do modelo primário, também propomos uma estratégia de reclassificação N-best para verificar novamente a validade dos candidatos e melhorar ainda mais o desempenho. Resultados experimentais mostram que os métodos propostos superam significativamente vários sistemas de última geração por uma grande margem em conjuntos de dados públicos, como CNN e Children's Book Test.", 'ja': "クローズスタイルの読み取り理解は、ドキュメントとクエリのマイニング関係における代表的な問題です。この論文では、クローズスタイルの読解タスクをよりよく解決するために、アテンション・オーバー・アテンション・リーダーと呼ばれる単純ではあるが斬新なモデルを提示した。提案されたモデルは、文書レベルの注目度に別の注目度メカニズムを配置し、最終的な回答予測のために「出席した注目度」を誘導することを目的としている。当社モデルの利点の1つは、優れたパフォーマンスを発揮しながら、関連作品よりもシンプルであることです。一次モデルに加えて、候補者の妥当性を再確認し、さらにパフォーマンスを向上させるためのNベスト再ランク戦略も提案します。実験結果によると、提案された方法は、CNNやChildren 's Book Testなどの公開データセットにおいて、様々な最先端のシステムを大幅に上回っていることが示されています。", 'zh': 'Cloze风读之,掘文档问代表性。 本文中,略而新模,谓之注意阅读器,以更好地解决闭锁式读解事。 设意机于文档级之上,诱"被注注意"以终其占。 我们模样的一个美点是比相关的,兼备出色的性能。 规模之外,陈N-best重策,以审选人之有效性而并进一步提高性。 实验结果表明,所上法于CNN及童子图书测试等公共数据集明优诸最先进之统。', 'hi': 'क्लोज़-शैली पठन समझ दस्तावेज़ और क्वेरी के बीच खनन संबंध में एक प्रतिनिधि समस्या है। इस पेपर में, हम एक सरल लेकिन उपन्यास मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसे क्लोज़-स्टाइल रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन टास्क को बेहतर ढंग से हल करने के लिए ध्यान-अधिक-ध्यान पाठक कहा जाता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल का उद्देश्य दस्तावेज़-स्तर के ध्यान पर एक और ध्यान तंत्र रखना है और अंतिम उत्तर भविष्यवाणियों के लिए "ध्यान में भाग लेना" को प्रेरित करता है। हमारे मॉडल का एक लाभ यह है कि यह उत्कृष्ट प्रदर्शन देते समय संबंधित कार्यों की तुलना में सरल है। प्राथमिक मॉडल के अलावा, हम उम्मीदवारों की वैधता को दोगुना करने और प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए एक एन-बेस्ट री-रैंकिंग रणनीति का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित तरीके सीएनएन और चिल्ड्रन बुक टेस्ट जैसे सार्वजनिक डेटासेट में एक बड़े अंतर से विभिन्न अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को काफी हद तक मात देते हैं।', 'ru': "Понимание чтения в стиле Cloze является типичной проблемой в связи интеллектуального анализа данных между документом и запросом. В этой статье мы представляем простую, но новаторскую модель, называемую «читатель внимания над вниманием», для лучшего решения задачи понимания чтения в закрытом стиле. Предлагаемая модель нацелена на то, чтобы поставить другой механизм внимания выше внимания на уровне документов и побуждает «присутствующее внимание» к окончательным прогнозам ответов. Одним из преимуществ нашей модели является то, что она проще сопутствующих работ, обеспечивая при этом отличную производительность. В дополнение к первичной модели, мы также предлагаем стратегию N-best reanking для двойной проверки достоверности кандидатов и дальнейшего улучшения производительности. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемые методы значительно превосходят различные современные системы с большим запасом в публичных наборах данных, таких как CNN и Children 's Book Test.", 'ga': "Fadhb ionadaíoch sa chaidreamh mianadóireachta idir doiciméad agus fiosrúchán is ea an léamhthuiscint ar an stíl cloze. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair múnla simplí ach úrscéal ar a dtugtar léitheoir aird-ró-aire chun tasc léamhthuisceana ar stíl cloze a réiteach níos fearr. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an tsamhail atá beartaithe meicníocht eile aird a dhíriú ar an aird ar leibhéal na doiciméid agus spreagann sé “aird ar fhreastail” chun freagraí deiridh a thuar. Buntáiste amháin dár múnla ná go bhfuil sé níos simplí ná oibreacha gaolmhara agus é ag tabhairt feidhmíocht den scoth. Chomh maith leis an múnla príomhúil, molaimid freisin straitéis athrangaithe N-is fearr chun bailíocht na n-iarrthóirí a sheiceáil faoi dhó agus chun an fheidhmíocht a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn na modhanna atá molta go mór na córais nua-aimseartha éagsúla i dtacar sonraí poiblí, mar CNN agus Children's Book Test.", 'ka': 'დახურების სტილის კითხვის შესახებ არის რესპენტიგური პრობლემა დოკუმენტის და კითხვის შორის მინუსის შესახებ. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრდა მაგრამ პრომენტის მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უფრო დაახლოებით კოლოზის სტილის კითხვის შესახებ. პროგრამის მოდელის მიზეზია, რომ დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის აღმოჩენების მეორე აღმოჩენების მექანიზმის დააყენება და მიზეზება "დაახლოვნელი აღმოჩენ ჩვენი მოდელის ერთი გამოსახულება არის რომ ეს უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე შესახებ მუშაობელი სამუშაო სამუშაო გამოსახულება. პირველი მოდელის დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე N-ს უკეთესი რედანტიგური სტრატიგია, რომელიც კონდიდენტების მუშაობას ეუბრალოდ შემოწმება და უფრო უფრო უფრო ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ პროგრამები მნიშვნელოვანია განსხვავებული სისტემების განსხვავებას დიდი მარტინზე საზოგადო მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, როგ', 'hu': 'Az állagos olvasási megértés reprezentatív probléma a dokumentum és lekérdezés közötti kapcsolat bányászatában. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy egyszerű, de újszerű modellt, amelyet figyelem felett-figyelem olvasónak nevezünk, hogy jobban megoldjuk az olvasásértési feladatot. A javasolt modell célja, hogy egy másik figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmust helyezzen a dokumentum szintű figyelem fölé, és a végső válasz előrejelzéseihez "figyelemmel kísérő figyelmet" keltsen. Modellünk egyik előnye, hogy egyszerűbb, mint a kapcsolódó munkák, miközben kiváló teljesítményt nyújt. Az elsődleges modell mellett javaslatot teszünk egy N-best újraértékelési stratégiára is, amely kétszer ellenőrzi a jelöltek érvényességét és tovább javítja a teljesítményt. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszerek jelentős mértékben felülmúlják a különböző korszerű rendszereket a nyilvános adatkészletekben, mint például a CNN és a Children\'s Book Test.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση ανάγνωσης τύπου κλόζ είναι ένα αντιπροσωπευτικό πρόβλημα στη σχέση εξόρυξης μεταξύ εγγράφου και ερωτήματος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα απλό αλλά καινοτόμο μοντέλο που ονομάζεται αναγνώστης προσοχής πάνω από την προσοχή για την καλύτερη επίλυση της εργασίας κατανόησης ανάγνωσης τύπου κλόζι. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο στοχεύει να τοποθετήσει έναν άλλο μηχανισμό προσοχής πάνω από την προσοχή σε επίπεδο εγγράφου και να προκαλέσει την "παρευρισκόμενη προσοχή" για τις προβλέψεις τελικών απαντήσεων. Ένα πλεονέκτημα του μοντέλου μας είναι ότι είναι απλούστερο από τις σχετικές εργασίες ενώ δίνει εξαιρετική απόδοση. Εκτός από το πρωτογενές μοντέλο, προτείνουμε επίσης μια στρατηγική αναπροσαρμογής για τον διπλό έλεγχο της εγκυρότητας των υποψηφίων και την περαιτέρω βελτίωση της απόδοσης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι ξεπερνούν σημαντικά διάφορα συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με μεγάλο περιθώριο σε δημόσια σύνολα δεδομένων, όπως το CNN και το Παιδικό Βιβλίο Τεστ.', 'kk': 'Құжат мен сұраныс арасындағы бақылау қатынасын жабу стилінің түсінімі - негізгі мәселе. Бұл қағазда, біз қарапайым, бірақ романдық үлгісін "attention-over-attention оқушы" деп аталады. Клоз стилінің оқу тапсырмасын жақсы шешу үшін. Келтірілген үлгі құжаттың деңгейіндегі қарау механизмін басқа қарау механизмін және соңғы жауап бақылау үшін \'қатысушылар\' дегенді көмектеседі. Біздің моделіміздің бір артықшылығы - бұл қатынастық жұмыстардан қарапайым. Негізгі үлгісінің қосымша, сонымен қатар, кандидаттардың дұрыстығын тексеру үшін N-дұрыстығын қайта реттеу стратегиясын жұмыс істейміз. Тәжірибе нәтижелері CNN және Балалардың кітапшасының сынақтарындағы көпшілік деректер жиындарының көпшілікті жүйелердің әртүрлі күй- жайындағы әртүрлі жүйелерді көп ше', 'mk': 'Разбирање на читањето во стилот Cloze е претставен проблем во рударската врска помеѓу документот и прашањето. Во овој весник, претставуваме едноставен но нов модел наречен читател на внимание преку внимание за подобро решавање на задачата за разбирање на читањето во стил на клоз. Предложениот модел има за цел да стави друг механизам на внимание над вниманието на нивото на документот и да предизвика „присуство на вниманието“ за предвидувањата на конечниот одговор. Една предност од нашиот модел е тоа што е поедноставно од поврзаните дела додека дава одлична изведба. In addition to the primary model, we also propose an N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложените методи значително ги надминуваат различните најсовремени системи со голема маргина во јавните податоци, како што се ЦНН и тестот за детска книга.', 'lt': 'Cloze-style reading comprehension is a representative problem in mining relationship between document and query.  Šiame dokumente pristatome paprastą, bet naują model į, vadinamą dėmesio pertekliaus skaitytuvu, siekiant geriau išspręsti klozo stiliu skaitymo supratimo užduotį. Siūlomu modeliu siekiama skirti papildomą dėmesio dokumentų lygmeniu mechanizmą ir paskatinti „atidėtą dėmesį“ galutiniams atsakymų prognozėms. Vienas iš mūsų modelio pranašumų yra tai, kad jis paprastesnis nei susiję darbai ir suteikia puikius rezultatus. In addition to the primary model, we also propose an N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomi metodai gerokai viršija įvairias pažangiausias sistemas, o viešuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, pavyzdžiui, CNN ir vaikų knygų testavimą, labai skiriasi.', 'it': 'La comprensione della lettura in stile cloze è un problema rappresentativo nel mining della relazione tra documento e query. In questo articolo, presentiamo un modello semplice ma innovativo chiamato attenzione-over-attenzione lettore per risolvere meglio il compito di comprensione della lettura in stile cloze. Il modello proposto mira a porre un altro meccanismo di attenzione sull\'attenzione a livello di documento e induce "attenzione attesa" per le previsioni di risposta finale. Un vantaggio del nostro modello è che è più semplice rispetto ai lavori correlati, pur dando prestazioni eccellenti. Oltre al modello primario, proponiamo anche una strategia di ri-ranking N-best per ricontrollare la validità dei candidati e migliorare ulteriormente le performance. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che i metodi proposti superano significativamente vari sistemi all\'avanguardia con un ampio margine in set di dati pubblici, come CNN e Children\'s Book Test.', 'ml': "ക്ലോസ്- സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നത് രേഖയും ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ഇടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധത്തിനുമിടയില്\u200d പ്രതിന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ, പക്ഷെ നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ക്ലോസ് സൈല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന് നല്ല പരിഹാരം പരിഹരിക്ക പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d രേഖ-നില ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ മറ്റൊരു ശ്രദ്ധ വ്യവസ്ഥയെ സ്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദ നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഒരു ഉപകാരമാണ് ഇത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d എളുപ്പമാണെന്ന്. പ്രധാന മോഡല്\u200d കൂടാതെ, പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തെ ഇരട്ടി പരിശോധിക്കാനും പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടാനും നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു N-മികച്ച റാങ് Experimental results show that the proposed methods significantly outperform various state-of-the-art systems by a large margin in public datasets, such as CNN and Children's Book Test.", 'no': "Forståking av lesing av lukka- stil er eit reprezentativt problem i miningsrelasjon mellom dokumentet og spørjing. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein enkel, men roman modell kalla attention-over-attention lesar for å løyse oppgåva for lesing av klosistil. Det første modellen må plassera ein annan oppmerksmekanisme over oppmerksomheten til dokumentnivået og indusera « delta oppmerksomheten » for sluttforhåndsvising av svaret. Eit fordel av modellen vårt er at det er enklare enn relaterte arbeidar mens det gjer utrolig utvikling. I tillegg til primærmodellen foreslår vi også ein N-beste reintegringsstrategi for å dobbelta kontrollen av kandidatene og forbetra utviklinga. Eksperimentale resultat viser at dei foreslåde metodane utfører forskjellige kunstsystemar med stor margin i offentlige datasett, slik som CNN og Children's Book Test.", 'mt': "Cloze-style reading comprehension is a representative problem in mining relationship between document and query.  In this paper, we present a simple but novel model called attention-over-attention reader for better solving cloze-style reading comprehension task.  The proposed model aims to place another attention mechanism over the document-level attention and induces 'attended attention' for final answer predictions.  Vantaġġ wieħed tal-mudell tagħna huwa li huwa aktar sempliċi minn xogħlijiet relatati filwaqt li jagħti prestazzjoni eċċellenti. In addition to the primary model, we also propose an N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance.  Experimental results show that the proposed methods significantly outperform various state-of-the-art systems by a large margin in public datasets, such as CNN and Children's Book Test.", 'ro': 'Înțelegerea citirii în stil cloze este o problemă reprezentativă în extragerea relației dintre document și interogare. În această lucrare, prezentăm un model simplu, dar nou numit cititor atenție-peste-atenție pentru o mai bună rezolvare a sarcinii de înțelegere a citirii în stil cloze. Modelul propus urmărește să acorde un alt mecanism de atenție atenției asupra atenției la nivelul documentelor și induce "atenția participată" pentru previziunile răspunsurilor finale. Un avantaj al modelului nostru este că este mai simplu decât lucrările conexe, oferind în același timp performanțe excelente. Pe lângă modelul primar, propunem, de asemenea, o strategie N-best de re-ranking pentru a verifica de două ori validitatea candidaților și pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare performanța. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metodele propuse depășesc semnificativ diferite sisteme de ultimă generație cu o marjă mare în seturile de date publice, cum ar fi CNN și Children\'s Book Test.', 'ms': "Pemahaman pembacaan gaya-Cloze adalah masalah mewakili dalam hubungan perlombaan antara dokumen dan pertanyaan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model mudah tetapi baru yang dipanggil pembaca perhatian-lebih-perhatian untuk menyelesaikan lebih baik tugas pemahaman pembacaan gaya cloze. The proposed model aims to place another attention mechanism over the document-level attention and induces 'attended attention' for final answer predictions.  Satu keuntungan dari model kita adalah ia lebih mudah daripada kerja berkaitan dengan memberikan prestasi yang baik. Selain model utama, kami juga cadangkan strategi peringkat semula N-terbaik untuk memeriksa ganda kemampuan calon dan memperbaiki prestasi. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan melampaui batas yang signifikan melampaui pelbagai sistem state-of-the-art dengan margin besar dalam set data awam, seperti CNN dan Ujian Buku kanak-kanak.", 'pl': 'Rozumienie czytania w stylu Cloze jest reprezentatywnym problemem w eksploatacji relacji między dokumentem a zapytaniem. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy prosty, ale nowatorski model zwany czytelnikiem uwagi nad uwagą dla lepszego rozwiązywania zadania zrozumienia czytania w stylu cloze. Proponowany model ma na celu umieszczenie innego mechanizmu uwagi nad uwagą na poziomie dokumentu i wywoływanie "uwagi uczestniczącej" dla ostatecznych przewidywań odpowiedzi. Zaletą naszego modelu jest to, że jest on prostszy niż powiązane prace przy jednoczesnym zapewnieniu doskonałej wydajności. Oprócz modelu podstawowego proponujemy również strategię renokacji N-best w celu podwójnego sprawdzenia ważności kandydatów i dalszej poprawy wyników. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane metody znacznie przewyższają różne najnowocześniejsze systemy w publicznych zbiorach danych, takich jak CNN i Test Książki Dziecięcej.', 'so': "Heshiiska akhriska ee qoraalka ee Cloze waa dhibaato ku saabsan xiriirka qoraalka iyo qoraalka. Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa model fudud laakiin sawir ah oo loogu yeeraa warqada aad u fiirsan kartid, si aad ugu fiican u xajisid qoraalka hoose-hoose. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu ku jeedaa in uu sameeyo meymisyo kale oo aad u taxadar karto labada wargeyska iyo dhaqaalaha 'taqsiir' si uu ugu dambeeyo u hor jeedo jawaabta ugu dambeeya. Tusaalkayaga hal faa'iido ah waa in ay ka sahlan tahay shaqada la xidhiidha marka lagu sameynayo tababar wanaagsan. Tusaale-horaadka ka sokow, waxan sidoo kale soo jeedaynaa qoraal-qoraal ah oo N-ka ugu wanaagsan, si aan labanlaab u hubsanno xaqiiqnimada kandidada islamarkaasna horumarinno tababarka. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay si muhiim ah u sameeyaan nidaamka farshaxanka kala duduwan, sida imtixaanka CNN iyo Qorniinka caruurta.", 'sv': 'Cloze-stil läsförståelse är ett representativt problem i mining relationen mellan dokument och fråga. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en enkel men ny modell kallad uppmärksamhet-över-uppmärksamhet läsare för att bättre lösa cloze-stil läsförståelse uppgift. Den föreslagna modellen syftar till att placera en annan uppmärksamhetsmekanism över uppmärksamheten på dokumentnivå och framkallar "uppmärksamhet" för förutsägelser av slutliga svar. En fördel med vår modell är att den är enklare än relaterade arbeten samtidigt som den ger utmärkt prestanda. Utöver den primära modellen föreslår vi även en N-best omräkningsstrategi för att dubbelkontrollera kandidaternas giltighet och ytterligare förbättra prestationen. Experimentella resultat visar att de föreslagna metoderna avsevärt överträffar olika state-of-the-art system med stor marginal i offentliga datamängder, såsom CNN och Children\'s Book Test.', 'mn': 'Хоосон хэлбэрийн унших ойлголт бол баримт болон query-ын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхаарлыг анхаарлын хэлбэрээр унших ажлыг илүү сайн шийдэхэд энгийн гэхдээ шинэ загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Шинэ санал өгсөн загварын төлөвлөгөө баримт түвшинд анхаарлын төвлөрөл дээр өөр нэг анхаарлын механизмийг тавьж, хамгийн сүүлийн хариултын таамаглал дээр "анхаарлын төвлөрөл Бидний загварын нэг давуу тал нь хамааралтай ажилдаас илүү хялбар юм. Эхний загвар дээр мөн бид N-н сайн дахин дүрслэх стратегийг хоёр дахин шалгаж, дахин ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд санал болгож байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь CNN болон хүүхдүүдийн номын шалгалт зэрэг олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн санд олон төрлийн урлагийн системээс илүү чухал байдаг.', 'ta': 'Comment இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சுலபமான ஆனால் புதிய மாதிரி கொண்டு வருகிறோம். குளோஸ்-பாணி படிக்க சூழ்ந்த பணியை முடிவு ச முந்திருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மற்றொரு கவனத்தின் முறைமையை ஆவண- மட்டத்தின் கவனத்திற்கு மேல் அமைக்கும் மற்றும் கடைசி விடை  எங்கள் மாதிரியின் ஒரு பயன் என்னவென்றால் இது சிறந்த முடிவு கொடுக்கும் போது தொடர்பு செயல்களை விட சுலபமா முதல் மாதிரி தவிர, நாம் ஒரு N-சிறந்த திரும்பச் செய்யும் திட்டத்தை இரட்டிப்பாக பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மார்க்காளரின் செல்லு சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் சிஎன்ன் மற்றும் சிறுவர்களின் புத்தகத்தின் சோதனைப் போன்ற பெரிய முறைமையில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமைகள் முறைய', 'sr': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja stila zatvora predstavlja problem u rudarskoj vezi između dokumenta i pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavan, ali novi model koji se zove čitač pažnje preko pažnje za bolje rešenje zadatka o razumijevanju kloza stila. Predloženi model je cilj da stavi još jedan mehanizam pažnje na nivo dokumenta i inducira "prisustvovanje pažnje" na konačne predviđanja odgovora. Jedna prednost našeg modela je da je jednostavnija od povezanih radova dok pružaju odličnu predstavu. Osim osnovnog modela, takođe predlažemo strategiju za ponovno reagiranje N-a kako bi dvostruko provjerili validnost kandidata i dalje poboljšali provedbu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložene metode značajno iznose različite državne umjetničke sustave velikom marginom u javnim podacima, poput CNN i dječjeg testa knjiga.', 'ur': "لکھنے کی طرح پڑھنے کی سمجھ یہ ایک نمایش مسئلہ ہے سند اور سؤال کے درمیان معاملہ میں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ساده لیکن نو موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جو اچھی طرح کلاس استیل پڑھنے کی تعلیم کے کام کو حل کرنے کے لئے اچھی طرح توجه والی پڑھنے والی ہے۔ پیغمبر کی مدل کا ارادہ ہے کہ دوسری توجه کی مکانیسم دکھانے والی سطح کی توجه پر رکھے اور آخری جواب کی پیش بینی کے لئے 'حضور حاضر ہونے' کو پیدا کرے۔ ہمارے مدل کا ایک فائدہ یہ ہے کہ یہ تعلق کے کاموں سے زیادہ آسان ہے جبکہ بہترین عملہ دیتے ہیں. ہم نے نئی موڈل کے علاوہ بھی ایک N-بہترین رینگ استراتژی کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ کاندینڈ کے مطابق دوگنا چک سکیں اور عملکرد کو اضافہ کریں۔ تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقے مختلف طریقے کی حالت-آرت سیستموں سے بہت زیادہ غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر", 'si': 'වහලා ස්ථානය කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ලිපින්ත සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අවධානයක් අවධානයක් කියලා කියලා ක්\u200dලොස් ශේලිය කියවන්න අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විසින් අධ්\u200dයාපනය වෙනුවෙන් අධ්\u200dයාපනයක් තියෙන්නේ විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි ඒක සම්බන්ධ වැඩට වඩා සරලයි. හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දෙන්න වෙලාවට. ප්\u200dරධාන මෝඩේල් එක්ක, අපි N-හොඳම ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණයක් සමහරවිතරයි, ප්\u200dරධාන කාර්යාන්තාවන්ගේ වැදගත්තාවක් ද පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz oddiy lekin novel modelini tahrirlash uchun o'qituvchi muvaffaqiyatlarni yaxshi o'qish uchun foydalanishimiz mumkin. Name One advantage of our model is that it is simpler than related works while giving excellent performance.  Birinchi asosiy modeldan boshqa, biz kandidalarning haqiqiqiyligini ikki marta tekshirish va bajarish imkoniyatini oshirish uchun N-eng yaxshi tarjima qilamiz. Tajriba natijalari esa, talab qilingan usullar CNN va Child Kitob sinovlari kabi maqsadlar tizimlarida katta margin tarkibini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Giải thích kiểu quần áo là vấn đề đại diện trong mối quan hệ khai thác giữa tài liệu và câu hỏi. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình đơn giản nhưng mới được gọi là chuyên gia đọc tập trung để giải quyết ý thức khoa học. Kiểu mẫu đề xuất nhằm đặt một cơ chế tập trung khác vào việc chú ý trên mức tập trung tài liệu và thúc đẩy sự chú ý dành cho dự đoán câu trả lời cuối cùng. Một lợi thế của mô hình là nó đơn giản hơn những công trình liên quan trong khi đạt được những hiệu quả tuyệt vời. Ngoài mẫu chính, chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một chiến lược N-best tái cấp bậc để kiểm tra hai lần giá trị của ứng viên và nâng cao hiệu suất hơn nữa. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy các phương pháp được đề nghị vượt trội hơn nhiều các hệ thống hiện đại với một khoảng cách lớn trong các bộ dữ liệu công cộng, như là thử nghiệm CNN và Sách Trẻ em.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на четене в стил клозе е представителен проблем при извличането на връзка между документ и заявка. В тази статия представяме прост, но нов модел, наречен читател на вниманието над вниманието, за по-добро решаване на задачата за разбиране на четенето в клозе стил. Предложеният модел има за цел да постави друг механизъм за внимание над вниманието на ниво документ и да предизвика "вниманието на вниманието" за прогнози за крайния отговор. Едно от предимствата на нашия модел е, че той е по-прост от свързаните с него работи, като същевременно дава отлична производителност. В допълнение към първичния модел предлагаме и стратегия за повторно класиране с цел двойна проверка на валидността на кандидатите и допълнително подобряване на представянето. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложените методи значително превъзхождат различни съвременни системи с голям марж в обществените набори от данни, като например Тест за детска книга.', 'nl': "Het leesbegrip in cloze-stijl is een representatief probleem bij het mining van de relatie tussen document en query. In dit artikel presenteren we een eenvoudig maar nieuw model genaamd attentie-over-attentie reader voor een betere oplossing van cloze-style leesbegripstaak. Het voorgestelde model beoogt een ander aandachtsmechanisme boven de aandacht op documentniveau te plaatsen en wekt 'bijgewoonde aandacht' op voor definitieve antwoordvoorspellingen. Een voordeel van ons model is dat het eenvoudiger is dan gerelateerde werken terwijl het uitstekende prestaties geeft. Naast het primaire model stellen we ook een N-best re-ranking strategie voor om de validiteit van de kandidaten te controleren en de prestaties verder te verbeteren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methoden aanzienlijk beter presteren dan verschillende state-of-the-art systemen in publieke datasets, zoals CNN en Kinderboektest.", 'de': 'Das Leseverständnis im Cloze-Stil ist ein repräsentatives Problem beim Mining der Beziehung zwischen Dokument und Abfrage. In diesem Beitrag präsentieren wir ein einfaches, aber neuartiges Modell namens Aufmerksamkeits-über-Aufmerksamkeits-Leser zur besseren Lösung von Cloze-Stil Leseverstehen Aufgabe. Das vorgeschlagene Modell zielt darauf ab, einen anderen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus über die Aufmerksamkeit auf Dokumentenebene zu platzieren und bewirkt eine "aufgemerkte Aufmerksamkeit" für endgültige Antwortvorhersagen. Ein Vorteil unseres Modells ist, dass es einfacher ist als verwandte Arbeiten bei ausgezeichneter Leistung. Zusätzlich zum Primärmodell schlagen wir auch eine N-best Re-Ranking Strategie vor, um die Validität der Kandidaten zu überprüfen und die Leistung weiter zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Methoden in öffentlichen Datensätzen, wie CNN und Kinderbuchtest, verschiedene State-of-the-Art Systeme deutlich übertreffen.', 'ko': "완형 빈칸 채우기식 읽기와 이해는 문서와 조회 관계를 발굴하는 전형적인 문제이다.완형 빈칸식 읽기와 이해 임무를 더욱 잘 해결하기 위해 본고는 간단하면서도 참신한 모델을 제시했는데 이를'주의력이 주의력에 대한 독자'라고 부른다.이 모델은 문서 수준의 주의 위에 다른 주의 메커니즘을 놓고 최종 답안 예측에'주의 주의'를 유도하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리 모델의 장점 중 하나는 관련 작업보다 간단하고 우수한 성능을 제공한다는 것이다.1차 모델 외에도 후보의 유효성을 이중으로 점검하고 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있는 N-best 재배열 전략을 제시했다.실험 결과 CNN과 어린이 도서 테스트 등 공공 데이터 집합에서 제시된 방법은 각종 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 현저히 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.", 'hr': "Razumijevanje pročitanja stila zatvora predstavlja problem u rudarskoj vezi između dokumenta i pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavan, ali novi model koji se zove čitač pažnje preko pažnje za bolje rješavanje zadatka o razumijevanju kloza stila. Predloženi model je cilj staviti još jedan mehanizam pažnje na razinu dokumenta i inducirati 'prisustvovanu pažnju' na konačne predviđanja odgovora. Jedna prednost našeg modela je da je jednostavnija od povezanih radova dok pružaju odličnu predstavu. Osim osnovnog modela, također predlažemo strategiju ponovnog redoviranja N-a kako bi se dvostruko provjerila validnost kandidata i dalje poboljšala učinkovitost. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložene metode značajno iznose različite sustave države umjetnosti velikom marginom u javnim podacima, poput CNN i dječjeg testa knjiga.", 'da': "Cloze-stil læseforståelse er et repræsentativt problem i mining relationen mellem dokument og forespørgsel. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en enkel, men ny model kaldet opmærksomhed over opmærksomhed læser for bedre at løse cloze-stil læseforståelse opgave. Den foreslåede model har til formål at placere en anden opmærksomhedsmekanisme over opmærksomheden på dokumentniveau og fremkalde 'opmærksomhed' til forudsigelser af endelige svar. En fordel ved vores model er, at den er enklere end relaterede værker og samtidig giver fremragende ydeevne. Ud over den primære model foreslår vi også en N-best re-ranking strategi for at dobbelttjekke kandidaternes gyldighed og yderligere forbedre resultaterne. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at de foreslåede metoder i høj grad overgår forskellige state-of-the-art systemer i offentlige datasæt, såsom CNN og Children's Book Test.", 'fa': 'درک خواندن سبک بند یک مشکل نماینده در رابطه خرید بین سند و سوال است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل ساده ولی نویس را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به نام خواننده توجه بسیار زیادی برای حل کردن کار یادآوری از طریق کلوز بهتر است. این مدل پیشنهاد را هدف می\u200cدهد که یک مکانیسم دیگر توجه را بر روی توجه سطح سند قرار دهد و برای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پایان پایان «توجه\u200cی مشاهده\u200cشده\u200cاست». یک نفع از مدل ما این است که این ساده تر از کار های ارتباطی در حالی که اجرای عالی انجام می دهد. در addition to the primary model, we also propose a N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد با یک مرز بزرگ در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عمومی، مانند سین\u200cان و آزمایش کتاب کودکان، به طور کلی بیشتر از سیستم\u200cهای ایالت هنر انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': "Sened we soragy arasyndaky baglaýyşyň içinde täze bir mesele däldir. Bu kagyzda basit bir ýagdaý nusgasyny görkezýäris. Diňe üns-üstünlik okadýan täblisini gowy çözmek üçin. Teklip eden nusga sened derejesi üçin başga bir üns meýdançasyny diňleýän we soňky jogabat täsirleri üçin 'üns berilip goýýan' meýdançasyny gurnamak maksady. Biziň nusgymyzyň ýene bir bahatymyz bolsa, bu temaslaryň üstünlikli performans bererken işlerden has hem basitdir. Birnäçe nusga daşary hem, kandidýalaryň barlygyny iki gezek barlamak üçin N-iň gowy derejä tertiblemek strategiýany teklip edip otyrys. Durumsal netijeler CNN we Çagalaryň Kitap Sınamasynda teklip eden çykyşlaryň dürli durumlaryň üstünde örän uly gabdalyk bilen üýtgedýändigini görkezýär.", 'id': "Cloze-style reading comprehension is a representative problem in mining relationship between document and query.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan model sederhana tetapi baru yang disebut pembaca perhatian-lebih-perhatian untuk menyelesaikan lebih baik tugas pemahaman pembacaan gaya cloze. Model yang diusulkan bermaksud untuk menempatkan mekanisme perhatian lain di atas perhatian tingkat dokumen dan mendorong 'perhatian yang hadir' untuk prediksi jawaban akhir. Satu keuntungan dari model kita adalah bahwa hal ini lebih sederhana daripada pekerjaan terkait sementara memberikan prestasi yang luar biasa. Selain model utama, kami juga mengusulkan strategi N-terbaik untuk memeriksa ganda validitas kandidat dan meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan jauh lebih melebihi berbagai sistem state-of-the-art dengan margin besar dalam dataset publik, seperti CNN dan Children's Book Test.", 'sw': 'Mfano wa kusoma kwa mtindo wa Cloze ni tatizo la mwakilishi katika uhusiano wa madini kati ya nyaraka na utafiti. Katika gazeti hili, tunaleta mtindo rahisi lakini wa riwaya unaoitwa wasomaji wenye msimamo mkali kwa ajili ya kutatua jukumu la kusoma msingi. Mradi wa pendekezo unalenga kuweka mfumo mwingine wa kutoa maoni juu ya kutangaza kwa kiwango cha nyaraka na viwanda vinavyotengeneza ‘kuhusika’ kwa utabiri wa mwisho wa jibu. One advantage of our model is that it is simpler than related works while giving excellent performance.  Zaidi ya mifano ya msingi, tunapendekeza mkakati mzuri wa upya wa N ili kudhibiti ukweli wa wagombea na kuboresha utendaji huo zaidi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa vizuri zinazofanya mifumo mbalimbali ya sanaa kwa njia kubwa katika seti za umma kama vile jaribio la CNN na Watoto.', 'af': "Sluit-styl lees verstanding is 'n reprezentante probleem in mining verhouding tussen dokument en navraag. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n eenvoudige maar roman model wat aandag-oor-aandag leser genoem word vir beter oplossing van klose-styl lees verstaan taak. Die voorgestelde model is doel om 'n ander aandag mekanisme oor die dokumentvlak aandag te plaas en 'aandag aangevoer' vir die eindelike antwoord voorskou te bring. Een voordeel van ons model is dat dit eenvoudiger is as verwante werke terwyl uitgelyk prestasie gee. In addition to the primary model, we also propose an N-best re-ranking strategy to double check the validity of the candidates and further improve the performance. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metodes betekeurig verskillende staat-van-kuns-stelsels uitvoer deur 'n groot marjin in publieke datastelle, soos CNN en kinders se boektoets.", 'sq': "Përkuptimi i leximit në stilin e mbylljes është një problem përfaqësues në marrëdhëniet miniere midis dokumentit dhe pyetjes. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model të thjeshtë por të ri të quajtur lexues i vëmendjes mbi vëmendjen për zgjidhjen më të mirë të punës së kuptimit të leximit në stil kloze. Modeli i propozuar synon të vë një mekanizëm tjetër vëmendjeje mbi vëmendjen e nivelit të dokumentit dhe nxit 'vëmendjen e ndjekur' për parashikimet e përgjigjeve përfundimtare. Një avantazh i model it tonë është se është më e thjeshtë se punët e lidhura duke dhënë shfaqje të shkëlqyera. Përveç modelit kryesor, ne propozojmë gjithashtu një strategji ri-renditjeje N-më të mirë për të kontrolluar dyfishtë vlerësinë e kandidatëve dhe për të përmirësuar më tej performancën. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metodat e propozuara tejkalojnë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme sistemet e ndryshme të state-of-the-art me një margin të madh në të dhënat publike, të tilla si CNN dhe Testi i Librit të Fëmijëve.", 'am': 'ሰነድ እና በመጠያቂያ መካከል ግንኙነትን ለማንቀሳቀስ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቀላል ነገር ግን የዘላለም ምሳሌ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የሰነድ-ደረጃን ማስታወቂያ እና የመጨረሻው መልስ ቅድሚያ እንዲያሳየው ‘ተጣበቅ’ የሚል አካሄድ ሌላ የጥያቄ ሥልጣን ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ የሞዴል አንዲት ጥቅማችን ነው፣ በተለየ ሥራ ላይ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ ከመጀመሪያው ሞዴል በቀር፣ የአካባሪዎቹን እውነተኛነት እጥፍ እጥፍ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የCNN እና የሕፃናት መጻሕፍት እንደሚመስል የሥርዓት-የ-አርእስት ስርዓቶችን በተለየ ትልቅ ስርዓት በህዝብ ዳታተሮች ላይ በመስጠት ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Close-ոճի ընթերցման ընկալումը ներկայացուցիչ խնդիր է փաստաթղթի և հարցի միջև հանքային հարաբերությունների մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի պարզ, բայց նորարար մոդել, որը կոչվում է ուշադրության չափից ավելի ուշադրության ընթերցող, որպեսզի ավելի լավ լուծենք գլխավոր ոճի ընթերցման ընկալումների խնդիրը: Պատրաստված մոդելը նպատակով է մեկ այլ ուշադրության մեխանիզմ դնել փաստաթղթի մակարդակի ուշադրության վրա և առաջացնում է "մասնակցել ուշադրություն" վերջնական պատասխանների կանխատեսումների համար: Մեր մոդելի առավելությունն այն է, որ այն ավելի պարզ է, քան կապված աշխատանքները, միաժամանակ տալով հրաշալի արտադրողություններ: Առաջին մոդելը բացի, մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք N-լավագույն վերադասավորման ստրատեգիա, որպեսզի կրկնակի ստուգենք թեկնածուների ճշմարտությունը և շարունակենք բարելավել արդյունքը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդները նշանակաբար գերազանցում են տարբեր ամենահետաքրքիր համակարգերը հանրային տվյալների համակարգերում, ինչպիսիք են CNN-ը և Երեխաների գրքի թեստերը:', 'bn': "ডকুমেন্ট এবং অনুসন্ধানের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক কমানোর একটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের সমস্যা। In this paper, we present a simple but novel model called attention-over-attention reader for better solving cloze-style reading comprehension task.  The proposed model aims to place another attention mechanism over the document-level attention and induces 'attended attention' for final answer predictions.  আমাদের মডেলের একটা সুবিধা হচ্ছে যে সংশ্লিষ্ট কাজের চেয়ে সহজ। প্রথম মডেল ছাড়াও আমরা প্রার্থীদের বৈধতা দ্বিগুণ পরীক্ষা করার প্রস্তাব করছি এবং প্রার্থীর বৈধতা আরো উন্নত করার জন্য একটি N-এর সেরা রেঙ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিগুলো পাবলিক ডাটাসেটে বিশাল পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প ব্যবস্থা প্", 'az': "Qiyam…ôt stili oxuyan anlama bel…ô bir problemdir ki, d√∂k√ľm v…ô soruŇüma arasńĪndakńĪ m…ôlumatńĪn m…ôlumatńĪ m…ôlumatńĪdńĪr. Bu kańüńĪzda, √ßox asanlńĪq, ancaq yeni bir modeli g√∂st…ôririk ki, kloz stili oxuyan √∂yr…ônm…ô iŇüini daha yaxŇüńĪ √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn attention-over-attention oxuyan. M…ôrh…ôm…ôtli modell…ôrin son cavab t…ôdbirl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô baŇüqa bir t…ôsiri mehanizmasńĪnńĪ d√∂k√ľm…ôt s…ôviyy…ôsi √ľz…ôrind…ô yerl…ôŇüdirm…ôk v…ô son cavab t…ôdbirl…ôrin…ô 't…ôsirli t…ôsiri' g√∂st…ôrm…ôk ist…ôyir. Bizim modelimizin bir faydasńĪ, yaxŇüńĪ performansńĪ verirk…ôn, qohumluq iŇül…ôrind…ôn daha asandńĪr. ńįlk modell…ô birlikd…ô, biz d…ô N-…ôn yaxŇüńĪ yeni r…ôngli strateji t…ôklif edirik ki, kandidńĀtlarńĪn qiym…ôtini iki d…ôf…ô yoxlamaq v…ô performansńĪnńĪ daha da yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn. M√ľxt…ôlif sonu√ßlar g√∂st…ôrir ki, t…ôblińü edilmiŇü metodlar CNN v…ô √áocuklarńĪn KitabńĪ SńĪnama kimi, halkńĪ veril…ôn qurbanlarda b√∂y√ľk bir margin il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif Ňü…ôkild…ô m√ľxt…ôlif Ňü…ôkild…ô m√ľxt…ôlif t…ôrzd…ô istifad…ô edirl…ôr.", 'ca': "La comprensió de la lectura d'estil cloze és un problem a representatiu en la relació minera entre el document i la consulta. En aquest article, presentem un model senzill però nou anomenat lector d'atenció per a resoldre millor la tasca de comprensió de lectura d'estil cloze. El model proposat té l'objectiu de posar un altre mecanisme d'atenció sobre l'atenció a nivell documental i indueix 'atenció atenta' a les prediccions finals de resposta. Un avantatge del nostre model és que és més senzill que treballs relacionats mentre dóna excel·lent rendiment. A més del model primari, també proposem una estratègia de re-classificació N-millor per comprobar doblement la validez dels candidats i millorar més el rendiment. Experimental results show that the proposed methods significantly outperform various state-of-the-art systems by a large margin in public datasets, such as CNN and Children's Book Test.", 'et': 'Kloosestiilis lugemine on tüüpiline probleem dokumendi ja päringu vahelise seose kaevandamisel. Käesolevas töös tutvustame lihtsat, kuid uudset mudelit, mida nimetatakse tähelepanu üle tähelepanu lugejaks paremaks lahendamiseks kloze stiilis lugemise mõistmise ülesandeks. Kavandatud mudeli eesmärk on paigutada dokumenditasemel tähelepanu teine tähelepanumehhanism ja kutsuda lõplike vastuste prognoosimiseks tähelepanu kaasama. Meie mudeli üks eelis on see, et see on lihtsam kui seotud tööd, andes samas suurepärase jõudluse. Lisaks esmasele mudelile pakume välja ka N-best ümberhindamise strateegia, et kontrollida kandidaatide kehtivust ja parandada tulemusi veelgi. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetodid on avalikes andmekogumites, näiteks CNN ja Lasteraamatu test, märkimisväärselt ületavad erinevaid kaasaegseid süsteeme.', 'cs': 'Porozumění čtení ve stylu Cloze je reprezentativní problém v dolování vztahu mezi dokumentem a dotazem. V tomto článku představujeme jednoduchý, ale nový model nazvaný pozornost-nad-pozornost čtenář pro lepší řešení úlohy porozumění čtení cloze stylu. Navržený model si klade za cíl umístit další mechanismus pozornosti nad pozornost na úrovni dokumentu a vyvolat "zúčastněnou pozornost" pro předpovědi konečných odpovědí. Jednou z výhod našeho modelu je, že je jednodušší než související práce a přitom poskytuje vynikající výkon. Kromě primárního modelu navrhujeme také strategii N-best re-rankingu pro dvojitou kontrolu platnosti kandidátů a další zlepšení výkonnosti. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržené metody výrazně překonávají různé nejmodernější systémy ve veřejných datových souborech, jako je CNN a Dětský knižní test.', 'fi': "Kloosetyylinen lukuymmärtäminen on edustava ongelma dokumentin ja kyselyn välisen suhteen louhimisessa. Tässä työssä esittelemme yksinkertaisen, mutta uudenlaisen mallin nimeltä huomio yli huomio lukija, jolla voidaan ratkaista paremmin cloze-tyylinen lukuymmärtäminen tehtävä. Ehdotetun mallin tavoitteena on sijoittaa toinen huomiomekanismi dokumenttitason huomiolle ja indusoi 'attended attention' lopullisen vastauksen ennustamiseen. Yksi mallimme etu on, että se on yksinkertaisempi kuin siihen liittyvät työt ja antaa erinomaisen suorituskyvyn. Ensisijaisen mallin lisäksi ehdotamme myös N-best-uudelleensijoitusstrategiaa ehdokkaiden pätevyyden kaksinkertaiseksi tarkistamiseksi ja suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi edelleen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät suoriutuvat merkittävästi julkisissa tietoaineistoissa, kuten CNN:ssä ja Children's Book Testissä, huomattavasti paremmin kuin monet uusimmat järjestelmät.", 'bs': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja stila zatvora predstavlja problem u rudarskoj vezi između dokumenta i pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavan, ali novi model koji se zove čitač pažnje preko pažnje za bolje rješavanje zadatka o razumijevanju kloza stila. Predloženi model je cilj da stavi još jedan mehanizam pažnje na razinu dokumenta i inducira "prisustvovanu pažnju" na konačne predviđanja odgovora. Jedna prednost našeg modela je da je jednostavnija od povezanih radova dok pružaju odličnu predstavu. Osim osnovnog modela, također predlažemo strategiju za ponovno reagiranje N-a kako bi dvostruko provjerili validnost kandidata i dalje poboljšali provedbu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložene metode značajno iznose različite sustave države umjetnosti velikom marginom u javnim podacima, poput CNN i dječjeg testa knjiga.', 'jv': 'Close-style Nang mapun iki, kita mulai un model sing perusahaan nganggo kuwi, dadi kapan-kapan kanggo nguasakno sing luwih apik. Ndeleng, kita ngubah ndelokipun panjenengan kelas sistem sing luwih apik. Algorithm Layang Nambah model sing berarti, kita ngubah tindakan sistem sing gak nggap banjur-barêng langgar nganggep bantuan winih sing berarti kebebasan kandidé lan uga bantuan ngono nggawe barang langgar. Resulot perangkat wong kuwi nggunakake sistem sing gak bener tentang karo perusahaan-sistem sing gak-perusahaan ning durum kuwi, nganggo perusahaan dumadhi sak dadi Publik, kaya ngono "MT" lan "User\'s Library Test".', 'sk': 'Razumevanje branja v slogu kloze je reprezentativna težava pri rudarjenju odnosa med dokumentom in poizvedbo. V prispevku predstavljamo preprost, a nov model, imenovan bralec pozornosti preko pozornosti, za boljše reševanje naloge razumevanja branja v slogu kloze. Namen predlaganega modela je postaviti drug mehanizem pozornosti nad pozornostjo na ravni dokumenta in spodbuditi "pozornost" za napovedi končnih odgovorov. Ena od prednosti našega modela je, da je preprostejši od sorodnih del, hkrati pa daje odlično zmogljivost. Poleg primarnega modela predlagamo tudi strategijo N-best za ponovno razvrstitev kandidatov za dvojno preverjanje veljavnosti kandidatov in nadaljnje izboljšanje uspešnosti. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagane metode bistveno presegajo različne najsodobnejše sisteme v javnih naborih podatkov, kot sta CNN in Test otroške knjige.', 'ha': "@ action: button In this paper, we present a simple but novel model called attention-over-attention reader for better solving cloze-style reading comprehension task.  @ action: button Babu wani abu daga misalinmu ni'ani ne mafiya sauri daga aikin da ke danganta a lokacin da za'a sami mafĩfi. Babu motsi na farko, za'a buƙata wata nishati na-N-da za'a saurari sau biyu dõmin ka jarraba gaskiyar kandandanki kuma ka ƙara gyaranta. Mataimakin jarrabãwa na nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, suna significantly outdo wasu state-of-the-art system by a huge margin cikin database na umma, kamar jarrabon CNN da Littãfin Kiyãn.", 'bo': "Cloze-style reading comprehension is a representative problem in mining relationships between document and query. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་གསར་གཏོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། The proposed model aims to place another attention mechanism over the document-level attention and induces 'attended attention' for final answer predictions. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ཐག་གཅིག་ནི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་པོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡིན་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་རེད། རྨན་གཞུང་གི་མ་དབུགས་སྐོར་ལས། ང་ཚོས་N(N)རིམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད་པ་ཚོའི་ནུས་པ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། མི་སྒྲུབ ལག་འཚོལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྤྲོད་ཟིན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་འདིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྣེ་མང་ཆོག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་", 'he': 'הבנה קריאה בסגנון Cloze היא בעיה מייצגת במערכת יחסים כרייה בין מסמך לבקשה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מודל פשוט אבל חדש שנקרא קריאת תשומת לב-על-תשומת לב לפתור טוב יותר את משימה הבנה קריאה בסגנון קלוז. המודל המוצע מכוון לשים מנגנון תשומת לב נוסף על תשומת לב רמת המסמכים ולגרום "תשומת לב מוכנה" לחזויות תשובות סופיות. יתרון אחד מהמודל שלנו הוא שהוא פשוט יותר מעבודות קשורות בזמן שנותן ביצועים מצוינים. בנוסף לדוגמא העיקרית, אנחנו גם מציעים אסטרטגיה מחדש N-הטוב ביותר כדי לבדוק כפול את האישיות של המועמדים ולמשפר את ההופעה. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהשיטות המוצעות יוצאות משמעותית מערכות חדשות במיוחד על ידי מגוון גדול בתערוכי נתונים ציבוריים, כמו CNN ובדיקת ספר הילדים.'}
{'en': 'Alignment at Work : Using Language to Distinguish the Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations', 'pt': 'Alinhamento no trabalho: usando a linguagem para distinguir os componentes de internalização e autorregulação do ajuste cultural nas organizações', 'es': 'Alineación en el trabajo: uso del lenguaje para distinguir los componentes de internalización y autorregulación del ajuste cultural en las organizaciones', 'ar': 'التوافق في العمل: استخدام اللغة للتمييز بين مكونات التنظيم الذاتي والداخلي للملاءمة الثقافية في المنظمات', 'fr': "L'alignement au travail\xa0: utiliser le langage pour distinguer les composantes d'internalisation et d'autorégulation de l'adéquation culturelle dans les organisations", 'ja': '職場におけるアライメント：組織における文化的適合性の内部化と自主規制の要素を区別するための言語の使用', 'zh': '其一致性:言语以别内化自我调节', 'hi': 'काम पर संरेखण: संगठनों में सांस्कृतिक फिट के आंतरिककरण और स्व-विनियमन घटकों को अलग करने के लिए भाषा का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Согласование на работе: использование языка для различения компонентов интернализации и саморегулирования культурной пригодности в организациях', 'ga': 'Ailíniú san Ionad Oibre: Teanga a Úsáid chun Idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar Inmheánú agus ar Fhéinrialú Comhpháirteanna an Chultúir in Eagraíochtaí', 'el': 'Στοίχιση στην εργασία: Χρήση της γλώσσας για να διακρίνει τα στοιχεία εσωτερικοποίησης και αυτορρύθμισης της πολιτιστικής προσαρμογής σε οργανισμούς', 'ka': 'სამუშაო დაწყება: ენის გამოყენება კულტურაციის კომპონენტების ინტერელიზაციის და თავიდან რეგულაციის კომპონენტების კომპონენტების გამოყენება', 'it': "Allineamento sul lavoro: usare il linguaggio per distinguere le componenti di internazionalizzazione e autoregolamentazione dell'adattamento culturale nelle organizzazioni", 'hu': 'Munkahelyi összehangolás: A nyelv használata a kulturális illeszkedés nemzetközi és önszabályozó komponenseinek megkülönböztetésére a szervezetekben', 'ms': 'Alignment at Work: Using Language to Distinguish the Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations', 'kk': 'Жұмыс бойынша туралау: Тілді Ұйымдастырудың ішкі және өзінің ережелерін бөлу үшін қолдану', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ: സംഘടനങ്ങളിലെ ആന്തരീക്ഷണത്തിനും സ്വയം നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന സംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെ സ്വന്തം നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങളു', 'lt': 'Darbo tvarkos suderinimas: kalbos naudojimas siekiant išskirti organizacijose pritaikytų kultūros integracijos ir savireguliavimo komponentus', 'mk': 'Распоредување на работата: Користење јазик за разлика на внатрешноста и саморегулативните компоненти на културната соодветност во организациите', 'mt': 'Allinjament fuq ix-Xogħol: Użu tal-Lingwa biex jiddistingwi l-Komponenti tal-Internizzazzjoni u l-Awtoregolazzjoni ta’ Kultura f’Organizzazzjonijiet', 'mn': 'Ажил дээр тулгуурлалт: Холбоо хэрэглэх нь Организацийн соёл төлөвлөгөөний доторх болон Өөрөөр зөвлөгөөний компонентүүдийг', 'pl': 'Dostosowanie w pracy: używanie języka do odróżnienia internalizacyjnych i samoregulacyjnych składników kulturowego dopasowania w organizacjach', 'ro': 'Alinierea la locul de muncă: folosirea limbajului pentru a distinge componentele internaționalizării și autoreglementării adaptării culturale în organizații', 'sr': 'Postavljanje na radu: korištenje jezika za razliku komponenta internalizacije i samoregulacije kulturne prilike u organizacijama', 'no': 'Justering ved arbeid: Bruk språk for å avdele internaliseringskomponentane for kulturelle tilpassar i organisasjonar', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka shaqada: Isku isticmaalka luqada kala soocsiga Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations', 'sv': 'Anpassning i arbetet: Använda språk för att skilja på de interna och självreglerande komponenterna i kulturell anpassning i organisationer', 'si': 'වැඩේ සංවිධානය: භාෂාව භාවිතා කරනවා සංවිධානයේ සංවිධානය සහ ස්වයංග්\u200dය සංවිධානයේ සංවිධාන', 'ta': 'வேலையில் ஒழுங்குப்படுத்தல்: நிறுவனங்களில் உள்ளமைப்பு மற்றும் தன்னியக்க கட்டுப்பாட்டு பகுதிகளை விலக்க பயன்படுத்தும்', 'ur': 'کاروبار پر الزام: زبان کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ سازمانیوں میں سنگتی Fit کے اندر انٹرنیزی اور خود سازمانی رغتوں کو تقسیم کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Alignment at Work: Using Language to Distinguish the Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations', 'vi': 'Liên kết với công việc: Dùng Ngôn ngữ để phân biệt các thành phần nội tâm và tự quy của các tổ chức', 'bg': 'Подравняване на работното място: използване на езика за разграничаване на интернационализацията и саморегулирането на културната годност в организациите', 'da': 'Tilpasning på arbejdspladsen: Brug af sprog til at skelne mellem internationaliserings- og selvreguleringskomponenterne i kulturel tilpasning i organisationer', 'hr': 'Postavljanje na radu: Korištenje jezika za razliku komponenta internalizacije i samopravdavanja kulturne prilike u organizacijama', 'nl': 'Uitlijning op het werk: Taal gebruiken om de internaliserings- en zelfreguleringscomponenten van Cultural Fit in organisaties te onderscheiden', 'de': 'Ausrichtung bei der Arbeit: Sprache zur Unterscheidung der Internalisierungs- und Selbstregulierungskomponenten von Cultural Fit in Organisationen', 'id': 'Penjajaran di tempat kerja: Menggunakan bahasa untuk membedakan Komponen Internalisasi dan Reguliasi Sendiri dari Kecocokan Kultur dalam Organisasi', 'ko': '작업 중의 일치성: 언어를 사용하여 조직 중의 문화적 결합의 내부화와 자기 조절 성분을 구분한다', 'fa': 'تنظیمات در کار: استفاده از زبان برای تنظیمات بخش\u200cهای داخلی و خودتنظیمات مناسب فرهنگی در سازمان\u200cها', 'sw': 'Ushiriki katika Kazi: Utumiaji wa Lugha Kupuuza Makengele ya Udhibiti na Kudhibiti wenyewe ya Utamaduni katika mashirika', 'af': 'Oplyn by Werk: Gebruik Taal om die Internisasie en Selfregulasiekomponente van Kulturaal Pas in Organisasies te bepaal', 'tr': 'Çaplanjak', 'sq': 'Rregullimi në punë: Përdorimi i gjuhës për të dalluar përbërësit e brendshëm dhe vetërregullimit të përshtatshëm kulturor në organizata', 'hy': 'Աշխատանքի ընթացքում հավասարակշռություն. Լեզու օգտագործումը կազմակերպություններում համապատասխանվող մշակութային հարմարությունների ներքին ներդրումը և ինքնավերահսկողությունը տարբերելու համար', 'az': 'İş yerində çəkiliş: Qurğul Fit Komponentlərinin İçin İşləri və Öz-düzəltmə Komponentlərini Özünü Bölüşdirmək üçün Dili istifadə etmək', 'am': 'Alignment at Work: Using Language to Distinguish the Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations', 'cs': 'Alignment v práci: Použití jazyka k rozlišení internalizačních a seberegulačních složek kulturního fit v organizacích', 'ca': "Allinjament al treball: Utilitzar llenguatge per distingir els components d'internació i autoregulació de la cultura adequada a les organitzacions", 'bn': 'কার্যক্রমের প্রতিযোগিতা: সংস্থাগুলোতে ইন্টারন্যালেশন এবং সংস্কৃতিক সংস্কৃতিক প্রতিযোগিতা বিভ্রান্ত করার জন্য ভাষা', 'fi': 'Yhdenmukaistaminen ty철el채m채ss채: Kielen k채ytt채minen kulttuurisen sopivuuden kansainv채listymisen ja itses채채ntelyn erottamiseen organisaatioissa', 'et': 'Ühtlustamine tööl: keele kasutamine organisatsioonide kultuurilise sobivuse rahvusvahelistumise ja eneseregulatsiooni komponentide eristamiseks', 'bs': 'Uspoređenje na radu: Koristenje jezika za razliku komponenta internalizacije i samoregulacije kulturne prilike u organizacijama', 'sk': 'Usklajevanje pri delu: uporaba jezika za razlikovanje komponent internalizacije in samoregulacije kulturne prilagojenosti organizacij', 'jv': 'Align at Workspace: Using Language to Distingush the', 'he': 'התאמה בעבודה: השימוש בשפה כדי להפריד את המרכיבים של הפנימיות והתנהגות עצמית של התרבות מתאימות לארגונים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Alignment at Work: Using Language to Distinguish the Internalization and Self-Regulation Components of Cultural Fit in Organizations'}
{'en': 'Cultural fit is widely believed to affect the success of individuals and the groups to which they belong. Yet it remains an elusive, poorly measured construct. Recent research draws on computational linguistics to measure cultural fit but overlooks asymmetries in cultural adaptation. By contrast, we develop a directed, dynamic measure of cultural fit based on linguistic alignment, which estimates the influence of one person’s word use on another’s and distinguishes between two enculturation mechanisms : internalization and self-regulation. We use this measure to trace employees’ enculturation trajectories over a large, multi-year corpus of corporate emails and find that patterns of alignment in the first six months of employment are predictive of individuals’ downstream outcomes, especially involuntary exit. Further predictive analyses suggest referential alignment plays an overlooked role in linguistic alignment.', 'ar': 'يُعتقد على نطاق واسع أن الملاءمة الثقافية تؤثر على نجاح الأفراد والجماعات التي ينتمون إليها. ومع ذلك ، فإنه لا يزال بناء بعيد المنال وسوء القياس. تعتمد الأبحاث الحديثة على اللغويات الحاسوبية لقياس الملاءمة الثقافية ولكنها تتجاهل التباينات في التكيف الثقافي. على النقيض من ذلك ، فإننا نطور مقياسًا ديناميكيًا موجهًا للتوافق الثقافي على أساس التوافق اللغوي ، والذي يقدر تأثير استخدام كلمة شخص ما على شخص آخر ويميز بين آليتين للتثقيف: الاستيعاب والتنظيم الذاتي. نحن نستخدم هذا المقياس لتتبع مسارات ثقافة الموظفين عبر مجموعة كبيرة ومتعددة السنوات من رسائل البريد الإلكتروني الخاصة بالشركات ، ووجدنا أن أنماط المواءمة في الأشهر الستة الأولى من العمل تنبئ بالنتائج النهائية للأفراد ، وخاصة الخروج غير الطوعي. تشير التحليلات التنبؤية الإضافية إلى أن المحاذاة المرجعية تلعب دورًا تم تجاهله في المحاذاة اللغوية.', 'es': 'Se cree ampliamente que el ajuste cultural afecta el éxito de las personas y los grupos a los que pertenecen. Sin embargo, sigue siendo una construcción esquiva y mal medida. Investigaciones recientes se basan en la lingüística computacional para medir el ajuste cultural, pero pasan por alto las asimetrías en la adaptación cultural. Por el contrario, desarrollamos una medida dirigida y dinámica del ajuste cultural basada en la alineación lingüística, que estima la influencia del uso de palabras de una persona en el de otra y distingue entre dos mecanismos de inculturación: la internalización y la autorregulación. Utilizamos esta medida para rastrear las trayectorias de inculturación de los empleados en un gran corpus de correos electrónicos corporativos de varios años y descubrimos que los patrones de alineación en los primeros seis meses de empleo predicen los resultados posteriores de las personas, especialmente las salidas involuntarias. Otros análisis predictivos sugieren que la alineación referencial desempeña un papel ignorado en la alineación lingüística.', 'pt': 'Acredita-se amplamente que o ajuste cultural afeta o sucesso dos indivíduos e dos grupos aos quais pertencem. No entanto, continua a ser um construto evasivo e mal medido. Pesquisas recentes baseiam-se na linguística computacional para medir o ajuste cultural, mas ignoram as assimetrias na adaptação cultural. Em contraste, desenvolvemos uma medida direcionada e dinâmica de ajuste cultural com base no alinhamento linguístico, que estima a influência do uso da palavra de uma pessoa no uso de outra e distingue entre dois mecanismos de enculturação: internalização e autorregulação. Usamos essa medida para rastrear as trajetórias de enculturação dos funcionários em um grande corpus de vários anos de e-mails corporativos e descobrimos que os padrões de alinhamento nos primeiros seis meses de emprego são preditivos dos resultados posteriores dos indivíduos, especialmente a saída involuntária. Outras análises preditivas sugerem que o alinhamento referencial desempenha um papel negligenciado no alinhamento linguístico.', 'fr': "On pense généralement que l'adéquation culturelle influe sur la réussite des individus et des groupes auxquels ils appartiennent. Pourtant, il s'agit d'une construction insaisissable et mal mesurée. Des recherches récentes s'appuient sur la linguistique computationnelle pour mesurer l'adéquation culturelle, mais négligent les asymétries dans l'adaptation culturelle. En revanche, nous développons une mesure dynamique et dirigée de l'adéquation culturelle basée sur l'alignement linguistique, qui estime l'influence de l'utilisation des mots d'une personne sur celle d'une autre et distingue deux mécanismes d'enculturation\xa0: l'internalisation et l'autorégulation. Nous utilisons cette mesure pour suivre les trajectoires d'enculturation des employés sur un vaste corpus pluriannuel de courriels d'entreprise et nous constatons que les modèles d'alignement au cours des six premiers mois d'emploi sont prédictifs des résultats en aval des individus, en particulier les sorties involontaires. D'autres analyses prédictives suggèrent que l'alignement référentiel joue un rôle négligé dans l'alignement linguistique.", 'zh': '人普遍认为,文契度会及群体成功。 然犹一难测,量不周之构也。 近者研用算语言学以量文契,而忽其适中之不对称性。 比之以言一致性发一直,动之以文契,度一人之单词用一人之化,而别二文之内化自我调节。 用此量以追踪员工公司电子邮件中文化养迹,并见就业之前六月,一致性式可以测下流,尤非自愿去位。 益之测分析表明,参以齐言中起被忽视之用。', 'ja': '文化的適合性は、個人とそのグループの成功に影響を与えると広く信じられています。しかしながら、それは依然として難解で、測定が不十分な構築物である。最近の研究は、文化的適合を測定するために計算言語学を利用しているが、文化的適応における非対称性を見落としている。対照的に、私たちは、言語的整列に基づいて文化的適合の指向的で動的な尺度を開発します。これは、ある人の言葉の使用が他の人の言葉に与える影響を推定し、内在化と自己調整という2つの同化メカニズムを区別します。私たちは、この尺度を使用して、企業の電子メールの大規模な複数年にわたる社員の文化的軌跡を追跡し、雇用の最初の6ヶ月におけるアライメントのパターンが、個人の下流の結果、特に非自発的な退出を予測することを発見します。さらなる予測分析は、参照的整列が言語的整列において見落とされた役割を果たすことを示唆している。', 'hi': 'सांस्कृतिक फिट व्यापक रूप से व्यक्तियों और उन समूहों की सफलता को प्रभावित करने के लिए माना जाता है जिनसे वे संबंधित हैं। फिर भी यह एक मायावी, खराब मापा निर्माण बना हुआ है। हाल के शोध सांस्कृतिक फिट को मापने के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान पर आकर्षित करते हैं लेकिन सांस्कृतिक अनुकूलन में विषमताओं को अनदेखा करते हैं। इसके विपरीत, हम भाषाई संरेखण के आधार पर सांस्कृतिक फिट का एक निर्देशित, गतिशील उपाय विकसित करते हैं, जो एक व्यक्ति के शब्द के उपयोग के प्रभाव का अनुमान लगाता है और दो संवर्धन तंत्रों के बीच अंतर करता है: आंतरिककरण और आत्म-विनियमन। हम कॉर्पोरेट ईमेल के एक बड़े, बहु-वर्षीय कॉर्पस पर कर्मचारियों के enculturation trajectories का पता लगाने के लिए इस उपाय का उपयोग करते हैं और पाते हैं कि रोजगार के पहले छह महीनों में संरेखण के पैटर्न व्यक्तियों के डाउनस्ट्रीम परिणामों, विशेष रूप से अनैच्छिक निकास की भविष्यवाणी कर रहे हैं। आगे के पूर्वानुमानित विश्लेषणों से पता चलता है कि संदर्भित संरेखण भाषाई संरेखण में एक अनदेखी भूमिका निभाता है।', 'ru': 'Широко распространено мнение о том, что культурное соответствие влияет на успех отдельных лиц и групп, к которым они принадлежат. Тем не менее, она остается неуловимой, плохо оцененной конструкцией. Недавние исследования опираются на вычислительную лингвистику для измерения культурной пригодности, но упускают из виду асимметрии в культурной адаптации. Напротив, мы разрабатываем направленную, динамическую меру культурной подгонки, основанную на лингвистическом выравнивании, которая оценивает влияние употребления слова одним человеком на другое и различает два механизма инкультивации: интернализацию и саморегулирование. Мы используем эту меру, чтобы проследить траектории инкубации сотрудников на протяжении большого, многолетнего корпуса корпоративных электронных писем и обнаружить, что модели согласования в первые шесть месяцев занятости предсказывают результаты отдельных людей, особенно недобровольный уход. Дальнейшие прогностические анализы предполагают, что эталонное выравнивание играет упущенную роль в лингвистическом выравнивании.', 'ga': 'Creidtear go forleathan go gcuireann feistiú cultúrtha isteach ar rathúlacht daoine aonair agus na ngrúpaí lena mbaineann siad. Mar sin féin is tógáil nach féidir a fháil amach agus nach bhfuil tomhaiste go maith. Tarraingíonn taighde le déanaí ar theangeolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil chun oiriúnacht chultúrtha a thomhas ach féachtar ar neamhshiméadracht in oiriúnú cultúrtha. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, forbraímid tomhas dírithe, dinimiciúil ar oiriúnacht chultúrtha bunaithe ar ailíniú teanga, a dhéanann meastachán ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag focal duine amháin ar dhaoine eile agus a dhéanann idirdhealú idir dhá mheicníocht chultúrtha: inmheánú agus féinrialú. Bainimid úsáid as an mbeart seo chun conairí saothraithe na bhfostaithe a rianú thar chorpas mór ilbhliantúil de r-phoist chorparáideacha agus aimsímid go bhfuil patrúin ailínithe sna chéad sé mhí den fhostaíocht réamh-mheasta ar thorthaí iartheachtacha daoine aonair, go háirithe imeacht ainneonach. Tugann anailísí tuarcha eile le fios go n-imríonn ailíniú tagartha ról nach bhfuiltear ag súil leis in ailíniú teanga.', 'el': 'Η πολιτιστική προσαρμογή θεωρείται ευρέως ότι επηρεάζει την επιτυχία των ατόμων και των ομάδων στις οποίες ανήκουν. Παρόλα αυτά παραμένει ένα άπιαστο, κακώς μετρημένο οικοδόμημα. Η πρόσφατη έρευνα βασίζεται στην υπολογιστική γλωσσολογία για να μετρήσει την πολιτιστική προσαρμογή, αλλά παραβλέπει τις ασυμμετρίες στην πολιτιστική προσαρμογή. Αντιθέτως, αναπτύσσουμε ένα κατευθυνόμενο, δυναμικό μέτρο πολιτιστικής προσαρμογής βασισμένο στη γλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση, το οποίο εκτιμά την επίδραση της χρήσης λέξεων ενός ατόμου στη χρήση ενός άλλου και διακρίνει δύο μηχανισμούς κουλτούρωσης: εσωτερικοποίηση και αυτορύθμιση. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτό το μέτρο για να εντοπίσουμε τις τροχιές εγκλιματισμού των εργαζομένων σε ένα μεγάλο, πολυετές σώμα εταιρικών μηνυμάτων ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου και διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα πρότυπα ευθυγράμμισης κατά τους πρώτους έξι μήνες απασχόλησης προβλέπουν τα επόμενα αποτελέσματα των ατόμων, ιδίως την ακούσια έξοδο. Περαιτέρω προβλέψιμες αναλύσεις δείχνουν ότι η αντιστοιχία αναφοράς παίζει παραβλέψιμο ρόλο στη γλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση.', 'it': "Si ritiene che l'adattamento culturale influenzi il successo degli individui e dei gruppi a cui appartengono. Eppure rimane un costrutto sfuggente, scarsamente misurato. La ricerca recente si basa sulla linguistica computazionale per misurare l'adattamento culturale, ma trascura le asimmetrie nell'adattamento culturale. Al contrario, sviluppiamo una misura diretta e dinamica di adattamento culturale basata sull'allineamento linguistico, che stima l'influenza dell'uso della parola di una persona su un'altra e distingue tra due meccanismi di inculturazione: interiorizzazione e autoregolamentazione. Usiamo questa misura per tracciare le traiettorie di inculturazione dei dipendenti su un ampio corpus pluriennale di email aziendali e scoprire che i modelli di allineamento nei primi sei mesi di occupazione sono predittivi dei risultati a valle degli individui, in particolare l'uscita involontaria. Ulteriori analisi predittive suggeriscono che l'allineamento referenziale gioca un ruolo trascurato nell'allineamento linguistico.", 'ka': 'კულტურური შესაბამისი შესაბამისათვის და ჯგუფის წარმატების შემდეგ გააკეთება. მაგრამ ეს დარჩენა უცნობიერი, ცოტა კონტრუქტურა. შემდეგ კომპუტაციური ლინგურისტიკის შესახებ კომპუტაციური შესაბამისათვის გამოყენება, მაგრამ კულტაციური ადატაციაში არიმეტრიების გადა კონტრასტიკური დამატებით, რომელიც ერთი ადამიანის სიტყვების გამოყენება სხვა ადამიანის და განსხვავებას ორი კულტურაციის მექანსის შორის: ინტერნალიზაცია და self-regulation. ჩვენ ამას გამოყენებთ სამუშაო სამუშაო კომპორაციის კოლუტურაციის ტრაექტორიების ძალიან დიდი, მრავალი წლის კოპორაციული ელფოსტის კოპორაციის კოპორაციის კოპორაციაზე და აღმოჩენებთ, რომ სამუშაო სა სხვა პროგრამეტური ანალიზების შესახებ, რომ რეფერენციალური დაწყვეტილება ინგუნგისტიკური დაწყვეტილებაში უნდა იყოს პროლია.', 'hu': 'A kulturális illeszkedés széles körben úgy vélik, hogy befolyásolja az egyének és azon csoportok sikerét, amelyekhez tartoznak. Mégis ez egy megfoghatatlan, rosszul mért konstrukció. A legutóbbi kutatások a számítástechnikai nyelvészetre támaszkodnak a kulturális illeszkedés mérésére, de figyelmen kívül hagyják a kulturális adaptáció aszimmetriáját. Ezzel szemben a nyelvi összehangoláson alapuló kulturális illeszkedés irányított, dinamikus mértékét fejlesztjük ki, amely becsüli az egyik személy szóhasználatának hatását a másikra, és megkülönbözteti két inkultúrálási mechanizmust: az internalizációt és az önszabályozást. Ezt az intézkedést arra használjuk, hogy nyomon kövessük a munkavállalók inkultúrációs pályáját a vállalati e-mailek nagy, többéves korpuszán keresztül, és megállapítsuk, hogy a foglalkoztatás első hat hónapjában az összehangolási minták előrejelzik az egyének downstream eredményeit, különösen a akaratlan kilépést. További prediktív elemzések azt sugallják, hogy a referenciaigazítás figyelmen kívül hagyott szerepet játszik a nyelvi igazításban.', 'kk': 'Мәдениеттің сәйкестігі адамдардың және топтардың сәттілігіне әсер етеді. Бірақ бұл өзгертілмеген, өзгертілмеген құрылғы қалды. Жуырдағы зерттеулердің компьютерлік лингвистикалық мәдениеттің келесін өлшеу үшін, бірақ мәдениеттің адаптациясындағы асимметриялық симметриялық көріні Әйтпесе, біз лингвистикалық түрлендіруде негізделген мәдениеттің динамикалық өлшемін жасаймыз. Бұл бір адамдың сөздерінің басқа сөздерінің пайдалануын бағалап, екі культуралау механизмінің арасындағы түрлендіру: интернелизациялау мен өз Бұл мерзімі жұмыс істегендердің көп, көп жылдық корпорациялық эл. пошта корпорациялық корпорациялық траекторияларын қарау үшін қолданып, бірінші алты ай жұмыс істеу үлгілері адамдардың төменгі нәтижелерін көрсету үшін, ос Қосымша таңдау анализациялары сілтеменің теңдеу тілдік теңдеу үшін көзгертілген рольді ойлайды.', 'mk': 'Се смета дека културната способност влијае на успехот на поединците и групите на кои припаѓаат. Сепак, останува неизбежна, лошо мерена конструкција. Неодамнешното истражување се користи од компјутативната лингвистика за мерење на културната соодветност, но ја надгледува асиметријата во културната адаптација. За разлика од тоа, ние развиваме директивна, динамична мерка на културната соодветност базирана на јазичното прилагодување, кое го проценува влијанието на употребата на зборовите на една личност на другата и го разликува меѓу двата енкултурни механизми: интернализација и саморегулација. Ние ја користиме оваа мерка за да ги следиме траекториите на анкултурата на вработените преку голем, мултигодишен корпоративен корпоративен електронски пошта и да дознаеме дека шаблоните на пристапување во првите шест месеци на вработување се предвидувачки за последните резултати на поединците, особено неволонтарно из Понатамошните претпоставувачки анализи покажуваат дека референцијалното прилагодување игра заборавена улога во јазичното прилагодување.', 'ms': 'Kecocokan budaya dipercayai secara luas mempengaruhi kejayaan individu dan kumpulan yang mereka miliki. Namun ia tetap konstruksi yang tidak jelas, yang kurang diukur. kajian baru-baru ini menggunakan bahasa komputasi untuk mengukur sesuai budaya tetapi mengabaikan asymmetri dalam penyesuaian budaya. Sebaliknya, kita mengembangkan ukuran dinamik yang direncanakan dari persamaan budaya berdasarkan penyesuaian bahasa, yang menghargai pengaruh penggunaan kata seseorang pada perkataan yang lain dan membedakan antara dua mekanisme penciptaan: internalisasi dan self-regulation. Kami menggunakan ukuran ini untuk melacak trajektori perkembangan pegawai melalui korpus besar, berbilang tahun e-mel syarikat dan mencari bahawa corak penyesuaian dalam enam bulan pertama pekerjaan adalah ramalan hasil turun individu, terutama keluar tidak sengaja. Analisis ramalan lanjut menunjukkan penyesuaian referensi bermain peran yang terlepas dalam penyesuaian bahasa.', 'lt': "Manoma, kad kultūrinis tinkamumas turi įtakos asmenų ir grupių, į kurias jie priklauso, sėkmei. Vis dėlto ji išlieka neišvengiama, prastai išmatuota konstrukcija. Naujausi moksliniai tyrimai grindžiami kompiuterine kalba kultūriniam pritaikymui matuoti, tačiau neatsižvelgiama į kultūrinio pritaikymo asimetrijas. By contrast, we develop a directed, dynamic measure of cultural fit based on linguistic alignment, which estimates the influence of one person's word use on another's and distinguishes between two enculturation mechanisms: internalization and self-regulation.  Mes naudojame šią priemonę darbuotojų kultūriniams maršrutams atsekti per didelį, daugiametį korporacinių elektroninių paštų korpusą ir nustatome, kad suderinimo modeliai per pirmuosius šešis darbo mėnesius numato asmenų tolesnius rezultatus, ypač savanorišką pasitraukimą. Tolesnės prognozuojamos analizės rodo, kad kalbų derinimo srityje nepastebėtas referencinis suderinimas.", 'ml': 'സംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിഫലം വ്യക്തികള്\u200dക്കും വിജയത്തിന്റെയും കൂട്ടങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ബാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. എന്നിട്ടും അതൊരു അളന്ന നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം. അടുത്തുള്ള പരിശോധന കണക്കൂട്ടുകണക്കിലെ ഭാഷകങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വരയ്ക്കുന്നു വ്യത്യസ്തമായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷക്കുറിച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലുള്ള സംസ്കാരത്തിലുള്ള വ്യാപാരമ്പര്യം വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അത് ഒരാളുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം മറ്റൊരാളുടെ വാക ഒരു വലിയ, പല വര്\u200dഷം മെയില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പറേറ്റിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dപ്പറേറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിക്കാരുടെ ആറു മാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ ആദ്യത്തെ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d വ്യക്തി Further predictive analyses suggest referential alignment plays an overlooked role in linguistic alignment.', 'mt': "Huwa mifhum ħafna li l-kundizzjoni kulturali taffettwa s-suċċess tal-individwi u l-gruppi li jappartjenu għalihom. Madankollu tibqa’ kostruzzjoni elużiva u mkejla ħażin. Ir-riċerka reċenti tibbaża fuq il-lingwistika komputattiva biex tkejjel l-adattament kulturali iżda tinjora l-asimetriji fl-adattament kulturali. B'kuntrast, a ħna niżviluppaw miżura diretta u dinamika ta' adattament kulturali bbażata fuq l-allinjament lingwistiku, li tistma l-influwenza tal-użu tal-kliem ta' persuna waħda fuq dak ta' persuna oħra u tiddistingwi bejn żewġ mekkaniżmi ta' enkultura: l-internalizzazzjoni u l-awtoregolazzjoni. Aħna nużaw din il-miżura biex jittraċċaw it-trajettorji tal-enkultura tal-impjegati fuq korpus kbir u multiannwali ta’ e-mails korporattivi u nsibu li xejriet ta’ allinjament fl-ewwel sitt xhur ta’ impjieg huma prevedibbli tar-riżultati downstream tal-individwi, speċjalment il-ħruġ involontarju. Analiżijiet prevedibbli ulterjuri jissuġġerixxu li l-allinjament referenzjali għandu rwol injorat fl-allinjament lingwistiku.", 'no': "Det er stort trodd på at kulturelle passar påvirkar opplysningane av individuane og gruppene dei høyrer til. Men det er likevel eit utrygt, slik målt konstruksjon. Nyleg brukte forskning teiknar på computational linguistics for å måle kulturelle passar, men oversjå asymmetrier i kulturelle tilpassingar. I contrast, we develop a direkte, dynamic measure of cultural fit based on linguistic alignment, which estimates the influence of one person's word use on another's and distinguishes between to enculturation mechanisms: internalization and self-regulation. Vi bruker denne målet for å spora arbeidsgiverens kulturasjonstraktørar over ein stor, fleirårige korporasjon av korporasjonsmeldingar og finn at mønsterelement for innretting i dei første seks månedene av arbeidsgiveren er foregåande av nedtrekksverdiane av individuelle, spesielt utgangspunkt. Dei fleire forhåndsvising tyder på at referansielle justeringa spelar ei oversikt rolle i språkstisk justering.", 'ro': 'Se crede că potrivirea culturală afectează succesul indivizilor și al grupurilor din care aparțin. Totuşi, rămâne o construcţie evazivă, slab măsurată. Cercetările recente se bazează pe lingvistica computațională pentru a măsura adaptarea culturală, dar ignoră asimetriile în adaptarea culturală. În schimb, dezvoltăm o măsură direcționată, dinamică a adaptării culturale bazată pe alinierea lingvistică, care estimează influența folosirii cuvântului unei persoane asupra celuilalt și face distincția între două mecanisme de inculturare: internalizare și autoreglementare. Folosim această măsură pentru a urmări traiectoriile de inculturare ale angajaților într-un corpus mare, multian de e-mailuri corporative și pentru a constata că modelele de aliniere în primele șase luni de angajare sunt predictive ale rezultatelor din aval ale persoanelor fizice, în special ieșirea involuntară. Analizele predictive suplimentare sugerează că alinierea referențială joacă un rol neglijat în alinierea lingvistică.', 'mn': 'Соёлын төлөвлөгөө нь хүмүүсийн амжилтын тухай нөлөөлдөг гэж боддог. Гэхдээ энэ нь үнэхээр хэмжээтэй, муу хэмжээтэй бүтэц үлдсэн. Шинэ хугацаанд судалгаа нь соёлын адилхан байдлыг хэмжихэд тооцооллын хэлний талаар тооцооллын хэлний талаар дүрслэгдсэн ч соёлын адилхан байдлын адилхан байд Харамсалтай нь, бид хэлний зэрэгцээ тогтоох соёлын шууд, динамик хэмжээг хөгжүүлдэг. Энэ нь нэг хүний үгийн хэрэглээний нөлөө бусдын хоёр соёлын механизмын хоорондоо ялгаатай байдаг. Бид ажилтнуудын урсгалын зам замыг олон жилийн корпоруз дээр ашиглаж, ажиллагааны анхны 6 сарын ажиллагааны төгсгөлийн төгсгөл нь хүмүүсийн доорх үр дүнг, ялангуяа дундаж гарах боломжтой гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Дараагийн таамаглалтын шинжилгээ нь хэлний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээнд давхар дүр зураг тоглодог.', 'si': 'සංස්කෘතිය සම්පූර්ණය විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ ඒත් ඒක නිර්මාණයෙන්, නරක විශාලයක් තියෙනවා. අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණ භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විසින් සංස්කෘතිය සම්පූර්ණ විසින් සංස්කෘ විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, සංස්කෘතික සංස්කෘතික සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳ අපි මේ මාර්ගය පාවිච්චි කරනවා විශේෂයෙන් ගොඩක් අවුරුද්ධ වර්ගයක් ගොඩක් අවුරුද්ධ වර්ගයක් ගොඩක් අවුරුද්ධ වර්ගයක් ගොඩක් අවුරුද්ධ වර්ගයක් ග තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණයක් භාෂාවික සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි', 'pl': 'Powszechnie uważa się, że dopasowanie kulturowe wpływa na sukces jednostek i grup, do których należą. Jednak pozostaje to nieuchwytny, słabo zmierzony konstrukt. Ostatnie badania opierają się na językoznawstwie obliczeniowym, aby mierzyć dopasowanie kulturowe, ale pomijają asymetrię w adaptacji kulturowej. Opracowujemy natomiast ukierunkowaną, dynamiczną miarę dopasowania kulturowego opartą na dostosowaniu językowym, która oszacowuje wpływ używania słowa jednej osoby na drugą i rozróżnia dwa mechanizmy enkulturacji: internalizację i samoregulację. Wykorzystujemy ten środek do śledzenia trajektorii enkulturacji pracowników w dużym, wieloletnim korpusie korporacyjnych wiadomości e-mail i stwierdzamy, że wzorce dostosowania się w pierwszych sześciu miesiącach zatrudnienia są predykcyjne dla wyników poszczególnych osób, zwłaszcza mimowolnego wyjścia. Dalsze analizy predykcyjne sugerują, że dopasowanie referencyjne odgrywa pomijaną rolę w dopasowaniu językowym.', 'sr': 'Kulturna pristupnost se široko veruje da utječe na uspeh pojedinaca i grupa kojima pripadaju. Ipak, ostaje nevoljna, loše izmjerena konstrukcija. Nedavno istraživanje privlači računalne lingvistike kako bi izmjerili kulturnu pristojnost, ali pregledali asimetriju u kulturnoj adaptaciji. Uspored toga, razvijamo direktnu dinamičnu mjeru kulturne sposobnosti na temelju jezičkog poravnanja, koja procjenjuje uticaj upotrebe reči jedne osobe na druge i razliku između dva mehanizma okulturacije: internalizacija i samoregulacija. Koristimo ovu mjeru da pratimo ulazne trajekte zaposlenika preko velikog, višegodišnjeg korporacije korporacijskih e-maila i saznamo da su obrasce usklađenja u prvih šest mjeseci zapošljavanja predviđeni iznutcima pojedinaca, posebno nezaposlenog izlaza. Daljnje predviđavajuće analize sugeriraju da referencijsko poravnanje igra predviđenu ulogu u jezičkom poravnanju.', 'ur': 'فرهنگی کے مطابق بہت زیادہ سمجھی جاتی ہے کہ شخصوں اور گروہوں کے کامیابی پر تاثیر کرے۔ اور یہ ایک بے وقوف اور کم اندازہ دار بنا رہا ہے اچھی تحقیقات کمپیوٹریشن زبان شناسی کے ذریعے مطابق فرهنگی کے مطابق اندازے کے لئے ڈالا جاتا ہے لیکن فرهنگی اٹھانے کے مطابق غیر برابر نظر آتا ہے. مخالفت سے، ہم ایک سیدھا، سیدھا اندازہ سیدھا، سیدھا اندازہ دیتے ہیں زبان سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی اندازہ، جو ایک شخص کے کلمات کا ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ استعم ہم اس اندازہ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں تاکہ کارمنوں کی کمپانی کے ایک بڑے، بہت سی سال کی کمپانی ایمیل کے تراکتوریوں کے پیچھے لگائیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ پہلی چھ مہینے کی کمپانی کی نمونے کس شخص کے نیچے نتیجے کی پیش بینی کر رہے ہیں، مخصوصا بغیر بغیر بغیر بیرون. اور اضافہ پیش بینی تحقیقات کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے کہ نسبت پھیلانے کی تعمیر زبان کی تعمیر میں ایک غیر نظیر رول پڑتی ہے.', 'so': 'Dhaqanka waxaa si badan looga aaminsadaa inay saameyn ku yeelaan guulaysta qofka iyo kooxaha ay leeyihiin. Habase yeeshee waxay ku jiraan dhismo aan la qiyaasay. Waxbarashada la soo dhowaaday waxay ku soo bandhigtaa luuqadaha xisaabinta si ay u qiyaasaan habka dhaqamada, laakiin waxaa lagu soo jeedaa hagaajinta dhaqamada. Iska soojeeda, waxaynu horumarinaa qiyaastii dhaqanka oo hagaysa oo ku habboon isbedelka luuqada, taasoo qiimeynaya saamaynta isticmaalka qof kale ku saabsan isticmaalka midka kale iyo kala duwanaanta labada meymisyo ku saabsan waxyaabaha lagu sameeyo: internalization iyo is-talinta. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa in aad kooban karto wadooyin ay shaqo-bixiyayaashu ay ka buuxaan emayl badan oo badan, islamarkaasna aan helno in noocyada isbedelka ah lix bilood ee ugu horraysay ee shaqadu ay tahay mid ka sii hor maraya dhamaadka hoose ee qofka, khusuusan ka baxda aan qasab lahayn. Baaritaanka la sii sheegayo oo kale waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu beddelo isku-dhigista luuqadda lagu beddelo ay leedahay qayb la xiriira.', 'sv': 'Kulturell lämplighet anses påverka framgång för individer och grupper som de tillhör. Ändå är det fortfarande en svårfångad, dåligt mätt konstruktion. Den senaste forskningen bygger på datorlingvistik för att mäta kulturell anpassning men bortser från asymmetrier i kulturell anpassning. Däremot utvecklar vi ett riktat, dynamiskt mått på kulturell anpassning baserat på språklig anpassning, som uppskattar påverkan av en persons ordanvändning på en annans och skiljer mellan två inkultureringsmekanismer: internalisering och självreglering. Vi använder denna åtgärd för att spåra medarbetarnas inkultureringsbanor över en stor, flerårig korpus av företagse-postmeddelanden och konstatera att anpassningsmönster under de första sex månaderna av anställningen är prediktiva för individers nedströms utfall, särskilt ofrivillig exit. Ytterligare prediktiva analyser tyder på att referensanpassning spelar en förbisedd roll i språklig anpassning.', 'ta': "கலாச்சார பொருத்தம் தனிப்பட்ட வெற்றியையும் குழுவையும் பாதிக்க நம்புகிறது. ஆனாலும் அது ஒரு வெறும், குறைவான அளவு கட்டமைப்பு இருக்கிறது. சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சி கலாச்சார பொருத்தம் அளவிடுவதற்கு கணிக்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளை வரைகிறது ஆனால் கலாசார மாற்றத்தில் அமர்த்து By contrast, we develop a directed, dynamic measure of cultural fit based on linguistic alignment, which estimates the influence of one person's word use on another's and distinguishes between two enculturation mechanisms: internalization and self-regulation.  ஒரு பெரிய, பல ஆண்டு நிறுவனத்தின் மின்னஞ்சல் குறியீட்டிற்கு மேல் நாம் வேலையாளர்களின் வெளியீடுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க இந்த அளவை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். முதல் ஆறு மாதங்களில் ஒதுங்கு மேலும் முன்னோக்கி ஆய்வுகள் குறிப்பு ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் ஒரு மொழிமை ஒழுங்குப்படுத்தலில் ஒதுங்குபடுத்தப்பட்ட", 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis (Яъни, эй Муҳаммад, бу ерда ажойиб эди. Yaqinda taʼminlovchi o'qituvchilar davlatni o'zgartirish uchun kompyuterlar tillarini o'zgartiradi, lekin cultural adaptarida asymmetrlarni o'zgartiradi. Ikkinchi tomonda, biz tillarda bir so'zni boshqa so'zga ishlatish va ikkita suhbat mechanislarga ajratish qo'llanmalar: internalization va o'zimni boshqarish. Biz tashkilotlarning bir necha yil elektron pochta huquqlarini o'rganish uchun shu tilni foydalanamiz va shu vazifaning birinchi lix oy ichida birinchi tashkilotlarni tasdiqlash natijalarini ishga tushunamiz, ammo o o'zimni o'zgartirish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'rganish mumkin. Koʻprodigan taʼminlovchi tarjima tilni tenglashtirishni anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Rất nhiều người tin rằng khả năng văn hóa ảnh hưởng đến thành công của cá nhân và các nhóm mà họ thuộc về. Tuy nhiên, nó vẫn là một tính toán khó nắm bắt. Nghiên cứu gần đây dựa trên tính to án ngôn ngữ để đo mức độ văn hóa nhưng vượt qua được sự phù hợp văn hóa. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi phát triển một thước đo nhiệt độ văn hóa trực tiếp dựa trên s ự phối hợp ngôn ngữ, ước tính tác động từ ngữ của người này lên người kia và phân biệt giữa hai quy tắc thôi thúc: liên hệ và tự quy định. Chúng tôi sử dụng biện pháp này để theo dõi quỹ dẫn dẫn dẫn của nhân viên trên một tập đoàn lớn, đa năm đầy các email tập đoàn và thấy rằng các mô hình sự thẳng hàng trong vòng sáu tháng đầu của việc làm là dự đoán về kết quả xuôi dòng của cá nhân, đặc biệt là lối thoát vô ý thức. Thêm các phân tích dự đoán khác cho thấy việc nối tiếp không được chú ý đến trong việc sắp xếp ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Широко се смята, че културната годност влияе върху успеха на индивидите и групите, към които принадлежат. И все пак тя остава неуловима, слабо измерена конструкция. Последните изследвания се основават на компютърна лингвистика за измерване на културната пригодност, но пренебрегват асиметриите в културната адаптация. За разлика от това, ние разработваме насочена, динамична мярка на културната пригодност, базирана на лингвистичното подравняване, която оценява влиянието на употребата на думите на един човек върху употребата на друг и разграничава два механизма на енкултурация: интернализация и саморегулиране. Използваме тази мярка, за да проследим екултурационните траектории на служителите в голям многогодишен корпоративен корпус от имейли и да установим, че моделите на привеждане в съответствие през първите шест месеца на заетостта предсказват резултатите на лицата надолу по веригата, особено неволното напускане. Допълнителни прогнозни анализи показват, че референтното подравняване играе пренебрегвана роля в лингвистичното подравняване.', 'nl': 'Men gelooft dat culturele fit invloed heeft op het succes van individuen en de groepen waartoe zij behoren. Toch blijft het een ongrijpbare, slecht gemeten constructie. Recent onderzoek maakt gebruik van computerlinguïstiek om culturele fit te meten, maar vergeet asymmetrieën in culturele adaptatie. Daarentegen ontwikkelen we een gerichte, dynamische maatstaf van culturele fit op basis van taalkundige alignment, die de invloed van het woordgebruik van de ene persoon op die van de ander schat en onderscheid maakt tussen twee enculturatiemechanismen: internalisering en zelfregulering. We gebruiken deze maatregel om de enculturatietrajecten van werknemers te traceren over een groot, meerjarig corpus van zakelijke e-mails en stellen vast dat patronen van afstemming in de eerste zes maanden van werk voorspellen de downstream resultaten van individuen, met name onvrijwillige exit. Verdere voorspellende analyses suggereren dat referentiële uitlijning een over het hoofd gezien rol speelt in linguïstische uitlijning.', 'da': 'Kulturel tilpasning menes bredt at påvirke enkeltpersoners og de grupper, de tilhører. Men det er stadig en undvigende, dårligt målt konstruktion. Nylig forskning trækker på computational lingvistik til at måle kulturel tilpasning, men overser asymmetrier i kulturel tilpasning. Derimod udvikler vi et direkte, dynamisk mål for kulturel tilpasning baseret på sproglig tilpasning, som vurderer indflydelsen af en persons ordbrug på en andens og sondrer mellem to enkultureringsmekanismer: internalisering og selvregulering. Vi bruger denne foranstaltning til at spore medarbejdernes enkultureringsbaner over et stort, flerårigt korpus af virksomheds e-mails og finde ud af, at tilpasningsmønstre i de første seks måneder af beskæftigelsen forudsiger enkeltpersoners efterfølgende resultater, især ufrivilligt exit. Yderligere prædiktive analyser tyder på, at referential justering spiller en overset rolle i sproglig justering.', 'hr': 'Kulturna pristojnost se široko smatra utjecajem na uspjeh pojedinaca i grupa kojima pripadaju. Ipak, ostaje nevjerojatna, loše mjerena konstrukcija. Nedavno istraživanje privlači računalne lingvistike za mjerenje kulturne pristojnosti, ali pregleda asimetrije u kulturnoj adaptaciji. Naprotiv, razvijamo usmjerenu dinamičnu mjeru kulturne pristojnosti na temelju jezičkog poravnanja, koja procjenjuje utjecaj upotrebe riječi jedne osobe na druge i različita između dva mehanizma okulturacije: internalizacija i samoregulacija. Koristimo ovu mjeru kako bi pratili ulazne trajekte zaposlenika preko velikog, višegodišnjeg korporacije korporacijskih e-maila i pronašli da su obrasce usklađenja u prvih šest mjeseci zaposlenja predviđali iznose pojedinaca, posebno neposrednog izlaza. Daljnje predviđavajuće analize ukazuju na referencijsko poravnanje igra nadgledanu ulogu u jezičkom poravnanju.', 'ko': '사람들은 문화적 결합이 개인과 그 소속 단체의 성공에 영향을 미칠 것이라고 보편적으로 생각한다.그러나 그것은 여전히 파악하기 어렵고 측정이 정확하지 않은 구조이다.최근의 연구는 계산언어학을 이용하여 문화적 적응을 평가하지만 문화적 적응의 비대칭을 소홀히 했다.그에 비해 우리는 언어가 일치하는 방향, 동태적인 문화적 결합도 측정 방법을 개발했다. 이 방법은 한 사람의 어휘 사용이 다른 사람에게 미치는 영향을 평가하고 두 가지 문화 융합 메커니즘인 내재화와 자기 조절을 구분했다.우리는 이 지표를 이용하여 대형, 다년간의 회사 전자메일 자료 라이브러리에서 직원들의 융합 궤적을 추적하여 취업 6개월 전에 융합 모델은 개인의 하위 결과, 특히 비자발적인 이직을 예측할 수 있음을 발견했다.진일보한 예측 분석에 의하면 지칭 정렬은 언어 정렬에서 무시되는 작용을 한다.', 'de': 'Es wird allgemein angenommen, dass kultureller Fit den Erfolg von Einzelpersonen und den Gruppen, denen sie angehören, beeinflusst. Dennoch bleibt es ein schwer fassbares, schlecht gemessenes Konstrukt. Neuere Forschungen stützen sich auf computergestützte Linguistik, um kulturelle Passung zu messen, übersehen jedoch Asymmetrien in der kulturellen Anpassung. Im Gegensatz dazu entwickeln wir ein gerichtetes, dynamisches Maß kultureller Passung basierend auf sprachlicher Ausrichtung, das den Einfluss des Wortgebrauchs eines Menschen auf den anderen abschätzt und zwischen zwei Enkulturationsmechanismen unterscheidet: Internalisierung und Selbstregulierung. Wir nutzen diese Maßnahme, um die Enkulturationsverläufe der Mitarbeiter über einen großen, mehrjährigen Korpus von Unternehmens-E-Mails zu verfolgen und stellen fest, dass Ausrichtungsmuster in den ersten sechs Monaten der Beschäftigung Vorhersagen für die nachgelagerten Ergebnisse von Einzelpersonen sind, insbesondere unfreiwilligen Austritt. Weitere prädiktive Analysen deuten darauf hin, dass die referenzielle Ausrichtung bei der sprachlichen Ausrichtung eine übersehene Rolle spielt.', 'fa': 'مثال فرهنگی به وسیله اعتقاد دارد که موفقیت فرد و گروهی که به آن تعلق دارند تأثیر دهد. ولی این ساختمان بی\u200cگمان و بد اندازه\u200cگیری باقی ماند. تحقیقات اخیرا روی زبان\u200cشناسی محاسباتی برای اندازه\u200cگیری مناسب فرهنگی کشیده می\u200cشود ولی در تغییرات فرهنگی نابرابری را فراموش می\u200cکند. بر خلاف این، ما یک اندازه\u200cای راهنمایی و دینامیک فرهنگی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس تنظیم زبان\u200cشناسی است، که تأثیر استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای یک شخص بر اساس یک شخص دیگر تأثیر می\u200cدهد و میان دو مکانیسم\u200cهای تنظیم: اینترنتیزی و تنظیم خودخواهی. ما از این اندازه استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مسیرهای جامعه\u200cگیری کارمندان را بر روی یک شرکت بزرگ، چند سال از ایمیل\u200cهای شرکتی دنبال کنیم و می\u200cبینیم که الگوهای تطبیعی در شش ماه اول کارمندان از نتایج پایین افراد پیش بینی می\u200cکنند، مخصوصاً بیرون رفتن غیرقابل تو تحلیل پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای دیگر پیشنهاد پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که تعیین\u200cکننده\u200cی گزارش\u200cکننده نقشه\u200cای در تعیین زبان\u200cشناسی فراموش می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Kecocokan budaya sangat dipercaya mempengaruhi sukses individu dan kelompok yang mereka miliki. Namun itu tetap konstruksi yang tidak jelas, yang kurang diukur. Penelitian baru-baru ini menggunakan bahasa komputasi untuk mengukur sesuai budaya tetapi mengabaikan asimetri dalam adaptasi budaya. Sebaliknya, kita mengembangkan ukuran dinamik yang direksi dari persamaan budaya berdasarkan persamaan bahasa, yang memperkirakan pengaruh dari penggunaan kata seseorang pada yang lain dan membedakan antara dua mekanisme enkulturasi: internalisasi dan self-regulation. Kami menggunakan ukuran ini untuk melacak trajektori perkembangan karyawan melalui korpus besar, multi-tahun email perusahaan dan menemukan bahwa pola penyesuaian dalam enam bulan pertama pekerjaan adalah prediksi hasil turun individu, terutama keluar tidak sengaja. Analisi prediksi lanjut menunjukkan alignment referensi bermain peran yang terlepas dalam alignment bahasa.', 'tr': 'Milletýet ýagdaýynyň adamlaryň we toparlaryň başarnygyna täsirlejek bolmagyna köp ynanýar. Yine de bu şekilde bozgunça ölçüli bir inşaat kalıyor. Ýakyndaky araştyrmalar kalkular lingwistiklerini kültürel derjesini ölçürmek üçin çykýar, ýöne kültürel adaptasynda asymetriýa ýok. Iň garşyňa seredeniňde, biz dil çyzygynda daýanýan, dinamik ölçüsi bir adamyň s özüniň ýerini başga biriniň sözleriniň täsirini tapýar we iki kültürleme meýdançasynyň arasynda taparlaýarys: daýanýa şmak we özüni düzenleme. Biz bu çölegi işgärlerin kültürleşik traktörlerini uly, köp ýyl korpoçy e-mailleriň ýüzünde gözlemek üçin ullanýarys we bu çölegi ilkinji 6 a ýynyň işgärlikleriniň düzümlenmesi bolup adamlaryň indiki aşagynyň netijesini gözden geçirmek üçin ullanýarys. Daha gowy çaklanan çözümler çykyşyň referensiýaly çykyşyň dil çykyşynda göz öňe golaýlaýar.', 'sw': 'Matukio ya kitamaduni yanaaminika sana kuathiri mafanikio ya watu na makundi yanayomilikiwa. Bado bado inabaki jengo lisilo na uzito kidogo. Utafiti wa hivi karibuni unazungumzia lugha za kompyuta ili kurekebisha hali ya kiutamaduni lakini hupitia wasiwasi katika mabadiliko ya kitamaduni. Kwa tofauti na hilo, tunaendelea hatua ya moja kwa moja na yenye msimamo wa kiutamaduni kwa kutumia sura ya lugha, ambayo inakadiria athari ya matumizi ya neno la mtu mmoja kwenye matumizi ya mwingine na kutofautisha kati ya mfumo miwili wa ujamaduni: utaratibu wa ndani na kudhibiti nafsi zao. Tunatumia hatua hii ili kutafuta maeneo ya mashambulizi ya wafanyakazi kwa zaidi ya viungo vikubwa vya barua pepe za miaka mingi na kutafuta kwamba namna ya kuunganisha kwa miezi sita ya mwanzo wa ajira ni kutabiri matokeo ya watu wa chini ya mto, hasa ya kuondoka kwa watu wasio na uhuru. Uchambuzi zaidi wa utabiri unaonyesha kuwa usambazaji wa maana unacheza nafasi ya kutolewa kwa lugha.', 'sq': 'Përaftësia kulturore besohet gjerësisht se ndikon në suksesin e individëve dhe grupeve në të cilët ata i përkasin. Megjithatë, ajo mbetet një ndërtesë e pamundur dhe e matur keq. Kërkimi i fundit mbështetet në gjuhën llogaritare për të matur përshtatjen kulturore por harron asimetritë në përshtatjen kulturore. Përkundrazi, ne zhvillojmë një masë të drejtuar dhe dinamike të përshtatshmërisë kulturore bazuar në përshtatjen gjuhësore, e cila vlerës on ndikimin e përdorimit të fjalës s ë një personi në të tjerin dhe dallon midis dy mekanizmave të enkulturës: internalizimit dhe vetërregullimit. Ne përdorim këtë masë për të gjurmuar trajektoret e inkulturimit të punonjësve nëpërmjet një korpusi të madh, shumëvjeçar e-mails korporatore dhe gjejmë se modelet e përshtatjes në gjashtë muajt e parë të punësimit janë parashikuese të rezultateve të individëve poshtë rrjedhës, veçanërisht daljes së paaftë. Further predictive analyses suggest referential alignment plays an overlooked role in linguistic alignment.', 'af': "Kultuurlike pas is baie geloof om die sukses van individuele en die groepe na wat hulle behoort. Maar dit bly 'n ongelukkige, ongelukkige gemeet konstruksie. Onlangste verondersoek teken op rekenasielike lingvistike om kulturele pas te maak, maar oorskou asymmetries in kulturele aanpassing. By kontras ontwikkel on s 'n direkte, dinamiese maat van kulturele pas gebaseer op lingwisiese oplyn, wat die influens van een persoon se woord gebruik op 'n ander se en uitvee tussen twee inkulturasie mekanisme: internalisasie en self-regulasie. Ons gebruik hierdie maat om arbeidsgenote trajektories oor 'n groot, veelvuldige korporasie van korporatiese e-pos te soek en vind dat patrone van belyning in die eerste ses maande van arbeid voorskou is van individuele se onderstreemde uitgaande, spesiaal ongelukkige uitgaan. Verdere voorskoude analiserings stel verwysing van verwysing oplyn 'n oorskoude rol in lingwisiese oplyn.", 'hy': "Կարծում է, որ մշակութային համապատասխանությունը ազդում է անհատների և խմբերի հաջողության վրա, ում նրանք պատկանում են: Yet it remains an elusive, poorly measured construct.  Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնված են համակարգչային լեզվաբանության վրա, որպեսզի չափեն մշակութային համապատասխանությունը, բայց նայում են մշակութային ադապտացիայի անհամաչափություններին: Դրան հակառակ, մենք զարգանում ենք մշակութային համապատասխանության ուղղակի, դինամիկ չափումը, հիմնված լեզվաբանական համապատասխանման վրա, որը գնահատում է մեկ անձի բառի օգտագործման ազդեցությունը մյուսի վրա և տարբերակում է երկու մշակութային մեխանիզմների միջև' ներքին կառու Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս չափումը աշխատակիցների մշակութային ճանապարհների հետևելու համար կորպորատիվ էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային նամակների մեծ, բազմատարեկան կորպորատիվ միջոցով և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ աշխատանքի առաջին վեց ամիսների ընթացքում հարմարեցման ձևերը կանխատեսում են անհատնե Ավելի կանխատեսողական վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ հեռախոսական հարմարեցումը լեզվաբանական հարմարեցության մեջ անտեսված դեր է խաղում:", 'am': 'የባሕል ግንኙነት የግንኙነታቸውን እና የሆኑ ቡድሮች በመጠቀም ይታሰራል፡፡ ነገር ግን የተለየና የተለካ የግንብ ግንብ ይኖራል። Recent research draws on computational linguistics to measure cultural fit but overlooks asymmetries in cultural adaptation.  በተለየው፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተግባር ላይ የተመሳሳይ፣ የአንድ ሰው ቃል በሌላው ስር ላይ የሚጠቀም እና በሁለት ስርዓት አካላት መካከል የሚለይ የባሕላዊ ጉዳይ ማሰናከል እና የራሳቸውን ሥርዓት ይቆጥራል፡፡ የሠራተኞችን የድምፅ ውጤቶች በብዙ ዓመት የኮርፖርት ኢሜይል የኮርፖርት ኢሜይል ላይ ለመግለጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የምስታወቀው ትምህርት ማተሚያዎች የህዝባዊ ክፍል በቋንቋዊው ተቃውሞ ላይ ተለይቶ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Kültür uyğunluğu insanların və qrupların başarısına müvafiq edəcəklərinə inanılır. Halbuki o, çətin və çətin ölçülü bir inşaat saxlanır. Son araştırmalar, mədəniyyəti uyğunluğunu ölçürmək üçün bilgisayar dilində çəkir, lakin mədəniyyəti uyğunlaşdırmaqla asimetriyə baxır. Əksinə, biz dillərin tərəfindən istifadə edilməsini təmin edir və iki kültürlük mehānisminin arasındakı təsirlərini təmin edir: internalizasyon və özünün tərəfindən təsirlərini təmin edir. Biz bu ölçünü çalışanların kültür yollarını böyük, çoxlu il korporatlı e-maillərin üstündə izləmək üçün istifadə edirik və ilk altı ay istifadə etmək şəkillərinin indirlərin indirlərin a şağı sonuçlarını, özlərinə də səbəbdən çıxması üçün təmin edirik. Daha çox tədbir analizələri, dillərin tərəfdarlıqlarında dəyişiklik tərəfdarlıqlarının çox gözəl rolünü göstərir.', 'bn': 'সাংস্কৃতিক যুক্তি ব্যাপক ভাবে বিশ্বাস করা হচ্ছে যে ব্যক্তি এবং তাদের সাফল্যের প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে। কিন্তু এটা একটি অদ্ভুত, খুব কম পরিমাপ নির্মাণ। সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা সাংস্কৃতিক যোগ্যতা মাপের জন্য গণনার ভাষায় আঁকছে, কিন্তু সাংস্কৃতিক সংস্কৃতিক আপডেটমিটির বিপরীতে, আমরা ভাষার সাথে ভিত্তিক সংস্কৃতির মাধ্যমে নির্দেশিত এবং নির্দেশিত মাধ্যমে সাংস্কৃতিক যোগাযোগের পরিমাণ উন্নয়ন করি, যা এক ব্যক্তির শব্দ ব্যবহারের প্রভাব হিসেবে হ আমরা এই পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করি একটি বিশাল, বহু বছরের কোর্পোরেট ইমেইলের উপর কর্মকর্তাদের আক্রমণের পথ চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এবং প্রথম ছয় মাসের চাকুরীর প্রাথমিক প্রতিষ্ঠানের মাধ্যমে প্রতিষ আরো ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী বিশ্লেষণের পরামর্শ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে যে গণতান্ত্রিক সমন্বয়ে ভূমিকা পালন করে।', 'cs': 'Všeobecně se předpokládá, že kulturní fit ovlivňuje úspěch jednotlivců a skupin, do nichž patří. Přesto zůstává nepolapitelným, špatně měřeným konstruktem. Nedávný výzkum využívá výpočetní lingvistiky k měření kulturní fit, ale přehlíží asymetrie v kulturní adaptaci. Naproti tomu vyvíjíme řízené, dynamické měřítko kulturní paměti založené na jazykovém uspořádání, které odhaduje vliv užívání slova jednoho člověka na druhého a rozlišuje mezi dvěma enculturačními mechanismy: internalizací a seberegulací. Toto opatření používáme k sledování enkulturačních trajektorií zaměstnanců v rámci velkého, víceletého korpusu firemních e-mailů a zjišťujeme, že vzorce sladění v prvních šesti měsících zaměstnání prediktivní výsledky jednotlivců, zejména nedobrovolného odchodu. Další prediktivní analýzy naznačují, že referenční zarovnání hraje přehlíženou roli v lingvistickém zarovnání.', 'bs': 'Kulturna prilika se široko smatra da utječe na uspjeh pojedinaca i grupa kojima pripadaju. Ipak, ostaje nevjerojatna, loše mjerena konstrukcija. Nedavno istraživanje privlači računalne lingvistike kako bi mjerili kulturnu pristojnost, ali pregledali asimetriju u kulturnoj adaptaciji. Naprotiv, razvijamo direktnu dinamičnu mjeru kulturne pristojnosti na temelju jezičkog poravnanja, koja procjenjuje utjecaj upotrebe riječi jedne osobe na druge i različita između dva mehanizma okulturacije: internalizacija i samoregulacija. Koristimo ovu mjeru da pratimo ulazne trajekte zaposlenika preko velikog, višegodišnjeg korporacije korporacijskih e-maila i pronađemo da su obrasce usklađenja u prvih šest mjeseci zaposlenja predvidljivi iznosi pojedinaca, posebno neposrednog izlaza. Daljnje predviđavajuće analize sugeriraju da referencijsko poravnanje igra predviđenu ulogu u jezičkom poravnanju.', 'et': 'Arvatakse laialdaselt, et kultuuriline sobivus mõjutab üksikisikute ja rühmade edukust, kuhu nad kuuluvad. Ometi on see põgenematu, halvasti mõõdetud konstruktsioon. Hiljutised uuringud tuginevad arvutuslingvistikale kultuurilise sobivuse mõõtmiseks, kuid jätavad tähelepanuta kultuurilise kohanemise asümmeetriat. Seevastu töötame välja suunatud, dünaamilise kultuurilise sobivuse mõõtmise, mis põhineb keelelisel ühtlustamisel, mis hindab ühe inimese sõnakasutuse mõju teisele ning eristab kahte enkultuurimismehhanismi: sisemise ja eneseregulatsiooni vahel. Me kasutame seda meedet selleks, et jälgida töötajate enkulturatsiooni trajektooreid suure, mitmeaastase korpuse kaudu ettevõtete e-kirjadest ning leiame, et tööhõive esimese kuue kuu jooksul toimuvad vastavusmudelid ennustavad üksikisikute järgnevaid tulemusi, eriti tahtmatut lahkumist. Edasised prognoosivad analüüsid näitavad, et viitejoondusel on keelelises joonduses tähelepanuta jäetud roll.', 'fi': 'Kulttuurisen sopivuuden uskotaan yleisesti vaikuttavan yksilöiden ja niiden ryhmien menestykseen, joihin he kuuluvat. Silti se on vaikeasti mitattu rakenne. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset perustuvat laskennalliseen kielitieteeseen kulttuurisen sopivuuden mittaamiseen, mutta eivät huomioi kulttuurisen sopeutumisen epäsymmetrioita. Sen sijaan kehitämme kielelliseen linjaukseen perustuvan suunnatun, dynaamisen kulttuurisen sopivuuden mittarin, joka arvioi yhden sanan käytön vaikutusta toisen kieleen ja erottaa toisistaan kaksi enkulttuurimekanismia: sisäistäminen ja itsesääntely. Käytämme tätä toimenpidettä jäljittääksemme työntekijöiden enkulttuurisuuspolkuja suuren, monivuotisen yrityssähköpostin kautta ja havaitsimme, että linjausmenetelmät ensimmäisten kuuden kuukauden aikana ennakoivat yksilöiden loppupään tuloksia, erityisesti tahatonta poistumista. Ennustettavat analyysit viittaavat siihen, että viitelinjauksella on sivuutettu rooli kielellisessä linjauksessa.', 'ca': "Es creu que l'aptitud cultural afecta l'èxit dels individus i dels grups als quals pertanyen. Però encara és un construct elusiv i mal mesurat. La recent recerca es basa en la lingüística computacional per mesurar l'aptitud cultural però ignora les asimetries en l'adaptació cultural. En canvi, desenvolupem una mesura directa i dinàmica de la adaptació cultural basada en l'alliniament lingüístic, que estima l'influència de l'ús de paraules d'una person a en l'altre i distingeix entre dos mecanismes de cultiu: internalizació i autoregulació. Utilitzem aquesta mesura per rastrear les trajectòries d'encultura dels treballadors a través d'un gran corpus multianual de correus electrònics corporatius i descobrim que els patrons d'allinjament en els primers sis mesos d'ocupació són preditius dels resultats avall dels individus, especialment la sortida involuntària. Further predictive analyses suggest referential alignment plays an overlooked role in linguistic alignment.", 'jv': 'Kulturahang pas karo hal-hal nganggep kuwi susahe perbudhakan lan kelompok kuwi padha sing ngejaraké. Nyong-ngopo saiki luwih dumateng, njuk-uwis metus gak. R Tulung wigatining langgar Awak dhéwé nglanggar wigatining perbudhakan kanggo ngelambang barang dumadhi winih, nik akeh lan alah sing itlané kabèh dumadhi podho sing nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi iki bakal ngelambang alah sing sampek kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan winih sing nguasai perbudhakan winih dumadhi winih Dijejer-jejer atualizasi sing paling nggawe barang nggawe Ngubah luwih bantuan ingkang nggawe', 'sk': 'Široko verjamemo, da kulturno prilagajanje vpliva na uspeh posameznikov in skupin, v katere pripadajo. Vendar ostaja izmuzljiv, slabo izmerjen konstrukt. Nedavne raziskave temeljijo na računalniškem jezikoslovju za merjenje kulturne prilagoditve, vendar spregledajo asimetrije v kulturni prilagoditvi. Nasprotno pa razvijamo usmerjeno, dinamično merilo kulturne prilagojenosti, ki temelji na jezikovni poravnavi, ki ocenjuje vpliv ene osebe uporabe besed na druge osebe in razlikuje med dvema enkulturacijskima mehanizmoma: internalizacijo in samoregulacijo. Ta ukrep uporabljamo za sledenje enkulturacijskih poti zaposlenih v velikem, večletnem korpusu poslovnih e-poštnih sporočil in ugotavljamo, da vzorci usklajevanja v prvih šestih mesecih zaposlitve napovedujejo rezultate posameznikov na koncu verige, zlasti neprostovoljni izstop. Nadaljnje napovedne analize kažejo, da ima referenčna poravnava spregledano vlogo pri jezikovni poravnavi.', 'ha': "Kikunci na amince a widespread da za su yi amfani da mafanicin mutane da ƙungiyõyin da suke cikinsu. Alhãli kuwa ita, haƙĩƙa, gidãje ne abin ƙaddarãwa. A yanzu karatun littafan na lissafi na lissafa ko da za'a iya ƙayyade abincin kultur, kuma yana sami asymmetiya a cikin adadin tamaduni. Ina motsa, sai mu buɗa wani gwargwadon da aka shiryar da shi a kan fassarar kultur a kan sura'in lingui, wanda yana ƙaddara muhimmin maganar wani mutum ya yi amfani da shi a kan wani na'anin kuma yana rarraba a tsakanin matsayin biyu masu fasihi: intake da kansa. We use this measure to trace employees' enculturation trajectories over a large, multi-year corpus of corporate emails and find that patterns of alignment in the first six months of employment are predictive of individuals' downstream outcomes, especially involuntary exit.  Ana ƙidãya masu basĩra yana son juyi ga juyi cikin linguin.", 'he': 'התאימה תרבותית מאמינה באופן רחב להשפיע על הצלחה של האדם והקבוצות אליהם הם שייכים. ועדיין הוא נשאר בניין בלתי ברור ומדוד גרוע. המחקר האחרון ממשיך על שפת מחשב כדי למדוד התאימה תרבותית, אך מתעלם מאסימטריות בהתאמה תרבותית. בניגוד לזה, אנחנו מפתחים מדידה מיוקדת, דינמית של התאמה תרבותית מבוססת על התאמה לשונתית, שמערכת את השפעה של השימוש במילים של אדם אחד על השני, ומבדקת בין שני מנגנונים התרבות: הפנימיות והריגול עצמי. אנו משתמשים במידה זו כדי לאתר מסלולי התרבות של העובדים מעל גוף גדול, רב שנה של דואר אלקטרוני תאגידים ומוצאים שדפוסים של התאמה בשש החודשים הראשונים של העבודה הם צפויים של תוצאות המדרגות של האדם, במיוחד יציאה לא רצינית. ניתוחים צפויים נוספים מצביעים שההתאמה רפורנציאלית משחקת תפקיד מועלמת בתאמה שפתית.', 'bo': 'རིག་སྲོལ་དང་ཚོ་ཁག་ཚོ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་པ་ལ་ཡིད་ཆེན་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལྡན་མིན་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཞིག་རེད། འཕྲལ་ཁམས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་པས་རྩིས་རིག་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་ཐད་ཀར་བའི་ལམ་སྲོལ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ། ང་ཚོས་ལས་འབོར་གྱི་སྦྱོར་བའི་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ལས་རིམ་ལ་ལས་ཀྱང་བའི་ཚད་འདིར་སྤྱད་ནས། སྔོན་ལྟའི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་གཞན་ལས་སྔོན་ལྟའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཕྲེང་མཐོང་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Representations of language in a model of visually grounded speech signal', 'ar': 'تمثيلات اللغة في نموذج لإشارة الكلام المؤرضة بصريًا', 'fr': 'Représentations du langage dans un modèle de signal vocal visuellement ancré', 'es': 'Representaciones del lenguaje en un modelo de señal de voz con base visual', 'pt': 'Representações da linguagem em um modelo de sinal de fala visualmente fundamentado', 'ja': '視覚的に接地された発話信号のモデルにおける言語の表現', 'zh': '视觉接地语音信号模形中语', 'hi': 'नेत्रहीन आधारित भाषण संकेत के एक मॉडल में भाषा का प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'Представления языка в модели визуально обоснованного речевого сигнала', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin teanga i múnla de chomhartha cainte atá bunaithe ar fhís', 'hu': 'A nyelv ábrázolása vizuálisan földelt beszédjel modelljében', 'el': 'Αντιπροσωπείες της γλώσσας σε ένα μοντέλο οπτικά γειωμένου σήματος ομιλίας', 'ka': 'ვიზუალურად ფონტური სიგნალის მოდელში ენის გამოსახულებები', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni del linguaggio in un modello di segnale vocale visivamente a terra', 'kk': 'Тілді көрініс негіздеген сөйлесу сигналының үлгісінде таңдау', 'ms': 'Perwakilan bahasa dalam model isyarat ucapan berasaskan secara visual', 'lt': 'Kalbos atstovavimai vaizdu pagrįsto kalbos signalo modelyje', 'mk': 'Претставувања на јазикот во модел на визуелно основан говорен сигнал', 'ml': 'കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ സംസാര സിഗ്നലിന്റെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-lingwa f’mudell ta’ sinjal viżwalment ibbażat fuq id-diskors', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн үндсэн илтгэлийн загвар дээр', 'ro': 'Reprezentări ale limbajului într-un model de semnal vocal împământat vizual', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje języka w modelu wizualnie uziemionego sygnału mowy', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Predstavljanja jezika u modelu vizualno osnovanog govornog signal a', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Ku soo celinta luqada tusaale ahaan sawirka hadalka ee muuqata', 'sv': 'Representationer av språk i en modell av visuellt jordad talsignal', 'ta': 'பார்வைக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சு கையெழுத்தின் மாதிரியின் பிரதிதிகள்', 'ur': 'زبان کی روشنی کی نمونڈل میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ tượng trưng trong mô hình của tín hiệu ngôn ngữ hình ảnh', 'bg': 'Представления на езика в модел на визуално заземен речен сигнал', 'hr': 'Predstavljanja jezika u modelu vizualno osnovanog govornog signal a', 'nl': 'Vertegenwoordigingen van taal in een model van visueel geaard spraaksignaal', 'da': 'Repræsentationer af sprog i en model af visuelt jordbaseret talesignal', 'ko': '시각 접지 음성 신호 모델에서의 언어 표시', 'id': 'Perwakilan bahasa dalam model sinyal pidato secara visual', 'de': 'Repräsentationen der Sprache in einem Modell des visuell geerdeten Sprachsignals', 'fa': 'نمایش زبان در یک مدل سیگنال سخنرانی بنیادی دیده', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya lugha katika mfano wa ishara ya hotuba yenye kuonekana', 'tr': 'Dil görkezilen çykyş sinyalynda görkezilmeli', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የቋንቋ መልዕክቶች በአየር ቋንቋ ሲንጋል ምሳሌ', 'sq': 'Përfaqjet e gjuhës në një model sinjali të fjalimit të bazuar vizualisht', 'hy': 'Լեզվի ներկայացումները տեսողական հիմնված խոսքի ազդանշանի մոդելի մեջ', 'ca': 'Representacions del llenguatge en un model de senyal visual', 'az': 'G칬r칲n칲rl칲 s칬z sinyall톛rinin modelind톛 dill톛rin imzalar캼', 'bn': 'Representations of language in a model of visually grounded speech signal', 'bs': 'Predstavljanja jezika u modelu vizualno osnovanog govornog signal a', 'cs': 'Reprezentace jazyka v modelu vizuálně uzemněného řečového signálu', 'et': 'Keele esindused visuaalselt maandatud kõnesignaali mudelis', 'fi': 'Kielen representaatiot visuaalisesti maadoitetun puhesignaalin mallissa', 'jv': 'repréentasi lang nèng modèl kuwi sawar nggawe', 'ha': 'Repositori of language in an example of an gane-based voice', 'sk': 'Reprezentacije jezika v modelu vizualno ozemljenega govornega signala', 'he': 'מייצגים של שפה במודל של אות נאום מקורקע מבחינה ראייתית', 'bo': 'Representations of language in a model of visually grounded speech signal'}
{'en': 'We present a visually grounded model of speech perception which projects spoken utterances and images to a joint semantic space. We use a multi-layer recurrent highway network to model the temporal nature of spoken speech, and show that it learns to extract both form and meaning-based linguistic knowledge from the input signal. We carry out an in-depth analysis of the representations used by different components of the trained model and show that encoding of semantic aspects tends to become richer as we go up the hierarchy of layers, whereas encoding of form-related aspects of the language input tends to initially increase and then plateau or decrease.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo visualmente fundamentado de percepção da fala que projeta enunciados falados e imagens para um espaço semântico conjunto. Usamos uma rede de rodovias recorrentes de várias camadas para modelar a natureza temporal da fala falada e mostramos que ela aprende a extrair conhecimento linguístico baseado em forma e significado do sinal de entrada. Realizamos uma análise aprofundada das representações utilizadas por diferentes componentes do modelo treinado e mostramos que a codificação de aspectos semânticos tende a se tornar mais rica à medida que subimos na hierarquia de camadas, enquanto a codificação de aspectos relacionados à forma da entrada da linguagem tende a aumentar inicialmente e depois estabilizar ou diminuir.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا مرئيًا لإدراك الكلام والذي يعرض الأقوال والصور المنطوقة إلى مساحة دلالية مشتركة. نحن نستخدم شبكة طرق سريعة متكررة متعددة الطبقات لنمذجة الطبيعة الزمنية للكلام المنطوق ، وإظهار أنها تتعلم لاستخراج المعرفة اللغوية القائمة على الشكل والمعنى من إشارة الإدخال. نجري تحليلًا متعمقًا للتمثيلات المستخدمة من قبل المكونات المختلفة للنموذج المدرَّب ونبين أن ترميز الجوانب الدلالية يميل إلى أن يصبح أكثر ثراءً كلما صعدنا في التسلسل الهرمي للطبقات ، في حين أن ترميز الجوانب المتعلقة بالشكل لمدخلات اللغة يميل إلى الزيادة في البداية ثم الاستقرار أو النقصان.', 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo de percepción del habla con base visual que proyecta expresiones e imágenes habladas en un espacio semántico conjunto. Utilizamos una red de autopistas recurrentes de múltiples capas para modelar la naturaleza temporal del habla hablada y demostrar que aprende a extraer el conocimiento lingüístico basado en la forma y el significado de la señal de entrada. Llevamos a cabo un análisis en profundidad de las representaciones utilizadas por los diferentes componentes del modelo entrenado y mostramos que la codificación de los aspectos semánticos tiende a enriquecerse a medida que avanzamos en la jerarquía de capas, mientras que la codificación de los aspectos relacionados con la forma de la entrada del lenguaje tiende a aumentar inicialmente y luego meseta o disminución.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle visuel de perception de la parole qui projette des énoncés et des images parlés dans un espace sémantique commun. Nous utilisons un réseau autoroutier récurrent multicouche pour modéliser la nature temporelle du discours parlé et montrer qu'il apprend à extraire des connaissances linguistiques basées sur la forme et la signification du signal d'entrée. Nous effectuons une analyse approfondie des représentations utilisées par les différents composants du modèle entraîné et montrons que l'encodage des aspects sémantiques tend à s'enrichir au fur et à mesure que nous montons dans la hiérarchie des couches, alors que l'encodage des aspects liés à la forme de l'entrée de la langue tend d'abord à augmenter puis plateau ou diminution.", 'ja': '私たちは、話し言葉と画像を関節の意味空間に投影する、視覚的に基礎づけられた音声知覚モデルを提示します。我々は、多層繰り返し高速道路ネットワークを使用して、話し言葉の時間的性質をモデル化し、入力信号から形態と意味に基づく言語学的知識の両方を抽出することを学習することを示します。私たちは、訓練されたモデルの異なるコンポーネントによって使用される表現の深い分析を行い、レイヤーの階層を上るにつれてセマンティックな側面のエンコーディングがより豊かになる傾向がある一方で、言語入力のフォーム関連の側面のエンコーディングは、最初は増加し、次にプラットフォームまたは減少する傾向があることを示します。', 'hi': 'हम भाषण धारणा का एक नेत्रहीन आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एक संयुक्त शब्दार्थ स्थान पर बोले गए कथनों और छवियों को प्रोजेक्ट करता है। हम बोले गए भाषण की अस्थायी प्रकृति को मॉडल करने के लिए एक बहु-परत आवर्तक राजमार्ग नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह इनपुट सिग्नल से रूप और अर्थ-आधारित भाषाई ज्ञान दोनों को निकालना सीखता है। हम प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के विभिन्न घटकों द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने वाले अभ्यावेदनों का गहन विश्लेषण करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि शब्दार्थ पहलुओं का एन्कोडिंग समृद्ध हो जाता है क्योंकि हम परतों के पदानुक्रम पर जाते हैं, जबकि भाषा इनपुट के फॉर्म-संबंधित पहलुओं का एन्कोडिंग शुरू में बढ़ता है और फिर पठार या कमी होती है।', 'zh': '我出了一个视觉的语音感模形,该将语音语语和图像投射到一个合语义空间中。 循环数重高速公路网络以拟口语语音之时性,而明其取文于信义也。 臣等练模之异组件深入分析而明之,随层次结构之升,语义之编码,往往转丰,而言输之文编码往往初增,然后趋于稳定损。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем визуально обоснованную модель восприятия речи, которая проецирует произнесенные высказывания и образы в совместное семантическое пространство. Мы используем многослойную рекуррентную сеть шоссе, чтобы смоделировать временную природу речевой речи и показать, что она учится извлекать как формальные, так и смысловые лингвистические знания из входного сигнала. Мы проводим углубленный анализ представлений, используемых различными компонентами обучаемой модели, и показываем, что кодирование семантических аспектов, как правило, становится богаче по мере того, как мы поднимаемся вверх по иерархии слоев, тогда как кодирование связанных с формой аспектов ввода языка, как правило, сначала увеличивается, а затем плато или уменьшается.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair eiseamláir amhairc den bhraistint chainte a thionscnaíonn cainteanna agus íomhánna chuig comhspás shéimeantach. Bainimid úsáid as líonra bóithre athfhillteach ilchiseal chun nádúr ama na cainte labhartha a shamhaltú, agus chun a thaispeáint go bhfoghlaimíonn sé eolas teanga foirme agus brí-bhunaithe a bhaint as an comhartha ionchuir. Déanaimid mionanailís ar na léirithe a úsáideann comhpháirteanna éagsúla den tsamhail oilte agus léirímid go n-éireoidh ionchódú gnéithe séimeantacha níos saibhre de réir mar a théann muid suas an t-ordlathas sraitheanna, agus ionchódú gnéithe foirm-bhainteacha den ionchur teanga. claonadh chun méadú ar dtús agus ansin Plateau nó laghdú.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα οπτικά θεμελιωμένο μοντέλο αντίληψης ομιλίας το οποίο προβάλλει προφορικές εκφράσεις και εικόνες σε έναν κοινό σημασιολογικό χώρο. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα πολυστρωματικό επαναλαμβανόμενο οδικό δίκτυο για να μοντελοποιήσουμε την χρονική φύση της προφορικής ομιλίας και να δείξουμε ότι μαθαίνει να εξάγει τόσο τη μορφή όσο και τη σημασία γλωσσική γνώση από το σήμα εισόδου. Πραγματοποιούμε μια σε βάθος ανάλυση των αναπαραστάσεων που χρησιμοποιούνται από διάφορα συστατικά του εκπαιδευμένου μοντέλου και δείχνουμε ότι η κωδικοποίηση των σημασιολογικών πτυχών τείνει να γίνεται πλουσιότερη καθώς ανεβαίνουμε την ιεραρχία των στρωμάτων, ενώ η κωδικοποίηση των μορφών της γλωσσικής εισαγωγής τείνει αρχικά να αυξάνεται και στη συνέχεια να υψώνεται ή να μειώνεται.', 'hu': 'A beszédérzékelés vizuálisan megalapozott modelljét mutatjuk be, amely a beszélt szavakat és képeket egy közös szemantikai térbe vetíti. A beszélt beszéd időbeli természetének modellezésére egy többrétegű visszatérő autópálya hálózatot használunk, és megmutatjuk, hogy megtanulja kivonni mind a forma, mind a jelentésalapú nyelvtudást a bemeneti jelből. Mélyreható elemzést végzünk a képzett modell különböző komponensei által használt reprezentációkról, és megmutatjuk, hogy a szemantikai aspektusok kódolása a rétegek hierarchiájának felfelé halad, míg a nyelvi bevitel formához kapcsolódó aspektusainak kódolása kezdetben emelkedik, majd emelkedik, majd csökken.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიზუალურად დავიწყებთ სიტყვების მოდელი, რომელიც პროექტები უბრალოდ სიტყვების და გამოსახულების საერთო სემონტიკური ადგილაში. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მრავალური რეკურენტური საზოგადო ქსელი, რომელიც საუკეთესო სიტყვების ტემპალური ნათობას მოდელურად, და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ის სწავლის ორივე ფორმა და სანიშვნო ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული მოდელის განსხვავებული კომპონენტების განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ანალიზაციების განსხვავებული ანალიზაციას და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სემონტიკური ანალიზეტების კონდიზაცია უფრო დიდება, როგორც ჩვენ ჩვენ ზემოთ სინამდვილეები', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello di percezione vocale basato visivamente che proietta le espressioni e le immagini parlate in uno spazio semantico comune. Usiamo una rete autostradale ricorrente a più strati per modellare la natura temporale del parlato e mostrare che impara ad estrarre sia la conoscenza linguistica basata sulla forma che sul significato dal segnale di ingresso. Eseguiamo un'analisi approfondita delle rappresentazioni utilizzate dai diversi componenti del modello addestrato e mostriamo che la codifica degli aspetti semantici tende a diventare più ricca man mano che saliamo la gerarchia dei livelli, mentre la codifica degli aspetti legati alla forma dell'input linguistico tende inizialmente ad aumentare e poi ad appiattire o diminuire.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome vizualiai pagrįstą kalbos suvokimo model į, kuris projektuoja kalbėtus žodžius ir vaizdus į bendrą semantinę erdvę. Mes naudojame daugiasluoksnį pakartotinį greitkelio tinklą, kad modeliuotume kalbos laiko pobūdį ir parodysime, kad jis mokosi ištraukti tiek form ą, tiek reikšmę grindžiamas kalbines žinias iš įėjimo signalo. Atliekame išsamią įvairių mokymo modelio komponentų naudojamų atstovybių analizę ir parodome, kad semantinių aspektų kodavimas dažniausiai tampa turtingesnis didinant sluoksnių hierarchiją, o su forma susijusių kalbos įvedimo aspektų kodavimas iš pradžių didėja, o vėliau didėja arba mažėja.', 'kk': 'Біз көзгертілген сөздерді мен кескіндерді біріктірілген семантикалық орынға сұрақтау үлгісін көрсетедік. Біз көп қабатты қайталанатын жолдар желіне сөйлейтін сөздердің уақытша қасиетін үлгілеу үшін қолданып, ол пішін мен мақсатты лингвистикалық мәліметтерді келтіру сигналынан түсіргенін көрсетеді. Біз оқылған моделінің әртүрлі компоненттерінің қолданылатын кескіндердің тереңдігін анализ жасап, семантикалық аспекттердің кодтамасы қабаттардың иерархиясын жоғарылағанда бағатты болады, бірақ тілдердің кірісінің пішіндік аспекттерін кодтамасы бастапқы көтеріп,', 'mk': 'Презентираме визуелно основан модел на перцепција на говорот кој проектира зборувани изрази и слики во заеднички семантичен простор. Користиме мултислоевна рецидентна автопатска мрежа за да ја моделираме временската природа на говорниот говор, и да покажеме дека научи да извлече јазичко знаење базирано на форма и значење од внатрешниот сигнал. Ние спроведуваме длабока анализа на претставувањата кои ги користат различните компоненти на обучениот модел и покажуваме дека кодирањето на семантичните аспекти тенденцира да стане побогато со зголемувањето на хиерархијата на слоевите, додека кодирањето на аспектите поврзани со формата на јазичниот влог тенденцијално се зголемува и потоа се', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model persepsi ucapan yang berasaskan secara visual yang projek ucapan dan imej bercakap ke ruang semantik kongsi. We use a multi-layer recurrent highway network to model the temporal nature of spoken speech, and show that it learns to extract both form and meaning-based linguistic knowledge from the input signal.  Kami melakukan analisis dalam-dalam perwakilan yang digunakan oleh komponen berbeza model terlatih dan menunjukkan bahawa pengekodan aspek semantik cenderung menjadi lebih kaya semasa kita naik hierarki lapisan, sementara pengekodan aspek berkaitan bentuk input bahasa cenderung pada awalnya meningkat dan kemudian plateau atau turun.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളും ചിത്രങ്ങളും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലത്തേക്ക് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പ്രൊജക്ട് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കാഴ്ചപ്പ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ സമയത്തിന്റെ സ്വഭാവം മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല-ലേയര്\u200d വീണ്ടും ഹൈവേ ശൃംഖലം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ രൂപ പരിശീലന മോഡലിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക് ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കോഡിങ്ങിന്റെ കോഡിങ', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell viżwalment ibbażat fuq il-perċezzjoni tad-diskors li jipproġetta dikjarazzjonijiet u immaġni mitkellma għal spazju semantiku konġunt. Aħna nużaw netwerk ta’ awtostradi rikorrenti f’diversi saffi biex nimmudellaw in-natura temporali tad-diskors mitkellm, u nuru li jitgħallem li jestrezzjona kemm l-għarfien lingwistiku bbażat fuq il-form a kif ukoll it-tifsira mis-sinjal ta’ input. Aħna nagħmlu analiżi fil-fond tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet użati minn komponenti differenti tal-mudell imħarreġ u nuru li l-kodifikazzjoni tal-aspetti semantiċi għandha t-tendenza li ssir aktar rikka hekk kif nagħlew il-ġerarkija tas-saffi, filwaqt li l-kodifikazzjoni tal-aspetti relatati mal-forma tal-input lingwistiku għandha t-tendenza li inizjalment tiżdied u mbagħad tonqos jew tonqos.', 'mn': 'Бид илтгэлийн ойлголтын үндсэн загварыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь илтгэлийг, зурагт холбогдолтой семантийн орон зайд ярьдаг. Бид олон давхар дахин дахин дахин өргөн замын сүлжээг ашиглаж ярианы хугацааны байдлыг загварчлахын тулд ярианы загварчлалыг загварчлахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Энэ нь хэлбэрт болон утгатай хэлний мэдлэг хоёул Бид сургалтын загварын өөр хэсгүүдийн хэрэглэгдсэн үзүүлэлтийг гүн гүнзгий шинжилгээ хийж, семантик хэсгүүдийн кодлог нь бидний давхар дээр нэмэгдэхэд баян болдог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ хэлний орлуулалтын хэлбэртэй асуудлын кодлог эхлээд нэмэгдэж, дараа нь платау эс', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wizualnie uziemiony model percepcji mowy, który projektuje mówione wypowiedzi i obrazy do wspólnej przestrzeni semantycznej. Wykorzystujemy wielowarstwową powtarzającą się sieć autostrad, aby modelować czasową charakter mowy mówionej i pokazać, że uczy się ona wydobywać z sygnału wejściowego zarówno wiedzę językową opartą na formie, jak i znaczeniu. Przeprowadzamy dogłębną analizę reprezentacji wykorzystywanych przez różne komponenty przeszkolonego modelu i pokazujemy, że kodowanie aspektów semantycznych staje się bogatsze wraz z podnoszeniem hierarchii warstw, natomiast kodowanie aspektów związanych z formą wejścia językowego ma tendencję do początkowego wzrostu, a następnie płaskowania lub spadku.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un model vizual bazat pe percepția vorbirii, care proiectează expresiile și imaginile vorbite într-un spațiu semantic comun. Utilizăm o rețea rutieră recurentă pe mai multe straturi pentru a modela natura temporală a vorbirii vorbite și a arăta că aceasta învață să extragă atât cunoștințe lingvistice bazate pe formă, cât și pe semnalul de intrare. Realizăm o analiză aprofundată a reprezentărilor utilizate de diferitele componente ale modelului instruit și arătăm că codificarea aspectelor semantice tinde să devină mai bogată pe măsură ce urcăm ierarhia straturilor, în timp ce codificarea aspectelor legate de formă ale introducerii limbajului tinde să crească inițial și apoi să plateze sau să scadă.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit visuelt grunnleggjande modell for taleoppfatning som prosjektar snakket uttaler og bilete til eit samt semantisk plass. Vi bruker eit rekurserande nettverk med fleire lag for å modellere den tidlegare naturen til talet, og viser at det lærer å pakka ut både form og meningsbasert lingviske kunnskap frå inndatasignalen. Vi utfører ein i dybde analyse av representasjonane som brukar av ulike komponentar av den trengte modellen og viser at koding av semantiske aspektar er tendens til å bli rikker når vi går opp hierarkien av lag, mens koding av skjemarelaterte aspektar av språk-inndata er tendens til å auke oppstart og deretter plateau eller minke.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo vizualno osnovan model percepcije govora koji projekti govore govore i slike zajedničkom semantičkom prostoru. Koristimo višeslojnu rekonstruntnu mrežu autoceste da modeliramo temporalnu prirodu govora i pokažemo da nauèi da izvuèe i formulare i znaèenje jezičke znanja iz ulaznog signal a. Provodimo duboku analizu predstavljanja koje koriste različiti komponenti obučenog modela i pokazujemo da kodiranje semantičkih aspekta često postaje bogatije dok se podižemo hijerarhiju slojeva, dok kodiranje aspekta povezanih sa oblicima jezičkog ulaza često povećava i onda se plato ili smanjuje.', 'so': 'Waxaynu keennaa tusaale aragtida aragtida ah aragtida hadalka, taas oo ku qoran hadal iyo sawirro ay ku hadlaan goob wadajir ah. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakadda jidadka ee soo socda oo kala duduwan si aan u sameyno dabiicadda ku meelgaarka ah ee hadalka, waxaana muujinnaa in ay ka soo bixiso aqoonta luuqada iyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan sawirka gudaha. Anagu waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka hoose u dheer ee noocyada tababarida kala duduwan ee lagu isticmaalayo, waxaana muujinnaa in koordinta dhinacyada semantika ah ay noqdaan taajir markaynu korno meesha saqafka, iyadoo koobi karta dhinacyada la xiriira qoraalka luuqadu waa horay u korodhaa, dabadeedna waxaa ka dhici kara plateau.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en visuellt förankrad modell av taluppfattning som projicerar talade uttalanden och bilder till ett gemensamt semantiskt rum. Vi använder ett flerskiktigt återkommande motorvägsnät för att modellera det talade talets temporala natur och visa att det lär sig att extrahera både form- och meningsbaserade språkkunskaper från ingångssignalen. Vi gör en djupgående analys av de representationer som används av olika komponenter i den utbildade modellen och visar att kodning av semantiska aspekter tenderar att bli rikare när vi går upp i hierarkin av lager, medan kodning av formrelaterade aspekter av språkindata tenderar att inledningsvis öka och sedan platea eller minska.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பேச்சு உணர்வு போன்ற பார்வையின் மாதிரியை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது பேச்சு பேச்சு மற்றும் பிம்பங்கள் பே நாம் பல அடுக்கு மீண்டும் திரும்ப வெளியேறும் பேச்சின் தற்காலிக நேர இயல்பை மாற்ற பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அது உள்ளீட்டு குறியீட்டிலிருந்து மொ We carry out an in-depth analysis of the representations used by different components of the trained model and show that encoding of semantic aspects tends to become richer as we go up the hierarchy of layers, whereas encoding of form-related aspects of the language input tends to initially increase and then plateau or decrease.', 'si': 'අපි බලන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ කතා බලන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා අපි ගොඩක් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියපු භාෂාව ස්වභාවිතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන විවිධ භාවිතාවක් වලින් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියේ ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සෙමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියේ කොඩි', 'ur': 'ہم ایک زبان کی نظر کے ذریعے بنیادی موڈل کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک جوڑی سیمنٹی فضا میں زبان اور تصاویر بولتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک متعدل لائر دوبارہ ہیوی نیٹ ورک کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کلام کی موقتل طبیعت کی مدل کریں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ دونوں فرم اور معنی کی بوسیدہ زبان علم کو اٹھانے کی سیگنال سے سکھاتا ہے۔ ہم تعلیم دیئے ہوئے موڈل کے مختلف قسمتوں سے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ سیمنٹی قسمتوں کا اکڈینڈ ثروتمند ہوتا ہے جبکہ ہم لہروں کے حصہ پر چلتے ہیں، حالانکہ زبان انپیٹ کے فرموں کا اکڈینڈ شروع سے بڑھتا ہے اور پھر پلاتو یا کم ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz gapiradigan so'zlar va rasmlar bir bir necha semantik romaniga aytib keladigan gapiruvchi modelni ko'rinamiz. Biz bir necha darajada davom etilgan yoʻl tarmoqdan foydalanamiz, gapiradigan soʻzning taymaviy turini modellash uchun va uni kiritish imkoniyatidan foydalanuvchi va asosiy tillar haqida o'rganadi. Biz taʼminlovchi modelning boshqa komponentlaridan foydalanadigan tashkilotlarni qo'llab ko'rsamiz va semantik darajalarining kodlash qoidalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, chunki biz qatlamlarning sarlavhasini ko'rib chiqqamiz, lekin tilning shakllar bilan bog'liq tarkibini kodlash usulini boshlaydi va keyin plateau ko'payishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một hình mẫu nhận thức ngôn ngữ được hình ảnh được phát biểu theo một ngữ nghĩa chung. Chúng tôi sử dụng một mạng lưới đường cao tốc liên tục nhiều lớp để mô hình tính thời gian của ngôn ngữ đã nói, và cho thấy nó học cách moi từ tín hiệu nhập cả hình dạng lẫn ý nghĩa kiến ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi phân tích sâu sắc các biểu hiện được sử dụng bởi các thành phần khác nhau của mô hình được đào tạo và cho thấy rằng việc mã hóa các khía cạnh theo ngữ pháp có xu hướng trở nên giàu hơn khi chúng tôi leo lên mức độ phân cấp của các lớp, trong khi việc mã hóa các khía cạnh hình dạng của các ngôn ngữ thường bắt đầu tăng lên và sau đó cao hoặc giảm.', 'bg': 'Представяме визуално обоснован модел на възприемане на речта, който проектира речните изказвания и образи в съвместно семантично пространство. Използваме многослойна повтаряща се магистрална мрежа, за да моделираме времевата природа на говорената реч и да покажем, че тя се научава да извлича от входния сигнал езиково познание както на формата, така и на значението. Извършваме задълбочен анализ на репрезентациите, използвани от различните компоненти на обучения модел и показваме, че кодирането на семантичните аспекти е склонно да става по-богато с издигането нагоре в йерархията на слоевете, докато кодирането на свързаните с формата аспекти на въвеждането на езика първоначално се увеличава и след това се равнява или намалява.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een visueel geaard model van spraakperceptie dat gesproken uitingen en beelden projecteert naar een gezamenlijke semantische ruimte. We gebruiken een meerlaags terugkerend wegennetwerk om de temporele aard van gesproken spraak te modelleren, en laten zien dat het leert om zowel vorm- als betekenisgebaseerde taalkennis uit het ingangssignaal te halen. We voeren een diepgaande analyse uit van de representaties die worden gebruikt door verschillende componenten van het getrainde model en tonen aan dat codering van semantische aspecten rijker wordt naarmate we omhoog gaan in de hiërarchie van lagen, terwijl codering van vormgerelateerde aspecten van de taalinvoer in eerste instantie toeneemt en vervolgens plateau of afneemt.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en visuelt grundlagt model for taleopfattelse, der projicerer talte udtalelser og billeder til et fælles semantisk rum. Vi bruger et tilbagevendende motorvejsnetværk i flere lag til at modellere talens tidsmæssige karakter og vise, at den lærer at udtrække både form- og meningsbaseret sproglig viden fra input signalet. Vi gennemfører en dybdegående analyse af de repræsentationer, der anvendes af forskellige komponenter i den uddannede model, og viser, at kodning af semantiske aspekter har tendens til at blive rigere efterhånden som vi går op i hierarkiet af lag, mens kodning af formrelaterede aspekter af sproginput har tendens til i første omgang at stige og derefter plateau eller falde.', 'ko': '우리는 시각을 바탕으로 하는 언어 감지 모델을 제시하여 언어와 이미지를 하나의 결합된 의미 공간에 투사했다.우리는 다중 순환 고속도로 네트워크를 사용하여 구어의 시간적 성격을 모의하고 입력 신호에서 형식과 의미를 바탕으로 하는 언어 지식을 추출할 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리는 훈련 모델의 서로 다른 구성 부분에 사용된 표시를 깊이 있게 분석한 결과 차원이 상승함에 따라 의미의 인코딩은 더욱 풍부해지고 언어 입력의 형식과 관련된 인코딩은 먼저 증가한 다음에 안정적이거나 감소하는 것으로 나타났다.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein visuell fundiertes Modell der Sprachwahrnehmung, das gesprochene Äußerungen und Bilder in einen gemeinsamen semantischen Raum projiziert. Wir nutzen ein mehrschichtiges, wiederkehrendes Autobahnnetz, um die zeitliche Natur gesprochener Sprache zu modellieren und zeigen, dass sie lernt, aus dem Eingangssignal sowohl form- als auch bedeutungsbasiertes Sprachwissen zu extrahieren. Wir führen eine eingehende Analyse der Repräsentationen durch, die von verschiedenen Komponenten des trainierten Modells verwendet werden, und zeigen, dass die Kodierung semantischer Aspekte tendenziell reicher wird, wenn wir die Hierarchie der Ebenen hinaufsteigen, während die Kodierung formaler Aspekte der Spracheingabe zunächst zunimmt und dann Plateau oder Abnahme aufweist.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mfano wa mtazamo wa hotuba ambao mradi unazungumza lugha na picha kwenye nafasi ya sekunde ya pamoja. Tunatumia mtandao wa barabara inayoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa ili kuonyesha aina ya muda wa hotuba, na kuonyesha kwamba inajifunza kuchagua maarifa ya lugha na yenye maana ya lugha kutoka kwenye ishara ya input. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa kina wa maoni yaliyotumiwa na vipengele tofauti vya mfumo wa treni na kuonyesha kuwa uchunguzi wa vipengele vya semanti unakuwa tajiri kwani tunakwenda juu ya vipande vya juu, wakati ukodi wa vipengele vya vipengele vinavyohusiana na lugha huenda kuongezeka kwa mara ya kwanza na kisha kupungua plateau.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo vizualno osnovan model percepcije govora koji projekti govore govore i slike zajedničkom semantičkom prostoru. Koristimo višeslojnu povratnu mrežu autoceste kako bismo modelili privremenu prirodu govora i pokazali da naučimo izvući i oblik i značenje jezičkih znanja iz ulaznog signal a. Provodimo duboku analizu predstavljanja koje koriste različiti komponenti obučenog modela i pokazujemo da kodiranje semantičkih aspekta tendencija postaje bogatiji dok se podižemo hijerarhiju slojeva, dok kodiranje aspekta u obliku uključenog jezika tendencija je početno povećati i onda plato ili smanjiti.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل مفهوم سخنرانی را به نظر می رسانیم که پروژه\u200cها سخنرانی و تصاویر را به یک فضای طبیعی مشترک صحبت می\u200cکنند. ما از شبکه بزرگراه\u200cهای متعددی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا طبیعت موقتی سخنرانی را مدل کنیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن یاد می\u200cگیرد که از سیگنال ورودی دانش\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و شکل\u200cهای متعدد به معنی اخراج کنیم. ما یک تحلیل عمیق از نمایش\u200cهای متفاوت از نمایش\u200cهای مدل آموزش استفاده می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که رمزگذاری از نقطه\u200cهای semantic به عنوان افزایش طبقه\u200cها ثروتمند می\u200cشود، در حالی که رمزگذاری از نقطه\u200cهای مربوط به شکل ورودی زبان به عنوان اول افزایش و سپس پلاتو یا کمتر می\u200cشود', 'af': "Ons stel 'n visuele gegrónde model van spraak aandag wat projekte spreek uitspraak en beelde aan 'n gemeenskap semantiese spasie. Ons gebruik 'n multilaag herhaalde hoogteware netwerk om die tydelike natuur van gespreek spreek te model, en wys dat dit leer om beide vorm en betekenis gebaseerde lingvisiese kennis uit die invoer sein te uitpak. Ons uitvoer 'n in-diepte analisie van die voorstellings gebruik deur verskillende komponente van die opgelei model en wys dat kodering van semantiese aspekte beteken om rykder te word as ons opgaan die hierarkie van laagte, terwyl kodering van vorm-verwante aspekte van die taal invoer aanvaar tot eerste vergroot en dan plateau of verklein.", 'am': 'የንግግር ማስታወቂያ ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ደረጃዎች ላይ የሚቆጠሩ የመንገድ መረብ ላይ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በተስተማሪው ሞዴል በተለየ መልዕክቶች የሚጠቀሙትን የጥልቅ አስተያየት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የሴሜንቲካዊ ጉዳዮች የደረጃውን ክፍል ሲወስዱ ሀብታሞች ይሆናሉ፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz görsel sereden çykyş alyşynyň nusgasyny görkeýäris. Diňe sözleri we suratlary bir semantik seleňe gepleýärler. Biz bu gürrüň zamany gepleşilen çykyş şeklinde örenmek üçin birnäçe katly ýokardan ýokardan bir ýokardan uzaklaşdyrýarys we bu işiň, giriş sinyalinden hem şeklinde, hem bir näme şeklinde daşardan bolan lingwistiki bilgileri çykarmagyny öwrendirdi Biz okuwçy nusgalaryň üýtgeşmeleriniň derinlikleri çykyp çykyp bilýäris we semantik aspektlaryň kodlemesiniň iýerarhiýasyna ýokarynda baý bolmagy ahmal edip, dil girişiniň ködlemeleriniň ködlemesi başlangıçda artýar we soňra plateau ýa-da azaltýar.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խոսքի ընկալության տեսողական հիմնված մոդել, որը նախագծում է խոսքեր ու պատկերներ խոսում են սեմանտիկ տարածության մեջ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք բազմաշերտ անընդհատ ճանապարհների ցանց, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք խոսքի ժամանակական բնույթը և ցույց տանք, որ այն սովորում է դուրս բերել և ձևի, և նաև իմաստի հիմնված լեզվաբանական գիտելիքները ներմուծի ազդանշանից: Մենք կատարում ենք ուսուցանված մոդելի տարբեր բաղադրիչների կողմից օգտագործվող ներկայացումների խորը վերլուծություն և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սեմանտիկ ասպեկտների կոդավորումը հակված է դառնալ ավելի հարուստ, երբ բարձրանում ենք շերտերի հիերարխիան, մինչդեռ լեզվի ներմուծի ձևի կապված ասպեկտների կոդավորումը սկզբո', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model persepsi pidato yang mendasarkan visual yang proyek berbicara ucapan dan gambar ke ruang semantis kongsi. Kami menggunakan jaringan jalan raya berkurang berbagai lapisan untuk memmodelir alami sementara dari pidato yang dibicarakan, dan menunjukkan bahwa ia belajar untuk mengekstrak kedua bentuk dan pengetahuan bahasa berdasarkan arti dari sinyal input. Kami melakukan analisis dalam-dalam dari represisi yang digunakan oleh komponen yang berbeda dari model terlatih dan menunjukkan bahwa pengekodan aspek semantis cenderung menjadi lebih kaya saat kita naik hierarki lapisan, sementara pengekodan aspek-aspek berhubungan bentuk input bahasa cenderung pada awalnya meningkat dan kemudian plateau atau menurun.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model vizual të perceptimit të fjalës që projekton shprehje dhe imazhe të folura në një hapësirë të përbashkët semantike. Ne përdorim një rrjet autostradë të përsëritur në shumë nivele për të modeluar natyrën e përkohshme të fjalimit të folur, dhe tregojmë se ai mëson të nxjerrë si form ën ashtu edhe njohurinë gjuhësore bazuar në kuptim nga sinjali i hyrjes. Ne kryejmë një analizë të thellë të përfaqësimeve të përdorura nga komponente të ndryshme të modelit të stërvitur dhe tregojmë se kodifikimi i aspekteve semantike ka tendencë të bëhet më i pasur ndërsa ngrihemi hierarkinë e shtresave, ndërsa kodifikimi i aspekteve të lidhura me form ën e hyrjes së gjuhës ka tendencë fillimisht të rritet dhe pastaj të rritet apo të zvogëlohet.', 'bn': 'আমরা ভাষণের ধারণার একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছি যেখানে কথা বলা হয়েছে ভাষা এবং ছবি যৌথ সেম্যান্টিক স্থানে প্রকল আমরা একটি বহুস্তরের পুনরাবৃত্তি হাইওয়েত নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি ভাষণের সাময়িক প্রকৃতি মডেল করার জন্য, এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এটি ইনপুট সিগন্যাল থেকে উভয় ফর আমরা প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের বিভিন্ন অংশের প্রতিনিধিদের গভীরভাবে বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে সেমান্টিক বিষয়গুলোর কোডিং প্রায় ধনী হয়ে যাচ্ছে যখন আমরা স্তরের হায়েরার্কিতে যাচ্ছি, কিন্তু', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo vizualno osnovan model percepcije govora koji projekti govore govore i slike zajedničkom semantičkom prostoru. Koristimo višeslojnu povratnu mrežu autoceste da modeliramo privremenu prirodu govora i pokažemo da nauči izvući i oblik i značenje jezičkih znanja iz ulaznog signal a. Provodimo duboku analizu predstavljanja koje koriste različiti komponenti obučenog modela i pokazujemo da kodiranje semantičkih aspekta često postaje bogatiji dok se podižemo hijerarhiju slojeva, dok kodiranje aspekta povezanih sa oblicima ulaska jezika često se početno povećava, a zatim se plato ili smanjuje.', 'ca': "Presentam un model de percepció visual de la fala que projecta expressions i imatges parlades a un espai semàntic conjunt. Utilitzem una xarxa d'autopistes recurrents de moltes capes per modelar la naturalesa temporal del discurs parlat i demostrar que aprenen a extrair tant el coneixement lingüístic basat en forma com en sentit de la senyal d'entrada. Fem una an àlisi profunda de les representacions utilitzades per diferents components del model entrenat i demostrem que la codificació dels aspectes semàntics tendeix a tornar-se més rica mentre augmentem la jerarquia de capes, mentre que la codificació dels aspectes relacionats amb la forma de l'entrada de llenguatge tendeix a augmentar inicialment i després a augmentar o disminuir.", 'et': 'Esitleme visuaalselt põhjendatud kõnetajumise mudelit, mis projekteerib kõnelejad ja kujutised ühisesse semantilisesse ruumi. Kasutame mitmekihilist korduvat maanteevõrku, et modelleerida kõne ajalist olemust ning näidata, et see õpib sisendsignaalist välja võtma nii vormi- kui ka tähenduspõhiseid keeleoskusi. Me analüüsime põhjalikult koolitatud mudeli erinevate komponentide esitusi ja näitame, et semantiliste aspektide kodeerimine kipub kihtide hierarhias üles liikudes rikkamaks muutuma, samas kui keele sisendi vormiga seotud aspektide kodeerimine kipub algselt suurenema ja seejärel tasanduma või vähenema.', 'fi': 'Esitämme visuaalisesti pohjautuvan puheentunnistuksen mallin, joka projisoi puhuttuja ilmaisuja ja kuvia yhteiseen semanttiseen tilaan. Käytämme monikerroksista toistuvaa tieverkostoa mallintamaan puheen ajallista luonnetta ja osoittamaan, että se oppii poimimaan sekä muotoon että merkitykseen perustuvaa kielellistä tietoa tulosignaalista. Teemme perusteellisen analyysin koulutetun mallin eri osien käyttämistä esityksistä ja osoitamme, että semanttisten näkökohtien koodaus rikastuu kerrosten hierarkian noustessa, kun taas muotoon liittyvien näkökohtien koodaus taipuu aluksi lisääntymään ja sitten tasaantumaan tai laskemaan.', 'az': 'Biz görünümlü nümunəli söz görünüşünün modelini göstəririk ki, sözləri və görüntüləri birlikdə semantik alana danışırlar. Biz çoxlu-düzüm təkrarlanan yüksək yol a ğzını danışan sözlərin məhsullarını modellemək üçün istifadə edirik və bunun hər cür formu və anlama tabanlı dil bilgisini giriş sinyalindən çıxartmasını öyrənirik. Biz təhsil edilmiş modellərin müxtəlif komponentlərin istifadə edilənlərin ən derin analizi çəkirik və semantik aspektlərin kodlaması daha zengin olacağını göstəririk ki, biz səviyyələrin hierarhiyasını yuxarı qaldırıq, halbuki dillərin girişin in formlarla bağlı aspektlərin kodlaması ilk dəfə artırmaq və sonra plateau və ya azaltmaq üçün daha yaxşı olur.', 'cs': 'Představujeme vizuálně zakotvený model vnímání řeči, který promítá mluvené výroky a obrazy do společného sémantického prostoru. Používáme vícevrstvou recidivující dálniční síť k modelování časové povahy mluvené řeči a ukážeme, že se učí extrahovat ze vstupního signálu jazykové znalosti založené na formě i významu. Provádíme hloubkovou analýzu reprezentací používaných různými komponenty trénovaného modelu a ukazujeme, že kódování sémantických aspektů má tendenci být bohatší s postupem hierarchie vrstev, zatímco kódování formově souvisejících aspektů jazykového vstupu má tendenci zpočátku zvyšovat a poté plošinu či klesat.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé éntuk kesempatan karo gambar nggawe barang sematik. Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sistem multi layer perusahaan seneng dadi nggawe nguasal sistem dadi, lan bongkake kuwi tindakan tentang nggawe ngupakan seneng bongkar nggawe sistem sistem sing basa banget nggawe seneng pisan seneng nggawe. Awak dhéwé nggawe diuntingi karo akeh sampeyan ingkang dipunangé sampeyan karo model sing nyimpen lan ujaran winih dhéwé', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani misalin na gane da aka gane shi da ake cikin muhimmada da aka faɗa magana da zane zuwa wani fili na haɗi. Tuna amfani da wani jerin hanya mai daɗi a multi-daraja don mu sami tsarin halin da aka yi wa magana, kuma Muke nuna cewa, za'a iya fito da zane cikin tsari da kuma a gane shi daga sain injistan. We carry out an in-depth analysis of the representations used by different components of the trained model and show that encoding of semantic aspects tends to become richer as we go up the hierarchy of layers, whereas encoding of form-related aspects of the language input tends to initially increase and then plateau or decrease.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vizualno utemeljen model zaznavanja govora, ki projicira govorjene izgovore in slike v skupni semantični prostor. Z večplastnim ponavljajočim se avtocestnim omrežjem modeliramo časovno naravo govorjenega govora in pokažemo, da se iz vhodnega signala nauči izvleči jezikovno znanje, ki temelji na obliki in pomenu. Izvedli smo poglobljeno analizo reprezentacij, ki jih uporabljajo različne komponente usposobljenega modela, in pokazali, da kodiranje semantičnih vidikov postaja bogatejše, ko gremo po hierarhiji plasti, medtem ko kodiranje z obliko povezanih vidikov jezikovnega vnosa najprej narašča in nato pada ali pada.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל ראייתי של תפיסת הנאום אשר פרוייקטים מדברים ביטויים ותמונות למרחב סמנטי משותף. אנו משתמשים ברשת כביש כביש ממספר שכבות כדי לדוגמא את הטבע הזמני של נאום מדבר, ולהראות שהוא לומד להוציא את ידע שפתי מבוסס על צורה ומשומעות מהאות הכניסה. אנו מבצעים ניתוח עמוק של הייצגות שמשתמשים על ידי רכיבים שונים של המודל המאמן ומראים שהקידום של היבטים הסמנטיים נוטה להיות עשירים יותר כשאנחנו עולים על הייררכיה של שכבות, בעוד הקוד של היבטים הקשורים לצורה של הכניסה של השפה נוטה להתגבר בהתחלה ולאחר מכן לרדת או לרדת.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྡན་པའི་སྨྲ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། We use a multi-layer recurrent highway network to model the temporal nature of spoken speech, and show that it learns to extract both form and meaning-based linguistic knowledge from the input signal. We carry out an in-depth analysis of the representations used by different components of the trained model and show that encoding of semantic aspects tends to become richer as we go up the hierarchy of layers, whereas encoding of form-related aspects of the language input tends to initially increase and then plateau or decrease.'}
{'en': 'Spectral Analysis of Information Density in Dialogue Predicts Collaborative Task Performance', 'ar': 'التحليل الطيفي لكثافة المعلومات في الحوار يتوقع أداء المهام التعاونية', 'es': 'El análisis espectral de la densidad de información en el diálogo predice el rendimiento de tareas', 'fr': "L'analyse spectrale de la densité de l'information dans le dialogue prédit la performance des tâches", 'pt': 'Análise Espectral da Densidade da Informação no Diálogo Prevê o Desempenho da Tarefa Colaborativa', 'ja': '対話における情報密度のスペクトル分析は、共同作業のパフォーマンスを予測する', 'hi': 'संवाद में सूचना घनत्व का वर्णक्रमीय विश्लेषण सहयोगी कार्य प्रदर्शन की भविष्यवाणी करता है', 'zh': '言信密度者光谱析占协任', 'ru': 'Спектральный анализ информационной плотности в диалоге прогнозирует выполнение совместной задачи', 'ga': 'Déanann Anailís Speictrim ar Dhlús Faisnéise san Idirphlé Feidhmíocht Tasc Comhoibritheach a thuar', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის ცნობიერების სპექტრალური ანალიზაცია დიალოგიში დასაწყება კოლაბორატიური დავალების პერფორმაცია', 'el': 'Η φασματική ανάλυση της πυκνότητας πληροφοριών στον διάλογο προβλέπει την απόδοση συνεργατικών εργασιών', 'hu': 'Az információsűrűség spektrumelemzése a párbeszédben előrejelzi az együttműködési feladatok teljesítményét', 'it': "L'analisi spettrale della densità delle informazioni nel dialogo prevede le prestazioni delle attività collaborative", 'lt': 'Informacijos tankumo dialoge spektrinė analizė numato bendras užduočių vykdymą', 'kk': 'Диалогта мәліметтің теңдігін Spectral Analysis of Information Density Predicts Collaborative Task Performance', 'mk': 'Спектралната анализа на густината на информации во дијалогот предвидува соработка со задачите', 'ms': 'Analisis Spektral Densitas Maklumat dalam Dialog Prediksi Performasi Tugas Kolaboratif', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗിലെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ സ്പെക്ട്രല്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Spektralanalyse av informasjonstettleiken i dialogvindauget foreslår samarbeidsfunksjon', 'ro': 'Analiza spectrală a densității informațiilor în dialog previne performanța activităților colaborative', 'mn': 'Спектрал мэдээллийн жинхэнэ шинжилгээ Диалог дээр хамтын ажлын үйл ажиллагааг илэрхийлж байна', 'sr': 'Spektralna analiza gustoće informacija u dijalogu predviđa učinkovitost saradnje zadataka', 'si': 'සංවාදයේ තොරතුරු සැකසුම් විශ්ලේෂණය සංවාදයක් සංවාදයේ සැකසුම් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'pl': 'Analiza spektralna gęstości informacji w dialogu przewiduje wykonanie wspólnych zadań', 'so': 'Analys Spectral of Information Density in Dialog Predicts Collaborative Tax Performance', 'sv': 'Spektralanalys av informationsdensitet i dialogen förutspår samverkansarbete', 'ta': 'உரையாடலில் தகவல் அடர்த்தியின் சிறப்பு ஆராய்வு செயல் செயல் செயலை முன்னுரிமையாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'ڈیلوگو میں معلومات تنسیٹی کی سپکترال تحلیل مشترک ٹاکس کی عملکرد کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے', 'mt': 'Analiżi Spettrali tad-Densità tal-Informazzjoni fid-Djalogu tipprevedi l-Prestazzjoni ta’ Kompiti Kolaborattivi', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích phổ biến số lượng thông tin trong cuộc đối thoại Đặt ứng dụng tác động', 'bg': 'Спектралният анализ на плътността на информацията в диалога прогнозира изпълнението на съвместните задачи', 'nl': 'Spectrale analyse van informatiedichtheid in dialoog voorspelt prestaties van gezamenlijke taken', 'hr': 'Spektralna analiza gustoće informacija u dijalogu predviđa učinkovitost suradnih zadataka', 'da': 'Spektralanalyse af informationstætheden i dialogen forudsiger samarbejdsopgavernes ydeevne', 'de': 'Spektrale Analyse der Informationsdichte im Dialog prognostiziert die Leistung kollaborativer Aufgaben', 'id': 'Analisi Spektral Densitas Informasi dalam Dialog Menunjukkan Performasi Tugas Kolaboratif', 'ko': '대화 중 정보 밀도의 스펙트럼 분석 예측 협업 임무 실적', 'fa': 'تحلیل Spectral of Information Density in Dialog Predicts Collaborative Tasks', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Kielelezo cha Habari katika Dialogu Udhibiti wa Kazi ya Ushirikiano', 'tr': 'Durum', 'af': 'Spektrale Analisie van Informasie Densiteit in Dialoog Voorskou Kolaborative Opdrag Performasie', 'sq': 'Analiza spektrale e densitetit të informacionit në dialog parashikon performancën e punës së bashkëpunuar', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Պատկերում տեղեկատվության խտության սպեկտրական վերլուծությունը կանխատեսում է համագործակցական գործողությունները', 'az': 'Dialoog içində məlumat çətinliklərinin Spektral Analizi İşləşməsi İşləşməsini Öyrədir', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের বিশ্লেষণ স্পেক্ট্রেল বিশ্লেষণ কলামিত কাজের কার্যক্রম', 'bs': 'Spektralna analiza gustoće informacija u dijalogu predviđa učinkovitost saradnje zadataka', 'ca': "L'anàlisi espectral de la densitat d'informació en el diàleg prediu el desempeny de les tasques col·laboradores", 'et': 'Dialoogi infotiheduse spektraalanalüüs prognoosib koostööülesannete tulemuslikkust', 'cs': 'Spektrální analýza hustoty informací v dialogu předpovídá výkon spolupráce', 'fi': 'Dialogin tietotiheyden spektraalinen analyysi ennustaa yhteistyötehtävien suorituskykyä', 'ha': 'Analyze of information in Dialog Predicts Collabative Tax Performance', 'sk': 'Spektralna analiza gostote informacij v dialogu napoveduje uspešnost sodelovalnih nalog', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་དག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དཔག་མཐོང་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བ', 'he': 'Spectral Analysis of Information Density in Dialogue Predicts Collaborative Task Performance', 'jv': 'structural navigation'}
{'en': 'We propose a perspective on dialogue that focuses on relative information contributions of conversation partners as a key to successful communication. We predict the success of collaborative task in English and Danish corpora of task-oriented dialogue. Two features are extracted from the frequency domain representations of the lexical entropy series of each interlocutor, power spectrum overlap (PSO) and relative phase (RP). We find that PSO is a negative predictor of task success, while RP is a positive one. An SVM with these features significantly improved on previous task success prediction models. Our findings suggest that the strategic distribution of information density between interlocutors is relevant to task success.', 'ar': 'نقترح منظورًا للحوار يركز على مساهمات المعلومات النسبية لشركاء المحادثة كمفتاح للتواصل الناجح. نتوقع نجاح المهمة التعاونية باللغتين الإنجليزية والدنماركية للحوار الموجه نحو المهام. يتم استخلاص ميزتين من تمثيلات مجال التردد لسلسلة الانتروبيا المعجمية لكل محاور ، وتداخل طيف القدرة (PSO) والمرحلة النسبية (RP). نجد أن PSO هو مؤشر سلبي لنجاح المهمة ، بينما RP هو مؤشر إيجابي. تم تحسين SVM بهذه الميزات بشكل كبير على نماذج التنبؤ بنجاح المهمة السابقة. تشير النتائج التي توصلنا إليها إلى أن التوزيع الاستراتيجي لكثافة المعلومات بين المحاورين وثيق الصلة بنجاح المهمة.', 'es': 'Proponemos una perspectiva sobre el diálogo que se centre en las contribuciones de información relativa de los interlocutores como clave para una comunicación exitosa. Predecimos el éxito de la tarea colaborativa en corpus de diálogo orientado a tareas en inglés y danés. Se extraen dos características de las representaciones de dominio de frecuencia de la serie de entropía léxica de cada interlocutor, la superposición del espectro de potencia (PSO) y la fase relativa (RP). Encontramos que la OSP es un predictor negativo del éxito de la tarea, mientras que la RP es positiva. Un SVM con estas características mejoró significativamente en comparación con los modelos de predicción de éxito de tareas anteriores. Nuestros hallazgos sugieren que la distribución estratégica de la densidad de información entre los interlocutores es relevante para el éxito de la tarea.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un point de vue sur le dialogue qui met l'accent sur les contributions d'information relatives des interlocuteurs en tant que clé d'une communication réussie. Nous prédisons le succès de la tâche collaborative dans des corpus de dialogues orientés vers les tâches en anglais et en danois. Deux caractéristiques sont extraites des représentations du domaine fréquentiel de la série d'entropie lexicale de chaque interlocuteur, du chevauchement du spectre de puissance (PSO) et de la phase relative (RP). Nous trouvons que le PSO est un prédicteur négatif de la réussite d'une tâche, tandis que le RP est un indicateur positif. Une SVM dotée de ces fonctionnalités a considérablement amélioré les modèles de prédiction de succès des tâches précédents. Nos résultats suggèrent que la répartition stratégique de la densité de l'information entre les interlocuteurs est pertinente pour la réussite des tâches.", 'pt': 'Propomos uma perspectiva sobre o diálogo que se concentra nas contribuições de informações relativas dos parceiros de conversação como chave para uma comunicação bem-sucedida. Prevemos o sucesso da tarefa colaborativa em corpora de diálogo orientado a tarefas em inglês e dinamarquês. Duas características são extraídas das representações no domínio da frequência das séries de entropia lexical de cada interlocutor, sobreposição de espectro de potência (PSO) e fase relativa (RP). Descobrimos que PSO é um preditor negativo de sucesso da tarefa, enquanto RP é positivo. Um SVM com esses recursos melhorou significativamente em modelos anteriores de previsão de sucesso de tarefas. Nossos achados sugerem que a distribuição estratégica da densidade de informações entre os interlocutores é relevante para o sucesso da tarefa.', 'ja': 'コミュニケーションを成功させるための鍵として、会話パートナーの相対的な情報貢献に焦点を当てた対話の視点を提案します。私たちは、タスク指向の対話の英語とデンマーク語の協働タスクの成功を予測しています。パワースペクトル重複（ ＰＳＯ ）及び相対位相（ ＲＰ ）の２つの特徴は、各対話者の語彙エントロピー系列の周波数領域表現から抽出される。PSOはタスクの成功のネガティブな予測因子であり、RPはポジティブな予測因子であることがわかります。これらの機能を備えたSVMは、以前のタスク成功予測モデルよりも大幅に改善された。私たちの調査結果は、対話者間の情報密度の戦略的分布がタスクの成功に関連していることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '我们立了一对话,重点关注对话的相关信息,这是成功通通的机会。 我卜协事于英语丹麦语面于语料库。 每对话器词法熵级数频域取二特,功率谱重叠(PSO)与相(RP)。 吾见PSO者,事之因也;而RP者,正之因子也。 有此功能者 SVM 著于前务。 臣等论结果表明,对话者之间密度信略布告成。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем перспективу диалога, которая фокусируется на относительном информационном вкладе партнеров по разговору в качестве ключа к успешному общению. Мы прогнозируем успех совместной задачи на английском и датском языках в рамках целенаправленного диалога. Из представлений частотной области лексической энтропии каждого собеседника выделяют два признака: перекрытие спектра мощности (PSO) и относительную фазу (RP). Мы обнаружили, что PSO является отрицательным предиктором успеха задачи, в то время как RP является положительным. Виртуальная машина защиты с этими возможностями значительно улучшилась по сравнению с предыдущими моделями прогнозирования успеха задач. Наши выводы показывают, что стратегическое распределение информационной плотности между собеседниками имеет отношение к успеху задачи.', 'hi': 'हम संवाद पर एक परिप्रेक्ष्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सफल संचार की कुंजी के रूप में वार्तालाप भागीदारों के सापेक्ष जानकारी योगदान पर केंद्रित है। हम कार्य उन्मुख संवाद के अंग्रेजी और डेनिश कॉर्पोरेट में सहयोगी कार्य की सफलता की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। दो विशेषताओं को प्रत्येक वार्ताकार, पावर स्पेक्ट्रम ओवरलैप (पीएसओ) और सापेक्ष चरण (आरपी) की लेक्सिकल एन्ट्रॉपी श्रृंखला के आवृत्ति डोमेन प्रतिनिधित्व से निकाला जाता है। हम पाते हैं कि पीएसओ कार्य की सफलता का एक नकारात्मक भविष्यवक्ता है, जबकि आरपी एक सकारात्मक है। इन सुविधाओं के साथ एक एसवीएम पिछले कार्य सफलता भविष्यवाणी मॉडल पर काफी सुधार हुआ। हमारे निष्कर्ष बताते हैं कि वार्ताकारों के बीच सूचना घनत्व का रणनीतिक वितरण कार्य की सफलता के लिए प्रासंगिक है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid peirspictíocht ar idirphlé a dhíríonn ar rannchuidiú faisnéise coibhneasta na gcomhpháirtithe comhrá mar eochair do chumarsáid rathúil. Déanaimid tuar ar an rath a bheidh ar thasc comhoibríoch i gcorpasphlé an Bhéarla agus na Danmhairge d’idirphlé tasc-dhírithe. Baintear dhá ghné as léirithe fearainn minicíochta na sraithe eantrópachta foclóireachta de gach idirghabhálaí, forluí speictrim cumhachta (PSO) agus céim choibhneasta (RP). Is léir dúinn gur réamhaithriseoir diúltach é PSO ar rath an taisc, agus gur rud dearfach é RP. Tháinig feabhas suntasach ar SVM leis na gnéithe seo ar mhúnlaí réamh-mheasta ratha tascanna roimhe seo. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios go bhfuil dáileadh straitéiseach dlús faisnéise idir idirghabhálaithe ábhartha maidir le rathúlacht an taisc.', 'hu': 'Olyan perspektívát javaslunk a párbeszédre, amely a beszélgetési partnerek relatív információs hozzájárulására összpontosít, mint a sikeres kommunikáció kulcsa. Az együttműködési feladatok sikerét angol és dán nyelven jósoljuk meg a feladatorientált párbeszéd korpusai. Az egyes beszélgetők lexikális entrópia sorozatának frekvenciatartományi reprezentációjából két jellemzőt vonunk ki: a teljesítményspektrum átfedése (PSO) és a relatív fázis (RP). Úgy találjuk, hogy a PSO negatív előrejelzője a feladat sikerének, míg RP pozitív. Az ilyen funkciókkal rendelkező SVM jelentősen javult a korábbi feladatsikeres előrejelzési modellekhez képest. Megállapításaink azt sugallják, hogy az információsűrűség stratégiai elosztása a beszélgetőpartnerek között releváns a feladatok sikere szempontjából.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια προοπτική διαλόγου που εστιάζει στη σχετική πληροφόρηση των συνεργατών συνομιλίας ως κλειδί για την επιτυχημένη επικοινωνία. Προβλέπουμε την επιτυχία των συνεργατικών εργασιών στα αγγλικά και δανικά σώματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένου στην εργασία. Δύο χαρακτηριστικά εξάγονται από τις αναπαραστάσεις του τομέα συχνότητας της λεξικής σειράς εντροπίας κάθε συνομιλητή, η επικάλυψη φάσματος ισχύος (PSO) και η σχετική φάση (RP). Διαπιστώνουμε ότι το PSO είναι αρνητικός παράγοντας πρόληψης της επιτυχίας της εργασίας, ενώ το RP είναι θετικό. Ένα SVM με αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά βελτιώθηκε σημαντικά σε σχέση με προηγούμενα μοντέλα πρόβλεψης επιτυχίας εργασιών. Τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν ότι η στρατηγική κατανομή της πυκνότητας των πληροφοριών μεταξύ των συνομιλητών είναι σχετική με την επιτυχία των εργασιών.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვითარებთ დიალოგის პერსპუტექტი, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული ინფორმაციის დამატებით, რომელიც წარმატებული კომუნიკაციის გასაღები. ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ კოლობორაციური დავალების წარმატება ინგლისური და დენისური კოპორაში დავალებით დავალებით დიალოგში. ორი ფუნქციები ექსტრებულია ყოველ ინტელექტორის ელექსიკალური ენტროოთის სერიის ფუნქციური დემომინის გამოსახულებებიდან, ძალიან სპექტრემის გადარჩენა (PSO) და რედაციალური ფ ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ PSO არის დავალების წარმატების negatifური პროგრამეტრი, როცა RP არის პოციფიური. Name ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები გვაქვს, რომ ინფორმაციის დონეტიკური გაყოფილი ინფორმაციის დონეტია საშუალების შორის მნიშვნელოვანია სამუშაო წარმატების', 'it': 'Proponiamo una prospettiva sul dialogo che si concentra sui contributi informativi relativi dei partner di conversazione come chiave per una comunicazione di successo. Prevediamo il successo del lavoro collaborativo in inglese e danese corpora di dialogo orientato ai compiti. Due caratteristiche sono estratte dalle rappresentazioni del dominio di frequenza della serie di entropia lessicale di ogni interlocutore, la sovrapposizione dello spettro di potenza (PSO) e la fase relativa (RP). Troviamo che PSO è un predittore negativo del successo delle attività, mentre RP è positivo. Un SVM con queste caratteristiche notevolmente migliorato rispetto ai precedenti modelli di previsione del successo delle attività. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che la distribuzione strategica della densità di informazioni tra interlocutori è rilevante per il successo dei compiti.', 'kk': 'Біз сәтті байланыстыру үшін сәтті мәлімет партнерінің қатынастық мәліметтерінің көмегімен байланыстыру диалогының перспективін ұсынамыз. Біз ағылшын және Дания корпорасында біріктірілген тапсырманың сәттігін бақылаймыз. Екі мүмкіндігі әрбір интерлоктор, қуатты спектру (PSO) және қатынасыз этап (RP) лексикалық энтропия сериясының жиілігі доменінен шығарылады. Біз PSO тапсырманың сәттілігінің негативті тапсырманың алдындаушы деп ойлаймыз, және RP - оң жақсы. Бұл мүмкіндіктердің SVM арқылы алдыңғы тапсырма сәтті алдыңғы тапсырмалар үлгілерінде өте жақсартылды. Біздің тапсырмамыз тапсырмалардың сәттілігіне маңызды мәлімет жиілігінің стратегиялық үлестіріміз деп ойлайды.', 'mk': 'We propose a perspective on dialogue that focuses on relative information contributions of conversation partners as a key to successful communication.  Го предвидуваме успехот на соработката на англиски и дански тело на дијалог ориентиран на задачите. Две карактеристики се извадени од репрезентациите на фреквентниот домен на лексикалната ентропија серија на секој интерлокатор, прекривањето на струјата на спектрот (PSO) и релативната фаза (RP). Најдовме дека ПСО е негативен предвидувач на успехот на задачата, додека РП е позитивен. СВМ со овие карактеристики значително се подобри во претходните модели за предвидување на успехот на задачите. Нашите откритија покажуваат дека стратешката дистрибуција на густината на информациите помеѓу интерлокаторите е релевантна за успехот на задачата.', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome dialogo perspektyvą, kurioje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama santykiniam pokalbių partnerių informavimo indėliui kaip sėkmingo komunikacijos raktui. Mes prognozuojame bendradarbiavimo užduoties sėkmę anglų ir Danijos užduotims orientuoto dialogo korpora. Dvi požymiai ištraukiami iš kiekvieno interlokutorio lexinės entropijos serijos dažnio domeno, galios spektro dubliavimo (PSO) ir santykinės fazės (RP) rodmenų. Mes manome, kad PSO yra neigiamas užduočių sėkmės prognozatorius, o RP teigiamas. SVM su šiais požymiais gerokai pagerėjo ankstesnių užduočių sėkmės prognozavimo modelių atžvilgiu. Mūsų išvados rodo, kad strateginis informacijos tankumo paskirstymas tarpusavyje yra svarbus užduočių sėkmei.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan perspektif dialog yang fokus pada kontribusi maklumat relatif rakan-rakan perbualan sebagai kunci untuk komunikasi berjaya. Kami meramalkan keberhasilan tugas kerjasama dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Danish corpora bagi dialog oriented tugas. Dua ciri dikekstrak dari perwakilan domain frekuensi bagi siri entropi leksikal setiap interlocutor, spektrum kuasa meliputi (PSO) dan fasa relatif (RP). Kami mendapati bahawa PSO adalah prediksor negatif untuk kesuksesan tugas, sementara RP adalah satu positif. Name Penemuan kami menunjukkan bahawa pengedaran strategik ketepatan maklumat antara interlocutor adalah berkaitan dengan kejayaan tugas.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പങ്കാളികളുടെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങളെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് വിജയിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് വിവരങ ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും ഡാനിഷ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയിലും സഹകരിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ വിജയത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ഇന്റ്റര്\u200dലോക്ടറിന്റെയും വൈദ്യുതി സ്പെക്ട്രാം മേല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും അടുത്ത ഫേസിലെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d എന്\u200dട്രോപ്പി സിരിസ്റ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് പിസോയ് ജോലിയുടെ വിജയത്തിന്\u200dറെ നേരിട്ട പ്രവചിക്കാരനാണെന്നാണ്, പക്ഷെ ആര്\u200dപി ഒരു  മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി വിജയം പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഒരു SVM ഉള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സാങ്കേതികമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണം എന്നാണ് വിശദീകരിക്കുന', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu perspettiva dwar id-djalogu li tiffoka fuq il-kontribuzzjonijiet relattivi ta’ informazzjoni tal-imsieħba tal-konverżjoni bħala ċentru għall-komunikazzjoni b’suċċess. Aħna nipprevedu s-suċċess tal-kompitu kollaborattiv fl-Ingliż u fid-Daniż ta’ korpura ta’ djalogu orjentat lejn il-kompiti. Żewġ karatteristiċi huma estratti mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tad-dominju tal-frekwenza tas-serje ta’ entropija lexika ta’ kull interlokutur, sovrappożizzjoni tal-ispettru tal-enerġija (PSO) u fażi relattiva (RP). Aħna nsibu li l-PSO huwa tbassir negattiv tas-suċċess tal-kompiti, filwaqt li l-RP huwa wieħed pożittiv. SVM b’dawn il-karatteristiċi tjieb b’mod sinifikanti fuq mudelli preċedenti ta’ tbassir tas-suċċess tal-kompiti. Is-sejbiet tagħna jissuġġerixxu li d-distribuzzjoni strateġika tad-densità tal-informazzjoni bejn l-interlokuturi hija rilevanti għas-suċċess tal-kompitu.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein perspektiv på dialogen som fokuserer på relativ informasjonsbidrag til samtalepartnerar som nøkkel til vellukka kommunikasjon. Vi forventar suksess på samarbeidsområdet i engelsk og danske korporasjon av oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge. To funksjonar vert pakka ut frå frekvensdomenerepresentasjonane av den leksiske entropiserien av kvar interlocutor, straumspektromoverlapping (PSO) og relative fase (RP). Vi finn at PSO er ein negativt forhåndsvising av oppgåva, mens RP er ein positivt. Name Finningane våre tyder på at strategiske distribusjon av informasjonstettleiken mellom interlocutorar er relevant for oppgåvesuksess.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy perspektywę dialogu, która koncentruje się na względnym wkładzie informacyjnym partnerów rozmowy jako kluczu do udanej komunikacji. Przewidujemy sukces współpracy w angielskich i duńskich korporach dialogu zorientowanego na zadania. Z reprezentacji domen częstotliwości serii entropii leksykalnej każdego rozmówcy wyodrębnione są dwie cechy: nakładanie się widma mocy (PSO) i faza względna (RP). Stwierdzamy, że PSO jest negatywnym predyktorem sukcesu zadania, natomiast RP jest pozytywnym. SVM z tymi funkcjami znacznie poprawił się w stosunku do poprzednich modeli przewidywania sukcesu zadania. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że strategiczny rozkład gęstości informacji między rozmówcami ma znaczenie dla sukcesu zadania.', 'mn': 'Бид ярилцлагын хамтрагчдын харьцаатай мэдээллийн нийлүүлэлтийг амжилттай харилцааны түлхүүр болгон төвлөрүүлэх диалогын тухай ярилцлагын талаар анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид Англи болон Данийн корпоратын хамтран ажиллагааны амжилтыг таамаглаж байна. Хоёр сонирхол нь хоорондын интропийн хэлбэрээс, хүчирхэг спектр давхарлах (PSO) болон харьцангуй хэлбэрээс (RP) илэрхийлэгддэг. Бид PSO нь ажлын амжилтын сөрөг таамаглаач гэдгийг олж мэднэ. RP нь эерэг. Өмнөх ажлын амжилтын таамаглалтын загвар дээр эдгээр чанартай SVM нь маш чухал сайжруулсан. Бидний ололтууд нь ажлын амжилтын тухай мэдээллийн жингийн стратегик хуваарилалт нь холбоотой гэдгийг сануулдаг.', 'ro': 'Propunem o perspectivă asupra dialogului care se concentrează pe contribuțiile de informare relative ale partenerilor de conversație ca cheie pentru comunicarea de succes. Prezicem succesul sarcinii colaborative în limba engleză și daneză a corpurilor de dialog orientat spre sarcini. Două caracteristici sunt extrase din reprezentările domeniului de frecvență ale seriei entropiei lexicale ale fiecărui interlocutor, suprapunerea spectrului de putere (PSO) și faza relativă (RP). Considerăm că PSO este un predictor negativ al succesului sarcinii, în timp ce RP este unul pozitiv. Un SVM cu aceste caracteristici îmbunătățite semnificativ față de modelele anterioare de predicție a succesului sarcinilor. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că distribuirea strategică a densității informațiilor între interlocutori este relevantă pentru succesul sarcinii.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa aragti ku saabsan dialogue, kaas oo ku kalsoonaanaysa kharashaadka macluumaadka saaxiibada wadajirka kala sheekeysan sida furan u ah xiriirka succeeded. Waxaynu horay u sii sheegaynaa liibaanka shaqada iskuulka ah ee ku qoran Ingiriis iyo Shirkadda Daanishka oo ku qoran labaad shaqo. Waxaa laga soo saaraa laba tayabar oo ay ka tirsan yihiin xarumaha leksikal ee gudaha, koronta power spectrum (PSO) iyo fasaxa qaraabada (RP). Waxaynu aragnaa in PSO uu yahay wax ka hor dhigi karo liibaanka shaqada, laakiin RP waa mid suurtagal ah. SVM oo qabanqaabiyey tayooyinkaas waxaa lagu hagaajiyey qaababka horumarinta shaqada. Shaqooyinkayada waxaa loola jeedaa in qaybinta strategiyada ee faa’iidada macluumaadka dhexe u dhexeeya ay muhiim u tahay liibaanka shaqada.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett perspektiv på dialog som fokuserar på relativa informationsbidrag från samtalspartners som en nyckel till framgångsrik kommunikation. Vi förutspår framgången av samarbetsuppgifter på engelska och danska korpora av uppgiftsorienterad dialog. Två funktioner extraheras från frekvensdomänrepresentationer av den lexikala entropiserien för varje samtalspartner, effektspektrumöverlappning (PSO) och relativ fas (RP). Vi finner att PSO är en negativ prediktor för uppgifts framgång, medan RP är en positiv sådan. En SVM med dessa funktioner förbättrades avsevärt jämfört med tidigare modeller för förutsägelse av framgång. Våra resultat tyder på att den strategiska fördelningen av informationstäthet mellan samtalspartner är relevant för uppgiftens framgång.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo perspektivu na dijalogu koji se fokusira na relativni doprinos informacija razgovornih partnera kao ključ uspešne komunikacije. Predviđamo uspeh saradnje na engleskom i danskom korporaciji dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Dva karakteristika su izvučena iz predstavljanja frekvencije leksičke entropije serije svakog interlocutora, preklapanja energetskog spektra (PSO) i relativne faze (RP). Pronašli smo da je PSO negativan predviđa č uspeha zadataka, dok je RP pozitivan. SVM sa ovim karakteristikama značajno je poboljšao na prethodnim modelima predviđanja uspeha zadataka. Naši nalazi sugeriraju da je strateška distribucija gustosti informacija između interlocutora važna za uspeh zadatka.', 'si': 'අපි සංවාදය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඒක සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් ගැන සම්බන්ධ සම්බන් අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ඩැනිෂ් සංවාදයේ සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ සාර්ථක වැඩේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා. අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් දෙකක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ හැම ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක්ම ලෙක්සිකාල් ඇන්ට්\u200dරොපි සිරියාව, බලය ස්පෙක්ටර් අවශ්\u200dයතාව අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට PSO කියලා වැඩේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, RP කියලා විශ්වාස @ info: status අපේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා තොරතුරු සංවේදනය අතර ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න තොරතුරු ගැ', 'ta': 'நாம் உரையாடல் மீது ஒரு பார்வையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சார்ந்த தகவல் பங்குகளை பேச்சு கூட்டாளிகளின் தகவல் பங் நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் டானிஷ் நிறுவனத்தில் சேர்ந்த உரையாடல் வெற்றியை முன்வாக்குகிறோம். இரண்டு குணங்கள் லெக்சிக்சியல் நுழைவு தொடர்களின் வெளியீட்டு களத்திலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்படுகின்றன ஒவ்வொரு இடைவெளிக்காட்டியின் விருப PSO என்பது பணியின் வெற்றியை எதிர்மறை முன்னோக்கி என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், ஆனால் RP ஒரு நேர்ம மையான Name எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் வெற்றியடைந்த தகவல் தொகுதியின் அலங்காரத்தை விரிவாக்குதல் தெரிவிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک دیالوگ کے بارے میں ایک نظر پیش کرتے ہیں جو مکالمانی شریکوں کی نسبت معلومات کے ذریعے مکالمانی کے ذریعے مکالمانی کا کلید بنا رہا ہے. ہم نے انگلیسی اور دنیا کی شرکت میں کامیابی کی کامیابی کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ دو فرکانس ڈومین کے فرکانس ڈومین سے ہر انٹرلوکوٹر کے لکسیکل انٹروپی سیری کی نمایش سے نکالے جاتے ہیں، پاور اسپترم اورلپ (PSO) اور نسبت فاز (RP) کے۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ PSO کار کامیابی کے منفی پیش بینی ہے، حالانکہ RP ایک مثبت ہے. ان شائستیوں کے ساتھ ایک SVM پہلے کام کے موفقیت کی پیش بینی موڈل پر بہت اچھی طرح اضافہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے یہ سمجھتے ہیں کہ معلومات کی گھمنٹی کا استراتژیک تقسیم کرنا مشکل کامیابی کے باعث ہے.', 'uz': "Biz muloqat oynasida, bu muloqat bilan bog'liq bilan bog'liq bog'liqlarining ma'lumotning qismlariga qarshi mumkin. Biz ingliz va Danish kompaniyalarida ishlab chiqarish muvaffaqiyatlarini oldik qilamiz. Two features are extracted from the frequency domain representations of the lexical entropy series of each interlocutor, power spectrum overlap (PSO) and relative phase (RP).  Biz o'ylaymiz, PSO vazifa muvaffaqiyatlarining negativ prediktoriyasi, va RP yaxshi biri. Name Bizning murakkablarimiz shunday aytganimiz, o'zgarishlar orasidagi maʼlumot chegarasining strategik tarjima qilish muvaffaqiyatlariga muhim.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một viễn cảnh về một cuộc đối thoại tập trung vào những cống hiến thông tin liên quan giữa các đối tác. Chúng tôi dự đoán thành công của việc hợp tác trong tiếng Anh và tiếng Đan Mạch trong cuộc đối thoại hướng dẫn nhiệm vụ. Hai tính năng được chiết xuất từ các biểu tượng miền tần số của các chuỗi ngẫu nhiên của mỗi đối tác, tần số điện bị chồng chéo (PSO) và giai đoạn tương đối (RP). Chúng tôi thấy PSO là dự đoán tiêu cực về thành công nhiệm vụ, trong khi RP là một dự án tích cực. Một SVM với những tính năng này đã cải tiến đáng kể về các mô hình dự đoán thành công trước. Những phát hiện của chúng tôi cho thấy việc phân phối mật độ thông tin giữa đối tác là liên quan đến thành công.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo perspektivu o dijalogu koji se fokusira na relativni doprinos informacija razgovornih partnera kao ključ uspješne komunikacije. Predviđamo uspjeh suradnog zadatka na engleskom i danskom korporaciji dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Dva karakteristika su izvučena iz zastupanja frekvencije domena leksičke entropije serije svakog interlocutora, preklapanja energetskog spektra (PSO) i relativne faze (RP). Pronašli smo da je PSO negativan predviđa č uspjeha zadatka, dok je RP pozitivan. SVM s ovim karakteristikama značajno poboljšao se u prethodnim modelima predviđanja uspjeha zadataka. Naši nalazi sugeriraju da je strateška distribucija gustosti informacija između interlocutora važna za uspjeh zadataka.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår et perspektiv på dialog, der fokuserer på relative informationsbidrag fra samtalepartnere som en nøgle til vellykket kommunikation. Vi forudsiger succesen af samarbejdsopgaver på engelsk og dansk korpora af opgaveorienteret dialog. To funktioner udtrækkes fra frekvensdomænenes repræsentationer af den lexikale entropiserie for hver samtalepartner, effektspektrumoverlapning (PSO) og relativ fase (RP). Vi finder ud af, at PSO er en negativ forudsigelse af opgavens succes, mens RP er en positiv en. En SVM med disse funktioner er væsentligt forbedret i forhold til tidligere opgaver succes forudsigelsesmodeller. Vores resultater tyder på, at den strategiske fordeling af informationstætheden mellem samtalepartnere er relevant for opgavernes succes.', 'nl': "We stellen een perspectief voor op dialoog dat zich richt op relatieve informatiebijdragen van gesprekspartners als sleutel tot succesvolle communicatie. We voorspellen het succes van samenwerkingstaken in Engelse en Deense corpora's van taakgerichte dialoog. Twee kenmerken worden geëxtraheerd uit de frequentiedomeinrepresentaties van de lexicale entropiereeks van elke gesprekspartner, vermogensspectrumoverlap (PSO) en relatieve fase (RP). We vinden dat PSO een negatieve voorspeller is van taakverslag, terwijl RP een positieve is. Een SVM met deze functies is aanzienlijk verbeterd ten opzichte van eerdere modellen voor het voorspellen van het succes van taken. Onze bevindingen suggereren dat de strategische verdeling van de informatiedichtheid tussen gesprekspartners relevant is voor het succes van de taak.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме перспектива за диалога, която се фокусира върху относителния информационен принос на партньорите в разговора като ключ към успешната комуникация. Прогнозираме успеха на съвместната задача в английски и датски корпори на ориентиран към задачите диалог. Две черти са извлечени от честотните домейни представяния на лексикалната ентропия серия на всеки събеседник, припокриване на силовия спектър (PSO) и относителна фаза (RP). Откриваме, че ПСО е отрицателен предсказател на успеха на задачата, докато РП е положителен. СВМ с тези функции значително се подобри в сравнение с предишните модели за прогнозиране на успеха на задачите. Нашите констатации предполагат, че стратегическото разпределение на плътността на информацията между събеседниците е от значение за успеха на задачата.', 'fa': 'ما به عنوان کلید ارتباط موفقیت یک دیدگاه روی محاورۀ محاورۀ اطلاعات نسبتی که به عنوان کلید ارتباط موفقیت تمرکز می\u200cکند پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما موفقیت کارهای همکاری را در شرکت انگلیسی و دانش پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم که در محاوره\u200cی مشارکت کار است. دو ویژگی از نمایش\u200cهای دومین فرکانس مجموعه انتروپی زبان\u200cشناسی هر متصل\u200cکننده، برق برق (PSO) و مرحله\u200cی نسبتی (RP) خارج می\u200cشوند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که PSO یک پیش\u200cبینی منفی از موفقیت کار است، در حالی که RP یک مثبت است. Name نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که تقسیم استراتژیکی density اطلاعات بین پیوندگران با موفقیت کار ارتباطی دارد.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine Perspektive des Dialogs vor, die sich auf relative Informationsbeiträge der Gesprächspartner als Schlüssel zu erfolgreicher Kommunikation konzentriert. Wir prognostizieren den Erfolg einer kollaborativen Aufgabe in englischen und dänischen Korpora des aufgabenorientierten Dialogs. Aus den Repräsentationen des Frequenzbereichs der lexikalischen Entropieserie jedes Gesprächspartners werden zwei Merkmale extrahiert: Leistungsspektrumüberlappung (PSO) und Relative Phase (RP). Wir finden, dass PSO ein negativer Prädiktor für den Erfolg von Aufgaben ist, während RP ein positiver Faktor ist. Ein SVM mit diesen Funktionen hat sich gegenüber früheren Erfolgsvorhersagemodellen deutlich verbessert. Unsere Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass die strategische Verteilung der Informationsdichte zwischen den Gesprächspartnern für den Aufgabenerfolg relevant ist.', 'id': 'We propose a perspective on dialogue that focuses on relative information contributions of conversation partners as a key to successful communication.  Kami memprediksi sukses tugas kollaboratif dalam bahasa Inggris dan Danish corpora dari dialog oriented tugas. Dua ciri-ciri dikekstraksi dari representation domain frekuensi dari seri entropi lexik dari setiap interlokutor, spektrum kekuatan overlap (PSO) dan fase relatif (RP). Kami menemukan bahwa PSO adalah prediksor negatif dari sukses tugas, sementara RP adalah positif. Sebuah SVM dengan ciri-ciri ini meningkat signifikan pada model prediksi sukses tugas sebelumnya. Penemuan kami menunjukkan bahwa distribusi strategis dari ketepatan informasi antara interlokutor relevan untuk sukses tugas.', 'ko': '우리는 대화의 관점을 제시했고 대화 파트너의 관련 정보 공헌에 중점을 두는 것이 성공적인 소통의 관건이다.영어와 덴마크어 임무형 대화 자료 라이브러리에서 우리는 협업 임무의 성공을 예측했다.각 대화자의 어휘엔트로피 서열의 주파수 표현에서 파워 스펙트럼 중첩(PSO)과 상대상위(RP) 두 가지 특징을 추출한다.PSO는 미션 성공에 대한 마이너스 예측 요인인 반면 RP는 플러스 예측 요인인 것으로 나타났습니다.이전의 임무 성공 예측 모델에 비해 이러한 특징을 가진 지원 벡터기는 현저한 개선을 보였다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 대화자 간의 정보 밀도의 전략적 분포는 임무 성공과 관련이 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mtazamo wa mazungumzo yanayohusisha michango ya taarifa ya washirika wa mazungumzo kama ufunguo wa mawasiliano ya mafanikio. Tunatabiri mafanikio ya kazi ya ushirikiano katika kampuni ya Kiingereza na Kidanish ya mazungumzo yanayoelekezwa na kazi. Tamko mbili zimetolewa kutoka kwa uwakilishi wa kiwango cha umeme wa mfululizo wa ujasiri wa lexico wa kila mmoja wa wateja wa ndani, vituo vya juu vya umeme (PSO) na kiwango cha karibu (RP). Tunapata kwamba PSO ni mtabiri hasi wa mafanikio ya kazi, wakati RP ni moja chanya. SVM yenye vipengele hivi vizuri vikubwa juu ya modeli za kutabiri mafanikio ya kazi zilizopita. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kwamba usambazaji wa kimkakati wa uchungufu wa taarifa kati ya wenyeji ni muhimu wa mafanikio ya kazi.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një perspektivë për dialogun që përqëndrohet në kontributet e informacionit relativ të partnerëve të bisedës si një kyç për komunikimin e suksesshëm. Ne parashikojmë suksesin e detyrës së bashkëpunimit në anglisht dhe danisht korpora e dialogut të orientuar ndaj detyrave. Dy karakteristika janë nxjerrë nga përfaqësimet e frekuencës domain e serisë të entropisë lexike të çdo interlokuturi, mbishtypja e spektrit të energjisë (PSO) dhe faza relative (RP). Ne zbulojmë se PSO është një parashikues negativ i suksesit të detyrës, ndërsa RP është pozitiv. Një SVM me këto funksione u përmirësua ndjeshëm në modelet e parashikimit të suksesit të detyrës së mëparshme. Zbulimet tona sugjerojnë se shpërndarja strategjike e densitetit të informacionit midis interlokutorëve është e rëndësishme për suksesin e detyrës.', 'tr': 'Biz çykyş ortaklarynyň üstünlikli komunikaçylygyň a çary hökmünde üns berýän dijalogda perspektive teklip edýäris. Biz Iňlisçe we Danish korporatynda işbirlikçilik işiniň üstesini tahmin edip otyrýarys. Her interlocutor, güç spektrumu geçerli (PSO) we relative fas (RP) tarafından iki özellik alçaklar. PSO täbligiň başarnygynyň negatif töweregidir we RP pozitif biridir. Bu özellikler bilen bir SVM öňki täblisaň başarnyk önlemek nusgalarynda beter gelişmiş. Biziň tapylarymyz sistemasyzlykçylar arasyndaky maglumat çykyşynyň täsirine baglanşygy maslahat berýär.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n perspektief op dialoog wat fokus op relatiewe inligting bydraaiïngs van gesprekslys partnere as 'n sleutel vir suksesvol kommunikasie. Ons voorskou die sukses van samarbeidlike taak in Engels en Daniese korpora van die taak-orienteerde dialoog. Twee funksies word uitgevoer van die frekwensiedomein voorstellings van die leksiese entropie reeks van elke interlocutor, krag spektrum oorlaap (PSO) en relatiewe fase (RP). Ons vind dat PSO 'n negatiewe voorskouer van taak sukses is, terwyl RP 'n positiewe een is. Name Ons gevinde beveel dat die strategiese verspreiding van inligting-densiteit tussen interlocutors relevant is aan taak sukses.", 'az': 'Biz müzakirə ortaqlarının qohumluq məlumatının məlumatı olaraq müzakirə edən dijalog barəsindəki perspektivə təklif edirik. Biz İngilizce və Danca korporasında işbirlikçilik işlərinin başarısından öyrəndik. Hər interlocutor, gücü spektrumu (PSO) və relatif fəzində (RP) leksik entropi serisinin frekans domeindən iki xüsusiyyət çıxarılır. PSO işlərin başarısızlığının negatif tədbir olduğunu görürük, RP pozitifdir. Bu xüsusiyyətlərlə birlikdə əvvəlki işin başarılı tədbir modellərində çox yaxşılaşdı. Bizim tapındıqlarımız tədbirlərin arasındakı məlumat yoğunluğunun stratejik dağıtılmasını iddia edir.', 'am': 'በአካባቢው የኢንተርኔት አካባሪዎችን የዝግጅት ማግኘት መክፈት በሚያሳየው ማኅበረሰብ ላይ የሚያሳውቅ የጦማሪያን ማኅበረሰብ እናስባለን፡፡ እንግሊዝኛ እና ዳንስ ኮርፖራ የስራ ማኅበረሰብ ድል መሆኑን እናውቃለን፡፡ Two features are extracted from the frequency domain representations of the lexical entropy series of each interlocutor, power spectrum overlap (PSO) and relative phase (RP).  PSO የስራ ዕድል ግንኙነት መሆኑን አነቀፍ እንደሆነ እናገኘዋለን፣ RP ስልጣን ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው የስራ ትክክለኛ ሚድላት ላይ የተጠቃሚ የስራ ምርጫዎች አሻራች፡፡ ግንኙነታችን የኢንተርኔት አካባቢዎች መካከል የመረጃ ውጤት የstrategic ክፍተት ለስራ ማግኘት የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի տեսանկյուն, որը կենտրոնանում է խոսակցության գործընկերների հարաբերական ինֆորմացիայի ներդրումների վրա, որպես հաջողակ հաղորդակցման կարիք: Մենք կանխատեսում ենք համագործակցության հաջողությունը անգլերենում և Դանիայում աշխատանքի ուղղությամբ խոսակցության մարմնում: Երկու առանձնահատկություն դուրս է գալիս յուրաքանչյուր ինտերլոկուտորի լեքսիկական էնտրոպիայի շարքի հաճախականության արտահայտություններից, ուժի սպեկտրի անկման (PSO) և հարաբերական ֆեզից (RP). Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ PSO-ն առաջադրանքի հաջողության բացասական կանխատեսողն է, իսկ RP-ը դրական է: Այս առանձնահատկություններով ունեցող ԱՎՄ-ը նշանակալի բարելավվեց նախորդ խնդիրների հաջողության կանխատեսման մոդելների վրա: Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ ինտերլոկուտորների միջև տեղեկատվության խտության ռազմավարական տարածումը կարևոր է խնդրի հաջողության համար:', 'bn': 'আমরা ডায়ালগের উপর একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রস্তাব করছি যা আলোচনার অংশীদারদের আত্মিক তথ্য অবদানের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে যাচ্ছে  ইংরেজি এবং ড্যানিশ কোর্পোরায় সহযোগিতার কাজের সাফল্য ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা হয়েছে কাজের দিকের আলোচনায়। লেক্সিক্যাল এন্ট্রোপি সিরিজের ফ্রেন্সি ডোমেইন থেকে দুটি বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, প্রত্যেক ইন্টারনেট্রোক্টর, বিদ্যুৎ স্পেক্টর্ম আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে পিএসও কাজের নেতিবাচক ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী এবং আর্পি একটা ইতিবাচক। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের সফল ভবিষ্যৎ মডেলে এসভিএম এর বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নত হয়েছে। আমাদের আবিস্কার পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে ইন্টারনেট স্থানীয়দের মধ্যে তথ্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য বিতরণের কৌশল বি', 'ca': "Proposem una perspectiva del diàleg que es centri en les contribucions relativas d'informació de les parelles de conversa com a clau per a una comunicació d'èxit. Predim l'èxit de la tasca col·laborativa en anglès i danès, de diàleg orientat a les tasques. Dos característiques es extraeixen de les representacions del domini de freqüència de la sèrie d'entropia lèxica de cada interlocutor, la superposició de l'espectre d'energia (PSO) i la fase relativa (RP). Trobem que la OSP és un preditor negatiu de l'èxit de la tasca, mentre que la RP és positiva. Un SVM amb aquestes característiques va millorar significativament en models anteriors de predicció de l'èxit de les tasques. Els nostres descobriments suggereixen que la distribució estratègica de la densitat d'informació entre els interlocutors és rellevant per l'èxit de la tasca.", 'bs': 'Predlažemo perspektivu na dijalogu koji se fokusira na relativni doprinos informacija razgovornih partnera kao ključ uspješne komunikacije. Predviđamo uspjeh saradnje na engleskom i danskom korporaciji dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Dva karakteristika se izvlače iz predstavljanja frekvencije domena leksičke entropije serije svakog interlocutora, preklapanja energetskog spektra (PSO) i relativne faze (RP). Pronašli smo da je PSO negativan predviđa č uspjeha zadataka, dok je RP pozitivan. SVM sa ovim karakteristikama značajno je poboljšao na prethodnim modelima predviđanja uspjeha zadataka. Naši nalazi sugeriraju da je strateška distribucija gustosti informacija između interlocutora važna za uspjeh zadataka.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme pohled na dialog, který se zaměřuje na relativní informační přínos konverzačních partnerů jako klíč k úspěšné komunikaci. Předpovídáme úspěch spolupráce v anglických a dánských korpusech dialogu orientovaného na úkoly. Z reprezentací frekvenční oblasti lexikální entropické řady každého partnera jsou extrahovány dvě rysy: překrývání výkonového spektra (PSO) a relativní fáze (RP). Zjišťujeme, že PSO je negativní prediktor úspěchu úkolu, zatímco RP je pozitivní. SVM s těmito funkcemi se výrazně zlepšil oproti předchozím modelům predikce úspěchu úkolů. Naše zjištění naznačují, že strategické rozdělení hustoty informací mezi partnery je relevantní pro úspěch úkolu.', 'et': 'Pakume välja dialoogi perspektiivi, mis keskendub vestluspartnerite suhtelisele infopanusele eduka suhtluse võtmena. Me ennustame koostööülesannete edukust inglise ja taani korpustes ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogi. Iga vestluspartneri leksikaalse entroopia seeria sagedusvaldkonna esindustest, võimsusspektri kattuvusest (PSO) ja suhtelisest faasist (RP) eraldatakse kaks omadust. Leiame, et PSO on ülesande edu negatiivne prognoos, samas RP on positiivne. Nende funktsioonidega SVM parandas oluliselt varasemate ülesannete edu prognoosimise mudelitega. Meie tulemused näitavad, et teabe tiheduse strateegiline jaotamine partnerite vahel on ülesannete edukuse seisukohalt oluline.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme dialogin näkökulmaa, joka keskittyy keskustelukumppanien suhteelliseen informaatioon onnistuneen viestinnän avaimena. Ennustamme yhteistyötehtävän onnistumista englannin- ja tanskalaisissa tehtäväpainotteisen vuoropuhelun korpusissa. Kunkin keskustelukumppanin lexikaalisen entropiasarjan taajuusalueen esittämistä, tehospektrin päällekkäisyyttä (PSO) ja suhteellista vaihetta (RP) on poimittu kaksi ominaisuutta. PSO on negatiivinen ennuste tehtävän onnistumisesta, kun taas RP on positiivinen. Näillä ominaisuuksilla varustettu SVM parani merkittävästi aiempiin tehtävien onnistumisen ennustusmalleihin verrattuna. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että tiedontiheyden strateginen jakautuminen keskustelukumppanien kesken on tärkeää tehtävän onnistumisen kannalta.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo perspektivo dialoga, ki se osredotoča na relativne informacijske prispevke pogovornih partnerjev kot ključ do uspešne komunikacije. Napovedujemo uspeh sodelovalne naloge v angleškem in danskem korpusu nalog usmerjenega dialoga. Iz frekvenčnih domenskih predstavitev serije leksikalne entropije vsakega sogovornika, prekrivanja močnega spektra (PSO) in relativne faze (RP) sta pridobljeni dve značilnosti. Ugotovili smo, da PSO negativno napoveduje uspeh nalog, medtem ko je RP pozitiven. SVM s temi funkcijami se je bistveno izboljšal v primerjavi s prejšnjimi modeli napovedovanja uspeha opravil. Naše ugotovitve kažejo, da je strateška porazdelitev gostote informacij med sogovorniki pomembna za uspeh nalog.', 'ha': "Munã ƙarfafa wani kalma a kan zauren akwatin bayanin da ke muhalli da ma'abũcin mutane na danganta da mazaɓa kamar maɓalli wa mawaɓa da babban mazaɓa. Tuna gabani da cin nasara ga aikin aiki da ke cikin Ingiriya da danshiya da shirin mazaɓa masu shirya. An fiɗe wasu feature biyu daga the Frequency Domen wakilling of the linguin entropy ɗin leksisi, rufe power spectrum (PSO) da fase na danganta (RP). Munã ganin PSO ya zama mai bastarwa ga babban rabo na aikin, da kuma RP yana da wani mataimaki. An sami SvM da wannan feature mai girma cikin misãlai na gaba da babban aikin da aka sani. FantayinMu na gaya cewa rabon da kimkakati na tsakanin mutane da ke cikin mataifa, yana da muhimmi zuwa babban rabo ga aikin.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe perspektur kanggo dialog sing dikutung kanggo nyenengaké informasi ning resmi ingkang cara nggawe komunikasi gagal Awakdhéwé ngerti barang nggawe barang nggambar barang inggiles karo bugar Danis Two parameters are extract from the partition domain representations of the lectucal Entropy string of every interlocutor, power pectum surLap (PPO) and ratio phase (PP). Awak dhéwé ngerti, PPO kuwi nggawe Perintah dhéwé apa-apa kanggo barang nggawe barang pengguna, macem RP kuwi Mungkin dadi. Name Mbok', 'he': 'אנו מציעים פרספקטיבה על דיאלוג שמתמקד בתרומות מידע יחסיים של שותפים לשיחה כמפתח לתקשורת מצליחה. אנו חושפים את הצלחה של משימה שיתוף פעולה באנגלית ודנית של דיאלוג ממוקד משימה. שני תכונות מווצאים מהייצוגים בתחום התדירות של סדרת אנטרופיה הלקסית של כל אינטרלוקוטור, פיצול ספקטרום כוח (PSO) ושלב יחסי (RP). אנו מוצאים שPSO הוא צפוי שלילי של הצלחה במשימה, בעוד RP הוא אחד חיובי. Name הממצאים שלנו מצביעים שהפיצול האסטרטגי של צפיפות המידע בין האינטרלוקטורים הוא רלוונטי להצלחה במשימה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ་ཆུང་མཐུན་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མཐུན་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་མཐུན་འགྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱེན་པའི་ ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡུལ་དང་ཌེན་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་རྗེས་སྔོན་འདོད། Two features are extracted from the frequency domain representations of the lexical entropy series of each interlocutor, power spectrum overlap (PSO) and relative phase (RP). ང་ཚོས་PSO་ནི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གནོད་སྐྱོན་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཞིག་རེད། RP་ནི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་རེད། SVM འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡོད་ཚད་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྗེས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སུ་གཏོང ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གིས་ཁྱད་པར་དབུལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གླེང་འབྲེལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུན་གྲུབ་སྐྱོང་དང་གསལ་བཤད་'}
{'en': 'Affect-LM : A Neural Language Model for Customizable Affective Text Generation', 'ar': 'Affect-LM: نموذج لغة عصبية لتوليد نص عاطفي قابل للتخصيص', 'es': 'Affect-LM: un modelo de lenguaje neuronal para la generación de texto afectivo personalizable', 'fr': 'Affect-LM\xa0: un modèle de langage neuronal pour la génération de texte affectif personnalisable', 'pt': 'Affect-LM: um modelo de linguagem neural para geração de texto afetivo personalizável', 'ja': '影響- LM ：カスタマイズ可能な感情的テキスト生成のためのニューラル言語モデル', 'hi': 'प्रभावित-LM: अनुकूलन भावात्मक पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए एक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Affect-LM: Нейронная языковая модель для настраиваемого генерации аффективного текста', 'zh': 'Affect-LM曰:自定义情神经言', 'ga': 'Affect-LM: Samhail Neural Teanga do Ghiniúint Téacs Tionchar Inoiriúnaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Affect-LM: Neurális nyelvi modell a testreszabható affektív szöveggeneráláshoz', 'el': 'Ένα Νευρικό Μοντέλο Γλώσσας για Προσαρμογή Επιθετικού Κειμένου', 'kk': 'QPrintPreviewDialog', 'lt': 'Affect-LM: Neural Language Model for Customizable Affective Text Generation', 'it': 'Affect-LM: un modello di linguaggio neurale per la generazione di testo affettivo personalizzabile', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സ്വകാര്യമാക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള എക്സ്റ്റെക്റ്റ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Affett-LM: Mudell tal-Lingwa Newrali għall-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Affettiv Personalizzabbli', 'mn': 'Эффект-LM: Хэрэглэгдэх эффективны Текст үүсгэх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн хэл загвар', 'no': 'Effekt- LM: Ein neiralspråk- modell for tilpassbare effektiv tekstgenerering', 'pl': 'Affect-LM: neuronowy model języka dla konfigurowalnego efektywnego generowania tekstu', 'ro': 'Affect-LM: Un model de limbaj neural pentru generarea de text afectiv personalizabil', 'sr': 'Afekt-LM: Neuralni jezik model za generaciju korisnog efikasnog teksta', 'mk': 'Name', 'si': 'Affect- LM: A neural language Model for custom Affective Text neration', 'so': 'Affect-LM: A Neural language Model for Customable Text Generation', 'sv': 'Affect-LM: En neural språkmodell för anpassningsbar affektiv textgenerering', 'ta': 'Affect-LM: A Neural Language Model for Customizable Affective Text Generation', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Bộ màu tím: Mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh cho tạo văn bản có tính tình chỉnh', 'bg': 'Модел на неврален език за персонализиране на ефектен текст', 'nl': 'Affect-LM: een neuraal taalmodel voor aanpasbare affectieve tekstgeneratie', 'da': 'Affect-LM: En neural sprogmodel til brugerdefinerbar affektiv tekstgenerering', 'hr': 'Afekt- LM: Neuralni jezik model za generaciju korisnog efektivnog teksta', 'id': 'Affect-LM: A Neural Language Model for Customizable Affective Text Generation', 'de': 'Affect-LM: Ein neuronales Sprachmodell für anpassbare affektive Textgenerierung', 'tr': 'Etkinlik-LM: Şahsy Etkinlik Metin Döredişi üçin bir näyral Dili', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Affect-LM: Model of Language Neural for Customized Text Generation', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Affect-LM: A Neural Language Model for Customizable Affective Text Generation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Affect- LM: Özləşdirilabilir Afektiv Metin Məxluqatının Nöral Dili Modeli', 'bn': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Afekt-LM: Neuralni jezik model za generaciju korisnog efektivnog teksta', 'ko': '감정 LM: 감정 텍스트 생성을 위한 신경 언어 모델 사용자 정의', 'ca': 'Affect-LM: Un model de llenguatge neural per a generar text afectiu personalitzable', 'et': 'Affect-LM: kohandatava mõjutava teksti genereerimise neuraalne keele mudel', 'fi': 'Affect-LM: Neuraalinen kielimalli muokattavaa afektiivista tekstiä varten', 'cs': 'Affect-LM: neuronový jazykový model pro přizpůsobitelné efektivní generování textu', 'jv': 'Mulai-LM: model Jejarang Neral kanggo Kemerdekaan AfEffectative Text Generation', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Affect-LM: Model nevralnega jezika za prilagodljivo ustvarjanje efektivnega besedila', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'Affect-LM: སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་བཟོ་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལ་རང་བཟོས་ནུས་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས'}
{'en': 'Human verbal communication includes affective messages which are conveyed through use of emotionally colored words. There has been a lot of research effort in this direction but the problem of integrating state-of-the-art neural language models with affective information remains an area ripe for exploration. In this paper, we propose an extension to an LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) language model for generation of conversational text, conditioned on affect categories. Our proposed model, Affect-LM enables us to customize the degree of emotional content in generated sentences through an additional design parameter. Perception studies conducted using Amazon Mechanical Turk show that Affect-LM can generate naturally looking emotional sentences without sacrificing grammatical correctness. Affect-LM also learns affect-discriminative word representations, and perplexity experiments show that additional affective information in conversational text can improve language model prediction.', 'ar': 'يشمل الاتصال اللفظي البشري الرسائل العاطفية التي يتم نقلها من خلال استخدام الكلمات الملونة عاطفياً. كان هناك الكثير من الجهود البحثية في هذا الاتجاه ، لكن مشكلة دمج أحدث نماذج اللغة العصبية مع المعلومات العاطفية تظل مجالًا جاهزًا للاستكشاف. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح امتدادًا لنموذج لغة LSTM (ذاكرة طويلة المدى) لتوليد نص محادثة ، مشروطًا بفئات التأثير. يتيح لنا نموذجنا المقترح ، Affect-LM تخصيص درجة المحتوى العاطفي في الجمل التي تم إنشاؤها من خلال معلمة تصميم إضافية. تُظهر دراسات التصور التي أجريت باستخدام Amazon Mechanical Turk أن Affect-LM يمكنه إنشاء جمل عاطفية تبدو طبيعية دون التضحية بالصحة النحوية. يتعلم Affect-LM أيضًا تمثيلات الكلمات التمييزية المؤثرة ، وتُظهر تجارب الحيرة أن المعلومات العاطفية الإضافية في نص المحادثة يمكن أن تحسن التنبؤ بنموذج اللغة.', 'pt': 'A comunicação verbal humana inclui mensagens afetivas que são transmitidas através do uso de palavras emocionalmente coloridas. Tem havido muito esforço de pesquisa nessa direção, mas o problema de integrar modelos de linguagem neural de última geração com informações afetivas continua sendo uma área madura para exploração. Neste artigo, propomos uma extensão a um modelo de linguagem LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) para geração de texto conversacional, condicionado a categorias de afetos. Nosso modelo proposto, Affect-LM, nos permite personalizar o grau de conteúdo emocional nas frases geradas por meio de um parâmetro de design adicional. Estudos de percepção realizados usando o Amazon Mechanical Turk mostram que o Affect-LM pode gerar frases emocionais de aparência natural sem sacrificar a correção gramatical. Affect-LM também aprende representações de palavras discriminativas de afeto, e experimentos de perplexidade mostram que informações afetivas adicionais em texto de conversação podem melhorar a previsão do modelo de linguagem.', 'es': 'La comunicación verbal humana incluye mensajes afectivos que se transmiten mediante el uso de palabras emocionalmente coloreadas. Se ha realizado un gran esfuerzo de investigación en esta dirección, pero el problema de integrar modelos de lenguaje neuronal de última generación con información afectiva sigue siendo un área madura para la exploración. En este artículo, proponemos una extensión a un modelo de lenguaje LSTM (memoria a corto plazo) para la generación de texto conversacional, condicionado a las categorías afectivas. Nuestro modelo propuesto, Affect-LM, nos permite personalizar el grado de contenido emocional en las oraciones generadas a través de un parámetro de diseño adicional. Los estudios de percepción realizados con Amazon Mechanical Turk muestran que Affect-LM puede generar frases emocionales de aspecto natural sin sacrificar la corrección gramatical. Affect-LM también aprende representaciones de palabras afecto-discriminatorias, y los experimentos de perplejidad muestran que la información afectiva adicional en el texto conversacional puede mejorar la predicción del modelo de lenguaje.', 'fr': "La communication verbale humaine comprend des messages affectifs qui sont transmis par l'utilisation de mots colorés émotionnellement. De nombreux efforts de recherche ont été déployés dans ce sens, mais le problème de l'intégration de modèles de langage neuronal de pointe avec des informations affectives reste un domaine mûr pour l'exploration. Dans cet article, nous proposons une extension à un modèle de langage LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pour la génération de texte conversationnel, conditionné par catégories d'affect. Le modèle que nous proposons, Affect-LM, nous permet de personnaliser le degré de contenu émotionnel dans les phrases générées grâce à un paramètre de conception supplémentaire. Des études de perception menées à l'aide d'Amazon Mechanical Turk montrent que Affect-LM peut générer des phrases émotionnelles d'apparence naturelle sans sacrifier la correction grammaticale. Affect-LM apprend également des représentations de mots discriminant l'affect, et des expériences de perplexité montrent que des informations affectives supplémentaires dans un texte conversationnel peuvent améliorer la prédiction du modèle linguistique.", 'ja': '人間の言葉によるコミュニケーションには、感情的に色づいた言葉を使用して伝達される感情的なメッセージが含まれます。この方向には多くの研究努力があったが、最先端のニューラル言語モデルと情動情報を統合するという問題は、まだ探求のための領域として成熟したままである。本稿では、影響カテゴリを条件とする会話テキストの生成のためのLSTM （ Long Short - Term Memory ）言語モデルの拡張を提案する。私たちが提案するモデル「Affect - LM」は、追加のデザインパラメータを通じて、生成された文章の感情的なコンテンツの度合いをカスタマイズすることを可能にします。Amazon Mechanical Turkを使用して行われた知覚研究では、Affect - LMは文法的正しさを犠牲にすることなく、自然に感情的な文章を生成することができることが示されています。影響- LMはまた、影響を区別する単語表現を学習し、困惑実験は、会話テキスト内の追加の情動情報が言語モデル予測を改善することができることを示している。', 'hi': 'मानव मौखिक संचार में भावनात्मक संदेश शामिल हैं जो भावनात्मक रूप से रंगीन शब्दों के उपयोग के माध्यम से व्यक्त किए जाते हैं। इस दिशा में बहुत सारे शोध प्रयास किए गए हैं, लेकिन राज्य के अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल को भावात्मक जानकारी के साथ एकीकृत करने की समस्या अन्वेषण के लिए परिपक्व क्षेत्र बनी हुई है। इस पेपर में, हम संवादी पाठ की पीढ़ी के लिए एक LSTM (लंबी अल्पकालिक स्मृति) भाषा मॉडल के लिए एक विस्तार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो प्रभावित श्रेणियों पर वातानुकूलित है। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल, प्रभाव-एलएम हमें एक अतिरिक्त डिजाइन पैरामीटर के माध्यम से उत्पन्न वाक्यों में भावनात्मक सामग्री की डिग्री को अनुकूलित करने में सक्षम बनाता है। अमेज़ॅन मैकेनिकल तुर्क का उपयोग करके किए गए धारणा अध्ययनों से पता चलता है कि प्रभावित-एलएम व्याकरणिक शुद्धता का त्याग किए बिना स्वाभाविक रूप से दिखने वाले भावनात्मक वाक्यों को उत्पन्न कर सकता है। प्रभाव-एलएम भी प्रभावित-भेदभावपूर्ण शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है, और उलझन प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि संवादी पाठ में अतिरिक्त भावात्मक जानकारी भाषा मॉडल भविष्यवाणी में सुधार कर सकती है।', 'zh': '人口交流,情色词语。 于此多方,先进神经言,犹熟索域也。 本文之中,发LSTM(长短期记)言语模样,以成会话文本,以妨类别。 吾之所为者Impact-LM使吾得以额外之设参数自定义成句之情也。 用Amazon Mechanical Turk知明,Affect-LM可以不杀语法正确性生自然之情句。 Affect-LM学情判别词,困实验明,会话文本他情信可改言语模样之占。', 'ru': 'Словесное общение человека включает в себя аффективные сообщения, которые передаются посредством использования эмоционально окрашенных слов. В этом направлении было много исследований, но проблема интеграции современных нейронных языковых моделей с аффективной информацией остается областью, созревшей для исследования. В этой статье мы предлагаем расширение языковой модели LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) для генерации разговорного текста, основанного на категориях влияния. Наша предлагаемая модель, Affect-LM, позволяет нам настраивать степень эмоционального содержания в сгенерированных предложениях с помощью дополнительного параметра дизайна. Исследования восприятия, проведенные с использованием Amazon Mechanical Turk, показывают, что Affect-LM может генерировать эмоциональные предложения естественного вида, не жертвуя грамматической корректностью. Affect-LM также изучает аффектно-дискриминирующие представления слов, и эксперименты с недоумением показывают, что дополнительная аффективная информация в разговорном тексте может улучшить предсказание языковой модели.', 'ga': 'Áirítear leis an gcumarsáid béil daonna teachtaireachtaí mothúcháin a chuirtear in iúl trí úsáid a bhaint as focail ar dhathanna mothúchánacha. Tá go leor iarrachtaí taighde déanta sa treo seo ach tá fadhb fós ann maidir le samhlacha nua-aimseartha teanga néaracha a chomhtháthú le heolas mothúchánach ina réimse níos aibí le haghaidh iniúchta. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid síneadh a chur le samhail teanga LSTM (Cuimhne Fada Gearrthéarmach) chun téacs comhrá a ghiniúint, arna choinníoll ar chatagóirí tionchair. Cuireann ár múnla molta, Affect-LM ar ár gcumas méid an ábhair mhothúchánach in abairtí ginte a shaincheapadh trí pharaiméadar dearaidh breise. Léiríonn staidéir aireachtála a rinneadh ag baint úsáide as Amazon Mechanical Turk gur féidir le Affect-LM abairtí mothúchánacha a fhéachann go nádúrtha a ghiniúint gan cruinneas gramadaí a íobairt. Foghlaimíonn Affect-LM freisin léiriúcháin focal difear-idirdhealaitheach, agus taispeánann turgnaimh imphléasachta gur féidir le faisnéis bhreise i dtéacs comhrá feabhas a chur ar thuar na samhla teanga.', 'hu': 'Az emberi verbális kommunikáció olyan érzelmi üzeneteket tartalmaz, amelyeket érzelmileg színes szavak használatával közvetítenek. Sok kutatási erőfeszítés történt ebben az irányban, de a legkorszerűbb neurális nyelvi modellek affektív információkkal való integrálásának problémája továbbra is feltárásra érett terület. Jelen tanulmányban egy LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) nyelvi modell kiterjesztését javasoljuk a beszélgetési szövegek generálására, a hatáskörök kategóriáinak megfelelően. Javasolt modellünk, az Affect-LM lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy egy további tervezési paraméter segítségével testreszabhassuk a létrehozott mondatok érzelmi tartalmának mértékét. Az Amazon Mechanical Turk segítségével végzett érzékelési tanulmányok azt mutatják, hogy az Affect-LM természetes kinézetű érzelmi mondatokat generál anélkül, hogy feláldozná a nyelvtani korrektséget. Az Affect-LM megtanulja az érintett-diszkriminatív szóreprezentációkat is, és a zavarósági kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a beszélgetési szövegben található további affektív információk javíthatják a nyelvmodell előrejelzését.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის გერბალური კომუნიკაცია აქვს მოტვირდებული შეტყობინებები, რომლებიც ემოციონიურად ფერად ფერად სიტყვების გამოყენებით გადატვი ამ მიზეზაში ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი შესწავლობა იყო, მაგრამ შესწავლობას სახელის ნეიროლური ენის მოდელების ინტერგურაციის პრობლემა დარჩენა. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ LSTM (სიგრძე სიგრძე მეხსიერების) ენის მოდელზე, როგორც კონტაქციული ტექსტის შექმნა, როგორც გამოცდილობულია კატეგორიაში. ჩვენი მოდელი, Affect-LM მოძლია ჩვენ ემოციონალური შემდგომარების დროს შექმნა წარმოქმნილი სიტყვებში დამატებული დიზაინის პარამეტრებით დამატებით. პროცენტების სწავლებები, რომლებიც ამოზონიკალური მაქნიკალური რურკის გამოყენებული გამოყენებული გამოყენებულია, რომ Affect-LM შეუძლიათ წარმოიდგინოთ ემოციონალური სიტყ Affect-LM ასევე ისწავლის შესახებ დისკრიმინატიური სიტყვების გამოსახულება, და პროპლექტიური ექსპერიმენტები იჩვენებს, რომ დამატებული ინფორმაცია კონტრაციოლური ტექსტიში', 'it': "La comunicazione verbale umana include messaggi affettivi che vengono trasmessi attraverso l'uso di parole emotivamente colorate. Ci sono stati molti sforzi di ricerca in questa direzione, ma il problema di integrare modelli di linguaggio neurale all'avanguardia con informazioni affettive rimane un'area matura per l'esplorazione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un'estensione a un modello linguistico LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) per la generazione di testo conversazionale, condizionato dalle categorie di effetti. Il nostro modello proposto, Affect-LM, ci permette di personalizzare il grado di contenuto emotivo nelle frasi generate attraverso un parametro di progettazione aggiuntivo. Studi sulla percezione condotti utilizzando Amazon Mechanical Turk dimostrano che Affect-LM può generare frasi emotive dall'aspetto naturale senza sacrificare la correttezza grammaticale. Affect-LM impara anche rappresentazioni di parole affettive discriminatorie, e gli esperimenti di perplessità mostrano che ulteriori informazioni affettive nel testo conversazionale possono migliorare la previsione del modello linguistico.", 'lt': 'Žmogaus žodinis ryšys apima įtakingas žinias, perduodamas naudojant emocionaliai spalvotus žodžius. Mokslinių tyrimų šioje srityje dėta daug pastangų, tačiau pažangiausių neuralinių kalbų modelių integravimo su įtakinga informacija problem a išlieka tiriama sritis. Šiame dokumente siūlome pratęsti kalbos model į LSTM (ilgalaikė trumpalaikė atmintis), skirtą pokalbio teksto kūrimui, priklausomai nuo poveikio kategorijų. Mūsų siūlomas modelis Affect-LM leidžia mums pritaikyti emocinio turinio laipsnį sukauptais sakiniais papildomu projektiniu parametru. Perception studies conducted using Amazon Mechanical Turk show that Affect-LM can generate naturally looking emotional sentences without sacrificing grammatical correctness.  Poveikis LM taip pat mokosi diskriminuojančių žodžių atstovavimų, o triukšmo eksperimentai rodo, kad papildoma įtakinga informacija pokalbio tekste gali pagerinti kalbos modelio prognozę.', 'kk': 'Адам вербалды коммуникациясы емоциялық түсті сөздерді қолдану арқылы көмектесетін хаттар бар. Бұл бағытта бірнеше зерттеу әрекеттері болды, бірақ әрекетті невралдық тіл моделдерін біріктіру мәселесі керек мәліметтерімен біріктіру үшін аумақтық өзгертілген. Бұл қағазда, қатынау мәтінді құру үшін LSTM (ұзын қысқа уақыт жады) тіл үлгісінің кеңейтуін таңдаймыз. Бұл санаттар санаттарына әсер етеді. Біздің келтірілген үлгіміз "Affect-LM" қосымша дизайн параметрі арқылы жасалған сөйлемелердің эмоциялық мазмұнын баптауға мүмкіндік береді. Amazon механикалық Турк арқылы әрекеттер зерттеулері жасалған аффект- LM грамматикалық дұрыстығын жетіспей емоциялық сөздерді құрастыра алады дегенді көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, LM дискриминациялық сөздердің түсініктемелерін оқып береді, және тәжірибелердің тәжірибелері, аударылық мәтіндегі қосымша мәліметтің түсініктемелерін түсініп', 'mk': 'Човечката вербална комуникација вклучува afective пораки кои се пренесуваат преку употреба на емоционално боени зборови. Имаше многу истражувачки напори во оваа насока, но проблемот со интеграцијата на најсовремените нервни јазички модели со влијателни информации останува област зрела за истражување. Во овој весник предлагаме продолжување на јазичкиот модел на LSTM (долг краткорочен меморија) за генерација на разговарачки текст, условен на влијание на категориите. Нашиот предложен модел, Affect-LM ни овозможува да го прилагодиме степенот на емоционална содржина во генерираните реченици преку дополнителен дизајнски параметр. Студиите за перцепција спроведени со користење на Амазонски механички Турк покажуваат дека Affect-LM може да генерира природно изгледачки емоционални реченици без да ја жртвува граматичката коректност. Affect-LM, исто така, учи да влијае на дискриминативните репрезентации на зборовите, и експериментите на збунетоста покажуваат дека дополнителните ефективни информации во разговорниот текст можат да ја подобрат предвидувањето на јазичкиот модел.', 'el': 'Η ανθρώπινη λεκτική επικοινωνία περιλαμβάνει συναισθηματικά μηνύματα που μεταδίδονται μέσω της χρήσης συναισθηματικά χρωματισμένων λέξεων. Έχει γίνει μεγάλη ερευνητική προσπάθεια προς αυτή την κατεύθυνση, αλλά το πρόβλημα της ενσωμάτωσης σύγχρονων μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας με συναισθηματικές πληροφορίες παραμένει μια περιοχή ώριμη για εξερεύνηση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια επέκταση σε ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία κειμένου συνομιλίας, με βάση τις κατηγορίες επιρροής. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μας, μας επιτρέπει να προσαρμόσουμε τον βαθμό συναισθηματικού περιεχομένου στις προτάσεις που δημιουργούνται μέσω μιας επιπλέον παραμέτρου σχεδιασμού. Μελέτες αντίληψης που διεξήχθησαν χρησιμοποιώντας το Amazon Mechanical Turk δείχνουν ότι το Affect-LM μπορεί να δημιουργήσει φυσικά αισθησιακές προτάσεις χωρίς να θυσιάσει τη γραμματική ορθότητα. Το Affect-LM μαθαίνει επίσης αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων με διακριτικές επιπτώσεις και πειράματα σύγχυσης δείχνουν ότι πρόσθετες συναισθηματικές πληροφορίες στο κείμενο συνομιλίας μπορούν να βελτιώσουν την πρόβλεψη γλωσσικού μοντέλου.', 'ms': 'Human verbal communication includes affective messages which are conveyed through use of emotionally colored words.  Terdapat banyak usaha kajian dalam arah ini tetapi masalah untuk mengintegrasikan model bahasa saraf-state-of-the-art dengan maklumat afektif tetap kawasan yang dewasa untuk eksplorasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan sambungan ke model bahasa LSTM (Memori Panjang-Term) untuk generasi teks perbualan, berkundisi pada kategori pengaruh. Model kami yang diusulkan, Affect-LM membolehkan kami untuk menyesuaikan darjah kandungan emosional dalam kalimat yang dijana melalui parameter reka tambahan. kajian perception yang dilakukan menggunakan Amazon Mechanical Turk menunjukkan bahawa Affect-LM boleh menghasilkan kalimat emosional yang terlihat secara alami tanpa mengorbankan kebijaksanaan grammatik. Affect-LM also learns affect-discriminative word representations, and perplexity experiments show that additional affective information in conversational text can improve language model prediction.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ വാര്\u200dബാല്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രാപ്തികമായ സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വികാരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിറമ There has been a lot of research effort in this direction but the problem of integrating state-of-the-art neural language models with affective information remains an area ripe for exploration.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാചകത്തിനുള്ള ത നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d, ഫെക്സ്റ്റ്-എംഎം നമ്മള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d ഡിസൈനര്\u200d പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d വഴി സൃഷ്ടിച്ച വാക അമാസണ്\u200d മെക്കനിക്കല്\u200d തുര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പെര്\u200dസെപ്ഷന്\u200d പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ആഫ്റ്റ്-എംഎം സ്വാഭാവികമായി  സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന', 'mt': 'Il-komunikazzjoni verbali tal-bniedem tinkludi messaġġi affettivi li jitwasslu permezz tal-użu ta’ kliem ikkulurit emozzjonalment. Kien hemm ħafna sforz ta’ riċerka f’din id-direzzjoni iżda l-problem a tal-integrazzjoni tal-mudelli tal-lingwi newrali l-aktar avvanzati b’informazzjoni affetttiva tibqa’ żona matura għall-esplorazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu estensjoni għal mudell lingwistiku tal-LSTM (Memorja fit-Tul fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien) għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ test ta’ konverżjoni, kondizzjonat fuq kategoriji ta’ affettwazzjoni. Il-mudell propost tagħna, Affect-LM, jippermettilna naraw il-grad ta’ kontenut emozzjonali f’sentenzi ġġenerati permezz ta’ parametru addizzjonali tad-disinn. Studji ta’ perċezzjoni mwettqa bl-użu ta’ Amazon Mechanical Turk juru li Affect-LM jista’ jiġġenera sentenzi emozzjonali li jidhru b’mod naturali mingħajr ma tiġi sakrifikata l-korrettezza grammatika. L-Affett-LM jitgħallem ukoll rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem diskriminatorji, u esperimenti ta’ perplessità juru li informazzjoni affetttiva addizzjonali fit-test tal-konverżjoni tista’ ttejjeb it-tbassir tal-mudell tal-lingwa.', 'no': 'Menneske verbalekommunikasjon inneheld påvirkelige meldingar som vert konvertert gjennom bruk av emosjonell farge ord. Det har vært mykje forskningseffort i denne retninga, men problemet med integrering av tilstanden til kunstspråkkmodeller med påvirkelige informasjon blir eit område ripe for utforsking. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit utviding til eit LSTM- språk- modell (lang kortmannomsikt) for å laga samtaletekst som er avhengig på kategoriar. Vår foreslått modell, Affect-LM lèt oss tilpassa kor mykje emosjonell innhald i oppretta setningar gjennom ein ekstra design parameter. Prosepsjonsstudiar gjennomført med Amazon Mechanical Turk viser at Affect-LM kan laga naturleg utsjåande emosjonssetningar utan å oftasta grammatiske rettighet. Effekt-LM lærer også effekt-diskriminasjonsbehandlingar av ordrepresentasjonar, og eksperimenter for kompleksitet viser at ekstra effektiv informasjon i konvertasjon-tekst kan forbetra forebygging av språk-modeller.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний үгийн харилцаа нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өнгөтэй үгийг ашиглаж ирсэн нөлөөлдөг захиагуудыг агуулдаг. Энэ хэсэгт олон судалгааны хичээл байлаа. Гэхдээ урлагийн сэтгэл зүйн хэл загваруудыг нөлөөлдөг мэдээлэл дээр нэгтгэх асуудал нь судалгааны тулд хөгжиж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид LSTM (Удаан богино-Term Memory) хэл загварын үеэр ярианы текст бий болгох загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар, Affect-LM бидэнд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тодорхойлолтыг нэмэлт дизайны параметрын аргаар бий болгох боломжтой болгодог. Амазон Механик Турк ашиглан хийгдсэн хувьцааны судалгаанууд харуулж байгаа нь Аффект-LM нь грамматикийн зөв байдлыг хүргэхгүй сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өгүүлбэрийг бий болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эффект-ЛМ мөн ялгаагүй үг илэрхийлэлтэй нөлөө үзүүлдэг. Эффект-ЛМ-ын туршилтууд нь хэл загварын тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Comunicarea verbală umană include mesaje afective care sunt transmise prin utilizarea de cuvinte colorate emoțional. Au fost multe eforturi de cercetare în această direcție, dar problema integrării modelelor de limbaj neural de ultimă generație cu informații afective rămâne o zonă pregătită pentru explorare. În această lucrare, propunem o extensie a unui model lingvistic LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pentru generarea de text conversațional, condiționat de categoriile de afectare. Modelul nostru propus, Affect-LM ne permite să personalizăm gradul de conținut emoțional în propozițiile generate printr-un parametru suplimentar de design. Studiile de percepție efectuate folosind Amazon Mechanical Turk arată că Affect-LM poate genera propoziții emoționale cu aspect natural fără a sacrifica corectitudinea gramaticală. Afect-LM învață, de asemenea, reprezentările cuvintelor afectante-discriminatorii, iar experimentele de perplexitate arată că informațiile afective suplimentare din textul conversațional pot îmbunătăți predicția modelului lingvistic.', 'pl': 'Ludzka komunikacja werbalna obejmuje wiadomości afektywne, które są przekazywane przez użycie emocjonalnie kolorowych słów. Podjęto wiele wysiłków badawczych w tym kierunku, ale problem integracji najnowocześniejszych modeli języka neuronowego z informacją afektywną pozostaje obszarem dojrzałym do eksploracji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy rozszerzenie modelu językowego LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) do generowania tekstu konwersacyjnego, uwarunkowanego kategoriami efektów. Proponowany przez nas model Affect-LM pozwala nam dostosować stopień treści emocjonalnej w wygenerowanych zdaniach poprzez dodatkowy parametr projektowy. Badania percepcji przeprowadzone przy użyciu Amazon Mechanical Turk pokazują, że Affect-LM może generować naturalnie wyglądające zdania emocjonalne bez poświęcania poprawności gramatycznej. Affect-LM uczy się również reprezentacji słów dyskryminujących wpływ, a eksperymenty z zakłopotaniem pokazują, że dodatkowe informacje afektywne w tekście konwersacyjnym mogą poprawić przewidywanie modelu językowego.', 'sr': 'Ljudska verbalna komunikacija uključuje utjecajne poruke koje se prenose koristeći emocionalno obojene reči. Postojalo je mnogo istraživanja u ovom smjeru, ali problem integracije državnih neuralnih jezičkih modela sa utjecajnim informacijama ostaje područje zrelo za istraživanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo produženje jezičkog modela LSTM (Long-Term Memory) za generaciju razgovornog teksta, pod uvjetom na kategorije uticaja. Naš predloženi model, Affect-LM nam omogućava da prilagodimo stepen emocionalnog sadržaja u proizvedenim rečenicama kroz dodatni dizajnski parameter. Ispitivanja proceptacije provedena koristeći Amazonski mehanički Turski pokazuju da Affect-LM može stvoriti prirodno izgledajuće emocionalne rečenice bez žrtvovanja gramatične ispravnosti. Afekt-LM takođe uči na diskriminacijske predstave riječi, a eksperimenti kompleksnosti pokazuju da dodatne utjecajne informacije u konverzacijskom tekstu mogu poboljšati predviđanje jezičkog modela.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු වාර්තාවික සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධ පණිවිඩය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ. ඒ වගේම හැ මේ පැත්තේ ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන් මේ පැත්තේ, අපි LSTM (ලොකු කොට්ටාර්ම් මතකය) භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා පරිස්සම් පාළුවක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පරිස්සම් කරනවා, ප අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල්, Affect-LM අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තවත් විද්\u200dයාපනය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා භාව අමාසේන් මැකිනිකල් තුර්ක් භාවිතානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ Affect-LM ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වභාවිතයෙන් හ Affect-LM වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා විශේෂ වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන', 'so': 'Wargelinta dadka waxaa ka mid ah macluumaad saameyn ah, kuwaas oo lagu isticmaalayo erayo ismidab ah. Halkaas waxaa ku dhacay hawlo waxbarasho badan, laakiin dhibaatada la qabsashada modelalka afka farshaxanka ah ee wadanka farshaxanka ah, ee macluumaadka saameyn ku leh, waxay ku jirtaa meel baaritaan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal dheeraad ah oo LSTM (xasuusta waqtiga dheer) oo u qoran qoraalka hadalka, oo ku saabsan kooxo saameyn ku leh. Tusaale la soo jeeday, Affect-LM ayaa inagu isticmaali kara si aan u isticmaalno shahaadada waxyaabaha hissiga ah oo lagu sameeyo ciqaab kale ah. Waxbarashada heshiiska lagu sameynayo isticmaalka Amazon Mechanical Turk waxay muujin karaan in Affect-LM uu soo saari karo fursad dabiicadda ah oo aan bixinayn hagaajiyada grammatika. Af-LM waxay sidoo kale bartaan inay saameyn ku yeelaan macluumaadka ku saameyn-takoorida hadalka, imtixaanka qalabkana waxay muujiyaan in macluumaad dheeraad oo saameyn ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka hadalka lagu qorayo uu beddeli karo qaababka qaababka luuqada.', 'sv': 'Mänsklig verbal kommunikation innefattar känslomässiga budskap som förmedlas genom användning av känslomässigt färgade ord. Det har gjorts mycket forskning i denna riktning, men problemet med att integrera state-of-the-art neurala språkmodeller med affektiv information är fortfarande ett område moget för utforskning. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en förlängning av en språkmodell för LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) för generering av konversationstext, beroende på påverkanskategorier. Vår föreslagna modell, Affect-LM, gör det möjligt för oss att anpassa graden av känslomässigt innehåll i genererade meningar genom en ytterligare designparameter. Perceptionsstudier utförda med Amazon Mechanical Turk visar att Affect-LM kan generera naturligt utseende känslomässiga meningar utan att offra grammatisk korrekthet. Affect-LM lär sig också affect-diskriminerande ordrepresentationer, och förvirringsexperiment visar att ytterligare affektiv information i konversationstext kan förbättra språkmodellprediktion.', 'ta': 'மனித சொல்லாத தொடர்பு பாதிக்கப்பட்ட செய்தி இந்த திசையில் நிறைய ஆராய்ச்சி முயற்சி இருக்கிறது ஆனால் பாதிப்புக்குள்ள தகவல் உள்ள நிலையில் உள்ள புதிய மொழி மாதிரிகளை ஒன்றிணை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் LSTM (நீண்ட சிறிய- முறை நினைவகம்) மொழி மாதிரியை உருவாக்க, பேச்சு உரையை உருவாக்க, பாதிக்கப்பட்ட வகைப்புகள்  எங்கள் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி, விகிதத்தின் மற்றும் கூடுதல் வடிவமைப்பு அளபுருவை மூலம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களில் உண அமாசான் மெக்சிக் துருக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாடுகள் காட்டுகிறது விளைவு- LM தானாகவே உணர்வு வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்க முடியும் என விளைவு-LM வார்த்தைகளை வித்தியாசமான வார்த்தை பிரதிநிதிகளுக்கு கற்றுக் கொள்கிறது மற்றும் சிக்கல் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது பேசும் உரை', 'ur': 'انسان کی کلام کی ارتباط میں تأثیر دینے والی پیغام شامل ہوتی ہے جو احساساتی رنگ کلمات کے استعمال سے پہنچائی جاتی ہیں. اس طرح بہت سی تحقیق کوشش کی گئی ہے لیکن اچھی معلومات کے ساتھ اثرات کی نئورل زبان کی مدلکوں کا مشکل ہے جو تحقیق کے لئے ایک منطقه پھیل رہی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک LSTM (لانگی کوٹ ٹر میمور) کی زبان کی مدل کی استعمال کریں گے، جو کانٹریشن ٹیکسٹ کی نسل کے لئے کانٹریشن ٹیکسٹ کی پیدائش کرتی ہے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل، Affect-LM ہمیں اضافہ طراحی پارامیٹر کے ذریعہ سے احساسات منصوبات کے درجے کو مطابق کر دیتا ہے۔ آمازین مکانیک ترک کے مطابق طریقہ کی تصور کی تحقیقات دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ Affect-LM نے طبیعی طور پر احساساتی جماعتیں پیدا کر دی ہیں بغیر گراماتیکی سیدھی ذبح کے. اثر-LM نے بھی پھیر لیا ہے کہ الفاظ الفاظ کی تعلیمات پر اثر دینے والی کلمات کی تصویر کرتی ہے، اور پھیر لینے والی آزمائش نے دکھائی ہے کہ کلمات کے متن میں اضافہ اثر اثر معلومات کی معلومات زبان', 'uz': "Name Bu usulda ko'p taʼminlovchi harakat bor edi, lekin tashkilotli maʼlumot bilan birlashtirish natijasida neyron tilning holatini birlashtirish muammolari bu yerda qidirish uchun maydonni o'rganadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz muloqat matnni yaratish uchun LSTM (Long- Term xotirasi xotirasi) tilning modelini kengaytirishni talab qilamiz. Hujjatning turlariga murojaat qilinadi. Bizning taʼminlovchi modelimiz, Affekt-LM bizga qoʻshimcha dizayn parametrlari orqali hissiyot tarkibini foydalanish imkoniyatini beradi. Name Affect-LM also learns affect-discriminative word representations, and perplexity experiments show that additional affective information in conversational text can improve language model prediction.", 'vi': 'Kết nối bằng ngôn ngữ con người bao gồm những thông điệp cảm động được truyền đi bằng cách dùng những từ có cảm xúc. Đã có rất nhiều nỗ lực nghiên cứu theo hướng này nhưng vấn đề là hệ thống thiết lập ngôn ngữ thần kinh với các mô hình thần kinh cổ đại với các thông tin ảnh hưởng vẫn là một khu vực đáng để nghiên cứu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phần mở rộng ngôn ngữ của LSTM (Ký Ức Dài Hạn) cho việc tạo ra đoạn đối thoại, phụ thuộc vào các loại ảnh hưởng. Mẫu đã đề nghị của chúng tôi, Affect-LM nhờ có thể thay đổi độ của các ký ức cảm xúc trong các câu được tạo ra qua một tham số thiết kế thêm. Xét nghiệm nhận thức được tiến hành bằng Amazon Mechanial Turk cho thấy rằng Affect-LM có thể tạo ra các phiên bản cảm xúc tự nhiên mà không hy sinh tính toán sai. Tác động-LM cũng biết ảnh hưởng của sự phân biệt các từ, và các thử nghiệm bất mãn cho thấy thông tin ảnh hưởng thêm trong văn bản đối thoại có thể cải thiện dự đoán của mô- đun ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Човешката вербална комуникация включва афективни послания, които се предават чрез използване на емоционално оцветени думи. В тази посока се полагат много изследвания, но проблемът с интегрирането на най-съвременните невронни езикови модели с афективната информация остава област, зряла за изследване. В настоящата статия предлагаме разширение на езиков модел за генериране на разговорен текст, обусловен на категориите афект. Нашият предложен модел ни позволява да персонализираме степента на емоционално съдържание в генерираните изречения чрез допълнителен проектен параметър. Проучванията за възприятие, проведени с помощта на Амазонски механичен турк, показват, че може да генерира естествено изглеждащи емоционални изречения, без да жертва граматическата коректност. Експериментите за объркване показват, че допълнителна афективна информация в разговорния текст може да подобри предсказването на езиковия модел.', 'hr': 'Ljudska verbalna komunikacija uključuje utjecajne poruke koje se prenose koristeći emocionalno obojene riječi. U ovom smjeru postoji mnogo istraživanja, ali problem integracije modela stanja umjetnosti neurološkog jezika s utjecajnim informacijama ostaje područje zrelo za istraživanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo produženje jezičkog modela LSTM (dugoročna uspomena) za generaciju razgovornog teksta pod uvjetom na kategorije utjecaja. Naš predloženi model, Affect-LM nam omogućava prilagoditi stupanj emocionalnog sadržaja u proizvedenim rečenicama kroz dodatni parameter dizajna. Ispitivanja o procjenama provedena s pomoću Amazon Mechanical Turk pokazuju da Affect-LM može stvoriti prirodno izgledajuće emocionalne rečenice bez žrtvovanja gramatične ispravnosti. Afekt-LM također uči na diskriminacijske predstave riječi, a eksperimenti o kompleksnosti pokazuju da dodatne utjecajne informacije u konverzacijskom tekstu mogu poboljšati predviđanje jezičkih modela.', 'nl': 'Menselijke verbale communicatie omvat affectieve boodschappen die worden overgebracht door het gebruik van emotioneel gekleurde woorden. Er is veel onderzoek gedaan in deze richting, maar het probleem van de integratie van state-of-the-art neurale taalmodellen met affectieve informatie blijft een gebied rijp voor verkenning. In dit artikel stellen we een uitbreiding voor op een LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) taalmodel voor het genereren van conversatietekst, afhankelijk van affectcategorieën. Ons voorgestelde model, Affect-LM, stelt ons in staat om de mate van emotionele inhoud in gegenereerde zinnen aan te passen door middel van een extra ontwerpparameter. Perceptiestudies uitgevoerd met Amazon Mechanical Turk tonen aan dat Affect-LM natuurlijk uitziende emotionele zinnen kan genereren zonder de grammaticale correctheid in te boeten. Affect-LM leert ook affect-discriminerende woordrepresentaties, en verwardheid experimenten tonen aan dat aanvullende affectieve informatie in conversatietekst taalmodel voorspelling kan verbeteren.', 'da': 'Menneskelig verbal kommunikation omfatter følelsesmæssige budskaber, som formidles gennem brug af følelsesmæssigt farvede ord. Der har været en masse forskningsindsats i denne retning, men problemet med at integrere state-of-the-art neurale sprogmodeller med affektiv information er stadig et område modent til udforskning. I denne artikel foreslår vi en udvidelse til en LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) sprogmodel til generering af samtaletekst, betinget af påvirkningskategorier. Vores foreslåede model, Affect-LM, giver os mulighed for at tilpasse graden af følelsesmæssigt indhold i genererede sætninger gennem en ekstra designparameter. Perceptionsundersøgelser udført ved hjælp af Amazon Mechanical Turk viser, at Affect-LM kan generere naturligt udseende følelsesmæssige sætninger uden at ofre grammatisk korrekthed. Affect-LM lærer også påvirkningsdiskriminerende ordrepræsentationer, og forvirringseksperimenter viser, at yderligere affektive oplysninger i samtaletekst kan forbedre sprogmodel forudsigelse.', 'de': 'Die menschliche verbale Kommunikation umfasst affektive Botschaften, die durch die Verwendung von emotional gefärbten Wörtern vermittelt werden. Es gibt viele Forschungsanstrengungen in dieser Richtung, aber das Problem der Integration modernster neuronaler Sprachmodelle mit affektiver Information bleibt ein Gebiet, das reif für die Erforschung ist. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Erweiterung eines LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) Sprachmodells zur Erzeugung von Konversationstext vor, bedingt durch Affektkategorien. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell Affect-LM ermöglicht es uns, den Grad des emotionalen Inhalts in generierten Sätzen durch einen zusätzlichen Designparameter anzupassen. Wahrnehmungsstudien, die mit Amazon Mechanical Turk durchgeführt wurden, zeigen, dass Affect-LM natürlich aussehende emotionale Sätze erzeugen kann, ohne dabei auf grammatische Korrektheit zu verzichten. Affect-LM lernt auch affektdiskriminierende Wortdarstellungen, und Ratplexizitätsexperimente zeigen, dass zusätzliche affektive Informationen im Konversationstext die Vorhersage von Sprachmodellen verbessern können.', 'id': 'Komunikasi verbal manusia termasuk pesan afektif yang disampaikan melalui penggunaan kata-kata yang berwarna emosional. Ada banyak usaha penelitian dalam arah ini tapi masalah untuk mengintegrasi model bahasa saraf terbaik dengan informasi afektif tetap area yang dewasa untuk eksplorasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan estensi ke model bahasa LSTM (Long-Term Memory) untuk generasi teks konversasi, tergantung pada kategori efek. Model kami yang diusulkan, Affect-LM memungkinkan kita untuk menyesuaikan tingkat isi emosional dalam kalimat yang dihasilkan melalui parameter desain tambahan. Studi persepsi yang dilakukan menggunakan Amazon Mechanical Turk menunjukkan bahwa Affect-LM dapat menghasilkan kalimat emosional yang terlihat secara alami tanpa mengorbankan persamaan grammatik. Affect-LM juga belajar mempengaruhi-diskriminatif represisi kata, dan eksperimen kekacauan menunjukkan bahwa informasi afektif tambahan dalam teks konversasi dapat meningkatkan prediksi model bahasa.', 'fa': 'ارتباط حرفه\u200cای انسان شامل پیغام\u200cهای تاثیر\u200cپذیر است که از طریق استفاده از کلمات رنگ\u200cهای احساسی به طور احساسی منتقل می\u200cشوند. تلاش زیادی تحقیقات در این مسیر وجود داشته است ولی مشکل جمع کردن مدل های زبان عصبی ایالت هنری با اطلاعات تاثیرگذاری برای تحقیقات باقی مانده است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل زبان LSTM (حافظه کوتاه\u200cزمان طولانی) برای نسل متن مکالمه\u200cای است که بر پایه\u200cهایی تأثیر می\u200cدهد. مدل پیشنهاد ما، Affect-LM به ما اجازه می دهد که درجه محتوای احساساتی در جمله\u200cهای تولید شده با یک پارامتر طراحی اضافه تغییر دهیم. مطالعه\u200cهای درجه\u200cای که با استفاده از ترک مکانیکی آمازون انجام می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهد که اثر-LM می\u200cتواند به صورت طبیعی جمله\u200cهای احساساتی را بدون قربانی درستی گرامیک تولید کند. اثر LM همچنین یاد می\u200cگیرد نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای تفریح\u200cکننده و آزمایش\u200cهای تفریح\u200cکننده نشان می\u200cدهد که اطلاعات اثر اثر\u200cکننده در متن مکالمه\u200cای می\u200cتواند پیش\u200cبینی مدل زبانی را بهتر کند.', 'ko': '인류의 언어 교류는 감정 정보를 포함하는데 이런 정보는 감정 색채를 띤 단어를 사용하여 전달된다.이 방향에서 이미 많은 연구 작업이 있었지만 가장 선진적인 신경 언어 모델과 감정 정보를 결합시키는 문제는 여전히 성숙한 탐색 분야이다.본고에서 우리는 LSTM(장-단기 기억) 언어 모델로 확장된 회화 텍스트 생성을 감정 유형을 조건으로 제시했다.우리가 제시한 감정 LM모델은 우리가 추가적인 디자인 파라미터를 통해 문장의 감정 내용을 맞춤형으로 생성할 수 있게 한다.Amazon Mechanical Turk를 사용한 감지 연구에 따르면 감정 언어는 문법의 정확성을 희생하지 않고 자연스러워 보이는 감정 문장을 생성할 수 있다.감정 LM은 감정 변별성 어휘 표징도 배운다. 곤혹 실험은 회화 텍스트에 추가된 감정 정보가 언어 모델 예측을 개선할 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'Mawasiliano ya kibinadamu yanajumuisha jumbe zinazoathiri ambazo zinatumika kwa kutumia maneno ya rangi yenye hisia. Kumekuwa na jitihada nyingi za utafiti katika mwelekeo huu lakini tatizo la kuunganisha mitindo ya lugha ya asili ya sanaa yenye taarifa zinazoathiri bado ni maeneo yanayotokana na uchunguzi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuongezeka kwa mfumo wa lugha ya LSTM (kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu wa muda mrefu) kwa ajili ya kutengeneza ujumbe wa mazungumzo, ambao umewekwa katika makundi yanayoathiri. Mfano wetu wa pendekezo, Affect-LM inatuwezesha kututumia kiwango cha maudhui ya hisia katika kutengeneza sentensi kupitia kipimo cha ziada cha ubunifu. Utafiti wa upatikanaji unaofanywa kwa kutumia Uturuki wa Amazon unaonyesha kuwa Affect-LM anaweza kutengeneza sentensi za asili zinazoonekana kwa hisia bila kutoa uhakika wa kiuchumi. Affect-LM pia hujifunza kuathiri uwakilishi wa maneno yanayotofauti, na majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa taarifa za ziada zinazoathiri katika maandishi ya mazungumzo yanaweza kuboresha utabiri wa mtindo wa lugha.', 'af': "Mense verbale kommunikasie inkluit effektiewe boodskappe wat deur gebruik van emosielik kleurde woorde verbind word. Daar is baie ondersoek versoek in hierdie rigting, maar die probleem van integrering van staat-van-die-kunste neurale taal modele met effektiewe inligting bly 'n area rip vir ondersoek. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n uitbreiding na' n LSTM (lang- Term Geheue) taal model vir generasie van omskakelike teks, betekende op effekte kategories. Ons voorgestelde model, Affect-LM kan ons die grad van emosionele inhoud in gegenereerde setinge pasmaak deur 'n addisionele ontwerp parameter. Prosepsiestudies wat deur Amazon Mekaniese Turk gedoen word, vertoon dat Affect-LM natuurlik uitkyk emosionele setinge kan genereer sonder om grammatiese korrekheid te offer. Affect-LM leer ook effekt-diskriminasiewe woorde voorstellings, en verpleksies eksperimente wys dat ekstra afvloeidige inligting in omskakelike teks taal model voorskou kan verbeter.", 'tr': 'Adamlar sözleri duýgy bilen renkli sözleri ulanyp bilen täsirli hatlary bar. Bu yönde bir süri araştyrma çabalary bar emma sanat nural dili modellerini araştyrmak üçin ýakyn mesele hem bölegi ösümlidir. Bu kagyzda, söhbet metini döretmek üçin LSTM (Uzun Terminal Hata) diline laýynlama nusgasyny teklip edip görkezip Biziň teklip eden nusgadymyz, Affect-LM, sözlerimiz ýüze bir dizayn parametri bilen duýgymlyk mahalysyny üýtgetmegimizi mümkin edir. Amazoniýa Mehanika Turk ullanýan ösümlikler görkezilýär. Affect-LM gramatik dogrylygyny bejermede duýdury sözleri döredip biler. Afekt-LM diskriminçylyk sözleriniň täsirini öwrenýär, we çykyşlyk deneyleri taryşly metinde esasy maglumatyň dili nusgasyny gowurap biler.', 'am': 'የሰው ምሳሌ ግንኙነት የሚያስጨንቀው መልዕክቶች በሐሳብ ቀለም ቃላት በመጠቀም የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ መንገድ ብዙ ትምህርት ድጋፍ ተገኝቶአል፤ ነገር ግን የአካባቢ መረጃ ጋር የልዩ ቋንቋ ሞዴላዎችን ለመቀላቀል የሚችል ጉዳይ ግን ለመመርመርመር የተለየ ክፍል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለቋንቋ ሞዴል ለመፍጠር እናስፋታለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል፣ አፍፊክስቲ-LM የemotional ሆኖችን አካባቢ ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የአማዞን ሜክናክሊክ ቱርክ የተፈጸመ ትምህርት ተርጓሚዎች፣ አፍፊክስቲካዊ-LM በተለየ የስህተት ቃላት ማፍለጋዊ አስተዳደር ሳይያሳርፍ የስህተት ቃላት እንዲወስድ ይችላል፡፡ በአፍሪካ-LM ደግሞ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ምሳሌ እንዲያሳድግ ይማራሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդկային խոսքի հաղորդակցվածքը ներառում է ազդեցություն ունեցող հաղորդագրություններ, որոնք փոխանցվում են զգացմունքային գունավոր բառերի օգտագործման միջոցով: Այս ուղղությամբ շատ հետազոտություններ են արվել, բայց ամենաբարձր լեզվի նյարդային մոդելների ինտեգրացման խնդիրը աֆեկտիվ ինֆորմացիայի հետ շարունակում է հետազոտության համար հասանելի տարածք: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ընդլայնել LSMT (երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության) լեզվի մոդելը խոսակցական տեքստի ստեղծման համար, կախված ազդեցության կատեգորիաներից: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը, Աֆեկտ-ԼՄ, հնարավորություն է տալիս մեզ կազմակերպել էմոցիոնալ պարունակության քանակը ստեղծված նախադասություններում ավելին դիզայնի պարամետրով: Perception studies conducted using Amazon Mechanical Turk show that Affect-LM can generate naturally looking emotional sentences without sacrificing grammatical correctness.  Աֆեկտ-ԼՄ-ը նաև սովորում է ազդեցություն ունենալ խտրականության բառերի ներկայացումների վրա, և խտրականության փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ խոսակցական տեքստում ավելին ազդեցություն ունեցող տեղեկատվությունը կարող է բարելավել լեզ', 'az': 'İnsanın verbal iletişimi emosiyal rəngli sözlərin istifadəsi ilə təşkil edilən məktublar içindədir. Bu tərəfdə çox araştırma çabaları var, amma sanat nöral dili modellərini təsirli məlumatlarla birləşdirmək problemi araştırma üçün bir bölge hazırlanmışdır. Bu kağızda, söhbət mətnlərin nəzəriyyəti üçün LSTM (Uzun Qısqa-Term Yadına) dil modelinin çoxluğunu təbliğ edirik, kategoriyaların üzərində təsirləndirilmiş. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz, Affect-LM, əlavə dizayn parametru vasitəsilə məlumatlarda emosiyal məlumatın dərəsini təmizləməyə imkan verir. Amazon Mehanikalı Türk vasitəsilə təşkil edilən təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil etdiyi təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil olaraq, grammatik düzgün təhsil etmədən emosiyal cümlələri yarada bilər. Affect-LM də müxtəlif sözlərin təsirlərini öyrənir, və müxtəlif təcrübələr də dəyişiklik mətnlərin əlavə edilən məlumatların dil modeli təcrübəsini daha yaxşılaşdırabilir.', 'sq': 'Komunikimi verbal njerëzor përfshin mesazhe afektive që transmetohen nëpërmjet përdorimit të fjalëve të ngjyrosura emocionalisht. Ka pasur shumë përpjekje kërkimi në këtë drejtim, por problemi i integrimit të modeleve të gjuhës nervore me informacion afektiv mbetet një fushë e pjekur për eksplorim. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një zgjerim në një model gjuhësh LSTM (Memory Long-Term Short-Term) për gjenerimin e tekstit bisedimor, të kushtuar nga kategori ndikimi. Our proposed model, Affect-LM enables us to customize the degree of emotional content in generated sentences through an additional design parameter.  Studimet e perceptimit të kryera me përdorimin e Amazon Mekanical Turk tregojnë se Affect-LM mund të gjenerojë fjalë emocionale me pamje natyrore pa sakrifikuar korrektësinë grammatike. Affect-LM mëson gjithashtu përfaqësime fjalësh diskriminuese dhe eksperimentet e hutimit tregojnë se informacioni shtesë afektiv në tekstin e bisedës mund të përmirësojë parashikimin e modelit gjuhësor.', 'bs': 'Ljudska verbalna komunikacija uključuje utjecajne poruke koje se prenose koristeći emocionalno obojene riječi. U ovom smjeru je bilo dosta istraživanja, ali problem integracije modela stanja umjetnosti neuralnog jezika sa utjecajnim informacijama ostaje područje zrela za istraživanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo produženje jezičkog modela LSTM (dugoročna uspomena) za generaciju razgovornog teksta, pod uvjetom na kategorije utjecaja. Naš predloženi model, Affect-LM nam omogućava da prilagodimo stepen emocionalnog sadržaja u proizvedenim rečenicama kroz dodatni dizajnski parameter. Ispitivanja o procenacijama provedena koristeći Amazonski mehanički Turski pokazuju da Affect-LM može stvoriti prirodno izgledajuće emocionalne rečenice bez žrtvovanja gramatičke ispravnosti. Afekt-LM također uči na diskriminacijske predstave riječi, a eksperimenti kompleksnosti pokazuju da dodatne utjecajne informacije u konverzacijskom tekstu mogu poboljšati predviđanje jezičkih modela.', 'ca': "La comunicació verbal humana inclou missatges afectius que es transmiten amb l'ús de paraules emocionalment colorades. Hi ha hagut molt d'esforç de recerca en aquesta direcció però el problem a d'integrar models neurals de llenguatge més avançat amb informació afectiva encara és una àrea madura per explorar. En aquest article, proposem una extensió a un model de llenguatge LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) per generar text conversacional, condicionat per categories d'afectes. El nostre model proposat, Affect-LM, ens permet personalitzar el grau de contingut emocional en frases generades a través d'un paràmetre de disseny adicional. Els estudis de percepció que s'utilitzen els turcs mecànics d'Amazon mostren que Affect-LM pot generar frases emocionals naturals sense sacrificar la correctesa gramàtica. Affect-LM també aprenen representacions de paraules discriminatives, i experiments de perplexitat demostren que informació afectiva adicional en el text conversacional pot millorar la predicció del model lingüístic.", 'et': 'Inimese verbaalne kommunikatsioon hõlmab afektiivseid sõnumeid, mida edastatakse emotsionaalselt värvitud sõnade abil. Selles suunas on tehtud palju uurimistööd, kuid tipptasemel neurokeele mudelite integreerimise probleem afektiivse informatsiooniga on jätkuvalt uurimiseks küps valdkond. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku laiendada LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) keelemudelit vestlusteksti genereerimiseks, sõltuvalt mõjukategooriatest. Meie pakutud mudel Affect-LM võimaldab meil kohandada emotsionaalse sisu taset genereeritud lausetes täiendava disainiparameetri kaudu. Amazon Mechanical Turki abil läbi viidud tajumisuuringud näitavad, et Affect-LM võib luua loomuliku välimusega emotsionaalseid lauseid, ohverdamata grammatilist korrektsust. Affect-LM õpib ka mõju-diskrimineerivaid sõnaesitusi ja hämmelduskatsed näitavad, et täiendav affektiivne teave vestlustekstis võib parandada keelemudeli ennustamist.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen verbaalinen viestintä sisältää affektiivisia viestejä, jotka välitetään emotionaalisesti värillisten sanojen avulla. Tähän suuntaan on tehty paljon tutkimustyötä, mutta viimeisimpien neurokielimallien integroiminen affektiiviseen tietoon on edelleen kypsä tutkimusalue. Tässä työssä ehdotamme LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) -kielimallin laajentamista keskustelutekstien tuottamiseen affect-kategorioiden perusteella. Ehdotetun Affect-LM-mallimme avulla voimme mukauttaa luotujen lauseiden tunnesisällön tasoa suunnitteluparametrin avulla. Amazon Mechanical Turkilla tehdyt havainnointitutkimukset osoittavat, että Affect-LM voi luoda luontevasti näyttäviä tunnelauseita uhraamatta kieliopin oikeellisuutta. Affect-LM oppii myös affect-diskriminatiivisia sanaesityksiä, ja hämmennyskokeet osoittavat, että affektiivinen tieto keskustelutekstissä voi parantaa kielimallin ennustamista.', 'bn': 'মানুষের ভার্বাল যোগাযোগের মধ্যে রয়েছে প্রভাবিত বার্তাগুলো যা আবেগের রং শব্দ ব্যবহার করার মাধ্যমে প্রচ এই দিকে অনেক গবেষণা প্রচেষ্টা হয়েছে কিন্তু প্রভাবিত তথ্যের সাথে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের নিউরেল ভাষার মডেল একত্রিত করার সমস্যা হচ্ছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি এলস্টিএম (লম্বা সংক্ষিপ্ত টার্ম মেমোরি) ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যে কথোপকথনৈতিক টেক্সট প্রজন্মের জন্য, যা বি আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল, এফেক্ট-এলএম আমাদের আবেগের বিষয়বস্তুর ডিগ্রি ব্যবহার করতে পারে আরো ডিজাইন প্যারামিটার মাধ্যমে। আমাজোন মেকানিক্যাল তুর্ক ব্যবহার করে পার্সিপশন গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে এফেক্ট-এলএম গ্রামাটিক্যাল সংশোধন ছাড়া স্বাভাবিক ভাবে আবে এফেক্টএলএমও শিখতে পারে বৈষম্য শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রভাব ফেলে দিতে পারে এবং প্রফেক্সিটি পরীক্ষা দেখায় যে কথোপকথনের লেখায় আরো প', 'cs': 'Lidská verbální komunikace zahrnuje afektivní zprávy, které jsou přenášeny pomocí emocionálně barevných slov. V tomto směru bylo mnoho výzkumného úsilí, ale problém integrace nejmodernějších neuronových jazykových modelů s afektivními informacemi zůstává oblastí zralou k průzkumu. V tomto článku navrhujeme rozšíření jazykového modelu LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pro generování konverzačního textu podmíněného na kategorie affektů. Náš navržený model Affect-LM nám umožňuje přizpůsobit stupeň emočního obsahu v generovaných větách prostřednictvím dalšího designového parametru. Percepční studie provedené pomocí Amazon Mechanical Turk ukazují, že Affect-LM může generovat přirozeně vypadající emoční věty bez obětování gramatické správnosti. Affect-LM se také učí efektně diskriminační reprezentace slov a experimenty zmatenosti ukazují, že další afektivní informace v konverzačním textu mohou zlepšit predikci jazykového modelu.', 'jv': 'Coverage Ana kaya akèh akeh ranèh sêpéntuk ning direction iki dadi sak ngono nggawe gerakan gambar obah-obah lan banjur-obah-ingkang sampek karo informasi sing ngendalikke tarjamahan kanggo ngelarané. Nang pepulan iki, kita mudhun kanggo kalaayuni kanggo SLT M (lang-Terminal)model model kanggo kelas teks conversations, supoyata sak kategori wis ana. Monday Percention arah sing digawe gambar ne gambar Amarok Mehanical turk bukane mungkane AfAfEffectt-LM iso nggawe barang kelas empatik kuwi dudasar kelas nang ora bisa pasar kelas terakhir nggawe barang kelas. Aft', 'sk': 'Človeška verbalna komunikacija vključuje afektivna sporočila, ki se prenašajo z uporabo čustveno obarvanih besed. V tej smeri je bilo veliko raziskovalnih naporov, vendar problem integracije najsodobnejših nevronskih jezikovnih modelov z afektivnimi informacijami ostaja področje zrelo za raziskovanje. V prispevku predlagamo razširitev jezikovnega modela LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) za generiranje pogovornega besedila, pogojenega na kategorijah učinka. Naš predlagani model Affect-LM nam omogoča prilagoditev stopnje čustvene vsebine v ustvarjenih stavkih prek dodatnega parametra oblikovanja. Študije zaznavanja, izvedene z uporabo Amazon Mechanical Turk, kažejo, da lahko Affect-LM ustvari naravno videz čustvenih stavkov brez žrtvovanja slovnične pravilnosti. Affect-LM se uči tudi efektivno-diskriminativnih besednih predstavitev, eksperimenti zmedenosti pa kažejo, da lahko dodatne afektivne informacije v pogovornem besedilu izboljšajo napoved jezikovnega modela.', 'ha': "Mawallafin maganar mutum na ƙunsa da jumbe masu yin zina da za'a haɗa su da amfani da magana masu launi na hisia'a. An sami aikin research masu yawa a cikin wannan hanyarwa, amma matabbata ta ta haɗa misãlai na-state-of-art-na'ura da zane-zane-zane-zane da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zan Daga wannan takardan, muna goyyade wata faɗaɗawa zuwa wani misalin harshen LTRM (Narrabi'in-Low-Long-Long-Long) wa mai ƙiƙiro matsayin da za'a yi magana, wanda aka ƙayyade kan categories. @ info: whatsthis Tayyar da Perception da aka yi amfani da amazon Mekanical turk ya nuna cewa Affect-LM zai iya ƙara cewa masu kalma na daidaita a a kangara kuma bã ya iya zartar da tsarin grammatisk. Affect-LM yana sanar da masu yin fasalin maganar-da-yin-inganci, kuma masu jarraba masu husũma sun nuna cewa, wasu information masu yin amfani da cikin littafin da ke cikin sha'anin mazaɓa, yana iya ƙaranci bayani ga misalin harshe.", 'he': 'תקשורת מילולית אנושית כוללת הודעות חיוביות שמעברות באמצעות השימוש במילים צבעות רגשית. היו הרבה מאמץ מחקר בכיוון הזה אבל הבעיה של השיתוף מודלים של שפת עצבית מוקדמות עם מידע חיובי נשארת אזור בוגר לחקור. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מחדשה למודל שפה LSTM (זיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר) לדור של טקסט שיחה, בהתאם לקטגוריות השפעות. המודל המוצע שלנו, Affect-LM מאפשר לנו לתאים את הדרגה של תוכן רגשי במשפטים יוצרים באמצעות פרמטר עיצוב נוסף. מחקרי ההבחינה שנערכו באמצעות הטורק המכוני של אמאזון מראים שאפיקט-אל-אם יכול ליצור משפטים רגשיים שנראים באופן טבעי בלי להקריב תקנות גרמטית. Affect-LM also learns affect-discriminative word representations, and perplexity experiments show that additional affective information in conversational text can improve language model prediction.', 'bo': 'མི་ཚོའི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་འཕྲིན་དོན་ཚུ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བ་སྐྱེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། In this paper, we propose an extension to an LSTM (Long-Term Memory) language model for generation of conversational text, conditioned on affect categories. Name Our proposed model, Affect-LM enables us to customize the degree of emotional content in generated sentences through an additional design parameter. Perception studies conducted using Amazon Mechanical Turk show that Affect-LM can generate naturally looking emotional sentences without sacrificing grammatical correctness. Affect-LM ད་དུས་ཚོད་དམ་གསལ་བའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་རྣམས་ཀྱང་། བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་བརྗོད་ཚིག་གི་ཚིག'}
{'en': 'Domain Attention with an Ensemble of Experts', 'pt': 'Atenção de domínio com um conjunto de especialistas', 'es': 'Atención de dominio con un conjunto de expertos', 'ar': 'الاهتمام بالمجال مع مجموعة من الخبراء', 'fr': "L'attention du domaine avec un ensemble d'experts", 'ja': '専門家のアンサンブルによるドメインへの注目', 'zh': '专家合集', 'hi': 'विशेषज्ञों की एक टुकड़ी के साथ डोमेन ध्यान', 'ru': 'Внимание с ансамблем экспертов', 'ga': 'Aird Fearainn le Ensemble Saineolaithe', 'ka': 'ეჲმვნ გნთმაგაŒვ ნა ვკჟოვპრთრვ.', 'hu': 'Domain Figyelem egy szakértői csoporttal', 'el': 'Προσοχή τομέα με ένα σύνολο εμπειρογνωμόνων', 'kk': 'Name', 'it': 'Domain Attenzione con un gruppo di esperti', 'mk': 'Внимание на доменот со Енсембл на експерти', 'lt': 'Svarbus dėmesys ekspertų grupei', 'ms': 'Perhatian Domain dengan Ensemble of Experts', 'mn': 'Эрч хүмүүсийн дуртай холбоотой холбоотой', 'ml': 'ഒരു വിശേഷപൂര്\u200dവ്വപരിശീലന്മാരുമായി ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Attenzjoni Domenika ma’ Ensemble ta’ Esperti', 'pl': 'Uwaga domeny z zespołem ekspertów', 'no': 'Domeneoppmerksomhet med ein eksperttast', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Domeniu Atenție cu un ansamblu de experți', 'so': 'Domain Attention with an Ensemable of Experts', 'sr': 'Domena pažnja sa ekspertima', 'sv': 'Domain Uppmärksamhet med en grupp experter', 'ur': 'مطالبوں کے ذریعہ حفاظت کی حفاظت', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட விவரங்களுடன் களம் கவனிப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lãnh địa Chú ý với một giao bối chuyên gia', 'bg': 'Внимание на домейна с ансамбъл от експерти', 'nl': 'Domein Attentie met een Ensemble van Experts', 'de': 'Domain Attention mit einem Expertensemble', 'da': 'Domæne Opmærksomhed med et Ensemble af Eksperter', 'hr': 'Domena pažnja sa provozom stručnjaka', 'id': 'Perhatian Domain dengan Ensemble of Experts', 'sw': 'Mtazamo wa Domain kwa mtaalam', 'ko': '전문가 팀의 영역 관심도', 'fa': 'توجه به دامنه با تجارت متخصص', 'tr': 'Ekstantçiler bilen sahypa ünsü', 'am': 'የዶሜን ምርጫዎች', 'af': "Domein Aansig met 'n Ensemble van Experts", 'sq': 'Vëmendje në domeni me një grup ekspertësh', 'az': 'Ekspertl…Щrin istifad…Щsi il…Щ Domain Attention', 'bn': 'বিশেষজ্ঞদের সাথে ডোমেনের মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ', 'hy': 'Domain Attention with an Ensemble of Experts', 'bs': 'Domena pažnja sa ekspertima', 'ca': "Atenció al domini amb un conjunt d'experts", 'fi': 'Alueiden huomio asiantuntijaryhmän kanssa', 'cs': 'Doménová pozornost se souborem odborníků', 'et': 'Domeeni tähelepanu ekspertide ansambliga', 'jv': 'domain Attention with an ENsemble of Exprts', 'sk': 'Domenska pozornost z ansamblom strokovnjakov', 'he': 'Domain Attention with an Ensemble of Experts', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'bo': 'ཆེད་བྱེད་ཚོའི་བཅས་མཚོན་ན་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་བཤད་ལ་ཉར་སྤྱོད་པ'}
{'en': 'An important problem in domain adaptation is to quickly generalize to a new domain with limited supervision given K existing domains. One approach is to retrain a global model across all K + 1 domains using standard techniques, for instance Daum III (2009). However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added. We describe a solution based on attending an ensemble of domain experts. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains. When given domain K + 1, our model uses a weighted combination of the K domain experts’ feedback along with its own opinion to make predictions on the new domain. In experiments, the model significantly outperforms baselines that do not use domain adaptation and also performs better than the full retraining approach.', 'ar': 'تتمثل إحدى المشكلات المهمة في تكييف المجال في التعميم السريع على مجال جديد مع إشراف محدود نظرًا للمجالات الموجودة K. يتمثل أحد الأساليب في إعادة تدريب نموذج عالمي عبر جميع مجالات K + 1 باستخدام تقنيات قياسية ، على سبيل المثال Daumë III (2009). ومع ذلك ، فمن المستحسن التكيف دون الحاجة إلى إعادة تقدير نموذج عالمي من نقطة الصفر في كل مرة يتم فيها إضافة مجال جديد يحتمل أن يكون له نوايا وفتحات جديدة. نصف حلاً يعتمد على حضور مجموعة من خبراء المجال. نحن نفترض أن الغرض من المجال المحدد ونماذج الفتحات المدربة على المجالات المعنية. عند إعطاء المجال K + 1 ، يستخدم نموذجنا مجموعة مرجحة من تعليقات خبراء المجال K جنبًا إلى جنب مع رأيها الخاص لعمل تنبؤات بشأن المجال الجديد. في التجارب ، يتفوق النموذج بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس التي لا تستخدم تكييف المجال وأيضًا يؤدي بشكل أفضل من نهج إعادة التدريب الكامل.', 'pt': 'Um problema importante na adaptação de domínio é generalizar rapidamente para um novo domínio com supervisão limitada, dados K domínios existentes. Uma abordagem é treinar novamente um modelo global em todos os domínios K + 1 usando técnicas padrão, por exemplo Daumë III (2009). No entanto, é desejável adaptar sem ter que reestimar um modelo global a partir do zero cada vez que um novo domínio com potencialmente novas intenções e slots é adicionado. Descrevemos uma solução baseada na participação de um conjunto de especialistas no domínio. Assumimos intenção específica do domínio K e modelos de slot treinados nos respectivos domínios. Quando recebe o domínio K + 1, nosso modelo usa uma combinação ponderada do feedback dos especialistas do domínio K junto com sua própria opinião para fazer previsões sobre o novo domínio. Em experimentos, o modelo supera significativamente as linhas de base que não usam adaptação de domínio e também tem um desempenho melhor do que a abordagem de retreinamento completo.', 'fr': "Un problème important dans l'adaptation de domaine est de généraliser rapidement à un nouveau domaine avec une supervision limitée étant donné K domaines existants. Une approche consiste à recycler un modèle global dans tous les domaines K + 1 à l'aide de techniques standard, par exemple Daumë III (2009). Cependant, il est souhaitable de s'adapter sans avoir à réévaluer un modèle global à partir de zéro chaque fois qu'un nouveau domaine avec des intentions et des créneaux potentiellement nouveaux est ajouté. Nous décrivons une solution basée sur la participation d'un ensemble d'experts du domaine. Nous supposons que les modèles d'intention et d'emplacement spécifiques au domaine K sont formés sur les domaines respectifs. Lorsque le domaine K +1 est attribué, notre modèle utilise une combinaison pondérée des commentaires des experts du domaine K ainsi que de son propre avis pour faire des prévisions sur le nouveau domaine. Dans les expériences, le modèle surpasse de manière significative les lignes de base qui n'utilisent pas d'adaptation de domaine et donne également de meilleurs résultats que l'approche de réapprentissage complet.", 'es': 'Un problema importante en la adaptación de dominios es generalizar rápidamente a un nuevo dominio con supervisión limitada dados los K dominios existentes. Un enfoque consiste en volver a entrenar un modelo global en todos los dominios K+1 utilizando técnicas estándar, por ejemplo, Daumë III (2009). Sin embargo, es deseable adaptarse sin tener que volver a estimar un modelo global desde cero cada vez que se agrega un nuevo dominio con intenciones y espacios potencialmente nuevos. Describimos una solución basada en la asistencia de un conjunto de expertos en el dominio. Asumimos modelos de intención y ranura específicos del dominio K entrenados en los dominios respectivos. Cuando se le da el dominio K + 1, nuestro modelo utiliza una combinación ponderada de los comentarios de los expertos del dominio K junto con su propia opinión para hacer predicciones sobre el nuevo dominio. En los experimentos, el modelo supera significativamente a las líneas de base que no utilizan la adaptación de dominios y también funciona mejor que el enfoque de reentrenamiento completo.', 'ja': 'ドメイン適応における重要な問題は、既存のKドメインが与えられた場合、監督が制限された新しいドメインに迅速に一般化することである。１つのアプローチは、標準的な技術、例えば、Daumë III (2009)を使用して、すべてのK + 1ドメインにわたるグローバルモデルを再訓練することである。しかしながら、潜在的に新しいインテント及びスロットを有する新しいドメインが追加されるたびに、グローバルモデルを一から再推定することなく適応することが望ましい。ドメイン専門家のアンサンブルに参加することに基づくソリューションについて説明します。Kドメイン固有の意図と、それぞれのドメインでトレーニングされたスロットモデルを想定しています。ドメインK + 1が与えられた場合、当社のモデルは、Kドメインの専門家のフィードバックと独自の意見の重み付けされた組み合わせを使用して、新しいドメインについて予測を行います。実験では、モデルは、ドメイン適応を使用しないベースラインを大幅に上回り、完全な再訓練アプローチよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮します。', 'hi': 'डोमेन अनुकूलन में एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या K मौजूदा डोमेन दिए गए सीमित पर्यवेक्षण के साथ एक नए डोमेन को जल्दी से सामान्यीकृत करना है। एक दृष्टिकोण मानक तकनीकों का उपयोग करके सभी K + 1 डोमेन में एक वैश्विक मॉडल को फिर से प्रशिक्षित करना है, उदाहरण के लिए Daumé III (2009)। हालांकि, हर बार संभावित रूप से नए इरादों और स्लॉट के साथ एक नया डोमेन जोड़ने पर खरोंच से एक वैश्विक मॉडल को फिर से अनुमान लगाने के बिना अनुकूलित करना वांछनीय है। हम डोमेन विशेषज्ञों के एक पहनावे में भाग लेने के आधार पर एक समाधान का वर्णन करते हैं। हम K डोमेन विशिष्ट इरादा और स्लॉट मॉडल संबंधित डोमेन पर प्रशिक्षित मान लेते हैं। जब डोमेन K + 1 दिया जाता है, तो हमारा मॉडल नए डोमेन पर भविष्यवाणियां करने के लिए अपनी राय के साथ-साथ K डोमेन विशेषज्ञों की प्रतिक्रिया के भारित संयोजन का उपयोग करता है। प्रयोगों में, मॉडल बेसलाइन को काफी बेहतर बनाता है जो डोमेन अनुकूलन का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं और पूर्ण पुन: प्रशिक्षण दृष्टिकोण से भी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '应中之要,给定K有域者,督于有限,速及新域。 一法者,用法于诸K + 1域更练全球形,如Daumë III(2009)。 然宜调之,不必每加新意插槽新域从头更度全局。 述群领之解决方案。 设 K 个域特定意向及槽形各域训练。 当给定域 K + 1 之时,吾法用 K 域专家之反馈及其身加权合而占新域。 实验之中,形显优于不域自适之基线,而性优于完训练方法。', 'ru': 'Важной проблемой в адаптации домена является быстрое обобщение до нового домена с ограниченным надзором, учитывая существующие домены K. Один из подходов заключается в переобучении глобальной модели по всем доменам K + 1 с использованием стандартных методов, например Daumë III (2009). Однако желательно адаптироваться без необходимости переоценивать глобальную модель с нуля каждый раз, когда добавляется новая область с потенциально новыми намерениями и слотами. Мы описываем решение, основанное на посещении ансамбля доменных экспертов. Мы предполагаем, что модели намерений и слотов для K-доменов обучены на соответствующих доменах. При задании домена K + 1 наша модель использует взвешенную комбинацию отзывов экспертов домена K наряду с собственным мнением для прогнозирования нового домена. В экспериментах модель значительно превосходит базовые линии, которые не используют адаптацию домена, а также работает лучше, чем полный подход к переподготовке.', 'ga': 'Fadhb thábhachtach maidir le hoiriúnú fearainn is ea ginearálú tapa chuig fearann nua le maoirseacht theoranta i bhfianaise K na bhfearainn atá ann cheana. Cur chuige amháin is ea samhail dhomhanda a athoiliúint ar fud na bhfearann K + 1 go léir ag baint úsáide as teicnící caighdeánacha, mar shampla Daumë III (2009). Tá sé inmhianaithe, áfach, oiriúnú a dhéanamh gan samhail dhomhanda a athmheas ón tús gach uair a chuirtear fearann nua le hintinn agus sliotáin nua a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann. Déanaimid cur síos ar réiteach atá bunaithe ar fhreastal ar ensemble de shaineolaithe fearainn. Glacaimid leis go bhfuil rún ag K fearann sonrach agus samhlacha sliotán oilte ar na fearainn faoi seach. Nuair a thugtar fearann K + 1 dúinn, úsáideann ár samhail teaglaim ualaithe d’aiseolas na saineolaithe fearainn K mar aon lena thuairim féin chun tuar a dhéanamh ar an bhfearann nua. I dturgnaimh, sáraíonn an tsamhail bonnlínte go suntasach nach n-úsáideann oiriúnú fearainn agus a fheidhmíonn níos fearr ná an cur chuige athoiliúint iomlán.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა დემომინის აკაპეტიფიკაციაში არის დაბრუნებული დავადგინოთ ახალი დემომინის შესახებ, რომელიც K აქვს დემომინის შესახებ. ერთი პროგრამა არის ყველა K + 1 დიომენის სტანდარტული ტექნექციების გამოყენება, მაგალითად Daume III (2009). მაგრამ, უნდა აეპორტირება, როცა გლობალური მოდელის გადაწყენება ყოველ შემთხვევაში, როცა ახალი დიომინი, რომელიც პოტენციალურად ახალი საზოგადოება და სტატის შემატე ჩვენ დავწერეთ განსაზღვრება, რომელიც დიომინის ექსპერტების სენემბლის დაწყებაზე. ჩვენ დავფიქრობთ K დემომინის სპექტიფიკური საზოგადოება და სლოტის მოდელები, რომლებიც შესაბამისი დემომინის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი. როდესაც კი პლუს 1 მოდულია, ჩვენი მოდული გამოყენება კი დემომინის ექსპერტის გამოცემული კომბინეციის გამოცემული კომბინეციას და მისი თავისუფლიო მნიშვნელობის შე ექსპერიმენტებში მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც არ გამოყენებს დიომინის ადატაციაციას და ასევე უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი', 'hu': 'Fontos probléma a domain adaptációban, hogy gyorsan általánosítsunk egy új domainre korlátozott felügyelettel, tekintettel a K meglévő domainekre. Az egyik megközelítés egy globális modell átképzése valamennyi K + 1 tartományban szabványos technikákkal, például a Daume III (2009). Mindazonáltal kívánatos alkalmazkodni anélkül, hogy újra kellene becsülni a globális modellt minden egyes alkalommal, amikor egy potenciálisan új szándékkal és résidőkkel rendelkező domain kerül hozzáadásra. Egy domain szakértők csoportjának részvételén alapuló megoldást írunk le. Feltételezzük, hogy K domain specifikus szándék és slot modellek képzettek az adott domain. A K + 1 domain megadásakor modellünk a K domain szakértői visszajelzéseinek súlyozott kombinációját és saját véleményét használja az új domain előrejelzéseihez. A kísérletek során a modell jelentősen felülmúlja a domain adaptációt nem alkalmazó alapvető értékeket, és jobban teljesít, mint a teljes átképzési megközelítés.', 'el': 'Ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα στην προσαρμογή του τομέα είναι να γενικευθεί γρήγορα σε ένα νέο τομέα με περιορισμένη εποπτεία δεδομένου των K υφιστάμενων τομέων. Μια προσέγγιση είναι η επανεκπαίδευση ενός παγκόσμιου μοντέλου σε όλους τους τομείς του Κ-1 χρησιμοποιώντας τυποποιημένες τεχνικές, για παράδειγμα Daume III (2009). Ωστόσο, είναι επιθυμητό να προσαρμοστούμε χωρίς να χρειάζεται να επαναεκτιμούμε ένα παγκόσμιο μοντέλο από την αρχή κάθε φορά που προστίθεται ένας νέος τομέας με δυνητικά νέες προθέσεις και κουλοχέρηδες. Περιγράφουμε μια λύση που βασίζεται στην παρακολούθηση ενός συνόλου εμπειρογνωμόνων στον τομέα. Υποθέτουμε την πρόθεση και τα μοντέλα κουλοχέρηδων που εκπαιδεύονται σε αντίστοιχους τομείς. Όταν δίνεται τομέας Κ-1, το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί έναν σταθμισμένο συνδυασμό των σχολίων των εμπειρογνωμόνων του τομέα Κ μαζί με τη δική του γνώμη για να κάνει προβλέψεις για τον νέο τομέα. Σε πειράματα, το μοντέλο ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις γραμμές βάσης που δεν χρησιμοποιούν προσαρμογή τομέα και επίσης αποδίδει καλύτερα από την προσέγγιση πλήρους επανεκπαίδευσης.', 'it': "Un problema importante nell'adattamento del dominio è quello di generalizzare rapidamente a un nuovo dominio con supervisione limitata dati i domini K esistenti. Un approccio consiste nel riqualificare un modello globale in tutti i domini K + 1 utilizzando tecniche standard, ad esempio Daume III (2009). Tuttavia, è auspicabile adattarsi senza dover rivalutare un modello globale da zero ogni volta che viene aggiunto un nuovo dominio con potenziali nuovi intenti e slot. Descriviamo una soluzione basata sulla partecipazione di un gruppo di esperti del settore. Assumiamo intenti specifici del dominio K e modelli di slot addestrati sui rispettivi domini. Quando viene assegnato il dominio K + 1, il nostro modello utilizza una combinazione ponderata del feedback degli esperti del dominio K insieme alla propria opinione per fare previsioni sul nuovo dominio. Negli esperimenti, il modello supera significativamente le linee di base che non utilizzano l'adattamento del dominio e si comporta anche meglio dell'approccio di riqualificazione completa.", 'kk': 'Домен адаптациясының маңызды мәселесі - K бар домендерінің шектелген басқаруы үшін жаңа доменге тез жалғастыру. Бір тәсілі - барлық K + 1 доменге стандартты техникаларды қолдану үшін, мысалы, Daume III (2009) үшін жүйелік моделін қайта алу. Бірақ әрбір рет жаңа доменге жаңа мақсаттар мен слоттар қосылып жатқан жалпы үлгісін қайта оқу үшін адаптациялау керек. Біз домен эксперттерінің қатысуына негізделген шешімін таңдаймыз. Біз K доменінің ерекше мақсаттары мен слот моделдері бар деп ойлаймыз. Келтірілген домен K + 1 үшін, біздің моделіміз K домен эксперттерінің қайталануын қолданып жаңа доменде таңдау үшін өзіміздің ойымен бірге қолданылады. Тәжірибелерде, үлгі доменнің адаптациясын қолданбаған негізгі сызықтарды жұмыс істейді, сондай-ақ толық қалдыру тәртібінен жақсы жұмыс істейді.', 'lt': 'Svarbi srities pritaikymo problem a yra greitai išplėsti į naują sritį su ribota priežiūra atsižvelgiant į K esamas sritis. Vienas iš metodų – persvarstyti visuotinį model į visose K + 1 srityse taikant standartinius metodus, pavyzdžiui, Daume III (2009 m.). Tačiau pageidautina prisitaikyti nereikalaujant iš naujo įvertinti pasaulinio modelio nuo nulio kiekvieną kartą, kai pridedama nauja sritis su potencialiai naujais ketinimais ir laiko tarpsniais. Mes apibūdiname sprendimą, pagrįstą dalyvavimu srities ekspertų rinkinyje. Mes darome prielaidą, kad K domeno specifinis ketinimas ir laiko tarpsnių modeliai, parengti atitinkamose srityse. Kai duodama K + 1 sritis, mūsų modelis naudoja svertinį K srities ekspertų atsiliepimų derinį kartu su savo nuomone, kad galėtų prognozuoti naują sritį. In experiments, the model significantly outperforms baselines that do not use domain adaptation and also performs better than the full retraining approach.', 'mk': 'An important problem in domain adaptation is to quickly generalize to a new domain with limited supervision given K existing domains.  One approach is to retrain a global model across all K + 1 domains using standard techniques, for instance Daume III (2009).  Сепак, посакувано е да се адаптира без да мора повторно да се процени глобален модел од нула секој пат кога ќе се додаде нов домен со потенцијално нови намери и слотови. Опишуваме решение базирано на присуство на ансембл експерти од домени. Претпоставуваме дека К домен има специфична намера и модели на слотови тренирани на одредени домени. Кога е даден домен К + 1, нашиот модел користи тежана комбинација на реакциите на експертите на домен К заедно со своето мислење за да направи предвидувања за новиот домен. Во експериментите, моделот значително ги надминува основните линии кои не користат адаптација на доменот и исто така вршат подобро од целосниот пристап на ретренирање.', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷനിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d കെ നിലവിലുള്ള ഡൊമെനെ സാധാരണ ടെക്നിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d കെ + 1 ഡൊമെന്\u200dസിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചുവീണ്ടും ഒരു  എങ്കിലും പുതിയ ഉദ്ദേശങ്ങളും സ്ലോട്ടുകളും ചേര്\u200dത്തുകൊണ്ടുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും പുതിയ മാതൃകയും പുതിയ മാതൃകയും പുതിയൊ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പരിഹാരം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷപ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നതിന് അട നമ്മള്\u200d കരുതുന്നത് കെ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200dറെ പ്രത്യേക ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലും സ്ലോട്ട് മോഡലുകളിലും പഠിപ്പിച്ചു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d കെ + 1 കൊടുത്തപ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പുതിയ ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി കെ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷികളുടെ ഫിബ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d മാത്രം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ', 'ms': 'Masalah penting dalam penyesuaian domain adalah untuk menyebarkan dengan cepat ke domain baru dengan pengawasan terhad diberikan domain K yang wujud. Satu pendekatan adalah untuk melatih semula model global di seluruh domain K + 1 menggunakan teknik piawai, misalnya Daume III (2009). Namun, ia adalah diinginkan untuk menyesuaikan tanpa perlu menilai semula model global dari kosong setiap kali domain baru dengan niat dan slot yang berpotensi baru ditambah. Kami menggambarkan penyelesaian berdasarkan menghadiri kumpulan ahli domain. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains.  Apabila diberi domain K + 1, model kami menggunakan kombinasi berat balas balik ahli domain K bersama dengan pendapat sendiri untuk membuat ramalan domain baru. Dalam eksperimen, model melampaui garis dasar yang signifikan yang tidak menggunakan penyesuaian domain dan juga lebih baik daripada pendekatan pelatihan semula penuh.', 'mt': 'Problema importanti fl-adattament tad-dominju hija li jiġi ġeneralizzat malajr għal dominju ġdid b’superviżjoni limitata minħabba dominji eżistenti K. Approċċ wieħed huwa li jiġi mħarreġ mill-ġdid mudell globali fl-oqsma kollha K + 1 bl-użu ta’ tekniki standard, pereżempju Daume III (2009). Madankollu, huwa mixtieq li jiġi adattat mingħajr ma jkun hemm bżonn li jiġi stmat mill-ġdid mudell globali mill-ewwel darba li jiġi miżjud dominju ġdid b’intenzjonijiet u slots potenzjalment ġodda. Aħna niddeskrivu soluzzjoni bbażata fuq l-attendenza ta’ ensemble ta’ esperti fil-qasam. Aħna nassumu mudelli ta’ intenzjoni u slots speċifiċi għad-dominju K imħarrġa fuq dominji rispettivi. Meta jingħata d-dominju K + 1, il-mudell tagħna juża kombinazzjoni peżata tar-rispons tal-esperti tad-dominju K flimkien mal-opinjoni tiegħu stess biex jagħmel tbassir dwar id-dominju l-ġdid. Fl-esperimenti, il-mudell jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi li ma jużawx l-adattament tad-dominju u jwettaq ukoll aħjar mill-approċċ sħiħ ta’ taħriġ mill-ġdid.', 'mn': 'Холбооны адилтгалын чухал асуудал бол K сууж буй домаар хязгаарлагдсан хязгаарлагдсан шинэ холбоонд хурдан нийтлэгдэх юм. Нэг арга бол Дэум III (2009) гэх мэт стандарт техникуудыг ашиглан бүх K + 1 зохиолын дэлхийн загварын загварыг авах юм. Гэхдээ дэлхийн загварыг шинэ зорилго болон слотуудыг нэмэгдүүлэхээс дахин тооцоолж чадахгүй өөрчлөлт хийх нь хүсэлтэй. Бид хүрээлэн буй мэргэжилтнүүдийн хамтдаа суурилсан шийдэлийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид K холбооны тодорхой зорилго болон слотын загваруудыг тодорхойлж байна. K + 1 холбоотой үед бидний загвар нь K холбоотой мэргэжилтнүүдийн хариултын жингийн нийлбэр ашигладаг. Эдгээр туршилтуудын хувьд энэ загвар нь холбоотой адилтгал ашиглахгүй суурь шулуунуудыг илүү ашигладаг.', 'no': 'Eit viktig problem i domeneadaptasjonen er å raskt generalisera til ein ny domene med begrenset overvaking gitt K eksisterande domene. Eit tilnærming er å gjenoppretta eit globalt modell over alle K + 1 domene ved bruk av standard teknikk, for eksempel Daume III (2009). Det er imidlertid ønskjer å tilpassa utan å må gjenoppretta eit globalt modell frå å å rulla kvar gong ein ny domene med potensielt nye mål og plasser vert lagt til. Vi skildrar eit løysing basert på å delta på ein ensembel av domeneekspertar. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains. Når det gjev domenet K + 1, brukar modellen vårt ein vekte kombinasjon av tilbakemeldinga til K domeneekspertane sammen med sine eige mening for å gjera foregåver på den nye domenet. I eksperimenter utfører modellen betydelig ut baselinjer som ikkje brukar domeneadaptasjon og også utfører bedre enn den fulle retraining tilnærminga.', 'pl': 'Istotnym problemem adaptacji domen jest szybkie uogólnienie na nową domenę z ograniczonym nadzorem przy przypadku istniejących domen K. Jednym z podejść jest przekwalifikowanie globalnego modelu we wszystkich dziedzinach K-1 przy użyciu standardowych technik, na przykład Daume III (2009). Pożądane jest jednak dostosowanie się bez konieczności ponownego oszacowania globalnego modelu od podstaw za każdym razem, gdy dodaje się nową domenę z potencjalnie nowymi intencjami i slotami. Opisujemy rozwiązanie oparte na uczestnictwie w zespole ekspertów domenowych. Zakładamy, że specyficzne modele intencji i slotów K przeszkolone w odpowiednich domenach. W przypadku podania domeny K-1, nasz model wykorzystuje ważoną kombinację opinii ekspertów z dziedziny K wraz z własną opinią do przewidywania nowej domeny. W eksperymentach model znacznie przewyższa linie bazowe, które nie wykorzystują adaptacji domeny, a także działa lepiej niż podejście pełnego przekwalifikowania.', 'so': 'Dhibaato muhiim ah oo ku saabsan bedelka gudaha waa in aad dhaqso ugu soo bandhigto deegaan cusub oo ay haystaan ilaaliyo xad-xad ah oo ay ka heleen deegaanka joogta ee K. Dhaqdhaqaaq kaliya waa in lagu soo celiyo model caalami ah oo dhan K + 1 domain isticmaalo qalabka caalamiga ah, tusaale ahaan Dalum III (2009). Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa haboon in la beddelo, iyadoo aan loo baahnayn in mar walba lagu qiimeeyo tusaale caalami ah oo lagu daro deegaan cusub oo ay ku dari karto waxyaabaha cusub iyo qalabka. Waxaynu tilmaamaynaa xalal ku saleysan ka qeyb qaadashada xeerka deegaanka. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains.  Markii la siiyo domain K + 1, modellkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa jawaab miisaan ah oo ka buuxda warqada aqoonta deegaanka ee K domain ee ku saabsan fikirkiisa si uu wax ugu sii sheego guriga cusub. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa tusaale si muhiim ah oo ay u muujiyaan saldhigyo aan isticmaalin habka habboonaanta gudaha, sidoo kale wuxuu sameeyaa mid ka wanaagsan qaababka dib u soo celinta oo dhan.', 'ro': 'O problemă importantă în adaptarea domeniului este generalizarea rapidă la un domeniu nou cu supraveghere limitată dată fiind domeniile K existente. O abordare constă în recalificarea unui model global în toate domeniile K + 1 folosind tehnici standard, de exemplu Daume III (2009). Cu toate acestea, este de dorit să se adapteze fără a fi nevoie să reevalueze un model global de la zero de fiecare dată când se adaugă un domeniu nou cu intenții și sloturi potențial noi. Descriem o soluție bazată pe participarea la un ansamblu de experți în domeniu. Ne asumăm intenția specifică domeniului K și modele slot instruite pe domeniile respective. Atunci când este dat domeniul K + 1, modelul nostru utilizează o combinație ponderată a feedback-ului experților domeniului K împreună cu opinia sa proprie pentru a face previziuni asupra noului domeniu. În cadrul experimentelor, modelul depășește semnificativ liniile de bază care nu utilizează adaptarea domeniului și, de asemenea, performează mai bine decât abordarea completă de recalificare.', 'sv': 'Ett viktigt problem i domänanpassning är att snabbt generalisera till en ny domän med begränsad övervakning med tanke på K befintliga domäner. Ett tillvägagångssätt är att omskola en global modell över alla K + 1-domäner med hjälp av standardtekniker, till exempel Daume III (2009). Det är dock önskvärt att anpassa sig utan att behöva omvärdera en global modell från grunden varje gång en ny domän med potentiellt nya avsikter och platser läggs till. Vi beskriver en lösning baserad på att delta i en ensemble av domänexperter. Vi utgår från K domänspecifika avsikter och slotmodeller utbildade på respektive domän. När den ges domän K + 1 använder vår modell en viktad kombination av K-domänexperternas feedback tillsammans med sin egen åsikt för att göra förutsägelser på den nya domänen. I experiment överträffar modellen avsevärt baslinjer som inte använder domänanpassning och presterar också bättre än den fullständiga omskolningen.', 'ta': 'Name நிலையான தொழில்நுட்பங்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரியை மீண்டும் திரும்ப முடியும். ஆனால் ஒவ்வொரு முறையும் புதிய முறைமையிலிருந்து திரும்ப மதிப்பிட வேண்டாம் இல்லாமல் பொதுவான மாதிரியை ஒழுங்கு செய்ய வேண் நாம் ஒரு தீர்வை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் களம் அறிவிப்பாளரின் ஒதுக்கீட்டிற்கு அடிப்படையில். நாம் K டோமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட இலக்கு மற்றும் செருகுவாய் மாதிரிகளை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் தேவை கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ட டோமைன் K + 1 போது, எங்கள் மாதிரி கே டோமைன் முகவரிகளின் விடைக்கு ஒரு நிறைவேற்றப்பட்ட சேர்ப்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அதன் ச பரிசோதனைகளில், மாதிரி முழு மீண்டும் செயல்படுத்துவதை விட முக்கியமாக செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'sr': 'Važan problem u adaptaciji domena je brzo generalizovati u novu domenu sa ograničenim nadzorom pod obzirom na postojeće domene K. Jedan pristup je da se vratimo globalni model u svim K + 1 domenama koristeći standardne tehnike, na primjer Daume III (2009). Međutim, poželjno je da se prilagodimo bez obnove procjene globalnog model a svaki put kada se doda nova domena sa potencijalnim novim namjerama i slovima. Opišemo rješenje na osnovu prisustvovanja kompleta stručnjaka domena. Pretpostavljamo da je K domena određena namjera i modeli slota obučeni na odgovarajućim domenama. Kada je dao domenu K + 1, naš model koristi težinu kombinacije eksperta K domena zajedno sa svojim mišljenjem kako bi napravili predviđanja na novom domenu. U eksperimentima, model značajno iznosi osnovne linije koje ne koriste adaptaciju domena i izvršava i bolji od punog pristupa povlačenja.', 'si': 'වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඩෝමින් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ඉක්මනට අලුත් ඩෝමින් එක්ක අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සීමාන එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තමයි සියළුම K + 1 ඩෝමේන් වලට ස්ථානික විද්\u200dයාවක් භාවිත කරන්න, උදාහරණයෙන් Daume III (2009). නමුත්, හැම වෙලාවෙම ජාතික මෝඩල් එකක් ස්ක්\u200dරේට් වලින් අළුත් අරමුණක් සහ ස්ලෝට් වලින් අළුත් ඩොමේන් එකක් අවශ්\u200dය ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්නේ ඩොමේන් විශ්වාසිකරුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි හිතන්නේ K ඩොමේන් විශේෂ අදහස් සහ ස්ලෝට් මොඩේල්ස් විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න K + 1 නිර්දේශය දෙන්නම්, අපේ මොඩල් භාවිත කරනවා K ඩොමේන් විශ්වාසිකයෝ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අලුත් ඩොමේන් වල අ පරීක්ෂණාවල්, මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නොප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ නැත', 'ur': 'ڈومین اضافہ میں ایک اہم مسئلہ یہ ہے کہ ایک نئی ڈومین کی سرعت سے محدود نظر کے ساتھ K موجود ڈومین کے مطابق ایک نئی ڈومین کی جرائل کرنا ہے. ایک طریقہ یہ ہے کہ تمام K + 1 ڈومین میں ایک گلوبی موڈل کو استاندارڈ ٹیکنیک کے مطابق، دائم III (2009) کے مطابق پیدا کرنا ہے۔ However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch every time a new domain with potentially new intentions and slots is added. ہم ایک حل کی توصیف کرتے ہیں جو ڈومین کے متخصص لوگوں کے سفر پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ K ڈومین خاص مطلب اور اسلوٹ موڈل جو تعلیم دیئے گئے ہیں۔ جب دی جاتی ہے ڈومین K + 1، ہمارا موڈل K ڈومین متخصص کے فیڈبک کے ساتھ ایک وزن ترکیب استعمال کرتا ہے اور اپنی نظر کے ساتھ نئی ڈومین پر پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔ آزمائش میں، موڈل بہت اچھی طریقے سے زیادہ بیس لائن کرتا ہے جو ڈومین کے اضافہ نہیں کرتا اور اس سے بھی بہتر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Một vấn đề quan trọng trong việc sửa chữa miền là nhanh chóng tổng hợp lại một miền mới với sự giám sát hạn chế cho khu vực K đã có. Một phương pháp là tái tạo lại một mô hình to àn cầu trên tất cả miền K+1 bằng kỹ thuật tiêu chuẩn, ví dụ Daume III (2009). Tuy nhiên, cần phải thích nghi mà không cần phải đánh giá lại mô hình to àn cầu từ đầu mỗi khi thêm một miền mới có khả năng có triển vọng và thời gian mới. Chúng tôi mô tả một giải pháp dựa trên việc tham gia một tập hợp chuyên gia miền. Chúng tôi giả sử mục đích đặc biệt khu vực K và mô hình suất được huấn luyện trên mỗi miền tương ứng. Khi cho miền K+1, mô hình của chúng tôi dùng một kết quả cân nhắc của các chuyên gia về lĩnh vực K cùng với ý kiến của riêng mình để dự đoán về lĩnh vực mới. Trong các thí nghiệm, mô- đun này hoàn toàn vượt trội các nền tảng không sử dụng sự thích nghi miền và cũng đạt trình độ cải tạo hoàn toàn tốt hơn.', 'uz': "An important problem in domain adaptation is to quickly generalize to a new domain with limited supervision given K existing domains.  Bir usul, masalan, DM III (2009) bilan butun K + 1 domen'larda butun umumiy modelni qayta olish uchun. Lekin, har safar yangi qatlam va slotlarni qayta qidirish kerak boʻlmasligi mumkin. Biz domen ekspertlarining bir ekspertlarini o'rganishga asoslangan o'zgarishga qaramamiz. Biz K domen bilan o'rganish xossa va slot modellarini o'rganamiz. Domen K + 1 koʻrsatilganda, modelmiz K domen ekspertlarining qiyin birikmasini ishlatiladi va uning fikri bilan yangi domen davomida oldinga ishlatish uchun. Imtibor qilishda model domen adapterini ishlatilmagan asosiy asboblarni bajaradi va butun qayta qilish usulida yaxshi bajaradi.", 'hr': 'Važan problem u adaptaciji domena je brzo generalizirati u novu domenu s ograničenim nadzorom s obzirom na postojeće domene K. Jedan pristup je obnoviti globalni model u svim K + 1 domenama koristeći standardne tehnike, na primjer Daume III (2009). Međutim, poželjno je prilagoditi se bez ponovnog procjene globalnog model a svaki put kad se doda nova domena sa potencijalno novim namjerama i slovima. Opišemo rješenje na temelju prisustvovanja kompleta stručnjaka domena. Pretpostavljamo specifične namjere K domena i modele slota obučene na odgovarajućim domenama. Kada je dao domenu K + 1, naš model koristi težinu kombinacije odbijanja stručnjaka domena K zajedno sa svojim vlastitim mišljenjem kako bi napravili predviđanja na novom domenu. U eksperimentima, model značajno iznosi početne linije koje ne koriste adaptaciju domena te također čini bolje od punog pristupa povlačenja.', 'da': 'Et vigtigt problem i domænetilpasning er hurtigt at generalisere til et nyt domæne med begrænset tilsyn givet K eksisterende domæner. En tilgang er at omskole en global model på tværs af alle K + 1 domæner ved hjælp af standardteknikker, f.eks. Daume III (2009). Det er imidlertid ønskeligt at tilpasse sig uden at skulle vurdere en global model fra bunden, hver gang der tilføjes et nyt domæne med potentielt nye intentioner og slots. Vi beskriver en løsning baseret på at deltage i et ensemble af domæneeksperter. Vi antager K domænespecifikke hensigter og slot modeller trænet på de respektive domæner. Når det gives domæne K + 1, bruger vores model en vægtet kombination af K domæneeksperternes feedback sammen med sin egen mening til at lave forudsigelser på det nye domæne. I eksperimenter overgår modellen væsentligt basislinjer, der ikke anvender domænetilpasning, og den klarer sig også bedre end den fulde omskolingsmetode.', 'nl': "Een belangrijk probleem bij domeinaanpassing is om snel te generaliseren naar een nieuw domein met beperkte supervisie gegeven K bestaande domeinen. Een aanpak is om een globaal model over alle K'1 domeinen heen te trainen met behulp van standaard technieken, bijvoorbeeld Daume III (2009). Het is echter wenselijk om zich aan te passen zonder een globaal model opnieuw te hoeven inschatten telkens wanneer een nieuw domein met mogelijk nieuwe intenties en slots wordt toegevoegd. We beschrijven een oplossing gebaseerd op het bijwonen van een ensemble van domeinexperts. We gaan ervan uit dat K domein specifieke intentie en slot modellen getraind zijn op respectievelijke domeinen. Wanneer domein K-1 wordt gegeven, maakt ons model gebruik van een gewogen combinatie van feedback van de K-domeinexperts samen met zijn eigen mening om voorspellingen te doen over het nieuwe domein. In experimenten presteert het model aanzienlijk beter dan baselines die geen domeinaanpassing gebruiken en presteert het ook beter dan de volledige herscholingsaanpak.", 'de': 'Ein wichtiges Problem bei der Domänenanpassung ist die schnelle Verallgemeinerung auf eine neue Domäne mit begrenzter Aufsicht bei bestehenden K-Domänen. Ein Ansatz besteht darin, ein globales Modell über alle K�1-Domänen mit Standardtechniken umzuschulen, zum Beispiel Daume III (2009). Es ist jedoch wünschenswert, sich anzupassen, ohne ein globales Modell jedes Mal neu schätzen zu müssen, wenn eine neue Domäne mit potenziell neuen Absichten und Slots hinzugefügt wird. Wir beschreiben eine Lösung, die auf der Teilnahme an einem Ensemble von Experten basiert. Wir gehen davon aus, dass K domänenspezifische Intent- und Slot-Modelle auf den jeweiligen Domains trainiert werden. Wenn die Domäne K-1 angegeben wird, verwendet unser Modell eine gewichtete Kombination aus dem Feedback der K-Domain-Experten zusammen mit seiner eigenen Meinung, um Vorhersagen über die neue Domäne zu treffen. In Experimenten übertrifft das Modell deutlich Baselines, die keine Domänenanpassung verwenden und schneidet auch besser ab als der vollständige Umschulungsansatz.', 'bg': 'Важен проблем в адаптацията на домейна е бързо обобщаване към нов домейн с ограничен надзор при наличие на съществуващи домейни. Един от подходите е преквалификацията на глобален модел във всички К + 1 домейни, като се използват стандартни техники, например Daume III (2009). Желателно е обаче да се адаптира, без да се налага да се преоценява глобален модел от нулата всеки път, когато се добавя нов домейн с потенциално нови намерения и слотове. Описваме решение въз основа на присъствието на ансамбъл от експерти в областта. Предполагаме К домейн специфични намерения и слот модели обучени за съответните домейни. Когато даден домейн К + 1, нашият модел използва претеглена комбинация от обратната връзка на експертите от домейна К заедно със собственото си мнение, за да направи прогнози за новия домейн. При експерименти моделът значително надминава базовите линии, които не използват адаптация на домейна и също така се представя по-добре от подхода на пълно преквалификация.', 'sw': 'Tatizo muhimu katika mabadiliko ya ndani ni kutengeneza kwa haraka kwenda kwenye eneo jipya ambalo ni ufuatiliaji mdogo uliofanywa na maeneo yanayopo K. Mfumo mmoja ni kurudisha mifano ya dunia kote ya K + 1 kwa kutumia mbinu za kawaida, kwa mfano Daume III (2009). Hata hivyo, inahitaji kubadilisha bila kujaribu kuchukua tena mifano ya kidunia kutoka kwenye viwanja vipya kwa uwezekano wa kuongezeka kwa nia mpya na mistari. Tunaelezea suluhisho kwa kutumia ushiriki wa wataalam wa ndani. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains.  Wakati alipopewa domain K + 1, mifano yetu inatumia muunganiko mzito wa mwitikio wa wataalam wa domain wa K pamoja na maoni yake mwenyewe ili kutengeneza utabiri katika eneo hili mpya. Katika majaribio hayo, mifano inaonyesha msingi ambao hawatumii kuboresha mazingira ya ndani na pia inafanya vizuri zaidi ya mbinu za kurejesha.', 'id': 'Masalah penting dalam adaptasi domain adalah dengan cepat menyebarkan ke domain baru dengan pengawasan terbatas diberikan domain K yang ada. One approach is to retrain a global model across all K + 1 domains using standard techniques, for instance Daume III (2009).  However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added.  Kami menggambarkan solusi berdasarkan menghadiri ensemble ahli domain. We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains.  Ketika diberikan domain K + 1, model kami menggunakan kombinasi berat dari feedback ahli domain K bersama dengan pendapatnya sendiri untuk membuat prediksi domain baru. Dalam eksperimen, model ini jauh lebih besar dari garis dasar yang tidak menggunakan adaptasi domain dan juga lebih baik dari pendekatan pelatihan ulang penuh.', 'tr': "Domenyň adaptasynda wajyp mesele K bar domeny berilen kiçi üstünde täze domeny üýtgetmekdir. Bütin K + 1 sahypalaryň içinde standart tekniklerden ullanýan dünýäb nusgasyny (Daume III (2009) ýene almak üçin bir nusgasy bar. Ancak, her sefere küresel bir modeli taşınmadan yeni bir domenin yeni amaçları ve yer eklenmesi gerektiğini yeniden tahmin etmek istiyor. Biz domena uzmanlarynyň köpüsüne daýan bir çözümü tasvir edip görýäris. K domenin özel niyeti ve slot modelleri saygı alanlarda eğitildiğini tahmin ediyoruz. K + 1'de verilen domena, modelimiz K domena uzmanlarından tahmin etmek için önemli bir kombinasyonu kullanır. Deneylerde, model domeny adaptasiýany ulanmaýan basit hatlary çykarýar we hem doly yzarlanja golaýyndan gowy edip bilýär.", 'ko': '도메인 어댑터의 중요한 문제는 K개의 기존 도메인을 지정한 상황에서 감독이 제한된 새로운 도메인으로 신속하게 확대하는 것이다.한 가지 방법은 표준 기술, 예를 들어 Daume III(2009)를 사용하여 모든 K+1 분야에서 전역 모델을 재훈련하는 것이다.그러나 글로벌 모델을 처음부터 재평가하지 않고도 잠재적인 새 의도와 슬롯이 있는 새 도메인을 추가할 때마다 조정이 필요합니다.우리는 참가 분야 전문가들의 집합을 바탕으로 한 해결 방안을 묘사했다.우리는 K개의 특정한 영역의 의도와 슬롯 모델이 각자의 영역에서 훈련을 했다고 가정한다.K+1 도메인을 지정할 때, 우리 모델은 K도메인 전문가의 피드백과 자신의 의견의 가중 조합을 사용하여 새로운 도메인을 예측합니다.실험에서 이 모델의 성능은 지역이 스스로 적응하는 기선을 사용하지 않는 것보다 현저히 우수하고 완전한 재교육 방법보다 우수하다.', 'sq': 'Një problem i rëndësishëm në përshtatjen e domainit është të gjeneralizohet shpejt në një domain të ri me mbikqyrje të kufizuar duke i dhënë domainet ekzistuese K. Një metodë është të rindërtohet një model global në të gjitha domenat K + 1 duke përdorur teknika standarde, për shembull Daume III (2009). However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added.  Ne përshkruajmë një zgjidhje bazuar në ndjekjen e një ansambli ekspertësh në domeni. Ne marrim parasysh qëllimin specifik të domenit K dhe modelet e slot trajnuar në domenat respektive. Kur u jep domeni K + 1, modeli ynë përdor një kombinim të peshuar të përgjigjes së ekspertëve të domenit K së bashku me opinionin e vet për të bërë parashikime mbi domenin e ri. Në eksperimente, modeli ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më shumë se linjat bazë që nuk përdorin përshtatjen e domenit dhe gjithashtu bën më të mirë se metoda e rindërtimit të plotë.', 'fa': 'یک مشکل مهم در تغییرات دامنی است که سریع به یک دامنه جدید با بررسی محدود به دامنه های K موجود باشد، به سرعت تولید کنید. یک دستور این است که از استفاده از تکنیک\u200cهای استاندارد، برای مثال Daume III (2009) یک مدل جهانی در تمام دامنهای K + 1 بازیافت کنیم. با این حال، لازم است بدون مجبور به دوباره بررسی یک مدل جهانی از بررسی کردن هر بار یک دامنه جدید با نیازهای جدید و نقطه\u200cها اضافه شود. ما یک راه حلی را بر اساس حاضر کردن یک مجموعه متخصص دامنی توصیف می کنیم. ما حدس می\u200cزنیم که هدف ویژه K و مدل\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای روی دامنه\u200cهای مختلف آموزش داده شده است. زمانی که دامنه K + 1 داده شده، مدل ما از یک ترکیب وزن ترکیب برخورد متخصص دامنه K با نظر خودش استفاده می کند تا پیش بینی در دامنه جدید انجام دهد. در آزمایشات، مدل خیلی زیادی از خطوط بنیادی که از تعادل دامنی استفاده نمی\u200cکند و نیز بهتر از طریق تحقیق کامل انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'az': 'Domenin uyğunlaşdırmasındakı möhüm problemi, K mövcud domenilərlə müəyyən edilən yeni domenin üstünə hızlı generalizməsi idi. Bütün K + 1 domeinlərin standart tekniklərini istifadə edən küresel modeli geri almaq, məsələn Daume III (2009). Lakin, hər dəfə yeni domena yeni niyyətlə və slotların əlavə edilən küresel modeli yenidən təmin etmək istəyir. Biz domenin müsəlmanlarının ensembli olmasına dayanan çətinlikləri təsdiqləyirik. Biz K domeinin müəyyən niyyəti və slot modellərini sayəsində təhsil etdik. Domena K + 1 verildikdə, modelimiz yeni domena tədbir etmək üçün K domena ekspertlərinin reaksiyonunun a ğırlığını istifadə edir. Həqiqətən, modeli domain adaptasiyasını istifadə etməyən və həmçinin tamamlama tərzindən daha yaxşı işlədən əsas sətirlərdən daha çox üstün gəlir.', 'bn': 'An important problem in domain adaptation is to quickly generalize to a new domain with limited supervision given K existing domains.  কে+ ১ ডোমেনে একটি বিশ্ব মডেল পুনরুদ্ধার করার একটি প্রযুক্তি হচ্ছে, যেমন ডেমুম ৩ (২০০৯)। তবে প্রত্যেক বার একটি নতুন ডোমেইন থেকে বিশ্ব মডেল পুনরায় গণনা করতে হবে না যা সম্ভাব্য নতুন উদ্দেশ্য এবং স্লোট যোগ করা হয়। We describe a solution based on attending an ensemble of domain experts.  আমরা ধারণা করি কে ডোমেইনের নির্দিষ্ট উদ্দেশ্য এবং স্লোট মডেল সম্পর্কে শিক্ষিত হয়েছে। যখন ডোমেইন কে+ ১ দেয়া হয়, তখন আমাদের মডেল কে. ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞের ক্ষেত্রে ভারী একটি সংযোগ ব্যবহার করে নিজের মতামতের সাথে নতুন ডোমেইনে ভবিষ পরীক্ষার মধ্যে মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক ভাবে প্রদর্শন করে যারা ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপেটশন ব্যবহার করে না এবং পুরো পুনরুদ্ধারের চ', 'am': 'የዶሜን አካባቢ ጉዳይ ፈጥኖ ወደ አዲስ ዶሜን ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ One approach is to retrain a global model across all K + 1 domains using standard techniques, for instance Daume III (2009).  ነገር ግን በየጊዜው አዲስ አዲስ ዓይነት እና ስርዓት ይጨመር ዘንድ አዲስ ዶሜኔን እንደገና መቆጣጠር አይችልም፡፡ የውይይት አካባቢዎች አካባቢ መሆኑን በመጠቀም መፍትሄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የK ዶሜን ፍጥረት እና የስሎት ሞዴላዎችን በአካላዊ ድሆች ላይ ያስተማራሉ፡፡ ከዶሜን K + 1 በተሰጠ ጊዜ ሞዴላዎቻችን በአዲስ ዶሜን ላይ ትንቢት እንዲናገሩ የኬ ዶሜን አዋቂዎች መልስ አካባቢ ይደረጋል፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ ምሳሌው የዶሜን አካባቢ በማይጠቀም እና በሙሉ መግለጫ የሚሻል ነው፡፡', 'ca': "Un problem a important en l'adaptació a dominis és generalitzar-se ràpidament a un nou domini amb supervisió limitada dada els dominis existents en K. Un enfocament és reenvolupar un model global en tots els dominis K + 1 utilitzant tècniques estàndard, per exemple Daume III (2009). Tanmateix, és desitjable adaptar-se sense haver de reestimar un model global de zero cada vegada que s'afegeix un nou domini amb intents i slots potencialment nous. Descrevem una solució basada en participar en un conjunt d'experts en dominis. Suposem que els models d'intenció específica del domini K i de slots entrenats en dominis respectius. Quan es dóna el domini K + 1, el nostre model utilitza una combinació ponderada del feedback dels experts del domini K juntament amb la seva pròpia opinió per fer prediccions sobre el nou domini. En experiments, el model supera significativament les línies de base que no utilitzen l'adaptació del domini i també té millor resultat que l'enfocament complet de reestructuració.", 'hy': 'Ադապտացիայի ոլորտում կարևոր խնդիրն այն է, որ արագ ընդհանրացնենք նոր ոլորտում, որն ունի սահմանափակ վերահսկողություն, հաշվի առնելով K գոյություն ունեցող ոլորտում: Մեկ մոտեցումը գլոբալ մոդելն է վերադասավորելու բոլոր K + 1 ոլորտներում, օգտագործելով ստանդարտ տեխնիկաներ, օրինակ Դաում III (2009). However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added.  Մենք նկարագրում ենք լուծում, որը հիմնված է բնագավառի մասնագետների համախումբի մասնակցության վրա: We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains.  Երբ տրվում է K + 1 տիեզերքը, մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է K տիեզերքի մասնագետների արձագանքի կենտրոնացված համակցությունը միասին իր սեփական կարծիքով նոր տիեզերքի կանխատեսումներ կատարելու համար: Փորձերի ընթացքում մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է հիմնական գծերը, որոնք չեն օգտագործում բնագավառի ադապտացիա և նաև ավելի լավ են աշխատում, քան ամբողջ վերադասավորման մոտեցումը:', 'bs': 'Važan problem u adaptaciji domena je brzo generalizirati u novu domenu s ograničenim nadzorom pod obzirom na postojeće domene K. Jedan pristup je da se vratimo globalni model u svim K + 1 domenama koristeći standardne tehnike, na primjer Daume III (2009). Međutim, poželjno je prilagoditi se bez ponovnog procjene globalnog model a svaki put kad se doda nova domena sa potencijalno novim namjerama i slovima. Opišemo rješenje na temelju prisustvovanja kompleta stručnjaka domena. Pretpostavljamo da je K domena specifična namjera i modeli slota obučeni na odgovarajućim domenama. Kada je dao domenu K + 1, naš model koristi težinu kombinacije odgovora stručnjaka domena K zajedno sa svojim vlastitim mišljenjem kako bi napravili predviđanja na novom domenu. U eksperimentima, model značajno iznosi osnovne linije koje ne koriste adaptaciju domena i izvršava bolje od punog pristupa povlačenja.', 'fi': 'Tärkeä ongelma toimialueen sopeutumisessa on yleistyä nopeasti uuteen toimialueeseen, jossa on rajoitettu valvonta K olemassa olevien toimialueiden perusteella. Yksi lähestymistapa on globaalin mallin uudelleenkouluttaminen kaikilla K + 1-toimialoilla käyttäen vakiotekniikoita, kuten Daume III (2009). On kuitenkin suotavaa mukauttaa sitä ilman, että globaalia mallia joudutaan arvioimaan alusta alkaen aina, kun lisätään uusi verkkotunnus, jossa mahdollisesti on uusia aikomuksia ja lähtöpaikkoja. Kuvaamme ratkaisun, joka perustuu siihen, että osallistumme toimialaasiantuntijoiden joukkoon. Oletamme, että K-verkkotunnuskohtaiset intent- ja slot-mallit on koulutettu kullekin verkkotunnukselle. Kun verkkotunnus K + 1 annetaan, mallimme käyttää K-verkkotunnuksen asiantuntijoiden palautteen painotettua yhdistelmää ja omaa mielipidettään ennustaakseen uutta verkkotunnusta. Kokeissa malli suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin kuin peruslinjat, joissa ei käytetä toimialueen sopeutumista, ja se suoriutuu myös paremmin kuin täysimittainen uudelleenkoulutus.', 'af': "'n belangrike probleem in domein aanpassing is om vinnig te genereer na 'n nuwe domein met beperkte supervisie gegee het K bestaande domeine. Een toegang is om 'n globale model te herhaal oor alle K + 1 domeine te gebruik standaard teknike, byvoorbeeld Daume III (2009). Maar, dit is voldoende om te adapteer sonder om 'n globale model te herestimer van elke keer 'n nuwe domein met potensielle nuwe doels en slots bygevoeg te word. Ons beskrywe 'n oplossing gebaseer op 'n ensemble van domein eksperte. Ons aanvaar K domein spesifieke doel en slot modele wat op respektiewe domeine opgelei is. Wanneer gegewe domein K + 1, ons model gebruik 'n gewigte kombinasie van die K domein eksperte se terugmelding saam met sy eie besonderhede om voorskoue te maak op die nuwe domein. In eksperimente, die model uitvoer betekeurig basis lyne wat nie domein aanpassing gebruik nie en ook beter doen as die volledige terugteling toegang.", 'cs': 'Důležitým problémem při adaptaci domén je rychlé zobecnění na novou doménu s omezeným dohledem nad existujícími K doménami. Jedním z přístupů je přeškolení globálního modelu napříč všemi K-1 doménami pomocí standardních technik, například Daume III (2009). Je však žádoucí přizpůsobit se bez nutnosti přehodnocovat globální model od začátku pokaždé, když je přidána nová doména s potenciálně novými záměry a sloty. Popisujeme řešení založené na účasti souboru doménových expertů. Předpokládáme, že modely typu K domény specifické a sloty trénované na příslušných doménách. Při zadání domény K-1 používá náš model váženou kombinaci zpětné vazby odborníků K-domény spolu s vlastním názorem k provádění předpovědí o nové doméně. V experimentech model výrazně překonává základní linie, které nepoužívají doménovou adaptaci, a také výkonnější než přístup k plnému rekvalifikaci.', 'et': 'Oluline probleem domeeni kohandamisel on kiiresti üldistamine uuele domeenile piiratud järelevalvega, arvestades K olemasolevaid domeene. Üks lähenemisviis on ülemaailmse mudeli ümberõpetamine kõigis K + 1 valdkondades, kasutades standardmeetodeid, näiteks Daume III (2009). Siiski on soovitav kohandada, ilma et peaks ülemaailmset mudelit nullist ümber hindama iga kord, kui lisatakse uus domeen, millel on potentsiaalselt uued kavatsused ja teenindusajad. Kirjeldame lahendust, mis põhineb valdkonna ekspertide ansambli osalemisel. Eeldame, et K domeenispetsiifilised eesmärgid ja teenindusajad on koolitatud vastavatele domeenidele. Domeeni K + 1 andmisel kasutab meie mudel K domeeni ekspertide tagasiside kaalutud kombinatsiooni koos oma arvamusega uue domeeni kohta prognooside tegemiseks. Katsetes ületab mudel märkimisväärselt lähtetasemeid, mis ei kasuta domeeni kohandamist, ning on ka parem kui täielik ümberõpe.', 'jv': "A big question in domain modification is to fast genelise to a new domain with limitsuper view given K current domain. One method is to back up a global model NoneInclude threshold We describe a question- We presumed K domain special enth and slot modes TRANSLED on context domain. When given domain K + 1, we model use a measurementd combining of the K domain Specis' backbackback together with the same view to make warnings on the new domain. Nang ujaran, model sing wis ngerasakno akeh basa sing gak bener, dadi iso nggawe adalah domain ngono iso nggawe luwih apik sing wis ana.", 'he': 'בעיה חשובה בהתאמה לתחום היא להתפשט מהר לתחום חדש עם פיקוח מוגבל בהתחשב בתחומים קיימים K. גישה אחת היא לאמן מחדש מודל גלובלי בכל התחומים K+1 באמצעות טכניקות סטנדרטיות, לדוגמא דום III (2009). However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added.  אנחנו מתארים פתרון מבוסס על להשתתף באנסבול של מומחים בתחום. אנו מניחים שכוונה ספציפית לתחום K ודוגמנים של סגנון מאומנים בתחומים מסוימים. כשנתנו את התחום K + 1, המודל שלנו משתמש בשילוב משקל של התגובה של המומחים בתחום K יחד עם דעתו בעצמו כדי לעשות חזיונות על התחום החדש. בניסויים, הדוגמא יוצאת משמעות מעל קווי הבסיס שלא משתמשים בהתאם לתחום וגם יוצאת משמעות טובה יותר מהגישה המלאה לחדש.', 'ha': "Wata masĩfa mai muhimu a cikin adadin ɗin ayuka, shine za'a iya gabatar da sauri zuwa wata shekara guda na da tsarin tsarin K wanda ke da. Tsarawa guda shine ya sake wata motel ɗin duniya kowace duk K+ 1 domin ka yi amfani da tufãfin na daidaita, misali, Dalum III (2009). Amma, ana kwaɗayin ka sake adadi ba kuma ana kamata a canza wata motsi na duniya kowace lokacin a samu'in da yanzu-yanzu masu iya son hanyoyi da slot. Munã bayyana sulhu a kan ka sami wani mataimaki na masu fitarwa. Tuna ƙayyade K-Domen da misalin misãlai da aka sanar da shi a kan dukkan damu. When given domain K + 1, our model uses a weighted combination of the K domain experts' feedback along with its own opinion to make predictions on the new domain.  Aka cikin jarrabo, motel yana mai girma fara layin da ba su yi amfani da adadin Domen kuma yana aikata mafi alhẽri daga hanyarin da za'a sake koma.", 'bo': "An important problem in domain adaptation is to quickly generalize to a new domain with limited supervision given K existing domains. One approach is to retrain a global model across all K + 1 domains using standard techniques, for example Daume III (2009). However, it is desirable to adapt without having to re-estimate a global model from scratch each time a new domain with potentially new intents and slots is added. ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ཁོངས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དཔོན་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཞིག་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We assume K domain specific intent and slot models trained on respective domains. When given domain K + 1, our model uses a weighted combination of the K domain experts' feedback along with its own opinion to make predictions on the new domain. ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་འདིས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་མི་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།", 'sk': 'Pomemben problem pri prilagajanju domen je hitro posploševanje na novo domeno z omejenim nadzorom glede na obstoječe domene K. Eden od pristopov je preusposabljanje globalnega modela na vseh področjih K + 1 z uporabo standardnih tehnik, na primer Daume III (2009). Vendar pa je zaželeno, da se prilagodi brez ponovne ocene globalnega modela iz nič vsakič, ko se doda nova domena z morebitnimi novimi nameni in režami. Rešitev opisujemo na podlagi udeležbe skupine strokovnjakov za področje. Predvidevamo K domeno specifične namene in modele rež, usposobljene za posamezne domene. Ko dobimo domeno K + 1, naš model uporablja ponderirano kombinacijo povratnih informacij strokovnjakov za domeno K skupaj z lastnim mnenjem za napovedovanje nove domene. V poskusih model bistveno presega osnovne vrednosti, ki ne uporabljajo domenske prilagoditve, in je tudi boljši od pristopa popolnega preusposabljanja.'}
{'en': 'Learning Discourse-level Diversity for Neural Dialog Models using Conditional Variational Autoencoders', 'ar': 'تعلم التنوع على مستوى الخطاب لنماذج الحوار العصبي باستخدام التشفير التلقائي المتغير الشرطي', 'pt': 'Aprendendo Diversidade em Nível de Discurso para Modelos de Diálogo Neural usando Autoencoders Variacionais Condicionais', 'fr': 'Apprentissage de la diversité au niveau du discours pour les modèles de dialogue neuronal utilisant des auto-encodeurs variationnels', 'ja': '条件付き変数オートエンコーダを使用したニューラルダイアログモデルのためのディスコースレベル多様性の学習', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de la diversidad a nivel del discurso para modelos de diálogo neuronal mediante autocodificadores variacionales condicionales', 'ru': 'Изучение разнообразия на уровне дискурса для моделей нейронного диалога с использованием условных вариационных автокодеров', 'zh': '用变分自编码器学神经言多样性', 'hi': 'सशर्त परिवर्तनीय Autoencoders का उपयोग कर तंत्रिका संवाद मॉडल के लिए प्रवचन-स्तर विविधता सीखना', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Éagsúlacht ar leibhéal dioscúrsa le haghaidh Múnlaí Dialóige Néaracha ag úsáid Uath-ionchódóirí Athraitheacha Coinníollacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Beszédszintű sokszínűség tanulása a neurális párbeszédmodellek feltételes variációs automatikus kódolókkal', 'el': 'Μάθηση Διαφορετικότητας σε επίπεδο λόγου για μοντέλα Νευρικού Διαλόγου χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόματους κωδικοποιητές παραλλαγών υπό όρους', 'it': 'Diversità di apprendimento a livello di discorso per i modelli di dialogo neurale che utilizzano autocodificatori a variazione condizionale', 'kk': 'Кәдімгі айнымалы автокодерлерді қолдану диалог үлгілерінің диалог деңгейінің айнымалылығын үйрену', 'lt': 'Mokymosi diskurso lygio įvairovė neurologinio dialogo modeliams naudojant sąlyginius kintamuosius automatinius kodus', 'mk': 'Учење на различност на ниво на дискурс за модели на нервен дијалог користејќи условни варијационални автокодери', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Perbezaan Aras-Perhubungan untuk Model Dialog Neural menggunakan Autopengekod Perubahan Bersyarat', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ്- നില വ്യത്യാസം പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Id-Diversità fil-livell ta’ Diskors għat-Tagħlim għall-Mudelli ta’ Djalogu Newrali bl-użu ta’ Awtokodifikaturi Varjazzjonali Kundizzjonali', 'mn': 'Үндсэн өөрчлөлтийн автокодчуудыг ашиглан мэдрэлийн диалог загваруудын ярианы түвшин өөрчлөлт сурах', 'no': 'Læring av forskjellighet på diskursnivå for nøyraldialogmodeller ved hjelp av vilkårlege variasjonsverdikodar', 'pl': 'Uczenie się różnorodności na poziomie dyskursu dla modeli dialogu neuronowego przy użyciu warunkowych autokoderów warunkowych', 'ro': 'Diversitatea de învățare la nivel de discurs pentru modelele de dialog neural utilizând Autoencodere cu Variații Condiționale', 'sr': 'Naučenje raznolikosti razgovora na nivou neurološkog dijaloga koristeći uvjetne varijacionalne autokodere', 'ta': 'நிரல் உரையாடல் மாதிரி', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් ස්වයංකේතකය භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සංවාදකය සඳහා කතාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සඳහා සංවාදකය ව', 'so': 'Barista Discourse-level Difference for Neural Dialog Models using Conditional Variable Autoencoders', 'sv': 'Mångfald på diskursnivå för neurala dialogmodeller med autokodare för villkorliga variationer', 'ur': 'سیکھ رہی ہے نیورل ڈیلوگ موڈل کے لئے ڈیکورس-لائل مختلفیت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học Discourse-level Diversity for Neural Diaog Models using conditional thay đổi Autocode.', 'bg': 'Разнообразие на дискурсно ниво за модели на неврален диалог, използващи условни вариационни автокодери', 'hr': 'Naučenje različitosti razine diskursa za modele neurološkog dijaloga koristeći uvjetne varijacionalne autokodere', 'da': 'Mangfoldighed på diskursniveau for neurale dialogmodeller ved hjælp af betingede variable autoencodere', 'nl': 'Diversiteit op discoursniveau leren voor neurale dialoogmodellen met behulp van voorwaardelijke variatieautoencoders', 'de': 'Diversität auf Diskursebene lernen für neuronale Dialogmodelle unter Verwendung von Conditional Variational Autoencoders', 'id': 'Belajar Diversitas Tingkat Berlaku untuk Model Dialog Neural menggunakan Autokoder Variasi Kondisional', 'ko': '사용 조건 변분 자동 인코더 학습 신경 대화 모델의 문장 차원 다양성', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن مختلف سطح سخنرانی برای مدل\u200cهای گفتگوی عصبی با استفاده از رمز\u200cدهندگان خودکار متفاوتی شرایط', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Kutofauti kwa Kiwango cha Utafiti kwa ajili ya Mradi wa Ujadala', 'tr': 'Durum Äpişgäniň Awtomatik Ködlemeleri ullanýan diskler derejesi Çeşitlik', 'af': 'Leer Diskurse- vlak Diversiteit vir Neurale Dialoog Modelle gebruik Conditional Variational Autoencoders', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Diversitetit të nivelit të diskutimit për modelet e dialogut neuronal duke përdorur autokoduesit Variacional të Kushtueshëm', 'am': 'chess-rank', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հաղորդակցման մոդելների բազմազանությունը սովորելը՝ օգտագործելով պայմանավոր բազմազանություն', 'az': 'N칬ral Dialoog Modell톛rinin 칐yr톛nm톛si S톛viyy톛ti 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'নিউরেল ডায়ালগ মোডেলের জন্য ডিসার্স- স্তরের ডিভার্স শিখা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Naučenje raznolikosti razgovora na nivou neurološkog dijaloga koristeći uvjetne varijacionalne autokodere', 'ca': 'Aprendre diversitat de nivell de discurs per a models de diàleg neuronal utilitzant autocodificadors variacions condicionals', 'cs': 'Rozmanitost na úrovni diskurzu pro modely neuronového dialogu pomocí autokodérů podmíněných variací', 'et': 'Õppimine diskursustasemel mitmekesisus neuraalsete dialoogimudelite jaoks tingimuslike variatsioonide automaatkodeerijate abil', 'fi': 'Oppiminen diskurssitason monimuotoisuus hermodialogimalleissa ehdollisten variaatioautomaattien avulla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Raznolikost na ravni diskurza za modele živčnega dialoga z uporabo pogojnih variacijskih samokodirnikov', 'he': 'ללמוד שוויון ברמה של דיסקורס למודלים של דיאלוג נוירולי באמצעות קודמות אוטומטיים שינויים תנאיים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྦྱོར་བའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདྲ་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'While recent neural encoder-decoder models have shown great promise in modeling open-domain conversations, they often generate dull and generic responses. Unlike past work that has focused on diversifying the output of the decoder from word-level to alleviate this problem, we present a novel framework based on conditional variational autoencoders that capture the discourse-level diversity in the encoder. Our model uses latent variables to learn a distribution over potential conversational intents and generates diverse responses using only greedy decoders. We have further developed a novel variant that is integrated with linguistic prior knowledge for better performance. Finally, the training procedure is improved through introducing a bag-of-word loss. Our proposed models have been validated to generate significantly more diverse responses than baseline approaches and exhibit competence of discourse-level decision-making.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن نماذج وحدة فك التشفير العصبية الحديثة قد أظهرت وعدًا كبيرًا في نمذجة محادثات المجال المفتوح ، إلا أنها غالبًا ما تولد استجابات مملة وعامة. على عكس العمل السابق الذي ركز على تنويع مخرجات وحدة فك التشفير من مستوى الكلمات للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة ، فإننا نقدم إطارًا جديدًا يعتمد على المشفرات التلقائية المتغيرة الشرطية التي تلتقط التنوع على مستوى الخطاب في المشفر. يستخدم نموذجنا المتغيرات الكامنة لمعرفة التوزيع على نوايا المحادثة المحتملة ويولد استجابات متنوعة باستخدام أجهزة فك التشفير الجشعة فقط. لقد طورنا أيضًا متغيرًا جديدًا يتكامل مع المعرفة اللغوية السابقة لتحقيق أداء أفضل. أخيرًا ، تم تحسين إجراء التدريب من خلال إدخال فقدان حقيبة من الكلمات. تم التحقق من صحة نماذجنا المقترحة لتوليد استجابات أكثر تنوعًا بشكل ملحوظ من مناهج خط الأساس وإظهار كفاءة صنع القرار على مستوى الخطاب.', 'es': 'Si bien los modelos recientes de codificador-decodificador neuronal han demostrado ser muy prometedores al modelar conversaciones de dominio abierto, a menudo generan respuestas aburridas y genéricas. A diferencia del trabajo anterior que se ha centrado en diversificar la salida del decodificador del nivel de palabra para aliviar este problema, presentamos un marco novedoso basado en autocodificadores variacionales condicionales que capturan la diversidad a nivel de discurso en el codificador. Nuestro modelo utiliza variables latentes para aprender una distribución sobre las posibles intenciones conversacionales y genera respuestas diversas utilizando solo decodificadores codiciosos. Hemos desarrollado aún más una variante novedosa que se integra con los conocimientos previos lingüísticos para un mejor rendimiento. Finalmente, el procedimiento de entrenamiento se mejora mediante la introducción de una pérdida de bolsa de palabras. Nuestros modelos propuestos han sido validados para generar respuestas significativamente más diversas que los enfoques de referencia y muestran competencia en la toma de decisiones a nivel del discurso.', 'ja': '最近のニューラルエンコーダデコーダモデルは、オープンドメインの会話をモデリングすることに大きな将来性を示しているが、それらはしばしば鈍重で一般的な応答を生成する。この問題を緩和するために、デコーダの出力をワードレベルから多様化することに焦点を当ててきた過去の仕事とは異なり、私たちはエンコーダ内の話題レベルの多様性を取り込む条件変動オートエンコーダに基づいた新規のフレームワークを提示します。私たちのモデルは、潜在的な変数を使用して、潜在的な会話の意図に対する分布を学習し、貪欲なデコーダーのみを使用して多様な応答を生成します。私たちはさらに、より良いパフォーマンスのために言語学的事前知識と統合された新しい変種を開発しました。最後に、単語喪失を導入することで、トレーニング手順を改善します。提案されたモデルは、ベースライン・アプローチよりも有意に多様な応答を生み出し、議論レベルの意思決定の能力を示すことが検証されています。', 'pt': 'Embora os modelos recentes de codificador-decodificador neural tenham se mostrado muito promissores na modelagem de conversas de domínio aberto, eles geralmente geram respostas maçantes e genéricas. Ao contrário do trabalho anterior que se concentrou em diversificar a saída do decodificador do nível da palavra para aliviar esse problema, apresentamos uma nova estrutura baseada em autoencoders variacionais condicionais que capturam a diversidade no nível do discurso no codificador. Nosso modelo usa variáveis latentes para aprender uma distribuição sobre possíveis intenções de conversação e gera diversas respostas usando apenas decodificadores gananciosos. Desenvolvemos ainda uma nova variante que é integrada ao conhecimento linguístico prévio para um melhor desempenho. Finalmente, o procedimento de treinamento é aprimorado através da introdução de uma perda de saco de palavras. Nossos modelos propostos foram validados para gerar respostas significativamente mais diversificadas do que as abordagens de linha de base e exibir competência de tomada de decisão no nível do discurso.', 'fr': "Alors que les récents modèles encodeur-décodeur neuronal se sont révélés très prometteurs dans la modélisation de conversations de domaine ouvert, ils génèrent souvent des réponses ternes et génériques. Contrairement aux travaux antérieurs qui se sont concentrés sur la diversification de la sortie du décodeur à partir du niveau mot pour pallier ce problème, nous présentons un nouveau cadre basé sur des auto-encodeurs variationnels conditionnels qui capturent la diversité de niveau de discours dans l'encodeur. Notre modèle utilise des variables latentes pour apprendre une distribution sur les intentions conversationnelles potentielles et génère des réponses diverses en utilisant uniquement des décodeurs gourmands. Nous avons développé une nouvelle variante qui est intégrée aux connaissances linguistiques préalables pour de meilleures performances. Enfin, la procédure de formation est améliorée grâce à l'introduction d'une perte de sac de mots. Les modèles que nous proposons ont été validés pour générer des réponses nettement plus diversifiées que les approches de base et démontrent une compétence dans la prise de décisions au niveau du discours.", 'hi': 'जबकि हाल ही में तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल ने ओपन-डोमेन वार्तालापों के मॉडलिंग में महान वादा दिखाया है, वे अक्सर सुस्त और सामान्य प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करते हैं। पिछले काम के विपरीत जिसने इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए शब्द-स्तर से डिकोडर के आउटपुट में विविधता लाने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है, हम सशर्त भिन्नता वाले ऑटोएनकोडर के आधार पर एक उपन्यास ढांचा प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एन्कोडर में प्रवचन-स्तर की विविधता पर कब्जा करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल संभावित संवादी इरादों पर वितरण सीखने के लिए अव्यक्त चर का उपयोग करता है और केवल लालची डिकोडर का उपयोग करके विविध प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करता है। हमने एक उपन्यास संस्करण विकसित किया है जो बेहतर प्रदर्शन के लिए भाषाई पूर्व ज्ञान के साथ एकीकृत है। अंत में, प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया को बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड लॉस पेश करने के माध्यम से बेहतर बनाया जाता है। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल को बेसलाइन दृष्टिकोण की तुलना में काफी अधिक विविध प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करने और प्रवचन-स्तर के निर्णय लेने की क्षमता प्रदर्शित करने के लिए मान्य किया गया है।', 'zh': '虽近神经编码器-解码器拟开放域大言,常有闷通之应。 与往者注解码器输从单词级多样化以纾其事不同,举一以变分自编码器之框架,当框架获编码器之言多样性。 吾法用潜于变量以学潜于言,并仅用贪解码器以生异应。 更开一变体,变体与言语先验知识相合,以得其善。 最后,引入单词囊失改训练程序。 臣等验之,多样化于基线术,而决策于言。', 'ru': 'Хотя последние модели нейронный кодер-декодер показали большие перспективы в моделировании разговоров в открытом домене, они часто генерируют скучные и общие ответы. В отличие от прошлой работы, которая была сосредоточена на диверсификации выхода декодера с уровня слова, чтобы облегчить эту проблему, мы представляем новую структуру, основанную на условных вариационных автокодерах, которые захватывают разнообразие на уровне дискурса в кодере. Наша модель использует скрытые переменные для изучения распределения по потенциальным разговорным намерениям и генерирует разнообразные ответы, используя только жадные декодеры. Мы далее разработали новый вариант, который интегрирован с лингвистическими предварительными знаниями для лучшей производительности. Наконец, процедура обучения улучшается за счет введения потери "мешка слова". Наши предлагаемые модели были проверены, чтобы генерировать значительно более разнообразные ответы, чем базовые подходы, и демонстрировать компетентность принятия решений на уровне дискурса.', 'ga': 'Cé gur léirigh samhlacha ionchódóra-díchódóra néaracha le déanaí gealltanas mór i gcomhráite fearainn oscailte a shamhaltú, is minic a ghineann siad freagraí dullacha agus cineálacha. Murab ionann agus obair san am a chuaigh thart a dhírigh ar éagsúlú a dhéanamh ar aschur an díchódóra ó leibhéal na bhfocal chun an fhadhb seo a mhaolú, cuirimid creat nua i láthair atá bunaithe ar uath-ionchódóirí éagsúlachta coinníollach a ghlacann an éagsúlacht leibhéal dioscúrsa san ionchódóir. Úsáideann ár múnla athróga folaigh chun dáileadh a fhoghlaim thar rún féideartha comhrá agus gineann sé freagraí éagsúla ag baint úsáide as díchódóirí sanntach amháin. Tá tuilleadh forbartha againn ar mhalairt úrnua atá comhtháite le réamheolas teangeolaíoch ar mhaithe le feidhmíocht níos fearr. Ar deireadh, feabhsaítear an nós imeachta oiliúna trí mhála focal a chailleadh. Tá ár múnlaí molta bailíochtaithe chun freagraí i bhfad níos éagsúla a ghiniúint ná cineálacha cur chuige bonnlíne agus chun inniúlacht a léiriú i gcinnteoireacht ag leibhéal dioscúrsa.', 'hu': 'Míg a legújabb neurális kódoló-dekódoló modellek nagy ígéretességet mutattak a nyílt domain beszélgetések modellezésében, gyakran unalmas és általános válaszokat generálnak. A múltbeli munkákkal ellentétben, amelyek a dekóder kimenetének szó szintjéről történő diverzifikálására összpontosítottak, hogy enyhítsék ezt a problémát, új keretrendszert mutatunk be, amely feltételes variációs autokódolókon alapul, és rögzítik a diskurzus szintű diverzitást a kódolóban. Modellünk látens változókat használ arra, hogy megismerjük a potenciális beszélgetési szándékok közötti eloszlást, és különböző válaszokat generáljunk csak kapzsi dekóderekkel. Továbbfejlesztettünk egy új változatot, amely integrálódik a nyelvi előzetes ismeretekkel a jobb teljesítmény érdekében. Végezetül a képzési eljárás javítása a zsák-of-word veszteség bevezetésével történik. Javasolt modelleinket validálták, hogy az alapvető megközelítéseknél lényegesen sokszínűbb válaszokat generáljanak, és a diskurzus szintű döntéshozatal kompetenciáját mutatják.', 'el': 'Ενώ τα πρόσφατα μοντέλα νευρωνικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή έχουν δείξει μεγάλη υπόσχεση στη μοντελοποίηση συνομιλιών ανοιχτού τομέα, συχνά δημιουργούν βαριές και γενικές απαντήσεις. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες που έχουν επικεντρωθεί στη διαφοροποίηση της εξόδου του αποκωδικοποιητή από το επίπεδο λέξης για την ανακούφιση αυτού του προβλήματος, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο βασισμένο σε αυτοκωδικοποιητές μεταβλητών υπό όρους που συλλαμβάνουν την πολυμορφία σε επίπεδο λόγου στον κωδικοποιητή. Το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές για να μάθει μια κατανομή πάνω σε πιθανές προθέσεις συνομιλίας και παράγει διαφορετικές απαντήσεις χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο άπληστους αποκωδικοποιητές. Έχουμε αναπτύξει περαιτέρω μια νέα παραλλαγή που ενσωματώνεται με γλωσσικές γνώσεις για καλύτερη απόδοση. Τέλος, η διαδικασία κατάρτισης βελτιώνεται μέσω της εισαγωγής μιας τσάντας-με-λέξη απώλεια. Τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα έχουν επικυρωθεί για να δημιουργήσουν σημαντικά πιο διαφορετικές απαντήσεις από τις βασικές προσεγγίσεις και να επιδείξουν ικανότητα λήψης αποφάσεων σε επίπεδο λόγου.', 'ka': 'მაშინ ახალი ნეიროლური კოდირების რეკოდერების მოდელები გაჩვენეთ დიდი გვერდის მოდელში გახსნილი დიომინის პარამეტრებში, ისინი ბევრად დავიწყებენ ძალიან ძალიან და გენ წინა სამუშაო განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც განსხვავებულია სიტყვების განსხვავებას სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც ამ პრობლემას გახსნა, ჩვენ ახლა ახალი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ავტოკოდერების გან ჩვენი მოდელი გამოყენებს ლატენტური ცვლილებები, რომლებიც შესწავლოთ განსაზღვრება პოტენტური კონტაქციო საზოგადოებების შესახებ და შექმნა განსხვავებული პასუ ჩვენ უფრო მეტი განვითარეთ პრომენტიკური გარიანტი, რომელიც ინტერგურაცია ლენგურისტიკური წინასწორედ უფრო მუშაობისთვის. საბოლოოდ, სწავლების პროცექტია უფრო მეტადებულია, რომლებიც საკუთარი სიტყვების დაკავშირება. ჩვენი მოდელები გავაკეთებულია, რომ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებები შექმნა, ვიდრე ბაზლინის მიღება და გამოჩვენება კომპექტირების განსხვავება.', 'it': "Mentre i recenti modelli di encoder-decoder neurali hanno mostrato grandi promesse nella modellazione di conversazioni a dominio aperto, spesso generano risposte noiose e generiche. A differenza del lavoro passato che si è concentrato sulla diversificazione dell'output del decoder dal livello di parola per alleviare questo problema, presentiamo un nuovo framework basato su autocodificatori variazionali condizionali che catturano la diversità a livello di discorso nell'encoder. Il nostro modello utilizza variabili latenti per imparare una distribuzione su potenziali intenti conversazionali e genera risposte diverse utilizzando solo decoder avidi. Abbiamo ulteriormente sviluppato una nuova variante che è integrata con conoscenze linguistiche preliminari per migliorare le prestazioni. Infine, la procedura di formazione è migliorata introducendo una perdita di parole. I nostri modelli proposti sono stati convalidati per generare risposte significativamente più diverse rispetto agli approcci di base e mostrare competenza nel processo decisionale a livello di discorso.", 'lt': 'Nors naujausi nervų kodavimo kodavimo modeliai parodė didelį pažadą modeliuojant atviro domeno pokalbius, jie dažnai sukuria nuobodžius ir bendrus atsakus. Priešingai nei ankstesniame darbe, kuriame daugiausia dėmesio skirta dekoderio išeigos diversifikavimui nuo žodžių lygio, siekiant sušvelninti šią problem ą, pristatome naują sistemą, grindžiamą sąlyginiais kintamaisiais autokodoriais, kuriais atsižvelgiama į diskurso lygio įvairovę kodoriuje. Mūsų modelis naudoja latentus kintamuosius, kad išsiaiškintų pasiskirstymą apie galimus pokalbio tikslus, ir sukuria įvairius atsakus naudojant tik greedy dekoderius. Toliau plėtojome naują variant ą, kuris yra integruotas į ankstesnes kalbines žinias siekiant geresnių rezultatų. Galiausiai mokymo procedūra tobulinama įvedant žodžio maišelio praradimą. Mūsų pasiūlyti modeliai buvo patvirtinti siekiant sukurti gerokai įvairesnius atsakymus nei pagrindiniai metodai ir parodyti diskursinio lygmens sprendimų priėmimo kompetenciją.', 'mk': 'Иако неодамнешните модели на нервен кодер покажаа големи ветувања во моделирањето на разговорите на отворен домен, честопати генерираат досадни и генерични одговори. За разлика од минатата работа која се фокусираше на диверзификација на излезот на декодерот од нивото на зборови за олеснување на овој проблем, претставуваме нова рамка базирана на условни варијационални автокодери кои го заземаат дискурсниот ниво на диверзитет во кодерот. Нашиот модел користи тајни променливи за да научи дистрибуција над потенцијалните разговарачки намери и генерира различни одговори користејќи само алчни декодери. Понатаму развивме нов варијант кој е интегриран со јазичното претходно знаење за подобра резултатност. Конечно, процедурата на обука се подобрува со воведување на загуба од вреќа на збор. Нашите предложени модели се валидирани за да генерираат значително поразлични одговори отколку основните пристапи и да покажат надлежност за донесување одлуки на дискурсни нивоа.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പുതിയ ന്യൂറല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d തുറന്ന ഡോമെയിന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വലിയ വാഗ്ദാനം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അവയെപ് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വാക്ക്- നിലയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഡെകോഡേറിന്റെ ഫലം വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വ് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ആഗ്രഹങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി വിതരണം പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ മാതൃകയ നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നോവല്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200dക്ക് മുന്\u200dപ് പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്  അവസാനം, ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയൊക്കെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ബാഗ് ഓഫ് വാക്ക് നഷ Our proposed models have been validated to generate significantly more diverse responses than baseline approaches and exhibit competence of discourse-level decision-making.', 'ms': 'Sementara model pengekod saraf baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan janji besar dalam modelkan perbualan domain terbuka, mereka sering menghasilkan balasan yang membosankan dan generik. Tidak seperti kerja masa lalu yang telah fokus pada pelbagai pelbagai output dekoder dari aras-perkataan untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kami mempersembahkan kerangka baru berdasarkan pengekod otomatik variasi syarat yang menangkap pelbagai aras-diskors dalam pengekod. Model kami menggunakan pembolehubah tersembunyi untuk belajar distribusi atas niat percakapan potensi dan menghasilkan balasan berbeza menggunakan hanya dekoder serakah. Kami telah mengembangkan lebih lanjut varian baru yang diintegrasikan dengan pengetahuan bahasa terdahulu untuk prestasi yang lebih baik. Akhirnya, prosedur latihan diperbaiki dengan memperkenalkan kerugian beg perkataan. Model kami telah disahkan untuk menghasilkan respon yang jauh lebih berbeza daripada pendekatan asas dan menunjukkan kemampuan keputusan tahap-diskors.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li mudelli reċenti ta’ kodifikaturi newrali wrew wegħda kbira fl-immudellar ta’ konverżjonijiet f’dominju miftuħ, ta’ spiss jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet imċajpra u ġeneriċi. Għall-kuntrarju tax-xogħol tal-imgħoddi li ffoka fuq id-diversifikazzjoni tal-output tad-dekoder mil-livell tal-kliem biex ittaffi din il-problem a, qed nippreżentaw qafas ġdid ibbażat fuq awtokoders varjazzjonali kondizzjonali li jaqbdu d-diversità fil-livell ta’ diskors fil-kodifikatur. Il-mudell tagħna juża varjabbli moħbija biex jitgħallem distribuzzjoni fuq intenzjonijiet ta’ konverżjoni potenzjali u jiġġenera reazzjonijiet varji bl-użu ta’ dekoders għaqlija biss. Aħna żviluppajna aktar varjant ġdid li huwa integrat ma’ għarfien lingwistiku minn qabel għal prestazzjoni a ħjar. Finally, the training procedure is improved through introducing a bag-of-word loss.  Il-mudelli proposti tagħna ġew ivvalidati biex jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet ferm aktar diversifikati mill-approċċi bażi u juru l-kompetenza tat-teħid tad-deċiżjonijiet fil-livell ta’ diskors.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy ostatnie modele kodera-dekodera neuronowego okazały się wielką obiecującą w modelowaniu rozmów w otwartej domenie, często generują nudne i ogólne odpowiedzi. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac, które koncentrowały się na zróżnicowaniu wyjścia dekodera z poziomu słowa w celu złagodzenia tego problemu, prezentujemy nowe ramy oparte na warunkowych autokoderach wariancyjnych, które uwzględniają różnorodność na poziomie dyskursu w koderze. Nasz model wykorzystuje skryte zmienne, aby nauczyć się rozkładu nad potencjalnymi intencjami konwersacji i generuje różnorodne odpowiedzi wykorzystując tylko chciwe dekodery. Dalej opracowaliśmy nowy wariant, który jest zintegrowany z językową wiedzą uprzednią dla lepszej wydajności. Wreszcie, procedura szkoleniowa ulepszona jest poprzez wprowadzenie worka-of-word straty. Nasze proponowane modele zostały zweryfikowane w celu generowania znacznie bardziej zróżnicowanych reakcji niż podejścia bazowe i wykazania kompetencji podejmowania decyzji na poziomie dyskursu.', 'mn': 'Саяхан мэдрэлийн коддогч загварууд нь нээлттэй холбоотой ярилцлагуудын загварыг загварчлах гайхалтай амлалтыг харуулсан ч тэд ихэвчлэн ховор, ерөнхий хариулт гаргадаг. Өнгөрсөн ажлын ялгаатай адилаар бид энэ асуудлыг багасгах үеэс илүү олон хэмжээний үр дүнг илүү олон хэмжээний шинэ хэлбэрүүдийг зохион байгуулдаг. Бидний загвар нь хамгийн сүүлийн хувьсагчдыг ашиглаж боломжтой ярилцлагын зорилго дээр хуваарилцах боломжтой, зөвхөн хүлээн зөвхөн хүлээн зөвхөн загварчлагчдыг ашиглаж Бид илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааны тулд хэлний өмнөх мэдлэгтэй холбогдсон шинэ өөрчлөлт хөгжүүлсэн. Эцэст нь дасгал хөдөлгөөн үйлдвэрлэлийн процесс нь хэлбэрийн алдагдалд сайжруулж байна. Бидний санал өгсөн загварууд үндсэн ойлголтын тухай илүү олон хариултыг гаргаж, ярианы түвшинд шийдвэр гаргах чадварыг илэрхийлж чаддаг.', 'no': 'Mens det siste nøyrale koderingsmodeller har vist stor promet i modellering av open-domain-samtaler, har dei ofte generelle svar. I motsetning til forrige arbeid som har fokusert på å diversisera utdata av dekoderen frå ordnivået for å redusera dette problemet, presenterer vi eit nytt rammeverk basert på conditional variasjonal autokodar som får forskjellen på diskursnivået i koderen. Modellen vårt brukar latere variabler for å lære distribusjon over potensielle konversjonsverdiar og lager forskjellige svar med berre grøndedekoder. Vi har utvikla meir ein novel variant som er integrert med språkstisk førre kunnskap for bedre utvikling. Til slutt vert opplæringsprosessen forbetra ved å introdusera ein pakke med ordtap. Våre foreslåde modeller er validert for å laga mykje meir forskjellige svar enn baseline tilnærmingar og vise kompetansen til å få beslutningar på diskursnivået.', 'ro': 'În timp ce modelele recente de encoder neural-decoder au arătat o mare promisiune în modelarea conversațiilor cu domeniu deschis, ele generează adesea răspunsuri plictisitoare și generice. Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare care s-au concentrat pe diversificarea ieșirii decodorului de la nivel de cuvânt pentru a atenua această problemă, prezentăm un cadru nou bazat pe autocodere variaționale condiționale care capturează diversitatea la nivel de discurs în encoder. Modelul nostru folosește variabile latente pentru a învăța o distribuție peste potențiale intenții conversaționale și generează răspunsuri diverse folosind doar decodoare lacome. Am dezvoltat în continuare o variantă nouă care este integrată cu cunoștințele lingvistice anterioare pentru o performanță mai bună. În cele din urmă, procedura de formare este îmbunătățită prin introducerea unei pierderi sac-of-word. Modelele noastre propuse au fost validate pentru a genera răspunsuri semnificativ mai diverse decât abordările de bază și pentru a demonstra competența luării deciziilor la nivel de discurs.', 'sr': 'Dok su nedavni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera pokazali veliko obećanje u modelima razgovora o otvorenom domenu, često stvaraju dosadne i generične odgovore. Za razliku od prošlog rada koji je fokusirao na diversifikaciju proizvoda dekodera iz nivoa riječi da bi ublažili ovaj problem, predstavljamo novi okvir na osnovu uvjetnih varijacijskih autokodera koji uključuju raznolikost nivoa diskursa u koderu. Naš model koristi latentne promjene da nauči distribuciju o potencijalnim razgovornim namjerama i stvara različite odgovore koristeći samo pohlepne dekodere. Dalje smo razvili novu variantu koja je integrisana sa jezičkim prethodnim znanjem za bolju izvedbu. Na kraju, postupak obuke se poboljšava uvođenjem gubitka reči. Naši predloženi modeli su potvrđeni kako bi stvorili značajno više različitih odgovora od početnih pristupa i pokazali sposobnost donošenja odluka na nivou diskursa.', 'si': 'අලුත් න්\u200dයූරල් කෝඩාර් එක්කෝඩ් එක්කෝඩර් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය අතින් වැඩ වගේ විසින් විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විසින් විසින් ස්වයංකේත අපේ මොඩල් භාවිතා කරනවා ලේටින් වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වාර්තාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය අපි තවදුරටත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් විස්තර කළා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම භාෂාව්\u200dයාත්මක විස්තරයක් හොඳ ප්\u200dරවේශ අන්තිමේදි, ප්\u200dරේෂණික විධානයක් වැඩ කරනවා වචනයක් නැති විධානයක් දැනගන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට වඩා විවිදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වඩා විවිදි', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы невралдық кодер- декодер үлгілері ашылған домендің сұрақтарын моделдеу үшін үлкен әлемді көрсетеді, олар көбінде қатты және жалпы жауап береді. Өткен жұмыс, сөз деңгейінен деңгейінің шығысын түрлендіру үшін, осы мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін, оның бағдарламасына негізделген шарт айнымалы автокодерге негізделген, кодердегі дискурс деңгейінің айнымалылығын түсіндіретін,  Біздің моделіміз келесі айнымалыларды қолданып, мүмкіндік айнымалылық мақсаттарды оқыту үшін жұмыс істейді және тек жалғыз декодерлерді қолдану үшін әртүрлі жа Біз басқа жақсы істеу үшін лингвистикалық алдындағы білім мен біріктірілген романдық вариантын жасадық. Соңында, оқыту процедуры сөздерді жоғалуға арналған. Біздің келтірілген үлгілеріміз негізгі жағдайлардан артық жауаптарды жасау және дискурстар деңгейінің шешімінің көбіректігін көрсету үшін көбірек жауаптарды жасау үшін тексерілді.', 'so': "Inta lagu sameeyo sameynta hadalka furan ee gudaha xiliga neurada ee codcodsiga ayaa ballan weyn tusay sameynta sameynta hadalka furan, marar badan waxay sameeyaan jawaabo dulli ah iyo wax caadi ah. Shaqo kale oo ka duwan shaqadii hore ee uu ku kalsoonaaday kala duwanaanshaha midhaha qodeynta si aan u fududayno dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku saleysan qoraal qaabilaad ah oo ku saabsan kormeedyo kala duduwan ee hadalka. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa isbedelyada ugu dambeeya si uu u barto qayb ka qaybsan waxyaabaha hadalka awoodda ah, wuxuuna sameeyaa jawaabo kala duduwan oo isticmaalaya deynta faa'iidada ah oo kaliya. Waxaannu horumarinnay kala duwan ee warqada la xiriira aqoonta afka hore ee la xiriira sameynta hore. Ugu dambaysta waxaa lagu hagaajiyaa baaritaanka waxbarashada marka lagu soo bandhigayo khasaaro hadal ah. Tusaalada la soo jeeday waxaa loo xaqiijiyey in loo sameeyo jawaabooyin kala duduwan oo ka muujiyo aqoonta go'aanka heerka hadalka.", 'sv': 'Medan de senaste neurala kodare-avkodarmodellerna har visat stor lovande vid modellering av öppna domänkonversationer, genererar de ofta tråkiga och generiska svar. Till skillnad från tidigare arbete som har fokuserat på att diversifiera avkodarens output från ordnivå för att lindra detta problem, presenterar vi ett nytt ramverk baserat på villkorliga variationsautokodare som fångar diskursnivåns mångfald i kodaren. Vår modell använder latenta variabler för att lära sig en fördelning över potentiella konversationsinsatser och genererar olika svar med endast giriga avkodare. Vi har vidare utvecklat en ny variant som integreras med språkliga förkunskaper för bättre prestanda. Slutligen förbättras utbildningsförfarandet genom att införa en säck-of-word loss. Våra föreslagna modeller har validerats för att generera betydligt mer varierade svar än basmetoder och uppvisar kompetens i beslutsfattande på diskursnivå.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் புதிய புதிய குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகள் திறந்த டோமைன் பேச்சை மாதிரியும் போது, அவர்கள் பெரும்பாலும் சிறிய மற்றும் பொ இந்த பிரச்சனையை நீக்க முடியும் வெளியீட்டை வெளியீட்டை வெளியீட்டை வெளியீட்டை வெளியீட்டாக்கும் முன்னோட்ட பணியை வித்தியாசமாக்கும் போது  நம்முடைய மாதிரி சமீபத்தில் மாறிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது சாத்தியமான பேச்சு விரிவாக்கத்திற்கு மேல் கற்று மற்றும் உலோப்பு  நாம் மேலும் ஒரு புதிய வேறுபாட்டை உருவாக்கியிருக்கிறோம். அது சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கு முன்னால் மொழிய இறுதியில், பயிற்சி செயல்பாடு ஒரு பாக் சொல்லி இழப்பை முன்னேற்றியது. எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது பேச்சு மட்டத்தின் தீர்ப்பு முடிவுகளை விட மிகவும் வேறு வித்தியாசம', 'ur': 'اگلے نئورل کوڈر ڈیکوڈر نمڈلوں میں بہت بڑا وعدہ دکھائے گئے ہیں، ان میں اگلے وقت آہستہ اور عمومی جواب دیتے ہیں گزشتہ کاروں کے مطابق جو لفظ سطح سے ڈیکوڈر کے نتائج کو مختلف طریقے سے متفاوت کرنے کے لئے تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، ہم ایک نئی فرمود پیش کرتے ہیں جو اس کوڈر میں متفاوت لفظ کی مختلف طریقے کو پکڑتے ہیں. ہمارا مدل لٹینٹ ویرائیٹ کو استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ بتوانی مکالمات کے مطابق تقسیم کریں اور مختلف جواب پیدا کریں صرف گہرے ڈیکوڈر کے مطابق۔ ہم نے اچھی طرح ایک نو الفاظ پیدا کیا ہے جو اس سے پہلے زبان علم کے ساتھ بہترین عمل کے لئے ملی جاتی ہے۔ آخر میں تدریس پردازی بہتر کی جاتی ہے ایک بستی لکھی ہوئی خسارہ کے ذریعے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدلکوں کو اس سے زیادہ مختلف جواب دینے کے لئے ثابت قدم رکھا گیا ہے جو بنیادی لائن کے پاس آتے ہیں اور صحبت سطح کے فیصلہ کرنے کے قابلیت کو دکھاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda yangi neyrolik kodekoder modellari ochiq domen muloqatlarini modellashda juda yaxshi muammola koʻrsatilgan paytda ular ko'p paydo va umumiy javoblarni yaratadi. Name Bizning modelimizning latent variablerni ishlatish mumkin, pul talab qilish qoidalarini o'rganish uchun bir xil javoblar yaratish va faqat qiziq kodlash usulini ishlatadi. Biz yaxshi bajarish uchun eng yaxshi tizimdan oldin tillar bilan birga bog'liq o'zgarishni yaratdik. Endi, ta'lim vazifasi bir so'zni o'zgartirish orqali o'zgartiradi. Bizning taʼminlovchi modellarimiz baseline murakkablaridan juda ko'proq javoblarni yaratishga va suhbat darajasini boshqarish imkoniyatini ko'rsatishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù các mô hình bộ mã hóa thần kinh gần đây đã cho thấy rất hứa hẹn trong việc thiết lập các cuộc đối thoại mở miền, nhưng chúng thường tạo ra những phản ứng đơn giản. Không giống những tác phẩm trước đây tập trung vào việc đa dạng kết xuất của bộ giải mã từ cấp độ ngắn để giảm thiểu vấn đề này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ khung mới dựa trên các mã tự mã ký tự động số kiện nắm bắt sự đa dạng ngôn ngữ trong bộ mã hóa. Người mẫu của chúng ta sử dụng các biến số tiềm ẩn để học phân phối tiềm năng sử dụng các ý định đối thoại và tạo ra các phản ứng khác nhau chỉ bằng tham lam giải mã. Chúng tôi đã phát triển thêm một biến thể mới được hợp nhất với kiến thức ngôn ngữ để đạt hiệu suất tốt hơn. Cuối cùng, thủ tục huấn luyện được cải thiện bằng việc tạo lỗ chữ. Các mô hình đề nghị của chúng tôi đã được xác định để tạo ra các phản ứng khác nhau nhiều hơn so với các phương pháp cơ bản và thể hiện năng quyết định cấp độ.', 'bg': 'Макар последните модели на невронен кодер-декодер показаха голямо обещание при моделирането на разговори с отворен домейн, те често генерират скучни и общи отговори. За разлика от миналата работа, която се фокусира върху диверсифицирането на изхода на декодера от ниво дума за облекчаване на този проблем, ние представяме нова рамка, базирана на условни вариационни автокодери, които улавят разнообразието на дискурсно ниво в кодера. Нашият модел използва латентни променливи, за да научи разпределение над потенциални разговорни намерения и генерира разнообразни отговори, използвайки само алчни декодери. Разработихме по-нататък нов вариант, който е интегриран с предишните езикови познания за по-добро представяне. И накрая, процедурата за обучение се подобрява чрез въвеждане на загуба на думата. Нашите предложения модели са валидирани, за да генерират значително по-разнообразни отговори от базовите подходи и да демонстрират компетентност при вземане на решения на ниво дискурс.', 'nl': 'Hoewel recente neurale encoder-decoder modellen grote belofte hebben getoond in het modelleren van open-domein gesprekken, genereren ze vaak saaie en generieke reacties. In tegenstelling tot vorig werk dat zich heeft gericht op het diversifiëren van de output van de decoder vanaf woordniveau om dit probleem te verlichten, presenteren we een nieuw framework gebaseerd op voorwaardelijke variatie autoencoders die de discours-level diversiteit in de encoder vastleggen. Ons model gebruikt latente variabelen om een verdeling over potentiële gespreksintenties te leren en genereert diverse reacties met behulp van alleen hebzuchtige decoders. We hebben een nieuwe variant verder ontwikkeld die is geïntegreerd met taalkundige voorkennis voor betere prestaties. Ten slotte wordt de trainingsprocedure verbeterd door het invoeren van een bag-of-word verlies. Onze voorgestelde modellen zijn gevalideerd om significant meer uiteenlopende reacties te genereren dan baseline benaderingen en bekwaamheid van besluitvorming op discoursniveau te tonen.', 'hr': 'Iako su nedavni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera pokazali veliko obećanje u modelima razgovora o otvorenom domenu, često stvaraju dosadne i opće odgovore. Za razliku od prošlog rada koji je fokusirao na diversifikaciju proizvoda dekodera iz razine riječi kako bi ublažili ovaj problem, predstavljamo novi okvir na osnovu uvjetnih varijacijskih autokodera koji uključuju raznolikost razine diskursa u koderu. Naš model koristi latentne promjene kako bi naučili distribuciju nad potencijalnim razgovornim namjerama i stvarali različite odgovore koristeći samo pohlepne dekodere. Dalje smo razvili novu variantu koja je integrirana sa jezičkim prije znanjem za bolju učinku. Konačno se postupak obuke poboljšava uvođenjem gubitka riječi. Naši predloženi modeli su potvrđeni kako bi stvorili značajno više različitih odgovora od početnih pristupa i pokazali nadležnost donošenja odluka na razini diskursa.', 'da': 'Mens de seneste neurale encoder-dekoder modeller har vist stor lovende i modellering af åbne domæne samtaler, genererer de ofte kedelige og generiske svar. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde, der har fokuseret på at diversificere output af dekoderen fra ordniveau for at lindre dette problem, præsenterer vi en ny ramme baseret på betingede variationsautoencodere, der fanger diskursniveauets diversitet i koderen. Vores model bruger latente variabler til at lære en fordeling over potentielle samtaleansigter og genererer forskellige svar ved hjælp af kun grådige dekodere. Vi har videreudviklet en ny variant, der er integreret med sproglig forudgående viden for bedre præstation. Endelig forbedres uddannelsesproceduren gennem indførelse af et tab af ord. Vores foreslåede modeller er blevet valideret til at generere betydeligt flere forskelligartede svar end basistilgange og udvise kompetence i diskursniveau beslutningstagning.', 'de': 'Während die jüngsten neuronalen Encoder-Decoder-Modelle bei der Modellierung von Open-Domain-Konversationen vielversprechend sind, generieren sie oft langweilige und generische Antworten. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten, die sich auf die Diversifizierung der Ausgabe des Decoders von Wortebene konzentriert haben, um dieses Problem zu lindern, präsentieren wir ein neuartiges Framework, das auf bedingten variationalen Autoencodern basiert, die die Vielfalt auf Diskursebene im Encoder erfassen. Unser Modell verwendet latente Variablen, um eine Verteilung über potenzielle Konversationsintentionen zu lernen und generiert verschiedene Antworten nur mit gierigen Decodern. Wir haben eine neuartige Variante weiterentwickelt, die mit linguistischen Vorkenntnissen für eine bessere Leistung integriert ist. Schließlich wird das Trainingsverfahren durch die Einführung eines Sack-of-Word-Loss verbessert. Unsere vorgeschlagenen Modelle wurden validiert, um signifikant vielfältigere Reaktionen zu generieren als Basisansätze und zeigen Kompetenz der Entscheidungsfindung auf Diskursebene.', 'id': 'Sementara model pengkode saraf baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan janji besar dalam modeling konversasi domain terbuka, mereka sering menghasilkan respon yang membosankan dan generik. Tidak seperti pekerjaan masa lalu yang fokus pada diversifikasi keluaran dekoder dari tingkat kata untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kami mempersembahkan rangka baru berdasarkan variasi otokoder syarat yang menangkap diversitas tingkat diskors dalam pengekoder. Model kami menggunakan variabel latent untuk belajar distribusi atas niat percakapan potensial dan menghasilkan respon berbeda menggunakan hanya dekoder serakah. Kami telah mengembangkan lebih lanjut varian baru yang terintegrasi dengan pengetahuan lingwistik sebelumnya untuk prestasi yang lebih baik. Akhirnya, prosedur pelatihan diperbaiki dengan memperkenalkan kehilangan tas kata. Model kami yang diusulkan telah dipvalidasi untuk menghasilkan respon yang jauh lebih berbeda daripada pendekatan dasar dan menunjukkan kompetensi pembuat keputusan tingkat diskors.', 'ko': '최근의 신경 인코더 - 디코더 모형은 개방역 대화를 모의하는 데 커다란 잠재력을 보이지만 단조롭고 범용적인 응답을 일으킨다.이전의 작업과 달리 우리는 조건을 바탕으로 자동 인코더를 변환하는 새로운 프레임워크를 제시했는데 이 프레임워크는 인코더의 문장급 다양성을 포착했다.우리의 모델은 잠재적인 변수를 사용하여 잠재적인 세션 의도의 분포를 학습하고 탐욕 디코더만 사용하여 서로 다른 응답을 생성합니다.우리는 더욱 좋은 성능을 얻기 위해 언어 선험지식과 결합된 새로운 변체를 한층 더 개발했다.마지막으로 단어 분실 가방을 도입함으로써 훈련 과정을 개선한다.우리가 제시한 모델은 이미 검증되어 기선 방법보다 다양한 반응을 일으키고 언어 차원의 의사결정 능력을 나타낼 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در حالی که مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی عصبی اخیرا در مدل\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cهای دامنی باز، قول بزرگی را نشان داده\u200cاند، آنها اغلب پاسخ\u200cهای قابل و عمومی می می\u200cدهند. برخلاف کارهای گذشته که روی تغییر دادن نتیجه\u200cی دکور از سطح کلمات تمرکز کرده است تا این مشکل را کمتر کند، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مدل ما از تغییرات latent استفاده می\u200cکند تا یک توزیع در مورد هدف\u200cهای مکالمه پتانسیل یاد بگیرند و جواب\u200cهای مختلف را با استفاده از فقط دکوردر\u200cهای آرامش می\u200cدهد. ما دیگر یک تغییر نویسی را توسعه کردیم که با دانش پیشینی زبان\u200cشناسی برای عملکرد بهتر متصل شده است. بالاخره، روش آموزش با توجه به خسارت کيف کلمات بهتر ميشه. مدلهای پیشنهاد ما برای ایجاد جواب های بسیار مختلف بیشتر از نزدیک های پایین و استعداد تصمیم گرفتن سطح صحبت را نشان داده اند.', 'sw': 'Wakati mifano ya kodi ya neura hivi karibuni imeonyesha ahadi nzuri katika kutengeneza mazungumzo ya wazi ya ndani, mara nyingi huzalisha majibu ya kawaida na ya kawaida. Tofauti na kazi iliyopita ambayo imejikita katika kutenganisha matokeo ya kodi kutoka ngazi ya maneno ili kupunguza tatizo hili, tunaweka mfumo wa riwaya kwa kutumia utaratibu wa mabadiliko yanayofanana na utofauti wa kiwango cha mazungumzo. Mfano wetu unatumia mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni ili kujifunza usambazaji wa mitazamo ya mazungumzo na kutengeneza majibu mbalimbali kwa kutumia mabadiliko yenye uchumi tu. Tumeunda tofauti zaidi ya riwaya ambayo imeunganishwa na maarifa ya lugha kabla ya ufanisi bora. Mwisho, mchakato wa mafunzo umeboreshwa kwa kuanzisha hasara ya maneno. Mradi wetu unapendekezwa umethibitishwa kutengeneza miitikio mbalimbali zaidi ya mbinu za msingi na kuonyesha uwezo wa uamuzi wa ngazi za mazungumzo.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky näöral ködleme modelleri aç-domeny görüşmelerinde ajaýyp söz berdiler. Olar kän geň we ýagdaýy jogaplary döreýärler. Geçen işiň ýaly söz derejesinden çykyş çykyşyny çykarmak üçin bu meseläni azaltmak üçin, bu meseläni soňra görnüşdüren a ýratyn awtomatik ködlerä döredilen mümkin bir çapda görkezip otyrýarys. Bizim modelimiz geçen değişkenleri potansiyel konuşma niyetlerinden bir dağıtımı öğrenmek için kullanır ve sadece zelim kodlaması kullanarak farklı cevaplar üretir. Biz indi gowy başarylyk üçin lingwistiki öňki bilim bilen birleştirilýän nowel wariantçylyk döredik. Soňunda, okuw procedesini çykyş sözlerini ýitirmek bilen geliştirilýär. Biziň teklip eden nusgalarymyz üýtgetmek üçin esasy çykyş jogaplary basetik ýagdaýynda döretmäge hakyky edildi we gürrüňlemek derejesi karar bermäge ukyplarymyzy görkezildi.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa modelet e fundit të koduesit-dekoderit nervor kanë treguar premtimin e madh në modelimin e bisedimeve në domeni të hapur, ato shpesh gjenerojnë përgjigje të mërzitshme dhe gjenerale. Ndryshe nga puna e kaluar që është përqëndruar në diversifikimin e daljes së dekoderit nga niveli i fjalëve për të lehtësuar këtë problem, ne paraqesim një kuadër të ri bazuar në autokoduesit variacione kushtuese që kapin diversitetin e nivelit të diskursit në koduesin. Modeli ynë përdor ndryshuesit e fshehtë për të mësuar një shpërndarje mbi qëllimet e mundshme të bisedës dhe gjeneron përgjigje të ndryshme duke përdorur vetëm dekoderët lakmues. Ne kemi zhvilluar më tej një variant të ri që është i integruar me njohuritë gjuhësore të mëparshme për performancë më të mirë. Më në fund, procedura e stërvitjes përmirësohet nëpërmjet futjes së një çantë me humbje fjalësh. Our proposed models have been validated to generate significantly more diverse responses than baseline approaches and exhibit competence of discourse-level decision-making.', 'af': "Terwyl onlangse neurale enkoder-dekoder modele groot belofte in modellering open-domein gesprekke het, genereer hulle dikwels dulle en generieke antwoordes. Ongelyks van verlede werk wat gefokus het op die uitvoer van die dekoder van woord-vlak af om hierdie probleem te verminder, voorsien ons 'n nuwe raamwerk gebaseer op voorwaardes variasionale outokooders wat die diskursie-vlak verskeidigheid in die enkoder opneem. Ons model gebruik latente veranderlikes om 'n verspreiding te leer oor potensiele omskakelike bedoelings en genereer verskeie antwoordes met slegs groet dekodere te gebruik. Ons het verder 'n roman variant ontwikkel wat integreer is met lingwisiese voorheede kennis vir beter prestasie. Eindelik word die onderwerp prosedure verbeter deur 'n sak van woord verloor te introduseer. Ons voorgestelde modele is geldigheid om betekenlik meer verskillende antwoordes te genereer as baselyn toegang en die kompetentie van diskursvlak-besluit-gemaak te vertoon.", 'am': 'ቅርብ ዘመን የሆኑት የሆኑት የሆኑት የኮድ ኮድዶር-አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች በተከፈተ ዶሜን ንግግር ማሳየት ትልቅ የተስፋ ቃል ሲገልጹ፣ ብዙ ጊዜም ብልሃት እና የብሔራዊ መልስ ያሳድጋሉ፡፡ የድምፅ አካባቢው ውጤት ከቃላት ደረጃ በመለየት ላይ በተለየ የቀድሞው ሥራ በተለየ፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሳየት በአካባቢው ላይ የተለየውን የልዩ አካላት በኮድ ውስጥ የልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት በሚያያሳየው የመረጃ ፍሬም እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የቅርብ መለያየት በተቃውሞው እና በተቃውሞው የአካባቢ ጉዳይ ላይ ትክክል ማድረግ እና የልዩ መልስ ጥያቄዎችን በመጠቀም ብዙዎችን ጥቅም የሚያደርጋል፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እውቀት ከቀድሞ የተሰበሰብን የኖሮውን መለወጥ አቀረብን፡፡ በመጨረሻው የግንኙነቱ ፕሮጀክት የቃላት ጉዳይ መግለጫ በመግለጥ ይሻላል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴላዎቻችን ከመጀመሪያ ደረጃዎች ይልቅ የበለጠ መልዕክቶችን ለማፍጠር እና የንግግር-ደረጃ ውሳኔዎችን ማሳየት የሚችሉትን ሥልጣን ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ վերջին նյարդային կոդավորման մոդելները մեծ խոստումներ են ցույց տվել բաց տիեզերքի զրույցների մոդելավորման մեջ, նրանք հաճախ ձանձրալի և ընդհանուր պատասխաններ են ստեղծում: Ի տարբերություն անցյալ աշխատանքին, որը կենտրոնացել է բառերի մակարդակից բազմազանությունը բառերի մակարդակից, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք այս խնդիրը, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր շրջանակ, որը հիմնված է պայմանավոր բազմազանությունների ավտոկոդերների վրա, որոնք վերցնում են խոսա Մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է թաքնված փոփոխականներ, որպեսզի սովորի բաշխման պոտենցիալ հաղորդակցման նպատակների մասին, և ստեղծում է բազմազան արձագանքներ՝ օգտագործելով միայն գաղտնի կոդերներ: Մենք նաև զարգացրել ենք նոր տարբերակ, որը ինտեգրված է լեզվաբանական նախորդ գիտելիքների հետ ավելի լավ արդյունքների համար: Վերջապես, վարժեցման գործընթացը բարելավվում է՝ ներկայացնելով բառերի կորուստ: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելները հավասարակվել են, որպեսզի ստեղծեն ավելի բազմազան պատասխաններ, քան հիմնական մոտեցումները և ցույց են տալիս խոսակցային մակարդակի որոշումների կայացման հնարավորությունները:', 'az': 'Əvvəlki nöral kodlayıcı modellər açıq domena danışmalarında böyük vəd göstərdilər, onlar çox sıxıntılı və generic cavab verərlər. Əvvəlki işlərə baxmayaraq, söz səviyyəsindən bu problemi yüngülləşdirmək üçün dekoderin çıxışını müxtəlif dəyişiklik kodlayıcılara dayanan yeni bir framework ü göstəririk. Bizim modellərimiz müxtəlif dəyişiklikləri potensial müzakirə niyyətləri üzərində dağıtmaq üçün istifadə edir və yalnızca xoşbəxt dekoder vasitəsilə müxtəlif cavab verər. Daha sonra, daha yaxşı işlər üçün dillərin elmi ilə birləşdirilmiş yeni bir dəyişiklik təhsil etdik. Sonunda, təhsil prosedürü bir torba sözlərin ziyana uğrayaraq daha yaxşılaşdırılır. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz başlangıç yaxınlıqlarından daha çox müxtəlif cavab vermək və söhbət seviyyətində karar vermək mümkünlüyünü göstərmək üçün təsdiqlənmişdir.', 'bn': 'While recent neural encoder-decoder models have shown great promise in modeling open-domain conversations, they often generate dull and generic responses.  এই সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য ডেকোডারের আউটপুট বৈচিত্র্যের প্রতি মনোযোগ দিয়েছে অতীত কাজের অন্তর্ভুক্ত ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যা এনকোডারে কথোপকথন আমাদের মডেলের সাম্প্রতিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ আমরা আরো একটি নভেলের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার সাথে ভাষার পূর্বের জ্ঞানের সাথে একত্রিত হয়েছি। অবশেষে, প্রশিক্ষণের প্রক্রিয়া উন্নত হয়েছে ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের ক্ষতির মাধ্যমে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বৈধ করা হয়েছে যে বেসাইলাইনের চেয়ে বেশী বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং কথোপকথন-স্তরের সিদ্ধান্', 'ca': "Mentre que els models neurocodificadors recents han demostrat gran promesa en modelar converses de domini obert, sovint generen respostes aburrides i genèriques. A diferència de la feina passada que s'ha centrat en diversificar la producció del decodificador del nivell de paraules per aliviar aquest problem a, presentem un nou marc basat en autocodificadors condicionals variacionals que capturen la diversitat del nivell de discurs del codificador. El nostre model utilitza variables latents per aprendre una distribució sobre intencions conversacionals potencials i genera diverses respostes utilitzant només codificadors codificadors. Hem desenvolupat una nova variant integrada amb el coneixement lingüístic anterior per a millor rendiment. Finalment, el procediment d'entrenament es millora introduint una pèrdua de paraula. Els nostres models proposats han estat validats per generar respostes significativament més diverses que els enfocaments de base i mostrar la competència de la toma de decisions a nivell discursiu.", 'cs': 'Zatímco nedávné modely neuronového kodéru a dekodéru ukázaly velký slib v modelování konverzací s otevřenou doménou, často generují nudné a obecné reakce. Na rozdíl od minulé práce, která se zaměřila na diverzifikaci výstupu dekodéru z úrovně slova, aby se zmírnila tento problém, představujeme nový rámec založený na podmíněných variačních autokodérech, které zachycují diverzitu diskurzní úrovně v kodéru. Náš model používá latentní proměnné k naučení rozdělení nad potenciálními konverzačními záměry a generuje různé reakce pouze pomocí chamtivých dekodérů. Dále jsme vyvinuli novou variantu, která je integrována s jazykovými předchozími znalostmi pro lepší výkon. V neposlední řadě je postup školení zlepšen zavedením pytle-of-word ztráty. Naše navržené modely byly validovány tak, aby generovaly výrazně rozmanitější reakce než základní přístupy a vykazovaly kompetenci rozhodování na úrovni diskurzu.', 'bs': 'Dok su nedavni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera pokazali veliko obećanje u modelima razgovora o otvorenom domenu, često stvaraju dosadne i generične odgovore. Za razliku od prošlog rada koji je fokusirao na diversifikaciju proizvoda dekodera iz nivoa riječi da bi ublažili ovaj problem, predstavljamo novi okvir na osnovu uvjetnih varijacijskih autokodera koji uključuju raznolikost nivoa diskursa u koderu. Naš model koristi latentne promjene da nauči distribuciju nad potencijalnim razgovornim namjerama i stvara različite odgovore koristeći samo pohlepne dekodere. Dalje smo razvili novu variantu koja je integrisana sa jezičkim prethodnim znanjem za bolju izvedbu. Na kraju, postupak obuke se poboljšava uvođenjem gubitka riječi. Naši predloženi modeli su potvrđeni kako bi stvorili značajno više različitih odgovora od početnih pristupa i pokazali kompetenciju donošenja odluka na nivou diskursa.', 'et': 'Kuigi hiljutised neurokodeeri-dekooderi mudelid on näidanud suurt lubadust avatud domeeni vestluste modelleerimisel, tekitavad nad sageli igavaid ja üldisi vastuseid. Erinevalt varasematest töödest, mis on keskendunud dekooderi väljundi mitmekesistamisele sõnatasemelt selle probleemi leevendamiseks, esitame uudse raamistiku, mis põhineb tingimuslikel variatsioonilistel autokodeerijatel, mis jäädvustavad diskursustaseme mitmekesisust kodeerijas. Meie mudel kasutab latentseid muutujaid, et õppida jaotust potentsiaalsete vestluskavatsuste üle ja genereerida erinevaid vastuseid, kasutades ainult ahneid dekoodreid. Oleme edasi arendanud uudse variandi, mis on integreeritud keeleliste eelnevate teadmistega parema jõudluse saavutamiseks. Lisaks parandatakse koolitusmenetlust sõnakoti kaotamisega. Meie väljapakutud mudelid on valideeritud, et luua oluliselt mitmekesisemaid vastuseid kui alglähenemisviisid ja näidata pädevust diskursuse tasandil otsustamisel.', 'fi': 'Vaikka viimeaikaiset neurokooderi-dekooderimallit ovat osoittautuneet lupaaviksi avoimen verkkotunnuksen keskustelujen mallintamisessa, ne tuottavat usein tylsiä ja yleisiä vastauksia. Toisin kuin aiemmat työt, joissa on pyritty monipuolistamaan dekooderin tuotosta sanatasolta ongelman lievittämiseksi, esittelemme uuden viitekehyksen, joka perustuu ehdollisiin variaatioon perustuviin automaattikoodereihin, jotka kuvaavat diskurssitason monimuotoisuutta kooderissa. Mallimme käyttää piileviä muuttujia oppiakseen jakautumisen mahdollisiin keskustelutarkoituksiin ja tuottaa erilaisia vastauksia käyttämällä vain ahneita dekoodereita. Olemme edelleen kehittäneet uuden variantin, joka on integroitu kielitaitoon paremman suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi. Lopuksi koulutusmenettelyä parannetaan ottamalla käyttöön sanapussin menetys. Ehdotetut mallit on validoitu tuottamaan huomattavasti monipuolisempia vastauksia kuin peruslähestymistavat ja osoittamaan diskurssitason päätöksenteon osaamista.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko so nedavni modeli nevronskih kodirnikov-dekodirnikov pokazali veliko obetov pri modeliranju odprtih domenskih pogovorov, pogosto ustvarjajo dolgočasne in splošne odzive. Za razliko od preteklih del, ki so se osredotočali na diverzifikacijo izhoda dekoderja iz besedne ravni za lajšanje tega problema, predstavljamo nov okvir, ki temelji na pogojnih variacijskih avtonoderjih, ki zajemajo raznolikost diskurzne ravni v kodirju. Naš model uporablja latentne spremenljivke za učenje porazdelitve nad potencialnimi pogovornimi nameni in ustvarja različne odzive z uporabo samo pohlepnih dekodirjev. Dodatno smo razvili novo različico, ki je integrirana z jezikovnim predhodnim znanjem za boljšo izvedbo. Postopek usposabljanja se izboljša z uvedbo izgube besede. Naši predlagani modeli so bili potrjeni, da ustvarijo bistveno bolj raznolike odzive kot osnovni pristopi in kažejo kompetence za sprejemanje odločitev na ravni diskurza.', 'ha': "A lokacin da misãlai na kode-kode-neuran yanzu suka nuna wa'adi mai girma a samu'anar magana masu buɗe-mazaɓa, ko da yawa sunã samun masuwã na dull da jeni. Di motsi da aikin da ya gabãta wanda ya yi zura ido da yin farin fari masu buɗe matsayin koda daga zane-daraja zuwa ya sauƙa ƙara wannan shida, muna halarce wani firam na kwanan da ke kan kwamfyuta masu buƙata dabam-dabam da ke riƙe difwaltan-daraja cikin kode. @ info: whatsthis Kuma Muka ƙãga wata dabam-dabam da aka haɗa harshen ilmi a gabãnin su fi kyãwo ga aikin aiki. Haƙĩƙa, an improve aikin mafarinta da za'a introduce wani hasara na-magana. An gaskata misalinmu da aka buƙata, don ya sami marubuci masu yawa ko kuma ya sami karatun masu cire-zaɓen magana-daraja.", 'jv': 'Halas recent Neral koder-decoder modeles have displayed big word in modeing open-domain conversations, it often generated dull and generic responses. Sing barêt-barêt sing beraksi kanggo ngerasakno akeh lan mbukakipo mulai kuwi jenis diolah sing perusahaan winih dumadhi kuwi nggawe gerakno perusahaan iki, awak dhéwé ngewehi sistem Anyar sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke karo akeh koder sampek Anyar sampek sing dadi winih antar dumadhi winih lan koder modellus Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih akeh variant sing nyebutaké karo akeh luwih ingkang awak dhéwé nang ngerasakno sing luwih. Lah, njuk saiki, perusahaan langkung ora bisa mbelake seneng pisan-pakan. model sing dibutuhke', 'he': 'למרות שדוגמנים של קודד-קידור עצבי לאחרונה הראו הבטחה גדולה בנוגע לדוגמה לשיחות בתחום פתוח, הם לעתים קרובות יוצרים תגובות משעממות וגנריות. בניגוד לעבודה שעברה שמוקדת על ההגיון של התוצאה של התיקון מרמה מילים כדי להקל על הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציגים מסגרת חדשה מבוססת על קודדים אוטומטיים שווירציונים תנאיים שמתפסות את מגוון רמת הדיוקרס בקודד. הדוגמנית שלנו משתמשת בשתנים מוסתרים כדי ללמוד פיצוח על כוונות שיחה פוטנציאליות ויוצר תגובות מגוונות בשימוש רק מעתקים חמדנים. פיתחנו עוד שינוי חדש שמשותף בידע קודם לשפתי עבור ביצועים טובים יותר. סוף סוף, הליך האימונים משתפר על ידי הכניסה לאבד שקית מילה. הדוגמנים המוצעים שלנו הואשמו כדי ליצור תגובות משמעותיות יותר מגישות בסיסית ולהראות כישורים של קיבלת החלטות ברמה דיבורית.', 'bo': 'དེ་འབདཝ་ད། སྔོན་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་neural encoder-decoder models་ལ་རྣམས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མོ་འདུག་གི་ open-domain conversations་ནང་གི་ཁས་འཆར Unlike past work that has focused on diversifying the output of the decoder from word-level to alleviate this problem, we present a novel framework based on conditional variational autoencoders that capture the discourse-level diversity in the encoder. Our model uses latent variables to learn a distribution over potential conversational intents and generates various responses using only greedy decoders. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག མཇུག་རྫོགས་ལ། སློབ་གྲྭར་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཕར་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང། ང་ཚོའི་བསམ་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Modeling Source Syntax for Neural Machine Translation', 'es': 'Modelización de la sintaxis de origen para la traducción automática', 'ar': 'بناء جملة مصدر النمذجة لترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'fr': 'Syntaxe source de modélisation pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'pt': 'Sintaxe de origem de modelagem para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のためのモデリングソース構文', 'zh': '用神经机器翻译之源语法建模', 'hi': 'मॉडलिंग स्रोत तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए वाक्यविन्यास', 'ru': 'Синтаксис моделирования источника для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Comhréir Foinse Samhaltú le haghaidh Aistriúcháin Néar-Mheine', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Forrás-szintaxis modellezése a neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Συντονισμός πηγής μοντελοποίησης για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Sintassi sorgente di modellazione per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін көзінің синтаксисін үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Моделирање на синтаксис на изворот за превод на неврални машини', 'ms': 'Modeling Source Syntax for Neural Machine Translation', 'lt': 'Modeling Source Syntax for Neural Machine Translation', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മോഡലിങ് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് സിന്\u200dടാക്സ്', 'mn': 'Цөмийн машины хөгжлийн эх үүсвэр синтаксисын модель', 'mt': 'Sintassi tas-Sors tal-Immudellar għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'pl': 'Składnia źródła modelowania dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Sintaxa sursei de modelare pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'no': 'Modeleringssyntaks for kjelde for neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'sr': 'Modeliranje izvora sintaksa za neuronski prevod mašine', 'so': 'Turjumidda maskinenka neurada', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මෙසින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා මූලික සංවිධානය', 'sv': 'Modelleringskällsyntax för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தை மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான மூலம் ஒத்திசைவு', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے سراسر سینٹکس مدل کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ từ nguồn cho dịch sang máy thần kinh', 'hr': 'Modeliranje izvornog sintaksa za neuronski prevod uređaja', 'da': 'Modelleringskildesyntaks for neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Modelbronsyntaxis voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'bg': 'Синтаксис на моделиране на източника за неврален машинен превод', 'de': 'Modellierungsquellensyntax für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Modeling Sintaks Sumber untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cسازی سینتکس منبع برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'ko': '신경기계 번역의 원문법 모델링', 'tr': 'Näyral Mazmunlar terjime üçin Çeşme Sentaksy nusgala', 'sw': 'Makosa ya Vyombo vya Habari kwa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani', 'af': 'Modelering Bron Sintaks vir Nural Masjien Vertaling', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Modelimi i sintaksës së burimit për përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման աղբյուրի սինտաքսի մոդելավորումը', 'bs': 'Modeliranje izvornog sintaksa za neuronski prevod mašine', 'az': 'N칬ral Makin 칂evirm톛si 칲칞칲n m톛nb톛 Sintaks캼 Modell톛ndirilir', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য মডেলিং উৎস সিন্যাক্স', 'ca': 'Modelar la sintaxi de fonts per a la traducció de màquines neuronales', 'cs': 'Syntaxe modelování zdroje pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Modelleerimisallika süntaks neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Modeling Source Syntax for Neural Machine Translation', 'jv': 'Packages', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודל סינטקס מקור לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'sk': 'Sintaksa vira modeliranja za nevralni strojni prevod', 'bo': 'Modeling Source Syntax for Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Even though a linguistics-free sequence to sequence model in neural machine translation (NMT) has certain capability of implicitly learning syntactic information of source sentences, this paper shows that source syntax can be explicitly incorporated into NMT effectively to provide further improvements. Specifically, we linearize parse trees of source sentences to obtain structural label sequences. On the basis, we propose three different sorts of encoders to incorporate source syntax into NMT : 1) Parallel RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors parallelly ; 2) Hierarchical RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors in a two-level hierarchy ; and 3) Mixed RNN encoder that stitchingly learns word and label annotation vectors over sequences where words and labels are mixed. Experimentation on Chinese-to-English translation demonstrates that all the three proposed syntactic encoders are able to improve translation accuracy. It is interesting to note that the simplest RNN encoder, i.e., Mixed RNN encoder yields the best performance with an significant improvement of 1.4 BLEU points. Moreover, an in-depth analysis from several perspectives is provided to reveal how source syntax benefits NMT.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن التسلسل الخالي من اللغويات إلى نموذج التسلسل في الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) لديه قدرة معينة على التعلم الضمني للمعلومات النحوية للجمل المصدر ، توضح هذه الورقة أنه يمكن دمج بناء جملة المصدر بشكل صريح في NMT بشكل فعال لتوفير مزيد من التحسينات. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بترتيب أشجار التحليل الخطي لجمل المصدر للحصول على تسلسلات تسمية هيكلية. على الأساس ، نقترح ثلاثة أنواع مختلفة من أجهزة التشفير لدمج بناء جملة المصدر في NMT: 1) مشفر RNN المتوازي الذي يتعلم متجهات التعليقات التوضيحية للكلمات والتسمية بشكل متوازي ؛ 2) مشفر RNN الهرمي الذي يتعلم متجهات شرح الكلمات والتسمية في تسلسل هرمي من مستويين ؛ و 3) مشفر RNN المختلط الذي يتعلم درزًا متجهات التعليقات التوضيحية للكلمات والتسميات عبر التسلسلات التي يتم فيها خلط الكلمات والتسميات. توضح التجارب على الترجمة من الصينية إلى الإنجليزية أن جميع المشفرات النحوية الثلاثة المقترحة قادرة على تحسين دقة الترجمة. من المثير للاهتمام ملاحظة أن أبسط مشفر RNN ، أي مشفر RNN المختلط ، ينتج أفضل أداء مع تحسن كبير يبلغ 1.4 نقطة BLEU. علاوة على ذلك ، يتم توفير تحليل متعمق من عدة وجهات نظر لكشف كيف يفيد بناء جملة المصدر NMT.', 'es': 'A pesar de que un modelo de secuencia a secuencia libre de lingüística en la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) tiene cierta capacidad de aprender implícitamente la información sintáctica de las oraciones fuente, este artículo muestra que la sintaxis fuente se puede incorporar explícitamente en la NMT de manera efectiva para proporcionar mejoras adicionales. Específicamente, linealizamos árboles de análisis sintáctico de oraciones fuente para obtener secuencias de etiquetas estructurales. Sobre la base, proponemos tres tipos diferentes de codificadores para incorporar la sintaxis de origen en NMT: 1) codificador RNN paralelo que aprende vectores de anotación de palabras y etiquetas paralelamente; 2) codificador RNN jerárquico que aprende vectores de anotación de palabras y etiquetas en una jerarquía de dos niveles; y 3) codificador RNN mixto que aprende de manera uniforme los vectores de anotación de palabras y etiquetas sobre secuencias en las que se mezclan palabras y etiquetas. La experimentación con la traducción del chino al inglés demuestra que los tres codificadores sintácticos propuestos son capaces de mejorar la precisión de la traducción. Es interesante observar que el codificador RNN más simple, es decir, el codificador RNN mixto, produce el mejor rendimiento con una mejora significativa de 1,4 puntos BLEU. Además, se proporciona un análisis en profundidad desde varias perspectivas para revelar cómo la sintaxis de la fuente beneficia a NMT.', 'pt': 'Mesmo que um modelo de sequência para sequência livre de linguística na tradução automática neural (NMT) tenha certa capacidade de aprender implicitamente informações sintáticas de sentenças de origem, este artigo mostra que a sintaxe de origem pode ser explicitamente incorporada à NMT de forma eficaz para fornecer melhorias adicionais. Especificamente, linearizamos árvores de análise sintática de sentenças de origem para obter sequências de rótulos estruturais. Com base, propomos três tipos diferentes de codificadores para incorporar a sintaxe fonte na NMT: 1) Codificador RNN paralelo que aprende vetores de anotação de palavras e rótulos paralelamente; 2) Codificador RNN hierárquico que aprende vetores de anotação de palavras e rótulos em uma hierarquia de dois níveis; e 3) Codificador RNN misto que aprende por costura vetores de anotação de palavras e rótulos sobre sequências onde palavras e rótulos são misturados. A experimentação na tradução de chinês para inglês demonstra que todos os três codificadores sintáticos propostos são capazes de melhorar a precisão da tradução. É interessante notar que o codificador RNN mais simples, ou seja, o codificador RNN misto produz o melhor desempenho com uma melhoria significativa de 1,4 pontos BLEU. Além disso, uma análise aprofundada de várias perspectivas é fornecida para revelar como a sintaxe de origem beneficia a NMT.', 'fr': "Même si un modèle de séquence à séquence sans linguistique dans la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) possède une certaine capacité d'apprentissage implicite des informations syntaxiques des phrases sources, cet article montre que la syntaxe source peut être explicitement incorporée dans la NMT efficacement pour apporter des améliorations supplémentaires. Plus précisément, nous linéarisons les arbres d'analyse des phrases sources pour obtenir des séquences de marqueurs structuraux. Sur la base, nous proposons trois types d'encodeurs différents pour intégrer la syntaxe source dans NMT\xa0: 1) un encodeur RNN parallèle qui apprend les vecteurs d'annotation de mots et d'étiquettes en parallèle\xa0; 2) un encodeur RNN hiérarchique qui apprend les vecteurs d'annotation de mots et d'étiquettes dans une hiérarchie à deux niveaux\xa0; et 3) un encodeur RNN mixte qui apprend par couture des vecteurs d'annotation de mots et d'étiquettes sur des séquences où les mots et les étiquettes sont mélangés. L'expérimentation de la traduction du chinois vers l'anglais montre que les trois encodeurs syntaxiques proposés sont capables d'améliorer la précision de la traduction. Il est intéressant de noter que le codeur RNN le plus simple, c'est-à-dire le codeur RNN mixte, donne les meilleures performances avec une amélioration significative de 1,4 point BLEU. De plus, une analyse approfondie de plusieurs points de vue est fournie pour révéler comment la syntaxe source profite à la NMT.", 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）におけるシーケンス・モデルに対する無言語シーケンスは、ソース文の構文情報を暗黙的に学習する特定の能力を有するにもかかわらず、本論文は、ソース構文をNMTに明示的に効果的に組み込むことができ、さらなる改善をもたらすことができることを示している。 具体的には、ソース文の解析木を線形化して構造標識配列を得る。 これに基づいて、私たちは、ソース構文をNMTに組み込むための3つの異なる種類のエンコーダを提案します。1)ワードとラベルの注釈ベクトルを並列に学習するパラレルRNNエンコーダ、2) 2段階の階層でワードとラベルの注釈ベクトルを学習する階層RNNエンコーダ、および3)ワードとラベルが混合されたシーケンス上でワードとラベルの注釈ベクトルを縫い合わせて学習する混合RNNエンコーダ。 中国語から英語への翻訳の実験は、提案された3つの構文エンコーダすべてが翻訳精度を向上させることができることを示しています。 最も単純なRNNエンコーダ、すなわち混合RNNエンコーダは、1.4 BLEUポイントの大幅な改善で最高のパフォーマンスをもたらすことに興味深い。 さらに、ソース構文がNMTにどのような利益をもたらすかを明らかにするために、いくつかの観点からの深い分析が提供される。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)中无语言学序列模形隐式学源句法信息之能,然本文明源语法有效地显式整合于NMT,以供更进。 具体来说,线性化源句解析树以得结构标序。 立三编码器,并源语法于NMT:1)并学单词与注向量并RNN编码器。 2)分RNN编码器,于两层结构中学单词及标签注向量。 与 3) 合 RNN 编码器,可拼接学单词与序单词与注向量。 中英译实验明,凡三句法编码器皆能重准确性。 有趣者,至简之RNN编码器,混RNN编码器生至善,显崇1.4 BLEU点。 供深入分析数角,以明源语法 NMT 益。', 'hi': 'भले ही तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) में अनुक्रम मॉडल के लिए एक भाषाविज्ञान-मुक्त अनुक्रम में स्रोत वाक्यों की वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को स्पष्ट रूप से सीखने की कुछ क्षमता है, इस पेपर से पता चलता है कि स्रोत वाक्यविन्यास को आगे के सुधार प्रदान करने के लिए एनएमटी में प्रभावी ढंग से शामिल किया जा सकता है। विशेष रूप से, हम संरचनात्मक लेबल अनुक्रमों को प्राप्त करने के लिए स्रोत वाक्यों के पार्स पेड़ों को रैखिक करते हैं। इस आधार पर, हम NMT में स्रोत वाक्यविन्यास को शामिल करने के लिए तीन अलग-अलग प्रकार के एनकोडर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: 1) समानांतर RNN एन्कोडर जो शब्द और लेबल एनोटेशन वैक्टर को समानांतर रूप से सीखता है; 2) पदानुक्रमित RNN एन्कोडर है कि एक दो स्तर पदानुक्रम में शब्द और लेबल एनोटेशन वैक्टर सीखता है; और 3) मिश्रित RNN एन्कोडर है कि सिलाई शब्द और लेबल एनोटेशन वैक्टर अनुक्रमों पर जहां शब्दों और लेबल मिश्रित कर रहे हैं पर सीखता है. चीनी-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर प्रयोग दर्शाता है कि सभी तीन प्रस्तावित वाक्यात्मक एन्कोडर अनुवाद सटीकता में सुधार करने में सक्षम हैं। यह ध्यान रखना दिलचस्प है कि सबसे सरल RNN एन्कोडर, यानी, मिश्रित RNN एन्कोडर 1.4 BLEU अंकों के महत्वपूर्ण सुधार के साथ सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन देता है। इसके अलावा, कई दृष्टिकोणों से एक गहन विश्लेषण यह प्रकट करने के लिए प्रदान किया जाता है कि स्रोत वाक्यविन्यास एनएमटी को कैसे लाभ पहुंचाता है।', 'ru': 'Несмотря на то, что свободная от лингвистики последовательность к модели последовательности в нейронном машинном переводе (НМТ) обладает определенной способностью неявно изучать синтаксическую информацию исходных предложений, эта статья показывает, что синтаксис источника может быть явно включен в НМТ эффективно для обеспечения дальнейших улучшений. В частности, мы линеаризируем деревья синтаксического анализа исходных предложений для получения структурных последовательностей меток. Основываясь на этом, мы предлагаем три различных вида кодировщиков для включения исходного синтаксиса в NMT: 1) параллельный кодировщик RNN, который параллельно изучает векторы аннотаций слов и меток; 2) иерархический кодировщик RNN, который изучает векторы аннотаций слов и меток в двухуровневой иерархии; и 3) смешанный кодировщик RNN, который сшивающе изучает векторы аннотаций слов и меток над последовательностями, где слова и метки смешиваются. Эксперименты по китайско-английскому переводу показывают, что все три предложенных синтаксических кодировщика способны улучшить точность перевода. Интересно отметить, что самый простой кодер RNN, то есть смешанный кодер RNN, дает лучшую производительность со значительным улучшением на 1,4 балла BLEU. Кроме того, проводится углубленный анализ с нескольких точек зрения, с тем чтобы выявить преимущества синтаксиса источника для НБМ.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil cumas áirithe ag seicheamh saor ó theangeolaíocht chun seicheamhú a dhéanamh ar shamhail in néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT) faisnéis chomhréire d’abairtí foinseacha a fhoghlaim go hintuigthe, léiríonn an páipéar seo gur féidir comhréir foinse a ionchorprú go sonrach san NMT go héifeachtach chun tuilleadh feabhsuithe a sholáthar. Go sonrach, déanaimid pharsáil líneach ar chrainn abairtí foinse chun seichimh struchtúracha lipéad a fháil. Ar an mbonn, molaimid trí chineál éagsúla ionchódóirí chun comhréir foinse a ionchorprú isteach i NMT: 1) Ionchódóir RNN comhthreomhar a fhoghlaimíonn veicteoirí nótaí focal agus lipéad go comhthreomhar; 2) Ionchódóir ordlathach RNN a fhoghlaimíonn veicteoirí nótaí focal agus lipéid in ordlathas dhá leibhéal; agus 3) Ionchódóir RNN measctha a fhoghlaimíonn go fuála veicteoirí anótála focal agus lipéad thar sheichimh ina measctar focail agus lipéid. Léiríonn turgnamh ar aistriúchán Síneach go Béarla go bhfuil na trí ionchódóir comhréire atá beartaithe in ann cruinneas an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú. Tá sé suimiúil a thabhairt faoi deara go dtugann an t-ionchódóir RNN is simplí, ie, ionchódóir RNN measctha an fheidhmíocht is fearr le feabhas suntasach de 1.4 pointe BLEU. Ina theannta sin, soláthraítear anailís dhomhain ó dhearcadh éagsúla chun a léiriú conas a théann comhréir foinse chun tairbhe NMT.', 'hu': 'Annak ellenére, hogy egy nyelvészet-szekvencia modell a neurális gépi fordításban (NMT) bizonyos képességekkel rendelkezik arra, hogy implicit módon tanulja a forráspontok szintaktikus információit, ez a tanulmány azt mutatja, hogy a forrásszintaxis hatékonyan beépíthető az NMT-be, hogy további fejlesztéseket nyújtson. Konkrétan linearizáljuk a forrás mondatok elemzési fáit, hogy strukturális címke szekvenciákat kapjunk. Ennek alapján három különböző típusú kódolót javasolunk a forrásszintaxis beépítésére az NMT-be: 1) Párhuzamos RNN kódoló, amely párhuzamosan tanul szó- és címkézési vektorokat; 2) Hierarchikus RNN kódoló, amely megtanulja a szó és a címke jegyzékek vektorait egy kétszintes hierarchiában; és 3) Vegyes RNN kódoló, amely varrással tanulja meg a szó és címke jegyzékek vektorait a szekvenciákon keresztül, ahol szavak és címkék keverednek. A kínai-angol fordítással végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy mindhárom javasolt szintaktikus kódoló képes javítani a fordítási pontosságot. Érdekes megjegyezni, hogy a legegyszerűbb RNN kódoló, azaz a vegyes RNN kódoló a legjobb teljesítményt nyújtja 1,4 BLEU pont jelentős javulásával. Ezenkívül több perspektívából is részletes elemzést nyújtunk annak feltárására, hogy a forrás szintaxisa milyen előnyökkel jár az NMT.', 'el': 'Παρόλο που ένα μοντέλο ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία χωρίς γλωσσολογία στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) έχει ορισμένη ικανότητα να μαθαίνει σιωπηρά συντακτικές πληροφορίες των προτάσεων προέλευσης, η παρούσα εργασία δείχνει ότι η σύνταξη πηγής μπορεί να ενσωματωθεί ρητά στο NMT αποτελεσματικά για να παρέχει περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις. Συγκεκριμένα, γραμμοποιούμε τα δέντρα ανάλυσης προτάσεων πηγής για να πάρουμε δομικές ακολουθίες ετικετών. Στη βάση, προτείνουμε τρία διαφορετικά είδη κωδικοποιητών για να ενσωματώσουν τη σύνταξη πηγής στο Παράλληλο κωδικοποιητή που μαθαίνει τα διανύσματα σχολιασμού λέξεων και ετικετών παράλληλα. 2) Ιεραρχικός κωδικοποιητής που μαθαίνει διανύσματα σχολιασμού λέξεων και ετικετών σε μια ιεραρχία δύο επιπέδων. και 3) Μεικτός κωδικοποιητής που μαθαίνει στενά διανύσματα σχολιασμού λέξεων και ετικετών πάνω από ακολουθίες όπου οι λέξεις και οι ετικέτες αναμιγνύονται. Το πείραμα στη μετάφραση κινέζικης-αγγλικής δείχνει ότι και οι τρεις προτεινόμενοι συντακτικοί κωδικοποιητές είναι σε θέση να βελτιώσουν την ακρίβεια της μετάφρασης. Είναι ενδιαφέρον να σημειωθεί ότι ο απλούστερος κωδικοποιητής δηλαδή ο μικτός κωδικοποιητής αποδίδει την καλύτερη απόδοση με σημαντική βελτίωση των σημείων 1.4. Επιπλέον, παρέχεται μια σε βάθος ανάλυση από διάφορες προοπτικές για να αποκαλύψει πώς η σύνταξη πηγής ωφελεί την NMT.', 'ka': 'თუმცა სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური შესაძლებელია, რომ სინტექტიკური სინტექსი განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ მივიღეთ სტრუქტური ნიშანების სერექტური სიმბოლოების პარალიზაცია. მხოლოდ, ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული კოდერების პროგრამები NMT: 1) პარალელი RNN კოდერები, რომელიც სიტყვების და etiket ანტორაციის გვეკოდერების პარალელურად შესწავლას; 2) ჰიერარიქული RNN კოდერი, რომელიც სიტყვის და ნიშანის ნიშანტის გვეკორების ორ დონის ჰიერარიაციაში შესწავლის; და 3) შემთხვევული RNN კოდერი, რომელიც სიტყვების და ნიშანის გვეკორტების სიტყვების და სიტყვების შემთხვევაში, სადაც სიტყვები და ნიშანების შემთხვევაში გადასწავლის. Name ინტერესურია, რომ ყველაფერი RNN კოდერი, ანუ, შესაბამისი RNN კოდერი უფრო საუკეთესო გამოყენება, რომელიც 1.4 BLEU წერტილების მნიშვნელოვანია. დამატებით, რამდენიმე პერსპუტექტიდან განსაზღვრული ანალიზია, როგორ გამოიყენება სინტაქსი NMT.', 'it': "Anche se un modello sequenziale-sequenziale privo di linguistica nella traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) ha una certa capacità di apprendere implicitamente le informazioni sintattiche delle frasi sorgente, questo articolo mostra che la sintassi sorgente può essere esplicitamente incorporata in NMT efficacemente per fornire ulteriori miglioramenti. Nello specifico, linearizziamo gli alberi di analisi delle frasi sorgente per ottenere sequenze di etichette strutturali. Sulla base, proponiamo tre diversi tipi di encoder per incorporare la sintassi sorgente in NMT: 1) encoder RNN parallelo che impara i vettori di annotazione di parole ed etichette parallelamente; 2) Encoder RNN gerarchico che impara i vettori di annotazione di parole ed etichette in una gerarchia a due livelli; e 3) Encoder RNN misto che impara cucitivamente i vettori di annotazione di parole ed etichette su sequenze in cui parole ed etichette sono mescolate. La sperimentazione sulla traduzione cinese-inglese dimostra che tutti e tre i codificatori sintattici proposti sono in grado di migliorare l'accuratezza della traduzione. È interessante notare che l'encoder RNN più semplice, cioè l'encoder RNN misto offre le migliori prestazioni con un miglioramento significativo di 1,4 punti BLEU. Inoltre, viene fornita un'analisi approfondita da diverse prospettive per rivelare come la sintassi sorgente benefici NMT.", 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што слободна секвенца за секвенца на моделот во нервниот машински превод (НМТ) има одредена способност за имплицитно учење синтактички информации за изворните реченици, оваа вест покажува дека изворната синтаксија може да биде експлицитно вклучена во НМТ ефикасно за да обезбеди понатамошни подоб Specifically, we linearize parse trees of source sentences to obtain structural label sequences.  На основа, предложуваме три различни видови на кодери за вклучување на синтаксија на изворот во НМТ: 1) Паралелен RNN кодер кој научи паралелно вектори на анотација на зборови и етикети; 2) хиерархичен RNN кодер кој научи вектори за анотација на зборови и етикети во хиерархија на две нивоа; и 3) Мешан RNN кодер кој шиво научи зборови и означува вектори на анотација преку секвенции каде зборови и означувања се мешани. Експериментацијата на кинески-англиски превод покажува дека сите три предложени синтактички кодери можат да ја подобрат преводната точност. Интересно е да се забележи дека наједноставниот кодер на РНН, т.е., мешаниот кодер на РНН, дава најдобра резултат со значително подобрување од 1,4 БЛЕ поени. Покрај тоа, се обезбедува длабока анализа од неколку перспективи за да се открие како синтаксијата на изворот користи НМТ.', 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармаларының (NMT) үлгісінің лингвистикалық бос ретінде бірнеше синтактикалық мәліметтерді оқыту мүмкіндігі бар болса да, бұл қағаз көзінің синтаксисі NMT-ке қосылмай алады. Сәйкес, біз құрылғы жарлықтар ретіндегі көздегі сөйлемелердің ағаштарын талдау үшін сызықты түрлендік. Негізінде, біз көзінің синтаксисін NMT: 1) Сөзді және белгіленген белгілер векторларын параллель түрде үйренетін үш түрлі кодерлерді ұсынып тастаймыз; 2) Екі деңгейіндегі иерархиясында сөз мен белгілеу векторларын үйренетін иерархиялық RNN кодері; мәліметтері және 3) Сөздер мен жарлықтар араластырылып жатқан тізімдер мен белгілерді түсіндіреді. Қытай- ағылшын аудармасының эксперименті барлық үш таңдалған синтактикалық кодерлер аудармасының дұрыстығын жақсарту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Ең қарапайым RNN кодері, яғни аралас RNN кодері 1,4 BLEU нүктелерін жақсы жақсы жақсарту арқылы жақсы жұмыс істейді. Сонымен қатар, бірнеше қарап көріністерден тең талдауы NMT бағдарламасының көзі синтаксисінің қалай пайдалануын көрсетуге болады.', 'lt': 'Nors kalbos neturinti seka sekos modeliui nervinių mašin ų vertimui (NMT) turi tam tikrą galimybę netiesiogiai išmokti sintaksinę informaciją apie pradinius sakinius, šis dokumentas rodo, kad šaltinio sintaksą galima aiškiai įtraukti į NMT veiksmingai, siekiant tolesnių patobulinimų. Konkrečiai, mes tiesiniu būdu analizuojame išorinius sakinius medžius, kad gautume struktūrines etiketės sekas. Atsižvelgdami į tai, siūlome tris skirtingus kodatorius į NMT įtraukti šaltinio sintaksą: 1) paralelinis RNN kodatorius, kuris vienu metu mokosi žodžių ir etiketės annotacijos vektorių; 2) hierarchinis RNN kodatorius, kuris dviejų lygių hierarchijoje išmoko žodžių ir etiketės annotacijos vektorius; ir 3) sumaišytas RNR kodatorius, kuris stebuklingai išmoko žodžių ir etiketės annotacijos vektorius sekose, kuriose žodžiai ir etiketės sumaišomi. Eksperimentavimas dėl vertimo iš kinų į anglų rodo, kad visi trys siūlomi sintaksiniai kodai gali pagerinti vertimo tikslumą. Įdomu pažymėti, kad paprasčiausias RNN kodatorius, t. y. sumaišytas RNN kodatorius, duoda geriausių rezultatų ir gerokai pagerėjo 1,4 BLEU taško. Be to, pateikiama išsami kelių perspektyvų analizė, kuria siekiama atskleisti, kaip šaltinio sintaksas naudingas NMT.', 'ms': 'Walaupun jujukan bebas bahasa ke model jujukan dalam terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) mempunyai kemampuan tertentu untuk mempelajari maklumat sintaktik secara implicit kalimat sumber, kertas ini menunjukkan bahawa sintaks sumber boleh secara eksplicit didalam NMT secara efektif untuk menyediakan peningkatan lanjut. Secara khusus, kita linearisasikan pepohon huraian sumber untuk mendapatkan urutan label struktur. On the basis, we propose three different sorts of encoders to incorporate source syntax into NMT: 1) Parallel RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors parallelly;  2) Pengenkod RNN Hierarkik yang belajar vektor anotasi perkataan dan label dalam hierarki dua aras; dan 3) Pengenkod RNN bercampur yang mempelajari vektor anotasi perkataan dan label secara jahitan melalui urutan di mana perkataan dan label dicampur. Pengalaman dalam terjemahan bahasa Cina-bahasa Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa semua tiga pengekod sintaktik yang diusulkan mampu memperbaiki ketepatan terjemahan. Menarik untuk memperhatikan bahawa pengekod RNN paling sederhana, iaitu pengekod RNN campuran memberikan prestasi terbaik dengan peningkatan yang signifikan 1.4 titik BLEU. Lagipun, analisis mendalam dari beberapa perspektif diberikan untuk mengungkap bagaimana sumber sintaks berguna NMT.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിനുള്ള ഭാഷ- സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഒരു സെക്കന്റിക്ക് സെക്കന്റിക്ക് സെക്കന്റിക്ക് സെക്കന്റിക്ക് സംവിധാനം ഉണ്ടെങ്കിലും സ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, സൂര്യശിക്ഷകളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു. അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ലേബി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത കോഡുകള്\u200d പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. സോഴ്സ് സിന്\u200dടാക്സ് NMT: 1) പാരാള്\u200dഎല്\u200d RNN എന്\u200dകോഡോര്\u200d പഠ 2) വാക്കും ലേബറ്റിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയുള്ള RNN എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d 3) വാക്കുകളും ചിട്ടയും തമ്മില്\u200d കലര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വെക്ടറുകളും വാക്കുകളും ലേബിലേറ്റ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന RNN ചൈനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മൂന്നു പ്രൊദ് It is interesting to note that the simplest RNN encoder, i.e., Mixed RNN encoder yields the best performance with an significant improvement of 1.4 BLEU points.  അതുകൊണ്ടും, കുറച്ചു ദൃഷ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ആഴങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു അന്വേഷണം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. സോര്\u200dസ് സിന്\u200dടാക്സ് എങ്ങന', 'no': 'Selv om eit språkstisk fri sekvens for å sekvensera modell i neuralmaskinsomsetjinga (NMT) har ein viss kapasitet for å lære syntaksisk informasjon om kjeldesetningar implisitt, viser denne papiret at kjeldesyntaksen kan eksplisisk inkluderast i NMT effektivt for å gjera fleire forbedringar. Vi lineariserer tolking av kjeldesetningar for å få strukturelle merkelappesekvens. På grunnleggjande foreslår vi tre ulike sorter kodar for å inkludere kjeldesyntaks i NMT: 1) Parallel RNN-kodar som lærer ordet og merkelappevektorar parallellt; og 2) Hierarisk RNN-kodar som lærer ordet og merkelappevektorar i ein to nivå-hierarki; Og 3) Miska RNN-kodar som lærer ordet og merkelappevektorar på rekkjefølgjer der ord og merkelapper er blanda. Eksperiment om omsetjinga frå kinesisk til engelsk viser at alle tre foreslåde syntaksiske kodingar kan forbetra omsetjingskodekritet. Det er interessant å merke på at den enkleste RNN-koderen, t.d. Mixed RNN-koderen gjer det best e utviklinga med ein signifikant forbedring av 1,4 BLEU-punkt. I tillegg er det tilgjengeleg ein i dybde analyse frå fleire perspektiv for å oppdaga korleis kjeldesyntaks brukar NMT.', 'pl': 'Chociaż model sekwencji do sekwencji wolny od językowości w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym (NMT) posiada pewną zdolność do domyślnego uczenia się informacji składni zdań źródłowych, niniejszy artykuł pokazuje, że składnia źródłowa może być wyraźnie włączona do NMT w celu zapewnienia dalszych ulepszeń. W szczególności linearyzujemy drzewa parsowania zdań źródłowych, aby uzyskać strukturalne sekwencje etykiet. Na podstawie proponujemy trzy różne rodzaje koderów do włączenia składni źródłowej do NMT: 1) Równoległy koder RNN, który uczy się wektorów adnotacji słowa i etykiet równolegle; 2) Hierarchiczny koder RNN, który uczy się wektorów adnotacji słowa i etykiet w hierarchii dwupoziomowej; i 3) Mieszany koder RNN, który szywo uczy się wektorów adnotacji słowa i etykiet na sekwencjach, w których słowa i etykiety są mieszane. Eksperymenty na tłumaczeniu chińsko-angielskim pokazują, że wszystkie trzy proponowane kodery składni są w stanie poprawić dokładność tłumaczenia. Warto zauważyć, że najprostszy koder RNN, tj. koder mieszany RNN daje najlepszą wydajność przy znacznej poprawie punktów 1.4 BLEU. Ponadto przeprowadzono dogłębną analizę z kilku perspektyw, aby ujawnić, jak składnia źródła korzysta z NMT.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm sekwenza ħielsa mil-lingwistika għall-mudell tas-sekwenza fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) għandha ċerta kapaċità ta’ tagħlim impliċitu ta’ informazzjoni sintattika tas-sentenzi tas-sors, dan id-dokument juri li s-sintaks tas-sors jista’ jiġi inkorporat b’mod espliċitu fl-NMT b’mod effettiv biex jipprovdi aktar titjib. Speċifikament, nillinjalizzaw is-siġar tal-analiżi tas-sentenzi tas-sors biex inkisbu sekwenzi tat-tikketta strutturali. Fuq il-bażi, nipproponu tliet tipi differenti ta’ kodifikaturi biex tinkorpora s-sintaks tas-sors fl-NMT: 1) Kodifikatur parallel tal-RNN li jitgħallem il-vetturi tal-annotazzjoni tal-kliem u t-tikketta b’mod parallel; 2) Kodifikatur tal-RNN ġerarkiku li jitgħallem vetturi tal-annotazzjoni tal-kliem u t-tikketta f’ġerarkija ta’ żewġ livelli; u 3) Kodifikatur ta’ RNN imħallat li jitgħallem bil-labra l-vetturi tal-annotazzjoni tal-kliem u t-tikketta fuq sekwenzi fejn il-kliem u t-tikketti jitħalltu. L-esperimentazzjoni dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniża-Ingliża turi li t-tliet kodifikaturi sintetiċi proposti kollha jistgħu jtejbu l-preċiżjoni tat-traduzzjoni. Huwa interessanti li wieħed jinnota li l-aktar kodifikatur sempliċi tal-RNN, jiġifieri kodifikatur imħallat tal-RNN jagħti l-aħjar prestazzjoni b’titjib sinifikanti ta’ 1.4 punti BLEU. Barra minn hekk, hija pprovduta analiżi fil-fond minn diversi perspettivi biex tiżvela kif is-sintaks tas-sors jibbenefika lill-NMT.', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө дамжуулалтын загварын дарааллаар хэлбэргүй хэлний дарааллаар (NMT) эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрийн синтактик мэдээллийг сурах боломжтой байдаг ч энэ цаасан нь эх үүсвэрийн синтаксис NMT-д илүү сайжруулах боломжтой болно гэдгийг Ялангуяа бид бүтцийн тэмдэгтийн дарааллыг олж авахын тулд эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрүүдийн модыг шугамнаар хуваалцаж байна. Үнэндээ бид эх үүсвэрийн синтаксисийг NMT-д орлуулахын тулд 3 өөр төрлийн коддогч нарийвчлан санал болгож байна: 1) Бараллал RNN коддогч нь үг болон тэмдэглэх векторуудыг параллель ойлгох болно. 2) Хоёр төвшин диархины хэмжээнд үг болон захирах векторуудыг суралцаж байгаа Hierarchical RNN кодер; 3) Дэлхийн холбоотой RNN коддогч нь үг болон тэмдэглэгүүдийн холбоотой дарааллаар үг болон тэмдэглэгүүдийг сурдаг. Хятад болон Англи хэлний орчуулалтын туршилт нь 3 санал өгсөн синтактик кодерууд нь орчуулалтын зөв байдлыг сайжруулж чадна. Хамгийн энгийн RNN коддогч, яг л холбогдсон RNN коддогч нь 1.4 БЛЕС цэгүүдийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэх нь хамгийн сонирхолтой. Үүнээс гадна хэдэн асуудлын гүн гүнзгий шинжилгээ нь NMT-ийн эх үүсвэрийн синтаксис хэрхэн ашигтай вэ гэдгийг харуулахад хангалттай байна.', 'ro': 'Chiar dacă un model secvență la secvență fără lingvistică în traducerea automată neurală (NMT) are o anumită capacitate de a învăța implicit informații sintactice ale propozițiilor sursă, această lucrare arată că sintaxa sursă poate fi încorporată în mod explicit în NMT pentru a oferi îmbunătățiri suplimentare. Mai exact, linearizăm arborii de parsare a propozițiilor sursă pentru a obține secvențe structurale de etichete. Pe bază, propunem trei tipuri diferite de codificatoare pentru a încorpora sintaxa sursă în NMT: 1) Encoder RNN paralel care învață vectorii de adnotare de cuvinte și etichete paralel; 2) Encoder RNN ierarhic care învață vectorii de adnotare a cuvintelor și etichetelor într-o ierarhie pe două niveluri; și 3) Encoder RNN mixt care învață cu cusătură vectorii de adnotare a cuvintelor și etichetelor peste secvențe în care cuvintele și etichetele sunt amestecate. Experimentarea traducerii din chineză în engleză demonstrează că toate cele trei codificatoare sintactice propuse sunt capabile să îmbunătățească acuratețea traducerii. Este interesant de remarcat faptul că cel mai simplu encoder RNN, adică encoder RNN mixt oferă cea mai bună performanță cu o îmbunătățire semnificativă de 1,4 puncte BLEU. Mai mult decât atât, o analiză aprofundată din mai multe perspective este furnizată pentru a dezvălui modul în care sintaxa sursă beneficiază NMT.', 'so': 'Inkastoo muusikada koorsiga neurada (NMT) uu haysto awoodo cayiman oo uu ku baran karo macluumaadka koowaad ee fursadaha sourceedka, warqaddaas wuxuu muujin karaa in cashuurta kaarka sourceedka si cad looga soo koobi karo NMT si uu u faa’iido badan u sameeyo hagaajinta. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku qornaa geedaha kaniisadda ee xukunka sourceedka si aan u helno nidaamka dhismaha. Sida lagu saleynayo, waxaan sadex noocyo oo kala duduwan oo codsiga ah u soo jeedaynaa in loo soo geliyo cashuurta kaarista sourceed ee NMT: 1) kooxda barxadda RNN ee baranaya hadal iyo qalabka wargelinta si siman ah; 2) Qoidaha RNN ee hierarchical RNN oo baranaya hadal and label annotation vector in ay laba-level hierarchy tahay; 3) Qoidaha RNN ee isku qasan, kaas oo si qalabka ah u barta hadal iyo alaabta wax lagu caddeeyo oo ku qoran xilliyada ay ku leeyihiin hadal iyo calaamado. Baaritaanka turjumista Shiino-to-Ingiriis waxay muujiyaan in saddexda qoraal ee la soo jeeday ay oo dhammu ay awoodi karaan inay kordhisaan saxda turjumaadda. Waxaa xiiso inaad taxadid in qodeynta ugu fudud e e RNN, tusaale ahaan koodeynta Mixed RNN waxay bixisaa shaqo ugu wanaagsan oo hagaajinta 1.4 barta BLEU. Markaas waxaa sidoo kale lagu sameeyaa baaritaanka hoose u dheer oo ka mid ah aragtida qaarkood, si uu u muujiyo sida kaalmada kaalmada cashuurta ee sourceedu ay NMT u leedahay.', 'sr': 'Iako sekvencija bez lingvistike za sekvenciju model a u prevodu neuralnih mašina (NMT) ima određenu mogućnost implicitno učenja sintaktičnih informacija izvornih rečenica, ovaj papir pokazuje da izvorni sintaks može biti jasno uključen u NMT kako bi se pružio daljnje poboljšanje. Posebno, lineariziramo drveće izvornih rečenica da bi dobili strukturne sekvence etiketa. Na osnovu toga, predlažemo tri različite vrste kodera da uključimo izvornu sintaksu u NMT: 1) Paralelni koder RNN koji paralelno nauči reči i etiketne vekore za annotaciju; 2) hijerarhički koder RNN koji nauči vektore oznake riječi i oznake u hijerarhiji dva nivoa; i 3) Mixed RNN encoder koji šišavajući uči vektore riječi i etikete annotacije po sekvencijama gde su reči i etikete miješane. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog na engleskom jeziku pokazuje da su svi tri predložena sintaktička kodera u stanju poboljšati preciznost prevoda. Zanimljivo je primijetiti da najjednostavniji RNN koder, tj. Mixed RNN koder, daje najbolji izvor sa značajnim poboljšanjem od 1,4 BLEU bodova. Osim toga, pruža se duboka analiza iz nekoliko perspektiva kako bi otkrila kako izvorni sintaks koristi NMT.', 'si': 'නමුත් භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක නිදහස් ක්\u200dරමයක් නිර්මාණ පද්ධති පද්ධති පද්ධතිය (NMT) වලින් පද්ධති පද්ධති පද්ධතියේ සංවිධාන තොරතුරු ඉගෙන ගන්න සක්ෂමත්  විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ වර්ගයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ස්ථානය ලේබල් පරීක්ෂණය අධාරණයෙන්, අපි වෙනස් වර්ගයක් සංකේතකය තුනක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා NMT: 1) සමාන්\u200dය RNN සංකේතකය සහ ලෙබෙක්ටර් වෙක්ටර් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට 2) ශ්\u200dරේෂ්\u200dය RNN සංකේතකයෙන් වචන සහ ලෙබෙක්ටර් වෙක්ටර්ස් දෙකක් ස්තූතියේ ඉගෙන ගන්න; 3) විශාල RNN සංකේතකයෙන් සිටිචින්ලික් වචන සහ ලේබල් වෙක්ටර්ස් විශාල වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට පරිස්සම් කරනවා කියලා. චීනියාවට ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාවට පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සංවේදනය කරපු තුනක් සංවේදනය කරන්න පුළ ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය RNN කෝඩාර් එකක්, ඉතින්, මික්ස් RNN කෝඩාර් එකක් හොඳම ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ලැබෙනවා කියලා බලන්න. එතකොට, විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් අනුවෙන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට NMT වලට කොහොමද ප්\u200dරභාව විස්තර', 'sv': 'Även om en språkfri sekvens till sekvensmodell i neural maskinöversättning (NMT) har viss förmåga att implicit lära sig syntaktisk information om källmeningar, visar denna uppsats att källsyntax uttryckligen kan införlivas i NMT effektivt för att ge ytterligare förbättringar. Specifikt linjäriserar vi parseträd av källmeningar för att få strukturella etikettsekvenser. På grundval av detta föreslår vi tre olika typer av kodare för att införliva källsyntax i NMT: 1) Parallell RNN encoder som lär ord och etikett annotation vektorer parallellt; 2) Hierarkisk RNN-kodare som lär sig ord- och etikettannotationsvektorer i en hierarki på två nivåer; och 3) Mixed RNN encoder som sömlöst lär ord och etikett annotation vektorer över sekvenser där ord och etiketter blandas. Experiment med kinesisk-engelsk översättning visar att alla tre föreslagna syntaktiska kodare kan förbättra översättningens noggrannhet. Det är intressant att notera att den enklaste RNN-kodaren, dvs. Mixed RNN-kodaren ger bästa prestanda med en signifikant förbättring av 1,4 BLEU-punkter. Dessutom ges en djupgående analys ur flera perspektiv för att avslöja hur källsyntax gynnar NMT.', 'ta': 'Even though a linguistics-free sequence to sequence model in neural machine translation (NMT) has certain capability of implicitly learning syntactic information of source sentences, this paper shows that source syntax can be explicitly incorporated into NMT effectively to provide further improvements.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் மூல வாக்கியங்களின் பகுதி மரங்களை வரிசைப்படுத்துகிறோம் கட்டுப்பாட்டு விளக்கச் ச அடிப்படையில் நாம் மூன்று வித்தியாசமான குறியீடுகளை NMT-ல் சேர்க்க முடியும் மூல ஒத்திசைவு வரிசையாக்கம் சேர்க்க ஆர்என்ன் குறியீட 2) இரண்டு மட்டத்தில் உள்ள விளக்கச்சீட்டு வெக்டார்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் சொல்லையும் விளக்கச் செய்யும் ஆர்என்ன 3) வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் சிட்டைகள் கலப்படும் வரிசைகளில் சொல்லை மற்றும் விளக்கச்சீட்டு வெக்டார்கள் கற்று கொள்ளும் கலக்கப் Name எளிதான RNN குறியீடு, அதாவது, கலக்கப்பட்ட RNN குறியீட்டு 1.4 பிலியு புள்ளிகளின் முன்னேற்றத்தை கொண்டு சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டை கொடுக்கும்  மேலும், மூல ஒத்திசைவு NMT எவ்வாறு பயன்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு ஆழமான ஆய்வு பல பார்வைகளில', 'ur': 'اگرچہ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) میں ایک نمڈل کے ذریعہ سینٹکتیک سینٹکتیک سینٹکتیک سینٹکتیک معلومات کے قابل ہے، اس کاغذ کو دکھاتا ہے کہ سورج سینٹکس NMT میں اضافہ طور پر اضافہ کے ساتھ اضافہ کر سکتا ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم منزل جماعتوں کے درختوں کو پارس کر رہے ہیں جو ساخترال لیبل سطح حاصل کریں۔ بنیاد پر، ہم تین مختلف قسم کا انکوڈر پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ سورج سینٹکس NMT میں شامل کریں: 1) پارالی رن کا انکوڈر جو کلمات اور لیبل آنٹ ویکتروں کو مشابہ طور پر سکھاتا ہے۔ 2) ہیر لیارشیک RNN کوڈر جو کلمات اور لیبل انٹوریٹ ویکتروں کو دو سطح حیرارشی میں سکھاتا ہے۔ اور 3) پیدا ہوا RNN کوڈر جو کلمات اور لیبل ویکتروں کو سیکھاتا ہے جہاں کلمات اور لیبل ملحق ہوتے ہیں۔ چین سے انگلیسی ترجمہ پر تجربہ دکھاتا ہے کہ تمام تین پیغمبروں کی سینٹکتیک کوڈروں کو ترجمہ دقیقیت کے ساتھ بہتر کر سکتے ہیں. یہ مشورہ ہے کہ سب سے ساده RNN کوڈر، یعنی ملحق RNN کوڈر 1.4 BLEU پوینٹوں کی بہترین فعالیت کے ساتھ اچھی فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، بہت سی نظریوں سے ایک عمیق تحلیل ہے کہ بتائے جاتے ہیں کہ سورج سینٹکس NMT کو کس طرح فائدہ دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Ingawa neyrolik tarjima modelida tarjima qilish uchun lingvistik boʻsh tarjima (NMT) maʼlumotini aniqlash imkoniyatini aniqlashga ega boʻlishi mumkin. Bu takarda manba syntaktika qoʻllaniladi. @ info Asosida, biz NMT'ga uch turli kodlash kodlash usulini yangi manba syntax (1) kodlash uchun parallel RNN kodlash usulini o'rganadigan so'z va yorliq taʼminlovchi vektorlarini o'rganadi; 2) Ikki darajadagi soʻz va yorliq taʼminlovchi vektorlarni oʻrganish uchun eng yuqori RNN kodlash kodvali; Name Name It is interesting to note that the simplest RNN encoder, i.e., Mixed RNN encoder yields the best performance with an significant improvement of 1.4 BLEU points.  Ko'proq, bir nechta qo'shimcha analyzerni NMT qanday foydalanishini koʻrsatish uchun koʻrsatiladi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù một chuỗi ngôn ngữ tự do để phân tích mô hình trong phiên dịch máy thần kinh (NMB) có một số khả năng ngầm học được các thông tin cấu hình pháp thuật của các câu từ, tờ giấy này cho thấy rằng cú pháp từ nguồn có thể được trực tiếp nhập vào công ty NMT để cải tiến thêm. Cụ thể, chúng ta sẽ phân tích các cây câu cung cấp để đạt được các dãy hiệu cấu trúc. Trên cơ sở, chúng tôi đề xuất ba loại mã hóa khác nhau để nhập nhập độc nguồn vào công ty NMT: 1) mã hóa RNN song song song học cùng với các Hệ thống hóa ghi chú từ và nhãn hiệu. 2) Bộ mã hóa ARN leo trèo học các sinh tố ghi chú bằng từ và nhãn theo một mức độ hai cấp; và ba) Hộp mã số RNN hoà hợp có thể lấy được từ và nhãn ký hiệu hoá trên các chuỗi nơi chữ và nhãn được trộn lẫn. Thí nghiệm dịch từ Trung Quốc sang Anh cho thấy ba hộp mã hóa cú pháp đề xuất có thể cải thiện độ chính xác dịch. Thật thú vị khi thấy rằng hộp mã hóa RNN đơn giản nhất, tức là hộp mã số RNN hoà hợp sẽ hiệu quả tốt nhất với một sự cải tiến đáng kể của một đi ểm 1.4 tiếng bíp. Hơn nữa, một cuộc phân tích sâu sắc từ nhiều khía cạnh được cung cấp để tìm ra cách nào mà cú pháp gốc có lợi cho NMB.', 'hr': 'Iako sekvencija bez jezika za sekvenciju model a u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT) ima određenu mogućnost implicitno učenja sintaktičnih informacija izvornih rečenica, ovaj papir pokazuje da izvorni sintaks može biti učinkovito uključen u NMT kako bi se pružio daljnje poboljšanje. Posebno, lineariziramo drveće izvornih rečenica kako bi dobili strukturne sekvence oznake. Na osnovu toga, predlažemo tri različite vrste kodera da uključimo izvornu sintaksu u NMT: 1) Parallelni koder RNN-a koji paralelno uči vektore oznake riječi i etikete; 2) hijerarhički koder RNN-a koji uči vektore oznake riječi i oznake u hijerarhiji dva nivoa; i 3) Mixed RNN koder koji šišinski uči vektore riječi i označavanja označavanja po sekvencijama u kojima se riječi i etikete miješaju. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuje da su svi tri predložena sintaktička kodera u stanju poboljšati preciznost prevoda. Zanimljivo je primijetiti da najjednostavniji RNN koder, tj. Mixed RNN koder, daje najbolji učinkoviti s značajnim poboljšanjem bodova BLEU-a od 1,4. Osim toga, pruža se duboka analiza iz nekoliko perspektiva kako bi otkrila kako izvorni sintaks koristi NMT-u.', 'nl': 'Hoewel een taalkundig vrij sequence to sequence model in neural machine translation (NMT) bepaalde mogelijkheden heeft om impliciet syntactische informatie van bronzinnen te leren, toont dit artikel aan dat bronsyntaxis expliciet kan worden opgenomen in NMT effectief om verdere verbeteringen te bieden. Specifiek lineariseren we parse bomen van bronzinnen om structurele labelsequenties te verkrijgen. Op basis daarvan stellen we drie verschillende soorten encoders voor om bronsyntaxis in NMT op te nemen: 1) Parallele RNN encoder die woord- en labelannotatievectoren parallel leert; 2) Hierarchische RNN-encoder die woord- en label annotatievectoren leert in een hiërarchie op twee niveaus; en 3) Gemengde RNN encoder die steekend leert woord en label annotatievectoren over sequenties waar woorden en labels worden gemengd. Experimenten met Chinees-naar-Engels vertaling tonen aan dat alle drie voorgestelde syntactische encoders de vertaalnauwkeurigheid kunnen verbeteren. Het is interessant om op te merken dat de eenvoudigste RNN encoder, d.w.z. Mixed RNN encoder de beste prestaties levert met een significante verbetering van 1.4 BLEU punten. Bovendien wordt een diepgaande analyse vanuit verschillende perspectieven gegeven om aan te tonen hoe bronsyntaxis NMT ten goede komt.', 'da': 'Selvom en lingvistisk sekvens til sekvens model i neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) har en vis evne til implicit at lære syntaktisk information om kildesætninger, viser denne artikel, at kildesyntaksen udtrykkeligt kan indarbejdes i NMT effektivt for at give yderligere forbedringer. Specielt lineariserer vi parsetræer af kildesætninger for at opnå strukturelle labelsekvenser. På grundlag af dette foreslår vi tre forskellige former for encodere til at indarbejde kildesyntaks i NMT: 1) Parallel RNN encoder, der lærer ord og etiket annotation vektorer parallelt; 2) Hierarkisk RNN encoder, der lærer ord og etiket annotation vektorer i et to-niveau hierarki; og 3) Blandet RNN encoder, der synkende lærer ord og etiket annotation vektorer over sekvenser, hvor ord og etiketter er blandet. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-til-engelsk oversættelse viser, at alle de tre foreslåede syntaktiske kodere er i stand til at forbedre oversættelsesnøjagtigheden. Det er interessant at bemærke, at den enkleste RNN encoder, dvs. Mixed RNN encoder giver den bedste ydelse med en betydelig forbedring på 1,4 BLEU point. Desuden leveres en dybdegående analyse fra flere perspektiver for at afsløre, hvordan kildesyntaks gavner NMT.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че моделът на последователност към последователност без лингвистика в невронния машинен превод (НМТ) има известна способност да изучава имплицитно синтактична информация за изреченията, тази статия показва, че синтаксисът на източника може изрично да бъде включен в НМТ ефективно, за да осигури допълнителни подобрения. По-конкретно линейно анализираме дърветата на изходните изречения, за да получим структурни последователности на етикетите. Въз основа на това предлагаме три различни вида кодери за включване на синтаксиса на източника в Паралелен кодер, който успоредно научава вектори на анотация на думи и етикети; 2) Йерархичен кодер, който изучава вектори на анотация на думи и етикети в йерархична йерархия на две нива; и 3) Смесен кодер, който изучава вектори за анотация на думи и етикети върху последователности, където думи и етикети се смесват. Експериментите с китайско-английски превод показват, че и трите предложени синтактични кодера са в състояние да подобрят точността на превода. Интересно е да се отбележи, че най-простият кодер, т.е. смесеният кодер дава най-добра производителност със значително подобрение от 1.4 точки. Освен това е направен задълбочен анализ от няколко гледни точки, за да се разкрие как синтаксисът на източника облагодетелства НМТ.', 'de': 'Obwohl ein linguistisch-freies Sequenzmodell in neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung (NMT) bestimmte Fähigkeiten besitzt, syntaktische Informationen von Quellsätzen implizit zu lernen, zeigt diese Arbeit, dass Quellsyntax explizit in NMT integriert werden kann, um weitere Verbesserungen zu erzielen. Insbesondere linearisieren wir Parse-Bäume von Quellsätzen, um strukturelle Label-Sequenzen zu erhalten. Basierend auf dieser Basis schlagen wir drei verschiedene Arten von Encodern vor, um Quellsyntax in NMT zu integrieren: 1) Paralleler RNN Encoder, der Wort- und Beschriftungsvektoren parallel lernt; 2) Hierarchischer RNN-Encoder, der Wort- und Beschriftungsvektoren in einer zweistufigen Hierarchie lernt; und 3) Mixed RNN Encoder, der Wort- und Label-Annotationsvektoren über Sequenzen lernt, in denen Wörter und Beschriftungen gemischt werden. Experimente an der Chinesisch-Englisch-Übersetzung zeigen, dass alle drei vorgeschlagenen syntaktischen Encoder in der Lage sind, die Übersetzungsgenauigkeit zu verbessern. Es ist interessant festzustellen, dass der einfachste RNN-Encoder, d.h. Mixed RNN-Encoder, die beste Leistung mit einer signifikanten Verbesserung von 1.4 BLEU-Punkten liefert. Darüber hinaus wird eine eingehende Analyse aus mehreren Perspektiven angeboten, um zu zeigen, wie die Quellsyntax NMT profitiert.', 'id': 'Meskipun urutan bebas bahasa untuk urutan model dalam terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) memiliki kemampuan tertentu untuk mempelajari informasi sintaks dari kalimat sumber secara implicit, kertas ini menunjukkan bahwa sintaks sumber dapat secara eksplicit ditemukan ke NMT secara efektif untuk menyediakan perkembangan lanjut. Secara spesifik, kita linearisasi pemeriksaan pohon dari kalimat sumber untuk mendapatkan urutan label struktur. Pada dasarnya, kami mengusulkan tiga jenis pengekode yang berbeda untuk memasukkan sintaks sumber ke NMT: 1) pengekode RNN paralel yang belajar vektor anotasi kata dan label secara paralel; 2) Pengenkodar RNN Hierarkis yang mempelajari vektor anotasi kata dan label dalam hierarki dua tingkat; dan 3) Pengkode RNN campuran yang menggosok belajar vektor anotasi kata dan label melalui urutan di mana kata dan label campuran. Eksperimen dalam terjemahan bahasa Cina-Inggris menunjukkan bahwa semua tiga koder sintaksi yang diusulkan mampu meningkatkan akurasi terjemahan. Menarik untuk memperhatikan bahwa koder RNN paling sederhana, i.e., koder RNN campuran menghasilkan prestasi terbaik dengan peningkatan signifikan dari 1,4 poin BLEU. Moreover, an in-depth analysis from several perspectives is provided to reveal how source syntax benefits NMT.', 'ko': '비록 신경기계번역(NMT) 중의 비언어학 서열에서 서열모델까지는 일정한 은식 학습 원문 문법 정보를 가진 능력이 있지만 본고는 원문 문법이 NMT에 현저하게 병합되어 진일보한 개선을 제공할 수 있음을 나타낸다.구체적으로 말하면, 우리는 구조 라벨 서열을 얻기 위해 원본 문장의 해석 트리를 선형화할 것이다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 세 가지 다른 인코더를 제기하여 원본 문법을 NMT에 통합시켰다. 1) 병행 RNN 인코더, 병행 학습 단어와 라벨 주석 벡터.2) 층별 RNN 인코더로 단어와 라벨 주석 벡터를 2단계에서 학습한다.3) RNN 인코더를 혼합하여 단어와 라벨이 혼합된 서열에 학습 단어와 라벨 주석 벡터를 결합시킨다.한영 번역 실험에 의하면 세 가지 문법 인코더는 모두 번역 정밀도를 높일 수 있다.흥미로운 것은 가장 간단한 RNN 인코더(즉 혼합 RNN 인코더)의 성능이 가장 좋아 1.4개의 BLEU 포인트가 현저히 높아졌다는 점이다.그 밖에 본고는 여러 측면에서 깊이 있게 분석함으로써 원본 문법이 NMT에 대한 장점을 제시했다.', 'fa': 'اگرچه یک دستور آزاد زبان\u200cشناسی برای ترجمه مدل در ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای عصبی (NMT) قادر به یادگیری اطلاعات سنتاکتیک از جمله\u200cهای منبع دارد، این کاغذ نشان می\u200cدهد که سنتاکس منبع می\u200cتواند به طور کاملاً در NMT شامل شود تا بهترین بیشتری را پیشنهاد کند. به طور خاصی، ما درخت\u200cها از جمله\u200cهای منبع را برای گرفتن رده\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای ساختاری خط\u200cبندی می\u200cکنیم. بر اساس آن، ما سه نوع متفاوت رمز\u200cکننده را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا سنتاکس منبع را در NMT: ۱) رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی RNN پارالی که ویکتورهای نوشته\u200cکننده\u200cی کلمه و نقاشی را متفاوت یاد می\u200cگیرد; (۲) رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی RNN هیئراریکی که ویکتورهای نوشته\u200cهای کلمه و نقاشی را در یک سطح دو سطح یاد می\u200cگیرد; و و ۳) رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی RNN پیچیده\u200cای که با تنظیم کلمه\u200cها و برچسب\u200cها را بر روی برچسب\u200cها یاد می\u200cگیرد که کلمه\u200cها و برچسب\u200cها پیچیده می\u200cشوند. تجربه\u200cی ترجمه\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد که تمام سه\u200cتا رمزگذارنده\u200cهای سنتاکتیک قادر به دقیق ترجمه\u200cی ترجمه\u200cها باشند. جالب است که یادآوری کنید که ساده ترین رمز\u200cکننده RNN، یعنی رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی RNN مختلف، بهترین عملکرد را با توسعه\u200cی بهترین نقطه\u200cهای ۱.۴ BLEU می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، یک تحلیل عمیق از چندین نگاهی به نشان داده می شود که چگونه سنتاکس منبع به NMT سود می دهد.', 'sw': 'Hata kama mfululizo wa lugha usio na lugha wa mfululizo wa mfululizo katika tafsiri ya mashine ya neura (NMT) una uwezo wa uwezo wa kutoa taarifa za ushirikiano wa habari za sentensi za vyanzo, gazeti hili linaonyesha kuwa kodi la vyanzo vinaweza kuingizwa kwa uwazi katika NMT kwa ufanisi wa kutoa maendeleo zaidi. Kwa ujumla, tunatengeneza miti ya parse ya hukumu za vyanzo ili kupata mfululizo wa alama ya ujenzi. Kwa msingi, tunapendekeza aina tatu tofauti ya kodi za aina hii ili kuingiza kodi ya vyanzo vya habari katika mfumo wa NMT: 1) kodi ya Parallel RNN ambayo inajifunza neno na vectors za uchunguzi kwa usawa uliofanana; 2) Kodi kubwa la RNN ambalo linajifunza maneno na mabadiliko katika ukurasa wa ngazi mbili; na 3) Shirika la RNN linalochanganyika ambalo kwa ujumla hujifunza maneno na barabara za kutangaza kwa namna ambapo maneno na mabango yanachanganyika. Tafiti kuhusu tafsiri ya Kichina-kwa-Kiingereza inaonyesha kuwa kodi zote tatu zilizopendekezwa za ushirikiano wanaweza kuboresha uhakika wa tafsiri. Inafurahisha kuona kuwa kodi rahisi zaidi ya RNN, yaani, kodi ya Mixed RNN inaleta ufanisi bora zaidi na kuboreshwa kwa pointi 1.4 BLEU. Zaidi ya hayo, uchambuzi wa kina kutoka kwa mtazamo kadhaa unapatikana kuonyesha jinsi kodi ya vyanzo vinavyofaidia NMT.', 'tr': "Dillerden boş bir terjime näyral maşynyň terjime edilmesinde (NMT) köpüsi sözleriň sintaktik maglumatyny öwretmek üçin belli bir şekilde, bu kagyz köpüsi sintaksy NMT'a daşary ýagdaýlaşdyrylmagy mümkin edip biler. Biz çykyş şeklinde, çeşme sözleriň agaçlaryny struktur etiket dizirlerini almak üçin çizginiň görkezilişi. Basit olarak, NMT'e kaynak sintaksi dahil etmek için üç farklı tür kodlayıcı teklif ediyoruz: 1) Parallel RNN kodlayıcısı kelime ve etiket duyurun vektörleri parallelel olarak öğrenmek için; 2) Bir iki seviyede hiyerarşinde söz we etiket a ňlama vektörlerini öwrenýän hiyerarşik RNN ködleme; Ve 3) Karışık RNN kodlayıcısı kelime ve etiket vektörlerinin karışık dizilerinde öğrenir. Çinçe-we Iňlisçe terjime hakyndaky örnek görkezýär. Bu üç teklip eden sintaktik ködleriň dogrylygyny gowurap biljekdigini görkezýär. Adynyň esasy RNN ködlemeleri diýmek gyzykly bolýar, diýmek bolsa, Karışmış RNN ködlemeleri 1.4 BLEU noktalaryň gowuralygy bilen gowurak gazandyrýar. Mundan soňra, birnäçe perspektyň derinliklerinden çykyş analyzasy NMT'iň çeşme sintaksy nähili gowy gazanýandygyny görkezmek üçin berilýär.", 'af': "Selfs al het 'n lingwisiese-vry volgorde om sekwensiemodel in neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) sekere kapasiteit van inplisite sintaktieke inligting van bron setings te leer, hierdie papier vertoon dat bron sintaks kan uitsondelik in NMT effektief inkorpreer word om verdere verbeteringe te verskaf. Spesifieke, ons lineariseer verwerking bome van bron setnings om strukturele etiket sekwensies te kry. Op die basis, voorstel ons drie verskillende soorte enkoderers om bron sintaks in NMT: 1) Parallele RNN-enkoder te inkorpreer wat word en etiket annotasie vektore parallelies leer; 2) Hierarchical RNN-enkoder wat leer woord en etiket annotasie vektore in 'n twee vlak hierarkie; en 3) Gegemengde RNN-enkoder wat sterk leer woord en etiket annotasie vektore oor volgorde waar woorde en etikette gemengde is. Eksperimentasie oor Sjinese-na-Engelse vertaling bevestig dat al die drie voorgestelde sintaktiske koders kan verbeter vertalingspresies. Dit is interessant om te merk dat die eenvoudige RNN-enkoder, i.e. gemengde RNN-enkoder die beste prestasie met 'n betekende verbetering van 1.4 BLEU punte gee. Daarop is 'n in-diepte analisie van verskeie perspeksies verskaf om te vertel hoe bron sintaks NMT voordeel.", 'sq': 'Edhe pse një sekuencë pa gjuhë për model in e sekuencës në përkthimin e makinave nervore (NMT) ka një aftësi të caktuar për mësimin implicit të informacionit sintaktik të fjalëve burimore, kjo letër tregon se sintaksi burimi mund të përfshihet eksplicitalisht në NMT efektivisht për të ofruar përmirësime të mëtejshme. Veçanërisht, ne linearizojmë pemët e analizimit të fjalëve burimi për të marrë sekuenca strukturore të etiketave. On the basis, we propose three different sorts of encoders to incorporate source syntax into NMT: 1) Parallel RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors parallelly;  2) Koduesi hierarkik RNN që mëson vektorët e anotacionit në një hierarki dy niveli; dhe 3) koduesi i përzier RNN që mëson me shkrirje fjalë dhe etiketon vektorët e anotacionit mbi sekuencat ku fjalët dhe etiketat janë përzier. Eksperimentimi mbi përkthimin kinez-anglez demonstron se të tre koduesit sintaktikë të propozuar janë në gjendje të përmirësojnë saktësinë e përkthimit. Është interesante të vëmë në dukje se koduesi më i thjeshtë RNN, i.e., koduesi i përzier RNN jep performancën më të mirë me një përmirësim të rëndësishëm prej 1.4 pikësh BLEU. Përveç kësaj, jepet një analizë e thellë nga disa perspektiva për të zbuluar se si sintaksi i burimit përfiton NMT.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን የቋንቋው ነጻ-ነጻ ዓይነት በናውሬል መሳሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) የዓይነቶች መረጃዎችን በማስተማር የሚችል ቢኖር እንኳን የዓይነቱ ቋንቋ-ነጻ ክፍል የኩነቶች ክፍሎች ማስተማር የሚችል እርግጠኛ ችሎታ አለበት፡፡ በተለያይነት የአሁኑን የኩነቶች ክፍሎች ለማግኘት የግንኙነት ምልክት ግንኙነትን እናቆራርጣለን፡፡ በመሠረት ላይ፣ የኢንተርኔት ዓይነት እና የኢንተርኔት የኢንተርኔት የኢንተርኔት መስኮትን ለመቀበል ሦስት ልዩ ዓይነት የኮድ አካባቢዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡ 2) በሁለት ደረጃ ውስጥ ቃላት እና የlabel ማስታወቂያ vectors የሚያስተምር RNN የኮድ ኮድ፦ እና (3) ቃላት እና ምልክቶች በተለየ ቁጥጥር ላይ ቃልን እና የlabel ማስታወቂያ vectors በሚያስተምሩ የRNN ኮድ በቻይና-ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ላይ ፈተና የሚያስታውቀው ሦስቱ የተዘጋጀው የስንተርናዊ ኮድ ሁሉ ትርጉም እርግጠኛ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ቀላል RNN የኮድ ኮድ (ቀላል RNN የኮድ ኮድ) በአውቀት 1.4 BLEU ነጥቦች የበለጠ ጥናት እንዲያሳርፍ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ደግሞ ከጥቂት ዓይነቶች የጥልቅ አስተያየት የኩነቶች ሲንካስብ NMT እንዴት እንደሚጠቅመው ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Չնայած, որ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելի անլեզվաբանական հաջորդականությունը (NMT) ունի որոշ հնարավորություններ անխուսափելի սովորելու սինտակտիկ տեղեկություն աղբյուր նախադասությունների մասին, այս թղթին ցույց է տալիս, որ աղբյուր սինտաքսը հնարավոր է բացատր Մասնավորապես, մենք գծային ենք վերլուծում աղբյուր նախադասությունների ծառերը, որպեսզի ստանանք կառուցվածքային պիտակների հաջորդականություններ: Հիմնականում, մենք առաջարկում ենք երեք տարբեր տեսակի կոդավորներ, որպեսզի ներառենք աղբյուրի սինտաքսը ՆՄԹ-ի մեջ. 1) զուգահեռ ՌՆԹ կոդավորը, որը միաժամանակ սովորում է բառեր և պիտակ նոտացիոն վեկտորներ: 2) Հիերարխիկ ՌՆԹ-ի կոդավորիչը, որը սովորում է բառեր և նշում նշումների վեկտորներ երկու մակարդակի հիերարխիայում: և 3) Միքսված ՌՆԹ-ի կոդերը, որը կարծրապես սովորում է բառեր և նշում նշումների վեկտորներ հաջորդականության մեջ, որտեղ բառերը և նշումները խառնվում են: Չինաստանի-անգլերեն թարգմանման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ բոլոր երեք առաջարկած սինտակտիկ կոդերները կարող են բարելավել թարգմանման ճշգրտությունը: It is interesting to note that the simplest RNN encoder, i.e., Mixed RNN encoder yields the best performance with an significant improvement of 1.4 BLEU points.  Ավելին, բազմաթիվ տեսանկյուններից տրամադրվում է խորը վերլուծություն, որպեսզի բացահայտենք, թե ինչպես է աղբյուրի սինտաքսին օգտակար NMT-ին:', 'bn': 'যদিও নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের (এনএমটি) নির্দিষ্ট ক্ষেত্রে সিন্ট্যাকটিক তথ্য শিখতে পারে, তবুও এই পত্রিকাটি দেখাচ্ছে যে সোর্স স সিন্ট্যাক্স এনএমটিতে স্পষ্ট ভাষায় জড়িত বিশেষ করে, আমরা সূত্রের শাস্তি পার্সের বৃক্ষের সারিজ করি কাঠামো লেবেলের সীমা পাওয়ার জন্য। ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে আমরা তিনটি বিভিন্ন ধরনের এনকোডারের প্রস্তাব করি যাতে সোর্স সিন্ট্যাক্স এনএমটি: ১) প্যারালেল আরএনএন এনকোডারে যা শব্দ ২) হিরেরাক্কিল RNN এনকোডার যে শব্দ এবং লেবেল বিজ্ঞাপনের ভেক্টর শিখে দুই স্তরের হিয়েরার্কিতে শিখে; এবং ৩) মিশ্রিত RNN এনকোডার যেখানে শব্দ ও লেবেল বিশ্লেষণের ভেক্টর শিখতে পায় যেখানে শব্দ ও লেবেল মিশ্রিত। চীন-থেকে ইংরেজী অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে প্রস্তাবিত তিনটি সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কোডারের সকল অনুবাদের সঠিকভাবে উন্ এটা খুব মজার লাগছে যে সর্বোচ্চ RNN এনকোডার, যেমন মিক্সেড RNN এনকোডার ১. এছাড়াও, বেশ কয়েকটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে গভীর বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যাতে সোর্স সিন্ট্যাক্স কিভাবে এনএ', 'az': "NMT'nin nöral maşına çevirilməsindəki modellərin sintaktik məlumatlarının sintaktik məlumatlarını öyrənməsi mümkün olmasına rağmen bu kağız göstərir ki, mənbə sintaksi NMT'ə daha çox yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün a çıq-aydın bir şekildə daxil olar. Özellikle, strukturlu etiket sıralarını almaq üçün mənbə cümlələrinin ağaclarını linearizēt edirik. Buna görə də, NMT: 1) Sözü və etiketli etiketli vektörləri paralelə öyrənən paralelə RNN kodlayıcını birləşdirmək üçün üç cür müxtəlif kodlayıcı təklif edirik; 2) İki səviyyədə hiyerarşində söz və etiket vektörlərini öyrənən hiyerarşik RNN kodlayıcı; Və 3) Sözlər və etiketlər karıştırılmış sıralar üzerində söz və etiketlər öyrənən karışıqlı RNN kodlayıcısı. Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi barəsindəki təcrübə göstərilir ki, üç təklif edilmiş sintaktik kodlayıcının dəqiqliyini yaxşılaşdıra bilər. Ən basit RNN kodlayıcısı, yani karışıq RNN kodlayıcısı 1.4 BLEU nöqtələrinin ən yaxşı performansını təşkil edir. Daha sonra, bir neçə perspektivdən derinlik analizi NMT-ə nə cür mənbə sintaksi fayda verəcəyini göstərmək üçün təmin edilir.", 'ca': "Encara que una seqüència sense llengüística al model de seqüència en la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) té certa capacitat d'aprendre implícitament informació sinàctica de les frases de font, aquest article mostra que la sintaxi de font pot ser incorporada explícitament a la NMT efectivament per proporcionar millores ulteriors. Specifically, we linearize parse trees of source sentences to obtain structural label sequences.  Sobre la base, proposem tres tipus de codificadors diferents per incorporar la sintaxi de fonts a la NMT: 1) codificador paralèl·lel de RNN que aprenen els vectors d'anotació de paraula i etiqueta parallelament; 2) codificador hieràrquic RNN que aprenen vectors d'anotació de paraules i etiquetes en una jerarquia de dos nivells; i 3) Encodidor de RNN mixte que aprenen de forma sutil vectors d'anotació de paraules en seqüències on les paraules i etiquetes es mestren. L'experiment de traducció xinesa a anglès demostra que tots els tres codificadors sinàtics proposats són capaços de millorar la precisió de la traducció. És interessant notar que el codificador RNN més senzill, és a dir, el codificador RNN mixt produeix el millor rendiment amb una millor significativa de 1,4 punts BLEU. A més, es proporciona una an àlisi profunda de diverses perspectives per revelar com la síntaxi de fonts beneficia a la NMT.", 'bs': 'Iako sekvencija bez lingvistike za sekvenciju model a u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT) ima određenu mogućnost implicitno učenja sintaktičnih informacija izvornih rečenica, ovaj papir pokazuje da se izvorni sintaks može pojasno uključiti u NMT kako bi se pružio daljnje poboljšanje. Posebno, lineariziramo drveće izvornih rečenica da bi dobili strukturne sekvence etiketa. Na osnovu toga, predlažemo tri različite vrste kodera da uključimo izvornu sintaksu u NMT: 1) Paralelni koder RNN koji paralelno uči vektore oznake riječi i etikete; 2) hijerarhički koder RNN koji uči vektore oznake riječi i oznake u hijerarhiji dvonivoa; i 3) Mixed RNN encoder koji šišinski uči vektore riječi i označavanja označavanja po sekvencijama gdje se riječi i etikete miješaju. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuje da su svi tri predložena sintaktička kodera u stanju poboljšati preciznost prevoda. Zanimljivo je primijetiti da najjednostavniji RNN koder, tj. Mixed RNN koder, daje najbolji učinkovit sa značajnim poboljšanjem od 1,4 BLEU bodova. Osim toga, pruža se duboka analiza iz nekoliko perspektiva kako bi otkrila kako izvorni sintaks koristi NMT.', 'et': 'Kuigi keeleteadusevaba järjestuse mudel neuromasintõlkes (NMT) on teatud võimekus kaudselt õppida lähtelausete süntaktilist informatsiooni, näitab see töö, et lähtelause süntaksit saab sõnaselgelt NMT-sse integreerida, et täiendavaid parandusi pakkuda. Konkreetselt analüüsime lähtelausete puid, et saada struktuurilised märgisjärjestused. Selle põhjal pakume välja kolme erinevat tüüpi kodeerijaid lähtesüntaksi lisamiseks NMT-sse: 1) paralleelne RNN-kodeerija, mis õpib sõna- ja siltide annotatsioonivektoreid paralleelselt; 2) Hierarhiline RNN kodeerija, mis õpib sõna- ja siltide annotatsioonivektorid kahetasandilises hierarhias; ja 3) segatud RNN kodeerija, mis õpib õmblevalt sõna- ja siltide annotatsioonivektoreid jadades, kus sõnad ja siltid on segatud. Hiina-inglise tõlke eksperimenteerimine näitab, et kõik kolm kavandatud süntaktilist kodeerijat suudavad tõlke täpsust parandada. Huvitav on märkida, et lihtsaim RNN kodeerija, st segatud RNN kodeerija annab parima jõudluse märkimisväärse paranemisega 1,4 BLEU punkti. Lisaks esitatakse põhjalik analüüs mitmest vaatenurgast, et selgitada, kuidas allikasüntaks kasutab NMT.', 'cs': 'I když model sekvence na sekvenci bez lingvistiky v neuronovém strojovém překladu (NMT) má určitou schopnost implicitně učit se syntaktické informace zdrojových vět, tento článek ukazuje, že zdrojová syntaxe může být explicitně začleněna do NMT efektivně a poskytnout další zlepšení. Konkrétně linearizujeme parse stromů zdrojových vět, abychom získali strukturální sekvence popisků. Na základě navrhujeme tři různé druhy kodérů pro začlenění zdrojové syntaxe do NMT: 1) Paralelní RNN kodér, který se učí slovo a popisovací anotace vektory paralelně; 2) Hierarchický RNN kodér, který se učí slovní a štítkové anotace vektory ve dvouúrovňové hierarchii; a 3) Smíšený RNN kodér, který se šitě učí slovní a štítkové anotace vektory přes sekvence, kde jsou slova a štítky smíšeny. Experiment na čínsko-anglickém překladu ukazuje, že všechny tři navržené syntaktické kodéry jsou schopny zlepšit přesnost překladu. Je zajímavé poznamenat, že nejjednodušší RNN snímač, tj. Mixed RNN snímač přináší nejlepší výkon s výrazným zlepšením 1,4 BLEU bodů. Dále je poskytnuta hloubková analýza z několika perspektiv, která odhalila, jaký přínos syntaxe zdroje NMT.', 'fi': 'Vaikka kielitieteen vapaalla sekvenssimallilla neurokonekäännöksessä (NMT) on tietty kyky implisiittisesti oppia lähdelauseiden syntaktista tietoa, tämä artikkeli osoittaa, että lähdesyntaksi voidaan nimenomaisesti sisällyttää NMT:hen tehokkaasti lisäparannusten aikaansaamiseksi. Tarkemmin sanottuna analysoimme lähdelauseiden puita rakenteellisten merkkisekvenssien saamiseksi. Perustuen ehdotamme kolmenlaisia koodereita lähdesyntaksin sisällyttämiseksi NMT:hen: 1) Rinnakkainen RNN-kooderi, joka oppii sana- ja tarramerkintävektorit rinnakkain; 2) Hierarkkinen RNN-kooderi, joka oppii sana- ja tarramerkintävektorit kaksitasoisessa hierarkiassa; ja 3) Sekoitettu RNN-kooderi, joka oppii ompelemalla sana- ja tarramerkintävektorit sekvensseissä, joissa sanat ja tarrat sekoitetaan. Kokeet kiina-englanti käännöksestä osoittavat, että kaikki kolme ehdotettua synteettistä koodaajaa pystyvät parantamaan käännöksen tarkkuutta. On mielenkiintoista huomata, että yksinkertaisin RNN-kooderi eli Mixed RNN-kooderi tuottaa parhaan suorituskyvyn merkittävällä parannuksella 1,4 BLEU-pistettä. Lisäksi tehdään perusteellinen analyysi useista näkökulmista paljastaakseen, miten lähdesyntaksi hyödyttää NMT:tä.', 'jv': 'bah sa nguasai sistem sing perusahaan banget kanggo sampek paran neng tarjamahan kelangan Neral string" in "context_BAR_stringLink We proposal 3 2) 2) Mixed DNN koder that stithingly Learns word and label anntations vectors Wang Iki penting nggo ngerti dadi, akeh koder (DNN) sing sampeyan perusahaan, dadi, koder (DNN) sing paling nggo awak dhéwé nggawe barang langgar sampeyan luwih operasi sing lunak pulan 1.4, sing paling nggo politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, kuma kõ da wani sauri na-linguistic zuwa misalin sauri cikin fassarar maɓallin neural (NMT) yana da wani abinci mai iya amfani da suntaktisk information na cewa kwanza, wannan takarda yana nuna cewa, za'a iya iya haɗa kodi bayana zuwa NMT, dõmin ya iya samar da ƙari. Ina ƙayyade, muna yin parse ga itãce na salon kwanan kwanan zuwa ka sami saurãren layin rubutu. Ga bangon, muna buƙata nau'i uku-nau'i kode-nau'i ko-nau'in kodi guda zuwa NMT: 1) Parallel RNN kode da za'a fahimta maganar da shiryoyi masu sanarwa da label parallel; 2) Kode na Tsarakiya na RNN mai iya sanar da magana da shiryoyi masu sanar maganar da label cikin taƙaitar daraja biyu; kuma 3) Kode da aka haɗu da RNN wanda ke iya yin amfani da maganar da alama masu sanar da shiryoyi na alama kan sauran da aka haɗa maganar da alama. Tajararin zaman tafsiri na China-to-Ingiriya na nuna cewa duk kodi ukun da aka yi niyyar su kodi na syntactic sunã iya ƙari tsari. Ina yarda da in tuna cewa kode na RNN, misali, kodi na Mixed RNN na fitar da mafi kyaun aikin da ya kyautata shirya point 1.4 BLEU. Da haka, an ƙayyade wani analyi cikin-depth daga wasu wurãre masu yawa dõmin ya bayyana jinsi sunanta na source na amfani da NMT.", 'sk': 'Čeprav ima jezikoslovni model zaporedja do zaporedja v nevronskem strojnem prevajanju (NMT) določeno zmožnost implicitnega učenja sintaktičnih informacij izvornih stavkov, ta prispevek kaže, da je izvorno sintakso mogoče eksplicitno vključiti v NMT in tako zagotoviti nadaljnje izboljšave. Natančneje, lineariziramo razčlenitev dreves izvornih stavkov, da bi dobili strukturne zaporedje oznak. Na osnovi predlagamo tri različne vrste kodirnikov za vključitev izvorne sintakse v NMT: 1) vzporedni kodirnik RNN, ki vzporedno uči vektorje označevanja besed in etiket; 2) Hierarhični kodirnik RNN, ki uči besede in oznake vektorje označevanja v dvostopenjski hierarhiji; in 3) Mešani kodirnik RNN, ki šivajoče uči vektorje označevanja besed in etiket prek zaporedij, kjer so besede in etikete mešane. Eksperimentacija s kitajsko-angleškim prevodom dokazuje, da so vsi trije predlagani sintaktični kodirniki sposobni izboljšati natančnost prevajanja. Zanimivo je opozoriti, da najpreprostejši RNN kodirnik, tj. mešani RNN kodirnik zagotavlja najboljšo zmogljivost z znatnim izboljšanjem 1,4 točke BLEU. Poleg tega je predložena poglobljena analiza z več vidikov, da bi razkrila, kako sintaksa vira koristi NMT.', 'he': 'למרות שלרצף ללא שפתיים למודל לרצף בתרגום מכונת עצבית (NMT) יש יכולת מסוימת ללמוד מידע סינטקטי בלתי ייחודי של משפטי מקור, העיתון הזה מראה כי סינטקס מקור יכול להיות מעורב באופן ברור NMT בעובדה כדי לספק שיפורים נוספים. במיוחד, אנו לינריזצים עצים של משפטי מקור כדי להשיג רצפי תוויות מבנה. על בסיס, אנו מציעים שלושה סוגים שונים של קודנים כדי להכניס סינטקס מקור ל NMT: 2) קודד RNN הייררכי שלמד את ווקטורי המילים ותקליט בהיררכיה בשני רמות; ו-3) קודד RNN מעורבב שלמד בתפרה את ווקטורי המילים ותקליט מעל רצפים שבו המילים ותקליטים מעורבים. ניסוי על התרגום סיני לאנגלית מראה שכל שלושת הקודנים הסינטקטיים המוצעים יכולים לשפר את מדויקת התרגום. מעניין לשים לב שהקודד RNN הפשוט ביותר, כלומר קודד RNN מעורב מציג את ההופעה הטובה ביותר עם שיפור משמעותי של 1.4 נקודות BLEU. Moreover, an in-depth analysis from several perspectives is provided to reveal how source syntax benefits NMT.', 'bo': 'Even though a linguistics-free sequence to sequence model in neural machine translation (NMT) has certain capabilities of implicitly learning syntactic information of source sentences, this paper shows that source syntax can be explicitly incorporated into NMT effectively to provide further improvements. ངེད་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་འབྱུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གི་དབྱེ་བ་བྱེད་དགོས On the basis, we propose three different types of encoders to incorporate source syntax into NMT: 1) Parallel RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors parallelly; and 2) Hierarchical RNN encoder that learns word and label annotation vectors in a two-level hierarchy; in and 3) Mixed RNN encoder that stitchingly learns word and label annotation vectors over sequences where words and labels are mixed. རྒྱ་ནག་ལས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གྱི་ལག་སྟར་གྱིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན་གསལ་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་པ་གསུམ་འདི་སྔོན་ས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆེ་མཐོང་ནུས་པ་འདི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་མིན་ན། དཔེར་ན། Mixed RNN encoder(Mixed RNN encoder)ཡིས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་མཚམས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ Moreover, an in-depth analysis from several perspectives is provided to reveal how source syntax benefits NMT.'}
{'en': 'Detect Rumors in Microblog Posts Using Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'ar': 'كشف الشائعات في منشورات المدونات الصغيرة باستخدام بنية الانتشار عبر تعلم Kernel', 'pt': 'Detectar Rumores em Postagens de Microblog Usando Estrutura de Propagação via Kernel Learning', 'es': 'Detectar rumores en publicaciones de microblogs mediante la estructura de propagación mediante el aprendizaje del núcleo', 'fr': "Détecter les rumeurs dans les articles de microblog en utilisant la structure de propagation via l'apprentissage", 'ja': 'カーネル学習を介した伝播構造を使用したマイクロブログ投稿の噂の検出', 'hi': 'कर्नेल लर्निंग के माध्यम से प्रोपेगेशन संरचना का उपयोग कर Microblog पोस्ट में अफवाहों का पता लगाएं', 'zh': '因内核学用传构微博帖中讹言', 'ru': 'Обнаружение слухов в постах микроблога с использованием структуры распространения через обучение ядра', 'ga': 'Braith Ráflaí i bPoist Microblog Ag Úsáid Struchtúr Iomadaithe trí Fhoghlaim Eithne', 'hu': 'Pletykák észlelése a Microblog bejegyzésekben Propagation Structure segítségével Kernel Learning segítségével', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εντοπίστε φήμες σε δημοσιεύσεις χρησιμοποιώντας τη δομή διάδοσης μέσω της μάθησης πυρήνα', 'it': 'Rilevare voci nei post di Microblog utilizzando la struttura di propagazione tramite Kernel Learning', 'kk': 'Майкроблог пошталарындағы сөйлерді табу Kernel Learning арқылы пропагациялау құрылымын қолданатын', 'lt': 'Nustatyti mikroblogų postuose, kuriuose naudojama propagavimo struktūra, gautus gandus mokant branduolius', 'mk': 'Детектирај гласини во микроблоговите постови користејќи пропагациска структура преку научување на јадрото', 'ms': 'Detect Rumors in Microblog Posts Using Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'ml': 'കെര്\u200dണല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ മൈക്രോബോഗ് പോസ്റ്റുകളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Id-Detezzjoni ta’ Rumori f’Postijiet Mikrobloġiċi bl-Użu ta’ Struttura ta’ Propagazzjoni permezz tat-Tagħlim tal-Kernel', 'no': 'Oppdag rumarar i mikrobloggpost ved bruk av propagasjonstrukturen via kjernelæring', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie plotek w postach mikroblogowych za pomocą struktury propagacji poprzez uczenie się jądra', 'mn': 'Майкроблог захиргааны дуудлага Kernel Learning аргаар дэлхийн бүтэц ашиглах', 'ro': 'Detectează zvonurile în postările Microblog folosind structura de propagare prin învățarea Kernel', 'sr': 'Otkrijte glasine u mikroblogskim poštovima koristeći strukturu propagacije putem učenja kernela', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Upptäcka rykten i Microblogginlägg med hjälp av Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'so': 'Aqoonso muhiimka ah ee microblog Posts isticmaalka Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện mật khẩu trong các bài viết về Microblog Sử dụng cấu trúc propagation qua Kernel Learning', 'bg': 'Откриване на слухове в публикациите в микроблога, използвайки структурата на размножаването чрез изучаване на ядра', 'hr': 'Otkrijte glasine u mikroblogskim postavima koristeći strukturu proširenja putem učenja Kernela', 'da': 'Opdage rygter i Microblog Indlæg ved hjælp af Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'nl': 'Detecteer geruchten in Microblogberichten met behulp van Propagatiestructuur via Kernel Learning', 'fa': 'شناسایی زبان\u200cها در پوست\u200cهای میکروبلاگ استفاده از ساختار ارائه\u200cسازی از طریق یادگیری Kernel', 'id': 'Deteksi Rumor dalam Posts Microblog Menggunakan Struktur Propagasi melalui Kernel Learning', 'de': 'Erkennen Sie Gerüchte in Microblog-Beiträgen mithilfe von Propagation Structure via Kernel Learning', 'ko': '전파 구조를 이용하여 핵 학습을 통해 웨이보 게시물의 헛소문을 검출하다', 'sq': 'Gjej thashethemet në Microblog Posts duke përdorur strukturën e propagacionit nëpërmjet mësimit të bërthamës', 'sw': 'Kugundua uvumi katika Posti za Microblog kwa kutumia Mradi wa Utangazaji kupitia mafunzo ya Kernel', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Mikroblog Postlarda Azalary Kernel öwrenmek üzerinden Wesip Structure ullanýar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Kernel √∂yr…ônm…ôsi vasit…ôsil…ô propagasyon quruluŇüunu istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk Mikroblog PostlarńĪnda s…ôsl…ôri keŇüfet', 'hy': 'Միկրոբլոգի գրքերում հայտնաբերել լսություններ՝ օգտագործելով քարոզելու կառուցվածքը միջոցով', 'bn': 'কেরনেল শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে মাইক্রোব্লগ পোস্টে গুজব সনাক্ত করুন', 'bs': 'Otkrijte glasine u mikroblogskim postavima koristeći strukturu propagacije putem učenja Kernela', 'cs': 'Detekce zvěstí v mikroblogových příspěvcích pomocí propagační struktury prostřednictvím učení jádra', 'ca': "Detectar rumors en publicacions de microblog utilitzant estructura de propagació a través de l'aprenentatge del nucli", 'et': 'Mikroblogi postituste kuulujutute tuvastamine, kasutades paljundusstruktuuri kernel Learning kaudu', 'fi': 'Havaitse huhuja mikroblogiviesteissä käyttämällä propagaatiorakennetta ytimen oppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'detect', 'he': 'גלה שמועות במיקרובלוג פוסטים באמצעות מבנה ניצוי באמצעות לימוד הגרעין', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje govoric v objavah mikrobloga z uporabo strukture razmnoževanja prek učenja jedra', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་ཆེན་གྱིས་ཟིན་བྲིས་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་བརྗོད་འཛིན་བྱེད་སྟངས་ལ་རྟོགས་པ།'}
{'en': 'How fake news goes viral via social media? How does its propagation pattern differ from real stories? In this paper, we attempt to address the problem of identifying rumors, i.e., fake information, out of microblog posts based on their propagation structure. We firstly model microblog posts diffusion with propagation trees, which provide valuable clues on how an original message is transmitted and developed over time. We then propose a kernel-based method called Propagation Tree Kernel, which captures high-order patterns differentiating different types of rumors by evaluating the similarities between their propagation tree structures. Experimental results on two real-world datasets demonstrate that the proposed kernel-based approach can detect rumors more quickly and accurately than state-of-the-art rumor detection models.', 'ar': 'كيف تنتشر الأخبار المزيفة عبر وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي؟ كيف يختلف نمط انتشاره عن القصص الحقيقية؟ في هذه الورقة ، نحاول معالجة مشكلة تحديد الشائعات ، أي المعلومات المزيفة ، من منشورات المدونات الصغيرة بناءً على هيكل انتشارها. نقوم أولاً بنمذجة نشر منشورات المدونات الصغيرة باستخدام أشجار الانتشار ، والتي توفر أدلة قيمة حول كيفية إرسال الرسالة الأصلية وتطويرها بمرور الوقت. ثم نقترح طريقة قائمة على النواة تسمى Propagation Tree Kernel ، والتي تلتقط أنماطًا عالية الترتيب تميز أنواعًا مختلفة من الشائعات من خلال تقييم أوجه التشابه بين هياكل شجرة الانتشار. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات في العالم الحقيقي أن النهج المقترح القائم على النواة يمكن أن يكتشف الشائعات بشكل أسرع وأكثر دقة من أحدث نماذج الكشف عن الشائعات.', 'es': '¿Cómo las noticias falsas se vuelven virales en las redes sociales? ¿En qué se diferencia su patrón de propagación de las historias reales? En este artículo, intentamos abordar el problema de identificar rumores, es decir, información falsa, de las publicaciones de microblogs en función de su estructura de propagación. En primer lugar, modelamos la difusión de publicaciones de microblogs con árboles de propagación, que proporcionan pistas valiosas sobre cómo se transmite y desarrolla un mensaje original a lo largo del tiempo. Luego proponemos un método basado en el núcleo llamado Propagation Tree Kernel, que captura patrones de orden superior que diferencian diferentes tipos de rumores mediante la evaluación de las similitudes entre sus estructuras de árbol de propagación. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos del mundo real demuestran que el enfoque propuesto basado en el núcleo puede detectar rumores con mayor rapidez y precisión que los modelos de detección de rumores de última generación.', 'pt': 'Como as notícias falsas se tornam virais nas redes sociais? Como seu padrão de propagação difere das histórias reais? Neste artigo, tentamos abordar o problema de identificar rumores, ou seja, informações falsas, de postagens de microblog com base em sua estrutura de propagação. Em primeiro lugar, modelamos a difusão de postagens de microblog com árvores de propagação, que fornecem pistas valiosas sobre como uma mensagem original é transmitida e desenvolvida ao longo do tempo. Propomos então um método baseado em kernel chamado Propagation Tree Kernel, que captura padrões de alta ordem diferenciando diferentes tipos de rumores avaliando as semelhanças entre suas estruturas de árvore de propagação. Resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados do mundo real demonstram que a abordagem baseada em kernel proposta pode detectar rumores com mais rapidez e precisão do que os modelos de detecção de rumores de última geração.', 'fr': "Comment les fake news deviennent virales via les réseaux sociaux\xa0? En quoi son modèle de propagation diffère-t-il des histoires réelles\xa0? Dans cet article, nous tentons de résoudre le problème de l'identification de rumeurs, c'est-à-dire de fausses informations, à partir de billets de microblog en fonction de leur structure de propagation. Nous modélisons d'abord la diffusion d'articles de microblog avec des arbres de propagation, qui fournissent de précieux indices sur la façon dont un message original est transmis et développé au fil du temps. Nous proposons ensuite une méthode basée sur le noyau appelée Propagation Tree Kernel, qui capture des modèles d'ordre élevé différenciant différents types de rumeurs en évaluant les similitudes entre leurs structures d'arbre de propagation. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données réels démontrent que l'approche basée sur le noyau proposée peut détecter les rumeurs plus rapidement et avec plus de précision que les modèles de détection de rumeurs de pointe.", 'zh': '假新闻何以社交媒体传? 其传模与真何异? 于本文中,试据其传构微博帖识讹言(即虚信)也。 先用传树对微博帖扩而建模之,这为消息随时传输给其直线。 然后立传树核之法,内核量树构之间相似性以别异类之高阶式。 二真数集上之实验结果表明,所立基于内核之法,可以疾于至言,审于讹言。', 'ru': 'Как фейковые новости распространяются через социальные сети? Чем паттерн его распространения отличается от реальных историй? В данной работе мы пытаемся решить проблему выявления слухов, то есть фальшивой информации, из микроблогов на основе их структуры распространения. Сначала мы моделируем распространение микроблогов с помощью деревьев распространения, которые предоставляют ценные подсказки о том, как оригинальное сообщение передается и развивается с течением времени. Затем мы предлагаем метод, основанный на ядре, называемый ядром дерева распространения, который фиксирует шаблоны высокого порядка, дифференцирующие различные типы слухов, оценивая сходства между их структурами дерева распространения. Экспериментальные результаты по двум реальным наборам данных показывают, что предлагаемый подход, основанный на ядре, может обнаруживать слухи быстрее и точнее, чем современные модели обнаружения слухов.', 'ja': 'フェイクニュースはソーシャルメディアを介してどのようにバイラルになりますか？その伝播パターンは実際の物語とどのように違いますか？本稿では、マイクロブログ投稿の伝播構造に基づいて、噂、すなわち偽情報を識別する問題に取り組もうとする。私たちはまず、マイクロブログの投稿を伝播ツリーで拡散するモデルを作成します。伝播ツリーは、元のメッセージがどのように伝達され、時間の経過とともに発展するかについての貴重な手がかりを提供します。次に、伝播ツリーカーネルと呼ばれるカーネルベースの方法を提案します。これは、伝播ツリー構造間の類似性を評価することによって、異なるタイプの噂を区別する高次パターンをキャプチャします。2つの実際のデータセットの実験結果は、提案されたカーネルベースのアプローチが、最先端の噂検出モデルよりも迅速かつ正確に噂を検出できることを示しています。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया के माध्यम से फेक न्यूज कैसे वायरल होती है? इसका प्रचार पैटर्न वास्तविक कहानियों से कैसे भिन्न है? इस पेपर में, हम अफवाहों की पहचान करने की समस्या को संबोधित करने का प्रयास करते हैं, यानी, नकली जानकारी, उनके प्रचार संरचना के आधार पर माइक्रोब्लॉग पोस्ट से बाहर। हम सबसे पहले मॉडल microblog प्रसार पेड़ों के साथ प्रसार पोस्ट, जो कैसे एक मूल संदेश संचारित और समय के साथ विकसित किया जाता है पर मूल्यवान सुराग प्रदान करते हैं. फिर हम प्रोपेगेशन ट्री कर्नेल नामक एक कर्नेल-आधारित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो उनके प्रचार पेड़ संरचनाओं के बीच समानताओं का मूल्यांकन करके विभिन्न प्रकार की अफवाहों को अलग करने वाले उच्च-क्रम पैटर्न को कैप्चर करता है। दो वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि प्रस्तावित कर्नेल-आधारित दृष्टिकोण राज्य के अत्याधुनिक अफवाह का पता लगाने वाले मॉडल की तुलना में अधिक तेज़ी से और सटीक रूप से अफवाहों का पता लगा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Conas a théann nuacht falsa víreasach trí na meáin shóisialta? Cén difríocht atá idir a phatrún iomadaithe agus fíorscéalta? Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iarracht dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb a bhaineann le ráflaí a aithint, i.e., faisnéis bhréige, as poist mhicribhlog bunaithe ar a struchtúr iomadaithe. Ar an gcéad dul síos déanaimid samhail ar phoist mhicribhlog idirleata le crainn iomadaithe, rud a thugann leideanna luachmhara ar conas a tharchuirtear agus a fhorbraítear teachtaireacht bhunaidh le himeacht ama. Molaimid ansin modh eithne-bhunaithe ar a dtugtar Iomadú Crann Eithne, a ghabháil patrúin ard-ord a idirdhealú cineálacha éagsúla ráflaí trí mheastóireacht a dhéanamh ar na cosúlachtaí idir a struchtúir crann iomadaithe. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí den saol fíor gur féidir leis an gcur chuige bunaithe ar eithne atá beartaithe ráflaí a bhrath níos tapúla agus níos cruinne ná na samhlacha braite ráflaí úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'რამდენი ტალქტური ნუმენტები ვირალურია საზოგადო მედიაზე? როგორ განსხვავებს მისი პროპაგიაციის მონაცემები რეალური ისტორიებიდან? ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვცდილობთ წარმოადგენის პრობლემა, რომელიც სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, მაიკრობლოგური პოსტრუქტურაციის განსაზღვრებაზე. ჩვენ პირველი მოდელური მიკრობლოგური პოსტის განფორმაცია პროპაგიაციის ხელებით, რომლებიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კოსტულების შესახებ, როგორ ორიგიალური შეტყობინებ შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩვენ მინდომებით კურნალის ბაზეული მეთოდი, რომელიც პროპაგიაციის ხე კერნელი, რომელიც აკეთებს მაღალი წერტილის შაბლონების განსხვავებას განსხვავებს განსხვავებული ხმების ტიპ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ორი რეალური მსოფლიო მონაცემების შედეგებაში გამოჩვენება, რომ მიზეზებული კურნალის დაბათი პროგრამა შეიძლება უფრო ბრალოდ და უფრო წესიერად განვიხ', 'el': 'Πώς τα ψεύτικα νέα διαδίδονται μέσω των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης; Πώς διαφέρει το μοτίβο διάδοσής του από τις πραγματικές ιστορίες; Σε αυτή την εργασία, επιχειρούμε να αντιμετωπίσουμε το πρόβλημα του εντοπισμού φήμων, δηλαδή ψεύτικων πληροφοριών, από δημοσιεύσεις με βάση τη δομή διάδοσης τους. Αρχικά μοντελοποιούμε τη διάχυση δημοσιεύσεων μικροιστολογίων με δέντρα πολλαπλασιασμού, τα οποία παρέχουν πολύτιμες ενδείξεις για το πώς μεταδίδεται και αναπτύσσεται ένα πρωτότυπο μήνυμα με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο βασισμένη στον πυρήνα που ονομάζεται πυρήνας δέντρου πολλαπλασιασμού, η οποία συλλαμβάνει πρότυπα υψηλής τάξης διαφοροποιώντας διαφορετικούς τύπους φήμων αξιολογώντας τις ομοιότητες μεταξύ των δομών δέντρων πολλαπλασιασμού τους. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση βασισμένη στον πυρήνα μπορεί να ανιχνεύσει φήμες πιο γρήγορα και με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια από τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα ανίχνευσης φήμων.', 'hu': 'Hogy válnak a hamis hírek a közösségi médián keresztül? Hogyan különbözik a terjedési mintázata a valós történetektől? Ebben a tanulmányban megpróbáljuk megoldani a pletykák, azaz hamis információk azonosításának problémáját a mikroblog bejegyzésekből a terjesztési struktúrájuk alapján. Elsősorban mikroblog posztok diffúzióját modellezzük szaporítófákkal, amelyek értékes nyomokat nyújtanak az eredeti üzenet idővel történő továbbításáról és fejlesztéséről. Ezt követően javasoljuk a Propagation Tree kernel nevű mag alapú módszert, amely a különböző pletykák különböző típusait megkülönböztető magas rendű mintákat rögzíti a szaporítási fa struktúrák közötti hasonlóságok értékelésével. Két valós adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt kernel-alapú megközelítés gyorsabban és pontosabban tudja felismerni a pletykákat, mint a legkorszerűbb pletykaészlelési modellek.', 'it': "Come le fake news diventano virali attraverso i social media? In che modo il suo modello di propagazione differisce dalle storie reali? In questo articolo, cerchiamo di affrontare il problema di identificare le voci, cioè informazioni false, fuori dai post di microblog in base alla loro struttura di propagazione. Modelliamo innanzitutto la diffusione dei post di microblog con alberi di propagazione, che forniscono preziosi indizi su come un messaggio originale viene trasmesso e sviluppato nel tempo. Proponiamo quindi un metodo basato sul kernel chiamato Propagation Tree Kernel, che cattura modelli di alto ordine differenziando diversi tipi di voci valutando le somiglianze tra le loro strutture di albero di propagazione. I risultati sperimentali su due set di dati reali dimostrano che l'approccio basato sul kernel proposto può rilevare le voci in modo più rapido e preciso rispetto ai modelli di rilevamento delle voci all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Социалдық медиақтар арқылы қанша жалғыз жаңалықтар вирусалды? Пропагация үлгісі шын оқиғалардан қалай айырылады? Бұл қағазда, әңгімелерді анықтау мәселесін, мысалы, жалғыз мәліметті, микроблог жіберіліктерінің пропагациялық құрылымына негізделген мәселелерін шешуге тырыстық. Біз біріншіден микроблог жіберушілерін пропагациялық ағаштарымен түрлендіруді үлгіледік. Бұл бастапқы хатты уақыт бойынша қалай жіберілген және қалай жасалған тү Содан кейін біз өзек негізінде Пропагациялық ағаш шебері деп аталатын әдісін ұсынамыз. Бұл өзінің пропагациялық ағаш құрылымының арасындағы ұқсастықтарын бағалап, әртүрлі түрлерін айыратын ү Екі шын әлемдегі деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері өзектің негізіндегі тәсілдерінің оқу үлгілерінен тез және дұрыс түсіндіру үлгілерінен артық және дұрыс түсіндіре алады', 'lt': 'Kaip suklastotos žinios virsta per socialinę žiniasklaidą? Kaip jos dauginimo modelis skiriasi nuo tikrų istorijų? Šiame dokumente bandome i šspręsti problem ą, susijusią su gandų, t. y. suklastotos informacijos, identifikavimu iš mikroblogų postų, pagrįstų jų dauginimo struktūra. Pirmiausia modeliuojame mikroblogų postus, kurie skleidžia dauginamuosius medžius, kurie suteikia vertingų įrodymų, kaip laikui bėgant perduodama ir plėtojama originali žinia. We then propose a kernel-based method called Propagation Tree Kernel, which captures high-order patterns differentiating different types of rumors by evaluating the similarities between their propagation tree structures.  Dviejų realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas branduolinis metodas gali greičiau ir tiksliau aptikti gandus nei naujausi gandų aptikimo modeliai.', 'ms': 'How fake news goes viral via social media?  Bagaimana corak pendarabannya berbeza dari cerita sebenar? Dalam kertas ini, kita cuba untuk mengatasi masalah mengenali pengenalan khabar angin, iaitu maklumat palsu, dari pos mikroblog berdasarkan struktur penyebaran mereka. Kami pertama-tama model posts mikroblog difusion dengan pokok penyebaran, yang menyediakan petunjuk berharga tentang bagaimana mesej asal dihantar dan dikembangkan melalui masa. Kemudian kami cadangkan kaedah berdasarkan kernel yang dipanggil Kernel Pohon Propagasi, yang menangkap corak tertib tinggi yang membezakan jenis khabar angin berbeza dengan menilai persamaan antara struktur pokok propagasi mereka. Hasil percubaan pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan berdasarkan kernel yang diusulkan boleh mengesan khabar angin lebih cepat dan tepat daripada model pengesan khabar angin terbaik.', 'ml': 'How fake news goes viral via social media?  അതിന്റെ പ്രഖ്യാപനത്തിന്റെ രീതി എങ്ങനെയാണ് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ കഥകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായത്? ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രപഞ്ചന ഘടനയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി മൈക്രോബോഗ് പോസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യാജവി ആദ്യം മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗ് പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രൊപ്പഗ്രീകളുമായി വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു മൂല്യമായ സന്ദേശം എങ്ങനെയാണ് മുന്\u200dപ് അയ പിന്നീട് നാം ഒരു കെര്\u200dണലിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രൊഫഗേഷന്\u200d വൃക്ഷത്തിന്\u200dറെ കെര്\u200dണെല്\u200d എന്ന് പേരുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത രണ്ട് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച കെര്\u200dണല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന നടപടികള്\u200dക്ക് വേഗത്തിലും കൂടു', 'mk': 'Како лажните вести стануваат вирусни преку социјалните медиуми? Како се разликува нејзиниот модел на пропагација од вистинските приказни? Во овој весник се обидуваме да го решиме проблемот со идентификувањето на гласини, т.е. лажни информации, од микроблоговите постови базирани на нивната пропагациска структура. Прво, моделот на микроблогот поставува дифузија со дрвја за пропагација, што обезбедува вредни траги за тоа како оригиналната порака е пренесена и развиена со текот на времето. Потоа предложуваме метод базиран на јадрото наречен јадро на пропагација, кое фаќа високи шеми кои разликуваат различни видови гласини со проценка на сличностите помеѓу нивните структури на дрво на пропагација. Експерименталните резултати на двата бази на податоци на реалниот свет покажуваат дека предложениот пристап базиран на јадрото може да ги детектира гласините побрзо и прецизно отколку најсовремените модели за детектирање гласини.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллээр хэр хуурамч мэдээг вирус болдог вэ? Үүний тархалтын загвар яаж бодит түүхээс ялгаатай вэ? Энэ цаасан дээр бид дуу хоолойг тодорхойлох асуудлыг, яг л хуурамч мэдээлэл, дэлхийн бүтээгдэхүүний үндсэн микроблогийн захирагдлуудаас тусалдаг. Эхлээд бид микроблог загварыг дамжуулах модноос тархах загварыг загварладаг. Энэ нь эхний загварын хэрхэн дамжуулан хөгжүүлж, цаг хугацаанд хөгжүүлэхийг үнэ цэнэтэй тодорхойлолтой. Үүний дараа бид Kernel-д суурилсан пропагацийн модны Kernel гэж нэрлэдэг арга загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь өндөр дараагийн дуу хэлбэрүүдийг өөр төрлийн дуу холбоотой. Тэдний дэлхийн модны бүтцийн хоорондох төстэй адил Хоёр бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд нүүрстөрөгчийн суурь ойлголтын тухай яриаг илүү хурдан, шууд ойлгох арга загвараас илүү тодорхойлж чадна.', 'mt': 'Kif l-aħbarijiet foloz isiru virali permezz tal-midja soċjali? Kif id-disinn tal-propagazzjoni tiegħu jvarja minn storji reali? F’dan id-dokument, nippruvaw nindirizzaw il-problema tal-identifikazzjoni ta’ rumori, jiġifieri informazzjoni falza, minn postijiet ta’ mikroblog ibbażati fuq l-istruttura ta’ propagazzjoni tagħhom. L-ewwel nett, nagħmlu mudell ta’ postijiet ta’ mikroblog ta’ diffużjoni ma’ siġar ta’ propagazzjoni, li jipprovdu indikazzjonijiet ta’ valur dwar kif messaġġ oriġinali jiġi trażmess u żviluppat maż-żmien. Imbagħad nipproponu metodu bbażat fuq il-qalba msejjaħ il-qalba tas-siġar tal-propagazzjoni, li jaqbad xejriet ta’ ordni għolja li jiddifferenzjaw tipi differenti ta’ rumori billi jivvalutaw is-similaritajiet bejn l-istrutturi tas-siġar tal-propagazzjoni tagħhom. Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li l-approċċ propost ibbażat fuq il-qalba jista’ jiskopri rumori aktar malajr u b’mod preċiż mill-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati ta’ skoperta ta’ rumori.', 'no': 'Kor falske nyhetar går viral via sosiale media? Korleis forskjeller den propagasjonsmønsteret frå verkelege historiar? I denne papiret prøver vi å handtera problemet med å identifisera rumorer, t.d. falske informasjon, ut av mikrobloggpost basert på sine propagasjonsstrukturen. Vi først modeller mikrobloggpost diffusion med propagasjonstråder, som gjev verdilege klokke om korleis ein original melding vert transmisert og utvikla over tid. Vi foreslår derfor ein kjernebasert metode kalla Propagasjonstråkjernel, som hentar høg rekkefølgje mønsterer som forskjeller ulike typar rumorer ved å evaluera liknande mellom dei propagasjonstråstrukturene sine. Eksperimentale resultat på to datasett for verda viser at den foreslåde kjernebaserte tilnærminga kan finne rumorer mer raskt og nøyaktig enn modeller for oppdaging av rumoren i kunsten.', 'pl': 'Jak fałszywe wiadomości stają się wirusowe przez media społecznościowe? Czym wzór rozprzestrzeniania się różni od rzeczywistych opowieści? W niniejszym artykule próbujemy poruszyć problem identyfikacji plotek, czyli fałszywych informacji, z postów mikroblogowych w oparciu o ich strukturę propagacyjną. Najpierw modelujemy dyfuzję postów mikroblogowych z drzewami rozmnożeniowymi, które dostarczają cennych wskazówek na temat tego, jak oryginalny przekaz jest przekazywany i rozwijany w czasie. Następnie proponujemy metodę opartą na jądrze o nazwie Jądro Propagacji, która przechwytuje wzorce wysokiego rzędu różnicujące różne rodzaje plotek poprzez ocenę podobieństwa między ich strukturami drzew propagacyjnych. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że proponowane podejście oparte na jądrze może wykrywać plotki szybciej i dokładniej niż najnowocześniejsze modele wykrywania plotek.', 'si': 'කොච්චර බොරු ආරංචියක් සාමාජික මිඩියාවෙන් විරුද්ධ වෙනවා? ඇත්ත කතාවල් වලින් කොහොමද එයාගේ ප්\u200dරකාශනය ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙනස් වෙන්නේ? මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඉතින්, බොරු තොරතුරු හඳන්න, මයික්රොබ්ලොග් පොස්ට්ස් එක අපි මුලින්ම මයික්රොබ්ලෝග් පොස්ටස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශනය ගස්ස් සමග විස්තර කරනවා, ඒකෙන් මුලින් පණිවිඩයක් කොහොමද ව අපි පස්සේ කාර්නල් අධාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරොපැගේෂන් ට්\u200dරි කෙර්නල් කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒක අධාරිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සටහන් දෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට කාර්නල් අධාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dර', 'ro': 'Cum devin virale știrile false prin intermediul rețelelor de socializare? Cum diferă modelul său de propagare de poveștile reale? În această lucrare, încercăm să abordăm problema identificării zvonurilor, adică a informațiilor false, din posturile de microblog bazate pe structura lor de propagare. În primul rând modelăm difuzarea postărilor de microblog cu arbori de propagare, care oferă indicii valoroase despre modul în care un mesaj original este transmis și dezvoltat în timp. Apoi propunem o metodă bazată pe nucleu numită Propagation Tree Kernel, care capturează modele de ordine înaltă diferențierea diferitelor tipuri de zvonuri prin evaluarea similarităților dintre structurile arborelor de propagare. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date din lumea reală demonstrează că abordarea propusă bazată pe nucleu poate detecta zvonurile mai rapid și mai precis decât modelele de detectare a zvonurilor de ultimă generație.', 'so': 'Sidee waryo been ah u baahan yihiin macluumaadka bulshada? Sidee muuqashadeedu uga duwan yahay sheekooyinka runta ah? Warqadan waxaynu isku daynaa in aan ka sheekeyno dhibaatada aqoonsashada wararka, tusaale ahaan macluumaad been ah, warqadaha microblog oo ku saleysan dhismaha ogeysiiska. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu bandhigaynaa boostada microblog oo lagu kala firdhiyo geedo ogeysiis ah, taasoo bixiya tusaale qiimo ah oo ku saabsan sida warqada asalka ah loo soo diro iyo horumarinayo waqti dheer. Markaas waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab lagu magacaabay Geed Propagation Kernel, kaasoo qabta qaabab sare oo kala duduwan hadallo kala duduwan, si aan u qiimeyno isku mid ah dhismaha geedka lagu ogeysiiyo. Imtixaanka labada danbiyo ee caalamiga ah waxay muujiyaan in qaababka lagu soo jeeday ay ay soo ogaan karto warar dhaqso iyo si saxda ah oo ay u ogaan karto qaababka aqoonsiga farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Hur blir falska nyheter virala via sociala medier? Hur skiljer sig dess spridningsmönster från verkliga berättelser? I denna uppsats försöker vi ta itu med problemet med att identifiera rykten, dvs falsk information, ur mikroblogginlägg baserat på deras spridningsstruktur. Vi modellerar först spridningen av mikroblogginlägg med förökningsträd, som ger värdefulla ledtrådar om hur ett originalbudskap överförs och utvecklas över tid. Vi föreslår sedan en kärnbaserad metod som kallas Propagation Tree Kernel, som fångar upp högordnade mönster som skiljer olika typer av rykten genom att utvärdera likheterna mellan deras förökningsträd strukturer. Experimentella resultat på två verkliga datauppsättningar visar att det föreslagna kärnbaserade tillvägagångssättet kan upptäcka rykten snabbare och korrekt än toppmoderna ryktesdetekteringsmodeller.', 'sr': 'Koliko lažne vesti idu virusom društvenih medija? Kako se njegov propagacijski obrazac razlikuje od stvarnih prièa? U ovom papiru pokušavamo rešiti problem identifikacije glasina, tj. lažne informacije, iz mikroblogskih postaja na temelju njihove strukture propagacije. Prvo modeliramo mikroblogske postave širenja sa propagacijskim drvećem, koje pružaju vrijedne tragove o tome kako se originalna poruka prenosi i razvija tokom vremena. Onda predlažemo metodu na osnovu kernel pod nazivom Kernel Proagacijskog drveta, koja uključuje visokoredne obrasce koji diferenciraju različite vrste glasina procjenjujući sličnosti između njihovih struktura proagacijskog drveta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da predloženi pristup na kernel može otkriti glasine brže i tačnije od modela otkrivanja glasina.', 'ta': 'எவ்வாறு பொய் செய்திகள் சமூக ஊடகங்கள் மூலம் வெளியேறுகிறது? அதன் பரப்பு முறைமை எப்படி உண்மையான கதைகளிலிருந்து வேறுபடுகிறது? இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பிரச்சனையை அடையாளம் செய்ய முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சிக்கிறோம், அதாவது, பொய் தகவல், மைக்ரோப்பாக்கு முறைமைய முதலில் நாம் மைக்ரோபாக்கிய முறைமையில் பிரிப்பு மரங்களுடன் வித்தியாசம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அது முதலில் ஒரு முதல் செய்தி பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு கெர்னல் அடிப்படையான முறையில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் பெயர் Propagation Tree கெர்னெல், அது உயர் வரிசையில் மாதிரிகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்ளும், வ இரண்டு உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட கெர்னல் அடிப்படையிலுள்ள முறையை விரை', 'ur': 'کیسے جھوٹی خبر سوسیل میڈیا کے ذریعے ویروس ہوتی ہے؟ اس کے پھیلانے کی نمونہ کس طرح حقیقی کہانیاں سے مختلف ہے؟ اس کاغذ میں ہم افسانے کی شناسایی کا مشکل کرنے کی کوشش کررہے ہیں، یعنی جھوٹی معلومات، میکروبلوگ پوسٹوں میں سے ان کی پراپاژن ساختار پر بنیاد ہے. ہم پہلی بار میکروبلوگ پوسٹ کے ذریعے پھیلانے کے درختوں کے ذریعہ تفریق کی مدل کرتے ہیں، جو ایک اصلی پیغام کو کس طرح پیغام پہنچایا جاتا ہے اور کس طرح تفریق کی جاتی ہے۔ پھر ہم ایک کرنل بنیادی طریقہ پیش کریں جس کا نام پراپاگشن درخت کرنل ہے، جس نے اچھی طریقہ کے بغیر مختلف افسانے کی طریقوں کو متفاوت کرتا ہے اور ان کے پراپاگشن درخت کی ساختوں کے درمیان برابری کا ارزش کرتا ہے. دو حقیقی دنیاوی ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کرنل بنیاد کی تقریبا بہت سریع اور دقیق آواز کی آواز آگاہ کی مدل سے بہت دقیق آواز پہچان سکتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Sao tin giả lan truyền qua mạng xã hội? Nó phân phối cách nào khác với các câu chuyện thực sự? Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi cố giải quyết vấn đề xác định tin đồn, ví dụ như thông tin giả, từ những bài viết trên microblog dựa trên cấu trúc sinh sản của chúng. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi mô hình những bài phát tán từ những cây rải rác, cung cấp những manh mối đáng giá về cách một thông điệp được truyền đi và phát triển qua thời gian. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dựa trên hạt nhân gọi là Nhân cây ngũ, nắm bắt các mô hình cao đẳng phân biệt các kiểu tin đồn khác nhau bằng cách đánh giá điểm tương đồng giữa cấu trúc cây. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên hai tập tin trên thế giới thực chứng minh rằng phương pháp hạt nhân đề xuất có thể phát hiện tin đồn nhanh và chính xác hơn những mô hình tung tin đồn hiện đại.', 'uz': "Fayl news qanday ijodkorlik media orqali viral bo'ladi? Ko'rinishining propaganda shakli haqiqiqiy hikoyalar qanday ajratiladi? Bu qogʻozda biz gapiruvchi tizimini aniqlashga harakat qilamiz, masalan, biz mikroblog postlaridan foydalanuvchi tizim asosida o'xshash maʼlumotni aniqlashga harakat qilamiz. Birinchi modeli biz propaganda daraxtlar bilan diffaqiyatli misol qilamiz. Bu birinchi modeli asl xabar qanday uzilgan va vaqtda qanday taʼminlovchi bo'lgan narsalarni yaratadi. Keyin biz Propagation Tree Kernel (Kernel) deb nomli kernelning asosiy usulini talab qilamiz. Bu narsalarning propaganda daraxt structurlarining orasidagi bir xil turlarini o'zgartirish mumkin. Ikki haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, iloji kernelning asosida qo'llangan usulni tez va yaxshi qiziqarish modellaridan foydalanishi mumkin.", 'bg': 'Как фалшивите новини се разпространяват чрез социалните медии? Как се различава моделът на разпространение от реалните истории? В тази статия се опитваме да разгледаме проблема с идентифицирането на слухове, т.е. фалшива информация, от публикациите в микроблога въз основа на тяхната структура на разпространение. Първо моделираме разпространението на публикациите в микроблога с размножителни дървета, които дават ценни улики за това как оригинално послание се предава и развива с течение на времето. След това предлагаме метод, базиран на ядра, наречен Ядро на разсъждаващото дърво, който улавя модели от висок ред, разграничаващи различни видове слухове, като оценява приликите между техните разсъждаващи дървесни структури. Експерименталните резултати на два набора от данни от реалния свят показват, че предложеният подход, базиран на ядра, може да открие слухове по-бързо и точно от най-съвременните модели за откриване на слухове.', 'hr': 'Koliko lažne vijesti idu virusom društvenih medija? Kako se njegov propagacijski obrazac razlikuje od stvarnih priča? U ovom papiru pokušavamo riješiti problem identifikacije glasina, tj. lažne informacije, iz mikroblogskih postaja na temelju njihove strukture propagacije. Prvo modeliramo proširenje mikroblogskih postaja s proširenjem drveća, koje pružaju vrijedne tragove o tome kako se originalna poruka prenosi i razvija tijekom vremena. Zatim predlažemo metodu koja se temelji na kernel naziva Kernel Proagacijskog drveta, koja uključuje visokoredne obrasce koji diferenciraju različite vrste glasina procjenjujući sličnosti između njihovih struktura proagacijskog drveta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka o stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da predloženi pristup na temelju kernel može otkriti glasine brže i preciznije od modela otkrivanja glasina u stanju umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Hvordan falske nyheder bliver virale via sociale medier? Hvordan adskiller dets formeringsmønster sig fra virkelige historier? I denne artikel forsøger vi at løse problemet med at identificere rygter, dvs. falske oplysninger, ud af mikroblogindlæg baseret på deres formeringsstruktur. Vi modellerer først og fremmest spredning af mikroblogindlæg med formeringstræer, som giver værdifulde spor til, hvordan et originalt budskab overføres og udvikles over tid. Vi foreslår derefter en kernebaseret metode kaldet Propagation Tree Kernel, som fanger høj ordensmønstre, der differentierer forskellige typer rygter ved at evaluere lighederne mellem deres formeringstræstrukturer. Eksperimentelle resultater på to virkelige datasæt viser, at den foreslåede kernebaserede tilgang kan opdage rygter hurtigere og præcist end state-of-the-art rygtedetekteringsmodeller.', 'nl': 'Hoe wordt fake news viral via social media? Hoe verschilt het voortplantingspatroon van echte verhalen? In dit artikel proberen we het probleem aan te pakken van het identificeren van geruchten, dat wil zeggen valse informatie, uit microblogberichten op basis van hun verspreidingsstructuur. We modelleren eerst microblogposts diffusie met vermeerderingsbomen, die waardevolle aanwijzingen geven over hoe een originele boodschap in de loop van de tijd wordt overgedragen en ontwikkeld. Vervolgens stellen we een kernel-gebaseerde methode voor genaamd Propagation Tree Kernel, die patronen van hoge orde vastlegt die verschillende soorten geruchten onderscheiden door de overeenkomsten tussen hun propagatieboomstructuren te evalueren. Experimentele resultaten op twee real-world datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde kernel-gebaseerde benadering geruchten sneller en nauwkeuriger kan detecteren dan state-of-the-art gerucht detectie modellen.', 'de': 'Wie werden Fake News über Social Media viral? Wie unterscheidet sich sein Ausbreitungsmuster von realen Geschichten? In diesem Beitrag versuchen wir, das Problem der Identifizierung von Gerüchten, d.h. gefälschten Informationen, aus Mikroblogbeiträgen basierend auf ihrer Ausbreitungsstruktur anzugehen. Zunächst modellieren wir die Diffusion von Mikroblogbeiträgen mit Vermehrungsbäumen, die wertvolle Hinweise darauf liefern, wie eine ursprüngliche Botschaft im Laufe der Zeit übertragen und entwickelt wird. Wir schlagen dann eine kernelbasierte Methode namens Propagation Tree Kernel vor, die Muster hoher Ordnung erfasst, die verschiedene Arten von Gerüchten unterscheiden, indem die Ähnlichkeiten zwischen ihren Vermehrungsbaumstrukturen bewertet werden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene kernelbasierte Ansatz Gerüchte schneller und genauer erkennen kann als moderne Gerüchteerkennungsmodelle.', 'fa': 'چقدر خبرهای دروغ از طریق رسانه های اجتماعی ویروس می شود؟ چگونه الگوی گسترش از داستان واقعی تفاوت می\u200cکند؟ در این کاغذ، ما سعی می کنیم مشکل شناسایی شایعه ها را حل کنیم، یعنی اطلاعات دروغ، از پست میکروبلاگ بر اساس ساختار گسترش آنها. اولین بار ما میکروبلاگ را با درختان گسترش مدل می\u200cدهیم که نشانه\u200cهای ارزشمند در مورد چگونه پیام اصلی در طول زمان انتقال و توسعه می\u200cشود. سپس ما یک روش بنیادی کرونل به نام کرونل درخت گسترش را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که الگوهای بلند سفارش را می\u200cگیرد که نوع شایعه\u200cهای مختلف را با ارزیابی شبیه\u200cهایی بین ساختار درخت گسترش آنها تغییر می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای جهانی واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور پیشنهاد بر اساس کرونل می\u200cتواند شایعه\u200cها را سریعتر و دقیقاً از مدل\u200cهای شناسایی شایعه\u200cهای هنری شناسایی کند.', 'sw': 'Habari za uongo vipi vinaendelea kupitia mitandao ya kijamii? Mfano wake wa propaganda unatofautiana na hadithi za kweli? Katika karatasi hii, tunajaribu kujadili tatizo la kutambua uvumi, kama vile taarifa bandia, kutokana na posti za microblogu zinazohusiana na muundo wao wa propaganda. Kwanza tunaweka mitindo ya microblogu ya miti ya kutangazwa na miti ya propaganda, ambayo inatoa alama muhimu kuhusu namna ujumbe wa asili unavyosambazwa na kutengenezwa kwa muda. Kisha tunapendekeza mbinu yenye kiini kinachoitwa mti wa Utagaji Kernel, ambayo inachukua mitindo ya juu inayotofautiana na aina tofauti za uvumi kwa kutathmini sawa kati ya miundombinu ya miti ya propaganda. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na takwimu mbili za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa kwa kutumia kernel zinaweza kugundua tetesi kwa haraka na kwa sahihi zaidi ya mifano ya uvumi wa sanaa.', 'tr': 'Nähili ýalňyş haberler sosyal medýýatlar bilen döwürülýär? Onuň ösümlik nusgasy hakyky hekaýalardan nähili üýtgeşýär? Bu kagyzda, sözleri tanamak kynçylygyny çözmekde synanyşýarys, diýi ýalňyş maglumatlar, mikroblog postalarynyň propagasyon düzeninde daşarylan meselelerini çözmäge synanyşýarys. Biz ilkinji gezek mikroblog postalaryny döwürme agaçlary bilen wajyplaşýarys. Bu meseleň başlangyç meseleniň nähili gönderilýäni we öwrülişýäni barada deňli pikirleri saýlaýarlar. Biz kernel tabanlı bir yöntemi Propagasyon Tree Kernel adlandırıyoruz. Bu şekilde yüksek sıralar şekillerini propagasyon agaç yapıları arasynda farklı şekilleri çözerek farklı şekilleri çözerek düzenleyir. Gerçek dünýäde 2 sany veri setiriniň netijesi kernel ýagdaýynda görkezilen çykyşlary çalt we dogry bir şekilde tapyp biler.', 'id': 'Bagaimana kabar palsu menjadi viral melalui media sosial? Bagaimana pola propagasinya berbeda dari cerita nyata? Dalam kertas ini, kami mencoba untuk mengatasi masalah mengenai identifikasi rumor, yaitu informasi palsu, dari pos mikroblog berdasarkan struktur propagasi mereka. Kami pertama-tama model mikroblog posting diffusion dengan pohon propagasi, yang menyediakan petunjuk berharga tentang bagaimana pesan asli diterima dan dikembangkan melalui waktu. We then propose a kernel-based method called Propagation Tree Kernel, which captures high-order patterns differentiating different types of rumors by evaluating the similarities between their propagation tree structures.  Hasil eksperimental pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan berdasarkan kernel dapat mendeteksi rumor lebih cepat dan akurat daripada model deteksi rumor terbaik.', 'sq': 'Si lajmet e rreme bëhen virale nëpërmjet mediave sociale? Si ndryshon modeli i përhapjes nga historitë e vërteta? Në këtë letër, ne përpiqemi të trajtojmë problemin e identifikimit të thashethemeve, pra, informacioneve të rreme, nga postet e mikroblogut bazuar në strukturën e tyre të përhapjes. Ne së pari modelin e mikroblogut poston diffuzionin me pemët e përhapjes, të cilat ofrojnë udhëzime të vlefshme se si një mesazh origjinal transmetohet dhe zhvillohet me kalimin e kohës. Pastaj propozojmë një metodë bazuar në bërthamë të quajtur Kernel i Pemës së Propagacionit, i cili kapon modele të rendit të lartë që diferencojnë lloje të ndryshme të thashethemeve duke vlerësuar ngjashmëritë midis strukturave të tyre të pemës së përhapjes. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash të botës reale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar bazuar në bërthamë mund të zbulojë thashethemet më shpejt dhe me saktësi se modelet e zbulimit të thashethemeve më të moderne.', 'ko': '가짜 뉴스는 어떻게 소셜 미디어를 통해 전파합니까?그것의 전파 모델은 실제 이야기와 어떤 차이가 있습니까?본고에서 우리는 웨이보 게시물의 전파 구조에 따라 웨이보 게시물에서 헛소문(즉 허위정보)을 식별하는 문제를 해결하고자 한다.우리는 먼저 전파 트리로 마이크로 블로그 게시물의 확산을 모의하는데 이것은 원시 정보의 전파와 발전에 가치 있는 단서를 제공했다.그 다음에 우리는 핵을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 제시했다. 이를 전파수핵이라고 하는데 이 방법은 전파수 구조 간의 유사성을 평가함으로써 서로 다른 유형의 유언비어를 구분하는 고급 모델을 포획한다.두 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 기존의 루머 검출 모델에 비해 내부 핵을 바탕으로 하는 방법은 루머를 더욱 빠르고 정확하게 검출할 수 있다.', 'hy': "Ինչպե՞ս են կեղծ նորությունները տարածվում սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների միջոցով: Ինչպե՞ս է դրա տարբերվում իրական պատմություններից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք փորձում ենք լուծել խոսքերի հայտնաբերման խնդիրը, այսինքն' կեղծ տեղեկատվություն, միկրոբլոգի գրքերից, հիմնված իրենց տարածման կառուցվածքի վրա: Մենք առաջին հերթին միկրոբլոգերի մոդելը դիֆուզիան տեղադրում է տարածման ծառերի հետ, որոնք արժեքավոր հնարավորություններ են տալիս այն մասին, թե ինչպես է սկզբնական հաղորդագրությունը փոխանցվում և զարգացվում ժամանակի ընթացքում: Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք միջուկից հիմնված մեթոդ, որը կոչվում է Փրոգագացիոն ծառի միջուկը, որը վերցնում է բարձր կարգչային կաղապարներ, որոնք տարբեր տեսակի ձայներ են տարբերվում՝ գնահատելով իրենց տարածման ծառի կառուցվածքների նմանությունները: Երկու իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նախագծված միջուկային մոտեցումը կարող է հայտնաբերել հնչյունները ավելի արագ և ճշգրիտ, քան ամենաբարձր հնչյունների հայտնաբերման մոդելները:", 'am': 'የውሸት ዜና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ እንዴት ይሄዳል? How does its propagation pattern differ from real stories?  በዚህ ካላት፣ የውሸት መረጃዎችን በማሳየት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የማክሮቦክ ሚክሮቦክ አካባቢ ፕሮግራም ዛፎች የግንኙነት አካል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም Propagation Tree Kernel የሚባል የኪርኔል ሥርዓት፣ የልዩ ልዩ ወሬዎችን በተለየ የኩነቶች ሥርዓቶች በpropaganda ዛፍ አካባቢዎች መካከል በሚመስል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሁለት እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ የመፈተናው ፍሬዎች የኬርኔል-based ሥርዓት ከሀገር-አርጤው ውጤት አዋቂዎችን እንዲያረጋግጥ ፈጥኖ እና በትክክል እንዲያረጋግጥ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Necə sahte xəbərlər sosyal media vasitəsilə viral olur? Onun propagasyon nümunəsi həqiqət hekayələrindən necə fərqli ola bilər? Bu kağızda, biz səsləri tanıtmaq məqsədilə, yanlış məlumatları, onların propagasyon strukturlarına dayanan mikroblog məlumatlarından çəkinməyə çalışırıq. Biz ilk dəfə mikroblog postalarını propagasyon ağacları ilə döyüşdürmək üçün modelləşdiririk ki, bu məlumatların başlangıç mesajının necə tərəfindən yayıldığını və zaman boyunca yayıldığını anlayırlar. Daha sonra, propagasyon a ğacı ağacı Kernel adlı nümunə təklif edirik. Bu, yüksək sıralar örtüklərini çəkir, müxtəlif söhbətlərdən fərqləndirir. İki həqiqət dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin təcrübəsi kernel tərəfindən olan təcrübələrin səslərini daha hızlı və daha doğru tanıdığını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Koliko lažne vijesti idu virusom društvenih medija? Kako se njegov propagacijski obrazac razlikuje od stvarnih priča? U ovom papiru pokušavamo riješiti problem identifikacije glasina, tj. lažne informacije, iz mikroblogskih postaja na temelju njihove strukture propagacije. Prvo modeliramo mikroblogske postave širenja sa propagacijskim drvećem, koje pružaju vrijedne tragove o tome kako se originalna poruka prenosi i razvija tijekom vremena. Onda predlažemo metodu na kernel-based pod nazivom Kernel Proagacijskog drveta, koja uključuje visokoredne obrasce koji diferenciraju različite vrste glasina procjenjujući sličnosti između njihovih struktura propagacijskog drveta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da predloženi pristup na kernel može otkriti glasine brže i preciznije od modela otkrivanja glasina.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের মাধ্যমে কিভাবে মিথ্যা সংবাদ চলছে? তার প্রচারাভিযানটি কিভাবে সত্যিকারের গল্প থেকে পার্থক্য হয়? এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গুজব চিহ্নিত করার চেষ্টা করছি, যেমন মাইক্রোব্লগের মাইক্রোব্লগ পোস্ট থেকে তাদের প্রচারাভিযান কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্ প্রথমে আমরা মাইক্রোব্লগের মডেল পোস্ট প্রচারণা গাছের মাধ্যমে বিভ্রান্তি পোস্ট করি, যা প্রচারণা গাছের মূল্যবান কিভাবে একটি মূল তারপর আমরা একটি কের্নেল ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যার নাম প্রপ্রচারণা গাছের কাঠামোর মধ্যে একই ধরনের বিভিন্ন গুজবের মাধ্যমে তাদের প্রচারণা গাছের মা প্রস্তাবিত কেরেল ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি দ্রুত এবং সঠিকভাবে গুজব সনাক্ত করার পরিফল দুই বিশ্বের তথ্যের ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে যে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প গুজব', 'ca': "Com es fan virals les notícies falses a través dels mitjans socials? Com diferèn el seu patró de propagació de les històries reals? En aquest article intentem abordar el problema d'identificar rumors, és a dir, informació falsa, de publicacions de microblogs basades en la seva estructura de propagació. En primer lloc, modelem publicacions de microblogs de difusió amb arbres de propagació, que proporcionen indicis valiosos sobre com es transmit i desenvolupa un missatge original al llarg del temps. We then propose a kernel-based method called Propagation Tree Kernel, which captures high-order patterns differentiating different types of rumors by evaluating the similarities between their propagation tree structures.  Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades del món real demostren que l'enfocament proposat basat en el núcleu pot detectar rumors més ràpidament i exactament que els models de detecció de rumors més avançats.", 'af': "Hoe falske nuus virus deur sosiale media gaan? Hoe verander sy propagasie patroon van regte stories? In hierdie papier probeer ons die probleem van die identifiseer van rumore, t.d. falske inligting, uit mikroblog pos gebaseer op hul propagasie-struktuur. Ons model eerste mikroblog pos verspreiding met propagasie bome wat waardelike kloue verskaf oor hoe 'n oorspronklike boodskap oor tyd gestuur word en ontwikkel word. Ons voorstel dan 'n kernel-gebaseerde metode wat genoem word Propagasie Boom Kernel, wat vang hoë-volgorde patrone wat verskillende tipes rumors deur die gelykenisse tussen hul propagasie boom strukture te evalueer. Eksperimentale resultate op twee reël wêreld datastelle bevestig dat die voorgestelde kernel-gebaseerde toegang kan spesifiseer rumore meer vinniger en presies as state-of-the-art rumor detection models.", 'cs': 'Jak jsou falešné zprávy virální prostřednictvím sociálních médií? Jak se jeho šíření liší od reálných příběhů? V tomto článku se snažíme řešit problém identifikace fámů, tedy falešných informací, z mikroblogových příspěvků na základě jejich šíření. Nejprve modelujeme difuzi mikroblogových příspěvků s propagačními stromy, které poskytují cenné vodítko o tom, jak je originální zpráva přenášena a vyvíjena v průběhu času. Následně navrhujeme metodu založenou na jádru s názvem Jádro propagačního stromu, která zachycuje vzorce vysokého řádu odlišující různé typy pověstí hodnocením podobnosti mezi jejich strukturami propagačních stromů. Experimentální výsledky na dvou skutečných datových sadách ukazují, že navržený přístup založený na jádru dokáže detekovat pověsti rychleji a přesněji než moderní modely detekce pověstí.', 'et': 'Kuidas valeuudised muutuvad sotsiaalmeedia kaudu viiruslikuks? Kuidas erineb selle levimuster reaalsetest lugudest? Käesolevas töös püüame käsitleda kõlakate ehk valeinfo tuvastamise probleemi mikroblogipostitustest nende levimisstruktuuri alusel. Esiteks modelleerime mikroblogipostituste difusiooni paljunduspuudega, mis annavad väärtuslikke vihjeid selle kohta, kuidas algne sõnum aja jooksul edastatakse ja arendatakse. Seejärel pakume välja tuumapõhise meetodi nimega Propagation Tree Kernel, mis tabab kõrge järjekorra mustreid, mis eristavad erinevaid kuulujutte, hinnates nende paljunduspuustruktuuride sarnasust. Kahe reaalmaailma andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud tuumapõhine lähenemine suudab avastada kuulujutte kiiremini ja täpsemalt kui kaasaegsed kuulujutte tuvastamise mudelid.', 'fi': 'Miten valeuutiset leviävät sosiaalisen median kautta? Miten sen leviäminen kuvio eroaa todellisista tarinoista? Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme käsittelemään ongelmaa, joka liittyy huhujen eli väärennettyjen tietojen tunnistamiseen mikroblogiviesteistä niiden leviämisrakenteen perusteella. Ensin mallinnamme mikroblogipostausten diffuusiota lisääntymispuilla, jotka antavat arvokkaita vihjeitä siitä, miten alkuperäinen viesti välittyy ja kehittyy ajan myötä. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme ydinpohjaista menetelmää nimeltä Propagation Tree Kernel, joka kerää korkean järjestyksen kuvioita, jotka erottavat erilaisia huhuja arvioimalla niiden lisääntymispuurakenteiden yhtäläisyyksiä. Kokeelliset tulokset kahdesta reaalimaailman aineistosta osoittavat, että ehdotettu ydinpohjainen lähestymistapa pystyy havaitsemaan huhut nopeammin ja täsmällisemmin kuin uusimmat huhuntunnistusmallit.', 'jv': "Piye perkaran uwis mangan wae, nganggo media sothik ? Piye nganggo maneh sing paling kelas nang pasar iki ? Nang mapun iki, kéné saiki urip ngbote kanggo ngilangno langgar wiyandik, t.i. informasi lahiré, ono langgar blas, dadi miklog sing basa supra èstriktura awakdhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sistem mikro-sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan karo ngono nggawe barang kelas barang nggawe barang bongkar bongkar bongkar tindakan ngerwih perusahaan sugih lan didasakno We, after that, proposal a Kernel-bazed method to be used as profacation Grid Kernel, that Captes height-order patterns separated from the types of rumor by asserting the Simlarityans amongst their profacation string. It's a basic tool for refining and refining from that macro. R", 'ha': "Yãya lãbãrin ƙarya ke tafiya a tsakanin mitandai da jamii? Yãya ne misalinsa ya sãɓã daga lãbãran gaskiya? Ga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba mu bayana masu ganin ƙarya, misali, information na ƙarya, daga maigo misalin microlog a kan salon da bakin bayanin su. @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan kuma Muke buɗa wata hanyoyi a kan kernel, kalmar itãce na Anarwa Kernl, wadda ke riƙon wasu shiryoyi masu sarrafa da rarrabe nau'i-nau'i-nau'i, da kuma Mu ƙaddara misãlai tsakanin itãce na sifarwa. Matarin jarrabãwa ta kan danna biyu masu cikin duniya biyu na gaske sun nuna cewa, hanyoyin wanda aka ƙayyade wajen kernel, yana iya iya gane gaura masu sauri ko da gaske ko misalin-misalin-kunna-sanar.", 'sk': 'Kako lažne novice postanejo virusne prek socialnih omrežij? Kako se njegov vzorec razmnoževanja razlikuje od resničnih zgodb? V tem prispevku poskušamo rešiti problem prepoznavanja govoric, tj. lažnih informacij, iz objav v mikroblogu na podlagi njihove strukture širjenja. Najprej modeliramo difuzijo objav mikroblogov z razmnoževalnimi drevesi, ki dajejo dragocene namige o tem, kako se izvirno sporočilo prenaša in razvija skozi čas. Nato predlagamo metodo, ki temelji na jedru, imenovano Propagation Tree Kernel, ki zajema vzorce visokega reda, ki razlikujejo različne vrste govoric z ocenjevanjem podobnosti med njihovimi strukturami razmnoževanja dreves. Eksperimentalni rezultati dveh resničnih naborov podatkov kažejo, da lahko predlagani pristop, ki temelji na jedru, hitreje in natančneje zazna govorice kot najsodobnejši modeli za zaznavanje govoric.', 'he': 'איך חדשות מזויפות נעשות וירוסיות דרך תקשורת חברתית? איך דפוס ההתפתחות שלו שונה מסיפורים אמיתיים? בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מנסים להתמודד עם הבעיה של זיהוי שמועות, כלומר מידע מזויף, מתוך פרסומות מיקרובלוג מבוססים על מבנה ההרבות שלהם. ראשית, אנחנו מודל מיקרובלוג פורסמים דיפוזיה עם עצי התרבות, שמספקים רמזים ערובים על איך הודעה מקורית משדרת ופתחה במהלך הזמן. ואז אנו מציעים שיטה מבוססת על גרעין שנקראת גרעין עץ ההתנהגות, שמתפסה דפוסים סדר גבוה שמפרשים סוגים שונים של שמועות על ידי הערכה של הדומיות בין מבני עץ ההתנגדות שלהם. תוצאות ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראות שהגישה המבוססת על הגרעין המוצעת יכולה לגלות שמועות במהירות ובדיוק יותר ממודלים של גילוי שמועות חדשים.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལས་ཇི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ལས་བརླག་པ་རེད། དེའི་འཕར་རིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་འདྲ་ཡིན་ནམ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཙུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་མཁན་དབུགས་གཙང་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་པས། We then propose a kernel-based method called Propagation Tree Kernel, which captures high-order patterns differentiating different types of rumors by evaluating the similarities between their propagation tree structures. Experimental results on two real-world datasets demonstrate that the proposed kernel-based approach can detect rumors more quickly and accurately than state-of-the-art rumor detection models.'}
{'en': 'EmoNet : Fine-Grained Emotion Detection with Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ar': 'EmoNet: اكتشاف دقيق للعاطفة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية المتكررة ذات البوابات', 'es': 'eMonet: detección detallada de emociones con redes neuronales recurrentes cerradas', 'fr': 'EMOnet\xa0: détection fine des émotions grâce à des réseaux neuronaux récurrents déclenchés', 'pt': 'EmoNet: Detecção de emoções refinadas com redes neurais recorrentes fechadas', 'ja': 'EmoNet ：ゲーテッド・リカレント・ニューラル・ネットワークによる細かい疲労感情の検出', 'zh': 'EmoNet:用门控递归神经网络细粒度情', 'hi': 'EmoNet: गेटेड आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ ठीक दानेदार भावना का पता लगाने', 'ru': 'EmoNet: обнаружение мелкозернистых эмоций с помощью синхронных рекуррентных нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'EmoNet: Brath Mothúcháin Mínghráthaithe le Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha Gated', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'EmoNet: finomszemélyes érzelmek felismerése kapcsolt ismétlődő ideghálózatokkal', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων με κλειστά επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα', 'it': 'EmoNet: rilevamento delle emozioni a grana fine con reti neurali ricorrenti Gated', 'kk': 'EmoNet: Қайталанған невралдық желілерден қайталанатын көңіл күйін анықтау', 'mk': 'EmoNet: Детектирање на фини емоции со вратени неурални мрежи', 'lt': 'EmoNet: fine-grained emotion detection with Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'mt': 'EmoNet: Sejbien ta’ Emożizzjoni b’Ħruġ Fin b’Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti Miġbura', 'no': 'Comment', 'ml': 'എമോയ്നെറ്റ്: ഗേറ്റ് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി നല്ല- ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് ഗ്രേഡ് ഡിറ്റ', 'ms': 'EmoNet: Pengesanan Emosi Terbenih Dengan Rangkaian Neural Berulang Gerbang', 'mn': 'EmoNet', 'sr': 'EmoNet: Fino-gravirana detekcija emocija sa povratnim neuronskim mrežama', 'si': 'EmoNet: හොඳ- ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් භාවිතාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ආයුතික න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සමග', 'ro': 'EmoNet: Detectarea emoțiilor cu granule fine cu rețele neurale recurente închise', 'so': 'EmoNet: Fine-Grained Diotion with Gated Recurrent Neural Network', 'sv': 'EmoNet: Finkornig känslodetektering med slutna återkommande neurala nätverk', 'pl': 'EmoNet: drobnoziarniste wykrywanie emocji za pomocą Gated Recurrent Neuroral Networks', 'ta': 'EmoNet: சிறந்த- பிரித்த உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மீண்டும் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்களுடன்', 'ur': 'ایمونیٹ: اچھا گرینڈ ایموٹ\u200cशन شناسایی جو جمع ہونے والی نیورال نیٹورک کے ساتھ ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Emonet: fine-bốc đồng trinh sát với tập hợp các mạng thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Финозърнесто откриване на емоции с затворени повтарящи се невронни мрежи', 'hr': 'EmoNet: Fino-gravirana detekcija emocija s prikupljenim ponovnim neuronskim mrežama', 'nl': 'EmoNet: Fijnkorrelige emotionele detectie met Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'da': 'EmoNet: Finkornet følelsesdetektion med Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'de': 'EmoNet: Feinkörnige Emotionserkennung mit Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ko': 'EmoNet: 게이트웨이 재귀환 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 세립도 감정 검출', 'id': 'EmoNet: Deteksi Emosi Terbenih Dengan Rangkaian Neural Berulang Gerbang', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'EmoNet: Utafiti mzuri wa Tambulio na Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'EmoNet:Gated Recurrent Neural Networks ile Fine-Grained Emotion Detection', 'sq': 'EmoNet: Fine-Grained Emotion Detection with Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'am': 'የኢሜይል መረብ', 'hy': 'EmoNet. Լավագույն զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը վերջնական նյարդային ցանցերով', 'az': 'EmoNet', 'bn': 'এমোনেট: গেট পুনরাবৃত্তিক নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে ভালো গ্রেফতার করা Emotion Detection', 'ca': 'EmoNet: Fine-Grained Emotion Detection with Gated Recurrent Neural Networks', 'cs': 'EmoNet: jemnozrnná detekce emocí s bráněnými recidivními neuronovými sítěmi', 'et': 'EmoNet: peeneteraline emotsioonide tuvastamine värvitud korduvate närvivõrkudega', 'bs': 'EmoNet: Fino-gravirana detekcija emocija sa prikupljenim ponovnim neuronskim mrežama', 'fi': 'EmoNet: Hienorakeinen tunteiden tunnistus suljetuilla toistuvilla hermoverkoilla', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'EmoNet: drobnozrnato zaznavanje čustev z zaprtimi ponavljajočimi se živčnimi omrežji', 'jv': 'EMOnet: Fine-Graining emutation detection with gated recurring Neral Network', 'bo': 'EmoNet: Fine-Grained Emotion Detection with Gated Recurrent Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'Accurate detection of emotion from natural language has applications ranging from building emotional chatbots to better understanding individuals and their lives. However, progress on emotion detection has been hampered by the absence of large labeled datasets. In this work, we build a very large dataset for fine-grained emotions and develop deep learning models on it. We achieve a new state-of-the-art on 24 fine-grained types of emotions (with an average accuracy of 87.58 %). We also extend the task beyond emotion types to model Robert Plutick’s 8 primary emotion dimensions, acquiring a superior accuracy of 95.68 %.', 'ar': 'الكشف الدقيق عن المشاعر من اللغة الطبيعية له تطبيقات تتراوح من بناء روبوتات محادثة عاطفية إلى فهم أفضل للأفراد وحياتهم. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم إعاقة التقدم في اكتشاف المشاعر بسبب عدم وجود مجموعات بيانات كبيرة معنونة. في هذا العمل ، نبني مجموعة بيانات كبيرة جدًا للعواطف الدقيقة ونطور نماذج التعلم العميق عليها. نحقق أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في 24 نوعًا من المشاعر الدقيقة (بمتوسط دقة 87.58٪). قمنا أيضًا بتوسيع المهمة إلى ما وراء أنواع المشاعر لنمذجة أبعاد المشاعر الأساسية الثمانية لروبرت بلوتيك ، والحصول على دقة فائقة تبلغ 95.68٪.', 'es': 'La detección precisa de emociones a partir del lenguaje natural tiene aplicaciones que van desde la creación de chatbots emocionales hasta una mejor comprensión de las personas y sus vidas. Sin embargo, el progreso en la detección de emociones se ha visto obstaculizado por la ausencia de grandes conjuntos de datos etiquetados. En este trabajo, construimos un conjunto de datos muy grande para emociones detalladas y desarrollamos modelos de aprendizaje profundo sobre él. Logramos un nuevo estado de la técnica en 24 tipos de emociones de grano fino (con una precisión promedio del 87,58%). También ampliamos la tarea más allá de los tipos de emociones para modelar las 8 dimensiones de emociones principales de Robert Plutick, adquiriendo una precisión superior del 95,68%.', 'pt': 'A detecção precisa de emoção a partir da linguagem natural tem aplicações que vão desde a construção de chatbots emocionais até a melhor compreensão dos indivíduos e de suas vidas. No entanto, o progresso na detecção de emoções foi dificultado pela ausência de grandes conjuntos de dados rotulados. Neste trabalho, construímos um conjunto de dados muito grande para emoções refinadas e desenvolvemos modelos de aprendizado profundo nele. Alcançamos um novo estado da arte em 24 tipos de emoções refinadas (com uma precisão média de 87,58%). Também estendemos a tarefa além dos tipos de emoção para modelar as 8 dimensões primárias de emoção de Robert Plutick, adquirindo uma precisão superior de 95,68%.', 'fr': "La détection précise des émotions à partir du langage naturel a des applications allant de la création de chatbots émotionnels à une meilleure compréhension des individus et de leur vie. Cependant, les progrès en matière de détection des émotions ont été entravés par l'absence de grands ensembles de données étiquetés. Dans ce travail, nous construisons un très grand ensemble de données pour les émotions fines et développons des modèles d'apprentissage profond à partir de celui-ci. Nous atteignons une nouvelle technologie sur 24 types d'émotions à grain fin (avec une précision moyenne de 87,58\xa0%). Nous étendons également la tâche au-delà des types d'émotions pour modéliser les 8 dimensions principales des émotions de Robert Plutick, en obtenant une précision supérieure de 95,68\xa0%.", 'ja': '自然言語からの感情の正確な検出には、感情的なチャットボットの構築から、個人とその生活をよりよく理解するまでのさまざまなアプリケーションがあります。しかしながら、感情検出の進捗は、大きなラベル付けされたデータセットの不在によって妨げられている。この研究では、微細な感情のための非常に大きなデータセットを構築し、それに基づいて深層学習モデルを開発します。私たちは、24種類の細かい感情（平均精度87.58 ％ ）で新しい最先端を達成しています。また、ロバート・プルーティックの8つの主要な感情次元をモデル化するために、感情の種類を超えてタスクを拡張し、95.68 ％の優れた精度を獲得しました。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा से भावनाओं का सटीक पता लगाने में भावनात्मक चैटबॉट्स के निर्माण से लेकर व्यक्तियों और उनके जीवन को बेहतर ढंग से समझने तक के अनुप्रयोग हैं। हालांकि, भावना का पता लगाने पर प्रगति बड़े लेबल डेटासेट की अनुपस्थिति से बाधित हुई है। इस काम में, हम ठीक-ठाक भावनाओं के लिए एक बहुत बड़ा डेटासेट बनाते हैं और उस पर गहरे सीखने के मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। हम 24 महीन प्रकार की भावनाओं (87.58% की औसत सटीकता के साथ) पर एक नया अत्याधुनिक प्राप्त करते हैं। हम रॉबर्ट प्लूटिक के 8 प्राथमिक भावना आयामों को मॉडल करने के लिए भावना प्रकारों से परे कार्य का विस्तार भी करते हैं, 95.68% की बेहतर सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '自然语言中准检情有自构情聊天机器人更知生活之用。 然以乏大标数据集,情检进阻。 于此为细粒度情构大数集,并开深学模形。 吾于24种细粒度情绪类型最先进之术(均准确率为87.58%)。 广之于情类之外,罗伯特·普鲁蒂克(Robert Plutick)之于8,维度之于建模,而获95.68%之卓准确率。', 'ru': 'Точное обнаружение эмоций от естественного языка имеет приложения, начиная от создания эмоциональных чат-ботов до лучшего понимания людей и их жизни. Тем не менее, прогресс в обнаружении эмоций был затруднен из-за отсутствия больших маркированных наборов данных. В этой работе мы строим очень большой набор данных для мелкозернистых эмоций и разрабатываем на нем модели глубокого обучения. Мы достигли нового уровня на 24 мелкозернистых типах эмоций (со средней точностью 87,58%). Мы также расширяем задачу за пределы типов эмоций, чтобы смоделировать 8 основных измерений эмоций Роберта Плутика, получая превосходную точность 95,68%.', 'ga': 'Tá feidhm ag baint le braite cruinn na mothúchán ó theanga nádúrtha, ó chatbots mothúcháin a thógáil go dtí tuiscint níos fearr ar dhaoine aonair agus ar a saol. Mar sin féin, tá bac curtha ar dhul chun cinn ar bhrath mothúcháin mar gheall ar easpa tacair sonraí lipéadaithe móra. San obair seo, tógaimid tacar sonraí an-mhór do mhothúcháin mhíne agus forbraimid múnlaí domhainfhoghlama air. Bainimid amach staid nua-aimseartha ar 24 cineál mothúcháin mhíne (le meánchruinneas 87.58%). Déanaimid an tasc a leathnú níos faide ná cineálacha mothúcháin freisin chun 8 bpríomhthoise mothúcháin Robert Plutic a shamhaltú, ag fáil cruinneas níos fearr de 95.68%.', 'ka': 'ჩემი ენერგიდან ემოციების წარმოდგენა, რომელიც ემოციონალური კატბოტების შექმნა იქნება, რომელიც ემოციონალური კატბოტების შექმნა უფრო უფრო უფ მაგრამ ემოციონის განახლების პროგრესი გადარჩენა დიდი მონაცემების არსებობით. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ძალიან დიდი მონაცემების საზოგადო ემოციებისთვის შევქმნით და გავაკეთებთ ძალიან დიდი მონაცემები. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ახალი სურათის შესახებ 24 ფუნქტური ემოციების ტიპზე (სინამდვილეში 87,58%). ჩვენ ასევე ემოციონის ტიპების განმავლობაში დავზრდით 8 პირველი ემოციონის განმავლობაში რობორტ პლუსტიკის მოდელზე, რომლებიც 95,68% უფრო მარტივია მივიღეთ.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek pontos felismerése a természetes nyelvből olyan alkalmazásokat tartalmaz, amelyek az érzelmi chatbotok építésétől kezdve az egyének és életük jobb megértéséig terjednek. Az érzelmek felismerésének előrehaladását azonban akadályozta a nagy címkézett adatkészletek hiánya. Ebben a munkában nagyon nagy adatkészletet építünk a finomszemcsés érzelmekhez, és mélytanulási modelleket dolgozunk ki rajta. 24 finomszemcsés érzelemtípuson (átlagosan 87,58%-os pontossággal) új korszerűséget érünk el. Továbbá kiterjesztjük a feladatot az érzelmek típusain túl Robert Plutick 8 elsődleges érzelmi dimenziójának modellezésére, és 95,68%-os pontosságot érünk el.', 'el': 'Η ακριβής ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων από τη φυσική γλώσσα έχει εφαρμογές που κυμαίνονται από την κατασκευή συναισθηματικών μέχρι την καλύτερη κατανόηση των ατόμων και της ζωής τους. Ωστόσο, η πρόοδος στην ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων παρεμποδίζεται από την απουσία μεγάλων ετικετών συνόλων δεδομένων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χτίζουμε ένα πολύ μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων για λεπτά συναισθήματα και αναπτύσσουμε μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης πάνω σε αυτό. Επιτυγχάνουμε μια νέα υπερσύγχρονη κατάσταση σε 24 λεπτόκοκκους τύπους συναισθημάτων (με μέση ακρίβεια 87,58%). Επίσης επεκτείνουμε το έργο πέρα από τους τύπους συναισθημάτων για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τις 8 βασικές διαστάσεις συναισθημάτων του Ρόμπερτ Πλούτικ, αποκτώντας μια ανώτερη ακρίβεια 95.68%.', 'it': "Il rilevamento accurato delle emozioni dal linguaggio naturale ha applicazioni che vanno dalla costruzione di chatbot emotivi alla migliore comprensione degli individui e delle loro vite. Tuttavia, i progressi nel rilevamento delle emozioni sono stati ostacolati dall'assenza di grandi set di dati etichettati. In questo lavoro, costruiamo un set di dati molto ampio per le emozioni a grana fine e sviluppiamo modelli di deep learning su di esso. Otteniamo un nuovo stato dell'arte su 24 tipi di emozioni a grana fine (con una precisione media dell'87,58%). Estendiamo anche il compito oltre i tipi di emozioni per modellare le 8 dimensioni emotive primarie di Robert Plutick, acquisendo una precisione superiore del 95,68%.", 'lt': 'Tikrasis emocijų nustatymas iš natūralios kalbos apima programas, nuo emocinių chatbotų kūrimo iki geresnio asmenų ir jų gyvenimo supratimo. Tačiau pažangą emocijų nustatymo srityje trukdė didelių pažymėtų duomenų rinkinių nebuvimas. In this work, we build a very large dataset for fine-grained emotions and develop deep learning models on it.  Mes pasiekiame naujausią pažangą 24 smulkiai grūdintų emocijų rūšims (vidutiniškai tiksliai 87,58 %). Mes taip pat išplečiame užduotį ne tik emocinių tipų, bet ir modeliuojame 8 pagrindinius Robert Plutick emocinius matmenis, įgyjant didesnį tikslumą 95,68 %.', 'mk': "Точното детекција на емоциите од природниот јазик има апликации кои се движат од градење емоционални чатботи до подобро разбирање на поединците и нивните животи. Сепак, напредокот во детекцијата на емоциите е попречен од отсуството на големи обележани податоци. Во оваа работа изградуваме многу голем податок за фини емоции и развиваме модели за длабоко учење. Ние постигнуваме нова техничка состојба на 24 фино-зелени видови емоции (со просечна точност од 87,58 отсто). We also extend the task beyond emotion types to model Robert Plutick's 8 primary emotion dimensions, acquiring a superior accuracy of 95.68%.", 'kk': 'Табиғи тілден емоцияларды табу дұрыс, емоциялық шатботтарды құру үшін адамдарды және өмірін түсінуге болады. Бірақ емоцияларды анықтау үлкен деректер қорларының жоқ болмасын көмектеседі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз дұрыс емоциялар үшін өте үлкен деректер жинағын құрып, оның ішінде дұрыс оқыту үлгілерін жасаймыз. Біз 24 түрлі емоциялардың жаңа орындау күйін жеткіземіз (орташа дәл 87,58%). Сонымен қатар, біз тапсырманы эмоциялық түрлерінен артық, Роберт Плутик 8 негізгі эмоциялық өлшемдеріне өзгертеміз, 95,68% деген ең жақсы дұрыстығын аламыз.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan yang tepat emosi dari bahasa alam mempunyai aplikasi yang berlainan dari membina chatbot emosional hingga memahami lebih baik individu dan kehidupan mereka. Namun, kemajuan pengesan emosi telah diganggu oleh kekurangan set data yang diberi label besar. Dalam kerja ini, kami membina set data yang sangat besar untuk emosi yang baik dan mengembangkan model belajar dalam di dalamnya. Kami mencapai kemajuan baru pada 24 jenis emosi (dengan ketepatan rata-rata 87.58%). Kami juga memperluas tugas melampaui jenis emosi untuk model 8 dimensi emosi utama Robert Plutick, memperoleh ketepatan yang lebih tinggi 95.68%.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യക്തികളെയും ജീവനെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d  എന്നാലും, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പുരോഗതി വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഇല്ലാത്തതാല്\u200d ബാധിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ട്. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നല്ല വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പണിയുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന We achieve a new state-of-the-art on 24 fine-grained types of emotions (with an average accuracy of 87.58%).  റോബര്\u200dട്ട് പ്ലാട്ടിക്കിന്റെ 8 പ്രധാനപ്രാദേശികമായ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി നാം ജോലി വികമങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d വെച്ച്', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлээс сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тодорхойлолтыг тодорхойлох нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн бөмбөлөгүүдийг бүтээхээс илүү сайн ойлгох хүртэл хэрэгжүүлэгддэг. Гэвч сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийн ололтын хөгжлийг тодорхойлох нь том өгөгдлийн санд байхгүй байдлаар зогсоосон. Энэ ажил дээр бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөө маш том өгөгдлийн сан бүтээж, гүн гүнзгий суралцах загваруудыг хөгжүүлнэ. Бид 24 төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинэ урлагийн хувьд (дундаж 87.58%) тохиромжтой болсон. Мөн бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төрлөөс гадна үүнийг Роберт Плутик-ын 8 анхны сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэмжээсүүдийг загвар руу нэмэгдүүлж, 95.68% өндөр тохиромжтой байдаг.', 'pl': 'Dokładne wykrywanie emocji z języka naturalnego ma zastosowania, od budowy emocjonalnych chatbotów do lepszego zrozumienia jednostek i ich życia. Postęp w zakresie wykrywania emocji utrudnił jednak brak dużych oznaczonych zbiorów danych. W niniejszej pracy budujemy bardzo duży zbiór danych dotyczący drobnoziarnistych emocji i opracowujemy na nim modele głębokiego uczenia. Osiągamy nowy state-of-the-art w zakresie 24-drobnoziarnistych rodzajów emocji (o średniej dokładności 87,58%). Rozszerzamy również zadanie poza typy emocji, aby modelować 8-podstawowe wymiary emocji Roberta Pluticka, uzyskując doskonałą dokładność 95,68%.', 'ro': 'Detectarea exactă a emoțiilor din limbajul natural are aplicații care variază de la construirea de chatboți emoționali la o mai bună înțelegere a persoanelor și a vieții lor. Cu toate acestea, progresele în detectarea emoțiilor au fost împiedicate de absența unor seturi mari de date etichetate. În această lucrare, construim un set de date foarte mare pentru emoții fine și dezvoltăm modele de învățare profundă pe aceasta. Realizăm o nouă stare de ultimă oră pe 24 de tipuri de emoții cu granule fine (cu o acuratețe medie de 87,58%). De asemenea, extindem sarcina dincolo de tipurile emoționale pentru a modela cele 8 dimensiuni emoționale primare ale lui Robert Plutick, dobândind o precizie superioară de 95,68%.', 'no': 'Akkurat oppdaging av emosjonar frå naturspråk har programmer frå bygging av emosjonelle pratbottar til bedre forståking av individuar og livet sine. Dette er imidlertid framgang for oppdaging av emosjonar avbrytt av ingen stor datasett med merkelappen. I denne arbeiden bygger vi ein veldig stor dataset for fyrke følelser og utviklar dypt læringsmodeller på det. Vi oppnår eit nytt kunsttilstand på 24 fine-grained typar følelser (med gjennomsnittlig nøyaktighet på 87,58%). Vi utvidar også oppgåva utenfor emosjonstypar til modellen av 8 primære emosjonsdimensjonar i Robert Plutick, og hentar ein supernøyaktig av 95,68 %.', 'sr': 'Taèno otkrivanje emocija iz prirodnog jezika ima aplikacije od izgradnje emocionalnih govornica do boljeg razumevanja pojedinaca i njihovih života. Međutim, napredak u otkrivanju emocija je ometen odsustvom velikih označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, izgradimo veoma veliku kompletu podataka za fino zrno emocije i razvijamo duboke modele učenja na njemu. Postižemo novo stanje umjetnosti na 24 vrsta fine zrnca emocija (sa prosječnom preciznošću od 87,58%). Takoðe proširimo zadatak izvan emocionalnih tipa na model 8 primarnih emocija Robert a Plutika, dobivajuæi nadreðenu taènost od 95,68%.', 'so': "Si rasmi ah u ogaashada fikrada luqada dabiicadda ah waxay leedahay codsiyo ka duwan dhismaha hadalka emotional ee u wanaagsan garashada qofka iyo noloshooda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, horumarinta aqoonsiga emotion ayaa dhibaataysan la'aanta koox badan oo macluumaad la xiriiray. Shaqadan, waxaynu dhisnaa sawir aad u weyn oo loo qoray fikrada wanaagsan, waxaana ku horumarinnaa modelal waxbarasho aad u dheer. Waxaynu helnaa xaalad cusub oo farshaxan ah 24 noocyo wanaagsan oo la yaqaan (qiyaastii qiyaas ah 87,58 boqolkiiba). Sidoo kale waxaynu shaqada u fidinnaa noocyo kale oo aad u sameynayso noocyada xisaabta rasmiga ah ee Robert Plutick, waxayna heli lahaayeen saxda ugu sarreeya 95.68 boqolkiiba.", 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවෙන් හැඟීමක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තියෙනවා හැඟීමත් කතාබට්ටු නිර්මාණයෙන් හොඳට ප නමුත්, ලොකු ලේබල් තොරතුරු සැකසුම් නැති විශාල දත්ත හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි ගොඩක් ලොකු තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් හදන්නේ හොඳ හැඟීමක් සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වි අපි අළුත් තත්වයක් ලැබෙනවා වගේ හැඟීම් වර්ගයක් වගේ අලුත් තත්වයක්. අපි හැඟීම් වලින් වැඩ කරන්නේ රොබ්ටර්ට් ප්ලුටික්ගේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිතාවක් 8 විශේෂයෙන්, 95.68% වලින් විශේෂතාවක් ලැ', 'ta': 'Accurate detection of emotion from natural language has applications ranging from building emotional chatbots to better understanding individuals and their lives.  ஆனால், உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு முன்னேற்றம் பெரிய குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகள் இல்லை இந்த வேலையில், நாம் நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வுகளுக்கு ஒரு மிகவும் பெரிய தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவாக்கி அதில் ஆழமான கற்றுக 24 நன்றாக சிறப்பு பிடிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வுகளில் ஒரு புதிய நிலையை நாம் பெறுகிறோம் (சராசரி சரியான 87.58%). நாம் உணர்வு வகைகளுக்கு மேலான செயலை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் ராபர்ட் ப்ளாடிக்கின் 8 முதன்மை உணர்வு பரிமாணங்களை மாதிரிக்க, 95.68 சதவ', 'sv': 'Exakt detektering av känslor från naturligt språk har tillämpningar som sträcker sig från att bygga känslomässiga chatbots till att bättre förstå individer och deras liv. Framstegen när det gäller detektering av känslor har dock försvårats av avsaknaden av stora märkta datamängder. I detta arbete bygger vi ett mycket stort dataset för finkorniga känslor och utvecklar djupinlärningsmodeller på det. Vi uppnår en ny state-of-the-art på 24 finkorniga typer av känslor (med en genomsnittlig noggrannhet på 87,58%). Vi utökar också uppgiften bortom känslotyper till att modellera Robert Pluticks 8 primära känslodimensioner, vilket får en överlägsen noggrannhet på 95,68%.', 'mt': "L-iskoperta eżatta tal-emozzjoni mil-lingwa naturali għandha applikazzjonijiet li jvarjaw minn bini ta’ chatbots emozzjonali sa fehim aħjar tal-individwi u l-ħajjiet tagħhom. Madankollu, il-progress fl-identifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet kien imxekkel min-nuqqas ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ttikkettati kbar. In this work, we build a very large dataset for fine-grained emotions and develop deep learning models on it.  Aħna niksbu avvanz ġdid fuq 24 tip ta’ emozzjonijiet b’ħbub fin (b’preċiżjoni medja ta’ 87.58%). We also extend the task beyond emotion types to model Robert Plutick's 8 primary emotion dimensions, acquiring a superior accuracy of 95.68%.", 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان سے سیدھی احساسات کا اظہار کرنا ہے کہ احساساتی بات بنانے سے بہتر آدمیوں اور ان کی زندگی کو سمجھ سکتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ، احساسات شناسایی پر پیشرفت بڑی لابلیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے غیر موڑ گئی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک بہت بڑا ڈاٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں نیک دانے کے احساسات کے لئے اور اس پر عمیق سیکھنے کے نمونے پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی حالت آرتی کو 24 قسم کے مطابق احساسات پر پہنچ لیا ہے (معمولاً 87.58%). ہم نے بھی احساسات طریقوں سے زیادہ کام کو رابرٹ پلٹیکک کی 8 اصلی احساسات اندازے کی مدل تک پھیلایا ہے، 95.68% کے زیادہ بالاتر دقیق حاصل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Natalik tildan hissiyotni aniqlashni tasavvur qilish uchun emotional chatbotlarni quyidagi va odamlarning hayotini yaxshi o'rganish uchun dasturlar bor. Lekin, hissiyotni aniqlash muvaffaqiyatsiz katta maʼlumot tizimi yoʻq edi. Bu ishda, biz ajoyib hissiyotlar uchun juda katta maʼlumot tarkibini yaramiz va uning o'rganish modellarini o'rganamiz. Biz 24 yaxshi qo'llangan hissiyotlarda yangi sanat holatini bajaramiz (87.58 foiz bilan o'xshash mumkin). Biz esa hissiyotning turlaridan boshqa vazifani o'zgartiraymiz Robert Plutickning 8 asosiy hissiyotning chegarasini o'zgartiraymiz. 95.68%'ning eng yuqori imkoniyatini olib tashlash.", 'vi': 'Sự phát hiện chính xác cảm xúc từ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có các ứng dụng, từ việc xây dựng chat cảm xúc cho đến việc hiểu thấu cá nhân và cuộc sống của họ. Tuy nhiên, tiến độ khám phá cảm xúc đã bị cản trở bởi không có các tập tin lớn được đánh dấu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu rất lớn cho cảm xúc đặc biệt và phát triển các mô hình học sâu về nó. Chúng tôi đạt được một trạng thái mới trong các loại cảm xúc có kích cỡ 244 (với độ chính xác trung bình của 87.58=). Chúng tôi cũng mở rộng nhiệm vụ vượt xa các kiểu cảm xúc đến chiều dài cảm xúc của Robert Plucker. Nhận được độ chính xác cao cấp của 95.68 Name', 'nl': 'Nauwkeurige detectie van emoties uit natuurlijke taal heeft toepassingen variërend van het bouwen van emotionele chatbots tot het beter begrijpen van individuen en hun leven. De vooruitgang op het gebied van emotie detectie is echter belemmerd door het ontbreken van grote gelabelde datasets. In dit werk bouwen we een zeer grote dataset voor fijngranige emoties en ontwikkelen we daar deep learning modellen op. We bereiken een nieuwe state-of-the-art op 24-fijne soorten emoties (met een gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid van 87,58%). We breiden de taak verder uit dan emotietypes om Robert Pluticks 8-primaire emotietypes te modelleren, met een superieure nauwkeurigheid van 95,68%.', 'bg': 'Точното откриване на емоции от естествения език има приложения, вариращи от изграждане на емоционални чатботи до по-добро разбиране на индивида и техния живот. Напредъкът в откриването на емоции обаче е възпрепятстван от липсата на големи набори от данни с етикет. В тази работа изграждаме много голям набор от данни за фини емоции и разработваме модели за дълбоко учене върху него. Ние постигаме ново състояние на изкуството върху 24 фини вида емоции (със средна точност 87.58%). Също така разширяваме задачата отвъд типовете емоции, за да моделираме 8-те основни емоционални измерения на Робърт Плутик, придобивайки превъзходна точност от 95,68%.', 'da': 'Præcis detektion af følelser fra naturligt sprog har applikationer, der spænder fra opbygning af følelsesmæssige chatbots til bedre forståelse af enkeltpersoner og deres liv. Fremskridtene med hensyn til detektering af følelser er imidlertid blevet hæmmet af manglen på store mærkede datasæt. I dette arbejde bygger vi et meget stort datasæt for finkornede følelser og udvikler deep learning modeller på det. Vi opnår en ny state-of-the-art på 24 finkornede typer af følelser (med en gennemsnitlig nøjagtighed på 87,58%). Vi udvider også opgaven ud over følelsestyper til at modellere Robert Pluticks 8 primære følelsesdimensioner og opnå en overlegen nøjagtighed på 95,68%.', 'hr': 'Tačno otkrivanje emocija iz prirodnog jezika ima aplikacije od izgradnje emocionalnih govornica do boljeg razumijevanja pojedinaca i njihovih života. Međutim, napredak u otkrivanju emocija ometao je nedostatak velikih označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, izgradimo veoma veliku podatku za fino zrno emocije i razvijamo duboke modele učenja na njemu. Postigli smo novo stanje umjetnosti na 24 vrsta fine zrnca emocija (s prosječnom preciznošću od 87,58%). Također proširimo zadatak izvan vrsta emocija u model 8 primjernih emocija Robert a Pluticka, dobivajući nadmoćnu tačnost od 95,68%.', 'id': 'Deteksi yang tepat emosi dari bahasa alam memiliki aplikasi yang berasal dari membangun chatbot emosional hingga memahami lebih baik individu dan kehidupan mereka. Namun, kemajuan dalam deteksi emosi telah diganggu oleh ketidakhadiran set data yang besar. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami membangun dataset yang sangat besar untuk emosi yang sempurna dan mengembangkan model belajar dalam di dalamnya. Kami mencapai state-of-the-art baru pada 24 jenis emosi fine grained (dengan akurasi rata-rata 87,58%). Kami juga memperluas tugas melampaui tipe emosi untuk model 8 dimensi emosi utama Robert Plutick, mendapatkan akurasi yang lebih tinggi 95,68%.', 'de': 'Die genaue Erkennung von Emotionen aus natürlicher Sprache bietet Anwendungen, die vom Aufbau emotionaler Chatbots bis hin zum besseren Verständnis von Individuen und ihrem Leben reichen. Allerdings wurden Fortschritte bei der Emotionserkennung durch das Fehlen großer markierter Datensätze behindert. In dieser Arbeit bauen wir einen sehr großen Datensatz für feingranulare Emotionen auf und entwickeln daraus Deep Learning Modelle. Wir erreichen einen neuen Stand der Technik auf 24-feinkörnigen Arten von Emotionen (mit einer durchschnittlichen Genauigkeit von 87,58%). Wir erweitern auch die Aufgabe über Emotionstypen hinaus, um Robert Pluticks 8-primäre Emotionsdimensionen zu modellieren und erhalten eine überlegene Genauigkeit von 95,68%.', 'ko': '자연 언어에서 감정을 정확하게 측정하는 응용 범위는 감정 채팅 로봇을 구축하는 것부터 개인과 그의 생활을 더욱 잘 이해하는 것까지 다양하다.그러나 대형 표기 데이터 집합이 부족해 감정 검출의 진전이 지장을 받고 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 세립도 정서를 위해 매우 큰 데이터 집합을 구축했고 이를 바탕으로 심도 있는 학습 모델을 개발했다.우리는 24가지 세립도 정서 유형에서 새로운 수준에 이르렀다(평균 정확도는 87.58%).또한 Robert Plutick의 8가지 주요 감정 차원을 모델링하여 95.68%의 높은 정확도를 얻을 수 있도록 임무를 감정 유형 외에 확장했습니다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی دقیق احساسات از زبان طبیعی، کاربردهای از ساختن صحبت احساساتی به بهتر درک افراد و زندگیشان است. با این حال، پیشرفت روی شناسایی احساسات توسط absence of large labelled datasets محدود شده است. در این کار، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات بسیار بزرگ برای احساسات خوب دانه ساختیم و مدل یادگیری عمیق روی آن توسعه می کنیم. ما یک وضعیت هنر جدید در ۲۴ نوع احساسات قطعی (با دقیق متوسط 87.58%) رسیدیم. ما همچنین کار را فراتر از نوع احساسات به مدل ۸ بعدی اولین احساسات رابرت پلتیک گسترش می دهیم و دقیق بالاتر 95.68 درصد را دریافت می کنیم.', 'af': "Onbekende opdekking van emosies van natuurlike taal het toepassings van die bou van emosiele chatbots tot beter verstanding van individuele en hulle lewe. Maar, vordering op emosie-opdekking is gehamperer deur die absence van groot gemerkte datastel. In hierdie werk bou ons 'n baie groot datastel vir fyn-kornerede emosies en ontwikkel diep leer modele daarop. Ons bereik 'n nuwe staat van die kuns op 24 fyn-graad tipes emosie (met 'n gemiddelde presisie van 87,58%). Ons verleng ook die taak buite emosie tipes na model Robert Plutick se 8 primêre emosie-dimensies, met 'n superwaarheid van 95.68%.", 'sw': 'Kugundua hisia sahihi kutoka lugha ya asili ina matumizi yanayotoka kwenye kujenga mazungumzo ya hisia ili kuelewa vizuri watu na maisha yao. Hata hivyo, maendeleo kuhusu kutambua hisia yamekuwa yakiharibiwa na kutokuwepo kwa seti kubwa za taarifa zilizoonyeshwa. Katika kazi hii, tunajenga seti kubwa ya taarifa kwa hisia zenye vizuri na kutengeneza mifano ya kujifunza kwa kina. Tunapata hali mpya ya sanaa kwa aina 24 zenye hisia nzuri (kwa kiwango cha wastani wa asilimia 87.58). Kadhalika tunaongeza juhudi zaidi ya aina za hisia za kuonyesha vipimo 8 vya hisia za msingi wa Robert Plutick, kupata uhakika mkubwa wa asilimia 95.68.', 'tr': "Doýal dilinden duýgularyň tapylygyny takyklaşdyrmak üçin duýgym gürrüňleri bolup adamlaryny we durmuşyny gowylaşdyrmak üçin başlaýarlar. Ýöne, duýgy tanyşdyrylygynyň öňki näçe etiket edilen veri setirleriniň ýok bolmagy tarapyndan impelleşdirildi. Bu işde, duýgular üçin örän uly bir veri setir inşa edýäris we ol üstünde gaty uly öwrenme nusgalaryny döreýäris. Biz 24 iň tagamly duýgymlar bilen täze bir ýagdaý taýýarlapdyk (ortalama derejesi 87.58%). Biz hem duýgularyň hatlaryndan öňki zadyny Robert Plutick'iň 8 öňki duýgularyň hatlarynyň öränini örän uzatdyrýarys, 95.68% derejesinden üst tutup bileris.", 'sq': 'Zbulimi i saktë i emocioneve nga gjuha natyrore ka aplikime që shkojnë nga ndërtimi i chatbotëve emocionalë deri në kuptimin më të mirë të individëve dhe jetës së tyre. Megjithatë, përparimi në zbulimin e emocioneve është penguar nga mungesa e të dhënave të mëdha të etiketuara. Në këtë punë, ne ndërtojmë një grup të dhënash shumë të madhe për emocione të bukura dhe zhvillojmë modele mësimi të thellë në të. Ne arrijmë një state-of-the-art të ri në 24 lloje emocionesh të holla (me një saktësi mesatare 87.58%). Ne gjithashtu e zgjerojmë detyrën përtej llojeve të emocioneve për të modeluar 8 dimensionet kryesore të emocioneve të Robert Plutikut, duke fituar një saktësi më të lartë prej 95.68%.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ የተሰኘው የአስብሰባዊ ድምፅ እና ሕይወታቸውን ለማስተዋል የተለየ ተግባር አለበት፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የስብሰባ ማግኘት ግንኙነት በታላቅ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች ሳይኖር የተደገመ ነው፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ፣ ለጥልቅ አስተማርነት ምሳሌዎችን መሥራት እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ የ ሀብት አርእስት በ24 መልካም ዓይነቶች ላይ እናደርጋለን (በaverage እርግጠኛ 87.58 በመቶ) የቦርት ፕላቲክ 8 የፊደል እውቀት አካባቢውን እናሳድጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվից տեղի ունեցող զգացմունքների ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերումը ունի ծրագրեր, որոնք սկսում են զգացմունքային շտաբոտների կառուցելուց մինչև ավելի լավ հասկանալ անհատներին և նրանց կյանքը: Այնուամենայնիվ, զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման առաջընթացը խոչընդոտում է մեծ պիտակ տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կառուցում ենք շատ մեծ տվյալների համակարգ գեղեցիկ զգացմունքների համար և զարգանում խորը ուսուցման մոդելներ դրա վրա: Մենք հասնում ենք նոր տեխնոլոգիայի 24 նրբագեղ էմոցիաների վրա (միջին ճշգրտությունը 87.58 տոկոս է): Մենք նաև ընդլայնում ենք խնդիրը զգացմունքների տեսակներից դուրս, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք Ռոբերտ Փլատիկի 8 հիմնական զգացմունքների չափերը, ստանալով 95.68 տոկոսի բարձր ճշգրտություն:', 'bn': "প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা থেকে অনুভূতির সঠিকভাবে আবিষ্কার করার প্রাকৃতিক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের মধ্যে অনুভূতি নির্মাণ করা হয়েছ তবে অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার অগ্রগতি বিশাল লেবেলেটের অনুপস্থিতি দ্বারা ব্যর্থ হয়েছে। এই কাজে আমরা একটি বিশাল ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি ভালো কাজের জন্য এবং এর উপর গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল তৈরি করি। আমরা ২৪ টি ভালোভাবে আনন্দিত অনুভূতিতে নতুন শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি অর্জন করি (সাধারণত ৮৭. ৫৮%)। We also extend the task beyond emotion types to model Robert Plutick's 8 primary emotion dimensions, acquiring a superior accuracy of 95.68%.", 'bs': 'Tačno otkrivanje emocija iz prirodnog jezika ima aplikacije od izgradnje emocionalnih govornica do boljeg razumijevanja pojedinaca i njihovih života. Međutim, napredak u otkrivanju emocija je zaustavio odsustvo velikih označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, izgradimo veoma veliku podatku za fino zrno emocije i razvijamo duboke modele učenja na njemu. Postigli smo novo stanje umjetnosti na 24 vrsta fine zrnca emocija (s prosječnom preciznošću 87,58%). Također proširimo zadatak izvan vrsta emocija u model 8 primjernih dimenzija emocija Robert a Pluticka, dobivajući superiornu tačnost od 95,68%.', 'az': "Təbiətli dildən duyguların doğruluğu tapılması emosiyal çöpələri inşa etməkdən daha yaxşı insanları və həyatlarını daha yaxşı anlamağa başlayan proqramlar vardır. Lakin, duyguların keşfetməsi üçün böyük etiket edilmiş verilən qurğular yoxdur. Bu işdə, çox böyük bir verilən quruluş düzgün hisslər üçün inşa edir və onun üzərində derin öyrənmə modellərini təhsil edirik. Biz 24 hiss türünün yeni məhsullarına yetişiririk (ortalama doğruluğu 87,58 %). Biz də bu işi duyguların türünün üstündə Robert Plutick'in 8 ilk duyguların ölçülərinə çevirdik, 95.68% dəqiqliyinə daha üstün düzgünlüyü elde edirik.", 'cs': 'Přesná detekce emocí z přirozeného jazyka má aplikace sahající od budování emočních chatbotů až po lepší porozumění jednotlivcům a jejich životům. Pokrok v detekci emocí byl však bráněn absencí velkých označených datových sad. V této práci vytváříme velmi rozsáhlý datový soubor pro jemné emoce a vytváříme na něm modely hlubokého učení. Dosahujeme nového nejmodernějšího stavu na 24-zrnitých typech emocí (s průměrnou přesností 87,58%). Rozšiřujeme také úkol mimo emoční typy a modelujeme osm primárních emočních dimenzí Roberta Pluticka, což získává vynikající přesnost 95,68%.', 'ca': "La detecció exacta de l'emoció del llenguatge natural té aplicacions que van des de construir chatbots emocionals fins a entendre millor els individus i les seves vides. However, progress on emotion detection has been hampered by the absence of large labeled datasets.  En aquest treball, construïm un conjunt de dades molt gran per a les emocions fins i desenvolupem models d'aprenentatge profund. Obtenim un nou avançat en 24 tipus d'emocions fines (amb una precisió mitjana de 87,58%). També estenem la tasca més enllà dels tipus emocionals fins a modelar les 8 dimensions emocionals primàries de Robert Plutick, adquirient una precisió superior del 95,68%.", 'et': 'Emotsioonide täpne tuvastamine looduskeelest hõlmab rakendusi alates emotsionaalsete jutubotide loomisest kuni inimeste ja nende elu parema mõistmiseni. Ent emotsioonide tuvastamise edusamme on takistanud suurte märgistatud andmekogumite puudumine. Selles töös ehitame väga suure andmekogumi peenete emotsioonide jaoks ja töötame selle põhjal välja sügavõppe mudelid. Saavutame uue tehnika taseme 24 peeneteralise emotsioonitüübi puhul (keskmise täpsusega 87,58%). Lisaks laiendame ülesannet emotsioonitüüpidest kaugemale, et modelleerida Robert Pluticki 8 esmast emotsioonimõõdet, saavutades suurepärase täpsuse 95,68%.', 'fi': 'Tunteiden tarkka tunnistaminen luonnollisesta kielestä sisältää sovelluksia emotionaalisten chatbottien rakentamisesta yksilöiden ja heidän elämänsä ymmärtämiseen. Tunneidentunnistuksen edistymistä on kuitenkin haitannut suurten merkittyjen aineistojen puuttuminen. Tässä työssä rakennamme erittäin suuren datajoukon hienojakoisille tunteille ja kehitämme siitä syväoppimismalleja. Saavutamme uuden huipputason 24 hienorakeisella tunteella (keskimääräinen tarkkuus 87,58%). Laajennamme tehtävän tunnetyyppien lisäksi mallintaaksemme Robert Plutickin kahdeksan ensisijaisen tunnetason ulottuvuutta ja saavutamme 95,68 prosentin tarkkuuden.', 'jv': 'Iyo kesalahan luwih ingkang alam sing nganggep kuwi tindang pribadi, kuwi aplikasi sing nguasai nggawe karo kuwi kesalahan sing luwih apik karo urip kuwi. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang trabah iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kuwi dakar ampar kanggo sampeyan luwih dumateng lan ijol-ijolan model sing apik kuwi. Awak dhéwé nglanggar langkung wigatining sistem sing gak-wigatining kanggo 24 luwih sing dirampakan luwih (karo kesempatan sing katêpakan karo bener, nêmên ngerasakno asai, lan ujaran oleh adhar) Awak dhéwé mulai nggawe aturan sing luwih apik karo perduhaan sampek kanggo model sing gawe 8 dimensiya cuwisan pratike, ingkang sampek dhéwé kuwi nggawe kesempatan sing luwih apik, ning awak dhéwé padha, 75%.', 'ha': "Ana gane hisia masu daidaita daga harshen asiyya yana da shiryoyin ayuka daga kuɓutar sautin hisia zuwa mafiya fahimtar mutane da rãyukansu. Haƙĩƙa, taƙaitacce a kan ganin hisãbi sun yi amfani da kuma ba da matsayin mai girma da aka rubuta. Daga wannan aikin, muna samar da zaɓata mai girma wa hisãbi masu tsari kuma tuna misãlai masu sani a kansa. Tun sami wani halin-sanar-da a shekara 24-nau'i mai kyãwo (da taƙaitar sauri na 87.58%). Kayya, Munã shimfiɗa aikin bayan nau'in hisia ko kuma za mu sami kwamfyutan sauri na rubutun na rubutun rubutu na rubutun ya zama 95.68.", 'sk': 'Natančno zaznavanje čustev iz naravnega jezika ima aplikacije, ki segajo od gradnje čustvenih chatbotov do boljšega razumevanja posameznikov in njihovega življenja. Vendar pa napredek pri zaznavanju čustev ovira odsotnost velikih označenih naborov podatkov. V tem delu zgradimo zelo velik nabor podatkov za drobnozrnata čustva in na njem razvijamo modele globokega učenja. Pri 24 drobnozrnatih vrstah čustev dosegamo novo vrsto tehnike (s povprečno natančnostjo 87,58%). Poleg tega razširimo nalogo preko tipov čustev in modeliramo osmih primarnih dimenzij čustev Roberta Pluticka, pridobimo vrhunsko natančnost 95,68%.', 'he': 'גילוי מדויק של רגשות מהשפה הטבעית יש שימושים שמגיעים מבניין צ\'אטבוטים רגשיים עד הבנה טובה יותר לאדם וחייהם. עם זאת, התקדמות בזיהוי רגשות הוגבלה ע"י חוסר קבוצות מידע גדולות. In this work, we build a very large dataset for fine-grained emotions and develop deep learning models on it.  אנו מגיעים למצב חדש של אומנות על 24 סוגים של רגשות מעורפלים (עם מדויק ממוצע של 87.58%). אנחנו גם ממשיכים את המשימה מעבר לטיפוסי רגשות למדגם של רוברט פלוטיק 8 מימדי רגשות ראשיים, להשיג מדויקה מעלית של 95.68%.', 'bo': "སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ནི་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གླེང་མོལ འོན་ཀྱང་། སེམས་ཚོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་འདི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་བཅས་ཀྱིས་བཏོན་ཚར་བ། Bu işte, duygusallık için çok büyük bir veri seti oluşturuyoruz ve bunun üzerinde derin öğrenci modelleri geliştiririz. ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འདི་ཡང་བསྐྱེད་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་Plutick's primary སེམས་ཚོར་ཆ"}
{'en': 'Beyond Binary Labels : Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'ar': 'ما وراء العلامات الثنائية: توقع الأيديولوجية السياسية لمستخدمي تويتر', 'fr': 'Au-delà des étiquettes binaires\xa0: prédiction idéologique politique des utilisateurs de Twitter', 'es': 'Más allá de las etiquetas binarias: predicción de ideología política de usuarios de Twitter', 'pt': 'Além dos rótulos binários: previsão da ideologia política dos usuários do Twitter', 'ja': 'バイナリラベルを超えて： Twitterユーザーの政治的イデオロギー予測', 'hi': 'बाइनरी लेबल से परे: चहचहाना उपयोगकर्ताओं की राजनीतिक विचारधारा भविष्यवाणी', 'zh': '越二元标:Twitter用户之政意识形态占', 'ru': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Политическая идеология Прогнозирование пользователей Twitter', 'ga': 'Thar Lipéid Dénártha: Idé-eolaíocht Pholaitiúil Réamh-mheastachán Úsáideoirí Twitter', 'ka': 'ბიუნური ნიშანების გარეშე: პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგია Twitter მომხმარებლის გარეშე', 'el': 'Πέρα από τις δυαδικές ετικέτες: Πρόβλεψη πολιτικής ιδεολογίας των χρηστών του Twitter', 'hu': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Politikai ideológia előrejelzése a Twitter felhasználók számára', 'it': "Oltre le etichette binarie: Predizione dell'ideologia politica degli utenti di Twitter", 'kk': 'Бинарлық жарлықтардың артында: Twitter пайдаланушылардың саяси идеологиясы', 'mk': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'lt': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'ms': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'ml': 'ബൈന്റരി ലേബലുകള്\u200dക്കു മുകളില്\u200d: രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോഗിയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണന', 'mn': 'Твиттерийн хэрэглэгчийн улс төрийн идеологи', 'no': 'Utan binære merkelappar: Politisk ideologisk forhåndsvising av Twitter-brukarar', 'pl': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Prognoza ideologii politycznej użytkowników Twittera', 'ro': 'Dincolo de etichete binare: Predicția ideologiei politice a utilizatorilor Twitter', 'sr': 'Izvan Binarnih etiketa: Politička ideologija predviđanja korisnika Twitter-a', 'si': 'බායිනාරි ලේබල් වලින්: රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක අදහසක් Twitter ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'sv': 'Bortom binära etiketter: Politisk ideologi förutsägelse av Twitter-användare', 'ta': 'இருநிலை விளக்கச்சீட்டுகளுக்கு முன்னால்: அரசியல் ஐடியோஜி முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'بیناری لابل کے علاوہ: ٹویٹر کارساز کے سیاسی ایڈیولوژی پیش بینی', 'mt': 'Lil hinn mit-Tikketti Binarji: Tbassir tal-Ideoloġija Politika tal-Utenti tat-Twitter', 'uz': 'Ikkilamchi yorliqlar yonida: Siyasiya Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'vi': 'Bên ngoài những nhãn nhị phân: Sự tiên đoán về Twitter của người dùng', 'da': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Politisk Ideologi Forudsigelse af Twitter-brugere', 'hr': 'Izvan Binarnih etiketa: Predviđanje političke ideologije korisnika Twitter-a', 'de': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Politische Ideologie Vorhersage von Twitter-Nutzern', 'bg': 'Отвъд бинарните етикети: Прогнозиране на политическата идеология на потребителите в Туитър', 'id': 'Selain Label Binari: Prediksi Ideologi Politik Pengguna Twitter', 'sw': 'Chini ya mabango ya Binary: Utawala wa Tamko za Kisiasa wa watumiaji wa Twita', 'nl': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Politieke Ideologie Voorspelling van Twitter-gebruikers', 'fa': 'برچسب\u200cهای بینی: پیشنهاد ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی از کاربران توئیتر', 'af': 'Buitend Binêre Etikettes: Politiese Ideologie Voorskou van Twitter Gebruikers', 'sq': 'Përtej etiketave dypalëshe: parashikimi i ideologjisë politike të përdoruesve të Twitter', 'hy': 'Տվիթերի օգտագործողների քաղաքական գաղափարների կանխատեսումը', 'ko': '이원 태그 초월: 트위터 사용자의 정치 이데올로기 예측', 'am': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users', 'az': 'Binary Etiketl톛rin ard캼nca: Twitter 캻stifad톛칞il톛rin Siyasi 캻deoloji T칬vrat캼', 'bn': 'বাইনারি লেবেলের পাশে: টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীদের রাজনৈতিক আইডিয়োলজি প্রেকশন', 'cs': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Politická ideologie predikce uživatelů Twitteru', 'et': 'Beyond Binary Labels: poliitiline ideoloogia prognoos Twitter kasutajatele', 'fi': 'Binary Labels: Political Ideology Ennuste Twitter-käyttäjille', 'tr': 'Twitter Ullançylaryň Syýasy Ideologiýasy', 'bs': 'Izvan Binarnih etiketa: Predviđanje političke ideologije korisnika Twitter-a', 'ca': "Més enllà dels etiquets binaris: Predicció d'ideologia política dels usuaris de Twitter", 'jv': 'Walian Binary Label', 'sk': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Napoved politične ideologije uporabnikov Twitterja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מעבר לתווית שתיים: ציון אידיאולוגיה פוליטית של משתמשים בטוויטר', 'bo': 'Beyond Binary Labels: Political Ideology Prediction of Twitter Users'}
{'en': 'Automatic political orientation prediction from social media posts has to date proven successful only in distinguishing between publicly declared liberals and conservatives in the US. This study examines users’ political ideology using a seven-point scale which enables us to identify politically moderate and neutral users   groups which are of particular interest to political scientists and pollsters. Using a novel data set with political ideology labels self-reported through surveys, our goal is two-fold : a) to characterize the groups of politically engaged users through language use on Twitter ; b) to build a fine-grained model that predicts political ideology of unseen users. Our results identify differences in both political leaning and engagement and the extent to which each group tweets using political keywords. Finally, we demonstrate how to improve ideology prediction accuracy by exploiting the relationships between the user groups.', 'ar': 'أثبت التنبؤ التلقائي بالتوجه السياسي من منشورات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي نجاحه حتى الآن فقط في التمييز بين الليبراليين المعلنين علنًا والمحافظين في الولايات المتحدة. تفحص هذه الدراسة الأيديولوجية السياسية للمستخدمين باستخدام مقياس من سبع نقاط يمكّننا من تحديد المستخدمين المعتدلين والحياديين سياسيًا - وهي مجموعات ذات أهمية خاصة لعلماء السياسة ومنظمي استطلاعات الرأي. باستخدام مجموعة بيانات جديدة مع تسميات أيديولوجية سياسية يتم الإبلاغ عنها ذاتيًا من خلال الاستطلاعات ، فإن هدفنا ذو شقين: أ) لتمييز مجموعات المستخدمين المنخرطين سياسيًا من خلال استخدام اللغة على تويتر ؛ ب) لبناء نموذج دقيق يتنبأ بالإيديولوجية السياسية للمستخدمين غير المرئيين. تحدد نتائجنا الاختلافات في كل من الميول السياسية والمشاركة ومدى قيام كل مجموعة بالتغريد باستخدام الكلمات المفتاحية السياسية. أخيرًا ، نوضح كيفية تحسين دقة التنبؤ الأيديولوجي من خلال استغلال العلاقات بين مجموعات المستخدمين.', 'es': 'Hasta la fecha, la predicción automática de la orientación política a partir de publicaciones en redes sociales solo ha demostrado ser exitosa para distinguir entre liberales y conservadores declarados públicamente en los Estados Unidos. Este estudio examina la ideología política de los usuarios utilizando una escala de siete puntos que nos permite identificar a los usuarios políticamente moderados y neutrales, grupos que son de particular interés para los politólogos y encuestadores. Utilizando un conjunto de datos novedoso con etiquetas de ideología política autoinformadas a través de encuestas, nuestro objetivo es doble: a) caracterizar los grupos de usuarios comprometidos políticamente mediante el uso del lenguaje en Twitter; b) construir un modelo detallado que prediga la ideología política de los usuarios invisibles. Nuestros resultados identifican diferencias tanto en la inclinación política como en el compromiso y la medida en que cada grupo tuitea con palabras clave políticas. Finalmente, demostramos cómo mejorar la precisión de la predicción de ideología explotando las relaciones entre los grupos de usuarios.', 'pt': 'A previsão automática de orientação política a partir de postagens de mídia social provou ser bem-sucedida apenas na distinção entre liberais declarados publicamente e conservadores nos EUA. Este estudo examina a ideologia política dos usuários usando uma escala de sete pontos que nos permite identificar usuários politicamente moderados e neutros – grupos que são de interesse particular para cientistas políticos e pesquisadores. Usando um novo conjunto de dados com rótulos de ideologia política autorrelatados por meio de pesquisas, nosso objetivo é duplo: a) caracterizar os grupos de usuários politicamente engajados por meio do uso da linguagem no Twitter; b) construir um modelo refinado que preveja a ideologia política de usuários invisíveis. Nossos resultados identificam diferenças tanto na inclinação política quanto no engajamento e na medida em que cada grupo twitta usando palavras-chave políticas. Finalmente, demonstramos como melhorar a precisão da previsão de ideologia explorando as relações entre os grupos de usuários.', 'fr': "La prédiction automatique de l'orientation politique à partir des publications sur les réseaux sociaux s'est jusqu'à présent révélée efficace uniquement pour faire la distinction entre les libéraux publiquement déclarés et les conservateurs aux États-Unis. Cette étude examine l'idéologie politique des utilisateurs à l'aide d'une échelle de sept points qui nous permet d'identifier les utilisateurs politiquement modérés et neutres — des groupes qui intéressent particulièrement les politologues et les sondeurs. À l'aide d'un ensemble de données novateur avec des étiquettes d'idéologie politique autodéclarées par le biais d'enquêtes, notre objectif est double\xa0: a) caractériser les groupes d'utilisateurs engagés politiquement grâce à l'utilisation de la langue sur Twitter\xa0; b) construire un modèle précis qui prédit l'idéologie politique des utilisateurs invisibles. Nos résultats identifient les différences d'orientation et d'engagement politiques et la mesure dans laquelle chaque groupe tweete à l'aide de mots-clés politiques. Enfin, nous montrons comment améliorer la précision des prévisions idéologiques en exploitant les relations entre les groupes d'utilisateurs.", 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアの投稿からの自動的な政治的方向性の予測は、米国で公に宣言されたリベラル派と保守派の区別にのみ成功していることが今日まで証明されています。この研究では、7段階の尺度を使用してユーザーの政治的イデオロギーを検討しています。これにより、政治学者や世論調査担当者が特に関心を持つ政治的に穏健で中立的なユーザーグループを特定することができます。調査を通じて自己報告された政治的イデオロギーラベルを持つ新規のデータセットを使用して、私たちの目標は2つあります。a ） Twitterでの言語使用を通じて政治的に関与しているユーザーのグループを特徴付けること、b ）見えないユーザーの政治的イデオロギーを予測する細かいモデルを構築することです。私たちの結果は、政治的傾向とエンゲージメントの両方の違い、および各グループが政治的キーワードを使用してツイートする程度を特定します。最後に、ユーザーグループ間の関係を活用して、イデオロギー予測の精度を向上させる方法を実演します。', 'zh': '迄今为止者,社交媒体帖之自政取向占已分明美国宣自由派保守派成功也。 此治用七分制省用户之政意识形态,使吾能别温和中立之用户 - 科学家民意调查者之群体也。 用勘自己的带有政治意识形态标签的新数据集,我们的是双重的:a)因Twitter上的言语用来描述参与政治的用户群体。 b)立一细粒度之形,占不见用户之政意识形态。 臣等实定倾参与度之异,及群体用政关键字之推文。 展用户组以崇意识形态占之准确性。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое прогнозирование политической ориентации из постов в социальных сетях на сегодняшний день оказалось успешным только в проведении различия между публично объявленными либералами и консерваторами в США. В этом исследовании рассматривается политическая идеология пользователей с использованием семибалльной шкалы, которая позволяет нам идентифицировать политически умеренных и нейтральных пользователей – группы, которые представляют особый интерес для политологов и опрошенных. Используя новый набор данных с ярлыками политической идеологии, саморепортирующимися через опросы, мы преследуем двоякую цель: а) охарактеризовать группы политически активных пользователей через использование языка в Twitter; б) построить мелкозернистую модель, которая предсказывает политическую идеологию невидимых пользователей. Наши результаты выявляют различия как в политическом наклонении и вовлеченности, так и в степени, в которой каждая группа твитит, используя политические ключевые слова. Наконец, мы демонстрируем, как улучшить точность прогнозирования идеологии, используя отношения между группами пользователей.', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट से स्वचालित राजनीतिक अभिविन्यास भविष्यवाणी को केवल अमेरिका में सार्वजनिक रूप से घोषित उदारवादियों और रूढ़िवादियों के बीच अंतर करने में सफल साबित होना पड़ा है। यह अध्ययन सात-बिंदु पैमाने का उपयोग करके उपयोगकर्ताओं की राजनीतिक विचारधारा की जांच करता है जो हमें राजनीतिक रूप से उदारवादी और तटस्थ उपयोगकर्ताओं की पहचान करने में सक्षम बनाता है - समूह जो राजनीतिक वैज्ञानिकों और पोलस्टरों के लिए विशेष रुचि रखते हैं। राजनीतिक विचारधारा लेबल के साथ एक उपन्यास डेटा सेट का उपयोग करके सर्वेक्षणों के माध्यम से स्व-रिपोर्ट किया गया है, हमारा लक्ष्य दो गुना है: ए) ट्विटर पर भाषा के उपयोग के माध्यम से राजनीतिक रूप से लगे उपयोगकर्ताओं के समूहों को चिह्नित करने के लिए; ख) एक ठीक दानेदार मॉडल है कि अनदेखी उपयोगकर्ताओं की राजनीतिक विचारधारा की भविष्यवाणी का निर्माण करने के लिए. हमारे परिणाम राजनीतिक झुकाव और सगाई दोनों में अंतर की पहचान करते हैं और किस हद तक प्रत्येक समूह राजनीतिक कीवर्ड का उपयोग करके ट्वीट करता है। अंत में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि उपयोगकर्ता समूहों के बीच संबंधों का शोषण करके विचारधारा भविष्यवाणी सटीकता में सुधार कैसे किया जाए।', 'ga': 'Go dtí seo níor éirigh le tuar treoshuíomh polaitiúil uathoibríoch ó phoist ar na meáin shóisialta ach amháin chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir liobrálaithe a fógraíodh go poiblí agus coimeádaigh sna SA. Scrúdaíonn an staidéar seo idé-eolaíocht pholaitiúil na n-úsáideoirí agus úsáid á baint as scála seacht bpointe a chuireann ar ár gcumas úsáideoirí atá measartha agus neodrach ó thaobh na polaitíochta de a aithint – grúpaí a bhfuil suim ar leith ag eolaithe polaitiúla agus polltóirí iontu. Agus úsáid á baint againn as tacar sonraí nua le lipéid idé-eolaíochta polaitiúla féin-thuairiscithe trí shuirbhéanna, tá dhá sprioc againn: a) tréithriú a dhéanamh ar na grúpaí úsáideoirí atá i mbun polaitíochta trí úsáid teanga ar Twitter; b) samhail mhionsonraithe a chruthú a thuar idé-eolaíocht pholaitiúil úsáideoirí nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. Aithníonn ár dtorthaí na difríochtaí idir an claonadh polaitiúil agus an rannpháirtíocht pholaitiúil agus an méid a dhéanann gach grúpa tweet ag baint úsáide as eochairfhocail pholaitiúla. Ar deireadh, léirímid conas cruinneas tuartha idé-eolaíochta a fheabhsú trí leas a bhaint as na caidrimh idir na grúpaí úsáideoirí.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიატის პოლიტიკური ორიზაციის განსაზღვრება ახლა მხოლოდ წარმატებულია მხოლოდ განსაზღვრებულად განსაზღვრებული ლიბრალური და კონცერატიგების შორის განსა ეს სწავლად მომხმარებლის პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგიის გამოყენება, რომელიც გვაქვს პოლიტიკურად მედირალური და ნეირრალური მომხმარებელი განსაცნობა, რომელიც პოლიტიკურად მეცნიერებელი და პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგიის ლაბეტებით პრომენტიკური მონაცემების გამოყენება, ჩვენი მიზეზი ორჯერ არის: a) პოლიტიკურად დაკავშირებული მომხმარების ჯგუფები Twitter-ში ენის გამოყენებაზე; b) შექმნა სწორი მოდელ, რომელიც განსაზღვრებას პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგია არაჩვენებული მომხმარებისთვის. ჩვენი წარმოდგენების განსხვავება პოლიტიკური დაკავშირებაში და დაკავშირებაში და რომლებიც ყოველ ჯგუფი პოლიტიკური სიტყვების გამოყენებაში გარგება. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ მოვიდენსებთ როგორ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'hu': 'Az automatikus politikai orientáció előrejelzése a közösségi média posztokból eddig csak a nyilvánosan kijelentett liberálisok és konzervatívok közötti különbség terén bizonyult sikeresnek az Egyesült Államokban. A tanulmány hétpontos skálával vizsgálja a felhasználók politikai ideológiáját, amely lehetővé teszi, hogy azonosítsuk a politikailag mérsékelt és semleges felhasználókat - olyan csoportokat, amelyek különösen érdekelnek a politikai tudósok és a kutatók számára. Egy új, politikai ideológiai címkékkel ellátott adatkészlet felhasználásával kétszeres célunk: a) a Twitteren történő nyelvhasználat révén jellemezzük a politikailag elkötelezett felhasználók csoportjait; b) olyan finom szemű modell kialakítása, amely előrejelzi a láthatatlan felhasználók politikai ideológiáját. Eredményeink azonosítják a különbségeket mind a politikai hajlam, mind az elkötelezettség tekintetében, mind pedig azt, hogy az egyes csoportok milyen mértékben tweetelnek politikai kulcsszavakkal. Végül bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet javítani az ideológiai előrejelzések pontosságát a felhasználói csoportok közötti kapcsolatok kihasználásával.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη πρόβλεψη πολιτικού προσανατολισμού από δημοσιεύσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης έχει μέχρι σήμερα αποδειχθεί επιτυχής μόνο στη διάκριση μεταξύ δημοσίως δηλωμένων φιλελεύθερων και συντηρητικών στις ΗΠΑ. Η παρούσα μελέτη εξετάζει την πολιτική ιδεολογία των χρηστών χρησιμοποιώντας μια κλίμακα επτά σημείων που μας επιτρέπει να εντοπίσουμε πολιτικά μετριοπαθείς και ουδέτερες χρήστες ομάδων που ενδιαφέρουν ιδιαίτερα τους πολιτικούς επιστήμονες και τους δημοσκόπους. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων με ετικέτες πολιτικής ιδεολογίας που αυτοαναφέρονται μέσω ερευνών, ο στόχος μας είναι διττός: α) να χαρακτηρίσουμε τις ομάδες των πολιτικά εμπλεκόμενων χρηστών μέσω της χρήσης γλώσσας στο Twitter. β) να οικοδομήσουμε ένα λεπτόκοκκο μοντέλο που προβλέπει την πολιτική ιδεολογία των αόρατων χρηστών. Τα αποτελέσματά μας εντοπίζουν διαφορές τόσο στην πολιτική κλίση όσο και στην εμπλοκή και στον βαθμό στον οποίο κάθε ομάδα tweets χρησιμοποιεί πολιτικές λέξεις-κλειδιά. Τέλος, καταδεικνύουμε πώς μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε την ακρίβεια πρόβλεψης ιδεολογίας αξιοποιώντας τις σχέσεις μεταξύ των ομάδων χρηστών.', 'it': "La previsione automatica dell'orientamento politico dei post sui social media si è finora dimostrata efficace solo nel distinguere tra liberali dichiarati pubblicamente e conservatori negli Stati Uniti. Questo studio esamina l'ideologia politica degli utenti utilizzando una scala di sette punti che ci permette di identificare utenti politicamente moderati e neutrali - gruppi che sono di particolare interesse per gli scienziati politici e i sondisti. Utilizzando un nuovo set di dati con etichette ideologiche politiche auto-riportate attraverso sondaggi, il nostro obiettivo è duplice: a) caratterizzare i gruppi di utenti politicamente impegnati attraverso l'uso della lingua su Twitter; b) costruire un modello a grana fine che predica l'ideologia politica degli utenti invisibili. I nostri risultati identificano differenze sia nell'orientamento politico che nell'impegno e nella misura in cui ciascun gruppo twitta utilizzando parole chiave politiche. Infine, dimostriamo come migliorare l'accuratezza della previsione ideologica sfruttando le relazioni tra i gruppi di utenti.", 'mk': 'Автоматското предвидување на политичката ориентација од позициите на социјалните медиуми досега се покажа успешно само во разликата помеѓу јавно прогласените либерали и конзервативци во САД. Оваа студија ја испитува политичката идеологија на корисниците користејќи седумпоени скала која ни овозможува да идентификуваме политички модерни и неутрални корисници - групи кои се од особен интерес за политичките научници и анкетите. Користејќи нов набор податоци со политички идеолошки етикети кои се самообјавуваат преку истражувања, нашата цел е двојна: a) да ги карактеризираме групите на политички ангажирани корисници преку употреба на јазик на Твитер; b) to build a fine-grained model that predicts political ideology of unseen users.  Нашите резултати ги идентификуваат разликите во политичкото насочување и ангажманот и во каков степен секоја група твита користејќи политички клучни зборови. Конечно, демонстрираме како да ја подобриме прецизноста на предвидувањето на идеологијата со искористување на односите меѓу корисниците.', 'lt': "Automatic political orientation prediction from social media posts has to date proven successful only in distinguishing between publicly declared liberals and conservatives in the US.  This study examines users' political ideology using a seven-point scale which enables us to identify politically moderate and neutral users - groups which are of particular interest to political scientists and pollsters.  Naudojant naują duomenų rinkinį su politinėmis ideologinėmis etiketėmis, apie kurias pranešama per apklausas, mūsų tikslas yra dvigubas: a) apibūdinti politiškai įsitrauktų vartotojų grupes naudojant kalbas Twitter; b) sukurti puikų model į, numatantį nematomų naudotojų politinę ideologiją. Our results identify differences in both political leaning and engagement and the extent to which each group tweets using political keywords.  Finally, we demonstrate how to improve ideology prediction accuracy by exploiting the relationships between the user groups.", 'ms': 'Ramalan orientasi politik automatik dari pos media sosial sehingga kini telah terbukti berjaya hanya dalam membezakan antara liberal yang diumumkan secara awam dan konservatif di Amerika Syarikat. Ujian ini memeriksa ideologi politik pengguna menggunakan skala tujuh titik yang membolehkan kita mengenali pengguna yang bijak dan neutral secara politik - kumpulan yang tertarik kepada saintis politik dan penyelidikan. Menggunakan set data baru dengan label ideologi politik yang dilaporkan sendiri melalui penyelidikan, tujuan kita adalah dua kali: a) untuk mengukur kumpulan pengguna yang terlibat secara politik melalui penggunaan bahasa di Twitter; b) untuk membina model berwarna gandum yang meramalkan ideologi politik pengguna yang tidak terlihat. Keputusan kita mengenalpasti perbezaan dalam kedua-duanya tindakan politik dan keterlibatan dan ke mana setiap kumpulan tweet menggunakan kata kunci politik. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bagaimana untuk meningkatkan ketepatan ramalan ideologi dengan mengeksploitasi hubungan antara kumpulan pengguna.', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പോസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വയം രാഷ്ട്രീയ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന പ്രവചനം മാത്രം വിജയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക് ഈ പഠനം ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോഗ്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. രാഷ്ട്രീയ വിജ്ഞാനികള്\u200dക്കും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ത രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോളജി ലേബ്ലുകളുടെ സ്വയം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയ നോവല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഞങ്ങളുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം രണ്ട് തവണ: a) ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയില്\u200d ഉള b) അദൃശ്യമായ ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോഗ്യം പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നല്ല കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയ കീവോര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് രാഷ്ട്രീയത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്ക അവസാനം, ഉപയോക്താവ് ഗ്രൂപ്പുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ആശയോ', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av politiske orientasjon frå sosiale mediepost må til dag vera vellukka berre ved å distisera mellom offentlig deklarert liberal og konservativ i USA. Denne studien undersøker politiske ideologi for brukarar med ein syv punktskala som kan identifisera oss politisk moderert og nøytralt brukarar - grupper som er spesielt interesserte for politiske vitenskaplege og pollsterar. Når du brukar eit nytt data set med politiske ideologiske etikettar meldt selv gjennom undersøkingar, målet vårt er to ganger: a) for å karakterisera gruppene av politisk involverte brukarar gjennom språkbruk på Twitter; b) for å bygge eit fin-korn modell som foregår politisk ideologi av ukjende brukarar. Resultatet våre identifiserer ulike forskjeller i både politiske leining og engasjering og kor mykje kvar gruppe tvitter med politiske nøkkelord. Etter slutt, viser vi korleis å forbetra nøyaktighet for ideologisk forhåndsvising ved å bruka forholdet mellom brukargruppene.', 'kk': 'Америкадағы либералдар мен консервативтер арасындағы түрлендірілген саяси бағыттауларының автоматты түрлі бағыттауын бақылау керек. Бұл зерттеу пайдаланушылардың саяси идеологиясын 7 нүкте масштабын қолдану үшін, саяси ғылымдарға және бөлшектерге өзгертілген топтарды анықтауға мүмкіндік береді. Саяси идеология жарлығындағы романдық деректерді қолдануға өзімізді зерттеу арқылы хабарлаған жарлықтарды қолдануға мақсатымыз екі рет: a) саяси пайдаланушылардың топтарын Твиттерде тіл қолдануға арнал b) беймәлім пайдаланушылардың саяси идеологиясын таңдау үлгісін құру үшін. Біздің нәтижелеріміз саяси арқылы және қатынастығында, әрбір топ саяси сөздерді қолданатын айырмашылығын анықтайды. Соңында, пайдаланушылардың топтардың қатынасын қолдану арқылы идеологиялық таңдау дұрыстығын қалай жақсарту дегенді көрсетедік.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna prognoza orientacji politycznej z postów w mediach społecznościowych okazała się dotychczas skuteczna tylko w rozróżnieniu publicznie deklarowanych liberałów od konserwatystów w USA. Badanie bada ideologię polityczną użytkowników za pomocą skali siedmiopunktowej, która umożliwia identyfikację politycznie umiarkowanych i neutralnych użytkowników grup, które są szczególnie interesujące dla politologów i ankieterów. Wykorzystując nowatorski zestaw danych o etykietach ideologicznych politycznych, które zostały zgłoszone przez ankiety, nasz cel jest dwukrotny: a) scharakteryzowanie grup zaangażowanych politycznie użytkowników poprzez używanie języka na Twitterze; b) zbudować precyzyjny model, który przewiduje ideologię polityczną niewidzialnych użytkowników. Nasze wyniki identyfikują różnice zarówno w nastawieniu politycznym, jak i zaangażowaniu oraz stopień, w jakim każda grupa tweetuje za pomocą słów kluczowych politycznych. Na koniec demonstrujemy, jak poprawić dokładność przewidywania ideologii poprzez wykorzystanie relacji między grupami użytkowników.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн мэдээллийн сайтаас автоматически улс төрийн тодорхойлолтын таамаглал нь АНУ-ын нийтийн хувилбар болон хамгаалалтын хүмүүсийн хоорондоо ялгаад амжилттай болж байна. Энэ судалгаа хэрэглэгчдийн улс төрийн ойлголтыг 7 цэгийн хэмжээг ашиглан бидэнд улс төрийн дунджаар, солилцоогүй хэрэглэгчдийг тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Улс төрийн эрдэмтэд болон солилцоогчид Улс төрийн идеологийнхаа шинэ өгөгдлийг ашиглах нь бидний зорилго нь хоёр дахин: a) улс төрийн оролцсон хэрэглэгчийн бүлгүүдийг Twitter дээр хэлний хэрэглээнээр дүрслэх болно. b) харагдахгүй хэрэглэгчдийн улс төрийн ойлголтыг таамаглах загвар бүтээх. Манай үр дүнд улс төрийн холбоотой, оролцоотой холбоотой ялгааг, улс төрийн түлхүүр үг ашиглаж буй бүлэг бүртгэдэг хэмжээг олж мэднэ. Эцэст нь, бид хэрэглэгчийн бүлгүүдийн харилцааныг хэрхэн ашиглаж, идеологийн тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтыг хэрхэн сайжруулах тодорхойлолтыг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Prevederea automată a orientării politice din posturile de socializare s-a dovedit până în prezent a reușit doar în distingerea între liberalii declarați public și conservatorii din SUA. Acest studiu examinează ideologia politică a utilizatorilor folosind o scară de șapte puncte care ne permite să identificăm utilizatorii moderați și neutri din punct de vedere politic - grupuri care sunt de interes deosebit pentru oamenii de știință și sondajele de opinie. Folosind un set de date nou cu etichete ideologice politice auto-raportate prin sondaje, obiectivul nostru este dublu: a) caracterizarea grupurilor de utilizatori implicați politic prin utilizarea limbilor pe Twitter; b) construirea unui model cu granule fine care prezice ideologia politică a utilizatorilor nevăzuți. Rezultatele noastre identifică diferențele atât în tendința politică, cât și în implicarea politică, cât și în măsura în care fiecare grup tweetează folosind cuvinte cheie politice. În cele din urmă, demonstrăm cum să îmbunătățim acuratețea predicției ideologiei prin exploatarea relațiilor dintre grupurile de utilizatori.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව පොස්ට් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක පිළිබඳ අනුවෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ රජාත්\u200dරික අදහසක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා වගේම රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාසිකය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගාරකයෝ පරීක් රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක අදහස් ලේබල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, අපේ අරමුණ දෙකක් විතරයි: a) රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ ජාතික වියෝජනයෙන් භාෂ b) නොදන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ රජාත්\u200dරික අදහසක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දේවල් වෙනස් තියෙන්නේ රජාත්\u200dරික විශේෂය සහ සම්බන්ධය සහ හ හැම කණ්ඩායමේ විශේෂය සඳහා ර අන්තිමේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කොහොමද අදහස් විශ්වාසයේ අනුවාදය අනුවාදය කණ්ඩායම් අතර සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Horinta siyaasadeedka ah oo ka soo horjeeda boostada bulshada waa in loo caddeeyaa inay ku liibaansamaan kala soocaan marka loo kala soocaa bulshada xorriyada iyo ilaaliyayaasha Mareykanka. Waxbarashadan wuxuu ka baaraandegaa fikrada siyaasadeed ee isticmaalayaasha isticmaalaya qiyaastii todobaad, kaas oo inagu caawinaya inaannu aqoonsanno isticmaalayaasha siyaasada hoose u dhaqaalaya iyo kooxaha si gaar ah u xiiseynaya cilmiyiinta siyaasada ah iyo dooriyayaasha. Isku isticmaalidda macluumaadka warqada qoraalka ee siyaasadeedka ah ee loo qoray baaritaanka iskuu soo qoray, goalkayagu waa labo jeer: a) si loo gaaro kooxaha siyaasadeed isticmaalayaasha isticmaalka luqada Twitterka; (b) inuu dhiso model aad u fiican oo soo hormariya fikrada siyaasadeed ee isticmaalayaasha qarsoon. Sababyadayada waxay ka muuqataa kala duwan siyaasadeedka ku tiirsashada iyo qaybaha ay koox walba u tweetiyaan isticmaalka hadalka siyaasada ah. Ugu dambaysta waxaynu muujinnaa sida loo kordhin karo fikradda horumarinta horumarinta, si loo isticmaalo xiriirka u dhexeeya kooxda isticmaalaha.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje automatske političke orijentacije iz postova društvenih medija do sada dokazalo je uspešno samo u razlici između javno objavljenih liberala i konzervativa u SAD-u. Ova studija pregledava političku ideologiju korisnika koristeći sedam bodova skalu koja nam omogućava da identifikujemo politički umjerene i neutralne korisnike - grupe koje su posebno zainteresovane političkim naučnicima i zagađa čima. Koristenjem novog podataka sa političkim ideološkim etiketama koje su sami prijavljene kroz istraživanje, naš cilj je dva puta: a) da karakteriziramo grupe politički uključenih korisnika kroz korištenje jezika na Twitter; b) izgraditi dobar model koji predviđa političku ideologiju nevidljivih korisnika. Naši rezultati identifikuju razlike i političkog naglašavanja i angažmana, i u kakvoj mjeri svaka grupa tweets koristeći političke ključne riječi. Konačno, pokazujemo kako da poboljšamo preciznost predviđanja ideologije iskorištavajući odnose između grupa korisnika.', 'sv': 'Automatisk politisk orientering förutsägelse från sociala medier har hittills visat sig vara framgångsrik endast när det gäller att skilja mellan offentligt deklarerade liberaler och konservativa i USA. Denna studie undersöker användarnas politiska ideologi med hjälp av en sjupunktsskala som gör det möjligt för oss att identifiera politiskt måttliga och neutrala användare - grupper som är av särskilt intresse för statsvetare och opinionsbildare. Med hjälp av en ny datauppsättning med politiska ideologietiketter som självrapporterats genom enkäter är vårt mål dubbelt: a) att karakterisera grupper av politiskt engagerade användare genom språkanvändning på Twitter; b) att bygga en finkornig modell som förutspår den politiska ideologin av osynliga användare. Våra resultat identifierar skillnader i både politisk läggning och engagemang och i vilken utsträckning varje grupp tweetar med hjälp av politiska nyckelord. Slutligen visar vi hur man kan förbättra ideologiförutsägelsens noggrannhet genom att utnyttja relationerna mellan användargrupperna.', 'ur': "سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ سے سیاسی نظریات کی پیش بینی صرف ظاہری رسالتوں اور محافظتوں کے درمیان جدائی کرنے کے لئے موفق ہے۔ This study examines the users' political ideology using a seven-point scale which allows us to identify politically moderate and neutral users - groups which are specific interest to political scientists and pollsters. سیاسی ایڈیولوژی لابلیٹ کے ساتھ ایک نو ڈیٹ کا استعمال کرنا، ہمارا موقع دوبارہ ہے: a) ٹویٹر پر زبان استعمال کے ذریعے سیاسی طرح مشغول استعمال کرنے والوں کے گروپ کو تعریف کرنے کے لئے۔ (b) ایک پاکیزہ دانہ موڈل بنانے کے لئے جو غیر دیکھے کارساز کے سیاسی نظریات کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دو سیاسی لینگ اور مشارکت میں فرق پہچان دیتے ہیں اور جس طرح ہر گروپ سیاسی کلمات کے مطابق ٹویٹ کرتا ہے۔ آخر میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایڈیولوژی پیش بینی کی دقیق کس طرح اضافہ کرنا ہے کہ کارساز گروپ کے درمیان رابطہ استعمال کریں۔", 'ta': 'தானாகவே அரசியல் திசையில் இருந்து சமூக ஊடக முறைகளிலிருந்து முன்னோட்டம் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பது தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது  இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி பயனரின் அரசியல் யோசனையை ஏழு புள்ளியின் அளவு பயன்படுத்தி சோதிக்கிறது அது நமக்கு அரசியலான நடுவான மற்றும் நடுவான பயனர்களை கண்டுபிடி பரிசோதனைகள் மூலம் தானே அறிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, எங்கள் இலக்கு இரு மடங்கு: a) தொடர்ந்து மொழியை பயன்படுத்தும் அரசியலாக உடை (b) மறைக்கப்படாத பயனர்களின் அரசியல் யோசனையை பார்க்கும் ஒரு நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி உருவாக்குவதற்கு. முடிவு இறுதியில், நாம் எப்படி யோசனை முன்னேற்றத்தை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் பயனர் குழுவின் இடையே உறவு', 'mt': "Automatic political orientation prediction from social media posts has to date proven successful only in distinguishing between publicly declared liberals and conservatives in the US.  Dan l-istudju jeżamina l-ideoloġija politika tal-utenti bl-użu ta' skala ta' seba' punti li tippermettilna nidentifikaw utenti politikament moderati u newtrali - gruppi li huma ta' interess partikolari għax-xjenzati politiċi u dawk li jniġġsu. Bl-użu ta’ sett ġdid ta’ dejta b’tikketti ta’ ideoloġija politika rrappurtati lilna nnifisha permezz ta’ stħarriġ, l-għan tagħna huwa doppju: a) li jikkaratterizzaw il-gruppi ta’ utenti involuti politikament permezz tal-użu tal-lingwi fuq Twitter; b) li jinbena mudell ta’ ħbub fin li jipprevedi ideoloġija politika ta’ utenti mhux osservati. Our results identify differences in both political leaning and engagement and the extent to which each group tweets using political keywords.  Fl-aħħar nett, nagħmlu xhieda ta' kif nistgħu ntejbu l-preċiżjoni tat-tbassir ideoloġiku billi nistruttaw ir-relazzjonijiet bejn il-gruppi ta' utenti.", 'uz': "Name Bu o'qituvchi foydalanuvchilarning siyasosiy fikrlarini 7 nuqta bilan o'rganadi. Bu bizga politika o'xshash va katta foydalanuvchilarni aniqlashga imkoniyat beradi. va siyosatiy fan va pollslarga qiziqarli qiziqarli guruhlar. Koʻrib chiqindilar orqali o'z haqida o'z berilgan xabar maʼlumotidan foydalanish uchun bizning maqsadimiz ikki marta: a) Twitterda foydalanuvchilarga qo'shimcha foydalanuvchilarni foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchiga tayyorlash uchun. (b) Qarsoodigan foydalanuvchilarning political fikrlarini ko'rganish uchun ajoyib modelni yaratish uchun. Bizning natijalarimiz siyosiy qo'llanmalar va tashkilotni va har bir guruh xavfsiz kalitlarni ishlatish imkoniyatini aniqlaydi. Oxirgi, biz foydalanuvchi guruhlari bilan bog'liqlarni foydalanish uchun fikologiy kutilgan tashkilotni qanday yaxshi ko'rsatishni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Lời tiên đoán chính trị tự động từ các bài báo truyền thông xã hội cho đến nay chỉ thành công trong việc phân biệt giới tự do và người bảo vệ công khai ở Mỹ. Nghiên cứu này xem xét tư tưởng chính trị của người dùng dựa trên một quy mô có bảy điểm, nó cho phép chúng ta xác định các nhóm người dùng từ chế độ vừa trung lập, đặc biệt quan tâm đến các nhà khoa học chính trị. Sử dụng các dữ liệu mới với các nhãn hiệu tư tưởng chính trị được tự giới thiệu qua các cuộc khảo sát, mục tiêu của chúng ta là hai lần: a) mô tả các nhóm người dùng bận rộn chính trị bằng cách dùng ngôn ngữ trên Twitter; B) xây dựng một mô hình hoàn hảo tiên đoán tư tưởng chính trị của những người dùng vô hình. Kết quả của chúng tôi xác định sự khác nhau về chiều hướng chính trị và cam kết, và mức độ mỗi nhóm tweet bằng từ khóa chính trị. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi chứng minh cách cải thiện tính chính xác của tư tưởng bằng cách tận dụng mối quan hệ giữa các nhóm người dùng.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното прогнозиране на политическата ориентация от публикациите в социалните медии досега се оказа успешно само в разграничаването между публично обявени либерали и консерватори в САЩ. Това изследване разглежда политическата идеология на потребителите, използвайки седем точки скала, която ни позволява да идентифицираме политически умерени и неутрални потребители - групи, които представляват особен интерес за политическите учени и социолозите. Използвайки нов набор от данни с етикети на политическа идеология, самодокладвани чрез проучвания, нашата цел е две: а) да характеризираме групите политически ангажирани потребители чрез използването на езика в Туитър; б) да изгради фин модел, който прогнозира политическата идеология на невидимите потребители. Нашите резултати идентифицират различия както в политическия наклон, така и в ангажираността и степента, до която всяка група туитва с политически ключови думи. И накрая, демонстрираме как да подобрим точността на идеологичните прогнози чрез използване на взаимоотношенията между потребителските групи.', 'nl': 'Automatische voorspelling van politieke oriëntatie uit social media posts is tot op heden alleen succesvol gebleken in het onderscheid tussen publiek verklaarde liberalen en conservatieven in de VS. Deze studie onderzoekt de politieke ideologie van gebruikers aan de hand van een zeven-puntsschaal die ons in staat stelt politiek gematigde en neutrale gebruikers te identificeren van groepen die van bijzonder belang zijn voor politicologen en pollsters. Met behulp van een nieuwe dataset met politieke ideologische labels die zelf worden gerapporteerd via enquêtes, is ons doel tweeledig: a) de groepen politiek betrokken gebruikers karakteriseren door middel van taalgebruik op Twitter; b) het bouwen van een fijngranig model dat politieke ideologie voorspelt van onzichtbare gebruikers. Onze resultaten identificeren verschillen in politieke neiging en betrokkenheid en de mate waarin elke groep twittert met behulp van politieke trefwoorden. Tenslotte demonstreren we hoe we de nauwkeurigheid van ideologische voorspellingen kunnen verbeteren door gebruik te maken van de relaties tussen de gebruikersgroepen.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje automatske političke orijentacije iz postova društvenih medija do sada dokazuje uspješno samo u razlici između javno objavljenih liberala i konzervativa u SAD-u. U ovom ispitivanju istražuje političku ideologiju korisnika koristeći 7 bodova skalu koja nam omogućava identificirati politički umjerene i neutralne korisnike - grupe koje su posebno zanimljive političkim naučnicima i zagađa čima. Koristeći novi podaci s etiketama političke ideologije samopojavljenim putem ispitivanja, naš cilj je dvaput: a) karakterizirati grupe politički uključenih korisnika kroz korištenje jezika na Twitteru; b) izgraditi dobar model koji predviđa političku ideologiju nevidljivih korisnika. Naši rezultati identificiraju razlike i političkog naglašavanja i uključivanja i mjeru u kojoj svaka grupa tweets koristeći političke ključne riječi. Konačno, pokazujemo kako poboljšati preciznost predviđanja ideologije koristeći odnose između grupa korisnika.', 'ko': '지금까지는 미국이 공개적으로 선언한 자유파와 보수파를 구분할 때만 소셜미디어 게시물의 자동 정치성향 예측이 성공했다는 사실이 입증됐다.이 연구는 7가지 양표를 이용하여 사용자의 정치 이데올로기를 고찰함으로써 우리는 정치적으로 온화하고 중립적인 사용자인 정치 과학자와 여론 조사 전문가가 특히 흥미를 느끼는 단체를 식별할 수 있다.새로운 데이터 집합을 사용하고 자기보고 정치 이데올로기 라벨을 조사함으로써 우리의 목표는 두 가지가 있다. a) 트위터의 언어 사용을 통해 정치 활동에 참여하는 사용자를 묘사하는 것이다.b) 세립도 모델을 구축하여 스텔스 사용자의 정치 이데올로기를 예측한다.우리의 연구 결과는 정치 성향과 참여도의 차이, 그리고 각 단체가 정치 키워드를 사용해서 추론하는 정도를 확정했다.마지막으로 우리는 사용자 단체 간의 관계를 어떻게 활용하여 이데올로기 예측의 정확성을 높일 수 있는지 보여 주었다.', 'id': "Prediksi orientasi politik otomatis dari pos media sosial sehari-hari telah terbukti sukses hanya dalam membedakan antara liberal dan konservatif publik di Amerika Serikat. This study examines users' political ideology using a seven-point scale which enables us to identify politically moderate and neutral users - groups which are of particular interest to political scientists and pollsters.  Menggunakan set data baru dengan label ideologi politik yang dilaporkan sendiri melalui survei, tujuan kita adalah dua kali: a) untuk mengkaraterisasikan kelompok pengguna yang terlibat secara politik melalui penggunaan bahasa di Twitter; b) to build a fine-grained model that predicts political ideology of unseen users.  Hasil kita mengidentifikasikan perbedaan dalam pendekatan politik dan keterlibatan dan ke mana setiap kelompok tweet menggunakan kata kunci politik. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bagaimana untuk meningkatkan presisi prediksi ideologi dengan mengeksploitasi hubungan antara kelompok pengguna.", 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی رهبری سیاسی خودکار از رسانه\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی تا الان موفقیت تنها در اختلاف بین لیبرال\u200cها و محافظت\u200cکنندگان عمومی در آمریکا ثابت شده است. این مطالعه ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی کاربر را با استفاده از یک مقیاس هفت نقطه تحقیق می\u200cکند که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد که کاربران سیاسی متوسط و ناتوان را شناسایی کنیم، گروه\u200cهایی که به دانشمندان سیاسی و آلوده\u200cکنندگان علاقه\u200cای خا استفاده از یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای رمانی با برچسب\u200cهای ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی که از طریق تحقیقات خود گزارش شده\u200cاند، هدف ما دو برابر است: a) تا گروهی از کاربران\u200cهای سیاسی با استفاده از زبان\u200cهای توئیتر تشکیل دهیم; (b) برای ساختن یک مدل دانه\u200cای خوب که ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی از کاربران غیب را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما تفاوت\u200cهایی را در مورد استفاده از کلمات سیاسی و درگیری سیاسی و به اندازه\u200cای که هر گروه با استفاده از کلمات سیاسی توئیت می\u200cکند شناسایی می\u200cکند. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم چگونه دقیق پیش بینی ایده\u200cشناسی را با استفاده از رابطه\u200cهای بین گروه\u200cهای کاربر بهتر کنیم.', 'sw': "Uonyesho wa kisiasa wa kujitegemea kutoka makala za mitandao ya kijamii lazima hivi sasa unahitimisha kuwa ni mafanikio pekee kwa kutofautisha kati ya kutangaza uhuru na watetezi wa kihafidhina nchini Marekani. This study examines users' political ideology using a seven-point scale which enables us to identify politically moderate and neutral users - groups which are of particular interest to political scientists and pollsters.  Kwa kutumia taarifa za riwaya zilizowekwa na alama za kisiasa zilizoripotiwa kupitia utafiti, lengo letu ni mara mbili: a) kuwasifisha makundi ya watumiaji wa kisiasa waliohusika kupitia matumizi ya lugha kupitia mtandao wa Twita; b) kutengeneza muundo mzuri unaotabiri dhana ya kisiasa ya watumiaji wasiojulikana. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha tofauti katika misingi ya kisiasa na ushirikiano na kiwango ambacho kila kikundi kinatwiti kwa kutumia maneno ya kisiasa. Mwisho, tunaonyesha namna ya kuboresha utabiri wa mawazo kwa kutumia uhusiano kati ya makundi ya watumiaji.", 'da': 'Automatisk politisk orientering forudsigelse fra sociale medier har indtil videre kun vist sig at være vellykket med at skelne mellem offentligt erklærede liberale og konservative i USA. Denne undersøgelse undersøger brugernes politiske ideologi ved hjælp af en syv-punktsskala, der gør det muligt at identificere politisk moderate og neutrale brugere - grupper, der er af særlig interesse for politikere og meningsmålere. Ved hjælp af et nyt datasæt med politiske ideologimærker, der selv rapporteres gennem undersøgelser, er vores mål dobbelt: a) at karakterisere grupper af politisk engagerede brugere gennem sprogbrug på Twitter; b) at opbygge en finkornet model, der forudsiger politisk ideologi af usete brugere. Vores resultater identificerer forskelle i både politisk tilbøjelighed og engagement, og i hvilket omfang hver gruppe tweeter ved hjælp af politiske søgeord. Endelig demonstrerer vi, hvordan man kan forbedre ideologiforudsigelsens nøjagtighed ved at udnytte relationerne mellem brugergrupperne.', 'de': 'Die automatische Vorhersage politischer Orientierung aus Social Media Posts hat sich bisher nur bei der Unterscheidung zwischen öffentlich erklärten Liberalen und Konservativen in den USA bewährt. Diese Studie untersucht die politische Ideologie der Nutzer anhand einer Sieben-Punkte-Skala, die es uns ermöglicht, politisch moderate und neutrale Nutzergruppen zu identifizieren, die für Politikwissenschaftler und Umfrager von besonderem Interesse sind. Mit Hilfe eines neuartigen Datensatzes mit politisch-ideologischen Labels, die durch Umfragen selbst gemeldet werden, ist unser Ziel zweifach: a) die Gruppen politisch engagierter Nutzer durch Sprachgebrauch auf Twitter zu charakterisieren; b) ein feinmaschiges Modell zu entwickeln, das die politische Ideologie unsichtbarer Nutzer vorhersagt. Unsere Ergebnisse identifizieren Unterschiede sowohl in der politischen Ausrichtung als auch im Engagement und in dem Ausmaß, in dem jede Gruppe mit politischen Keywords twittert. Schließlich zeigen wir, wie die Genauigkeit der Ideologieprognition verbessert werden kann, indem die Beziehungen zwischen den Benutzergruppen ausgenutzt werden.', 'sq': "Automatic political orientation prediction from social media posts has to date proven successful only in distinguishing between publicly declared liberals and conservatives in the US.  This study examines users' political ideology using a seven-point scale which enables us to identify politically moderate and neutral users - groups which are of particular interest to political scientists and pollsters.  Using a novel data set with political ideology labels self-reported through surveys, our goal is two-fold: a) to characterize the groups of politically engaged users through language use on Twitter;  b) to build a fine-grained model that predicts political ideology of unseen users.  Rezultatet tona identifikojnë dallimet si në përqëndrimin politik ashtu edhe në angazhimin dhe në shkallën në të cilën çdo grup tweeton duke përdorur fjalët kyçe politike. Më në fund, ne demonstrojmë si të përmirësojmë saktësinë e parashikimit të ideologjisë duke shfrytëzuar marrëdhëniet midis grupeve përdorues.", 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեղադրություններից ավտոմատիկ քաղաքական ուղղությունների կանխատեսումը մինչ հիմա հաջողակ է ապացուցել միայն տարբերակելով ԱՄՆ-ում հանրային հայտարարված լիբերալների և պահպանողականների միջև: Այս ուսումնասիրությունը ուսումնասիրում է օգտագործողների քաղաքական գաղափարաբանությունը, օգտագործելով յոթ կետի սանդղակ, որը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս բացահայտել քաղաքական տեսակի և չեզոք օգտագործողների, խմբերի, որոնք քաղաքական գիտնական Օգտագործելով քաղաքական գաղափարաբանության պիտակների նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որոնք ինքնուրույն հայտարարվում են հարցումների միջոցով, մեր նպատակը երկու անգամ է. a) բնորոշել քաղաքականորեն ներգրավված օգտագործողների խմբերը Թվիթերի լեզուների օգտագործման միջ b) կառուցել մի գեղեցիկ մոդել, որը կանխատեսում է անտեսանելի օգտագործողների քաղաքական գաղափարախոսությունը: Մեր արդյունքները բացահայտում են քաղաքական մոտեցումների և ներգրավման տարբերությունները և այն քայլը, թե ինչքան յուրաքանչյուր խումբ թվիթերում է օգտագործելով քաղաքական բառեր: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես բարելավել գաղափարաբանության կանխատեսման ճշգրիտությունը օգտագործելով օգտագործողների խմբերի միջև եղած հարաբերությունները:', 'tr': "Sosyal medýdançalaryň ýerlerinden awtomatik syýasy ýagdaýlaşyk öňünden boýunça edilen ýagdaý diňe ABD'de publika deklaran liberaller we konservatýarlar arasynda tapawutlandyrmak üçin üýtgedilmeli. Bu araşdyrma ulananlaryň syýasy ideologiýasyny 7-nokat derejesi ulanyp syýasy umydyr we neutral ullançylaryny tanamaga mümkin edýär - syýasy bilim adamlary we sowçylara has gyzyklanýan toparlar. Politiki ideologiýa etiketleri bilen nowelläk maglumatlary ullanýan, biziň maksadymyz iki gezek bolsa: a) Twitter'da syýasatly işe alyp tutan ulanlaryň toparyny düzeltmek üçin; b) gaýd edilmedik ulananlaryň syýasy ideologiýasyny öňünden çykarýan bir nusga gurmak üçin. Biziň netijelerimiz hem syýasy sözleşme hem işleşmeleriň, hem her topar syýasy sözleri ulanyp tweets etýändigini tanaýarlar. Soňunda, ulançylar toparlaryň arasyndaky baglaşyklary ulanarak ideologiýanyň öngörümleriniň dogrylygyny nädip gowylaşdyrylygyny görkezýäris.", 'af': "Outomatiese politieke oriëntasie voorskou van sosiale medieposte het tot tot datum gespoedig slegs in die afdeling tussen openlik verkondig liberale en konservatiewe in die VSA. Hierdie studie ondersoek die politieke ideologie van gebruikers met 'n sewe punt skaal wat ons kan identifiseer politieke moderate en neutrale gebruikers - groepe wat van bepaalde belang is vir politieke wetenskappers en pollsters. Die gebruik van 'n nuwe data stel met politieke ideologie etikette wat self-verkondig is deur ondersoek, is ons doel twee maal: a) om die groepe van politieke verkondig gebruikers deur taal gebruik op Twitter te karakteriseer; b) â\x80\x99n fyn-koring model bou wat politiese ideologie van onverskyn gebruikers voorskou. Ons resultate identifiseer verskille in politieke leining en aantekening en die uitbreiding waarmee elke groep tweet met politieke sleutelwoorde. Eindelik, ons wys hoe ideologie voorskou presisie te verbeter deur die verwantings tussen die gebruikergroepe te gebruik.", 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ፖስቲካ የፖለቲካ አቀናቢ ማድረግ በአሜሪካ ባለሥልጣዊ ነፃነት እና conservatives መካከል በመለየት ብቻ ነው፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት የፖለቲካ አእምሮዎች የፖለቲካ አካባቢ፣ የፖለቲካ መካከለኛ እና የውይይት ተጠቃሚዎችን እና የመረጥ ምርጦች የፖለቲካዊ አዋቂዎች እና የመረጥጠኞች ቡድን በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የፖለቲካ አዳዲስ ማሳየት ማህበረሰብ በራሱ የተዘጋጀ የፖለቲካ ማሳየት ምልክቶችን በመጠቀም አቀማመጥ፣ አቃላማችን ሁለት እጥፍ ነው፤ a) የፖለቲካዊ ተግባራዊ ተጠቃሚዎችን በቋንቋ በትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች በመቀበል እና ለማስተካከል፡፡ b) የሳውቅ ተጠቃሚዎች የፖለቲካ አሳቤውን ለመፍጠር የሚችል ጥሩ ምሳሌ ለመሥራት ነው፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የፖለቲካ አካባቢ እና ተግባር እና የፖለቲካ ቃላትን በመጠቀም የፖለቲካ ቃላት የሚጠይቁትን ጥያቄ እና ጥያቄን ያሳውቃቸዋል፡፡ Finally, we demonstrate how to improve ideology prediction accuracy by exploiting the relationships between the user groups.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje automatske političke orijentacije iz postova društvenih medija do sada dokazuje uspješno samo u razlici između javno objavljenih liberala i konzervativa u SAD-u. Ova studija pregledava političku ideologiju korisnika koristeći sedam bodova skalu koja nam omogućava da identificiramo politički umjerene i neutralne korisnike - grupe koje su posebno zainteresovane političkim naučnicima i zagađa čima. Koristeći nove podatke sa političkim ideološkim etiketama koje su sami prijavljene kroz istraživanje, naš cilj je dva puta: a) karakterizirati grupe politički uključenih korisnika kroz korištenje jezika na Twitter; b) izgraditi dobar model koji predviđa političku ideologiju nevidljivih korisnika. Naši rezultati identificiraju razlike i političkog naglašavanja i angažmana, i u kakvoj mjeri svaka grupa tweets koristeći političke ključne riječi. Konačno, pokazujemo kako da poboljšamo preciznost predviđanja ideologije iskorištavajući odnose između grupa korisnika.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় রাজনৈতিক দিক থেকে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের পোস্ট থেকে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী শুধুমাত্র মার্কিন যুক্তরাষ্ট্রের স্ব এই গবেষণা ব্যবহারকারীদের রাজনৈতিক ধারণা ব্যবহারকারীদের পরীক্ষা করে সাতটি পয়েন্ট ব্যবহার করে যা আমাদের রাজনৈতিক আধুনিক এবং নিউট্রাল ব্যবহারকারীদের Using a novel data set with political ideology labels self-reported through surveys, our goal is two-fold: a) to characterize the groups of politically engaged users through language use on Twitter;  b) অদৃশ্য ব্যবহারকারীদের রাজনৈতিক ধারণা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য একটি সুন্দর গ্রাহক মডেল তৈরি করার জন্য। আমাদের ফলাফল রাজনৈতিক বিশ্বাস এবং অংশগ্রহণের মধ্যে পার্থক্য এবং প্রত্যেক গ্রুপ রাজনৈতিক কীবার্তা ব্যবহার করে টুইট শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করে কিভাবে ধারণাগত ভবিষ্যতের সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করতে পারি।', 'cs': 'Automatická predikce politické orientace z příspěvků na sociálních médiích se dosud osvědčila pouze v rozlišování mezi veřejně deklarovanými liberály a konzervativci v USA. Tato studie zkoumá politickou ideologii uživatelů pomocí sedmibodové stupnice, která nám umožňuje identifikovat politicky umírněné a neutrální uživatele skupiny, které jsou zvláště zajímavé pro politické vědce a ankety. S využitím nového datového souboru s politickými ideologickými označeními samozřejmě nahlášenými prostřednictvím průzkumů je naším cílem dvojí: a) charakterizovat skupiny politicky angažovaných uživatelů prostřednictvím jazykového používání na Twitteru; b) vytvořit jemný model, který předpovídá politickou ideologii neviditelných uživatelů. Naše výsledky identifikují rozdíly v politickém směru a angažovanosti a rozsahu, do jaké každá skupina tweetuje pomocí politických klíčových slov. Nakonec demonstrujeme, jak zlepšit přesnost predikce ideologie využitím vztahů mezi uživatelskými skupinami.', 'az': "Sosyal media məlumatlarından avtomatik siyasi tərzdə tədbir edilməsi ancaq ABD'də açıq-aşkar liberallər və konservativlar arasından ayırmaq üçün müvəffəqiyyəti göstərməlidir. Bu təcrübə istifadəçilərin siyasi ideolojisini yeddi nöqtə ölçü vasitəsilə təşkil edir ki, siyasi və nötrəli istifadəçiləri - siyasi bilim adamlara və təşkil edənlərə məxsus olan qruplar təşkil edir. Siyasi ideoloji etiketləri ilə yeni məlumatlar istifadə etmək məqsədimiz Twitter dilində istifadə edilən istifadəçilərin qruplarını müəyyən etməkdir; b) qeyb istifadəçilərin siyasi ideologiyasını təmin edir. Növbələrimiz siyasi təklif və işbirlikdə fərqlərimizi və hər grup siyasi anahtar sözlərini istifadə edərək tweets edir. Sonunda biz ideoloji tədbirlərinin doğruluğunu necə yaxşılaşdıracağını göstəririk, istifadəçi qrupların arasındakı ilişkiləri istifadə edərək.", 'et': 'Seni on sotsiaalmeedia postituste automaatne poliitilise orientatsiooni ennustamine osutunud edukaks ainult avalikult deklareeritud liberaalide ja konservatiivide eristamisel USAs. Käesolev uuring uurib kasutajate poliitilist ideoloogiat seitsmepunktilise skaala abil, mis võimaldab meil tuvastada poliitiliselt mõõdukaid ja neutraalseid kasutajaid - rühmi, mis pakuvad eriti huvi poliitikateadlastele ja küsitlejatele. Meie eesmärgiks on kaks: a) iseloomustada poliitiliselt kaasatud kasutajate rühmi Twitteris keelekasutuse kaudu; b) ehitada peenrahaline mudel, mis ennustab nähtamatute kasutajate poliitilist ideoloogiat. Meie tulemused tuvastavad erinevusi nii poliitilises suundumuses kui ka kaasatuses ning seda, mil määral iga rühm säutseb poliitiliste märksõnadega. Lõpuks näitame, kuidas parandada ideoloogia ennustamise täpsust, kasutades ära kasutajarühmade vahelisi suhteid.', 'fi': 'Automaattinen poliittisen suuntautumisen ennustaminen sosiaalisessa mediassa on tähän mennessä osoittautunut menestyksekkääksi vain erottaessaan julkisesti julistetut liberaalit ja konservatiivit Yhdysvalloissa. Tässä tutkimuksessa tarkastellaan käyttäjien poliittista ideologiaa seitsemän pisteen asteikolla, jonka avulla voimme tunnistaa poliittisesti maltillisia ja neutraaleja käyttäjiä - ryhmiä, jotka kiinnostavat erityisesti poliittisia tutkijoita ja mielipidemittajia. Käyttämällä uudenlaista aineistoa, jonka poliittinen ideologia on itse raportoitu kyselyissä, tavoitteenamme on kaksitahoinen: a) luonnehtia poliittisesti sitoutuneita käyttäjiä Twitterin kielen käytön kautta; b) rakentaa hienorakeinen malli, joka ennustaa näkymättömien käyttäjien poliittista ideologiaa. Tuloksissamme tunnistetaan eroja sekä poliittisessa taipumuksessa että sitoutumisessa sekä se, missä määrin kukin ryhmä twiittaa poliittisilla avainsanoilla. Lopuksi näytämme, miten ideologian ennustamisen tarkkuutta voidaan parantaa hyödyntämällä käyttäjäryhmien välisiä suhteita.', 'ca': "Les prediccions automàtiques d'orientació política dels mitjans socials han demostrat èxit fins ara només en distingir entre liberals i conservadors declarats públicament als Estats Units. Aquest estudi examina la ideologia política dels usuaris utilitzant una escala de set punts que ens permet identificar usuaris políticament moderats i neutrals - grups que són d'especial interès per científics polítics i polítics. Utilitzant un nou conjunt de dades amb etiquetes d'ideologia política auto-informades a través d'encuestes, el nostre objectiu és doble: a) caracteritzar els grups d'usuaris involucrats políticament mitjançant l'ús del llenguatge a Twitter; b) construir un model amb grans grans que prediu la ideologia política dels usuaris invisibles. Our results identify differences in both political leaning and engagement and the extent to which each group tweets using political keywords.  Finalment, demostram com millorar la precisió de la predicció ideològica explotant les relacions entre els grups d'usuaris.", 'sk': 'Avtomatsko napovedovanje politične usmerjenosti iz objav na družbenih omrežjih se je do danes izkazalo za uspešno le pri razlikovanju med javno razglašenimi liberalci in konservativci v ZDA. Ta študija preučuje politično ideologijo uporabnikov s sedemtočkovno lestvico, ki nam omogoča prepoznavanje politično zmernih in nevtralnih uporabnikov - skupin, ki so posebej zanimive za politične znanstvenike in ankete. Z uporabo novega nabora podatkov z oznakami politične ideologije, ki se samoporočajo skozi ankete, je naš cilj dvojni: a) označiti skupine politično angažiranih uporabnikov preko uporabe jezika na Twitterju; b) zgraditi drobnozrnat model, ki napoveduje politično ideologijo nevidnih uporabnikov. Naši rezultati ugotavljajo razlike v političnem nagnjenju in angažiranju ter obseg, v katerem vsaka skupina tvita s političnimi ključnimi besedami. Na koncu predstavljamo, kako izboljšati natančnost ideologije napovedovanja z izkoriščanjem odnosov med skupinami uporabnikov.', 'he': 'חיזוי אוטומטי של מדיה פוליטית ממשימות התקשורת החברתית הוכיח להצליח רק בהבדל בין ליברלים ומשמרים מוכרחים בפומבי בארה"ב. מחקר זה בודק אידיאולוגיה פוליטית של המשתמשים בשימוש בסולם שבע נקודות שמאפשר לנו לזהות משתמשים פוליטית מוצמצים ונטרלים - קבוצות שמעניינות במיוחד למדענים פוליטיים ומחקרים. בשימוש בסט נתונים חדש עם תוויות אידיאולוגיה פוליטית שמדווחות בעצמנו דרך סקריות, המטרה שלנו היא כפולה: a) לתייצב את קבוצות המשתמשים המעורבים פוליטית דרך השימוש בשפה בטוויטר; b) לבנות דוגמא מעולה שחזות אידיאולוגיה פוליטית של משתמשים בלתי נראים. התוצאות שלנו מזהה הבדלים בשינוי פוליטי ובהתערבות ובמידה לכל קבוצה טוויטת באמצעות מילים מפתחות פוליטיות. סוף סוף, אנחנו מראים כיצד לשפר את מדויקת חיזוי האידיאולוגיה על ידי ניצל את מערכות היחסים בין קבוצות המשתמשים.', 'ha': "Kayan kunyar da farat-ori na siyasaci daga maimaimain mitandaki na jamii, sai a baya a yanzu ta zama mai cin nasara kawai a rarrabe tsakanin da aka sanar da mutane da tsariyattu a cikin Marekani. Wannan littãfi yana jarraba fikayaikin siyasan da masu amfani da yana amfani da wata sifati saba point wanda ke so da mu gane wa masu amfani da masu fasada na kisa da na'ura - jama'a waɗanda ke da amfani da masu sayanta na siyasa da kura. Yi amfani da wani data na node wanda aka samar da alama masu saɓa na kisasa masu yin rubu'a, kanmu yana da amfani da harshen Twitter; b) kuɓutar da wata misãla mai kyau wanda ke gabatar zato na'urar masu amfani da b a'a sani ba. MatamayinMu na gane sãɓãni a cikin masu tawada'a da shagala na kisa da gwargwadon da kõwace jama'a ta yi Twitter game da words masu kisa. Gani, za mu nũna jini za mu improve gaurawa na'ura na fikloiki da za'a yi isticmani da mazaɓa tsakanin jama'a mãsu amfani da shi.", 'jv': 'Spanish Jejaring iki digawe sistem politik sing gambar nggambar kelas 7 punt, sing bisa nyebutne awak dhéwé nggawe politiki lan alam-alam sing yendalikno karo pak sampek - kelompok sing larang awak dhéwé sampek kanggo ngerasakno politik lan nguasakno-pukan. Ngawe ngubah data donêng ngentèni ana karo etikete politik sing berarti meluran liwih nguasai winih, bukêng awak dhéwé kuwi tanggal dhéwé: a) kanggo kelasan kelompok politik sing berarti ngulinakake sistem sing nyebutakone pengguna nyebuturan langgar Google; b) nggawe model sing dibenalke sampeyan kang disebarke ide-politik sing nguasar bendhisik. Rejalaké awak dhéwé éngari kalaluk ning larang politik lan nggawe gerakan karo hal-hal kuwi nggawe kelompok sing tuwit gambar kelas politik Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé ngerasah piye meluran pangan idéholoje kuwi kesempatan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe kelas kuwi nggawe kelas mruput.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ གནད་དོན་འདིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཏོན་ཟིན་པའི་མདུན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡོད། སྲིད་ཡིག་ཆེན་ལུགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་ཚིག་གིས་རང་ཉིད་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཟིན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། b) ནུས་པ་མེད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚོ་ཁག་གི་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Behavioral and Social Information for Weakly Supervised Collective Classification of Political Discourse on Twitter', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من المعلومات السلوكية والاجتماعية من أجل التصنيف الجماعي الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف للخطاب السياسي على تويتر', 'pt': 'Aproveitando Informações Comportamentais e Sociais para Classificação Coletiva Fracamente Supervisionada do Discurso Político no Twitter', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de la información conductual y social para una clasificación colectiva débilmente supervisada del discurso político en Twitter', 'fr': 'Tirer parti des informations comportementales et sociales pour une classification collective faiblement supervisée du discours politique sur Twitter', 'zh': '以行与世信息Twitter政语弱监聚', 'ja': 'Twitter上の政治的言説の弱く監督された集合的分類のために行動的および社会的情報を活用する', 'hi': 'चहचहाना पर राजनीतिक प्रवचन के कमजोर पर्यवेक्षित सामूहिक वर्गीकरण के लिए व्यवहार और सामाजिक जानकारी का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Использование поведенческой и социальной информации для слабо контролируемой коллективной классификации политического дискурса в Twitter', 'ga': 'Faisnéis Iompraíochta agus Shóisialta a Ghiaráil le haghaidh Aicmiú Comhchoiteann Dioscúrsa Polaitíochta faoi Mhaoirseacht Lag ar Twitter', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Viselkedési és társadalmi információk hasznosítása a politikai beszédek gyengén felügyelt kollektív osztályozásához a Twitteren', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση Συμπεριφερειακών και Κοινωνικών Πληροφοριών για την αδύναμη Εποπτευμένη Συλλογική Ταξινόμηση Πολιτικών Διαλόγων στο Twitter', 'it': 'Sfruttare le informazioni comportamentali e sociali per la classificazione collettiva debolmente controllata del discorso politico su Twitter', 'mk': 'Разголемување на однесувањето и социјалните информации за слабо надгледувана колективна класификација на политички дискурс на Твитер', 'lt': 'Leveraging Behavioral and Social Information for Weakly Supervised Collective Classification of Political Discourse on Twitter', 'kk': 'Твиттерде саяси сөйлемелерді бақылау және әлемдік мәліметтер үшін көңіл бақылау және әлемдік мәліметі', 'ms': 'Meningkatkan Maklumat Perilaku dan Sosial untuk Klasifikasi Kolektif Dengan Kecacatan Pada Twitter', 'ml': 'വൈകുന്ന സാമൂഹ്യ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വേണ്ടി ലെവര്\u200dജിങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Leveraging Behavioral and Social Information for Weakly Supervised Collective Classification of Political Discourse on Twitter', 'mn': 'Твиттерт улс төрийн ярианы нийгмийн хөдөлгөөн, нийгмийн мэдээлэл', 'no': 'Oppførsel og sosialinformasjon for viktig overvåking av kollektiv klassifisering av politiske diskursar på Twitter', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie informacji behawioralnych i społecznych do słabo nadzorowanej zbiorowej klasyfikacji dyskursu politycznego na Twitterze', 'ro': 'Utilizarea informațiilor comportamentale și sociale pentru clasificarea colectivă slab supravegheată a discursului politic pe Twitter', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Levering Behavior and Social Information for Weekly Supered Collective Classification of Political Discourse on Twitter', 'sv': 'Utnyttja beteendeinformation och social information för svagt övervakad kollektiv klassificering av politiska diskurser på Twitter', 'ur': 'ٹویٹر پر سیاسی دیسکورز کی کلاسیفٹ کے لئے نہایت نازل ہونے والی رفتار اور سوسیال معلومات کے لئے', 'ta': 'வாரத்தில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட தொகுப்பு வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'sr': 'Povlačenje ponašanja i socijalne informacije za slabe nadzorne kolektivne klasifikacije političkih diskusija na Twitter-u', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thông tin hành vi và xã hội cấp cao cho Hệ thống giám sát Tập hợp Về phân tích chính trị trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Използване на поведенческа и социална информация за слабо контролирана колективна класификация на политическия дискурс в Туитър', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af adfærdsmæssig og social information til svagt overvåget kollektiv klassificering af politiske diskurser på Twitter', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van gedrags- en sociale informatie voor zwak gecontroleerd collectief classificeren van politiek discours op Twitter', 'hr': 'Usporavanje ponašanja i socijalne informacije za slabe nadzorne kolektivne klasifikacije političkih diskusija na Twitter-u', 'id': 'Meningkatkan Informasi Perilaku dan Sosial untuk Klasifikasi Kollektif Bersikap Politis di Twitter', 'de': 'Nutzung verhaltensbezogener und sozialer Informationen zur schwach überwachten kollektiven Klassifizierung politischer Diskurse auf Twitter', 'ko': '행위와 사회 정보를 이용하여 트위터의 정치적 언어에 대해 약한 감독을 하는 집단 분류', 'fa': 'تحت تاثیر رفتار و اطلاعات اجتماعی برای شناسایی مجموعه\u200cی مشاوره\u200cهای سیاسی در توئیتر', 'tr': "Twitter'da Syýahatça Gözlemýän Kolleksiýa Soňlaşmalar üçin Nähili Maglumaty Derjesi we sosial Maglumaty", 'af': 'Gedrag en sosiale inligting vir weerlik ondersoekte samekomstige klassifikasie van politieke diskursie op Twitter', 'sw': 'Uandishi wa Habari za Utamaduni na Kijamii kwa ajili ya Makosa ya Utamaduni wa Siasa kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'sq': 'Shkatërrimi i informacionit sjellësor dhe social për klasifikimin kolektiv të diskutimit politik në Twitter me mbikqyrje të dobët', 'hy': 'Թվիթերում քաղաքական քննարկումների թույլ վերահսկվող հավաքական դասակարգման համար բարձրացնել վարքագծային և սոցիալական տեղեկատվությունը', 'am': 'አካባቢ እና ማኅበራዊ መረጃ ለመጠቀም አካባቢ ስብስብ የፖለቲካ ወሲቀት በትዊተር ላይ', 'az': '哃뙶牡瑤慫쒱⁓楹慳椠䑩獫畳楹慬慲쒱渠䏉饮滉饴泉駅齤楲楬淉饳椠䏉饮滉饴泉駅齤楲楬淉饳椠盉餠卯獩慬⁍慬쎼浡瓄넊', 'bn': 'সপ্তাহে সার্ভিস সংক্রান্ত সংগ্রহের জন্য আচরণ এবং সামাজিক তথ্য লেভারেজিং করা হচ্ছে টুইটারে রাজনৈতিক সংক্রান্ত স', 'bs': 'Usporavanje ponašanja i socijalne informacije za slabe nadzorne kolektivne klasifikacije političkih diskursa na Twitter-u', 'ca': 'Leveraging Behavioral and Social Information for Weakly Supervised Collective Classification of Political Discourse on Twitter', 'cs': 'Využití behaviorálních a sociálních informací pro slabě kontrolovanou kolektivní klasifikaci politického diskursu na Twitteru', 'fi': 'Käyttäytymisen ja sosiaalisen tiedon hyödyntäminen heikosti valvotussa poliittisen diskurssin kollektiivisessa luokittelussa Twitterissä', 'et': 'Käitumis- ja sotsiaalse teabe kasutamine poliitilise diskursuse nõrgalt järelevalve all oleva kollektiivse klassifikatsiooni jaoks Twitteris', 'jv': 'Sugeng Panjenengan langkung Informasi Suwasi kanggo Kelangan Karo iCalendar Karo iCalendar Debian', 'he': 'מגביר מידע התנהגות והחברתי לטוויטר', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje vedenjskih in socialnih informacij za šibko nadzorovano kolektivno klasifikacijo političnega diskurza na Twitterju', 'bo': 'སྤྲོ་སྣང་བྱེད་པའི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་'}
{'en': 'Framing is a political strategy in which politicians carefully word their statements in order to control public perception of issues. Previous works exploring political framing typically analyze frame usage in longer texts, such as congressional speeches. We present a collection of weakly supervised models which harness collective classification to predict the frames used in political discourse on the microblogging platform, Twitter. Our global probabilistic models show that by combining both lexical features of tweets and network-based behavioral features of Twitter, we are able to increase the average, unsupervised F1 score by 21.52 points over a lexical baseline alone.', 'es': 'El encuadre es una estrategia política en la que los políticos redactan cuidadosamente sus declaraciones para controlar la percepción pública de los problemas. Los trabajos anteriores que exploran el encuadre político suelen analizar el uso de marcos en textos más largos, como los discursos del Congreso. Presentamos una colección de modelos débilmente supervisados que aprovechan la clasificación colectiva para predecir los marcos utilizados en el discurso político en la plataforma de microblogueo Twitter. Nuestros modelos probabilísticos globales muestran que, al combinar las características léxicas de los tuits y las características de comportamiento basadas en la red de Twitter, podemos aumentar la puntuación media de F1 sin supervisión en 21,52 puntos por encima de una línea de base léxica solamente.', 'ar': 'التأطير هو استراتيجية سياسية يقوم فيها السياسيون بصياغة بياناتهم بعناية من أجل السيطرة على الإدراك العام للقضايا. تحلل الأعمال السابقة التي تستكشف التأطير السياسي عادةً استخدام الإطار في نصوص أطول ، مثل خطابات الكونغرس. نقدم مجموعة من النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف الضعيف والتي تستخدم التصنيف الجماعي للتنبؤ بالأطر المستخدمة في الخطاب السياسي على منصة المدونات الصغيرة تويتر. تُظهر نماذجنا الاحتمالية العالمية أنه من خلال الجمع بين كل من السمات المعجمية للتغريدات والميزات السلوكية القائمة على الشبكة في Twitter ، يمكننا زيادة متوسط درجة F1 غير الخاضعة للإشراف بمقدار 21.52 نقطة على خط الأساس المعجمي وحده.', 'pt': 'O enquadramento é uma estratégia política na qual os políticos redigiram cuidadosamente suas declarações para controlar a percepção pública das questões. Trabalhos anteriores que exploram o enquadramento político normalmente analisam o uso do enquadramento em textos mais longos, como discursos no Congresso. Apresentamos uma coleção de modelos fracamente supervisionados que aproveitam a classificação coletiva para prever os frames usados no discurso político na plataforma de microblogging Twitter. Nossos modelos probabilísticos globais mostram que, combinando os recursos lexicais dos tweets e os recursos comportamentais baseados em rede do Twitter, somos capazes de aumentar a pontuação média não supervisionada da F1 em 21,52 pontos apenas em uma linha de base lexical.', 'fr': "Le cadrage est une stratégie politique dans laquelle les politiciens formulent soigneusement leurs déclarations afin de contrôler la perception du public à l'égard des questions. Les travaux précédents explorant le cadrage politique analysent généralement l'utilisation des cadres dans des textes plus longs, tels que les discours au Congrès. Nous présentons une collection de modèles faiblement supervisés qui exploitent la classification collective pour prédire les cadres utilisés dans le discours politique sur la plateforme de microblogging Twitter. Nos modèles probabilistes mondiaux montrent qu'en combinant à la fois les caractéristiques lexicales des tweets et les caractéristiques comportementales basées sur le réseau de Twitter, nous sommes en mesure d'augmenter le score F1 moyen non supervisé de 21,52 points par rapport à une base lexicale uniquement.", 'ja': 'フレーミングとは、政治家が問題に対する世間の認識をコントロールするために、自分の発言を慎重に言葉にする政治戦略である。政治的枠組みを探求する以前の著作は、通常、議会演説などの長いテキストでフレームの使用を分析します。私たちは、マイクロブログプラットフォームであるTwitterで政治的な議論で使用されるフレームを予測するために集合的な分類を利用する、弱く監督されたモデルのコレクションを提示します。私たちの世界的な確率モデルは、ツイートの語彙機能とTwitterのネットワークベースの行動機能の両方を組み合わせることで、語彙ベースラインだけで21.52ポイントの平均的な無監督F 1スコアを増加させることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '框架者,政之策也,政治家谨言其声明,以制众心。 昔之求政框架常析长文(如国会)之框架用法。 建一系弱以监模形,因群类以占微博平台Twitter政语之框架。 吾全球概率形明,合推文之词汇,Twitter基于网络,能以均无监督F1分增于词汇基线21.52分。', 'hi': 'फ्रेमिंग एक राजनीतिक रणनीति है जिसमें राजनेता मुद्दों की सार्वजनिक धारणा को नियंत्रित करने के लिए सावधानीपूर्वक अपने बयानों को व्यक्त करते हैं। राजनीतिक फ्रेमिंग की खोज करने वाले पिछले काम आमतौर पर लंबे ग्रंथों में फ्रेम उपयोग का विश्लेषण करते हैं, जैसे कि कांग्रेस के भाषण। हम कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल का एक संग्रह प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो माइक्रोब्लॉगिंग प्लेटफॉर्म, ट्विटर पर राजनीतिक प्रवचन में उपयोग किए जाने वाले फ्रेम की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए सामूहिक वर्गीकरण का दोहन करते हैं। हमारे वैश्विक संभाव्य मॉडल से पता चलता है कि ट्वीट्स की लेक्सिकल विशेषताओं और ट्विटर की नेटवर्क-आधारित व्यवहार सुविधाओं दोनों के संयोजन से, हम अकेले एक लेक्सिकल बेसलाइन पर 21.52 अंकों से औसत, असुरक्षित एफ 1 स्कोर को बढ़ाने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'Формирование - это политическая стратегия, в которой политики тщательно формулируют свои заявления, чтобы контролировать общественное восприятие проблем. В предыдущих работах, посвященных изучению политического обрамления, обычно анализируется использование обрамления в более длинных текстах, таких как выступления в конгрессе. Мы представляем коллекцию слабо контролируемых моделей, которые используют коллективную классификацию для прогнозирования фреймов, используемых в политическом дискурсе на платформе микроблогов Twitter. Наши глобальные вероятностные модели показывают, что, сочетая как лексические признаки твитов, так и сетевые поведенческие признаки Twitter, мы можем увеличить средний, неконтролируемый балл F1 на 21,52 пункта по сравнению только с лексической базой.', 'ga': 'Is straitéis pholaitiúil é chumadh ina gcuireann polaiteoirí a gcuid ráiteas i bhfocal go cúramach chun dearcadh an phobail ar cheisteanna a rialú. Go hiondúil déanann saothair roimhe seo a dhéanann iniúchadh ar fhrámaíocht pholaitiúil anailís ar úsáid fráma i dtéacsanna níos faide, mar óráidí comhdhála. Cuirimid i láthair cnuasach de shamhlacha lag-mhaoirsithe a bhaineann leas as rangú comhchoiteann chun na frámaí a úsáidtear sa dioscúrsa polaitiúil ar an ardán micreabhlagála, Twitter, a thuar. Léiríonn ár múnlaí dóchúlachta domhanda, trí ghnéithe foclóireachta tweets agus gnéithe iompraíochta líonra-bhunaithe Twitter a chomhcheangal, gur féidir linn an meánscór F1 gan mhaoirseacht a mhéadú 21.52 pointe thar bhonnlíne foclóireachta amháin.', 'hu': 'A keretezés olyan politikai stratégia, amelyben a politikusok gondosan megfogalmazzák állításaikat annak érdekében, hogy ellenőrizzék a nyilvánosság felfogását a kérdésekről. A politikai keretezést vizsgáló korábbi munkák jellemzően hosszabb szövegekben, például kongresszusi beszédekben vizsgálják a keretek használatát. Gyengén felügyelt modellek gyűjteményét mutatjuk be, amelyek kollektív osztályozást használnak arra, hogy megjósolják a politikai diskurzusban használt kereteket a mikroblogoló platformon, a Twitteren. Globális valószínűségi modelleink azt mutatják, hogy a tweetek lexikai funkcióinak és a Twitter hálózati alapú viselkedési funkcióinak kombinálásával 21,52 ponttal növelhetjük az átlagos, felügyelet nélküli F1 pontszámot egyedül a lexikai alapképzéshez képest.', 'ka': 'ფრამინგი არის პოლიტიკური სტრატიგია, რომელიც პოლიტიკონები მხოლოდ ამბობენ საკუთარი გამოსახულებას, რომ კონტროლისთვის პოლიტიკური გონების წინა მუშაობა პოლიტიკური ფრამების გამოყენებას, როგორც კონგრესიური სიტყვებში, ანალიზება ფრამების გამოყენებას. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ კოლექციაციას ძალიან დანარწმუნებული მოდელების, რომელიც კოლექტიური კლასიფიკაცია გამოიყენება პოლიტიკური დისკურსში გამოიყენებული ფრამები, Twitter- ჩვენი გლობალური შესაბამისი მოდელები აჩვენებს, რომ Twitter-ის ტევიტების ლექსიკალური ფუნქციების და ქსელის მოქმედების ფუნქციების შესაბამისად, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ საშუალო, არაფერიზებული F1 მოდელზე 21.52', 'el': 'Η πλαισίωση είναι μια πολιτική στρατηγική στην οποία οι πολιτικοί εκφράζουν προσεκτικά τις δηλώσεις τους προκειμένου να ελέγξουν την αντίληψη του κοινού για τα θέματα. Προηγούμενες εργασίες που διερευνούν την πολιτική πλαισίωση συνήθως αναλύουν τη χρήση πλαισίων σε μακρύτερα κείμενα, όπως ομιλίες του Κογκρέσου. Παρουσιάζουμε μια συλλογή από αδύναμα εποπτευμένα μοντέλα που αξιοποιούν τη συλλογική ταξινόμηση για να προβλέψουν τα πλαίσια που χρησιμοποιούνται στον πολιτικό διάλογο στην πλατφόρμα μικροblogging, Twitter. Τα παγκόσμια πιθανολογικά μοντέλα μας δείχνουν ότι συνδυάζοντας τόσο τα λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά των tweets όσο και τα χαρακτηριστικά συμπεριφοράς που βασίζονται στο δίκτυο του Twitter, είμαστε σε θέση να αυξήσουμε το μέσο, χωρίς επίβλεψη σκορ F1 κατά 21,52 πόντους πάνω από μια λεξική βάση μόνο.', 'lt': 'Sistema yra politinė strategija, kurioje politikai atidžiai išreiškia savo pareiškimus, kad galėtų kontroliuoti visuomenės požiūrį į klausimus. Ankstesniuose darbuose, kuriuose nagrinėjama politinė struktūra, paprastai analizuojamas ilgesnių tekstų, pavyzdžiui, kongresinių kalbų, pagrindų naudojimas. Mes pristatome silpnai prižiūrimų modelių rinkinį, kuris naudoja kolektyvinę klasifikaciją, kad būtų galima prognozuoti mikroblogo platformos, Twitter, politinėse diskusijose naudojamas sistemas. Mūsų visuotiniai probabilistiniai modeliai rodo, kad derindami dviejų dviejų tekstinių ir tinklu grindžiamų Twitter elgesio savybių, mes galime padidinti vidutinį, nepastebimą F1 rezultatą 21,52 punktu, palyginti su vien tik tekstine baze.', 'it': "Il framing è una strategia politica in cui i politici pronunciano attentamente le loro dichiarazioni al fine di controllare la percezione pubblica delle questioni. I lavori precedenti che esplorano il framing politico analizzano tipicamente l'uso dei frame in testi più lunghi, come i discorsi del Congresso. Presentiamo una raccolta di modelli poco supervisionati che sfruttano la classificazione collettiva per prevedere i frame utilizzati nel discorso politico sulla piattaforma di microblogging, Twitter. I nostri modelli probabilistici globali mostrano che combinando sia le caratteristiche lessicali dei tweet che le funzionalità comportamentali basate sulla rete di Twitter, siamo in grado di aumentare il punteggio medio F1 non supervisionato di 21,52 punti rispetto a una sola base lessicale.", 'kk': 'Фраминг - саясаттар мәселелерді бақылау үшін мәселелерді бақылау үшін өзінің сөйлемелерін тәжірибе сөйлейтін саясатты стратегия. Алдыңғы жұмыстар саяси фреймдерді зерттеу кәдімгі, конгресс сөздері секілді, фреймдердің қолдануын ұзындық мәтіндерде анализиру. Біз микроблог платформасында саяси дискурстарда қолданылатын фреймдерді таңдау үшін жинақтау үлгілерін таңдаймыз. Біздің жалпы ықтималдық үлгілеріміз Твиттердің тейтеттерінің лексикалық мүмкіндіктерін және желінде негізделген әрекеттерін біріктіріп, орташалық, тек лексикалық негізінен 21,52 нүкте F1 нүктесін өзгертуге болады.', 'mk': 'Рампирањето е политичка стратегија во која политичарите внимателно ги објаснуваат своите изјави со цел да ја контролираат јавната перцепција на прашањата. Претходните дела кои ги истражуваат политичките рамки обично анализираат употребата на рамки во подолгите тексти, како што се конгресните говорови. Презентираме колекција слабо надгледувани модели кои користат колективна класификација за да ги предвидат рамките кои се користат во политичкиот дискурс на микроблоговската платформа, Твитер. Нашите глобални веројатни модели покажуваат дека со комбинација на лексикалните карактеристики на твитови и мрежните карактеристики на Твитер, можеме да го зголемиме просечниот, ненадгледуван резултат на F1 за 21,52 поени над само лексикалната основа.', 'ms': 'Bingkai adalah strategi politik di mana ahli politik dengan hati-hati mengucapkan pernyataan mereka untuk mengawal perasaan awam mengenai isu. Kerja sebelumnya mengeksplorasi bingkai politik biasanya menganalisis penggunaan bingkai dalam teks yang lebih panjang, seperti ucapan kongres. Kami memperkenalkan koleksi model yang mengawasi kelemahan yang menggunakan klasifikasi kolektif untuk meramalkan bingkai yang digunakan dalam pembicaraan politik pada platform mikroblog, Twitter. Model kemungkinan global kita menunjukkan bahawa dengan menggabungkan kedua-dua ciri-ciri leksikal tweet dan ciri-ciri perilaku berdasarkan rangkaian Twitter, kita boleh meningkatkan rata-rata, skor F1 yang tidak diawasi dengan 21.52 titik atas dasar leksikal sahaja.', 'ml': 'ഫ്രോമിങ്ങ് ഒരു രാഷ്ട്രീയ ക്രമത്താണ്. അതില്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയക്കാര്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് അവരുടെ പ്രസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ നീണ്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമിന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടു മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗിങ്ങ് പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിലെ രാഷ്ട്രീയ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി കൂടുതല്\u200d ദുര്\u200d Our global probabilistic models show that by combining both lexical features of tweets and network-based behavioral features of Twitter, we are able to increase the average, unsupervised F1 score by 21.52 points over a lexical baseline alone.', 'mt': 'L-iffurmar ta’ qafas huwa strateġija politika li fiha l-politiċi jikkumentaw bir-reqqa d-dikjarazzjonijiet tagħhom sabiex jikkontrollaw il-perċezzjoni pubblika tal-kwistjonijiet. Xogħlijiet preċedenti li jesploraw l-oqfsa politiċi tipikament janalizzaw l-użu tal-oqfsa f’testi itwal, bħal diskorsi kongressivi. Aħna nippreżentaw ġabra ta’ mudelli b’superviżjoni dgħajfa li jużaw il-klassifikazzjoni kollettiva biex jipprevedu l-oqfsa użati fid-diskors politiku fuq il-pjattaforma tal-mikroblogging, Twitter. Il-mudelli probabilistiċi globali tagħna juru li billi ngħaqdu kemm il-karatteristiċi lexiċi tat-tweets kif ukoll il-karatteristiċi ta’ mġiba bbażati fuq in-netwerk ta’ Twitter, nistgħu nżidu l-punteġġ F1 medju, mhux sorveljat b’21.52 punt fuq linja bażi lexika biss.', 'no': 'Framing er ein politisk strategi der politikere særleg ordnar uttalene sine for å kontrollere offentlige oppfatningar av problemar. Førre arbeidar som utforskar politiske ramme, analyser vanlegvis rammebruk i lengre tekstar, slik som kongresstaler. Vi presenterer eit samling av svakt oversikt modeller som brukar kolektiv klassifikasjon for å foregå ramma som brukar i politiske diskursar på mikrobloggplattformet, Twitter. Våre globale sannsynlige modeller viser at ved å kombinere både leksiske funksjonar på tweets og nettverksbaserte oppførsel av Twitter, kan vi øke gjennomsnittlig, ikkje oppretta F1-poeng med 21,52 punkt over ein leksisk baseline alene.', 'pl': 'Framing to strategia polityczna, w której politycy starannie wyrażają swoje wypowiedzi, aby kontrolować społeczne postrzeganie kwestii. Poprzednie prace badające ramowanie polityczne zazwyczaj analizują wykorzystanie ram w dłuższych tekstach, takich jak przemówienia kongresowe. Prezentujemy zbiór słabo nadzorowanych modeli, które wykorzystują klasyfikację zbiorową do przewidywania ram wykorzystywanych w dyskursie politycznym na platformie mikroblogowym Twitter. Nasze globalne modele prawdopodobieństwa pokazują, że łącząc zarówno cechy leksykalne tweetów, jak i sieciowe cechy behawioralne Twittera, jesteśmy w stanie zwiększyć średni, nienadzorowany wynik F1 o 21,52 punkty ponad wyłącznie leksykalną bazę podstawową.', 'ro': 'Încadrarea este o strategie politică în care politicienii își exprimă cu atenție declarațiile pentru a controla percepția publică a problemelor. Lucrările anterioare care explorează încadrarea politică analizează de obicei utilizarea cadrelor în texte mai lungi, cum ar fi discursurile congresului. Vă prezentăm o colecție de modele slab supravegheate care valorifică clasificarea colectivă pentru a prezice cadrele utilizate în discursul politic pe platforma de microblogging Twitter. Modelele noastre globale de probabilitate arată că combinând atât caracteristicile lexicale ale tweeturilor, cât și caracteristicile comportamentale bazate pe rețea ale Twitter, suntem capabili să creștem scorul mediu F1 nesupravegheat cu 21,52 puncte față de o bază lexicală numai.', 'mn': 'Фраминг бол улс төрчид олон нийтийн асуудлын ойлголтыг удирддаг улс төрчид өөрсдийнхөө илтгэлийг анхааралтай хэлэх улс төрийн стратеги юм. Өмнөх нь улс төрийн фрэймүүдийг судалж байгаа ажиллагаанууд ихэвчлэн урт текстүүдийн хэрэглээ шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид микроблог платформасын улс төрийн ярианд хэрэглэгдсэн фреймүүдийг тодорхойлдохын тулд хамтын нийлүүлэгч загваруудын цуглуулалт хийдэг. Магадгүй дэлхийн магадлалын загварууд нь Twitter-ийн tweets болон сүлжээнд суурилсан үйл ажиллагааны хэмжээсүүдийг нэгтгэхэд бид дундаж F1 оноо 21.52 цэгээр нэмэгдүүлж чадна.', 'sr': 'Framing je politička strategija u kojoj političari pažljivo govore svoje izjave kako bi kontrolisali javno percepciju problema. Prethodni rad istraživanja političkih okvira obično analizira korištenje okvira u dužim tekstima, poput kongresnih govora. Predstavljamo kolekciju slabi nadziranih modela koji koriste kolektivnu klasifikaciju kako bi predvidjeli rame korištene u političkim diskusijama na mikrobloggerskoj platformi, Twitter. Naši globalni verovatnih modeli pokazuju da možemo povećati prosječni, neodređeni rezultat F1 za 21,52 bodova samo na leksičkoj osnovnoj liniji.', 'si': 'ෆ්\u200dරෑමින්ග් තමයි රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම රජාත්මකාරයෝ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්න මුලින් වැඩේ රාජකිතික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා වගේම විශ අපි දුර්වලින් බලාපොරොත්තු මොඩේල් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් සංවිධානයක් තියෙනවා මික්\u200dරොබ්ලොග් ප්\u200dලේටෆ්ටුවර් එකේ  අපේ ජාතික සංභාවිත සංභාවිත විද්\u200dයාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ තවිට් සහ ජාතික විද්\u200dයාවක් විද්\u200dයාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපිට පුළුවන් විශේෂ', 'so': 'Iskhilaafku waa qoraal siyaasadeed oo siyaasadeed si taxadar ah ugu hadlaan hadalkooda si ay u maamulaan aragtida dadweynaha. Shaqooyinkii hore oo aad u baahan jirtay si shakhsiyadda siyaasada ah wuxuu si caadiga ah u baarayaa isticmaalka firaamka ee qoraal dhaadheer, tusaale ahaan hadalka ururka. We present a collection of weakly supervised models which harness collective classification to predict the frames used in political discourse on the microblogging platform, Twitter.  Tilmaamaha caalamiga ah ee suurtagalka ah waxay muuqan karaan in labada cudur oo leksikal ah ee twitter iyo xeeral dabiicadda ee shabakadda, waxaynu kordhin karnaa qiimaha F1 oo aan la ilaalinayn 21.52 points oo kaliya ku qoran shabakadda leksikal.', 'sv': 'Framställning är en politisk strategi där politiker noggrant formulerar sina uttalanden för att kontrollera allmänhetens uppfattning av frågor. Tidigare verk som utforskar politisk inramning analyserar vanligtvis bildanvändning i längre texter, till exempel kongresstal. Vi presenterar en samling svagt övervakade modeller som utnyttjar kollektiv klassificering för att förutsäga ramarna som används i den politiska diskursen på mikrobloggplattformen Twitter. Våra globala sannolikhetsmodeller visar att genom att kombinera både lexikala funktioner i tweets och nätverksbaserade beteendefunktioner på Twitter, kan vi öka den genomsnittliga, oövervakade F1-poängen med 21,52 poäng över en lexikal baslinje enbart.', 'ta': 'சட்டம் ஒரு அரசியல் திட்டம் உள்ளது அதில் அரசியல்கள் பிரச்சனைகளை கட்டுப்படுத்துவதற்காக அவர்கள் கூற்றுகளை கவனமாக சொல் முந்தைய வேலைகள் அரசியல் சட்டத்தின் பயன்பாட்டை நீண்ட உரைகளில் ஆய்வு செய்யும், போன்ற கூட்டத்தார் பேச்சுகள் போ நாங்கள் பலவீனமான கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் சேகரிக்கையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் அது சேகரிக்கும் வகுப்பாடுகளை முன்வார்க்கும் விளை எங்கள் உலக சாத்தியமான மாதிரிகள் தெரியும் என்பது தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தொடர்புகள் மற்றும் வலைப்பின்னல் சார்ந்த நடத்தைக்குறிப்புகளை ஒன்று சேர்த்து, சராசரியான F1 பு', 'ur': 'فرمینگ ایک سیاسی استراتژی ہے جس میں سیاستمداروں نے اچھی طرح اپنے مطلوبات کی باتیں سنائی ہیں تاکہ مسائل کی نظر جمع کریں۔ اگلے کام ہیں جنہیں سیاسی فرم کی تحقیق کرتی ہے، جسے عمدہ طور پر فارمی استعمال کی تحقیق کرتی ہے، جیسے کنگرس کی باتیں. ہم کمزور نظارت والی موڈل کی ایک مجموعہ پیش آتے ہیں جو میکروبلوگ پٹروٹ، ٹویٹر پر سیاسی گفتگو میں استعمال ہوئے فرموں کی پیش آگاہ کرنے کے لئے کالکتیو کلاسیفون کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے global probabilistic models show that by combining both lexical features of tweets and network-based behavioral features of Twitter, we can increase the average, unsupervised F1 score by 21.52 points over a lexical baseline.', 'uz': "Tashkilot, siyosatlar muammolarni boshqarish uchun ularning o'zlarini taqlid qilish uchun o'z so'zlarini aytadi. Oldingi vazifalar, siyosatdagi raqamlarni o'rganish odatda uzoq matnlarning foydalanishini aniqlash mumkin. Bu kabi kongress hisoblarida. Biz qo'shimcha taʼminlovchi modellarni ko'rib chiqqamiz. Bu bir bir necha o'xshash modellarni o'ylaymiz, bu bir necha o'smirlar microblogg platformida foydalanadigan shakllarni ko'rganadi. Umumiy modellarimiz Twitterga va tarmoq asosidagi tabiiy xususiyatlarni birlashtirish mumkin, biz faqat Leksikal asosida o'rtasida o'rtacha, saqlangan F1 qiymatni 21.52 nuqta bilan ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phân chia là một chiến lược chính trị trong đó chính khách cẩn thận nói ra để kiểm soát nhận thức của người dân về vấn đề. Những công việc trước đây khám phá khung chính trị thường phân tích khung sử dụng trong các văn bản dài, như các bài phát biểu Quốc hội. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ sưu tập các mô hình bị giám sát thiếu sót, dùng các phân tích tập thể để dự đoán các khung trong các cuộc đối thoại chính trị trên bục vi tải, Twitter. Các mô tả xác suất to àn cầu cho thấy bằng cách kết hợp cả tính năng ngôn ngữ của Twitter và các tính năng hành vi dựa trên mạng, chúng ta có thể tăng điểm F1 trung bình, không giám sát bởi 21.52 chỉ trên một cơ sở y học.', 'bg': 'Рамковането е политическа стратегия, в която политиците внимателно изразяват изявленията си, за да контролират общественото възприемане на проблемите. Предишни работи, изследващи политическото рамкиране, обикновено анализират използването на рамки в по-дълги текстове, като речи в конгреса. Представяме колекция от слабо контролирани модели, които използват колективна класификация за предсказване на рамките, използвани в политическия дискурс на платформата за микроблог Туитър. Нашите глобални вероятностни модели показват, че чрез комбиниране както на лексикалните характеристики на туитовете, така и на мрежовите поведенчески характеристики на Туитър, ние сме в състояние да увеличим средния, без надзор резултат с 21,52 точки само спрямо лексикалната база.', 'da': 'Frameing er en politisk strategi, hvor politikerne omhyggeligt formulerer deres udtalelser for at kontrollere offentlighedens opfattelse af spørgsmål. Tidligere værker, der undersøger politisk ramme, analyserer typisk rammebrug i længere tekster, såsom kongressens taler. Vi præsenterer en samling af svagt overvågede modeller, der udnytter kollektiv klassificering til at forudsige de rammer, der anvendes i den politiske diskurs på mikroblogging platformen Twitter. Vores globale sandsynlighedsmodeller viser, at ved at kombinere både leksikalske funktioner i tweets og netværksbaserede adfærdsfunktioner på Twitter, er vi i stand til at øge den gennemsnitlige, ubevågede F1 score med 21,52 point i forhold til en leksikalsk baseline alene.', 'hr': 'Framing je politička strategija u kojoj političari pažljivo govore svoje izjave kako bi kontrolirali javno percepciju problema. Prethodni rad istraživanja političkih okvira obično analizira korištenje okvira u dužim tekstima, poput kongresnih govora. Predstavljamo kolekciju slabi nadziranih modela koji koriste kolektivnu klasifikaciju kako bi predvidjeli okvir korišteni u političkim diskusijama na mikrobloggerskoj platformi, Twitter. Naši globalni vjerojatni modeli pokazuju da spajanjem leksičkih karakteristika tweeta i mrežnih ponašanja Twitter-a, možemo povećati prosječni, neodređeni F1 rezultat za 21,52 bodova samo na leksičkom početnom liniji.', 'nl': 'Framing is een politieke strategie waarin politici zorgvuldig hun uitspraken formuleren om de publieke perceptie van kwesties te controleren. Eerdere werken die politieke kadering onderzoeken analyseren meestal het gebruik van frames in langere teksten, zoals toespraken van het congres. We presenteren een verzameling zwak begeleide modellen die collectieve classificatie gebruiken om de frames te voorspellen die worden gebruikt in het politieke discours op het microblogging platform Twitter. Onze globale probabilistische modellen tonen aan dat we door zowel lexicale kenmerken van tweets als netwerkgebaseerde gedragskenmerken van Twitter, in staat zijn om de gemiddelde F1 score zonder toezicht te verhogen met 21,52 punten boven een lexicale baseline alleen.', 'de': 'Framing ist eine politische Strategie, bei der Politiker ihre Aussagen sorgfältig formulieren, um die öffentliche Wahrnehmung von Themen zu kontrollieren. Frühere Arbeiten zum Thema Political Framing analysieren typischerweise die Framenutzung in längeren Texten, wie Kongressreden. Wir präsentieren eine Sammlung schwach überwachter Modelle, die kollektive Klassifizierung nutzen, um die Frames vorherzusagen, die im politischen Diskurs auf der Microblogging-Plattform Twitter verwendet werden. Unsere globalen probabilistischen Modelle zeigen, dass wir durch die Kombination von lexikalischen Merkmalen von Tweets und netzwerkbasierten Verhaltensmerkmalen von Twitter in der Lage sind, den durchschnittlichen, unbeaufsichtigten F1 Score um 21,52 Punkte über einer lexikalischen Grundlinie allein zu erhöhen.', 'id': 'Framing adalah strategi politik di mana politisi dengan hati-hati mengucapkan pernyataan mereka untuk mengendalikan persepsi publik tentang isu. Pekerjaan sebelumnya mengeksplorasi bingkai politik biasanya menganalisa penggunaan bingkai dalam teks yang lebih panjang, seperti pidato kongres. Kami mempersembahkan koleksi dari model yang terpantau lemah yang menggunakan klasifikasi kolektif untuk memprediksi bingkai yang digunakan dalam diskors politik di platform mikroblog, Twitter. Model probabilis global kita menunjukkan bahwa dengan menggabungkan kedua fitur lexik dari tweet dan fitur perilaku berdasarkan jaringan dari Twitter, kita dapat meningkatkan nilai F1 rata-rata, tidak diawasi dengan 21,52 poin di atas dasar lexik sendirian.', 'ko': '틀은 일종의 정치 전략이다. 이런 전략에서 정치인들은 문제에 대한 대중의 견해를 통제하기 위해 자신의 말을 신중하게 표현한다.이전에 정치 틀을 연구한 저작들은 국회 강연과 같은 긴 텍스트의 틀의 용법을 분석하곤 했다.우리는 웨이보 플랫폼 트위터의 정치적 언어에 사용되는 틀을 집단 분류를 활용해 예측하는 약한 감독 모델을 제시했다.우리의 글로벌 확률모델은 트위터의 어휘 특징과 트위터의 인터넷 기반 행위 특징을 결합시켜 평균 무감독 F1 점수를 어휘 기선에서만 21.52점 증가시킬 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'فرمینگ یک استراتژی سیاسی است که سیاستمداران با دقت به اظهارات خود را برای کنترل perception عمومی از مسائل می گویند. کارهای قبلی که در جستجوی فرم سیاسی معمولاً استفاده از فرم در متن های طولانی تحلیل می کنند، مانند سخنرانی کنگرس. ما یک مجموعه از مدل های ضعیف تحت نظر قرار می دهیم که برای پیش بینی کردن فرم های استفاده شده در صحبت سیاسی روی پلاکت میکروبلاگ، توئیتر، محرمانه جمع\u200cآوری می\u200cکنند. مدلهای احتمالی جهانی ما نشان می دهند که با ترکیب هر دو ویژگی\u200cهای زبانی از توئیت\u200cها و ویژگی\u200cهای رفتاری بر روی شبکه از توئیتر، ما می\u200cتوانیم امتیاز متوسط و غیرقابل تولید F1 را با 21.52 امتیاز بر روی یک خط اصلی زبانی تنها افزایش دهیم.', 'sw': 'Kupindua ni mkakati wa kisiasa ambapo wanasiasa wanasema kwa makini kauli zao ili kudhibiti mtazamo wa umma wa masuala. Kazi zilizopita zinazotumia uchochezi wa kisiasa kwa kawaida huchambua matumizi ya mifumo katika maandishi ya muda mrefu, kama vile hotuba za bunge. Tunawesha mkusanyiko wa mifano yanayofuatiliwa na udhaifu ambao unasambazwa kwa makusanyiko ili kutabiri mfumo uliotumika katika mazungumzo ya kisiasa kuhusu jukwaa la kublogu, Twita. Mfano wetu wa uwezekano wa dunia unaonyesha kwamba kwa kuunganisha vipengele vya twita na tabia za mtandaoni za Twita, tunaweza kuongeza wastani, kipimo cha F1 ambacho hakijulikana kwa njia 21.52 zaidi ya msingi wa lexico pekee.', 'tr': "Framing - syýasy stratejiýa, syýasatçylar hemme meselelerin habaryny kontrol etmek üçin öz a ýdymlaryny ünsli sözleýärler. Öňki işleri syýasy framlary gözləýän işleriň adatça uzun metinlerde, Kongresiýa sözleriň ýaly. Mikroblogg platformynda arzanlaşyk edilen çykyşlaryň önlemek üçin zayıf gözleýän nusgalaryny görkezip çykarýarys. Munuň dünýädäki möhüm modalarymyz Twitter'yň hem tweets we şebeke daýanýan hereketleriň hatlaryny birleşdirerek ortalamasyny we 21.52 puç diňe terjime edilmedigini çykaryp bileris.", 'af': "Framing is 'n politieke strategie waarin politiseers versigtig woord hul opdragte om publieke aandag van probleme te beheer. Vorige werke wat politieke raam ondersoek is, tipies analyseer raam gebruik in langer teks, soos kongresiespeletjies. Ons stel 'n versameling van swak ondersoekte modele wat kolektiewe klasifikasie verhaal om die rame wat gebruik word in politieke diskursie op die mikroblogging platform a, Twitter te voorskou. Ons globaal waarskynlike modele wys dat deur tweets en netwerk-gebaseerde gedrag-funksies van Twitter te kombinerer, ons kan die gemiddelde, ononderwerpende F1-punt deur 21.52 punte oor 'n leksiese basislien alleen verhoog.", 'sq': 'Korniza është një strategji politike në të cilën politikanët flasin me kujdes deklaratat e tyre me qëllim që të kontrollojnë perceptimin publik të çështjeve. Punët e mëparshme që eksplorojnë kuadrin politik tipikisht analizojnë përdorimin e kuadrit në tekste më të gjata, të tilla si fjalimet e kongresit. Ne paraqesim një koleksion modelesh të mbikqyrur dobësisht që përdorin klasifikimin kolektiv për të parashikuar kornizat e përdorura në diskursin politik në platform ën e mikroblogut, Twitter. Modelet tona globale probabiliste tregojnë se duke kombinuar si karakteristikat lexike të tweeteve dhe karakteristikat e sjelljes me bazë në rrjet të Twitterit, ne jemi në gjendje të rritim rezultatin mesatar F1 pa mbikqyrje me 21.52 pikë mbi një bazë lexike vetëm.', 'am': 'የፖለቲካ ስርዓት ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው የፖለቲካ ድምፅ በመጠቀም የፍሬም ጥናት በተጨማሪው ጽሑፎች፣ እንደ ጉርማዊ ንግግር በሚመስል አስተያይተዋል፡፡ በፖለቲካ ንግግር ላይ የሚጠቀሙትን የፖለቲካ ንግግር ላይ የሚጠቀሙትን ፍሬማዎችን ለመቀበል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ዓለምአቀፍ ምሳሌዎቻችን፣ ለሌክሲካዊ የTwitter እና የመረብ የአግባብ ሁኔታዎችን በመቀላቀል፣ ብዛት፣ ያልጠበቀውን የF1 ነጥብ በ21.52 ነጥብ ብቻውን በመጠቀም እናችላለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Framing is a political strategy in which politicians carefully word their statements in order to control public perception of issues.  Անցյալ աշխատանքները քաղաքական կառուցվածքների ուսումնասիրում սովորաբար վերլուծում են կառուցվածքի օգտագործումը երկար տեքստներում, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ կոնգրեսիոն ելույթները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի հավաքածու թույլ վերահսկված մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործում են հավաքական դասակարգումը, որպեսզի կանխագուշակեն այն շրջանները, որոնք օգտագործվում են քաղաքական խոսակցության մեջ միկրոբլոգի հարթա Մեր գլոբալ հավանական մոդելները ցույց են տալիս, որ միավորելով Թվիթերի և ցանցի հիմնված վարքագծային հատկանիշները, մենք կարող ենք բարձրացնել միջին, անվերահսկված F1-ի գնահատականը 21.52 միայն լեքսիկական հիմքում:', 'bn': 'প্রতিযোগিতা হচ্ছে একটি রাজনৈতিক কৌশল যেখানে রাজনীতিবিদরা তাদের বক্তব্য সতর্ক করে তাদের বিবৃতি প্রদান করেছেন পূর্ববর্তীরা রাজনৈতিক বিভ্রান্তিক বিভ্রান্ত বিশ্লেষণ করে, যেমন কনজেন্সিয়াল ভাষণ। আমরা দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষিত মডেলের একটি সংগ্রহ উপস্থাপন করছি যা টুইটারে মাইক্রোব্লগিং প্ল্যাটফর্মে রাজনৈতিক কথোপকথনে ব্যবহৃত ফ্রেমের সংগ্ আমাদের বিশ্বের সম্ভাব্য মডেল দেখাচ্ছে যে টুইটার এবং নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক আচরণের বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে টুইটারের লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যুতে আমরা একাই লে', 'ca': "La trampa és una estratègia política en la qual els polítics diuen atentament les seves declaracions per controlar la percepció pública dels problemes. Els treballs anteriors que exploren el marc polític normalment analitzen l'ús del marc en textos més llargs, com els discursos del Congrés. Presentam una col·lecció de models poc supervisionats que utilitzen la classificació col·lectiva per predir els marcs utilitzats en discurs polític a la plataforma de microblogues, Twitter. Els nostres models probabilistes globals demostren que combinant les característiques lècsiques dels tweets i les característiques comportamentals basades en la xarxa de Twitter, podem augmentar la mitjana de puntuacions F1 sense supervisió de 21,52 punts només sobre una base lècsica.", 'bs': 'Framing je politička strategija u kojoj političari pažljivo govore svoje izjave kako bi kontrolirali javno percepciju problema. Prethodni rad istraživanja političkih okvira obično analizira korištenje okvira u dužim tekstima, poput kongresnih govora. Predstavljamo kolekciju slabi nadziranih modela koji koriste kolektivnu klasifikaciju kako bi predvidjeli okvir koji se koristi u političkim diskusijama na mikrobloggerskoj platformi, Twitter. Naši globalni verovatnih modeli pokazuju da možemo povećati prosječni, neodređeni rezultat F1 za 21,52 bodova samo na leksičkoj početnoj liniji.', 'cs': 'Framing je politická strategie, ve které politici pečlivě slovují svá prohlášení, aby kontrolovali veřejné vnímání problémů. Předchozí práce zkoumající politické rámování obvykle analyzují využití rámců v delších textech, jako jsou kongresové projevy. Představujeme sbírku slabě dohledovaných modelů, které využívají kolektivní klasifikace k předpovědi rámců používaných v politickém diskurze na mikroblogové platformě Twitter. Naše globální pravděpodobnostní modely ukazují, že kombinací lexikálních vlastností tweetů a síťových behaviorálních vlastností Twitteru dokážeme zvýšit průměrné, bez dozoru skóre F1 o 21,52 body nad lexikální základní linií.', 'az': 'Framing siyasi stratejidir ki, siyasətçilər olaraq problemlərin görünüşünü kontrol etmək üçün öz ifadələrini dikkatli söyləyir. Əvvəlki işlər siyasi framlarını keşfetmək üçün çox uzun mətnlərdə, Kongres sözləri kimi, fotogramların istifadəsini analiz edir. Biz mikroblogg platformasında siyasi diskurslarda istifadə edilən çerçimləri müəyyən etmək üçün kolektiv klasifikasyonu təmin edirik. Bizim küresel mümkünlük modellərimiz göstərir ki, Tövratın hər ikisini və a ğ tərəfindən dayanan davranış özelliklərini birləşdirərək ortalama, fikirləşmədiyimiz F1 nöqtəsini 21,52 nöqtəsinə təkcə leksik tərəfindən artırabilirik.', 'fi': 'Kehittäminen on poliittinen strategia, jossa poliitikot lausuvat lausuntonsa huolellisesti hallitakseen yleistä käsitystä asioista. Aiemmat poliittiset kehykset tutkivat tyypillisesti kehysten käyttöä pitkissä teksteissä, kuten kongressipuheissa. Esittelemme kokoelman heikosti valvottuja malleja, jotka valjastavat kollektiivista luokittelua ennustamaan poliittisen diskurssin kehyksiä mikrobloggausalustalla Twitterissä. Globaalit todennäköisyysmallimme osoittavat, että yhdistämällä sekä twiittien leksikaalisia piirteitä että Twitterin verkkopohjaisia käyttäytymisominaisuuksia pystymme kasvattamaan keskimääräistä, valvomatonta F1-pistettä 21,52 pisteellä pelkän leksikaalisen lähtötilanteen suhteen.', 'et': 'Raamimine on poliitiline strateegia, milles poliitikud sõnavad hoolikalt oma avaldusi, et kontrollida avalikkuse arusaamist küsimustest. Varasemad poliitilist raamimist käsitlevad tööd analüüsivad tavaliselt raamide kasutamist pikemates tekstides, näiteks kongressi kõnedes. Esitleme nõrgalt kontrollitud mudelite kollektiivset klassifikatsiooni, et ennustada poliitilises diskursuses kasutatavaid raame mikroblogiplatvormil Twitteris. Meie globaalsed tõenäosusmudelid näitavad, et kombineerides nii säutsude leksikaalseid omadusi kui ka Twitteri võrgupõhiseid käitumisfunktsioone, suudame suurendada keskmist järelevalveta F1 skoori 21,52 punkti võrra ainuüksi leksikaalse algtasemega võrreldes.', 'jv': 'Framingne kuwi politik sing beraksi politik sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo kuwi nggawe barang popolasi sing ngesalakno. Workspace %d Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh sampeyan akeh model sing nguasai nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang pulitik neng sistem mikro-sistem, Google. Awak dhéwé model sing paling-perusahaan sistem sing songani kuwi nggawe jiné perusahaan langgambar gak tentang karo tuwit karo netawak dhéwé', 'sk': 'Oblikovanje je politična strategija, v kateri politiki skrbno izražajo svoje izjave, da bi nadzorovali javno dojemanje vprašanj. Prejšnja dela, ki raziskujejo politično oblikovanje, običajno analizirajo uporabo okvirjev v daljših besedilih, kot so kongresni govori. Predstavljamo zbirko šibko nadzorovanih modelov, ki uporabljajo kolektivno klasifikacijo za napovedovanje okvirjev, uporabljenih v političnem diskurzu na platformi za mikrobloganje Twitter. Naši globalni verjetnostni modeli kažejo, da lahko z združevanjem tako leksikalnih značilnosti tweetov kot omrežnih vedenjskih značilnosti Twitterja povečamo povprečno, nenadzorovano oceno F1 za 21,52 točke samo v primerjavi z leksikalno osnovno vrednostjo.', 'ha': "Kiduniya wani taskaci ne na kisasa, a cikinsa kisasan su faɗi magana taƙaitacce dõmin su yi mamlaka ga gannai masu cikin al'amarin. Yinin da ya gabãta na aikin yin jarraba misalin kisa, yana analyza amfani da firam a cikin littattafai masu tsawo, kamar hotaffiyar kongress. Tuna halatar da samun misãlai masu rauni da aka tsare su, wanda ke samun darafõfi mai haɗuwa dõmin ka yi bayani ga firam wanda aka yi amfani da cikin mazaɓa na kisasa a kan platforman micrologogin, Twitter. Ana iya ƙara masu yiwuwa na duniya shine cẽwa, da koma da duk mistakardar littattafai na Twitter da bakin tarayya, za'a iya ƙara nau'in F1 na da 21.52 points kowace a kan salin mai leksiya kawai.", 'he': 'המפלגה היא אסטרטגיה פוליטית שבה פוליטיקאים מילים בזהירות את הצהרות שלהם כדי לשלוט בתפיסה הציבורית של בעיות. עבודות קודמות חוקרות מסגרת פוליטית בדרך כלל ניתוח השימוש מסגרת בטקסטים ארוכים יותר, כמו נאומי קונגרס. אנחנו מציגים אוסף של דוגמנים מפקחים חלשים שמשתמשים בקולקטיבית קליפורניה כדי לחזות את המסגרות שמשתמשות בתשובה פוליטית על הפלטפורמת המיקרובלוג, טוויטר. הדוגמנים הפרובינליסטיים הגלובליים שלנו מראים כי על ידי שילוב שני תכונות לקסיות של טוויטים ואת תכונות התנהגות מבוססים ברשת של טוויטר, אנחנו מסוגלים להעלות את הציון F1 הממוצע, ללא השגחה ב-21.52 נקודות על בסיס לקסי בלבד.', 'bo': 'ཕྱོགས་མི་ནི་ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་སྲོལ་སྒྲིག་ཞིག་རེད། དེ་ནི་སྲིད་མཁན་གྱིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བཤད་ཚུལ་ལ་ཁག་གཏོང་བྱེད་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆབ་སྲིད་གཞུང་ལ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཕར་ཐིག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚན་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་སྟངས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས'}
{'en': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ar': 'نموذج هجين عصبي الانتباه المتداخل لتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية', 'fr': "Un modèle hybride neuronal d'attention imbriquée pour la correction des erreurs grammaticales", 'pt': 'Um modelo híbrido neural de atenção aninhado para correção de erros gramaticais', 'es': 'Un modelo híbrido neuronal de atención anidada para la corrección de errores gramaticales', 'ja': '文法的誤り訂正のための入れ子型注意ニューラルハイブリッドモデル', 'zh': '一以语法纠错嵌套意神经合模形', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए एक नेस्टेड ध्यान तंत्रिका हाइब्रिड मॉडल', 'ru': 'Вложенная нейронная гибридная модель для коррекции грамматических ошибок', 'ga': 'Samhail Néar Hibrideach Airde Neadaithe le haghaidh Ceartú Earráidí Gramadaí', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egy beágyazott figyelem idegi hibrid modell a nyelvtani hibák javításához', 'el': 'Ένα ένθετο νευρωνικό υβριδικό μοντέλο προσοχής για τη γραμματική διόρθωση σφαλμάτων', 'it': 'Un modello ibrido neurale Nested Attention per la correzione degli errori grammaticali', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қатені түзету үшін қайталанатын нейралық гибрид моделі', 'ms': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നെസ്റ്റെന്\u200dറില്\u200d ഹൈബ്രിഡ് മോഡല്\u200d', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'pl': 'Zagnieżdżony neuronowy hybrydowy model uwagi do korekcji błędów gramatycznych', 'ro': 'Un model hibrid neural de atenție cuibărit pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale', 'mt': 'Mudell Ibridu Newrali ta’ Attenzjoni Mnieħer għal Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi', 'sr': 'Neuralni hibridni model pažnje za korištenje greške', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэх сэтгэл санааны мэдрэлийн гибрид загвар', 'si': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'sv': 'En Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model för grammatisk felkorrigering', 'so': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ta': 'சிறப்பு பிழை திருத்தமுறைக்கான நெயுரல் ஹைப்ரிட் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình răng thần kinh dành cho lỗi máy tính', 'bg': 'Невроден хибриден модел за корекция на граматични грешки', 'da': 'En indlejret opmærksomhed Neural Hybrid Model til grammatisk fejlkorrektion', 'nl': 'Een genest Attention Neural Hybrid Model voor grammaticale Foutcorrectie', 'hr': 'Neuralni hibridni model pažnje za ispravu greške', 'de': 'Ein verschachteltes Aufmerksamkeitsneurorales Hybridmodell zur grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Hybrid wa Kifaransa wa Kupitia Tamko', 'id': 'A Nested Attention Hybrid Model Neural for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ko': '문법 오류 수정에 사용되는 삽입 주의 - 신경 혼합 모델', 'tr': 'Gramatik Hata Düzeltmek üçin bir nusgala Hybrid nusgasy', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'az': 'Gramatik x톛ta d칲z톛ltm톛si 칲칞칲n N칲ral Hibrid Modeli', 'sq': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ca': 'A Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'bs': 'Neuralni hibridni model pažnje za korištenje greške', 'hy': 'Գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղելու նյարդային հիբրիդ մոդելը', 'cs': 'Vnořený neuronový hybridní model pozornosti pro gramatickou korekci chyb', 'fi': 'Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction', 'et': 'Pesatud tähelepanu neuraalne hübriidmudel grammatiliste vigade parandamiseks', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Gnezdenjen pozornost nevronski hibridni model za popravljanje slovničnih napak', 'bo': 'Grammatical Error correction for a Nested Attention Neural Hybrid Model for Grammatical Error Correction'}
{'en': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correct both global errors inword order and usage, and local errors inspelling and inflection. Further developing upon recent work on neural machine translation, we propose a new hybrid neural model with nested attention layers for GEC.Experiments show that the new model can effectively correct errors of both types by incorporating word and character-level information, and that the model significantly outperforms previous neural models for GEC as measured on the standard CoNLL-14 benchmark dataset. Further analysis also shows that the superiority of the proposed model can be largely attributed to the use of the nested attention mechanism, which has proven particularly effective incorrecting local errors that involve small edits in orthography.', 'ar': 'تسعى أنظمة تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC) جاهدة لتصحيح كل من الأخطاء العامة في ترتيب الكلمات واستخدامها ، والتحقق من الأخطاء المحلية وتصريفها. مزيد من التطوير بناءً على العمل الأخير في الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا هجينًا جديدًا مع طبقات انتباه متداخلة لـ GEC. تظهر التجارب أن النموذج الجديد يمكنه تصحيح الأخطاء من كلا النوعين بشكل فعال من خلال دمج معلومات على مستوى الكلمات والحرف ، وأن النموذج يتفوق بشكل كبير على النماذج العصبية السابقة لـ GEC كما تم قياسها في مجموعة البيانات المعيارية المعيارية CoNLL-14 ، ويظهر التحليل الإضافي أيضًا أن تفوق النموذج المقترح يمكن أن يُعزى إلى حد كبير إلى استخدام آلية الانتباه المتداخلة ، والتي أثبتت فعاليتها بشكل خاص في تصحيح الأخطاء المحلية التي تتضمن تعديلات صغيرة في قواعد الإملاء.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de correção de erros gramaticais (GEC) se esforçam para corrigir erros globais na ordem e uso das palavras e erros locais de ortografia e flexão. Desenvolvendo ainda mais o trabalho recente em tradução automática neural, propomos um novo modelo neural híbrido com camadas de atenção aninhadas para GEC. Experimentos mostram que o novo modelo pode efetivamente corrigir erros de ambos os tipos, incorporando informações em nível de palavra e caractere, e que o modelo supera significativamente os modelos neurais anteriores para GEC, conforme medido no conjunto de dados de referência padrão CoNLL-14. Análises adicionais também mostram que a superioridade do modelo proposto pode ser amplamente atribuída ao uso do mecanismo de atenção aninhado, que provou ser particularmente eficaz na correção de erros locais que envolvem pequenas edições na ortografia.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de correction des erreurs grammaticales (GEC) s'efforcent de corriger à la fois les erreurs globales dans l'ordre et l'utilisation des mots, et les erreurs locales d'inspiration et d'inflexion. En nous appuyant sur des travaux récents sur la traduction automatique neuronale, nous proposons un nouveau modèle neuronal hybride avec des couches d'attention imbriquées pour la GEC. Les expériences montrent que le nouveau modèle peut corriger efficacement les erreurs des deux types en incorporant des informations au niveau des mots et des caractères, et que le modèle de manière significative surpasse les modèles neuronaux précédents pour GEC tels que mesurés sur la base de données de référence standard ConLL-14. Une analyse plus approfondie montre également que la supériorité du modèle proposé peut être largement attribuée à l'utilisation du mécanisme d'attention imbriquée, qui s'est révélé particulièrement efficace pour corriger les erreurs locales qui impliquent de petites modifications dans l'orthographe.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC) se esfuerzan por corregir tanto los errores globales en el orden y el uso de las palabras como los errores locales de inspección e inflexión. Desarrollando aún más el trabajo reciente sobre la traducción automática neuronal, proponemos un nuevo modelo neuronal híbrido con capas de atención anidadas para GEC. Los experimentos muestran que el nuevo modelo puede corregir eficazmente errores de ambos tipos incorporando información a nivel de palabras y caracteres, y que el modelo de manera significativa supera a los modelos neuronales anteriores para GEC medidos en el conjunto de datos de referencia estándar ConLL-14. Un análisis más detallado también muestra que la superioridad del modelo propuesto puede atribuirse en gran medida al uso del mecanismo de atención anidado, que ha demostrado ser particularmente eficaz para corregir errores locales que implica pequeñas ediciones en ortografía.', 'ja': '文法的誤り訂正（ GEC ）システムは、単語の順序と使用法のグローバルな誤り、およびインスピレーションとインフレの局所的な誤りの両方を訂正するように努めています。神経機械翻訳に関する最近の研究をさらに発展させると、GECのためのネストされた注目層を持つ新しいハイブリッドニューラルモデルを提案します。実験によると、新しいモデルは単語と文字レベルの情報を組み込むことによって両方のタイプのエラーを効果的に修正することができ、標準的なCoNLL -14ベンチマークデータセットで測定されたGECの以前のニューラルモデルを大幅に上回ることが示されています。分析によると、提案されたモデルの優位性は、ネストされた注目メカニズムの使用に大きく起因する可能性があり、正書法の小さな編集を伴う局所的なエラーを修正することが特に効果的であることが証明されています。', 'zh': '语法纠错 (GEC) 统务正词序用法之全谬,及拼写词形变化之局误。 近神经机器翻译之本,为GEC合神经,有嵌套之意。 实验者,所以合单词字符也,所以正二者之过也,而其性明优于准CoNLL-14准数集上度者GEC前神经也。 又明模形之优越性可归因于嵌套机之用,其机已证尤正及正字法小编辑之局误矣。', 'ru': 'Системы исправления грамматических ошибок (GEC) стремятся исправить как глобальные ошибки в порядке слов и их использовании, так и локальные ошибки, вызывающие и перегибы. Дополнительно развивая недавнюю работу по нейронному машинному переводу, мы предлагаем новую гибридную нейронную модель с вложенными слоями внимания для GEC .Эксперименты показывают, что новая модель может эффективно исправлять ошибки обоих типов путем включения информации на уровне слов и символов, и что модель значительно превосходит предыдущие нейронные модели для GEC, измеренные на стандартном наборе данных CoNLL-14. Дальнейший анализ также показывает, что превосходство предлагаемой модели может быть во многом связано с использованием вложенного механизма внимания, который доказал свою особую эффективность в устранении локальных ошибок, связанных с небольшими изменениями в ортографии.', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) सिस्टम वैश्विक त्रुटियों के इनवर्ड ऑर्डर और उपयोग दोनों को सही करने का प्रयास करते हैं, और स्थानीय त्रुटियों को वर्तनी और मोड़। तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद पर हाल के काम पर आगे विकसित करते हुए, हम जीईसी के लिए नेस्टेड ध्यान परतों के साथ एक नया हाइब्रिड तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तावित करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि नया मॉडल शब्द और चरित्र-स्तर की जानकारी को शामिल करके दोनों प्रकार की त्रुटियों को प्रभावी ढंग से ठीक कर सकता है, और यह कि मॉडल जीईसी के लिए पिछले तंत्रिका मॉडल को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है जैसा कि मानक CoNLL-14 बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर मापा जाता है। आगे के विश्लेषण से यह भी पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल की श्रेष्ठता को काफी हद तक नेस्टेड ध्यान तंत्र के उपयोग के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराया जा सकता है, जिसने विशेष रूप से प्रभावी गलत तरीके से स्थानीय त्रुटियों को साबित किया है जिसमें ऑर्थोग्राफी में छोटे संपादन शामिल हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanann córais um cheartú earráidí gramadaí (GEC) a dhícheall earráidí domhanda in ord agus úsáid focal a cheartú, agus earráidí logánta inlitrithe agus infhillte. Ag forbairt tuilleadh ar obair le déanaí ar aistriúchán meaisín néarach, molaimid múnla néarúil hibrideach nua le sraitheanna aird neadaithe do GEC.Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir leis an tsamhail nua earráidí den dá chineál a cheartú go héifeachtach trí fhaisnéis ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus ar leibhéal na gcarachtar a ionchorprú, agus go bhfuil an tsamhail sáraíonn sé go mór na samhlacha néaracha a bhí ann roimhe seo do GEC mar a thomhaistear ar thacar sonraí tagarmharcála caighdeánach CoNLL-14. Léiríonn tuilleadh anailíse freisin gur féidir barr feabhais an mhúnla atá beartaithe a chur i leith úsáid na meicníochta aire neadaithe go mór mór, rud a chruthaigh earráidí áitiúla mícheartaithe go háirithe éifeachtach. a bhaineann le mionathruithe sa ortagrafaíocht.', 'hu': 'A nyelvtani hibakorrekciós (GEC) rendszerek mind a globális hibák kijavítására törekszenek a szó sorrendjében és használatában, mind a helyi hibák beírására és inflexiójára. A neurális gépi fordítással kapcsolatos közelmúltbeli munkák alapján továbbfejlesztünk egy új hibrid neurális modellt, beágyazott figyelemrétegekkel a GEC számára. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az új modell mindkét típusú hibákat hatékonyan ki tudja javítani szó- és karakterszintű információk beépítésével, és hogy a modell jelentősen felülmúlja a GEC korábbi neurális modelljeit a standard CoNLL-14 benchmark adatkészleten mérve. További elemzések azt is mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell felsőbbrendűsége nagyrészt a beágyazott figyelem mechanizmus alkalmazásának tulajdonítható, amely különösen hatékonynak bizonyult a helyi hibák helytelen helyreállításában, amelyek kis ortográfiai szerkesztésekkel járnak.', 'ka': 'გრამიტური შეცდომის შეცდომის რედაქტირება (GEC) სისტემები მუშაობს, რომ გლობალური შეცდომის რედაქტირება და გამოყენება და ლოკალური შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდო შემდეგ ახალი სამუშაო ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაზე, ჩვენ გვეძლევა ახალი ჰიბრიტური ნეიროლური მოდელს, რომელიც GEC-სთვის გაგრძელებული გ ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ ახალი მოდელის შესაძლებელია ექსპექტიურად შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შესახებ სიტყვა და სიტყვა-დონეზე ინფორმაციის შესახებ, და რომ მოდელის მნიშვნელოვანად დამატებული ანალიზი ასევე ჩვენებს, რომ პროგრამის მოდელის უფრო მეტი შესაძლებელია ატრიბუტირებული მოდელის გამოყენებას, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულად ეფექტიურად შეცდომა ლოკალური შეცდომა, რომელიც შე', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα γραμματικής διόρθωσης σφαλμάτων (GEC) προσπαθούν να διορθώσουν τόσο τα παγκόσμια λάθη στη σειρά και τη χρήση λέξεων, όσο και τα τοπικά λάθη στην ορθογραφία και την κάμψη. Περαιτέρω αναπτύσσοντας τις πρόσφατες εργασίες σχετικά με τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, προτείνουμε ένα νέο υβριδικό νευρωνικό μοντέλο με ένθετα στρώματα προσοχής για τη ΓΕΚ. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το νέο μοντέλο μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να διορθώσει σφάλματα και των δύο τύπων ενσωματώνοντας πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο λέξεων και χαρακτήρων, και ότι το μοντέλο ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα προηγούμενα νευρωνικά μοντέλα για GEC όπως μετρήθηκαν στο τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς CoNLL-14. Περαιτέρω ανάλυση δείχνει επίσης ότι η υπεροχή του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου μπορεί να αποδοθεί σε μεγάλο βαθμό στη χρήση του μηχανισμού ένθετης προσοχής, ο οποίος έχει αποδειχθεί ιδιαίτερα αποτελεσματικός στην εσφαλμένη διόρθωση τοπικών σφαλμάτων που περιλαμβάνουν μικρές επεξεργασίες στην ορθογραφία.', 'lt': 'Gramatinių klaidų koregavimo (GEC) sistemos stengiasi ištaisyti visuotines klaidas žodžių tvarkoje ir naudojime, taip pat vietines klaidas įrašant ir įterpiant. Toliau plėtojant pastaruoju metu atliktą darbą nervų mašinų vertimo srityje, siūlome naują hibridinį nervų model į su uždengtais dėmesio sluoksniais GEC. Eksperimentai rodo, kad naujasis modelis gali veiksmingai ištaisyti abiejų tipų klaidas, įtraukdamas žodžių ir simbolių lygmens informaciją, ir kad modelis gerokai viršija ankstesnius GEC neurologinius modelius, išmatuotus standartiniu CoNLL-14 lyginamuoju duomenų rinkiniu. Iš tolesnės analizės taip pat matyti, kad siūlomo modelio viršenybę galima daugiausia priskirti naudojimui įdėstyto dėmesio mechanizmui, kuris pasirodė ypač veiksmingas klaidų, susijusių su nedidelėmis ortografijos redakcijomis, ištaisymas.', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қателерді түзету (GEC) жүйелері жалпы қателерді келтіру және қолдану ретінде және жергілікті қателерді тексеру және инфлекциясын түзету үшін жұмыс істейді. Жуырдағы невралдық компьютердің аудармасында жаңа гибридтік невралдық моделі GEC үшін жаңа қатынастық қабаттары бар. Тәжірибелер жаңа модель сөз мен таңбалардың деңгейінің мәліметін қосу арқылы екі түрлерінің қателерін тексеруге болады және үлгі GEC үшін алдыңғы невралдық моделдерлерді стандартты CoNLL- 14 бағдарламалардың тегістеу жиынына тегі Қосымша анализ қолданылатын үлгінің жоғарылығы көпшілігін ортографияда кішкентай өңдеу қателерді дұрыс емес дегенді көрсетеді.', 'it': "I sistemi di correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC) si sforzano di correggere sia gli errori globali nell'ordine e nell'uso delle parole, sia gli errori locali nell'impostazione e nell'inflessione. Sviluppando ulteriormente il recente lavoro sulla traduzione automatica neurale, proponiamo un nuovo modello neurale ibrido con strati di attenzione nidificati per GEC. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nuovo modello può correggere efficacemente gli errori di entrambi i tipi incorporando informazioni a livello di parole e caratteri, e che il modello supera significativamente i modelli neurali precedenti per GEC misurati sul set di dati standard di riferimento CoNLL-14. Un'ulteriore analisi mostra anche che la superiorità del modello proposto può essere ampiamente attribuita all'uso del meccanismo di attenzione annidato, che si è dimostrato particolarmente efficace sbagliando errori locali che implicano piccole modifiche in ortografia.", 'ms': 'Sistem penyesuaian ralat grammatik (GEC) berusaha untuk membetulkan kedua-dua ralat global dalam urutan dan penggunaan perkataan, dan ralat setempat menginskrip dan pengalihan. Kemudian berkembang pada kerja baru-baru ini mengenai terjemahan mesin saraf, kami cadangkan model saraf hibrid baru dengan lapisan perhatian saraf untuk GEC. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model baru boleh secara efektif betulkan ralat kedua-dua jenis dengan memasukkan maklumat perkataan dan aras-aksara, dan bahawa model secara signifikan melebihi model saraf terdahulu untuk GEC seperti diukur pada set data benchmark CoNLL-14 piawai. Analisis lebih lanjut juga menunjukkan bahawa ketinggian model yang direncanakan boleh ditentukan pada sebagian besar kepada penggunaan mekanisme perhatian tersarang, yang telah membuktikan khususnya berkesan menyalahkan ralat setempat yang melibatkan edit kecil dalam ortografi.', 'mk': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correct both global errors inword order and usage, and local errors inspelling and inflection.  Понатаму развивајќи се по неодамнешната работа за превод на невројалните машини, предложуваме нов хибриден невројален модел со гнездени слоеви на внимание за ГЕЦ. Експериментите покажуваат дека новиот модел може ефикасно да ги коригира грешките на двата типови со вклучување на информации на зборови и на ниво на карактери, и дека моделот значително ги надминува претходните неурални модели за ГЕЦ според мерките на стандардниот компјутер на податоци за референ Понатамошната анализа, исто така, покажува дека супериорноста на предложениот модел може да се припишува во голема мера на употребата на механизмот за внимание во гнездото, кој се покажа особено ефективно поправи локални грешки кои вклучуваат мали уредувања во ортографијата.', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമ്മാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലുള്ള സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പടിയിലും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രാദേശി ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d പിന്നെയും വികസിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d വാക്കും അക്ഷരരീതി വിവരങ്ങളും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം പിശകുകള്\u200dക്കും ശരിയാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണ കോണ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ഉന്നതസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200dനോട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ്ടെന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്നു. പ്രാദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മ', 'pl': 'Systemy korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC) dążą do korygowania zarówno globalnych błędów w porządku i użyciu słów, jak i lokalnych błędów napisania i przekształcenia. W dalszym ciągu opracowywania ostatnich prac nad tłumaczeniem maszynowym neuronowym proponujemy nowy hybrydowy model neuronowy z zagnieżdżonymi warstwami uwagi dla GEC. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nowy model może skutecznie korygować błędy obu typów poprzez włączenie informacji na poziomie słowa i znaków oraz że model znacznie przewyższa poprzednie modele neuronowe dla GEC mierzone na standardowym zbiorze danych referencyjnym CoNLL-14. Dalsza analiza pokazuje również, że wyższość proponowanego modelu można w dużej mierze przypisać zastosowaniu mechanizmu zagnieżdżonej uwagi, który okazał się szczególnie skuteczny w przypadku błędów lokalnych wymagających małych edycji w ortografii.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de corecție a erorilor gramaticale (GEC) se străduiesc să corecteze atât erorile globale în ordinea și utilizarea cuvintelor, cât și erorile locale de inscripționare și inflexiune. Dezvoltarea ulterioară a lucrărilor recente privind traducerea automată neurală, propunem un nou model neural hibrid cu straturi de atenție cuibărite pentru GEC. Experimentele arată că noul model poate corecta eficient erorile de ambele tipuri prin încorporarea informațiilor la nivel de cuvânt și caractere și că modelul depășește semnificativ modelele neurale anterioare pentru GEC măsurate pe setul standard de date CoNLL-14 de referință. Analizele suplimentare arată, de asemenea, că superioritatea modelului propus poate fi atribuită în mare măsură utilizării mecanismului de atenție cuibărit, care s-a dovedit deosebit de eficient erorile locale incorecte care implică mici modificări în ortografie.', 'sr': 'Gramatična korekcija greška (GEC) sustava pokušavaju da ispravi i globalne greške unutrašnjost reda i korištenja, i lokalne greške koje provaljuju i utiču. Dalje se razvijamo nakon nedavnog rada o prevodu neuralne mašine, predlažemo novi hibridni neuralni model sa gnijezdanim slojevima pažnje za GEC. Eksperimenti pokazuju da novi model može učinkovito ispraviti greške oba tipa uključujući informacije o reči i nivou karaktera, i da model značajno iznosi prethodne neuralne modele za GEC kao što je mjereno na standardnom setu podataka o referenciji CoNLL-14. Još jedna analiza takođe pokazuje da je superiornost predloženog modela u velikoj meri privedena na upotrebu gnijezdanog mehanizma pažnje, koji je pokazao posebno efikasno nepravedno lokalne greške koje uključuju male edicije u ortografiju.', 'no': 'Gramatiske feilretting (GEC) systemer strekar for å korrigera både globale feil i rekkefølgje og bruk, og lokale feil ved opplesing og infleksjon. Førre utviklingar ved nyleg arbeid på neuralmaskinsomsetjing, foreslår vi eit nytt hybrid neuralmodell med neste oppmerkslag for GEC. Eksperimentar viser at den nye modellen kan korrigera feil på begge typar ved å inkorprera informasjon om ordet og teiknsnivå, og at modellen utfører vanleg tidlegare neuralmodeller for GEC som målt på standardmodellet CoNLL-14. Dei fleire analysene viser også at overhøgda av den foreslåde modellen kan ha stort attributt til bruken av den neste oppmerksmekanismen, som har vist spesielt effektiv feil i lokale feil som involverer små redigeringar i ortografiet.', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа засах (GEC) системүүд дэлхийн алдаа алдаа хоёуланг орж ирсэн дарааллаар, хэрэглэх болон орон нутгийн алдаа шалгах болон нөлөөлдөг. Сүүлийн ажилд мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн тухай ажиллах үед бид GEC-ийн төлөө анхаарал хангалттай шинэ гибрид мэдрэлийн загварыг санал болгож байна. Шинэ загвар нь үг болон харин дүнгийн мэдээллийг нэгтгэхэд эффективно зөвшөөрөх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ загвар нь стандарт CoNLL-14 салбарын өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээнд хэмжээтэй GEC-ийн өмнөх мэдрэлийн загварын эсийн загварыг илүү чуха Дараагийн шинжилгээ нь мөн санал өгсөн загварын өндөр өндөр нь ихэвчлэн анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийн хэрэглээ ашиглах боломжтой байдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь яг ихэвчлэн орчин нутгийн алдаа буруу байдлыг харуулсан бөгөөд жижиг хэвлэл', 'si': 'Gramatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correction both in the input and use, and local error inspelling and affection. අපි අලුත් වැඩේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්තාවේ අනුවෙන් වැඩ කරන්න, අපි GEC වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් න්\u200dයුරෝල් මො පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අළුත් මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් වචන සහ අක්ෂර ප්\u200dරමාණයේ තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පර තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ, ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන', 'sv': 'Systemen för grammatisk felkorrigering (GEC) strävar efter att korrigera både globala fel i ordordning och användning, och lokala fel inspelning och böjning. Fortsatt utveckling efter det senaste arbetet med neural maskinöversättning, föreslår vi en ny hybrid neural modell med kapslade uppmärksamhetslager för GEC. Experiment visar att den nya modellen effektivt kan korrigera fel av båda typerna genom att införliva ord- och teckeninformation, och att modellen avsevärt överträffar tidigare neurala modeller för GEC mätta på standard CoNLL-14 benchmark dataset. Ytterligare analyser visar också att den föreslagna modellens överlägsenhet till stor del kan tillskrivas användningen av den kapslade uppmärksamhetsmekanismen, som har visat sig särskilt effektiv att felaktigt korrigera lokala fel som involverar små redigeringar i ortografin.', 'so': 'nidaamka hagaajinta qaladka grammatical (GEC) waxay isku dayaan inay hagaajiyaan khaladda caalamiga ah oo ku hagaajiya nidaamka iyo isticmaalka, iyo qaladyada degmada ah oo ku saxeysanaya iyo saameyn ku leh. Sidoo kale horumarinta shaqada ugu dambeysay oo ku saabsan tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model cusub oo daboolka neuro ah oo ku qoran xarumaha dhaqaalaha ee GEC. Imtixaanka cusub waxay muujinayaan in qaabka cusub uu hagaajin karo qaladyada labada noocyo ah, in uu ku qoro macluumaadka hadalka iyo heerka sawirka, modelkuna si muhiim ah ayuu u muujiyaa modelalka neurada ee hore ee GEC sida loo qiyaasay sanduuqii standard CoNLL-14. Analysis dheeraad ah waxaa sidoo kale tusi kara in aad u sarrayn karto modelka la soo jeeday ay isticmaali karto isticmaalka meymiska dareemada, kaas oo caddaynayey si khatar ah oo kharriban khaladaha deegaanka, kuwaas oo ku saabsan hagaajiyada yar ee ortografiga.', 'ta': 'சரியான பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC) அமைப்புகள் பொதுவான சொல்லுவரிசையையும் பயன்படுத்தும் பிழைகளையும் சரிசெய்ய முயற்சிக்கின்றன, மற் சமீபத்தில் நெய்யூரி இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் வேலை செய்யும் போது நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஹைப்ரிட் புதிய மாதிரி மாதிரியை  Name மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சி காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் மேன்மையானது குறிப்பிட்ட கவனத்தின் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக இருக்கலாம', 'ur': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correct both global errors in order and use, and local errors inspelling and inflection. نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے بارے میں اچھے کام پر اضافہ ہونے کے بعد ہم نے GEC کے لئے نیویورل ماڈل کے ساتھ ایک نوی ہیبرڈ نیورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ نئی موڈل کلمات اور کریٹر سطح معلومات کے ساتھ کلمات اور کریٹر سطح معلومات کے ذریعہ دو طریقوں کی خطاؤں کو اثبات سے درست کر سکتا ہے اور یہ موڈل اگلے نیورال موڈل GEC کے لئے اثبات سے زیادہ اثبات کرتا ہے جیسے استاندارڈ. اور اضافہ تحلیل بھی دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد مدل کی زیادتی بہت زیادہ مکانیسم کے استعمال کے ذریعہ سے متعلق ہو سکتی ہے جو مخصوصاً غلط محلی خطاؤں کے مطابق ثابت ہو چکی ہے جن میں چھوٹی سیدھی تدبیروں میں شامل ہوتی ہے.', 'mt': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correct both global errors inword order and usage, and local errors inspelling and inflection.  Further developing upon recent work on neural machine translation, we propose a new hybrid neural model with nested attention layers for GEC. L-esperimenti juru li l-mudell il-ġdid jista’ jikkoreġi b’mod effettiv l-iżbalji taż-żewġ tipi billi jinkorpora informazzjoni dwar il-kelma u l-livell tal-karattri, u li l-mudell jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-mudelli newrali preċedenti għall-GEC kif imkejjel fuq is-sett ta’ dejta standard ta’ referenza CoNLL-14. Analiżi ulterjuri turi wkoll li s-superjorità tal-mudell propost tista’ tiġi attribwita fil-biċċa l-kbira għall-użu tal-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni mibjugħa, li wera li huwa partikolarment effettiv li jinkorreġi żbalji lokali li jinvolvu editjar żgħir fl-ortografija.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda yangi neyrolik mashinasi tarjima qilishda harakat qilayotganda, biz GEC uchun qo'llangan qatlamlar bilan yangi hybrid neyrol modelini rivojlanamiz. Name Koʻproq taʼminlovchi modelning eng darajaligi ortografiya qisqa tahrirlarga murojaat qiladigan qisqa tahrirlarni ishlatishga ega bo'lishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống sửa lỗi máy (GEC) cố gắng sửa chữa cả sai sót liên tục trong trật tự và sử dụng, và lỗi cục bộ trong việc in và biến hình. Tiếp tục phát triển sau những nghiên cứu gần đây về dịch chuyển máy thần kinh, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình thần kinh lai mới với các lớp tập trung gắn tổ cho GEC. Thí nghiệm cho thấy kiểu mẫu mới có thể sửa lỗi của cả hai loại bằng cách nhập thông tin từ và mức ký tự, và kiểu mẫu này thực hiện khả năng cao hơn các mô hình thần kinh trước với trí tuệ trí tuệ được so với tập tin tiêu chuẩn CO2-14. Phân tích tiếp theo cũng cho thấy khả năng ưu việt của mô hình được đề xuất có thể được phần lớn phụ thuộc vào việc sử dụng cơ chế tập trung gắn tổ, nó đã chứng minh sai lệch đặc biệt hiệu quả các lỗi địa phương liên quan đến các bản nhỏ ở trường tính.', 'bg': 'Системите за граматична корекция на грешки (ГЕК) се стремят да коригират както глобалните грешки в реда и употребата на думите, така и локалните грешки в изписването и наклонението. По-нататък разработвайки скорошната работа по невронния машинен превод, ние предлагаме нов хибриден невронен модел с вложени слоеве на внимание за ГЕК. Експериментите показват, че новият модел може ефективно да коригира грешките и от двата типа чрез включване на информация на ниво думи и символи и че моделът значително превъзхожда предишните невронни модели за GEC, измерени на стандартния набор от данни CoNLL-14. Допълнителният анализ показва също, че превъзходството на предложения модел може до голяма степен да се дължи на използването на гнездения механизъм за внимание, който се оказа особено ефективен при неправилно коригиране на локални грешки, които включват малки редакции в ортографията.', 'nl': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC) systemen streven ernaar om zowel globale fouten in woordvolgorde en gebruik, als lokale fouten inspelling en buiging te corrigeren. Voortbouwend op recent werk over neurale machinevertaling, stellen we een nieuw hybride neuraal model voor met geneste aandachtslagen voor GEC. Experimenten tonen aan dat het nieuwe model fouten van beide typen effectief kan corrigeren door informatie op woord- en tekenniveau op te nemen, en dat het model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan eerdere neurale modellen voor GEC zoals gemeten op de standaard CoNLL-14 benchmark dataset. Verdere analyse toont ook aan dat de superioriteit van het voorgestelde model grotendeels kan worden toegeschreven aan het gebruik van het geneste aandachtsmechanisme, dat bijzonder effectief is gebleken bij het corrigeren van lokale fouten die kleine bewerkingen in de orthografie vereisen.', 'da': 'Systemer til grammatisk fejlkorrektion (GEC) stræber efter at korrigere både globale fejl i ordrækkefølge og brug samt lokale fejlindspilning og bøjning. Yderligere udvikling på nyligt arbejde med neural maskinoversættelse, vi foreslår en ny hybrid neural model med indlejrede opmærksomhedslag til GEC. Eksperimenter viser, at den nye model effektivt kan korrigere fejl af begge typer ved at indarbejde ord- og tegneniveau information, og at modellen betydeligt overgår tidligere neurale modeller for GEC målt på standard CoNLL-14 benchmark datasæt. Yderligere analyse viser også, at den foreslåede models overlegenhed i vid udstrækning kan tilskrives brugen af indlejret opmærksomhedsmekanisme, som har vist sig særlig effektiv forkerte lokale fejl, der involverer små redigeringer i ortografien.', 'hr': 'Gramatična korekcija greška (GEC) sustava pokušavaju ispraviti i globalne greške unutarnjeg reda i korištenja, i lokalne greške uvlačenja i utjecaja. Dalje se razvijamo nakon nedavnog rada o prevodu neuralnih strojeva, predlažemo novi hibridni neuralni model s gnijezdanim slojevima pažnje za GEC. Eksperimenti pokazuju da novi model može učinkovito ispraviti greške obje vrste uključujući informacije o riječi i razini karaktera, te da model značajno iznosi prethodne neuralne modele GEC-a kako je mjeren na standardnom setu podataka o referenciji CoNLL-14. Daljnja analiza također pokazuje da se nadvišenost predloženog modela u velikoj mjeri može priključiti korištenju gnijezdanog mehanizma pažnje, koji je pokazao posebno učinkovito nepravedno lokalne greške koje uključuju male editore ortografije.', 'de': 'Grammatical Error Correction (GEC)-Systeme sind bestrebt, sowohl globale Fehler in der Wortreihenfolge und -verwendung als auch lokale Fehler zu korrigieren. Im Anschluss an neuere Arbeiten zur neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung schlagen wir ein neues hybrides neuronales Modell mit verschachtelten Aufmerksamkeitsschichten für GEC vor. Experimente zeigen, dass das neue Modell Fehler beider Typen effektiv korrigieren kann, indem es Informationen auf Wort- und Zeichenebene integriert, und dass das Modell die bisherigen neuronalen Modelle für GEC deutlich übertrifft, die auf dem Standard-CoNLL-14 Benchmark-Datensatz gemessen wurden. Weitere Analysen zeigen auch, dass die Überlegenheit des vorgeschlagenen Modells weitgehend auf die Verwendung des verschachtelten Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zurückzuführen ist, der sich besonders effektiv bei der Fehlerbehebung lokaler Fehler, die kleine Bearbeitungen in der Orthographie erfordern, erwiesen hat.', 'id': 'Sistem koreksi kesalahan grammatik (GEC) berusaha untuk memperbaiki kedua kesalahan global dalam urutan dan penggunaan kata, dan kesalahan lokal menginspelling dan inflection. Lebih lanjut berkembang pada pekerjaan baru-baru ini tentang terjemahan mesin saraf, kami mengusulkan model saraf hibrid baru dengan lapisan perhatian sarang untuk GEC. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model baru dapat secara efektif memperbaiki kesalahan dari kedua tipe dengan memasukkan informasi kata dan tingkat karakter, dan bahwa model secara signifikan melebihi model saraf sebelumnya untuk GEC seperti diukur pada set standar CoNLL-14 benchmark data. Analisis lanjut juga menunjukkan bahwa ketinggian model yang diusulkan dapat diperkirakan sebagian besar dengan penggunaan mekanisme perhatian tersarang, yang telah terbukti khusus efektif mengabaikan kesalahan lokal yang melibatkan edit kecil dalam ortografi.', 'ko': '문법 오류 수정(GEC) 시스템은 어순과 용법의 전체적인 오류, 맞춤법과 굴절 변화의 부분적인 오류를 교정하는 데 주력한다.최근의 신경 기계 번역 작업을 토대로 우리는 GEC에 사용되는 새로운 혼합 신경 모델을 제시했다.실험에 의하면 새로운 모델은 단어와 문자급 정보를 결합시켜 이 두 가지 유형의 오류를 효과적으로 바로잡을 수 있고 이 모델은 표준 CoNLL-14 기준 데이터 집합에서의 성능이 이전의 GEC 신경 모델보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.진일보한 분석에 의하면 제시된 모델의 우월성은 어느 정도에 끼워 넣는 주의 메커니즘의 사용에 기인할 수 있다. 이 메커니즘은 정자법 편집과 관련된 부분적인 오류를 바로잡는 데 특히 효과적임을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa uharibifu wa makosa ya kiGrammatika (GEC) wanajitahidi kurekebisha makosa ya kimataifa kwa ajili ya amri ya maneno na matumizi, na makosa ya mahali yanayoingia na kuhusiana. Zaidi ya kuendelea kwa kazi ya hivi karibuni kuhusu tafsiri ya mashine ya neura, tunapendekeza modeli mpya ya ubongo wa huduma za vifaa vya kisasa kwa ajili ya GEC. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo mpya unaweza kuhakikisha makosa ya aina zote kwa kuingiza taarifa za maneno na kiwango cha tabia, na kwamba mtindo huo unafanya mifano ya kisasa ya zamani kwa ajili ya GEC kama ilivyopima kwenye seti ya taarifa za bendera za standard CoNLL-14. Uchambuzi zaidi pia unaonyesha kuwa ukubwa wa muundo huu unapendekezwa unaweza kutumika sana kwa matumizi ya mfumo wa ufuatiliaji wa msimamo mkali, ambao umethibitisha hasa na ufanisi wa kukosekana makosa yanayohusisha uhariri mdogo katika orodha.', 'sq': 'Sistemet e korrigjimit të gabimeve grammatike (GEC) përpiqen të korrigjojnë si gabimet globale në rendin dhe përdorimin e fjalëve, si dhe gabimet lokale në shkrim dhe përdorim. Për zhvillimin e mëtejshëm të punës së fundit në përkthimin e makinave nervore, propozojmë një model të ri hibridik nervor me shtresa të vëmendjes për GEC. Eksperimentet tregojnë se modeli i ri mund të korrigjojë efektivisht gabimet e të dy tipeve duke përfshirë informacionin e nivelit të fjalës dhe karakterit dhe se modeli ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më shumë se modelet e mëparshëm neuronale për GEC siç matet në bazën e standartit të të dhënave CoNLL-14. Analiza e mëtejshme tregon gjithashtu se superioriteti i modelit të propozuar mund të atribuohet kryesisht përdorimit të mekanizmit të vëmendjes së vendosur, i cili është provuar veçanërisht efektiv në korrigjimin e gabimeve lokale që përfshijnë editime të vogla në ortografi.', 'tr': 'Grammatik hata düzeltmek (GEC) sistemleri küresel hatalaryň içine girişi we ullanyşyny düzeltmek üçin mümkin edýär. Ýakynda näural maşynyň terjimesinde täze bir hybrid nural nusgasyny GEC üçin göz öňünde duran gatylar bilen täze bir hybrid nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Testler täze modeliniň sözleri we karakter derejesi maglumatyny dahyl eden iki hiliniň hatalaryny etkinleýändigini görkezip bilýär we bu modeliniň GEC üçin öňki neural modelleriniň derejesi CoNLL-14 etiket baglanmasynda ölçülen ýaly öňki nural modellerini çykarýar. Daşary analýusy hem teklip eden nusganyň üstünliklerini ýakyn üns meýdançasynyň ullanmasyna golaýlaşdyrylýandygyny görkezýär. Bu nusgasyna görä kiçi düzenlemeler ortografiýada ýalňyş ýalňyşlyk bilen täsirli ýalňyşlyk bar.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای اصلاح خطای گراماتیکی (GEC) سعی می\u200cکنند که هر دو خطای جهانی را در دستور و استفاده جهانی اصلاح کند، و خطاهای محلی را در حال انفجار و تأثیر. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل عصبی جدید با لایه\u200cهای توجه برای GEC به کار اخیر در مورد ترجمه ماشین عصبی\u200cها پیشنهاد کنیم. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل جدید می\u200cتواند با جمع اطلاعات کلمه و سطح شخصیت\u200cها اشتباه\u200cهای هر دو نوع را به طور تاثیر درست کند، و این مدل به طور معنی مدل\u200cهای عصبی قبلی برای GEC را به طور اندازه\u200cگیری بر سطح داده\u200cهای استاندارد CoNLL-14 اجرا می\u200cکند. تحلیل اضافه\u200cای هم نشان می\u200cدهد که بزرگترین مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند به وسیله استفاده از مکانیسم توجه\u200cای که به طور خاص اشتباه\u200cهای محلی غلط شده را ثابت کرده است که در ارتوگرافی تغییرات کوچک شامل تغییرات محلی است.', 'am': 'የግራማዊ ስህተት ማቀናጃ (GEC) ሲስተካከሉ የዓለምአቀፍ ስህተቶችን በንግግር ትእዛዝ እና ማቀናጃ እና የአገር ስህተቶችን በመጨመር እና ማቀናቀል ለማስተካከል ይፈልጋሉ። አዲስ የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ ላይ የሚሠራውን ሥራ ደግሞ ለመፍጠር አዲስ የኬብሪድ የናውሬል ሞዴል ለGEC ጥያቄ የደረጃዎችን ጥያቄ እናስባለን፡፡ ምርጫዎች ቃላት እና የፊደል ደረጃ መረጃ በመግባት አዲስ ሞዴል በሁለቱም ዓይነት ስህተቶችን የሚያስተካክል እንዲችል እና ሞዴል በሙሉ CoNLL-14 benchmark-ዳታማውን በመለጠፍ ለGEC የተባለፈውን የውጤት ዓይነቶች በሙሉ እንዲያሳየው ያስተካክላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም አስተያየት ደግሞ የተዘጋጀው የሞዴል ብልሃት በኩል የተጠቃሚ የጥያቄ አካላት ለመጠቀም የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղությունը (geoc) համակարգերը փորձում են ուղղություն տալ բառի և օգտագործման միջև գլոբալ սխալներին, ինչպես նաև տեղական սխալներին գրելիս և արտադրելուն: Հետագա զարգացումը նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման վերջին աշխատանքի վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր հիբրիդ նյարդային մոդել, որն ունի խրճված ուշադրության շերտեր, որոնք օգտագործում են գետիկ հատվ Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ նոր մոդելը կարող է արդյունավետ ուղղել երկու տեսակի սխալները՝ ներառելով բառերի և բնավորների մակարդակի ինֆորմացիա, և որ մոդելը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է գերազանցության նախորդ նյարդային մոդելները, ինչպես չափում է ստանդ Ավելի վերլուծությունը նաև ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելի գերազանցությունը կարող է հիմնականում պատասխանվել խզբզված ուշադրության մեխանիզմի օգտագործմանը, որը պարզվել է հատկապես արդյունավետ տեղական սխալներ ուղղել, որոնք ներառում են փոքր խմբագրություններ օրթոգր', 'af': "Gramatiese fout korreksie (GEC) stelsels strep om beide globale foute in volgorde en gebruik te korrigeer, en plaaslike foute inspelling en inflekking. Verder ontwikkeling op onlangse werk op neural masjien vertaling, voorstel ons 'n nuwe hibride neural model met geneste aandag laag vir GEC. Eksperimente wys dat die nuwe model kan effektief korrigeer foute van beide tipes deur word en karaktervlak-inligting te inkorporeer, en dat die model betekeurig uitvoer vorige neurale modele vir GEC soos gemeet op die standaard CoNLL-14 benchmark datastel. Verdere analisie wys ook dat die hoogheid van die voorgestelde model groot aangewys kan word aan die gebruik van die naaste aandagmekanisme, wat besonderlik effektief het beskerm effektief verkeerde plaaslike foute wat klein redigeerders in ortografie insluit.", 'bs': 'Gramatična korekcija greška (GEC) sustava pokušavaju ispraviti i globalne greške unutrašnjost reda i korištenja, i lokalne greške u inspekciji i inflekciji. Dalje se razvijamo nakon nedavnog rada o prevodu neuralnih strojeva, predlažemo novi hibridni neuralni model sa gnijezdanim slojevima pažnje za GEC. Eksperimenti pokazuju da novi model može učinkovito ispraviti greške oba tipa uključujući informacije o riječima i nivou karaktera i da model značajno iznosi prethodne neuralne modele GEC-a kako je mjeren na standardnom setu podataka o referenciji CoNLL-14. Daljnja analiza također pokazuje da je nadvišenost predloženog modela u velikoj mjeri privedena korištenju gnijezdanog mehanizma pažnje, koji je pokazao posebno učinkovito pogrešne lokalne greške koje uključuju male editore u ortografiji.', 'cs': 'Systémy pro gramatickou korekci chyb (GEC) se snaží opravit jak globální chyby v pořadí a použití slov, tak i lokální chyby přepisování a zklonění. V rámci nedávné práce na neuronovém strojovém překladu navrhujeme nový hybridní neuronový model s vnořenými vrstvami pozornosti pro GEC. Experimenty ukazují, že nový model dokáže efektivně opravit chyby obou typů začleněním informací na úrovni slova a znaků a že model výrazně předčí předchozí neuronové modely pro GEC měřené na standardní referenční sadě CoNLL-14. Další analýza rovněž ukazuje, že nadřazenost navrženého modelu lze z velké části připsat použití vnořeného mechanismu pozornosti, který se ukázal obzvláště efektivní při nesprávě lokálních chybách, které zahrnují malé úpravy pravopisu.', 'ca': "Els sistemes de correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC) busquen corregir tant els errors globals en l'ordre de paraules com en l'ús, com els errors locals en l'inscripció i la inflecció. Després de desenvolupar-nos amb la recent feina sobre la traducció de màquines neurals, proposem un nou model neural híbrid amb capes d'atenció ninjades per a GEC. Els experiments demostren que el nou model pot corregir efectivament els errors de ambdós tipus incorporant informació sobre paraules i nivell de caràcter, i que el model supera significativament els models neuronals anteriors de GEC mesurats en el conjunt de dades de referència standard CoNLL-14. Una altra anàlisi també mostra que la superioritat del model proposat es pot atribuir en gran part a l'ús del mecanisme d'atenció ninjat, que ha demostrat ser particularment efectiu incorrectant els errors locals que impliquen petites edicions en l'ortografia.", 'az': 'Gramatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) sistemləri küresel xətaları içərisində və istifadəsində düzəltmək və yerli xətaları sınamaq və infleksiyon etmək üçün cəhd edirlər. Əvvəlki nöral maşına çevirilməsi haqqında yeni işlərdə, GEC üçün döşənmiş nöral modeli ilə yeni hibrid nöral modeli təklif edirik. Tərəbbür göstərir ki, yeni modellərin hər iki növünün xətalarını söz və karakter səviyyəsi məlumatlarını daxil edərək, və modellərin GEC üçün əvvəlki nöral modellərin standart CoNLL-14 benchmark verilər qutusunda ölçülü kimi ölçülü olaraq daha çox çəkilir. Daha çox analizi də göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş model in üstünlüyünü çox yüksək dəyişiklik mehanizmisinin istifadəsinə qoyula bilər, ki bu, ortografiyada küçük editlər içərisində olan yerli hataların çox etkili olmasını təsdiqləmişdir.', 'et': 'Grammatilise veaparanduse (GEC) süsteemid püüavad parandada nii globaalseid vigu sõnade järjekorras ja kasutamises kui ka kohalikke vigu sisestamises ja paindlikkuses. Hiljutise neurotõlke töö põhjal pakume GEC jaoks välja uue hübriidneuraalmudeli pesastatud tähelepanukihtidega. Katsed näitavad, et uus mudel suudab tõhusalt parandada mõlemat tüüpi vigu, sisaldades sõna- ja märgitasemel teavet, ning et mudel on oluliselt suurem kui varasemad GEC närvimudelid, mida mõõdetakse standardsete CoNLL-14 võrdlusandmete põhjal. Täiendav analüüs näitab ka, et kavandatud mudeli paremust võib suures osas omistada pesastatud tähelepanumehhanismi kasutamisele, mis on osutunud eriti efektiivseks kohalike vigade korrigeerimisel, mis hõlmavad väikeseid ortograafia redigeerimisi.', 'fi': 'Kielioppivirheiden korjausjärjestelmät (GEC) pyrkivät korjaamaan sekä yleisiä sanojen järjestys- ja käyttövirheitä että paikallisia kirjoitusvirheitä ja taipumuksia. Kehitämme hiljattain neurokonekäännöstä ja ehdotamme uutta hybridi-neuromallia, jossa on sisäkkäisiä huomiokerroksia GEC:lle. Kokeet osoittavat, että uusi malli pystyy tehokkaasti korjaamaan molempien tyyppien virheitä sisällyttämällä sana- ja merkkitason tietoja ja että malli on huomattavasti parempi kuin aikaisemmat GEC:n neuromallit mitattuna standardissa CoNLL-14-vertailuaineistossa. Jatkoanalyysi osoittaa myös, että ehdotetun mallin ylivoimaisuus johtuu pitkälti sisäkkäisen huomiomekanismin käytöstä, joka on osoittautunut erityisen tehokkaaksi väärien paikallisten virheiden korjaamisessa, joihin liittyy pieniä ortografiamuokkauksia.', 'bn': 'গ্রামেটিক্যাল ত্রুটির সংশোধন (GEC) সিস্টেম বিশ্বব্যাপী ভুল ইনওয়ার্ডের আদেশ ও ব্যবহারের জন্য সংশোধন করার চেষ্টা করেছে এবং স সাম্প্রতিক কাজের উপর নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের ব্যাপারে আরো উন্নয়নশীল, আমরা একটি নতুন হাইব্রিড নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যারা জ Experiments show that the new model can effectively correct errors of both types by incorporating word and character-level information, and that the model significantly outperforms previous neural models for GEC as measured on the standard CoNLL-14 benchmark dataset. আরো বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের শ্রেষ্ঠত্ব বেশীরভাগ মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের ব্যবহারের কারণে প্রকাশিত হতে পারে, যা বিশেষ করে স্থানীয় ভুল প্রমাণ করেছে যা', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Lakok nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe karo penting-manut, kita supoyo model sing apik, wiir-apik nggawe barang nggawe layang-ajang kanggo GEC Name Ndeleksyon tambah mungkane bukane dadi, akeh akeh luhur akeh model sing supoyo iso nggawe nyimpen nggo ngegambar aturan tapi kanggo nguasai manungsa titik sing nguasai, sing wis ngerasakno ngomong gak bener akeh akeh lokal sing isingke nggawe nguasai nyong.', 'ha': "Systemi na kure na grammaci (GEC) sun yi aikin su gyare-gyare, suna cikin tsarin maganar da amfani, da kuma makorari masu cikin matsayin da za'a lissafa da mai amfani da. Further developing upon recent work on neural machine translation, we propose a new hybrid neural model with nested attention layers for GEC. Fijaroyi na nuna cewa, shirin new motel yana iya gyara makorari na biyu typi, da za'a shigar da maɓallin maganar da babban-daraja, kuma, shirin ya nuna motsi masu ƙaranci wa zaman neural wa GEC kamar an ƙaddara shi a kan danne na tsarin bango na CoNLL-14. Furan Anayi na nuna cewa, mafi girma ga misalin wanda aka buƙata, za'a iya ƙayyade amfani da misalin muhimmin muhimmada, wanda ya jarraba yana mai amfani da matsayin aikin muhimmanci, da kuma ya gaskata masu inganci masu cikin makorari masu cikin ortografi.", 'sk': 'Sistemi slovničnega popravka napak (GEC) si prizadevajo popraviti globalne napake v vrstnem redu besed in uporabi ter lokalne napake pri črkovanju in upogibanju. Na podlagi nedavnega dela na področju nevronskega strojnega prevajanja predlagamo nov hibridni nevronski model z gnezdenimi pozornostnimi plastmi za GEC. Eksperimenti kažejo, da lahko novi model učinkovito popravi napake obeh tipov z vključitvijo besednih in znakov informacij in da model znatno presega prejšnje živčne modele za GEC, merjene na standardnem naboru referenčnih podatkov CoNLL-14. Nadaljnja analiza kaže tudi, da je mogoče superiornost predlaganega modela v veliki meri pripisati uporabi gnezdenega mehanizma pozornosti, ki se je izkazal za posebej učinkovit pri napačnih lokalnih napakah, ki vključujejo majhne ureditve v ortografiji.', 'he': "Grammatical error correction (GEC) systems strive to correct both global errors inword order and usage, and local errors inspelling and inflection.  התפתחות נוספות בעבודה האחרונה על התרגום של מכונות עצביות, אנו מציעים מודל עצבי היברידי חדש עם שכבות תשומת לב קן עבור GEC. ניסויים מראים שהמודל החדש יכול לתקן בעובדה שגיאות של שני הטיפוסים על ידי הכילוי מידע מילים וברמת האופים, ושהמודל יוצא משמעות מעל מודלים עצביים קודמים לג'י.ג'י.סי כפי שמדוד על קבוצת מידע קונדרטית CoNLL-14. ניתוח נוסף גם מראה כי העליון של המודל המוצע יכול להיות מונח בעיקר לשימוש של מנגנון תשומת לב הקן, אשר הוכיח היעיל במיוחד לתיקון שגיאות מקומיות לא נכונות", 'bo': 'Grammatical error correction (GEC)system strive to correct both global errors in order and use, and local errors inspelling and inflection. Further developing on recent work on neural machine translation, we propose a new hybrid neural model with nested attention layers for GEC. Experiments show that the new model can effectively correct errors of both types by incorporating word and character-level information, and that the model significantly outperforms previous neural models for GEC as measured on the standard CoNLL-14 benchmark dataset. ཞིབ་དཔྱད་གཞན་པ་དེ་ལས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ཆེས་ཉུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པས།'}
{'en': 'TextFlow : A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'ar': 'TextFlow: مقياس تشابه النص بناءً على التسلسلات المستمرة', 'es': 'TextFlow: una medida de similitud de texto basada en secuencias continuas', 'fr': 'TextFlow\xa0: une mesure de similarité de texte basée sur des séquences continues', 'pt': 'TextFlow: uma medida de similaridade de texto baseada em sequências contínuas', 'ja': 'TextFlow:連続シーケンスに基づくテキスト類似性メジャー', 'zh': '文本流:连序相似性度', 'hi': 'TextFlow: निरंतर अनुक्रमों के आधार पर एक पाठ समानता उपाय', 'ru': 'TextFlow: мера текстового сходства, основанная на непрерывных последовательностях', 'ga': 'TextFlow: Beart Cosúlachta Téacs bunaithe ar Sheichimh Leanúnacha', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'TextFlow: Folyamatos sorozatokon alapuló szöveghasonlósági mérés', 'el': 'Ένα μέτρο ομοιομορφίας κειμένου βασισμένο σε συνεχείς ακολουθίες', 'it': 'TextFlow: una misura di somiglianza del testo basata su sequenze continue', 'kk': 'Мәтіннің жылжығы: Мәтін ұқсастығының тегістеу', 'lt': 'TextFlow: A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'mk': 'TextFlow: A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'ms': 'Teks', 'ml': 'പദാവലി', 'mt': 'Fluss tat-Test: Miżura ta’ Similarità tat-Test ibbażata fuq Sekwenzi Kontinwi', 'mn': 'TextFlow: Текст тэнцүү хэмжээсүүд үргэлжлүүлэх дарааллын үндсэн хэмжээсүүд', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'TextFlow: mjera sličnosti teksta bazirana na kontinualnim sekvencijama', 'pl': 'TextFlow: Pomiar podobieństwa tekstu oparty na ciągłych sekwencjach', 'ro': 'TextFlow: O măsură de similitudine a textului bazată pe secvențe continue', 'si': 'Comment', 'sv': 'TextFlow: Ett textliknande mått baserat på kontinuerliga sekvenser', 'so': 'TextFlow: A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'ta': 'உரைநிலை: தொடர்ந்து வரிசைகளை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு உரையின் ஒற்றை அளவு', 'ur': 'Text Flow: A Text Similarity Measure based on continuous sequences', 'uz': 'Matn', 'vi': 'Hình chảy: Một thước đo tỷ lệ văn bản dựa trên các chuỗi lặp liên tiếp', 'bg': 'Текстов поток: мярка за сходство на текста въз основа на непрекъснати последователности', 'hr': 'TextFlow: mjera sličnosti teksta temeljena na kontinualnim sekvencijama', 'da': 'TextFlow: En tekst lighedsmåling baseret på kontinuerlige sekvenser', 'nl': 'TextFlow: Een Tekst Similarity Measure gebaseerd op Continuous Sequences', 'fa': 'Comment', 'de': 'TextFlow: Ein Textgleichheitsmaß basierend auf kontinuierlichen Sequenzen', 'id': 'TextFlow: Sebuah Ukuran Kesamaan Teks berdasarkan Sekuensi Terus', 'sw': 'TextFlow: Hakima ya Similarity kwa msingi wa Maendeleo', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Metin Flow:A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'sq': 'TextFlow: A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'ko': 'TextFlow: 연속 시퀀스 기반 텍스트 유사성 메트릭', 'az': 'TextFlow: Mətn oxuması Ölçüsü Daxili Sıradanlara dayanan', 'bs': 'TextFlow: mjera sličnosti teksta temeljena na kontinualnim sekvencijama', 'bn': 'টেক্সটফ্লো: অনলাইন সেকেন্সের ভিত্তিতে একটি টেক্সট সমতামূলক মাপ', 'ca': 'TextFlow: Una mesura de similitud de text basada en seqüències continues', 'cs': 'TextFlow: Měření podobnosti textu založené na kontinuálních sekvencích', 'fi': 'TextFlow: Jatkuviin sekvensseihin perustuva tekstin samankaltaisuuden mittaus', 'et': 'TextFlow: pidevatel järjestustel põhinev teksti sarnasuse mõõde', 'jv': 'Text Flow: A Text Similrity', 'sk': 'TextFlow: merilo podobnosti besedila, ki temelji na neprekinjenih zaporedjih', 'he': 'Comment', 'ha': 'A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences', 'bo': 'TextFlow: A Text Similarity Measure based on Continuous Sequences'}
{'en': 'Text similarity measures are used in multiple tasks such as plagiarism detection, information ranking and recognition of paraphrases and textual entailment. While recent advances in deep learning highlighted the relevance of sequential models in natural language generation, existing similarity measures do not fully exploit the sequential nature of language. Examples of such similarity measures include n-grams and skip-grams overlap which rely on distinct slices of the input texts. In this paper we present a novel text similarity measure inspired from a common representation in DNA sequence alignment algorithms. The new measure, called TextFlow, represents input text pairs as continuous curves and uses both the actual position of the words and sequence matching to compute the similarity value. Our experiments on 8 different datasets show very encouraging results in paraphrase detection, textual entailment recognition and ranking relevance.', 'ar': 'تُستخدم مقاييس تشابه النص في مهام متعددة مثل اكتشاف الانتحال ، وترتيب المعلومات ، والتعرف على إعادة الصياغة والاستدلال النصي. بينما أبرزت التطورات الحديثة في التعلم العميق أهمية النماذج المتسلسلة في توليد اللغة الطبيعية ، لا تستغل مقاييس التشابه الحالية بشكل كامل الطبيعة المتسلسلة للغة. تتضمن أمثلة مقاييس التشابه هذه تداخل n-grams و skip-grams التي تعتمد على شرائح مميزة من نصوص الإدخال. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مقياس تشابه نص جديد مستوحى من تمثيل شائع في خوارزميات محاذاة تسلسل الحمض النووي. يمثل المقياس الجديد ، المسمى TextFlow ، أزواج نص الإدخال كمنحنيات مستمرة ويستخدم كل من الموضع الفعلي للكلمات ومطابقة التسلسل لحساب قيمة التشابه. تُظهر تجاربنا على 8 مجموعات بيانات مختلفة نتائج مشجعة للغاية في اكتشاف إعادة الصياغة ، والتعرف على الضمانات النصية ، ومدى ملاءمة الترتيب.', 'es': 'Las medidas de similitud de texto se utilizan en múltiples tareas, como la detección de plagio, la clasificación de la información y el reconocimiento de paráfrasis y la implicación textual. Si bien los avances recientes en el aprendizaje profundo destacaron la relevancia de los modelos secuenciales en la generación del lenguaje natural, las medidas de similitud existentes no aprovechan completamente la naturaleza secuencial del lenguaje. Ejemplos de tales medidas de similitud incluyen la superposición de n-gramas y omisiones que se basan en cortes distintos de los textos de entrada. En este artículo presentamos una novedosa medida de similitud de texto inspirada en una representación común en los algoritmos de alineación de secuencias de ADN. La nueva medida, denominada TextFlow, representa los pares de texto de entrada como curvas continuas y utiliza tanto la posición real de las palabras como la coincidencia de secuencia para calcular el valor de similitud. Nuestros experimentos en 8 conjuntos de datos diferentes muestran resultados muy alentadores en la detección de paráfrasis, el reconocimiento de implicación textual y la relevancia de la clasificación.', 'fr': "Les mesures de similarité de texte sont utilisées dans de multiples tâches telles que la détection du plagiat, le classement des informations et la reconnaissance des paraphrases et des implications textuelles. Alors que les récents progrès en matière d'apprentissage profond ont mis en évidence la pertinence des modèles séquentiels dans la génération du langage naturel, les mesures de similitude existantes n'exploitent pas pleinement la nature séquentielle du langage. Des exemples de telles mesures de similarité incluent le chevauchement de n-grammes et de sauts de grammes qui reposent sur des tranches distinctes des textes d'entrée. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle mesure de similarité de texte inspirée d'une représentation courante dans les algorithmes d'alignement de séquences d'ADN. La nouvelle mesure, appelée TextFlow, représente les paires de texte en entrée sous forme de courbes continues et utilise à la fois la position réelle des mots et la correspondance de séquence pour calculer la valeur de similarité. Nos expériences sur 8 ensembles de données différents montrent des résultats très encourageants en termes de détection de paraphrase, de reconnaissance des implications textuelles et de pertinence du classement.", 'pt': 'As medidas de similaridade de texto são usadas em várias tarefas, como detecção de plágio, classificação de informações e reconhecimento de paráfrases e vinculação textual. Embora os avanços recentes no aprendizado profundo tenham destacado a relevância dos modelos sequenciais na geração de linguagem natural, as medidas de similaridade existentes não exploram totalmente a natureza sequencial da linguagem. Exemplos de tais medidas de similaridade incluem sobreposição de n-grams e skip-grams que dependem de fatias distintas dos textos de entrada. Neste artigo apresentamos uma nova medida de similaridade de texto inspirada em uma representação comum em algoritmos de alinhamento de sequências de DNA. A nova medida, chamada TextFlow, representa os pares de texto de entrada como curvas contínuas e usa a posição real das palavras e a correspondência de sequência para calcular o valor de similaridade. Nossos experimentos em 8 conjuntos de dados diferentes mostram resultados muito encorajadores na detecção de paráfrases, reconhecimento de vinculação textual e relevância de classificação.', 'hi': 'पाठ समानता उपायों का उपयोग कई कार्यों में किया जाता है जैसे साहित्यिक चोरी का पता लगाना, सूचना रैंकिंग और पैराफ्रेज़ की मान्यता और पाठ्य अनिवार्यता। जबकि गहरी शिक्षा में हाल की प्रगति ने प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी में अनुक्रमिक मॉडल की प्रासंगिकता पर प्रकाश डाला, मौजूदा समानता उपाय पूरी तरह से भाषा की अनुक्रमिक प्रकृति का शोषण नहीं करते हैं। इस तरह के समानता उपायों के उदाहरणों में एन-ग्राम और स्किप-ग्राम ओवरलैप शामिल हैं जो इनपुट ग्रंथों के अलग-अलग स्लाइस पर भरोसा करते हैं। इस पेपर में हम डीएनए अनुक्रम संरेखण एल्गोरिदम में एक सामान्य प्रतिनिधित्व से प्रेरित एक उपन्यास पाठ समानता उपाय प्रस्तुत करते हैं। नया उपाय, जिसे TextFlow कहा जाता है, निरंतर घटता के रूप में इनपुट टेक्स्ट जोड़े का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है और समानता मान की गणना करने के लिए शब्दों की वास्तविक स्थिति और अनुक्रम मिलान दोनों का उपयोग करता है। 8 अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रयोगों में व्याख्या का पता लगाने, पाठ्य अनिवार्यता मान्यता और रैंकिंग प्रासंगिकता में बहुत उत्साहजनक परिणाम दिखाई देते हैं।', 'ja': 'テキスト類似性測定は、剽窃の検出、情報の順位付け、パラフレーズの認識、テキストの関連付けなどの複数のタスクで使用されます。ディープラーニングの最近の進歩は、自然言語生成におけるシーケンシャルモデルの関連性を強調したが、既存の類似性尺度は、言語のシーケンシャルな性質を完全に利用するものではない。そのような類似性尺度の例としては、入力テキストの異なるスライスに依存するｎグラム及びスキップグラムが挙げられる。本論文では、ＤＮＡ配列アラインメントアルゴリズムにおける共通表現から着想を得た新規のテキスト類似性尺度を提示する。TextFlowと呼ばれる新しいメジャーは、入力テキストのペアを連続した曲線として表し、単語の実際の位置とシーケンスマッチングの両方を使用して類似性値を計算します。8つの異なるデータセットに関する当社の実験は、パラフレーズ検出、テキストの巻き込み認識、およびランキング関連性において非常に奨励される結果を示しています。', 'ru': 'Меры текстового сходства используются в нескольких задачах, таких как обнаружение плагиата, ранжирование информации и распознавание парафраз и текстовых влечений. Хотя последние достижения в области глубокого обучения подчеркивают актуальность последовательных моделей в процессе генерации естественного языка, существующие показатели сходства не в полной мере учитывают последовательный характер языка. Примеры таких показателей сходства включают n-граммы и перекрытие скип-грамм, которые опираются на отдельные срезы входных текстов. В этой статье мы представляем новую меру подобия текста, вдохновленную общим представлением в алгоритмах выравнивания последовательностей ДНК. Новая мера, называемая TextFlow, представляет входные текстовые пары как непрерывные кривые и использует как фактическое положение слов, так и сопоставление последовательностей для вычисления значения сходства. Наши эксперименты на 8 различных наборах данных показывают очень обнадеживающие результаты в обнаружении перефразов, распознавании текстовых влечений и релевантности ранжирования.', 'zh': '文本相似性度量计用于数务,如抄袭检测,信息排名及释义、文本蕴涵识。 虽深学之最新进展凸显,自然语言生之中相关性,而相似性备未尽言性也。 此类似性度量之示例, n-gram skip-gram 重叠,赖输文本之切片也。 于本文中,立一新相似性度量,其灵感自DNA序比于算法中常见。 名 TextFlow 之新度量直输文本为连曲线,以单词实位序配算相似性直。 8异数集上实验检于释义,文蕴涵识名相关性见非常令人鼓舞也。', 'ga': 'Baintear úsáid as bearta cosúlachta téacs i dtascanna iolracha ar nós bradaíl a bhrath, rangú faisnéise agus aithint parafrása agus gabháil téacs. Cé gur léirigh dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí sa domhainfhoghlaim ábharthacht na múnlaí seicheamhacha i nginiúint nádúrtha teanga, ní bhaineann bearta cosúlachta reatha leas iomlán as nádúr seicheamhach na teanga. I measc samplaí de bhearta cosúlachta den sórt sin tá n-gram agus scip-gramanna forluí a bhraitheann ar shleachta ar leith de na téacsanna ionchuir. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair beart cosúlachta téacs nua spreagtha ó léiriú coitianta in algartaim ailínithe seicheamh DNA. Léiríonn an beart nua, ar a dtugtar TextFlow, péirí téacs ionchuir mar chuair leanúnacha agus úsáideann sé suíomh iarbhír na bhfocal agus meaitseáil seicheamh araon chun luach na cosúlachta a ríomh. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar 8 tacar sonraí difriúla torthaí an-spreagúil maidir le hathinsint a bhrath, gabháil le haithint téacs agus ábharthacht rangú.', 'hu': 'A szöveghasonlósági intézkedéseket több feladatban alkalmazzák, mint plágium felismerése, információrangsorolás, parafrázisok és szöveges vonatkozások felismerése. Míg a mélytanulás terén a közelmúltbeli előrehaladások rávilágítottak a szekvenciális modellek jelentőségére a természetes nyelvek létrehozásában, a meglévő hasonlósági intézkedések nem használják ki teljes mértékben a nyelv szekvenciális jellegét. Ilyen hasonlósági intézkedésekre például az n-gramm és a kihagyás-gramm átfedések, amelyek a beviteli szövegek különböző szeletein alapulnak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új szöveghasonlósági mérést, amely a DNS-szekvencia-igazítási algoritmusok közös reprezentációjából ered. A TextFlow nevű új mérés folyamatos görbékként jeleníti meg a bemeneti szövegpárokat, és a hasonlósági érték kiszámításához mind a szavak tényleges helyzetét, mind pedig a szekvencia egyezését használja. 8 különböző adatkészleten végzett kísérleteink nagyon bátorító eredményeket mutatnak a parafrázis felismerésében, a szöveges vonatkozások felismerésében és rangsorolási relevanciában.', 'el': 'Τα μέτρα ομοιότητας κειμένου χρησιμοποιούνται σε πολλαπλές εργασίες, όπως η ανίχνευση λογοκλοπής, η ταξινόμηση πληροφοριών και η αναγνώριση παραφράσεων και των κειμένων. Ενώ οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στη βαθιά μάθηση τόνισαν τη σημασία των διαδοχικών μοντέλων στη δημιουργία φυσικών γλωσσών, τα υπάρχοντα μέτρα ομοιότητας δεν αξιοποιούν πλήρως τη διαδοχική φύση της γλώσσας. Παραδείγματα τέτοιων μέτρων ομοιότητας περιλαμβάνουν την επικάλυψη των γραμμάτων n και των γραμμάτων skip, οι οποίες βασίζονται σε διακριτές φέτες των κειμένων εισαγωγής. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μέτρο ομοιότητας κειμένου εμπνευσμένο από μια κοινή αναπαράσταση σε αλγόριθμους ευθυγράμμισης ακολουθίας DNA. Το νέο μέτρο, που ονομάζεται TextFlow, αντιπροσωπεύει ζεύγη κειμένου εισαγωγής ως συνεχείς καμπύλες και χρησιμοποιεί τόσο την πραγματική θέση των λέξεων όσο και την αντιστοίχιση ακολουθίας για τον υπολογισμό της τιμής ομοιότητας. Τα πειράματά μας σε οκτώ διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν πολύ ενθαρρυντικά αποτελέσματα στην ανίχνευση παραφράσεων, την αναγνώριση κειμένων και τη συνάφεια κατάταξης.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის სინამდვილეობის მიზეზები გამოყენება რამდენიმე დავალებში, როგორც პლაგიარიზმის განახლება, ინფორმაციის რენექცია და პარაფრაზების და ტექსტულის შესახებ. მაგრამ ახალი წინასწარმოდგენები ძალიან სწავლების შესახებ მოდელების შესახებ სახელსაწარმოდგენებაში, მსგავსი სხვადასხვა მოდელების შესახებ არ გამოყენებს ენის სხვადასხვა სახე ასეთი განსხვავებულების მაგალითად n-გრამები და გადატანა გრამები, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექსტის განსხვავებული ნაწილზე იქნება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პრომენტის ტექსტის სინამდვილეობის ზომა, რომელიც საერთო გამოსახულებულია DNA-ს სინამდვილეობის ალგორიტიმში. ახალი მაზი, სახელი TextFlow, გამოყენებს ტექსტის ზოგი როგორც მუშაობელი კრიგები და გამოყენებს სიტყვების რეალური პოზაცია და წერტილების მნიშვნელობის გამოყენება. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები 8 განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენება პარაფრეზის განახლებაში, ტექსტულ მონაცემების განახლება და რე', 'it': 'Le misure di somiglianza del testo sono utilizzate in molteplici attività, come la rilevazione del plagio, la classificazione delle informazioni e il riconoscimento delle parafrase e del coinvolgimento testuale. Mentre i recenti progressi nel deep learning hanno evidenziato la rilevanza dei modelli sequenziali nella generazione del linguaggio naturale, le misure di somiglianza esistenti non sfruttano appieno la natura sequenziale del linguaggio. Esempi di tali misure di somiglianza includono sovrapposizioni di n-grammi e skip-grammi che si basano su fette distinte dei testi di input. In questo articolo presentiamo una nuova misura di somiglianza testuale ispirata da una rappresentazione comune negli algoritmi di allineamento della sequenza del DNA. La nuova misura, chiamata TextFlow, rappresenta coppie di testo in ingresso come curve continue e utilizza sia la posizione effettiva delle parole che la corrispondenza di sequenza per calcolare il valore di somiglianza. I nostri esperimenti su 8 diversi set di dati mostrano risultati molto incoraggianti nel rilevamento delle parafrasi, nel riconoscimento dei implicamenti testuali e nella rilevanza della classifica.', 'lt': 'Tekstų panašumo priemonės taikomos kelioms užduotims, pvz., plagiarizmo nustatymui, parafrazių klasifikavimui ir pripažinimui bei teksto įtraukimui. Nors pastarojo meto pažanga giliojo mokymosi srityje pabrėžė sekacinių modelių svarbą gamtinės kalbos kūrimui, esamos panašumo priemonės visiškai nepasinaudoja kalbos sekaciniu pobūdžiu. Tokių panašumo priemonių pavyzdžiai yra n-gramai ir viršijantys-gramai, kurie grindžiami atskirais įvestų tekstų gabalais. In this paper we present a novel text similarity measure inspired from a common representation in DNA sequence alignment algorithms.  Naujoji priemonė, vadinama TextFlow, reiškia įvedimo teksto poros kaip nuolatines kreives ir naudojama ir faktinė žodžių padėtis, ir seka, atitinkanti panašumą, apskaičiuojant. Mūsų 8 skirtingų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo labai skatinančius parafrazių aptikimo, tekstinio įtraukimo pripažinimo ir klasifikavimo svarbos rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Мәтін ұқсастық мерзімдері, мысалы, плагитаризм анықтау, мәліметтің реттеу және парафразтарды мен мәтіндік тіркелгенін анықтау үшін бірнеше тапсырмаларда қолданылады. Жуырдағы түсінікті оқу үлгілерін табиғи тілдерді құру үлгілерінің маңыздылығын белгілегенде, бар ұқсастық мерзімдері тілдің келесі тәуелдігін толық қолданбады. Мұндай ұқсас өлшемдерінің мысалдары n- граммалар және ендіру мәтіндерінің түрлі бөлшектеріне тәуелді граммаларды ауыстыру. Бұл қағазда, ДНК реттеу алгоритмдерінің жалпы түрлендірілген жаңа мәтіннің ұқсас өлшемін көрсетедік. Жаңа өлшемі, мәтін жылжығы деп аталатын, келтірілген мәтін екеуін тұрақты қызықты ретінде көрсетеді және сөздер мен реттердің шындығын де есептеу үшін сәйкестік мәнін қолданады. 8 түрлі деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелеріміз парафразды анықтау, мәтіндік қабылдау және реттеу маңыздылығын көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'പ്ലാജിയറിസ് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d റാങ്ങിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും പാരാഫ്രസ്സുകളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും പദാവലിയുടെ പ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ തലമുറതലമുറയില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d, നിലവ ഇതുപോലുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്ലൈറ്റുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന n- ഗ്രാമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തുല്യമായ അളവില്\u200d നിന്നും DNA സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു സാധാരണ ടെക്സ്റ്റ്\u200cഫ്ലൂ എന്ന പുതിയ അളവില്\u200d, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ടെക്സ്ഫ്ലോവ് ജോടികളെ തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന കറവകളായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന 8 വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പാരാഫ്രെയിസ് കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന് വളരെ ആശ്വാസകരമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കു', 'ms': 'Ukuran persamaan teks digunakan dalam tugas berbilang seperti pengesan plagiarisme, rangkaian maklumat dan pengenalan parafrasa dan penyelesaian teks. Sementara kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembelajaran mendalam menyatakan relevansi model urutan dalam generasi bahasa alam, tindakan persamaan yang wujud tidak sepenuhnya mengeksploitasi sifat urutan bahasa. Contoh tindakan persamaan seperti ini termasuk n-gram dan laksana-gram meliputi yang bergantung pada potongan yang berbeza teks input. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan ukuran kesamaan teks baru yang diinspirasi dari perwakilan umum dalam algoritma penyesuaian urutan DNA. Ukuran baru, dipanggil TextFlow, mewakili pasangan teks input sebagai lengkung terus menerus dan menggunakan kedua-dua kedudukan sebenar perkataan dan urutan yang sepadan untuk menghitung nilai kesamaan. Our experiments on 8 different datasets show very encouraging results in paraphrase detection, textual entailment recognition and ranking relevance.', 'mn': 'Текст тэнцүү үйл ажиллагааг олон даалгаварт хэрэглэгддэг. Жишээ нь плагитаризм олох, мэдээллийн түвшин, парафрейз болон текстуудын хөгжлийг таних. Гүн гүнзгий суралцах саяхан хөгжлийн давхар нь байгалийн хэл үеийн үеийн дараагийн загварын чухал байдлыг тодорхойлдог ч, суурь төстэй үйл ажиллагаа хэлний дараагийн байдлыг бүрэн ашиглахгүй. Эдгээр төстэй хэмжээний жишээлүүд нь n-грамм болон хариултын хэмжээсүүдийн ялгаатай хэсгүүд дээр байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ДНХ дараагийн тэгшитгэлийн алгоритмын нийтлэг харилцааны төстэй хэмжээг шинэ текст илэрхийлдэг. TextFlow гэдэг шинэ хэмжээг бичсэн текст хоёрыг үргэлжлүүлэх муруй гэж илэрхийлж, мөн адилхан утгыг тооцоолох үед үг болон дарааллын бодит байрлал хоёуланг ашигладаг. 8 өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтууд хэлбэрүүдийг олж мэдэх, текстурын хүлээн зөвшөөрөх болон үнэ цэнэтэй байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Miżuri ta’ similarità tat-test jintużaw f’diversi kompiti bħall-individwazzjoni tal-plaġjariżmu, il-klassifikazzjoni tal-informazzjoni u r-rikonoxximent tal-parafrażijiet u l-involviment testwali. Filwaqt li l-avvanzi reċenti fit-tagħlim profond enfasizzaw ir-rilevanza tal-mudelli sekwenzjali fil-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali, il-miżuri eżistenti ta’ similarità ma jisfruttawx bis-sħiħ in-natura sekwenzjali tal-lingwa. Eżempji ta’ miżuri simili bħal dawn jinkludu n-grammi u skip-grammi li jikkoinċidu li jiddependu fuq biċċiet distinti tat-testi tal-input. F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw miżura ta’ similarità ta’ test ġdid ispirata minn rappreżentazzjoni komuni f’algoritmi ta’ allinjament tas-sekwenza tad-DNA. Il-miżura l-ġdida, imsejħa TextFlow, tirrappreżenta pari tat-test tal-input bħala kurvi kontinwi u tuża kemm il-pożizzjoni attwali tal-kliem kif ukoll is-sekwenza li taqbel għall-kalkolu tal-valur ta’ similarità. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq tmien settijiet differenti ta’ dejta juru riżultati inkoraġġanti ħafna fid-detezzjoni tal-parafrażi, ir-rikonoxximent tal-involviment testwali u r-rilevanza tal-klassifikazzjoni.', 'pl': 'Miary podobieństwa tekstowego są wykorzystywane w wielu zadaniach, takich jak wykrywanie plagiatów, ranking informacji i rozpoznawanie parafraz i zawieranie tekstu. Chociaż ostatnie postępy w zakresie głębokiego uczenia się podkreślały znaczenie modeli sekwencyjnych w generowaniu języka naturalnego, istniejące środki podobieństwa nie wykorzystują w pełni sekwencyjnego charakteru języka. Przykłady takich miarów podobieństwa obejmują nakładanie się n-gramów i skip-gramów, które opierają się na odrębnych plastrach tekstów wejściowych. W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorską miarę podobieństwa tekstowego inspirowaną ze wspólnej reprezentacji w algorytmach wyrównywania sekwencji DNA. Nowa miara, zwana TextFlow, reprezentuje para tekstu wejściowego jako krzywe ciągłe i wykorzystuje zarówno rzeczywistą pozycję słów, jak i dopasowanie sekwencji do obliczenia wartości podobieństwa. Nasze eksperymenty na 8-ciu różnych zbiorach danych pokazują bardzo zachęcające wyniki w zakresie wykrywania parafraz, rozpoznawania pociągów tekstowych i znaczenia rankingowego.', 'ro': 'Măsurile de similitudine a textului sunt utilizate în mai multe sarcini, cum ar fi detectarea plagiatului, clasificarea informațiilor și recunoașterea parafrazelor și implicarea textuală. Deși progresele recente în domeniul învățării profunde au evidențiat relevanța modelelor secvențiale în generarea limbilor naturale, măsurile existente de similitudine nu exploatează pe deplin natura secvențială a limbii. Exemple de asemenea măsuri de asemenea similaritate includ suprapunerea n-grame și skip-grame care se bazează pe felii distincte ale textelor de intrare. În această lucrare prezentăm o nouă măsură de similitudine a textului inspirată dintr-o reprezentare comună în algoritmii de aliniere a secvențelor ADN. Noua măsură, numită TextFlow, reprezintă perechile de text introduse ca curbe continue și utilizează atât poziția reală a cuvintelor, cât și potrivirea secvențelor pentru a calcula valoarea similarității. Experimentele noastre pe 8 seturi de date diferite arată rezultate foarte încurajatoare în detectarea parafrazelor, recunoașterea implicațiilor textuale și relevanța clasificării.', 'no': 'Tekstliknande målar vert bruka i fleire oppgåver som oppdaging av plagiarism, informasjonsranking og gjenkjenning av parafrasar og tekstinnhalding. Mens det siste avanserte i dypt læring markerte viktigheten av sekvensiske modeller i naturspråk-generering, vil det eksisterande tilpassingsmålingane ikkje fullstendig bruka den sekvensiske naturen av språk. Eksempel på slike tilsvarande målar inneheld n-gramer og hopp over gramer som er avhengig på spesielle deler av inndata-tekstane. I denne papiret viser vi eit nytt tekstliknande mål inspirert frå ein felles representasjon i DNA-rekkjefølgjande algoritme. Den nye målet, kalla tekstFlow, representerer tekstpar som kontinuerlege kurver og brukar både den aktuelle posisjonen av ord og sekvensen som passar til å rekna ut liknande verdien. Eksperimentane våre på 8 forskjellige datasett viser svært stimulerande resultat i oppdaging av parafraser, gjenkjenning av tekstinnstillingar og rankeringsrelevans.', 'mk': 'Мерки за сличност на текстот се користат во повеќето задачи како што се детекција на плагијаризмот, рангирање на информациите и признавање на парафрази и текстуално вмешање. Иако неодамнешните напредоци во длабоко учење ја истакнаа релевантноста на секвенцијалните модели во генерацијата на природни јазици, постојните мерки на сличност не ја искористуваат целосно секвенцијалната природа на јазикот. Примери на вакви мерки на сличност вклучуваат n-грами и skip-грами прекривање кои се потпираат на различни делови од внатрешните тексти. Во овој документ претставуваме нова мерка на сличност на текстот инспирирана од заедничка претстава во алгоритмите за одредување на ДНК секвенца. Новата мерка, наречена TextFlow, претставува внесени текстови парови како континуирани криви и ја користи и вистинската позиција на зборовите и секвенцата што се совпаѓа за пресметка на сличноста вредност. Нашите експерименти на 8 различни датотеки покажуваат многу охрабрувачки резултати во детекција на парафрази, препознавање на текстуално вмешање и рангирање релевантност.', 'sr': 'Mjere sličnosti teksta se koriste u višestrukim zadatkima, poput otkrivanja plagijarizma, redoviranja informacija i prepoznavanja parafraza i tekstualnih zadataka. Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju ukazuje na važnost sekvencijskih modela u generaciji prirodnog jezika, postojeće mjere sličnosti ne koriste u potpunosti sekvencijsku prirodu jezika. Primjeri takvih mjera sličnosti uključuju n-grame i preskočite grame koje se oslanjaju na različite dijelove teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti teksta inspirisanu iz zajedničke predstave algoritma poravnanja DNK sekvence. Nova mjera, zvana TextFlow, predstavlja tekstske parove kao stalne krive i koristi i pravu poziciju reči i sekvence odgovarajuće kako bi računalo vrijednost sličnosti. Naši eksperimenti na 8 različitih podataka pokazuju vrlo ohrabrujuće rezultate u otkrivanju parafraza, prepoznavanju tekstualnih želja i povezanosti.', 'so': 'Shaqooyin kala duduwan waxaa lagu isticmaalaa qoraal isku mid ah, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka farshaxanka, warbixinta iyo aqoonsashada farshaxanka iyo qoraalka. Inta lagu jiro horumarinta waxbarashada mool dheer, waxay ka muuqatay muhiimka muuqashada soo socda qarniga afka dabiicadda ah, qaababka isku mid ahaanshaha ah ma wada baahnaan dabiicadda luqada dabadeed. Tusaale ahaan waxyaabaha isku mid ah waxaa ka mid ah n-gram iyo boob-gram, kaas oo ku xiran qaab kala duduwan qoraalka soo gelinta. In this paper we present a novel text similarity measure inspired from a common representation in DNA sequence alignment algorithms.  Xisaabta cusub ee la yidhaahdo TextFlow, wuxuu ka mid yahay labada labood oo qoraal ah sida cursor joogtada ah, wuxuuna isticmaalaa meelaha rasmiga ah ee erayada iyo isku mid ah si uu u xisaabo qiimaha siman. Imtixaankayada ku qoran 8-kooxda macluumaadka kala duduwan waxay ka muuqataa sabab aad u dhiirranaya in la ogaado baaritaanka farsamada, aqoonsashada qoraalka iyo faa’iidada kala duwan.', 'sv': 'Textliknande åtgärder används i flera uppgifter såsom plagiatdetektering, informationsrankning och erkännande av parafraser och textinnehåll. Även om de senaste framstegen inom djupinlärning belyste betydelsen av sekventiella modeller för skapandet av naturligt språk, utnyttjar befintliga likhetsåtgärder inte språkets sekventiella karaktär fullt ut. Exempel på sådana likhetsåtgärder inkluderar överlappning av n-gram och hoppa-gram som bygger på distinkta delar av inmatningstexterna. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt textliknande mått inspirerat av en gemensam representation i DNA-sekvensjusteringsalgoritmer. Det nya måttet, som kallas TextFlow, representerar inmatningstextpar som kontinuerliga kurvor och använder både ordens faktiska position och sekvensmatchning för att beräkna likhetsvärdet. Våra experiment på 8 olika datauppsättningar visar mycket uppmuntrande resultat inom parafrasdetektering, textigenkänning och rangordning.', 'ta': 'பிளாஜிரியல் கண்டுபிடிப்பு, தகவல் வரிசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் சொற்றொடர் மற்றும் நிரல் அறியும் போன்ற உரை ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் அளவுகள சமீபத்தில் ஆழமான கற்றலில் முன்னேற்றங்கள் பின்வரும் மாதிரிகளின் தொடர்பை இயல்பான மொழி தலைமுறையில் குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது, இருக்கும்  உதாரணங்களின் எடுத்துகாட்டுக்காட்டுகள் உள்ளீட்டு உரைகளின் வேறுபட்ட சட்டங்களை நம்புகின்றன n- gram மற்றும் skip- gram மூடி இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு புதிய உரையின் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் அளவை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். DNA வரிசையில் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தும்  புதிய அளவு, உரைப் பெயரிடப்பட்ட உரையின் ஜோடிகளை தொடர்ந்து வரிசைகளாக குறிக்கும் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளின் உண்மையான நிலையையும், வரிசையைய 8 வெவ்வேறு தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் மிகவும் ஆச்சரியமான விளைவுகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பது, நிரல் அறிந்து கொள்ள முடிவுகள்', 'si': 'පාළුව සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් මාර්ගය භාවිතා කරනවා වගේම ප්ලැජියාරිස්ම් හොයාගන්න, තොරතුරු රේජින් සහ පාරප්\u200dරතිකාර ස ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරභාවිතයේ අන්තිම විදියට ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට අනිවාර්ය සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයේ උදාහරණය n- ග්\u200dරාම්ස් සහ Skip- ග්\u200dරාම්ස් විශේෂ ස්ලායිස් වලින් ඇතුළත් පාළුවන් ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නියම පාළුවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් තියෙන්නේ DNA ක්\u200dරමාණ ඇල්ගොරිතම්  අළුත් මාර්ගය, textFlow කියලා නම්, ඇතුළත් පාළුව සම්බන්ධයක් පෙන්වන්න පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වර්ගයක් විදියට සඳහා වචන සහ පරි අපේ පරීක්ෂණය වෙනස් දත්ත සේට් 8 වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න, පැත්තක් අනුමුණ', 'ur': 'پیغام برابری کے اندازے بہت سے کاموں میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جیسے پیغام شناسایی، اطلاعات رقم اور پارافریز اور ٹیکسٹل متن کی شناسایی. اگرچہ اگلے پھرنے کی عمیق تعلیم کی پیشرفت نے طبیعی زبان کی نسل میں سفارشی موڈل کی اثبات کی تعریف کی ہے، موجود مثالی مثالیں زبان کی سفارشی کی اثبات کو کامل نہیں کر سکتے۔ اس طرح کی مثالیں مثالیں ان گراموں اور ان گراموں کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں جو ان وروت ٹیسٹوں کے مختلف ٹیسٹوں پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی پیغام کی مثالی اندازہ دکھائی جو DNA سطح الگوریٹم میں ایک مشترک تصویر سے الهام کی جاتی ہے۔ نوی اندازہ، یعنی TextFlow نامیدہ ہے، اینپیٹ ٹیکسٹ جوڑوں کو دائمی کروٹ کے طور پر نمایش دیتا ہے اور کلمات اور سطح کی حقیقی موقعیت کو کامپیوتر کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے. ہماری آزمائش 8 مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ میں بہت تحمل کرنے والی نتیجے پارافریز شناسایے، ٹیکسٹل حاصل کی شناسایی اور رنگ کی اثرات میں دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarida keyingi o'rganish modellarining muhimligini tabiiy tillar generatidagi muhimligini ko'rsatadi, huddi huddi o'xshash holatlarni butunlay tilning keyingi xil asosida foydalanmaydi. @ info: whatsthis Bu hujjatda biz DNA tarkibini tenglashtirish algorithidagi umumiy representing bir novel matn moslamasini koʻrsatamiz. Name 8 boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibida taʼminlovchimizmiz paraphrasni aniqlash, matn ilmiy aniqlash va chegara muhimligini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện nét giống nhau được dùng trong nhiều công việc như là phát hiện chữ cái, xếp hạng thông tin và nhận diện liệt kê và kết cấu. Trong khi những bước tiến gần đây trong việc học sâu đã nhấn mạnh tầm quan trọng của các mô-tơ sắp xếp trong sản xuất ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, các biện pháp giống nhau hiện tại không hoàn toàn tận dụng tính ngẫu nhiên của ngôn ngữ. Ví dụ về những biện pháp tương tự như thế bao gồm sự gấp bội n n- gam và hộp chứa dựa trên các phần khác nhau của văn bản nhập. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu một thước đo nét giống nhau mới lấy cảm hứng từ một đại diện chung trong thuật toán định vị dãy DNA. The new thước, called TextFlow, đại diện cho các chữ nhập đôi như những đường cong liên tục và dùng cả độ chính của các từ và dãy khớp để tính giá trị tương tự. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi trên tám bộ dữ liệu khác nhau cho thấy kết quả rất khả quan trong việc phát hiện liệt kê, nhận diện kết cấu và xếp hạng liên quan.', 'bg': 'Мерките за сходство на текста се използват при множество задачи като откриване на плагиатство, класиране на информацията и разпознаване на парафрази и текстово обвързване. Макар последните постижения в областта на дълбокото учене да подчертаят значението на последователните модели при генерирането на естествени езици, съществуващите мерки за сходство не експлоатират напълно последователния характер на езика. Примери за такива мерки за сходство включват припокриване на n-грамове и пропуснати грамове, които разчитат на отделни парчета от входните текстове. В тази статия представяме нова мярка за сходство на текста, вдъхновена от общо представяне в алгоритми за подравняване на ДНК последователности. Новата мярка, наречена Текстов поток, представлява входните текстови двойки като непрекъснати криви и използва както действителната позиция на думите, така и съвпадението на последователността, за да изчисли стойността на сходството. Нашите експерименти с 8 различни набора от данни показват много окуражаващи резултати в откриването на парафрази, разпознаването на текстови обвързвания и класирането.', 'da': 'Tekstlignende foranstaltninger anvendes i flere opgaver såsom plagiatdetektion, informationsplacering og anerkendelse af parafraser og tekstinddragelse. Mens de seneste fremskridt inden for dyb læring fremhævede relevansen af sekventielle modeller i forbindelse med generering af naturligt sprog, udnytter eksisterende lignende foranstaltninger ikke fuldt ud sprogets sekventielle karakter. Eksempler på sådanne lignende foranstaltninger omfatter overlapning af n-gram og spring-gram, der er afhængige af forskellige dele af input tekster. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny tekst lighedsmåling inspireret af en fælles repræsentation i DNA sekvensjusteringsalgoritmer. Det nye mål, kaldet TextFlow, repræsenterer input tekstpar som kontinuerlige kurver og bruger både ordenes faktiske position og sekvensmatchning til at beregne lighedsværdien. Vores eksperimenter med 8 forskellige datasæt viser meget opmuntrende resultater inden for parafrasedetektion, tekstgenkendelse og rangering relevans.', 'nl': 'Tekstvergelijkingsmaatregelen worden gebruikt bij meerdere taken zoals plagiaatdetectie, informatieranking en herkenning van parafrases en tekstuele implicatie. Hoewel recente vooruitgang op het gebied van deep learning de relevantie van sequentiële modellen voor het genereren van natuurlijke talen benadrukte, maken bestaande overeenkomsten niet volledig gebruik van het sequentiële karakter van taal. Voorbeelden van dergelijke vergelijkingsmaatregelen zijn overlapping van n-grammen en skip-grammen, die afhankelijk zijn van afzonderlijke stukken van de invoerteksten. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe tekstvergelijkingsmeter geïnspireerd op een gemeenschappelijke representatie in DNA sequentie alignment algoritmes. De nieuwe maat, genaamd TextFlow, vertegenwoordigt invoertekstparen als continue curves en gebruikt zowel de werkelijke positie van de woorden als de volgorde matching om de gelijkeniswaarde te berekenen. Onze experimenten met acht verschillende datasets tonen zeer bemoedigende resultaten op het gebied van parafrasedetectie, tekstuele implicatierekening en rangschikking relevantie.', 'de': 'Text채hnlichkeitsmessungen werden in mehreren Aufgaben wie Plagiatserkennung, Informationsranking und Erkennung von Paraphrasen und textlicher Umsetzung eingesetzt. W채hrend die j체ngsten Fortschritte im Deep Learning die Relevanz sequenzieller Modelle f체r die Generierung nat체rlicher Sprachen unterstrichen haben, nutzen bestehende 횆hnlichkeitsma횩nahmen die sequenzielle Natur der Sprache nicht vollst채ndig aus. Beispiele f체r solche 횆hnlichkeitsma횩e sind 횥berlappungen von n-Grammen und Skip-Grammen, die auf unterschiedlichen Abschnitten der Eingabetexte beruhen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Text채hnlichkeitsma횩 vor, das von einer gemeinsamen Darstellung in DNA-Sequenz-Alignment-Algorithmen inspiriert ist. Das neue Ma횩, TextFlow genannt, stellt Eingabetextpaare als kontinuierliche Kurven dar und verwendet sowohl die tats채chliche Position der W철rter als auch den Sequenzabgleich, um den 횆hnlichkeitswert zu berechnen. Unsere Experimente an acht verschiedenen Datens채tzen zeigen sehr ermutigende Ergebnisse in der Paraphrasenerkennung, Texterkennung und Rankingrelevanz.', 'hr': 'Mjere sličnosti teksta se koriste u višestrukim zadatkima poput otkrivanja plagijarizma, redoviranja informacija i prepoznavanja parafraza i tekstualnog zadatka. Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju ukazuje na važnost sekvencijskih modela u generaciji prirodnog jezika, postojeće mjere sličnosti ne potpuno iskorištavaju sekvencijsku prirodu jezika. Primjeri takvih mjera sličnosti uključuju n-grame i preskočite grame koje se oslanjaju na različite dijelove teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti teksta inspirisanu iz zajedničke predstave algoritma poravnanja DNK sekvencije. Nova mjera, zvana TextFlow, predstavlja ulazne tekstne parove kao stalne krive i koristi i pravu poziciju riječi i sekvence odgovarajuće kako bi računali vrijednost sličnosti. Naši eksperimenti na 8 različitih podataka pokazuju vrlo ohrabrujuće rezultate u otkrivanju parafraza, prepoznavanju tekstualne želje i povezanosti na ranking.', 'id': 'Ukuran kesamaan teks digunakan dalam beberapa tugas seperti deteksi plagiarisme, peringkat informasi dan pengakuan parafrasa dan penyelesaian teks. Sementara kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembelajaran mendalam menunjukkan relevansi model sekuensi dalam generasi bahasa alami, tindakan persamaan yang ada tidak sepenuhnya mengeksploitasi sifat sekuensi bahasa. Contoh tindakan similaritas seperti itu termasuk n-gram dan skip-gram overlap yang bergantung pada potongan yang berbeda dari teks input. Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan ukuran persamaan teks baru yang diinspirasikan dari representation umum dalam algoritma penyesuaian urutan DNA. Ukuran baru, disebut TextFlow, mewakili pasangan teks input sebagai kurva terus menerus dan menggunakan kedua posisi sebenar kata-kata dan urutan yang cocok untuk menghitung nilai kesamaan. Eksperimen kami pada 8 set data yang berbeda menunjukkan hasil yang sangat mendorong dalam deteksi parafrasa, pengenalan teks dan relevansi rangkaian.', 'fa': 'اندازه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی متن در کارهای متعدد مثل شناسایی پیژاریسم، رشته\u200cسازی اطلاعات و شناسایی پارافریسم و دسترسی متن استفاده می\u200cشوند. در حالی که پیشرفت های اخیر در یادگیری عمیق ارتباط مدلهای سفارشی در نسل زبان طبیعی را نشان داد، اندازه های شبیه\u200cانگیز موجود به طور کامل طبیعت سفارشی زبان را استفاده نمی\u200cکند. مثال اندازه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیزی شامل n-گرم\u200cها و گرم\u200cهای پرتاب\u200cگرم\u200cها است که بر قطعه\u200cهای متفاوتی از متن وارد می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ ما یک اندازه شبیه\u200cسازی متن رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک نمایش مشترک در الگوریتم\u200cهای تنظیم\u200cسازی DNA الگوریتم است. اندازه جدید، به نام TextFlow، جفت متن ورودی را به عنوان پرده\u200cهای پایداری نمایش می\u200cدهد و از موقعیت واقعی کلمات و ترکیب متفاوت برای محاسبه ارزش شبیه استفاده می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف، نتیجه\u200cهای بسیار تشخیص\u200cدهنده\u200cای در تشخیص عبارت، شناسایی متن\u200cآوری و مرتبه\u200cای را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': 'Metin meňzeşlik ölçüleri birnäçe görerde ullanýar Ýakyndaky gaty öwrenmek üçin önümleri tebigy dil döredilişinde nähili nusgalaryň wajyplygyny ýagtylaşdyryp bilen meňzeş meňzeşlik düzümleri çykarmaýar. Munuň ýaly çykyş ölçümleriniň mysal görnöşi n-gramleriň we belleşmeleriniň üstüne gollaýar. Bu kagyzda biz DNA dizisi çyzygynda örän bir metin meňzeşlikli ölçüsi görkeýäris. Täze ölçü, Metin Flow adlanan, giriş çiftlerini dağıtmak üçin gösterir we sözlerin we sıralamak değerini hesaplamak üçin elimizde tutan durumyny hem de ullar. Bizim 8 farklı veri setirlerinde deneylerimiz parafrazleri tanamak, metin tanamak we derejlenmek üçin örän töwesli netijeleri görkezýär.', 'af': "Teks gelykenis maat word gebruik in veelvuldige opdragte soos plagiërisme opdekking, inligting rangering en herkening van parafrase en tekstuul aanhouding. Terwyl onlangse vorderings in diep leer verlig het die relevante van sekwensiele modele in natuurlike taal generasie, bestaande gelykenis-maatskappe het nie volledig die sekwensiele natuur van taal uitgebruik nie. Voorbeelde van sodanige gelykenis maatskappe insluit n-grame en skip-grame oorvloei wat op skiedende slippe van die invoer teks vertrou word. In hierdie papier voorsien ons 'n nuwe teks gelykbaarheid maat wat inspireer is van 'n gemeenskaplike voorstelling in DNA sekwensiealignment algoritme. Die nuwe maat, genoem TextFlow, verteenwoordig invoer teks paar as voortdurende kurves en gebruik beide die werklike posisie van die woorde en volgorde ooreenstemmende om die gelykheidswaarde te bereken. Ons eksperimente op 8 verskillende datastelle vertoon baie verstandige resultate in parafrase-opdekking, teksverking-herkening en ranking-relevansie.", 'sq': 'Masat e ngjashmërisë së tekstit përdoren në detyra të shumta të tilla si zbulimi i plagiarisë, renditja e informacionit dhe njohja e parafrazave dhe përfshirja tekstuale. Ndërsa përparimet e fundit në mësimin e thellë theksuan rëndësinë e modeleve sekuenciale në gjenerimin natyror të gjuhës, masat ekzistuese të ngjashmërisë nuk shfrytëzojnë plotësisht natyrën sekuenciale të gjuhës. Shembujt e masave të tilla të ngjashmërisë përfshijnë n-gram dhe skip-gram mbishtypje që mbështeten n ë copa të ndryshme të teksteve të hyrjes. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim një masë të ngjashme teksti të ri frymëzuar nga një përfaqësim i përbashkët në algoritmet e renditjes së ADN-së. Masa e re, e quajtur TextFlow, përfaqëson çifte teksti të hyrjes si kurva të vazhdueshme dhe përdor si pozicionin aktual të fjalëve dhe sekuencën që përputhen për të llogaritur vlerën e ngjashmërisë. Eksperimentet tona në 8 grupe të dhënash të ndryshme tregojnë rezultate shumë inkurajuese në zbulimin e parafrazave, njohjen tekstuale të përfshirjes dhe rëndësinë e renditjes.', 'hy': 'Text similarity measures are used in multiple tasks such as plagiarism detection, information ranking and recognition of paraphrases and textual entailment.  Մինչդեռ խորը ուսումնասիրության վերջին զարգացումները նշանակում էին հաջորդական մոդելների կարևորությունը բնական լեզվի ստեղծման ընթացքում, գոյություն ունեցող նմանության չափումները լիովին չեն օգտագործում լեզվի հաջորդական բնույ Նմանատիպ չափումների օրինակները ներառում են n-գրամը և բաց-գրամը, որոնք հիմնված են ներդրված տեքստների տարբեր մասերի վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր տեքստի նմանության չափում, ոգեշնչված ԴՆԹ-ի հաջորդականության հաղորդակցման ալգորիթմների ընդհանուր ներկայացումից: Նոր չափումը, որը կոչվում է TextFlow, ներմուծման տեքստի զույգեր ներմուծման համար ներմուծված է որպես անընդհատ կորեր և օգտագործում է բառերի իրական դիրքը և հաջորդականությունը, որոնք համապատասխանում են նման արժեքի հաշվարկելու համար: Մեր 8 տարբեր տվյալների փորձարկումները շատ խրախուսափելի արդյունքներ են ցույց տալիս պարաֆրեզների հայտնաբերման, տեքստային ներգրավման ճանաչելու և դասակարգման կարևորության մեջ:', 'ko': '텍스트 유사성 도량은 표절 검출, 정보 정렬, 해석 식별과 텍스트 함축 등 여러 가지 임무에 사용된다.심도 있는 학습의 최신 진전은 자연 언어 생성 중의 순서 모델의 상관성을 두드러지게 했지만 기존의 유사성 도량은 언어의 순서성을 충분히 이용하지 못했다.이런 유사성 도량의 예는 n-gram과skip-gram이 중첩되어 텍스트를 입력하는 서로 다른 부분에 의존한다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 텍스트 유사성 도량을 제시했는데 그 영감은 DNA 서열 비교 알고리즘에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 표현에서 비롯되었다.새로운 메트릭을 TextFlow라고 하는데, 입력한 텍스트 쌍을 연속 곡선으로 표시하고, 단어의 실제 위치와 시퀀스를 일치시켜 유사도 값을 계산한다.우리가 8개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에서 실시한 실험은 해석 검측, 텍스트 함축 식별과 관련성 정렬에 있어 고무적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Hatua zinazofanana na maandishi yanatumiwa katika kazi mbalimbali kama vile kutambua vifaa vya kijamii, taarifa zinazopangwa na kutambua misemo na maarifa yanayofahamika. Wakati maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika elimu ya kina yalionyesha umuhimu wa mifano ya baadae katika kizazi cha lugha asili, hatua zinazofanana na zinazopo hazitumia mazingira ya lugha. Mfano wa hatua kama hizo ni pamoja na vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vinavyotegemea vipande tofauti vya maandishi. Katika gazeti hili tunaweka hatua ya maandishi ya kitabu inayofanana na vifaa vinavyohamishwa kutoka kwa uwakilishi wa kawaida katika algorithi za usambazaji wa DNA. Hatua mpya, inayoitwa TextFlow, inawakilisha wanandoa wa maandishi kama viwanja vinavyoendelea na kutumia nafasi halisi ya maneno na mfululizo unaohusiana na kuhesabu thamani sawa. Majaribio yetu kwenye seti 8 tofauti za taarifa zinaonyesha matokeo yanayohamasisha sana ya kutambua maneno, kutambua maarifa ya msingi na umuhimu mkubwa.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎች በተለያዩ ስራ ውስጥ እንደተጨማሪው ማግኘት፣ መረጃ ማዘጋጀት እና የጽሑፍ ማውቀት እና ማውቀት በተለያዩ ስራ ይጠቀቃሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው የጥልቅ ትምህርት ግንኙነት በተለየ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ውስጥ የግንኙነቱን የሞዴል ግንኙነት አስታውቆታል፣ የአገኘው ብጤነት ሥርዓቶች የቋንቋውን ፍጥረት በሙሉ አይጠቅሙም፡፡ እንደነዚህ በሚያሳየው መጠቀሚያ ምሳሌዎች በ-ግራም እና የክፍለ ቅርጽ መክፈቻ ላይ በተለየ ጥያቄ ጽሑፎች ላይ የሚታመኑ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም በ DNA ክፍል አካሎጂ ውስጥ በተለየ ትክክለኛ የጽሑፍ ብጤት መስመር እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የTextFlow የሚባል አዲስ መጠን የinput text pairs as continuous curves የሚያስተካክል እና ቃሎችን እና sequence ለጥያቄ መጠን እንዲቆጠር ይጠቅማል። የ8 ልዩ ዳታተሮች ፈተናዎቻችን የፊደሎችን ግንኙነት፣ የጽሑፍ ማወቅ እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የሚያሳየው ፍሬዎችን የሚያደናግፍ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'Text similarity measures are used in multiple tasks such as plagiarism detection, information ranking and recognition of paraphrases and textual entailment.  যদিও সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে গভীর শিক্ষার উন্নয়নগুলোতে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রজন্মের পরবর্তী মডেলের প্রভাব উল্লেখ করেছে, তবে বিদ্যমান সম এই ধরনের সমতামূলক পদক্ষেপের উদাহরণ হচ্ছে এন-গ্রাম এবং স্কিপ- গ্রামের উপর আড়াল করা যায় যা ইনপুট ট টেক্সটের বিভিন্ন ধরনের উপর ন এই পত্রিকায় আমরা ডিএনএ সেকেন্সের আলগরিদমের একটি সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিত্ব থেকে অনুপ্রাণিত একটি উপন্যাসের লেখার সমতুল্য মাপ নতুন মাপ, যার নাম টেক্সটফ্লু, ইনপুট টের লেখা জোড়ার প্রতিনিধিত্বিত করে অনলাইন কার্ভ হিসেবে এবং একই মান গণনা করার জন্য শব্দ ও সেকেন ৮টি ভিন্ন ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে প্যারাফ্রেস আবিষ্কার, টেক্চুয়াল বিজ্ঞানের স্বীকৃতি এবং রেঞ্জিং', 'ca': "Les mesures de similitud de text es fan servir en múltiples tasques, com la detecció del plagiarisme, la classificació de la informació i el reconeixement de parafrases i l'involucració textual. Mentre els avanços recents en l'aprenentatge profund van destacar la pertinencia de models seqüencials en la generació de llenguatges naturals, les mesures de similitud existents no explotan plenament la naturalesa seqüencial del llenguatge. Els exemples d'aquestes mesures de similitud inclouen n-grams i skip-grams sovrapposicions que es basan en fragments distints dels textos d'entrada. In this paper we present a novel text similarity measure inspired from a common representation in DNA sequence alignment algorithms.  La nova mesura, anomenada TextFlow, representa parelles de text d'entrada com corbes contínues i utilitza tant la posició real de les paraules com la seqüència que coincideix per calcular el valor de similitud. Els nostres experiments en 8 conjunts de dades mostren resultats molt encorajadors en la detecció de parafrases, el reconeixement de l'involucració textual i la relevància de la classificació.", 'cs': 'Měřítka podobnosti textu se používají při mnoha úkolech, jako je detekce plagiátů, hodnocení informací a rozpoznávání parafrází a textových implikací. Zatímco nedávné pokroky v hlubokém učení zdůraznily význam sekvenčních modelů pro generování přirozeného jazyka, stávající opatření podobnosti plně nevyužívají sekvenční povahy jazyka. Příklady takových podobnostních měřítek zahrnují překrývání n-gramů a skip-gramů, které se opírají o odlišné řezy vstupních textů. V tomto článku představujeme nové měřítko podobnosti textu inspirované běžnou reprezentací v algoritmech zarovnání sekvencí DNA. Nová měřítka, nazvaná TextFlow, představuje vstupní textové páry jako kontinuální křivky a používá k výpočtu hodnoty podobnosti jak skutečnou polohu slov, tak odpovídající sekvenci. Naše experimenty na osmi různých datových sadách ukazují velmi povzbuzující výsledky v detekci parafráze, rozpoznávání textových implikací a hodnocení relevance.', 'et': 'Teksti sarnasuse meetmeid kasutatakse mitmes ülesandes, nagu plagiaadi tuvastamine, teabe järjestamine ning parafraaside ja tekstilise kaasamise tunnustamine. Kuigi hiljutised edusammud sügavõppes rõhutasid järjestikuste mudelite olulisust looduskeele genereerimisel, ei kasuta olemasolevad sarnasuse meetmed täielikult ära keele järjestikust olemust. Selliste sarnasuse meetmete näiteks on n-grammide ja vahelejätmise grammide kattuvus, mis põhineb sisendtekstide erinevatel lõikudel. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset teksti sarnasuse mõõdet, mis on inspireeritud ühisest representatsioonist DNA jada joondamise algoritmides. Uus mõõde, mida nimetatakse TextFlow, esindab sisendtekstipaare pidevate kõveratena ning kasutab sarnasuse väärtuse arvutamiseks nii sõnade tegelikku asukohta kui ka järjestuse sobitamist. Meie eksperimendid kaheksa erineva andmekogumiga näitavad väga julgustavaid tulemusi parafraaside tuvastamisel, tekstilise kaasatuse tuvastamisel ja järjestuse asjakohasusel.', 'fi': 'Tekstin samankaltaisuuden mittareita käytetään useissa tehtävissä, kuten plagioinnin havaitsemisessa, tiedon luokittelussa sekä parafraasien ja tekstien liittämisen tunnistamisessa. Vaikka syväoppimisen viimeaikainen kehitys on tuonut esiin peräkkäisten mallien merkityksen luonnollisen kielen tuottamisessa, nykyisissä samankaltaisuustoimenpiteissä ei hyödynnetä täysin kielen peräkkäisyyttä. Esimerkkejä tällaisista samankaltaisuustoimenpiteistä ovat n-grammien ja ohitettujen grammien päällekkäisyydet, jotka perustuvat syöttötekstien erillisiin viipaleisiin. Tässä työssä esittelemme uuden tekstin samankaltaisuuden mittarin, joka on saanut inspiraationsa DNA-sekvenssin tasausalgoritmien yhteisestä esittämisestä. Uusi mitta, nimeltään TextFlow, edustaa syöttötekstipareja jatkuvina käyreinä ja käyttää sekä sanojen todellista sijaintia että järjestystäsmäämää samankaltaisuusarvon laskemiseen. Kokeemme kahdeksalla eri aineistolla osoittavat erittäin rohkaisevia tuloksia parafraasien tunnistamisessa, tekstien merkittävyyden tunnistamisessa ja luokittelun relevanssissa.', 'az': 'Mətn similarlığı ölçüləri, plagiarism keşfini, məlumat səviyyəsi və parafrazlərin tanıması kimi çoxlu işlərdə istifadə edilir. Yaxınlıq öyrənməsində son öyrənmələr təbiətli dil nəsilində seçən modellərin çoxluğunu aydınlaşdırdıqları halda, mevcut similik ölçüləri dillərin sonrakı təbiətini tamamilə istifadə etməz. Bütün bənzər ölçülərin n ümunələri n-gramlərin və giriş mətnlərin müxtəlif parçalarına dayanır. Bu kağızda yeni mətn oxuması ölçüsünü göstəririk, DNA sıralama algoritminin ortaq göstərilməsindən ilham alır. Yeni ölçü, TextFlow adlı, giriş mətn çiftlərini sürəkli iplər kimi göstərir və sözlərin və sıralıqların hər ikisini də istifadə edir ki, bənzər qiyməti hesablamaq üçün istifadə edir. Bizim 8 müxtəlif verilən qurğularda təcrübələrimiz parafrazlərin keşfini, məktub təşkil etməyi və dərəcələrinin bağlılığını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Mjere sličnosti teksta se koriste u višestrukim zadatkima poput otkrivanja plagijarizma, redoviranja informacija i prepoznavanja parafraza i tekstualnog zadatka. Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju ukazuje na važnost sekvencijskih modela u generaciji prirodnog jezika, postojeće mjere sličnosti ne potpuno iskorištavaju sekvencijsku prirodu jezika. Primjeri takvih mjera sličnosti uključuju n-grame i preskočite grame koje se oslanjaju na različite dijelove teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti teksta inspirisanu iz zajedničke predstave algoritma poravnanja DNK sekvence. Nova mjera, zvana TextFlow, predstavlja ulazne tekstne parove kao stalne krive i koristi i pravu poziciju riječi i sekvence odgovarajuće kako bi računalo vrijednost sličnosti. Naši eksperimenti na 8 različitih podataka pokazuju vrlo ohrabrujuće rezultate u otkrivanju parafraza, prepoznavanju tekstualne želje i povezanosti na ranking.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan tab Genjer-genjer diunting langkung wigat nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe model sing berarti dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan layar, meh kuwi nggawe gerakan sampeyan éwé ngelarang langak. Ballot Nang pepulan iki, kita sampeyan panjenengan kelangan seneng pisan kelangan sampeyan anyar luwih apik nggambar kelangan DNS Text Flow, input method Awak dhéwé éntuk ning 8 dataset sing dipun dadi iki dadi, dadi kapan pawaran langkung dadi, kawat titimbang pancen layang, tekan kelangan seneng pisan lan kelangan', 'ha': "Ana amfani da shiryoyin matsayi masu daidaita cikin aikin masu yawa kamar gane na plagiti, masu yin rangi da takarda da gane na fassarar da kuma masu sani na rubutu. A lokacin da masu ƙari da aka ƙara a cikin karanta na ƙari ya ƙayyade muhimu wa masu motsi masu daban cikin zayen harshen asimi, da kuma da takwara masu daidaita, ba su cika amfani da mazaunin lugha na daban. Misãlai na kamakon wannan, akwai fancy na n-gram da skip-gram da za'a haɗa rufe su da kuma sunã dõgara da zane-zane-zane cikin matsayin injistan. In this paper we present a novel text similarity measure inspired from a common representation in DNA sequence alignment algorithms.  Kibaindin da aka sanar Textflow, yana mai ƙayyade matsayin ayuka biyu kamar curve continuous kuma yana amfani da duk wuri na gaske da matsayin da tsohon don ya yi ƙidãya kimar daidai. Kayan jarrabayanmu a kan zane-zane 8 dabam-daban na nuna matsala mai farin ciki, ganin littafin da aka sani na littãfi da yana da muhimmi.", 'he': 'אמצעי דמיון טקסט משתמשים במשימות רבות, כמו זיהוי פלג\'יאריזם, מעמד מידע והזיהוי של פראפרסמות והקשר טקסטלי. למרות שההתקדמות האחרונות בתלמידה עמוקה הרמזו את הרלוונטיות של דוגמנים רצופיים בדור שפת טבעית, אמצעי דמיון קיימים לא מנצלים באופן מלא את טבע רצופי השפה. דוגמאות של מדידות דומה כאלה כוללות n-גרם ודלג-גרם כפילה שמתלויים בחתיכות בודדות של טקסטים הכניסה. בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים מדד דמיון טקסט חדש שמושרא ממצגת משותפת באלגוריטמים של רצף הדנ"א. המידד החדש, שנקרא TextFlow, מייצג זוגות טקסט כניסה כקווים ממשיכים ושתמש גם במיקום האמיתי של המילים וברצף מתאים לחישוב את ערך הדומה. הניסויים שלנו ב-8 קבוצות נתונים שונות מראים תוצאות מעודדות מאוד בזיהוי מונחים, זיהוי התקשורת טקסטלית ורלוונטיה.', 'sk': 'Merila podobnosti besedila se uporabljajo pri več nalogah, kot so odkrivanje plagiata, razvrščanje informacij in prepoznavanje parafraz in besedilne posledice. Medtem ko je nedavni napredek na področju globokega učenja poudaril pomen zaporednih modelov pri ustvarjanju naravnega jezika, obstoječi ukrepi za podobnost ne izkoriščajo v celoti zaporedne narave jezika. Primeri takšnih ukrepov podobnosti vključujejo prekrivanje n-gramov in preskočenih gramov, ki se opira na različne rezine vhodnega besedila. V prispevku predstavljamo novo merilo podobnosti besedila, navdihnjeno iz skupne reprezentacije v algoritmih poravnave zaporedja DNK. Nova merila, imenovana TextFlow, predstavlja vhodne pare besedila kot neprekinjene krivulje in uporablja dejanski položaj besed in ujemanje zaporedja za izračun vrednosti podobnosti. Naši eksperimenti na osmih različnih naborih podatkov kažejo zelo spodbudne rezultate pri odkrivanju parafraz, prepoznavanju besedilnih posledic in relevantnosti razvrščanja.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ཡོད། འཕེལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་གི་མིང་ཁག་ཅིག་མཐོང་ནི་ཕལ་རིམ། དཔེར་ན། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དག་ནི་n-grams དང་skip-grams overlap རྣམ་པ་ཡིན་གྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་ཀྱི་བགོ་རིམ་ཡི་གེ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་ཚིག་ཡི་གེ་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུན་རིམ་གཞན་ཞིག་སྟོན་པའི་མཐུན་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད། The new measure, called TextFlow, represents input text pairs as continuous curves and uses both the actual position of the words and sequence matching to compute the similarity value. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཚང་མ་འདྲ་བའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་མཐོང་ནི་མཐོང་ཚིག་རྣམས་མཐོང་ནི་མི་རྣམས་པས།'}
{'en': 'Friendships, Rivalries, and Trysts : Characterizing Relations between Ideas in Texts', 'ar': 'الصداقات والمنافسات والتريستس: توصيف العلاقات بين الأفكار في النصوص', 'fr': 'Amitiés, rivalités et rendez-vous galants\xa0: caractériser les relations entre les idées dans les textes', 'pt': 'Amizades, Rivalidades e Encontros: Caracterizando Relações entre Ideias em Textos', 'es': 'Amistades, rivalidades y citas: caracterización de las relaciones entre ideas en los textos', 'ja': '友情、ライバル関係、そして試み：テキスト内のアイデア間の関係を特徴付ける', 'zh': '友谊,争和尝试:表征文本中意思相关', 'hi': 'दोस्ती, प्रतिद्वंद्विता, और प्रयास: ग्रंथों में विचारों के बीच संबंधों की विशेषता', 'ru': 'Дружба, соперничество и попытки: характеристика отношений между идеями в текстах', 'ga': 'Cairdeas, Iomaíocht, agus Iarrachtaí: Caidreamh a Thréithríonn Smaointe i dTéacsanna', 'hu': 'Barátságok, riváliságok és próbák: Az ötletek közötti kapcsolatok jellemzése a szövegekben', 'it': 'Amicizie, rivalità e tentativi: caratterizzare le relazioni tra idee nei testi', 'el': 'Φιλίες, αντιπαλότητες και δοκιμές: Χαρακτηρισμός των σχέσεων μεταξύ ιδεών στα κείμενα', 'ka': 'მეგობრები', 'ms': 'Persahabatan, Rivalry, dan Trysts: Menakrifkan Hubungan antara Idea dalam Teks', 'kk': 'Мәтіндерде идеялар арасындағы қасиеттерді таңдау', 'mk': 'Friendships, Rivalries, and Trysts: Characterizing Relations between Ideas in Texts', 'ml': 'സുഹൃത്തുക്കള്\u200d, റിവാലികള്\u200d, ശ്രമിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d: ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളിലെ ഐഡിയകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്ടിലാക', 'mt': 'Ħbieb, Rivalriji, u Tristi: Il-karatterizzazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet bejn l-Ideat fit-Testi', 'lt': 'Draugystės, rivalijos ir bandytojai: idėjų santykių tekste apibūdinimas', 'pl': 'Przyjaźnie, rywalizacja i próby: Charakteryzowanie relacji pomiędzy pomysłami w tekstach', 'ro': 'Prietenii, rivalități și încercări: caracterizarea relațiilor dintre idei în texte', 'sr': 'Prijateljstva, Rivalije i Trysts: karakterizirajući odnose između ideja u tekstu', 'si': 'යාළුවන්, රිවලරිස්, සහ උත්සාහ කරනවා: පාළුවන් අතර අදහස් සම්බන්ධය', 'no': 'Vennskap, ryvarer og prøver: Teiknar relasjonar mellom idear i tekst', 'so': 'Saaxiibada, Rivalries iyo jardiinooyinka: Characterizing xiriirka u dhexeeya fikrada qoraalka', 'sv': 'Vänskap, rivaliteter och försök: Karakterisera relationer mellan idéer i texter', 'ta': 'Friendships, Rivalries, and Trysts: Characterizing Relations between Ideas in Texts', 'mn': 'Найзууд, Ривалери, Тристос: Текст дээрх санаануудын хоорондын харилцаа', 'ur': 'دوستی, Rivalries, and Trysts: Ideas in Text', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tình bạn, Đối thủ, và các điểm: Ký tự Quan hệ giữa các ý tưởng trong Văn bản', 'bg': 'Приятелства, съперничества и опити: характеризиране на отношенията между идеите в текстовете', 'da': 'Venskaber, rivaliteter og forsøg: Karakterisering af relationer mellem idéer i tekster', 'id': 'Persahabatan, Rivalry, dan Trysts: Menentukan Hubungan antara Ide dalam Teks', 'hr': 'Prijateljstvo, rijeke i pokušaji: karakterizirajući odnose između ideja u tekstu', 'nl': 'Vriendschappen, rivaliteiten en trysts: Relaties tussen ideeën in teksten karakteriseren', 'de': 'Freundschaften, Rivalitäten und Versuche: Beziehungen zwischen Ideen in Texten charakterisieren', 'ko': '우정, 경쟁과 밀회: 텍스트에서 사상 간의 관계 특징', 'sw': 'Marafiki, Rivalries, na Jaribio: Kuhisi uhusiano kati ya mawazo katika Maandishi', 'tr': 'Dostlar, Rivaliýalar we Samaglaýyşlar: Metinler ideýalaryň arasynda karakterlere alýan', 'fa': 'دوستی، رودخانه\u200cها و امتحان\u200cها: تعریف کردن رابطه بین ایده\u200cها در متن\u200cها', 'am': 'ወዳጆች፣ ፈረላጊዎች እና ድምፅ፤ በአእምሮ መካከል በጽሑፍ መካከል ግንኙነት የሚያደርግ', 'hy': 'Ընկերություններ, հակամարտություններ և փորձեր: Տեքստում գտնվող գաղափարների միջև հարաբերությունները', 'bn': 'বন্ধুত্ব, রিভালেরি এবং চেষ্টা করছে: টেক্সটের আইডিয়ার মধ্যে চিহ্নিত সম্পর্ক', 'az': 'Dostlar, Rivalries v…ô Trysts: M…ôtnl…ôrd…ô ideyalar arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükiler karakteriz…ôy…ô qoyur', 'bs': 'Prijateljstva, Rivalries i Trysts: karakterizirajući odnose između ideja u tekstu', 'cs': 'Přátelství, soupeření a snahy: charakterizování vztahů mezi myšlenkami v textech', 'af': 'Vrienskappe, Rivalries en Probysters: Karakteriseer Relasies tussen Idees in Teks', 'et': 'Sõprused, konkurendid ja trüstid: ideede suhete iseloomustamine tekstides', 'fi': 'Ystävyys, kilpailu ja trystit: ideoiden välisten suhteiden luonnehtiminen teksteissä', 'sq': 'Miqësitë, Rivalritë dhe Përpjekësit: Duke karakterizuar marrëdhëniet midis Ideve në Tekst', 'ca': 'Friendships, Rivalries, and Trysts: Characterizing Relations between Ideas in Texts', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ידידות, רייברליות ומנסות: מאפיינים מערכות יחסים בין רעיונות בטקסטים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prijateljstva, tekmovanja in poskusi: značilnost odnosov med idejami v besedilih', 'bo': 'མཛའ་འབྲུག་དང་འཛོམས་པུད་དང་བརྩོན་རིས། ཡིག་གེ་ནང་གི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Understanding how ideas relate to each other is a fundamental question in many domains, ranging from intellectual history to public communication. Because ideas are naturally embedded in texts, we propose the first framework to systematically characterize the relations between ideas based on their occurrence in a corpus of documents, independent of how these ideas are represented. Combining two statisticscooccurrence within documents and prevalence correlation over timeour approach reveals a number of different ways in which ideas can cooperate and compete. For instance, two ideas can closely track each other’s prevalence over time, and yet rarely cooccur, almost like a cold war scenario. We observe that pairwise cooccurrence and prevalence correlation exhibit different distributions. We further demonstrate that our approach is able to uncover intriguing relations between ideas through in-depth case studies on news articles and research papers.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم كيفية ارتباط الأفكار ببعضها البعض سؤالًا أساسيًا في العديد من المجالات ، بدءًا من التاريخ الفكري إلى الاتصال العام. نظرًا لأن الأفكار مضمنة بشكل طبيعي في النصوص ، فإننا نقترح الإطار الأول لتوصيف العلاقات بين الأفكار بشكل منهجي بناءً على حدوثها في مجموعة من الوثائق ، بغض النظر عن كيفية تمثيل هذه الأفكار. الجمع بين إحصائين - التواجد داخل المستندات وعلاقة الانتشار بمرور الوقت - يكشف نهجنا عن عدد من الطرق المختلفة التي يمكن للأفكار من خلالها التعاون والتنافس. على سبيل المثال ، يمكن أن تتتبع فكرتان عن كثب انتشار بعضهما البعض بمرور الوقت ، ولكن نادرًا ما تتواجدان ، مثل سيناريو "الحرب الباردة" تقريبًا. نلاحظ أن الارتباط الزوجي والانتشار يظهر توزيعات مختلفة. نوضح كذلك أن نهجنا قادر على الكشف عن العلاقات المثيرة بين الأفكار من خلال دراسات الحالة المتعمقة حول المقالات الإخبارية والأوراق البحثية.', 'fr': "Comprendre comment les idées sont liées les unes aux autres est une question fondamentale dans de nombreux domaines, allant de l'histoire intellectuelle à la communication publique. Parce que les idées sont naturellement intégrées dans les textes, nous proposons le premier cadre pour caractériser systématiquement les relations entre les idées en fonction de leur occurrence dans un corpus de documents, indépendamment de la façon dont ces idées sont représentées. En combinant deux statistiques, la cooccurrence dans les documents et la corrélation de la prévalence au fil du temps, notre approche révèle un certain nombre de façons différentes dont les idées peuvent coopérer et entrer en concurrence. Par exemple, deux idées peuvent suivre de près la prévalence de l'autre au fil du temps, mais elles se produisent rarement, un peu comme dans un scénario de «\xa0guerre froide\xa0». Nous observons que la corrélation de cooccurrence et de prévalence deux à deux présente des distributions différentes. Nous démontrons également que notre approche est capable de découvrir des relations intrigantes entre les idées grâce à des études de cas approfondies sur des articles de presse et des documents de recherche.", 'es': 'Comprender cómo las ideas se relacionan entre sí es una cuestión fundamental en muchos ámbitos, que van desde la historia intelectual hasta la comunicación pública. Debido a que las ideas están naturalmente incrustadas en los textos, proponemos el primer marco para caracterizar sistemáticamente las relaciones entre las ideas en función de su aparición en un corpus de documentos, independientemente de cómo se representen estas ideas. Combinando dos estadísticas —la coexistencia dentro de los documentos y la correlación de la prevalencia a lo largo del tiempo—, nuestro enfoque revela una serie de formas diferentes en las que las ideas pueden cooperar y competir. Por ejemplo, dos ideas pueden seguir de cerca la prevalencia de la otra a lo largo del tiempo y, sin embargo, rara vez coexisten, casi como un escenario de «guerra fría». Observamos que la correlación de coocurrencia y prevalencia por pares exhiben distribuciones diferentes. Además, demostramos que nuestro enfoque es capaz de descubrir relaciones interesantes entre ideas a través de estudios de casos detallados en artículos de noticias y artículos de investigación.', 'pt': 'Compreender como as ideias se relacionam é uma questão fundamental em muitos domínios, desde a história intelectual até a comunicação pública. Como as ideias estão naturalmente inseridas nos textos, propomos o primeiro framework para caracterizar sistematicamente as relações entre as ideias com base em sua ocorrência em um corpus de documentos, independentemente de como essas ideias são representadas. Combinando duas estatísticas – coocorrência dentro de documentos e correlação de prevalência ao longo do tempo – nossa abordagem revela várias maneiras diferentes pelas quais as ideias podem cooperar e competir. Por exemplo, duas ideias podem acompanhar de perto a prevalência uma da outra ao longo do tempo e, no entanto, raramente ocorrer simultaneamente, quase como um cenário de “guerra fria”. Observamos que a coocorrência pareada e a correlação de prevalência apresentam distribuições diferentes. Demonstramos ainda que nossa abordagem é capaz de descobrir relações intrigantes entre ideias por meio de estudos de caso aprofundados em artigos de notícias e artigos de pesquisa.', 'ja': 'アイデアが互いにどのように関係しているかを理解することは、知的な歴史から公的なコミュニケーションまで、多くの領域で基本的な問題です。アイデアは自然にテキストに組み込まれているため、私たちはこれらのアイデアがどのように表現されているかに関係なく、文書のコーパスでのアイデアの発生に基づいてアイデア間の関係を体系的に特徴付ける最初のフレームワークを提案します。ドキュメント内での2つの統計的な共起と、時間の経過とともに起こる有病率の相関を組み合わせることで、私たちのアプローチは、アイデアが協力して競争するためのいくつかの異なる方法を明らかにします。たとえば、2つのアイデアは、時間の経過とともに互いの有病率を綿密に追跡することができますが、ほぼ「冷戦」のシナリオのように起こることはほとんどありません。ペアワイズ共起と有病率相関は異なる分布を示すことを観察した。私たちのアプローチは、ニュース記事や研究論文の詳細なケーススタディを通じて、アイデア間の興味深い関係を明らかにすることができることをさらに示しています。', 'hi': 'यह समझना कि विचार एक-दूसरे से कैसे संबंधित हैं, कई डोमेन में एक मौलिक प्रश्न है, जिसमें बौद्धिक इतिहास से लेकर सार्वजनिक संचार तक शामिल हैं। क्योंकि विचार स्वाभाविक रूप से ग्रंथों में एम्बेडेड होते हैं, हम दस्तावेजों के एक कॉर्पस में उनकी घटना के आधार पर विचारों के बीच संबंधों को व्यवस्थित रूप से चिह्नित करने के लिए पहले ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, इस बात से स्वतंत्र हैं कि इन विचारों का प्रतिनिधित्व कैसे किया जाता है। दो आंकड़ों के संयोजन- दस्तावेजों के भीतर सह-घटना और समय के साथ व्यापकता सहसंबंध- हमारे दृष्टिकोण से कई अलग-अलग तरीकों से पता चलता है जिसमें विचार सहयोग कर सकते हैं और प्रतिस्पर्धा कर सकते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, दो विचार समय के साथ एक-दूसरे के प्रसार को बारीकी से ट्रैक कर सकते हैं, और फिर भी शायद ही कभी सह-अस्तित्व में आते हैं, लगभग "शीत युद्ध" परिदृश्य की तरह। हम देखते हैं कि युग्मवार सह-घटना और व्यापकता सहसंबंध विभिन्न वितरणों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं। हम आगे प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण समाचार लेखों और शोध पत्रों पर गहन मामले के अध्ययन के माध्यम से विचारों के बीच पेचीदा संबंधों को उजागर करने में सक्षम है।', 'zh': '知所以相关者,众域之大略也,自思想史至公共传之。 意自嵌文本,故首建框架,以系统地表征,基于文档语料库,非关此义。 合二统计数据 - 文档之性,与时推移相关性 - 吾道见可合争之多种不同。 如两意可以密踵相推移,而少发之,殆如"冷战"。 观成对患病率相关性异布。 吾益明之,吾法可以新闻文与论文之深,以见意之趣。', 'ru': 'Понимание того, как идеи соотносятся друг с другом, является основополагающим вопросом во многих областях, начиная от интеллектуальной истории и заканчивая публичным общением. Поскольку идеи естественным образом заложены в текстах, мы предлагаем первые рамки для систематической характеристики отношений между идеями на основе их появления в корпусе документов, независимо от того, как эти идеи представлены. Сочетание двух статистических данных - встречаемости в документах и корреляции распространенности во времени - наш подход выявляет ряд различных способов, с помощью которых идеи могут сотрудничать и конкурировать. Например, две идеи могут внимательно отслеживать преобладание друг друга с течением времени, и все же редко встречаются, почти как сценарий «холодной войны». Мы наблюдаем, что парное совпадение и корреляция распространенности демонстрируют различные распределения. Мы далее демонстрируем, что наш подход способен выявить интригующие отношения между идеями посредством углубленных тематических исследований по новостным статьям и исследовательским работам.', 'ga': 'Is ceist bhunúsach i go leor réimsí í tuiscint a fháil ar an gcaoi a mbaineann smaointe lena chéile, ó stair intleachtúil go cumarsáid phoiblí. Toisc go bhfuil smaointe fite fuaite go nádúrtha i dtéacsanna, molaimid an chéad chreat chun an caidreamh idir smaointe a thréithriú go córasach bunaithe ar a dtarlaíonn siad i gcorpas doiciméad, neamhspleách ar an gcaoi a léirítear na smaointe sin. Trí dhá staitistic a chomhcheangal—comhtharlú laistigh de dhoiciméid agus comhghaol leitheadúlachta le himeacht ama—nochtann ár gcur chuige roinnt bealaí éagsúla inar féidir le smaointe comhoibriú agus dul san iomaíocht. Mar shampla, is féidir le dhá smaoineamh leitheadúlacht a chéile a rianú go dlúth le himeacht ama, agus fós is annamh a tharlaíonn siad, beagnach cosúil le cás “cogadh fuar”. Tugaimid faoi deara go léiríonn comhtharlú péireáilte agus comhghaol leitheadúlachta dáiltí éagsúla. Léirímid freisin go bhfuil ár gcur chuige in ann caidrimh shuimiúla idir smaointe a nochtadh trí dhianstaidéir ar ailt nuachta agus páipéir thaighde.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο οι ιδέες σχετίζονται μεταξύ τους είναι ένα θεμελιώδες ερώτημα σε πολλούς τομείς, που κυμαίνονται από την πνευματική ιστορία έως τη δημόσια επικοινωνία. Επειδή οι ιδέες είναι φυσικά ενσωματωμένες σε κείμενα, προτείνουμε το πρώτο πλαίσιο για τον συστηματικό χαρακτηρισμό των σχέσεων μεταξύ ιδεών με βάση την εμφάνισή τους σε ένα σώμα εγγράφων, ανεξάρτητα από το πώς αναπαράγονται αυτές οι ιδέες. Συνδυάζοντας δύο στατιστικά στοιχεία – τη συνέλευση στα έγγραφα και τη συσχέτιση επικράτησης με την πάροδο του χρόνου – η προσέγγισή μας αποκαλύπτει διάφορους τρόπους με τους οποίους οι ιδέες μπορούν να συνεργαστούν και να ανταγωνιστούν. Για παράδειγμα, δύο ιδέες μπορούν να παρακολουθούν στενά η μία την επικράτηση της άλλης με την πάροδο του χρόνου, αλλά σπάνια εμφανίζονται, σχεδόν σαν σενάριο "ψυχρού πολέμου". Παρατηρούμε ότι η συσχέτιση αλληλεπίδρασης και επικράτησης του ζευγαριού παρουσιάζουν διαφορετικές κατανομές. Αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι η προσέγγισή μας είναι σε θέση να αποκαλύψει ενδιαφέρουσες σχέσεις μεταξύ ιδεών μέσω εμπεριστατωμένων περιπτωσιολογικών μελετών σε άρθρα ειδήσεων και ερευνητικές εργασίες.', 'it': 'Capire come le idee si relazionano tra loro è una questione fondamentale in molti campi, dalla storia intellettuale alla comunicazione pubblica. Poiché le idee sono naturalmente incorporate nei testi, proponiamo il primo quadro per caratterizzare sistematicamente le relazioni tra idee in base alla loro presenza in un corpus di documenti, indipendentemente da come queste idee sono rappresentate. Combinando due statistiche - la cooperazione all\'interno dei documenti e la correlazione della prevalenza nel tempo - il nostro approccio rivela una serie di modi diversi in cui le idee possono cooperare e competere. Ad esempio, due idee possono seguire da vicino la prevalenza reciproca nel tempo, e tuttavia raramente cooperino, quasi come uno scenario di "guerra fredda". Osserviamo che la correlazione di cooccupazione e prevalenza in coppia mostra distribuzioni diverse. Dimostriamo inoltre che il nostro approccio è in grado di scoprire interessanti relazioni tra idee attraverso casi di studio approfonditi su articoli di notizie e articoli di ricerca.', 'hu': 'Az ötletek egymáshoz való kapcsolódásának megértése számos területen alapvető kérdés, az intellektuális történettől a nyilvános kommunikációig terjedő területen. Mivel az ötletek természetesen beágyazódnak a szövegekbe, javasoljuk az első keretet, amely szisztematikusan jellemzi az ötletek közötti kapcsolatokat a dokumentumok korpuszában való előfordulásuk alapján, függetlenül attól, hogy ezeket az ötleteket hogyan reprezentálják. Két statisztikai adat – a dokumentumokon belüli együttműködés és az előfordulás időbeli korrelációja – kombinálásával megközelítésünk számos különböző módot fed fel, hogy az ötletek együttműködhetnek és versenyezhetnek. Például két ötlet szorosan nyomon követheti egymás előfordulását az idő során, és mégis ritkán együttműködik, szinte mint egy hidegháború forgatókönyve. Megfigyeljük, hogy a páros kockázati és prevalencia korreláció eltérő eloszlást mutat. Továbbá bemutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk képes felfedni az ötletek közötti érdekes kapcsolatokat a hírek és kutatási cikkek részletes esettanulmányai révén.', 'kk': 'Идеялардың бір-біріне қалай қатынасын түсіну - көптеген доменде негізгі сұрақ, интеллектуалды тарихтан көпшілік коммуникацияға дейін. Себебі идеялар мәтіндерге ендірілген, бірінші бағдарламасын жүйелік түрде идеялар арасындағы қатынастарды құжаттардың корпусына негізделген қатынастарына негізделген, бұл идеялар қалай көрсетілген қатынастарын Құжаттардың екі статистика және көпшілігіміздің көпшілігіміздің көпшілігін біріктіру керек арқылы идеяларды біріктіруге және бұл көпшіліктердің көпшілігін түсінд Мысалы, екі идея бір-бірінің уақыт бойынша бір-бірінің көтерілігін жақындай қарай алады, бірақ әлі бір-бірінің көтерілігін қарай алады. Бірақ әлі бір-бірінің к Біз екі жерде теңіздік және көлемдік корелациясы түрлі бөлімдерді көрсетеді. Біз жаңалық мақалалар мен зерттеу құжаттары туралы зерттеу арқылы идеялар арасындағы қызықтық қатынастарды ашу мүмкіндігін көрсетедік.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinis klausimas daugelyje sričių – nuo intelektinės istorijos iki viešojo ryšio – yra suprasti, kaip idėjos tarpusavyje susijusios. Because ideas are naturally embedded in texts, we propose the first framework to systematically characterize the relations between ideas based on their occurrence in a corpus of documents, independent of how these ideas are represented.  Dviejų dokumentų statistinių duomenų ir paplitimo koreliacijos derinimas laikui bėgant atskleidžia įvairius būdus, kaip idėjos gali bendradarbiauti ir konkuruoti. Pavyzdžiui, dvi idėjos gali atidžiai sekti viena kitos paplitimą laikui bėgant, tačiau retai atsiranda, beveik kaip "šaltojo karo" scenarijus. Pastebėjome, kad dviejų pusių sutrikimai ir paplitimo koreliacija rodo skirtingus pasiskirstymus. Be to, įrodome, kad mūsų požiūris gali atskleisti įdomius idėjų santykius atliekant nuodugnius atvejų tyrimus apie naujienų straipsnius ir mokslinių tyrimų dokumentus.', 'mk': "Разбирањето како идеите се поврзуваат меѓусебно е основно прашање во многу домени, од интелектуална историја до јавна комуникација. Бидејќи идеите се природно вклучени во текстите, ние ја предложуваме првата рамка за систематски да ги карактеризираме односите помеѓу идеите базирани на нивното појавување во корпус документи, независно од тоа како се претставуваат овие идеи. Комбинирањето на две статистички координации во рамките на документите и корелацијата на појавата со текот на времето-нашиот пристап открива број различни начини на кои идеите можат да соработуваат и да се натпреваруваат. For instance, two ideas can closely track each other's prevalence over time, and yet rarely cooccur, almost like a 'cold war' scenario.  Го набљудуваме тоа што координацијата и корелацијата на појавата на парови покажуваат различни дистрибуции. Понатаму демонстрираме дека нашиот пристап е во можност да открие интересни односи помеѓу идеите преку длабоки случајни студии за вести и истражувачки документи.", 'ka': "იდეების შესახებ, როგორ ერთმანეთისთვის შესახებ ერთმანეთისთვის უფრო ფუნდამეტური კითხვა, რამდენიმე დომენეში, ინტელექტური ისტორიის განმავლობაზე სა იმიტომ, რომ იდეები ტექსტში ჩვენ პირველი ფრამეტრის მინდა სისტემატიკურად გავაკეთოთ იდეების შესახებ, რომლებიც დოკუმენტების კორპოსში მოხდება, რომლებიც ეს იდეების გამოსახულებაზე უცნ ორი სტატისტიკის შესაბამისად დოკუმენტების და გარეშე კორელაციის შესაბამისად ჩვენი წარმოდგენა რამდენიმე განსხვავებული გზების შესაბამისად იდეები შეუძლიათ დამუშაობა და კომ მაგალითად, ორი იდეები შეუძლიათ ერთმანეთის გარეშე დროს განმავლობაში, და მაგრამ არაფერად მუშაობა, მაგალითად როგორც 'შვილი გჲინის' სინარიო. ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ ჩვენ მხოლოდ კოლელაციას და კოლელაციას განსხვავებულია განყოფილებები. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა შეუძლია აღმოჩენოთ ინტერიგური პროგრამები იდეების შორის განმავლობაში, რომლებიც ახალგაზომის ანტიკულების და სწავლების კონ", 'ms': "Understanding how ideas relate to each other is a fundamental question in many domains, ranging from intellectual history to public communication.  Kerana idea secara alami terlibat dalam teks, kita cadangkan kerangka pertama untuk secara sistematik mengkaraikan hubungan antara idea berdasarkan kejadian mereka dalam tubuh dokumen, bebas dari bagaimana idea-idea ini diwakili. Menggabungkan dua statistik-kejadian dalam dokumen dan korelasi keterangan melalui masa-pendekatan kita mengungkapkan beberapa cara yang berbeza dalam mana idea boleh bekerja sama dan bersaing. Contohnya, dua idea boleh mengikuti secara dekat penerbangan satu sama lain melalui masa, tetapi jarang berlaku, hampir seperti skenario 'perang sejuk'. Kami memperhatikan bahawa keberadaan dan korelasi kebanyakan berpasangan menunjukkan distribusi yang berbeza. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami mampu mengungkap hubungan yang menarik antara idea melalui kajian kes yang mendalam mengenai artikel berita dan kertas kajian.", 'mt': "Understanding how ideas relate to each other is a fundamental question in many domains, ranging from intellectual history to public communication.  Minħabba li l-ideat huma naturalment inkorporati fit-testi, qed nipproponu l-ewwel qafas li jikkaratterizza sistematikament ir-relazzjonijiet bejn ideat ibbażati fuq l-okkorrenza tagħhom f’korp ta’ dokumenti, indipendentement minn kif dawn l-ideat huma rappreżentati. Il-kombinazzjoni ta’ żewġ statistiki u korrelazzjoni bejn id-dokumenti u l-prevalenza tul iż-żmien u l-approċċ tagħna turi għadd ta’ modi differenti li bihom l-ideat jistgħu jikkooperaw u jikkompetu. Pereżempju, żewġ ideat jistgħu jsegwu mill-qrib il-prevalenza ta’ xulxin maż-żmien, u madankollu rarament iseħħu, kważi bħal xenarju ta’ ‘gwerra kiesħa’. Aħna ninservaw li l-korrelazzjoni bejn il-pari u l-prevalenza turi distribuzzjonijiet differenti. Aħna nippruvaw ukoll li l-approċċ tagħna huwa kapaċi jiżvela relazzjonijiet intriganti bejn ideat permezz ta' studji fil-fond ta' każijiet dwar artikoli tal-aħbarijiet u dokumenti ta' riċerka.", 'no': 'For å forstå korleis ideane relaterte til kvarandre er ein grunnleggjande spørsmål i mange domene, frå intellektuell historie til offentlig kommunikasjon. Fordi ideane er naturleg innebygde i tekstar, foreslår vi den første rammeverket som systematisk karakteriserer forholdet mellom ideane basert på framsyninga sine i eit korpus av dokument, uavhengig av korleis desse ideane vert representerte. Kombinert to statistikk-samanlikning i dokument og utbredelseskorrelasjon over tidspunktet vår viser mange ulike måtar ideane kan samarbeide og konkurrere. For eksempel kan to idear nærare spora kvarandre prevalens over tid, og likevel ofte kjem, nesten som ein «kald krig»-scenario. Vi observerer at pare samanlikning og prevalens-korrelasjon viser ulike distribusjonar. Vi demonstrerer lenger at tilnærminga vårt er i stand til å oppdaga interessante forholdet mellom idear gjennom studier i djupn tilfelle om nyhetsgiver og forskningspapir.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea modului în care ideile se raportează între ele este o întrebare fundamentală în multe domenii, de la istoria intelectuală la comunicarea publică. Deoarece ideile sunt încorporate în mod natural în texte, propunem primul cadru pentru caracterizarea sistematică a relațiilor dintre idei bazate pe apariția lor într-un corpus de documente, independent de modul în care aceste idei sunt reprezentate. Combinând două statistici – colaborarea în cadrul documentelor și corelația prevalenței în timp – abordarea noastră dezvăluie o serie de moduri diferite în care ideile pot coopera și concura. De exemplu, două idei pot urmări îndeaproape prevalența reciprocă în timp, și totuși rareori cooperează, aproape ca un scenariu de "război rece". Observăm că corelația cuplă și prevalența prezintă distribuții diferite. De asemenea, demonstrăm că abordarea noastră este capabilă să descopere relații interesante între idei prin studii de caz aprofundate pe articole de știri și lucrări de cercetare.', 'mn': 'Олон хэсэгт санаанууд хэрхэн холбоотой вэ гэдгийг ойлгох нь оюун ухааны түүхээс холбоотой нийтийн харилцаа хүртэл үндсэн асуулт юм. Яагаад гэвэл санаанууд бичсэн текстүүд бий болсон учраас бид санаануудын хоорондын харилцааны систематик харилцааны анхны хэлбэрийг нь бичсэн баримтуудын корпус дээр харьцуулахын тулд санаанууд хэрхэн төсөөлдөг вэ гэдгийг Хоёр статистикийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хооронд Жишээлбэл, хоёр санаанууд бие биенээ цаг хугацаанд ойролцоогоор тайлбарлаж болно. Гэхдээ хамаагүй хамаагүй "хүйтэн дайны" хувилбар шиг. Бид хоёр хоёр хоёр хоёр хоёр хоёр хоёр хоёр хоорондоо хамааралтай холбоотой байдлыг харуулж байна. Бид дахиад бидний арга зам нь санаануудын хоорондын сонирхолтой харилцааныг мэдээллийн баримт, судалгааны сэтгүүлийн тухай судалгаагаар нээж чадна.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie odnoszących się do siebie idei jest podstawowym pytaniem w wielu dziedzinach, począwszy od historii intelektualnej po komunikację publiczną. Ponieważ pomysły są naturalnie osadzone w tekstach, proponujemy pierwsze ramy systematycznego charakteryzowania relacji pomiędzy pomysłami na podstawie ich występowania w korpusie dokumentów, niezależnie od tego, jak te idee są reprezentowane. Łącząc dwie statystyki – współwystępowanie w dokumentach i korelację powszechności w czasie – nasze podejście ujawnia szereg różnych sposobów współpracy i konkurencji pomysłów. Na przykład dwie pomysły mogą ściśle śledzić wzajemną powszechność w czasie, a jednak rzadko się występują, prawie jak scenariusz "zimnej wojny". Obserwujemy, że korelacja współczesności i częstości występowania pary wykazuje różne rozkłady. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasze podejście jest w stanie odkryć intrygujące relacje między pomysłami poprzez dogłębne studia przypadków artykułów wiadomościowych i prac badawczych.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje ideja koje se odnose međusobno je osnovno pitanje u mnogim domenama, od intelektualne istorije do javne komunikacije. Zato što su ideje prirodno uključene u tekstove, predlažemo prvi okvir da sistematski karakterizira odnose između ideja bazirane na njihovom pojavljivanju u korpusu dokumenta, nezavisnom od toga kako su te ideje predstavljene. U kombinaciji dva statističkog sporazuma unutar dokumenta i korelacije prevalencije tijekom vremena-našeg pristupa pokazuje broj različitih način a na koji ideja mogu sarađivati i natjecati. Na primer, dve ideje mogu pažljivo pratiti prevalenciju jedni druge tokom vremena, a ipak rijetko se slaže, skoro kao scenario hladnog rata. Primijetljamo da na parima pristupanje i korelacija prevalencije pokazuju različite distribucije. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup u stanju da otkrije zanimljive odnose između ideja kroz proučavanje dubokih slučajeva o novinskim člancima i istraživačkim papirima.', 'si': 'අදහස් එක්කෙනෙක්ට කොහොමද සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ කියලා තේරුම් ගන්නේ කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්,  මොකද අදහස් ස්වභාවිතයෙන්ම පාළුවක් වලින් ඇතුල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපි පළමු සංවිධානයක් පද්ධතියෙන්ම සංවිධානය කරන්න පුළුව සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ලිපින්තුවක් වලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වලින් අපේ වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dර උදාහරණයෙන්, අදහස් දෙකක් එක්කෙනෙක්ගේ ප්\u200dරභාවය වෙලාවට පස්සෙන් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙයි, ඒත් තවමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා වෙනස් විතරයි විතරයි. අපි තවදුරටත් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ විදියට පුළුවන් අදහස් අතරේ අභිවිධාන සම්බන්ධයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා', 'sv': 'Att förstå hur idéer relaterar till varandra är en grundläggande fråga inom många områden, allt från intellektuell historia till offentlig kommunikation. Eftersom idéer naturligt är inbäddade i texter föreslår vi det första ramverket för att systematiskt karakterisera relationerna mellan idéer baserat på deras förekomst i en korpus av dokument, oberoende av hur dessa idéer representeras. Genom att kombinera två statistiska uppgifter – förekomst inom dokument och prevalenskorrelation över tid – visar vårt tillvägagångssätt ett antal olika sätt att samverka och konkurrera på. Till exempel kan två idéer noggrant följa varandras utbredning över tiden, men ändå sällan samverkar, nästan som ett "kallt krig"-scenario. Vi observerar att parvis förekomst och prevalenskorrelation uppvisar olika fördelningar. Vi visar vidare att vårt tillvägagångssätt kan avslöja spännande relationer mellan idéer genom djupgående fallstudier på nyhetsartiklar och forskningsartiklar.', 'so': "Understanding how ideas relate to each other is a fundamental question in many domains, ranging from intellectual history to public communication.  Maxaa yeelay fikrada sida dabiicadda ah ayaa qoraalka ku qoran, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa saxda ugu horraysa si aan si rasmi ah u dhigno xiriirka fikrada dhexdooda oo ku qoran muuqashada dukumentiyada, iyadoo aan ka mid ahayn sida fikradaas loo qeybeeyo. Dukummada iyo xiriirka hor-socodka wakhtiga iyo wakhtiga la soconayo waxaa muujiya qaablo kala duduwan oo fikradu ku wada shaqayn karto iyo iskumarin karto. Tusaale ahaan labo fikradood ayaa isdabarayn kara isbedelka waqtiga dheer, laakiin wax yar oo dhaqdhaqaaq ah, sida muuqashada 'dagaalka qabow' oo kale. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa in cuntada labada xilli ah iyo xiriirka hore ay kala duduwan yihiin. Sidoo kale waxaynu caddaynaynaa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu soo muujin karo xiriir xiisaysan oo fikrada dhexdooda ah, taas oo lagu baran karo warqadaha warqadaha iyo baaritaanka.", 'ta': 'புரிந்து அறிவியல் வரலாற்றிலிருந்து பொது தொடர்பு கொள்ளும் நிலையில் ஒரு முக்கியமான கேள்வி என்பதை புரிந்து கொ ஏனென்றால் நினைவுகள் தானாகவே உரைகளில் உள்ளடக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, நாம் முதல் சட்டத்தை முறைமையாக குறிப்பிட வேண்டும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இந்த கருத்து ஆவணங்களுக்குள் இரண்டு புள்ளிவிவரங்கள் சம்பாதிக்கும் மற்றும் முன்னிருப்பு இணைப்புகளுக்கும் நேரத்திற்கும் மேலும் முறையில் ந உதாரணத்திற்கு, இரண்டு யோசனைகள் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் நேரத்திற்கு முன்னேற்றத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும், இன்னும் குறைவாகவும் கு நாம் ஜோடி விளக்கம் மற்றும் முன்னிருப்பு இணைப்புகள் வேறு வித்தியாசமான பங்கீடுகளை பார்க்கிறோம். நாங்கள் மேலும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் நம்முடைய அணுகல் செய்தி கட்டுரைகள் மற்றும் ஆராய்ச்சி காக்குகள் பற்றி உள்ள ஆழ', 'ml': 'ബുദ്ധിമാന്യ ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പൊതുവിലോകത്തിലേക്ക് മാറിയിരിക്കുന്ന ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പരസ്പരം ബന്ധിച് കാരണം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d ലേഖനങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ആശയങ്ങളുടെ സംഭവം അവരുട രേഖകളില്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിക്കസ്റ്റിക്കൂറന്\u200dസ് കൂട്ടുന്നുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സമയത്തേക്കുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മുന ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് രണ്ടു ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ജോലിയുള്ള പാചകങ്ങളും മുമ്പുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്ര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന', 'ur': 'بہت سی دامنوں میں ایک دوسرے سے ایڈیوں کی نسبت کس طرح معلوم ہوتی ہیں، یہ بہت سی دامنوں میں ایک بنیادی سوال ہے، جو ذهن تاریخ سے عمومی ارتباط تک ہوتی ہے۔ کیونکہ ایڈیوں کو طبیعی طور پر پیغام میں داخل ہوا ہے، ہم پہلی فرمود کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ سیستماتیک طور پر ایڈیوں کے درمیان رابطہ کی تعریف کریں جو ان کے اتفاق پر ایک دفتروں کی جسم میں ہے، ان ایڈیوں کو کس طرح دکھائی جاتی ہیں، بغ دو ایستٹیسٹی کی تعداد کے ساتھ سندکھانوں میں اور دوسری تعداد کی تعداد کے ساتھ ہماری طریقہ پر، بہت سی مختلف طریقے ظاہر کرتے ہیں جن میں ایڈیوں کی تعداد اور رقابت کرسکتی ہیں. مثال یہ ہے کہ دو ایڈیوں ایک دوسرے کی غلبہ زمانہ کے اندر قریب سے پیدا کر سکتے ہیں، اور اگرچہ بہت کم خنک ہے، تقریباً ایک "ٹھنڈی جنگ" سیناریو کی طرح. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ دو جوڑوں کی آرام اور پھیلانے کی تعلق مختلف تقسیم کو دکھاتے ہیں ہم اس سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ایڈیوں کے درمیان اچھی طریقے کے ذریعے اچھی مطالعہ کے ذریعے اظہارات اور تحقیق کاغذوں کے بارے میں اظہار کرنے کی قادر ہے.', 'uz': "Biz bir-бирларига qanday g'oyalar bilan bog'liq, ko'pchilik davlatdagi asosiy savol, intellekt tarixidagi hamma xabarga bog'liq. Chunki g'oyalar textlarni tabiiy qo'llangan, biz bu fikrlar qanday tashkilotni tasavvur qilishdan tasavvur qilamiz. Ҳужжатлар ичида иккита statistic нуқтаси қўшилиш ва вақт-усулида мувофиқлик алоқаларини кўриб чиқади. Диски фикрларни улуғлаш ва қонунлашга қодир бўлиши мумкин бўлган бир гуруҳларнинг турли йўлларини кўрсатади. Masalan, ikkita g'oyalar vaqt ichida birlashtirilgan vaqtni o'zgartirib o'rganadi, lekin qachon qanchalik chegara chiqishni o'rganadi. Biz ko'pchilikni ko'rib turganmiz, ko'pchilik bog'liqning boshqa tarqatishni ko'radi. Biz yana ko'rsatdik, bizning fikrlarimiz o'ylab o'ylab o'ylab, yangilik maqolalar va tahrirchi qoʻllari haqida qo'llanmalarning eng muvaffaqiyatlarini ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự hiểu biết ý tưởng liên quan đến nhau là một vấn đề quan trọng trong nhiều lĩnh vực, từ lịch sử trí tuệ cho thông tin công cộng. Vì ý tưởng luôn nằm trong các văn bản, chúng tôi đề nghị cơ quan đầu tiên đặt dấu hiệu các mối quan hệ giữa các ý tưởng dựa trên sự hiện diện của chúng trong một tập tài liệu, không quan trọng cách các ý tưởng được đại diện. Kết hợp hai liên kết thống kê trong các tài liệu và mối tương quan phổ biến qua thời gian cho thấy một số cách khác nhau để các tư tưởng có thể hợp tác và cạnh tranh. Ví dụ, hai ý tưởng có thể theo dõi gần gũi khả năng tồn tại của nhau qua thời gian, nhưng hiếm khi hợp tác, gần như viễn cảnh "chiến tranh lạnh". Chúng tôi quan sát việc tương đồng và tỉ lệ bao gồm những phân phát khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng phương pháp của chúng tôi có thể khám phá mối quan hệ hấp dẫn giữa các ý tưởng qua các nghiên cứu sâu sắc về báo chí và các nghiên cứu.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje kako se ideje odnose međusobno je osnovno pitanje u mnogim domenama, od intelektualne povijesti do javne komunikacije. Jer ideje su prirodno uključene u tekstove, predlažemo prvi okvir koji sistematski karakterizira odnose između ideja na temelju njihovog pojavljivanja u korpusu dokumenta, nezavisno od način a predstavljanja tih ideja. U kombinaciji dva statističkog sporazuma u dokumentima i korelacije prevalencije tijekom našeg vremenskog pristupa pokazuje broj različitih način a na koji ideja mogu surađivati i natjecati. Na primjer, dvije ideje mogu pažljivo pratiti prevalenciju jedni druge tijekom vremena, a ipak rijetko čudno, skoro poput scenarija hladnog rata. Primjetili smo da na parima rastavljanje i korelacija prevalencije pokazuju različite distribucije. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup u stanju otkriti zanimljive odnose između ideja kroz proučavanje dubokih slučajeva o novinskim članicama i istraživačkim papirima.', 'de': 'Zu verstehen, wie sich Ideen zueinander verhalten, ist eine grundlegende Frage in vielen Bereichen, von der Geistesgeschichte bis zur öffentlichen Kommunikation. Da Ideen von Natur aus in Texte eingebettet sind, schlagen wir den ersten Rahmen vor, um die Beziehungen zwischen Ideen anhand ihres Vorkommens in einem Dokumentenkorpus systematisch zu charakterisieren, unabhängig davon, wie diese Ideen dargestellt werden. Durch die Kombination zweier Statistiken – das Zusammentreffen innerhalb von Dokumenten und die Prävalenzkorrelation im Laufe der Zeit – zeigt unser Ansatz eine Reihe unterschiedlicher Möglichkeiten auf, wie Ideen zusammenarbeiten und konkurrieren können. Zum Beispiel können zwei Ideen die Vorherrschaft des anderen im Laufe der Zeit genau verfolgen, und doch selten, fast wie ein Szenario des "Kalten Krieges". Wir beobachten, dass paarweise Koeffizienz und Prävalenzkorrelation unterschiedliche Verteilungen aufweisen. Wir zeigen weiter, dass unser Ansatz in der Lage ist, faszinierende Zusammenhänge zwischen Ideen durch detaillierte Fallstudien zu Nachrichtenartikeln und Forschungsarbeiten aufzudecken.', 'nl': "Begrijpen hoe ideeën zich tot elkaar verhouden is een fundamentele vraag in veel domeinen, variërend van intellectuele geschiedenis tot publieke communicatie. Omdat ideeën van nature ingebed zijn in teksten, stellen we het eerste kader voor om de relaties tussen ideeën systematisch te karakteriseren op basis van hun voorkomen in een corpus van documenten, onafhankelijk van hoe deze ideeën worden vertegenwoordigd. Door twee statistieken te combineren – cocurrence binnen documenten en prevalentie correlatie in de loop van de tijd – onthult onze aanpak een aantal verschillende manieren waarop ideeën kunnen samenwerken en concurreren. Twee ideeën kunnen bijvoorbeeld elkaars prevalentie in de loop van de tijd nauwlettend volgen, en toch komen ze zelden voor, bijna als een 'koude oorlog'-scenario. We observeren dat pairwise cocurrence en prevalentie correlatie verschillende verdelingen vertonen. We tonen verder aan dat onze aanpak intrigerende relaties tussen ideeën kan ontdekken door middel van diepgaande casestudy's op nieuwsberichten en onderzoeksartikelen.", 'bg': 'Разбирането как идеите се отнасят помежду си е фундаментален въпрос в много области, вариращи от интелектуалната история до публичната комуникация. Тъй като идеите са естествено вградени в текстовете, ние предлагаме първата рамка за систематично характеризиране на отношенията между идеите въз основа на тяхното появяване в корпус от документи, независимо от това как са представени тези идеи. Съчетавайки две статистически данни - съвпадение в документите и корелация на разпространението във времето - нашият подход разкрива редица различни начини, по които идеите могат да си сътрудничат и да се конкурират. Например две идеи могат да проследят отблизо разпространението на другите във времето и все пак рядко се случват, почти като сценарий на "студена война". Наблюдаваме, че съвпадението по двойки и корелацията на разпространението показват различни разпределения. Освен това демонстрираме, че нашият подход е в състояние да разкрие интригуващи взаимоотношения между идеите чрез задълбочени казуси на новинарски статии и изследователски статии.', 'ko': "사상사부터 공공 전파까지 사상 간의 관계를 이해하는 것은 많은 분야의 기본적인 문제이다.생각이 텍스트에 자연스럽게 박혀 있기 때문에 우리는 첫 번째 구조를 제시했다. 아이디어가 문서 자료 라이브러리에 나타나는 상황에 따라 아이디어 간의 관계를 체계적으로 묘사하고 이런 아이디어가 어떻게 표현되는지에 의존하지 않는다.우리의 방법은 두 가지 통계 데이터, 즉 문헌 중의 공현성과 시간에 따라 유행하는 관련성을 결합시켜 사상 합작과 경쟁의 다양한 방식을 제시했다.예를 들어 시간의 추이에 따라 이 두 가지 생각은 서로의 유행 정도를 밀접하게 추적할 수 있지만 협동이 거의 일어나지 않고 거의'냉전'상황과 같다.우리는 쌍공현과 환병률의 상관성이 서로 다른 분포를 보이는 것을 관찰했다.우리는 뉴스 문장과 연구 논문에 대한 깊은 사례 연구를 통해 우리의 방법은 생각 사이의 흥미로운 관계를 드러낼 수 있음을 한층 더 증명했다.", 'da': "At forstå, hvordan idéer forholder sig til hinanden, er et grundlæggende spørgsmål på mange områder, lige fra intellektuel historie til offentlig kommunikation. Ideer er naturligvis indlejret i tekster, foreslår vi den første ramme til systematisk at karakterisere relationerne mellem idéer baseret på deres forekomst i et korpus af dokumenter, uafhængigt af hvordan disse idéer repræsenteres. Ved at kombinere to statistikker – samarbejde inden for dokumenter og forekomstkorrelation over tid – afslører vores tilgang en række forskellige måder, hvorpå idéer kan samarbejde og konkurrere. For eksempel kan to ideer nøje spore hinandens forekomst over tid, og alligevel sjældent samles, næsten som et 'kold krig'-scenario. Vi observerer, at parvis koforekomst og prævalens korrelation udviser forskellige fordelinger. Vi viser endvidere, at vores tilgang er i stand til at afdække spændende relationer mellem ideer gennem dybdegående casestudier på nyhedsartikler og forskningsartikler.", 'fa': 'درک کردن چگونه ایده\u200cها با یکدیگر ارتباط دارند، یک سوال بنیادی در بسیاری از سرزمینها است، از تاریخ intellectual به ارتباط عمومی. چون ایده\u200cها طبیعی در متن\u200cها متنوع شده\u200cاند، ما اولین چهارچوب را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با سیستماتیک رابطه\u200cهای بین ایده\u200cها بر اساس اتفاق ایده\u200cهایشان در یک قالب سند، مستقل از اینکه چگونه این ایده\u200cها معرفی می\u200cشوند. ترکیب دو اتفاق آمار و اتفاقی در داخل سند و ارتباط فراوانی در طول روش زمان ما تعدادی از راه های مختلف را نشان می دهد که ایده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند همکاری و رقابت کنند. به عنوان مثال، دو ایده می توانند به نزدیک توسط زمان فراوانی یکدیگر را ردیاب کنند، و در آن صورت کمی خنک است، تقریباً مثل یک سناریو جنگ سرد. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که اتفاقات و اتفاقات گسترش با جفت\u200cها، توزیع\u200cهای مختلف را نمایش می\u200cدهند. ما تاثیر می\u200cدهیم که روش ما قادر است رابطه\u200cهای جالب بین ایده\u200cها را از طریق مطالعه\u200cهای عمیق در مورد مقاله\u200cهای خبری و روزنامه\u200cهای تحقیق بفهمه.', 'id': "Memahami bagaimana ide berhubungan satu sama lain adalah pertanyaan dasar dalam banyak bidang, dari sejarah intelektual ke komunikasi publik. Karena ide-ide secara alami terlibat dalam teks, kami mengusulkan rangka pertama untuk secara sistematis mengkaraterisasikan hubungan antara ide berdasarkan kejadian mereka dalam tubuh dokumen, bebas dari bagaimana ide-ide ini diwakili. Kombinasi dua statistik-korelasi dalam dokumen dan korelasi prevalensi dalam waktu-pendekatan kita mengungkapkan beberapa cara yang berbeda di mana ide dapat bekerja sama dan bersaing. Contohnya, dua ide dapat melacak secara dekat prevalensi satu sama lain melalui waktu, namun jarang muncul, hampir seperti skenario 'perang dingin'. Kami memperhatikan bahwa keberadaan dan korelasi prevalensi berpasangan menunjukkan distribusi yang berbeda. Kita lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mampu menemukan hubungan menarik antara ide melalui studi kasus dalam artikel berita dan kertas penelitian.", 'tr': 'Ideýalaryň bir-birine nähili geňleýändigini düşünmek köp sahypalarda esasy soragdyr, intellektuel taryhdan hem jemgyýet komunikaýasyna çenli. Sebäbi ideýalar textlerde daşarylýar, biz sistematik sebäbi ideýalar arasynyň bolmagynyň köpüsi içinde, bu ideýalaryň nähili täsirinden daşarylýandygyny düşünýäris. Senedleriň içinde iki statistika-ýerleşmeligini birleşdirmek we zamanyň golaýynda ýerleşmeligini çaklamak üçin pikirlerimiz üçin bir näçe döwletlere işbirleşip otyryp biljekdigini görkezýär. mysal bolsa, iki pikir bir-biriniň wagtyň öňüni ýakynlaşdyryp bilýär, ýöne indi sowuk uruş senaryýaly diýen ýaly yssyz bolup biler. Biz bu çiftlikde ýetişiklik we daşyklyk bilen daşyklaşyklary üýtgedýäris. Biz indi düşünjelerimiz arasyndaky düşünjeler arasynda gaty gyzyklanýar ýagdaýlary, täzelikler we ylmy kagytlar barada öwrenip bilmegimizi kanıtlaýarys.', 'am': 'ብዙዎች አካባቢ ታሪክ ከህልም ታሪክ ወደ ህዝብ ግንኙነት የሚለይ የዋና ጥያቄ እንዴት እንደሆነ ለማስተዋል፡፡ ምክንያቱም አእምሮዎች በጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተሰለፉ ናቸው፣ የመጀመሪያውን የፍሬም ክፍል በሥርዓት የሥርዓት ሥርዓት በሥርዓት ውስጥ ያሉትን የአሳብን ግንኙነት በሰልፍ ክፍል በመቀበል እናስባታለን፡፡ Combining two statistics-cooccurrence within documents and prevalence correlation over time-our approach reveals a number of different ways in which ideas can cooperate and compete.  ለምሳሌ፣ ሁለት አሳቦች የጊዜውን ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር ይችላል፣ ነገር ግን ጥቂት ቆርጦ እንደቀረበ “ቀዝቃዛ ጦርነት” አስተያየት ይችላል፡፡ ሁለትን የውሃት ማህበረሰብ እና የፍላጎት ግንኙነት የተለየ ክፍሎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢዎች እና የዜና ጽሑፎች እና ትምህርት ገጾችን በጥልቅ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማግኘት እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Om te verstaan hoe idees met mekaar verwante is 'n fundamentele vraag in baie domeine, af van intellektuele geskiedenis tot openbare kommunikasie. Omdat idees natuurlik in tekste ingesluit is, voorstel ons die eerste raamwerk om die verwantings tussen idees te karakteriseer wat op hulle voorkoms in 'n korpus van dokumente gebaseer word, onhanglik van hoe hierdie idees verteenwoordig word. Kombineer twee statistieke-koördinaat binne dokumente en oorspronklikheidkorrelasie oor tyd-ons toegang vertoon 'n aantal verskillende maniere waarin idees kan kooperaat en kompetiseer. Byvoorbeeld, twee idees kan mekaar se oorvloedigheid nader volg oor tyd, en nogtans selfs skaars, amper soos 'n koue oorlog' scenario. Ons hou op dat paar wyse koördinasie en oorspronklikheid korrelasie verskillende verspreidings uitbied. Ons wys verder dat ons toegang kan ontdek intriguerende verwantings tussen idees deur in diepte geval studies oor nuusartikels en ondersoek papier.", 'hy': 'Հասկանալը, թե ինչպես են միմյանց հետ կապված գաղափարները շատ ոլորտներում հիմնական հարց է, որը սկսում է ինտելեկտուալ պատմությունից մինչև հանրային հաղորդակցությունը: Քանի որ գաղափարները բնական են ներառված տեքստներում, մենք առաջարկում ենք առաջին շրջանակը, որպեսզի սիստեմատիկ կերպով բնորոշվեն գաղափարների միջև կապը, հիմնված դրանց իրադարձությունների վրա փաստաթղթերի մարմնում, անկախ նրանից, թե ինչպես են Երկու վիճակագրական համապատասխանությունը փաստաթղթերի մեջ և հաղորդակցվածությունը ժամանակի ընթացքում մեր մոտեցումը բացահայտում է մի շարք տարբեր ձևեր, որոնց միջոցով գաղափարները կարող են համագործակցել և մրցակցել: Օրինակ, երկու գաղափար կարող են ուշադիր հետևել միմյանց տարածությունը ժամանակի ընթացքում, սակայն հազվադեպ են գալիս, գրեթե "սառը պատերազմի" սցենարի նման: Մենք նկատում ենք, որ զույգչափ հաղորդակցվածությունը և հաղորդակցվածությունը տարբեր տարածումներ են ցույց տալիս: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարողանում է բացահայտել գաղափարների միջև հետաքրքիր հարաբերությունները հիմնական հետազոտությունների միջոցով նորությունների հոդվածների և հետազոտությունների մասին:', 'az': 'IdeyalarńĪn bir-birin…ô nec…ô bańülńĪ olduńüunu anlamaq √ßoxlu sah…ôl…ôrd…ô …ôsl bir sual, intellektuq tarihind…ôn halkńĪ iletiŇüin …ô q…ôd…ôr. D√ľŇü√ľn√ľrl…ôr m…ôktublara t…ôbi…ôtli olaraq daxil olub, biz sistematik olaraq ideyalar arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükil…ôri t…ôsbit edirik, bu ideyalarńĪn nec…ô g√∂st…ôrilm…ôsind…ôn baŇüqasńĪna g…ôlm…ôsini t…ôsdiql…ôyirik. ńįki statistik-istifad…ô il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôk v…ô zamanńĪmńĪz boyunca geniŇüliyi il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôk fikirl…ôri birl…ôŇüdir…ô bil…ôc…ôk v…ô yarńĪŇüa bil…ôc…ôk bir ne√ß…ô f…ôrqli yolu g√∂st…ôrir. Misal olaraq, iki fikir bir-birinin zamanńĪndan √ßox yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪlabilir, amma √ßox s …ôrin bir m√ľharib…ô senaryosu kimi, az qala s…ôrin bir m√ľharib…ô kimi. Biz h…ôr ikisinin istifad…ô edilm…ôsini v…ô geniŇüliyi il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif dańüńĪtńĪmlarńĪ g√∂st…ôrir. Biz artńĪq t…ôrzimizin ideyalarńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ ilgin√ß iliŇükimi x…ôb…ôr m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri v…ô araŇütńĪrma kańüńĪtlarńĪ bar…ôsind…ôki m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr il…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri a√ßmańüa qadir olduńüunu g√∂st…ôririk.', 'bn': "বুঝতে পারছি কিভাবে একে অপরের সাথে যোগাযোগের চিন্তা অনেক দেশের মৌলিক প্রশ্ন, যা বুদ্ধিজীবী ইতিহাস থেকে জনগণের য কারণ স্বাভাবিকভাবে টেক্সটে চিন্তার ভিত্তিক ভাবে প্রথম কার্যক্রমের প্রস্তাব করছি যে তাদের ঘটনার উপর ভিত্তিক চিন্তার সম্পর্ক স্বাভাবিকভাবে চিন্তা Combining two statistics-cooccurrence within documents and prevalence correlation over time-our approach reveals a number of different ways in which ideas can cooperate and compete.  উদাহরণস্বরূপ, দুই চিন্তা একে অপরের কাছে কাছাকাছি সময়ের বিভেদ অনুসরণ করতে পারে, কিন্তু কমই কম কুকুর, প্রায় 'ঠান্ডা যুদ্ধ' দৃশ্ আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে জুড়ে জোড়া রান্না এবং পূর্ববর্তী সম্পর্ক বিভিন্ন বিতরণ প্রদর্শন করে। আমরা আরো প্রমাণ করছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ এবং গবেষণা কাগজের উপর গভীর মাধ্যমে চিন্তার মধ্যে যুক্তিকর সম্পর্কের সম্", 'sw': 'Kuelewa jinsi mawazo yanavyohusiana na wao ni swali la msingi katika maeneo mengi, ukilinganisha na historia ya akili na mawasiliano ya umma. Kwa sababu mawazo yanajumuishwa kwa asili katika maandishi, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kwanza wa kuhusiana na mahusiano ya mawazo yanayotokea kwa kutumia viungo vya nyaraka, bila kujali jinsi mawazo haya yanavyowakilishwa. Combining two statistics-cooccurrence within documents and prevalence correlation over time-our approach reveals a number of different ways in which ideas can cooperate and compete.  Kwa mfano, mawazo mawili yanaweza kufuatilia ukatili wa muda mwingine, na bado ni nadra sana wa kuchimbia, kama hali ya ‘vita baridi’. Tunaona kuwa mchanganyiko wa michezo miwili na mahusiano yanaonyesha usambazaji tofauti. Tunaonyesha zaidi kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kugundua uhusiano wa kuvutia kati ya mawazo kupitia tafiti za kina za makala na karatasi za utafiti.', 'bs': 'Razumijeti kako se ideje odnose međusobno je osnovno pitanje u mnogim domenama, od intelektualne povijesti do javne komunikacije. Zato što su ideje prirodno uključene u tekstove, predlažemo prvi okvir da sistematski karakterizira odnose između ideja bazirane na njihovom pojavljivanju u korpusu dokumenta, nezavisnom od način a predstavljanja tih ideja. U kombinaciji dva statističkog sporazuma u dokumentima i korelacije prevalencije tijekom vremena-našeg pristupa pokazuje broj različitih način a na koji ideja mogu sarađivati i natjecati. Na primjer, dvije ideje mogu pažljivo pratiti prevalenciju jedni druge preko vremena, a ipak rijetko čudno, skoro kao scenario hladnog rata. Primjetili smo da se na parovima rastavlja i korelacija prevalencije pokazuju različite distribucije. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup u stanju otkriti zanimljive odnose između ideja kroz proučavanje dubokih slučajeva o novinskim članicama i istraživačkim papirima.', 'cs': 'Pochopení vztahu myšlenek k sobě je základní otázkou v mnoha oblastech, od duševní historie až po veřejnou komunikaci. Protože myšlenky jsou přirozeně zakotveny v textech, navrhujeme první rámec, který systematicky charakterizuje vztahy mezi myšlenkami na základě jejich výskytu v korpusu dokumentů, nezávisle na tom, jak jsou tyto myšlenky reprezentovány. Kombinace dvou statistik – současnost v dokumentech a korelace prevalence v průběhu času – náš přístup odhaluje řadu různých způsobů, jak mohou myšlenky spolupracovat a konkurovat. Například dvě myšlenky se mohou v průběhu času úzce sledovat, a přesto se vzácně vyskytují, téměř jako scénář "studené války". Zjišťujeme, že párová korelace koevýskytu a prevalence vykazují různé distribuce. Dále ukazujeme, že náš přístup je schopen odhalit zajímavé vztahy mezi myšlenkami prostřednictvím hloubkových případových studií na zpravodajských článcích a výzkumných článcích.', 'et': 'Mõistmine, kuidas ideed omavahel seonduvad, on põhiküsimus paljudes valdkondades, alates intellektuaalsest ajaloost kuni avaliku kommunikatsioonini. Kuna ideed on loomulikult tekstides integreeritud, pakume välja esimese raamistiku ideede vaheliste suhete süstemaatiliseks kirjeldamiseks nende esinemise alusel dokumentide korpuses, sõltumata sellest, kuidas neid ideid esindatakse. Kombineerides kaks statistikat – dokumentide koostöö ja levimuse korrelatsioon aja jooksul – näitab meie lähenemisviis mitmeid erinevaid viise, kuidas ideed saavad koostööd teha ja konkureerida. Näiteks võivad kaks ideed tähelepanelikult jälgida üksteise levikut aja jooksul, kuid harva toimuvad, peaaegu nagu "külma sõja" stsenaarium. Me täheldame, et paarijärgse koostoime ja levimuse korrelatsiooni jaotused on erinevad. Lisaks näitame, et meie lähenemisviis suudab avastada ideede intrigeerivaid seoseid põhjalike juhtumiuuringute kaudu uudisteartiklite ja uurimistööde kohta.', 'fi': 'Ideoiden keskinäisen yhteyden ymmärtäminen on perustavanlaatuinen kysymys monilla aloilla intellektuaalisesta historiasta julkiseen viestintään. Koska ideat ovat luonnollisesti upotettuja teksteihin, ehdotamme ensimmäistä viitekehystä systemaattisesti kuvaamaan ideoiden välisiä suhteita niiden esiintymisen perusteella asiakirjoissa, riippumatta siitä, miten nämä ideat ovat edustettuina. Yhdistämällä kaksi tilastotietoa – asiakirjojen välinen yhteistyö ja ajan mittaan esiintyvyyden korrelaatio – lähestymistapamme paljastaa useita eri tapoja, joilla ideat voivat toimia yhteistyössä ja kilpailla keskenään. Esimerkiksi kaksi ideaa voi seurata tarkasti toistensa levinneisyyttä ajan mittaan, mutta harvoin ne toimivat, melkein kuin "kylmän sodan" skenaario. Havaitsemme, että parikohtainen koordinaatio ja prevalenssikorrelaatio jakautuvat eri tavalla. Osoitamme myös, että lähestymistapamme pystyy paljastamaan ideoiden välisiä kiehtovia suhteita uutis- ja tutkimusartikkeleiden syvällisten tapaustutkimusten avulla.', 'ca': "Entendre com les idees es relacionen entre elles és una qüestió fonamental en molts dominis, des de la història intel·lectual a la comunicació pública. Because ideas are naturally embedded in texts, we propose the first framework to systematically characterize the relations between ideas based on their occurrence in a corpus of documents, independent of how these ideas are represented.  Combinant dues estadístiques i coincidències dins els documents i la correlació de prevalència al llarg del temps-el nostre enfocament revela una sèrie de maneres diferents de com les idees poden cooperar i competir. For instance, two ideas can closely track each other's prevalence over time, and yet rarely cooccur, almost like a 'cold war' scenario.  We observe that pairwise cooccurrence and prevalence correlation exhibit different distributions.  We further demonstrate that our approach is able to uncover intriguing relations between ideas through in-depth case studies on news articles and research papers.", 'sq': "Understanding how ideas relate to each other is a fundamental question in many domains, ranging from intellectual history to public communication.  Because ideas are naturally embedded in texts, we propose the first framework to systematically characterize the relations between ideas based on their occurrence in a corpus of documents, independent of how these ideas are represented.  Combining two statistics-cooccurrence within documents and prevalence correlation over time-our approach reveals a number of different ways in which ideas can cooperate and compete.  Për shembull, dy ide mund të ndjekin ngushtë përkrahjen e njëri-tjetrit gjatë kohës, dhe megjithatë rrallë të freskëta, pothuajse si një skenar 'lufte të ftohtë'. Ne vëzhgojmë se korrigjenca dhe korrelacioni i papërgjegjësisë në njëri-tjetrin ekspozojnë shpërndarje të ndryshme. We further demonstrate that our approach is able to uncover intriguing relations between ideas through in-depth case studies on news articles and research papers.", 'ha': "Ina fahimta jinsi idãnun da ke danganta da ɗayansu yana tambayi muhimu a cikin wurãren jama'a mãsu yawa, mai tsawo daga historin baka zuwa zuwa mawasicin da jamii. Ko kuwa idãnun za'a shiga a naturaci cikin littattafai, za'a buƙata firam na farko dõmin a daidaita mazaɓa tsakanin idãnun da ke danna su a cikin wata takardar takardar, kuma ba mu zama masu buƙata ba da jinsi za'a nuna idãnun su. Combining statistics-koccurrence biyu a cikin takardar, da kuma mazaunin da suka yi amfani da tsakanin-lokaci, ya bayyana wasu hanyõyi dabam-dabam, da za'a iya samarari da yin competiti. Misali, mawadãta biyu za'a iya samun tunkuɗe birnin da ya yi daidai, kuma amma kuma yana da sauri kaɗan, kamar wani na'urar 'war kulli'. We observe that pairwise cooccurrence and prevalence correlation exhibit different distributions.  Tuna nuna furo cẽwa hanyoyinmu za'a iya iya iya buɗe mazaɓa tsakanin idãnun da ke cikin littafan da takardar da takardar da yin muhimma.", 'sk': 'Razumevanje povezanosti idej je temeljno vprašanje na številnih področjih, od intelektualne zgodovine do javne komunikacije. Ker so ideje naravno vgrajene v besedila, predlagamo prvi okvir za sistematično označevanje odnosov med idejami na podlagi njihovega pojava v korpusu dokumentov, neodvisno od tega, kako so te ideje predstavljene. Združevanje dveh statističnih podatkov – sodelovanje v dokumentih in korelacija razširjenosti skozi čas – naš pristop razkriva številne različne načine, na katere lahko ideje sodelujejo in konkurirajo. Na primer, dve zamisli lahko natančno spremljata razširjenost drug drugega skozi čas, vendar se redko ujemata, skoraj kot scenarij "hladne vojne". Opazujemo, da se sodobnost in korelacija prevalence v paru razlikujeta. Dodatno dokazujemo, da je naš pristop sposoben odkriti zanimive odnose med idejami s poglobljenimi študijami primerov novic in raziskovalnih člankov.', 'bo': 'དེ་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ཇི་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་མི་འདྲ་བར་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་གི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་རེད། གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། བསམ་ཚུལ་རང་རུང་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་ཕན་ཆད་པ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ ཡིག དཔེར་ན། ཐབས་ཤེས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཁྱད་དུ་ཕལ་ཆེར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐབས་ལྟར་དུ་གཏོང་ནི་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་ལ་མཐུན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཡིག', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé ngerasakno pipilihan langkung sampeyan ambekan iki luwih basan ning akeh pangrungan ingkang sampeyan luwih Soalé ide sing berarti dadi akeh lan textun, awak dhéwé ngerusakno perusahaan karo sistematik karo perusahaan langkung sampek idira dadi iki dadi sing bisa pasakno karo dokumen gênêr, akeh on ês mengko iso nggawe ide sing dibutuhé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sampeyan, akeh sing sampeyan duwé iso nggambar nggo sampeyan nguasah dumadhi, nganggo iso nggawe barang sampeyan \'guujar\' seneng kabèh. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo negori-negori nggawe lan ijol-ijolan éwong liyane Awak dhéwé éntuk mungkin ngono hal-hal dadi iki ngono kak nggawe barang langgar alih iki luwih basa sing nyeangno karo perusahaan kanggo masalah wartané karo perusahaan maning.', 'he': 'להבין איך רעיונות מתקשרים אחד עם השני היא שאלה בסיסית בתחומים רבים, מתרחשת מההיסטוריה האינטלקטואלית לתקשורת ציבורית. מכיוון שרעיונות נמשכים בטבעי בטקסטים, אנו מציעים את המסגר הראשון כדי לתייצב באופן שיטתי את היחסים בין הרעיונות המבוססים על התרחשות שלהם בתוך גוף מסמכים, ללא קשר לאיך הרעיונות האלה מוצגים. שילוב שני סטטיסטיקות-התרחשות בתוך מסמכים ומערכת התרחשות במהלך הזמן-הגישה שלנו מגלה מספר דרכים שונות שבהן רעיונות יכולים לשתף פעולה ולהתחרות. לדוגמא, שני רעיונות יכולים לעקוב אחר התרחבות של אחד את השני בזמן, ובכל זאת לעיתים נדירות קורים, כמעט כמו תרחיש "מלחמה קרה". We observe that pairwise cooccurrence and prevalence correlation exhibit different distributions.  אנו גם מראים שהגישה שלנו מסוגלת לחשוף יחסים מעניינים בין רעיונות דרך מחקרי מקרים עמוקים על מאמרים חדשות ומסמכי מחקר.'}
{'en': 'Polish evaluation dataset for compositional distributional semantics models', 'ar': 'مجموعة بيانات التقييم البولندية لنماذج دلالات التوزيع التركيبية', 'pt': 'Conjunto de dados de avaliação polonês para modelos de semântica de distribuição composicional', 'es': 'Conjunto de datos de evaluación polaca para modelos de semántica distributiva compositiva', 'fr': "Jeu de données d'évaluation polonais pour les modèles sémantiques distributionnels compositionnels", 'ja': '構成分布セマンティクスモデルのためのポーランドの評価データセット', 'zh': '合分布语义模波兰语评估数据集', 'ru': 'Польский оценочный набор данных для композиционных моделей семантики распределения.', 'hi': 'compositional distributional semantics मॉडल के लिए पोलिश मूल्यांकन डेटासेट', 'ga': 'Tacar sonraí meastóireachta Polainnis do mhúnlaí dáilte shéimeantach comhdhéanaimh', 'hu': 'Lengyel értékelési adatkészlet kompozíciós eloszlási szemantikai modellekhez', 'el': 'Πολωνικό σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης για σύνθετα σημασιολογικά μοντέλα κατανομής', 'ka': 'პოლიქური განსაზღვრების მონაცემები კომპოზიციონალური განსაზღვრების მოდელებისთვის', 'kk': 'Комбинациялық дистрибуторлық семантикалық үлгілер үшін Польша оқу деректер жиыны', 'lt': 'Lenkijos sudėtinių paskirstymo semantikos modelių vertinimo duomenų rinkinys', 'it': 'Set di dati di valutazione polacco per modelli semantici distributivi compositivi', 'ms': 'Set data penilaian Polandia untuk model semantik distribusi komposisi', 'mk': 'Polish evaluation dataset for compositional distributional semantics models', 'ml': 'പോളിഷ് വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni Pollakk għal mudelli ta’ semantika distributtiva kompożittiva', 'mn': 'Польшийн тооцоолох өгөгдлийн сангууд бүтээмжтэй хуваарилцах семантик загваруудын', 'ro': 'Set de date poloneze de evaluare pentru modelele semantice distribuționale compoziționale', 'no': 'Polsk evalueringsdataset for komponentsdistribusjonssemantiske modeller', 'pl': 'Polski zestaw danych oceniających kompozycyjne modele semantyczne dystrybucyjne', 'sr': 'Poljski set podataka za procjenu kompozicionalnih distribucijskih semantičkih modela', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qeymeynta qiimeynta booliska', 'sv': 'Polska utvĂ¤rderingsdata fĂ¶r kompositionsfĂ¶rdelningsmĂ¤ssiga semantiska modeller', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'کمپیشنشن تقسیم سیمانٹیکس موڈل کے لئے پولیش ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập tin đánh giá Ba Lan cho mô- đun phân phối phân tử', 'da': 'Polsk evalueringsdatasæt for sammensætningsdistributionelle semantiske modeller', 'bg': 'Полски набор от данни за оценка на композиционни дистрибуционни семантични модели', 'nl': 'Poolse evaluatiedataset voor compositionele distributionele semantische modellen', 'de': 'Polnischer Auswertungsdatensatz für kompositorische distributionale semantische Modelle', 'hr': 'Poljski set podataka za procjenu kompozicionalnih distribucijskih semantičkih modela', 'id': 'Set data evaluasi Polandia untuk model komposisi distribusi semantik', 'sw': 'Taarifa za uchunguzi za Poland kwa ajili ya mifano ya usambazaji', 'fa': 'مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارزیابی لهستانی برای مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک\u200cهای تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cای', 'tr': 'compositional distributional semantik nusgalar üçin Polonça çykyş maglumaty düzeni', 'af': 'Poolse evalueringsdatastel vir komponensiese verspreidingssemantieke modele', 'sq': 'Të dhënat polake të vlerësimit për modelet e semantikës përbërëse shpërndarëse', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ko': '분포 의미 모델을 조합한 폴란드 평가 데이터 집합', 'az': 'Kompozisyonal dağıtım semantik modellərinin polonya değerlendirmə veri qurğuları', 'hy': 'Փոլանդական գնահատման տվյալների համակարգը բաշխարհային սևմանտիկայի մոդելների համար', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Poola hindamisandmekogum kompositsiooniliste jaotussemantika mudelite jaoks', 'cs': 'Polská hodnotící sada dat pro kompoziční distribuční sémantické modely', 'fi': 'Puolalainen arviointiaineisto kompositiivisille jakelusemantiikkamalleille', 'bs': 'Poljski set podataka za procjenu kompozicionalnih distribucijskih semantičkih modela', 'ca': 'Polish evaluation dataset for compositional distributional semantics models', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Poljski nabor podatkov o ocenjevanju kompozicijskih distribucijskih semantičnih modelov', 'ha': 'QXml', 'he': 'קבוצת מידע הערכה פולנית למודלים סמנטיקים פיצועיים', 'bo': 'compositional distributional semantics models'}
{'en': 'The paper presents a procedure of building an evaluation dataset. for the validation of compositional distributional semantics models estimated for languages other than English. The procedure generally builds on steps designed to assemble the SICK corpus, which contains pairs of English sentences annotated for semantic relatedness and entailment, because we aim at building a comparable dataset. However, the implementation of particular building steps significantly differs from the original SICK design assumptions, which is caused by both lack of necessary extraneous resources for an investigated language and the need for language-specific transformation rules. The designed procedure is verified on Polish, a fusional language with a relatively free word order, and contributes to building a Polish evaluation dataset. The resource consists of 10 K sentence pairs which are human-annotated for semantic relatedness and entailment. The dataset may be used for the evaluation of compositional distributional semantics models of Polish.', 'ar': 'تقدم الورقة إجراء لبناء مجموعة بيانات التقييم. للتحقق من صحة نماذج دلالات التوزيع التركيبية المقدرة للغات غير الإنجليزية. يعتمد الإجراء بشكل عام على الخطوات المصممة لتجميع مجموعة بيانات SICK ، والتي تحتوي على أزواج من الجمل الإنجليزية مشروحة للارتباط الدلالي والاستلزم ، لأننا نهدف إلى بناء مجموعة بيانات قابلة للمقارنة. ومع ذلك ، فإن تنفيذ خطوات بناء معينة يختلف اختلافًا كبيرًا عن افتراضات تصميم SICK الأصلية ، والتي تنتج عن نقص الموارد الخارجية اللازمة للغة التي تم فحصها والحاجة إلى قواعد التحويل الخاصة باللغة. يتم التحقق من الإجراء المصمم على اللغة البولندية ، وهي لغة اندماجية مع ترتيب كلمات مجاني نسبيًا ، ويساهم في بناء مجموعة بيانات تقييم بولندية. يتكون المورد من أزواج جمل 10K والتي تم شرحها بواسطة الإنسان من أجل الترابط الدلالي والاستلزم. يمكن استخدام مجموعة البيانات لتقييم نماذج دلالات التوزيع التركيبية للغة البولندية.', 'es': 'El artículo presenta un procedimiento para construir un conjunto de datos de evaluación para la validación de modelos de semántica distributiva compositiva estimados para idiomas distintos del inglés. El procedimiento generalmente se basa en los pasos diseñados para ensamblar el corpus SICK, que contiene pares de oraciones en inglés anotadas para la relación semántica y la implicación, porque nuestro objetivo es construir un conjunto de datos comparable. Sin embargo, la implementación de pasos de construcción particulares difiere significativamente de los supuestos de diseño originales de SICK, lo que se debe tanto a la falta de recursos extraños necesarios para un lenguaje investigado como a la necesidad de reglas de transformación específicas del idioma. El procedimiento diseñado se verifica en polaco, un idioma de fusión con un orden de palabras relativamente libre, y contribuye a crear un conjunto de datos de evaluación en polaco. El recurso consiste en 10K pares de oraciones que están anotadas por humanos para la relación semántica y la implicación. El conjunto de datos se puede utilizar para la evaluación de los modelos de semántica distributiva composicional del polaco.', 'pt': 'O artigo apresenta um procedimento de construção de um conjunto de dados de avaliação. para a validação de modelos de semântica distribucional composicional estimados para outros idiomas que não o inglês. O procedimento geralmente se baseia em etapas projetadas para montar o corpus SICK, que contém pares de sentenças em inglês anotadas para relação semântica e vinculação, porque visamos construir um conjunto de dados comparável. No entanto, a implementação de etapas de construção específicas difere significativamente das premissas de projeto originais da SICK, o que é causado tanto pela falta de recursos externos necessários para uma linguagem investigada quanto pela necessidade de regras de transformação específicas da linguagem. O procedimento projetado é verificado em polonês, uma língua fusional com uma ordem de palavras relativamente livre, e contribui para a construção de um conjunto de dados de avaliação polonês. O recurso consiste em 10 mil pares de frases que são anotados por humanos para relação semântica e vinculação. O conjunto de dados pode ser usado para a avaliação de modelos de semântica distribucional composicional do polonês.', 'fr': "L'article présente une procédure de construction d'un jeu de données d'évaluation pour la validation de modèles sémantiques distributionnels compositionnels estimés pour des langues autres que l'anglais. La procédure repose généralement sur des étapes conçues pour assembler le corpus SICK, qui contient des paires de phrases anglaises annotées pour la relation sémantique et l'implication, car nous visons à créer un ensemble de données comparable. Cependant, la mise en œuvre d'étapes de construction particulières diffère considérablement des hypothèses de conception SICK d'origine, ce qui est dû à la fois au manque de ressources externes nécessaires pour un langage étudié et à la nécessité de règles de transformation spécifiques au langage. La procédure conçue est vérifiée sur le polonais, une langue fusionnelle dont l'ordre des mots est relativement libre, et contribue à la création d'un ensemble de données d'évaluation polonais. La ressource se compose de 10 000 paires de phrases qui sont annotées par des humains pour la relation sémantique et l'implication. L'ensemble de données peut être utilisé pour l'évaluation de modèles sémantiques distributionnels compositionnels du polonais.", 'ja': '英語以外の言語で推定される構成分布意味論モデルの検証のための評価データセットを構築する手順を提示した。 この手順は、一般的に、意味的関連性と巻き込み性のために注釈された一対の英語の文章を含む病気のコーパスを組み立てるように設計されたステップに基づいています。なぜなら、私たちは比較可能なデータセットを構築することを目指しているからです。 しかしながら、特定の構築ステップの実装は、調査された言語に必要な外部リソースの欠如と、言語固有の変換ルールの必要性の両方によって引き起こされる、元の病気設計の仮定とは著しく異なる。 設計された手順は、比較的自由な語順を持つ融合言語であるポーランド語で検証され、ポーランド語評価データセットの構築に貢献します。 リソースは10 Kの文ペアで構成されており、人間が意味関連性と帰結のために注釈を付けています。 データセットは、ポーランド語の構成的分布意味論モデルの評価に使用され得る。', 'zh': '本文引构评估数据集。 以验英语外语言度布语义模形。 其间常立于组装 SICK 语料库步驿之上,其语料库为语义相关性、蕴涵注英语句对,以吾党为可较之数集也。 然特定构步骤之施,与初 SICK 设设殊异,盖言语乏要及特定言语转移之法然也。 设法波兰语(有对自由词序合语)验之,助构波兰语评数集。 资10K句对成,句对语义相关性内涵性。 其数集可于评估波兰语者为布语义模形。', 'ru': 'В работе представлена процедура построения оценочного набора данных. для валидации композиционно-распределительных семантических моделей, оцененных для языков, отличных от английского. Процедура, как правило, основывается на шагах, предназначенных для сборки БОЛЬНИЧНОГО корпуса, который содержит пары английских предложений, аннотированных для семантической взаимосвязи и влечения, потому что мы стремимся построить сопоставимый набор данных. Вместе с тем осуществление конкретных этапов строительства существенно отличается ОТ первоначальных предположений, положенных в основу проекта, что обусловлено как отсутствием необходимых посторонних ресурсов для исследуемого языка, так и необходимостью правил языковой трансформации. Разработанная процедура верифицирована на польском языке, фузиональном языке с относительно свободным порядком слов, и способствует созданию польского оценочного набора данных. Ресурс состоит из 10K пар предложений, которые аннотированы человеком для семантической связи и влечения. Набор данных может быть использован для оценки композиционно-распределительных семантических моделей польского языка.', 'hi': 'पेपर एक मूल्यांकन डेटासेट के निर्माण की एक प्रक्रिया प्रस्तुत करता है। अंग्रेजी के अलावा अन्य भाषाओं के लिए अनुमानित compositional distributional semantics मॉडल के सत्यापन के लिए। प्रक्रिया आम तौर पर बीमार कॉर्पस को इकट्ठा करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए चरणों पर आधारित होती है, जिसमें शब्दार्थ संबंधितता और अनिवार्यता के लिए एनोटेट किए गए अंग्रेजी वाक्यों के जोड़े होते हैं, क्योंकि हम एक तुलनीय डेटासेट का निर्माण करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हालांकि, विशेष निर्माण चरणों का कार्यान्वयन मूल बीमार डिजाइन मान्यताओं से काफी भिन्न है, जो जांच की गई भाषा के लिए आवश्यक बाहरी संसाधनों की कमी और भाषा-विशिष्ट परिवर्तन नियमों की आवश्यकता दोनों के कारण होता है। डिज़ाइन की गई प्रक्रिया पोलिश पर सत्यापित की जाती है, जो अपेक्षाकृत मुक्त शब्द क्रम के साथ एक संलयन भाषा है, और पोलिश मूल्यांकन डेटासेट के निर्माण में योगदान देती है। संसाधन में 10K वाक्य जोड़े होते हैं जो शब्दार्थ संबंधीता और अनिवार्यता के लिए मानव-एनोटेट किए जाते हैं। डेटासेट का उपयोग पोलिश के रचनात्मक वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल के मूल्यांकन के लिए किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar nós imeachta chun tacar sonraí meastóireachta a thógáil. do bhailíochtú samhlacha dáileacháin chomhdhéanaimh atá measta do theangacha seachas Béarla. Go ginearálta tógann an nós imeachta ar chéimeanna atá deartha chun an corpas SICK a chur le chéile, ina bhfuil péirí abairtí Béarla anótáilte maidir le gaolmhaireacht shéimeantach agus gabháil, toisc go bhfuil sé mar aidhm againn tacar sonraí inchomparáide a thógáil. Mar sin féin, tá difríocht shuntasach idir cur i bhfeidhm céimeanna tógála ar leith agus na buntoimhdí dearaidh SICK, rud is cúis leis an easpa acmhainní seachtracha riachtanacha do theanga imscrúdaithe agus an gá atá le rialacha claochlaithe a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga. Fíoraítear an nós imeachta deartha ar an bPolainnis, teanga chomhcheangailte a bhfuil ord focal sách saor in aisce aici, agus cuidíonn sé le tacar sonraí meastóireachta Polainnis a thógáil. Is éard atá san acmhainn ná péirí abairtí 10K atá anótáilte ag an duine le haghaidh gaolta agus eitice shéimeantach. Is féidir an tacar sonraí a úsáid chun samhlacha comhdhála de shéimeantaic na Polainne a mheas.', 'el': 'Η εργασία παρουσιάζει μια διαδικασία δημιουργίας ενός συνόλου δεδομένων αξιολόγησης. για την επικύρωση σύνθετων σημασιολογικών μοντέλων κατανομής που εκτιμώνται για γλώσσες άλλες από τα αγγλικά. Η διαδικασία γενικά βασίζεται σε βήματα που έχουν σχεδιαστεί για τη συναρμολόγηση του σώματος το οποίο περιέχει ζεύγη αγγλικών προτάσεων σχολιασμένα για σημασιολογική συσχέτιση και συμπερίληψη, επειδή στοχεύουμε στην οικοδόμηση ενός συγκρίσιμου συνόλου δεδομένων. Ωστόσο, η υλοποίηση συγκεκριμένων οικοδομικών βημάτων διαφέρει σημαντικά από τις αρχικές παραδοχές σχεδιασμού η οποία οφείλεται τόσο στην έλλειψη απαραίτητων εξωτερικών πόρων για μια διερευνημένη γλώσσα όσο και στην ανάγκη για γλωσσικούς κανόνες μετασχηματισμού. Η σχεδιασμένη διαδικασία επαληθεύεται στα πολωνικά, μια σύνθετη γλώσσα με σχετικά ελεύθερη σειρά λέξεων, και συμβάλλει στη δημιουργία ενός πολωνικού συνόλου δεδομένων αξιολόγησης. Ο πόρος αποτελείται από ζεύγη προτάσεων 10Κ τα οποία είναι σχολιασμένα από άνθρωπο για σημασιολογική συσχέτιση και εμπλοκή. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την αξιολόγηση σύνθετων σημασιολογικών μοντέλων κατανομής των πολωνικών.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja az értékelési adatok készítésének eljárását. az angol nyelven kívüli nyelvekre becsült kompozíciós eloszlási szemantikai modellek validálására. Az eljárás általában a SICK korpusz összeállítására irányuló lépésekre épül, amelyek angol mondatpárokat tartalmaznak szemantikai kapcsolattartásra és vonatkozásra jegyzetelve, mivel célunk egy hasonló adathalmaz létrehozása. Az egyes építési lépések megvalósítása azonban jelentősen eltér az eredeti SICK tervezési feltételezésektől, amelyeket mind a vizsgált nyelvhez szükséges idegen erőforrások hiánya, mind pedig a nyelvspecifikus átalakítási szabályok szükségessége okoz. A tervezett eljárás lengyel, viszonylag szabad szósorrendű, fúziós nyelven történik, és hozzájárul egy lengyel értékelési adatkészlet kialakításához. Az erőforrás 10K mondatpárokból áll, amelyek emberi-jegyzetekkel vannak ellátva a szemantikai kapcsolat és vonatkozás szempontjából. Az adatkészlet felhasználható lengyel kompozíciós eloszlási szemantikai modellek értékelésére.', 'ka': 'დაახლოების პროცექტურა, რომელიც განსაზღვრების მონაცემების საქაღალდეს. კომპოზიციონალური დისტრიბუციონალური სმენტიკის მოდელების გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, რომლებიც ინგლისური განსხვავებული ენებისთვის. პროცესია უბრალოდ შექმნილია SICK კორპუსს შემყვებისთვის, რომელსაც ანგლისური წესების ორი წესები, რომლებიც სიმენტიკური დაკავშირება და დაკავშირება, რადგან ჩვენ მინდომით შემყვებელი მო მაგრამ განსაკუთრებული შექმნის მომხმარება ძალიან განსხვავებულია ორივე განსაკუთრებული რესურსების გამოყენება, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული ენაზე და ენაზე განსაკუთრებული რესპორმაციის განსაკუთრებების ნსურაცი განსაზღვრებული პროცესტია პოლიქური სიტყვების შესახებ, ფუნციონალური ენაზე, რომელიც თავისუფალურად თავისუფალური სიტყვების შესახებ, და დამატება პოლიქ რესურსი არის 10K წესების ზოგი, რომლებიც ადამიანის ამონიტურებულია სემონტიკური დაკავშირება და დაკავშირება. მონაცემები შეიძლება გამოყენება პოლიქის კომპუზიციონალური სმენტიკური მოდელების შესახებ.', 'it': "Il documento presenta una procedura di costruzione di un set di dati di valutazione. per la convalida di modelli semantici distributivi compositivi stimati per lingue diverse dall'inglese. La procedura si basa generalmente su passaggi progettati per assemblare il corpus SICK, che contiene coppie di frasi inglesi annotate per relazione semantica e implicazione, perché miriamo a costruire un dataset comparabile. Tuttavia, l'implementazione di particolari fasi costruttive differisce significativamente dalle ipotesi progettuali originali di SICK, che è causata sia dalla mancanza di risorse estranee necessarie per un linguaggio indagato che dalla necessità di regole di trasformazione specifiche per il linguaggio. La procedura progettata è verificata sul polacco, una lingua fusionale con un ordine di parole relativamente libero, e contribuisce alla costruzione di un set di dati di valutazione polacco. La risorsa consiste di coppie di frasi 10K che sono annotate dall'uomo per relazione semantica e implicazione. Il dataset può essere utilizzato per la valutazione di modelli semantici distributivi compositivi della lingua polacca.", 'mk': 'The paper presents a procedure of building an evaluation dataset.  за валидација на моделите на композициска дистрибуционална семантика проценети за јазици кои не се англиски. Процедурата генерално се базира на чекори дизајнирани за собирање на СИК корпусот, кој содржи пари англиски реченици анотирани за семантична врска и вмешаност, бидејќи ние имаме за цел изградба споредлив податок. Сепак, спроведувањето на одредени градежни чекори значително се разликува од оригиналните претпоставувања за дизајн на SICK, кои се предизвикани од недостатокот на потребни надворешни ресурси за истражен јазик и потребата за правила за трансформација специфични за јазик Дизајнираната процедура е верификувана на полски јазик, фузионален јазик со релативно слободна наредба на зборови, и придонесува за изградба на полски набор податоци за проценка. Ресурсот се состои од парови од 10.000 реченици кои се анотирани за семантична врска и вмешаност. Податоците може да се користат за проценка на композиционалните семантични модели на полски.', 'kk': 'Қағаз бағалау деректер жиынын құру процедурын көрсетеді. ағылшыншадан басқа тілдер үшін бағалайтын композиционалық дистрибуторлық семантикалық моделдерін тексеру үшін. Бұл процедур кәдімгі SICK корпусын жинақтау үшін құрылған қадамдардан құрылады. Бұл біздің салыстырылған деректер жиынын құру үшін ағылшынша сөздердің екеуі бар. Бірақ құрастыру қадамдарының іске асыру үшін бастапқы SICK құрастыру қажеттерінен көбірек айырмашылық. Бұл тілді зерттеу үшін және тілді арнайы түрлендіру ережелерінің қажеттігі екеуі қажетт Құрастырылған процедура Польша тілінде, сәйкес бос сөздер ретінде біріктірілген тілді тексеріп, Польша бағалау деректер жиынын құру үшін көмектеседі. Ресурстың 10 К сөйлеменің екі бөлігі, бұл симантикалық қатынас және қатынас үшін адамға белгіленген. Деректер жиыны Польшадың композиционалық дистрибуторлық семантикалық моделдерін бағалау үшін қолданылады.', 'lt': 'The paper presents a procedure of building an evaluation dataset.  siekiant patvirtinti kompozicinius paskirstymo semantikos modelius, apskaičiuotus kitoms nei anglų kalboms. Procedūra paprastai grindžiama žingsniais, kuriais siekiama surinkti SICK corpus, kuriame yra dviejų anglų sakinių, užrašytų semantiniam ryšiui ir įtraukimui, nes mes siekiame sukurti palyginamą duomenų rinkinį. Tačiau konkrečių statybos etapų įgyvendinimas labai skiriasi nuo pradinių SICK projektavimo prielaidų, dėl kurių trūksta būtinų išorinių išteklių tiriamai kalbai ir dėl būtinybės taikyti konkrečiai kalbai skirtas pertvarkymo taisykles. Sukurta procedūra tikrinama lenkų kalba – santykinai nemokama žodžių tvarka – ir prisidedama prie Lenkijos vertinimo duomenų rinkinio kūrimo. Išteklius sudaro 10K sakinių poros, kurios yra žmogaus anotuotos semantiniam ryšiui ir įtraukimui. Duomenų rinkinys gali būti naudojamas Lenkijos sudėtinių paskirstymo semantikos modelių vertinimui.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan prosedur untuk membina set data penilaian. untuk pengesahihan model semantik distribusi komposisi diharapkan untuk bahasa lain selain bahasa Inggeris. Prosedur ini biasanya membina pada langkah yang direka untuk mengumpulkan SICK corpus, yang mengandungi pasangan kalimat Inggeris yang dicatat untuk hubungan semantik dan penyelesaian, kerana kita bertujuan untuk membina set data yang boleh dibandingkan. Namun, pelaksanaan langkah bangunan tertentu berbeza secara signifikan dari asumsi reka asli SICK, yang disebabkan oleh kedua-dua kekurangan sumber luar biasa yang diperlukan untuk bahasa yang diseliti dan keperluan untuk peraturan perubahan tertentu bahasa. Prosedur yang direka disahkan pada bahasa Polandia, bahasa fusional dengan perintah perkataan relatif bebas, dan berkontribusi untuk membina set data penilaian Polandia. Sumber terdiri dari pasangan kalimat 10K yang dicatat oleh manusia untuk hubungan semantik dan penyelesaian. Set data boleh digunakan untuk penilaian model semantik distribusi komposisi Polandia.', 'ml': 'പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പണിയുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയെ കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അല്ലാത്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഈ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d സാധാരണമായി സിസികെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ കൂട്ടുവാനുള്ള പടികളില്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാക്കുകളുണ്ട്. സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക എന്നാലും പ്രത്യേക കെട്ടിടത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് സിസികെ ഡിസൈനിങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്. അത് അന്വേഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d പോളിഷിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സ്വതന്ത്ര വാക്കിന്റെ ഉത്തരവുമുള്ള ഭാഷ, പോലീഷിന്റ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d 10K വാക്കിന്റെ ജോട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. അവയില്\u200d മനുഷ്യര്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും പ്രശ്നമില്ല The dataset may be used for the evaluation of compositional distributional semantics models of Polish.', 'mt': 'The paper presents a procedure of building an evaluation dataset.  għall-validazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ semantika distributtiva kompożittiva stmati għal lingwi għajr l-Ingliż. Il-proċedura ġeneralment tibni fuq passi ddisinjati biex jimmontaw is-SICK corpus, li fih par ta’ sentenzi Ingliżi annotati għal rabta semantika u involviment, għaliex għandna l-għan li nibnu sett ta’ dejta komparabbli. Madankollu, l-implimentazzjoni ta’ passi partikolari ta’ bini tvarja b’mod sinifikanti mis-suppożizzjonijiet oriġinali tad-disinn tas-SICK, li hija kkawżata kemm min-nuqqas ta’ riżorsi estranji meħtieġa għal lingwa investigata kif ukoll mill-ħtieġa għal regoli ta’ trasformazzjoni speċifiċi għall-lingwa. Il-proċedura ddisinjata hija vverifikata bil-Pollakk, lingwa fużjonali b’ordni relattivament ħielsa ta’ kliem, u tikkontribwixxi għall-bini ta’ sett ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni Pollakk. Ir-riżorsa tikkonsisti f’pari ta’ sentenzi ta’ 10K li huma annotati mill-bniedem għal rabta semantika u involviment. Is-sett tad-dejta jista’ jintuża għall-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudelli semantiċi distributtivi kompożittivi tal-Pollakk.', 'mn': 'Цааз нь үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх процедур илэрхийлж байна. Англи хэлээсээ бусад хэлэгтэй тооцоолж байгаа хэлбэрүүдийг тооцоолж чадна. Энэ процесс нь ихэвчлэн SICK корпус цуглуулахын тулд зориулагдсан алхам дээр байдаг. Энэ нь хэдэн англи хэллэгүүдийг зэрэг ихэвчлэн холбогдолтой байдаг. Учир нь бид харьцуулагдах өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх зорилго юм. Гэвч нарийн барилгын тодорхой шалтгаануудын үйлдвэрлэл нь эхний SICK дизайны таамаглалтаас хамааралтай өөрчлөгдөж байна. Энэ нь судалгааны хэл болон хэл тодорхой өөрчлөлтийн шаардлагатай гадаад нөөц боломжгүй байдаг. Загварчлалтай процедур Польшийн хэл, харьцангуй үнэгүй үг дарааллаар нэгтгэх хэл, Польшийн үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн санг бүтээхэд тусалдаг. Бүтээгдэхүүнд 10 K өгүүлбэрийн хоёр нь хүн төрөлхтний холбоотой байдаг. Өгөгдлийн санг Польшийн биеийн хуваарилалтын семантик загварын үнэлгээнд ашиглаж болно.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono procedurę budowy zbioru danych oceniających. do walidacji kompozycyjnych modeli semantycznych szacowanych dla języków innych niż angielski. Procedura ta opiera się zazwyczaj na krokach przeznaczonych do złożenia korpusu SICK, który zawiera pary zdań angielskich adnotacji pod kątem związku semantycznego i implikacji, ponieważ dążymy do zbudowania porównywalnego zbioru danych. Jednak realizacja poszczególnych etapów budowlanych znacząco różni się od oryginalnych założeń projektowych SICK, co jest spowodowane zarówno brakiem niezbędnych zasobów obcych dla badanego języka, jak i potrzebą stosowania specyficznych reguł transformacji językowej. Zaprojektowana procedura została zweryfikowana na języku polskim, języku fusjonalnym o stosunkowo wolnej kolejności słów, i przyczynia się do budowania polskiego zbioru danych oceniających. Zasób składa się z 10K par zdań, które są anotowane przez człowieka pod kątem semantycznego powiązania i implikacji. Zestaw danych może być wykorzystywany do oceny kompozycyjnych modeli semantycznych dystrybucyjnych języka polskiego.', 'no': 'Papiret viser ein prosedyr for å bygge eit evalueringsdataset. for å validera komposisjonelle semantiske modeller som er anslått for språk andre enn engelsk. Prosedyren bygger generelt på steg designert for å samla SICK-korpusen, som inneheld par engelsk setningar som er merkt for semantisk relasjon og innstillingar, fordi vi må bygge ei sammenlignbar datasett. Dette er imidlertid utføringen av spesielle byggingssteg betydelig forskjeller frå den opprinnelige SICK-design-assumpsjonane, som følgjer både manglar nødvendige ekstra ressursar for eit forsøkt språk og nødvendighet for språksspesifikke transformasjonsregular. Den oppretta prosedyren er verifisert på Polsk, ein fusjonspråk med relativt fri ordrekkefølgje, og bidrar til å bygge eit polsk evalueringsdataset. Ressursen inneheld av 10K setningsmar som er menneskelig markert for semantisk relasjon og innstillingar. Datasettet kan brukast for evaluering av komposisjonelle distribusjonelle semantiske modeller i Polsk.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă o procedură de construire a unui set de date de evaluare. pentru validarea modelelor semantice distribuționale compoziționale estimate pentru alte limbi decât engleza. Procedura se bazează, în general, pe pași meniți să asambleze corpusul SICK, care conține perechi de propoziții în limba engleză adnotate pentru relație semantică și implicare, deoarece ne propunem să construim un set de date comparabil. Cu toate acestea, implementarea anumitor etape de construcție diferă semnificativ de ipotezele inițiale de proiectare SICK, care este cauzată atât de lipsa resurselor străine necesare pentru un limbaj investigat, cât și de necesitatea unor reguli de transformare specifice limbajului. Procedura proiectată este verificată pe limba poloneză, o limbă fuzională cu o ordine relativ liberă de cuvinte, și contribuie la construirea unui set de date de evaluare poloneză. Resursa constă din perechi de propoziții 10K care sunt adnotate om pentru relație semantică și implicare. Setul de date poate fi utilizat pentru evaluarea modelelor semantice distribuționale compoziționale din limba poloneză.', 'so': 'Qoraalka warqaddu wuxuu soo bandhigaa baaritaanka dhisidda kaartaynta. si loo xaqiijiyo tusaalaha qayb-qaybinta oo lagu qiimeeyo luuqadaha aan ingiriisiga ahayn. Xiriirku wuxuu ku qoraa tallaabooyin lagu qorayo in lagu soo ururiyo SICK corpus, kaas oo ku qoran erayo Ingiriis ah oo ku qoran isku xiriir iyo cilmi la’aan, sababtoo ah waxaannu ku talo galaynaa dhismo sawir u eg. Si kastaba ha ahaatee in la soo dejiyo tallaabooyin gaar ah uu si weyn u kala duwan yahay malaha asalka SICK, taas oo sababtay baahida labadooda maalmood oo aad u baahan tahay in luqada la baahan yahay iyo in loo baahan yahay sharciyada beddelinta ee luuqada cayiman. Dhacdooyinka la qoray waxaa lagu xaqiijiyey booliska, taasoo ku qoran luqad fudud oo ku qoran amar lacag la’aan oo hadal ah, wuxuuna ku caawiyaa dhisidda kooxda qiimeynta booliska. Weydka waxaa ka mid ah 10K qeyb, kuwaas oo dadka la dhibaatayso xiriirka lammaanka iyo qofka aan la aqoonin. Rugta macluumaadka waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa qiimeynta noocyada qeybinta ee booliska.', 'sv': 'I uppsatsen presenteras ett f철rfarande f철r att bygga en utv채rderingsdata. f철r validering av kompositionsf철rdelningsm채ssiga semantiska modeller ber채knade f철r andra spr책k 채n engelska. F철rfarandet bygger generellt p책 steg avsedda att sammanst채lla SICK-korpusen, som inneh책ller par engelska meningar kommenterade f철r semantisk anknytning och involvering, eftersom vi str채var efter att bygga en j채mf철rbar dataupps채ttning. Genomf철randet av s채rskilda byggnadssteg skiljer sig dock avsev채rt fr책n SICK:s ursprungliga konstruktionsantaganden, vilket beror b책de p책 bristen p책 n철dv채ndiga fr채mmande resurser f철r ett unders철kt spr책k och behovet av spr책kspecifika transformationsregler. Den planerade proceduren verifieras p책 polska, ett fusionsspr책k med en relativt fri ordordning, och bidrar till att bygga en polsk utv채rderingsdata. Resursen best책r av 10K meningspar som 채r m채nskliga-kommenterade f철r semantisk anknytning och involvering. Dataupps채ttningen kan anv채ndas f철r utv채rdering av kompositionsf철rdelningsm채ssiga semantiska modeller av polska.', 'sr': 'Novinar predstavlja proceduru izgradnje podataka za procjenu. za validaciju kompozicionalnih semantičkih modela koji procjenjuju za jezike osim engleskog. Procedura se uglavnom nalazi na koracima dizajniranim za okupljanje korpusa SICK-a, koja sadrži par engleskih rečenica koje su annotirane za semantičku vezu i zadovoljstvo, jer ciljamo da izgradimo komparabilnu setu podataka. Međutim, provedba određenih koraka zgrade značajno se razlikuje od originalnih pretpostavki o dizajnu SICK-a, koji je uzrokovan nedostatkem neophodnih vanzemaljskih resursa za istraženi jezik i potrebu za pravila transformacije jezika specifičnih jezika. Dizajnirana procedura se provjerava na poljskom, kombinacijskom jeziku sa relativno slobodnim riječima, i doprinosi izgradnji poljskog seta podataka za procjenu. Resurska se sastoji od par rečenica od 10 K, koje su ljudske annotirane zbog semantičke odnose i zadovoljstva. Podaci se mogu koristiti za procjenu kompozicionalnih semantičkih modela poljskog distribucije.', 'si': 'පත්තරය පෙනුවෙන් විශේෂණ දත්ත සැටියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වලින් වෙනස් භාෂාවට විශේෂ සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් විශේෂ කරගන්න. සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය නිර්මාණය කරනවා SICK කොර්පුස් එක්කන් කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වචන දෙකක් තියෙනවා සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සැලසුම්  නමුත්, විශේෂයෙන් ගොඩනැගීම් පටන් ගැනීමේ විශේෂ පටන් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් SICK සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපනය අවස්ථාවක් වග සැකසුම් විධානය පොලිෂ් වලින්, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නිදහස් වචන ක්\u200dරමයක් තියෙන භාෂාවක්, පොලිෂ් විශ්ලේෂණ සම්බන්ධයෙන් 10 K වාක්ෂා දෙකක් තියෙනවා, මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචා දත්ත සෙට් පෝලිෂ් වල සංවිධාන විශාල විතරයේ සෙමැන්ටික් මෝඩේල්ස් වලට භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'ta': 'காகிதத்தில் ஒரு மதிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்க ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை அளிக்கிறது. ஆங்கிலம் தவிர மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கு எண்ணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள கூட்டு பங்கீட்டு பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகளின் செல்லுபட இந்த செயல்கூறு SICK கார்ப்ஸை ஒன்று சேர்க்க வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட படிகளில் கட்டும், அதில் பொதுவான இணைப்பு மற்றும் அறிவில்லாத சொற்களை கொண்டு இரு ஜோடி ஆங்கிலம ஆயினும், சிறப்பு கட்டும் படிகள் செயல்படுத்தல் முதல் SICK வடிவமைப்பு எண்ணங்களிலிருந்து மாறுபடுகிறது, இது தேவைப்படும் மொழிக்கு தேவைப்பட்ட மொழிக்கு மா வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு போலிஷ் மீது சரிபார்க்கப்படுகிறது, ஒரு சார்ந்த இலவச வார்த்தை வரிசையுடன், மற்றும் ஒரு போலிஷ் மதிப்பு  மூலத்தில் 10K வாக்கியத்தின் ஜோடி இருக்கிறது இது பெம்மென்டிக் தொடர்பு மற்றும் அறிவில்லாமல் மனிதன் துக்கப்பட்டு போலிஷின் கூட்டு பங்கீட்டு semantics மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான தகவல் அமைப்பு பயன்படுத்தலாம்.', 'ur': 'کاغذ ایک ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے. انگلیسی کے بغیر زبانوں کے مطابق مضبوطی تقسیم کرنے کے لئے مطابق ہے. اس پردازش کی عمومی طراحی کی جاری ہے کہ SICK کورپوس کو جمع کرنے کے لئے طراحی کیا گیا ہے، جس میں انگلیسی جماعت کے جوڑے ہیں جن میں سمantic relatedness and entailment کے ذریعہ مطلع کیا گیا ہے، کیونکہ ہم ایک مقایسہ ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں. However, the implementation of specific building steps is significantly different from the original SICK design assumptions, which is caused by both necessary extraneous resources for a investigated language and the need for language-specific transformation rules. طراحی پردازی پولیش پر ثابت کی جاتی ہے، ایک پیچیدگی زبان کی نسبت آزاد کلمات کے ساتھ، اور ایک پولیش ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے اضافہ کرتی ہے. یہ منبع 10 کیلومتر جماعت جوڑوں میں سے ہے جن کو انسان کی تعلق و تعلق کے لئے آگاہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ڈاٹ سٹ پولیش کی کمپیشن تقسیم سیمانٹیکس موڈل کی ارزیابی کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Qog\xa0Ľoz ta\xa0ľminlovchi ma\xa0ľlumot bazasini yaratish jarayoni ko\xa0Ľrsatiladi. o'z tildan boshqa ingliz tildan hisoblangan tarqatish semantik modellarini to\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri qilish uchun. Ushbu dastur, SICK corpusni birlashtirish uchun yaratilgan foydalanadi. Bu bir necha ingliz tilida semantik bog\xa0Ľ'liq va ilmiy so'zlar mavjud. Chunki biz bir qisqa ma\xa0ľlumot tizimini yaratishni istaymiz. Lekin foydalanuvchi qatlamni bajarish asl SICK dizayning asl g'oyalaridan juda ajoyib o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Bu bir xil tilning qidirish uchun juda ekstra narsalar yo\xa0Ľq, va tilni boshqa o'zgartirish qoidalari uchun kerak. Dizatilgan vazifalar Polish tilidan tasdiqlanmoqda, qiziqarli bo\xa0Ľsh so\xa0Ľz tartibi bilan foydalanadi, va Polish qiymati ma\xa0ľlumotlarini yaratishga qo\xa0Ľllaydi. Manba 10,000 so'zlardan qo'l bo'ladi. Bu narsa semantik bog\xa0Ľlamalari va entailmiy narsa uchun qo'llangan. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy đưa ra một quy trình xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu đánh giá. để xác định các mô hình phân phối phân chia theo ngữ pháp được đánh giá cho ngôn ngữ khác ngoài tiếng Anh. Thủ tục thông thường dựa trên các bước được thiết kế để ráp tập hợp tập thể SK, chứa các câu chữ Anh ghi chú cho quan hệ và giao tiếp theo theo ngữ nghĩa, vì chúng tôi nhắm vào việc xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu tương đối. Tuy nhiên, sự tiến hành của những bước xây dựng khác biệt đáng kể với các giả định thiết kế SK gốc, gây ra bởi sự thiếu hụt nguồn lực thừa kế cần thiết cho một ngôn ngữ đã được điều tra và sự cần phải có quy định chuyển dạng ngôn ngữ cụ thể. Thủ tục được thiết kế được kiểm tra bằng tiếng Ba Lan, một ngôn ngữ liên lưu với một lệnh từ tương đối tự do, và góp phần xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu đánh giá Ba Lan. Tài nguyên bao gồm các cặp câu 10K được ghi chú theo ngữ pháp và tính cách. Bộ dữ liệu có thể được dùng để đánh giá các mô hình phân phối giao thức của chế độ Ba Lan.', 'da': 'Dokumentet præsenterer en procedure for opbygning af et evalueringsdatasæt. til validering af kompositionsdistributionsmæssige semantiske modeller anslået for andre sprog end engelsk. Proceduren bygger generelt på trin designet til at samle SICK korpus, som indeholder par engelske sætninger kommenteret for semantisk relaterethed og involvering, fordi vi sigter mod at opbygge et sammenligneligt datasæt. Gennemførelsen af bestemte bygningstrin adskiller sig imidlertid væsentligt fra de oprindelige SICK-designantagelser, hvilket skyldes både manglen på nødvendige fremmede ressourcer til et undersøgt sprog og behovet for sprogspecifikke transformationsregler. Den designede procedure er verificeret på polsk, et fusionssprog med en relativt fri ordrækkefølge, og bidrager til at opbygge et polsk evalueringsdatasæt. Ressourcen består af 10K sætningspar, som er menneskelige-annoterede for semantisk relaterethed og involvering. Datasættet kan anvendes til evaluering af kompositionelle distributionsmæssige semantiske modeller af polsk.', 'bg': 'Статията представя процедура за изграждане на набор от данни за оценка. за валидиране на композиционни разпределителни семантични модели, оценени за езици, различни от английски. Процедурата обикновено се основава на стъпки, предназначени за сглобяване на корпуса който съдържа двойки английски изречения, анотирани за семантична свързаност и обвързване, тъй като ние се стремим да изградим сравним набор от данни. Въпреки това изпълнението на конкретни стъпки в строителството значително се различава от първоначалните предположения за проектиране, което се дължи както на липсата на необходимите външни ресурси за изследвания език, така и на необходимостта от специфични за езика правила за трансформация. Проектираната процедура се проверява на полски език, език със сравнително свободен словен ред, и допринася за изграждането на полски набор от данни за оценка. Ресурсът се състои от 10К двойки изречения, които са анотирани с човека за семантична свързаност и обвързване. Наборът от данни може да се използва за оценка на композиционни дистрибуционни семантични модели на полски език.', 'hr': 'Novinar predstavlja postupak izgradnje podataka za procjenu. za potvrdu kompozicijskih distribucijskih semantičkih modela procijenjenih za jezike osim engleskog. Procedura se općenito osnova na koracima dizajniranim za okupljanje korpusa SICK-a, koja sadrži par engleskih rečenica koje su izjavljene za semantičku odnošenost i zadovoljstvo, jer ciljamo izgraditi usporedbenu kompletu podataka. Međutim, provedba određenih koraka zgrade značajno se razlikuje od originalnih pretpostavki o dizajnu SICK-a, što je uzrokovalo nedostatak neophodnih vanzemaljskih resursa za istraženi jezik i potreba za pravilima transformacije jezika specifičnih jezika. Provjerena je postupak na poljskom, kombinacijskom jeziku s relativno slobodnim riječima, i doprinosi izgradnji poljskog seta podataka za procjenu. Resurska se sastoji od par rečenica od 10 K, koje su ljudske annotirane zbog semantičke odnose i zadovoljstva. Podaci se mogu koristiti za procjenu kompozicijskih distribucijskih semantičkih modela poljskih.', 'nl': 'Het document presenteert een procedure voor het opbouwen van een evaluatiedataset. voor de validatie van compositionele distributionele semantische modellen geschat voor andere talen dan Engels. De procedure bouwt over het algemeen voort op stappen die zijn ontworpen om het SICK-corpus te assembleren, dat paren Engelse zinnen bevat die geannoteerd zijn op semantische verwantheid en implicatie, omdat we streven naar het bouwen van een vergelijkbare dataset. De uitvoering van bepaalde bouwstappen verschilt echter aanzienlijk van de oorspronkelijke SICK ontwerpaannames, wat wordt veroorzaakt door zowel het ontbreken van noodzakelijke externe middelen voor een onderzochte taal als de noodzaak van taalspecifieke transformatieregels. De ontworpen procedure is geverifieerd op Pools, een fusionele taal met een relatief vrije woordvolgorde, en draagt bij aan het opbouwen van een Poolse evaluatiedataset. De bron bestaat uit 10K zinnenparen die door mensen geannoteerd zijn voor semantische verwantschap en implicatie. De dataset kan worden gebruikt voor de evaluatie van compositionele distributionele semantische modellen van het Pools.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag stellt ein Verfahren zur Erstellung eines Evaluationsdatensatzes vor. zur Validierung kompositorischer Verteilungsmodelle, die für andere Sprachen als Englisch geschätzt werden. Das Verfahren baut in der Regel auf Schritten auf, die entwickelt wurden, um das SICK-Korpus zusammenzustellen, das Paare englischer Sätze enthält, die für semantische Verwandtschaft und Einbeziehung annotiert sind, da wir darauf abzielen, einen vergleichbaren Datensatz zu erstellen. Die Umsetzung einzelner Bauschritte unterscheidet sich jedoch deutlich von den ursprünglichen SICK-Designannahmen, was sowohl auf fehlende Fremdressourcen für eine untersuchte Sprache als auch auf die Notwendigkeit sprachspezifischer Transformationsregeln zurückzuführen ist. Das entwickelte Verfahren wurde auf Polnisch verifiziert, einer Fusionssprache mit relativ freier Wortreihenfolge, und trägt zum Aufbau eines polnischen Evaluationsdatensatzes bei. Die Ressource besteht aus 10K Satzpaaren, die human-annotiert sind, um semantische Verwandtschaft und Einbeziehung zu gewährleisten. Der Datensatz kann für die Bewertung kompositorischer Verteilungsmodelle des Polnischen verwendet werden.', 'fa': 'کاغذ یک روش ساختن یک مجموعه داده ارزیابی را نشان می دهد. برای تایید کردن مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک\u200cهای ترکیب سازی برای زبانهای غیر از انگلیسی ارزیابی می\u200cشود. این روش عمومی روی قدم\u200cهای طراحی برای جمع کردن کورپوس SICK ساخته می\u200cشود که در آن دو جمله\u200cای از جمله\u200cهای انگلیسی است که برای رابطه\u200cهای semantic و اراده\u200cای مشخص شده است، زیرا ما هدف داریم به ساختن یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقایسه. ولی عملکرد قدم های ساختمان خاصی از فرضیه های طراحی اصلی SICK متفاوت است که به دلیل ناتوانی منابع خارجی لازم برای یک زبان تحقیق شده و نیازی برای قوانین تغییر دهنده خاص زبان وجود دارد. این روش طراحی در لهستان، یک زبان ترکیب با یک دستور نسبتا آزاد کلمه است و به ساختن یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارزیابی لهستان کمک می\u200cکند. منابع از جفت\u200cهای جمله ۱۰ کیلومتر است که برای ارتباط و ارتباط به انسان نشان داده می\u200cشوند. این مجموعه داده\u200cها ممکن است برای ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک\u200cهای تهیه\u200cشده\u200cای از لهستان استفاده شود.', 'ko': '본고는 평가 데이터 집합을 구축하는 과정을 소개했다.비영어 언어의 성분 분포 의미 모델을 검증하는 데 쓰인다.이 과정은 일반적으로 병태 자료 라이브러리를 조립하는 데 사용되는 절차를 설계하는 데 사용된다. 병태 자료 라이브러리는 쌍의 영어 문장을 포함하고 이 문장들은 의미의 관련성과 함축성으로 표기된다. 왜냐하면 우리의 목표는 비교 가능한 데이터 집합을 구축하는 것이기 때문이다.그러나 특정한 건축 절차의 실시는 최초의 병적인 설계 가설과 현저한 차이가 존재한다. 이것은 연구한 언어의 필요한 외부 자원이 부족하고 특정한 언어의 전환 규칙이 필요하기 때문이다.디자인된 프로그램은 폴란드어에서 검증되었다. 폴란드어는 어순이 상대적으로 자유로운 융합 언어로 폴란드어 평가 데이터 집합을 구축하는 데 도움이 된다.이 자원은 인간이 주석한 의미에 연관되고 내포된 10K개의 문장 쌍으로 구성돼 있다.이 데이터 집합은 폴란드어의 성분-분포어의 모델을 평가하는 데 쓰일 수 있다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan prosedur membangun dataset evaluasi. untuk validasi model semantik distribusi komposisi yang diharapkan untuk bahasa lain selain bahasa Inggris. Prosedur biasanya dibangun pada langkah yang direncanakan untuk mengumpulkan SICK corpus, yang mengandung sepasang kalimat Inggris yang dicatat untuk hubungan semantis dan keterlibatan, karena kita bertujuan untuk membangun set data yang dapat dibandingkan. Namun, implementasi langkah-langkah pembinaan tertentu sangat berbeda dari asumsi desain asli SICK, yang disebabkan oleh kekurangan sumber daya luar negeri yang diperlukan untuk bahasa yang diselidiki dan kebutuhan untuk aturan transformasi spesifik bahasa. Prosedur yang direncanakan dipastikan dalam bahasa Polandia, bahasa fusional dengan perintah kata relatif bebas, dan berkontribusi untuk membangun dataset evaluasi Polandia. Sumber daya terdiri dari pasangan kalimat 10K yang dicatat manusia untuk hubungan semantis dan keterlibatan. Set data dapat digunakan untuk evaluasi komposisi model semantik distribusi Polandia.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaleta mchakato wa kujenga seti ya taarifa za uchunguzi. kwa uhakikishaji wa mifano ya usambazaji wa mikutano inayokadiriwa kwa lugha nyingine isipokuwa Kiingereza. Utaratibu huo unajenga kwa ujumla katika hatua zinazolengwa kukusanya makampuni ya SICK, ambayo ina sentensi mbili za Kiingereza zinazozungumzia uhusiano wa kimapenzi na wasiofahamu, kwa sababu tunakusudia kujenga seti inayofanana na taarifa. Hata hivyo, utekelezaji wa hatua maalum zinatofautiana na dhana za awali za SICK, ambazo zinasababishwa na ukosefu wa rasilimali zinazohitajika kwa lugha za uchunguzi na mahitaji ya sheria za mabadiliko ya lugha maalum. Mradi wa kutengenezwa umethibitishwa kwa Polish, lugha yenye utaratibu wa bure wa maneno, na unachangia kujenga taarifa za uchunguzi wa Polish. Chanzo hilo ni pamoja na wanandoa wa hukumu 10K ambazo zinaudhibishwa kwa binadamu kwa uhusiano wa kimapenzi na wasiofahamika. Taarifa hizo zinaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutathmini mifano ya usambazaji wa mfumo wa mifano ya kisiasa.', 'am': 'የፕሬዝዳንት ዋናው ዳታዎችን ለመሥራት ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በቋንቋዎች ላይ ከንግግሊዝኛ ሌላ የተቆጠሩ የክፍለ ስምናሲ ሞዴላዎችን ለማስተካከል ነው፡፡ ፕሮጀክቱ በጠቅላላ የSICK ኮርፓስ ለመሰብሰብ በተለየ ደረጃዎች ላይ ይሠራል፡፡ በዚህ ውስጥ ለsemantic ግንኙነት እና ማወቅ የኢንግሊዝኛ ቃላት እና ስለማያስተሳሰቡ ሁለት ዓይነቶች የኢንጂል ቃላት ይኖራል፡፡ ነገር ግን የተለየ የግንኙነት እርምጃዎች መፈጸም ከቀድሞ SICK አካሄድ የተለየ ነው፤ ይህም በተመረጠው ቋንቋ እና የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-specific ለውጥ ሥርዓቶች እንዲያስፈልጋቸው የግድ ሀብት ጥቅም ሆኖአል፡፡ የተፈጠረው ሥርዓት የፖሊስ ቋንቋ፣ የነፃ ቃላት ትእዛዝ፣ የፖሊስ አካውንት ዳታ መሠረት ያበረታል፡፡ The resource consists of 10K sentence pairs which are human-annotated for semantic relatedness and entailment.  የዳታ ሳጥን የፖሊስ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Gazeta paraqet një procedurë për ndërtimin e një grupi të dhënash vlerësimi. për vlerësimin e modeleve të semantikës përbërëse shpërndarëse të vlerësuara për gjuhë të tjera përveç anglisht. Procedura në përgjithësi mbështetet në hapa të dizajnuara për të mbledhur SICK corpus, i cili përmban dy fjalime angleze të anotuara për lidhje semantike dhe përfshirje, sepse synojmë të ndërtojmë një set të dhënash të krahasueshme. Megjithatë, zbatimi i hapave të veçantë të ndërtimit ndryshon ndjeshëm nga supozimet origjinale të dizajnit SICK, të cilat shkaktohen si nga mungesa e burimeve të nevojshme të jashtme për një gjuhë të hetuar dhe nevoja për rregulla të transformimit specifik gjuhës. Procedura e projektuar verifikohet në polak, një gjuhë fuzionale me një rend relativisht të lirë fjalësh dhe kontribuon në ndërtimin e një grupi të dhënash të vlerësimit polak. Përdorimi përbëhet nga dy fjalë 10K që janë shënuar nga njerëzit për lidhje semantike dhe përfshirje. The dataset may be used for the evaluation of compositional distributional semantics models of Polish.', 'af': "Die papier stel 'n prosedure van 'n evalueringsdatastel te bou. vir die geldigheid van samenskaplike verspreidingssemantieke-modelles wat gespesifiseer word vir tale ander as Engels. Die prosedure bou algemeen op stappe ontwerp om die SICK korpus te samel, wat bevat paar Engelse setings wat vir semantiese verhouding en verhouding aangeteken is, omdat ons doen om 'n vergelykbare datastel te bou. Maar die implementasie van bepaalde boustappe is betekeurig verskillende van die oorspronklike SICK-ontwerp aanvaardes, wat veroorsaak word deur beide gebrek van nodige eksterne hulpbronne vir 'n ondersoekte taal en die behoefte vir taal-spesifieke transformasie reëls. Die ontwerp prosedure is bevestig op Poolse, 'n afsonderlike taal met 'n relativief vry woord volgorde en bydra by 'n Poolse evalueringsdatastel te bou. Die hulpbron bestaan van 10K setpunt paar wat menslike-notasie is vir semantiese verhouding en verhouding. Die datastel kan gebruik word vir die evaluering van komponensiese verspreidingssemantieke modele van Poles.", 'tr': 'Kagyzyň deňlenme datasyny gurmanyň bir prosedüsini görkezýär. Iňlislerden başga diller üçin hasaplanýan aýratyn semantik nusgalaryny barlamak üçin. Bu prosedür umumy SICK korpusyny ýygnamak üçin tasarlanýan adımlarda inşa edýär. Bu semantik baglanylyk we çykyşlyk üçin sözlän iňlisçe sözleriň çift sanyny barýar, sebäbi biz hoñlaýyşlyk bir veri setini guramak amaçlandyrys. Ýöne, beýleki bina adımlaryň implementasy original SICK dizayn pikirlerinden has baglanşygynyň üýtgetmegine meňzeýär. Bu diňe soraglanylan dil üçin gerekli taze resurslaryň ýok bolmagyna we dilleriň spesifik terjime kararlarynyň gerekli bolmagyna sebäbi. Bu tasarlanmış prosedür Polonýada, relativ boş söz düzeni bilen birleştirilen bir dil we Polonýa baýramçylygy düzenlemek üçin kömekleýär. Ressurat semantik baglanyşyk we çykyş üçin hasaplanýan 10K sözlem çizmesi bar. Maglumat setirini Polonýanyň çykyş daýlamak semantik nusgalarynyň çykarmak üçin ullanýar.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է գնահատման տվյալների համակարգի կառուցման գործընթացը: որպեսզի ստուգեն այլ լեզուների, քան անգլերենը, բաշխված բաշխման սեմանտիկայի մոդելները: Այս գործընթացը սովորաբար հիմնված է SICK-ի կորպուսի հավաքավորման աստիճանների վրա, որոնք պարունակում են երկու անգլերեն նախադասություններ, որոնք գրված են սեմանտիկ կապվածության և ներգրավման համար, քանի որ մենք նպատակում ենք կառուցել համեմատական տվյալներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, որոշակի կառուցվածքային քայլերի իրականացումը կարևոր տարբերվում է սկզբնական SICK-ի դիզայնի ենթադրություններից, որոնք պատճառ են երկու անհրաժեշտ օտար ռեսուրսների բացակայությունից ուսումնասիրելի լեզվի համար, ինչպես նաև լեզ Նախագծված գործընթացը ստուգում է պոլանդական լեզուն, որը միանգամայն ազատ բառերի կարգով է, և օգնում է ստեղծել պոլանդական գնահատման տվյալների համակարգ: Այս ռեսուրսը կազմված է 10K նախադասությունների զույգերից, որոնք մարդու համար գրված են սեմանտիկ կապվածության և ներգրավման համար: Տվյալների համակարգը կարող է օգտագործվել պոլանդական բաշխման սեմանտիկայի բաղադրական մոդելների գնահատման համար:', 'az': "Kağıt değerlendirmə verilənləri inşa etmək üçün bir prosedü göstərir. İngilizdən başqa dillər üçün müəyyən edilmiş müxtəlif dağıtım semantik modellərinin təsdiqlənməsi üçün. Bu prosedür genellikle SICK korpusu birləşdirmək üçün hazırlanmış adımlar üzerində inşa edir. Bu, semantik bağlantılıq və məqsədilə bildirilən İngilizce cümlələrinin çift olması barəsindədir, çünki biz müqayisədə verilən qurmaq istəyirik. Lakin, bəzi inşaat adımlarının istifadəsi ilk SICK dizayn assumplərindən çox müxtəlif fərqli idi, ki, araşdırılmış dil üçün və dil müəyyən dəyişiklik kurallarının ihtiyacı olan hər ikisinin istifadə edilməsi üçün istifadə edilən extra resurslar yoxdur. Tasarlanmış prosedür Polonya təsdiqlənir, çox boş söz əmri ilə birləşdirilmiş bir dil və Polonya değerlendirmə verilən qurğuları inşa edər. Məlumat 10 K cümləlik çiftləridir ki, semantik bağlılığı və çətinlikləri üçün insan şəkilində yazılmışdır. Veri qurğuları Polonya'nın kompozisyonal dağıtıcı semantik modellerinin değerlendirməsi üçün istifadə edilə bilər.", 'bn': 'কাগজটি একটি মূল্যায়নের ডাটাসেট বানানোর প্রক্রিয়া উপস্থাপন করেছে। ইংরেজি ছাড়া অন্য ভাষার জন্য হিসেবে বিতরণের সেমেন্টিক মডেল বৈধ করার জন্য। এই প্রক্রিয়া সাধারণত সিসিকে কোর্পাস সম্মুখীন করার জন্য নির্মিত পদক্ষেপের উপর তৈরি করে, যার মধ্যে সেম্পেন্টিক সম্পর্ক এবং বিজ্ঞানের জন্যে বেশ কয়েকটি ই তবে বিশেষ বিল্ডিং পদক্ষেপ প্রয়োজনীয় ভাষার জন্য অনুসন্ধানের জন্য এবং ভাষার নির্দিষ্ট পরিবর্তনের নিয়মের প্রয়োজনীয় প্রয়োজনীয় সম্পদের অভাব। The designed procedure is verified on Polish, a fusional language with a relatively free word order, and contributes to building a Polish evaluation dataset.  এই সম্পদের মধ্যে ১০০০০ কারাদণ্ডের জোড়া আছে যারা সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক এবং বিজ্ঞানের জন্য মানুষের বিরক্তিকর। পোলিশের সেম্যান্টিক মডেলের মূল্যের জন্য ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করা যাবে।', 'ca': "El paper presenta un procediment de construcció d'un conjunt de dades d'evaluació. per a la validació de models semàntics distribucionals compositius estimats per altres llengües que no l'anglès. El procediment es basa generalment en pas dissenyats per assemblar el corpus SICK, que conté parells de frases angleses anotats per relació semàntica i involucració, perquè volem construir un conjunt de dades comparable. No obstant això, la implementació de passes concrets de construcció difereix significativament de les suposicions originals del disseny SICK, que es produeix tant per la falta de recursos extraneos necessaris per a una llengua investigada com per la necessitat de normes de transformació específices per a una llengua. El procediment dissenyat es verifica en polac, un llenguatge fusional amb un ordre de paraules relativament lliure, i contribueix a construir un conjunt de dades d'evaluació polac. El recurso consisteix en parells de frases de 10.000 que són anotats per relació semàntica i involucració. El conjunt de dades pot ser utilitzat per a l'evaluació de models semàntics distribucionals compositius de polonès.", 'bs': 'Novinar predstavlja proceduru izgradnje podataka za procjenu. za potvrdu kompozicionalnih semantičkih modela distribucije procijenjenih za jezike osim engleskog. Procedura se općenito osnova na koracima dizajniranim za okupljanje korpusa SICK-a, koja sadrži par engleskih rečenica koje su izjavljene za semantičku vezu i zadovoljstvo, jer ciljamo izgraditi usporedbenu kompletu podataka. Međutim, provedba određenih koraka zgrade značajno se razlikuje od originalnih pretpostavki o dizajnu SICK-a, što je uzrokovalo nedostatak neophodnih vanzemaljskih resursa za istraženi jezik i potrebu za pravila transformacije jezika specifičnih jezika. Dizajnirana procedura se provjerava na poljskom, kombinacijskom jeziku sa relativno slobodnim riječima, i doprinosi izgradnji poljskog seta podataka za procjenu. Resurska se sastoji od par rečenica od 10 K, koje su ljudske annotirane zbog semantičke odnose i zadovoljstva. Podaci se mogu koristiti za procjenu kompozicionalnih semantičkih modela poljskog distribucije.', 'cs': 'Příspěvek představuje postup sestavení hodnotícího datového souboru. pro validaci kompozičních distribučních sémantických modelů odhadovaných pro jiné jazyky než angličtinu. Postup obecně staví na krocích navržených k sestavení korpusu SICK, který obsahuje dvojice anglických vět anotovaných pro sémantickou souvislost a implikaci, protože se snažíme vytvořit srovnatelný datový soubor. Implementace jednotlivých stavebních kroků se však výrazně liší od původních předpokladů návrhu SICK, což je způsobeno jak nedostatkem potřebných cizích zdrojů pro zkoumaný jazyk, tak potřebou jazykově specifických transformačních pravidel. Navržený postup je ověřen na polštině, fúzičním jazyce s relativně volným pořadím slov, a přispívá k budování polského hodnotícího datového souboru. Zdroj se skládá z 10K větových párů, které jsou člověkem anotovány pro sémantickou souvislost a implikaci. Datová sada může být použita pro hodnocení kompozičních distribučních sémantických modelů polštiny.', 'et': 'Töös esitatakse hindamisandmekogumi koostamise kord. muude keelte kui inglise keele jaoks hinnatud kompositsioonilise jaotussemantika mudelite valideerimiseks. Protseduur põhineb üldiselt sammudel, mis on mõeldud SICK korpuse koostamiseks, mis sisaldab paari inglise keeles lauseid semantilise seose ja kaasamise kohta, sest meie eesmärk on luua võrreldav andmekogum. Siiski erineb konkreetsete ehitusetappide rakendamine oluliselt esialgsetest SICK-i projekteerimise eeldustest, mille põhjuseks on nii uuritava keele jaoks vajalike välisressursside puudumine kui ka vajadus keelepõhiste muundamise reeglite järele. Kavandatud protseduur on kontrollitud poola keeles, mis on suhteliselt vaba sõnajärjekorraga fusioonikeel, ning aitab koostada poola hindamisandmekogumi. Ressurss koosneb 10K lausepaaridest, mis on semantilise seose ja kaasamise jaoks inimmärkidega. Andmekogumit võib kasutada poola keele kompositsioonilise jaotussemantika mudelite hindamiseks.', 'fi': 'Työssä esitellään menettely arviointiaineiston rakentamiseksi. Muille kielille kuin englannille arvioitujen kompositiivisten jakelusemanttisten mallien validointiin. Menettely perustuu yleensä SICK-korpusen kokoamiseen tähtääviin vaiheisiin, jotka sisältävät englanninkielisiä lausepareja semanttisen yhteyden ja osallisuuden kannalta, koska pyrimme rakentamaan vertailukelpoisen aineiston. Tiettyjen rakennusvaiheiden toteutus eroaa kuitenkin merkittävästi alkuperäisistä SICK-suunnitteluoletuksista, mikä johtuu sekä tutkitulle kielelle tarvittavien ulkopuolisten resurssien puuttumisesta että kielikohtaisten muutossääntöjen tarpeesta. Suunniteltu menettely varmennetaan puolalla, fuusiokielellä, jolla on suhteellisen vapaa sanajärjestys, ja se auttaa rakentamaan puolalaista arviointiaineistoa. Resurssi koostuu 10K lausepareista, jotka on inhimillisesti merkitty semanttiseen yhteyteen ja osallistamiseen. Aineistoa voidaan käyttää puolan kielen kompositiivisten jakelusemantiikkamallien arviointiin.', 'ha': "Gansa na ƙunsa da wata zartar da za'a samar da wani danne mai qiymatãwa. QXml Cirari na samar da shi a gaba ɗaya a kan hanyõyin aka yi tsaron ka haɗa nau'in SCK, wanda na ƙunsa da sauri biyu na Ingiriya wanda aka yi zartar da wa masu husũma na semanti da kuma ba'a sani ba, kwani tuna kwaɗayin ka sami wani tsari da ke daidaita. Haƙĩƙa, ƙiyayya hanyõyin tsarin da aka ƙayyade shi yana mai girma daga zato na farko na shirin SCK, wanda yana saba da kuma bã za'a yi mataimaki ba da amfani ba ga lugha mai ƙiyayya da kuma ana buƙata wa'asalin jujjũya-canza-zaɓa na harshe. An gaskata shirin da aka design a kan Polish, wata harshe na fusãfi da wata tsarin maganar ta sami'a kuma yana ƙara cikin ka sami tsarin danasãri na Polish. @ info: whatsthis Ana iya amfani da tsarin bayani don a iya ƙayyade misãlai masu raba cikin shirin semantiki na Polish.", 'he': 'The paper presents a procedure of building an evaluation dataset.  עבור האישור של דוגמניות סמנטיקה פיצועית מורכבת שמערכות לשפות אחרות מאשר אנגלית. ההליך בונה בדרך כלל על צעדים שנועדו לאיסוף את הקורפוס של SICK, אשר מכיל זוג משפטים אנגליים שמרשמים על קשר סמנטי ומערכת, כי אנחנו מכוונים לבנות קבוצת נתונים שווה. עם זאת, ההפעלה של צעדים בניין מסויימים שונים באופן משמעותי מההנחות המקוריות בעיצוב SICK, אשר נגרמה גם על ידי חוסר משאבים זרים הכרחיים לשפה חוקרת והצורך של חוקי שינוי ספציפי לשפה. ההליך המתכנן מאושר בשפה פולנית, שפת מיזוג עם סדר מילים חופשי יחסית, ותרום לבניית קבוצת מידע הערכה פולנית. המשאב כולל זוגות משפטים של 10,000 שנמצאים על ידי האדם עבור קשר סמנטי ומערכת. קבוצת הנתונים ניתן להשתמש בהערכה של דוגמניות סמנטיקה פיצועית של פולנים.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen postopek izdelave vrednotenjskega nabora podatkov. za validacijo kompozicijskih distribucijskih semantičnih modelov, ocenjenih za jezike, ki niso angleščina. Postopek na splošno temelji na korakih, namenjenih sestavljanju korpusa SICK, ki vsebuje pare angleških stavkov z oznakami za semantično povezanost in vključenost, saj želimo ustvariti primerljiv nabor podatkov. Vendar pa se izvajanje posameznih korakov gradnje bistveno razlikuje od prvotnih projektnih predpostavk SICK, kar je posledica pomanjkanja potrebnih tujih virov za preiskovani jezik in potrebe po pravilih za preoblikovanje, specifičnih za jezik. Načrtovani postopek je preverjen v poljščini, fuzijskem jeziku z relativno prostim besednim vrstnim redom, in prispeva k oblikovanju poljskega vrednotenja podatkov. Vir je sestavljen iz 10K stavkovnih parov, ki so človeško označeni za semantično povezanost in posledico. Zbirka podatkov se lahko uporablja za vrednotenje kompozicijskih distribucijskih semantičnih modelov poljščine.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Language Procedur nggawe barang-barang nggawe barang-barang nggawe geranggap karo perusahaan SiCK, sing nduwe nyimpen kuwi tindakan Perusahaan sing apik perusahaan kelas karo perusahaan semanti, soalé awak dhéwé wis arep kuwi nggawe dataset sing nggawe Saiki, nggawe akeh sing nggawe gerakan sing dumadhi luwih saben diolukan kelangan winih sing dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno pangan SiCK dumadhi, iki lak wis arep gawe kaya perusahaan sing dibutuhke kanggo ingkang dipunanggé kanggo ngilanggar sampek kanggo ngilanggar sampek kanggo ngilanggar. Perintah sing dibenaké nggunakake punika dipoles, langkung sampeyan karo perusahaan kelas kuwi buturan, lan kontribusi kanggo nggawe dataset kuwi nggawe Kemerdekaan polas. Awak dhéwé ning unang kelas 10 K ditambah sing wong liyane dadi kapan-awak dhéwé karo sematik nggawe barang lan tambah. Sampeyan dataset iki iso nggambar deweke nggambar model semanti sing nggawe Kasunyatan', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་དེས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཚང་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལས་གཞན་མིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྩིས་བ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ནི་ཡིན། The procedure generally builds on steps designed to assemble the SICK corpus, which contains pairs of English sentences annotated for semantic relatedness and entailment, because we aim to build a comparable dataset. ཡིན་ནའང་། གསར་གཏོད་ཁང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་དམིགས་བསལ་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་SICK་གཟུགས་རྩ་བརྗོད་དང་། འདི་ནི་སྒྲུང་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་ལས་ཕ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་པོ་ལིས་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས། ཆ་མཉམ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཕན་མེད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་དང་ རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདི་ལྟར་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་སུ་༡༠༠་ཙམ་ཡིན་པས་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཆས་བ སྒྲིག་ཆ་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ཕལ་ཆེར་གྱི་མཉམ་གྱི་བསྡོམས་རིམ་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'pt': 'Anotação automática e avaliação de tipos de erro para correção de erros gramaticais', 'ar': 'التعليقات التوضيحية التلقائية وتقييم أنواع الأخطاء لتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية', 'fr': "Annotation automatique et évaluation des types d'erreurs pour la correction des erreurs grammaticales", 'es': 'Anotación y evaluación automáticas de tipos de error para la corrección de errores gramaticales', 'ja': '文法エラー訂正のためのエラータイプの自動アノテーションと評価', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए त्रुटि प्रकारों का स्वत: एनोटेशन और मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Автоматическая аннотация и оценка типов ошибок для коррекции грамматических ошибок', 'zh': '自注与评估语法纠错之误', 'ga': 'Anótáil Uathoibríoch agus Meastóireacht ar Chineálacha Earráide le haghaidh Ceartú Earráide Gramadaí', 'ka': 'შეცდომის ტიპების ავტომატური ანოტაცია და განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Hibatípusok automatikus jegyzetelése és értékelése nyelvtani hibakorrekcióhoz', 'el': 'Αυτόματη σημείωση και αξιολόγηση τύπων σφαλμάτων για τη γραμματική διόρθωση σφαλμάτων', 'it': 'Annotazione automatica e valutazione dei tipi di errore per la correzione degli errori grammaticali', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қатені түзету үшін қатенің түрлерін автоматты түрде белгілеу және бағалау', 'lt': 'Automatinis gramatinių klaidų koregavimo klaidų tipų anotacija ir vertinimas', 'ms': 'Anotasi dan Evaluasi Automatik Jenis Ralat untuk Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള പിശകുകളുടെ സ്വയം അറിയിപ്പും പരിശോധന', 'mt': 'Annotazzjoni u Evalwazzjoni Awtomatiċi tat-Tipi ta’ Żball għall-Korrezzjoni ta’ Żball Grammatiku', 'no': 'Automatisk notasjon og evaluering av feiltypar for grammatisk feilretting', 'pl': 'Automatyczna adnotacja i ocena typów błędów dla korekcji błędów gramatycznych', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэхийн тулд алдаа төрлийн автоматтын анзаарал болон үнэлгээ', 'ro': 'Adnotare automată și evaluare a tipurilor de eroare pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale', 'mk': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'sr': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැරදි විධානය සඳහා වැරදි වර්ගයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරකාරය සහ අවශ්\u200dය', 'sv': 'Automatisk notering och utvärdering av feltyper för grammatisk felkorrigering', 'ta': 'பிழை திருத்தத்திற்கான தானாகவே அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் பிழை வகைகளை மதிப்பிடுதல்', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha hagitaanka khaladda', 'ur': 'گرامٹیکل خطا اصلاح کے لئے خطا ٹائیپ کی آٹوٹ اور ارزش', 'uz': 'Grammatikal xato toò£gò£riligi uchun avtomatik taò¥rifi va toò£gò£rilash', 'vi': 'Báo cáo và đánh giá lỗi thường cho sự sửa lỗi máy tính', 'da': 'Automatisk notering og evaluering af fejltyper til grammatisk fejlrettelse', 'hr': 'Automatska oznake i procjena tipa greške za ispravu greške', 'nl': 'Automatische annotatie en evaluatie van fouttypen voor grammaticale foutcorrectie', 'bg': 'Автоматична анотация и оценка на типове грешки за граматична корекция на грешки', 'ko': '문법 오류 수정 중 오류 유형의 자동 표시 및 평가', 'fa': 'توضیح و ارزیابی خودکار نوع خطا برای اصلاح خطای گراماتیک', 'sw': 'Tamko la kujitegemea na Uthibitisho wa aina za Tatizo kwa ajili ya Serikali ya Tamko', 'id': 'Anotasi dan Evaluasi Otomatis Jenis Galat untuk Koreksi Galat Grammatis', 'tr': 'Grammatik Hata Düzeltmek üçin hata hilleriniň otomatik duşurmesi we Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Outomatiese Opmerking en Evaluering van Fout Tipes vir Gramatiese Fout Korreksie', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'az': 'Gramatik x톛ta d칲z톛ltm톛si 칲칞칲n x톛ta N칬vl톛rinin Avtomatik Notasyonu v톛 Q캼ymeti', 'bn': 'গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সংশোধনের জন্য ত্রুটির ধরনের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ঘোষণা এবং মূল্যায়ন', 'ca': "Anotació automàtica i evaluació dels tipus d'error per a la correcció d'errors gramàtics", 'cs': 'Automatická anotace a vyhodnocování typů chyb pro gramatickou korekci chyb', 'de': 'Automatische Annotation und Auswertung von Fehlertypen zur grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur', 'fi': 'Automaattinen huomautus ja virhetyyppien arviointi kielioppisten virheiden korjauksessa', 'et': 'Grammatilise veaparanduse tüüpide automaatne annoteerimine ja hindamine', 'sq': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'bs': 'Automatska oznake i procjena tipa greške za ispravu greške', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Automatically', 'he': 'Automatic Annotation and Evaluation of Error Types for Grammatical Error Correction', 'sk': 'Samodejna opomba in vrednotenje vrst napak za slovnično popravljanje napak', 'bo': 'ཚད་རྩིས་འབྱུང་བའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་འགྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Until now, error type performance for Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) systems could only be measured in terms of recall because system output is not annotated. To overcome this problem, we introduce ERRANT, a grammatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit designed to automatically extract edits from parallel original and corrected sentences and classify them according to a new, dataset-agnostic, rule-based framework. This not only facilitates error type evaluation at different levels of granularity, but can also be used to reduce annotator workload and standardise existing GEC datasets. Human experts rated the automatic edits as Good or Acceptable in at least 95 % of cases, so we applied ERRANT to the system output of the CoNLL-2014 shared task to carry out a detailed error type analysis for the first time.', 'ar': 'حتى الآن ، لا يمكن قياس أداء نوع الخطأ لأنظمة تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC) إلا من حيث الاسترجاع لأن إخراج النظام غير موضح. للتغلب على هذه المشكلة ، نقدم ERRANT ، وهو عبارة عن مجموعة أدوات للتعليق النحوي للخطأ مصممة لاستخراج التعديلات تلقائيًا من الجمل الأصلية الموازية والمصححة وتصنيفها وفقًا لإطار عمل جديد قائم على قواعد البيانات وغير محدد لمجموعة البيانات. هذا لا يسهل فقط تقييم نوع الخطأ على مستويات مختلفة من التفصيل ، ولكن يمكن استخدامه أيضًا لتقليل عبء العمل التوضيحي وتوحيد مجموعات بيانات GEC الحالية. صنف الخبراء البشريون التعديلات التلقائية على أنها "جيدة" أو "مقبولة" في 95٪ على الأقل من الحالات ، لذلك قمنا بتطبيق ERRANT على مخرجات النظام للمهمة المشتركة CoNLL-2014 لإجراء تحليل مفصل لنوع الخطأ لأول مرة.', 'fr': "Jusqu'à présent, les performances de type d'erreur pour les systèmes de correction d'erreur grammaticale (GEC) ne pouvaient être mesurées qu'en termes de rappel, car la sortie du système n'était pas annotée. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous avons introduit ERRANT, un outil d'annotation d'erreurs grammaticales conçu pour extraire automatiquement les modifications de phrases originales et corrigées parallèles et les classer selon un nouveau cadre basé sur des règles indépendant des ensembles de données. Cela facilite non seulement l'évaluation du type d'erreur à différents niveaux de granularité, mais peut également être utilisé pour réduire la charge de travail des annotateurs et normaliser les ensembles de données GEC existants. Les experts humains ont évalué les modifications automatiques comme «\xa0bonnes\xa0» ou «\xa0acceptables\xa0» dans au moins 95\xa0% des cas. Nous avons donc appliqué ERRANT à la sortie système de la tâche partagée ConLL-2014 pour effectuer une analyse détaillée du type d'erreur pour la première fois.", 'pt': 'Até agora, o desempenho do tipo de erro para sistemas de correção de erros gramaticais (GEC) só podia ser medido em termos de recuperação porque a saída do sistema não é anotada. Para superar esse problema, apresentamos o ERRANT, um ERRor ANnotation Toolkit gramatical projetado para extrair automaticamente edições de sentenças paralelas originais e corrigidas e classificá-las de acordo com uma nova estrutura baseada em regras, independente de conjunto de dados. Isso não apenas facilita a avaliação do tipo de erro em diferentes níveis de granularidade, mas também pode ser usado para reduzir a carga de trabalho do anotador e padronizar os conjuntos de dados GEC existentes. Especialistas humanos classificaram as edições automáticas como “Boas” ou “Aceitáveis” em pelo menos 95% dos casos, então aplicamos ERRANT à saída do sistema da tarefa compartilhada CoNLL-2014 para realizar uma análise detalhada do tipo de erro pela primeira vez.', 'es': 'Hasta ahora, el rendimiento del tipo de error para los sistemas de corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC) solo se podía medir en términos de recuperación porque la salida del sistema no estaba anotada. Para superar este problema, presentamos ERRANT, un kit de herramientas de anotación de errores gramaticales diseñado para extraer automáticamente las ediciones de oraciones originales y corregidas paralelas y clasificarlas de acuerdo con un nuevo marco basado en reglas, independiente del conjunto de datos. Esto no solo facilita la evaluación del tipo de error en diferentes niveles de granularidad, sino que también se puede utilizar para reducir la carga de trabajo del anotador y estandarizar los conjuntos de datos GEC existentes. Los expertos humanos calificaron las ediciones automáticas como «Buenas» o «Aceptables» en al menos el 95% de los casos, por lo que aplicamos ERRANT a la salida del sistema de la tarea compartida de ConLL-2014 para llevar a cabo un análisis detallado del tipo de error por primera vez.', 'ja': 'これまで、文法誤り訂正（ GEC ）システムのエラータイプのパフォーマンスは、システム出力に注釈が付いていないため、リコールの観点からのみ測定できました。この問題を克服するために、誤った、文法的なERRor ANnotation Toolkitを導入し、並行する元の文章と修正された文章から自動的に編集を抽出し、新しいデータセット非推論的でルールベースのフレームワークに従って分類するように設計しました。これは、異なるレベルの粒度でのエラータイプ評価を容易にするだけでなく、アノテーターの作業負荷を軽減し、既存のGECデータセットを標準化するためにも使用できます。人間の専門家は、少なくとも95%のケースで自動編集を「良好」または「許容可能」と評価したため、CoNLL -2014共有タスクのシステム出力に誤りを適用し、初めて詳細なエラータイプ分析を実施しました。', 'hi': 'अब तक, व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) सिस्टम के लिए त्रुटि प्रकार प्रदर्शन केवल याद के संदर्भ में मापा जा सकता है क्योंकि सिस्टम आउटपुट एनोटेट नहीं है। इस समस्या को दूर करने के लिए, हम ERRANT, एक व्याकरणिक ERRor ANnotation टूलकिट को स्वचालित रूप से समानांतर मूल और सही वाक्यों से संपादन निकालने और उन्हें एक नए, डेटासेट-अज्ञेयवादी, नियम-आधारित ढांचे के अनुसार वर्गीकृत करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। यह न केवल ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के विभिन्न स्तरों पर त्रुटि प्रकार के मूल्यांकन की सुविधा प्रदान करता है, बल्कि एनोटेटर वर्कलोड को कम करने और मौजूदा जीईसी डेटासेट को मानकीकृत करने के लिए भी इस्तेमाल किया जा सकता है। मानव विशेषज्ञों ने कम से कम 95% मामलों में स्वचालित संपादनों को "अच्छा" या "स्वीकार्य" के रूप में रेट किया, इसलिए हमने पहली बार एक विस्तृत त्रुटि प्रकार विश्लेषण करने के लिए CoNLL-2014 साझा कार्य के सिस्टम आउटपुट पर ERRANT लागू किया।', 'zh': '至目前为止,语法纠错 (GEC) 系统之误,但据召入量之,以统输无注也。 所以克此者,引入ERRANT,此一语法错误ANnotation工具包也,指从并行之原始更正之句自取编辑,并据新数集,基于规矩之框架分类焉。 此非徒有助于粒度级,而可以损注器标准化见GEC数集也。 至少95%,则人自辑为良、可受,故ERRANT用于CoNLL-2014共事者,首为详过。', 'ru': 'До сих пор производительность типов ошибок для систем с грамматической коррекцией ошибок (GEC) можно было измерять только с точки зрения вызова, потому что вывод системы не аннотирован. Чтобы преодолеть эту проблему, мы вводим ERRANT, грамматический ERRor ANnotation Toolkit, предназначенный для автоматического извлечения правок из параллельных исходных и исправленных предложений и их классификации в соответствии с новым, диагностическим набором данных, основанным на правилах фреймворком. Это не только облегчает оценку типов ошибок на различных уровнях детализации, но также может быть использовано для снижения нагрузки на аннотатор и стандартизации существующих наборов данных GEC. Человеческие эксперты оценили автоматические правки как «хорошие» или «приемлемые» по крайней мере в 95% случаев, поэтому мы применили ошибку к системному выходу разделяемой задачи CoNLL-2014 для проведения детального анализа типов ошибок впервые.', 'ga': 'Go dtí seo, níorbh fhéidir feidhmíocht an chineáil earráide do chórais Ceartúcháin Earráidí Gramadaí (GEC) a thomhas ach i dtéarmaí aisghairme toisc nach bhfuil anótáil ar aschur córais. Chun an fhadhb seo a shárú, tugaimid isteach ERRANT, Foireann Uirlisí Nodaíochta ERRor gramadaí atá deartha chun athruithe a bhaint go huathoibríoch as abairtí bunaidh agus ceartaithe comhthreomhara agus iad a rangú de réir creata nua, tacar sonraí agnostic, bunaithe ar rialacha. Ní hamháin go n-éascaíonn sé seo meastóireacht ar chineál earráide ag leibhéil éagsúla gráinneachta, ach is féidir é a úsáid freisin chun ualach oibre anótairí a laghdú agus tacair shonraí GEC atá ann cheana a chaighdeánú. Thug saineolaithe daonna rátáil “Maith” nó “Inghlactha” ar na hathraithe uathoibríocha i 95% de na cásanna ar a laghad, agus mar sin chuireamar ERRANT i bhfeidhm ar aschur córais tasc comhroinnte CoNLL-2014 chun anailís mhionsonraithe cineál earráide a dhéanamh den chéad uair.', 'ka': "სანამ შეცდომის ტიპის მუშაობა Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) სისტემებისთვის შესაძლებელია მხოლოდ შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება მხოლოდ შეიძლება შეიძლება შეი ამ პრობლემას გადავიწყებთ, ჩვენ ERRANT-ს, გრამმატიკური ERRor ANnotation ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთან ავტომატურად რედაქტირებას პარალელური ორიგინალური და რედაქტირებული სიტყვების გამოსახულებლად ეს არა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ შეცდომის ტიპის განსაზღვრებას განსხვავებული დრანულაციის დონეზე, მაგრამ შეიძლება გამოყენება ანტოტორორის მუშაობის გადატვირთვის და სტანდარტაციის ადამიანის ექსპერტები ავტომატური რედაქტირების შესახებ 'კარგი' ან 'მიღებელი' შესახებ უნდა 95%-ში, ასე რომ ჩვენ პირველი ჯერ შეცდომა ანალიზაციის შესახებ შემდეგ შეცდომა ანალიზაციის შესახებ შემდე", 'hu': 'Eddig a Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) rendszerek hibatípusának teljesítménye csak a visszahívás szempontjából mérhető, mivel a rendszer kimenete nincs jegyzetelve. A probléma megoldása érdekében bemutatjuk az ERRANT nyelvtani ERRor ANnotation Toolkit-t, amelynek célja, hogy automatikusan kivonja a szerkesztéseket a párhuzamos eredeti és javított mondatokból, és osztályozza őket egy új, adatkészlet-agnosztikus, szabályalapú keretrendszer szerint. Ez nemcsak megkönnyíti a hibatípusok értékelését a különböző szinteken, hanem felhasználható a kommentátorok munkaterhelésének csökkentésére és a meglévő GEC adatkészletek szabványosítására is. Emberi szakértők az automatikus szerkesztéseket az esetek legalább 95%-ában "Jónak" vagy "Elfogadhatónak" értékelték, ezért a CoNLL-2014 megosztott feladat rendszer kimenetére az ERRANT alkalmazást alkalmaztuk, hogy először végezzünk részletes hibatípuselemzést.', 'el': 'Μέχρι τώρα, η απόδοση τύπου σφάλματος για συστήματα γραμματικής διόρθωσης σφαλμάτων (GEC) μπορούσε να μετρηθεί μόνο από την άποψη ανάκλησης επειδή η έξοδος του συστήματος δεν είναι σχολιασμένη. Για να ξεπεράσουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα, εισάγουμε ένα γραμματικό Εργαλείο που έχει σχεδιαστεί για να εξάγει αυτόματα επεξεργασίες από παράλληλες πρωτότυπες και διορθωμένες προτάσεις και να τις ταξινομεί σύμφωνα με ένα νέο πλαίσιο που βασίζεται σε κανόνες. Αυτό όχι μόνο διευκολύνει την αξιολόγηση τύπου σφάλματος σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα κοκκοποίησης, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη μείωση του φόρτου εργασίας σχολιαστών και την τυποποίηση των υφιστάμενων συνόλων δεδομένων GEC. Οι ανθρώπινοι ειδικοί αξιολόγησαν τις αυτόματες επεξεργασίες ως "καλές" ή "αποδεκτές" σε τουλάχιστον 95% των περιπτώσεων, έτσι εφαρμόσαμε το στην έξοδο του συστήματος της κοινής εργασίας για να εκτελέσουμε μια λεπτομερή ανάλυση τύπου σφάλματος για πρώτη φορά.', 'it': 'Fino ad ora, le prestazioni del tipo di errore per i sistemi di correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC) potevano essere misurate solo in termini di richiamo perché l\'output del sistema non è annotato. Per superare questo problema, introduciamo ERRANT, un toolkit grammaticale ERRor ANnotation progettato per estrarre automaticamente le modifiche da frasi originali e corrette parallele e classificarle secondo un nuovo framework basato su regole, agnostico e basato su set di dati. Ciò non solo facilita la valutazione del tipo di errore a diversi livelli di granularità, ma può anche essere utilizzato per ridurre il carico di lavoro degli annotatori e standardizzare i set di dati GEC esistenti. Gli esperti umani hanno valutato le modifiche automatiche come "Buone" o "Accettabili" in almeno il 95% dei casi, quindi abbiamo applicato ERRANT all\'output del sistema dell\'attività condivisa CoNLL-2014 per effettuare per la prima volta un\'analisi dettagliata del tipo di errore.', 'mk': 'Досега, резултатите на типот на грешка за системите за корекција на граматска грешка (GEC) можеа да се мерат само во однос на повлекување бидејќи системскиот излез не е анотиран. За да го надминеме овој проблем, ние го воведуваме ЕРРАНТ, граматичен ЕРРОР АНОТАЦИЈА Интернационален Кит дизајниран за автоматски да ги извади уредувањата од паралелните оригинални и коректирани реченици и да ги класификуваме според нова, агностичка рамка на Ова не само што ја олеснува евалуацијата на типот на грешки на различни нивоа на грануларност, туку и може да се користи за намалување на работното товарување на анотаторите и стандардизација на постојните датотеки на GEC. Човечките експерти ги оценуваа автоматските уредувања како „добри“ или „Прифатливи“ во најмалку 95 отсто од случаите, па го применивме ЕРРАНТ на системскиот излез од CoNLL-2014 споделена задача за спроведување детална анализа на типот грешки за првпат.', 'lt': 'Iki šiol Gramatinių klaidų koregavimo (GEC) sistemų klaidų tipas gali būti matuojamas tik atšaukimo požiūriu, nes sistemos išėjimas nenustatytas. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, įvedame ERRANT, gramatinį ERRor ANnotation Toolkit, sukurtą automatiškai išimti redakcijas iš lygiagrečių originalių ir pataisytų sakinių ir klasifikuoti jas pagal naują, duomenų rinkinio agnostinę, taisyklėmis pagrįstą sistemą. Tai ne tik palengvina klaidų tipo vertinimą skirtingais granuliarumo lygiais, bet ir gali būti naudojama mažinant anotatorių darbo krūvį ir standartizuojant esamus GEC duomenų rinkinius. Žmogaus ekspertai ne mažiau kaip 95 proc. atvejų automatinius redakcijas įvertino kaip „geras“ arba „priimtinas“, taigi mes taikėme ERRANT sistemos rezultatams pagal CoNLL-2014 bendrą užduotį atlikti išsamią klaidų tipo analizę pirmą kartą.', 'mt': "Sal-lum, il-prestazzjoni tat-tip ta’ żball għas-sistemi ta’ Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi (GEC) tista’ titkejjel biss f’termini ta’ ġbir lura minħabba li l-output tas-sistema mhuwiex annotat. Biex tingħeleb din il-problem a, a ħna nintroduċu ERRANT, sett grammatiku ta’ għodod ta’ ANnotazzjoni ta’ ERRor iddisinjat biex awtomatikament ineħħi edits minn sentenzi oriġinali paralleli u kkoreġuti u jikklassifikahom skont qafas ġdid, dataset-agnostic, ibbażat fuq ir-regoli. Dan mhux biss jiffaċilita l-evalwazzjoni tat-tip ta’ żball f’livelli differenti ta’ granularità, iżda jista’ jintuża wkoll biex jitnaqqas it-tagħbija tax-xogħol tal-annotatur u jiġu standardizzati settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti tal-GEC. L-esperti umani kklassifikaw l-editjar awtomatiku bħala 'tajjeb' jew 'Aċċettabbli' f'mill-inqas 95% tal-każijiet, għalhekk applikajna ERRANT għall-output tas-sistema tal-kompitu kondiviż CoNLL-2014 biex titwettaq analiżi dettaljata tat-tip ta' żball għall-ewwel darba.", 'ml': "ഇപ്പോള്\u200d വരെ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് പരിശോധിപ്പിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പിശക് ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്യുക (GEC) സിസ്റ്റമുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പരിജയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ERRANT-നെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു ഗ്രാമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d ഏര്\u200dറോര്\u200d ANnotation Toolkit പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പാരാളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശരിയായ വാക്കു ഇത് വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിഭാഗത്തില്\u200d പിശക് തരം വിലയിലുള്ള വിലയ്ക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ, പക്ഷെ നിലവിലുള്ള GEC ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റ Human experts rated the automatic edits as 'Good' or 'Acceptable' in at least 95% of cases, so we applied ERRANT to the system output of the CoNLL-2014 shared task to carry out a detailed error type analysis for the first time.", 'no': 'Til nå kan feiltype utføringar for Gramatiske feilretting (GEC) systemet berre målare i tillegg til å rekna opp fordi systemutdata ikkje er merka opp. For å overføra dette problemet, introdusere vi ein grammatisk ERROR ANnotation- verktøykassett for å automatisk pakka ut redigeringar frå parallelle originale og korrigerte setningar og klassifisera dei etter eit ny, dataset- agnostisk, regelbasert rammeverktøy. Dette kan ikkje berre gjere feiltypevaluering på ulike nivå av granularitet, men også brukast for å redusera arbeidslag av annotatorar og standardisere eksisterande GEC-datasett. Menneske ekspertar raterte automatiske redigeringar som « god » eller « akseptabel » i minst 95% av tilfella, så vi brukte ERRANT til systemutdata av delt oppgåva CoNLL-2014 for å utføra ein detaljert feiltype analyse for første gong.', 'mn': "Одоо хүртэл, Грамматикийн алдаа засах (GEC) системийн алдаа төрлийн үйл ажиллагааг зөвхөн ойлголтын хувьд хэмжигдэх боломжтой. Учир нь системийн үр дүнг анзаарлаагүй. Энэ асуудлыг давхарлахын тулд бид ERRANT-г, грамматикийн ERRor ANnotation Tool Toolkit-ийг автоматаар зэрэгцээ гаргаж, зөв өгүүлбэрээс өөрчлөгдөж, шинэ, өгөгдлийн сангийн агностик, дүрмийн үндсэн хэлбэрээр хуваалцдаг. Энэ нь зөвхөн алдаа хэлбэрийн үнэлгээг өөр хэмжээнд багасгаж болохгүй, гэхдээ мөн агуулагчийн ажлын ачаалал багасгаж, бараг байгаа GEC өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг стандартизацийг багасгаж болно. Хүн нарын мэргэжилтнүүд хамгийн багахан 95% тохиолдолд автоматик редакцийг 'сайн' эсвэл 'хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой' гэж үнэлдэг. Тиймээс бид анхны удаа энгийн алдаа төрлийн шинжилгээ хийх боломжтой системийн бүтээгдэхүүнд ERRANT хэрэглэсэн.", 'pl': 'Do tej pory wydajność typu błędu dla systemów korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC) można była mierzyć tylko w kategoriach wycofania, ponieważ wyjście systemu nie jest podane adnotacjami. Aby przezwyciężyć ten problem, wprowadzamy ERRANT, gramatyczny zestaw narzędzi ERRor ANnotacji zaprojektowany do automatycznego wyodrębniania edycji z równoległych oryginalnych i poprawionych zdań i klasyfikowania ich według nowego, agnostycznego, opartego na regułach frameworka. To nie tylko ułatwia ocenę typów błędów na różnych poziomach granularności, ale może być również wykorzystane do zmniejszenia obciążenia adnotatorem i standaryzacji istniejących zbiorów danych GEC. Eksperci ludzi ocenili automatyczne edycje jako "Dobre" lub "Akceptowalne" w co najmniej 95% przypadków, dlatego zastosowaliśmy ERRANT do wyjścia systemowego wspólnego zadania CoNLL-2014, aby po raz pierwszy przeprowadzić szczegółową analizę typu błędu.', 'ms': "Sehingga kini, prestasi jenis ralat untuk sistem Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik (GEC) hanya boleh diukur dalam terma pengulangan kerana output sistem tidak dicatat. To overcome this problem, we introduce ERRANT, a grammatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit designed to automatically extract edits from parallel original and corrected sentences and classify them according to a new, dataset-agnostic, rule-based framework.  Ini tidak hanya memudahkan penilaian jenis ralat pada tahap berbeza granulariti, tetapi juga boleh digunakan untuk mengurangkan muatan kerja annotator dan standardisasi set data GEC yang wujud. Ahli manusia menilai edit automatik sebagai 'baik' atau 'boleh diterima' dalam sekurang-kurangnya 95% kes, jadi kami menerapkan ERRANT kepada output sistem tugas kongsi CoNLL-2014 untuk melakukan analisis jenis ralat terperinci untuk pertama kalinya.", 'kk': "Қазірше, граматикалық қатені түзету (GEC) жүйелерінің қатені тек қайталау тәртібімен өлшемі болады, себебі жүйелік шығысы оқылмайды. Бұл мәселеді көтеру үшін біз ERRANT дегенді, грамматикалық ERRor ANnotation құралдарының бағдарламасын параллель бастапқы және түзетілген сөздерден автоматты түрде өзгерту үшін құрылған және оларды жаңа, деректер қорларының агностикалық Бұл тек қате түрлерін бағалау үшін әртүрлі гранулациялық деңгейлерінде емес, сондай-ақ белгілер жұмыс жүктеу және бар GEC деректер жиындарын стандарттау үшін қолданылады. Адам эксперттері кемінде 95% жағдайда автоматты түрде 'Жақсы' немесе 'Қабылдауға мүмкін' деп бағалады, сондықтан бірінші рет қате түрін анализ үшін CoNLL- 2014 ортақ тапсырманың жүйесінің шығысына ERRANT қолдандық.", 'ro': 'Până în prezent, performanța tipului de eroare pentru sistemele Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) a putut fi măsurată doar în termeni de rechemare, deoarece ieșirea sistemului nu este adnotată. Pentru a depăși această problemă, introducem ERRANT, un kit gramatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit conceput pentru a extrage automat editările din propozițiile originale și corectate paralele și pentru a le clasifica conform unui nou cadru bazat pe reguli, agnostic-set de date. Acest lucru nu numai că facilitează evaluarea tipului de eroare la diferite niveluri de granularitate, ci poate fi utilizat și pentru a reduce volumul de lucru al adnotatorilor și pentru a standardiza seturile de date GEC existente. Experții umani au evaluat editările automate drept "Bune" sau "Acceptabile" în cel puțin 95% din cazuri, așa că am aplicat ERRANT la ieșirea sistemului din sarcina partajată CoNLL-2014 pentru a efectua o analiză detaliată a tipului de eroare pentru prima dată.', 'si': "දැන් වෙනකම්, ග්\u200dරාමාටිකාලික වැරදි සුදුසුම (GEC) පද්ධතියට වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි විතරයි, පද්ධති ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන්, අපි ERRANT විශ්වාස කරනවා, ග්\u200dරාම්තික ERRor ANnote Toolkit ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්ම මේක විවිධ ස්ථානයේ විවිධ ස්ථානයේ වැරදි වර්ගය අවශ්\u200dයය විතරයි නෙවෙයි, නමුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනකය වැඩ කරන්න සහ තියෙන්න ති මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසිකයෝ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සංපාදනය 'හොඳ' නැත්තම් 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක' විදියට අඩුම 95% අවස්ථාවක්, ඉතින් අපි පළමුවෙන් වි", 'sv': 'Hittills har feltypprestanda för GEC-system (Grammatical Error Correction) endast kunnat mätas i termer av återkallelse eftersom systemutmatningen inte är kommenterad. För att lösa detta problem introducerar vi ERRANT, en grammatisk ERRor ANnotation Toolkit utformad för att automatiskt extrahera redigeringar från parallella ursprungliga och korrigerade meningar och klassificera dem enligt ett nytt dataset-agnostiskt, regelbaserat ramverk. Detta underlättar inte bara utvärderingen av feltyper på olika nivåer av granularitet, utan kan också användas för att minska kommentatorns arbetsbelastning och standardisera befintliga GEC-datauppsättningar. Mänskliga experter bedömde de automatiska redigeringarna som "Bra" eller "Acceptable" i minst 95% av fallen, så vi tillämpade ERRANT på systemresultatet för CoNLL-2014 delade uppgift för att utföra en detaljerad feltypsanalys för första gången.', 'so': "Hada la joogo waxaa loo qiyaasi karaa nidaamka hagaajiyada khaladda ee Grammatika (GEC) oo kaliya marka lagu xusuusto, sababtoo ah soo baxada nidaamka laguma dhibaatayso. Si aan dhibaatadan uga adkayso, waxaan soo bandhignaa ERRANT, xarumaha ERRor ANnotation Toolkit oo loo qoray si ay automatic uga soo saaraan qoraalka asalka ah oo la hagaajiyey, waxaana loo qoraynaa si waafaqsan xarumaha cusub ee danbiyada la qoray. Tani ma ahan oo kaliya qiimeynta caymiska ah ee heerarka kala duwan ee granuugga, laakiin waxaa sidoo kale looga isticmaali karaa inuu hoos u dhigo booska shaqada oo uu ku caadi karo sawirada GEC. Xerbiyiinta dadku waxay ku qiimeeyeen sawirro bilowga ah sida 'Good' ama 'Aqbali' ugu yaraan 95% xaalada, sidaas darteed waxaynu u dalbannay ERRANT ka soo bixinta nidaamka CoNLL-2014 shaqada loo qaybsaday si aan u sameeyo baaritaanka caymiska ah oo gaar ah marka hore.", 'ta': "இப்பொழுது வரையில், சிறப்பு பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC) அமைப்புகளுக்கு பிழை செயல்படுத்தல் வகை செயல்பாடு மட்டும் நினைவில் மட்டும் அளவி இந்த பிரச்சனையை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் ERRANT, ஒரு வரையறை ERRor ANnotation கருவிப்புக்குறிப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், இணைய மூல வாக்குகளிலிருந்து தானாகவே திருத்திகளை வெளியேற் இது வெவ்வேறு நிலைகளில் பிழை வகை மதிப்பினை மட்டும் உதவும் இல்லை, ஆனால் அறிவிப்பாளர் வேலையை குறைத்து தற்போதைய GEC தரவுத்தளங்களை இயல மனிதன் தானியங்கி திருத்தும் விகிதத்தை குறைந்தது 'நல்ல' அல்லது 'ஏற்றுக்கொள்ளலாம்' என்று விகிதத்தில் குறைந்தது 95% விஷயங்களில், ஆகையால் நாம் முதல் முறையில் ப", 'ur': "یہاں تک، گرماٹیکل خطا اصلاح (GEC) سیسٹم کے لئے خطا تایپ کی عملکرد صرف یادآوری کے مطابق اندازہ کر سکتا ہے کیونکہ سیسٹم آوٹ پیٹ نہیں آواز دی جاتی ہے. اس مسئلہ پر غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم ERRANT کو معلوم کرتے ہیں، ایک گراماتیکی ERROr ANnotation تولیک کیٹ جو سائل اصلی اور اصلاح کلمات سے ویڈیوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے اور ان کو ایک نوی، ڈیٹ سٹ-agnostic، قانون-بنیاد فرم کے مطابق کلاس کریں۔ یہ نہیں صرف گرنولیٹی کے مختلف سطح پر خطا کے ٹائپ کا ارزیابی آسان کرتا ہے، بلکہ یہ بھی استعمال کر سکتا ہے کہ annotator کارلوڈ کم کرے اور موجود GEC ڈیٹ سٹ کو استاندارڈ کرے۔ انسان کے متخصص نے اپنے ساتھی ایڈیٹوں کو 'اچھا' یا 'قبول کرنے والا' کے ذریعہ سے کم 95% کیسوں میں ارتفاع کیا، سو ہم نے پہلی بار کوNLL-2014 کے شریک ٹاکس کے سیستم ایڈیٹ پر ERRANT کو استعمال کیا تھا۔", 'sr': "Do sada, provedba tipa greške za sisteme Gramatične korekcije greška (GEC) mogla bi biti mjerena samo u smislu sećanja jer izlaz sistema nije annotiran. Za prevladanje ovog problem a predstavljamo ERRANT, gramatički instrument ERRor ANnotation dizajniran da automatski izvučemo editore iz paralelnih originalnih i ispravnih rečenica i klasifikujemo ih prema novom, agnostičkom, pravilnom okviru podataka. To ne samo olakšava procjenu tipa greška na različitim nivoima granularnosti, nego se može koristiti i za smanjenje radnog opterećenja annotatora i standardizaciju postojećih GEC podataka. Ljudski stručnjaci su ocenili automatske edicije kao 'dobre' ili 'prihvatljive' u najmanje 95% slučajeva, pa smo primjenjivali ERRANT na izlaz sustava zajedničkog zadatka CoNLL-2014 kako bi prvi put proveli detaljnu analizu tipa greške.", 'uz': "Hisobda, grammatikal xato toʻgʻri tizimi (GEC) tizimini oʻzgartirishda xato roʻy berdi. Chunki tizimning natijasi taʼminlovchi emas. To overcome this problem, we introduce ERRANT, a grammatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit designed to automatically extract edits from parallel original and corrected sentences and classify them according to a new, dataset-agnostic, rule-based framework.  @ info Inson ekspertlari avtomatik tahrirlarni birinchi marta 'Bach' yoki 'Qabul qilinadigan' holatda ko'proq 95% sifatida ishlatishga ruxsat berdi. Shunday qilib, biz birinchi marta notoʻgʻri xato turi analysini bajarish uchun KNLL- 2014 bogʻlangan vazifaning tizimini qoʻlladik.", 'vi': 'Cho đến bây giờ, khả năng lỗi của hệ thống cải tạo lỗi máy (trí tuệ) chỉ có thể được đo bằng cách gọi lại bởi vì kết xuất hệ thống không được ghi chú. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu ERran, một công cụ cắt dòng đã được thiết kế để tự động trích xuất từ các câu gốc và sửa chữa song song, và phân loại chúng theo một cơ sở quy định mới, cài dữ liệu. Việc này không chỉ giúp việc đánh giá kiểu lỗi ở các mức độ hạt khác nhau, mà còn có thể được dùng để giảm áp lực của chú thích và tiêu chuẩn các bộ dữ liệu GED hiện tại. Loài người đánh giá các phiên bản tự động như "Good" hay "Dễ nhận" trong ít nhất tổng số trường hợp tổng thể, nên chúng tôi đã áp dụng ERANT vào kết xuất hệ thống của nhiệm vụ chia sẻ CONLL-Ngực để lần đầu thực hiện một phân tích chi tiết về kiểu lỗi.', 'da': 'Indtil nu kunne fejltypeydelsen for GEC-systemer kun måles i form af tilbagekaldelse, fordi systemoutput ikke er noteret. For at løse dette problem introducerer vi ERRANT, et grammatisk ERRor ANnotation Toolkit designet til automatisk at udtrække redigeringer fra parallelle originale og korrigerede sætninger og klassificere dem i henhold til en ny, datasæt-agnostisk, regelbaseret ramme. Dette letter ikke kun evaluering af fejltype på forskellige granularitetsniveauer, men kan også bruges til at reducere kommentatorarbejdsbyrden og standardisere eksisterende GEC-datasæt. Menneskelige eksperter vurderede de automatiske redigeringer som "Gode" eller "Acceptable" i mindst 95% af tilfældene, så vi anvendte ERRANT på systemoutput af CoNLL-2014 delte opgave for at udføre en detaljeret fejltypeanalyse for første gang.', 'nl': "Tot nu toe konden fouttypeprestaties voor GEC-systemen alleen worden gemeten in termen van terugroeping omdat de systeemoutput niet geannoteerd is. Om dit probleem op te lossen introduceren we ERRANT, een grammaticale ERRor ANnotation Toolkit ontworpen om automatisch bewerkingen uit parallelle originele en gecorrigeerde zinnen te extraheren en te classificeren volgens een nieuw, dataset-agnostisch, regelgebaseerd framework. Dit vergemakkelijkt niet alleen de evaluatie van fouttypen op verschillende niveaus van granulariteit, maar kan ook worden gebruikt om annotatorwerklast te verminderen en bestaande GEC-datasets te standaardiseren. Menselijke experts beoordeelden de automatische bewerkingen als 'Goed' of 'Aanvaardbaar' in ten minste 95% van de gevallen, dus hebben we ERRANT toegepast op de systeemuitvoer van de gedeelde taak CoNLL-2014 om voor het eerst een gedetailleerde fouttypeanalyse uit te voeren.", 'id': "Sampai sekarang, prestasi tipe kesalahan untuk sistem Koreksi Galat Grammatik (GEC) hanya dapat diukur dalam terma recall karena output sistem tidak dicatat. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami memperkenalkan ERRANT, sebuah perangkat ANnotasi ERRor grammatical Toolkit yang direncanakan untuk secara otomatis mengekstrak edit dari kalimat asli paralel dan diperbaiki dan mengklasifikasikan mereka menurut rangka baru, dataset-agnostic, berdasarkan aturan. Ini tidak hanya memudahkan evaluasi tipe kesalahan di tingkat granularitas yang berbeda, tetapi juga dapat digunakan untuk mengurangi muatan kerja annotator dan standardisasi set data GEC yang ada. Human experts rated the automatic edits as 'Good' or 'Acceptable' in at least 95% of cases, so we applied ERRANT to the system output of the CoNLL-2014 shared task to carry out a detailed error type analysis for the first time.", 'bg': 'Досега ефективността на типа грешки за системите за граматична корекция на грешки (GEC) може да бъде измерена само по отношение на изземване, тъй като изходът на системата не е анотиран. За да преодолеем този проблем, въвеждаме граматически инструментариум предназначен да извлича автоматично редакции от паралелни оригинални и коригирани изречения и да ги класифицира според нова, агностична, базирана на правила рамка. Това не само улеснява оценката на типа грешки при различни нива на гранулираност, но може да се използва и за намаляване на натоварването на анотаторите и стандартизиране на съществуващите набори от данни на ГЕС. Човешките експерти оцениха автоматичните редакции като "добри" или "приемливи" в най-малко 95% от случаите, затова приложихме към изхода на системата на споделената задача за извършване на подробен анализ на типа грешки за първи път.', 'hr': "Do sada, učinkovitost tipa greške za sisteme Gramatične korekcije greške (GEC) može se mjeriti samo u smislu sjećanja jer izlaz sustava nije označen. Za prevladanje ovog problem a, predstavljamo ERRANT, gramatički instrument za ANnotaciju ERRora dizajniran kako bi se automatski izvukao redakcije iz paralelnih originalnih i ispravljenih rečenica i klasifikirali ih prema novom, agnostičkom, pravilnom okviru podataka. To ne samo olakšava procjenu tipa greške na različitim razinama granularnosti, već se može koristiti i za smanjenje radnog opterećenja annotatora i standardizaciju postojećih GEC podataka. Ljudski stručnjaci su ocjenjivali automatske redakcije kao 'dobre' ili 'prihvatljive' u najmanje 95% slučajeva, pa smo primjenjivali ERRANT na izlaz sustava zajedničkog zadatka CoNLL-2014 kako bi prvi put proveli detaljnu analizu tipa greške.", 'sw': "Mpaka sasa, uwezekano wa matokeo ya makosa kwa mfumo wa Uharibifu wa Tafadhali (GEC) unaweza kupunguzwa kwa mujibu wa kumbukumbu kwa sababu matokeo ya mfumo hayajatajwa. Ili kushinda tatizo hili, tunautambulisha ERRANT, kituo cha ANnotation cha ERRor ANnotation kilichoundwa ili kutengeneza wahariri kutoka kwenye sentensi za asili na zilizotengenezwa na kutangaza kwa mujibu wa mfumo mpya, mpya wa taarifa inayotengenezwa na utawala. Hii si tu inasaidia uchunguzi wa aina ya makosa katika viwango tofauti vya uchunguzi, bali pia inaweza kutumika kupunguza upload wa kazi za uchunguzi na kurekebisha seti za data zilizopo kwenye GEC. Wataalam wa binadamu walichanganya wahariri wa kujitegemea kama 'Tajiri' au 'Inapokubaliwa' katika asilimia 95 ya kesi, kwa hiyo tulitumia ERRANT kwenye mfumo wa jitihada za CoNLL-2014 ili kufanya uchambuzi wa a in a ya makosa ya kina kwa mara ya kwanza.", 'fa': 'تا الان ، فعالیت نوع خطای برای سیستم اصلاح خطای گرماتیک (GEC) فقط به صورت یادآوری می\u200cتواند اندازه گیری شود چون نتیجه سیستم علامت داده نشده است. برای تغییر این مشکل، ما ERRANT را معرفی می کنیم، یک ابزار ERRor ANnotation tool طراحی شده تا ویرایش\u200cها را از جمله\u200cهای اصلی parallel و اصلاح کنیم و آنها را بر اساس یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها این نه تنها ارزیابی نوع خطایی در سطح مختلف گرانولاتی را آسان می\u200cسازد، بلکه می\u200cتواند برای کاهش بار کارگر و استاندارد داده\u200cهای GEC موجود استفاده شود. دانشمندان انسان در حداقل 95% از پرونده\u200cها ویرایش\u200cهای خودکار را به عنوان «خوب» یا «قابل قبول» مقدار دادند، بنابراین ما ERRANT را به نتیجه سیستم کار مشترک CoNLL-2014 برای انجام یک تحلیل نوع خطای جزئیات برای اولین بار استفاده کردیم.', 'de': 'Bisher konnte die Fehlertypleistung von GEC-Systemen nur in Bezug auf Rückruf gemessen werden, da die Systemausgabe nicht kommentiert ist. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, führen wir ERRANT ein, ein grammatikalisches ERRor ANnotation Toolkit, das entworfen wurde, um Bearbeitungen aus parallelen Originalsätzen und korrigierten Sätzen automatisch zu extrahieren und nach einem neuen, datensatzanagnostischen, regelbasierten Framework zu klassifizieren. Dies erleichtert nicht nur die Fehlertypbewertung auf verschiedenen Granularitätsstufen, sondern kann auch genutzt werden, um den Annotator-Arbeitsaufwand zu reduzieren und bestehende GEC-Datensätze zu standardisieren. Menschliche Experten bewerteten die automatischen Bearbeitungen in mindestens 95% der Fälle als "gut" oder "akzeptabel", daher haben wir ERRANT auf die Systemausgabe der gemeinsamen Aufgabe CoNLL-2014 angewendet, um erstmals eine detaillierte Fehlertypanalyse durchzuführen.', 'af': "Tot nou, fout tipe prestasie vir Gramatiese Fout Korreksie (GEC) stelsels kon slegs gemeet word in terms van herhaal omdat stelsel uitvoer nie aangekies is nie. Om hierdie probleem te oorwerp, introduseer ons ERRANT, 'n grammatiese ERROR ANnotation Toolkit ontwerp om outomaties redigeerders uit parallele oorspronklike en korrigeerde setinge uit te pak en hulle te klassifiseer volgens 'n nuwe, dataset- agnostiese, reëlsgebaseerde raamwerk. Hierdie nie slegs maak fout tipe evaluering op verskillende vlakke van granulariteit gemaklik nie, maar kan ook gebruik word om annotator werk laai te verminder en bestaande GEC datastelle te standardiseer. Mense eksperte het die outomatiese redigeerders as 'goed' of 'aanvaarbaar' in ten minste 95% van gevalle aangepas, sodat ons ERRANT aangepas het na die stelsel uitvoer van die CoNLL-2014 gedeelde taak om 'n gedeelte fout tipe analisie vir die eerste keer te uitvoer.", 'ko': "지금까지 문법 오류 수정(GEC) 시스템의 오류 유형 성능은 시스템 출력에 주석이 없기 때문에 회상으로만 평가할 수 있었다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 ERRANT를 도입했습니다. 이것은 문법 오류 주석 도구 패키지입니다. 이것은 자동으로 평행의 원시와 정정 문장에서 편집 내용을 추출하고 데이터 집합과 무관하고 규칙에 기반한 새로운 구조에 따라 분류하는 것입니다.이는 서로 다른 입도 단계에서 오류 유형을 평가하는 데 도움이 될 뿐만 아니라 주석기의 작업량을 줄이고 기존의 GEC 데이터 집합을 표준화하는 데도 사용될 수 있다.최소 95%의 경우 인간 전문가들은 자동 편집을'양호'또는'수용 가능'으로 평가하기 때문에 우리는 처음으로 CoNLL-2014 공유 작업의 시스템 출력에 ERRANT를 적용하여 상세한 오류 유형 분석을 실시했다.", 'sq': "Deri tani, performanca e tipit të gabimeve për sistemet e Korrektimit të Gabimeve Gramatike (GEC) mund të matej vetëm në termat e tërheqjes sepse dalja e sistemit nuk është shënuar. Për të kapërcyer këtë problem, ne paraqesim ERRANT, një kasafortë grammatike ERRor ANnotation Toolkit dizajnuar për të nxjerrë automatikisht editimet nga fjalët paralele origjinale dhe të korrigjuara dhe për t'i klasifikuar sipas një kuadri të ri, të dataset-agnostic, bazuar në rregulla. Kjo jo vetëm lehtëson vlerësimin e tipit të gabimeve në nivele të ndryshme të granularitetit, por mund të përdoret gjithashtu për të reduktuar ngarkesën e punës së anotatorit dhe për të standardizuar grupet ekzistuese të të dhënave GEC. Ekspertët njerëzorë vlerësuan editimet automatike si 'të mira' apo 'të pranueshme' në të paktën 95% të rasteve, kështu që ne aplikuam ERRANT në prodhimin e sistemit të detyrës së përbashkët CoNLL-2014 për të kryer një analizë të detajuar të llojit të gabimeve për herë të parë.", 'az': "Şimdiye qədər, Grammatical Hata Düzəltməsi (GEC) sistemlərinin xəta növü performansı yalnız sistem çıxışı bildirilmədiyinə görə ölçürilə bilər. Bu problemdən üstün gəlmək üçün, ERRANT'i, gramatik ERRor ANnotation Toolkit'i, paralel original və düzəltmiş cümlələrdən düzəltmək üçün düzəltdi və yeni, verilən qurğu-agnostik, qayda-tabanlı frameworlərə görə təşkil edirik. Bu yalnız müxtəlif granularlığın səviyyələrində xəta türünün değerlendirməsini asanlaşdırır, ancaq annotator çalışma yükünü azaltmaq və mevcut GEC veri qurularını standartlaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. İnsanların xəbərdarlıqları ən az 95% vəziyyətdə otomatik editlərini 'yaxşı' və ya 'qəbul edilə bilər' kimi hesab etdilər, bu yüzden ilk dəfə xəta növü analizi etmək üçün CoNLL-2014 paylaşılan işlərin sisteminin istifadəsinə ERRANT uyguladıq.", 'bn': "এখন পর্যন্ত গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিক্যাল সংশোধনের (GEC) সিস্টেমের জন্য ত্রুটি প্রদর্শন করা যাবে কেবল স্মরণের মাধ্যমে মাপ পরিমাপ এই সমস্যাকে জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা ERRANT-কে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, একটি গ্রামাটিক্যাল এররোর এনোটেশন টুলিকিট, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্যারালেলেল মূলিকানা থেকে সম্পাদক বের করে সংশোধন এটি শুধুমাত্র ভিন্ন পর্যায়ে ত্রুটির ধরনের মূল্যের সুযোগ প্রদান করে না, বরং বিদ্যমান GEC ডাটাসেট কমানোর জন্য ব্যবহার করা যাবে। মানবিক বিশেষজ্ঞরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় সম্পাদকগুলোকে 'ভাল' অথবা 'গ্রহণযোগ্য' হিসেবে হারিয়েছেন অন্তত ৯৫% ক্ষেত্রে, তাই আমরা প্রথমবারের জন্য বিস্তারিত ত ত্রুটির", 'bs': "Do sada, provedba tipa greške za sisteme Gramatične korekcije greške (GEC) mogla bi biti mjerena samo u smislu sjećanja jer izlaz sistema nije annotiran. Za prevladanje ovog problem a, predstavljamo ERRANT, gramatički instrument za ANnotaciju ERRor dizajniran kako bi automatski izvukao editore iz paralelnih originalnih i ispravnih rečenica i klasifikovali ih prema novom, agnostičkom, pravilnom okviru podataka. To ne samo olakšava procjenu tipa greška na različitim nivoima granularnosti, već se može koristiti i za smanjenje radnog opterećenja annotatora i standardizaciju postojećih GEC podataka. Ljudski stručnjaci su ocenili automatske editore kao 'dobre' ili 'prihvatljive' u najmanje 95% slučajeva, pa smo primjenjivali ERRANT na izlaz sustava zajedničkog zadatka CoNLL-2014 kako bi prvi put proveli detaljnu analizu tipa greške.", 'hy': "Until now, error type performance for Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) systems could only be measured in terms of recall because system output is not annotated.  Այս խնդիրը հաղթահարելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք ERRAnt-ը, մի գրամատիկ ERROR-ի Աննոտացիայի գործիքների համակարգ, որը ստեղծված է ավտոմատ հանելու խմբագրությունները զուգահեռ օրիգինալ և ճշգրիտ նախադասություններից և դասակարգում դրանք ըստ նոր, տվյալների համակարգ This not only facilitates error type evaluation at different levels of granularity, but can also be used to reduce annotator workload and standardise existing GEC datasets.  Human experts rated the automatic edits as 'Good' or 'Acceptable' in at least 95% of cases, so we applied ERRANT to the system output of the CoNLL-2014 shared task to carry out a detailed error type analysis for the first time.", 'cs': 'Dosud mohl být výkon typu chyb pro systémy gramatické korekce chyb (GEC) měřen pouze z hlediska stažení, protože systémový výstup není anotován. Pro překonání tohoto problému představujeme ERRANT, gramatický ERRor ANnotation Toolkit určený k automatickému extrahování editací z paralelních originálních a opravených vět a klasifikaci podle nového, datově-agnostického, pravidelného frameworku. To nejen usnadňuje hodnocení typů chyb na různých úrovních granularity, ale může být také použito ke snížení pracovní zátěže anotátorů a standardizaci stávajících datových sad GEC. Lidští odborníci hodnotili automatické úpravy jako "Dobré" nebo "Přijatelné" alespoň v 95% případů, takže jsme aplikovali ERRANT na systémový výstup sdíleného úkolu CoNLL-2014 a poprvé provedli podrobnou analýzu typu chyby.', 'et': 'Praeguseni oli grammatilise veaparanduse (GEC) süsteemide veatüübi jõudlust võimalik mõõta ainult tagasivõtmise põhjal, sest süsteemi väljundit ei ole märgitud. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks tutvustame ERRANT-i, grammatilist ERRor ANnotation Toolkit, mille eesmärk on automaatselt ekstraheerida redaktsioone paralleelsetest originaalsetest ja parandatud lausetest ning klassifitseerida need vastavalt uuele andmekogumile sõltumatule reeglipõhisele raamistikule. See mitte ainult ei hõlbusta veatüübi hindamist erinevatel täpsustasemetel, vaid seda saab kasutada ka annotatorite töökoormuse vähendamiseks ja olemasolevate GEC andmekogumite standardimiseks. Inimeseksperdid hindasid automaatseid muudatusi vähemalt 95% juhtudest "heaks" või "aktsepteeritavaks", seega rakendasime ERRANTi CoNLL-2014 jagatud ülesande süsteemi väljundile, et viia esmakordselt läbi üksikasjalik veatüübi analüüs.', 'ca': "Fins ara, el rendiment del tipus d'error dels sistemes de correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC) només es podria mesurar en termes de recuperació perquè la sortida del sistema no està anotata. To overcome this problem, we introduce ERRANT, a grammatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit designed to automatically extract edits from parallel original and corrected sentences and classify them according to a new, dataset-agnostic, rule-based framework.  Això no només facilita l'evaluació del tipus d'error a diferents nivells de granularitat, sinó també pot ser utilitzat per reduir la càrrega de treball dels anotators i estandaritzar els conjunts de dades GEC existents. Els experts humans van classificar les edicions automàtiques com 'Bones' o 'Acceptables' en almenys el 95% dels casos, així que vam aplicar ERRANT a la producció del sistema de la tasca compartida CoNLL-2014 per a fer una anàlisi detallada del tipus d'error per primera vegada.", 'tr': "Häzirçe, Grammatikal Hata Dopasy (GEC) sistemleri üçin hata hili eserlemeleri diňe gaýd etmek üçin sistemiň çikgi şöwürlenmedi. Bu meseleden üstün çykmak üçin biz ERRANT'i, gramatik ERROR Aňlamak isleýän äpişgeleri öz-özüne parallel original we düzenli sözlerni a çmak üçin tassyklandyrýarys we olaryň täze, veri-setir agnostik we kural daýanýan çerçewçilikine laýyşlandyrýarys. Bu diňe faýllaryň tekiz derejesinde hata hilli çykyşyny bejermek üçin bejermez, ýöne bu ýerde ýazyşlyk ýüklemek üçin ullanyla bilýär we bu ýerde bar GEC veri setirlerini düşürmek üçin ullanyla bilýär. Adamlar ekspertleri iň azyndan 95% durumda 'gowy' ýa 'kabul edilebilir' diýip awtomatik düzenlemeklerini, şonuň üçin CoNLL-2014 sistemiň çizgisinde bir hata hili analýşini ilkinji gezek ýerine ýetirdik.", 'am': 'እስከ አሁን ድረስ የስህተት ዓይነት ስህተት ማቀናጃ (GEC) ስርዓቶች በቁጥጥር ማሰሪያ ብቻ ይችላል ምክንያቱም የስርዓት ውጤት ማስታወስ አይደለም። ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሸንፍ የERRANT፣ የቅርማዊ ERRor ANnotation Toolkit፣ በተለየ አዲስ የዳታ-አቀማመጥ፣ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ክፍተት ማረፊያዎችን በራስነት ለማውጣት እና በተለየነው፡፡ ይህ የስህተት ዓይነት ማሰናከል ብቻ አይደለም፥ ነገር ግን የGEC ዳታዎችን ለማጎድል እና ለማስተካከል ይችላል። የሰው ባለስህተተኞች የራሳቸውን ማረፊያ ‘መልካም’ ወይም ‘መቀበል’ በመያነስ 95 በመቶ እንደሆነ አስቀድሞ የስህተት ዓይነት አስተያየት ለመጀመሪያ ጊዜ ለመፈለግ የስህተት መልዕክት ERRANT አቀረብን፡፡', 'fi': 'Tähän mennessä Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) -järjestelmien virhetyyppien suorituskykyä voitiin mitata vain takaisinkutsun perusteella, koska järjestelmän ulostuloa ei ole merkitty. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi otamme käyttöön ERRANT-kieliopillisen ERRor ANnotation Toolkit -työkalun, joka on suunniteltu automaattisesti poimimaan muokkauksia rinnakkaisista alkuperäisistä ja korjatuista lauseista ja luokittelemaan ne uuden, dataset-agnostisen, sääntöpohjaisen kehyksen mukaan. Tämä ei ainoastaan helpota virhetyyppien arviointia eri tarkkuustasoilla, vaan sitä voidaan käyttää myös merkintöjen työmäärän vähentämiseen ja olemassa olevien GEC-tietokokonaisuuksien standardointiin. Inhimilliset asiantuntijat arvioivat automaattiset muokkaukset "hyviksi" tai "hyväksyttäviksi" vähintään 95 prosentissa tapauksista, joten sovelsimme ERRANTin CoNLL-2014 jaettuun tehtävään tehdäksemme ensimmäisen kerran yksityiskohtaisen virhetyypin analyysin.', 'sk': 'Do zdaj je bilo mogoče učinkovitost vrste napak pri sistemih Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) meriti samo v smislu odpoklica, ker sistemski izhod ni označen. Da bi premagali ta problem, uvajamo ERRANT, slovnični ERRor ANnotation Toolkit, ki je namenjen samodejnemu ekstrahiranju urejanj iz vzporednih izvirnih in popravljenih stavkov in jih razvrstitvi v skladu z novim okvirom, ki temelji na pravilih. To ne le olajša ocenjevanja vrste napak na različnih ravneh natančnosti, temveč se lahko uporabi tudi za zmanjšanje delovne obremenitve označevalcev in standardizacijo obstoječih naborov podatkov GEC. Človeški strokovnjaki so avtomatsko urejanje ocenili kot "dobro" ali "sprejemljivo" v vsaj 95% primerov, zato smo ERRANT uporabili za sistemski rezultat skupne naloge CoNLL-2014, da bi prvič izvedli podrobno analizo vrste napak.', 'ha': "@ action: button Za iya rinjãya wannan fitina, za mu ƙara shirin YERANRor ANnotation na grammaci, don a yi amfani da shi wajen tafiyar da editori farat ɗaya daga cire-kwance da aka daidaita, kuma mu ƙayyade su a kan zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-danne. Wannan bã ya amfani da evaluation na nau'in ɓata kawai cikin daraja daban granuti, kuma amma yana iya amfani da shi dõmin a ƙara lodi na aikin mai zartar da shi kuma a daidaita tsarin da ke jira na GEC. Wata masu ƙayyade shirin editorin farat ɗaya kamar 'Bai'a' ko 'Aktabitacce' ko da a rage 95% daga masu sakan, don haka mun amfani da ERANNT zuwa matsalar na tsarin aikin na CoNLL-2014 da aka raba shi dõmin ya yi aikin wani Analytan nau'in ɓata wa kwanza.", 'jv': "buddy text-tool-action Iki ora bisa perusahaan kanggo kaliwat urip kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo sampeyan gérané Awak sing perbudhakan nambah kelas 'Layar' karo 'Acceptable' ning njuk-ngobro 75% keasara, dadi Awak dhéwé aplikasi MERIND kanggo output sistem sing CoNLL", 'he': 'עד עכשיו, ביצועי סוג טעות במערכות תיקון שגיאות גראמטיות (GEC) יכולים למדוד רק במונחים של זיכרון כי יציאת המערכת לא מוסרת. כדי להתגבר על הבעיה הזאת, אנו מכירים את ERRANT, ערכת כלים גרמטית ANnotation ERRor תוכננה כדי אוטומטית להוציא עורכות משפטים מקוריים ומתוקנים במקביל ולקליфікуת אותם לפי מסגרת חדשה, קבוצת נתונים-אגנוסטית, מבוססת על חוקים. זה לא רק מקל הערכה של סוג שגיאות ברמות שונות של גרניליות, אלא גם יכול להשתמש כדי להפחית העמס העבודה של המכתבים ולסטנדרטיזם קבוצות מידע GEC קיימות. המומחים האנושיים העריכו את העורקים האוטומטיים כ"טובים" או "מקובלים" לפחות ב-95% מהמקרים, כך שימשנו ERRANT ליציאה המערכת של משימה משותפת CoNLL-2014 לבצע ניתוח סוג שגיאות מפורט בפעם הראשונה.', 'bo': "Until now, error type performance for Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) systems could only be measured in terms of recall because system output is not annotated. ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསྐྱེད་ཐབས་བྱས་ན་ERRANT་དང་grammatical ERRor ANnotation Toolkit་གི་སྒྲིག This is not only facilitates error type evaluation at different levels of granularity. It can also be used to reduce annotator workload and standardise existing GEC datasets. Human experts rated the automatic edits as 'Good' or 'Acceptable' in at least 95% of cases, so we applied ERRANT to the system output of the CoNLL-2014 shared task to carry out a detailed error type analysis for the first time."}
{'en': 'Evaluation Metrics for Machine Reading Comprehension : Prerequisite Skills and Readability', 'ar': 'مقاييس التقييم لفهم القراءة الآلي: المهارات الأساسية وقابلية القراءة', 'fr': "Mesures d'évaluation pour la compréhension de la lecture automatique\xa0: compétences préalables et lisibilité", 'es': 'Métricas de evaluación para la comprensión de la lectura automática: habilidades y legibilidad necesarias', 'pt': 'Métricas de avaliação para compreensão de leitura de máquina: habilidades de pré-requisito e legibilidade', 'ja': '機械読解理解のための評価指標：前提となるスキルと読みやすさ', 'hi': 'मशीन पढ़ने की समझ के लिए मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स: पूर्वशर्त कौशल और पठनीयता', 'zh': '机器读其评指标:先决技能可读性', 'ga': 'Méadrachtaí Measúnaithe do Thuiscint Meaisín-Léitheoireachta: Scileanna Réamhriachtanas agus Inléiteacht', 'ru': 'Оценочные показатели для понимания машинного чтения: необходимые навыки и удобочитаемость', 'el': 'Μέτρα αξιολόγησης για την κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης: Απαραίτητες δεξιότητες και αναγνωσιμότητα', 'hu': 'Értékelési mércék a gépi olvasáshoz: előfeltételek és olvashatóság', 'ka': 'მაქსინური კითხვის კომპრენციის განსაზღვრება მეტრიკები: საჭირო სკენები და კითხვის შესაძლებლობა', 'lt': 'Mašinų skaitymo supratimo vertinimo metodai: būtini įgūdžiai ir skaitomumas', 'it': 'Metriche di valutazione per la lettura automatica Comprensione: Prerequisiti di abilità e leggibilità', 'kk': 'Машин оқу құрылғысының оқу метрикалары: алдындағы мәліметтер мен оқу мүмкіндігі', 'mk': 'Оценувачките метрики за разбирање на читањето на машина: Препредусловни вештини и читливост', 'ms': 'Metrik Evaluasi untuk Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin: Kekuatan dan Kemudahan Bersyarat', 'mt': 'Metriki ta’ Evalwazzjoni għall-Komprensjoni tal-Qari tal-Magni: Ħiliet u Readability Prerekwiżit', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d: ആവശ്യമുള്ള സ്കൈലുകളും പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നതും', 'mn': 'Машин унших судалгааны тооцоолох метрик: Алдын шаардлагатай Skills and Readability', 'pl': 'Metryki oceny dla zrozumienia odczytu maszynowego: wstępne umiejętności i czytelność', 'ro': 'Metrici de evaluare pentru citirea mașinilor Înțelegerea: abilități și lizibilitate necesare', 'no': 'Evalueringsmetrikar for komprimering av maskinelesingName', 'sr': 'Метрике оценки за компреценсију прочитања машина: предварно требане умећности и читање', 'so': 'Qiimeynta kaartaynta baaritaanka ee akhriska mashiinka: Skills iyo Waxqabadka u baahan', 'sv': 'Utvärderingsmetoder för maskinläsning Förståelse: Förutsättningar för färdigheter och läsbarhet', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் முடிவுக்கான மதிப்பீட்டு முறைமை', 'si': 'මැෂින් කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන විශ්ලේෂණ මීට්\u200dරික්', 'ur': 'ماشین پڑھنے کی کمپرنسیس کے لئے مطالعہ متریک: پیش خواستہ اسکیل اور پڑھنے کی طاقت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bài đánh giá Hoàn toàn cho máy móc:', 'bg': 'Метрици за оценка за разбиране на машинното четене: предварителни умения и четливост', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje metrika za kompresiju pročitanja strojeva: predviđena vještina i čitljivost', 'nl': 'Evaluatiestatistieken voor het begrijpen van machinelezen: vereiste vaardigheden en leesbaarheid', 'da': 'Evaluering Metrics for Machine Reading Forståelse: Forudsætninger for færdigheder og læsbarhed', 'de': 'Evaluation Metrics for Machine Reading Comprehension: Voraussetzungen und Lesbarkeit', 'fa': 'متریک ارزیابی برای تأثیر خواندن ماشین: Skills and Readability پیش\u200cنیاز', 'sw': 'Matambo ya Uchunguzi kwa Mashiniki ya Kusoma Uwezeshaji: Magonjwa muhimu na Uwezekanaji', 'tr': 'Makine Okamak Derjesi üçin Taýýarlama Metrici', 'id': 'Metrik Evaluasi untuk Pembacaan Mesin Komprensi: Keahlian dan Kemudahan Berdasarkan', 'af': 'Evalueer Metrike vir Masjien Lees Kompleksie: Voorskoude Skille en Leesbaard', 'sq': 'Metrikët e vlerësimit për përfshirjen e leximit të makinave: aftësitë parakushtuese dhe lexueshmëria', 'ko': '기계독해의 평가 지표: 필수 기능과 가독성', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Մեխանիզմների ընթերցման գնահատման մետրիկները. նախապայմանավոր հմտություններ և կարելի է ընթերցել', 'az': 'Makinat oxuyan Səfərləşməsi üçün çəkilmə Metrici: Öncelikdə Səfərlənmiş Səfərlənmələr və Oquqlanması', 'bn': 'মেশিন পাঠ করার জন্য পরিমাণ মেট্রিক: প্রয়োজনীয় স্কিল এবং প্রত্যাবর্তন', 'ca': "Métrics d'Evaluació per la Comprensió de la Llegida Màquina: Capacitats precondits i llegibilitat", 'cs': 'Metriky hodnocení pro pochopení strojového čtení: Předpokladné dovednosti a čitelnost', 'et': 'Hindamismeetrid masinlugemise mõistmiseks: eeltingimused oskused ja loetavus', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje metrika za kompresiju pročitanja strojeva: predviđena vještina i čitljivost', 'fi': 'Konelukemisen arviointimittarit: Edellyttävät taidot ja luettavuus', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Ocenjevalne meritve za strojno branje: predpogojne spretnosti in berljivost', 'he': 'מטריות הערכה עבור ביטוי קריאת מכונות: מיומנות מראשית וקריאות', 'bo': 'Machine Reading Comprehension for Evaluation Metrics: Prerequisite Skills and Readability'}
{'en': 'Knowing the quality of reading comprehension (RC) datasets is important for the development of natural-language understanding systems. In this study, two classes of metrics were adopted for evaluating RC datasets : prerequisite skills and readability. We applied these classes to six existing datasets, including MCTest and SQuAD, and highlighted the characteristics of the datasets according to each metric and the correlation between the two classes. Our dataset analysis suggests that the readability of RC datasets does not directly affect the question difficulty and that it is possible to create an RC dataset that is easy to read but difficult to answer.', 'es': 'Conocer la calidad de los conjuntos de datos de comprensión lectora (RC) es importante para el desarrollo de sistemas de comprensión del lenguaje natural. En este estudio, se adoptaron dos clases de métricas para evaluar los conjuntos de datos de RC: habilidades de requisitos previos y legibilidad. Aplicamos estas clases a seis conjuntos de datos existentes, incluidos McTest y sQuad, y destacamos las características de los conjuntos de datos de acuerdo con cada métrica y la correlación entre las dos clases. Nuestro análisis de conjunto de datos sugiere que la legibilidad de los conjuntos de datos de RC no afecta directamente a la dificultad de la pregunta y que es posible crear un conjunto de datos de RC que sea fácil de leer pero difícil de responder.', 'ar': 'تعد معرفة جودة مجموعات بيانات فهم القراءة (RC) أمرًا مهمًا لتطوير أنظمة فهم اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الدراسة ، تم اعتماد فئتين من المقاييس لتقييم مجموعات بيانات RC: المهارات الأساسية وقابلية القراءة. طبقنا هذه الفئات على ست مجموعات بيانات موجودة ، بما في ذلك MCTest و SQuAD ، وأبرزنا خصائص مجموعات البيانات وفقًا لكل مقياس والعلاقة بين الفئتين. يشير تحليل مجموعة البيانات لدينا إلى أن قابلية قراءة مجموعات بيانات RC لا تؤثر بشكل مباشر على صعوبة السؤال وأنه من الممكن إنشاء مجموعة بيانات RC يسهل قراءتها ولكن يصعب الإجابة عليها.', 'fr': "Connaître la qualité des ensembles de données de compréhension de la lecture (RC) est important pour le développement de systèmes de compréhension du langage naturel. Dans cette étude, deux classes de métriques ont été adoptées pour évaluer les ensembles de données RC\xa0: compétences préalables et lisibilité. Nous avons appliqué ces classes à six ensembles de données existants, dont McTest et SQuad, et avons mis en évidence les caractéristiques des ensembles de données en fonction de chaque métrique et la corrélation entre les deux classes. Notre analyse des ensembles de données suggère que la lisibilité des ensembles de données RC n'affecte pas directement la difficulté de la question et qu'il est possible de créer un jeu de données RC facile à lire mais difficile à répondre.", 'pt': 'Conhecer a qualidade dos conjuntos de dados de compreensão de leitura (RC) é importante para o desenvolvimento de sistemas de compreensão de linguagem natural. Neste estudo, duas classes de métricas foram adotadas para avaliar conjuntos de dados RC: habilidades de pré-requisito e legibilidade. Aplicamos essas classes a seis conjuntos de dados existentes, incluindo MCTest e SQuAD, e destacamos as características dos conjuntos de dados de acordo com cada métrica e a correlação entre as duas classes. Nossa análise do conjunto de dados sugere que a legibilidade dos conjuntos de dados RC não afeta diretamente a dificuldade da pergunta e que é possível criar um conjunto de dados RC que seja fácil de ler, mas difícil de responder.', 'ja': '読解（ RC ）データセットの質を知ることは、自然言語理解システムの開発にとって重要である。この研究では、RCデータセットを評価するために、前提条件スキルと読みやすさの2つのクラスの指標が採用されました。これらのクラスをMCTestやSQuADを含む6つの既存のデータセットに適用し、各指標に応じたデータセットの特徴と2つのクラス間の相関関係を強調しました。当社のデータセット分析は、RCデータセットの可読性が質問の難易度に直接影響しないこと、および読みやすいが回答が難しいRCデータセットを作成することが可能であることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '知读(RC)数集,于自然语言为重。 于此论之,用二指标以质RC数集:先决技能可读性。 宜用六集, MCTest SQuAD,各以指标、二类相关性显见数集。 余数据集分析表明,RC数集之可读性不能直损其难,且可创易读而难对者RC数集。', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ (आरसी) डेटासेट की गुणवत्ता को जानना प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ प्रणालियों के विकास के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। इस अध्ययन में, आरसी डेटासेट का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए मीट्रिक के दो वर्गों को अपनाया गया था: पूर्वशर्त कौशल और पठनीयता। हमने इन वर्गों को MCTest और SQuAD सहित छह मौजूदा डेटासेट पर लागू किया, और प्रत्येक मीट्रिक के अनुसार डेटासेट की विशेषताओं और दो वर्गों के बीच सहसंबंध पर प्रकाश डाला। हमारे डेटासेट विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि आरसी डेटासेट की पठनीयता सीधे प्रश्न कठिनाई को प्रभावित नहीं करती है और यह कि एक आरसी डेटासेट बनाना संभव है जिसे पढ़ना आसान है लेकिन जवाब देना मुश्किल है।', 'ru': 'Знание качества наборов данных понимания чтения (RC) имеет важное значение для развития систем понимания естественного языка. В этом исследовании для оценки наборов данных RC были приняты два класса метрик: необходимые навыки и читаемость. Мы применили эти классы к шести существующим наборам данных, включая MCTest и SQuAD, и выделили характеристики наборов данных в соответствии с каждой метрикой и корреляцию между двумя классами. Наш анализ наборов данных показывает, что читаемость наборов данных RC напрямую не влияет на сложность вопроса и что можно создать набор данных RC, который легко читать, но на который трудно ответить.', 'ga': 'Tá sé tábhachtach eolas a bheith agat ar cháilíocht thacair sonraí na léamhthuisceana (RC) chun córais tuisceana nádúrtha-teanga a fhorbairt. Sa staidéar seo, glacadh le dhá rang méadrachta chun tacair sonraí RC a mheas: scileanna réamhriachtanas agus inléiteacht. Chuireamar na haicmí seo i bhfeidhm ar shé thacar sonraí a bhí ann cheana, lena n-áirítear MCTest agus SQuAD, agus leagamar béim ar shaintréithe na dtacar sonraí de réir gach méadrach agus an comhghaol idir an dá rang. Tugann ár n-anailís ar thacair sonraí le fios nach gcuireann inléiteacht thacair sonraí RC isteach go díreach ar an deacracht ceiste agus gur féidir tacar sonraí RC a chruthú atá éasca le léamh ach deacair a fhreagairt.', 'ka': 'მონაცემების კითხვის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია (RC) მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია მონაცემების სისტე ამ კვლევაში, ორი მეტრიკის კლასი RC მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის დავუწყებულია: საუკეთესო კონფიგურაცია და კონფიგურაცია. ჩვენ ამ კლასის შვიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას დაყენეთ, რომელიც MCTest და SQuAD, და მონაცემების კონფიგურაციების განსაზღვრება ყოველ მეტრიკის და ორი კლასის შორის კონრელეციას ჩვენი მონაცემების ანალიზია, რომ RC მონაცემების კითხვა შესაძლებლობა არ ექნება კითხვის შესაძლებლობას და რომ შესაძლებელია RC მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შექმნა, რომელიც ადვილი უკეთეს', 'hu': 'Az olvasásértő (RC) adatkészletek minőségének ismerete fontos a természetes nyelvértő rendszerek fejlesztéséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban két osztályt alkalmaztunk az RC adatkészletek értékelésére: előfeltételi készségek és olvashatóság. Ezeket az osztályokat hat meglévő adatkészletre alkalmaztuk, beleértve az MCTest és az SQUAD-t, és kiemeltük az adatkészletek jellemzőit az egyes metrikák szerint és a két osztály közötti korrelációt. Adatkészlet elemzésünk azt sugallja, hogy az RC adatkészletek olvashatósága nem befolyásolja közvetlenül a kérdés nehézségét, és hogy lehetséges egy könnyen olvasható, de nehéz megválaszolni RC adatkészlet létrehozása.', 'el': 'Η γνώση της ποιότητας των συνόλων δεδομένων κατανόησης ανάγνωσης (RC) είναι σημαντική για την ανάπτυξη συστημάτων κατανόησης φυσικής γλώσσας. Στη μελέτη αυτή υιοθετήθηκαν δύο κατηγορίες μετρήσεων για την αξιολόγηση των συνόλων δεδομένων: οι απαραίτητες δεξιότητες και η αναγνωσιμότητα. Εφαρμόσαμε αυτές τις κατηγορίες σε έξι υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των MCTest και SQuAD, και τονίσαμε τα χαρακτηριστικά των συνόλων δεδομένων σύμφωνα με κάθε μετρική και τη συσχέτιση μεταξύ των δύο τάξεων. Η ανάλυση του συνόλου δεδομένων μας δείχνει ότι η αναγνωσιμότητα των συνόλων δεδομένων δεν επηρεάζει άμεσα τη δυσκολία της ερώτησης και ότι είναι δυνατόν να δημιουργηθεί ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που είναι εύκολο να διαβαστεί αλλά δύσκολο να απαντηθεί.', 'it': 'Conoscere la qualità dei set di dati di comprensione della lettura (RC) è importante per lo sviluppo di sistemi di comprensione del linguaggio naturale. In questo studio sono state adottate due classi di metriche per la valutazione dei dataset RC: competenze prerequisiti e leggibilità. Abbiamo applicato queste classi a sei set di dati esistenti, tra cui MCTest e SQUAD, ed abbiamo evidenziato le caratteristiche dei set di dati secondo ogni metrica e la correlazione tra le due classi. La nostra analisi dei dataset suggerisce che la leggibilità dei dataset RC non influisce direttamente sulla difficoltà della domanda e che è possibile creare un dataset RC facile da leggere ma difficile da rispondere.', 'kk': 'Оқу сапасы (RC) деректер қорларын білу - табиғи тілдерді түсінім жүйелерін жасау үшін маңызды. Бұл зерттеулерде, RC деректер қорларын оқу үшін екі метрикалық классы қолданылды: алдыңғы қажеттілік және оқу мүмкіндігі. Біз бұл класстарды алты бар деректер қорларына қолдандық, MCTest және SQuAD, және деректер қорларының қасиеттерін әрбір метрикалық және екі класс арасындағы кореляциясына сәйкес белгіледі. Біздің деректер жиының анализиясы RC деректер жиындарының оқу мүмкіндігі сұрақтар мәселесіне әсер етпейді және RC деректер жиынын құру оңай, бірақ жауап беру қиын.', 'lt': 'Skaitymo supratimo duomenų rinkinių kokybės žinojimas yra svarbus gamtos kalbų supratimo sistemų kūrimui. Šiame tyrime buvo patvirtintos dvi RC duomenų rinkinių vertinimo klasės: būtini įgūdžiai ir skaitomumas. Taikėme šias klases šešiems esamiems duomenų rinkiniams, įskaitant MCTest ir SQuAD, ir pabrėžėme duomenų rinkinių charakteristikas pagal kiekvieną metriją ir abiejų klasių koreliaciją. Mūsų duomenų rinkinio analizė rodo, kad RC duomenų rinkinių skaitomumas tiesiogiai neturi įtakos klausimų sunkumui ir kad yra įmanoma sukurti RC duomenų rinkinį, kuris būtų lengvas skaityti, bet sunku atsakyti.', 'mk': 'Познавањето на квалитетот на датотеките за разбирање на читањето (RC) е важно за развојот на системите за разбирање на природниот јазик. Во оваа студија беа усвоени две класи метрика за проценка на податоците на РЦ: предусловни вештини и читливост. Ги применивме овие класи на шест постоечки податоци, вклучително и MCTest и SQuAD, и ги истакнавме карактеристиките на податоците според секоја метрика и корелацијата помеѓу двете класи. Нашата анализа на податоците покажува дека читливоста на податоците на РЦ не влијае директно на тешкотијата во прашањето и дека е можно да се создаде податок на РЦ кој е лесен за читање, но тешко за одговор.', 'ms': 'Mengetahui kualiti set data pemahaman baca (RC) adalah penting untuk pembangunan sistem pemahaman bahasa alam. Dalam kajian ini, dua kelas metrik diterima untuk menilai set data RC: kemampuan dan pembacaan awal syarat. Kami menerapkan kelas-kelas ini kepada enam set data yang ada, termasuk MCTest dan SQuAD, dan menyatakan ciri-ciri set data mengikut setiap metrik dan korelasi antara kedua-dua kelas. Analisis set data kami menunjukkan bahawa pembacaan set data RC tidak secara langsung mempengaruhi kesulitan soalan dan bahawa ia adalah mungkin untuk mencipta set data RC yang mudah dibaca tetapi sukar untuk dijawab.', 'mt': 'L-għarfien tal-kwalità tas-settijiet tad-dejta tal-fehim tal-qari (RC) huwa importanti għall-iżvilupp ta’ sistemi ta’ fehim tal-lingwa naturali. F’dan l-istudju, ġew adottati żewġ klassijiet ta’ metrika għall-evalwazzjoni tas-settijiet ta’ dejta RC: ħiliet prerekwiżiti u leġibbiltà. Applikajna dawn il-klassijiet għal sitt settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti, inklużi l-MCTest u l-SQuAD, u enfasizzaw il-karatteristiċi tas-settijiet ta’ dejta skont kull metrika u l-korrelazzjoni bejn iż-żewġ klassijiet. Our dataset analysis suggests that the readability of RC datasets does not directly affect the question difficulty and that it is possible to create an RC dataset that is easy to read but difficult to answer.', 'ml': 'Knowing the quality of reading comprehension (RC) datasets is important for the development of natural-language understanding systems.  ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d RC ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d രണ്ടു ക്ലാസ്സ് മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തു. ആവശ്യമുള്ള കഴിവ ഈ ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ആറു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിച്ചു. എംസിറ്റെസ്റ്റും എസ്ക്വാഡിലേയും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തി. ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളു നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ വായിക്കാനുള്ള വിശദീകരണം നേരിട്ട് ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയില്ല എന്നും വായിക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമാ', 'no': 'Å vite kvaliteten for lesingsforståking (RC) er viktig for utviklinga av naturspråksforståkingssystemer. I denne studien vart to metriske klasser godtatt for å evaluera RC-datasett: forenødvendige ferdigheit og lesabilitet. Vi brukte desse klassene til seks eksisterande datasett, inkludert MCTest og SQuAD, og markerte karakteristikaren på datasetta etter kvar metrisk og korrelasjonen mellom dei to klassene. Datasett-analysen vårt foreslår at lesabiliteten av RC-datasett ikkje direkte påvirkar spørsmålsvanskeligheten og at det er mogleg å laga ein RC-dataset som er lett å lesa, men vanskeleg å svara.', 'pl': 'Znajomość jakości zbiorów danych dotyczących rozumienia czytania (RC) jest ważna dla rozwoju systemów rozumienia języka naturalnego. W niniejszym badaniu przyjęto dwie klasy wskaźników do oceny zbiorów danych RC: umiejętności wstępne i czytelność. Zastosowaliśmy te klasy do sześciu istniejących zbiorów danych, w tym MCTest i SQuAD, i podkreśliliśmy charakterystykę zbiorów danych według każdej metryki oraz korelację między tymi dwiema klasami. Nasza analiza zbiorów danych sugeruje, że czytelność zbiorów danych RC nie wpływa bezpośrednio na trudność pytania i że możliwe jest stworzenie zbioru danych RC, który jest łatwy do odczytania, ale trudny do odpowiedzi.', 'mn': 'Унших ухаан (RC) өгөгдлийн санг мэдэх нь байгалийн хэл ойлгох системийн хөгжлийн тулд чухал. Энэ судалгаанд РК өгөгдлийн сангуудыг үнэлэхэд хоёр төрлийн метрик ангид хэрэглэгдсэн. Бид эдгээр хичээлийг MCTest болон SQuAD-ын 6 сургуулийн өгөгдлийн санд ашиглаж, метрик болон хоёр хичээлийн хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой харилцааны чанарыг тодорхойлдог. Бидний өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжилгээ нь RC өгөгдлийн сангийн унших чадварыг шууд асуултын хэцүү нөлөөлөхгүй ба хариултыг хэцүү RC өгөгдлийн санг бий болгох боломжтой.', 'ro': 'Cunoașterea calității seturilor de date de înțelegere a citirii (RC) este importantă pentru dezvoltarea sistemelor de înțelegere a limbajului natural. În acest studiu, au fost adoptate două clase de măsurători pentru evaluarea seturilor de date RC: abilitățile preliminare și lizibilitatea. Am aplicat aceste clase la șase seturi de date existente, inclusiv MCTest și SQUAD, și am evidențiat caracteristicile seturilor de date în funcție de fiecare metrică și corelația dintre cele două clase. Analiza seturilor de date sugerează că lizibilitatea seturilor de date RC nu afectează direct dificultatea întrebării și că este posibil să se creeze un set de date RC ușor de citit, dar dificil de răspuns.', 'si': 'කියවන්න පුළුවන්ගැනීම (RC) දත්ත සෙට් දැනගන්න ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් පද්ධතියට වැදගත් වෙන්න ව මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වර්ගයක් දෙකක් අවශ්\u200dය වුනා RC දත්ත සේට විශ්වාස කරන්න: ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්වා අපි මේ විශ්වාසයේ තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සෙට් හයක් වෙනුවෙන්, MCtesting සහ SQuAD වලින්, ඒ වගේම දත්ත සෙට්ටුවගේ විශේෂතාවක් හැම මෙ අපේ දත්ත සැට විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා RC දත්ත සේට්ගේ කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අමාරුයි නැහැ කියලා RC දත්ත සැ', 'so': "Ogaanshada takhasuska hoose-dhigista akhriska (RC) waa muhiim u ah horumarinta nidaamka waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah. Waxbarashadan waxaa loo qaaday laba kooras oo metrici ah si ay u qiimeyso sawirada RC: aqoonta hore iyo awoodda akhriska. Waxaan fasalkan ku codsannay lix kooras oo jira ee macluumaadka, including MCTest iyo SQuAD, waxaana ku qornay takhasuska macluumaadka, si waafaqsan metric kasta iyo xiriirka labada fasalka dhexdooda. Analyska danbiyada waxaa ka muuqanaya in karashada macluumaadka RC si toos ah uma saameyn karo dhibaatada su'aalka, waxaana suurtagal in la abuuro saxda macluumaadka RC oo fudud in la akhriyo laakiin waa adag in la jawaabo.", 'sr': 'Znanje kvalitete razumevanja čitanja (RC) podataka je važno za razvoj sustava razumevanja prirodnog jezika. U ovom ispitivanju, dve klase metrike su usvojene za procjenu kompeta podataka RC-a: predviđene vještine i čitljivosti. Prijavili smo ove klase na šest postojećih seta podataka, uključujući MCTest i SQuAD, i naglasili smo karakteristike seta podataka prema svakoj metrici i korelaciji između dva klasa. Naša analiza podataka ukazuje na to da čitljivost RC podataka ne utiče direktno na teškoće pitanja i da je moguće stvoriti RC podatak koji je lako čitati ali teško odgovoriti.', 'sv': 'Att känna till kvaliteten på läsförståelse (RC) dataset är viktigt för utvecklingen av naturliga språkförståelse system. I denna studie antogs två klasser av mätvärden för utvärdering av RC-dataset: förkunskaper och läsbarhet. Vi tillämpade dessa klasser på sex befintliga datauppsättningar, inklusive MCTest och SQUAD, och lyfte fram datauppsättningarnas egenskaper enligt varje metrik och korrelationen mellan de två klasserna. Vår dataset analys tyder på att läsbarheten hos RC-dataset inte direkt påverkar frågesvårigheten och att det är möjligt att skapa en RC-dataset som är lätt att läsa men svårbesvarad.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான-மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு தரவு படிக்க (RC) தரவு அமைப்புகள் தெரியும். In this study, two classes of metrics were adopted for evaluating RC datasets: prerequisite skills and readability.  நாம் இந்த வகுப்புகளை 6 இருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தினோம், MCTest மற்றும் SQuAD சேர்த்து, ஒவ்வொரு மெட்ரிக் மற்றும் இரண்டு வகுப்புகளுக எங்கள் தரவுத்தள அமைப்பு ஆய்வு ஆர்சி தரவுத்தளங்களின் வாசிப்பு நேரடியாக கேள்வியின் கடினம் பாதிக்காது என்று தெரியும் மற்றும் பதில', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کے کیفیت کا جاننا (RC) ڈیٹ سٹ کو طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی سیستموں کی تولید کے لئے اہم ہے. اس مطالعہ میں، دو کلاس متریک راس ڈیٹسٹ کا ارزیابی کرنے کے لئے منتخب کیا گیا تھا: پیش فرض کی طاقت اور پڑھنے کی طاقت. ہم نے ان کلاس کو چھ موجود ڈاٹ سٹ پر لازم کیا تھا، جیسے MCTest اور SQuAD، اور ہر متریک کے مطابق ڈاٹ سٹ کے خصوصے اور دو کلاس کے درمیان تعلق کے مطابق تعلق کیا تھا. ہمارے ڈیٹائیسٹ تحقیقات کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ RC ڈیٹائیسٹ کی پڑھنے کی طاقت مستقیماً سؤال کی مشکل پر تأثیر نہیں کرتی اور یہ کہ RC ڈیٹائیسٹ بنانے کی امکان ہے جو پڑھنے کے لئے آسان ہے لیکن جواب دینے', 'uz': "Maʼlumotlar tizimini o'qish (RC) ta'minlovchisi sifatida o'rganish asl tilni o'rganish uchun muhim. Bu tadqida, RC maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatga ikki sinfni o'rganish uchun metrik foydalanadi: muhim taʼminot va oʻqishlik mumkin. Biz bu sinflarni MCTest va SQuAD kabi liq maʼlumotlar tarkibiga qoʻlladik, va har bir metrik va ikki sinfning orasidagi bogʻ'liq darajaga qaramay qildik. Maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlash imkoniyatini aytadi, RC maʼlumot bazasining o'qishni to ʻgʻri muammolasiga qoʻllamaydi va u o'qish oson boʻlgan maʼlumot bazasini yaratish mumkin, ammo javob berish juda qiyin.", 'vi': 'Biết rõ chất lượng của bộ trình bày hiểu biết (RC) rất quan trọng với việc phát triển hệ thống hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong nghiên cứu này, hai lớp đo lường được chọn để đánh giá các tập tin cơ bản: kỹ năng cơ bản và dễ đọc. Chúng tôi áp dụng những lớp này vào sáu tập tin tồn tại, bao gồm MCTest và SQurAD, và đã đánh dấu các đặc trưng của các tập tin theo từng mét và sự tương quan giữa hai lớp. Phân tích bộ dữ liệu của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sự dễ đọc của bộ dữ liệu RC không ảnh hưởng trực tiếp đến vấn đề khó khăn và có thể tạo ra một bộ dữ liệu RC dễ đọc nhưng khó trả lời.', 'da': 'At kende kvaliteten af læseforståelsesdata (RC) er vigtigt for udviklingen af natursprogforståelsessystemer. I denne undersøgelse blev der vedtaget to klasser af metrics til evaluering af RC datasæt: forudsætningsfærdigheder og læsbarhed. Vi anvendte disse klasser på seks eksisterende datasæt, herunder MCTest og SQUAD, og fremhævede datasættenes karakteristika i henhold til hver metric og korrelationen mellem de to klasser. Vores datasæt analyse tyder på, at læsbarheden af RC datasæt ikke direkte påvirker spørgsmålsvanskeligheden, og at det er muligt at oprette et RC datasæt, der er let at læse, men svært at besvare.', 'nl': 'Kennis van de kwaliteit van datasets voor leesbegrip (RC) is belangrijk voor de ontwikkeling van systemen voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke talen. In dit onderzoek werden twee klassen metrics gebruikt voor het evalueren van RC datasets: vereiste vaardigheden en leesbaarheid. We pasten deze klassen toe op zes bestaande datasets, waaronder MCTest en SQuAD, en benadrukten de kenmerken van de datasets volgens elke metriek en de correlatie tussen de twee klassen. Onze datasetanalyse suggereert dat de leesbaarheid van RC datasets niet direct invloed heeft op de vraagmoeilijkheid en dat het mogelijk is om een RC dataset te maken die gemakkelijk te lezen maar moeilijk te beantwoorden is.', 'hr': 'Znanje kvalitete razumijevanja čitanja (RC) podataka važno je za razvoj sustava razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. U ovom ispitivanju, dvije klase metrike su usvojene za procjenu RC dataset: predviđene vještine i čitljivosti. Prijavili smo ove klase na šest postojećih seta podataka, uključujući MCTest i SQuAD, i naglasili smo karakteristike seta podataka prema svakoj metrici i korelaciji između dvije klase. Naša analiza podataka ukazuje na to da čitljivost podataka RC-a ne utječe direktno na teškoće pitanja i da je moguće stvoriti komplet podataka RC-a koji je lako čitati ali teško odgovoriti.', 'de': 'Die Kenntnis der Qualitﾃ､t von Leseverstﾃ､ndnisdatensﾃ､tzen (RC) ist wichtig fﾃｼr die Entwicklung natﾃｼrlicher Sprachverstﾃ､ndnissysteme. In dieser Studie wurden zwei Klassen von Metriken fﾃｼr die Auswertung von RC-Datensﾃ､tzen ﾃｼbernommen: Voraussetzung Skills und Lesbarkeit. Wir haben diese Klassen auf sechs bestehende Datensﾃ､tze angewendet, einschlieﾃ殕ich MCTest und SQuAD, und die Eigenschaften der Datensﾃ､tze entsprechend jeder Metrik und die Korrelation zwischen den beiden Klassen hervorgehoben. Unsere Datensatzanalyse legt nahe, dass die Lesbarkeit von RC-Datensﾃ､tzen nicht direkt die Frageschwierigkeit beeinflusst und dass es mﾃｶglich ist, einen RC-Datensatz zu erstellen, der leicht zu lesen, aber schwer zu beantworten ist.', 'bg': 'Познаването на качеството на наборите от данни за разбиране на четенето е важно за развитието на системи за разбиране на естествения език. В това проучване са приети два класа показатели за оценка на наборите от данни за РК: предпоставки умения и четливост. Приложихме тези класове към шест съществуващи набора от данни, включително MCTest и SQuAD, като подчертахме характеристиките на наборите от данни според всеки показател и корелацията между двата класа. Нашият анализ на набора от данни предполага, че четливостта на наборите от данни не засяга пряко трудността на въпроса и че е възможно да се създаде набор от данни, който е лесен за четене, но труден за отговор.', 'id': 'Mengetahui kualitas pemahaman baca (RC) dataset penting untuk pengembangan sistem pemahaman bahasa alam. Dalam studi ini, dua kelas metrik diadopsi untuk mengevaluasi set data RC: keterampilan dan pembacaan. Kami menerapkan kelas-kelas ini pada enam set data yang ada, termasuk MCTest dan SQuAD, dan memperlihatkan karakteristik dataset menurut setiap metrik dan korelasi antara kedua kelas. Analisis dataset kami menunjukkan bahwa pembacaan dataset RC tidak secara langsung mempengaruhi kesulitan pertanyaan dan bahwa mungkin untuk menciptakan dataset RC yang mudah dibaca tetapi sulit untuk dijawab.', 'fa': 'دانستن کیفیت خواندن درک داده\u200cهای (RC) برای توسعه سیستم\u200cهای درک زبان طبیعی مهم است. در این مطالعه، دو کلاس متریک برای ارزیابی مجموعه داده\u200cهای RC پذیرفته شد: مهارت پیش\u200cنیاز و قابلیت خواندن. ما این کلاس ها را به شش مجموعه داده موجود، شامل MCTest و SQuAD، استفاده کردیم، و ویژگی های مجموعه داده ها را بر اساس هر متریک و ارتباطی بین دو کلاس مشخص کردیم. تحلیل مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که قابلیت خواندن مجموعه داده\u200cهای RC مستقیماً مشکل سوال را تأثیر نمی\u200cدهد و ممکن است یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای RC ایجاد کند که برای خواندن آسان است ولی برای جواب سخت است.', 'sw': 'Kujua kiwango cha mfumo wa kusoma (RC) wa taarifa ni muhimu kwa maendeleo ya mfumo wa ufahamu wa lugha asilia. Katika utafiti huu, darasa mbili la mitindo ilichukuliwa kwa ajili ya kutathmini seti za data za RC: ujuzi wa muhimu na uwezo wa kusoma. Tulitumia darasa hizi kwenye seti sita za taarifa zilizopo, ikiwa ni pamoja na MCTest na SQuAD, na kuonyesha sifa za taarifa kwa mujibu wa kila mitiri na uhusiano kati ya darasa hizo mbili. Uchambuzi wetu wa taarifa unapendekeza kuwa uwezo wa kusoma seti za data za RC hauathiri moja kwa moja kwenye matatizo ya swali na kwamba inawezekana kutengeneza seti ya data za RC ambazo ni rahisi kusoma lakini ni vigumu kujibu.', 'tr': 'Haýyl dilleriň düşünmesi üçin okamakyň (RC) hasaplanjaň keyfiýetini bilýäni tebigy dilleriň düşünmesi sistemleriniň döwletlerine möhüm. Bu araştyrmada, RC veri setirlerini deňlemek üçin iki topar metrik tapyldy: gerekli ukyplary we okamak üçin ullanýardy. Biz bu klaslary 6 bar veri setirlere uygulapdyk, MCTest we SQuAD bilen we veri setirleriniň has karakterlerini iki klas arasynda ýagtylaşdyrdyk. Biziň veri setirmelerimiz RC veri setirleriniň okamak kynçylyklygyny düzgün täsirleşmeýändigini düşünýär we bu RC veri setirlerini okamak aňsat we jogabat etmek kyn mümkin edir.', 'af': "Die kenning van die kwaliteit van lees verstaan (RC) datastelle is belangrik vir die ontwikkeling van natuurlike taal verstaan stelsels. In hierdie studie was twee klasse van metries aangeneem om RC datastelle te evalueer: voorspoedige kunstenaars en leesbaarheid. Ons het hierdie klasse aangepas na ses bestaande datastelle, insluitend MCTest en SQuAD, en die karakteristieke van die datastelle verlig volgens elke metrie en die korrelasie tussen die twee klase. Ons datastel analisie stel voorstel dat die leesbaard van RC datastelle nie direkte invloek die vraag moeilikheid en dat dit moontlik is om 'n RC datastel te skep wat maklik is om te lees maar moeilik te antwoord.", 'sq': "Njohja e cilësisë së grupeve të të dhënave të kuptimit të leximit (RC) është e rëndësishme për zhvillimin e sistemeve të kuptimit të gjuhës natyrore. Në këtë studim, u miratuan dy klasa metrike për vlerësimin e grupeve të të dhënave RC: aftësitë parakushtuese dhe lexueshmëria. Ne i aplikojmë këto klasa gjashtë grupeve të dhënash ekzistuese, duke përfshirë MCTest dhe SQuAD, dhe theksuam karakteristikat e grupeve të dhënash sipas çdo metrike dhe korrelacionit midis dy klasave. Analiza jonë e dataset sugjeron se lexueshmëria e datasets RC nuk prek drejtpërdrejt vështirësinë e pyetjes dhe se është e mundur të krijohet një dataset RC që është e lehtë për të lexuar por e vështirë për t'u përgjigjur.", 'am': 'የድምፅ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓት መግለጫ የሚያውቅ (RC) ዳታዎችን ማወቅ ለፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓት መግለጫ muhimu ነው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ሁለት ክፍሎች የRC ዳታተሮችን ለማሻሻል ተወሰዱ፤ አስፈላጊ እውቀት እና መቃወሚያ ነው፡፡ We applied these classes to six existing datasets, including MCTest and SQuAD, and highlighted the characteristics of the datasets according to each metric and the correlation between the two classes.  የዳታ ሳጥን ማተሚያያችን የRC ዳታዎችን ማነባብል ጥያቄውን በአቅራቢያ ላይ አያስጨንቅም፡፡', 'ko': '읽기 이해(RC) 데이터 집합의 질을 이해하는 것은 자연 언어 이해 시스템의 개발에 매우 중요하다.본 연구에서 RC 데이터 세트의 선결 기능과 가독성을 평가하는 두 가지 지표를 채택했다.이러한 클래스는 MCTest와 SHAND 등 6개의 기존 데이터 세트에 적용되며 각 메트릭과 두 클래스 간의 상관성에 따라 데이터 세트의 특징을 강조합니다.우리의 데이터 집합 분석에 의하면 RC 데이터 집합의 가독성은 문제의 난이도에 직접적인 영향을 주지 않을 뿐만 아니라 읽기 쉽지만 대답하기 어려운 RC 데이터 집합을 만들 수 있다.', 'az': 'Kitabın anlama (RC) veri qurğularını bilmək təbiətli dil anlama sistemlərinin gelişməsi üçün mövcuddur. Bu təcrübədə, RC verilən qurğularını değerləşdirmək üçün iki metrik sınıf qəbul edildi: əvvəlcə təcrübə və oxuya bilər. Biz bu dəstələri MCTest və SQuAD dahil altı mevcut verilən qurğulara uyguladıq və verilən qurğuların özelliklərini hər metrik və iki dəstə arasındakı bağlantılara görə aydınlaşdırdıq. Bizim verilən qurğumuz analizi RC verilən qurğuların oxuyabilməsi haqqında sorğu çətinliklərə təsir etməz və RC verilən qurğuları yaratmaq üçün asandır, lakin cavab vermək çətin olar.', 'hy': "Գիտելը կարդալու ընկալության որակի (ՌԿ) տվյալների համակարգերի կարևոր է բնական լեզուների հասկանալու համակարգերի զարգացման համար: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում ՌԿ տվյալների համակարգերի գնահատման համար ընդունվեցին երկու չափերի դասեր' նախապայման հմտություններ և կարդալիություն: Մենք կիրառեցինք այս դասերը գոյություն ունեցող վեց տվյալների համակարգի վրա, ներառյալ MCT-ը և SQUADը, և նշեցինք տվյալների համակարգի առանձնահատկությունները ըստ յուրաքանչյուր մետրիկայի և երկու դասերի միջև կապվածության: Our dataset analysis suggests that the readability of RC datasets does not directly affect the question difficulty and that it is possible to create an RC dataset that is easy to read but difficult to answer.", 'ca': "Knowing the quality of reading comprehension (RC) datasets is important for the development of natural-language understanding systems.  En aquest estudi, es van adoptar dues classes de mètrica per avaluar conjunts de dades RC: habilitats precondits i llegibilitat. Vam aplicar aquestes classes a sis conjunts de dades existents, incloent MCTest i SQuAD, i vam destacar les característiques dels conjunts de dades segons cada mètrica i la correlació entre les dues classes. L'an àlisi del conjunt de dades suggereix que la llegibilitat dels conjunts de dades RC no afecta directament la dificultat de preguntar i que és possible crear un conjunt de dades RC que és fàcil de llegir però difícil de respondre.", 'cs': 'Znalost kvality datových souborů porozumění čtení (RC) je důležitá pro vývoj systémů porozumění přirozenému jazyku. V této studii byly přijaty dvě třídy metrik pro hodnocení RC datových sad: předpokladné dovednosti a čitelnost. Tyto třídy jsme aplikovali na šest existujících datových sad, včetně MCTest a SQuAD, a zdůraznili charakteristiky datových sad podle každé metriky a korelaci mezi oběma třídami. Naše analýza datových sad naznačuje, že čitelnost RC datových sad přímo neovlivňuje obtížnost otázky a že je možné vytvořit RC datovou sadu, která je snadno čitelná, ale obtížně odpovídající.', 'et': 'Lugemise mõistmise (RC) andmekogumite kvaliteedi tundmine on oluline looduskeele mõistmise süsteemide arendamisel. Käesolevas uuringus kasutati RC andmekogumite hindamiseks kaks klassi näitajaid: eeltingimuslikud oskused ja loetavus. Rakendasime neid klasse kuuele olemasolevale andmekogumile, sealhulgas MCTest ja SQuAD, ning tõstsime esile andmekogumite omadused vastavalt igale mõõdikule ning nende kahe klassi vahelise korrelatsiooni. Meie andmekogumi analüüs näitab, et RC andmekogumite loetavus ei mõjuta otseselt küsimuse raskust ja et on võimalik luua RC andmekogum, mida on lihtne lugeda, kuid raske vastata.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বোঝার সিস্টেমের উন্নয়নের জন্য পাঠকের মান (আরসি) ডাটাসেটগুলো জানা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই গবেষণায় RC ডাটাসেট মূল্যায়নের জন্য দুই শ্রেণী মেট্রিক গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে: প্রযুক্ত দক্ষতা এবং পাঠকত্ব। আমরা এই শ্রেণীগুলো ছয়টি বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেটে প্রয়োগ করেছি, যার মধ্যে এমসিটিস্টেস্ট এবং এসকুয়াড, এবং প্রত্যেক মেট্রিক এবং দুই শ্রেণীর মধ্যে সম্ আমাদের ডাটাসেট বিশ্লেষণ পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে RC ডাটাসেটের পড়তে পারে তা সরাসরি প্রশ্নের কঠিন প্রভাব ফেলে না এবং এটা একটি RC ডাটাসেট তৈরি', 'fi': 'Lukemisen ymmärtämisen (RC) aineistojen laadun tunteminen on tärkeää luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisjärjestelmien kehittämiselle. Tässä tutkimuksessa otettiin käyttöön kaksi mittariluokkaa RC-aineistojen arvioimiseksi: ennakkotaidot ja luettavuus. Näitä luokkia sovellettiin kuuteen olemassa olevaan aineistoon, mukaan lukien MCTest ja SQuAD, ja korostettiin aineistojen ominaisuuksia kunkin mittarin mukaan sekä näiden kahden luokan välistä korrelaatiota. Aineistoanalyysimme perusteella RC-aineistojen luettavuus ei suoraan vaikuta kysymyksen vaikeuteen ja että on mahdollista luoda helposti luettava mutta vaikeasti vastattava RC-aineisto.', 'bs': 'Znanje kvalitete razumijevanja čitanja (RC) podataka je važno za razvoj sustava razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. U ovom ispitivanju, dvije klase metrike su usvojene za procjenu RC dataset: predviđene vještine i čitljivosti. Prijavili smo ove klase na šest postojećih seta podataka, uključujući MCTest i SQuAD, i istakli karakteristike seta podataka prema svakoj metrici i korelaciji između dvije klase. Naša analiza podataka ukazuje na to da čitljivost RC podataka ne utječe direktno na teškoće pitanja i da je moguće stvoriti RC podatak koji je lako čitati ali teško odgovoriti.', 'jv': 'Bilih kapan sistem sing akeh perusahaan nggunaken (PN)dataset sing dikarepaké kanggo ngubah sistem sing apik tur angel. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kelas sing duwé meta iki dipunangé kanggo kuwi nggawe dataset nêmên: karo bekisan karo perusahaan kuwi wis dipunangé. Awak dhéwé aplikasi kelas iki sak saben dataset sing isih perusahaan, nambah XMTest lan XMUAL, lan dino ngewehku perusahaan dataset nganggo saben meta sak karo perusahaan karo kelas sing duwe. Awakdhéwé dadi-set anjelisasi suggerekan iki bakal akeh basa gambaran bakal nguasai susah-gambaran iki ate arane iso nggawe dataset', 'sk': 'Poznavanje kakovosti naborov podatkov o branju (RC) je pomembno za razvoj sistemov razumevanja naravnega jezika. V tej študiji sta bila za ocenjevanje naborov podatkov RC sprejeta dva razreda meritev: predpogojna spretnost in berljivost. Te razrede smo uporabili za šest obstoječih naborov podatkov, vključno z MCTest in SQuAD, ter poudarili značilnosti naborov podatkov glede na vsako meritev in korelacijo med obema razredoma. Analiza nabora podatkov kaže, da berljivost naborov podatkov RC ne vpliva neposredno na težavo vprašanja in da je mogoče ustvariti nabor podatkov RC, ki je enostaven za branje, a težko odgovoriti.', 'he': 'הידע לאיכות קבוצת נתונים של בינה קריאה (RC) חשובה לפיתוח מערכות הבנה של שפת טבעית. במחקר הזה, שני כיסויים של מטריקה הואמצו להערכה קבוצת נתונים של RC: כישורים מראשיים וקריאות. We applied these classes to six existing datasets, including MCTest and SQuAD, and highlighted the characteristics of the datasets according to each metric and the correlation between the two classes.  ניתוח קבוצת נתונים שלנו מצביע כי היכולת לקרוא של קבוצות נתונים RC לא משפיעה ישירות על קשות השאלות ושאפשרי ליצור קבוצת נתונים RC שקל לקרוא אבל קשה לענות.', 'ha': "Kunna sifar da fassarar karantawa (RC) na da muhimu wa buwãyar da fassarar zane-zane-zane-zane. A cikin wannan lõkaci, aka zãɓi nau'i biyu na metric dõmin a evaluate tsari na RC: zance da amfani da karatunci da baƙaitacce. Suna amfani da waɗannan darafõfi zuwa sitan tsari masu jira, kamar MATest da SQuAD, kuma Muka ƙayyade masu tsari na database da ingancin kowace metric da mazaunin tsakanin darafõfi biyu. Analyyina danne-set na gaya cewa karatun mutane na RC bã ya shagala bayani ga masu nau'i na tambayar, kuma an yiwuwa a sami wani tsarin RC da ya sauƙi a karanta, kuma amma yana da nau'i ga karɓãwa.", 'bo': 'ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་པའི་ལྷན་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནད་དོན་ཚད་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this study, two classes of metrics were adopted for evaluating RC datasets: prerequisite skills and readability. We applied these classes to six existing datasets, including MCTest and SQuAD, and highlighted the characteristics of the datasets according to each metric and the correlation between the two classes. ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱས་ནི་RC་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཀློག'}
{'en': 'A Minimal Span-Based Neural Constituency Parser', 'ar': 'محلل دائرة عصبية قائم على الحد الأدنى من الامتداد', 'pt': 'Um analisador de constituintes neurais com base no intervalo mínimo', 'fr': 'Un analyseur de constituants neuronaux basé sur une durée minimale', 'es': 'Un analizador de circunscripciones neuronales basado en el span mínimo', 'ja': '最小限のスパンベースのニューラルコミュニティパーサー', 'zh': '盖最小跨度者神经区解析器', 'hi': 'एक न्यूनतम स्पैन-आधारित तंत्रिका निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सर', 'ru': 'Анализ нейронного избирательного округа на основе минимального диапазона', 'ga': 'Parsálaí Íosta um Thoghcheantar Néarach Bunaithe ar Réise', 'hu': 'Minimális távolság alapú idegi választókerületi elemző', 'el': 'Ένας ελάχιστος αναλυτής νευρωνικής καταστάσεως με βάση το εύρος', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Un parser di circoscrizione neurale basato sulla portata minima', 'kk': 'Төменгі кеңістік кеңістік нейрондық конституттарды талдау', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും ചെറിയ സ്പാന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നെയുറല്\u200d ആധിപത്യ പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Parser tal-Kostituzzjoni Newrali Bażat fuq Spanja Minima', 'mn': 'Хамгийн багасгалттай мэдрэлийн байгууллагууд', 'mk': 'A Minimal Span-Based Neural Constituency Parser', 'lt': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un analizator al circumscripției neutre bazat pe intervalul minim', 'pl': 'Parser ustawodawstwa neuronowego oparty na minimalnym rozpięciu', 'sr': 'Minimalni razmatrač neuralne konstitucije na osnovu spana', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A minimum Span-based Neural Constitution', 'sv': 'En minimal spannbaserad neural valkrets parser', 'ta': 'குறைந்தபட்ச இடைவெளி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình phân tích thần kinh theo hầu bất chuẩn', 'bg': 'Базиран на минимален обхват на невронните съставни единици', 'hr': 'Minimalni razmatrač neuralne konstitucije na osnovu spana', 'da': 'En minimal spændingsbaseret neural valgkreds Parser', 'nl': 'Een minimale span-based neural consituency parser', 'id': 'Penganalis Konstitusi Neural Berdasarkan Span Minimal', 'de': 'Ein Minimal Span-Based Neural Constituency Parser', 'ko': '최소 경계를 바탕으로 하는 신경 선택 영역 분석기', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mwanachama wa Kichini cha Kihispania cha Nyingira', 'tr': 'A çyk', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një analizues i kushtetutës neurone minimale bazuar në shtresa', 'bn': 'একটি সর্বনিম্ন স্প্যান-ভিত্তিক নিউরাল সংবিধান পার্সার', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային կառուցվածքի հիմնված մանրամասն վերլուծում', 'az': 'Minimal Span-Based Neural Constituency Parser', 'bs': 'Minimalni razmatrač neuralne konstitucije na osnovu spana', 'ca': 'Un analitzador de la Constituència Neural Minimal Based on Span', 'cs': 'Parser neuronové konstituce založený na minimálním rozpětí', 'et': 'Minimaalse ulatuse alusel põhinev neurokomponentide parser', 'fi': 'Minimaalinen span-pohjainen hermokomponentin jäsennys', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev živčnih sestavnih enot na osnovi minimalnega obsega', 'he': 'מחקר חוזקת נוירולית מבוססת על מינימום', 'bo': 'ཆུང་བའི་སྟོང་ཆུང་བའི་ཕྱོགས་སྟོང་གཞུང་གི་སྐྱེལ་ཚད་རྩིས་པོ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'In this work, we present a minimal neural model for constituency parsing based on independent scoring of labels and spans. We show that this model is not only compatible with classical dynamic programming techniques, but also admits a novel greedy top-down inference algorithm based on recursive partitioning of the input. We demonstrate empirically that both prediction schemes are competitive with recent work, and when combined with basic extensions to the scoring model are capable of achieving state-of-the-art single-model performance on the Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) and strong performance on the French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا أدنى لتحليل الدائرة الانتخابية بناءً على التقييم المستقل للتسميات والفواصل. نظهر أن هذا النموذج لا يتوافق فقط مع تقنيات البرمجة الديناميكية الكلاسيكية ، ولكنه أيضًا يعترف بخوارزمية استدلال جديدة جشعة من أعلى إلى أسفل استنادًا إلى التقسيم العودي للمدخلات. لقد أثبتنا بشكل تجريبي أن كلا مخططي التنبؤ يتنافسان مع الأعمال الحديثة ، وعندما يتم دمجهما مع الامتدادات الأساسية لنموذج التسجيل ، فإنهما قادران على تحقيق أداء نموذج واحد على أحدث طراز في Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) والأداء القوي في تريبانك الفرنسي (82.23 F1).', 'es': 'En este trabajo, presentamos un modelo neuronal mínimo para el análisis de las circunscripciones basado en la puntuación independiente de etiquetas y intervalos. Mostramos que este modelo no solo es compatible con las técnicas clásicas de programación dinámica, sino que también admite un novedoso algoritmo de inferencia descendente codicioso basado en la partición recursiva de la entrada. Demostramos empíricamente que ambos esquemas de predicción son competitivos con trabajos recientes y, cuando se combinan con extensiones básicas del modelo de puntuación, son capaces de lograr un rendimiento de modelo único de última generación en el Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) y un buen rendimiento en el French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, apresentamos um modelo neural mínimo para análise de constituintes baseado em pontuação independente de rótulos e intervalos. Mostramos que este modelo não é apenas compatível com técnicas clássicas de programação dinâmica, mas também admite um novo algoritmo de inferência ganancioso de cima para baixo baseado em particionamento recursivo da entrada. Demonstramos empiricamente que ambos os esquemas de previsão são competitivos com trabalhos recentes e, quando combinados com extensões básicas ao modelo de pontuação, são capazes de alcançar desempenho de modelo único de última geração no Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) e forte desempenho em o Treebank francês (82,23 F1).', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous présentons un modèle neuronal minimal pour l'analyse des circonscriptions basé sur la notation indépendante des étiquettes et des plages. Nous montrons que ce modèle est non seulement compatible avec les techniques de programmation dynamique classiques, mais admet également un nouvel algorithme d'inférence descendante basé sur le partitionnement récursif de l'entrée. Nous démontrons empiriquement que les deux systèmes de prédiction sont compétitifs par rapport aux travaux récents et que, lorsqu'ils sont combinés avec des extensions de base du modèle de notation, ils sont capables d'atteindre des performances de pointe sur le Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) et de solides performances sur le French Treebank (82,23 F1).", 'ja': 'この研究では、ラベルとスパンの独立したスコアリングに基づいて、選挙区解析のための最小限のニューラルモデルを提示する。このモデルは、古典的な動的プログラミング技術と互換性があるだけでなく、入力の再帰的分割に基づく斬新な貪欲なトップダウン推論アルゴリズムを認めることを示しています。両方の予測スキームが最近の研究と競合していることを経験的に実証し、スコアモデルの基本的な拡張と組み合わせると、ペンツリーバンク（ 91.79 F 1 ）で最先端のシングルモデルのパフォーマンスを達成し、フレンチツリーバンク（ 82.23 F 1 ）で強力なパフォーマンスを達成することができます。', 'zh': '立标跨度独立评分解析最小神经模形。 我们表明,该模样不但与经典的动态规画术兼容,而且认为了一种基于输入递归分区的新颖贪婪自上而下的推理算法。 吾以经验之,此二占者,比于近事有竞争力,而当与评分模形之大略相合,能于Penn Treebank(91.79 F1)上得先进之单模,而致劲于French Treebank(82.23 F1)。', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы представляем минимальную нейронную модель для синтаксического анализа избирательных округов, основанную на независимой оценке меток и интервалов. Показано, что эта модель не только совместима с классическими методами динамического программирования, но и допускает новый жадный алгоритм вывода сверху вниз, основанный на рекурсивном разбиении входных данных. Мы эмпирически демонстрируем, что обе схемы прогнозирования конкурируют с недавними работами, и в сочетании с базовыми расширениями к скоринговой модели способны достичь современных показателей одной модели на Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) и сильных показателей на French Treebank (82,23 F1).', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम लेबल और स्पैन के स्वतंत्र स्कोरिंग के आधार पर निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग के लिए एक न्यूनतम तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह मॉडल न केवल शास्त्रीय गतिशील प्रोग्रामिंग तकनीकों के साथ संगत है, बल्कि इनपुट के पुनरावर्ती विभाजन के आधार पर एक उपन्यास लालची टॉप-डाउन अनुमान एल्गोरिथ्म को भी स्वीकार करता है। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि दोनों भविष्यवाणी योजनाएं हाल के काम के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी हैं, और जब स्कोरिंग मॉडल के लिए बुनियादी एक्सटेंशन के साथ संयुक्त होती हैं, तो पेन ट्रीबैंक (91.79 एफ 1) पर अत्याधुनिक एकल-मॉडल प्रदर्शन और फ्रेंच ट्रीबैंक (82.23 एफ 1) पर मजबूत प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में सक्षम होती हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa obair seo, cuirimid múnla néarúil íosta i láthair do pharsáil toghlaigh bunaithe ar scóráil neamhspleách ar lipéid agus ar réisí. Léirímid go bhfuil an tsamhail seo ní hamháin ag luí le teicnící ríomhchlárú dinimiciúla clasaiceach, ach admhaíonn sé freisin algartam tátal greedy ó bharr anuas atá bunaithe ar dheighilt athchúrsach an ionchuir. Léirímid go heimpíreach go bhfuil an dá scéim tuar iomaíoch le hobair a rinneadh le déanaí, agus nuair a chuirtear iad le chéile le síntí bunúsacha ar an tsamhail scórála go bhfuil siad in ann feidhmíocht samhail-aonair den scoth a bhaint amach ar an Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) agus feidhmíocht láidir ar. Bruach Crann na Fraince (82.23 F1).', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინიმალური ნეიროლური მოდელს კონსტუტენტების პანსტირებისთვის, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია მართლა და სპონტების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მოდელი არა მხოლოდ კლასიკური დინამიკური პროგრამიკური ტექნიკებით კომპოგრამის შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ რომელიც აღმოჩნდება პრომენტის შესაძლებელი დაკავშირებული ჩვენ ემპერიკურად აჩვენებთ, რომ ორივე პროგრამების სქემები კონპექტიურია ახალი სამუშაოში, და როცა კონპერიკური მოდელის ფექსური გაფართლებით შეუძლებელია, რომ პენ ტრიბელანკის ერთმანეთის მოდელის გავაკეთება (91,79 F1) და ფრა', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα ελάχιστο νευρωνικό μοντέλο για ανάλυση εκλογικών περιφερειών με βάση την ανεξάρτητη βαθμολογία ετικετών και διαστάσεων. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό το μοντέλο δεν είναι μόνο συμβατό με τις κλασικές τεχνικές δυναμικού προγραμματισμού, αλλά και παραδέχεται έναν νέο άπληστο αλγόριθμο συμπερασμάτων από πάνω προς τα κάτω βασισμένο στην αναδρομική κατανομή της εισόδου. Αποδεικνύουμε εμπειρικά ότι και τα δύο συστήματα πρόβλεψης είναι ανταγωνιστικά με τις πρόσφατες εργασίες, και σε συνδυασμό με βασικές επεκτάσεις στο μοντέλο βαθμολόγησης είναι σε θέση να επιτύχουν την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση ενός μοντέλου στην τράπεζα και ισχυρή απόδοση στη γαλλική τράπεζα δέντρων (82.23 F1).', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában egy minimális neurális modellt mutatunk be a választókerületi elemzéshez, amely a címkék és tartományok független pontozásán alapul. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a modell nemcsak a klasszikus dinamikus programozási technikákkal kompatibilis, hanem egy új kapzsi top-down következtetési algoritmust is elismer, amely a bemenet rekurzív partícióján alapul. Empirikusan bizonyítjuk, hogy mindkét előrejelzési séma versenyképes a közelmúltbeli munkákkal, és ha kombináljuk a pontszámítási modell alapvető kiterjesztéseivel, képes a Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) legkorszerűbb egymodell teljesítményét és a francia Treebank (82.23 F1) erőteljesítményét elérni.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, presentiamo un modello neurale minimo per l'analisi delle circoscrizioni basato sul punteggio indipendente di etichette e span. Mostriamo che questo modello non è solo compatibile con le classiche tecniche di programmazione dinamica, ma ammette anche un nuovo avido algoritmo di inferenza top-down basato sul partizionamento ricorsivo dell'input. Dimostriamo empiricamente che entrambi gli schemi di previsione sono competitivi con i lavori recenti, e quando combinati con estensioni di base al modello di punteggio sono in grado di ottenere prestazioni monomodello all'avanguardia sulla Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) e prestazioni forti sulla French Treebank (82.23 F1).", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, тәуелсіз жарлықтар мен меңзерлердің шектеу негізінде төменгі неврал үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл үлгі тек классикалық динамикалық бағдарламалардың техникаларымен үйлесімді емес, сондай-ақ қайталанған қайталанған бөліміне негізделген жоғарғы жағынан жағынан жағынан жақын алгоритмін қабылдайды. Біз эмпирикалық түрде екеуі жаңа жұмыс істеу сұлбаларының соңғы жұмыс істеуіне тәртіпсіздігін көрсетедік, және ескерту моделінің негізгі кеңейтулерімен біріктірілген кезде Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) және Француз Treebank (82,23 F1) деген жалп', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, претставуваме минимален нервен модел за анализирање на изборниот округ базиран на независно оценување на етикетите и растојанијата. We show that this model is not only compatible with classical dynamic programming techniques, but also admits a novel greedy top-down inference algorithm based on recursive partitioning of the input.  Емпирички демонстрираме дека двете прогнозички шеми се конкурентни со неодамнешната работа, и кога се комбинирани со основните проширувања на моделот на оценка, се способни да постигнат најсовремени единствени модели на пен дрвен банк (91,79 F1) и силни резултати на француската дрвена банка (82,23 F1).', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan model saraf minimal untuk penghuraian constituency berdasarkan skor independen label dan jangkauan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model ini tidak hanya kompatibel dengan teknik pemrograman dinamik klasik, tetapi juga mengakui algoritma kesimpulan serakah novel dari atas ke bawah berdasarkan sekatan rekursif input. Kami menunjukkan secara empirik bahawa kedua-dua skema ramalan adalah kompetitif dengan kerja baru-baru ini, dan apabila digabungkan dengan sambungan asas kepada model skor mampu mencapai prestasi model tunggal-state-of-the-art di Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) dan prestasi kuat di French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'ml': 'In this work, we present a minimal neural model for constituency parsing based on independent scoring of labels and spans.  ഈ മോഡല്\u200d ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക് പ്രോഗ്രാമിംഗ് ടെക്നിക്ക് മാത്രമല്ല എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷേ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്\u200dറെ റിസ്റ്റോര്\u200dസി പെന്\u200d ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d (91. 79 F1) നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഏക മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം മത്സരിക്കുന്നു എന്നും ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d ശക', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nippreżentaw mudell newrali minimu għall-analiżi tal-kostitwenzi bbażat fuq punteġġ indipendenti tat-tikketti u l-firxiet. Aħna nuru li dan il-mudell mhuwiex biss kompatibbli mat-tekniki ta’ programmazzjoni dinamika klassika, iżda jammetti wkoll algoritmu ġdid ta’ inferenza minn fuq għal isfel ibbażat fuq tqassim rikorrenti tal-input. Jiġu murija empirikament li ż-żewġ skemi ta’ tbassir huma kompetittivi max-xogħol reċenti, u meta kkombinati ma’ estensjonijiet bażiċi għall-mudell ta’ punteġġ huma kapaċi jiksbu prestazzjoni unika bl-aktar mudell avvanzat fuq il-Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) u prestazzjoni qawwija fuq il-French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хамгийн бага мэдрэлийн загварыг загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар, загвар Бид энэ загвар нь зөвхөн классик динамик програмчлалын технологиудтай холбоотой биш гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ үүнийг дахин дахин хуваагдаж байгаа шинэ хүндрэл доорх халдварын алгоритмыг хүлээн зөвшөөрч байна. Бид хоёр талаарх таамаглалтын схемүүд саяхан ажилтай өрсөлдөг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хэрвээ сүлжээний загварын үндсэн өрсөлдөг нь Пенс Treebank (91.79 F1) болон Франц Treebank (82.23 F1) дээрх хүчтэй үйл ажиллагаа гаргаж чадна.', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe pateikiame minimal ų neurologinį model į rinkimų apygardos analizei, pagrįstą nepriklausomu etikečių ir intervalų įvertinimu. Mes parodome, kad šis modelis yra ne tik suderinamas su klasikiniais dinaminiais programavimo metodais, bet ir pripažįsta naują greedy iš viršaus į apačią išvados algoritmą, pagrįstą rekurenciniu įvedimo padalijimu. We demonstrate empirically that both prediction schemes are competitive with recent work, and when combined with basic extensions to the scoring model are capable of achieving state-of-the-art single-model performance on the Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) and strong performance on the French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy minimalny model neuronowy parsowania okręgów wyborczych oparty na niezależnym ocenie etykiet i rozpięć. Pokazujemy, że model ten jest nie tylko kompatybilny z klasycznymi technikami programowania dynamicznego, ale także dopuszcza nowy chciwy algorytm wnioskowania odgórnego oparty na rekursywnym partycjonowaniu wejścia. Wykazujemy empirycznie, że oba schematy predykcyjne są konkurencyjne z ostatnimi pracami, a w połączeniu z podstawowymi rozszerzeniami modelu punktowania są w stanie osiągnąć najnowocześniejszą wydajność pojedynczego modelu na Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) i silną wydajność na francuskim Drzewie (82.23 F1).', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un model neural minim pentru analizarea circumscripției, bazat pe punctajul independent al etichetelor și intervalelor. Arătăm că acest model nu este doar compatibil cu tehnicile clasice de programare dinamică, ci admite, de asemenea, un nou algoritm lacom de inferență sus-în jos bazat pe partiționarea recursivă a intrării. Demonstrăm empiric că ambele scheme de predicție sunt competitive cu lucrările recente, iar atunci când sunt combinate cu extensii de bază ale modelului de scoring sunt capabile să obțină performanțe de ultimă oră pe Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) și performanțe puternice pe Treebank francez (82.23 F1).', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo minimalni neuralni model za analizu konstitucija na osnovu nezavisnog izvlačenja etiketa i prostora. Pokazujemo da ovaj model nije samo kompatibilan sa klasičnim dinamičnim tehnikama programiranja, nego takođe priznaje novi pohlepni algoritam infekcije na vrhu dole na osnovu rekursivnog particije ulaza. Mi pokazujemo empirički da su obje shme predviđanja konkurentni sa nedavnim radom, a kada su kombinirane sa osnovnim proširenjem modela izvlačenja sposobni da postignu jedinstvenu predstavu stanja umjetnosti na Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) i snažnu predstavu na Francuskoj Treebank (82,23 F1).', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet viser vi ein minimal neuralmodell for å tolka konstitusjonar basert på uavhengige skalering av merkelappar og mellomrom. Vi viser at denne modellen er ikkje berre kompatibel med klassiske dynamiske programteknikk, men tillater også ein novel grød-algoritme for infeksjon på toppen ned basert på rekursiv partisjon av inndata. We demonstrate empirically that both prediction schemes are competitive with recent work, and when combined with basic extensions to the scoring model are capable of achieving the state of the art single-model performance on the Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) and strong performance on the French Treebank (82,23 F1).', 'so': 'Markaas waxan sameynaa tusaale neurada ugu yaraan baarlamaanka baaritaanka, taas oo ku saleysan qiimeynta kaararka iyo isboortiga. Waxaynu muujinnaa in tilmaankanu aysan ku habboonayn qaababka iskuulka ah oo dhaqdhaqaaqa ah, laakiin sidoo kale waxaan aqbalaynaa qoraalka qoyska oo damacsan oo hoos-hoos ku jirta oo ku saleysan qayb-qayb-soo-jeedid. Waxaynu si fiican u muujinnaa in labada qorshaha wax sii sheegiddu ay ku khiyaaneeyaan shaqada la soo dhowaaday, oo marka lagu soo ururiyo qalabka aasaasiga ah ee muusikada kooxaha lagu qorayo waxay awoodi karaan inay gaadhaan xaaladda farsamada oo kaliya ee Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) iyo bandhig xoog leh oo ku saabsan Faraansiinta Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'sv': 'I detta arbete presenterar vi en minimal neural modell för valkretstolkning baserad på oberoende poängsättning av etiketter och spans. Vi visar att denna modell inte bara är kompatibel med klassiska dynamiska programmeringstekniker, utan också medger en ny girig top-down inference algoritm baserad på rekursiv partitionering av indata. Vi visar empiriskt att båda förutsägelsescheman är konkurrenskraftiga med det senaste arbetet, och i kombination med grundläggande förlängningar av poängmodellen kan uppnå toppmodern single-model prestanda på Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) och stark prestanda på franska Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சுலபமான சிட்டைகள் மற்றும் ஸ்பென்ஸ் பாங்கை அடிப்படையில் குறைந்தபட்ச பாதிரிக்கும் மாதிரிய நாம் இந்த மாதிரி மட்டும் பொருத்தம் இல்லை ஆனால் உள்ளீட்டின் திரும்ப பகுதியை அடிப்படையில் சார்ந்து செல்லும் பொருத்தமான புத்தகத்தை பொருத்துக நாம் வெறுமையாக காண்பிக்கிறோம் பென் ட்ரீபாங்கில் ஒரு மட்டும் மாதிரி செயல்படும் போது பென்ன் ட்ரீபாக்கில் இருவரும் அண்மையில் போராடும் மற்றும் பிரெஞ்சு ட்ரீபாக்கில் வலிமை செயல்பாடு', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අඩුම න්\u200dයුරෝල් මොඩේලයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ලේබෙල් සහ ස්පැන්ස් ස්ථාවත් විශේෂණය සඳහා  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නෙවෙයි ප්\u200dරමාණික ව්\u200dයාපෘතික ව්\u200dයාපෘතික විද්\u200dයාපයක් එක්ක, නමුත් ප්\u200dරමාණ විද්\u200dයාපයක්  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අලුත් වැඩක් එක්ක දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්න සැලසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ස්කෝරින් මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පෙන්න් ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් එක්ක ප්\u200d', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں ایک کم نئورل موڈل پیش کریں گے کہ کانسیٹنسیٹ پارسینگ کے ذریعہ لابلوں اور جگہ کے مستقل اسکورینگ پر بنیاد ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈل صرف کلاسیک ڈینمالیک پروگرامینگ ٹیکنیک کے ساتھ مفید نہیں ہے بلکہ اس کے بعد بھی ایک نوم پر گریڈی ٹوپ-نائن ڈونس آلگوریٹم کو قبول کرتا ہے جو اینپیٹ کے دوبارہ پارٹیونٹ پر بنیاد ہے. ہم مضبوط طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں پیش بینی طریقے اچھے کاموں کے ساتھ مسابقه ہیں، اور جب اسکورینگ موڈل کی بنیادی زیادتی کے ساتھ ملے جائیں گے تو پن تری بانک پر ایک موڈل کے عملکرد کو پہنچ سکتے ہیں (91.79 F1) اور فرانسوی تری بانک پر مضبوط عملکرد (82.23 F1).', 'uz': "Bu vazifani biz quyidagi oddiy lab va spanning qiymatlari asosida davom etish uchun minimal neyrol modelini koʻrsatimiz. Biz bu model faqat klassik dynamik dastur usullari bilan bog'liq emas, balki kiritishni qaytarish qismlariga asosida yuqori yuqoriga qo'yish algoritga murojaat qilamiz. Biz taqdimot qoliplari yaqin ish bilan rivojlanishni ko'rsatamiz, va qiymatlar modelida asosiy kengaytmalari bilan birlashtirilganda Penn Treebank (91. 79 F1) va Fransuzcha Treebank (82. 23 F1) bilan bir bir marta model bajarish holatini bajarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra một mô hình thần kinh tối thiểu cho các cử tri phân tích dựa trên cách đánh giá độc lập của nhãn và cờ lê. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng mô hình này không chỉ phù hợp với các kỹ thuật lập động cổ điển, mà còn thừa nhận một thuật toán nhận nhận nhận nhận nhận nhận sinh học tham lam trên xuống dựa trên việc phân chia nội dung. Chúng tôi bằng kinh nghiệm chứng minh cả hai dự án đều cạnh tranh với công việc gần đây, và khi kết hợp với các phần mở rộng cơ bản của mô hình ghi điểm, đều có khả năng đạt được hiệu suất mô phỏng hàng loạt tuyệt vời nhất trên ngân hàng cây Penn Treebank (Hồ sơ F.7 F1) và hiệu suất mạnh ở Pháp Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'bg': 'В тази работа е представен минимален невронен модел за анализ на избирателните райони въз основа на независима оценка на етикети и интервали. Показваме, че този модел не само е съвместим с класическите техники за динамично програмиране, но и признава нов алгоритъм отгоре надолу за заключение базиран на рекурсивно разделяне на входа. Демонстрираме емпирично, че и двете схеми за прогнозиране са конкурентни с последните разработки, а когато се комбинират с основни разширения на модела за оценка, са в състояние да постигнат най-съвременно представяне на единичен модел на Пен Трейбанк (91.79 Формула 1) и силно представяне на Френската Трейбанк (82.23 Формула 1).', 'nl': "In dit werk presenteren we een minimaal neuraal model voor kiesdistrict parsing op basis van onafhankelijke scores van labels en spans. We laten zien dat dit model niet alleen compatibel is met klassieke dynamische programmeertechnieken, maar ook een nieuw hebberig top-down inferentiealgoritme toelaat gebaseerd op recursieve partitionering van de invoer. We tonen empirisch aan dat beide voorspellingsschema's concurrerend zijn met recent werk, en in combinatie met basisuitbreidingen van het scoremodel in staat zijn state-of-the-art single model prestaties op de Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) en sterke prestaties op de Franse Treebank (82.23 F1).", 'da': 'I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en minimal neural model for valgkreds parsing baseret på uafhængig scoring af etiketter og spænder. Vi viser, at denne model ikke kun er kompatibel med klassiske dynamiske programmeringsteknikker, men også indrømmer en ny grådig top-down inference algoritme baseret på rekursiv partitionering af input. Vi demonstrerer empirisk, at begge forudsigelsesordninger er konkurrencedygtige med det seneste arbejde, og når de kombineres med grundlæggende udvidelser til scoring modellen er i stand til at opnå state-of-the-art single-model præstation på Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) og stærk præstation på den franske Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit stellen wir ein minimales neuronales Modell für das Parsen von Wahlkreisen vor, das auf unabhängigem Scoring von Labels und Spanns basiert. Wir zeigen, dass dieses Modell nicht nur mit klassischen dynamischen Programmiertechniken kompatibel ist, sondern auch einen neuen gierigen Top-Down-Inferenz-Algorithmus erlaubt, der auf rekursiver Partitionierung der Eingabe basiert. Wir zeigen empirisch, dass beide Prognoseschemata mit aktuellen Arbeiten konkurrieren und in Kombination mit grundlegenden Erweiterungen des Scoring-Modells in der Lage sind, hochmoderne Einzelmodell-Performance auf der Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) und starke Leistung auf der französischen Treebank (82.23 F1) zu erzielen.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan model saraf minimal untuk penghuraian konstitusi berdasarkan skor independen label dan jangkauan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini tidak hanya kompatibel dengan teknik pemrograman dinamik klasik, tetapi juga mengakui algoritma inferensi serakah novel dari atas ke bawah berdasarkan partisi rekursif input. Kami menunjukkan secara empiris bahwa kedua skema prediksi kompetitif dengan pekerjaan baru-baru ini, dan ketika bergabung dengan ekstensi dasar ke model skor mampu mencapai prestasi model tunggal terbaik di Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) dan prestasi kuat di French Treebank (82,23 F1).', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 라벨과 경계를 바탕으로 독립적으로 점수를 매기는 선택 영역 분석의 최소 신경 모델을 제시했다.우리는 이 모델이 고전적인 동적 기획 기술과 호환될 뿐만 아니라 입력의 귀속 구분을 바탕으로 하는 탐욕이 위에서 아래로 추리하는 알고리즘을 지원한다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 경험적으로 이 두 가지 예측 방안이 최근의 업무와 경쟁력이 있고 평점 모델의 기본적인 확장과 결합할 때 펜실베이니아 트리 라이브러리(91.79F1)에서 가장 선진적인 단일 모델 성능을 실현하고 프랑스 트리 라이브러리(82.23F1)에서 강력한 성능을 실현할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunaweka mtindo wa kidogo wa neurali kwa ajili ya kuingiza mabunge ya ubunge kwa kutumia upande huru wa mabango na spani. Tunaonyesha kuwa muundo huu siyo tu unaohusika na mbinu za programu za klassic dynamic, lakini pia tunakiri utaratibu wa riwaya wenye uchumi wa uchumi wa juu unaoandaliwa kwa kutumia upigaji mgawanyiko wa taratibu. Tunaonyesha kwa makini kwamba mipango ya kutabiri mbili ni ushindani na kazi za hivi karibuni, na pale tunapounganishwa na maendeleo ya msingi kwa mtindo wa michoro huo wanaweza kufikia hali ya aina moja ya sanaa kwenye Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) na utendaji wa nguvu kwenye Treebank wa Ufaransa (82.23 F1).', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما یک مدل عصبی کمینه برای تقسیم محدودیت را بر اساس آزمایش مستقل برچسب\u200cها و فضا نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این مدل تنها با تکنیک\u200cهای برنامه\u200cریزی دینامیک کلاسیک پیوسته نیست، بلکه همچنین یک الگوریتم آلودگی آلودگی بالای پایین بر اساس تقسیم دوباره وارد می\u200cشود. ما به طور امپراطوری نشان می دهیم که هر دو برنامه پیش بینی با کار اخیر مسابقه دارند، و وقتی با وسیله\u200cهای بنیادی به مدل اسکورینگ، قادر به رسیدن عملکرد یک مدل هنری در بانک پن تری (91.79 F1) و عملکرد قوی در بانک درخت فرانسوی (82.23 F1) هستند.', 'tr': "Bu işde, etiketler ve uzakların bağımsız küçümsel alan çözümleme üçin az bir neural modeli gösteriyoruz. Biz bu nusga diňe klasik dinamik programlamak teknikleri bilen uyumlu däldigini görkeýäris ýokary üste-ýokary arzanylyk algoritmi girişiniň rekursiv bölümine daýanýar. Biz empiriýa görkezilýän täsirler hem täsirler ýakyn işiň bilen duşuşykly bolandygyny görkeýäris we haçan iňe gol nusgasyna gol nusgasynda Penn Treebank'da (91,79 F1) we Fransuz agajynda (82.23 F1) möhüm bir nusgasyna ulaşabiler.", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një model minimal neuronal për analizimin e qarkut zgjedhor bazuar në pikëpamjen e pavarur të etiketave dhe zgjatjeve. Ne tregojmë se ky model nuk është vetëm kompatibil me teknikat klasike dinamike të programimit, por pranon gjithashtu një algoritëm të ri lakmues nga lart poshtë inferencës bazuar në ndarjen rekursive të input. Ne demonstrojmë në mënyrë empirike se të dy skemat e parashikimit janë konkurruese me punën e fundit dhe kur kombinohen me zgjerimet bazë të modelit të shënimit janë në gjendje të arrijnë shfaqjen e modelit të vetëm më të lartë në Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) dhe shfaqjen e fortë në French Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ընտրական շրջանի վերլուծության միմինալ նյարդային մոդել, որը հիմնված է պիտակների անկախ գնահատման վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոդելը համատեղելի է ոչ միայն դասական դինամիկ ծրագրավորումների մեթոդների հետ, այլ նաև ընդունում է նոր գաղտնի վերևի-ներքև եզրակացության ալգորիթմ, որը հիմնված է մուտքի կրկնվող բաժանման վրա: Մենք էմպրիկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ երկու կանխատեսման ծրագրերը մրցակցում են վերջին աշխատանքի հետ, և երբ համադրված են գնահատման մոդելի հիմնական ընդլայնումների հետ, կարողանում են հասնել Penn Tree-ի (91.79 F1) և Ֆրանսիական Tree-ի (82.23 F1) մեծ արտադրողություններին:', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ፣ የባሕላዊ ምልክቶች እና ስፋቶችን በተመሳሳይ የፓርቲው ማኅበረሰብ የመታነስ የናውሬል ሞዴል እናቀርባለን፡፡ ይህ ምሳሌ በክላሲካዊ dynamic ፕሮግራም ቴክኖክኖች ብቻ እንደተያያይደለ እናሳየዋለን፥ ነገር ግን የውይይት ክፍል በመሠረት ላይ የሚኖረውን የረኀብ ጉዳይ አሌጎርቲም እናስባለን፡፡ በአሳማሚ ማስታወቂያው፣ ሁለቱም የመፍጠር ፕሮግራሞች በቅርብ ጊዜ ከሥራ ጋር ተቃዋሚዎች እንዲሆኑ እና ወደ ደረጃ መሠረት ሞዴል በተለየ ጊዜ በPenn Treebank (91.79 F1) የፊረንሳይ ቴርብክ (82.23 F1) የአንድ የፊርስቲክ ክፍል ግዛት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo minimalni neuronski model za analizu područja na temelju nezavisnog izvlačenja etiketa i prostora. Pokazujemo da je ovaj model ne samo kompatibilan sa klasičnim dinamičkim tehnikama programiranja, nego također priznaje novi pohlepni algoritam infekcije na vrhu dolje na temelju rekursivnog dijeljenja ulaza. Pokazujemo empirički da su obje shme predviđanja konkurentni s nedavnim radom, a kada su kombinirane s osnovnim proširenjem modela izvlačenja sposobni postići jedinstveno-umjetnički izvođenje na Penn Treebank-u (91,79 F1) i snažne učinke na Francuskoj Treebank-u (82,23 F1).', 'az': 'Bu işdə, mühafizəqi etiketlər və uzaqların müəyyən edilməsi üçün minimal nöral modeli göstəririk. Biz bu modeli yalnız klasik dinamik programlama teknikləri ilə uyğunlaşdırılmışdır, lakin daxilində yeni çox yüksək-a şağı infeksiya algoritmi yazılır. Biz hər ikisinin tədbir schemlarının son işi ilə müqayisədə olduğunu göstəririk, çünki tədbir modeli ilə birlikdə Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) və Fransız ağac bankasında çox qüvvətli performansı başa çatdıra bilər.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা স্বাধীন লেবেল এবং স্প্যানের স্কোরের ভিত্তিতে সংসদ পার্জিং এর জন্য একটি নিউরেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মডেল শুধুমাত্র ক্লাসিক ডাইনামিক প্রোগ্রামিং প্রযুক্তির সাথে যুক্ত নয়, কিন্তু পুনরাবৃত্তিক অংশের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক একটি  আমরা সাম্প্রতিক কাজের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করি এবং যখন স্কোরিং মডেলের মৌলিক বিস্তারিত প্রতিযোগিতা করা হয়, তখন পেন ট্রিবাঙ্কের মাধ্যমে এক-শিল্প মডেলের প্রতিযোগিতা পাওয়া যাবে (৯1. 79 F1) এবং ফ্রে', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo minimalni neuralni model za analizu predstava na temelju nezavisnog izvlačenja etiketa i prostora. Pokazujemo da je ovaj model ne samo kompatibilan sa klasičnim dinamičkim tehnikama programiranja, nego također priznaje novi pohlepni algoritam infekcije na vrhu dolje na temelju rekursivnog particije ulaza. Mi pokazujemo empirički da su obje shme predviđanja konkurentni sa nedavnim radom, a kada su kombinirane sa osnovnim proširenjem modela izvlačenja sposobni da postignu jedinstveno-umjetnu predstavu na Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) i snažnu predstavu na Francuskoj Treebank (82,23 F1).', 'ca': "En aquesta feina, presentem un model neural mínim per a l'analització electoral basat en una puntuació independent d'etiquetes i amples. We show that this model is not only compatible with classical dynamic programming techniques, but also admits a novel greedy top-down inference algorithm based on recursive partitioning of the input.  Demonstrem empíricament que ambdós esquemes de predicció són competitius amb la feina recent, i quan combinats amb extensions bàsiques al model de puntuació són capaços d'aconseguir un model únic d'última generació a la Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) i un fort rendiment a la French Treebank (82,23 F1).", 'cs': 'V této práci představujeme minimální neuronový model pro analýzu volebních obvodů založený na nezávislém skórování štítků a rozpětí. Ukazujeme, že tento model je nejen kompatibilní s klasickými dynamickými programovacími technikami, ale také připouští nový chamtivý top-down inferenční algoritmus založený na rekurzivním rozdělení vstupu. Empiricky ukazujeme, že obě predikční schémata jsou konkurenční s nedávnými pracemi a v kombinaci se základními rozšířeními bodovacího modelu jsou schopny dosáhnout nejmodernějšího výkonu jednoho modelu na Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) a silného výkonu na francouzské Treebank (82.23 F1).', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame valimisringkondade parsimise minimaalse närvimudeli, mis põhineb sõltumatul märgistuste ja vahemike skoorimisel. Näitame, et see mudel ei ühildu mitte ainult klassikalise dünaamilise programmeerimise tehnikaga, vaid tunnistab ka uut ahnet ülalt-alla järeldusalgoritmi, mis põhineb sisendi rekursiivsel partitsioneerimisel. Näitame empiiriliselt, et mõlemad prognoosimisskeemid on hiljutiste töödega konkurentsivõimelised ning kombineerituna punktisumudeli põhiliste laiendustega suudavad nad saavutada tipptasemel ühe mudeli tulemuslikkuse Penn Treebankil (91,79 F1) ja tugeva tulemuslikkuse Prantsuse Treebankil (82,23 F1).', 'af': "In hierdie werk voorsien ons 'n minimale neurale model vir konstituency verwerking gebaseer op onafhanklike skaring van etikette en spans. Ons wys dat hierdie model nie alleen kompatibel is met klassieke dinamike program teknike nie, maar ook aanvaar 'n roman groet groet bo-af inferensie algoritme gebaseer op rekursiewe partisiering van die invoer. Ons wys empiriese dat beide voorskou skeme rekenaar is met onlangse werk, en wanneer gekombineer is met basiese uitbreidings tot die skoring model, is in staat van die kuns enkel-model uitbreiding op die Penn Treebank (91,79 F1) en sterk uitbreiding op die Franse Boom bank (82,23 F1) kan bereik.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään vaalipiirien jäsentämiseen perustuva minimaalinen neuromalli, joka perustuu tunnisteiden ja välien riippumattomaan pisteytykseen. Osoitamme, että tämä malli ei ole vain yhteensopiva klassisten dynaamisten ohjelmointitekniikoiden kanssa, vaan myös uusi ahne top-down päättelyalgoritmi perustuu syötteen rekursiiviseen osiointiin. Osoitamme empiirisesti, että molemmat ennustejärjestelmät ovat kilpailukykyisiä viimeaikaisen työn kanssa, ja yhdistettynä pisteytysmallin peruslaajennuksiin ne pystyvät saavuttamaan huippuluokan yksimallin suorituskyvyn Penn Treebankissa (91,79 F1) ja vahvan suorituskyvyn French Treebankissa (82,23 F1).', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita sampeyan model minimal de nêr Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono model iki ora kelompatib sing karo perusahaan dadi, dadi nyimpen batirmi karo karo perusahaan kelompatif karo akeh lanjut-down Awak dhéwé éntuk cara-cara sing ngerasakno karo akeh tanggal nggawe nguasai iki, lan akeh dumateng lan entempen sing dibenakake nggawe model sing bisa ngelarang liyane cara-cara sing ngwalikno ngono akeh lanjut sing nyebute nggawe barang penné-cara (cila-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara) lan akeh lan lan', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים מודל עצבי מינימלי עבור בדיקת מחוז הבחירות המבוסס על נקודה עצמאית של תוויות ומרחבות. אנחנו מראים שהמודל הזה לא רק מתאים לטכניקות תוכנית דינמית קלאסית, אלא גם מודה אלגוריתם חדש חמדן מלמעלה למטה המבוסס על מחלקת חוזרת של הכניסה. אנחנו מראים באמפריה ששתי תכניות צפייה מתחרות בעבודה האחרונה, וכאשר שולבות עם התרחבות בסיסיות למודל הציוד הם מסוגלים להשיג ביצועים חד-מודל חד-מודל חד-מודל חד-מודל מצפון על פני עץ (91.79 F1) והביצועים חזקים על פני עץ צרפתי (82.23 F1).', 'ha': "In this work, we present a minimal neural model for constituency parsing based on independent scoring of labels and spans.  Tuna nũna cewa wannan misalin bai zama mai daidai kawai da zanen shiryoyin ayuka na classic, kuma amma suna gaskata algoritm na noveli mai rõƙon da bakin-bakin-bakin-surori a kan rabon sigarin da ke cikin shirin ayuka. Tuna nuna musamman kwamfyutan ayuka biyu masu yin bastarwa da aikin na farko, kuma idan an haɗa da faɗi-muhimmi zuwa misalin muhimmi, za'a iya iya sãmun muhimmin-mai-sanawa-da-dukkan Penn Treebank (91.79 F1) da mai ƙarfi a kan faransa Treebank (82.23 F1).", 'sk': 'V tem delu predstavljamo minimalni nevronski model za razčlenitev volilnih okrožij, ki temelji na neodvisnem ocenjevanju oznak in razponov. Pokazali smo, da ta model ni združljiv le s klasičnimi tehnikami dinamičnega programiranja, temveč tudi priznava nov pohlepen algoritem zgoraj navzdol, ki temelji na rekurzivnem particiranju vhoda. Empirično dokazujemo, da sta obe napovedni shemi konkurenčni z novejšimi deli in da sta v kombinaciji z osnovnimi razširitvami modela ocenjevanja sposobni doseči najsodobnejše enomodelne zmogljivosti na Penn Treebanku (91,79 F1) in močne zmogljivosti na French Treebanku (82,23 F1).', 'bo': 'In this work, we present a minimal neural model for constituency parsing based on independent scoring of labels and spans. We show that this model is not only compatible with classical dynamic programming techniques, but also admits a novel greedy top-down inference algorithm based on recursive partitioning of the input. ང་ཚོས་རྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཆར་གཞི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གསར་བ་དང་མཉམ་ལས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding', 'es': 'Análisis de la dependencia semántica mediante la incrustación de libros', 'ar': 'تحليل التبعية الدلالية عبر تضمين الكتاب', 'pt': 'Análise de dependência semântica via incorporação de livros', 'fr': "Analyse de dépendance sémantique via l'intégration de livres", 'zh': '以书嵌之语义赖解析', 'ja': 'ブック埋め込みによるセマンティック依存関係解析', 'hi': 'पुस्तक एम्बेडिंग के माध्यम से शब्दार्थ निर्भरता पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ семантической зависимости с помощью встраивания книги', 'ga': 'Spleáchas Shéimeantach a Pharsáil trí Leabú Leabhar', 'hu': 'Szemantikus függőség-értelmezés könyvbeágyazással', 'el': 'Ανάλυση σημασματικής εξάρτησης μέσω ενσωμάτωσης βιβλίων', 'ka': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding', 'it': 'Analisi della dipendenza semantica tramite incorporazione del libro', 'kk': 'Кітап ендіру арқылы семантикалық тәуелдік талдау', 'lt': 'Semantinis priklausomybės analizavimas įterpiant knygas', 'mk': 'Анализирање семантична зависност преку вградување на книги', 'ml': 'പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ എംബെഡിങ്ങിലൂടെ സെമാന്റിക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Dependensi Semantik melalui Penjelmaan Buku', 'mt': 'Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Semantika permezz tal-Inkorporazzjoni tal-Ktieb', 'no': 'Semantisk avhengighetstolking via bokinnbygging', 'mn': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding', 'pl': 'Parsowanie zależności semantycznej poprzez osadzanie książek', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței semantice prin încorporarea cărților', 'sr': 'Semantička zavisnost analiza preko uključenja knjiga', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Heshiiska ku xiran mas’uuliyadda ee qoraalka', 'sv': 'Semantisk beroendetolkning via bokinbäddning', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی اعتمادی پارچینگ', 'ta': 'புத்தகத்தின் உட்பொதித்தல் மூலம் செமாண்டிக் சார்ந்த பாடல்', 'uz': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding', 'vi': 'Phân tích tinh thần qua nhúng sách', 'bg': 'Семантично анализиране на зависимостта чрез вграждане на книги', 'nl': 'Semantische afhankelijkheidsparsing via boekembedding', 'hr': 'Semantičko razmatranje ovisnosti putem uključenja knjiga', 'da': 'Semantisk afhængighedsfortolkning via bog indlejring', 'de': 'Semantische Abhängigkeitspassung über Bucheinbettung', 'id': 'Penganalisan Dependensi Semantik melalui Penciptaan Buku', 'ko': '책에 삽입된 의미 의존 분석을 바탕으로', 'fa': 'ویرایش بستگی\u200cهای تقسیم از طریق انجمن کتاب', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha Uhuru wa Kisemantic kupitia Makala ya Vitabu', 'tr': 'Kitap Açmak Aralygy Taýýarlamak', 'af': 'Semantiese afhanklikheid verwerking deur boek Inbetering', 'sq': 'Analizimi i varësisë Semantike nëpërmjet përfshirjes së librave', 'am': 'የመጽሐፉ አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Kitab İçeri Aracılığıyla Semantik bağımlılıq Analizi', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'বই এমবেডিং এর মাধ্যমে সেম্যান্ডিক নির্ভর পার্সিং', 'bs': 'Semantičko razmatranje zavisnosti putem uključenja knjiga', 'et': 'Semantilise sõltuvuse parsimine raamatute manustamise kaudu', 'ca': "Analització Semàtica de Dependencies a través de l'incorporació de llibres", 'cs': 'Parsování sémantické závislosti prostřednictvím vložení knihy', 'fi': 'Semanttinen riippuvuuden analysointi kirjan upottamisen kautta', 'jv': 'semanti dipendènsi layang Ngawe Buk Entong', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev semantične odvisnosti prek vdelave knjig', 'ha': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding', 'he': 'מחקר תלויות סמנטית באמצעות קידום ספרים', 'bo': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing via Book Embedding'}
{'en': 'We model a dependency graph as a book, a particular kind of topological space, for semantic dependency parsing. The spine of the book is made up of a sequence of words, and each page contains a subset of noncrossing arcs. To build a semantic graph for a given sentence, we design new Maximum Subgraph algorithms to generate noncrossing graphs on each page, and a Lagrangian Relaxation-based algorithm tocombine pages into a book. Experiments demonstrate the effectiveness of the bookembedding framework across a wide range of conditions. Our parser obtains comparable results with a state-of-the-art transition-based parser.', 'ar': 'نقوم بنمذجة الرسم البياني للتبعية ككتاب ، نوع معين من الفضاء الطوبولوجي ، لتحليل التبعية الدلالية. يتكون ظهر الكتاب من سلسلة من الكلمات ، وتحتوي كل صفحة على مجموعة فرعية من الأقواس غير المتقاطعة. لبناء رسم بياني دلالي لجملة معينة ، قمنا بتصميم خوارزميات الحد الأقصى للرسم الفرعي الجديد لإنشاء رسوم بيانية غير متقاطعة في كل صفحة ، وخوارزمية تعتمد على الاسترخاء لاغرانج لدمج الصفحات في كتاب. تظهر التجارب فعالية إطار تجميع الكتب عبر مجموعة واسعة من الظروف. يحصل المحلل اللغوي الخاص بنا على نتائج مماثلة باستخدام محلل لغوي متطور قائم على الانتقال.', 'es': 'Modelamos un gráfico de dependencias como un libro, un tipo particular de espacio topológico, para el análisis de dependencias semánticas. El lomo del libro se compone de una secuencia de palabras, y cada página contiene un subconjunto de arcos que no se cruzan. Para construir un gráfico semántico para una oración dada, diseñamos nuevos algoritmos de Subgrafo Máximo para generar gráficos no cruzados en cada página, y un algoritmo basado en la relajación lagrangiana para combinar páginas en un libro. Los experimentos demuestran la eficacia del marco de inserción de libros en una amplia gama de condiciones. Nuestro analizador obtiene resultados comparables con un analizador basado en transiciones de última generación.', 'fr': "Nous modélisons un graphe de dépendance comme un livre, un type particulier d'espace topologique, pour l'analyse sémantique des dépendances. Le dos du livre est constitué d'une séquence de mots, et chaque page contient un sous-ensemble d'arcs non croisés. Pour créer un graphe sémantique pour une phrase donnée, nous concevons de nouveaux algorithmes de sous-graphe maximum pour générer des graphiques non croisés sur chaque page, et un algorithme basé sur la relaxation lagrangienne pour combiner les pages dans un livre. Les expériences démontrent l'efficacité du cadre d'intégration de livres dans un large éventail de conditions. Notre analyseur obtient des résultats comparables à ceux d'un analyseur de pointe basé sur la transition.", 'pt': 'Modelamos um grafo de dependência como um livro, um tipo particular de espaço topológico, para análise de dependência semântica. A lombada do livro é composta por uma sequência de palavras, e cada página contém um subconjunto de arcos não cruzados. Para construir um grafo semântico para uma determinada frase, projetamos novos algoritmos de Subgrafo Máximo para gerar gráficos não cruzados em cada página e um algoritmo baseado em Relaxamento Lagrangeano para combinar páginas em um livro. Experimentos demonstram a eficácia da estrutura de incorporação de livros em uma ampla gama de condições. Nosso analisador obtém resultados comparáveis com um analisador baseado em transição de última geração.', 'ja': '依存関係グラフを書籍としてモデル化します特定の種類のトポロジカル空間を意味依存関係解析のためにモデル化します本の背骨は一連の言葉で構成されており、各ページには交差しない円弧のサブセットが含まれています。特定の文のセマンティックグラフを構築するために、各ページに非交差グラフを生成する新しいMaximum Subgraphアルゴリズムと、ラグランジュ緩和ベースのアルゴリズムトコンビネーションページを本に設計します。実験は、幅広い条件にわたるブックエンベディングフレームワークの有効性を示しています。当社のパーサーは、最先端のトランジションベースのパーサーで同等の結果を得ることができます。', 'zh': '吾将倚图建模为一书,一拓扑空间,施于语义解析。 其书脊系单词,每一页含不交弧线子集。 为给定句构语义图,设新最大子图算法,以生非交图于页面,而设基于拉格朗日弛页面组合成一书。 实验证书本框架于诸有效性。 吾解析器用最先进者解析器得而较之。', 'hi': 'हम एक पुस्तक के रूप में एक निर्भरता ग्राफ मॉडल, शब्दार्थ निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए एक विशेष प्रकार के टोपोलॉजिकल स्पेस, एक विशेष प्रकार। पुस्तक की रीढ़ शब्दों के अनुक्रम से बनी है, और प्रत्येक पृष्ठ में नॉनक्रॉसिंग आर्क्स का एक सबसेट होता है। किसी दिए गए वाक्य के लिए एक शब्दार्थ ग्राफ बनाने के लिए, हम प्रत्येक पृष्ठ पर गैर-क्रॉसिंग ग्राफ़ उत्पन्न करने के लिए नए अधिकतम सबग्राफ एल्गोरिदम डिज़ाइन करते हैं, और एक लाग्रांगियन रिलैक्सेशन-आधारित एल्गोरिथ्म पृष्ठों को एक पुस्तक में संयोजित करने के लिए। प्रयोग शर्तों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में bookembedding ढांचे की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हमारा पार्सर एक अत्याधुनिक संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सर के साथ तुलनीय परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы моделируем граф зависимостей как книгу, определенный вид топологического пространства, для семантического синтаксического анализа зависимостей. Хребет книги состоит из последовательности слов, и каждая страница содержит подмножество непересекающихся дуг. Чтобы построить семантический граф для данного предложения, мы разрабатываем новые алгоритмы Maximum Subgraph для генерации непересекающихся графов на каждой странице, а также алгоритм на основе релаксации Лагранжа для объединения страниц в книгу. Эксперименты демонстрируют эффективность каркаса встраивания книг в широком диапазоне условий. Наш синтаксический анализатор получает сопоставимые результаты с современным синтаксическим анализатором на основе перехода.', 'ga': "Múnlaímid graf spleáchais mar leabhar, cineál faoi leith spáis toipeolaíochta, le haghaidh parsáil spleáchais shéimeantaigh. Tá cúl an leabhair comhdhéanta de sheicheamh focal, agus tá fo-thacar de stuanna neamhthrasnaithe ar gach leathanach. Chun graf shéimeantach a thógáil d'abairt ar leith, déanaimid halgartaim nua Uasteorainneacha Fothagraf a dhearadh chun graif neamhthrasnaithe a ghiniúint ar gach leathanach, agus algartam atá bunaithe ar Scíth Lagrangian chun leathanaigh a chomhcheangal i leabhar. Léiríonn turgnaimh éifeachtacht an chreata leabú leabhar thar raon leathan coinníollacha. Faigheann ár parsálaí torthaí inchomparáide le parsálaí den scoth atá bunaithe ar thrasdulta.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ მოდელურებთ დავამხრებული გრაფიკა, როგორც წიგნია, განსაკუთრებული ტიპი ტოპოლოგიური სამყარო, სემონტიური დავამხრებულობის პარასტირება. წიგნის წიგნის წიგნი სიტყვების წიგნიდან შექმნა, და ყოველ გვერდის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნი. სემონტიკური გრაფიკის შექმნა, ჩვენ ახალი მაქსიმიმური სემოგრაფიკური ალგორიტემის შექმნა, რომელიც ყოველ გვერდიდან უკრესირებული გრაფიკების შექმნა, და ლაგრეინიანის რელაქციის ალგორიტემის ტოკომბინის ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებს წიგნის შემდეგ ფრამეტურის ეფექტიურობას. ჩვენი პროცენტორი მიიღება შემდგომარებელი შედეგი შემდგომარებელი პროცენტორი შემდგომარებით.', 'el': 'μοντελοποιούμε ένα γράφημα εξάρτησης ως βιβλίο, ένα συγκεκριμένο είδος τοπολογικού χώρου, για την ανάλυση σημασιολογικής εξάρτησης. Η σπονδυλική στήλη του βιβλίου αποτελείται από μια ακολουθία λέξεων, και κάθε σελίδα περιέχει ένα υποσύνολο μη διασταυρούμενων τόξων. Για να φτιάξουμε ένα σημασιολογικό γράφημα για μια δεδομένη πρόταση, σχεδιάζουμε νέους αλγόριθμους μέγιστης Υπογραφής για να δημιουργήσουμε μη διασταυρούμενα γραφήματα σε κάθε σελίδα, και έναν αλγόριθμο με βάση τη Λαγκρανγιανή Χαλάρωση για να συνδυάσουμε σελίδες σε ένα βιβλίο. Τα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του πλαισίου ενσωμάτωσης βιβλίων σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα συνθηκών. Ο αναλυτής μας λαμβάνει συγκρίσιμα αποτελέσματα με έναν υπερσύγχρονο αναλυτή μετάβασης.', 'hu': 'Egy függőségi grafikont könyvként modellezünk, egy adott topológiai térként, szemantikai függőség elemzéséhez. A könyv gerincét szavak sorozata alkotja, és minden oldal tartalmaz egy részhalmazt nem átszelő ívek. Ahhoz, hogy egy adott mondat szemantikai grafikonját készítsünk, új Maximum Subgraph algoritmusokat tervezünk, amelyek nem áthaladó grafikonokat generálnak minden oldalon, és egy Lagrangian Relaxation alapú algoritmust, amely összekapcsolja az oldalakat egy könyvbe. A kísérletek bizonyítják a könyvbeágyazási keretrendszer hatékonyságát különböző körülmények között. Elemzőnk hasonló eredményeket ér el egy korszerű átmeneti alapú elemzővel.', 'it': "Modelliamo un grafico di dipendenza come un libro, un particolare tipo di spazio topologico, per l'analisi semantica delle dipendenze. La colonna vertebrale del libro è composta da una sequenza di parole, e ogni pagina contiene un sottoinsieme di archi non incrociati. Per costruire un grafico semantico per una data frase, progettiamo nuovi algoritmi Maximum Subgraph per generare grafici non incrociati su ogni pagina, e un algoritmo Lagrangian Relaxation-based per unire le pagine in un libro. Esperimenti dimostrano l'efficacia del framework di inserimento dei libri in una vasta gamma di condizioni. Il nostro parser ottiene risultati comparabili con un parser basato sulla transizione all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Mes modeliuojame priklausomybės grafiką kaip knygą, tam tikrą topologinę erdvę, semantiniam priklausomybės analizavimui. Knygos stuburas sudaromas iš žodžių sekos, o kiekviename puslapyje yra ne kryžminių lankų pogrupis. Siekdami sukurti semantinį grafiką tam tikram sakiniui, mes sukuriame naujus didžiausio paprogramo algoritmus, kad kiekviename puslapyje būtų sukurti ne kryžminiai grafikai, o Lagrangian Relaxation-based algorithm puslapiai į knygą. Eksperimentai rodo knygų įtraukimo sistemos veiksmingumą įvairiomis sąlygomis. Our parser obtains comparable results with a state-of-the-art transition-based parser.', 'mk': 'Ние моделираме график за зависност како книга, одреден вид на топологички простор, за семантичко анализирање на зависност. Работата на книгата е составена од секвенца на зборови, и секоја страна содржи подгрупа на неприкрснички арци. За да изградиме семантичен граф за одредена реченица, дизајнираме нови алгоритми на Максималниот субграф за да генерираме графики без преминување на секоја страница, и алгоритм базиран на релаксација на Lagrangian да ги комбинира страниците во книга. Експериментите ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на рамките за внесување книги во голем број услови. Нашиот анализатор добива споредливи резултати со најдобриот анализатор базиран на транзиција.', 'ms': 'Kami model graf dependensi sebagai buku, jenis ruang topologi tertentu, untuk penghuraian dependensi semantik. Tulang belakang buku dibuat dari urutan perkataan, dan setiap halaman mengandungi subset lengkung yang tidak menyeberangi. Untuk membina graf semantik untuk kalimat tertentu, kami merancang algoritma Subgraf Maksimum baru untuk menghasilkan graf tidak menyeberangi pada setiap halaman, dan algoritma berdasarkan Relaxation Lagrangian untuk menggabungkan halaman ke dalam buku. Eksperimen menunjukkan keefektivitas kerangka penyembelihan buku melalui julat luas syarat. Penganalis kami mendapat hasil yang boleh dibandingkan dengan penganalis berasaskan transisi yang terbaik.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുസ്തകമായ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച തരത്തിലെ ടോപ്ലോജിക്കല്\u200d സ്ഥ പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ ചുറ്റുകള്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ താളിലും ക്രോസ്ക് ചെയ്യ കൊടുത്ത വാക്കിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് ഗ്രാഫ് ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സുപ്രാഗ്രാഫ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു.  പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായ നിലങ്ങളിലൂടെ ബുക്ക്മെഡിങ്ങ് ഫ്രെയിമ്പിങ്ങിന്റെ പ്രവർത് നമ്മുടെ പരാജയപ്രകാരം ഒരു രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് തുല്യമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Aħna nimmudellaw graff tad-dipendenza bħala ktieb, tip partikolari ta’ spazju topoloġiku, għall-analiżi semantika tad-dipendenza. Is-sinsla tal-kotba hija magħmula minn sekwenza ta’ kliem, u kull paġna fiha sottosett ta’ arki li ma jaqsmux. Biex nibnu graff semantiku għal sentenza partikolari, a ħna niddisinjaw algoritmi ġodda tas-Subgrafu Massimu biex niġġeneraw graffi mingħajr qsim fuq kull paġna, u algoritmu Lagrangian Relaxation-based to combine pages into a book. L-esperimenti juru l-effettività tal-qafas ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kotba f’firxa wiesgħa ta’ kundizzjonijiet. Il-parser tagħna jikseb riżultati komparabbli ma’ parser ibbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni l-aktar avvanzat.', 'mn': 'Бид ном гэх мэт хамааралтай график, тодорхой төрлийн топологийн орон зай, semantic dependency parsing гэх мэт загварыг загварлаж байна. Номын эргүүл нь үгний дарааллаар бүрдсэн бөгөөд хуудас болгон бүрт давхарлаагүй бөмбөгүүдийн дарааллаар бүрдсэн. Өөр өгүүлбэрт семантик график бий болгохын тулд бид хуудас бүрт шинэ хамгийн их субграфик алгоритмыг бий болгохын тулд хуудас бүрт шинэ график бий болгож, Lagrangian Relaxation-ын алгоритмын токомбин хуудас бий болгохын тулд ном бол Эмчилгээний туршилтууд номын хөрөнгө оруулалтын үр дүнг олон нөхцөлд үзүүлдэг. Бидний хуваарч нь урлагийн шилжүүлэлтийн үндсэн хуваарьтай харьцуулагдах үр дүнг авдаг.', 'no': 'Vi modeller eit avhengighetsgraf som bok, eit spesielt type topologisk plass, for å tolka semantisk avhengighet. Rullen av boken er lagt opp av ei rekkjefølgje av ord, og kvar side inneheld ei undergruppe av ikkje kryssing av båka. For å bygge eit semantisk graf for eit gitt setning, designerer vi nye maksimum undergraf-algoritme for å laga ikkje-kryssing av grafen på kvar side, og eit lagrangian-relaksjonsbasert algoritme-tokombinesider i eit bok. Name Tolkaren vårt får sammenlignbare resultat med ein tilstand av kunsten-overgangsbasert tolkar.', 'pl': 'Modelujemy wykres zależności jako książkę, określony rodzaj przestrzeni topologicznej, do analizy zależności semantycznej. Kręgosłup książki składa się z sekwencji słów, a każda strona zawiera podzbiór niekrzyżujących się łuków. Aby zbudować wykres semantyczny dla danego zdania, projektujemy nowe algorytmy maksymalnego podpisu, aby generować niekrzyżujące wykresy na każdej stronie, oraz algorytm oparty na relaksacji Lagranga, aby łączyć strony w książkę. Eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność frameworku bookembedding w szerokim zakresie warunków. Nasz parser uzyskuje porównywalne wyniki z najnowocześniejszym parserem opartym na przejściu.', 'kk': 'Семантикалық тәуелсіздік талдау үшін, кітап ретінде тәуелсіздік графика, топологиялық бос орын ретінде үлгіледі. Кітаптың бұрыштығы сөздер ретінде құрылады. Әрбір бетте бұрыштық бұрыштардың бөлігі бар. Келтірілген сөйлеме үшін семантикалық график құру үшін, әрбір бетте көшірмесі жоқ графиктерді құру үшін жаңа максималдық субграфик алгоритмдерді құрамыз және Lagrangian Relaxation- негіздеген алгоритм токоминдық беттерін Тәжірибелер кітапша ендіру қоршауының ефективнігін көптеген шарттар арасында көрсетеді. Біздің талдаушысымыз өзгерту күйіне негізделген талдаушыларымен салыстырылатын нәтижелерді алады.', 'ro': 'Modelăm un grafic de dependență ca o carte, un anumit tip de spațiu topologic, pentru analizarea dependenței semantice. Coloana vertebrală a cărții este alcătuită dintr-o secvență de cuvinte, iar fiecare pagină conține un subset de arce necontrolate. Pentru a construi un grafic semantic pentru o anumită propoziție, proiectăm noi algoritmi Maximum Subgraph pentru a genera grafice non-crossing pe fiecare pagină, și un algoritm Lagrangian Relaxation bazat pe să combine paginile într-o carte. Experimentele demonstrează eficacitatea cadrului de încorporare a cărților într-o gamă largă de condiții. Parserul nostru obține rezultate comparabile cu un parser bazat pe tranziție de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Mi modeliramo grafik zavisnosti kao knjigu, posebno topološki prostor, za semantičku analizu zavisnosti. Okrug knjige je sastavljen od sekvence reèi, i svaka stranica sadrži podskup nepromištenih luka. Da bi izgradili semantički grafik za određenu rečenicu, dizajnirali smo nove maksimalne algoritme podgrafa kako bi stvorili nepristojne grafike na svakoj stranici, i na stranicama tokombina na osnovu Lagrangijanske Relaksije algoritma. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost okvira knjige u širokom nizu uvjeta. Naš analizator dobija usporedbene rezultate sa stanjem umjetničkog prethodnog analizatora.', 'so': 'Waxaan qoraalka ku sameynaa sawir ku xirnaanta sida buug, goob gaar ah oo ay u sameyn karto baaritaanka kalsoonaanta. Oo taariikhda dib baa loo dhigay erayo badan, oo dhanka kastana waxaa ku yaal koob aan xadhig lahayn. Si aan u dhisno qoraal semantic ah si aan loo qoro, waxaynu u qoraynaa algorithm cusub ee maximum Subgraph si aan looga sameyn karo sawir kasta, iyo algoritm oo ku saleysan Lagrangian Relaxation-based Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda saameynta firaaqada bookkerinta ee xaaladaha kala duduwan. Parameradeena wuxuu helaa matokero siman oo la mid ah xaalada turjumista farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு சார்ந்த வரைப்படம் ஒரு புத்தகமாக, ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட வகையான நோயாளி இடைவெளியை மாதிரியிடுகிறோம், அரைப்பு புத்தகத்தின் சுழற்சி வார்த்தைகளின் வரிசையில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டது, ஒவ்வொரு பக்கத்திலும் குறுக்கு முடியாத ஆர் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்திற்கான ஒரு பெம்பான்டிக் வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்க, ஒவ்வொரு பக்கத்திலும் குறிக்காத வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்க, மற்றும் ஒரு லாக்ராங்கியான பரிசோதனைகள் புத்தகக்குறிப்பிடும் சட்டத்தின் விளைவை வெளிப்படையாக்குகிறது நிபந்தனைகள் மூலம். Our parser obtains comparable results with a state-of-the-art transition-based parser.', 'sv': 'Vi modellerar en beroendegraf som en bok, ett visst slags topologiskt utrymme, för semantisk beroendetolkning. Bokens ryggrad består av en ordsekvens, och varje sida innehåller en delmängd icke-korsande bågar. För att bygga en semantisk graf för en given mening utformar vi nya Maximum Subgraph algoritmer för att generera icke-crossing grafer på varje sida, och en Lagrangian Relaxation-baserad algoritm för att kombinera sidor till en bok. Experiment visar hur effektiva ramarna för bokinbäddning är över ett brett spektrum av förhållanden. Vår parser får jämförbara resultat med en state-of-the-art övergångsbaserad parser.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک کتاب کے طور پر ایک مستقل گراف کی مدل کرتے ہیں، ایک مخصوص طرح توپولوژیکی جگہ، سیمنٹی مستقل پارس کے لئے۔ کتاب کا پینٹ کلمات کا ایک طریقہ سے بنایا گیا ہے، اور ہر صفحہ میں ایک طریقہ غیر قائم ہونے والی چوپاں کا سامان ہے. ایک دیے ہوئے جماعت کے لئے ایک سیمنٹی گراف بنانے کے لئے، ہم نے نئی مزید زیربگراف الگوریتم ڈیزائن کر رکھے ہیں کہ ہر صفحہ پر غیر کرسٹنگ گراف پیدا کریں، اور ایک لاگرینیان رالکسٹ بنیادی الگوریتم توکومبین صفحے ایک کتاب میں۔ آزمائش کی نشان دیتی ہے کہ کتاب کے اندازے میں ایک وسیع طریقہ پر چڑھنے کے فرمود کے فعالیت کی۔ ہمارے پارچر کو ایک ایٹ ٹرنیٹ پر بنیادی پارچر کے ساتھ برابر نتیجے حاصل کرتے ہیں.', 'si': 'අපි පොත වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂතා ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින්, විශේෂ විශේෂ ස්ථානයක්, සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂ ව පොතේ ස්පින්ට් එක වචනයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා, හැම පොතේ එක්කෙනෙක්ම පැත්තට පැත්තට පැත්තට පැත්තක් ති සෙමැන්ටික් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි අළුත් වාර්තාව සබ්ග්\u200dරාෆ් අල්ගෝරිතම් සිද්ධා කරනවා හැම පැත්තේ නොක්\u200dරාස් වාර්තාවක් නිර්ම පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ පොත්තක් සම්බන්ධ වැඩි අවස්ථාවක් වලින් පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරක අපේ පරීක්ෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'uz': "Biz kitob sifatida ishlatadigan grafikni modellaymiz, bir hususiy topologik boʻsh joy, semantik ishlatuvchi parsing uchun. Kitobning qismlari bir so'zlar tartibi qo'yiladi, va har bir sahifa ichida kichkina arkslarga ega. Koʻrsatilgan bir so'z uchun semantik grafikni yaratish uchun yangi Maksimal Subgraph algoritni yaratishimiz va har bir sahifani koʻchirib boʻlmaydi grafikni yaratish uchun va Lagrangiyaga tashkilgan algoritni kitobga birlashtirish uchun. Name Bizning tarkibimizning tarkibi shaxsiyatlarning holati asosida bog'liq natijalariga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả một đồ thị phụ thuộc như một cuốn sách, một dạng địa hình cụ thể, để phân tích độ quen thuộc. The spinning of the book is composed of a dãy of words, and each page contains a substration of nonxuyên arcs. Để xây dựng một đồ thị ngữ học cho một câu, chúng tôi thiết kế các thuật to án tối đa tiểu tiết mới để tạo ra các biểu đồ không vượt qua trên mỗi trang, và một thuật toán chuyển tiếp theo Chế độ Lagrange để leo lên các trang sách. Các thử nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của hệ thống đăng ký qua nhiều trường hợp khác nhau. Nhân viên phân tích có kết quả tương đối với một phân tích thời trang.', 'bg': 'Моделираме графика на зависимостта като книга, определен вид топологично пространство, за семантично анализиране на зависимостта. Гръбнакът на книгата е съставен от поредица от думи, и всяка страница съдържа поднабор от непресичащи дъги. За да изградим семантична графика за дадено изречение, ние проектираме нови алгоритми за максимален подграф, за да генерираме некръстосващи графики на всяка страница, както и алгоритъм, базиран на Лагрангова релаксация, за да комбинираме страници в книга. Експериментите демонстрират ефективността на рамката за вграждане на книги при широк спектър от условия. Нашият анализатор получава сравними резултати с най-съвременния анализатор, базиран на преход.', 'hr': 'Modeliramo grafik zavisnosti kao knjigu, posebno vrstu topološkog prostora, za semantičku analizu zavisnosti. Okrug knjige sastavlja se od sekvence riječi, i svaka stranica sadrži podskup nepromištenih luka. Da bi izgradili semantički grafik za određenu rečenicu, dizajnirali smo nove maksimalne algoritme podgrafa kako bi stvorili nepristojne grafike na svakoj stranici, i na stranicama tokombina algoritma osnovanog na Relaksiji Lagrangian u knjigu. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost okvira uključenja knjiga u širokom nizu uvjeta. Naš analizator dobija usporedbene rezultate sa stanjem umjetničkog prethodnog analizatora.', 'da': 'Vi modellerer en afhængighedsgraf som en bog, en bestemt form for topologisk rum, til semantisk afhængighedsanalyse. Bogens rygsøjle består af en række ord, og hver side indeholder et undersæt af ikke-krydsende buer. For at opbygge en semantisk graf for en given sætning designer vi nye Maximum Subgraph algoritmer til at generere ikke-crossing grafer på hver side, og en Lagrangian Relaxation-baseret algoritme til at kombinere sider i en bog. Eksperimenter viser effektiviteten af bookembedding rammerne på tværs af en lang række forhold. Vores parser opnår sammenlignelige resultater med en state-of-the-art overgangsbaseret parser.', 'nl': "We modelleren een afhankelijkheidsgrafiek als een boek, een bepaald soort topologische ruimte, voor semantische afhankelijkheidsparsing. De ruggengraat van het boek bestaat uit een reeks woorden, en elke pagina bevat een subset van niet-kruisende bogen. Om een semantische grafiek te bouwen voor een bepaalde zin, ontwerpen we nieuwe Maximum Subgraph algoritmes om niet-kruisende grafieken op elke pagina te genereren, en een Lagrange Relaxation gebaseerd algoritme om pagina's in een boek te combineren. Experimenten tonen de effectiviteit van het bookembedding framework aan onder een breed scala aan voorwaarden. Onze parser behaalt vergelijkbare resultaten met een state-of-the-art transition-based parser.", 'de': 'Wir modellieren einen Abhängigkeitsdiagramm als Buch, eine bestimmte Art von topologischem Raum, für semantisches Abhängigkeitsparsen. Der Buchrücken besteht aus einer Abfolge von Wörtern, und jede Seite enthält eine Untermenge von nicht kreuzenden Bögen. Um einen semantischen Graphen für einen bestimmten Satz zu erstellen, entwerfen wir neue Maximum Subgraph Algorithmen, um nicht kreuzende Graphen auf jeder Seite zu generieren, und einen Lagrange Relaxation-basierten Algorithmus, um Seiten zu einem Buch zusammenzufügen. Experimente zeigen die Effektivität des Bookembedding Frameworks unter verschiedensten Bedingungen. Unser Parser erzielt vergleichbare Ergebnisse mit einem state-of-the-art transition-basierten Parser.', 'ko': '우리는 도형에 의존하여 책 한 권, 특수한 토폴로지 공간으로 의미 의존 분석에 사용할 것이다.책의 등심은 일련의 단어로 구성되어 있으며, 매 페이지마다 비교차호의 서브집합을 포함한다.문장에 주어진 의미도를 구축하기 위해 우리는 새로운 가장 큰 서브맵 알고리즘을 설계하여 각 페이지의 비교차도를 생성하고 라그랑의 해이한 알고리즘을 바탕으로 페이지를 한 권의 책으로 조합했다.실험은 bookembedding 프레임워크가 각종 조건하에서의 유효성을 증명하였다.우리의 해상도는 가장 선진적인 변환에 기반한 해상도와 비슷한 결과를 얻었다.', 'fa': 'ما یک گراف بستگی را به عنوان یک کتاب، یک نوع فضای توپولوژیک، برای تقسیم بستگی semantic model می کنیم. گردن کتاب از یک دستور کلمات ساخته می شود، و هر صفحه یک دستور غیر قابل عبور است. برای ساختن یک گراف semantic برای یک جمله داده شده، ما الگوریتم\u200cهای بزرگترین زیر گراف جدید را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا در هر صفحه گراف\u200cهای غیر عبور کند، و صفحه\u200cهای توکومبین\u200cهای الگوریتم بر اساس Relaxation based Lagrangian به یک کتاب تولید کنیم. تجربه\u200cها موثرت چهارچوب\u200cسازی کتاب را در یک مجموعه\u200cی شرایط گسترده نشان می\u200cدهند. بازیگر ما نتیجه\u200cهای مقایسه\u200cای را با یک بازیگر بر اساس تغییر هنر می\u200cگیرد.', 'id': 'Kami model grafik dependensi sebagai sebuah buku, jenis ruang topologi tertentu, untuk penghuraian dependensi semantis. Tulang belakang buku terbuat dari urutan kata, dan setiap halaman mengandung subset lengkung yang tidak menyeberangi. Untuk membangun grafik semantis untuk kalimat tertentu, kami merancang algoritma Subgraph Maksimum baru untuk menghasilkan grafik tidak menyeberangi di setiap halaman, dan algoritma berbasis Relaxation Lagrangian untuk menggabungkan halaman ke dalam sebuah buku. Eksperimen menunjukkan efektivitas dari kerangka pembangunan buku melalui jangkauan luas kondisi. Penulis kami mendapatkan hasil yang bisa dibandingkan dengan peneliti terbaik yang berdasarkan transisi.', 'sw': 'We model a dependency graph as a book, a particular kind of topological space, for semantic dependency parsing.  Mzungumzo wa kitabu umetengenezwa kwa mfululizo wa maneno, na kila ukurasa unabeba kandanda isiyo na mipaka. Ili kutengeneza picha ya kigaidi kwa hukumu iliyo pewa, tunaunda algorithi mpya ya Ujumbe wa Kusini ili kutengeneza picha zisizo na mabadiliko katika kila ukurasa, na algorithi yenye uhusiano wa Lagrangia inaunganisha kurasa katika kitabu. Majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa mfumo wa kuandika katika mazingira mengi. Mchangiaji wetu anapata matokeo yanayofanana na hali ya mpito wa sanaa.', 'sq': 'We model a dependency graph as a book, a particular kind of topological space, for semantic dependency parsing.  Rruga e librit është e përbërë nga një sekuencë fjalësh, dhe çdo faqe përmban një nëngrup arkësh pa kryqëzim. Për të ndërtuar një grafik semantik për një fjalim të caktuar, ne dizajnojmë algoritme të reja Maximum Subgraph për të gjeneruar grafikë pa kryqëzim në çdo faqe, dhe një algoritëm Lagrangian-based Relaxation-algorithm për të kombinuar faqe në një libër. Eksperimentet tregojnë efektshmërinë e kuadrit të përfshirjes së librave nëpër një gamë të gjerë kushteve. Analizatori ynë merr rezultate të krahasueshme me një analizues me bazë në tranzicion.', 'tr': 'Biz bir kitap olaraq bağlanylyk grafisini, beýleki tür topolojik seleňi, semantik baglanylyk analysiýasy üçin örän çykýarys. Kitabyň boýunçysy sözlerniň bir dizisi bilen bejer, we her sahypa geçirmeden gatyklaryň bir toparyny bar. Berilen sözlem üçin semantik grafik inşa etmek üçin, her sahypada kesişmeýän grafikler döretmek üçin täze Maksimum Subgraf algoritmalaryny we Lagrangian Relaxation tabanly bir tokombin sahypalary kitabyna girýäris Testler kitaplanjak çarpyşynyň etkinliýetini birnäçe şartlarda görkez. Çeviri çözümlerimiz, sanat çeşitlerinin durumu ile karşılaştırılabilir neticeleri alır.', 'am': 'We model a dependency graph as a book, a particular kind of topological space, for semantic dependency parsing.  የመጽሐፉም ጕልበት ቃላት በሚያቋረጥ ቃል ታደርጋለች፥ በየገጹም ሁሉ የማያልተላለፍ የአርቅ ክፍል ነው። ለክፍል የተሰጠውን የsemantic graph ለመሥራት፣ በየገጹ ላይ ያልተላለፉ ግራፎችን ለማፍጠር አዲስ መተላለፊያ ትልቅ ጉዳይ አቋራጭ እና ለላግንጂያን ማቀናቀል አሌጎሪትም ገጾችን በመጽሐፍ ማቀናቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች የቡድቡን አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ላይ ጥቅም ያሳያል፡፡ ተሳታፊያችን የ-የ-ዓርት ግንኙነት የተሳካ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'af': "Ons model 'n afhanklikheidsgraf as 'n boek, 'n bepaalde soort topologiese spasie, vir semantiese afhanklikheid verwerking. Die spin van die boek is gemaak van 'n volgorde van woorde, en elke bladsy bevat 'n subartikel van onkruisende boeke. Om 'n semantiese graaf te bou vir 'n gegewe seting, ontwerp ons nuwe Maksimum Subgraaf algoritme om onkruisende graaf op elke bladsy te genereer, en 'n Lagrangian Relaxation-gebaseerde algoritme tocombine bladsye in 'n boek. Name Ons ontleerder kry vergelykbare resultate met 'n staat van die kuns transisie-gebaseerde ontleerder.", 'hy': 'We model a dependency graph as a book, a particular kind of topological space, for semantic dependency parsing.  Գրքի ետնամասը բառերի հաջորդականությունից է կազմված, և յուրաքանչյուր էջ պարունակում է առանց խաչը գծերի ենթախումբ: Որպեսզի կառուցենք որոշ նախադասությունների համար սեմանտիկ գրաֆիկ, մենք նախագծում ենք նոր Մաքսիմալ սուբգրաֆի ալգորիթմներ, որոնք ստեղծում են առանց խաչը գծագրեր յուրաքանչյուր էջի վրա, և Լագանյան հանգստացման հիմնված ալգորիթմ, որը կ Փորձերը ցույց են տալիս գրքերի ներառման շրջանի արդյունավետությունը տարբեր պայմաններում: Մեր խմբագրիչը ստանում է համեմատական արդյունքներ վերաբերյալ վերափոխման հիմնված խմբագրիչը:', 'az': 'Biz bir kitab olaraq bağımlılıq grafisini, bəzi topolojik alanı, semantik bağımlılıq analizi üçün modelləyirik. Kitabın dönüşü sözlərin sıralanlığından olub, hər səhifələrdə həddi a şmadığı zincirlərin bir dəstəsi vardır. Belə cümlələr üçün semantik grafik inşa etmək üçün, hər səhifədə küçük olmayan grafik yaratmaq üçün yeni Maximum Subgraph algoritmi və Lagrangian Relaxation tabanlı bir algoritm tokombin sayfalarını kitabda inşa edirik. Tərəbələr kitab qurğusunu geniş bir səviyyə şartları arasında etkinliğini göstərir. Bizim ayırıcımız, sanat vəziyyəti tərcümə ilə müqayisədə müqayisədə müəyyən sonuçları alır.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি বই হিসেবে নির্ভরশীল গ্রাফ মডেল করি, একটি বিশেষ ধরনের টোপোলজিক্যাল জায়গা হিসেবে, সেমেন্টিক নির্ভর পার্জ বইটির ঘুরে একটি শব্দের সংক্রান্ত বানানো হয়েছে এবং প্রত্যেক পাতায় একটি সাবটেট অক্রোসিং আর্ক আছে। একটি নির্দিষ্ট বাক্যের জন্য একটি সেমেন্টিক গ্রাফ তৈরি করার জন্য আমরা নতুন সর্বোচ্চ সাবগ্রাফ অ্যালগরিদম ডিজাইন করি প্রত্যেক পাতায় অক্রোসিং গ্রাফ তৈরি করার জন পরীক্ষাগুলো বিশাল পরিস্থিতিতে বুকমেডিং ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে। আমাদের প্যারার্সারের সাথে তুলনামূল ফলাফল পেয়েছে যেখানে একটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প-ভিত্তিক প্রতিযোগিতার', 'bs': 'Mi modeliramo grafik zavisnosti kao knjigu, posebno vrstu topološkog prostora, za semantičku analizu zavisnosti. Okrug knjige je sastavljen od sekvence riječi, i svaka stranica sadrži podskup nepromištenih luka. Da bi izgradili semantički grafik za određenu rečenicu, dizajnirali smo nove maksimalne algoritme podgrafa kako bi stvorili nepristojne grafike na svakoj stranici, i stranice tokombina na osnovu Lagrangianske Relaksije u knjizi. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost okvira knjige u širokom nizu uvjeta. Naš analizator dobija usporedbene rezultate sa stanjem umjetničkog prethodnog analizatora.', 'ca': "Modelem un gràfic de dependencia com un llibre, una espècie específica d'espai topològic, per analitzar la dependencia semàntica. The spine of the book is made up of a sequence of words, and each page contains a subset of noncrossing arcs.  Per construir un gràfic semàntic per una frase determinada, dissenyem nous algoritmes de Subgràfic Màxim per generar gràfics no cruçats a cada pàgina, i un algoritme basat en Relaxació Lagrangiana per combinar pàgines en un llibre. Els experiments demostren l'efectivitat del marc d'integració de llibres en una gran varietat de condicions. El nostre analitzador obté resultats comparables amb un analitzador basat en la transició més avançada.", 'cs': 'Modelujeme závislostní graf jako knihu, konkrétní typ topologického prostoru, pro analýzu sémantických závislostí. Páteř knihy je tvořen sekvencí slov a každá stránka obsahuje podmnožinu nekřižujících oblouků. Pro sestavení sémantického grafu pro danou větu navrhujeme nové algoritmy Maximum Subgraph pro generování nekřižujících grafů na každé stránce a algoritmus založený na Lagrangově relaxaci, který sloučí stránky do knihy. Experimenty demonstrují efektivitu frameworku bookembedding v široké škále podmínek. Náš parser dosahuje srovnatelných výsledků s nejmodernějším parserem založeným na přechodu.', 'fi': 'Mallistamme riippuvuuskaavion kirjaksi, tietynlaiseksi topologiseksi avaruudeksi semanttisen riippuvuuden jäsentämistä varten. Kirjan selkäranka koostuu sanasarjasta, ja jokainen sivu sisältää osan läpileikkaamattomia kaaria. Jotta voimme rakentaa semanttisen graafin tietylle lauseelle, suunnittelemme uusia Maximum Subgraph algoritmeja, jotka tuottavat ei-risteileviä graafioita jokaiselle sivulle, ja Lagrangian Relaxation-pohjainen algoritmi, joka yhdistää sivut kirjaksi. Kokeet osoittavat kirjojen upottamisen tehokkuuden monissa eri olosuhteissa. Analysoijamme saa vertailukelpoisia tuloksia huippuluokan siirtymäpohjaisen jäsentäjän kanssa.', 'et': 'Me modelleerime sõltuvusgraafikut raamatuna, teatud tüüpi topoloogilise ruumi semantilise sõltuvuse parsimiseks. Raamatu selgroog koosneb sõnade jadast ja iga lehekülg sisaldab mitteristuvaid kaari. Selleks et luua semantiline graafik antud lause jaoks, projekteerime uued Maximum Subgraph algoritmid, mis genereerivad mitteristuvaid graafikuid igal leheküljel, ja Lagrangi lõõgastuspõhine algoritm, mis ühendab lehekülgi raamatusse. Katsed näitavad raamatukogumise raamistiku tõhusust mitmesugustes tingimustes. Meie parser saab võrreldavad tulemused kaasaegse üleminekupõhise parseriga.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé model kuwi nggawe barang penggunaké buku, dadi koyo ngono kelas telomongke, nggawe semanti dipunangkedisebarke FindOK To create a semanti graphing for a given word, we design new maximum SubgraphAlgorithms to Genere nonintering graphs on every page, and a lagrangan Relaxion-basate Algorithm Toombine pages in a bookmark. Name string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Graf odvisnosti modeliramo kot knjigo, določeno vrsto topološkega prostora, za semantično razčlenitev odvisnosti. Hrbtenica knjige je sestavljena iz zaporedja besed in vsaka stran vsebuje podmnožico neprekrivnih lokov. Za izdelavo semantičnega grafa za določen stavek smo oblikovali nove algoritme Maksimalnega podgrafa za ustvarjanje neprekrižnih grafov na vsaki strani in algoritem na osnovi Lagrangove sprostitve, ki združuje strani v knjigo. Eksperimenti dokazujejo učinkovitost okvira za vgradnjo knjig v številnih pogojih. Naš razčlenjevalnik pridobi primerljive rezultate z najsodobnejšim prehodnim razčlenjevalnikom.', 'he': 'אנחנו דוגמנים גרף תלויות כספר, סוג מסוים של מרחב טופולוגי, עבור בדיקת תלויות סמנטית. השדרה של הספר מורכבת מעקב של מילים, וכל עמוד מכיל תחתונה של קווים לא חוצים. כדי לבנות גרף סמנטי למשפט מסוים, אנחנו מעצבים אלגוריתמים חדשים של התחתונים מקסימים כדי ליצור גרפים לא חוצה על כל עמוד, ואלגריתם מבוסס על Relaxation Lagrangian tocombine עמודים לספר. ניסויים מראים את היעילות של מסגרת הכניסה של ספרים ברחבי מגוון רחב של תנאים. המחקר שלנו משיג תוצאות שוויות עם המחקר המבוסס במעבר המאוחר.', 'ha': "Mu motsar karatun da ɗabi'a kamar wani littãfi, wa'yan fili na topogi, ga pargarin da ake yi na ɗabi'a na semantic. An halitta kwamfyutan littãfi da wasu kalmõmi na magana, kuma kõwane page yana da wani ƙanshi na karkassi. To, za mu ƙiƙiro wani grafi na semantiki wa birnin da aka ba, za'a ƙayyade algoritm na Kwamfyuta Kwamfyuta, don ka iya ƙiƙiro grafyuta masu yin ƙẽtare haddi a kan duk saura, da kuma algoritm na haɗe algoritm na Lagrangian a kan wata littãfi. Tajarakin sun nuna aikin firam mai bookewa a cikin wasu sharĩ'a mai tsawo. Paramermanmu yana sami matsala da mai daidai ga-state-of-art-parse-salon.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དེབ་ཅིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་བར་སྟོང་ཞིག་དང་། semantic dependen The spine of the book is made up of a sequence of words, and each page contains a subset of noncrossing arcs. To build a semantic graph for a given sentence, we design new Maximum Subgraph algorithms to generate noncrossing graphs on each page, and a Lagrangian Relaxation-based algorithm tocombine pages in a book. Experiments demonstrate the effectiveness of the bookembedding framework across a wide range of conditions. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་འབྲས་བ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural Word Segmentation with Rich Pretraining', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات العصبية مع التدريب المسبق الغني', 'es': 'Segmentación de palabras neuronales con preentrenamiento enriquecido', 'fr': 'Segmentation neuronale des mots avec préentraînement enrichi', 'pt': 'Segmentação de palavras neurais com pré-treinamento avançado', 'ja': '豊富な事前トレーニングによるニューラルワードセグメンテーション', 'zh': '多预训练之神经分词', 'hi': 'रिच प्रीट्रेनिंग के साथ तंत्रिका शब्द विभाजन', 'ru': 'Сегментация нейронных слов с богатым предварительным обучением', 'ga': 'Deighilt Focal Néarach le Réamhoiliúint Saibhir', 'hu': 'Neurális szószegmentáció gazdag előadással', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική τμηματοποίηση λέξεων με πλούσια προεπιλογή', 'kk': 'Рич претензиясы мен нейрондық сөз сегментациясы', 'it': 'Segmentazione neurale delle parole con Rich Pretraining', 'mk': 'Сегментација на неврални зборови со богати преправања', 'lt': 'Neuralinė žodžių segmentacija su turtingu pretrainingu', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Kata Neural dengan Pretraining Rich', 'ml': 'റിച്ച് പ്രിട്രിനീഷനോടൊപ്പം ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്ക് വേര്\u200dഡ് സെഗങ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Баян хөгжлийн мэдрэлийн үг хэвлэлт', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Newrali bi Prestrazzjoni Rikka', 'no': 'Neuralt ord- segmentasjon med rikt trekking', 'pl': 'Segmentacja słów neuronowych z bogatym wstępnym treningiem', 'ro': 'Segmentarea neurală a cuvintelor cu pretenții bogate', 'sr': 'Neuralna reč Segmentacija sa bogatim pretinanjem', 'si': 'Description', 'so': 'Heshiiska hadalka Neural with Rich Pretraining', 'sv': 'Neural ordsegmentering med Rich Pretraining', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த முன்பயிற்சியுடன் புதிய வார்த்தை பிரிப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chọn từ thần kinh với việc nghiền nát', 'hr': 'Neuralna riječ Segmentacija s bogatom pretvaranjem', 'bg': 'Нервна сегментация на думи с богато претрениране', 'de': 'Neuronale Wortsegmentierung mit reichhaltigem Vortraining', 'nl': 'Neurale woordsegmentatie met rijke pretraining', 'ko': '예훈련이 풍부한 신경분사', 'fa': 'جداگاهی کلمه عصبی با پرتین ثروت', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa Neural Word with Rich Pretraining', 'tr': 'Rich Pretraining ile nöral Kelime Segmentasyonu', 'id': 'Segmentasi kata saraf dengan Pretraining kaya', 'af': 'Neurale Woord Segmentasie met Rich Pretraining', 'hy': 'Բառերի նյարդային սեգմետացիան հարուստ պատրաստման հետ', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i Fjalëve Neurale me pretendim të pasur', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Neuralna segmentacija riječi sa bogatim pretvaranjem', 'az': 'Zengin Pretraining ilə Nöral Kelimi Segmentasyonu', 'ca': 'Segmentació neuronal de paraules amb simulació rica', 'cs': 'Segmentace neuronálních slov s bohatým předtréninkem', 'bn': 'সম্পদ প্রশিক্ষণের সাথে নিউরেল শব্দ বিভাগ', 'et': 'Neuraalse sõna segmenteerimine rikkaliku eeltreeninguga', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen sanasegmentointi rikkaalla esikoulutuksella', 'da': 'Neural ordsegmentering med rig foregivenhed', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'סגמנטציה מילים עצביות עם מעמד העשיר', 'sk': 'Segmentacija živčnih besed z bogatim predvajanjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Rich Pretraining ཡི་སྦྱར་བའི་ཚིག་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural word segmentation research has benefited from large-scale raw texts by leveraging them for pretraining character and word embeddings. On the other hand, statistical segmentation research has exploited richer sources of external information, such as punctuation, automatic segmentation and POS. We investigate the effectiveness of a range of external training sources for neural word segmentation by building a modular segmentation model, pretraining the most important submodule using rich external sources. Results show that such pretraining significantly improves the model, leading to accuracies competitive to the best methods on six benchmarks.', 'ar': 'استفاد بحث تجزئة الكلمات العصبية من النصوص الأولية واسعة النطاق من خلال الاستفادة منها في التدرب المسبق على الشخصيات والكلمات. من ناحية أخرى ، استغلت أبحاث التجزئة الإحصائية مصادر أكثر ثراءً للمعلومات الخارجية ، مثل علامات الترقيم والتجزئة التلقائية ونقاط البيع. نحن نحقق في فعالية مجموعة من مصادر التدريب الخارجية لتجزئة الكلمات العصبية من خلال بناء نموذج تجزئة معياري ، قبل التدريب المسبق على الوحدة الفرعية الأكثر أهمية باستخدام مصادر خارجية غنية. تظهر النتائج أن مثل هذا التدريب المسبق يحسن النموذج بشكل كبير ، مما يؤدي إلى دقة تنافسية لأفضل الطرق في ستة معايير.', 'fr': "La recherche sur la segmentation neuronale des mots a bénéficié de textes bruts à grande échelle en les utilisant pour le pré-apprentissage de l'intégration de caractères et de mots. D'autre part, la recherche sur la segmentation statistique a exploité des sources d'informations externes plus riches, telles que la ponctuation, la segmentation automatique et les points de vente. Nous étudions l'efficacité d'une gamme de sources d'apprentissage externes pour la segmentation de mots neuronaux en créant un modèle de segmentation modulaire, en préentraînant le sous-module le plus important à l'aide de sources externes riches. Les résultats montrent qu'un tel pré-entraînement améliore considérablement le modèle, ce qui permet d'obtenir des précisions compétitives par rapport aux meilleures méthodes sur six points de référence.", 'es': 'La investigación sobre segmentación de palabras neuronales se ha beneficiado de textos sin procesar a gran escala al aprovecharlos para el preentrenamiento de incrustaciones de caracteres y palabras. Por otro lado, la investigación de la segmentación estadística ha aprovechado fuentes más ricas de información externa, como la puntuación, la segmentación automática y el POS. Investigamos la eficacia de una serie de fuentes de entrenamiento externas para la segmentación de palabras neuronales mediante la creación de un modelo de segmentación modular, preentrenando el submódulo más importante utilizando fuentes externas ricas. Los resultados muestran que dicho preentrenamiento mejora significativamente el modelo, lo que lleva a precisiones competitivas con los mejores métodos en seis puntos de referencia.', 'pt': 'A pesquisa de segmentação neural de palavras se beneficiou de textos brutos em larga escala, aproveitando-os para pré-treinamento de caracteres e incorporação de palavras. Por outro lado, a pesquisa de segmentação estatística tem explorado fontes mais ricas de informações externas, como pontuação, segmentação automática e POS. Investigamos a eficácia de uma variedade de fontes externas de treinamento para segmentação neural de palavras construindo um modelo de segmentação modular, pré-treinando o submódulo mais importante usando fontes externas ricas. Os resultados mostram que tal pré-treinamento melhora significativamente o modelo, levando a acurácias competitivas aos melhores métodos em seis benchmarks.', 'zh': '神经分词研益大本,以预训练字符单词嵌。 又方,计割用益丰,如标点符号,自分POS。 吾因模块化分形,用外源预练要子模块,以究神经词分之训练源有效性。 结果表明,此预练著改模形,使精度在六准上与最佳法有竞争力。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका शब्द विभाजन अनुसंधान ने बड़े पैमाने पर कच्चे ग्रंथों से लाभ उठाया है, जो उन्हें पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण चरित्र और शब्द एम्बेडिंग के लिए लाभ उठाते हैं। दूसरी ओर, सांख्यिकीय विभाजन अनुसंधान ने बाहरी जानकारी के समृद्ध स्रोतों का शोषण किया है, जैसे विराम चिह्न, स्वचालित विभाजन और पीओएस। हम एक मॉड्यूलर विभाजन मॉडल का निर्माण करके तंत्रिका शब्द विभाजन के लिए बाहरी प्रशिक्षण स्रोतों की एक श्रृंखला की प्रभावशीलता की जांच करते हैं, समृद्ध बाहरी स्रोतों का उपयोग करके सबसे महत्वपूर्ण सबमॉड्यूल को प्रीट्रेनाइज़ करते हैं। परिणाम बताते हैं कि इस तरह के pretraining काफी मॉडल में सुधार करता है, छह बेंचमार्क पर सबसे अच्छा तरीकों के लिए प्रतिस्पर्धी सटीकता के लिए अग्रणी।', 'ru': 'Исследование нейронной сегментации слов выиграло от крупномасштабных необработанных текстов, используя их для предварительного обучения символов и вложений слов. С другой стороны, при проведении исследований в области статистической сегментации использовались более богатые источники внешней информации, такие, как пунктуация, автоматическая сегментация и POS. Исследуем эффективность ряда внешних обучающих источников для нейронной сегментации слов путем построения модульной модели сегментации, предварительной подготовки наиболее важного подмодуля с использованием богатых внешних источников. Результаты показывают, что такое предварительное обучение значительно улучшает модель, что приводит к погрешности, соперничающей с наилучшими методами по шести критериям.', 'ja': '神経単語セグメンテーション研究は、文字の事前トレーニングや単語の埋め込みに活用することで、大規模な生テキストの恩恵を受けています。一方、統計的セグメンテーション研究は、句読点、自動セグメンテーション、POSなどのより豊富な外部情報源を利用している。私たちは、モジュール式セグメンテーションモデルを構築し、最も重要なサブモジュールを豊富な外部ソースを使用して事前にトレーニングすることによって、神経単語セグメンテーションのための幅広い外部トレーニングソースの有効性を調査します。結果は、このような事前トレーニングはモデルを大幅に改善し、6つのベンチマークの最良の方法に対する競争的な精度につながることを示しています。', 'ga': 'Bhain taighde ar dheighilt focal néaraíoch leas as téacsanna amha ar scála mór trí iad a ghiaráil chun carachtair agus leabú focal a réamhoiliúint. Ar an láimh eile, tá leas á bhaint ag taighde deighilte staidrimh le foinsí níos saibhre faisnéise seachtraí, amhail poncaíocht, deighilt uathoibríoch agus POS. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar éifeachtúlacht raon foinsí oiliúna seachtracha do dheighilt focal néarúil trí mhúnla deighilte modúlach a thógáil, ag réamhoiliúint ar an bhfomhodúl is tábhachtaí ag baint úsáide as foinsí seachtracha saibhre. Léiríonn torthaí go gcuireann réamhoiliúint den sórt sin feabhas suntasach ar an tsamhail, rud a fhágann go mbíonn beachtas iomaíoch ar na modhanna is fearr ar shé thagarmharc.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური სიტყვების სეგმენტირების შესწავლობა დიდი სიტყვებისგან გამოიყენებულია, რომელიც მათი სიტყვებისთვის გამოყენებული სიტყვებისთვის. მეორე მხარეს, სტატისტიკური სეგმენტიკური სეგმენტიკური სეგმენტიკური სექმენტიკური გამოყენება გარეშე ინფორმაციის უფრო დიდი გამოყენება, როგორც პუნქტუაცია, ავტომატური სეგმენტიკური სექმენტიკური და POS. ჩვენ გან წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ ასეთი წარმოდგენა მნიშვნელოვანია მოდელს, რომელიც შეგვიძლია კონპექციას კონექციურად გავაკეთებენ საუკეთესო მეტოდი', 'hu': 'A neurális szószegmentációs kutatások a nagyszabású nyers szövegek előnyeit használták azáltal, hogy felhasználták őket a karakterek és szóbeágyazások előkészítésére. Másrészt a statisztikai szegmentációs kutatások a külső információk gazdagabb forrásait használták fel, mint például az írásjelek, az automatikus szegmentáció és a POS. A külső képzési források hatékonyságát vizsgáljuk a neurális szószegmentáció moduláris szegmentációs modell kialakításával, a legfontosabb submodul előkészítésével gazdag külső források felhasználásával. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az ilyen előkészítés jelentősen javítja a modellt, ami hat referenciaértéken a legjobb módszerekkel szemben versenyképes pontosságot eredményez.', 'el': 'Η έρευνα για την κατακερματισμό των νευρωνικών λέξεων έχει επωφεληθεί από τα ακατέργαστα κείμενα μεγάλης κλίμακας αξιοποιώντας τα για την προεπιλογή χαρακτήρων και ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Από την άλλη πλευρά, η στατιστική έρευνα κατακερματισμού έχει εκμεταλλευτεί πλουσιότερες πηγές εξωτερικών πληροφοριών, όπως η στίξη, η αυτόματη κατακερματισμός και Ερευνούμε την αποτελεσματικότητα μιας σειράς εξωτερικών πηγών εκπαίδευσης για την κατακερματισμό νευρωνικών λέξεων χτίζοντας ένα μορφωματικό μοντέλο κατακερματισμού, προενταξιακά το σημαντικότερο υποσύνολο χρησιμοποιώντας πλούσιες εξωτερικές πηγές. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι μια τέτοια προεπιλογή βελτιώνει σημαντικά το μοντέλο, οδηγώντας σε ακρίβειες ανταγωνιστικές προς τις καλύτερες μεθόδους σε έξι κριτήρια αναφοράς.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық сөздерді сегментациялау зерттеулері үлкен масштабтағы мәтіндерді таңбаларды және сөздерді ендіру үшін көмектеседі. Біріншіден, статистикалық сегментацияның зерттеулері сыртқы мәліметтердің бағатты көзін, мысалы таңбаша, автоматты сегментация және POS секретациясы. Біз невралдық сөздерді сегментациялау үшін сыртқы оқыту көзін зерттеп, модульді сегментациялау моделін Нәтижелер бұл үлгісі үлгісін өзгертеді. Алты бағдарламалардың ең жақсы әдістеріне сәйкестіктерді жақсы жасайды.', 'it': "La ricerca sulla segmentazione delle parole neurali ha beneficiato di testi grezzi su larga scala sfruttando loro per la preparazione di caratteri e incorporazioni di parole. D'altra parte, la ricerca sulla segmentazione statistica ha sfruttato fonti più ricche di informazioni esterne, come punteggiatura, segmentazione automatica e POS. Investighiamo l'efficacia di una serie di fonti di formazione esterne per la segmentazione neurale delle parole costruendo un modello di segmentazione modulare, pretraining del sottomodulo più importante utilizzando fonti esterne ricche. I risultati mostrano che tale pretraining migliora significativamente il modello, portando ad accuratezze competitive ai migliori metodi su sei parametri di riferimento.", 'lt': 'Neuralinių žodžių segmentacijos moksliniai tyrimai gavo naudos iš didelio masto žaliavinių tekstų, nes juos suteikė svertas išankstiniam mokymui ir žodžių įterpimui. Kita vertus, statistiniai segmentacijos tyrimai išnaudojo turtingesnius išorinės informacijos šaltinius, pvz., tašką, automatinę segmentaciją ir POS. Rezultatai rodo, kad toks išankstinis mokymas gerokai pagerina model į, todėl tikslumas konkurencingas pagal geriausius metodus pagal šešis kriterijus.', 'mk': 'Истражувањето на сегментацијата на нервните зборови имаше корист од големи сурови тексти со нивното искористување за претренирање на карактерот и вградувањето на зборови. Од друга страна, истражувањето на статистичката сегментација искористи побогати извори на надворешни информации, како што се поентуација, автоматска сегментација и POS. Ја истражуваме ефикасноста на голем број надворешни извори на обука за неурална сегментација на зборови со изградба на модуларен модел на сегментација, претре Резултатите покажуваат дека ваквото претренирање значително го подобрува моделот, водејќи до точност конкурентна со најдобрите методи на шест референтни оценки.', 'ms': 'Penelitian segmen perkataan saraf telah mengambil manfaat dari teks mentah skala besar dengan menggunakannya untuk latihan awal aksara dan pelengkapan perkataan. Di sisi lain, kajian segmen statistik telah mengeksploitasi sumber maklumat luaran yang lebih kaya, seperti punctuasi, segmen automatik dan POS. Kami menyelidiki kegunaan julat sumber latihan luaran untuk segmen perkataan saraf dengan membina model segmen modular, mempelatih submodul yang paling penting menggunakan sumber luaran yang kaya. Keputusan menunjukkan bahawa pretraining seperti itu meningkatkan dengan signifikan model, menyebabkan ketepatan kompetitif kepada kaedah terbaik pada enam tanda referensi.', 'mt': 'Ir-riċerka dwar is-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem newrali bbenefikat minn testi mhux ipproċessati fuq skala kbira billi ingranawhom għall-pretraining character u l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. Min-naħa l-oħra, ir-riċerka dwar is-segmentazzjoni statistika sfruttat sorsi aktar rikki ta’ informazzjoni esterna, bħall-puntwazzjoni, is-segmentazzjoni awtomatika u l-POS. Ir-riżultati juru li tali taħriġ minn qabel itejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-mudell, u jwassal għal preċiżjonijiet kompetittivi għall-aħjar metodi fuq sitt punti ta’ riferiment.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ പദ്ധതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തുകൊണ്ടും  മറ്റൊരു ഭാഗത്ത്, പുറത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സമൃദ്ധമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള പരിശോധന സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള പരിശീല സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഇത്തരം മഴ പെയ്യുന്നത് മോഡലിനെ വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്, ആറു ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല രീതികള', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл судалгаагаар мэдрэлийн үг хэмжээний судалгаа том хэмжээний жижиг textуудын тулд тэднийг харагдаж, үг хэмжээний нэвтрүүлэхэд ашигтай болсон. Нөгөө талаас, статистикийн загварын судалгаагаар гадаад мэдээллийн баян эх үүсвэрүүдийг ашиглаж байна. Яг цэгцээ, автоматик загвар болон POS юм. Үүний үр дүнд ийм загварыг маш чухал сайжруулж, зургаан загварын хамгийн сайхан арга загварын тулд зөрчилдөөнтэй тохиромжтой болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Badania segmentacji słów neuronalnych skorzystały z dużej skali surowych tekstów, wykorzystując je do wstępnego treningu znaków i osadzeń słów. Z drugiej strony badania segmentacji statystycznej wykorzystują bogatsze źródła informacji zewnętrznych, takie jak interpunkcja, automatyczna segmentacja i POS. Badamy skuteczność szeregu zewnętrznych źródeł treningowych dla segmentacji słów neuronowych poprzez budowę modułowego modelu segmentacji, wstępnie trenującego najważniejszy podmodul z wykorzystaniem bogatych źródeł zewnętrznych. Wyniki pokazują, że takie wstępne treningi znacznie poprawiają model, prowadząc do dokładności konkurencyjnej wobec najlepszych metod na sześciu punktach odniesienia.', 'no': 'Forskning av nøyrale ordsegmentasjon har brukt frå store skala råtekstar ved å levera dei for å trekke teikn og ordinnbygging. På den andre siden har statistiske segmentasjonsforskning eksplodert rikre kilder av eksterne informasjon, som punktering, automatisk segmentering og POS. Vi undersøker effektiviteten av eit rekkjefølgje av eksterne treningskilder for neuralsegmentasjon ved å bygge ein modular segmentasjonsmodul, som gjer den viktigste undermodulen med rike eksterne kilder. Resultatet viser at slike område betydelig forbedrar modellen, som fører til akkurasjon som konkurrer med dei beste metodane på seks benchmarker.', 'ro': 'Cercetarea segmentării neurale a cuvintelor a beneficiat de texte brute la scară largă, utilizându-le pentru pregătirea încorporărilor de caractere și cuvinte. Pe de altă parte, cercetările de segmentare statistică au exploatat surse mai bogate de informații externe, cum ar fi punctuația, segmentarea automată și POS. Investigăm eficiența unei game de surse externe de formare pentru segmentarea neuronală a cuvintelor prin construirea unui model modular de segmentare, pregătind cel mai important submodul folosind surse externe bogate. Rezultatele arată că o astfel de pregătire îmbunătățește semnificativ modelul, conducând la o precizie competitivă la cele mai bune metode pe șase criterii de referință.', 'sr': 'Istraživanje neuroloških reèi za segmentaciju koristilo se od velike skale sirovinih tekstova, uvećavajući ih na pretkivanje karaktera i ugraðenje reèi. S druge strane, istraživanje statističke segmentacije iskoristilo je bogatije izvore vanjskih informacija, poput punkcije, automatske segmentacije i POS-a. Istražujemo efikasnost niza vanjskih izvora obuke za segmentaciju neuroloških riječi, izgradjući modularni model segmentacije, pretvarajući najvažniji podmodul koristeći bogate vanjske izvore. Rezultati pokazuju da takva pretkivanja značajno poboljšava model, što dovodi do tačnosti konkurentne na najbolje metode na šest kriterija.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරල් වචන සැකසුම් පරීක්ෂණය ලොකු ස්කේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ වචන සම්බන්ධය සඳහ අනිත් අත්තරයෙන්, ස්ථාතික සෙගෙම්ටර් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය, ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සෙගෙම්ටර් සහ POS. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ප්\u200dරව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩ කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් හ', 'sv': 'Neural ordsegmentering forskning har gynnats av storskaliga råtexter genom att utnyttja dem för att förbereda tecken- och ordinbäddningar. Å andra sidan har statistisk segmenteringsforskning utnyttjat rikare källor till extern information, såsom skiljetecken, automatisk segmentering och POS.Vi undersöker effektiviteten av en rad externa utbildningskällor för neurala ordsegmentering genom att bygga en modulär segmenteringsmodell, förbereda den viktigaste submodulen med hjälp av rika externa källor. Resultaten visar att en sådan förberedelse avsevärt förbättrar modellen, vilket leder till noggrannhet som är konkurrenskraftig mot de bästa metoderna på sex riktmärken.', 'so': "Baaritaanka qeybinta qoyska ah ayaa faa'iido ka helay qoraal aad u weyn oo aad u baahan tahay si loo soo diro tababarka iyo hadalka. Sida kale, waxbarashada takhasuska ah ayaa isticmaalay macluumaadka dibadda ee taajirka ah, tusaale ahaan punctuation, bilowga kala soocmaalka iyo POS. Waxaynu baaraynaa faa'iidada kooxaha waxbarashada dibadda ah ee kooxaha hadalka neurada ah xagga dhisidda model kooxaha u dhexeeya, waxaana ka hor dhigaynaa noocyada ugu muhiimsan isticmaalka weerarka dibadda ah. Midhaha la’aanta waxay tustaa in dib u dhigidda uu u dhigo mid aad u hagaajiya tusaale, wuxuuna keenaa si saxda ah oo ku dadaalaya hababka ugu fiican ee lix qiimeeya.", 'ta': 'புதிய வார்த்தை துண்டு ஆராய்ச்சி பெரிய அளவிலிருந்து குறைந்த எழுத்துக்கள் மற்றும் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதல் மூலம் அவற்றை அனு மற்றொரு பகுதியில், புள்ளிவிவரங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி வெளி தகவல்களின் வளர்ச்சியான மூலங்களை பயன்படுத்தி விட்டது, பாங்கியம், தானாகவே பிரிவு மற்றும் POS. நாம் வெளி பயிற்சி மூலங்களின் விளைவை புதுப்பிக்கும் புதிய முடிவுகள் இந்த மாதிரியை முன்னேற்றும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது, ஆறு பெங்குருக்களில் சிறந்த முறைகளுக்கு பொருத்தமான முறைகளை', 'ur': 'نئورل لفظ سپٹمنٹ تحقیقات بڑے مقدار رئو ٹیکسٹ سے فائدہ اٹھائی گئی ہے کہ ان کو نئورل لفظ اور لفظ ایمبڈینگ کے لئے لفظ کریں۔ اور دوسری طرف، ایستٹیسٹیسی سیگنٹیسی تحقیقات بیرونی معلومات کے بہت ثروتمند سراسر استعمال کی گئی ہے، جیسے نقطہ، اتماتیک سیگنٹیسی اور POS. ہم نے نئورل لفظ کے لئے بیرونی تطارین سراسروں کے فائدہ کا تحقیق کیا ہے، ایک موڈولر سیگنٹیسی موڈل بنانے کے ذریعہ، سب نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایسی دھوپ کی موڈل کو بہت اچھی طریقے سے بہترین طریقے پر مسلط ہونے کی وجہ سے بہت اچھی طریقے سے اچھی دھوپ کی جاتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Boshqa bir tomonda, statistical qismni tashqi tarjima qilish natijadagi maʼlumotlarning kichkina manbaslarini ishlatish mumkin. Biz tashqi narsalarning chegarasini o'rganish natijadagi taʼminlovchi manbalarning foydalanishini o'rganamiz. Natijalar shunday o'xshash modelni juda yaxshi ko'ra ko'rsatadi, va lix parametrlarda eng eng yaxshi usullarni ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu phân tách các từ thần kinh đã được hưởng lợi từ các bản thảo lớn bằng cách dùng chúng tạo ra tính toán trước và từ ngữ. Mặt khác, nghiên cứu phân tách thống kê đã khai thác các nguồn thông tin bên ngoài giàu có, như chọc dò, phân biệt tự động và kết quả. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu tính hiệu quả của một loạt các nguồn huấn luyện bên ngoài cho phân chia các từ thần kinh, xây dựng một mô hình phân biệt khối khối từ theo chiều, sản xuất trước các mô- đun quan trọng nhất, sử dụng các nguồn độc lập bên ngoài giàu có. Kết quả cho thấy việc sản xuất lượng tuyết sẽ cải thiện đáng kể mô hình, dẫn đến việc độ chính xác cạnh tranh với cách thức tốt nhất trên sáu điểm tiêu chuẩn.', 'da': 'Neural ordsegmentering forskning har draget fordel af omfattende rå tekster ved at udnytte dem til forudgående tegn- og ordindlejringer. På den anden side har statistisk segmenteringsforskning udnyttet rigere kilder til ekstern information, såsom tegnsætning, automatisk segmentering og POS.Vi undersøger effektiviteten af en række eksterne træningskilder til neural ordsegmentering ved at opbygge en modulær segmenteringsmodel, der forudtræner det vigtigste submodul ved hjælp af rige eksterne kilder. Resultaterne viser, at en sådan forudtræning forbedrer modellen betydeligt, hvilket fører til nøjagtigheder, der er konkurrencedygtige med de bedste metoder på seks benchmarks.', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar neurale woordsegmentatie heeft geprofiteerd van grootschalige ruwe teksten door ze te gebruiken voor het voorbereiden van karakter- en woordembeddingen. Aan de andere kant heeft statistisch segmentatieonderzoek gebruik gemaakt van rijkere bronnen van externe informatie, zoals interpunctie, automatische segmentatie en POS. De resultaten tonen aan dat een dergelijke pretraining het model aanzienlijk verbetert, wat leidt tot nauwkeurigheiden die concurreren met de beste methoden op zes benchmarks.', 'id': 'Penelitian segmentasi kata saraf telah menguntungkan dari teks mentah skala besar dengan memanfaatkan mereka untuk melatih karakter dan embedding kata. Di sisi lain, penelitian segmentasi statistik telah mengeksploitasi sumber-sumber yang lebih kaya informasi luar, seperti punctuasi, segmentasi otomatis dan POS. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa pretraining seperti itu meningkatkan dengan signifikan model, yang menyebabkan akurasi kompetitif ke metode terbaik pada enam benchmark.', 'de': 'Die Forschung zur neuronalen Wortsegmentierung hat von großformatigen Rohtexten profitiert, indem sie sie für die Vorausbildung von Zeichen- und Worteinbettungen genutzt hat. Auf der anderen Seite hat die statistische Segmentierungsforschung reichhaltigere Quellen externer Informationen wie Interpunktion, automatische Segmentierung und POS genutzt. Wir untersuchen die Effektivität einer Reihe externer Trainingsquellen für neuronale Wortsegmentierung, indem wir ein modulares Segmentierungsmodell aufbauen, das das wichtigste Submodul mit umfangreichen externen Quellen vortrainiert. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass ein solches Vortraining das Modell signifikant verbessert, was zu Genauigkeiten führt, die mit den besten Methoden auf sechs Benchmarks konkurrieren.', 'ko': '신경분사 연구는 대규모 원시 텍스트 덕분에 문자 예훈련과 단어 삽입을 활용했다.다른 한편, 통계분사 연구는 문장부호, 자동분사와 어성 등 더욱 풍부한 외부 정보원을 이용했다. 우리는 모듈화 분사 모델을 구축하고 풍부한 외부 정보원을 이용하여 가장 중요한 서브모듈을 미리 훈련함으로써 일련의 외부 훈련원이 신경분사에 대한 유효성을 연구했다.그 결과 이런 예비훈련은 모델을 현저히 개선했고 6개 기준에서의 정밀도는 최선의 방법과 비슷했다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات قطع کردن کلمات عصبی از متن\u200cهای خاکستری بزرگ استفاده می\u200cکند با استفاده از آن برای تغییر کردن شخصیت\u200cها و جمع کردن کلمات. از طرف دیگر، تحقیقات قطعه آماری منابع ثروتمند اطلاعات خارجی مثل نقطه، قطعه اتوماتیک و POS را استفاده کرده است. ما تحقیقات فعالیت یک مجموعه منابع آموزش خارجی برای قطعه کردن کلمات عصبی را با ساختن یک مدل قطعه متصل modular با استفاده از منابع خارجی ثروتمند تحقیق می کنی نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این تغییرات مدل را بسیار زیادی بهتر می\u200cکند، که باعث می\u200cشود مسابقه\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای با بهترین روش\u200cهای شش تغییرات باشد.', 'bg': 'Изследването на сегментацията на невронните думи се възползва от мащабни сурови текстове, като ги използва за предварително обучение на символи и думи вграждания. От друга страна, статистическите изследвания на сегментацията са използвали по-богати източници на външна информация, като пунктуация, автоматична сегментация и Проучваме ефективността на редица външни източници на обучение за невронна сегментация на думи чрез изграждане на модулен модел на сегментация, предтренирайки най-важния субмодул с помощта на богати външни източници. Резултатите показват, че подобно предварително обучение значително подобрява модела, което води до прецизности, конкурентни на най-добрите методи по шест показатели.', 'hr': 'Istraživanje za segmentaciju neuroloških riječi iskoristilo se od velike skale sirovinih tekstova što ih je uticalo na pretkivanje karaktera i uloženje riječi. S druge strane, istraživanje statističke segmentacije iskoristilo je bogatije izvore vanjskih informacija, poput punkcije, automatske segmentacije i POS-a. Istražujemo učinkovitost niza vanjskih izvora obuke za segmentaciju neuroloških riječi, izgradjući modularni model segmentacije, pretvarajući najvažniji podmodul koristeći bogate vanjske izvore. Rezultati pokazuju da je takva pretkivanja značajno poboljšala model, što će dovesti do tačnosti konkurentne na najbolje metode na šest kriterija.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa upigaji maneno ya msingi umenufaika kutoka kwa ujumbe mkubwa wa maandishi mabaya kwa kutuma kwa ajili ya kutengeneza tabia na neno. Kwa upande mwingine, utafiti wa takwimu umetumia vyanzo vingi vya taarifa za nje, kama vile punctuation, mgawanyiko wa automatic pamoja na POS. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa ufanisi wa vyanzo vya mafunzo vya nje kwa ajili ya kutengeneza maneno ya upasuaji kwa kujenga modeli ya mgawanyiko wa kiutaratibu, kwa kuzingatia vifaa muhimu zaidi kwa kutumia vyanzo vya nje. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba matumizi hayo yanaboresha mtindo huo kwa kiasi kikubwa, na yanapelekea ukweli na ushindani wa njia nzuri katika bendera sita.', 'af': "Neurale woord segmentasie ondersoek het voordeel van groot- skaal rooi teks deur hulle te verwyder vir voorstreking van karakter en woord inbêring. Op die ander hand het statistiese segmentasie ondersoek ryker bronne van eksterne inligting gebruik, soos punktuasie, automatiese segmentasie en POS. Ons ondersoek die effektiviteit van 'n reek van eksterne ondersoek bronne vir neurale woord segmentasie deur 'n modulare segmentasie model te bou, wat die mees belangrikste submodule gebruik ryk eksterne bronne. Resultate wys dat sodanige pretreëning betekeurig die model verbeter, wat na akkurasies gemeenskap het tot die beste metodes op ses benchmarke.", 'tr': 'Nural söz segmentasiýasynyň barlamasy uly ölçek setir metinlerden üçin ullanýar Diňe bir durumda, statistik segmentasyon araştyrmalary daşaryk maglumatyň baýramçylygy ýaly punctuasy, awtomatik segmentasy we POS-i ulanyp ýüze çykdy. Munuň modul segmentasyon modelini gurarak, we bagy daşaryk çeşmelerden ullanýan iň möhüm submodulini terjime edip ýüze çykdy. Netijenler şol ýakyn çykyş nusgasyny örän gowy görkezip ýöredip, alty benchmarklardaki iň gowy yönlere çevrilýändigini görkez.', 'sq': 'Kërkimi i segmentimit të fjalëve nervore ka përfituar nga tekstet e mëdha të papërpunuara duke i përdorur ato për parastërvitjen e karakterit dhe përfshirjen e fjalëve. On the other hand, statistical segmentation research has exploited richer sources of external information, such as punctuation, automatic segmentation and POS. We investigate the effectiveness of a range of external training sources for neural word segmentation by building a modular segmentation model, pretraining the most important submodule using rich external sources.  Rezultatet tregojnë se një parastërvitje e tillë përmirëson ndjeshëm modelin, duke çuar në saktësi konkurruese me metodat më të mira në gjashtë pika referuese.', 'az': 'Nöral söz segmentasiya araştırması böyük ölçüdə çizgi mətnlərdən faydalanır ki, onları rəsmi və söz inşalları üçün dəyişdirər. Digər tərəfindən, Statistik segmentasyon araştırmaları daşınmış məlumatların daha zengin mənbələrini istifadə etdi, çünki punktular, avtomatik segmentasyon və POS kimi. Biz modular segmentasyon modelini inşa edərək, çox möhüm submodulu daşınmış mənbələrindən istifadə edirik. Sonuçlar göstərir ki, böyük təmizlənmə modelini çox yaxşılaşdırır, altı benchmarklardaki ən yaxşı metodların müqayisədə müqayisədə düşmənçilik göstərir.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային բառերի սեգմետրացիայի հետազոտությունը օգտագործել է մեծ մասշտաբով պարզ տեքստերը, օգտագործելով դրանք նախապատրաստ կերպարների և բառերի ներգրավման համար: Մյուս կողմից, վիճակագրական սեգմետրացիայի հետազոտությունները օգտագործել են արտաքին տեղեկատվության ավելի հարուստ աղբյուրներ, ինչպիսիք են կենտրոնացիան, ավտոմատիկ սեգմետրացիան և POS: մենք հետազոտում ենք արտաքին ուսումնասիրության աղբյուրների արդյունավետությունը նյարդային բառերի սեգմետրացիայի համար կառո Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այդպիսի նախավարժությունները նշանակալի բարելավում են մոդելը, ինչը հանգեցնում է ճշգրիտության մրցակցությանը վեց համեմատային նպատակների լավագույն մեթոդներին:', 'bs': 'Istraživanje neuroloških riječi segmentacije koristilo je od velike skale sirovih tekstova, uključujući ih za pretkivanje karaktera i uloženje riječi. S druge strane, istraživanje statističke segmentacije iskoristilo je bogatije izvore vanjskih informacija, poput punkcije, automatske segmentacije i POS-a. Istražujemo učinkovitost niza vanjskih izvora obuke za segmentaciju neuroloških riječi, izgradjući modularni model segmentacije, pretvarajući najvažniji podmodul koristeći bogate vanjske izvore. Rezultati pokazuju da takva pretkivanja značajno poboljšava model, što vodi do tačnosti konkurentne na najbolje metode na šest kriterija.', 'ca': "La recerca de la segmentació neuronal de paraules ha beneficiat de textos bruts a gran escala utilitzant-los per pré-treinar caràcter i integració de paraules. D'altra banda, la recerca de segmentació estadística ha explotat fonts més rics d'informació externa, com la puntuació, la segmentació automàtica i la POS. Investiguem l'eficacia d'una gamma de fonts externes de capacitació per la segmentació de paraules neurals construint un model de segmentació modular, pré-formant el submodule més important utilitzant fonts externes rics. Els resultats demostren que aquesta pré-capacitació millora significativament el model, portant a exactitudes competitives als millors mètodes en sis punts de referència.", 'cs': 'Výzkum segmentace neuronálních slov využil rozsáhlých surových textů tím, že je využil pro předškolení znaků a vložení slov. Na druhou stranu statistický segmentační výzkum využil bohatších zdrojů externích informací, jako jsou interpunkce, automatická segmentace a POS. Zkoumáme efektivitu řady externích zdrojů tréninku pro segmentaci nervových slov vytvořením modulárního segmentačního modelu, předškolením nejdůležitějších submodulů s využitím bohatých externích zdrojů. Výsledky ukazují, že takové předtrénování výrazně zlepšuje model, což vede k přesnosti konkurenceschopné nejlepším metodám na šesti benchmarkech.', 'et': 'Neuraalse sõna segmenteerimise uuringud on saanud kasu suuremahulistest toortekstidest, kasutades neid märgi- ja sõnade manustamise eelõpetamiseks. Teisest küljest on statistilised segmenteerimise uuringud kasutanud rikkalikumaid välisteabeallikaid, nagu vahemärgid, automaatne segmenteerimine ja POS. Uurime erinevate väliste koolitusallikate efektiivsust närvisõnade segmenteerimiseks, luues modulaarse segmenteerimismudeli, eeltreenides kõige olulisemat alammoodulit rikkalike välisallikate abil. Tulemused näitavad, et selline eelõpetamine parandab mudelit märkimisväärselt, viies täpsuseni, mis konkureerib parimate meetoditega kuuel võrdlusalusel.', 'am': 'የነዌብ ቃላት ግንኙነት ትምህርት ከትልቁ ነጥብ ጽሑፎች ለዝግጅት እና ለቃላት አካባቢ በመስጠት ጠቅሟቸዋል፡፡ በሌላው ክፍል፣ የstatistical segmentation ምርጫዎች የውጭው መረጃዎች፣ ጉዳይ፣ አውቶማቲካዊ ግንኙነት እና POS በመስጠት ተጠቃሚ ነው። የውጭው ተማሪ ምንጮች የውጭው ተማርኮት ክፍተቶችን ለመጠየቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶች እንደዚህ ዓይነት ዝናብ በሞዴል በጣም ያበዛል፣ እርግጠኞቹን በስድስት ወርክሮች ላይ የሚሻለውን ልማድ ይጨምሩታል፡፡', 'bn': 'নিউরেল শব্দ বিভক্তির গবেষণা বিশাল স্ক্যালের ভালো লেখা থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করেছে তাদের পাঠানোর জন্য। অন্যদিকে, পরিসংখ্যান বিভাগ গবেষণা বাইরের তথ্যের সমৃদ্ধ সূত্র ব্যবহার করেছে, যেমন ধারাবাহিক, স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের সূত্র এবং পোস্টের বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের কার্যকলাপ আমরা তদন্ত করছি একটি মডোলুল বিভি ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই ধরনের বৃষ্টিপাতের মডেলের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি করে, যার ফলে তারা ছয় বেনম্যার্কের সেরা পদ্ধতিতে প্রত', 'fi': 'Neurosanasegmentointitutkimus on hyötynyt laajamittaisesta raakatekstistä hyödyntämällä niitä hahmo- ja sanaupotusten esikoulutukseen. Toisaalta tilastollisessa segmentointitutkimuksessa on hyödynnetty monipuolisempia ulkoisia tietolähteitä, kuten välimerkkejä, automaattista segmentointia ja POS. Tutkimme erilaisten ulkoisten koulutuslähteiden tehokkuutta neurosanasegmentoinnissa rakentamalla modulaarisen segmentointimallin, esikouluttamalla tärkeimmän alimoduulin rikkaiden ulkoisten lähteiden avulla. Tulokset osoittavat, että tällainen esikoulutus parantaa merkittävästi mallia, mikä johtaa parhaisiin menetelmiin kilpaileviin tarkkuuksiin kuudella vertailuarvolla.', 'jv': 'text-tool-action section Pametuné wong liyane', 'sk': 'Raziskave segmentacije živčnih besed so imele koristi od obsežnih surovih besedil, saj so jih izkoristile za predtreniranje vključevanja znakov in besed. Po drugi strani pa so raziskave statistične segmentacije izkoristile bogatejše vire zunanjih informacij, kot so ločila, avtomatska segmentacija in POS, učinkovitost različnih zunanjih virov usposabljanja za segmentacijo nevronskih besed pa raziskujemo z izdelavo modularnega segmentacijskega modela, pri čemer smo predtrenirali najpomembnejši podmodul z bogatimi zunanjimi viri. Rezultati kažejo, da takšno predusposabljanje bistveno izboljša model, kar vodi do konkurenčnosti najboljših metod na šestih referenčnih vrednostih.', 'he': 'Neural word segmentation research has benefited from large-scale raw texts by leveraging them for pretraining character and word embeddings.  On the other hand, statistical segmentation research has exploited richer sources of external information, such as punctuation, automatic segmentation and POS. We investigate the effectiveness of a range of external training sources for neural word segmentation by building a modular segmentation model, pretraining the most important submodule using rich external sources.  התוצאות מראות שכזו שיפור משמעותי את המודל, מה שמוביל לדיוקים תחרותיים לשיטות הטובות ביותר בשש נקודות.', 'ha': "Research na segment na Neural ya amfani da matsayin mai girma mai raw da za'a transmit su zuwa bakin sarki da maganar da aka fito. Ga da ɗayan, research na fassarar segmentation sun yi amfani da masu ƙari na sourcen bayan information, kamar kunnuwan, yin jinsi farat ɗaya da ake iya karatun mafarata. Tuna ƙidãya masu amfani da wasu sourcen wahalar na bakwai dõmin segmentation wa maganar neural da za'a samar da wata modulun segmentation, na ƙayyade ƙarami masu muhimu da ke amfani da sourcen bakwai. Mataimakin na nuna cewa, misalin shi yana ƙara shi mai girma ga misalin, yana kusa su yi taƙaita zuwa mafi kyaun hanyõyin su kan salon sita.", 'bo': 'Neural word segmentation research has benefited from large-scale raw texts by leveraging them for pretraining character and word embeddings. On the other hand, statistical segmentation research has exploited richer sources of external information, such as punctuation, automatic segmentation and POS. We investigate the effectiveness of a range of external training sources for neural word segmentation by building a modular segmentation model, pretraining the most important submodule using rich external sources. གཟུགས་འབྲས་བ་ནི་བཟོ་མཁན་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་ནི་འགྱུར་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation via Binary Code Prediction', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية عبر توقع الكود الثنائي', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale par prédiction de code binaire', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural via previsão de código binário', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal mediante predicción de código binario', 'ja': 'バイナリコード予測による神経機械翻訳', 'hi': 'बाइनरी कोड भविष्यवाणी के माध्यम से तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'zh': '以二进制代码占神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод через предсказание двоичного кода', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach trí Chóid Dhénártha Prediction', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση μέσω πρόβλεψης δυαδικού κώδικα', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás bináris kód segítségével előrejelzés', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale tramite codice binario Prediction', 'kk': 'Бинарлық код арқылы нейрондық машинаны аудару', 'mk': 'Превод на неврална машина преку предвидување на бинарен код', 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimas dviejų kodų prognoze', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural melalui Prediksi Kod Binari', 'ml': 'രണ്ടാരി കോഡ് മുഖാന്തരം നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mn': 'Бинарийн кодын хэлбэрээр мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулалт', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali permezz ta’ Predizzjoni tal-Kodiċi Binarju', 'no': 'Neuralmaskinsomsetjing gjennom binærkodeoppsetjing', 'pl': 'Neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe za pomocą prognozy kodu binarnego', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală prin predicția codului binar', 'sr': 'Neuralna mašina prevoda preko Binarnog koda', 'si': 'බායිනාරි කෝඩ් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් නිර්මාණ මැෂින් භාවිතය', 'so': 'Turjumista baabuurka ee Neural Masiinka', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning via binär kod förutsägelse', 'ta': 'இருநிலை குறியீடு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'بیناری کوڈ پردیکت کے ذریعے نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch lắp thần kinh qua mã nhị phân', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод чрез предсказване на бинарен код', 'hr': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja preko Binarnog predviđanja koda', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse via binær kode forudsigelse', 'nl': 'Neuronale machinevertaling via binaire code voorspelling', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mittels Binary Code Prediction', 'ko': '2진 코드 예측 기반의 신경 번역', 'id': 'Translation Mesin Neural melalui Prediksi Kode Binar', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی از طریق پیشنهاد کد دویینی', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kijerumani kupitia Utawala wa Sheria ya Binali', 'tr': 'Ikinji köd öňe', 'af': 'Nurale Masjien Vertaling deur Binêre Kode Voorskou', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն երկու կոդի կանխատեսման միջոցով', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinës nervore nëpërmjet parashikimit të kodit binar', 'bs': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja preko Binarnog predviđanja koda', 'bn': 'বাইনারি কোডের মাধ্যমে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'az': '캻kili Kod T톛rcl톛m톛si vasit톛sil톛 n칬ral Makinat T톛rcl톛m톛si', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad prostřednictvím predikce binárního kódu', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge binaarse koodi ennustamise kaudu', 'ca': 'La traducció de la màquina neuronal a través de la predicció del codi binari', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös binäärikoodin ennustuksen avulla', 'jv': 'Ngucap Perintah Njaral kang dipunangkang Binary', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת עצבית באמצעות הקוד השני', 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod prek napovedi binarne kode', 'bo': 'གཉིས་བྱིའི་རྩིས་གཞུང་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་གཞུང་དང་འཁྲུལ་རྩིས་འཁོར་བ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a new method for calculating the output layer in neural machine translation systems. The method is based on predicting a binary code for each word and can reduce computation time / memory requirements of the output layer to be logarithmic in vocabulary size in the best case. In addition, we also introduce two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model : using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes. Experiments on two English-Japanese bidirectional translation tasks show proposed models achieve BLEU scores that approach the softmax, while reducing memory usage to the order of less than 1/10 and improving decoding speed on CPUs by x5 to x10.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث نقترح طريقة جديدة لحساب الطبقة الناتجة في أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية. تعتمد الطريقة على التنبؤ برمز ثنائي لكل كلمة ويمكن أن تقلل متطلبات الوقت / الذاكرة لطبقة المخرجات لتكون لوغاريتميًا في حجم المفردات في أفضل الحالات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم أيضًا طريقتين متقدمتين لتحسين متانة النموذج المقترح: استخدام أكواد تصحيح الأخطاء والجمع بين أكواد softmax والرموز الثنائية. تُظهر التجارب على مهمتي ترجمة ثنائية الاتجاه من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية أن النماذج المقترحة تحقق درجات BLEU التي تقترب من softmax ، مع تقليل استخدام الذاكرة إلى ترتيب أقل من 1/10 وتحسين سرعة فك التشفير على وحدات المعالجة المركزية من x5 إلى x10.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo método para calcular la capa de salida en los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal. El método se basa en predecir un código binario para cada palabra y puede reducir los requisitos de tiempo/memoria de cálculo de la capa de salida para que sean logarítmicos en el tamaño del vocabulario en el mejor de los casos. Además, también presentamos dos enfoques avanzados para mejorar la solidez del modelo propuesto: usar códigos correctores de errores y combinar códigos softmax y binarios. Experimentos en dos tareas de traducción bidireccional inglés-japonés muestran que los modelos propuestos obtienen puntuaciones BLEU que se acercan al softmax, al tiempo que reducen el uso de memoria a menos de 1/10 y mejoran la velocidad de decodificación en las CPU de x5 a x10.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo método para calcular a camada de saída em sistemas de tradução automática neural. O método é baseado na previsão de um código binário para cada palavra e pode reduzir os requisitos de tempo de computação/memória da camada de saída para serem logarítmicos no tamanho do vocabulário no melhor caso. Além disso, também introduzimos duas abordagens avançadas para melhorar a robustez do modelo proposto: usando códigos de correção de erros e combinando códigos softmax e binários. Experimentos em duas tarefas de tradução bidirecional inglês-japonês mostram que os modelos propostos atingem pontuações BLEU que se aproximam do softmax, reduzindo o uso de memória para menos de 1/10 e melhorando a velocidade de decodificação em CPUs de x5 a x10.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de calcul de la couche de sortie dans les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale. Le procédé est basé sur la prédiction d'un code binaire pour chaque mot et peut réduire les exigences de temps de calcul/mémoire de la couche de sortie pour qu'elle soit logarithmique en termes de taille de vocabulaire dans le meilleur des cas. En outre, nous introduisons également deux approches avancées pour améliorer la robustesse du modèle proposé\xa0: l'utilisation de codes correcteurs d'erreurs et la combinaison de codes softmax et binaires. Des expériences sur deux tâches de traduction bidirectionnelle anglais-japonais montrent que les modèles proposés obtiennent des scores BLEU proches du softmax, tout en réduisant l'utilisation de la mémoire à moins de 1/10 et en améliorant la vitesse de décodage sur les processeurs de x5 à x10.", 'ja': '本稿では，ニューラル機械翻訳システムにおける出力層を計算するための新たな手法を提案する．この方法は、各単語のバイナリコードを予測することに基づいており、最良の場合には、語彙サイズにおいて対数となるように出力層の計算時間／メモリ要件を削減することができる。さらに、提案されたモデルの堅牢性を向上させるための2つの高度なアプローチも紹介します。エラーコードの修正とソフトマックスとバイナリコードの組み合わせです。2つの英語と日本語の双方向翻訳タスクの実験では、提案されたモデルは、ソフトマックスに近づくBLEUスコアを達成し、メモリ使用量を1/10未満に削減し、CPUのデコード速度をx 5からx 10に向上させます。', 'zh': '本文中,设一算神经机器翻译系统中输出新法。 其法盖占单词之二进制代码,而输上计时/内存减其词汇大小对数。 又引二高以崇鲁棒性:纠错码合softmax二进制码。 两英语-日语双向译事之实验,则近softmax之BLEU分,损内存使用量不及1/10之数量级,而CPU解码之x5x10。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन सिस्टम में आउटपुट परत की गणना करने के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विधि प्रत्येक शब्द के लिए एक बाइनरी कोड की भविष्यवाणी करने पर आधारित है और आउटपुट परत की गणना समय / स्मृति आवश्यकताओं को कम कर सकती है ताकि सबसे अच्छे मामले में शब्दावली के आकार में लॉगरिदमिक किया जा सके। इसके अलावा, हम प्रस्तावित मॉडल की मजबूती में सुधार करने के लिए दो उन्नत दृष्टिकोण भी पेश करते हैं: त्रुटि-सुधार कोड का उपयोग करना और सॉफ्टमैक्स और बाइनरी कोड का संयोजन करना। दो अंग्रेजी-जापानी द्विदिश अनुवाद कार्यों पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल BLEU स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं जो सॉफ्टमैक्स तक पहुंचते हैं, जबकि 1/10 से कम के क्रम में स्मृति उपयोग को कम करते हैं और सीपीयू पर x5 से x10 तक डिकोडिंग गति में सुधार करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В данной работе предложен новый метод расчета выходного слоя в системах нейронного машинного перевода. Способ основан на прогнозировании двоичного кода для каждого слова и может уменьшить требования к времени вычисления/памяти выходного слоя, чтобы быть логарифмическим по размеру словаря в лучшем случае. Кроме того, мы также вводим два передовых подхода к повышению надежности предлагаемой модели: использование кодов коррекции ошибок и объединение softmax и двоичных кодов. Эксперименты над двумя англо-японскими двунаправленными задачами перевода показывают, что предлагаемые модели достигают баллов BLEU, которые приближаются к softmax, при этом снижая использование памяти до порядка менее 1/10 и улучшая скорость декодирования на ЦП от x5 до x10.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh nua chun an ciseal aschuir i gcórais néaraistriúcháin meaisín a ríomh. Tá an modh bunaithe ar chóid dhénártha a thuar do gach focal agus féadann sé am ríomhaireacht/riachtanais chuimhne na ciseal aschuir a laghdú go logartamach i méid stór focal sa chás is fearr. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid isteach freisin dhá chur chuige chun cinn chun feabhas a chur ar stóinseacht na samhla atá beartaithe: úsáid a bhaint as cóid a cheartú earráidí agus le chéile softmax agus cóid dénártha. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar dhá thasc aistriúcháin déthreoracha Béarla-Seapáinis go mbaineann samhlacha molta scóir BLEU amach a théann i dtreo an softmax, agus ag an am céanna laghdaítear úsáid na cuimhne go dtí ord níos lú ná 1/10 agus feabhsaítear luas díchódaithe ar LAPanna de x5 go x10.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების სისტემებში ახალგაზრდებული მეტი. პროცემი ყოველ სიტყვის ბინარიური კოდის განსაზღვრებაზე დაბაზიან და შეუძლია გამოყენება სიტყვის სიტყვის ლოდარიტური სიტყვის სიტყვის განსაზღვრების დროს/მეხსიერის მოსაზღვრებ დამატებით, ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ ორი წინასწარმოდგენებული მოდელის ძალადობას: შეცდომის კოდეების გამოყენება და softmax და binary კოდეების შეერთება. ორი ინგლისურ-იაპონური მედირექციონალური დაწყვეტილების გამოცდილებები ჩვენებენ მოდელები, რომლებიც BLEU წერტილების მიღებენ, რომლებიც მიღებენ softmax წერტილების მიღებენ, რომლებიც მეხსიერების გამოყენება 1/10 წერტი', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új módszert javasolunk a neurális gépi fordító rendszerek kimeneti rétegének kiszámítására. A módszer minden szó bináris kódjának előrejelzésén alapul, és a kimeneti réteg számítási idő/memória követelményeit a legjobb esetben logaritmikus szókincs méretű legyen. Emellett két fejlett megközelítést is bevezetünk a javasolt modell robusztusságának javítására: hibajavító kódok használata, softmax és bináris kódok kombinálása. Két angol-japán kétirányú fordítási feladaton végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modellek olyan BLEU pontszámokat érnek el, amelyek megközelítik a softmax-ot, miközben a memóriahasználatot 1/10-nél kisebbre csökkentik, és a processzorok dekódolási sebességét x5-x10-re javítják.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο υπολογισμού του στρώματος εξόδου σε νευρωνικά συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Η μέθοδος βασίζεται στην πρόβλεψη ενός δυαδικού κώδικα για κάθε λέξη και μπορεί να μειώσει τις απαιτήσεις χρόνου υπολογισμού/μνήμης του στρώματος εξόδου ώστε να είναι λογαριθμικό σε μέγεθος λεξιλογίου στην καλύτερη περίπτωση. Επιπλέον, εισάγουμε επίσης δύο προηγμένες προσεγγίσεις για τη βελτίωση της ανθεκτικότητας του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου: τη χρήση κωδικών διόρθωσης σφαλμάτων και τον συνδυασμό κωδικών και δυαδικών κωδικών. Τα πειράματα σε δύο αγγλο-ιαπωνικές εργασίες αμφίδρομης μετάφρασης δείχνουν ότι τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα επιτυγχάνουν βαθμολογίες που πλησιάζουν το Softmax, μειώνοντας παράλληλα τη χρήση μνήμης στη σειρά μικρότερης από 1/10 και βελτιώνοντας την ταχύτητα αποκωδικοποίησης σε επεξεργαστές από x5 έως x10.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo per calcolare il livello di output nei sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale. Il metodo si basa sulla previsione di un codice binario per ogni parola e può ridurre i requisiti di tempo di calcolo / memoria del livello di output per essere logaritmico nelle dimensioni del vocabolario nel migliore dei casi. Inoltre, introduciamo due approcci avanzati per migliorare la robustezza del modello proposto: utilizzare codici di correzione degli errori e combinare codici softmax e binari. Esperimenti su due attività di traduzione bidirezionale inglese-giapponese mostrano che i modelli proposti raggiungono punteggi BLEU che si avvicinano al softmax, riducendo al contempo l'utilizzo della memoria all'ordine inferiore a 1/10 e migliorando la velocità di decodifica sulle CPU da x5 a x10.", 'mk': 'Во оваа хартија, предлагаме нов метод за пресметување на слојот на излез во системите за превод на невралните машини. Методот се базира на предвидување на бинарен код за секој збор и може да ги намали потребите од времето/меморија на пресметувањето на слојот за излез за да биде логаритмичен во големината на речникот во најдобар случај. In addition, we also introduce two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model: using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes.  Експериментите на две англиско-јапонски двојно преведувачки задачи покажуваат дека предложените модели постигнуваат оценки БЛЕУ кои се приближуваат до софтмаксот, додека ја намалуваат употребата на меморијата на редот помалку од 1/10 и ја подобруваат брзината на декодирање на процесорите за x5', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, невралдық компьютердің аудару жүйелерінде шығыс қабатты есептеу үшін жаңа әдісін таңдаймыз. Әрбір сөз үшін бинарлық кодын алдын- ала көрсетуге негізделген және шығыс қабаттың есептеу уақыты/жады талаптарын лагарифмді сөздік өлшемінен ең жақсы жағдайда төмендетуге болады. Қосымша, келтірілген үлгісінің қатты түзету кодтарын қолданып, бағдарламалық мен бинарлық кодтарды біріктіру үшін екі жақсы арқылы келтіреміз. Екі ағылшын- жапон жұмыс аудармалардың екі тәжірибесін көрсету үлгілерін көрсету үлгілерінде бағдарламалық көмегімен жады пайдалануын 1/10 дегеннен кем ретіне азайту және процессорларды x5 дегенге x10 дегенге декодтау жылдам', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naują išėjimo sluoksnio skaičiavimo būdą nervinių mašin ų vertimo sistemose. Metodas grindžiamas kiekvieno žodžio dvigubo kodo prognozavimu ir gali sumažinti išėjimo sluoksnio skaičiavimo laiko ir (arba) atminties reikalavimus, kad geriausiu atveju žodyno dydis būtų logaritminis. Be to, įvedame du pažangius metodus siūlomo modelio patikimumui gerinti: klaidų koregavimo kodus ir softmax ir dviejų kodų derinimą. Dviejų anglų ir Japonijos dvikrypčių vertimo užduočių eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomi modeliai pasiekia BLEU rezultatus, kurie artėja prie softmax, tuo pat metu sumažina atminties naudojimą iki mažesnės nei 1/10 tvarkos ir didina CPU dekodizavimo greitį x5–x10.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk mengira lapisan output dalam sistem terjemahan mesin saraf. Kaedah ini berdasarkan meramalkan kod binari bagi setiap perkataan dan boleh mengurangkan keperluan masa/memori perhitungan lapisan output untuk logaritmi dalam saiz vokbulari dalam kes terbaik. In addition, we also introduce two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model: using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes.  Eksperimen pada dua tugas terjemahan bidireksi bahasa Inggeris-Jepun menunjukkan model yang diusulkan mencapai skor BLEU yang mendekati teks lunak, sementara mengurangkan penggunaan memori ke tertib kurang dari 1/10 dan meningkatkan kelajuan penyahkodan pada CPU dengan x5 hingga x10.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷണസിസ്റ്റത്തിലുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള അടുത്ത് കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പുതിയ ഓരോ വാക്കിനും ഒരു ബൈനരി കോഡ് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന് ഈ രീതി അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ലോഗാരിതിമിക്കിനുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള കണക്ക്  കൂടാതെ, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ വസ്ത്രം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള രണ്ട് മുന്\u200dഗണന സാധ്യതകളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു;  രണ്ടു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ജപ്പാനീസ് ബിഡിയര്\u200dട്ടിക്കല്\u200d പരിശോധനങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d സോഫ്റ്റ്മാക്സിലേക്ക് എത്തുന്നു. മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗം 1/', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-kalkolu tas-saff ta’ ħruġ fis-sistemi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. The method is based on predicting a binary code for each word and can reduce computation time/memory requirements of the output layer to be logarithmic in vocabulary size in the best case.  Barra minn hekk, aħna nintroduċu wkoll żewġ approċċi avvanzati biex itejbu r-robustezza tal-mudell propost: l-użu ta’ kodiċijiet ta’ korrezzjoni tal-iżbalji u l-kombinazzjoni ta’ kodiċijiet softmax u binarji. L-esperimenti fuq żewġ kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni bidirezzjonali Ingliż-Ġappuniż juru li l-mudelli proposti jiksbu punteġġi BLEU li jmissu mal-softmax, filwaqt li jnaqqsu l-użu tal-memorja għall-ordni ta’ inqas minn 1/10 u jtejbu l-veloċità tad-dekodifikazzjoni fuq is-CPUs b’x5 sa x10.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах системд гаргах давхарыг тооцох шинэ арга санал өгдөг. Энэ арга нь үг бүрт хоёр давхар кодыг таамаглах болон гарах давхарын тооцооллын цаг/санах хэрэгцээг хамгийн сайн тооцооллын хэмжээнд логарифмыг багасгаж болно. Мөн бид санал өгсөн загварын хүчтэй байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд хоёр давхар арга зам илэрхийлж байна: алдаа загварын загварын кодыг ашиглаж, сайхан макс болон хоёр давхар кодыг нэгтгэх хэрэгтэй. Хоёр Англи-Японы хоёр дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал хийх үйлдлийн дасгал загваруудын талаар илэрхийлэгдсэн загваруудын талаар багасгал хөгжлийн хэмжээсүүд нь багасга', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny metode for å rekna ut laget i neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystemet. Metoden er basert på å foregå ein binærkode for kvar ord, og kan redusera rekningstid/minne på utdatalaget for å vera logaritmisk i ordstorleiken i beste tilfelle. I tillegg introduserer vi også to avanserte tilnærmingar for å forbedra robustverken av den foreslåtte modellen: med feilkorrigeringskodar og kombinerer softmax- og binærkodar. Eksperimentar på to engelsk-japanske bidireksjonale omsetjingsprogrammer viser foreslått modeller å nærme BLEU-poeng som nærmer softmax, mens du reduserer minnebruk til rekkefølgja med mindre enn 1/10 og forbedrar dekodingsfart på CPU med x5 til x10.', 'pl': 'W artykule proponujemy nową metodę obliczania warstwy wyjściowej w neuronowych systemach tłumaczenia maszynowego. Metoda ta opiera się na przewidywaniu kodu binarnego dla każdego słowa i może w najlepszym przypadku skrócić czas obliczeń/wymagania pamięci warstwy wyjściowej, aby była logarytmiczna w rozmiarze słownictwa. Ponadto wprowadzamy dwa zaawansowane podejścia do poprawy solidności proponowanego modelu: wykorzystanie kodów korygujących błędy oraz łączenie kodów softmax i binarnych. Eksperymenty na dwóch angielsko-japońskich dwukierunkowych zadaniach tłumaczenia pokazują, że proponowane modele osiągają wyniki BLEU, które zbliżają się do softmaksu, przy jednoczesnym zmniejszeniu zużycia pamięci do kolejności mniejszej niż 1/10 oraz poprawie szybkości dekodowania procesorów o x5 do x10.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o nouă metodă de calcul a stratului de ieșire în sistemele neuronale de traducere automată. Metoda se bazează pe predicția unui cod binar pentru fiecare cuvânt și poate reduce cerințele de timp de calcul / memorie ale stratului de ieșire pentru a fi logaritmic în dimensiunea vocabularului în cel mai bun caz. În plus, introducem și două abordări avansate pentru a îmbunătăți robustețea modelului propus: utilizarea codurilor de corectare a erorilor și combinarea codurilor softmax și binare. Experimentele efectuate pe două sarcini de traducere bidirecțională engleză-japoneză arată că modelele propuse obțin scoruri BLEU care se apropie de softmax, reducând în același timp utilizarea memoriei la ordinea mai mică de 1/10 și îmbunătățind viteza de decodare pe procesoare cu x5 până la x10.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za raèunanje sloja izlaska u sistemima prevoda neuralnih mašin a. Metod je baziran na predviđanju binarnog koda za svaku reč i može smanjiti potrebe za računovođenje vremena/pamćenje sloja izlaza da bude logaritmiski u veličini rečnika u najboljem slučaju. Osim toga, predstavljamo i dve napredne pristupe kako bi poboljšali robotu predloženog modela: korištenje kodova za korištenje grešaka i kombinaciju softmax i binarnih kodova. Eksperimenti o dva zadatka za prevod engleskog-japanskog područja pokazuju da predloženi modeli postignu BLEU rezultate koji se približavaju softmaxu, dok smanjuju korištenje pamćenja na redak manje od 1/10 i poboljšavaju brzinu dekodiranja na CPU sa x5 do x10.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරයෝජන විධානය හැම වචනයට බායිනාරි කෝඩ් විශ්වාස කරන්න අධිරූපයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම පරිගණ කාලය/මතකය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් හ ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ජාපානිය බිඩිරෙක්ෂන් වාර්තාවක් දෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට BLUE ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ලඟි', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qaab cusub oo aan xisaabinno qalabka soo baxa nidaamka turjumidda maskaxda neurada. The method is based on predicting a binary code for each word and can reduce computation time/memory requirements of the output layer to be logarithmic in vocabulary size in the best case.  Intaas waxaa dheer oo aan soo bandhignaa laba qalab oo horumarinta ah si aan u hagaajino qalabka modelka la soo jeeday: isticmaalno kooxaha hagaajinta qaladka iyo isku daryeelashada sumadda labaad. Imtixaanka ku qoran labada shaqada turjumaadda ee Ingiriis-Japanese bideerctional turjumaadda waxaa ka muuqda tusaalooyin la soo jeeday inay gaadhaan kooxda BLEU oo u soo dhowaadaya softmax, iyadoo ay hoos u dhigi karto isticmaalka xusuusta si ka yar 1/10 iyo horumarinta deynta CPUs by x5-x10.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نیورل ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم میں آوٹ لائر کا شمار کرنے کے لئے ایک نوی طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں۔ یہ طریقہ ہر لفظ کے لئے ایک بیناری کوڈ کی پیش بینی پر بنیاد ہے اور اپوٹ لائر کی کمپیوٹ ٹیمٹ/میمور کی نیاز کی کم کر سکتا ہے کہ وکل سائز میں لوگریٹمیک ہو۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم نے دو پیش آئی طریقے پیش آئے ہیں کہ پیش آئے ہوئے موڈل کی مضبوطی سے زیادہ اضافہ کریں: error-correcting codes اور softmax and binary codes کو ترکیب کریں. دو انگلیسی-ژاپنی دوسری ترجمہ تاسکیوں پر آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل بلیوس اسکو پہنچ رہے ہیں جو نرم مکس کے پاس آتے ہیں، اور ذکر استعمال کو 1/10 سے کم کم کر رہے ہیں اور CPUs پر چڑھنے کی سرعت x5 سے x10 کے ذریعہ مزید کر رہے ہیں.', 'ta': 'In this paper, we propose a new method for calculating the output layer in neural machine translation systems.  இந்த முறைமை ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தைக்கும் இருமுறை குறியீட்டை முன்னோடிக்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது மற்றும் வெளியீட்டு அடுக்கு கணக்கிட நேரம்/நி மேலும், நாம் முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட இரண்டு முன்னேற்பட்ட முறைமைகளையும் முன்னேற்ற முறைமைகளையும் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மாதிரியான மாதி இரண்டு ஆங்கிலத்தில்- ஜப்பானிய மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளில் சோதனைகள் பிலியு மதிப்பெண்களை பெறுகிறது அது மென்பெரியத்திற்கு நெருக்கமாக இருக்கும், ஆனால் நினைவு பயன்பாட்ட', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats f철resl책r vi en ny metod f철r att ber채kna utg책ngslaget i neurala maskin철vers채ttningssystem. Metoden bygger p책 att f철ruts채ga en bin채r kod f철r varje ord och kan i b채sta fall minska ber채kningstid/minneskrav f철r utdatalagret f철r att vara logaritmisk i vokabul채rstorlek. Dessutom introducerar vi tv책 avancerade tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r att f철rb채ttra robustheten hos den f철reslagna modellen: att anv채nda felkorrigerande koder och kombinera softmax och bin채ra koder. Experiment p책 tv책 engelsk-japanska dubbelriktade 철vers채ttningsuppgifter visar att f철reslagna modeller uppn책r BLEU-po채ng som n채rmar sig softmax, samtidigt som minnesanv채ndningen minskas till mindre 채n 1/10 och avkodningshastigheten p책 processorer f철rb채ttras med x5 till x10.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz neyrol mashinaning tarjima tizimida chiqarish tugmasini hisoblash uchun yangi usulni boshqaramiz. Uskuna har bir so'z uchun ikki marta kodi kutilmagan asosida, va maxsus holatda logarifmik boʻlishi uchun tugmalar tarkibini hisoblash vaqt/xotiradan kamaytirish mumkin. Qo'shimcha, biz quyidagi modelning o'zgarishni oshirish uchun ikkita darajada o'zgarishni anglatamiz: xato kodlash qoidalarini ishlatish va softmax va binar kodlarini birlashtiramiz. Ikkita ingliz- japoncha tarjima vazifalarining taʼminlovlari bilan ilova qilingan modellar soʻzni yuklashni koʻrsatiladi. Bu soʻzni maksimal qilish uchun BLEU qiymatlari imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi, va xotira foydalanishni 1/10 tartibiga kamaytirish va x5 dan x10 orqali CPUs'ning tezligini oshirish.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để tính toán lớp xuất trong hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh. Phương pháp này dựa trên việc dự đoán một mã nhị phân cho mỗi từ và có thể giảm yêu cầu tính thời gian/trí nhớ của lớp xuất để theo logaritic trong kích thước từ. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi cũng áp dụng hai phương pháp tiên tiến để nâng cao độ bền của mô hình đề xuất: sử dụng mã sửa lỗi và kết hợp mật mã kim loại mềm và nhị phân. Thí nghiệm trên hai công việc dịch chuyển hai người Anh-Nhật cho thấy các mẫu đề xuất đạt được điểm của NIZ đang tiếp cận với Max, đồng thời giảm lượng sử dụng bộ nhớ theo thứ tự dưới 1/10 và tăng tốc độ giải mã trên CPU của x5 tới x10.', 'da': "I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny metode til beregning af outputlaget i neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer. Metoden er baseret på at forudsige en binær kode for hvert ord og kan reducere beregningstid / hukommelse krav for outputlaget til at være logaritmisk i ordforråd størrelse i bedste tilfælde. Derudover introducerer vi også to avancerede tilgange til at forbedre robustheden af den foreslåede model: brug af fejlkorrigerende koder og kombinering af softmax og binære koder. Eksperimenter med to engelsk-japanske tovejsede oversættelsesopgaver viser, at foreslåede modeller opnår BLEU-scorer, der nærmer sig softmax, samtidig med at hukommelsesforbruget reduceres til størrelsesordenen på mindre end 1/10 og afkodningshastigheden på CPU'er forbedres med x5 til x10.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за изчисляване на изходния слой в невронни системи за машинен превод. Методът се основава на предсказване на двоичен код за всяка дума и може да намали изчислителните изисквания за време/памет на изходния слой, за да бъде логаритмичен в размера на речника в най-добрия случай. В допълнение, въвеждаме и два усъвършенствани подхода за подобряване на здравината на предлагания модел: използване на кодове за коригиране на грешки и комбиниране на софтмакс и бинарни кодове. Експерименти с две англо-японски двупосочни преводни задачи показват, че предложените модели постигат резултати, които доближават софтмакса, като същевременно намаляват използването на памет до порядъка на по-малко от 1/10 и подобряват скоростта на декодиране на процесорите с х5 до х10.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe methode voor voor het berekenen van de outputlaag in neurale machine translation systemen. De methode is gebaseerd op het voorspellen van een binaire code voor elk woord en kan de berekeningstijd/geheugenvereisten van de uitvoerlaag verminderen om in het beste geval logaritmisch in woordenschat te zijn. Daarnaast introduceren we ook twee geavanceerde benaderingen om de robuustheid van het voorgestelde model te verbeteren: het gebruik van foutcorrigerende codes en het combineren van softmax en binaire codes. Experimenten met twee Engels-Japanse bidirectionele vertaaltaken tonen aan dat voorgestelde modellen BLEU-scores behalen die de softmax benaderen, terwijl het geheugengebruik wordt teruggebracht tot de volgorde van minder dan 1/10 en de decoderingssnelheid op CPU's wordt verbeterd met x5 tot x10.", 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neue Methode zur Berechnung der Ausgangsschicht in neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungssystemen vor. Die Methode basiert auf der Vorhersage eines Binärcodes für jedes Wort und kann den Rechenzeit-/Speicherbedarf der Ausgabeschicht im besten Fall auf logarithmische Vokabelgröße reduzieren. Darüber hinaus stellen wir zwei fortschrittliche Ansätze vor, um die Robustheit des vorgeschlagenen Modells zu verbessern: die Verwendung von Fehlerkorrekturcodes und die Kombination von Softmax- und Binärcodes. Experimente an zwei englisch-japanischen bidirektionalen Übersetzungsaufgaben zeigen, dass vorgeschlagene Modelle BLEU-Werte erzielen, die sich dem softmax nähern, während der Speicherverbrauch auf weniger als 1/10 reduziert wird und die Decodiergeschwindigkeit auf CPUs um x5 bis x10 verbessert wird.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu proračunanja sloja izlaza u sustavima prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Metod se temelji na predviđanju binarnog koda za svaku riječ i može smanjiti zahtjeve za računovođenje vremena/sjećanje sloja izlaza da bude logaritmiski u veličini riječnika u najboljem slučaju. Osim toga, predstavljamo i dvije napredne pristupe kako bi poboljšali robotu predloženog modela: korištenje kodova za korištenje grešaka i kombinaciju softmax i binarnih kodova. Eksperimenti o dva zadatka prijenosnog prevoda engleskog-japanskog jezika pokazuju da su predloženi modeli postigli rezultate BLEU-a koji se približavaju softmaxu, dok smanjuju korištenje pamćenja na redak manje od 1/10 i poboljšavaju brzinu dekodiranja na CPU-ovim s x5 do x10.', 'ko': '본고는 신경기계 번역 시스템의 출력층을 계산하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 모든 단어를 예측하는 2진 코드를 바탕으로 출력층의 계산 시간/메모리 수요를 줄일 수 있으며, 최적 상황에서 출력층의 어휘량은 대수이다.그 밖에 우리는 두 가지 선진적인 방법을 소개하여 이 모델의 노봉성을 향상시켰다. 바로 오류 코드를 사용하고softmax와 2진 코드를 결합하는 것이다.두 개의 영일 양방향 번역 임무에서의 실험에 따르면 제시된 모델은 소프트맥스에 가까운 BLEU 점수를 실현했고 메모리 사용량을 1/10 이하로 줄였으며 CPU의 디코딩 속도를 x5에서 x10으로 높였다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk menghitung lapisan output dalam sistem terjemahan mesin saraf. Metode ini berdasarkan memprediksi kode binari untuk setiap kata dan dapat mengurangi keperluan kalkulasi waktu/memori dari lapisan keluaran untuk logaritmi dalam ukuran vokbulari dalam kasus terbaik. Selain itu, kami juga memperkenalkan dua pendekatan maju untuk meningkatkan kekuatan model yang diusulkan: menggunakan kode penyesuaian kesalahan dan menggabungkan kode softmax dan binary. Eksperimen pada dua tugas terjemahan bidireksi bahasa Inggris-Jepang menunjukkan model yang diusulkan mencapai skor BLEU yang mendekati softmax, sementara mengurangi penggunaan memori ke perintah kurang dari 1/10 dan meningkatkan kecepatan dekodasi pada CPU dengan x5 hingga x10.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش جدید برای محاسبه لایه خروج در سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی پیشنهاد می کنیم. این روش بر روی پیش\u200cبینی کردن یک کد دویینی برای هر کلمه است و می\u200cتواند زمان محاسبه/حافظه\u200cهای خاطره\u200cای از لایه خروج را کاهش دهد تا در اندازه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی کلمه\u200cهای بهترین مورد لوگریتمیک باشد. در addition, we also introduce two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model: using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes. تجربه\u200cهایی در دو تابع ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی-ژاپن\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدلها پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند امتیاز BLEU را می\u200cرسانند که به نرم\u200cماکس نزدیک می\u200cشوند، در حالی که استفاده از حافظه به سفارش کمتر از ۱/۱۰ کاهش می\u200cکنند و سرعت رمزبندی در CPUs', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, netijeli maşynyň terjime sistemlerinde çikgi düzümlerini hasaplamak üçin täze bir yöntem teklip edýäris. Bu yöntem her söz üçin bir baýnary köd önlemekde dayanýar we çykyş gijesiniň kalkularyň wagtyny/yada etmek islemlerini gowy bir şekilde logaritmik bolup biler. Ayrıca teklif edilen modelinin güçlüğünü geliştirmek için iki gelişmiş yaklaşım tanıştırıyoruz: hata düzeltme kodlarını kullanarak, yumuşatmak ve ikili kodlarını birleştirerek. Iňlisçe-Japonça ikinji terjime etmek zadynyň örän experimentalary görkezýär. Mazmunlar üçin golaýlaşýan nusgalary BLEU अंश gyzyklanýar, 1/10 we CPUlaryň üstünde ýokaryny azaltýar we CPUlaryň hatlaryny x5 we x10 tarapyna ýüzeltýar.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re për llogaritjen e nivelit të daljes në sistemet e përkthimit të makinave nervore. Metoda bazohet në parashikimin e një kodi binar për çdo fjalë dhe mund të reduktojë kërkesat e kohës/kujtesës për llogaritjen e nivelit të daljes për të qenë logaritmik në madhësinë e fjalorit në rastin më të mirë. Përveç kësaj, ne përfaqësojmë gjithashtu dy qasje të avancuara për të përmirësuar fuqinë e modelit të propozuar: përdorimin e kodeve të korrigjimit të gabimeve dhe kombinimin e kodeve softmax dhe binare. Experiments on two English-Japanese bidirectional translation tasks show proposed models achieve BLEU scores that approach the softmax, while reducing memory usage to the order of less than 1/10 and improving decoding speed on CPUs by x5 to x10.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe metode vir bereken van die uitset laag in neurale masjien vertaling stelsels. Die metode is gebaseer op die voorskou van 'n binêre kode vir elke woord en kan reduseer rekenaar tyd/geheue benodigte van die uitset laag om logaritme te wees in woordeboek grootte in die beste geval. In addition, we introduce also two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model: using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes. Eksperimente op twee Engelse-Japanse bidireksjonale vertaling opdragte vertoon voorgestelde modele bereik BLES aantal wat naby die softmax aangaan, terwyl die geheue gebruik verduur tot die volgorde van minder as 1/10 en die dekoding spoed op CPUs met x5 tot x10 verbeter.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya kuhesabu kiwango cha output katika mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo. Utawala huu unategemea kutabiri sheria ya binafsi kwa kila neno na unaweza kupunguza mahitaji ya muda/kumbukumbu ya kiwango cha kuhesabu kinachohitajika kuwa kitaaluma kwa kiwango kikubwa cha lugha. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha mbili za maendeleo ili kuboresha ubora wa muundo wa pendekezo: kwa kutumia kanuni za makosa ya kurekebisha makosa na kuunganisha kanda za mafanikio na mbili. Majaribio kwenye kazi mbili za tafsiri za Kiingereza na Japani zinaonyesha vipindi vilivyopendekezwa kufikia vipindi vya BLEU ambavyo vinakutana na matumizi ya kumbukumbu kwa kiwango cha chini ya 1/10 na kuboresha kiwango cha kupunguza kwa CPU kwa x 5 hadi x10.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የውጤት ደረጃውን በናውሬል መሣሪያው ትርጉም ሲስተካከል አዲስ ደረጃን እናሳስባለን፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ በተጨማሪም፣ የተዘጋጀውን የሞዴል ልብስ ለማሻሻል ሁለትን የበረታች ደረጃዎች እና የስህተት ቀለም በመጠቀም እና የሶፍትኮድ እና የሁለተኛ ኮዶች በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በሁለት እንግሊዘኛ-ጃፓን አዳራሽ ትርጓሜዎችን በሚያሳየው የBLEU scores እንዲያገኙ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, nöral maşın çevirim sistemlərində çıxış sütunu hesablamaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Bu metod hər kəlmə üçün binar kodu təmin etməyə dayanır və ən yaxşı olaraq çıxış sütununun hesablama vaxtı/yaddaş şartlarını logaritmi olaraq düşürür. Biz də təklif edilmiş modelinin güclüyünü daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün iki ileri yol göstəririk: xəta düzəltmə kodlarını və softmax və binar kodlarını birləşdirmək. İki İngilizə-Japonca ilk dəyişikli tərcümə işlərində tədbir edilən modellərin məlumatlarını göstərir ki, yumuşaq max ilə yaxınlaşan BLEU nöqtələrinə yaxınlaşan, hafıza işləməsini 1/10-dən az sıra düşürür və CPUlar üçün x5-x10 ilə kodlama sürətini daha yaxınlaşdırar.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমে আউটপুট স্তর গণনা করার জন্য একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। এই পদ্ধতি প্রত্যেক শব্দের জন্য বাইনারি কোড প্রত্যাখ্যান করার ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক এবং ভাষাভাণ্ডারের আকারে লোগারিথিক্যাকে লোগারিফিক করার এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের পোশাক উন্নত করার জন্য দুটি উন্নত উপায়ের সাথে উপস্থাপন করেছি: ত্রুটি সংশোধন করা কোড ব্যবহার করে সফটম্যাক্স এবং ব দুই ই ইংরেজি-জাপানী বিদ্যমান অনুবাদের কাজে পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বিলিউ স্কোর অর্জন করে যা সফটম্যাক্সের কাছে পৌঁছে যায়, আর স্মৃতির ব্যবহার কমে ১/', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերի արտադրյալ շերտի հաշվարկելու համար: Մեթոդը հիմնված է յուրաքանչյուր բառի երկու կոդի կանխատեսման վրա և կարող է նվազեցնել արտադրյալ շերտի հաշվարկման ժամանակի և հիշողության պահանջները, որպեսզի լավագույն դեպքում բառարանի չափսի մեջ լոգարիթմիկ լինեն: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նաև երկու զարգացած մոտեցում, որպեսզի բարելավենք առաջարկած մոդելի ուժեղությունը. սխալների ուղղությամբ Experiments on two English-Japanese bidirectional translation tasks show proposed models achieve BLEU scores that approach the softmax, while reducing memory usage to the order of less than 1/10 and improving decoding speed on CPUs by x5 to x10.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu proračunanja sloja izlaza u sustavima prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Metod se temelji na predviđanju binarnog koda za svaku riječ i može smanjiti potrebe za računovođenje vremena/sjećanje sloja izlaza da bude logaritmiski u veličini rečnika u najboljem slučaju. Osim toga, predstavljamo i dvije napredne pristupe kako bi poboljšali robotu predloženog modela: korištenje kodova za korištenje grešaka i kombinaciju softmax i binarnih kodova. Eksperimenti o dva zadatka za prevod engleskog i japanskog jezika pokazuju da predloženi modeli postignu rezultate BLEU-a koji se približavaju softmaxu, dok smanjuju korištenje pamćenja u redak manje od 1/10 i poboljšavaju brzinu dekodiranja na CPU sa x5 do x10.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem un nou mètode per calcular la capa de sortida dels sistemes de traducció neural de màquines. El mètode es basa en predir un codi binari per cada paraula i pot reduir els requisits de temps/memòria de calcul de la capa de sortida per ser logarítmica en la mida del vocabulari en el millor cas. A més, també introduïm dos enfocaments avançats per millorar la robustet del model proposat: utilitzar codis de correcció d'errors i combinar codis softmax i binaris. Els experiments de dues tasques de traducció bidireccional anglès-japonès mostran que els models proposats aconsegueixen puntuacions BLEU que aborden el softmax, mentre redueixen l'ús de la memòria a un ordre de menys de 1/10 i millorant la velocitat de decodificació dels CPU en x5 a x10.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu výpočtu výstupní vrstvy v neuronových strojových překladatelských systémech. Metoda je založena na předpovědi binárního kódu pro každé slovo a může snížit požadavky na výpočet času/paměti výstupní vrstvy na logaritmickou velikost slovní zásoby v nejlepším případě. Kromě toho představujeme dva pokročilé přístupy ke zlepšení robustnosti navrhovaného modelu: použití kódů pro opravu chyb a kombinaci softmax a binárních kódů. Experimenty na dvou anglicko-japonských obousměrných úlohách překladu ukazují, že navrhované modely dosahují BLEU skóre, které se blíží softmaxu, přičemž snižují využití paměti na pořadí menší než 1/10 a zlepšují rychlost dekódování procesorů o x5 až x10.', 'et': 'Kﾃ､esolevas tﾃｶﾃｶs pakume vﾃ､lja uue meetodi vﾃ､ljundkihi arvutamiseks neuromasintﾃｵlkesﾃｼsteemides. Meetod pﾃｵhineb binaarkoodi prognoosimisel iga sﾃｵna kohta ja vﾃｵib vﾃ､hendada vﾃ､ljundikihi arvutusaega/mﾃ､lu nﾃｵudeid sﾃｵnavara suuruses logaritmiliseks. Lisaks tutvustame kavandatud mudeli tugevuse parandamiseks ka kahte tﾃ､iustatud lﾃ､henemisviisi: veaparanduskoodide kasutamine ning softmax- ja binaarkoodide kombineerimine. Kahe inglise-jaapani kahesuunalise tﾃｵlketﾃｶﾃｶga tehtud eksperimendid nﾃ､itavad, et kavandatud mudelid saavutavad BLEU-skoorid, mis lﾃ､henevad softmax-ile, vﾃ､hendades samal ajal mﾃ､lukasutust jﾃ､rjestusele alla 1/10 ja parandades protsessorite dekodeerimiskiirust x5 kuni x10.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta menetelmää lähtökerroksen laskemiseksi neurokonekäännösjärjestelmissä. Menetelmä perustuu binäärikoodin ennustamiseen jokaiselle sanalle ja voi parhaassa tapauksessa vähentää lähtökerroksen laskentaaikaa/muistivaatimuksia sanaston koon logaritmiseksi. Lisäksi esittelemme kaksi kehittynyttä lähestymistapaa ehdotetun mallin kestävyyden parantamiseksi: virheiden korjauskoodien käyttö sekä softmax- ja binaarikoodien yhdistäminen. Kahden englannin ja japanin kaksisuuntaisen käännöstehtävän kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetut mallit saavuttavat BLEU-pisteet, jotka lähestyvät softmax-tasoa, vähentävät muistin käyttöä alle 1/10:een ja parantavat prosessorien dekoodausnopeutta x5–x10.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilit iki, kita supoyo sistem sing bago kanggo kalkulan Layer Utol-sistem nan tarjamahan Metpod wis basa Mungkin Kulanggar kelompok nggo sampeyan Binari. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Gebudhakan langkung sampeyan ingkang-japoni iki dadi tanggal urip nggambar model sing bisa nguasai model sing paling nggawe gerakan nggolok barang blok', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה לחישוב את שכבת ההוצאה במערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות. השיטה מבוססת על חיזוי קוד בינרי לכל מילה, והיא יכולה להפחית את דרישות החישוב של זמן/זיכרון של שכבת ההוצאה כדי להיות לוגריטמית בגודל המילים במקרה הטוב ביותר. בנוסף, אנחנו גם מציגים שני גישות מתקדמות כדי לשפר את החזקה של המודל המוצע: להשתמש בקודים לתקן טעויות ולשילוב קודים סופטמקס ובינריים. ניסויים על שתי משימות התרגום בינוכיות אנגלית-יפנית מראים דוגמנים מציעים להשיג נקודות BLEU שמגיעות למקס הסופט, בעוד להפחית את השימוש בזיכרון לשורה של פחות מ-1/10 ולהשתפר את מהירות הפענוח על CPUs על ידי x5 עד x10.', 'ha': 'Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani hanyoyi na ƙidãya zanen fitarwa cikin tsarin masu fassari na ƙarami. Ana daidaita kan ka ƙayyade wani kodi na biyu wa kowace magana kuma yana iya ƙara da buƙatan lokaci/kumbare na ƙidãyar da jerin fitarwa don ya zama logarithmic cikin girmar maganar da ke cikin haske mafi kyau. Da wannan, za mu ƙayyade hanyõyi biyu masu gaba ga improve tufãfin misãlai wanda aka buƙata: don mu yi amfani da kodi masu daidaita makosa kuma mu haɗa kodi biyu masu kwamfyuta da kodi biyu. Fijaroyi biyu na aikin fassarar aiki biyu na Ingiriya-japane na nuna misãlai da aka yi niyyar su kai matsayin BLEU wanda ke kusantar kwamfyuta, kuma amma sun ƙara amfani da tunãtarwa zuwa ruwan da ke ƙara 1/10 kuma ya kyautata kasodi sauri na CPU da x5 zuwa x10.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo za izračun izhodne plasti v sistemih nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Metoda temelji na napovedovanju binarne kode za vsako besedo in lahko v najboljšem primeru zmanjša zahteve po času izračuna/pomnilniku izhodne plasti, da je logaritmična v velikosti besedišča. Poleg tega uvajamo tudi dva napredna pristopa za izboljšanje robustnosti predlaganega modela: uporabo kod za popravljanje napak ter kombinacijo softmax in binarnih kod. Eksperimenti na dveh angleško-japonskih dvosmernih prevajalskih nalogah kažejo, da predlagani modeli dosegajo rezultate BLEU, ki se približujejo softmax, hkrati pa zmanjšujejo porabo pomnilnika na vrstni red manj kot 1/10 in izboljšajo hitrost dekodiranja na procesorjih za x5 do x10.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་རྩིས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། The method is based on predicting a binary code for each word and can reduce computation time/memory requirements of the output layer to be logarithmic in vocabulary size in the best case. In addition, we also introduce two advanced approaches to improve the robustness of the proposed model: using error-correcting codes and combining softmax and binary codes. Experiments on two English-Japanese bidirectional translation tasks show proposed models achieve BLEU scores that approach the softmax, while reducing memory usage to the order of less than 1/10 and improving decoding speed on CPUs by x5 to x10.'}
{'en': 'Context-Dependent Sentiment Analysis in User-Generated Videos', 'ar': 'تحليل المشاعر المعتمدة على السياق في مقاطع الفيديو التي ينشئها المستخدم', 'pt': 'Análise de sentimento dependente do contexto em vídeos gerados pelo usuário', 'es': 'Análisis de opiniones dependiente del contexto en vídeos generados por usuarios', 'fr': 'Analyse des sentiments en fonction du contexte dans les vid챕os g챕n챕r챕es par les utilisateurs', 'ja': 'ユーザーが作成した動画のコンテキスト依存の感情分析', 'zh': '用户成视频中上下文相关情析', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ता-जनित वीडियो में संदर्भ-निर्भर भावना विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимый анализ настроений в пользовательских видео', 'ga': 'Anailís Mothúchán Comhthéacs-Chleithiúnach i bhFíseáin a Ginte Úsáideoirí', 'hu': 'Kontextusfüggő érzelmek elemzése a felhasználók által létrehozott videókban', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συναισθημάτων ανάλογα με το περιβάλλον σε βίντεο που δημιουργούνται από χρήστες', 'it': 'Analisi del sentimento dipendente dal contesto nei video generati dagli utenti', 'lt': 'Nuo konteksto priklausomo jausmo analizė naudotojų sukurtuose vaizduose', 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылар жасалған видеолордың контексттік- тәуелді Sentiment анализациясы', 'ms': 'Analisi Sentimen Tergantung-Konteks dalam Video Yang Dijana oleh Pengguna', 'mn': 'Контекст-хамааралтай мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээ хэрэглэгчийн бичлэгүүд', 'mk': 'Анализа на чувства зависни од контекст во видео генерирани од корисникот', 'mt': 'Analiżi tas-Sentiment Dipendenti fuq il-Kuntest f’Vidjows Ġenerati mill-Utent', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വീഡിയോകളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ട സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അന്യായം', 'no': 'Kontekstavhengig sendingsanalyse i brukargenererte videoar', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów zależna od kontekstu w filmach generowanych przez użytkownika', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකය සම්පූර්ණ වීඩියෝ වල සම්පූර්ණ- විශේෂ විශේෂණය', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor dependente de context în videoclipurile generate de utilizatori', 'sv': 'Sammanhangsberoende känsloanalys i användargenererade videor', 'sr': 'Kontekst-ovisno analiziranje sentimenta u snimkama Generiranim korisnikom', 'so': 'Fiidiyow-Generated', 'ta': 'பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வீடியோவில் உள்ளமைப்பு சார்ந்த அமர்வு ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Dữ liệu thời gian:', 'bg': 'Контекст-зависим анализ на чувствата в генерирани от потребителите видеоклипове', 'nl': "Contextafhankelijke sentimentanalyse in door gebruikers gegenereerde video's", 'hr': 'Analiza osjećajnog razdoblja na kontekstu u snimkama generiranom korisniku', 'da': 'Kontekstafhængig følelsesanalyse i brugergenererede videoer', 'de': 'Kontextabhängige Stimmungsanalyse in nutzergenerierten Videos', 'id': 'Analisi Sentimen Tergantung Konteks dalam Videos Digenerkan oleh Pengguna', 'ko': '상하문 기반의 사용자 영상 감정 분석', 'fa': 'ویدئو\u200cهای تولید از کاربر', 'sw': 'Anachambua Sentiment in Users-Generated video', 'tr': 'Ullançylar Jeniýetlenmiş Videolarda Kontekst-Mazmunlar Sentiment Taýýarlamasy', 'af': 'Konteks- afhanklike Sentiment Analiseer in Gebruiker- Gegenereerde Videos', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave të varura nga konteksti në video të gjeneruara nga përdoruesit', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Կանտեքստի կախված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը օգտագործողների ստեղծված տեսահոլովակներում', 'az': 'İstifadəçi Ünvan Videolarda Kontext-bağlı Sentiment Analizi', 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারী তৈরি করা ভিডিওতে ব্যবহারকারীর বিভিন্ন সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ', 'cs': 'Kontextově závislá analýza sentimentů v uživatelsky generovaných videích', 'bs': 'Analiza sentimenta zavisnih od konteksta u snimkama Generiranim korisnikom', 'ca': "Anàlisi de sentiments dependents del context en vídeos generats per l'usuari", 'et': 'Kontekstist sõltuv tunnete analüüs kasutaja loodud videotes', 'fi': 'Kontekstistä riippuvainen tunteiden analyysi käyttäjän luomissa videoissa', 'jv': 'Kontext-Deweke Sentiment Sentiment nang Gambar-Geweke Video', 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות תלוי בתקשר בסרטים שנgenerו ע"י השתמש', 'sk': 'Analiza čustva, odvisna od konteksta, v uporabniških videoposnetkih', 'ha': 'Analyze', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་མཐུན་ཡོད་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་ནང་དུ་Context-Dependent Sentiment Analysis'}
{'en': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is a developing area of research, which involves the identification of sentiments in videos. Current research considers utterances as independent entities, i.e., ignores the interdependencies and relations among the utterances of a video. In this paper, we propose a LSTM-based model that enables utterances to capture contextual information from their surroundings in the same video, thus aiding the classification process. Our method shows 5-10 % performance improvement over the state of the art and high robustness to generalizability.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط مجالًا متطورًا للبحث ، والذي يتضمن تحديد المشاعر في مقاطع الفيديو. يعتبر البحث الحالي الكلام ككيانات مستقلة ، أي يتجاهل الترابط والعلاقات بين أقوال الفيديو. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا قائمًا على LSTM يمكّن الكلمات المنطوقة من التقاط المعلومات السياقية من محيطها في نفس الفيديو ، وبالتالي المساعدة في عملية التصنيف. تُظهر طريقتنا تحسنًا في الأداء بنسبة 5-10٪ مقارنة بأحدث التقنيات وقوة عالية لإمكانية التعميم.', 'es': 'El análisis de sentimientos multimodales es un área de investigación en desarrollo, que implica la identificación de sentimientos en los vídeos. La investigación actual considera que los enunciados son entidades independientes, es decir, ignora las interdependencias y las relaciones entre los enunciados de un vídeo. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo basado en LSTM que permite que los enunciados capturen información contextual de su entorno en el mismo video, lo que ayuda al proceso de clasificación. Nuestro método muestra una mejora del rendimiento del 5 al 10% con respecto al estado de la técnica y una gran robustez para la generalización.', 'pt': 'A análise multimodal de sentimentos é uma área de pesquisa em desenvolvimento, que envolve a identificação de sentimentos em vídeos. A pesquisa atual considera os enunciados como entidades independentes, ou seja, ignora as interdependências e relações entre os enunciados de um vídeo. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo baseado em LSTM que permite que enunciados capturem informações contextuais de seu entorno no mesmo vídeo, auxiliando assim no processo de classificação. Nosso método mostra 5-10% de melhoria de desempenho em relação ao estado da arte e alta robustez para generalização.', 'fr': "L'analyse multimodale des sentiments est un domaine de recherche en développement, qui implique l'identification des sentiments dans les vidéos. Les recherches actuelles considèrent les énoncés comme des entités indépendantes, c'est-à-dire qu'ils ignorent les interdépendances et les relations entre les énoncés d'une vidéo. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle basé sur LSTM qui permet aux énoncés de capturer des informations contextuelles de leur environnement dans la même vidéo, facilitant ainsi le processus de classification. Notre méthode présente une amélioration des performances de 5 à 10\xa0% par rapport à l'état de la technique et une grande robustesse à la généralisabilité.", 'ja': 'マルチモーダル・センチメント・アナリティクスは、ビデオにおけるセンチメントの識別に関わる研究の発展分野である。現在の研究では、発話を独立した実体と見なしている。すなわち、ビデオの発話間の相互依存性と関係を無視している。本稿では、発話が周囲からの文脈情報を同一の動画に取り込むことを可能にするLSTMベースのモデルを提案し、分類プロセスを支援する。当社の方法は、最先端技術と比較して5〜10 ％のパフォーマンス向上と、一般化可能性に対する高い堅牢性を示しています。', 'zh': '多模态情析者,治域也,及知视频之情。 今论以语为独立之体,忽视频语之相依赖性也。 于本文中,立一 LSTM 之模,当使言语同视频,于周围环境中得上下文信息,以助分类。 吾道见,方之今术,性增5-10%,而于泛化有高鲁棒性。', 'ru': 'Анализ мультимодальных настроений является развивающейся областью исследований, которая включает в себя идентификацию настроений в видео. Современные исследования рассматривают высказывания как независимые сущности, т.е. игнорируют взаимозависимости и отношения между высказываниями видео. В этой статье мы предлагаем модель на основе LSTM, которая позволяет высказываниям захватывать контекстную информацию из их окружения в том же видео, тем самым помогая процессу классификации. Наш метод демонстрирует улучшение производительности на 5-10% по сравнению с современным уровнем техники и высокую устойчивость к обобщению.', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल भावना विश्लेषण अनुसंधान का एक विकासशील क्षेत्र है, जिसमें वीडियो में भावनाओं की पहचान शामिल है। वर्तमान शोध उच्चारण को स्वतंत्र संस्थाओं के रूप में मानता है, यानी, एक वीडियो के कथनों के बीच परस्पर निर्भरता और संबंधों को अनदेखा करता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक एलएसटीएम-आधारित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो कथनों को एक ही वीडियो में अपने परिवेश से प्रासंगिक जानकारी को कैप्चर करने में सक्षम बनाता है, इस प्रकार वर्गीकरण प्रक्रिया में सहायता करता है। हमारी विधि कला की स्थिति पर 5-10% प्रदर्शन में सुधार दिखाती है और सामान्यता के लिए उच्च मजबूती।', 'ga': 'Réimse taighde atá i mbéal forbartha is ea anailís ilmhódúil ar mheon, a bhaineann le mothúcháin a aithint i bhfíseáin. Breathnaítear i dtaighde reatha ar chainteanna mar eintitis neamhspleácha, i.e., déantar neamhaird de na hidirspleáchais agus den chaidrimh i measc chainteanna físe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla bunaithe ar LSTM a ligeann do chainteanna faisnéis chomhthéacsúil a ghabháil óna dtimpeallacht san fhíseán céanna, rud a chabhraíonn leis an bpróiseas rangaithe. Léiríonn ár modh feabhas feidhmíochta 5-10% thar an úrscothacht agus stóinseacht ard i leith ginearálú.', 'ka': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is a developing area of research, which involves the identification of sentiments in videos. მიმდინარე შესწავლობა იფიქრობს სიტყვები, როგორც განსაზღვრებული ინტერტიები, მაგალითად, ვიდეოს სიტყვების საშუალებაში ინგორიურება. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ LSTM-ის მუშაობის მოდელი, რომელიც შესაძლებელია კონტექსტური ინფორმაციას, რომელიც ერთი ვიდეოში დავწყებთ, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციის პროცესის და ჩვენი მეთოდი აჩვენებს, რომ 5-10% უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'hu': 'A multimodális hangulatelemzés egy fejlődő kutatási terület, amely magában foglalja az érzelmek felismerését a videókban. A jelenlegi kutatások független entitásként tekintik a kijelentéseket, vagyis figyelmen kívül hagyják a videó kijelentései közötti kölcsönös függőségeket és kapcsolatokat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy LSTM alapú modellt javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi a kijelentések számára, hogy ugyanabban a videóban rögzítsék a környezetükből származó kontextuális információkat, segítve ezzel az osztályozási folyamatot. Módszerünk 5-10%-os teljesítményjavulást mutat a korszerű technológiához képest és nagy robusztusságot mutat az általánosíthatósághoz.', 'el': 'Η πολυμοπική ανάλυση συναισθημάτων είναι ένας αναπτυσσόμενος τομέας έρευνας, ο οποίος περιλαμβάνει τον προσδιορισμό συναισθημάτων σε βίντεο. Η τρέχουσα έρευνα θεωρεί τις εκφάνσεις ως ανεξάρτητες οντότητες, δηλαδή αγνοεί τις αλληλεξάρτησεις και τις σχέσεις μεταξύ των εκφάνσεων ενός βίντεο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στο LSTM που επιτρέπει στις εκφάνσεις να συλλάβουν πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος από το περιβάλλον τους στο ίδιο βίντεο, βοηθώντας έτσι τη διαδικασία ταξινόμησης. Η μέθοδος μας δείχνει 5-10% βελτίωση της απόδοσης έναντι της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και υψηλή ανθεκτικότητα στη γενικότητα.', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšių jausmų analizė yra plėtojanti mokslinių tyrimų sritis, apimanti jausmų nustatymą vaizdo įrašuose. Dabartiniai tyrimai laiko i šraiškas nepriklausomais subjektais, t. y. ignoruoja tarpusavio priklausomybę ir ryšius tarp vaizdo išraiškų. Šiame dokumente siūlome LSTM pagrįstą model į, kuris leistų žodžiams surinkti kontekstinę informaciją iš jų aplinkų tame pačiame vaizdo įraše ir taip padėti klasifikavimo procesui. Mūsų metodas rodo 5–10 proc. veiksmingumo pagerėjimą, palyginti su pažangiąja technologija, ir didelį apskritumo patikimumą.', 'kk': 'Көптеген сезімдерді анализ - зерттеу аумағы. Бұл видеодағы сезімдерді идентификациясы бар. Қолданыстағы зерттеу сөздері тәуелсіз бірліктер ретінде, т.е. видеоның сөздерінің арасындағы тәуелсіздіктер мен қатынастарын елемейді. Бұл қағазда, LSTM негіздеген үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл сөздерді бір видеоның айналысуындағы мәліметтерінен түсіруге мүмкіндік береді. Сонымен қатар, классификациялау процесіне көмектес Біздің әдіміміз 5-10% жылдамдығын әртүрлік күйіне және жалпы жұмыс істеу үшін жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'it': "L'analisi dei sentimenti multimodali è un'area di ricerca in via di sviluppo, che prevede l'identificazione dei sentimenti nei video. La ricerca attuale considera le espressioni come entità indipendenti, cioè ignora le interdipendenze e le relazioni tra le espressioni di un video. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello basato su LSTM che consente alle parole di catturare informazioni contestuali dall'ambiente circostante nello stesso video, aiutando così il processo di classificazione. Il nostro metodo mostra un miglioramento delle prestazioni del 5-10% rispetto allo stato dell'arte e un'elevata robustezza alla generalizzabilità.", 'mk': 'Анализата на мултимодилните чувства е област во развој на истражување, која вклучува идентификација на чувствата во видеата. Сегашното истражување ги смета изразите за независни ентитети, односно ги игнорира меѓузависностите и односите меѓу изразите на видео. Во овој весник, предложуваме модел базиран на LSTM кој овозможува изразите да заземат контекстни информации од нивната околина во истиот видео, со што ќе му помогне на процесот на класификација. Нашиот метод покажува подобрување на резултатите од 5-10 отсто во однос на техничката состојба и висока силност кон генерализацијата.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിദീകരണത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ഒരു ഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക നിലവിലുള്ള പരിശോധന വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ വസ്തുക്കളായി വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. അതായത് വീഡിയോയുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ആ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു LSTM-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d അവരുടെ ചുറ്റുമുള്ള വീഡിയോയില്\u200d നിന്നും അടിസ്ഥാനമ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d 5-10% പ്രകടന മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്നു. കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയെക്കാളും ഉയര്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sentimenti multimodali hija qasam li qed jiżviluppa ta’ riċerka, li tinvolvi l-identifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fil-vidjows. Current research considers utterances as independent entities, i.e., ignores the interdependencies and relations among the utterances of a video.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ibbażat fuq l-LSTM li jippermetti li l-espressjonijiet jaqbdu informazzjoni kuntestwali mill-ambjent tagħhom fl-istess vidjo, u b’hekk jgħinu l-proċess ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Il-metodu tagħna juri titjib fil-prestazzjoni ta’ 5-10 % fuq l-aktar livell avvanzat u robustezza għolja għall-ġeneralizzazzjoni.', 'ms': 'Analisis sentimen berbilang modal adalah kawasan pembangunan penyelidikan, yang melibatkan pengenalan sentimen dalam video. kajian semasa menganggap ungkapan sebagai entiti independen, iaitu mengabaikan interdependensi dan hubungan antara ungkapan video. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model berdasarkan LSTM yang membolehkan ungkapan untuk menangkap maklumat kontekstual dari lingkungan mereka dalam video yang sama, sehingga membantu proses klasifikasi. Kaedah kami menunjukkan 5-10% peningkatan prestasi atas keadaan seni dan kuasa tinggi untuk keseluruhan.', 'no': 'Multimodal sentimentanalyse er eit utviklingsverktøyområde, som involverer identifisering av sentimentar i videoar. Gjeldande forskning ser ut uttrykk som uavhengige einingar, t.d. ignorerer interavhengigheten og forhold mellom uttrykkene av eit video. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein LSTM-basert modell som gjer at uttrykk kan henta kontekstinformasjon frå omgivningane sine i same video, slik at det hjelper klassifikasjonsprosessen. Metoden vårt viser at 5-10% utviklinga er forbetra over kunsten og høg kraftighet til generelliserbarhet.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ нь хөгжиж буй судалгааны талбай юм. Энэ нь бичлэгийн мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Одоогийн судалгаагаар хэлэлцээг бичлэгийн хэлэлцээний харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны хувьд хамааралтай байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид LSTM-ийн суурилсан загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь тэдний эргэн тойрноос нөхцөл мэдээллийг ижил бичлэгээр авах боломжийг олгодог. Бидний арга нь урлагийн хувьд 5-10% үйлдвэрлэл хөгжүүлэхийг харуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Analiza multimodalnih sentiment a je razvojna oblast istraživanja, koja uključuje identifikaciju osjećanja u video. Trenutno istraživanje smatra rečenicama nezavisnim entitetima, tj. ignoriše međuovisnosti i odnose među rečenicama video. U ovom papiru predlažemo model osnovan na LSTM-u koji omogućava reči da uhvate kontekstualne informacije iz njihovih okruženja u istom video, tako da pomaže procesu klasifikacije. Naša metoda pokazuje poboljšanje učinka od 5-10% u stanju umjetnosti i visoke snage u generalizaciju.', 'pl': 'Multimodalna analiza sentymentów to rozwijający się obszar badań, który polega na identyfikacji sentymentów w filmach. Aktualne badania uważają wypowiedzi za niezależne podmioty, tj. ignorują współzależności i relacje między wypowiedziami wideo. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model oparty na LSTM, który umożliwia przechwytywanie informacji kontekstowych z otoczenia w tym samym filmie, wspomagając tym samym proces klasyfikacji. Nasza metoda pokazuje 5-10% poprawę wydajności w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszym stanem techniki oraz wysoką solidność do uogólnienia.', 'sv': 'Multimodal sentimental analys är ett forskningsområde som utvecklas, vilket innebär identifiering av känslor i videor. Nuvarande forskning betraktar yttranden som oberoende enheter, det vill säga ignorerar det ömsesidiga beroendet och relationerna mellan yttrandena i en video. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en LSTM-baserad modell som gör det möjligt för yttranden att fånga kontextuell information från sin omgivning i samma video, vilket underlättar klassificeringsprocessen. Vår metod visar 5-10% prestandaförbättring jämfört med den senaste tekniken och hög robusthet till generaliserbarhet.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor multimodale este un domeniu de cercetare în curs de dezvoltare, care implică identificarea sentimentelor în videoclipuri. Cercetările actuale consideră afirmațiile ca entități independente, adică ignoră interdependențele și relațiile dintre afirmațiile unui videoclip. În această lucrare, propunem un model bazat pe LSTM care permite pronunțărilor să capteze informații contextuale din împrejurimile lor în același videoclip, ajutând astfel procesul de clasificare. Metoda noastră arată o îmbunătățire de performanță de 5-10% față de stadiul tehnologiei și o robustețe ridicată la generalizare.', 'ta': 'பல்முறையான உணர்வு ஆய்வு ஆராய்ச்சியின் முன்னேறும் பகுதியை ஆய்வு செய்கிறது, அது வீடியோவில் உணர்வுகள் அடைய தற்போதைய ஆய்வு சொற்களை சுதந்திரமான பொருளாக கருதுகிறது, அதாவது, வீடியோவின் வார்த்தைகளில் உள்ள சார்பு மற்றும் உறவுகளை பு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு LSTM அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சொல்லுகளை சுற்றும் வீடியோவில் இருந்து தற்பொதுவா எங்கள் முறைமையில் 5-10% செயல்பாட்டின் முன்னேற்றத்தைக் காட்டுகிறது கலை மற்றும் பொதுவாக முடியும் அதிக ஆ', 'so': "Analyaalka xisaabta badan waxaa ka mid ah dalabka waxbarashada horumarinta, kaasoo ku saabsan aqoonsiga fikradda fiidiyowyada. Baaritaanka joogtada ah ayaa hadallada u jeeda sida hay'adaha xor ah, wuxuu ka jeedaa iskala xiriirta iyo xiriirka ku jira hadalka fiidiyowga. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa model ku saleysan LSTM, kaas oo awoodda in hadallada laga soo qabsado macluumaadka joogtada ee ku wareegsan isla fiidiyowga, si aad u caawineyso fasaxa. Shaqooyinkayada waxaa ka muujiya 5-10 boqolkiiba horumarin kara xaaladda farshaxanka iyo khatarka sare si loo barwaaqo.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් මෝඩියාල් සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි විකාශ ප්\u200dරදේශයක්, ඒකෙන් වීඩියෝ වලට සංවේදනය අනුවෙන ප්\u200dරස්තූත පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා විඩියෝගේ කියන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් විතරයි, ඉතින්, විඩියෝ වල මේ පත්තරේ අපි LSTM-අධාරිත මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාපෘතියේ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු අරගෙන ඉන අපේ විධානය පෙන්වන්නේ විද්\u200dයාව 5-10% ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩි වැඩි වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා කියලා', 'ur': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is a development area of research, which involves the identification of sentiments in videos. اب کی تحقیق باتوں کو ایک ویڈیو کی باتوں کے درمیان تعلق و تعلق کا غیر نظر رکھتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک LSTM بنیادی موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کلیفوں کو ان کے اطراف سے متوسط معلومات کو ایک ہی ویڈیو میں پکڑ سکتا ہے، اسی طرح کلیفوں کی پروسس کی مدد کرتی ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ 5-10% فعالیت کو آهنگ اور عمومی قابلیت کے لحاظ پر زیادہ طاقت اور زیادہ طاقت دکھاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Multimodal sentiment analyzeri, taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maydonni aniqlash, bu video'da hissiyotlarni aniqlashga ega. Joriy taʼminlovchi so'zlarni o'zgartirib tashkilotlar deb hisoblanadi, balki video tilning o'zgarishlarining interdependetlarini va bog'liqlarini o'zgartiradi. Bu hujjatda, biz bir LSTM asosida gapiradigan so'zlarni o'zining атрофидаги доимий маълумотларни ушлаб олишга имконият берамиз, shunday qilib nasififning jarayonini yordam beramiz. Bizning usuli, sanam va eng yuqori ko'paytirish holatiga 5-10% bajarishni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Phân tích tình cảm đa phương là một khu vực nghiên cứu đang phát triển, liên quan đến việc xác định tình cảm trong video. Sự nghiên cứu hiện tại xem những lời phát biểu như những thực thể độc lập, tức là lờ đi sự liên quan và quan hệ giữa những phát biểu của video. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình dựa trên LSTM cho phép người đọc nắm giữ các thông tin ngữ cảnh từ môi trường chung trong cùng một video, và giúp đỡ quá trình phân loại. Cách của chúng tôi cho thấy 5-10=.=) khác vị hữu vị tinh hoạch vì sự thống và có vấn khó động để làm thường bình thường.', 'bg': 'Мултимодалният анализ на сантименталността е развиваща се област на изследване, която включва идентифицирането на сантименталности във видеоклиповете. Настоящите изследвания разглеждат изказванията като независими субекти, т.е. пренебрегват взаимните зависимости и взаимоотношения между изказванията на видео. В настоящата статия предлагаме базиран модел, който позволява на изказванията да улавят контекстуална информация от заобикалящата ги среда в едно и също видео, като по този начин подпомага процеса на класификация. Нашият метод показва 5-10% подобрение на производителността в сравнение с най-съвременните технологии и висока здравина към обобщаваемост.', 'da': 'Multimodal sentimental analyse er et forskningsområde, der udvikler sig, og som involverer identifikation af sentimentals i videoer. Nuværende forskning betragter udtalelser som uafhængige enheder, dvs. ignorerer den indbyrdes afhængighed og relationer mellem udtalelserne af en video. I denne artikel foreslår vi en LSTM-baseret model, der gør det muligt for udtalelser at indfange kontekstuelle oplysninger fra deres omgivelser i samme video, og dermed hjælpe klassificeringsprocessen. Vores metode viser 5-10% performance forbedring i forhold til state of te art og høj robusthed til generalisering.', 'nl': "Multimodale sentimentanalyse is een zich ontwikkelend onderzoeksgebied, waarbij gevoelens in video's worden geïdentificeerd. Momenteel onderzoek beschouwt uitingen als onafhankelijke entiteiten, d.w.z. negeert de onderlinge afhankelijkheid en relaties tussen de uitingen van een video. In dit artikel stellen we een LSTM-gebaseerd model voor waarmee uitspraken contextuele informatie uit hun omgeving kunnen vastleggen in dezelfde video, waardoor het classificatieproces wordt ondersteund. Onze methode toont 5-10% prestatieverbetering ten opzichte van de state of the art en hoge robuustheid tot generaliseerbaarheid.", 'hr': 'Analiza multimodalnih osjećaja je razvijena područja istraživanja, koja uključuje identifikaciju osjećaja u snimkama. Trenutno istraživanje smatra izrazima nezavisnim subjektima, tj. ignorira interovisnost i odnose među izrazima video. U ovom papiru predlažemo model osnovan na LSTM-u koji omogućava riječi da uhvati kontekstne informacije iz njihovih okoliša u istom video, tako da pomaže procesu klasifikacije. Naš metod pokazuje poboljšanje učinkovitosti od 5-10% u odnosu na stanje umjetnosti i visoke snage u generalizaciju.', 'id': 'Analisi sentimen multimodal adalah area yang berkembang penelitian, yang melibatkan identifikasi sentimen dalam video. Penelitian saat ini menganggap ucapan sebagai entitas independen, i.e., mengabaikan interdependensi dan hubungan antara ucapan video. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model berdasarkan LSTM yang memungkinkan ucapan untuk menangkap informasi kontekstual dari lingkungan mereka dalam video yang sama, sehingga membantu proses klasifikasi. Metode kami menunjukkan 5-10% peningkatan prestasi atas keadaan seni dan kekuatan tinggi untuk generalisasi.', 'de': 'Multimodale Stimmungsanalyse ist ein sich entwickelndes Forschungsgebiet, das die Identifikation von Stimmungen in Videos beinhaltet. Aktuelle Forschung betrachtet Äußerungen als unabhängige Entitäten, d.h. ignoriert die Wechselwirkungen und Beziehungen zwischen Äußerungen eines Videos. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein LSTM-basiertes Modell vor, das es Äußerungen ermöglicht, kontextbezogene Informationen aus ihrer Umgebung im selben Video zu erfassen und so den Klassifizierungsprozess zu unterstützen. Unsere Methode zeigt 5-10% Leistungssteigerung gegenüber dem Stand der Technik und hohe Robustheit gegenüber Verallgemeinerbarkeit.', 'ko': '다중모드적 감정 분석은 현재 발전하고 있는 연구 분야로 영상에서 감정의 식별과 관련된다.현재의 연구는 언어를 독립된 실체로 간주하고 영상 언어 간의 상호 의존과 관계를 소홀히 한다.본고에서 우리는 LSTM을 바탕으로 하는 모델을 제시하여 말이 같은 영상의 환경에서 상하문 정보를 포착하여 분류 과정을 돕는다.우리의 방법은 최신 기술에 비해 성능이 5-10% 향상되었고 유니버설성에 높은 노봉성을 가지고 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات زیادی یک منطقه توسعه تحقیقات است که شامل شناسایی احساسات در ویدئو است. تحقیقات فعلی کلمات را به عنوان متعلق به عنوان متعلق به عنوان متعلق به عنوان متعلق به عنوان متعلق به توافق و ارتباط بین کلمات یک ویدئو نادیده می گیرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل بنیاد LSTM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به کلمات اجازه می\u200cدهد اطلاعات متوسط را از محیط آنها در یک ویدئو بگیرد، بنابراین به فرایند مختصات کمک کند. روش ما 5-10 درصد توسط وضعیت هنر و قوت بالا به توانایی عمومی نشان می دهد.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa hisia mbalimbali unachambua eneo linaloendelea la utafiti, ambalo linahusisha kutambua hisia katika video. Utafiti wa sasa unachukulia maneno kama vitu huru, yaani, hupuuza kutegemea na uhusiano kati ya maneno ya video. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza muundo wa msingi wa LSTM ambao unawezesha kusema kupata taarifa za kisasa kutoka kwenye video hiyo, kwa hiyo tunasaidia mchakato wa kutangaza. Utawala wetu unaonyesha maendeleo ya utendaji wa asilimia 5-10 zaidi ya hali ya sanaa na matumizi makubwa ya umuhimu.', 'tr': 'Birnäçemodal duýgular analyzasy, wideoda duýgularyň tanymasyny bar. Häzirki araştyrma sözlerini goragsyz bir zat diýip görýär, myselýe, wideoň sözleriniň arasyndaky çarpyşlyklary we baglaşyklaryny görmezden geçýär. Bu kagyzda, LSTM tabanly bir nusga teklip edip, çykyşlaryň etraplarynda contest maglumaty ýazmagy mümkin edýär we şonuň üçin klasifikasyon prosesyna kömek edip biler. Biziň ýüregimiz 5-10% sanat we ýokary ukyplygymyz döredilýän ukyplygyny ukyplygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave multimodale është një fushë në zhvillim e kërkimit, e cila përfshin identifikimin e ndjenjave në videot. Current research considers utterances as independent entities, i.e., ignores the interdependencies and relations among the utterances of a video.  Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model bazuar në LSTM që lejon shprehjet të kapin informacion kontekstual nga rrethina e tyre në të njëjtin video, duke ndihmuar kështu procesin e klasifikimit. Metoda jonë tregon 5-10% përmirësim në performancë lidhur me gjendjen e artit dhe fuqinë e lartë ndaj gjeneralizueshmërisë.', 'am': 'ብዙአዊ ስሜት አስተያየት የሚያሳውቀው የፍጥረት መሬት ነው፡፡ Current research considers utterances as independent entities, i.e., ignores the interdependencies and relations among the utterances of a video.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቃላትን ከዙሪያቸው ያሉትን የአሁኑን የውይይት መረጃዎችን በመያዝ የሚችል LSTM-መሠረት ሞዴል እናሳስባለን፣ ስለዚህም መግለጫውን የሚረዳው ነው፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት 5-10 በመቶ ድምፅ በዓላማ እና ከፍተኛ ልብስ ማድረግ ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'af': "Multimodale sentimentanalisie is 'n ontwikkelingsgebied van ondersoek, wat die identifikasie van sentimente in videos insluit. Huidige ondersoek beoorsaak uitspraak as onafhanklike entiteite, t.d. ignoreer die interafhanklikhede en relasies tussen die uitspraak van 'n video. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n LSTM-gebaseerde model wat toelaat uitdrukkings om contextual inligting van hul omgewing in dieselfde video te vang, sodat die klassifikasie proses ondersteun. Ons metode wys 5-10% prestasie verbetering oor die staat van die kuns en hoë kragtigheid tot gewonelikheid.", 'hy': 'Մոլորմոդալ զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը ուսումնասիրության զարգացող ոլորտ է, որը ներառում է զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը տեսահոլովակներում: Այսօրվա հետազոտությունները կարծում են, որ արտահայտությունները անկախ են, այսինքն, անտեսում են տեսահոլովակի արտահայտությունների միջև կախվածությունները և հարաբերությունները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք LSMT-ով հիմնված մոդել, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս արտահայտություններին վերցնել իրենց շրջապատից կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվություն նույն տեսահոլովակում, օգնելով դասակարգման գործընթացին: Our method shows 5-10% performance improvement over the state of the art and high robustness to generalizability.', 'az': 'Multimodal sentiment analizi, videolarda duyguların tanımlamasını təşkil edən bir araştırma bölgesidir. Şimdiki araştırma sözləri video sözlərinin arasındakı bağımlılıqları və əlaqələrini görməyə çalışır. Bu kağızda, LSTM tabanlı modeli təbliğ edirik ki, sözlərin ətrafındakı məlumatlarını aynı video içində tutmağa imkan verir, böylece klasifikasiya prosesini kömək edir. Bizim metodumuz, sanatın və yüksək qüvvətliyimiz üzərində 5-10% performansının düzəltməsini göstərir.', 'bn': 'মাল্টিমোডাল অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণ একটি উন্নয়নশীল গবেষণার এলাকা বিশ্লেষণ করে, যার মধ্যে ভিডিওতে অনুভূতির পরিচিতি রয়ে বর্তমান গবেষণা স্বাধীন প্রতিষ্ঠান হিসেবে বিবেচনা করে, যেমন ভিডিওর ভাষার মধ্যে নির্ভর এবং সম্পর্ক উপেক্ষা করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি এলস্টিএম ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা শব্দগুলো একই ভিডিওতে তাদের চারপাশ থেকে প্রাক্তন তথ্য গ্রহণ করতে সক্ষম হয়, যার আমাদের পদ্ধতি শিল্পের পরিস্থিতিতে ৫-১০ শতাংশের প্রভাব উন্নতি দেখাচ্ছে এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাধারণ প্রযুক্ত', 'bs': 'Multimodalna analiza osjećanja je razvijajući područje istraživanja, što uključuje identifikaciju osjećaja u snimke. Trenutno istraživanje smatra izrazima nezavisnim entitetima, tj. ignorira interovisnost i odnose između govora video. U ovom papiru predlažemo model osnovan na LSTM-u koji omogućava govore da uhvate kontekstne informacije iz njihovih okoliša u istom video, tako da pomaže procesu klasifikacije. Naša metoda pokazuje poboljšanje učinka od 5-10% u stanju umjetnosti i visoke snage u generalizaciji.', 'ca': "L'anàlisi del sentiment multimodal és una àrea en desenvolupament de recerca, que implica la identificació de sentiments en vídeos. La recerca actual considera que les expressions són entitats independents, és a dir, ignora les interdependencies i les relacions entre les expressions d'un vídeo. En aquest paper, proposem un model basat en LSTM que permet que les expressions captin informació contextual del seu entorn en el mateix vídeo, ajudant així el procés de classificació. El nostre mètode mostra una millora del 5-10% del rendiment sobre l'estat de l'art i una alta robustet a la generalització.", 'cs': 'Multimodální analýza sentimentů je rozvíjející se oblastí výzkumu, která zahrnuje identifikaci sentimentů ve videu. Současný výzkum považuje výroky za nezávislé entity, tj. ignoruje vzájemné závislosti a vztahy mezi výroky videa. V tomto článku navrhujeme model založený na LSTM, který umožňuje výrokům zachytit kontextové informace ze svého okolí ve stejném videu, čímž napomáhá klasifikaci. Naše metoda ukazuje 5-10% zlepšení výkonnosti oproti stavu techniky a vysokou robustnost vůči generalizaci.', 'et': 'Multimodaalne sentimentaalüüs on arenev uurimisvaldkond, mis hõlmab sentimentaalsete tunnete tuvastamist videotes. Käesolevas uuringus käsitletakse väljendeid sõltumatute üksustena ehk ignoreeritakse video väljendite vastastikust sõltuvust ja suhteid. Käesolevas töös pakume välja LSTM-põhise mudeli, mis võimaldab väljenditel jäädvustada kontekstiteavet ümbritsevast ümbrusest samas videos, aidates seega kaasa klassifitseerimisprotsessile. Meie meetod näitab 5-10% jõudluse paranemist võrreldes tehnika tasemega ja üldistatavuse kõrget vastupidavust.', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen tunteiden analysointi on kehittyvä tutkimusalue, jossa tunteiden tunnistaminen videoissa tapahtuu. Nykyinen tutkimus pitää ilmaisuja itsenäisinä kokonaisuuksina eli sivuuttaa videon ilmaisujen keskinäiset riippuvuudet ja suhteet. Tässä työssä ehdotamme LSTM-pohjaista mallia, jonka avulla lauseet voivat tallentaa kontekstitietoa ympäristöstään samaan videoon ja näin helpottaa luokitteluprosessia. Menetelmämme osoittaa, että suorituskyky paranee 5-10% huipputekniikkaan verrattuna ja että se on erittäin kestävä yleistettävyyteen.', 'jv': 'Multiple modal Sensitive Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe barang kelas kuwi sampeyan sampek, dadi, ingkang teka-teka perusahaan karo perusahaan kuwi video. Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo model sing basa na LTT supoyo iso nggawe informasi contextual karo video sing berarti, dadi supoyo nggawe barang kelas Awakdhéwé éntuk 5-10% pengaturan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno karo hal-hal sing gawe nguasakno.', 'sk': 'Multimodalna analiza sentimenta je razvijajoče se področje raziskav, ki vključuje identifikacijo sentimenta v videoposnetkih. Trenutne raziskave obravnavajo izjave kot neodvisne entitete, tj. ignorirajo medsebojne odvisnosti in odnose med izjavami videa. V prispevku predlagamo model, ki temelji na LSTM, ki izgovorom omogoča zajemanje kontekstualnih informacij iz okolice v istem videu in s tem pomaga pri razvrščanju. Naša metoda kaže 5-10% izboljšanje zmogljivosti v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi tehnikami in visoko robustnost do splošnosti.', 'ha': "Ana yi anayyar wa masu motsi na fatawa, yana da wani fili na tsofa cikin video. Ana ƙaddara magana a yanzu kamar abubuwa masu huru, misali, yana gafala masu bakarãra da dangantarwa daga maganar video. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlin LSSM-da ke iya yarda da magana dõmin su kãma maɓallin yanzu daga wanda ke gefensu a cikin wannan video, don haka kuma Mu ƙarfafa fasarin fassarar. Kayan hanyoyinmu yana nũna mafarin aikin 5-10 a kan halin sanar da tufãfin da za'a samar da shi.", 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות רב-מודלית הוא אזור מתפתח של מחקר, שכולל זיהוי רגשות בסרטונים. המחקר הנוכחי מחשיב ביטויים כאישויות עצמאות, כלומר, מתעלם מההתלויות והיחסים בין ביטויים של וידאו. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל מבוסס על LSTM שמאפשר ביטויים לתפוס מידע קונטקסטי מהסביבה שלהם באותו וידאו, כך עוזר לתהליך ההקליטה. השיטה שלנו מראה שיפור ביצועים של 5-10% על מצב האומנות וחזקה גבוהה לגנרליזציה.', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཞིག་རེད། ད་ལྟོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཐ་སྙད་འདི་ནི་སྟེང་འབྲེལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་གི་བརྙན་ཐོ་ཡི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་ཡོད། In this paper, we propose a LSTM-based model that enables utterances to capture contextual information from their surroundings in the same video, thus helping the classification process. ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་༥-༡༠་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Tandem Anchoring : a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'ar': 'الترادف الترادفي: نهج مرساة متعدد الكلمات لنمذجة الموضوع التفاعلي', 'fr': "Ancrage en tandem\xa0: une approche d'ancrage multimots pour la modélisation interactive de sujets", 'pt': 'Ancoragem Tandem: uma Abordagem de Ancoragem Multipalavras para Modelagem de Tópicos Interativos', 'es': 'Anclaje en tándem: un enfoque de anclaje de palabras múltiples para el modelado interactivo', 'zh': '联锚定:一用交互式主题建模多字锚定法', 'hi': 'अग्रानुक्रम एंकरिंग: इंटरैक्टिव विषय मॉडलिंग के लिए एक मल्टीवर्ड एंकर दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Тандемная привязка: многослововый подход к моделированию интерактивных тем', 'ja': 'タンデムアンカー：インタラクティブなトピックモデリングのためのマルチワードアンカーアプローチ', 'ga': 'Ancaireacht Tandem: Cur Chuige Ancaire Ilfhocail le haghaidh Samhaltú Idirghníomhach Ábhair', 'ka': 'Tandem Anchoring: multiword Anchor approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'it': 'Ancoraggio tandem: un approccio di ancoraggio multiparola per la modellazione interattiva degli argomenti', 'hu': 'Tandem horgonyzás: többszós horgonyzási megközelítés az interaktív téma modellezéshez', 'kk': 'Тандемдің бағыттауы: интерактивті нақышты үлгілеу үшін көптеген сөздердің бағыттауы', 'mk': 'Приклучување на тандемот: пристап на повеќе зборови за интерактивно моделирање на темата', 'el': 'Αγκυροβολία Tandem: μια προσέγγιση αγκύρων πολλαπλών λέξεων για διαδραστική μοντελοποίηση θεμάτων', 'ms': 'Penekatan Tandem: pendekatan Penekatan Penekatan Berbilang untuk Modelan Topik Interaktif', 'mt': 'Ankoraġġ tat-Tandem: Approċċ ta’ Ankoraġġ Multikelma għall-Mudellar Topiku Interattiv', 'lt': 'Tandų tvirtinimas: daugiakalbis tvirtinimo metodas interaktyviam teminiam modeliavimui', 'no': 'Tandem-ankring: ein fleire ord-anker-nærming for interaktiv temamodellering', 'pl': 'Tandemowe kotwiczenie: wielowłowne podejście kotwicące do interaktywnego modelowania tematów', 'mn': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'sr': 'Tandem Anchoring: Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'si': 'ටැන්ඩිම් ඇන්කෝරින්ග්: අන්තර්භාවිත විද්\u200dයාව මොඩල් කරන්න ගොඩක් වචන ඇන්කෝර් අවස්ථාව', 'ro': 'Ancorarea tandem: o abordare cu mai multe cuvinte pentru modelarea interactivă a subiectelor', 'ml': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'so': 'Tandem Anchor: a Multiword Anchor route for Interactive Tog Modeling', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'sv': 'Tandemförankring: en flerords förankringsmetod för interaktiv ämnesmodellering', 'vi': 'Tandem Anchorage: một phương pháp Neo đa từ cho Chế độ nội tiết có tác dụng', 'uz': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'nl': 'Tandemverankering: een meerwoord ankerbenadering voor interactieve topic modellering', 'da': 'Tandem forankring: en flerords anker tilgang til interaktiv emne modellering', 'de': 'Tandem Anchoring: ein Mehrwortankeransatz für interaktive Themenmodellierung', 'bg': 'Тандемно анкериране: многословен анкер подход за интерактивно моделиране на теми', 'id': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'sw': 'Tandem Uchaguzi: Anchor Anchor Anchor Anchor for Modeling of Interactive Topic', 'tr': 'Tandem Teýdançysy: bir köp söz Ancir Approach', 'fa': 'تاندم انقلاب: یک نزدیک چند کلمه انقلاب برای مدل موضوع متفاوتی', 'af': "Tandem Anchoring: ' n Multiword Anchor Approach vir Interaktiewe Onderwerp Modelering", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ko': '직렬 앵커: 상호작용 테마 모델링의 다사 앵커 방법', 'bn': 'ট্যান্ডেম অ্যাঙ্কোরিং: ইন্টারনেটিভ বিষয় মোডেলিং এর জন্য একটি বহুশব্দ অ্যাঙ্কোর প্রস্থান', 'bs': 'Tandem Anchoring: Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'sq': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'cs': 'Tandemové ukotvení: víceslovný kotevní přístup pro interaktivní modelování témat', 'et': 'Tandemankur: mitmesõnaline ankur lähenemisviis interaktiivse teema modelleerimiseks', 'az': 'Tandem Anchoring: Interaktiv Mevzu Modeli üçün çoxlu söz Anchor Yaxınlığı', 'fi': 'Tandem-ankkurointi: monikanavainen lähestymistapa interaktiiviseen aihemallinnukseen', 'hr': 'Tandem Anchoring: Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'ca': 'Tandem Anchoring: a Multiword Anchor Approach for Interactive Topic Modeling', 'jv': 'Tandm Ngubungan: Peringatan langgar batir akêh kanggo modèran interactive Tema', 'sk': 'Tandemsko sidranje: večbesedni pristop sidra za interaktivno modeliranje teme', 'ha': 'Akwai na Tanda: A Cire Mai Motsi na Filin Mataimi', 'he': 'קישור טנדם: גישה קישור במילים רבות למודל נושאי אינטראקטיבי', 'bo': 'Tandem Anchor: སྒྲུབ་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་Anchor Approach'}
{'en': 'Interactive topic models are powerful tools for those seeking to understand large collections of text. However, existing sampling-based interactive topic modeling approaches scale poorly to large data sets. Anchor methods, which use a single word to uniquely identify a topic, offer the speed needed for interactive work but lack both a mechanism to inject prior knowledge and lack the intuitive semantics needed for user-facing applications. We propose combinations of words as anchors, going beyond existing single word anchor algorithmsan approach we call Tandem Anchors. We begin with a synthetic investigation of this approach then apply the approach to interactive topic modeling in a user study and compare it to interactive and non-interactive approaches. Tandem anchors are faster and more intuitive than existing interactive approaches.', 'ar': 'تعد نماذج الموضوعات التفاعلية أدوات فعالة لأولئك الذين يسعون إلى فهم مجموعات كبيرة من النصوص. ومع ذلك ، فإن مناهج النمذجة التفاعلية الحالية القائمة على أخذ العينات لا تتناسب مع مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة. توفر طرق الارتساء ، التي تستخدم كلمة واحدة لتحديد موضوع بشكل فريد ، السرعة اللازمة للعمل التفاعلي ولكنها تفتقر إلى آلية لحقن المعرفة السابقة وتفتقر إلى الدلالات البديهية اللازمة للتطبيقات التي تواجه المستخدم. نحن نقترح مجموعات من الكلمات كمثبتات ، ونتجاوز خوارزميات الارتساء الحالية - وهو نهج نسميه "المراسي الترادفية". نبدأ بتحقيق تركيبي لهذا النهج ثم نطبق النهج على نمذجة الموضوع التفاعلية في دراسة المستخدم ونقارنها بالنهج التفاعلية وغير التفاعلية. المراسي الترادفية أسرع وأكثر سهولة من الأساليب التفاعلية الحالية.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de tópicos interativos são ferramentas poderosas para quem busca entender grandes coleções de texto. No entanto, as abordagens de modelagem de tópicos interativas baseadas em amostragem existentes são pouco dimensionadas para grandes conjuntos de dados. Os métodos âncora, que usam uma única palavra para identificar exclusivamente um tópico, oferecem a velocidade necessária para o trabalho interativo, mas carecem de um mecanismo para injetar conhecimento prévio e da semântica intuitiva necessária para aplicativos voltados para o usuário. Propomos combinações de palavras como âncoras, indo além dos algoritmos existentes de âncora de palavra única – uma abordagem que chamamos de “Âncoras Tandem”. Começamos com uma investigação sintética dessa abordagem e, em seguida, aplicamos a abordagem à modelagem de tópicos interativos em um estudo de usuário e a comparamos com abordagens interativas e não interativas. As âncoras tandem são mais rápidas e intuitivas do que as abordagens interativas existentes.', 'es': 'Los modelos de temas interactivos son herramientas poderosas para quienes buscan comprender grandes colecciones de texto. Sin embargo, los enfoques de modelado de temas interactivos basados en muestreos existentes se adaptan mal a grandes conjuntos de datos Los métodos de anclaje, que utilizan una sola palabra para identificar un tema de forma única, ofrecen la velocidad necesaria para el trabajo interactivo, pero carecen de un mecanismo para inyectar conocimientos previos y carecen de la semántica intuitiva necesaria para las aplicaciones orientadas al usuario. Proponemos combinaciones de palabras como anclas, que van más allá de los algoritmos de anclaje de una sola palabra existentes, un enfoque que llamamos «Anclajes en tándem». Comenzamos con una investigación sintética de este enfoque, luego aplicamos el enfoque al modelado de temas interactivos en un estudio de usuarios y lo comparamos con enfoques interactivos y no interactivos. Los anclajes tándem son más rápidos e intuitivos que los enfoques interactivos existentes.', 'fr': "Les modèles de sujets interactifs sont des outils puissants pour ceux qui cherchent à comprendre de grandes collections de texte. Cependant, les approches existantes de modélisation interactive de sujets basées sur l'échantillonnage s'adaptent mal à de grands ensembles de données. Les méthodes d'ancrage, qui utilisent un seul mot pour identifier un sujet de manière unique, offrent la rapidité nécessaire au travail interactif, mais elles ne disposent pas à la fois d'un mécanisme permettant d'injecter des connaissances préalables et de la sémantique intuitive requise pour les applications destinées aux utilisateurs. Nous proposons des combinaisons de mots comme ancres, allant au-delà des algorithmes d'ancrage à mot unique existants, une approche que nous appelons «\xa0ancres en tandem\xa0». Nous commençons par une étude synthétique de cette approche, puis appliquons l'approche à la modélisation interactive de sujets dans une étude utilisateur et la comparons à des approches interactives et non interactives. Les ancrages en tandem sont plus rapides et plus intuitifs que les approches interactives existantes.", 'ja': 'インタラクティブなトピックモデルは、大きなテキストコレクションを理解しようとする人にとって強力なツールです。しかし、既存のサンプリングベースのインタラクティブなトピックモデリングは、大規模なデータセットへのスケールが悪い。トピックを一意に識別するために単一の単語を使用するアンカーメソッドは、インタラクティブ作業に必要な速度を提供しますが、既存の知識を注入するメカニズムと、ユーザー向けアプリケーションに必要な直感的な意味論の両方が欠如しています。私たちは、既存の単一の単語アンカーアルゴリズムを超えて、アンカーとしての単語の組み合わせを提案します。このアプローチを「タンデムアンカー」と呼びます。まず、このアプローチの総合的な調査から始めて、ユーザー研究のインタラクティブなトピックモデリングにアプローチを適用し、インタラクティブなアプローチと非インタラクティブなアプローチと比較します。タンデムアンカーは、既存の対話型アプローチよりも速く、直感的です。', 'zh': '交互式主题模者,求解文本合用户之强具也。 然今之采样交互式题建模法在大数集上者扩展性差。 锚点法用单单词,唯一标识,供交互式事之速,既乏注先验之机,亦乏面向用户之应用程序直观语义。 吾以单词组为锚点,越今单字锚点算法 - 谓之"串联锚点"。 参伍其始,然后施于用户之交互式建模,比之交互式非交互式法。 联锚点疾于今交互式法尤直观。', 'hi': 'इंटरैक्टिव विषय मॉडल पाठ के बड़े संग्रह को समझने की मांग करने वालों के लिए शक्तिशाली उपकरण हैं। हालांकि, मौजूदा नमूना-आधारित इंटरैक्टिव विषय मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण बड़े डेटा सेट के लिए खराब पैमाने पर हैं। एंकर विधियां, जो किसी विषय की विशिष्ट रूप से पहचान करने के लिए एक ही शब्द का उपयोग करती हैं, इंटरैक्टिव काम के लिए आवश्यक गति प्रदान करती हैं, लेकिन पूर्व ज्ञान को इंजेक्ट करने के लिए एक तंत्र की कमी होती है और उपयोगकर्ता-सामना करने वाले अनुप्रयोगों के लिए आवश्यक सहज ज्ञान युक्त शब्दार्थ की कमी होती है। हम एंकर के रूप में शब्दों के संयोजन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, मौजूदा एकल शब्द एंकर एल्गोरिदम से परे जा रहे हैं- एक दृष्टिकोण जिसे हम "टैंडेम एंकर" कहते हैं। हम इस दृष्टिकोण की एक सिंथेटिक जांच के साथ शुरू करते हैं, फिर एक उपयोगकर्ता अध्ययन में इंटरैक्टिव विषय मॉडलिंग के लिए दृष्टिकोण लागू करते हैं और इसकी तुलना इंटरैक्टिव और गैर-इंटरैक्टिव दृष्टिकोण से करते हैं। अग्रानुक्रम एंकर मौजूदा इंटरैक्टिव दृष्टिकोण की तुलना में तेज और अधिक सहज हैं।', 'ru': 'Интерактивные тематические модели являются мощным инструментом для тех, кто хочет разобраться в больших коллекциях текста. Вместе с тем существующие методы интерактивного тематического моделирования на основе выборки плохо подходят к масштабированию больших наборов данных. Якорные методы, которые используют одно слово для уникальной идентификации темы, предлагают скорость, необходимую для интерактивной работы, но не имеют как механизма для введения предварительных знаний, так и интуитивной семантики, необходимой для приложений, ориентированных на пользователя. Мы предлагаем комбинации слов в качестве якорей, выходящие за рамки существующих алгоритмов якоря одного слова - подход, который мы называем «тандемными якорями». Мы начинаем с синтетического исследования этого подхода, затем применяем подход к интерактивному тематическому моделированию в пользовательском исследовании и сравниваем его с интерактивным и неинтерактивным подходами. Тандемные якоря быстрее и интуитивнее, чем существующие интерактивные подходы.', 'ga': 'Is uirlisí cumhachtacha iad samhlacha ábhar idirghníomhacha dóibh siúd atá ag iarraidh bailiúcháin mhóra téacs a thuiscint. Mar sin féin, is beag an scála cuir chuige atá ann cheana maidir le samhaltú topaicí idirghníomhach bunaithe ar shampláil go tacair mhóra sonraí. Cuireann modhanna ancaire, a úsáideann aon fhocal amháin chun topaic a shainaithint go huathúil, an luas atá ag teastáil le haghaidh obair idirghníomhach ar fáil ach níl meicníocht ann chun réamheolas a instealladh agus níl an tséimeantaic iomasach atá ag teastáil le haghaidh feidhmchláir a úsáideann úsáideoirí in easnamh. Molaimid comhcheangail focal mar ancairí, ag dul níos faide ná na halgartaim ancaire aon fhocail atá ann cheana féin - cur chuige ar a dtugaimid “Tandem Anchors”. Tosaímid le himscrúdú sintéiseach ar an gcur chuige seo agus ansin cuirimid an cur chuige i bhfeidhm ar shamhaltú topaicí idirghníomhach i staidéar úsáideora agus cuir i gcomparáid é le cineálacha cur chuige idirghníomhacha agus neamh-idirghníomhacha. Tá ancairí tandem níos tapúla agus níos iomasach ná na cuir chuige idirghníomhacha atá ann cheana féin.', 'el': 'Τα διαδραστικά μοντέλα θεμάτων είναι ισχυρά εργαλεία για όσους αναζητούν να κατανοήσουν μεγάλες συλλογές κειμένου. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες διαδραστικές προσεγγίσεις μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων βασισμένες στη δειγματοληψία κλιμακώνονται ανεπαρκώς σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων. Οι μέθοδοι αγκύρωσης, οι οποίες χρησιμοποιούν μία λέξη για να προσδιορίσουν μοναδικά ένα θέμα, προσφέρουν την ταχύτητα που απαιτείται για διαδραστική εργασία, αλλά στερούνται τόσο ενός μηχανισμού για την εισαγωγή προηγούμενων γνώσεων όσο και της διαισθητικής σημασιολογίας που απαιτείται για εφαρμογές που αντιμετωπίζουν το χρήστη. Προτείνουμε συνδυασμούς λέξεων ως άγκυρες, που ξεπερνούν τους υπάρχοντες αλγόριθμους άγκυρας μιας λέξης – μια προσέγγιση που ονομάζουμε άγκυρες Tandem. Ξεκινάμε με μια συνθετική έρευνα αυτής της προσέγγισης στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζουμε την προσέγγιση στη διαδραστική μοντελοποίηση θεμάτων σε μια μελέτη χρήστη και τη συγκρίνουμε με διαδραστικές και μη διαδραστικές προσεγγίσεις. Οι άγκυρες Tandem είναι ταχύτερες και πιο διαισθητικές από τις υπάρχουσες διαδραστικές προσεγγίσεις.', 'hu': 'Az interaktív témamodellek hatékony eszközök azok számára, akik nagy szöveggyűjteményeket szeretnének megérteni. A meglévő mintavételi alapú interaktív témakörmodellezési megközelítések azonban rosszul skáláznak nagy adatkészletekre. A horgonyzási módszerek, amelyek egyetlen szót használnak egy téma egyedi azonosítására, az interaktív munkához szükséges sebességet biztosítanak, de nem rendelkeznek előzetes ismeretek befecskendezésére szolgáló mechanizmussal, és nem rendelkeznek a felhasználóval szembeni alkalmazásokhoz szükséges intuitív szemantikával. Szavak kombinációit javasoljuk horgonyként, amelyek túlmutatnak a meglévő egyszós horgony algoritmusokon – ezt a megközelítést Tandem horgonyoknak hívjuk. Ennek a megközelítésnek a szintetikus vizsgálatával kezdjük, majd egy felhasználói tanulmányban alkalmazzuk az interaktív téma modellezés megközelítését, és összehasonlítjuk az interaktív és nem interaktív megközelítésekkel. A tandem horgonyok gyorsabbak és intuitívabbak, mint a meglévő interaktív megközelítések.', 'ka': 'ინტერრაქტიური ტემების მოდელები არის ძალიან ხელსაწყოფილი ტექსტის დიდი კოლექციების შესახებ. მაგრამ არსებობს, ჩვენი მონაცემების ინტერრაქტიური ტემების მოდელირება ძალიან მარტივი მოდის დიდი მონაცემების შესახებ. პროგრამეტრები, რომელიც ერთი სიტყვის გამოყენებს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ მინდომათ სიტყვების კომბინციები როგორც კონფორები, რომლებიც არსებობს ერთი სიტყვების ალგორიტების გარეშე, რომელიც მინდომა "Tandem Anchors". ჩვენ ამ პროგრამის სინტეტიკური გამოყენებით დავიწყებთ, შემდეგ ინტერაქტიური ტემიკური მოდელისთვის გამოყენება და გამოყენება ინტერაქტიური და ინტერაქტიური მიღებთან. ტანდემის კონფორები უფრო ბრძელია და უფრო ინტერუტიურია, ვიდრე არსებობს ინტერუტიური პროგორები.', 'lt': "Interaktyvūs teminiai modeliai yra galingos priemonės tiems, kurie siekia suprasti dideles teksto rinkinys. Tačiau esami mėginių ėmimu pagrįsti interaktyvūs temų modeliavimo metodai prastai apima didelius duomenų rinkinius. Užtvirtinimo metodai, kurie naudoja vieną žodį unikaliai identifikuojant temą, siūlo greitį, reikalingą interaktyviam darbui, tačiau neturi mechanizmo išankstinėms žinioms sušvirkšti ir neturi intuityvios semantikos, reikalingos naudotojams skirtoms programoms. We propose combinations of words as anchors, going beyond existing single word anchor algorithms-an approach we call 'Tandem Anchors'.  Pradėsime sintetiniu šio metodo tyrimu, o vėliau naudotojų tyrimo metu taikysime metodą interaktyviam temų modeliavimui ir palyginsime jį su interaktyviais ir neeinteraktyviais metodais. Tandų tvirtinimo įtaisai yra greitesni ir intuityvesni nei esami interaktyvūs metodai.", 'ms': "Interactive topic models are powerful tools for those seeking to understand large collections of text.  However, existing sampling-based interactive topic modeling approaches scale poorly to large data sets.  Kaedah ikatan, yang menggunakan satu perkataan untuk mengenalpasti topik secara unik, menawarkan kelajuan yang diperlukan untuk kerja interaktif tetapi kekurangan kedua-dua mekanisme untuk menyuntik pengetahuan terdahulu dan kekurangan semantik intuitif yang diperlukan untuk aplikasi menghadapi pengguna. Kami mengusulkan kombinasi perkataan sebagai jangkar, melampaui algoritma jangkar perkataan tunggal yang wujud-pendekatan yang kami panggil 'Tandem Anchors'. Kami mengusulkan kombinasi perkataan sebagai jangkar, melampaui algoritma jangkar perkataan tunggal yang wujud. Kita bermula dengan penyelidikan sintetik pendekatan ini kemudian laksanakan pendekatan untuk pemodelan topik interaktif dalam kajian pengguna dan membandingkannya dengan pendekatan interaktif dan tidak interaktif. Tandem anchor lebih cepat dan lebih intuitif daripada pendekatan interaktif yang ada.", 'ml': 'ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്റ്റീവ് പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വലിയ പദാവലികള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കാ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള ടാമ്പിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്റ്റിവേറ്റ ഒരു പ്രഭാഷണത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ആങ്കോര്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d, വേഗത്തിന് വേഗത നല്\u200dകുക, എന്നാല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് അറിവ് ഇഞ്ചിക്കുന്നതിന നിലവിലുള്ള ആങ്കോര്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുന്\u200dപില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ കണക്കിനെക്കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യ ഈ നടപടിയുടെ സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന നിലവിലുള്ള ഇടപാടുകളെക്കാള്\u200d വേഗത്തിലും ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുമാണ് ടാന്\u200dഡമിന്\u200dറെ ആങ്കോര്\u200d', 'mk': 'Интерактивни темски модели се моќни алатки за оние кои сакаат да разберат големи колекции текст. Сепак, постојните интерактивни пристапи на моделирање на теми, базирани на примероци, лошо се шират до големи податоци. Анкорските методи, кои користат еден збор за единствено идентификување на тема, нудат брзина потребна за интерактивна работа, но немаат механизам за инјектирање на претходно знаење и недостаток на интуитивна семантика потребна за апликациите кои се однесуваат кон корисникот. Ние предложуваме комбинации на зборови како основачи, кои одат надвор од постоечките алгоритми на основач на еден збор - пристап кој ние го нарекуваме "Тандем основачи". Почнуваме со синтетичка истрага на овој пристап, потоа го применуваме пристапот до интерактивното моделирање на теми во корисничката студија и го споредуваме со интерактивните и неинтерактивните пристапи. Анкорите на тандемите се побрзи и поинтуитивни од постојните интерактивни пристапи.', 'it': "I modelli interattivi di argomenti sono strumenti potenti per coloro che cercano di capire grandi raccolte di testo. Tuttavia, gli approcci di modellazione interattiva basati su campionamento esistenti si adattano scarsamente a set di dati di grandi dimensioni. I metodi di ancoraggio, che utilizzano una sola parola per identificare in modo univoco un argomento, offrono la velocità necessaria per il lavoro interattivo, ma mancano sia di un meccanismo per iniettare conoscenze preliminari che di una semantica intuitiva necessaria per le applicazioni rivolte all'utente. Proponiamo combinazioni di parole come ancore, andando oltre gli algoritmi esistenti di ancoraggio di singole parole, un approccio che chiamiamo 'Ancore Tandem'. Iniziamo con un'indagine sintetica di questo approccio quindi applichiamo l'approccio alla modellazione interattiva dei temi in uno studio utente e lo confrontiamo con approcci interattivi e non interattivi. Gli ancoraggi tandem sono più veloci e intuitivi rispetto agli approcci interattivi esistenti.", 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tematiċi interattivi huma għodod b’saħħithom għal dawk li jfittxu li jifhmu kollezzjonijiet kbar ta’ test. Madankollu, l-approċċi eżistenti ta’ mudellar interattiv tas-suġġetti bbażati fuq it-teħid ta’ kampjuni jiskambjaw ħażin għal settijiet kbar ta’ dejta. Anchor methods, which use a single word to uniquely identify a topic, offer the speed needed for interactive work but lack both a mechanism to inject prior knowledge and lack the intuitive semantics needed for user-facing applications.  Aħna nipproponu taħlitiet ta\' kliem bħala ankri, li jmorru lil hinn mill-algoritmi eżistenti ta\' ankra ta\' kelma waħda - approċċ li jissejħu "Tandem Anchors". Nibdew b’investigazzjoni sintetika ta’ dan l-approċċ imbagħad napplikaw l-approċċ għall-immudellar interattiv ta’ suġġetti fi studju tal-utent u nqabblu ma’ approċċi interattivi u mhux interattivi. L-ankri tat-tandem huma aktar mgħaġġla u intwittivi minn approċċi interattivi eżistenti.', 'no': 'Interaktiv temamodeller er kraftige verktøy for dei som forsøker å forstå store tekstsamlingar. Det eksisterande interaktive temamodellering som er basert på prøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøver å skalera Ankormetodar som brukar ei enkelt ord for å identifisera eit emne, tilbyr farten nødvendig for interaktivt arbeid, men manglar både ein mekanisme for å injesera førre kunnskap og manglar det intuitive semantikken nødvendig for brukarapprogramma. Vi foreslår kombinasjonar av ord som anker, som går over eksisterande enkelt ordanker-algoritme-ein tilnærming vi kallar «Tandem Anchors». Vi startar med eit syntetisk undersøking av denne tilnærminga og så brukar tilnærminga til interaktiv temamodellering i ein brukarstudie og samanliknar det med interaktive og ikkje interaktive tilnærmingar. Tandem-ankorar er raskare og mer intuitive enn eksisterande interaktive tilnærmingar.', 'kk': 'Интерактивті нақыштар үлгілері үлкен мәтін жинақтарын түсіну үшін күшті құралдар. Бірақ, бар мәліметтерді баптау негізінде интерактивті нақышты модельдіру үлкен деректер жиындарының масштабына керек болады. Тақырыпты бірге анықтау үшін бір сөз қолданатын әдістер интерактивті жұмыс үшін қажетті жылдамдығын көрсетеді, бірақ алдыңғы білім инжекциялау және пайдаланушыларға қажетті интерактивті қолданбалар үшін қажетті инт Біз бір сөздердің тіркелгілерін бір тіркелгі сөздердің алгоритмдерінің артындағы сөздердің тіркелгілерін ұсынамыз. Біз "Тандем Анхорлар" деп аталамыз. Біз осы тәсілді синтетикалық зерттеуден бастап, пайдаланушылардың зерттеулерінде интерактивті нақышты модельгенге қарсы қолданып, оны интерактивті және интерактивті емес арқылы салыстырып, са Тандемдің шаршылары бар интерактивті келесінен тез және интуитивті.', 'sr': 'Interaktivni modeli teme su moćni alat za one koji žele razumjeti velike kolekcije teksta. Međutim, postojeće interaktivno modeliranje tema na osnovu uzoraka, loše se približava velikim setima podataka. Uspori metode, koje koriste jednu reč za jedinstvenu identifikaciju teme, nude brzinu potrebnu za interaktivni rad, ali nedostaje mehanizam za injekciju prije znanja i nedostaje intuitivne semantike potrebne za aplikacije koje se suočavaju sa korisnicima. Predlažemo kombinaciju reèi kao sidra, preko postojeæih algoritma sidra, pristupa koji zovemo "Tandem Anchors". Počeli smo sa sintetičkom istragom ovog pristupa, zatim primjenjujemo pristup interaktivnom modelima tema u studiji korisnika i usporedimo ga sa interaktivnim i ne interaktivnim pristupima. Tandemski sidri su brži i intuitivniji od postojećih interaktivnih pristupa.', 'ro': 'Modelele interactive de subiecte sunt instrumente puternice pentru cei care caută să înțeleagă colecții mari de text. Cu toate acestea, abordările existente de modelare interactivă a subiectelor bazate pe eșantionare se scalează slab la seturi de date mari. Metodele de ancorare, care folosesc un singur cuvânt pentru a identifica în mod unic un subiect, oferă viteza necesară pentru munca interactivă, dar lipsesc atât un mecanism de injectare a cunoștințelor anterioare, cât și lipsesc semantica intuitivă necesară pentru aplicațiile orientate spre utilizator. Propunem combinații de cuvinte ca ancore, mergând dincolo de algoritmii existenți de ancoră cu un singur cuvânt - o abordare pe care o numim "ancore tandem". Începem cu o investigare sintetică a acestei abordări, apoi aplicăm abordarea modelării subiectelor interactive într-un studiu utilizator și o comparăm cu abordările interactive și non-interactive. Ancoarele tandem sunt mai rapide și mai intuitive decât abordările interactive existente.', 'mn': 'Интерактив сэдвийн загварууд нь том хэмжээсүүдийг ойлгохын тулд хүчтэй хэрэгсэл юм. Гэвч, суурь жишээн дээрх интерактив сэдэв загварын загвар нь том өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр зөвхөн зөвхөн тодорхойлдог. Нэг үг ганц сэдвийг ганц тодорхойлж ашигладаг арга нь интерактив ажилд хэрэгтэй хурдыг санал болгоно. Гэхдээ өмнө мэдлэгийг инжекцийн механизм аль аль аль аль нь байхгүй, хэрэглэгчийн тусламжтайгаар хэрэглэгчийн хэрэглээнд хэрэглэгдэх Бид "Тандем Анхор" гэж нэрлэж байгаа нэг үг анхор алгоритмыг дахин дахин илүү олон үгийг анхор гэж нэрлэж байна. Бид энэ арга хэмжээний синтетик судалгаагаар эхлээд хэрэглэгчийн судалгаанд интерактив сэдэв загварын загварыг ашиглаж, интерактив болон интерактив бус арга загвартай харьцуулж байна. Тандемийн дагуулууд орших интерактив арга баримтуудаас илүү хурдан, илүү ойлгомжтой.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ විදේශ මොඩේල්ස් තමයි පාළුවේ ලොකු සම්බන්ධතාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න හැකි උපකරණය. නමුත්, තියෙන්නේ සැම්ප්ලින් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපයක් විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපයක් ලොකු දත්ත සැට් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන් ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වචන සංවිධානයක් ඇන්කර් විදියට, තියෙන එකම වචන ඇන්කර් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට පැනලා යන්න, අපි ටැන්ඩ අපි මේ විදියට සංවිධානය පරීක්ෂණයක් පටන් ගත්තා ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ටැන්ඩේම් ඇන්කෝර්ස් වඩා වේගයෙන් වඩා වේගයෙන් ඉන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ.', 'so': 'Tusaalada waxqabadka ah ee macluumaadku waa qalabka xoogga leh, kuwaas oo doonaya inay gartaan waxyaabo badan oo qoraal ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaale-sameynta oo ku qoran tusaale-sameynta sameynta, waxay u baahan yihiin samooyin badan. Midabka caadiga ah oo u isticmaalaya hadal keliya si aan u gaar ah u aqoonsado mada, waxaad bixisaa dhaqdhaqaaq loo baahan yahay shaqada interactive, laakiin uma baahnid meymisyo ku saxeysta aqoonta horay iyo baahida cilmiga u baahan ee loo baahan yahay codsiga wejiyada ee isticmaalka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa isku xiriir hadal ah oo ah qalabka, iyadoo ka dhaafaya qoraal-horumar oo kaliya ah, taas oo ah qaab aan u magacaabno Tandem Anchors. We begin with a synthetic investigation of this approach then apply the approach to interactive topic modeling in a user study and compare it to interactive and non-interactive approaches.  Tandem waxay u dhaqso badan yihiin dhaqso iyo faa’iido badan yihiin meelaha ay jiraan.', 'sv': 'Interaktiva ämnesmodeller är kraftfulla verktyg för dem som vill förstå stora textsamlingar. Dock skalas befintliga samplingsbaserade interaktiva ämnesmodelleringsmetoder dåligt till stora datamängder. Anchor metoder, som använder ett enda ord för att unikt identifiera ett ämne, erbjuder den hastighet som krävs för interaktivt arbete, men saknar både en mekanism för att injicera förkunskaper och saknar den intuitiva semantik som behövs för användarinriktade applikationer. Vi föreslår kombinationer av ord som ankare, som går bortom befintliga enstaka ordankaralgoritmer – ett tillvägagångssätt vi kallar "Tandem ankare". Vi börjar med en syntetisk undersökning av detta tillvägagångssätt och tillämpar sedan tillvägagångssättet för interaktiv ämnesmodellering i en användarstudie och jämför det med interaktiva och icke-interaktiva tillvägagångssätt. Tandemankare är snabbare och mer intuitiva än befintliga interaktiva tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': "உள்ளிருக்கும் தலைப்பு மாதிரிகள் உரையின் பெரிய தொகுப்புகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள முயற்சிக்கும் கரு ஆனால், இருக்கும் மாதிரி சார்ந்த இணைப்பு தலைப்பு மாதிரி முறைமையை பெரிய தரவு அமைப்புகளுக்கு குறைவாக உள ஒரே வார்த்தையை தனியாக அடையாளம் செய்ய ஒரு வார்த்தையை பயன்படுத்தி, இடைவெளிச்செயல்பாட்டிற்கு தேவையான வேகத்தை வழங்கு நாங்கள் ஒரே வார்த்தை நிறுவனம் முறைமைக்கு மேற்கு செல்லும் வார்த்தைகளின் இணைப்புகளை நிரூபிக்கிறோம் 'டான்டாம்  நாம் இந்த செயல்பாட்டின் ஒரு கூட்டிணைப்பு தேடுதலை ஆரம்பிக்கிறோம் பின்னர் ஒரு பயனர் படிப்பில் உள்ள நடிகர் தலைப்பு மாதிரியை பயன்படு இருக்கும் இடைவெளி செயல்பாடுகளை விட வேகமாக மற்றும் அதிகமாக இருக்கிறது.", 'pl': 'Interaktywne modele tematów są potężnymi narzędziami dla tych, którzy chcą zrozumieć duże zbiory tekstu. Jednak istniejące interaktywne podejścia do modelowania tematów oparte na próbkach są słabo skalowane do dużych zbiorów danych. Metody kotwiczenia, które używają jednego słowa do unikalnej identyfikacji tematu, oferują szybkość potrzebną do interaktywnej pracy, ale brakują zarówno mechanizmu wstrzykiwania wiedzy wcześniej, jak i intuicyjnej semantyki potrzebnej do aplikacji skierowanych do użytkownika. Proponujemy kombinacje słów jako kotwicy, wykraczające poza istniejące algorytmy kotwicy pojedynczego słowa – podejście, które nazywamy "kotwicami tandemowymi". Zaczynamy od syntetycznego badania tego podejścia, następnie stosujemy podejście do interaktywnego modelowania tematów w badaniu użytkownika i porównujemy je do interaktywnych i nieinteraktywnych podejść. Kotwice tandemowe są szybsze i bardziej intuicyjne niż istniejące interaktywne podejścia.', 'ur': 'ان لوگوں کے لئے جو بہت بڑی جماعتیں لکھنے کی تلاش کررہے ہیں ان کے لئے طاقتور ابزار ہیں۔ However, existing sampling-based interactive topic modeling approaches poorly to scale to large data sets. ایک ٹوپ کی پہچان کرنے کے لئے ایک کلمه کا استعمال کرتا ہے، ایک ٹوپ کی پہچان کرنے کے لئے ایک ٹوپ کے لئے ضرورت کی गति پیش کرتا ہے لیکن پہلے کے علم کے ذریعہ دو مکانیسی کے لائق ہیں اور کارساز کے سامنے ضرورت کی ضرورت کی ضرورت کی ضرورت کی ضرورت کی ضرورت کی سیمنٹیک ہم کلمات کی جمع کریں گے ایک کلمات آنچر الگوریتم سے زیادہ گزر رہے ہیں، ایک طریقہ سے ہم "تنڈم آنچر" کہتے ہیں. ہم اس طریقے کے ایک سینٹیٹیک تحقیق سے شروع کرتے ہیں پھر ایک کارس تحقیق میں انٹراکتیوں ٹوپ موڈلینگ کے لئے طریقے کو لازم کرتے ہیں اور اس کو interactive اور non-interactive approaches سے مقایسہ کرتے ہیں. تنڈم انچر موجود آنٹرنیٹیوں سے زیادہ سریع اور بصیرت سے زیادہ ہیں.', 'uz': 'Interaktiv mavzu modellari matnning katta to ʻplamlarini tushunishni xohlaydigan vositalar. Lekin, bu misol asosida mavjud interaktiv mavzu modeli katta maʼlumot satrlariga qarab qoladi. Name Biz birinchi so\'zlar tashkilotlarini tasavvur qilamiz, "Tandem Anchors" deb ataymiz. Biz bu usulni bir syntetik qidirish bilan boshlamiz, keyin foydalanuvchi o\'qituvchidagi interaktiv mavzu modelini qo\'llash va uni interaktiv va interaktiv boʻlmagan usullarga kamaytirish mumkin. Tandim tugmalari mavjud interaktiv usullardan tez va juda qulay.', 'vi': 'Tương tác về biểu tượng chủ đề là công cụ mạnh mẽ cho những người đang tìm hiểu các tập hợp văn bản lớn. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp tạo mẫu màn hình tương tác đã có lượng kém đối với các nhóm dữ liệu lớn. Phương pháp Neo, dùng chỉ một từ để xác định một chủ đề độc đáo, mang đến tốc độ cần thiết cho công việc tương tác, nhưng còn thiếu cả cơ chế cung cấp kiến thức trước và thiếu ngữ pháp nhạy bén cần thiết cho các ứng dụng có mặt người dùng. Chúng tôi đề nghị kết hợp các từ để làm tác giả, vượt ra các thuật toán neo bằng một từ tồn tại, một cách chúng tôi gọi là "Tandem Anchors." Chúng ta bắt đầu với một cuộc nghiên cứu tổng hợp về phương pháp này rồi áp dụng phương pháp tạo mẫu về tài liệu tương tác trong một nghiên cứu người dùng và so sánh nó với các phương pháp tương tác và không tương tác. Cột Tandem còn nhanh hơn và dễ hiểu hơn các phương pháp tương tác hiện tại.', 'nl': "Interactieve topic modellen zijn krachtige tools voor mensen die grote collecties tekst willen begrijpen. Bestaande op sampling gebaseerde interactieve topic modelling benaderingen schalen echter slecht naar grote datasets. Anchor methodes, die één woord gebruiken om een onderwerp uniek te identificeren, bieden de snelheid die nodig is voor interactief werk, maar missen zowel een mechanisme om voorkennis te injecteren als ontbreekt de intuïtieve semantiek die nodig is voor gebruikersgerichte toepassingen. We stellen combinaties van woorden voor als ankers, die verder gaan dan bestaande single word anker algoritmes – een aanpak die we 'Tandem Anchors' noemen. We beginnen met een synthetisch onderzoek van deze aanpak en passen de aanpak toe op interactieve topic modelling in een gebruikersstudie en vergelijken deze met interactieve en niet-interactieve benaderingen. Tandemankers zijn sneller en intuïtiever dan bestaande interactieve benaderingen.", 'bg': 'Интерактивните тематични модели са мощни инструменти за тези, които искат да разберат големи колекции от текст. Съществуващите базирани на извадка интерактивни подходи за моделиране на темата обаче се мащабират слабо до големи набори от данни. Методите на котва, които използват една дума за уникално идентифициране на тема, предлагат скоростта, необходима за интерактивна работа, но нямат както механизъм за инжектиране на предишни знания, така и интуитивната семантика, необходима за приложения, насочени към потребителя. Предлагаме комбинации от думи като котви, които надхвърлят съществуващите алгоритми за котва на една дума – подход, който наричаме "тандемни котви". Започваме със синтетично изследване на този подход, след което прилагаме подхода към интерактивно моделиране на темата в потребителско проучване и го сравняваме с интерактивни и неинтерактивни подходи. Тандемните котви са по-бързи и по-интуитивни от съществуващите интерактивни подходи.', 'de': 'Interaktive Themenmodelle sind leistungsstarke Werkzeuge für diejenigen, die große Textsammlungen verstehen möchten. Bisherige sampling-basierte interaktive Themenmodellierungsansätze skalieren jedoch schlecht für große Datensätze. Ankermethoden, die ein einzelnes Wort verwenden, um ein Thema eindeutig zu identifizieren, bieten die Geschwindigkeit, die für interaktives Arbeiten erforderlich ist, aber es fehlt sowohl an einem Mechanismus, um Vorwissen zu vermitteln, als auch an der intuitiven Semantik, die für benutzerorientierte Anwendungen erforderlich ist. Wir schlagen Kombinationen von Wörtern als Anker vor, die über bestehende Single Word Anker Algorithmen hinausgehen – ein Ansatz, den wir "Tandem Anker" nennen. Wir beginnen mit einer synthetischen Untersuchung dieses Ansatzes, wenden den Ansatz zur interaktiven Themenmodellierung in einer Benutzerstudie an und vergleichen ihn mit interaktiven und nicht-interaktiven Ansätzen. Tandemanker sind schneller und intuitiver als bestehende interaktive Ansätze.', 'id': "Interactive topic models are powerful tools for those seeking to understand large collections of text.  Namun, pemodelan topik interaktif berdasarkan sampel yang ada mendekati skala yang buruk ke set data besar. Metode ikatan, yang menggunakan satu kata untuk mengidentifikasi topik unik, menawarkan kecepatan yang diperlukan untuk kerja interaktif tetapi kekurangan kedua mekanisme untuk menyuntik pengetahuan sebelumnya dan kekurangan semantik intuitif yang diperlukan untuk aplikasi yang menghadapi pengguna. Kami mengusulkan kombinasi kata sebagai jangkar, melebihi algoritma jangkar kata tunggal yang ada-sebuah pendekatan yang kita sebut 'Tandem Anchors'... Kita mulai dengan penyelidikan sintetis pendekatan ini kemudian menerapkan pendekatan untuk model topik interaktif dalam penelitian pengguna dan membandingkannya dengan pendekatan interaktif dan tidak interaktif. Tandem anchor lebih cepat dan lebih intuitif daripada pendekatan interaktif yang ada.", 'hr': 'Interaktivni modeli teme su moćni alat za one koji pokušavaju razumjeti velike kolekcije teksta. Međutim, postojeći interaktivni modeliranje teme na osnovu uzoraka, loše se širi pristupi velikim podacima. Uspori metode koje koriste jednu riječ za jedinstvenu identifikaciju teme, nude brzinu potrebnu za interaktivni rad, ali nedostaje mehanizam za injekciju prije znanja i nedostaje intuitivne semantike potrebne za primjene koje se suočavaju s korisnicima. Predlažemo kombinaciju riječi kao sidra, preko postojećih jedinstvenih riječi anchor algoritma - pristup kojim zovemo "Tandem Anchors". Počinjemo sintetičkom istragom tog pristupa, zatim primjenjujemo pristup interaktivnom modelima teme u ispitivanju korisnika i uspoređujemo ga interaktivnim i ne interaktivnim pristupima. Tandem sidri su brži i intuitivniji od postojećih interaktivnih pristupa.', 'sw': "Mradi wa mada za kati ni nyenzo yenye nguvu kwa wale wanaojaribu kuelewa mkusanyiko mkubwa wa maandishi. However, existing sampling-based interactive topic modeling approaches scale poorly to large data sets.  Utawala wa nyakati, ambao unatumia neno moja kwa ajili ya kutambua mada, kutoa haraka inayohitajika kwa ajili ya kazi za kati lakini ukosefu wa mfumo wa kuingiza maarifa kabla na ukosefu wa mipango inayohitajika kwa matumizi yanayokabiliana na watumiaji. Tunazipendekeza muunganiko wa maneno kama nguzo, kuondoka zaidi ya miungo ya neno moja ya kuwepo kwa maneno yanayoitwa 'Tandem Anchors'. Tunaanza kwa uchunguzi wa pamoja wa mbinu hii, kisha tumia mbinu za kutengeneza mifano ya mada inayohusiana katika utafiti wa mtumiaji na kulinganisha na njia za kati na zisizo na uhusiano. Mpango wa Tandem ni haraka na wenye ufanisi zaidi ya njia za kati.", 'ko': "대량의 텍스트를 이해하려는 사람들에게 인터랙티브 테마 모델은 강력한 도구이다.그러나 기존의 표본 추출을 바탕으로 하는 상호작용식 주제 모델링 방법은 대형 데이터 집합의 신축성에 비교적 떨어진다.정착 방법은 한 단어를 사용하여 주제를 유일하게 식별하고 상호작용에 필요한 속도를 제공하지만 선험지식을 주입하는 메커니즘도 부족하고 사용자를 대상으로 하는 응용 프로그램에 필요한 직관적인 의미도 부족하다.우리는 단어의 조합을 닻으로 삼아 기존의 단어 닻 알고리즘을 초월하여'직렬 닻'이라고 부른다.우리는 먼저 이런 방법에 대해 종합적인 연구를 한 다음에 이런 방법을 사용자 연구에서의 상호작용 주제 모델링에 응용하고 이를 상호작용식과 비상호작용식 방법과 비교한다.직렬 닻은 기존의 상호작용 방법보다 빠르고 직관적이다.", 'da': "Interaktive emnemodeller er kraftfulde værktøjer til dem, der søger at forstå store samlinger af tekst. Eksisterende stikprøveudtagningsbaserede interaktive emnemodelleringsmetoder skalerer dog dårligt til store datasæt. Anchor metoder, der bruger et enkelt ord til entydigt at identificere et emne, giver den hastighed, der er nødvendig for interaktivt arbejde, men mangler både en mekanisme til at injicere forudgående viden og mangler den intuitive semantik, der er nødvendig for brugervenlige applikationer. Vi foreslår kombinationer af ord som ankre, der går ud over eksisterende enkelt ord anker algoritmer - en tilgang vi kalder 'Tandem ankre'. Vi begynder med en syntetisk undersøgelse af denne tilgang og anvender derefter tilgangen til interaktiv emne modellering i en brugerundersøgelse og sammenligner den med interaktive og ikke-interaktive tilgange. Tandem ankre er hurtigere og mere intuitive end eksisterende interaktive tilgange.", 'fa': 'مدل موضوع متفاوتی ابزارهای قدرتمند برای کسانی هستند که می\u200cخواهند جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای بزرگ متن را درک کنند. با این حال، نمونه\u200cبندی موجود موجود موجود موجود با نمونه\u200cبندی موجود به اندازه\u200cی بد به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ نزدیک می\u200cشود. روش\u200cهایی که از یک کلمه استفاده می\u200cکنند برای شناسایی یک موضوع تنها، سرعتی که نیاز دارد برای کارهای interactive را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، ولی برای تزریق دانش پیشینیان، هر دو مکانیسی برای تزریق کردن دانش پیشینیان و کمبود سیمانتیک\u200cهای بی\u200cنظیری که نیاز دارد برای کارهایی که ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم ترکیبش کلمات به عنوان لنگر، فراتر از الگوریتم\u200cهای لنگر یک کلمه وجود دارد، به عنوان یک دستور "آنگر\u200cهای تند" می\u200cگوییم. ما با تحقیقات سناتیک این روش شروع می\u200cکنیم، سپس روش را به مدل\u200cسازی موضوع interactive در یک مطالعه کاربر برقرار می\u200cکنیم و آن را با روش\u200cهای interactive و بی\u200cinteractive مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. لنگرهای تند سریع\u200cتر و دیده\u200cتر از نزدیک\u200cهای interactive موجود هستند.', 'af': "Interaktiewe onderwerp modele is kragtige nutsprogramme vir die wat soek om groot versameling van teks te verstaan. Alhoewel, bestaande versameling-gebaseerde interaktiewe onderwerp modellering toekom skaal slegs na groot data stelle. Anker metodes, wat 'n enkele woord gebruik om 'n onderwerp unieke te identifiseer, bring die spoed wat nodig is vir interaktiewe werk, maar misluk beide 'n mekanisme om vooraf kennis te inprop en die intuitiewe semantieke wat nodig is vir gebruiker-aangesig toepassings. Ons voorstel kombinasies van woorde as ankers, gaan buite bestaande enkele woord anker algoritme, 'n toegang noem ons 'Tandem Anchors'. Ons begin met 'n sintetiese ondersoek van hierdie toegang dan toewend die toegang na interaktiewe onderwerp modeling in 'n gebruiker studie en vergelyk dit met interaktiewe en nie-interaktiewe toegang. Tandem ankers is vinniger en meer intuitief as bestaande interaktiewe toegang.", 'hy': "Ինտերակտիվ թեմային մոդելները հզոր գործիքներ են նրանց համար, ովքեր ուզում են հասկանալ տեքստի մեծ հավաքածուներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող նմուշներից հիմնված ինտերակտիվ թեմայի մոդելավորման մոտեցումները վատ են ընդլայնվում մեծ տվյալների համակարգերին: Անկորային մեթոդները, որոնք միայն մեկ բառ են օգտագործում թեման բացահայտելու համար, առաջարկում են ինտերակտիվ աշխատանքի համար անհրաժեշտ արագություն, բայց բացակայում են նախորդ գիտելիքների ներարտադրման մեխանիզմ և անհրաժեշտ ինտուիտիվ սեմանտիկ օգտագործողների We propose combinations of words as anchors, going beyond existing single word anchor algorithms-an approach we call 'Tandem Anchors'.  We begin with a synthetic investigation of this approach then apply the approach to interactive topic modeling in a user study and compare it to interactive and non-interactive approaches.  Tandem anchors are faster and more intuitive than existing interactive approaches.", 'sq': "Modelet e temës interaktive janë mjete të fuqishme për ata që kërkojnë të kuptojnë koleksione të mëdha teksti. However, existing sampling-based interactive topic modeling approaches scale poorly to large data sets.  Metodat e lidhjes, të cilat përdorin një fjalë të vetme për të identifikuar unikisht një temë, ofrojnë shpejtësinë e nevojshme për punën interaktive por mungon si një mekanizëm për të injektuar njohuri të mëparshme dhe mungon semantikë intuitive të nevojshme për aplikimet e përdoruesve. We propose combinations of words as anchors, going beyond existing single word anchor algorithms-an approach we call 'Tandem Anchors'.  Ne fillojmë me një hetim sintetik të kësaj qasje pastaj zbatojmë qasjen për modelimin interaktiv të temës në një studim përdorues dhe e krahasojmë me qasjet interaktive dhe jo interaktive. Tandem anchors are faster and more intuitive than existing interactive approaches.", 'bn': 'ইন্টারেক্টিভেট বিষয় মডেলগুলো বিশাল টেক্সট সম্পর্কে বুঝতে চাচ্ছে তাদের জন্য শক্তিশালী টুল। তবে বিদ্যমান সামাইলিং-ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু মডেলিং মোডেলিং বিশাল তথ্য সেটের ক্ষেত্রে খুব কম। ব্যবহারকারীদের মুখোমুখি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় ব্যবস্থার জন্য একটি শব্দ ব্যবহার করার জন্য একটি শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। আমরা বিদ্যমান এক শব্দ অ্যাঙ্কোর অ্যালগোরিদমের বাইরে শব্দের সংযোগের প্রস্তাব করি, যা আমরা তান্দেম অ্যাঙ্কোর নামে ডাকি। আমরা এই প্রযুক্তির একটি সিন্টেটিক তদন্ত শুরু করি তারপর একটি ব্যবহারকারীর গবেষণায় ইন্টারেক্টিভ বিষয়ক মডেলের প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করে তার বিদ্যমান ইন্টারেক্টিভ ক্ষেত্রের চেয়ে তান্দেম এঙ্গোর দ্রুত এবং বেশী বুদ্ধিমান।', 'am': 'የመካከለኛ ጉዳይ ምሳሌዎች የጽሑፉን ብዙዎች ለማስተዋል ለሚፈልጉ ኃይለኛ መሣሪያዎች ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሚኖረው ምሳሌ በመስመር ላይ የተሰነጠቀው የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢ ምሳሌ ወደ ትልቁ የዳታ መስመር መጠቀሚያ በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ የመስኮት ዘዴዎች፣ አንዲት ቃላት ለጉዳዩ እንዲገልጽ የሚጠይቅ ቃላት፣ ለinteractive ሥራ የሚያስፈልገውን ፈጥኖ ያቀርባሉ፤ ነገር ግን አስቀድሞ እውቀትን ለማስነስ እና ለuser-facing ፕሮግራሞች የሚያስፈልገውን አስተያየት የሚያስፈልገውን የስሜቲካ መጠቀም አያስፈልግም፡፡ የአንዲት ቃላት "Tandem Anchors" የሚል የአንዲት ቃላት ግንኙነት ማውጣት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በተቃራኒ ምርመራ እናጀምራለን፡፡ በተንዶላዊ ጥያቄ ከመስመር ይልቅ ፈጥኖ ይኖራል፡፡', 'az': 'İnterактив məsələlər böyük mətn koleksiyonlarını anlamaq istəyənlər üçün güclü vasitələrdir. Halbuki, mövcud nümunələr tabanlı interaktif məsələlər modelləri böyük məlumat qurularına zəif tərəfdə yaxınlaşır. Bir məsələni təkrar tanımlamaq üçün təkrar sözü istifadə edən təkrar metodları təkrar edir, interaktif işlər üçün ehtiyacı olan hızı təklif edir, amma əvvəlki bilgi təklif etmək və istifadəçiləri ilə qarşılaşan proqramlar üçün ehtiyacı olan intuitiv semantik olmaq üçün hər ikisinin mehanizmini yo Biz sözlərin birləşdirilməsini təklif edirik, həmin sözlərin ancora algoritmi ilə "Tandem Anchors" adlandırırıq. Biz bu metodların sintetik xəbərdarlığıyla başlayırıq, sonra istifadəçi oxumasında interaktif məsələlər modelini uygulayır və onu interaktif və interaktif tərzlərlə karşılaşdırırıq. Tandem ankörləri mevcut interaktiv yaxınlıqlardan daha hızlı və daha intuitivdir.', 'bs': 'Interaktivni modeli teme su moćni alat za one koji žele razumjeti velike kolekcije teksta. Međutim, postojeći interaktivni modeling tema na osnovu uzoraka, loše se mjeri pristupa velikim setima podataka. Usporite metode, koje koriste jednu riječ za jedinstvenu identifikaciju teme, nude brzinu potrebnu za interaktivni rad, ali nedostaje mehanizam injekcije prije znanja i nedostaje intuitivne semantike potrebne za primjene koje se suočavaju s korisnicima. Predlažemo kombinaciju riječi kao sidra, preko postojećih algoritma sidra, pristup koji zovemo "Tandem Anchors". Počeli smo sa sintetičkom istragom ovog pristupa, zatim primjenjujemo pristup interaktivnom modelima tema u studiji korisnika i uspoređujemo ga sa interaktivnim i ne interaktivnim pristupima. Anđemski sidri su brži i intuitivniji od postojećih interaktivnih pristupa.', 'cs': 'Interaktivní tématické modely jsou výkonnými nástroji pro ty, kteří chtějí porozumět velkým sbírkám textu. Stávající interaktivní modelování témat založené na vzorkování se však špatně škálují na velké datové sady. Kotevní metody, které používají jediné slovo k jedinečné identifikaci tématu, nabízejí rychlost potřebnou pro interaktivní práci, ale postrádají mechanismus pro vstřikování předchozích znalostí a postrádají intuitivní sémantiku potřebnou pro aplikace orientované na uživatele. Navrhujeme kombinace slov jako kotvy, které překračují existující algoritmy kotvy jednoho slova – přístup, který nazýváme Tandem kotvy. Začínáme syntetickým zkoumáním tohoto přístupu, pak aplikujeme přístup k interaktivnímu modelování témat v uživatelské studii a porovnáme ho s interaktivními a neininteraktivními přístupy. Tandemové kotvy jsou rychlejší a intuitivnější než existující interaktivní přístupy.', 'et': 'Interaktiivsed teemamudelid on võimsad tööriistad neile, kes soovivad mõista suuri tekstikogusid. Olemasolevad valimipõhised interaktiivsed teemamodelleerimise lähenemisviisid ulatuvad siiski halvasti suurte andmekogumite jaoks. Ankrumeetodid, mis kasutavad ühte sõna teema unikaalseks tuvastamiseks, pakuvad interaktiivseks tööks vajalikku kiirust, kuid puuduvad nii eelnevate teadmiste süstimise mehhanismist kui ka intuitiivsest semantikast, mida on vaja kasutajapoolsete rakenduste jaoks. Pakume ankruna välja sõnade kombinatsioone, mis lähevad kaugemale olemasolevatest ühe sõna ankrualgoritmidest – lähenemisviisist, mida nimetame tandemankuriks. Alustame selle lähenemisviisi sünteetilise uurimisega, seejärel rakendame interaktiivse teemamodelleerimise lähenemisviisi kasutajauuringus ja võrdleme seda interaktiivsete ja mitteinfektiivsete lähenemisviisidega. Tandemankrud on kiiremad ja intuitiivsemad kui olemasolevad interaktiivsed lähenemisviisid.', 'tr': 'Etkile힊imli tema nusgalar uly metin 첵ygnaklaryny d체힊체nmek 체챌in g체첵챌li 챌arpy힊lar. 횦철ne, bar n채me 체챌in ta첵첵arlanan etkile힊imli tema modlemesi uly maglumat d체z체mlerinde 첵akyn 첵agda첵a golla첵ar. Bir tema be첵leki s철z체 tanamak 체챌in 첵eke s철z체 ullan첵an t채zelikleri tassyklap ed첵채n 첵철ne i힊i etkile힊ikli 체챌in gerek tizlikleri teklip et, emma 철흫ki bilgi t채ze etmek 체챌in ikisi hem mekanismi 첵ok we ullan첵an uygulamalar 체챌in gerek terjibe semantikleri 첵ok. Biz "Tandem Anchorlar" di첵ip atlandyran s철zlerin birle힊mesini teklip edip g철r첵채ris. Biz bu 첵az힊y흫 sintetik barlagy bilen ba힊ladyk we so흫ra ulanylary흫 철wrenmesinde etkile힊imli tema modellemesine gollan첵arys we muny etkile힊imli we etkile힊imli 첵az힊ylara kar힊캇la힊tyrsak. Tandem gur챌uklary bolan etkile힊imli 첵akynla힊dyrmalardan has 챌alt we n채hili d체힊체njelidir.', 'fi': 'Interaktiiviset teemamallit ovat tehokkaita työkaluja niille, jotka haluavat ymmärtää suuria tekstikokoelmia. Nykyiset näytteenottopohjaiset interaktiiviset teemamallinnukset skaalautuvat kuitenkin huonosti suuriin tietokokonaisuuksiin. Ankkurimenetelmät, joissa käytetään yhtä sanaa aiheen yksilölliseen tunnistamiseen, tarjoavat vuorovaikutteiseen työhön tarvittavan nopeuden, mutta niillä ei ole sekä mekanismia, jolla voidaan lisätä aikaisempaa tietoa, että intuitiivista semantiikkaa, jota tarvitaan käyttäjäkohtaisissa sovelluksissa. Ehdotamme sanojen yhdistelmiä ankkureiksi, jotka ylittävät olemassa olevat yhden sanan ankkurialgoritmit – lähestymistapaa, jota kutsumme "tandemankkureiksi". Aloitamme synteettisellä tutkimuksella tästä lähestymistavasta, jonka jälkeen sovellamme lähestymistapaa interaktiiviseen aihemallinnukseen käyttäjätutkimuksessa ja vertaamme sitä interaktiivisiin ja ei-interaktiivisiin lähestymistapoihin. Tandem-ankkurit ovat nopeampia ja intuitiivisempia kuin olemassa olevat interaktiiviset lähestymistavat.', 'ca': "Els models interactius són eines poderoses per a aquells que busquen entendre grans col·leccions de text. No obstant això, els enfocaments existents de modelació interactiva de temes basats en la mostra s'escalen malament a grans conjunts de dades. Els mètodes d'ankle, que utilitzen una sola paraula per identificar un tema únicament, ofereixen la velocitat requerida per a treballar interactivament però careixen tant d'un mecanisme per injectar coneixements anteriors com de la semàntica intuïtiva requerida per aplicacions que s'enfronten a l'usuari. Proposem combinacions de paraules com a ancores, anant més enllà dels algoritmes d'ancora d'una sola paraula existents-un enfocament que anomenem 'Ancors de Tandem'. Comencem amb una investigació sintètica d'aquest enfocament i després aplicam l'enfocament a la modelació interactiva de temes en un estudi d'usuari i el comparem amb enfocaments interactius i no interactius. Tandem anchors are faster and more intuitive than existing interactive approaches.", 'jv': 'Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngawe Perintah-ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé nggawe gerangé nggawe tema iki, nik nggawe barang dhéwé nggawe gerangé interaké karo sistem sing bisa nguasai sistem kanggo ngerasakno awak dhéwé karo akeh sistem sing bisa dumadhi iki sampek sistem sing dianggap nggawe sistem sing bisa dumadhi akeh 1.2.3 Awak dhéwé mulai karo akeh sinantesik kanggo diangkat iki, ngubah aplikasi dadi kanggo modèl tema interaksi kanggo ingkang alih basa gambar nggawe nyimpen karo pawaran interaksi lan ora interaksi. Tandém laké gadhah luwih lan tuwa kuwi nggawe', 'he': 'מודלים נושאים אינטראקטיביים הם כלים חזקים לאלה שמחפשים להבין אוסף גדול של טקסט. בכל אופן, גישות דוגמאות נושאים אינטראקטיביות מבוססות על דגימות קיימות מגוונות גרועות לקבוצות נתונים גדולות. שיטות הקשור, אשר משתמשות במילה אחת לזהות נושא יחיד, מציעות את המהירות הנדרשת לעבודה אינטראקטיבית אבל חסרות גם מנגנון להזריק ידע קודם ולחסר הסמנטיקה האינטואיטיבית הנדרשת ליישומים מול משתמשים. אנחנו מציעים שילובים של מילים כעוגורים, עוברים מעבר לאלגוריטמים של עוגורים מילים אחת קיימים - גישה שאנחנו קוראים "עוגורים טנדם". אנו מתחילים עם חקירה סינטטית של הגישה הזו ואז משתמשים בגישה לדוגמה נושאית אינטראקטיבית במחקר משתמש ולהשוות אותה לגישות אינטראקטיביות ולא אינטראקטיביות. עוגורי טנדם מהירים יותר ויותר אינטואיטיביים מאשר גישות אינטראקטיביות קיימות.', 'bo': 'Interactive topic models are powerful tools for those who seek to understand large collections of text. ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་sampling་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་གནད་དོན འདིའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་གཅིག་སྤྱད་ནས་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་ནང་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་བཅས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ་ལས་ སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འདི་ཚོར་བ རྒྱ་མཚོན་གྱི་སྐོར་གཟུགས་རིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་ལས་ལྡན་དང་ཐད་ཚོར་ཆེ་བ་རེད།', 'sk': 'Interaktivni tematski modeli so zmogljiva orodja za tiste, ki želijo razumeti velike zbirke besedila. Vendar pa obstoječi interaktivni pristopi modeliranja teme, ki temeljijo na vzorčenju, slabo merijo na velike nabore podatkov. Sidrne metode, ki uporabljajo eno samo besedo za edinstveno prepoznavanje teme, ponujajo hitrost, potrebna za interaktivno delo, vendar nimajo mehanizma za vbrizgavanje predhodnega znanja in nimajo intuitivne semantike, potrebne za aplikacije, usmerjene v uporabnika. Kot sidra predlagamo kombinacije besed, ki presegajo obstoječe algoritme sidra z eno besedo – pristop, ki ga imenujemo tandemska sidra. Začnemo s sintetično raziskavo tega pristopa, nato uporabimo pristop k interaktivnemu modeliranju teme v uporabniški študiji in ga primerjamo z interaktivnimi in neaktivnimi pristopi. Tandemska sidra so hitrejša in intuitivnejša od obstoječih interaktivnih pristopov.', 'ha': "@ info: tooltip A lokacin da ake samu'in da aka samu da shi masu sami da ke samar da masu motsi mai amfani da sami masu ƙaranci, ya yi daidai zuwa tsarin data masu girma. Shiryoyin shiryarwa, da za'a yi amfani da wata magana guda dõmin ya gane wani madaidaici, sai ka bãyar da gaggawa wanda aka yi amfani da wa aikin aiki na haɗi, kuma amma yana da manaja dukansu don ya injisa wani zane gaba ga ilmi kuma ba da tsari da ake amfani da wa shiryoyin ayukan mai amfani da shi ba. Tuna goyya da misalin kalmõmi kamar birlikai, da bakin da ke da algoritori guda, da wata hanyoyi da Muke kiran 'Tande AnChors'. Tuna fara ƙidãya ga wannan hanyarwa na haɗi, sa'an nan kuma Muke amfani da mazaɓa zuwa misalin madaidaici masu husũma a cikin wani littafin mai amfani da shi, kuma ka sami shi da hanyoyin masu husũma da bã-interactive. Tandem anchors are faster and more intuitive than existing interactive approaches."}
{'en': 'Apples to Apples : Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'ar': 'من التفاح إلى التفاح: تعلم دلالات الكيانات المشتركة من خلال مهمة الفهم الجديدة', 'es': 'De manzanas a manzanas: aprendizaje de la semántica de las entidades comunes a través de una nueva tarea de comprensión', 'fr': 'Apples to Apples\xa0: Apprentissage de la sémantique des entités communes grâce à une nouvelle tâche de compréhension', 'pt': 'Ma챌찾s para ma챌찾s: aprendendo a sem창ntica de entidades comuns por meio de uma nova tarefa de compreens찾o', 'ja': 'Apples to Apples ：新たな理解タスクを通じて共通のエンティティの意味論を学ぶ', 'zh': '苹果谓苹果:以新学公实体之语义', 'hi': 'सेब के लिए सेब: एक उपन्यास समझ कार्य के माध्यम से आम संस्थाओं के शब्दार्थ सीखना', 'ru': 'Яблоки к яблокам: изучение семантики общих сущностей через новую задачу понимания', 'ga': 'Úlla go Úlla: Séimeantaic Aonáin Choiteanna a Fhoghlaim Trí Thasc Tuisceana Úrscéalta', 'ka': 'პროგრამებისთვის მომხმარება: საერთო ელემენტიკის სმენტიკის შესწავლობა', 'hu': 'Alma az almára: A közös entitások szemantikájának tanulása új értékelési feladaton keresztül', 'it': 'Mele alle mele: imparare la semantica delle entità comuni attraverso un nuovo compito di comprensione', 'el': 'Μήλα σε Μήλα: Μάθηση Σημαντικών Κοινών Οντότητες Μέσα από μια Νέα Εργασία Κατανόησης', 'kk': 'Қолданбаларға қолдану: Жалпы нысандардың семантикалық үйрену', 'ml': 'പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d: നോവല്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയിലൂടെ സെമാന്റിക്സുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mk': 'Јаболка за јаболка: Научи семантика на заедничките ентитети преку нова задача за разбирање', 'lt': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through New Comprehension Task', 'mn': 'Апликт хэрэглэгддэг: Олон Нэгдүүдийн Semantics Learning Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'ms': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'mt': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a New Comprehension Task', 'no': 'Applikasjon for applikasjonar: Læring av semiantikk av felles einingar gjennom ein Novel Comprehension Task', 'sr': 'Aplikacije na Aplikacije: Učenje semantika zajedničkih poduzeća kroz novu kompresiju', 'pl': 'Jabłka do jabłek: Uczenie się semantyki wspólnych podmiotów poprzez nowe zadanie zrozumienia', 'ro': 'Mere pe mere: Învățarea semanticii entităților comune printr-o sarcină nouă de înțelegere', 'si': 'වැඩකරුවන්ට යුද්ධ කරනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය අන්තර්ජාවන් සෙමැන්ටික් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Codsiga codsiga', 'ur': 'کاروباروں کے لئے کاروبار کرتا ہے: نوئل کمپرس ٹاکس کے ذریعہ سیمانٹیکس سکھائی', 'sv': 'Äpplen till äpplen: Att lära sig semantik av gemensamma enheter genom en ny förståelse uppgift', 'ta': 'பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறது: பொதுவான உள்ளீடுகளின் செமான்டிக்ஸ் கற்றுக்கொள்வது நோட்டம் முடிவு செய்த பண', 'vi': 'Táo cho Apple: học hành tinh thần của các loài thông thường qua một nhiệm vụ quy mô tiểu thuyết', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Ябълки към ябълки: изучаване на семантика на общи субекти чрез нова задача за разбиране', 'hr': 'Prijave za aplikacije: Učenje semantika zajedničkih poduzeća kroz novčani zadatak za kompresiju', 'da': 'Æbler til æbler: Læring af semantik af fælles enheder gennem en ny forståelsesopgave', 'nl': 'Apples to Apples: Semantica leren van gemeenschappelijke entiteiten door middel van een nieuwe begrijpingstaak', 'id': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'de': 'Apples to Apples: Semantik gemeinsamer Entitäten durch eine neuartige Verstehensaufgabe lernen', 'fa': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'sw': 'Matumizi ya Apple: Kufundisha Semantics of Common Entries Through a Task of Comprehensive Novel', 'tr': 'Uygulamalar: Umumy Entiteleriň Semantiklerini öwrenmek', 'ko': '사과 대 사과: 새로운 이해 임무를 통해 흔히 볼 수 있는 실체의 의미를 배운다', 'sq': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task', 'am': 'Applications', 'af': 'Toepassing tot toepassings: Leer Semantieke van Gewone Entiteit deur 芒聙聶n Novel komprehensie taak', 'hy': 'Apples to Apples. Սեմանտիկ սովորելը ընդհանուր հասկանալիքների միջոցով', 'az': 'Uyƒüulamalara uyƒüular: Novel Comprehension Taski vasit…ôsil…ô Common Entities Semantics √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'bn': 'অ্যাপলিকেশন- এ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন: একটি নোভেল সম্পূর্ণ কাজের মাধ্যমে সেমান্টিক্স শিখানো', 'ca': "Màles a Màles: Aprendre Semàtics d'Entitats Comunes a través d'una nova tasca de comprensió", 'et': 'Õunad õunadele: tavaliste üksuste semantika õppimine uue arusaamise ülesande kaudu', 'cs': 'Jablka do jablka: Učení se sémantiky společných entit prostřednictvím nového pochopení úlohy', 'fi': 'Apples to Apples: Yhteisten entiteettien semantiikan oppiminen uuden ymmärtämystehtävän avulla', 'bs': 'Aplikacija za Aplikacije: Učenje semantika zajedničkih poduzeća kroz novinski zadatak za kompresiju', 'jv': 'tutorial_basic', 'he': 'תפוחים לתפוחים: ללמוד סמנטיקה של יחידות משותפות באמצעות משימה של הבנה חדשה', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Jabolka v jabolka: učenje semantike skupnih subjektov skozi novo nalogo razumevanja', 'bo': 'Apples to Apples: Learning Semantics of Common Entities Through a Novel Comprehension Task'}
{'en': 'Understanding common entities and their attributes is a primary requirement for any system that comprehends natural language. In order to enable learning about common entities, we introduce a novel machine comprehension task, GuessTwo : given a short paragraph comparing different aspects of two real-world semantically-similar entities, a system should guess what those entities are. Accomplishing this task requires deep language understanding which enables inference, connecting each comparison paragraph to different levels of knowledge about world entities and their attributes. So far we have crowdsourced a dataset of more than 14 K comparison paragraphs comparing entities from a variety of categories such as fruits and animals. We have designed two schemes for evaluation : open-ended, and binary-choice prediction. For benchmarking further progress in the task, we have collected a set of paragraphs as the test set on which human can accomplish the task with an accuracy of 94.2 % on open-ended prediction. We have implemented various models for tackling the task, ranging from semantic-driven to neural models. The semantic-driven approach outperforms the neural models, however, the results indicate that the task is very challenging across the models.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم الكيانات المشتركة وخصائصها مطلبًا أساسيًا لأي نظام يفهم اللغة الطبيعية. من أجل تمكين التعلم عن الكيانات المشتركة ، نقدم مهمة جديدة لفهم الآلة ، GuessTwo: بالنظر إلى فقرة قصيرة تقارن جوانب مختلفة من كيانات متشابهة لغويًا في العالم الحقيقي ، يجب على النظام تخمين ماهية هذه الكيانات. يتطلب إنجاز هذه المهمة فهمًا عميقًا للغة يتيح الاستدلال ، وربط كل فقرة مقارنة بمستويات مختلفة من المعرفة حول الكيانات العالمية وخصائصها. حتى الآن ، قمنا بتعهيد مجموعة بيانات لأكثر من 14 ألف فقرة مقارنة لمقارنة الكيانات من مجموعة متنوعة من الفئات مثل الفواكه والحيوانات. لقد صممنا مخططين للتقييم: التنبؤ المفتوح ، والتنبؤ بالاختيار الثنائي. لقياس المزيد من التقدم في المهمة ، قمنا بتجميع مجموعة من الفقرات كمجموعة اختبار يمكن للإنسان من خلالها إنجاز المهمة بدقة تصل إلى 94.2٪ في التنبؤ المفتوح. لقد قمنا بتنفيذ نماذج مختلفة للتعامل مع المهمة ، بدءًا من النماذج التي تحركها الدلالات إلى النماذج العصبية. يتفوق النهج الدلالي على النماذج العصبية ، ومع ذلك ، تشير النتائج إلى أن المهمة صعبة للغاية عبر النماذج.', 'fr': "La compréhension des entités communes et de leurs attributs est une exigence essentielle pour tout système qui comprend le langage naturel. Afin de permettre l'apprentissage des entités communes, nous introduisons une nouvelle tâche de compréhension automatique, GuestTwo\xa0: étant donné un court paragraphe comparant différents aspects de deux entités sémantiquement similaires dans le monde réel, un système devrait deviner quelles sont ces entités. Pour accomplir cette tâche, il faut une compréhension approfondie du langage qui permet l'inférence, reliant chaque paragraphe de comparaison à différents niveaux de connaissance des entités du monde et de leurs attributs. Jusqu'à présent, nous avons collaboré avec un ensemble de données de plus de 14 000 paragraphes de comparaison comparant des entités de diverses catégories telles que les fruits et les animaux. Nous avons conçu deux schémas d'évaluation\xa0: la prédiction ouverte et la prédiction à choix binaire. Pour évaluer les progrès futurs de la tâche, nous avons rassemblé un ensemble de paragraphes en tant que jeu de test sur lequel l'humain peut accomplir la tâche avec une précision de 94,2\xa0% sur la prédiction ouverte. Nous avons mis en œuvre différents modèles pour aborder cette tâche, allant des modèles axés sur la sémantique aux modèles neuronaux. L'approche axée sur la sémantique surpasse les modèles neuronaux, mais les résultats indiquent que la tâche est très difficile pour tous les modèles.", 'pt': 'Compreender entidades comuns e seus atributos é um requisito primário para qualquer sistema que compreenda a linguagem natural. Para permitir o aprendizado sobre entidades comuns, introduzimos uma nova tarefa de compreensão de máquina, GuessTwo: dado um pequeno parágrafo comparando diferentes aspectos de duas entidades semanticamente semelhantes do mundo real, um sistema deve adivinhar quais são essas entidades. A realização dessa tarefa requer uma compreensão profunda da linguagem que permite a inferência, conectando cada parágrafo de comparação a diferentes níveis de conhecimento sobre entidades do mundo e seus atributos. Até agora, reunimos um conjunto de dados de mais de 14 mil parágrafos de comparação comparando entidades de várias categorias, como frutas e animais. Nós projetamos dois esquemas para avaliação: predição aberta e de escolha binária. Para avaliar o progresso adicional na tarefa, coletamos um conjunto de parágrafos como o conjunto de teste no qual o ser humano pode realizar a tarefa com uma precisão de 94,2% na previsão aberta. Implementamos vários modelos para lidar com a tarefa, desde modelos semânticos até modelos neurais. A abordagem orientada por semântica supera os modelos neurais, no entanto, os resultados indicam que a tarefa é muito desafiadora em todos os modelos.', 'es': 'Entender las entidades comunes y sus atributos es un requisito fundamental para cualquier sistema que comprenda el lenguaje natural. Para permitir el aprendizaje sobre entidades comunes, introducimos una nueva tarea de comprensión de máquinas, GuessTwo: dado un breve párrafo que compara diferentes aspectos de dos entidades semánticamente similares del mundo real, un sistema debe adivinar qué son esas entidades. El logro de esta tarea requiere una comprensión profunda del lenguaje que permita la inferencia, conectando cada párrafo de comparación con diferentes niveles de conocimiento sobre las entidades del mundo y sus atributos. Hasta ahora, hemos creado un conjunto de datos de más de 14 000 párrafos de comparación que comparan entidades de una variedad de categorías, como frutas y animales. Hemos diseñado dos esquemas de evaluación: predicción abierta y de elección binaria. Para evaluar el progreso adicional en la tarea, hemos recopilado un conjunto de párrafos como el conjunto de pruebas en el que los humanos pueden realizar la tarea con una precisión del 94,2% en la predicción abierta. Hemos implementado varios modelos para abordar la tarea, que van desde modelos basados en semántica hasta modelos neuronales. El enfoque basado en la semántica supera a los modelos neuronales, sin embargo, los resultados indican que la tarea es muy desafiante en todos los modelos.', 'ja': '共通のエンティティとその属性を理解することは、自然言語を理解するあらゆるシステムの主要要件です。 共通のエンティティについて学習できるようにするために、私たちは新規の機械理解タスク、GuessTwoを導入します。2つの現実世界の意味的に類似したエンティティの異なる側面を比較する短いパラグラフを考えると、システムはそれらのエンティティが何であるかを推測する必要があります。 このタスクを達成するには、推論を可能にする深い言語理解が必要であり、各比較段落を世界のエンティティとその属性に関する異なるレベルの知識に接続します。 これまで、果物や動物などのさまざまなカテゴリのエンティティを比較する14,000を超える比較パラグラフのデータセットをクラウドソーシングしてきました。 私たちは、オープンエンドとバイナリチョイス予測の2つの評価スキームを設計しました。 タスクのさらなる進捗状況をベンチマークするために、人間が無制限の予測で94.2 ％の精度でタスクを達成できるテストセットとして、段落のセットを収集しました。 セマンティック駆動型からニューラルモデルまで、タスクに取り組むためのさまざまなモデルを実装してきました。 意味論的駆動アプローチは、ニューラルモデルを上回るが、結果は、タスクがモデル全体で非常に困難であることを示している。', 'hi': 'सामान्य संस्थाओं और उनकी विशेषताओं को समझना किसी भी प्रणाली के लिए एक प्राथमिक आवश्यकता है जो प्राकृतिक भाषा को समझती है। आम संस्थाओं के बारे में सीखने को सक्षम करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास मशीन समझ कार्य पेश करते हैं, GuessTwo: दो वास्तविक दुनिया के शब्दार्थ-समान संस्थाओं के विभिन्न पहलुओं की तुलना में एक छोटा पैराग्राफ दिया गया है, एक प्रणाली को अनुमान लगाना चाहिए कि वे संस्थाएं क्या हैं। इस कार्य को पूरा करने के लिए गहरी भाषा की समझ की आवश्यकता होती है जो अनुमान को सक्षम बनाता है, प्रत्येक तुलना पैराग्राफ को विश्व संस्थाओं और उनकी विशेषताओं के बारे में ज्ञान के विभिन्न स्तरों से जोड़ता है। अब तक हमने फलों और जानवरों जैसी विभिन्न श्रेणियों से संस्थाओं की तुलना में 14K से अधिक तुलना पैराग्राफ का एक डेटासेट क्राउडसोर्स किया है। हमने मूल्यांकन के लिए दो योजनाएं डिज़ाइन की हैं: ओपन-एंडेड, और बाइनरी-च्वाइस भविष्यवाणी। कार्य में आगे की प्रगति को बेंचमार्क करने के लिए, हमने परीक्षण सेट के रूप में पैराग्राफ का एक सेट एकत्र किया है जिस पर मानव ओपन-एंडेड भविष्यवाणी पर 94.2% की सटीकता के साथ कार्य को पूरा कर सकता है। हमने कार्य से निपटने के लिए विभिन्न मॉडलों को लागू किया है, जिसमें शब्दार्थ-संचालित से लेकर तंत्रिका मॉडल तक शामिल हैं। शब्दार्थ-संचालित दृष्टिकोण तंत्रिका मॉडल को मात देता है, हालांकि, परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि यह कार्य मॉडल में बहुत चुनौतीपूर्ण है।', 'zh': '知公共体,知自然语言之大体也。 为知常见之体,引入一新机器解务GuessTwo:给定一短段落,较两世界语义相似之异,一统当测之。 成此深入之言,可以推理,段落与世界实体性相连也。 至目前为止,已众包一集,其包过14K段落,较果物诸实。 设二评:开放式、二元择占。 试事者,收其类段落以为之集,人以开放式占94.2%准确率成之。 我既成矣,语义驱神经矣。 语义驱之善神经,然而结果表明,其事甚有挑战性。', 'ru': 'Понимание общих сущностей и их атрибутов является основным требованием для любой системы, которая понимает естественный язык. Чтобы дать возможность узнать об общих сущностях, мы вводим новую задачу машинного понимания, GuessTwo: учитывая короткий абзац, сравнивающий различные аспекты двух семантически похожих сущностей в реальном мире, система должна угадать, что это за сущности. Выполнение этой задачи требует глубокого понимания языка, что позволяет делать выводы, связывая каждый пункт сравнения с различными уровнями знаний о мировых сущностях и их атрибутах. На данный момент мы собрали набор данных из более чем 14 тысяч пунктов для сравнения, сравнивая объекты из различных категорий, таких как фрукты и животные. Мы разработали две схемы для оценки: открытое и двоичное прогнозирование. Для сравнения дальнейшего прогресса в этой задаче мы собрали набор абзацев в качестве тестового набора, на котором человек может выполнить задачу с точностью 94,2% при бессрочном прогнозировании. Мы реализовали различные модели решения задачи, начиная от семантических и заканчивая нейронными моделями. Семантический подход превосходит нейронные модели, однако результаты показывают, что задача очень сложна для всех моделей.', 'ga': "Is bunriachtanas é aonáin choiteanna agus a dtréithe a thuiscint d’aon chóras a thuigeann teanga nádúrtha. D'fhonn foghlaim faoi aonáin choiteanna a chumasú, tugaimid isteach tasc tuisceana meaisín nua, GuessTwo: nuair a chuirtear alt gairid i gcomparáid le gnéithe éagsúla de dhá eintiteas comhchosúla den saol fíor, ba cheart go ndéanfadh córas buille faoi thuairim cad iad na haonáin sin. Teastaíonn tuiscint dhomhain teanga chun an tasc seo a chomhlíonadh, rud a chumasaíonn tátal, trí gach alt comparáide a nascadh le leibhéil éagsúla eolais ar aonáin dhomhanda agus a dtréithe. Go dtí seo tá tacar sonraí plódaithe againn de níos mó ná 14K alt comparáide a dhéanann comparáid idir eintitis ó chatagóirí éagsúla amhail torthaí agus ainmhithe. Tá dhá scéim mheastóireachta deartha againn: ceannoscailte, agus réamh-mheastachán ar rogha dhénártha. Chun tuilleadh dul chun cinn sa tasc a thagarmharcáil, tá sraith míreanna bailithe againn mar an tacar tástála ar a bhféadfaidh an duine an tasc a chur i gcrích le cruinneas 94.2% ar thuar neamhiata. Tá múnlaí éagsúla curtha i bhfeidhm againn chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc, ó shéimeantach-tiomáinte go samhlacha néaracha. Tá an cur chuige shéimeantach-tiomáinte níos fearr ná na samhlacha néaracha, áfach, léiríonn na torthaí go bhfuil an tasc an-dúshlánach ar fud na múnlaí.", 'el': 'Η κατανόηση κοινών οντοτήτων και των χαρακτηριστικών τους αποτελεί πρωταρχική απαίτηση για κάθε σύστημα που κατανοεί τη φυσική γλώσσα. Προκειμένου να καταστεί δυνατή η εκμάθηση κοινών οντοτήτων, εισάγουμε μια νέα εργασία κατανόησης μηχανών, δεδομένου μιας σύντομης παραγράφου που συγκρίνει διαφορετικές πτυχές δύο σημασιολογικά παρόμοιων οντοτήτων στον πραγματικό κόσμο, ένα σύστημα πρέπει να μαντέψει ποιες είναι αυτές οι οντότητες. Η επίτευξη αυτού του έργου απαιτεί βαθιά κατανόηση της γλώσσας που επιτρέπει την εξαγωγή συμπερασμάτων, συνδέοντας κάθε παράγραφο σύγκρισης με διαφορετικά επίπεδα γνώσης σχετικά με τις παγκόσμιες οντότητες και τα χαρακτηριστικά τους. Μέχρι στιγμής έχουμε συλλέξει ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με περισσότερες από 14Κ παραγράφους σύγκρισης που συγκρίνουν οντότητες από διάφορες κατηγορίες όπως φρούτα και ζώα. Έχουμε σχεδιάσει δύο συστήματα αξιολόγησης: ανοικτού τέλους και δυαδικής επιλογής πρόβλεψης. Για τη συγκριτική αξιολόγηση της περαιτέρω προόδου στην εργασία, έχουμε συλλέξει ένα σύνολο παραγράφων ως το σύνολο δοκιμών στο οποίο ο άνθρωπος μπορεί να ολοκληρώσει την εργασία με ακρίβεια 94.2% σχετικά με την πρόβλεψη ανοικτού τέλους. Έχουμε εφαρμόσει διάφορα μοντέλα για την αντιμετώπιση του έργου, που κυμαίνονται από σημασιολογικά καθοδηγούμενα έως νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Η σημασιολογική προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα, ωστόσο, τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η εργασία είναι πολύ δύσκολη σε όλα τα μοντέλα.', 'it': "Comprendere le entità comuni e i loro attributi è un requisito primario per qualsiasi sistema che comprende il linguaggio naturale. Al fine di consentire l'apprendimento di entità comuni, introduciamo un nuovo compito di comprensione automatica, GuessTwo: dato un breve paragrafo che confronta aspetti diversi di due entità semanticamente simili nel mondo reale, un sistema dovrebbe indovinare cosa siano queste entità. La realizzazione di questo compito richiede una profonda comprensione del linguaggio che consenta l'inferenza, collegando ogni paragrafo di confronto a diversi livelli di conoscenza delle entità del mondo e dei loro attributi. Finora abbiamo raccolto un set di dati di oltre 14K paragrafi di confronto che confrontano entità di una varietà di categorie come frutta e animali. Abbiamo progettato due schemi di valutazione: open-ended e binary-choice prediction. Per il benchmarking di ulteriori progressi nel compito, abbiamo raccolto una serie di paragrafi come set di test su cui l'uomo può eseguire il compito con una precisione del 94,2% sulla previsione a termine aperto. Abbiamo implementato vari modelli per affrontare il compito, che vanno da modelli semantici a modelli neurali. L'approccio semantico-guidato supera i modelli neurali, tuttavia, i risultati indicano che il compito è molto impegnativo in tutti i modelli.", 'hu': 'A közös entitások és tulajdonságaik megértése elsődleges követelmény minden olyan rendszer számára, amely megérti a természetes nyelvet. Annak érdekében, hogy lehetővé tegyük a közös entitások megismerését, bemutatunk egy új gépi megértési feladatot, GuessTwo: egy rövid bekezdést, amely összehasonlítja két valós világ szemantikailag hasonló entitásának különböző aspektusait, egy rendszernek ki kell találnia, hogy mik ezek az entitások. Ennek a feladatnak a végrehajtásához mélyreható nyelvi megértésre van szükség, amely lehetővé teszi a következtetést, és összekapcsolja az összehasonlító bekezdéseket a világ entitásaival és tulajdonságaival kapcsolatos különböző szintű ismeretekkel. Eddig több mint 14K összehasonlító bekezdésből álló adatkészletet gyűjtöttünk össze, amely különböző kategóriákból, például gyümölcsökből és állatokból álló entitásokat hasonlít össze. Két értékelési sémát terveztünk: nyílt végű és bináris választási előrejelzés. A feladat további előrehaladásának összehasonlításához összegyűjtöttünk egy sor bekezdést, amelyen az ember 94,2%-os pontossággal tudja elvégezni a feladatot nyílt végű előrejelzéssel. A feladat megoldására különböző modelleket alkalmaztunk, a szemantikai vezérelt modellektől a neurális modellekig. A szemantikai vezérelt megközelítés felülmúlja az idegi modelleket, azonban az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a feladat nagyon kihívást jelent a modellek között.', 'mk': 'Understanding common entities and their attributes is a primary requirement for any system that comprehends natural language.  Со цел да овозможиме учење за заедничките ентитети, воведуваме нова задача за машинско разбирање, GuessTwo: со оглед на краток параграф кој ги споредува различните аспекти на двата реално-светски семантично слични ентитети, системот треба да погоди кои се тие ентитети. За да се заврши оваа задача, потребно е длабоко разбирање на јазикот што овозможува конференција, поврзувајќи го секој параграф за споредба со различни нивоа на знаење за светските ентитети и нивните атрибути. Досега имаме популарни податоци од повеќе од 14K параграфии за споредба на ентитетите од различни категории како што се овошје и животни. Ние дизајниравме две шеми за евалуација: отворен крај и предвидување со бинарен избор. For benchmarking further progress in the task, we have collected a set of paragraphs as the test set on which human can accomplish the task with an accuracy of 94.2% on open-ended prediction.  Имплементиравме различни модели за решавање на задачата, од семантични до нервни модели. Семантичкиот пристап ги надминува нервните модели, но резултатите покажуваат дека задачата е многу предизвикувачка низ моделите.', 'lt': 'Understanding common entities and their attributes is a primary requirement for any system that comprehends natural language.  Kad galėtume mokytis apie bendrus subjektus, įvedame naują mašinos supratimo užduotį GuessTwo: atsižvelgiant į trumpą pastraipą, palyginančią skirtingus dviejų realiojo pasaulio semantiškai panašių subjektų aspektus, sistema turėtų spėti, kas tie subjektai yra. Įgyvendinant šią užduotį reikia gilaus kalbų supratimo, kuris leidžia daryti išvadą, ir kiekvieną palyginimo dalį sujungti su skirtingais žinių apie pasaulinius subjektus ir jų požymius lygiais. Iki šiol surinkėme daugiau kaip 14K palyginimo straipsnių duomenų rinkinį, palyginantį subjektus iš įvairių kategorijų, pavyzdžiui, vaisių ir gyvūnų. We have designed two schemes for evaluation: open-ended, and binary-choice prediction.  Siekdami palyginti tolesnę šios užduoties pažangą, surinkėme keletą punktų, kaip bandymų rinkinį, kuriuo žmogus gali atlikti užduotį tiksliai 94,2 proc., kai numatoma, kad užduotis yra neapibrėžta. We have implemented various models for tackling the task, ranging from semantic-driven to neural models.  Semantinis požiūris yra didesnis už nervinius modelius, tačiau rezultatai rodo, kad užduotis įvairiuose modeliuose yra labai sudėtinga.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ഭാഷയെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ഏതൊരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിനും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആവശ്യങ്ങളാണെന്നും അവയുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥകളും മനസ സാധാരണ വസ്തുക്കളെക്കുറിച്ച് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്\u200dറെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഗ്യൂസ്2: രണ്ട ഈ ജോലി കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് ആഴത്തെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതിന് അപകടത്തിന് സാധ്യമാക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ താല്\u200dക്കോ ഇതുവരെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സൂക്ഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. 14K കൂടുതല്\u200d താരതമ്യം പാര്\u200dപ്പുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഴങ്ങളും മൃഗങ്ങളും പോലുള നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പദ്ധതിയെ പരിശോധിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു: തുറക്കുന്നതും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതും പിന്നെ രണ്ട ജോലിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്നേറുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ സെറ്റ് ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d ജോലി പൂര്\u200dത്തി ഈ ജോലി നോക്കുന്നതിന് വേറെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമാന്റിക് മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ന സെമാന്റിക് ഓടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനം ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകങ', 'ms': 'Memahami entiti umum dan atribut mereka adalah keperluan utama bagi mana-mana sistem yang memahami bahasa alam. In order to enable learning about common entities, we introduce a novel machine comprehension task, GuessTwo: given a short paragraph comparing different aspects of two real-world semantically-similar entities, a system should guess what those entities are.  Melakukan tugas ini memerlukan pemahaman bahasa yang mendalam yang membolehkan kesimpulan, menyambung setiap paragraf perbandingan dengan tahap pengetahuan berbeza mengenai entiti dunia dan atribut mereka. Sejauh ini, kita telah mengumpulkan kumpulan data lebih dari 14K paragraf perbandingan yang membandingkan entiti dari berbagai kategori seperti buah dan haiwan. Kami telah merancang dua skema untuk penilaian: ramalan pilihan terbuka dan binari. For benchmarking further progress in the task, we have collected a set of paragraphs as the test set on which human can accomplish the task with an accuracy of 94.2% on open-ended prediction.  We have implemented various models for tackling the task, ranging from semantic-driven to neural models.  The semantic-driven approach outperforms the neural models, however, the results indicate that the task is very challenging across the models.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл ойлгож буй системийн гол шаардлага юм. Олон төрлийн бизнесийн талаар суралцах боломжтой болгохын тулд бид шинэ машин ойлгох үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарлаж байна. Хоёр бодит ертөнцийн хоёр төрлийн бизнесийн өөр хэсгийг харьцуулахын тулд, систем нь эдгээр бизнесүүдийг юу гэж ойлгох хэрэг Энэ үйл ажиллагааг бүтээхэд гүн гүнзгий хэлний ойлголт хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь халдвар авч чадна, дэлхийн төрөлхтнүүд болон харьцуулахын тулд өөр өөр мэдлэгийн түвшинд холбоотой. Одоогоор бид 14K-аас илүү их өгөгдлийн сангуудыг жимс, амьтдын зэрэг олон хэлбэрээс харьцуулж байна. Бид үнэлгээнд хоёр схемийг зохион байгуулсан: нээлттэй төгсгөл, хоёр дахь сонголтын таамаглал. Үүний дасгал хөгжлийн тулд бид хүний ажлыг нээлттэй таамаглал дээр 94.2% зөв хийж чадах шалгалтын хэмжээг цуглуулсан. Бид ажлыг зогсоохын тулд олон загваруудыг суурилуулсан. Земантик загвараас сэтгэл зүйн загвар руу шилжүүлсэн. Цемантик дамжуулагдсан арга зам нь мэдрэлийн загварыг дамжуулдаг. Гэхдээ үр дүнд нь ажил загвар дээр маш хэцүү байгааг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim ta’ entitajiet komuni u l-attributi tagħhom huwa rekwiżit primarju għal kwalunkwe sistema li tifhem il-lingwa naturali. Sabiex nippermettu tagħlim dwar entitajiet komuni, nintroduċu kompitu ġdid ta’ komprensjoni tal-magna, GuessTwo: minħabba paragrafu qasir li jqabbel aspetti differenti ta’ żewġ entitajiet simili semantikament fid-dinja reali, sistema għandha taħseb x’inhuma dawk l-entitajiet. It-twettiq ta’ dan il-kompitu jeħtieġ fehim profond tal-lingwa li jippermetti l-inferenza, billi kull paragrafu ta’ paragun jiġi konness ma’ livelli differenti ta’ għarfien dwar entitajiet dinjija u l-attributi tagħhom. Sal-lum inkisbu sett ta’ dejta ta’ aktar minn 14K paragrafu ta’ paragun li jqabbel entitajiet minn varjetà ta’ kategoriji bħall-frott u l-annimali. Iddisinjajna żewġ skemi għall-evalwazzjoni: tbassir miftuħ u bi għażla binarja. Għall-valutazzjoni komparattiva ta’ aktar progress fil-kompitu, in ġabru sett ta’ paragrafi bħala s-sett tat-test li fuqu l-bniedem jista’ jwettaq il-kompitu b’preċiżjoni ta’ 94.2% fuq tbassir miftuħ. Implimentajna diversi mudelli biex nindirizzaw il-kompitu, li jvarjaw minn mudelli semantiċi sa mudelli newrali. Madankollu, ir-riżultati jindikaw li l-kompitu huwa sfida ħafna fil-mudelli kollha.', 'kk': 'Жалпы нысандарды мен атрибуттарын түсіну - табиғи тілді түсініп тұрған жүйе үшін негізгі қажет. Жалпы бірліктер туралы үйренуді рұқсат ету үшін, біз романдық компьютердің түсініктеме тапсырмасын келтіреміз, 2- тапсырма: екі шын әлемдегі семантикалық ұқсас бөліктердің түрлі аспектерін салыстырып, жүйе б Бұл тапсырманы орындау үшін түсініктеме үлкен тілдерді түсініп, әрбір бөлшекті әлемдік орындары мен атрибуттары туралы әртүрлі білім деңгейіне қосылу мүмкінді Қазір біз 14K-ден артық деректер жинағын салыстырып, жинақтар мен жануарлар секілді әртүрлі категориялардан салыстыратын параграфияларды көптеген. Біз оқу үшін екі сұлбаны құрылдық: ашық соңы және бинарлық таңдау бағдарламасы. Тапсырманың бағдарламасын бақылау үшін, адамдар тапсырманы ашық соңындағы тапсырманың дұрыс 94,2% деп жасай алатын сынақтар жиынын жинақтадық. Біз тапсырманы өзгерту үшін әртүрлі үлгілерді жұмыс істедік. Семантикалық үлгілерден невралдық үлгілеріне дейін. Семантикалық тәсілі невралдық үлгілерді жасайды, бірақ нәтижелер тапсырманың үлгілерде өте қиындық болуын көрсетеді.', 'no': 'Forståking av felles einingar og attributtane sine er ein primær krev for alle system a som inneheld naturspråk. For å slå på læring om vanlege einingar, introduserer vi eit oppgåve for å forstå eit nytt maskin, gjetTwo: gitt eit kort avsnitt som samanliknar ulike aspektar av to verdsverdssemantisk liknande einingar, bør eit systemet gjeta kva dei einingane er. På fullføring av denne oppgåva krev dyp språk-forståking som kan slå på infeksjon, kopla kvar sammenlikning avsnitt til ulike nivå av kunnskap om verdensentiteter og eigenskapane deres. Så langt har vi lagt opp ein dataset med meir enn 14K sammenligning av avsnitt som samanliknar einingar frå mange kategoriar som frukt og dyr. Vi har laga to oppsett for evaluering: åpne avslutt og forhåndsvising av binærvalet. For å benchmarkera framgangen i oppgåva, har vi samla eit sett avsnitt som testsettet som menneske kan fullføra oppgåva med nøyaktighet 94,2% på åpne foregåve. Vi har implementert forskjellige modeller for å handtera oppgåva, frå semantisk driving til neuralmodeller. Det semantiske tilnærminga utfører ikkje neuralmodellen, men resultatet tyder på at oppgåva er veldig vanskeleg over modelane.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie wspólnych podmiotów i ich atrybutów jest podstawowym wymogiem każdego systemu, który rozumie język naturalny. Aby umożliwić naukę o wspólnych podmiotach, wprowadzamy nowe zadanie rozumienia maszyny GuessTwo: biorąc pod uwagę krótki akapit porównujący różne aspekty dwóch rzeczywistych podmiotów semantycznie podobnych do świata rzeczywistego, system powinien odgadnąć, czym są te podmioty. Wykonanie tego zadania wymaga głębokiego zrozumienia języka, które umożliwia wnioskowanie, łącząc każdy akapit porównawczy z różnymi poziomami wiedzy o istotach świata i ich atrybutach. Do tej pory przygotowaliśmy zbiór danych z ponad 14K akapitów porównawczych porównujących podmioty z różnych kategorii, takich jak owoce i zwierzęta. Zaprojektowaliśmy dwa schematy oceny: prognozowanie otwartego i binarnego wyboru. Aby porównać dalsze postępy w zadaniu, zebraliśmy zestaw akapitów jako zestaw testowy, na którym człowiek może wykonać zadanie z dokładnością 94,2% w przewidywaniu otwartego końca. Wdrożyliśmy różne modele do rozwiązywania tego zadania, począwszy od modeli semantycznych po modele neuronowe. Podejście oparte na semantyce przewyższa modele neuronowe, jednak wyniki wskazują, że zadanie to jest bardzo wymagające dla wszystkich modeli.', 'ka': 'საერთო ინტერტიკების და მისი ატრიბუტებების გაგრძნობა პირველი შესაძლებლობაა ყველა სისტემისთვის, რომელიც თავისუფალური ენერგიის შესახებ. რომ საერთო ინტერტიების შესაძლებლობად გავისწავლათ, ჩვენ ახალი მაქსინური შესაძლებლობა დავიყენებთ, შესაძლებლობა 2: კიდევ პარაგრაფიკაში, რომელიც ორი რეალური მსოფლიოს სენმანტიკურად განსხვავებული ინტერტიების გან ამ დავაკეთებას დასრულება უნდა ძალიან ენერგიის გაგრძნობა, რომელიც შესაძლებელია ინფრენციას, ყოველ დასრულებული პარაფიკაციის განსხვავებული ცნობილების დონეზე და მისი ახლა, ჩვენ უფრო მეტი 14K-დან შემდგომარებული პარაგრაფიების შემდგომარებით განსხვავებული კატეგრაფიების განსხვავებას, როგორც ფულები და ცხოველები. ჩვენ დავყენეთ ორი სქემები განსაზღვრებისთვის: გახსნილი საკუთარი და ბიუნური განსაზღვრებისთვის. დამატებული პროგრესის შესახებ, ჩვენ დავყენეთ პარაგრაფიების ნაწილი როგორც ტესტის ნაწილი, რომელიც ადამიანის შესაძლებელია დავაკეთოთ რაოდენობა 94.2% წარმოდგენისთვის. ჩვენ განსხვავებული მოდელები გავამყენეთ რაოდენობას გადაწყენებისთვის, რომელიც სიმენტიკური მოდელებიდან ნეირალური მოდელებიდან გადაწყენებული. Semantic-driven approach outperforms the neural models, however, the results indicate that the task is very challenging across the models.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව සහ ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාවට තේරුම් ගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන අවශ්\u200dයයක් තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂා සාමාන්\u200dය වර්ගයක් ගැන ඉගෙනගන්න සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති පද්ධතියක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අනුමාණ දෙන්න: ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති වර්ගයක් දෙන්න වෙනස් වර්ග මේ වැඩේ සම්පූර්ණ කරනවා ගොඩක් භාෂාව තේරුම් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න ඕනේ ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයෙක්ම දැනටමත් අපිට 14K වඩා ගොඩක් දත්ත සූදානයක් තියෙනවා වගේ වර්ගයක් වලින් වර්ගයක් වලින් වර්ගයක් වලින් වර්ගයක් වලින් ව අපි විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා සැකසුම් දෙකක් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා: විවෘත අවස්ථාවක්, අවස්ථාවක් සහ ද මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාවේ තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංමුණ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංමුණු කරලා තියෙන්න අපි වෙනස් මොඩේල් එක්ක වැඩ කරන්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙනවා, සෙමැන්ටික් වලින් න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල් වලින සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය නිර්මාණය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන්, නමුත්, ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප', 'so': 'Waxgarashada arrimaha caadiga ah iyo hantida ay leeyihiin waa baahida ugu horeeya nidaam kasta oo garanaya luqada asalka ah. Si aad u barto wax ku saabsan waxyaabaha caadiga ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaa shuqul hoos u dhigista mashiinka hoose, Guess2: iyadoo lagu qoray koob fudud oo u eg labada dhinac oo kala duduwan labada xafiisyo oo caalamiga ah oo isku mid ah, nidaam waxaa haboon in ay ogaato waxa ay yihiin. Xisaabinta shaqadaas waxay u baahan tahay garashada luuqada aad u dheer, kaas oo suurtogal u yeelan kara aragtida, oo la xiriira heerarka aqoonta kala duduwan ee la xiriira alaabta aduunka iyo hantidiisa. Tan iyo waqtigan waxaan ka soo bandhignay koob macluumaad ah oo ka badan 14K oo isbarbardhigi kara qeybo ka mid ah midhaha iyo xoolaha. We have designed two schemes for evaluation: open-ended, and binary-choice prediction.  Waxaan u soo urursannay kooxaha loo dhigay imtixaanka dadku uu shaqada ku dhameyn karo si saxda ah 94.2% oo ku saabsan 预测 furan. Waxaannu sameeynay tusaalooyin kala duduwan si aan u tacliino shaqada, taasoo ka soo wareegsan samooyinka neurada. Dhaqdhaqaaqa halka lagu wado ayaa soo saara modelalka neurada ah, habase yeeshee resultadu waxay caddaysaa in shaqadu aad u tacliin yahay modelalka kale oo dhan.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje zajedničkih entiteta i njihovih atributa je glavna zahteva za svaki sistem koji obuhvaća prirodni jezik. Da bismo omogućili učenje o zajedničkim entitetima, predstavljamo novi zadatak o razumijevanju mašine, pogađajte dva: s obzirom na kratkom paragrafu koji uspoređuje različite aspekte dva semantički slična entiteta na stvarnom svijetu, sistem bi trebao pogoditi šta su te entitete. Završiti ovaj zadatak zahteva duboko razumevanje jezika koji omogućava infekciju, povezivanje svakog paragrafa sa različitim nivoima znanja o svetskim entitetima i njihovim atributima. Do sada smo skupljali skup podataka sa više od 14K usporedbenih paragrafa koji uspoređuju entitate iz raznih kategorija poput voća i životinja. Dizajnirali smo dve šeme za procjenu: otvoreno i dvostruko predviđanje izbora. Za pregled daljnjeg napretka u zadatku, skupili smo set paragrafa kao test na kojem ljudi mogu postići zadatak sa tačnošću od 94,2% na otvorenom predviđanju. Mi smo proveli različite modele za rješavanje zadatka, od semantičkog vođenja do neuralnih modela. Semantički pristup iznosi neuralne modele, međutim, rezultati ukazuju na to da je zadatak veoma izazovan preko modela.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea entităților comune și atributele acestora este o cerință primară pentru orice sistem care înțelege limbajul natural. Pentru a permite învățarea despre entitățile comune, introducem o sarcină nouă de înțelegere a mașinii, GuessTwo: având în vedere un scurt paragraf care compară diferite aspecte ale două entități semantic similare din lumea reală, un sistem ar trebui să ghicească ce sunt aceste entități. Realizarea acestei sarcini necesită o înțelegere profundă a limbajului, care permite deducerea, conectarea fiecărui paragraf de comparație la diferite niveluri de cunoaștere despre entitățile lumii și atributele acestora. Până în prezent am obținut un set de date de peste 14K de paragrafe comparative care compară entități dintr-o varietate de categorii, cum ar fi fructele și animalele. Am proiectat două scheme de evaluare: predicția cu opțiune deschisă și cea cu opțiune binară. Pentru a analiza progresul suplimentar în această sarcină, am colectat un set de paragrafe ca set de test pe care omul poate îndeplini sarcina cu o precizie de 94,2% pe predicția deschisă. Am implementat diverse modele pentru abordarea sarcinii, de la modele semantice la modele neurale. Abordarea bazată pe semantică depășește modelele neurale, cu toate acestea, rezultatele indică faptul că sarcina este foarte provocatoare în toate modelele.', 'sv': 'Att förstå gemensamma enheter och deras attribut är ett primärt krav för alla system som förstår naturligt språk. För att möjliggöra lärande om gemensamma entiteter introducerar vi en ny maskinförståelse uppgift, GuessTwo: givet ett kort stycke som jämför olika aspekter av två verkliga semantiskt liknande entiteter, bör ett system gissa vad dessa entiteter är. För att genomföra denna uppgift krävs djup språkförståelse som möjliggör slutsatser, som kopplar varje jämförelsestycke till olika kunskapsnivåer om världsentiteter och deras attribut. Hittills har vi samlat in en datauppsättning med mer än 14K jämförelsestycken som jämför enheter från en mängd olika kategorier såsom frukt och djur. Vi har utformat två system för utvärdering: öppen och binärt val förutsägelse. För att benchmarka ytterligare framsteg i uppgiften har vi samlat en uppsättning stycken som testset där människan kan utföra uppgiften med en noggrannhet på 94,2% på öppen förutsägelse. Vi har implementerat olika modeller för att hantera uppgiften, allt från semantiskt drivna till neurala modeller. Det semantiska drivna tillvägagångssättet överträffar de neurala modellerna, men resultaten indikerar att uppgiften är mycket utmanande över modellerna.', 'ta': 'பொதுவான பொருள்கள் மற்றும் குணங்கள் புரிந்து கொள்வது இயல்பான மொழியை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் எந்த அமைப்ப பொதுவான பொருள்களை பற்றி கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய இயந்திரத் தொகுதியை முன்னேற்றுகிறோம், Guess2: இரண்டு உண்மையில் இரு உண்மையான- உலக பொருள் போன்ற பொரு இந்த செயலை கணக்கிடுதல் ஆழமான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும். அது பிரச்சனையை செயல்படுத்தும், ஒவ்வொரு ஒப்பிடும் பத்தியை உலக உறுப் So far we have crowdsourced a dataset of more than 14K comparison paragraphs comparing entities from a variety of categories such as fruits and animals.  நாம் இரண்டு திட்டத்தை ஆய்வு செய்ய வடிவமைத்துள்ளோம்: திறந்த முடிந்தது, இரு தேர்வு முன்னோட்டம். பணியில் மேலும் முன்னேற்றத்தை புதுப்பிக்க, நாம் சோதனையின் அமைப்பாக ஒரு கூட்டு பத்திகளை சேகரித்து வைத்திருக்கிறோம். இது மேலும் மனிதன்  நாங்கள் பணியை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு பல மாதிரிகளை செயல்படுத்தியுள்ளோம், பெம்மான்டிக் காட்டப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில்  பெம்பான்டிக் இயக்கும் செயல்பாடு புதிய மாதிரிகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, ஆனால் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اور ان کی تعریفیں سمجھنے کے لئے ہر سیستم کے لئے ایک نہایت ضرورت ہے جو طبیعی زبان کا سمجھتا ہے۔ ہم نے ایک نوی مشین کی سمجھ کا کام پیش کرنا چاہیے کہ معاملہ کے بارے میں سیکھنا قادر کریں، GuessTwo: دو حقیقی دنیا کی مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختل اس کام کو پورا کرنے کے لئے عمیق زبان سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ ہر مقایسہ پاراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگر کو دنیا کے متعلق اور ان کے متعلق علم کی مختلف سطح سے اتصال کرے۔ یہاں تک کہ ہم نے 14K سے زیادہ ڈاٹ سٹ کو مقایسہ کرلیا ہے جن کی مختلف قسموں سے موجودات کی مقایسہ کرتی ہیں جیسے میوے اور جانوروں کی۔ ہم نے ارزیابی کے لئے دو طرح طراحی طراحی کی ہے: کھلی ہوئی قسم اور دوبارہ انتخاب کی پیش بینی۔ اس کام میں اضافہ پیشرفت کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک مجموعہ فراگراف کو آزمائش کے طور پر جمع کیا ہے جس پر انسان نے اس کام کو صرف 94.2% کی تصدیق کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے مشکل کے ساتھ مختلف موڈل بنائے ہیں، یعنی سیمانٹیکی سے نئورل موڈل تک۔ سیمنٹی طریقہ کی تقریبا نیورل موڈل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، لیکن نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کام موڈل میں بہت اضافہ ہے.', 'uz': "Umumiy obʼektlarni tushunish va xossalari asl tilni tushunadigan tizimning asosiy kerakligi. Umumiy obʼektlarni o'rganish uchun biz novel kompyuterni o'rganish vazifasini anglatamiz, Guess2: ikkita dunyoning qisqa qisqa qisqa qisqa paragraf bilan ikkita bo'lgan ikkita qisqa obʼektlarni kamaytirish uchun, tizim shu obʼektlarning nima ekanligini anglatishi kerak. Bu vazifani hisoblash uchun eng yuqori tilni o'rganish kerak. Bu bir ta'lim parametrini dunyo obʼektlari va xossalari haqida muloqat taʼminlovchi darajaga ulanish mumkin. Shunday paytda, biz bir necha 14K dan ortiq kompyuterning ma'lumotlar tarkibini o'xshash ko'plab o'zgarishga ega qilamiz. Biz ikkita qolipni qiymatlash uchun yaratdik: ochiq ochilgan va ikkita tanlash natijasi. Vazifaning davomida muvaffaqiyatlarni tekshirish uchun, biz odamlar vazifani ochiq kutilgan diqqat bilan amalga oshirish mumkin. Vazifani boshqarish uchun har xil modellarni bajardik, semantik qo'llangan neural modellaridan o'zgartirib turgan. Semantik ishlab chiqarish usuli neyrol modellarini bajaradi, ammo natijalar hamma modellarda ishlash juda murakkab qiladi.", 'vi': 'Hiểu được các thực thể chung và thuộc tính của họ là yêu cầu chính cho bất kỳ hệ thống nào hiểu được ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Để có thể học về các thực thể chung, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một nhiệm vụ thấu hiểu cỗ máy mới, Guess2: dựa vào một đoạn ngắn so sánh các khía cạnh khác nhau của hai thực tế giống nhau, một hệ thống sẽ đoán được đó là gì. Để hoàn thành nhiệm vụ này cần phải hiểu biết ngôn ngữ sâu rộng để có thể kết nối mỗi đoạn so sánh với những cấp độ hiểu biết khác nhau về thực thể thế giới và thuộc tính của chúng. Cho tới nay chúng ta đã có nhiều nguồn dữ liệu hơn 14K, các điểm so sánh so sánh các thực thể từ nhiều loại như trái cây và động vật. Chúng tôi đã thiết kế hai kế để đánh giá: tiên đoán hàng không và nhị phân. Chúng tôi đã thu thập các đoạn như thử nghiệm mà con người có thể thực hiện nhiệm vụ với độ chính xác của 94.2. về dự đoán bất hạn. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra nhiều phương pháp để giải quyết nhiệm vụ, từ ngữ pháp chuyển động với các mô hình thần kinh. Nhưng kết quả cho thấy nhiệm vụ rất khó khăn đối với các mô hình thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на общите субекти и техните атрибути е основно изискване за всяка система, която разбира естествения език. За да се даде възможност за изучаване на общи обекти, ние въвеждаме нова задача за машинно разбиране, като се има предвид кратък абзац, сравняващ различни аспекти на две семантично сходни обекти в реалния свят, системата трябва да познае какви са тези обекти. Изпълнението на тази задача изисква задълбочено езиково разбиране, което позволява заключение, свързвайки всеки сравнен абзац с различни нива на познание за световните обекти и техните атрибути. Досега сме събрали набор от данни от повече от 14К параграфи за сравнение, сравняващи обекти от различни категории като плодове и животни. Ние сме разработили две схеми за оценка: отворен и двоичен избор прогнози. За сравнителен анализ на по-нататъшния напредък в задачата сме събрали набор от параграфи като тест набор, върху който човек може да изпълни задачата с точност от 94,2% при отворено прогнозиране. Внедрили сме различни модели за справяне със задачата, вариращи от семантични до невронни модели. Сентично-ориентираният подход превъзхожда невронните модели, но резултатите показват, че задачата е много предизвикателна в моделите.', 'nl': "Het begrijpen van gemeenschappelijke entiteiten en hun kenmerken is een primaire vereiste voor elk systeem dat natuurlijke taal begrijpt. Om het leren over gemeenschappelijke entiteiten mogelijk te maken, introduceren we een nieuwe machine understanding taak, GuessTwo: gegeven een korte paragraaf waarin verschillende aspecten van twee real-world semantisch vergelijkbare entiteiten worden vergeleken, moet een systeem raden wat die entiteiten zijn. Om deze taak te vervullen, is een diepgaand taalbegrip vereist dat conclusies mogelijk maakt, waarbij elke vergelijkingsparagraaf wordt gekoppeld aan verschillende niveaus van kennis over wereldentiteiten en hun attributen. Tot nu toe hebben we een dataset van meer dan 14K vergelijkingsalinea's verzameld die entiteiten uit verschillende categorieën zoals fruit en dieren vergelijken. We hebben twee schema's voor evaluatie ontworpen: open-end en binaire-choice voorspelling. Om verdere vooruitgang in de taak te benchmarken, hebben we een reeks paragrafen verzameld als de testset waarop de mens de taak kan uitvoeren met een nauwkeurigheid van 94,2% op open-end voorspelling. We hebben verschillende modellen geïmplementeerd om de taak aan te pakken, variërend van semantisch gedreven tot neurale modellen. De semantisch-gedreven aanpak presteert beter dan de neurale modellen, maar de resultaten geven aan dat de taak zeer uitdagend is voor alle modellen.", 'da': 'Forståelse af fælles enheder og deres attributter er et primært krav for ethvert system, der forstår naturligt sprog. For at gøre det muligt at lære om fælles enheder introducerer vi en ny maskinforståelsesopgave, GuessTwo: Med et kort afsnit, der sammenligner forskellige aspekter af to semantisk lignende enheder i den virkelige verden, bør et system gætte, hvad disse enheder er. Udførelsen af denne opgave kræver dyb sprogforståelse, som muliggør udledning, der forbinder hvert sammenligningsafsnit til forskellige niveauer af viden om verdens enheder og deres egenskaber. Indtil videre har vi crowdsourceret et datasæt med mere end 14K sammenligningsafsnit, der sammenligner enheder fra en række forskellige kategorier såsom frugt og dyr. Vi har designet to ordninger til evaluering: open-ended og binære valg forudsigelse. Til benchmarking af yderligere fremskridt i opgaven har vi samlet et sæt afsnit som testsæt, hvor mennesker kan udføre opgaven med en nøjagtighed på 94,2% på open-ended forudsigelse. Vi har implementeret forskellige modeller til at tackle opgaven, lige fra semantisk drevet til neurale modeller. Den semantiske-drevne tilgang overgår de neurale modeller, men resultaterne indikerer, at opgaven er meget udfordrende på tværs af modellerne.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje zajedničkih subjekta i njihovih atributa je primarno zahtjev za svaki sustav koji obuhvaća prirodni jezik. Da bismo omogućili učenje o zajedničkim subjektima, predstavljamo novi zadatak razumijevanja strojeva, pogodite dva: s obzirom na kratko odstavak u usporedbi različitih aspekta dva semantički sličnih subjekta na stvarnom svijetu, sustav bi trebao pogoditi što su te subjekte. Završiti ovaj zadatak zahtijeva duboko razumijevanje jezika koji omogućava infekciju, povezivanje svakog paragrafa s različitim razinama znanja o svjetskim entitetima i njihovim atributima. Do sada smo dostigli skup podataka s više od 14K usporedbenih paragrafa u usporedbi entiteta iz raznih kategorija poput voća i životinja. Dizajnirali smo dvije šeme za procjenu: otvoreno i dvostruko predviđanje izbora. Za pregled daljnjeg napretka u zadatku, skupili smo niz odstavaca kao test na kojem čovjek može postići zadatak sa preciznošću od 94,2% na otvorenom predviđanju. Mi smo proveli različite modele za rješavanje zadatka, od semantičkog vođenja do neuralnih modela. Semantički pristup iznosi neuralne modele, međutim, rezultati ukazuju na to da je zadatak vrlo izazovan preko modela.', 'de': 'Gemeinsame Entitäten und ihre Attribute zu verstehen, ist eine primäre Voraussetzung für jedes System, das natürliche Sprache versteht. Um das Lernen über gemeinsame Entitäten zu ermöglichen, stellen wir eine neuartige maschinelle Verstehensaufgabe vor, GuessTwo: Angesichts eines kurzen Absatzes, der verschiedene Aspekte von zwei real-world semantisch ähnlichen Entitäten vergleicht, sollte ein System erraten, was diese Entitäten sind. Um diese Aufgabe zu erfüllen, bedarf es eines tiefen Sprachverständnisses, das Rückschlüsse ermöglicht und jeden Vergleichsabsatz mit verschiedenen Wissensebenen über Welteinheiten und ihre Attribute verbindet. Bisher haben wir einen Datensatz von mehr als 14K Vergleichsparagraphen erstellt, in dem Entitäten aus einer Vielzahl von Kategorien wie Obst und Tieren verglichen werden. Wir haben zwei Bewertungsschemata entwickelt: Open-End und Binary-Choice Vorhersage. Für das Benchmarking weiterer Fortschritte in der Aufgabe haben wir eine Reihe von Absätzen als Testsatz gesammelt, auf denen der Mensch die Aufgabe mit einer Genauigkeit von 94,2% auf offener Vorhersage ausführen kann. Wir haben verschiedene Modelle implementiert, die von semantisch-getriebenen bis hin zu neuronalen Modellen reichen. Der semantisch-getriebene Ansatz übertrifft die neuronalen Modelle, die Ergebnisse zeigen jedoch, dass die Aufgabe über die Modelle hinweg sehr herausfordernd ist.', 'id': 'Memahami entitas umum dan atribut mereka adalah rekwiżit utama untuk setiap sistem yang memahami bahasa alam. Untuk memungkinkan belajar tentang entitas umum, kita memperkenalkan tugas pemahaman mesin baru, GuessTwo: diberikan paragraf singkat yang membandingkan aspek berbeda dari dua entitas semantis dunia nyata, sistem harus menebak apa entitas tersebut. Menyelesaikan tugas ini memerlukan pemahaman bahasa yang mendalam yang memungkinkan kesimpulan, menghubungkan setiap paragraf perbandingan dengan tingkat yang berbeda pengetahuan tentang entitas dunia dan atribut mereka. Sejauh ini kita telah menyusun dataset lebih dari 14K paragraf membandingkan entitas dari berbagai kategori seperti buah dan hewan. Kami telah merancang dua skema untuk evaluasi: prediksi terbuka, dan pilihan binari. Untuk benchmarking lebih lanjut kemajuan dalam tugas, kami telah mengumpulkan set paragraf sebagai set tes yang mana manusia dapat menyelesaikan tugas dengan akurasi 94,2% pada prediksi berakhir terbuka. Kami telah menerapkan berbagai model untuk mengatasi tugas, dari semantis-driven ke model saraf. The semantic-driven approach outperforms the neural models, however, the results indicate that the task is very challenging across the models.', 'ko': '공공 실체와 그 속성을 이해하는 것은 자연 언어를 이해하는 어떤 체계의 가장 중요한 요구이다.흔히 볼 수 있는 실체를 배우기 위해 우리는 새로운 기계 이해 임무인guess two를 도입했다. 간단한 단락을 제시하고 두 현실 세계에서 의미가 비슷한 실체의 다른 측면을 비교하며 시스템은 이런 실체가 무엇인지 추측해야 한다.이 임무를 완성하려면 깊이 있는 언어 이해를 통해 추리를 할 수 있고 각 비교 단락과 세계 실체와 그 속성에 대한 서로 다른 차원의 지식을 연결시킬 수 있다.지금까지 우리는 14K개가 넘는 비교 단락의 데이터 집합을 포위하여 과일과 동물 등 다양한 종류의 실체를 비교했다.우리는 두 가지 평가 방안을 설계했는데 그것이 바로 개방식과 이원 선택 예측이다.임무의 진일보한 진전에 대해 기준 테스트를 하기 위해 우리는 한 조의 단락을 수집하여 테스트 집합으로 삼았는데 인류는 이 단락에서 94.2%의 개방식 예측 정확도로 임무를 완성할 수 있다.우리는 의미 구동에서 신경 모형까지 다양한 모델을 실현했다.의미 구동 방법은 신경 모델보다 낫지만 그 결과 크로스 모델의 임무는 매우 도전적이다.', 'fa': 'فهمیدن واحدهای مشترک و ویژگی\u200cهایشان نیازی اصلی برای هر سیستم که به زبان طبیعی دریافت می\u200cکند است. برای توانایی یادگیری در مورد شرکت های مشترک، ما یک کار درک ماشین نوی را معرفی می کنیم، حدس دوم: با توجه به یک پاراگراف کوتاه با مقایسه کردن نقطه های مختلف از دو شرکت دنیای واقعی به semantically شبیه است، یک سیستم باید حدس بزنیم که این شرکت ها چیست. تحمل این کار نیاز به فهمیدن زبان عمیق است که می تواند عفونت شود، ارتباط هر پاراگرافی با سطح مختلف دانش درباره entities جهانی و ویژگی\u200cهایشان ارتباط دهد. تا الان ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای بیشتر از 14K در مقایسه\u200cهای مقایسه کردن مجموعه\u200cها از مختلف گروه\u200cهای مانند میوه\u200cها و حیوانات را به عنوان مقایسه کرده\u200cایم. ما دو نقشه برای ارزیابی طراحی کردیم: پیش بینی باز و انتخاب دوگانه. برای بررسی پیشرفت بیشتری در این کار، ما مجموعه\u200cای از نقطه\u200cها را به عنوان مجموعه آزمایشی که انسان می\u200cتواند این کار را با دقیق 94.2% در پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای باز انجام دهد جمع کردیم. ما مدل\u200cهای مختلف را برای حل کردن کار انجام دادیم، از مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک به مدل\u200cهای عصبی. اما نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این کار در مدل\u200cها بسیار مشکل است.', 'sw': 'Kuelewa vifaa vya kawaida na vifaa vyao ni mahitaji ya msingi kwa mfumo wowote ambao unaelewa lugha ya asili. Ili kuwawezesha kujifunza kuhusu vitu vya kawaida, tunaanzisha kazi ya kompyuta ya kisasa, Guess2: kwa kutumia paragraph fupi inayolinganisha vipengele tofauti vya vitu viwili vya kimapenzi vya dunia, mfumo unapaswa kufikiri ni nini vitu hivyo. Kutimiza kazi hii inahitaji ufahamu wa kina wa lugha ambayo inawezesha kutokuwepo kwa ugonjwa, kuunganisha kila paragraph kwa kiwango tofauti cha maarifa kuhusu vitu vya dunia na vigezo vyao. So far we have crowdsourced a dataset of more than 14K comparison paragraphs comparing entities from a variety of categories such as fruits and animals.  Tumeunda mipango miwili ili kutathmini: utabiri wa wazi, na utabiri wa uchaguzi wa pili. Kwa ajili ya kuandika maendeleo zaidi katika kazi, tumekusanya vipengele kadhaa kama mtihani ambao binadamu anaweza kuitimiza kazi kwa uhakika wa asilimia 94.2 kuhusu utabiri uliotumwa wazi. Tumetekeleza mifano mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kushughulikia kazi hiyo, ikilinganisha na mifano ya kishindani ya neura. Hata hivyo, matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba kazi hiyo inachanganya sana katika mifano yote.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe guramlary we hysiýetlerini düşünmek tebigy diline düşünen ähli sistemada ilkinji gereklidir. Birleşik guramlar barada öwrenmegi mümkin etmek üçin, bir maşynyň düşünmesi üçin, 2-nji gezek: iki dünýäde semantik ýaly guramlaryň farklı aspektlerini gurlaşdyrmak üçin gysga paragrafda bir sistemasyň bu zatlaryň näme diýip pikir etmeli. Bu zady tamamlamak üçin derin dillerden çykyş düşünmesi gerek, hemme paragrafyny dünýädäki guramlar we hatlary barada bilim dürli derejesine baglaşdyrmak üçin gerek. Şu wagtda 14K-den köp sanlary meýdança we hayvanlar ýaly toparlar bilen karşılaştyrýan paragraflaryny çarpýardyk. Biz deňlemek üçin iki şeýle tasarladyk: açyk soňky we ikinji saýlaw öňünden geçirmek üçin. Bu işiň ilerlemesini basmak üçin, adamyň bu işi a çık soňunda 94.2% dyrlyk öňünde tapyp bilen paragraf düzümi ýygnadyk. Biz bu işi çözmek üçin birnäçe nusgalary çykdyk, semantik-tarapyndan näus nusgalara çevrilýän nusgalary taýýarlapdyk. Semantik-ýolaryň ýagdaýy neural modelleriň üstüne çykarýandygyny görkezýär, ýöne netijeler bu işiň modelleriň üstünde örän kynçylyk däldigini görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Të kuptosh njësitë e përbashkëta dhe atributet e tyre është një kërkesë kryesore për çdo sistem që kupton gjuhën natyrore. Me qëllim që të mundësojmë mësimin rreth njësive të përbashkëta, ne futim një detyrë të re të kuptimit të makinës, Guess Two: me një paragraf të shkurtër që krahason aspektet e ndryshme të dy njësive të ngjashme me botën reale, një sistem duhet të gjejë se çfarë janë a to njësi. Accomplishing this task requires deep language understanding which enables inference, connecting each comparison paragraph to different levels of knowledge about world entities and their attributes.  Deri tani kemi mbledhur një grup të dhënash prej më shumë se 14K paragramave që krahasojnë njësitë nga një varietet kategorish të tilla si frutet dhe kafshët. Kemi projektuar dy skema për vlerësim: parashikim me fund të hapur dhe zgjedhje binare. For benchmarking further progress in the task, we have collected a set of paragraphs as the test set on which human can accomplish the task with an accuracy of 94.2% on open-ended prediction.  Kemi zbatuar modele të ndryshme për trajtimin e detyrës, që shkojnë nga modele semantike deri në modele neuronale. Përqasja semantike ekziston më shumë se modelet neuronale, megjithatë rezultatet tregojnë se detyra është shumë e sfidueshme nëpër modele.', 'af': "Die verstaan van gemeenskaplike entiteite en hulle eienskappe is 'n primêre benodig vir enige stelsel wat natuurlike taal verstaan. In order to enable learning about common entities, we introduce a novel machine comprehension task, GuessTwo: given a short paragraph comparing different aspects of two real-world semantically-similar entities, a system should guess what those entities are. Hierdie taak vervulling benodig diep taal verstanding wat toelaat inferensie, verbind elke vergelyking paragraaf met verskillende vlakke van kennis oor wêreld entiteite en hulle eienskappe. Toe ver het ons 'n datastel van meer as 14K vergelyking paragraaf vergelyking van entiteite van 'n verskillende kategorie soos vrugte en diere. Ons het twee skeme vir evaluering ontwerp: open-ended en binêre-keuse voorskou. Vir verdere vordering in die taak, het ons 'n stel paragraaf versamel as die toets stel waarop die mens die taak kan voldoen met 'n presisie van 94.2% op oopgemaakte voorskou. Ons het verskeie modele geïmplementeer om die taak te trek, vanaf semantiek-gedryf tot neurale modele. Die semantiek-gedryf toegang uitvoer die neurale modele, maar die resultate wys dat die taak baie aanvaardig is oor die modele.", 'hy': "Հասարակ հասկանալը և նրանց առանձնահատկությունները ցանկացած համակարգի համար հիմնական պահանջն են, որը հասկանում է բնական լեզուն: Որպեսզի կարողանանք սովորել ընդհանուր հաստատությունների մասին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մեքենայի ընկալումների առաջադրանք' Գուցե երկրորդը' համեմատելով իրական աշխարհի երկու տարբեր առանձնահատկություններ, համակարգը պետք է գուշակեր, թե ինչ են այդ հաստատությունները: Այս խնդիրը կատարելու համար անհրաժեշտ է խորը լեզվի հասկացություն, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս եզրակացություն, կապելով յուրաքանչյուր համեմատություն աշխարհի էության և նրանց առանձնահատկությունների մասին տեղյակ տարբեր մա Այս պահին մենք բազմաթիվ տվյալներ ենք ստացել ավելի քան 14K համեմատական պարագաներ, որոնք համեմատում են տարբեր կատեգորիաների, ինչպիսիք են պտուղները և կենդանիները: Մենք երկու ծրագրեր ենք կազմակերպել գնահատելու համար. բաց սահմանափակ և երկու ընտրության կանխատեսումներ: Մենք հավաքել ենք մի շարք պարբերակներ, որպես փորձարկումներ, որոնց վրա մարդիկ կարող են կատարել առաջադրանքը 94.2 տոկոսի ճշգրիտությամբ բացարձակ կանխատեսման վրա: We have implemented various models for tackling the task, ranging from semantic-driven to neural models.  Սեմանտիկ մոտեցումը գերազանցում է նյարդային մոդելներին, սակայն արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ խնդիրը շատ դժվար է մոդելների մեջ:", 'bn': 'সাধারণ বস্তু এবং তাদের বৈশিষ্ট্য বুঝতে পারে যে কোন সিস্টেমের জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারে। সাধারণ বস্তুর ব্যাপারে শিখতে সক্রিয় করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ কাজের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, গুয়েস্২: দুটি বাস্তবতার মধ্যে দুটি পৃথিবীর সামান্যাক্ এই কাজের পরিমাণে গভীর ভাষা বুঝতে প্রয়োজন যা অসুস্থ এবং প্রত্যেকটি তুলনা প্যাপ্লাগের সাথে বিশ্বের বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ে জ্ঞান এবং তাদ So far we have crowdsourced a dataset of more than 14K comparison paragraphs comparing entities from a variety of categories such as fruits and animals.  আমরা মূল্যের জন্য দুটি পরিকল্পনা গঠন করেছি: উন্মুক্ত এবং বাইনারি পছন্দের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী। কাজে আরো অগ্রগতি বেনমেন্ট করার জন্য আমরা কিছু প্যারাফেক্টগুলো সংগ্রহ করেছি পরীক্ষা হিসেবে যার উপর মানুষ কাজ পূর্ণ করতে পারে যা উন্মুক্ত ভবিষ্ আমরা এই কাজের মোকাবেলা করার জন্য বিভিন্ন মডেল বাস্তবায়িত করেছি, যেখানে সেম্যান্টিক চালিয়ে নিউরেল মডেল থেক যাইহোক, সেম্যান্টিক চালানো পদ্ধতিটি নিউরেল মডেলের বাইরে প্রকাশ করে, তবে ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে মডেলের পাশে এই কাজ খুব চ্', 'am': 'የአካባቢ አካላት እና ፍላጎታቸውን ለማስተዋል የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋን ለማስተካከል የሥርዓት መጀመሪያ ፈቃድ ነው፡፡ ስለ ሁኔታ አካባቢዎች ማወቅ ለመቻል፣ የኖረ መሣሪያን ጉዳይ፣ Guess2: የሁለት እውነተኛ ዓለምን በተለያዩ የሁለት እኩሌታ ክፍሎች በሚያሳያል አካባቢዎች፣ ስርዓት እነዚህ አካባቢዎች ምን እንደሆኑ መግለጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለማስፈልግ የቋንቋ ማስተዋል የሚያስፈልጋል፣ የሁሉንም ትክክል ክፍል በዓለም አካባቢዎች እና ስህተታቸውን በማስተካከል የልዩ ደረጃዎች እውቀት እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ አካባቢዎችን እንደፍሬና እንስሳዎች በተለያዩ ዓይነት አካላትን ከመተካከል የሚበልጥ አካላትን አካባቢ አካባቢ ሰብስነናል፡፡ ሁለትን አካባቢዎች ለዋጋ መፍጠር ፈጠርነው፤ የተከፈተ እና የሁለተኛ ምርጫ ቅድሚያ ነው፡፡ ስራውን ለመግለጽ፣ ሰው ስራውን ለመፍታት የሚችለውን ስርዓት በቁጥጥር 94.2 በመቶ በተከፈተ ውይይት ላይ የሚችለውን ጽሑፎችን አከማቹ፡፡ ስራውን ለመቀናቀል የተለያየን ዓይነቶች አድርገናል፣ ከsemantic ወደneural models ለይቶ ነው፡፡ የፀሐይ አካባቢ ሥርዓት የናቡር ዓይነቶችን ያሳያል፤ ነገር ግን ፍሬው በሞዴሎቹ ላይ እጅግ የሚያቃጥል ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje zajedničkih entiteta i njihovih atributa je primarno zahtjev za svaki sistem koji obuhvaća prirodni jezik. Da bismo omogućili učenje o zajedničkim entitetima, predstavljamo novi zadatak razumijevanja mašine, pogađajte dva: s obzirom na kratko određen dio usporedbe različitih aspekta dva semantički sličnih entiteta na stvarnom svijetu, sistem bi trebao pogoditi šta su te entitete. Završiti ovaj zadatak zahtijeva duboko razumijevanje jezika koji omogućava infekciju, povezivanje svakog paragrafa sa različitim nivoima znanja o svjetskim entitetima i njihovim atributima. Do sada smo skupljali skup podataka od više od 14K usporedbenih paragrafa koji uspoređuju entitate iz raznih kategorija poput voća i životinja. Mi smo dizajnirali dva šema za procjenu: otvoreno i dvostruko predviđanje izbora. Za pregled daljnjeg napretka u zadatku, skupili smo skup paragrafa kao test set na kojem čovjek može postići zadatak sa preciznošću 94,2% na otvorenom predviđanju. Mi smo proveli različite modele za rješavanje zadatka, od semantičkog vođenja do neuralnih modela. Semantički pristup iznosi neuralne modele, međutim, rezultati ukazuju na to da je zadatak veoma izazovan preko modela.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dili anlayan hər sistem üçün təbii olaraq məxluqatı və qüdrətlərini anlamaq təbii olar. Ortaq entitələr haqqında öyrənmək üçün, yeni maşın anlama işini tanıyırıq. Bilin ki, 2: iki real dünyanın semantik bənzərinin müxtəlif aspektlərini qarşılaşdırmaq üçün qısa parçalanmış, sistem bu entitələrin nə olduğunu tahmin etməlidir. Bu işi tamamlamaq üçün çətin dillərin anlaması lazımdır ki, hər parçanı dünya entitələri və özellikləri haqqında müxtəlif bilgi seviyelərinə bağlayır. Şimdiye qədər, meyvələr və heyvanlar kimi növbənöv kategoriyaları ilə qarşılaşdıran 14K-dən daha çox verilən paragrafları ilə birləşdirdik. Biz değerlendirmək üçün iki schema dizayn etdik: açıq sonu və ikili seçim tədbir. Bu işdə daha çox ilerləşmək üçün, insanların bu işi a çıq-aşkar tədbirlərdə 94.2%-dən tamamlayabileceği sınama üçün bir dəstə paragrafları topladıq. Biz bu işi çəkmək üçün müxtəlif modellər təyin etdik, semantik modellərdən və nöral modellərə qədər. Semantik tərəfindən gələn tərzim nöral modellərin üstünlüyünü göstərir, amma sonuçlar bu işin modellərin arasında çox çətin olduğunu göstərir.', 'et': 'Ühiste üksuste ja nende atribuutide mõistmine on iga looduskeelt mõistava süsteemi esmane nõue. Selleks et võimaldada õppida ühiseid olemeid, tutvustame uut masinast arusaamise ülesannet, GuessTwo: kui võrrelda lühikest lõiku kahe reaalmaailma semantiliselt sarnase olemi erinevaid aspekte, peaks süsteem ära arvama, mis need olemid on. Selle ülesande täitmine nõuab sügavat keeleteadmist, mis võimaldab järeldada, ühendades iga võrdluslõigu erinevate tasemetega teadmisi maailma olemite ja nende atribuutide kohta. Seni oleme kogunud andmekogumi rohkem kui 14K võrdluslõikudest, mis võrdlevad erinevate kategooriate üksusi, näiteks puuviljad ja loomad. Oleme välja töötanud kaks hindamisskeemi: avatud ja binaarse valiku prognoosimine. Ülesande edasiseks edusammude võrdlemiseks oleme kogunud katsekomplektiks lõikude komplekti, millel inimene saab ülesande täita 94,2% täpsusega avatud prognoosimisel. Oleme rakendanud erinevaid mudeleid selle ülesande lahendamiseks, alates semantilistest ja närvimudelitest. Semantiline lähenemine on närvimudelitest parem, kuid tulemused näitavad, et ülesanne on mudelites väga keeruline.', 'cs': 'Pochopení společných entit a jejich atributů je primárním požadavkem každého systému, který porozumí přirozenému jazyku. Abychom se mohli učit o běžných entitách, představujeme novou úlohu strojového porozumění GuessTwo: vzhledem k krátkému odstavci porovnávajícímu různé aspekty dvou reálně podobných entit by systém měl odhadnout, co jsou tyto entity. Dosažení tohoto úkolu vyžaduje hluboké jazykové porozumění, které umožňuje odvození, propojení každého srovnávacího odstavce s různými úrovněmi znalostí o světových entitách a jejich atributech. Zatím jsme získali datovou sadu více než 14K srovnávacích odstavců porovnávajících entity z různých kategorií, jako jsou ovoce a zvířata. Pro hodnocení jsme navrhli dva schémata: otevřenou a binární predikci. Pro srovnání dalšího pokroku v úkolu jsme shromáždili sadu odstavců jako testovací sadu, na které může člověk splnit úkol s přesností 94,2% o otevřené predikci. Pro řešení tohoto úkolu jsme implementovali různé modely, od sémanticky řízených až po neuronové modely. Sémanticky řízený přístup překonává neuronové modely, nicméně výsledky ukazují, že úkol je velmi náročný napříč modely.', 'fi': 'Yhteisten kokonaisuuksien ja niiden attribuuttien ymmärtäminen on ensisijainen vaatimus kaikille luonnonkieltä käsittäville järjestelmille. Jotta voisimme oppia yhteisistä entiteeteistä, esittelemme uuden koneymmärrystehtävän, GuessTwo: kun otetaan huomioon lyhyt kappale, jossa verrataan kahden todellisuuden semanttisesti samankaltaisen entiteetin eri puolia, järjestelmän pitäisi arvata, mitä nämä entiteetit ovat. Tämän tehtävän suorittaminen edellyttää syvällistä kieliymmärrystä, joka mahdollistaa päättelyn yhdistämällä jokaisen vertailukappaleen eri tasoihin tietämystä maailman entiteeteistä ja niiden attribuuteista. Tähän mennessä olemme keränneet joukkolähdeaineiston yli 14K vertailukappaleesta, joissa vertaillaan eri luokkien kokonaisuuksia, kuten hedelmiä ja eläimiä. Olemme suunnitelleet kaksi arviointisuunnitelmaa: avoin ja binäärivalintaennuste. Tehtävän edistymisen vertailua varten olemme keränneet joukon kappaleita testisarjaksi, jonka avulla ihminen voi suorittaa tehtävän 94,2%:n tarkkuudella avoimessa ennusteessa. Olemme toteuttaneet erilaisia malleja tehtävän hoitamiseksi semanttisista neuromalleista. Semanttinen lähestymistapa suoriutuu neuromalleja paremmin, mutta tulokset osoittavat, että tehtävä on hyvin haastava kaikissa malleissa.', 'ca': "Entendre entitats comunes i els seus atributs és un requisit primordial per qualsevol sistema que entengui el llenguatge natural. Per poder aprendre sobre entitats comunes, introduim una nova tasca de comprensió de la màquina, GuessTwo: dada un curt paràgraf comparant diferents aspectes de dues entitats semànticament semblants al món real, un sistema hauria d'adivinar quines són aquestes entitats. Per a completar aquesta tasca es necessita una comprensió profunda del llenguatge que permet la inferència, connectant cada paràgraf de comparació amb diferents nivells de coneixement sobre entitats mundials i els seus atributs. Fins ara hem aconseguit un conjunt de dades de més de 14K paràgrafs de comparació que comparaven entitats d'una varietat de categories com fruits i animals. Hem dissenyat dos esquemes d'evaluació: predicció d'elecció binària i open-end. Per comparar el progrés més avançat en la tasca, hem recollit un conjunt de paràgrafs com el conjunt d'exàmens en què l'humà pot aconseguir la tasca amb una precisió del 94,2% en predicció a terme obert. Hem implementat diversos models per abordar la tasca, des de models semàntics a neurones. L'enfocament semàntic supera els models neuronals, però els resultats indican que la tasca és molt difícil en tots els models.", 'jv': 'Sampeyang ngerti atiribusi sing dibutuhke lan atiribusi dhéwé kuwi kudu nglanggar sapa sistem sing sampeyang bangsa pribadi. Abèh mengko iso nglanggar sampeyan karo akeh sampeyan pangan, kita nyebute nguasakno sistem sing kompleter, GossTwo: bisa kelas paragraph sing mengko sampeyan karo sampeyan iki sistem sing sematik-sampeyan sampeyan, sistem sing kudu nyebute sampeyan karo sampeyan iki sampeyan pakan. Mbok Taning open-end,and Binary-option Mbok Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing samihan model kanggo nggawe nggawe task, suku semanti-mudheng kuwi model alat. Sampeyan sematik-manungsa sing ngomong nik model de alas, piye dadi, akeh banjur ngomong nik pakan nggawe lan sampeyan kuwi coro model.', 'ha': "Ana fahimta masu abuni da halinsu yana da amfani da muhimmi wa tsarin da ke fahimta harshen asili. To, dõmin ya iya amfani da karanta game da abubuwa masu daidai, za'a fara wani aikin nan da za'a lissafa mashine ta yanzu, Gues2: ga da wani rubutu kafin a sami da fili masu biyu masu daidaita cikin duniya da misãli, na'ura ya kamata wani abu ya ƙayyade wanne masu gaskiyar. Akarin wannan aikin na ƙayyade fahimci na lugha mai girma da za'a yarda da yin zartar da yin maras'a, kuma yana haɗa kowace fassarar da misalin kowace da daraja masu sani na da masu abubuwa na duniya. Ga yanzu, mun sami danne da taki kodi na karatun 14,000, masu daidaita karatun abubuwa daga wasu nau'i kamar 'yã'yan itãce da dabbõbi. Lalle Mũ, Mun halitta ma'abũcin biyu, dõmin su yi tunãni: Mun cika ma'auni biyu da rarrabẽwa. Kuskure wajen bangon tafi ga aikin, mun sami komai da wasu misãlai kamar jarrabo wanda mutum ke iya cika aikin da taƙaitacce na 94.2% a kan bayanin da aka buɗe. Mun sami misãlai masu motsi da za'a yi mataimaki ga aikin, mai tsakanin da aka yi motsi zuwa misãlai na neura. Mataimakin wanda aka yi na semantic yana samar da misalin neura, kuma amma, matsala na nuna cewa aikin yana mai gaura a kowace misãlai.", 'sk': 'Razumevanje skupnih entitet in njihovih atributov je primarna zahteva za vsak sistem, ki razume naravni jezik. Da bi omogočili učenje o skupnih entitetah, predstavimo novo nalogo strojnega razumevanja, Ugibanje dve: v kratkem odstavku, ki primerja različne vidike dveh resnično semantično podobnih entitet, bi moral sistem uganiti, kaj so ti entiteti. Za izvedbo te naloge je potrebno globoko razumevanje jezika, ki omogoča sklepanje in povezovanje vsakega primerjalnega odstavka z različnimi ravnmi znanja o svetovnih entitetah in njihovih atributih. Doslej smo zbrali množični nabor podatkov z več kot 14.000 primerjalnimi odstavki, ki primerjajo subjekte iz različnih kategorij, kot so sadje in živali. Za vrednotenje smo oblikovali dve shemi: odprto in napoved binarne izbire. Za primerjalno analizo nadaljnjega napredka pri nalogi smo zbrali nabor odstavkov kot preskusni nabor, na katerem lahko človek opravi nalogo z natančnostjo 94,2% pri odprtih napovedih. Izvedli smo različne modele za reševanje naloge, od semantično usmerjenih do nevronskih modelov. Semantično usmerjen pristop presega nevronske modele, vendar rezultati kažejo, da je naloga v modelih zelo zahtevna.', 'he': 'הבנה של יחידות משותפות והתכונות שלהם היא דרישה ראשית לכל מערכת שמבינה שפה טבעית. כדי לאפשר ללמוד על ישויות משותפות, אנחנו מציגים משימה חדשה להבין מכונות, נחש שני: בהתחשב בפרק קצר שמשוווה אפקטים שונים של שני ישויות דומות בעולם האמיתי סמנטי, מערכת צריכה לנחש מה הן. לבצע את המשימה הזאת דורש הבנה בשפה עמוקה שמאפשר למסקנה, הקשר כל פרק השוואה לרמות שונות של ידע על יחידות העולם והתכונות שלהם. עד כה קיבלנו קבוצת נתונים של יותר מ-14 אלף פרקים שיוותים יחסים מגוון של קטגוריות כמו פירות וחיות. עיצבנו שתי תכניות להערכה: צפייה פתוחה ובחירה בינרית. על מנת להעריך התקדמות נוספת במשימה, אספנו קבוצה של פרקים כקבוצת הבדיקה שבה האדם יכול להשיג את המשימה עם מדויקה של 94.2% על צפוי פתוח. השקענו מודלים שונים לטפל במשימה, מגיעים מ מודלים סמנטיים עד מודלים עצביים. הגישה המונעת סמנטית מעליפה את הדוגמנים העצביים, אך התוצאות מראות שהמשימה מאד מאתגרת בכל הדוגמנים.', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན དབང་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་སྐོར་གྱི་སློབ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་དོན་ལས། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་པའི་རྩོམ་པ་གཉིས་བྱུང་། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ལ་སྒྲུབ་པ་དང་ཟབ་ཅིང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྟོགས་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྱུང་ན་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་སྤྱད་པར་ཆགས་པ་ལས་ 14K་ལས་མཇུག་བསྡུར་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་བསམ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྙེད་པར་ལ་ལས་འཆར་གཉིས་བྱ་རིམ་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། ཁ་ཕྱེས་པ་དང་གཉིས་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་རྔོན་ལྟར། ལས་ཀ་ལ་བགོ་སྤེལ་བའི་འཕེལ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལེན་བྱེད་པར་མཐོང་བའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཞིག་བསྡད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་བཟོ་བའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་ཅིག་ཡོད། semantic-driven approach outperforms the neural models. However, the results indicate that the task is very challenging across the models.'}
{'en': 'Going out on a limb : Joint Extraction of Entity Mentions and Relations without Dependency Trees', 'ar': 'الخروج على أحد الأطراف: الاستخراج المشترك لإشارات الكيانات والعلاقات بدون أشجار التبعية', 'es': 'Salir a un lío: extracción conjunta de menciones y relaciones de entidades sin árboles de dependencia', 'pt': 'Saindo em um galho: extração conjunta de menções e relações de entidades sem árvores de dependência', 'fr': "Sortir sur une branche\xa0: extraction conjointe des mentions d'entités et des relations sans arbres de dépendance", 'ja': '手足の外出：依存関係ツリーなしでのエンティティの言及と関係の共同抽出', 'zh': '四肢:无依于木,合提于实', 'hi': 'एक अंग पर बाहर जा रहा है: निर्भरता पेड़ों के बिना इकाई उल्लेख और संबंधों का संयुक्त निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Выходя на улицу: совместное извлечение упоминаний и отношений сущностей без деревьев зависимостей', 'ga': 'Ag dul amach ar ghéag: Comhshliocht d’Eintiteas agus Caidrimh Gan Spleáchas', 'ka': 'გადასვლა კიმპში: ერთადერთი ექსტრაქცია ინტერტის მენოციების და შესახებების შესახებ განმართლებელობის ექსტრაქცია', 'hu': 'Egy végtag: Szervezeti említések és kapcsolatok közös kivonása függőségfák nélkül', 'el': 'Έξοδος σε ένα άκρο: Κοινή εξαγωγή αναφορών οντοτήτων και Σχέσεων χωρίς Δέντρα εξάρτησης', 'it': 'Uscire in un arto: estrazione congiunta di menzioni di entità e relazioni senza alberi di dipendenza', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік Бұтақтардың біріктірілген нысандар мәзірлерін және қатынастарын тарқату', 'lt': 'Ištraukimas į galūnę: Bendras subjektų paminėjimų ir santykių be priklausomybės medžių ekstraktas', 'mk': 'Одење на крај: Заедничка екстракција на спомени и односи на ентитетите без дрвја на зависност', 'ms': 'Pergi keluar pada anggota: Ekstraksi Bersama-sama Menanggil Entiti dan Hubungan Tanpa Pohon Dependensi', 'ml': 'ഒരു ലിമ്പിലേക്ക് പുറത്തേക്ക് പോകുന്നു: ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ എന്റിറ്റി മെനുകളും ബന', 'mt': 'Ħruġ fuq driegħ: Estrazzjoni Konġunta ta’ Menzjonijiet u Relazzjonijiet ta’ Entitajiet mingħajr Siġar ta’ Dipendenza', 'mn': 'Гэхдээ хамааралтай модноос хамааралтай Entity Mentions, Relations', 'pl': 'Wyjście na kończynę: Wspólna ekstrakcja wspomnień o podmiotach i relacji bez drzew zależności', 'sr': 'Izlazi na kraju: zajednička izvlačenja spomena i odnosa područja bez ovisnosti drveća', 'si': 'ගිහින් පැත්තෙන් යන්න: අන්තිත්වය මනුස්සය සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති විශේෂතාවක්', 'so': 'Going out on a limb: Joint Extraction of Enterprise Menions and Relations without Dependess Trees', 'sv': 'Att gå ut på en lem: Gemensam extraktion av entitetsomnämnanden och relationer utan beroende träd', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த மரங்கள் இல்லாமல் வெளியேறுதல்', 'ur': 'ایک قسم پر باہر نکلتے ہیں: ایک قسم کے ذکر اور رابطہ کے ساتھ بغیر اضافہ کے درخت', 'ro': 'Ieșirea pe un membru: Extragerea comună a mențiunilor de entitate și relațiilor fără copaci de dependență', 'no': 'Går ut på eit linje: Kopla utpakking av einhetsmenyer og relasjonar utan avhengighetstre', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': '♪ Đi ra ngoài cùng một chi tiết: Kế hoạch chia sẻ các thư mục và quan hệ không phụ thuộc Cây', 'bg': 'Излизане на крайник: Съвместно извличане на споменавания на субекти и отношения без дърва за зависимост', 'nl': 'Op een ledemaat gaan: Gezamenlijke Uittrekking van Entiteitsmeldingen en Relaties zonder Afhankelijkheidsbomen', 'da': 'At gå ud på et lem: Fælles uddrag af enhedsomtaler og relationer uden afhængighedstræer', 'de': 'Auf ein Glied gehen: Gemeinsame Extraktion von Entitätserwähnungen und Beziehungen ohne Abhängigkeitsbäume', 'ko': '몸으로 걷기: 나무에 의존하지 않는 실체 언급과 관계의 연합 추출', 'fa': 'برون روی یک پای: اخراج همگانی از یادآوری و رابطه\u200cها بدون درختهای بستگی', 'hr': 'Izlazi na kraju: zajednička izvlačenja razmišljanja o podacima i odnosa bez ovisnosti drveća', 'id': 'Keluar pada bagian: Ekstraksi Berkongsi dari Menentang Entitas dan Hubungan Tanpa Pohon Dependensi', 'sq': 'Duke dalë në një anë: Zgjidhja e përbashkët e përmendimeve të njësisë dhe marrëdhënieve pa pemë të varësisë', 'af': "Gegaan uit op 'n limb: Gesamelede uittrek van Entiteit Mensies en Relasies sonder Afhanklikheid Boom", 'sw': 'Kutokea kwenye mfuko wa kifua: Kutokana na Kutokana na Maasiliano ya Ujasiri na Kuhusiana bila mti wa Kutegemea', 'am': 'Going out on a limb: Joint Extraction of Entity Menions and Relations without Dependent Trees', 'hy': "Մի կողմից դուրս գալը' միասին հանելով առանց կախվածության ծառերի նշանները և հարաբերությունները", 'az': 'D…ôrgahƒ±msƒ±z a ƒüaclarƒ±n istifad…ô edilm…ôsi', 'bs': 'Izlazi na kraju: zajednička izvlačenja sjećanja i odnosa područja bez ovisnosti drveća', 'tr': 'Goş at', 'et': 'Liikumine jäsemele: Üksuste märkuste ja suhete ühine väljavõtmine ilma sõltuvuspuudeta', 'cs': 'Jít na končetinu: Společná extrakce zmínek o entitách a vztahů bez závislostních stromů', 'fi': 'Liikkumatta raajaan: Yhteisöjen mainintojen ja suhteiden yhteinen poiminta ilman riippuvuuspuita', 'bn': 'বাইরে বের হচ্ছে: নির্ভরিত গাছ ছ ছাড়া এন্টিটি মেনু এবং সম্পর্কের সাথে যুক্ত করুন', 'ca': "Salir a una extremitat: Extracció Conjunta de Mencions i Relacions d'Entitats sense Árbres de Dependencies", 'jv': 'Ggoleki ngomong kebuturan: Bukak tanggal-tanggal Entité karo Kemerdekaan Karo Debian', 'sk': 'Gremo na okončine: Skupno pridobivanje omenitev subjektov in odnosov brez dreves odvisnosti', 'he': 'יציאה על גף: יציאה משותפת של זיכרונות יחסים ובלי עצי תלויות', 'ha': 'Going out on a limb: Join Extraction of Entity Menu and Relations regarded as Trees', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཕྱིར་ཚོང: ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དོན་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a novel attention-based recurrent neural network for joint extraction of entity mentions and relations. We show that attention along with long short term memory (LSTM) network can extract semantic relations between entity mentions without having access to dependency trees. Experiments on Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) corpora show that our model significantly outperforms feature-based joint model by Li and Ji (2014). We also compare our model with an end-to-end tree-based LSTM model (SPTree) by Miwa and Bansal (2016) and show that our model performs within 1 % on entity mentions and 2 % on relations. Our fine-grained analysis also shows that our model performs significantly better on Agent-Artifact relations, while SPTree performs better on Physical and Part-Whole relations.', 'ar': 'نقدم شبكة عصبية متكررة جديدة قائمة على الانتباه من أجل الاستخراج المشترك لإشارات الكيانات والعلاقات. نظهر أن الانتباه إلى جانب شبكة الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) يمكنها استخراج العلاقات الدلالية بين إشارات الكيانات دون الوصول إلى أشجار التبعية. تُظهر التجارب على هيئة استخراج المحتوى التلقائي (ACE) أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على النموذج المشترك القائم على الميزات بواسطة Li and Ji (2014). نقارن أيضًا نموذجنا بنموذج LSTM القائم على الشجرة من طرف إلى طرف (SPTree) بواسطة Miwa و Bansal (2016) ونبين أن نموذجنا يعمل في حدود 1٪ في إشارة الكيان و 2٪ على العلاقات. يُظهر تحليلنا الدقيق أيضًا أن نموذجنا يؤدي بشكل أفضل بشكل ملحوظ في العلاقات بين الوكيل والقطعة الأثرية ، بينما يعمل SPTree بشكل أفضل في العلاقات المادية والعلاقات الجزئية الكاملة.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau réseau neuronal récurrent basé sur l'attention pour l'extraction conjointe de mentions et de relations d'entités. Nous montrons que l'attention associée au réseau LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) peut extraire des relations sémantiques entre les mentions d'entités sans avoir accès aux arbres de dépendance. Les expériences sur les corpus d'extraction automatique de contenu (ACE) montrent que notre modèle surpasse largement le modèle conjoint basé sur les caractéristiques de Li et Ji (2014). Nous comparons également notre modèle avec un modèle LSTM basé sur l'arbre de bout en bout (SPtree) de Miwa et Bansal (2016) et montrons que notre modèle fonctionne à moins de 1\xa0% sur les mentions d'entités et de 2\xa0% sur les relations. Notre analyse fine montre également que notre modèle fonctionne nettement mieux sur les relations agent-artefact, tandis que SPTree est plus performant sur les relations physiques et partie-entière.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova rede neural recorrente baseada em atenção para extração conjunta de menções e relações de entidades. Mostramos que a atenção junto com a rede de memória de longo prazo (LSTM) pode extrair relações semânticas entre menções de entidade sem ter acesso a árvores de dependência. Experimentos em corpora de extração automática de conteúdo (ACE) mostram que nosso modelo supera significativamente o modelo conjunto baseado em recursos de Li e Ji (2014). Também comparamos nosso modelo com um modelo LSTM baseado em árvore de ponta a ponta (SPTree) de Miwa e Bansal (2016) e mostramos que nosso modelo funciona dentro de 1% nas menções de entidades e 2% nas relações. Nossa análise refinada também mostra que nosso modelo tem um desempenho significativamente melhor nas relações Agente-Artefato, enquanto o SPTree tem um desempenho melhor nas relações Física e Parte-Todo.', 'es': 'Presentamos una novedosa red neuronal recurrente basada en la atención para la extracción conjunta de menciones y relaciones de entidades. Demostramos que la atención junto con la red de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) pueden extraer relaciones semánticas entre menciones de entidades sin tener acceso a los árboles de dependencias. Los experimentos sobre corpus de extracción automática de contenido (ACE) muestran que nuestro modelo supera significativamente el modelo conjunto basado en funciones de Li y Ji (2014). También comparamos nuestro modelo con un modelo LSTM integral basado en árboles (SPTree) de Miwa y Bansal (2016) y demostramos que nuestro modelo funciona dentro del 1% en las menciones de entidades y del 2% en las relaciones. Nuestro análisis detallado también muestra que nuestro modelo funciona significativamente mejor en las relaciones Agente-Artefacto, mientras que SPTree funciona mejor en las relaciones Físicas y Parte-Todo.', 'ja': '我々は、実体の言及と関係の共同抽出のための新規の注目に基づく再帰的ニューラルネットワークを提示する。我々は、長期短期メモリ（ LSTM ）ネットワークとともに、依存関係ツリーにアクセスすることなく、エンティティのメンション間の意味関係を抽出できることに注目していることを示しています。自動コンテンツ抽出（ ACE ）コーラの実験では、当社のモデルがLiとJi （ 2014 ）による機能ベースのジョイントモデルを大幅に上回っていることが示されています。また、当社のモデルをMiwa and Bansal （ 2016 ）のエンドツーエンドのツリーベースのLSTMモデル（ SPTree ）と比較し、エンティティメンションで1 ％、リレーションシップで2 ％以内のパフォーマンスを実現しています。当社の細かい分析によると、当社のモデルはエージェントとアーティファクトの関係では著しく優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、SPTツリーは物理的およびパーツホールの関係では優れたパフォーマンスを発揮します。', 'zh': '立意力之新型递归神经网络,以合取其实。 吾示意力及长短期记忆(LSTM)网络可于无法访问树提实体语义间。 自取(ACE)语料库之实验,吾形明优于李和姬(2014)者,盖合模形焉。 以我比于MiwaBansal(2016)之端,基于树LSTM(SPTree),明在1%之内,在2%之内。 吾细粒度犹明,吾形明于摄-伪影,而 SPTree 于物理-体之善者也。', 'hi': 'हम इकाई उल्लेख और संबंधों के संयुक्त निष्कर्षण के लिए एक उपन्यास ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक स्मृति (एलएसटीएम) नेटवर्क के साथ ध्यान निर्भरता पेड़ों तक पहुंच के बिना इकाई के उल्लेख के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों को निकाल सकता है। स्वचालित सामग्री निष्कर्षण (एसीई) कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल ली और जी (2014) द्वारा फीचर-आधारित संयुक्त मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाता है। हम मिवा और बंसल (2016) द्वारा एक एंड-टू-एंड ट्री-आधारित एलएसटीएम मॉडल (एसपीट्री) के साथ अपने मॉडल की तुलना भी करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल इकाई के उल्लेख पर 1% और संबंधों पर 2% के भीतर प्रदर्शन करता है। हमारे ठीक-ठाक विश्लेषण से यह भी पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल एजेंट-आर्टिफैक्ट संबंधों पर काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, जबकि एसपीट्री शारीरिक और आंशिक-पूरे संबंधों पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Представлена новая, основанная на внимании, рекуррентная нейронная сеть для совместного извлечения упоминаний и отношений сущностей. Мы показываем, что внимание вместе с сетью долгосрочной краткосрочной памяти (LSTM) может извлекать семантические отношения между упоминаниями сущностей, не имея доступа к деревьям зависимостей. Эксперименты с корпусами автоматической экстракции содержимого (Ace) показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит модель суставов на основе признаков, разработанную Li и Ji (2014). Мы также сравниваем нашу модель со сквозной древовидной моделью LSTM (SPTree) от Miwa и Bansal (2016) и показываем, что наша модель работает в пределах 1% по упоминаниям сущностей и 2% по отношениям. Наш мелкозернистый анализ также показывает, что наша модель демонстрирует значительно лучшие результаты в отношении агент-артифакт, в то время как SPTree демонстрирует лучшие результаты в отношении физических и частично общих отношений.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair líonra néarúil athfhillteach úrnua aird-bhunaithe chun tagairtí agus caidreamh aonáin a chomhbhaint. Léirímid gur féidir le haird mar aon le líonra cuimhne gearrthéarmach fada (LSTM) caidreamh séimeantach a bhaint amach idir tráchtanna aonáin gan rochtain a bheith acu ar chrainn spleáchais. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar Chorpóra um Bhaint Uathoibríoch Ábhar (ACE) go sáraíonn ár samhail samhail chomhpháirteach gné-bhunaithe le Li and Ji (2014) go suntasach. Déanaimid comparáid freisin idir ár múnla agus samhail LSTM crann-bhunaithe ceann-go-deireadh (SPTree) le Miwa agus Bansal (2016) agus léirímid go bhfeidhmíonn ár múnla laistigh de 1% ar aonáin luaite agus 2% ar chaidreamh. Léiríonn ár n-anailís mhionsonraithe freisin go bhfeidhmíonn ár samhail i bhfad níos fearr ar chaidreamh Gníomhaire-Déantán, agus go bhfeidhmíonn SPTree níos fearr ar chaidreamh Fisiciúil agus Páirt-Iomláin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრულებული განახლოების რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც განახლოების და შესახებების ერთადერთი ექსტრაქცია. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ გრძნობა სიმართლური მეხსიერი (LSTM) ქსელი შეუძლია სემონტიკური გრძნობები, რომლებიც ინტერტიკის განსახულების შორ ავტომატური Content Extraction (ACE) კოპორაზე გამოცდილობა ჩვენი მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ Li და Ji (2014) განმავლობაში ერთადერთი მოდელზე მნიშვნელოვანია. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით მაივა და ბანსელი (2016) მხოლოდ LSTM მოდელის შესახებ და ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით 1% და 2% შესახებ განსახებების შესახებ. ჩვენი კეთილი ანალიზია ასევე, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო უფრო უკეთესია აზენტი-არტიფიქტიკის შესახებ, მაგრამ SPTree უფრო უკეთესია ფიზიკური და ნაწილი შესახებ.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στην προσοχή για κοινή εξαγωγή αναφορών και σχέσεων οντοτήτων. Δείχνουμε ότι η προσοχή μαζί με το δίκτυο μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (μπορεί να εξαγάγει σημασιολογικές σχέσεις μεταξύ αναφορών οντοτήτων χωρίς να έχει πρόσβαση σε δέντρα εξάρτησης. Τα πειράματα σε σώματα αυτόματης εξαγωγής περιεχομένου (ΑΚΕ) δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά το κοινό μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε χαρακτηριστικά από τον Λι και τον Τζι (2014). Επίσης, συγκρίνουμε το μοντέλο μας με ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο βασισμένο σε δέντρο των Μίβα και Μπάνσαλ (2016) και δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας αποδίδει εντός 1% στις αναφορές οντότητας και 2% στις σχέσεις. Η λεπτόκοκκη ανάλυση μας δείχνει επίσης ότι το μοντέλο μας αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα στις σχέσεις πράκτορα-τεχνουργήματος, ενώ το πρόγραμμα αποδίδει καλύτερα στις φυσικές και μερικώς-ολόκληρες σχέσεις.', 'hu': 'Egy új figyelem-alapú visszatérő neurális hálózatot mutatunk be entitás említések és kapcsolatok közös extrakciójára. Megmutatjuk, hogy a figyelem a hosszú rövid távú memória (LSTM) hálózattal együtt képes kivonni a entitás említései közötti szemantikai kapcsolatokat anélkül, hogy függőségi fákhoz férne hozzá. Az Automata Content Extraction (ACE) corpora kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja Li és Ji (2014) funkcióalapú közös modelljét. Modellünket összehasonlítjuk a Miwa és Bansal (2016) által készített end-to-end fa alapú LSTM modellekkel (SPTree), és megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk 1%-on belül teljesít entitás említéseken és 2%-on belül a kapcsolatokon. Finomszemcsés elemzésünk azt is mutatja, hogy modellünk jelentősen jobban teljesít az Agent-Artifact kapcsolatokban, míg az SPTree jobban teljesít a Fizikai és Rész-Teljes kapcsolatokban.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нова рецидентна нервна мрежа базирана на внимание за заедничко извлекување на спомените и односите на ентитетот. Ние покажуваме дека вниманието заедно со долгорочната мрежа на краткорочна меморија (LSTM) може да извлече семантични односи помеѓу спомените на ентитетот без да има пристап до дрвјата на зависност. Експериментите на корпората за автоматска екстракција на содржина (ACE) покажуваат дека нашиот модел значително го надминува заедничкиот модел на Li и Ji (2014). Ние, исто така, го споредуваме нашиот модел со моделот LSTM базиран на дрво од крај до крај (SPTree) од Мива и Бансал (2016) и покажуваме дека нашиот модел функционира во рамките на 1 отсто од спомените на ентитетот и 2 отсто од односите. Нашата фина анализа исто така покажува дека нашиот модел оди значително подобро во односите агент-артифакт, додека СПТРЕ оди подобро во односите на физиката и дел-целата.', 'kk': 'Біз жаңа назардағы қайталанатын невралдық желіні біріктіреміз. Біз қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) желімен бірге тәуелсіздік ағаштарға қатынау мүмкіндігі жоқ деген бөліктер арасындағы семантикалық қатынастарды тарқатуға болады. Автоматты мазмұн тарқату (ACE) корпорасының тәжірибелері біздің үлгіміз Li мен Ji (2014) үлгісінің жинақтар үлгісін көп жоқ деп көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз моделімізді Miwa және Bansal (2016) арқылы аяқталған LSTM моделімен (SPTree) салыстырып, біздің моделіміздің 1% ішінде жазылатын, 2% қатынас арқылы жазылатынын көрсетедік. Біздің дұрыс анализиямыз сондай-ақ, моделіміздің агент-артефакт қатынастарына көп жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді, бірақ SPTree физикалық және бөлігін толық қатынастарына жақсы', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome naują dėmesiu pagrįstą nuolatinį nervų tinklą, skirtą bendram subjekto paminėjimų ir santykių išgavimui. Mes rodome, kad dėmesys ir ilgalaikės trumpalaikės atminties (LSTM) tinklas gali ištraukti semantinius ryšius tarp subjektų paminėjimų neturint prieigos prie priklausomybės medžių. Automatinio turinio ekstrahavimo (ACE) korpros eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai viršija Li ir Ji jungtinį model į, pagrįstą savybėmis (2014 m.). Mes taip pat palyginame savo model į su Miwa ir Bansal (2016 m.) LSTM modeliu (SPTree) ir rodome, kad mūsų modelis veikia iki 1 proc. pagal subjektus, o santykius – iki 2 proc. Mūsų nuodugni analizė taip pat rodo, kad mūsų modelis veikia gerokai geriau agentų ir dirbtininkų santykiuose, o SPTree veikia geriau fiziniais ir daliniais santykiais.', 'it': "Presentiamo una nuova rete neurale ricorrente basata sull'attenzione per l'estrazione congiunta di menzioni e relazioni di entità. Mostriamo che l'attenzione insieme alla rete di memoria a lungo termine (LSTM) può estrarre relazioni semantiche tra menzioni di entità senza avere accesso agli alberi di dipendenza. Gli esperimenti sui corpora ACE (Automatic Content Extraction) mostrano che il nostro modello supera significativamente il modello congiunto basato sulle funzionalità di Li e Ji (2014). Confrontiamo anche il nostro modello con un modello LSTM end-to-end basato su albero (SPTree) di Miwa e Bansal (2016) e mostriamo che il nostro modello funziona entro l'1% sulle menzioni di entità e il 2% sulle relazioni. La nostra analisi a grana fine mostra anche che il nostro modello ha prestazioni significativamente migliori sulle relazioni Agente-Artefatto, mentre SPTree ha prestazioni migliori sulle relazioni Fisiche e Parte-Intere.", 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan rangkaian saraf berkurang berdasarkan perhatian yang baru untuk ekstraksi kongsi sebutan entiti dan hubungan. Kami menunjukkan perhatian bersama dengan rangkaian memori jangka pendek panjang (LSTM) boleh mengekstrak hubungan semantik antara sebutan entiti tanpa mempunyai akses ke pokok dependensi. Experiments on Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) corpora show that our model significantly outperforms feature-based joint model by Li and Ji (2014).  Kami juga membandingkan model kami dengan model LSTM berasaskan pokok (SPTree) dari Miwa dan Bansal (2016) dan menunjukkan bahawa model kami berfungsi dalam 1% pada entiti menyebut dan 2% pada hubungan. Analisis kita juga menunjukkan bahawa model kita berfungsi lebih baik pada hubungan Ejen-Artifakta, sementara SPTree berfungsi lebih baik pada hubungan Fizik dan Separuh-Separuh.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലം കാണിക്കുന്നു. വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളും ബന നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് നീണ്ട നീണ്ട മെമ്മറിയോടൊപ്പം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു (LSTM) ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്  സ്വയം ഉള്ളടക്കം പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (ACE) കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ലിയും ജി (2014) അടിസ്ഥാനമ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെയും അവസാന വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള LSTM മോഡല്\u200d (എസ്\u200cപിടി) മീവാ ബാന്\u200dസാലും (2016) ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ് നമ്മുടെ നല്ല കൃത്യമുള്ള അന്വേഷണം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d എജന്\u200dറ്-ആര്\u200dട്ടിഫാക്റ്റ് ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ നല്ലതാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw netwerk neurali rikorrenti ġdid ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni għall-estrazzjoni konġunta ta’ menzjonijiet u relazzjonijiet tal-entità. Aħna nuru li l-attenzjoni flimkien man-netwerk tal-memorja fit-tul fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien (LSTM) tista’ testrakta relazzjonijiet semantiċi bejn is-semmiet tal-entità mingħajr ma jkollha aċċess għas-siġar tad-dipendenza. L-esperimenti fuq korpra ta’ Estrazzjoni Awtomatika tal-Kontenut (ACE) juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa sinifikattivament akbar minn mudell konġunt ibbażat fuq karatteristiċi minn Li u Ji (2014). Aħna nqabblu wkoll il-mudell tagħna ma’ mudell LSTM ibbażat fuq is-siġar minn tmiem sa tmiem (SPTree) minn Miwa u Bansal (2016) u nuru li l-mudell tagħna jwettaq prestazzjoni fi ħdan 1% fuq imsemmija mill-entità u 2% fuq ir-relazzjonijiet. L-analiżi bir-reqqa tagħna turi wkoll li l-mudell tagħna jwettaq riżultati aħjar b’mod sinifikanti fir-relazzjonijiet bejn l-aġent u l-artikolu, filwaqt li l-SPTree jwettaq riżultati aħjar fir-relazzjonijiet fiżiċi u parzjali sħaħ.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit nytt oppmerksomhetsbasert rekurserande neuralnettverk for kopla ekstrahering av einingar som mener og relasjonar. Vi viser at oppmerksomheten saman med lang kort tidspunkt minne (LSTM) kan pakke ut semantiske forhold mellom einingar som mener utan å ha tilgang til avhengighetstrår. Eksperimentar på korpora automatisk innhald-utpakking (ACE) viser at modellen vårt utfører betydelig tilfeldig modell av Li og Ji (2014). Vi sammenliknar også modellen vårt med ein slutttrebasert LSTM-modell (SPTree) av Miwa og Bansal (2016) og viser at modellen vårt utfører i 1% på einingar og 2% på relasjonar. Vårt fine-grained analyse viser også at vårt modell utfører betydelig bedre på Agent-Artifact-relasjonar, mens SPTree utfører bedre på fysiske og del-heile relasjonar.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nową opartą na uwadze powtarzającą się sieć neuronową do wspólnej ekstrakcji wzmianek i relacji jednostek. Pokazujemy, że uwaga wraz z siecią długotrwałej pamięci krótkoterminowej (LSTM) może wyodrębnić relacje semantyczne między wzmiankami jednostek bez dostępu do drzew zależności. Eksperymenty z korpusami automatycznej ekstrakcji treści (ACE) pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa model oparty na funkcjach wspólnego modelu Li i Ji (2014). Porównujemy również nasz model z całościowym drzewnym modelem LSTM (SPTree) Miwy i Bansala (2016) i pokazujemy, że nasz model działa w przypadku wzmianek jednostek i 2% w relacjach. Nasza precyzyjna analiza pokazuje również, że nasz model działa znacznie lepiej w relacjach Agent-Artefakt, podczas gdy SPTree działa lepiej w relacjach fizycznych i część-całość.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o nouă rețea neurală recurentă bazată pe atenție pentru extragerea comună a mențiunilor și relațiilor entităților. Arătăm că atenția împreună cu rețeaua de memorie pe termen lung (LSTM) poate extrage relații semantice între mențiunile entităților fără a avea acces la arborii de dependență. Experimentele asupra corporelor de extracție automată a conținutului (ACE) arată că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ modelul articular bazat pe caracteristici de Li și Ji (2014). Comparăm, de asemenea, modelul nostru cu un model LSTM end-to-end bazat pe arbori (SPTree) de Miwa și Bansal (2016) și arătăm că modelul nostru performează în termen de 1% la mențiunile entităților și 2% la relații. Analiza noastră fină arată, de asemenea, că modelul nostru performează semnificativ mai bine în relațiile agent-artefact, în timp ce SPTree performează mai bine în relațiile fizice și parțial-întreg.', 'mn': 'Бид анхаарлын үндсэн шинэ сэтгэл зүйн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг нэгтгэл, харилцааны нийлбэр гаргах зорилготой. Бид урт хугацааны санамж (LSTM) сүлжээнд анхаарлын төвлөрөл нь байгалийн тухай санамжлалтай модонд хамааралтай байдлын харилцаа гаргаж чадна. Автоматикийн Content Extraction (ACE) корпора дахь туршилтууд бидний загвар Ли болон Жи (2014) дахь нийлбэр загварыг маш чухал харуулдаг. Бид мөн моделийг Мива болон Бансал (2016 оны модел) дээр зогсоох LSTM загвартай харьцуулдаг. Бидний загварын загварын нэг хувийн дотор нэг хэмжээний талаар, харилцааны талаар 2% үйлдвэрлэхийг харуулж байна. Манай сайн тарианы анализ мөн бидний загвар агент-уран бүтээлийн харилцаанд илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. SPTree нь физик болон хэсэг хэсэг бүрэн харилцаанд илүү сайн ажилладаг.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu pažnju na ponovnoj neuralnoj mreži za zajedničku izvlačenje spominjanja i odnosa entiteta. Pokazujemo da pažnja zajedno sa dugoročnom sjećanjem (LSTM) mrežom može izvući semantičke odnose između entiteta spominju bez pristupa drveću zavisnosti. Eksperimenti o korporaciji automatskog izvlačenja sadržaja (ACE) pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi zajednički model koji se temelji na funkcijama od Li i Ji (2014). Takođe uspoređujemo naš model sa modelom LSTM na kraju drveta (SPTree) od strane Mive i Bansal (2016) i pokažemo da naš model izvodi unutar 1% na spominjanju entiteta i 2% na odnosima. Naša ispravna analiza takođe pokazuje da naš model radi značajno bolje o odnosima agenta-artifakta, dok SPTree radi bolje o fizičkim i članovim odnosima.', 'so': 'Waxaynu keennaa shabakad diiwaangelinta ah oo ku saleysan warqada qoyska si wadajir ah looga soo bixiyo macluumaadka iyo xiriirka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in xigta xusuusta waqti dheer oo gaaban (LSTM) shabakaddu uu soo bixi karo xiriir semanti ah oo u dhexeeya axwaasha macluumaadka aan helin geedaha ku xiran. Experiments on Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) corpora show that our model significantly outperforms feature-based joint model by Li and Ji (2014).  Sidoo kale waxaynu isbarbardhignaa tilmaankeenna ugu dambaysta qoriga LSTM (SPTree) ee Miwa iyo Bansal (2016) waxaana muujinaynaa in muusikadeennu gudaha 1% ka sameynayo macluumaadka dhamaadka iyo 2% xiriirka xiriirka. Analyadeenna wanaagsanaa wuxuu sidoo kale muujiyaa in modellkayagu aad uga fiican yahay xiriirka Agent-Artifact, marka SPTree uu si wanaagsan uga sameeyo xiriirka fizikka iyo qeybta-Whole.', 'si': 'අපි නියම අවධානය සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාලය පෙන්වන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ දිගටම කාලයක් මතකය (LSTM) ජාලය සමඟ අවධානය ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් වලින් අවධානය අ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය (ACE) කොර්පෝරා වලට පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩල් ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් පුළුවන අපි මයිවා සහ බැන්සාල් වලින් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් LSTM මොඩේල් එක්ක (SPTree) එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්න අපේ  අපේ හොඳ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක නියෝජිත-ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් හොඳයි කියලා, SPTree විශ', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett nytt uppmärksamhetsbaserat återkommande neuralt nätverk för gemensam extraktion av entitetsomnämnanden och relationer. Vi visar att uppmärksamhet tillsammans med LSTM-nätverk kan extrahera semantiska relationer mellan entitetsomnämnanden utan att ha tillgång till beroendeträd. Experiment på ACE-corpora (Automatic Content Extraction) visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar funktionsbaserad gemensam modell från Li och Ji (2014). Vi jämför även vår modell med en end-to-end trädbaserad LSTM-modell (SPTree) av Miwa och Bansal (2016) och visar att vår modell presterar inom 1% på entitetsomnämnanden och 2% på relationer. Vår finkorniga analys visar också att vår modell presterar betydligt bättre på Agent-Artifact relationer, medan SPTree presterar bättre på Fysiska och Del-Hela relationer.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் மீண்டும் திரும்ப நெருக்கிய வலைப்பின்னலை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் பொருள் கு நாம் நீண்ட கால நினைவு (LSTM) வலைப்பின்னலுடன் கவனத்தை காட்டுகிறோம் சார்ந்த மரங்களை அணுகலாம் இல்லாமல் உடன்பொருள் குறிப்ப தானியங்கி உள்ளடக்கத்தை வெளியேற்றுதல் (ACE) நிறுவனத்தில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது லி மற்றும் ஜி மூலம் எங்கள் மாதிரி முறைமையில் கூட்டு ம நாம் மிவா மற்றும் Bansal (2016) மாதிரி முடிவில் முடிவில் உள்ள LSTM மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் மீவா மற்றும் பசால் மாதிரியைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம்  எங்கள் நன்றாக பிரிப்பு ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது என்று நம் மாதிரி செயல்படுகிறது முகவரி-கலை தொடர்புகளில் மிகவும் நல்ல செயல்படுகிறது, மற்றும் SP', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی توجه کی بنیاد پر دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی نشانیوں اور رابطہ کے ساتھ ایک جوڑے اٹھانے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ طویل مدت کی مہمانی (LSTM) نیٹورک کے ساتھ توجه کی نسبت ایستی درختوں کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ نکال سکتی ہے بغیر اس کے کہ اعتباری درختوں کی دسترسی نہ ہو۔ اٹوٹوٹوٹ منٹ نکتٹ (ACE) کورپورا پر آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا موڈل لی اور جی (2014) کے ذریعہ سے فوجیٹ منٹ موڈل سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے ہماری مدل کو میوا اور بانسل (2016) کے ذریعہ ایک درخت کے اندر بنیادی LSTM موڈل (SPTree) کے ساتھ مقایسہ کر دیا اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارا مدل ایک% کے اندر انٹیٹ کے ذریعہ اور 2% رابطہ پر عمل کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے نیک دانے کا تحلیل بھی دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا مدل اگنٹ-آرٹیفٹ رابطہ پر بہتر عمل کرتا ہے حالانکہ SPTree فیزیک اور حصہ پورے رابطہ پر بہتر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz ma'lumot taqdimot va bogʻlamalarni birlashtirish uchun qo'llanmalar tarmoqni taqdim qilamiz. Biz bir necha muddati xotira (LSTM) tarmoqni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, tashqi daraxtga murakkab bo'lmaydigan semantik aloqalarni ajratish mumkin. Comment Biz bu modelimizni Miwa va Bansal (2016) bilan oxirigi LSTM modeli (SPTre) bilan birlashtiramiz va modelimizni 1% tizimdan foydalanishimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, ma'lumot taʼminotlari bilan boshqarishimiz va 2% bilan boshqarish mumkin. Bizning yaxshi analytikimizni ko'rsatadi, modelmiz Agent-Artifact aloqalarida juda yaxshi bajaradi, va SPTre Fizik va Butun aloqalarni yaxshi bajaradi.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mạng thần kinh nổi dậy nổi loạn mới để khai thác các thực thể và quan hệ. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng tập trung cùng với hệ thống nhớ ngắn hạn (LSTM) có thể trích dẫn các mối quan hệ theo ngữ pháp giữa thực thể mà không có quyền sử dụng các cây phụ thuộc. Thí nghiệm về chiết xuất kim khí tự động (ACE) với cơ thể cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn toàn vượt trội hơn so với mô hình khớp của Li và Cơ Quan (Ngực). Chúng tôi cũng so sánh mô hình của chúng tôi với mô hình kết thúc dựa trên cây (SPTree) của Miwa và Bansal (thậm chí là phần thách bây giờ) và cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có tiến triển trong vòng 1+ trên thực thể chỉ thị và 2='về quan hệ. Phân tích tích đặc biệt của chúng tôi cũng cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi làm tốt hơn về quan hệ đặc vụ, trong khi cây kèo hoàn thiện quan hệ vật chất và phần bộ.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et nyt opmærksomhedsbaseret tilbagevendende neuralt netværk til fælles ekstraktion af entitetsomtaler og relationer. Vi viser, at opmærksomhed sammen med langtidshukommelse (LSTM) netværk kan udtrække semantiske relationer mellem entitetsnævnelser uden at have adgang til afhængighedstræer. Eksperimenter med ACE-corpora (Automatic Content Extraction) viser, at vores model i høj grad overgår funktionsbaserede fællesmodeller fra Li og Ji (2014). Vi sammenligner også vores model med en end-to-end træbaseret LSTM model (SPTree) af Miwa og Bansal (2016) og viser, at vores model præsterer inden for 1% på entity omtaler og 2% på relationer. Vores finkornede analyse viser også, at vores model præsterer betydeligt bedre på Agent-Artifact relationer, mens SPTree præsterer bedre på Fysiske og Del-Hele relationer.', 'bg': 'Представяме нова, базирана на вниманието рецидивираща невронна мрежа за съвместно извличане на споменавания и взаимоотношения на същността. Показваме, че вниманието, заедно с мрежата за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ), може да извлече семантични връзки между споменаваните обекти, без да има достъп до дървета за зависимост. Експерименти с корпуси за автоматично извличане на съдържание (АСЕ) показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда функционален съединителен модел от Ли и Джи (2014). Също така сравняваме модела си с модел от край до край базиран на дърво от Мива и Бансал (2016) и показваме, че моделът ни се представя в рамките на 1% при споменаването на обекти и 2% при отношенията. Нашият финозърнат анализ също показва, че нашият модел се представя значително по-добре в отношенията агент-артефакт, докато SPTree се представя по-добре в отношенията Физически и Част-Цяло.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan jaringan saraf rekuren berbasis perhatian baru untuk ekstraksi kongsi entity menyebutkan dan hubungan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa perhatian bersama dengan jaringan memori jangka pendek panjang (LSTM) dapat mengekstrak hubungan semantis antara entity menyebutkan tanpa memiliki akses ke pohon dependensi. Eksperimen pada korpra Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) menunjukkan bahwa model kita secara signifikan melebihi model bersama berdasarkan fitur oleh Li dan Ji (2014). Kami juga membandingkan model kami dengan model LSTM (SPTree) dari Miwa dan Bansal (2016) berbasis pohon akhir ke akhir dan menunjukkan bahwa model kami berhasil dalam 1% pada entitas menyebutkan dan 2% pada hubungan. Analisis kami juga menunjukkan bahwa model kami berhasil jauh lebih baik dalam hubungan Agen-Artifakta, sementara SPTree berhasil lebih baik dalam hubungan fisik dan Part-Whole.', 'nl': "We presenteren een nieuw aandachtsgebonden terugkerend neuraal netwerk voor gezamenlijke extractie van entiteitsvermeldingen en relaties. We laten zien dat aandacht samen met het LSTM-netwerk semantische relaties tussen entiteitsvermeldingen kan extraheren zonder toegang te hebben tot afhankelijkheidsbomen. Experimenten met ACE-corpora's (Automatic Content Extraction) tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan op feature-based joint model van Li en Ji (2014). We vergelijken ons model ook met een end-to-end boomgebaseerd LSTM model (SPTree) van Miwa en Bansal (2016) en laten zien dat ons model binnen 1% presteert op entiteitsvermeldingen en 2% op relaties. Onze fijnkorrelige analyse toont ook aan dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteert op Agent-Artifact relaties, terwijl SPTree beter presteert op Fysieke en Deel-Whole relaties.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu pažnju na ponovnoj neuronskoj mreži za zajedničku izvlačenje spominjanja i odnosa subjekta. Mi pokazujemo da pažnja zajedno s dugoročnim sjećanjem (LSTM) mreža može izvući semantičke odnose između subjekta spominju bez pristupa drveću zavisnosti. Eksperimenti o korporaciji automatskog izvlačenja sadržaja (ACE) pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi zajednički model na funkcijama koje su temeljeni Li i Ji (2014). Također uspoređujemo naš model s modelom LSTM-a na kraju na kraju stabla (SPTree) Miwa i Bansal (2016) i pokazujemo da naš model izvodi unutar 1% na spominjanju entiteta i 2% na odnosima. Naša ispravna analiza također pokazuje da naš model radi značajno bolje o odnosima agenta-artifakta, dok SPTree radi bolje o fizičkim i dijelom cjelokupnim odnosima.', 'ko': '우리는 실체 언급과 관계의 연합 추출에 사용되는 새로운 주의를 바탕으로 하는 귀속 신경 네트워크를 제시했다.주의와 장단시 기억 (LSTM) 네트워크는 의존 트리에 접근하지 않은 상황에서 실체 언급 간의 의미 관계를 추출할 수 있음을 발견했다.자동 콘텐츠 추출(ACE) 자료 라이브러리에서의 실험에 따르면 우리의 모델은 리와 지(2014)가 제시한 특징 기반의 결합 모델보다 현저히 우수하다.또한 우리 모델을 Miwa와 Bansal(2016)이 제시한 끝에서 끝까지의 트리를 바탕으로 하는 LSTM모델(SPTree)과 비교한 결과 우리 모델은 실체적 언급에서 1% 이내, 관계에서 2% 이내로 나타났다.우리의 세립도 분석에 의하면 우리의 모델은 대리 부품 관계에서 더욱 잘 표현되고 SPTree는 물리와 부분-전체 관계에서 더욱 잘 표현된다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mtandao wa kisasa unaoendelea kwa ajili ya kuondolewa pamoja kwa majina na mahusiano. Tunaonyesha kuwa, pamoja na mtandao wa kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu (LSTM) unaweza kuondoa mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya majina ya viwanda bila ya kupata miti ya kutegemea. Majaribio kwenye makampuni yanayotokana na kujitenga kwa kujitegemea (ACE) yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa na muundo wa muungano ulioanzishwa na Li na Ji (2014). Pia tunalinganisha mtindo wetu na mtindo wa LSTM mwenye msingi wa mwisho wa mti (SPTre) uliofanywa na Miwa na Bansal (2016) na kuonyesha kuwa model yetu inafanya ndani ya asilimia 1 kuhusu tajwa na asilimia 2 kuhusu uhusiano. Our fine-grained analysis also shows that our model performs significantly better on Agent-Artifact relations, while SPTree performs better on Physical and Part-Whole relations.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuartiges aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes rezidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk zur gemeinsamen Extraktion von Entitätserwähnungen und Beziehungen. Wir zeigen, dass Aufmerksamkeit zusammen mit Long Short Term Memory (LSTM) Netzwerk semantische Beziehungen zwischen Entity Erwähnungen extrahieren kann, ohne Zugriff auf Abhängigkeitsbäume zu haben. Experimente mit ACE-Korpora (Automatic Content Extraction) zeigen, dass unser Modell das funktionsbasierte Joint-Modell von Li und Ji deutlich übertrifft (2014). Wir vergleichen unser Modell auch mit einem End-to-End Baum-basierten LSTM Modell (SPTree) von Miwa und Bansal (2016) und zeigen, dass unser Modell innerhalb von 1% bei Entity Erwähnungen und 2% bei Relationen funktioniert. Unsere detaillierte Analyse zeigt auch, dass unser Modell bei Agent-Artefakt-Beziehungen deutlich besser abschneidet, während SPTree bei physischen und Teil-Ganzen-Beziehungen besser abschneidet.', 'fa': 'ما یک شبکه عصبی بازگشت بر روی توجه تازه را برای استخراج همگانی از یادآوری و ارتباط\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که توجه با شبکه حافظه کوتاه زمانی (LSTM) می تواند رابطه\u200cهای semantic بین شرکت\u200cها را بدون دسترسی به درختان بستگی خارج کند. تجربه\u200cهایی در شرکت\u200cهای اخراج محتوای خودکار (ACE) نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما با Li and Ji (2014) مدل مشترک بر ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای زیادی بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین مدل خود را با یک مدل LSTM (SPTree) بسیار پایان به درخت پایان مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، با میوا و بانسال (2016) و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل ما در اندازه ۱ درصد در مورد یادآوری و ۲ درصد در رابطه انجام می\u200cدهد. تحلیل نیک دانه\u200cهای ما هم نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما در رابطه\u200cهای مامور-آرتیفک خیلی بهتر انجام می\u200cدهد، در حالی که SPTree در رابطه\u200cهای فیزیکی و قسمت کل بهتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n nuwe aandag gebaseerde herhaalde neuralnetwerk voor joint uitpakking van entiteite bepaal en relasies. Ons wys dat aandag saam met lang kort tyd geheue (LSTM) netwerk kan semantiese verwantings tussen entiteit bepaal sonder toegang tot afhanklikheidsboom te hê. Eksperimente op Automatiese Inhoud Uitpakking (ACE) korpora vertoon dat ons model betekenlik uitvoer funksie-gebaseerde joint model deur Li en Ji (2014). Ons vergelyk ook ons model met 'n einde-na-einde-boom-gebaseerde LSTM model (SPTree) deur Miwa en Bansal (2016) en wys dat ons model in 1% uitvoer op entiteit bepaal en 2% op relasies. Ons fyn-graad analisie wys ook dat ons model beter uitvoer op Agent-Artifakte verhouding, terwyl SPTree beter uitvoer op fysiske en deel-heel verhouding.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një rrjet neural të ri të bazuar në vëmendje për nxjerrjen e përbashkët të përmendimeve dhe marrëdhënieve të njësisë. Ne tregojmë se vëmendja së bashku me rrjetin e kujtesës afat-shkurtër (LSTM) mund të nxjerrë marrëdhënie semantike midis përmendimeve të njësisë pa pasur akses në pemët e varësisë. Eksperimentet mbi korprën Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron ndjeshëm modelin e përbashkët bazuar në funksione nga Li dhe Ji (2014). Ne krahasojmë gjithashtu modelin tonë me një model LSTM bazuar në pemë (SPTree) nga Miwa dhe Bansal (2016) dhe tregojmë se modeli ynë performon brenda 1% në emrat e njësisë dhe 2% në marrëdhëniet. Analiza jonë e shkëlqyer tregon gjithashtu se modeli ynë funksionon më mirë në marrëdhëniet Agjent-Artifakt, ndërsa SPTree funksionon më mirë në marrëdhëniet fizike dhe pjesë-e të plota.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուշադրության վրա հիմնված նոր, կրկնօրինակ նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի միասին վերացնենք անհատականությունների նշանները և հարաբերությունները: We show that attention along with long short term memory (LSTM) network can extract semantic relations between entity mentions without having access to dependency trees.  Ավտոմատիկ պարունակության արտահանման (ACE) փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է Li-ի և Ջի կազմակերպված համեմատական մոդելը (2014). Մենք նաև համեմատում ենք մեր մոդելը ծառի վերջ-վերջ հիմնված LSMT մոդելի (SP Tree) հետ Միվայի և Բանզալի (2016) կողմից և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կատարում է 1 տոկոսի ընթացքում կազմակերպությունների մեջ և 2 տոկոսի ընթացքում հարաբերությունների մեջ Մեր գեղեցիկ վերլուծությունը նաև ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը ավելի լավ է աշխատում Ագենտ-Արվեստի հարաբերություններում, մինչդեռ ՍՊՏրեյը ավելի լավ է աշխատում ֆիզիկական և մասամբողջ հարաբերություններում:', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe çykyş we baglaşyklaryň ýene-de bir täze üns tabanly täze bir nural şebekesini a çýarys. Biz gysga wagtlar ýagdaýynda üns berip bilýäris (LSTM) aňlaýyşyň arasynda semantik baglaýyşy baglaýyşlara erişmeden çykaryp biler. Otomatik Mazmunlar Extraction (ACE) köpüründeki experimentler biziň modelimiz Li we Ji (2014-nji ýyldan) möhüm bellenen çykyş nusgasyny çykarýar. Biz hem modimizi Miwa we Bansal (2016-nji ýyl) tarapynda LSTM nusgasyna görýäris we nusgasymyz 1% içinde bar we 2% ilişkilerde bar. Biziň iň gowy analyzamyz hem nusgymyzyň Ajan-Artifakt baglaşyklarynda has gowy dowam edýändigini görkezýär, SPTree-yň Fizik we Bölüm baglaşyklarynda has gowy dowam edýär.', 'am': 'አካባቢውን እና ግንኙነትን ለመውጣት የደጋሚ የደዌብ መረብ አቀረብን፡፡ የረጅም ቁጥር ማስታወሻ (LSTM) መረብ በአካባቢው ማስታወሻ መካከል የsemantic ግንኙነት እንዲያወጣ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በኮርፖራ ላይ የራሳቸውን ውጤት ማውጣት (ACE) ሞዴላታችን በኩል እና ዲ (2014) የተመሳሳይ የአካባቢ ድርጅት ሞዴል የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ እናም ምሳሌያችንን ወደ መጨረሻ መጨረሻ LSTM ሞዴል (SPTree) በሚዋ እና ባንሳል (2016) እናሳያቸዋለን፤ ሞዴሌያችንም በአካባቢው ማስታወስ እና በ2 በመቶ ግንኙነት ላይ እንደተሳካ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የተመሳሳይ ትምህርታችን ደግሞ ምሳሌያችን በAgent-Artifact ግንኙነት በማድረግ በጣም የበለጠ እንዲያሳየው እና SPTree በአካሲና በሙሉ ግንኙነት የሚሻል ሲሆን ያሳያል፡፡', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu neuronu mrežu na temelju pažnje za zajedničku izvlačenje spominjanja i odnosa entiteta. Pokazujemo da pažnja zajedno sa dugoročnom sjećanjem (LSTM) mrežom može izvući semantičke odnose između subjekta spominju bez pristupa drveću zavisnosti. Eksperimenti o korporaciji automatskog izvlačenja sadržaja (ACE) pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi zajednički model koji se temelji na funkcijama Li i Ji (2014). Također uspoređujemo naš model sa modelom LSTM na kraju na drvetu (SPTree) od strane Miwa i Bansal (2016) i pokazujemo da naš model izvodi unutar 1% na spominjanju entiteta i 2% na odnosima. Naša ispravna analiza također pokazuje da naš model radi značajno bolje o odnosima agenta-artifakta, dok SPTree radi bolje o fizičkim i dijelom cjelokupnim odnosima.', 'ca': "Presentam una nova xarxa neural recurrent basada en l'atenció per a l'extracció conjunta de mentions i relacions d'entitats. Mostrem que l'atenció juntament amb la xarxa de memòria a curt termini (LSTM) pot extrair relacions semàntiques entre les mencions d'entitats sense tenir accés a arbres de dependencia. Els experiments d'extracció automàtica de contingut (ACE) mostran que el nostre model supera significativament el model conjunt basat en característiques de Li i Ji (2014). També comparem el nostre model amb un model LSTM basat en arbres (SPTree) de Miwa i Bansal (2016) i demostram que el nostre model actua en un 1% en les mentions de l'entitat i un 2% en les relacions. La nostra anàlisi fina mostra també que el nostre model actua molt millor en les relacions agent-artefacte, mentre que SPTree actua millor en les relacions físicas i part-integrals.", 'az': 'Biz yeni bir təsirli nöral şebekəsi ilə birlikdə istifadə etmək üçün yeni bir nöral şəbekəsi göstəririk. Biz göstəririk ki, uzun müddətli məlumat (LSTM) ağı ilə birlikdə məlumat bağlı ağacların arasındakı semantik bağlantıları uzaqlaşdıra bilər. Automatik Content Extraction (ACE) korporası təcrübələrinin modelimiz Li və Ji (2014) tərəfindən mövcuddur. Biz də modelimizi Miwa və Bansal (2016) ilə son-son ağacların LSTM modelini (SPTree) ilə qarşılaşdırırıq və modelimizin 1% içində istifadə edir və 2% ilişkilərdə istifadə edir. Bizim gözəl taxıl analizimiz də göstərir ki, modellərimiz Agent-Artifact ilişkilerində daha xeyirli olaraq, SPTree fiziki və Bölüm ilişkilerində daha yaxşı olaraq.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক উপস্থাপন করেছি যাতে বিষয়বস্তুর কথা এবং সম্পর্ক বের করে  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে দীর্ঘ মেয়াদের স্মৃতির (এলসিএম) নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে দীর্ঘমেয়াদ সংক্ষিপ্ত সম্পর্ক বের করতে পারে বস্তুর মে স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভিত্তিক যোগাযোগ মোডেল লি এবং জি (২০১৪) দ্বারা আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক যোগাযোগ মডেল প্রদর্শন করে। আমরা মিওয়া এবং বানসাল (২০১৬) দ্বারা আমাদের মডেলের মাধ্যমে শেষ পর্যন্ত এলস্টিএম মডেলের (এসপিট্রি) তুলনা করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল ১% ের মধ্যে প্রক আমাদের সুন্দর বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে এজেন্ট-আর্টিফ্যাক্ট সম্পর্কে আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভালো কাজ করে, আর এসপিট্রি শারীরিক এবং পার্', 'cs': 'Představujeme novou rekurentní neuronovou síť založenou na pozornosti pro společnou extrakci zmínek a vztahů entit. Ukazujeme, že pozornost spolu s dlouhodobou krátkodobou pamětí (LSTM) může extrahovat sémantické vztahy mezi zmínkami entit bez přístupu ke stromům závislostí. Experimenty na korpusech automatické extrakce obsahu (ACE) ukazují, že náš model výrazně překonává společný model založený na funkcích Li a Ji (2014). Dále porovnáváme náš model s end-to-end stromovým LSTM modelem (SPTree) od Miwy a Bansal (2016) a ukazujeme, že náš model funguje v hodnotě 1% na zmínkách entity a 2% na vztazích. Naše jemná analýza také ukazuje, že náš model funguje výrazně lépe u vztahů Agent-Artefakt, zatímco SPTree funguje lépe u fyzických a částečně-celých vztahů.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset tähelepanupõhist korduvat närvivõrku olemuse märkuste ja suhete ühiseks ekstraheerimiseks. Näitame, et tähelepanu koos pikaajalise lühiajalise mälu (LSTM) võrguga suudab ekstraheerida semantilisi seoseid olemimärgituste vahel ilma juurdepääsu sõltuvuspuudele. Automaatse sisu ekstraheerimise (ACE) korpuste eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudel on märkimisväärselt parem kui Li ja Ji (2014) funktsioonipõhised ühendusmudelid. Samuti võrdleme oma mudelit Miwa ja Bansali (2016) poolt läbiviidava puupõhise LSTM mudeliga (SPTree) ning näitame, et meie mudel toimib 1% ulatuses üksuste märkimisel ja 2% suhetel. Meie peeneteraline analüüs näitab ka, et meie mudel toimib märkimisväärselt paremini Agent-Artifact suhetes, samas kui SPTree toimib paremini Füüsilistel ja Osa-tervik suhetel.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden huomiopohjaisen toistuvan hermoverkon entiteettimainintojen ja suhteiden yhteiseen poimintaan. Osoitamme, että huomio yhdessä pitkän aikavälin muistin (LSTM) verkon kanssa voi poimia semanttisia suhteita entiteettimainintojen välillä ilman riippuvuuspuita. ACE (Automatic Content Extraction) -korpusten kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi Li ja Ji:n (2014) ominaisuuksiin perustuvasta liitosmallista. Vertaamme malliamme myös Miwan ja Bansalin (2016) end-to-end-puupohjaiseen LSTM-malliin (SPTree) ja osoitamme, että mallimme suoriutuu 1%:n sisällä entiteettimaininnoista ja 2%:n suhteista. Hienorakeinen analyysimme osoittaa myös, että mallimme suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin agentti-esine-suhteissa, kun taas SPTree suoriutuu paremmin fysikaalisissa ja osa-koko-suhteissa.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo na pozornosti temelječo ponavljajočo se nevronsko omrežje za skupno ekstrakcijo omenitev in odnosov entitet. Pokazali smo, da lahko pozornost skupaj z dolgoročnim kratkoročnim pomnilnikom (LSTM) omrežjem izvleče semantične relacije med omenitvami entitet brez dostopa do dreves odvisnosti. Eksperimenti na korpusih za samodejno ekstrakcijo vsebine (ACE) kažejo, da je naš model bistveno boljši od funkcijsko osnovanih skupnih modelov Li in Ji (2014). Naš model primerjamo tudi z modelom LSTM iz konca do konca (SPTree), ki temelji na drevesu Miwa in Bansal (2016), in pokažemo, da je naš model uspešen v 1% pri omenjanju entitete in 2% pri relacijah. Naša drobnozrnata analiza prav tako kaže, da je naš model bistveno boljši na relacijah Agent-Artifact, medtem ko SPTree uspešnejši na relacijah Fizično in Del-Celoto.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani jerin aikin kwanan da aka baka wani watani na kari a baka kwanan aiki dõmin ya fita wadan rabo masu ambato da mazaɓa. Tuna nũna wa muhalli da jerin lokaci mai tsawo (LSSM) kan ta fitar da danganci na semanti tsakanin sunayen abubuwa kuma bã ya iya samun su sami zuwa ga itãcen da ke ƙayyade. Experiments on Extractin Ƙaramian Ƙaramian Ƙaramiwa (ATEke) na nuna cewa misalinmu yana mai significant outperforma motel na haɗi a kan sali na ƙayyade rubutun da Li and Ji (2014). Tuna samfane misalinmu da misalin a ƙari zuwa-ƙari na LTRM (SPTree) na Miwa da Bansal (2016) kuma ke nuna misalinmu yana aiki guda a %1% kan karatun masu ambato da 2% kan danganta. AnalyyinMu mai kyãwo na nuna cewa misalinmu yana tafiyar da shi mai girma a kan ma'abũcin muhimmada na Ajansa-artifakt, kuma da SPTree yana sami mafi kyãwo a kan masu Fizikin da Compositi-Duke.", 'he': "אנחנו מציגים רשת עצבית חדשה שמבוססת על תשומת לב חוזרת לחילוץ משותף של זיכרונות יחסים. אנחנו מראים את תשומת לב יחד עם רשת זיכרון לטווח קצר ארוך (LSTM) יכולה להוציא מערכות יחסים סמנטיות בין זיכרונות ישויות בלי גישה לעצי תלויות. ניסויים על גופורה של תוכן אוטומטי (ACE) מראים שהמודל שלנו יוצא משמעותית יותר ממודל משותף מבוסס על תכונות על ידי לי וג'י (2014). אנחנו משווה גם את הדוגמא שלנו עם דוגמא LSTM מבוססת על עץ סוף-סוף (SPTree) על ידי מיווה ובנסל (2016) ולהראות שהדוגמא שלנו מבצעת בתוך 1% על היחידה הזכירה ו-2% על מערכות יחסים. הניתוח המפורסם שלנו גם מראה שהמודל שלנו מופע טוב יותר במערכת יחסים סוכן-אמן, בעוד SPTree מופע טוב יותר במערכת יחסים פיזית וחלקית שלמה.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing paling-akéwé ning buturan oleh nyebuturan gambar nggawe barang sampek karo nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh dumadhi lunak akeh dumadhi memperbudhakan (LTT M) iso nggawe barang semantar dumadhi tanggal sampeyan mruput User: Awak dhéwé kiparane model nambah karo model sing nambah akeh lanjut ning acara mulai, dadi, lan kelompok barang nggawe lan mênêmêr, egal ngéwé sistem iki sampek 1% sampek ndéwé sampek karo 2% sampek ndéwé. Anali sing dibenalke kelas-kotak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono model nambah sing luwih dumateng liyane karo Ajan-Artif barang, terus Jaring-Jaring sing sumulakno sing luwih apik karo perusahaan mat ahes karo parti-Whole.', 'bo': 'ངེད་ཚོས་དབུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚུལ་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་དྲ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྟེན་པའི་ ང་ཚོས་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རིང་ཐག་མ་ཚད་བརྗོད་པ(LSTM)དྲ་བ་ནང་དུ་དབུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ Experiments on Automatic Content Extraction (ACE) corpora show that our model significantly outperforms feature-based joint model by Li and Ji (2014). ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་དབུགས་འདི་Miwa དང་Bansal(2016)ལ་མཐའ་མཇུག་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་LSTM་རྣམ་པ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་བྱས་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཏོན་པའི་དབྱིབས་དང་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྡོང་བོའི་དབྱིབས་དང་ཆ་ཤས་'}
{'en': 'Naturalizing a Programming Language via Interactive Learning', 'ar': 'تطبيع لغة برمجة عبر التعلم التفاعلي', 'es': 'Naturalización de un lenguaje de programación a través del aprendizaje interactivo', 'pt': 'Naturalizando uma Linguagem de Programação via Aprendizagem Interativa', 'fr': "Naturalisation d'un langage de programmation via l'apprentissage interactif", 'ja': 'インタラクティブラーニングによるプログラミング言語の帰化', 'zh': '以交互式学归化编程语言', 'ru': 'Натурализация языка программирования посредством интерактивного обучения', 'hi': 'इंटरैक्टिव लर्निंग के माध्यम से एक प्रोग्रामिंग भाषा को प्राकृतिक बनाना', 'ga': 'Teanga Ríomhchlárúcháin a Nádúrú trí Fhoghlaim Idirghníomhach', 'el': 'Φυσικοποίηση μιας γλώσσας προγραμματισμού μέσω διαδραστικής μάθησης', 'it': 'Naturalizzazione di un linguaggio di programmazione tramite apprendimento interattivo', 'hu': 'Programnyelv honosítása interaktív tanulással', 'lt': 'Programavimo kalbos natūralizavimas naudojant sąveikų mokymąsi', 'kk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Interactive Learning വഴി ഒരു പ്രോഗ്രാം ഭാഷ സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Naturalizing a Programming Language via Interactive Learning', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Naturalizacja języka programowania poprzez interaktywne uczenie się', 'mt': 'Naturalizzazzjoni ta’ Lingwa ta’ Programmazzjoni permezz ta’ Tagħlim Interattiv', 'ro': 'Naturalizarea unui limbaj de programare prin învățare interactivă', 'mn': 'Интерактив суралцах аргаар програмчлалын хэл', 'sv': 'Att naturalisera ett programmeringsspråk via interaktivt lärande', 'so': 'Waxbarashada Interactive', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Naturalizacija programiranog jezika preko Interaktivnog učenja', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bảo bối ngôn ngữ lập trình thông qua giáo dục', 'da': 'Naturalisering af et programmeringssprog via interaktiv læring', 'bg': 'Натурализиране на езика за програмиране чрез интерактивно обучение', 'hr': 'Naturaliziranje programiranog jezika preko interaktivnog učenja', 'de': 'Naturalisierung einer Programmiersprache durch interaktives Lernen', 'nl': 'Een programmeertaal naturaliseren via interactief leren', 'ko': '인터랙티브 학습을 통해 프로그래밍 언어를 자연화하다', 'tr': 'Programlamak dilini interaktif öwrenmek üçin meňzeşleýär', 'fa': 'طبیعت\u200cسازی یک زبان برنامه\u200cبندی از طریق یادگیری Interactive', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kwa kutengeneza lugha ya programu kupitia Elimu ya Kimataifa', 'am': 'የተለመደው ዕይታ', 'hy': 'Naturalizing a Programming Language via Interactive Learning', 'bn': 'Interactive শিক্ষা দ্বারা প্রোগ্রামিং ভাষা স্বাভাবিক করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Naturalizacija programiranog jezika preko Interaktivnog učenja', 'az': 'ńįnteraktif √∂yr…ônm…ô vasit…ôsil…ô proqramma dilini t…ôhsil etm…ôk', 'cs': 'Přirození programovacího jazyka prostřednictvím interaktivního učení', 'ca': "Naturalitzar un llenguatge de programació mitjançant l'aprenentatge interactiu", 'et': 'Programmeerimiskeele naturaliseerimine interaktiivse õppe kaudu', 'sq': 'Naturalizimi i një gjuhe programimi nëpërmjet Mësimit Interaktiv', 'id': 'Mengalami Bahasa Programasi melalui Belajar Interaktif', 'fi': 'Ohjelmointikielen luonti vuorovaikutteisen oppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Naturalizacija programskega jezika prek interaktivnega učenja', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Naturalizing a Programming Language via Interactive Learning', 'bo': 'བྱ་རིམ་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཤེས་འཇུག་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ'}
{'en': 'Our goal is to create a convenient natural language interface for performing well-specified but complex actions such as analyzing data, manipulating text, and querying databases. However, existing natural language interfaces for such tasks are quite primitive compared to the power one wields with a programming language. To bridge this gap, we start with a core programming language and allow users to naturalize the core language incrementally by defining alternative, more natural syntax and increasingly complex concepts in terms of compositions of simpler ones. In a voxel world, we show that a community of users can simultaneously teach a common system a diverse language and use it to build hundreds of complex voxel structures. Over the course of three days, these users went from using only the core language to using the naturalized language in 85.9 % of the last 10 K utterances.', 'ar': 'هدفنا هو إنشاء واجهة لغة طبيعية مناسبة لأداء إجراءات محددة جيدًا ولكنها معقدة مثل تحليل البيانات ومعالجة النص والاستعلام عن قواعد البيانات. ومع ذلك ، فإن واجهات اللغة الطبيعية الحالية لمثل هذه المهام بدائية للغاية مقارنة بالقوة التي يستخدمها المرء مع لغة البرمجة. لسد هذه الفجوة ، نبدأ بلغة برمجة أساسية ونسمح للمستخدمين "بتجنيس" اللغة الأساسية بشكل تدريجي من خلال تحديد بناء جملة بديل وأكثر طبيعية ومفاهيم متزايدة التعقيد من حيث تركيبات أبسط منها. في عالم فوكسل ، نظهر أنه يمكن لمجتمع من المستخدمين تعليم نظام مشترك لغة متنوعة في نفس الوقت واستخدامها لبناء المئات من هياكل فوكسل المعقدة. على مدار ثلاثة أيام ، انتقل هؤلاء المستخدمون من استخدام اللغة الأساسية فقط إلى استخدام اللغة المجنَّسة في 85.9٪ من آخر 10 آلاف نطق.', 'fr': "Notre objectif est de créer une interface en langage naturel pratique pour effectuer des actions bien précises mais complexes, telles que l'analyse de données, la manipulation de texte et l'interrogation de bases de données. Cependant, les interfaces en langage naturel existantes pour de telles tâches sont assez primitives par rapport à la puissance d'un langage de programmation. Pour combler cette lacune, nous commençons par un langage de programmation de base et permettons aux utilisateurs de «\xa0naturaliser\xa0» le langage de base de manière incrémentielle en définissant une syntaxe alternative plus naturelle et des concepts de plus en plus complexes en termes de compositions de plus en plus simples. Dans un monde de voxels, nous montrons qu'une communauté d'utilisateurs peut simultanément enseigner un langage diversifié à un système commun et l'utiliser pour construire des centaines de structures de voxels complexes. En trois jours, ces utilisateurs sont passés de l'utilisation de la langue principale à la langue naturalisée dans 85,9\xa0% des 10 000 derniers énoncés.", 'pt': 'Nosso objetivo é criar uma interface de linguagem natural conveniente para executar ações bem especificadas, mas complexas, como analisar dados, manipular texto e consultar bancos de dados. No entanto, as interfaces de linguagem natural existentes para tais tarefas são bastante primitivas em comparação com o poder que se exerce com uma linguagem de programação. Para preencher essa lacuna, começamos com uma linguagem de programação central e permitimos que os usuários “naturalizem” a linguagem central de forma incremental, definindo uma sintaxe alternativa mais natural e conceitos cada vez mais complexos em termos de composições de outras mais simples. Em um mundo voxel, mostramos que uma comunidade de usuários pode ensinar simultaneamente a um sistema comum uma linguagem diversa e usá-la para construir centenas de estruturas voxel complexas. Ao longo de três dias, esses usuários passaram de usar apenas a linguagem principal para usar a linguagem naturalizada em 85,9% dos últimos 10 mil enunciados.', 'es': 'Nuestro objetivo es crear una interfaz de lenguaje natural conveniente para realizar acciones bien especificadas pero complejas, como analizar datos, manipular texto y consultar bases de datos. Sin embargo, las interfaces de lenguaje natural existentes para este tipo de tareas son bastante primitivas en comparación con el poder que se tiene con un lenguaje de programación. Para cerrar esta brecha, comenzamos con un lenguaje de programación central y permitimos a los usuarios «naturalizar» el lenguaje principal de forma incremental mediante la definición de una sintaxis alternativa más natural y conceptos cada vez más complejos en términos de composiciones de otros más simples. En un mundo de vóxel, demostramos que una comunidad de usuarios puede enseñar simultáneamente un lenguaje diverso a un sistema común y usarlo para construir cientos de estructuras de vóxel complejas. En el transcurso de tres días, estos usuarios pasaron de usar solo el idioma principal a usar el idioma naturalizado en el 85,9% de los últimos 10.000 enunciados.', 'ja': '当社の目標は、データの分析、テキストの操作、データベースのクエリなど、適切に指定された複雑なアクションを実行するための便利な自然言語インターフェースを作成することです。しかしながら、そのようなタスクのための既存の自然言語インターフェースは、プログラミング言語で振るわれる力と比較してかなり原始的である。このギャップを埋めるために、私たちはコアプログラミング言語から始め、ユーザーが代替の、より自然な構文と、より単純な構文の構成という点でますます複雑な概念を定義することによって、コア言語を段階的に「帰化」させることを可能にします。ボクセルの世界では、ユーザーのコミュニティが同時に共通システムに多様な言語を教え、それを使用して何百もの複雑なボクセル構造を構築できることを示しています。3日間にわたって、これらのユーザーはコア言語のみを使用することから、最後の10 K発話の85.9%で帰化言語を使用することになりました。', 'zh': '所向创便自然语言界面,以行指定良而杂操之,如析数析数,操文询数据库。 然与编程语言之所有者,今自然语言接口甚始。 为弥合之差,自核心编程语言始,许用户以定义代者,更自然语法益杂之概以渐"自然化"心语。 体素世界中,一用户社区可并教一通用系统一多样化语,并用构数百杂体素结构。 三日之间,用户从仅用核心语转为归化语,最后10K语占85.9%。', 'hi': 'हमारा लक्ष्य अच्छी तरह से निर्दिष्ट लेकिन जटिल कार्यों जैसे डेटा का विश्लेषण करने, पाठ में हेरफेर करने और डेटाबेस को क्वेरी करने के लिए एक सुविधाजनक प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफ़ेस बनाना है। हालांकि, इस तरह के कार्यों के लिए मौजूदा प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफेस एक प्रोग्रामिंग भाषा के साथ संचालित शक्ति की तुलना में काफी आदिम हैं। इस अंतर को पाटने के लिए, हम एक कोर प्रोग्रामिंग भाषा के साथ शुरू करते हैं और उपयोगकर्ताओं को सरल लोगों की रचनाओं के संदर्भ में वैकल्पिक, अधिक प्राकृतिक वाक्यविन्यास और तेजी से जटिल अवधारणाओं को परिभाषित करके मूल भाषा को "प्राकृतिक" करने की अनुमति देते हैं। एक voxel दुनिया में, हम दिखाते हैं कि उपयोगकर्ताओं का एक समुदाय एक साथ एक आम प्रणाली को एक विविध भाषा सिखा सकता है और सैकड़ों जटिल वोक्सेल संरचनाओं के निर्माण के लिए इसका उपयोग कर सकता है। तीन दिनों के दौरान, ये उपयोगकर्ता केवल मूल भाषा का उपयोग करने से लेकर पिछले 10K कथनों के 85.9% में प्राकृतिक भाषा का उपयोग करने के लिए चले गए।', 'ru': 'Наша цель - создать удобный интерфейс на естественном языке для выполнения четко определенных, но сложных действий, таких как анализ данных, манипуляция текстом и запрос баз данных. Однако существующие интерфейсы на естественном языке для таких задач довольно примитивны по сравнению с мощностью, которой обладает язык программирования. Чтобы преодолеть этот разрыв, мы начинаем с основного языка программирования и позволяем пользователям постепенно «натурализовать» основной язык, определяя альтернативный, более естественный синтаксис и все более сложные концепции с точки зрения композиций более простых. В мире вокселов мы показываем, что сообщество пользователей может одновременно обучать общую систему разнообразному языку и использовать его для создания сотен сложных воксельных структур. В течение трех дней эти пользователи перешли от использования только основного языка к использованию натурализованного языка в 85,9% последних 10 тыс. высказываний.', 'ga': 'Is é an sprioc atá againn comhéadan teanga nádúrtha áisiúil a chruthú chun gníomhartha dea-shonraithe ach casta a dhéanamh amhail anailís a dhéanamh ar shonraí, ionramháil téacs, agus bunachair shonraí a cheistiú. Mar sin féin, tá comhéadain nádúrtha teanga atá ann cheana féin le haghaidh tascanna den sórt sin primitive go leor i gcomparáid leis an gcumhacht a bhíonn ag duine le teanga ríomhchlárúcháin. Chun an bhearna seo a líonadh, cuirimid tús le croítheanga ríomhchlárúcháin agus ligeann d’úsáideoirí an croítheanga a “nádúrú” go hincriminteach trí chomhréir mhalartach, níos nádúrtha agus coincheapa atá ag éirí níos casta a shainmhíniú i dtéarmaí cumadóireachta na cinn níos simplí. I ndomhan voxel, léirímid gur féidir le pobal úsáideoirí teanga ilghnéitheach a mhúineadh do chomhchóras ag an am céanna agus í a úsáid chun na céadta struchtúr voxel casta a thógáil. Thar thréimhse trí lá, chuaigh na húsáideoirí seo ó úsáid a bhaint as an gcroítheanga amháin go dtí úsáid na teanga eadóirseachta in 85.9% de na 10K cainte deiridh.', 'el': 'Στόχος μας είναι να δημιουργήσουμε μια βολική διεπαφή φυσικής γλώσσας για την εκτέλεση καλά καθορισμένων αλλά σύνθετων ενεργειών όπως η ανάλυση δεδομένων, ο χειρισμός κειμένου και η αναζήτηση βάσεων δεδομένων. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες διεπαφές φυσικής γλώσσας για τέτοιες εργασίες είναι αρκετά πρωτόγονες σε σύγκριση με τη δύναμη που ασκεί κάποιος με μια γλώσσα προγραμματισμού. Για να γεφυρώσουμε αυτό το χάσμα, ξεκινάμε με μια βασική γλώσσα προγραμματισμού και επιτρέπουμε στους χρήστες να "φυσικοποιήσουν" την κεντρική γλώσσα σταδιακά ορίζοντας εναλλακτικές, πιο φυσικές συνθέσεις και ολοένα και πιο σύνθετες έννοιες όσον αφορά συνθέσεις απλούστερων. Σε έναν κόσμο δείχνουμε ότι μια κοινότητα χρηστών μπορεί ταυτόχρονα να διδάξει ένα κοινό σύστημα μια διαφορετική γλώσσα και να τη χρησιμοποιήσει για να χτίσει εκατοντάδες σύνθετες δομές. Κατά τη διάρκεια τριών ημερών, αυτοί οι χρήστες πέρασαν από τη χρήση μόνο της βασικής γλώσσας στη χρήση της πολιτογραφημένης γλώσσας σε 85,9% των τελευταίων 10Κ εκφράσεων.', 'hu': 'Célunk, hogy kényelmes természetes nyelvi felületet hozzunk létre jól meghatározott, de összetett műveletek végrehajtásához, mint például adatok elemzése, szöveg manipulálása és adatbázisok lekérdezése. Azonban az ilyen feladatokhoz meglévő természetes nyelvi interfészek meglehetősen primitívak a programozási nyelvhez képest. A szakadék áthidalása érdekében egy alapvető programozási nyelvvel kezdünk, és lehetővé tesszük a felhasználók számára, hogy fokozatosan "naturalizálják" az alapvető nyelvet az alternatív, természetesebb szintaxis és egyre összetettebb fogalmak meghatározásával az egyszerűbb kompozíciók szempontjából. Egy voxel világban megmutatjuk, hogy egy felhasználói közösség egyszerre taníthat egy közös rendszert egy változatos nyelvre, és azzal több száz komplex voxel struktúrát építhet fel. Három nap alatt ezek a felhasználók az alapvető nyelv használatától a honosított nyelv használatáig mentek át az utolsó 10 ezer beszéd 85,9%-ában.', 'kk': 'Біздің мақсатымыз - келтірілген, бірақ комплекс әрекеттерді анализ, мәтінді өзгерту және деректер қорларын сұрау үшін тәуелді тіл интерфейсін құру. Бірақ бұл тапсырмалар үшін табиғи тіл интерфейстері бір қуатты бағдарлама тілімен салыстырып тұрады. Бұл бос орынды көшірмелеу үшін, біз негізгі бағдарлама тілінен бастап, пайдаланушылардың негізгі тілді қарапайым, табиғдарлық синтаксисі және қарапайым тілдердің құрылымына арналған көбірек түрлі концепцияларын анықтап Воксель әлемінде, пайдаланушылардың көпшілігі бір-біріне әртүрлі тілді үйрете алады және оны жүздеген комплекс воксел құрылымын құру үшін қолданады. Үш күн бойынша, бұл пайдаланушылар соңғы 10K сөздерінің 85,9% тілде негізгі тілді қолдану үшін ғана негізгі тілді қолданады.', 'it': "Il nostro obiettivo è creare una comoda interfaccia di linguaggio naturale per eseguire azioni ben specificate ma complesse come l'analisi dei dati, la manipolazione del testo e l'interrogazione dei database. Tuttavia, le interfacce di linguaggio naturale esistenti per tali attività sono piuttosto primitive rispetto alla potenza che si esercita con un linguaggio di programmazione. Per colmare questo divario, partiamo da un linguaggio di programmazione core e permettiamo agli utenti di 'naturalizzare' il linguaggio core incrementalmente definendo sintassi alternative, più naturali e concetti sempre più complessi in termini di composizioni di quelli più semplici. In un mondo voxel, mostriamo che una comunità di utenti può insegnare contemporaneamente a un sistema comune un linguaggio diverso e usarlo per costruire centinaia di strutture voxel complesse. Nel corso di tre giorni, questi utenti sono passati dall'usare solo la lingua di base all'uso della lingua naturalizzata nell'85,9% degli ultimi 10K pronunciamenti.", 'lt': "Our goal is to create a convenient natural language interface for performing well-specified but complex actions such as analyzing data, manipulating text, and querying databases.  Tačiau esamos tokioms užduotims skirtos natūralios kalbos sąsajos yra gana primitivios, palyginti su galia, kurią naudoja programavimo kalba. To bridge this gap, we start with a core programming language and allow users to 'naturalize' the core language incrementally by defining alternative, more natural syntax and increasingly complex concepts in terms of compositions of simpler ones.  In a voxel world, we show that a community of users can simultaneously teach a common system a diverse language and use it to build hundreds of complex voxel structures.  Per tris dienas šie naudotojai perėjo nuo pagrindinės kalbos naudojimo iki natūralios kalbos naudojimo 85,9 % paskutinių 10 000 žodžių.", 'mk': 'Нашата цел е да создадеме соодветен природен јазички интерфејс за извршување добро специфицирани, но комплексни акции како што се анализирање на податоците, манипулирање на текстот и барање на базите на податоци. Сепак, постојните природни јазички интерфејсии за вакви задачи се примитивни во споредба со моќта што ја имаш со јазик на програмирање. За да ја преминеме оваа празнина, почнуваме со јазик на основна програмирање и им дозволуваме на корисниците да го „натурализираат“ јазикот постојано со дефинирање алтернативна, поприродна синтаксија и сé повеќе комплексни концепти во поглед на композициите на поедноставните. Во светот на вокселот, покажуваме дека заедницата на корисници истовремено може да научи заеднички систем различен јазик и да го користи за изградба на стотици комплексни вокселски структури. Во текот на три дена, овие корисници поминаа од користење на само јазикот до користење на натурализираниот јазик во 85,9 отсто од последните 10.000 изрази.', 'ml': "നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം നല്ല വ്യക്തമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്സ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതാണ്. പക്ഷെ വിവരങ്ങള എന്നാലും ഇത്തരം ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് നിലവിലുള്ള സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ വിനിമയതലകള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രാധാന്യം മാത്രമാണ്. പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ്  ഈ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുവെക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മൂല്യമായ പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ് ഭാഷ കൊണ്ട് തുടങ്ങി ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് 'സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുക' എന്ന ഭാഷ കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റം വിവിധ ഒരു വോക്സെല്\u200d ലോകത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സാധാരണ സിസ്റ്റം ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, നൂറുകണ മൂന്നു ദിവസം കഴിഞ്ഞിട്ട് ഈ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d 85. 9% അവസാനം 10K വാക്കുകളില്\u200d സ്വാഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉള്ള ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കു", 'mt': "Our goal is to create a convenient natural language interface for performing well-specified but complex actions such as analyzing data, manipulating text, and querying databases.  Madankollu, l-interfaces naturali eżistenti tal-lingwa għal dawn il-kompiti huma pjuttost primitivi meta mqabbla mas-setgħa li wieħed għandu b’lingwa ta’ programmazzjoni. To bridge this gap, we start with a core programming language and allow users to 'naturalize' the core language incrementally by defining alternative, more natural syntax and increasingly complex concepts in terms of compositions of simpler ones.  F’dinja tal-voxel, nuru li komunità ta’ utenti tista’ simultanjament tagħti sistema komuni lingwa diversa u tużaha biex tibni mijiet ta’ strutturi kumplessi tal-voxel. Matul tliet ijiem, dawn l-utenti bdew mill-użu tal-lingwa ewlenija biss għall-użu tal-lingwa naturalizzata f’85.9% tal-aħħar dikjarazzjonijiet ta’ 10K.", 'ms': "Tujuan kami ialah mencipta antaramuka bahasa biasa yang selesa untuk melakukan tindakan yang dinyatakan dengan baik tetapi kompleks seperti menganalisis data, memanipulasi teks, dan menanyai pangkalan data. Namun, antaramuka bahasa semulajadi yang wujud untuk tugas seperti ini agak primitif dibandingkan dengan kuasa yang dikendalikan dengan bahasa pemrograman. Untuk menyelesaikan ruang ini, kita bermula dengan bahasa pemrograman utama dan membenarkan pengguna untuk 'naturalize' bahasa utama secara bertambah-tambah dengan menentukan alternatif, sintaks yang lebih alami dan konsep yang semakin kompleks dalam terma komposisi yang lebih mudah. Dalam dunia voxel, kita menunjukkan bahawa komuniti pengguna boleh secara bersamaan mengajar sistem umum bahasa yang berbeza dan menggunakannya untuk membina ratusan struktur voxel kompleks. Selama tiga hari, pengguna-pengguna ini pergi dari menggunakan hanya bahasa utama untuk menggunakan bahasa alami dalam 85.9% daripada ungkapan-ungkapan 10K terakhir.", 'mn': 'Бидний зорилго бол сайн тодорхойлогдсон, гэхдээ комплекс үйл явцуудыг шинжилгээ, текст засах, өгөгдлийн санг кверижүүлэх боломжтой байгалийн интерфейс бий болгох юм. Гэвч ийм ажил дээр байгалийн хэлний интерфейс нь програмчлалын хэл дээр байгаа хүчтэй харьцуулахад маш чухал. Энэ ялгааг тодруулахын тулд бид үндсэн програмчлалын хэлээс эхлээд хэрэглэгчид илүү энгийн хэлбэрүүдийн төвөгтэй хэлээс хамааралтай байгалийн синтаксис болон илүү нарийн төвөгтэй ойлголтыг тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн нэг хэл нь олон хэл заах боломжтой гэдгийг бид харуулж байна. Гурван өдрийн турш эдгээр хэрэглэгчид сүүлийн 10K илтгэлийн 85.9% нь анхны хэл хэрэглэж байдаг.', 'pl': 'Naszym celem jest stworzenie wygodnego interfejsu języka naturalnego umożliwiającego wykonywanie dobrze określonych, ale złożonych działań, takich jak analiza danych, manipulacja tekstem i zapytanie baz danych. Jednak istniejące interfejsy języka naturalnego dla takich zadań są dość prymitywne w porównaniu z mocą, jaką posiada się język programowania. Aby wypełnić tę lukę, zaczynamy od podstawowego języka programowania i pozwalamy użytkownikom stopniowo "naturalizować" język podstawowy poprzez definiowanie alternatywnej, bardziej naturalnej składni i coraz bardziej złożonej koncepcji w zakresie kompozycji prostszych. W świecie voksela pokazujemy, że społeczność użytkowników może jednocześnie nauczyć wspólnego systemu zróżnicowanego języka i używać go do budowy setek złożonych struktur voksela. W ciągu trzech dni użytkownicy ci przeszli od używania tylko języka podstawowego do używania języka naturalizowanego w 85,9% ostatnich wypowiedzi 10K.', 'no': 'Målet vårt er å oppretta eit vanleg naturspråk grensesnitt for å utføra veldig spesifiserte, men komplekse handlingar som analyserar data, handtering av tekst og spørjingar av databaser. Dei eksisterande naturspråkegrensesnitta for slike oppgåver er imidlertid ganske primitiv samanlikna med straum som blir brukt med eit programspråk. For å bryta dette mellomrommet, begynner vi med ein kjerneprogramspråk og tillat brukarar å «naturalisere» kjernespråket med å definera alternativ, meir naturlig syntaks og økt komplekse konseptar med samlingar av enklare. I ein veksleverd viser vi at ein samfunn av brukarar kan lære eit felles system ein forskjellig språk og bruke det for å bygge hundre av komplekse vekslestrukturer. I løpet av tre dagar går desse brukarane frå å bruka berre kjernespråket til å bruka den naturaliserte språket i 85,9 % av dei siste 10K-talene.', 'ro': 'Scopul nostru este de a crea o interfață convenabilă de limbaj natural pentru a efectua acțiuni bine specificate, dar complexe, cum ar fi analiza datelor, manipularea textului și interogarea bazelor de date. Cu toate acestea, interfețele de limbaj natural existente pentru astfel de sarcini sunt destul de primitive în comparație cu puterea pe care o exercită cu un limbaj de programare. Pentru a depăși acest decalaj, începem cu un limbaj de programare de bază și permitem utilizatorilor să "naturalizeze" limbajul de bază treptat prin definirea sintaxei alternative, mai naturale și concepte din ce în ce mai complexe în ceea ce privește compozițiile de cele mai simple. Într-o lume voxel, arătăm că o comunitate de utilizatori poate învăța simultan un sistem comun o limbă diversă și o poate folosi pentru a construi sute de structuri voxel complexe. Pe parcursul a trei zile, acești utilizatori au trecut de la folosirea doar a limbii de bază la folosirea limbii naturalizate în 85,9% din ultimele 10.000 de cuvinte.', 'si': "අපේ අරමුණ තමයි හොඳ විශ්වාස කරන්න ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව අන්තර්ජනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒත් සංශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න,  නමුත්, ඒ වගේම ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ඉන්න ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාව සමඟ ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාව සම අපි මේ විශාලය සඳහා පටන් ගන්නේ මූලික ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණ භාෂයෙන් සඳහා පටන් ගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ 'ස්වභාවිකය' භාෂය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන වොක්සෙල් ලෝකයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ සමාජයෙක්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක්ට සමාන්\u200dය පද්ධතියක් විවිධ භාෂයක් ඉගෙන ග දවස් තුනක් කාලයෙන්, මේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ අන්තිම 10K වචනයේ ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව භාවිත කරන්නේ 85.9% විතරයි.", 'so': 'Ujeedkeennu waa in uu sameeyo Interfac ku haboon luqada dabiiciga ah oo loo sameynayo si fiican, laakiin falimaha adag, sida analyaynta macluumaadka, maamulidda qoraalka iyo baaritaanka macluumaadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, Interfacyada afka dabiiciga ah ee shaqaalahaas oo ay ku jiraan waa mid aad u muhiim ah si ay u barbarbartaan xoogga oo afka programka ah. Si aan u qabsado gafkan, waxaan ku bilaabaynaa afka kooxaha ah oo horumarinta, isticmaalayaana waxaan u ognahay in luqada kooxaha ah ay si kordhisan ugu qorsheyso mid kala duduwan, mid ka badan kaalmada dabiicadda ah iyo fikrada adag oo la xiriira qeybaha fudud. Dunida codsiga, waxaynu muujinnaa in koox isticmaalayaal ay islamarkaasna ku baran karaan nidaamka caadiga ah si luqad kala duduwan oo ay u isticmaalaan dhismo boqolaal dhismo adag oo qalabka qallafsan. Over the course of three days, these users went from using only the core language to using the naturalized language in 85.9% of the last 10K utterances.', 'sv': 'Vårt mål är att skapa ett bekvämt naturligt språkgränssnitt för att utföra väl specificerade men komplexa åtgärder som att analysera data, manipulera text och fråga databaser. Dock är befintliga naturliga språkgränssnitt för sådana uppgifter ganska primitiva jämfört med kraften man använder med ett programmeringsspråk. För att överbrygga denna klyfta börjar vi med ett kärnprogrammeringsspråk och låter användarna "naturalisera" kärnspråket stegvis genom att definiera alternativa, mer naturliga syntax och allt mer komplexa begrepp i form av kompositioner av enklare sådana. I en voxelvärld visar vi att en community av användare samtidigt kan lära ett gemensamt system ett varierat språk och använda det för att bygga hundratals komplexa voxelstrukturer. Under tre dagar gick dessa användare från att enbart använda kärnspråket till att använda det naturaliserade språket i 85,9% av de senaste 10 000 yttrandena.', 'ta': "எங்கள் இலக்கு நன்றாக குறிப்பிட்ட ஆனால் சிக்கலான செயல்களை செய்வதற்கு, தரவுத்தளத்தை ஆய்வு, உரை செயல்படுத்துதல், மற்றும் கேள்வி செய்ய ஆனால், இத்தகைய செயல்களுக்கான இயல்பான மொழி இடைமுகப்புகள் மிகவும் முதன்மையாக இருக்கும் முன்னிருப்பு மொழியை முன்ன இந்த இடைவெளியை பிரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு மூல நிரல் மொழியை ஆரம்பித்து பயனர்களை 'இயல்பாக்கு' மூலம் அதிகமாக மாற்றும், அதிக இயற்கையான ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் சிக்கலான கருத ஒரு குரல் உலகத்தில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பயனர்களின் ஒரு சமுதாயத்தை ஒரு பொதுவான முறைமையை ஒரு மொழி கற்றுக்கொடுக்க முடியும் மற்று Over the course of three days, these users went from using only the core language to using the naturalized language in 85.9% of the last 10K utterances.", 'sr': 'Naš cilj je da stvorimo prikladnu prirodnu jezičku interfejsu za izvršavanje dobro određenih ali kompleksnih akcija poput analize podataka, manipulacije teksta i ispitivanja baze podataka. Međutim, postojeće prirodne jezičke interfejse za takve zadatke su prilično primitivne u usporedbi sa moćom koju je prvi napao sa jezikom programiranja. Da bismo premostili taj praznik, počeli smo sa jezikom programiranja i omogućili korisnicima da "naturalizuju" jezik jezika veoma povećavajući definicijom alternativne, prirodne sintakse i sve kompleksnih koncepta u smislu kompozicije jednostavnijih. U svetu voksela pokazujemo da zajednica korisnika može istovremeno naučiti zajednički sistem različitim jezikom i koristiti ga da izgradi stotine kompleksnih struktura voksela. Tokom tri dana, ovi korisnici su otišli od korištenja jezika samo da bi koristili prirodno jezik 85,9% poslednjih 10K reči.', 'ur': 'ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ بہت اچھا مثال معلوم ہوا لیکن پیچیدہ اقدامات کے لئے ایک مناسب طبیعی زبان انٹرنفس بنانا ہے جیسے ڈیٹا شناسیل کرنا، ٹیکسٹ منڈوبس کرنا اور ڈیٹابیز سوال کرنا۔ However, existing natural language interfaces for such tasks are quite primitive compared to the power one wields with a programming language. اس جگہ کو دھوپ کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک اصلی پروگرامینگ زبان سے شروع کرتے ہیں اور کارساز کو اضافہ کرنا اجازت دیتے ہیں کہ ان کی اصلی زبان کو اضافہ کریں، اضافہ کریں، اضافہ کریں، اضافہ کریں، اضافہ کریں، اضافہ کریں، اور اضافہ کریں، آسانی ایک وکسل دنیا میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کارساز کی کمونٹی ایک دوسرے طرح طرح طرح کی زبان سکھائی سکتی ہے اور اسے صدوں پیچیدہ وکسل ساختار بنانے کے لئے استعمال کرتی ہے. تین دن کے طول میں، یہ کارساز صرف اصلی زبان کا استعمال کرنا چاہتے تھے کہ آخری 10K زبانوں میں 85.9 فیصد کی زبان استعمال کریں۔', 'ka': 'ჩვენი მიზეზი არის შექმნას საუკეთესო თავისი ინტერფექტის შექმნა, მაგრამ კომპლექციური მონაცემების ანალიზაცია, ტექსტის მანიპულაცია და დეტაბაზების შესახე მაგრამ არსებობს ნახვა ენერგიის ინტერფესები, რომლებიც ასეთი დავალებებისთვის, უფრო პრიმიტიურია, რომლებიც პროგრამირების ენერგიით გადასრულებულია. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ამ განსხვავებას, ჩვენ წინ პროგრამირების ენაზე და გამოყენებელი უფრო სრულად განსაზღვრებით მინუს ანტერფეტური, უფრო ნაირთი სინტაქსი და უფრო კომპლექტიური კომპონე ჩვენ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ, რომ მომხმარებლის საზოგადოება ერთადერთად შეუძლია საერთო სისტემის განსხვავებული ენაში გასწავლა და გამოყენება ასობით კომპლექსი ვაკსვლის სტრუქ სამი დღის განმავლობაში, ეს მომხმარებელი გამოყენება მხოლოდ მარტივი ენათის გამოყენებაში 85,9% ბოლო 10K სიტყვების გამოყენება.', 'uz': "Maʼlumotni analyzer, matnni boshqarish va maʼlumot bazasini soʻrov qilish uchun juda sodda sodda tilning interfeysni yaratish mumkin. Lekin, bu vazifalar uchun tabiiy tilning interfeyslari juda muhim va dastur tili bilan bir xil qo'llanmalar. Bu gapni birlashtirish uchun biz bir core dastur tilida boshlamiz va foydalanuvchilarni o'zgarishni o'zgartirish mumkin, ko'proq tabiiy syntaktika va juda murakkab fikrlarni soddalar kompyuterga aniqlash mumkin. Voksel dunyoda, biz foydalanuvchilar bir xil tizimni bir xil tilni o'rganish mumkin va uni yuzlab murakkab voksel strukturelarini yaratishdan foydalanamiz. Uchta kun davomida, bu foydalanuvchilar 85.9% охирги 10K gapirishdan foydalanish uchun asosiy tildan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Mục tiêu của chúng ta là tạo một giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên tiện lợi để thực hiện các hoạt động phức tạp, được xác định kỹ lưỡng như phân tích dữ liệu, điều khiển văn bản và tra dữ liệu. Tuy nhiên, các giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho các công việc như thế là hoàn to àn nguyên thủy so với năng lượng sử dụng với ngôn ngữ lập trình. Để vượt qua lỗ hổng này, chúng ta bắt đầu bằng một ngôn ngữ lập trình cốt lõi và cho phép người dùng "tự nhiên" ngôn ngữ cơ bản tăng dần bằng cách xác định tỉ lệ khác, cú pháp tự nhiên hơn và các khái niệm phức tạp hơn về hợp của ngôn ngữ đơn giản hơn. Trong thế giới voxel, chúng ta cho thấy rằng một cộng đồng người dùng có thể cùng nhau dạy một hệ thống khác nhau ngôn ngữ và sử dụng nó để xây dựng hàng trăm cấu trúc chất voxel. Trong suốt ba ngày, những người dùng này chuyển từ chỉ sử dụng ngôn ngữ cơ bản sang sử dụng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong 85.9=. trong những phát ngôn ngữ 10K cuối cùng.', 'nl': "Ons doel is om een handige natuurlijke taal interface te creëren voor het uitvoeren van goed gespecificeerde maar complexe acties zoals het analyseren van gegevens, het manipuleren van tekst en het opvragen van databases. Echter, bestaande natuurlijke taal interfaces voor dergelijke taken zijn vrij primitief in vergelijking met de kracht die men hanteert met een programmeertaal. Om deze kloof te overbruggen, beginnen we met een kernprogrammeertaal en stellen we gebruikers in staat om de kerntaal stapsgewijs te 'naturaliseren' door alternatieve, natuurlijkere syntaxis en steeds complexere concepten te definiëren in termen van composities van eenvoudigere. In een voxelwereld laten we zien dat een gemeenschap van gebruikers tegelijkertijd een gemeenschappelijk systeem een diverse taal kan leren en gebruiken om honderden complexe voxelstructuren te bouwen. In de loop van drie dagen gingen deze gebruikers van het gebruik van alleen de kerntaal naar het gebruik van de genaturaliseerde taal in 85,9% van de laatste 10K uitspraken.", 'da': "Vores mål er at skabe en praktisk naturlig sproggrænseflade til udførelse af velspecificerede, men komplekse handlinger såsom analyse af data, manipulering af tekst og forespørgsler i databaser. Men eksisterende naturlige sproggrænseflader til sådanne opgaver er ganske primitive sammenlignet med den kraft, man bruger med et programmeringssprog. For at bygge bro over denne kløft starter vi med et kernesprog og giver brugerne mulighed for at 'naturalisere' kernesproget trinvist ved at definere alternativ, mere naturlig syntaks og stadig mere komplekse begreber i form af kompositioner af enklere. I en voxelverden viser vi, at et fællesskab af brugere samtidig kan lære et fælles system et forskelligartet sprog og bruge det til at bygge hundredvis af komplekse voxelstrukturer. I løbet af tre dage gik disse brugere fra kun at bruge kernesproget til at bruge det naturaliserede sprog i 85,9% af de sidste 10.000 udtalelser.", 'bg': 'Нашата цел е да създадем удобен естествен езиков интерфейс за извършване на добре определени, но сложни действия като анализ на данни, манипулиране на текст и запитване на бази данни. Съществуващите интерфейси на естествения език за такива задачи обаче са доста примитивни в сравнение със силата, която човек притежава с език за програмиране. За да преодолеем тази пропаст, започваме с основен програмен език и даваме възможност на потребителите да "натурализират" основния език постепенно чрез дефиниране на алтернативен, по-естествен синтаксис и все по-сложни понятия по отношение на композиции от по-прости такива. В един вокселов свят ние показваме, че общност от потребители могат едновременно да преподават на обща система разнообразен език и да го използват за изграждане на стотици сложни вокселови структури. В продължение на три дни тези потребители преминаха от използването само на основния език към натурализирания език в 85,9% от последните 10 хиляди изказвания.', 'hr': 'Naš cilj je stvoriti prijatan prirodni jezički interfejs za dobro određene ali kompleksne akcije kao što su analiziranje podataka, manipuliranje teksta i ispitivanje baze podataka. Međutim, postojeći prirodni jezički interfejsi za takve zadatke su prilično primitivni u usporedbi s moćom kojom se širi s programiranim jezikom. Da bismo premostili taj praznik, počeli smo s jezikom programiranja i omogućili korisnicima da "naturaliziraju" jezik osnovno povećavajući definicijom alternativne, prirodne sintakse i sve kompleksnije koncepcije u smislu kompozicije jednostavnijih. U svetu voksela pokazujemo da zajednica korisnika može istovremeno naučiti zajednički sustav različitim jezikom i koristiti ga kako bi izgradila stotine složenih struktura voksela. Tokom tri dana, ovi korisnici su otišli od korištenja samo jezika jezika kako bi koristili prirodno jezik 85,9% posljednjih 10K izraza.', 'de': 'Unser Ziel ist es, eine komfortable Benutzeroberfläche in natürlicher Sprache zu schaffen, um genau spezifizierte, aber komplexe Aktionen wie Datenanalyse, Textmanipulation und Abfrage von Datenbanken durchzuführen. Allerdings sind vorhandene natürliche Sprachschnittstellen für solche Aufgaben recht primitiv im Vergleich zu der Macht, die man mit einer Programmiersprache ausübt. Um diese Lücke zu schließen, beginnen wir mit einer Kernprogrammiersprache und ermöglichen es Benutzern, die Kernsprache schrittweise zu "naturalisieren", indem alternative, natürlichere Syntax und zunehmend komplexere Konzepte in Bezug auf Kompositionen einfacherer zu definieren. In einer Voxel-Welt zeigen wir, dass eine Gemeinschaft von Nutzern gleichzeitig einem gemeinsamen System eine vielfältige Sprache beibringen und damit hunderte komplexer Voxel-Strukturen aufbauen kann. Im Laufe von drei Tagen gingen diese Benutzer von der Verwendung nur der Kernsprache zur Verwendung der naturalisierten Sprache in 85,9% der letzten 10K Äußerungen über.', 'ko': "우리의 목표는 데이터 분석, 조작 텍스트와 조회 데이터베이스 등 정확하지만 복잡한 조작을 수행하는 데 편리한 자연 언어 인터페이스를 만드는 것이다.그러나 프로그래밍 언어에 비해 이런 작업에 사용되는 기존의 자연 언어 인터페이스는 매우 원시적이다.이러한 차이를 메우기 위해 우리는 핵심 프로그래밍 언어부터 사용자가 대체적이고 자연스러운 문법과 갈수록 복잡해지는 개념을 정의함으로써 핵심 언어를 점차적으로'자연화'하도록 허용한다.체소 세계에서 우리는 사용자 커뮤니티가 하나의 공공 시스템에 서로 다른 언어를 가르치고 이를 이용하여 수백 개의 복잡한 체소 구조를 구축할 수 있음을 보여 준다.사흘간 이들 이용자는 마지막 10만회 발언에서 85.9%가 핵심어만 사용하던 것에서 귀화어로 바뀌었다.", 'sw': "Lengo letu ni kutengeneza sura rahisi ya lugha ya asili kwa kutekeleza vitendo vizuri lakini vigumu kama vile uchambuzi wa taarifa, kudhibiti maandishi, na kuuliza databases. Hata hivyo, mahusiano ya lugha ya asili kwa kazi kama hizi ni muhimu sana kulinganisha na mamlaka moja yenye lugha ya programu. Ili kuunganisha mpango huu, tunaanza na lugha ya programu ya msingi na kuwaruhusu watumiaji 'uhalisia' lugha ya msingi kwa kuelezea mabadiliko, kodi ya asili na dhana tatizo kwa namna ya makusanyiko ya moja rahisi. Katika ulimwengu wa upigaji kura, tunaonyesha kuwa jumuiya ya watumiaji wanaweza kufundisha mfumo wa kawaida wa lugha tofauti na kuitumia kujenga mamia ya miundombinu yenye utata. Over the course of three days, these users went from using only the core language to using the naturalized language in 85.9% of the last 10K utterances.", 'id': "Tujuan kita adalah menciptakan antaramuka bahasa alami yang nyaman untuk melakukan tindakan yang spesifikasi dengan baik tapi kompleks seperti menganalisis data, memanipulasi teks, dan mempertanyakan pangkalan data. Namun, interfaces bahasa alam yang ada untuk tugas seperti ini cukup primitif dibandingkan dengan kekuatan yang dikendalikan dengan bahasa pemrograman. Untuk memecahkan ruang ini, kita mulai dengan bahasa pemrograman utama dan memungkinkan pengguna untuk 'alami' bahasa utama secara bertambah-tambah dengan mendefinisikan alternatif, sintaks alami dan konsep yang semakin kompleks dalam terma komposisi dari yang lebih sederhana. Dalam dunia voksel, kita menunjukkan bahwa komunitas pengguna simultan dapat mengajar sistem umum bahasa yang berbeda dan menggunakannya untuk membangun ratusan struktur voksel kompleks. Selama tiga hari, pengguna-pengguna ini pergi dari hanya menggunakan bahasa utama untuk menggunakan bahasa alami dalam 85,9% dari 10.000 ucapan terakhir.", 'tr': 'Biziň maksadymyz, gowy belirtilen we çylşyrymlyk emelleri, maglumatlary analyz etmek, metin işlemek we databaselerden soraglamak üçin ýeterli tebigy dil interface bejermek. Ýöne, bu täzelikler üçin meňzeş tebigy dil interfejleri programlama dili bilen öňünde birnäçe ilkinji gezek boldy. Bu boşluky köplitmek üçin biz esasy programlama dili bilen başladyk we ullanyşlaryň üstüne özüni beýleki, tebigy syntaksi we a ňsatlyk düzümleri diýmek üçin ullanyň. Bir weksel dünýäde, ullançylaryň toplumynyň hemişe üýtgeşik sistemasyna dürli dil öwredip bilýändigini we muny ýüzlerçe karmaşık voksel strukturlary gurmak üçin ulanyp bilýändigini görkez. Üç güniň dowamynda, bu ulanylar 10 Köp dilinden 85.9% sözlerinde diňe esasy dilini ulanmakdan çykyp gitdiler.', 'af': "Ons doel is om 'n goeie natuurlike taal koppelvlak te skep vir goed gespesifiseer maar komplekse aksies soos data analiseer, teks manipuleer en databasis te vra. Maar bestaande natuurlike taal koppelvlakke vir sodanige taak is heeltemal primitief vergelyk met die krag wat met 'n program taal is. Om hierdie gap te brei, begin ons met 'n kortprogramming taal en toelaat gebruikers die kortprogramme taal 'naturaliseer' deur alternatiewe, meer natuurlike sintaks en meer komplekse konsepte te definieer in terms van samenskap van eenvoudige. In 'n voksel wêreld, wys ons dat 'n gemeenskap van gebruikers eenmaal 'n gemeenskap stelsel 'n verskeie taal kan leer en dit gebruik om honderde komplekse voksel strukture te bou. In die loop van drie dae het hierdie gebruikers van net die nuurtaal gebruik om die natuurlike taal in 85,9% van die laaste 10K uitspraak te gebruik.", 'fa': 'هدف ما اینه که برای انجام کارهای خوب مشخص شده اما پیچیده\u200cای مثل تحلیل داده\u200cها، تغییر کردن متن\u200cها و سوال داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها یک ارتباط طبیعی مناسب ایجاد کنیم. با این حال، interfaces exist natural language for such tasks are quite primitive compared to the power one wields with a programming language. برای تغییر این فاصله، ما با یک زبان برنامه\u200cریزی اصلی شروع می\u200cکنیم و به کاربران اجازه می\u200cدهیم که "طبیعت\u200cسازی" زبان اصلی را به طور اضافه\u200cی تعریف کردن واژه\u200cهای جایگزینی، واژه\u200cهای طبیعت\u200cتری و پیچیده\u200cتری بیشتری در تر در دنیای وکسل، ما نشان می دهیم که یک جامعه از کاربر می تواند همزمان سیستم مشترک را زبان مختلف آموزش دهد و از آن استفاده کند تا صدها ساختار وکسل پیچیده بسازد. در طول سه روز، این کاربران از استفاده از زبان اصلی برای استفاده از زبان طبیعی در ۸۵.۹ درصد سخنرانی ۱۰ کیلومتر استفاده کردند.', 'am': 'አጋራችን ዳታዎችን የሚያስተምር፣ ጽሑፍን ማቀናጃ እና ዳታቤቶችን ለመጠየቅ የሚደረግ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ interface መፍጠር ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ለዚህ ስራ የሚኖሩት የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋዎች የፊደል ቀዳሚ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ክፍል ለመቀላቀል፣ በአንድ አካባቢ ፕሮግራም ቋንቋ መጀመሪያ እና የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋዎችን ‘ፍጥረታዊ’ በመለወጥ፣ የበለጠ የፍጥረታዊ ስናክስብ እና በተጨማሪው አካባቢ አካባቢ ጉዳይ እና በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ጉዳይ ላይ ለመፍጠር እንፈቅዳለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው ዓለም፣ የጠቃሚዎች ማኅበረሰብ በተለያዩ ቋንቋ እንዲያስተምሩ እና መቶዎች የሚቆጠሩ ተግባራዊ ጥቅምቶችን ለመሥራት ይችላል፡፡ በሦስት ቀን ክፍል፣ እነዚህ ተጠቃሚዎች በኋለኛው 10K ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ 85.9 በመቶ የተገኘውን የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ብቻ ለመጠቀም ተለይተዋል፡፡', 'bn': "আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ভালো নির্দিষ্ট কিন্তু জটিল কাজের জন্য একটি সুবিধা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেস তৈরি করার জন্য, যেমন তথ্য বিশ তবে এই কাজের জন্য বিদ্যমান প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেস প্রাথমিক ভাষার তুলনায় প্রোগ্রামিং ভাষার সাথে ক্ষমতার একটি  বিকল্প, বেশী প্রাকৃতিক সিন্ট্যাক্স এবং বেশি জটিল ধারণার মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি মূল প্রোগ্রামিং ভাষায় শুরু করি এবং ব্যবহারকারীদেরকে 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা' ব্যবহার করে বিকল ভোক্সেল বিশ্বে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একই সাথে একটি ব্যবহারকারীর সম্প্রদায় একটি সাধারণ ভাষা শিক্ষা দিতে পারে এবং এটি ব্যবহার করতে পারে শত শত জটিল তিন দিনের মধ্যে, এই ব্যবহারকারীরা শেষ ১০কে ভাষার মধ্যে ৮৫.", 'az': 'Bizim məqsədimiz, məlumatları analiz etmək, məlumatları manipul etmək və veritabanları soruşmaq üçün uyğun təbiətli dil интерфейсini yaratmaq. Halbuki, bu işlər üçün təbiətli dil interfejsi, bir qüvvət programlama dili ilə birlikdə çox primitivdir. Bu boşluğu körpüşdürmək üçün, biz özümüzə programlama dili ilə başlayırıq və istifadəçilərin alternatifi, daha təbiətli sintaksi və daha çox kompleks fikirləri daha asanlıqların birlikləri ilə "naturalize" dilini artırmağa izin veririk. Biz bir səs dünyasında, istifadəçilərin toplumları birlikdə müxtəlif dil öyrətib yüzlərlə kompleks səs yapısını inşa etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Üç gün boyunca bu istifadəçilər son 10K sözlərinin 85,9%-ində doğal dilini istifadə etmək üçün yalnız ilk dilini istifadə etməkdən uzaqlaşdılar.', 'ca': 'El nostre objectiu és crear una interfície natural convenient per a fer accions ben especificades però complexes com analitzar les dades, manipular el text i consultar les bases de dades. Tot i així, les interfaces de llenguatge natural existents per a aquestes tasques són bastant primitives en comparació amb el poder que un utilitza amb un llenguatge de programació. Per superar aquest buit, comencem amb un llenguatge de programació central i permetem als usuaris "naturalitzar" cada cop més el llenguatge central definint una sintaxi alternativa, més natural i conceptes cada cop més complexes en termes de composicions de conceptes més simples. En un món del voxel, demostram que una comunitat d\'usuaris pot ensenyar simultàniament un sistema comú una llengua diversa i utilitzar-la per construir centenars d\'estructures complexes del voxel. Durant tres dies, aquests usuaris van passar d\'utilitzar només el llenguatge central a utilitzar el llenguatge naturalitzat en un 85,9% dels darrers 10.000 expressions.', 'cs': 'Naším cílem je vytvořit pohodlné rozhraní přirozeného jazyka pro provádění dobře specifikovaných, ale složitých akcí, jako je analýza dat, manipulace s textem a dotazování databází. Nicméně existující rozhraní přirozeného jazyka pro takové úkoly jsou poměrně primitivní ve srovnání s mocí, kterou má člověk s programovacím jazykem. Abychom tuto mezeru překlenuli, začneme s jádrovým programovacím jazykem a umožňujeme uživatelům postupně "naturalizovat" jádrový jazyk definováním alternativních, přirozenějších syntaxí a stále složitějších konceptů z hlediska kompozic jednodušších. Ve světě voxelů ukazujeme, že komunita uživatelů může současně naučit společný systém rozmanitý jazyk a použít ho k vytvoření stovek složitých voxelových struktur. Během tří dnů tito uživatelé přešli od používání pouze základního jazyka k použití naturalizovaného jazyka v 85,9% posledních 10K výroků.', 'hy': "Մեր նպատակն է ստեղծել հարմարավետ բնական լեզվի ինտերֆեյսը լավ որոշված, բայց բարդ գործողությունների կատարելու համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ տվյալների վերլուծությունը, տեքստի կառավարումը և տվյալների հիմքերի հարցու However, existing natural language interfaces for such tasks are quite primitive compared to the power one wields with a programming language.  To bridge this gap, we start with a core programming language and allow users to 'naturalize' the core language incrementally by defining alternative, more natural syntax and increasingly complex concepts in terms of compositions of simpler ones.  Վոքսելի աշխարհում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ օգտագործողների համայնքը միաժամանակ կարող է սովորեցնել համայնքային համակարգը բազմազան լեզու և օգտագործել այն հարյուրավոր բարդ Վոքսելի կառուցվածքներ կառուցելու համար: Երեք օրվա ընթացքում այս օգտագործողները սկսեցին օգտագործել միայն հիմնական լեզուն մինչև օգտագործել բնական լեզուն վերջին 10.000 արտահայտությունների 85.9 տոկոսին:", 'fi': 'Tavoitteenamme on luoda kätevä luonnollinen käyttöliittymä tarkasti määriteltyjen mutta monimutkaisten toimintojen suorittamiseen, kuten tietojen analysointiin, tekstin käsittelyyn ja tietokantojen kyselyyn. Kuitenkin olemassa olevat luonnolliset kielelliset rajapinnat tällaisiin tehtäviin ovat melko alkeellisia verrattuna ohjelmointikielen tehoon. Tämän aukon korjaamiseksi aloitamme ohjelmointikielestä, jonka avulla käyttäjät voivat "naturalisoida" ydinkielen asteittain määrittelemällä vaihtoehtoisen, luonnollisemman syntaksin ja yhä monimutkaisempia käsitteitä yksinkertaisempien sävellyksten suhteen. Vokselimaailmassa osoitamme, että käyttäjäyhteisö voi samanaikaisesti opettaa yhteiselle järjestelmälle monipuolisen kielen ja käyttää sitä satojen monimutkaisten vokselirakenteiden rakentamiseen. Kolmen päivän aikana nämä käyttäjät siirtyivät vain ydinkielen käytöstä naturalisoituun kieleen 85,9 prosentissa viimeisistä 10 000 lauseista.', 'et': 'Meie eesmärk on luua mugav looduskeeleliides täpselt määratletud, kuid keerukate toimingute tegemiseks, näiteks andmete analüüsimiseks, teksti manipuleerimiseks ja andmebaaside päringuteks. Kuid olemasolevad looduskeeleliidesed selliste ülesannete jaoks on üsna primitiivsed võrreldes programmeerimiskeele omase võimsusega. Selle lõhe ületamiseks alustame programmeerimiskeelt ja võimaldame kasutajatel tuumikeelt järk-järgult naturaliseerida, määratledes alternatiivse, loomulikuma süntaksi ja üha keerukamad kontseptsioonid lihtsamate kompositsioonide osas. Vokseli maailmas näitame, et kasutajate kogukond suudab üheaegselt õpetada ühisele süsteemile mitmekesist keelt ja seda kasutada sadu keerukaid vokseli struktuure ehitamiseks. Kolme päeva jooksul läksid need kasutajad ainult põhikeelt kasutamisest naturaliseeritud keelele 85,9% viimasest 10K kõnedest.', 'sq': "Qëllimi ynë është të krijojmë një interfaqe natyrore të përshtatshme gjuhësh për kryerjen e veprimeve të caktuara mirë por komplekse të tilla si analiza e të dhënave, manipulimi i tekstit dhe pyetja e bazave të të dhënave. Megjithatë, interfaqet ekzistuese të gjuhës natyrore për detyra të tilla janë mjaft primitive krahasuar me fuqinë që dikush ka me një gjuhë programimi. Për të mbushur këtë boshllëk, ne fillojmë me një gjuhë programimi thelbësor dhe lejojmë përdoruesit të 'naturalizojnë' gjuhën thelbësore në mënyrë graduale duke përcaktuar alternativë, sintaksi më natyrore dhe koncepte gjithnjë e më komplekse në termat e kompozitave të gjuhëve më të thjeshta. In a voxel world, we show that a community of users can simultaneously teach a common system a diverse language and use it to build hundreds of complex voxel structures.  Gjatë tre ditësh, këta përdorues shkuan nga përdorimi i vetëm gjuhës bazë deri në përdorimin e gjuhës natyraliste në 85.9% të shprehjeve të fundit 10.000.", 'bs': 'Naš cilj je da stvorimo prikladnu prirodnu jezičku interfejsu za provedbu dobro određenih ali kompleksnih akcija poput analize podataka, manipulacije teksta i ispitivanja baze podataka. Međutim, postojeći prirodni jezički interfejsi za takve zadatke su prilično primitivni u usporedbi s moćom koju je jedna koristila sa programiranim jezikom. Da bismo premostili taj praznik, počeli smo sa jezikom programiranja i omogućili korisnicima da "naturalizuju" jezik osnovno povećavajući definicijom alternativne, prirodne sintakse i sve kompleksne koncepte u smislu kompozicije jednostavnijih. U svetu voksela pokazujemo da zajednica korisnika može istovremeno naučiti zajednički sistem različitim jezikom i koristiti ga da izgradi stotine kompleksnih struktura voksela. Tokom tri dana, ovi korisnici su otišli od korištenja jezika samo da bi koristili prirodno jezik 85,9% poslednjih 10K govora.', 'jv': 'Kita goal punika kanggo nglanggar langgambar adalah kanggo nggawe ngubah sing bisa nguasai pernik aksi sing komplikasi koyo nggambar data, manipulasi teks, lan sisale databasa Nanging, mbok saiki pancene tengahane kanggo nggawe Perintah dumadhi kanggo nguasakno sing dumadhi karo nggawe Perintah sing dumadhi. kanggo nggawe gap iki, kita mulai karo pertualangan kanggo program sing nggawe ngubah sistem anyar karo "prijalisar" nggawe ngubah Alternate, akeh sistem anyar luwih apik lan kelangan kelangan sampeyan luwih dumateng. Nang pasangan banget, kita sembarang kelas komunitas kanggo nguasai sistem sing komplikasi banget nggawe nguasai bintang, lan uwis kuwi nggawe aturan tapi akeh barang kelas terakhi. Nanging kapan telu saiki, kawula-kapan dumadhi iki banget nggambar tanggal nggambar luwih dumadhi kanggo nggambar perkaranan ingkang ascene, cah-cah, 75.9% sampek kanggo terakhir 10 K terakhir.', 'sk': 'Naš cilj je ustvariti priročen vmesnik naravnega jezika za izvajanje dobro določenih, a kompleksnih dejanj, kot so analiza podatkov, manipulacija besedila in poizvedba baz podatkov. Vendar pa so obstoječi vmesniki naravnega jezika za takšne naloge precej primitivni v primerjavi z močjo, ki jo imamo pri programskem jeziku. Da bi premostili to vrzel, začnemo z jedrnim programskim jezikom in uporabnikom omogočimo, da "naturalizirajo" jedrni jezik postopoma z opredelitvijo alternativne, bolj naravne sintakse in vse bolj kompleksne koncepte v smislu kompozicij preprostejših. V vokselskem svetu pokažemo, da lahko skupnost uporabnikov hkrati uči skupni sistem raznolikega jezika in ga uporablja za gradnjo na stotine kompleksnih vokselskih struktur. V treh dneh so ti uporabniki v 85,9% zadnjih 10K izgovorov prešli od uporabe samo jezika na naturaliziran jezik.', 'he': 'המטרה שלנו היא ליצור ממשק טבעי נוח לשפה לבצע פעולות מסובכות אבל מוגדרות כמו ניתוח נתונים, מניפולציה בטקסט, וביקוש בסיסי נתונים. עם זאת, משקפי שפה טבעיים קיימים למשימות כאלה הם די פרימיטיביים בהשוואה לכוח שאפשר להשתמש בשפה תוכנית. כדי לשבור את הפער הזה, אנו מתחילים עם שפת תוכנית ליבה ולאפשר למשתמשים "לטבע" את שפת הליבוד באופן נוסף על ידי הגדרת אלטרנטיבית, סינטקס טבעית יותר ויותר מורכבת במונחים של מורכבות של אחד פשוט יותר. בעולם ווקסל, אנחנו מראים שקהילה של משתמשים יכולה באותו הזמן ללמד מערכת משותפת שפה מגוונת ולהשתמש בה כדי לבנות מאות מבנים ווקסל מורכבים. במהלך שלושה ימים, המשתמשים הללו עברו משימוש בשפה הליבשית בלבד לשימוש בשפה הטבעית ב-85.9% מההוצאות האחרונות של 10K.', 'ha': "Gayinmu yana ƙiƙira wani interfekt mai daidai na harshen asiyya wa aikin da za'a yi amfani da su da kyautata-ƙayyade, kuma amma masu adadi kamar analyza data, da maniyi matsayi, da kuma an tambayi database. A lokacin da ke da ɗayan fuskõkin harshen asiyya wa wannan aikin, za'a samba da umarni na komai da birane da wata lugha shirin ayuka. Dõmin ka sami wannan gaura, za'a fara da harshen shirin ayuka na ƙari kuma za'a yarda da mãsu amfani da shi zuwa 'naturalise' harshen ƙari na ƙari da za'a bayyana wasu dabam'a, masu ƙari ga synkasse na asalin da za'a ƙara zafi masu haɗi masu sauki. Daga wani duniya na voxel, Munã nũna cewa wani jami da ke amfani da shi, yana iya sanar da wani na'urar na ɗabi'a wata harshe na dabam'a, kuma munã amfani da shi dõmin ya ƙiƙiri wasu masallatan voxel masu hushi. Ga bayan kwanan uku, waɗannan masu amfani da shi sai ya yi amfani da harshen kimada kawai, don ya yi amfani da harshen da aka asare shi cikin asilimin 85.9 na farko na 10 K.", 'bo': "ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རིགས་ཀྱི་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གདོང་མཐའ་ནི་བྱ་རིམ་གཅིག་གི་དབང་ཆ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ནུས་པ To bridge this gap, we start with a core programming language and allow users to 'naturalize' the core language incrementally by defining alternative, more natural syntax and increasingly complex concepts in terms of compositions of simpler ones. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་ནང་དུ་བརྡ་བཀོད་བྱས་ན། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དུས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ཉིན་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་རིང་ལ། སྤྱོད་མཁན་འདི་དག་གིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་རོགས།"}
{'en': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering', 'ar': 'مجموعات الكلمات الدلالية باستخدام المجموعات الطيفية الموقعة', 'es': 'Agrupaciones de palabras semánticas mediante agrupamiento espectral firmado', 'fr': "Groupes de mots sémantiques utilisant l'agrégation spectrale signée", 'pt': 'Clusters de palavras semânticas usando clustering espectral assinado', 'ja': '署名付きスペクトルクラスタリングを使用したセマンティックワードクラスター', 'zh': '用符号光谱聚类之语义词聚类', 'ru': 'Семантические кластеры слов с использованием подписанной спектральной кластеризации', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक वर्ड क्लस्टर हस्ताक्षरित वर्णक्रमीय क्लस्टरिंग का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Cnuasaigh Focal Shéimeantacha ag Úsáid Braisle Speictrim Shínithe', 'ka': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hu': 'Szemantikus szóklaszterek aláírt spektrumklaszterek használatával', 'el': 'Σημαντικές ομάδες λέξεων που χρησιμοποιούν υπογεγραμμένη φασματική συσσώρευση', 'kk': 'Қолтаңбаланған Spectral кластерін қолданатын Semantic Word Clusters', 'it': 'Cluster semantici di parole che utilizzano cluster spettrali firmati', 'mk': 'Семантички зборски кластери кои користат потпишано спектрално кластерирање', 'lt': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering', 'ms': 'Kelompok Kata Semantik Mengguna Kelompok Spektral Tandatangan', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് വാക്ക് ക്ലൌസ്റ്റര്\u200d സിപ്പെക്ട്രല്\u200d ക്ലൌസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Raggruppamenti Semantiċi tal-kliem li jużaw Raggruppament Spettrali ffirmat', 'mn': 'Хүсэглэгдсэн Спектрал Клустер', 'pl': 'Klastry słów semantycznych wykorzystujące podpisane klastry widmowe', 'no': 'Semantisk ord- kluster ved bruk av signert spektral- klustering', 'ro': 'Clustere de cuvinte semantice utilizând clustere spectrale semnate', 'sr': 'Semantièni klusi reèi koristeći potpisanu spektralnu skupljanje', 'si': 'සැමැන්තික වචන ක්\u200dලස්ටර් ස්වාක්ෂිත ස්පෙක්ටර් ක්\u200dලස්ටර් භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering', 'sv': 'Semantiska ordkluster som använder signerade spektralkluster', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی کلاس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích từ ngữ kỳ bí dùng kí kết quấy rối ngoạn mục', 'nl': 'Semantische woordclusters met ondertekende spectrale clustering', 'da': 'Semantiske ordklynger ved hjælp af signeret spektral klynger', 'hr': 'Semantički klusi riječi koristeći potpisanu spektralnu skupinu', 'ko': '기호 스펙트럼 집합에 기초한 의미 단어 집합', 'bg': 'Семантични словесни клъстери, използващи подписани спектрални клъстери', 'id': 'Kelompok Kata Semantik Menggunakan Kelompok Spektral Tandatangan', 'de': 'Semantische Wortcluster mit signierter spektraler Clusterung', 'sw': 'Makundi ya neno la Semantic Usitumia Clustering Signatured Spectral', 'sq': 'Grupe fjalësh Semantike duke përdorur grupimin spektral të nënshkruar', 'tr': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'fa': 'استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای گوناگون امضا شده', 'am': 'text-tool-action', 'az': 'İmzalanmış Spektral Clustering', 'bs': 'Semantički klusi riječi koristeći potpisanu spektralnu skupinu', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ca': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering', 'bn': 'স্বাক্ষরিত স্পেক্ট্রাল ক্লাস্টিং ব্যবহার করে সেম্যান্টিক শব্দ ক্লাস্টার', 'af': 'Leoobject name (optional)', 'et': 'Semantilised sõnaklastrid allkirjastatud spektraalse klastri kasutamisel', 'fi': 'Semanttiset sanaklusterit, jotka käyttävät allekirjoitettua spektraalista klusterointia', 'cs': 'Sémantické slovní shluky používající signované spektrální shlukování', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringClostering', 'he': 'קבוצות מילים סמנטיות בשימוש קבוצות ספקטרליות חתומות', 'ha': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering', 'sk': 'Semantični sklopi besed z uporabo podpisanega spektralnega sklopa', 'bo': 'Semantic Word Clusters Using Signed Spectral Clustering'}
{'en': 'Vector space representations of words capture many aspects of word similarity, but such methods tend to produce vector spaces in which antonyms (as well as synonyms) are close to each other. For spectral clustering using such word embeddings, words are points in a vector space where synonyms are linked with positive weights, while antonyms are linked with negative weights. We present a new signed spectral normalized graph cut algorithm, signed clustering, that overlays existing thesauri upon distributionally derived vector representations of words, so that antonym relationships between word pairs are represented by negative weights. Our signed clustering algorithm produces clusters of words that simultaneously capture distributional and synonym relations. By using randomized spectral decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both fast and scalable. We validate our clusters using datasets containing human judgments of word pair similarities and show the benefit of using our word clusters for sentiment prediction.signed clustering, that overlays existing thesauri upon\n      distributionally derived vector representations of words, so that antonym\n      relationships between word pairs are represented by negative weights. Our\n      signed clustering algorithm produces clusters of words that simultaneously\n      capture distributional and synonym relations. By using randomized spectral\n      decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both\n      fast and scalable. We validate our clusters using datasets containing\n      human judgments of word pair similarities and show the benefit of using\n      our word clusters for sentiment prediction.\n    ', 'ar': 'تلتقط تمثيلات فضاء المتجهات للكلمات العديد من جوانب تشابه الكلمات ، لكن هذه الأساليب تميل إلى إنتاج مسافات متجهة تكون فيها المتضادات (وكذلك المرادفات) قريبة من بعضها البعض. بالنسبة للتجميع الطيفي باستخدام مثل هذه الكلمات المتضمنة ، فإن الكلمات هي نقاط في فضاء متجه حيث ترتبط المرادفات بأوزان موجبة ، بينما ترتبط المتضادات بأوزان سلبية. نقدم خوارزمية قطع رسم بياني طيفي جديد موقّع ، تجميع موقعة ، يتراكب مع قاموس المرادفات الحالي على تمثيلات متجهية مشتقة توزيعًا للكلمات ، بحيث يتم تمثيل العلاقات المتناقضة بين أزواج الكلمات بأوزان سالبة. تنتج خوارزمية التجميع الموقعة لدينا مجموعات من الكلمات التي تلتقط في الوقت نفسه علاقات التوزيع والمرادفات. باستخدام التحليل الطيفي العشوائي (Halko et al. ، 2011) والمصفوفات المتفرقة ، تكون طريقتنا سريعة وقابلة للتطوير. نحن نتحقق من صحة مجموعاتنا باستخدام مجموعات البيانات التي تحتوي على أحكام بشرية لأوجه التشابه بين أزواج الكلمات ونبين فائدة استخدام مجموعات الكلمات الخاصة بنا للتنبؤ بالمشاعر.', 'fr': "Les représentations spatiales vectorielles des mots capturent de nombreux aspects de la similitude des mots, mais ces méthodes ont tendance à produire des espaces vectoriels dans lesquels les antonymes (ainsi que les synonymes) sont proches les uns des autres. Pour l'agrégation spectrale utilisant de tels incorporations de mots, les mots sont des points dans un espace vectoriel où les synonymes sont liés par des pondérations positives, tandis que les antonymes sont liés par des pondérations négatives. Nous présentons un nouvel algorithme de découpage de graphe normalisé spectral signé, le clustering signé, qui superpose des thésaurus existants sur des représentations vectorielles de mots dérivées de manière distributionnelle, de sorte que les relations d'antonymes entre les paires de mots soient représentées par des pondérations négatives. Notre algorithme de clustering signé produit des groupes de mots qui capturent simultanément les relations distributionnelles et synonymes. En utilisant la décomposition spectrale aléatoire (Halko et al., 2011) et des matrices éparses, notre méthode est à la fois rapide et évolutive. Nous validons nos groupes à l'aide d'ensembles de données contenant des jugements humains sur les similitudes de paires de mots et montrons les avantages de nos groupes de mots pour la prédiction des sentiments.", 'es': 'Las representaciones de palabras en el espacio vectorial capturan muchos aspectos de la similitud de palabras, pero estos métodos tienden a producir espacios vectoriales en los que los antónimos (así como los sinónimos) están cerca unos de otros. Para la agrupación espectral que utiliza tales incrustaciones de palabras, las palabras son puntos en un espacio vectorial donde los sinónimos están vinculados con pesos positivos, mientras que los antónimos están vinculados con pesos negativos. Presentamos un nuevo algoritmo de corte de gráfico normalizado espectral con signo, agrupamiento con signo, que superpone tesauros existentes sobre representaciones vectoriales de palabras derivadas distribucionalmente, de modo que las relaciones antónimos entre pares de palabras están representadas por pesos negativos. Nuestro algoritmo de clustering firmado produce grupos de palabras que capturan simultáneamente las relaciones distribucionales y de sinónimos. Al utilizar la descomposición espectral aleatoria (Halko et al., 2011) y matrices dispersas, nuestro método es rápido y escalable. Validamos nuestros clústeres utilizando conjuntos de datos que contienen juicios humanos sobre las similitudes de pares de palabras y mostramos el beneficio de usar nuestros grupos de palabras para la predicción de opiniones.', 'pt': 'As representações do espaço vetorial de palavras capturam muitos aspectos da semelhança de palavras, mas esses métodos tendem a produzir espaços vetoriais nos quais os antônimos (assim como os sinônimos) estão próximos uns dos outros. Para agrupamento espectral usando tais incorporações de palavras, as palavras são pontos em um espaço vetorial onde sinônimos são ligados a pesos positivos, enquanto antônimos são ligados a pesos negativos. Apresentamos um novo algoritmo de corte de grafo normalizado espectral sinalizado, agrupamento sinalizado, que sobrepõe tesauros existentes a representações vetoriais de palavras derivadas de forma distribuída, de modo que as relações de antônimos entre pares de palavras sejam representadas por pesos negativos. Nosso algoritmo de agrupamento assinado produz agrupamentos de palavras que capturam simultaneamente relações de distribuição e sinônimos. Usando decomposição espectral aleatória (Halko et al., 2011) e matrizes esparsas, nosso método é rápido e escalável. Validamos nossos clusters usando conjuntos de dados contendo julgamentos humanos de semelhanças de pares de palavras e mostramos o benefício de usar nossos clusters de palavras para previsão de sentimentos.', 'ja': '単語のベクトル空間表現は、単語の類似性の多くの態様を取り込むが、そのような方法は、対義語（ならびに同義語）が互いに近接しているベクトル空間を生成する傾向がある。 このような単語埋め込みを使用するスペクトルクラスタリングの場合、単語は、同義語が正の重みにリンクされているベクトル空間内の点であり、対義語は負の重みにリンクされている。 我々は、新しい署名付き正規化されたスペクトルグラフカットアルゴリズム、署名付きクラスタリングを提示し、既存のシソーリを単語の分布的に導出されたベクトル表現に重ね合わせ、単語ペア間の対義語関係を負の重みで表現する。 当社の署名付きクラスタリングアルゴリズムは、分布関係と代名詞関係を同時に取り込む単語のクラスタを生成します。 ランダム化されたスペクトル分解（ Halko et al., 2011 ）と疎行列を使用することにより、我々の方法は高速でスケーラブルである。 私たちは、単語ペアの類似性の人間の判断を含むデータセットを使用してクラスタを検証し、感情予測に私たちの単語クラスタを使用する利点を示します。', 'zh': '单词向量空中获单词相似性多方,然其法往往生反义词(及同义词)相近向量空间。 其用此词嵌光谱聚类者,单词向量空中,其同义词与正权重链接,而反义词与负重链接。 新有符号光谱归一化图割算法,即有符号聚类,以见thesauri叠加于单词布生向量,以单词反义词负重。 吾符号聚类算法生成同时获布同义词之单词聚类。 因用随机光谱分解(Halko等,2011)疏矩阵,吾道速而可广也。 吾以含人类对单词以验吾相似性之数集来,而示用吾词簇之情占之利。', 'ru': 'Векторные пространственные представления слов охватывают многие аспекты сходства слов, но такие методы имеют тенденцию создавать векторные пространства, в которых антонимы (а также синонимы) близки друг к другу. Для спектральной кластеризации, использующей такие вложения слов, слова являются точками в векторном пространстве, где синонимы связаны с положительными весами, в то время как антонимы связаны с отрицательными весами. Представляем новый подписанный спектрально-нормализованный алгоритм отсечения графов, знаковая кластеризация, который накладывает существующие тезаурусы на распределенно выведенные векторные представления слов, так что антонимические отношения между парами слов представлены отрицательными весами. Наш подписанный алгоритм кластеризации производит кластеры слов, которые одновременно захватывают распределительные и синонимные отношения. Используя рандомизированное спектральное разложение (Halko et al., 2011) и разреженные матрицы, наш метод является одновременно быстрым и масштабируемым. Мы проверяем наши кластеры с помощью наборов данных, содержащих человеческие суждения о сходстве пар слов, и показываем преимущества использования наших кластеров слов для предсказания настроений.', 'hi': 'शब्दों के वेक्टर स्पेस प्रतिनिधित्व शब्द समानता के कई पहलुओं को कैप्चर करते हैं, लेकिन इस तरह के तरीके वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान का उत्पादन करते हैं जिसमें विलोम (साथ ही साथ पर्यायवाची शब्द) एक दूसरे के करीब होते हैं। इस तरह के शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके वर्णक्रमीय क्लस्टरिंग के लिए, शब्द एक वेक्टर स्पेस में बिंदु होते हैं जहां पर्यायवाची शब्द सकारात्मक वजन से जुड़े होते हैं, जबकि विलोम नकारात्मक वजन से जुड़े होते हैं। हम एक नया हस्ताक्षरित वर्णक्रमीय सामान्यीकृत ग्राफ कट एल्गोरिथ्म प्रस्तुत करते हैं, हस्ताक्षरित क्लस्टरिंग, जो शब्दों के वितरण व्युत्पन्न वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व पर मौजूदा थीसॉरी को ओवरले करता है, ताकि शब्द जोड़े के बीच विलोम संबंधों को नकारात्मक वजन द्वारा दर्शाया जा सके। हमारा हस्ताक्षरित क्लस्टरिंग एल्गोरिथ्म शब्दों के समूहों का उत्पादन करता है जो एक साथ वितरण और पर्यायवाची संबंधों को कैप्चर करते हैं। यादृच्छिक वर्णक्रमीय अपघटन (Halko et al., 2011) और विरल matrices का उपयोग करके, हमारी विधि दोनों तेजी से और स्केलेबल है। हम शब्द जोड़ी समानताओं के मानव निर्णय वाले डेटासेट का उपयोग करके अपने समूहों को मान्य करते हैं और भावना भविष्यवाणी के लिए हमारे शब्द समूहों का उपयोग करने का लाभ दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Gabhann léirithe spáis veicteora ar fhocail go leor gnéithe de chosúlachtaí focal, ach is gnách go gcruthaíonn modhanna dá leithéid spásanna veicteora ina bhfuil comhfhocail (chomh maith le comhchiallaigh) gar dá chéile. Maidir le cnuasaigh speictreach ag baint úsáide as leabaithe focal dá leithéid, is pointí iad focail i spás veicteora ina bhfuil comhchiallaigh nasctha le meáchain dearfacha, agus comhchiallaigh nasctha le meáchain dhiúltacha. Cuirimid i láthair algartam gearrtha graif normalaithe speictreach nua sínithe, cnuasach sínithe, a fhorleagann teasárais atá ann cheana féin ar uiríll veicteoirí díorthaithe dáileacháin, ionas go léireoidh meáchain dhiúltacha na caidrimh fhrithainm idir péirí focal. Táirgeann ár n-algartam cnuasaithe sínithe braislí focal a ghabhann le caidreamh dáileacháin agus comhchiallach ag an am céanna. Trí úsáid a bhaint as dianscaoileadh speictreach randamach (Halko et al., 2011) agus maitrísí tanaí, tá ár modh tapa agus inscálaithe araon. Déanaimid ár mbraislí a bhailíochtú ag baint úsáide as tacair shonraí ina bhfuil breithiúnais dhaonna ar chosúlachtaí péire focal agus taispeánann muid an tairbhe a bhaineann lenár gcnuasaigh focal a úsáid chun meon a thuar.', 'hu': 'A szavak vektoros térreprezentációi a szóhasonlóság számos aspektusát rögzítik, de az ilyen módszerek általában olyan vektortereket hoznak létre, amelyekben az antonymok (valamint a szinonimák) közel vannak egymáshoz. Az ilyen szóbeágyazásokat használó spektrális fürtözésnél a szavak vektortérben lévő pontok, ahol a szinonimák pozitív súlyokkal vannak összekapcsolva, míg az antonymek negatív súlyokkal vannak összekapcsolva. Bemutatunk egy új, aláírt spektrális normalizált gráf vágási algoritmust, aláírt klaszterezést, amely a meglévő szótárakat átfedi a szavak eloszlási szempontból származó vektoros reprezentációira, így a szópárok közötti antonym kapcsolatokat negatív súlyok jelentik. Aláírt klaszterezési algoritmusunk olyan szavak klasztereit hoz létre, amelyek egyidejűleg rögzítik a disztribúciós és szinonimás kapcsolatokat. randomizált spektrális bomlás (Halko et al., 2011) és ritka mátrixok alkalmazásával módszerünk gyors és skálázható. Klasztereinket olyan adatkészletekkel validáljuk, amelyek emberi megítéléseket tartalmaznak a szópárok hasonlóságairól, és megmutatjuk, milyen előnyös a szóklasztereink érzelmek előrejelzésére.', 'el': 'Οι διανυσματικές διαστημικές αναπαραστάσεις των λέξεων συλλαμβάνουν πολλές πτυχές της ομοιότητας λέξεων, αλλά τέτοιες μέθοδοι τείνουν να παράγουν διανυσματικούς χώρους στους οποίους τα αντωνύμια (καθώς και τα συνώνυμα) είναι κοντά μεταξύ τους. Για τη φασματική ομαδοποίηση χρησιμοποιώντας τέτοιες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων, οι λέξεις είναι σημεία σε ένα διανυσματικό χώρο όπου τα συνώνυμα συνδέονται με θετικά βάρη, ενώ τα αντωνύμια συνδέονται με αρνητικά βάρη. Παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο υπογεγραμμένο φασματικό ομαλοποιημένο αλγόριθμο κοπής γραφήματος, υπογεγραμμένη ομαδοποίηση, που επικαλύπτει υπάρχοντα θησαυρά σε διανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων, έτσι ώστε οι αντωνυμικές σχέσεις μεταξύ ζευγαριών λέξεων να αντιπροσωπεύονται από αρνητικά βάρη. Ο αλγόριθμος ομαδοποίησης με υπογραφή παράγει ομάδες λέξεων που ταυτόχρονα συλλαμβάνουν σχέσεις κατανομής και συνώνυμων. Χρησιμοποιώντας τυχαία φασματική αποσύνθεση (Χάλκο κ.α., 2011) και αραίους πίνακες, η μέθοδος μας είναι γρήγορη και κλιμακωτή. Επιβεβαιώνουμε τις ομάδες μας χρησιμοποιώντας σύνολα δεδομένων που περιέχουν ανθρώπινες κρίσεις για ομοιότητες ζεύγους λέξεων και δείχνουν το όφελος της χρήσης των συλλόγων λέξεων μας για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων.', 'ka': 'ვაკტორის სიტყვების განსაზღვრებები უფრო სიტყვების განსაზღვრებულობის აპექტირებით, მაგრამ ასეთი პროცემები უნდა გავაკეთოთ გვეკტორის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ანტონიმი (და სინონიმი სპექტრალური კლასტერის გამოყენებაში ასეთი სიტყვების შებრუნებისთვის სიტყვები გვეკტორის სამყაროში, სადაც სინონიმები დაკავშირებულია პოციტიური სიტყვებით, როცა ანტონიმებ ჩვენ ახალი სპექტრალური ნორმალურიზებული გრაფის გადაწყებული ალგორიტიმ, დაწერილი კლასტერის გადაწყება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულად განსაზღვრებული გვეკტორის გამოსახულებაზე გადაწყება სიტყვების განსაზღვრებით, ანტო ჩვენი წერტილი კლასტერინული ალგორიტიმ გამოვიყენება სიტყვების კლასტერი, რომელიც ერთადერთად გადატანა განსაზღვრებული და სინონიმური შესახებ. გამოყენებით გამოყენებული სპექტრალური განაკომპორციაცია (Halko et al., 2011) და გამოყენებული მარტირების გამოყენებით, ჩვენი მეთოდი ყველაფერი ძალიან და მარტირებული ჩვენ ჩვენი კლასტერები გავაკეთებთ, რომლის გამოყენება მონაცემების კონტაქტებით, რომელიც ადამიანის სწორებების სიტყვების მსგავსი და გამოყენება ჩვენი სიტყვების კლას', 'lt': 'Vektorių erdvės žodžių atvaizdai apima daugelį žodžių panašumo aspektų, tačiau tokie metodai paprastai sukuria vektorių erdves, kuriose antonimai (taip pat sinonimai) yra artimi vienas kitam. Spectraliniam klasifikavimui naudojant tokius žodžius įterpiami žodžiai yra vektoriaus erdvėje esantys taškai, kuriuose sinonimai yra susiję su teigiamais svoriais, o antonimai yra susiję su neigiamais svoriais. Mes pristatome naują pasirašytą spektrinį normalizuotą grafikos pjaustymo algoritmą, pasirašytą klasterizavimą, kuris padeda egzistuojančius tezaurus pasiskirstymo būdu išvestų vektorinių žodžių atspaudų atžvilgiu, kad antonimų santykiai tarp žodžių poros būtų atspindėti neigiamais svoriais. Mūsų pasirašytas klasterizavimo algoritmas gamina žodžių grupes, kurios vienu metu apima paskirstymo ir sinonimo santykius. Naudodami atsitiktinės atrankos spektro dekompoziciją (Halko ir kt., 2011) ir retas matricas, mūsų metodas yra greitas ir skaliuojamas. Patvirtiname savo klasterius naudojant duomenų rinkinius, kuriuose yra žmonių sprendimų dėl žodžių poros panašumo, ir parodomi nauda, kad mūsų žodžių klasteriai naudojami jausmų prognozavimui.', 'it': "Le rappresentazioni spaziali vettoriali delle parole catturano molti aspetti della somiglianza delle parole, ma tali metodi tendono a produrre spazi vettoriali in cui gli antonimi (così come i sinonimi) sono vicini l'uno all'altro. Per il clustering spettrale che utilizza tali incorporazioni di parole, le parole sono punti in uno spazio vettoriale in cui i sinonimi sono collegati con pesi positivi, mentre gli antonimi sono collegati con pesi negativi. Presentiamo un nuovo algoritmo di taglio grafico normalizzato spettrale firmato, clustering firmato, che sovrappone thesauri esistenti su rappresentazioni vettoriali distributivamente derivate delle parole, in modo che le relazioni antonimiche tra coppie di parole siano rappresentate da pesi negativi. Il nostro algoritmo di clustering firmato produce cluster di parole che catturano simultaneamente relazioni distributive e sinonime. Utilizzando scomposizione spettrale randomizzata (Halko et al., 2011) e matrici sparse, il nostro metodo è sia veloce che scalabile. Convalidiamo i nostri cluster utilizzando set di dati contenenti giudizi umani sulle somiglianze delle coppie di parole e mostriamo il vantaggio di utilizzare i nostri cluster di parole per la previsione dei sentimenti.", 'mk': 'Векторските вселенски претставувања на зборовите заземаат многу аспекти на сличноста на зборовите, но ваквите методи имаат тенденција да произведуваат векторски простори во кои анонимите (како и синонимите) се блиски еден до друг. За спектралното групирање со користење на вакви зборови, зборовите се точки во векторен простор каде синонимите се поврзани со позитивни тегови, додека анонимите се поврзани со негативни тегови. Презентираме нов потпишан спектрален нормализиран графски алгоритм, потпишан кластерирање, кој ги покрива постоечките тезаури на дистрибуционално изведени векторни претставувања на зборови, така што антонимските односи помеѓу зборски парови се претставени од негативни тегови. Our signed clustering algorithm produces clusters of words that simultaneously capture distributional and synonym relations.  Со користење на случајна декомпозиција на спектрал (Халко и други, 2011) и мали матрици, нашиот метод е брз и скалиран. Ги потврдуваме нашите групи користејќи податоци кои содржат човечки пресуди за сличности на зборовите парови и покажуваме корист од користењето на нашите зборови групи за предвидување на чувствата.', 'kk': 'Сөздердің векторлық бос орындары сөздердің ұқсастығының көптеген бөлшектерін түсіндіреді, бірақ бұл әдістер бір-біріне жақын атонимдердің (синонимдер және) векторлық бос орындарын жасайды. Бұл сөздерді ендіру үшін спектралды кластерлеу үшін сөздерді вектордың орындағы нүктелер болады. Антонимдері негативті теңдіктермен байланысты болғанда синонимдер негативті теңдіктермен байланысты. Біз жаңа қолтаңбаланған спектралдық графикалық көлемі алгоритм, қолтаңбаланған кластерлік, бұл дистрибуттық векторлық сөздерді таңдау үшін бар тезорияны өзгертеді, сондықтан сөздердің екі арасындағы антонимдік қатынастары нег Біздің қолтаңбаланған кластерлік алгоритміз бір-бір үлестірім мен синоним қатынастарды түсіндіреді. Кездейсоқ спектралдық бөлшектеуді (Halko et al., 2011) және кеңістірілген матрицаларды қолдану арқылы, әдіміздің әдісіміз жылдам және масштабтау арқылы. Біз кластерімізді адамдардың екі сөздің ұқсас сәйкестіктерін қолданатын деректер жиындарын тексеріп, сөздің кластерімізді көзгерту үшін пайдалану мүмкіндігін көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Perwakilan ruang vektor perkataan menangkap banyak aspek persamaan perkataan, tetapi kaedah tersebut cenderung menghasilkan ruang vektor di mana antonim (serta sinonim) adalah dekat satu sama lain. Untuk kumpulan spektral menggunakan penyembedding perkataan seperti ini, perkataan adalah titik dalam ruang vektor dimana sinonim dipaut dengan berat positif, sementara antonim dipaut dengan berat negatif. Kami memperkenalkan algoritma memotong graf spektral yang ditandatangani baru, menandatangani pemisahan, yang meliputi tesauri yang wujud pada perwakilan vektor berasal secara distribusi perkataan, sehingga hubungan antonym antara pasangan perkataan diwakili oleh berat negatif. Algoritma kumpulan ditandatangani kami menghasilkan kumpulan perkataan yang secara bersamaan menangkap hubungan distribusi dan sinonim. Dengan menggunakan pecahan spektral rawak (Halko et al., 2011) dan matriks jarang, kaedah kita adalah cepat dan boleh skala. Kami sahkan kumpulan kami menggunakan set data yang mengandungi penilaian manusia tentang persamaan perkataan pasangan dan menunjukkan keuntungan menggunakan kumpulan perkataan kami untuk ramalan perasaan.', 'mt': 'Ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-ispazju tal-vetturi tal-kliem jaqbdu ħafna aspetti tas-similarità tal-kliem, iżda metodi bħal dawn għandhom it-tendenza li jipproduċu spazji tal-vetturi li fihom l-antonimi (kif ukoll is-sinonimi) huma qrib xulxin. For spectral clustering using such word embeddings, words are points in a vector space where synonyms are linked with positive weights, while antonyms are linked with negative weights.  Aħna nippreżentaw algoritmu ġdid iffirmat ta’ qtugħ normalizzat tal-graff, raggruppament iffirmat, li jgħaddi minn tesauri eżistenti fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi derivati distribuzzjonalment tal-kliem, sabiex ir-relazzjonijiet antonimi bejn il-pari tal-kliem ikunu rappreżentati minn piżijiet negattivi. L-algoritmu ta’ raggruppament iffirmat tagħna jipproduċi raggruppamenti ta’ kliem li fl-istess ħin jaqbdu relazzjonijiet ta’ distribuzzjoni u sinonimu. Permezz ta’ dekompożizzjoni spettrali każwali (Halko et al., 2011) u matriċi rari, il-metodu tagħna huwa kemm mgħaġġel kif ukoll skalabbli. Aħna jivvalidaw il-gruppi tagħna billi nużaw settijiet ta’ dejta li fihom sentenzi umani ta’ similaritajiet ta’ pari ta’ kliem u nuru l-benefiċċju li nużaw il-gruppi ta’ kliem tagħna għat-tbassir tas-sentimenti.', 'mn': 'Вектор орон зай нь үгийн ижил хэмжээсүүдийг авч үздэг. Гэхдээ ийм арга нь вектор орон зай боловсруулдаг бөгөөд антонимууд (мөн синонимууд) хоорондоо ойрхон байдаг. Эдгээр үг нэмж ашиглах спектрал кластерын хувьд үг нь эерэг жинтэй холбогдсон векторын зайд цэгүүд юм. Антонимууд сөрөг жинтэй холбогдсон ч гэсэн. Бид шинэ үсэглэгдсэн спектрал хэмжээний график хасах алгоритм, үсэглэгдсэн кластерийн алгоритм бий болгож байна. Энэ нь хуваарилагдсан векторын илэрхийлэл дээр оршиж байгаа тезорийг илэрхийлж байна. Тиймээс үгийн хоорондын антоним харилцаа сөрөг хэмжээнд Бидний гарын үсэглэгдсэн алгоритм нь хуваарилалт болон синоним харилцааны бүлэг үг бий болгодог. Санаа санамсаргүй спектрал хуваагдах (Halko et al., 2011) болон жижиг матриц ашиглан бидний арга нь хурдан болон масштабтай. Бид өөрсдийн кластеруудыг хүн төрөлхтний хэлбэртэй дүгнэлтийг ашиглаж, мэдрэмжтэй хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглах хэрэгцээ харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ വെക്ടര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഒരേപോലെയുള്ള പല ഭാഗങ്ങളെയും പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ഇതുപോലുള്ള രീ ഇങ്ങനെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് സ്പെക്ട്രല്\u200d ക്ലസ്റ്റര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി വാക്കുകള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിറ്റര്\u200d സ്പെക്ട്രില്\u200d പ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ സ്പെക്ട്രേക്ടല്\u200d സാധാരണ ഗ്രാഫ് മുറിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മ്, സ്ക്രോരിറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത്, നിലവിലുള്ള തീസോറി വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിന നമ്മുടെ ഒപ്പിട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരേ സമയത്ത് വിതരണ വിഭ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്പെക്ട്രല്\u200d ഡെക്കോമോപ്പിഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വേഗത്തിലും കണക്കാക്കുന്നതുമാണ്. വാക്കിന്റെ രണ്ട് ജോട്ടിനെപ്പോലെയുള്ള വിധികള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഞങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200dമാരെ നിഷ്ഠിക്', 'no': 'Representasjonar av vektorrom av ord får mange aspektar av ordsimilaritet, men slike metodar har tendens til å produsera vektorrom der antonymar (og synonymar) er nær kvarandre. For spektralclustering med slike ordinnbygging, er ord punkt i ein vektorrom der synonymmer er lenke til positiv vekt, mens antonymmer er lenke til negativ vekt. Vi presenterer eit nytt signert spektral normalisert graf-kjøringsalgoritme, signert klassering, som overstyrer eksisterande tesauri på distribusjonelt avvikte vektorrepresentasjonar av ord, slik at antonymsforholdet mellom ordpar er representert av negativ vekt. Vårt signert klasseringsalgoritme produserer grupper av ord som samtidig hentar distribusjonsrelasjonar og synonym. Ved å bruka tilfeldige spektraldekomposisjon (Halko et al., 2011) og sparse matriser, er metoden vårt både rask og skalerbar. Vi bestemmer grupper våre med datasett som inneheld menneskelige sprøytebrukar av ord par liknande og viser fordel til å bruka ordgrupper våre for følelsesforhåndsvising.', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje przestrzeni wektorowej słów obejmują wiele aspektów podobieństwa słów, ale takie metody mają tendencję do tworzenia przestrzeni wektorowej, w których antonimy (a także synonimy) są blisko siebie. W przypadku grupowania widmowego przy użyciu takich osadzeń słowa są punktami w przestrzeni wektorowej, gdzie synonimy są powiązane z wagami dodatnimi, podczas gdy antonimy są powiązane z wagami ujemnymi. Przedstawiamy nowy algorytm znormalizowanego wykresu znormalizowanego spektralnego, klastrowania sygnałów, który nakłada istniejące tezaury na rozkładowo pochodzące reprezentacje wektorowe słów, dzięki czemu relacje antonimowe między parami słów są reprezentowane przez ujemne wagi. Nasz algorytm klastrowania sygnalizowanego tworzy klastry słów, które jednocześnie uchwycają relacje dystrybucyjne i synonimowe. Dzięki wykorzystaniu randomizowanego rozkładu spektralnego (Halko et al., 2011) i rzadkich macierzy nasza metoda jest zarówno szybka, jak i skalowalna. Sprawdzamy nasze klastry za pomocą zbiorów danych zawierających ludzkie oceny podobieństw par słów i pokazujemy korzyści płynące z wykorzystania naszych klastrów słów do przewidywania sentymentów.', 'ro': 'Reprezentările spațiului vectorial ale cuvintelor captează multe aspecte ale similitudinii cuvintelor, dar astfel de metode tind să producă spații vectoriale în care antonimele (precum și sinonimele) sunt aproape una de cealaltă. Pentru clusterizarea spectrală folosind astfel de încorporări de cuvinte, cuvintele sunt puncte într-un spațiu vectorial în care sinonimele sunt legate de greutăți pozitive, în timp ce antonimele sunt legate de greutăți negative. Vă prezentăm un nou algoritm de tăiere a graficului normalizat spectral semnat, clustering semnat, care suprapune tezaurile existente pe reprezentările vectoriale derivate distribuțional ale cuvintelor, astfel încât relațiile antonime dintre perechile de cuvinte să fie reprezentate de greutăți negative. Algoritmul nostru de clusterizare semnat produce clustere de cuvinte care captează simultan relațiile distribuționale și sinonime. Folosind descompunerea spectrală randomizată (Halko et al., 2011) și matrici rare, metoda noastră este atât rapidă, cât și scalabilă. Validăm grupurile noastre folosind seturi de date care conțin judecăți umane ale similarităților perechilor de cuvinte și arătăm beneficiul utilizării grupurilor noastre de cuvinte pentru predicția sentimentelor.', 'sr': 'Vektorski prostor predstavljanja reèi uhvate mnoge aspekte sliènosti reèi, ali takve metode su tendencije da proizvode vektorske prostore u kojima su antonimi (kao i sinonimi) blizu jedno drugom. Za spektralno skupljanje koristeći takve reči, reči su tačke u vektorskom prostoru gdje su sinonimi povezani sa pozitivnim težinama, dok su antonimi povezani sa negativnim težinama. Predstavljamo novi normalizirani algoritam presjeka grafika, potpisan skustering, koji predstavlja postojeće teorije na raspodjelljivo izvedenim vektorskim predstavljanjima riječi, tako da su antonimske veze između parova riječi predstavljene negativnim težinama. Naš potpisani algoritam skupljanja proizvodi skupine reči koje istovremeno uhvate distribucijske i sinonimske odnose. Koristeći randomizovane spektralne rasporede (Halko et al., 2011) i rezervne matrice, naša metoda je i brza i skalabilna. Potvrđujemo naše skupine koristeći podatke koje sadrže ljudske osude o sličnostima riječi par i pokazujemo korist koristi naše skupine riječi za predviđanje osjećaja.', 'si': 'වෙක්ටර් අවසානයේ වචන වර්තනය ගොඩක් අවසානය අල්ලගන්නවා, ඒත් ඒ වගේ වෙක්ටර් අවසානය නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්ටර් අවසානය (සහ සම ස්පෙක්ටර්ල් ක්ලොස්ටර් එක්ක මෙම වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචනය, වචනය වෙක්ටර් කැමතියෙන් වෙක්ටර් කැමතියෙන් තියෙනවා, සම්බන්ධ ව අපි අලුත් ස්පෙක්ටරල් සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපිත අල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් පෙන්වනවා, ස්වාක්ෂිත අල්ගෝරිතම්, ස්වාක්ෂිත අල්ගෝරිතම්, ඒකෙන් විද්\u200dයාපනයෙන්  අපේ සම්බන්ධ අල්ගෝරිතම් එක්කෙනෙක් විදුලි සහ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් අල්ලගන්න වචන වචන සංකේතයක් නිර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්පෙක්ටරල් විස්තරණය (හැල්කෝ et al., 2011) සහ පරික්ෂා මැට්\u200dරිස් භාවිත කරන්න, අපේ විධානය වේගයෙන් හා  අපි අපේ කණ්ඩායම් විශ්වාස කරනවා මිනිස්සු වචන වචන වගේ විශ්වාසය සඳහා දත්ත සේට් එක්ක භාවිත කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපේ වචන සංවා', 'ta': 'வெக்டர் இடைவெளி குறிப்புகள் வார்த்தைகளின் பலவிதமான வார்த்தைகளைப் பிடித்துக் கொள்ளும், ஆனால் இது போன்ற முறைகள் நெறிய இடைவெளிகளை உருவாக இத்தகைய வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதலை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்புகளுக்கு, வெக்டார் இடைவெளியில் உள்ள சொல்லுகள் புள்ளிகள் உள்ளது, அங்கு ஒத்திசைவுகள் நேர்ம நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட வரைபடத்தின் குறிப்புகளை குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளோம். இது இருக்கும் தேவையில் இருக்கும் வார்த்தைகளின் பி நம்முடைய கையெழுத்து குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பட்டியல் வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்குகிறது அது ஒரே நேரத்தில் பங்கீடு  குறிப்பில்லாத குறிப்பிட்ட காட்சியை பயன்படுத்து (ஹால்கோ மற்றும் அல்., 2011) மற்றும் பொருள்களை குறைக்க, எங்கள் முறைமை வே வார்த்தையின் ஜோடி விதிகள் இருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி செலுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் உணர்வு முன்னோக்கத்திற்கு எங்கள் வ', 'sv': 'Representationer av ord i vektorrymd fångar många aspekter av ordlikhet, men sådana metoder tenderar att producera vektorrum där antonymer (liksom synonymer) är nära varandra. För spektral klustring som använder sådana ordinbäddningar är ord punkter i ett vektorutrymme där synonymer är kopplade till positiva vikter, medan antonymer är kopplade till negativa vikter. Vi presenterar en ny signerad spektralnormaliserad grafklippningsalgoritm, signerad klustring, som överlägger existerande tesauri på distributivt härledda vektorrepresentationer av ord, så att antonymfrelationer mellan ordpar representeras av negativa vikter. Vår signerade klusteralgoritm producerar kluster av ord som samtidigt fångar distributions- och synonymrelationer. Genom att använda randomiserad spektral nedbrytning (Halko et al., 2011) och glesa matriser är vår metod både snabb och skalbar. Vi validerar våra kluster med datauppsättningar som innehåller mänskliga bedömningar av ordparlikheter och visar fördelen med att använda våra ordkluster för sentimentprediktion.', 'so': "Xiliga waxyaabaha ku saabsan hadallada waxaa qabta dhinacyo badan oo isku mid ah, laakiin qaababka oo kale waxaa ka mid ah meelo ay ku dhashaan goobaha wadiiqooyinka (iyo sidoo kale synonyamyada) oo isugu dhow yihiin. Sida uu ku isticmaalo warqadaha ku qoran, hadalka waxaa ku yaala goob vector ah, meesha ay synonimo ku xiran yihiin miisaanka positive, iyadoo ay ku xiran yihiin miisaanka negative. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa xaraf cusub oo lagu saxeeyey qoraal-qorid, oo saxeynaya qoraal, kaas oo saxeraya waxa joogta thesauri si qayb ah u kala geysta wadanka hadalka, si ay u muuqato xiriirka isku xiriirka labada is-dhexeeya miisaanka negative. Algorithiga saxeeya ayaa soo saara culus oo hadal ah oo isku mid ah qabta xiriirka kala qaybsan iyo isku xiriirka. By using randomized spectral decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both fast and scalable.  Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa alaabtayada lagu isticmaalayo taariikhda dadka oo isku mid ah xukummada hadalka noocyada ah, waxaana tusinaynaa faa'iidada isticmaalka alaabta hadalkayaga si loo sii sheego fikrada.", 'ur': 'ویکتوری جگہ کی تعریف کلمات کی بہت سی قسمت کی مثالیں پکڑتی ہیں، لیکن یہ طریقے ویکتوری جگہ پیدا کرتے ہیں جن میں آنٹنیم (اور سینونیم) ایک دوسرے کے قریب ہیں۔ ایسے لفظوں کے مطابق اسپکترال کلاسترینگ کے لئے لفظ ایک ویکتور جگہ میں پوینٹ ہیں جہاں سینونیم مثبت وزن سے متصل ہوتے ہیں، حالانکہ آنٹنونیم منفی وزن سے متصل ہوتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک نئی سیگن سپٹرال عام گراف کاٹ الگوریتم کو پیش کیا ہے، سیگن کلاسٹرینگ، جو مفصل کے ذریعہ موجود سسوری کو کلمات کے معاملات پر پھیلاتا ہے، تاکہ کلمات کے درمیان آنٹنیم رابطے منفی وزن کے ذریعہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں. ہماری تصویر کی کلسٹرینگ الگوریٹم نے کلسٹر کو پیدا کیا ہے جو ایک دفعہ تقسیم اور سینونیم رابطہ کو پکڑتے ہیں۔ نافذ طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر ہم اپنے کلسٹر کو ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق کررہے ہیں جن میں انسان کے جوڑے برابری کا فیصلہ ہے اور ہمارے کلسٹر کا فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں جو ہمارے کلسٹر کو احساس پیش بینی کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Biz yangi qo'llanma qo'llangan grafik algoritni qo'yish uchun imzolangan yangi imkoniyatlarni hozir qilamiz. Bu so ʻzning orasidagi soʻzlar orasidagi vektorning representlarini boshqarish mumkin. Bizning imzolangan algorithiz bir xil so'zlarni bir xil paytda tarqatish va synonym munosabatlarini qabul qiladi. Tasodifiy spektral dekompossiyasi (Halko et al., 2011) va matrikalarni kichiklashtirish orqali, bizning usuli tez va cheksiz. Biz murakkablarimizni bir xil so'zlar bir xil qoidaga qo'llangan maʼlumot setlarimizdan foydalanamiz va o'z so'zlarimizni tasavvur qilish uchun foydalanishimizni tushunamiz.", 'vi': 'Các biểu tượng về không gian Vetor đã ghi được nhiều khía cạnh của nét giống từ, nhưng các phương pháp này có xu hướng sản xuất các khoảng vector (cũng như đồng nghĩa) gần nhau. Đối với tụ tập quang phổ dùng từ này biển nối, từ là điểm trong một khoảng vector, nơi đồng nghĩa với các trọng lượng tích cực, trong khi Anton được kết nối với các trọng lượng âm. Chúng tôi giới thiệu thuật toán cắt đồ thị bình thường đã ký, cụm số đã ký, và nó bao phủ từ điển tồn tại trên các biểu tượng vector của từ được phân phát, để các mối quan hệ này được đại diện bởi các vật thể tiêu cực. Thuật toán gắn kết đã được ký để tạo ra cụm từ có thể đồng thời nắm giữ quan hệ phân phát và đồng nghĩa. Bằng cách dùng phân hủy quang phổ ngẫu nhiên (Halko et al., 20ph) và các tạp phẩm tầm ba, phương pháp của chúng tôi rất nhanh và có khả năng leo số. Chúng tôi xác nhận các tập đoàn của mình sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu chứa đựng phán đoán của con người về các khớp từ và cho thấy lợi ích của việc sử dụng các cụm từ để dự đoán tình cảm.', 'nl': 'Vectorruimterepresentaties van woorden vangen veel aspecten van woordgelijkenis op, maar dergelijke methoden hebben de neiging om vectorruimten te produceren waarin antoniemen (evenals synoniemen) dicht bij elkaar staan. Voor spectrale clustering met behulp van dergelijke woord embeddings, woorden zijn punten in een vectorruimte waar synoniemen worden gekoppeld aan positieve gewichten, terwijl antoniemen worden gekoppeld aan negatieve gewichten. We presenteren een nieuw signed spectral normalized graph cut algoritme, signed clustering, dat bestaande thesauri overlagert op distributieel afgeleide vectorrepresentaties van woorden, zodat antoniem relaties tussen woordparen worden vertegenwoordigd door negatieve gewichten. Ons signed clustering algoritme produceert clusters van woorden die gelijktijdig distributionele en synonieme relaties vastleggen. Door gebruik te maken van gerandomiseerde spectrale decompositie (Halko et al., 2011) en schaalbare matrices, is onze methode zowel snel als schaalbaar. We valideren onze clusters met behulp van datasets die menselijke oordelen bevatten over overeenkomsten tussen woordenparen en tonen het voordeel van het gebruik van onze woordclusters voor sentimentvoorspelling.', 'da': 'Vektorrum repræsentationer af ord fanger mange aspekter af ordlighed, men sådanne metoder har tendens til at producere vektorrum, hvor antonymer (såvel som synonymer) er tæt på hinanden. Ved spektral klyngning ved hjælp af sådanne ordindlejringer er ord punkter i et vektorrum, hvor synonymer er forbundet med positive vægte, mens antonymer er forbundet med negative vægte. Vi præsenterer en ny signeret spektral normaliseret graf cut algoritme, signeret clustering, der overlejrer eksisterende tesauri på distributionsmæssigt afledte vektorrepræsentationer af ord, således at antonym relationer mellem ordpar repræsenteres af negative vægte. Vores signerede klyngelalgoritme producerer klynger af ord, der samtidig fanger distributions- og synonymforbindelser. Ved at bruge randomiseret spektral nedbrydning (Halko et al., 2011) og sparsomme matricer er vores metode både hurtig og skalerbar. Vi validerer vores klynger ved hjælp af datasæt, der indeholder menneskelige vurderinger af ordpar ligheder og viser fordelene ved at bruge vores ordklynger til sentiment forudsigelse.', 'bg': 'Векторните пространствени изображения на думите улавят много аспекти на сходството на думите, но такива методи са склонни да произвеждат векторни пространства, в които антонимите (както и синонимите) са близки един до друг. За спектрално клъстериране, използвайки такива вграждания на думи, думите са точки във векторно пространство, където синонимите са свързани с положителни тегла, докато антонимите са свързани с отрицателни тегла. Представяме нов подписан спектрален нормализиран алгоритъм за рязане на графики, подписан клъстеринг, който покрива съществуващите тезаври върху разпределително извлечени векторни представи на думи, така че антонимните взаимоотношения между думичните двойки да бъдат представени чрез отрицателни тегла. Нашият подписан алгоритъм за клъстериране произвежда клъстери от думи, които едновременно улавят дистрибуционни и синонимни отношения. Използвайки рандомизирано спектрално разлагане (Халко и др., 2011) и редки матрици, методът ни е бърз и мащабируем. Ние валидираме нашите клъстери, използвайки набори от данни, съдържащи човешки преценки за приликите на двойката думи и показваме ползата от използването на нашите клъстери за предсказване на чувства.', 'hr': 'Vektorski prostor predstavljanja riječi uključuju mnoge aspekte sličnosti riječima, ali takve metode tendiraju proizvoditi prostore vektora u kojima su antonimi (kao i sinonimi) blizu jedni drugima. Za spektralno skupljanje koristeći takve riječi, riječi su točke u vektorskom prostoru gdje su sinonimi povezani s pozitivnim težinama, dok su antonimi povezani s negativnim težinama. Predstavljamo novi normalizirani grafički algoritam, potpisan skupljanje, koji prekriva postojeće teorije na predstavljanju izraženih vektora riječi, tako da su antonimske veze između parova riječi zastupane negativnim težinama. Naš potpisani algoritam skupljanja proizvodi skupine riječi koje istovremeno uhvate distribucijske i sinoničke odnose. Koristeći randomizirano spektralno rasključenje (Halko et al., 2011) i rezervne matrice, naša metoda je i brza i mjerljiva. Potvrđujemo naše skupine koristeći podatke koje sadrže ljudske osude o sličnosti riječi par i pokazujemo korist koristiti naše skupine riječi za predviđanje osjećaja.', 'de': 'Vektorraumdarstellungen von Wörtern erfassen viele Aspekte der Wortähnlichkeit, aber solche Methoden neigen dazu, Vektorräume zu produzieren, in denen Antonyme (sowie Synonyme) nahe beieinander liegen. Für die spektrale Clusterung mit solchen Worteinbettungen sind Wörter Punkte in einem Vektorraum, in dem Synonyme mit positiven Gewichten verknüpft sind, während Antonyme mit negativen Gewichten verknüpft sind. Wir präsentieren einen neuen signierten spektral normalisierten Graphenschnittalgorithmus, signierte Clustering, der bestehende Thesauri auf verteilungsgeleitete Vektorrepräsentationen von Wörtern überlagert, so dass Antonymbeziehungen zwischen Wortpaaren durch negative Gewichte dargestellt werden. Unser signierter Clustering-Algorithmus erzeugt Wortcluster, die gleichzeitig Verteilungs- und Synonymbeziehungen erfassen. Durch die Verwendung randomisierter spektraler Dekomposition (Halko et al., 2011) und sparser Matrizen ist unsere Methode sowohl schnell als auch skalierbar. Wir validieren unsere Cluster mit Datensätzen, die menschliche Urteile über Wortpaare Ähnlichkeiten enthalten und zeigen den Nutzen der Verwendung unserer Wortcluster für Sentiment Vorhersage auf.', 'id': 'Perwakilan ruang vektor kata menangkap banyak aspek dari persamaan kata, tetapi metode seperti itu cenderung untuk menghasilkan ruang vektor di mana antonim (serta sinonim) dekat satu sama lain. Untuk berkumpul spektral menggunakan penyembedding kata seperti itu, kata adalah titik dalam ruang vektor dimana sinonim terhubung dengan berat positif, sementara antonim terhubung dengan berat negatif. Kami mempersembahkan algoritma memotong grafik spektral yang baru ditandatangani, menandatangani clustering, yang meliputi tesauri yang ada pada representation vektor dari kata yang didistribusikan secara distribusional, sehingga hubungan antonym antara pasangan kata didistribusikan oleh berat negatif. Algoritma clustering yang ditandatangani kami menghasilkan kumpulan kata yang secara bersamaan menangkap hubungan distribusi dan sinonim. Dengan menggunakan dekomposisi spektral acak (Halko et al., 2011) dan matris langka, metode kita adalah cepat dan skalable. Kami mengkvalifikasi kelompok kami menggunakan dataset yang mengandung penilaian manusia dari persamaan kata pasangan dan menunjukkan keuntungan menggunakan kelompok kata kami untuk prediksi sentimen.', 'ko': '단어의 벡터 공간 표현법은 단어의 유사성을 포착하는 여러 가지 측면이 있지만 이런 방법은 반의어(또는 동의어)가 서로 가까운 벡터 공간을 생성하는 경향이 있다.이런 단어를 사용하여 삽입된 스펙트럼 집합에 대해 단어는 벡터 공간의 점으로 그 중에서 동의어는 정권중과 연결되고 반의어는 음권중과 연결된다.우리는 새로운 기호 스펙트럼 규범화 도면 절단 알고리즘, 즉 기호 집합 알고리즘을 제기했다. 이 알고리즘은 기존의 동의어 표를 단어의 분포 파생 벡터 표시에 덮어씌워 단어와 단어 간의 반의어 관계를 마이너스로 표시한다.우리의 기호 분류 알고리즘은 분포 관계와 동의 관계를 동시에 포획하는 어구를 생성한다.랜덤 스펙트럼 분해(Halko et al., 2011)와 희소 행렬을 사용하여 우리의 방법은 빠르고 확장할 수 있습니다.우리는 인류가 단어에 대한 유사성 판단을 포함하는 데이터 집합을 사용하여 우리의 집합을 검증했고 우리의 집합을 이용하여 감정 예측을 하는 장점을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Miwakilisho ya nafasi ya vector ya maneno yanazungumza mambo mengi yanayofanana na maneno, lakini njia kama hizi huwa zinatengeneza nafasi za vector ambazo onyo (pamoja na synonyesho) ni karibu. Kwa kutangaza vizuri kwa kutumia maneno kama hayo, maneno ni pointi katika nafasi ya vector ambapo synonymous huunganishwa na mizani chanya, wakati ngono zinaungana na mizani hasi. Tunawasilisha picha mpya iliyoandikwa kwa kutumia saini za kawaida, iliyoandika saini, ambayo inazidi kuwepo na thesauri kwa uwakilishi wa vector wa maneno, ili uhusiano wa rangi kati ya wanandoa maneno yanawakilishwa na mizani hasi. Kialgorithi chetu cha saini kinaleta viungo vya maneno ambavyo kwa wakati huo hukamata mahusiano ya usambazaji na ushirikiano. By using randomized spectral decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both fast and scalable.  Tunaweza kuthibitisha viungo vyetu kwa kutumia seti za taarifa zinazohusu maamuzi ya binadamu yanayofanana na maneno mawili na kuonyesha faida ya kutumia viungo vyetu vya maneno kwa kutabiri hisia.', 'tr': 'Bu şekilde vektör alanları, kelimelerin benzerinin birçok parças ını yakarlar ve bu şekilde, antonymlar (ve sinonimler) birbirine yakın noktalar oluşturmaktadır. To Biz yeni imzalanmış bir spektral normalizimli grafik kesim algoritmi ve imzalanmış bir klasteri gösteriyoruz. Bu şekilde, dağıtım alan vektör kelimelerin ifadesine göre, bu şekilde kelime çiftleri arasındaki antonim ilişkisi negatif a ğırlıkla temsil edilir. Biziň imzalanýan klusterilik algoritmus daýlamak we synonym ilişkileri çykarýan sözlerin bir toparyny üretýär. Bitişikli spektral deňleşmeleri (Halko et al., 2011) ve sparse matrices kullanarak, bizim yöntemimiz hem hızlı hem ölçeklenebilir. Toparlarymyzy kiçi söz meňzeşliklerini ýöne adamlaryň vergi sahypalaryny ulanyp barýarys we kellämizi duýgulamak üçin pikirlenýän faydalyny görkez.', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cهای فضای ویکتوری از کلمات بسیاری از نقطه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cی کلمات را می\u200cگیرند، ولی این روش\u200cها به تولید فضای ویکتوری می\u200cکنند که آنتونیمی (همچنین سنونیمی) به همدیگر نزدیک می\u200cشوند. برای گروه\u200cهای مختلف با استفاده از این کلمه\u200cها، کلمه\u200cها نقطه\u200cهایی در فضای ویکتور هستند که سنونیم\u200cها با وزن مثبت ارتباط دارند، در حالی که آنتونیم\u200cها با وزن منفی ارتباط دارند. ما یک الگوریتم بریدن گراف نورمی امضا شده جدید را نشان می دهیم، کلاستر امضا شده، که تزاوری موجود را بر روی نمایش\u200cهای ویکتوری که به طور تقسیم توسط کلمات توسعه می\u200cدهد، پس رابطه\u200cهای آنتونیم بین جفت کلمات با وزن منفی معرفی می\u200cشوند. الگوریتم کلاستر امضا شده ما کلاس کلمه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای را تولید می\u200cکند که همزمان رابطه\u200cهای تقسیم و سنونیم را گرفته می\u200cشود. با استفاده از قطعه\u200cبندی\u200cهای مختلف تصادفی (Halko et al., 2011) و ماتریس\u200cهای خاکستری، روش ما هم سریع و قابل مقیاس است. ما گروه\u200cهایمان را با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها که با قضاوت\u200cهای انسانی شبیه\u200cهای جفت کلمه\u200cها وجود دارند، و سودی از استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهایمان برای پیش\u200cبینی احساسات نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sq': 'Përfaqjet e hapësirës së vektorit të fjalëve kapin shumë aspekte të ngjashmërisë së fjalës, por metodat e tilla kanë tendencë të prodhojnë hapësira vektori në të cilat antonimet (si dhe sinonimet) janë pranë njëri-tjetrit. Për grupimin spektral duke përdorur të tilla fjalë të përfshira, fjalët janë pika në një hapësirë vektori ku sinonimet janë të lidhura me pesha pozitive, ndërsa antonimet janë të lidhura me pesha negative. Ne paraqesim një algoritëm të ri të nënshkruar spektralisht të normalizuar grafik të prerë, të nënshkruar grupim, që mbulon thesaurat ekzistuese mbi përfaqësimet vectore të shprehura nga shpërndarja të fjalëve, në mënyrë që marrëdhëniet antonime midis palëve të fjalëve të përfaqësohen nga pesha negative. Algoritmi ynë i nënshkruar i grupimit prodhon grupe fjalësh që në të njëjtën kohë kapin marrëdhëniet shpërndarëse dhe sinonime. Duke përdorur dekompozimin spektral të rastësizuar (Halko et al., 2011) dhe matricat e vogla, metoda jonë është si e shpejtë dhe e shkallëzueshme. Ne vlerësojmë grupet tona duke përdorur grupe të dhënash që përmbajnë gjykimet njerëzore të ngjashmërive të fjalëve të palëve dhe tregojmë përfitimin e përdorimit të grupeve tona të fjalëve për parashikimin e ndjenjave.', 'af': "Vektorkruimte voorstellings van woorde vang baie aspekte van woord gelykbaarheid, maar sodanige metodes tendeer na produseer vektor spasies waarin antonyms (en synonyms) naby mekaar is. Vir spektrale klastering wat sodanige woord inbêding gebruik word, is woorde punte in 'n vektorruimte waar sinonime gekoppel is met positiewe weegte, terwyl antonime gekoppel is met negatiewe weegte. Ons stel 'n nuwe geskenkte spektrale normaliseerde graaf knip algoritme, geskenkte clustering, wat oorgelê bestaande thesauri op verspreidionale afgeleide vektorvoorstellings van woorde, sodat antonyme verhouding tussen woorde paar verteenwoordig word deur negatiewe weegte. Ons geskende klasteringsalgoritme produseer klosters van woorde wat simultaan verspreidingse en sinonime verhouding opneem. Deur die gebruik van willekeurige spektrale aflossing (Halko et al., 2011) en sparse matrikse, ons metode is beide vinnig en skalbaar. Ons bevestig ons klasters deur datastelle te gebruik wat menslike oordelinge van woord paar gelykenisse bevat en die voordeel van ons woord klasters te gebruik vir sentiment voorskou.", 'bn': 'ভেক্টরের স্পেসের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শব্দের অনেক প্রতিনিধিত্ব তুলে ধরে, কিন্তু এই ধরনের পদ্ধতি ভেক্টরের স্থান তৈরি করে যেখানে অ্যান্টোনিমি এই ধরনের শব্দ ব্যবহার করে স্পেক্ট্রাল ক্লাস্টারিং এর জন্য, একটি ভেক্টরের স্পেসে শব্দগুলো বিন্দুমাত্র যেখানে সিনোনিমিস পটিভ ওজনের সাথ আমরা একটি নতুন স্বাক্ষরিত স্পেক্ট্রাল স্বাভাবিক গ্রাফ কেটে দিচ্ছি, স্বাক্ষর করে স্বাক্ষর করেছি, যা বিতরণের ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বে বিতরণ করা হয়েছে শব্দ জোড়ার আমাদের স্বাক্ষরিত অ্যালগরিদম শব্দের ক্ষেত্র তৈরি করেছে যা একই সাথে বিতরণ এবং সিনোমিম সম্পর্ক গ্রহণ করেছে। নির্দিষ্ট স্পেক্ট্রাল ডিকমোপশন ব্যবহার করে (হ্যালকো এল ২০১১) এবং ম্যাট্রিকেট স্মার্স করে আমাদের পদ্ধতি দ্রুত এবং ক্যালে আমরা আমাদের ক্লাস্টার ব্যবহার করি মানুষের বিচারের মাধ্যমে মানুষের সাথে একই ধরনের শব্দের জোড়া বিচার এবং আমাদের শব্দ ক্লাস্টার', 'az': 'Sözlərin vektör kosmosu ifadəsi sözlərin bənzərinin çoxluğunu alır, amma bu yollar bir-birinə yaxın olan antonimlərin (və sinonimlərin) vektör boşluqlarını ürəkləyir. Bu sözlər içərisində istifadə edən spektral clustering üçün sözlər vektor alanında nöqtələrdir ki, sinonimlər pozitif a ğırlarlarla bağlanır, antonimlər negatif ağırlarla bağlanır. Biz yeni imzalanmış spektral normalizmiş graflı kesilmiş algoritmi göstəririk, imzalanmış clustering, ki, dağılış olaraq yazılmış vektör ifadəsi sözlərin üstündə esorlar, böylece sözlərin çift arasındakı antonim ilişkisi negatif a ğırları ilə göstərilir. Bizim imzalanmış clustering algoritmi bir-birinə dağıtış və sinonim ilişkilerini tutan sözlərin koplarını ürəkləyir. Xüsusiyyətli spektral parçalanması (Halko et al., 2011) və parçalanmış matriklərdən istifadə edərək, metodumuz da hızlı və ölçülüdir. Biz qonaqlarımızı, insanların cüt sözlərin məsələləri ilə verilən verilən qurğuları ilə təsdiqləyirik və sözlərimizi hiss etmək üçün istifadə etmək faydasını göstəririk.', 'am': 'የቦታ ቦታ ምሳሌ ቃላት ብዙዎችን የቃላትን ምሳሌ ይያዛሉ፤ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ሥርዓቶች የvector ቦታዎች (እና Synonyms) እርስ በርሳቸው ይቀራሉ። እንደነዚህ ቃላት አካባቢ በመጠቀም በተቃራኒ ጉዳይ ላይ እና ቃላት በዋይትር ቦታ ውስጥ ሲኖኒም በአካባቢ ሚዛን ጋር ተያያያይቷል፡፡ አዲስ የተጻፈ የተደብቀው ቀለም መቆራረጥ አሌጎርቲም እናቀርባለን፣ የተገኘውን የቴሶሪ የቃላት መልዕክቶች በተለየ እና የንግግር ግንኙነት በአካባቢ ሚዛን ይታያል፡፡ የጻፈው መፍታት አሌጎርቲም በተጨማሪና የግንኙነት እና የሲኒኒም ግንኙነት የቃላትን መንቀሳቅስ ያወጣል፡፡ በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ (Halko et al., 2011) እና ማድረጊያውን በመጠቀም፣ የፍጥረት ማድረግ ፍጥረታችን ፍጥረት እና መጠቀሚያ ነው፡፡ የቃላችን ጉዳዮች እና የደብዳቤዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի վեկտորային տիեզերական ներկայացումները ներկայացնում են բառի նմանության բազմաթիվ ասպեկտներ, բայց նման մեթոդներ հակված են ստեղծել վեկտորային տարածքներ, որոնց մեջ անտոնիմները (ինչպես նաև սինոնիմները) միմյանց մոտ են: Սպեկտրալ խմբավորումների համար, օգտագործելով այս բառերը, բառերը վեկտորի տարածքում են, որտեղ սինոնիմները կապված են դրական կշիռների հետ, մինչդեռ անտոնիմները կապված են բացասական կշիռների հետ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր ստորագրված սպեկտրալ նորմալ գծագրի կտրելու ալգորիթմ, ստորագրված խմբավորում, որը ծածկում է գոյություն ունեցող թեզավրերը բառերի բաժանման կողմից ստացված վեկտորների ներկայացումների վրա, այնպես որ բառերի զույգերի միջև անտոնիմային հար Մեր ստորագրված խմբավորումների ալգորիթմը ստեղծում է բառերի խմբավորումներ, որոնք միաժամանակ ներառում են բաշխման և սինոնիմային հարաբերությունները: By using randomized spectral decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both fast and scalable.  Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր խմբերը օգտագործելով տվյալների համակարգեր, որոնք պարունակում են մարդկային դատողություններ բառերի զույգ նմանությունների մասին և ցույց են տալիս մեր խմբերի օգտագործման առավելությունը զգացմունքների կանխատեսման համար:', 'et': 'Sõnade vektoriruumi kujutised hõlmavad sõnade sarnasuse paljusid aspekte, kuid sellised meetodid kipuvad tootma vektoriruume, kus antonüümid (samuti sünonüümid) on üksteisele lähedased. Selliste sõnade põimimist kasutavate spektraalsete klastrite puhul on sõnad vektoriruumi punktid, kus sünonüümid on seotud positiivse kaaluga, antonüümid aga negatiivse kaaluga. Esitleme uut signeeritud spektraalset normaliseeritud graafiliseeritud lõikealgoritmi, signeeritud klastrite, mis katab olemasolevad tesaurud sõnade jaotuslikult tuletatud vektorikujutustele, nii et antonüümseid seoseid sõnavaaride vahel esindatakse negatiivsete kaaludega. Meie allkirjastatud klastrite algoritm toodab sõnade klastrid, mis samaaegselt kajastavad distributsiooni- ja sünonüümseid suhteid. Kasutades randomiseeritud spektraalset lagunemist (Halko et al., 2011) ja hõredaid maatrikse, on meie meetod nii kiire kui ka skaleeritav. Valideerime oma klastrid, kasutades andmekogumeid, mis sisaldavad inimlikke hinnanguid sõnapaaride sarnasuste kohta, ning näitame, kui kasulik on meie sõnaklastrite kasutamine tundete ennustamiseks.', 'ca': 'Les representacions espacials dels vectors de paraules capturen molts aspectes de la similitud de paraules, però aquests mètodes tendeixen a produir espais de vectors en els quals els antònims (com també els sinònims) estan propers els uns als altres. Per a agrupar espectrals fent servir aquestes integracions de paraules, les paraules són punts en un espai vector on els sinonims estan vinculats amb pes positius, mentre que els antonims estan vinculats amb pes negatius. Presentam un nou algoritme de tall de gràfic normalitzat espectral signat, agrupament signat, que sobreposta els tesauris existents sobre representacions vectorals derivades distribucionalment de paraules, de manera que les relacions antònims entre parelles de paraules siguin representades per pesos negatius. El nostre algoritme de agrupament signat produeix agrupaments de paraules que capturen simultàniament les relacions distribucionals i sinònims. Utilitzant descomposició espectral aleatoritzada (Halko et al., 2011) i matrius escases, el nostre mètode és ràpid i escalable. We validate our clusters using datasets containing human judgments of word pair similarities and show the benefit of using our word clusters for sentiment prediction.', 'bs': 'Vektorski prostor predstavljanja riječi uhvaćaju mnoge aspekte sličnosti riječi, ali takve metode tendiraju da proizvode prostore vektora u kojima su antonimi (kao i sinonimi) blizu jedno drugom. Za spektralno skupljanje koristeći takve riječi, riječi su točke u vektorskom prostoru gdje su sinonimi povezani sa pozitivnim težinama, dok su antonimi povezani sa negativnim težinama. Predstavljamo novi normalizirani algoritam presjecanja grafika, potpisan skustering, koji predstavlja postojeće teorije na predstavljanju izraženih vektora riječi, tako da su antonimske veze između parova riječi predstavljene negativnim težinama. Naš potpisani algoritam skupljanja proizvodi skupine riječi koje istovremeno uhvate distribucijske i sinonimske odnose. Koristeći randomizovane spektralne rasporede (Halko et al., 2011) i rezervne matrice, naša metoda je i brza i mjerljiva. Potvrđujemo naše skupine koristeći podatke koje sadrže ljudske osude o sličnostima riječi par i pokazujemo korist koristi naše skupine riječi za predviđanje osjećaja.', 'cs': 'Vektorové prostorové reprezentace slov zachycují mnoho aspektů slovní podobnosti, ale tyto metody mají tendenci vytvářet vektorové prostory, ve kterých antonyma (stejně jako synonyma) jsou blízko sobě. Pro spektrální shlukování používající takové vložení slov jsou slova body ve vektorovém prostoru, kde jsou synonyma spojena s kladnými váhami, zatímco antonyma jsou spojena se zápornými váhami. Představujeme nový signovaný spektrálně normalizovaný algoritmus grafového řezu, signované shlukování, který překrývá existující tezaury na distribučně odvozené vektorové reprezentace slov, takže antonymové vztahy mezi slovními páry jsou reprezentovány zápornými váhami. Náš algoritmus podepsaného shlukování vytváří shluky slov, které současně zachycují distribuční a synonymní vztahy. Použitím randomizované spektrální dekompozice (Halko et al., 2011) a řídkých matic je naše metoda rychlá a škálovatelná. Ověřujeme naše clustery pomocí datových sad obsahujících lidské hodnocení podobností slovních párů a ukazujeme výhody použití našich slovních clusterů pro predikci sentimentu.', 'fi': 'Sanan vektoriavaruusesitykset kuvaavat monia sanasamankaltaisuuden näkökohtia, mutta tällaiset menetelmät tuottavat vektoriavaruuksia, joissa antonyymit (sekä synonyymit) ovat lähellä toisiaan. Tällaisia sanaupotuksia käyttävässä spektriklusterissa sanat ovat vektoriavaruuden kohtia, joissa synonyymit linkitetään positiivisiin painoihin, kun taas antonyymit linkitetään negatiivisiin painoihin. Esittelemme uuden signeeratun spektrin normalisoidun graafileikkauksen algoritmin, signeeratun klusteroinnin, joka peittää olemassa olevat sanakirjat hajautetusti johdetuille vektoriesityksille siten, että sanaparien antonymisuhteet esitetään negatiivisilla painoilla. Allekirjoitettu klusterointialgoritmimme tuottaa sanaklustereita, jotka samanaikaisesti kuvaavat jakelu- ja synonyymisuhteita. Menetelmämme on nopea ja skaalautuva käyttämällä satunnaistettua spektristä hajoamista (Halko et al., 2011) ja harvoja matriiseja. Validoimme klusterimme käyttäen datakokonaisuuksia, jotka sisältävät ihmisten käsityksiä sanaparin samankaltaisuuksista, ja osoitamme, miten hyödyllistä on käyttää sanaklustereita tunteiden ennustamiseen.', 'sk': 'Vektorske prostorske predstavitve besed zajemajo številne vidike podobnosti besed, vendar takšne metode ponavadi ustvarjajo vektorske prostore, v katerih so antonimi (kot tudi sinonimi) blizu drugega. Pri spektralnem združevanju z uporabo takšnih vgradnj besed so besede točke v vektorskem prostoru, kjer so sinonimi povezani s pozitivnimi utežmi, antonimi pa povezani z negativnimi utežmi. Predstavljamo nov podpisani spektralni normalizirani grafski rezalni algoritem, podpisano grozdje, ki prekriva obstoječe tesavre na distribucijsko izpeljane vektorske reprezentacije besed, tako da so antonimske relacije med besednimi pari predstavljene z negativnimi utežmi. Naš podpisani algoritem grozdenja proizvaja grozde besed, ki hkrati zajemajo distribucijske in sinonimske relacije. Z uporabo randomizirane spektralne razgradnje (Halko et al., 2011) in redkih matric je naša metoda hitra in razširljiva. Naše grozde preverjamo z nabori podatkov, ki vsebujejo človeške presoje o podobnostih besednih parov, in kažemo korist uporabe naših besednih grozdov za napovedovanje čustev.', 'jv': 'hakanyingi clustering Kernel Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk kelompok saiki nggawe kelompok tarjamahan karo perusahaan winih Ngawe Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 챕ntukno sistem dadi sing beraksi perbudhakan karo perbudhakan langkung it챕pakan', 'ha': "Filinaikin masu motsi na hanya na kãma wasu aspecti na maganar da ke daidaita, kuma amma misãlan hanyõyi na zaɓe filayenaiki da za'a sami sauya masu tsakanin matsayi (da sami sunoniyom) da sunonium. @ info: whatsthis Tuna gabatar da wani yanzu wanda aka sayar a karatun algoritm wanda aka yi wa daidai a cikin littafin da aka ƙayyade shi, yana ƙara ƙararrar da wanda ke iya gabatar da shi, idan an samar da shiryuwar masu gauraya da bambanci, don haka kuma danganta da danganiya a tsakanin nau'i biyu na magana za'a nuna da nau'i negative. AlgorityinMu da aka sajiyar ta, yana fitar da matsayi da ke samu da danganta da sami'a. @ info: whatsthis Tuna gaskata mataimakanmu da amfani da dataset wanda ke ƙunsa da hukuncin mutane biyu masu daidaita kuma ke nuna amfani da amfani da ya yi amfani da samun ayukanmu zuwa birnin hisãbi.", 'he': 'מיצוגי חלל וקטורים של מילים שולטים בהרבה היבטים של דומות מילים, אך שיטות כאלה נוטות לייצר חללים וקטורים שבהם אנטונימים (כמו גם סינונימים) קרובים אחד לשני. למערכת ספקטרלית בשימוש במילים כאלה, המילים הן נקודות בחלל ווקטור שבו סינונימים מקושרים עם משקלים חיוביים, בעוד אנטונימים מקושרים עם משקלים שליליים. אנחנו מציגים אלגוריתם נחתוך בגרף נורמלי חדש חתום על ספקטרל, מחסום חתום, שמעטף את התזאורים קיימים על מיצוגי ווקטורים משובחים במחלקה, כך שייחסים אנטונימיים בין זוגות מילים מייצגים על ידי משקלים שליליים. אלגוריתם הקבוצה החתום שלנו מייצר קבוצות מילים שבאותו הזמן לכלוא יחסי פיצוח וסינונים. על ידי השימוש בתפרצות ספקטרלית אקראיות (Halko et al., 2011) ומטריצות נפרדות, השיטה שלנו היא גם מהירה וגם אפשרית למדרגות. אנו מאשרים את הקלאסטרים שלנו באמצעות קבוצות נתונים שמכילים שיפוטים אנושיים של דומות של זוג מילים ולהראות את היתרון של השימוש בקלאסטרים המילים שלנו לחזות רגשות.', 'bo': 'Vector space representations of words capture many aspects of word similarity, but such methods tend to produce vector spaces in which antonyms (as well as synonyms) are close to each other. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་དག་ཚགས་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུད་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲངས་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སུ་རྒྱུན་གྱིས་བཀོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་པ་ཞིག་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་བྱུང་། ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གིས་དེ་ཚོ་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གནད་དོན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་དག་ randomized spectral decomposition (Halko et al., 2011) and sparse matrices, our method is both fast and scalable. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་འཛིན་འདུག་གྱིས་མི་རྣམས་ལས་མི་རྣམས་ལས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་རྩོམ་མཁན་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་རྩོམ་མཁན་ཚ'}
{'en': 'An Interpretable Knowledge Transfer Model for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ar': 'نموذج نقل المعرفة القابل للتفسير لإكمال قاعدة المعرفة', 'pt': 'Um modelo de transferência de conhecimento interpretável para conclusão da base de conhecimento', 'es': 'Un modelo de transferencia de conocimientos interpretable para completar la base de conocimientos', 'fr': 'Un modèle de transfert de connaissances interprétable pour compléter la base de connaissances', 'ja': 'ナレッジベース完了のための解釈可能なナレッジ転送モデル', 'zh': '所以知识库成者,说移模形', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस पूर्णता के लिए एक व्याख्यात्मक ज्ञान स्थानांतरण मॉडल', 'ru': 'Интерпретируемая модель передачи знаний для завершения работы над базой знаний', 'ga': 'Samhail Aistrithe Faisnéise Inmhínithe chun Bonn Eolais a Chríochnú', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egy értelmezhető tudásátadási modell a tudásbázis befejezéséhez', 'it': 'Un modello di trasferimento di conoscenze interpretabile per il completamento della Knowledge Base', 'kk': 'Білім негізінің толтыру үшін білім беру үлгісі', 'el': 'Ένα ερμηνευτό μοντέλο μεταφοράς γνώσης για την ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσης', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനം പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുന്നതിനായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന അറിവുകള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь дуусгах боломжтой мэдлэг дамжуулах загвар', 'mt': 'An Interpretable Knowledge Transfer Model for Knowledge Base Completion', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Interpretowalny model transferu wiedzy dla uzupełniania bazy wiedzy', 'sr': 'Model prijenosa znanja za kompletnu bazu znanja', 'ro': 'Un model de transfer de cunoștințe interpretabil pentru finalizarea bazei de cunoștințe', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha wareejinta aqoonta ee buuxinta aasaasiga aqoonta', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En tolkningsbar kunskapsĂ¶verfĂ¶ringsmodell fĂ¶r slutfĂ¶rande av kunskapsbasen', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை முடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு பொருள் மாற்றும் அறிவு மாற்றும் முறைமை', 'ur': 'Name', 'lt': 'Išaiškinamojo žinių perdavimo modelis, skirtas žinių bazės užbaigimui', 'mk': 'Модел за пренесување на знаење за комплетирање на базата на знаење', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình truyền thức bí mật để hoàn thành Kiến thức.', 'da': 'En fortolkbar vidensoverførselsmodel til færdiggørelse af videnbasen', 'bg': 'Модел за интерпретиране на трансфер на знания за завършване на базата от знания', 'nl': 'Een interpreteerbaar kennisoverdrachtsmodel voor de voltooiing van de kennisbank', 'de': 'Ein interpretierbares Wissenstransfer-Modell zur Vervollständigung der Wissensdatenbank', 'hr': 'Model prijenosa znanja za kompletnu bazu znanja', 'id': 'An Interpretable Knowledge Transfer Model for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리에 대한 해석 가능한 지식 이동 모델', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Uhamiaji wa Sayansi inayotafsiriwa kwa Kutimiza Ujuzi', 'sq': 'Një model i përkthyeshëm i transferimit të njohurive për kompletimin e bazës së njohurive', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Bilim གཞ i Tamamlandyrmak üçin arkalanýan Bilgi Taýaşmalyk Modeli', 'az': 'Bilim Basi Tamamlama üçün İnterpretilə Bilim Transfer Modeli', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'bs': 'Model prijenosa znanja za kompletnu bazu znanja', 'hy': 'Comment', 'et': 'Tõlgendatav teadmussiirde mudel teadmisbaasi lõpetamiseks', 'fi': 'Tulkittava tietämyksen siirtomalli tietokannan täydentämiseksi', 'bn': 'An Interpretable Knowledge Transfer Model for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ca': 'Un model de transferència de coneixements interpretable per a completar la base de coneixements', 'cs': 'Interpretovatelný model přenosu znalostí pro dokončení znalostní báze', 'jv': 'Tampilan Njutahan Kerensi Ngubah', 'he': 'מודל העברת ידע ניתן להפריץ לשימוש בסיס ידע', 'bo': 'Interpretable Knowledge Transfer Model for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Razlagljiv model prenosa znanja za dokončanje zbirke znanja'}
{'en': 'Knowledge bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incompleteness. We propose a novel embedding model, ITransF, to perform knowledge base completion. Equipped with a sparse attention mechanism, ITransF discovers hidden concepts of relations and transfer statistical strength through the sharing of concepts. Moreover, the learned associations between relations and concepts, which are represented by sparse attention vectors, can be interpreted easily. We evaluate ITransF on two benchmark datasetsWN18 and FB15k for knowledge base completion and obtains improvements on both the mean rank and Hits@10 metrics, over all baselines that do not use additional information.', 'ar': 'قواعد المعرفة هي موارد مهمة لمجموعة متنوعة من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ولكنها تعاني من عدم الاكتمال. نقترح نموذج تضمين جديد ، ITransF ، لإكمال قاعدة المعرفة. مزودًا بآلية انتباه متفرقة ، يكتشف ITransF المفاهيم الخفية للعلاقات وينقل القوة الإحصائية من خلال مشاركة المفاهيم. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكن تفسير الارتباطات المكتسبة بين العلاقات والمفاهيم ، والتي يتم تمثيلها من خلال نواقل الانتباه المتفرقة ، بسهولة. نقوم بتقييم ITransF على مجموعتي بيانات معياريتين - WN18 و FB15k لإكمال قاعدة المعرفة والحصول على تحسينات على كل من متوسط الترتيب ومقاييس الفعالية @ 10 ، عبر جميع خطوط الأساس التي لا تستخدم معلومات إضافية.', 'pt': 'As bases de conhecimento são recursos importantes para uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, mas sofrem de incompletude. Propomos um novo modelo de incorporação, ITransF, para completar a base de conhecimento. Equipado com um mecanismo de atenção esparsa, o ITransF descobre conceitos ocultos de relações e transfere força estatística por meio do compartilhamento de conceitos. Além disso, as associações aprendidas entre relações e conceitos, que são representados por vetores de atenção esparsos, podem ser interpretadas facilmente. Avaliamos o ITransF em dois conjuntos de dados de referência - WN18 e FB15k para conclusão da base de conhecimento e obtemos melhorias nas métricas de classificação média e Hits@10, em todas as linhas de base que não usam informações adicionais.', 'fr': "Les bases de connaissances sont des ressources importantes pour diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel, mais elles sont parfois incomplètes. Nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'intégration, iTransf, pour compléter la base de connaissances. Doté d'un mécanisme d'attention clairsemée, iTransf découvre des concepts cachés de relations et transfère la force statistique par le partage de concepts. De plus, les associations apprises entre les relations et les concepts, qui sont représentées par des vecteurs d'attention clairsemés, peuvent être interprétées facilement. Nous évaluons iTransf sur deux ensembles de données de référence\xa0: WN18 et FB15k pour l'achèvement de la base de connaissances et obtenons des améliorations à la fois sur le classement moyen et les métriques Hits @10, sur toutes les lignes de base qui n'utilisent pas d'informations supplémentaires.", 'es': 'Las bases de conocimiento son recursos importantes para una variedad de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, pero no están completas. Proponemos un modelo de incrustación novedoso, iTransf, para completar la base de conocimientos. Equipado con un mecanismo de atención escaso, iTransf descubre conceptos ocultos de relaciones y transfiere la fuerza estadística mediante el intercambio de conceptos. Además, las asociaciones aprendidas entre relaciones y conceptos, que están representados por escasos vectores de atención, se pueden interpretar fácilmente. Evaluamos iTransF en dos conjuntos de datos de referencia: WN18 y FB15k para completar la base de conocimientos y obtenemos mejoras en las métricas de clasificación media y Hits @10, en todas las líneas de base que no utilizan información adicional.', 'ja': '知識ベースは、さまざまな自然言語処理タスクにとって重要なリソースですが、不完全性に苦しんでいます。知識ベースの完了を実行するための新しい埋め込みモデルITransFを提案します。まばらな注意メカニズムを備えたITransFは、関係の隠れた概念を発見し、概念の共有を通じて統計的強度を伝達します。さらに、まばらな注意ベクトルによって表される関係と概念との間の学習された関連性は、容易に解釈することができる。ITransFを2つのベンチマークデータセット- WN 18およびFB 15 kで評価して、ナレッジベースの完了を確認し、追加情報を使用しないすべてのベースラインにわたって、平均ランクとヒット@ 10の両方の指標の改善を取得します。', 'zh': '知识库者,百自然语言之大资也,而存乎不全者也。 新颖嵌模ITransF以行知识库成。 ITransF备疏机,以见其隐。 习得者(疏者向量)易解也。 臣等于两准集(WN18 FB15k)上评估 ITransF,以成知识库,并于所有不用他信息者基线上得均排名Hits@10指标改进。', 'hi': 'ज्ञान के आधार प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों की एक किस्म के लिए महत्वपूर्ण संसाधन हैं, लेकिन अपूर्णता से पीड़ित हैं। हम ज्ञान आधार पूरा करने के लिए एक उपन्यास एम्बेडिंग मॉडल, ITransF का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक विरल ध्यान तंत्र से सुसज्जित, ITransF संबंधों की छिपी हुई अवधारणाओं की खोज करता है और अवधारणाओं को साझा करने के माध्यम से सांख्यिकीय शक्ति को स्थानांतरित करता है। इसके अलावा, संबंधों और अवधारणाओं के बीच सीखा संघों, जो विरल ध्यान वैक्टर द्वारा प्रतिनिधित्व किया जाता है, को आसानी से व्याख्या की जा सकती है। हम नॉलेज बेस पूरा होने के लिए दो बेंचमार्क डेटासेट-WN18 और FB15k पर ITransF का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और अतिरिक्त जानकारी का उपयोग नहीं करने वाले सभी बेसलाइन पर माध्य रैंक और Hits@10 मीट्रिक दोनों पर सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Базы знаний являются важными ресурсами для различных задач по обработке естественного языка, но страдают от неполноты. Мы предлагаем новую модель встраивания, ITransF, для завершения базы знаний. Оснащенный редким механизмом внимания, ITransF обнаруживает скрытые концепции отношений и передает статистическую силу через обмен концепциями. Более того, усвоенные ассоциации между отношениями и понятиями, которые представлены редкими векторами внимания, могут быть легко интерпретированы. Мы оцениваем ITransF на двух эталонных наборах данных-WN18 и FB15k для завершения базы знаний и получаем улучшения как по среднему рангу, так и по показателям Hits@10, по всем базовым линиям, которые не используют дополнительную информацию.', 'ga': 'Is acmhainní tábhachtacha iad boinn eolais le haghaidh éagsúlacht tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha ach bíonn siad neamhiomlán. Molaimid samhail leabú nua, ITransF, chun an bonn eolais a chur i gcrích. Atá feistithe le meicníocht aird gann, aimsíonn ITransF coincheapa ceilte caidrimh agus aistríonn neart staidrimh trí choincheapa a roinnt. Ina theannta sin, is féidir na gaolmhaireachtaí foghlamtha idir an caidreamh agus na coincheapa, atá léirithe ag veicteoirí gann aird, a léirmhíniú go héasca. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar ITransF ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc - WN18 agus FB15k chun bonn eolais a chur i gcrích agus faightear feabhsuithe ar an gcéim mheánach agus ar mhéadracht Hits@10, thar gach bonnlíne nach n-úsáideann faisnéis bhreise.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების ბაზები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი რესურსები, რამდენიმე სახელსახულო ენის პროცესი დავალებებისთვის, მაგრამ უფრო დასრულებულია. ჩვენ პრომენტის შემდეგ მოდელი, ITransF, გავაკეთებთ მეცნიერების დასრულება. ITransF აღმოჩნდა შესახებ შესახებ შესახებ შესახებ და სტატისტიკალური ძალის გადატანქმება კონფექტების შესახებ. დამატებით, სწავლილი შესახებ შესახებ შესაძლებელია, რომლებიც შესახებ დაახლოების გვექტორებით გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ ITransF-ს ორი ბანქმერის მონაცემების დასრულება WN18 და FB15k-ზე გავუმუშავებთ და მივიღებთ საშუალო რეგის და საშუალო რეგის დასრულება. Hits@10 მეტრიკები, ყველა ფესური ხაზები, რომელიც არ გამოყენებს დამატებული ინფორმაცია.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázisok fontos erőforrások számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladathoz, de hiányosságban szenvednek. Egy új beágyazási modellt, az ITransF-et javasoljuk a tudásbázis teljesítéséhez. A ritka figyelemmechanizmussal felszerelt ITransF a kapcsolatok rejtett koncepcióit fedezi fel, és a koncepciók megosztásán keresztül átadja a statisztikai erőt. Ezen túlmenően könnyen értelmezhetők a kapcsolatok és fogalmak közötti tanult összefüggések, amelyeket ritka figyelemvektorok képviselnek. Az ITransF-et két referenciaadatkészleten értékeljük – WN18 és FB15k – a tudásbázis teljesítése érdekében, és javulást érünk el mind az átlagos rang, mind pedig az FB15k Hits@10 az összes olyan alapvető vonalon, amelyek nem használnak további információkat.', 'el': 'Οι βάσεις γνώσεων είναι σημαντικοί πόροι για μια ποικιλία εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, αλλά υποφέρουν από ελλιπότητα. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης, για την εκτέλεση ολοκλήρωσης της βάσης γνώσης. Εξοπλισμένο με έναν μηχανισμό περιορισμένης προσοχής, ανακαλύπτει κρυφές έννοιες σχέσεων και μεταφέρει στατιστική δύναμη μέσω της κοινής χρήσης εννοιών. Επιπλέον, οι μαθημένες συσχετίσεις μεταξύ σχέσεων και εννοιών, οι οποίες αντιπροσωπεύονται από αραίους φορείς προσοχής, μπορούν να ερμηνευθούν εύκολα. Αξιολογούμε το ITransF σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς-WN18 και FB15k για την ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσεων και επιτυγχάνουμε βελτιώσεις τόσο στον μέσο βαθμό όσο και στον μέσο βαθμό. Hits@10 μετρήσεις, σε όλες τις γραμμές βάσης που δεν χρησιμοποιούν πρόσθετες πληροφορίες.', 'kk': 'Білім негізінде табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларының көптеген маңызды ресурстар болады, бірақ толық болмайды. Біз романды ендіру үлгісін, ITransF, білім негізін толтыру үшін таңдаймыз. ITransF қатынастарды жасырып, статистикалық күшін концепцияларды ортақтастыру арқылы табылады. Сонымен қатар, қатынастар мен концепциялардың арасындағы үйренген қатынастар, бұл қатынастар белсендірілген векторлар, оңай түсіндіре алады. Біз ITransF дегенді білім негізінің толтыру үшін екі бағдарламалық деректер қорларына - WN18 және FB15k бағдарламасына оқу және орташа жолдарда да жақсарту үшін Hits@10 Қосымша мәліметтерді қолданбаған барлық негізгі жолдардың метрикалары.', 'lt': 'Knowledge bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incompleteness.  Mes siūlome naują įtraukimo model į, ITransF, siekiant užbaigti žinių bazę. Įdiegtas nedidelio dėmesio mechanizmas, ITransF atskleidžia paslėptas santykių koncepcijas ir perduoda statistinį stiprumą pasidalijant koncepcijomis. Be to, lengvai galima aiškinti sužinotas santykių ir koncepcijų sąsajas, kurioms atstovauja nedaug dėmesio skiriantys veiksniai. Įvertiname ITransF pagal du lyginamuosius duomenų rinkinius – WN18 ir FB15k, kad būtų galima užbaigti žinių bazę, ir siekiame gerinti tiek vidutinį lygią, tiek Hits@10 - metrijos visose bazinėse linijose, kuriose papildomos informacijos nenaudojama.', 'it': 'Le basi di conoscenza sono risorse importanti per una varietà di compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, ma soffrono di incompletezza. Proponiamo un nuovo modello di incorporazione, ITransF, per eseguire il completamento della base di conoscenza. Dotato di un meccanismo di attenzione sparso, ITransF scopre concetti nascosti di relazioni e trasferisce forza statistica attraverso la condivisione di concetti. Inoltre, le associazioni apprese tra relazioni e concetti, rappresentate da scarsi vettori di attenzione, possono essere interpretate facilmente. Valutiamo ITransF su due set di dati benchmark-WN18 e FB15k per il completamento della base di conoscenza e otteniamo miglioramenti sia sul rank medio che su Hits@10 metriche, su tutte le linee di riferimento che non utilizzano informazioni aggiuntive.', 'mk': 'Базите на знаење се важни ресурси за различни природни задачи за обработување јазик, но страдаат од нецелосност. Предложуваме нов модел за вградување, ИТрансФ, за да изврши комплетирање на базата на знаење. Опремени со мал механизам на внимание, ИТрансФ открива скриени концепти на односи и трансферира статистичка сила преку споделување на концепти. Покрај тоа, научените здруженија помеѓу односите и концептите, кои се претставени од мали вектори на внимание, може лесно да се толкуваат. Ние го оценуваме ИТрансФ на два набора на податоци за референционално значење - WN18 и FB15k за комплетирање на базата на знаење и добиваме подобрувања на средниот ранг и Hits@10 Метрика, на сите основни линии кои не користат дополнителни информации.', 'ms': 'Pangkalan pengetahuan adalah sumber penting untuk pelbagai tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam tetapi menderita dari ketidaklengkap. Kami cadangkan model penyembedding baru, ITransF, untuk melaksanakan penyelesaian pangkalan pengetahuan. Dipersediakan dengan mekanisme perhatian yang sedikit, ITransF menemui konsep tersembunyi hubungan dan pemindahan kuasa statistik melalui perkongsian konsep. Selain itu, persatuan belajar antara hubungan dan konsep, yang diwakili oleh vektor perhatian sedikit, boleh diterjemahkan dengan mudah. Kami menilai ITransF pada dua set data benchmark-WN18 dan FB15k untuk penyelesaian pangkalan pengetahuan dan mendapat peningkatan pada kedua-dua tingkat rata dan Hits@10 metrik, atas semua garis dasar yang tidak menggunakan maklumat tambahan.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വി അറിവുള്ള ബേസ് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d എപ്പോഡിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. സ്പെയിസ് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെക്കനിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നിന്നും എടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ഐട്രാന്\u200dസ് എഫ് പരിശോധനങ്ങളുടെ ഒളിഞ്ഞുവെച് അതുകൊണ്ടും, കുറച്ചു ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങളും ആശയങ്ങളും തമ്മിലുള്ള പഠി രണ്ട് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഐട്രാന്\u200dസ് എഫ് വിലയിക്കുന്നു. ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ബേസ് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനും മ Hits@10 കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത എല്ലാ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലും മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d.', 'pl': 'Bazy wiedzy są ważnymi zasobami dla różnych zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego, ale cierpią z powodu niekompletności. Proponujemy nowy model osadzenia ITransF, który pozwala na uzupełnienie bazy wiedzy. Wyposażony w rzadki mechanizm uwagi, ITransF odkrywa ukryte koncepcje relacji i przekazuje siłę statystyczną poprzez dzielenie się pojęciami. Ponadto nauczone skojarzenia pomiędzy relacjami i pojęciami, które są reprezentowane przez rzadkie wektory uwagi, można łatwo interpretować. Oceniamy ITransF na dwóch zestawach danych referencyjnych-WN18 i FB15k pod kątem uzupełnienia bazy wiedzy i uzyskujemy ulepszenia zarówno w zakresie średniego rankingu, jak i Hits@10 wskaźniki, na wszystkich liniach bazowych, które nie wykorzystują dodatkowych informacji.', 'no': 'Kvitningsbaser er viktige ressursar for ein del av naturspråk-handsamar, men køyrer frå ubefullstendighet. Vi foreslår eit nytt innbyggingsmodell, ITransF, for å utføra kunnskapsbasefullføring. Eksempelt med ein sparse oppmerksmekanisme, oppdagar ITransF gøymde konseptar for relasjonar og overfører statistiske kraft gjennom deling av konseptar. I tillegg kan dei lærte tilknytingane mellom relasjonar og konseptar, som er representert av spare oppmerksvektorar, tolkast lett. Vi evaluerer ITransF på to benchmarkdatasett-WN18 og FB15k for kunnskapsbasefullføring og får forbedringar på både gjennomsnittet og Hits@10 metrikn over alle grunnlinjer som ikkje brukar ekstra informasjon.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагаанд чухал нөөц боломжтой, гэхдээ бүтэлгүйтгүй байдаг. Бид мэдлэг суурь дуусахын тулд шинэ зохиолын загвар, ITransF гэх мэт санал өгдөг. ИТрансF нь харилцааны нуугдмал ойлголтыг олж, статистикийн хүчийг ойлголтын хуваалцах аргаар шилжүүлдэг. Мөн сурсан харилцаа болон ойлголтын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байгууллагууд нь бага анхаарлын векторууд илэрхийлэгддэг байдаг. Бид ITransF-г мэдлэгтэй суурь дуусахын тулд WN18 болон FB15k өгөгдлийн сангийн хоёр бага зэрэг үнэлдэг ба дундаж хэмжээ болон Hits@10 нэмэлт мэдээллийг ашиглахгүй бүх суурь шугам дээр метрик.', 'mt': 'Il-bażijiet tal-għarfien huma riżorsi importanti għal varjetà ta’ kompiti naturali ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi iżda jbatu minn nuqqas ta’ kompletezza. Aħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ inkorporazzjoni, ITransF, biex jitwettaq it-tlestija tal-bażi tal-għarfien. Equipped with a sparse attention mechanism, ITransF discovers hidden concepts of relations and transfer statistical strength through the sharing of concepts.  Moreover, the learned associations between relations and concepts, which are represented by sparse attention vectors, can be interpreted easily.  Aħna jevalwaw l-ITransF fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta referenzjarji – WN18 u FB15k għat-tlestija tal-bażi tal-għarfien u niksbu titjib kemm fil-livell medju kif ukoll Hits@10 ) metriċi, fuq il-linji bażi kollha li ma jużawx informazzjoni addizzjonali.', 'ro': 'Bazele de cunoștințe sunt resurse importante pentru o varietate de sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural, dar suferă de incompletitudine. Propunem un nou model de incorporare, ITransF, pentru a realiza completarea bazei de cunoștințe. Echipat cu un mecanism slab de atenție, ITransF descoperă concepte ascunse de relații și transferă puterea statistică prin împărtășirea conceptelor. Mai mult decât atât, asociațiile învățate dintre relații și concepte, care sunt reprezentate de vectori slabi de atenție, pot fi interpretate cu ușurință. Evaluăm ITransF pe două seturi de date de referință - WN18 și FB15k pentru completarea bazei de cunoștințe și obținem îmbunătățiri atât în ceea ce privește gradul mediu, cât și în ceea ce privește Hits@10 metrice, pe toate liniile de referință care nu utilizează informații suplimentare.', 'sr': 'Baze znanja su važne resurse za razne prirodne jezike, ali pate od nepotpunosti. Predlažemo novi model, ITransF, da izvrši završnu bazu znanja. Izložen mehanizam rezervne pažnje, ITransF otkriva skrivene koncepte odnosa i prenosi statističku snagu putem podjele koncepta. Osim toga, naučene asocijacije između odnosa i koncepta, koje predstavljaju rezervni vektori pažnje, mogu lako interpretirati. Procjenjujemo ITransF na dva standardna seta podataka-WN18 i FB15k za završavanje baze znanja i dobijamo poboljšanje na srednjoj ranki i Hits@10 metrika, preko svih osnovnih linija koje ne koriste dodatne informacije.', 'so': 'Aqoonta aasaaskeedu waa hanti muhiim ah oo loo baaraandegayo luuqadaha dabiicadda ah laakiin shaqo la’aanta la’aanta u xanuunsadaa. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sameynta sameynta aasaaska aqoonta, ITransF. IITransF wuxuu muuqanayaa fikrada qarsoon ee xiriirka iyo xoogga statisticada ku wareejinaya xagga sharciga fikrada. Sidoo kale waxaa si fudud looga turjumi karaa ururada la bartay xiriirka iyo fikrada, kuwaas oo ay u representaan wadiiqooyinka daryeelka aad u yar. Waxaannu ku qiimeynaynaa ITransF labada benchmark datasets-WN18 iyo FB15k si loo dhameeyo aasaaska aqoonta iyo horumarinta labada heer iyo Hits@10 Metrici, dhammaan saldhig oo aan isticmaalin macluumaad dheeraad ah.', 'si': 'දැනගන්න අධ්\u200dයාවය ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂාවක් වගේ විවිධ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වැදගත් උපකරණය අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා කියලා, ITRansF, දැනගන්න ආධාරය සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න. සම්බන්ධ අවධාන පද්ධතියක් සමග ඉක්කිප්ප් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ITran sF සම්බන්ධ අවධානය සහ සංවිධානයක් සම්බන්ධ ඒවගේම, සම්බන්ධතාවය සහ අදහස් අතර ඉගෙන ගත්ත සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවය, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණ වෙක්ටර් අත අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට-WN18 සහ FB15k විශ්වාස කරනවා දන්නවන අධ්\u200dයාත්මක සම්පූර්ණය සහ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අධ Hits@10 මෙට්\u200dරික්ස්, අඩුම තොරතුරු පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ නැති සියලුම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Kunskapsbaser är viktiga resurser för en mängd olika naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter men lider av ofullständighet. Vi föreslår en ny inbäddningsmodell, ITransF, för att utföra kunskapsbas komplettering. Utrustad med en gles uppmärksamhetsmekanism upptäcker ITransF dolda begrepp om relationer och överför statistisk styrka genom att dela begrepp. Dessutom kan de lärda associationerna mellan relationer och begrepp, som representeras av glesa uppmärksamhetsvektorer, lätt tolkas. Vi utvärderar ITransF på två benchmark-datauppsättningar-WN18 och FB15k för färdigställande av kunskapsbasen och erhåller förbättringar på både medelrankning och Hits@10 mätvärden över alla baslinjer som inte använder ytterligare information.', 'ta': 'அறிவு அடிப்படைகள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பணிகளுக்கு முக்கியமான வளங்கள் ஆனால் முழுமையில் இருந்து பாதிக் நாம் அறிவின் அடிப்படை முடிவை செய்ய ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி, ITransF, திருந்துகிறோம். ஒரு சிறிய கவனம் முறைமையுடன் தேவைப்பட்டது, ITransF தொடர்புகளின் மறைந்துள்ள கருத்துக்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவரமான மேலும், சிறிய கவனம் நெறிகளால் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட உறவுகளுக்கும் கருத்துக்களுக்கும் இடையே கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கும்  தெரியும் அடிப்படை முடிப்பதற்காக நாம் ITransF-ல் இரண்டு பென்க்மார்க் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் WN18 மற்றும் FB15k ஐ மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்ற Hits@10  metrics, over all baselines that do not use additional information.', 'ur': 'علم bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incomplete suffering. ہم ایک نئی مہینڈنگ موڈل، ITransF کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، علم بنسس کامل کرنے کے لئے۔ ایک کم توجه مکانیسم کے ساتھ برابر ہوا، ITransF رابطہ کی چھپائی نظریں پتہ کرتا ہے اور منطقی قوت کو تغییر کے ذریعہ تغییر دیتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، رابطہ اور معلومات کے درمیان تعلیم کی تعلیم آسانی کے ساتھ تفسیر کر سکتی ہے، جسے ذلیل توجه ویکتروں کے ذریعہ نمایش کر رہے ہیں. ہم نے ITransF کو دو بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ-WN18 اور FB15k کے ذریعے علم بنس کامل کرنے کے لئے ارزش کرلیا ہے اور میانہ رقم اور میانہ رقم پر بہترین ترقی حاصل کرلیا ہے Hits@10 متریک، تمام بنسس لینوں پر جو اضافہ معلومات نہیں استعمال کرتے۔', 'uz': "Maʼlumot asosiy o'zgarishlar turli tilni boshqarish vazifalari uchun muhim manbalar, lekin mukamlik vazifalarga murakkab bo'ladi. Biz ilmiy asosiy tuzuvni bajarish uchun yangi tuzuvchi modelni ITransF'ga qaramaymiz. ITransF bilan bir kichkina foydalanish mekaniyasi bilan ko'rsatadi, ma'lumotlarning bekitilgan g'oyalarni ko'rsatadi va statistik energini o'zgartiradi. Ko'pchilik vektorlar tomonidan tashkilotga ega bo'lgan munosabatlar va fikrlar orasidagi o'rganish qoidalari oddiy tarjima qilishi mumkin. Biz ITransF haqida o'qiymatimiz bilan ilmiy asosiy tuzilishi uchun ikkita benchmark maʼlumotlar soni WN18 va FB15k bilan imkoniyatlarni qiymatimiz va ikkita darajada o'zgarishni istaysiz. Hits@10 Qoʻshimcha maʼlumot qoʻllamaydigan hamma asl satrlarda metrik.", 'vi': 'Kiến thức là nguồn tài nguyên quan trọng cho nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên nhưng lại thiếu hoàn hảo. Chúng tôi đề nghị một kiểu cấy ghép tiểu thuyết, ITranF, để thực hiện việc hoàn thành căn cứ kiến thức. Với một cơ chế tập trung hẹp, ITran tìm ra các khái niệm bí mật về quan hệ và trao đổi sức mạnh thống qua chia sẻ các khái niệm. Hơn nữa, các liên kết học giữa các mối quan hệ và các khái niệm, được đại diện bởi các sinh vật nổi bật, có thể được giải thích dễ dàng. Chúng tôi đánh giá ITTransF dựa trên hai nhóm dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, WN18 và FB05k để hoàn thành căn cứ kiến thức và đạt được cải tiến về hai cấp trung và Hits@10 đo lường, trên tất cả các đường hầm không dùng thông tin phụ.', 'da': 'Videnbaser er vigtige ressourcer til en række naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver, men lider af ufuldstændighed. Vi foreslår en ny integreringsmodel, ITransF, til at udføre videnbase færdiggørelse. Udstyret med en sparsom opmærksomhedsmekanisme opdager ITransF skjulte begreber om relationer og overfører statistisk styrke gennem deling af begreber. Desuden kan de lærde associationer mellem relationer og begreber, som er repræsenteret af sparsomme opmærksomhedsvektorer, let fortolkes. Vi evaluerer ITransF på to benchmark datasæt-WN18 og FB15k til færdiggørelse af videnbasen og opnår forbedringer på både gennemsnitsrang og Hits@10 målinger over alle basislinjer, der ikke bruger yderligere oplysninger.', 'nl': 'Kennisbanken zijn belangrijke bronnen voor een verscheidenheid aan natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken, maar lijden onder onvolledigheid. We stellen een nieuw embedding model voor, ITransF, om kennisbasis voltooiing uit te voeren. Uitgerust met een schaars aandachtsmechanisme ontdekt ITransF verborgen concepten van relaties en draagt statistische kracht over door concepten te delen. Bovendien kunnen de geleerde associaties tussen relaties en concepten, die worden vertegenwoordigd door schaarse aandachtsvectoren, gemakkelijk worden geïnterpreteerd. We evalueren ITransF op twee benchmark datasets-WN18 en FB15k voor kennisbank voltooiing en verkrijgen verbeteringen op zowel de gemiddelde rang als de gemiddelde rang. Hits@10 Metrics, over alle basislijnen die geen extra informatie gebruiken.', 'de': 'Wissensdatenbanken sind wichtige Ressourcen für eine Vielzahl natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben, leiden aber unter Unvollständigkeit. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Einbettungsmodell vor, ITransF, um die Wissensdatenbank zu vervollständigen. Ausgestattet mit einem spärlichen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus entdeckt ITransF verborgene Beziehungskonzepte und überträgt statistische Stärke durch das Teilen von Konzepten. Darüber hinaus lassen sich die erlernten Assoziationen zwischen Relationen und Konzepten, die durch spärliche Aufmerksamkeitsvektoren dargestellt werden, leicht interpretieren. Wir evaluieren ITransF auf zwei Benchmark-Datensätzen – WN18 und FB15k zur Vervollständigung der Wissensdatenbank und erzielen Verbesserungen sowohl im mittleren Rang als auch im mittleren Rang. Hits@10 Metriken für alle Baselines, die keine zusätzlichen Informationen verwenden.', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리는 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무의 중요한 자원이지만 불완전성이 존재한다.우리는 지식 라이브러리의 구축을 완성하기 위해 새로운 삽입 모델인 ItransF를 제시했다.ItransF는 희소한 주의 메커니즘을 갖추고 있어 숨겨진 관계 개념을 발견하고 공유 개념을 통해 통계적 강도를 전달할 수 있다.또한 희소한 주의벡터로 표시된 관계와 개념 간의 학습 관련은 쉽게 해석할 수 있다.우리는 두 개의 기준 데이터 세트 WN18과 FB15k에서 ITransF를 평가하여 지식 라이브러리를 완성하고 평균 등급과Hits@10지표, 추가 정보를 사용하지 않는 모든 기선.', 'bg': 'Базите знания са важни ресурси за различни задачи по обработка на естествения език, но страдат от непълнота. Предлагаме нов вграден модел за изпълнение на завършване на базата от знания. Оборудван с рядък механизъм за внимание, открива скрити концепции за взаимоотношения и прехвърля статистическа сила чрез споделяне на концепции. Освен това научените асоциации между отношенията и понятията, които са представени от редки вектори на вниманието, могат да бъдат интерпретирани лесно. Ние оценяваме ITransF на два сравнителни бази данни - WN18 и FB15k за завършване на базата от знания и получаваме подобрения както на средния ранг, така и на средния ранг Hits@10 показатели, над всички базови линии, които не използват допълнителна информация.', 'hr': 'Baze znanja su važne resurse za razne prirodne jezike, ali pati od nepotpunosti. Predlažemo novi model uključivanja, ITransF, kako bi izvršili završetak baze znanja. Uz mehanizam rezervne pažnje, ITransF otkriva skrivene koncepte odnosa i prenošenje statističke snage putem dijeljenja koncepta. Osim toga, naučene asocijacije između odnosa i koncepta, koje predstavljaju rezervni vektori pažnje, mogu se lako interpretirati. Procjenjujemo ITransF na dva standardna seta podataka WN18 i FB15k za završavanje baze znanja i dobijamo poboljšanje na srednjem redu i Hits@10 metrika, preko svih osnovnih linija koje ne koriste dodatne informacije.', 'id': 'Pangkalan pengetahuan adalah sumber daya penting untuk berbagai tugas proses bahasa alam tapi menderita ketidaklengkap. Kami mengusulkan model penerbangan novel, ITransF, untuk melakukan penyelesaian dasar pengetahuan. Dipersediakan dengan mekanisme perhatian yang sedikit, ITransF menemukan konsep tersembunyi hubungan dan transfer kekuatan statistik melalui berbagi konsep. Selain itu, asosiasi belajar antara hubungan dan konsep, yang dipilih oleh vektor perhatian yang sedikit, dapat diterjemahkan dengan mudah. We evaluate ITransF on two benchmark datasets-WN18 and FB15k for knowledge base completion and obtains improvements on both the mean rank and  Hits@10 metrik, di atas semua garis dasar yang tidak menggunakan informasi tambahan.', 'sw': 'Mazingira ya maarifa ni rasilimali muhimu kwa kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha za asili lakini wanakabiliwa na ukosefu wa ukosefu. Tunazipendekeza muundo wa riwaya unaoandaliwa, ITransF, kutekeleza msingi wa maarifa. Kutokana na mfumo wa kutosha hisia, ITransF anagundua dhana zilizofichikana za mahusiano na kuhamisha nguvu ya takwimu kupitia kushirikiana na dhana. Zaidi ya hayo, makundi yaliyojifunza kati ya mahusiano na mawazo, ambayo yanawakilishwa na vectori za uchunguzi, yanaweza tafsiri kwa urahisi. Tutathmini ITransF kwenye seti mbili za taarifa za bendera-WN18 na FB15k kwa ajili ya kuuliza msingi wa maarifa na kupata maboresho kwa kiwango cha wastani na Hits@10 metrici, zaidi ya misingi yote ambayo hayatumia taarifa za ziada.', 'fa': 'پایگاه دانش منابع مهم برای پرداخت کار های زبان طبیعی است ولی از غیر کامل رنج می دهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل راهنمایی که در حال پیدا کردن، ITransF، تا کامل پایگاه دانش را انجام دهیم. با یک مکانیسم توجه کوچک، ITransF مشخص پنهان رابطه\u200cها و قدرت آمار را از طریق تقسیم مفهوم\u200cها کشف می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، ارتباطات یاد گرفته بین رابطه\u200cها و فرضیه\u200cها، که توسط ویکتورهای توجه کمی معرفی می\u200cشوند، به آسانی تفسیر می\u200cشود. ما ITransF را بر دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای نقطه\u200cبندی-WN18 و FB15k برای کامل پایگاه دانش ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و بهترین درجه\u200cهای میانه و Hits@10 متریک، در تمام خطوط پایین\u200cها که از اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای استفاده نمی\u200cکنند.', 'am': 'እውቀት መቀመጫዎች ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀያ ሥራ የተለየ ሀብት ነው ግን ከሙሉ መከራ ነው፡፡ የእውቀት መቀመጫውን ለመፈጸም የኖሮውን የኢትረንስF መተላለፊያ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የኢትራንስF ውጤቶች የተሰወረውን የግንኙነትን እና የstatistic ኃይልን በመከላከል የተሰወረውን አካባቢ አግኝቷል፡፡ ደግሞም በጥያቄ አካባቢዎች የሚቆጠሩ የግንኙነት እና አካባቢዎች መካከል የተማሩትን ጉዳዮች በብርቱ ሊተረጉም ይችላል፡፡ በሁለት benchmark ዳታ-WN18 እና FB15k ላይ የውቀት መደገፊያ እና በመካከለኛው ክፍል እና ክፍተቶችን አግኝተናል፡፡ Hits@10 ማተሚያዎች፣ አብዛኛውን መረጃ በማይጠቀም በመቀመጫዎች ሁሉ ላይ', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմքերը կարևոր ռեսուրսներ են բնական լեզվի վերամշակումների բազմաթիվ խնդիրների համար, բայց տառապում են անլրացությունից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ներդրման մոդել, ITRansF-ը, որպեսզի կատարենք գիտելիքի հիմքի ավարտումը: Equipped with a sparse attention mechanism, ITransF discovers hidden concepts of relations and transfer statistical strength through the sharing of concepts.  Moreover, the learned associations between relations and concepts, which are represented by sparse attention vectors, can be interpreted easily.  Մենք գնահատում ենք ITRansF-ը երկու համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա՝ World N18 և FB15k-ը գիտելիքի հիմքի կատարման համար և ստանում է բարելավումներ և Hits@10 Մետրիկներ, բոլոր հիմնական գծերի վրա, որոնք չեն օգտագործում ավելին տեղեկատվություն:', 'af': "kennisbasis is belangrik hulpbronne vir 'n verskillende natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte, maar lyk van onvolledigheid. Ons voorstel 'n roman inbetering model, ITransF, om kennis basis voltooiing te doen. Die ITransF ontdek verborge konsepte van relasies en oordra statistiese krag deur die deel van konsepte. Ook, die geleerde assosiasies tussen verwante en konsepte, wat deur sparse aandagvektores verteenwoordig word, kan maklik uittel word. Ons evalueer ITransF op twee benchmark dataset-WN18 en FB15k vir kennis basis voltooiing en verkry verbeteringe op beide die middelste rang en Hits@10 Metrike, oor alle basilyne wat nie addisionele inligting gebruik nie.", 'sq': 'Knowledge bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incompleteness.  We propose a novel embedding model, ITransF, to perform knowledge base completion.  Equipped with a sparse attention mechanism, ITransF discovers hidden concepts of relations and transfer statistical strength through the sharing of concepts.  Përveç kësaj, shoqatat e mësuara midis marrëdhënieve dhe koncepteve, të cilat përfaqësohen nga vektorët e vogël të vëmendjes, mund të interpretohen lehtë. Ne vlerësojmë ITransF në dy grupe të dhënash referenciale-WN18 dhe FB15k për kompletimin e bazës së njohurive dhe fitojmë përmirësime në nivelin mesatar dhe Hits@10 Metrika, mbi të gjitha linjat bazë që nuk përdorin informacion shtesë.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের জন্য জ্ঞানের ভেস গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সম্পদ, কিন্তু অসম্পূর্ণ ভাষ আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের প্রস্তাব করছি, আইট্রান্সএফ, জ্ঞানের বেস সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য। স্বল্প মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে আইট্রান্সএফ লুকিয়ে রাখা সম্পর্ক এবং পরিসংখ্যানের শক্তি প্রদান করে ধারণার মাধ্যমে পরিসংখ্যানের শক্তি প্ এছাড়াও, সম্পর্ক এবং ধারণার মধ্যে শিক্ষিত সম্পর্কের যোগাযোগ, যাদের মনোযোগের দ্বারা প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে, তাদের সহ আমরা আইট্রান্সএফ দুই বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট-WN18 এবং এফবি১৫কে পরিমাণ করি জ্ঞানের ভেস সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য এবং উভয়ের মাধ্যমে উন্নতি পা Hits@10 মেট্রিক, যারা আরো তথ্য ব্যবহার করে না।', 'az': 'Bilim üssələri təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün müxtəlif mənfəətlərdir, amma tamamlanmamışdır. Biz yeni inşa modeli, ITransF, elm üssünü tamamlamaq üçün təklif edirik. ITransF əlaqələrin gizli fikirlərini və statistik gücünü fikirləşdirir. Daha sonra, təsirli dikkat vektörləri ilə göstərilən ilişkiler arasındakı öyrənmiş bağlantılar asanlıqla ifadə edilə bilər. Biz ITransF-i iki benchmark veri-sets-WN18 və FB15k bilgi üssü tamamlaması üçün değerləşdiririk və orta dərəcə və dərəcə ilə yaxşılaşdırılır. Hits@10 Əlavə məlumatları istifadə etməyən bütün temel çətinlərin üstündə metrik.', 'cs': 'Znalostní báze jsou důležitými zdroji pro různé úkoly zpracování přirozeného jazyka, ale trpí neúplností. Navrhujeme nový embeddingový model ITransF pro provedení kompletace znalostní báze. Vybavena řídkým mechanismem pozornosti, ITransF objevuje skryté koncepty vztahů a přenáší statistickou sílu prostřednictvím sdílení konceptů. Navíc lze snadno interpretovat naučené asociace mezi vztahy a pojmy, které jsou reprezentovány řídkými vektory pozornosti. Vyhodnocujeme ITransF na dvou referenčních datových sadách – WN18 a FB15k pro dokončení znalostní báze a získáváme zlepšení jak na střední hodnotě, tak i na Hits@10 metriky pro všechny základní linie, které nepoužívají další informace.', 'et': 'Teadmistebaasid on olulised ressursid erinevate looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete jaoks, kuid kannatavad ebatäielikkuse all. Pakume välja uudse integreerimismudeli ITransF, et teostada teadmistebaasi lõpetamist. Varustatud hõreda tähelepanu mehhanismiga ITransF avastab varjatud suhete kontseptsioone ja kannab statistilist tugevust kontseptsioonide jagamise kaudu. Lisaks saab hõlpsasti tõlgendada seoseid seoste ja kontseptsioonide vahel, mida esindavad hõredad tähelepanu vektorid. Hindame ITransF-i kahe võrdlusandmekogumi põhjal – WN18 ja FB15k teadmistebaasi lõpetamiseks ning saavutame täiustusi nii keskmisel tasemel kui ka keskmisel tasemel. Hits@10 mõõdikud, mis hõlmavad kõiki lähtejooni, mis ei kasuta lisateavet.', 'fi': 'Tietokannat ovat tärkeitä resursseja erilaisiin luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtäviin, mutta ne kärsivät puutteellisuudesta. Ehdotamme uutta upotusmallia, ITransF, tietopohjan täydentämiseksi. Harjaalla huomiomekanismilla varustettu ITransF löytää piilotettuja suhteita koskevia käsitteitä ja siirtää tilastollista vahvuutta käsitteiden jakamisen kautta. Lisäksi suhteiden ja käsitteiden opitut assosiaatiot, joita harvat huomiovektorit edustavat, voidaan tulkita helposti. Arvioimme ITransF:tä kahdella vertailuaineistolla – WN18 ja FB15k tietopohjan täydentämiseksi ja saamme parannuksia sekä keskiarvoon että Hits@10 metriikka, joka kattaa kaikki perusviivat, jotka eivät käytä lisätietoja.', 'bs': 'Baze znanja su važne resurse za razne prirodne jezike, ali pati od nepotpunosti. Predlažemo novi model, ITransF, da izvrši završnu bazu znanja. Izložen mehanizam rezervne pažnje, ITransF otkriva skrivene koncepte odnosa i prenosi statističku snagu putem dijeljenja koncepta. Osim toga, naučene asocijacije između odnosa i koncepta, koje predstavljaju rezervni vektori pažnje, mogu lako interpretirati. Procjenjujemo ITransF na dva standardna seta podataka WN18 i FB15k za završavanje baze znanja i dobijamo poboljšanje na srednjem redu i Hits@10 metrika, preko svih osnovnih linija koje ne koriste dodatne informacije.', 'ca': "Knowledge bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incompleteness.  Proposem un nou model d'integració, ITransF, per a completar la base de coneixements. Equipped with a sparse attention mechanism, ITransF discovers hidden concepts of relations and transfer statistical strength through the sharing of concepts.  A més, les associacions aprengutes entre relacions i conceptes, que són representades per petits vectors d'atenció, es poden interpretar fàcilment. Evaluam ITransF en dos conjunts de dades de referència: WN18 i FB15k per a completar la base de coneixement i obtenim millores tant en el nivell mitjà com Hits@10 metriques, sobre totes les línies de base que no utilitzen informació adicional.", 'tr': 'Bilim bazlary tebigy dilleriň işlemesi üçin wajyp çeşitli çeşmeleridir ýöne boýunça çykyp ýok. Biz kitap taýýarlama nusgasyny ITransF, bilim tabany tamamlamak üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. ITransF birnäçe üns meýdançasynda nähili görnüş meýdançasynda ýakyn baglaşyklaryň düşüncelerini a çar we statistik güýjüni düşünjeleri paylaşyk bilen aktarlar. Ayrıca, fark vektörleri tarafından ifade edilen ilişkiler ve düşünceler arasında öğrenilen ilişkiler kolaylaştırılabilir. Biz ITransF -iň iki benchmark veri setirlerini WN18 we FB15k bilem üýtgetmek üçin deňleýäris we orta derejede we bolsa gowuralygyny bilýäris Hits@10 Diňe bir maglumat ulanmaýan metrikler üstünde.', 'jv': 'Bilih-Bilih sing dikarepaké sing dikarepaké kanggo akeh-akeh sing nggawe gerakan ning arep Perusahaan Perusahaan kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé nggawe barang pengguna nggawe model sing bukanjur, IBransF, nggawe barang pengguna kuwi wis mulai nggawe kesempatan. Iyo kiper karo nganggo sistem sing dadi nggunakake perangkapan, IBransF dumateng akeh barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe stasitik kejahatan Label We assess Hits@10 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "Basin ilmi yana da amfani masu muhimu wa aikin mutane masu aikin harshen asili, kuma amma suna cũtar da kamfata. Tuna goyyar da wani misali wanda ke cikin yanzu, ta sami da bassi na ilmi. Ana sami da wani masu saurãre masu kashewa, ItransF ya gane zato na ɓõye na masu hushi da kuma ya shige ƙarfin statistical game da shari'ar zato. Da haka, zan iya fassara mutane da aka sanar a tsakanin danganta da zato, waɗanda ake wakilisha na shiryoyi masu sauri. We evaluate ITransF on two benchmark datasets-WN18 and FB15k for knowledge base completion and obtains improvements on both the mean rank and  Hits@10 KCharselect unicode block name", 'he': 'Knowledge bases are important resources for a variety of natural language processing tasks but suffer from incompleteness.  אנחנו מציעים מודל חדש, ITransF, כדי לבצע סיום בסיס הידע. עם מנגנון תשומת לב נמוך, ITransF מגלה רעיונות חבויים של יחסים ומעבר כוח סטטיסטי דרך השתף של רעיונות. חוץ מזה, האיגוד הלמד בין יחסים לרעיונות, שמייצג על ידי ווקטורי תשומת לב נדיר, יכול להתפרש בקלות. אנו מעריכים את ITransF על שני קבוצות נתונים רמז-WN18 ו-FB15k לשימוש בסיס הידע Hits@10 מטריות, על כל קווי הבסיס שלא משתמשים במידע נוסף.', 'sk': 'Zbirke znanja so pomembni viri za različne naloge obdelave naravnega jezika, vendar trpijo zaradi nepopolnosti. Predlagamo nov model vgradnje, ITransF, za izvedbo dokončanja baze znanja. ITransF, opremljen z redkim mehanizmom pozornosti, odkriva skrite koncepte odnosov in prenaša statistično moč preko izmenjave konceptov. Poleg tega je mogoče učene povezave med odnosi in koncepti, ki jih predstavljajo redki vektorji pozornosti, zlahka interpretirati. ITransF ocenjujemo na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov – WN18 in FB15k za dokončanje baze znanja in pridobimo izboljšave tako na povprečnem razredu kot na področju FB15k. Hits@10 meritve, ki se nanašajo na vse osnovne vrstice, ki ne uporabljajo dodatnih informacij.', 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་དེ། རང་རིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚོར་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།ITransF། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོང་སྣེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་དང་། ITransF་ནི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚད་རྩིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པས། ད་དུང་། འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་དག་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང We evaluate ITransF on two benchmark datasets-WN18 and FB15k for knowledge base completion and obtain improvements on both the mean rank and the mean rank Hits@10 metrics, over all baselines that do not use additional information.'}
{'en': 'Learning a Neural Semantic Parser from User Feedback', 'ar': 'تعلم المحلل الدلالي العصبي من ملاحظات المستخدم', 'fr': 'Apprendre un analyseur sémantique neuronal à partir des commentaires des utilisateurs', 'es': 'Aprender un analizador semántico neuronal a partir de los comentarios de los usuarios', 'pt': 'Aprendendo um analisador semântico neural com o feedback do usuário', 'ja': 'ユーザーからのフィードバックからニューラルセマンティックパーサーを学ぶ', 'zh': '学神经语义解析器于用户反馈', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिक्रिया से एक तंत्रिका शब्दार्थ पार्सर सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение нейронного семантического анализатора на основе отзывов пользователей', 'ga': 'Parsálaí Séimeantach Néarach a Fhoghlaim ó Aiseolas Úsáideoirí', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egy idegi szemantikus elemző tanulása a felhasználói visszajelzésekből', 'el': 'Μάθηση ενός Νευρικού Σηματικού Ανάλυσης από σχόλια χρηστών', 'it': 'Imparare un parser semantico neurale dal feedback degli utenti', 'kk': 'Пайдаланушының қайталануынан нейралық семантикалық талдаушысын үйрену', 'lt': 'Naudotojo atsakymuose išmokti neurologinį Semantinį analizatorių', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫീഡ്ബാക്കില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim ta’ Parser Semantiku Newrali mir-Rispons tal-Utent', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн мэдээллээс сэтгэл зүйн Semantic Parser суралцах', 'no': 'Læring av ein neiral semantisk tolkar frå brukartilbakemelding', 'pl': 'Uczenie się neuronowego parsera semantycznego z opinii użytkowników', 'ro': 'Învățarea unui parser semantic neural din feedback-ul utilizatorilor', 'sr': 'Naučenje neuronskog semantičkog razmatrača iz povratka korisnika', 'si': 'පාවිච්චි ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Barto jardiinada Neural Semantic Parser from User Feedback', 'sv': 'Att lära sig en neural semantisk parser från användarfeedback', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'User Feedback سے نیورال سیمنٹی پارسر کی تعلیم', 'vi': 'Học một thầy phân tích thần kinh và kỳ từ người dùng', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Læring af en neural semantisk fortolker fra brugerens feedback', 'nl': 'Een neuronale semantische parser leren van feedback van gebruikers', 'bg': 'Научаване на неврален семантичен анализ от обратната връзка на потребителите', 'hr': 'Naučenje neuronskog semantičkog razmatrača iz povratka korisnika', 'de': 'Lernen eines neuronalen semantischen Parsers aus Benutzerfeedback', 'id': 'Mempelajari Parser Semantik Neural dari Feedback Pengguna', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن یک پزشک سیمانتیک عصبی از پذیرش کاربر', 'ko': '사용자 피드백에서 신경 의미 분석기 학습', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Mbunge wa Neural Semantic From User Feedback', 'tr': "Ullançy Feedback'den näral Semantik Taýýarlama öwrenmek", 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Mëso një analizues Semantik Neural nga përgjigjet e përdoruesit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': "캻stifad톛칞i Feedback'dan n칬ral Semantik Parser 칬yr톛nm톛k", 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারী ফিডব্যাক থেকে নিউরাল সেমান্টিক প্যারাজার শিখানো', 'hy': 'Օգտագործողի արձագանքից նյարդային սեմանտիկ վերլուծում սովորելը', 'cs': 'Učení se neuronového sémantického parseru z uživatelské zpětné vazby', 'et': 'Neuraalse semantilise parser õppimine kasutaja tagasisidest', 'bs': 'Naučenje neuronskog semantičkog razmatrača iz povratka korisnika', 'ca': 'Learning a Neural Semantic Parser from User Feedback', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen semanttisen parserin oppiminen käyttäjän palautteesta', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'he': 'ללמוד מעבד סמנטי נוירולי ממחזור משתמש', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje nevralne semantične analize iz povratnih informacij uporabnikov', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལྟ་བུ་དང་ཤེས་བྱས་ནས་སྦྱོར་བའི་རྒྱུད་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ'}
{'en': 'We present an approach to rapidly and easily build natural language interfaces to databases for new domains, whose performance improves over time based on user feedback, and requires minimal intervention. To achieve this, we adapt neural sequence models to map utterances directly to SQL with its full expressivity, bypassing any intermediate meaning representations. These models are immediately deployed online to solicit feedback from real users to flag incorrect queries. Finally, the popularity of SQL facilitates gathering annotations for incorrect predictions using the crowd, which is directly used to improve our models. This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers. Experiments suggest that this approach can be deployed quickly for any new target domain, as we show by learning a semantic parser for an online academic database from scratch.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا لبناء واجهات لغة طبيعية بسرعة وسهولة لقواعد البيانات الخاصة بالمجالات الجديدة ، والتي يتحسن أداؤها بمرور الوقت بناءً على ملاحظات المستخدم ، ويتطلب الحد الأدنى من التدخل. لتحقيق ذلك ، نقوم بتكييف نماذج التسلسل العصبي لتعيين الكلمات المنطوقة مباشرة إلى SQL بتعبيراتها الكاملة ، متجاوزين أي تمثيلات ذات معنى وسيط. يتم نشر هذه النماذج فورًا عبر الإنترنت للحصول على تعليقات من المستخدمين الحقيقيين للإبلاغ عن الاستعلامات غير الصحيحة. أخيرًا ، تسهل شعبية SQL جمع التعليقات التوضيحية للتنبؤات غير الصحيحة باستخدام الحشد ، والتي تُستخدم مباشرةً لتحسين نماذجنا. تفتح حلقة الملاحظات الكاملة هذه ، بدون تمثيلات وسيطة أو هندسة خاصة بقاعدة البيانات ، طرقًا جديدة لبناء محللات دلالية عالية الجودة. تشير التجارب إلى أنه يمكن نشر هذا النهج بسرعة لأي مجال مستهدف جديد ، كما نوضح من خلال تعلم محلل دلالي لقاعدة بيانات أكاديمية عبر الإنترنت من البداية.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem para construir de forma rápida e fácil interfaces de linguagem natural para bancos de dados para novos domínios, cujo desempenho melhora ao longo do tempo com base no feedback do usuário e requer intervenção mínima. Para conseguir isso, adaptamos modelos de sequência neural para mapear enunciados diretamente para SQL com sua total expressividade, ignorando qualquer representação de significado intermediário. Esses modelos são imediatamente implantados online para solicitar feedback de usuários reais para sinalizar consultas incorretas. Finalmente, a popularidade do SQL facilita a coleta de anotações para previsões incorretas usando a multidão, que é usada diretamente para melhorar nossos modelos. Este ciclo de feedback completo, sem representações intermediárias ou engenharia específica de banco de dados, abre novas maneiras de construir analisadores semânticos de alta qualidade. Experimentos sugerem que essa abordagem pode ser implantada rapidamente para qualquer novo domínio de destino, como mostramos aprendendo um analisador semântico para um banco de dados acadêmico online do zero.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque para crear rápida y fácilmente interfaces de lenguaje natural para bases de datos para nuevos dominios, cuyo rendimiento mejora con el tiempo en función de los comentarios de los usuarios y requiere una intervención mínima. Para lograr esto, adaptamos los modelos de secuencia neuronal para mapear las expresiones directamente a SQL con toda su expresividad, evitando cualquier representación de significado intermedio. Estos modelos se implementan inmediatamente en línea para solicitar comentarios de usuarios reales para marcar consultas incorrectas. Por último, la popularidad de SQL facilita la recopilación de anotaciones para predicciones incorrectas utilizando la multitud, que se utiliza directamente para mejorar nuestros modelos. Este ciclo de retroalimentación completo, sin representaciones intermedias ni ingeniería específica de base de datos, abre nuevas formas de construir analizadores semánticos de alta calidad. Los experimentos sugieren que este enfoque se puede implementar rápidamente para cualquier dominio de destino nuevo, como lo demostramos al aprender un analizador semántico para una base de datos académica en línea desde cero.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche permettant de créer rapidement et facilement des interfaces en langage naturel vers des bases de données pour de nouveaux domaines, dont les performances s'améliorent au fil du temps en fonction des commentaires des utilisateurs, et nécessitent une intervention minimale. Pour ce faire, nous adaptons des modèles de séquences neuronales pour mapper les énoncés directement au langage SQL avec son expressivité complète, en contournant toute représentation de signification intermédiaire. Ces modèles sont immédiatement déployés en ligne pour solliciter les commentaires des utilisateurs réels afin de signaler les requêtes incorrectes. Enfin, la popularité de SQL facilite la collecte d'annotations pour des prédictions incorrectes à l'aide de la foule, qui est directement utilisée pour améliorer nos modèles. Cette boucle de rétroaction complète, sans représentations intermédiaires ni ingénierie spécifique à la base de données, ouvre de nouvelles voies pour créer des analyseurs sémantiques de haute qualité. Les expériences suggèrent que cette approche peut être déployée rapidement pour tout nouveau domaine cible, comme nous le montrons en apprenant un analyseur sémantique pour une base de données académique en ligne à partir de zéro.", 'ja': '私たちは、新しいドメインのためのデータベースへの自然言語インターフェースを迅速かつ簡単に構築するアプローチを提示します。ユーザーのフィードバックに基づいて、データベースのパフォーマンスは時間の経過とともに向上し、介入は最小限に抑えられます。これを達成するために、私たちはニューラルシーケンスモデルを適応させ、発話を完全な表現性を備えたSQLに直接マッピングし、あらゆる中間意味表現を迂回します。これらのモデルは、不正確なクエリにフラグを立てるために実際のユーザーからフィードバックを求めるためにすぐにオンラインで展開されます。最後に、SQLの人気により、クラウドを使用して誤った予測に対する注釈を収集することができます。これは、当社のモデルを改善するために直接使用されます。この完全なフィードバックループは、中間表現やデータベース固有のエンジニアリングなしで、高品質のセマンティックパーサーを構築する新しい方法を開きます。実験によると、このアプローチは、オンラインの学術データベース用のセマンティックパーサーを一から学習することで示されるように、あらゆる新しいターゲットドメインに迅速に展開できることが示唆されています。', 'zh': '立速为新域数据库构自然语言接口之法,性随用户反馈而增之,且须最少干预。 为此者,调神经序形,直射于表现力之SQL,绕于中义。 即在线部分,以征真用户之反馈,以表非是之问。 最后,SQL之普及有助于用人群收拾非正之注,直施于改入我们的模样。 此全反馈循环,无间数据库特定之功,开构高质量语义解析器之法。 实验此可速部分新境,如吾从头学在线数据库语义解析器之效也。', 'hi': 'हम नए डोमेन के लिए डेटाबेस के लिए तेजी से और आसानी से प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफेस बनाने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसका प्रदर्शन उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिक्रिया के आधार पर समय के साथ सुधार करता है, और न्यूनतम हस्तक्षेप की आवश्यकता होती है। इसे प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम किसी भी मध्यवर्ती अर्थ के प्रतिनिधित्व को दरकिनार करते हुए, सीधे एसक्यूएल को अपनी पूर्ण अभिव्यक्ति के साथ उच्चारण को मैप करने के लिए तंत्रिका अनुक्रम मॉडल को अनुकूलित करते हैं। इन मॉडलों को तुरंत गलत क्वेरीज़ को फ़्लैग करने के लिए वास्तविक उपयोगकर्ताओं से प्रतिक्रिया मांगने के लिए ऑनलाइन तैनात किया जाता है। अंत में, एसक्यूएल की लोकप्रियता भीड़ का उपयोग करके गलत भविष्यवाणियों के लिए एनोटेशन इकट्ठा करने की सुविधा प्रदान करती है, जिसका उपयोग सीधे हमारे मॉडल को बेहतर बनाने के लिए किया जाता है। यह पूर्ण प्रतिक्रिया लूप, मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व या डेटाबेस विशिष्ट इंजीनियरिंग के बिना, उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले शब्दार्थ पार्सर के निर्माण के नए तरीकों को खोलता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि इस दृष्टिकोण को किसी भी नए लक्ष्य डोमेन के लिए जल्दी से तैनात किया जा सकता है, जैसा कि हम खरोंच से एक ऑनलाइन अकादमिक डेटाबेस के लिए एक शब्दार्थ पार्सर सीखकर दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подход к быстрому и легкому построению интерфейсов естественного языка к базам данных для новых доменов, производительность которых со временем улучшается на основе отзывов пользователей и требует минимального вмешательства. Для этого мы адаптируем модели нейронных последовательностей для отображения фраз непосредственно в SQL с их полной экспрессивностью, минуя любые промежуточные смысловые представления. Эти модели сразу же развертываются в Интернете, чтобы получить обратную связь от реальных пользователей, чтобы отметить неправильные запросы. Наконец, популярность SQL облегчает сбор аннотаций для неверных прогнозов с помощью крауда, который напрямую используется для улучшения наших моделей. Этот полный цикл обратной связи, без промежуточных представлений или конкретного проектирования базы данных, открывает новые способы создания высококачественных семантических парсеров. Эксперименты показывают, что этот подход может быть быстро развернут для любого нового целевого домена, как мы показываем, изучая семантический парсер для онлайновой академической базы данных с нуля.', 'ga': "Cuirimid cur chuige i láthair chun comhéadain teanga nádúrtha a thógáil go tapa agus go héasca chuig bunachair shonraí d’fhearainn nua, a bhfeabhsaítear a bhfeidhmíocht le himeacht ama bunaithe ar aiseolas ó úsáideoirí, agus a éilíonn idirghabháil íosta. Chun é seo a bhaint amach, déanaimid samhlacha seicheamh néaracha a oiriúnú chun cainteanna a mhapáil go díreach chuig SQL lena lánléiriú, ag seachaint aon léiriúcháin brí idirmheánacha. Imscartar na samhlacha seo láithreach ar líne chun aiseolas a lorg ó fhíorúsáideoirí chun fiosrúcháin míchearta a léiriú. Mar fhocal scoir, éascaíonn an tóir atá ar SQL nótaí a bhailiú le haghaidh tuar mícheart ag baint úsáide as an slua, a úsáidtear go díreach chun ár múnlaí a fheabhsú. Osclaíonn an lúb aiseolais iomlán seo, gan léiriúcháin idirmheánacha nó innealtóireacht ar bhunachar sonraí ar leith, bealaí nua chun parsairí shéimeantacha ar ardchaighdeán a thógáil. Tugann turgnaimh le fios gur féidir an cur chuige seo a úsáid go tapa d'aon spriocfhearann nua, mar a thaispeánaimid trí pharsálaí shéimeantach a fhoghlaim ó bhunachar sonraí acadúil ar líne.", 'hu': 'Olyan megközelítést mutatunk be, amely gyorsan és egyszerűen építhet természetes nyelvi interfészeket az új domainek adatbázisaihoz, amelyek teljesítménye a felhasználói visszajelzések alapján idővel javul, és minimális beavatkozást igényel. Ennek elérése érdekében neurális szekvencia modelleket alkalmazunk, hogy a kimondásokat közvetlenül az SQL-hez térképezzük fel teljes expresszivitásával, megkerülve minden köztes jelentésreformációt. Ezek a modellek azonnal online telepítésre kerülnek, hogy valódi felhasználóktól visszajelzést kérjenek a helytelen lekérdezések megjelöléséhez. Végül az SQL népszerűsége megkönnyíti a helytelen előrejelzésekhez szükséges jegyzetek összegyűjtését a tömeg segítségével, amelyet közvetlenül modelleink fejlesztésére használnak. Ez a teljes visszacsatolási hurok közbenső reprezentációk vagy adatbázis-specifikus tervezés nélkül új lehetőségeket nyit meg a kiváló minőségű szemantikai elemzők építésére. A kísérletek azt sugallják, hogy ez a megközelítés gyorsan alkalmazható bármilyen új céltartományra, amint azt azáltal mutatjuk, hogy megtanuljuk egy online akadémiai adatbázis szemantikai elemzőjét a semmiből.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την ταχεία και εύκολη δημιουργία διεπαφών φυσικής γλώσσας σε βάσεις δεδομένων για νέους τομείς, των οποίων η απόδοση βελτιώνεται με την πάροδο του χρόνου με βάση τα σχόλια των χρηστών και απαιτεί ελάχιστη παρέμβαση. Για να επιτευχθεί αυτό, προσαρμόζουμε μοντέλα νευρωνικής ακολουθίας για να χαρτογραφήσουμε τις εκφάνσεις απευθείας στο με την πλήρη εκφραστικότητα του, παρακάμπτοντας τυχόν ενδιάμεσες αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών. Αυτά τα μοντέλα αναπτύσσονται αμέσως στο διαδίκτυο για να ζητήσουν σχόλια από πραγματικούς χρήστες για να επισημάνουν λανθασμένα ερωτήματα. Τέλος, η δημοτικότητα του διευκολύνει τη συλλογή σχολίων για λανθασμένες προβλέψεις χρησιμοποιώντας το πλήθος, το οποίο χρησιμοποιείται άμεσα για τη βελτίωση των μοντέλων μας. Αυτός ο πλήρης βρόχος ανατροφοδότησης, χωρίς ενδιάμεσες αναπαραστάσεις ή ειδική μηχανική βάσης δεδομένων, ανοίγει νέους τρόπους για την κατασκευή σημασιολογικών αναλύσεων υψηλής ποιότητας. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση μπορεί να αναπτυχθεί γρήγορα για κάθε νέο τομέα στόχου, όπως αποδεικνύουμε μαθαίνοντας έναν σημασιολογικό αναλυτή για μια διαδικτυακή ακαδημαϊκή βάση δεδομένων από την αρχή.', 'it': 'Presentiamo un approccio per costruire rapidamente e facilmente interfacce di linguaggio naturale ai database di nuovi domini, le cui prestazioni migliorano nel tempo sulla base del feedback degli utenti e richiedono un intervento minimo. Per raggiungere questo obiettivo, adattiamo modelli di sequenza neurale per mappare le espressioni direttamente a SQL con la sua piena espressività, bypassando qualsiasi rappresentazione di significato intermedio. Questi modelli vengono immediatamente distribuiti online per sollecitare feedback da utenti reali per segnalare query errate. Infine, la popolarità di SQL facilita la raccolta di annotazioni per previsioni errate utilizzando il crowd, che viene utilizzato direttamente per migliorare i nostri modelli. Questo ciclo di feedback completo, senza rappresentazioni intermedie o ingegneria specifica del database, apre nuovi modi per costruire parser semantici di alta qualità. Gli esperimenti suggeriscono che questo approccio può essere implementato rapidamente per qualsiasi nuovo dominio di destinazione, come mostriamo imparando da zero un parser semantico per un database accademico online.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ძალიან ძალიან და ადვილად დავიწყეთ მონაცემები ენერგიის ინტერფექციების შესახებ მონაცემებისთვის ახალი დიომენტებისთვის, რომელსაც გამოყენებელი თავიდან გამოყენება და მინუს ინტე ამის გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ ნეიროლური სექსეციის მოდელების აეპტიფიკაცია SQL-ზე მხოლოდ სინამდვილეობით, რომელიც ყველა საშუალო სინამდვილეობით გავაკეთებთ. ეს მოდელები უბრალოდ ინტერნეტიურად გამოყენებულია რეალური მომხმარებისგან შეცდომა კითხვებისთვის. საბოლოოდ, SQL-ის პოლუბარიტება მარტივი წარმოდგენებისთვის წარმოდგენების შესაძლებელება, რომელიც ჩვენი მოდელების უფრო მუშაობისთვის გამოყენებულია. ეს დასრულებული გახსნა, საშუალოდ განსაზღვრება ან განსაზღვრებული ბაზის ინეზინერიის განმავლობაში, ახალი გახსნა საზოგადოებელი სმენტიკური პარასერების შექმნა. ექსპერიმენტები იტყვებენ, რომ ეს პროგრამა შეიძლება ძალიან გამოყენება ყველა ახალი მიზეზი დემომინისთვის, როგორც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ', 'kk': 'Біз тез және оңай тіл интерфейстерін жаңа домендердің деректер қорларына құру арқылы, олардың істеу уақытта пайдаланушылардың рейтинге негізделген және кеміндетті аралас керек. Бұны жеткізу үшін, біз невралдық реттеу үлгілерін SQL- ге тікелей сөздерді өзінің толық өрнектілігімен сәйкестіреміз, кез-келген орташа мәліметтерді көрсетуге арналған. Бұл үлгілер шын пайдаланушылардан қайталану сұраныстарын жалау үшін онлайн арқылы жіберіледі. Соңында, SQL мәліметі үлгілерімізді жасау үшін дұрыс таңдау үшін түсініктемелерді жинау мүмкіндігін көмектеседі. Бұл толық қайталау тізімі, мезгілдігі не деректер қорының ерекше инженерлігі жоқ, семантикалық талдаушыларды құру үшін жаңа сапа жоғарын ашады. Эксперименттер бұл тәсілді жаңа мақсатты доменге тез жұмыс істеуге болады, сезіміз онлайн академикалық деректер қорының семантикалық талдаушысын оқу үшін көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'പുതിയ ഡൊമെയിനുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡാറ്റാബേസിലേക്ക് വേഗത്തിലും സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ വിനിമയങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു വഴിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200d ഇത് പ്രാപിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് സ്ക്യൂഎലിലേക്ക് സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്\u200dറെ  യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ഉപയോക്താക്കളില്\u200d നിന്നും തെറ്റായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈനില്\u200d അയച്ചുകൊട Finally, the popularity of SQL facilitates gathering annotations for incorrect predictions using the crowd, which is directly used to improve our models.  ഈ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രതിനിധികളോ ഡാറ്റാബേസിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിനോ ഇല്ലാതെ ഈ ഫിഡിബ്ബാക്ക് ലൂപ്പ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ത പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു ഇത് പുതിയ ലക്ഷ്യ ഡൊമെയിനിലേക്ക് വേഗത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധി', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ għall-bini rapidu u faċli ta' interfaċċji lingwistiċi naturali għal bażijiet ta' dejta għal dominji ġodda, li l-prestazzjoni tagħhom titjieb maż-żmien ibbażata fuq ir-rispons tal-utent, u jeħtieġ intervent minimu. Biex niksbu dan, aħna nadattaw mudelli ta’ sekwenza newrali biex nimmappjaw it-testijiet direttament għal SQL bl-espressività sħiħa tiegħu, billi nibgħu lil kwalunkwe rappreżentazzjoni ta’ tifsira intermedja. Dawn il-mudelli jintużaw immedjatament onlajn biex jitolbu feedback minn utenti reali biex jimmarkaw mistoqsijiet mhux korretti. Fl-aħħar nett, il-popolarità tal-SQL tiffaċilita l-ġbir ta’ annotazzjonijiet għal tbassir mhux korrett bl-użu tal-massa, li tintuża direttament biex jittejbu l-mudelli tagħna. Dan iċ-ċirkwit komplet ta’ feedback, mingħajr rappreżentazzjonijiet intermedji jew inġinerija speċifika għall-bażi tad-dejta, jiftaħ modi ġodda ta’ bini ta’ analizzaturi semantiċi ta’ kwalità għolja. L-esperimenti jissuġġerixxu li dan l-approċċ jista’ jintuża malajr għal kwalunkwe dominju ġdid fil-mira, kif juru bit-tagħlim ta’ analizzatur semantiku għal database akkademika onlajn mill-bidu.", 'lt': 'We present an approach to rapidly and easily build natural language interfaces to databases for new domains, whose performance improves over time based on user feedback, and requires minimal intervention.  Siekiant to, mes pritaikome nervų sekos modelius, kad išraiškos būtų tiesiogiai mapuojamos į SQL visapusiškai išraiškavus, nepaisydami bet kokių tarpinių reikšmių atvaizdų. Šie modeliai nedelsiant diegiami internete, kad iš tikrųjų naudotojų būtų prašoma pateikti informaciją apie neteisingus klausimus. Galiausiai, SQL populiarumas padeda surinkti anotacijas dėl neteisingų prognozių naudojant minią, kuri tiesiogiai naudojama mūsų modeliams tobulinti. Šis visiškas grįžtamojo ryšio tinklas, kuriame nėra tarpinių atstovybių arba specialios duomenų bazės inžinerijos, atveria naujus būdus sukurti aukštos kokybės semantinius analizatorius. Eksperimentai rodo, kad šis metodas gali būti greitai taikomas bet kuriai naujai tikslinei sričiai, kaip rodome iš pradžių išmokant semantinio analizatoriaus internetinei akademinei duomenų bazei.', 'mn': 'Бид маш хурдан, амархан байгалийн хэл интерфейсийг шинэ сүлжээний өгөгдлийн санд бий болгож, хэрэглэгчийн хариултын үндсэн цаг хугацаанд ажиллагаа улам сайжруулж, бага зэрэг оролцох хэрэгтэй. Үүнийг хүртэхийн тулд бид мэдрэлийн дарааллын загваруудыг шууд SQL-д шууд илэрхийлэлтэй газрын зураг зурж, дундаж утгыг илэрхийлэх боломжтой. Эдгээр загварууд бодит хэрэглэгчдийн хариултыг буруу квадратуудыг хуулбарлахын тулд онлайн хэлбэрээр ашиглана. Эцэст нь SQL-ийн нэр хүндрэл нь олон нийгмийг ашиглаж буруу таамаглалтуудыг цуглуулахад тусалдаг. Энэ нь бидний загварыг сайжруулахад шууд хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ бүхэл хариу үйл ажиллагаа, өгөгдлийн сан тодорхой инженерчлэлгүй, өндөр чанартай semantic parsers бүтээх шинэ арга замыг нээж байна. Үүний туршилт нь шинэ зорилготой холбоонд хурдан ашиглах боломжтой гэж үздэг. Бид онлайн академикийн өгөгдлийн сан суралцаж суралцаж үздэг.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk membangun dengan cepat dan mudah antaramuka bahasa semulajadi ke pangkalan data untuk domain baru, prestasinya meningkat dengan masa berdasarkan balas balik pengguna, dan memerlukan intervensi minimal. Untuk mencapai ini, kita menyesuaikan model urutan saraf untuk memetakan ungkapan langsung kepada SQL dengan ekspresifiti penuh, melepasi mana-mana perwakilan makna tengah. These models are immediately deployed online to solicit feedback from real users to flag incorrect queries.  Akhirnya, popularitas SQL memudahkan mengumpulkan anotasi untuk ramalan yang salah menggunakan ramai, yang digunakan secara langsung untuk meningkatkan model kita. Loop balas lengkap ini, tanpa perwakilan sementara atau teknik pangkalan data khusus, membuka cara baru untuk membina penghurai semantik kualiti tinggi. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan ini boleh dilaksanakan dengan cepat untuk mana-mana domain sasaran baru, seperti yang kita tunjukkan dengan mempelajari penghurai semantik untuk pangkalan data akademik online dari awal.', 'mk': 'Презентираме пристап за брзо и лесно изградба на природни јазички интерфејси за бази на податоци за нови домени, чија перформанса се подобрува со текот на времето базирана на корисничката реакција и бара минимална интервенција. За да го постигнеме ова, ги адаптираме моделите на нервната секвенца за да ги мапираме изразите директно на SQL со целосна експресивност, избегнувајќи било какво меѓувреме значење претставувања. Овие модели се веднаш распоредени онлајн за да бараат реакција од вистинските корисници за да означат погрешни прашања. Конечно, популарноста на SQL го олеснува собирањето на анотации за погрешни предвидувања користејќи ја публиката, која е директно употребена за подобрување на нашите модели. Оваа целосна врска за враќање, без меѓувремени претставувања или специфично инженерство на базата на податоци, отвора нови начини за изградба на висококвалитетни семантични анализатори. Експериментите укажуваат на тоа дека овој пристап може да се распоредува брзо за било кој нов домен на мета, како што покажуваме со научување семантичен анализатор за онлајн академска база на податоци од нула.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy podejście do szybkiego i łatwego budowania interfejsów językowych naturalnych do baz danych dla nowych domen, których wydajność z biegiem czasu poprawia się w oparciu o opinie użytkowników i wymaga minimalnej interwencji. Aby to osiągnąć, dostosowujemy modele sekwencji neuronowych, aby mapować wypowiedzi bezpośrednio do SQL z pełną ekspresyjnością, omijając wszelkie pośrednie reprezentacje znaczenia. Modele te są natychmiast wdrażane online, aby uzyskać informacje zwrotne od prawdziwych użytkowników w celu oznaczenia nieprawidłowych zapytań. Wreszcie popularność SQL ułatwia gromadzenie adnotacji dla nieprawidłowych prognoz za pomocą tłumu, który jest bezpośrednio wykorzystywany do ulepszania naszych modeli. Ta kompletna pętla sprzężenia zwrotnego, bez pośrednich reprezentacji lub specyficznej inżynierii bazy danych, otwiera nowe sposoby budowy wysokiej jakości parserów semantycznych. Eksperymenty sugerują, że podejście to może być szybko wdrożone dla każdej nowej domeny docelowej, co pokazujemy, ucząc się parser semantyczny dla internetowej akademickiej bazy danych od podstaw.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein tilnærming til raskt og enkelt bygging av naturspråk- grensesnitt til databaser for nye domene, som utviklinga er forbetra over tid basert på tilbakemelding av brukaren, og krev minimal intervensjon. For å oppnå dette, tilpassar vi neuralsekvensmodeller for å kartera uttrykk direkte til SQL med fullstendig uttrykk, ved å gjere alle mellombelse uttrykk. Desse modelane er direkte utførte på nettet for å løysa tilbakemelding frå verkelege brukarar til å flagga feil spørjingar. Etter slutt, populariteten av SQL er tilgjengeleg å samla merknader for feil foregåver ved bruk av publikum, som vert direkte brukt for å forbedra modelane våre. Dette fullførte tilbakemeldingsløket opnar nye måtar å bygge høg kvalitet semantiske tolkarar uten mellombelse representasjonar eller databasespesifikke inženjering. Eksperimentar tyder på at denne tilnærminga kan verta utført raskt for alle nye måldområde, som vi viser ved å læra ein semantisk tolkar for eit internett akademisk database frå å å rulla.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare pentru a construi rapid și ușor interfețe lingvistice naturale pentru bazele de date pentru domenii noi, a căror performanță se îmbunătățește în timp pe baza feedback-ului utilizatorilor și necesită intervenție minimă. Pentru a realiza acest lucru, adaptăm modelele de secvență neurală pentru a cartografia pronunțările direct la SQL cu expresivitatea sa completă, ocolind orice reprezentare intermediară a semnificației. Aceste modele sunt implementate imediat online pentru a solicita feedback de la utilizatorii reali pentru a semnala interogările incorecte. În cele din urmă, popularitatea SQL facilitează colectarea adnotărilor pentru previziuni incorecte folosind mulțimea, care este utilizată direct pentru a îmbunătăți modelele noastre. Această buclă completă de feedback, fără reprezentări intermediare sau inginerie specifică bazei de date, deschide noi modalități de a construi parsere semantice de înaltă calitate. Experimentele sugerează că această abordare poate fi implementată rapid pentru orice domeniu țintă nou, așa cum arătăm prin învățarea unui parser semantic pentru o bază de date academică online de la zero.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup brzom i lako izgraditi prirodne jezičke interfejse u baze podataka za nove domene, čija je provedba poboljšala tokom vremena na osnovu reakcije korisnika i zahteva minimalnu intervenciju. Da bi to ostvarili, prilagodimo se modelima neuralne sekvence da mapiramo izraze direktno na SQL sa svojom punom izrazitošću, prelazeći bilo koje međuvremene predstave značenja. Ovi modeli su odmah raspoređeni na internetu da bi tražili odgovor od pravih korisnika na zastavu nepravnih ispitivanja. Na kraju, popularnost SQL olakšava okupljanje annotacija za nepravde predviđanja koristeći gomilu, koja se direktno koristi za poboljšanje našeg modela. Ovaj kompletni loop reakcije, bez prosječnih predstavljanja ili specifičnog inženjerstva baze podataka, otvara nove načine izgradnje semantičkih parsera visokokvalitete. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da se ovaj pristup može brzo rasporediti za bilo koju novu ciljnu domenu, kao što pokazujemo učeći semantički analizator za internetsku akademijsku bazu podataka iz ogrebotine.', 'so': "Dhaqso iyo si fudud ayaannu u sameynaa Interfacyada luuqada asalka ah ee loogu talagalay macluumaadka cusub, kaas oo lagu beddelayo waqti ka badan oo ku saleysan dib u celinta isticmaalaha, wuxuuna u baahan yahay mid u dhaqdhaqaaq ah. To achieve this, we adapt neural sequence models to map utterances directly to SQL with its full expressivity, bypassing any intermediate meaning representations.  Tusaaladan waxaa markiiba looga soo diraa internetka si ay u dalbaan jawaab-celinta isticmaalayaasha runta ah si ay u baaraandegaan su'aalo khalad ah. Ugu dambaysta, dadka SQL u dhaadheer wuxuu diyaariyaa in loo soo ururiyo warqado khalad ah oo lagu isticmaalo dadka sida toos loo isticmaalo in uu horumariyo modellkayaga. Sidan buuxinta dib u celinta ah oo aan la’aanin mid-dhexe ah ama baabuurta macluumaadka oo gaar ah, wuxuu furaa waddooyin cusub oo uu dhiso baaritaanka sare oo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqanaya in qaababkan dhaqso looga soo dejin karo goobaha cusub, taas oo a an ku tusno barashada iskuulka ee shabakadda iskuulka ah ee internetka.", 'si': 'අපි ඉක්මනින් ඉක්මනින් සහ ලේසියෙන් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා අලුත් ඩෝමේන්ස් වෙනුවෙන් තොරතුරු බේස් එක මේක සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න, අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් ක්\u200dරමණ මොඩේල්ස් එක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් SQL වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න, ඒකේ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200d මේ මොඩේල් ඉක්මනින් අන්ලයින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් වැරදි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කර අන්තිමේදි, SQL ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහයෙන් අවුරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා අවුරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා අවුරුද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒක අප මේ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැතුව, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැතුව, ඩාටාබේස් විශේෂ ඉන්ජිනිජ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා මේ විදිහට ඉක්මනින් අළුත් ලක්ෂණ ඩෝමේන් වලට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අපි පෙන්', 'ta': 'நாம் விரைவில் மற்றும் எளிதாக இயல்பான மொழி இடைமுகங்களை புதிய களஞ்சியங்களுக்கு உருவாக்க ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அதன் செயல்பா இதை அடைவதற்கு, நாம் புதிய தொடர் மாதிரிகளை SQL க்கு நேரடியாக வரைபடத்திற்கு ஏற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம், அதன் முழு கூற்றிலும், எந்த இடைமுறை அர்த இந்த மாதிரிகள் உடனடியாக அனுப்பப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள் உண்மையான பயனர் இறுதியில், எஸ்கியூஎலின் மக்கள் தொகுதியை பயன்படுத்தி தவறான முன்வாக்கியங்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்க உதவுகிறது, அது நேரடியாக எங்கள் மாதிரிகள This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers.  முயற்சிகள் இந்த அணுக்கம் எந்த புதிய இலக்கு தளத்திற்கும் விரைவாக வெளியேற்றப்பட முடியும் என்பது தெரிவிக்கிறது, நாம் ஒரு பெமான்டிக்', 'ur': 'ہم جلد اور آسان طریقے کے لئے نئی ڈومین کے لئے طبیعی زبان انٹرنیسٹ بناتے ہیں، جن کی عملکرد زمان کے ذریعہ استعمال کرتا ہے، اور کم انٹرنیسٹ کی ضرورت ہے. یہ کام کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے نئورل سفارشی موڈل کو SQL کے لئے مستقیماً نقشه مثال کے ساتھ اضافہ کردیا ہے، اس کی پوری مثال کے ساتھ، ہر میانہ مثال کی تعبیر کو اضافہ کردیا ہے. یہ موڈلے فوراً آنلاین کے لئے حقیقی کارساز سے فیڈ پک کی تلاوت کرنے کے لئے غلط سؤال کرنے کے لئے ڈالے جاتے ہیں. بالآخر، SQL کی جماعت نے جماعت کے مطابق غلط پیش بینی کے لئے اظہارات جمع کرنے کے لئے آسان کر دی ہے، جو ہماری مدل کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے مستقیم استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. یہ کامل فیڈبک لپ، بین میڈریٹ نمایش یا ڈیٹابیس خاص انجینر کے بغیر، اچھی کیفیت سیمانٹی پارس بنانے کے نو طریقے کھول دیتا ہے. تجربیات کی توصیف کرتی ہے کہ یہ طریقہ ہر نئی موجود ڈومین کے لئے سریع طریقہ کے ساتھ استعمال کر سکتی ہے، جیسے ہم اسراچ سے ایک آنلاین علمی ڈیٹابیس کے لئے سیمنٹی پارچر کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ دکھاتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för att snabbt och enkelt bygga naturliga språkgränssnitt till databaser för nya domäner, vars prestanda förbättras över tid baserat på användarfeedback och kräver minimal intervention. För att uppnå detta anpassar vi neurala sekvensmodeller för att kartlägga yttranden direkt till SQL med dess fulla expressivitet, kringgå eventuella mellanliggande betydelserepresentationer. Dessa modeller distribueras omedelbart online för att begära feedback från riktiga användare för att flagga felaktiga frågor. Slutligen underlättar populariteten av SQL insamling av anteckningar för felaktiga förutsägelser med hjälp av publiken, som direkt används för att förbättra våra modeller. Denna kompletta återkopplingsslinga, utan mellanliggande representationer eller databasspecifik teknik, öppnar upp nya sätt att bygga högkvalitativa semantiska tolkare. Experiment tyder på att detta tillvägagångssätt kan användas snabbt för alla nya måldomäner, vilket vi visar genom att lära oss en semantisk parser för en akademisk online databas från grunden.', 'uz': "Biz tez va oddiy oddiy tilning tarkibini yangi domen asboblar bazalariga ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin. Ular foydalanuvchiga javob berish asosida bajarish vaqtdan bajarishi mumkin va minimal intervention kerak. Buni amalga oshirish uchun biz so'zlarni SQL bilan butun imkoniyatlarni qo'yish uchun neyural seksirlik modellarini qo'yish mumkin. These models are immediately deployed online to solicit feedback from real users to flag incorrect queries.  Endi, SQL jamiyati, jamiyatlarni yordamida notoʻgʻri taqdimotlarni birlashtirishga ruxsat beradi. Bu modellarimizni yaxshi ko'ra ishlatiladi. @ info: whatsthis Tajribalar shunday qiladi, bu usulni yangi foydalanuvchi domen uchun tez ishlab chiqarish mumkin, chunki biz Online akademik maʼlumot bazasini o'rganish uchun semantik parameterni o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp về việc lập giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên nhanh chóng và dễ dàng cho cơ sở dữ liệu của những miền mới, hiệu quả của chúng tăng lên theo thời gian dựa trên phản hồi của người dùng, và đòi hỏi một sự can thiệp tối thiểu. Để đạt được điều này, chúng ta thích ứng các mô hình phân tử thần kinh để vẽ bản đồ trực tiếp với SQL với tính biểu lộ đầy đủ, vượt qua các biểu hiện ý nghĩa trung gian. Những mẫu này được lập tức bật trực tuyến để yêu cầu phản hồi từ người dùng thực để đánh dấu các yêu cầu sai. Tóm lại, phổ biến SQL giúp đỡ ghi chú những dự đoán sai thông qua đám đông, được sử dụng trực tiếp để cải tiến mô hình của chúng ta. Cái vòng quay hoàn chỉnh này, không có các trình chiếu tạm thời hay cơ sở dữ liệu đặc biệt, mở ra những cách mới để xây dựng các phân tích/ngữ học chất cao. Thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp này có thể được triển khai nhanh chóng cho bất kỳ miền đích mới nào, như chúng ta đã thấy bằng cách học hỏi một cha vấn ngữ pháp cho một cơ sở dữ liệu học trực tuyến từ đầu.', 'bg': 'Представяме подход за бързо и лесно изграждане на естествени езикови интерфейси към бази данни за нови домейни, чиято ефективност се подобрява с течение на времето въз основа на обратната връзка от потребителите и изисква минимална намеса. За да постигнем това, адаптираме модели на невронни последователности, за да картографираме изказванията директно към с пълната си експресивност, заобикаляйки всякакви междинни представи на значението. Тези модели незабавно се въвеждат онлайн, за да поискат обратна връзка от реални потребители, за да маркират неправилни запитвания. И накрая, популярността на улеснява събирането на анотации за неправилни прогнози с помощта на тълпата, която се използва директно за подобряване на нашите модели. Този пълен цикъл за обратна връзка, без междинни представяния или специфично инженерство за база данни, отваря нови начини за изграждане на висококачествени семантични анализатори. Експериментите предполагат, че този подход може да бъде внедрен бързо за всеки нов целев домейн, както показваме чрез изучаване на семантичен анализатор за онлайн академична база данни от нулата.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pristup brzom i lakom izgradnji prirodne jezičke interfejse na baze podataka za nove domene, čija se učinka poboljšava tijekom vremena na temelju povratka korisnika i zahtijeva minimalnu intervenciju. Da bi to postigli, prilagođavamo se modelima neuralne sekvence na mapu izravnih izraza SQL-u s potpunom izrazitošću, prelazeći bilo koje međuvremene predstave značenja. Ovi modeli su odmah raspoređeni na internetu kako bi tražili odgovor od pravih korisnika na zastavu nepravnih ispitivanja. Konačno, popularnost SQL-a olakšava okupljanje annotacija za nepravde predviđanja koristeći gomilu, koja se direktno koristi za poboljšanje naših modela. Ovaj potpuni krug povratka, bez prosječnih predstavljanja ili specifičnog inženjerstva baze podataka, otvara nove načine za izgradnju semantičkih parsera visoke kvalitete. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da se taj pristup može brzo rasporediti za bilo koju novu ciljnu domenu, kao što pokazujemo učeći semantički analizač internetske akademijske baze podataka iz ogrebotine.', 'nl': "We presenteren een aanpak om snel en eenvoudig natuurlijke taalinterfaces te bouwen voor databases voor nieuwe domeinen, waarvan de prestaties in de loop van de tijd verbeteren op basis van gebruikersfeedback en minimale interventie vereisen. Om dit te bereiken passen we neurale sequentiemodellen aan om uitspraken direct in kaart te brengen aan SQL met zijn volledige expressiviteit, waarbij tussentijdse betekenisrepresentaties worden omzeild. Deze modellen worden onmiddellijk online ingezet om feedback te vragen van echte gebruikers om onjuiste query's te markeren. Ten slotte vergemakkelijkt de populariteit van SQL het verzamelen van annotaties voor onjuiste voorspellingen met behulp van de crowd, die direct wordt gebruikt om onze modellen te verbeteren. Deze complete feedbackloop, zonder tussenliggende representaties of database specifieke engineering, opent nieuwe manieren om semantische parsers van hoge kwaliteit te bouwen. Experimenten suggereren dat deze aanpak snel kan worden ingezet voor elk nieuw doeldomein, zoals we laten zien door een semantische parser voor een online academische database vanaf nul te leren.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en tilgang til hurtigt og nemt at opbygge naturlige sproggrænseflader til databaser til nye domæner, hvis ydeevne forbedres over tid baseret på brugerfeedback og kræver minimal indgriben. For at opnå dette tilpasser vi neurale sekvensmodeller til at kortlægge udtalelser direkte til SQL med sin fulde udtryksevne, og omgå eventuelle mellemliggende meningsrepræsentationer. Disse modeller implementeres straks online for at opfordre til feedback fra rigtige brugere til at markere forkerte forespørgsler. Endelig letter populariteten af SQL indsamling af kommentarer til forkerte forudsigelser ved hjælp af crowd, som bruges direkte til at forbedre vores modeller. Denne komplette feedback loop, uden mellemliggende repræsentationer eller databasespecifik teknik, åbner op for nye måder at opbygge semantiske fortolkere af høj kvalitet. Eksperimenter tyder på, at denne tilgang hurtigt kan implementeres for ethvert nyt måldomæne, som vi viser ved at lære en semantisk fortolker til en online akademisk database fra bunden.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen Ansatz, um schnell und einfach natürliche Sprachschnittstellen zu Datenbanken für neue Domänen zu erstellen, deren Leistung sich im Laufe der Zeit aufgrund von Benutzerfeedback verbessert und minimale Eingriffe erfordert. Um dies zu erreichen, passen wir neuronale Sequenzmodelle an, um Äußerungen direkt auf SQL mit seiner vollen Expressivität abzubilden und dabei jegliche zwischenzeitliche Bedeutungsrepräsentationen zu umgehen. Diese Modelle werden sofort online bereitgestellt, um Feedback von echten Benutzern einzuholen, um falsche Abfragen zu kennzeichnen. Schließlich erleichtert die Popularität von SQL das Sammeln von Anmerkungen für falsche Vorhersagen mithilfe der Crowd, die direkt zur Verbesserung unserer Modelle verwendet wird. Diese komplette Feedbackschleife, ohne Zwischenrepräsentationen oder datenbankspezifisches Engineering, eröffnet neue Möglichkeiten, qualitativ hochwertige semantische Parser zu erstellen. Experimente deuten darauf hin, dass dieser Ansatz schnell für jede neue Zieldomäne eingesetzt werden kann, wie wir zeigen, indem wir einen semantischen Parser für eine wissenschaftliche Online-Datenbank von Grund auf erlernen.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk dengan cepat dan mudah membangun antarmuka bahasa alam ke pangkalan data untuk domain baru, prestasinya meningkat dengan waktu berdasarkan feedback pengguna, dan membutuhkan intervensi minimal. Untuk mencapai hal ini, kita menyesuaikan model urutan saraf untuk memetakan ungkapan langsung ke SQL dengan ekspresivitas penuh, melewati setiap representation arti intermedi. Model ini segera disebarkan online untuk meminta feedback dari pengguna asli untuk menandai pertanyaan yang salah. Akhirnya, popularitas SQL memudahkan mengumpulkan anotasi untuk prediksi yang salah menggunakan kerumunan, yang langsung digunakan untuk meningkatkan model kita. Loop feedback lengkap ini, tanpa representation intermedi atau insinyur database spesifik, membuka cara baru untuk membangun parser semantis kualitas tinggi. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan ini dapat disebarkan dengan cepat untuk domain target baru apapun, seperti yang kita tunjukkan dengan belajar parser semantis untuk database akademik online dari awal.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش برای سریع و آسان ساختن interfaces زبان طبیعی به پایگاه\u200cهای داده\u200cها برای دامنه\u200cهای جدید را نشان می\u200cدهیم، که عملکرد آن در طول زمان بر اساس بازگشت کاربر بهتر می\u200cشود، و نیاز به پایگاه\u200cهای کمینی است. برای رسیدن به این موضوع، ما مدل\u200cهای ترکیب عصبی را برای نقشه\u200cهای سخنرانی مستقیماً به SQL با توجه کامل، با گذروندن هر معنی بین\u200cالمللی adapt می\u200cکنیم. این مدلها فوراً در اینترنت برای خواسته بازگشت از کاربران واقعی به پرچم سوالات غلط استفاده می\u200cشوند. بالاخره، شهرت SQL برای جمع آگاهی برای پیش بینی\u200cهای غلط با استفاده از جمعیت، که مستقیماً برای بهبود مدل\u200cهای ما استفاده می\u200cشود، آسان می\u200cکند. این چرخۀ بازگشت کامل، بدون نمایش\u200cهای بین\u200cالمللی یا مهندسی داده\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای، راه\u200cهای جدید برای ساختن پارسالهای کیفیت بالا را باز می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که این روش می\u200cتواند سریع برای هر دامنۀ هدف جدید به طور سریع تغییر داده شود، همانطور که ما با یاد گرفتن یک بازیگر semantic برای یک داده\u200cگاه دانشگاه آنلاین از خرچ نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n toegang aan vinnig en maklik natuurlike taal koppelinge op databasis vir nuwe domeine te bou, wie se prestasie verbeter oor tyd gebaseer op gebruiker terugmelding, en benodig minimale intervensie. Om hierdie te bereik, pas ons neurale volgorde modele aan na kaart uitdrukkings direk na SQL met sy volle uitdrukking, deur enige middelste betekenis verteenwoordings te verbygaan. Hierdie modele is onmiddellik aanlyn uitgebruik na solicit terugmelding van regte gebruikers na vlaggie verkeerde vraag. Eindelik, die populariteit van SQL maak die versameling van notasies vir verkeerde voorskou gebruik van die skare, wat direk gebruik word om ons modele te verbeter. Hierdie volledige terugmelding loop, sonder intermediate voorstellings of databasis spesifieke inženiering, maak nuwe maniere om hoë kwaliteit semantiese verwerkers te bou. Eksperimente beveel dat hierdie toegang vinnig vir enige nuwe doel domein kan ontvang word, soos ons vertoon deur 'n semantiese ontwerker te leer vir 'n online akademiese databasis vanaf skratch.", 'tr': "Biz tiz we aňsatlyk bilen tebigy dil interfejlerini täze alanlar üçin databaselere ýerleşdirýäris we onuň etkinlik wagtyň reaksiýasyna daýan ýar we düşük intervjularyny gerek. Bunu başarmak için, nöral sıralama modellerini SQL'e doğrudan ifade etmeleri ile, ortalama ifade örneklerini geçirmek üzere adapte ediyoruz. Bu nusgalar hakyky ulananlardan nädogry soraglary diňlemek üçin internetde edildi. Soňunda, SQL'iň popülerligi adamlarymyzyň nusgalarymyzy gelişmek üçin ýalňyş öngörümleri toplamaga kömek edip otyrýar. Bu netijesi, beýik kaliwatly semantik parserçylary gurmakyň täze ýolüni açar. Experimentalar şu metodyň täze maksady domeny üçin çalt döredilebilir, sebäbi internetden bir akademiki databank üçin semantik parser öwrenip bilýäris.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje për të ndërtuar me shpejtësi dhe lehtësi interfaqe gjuhësh natyrore në bazat e të dhënave për fusha të reja, performanca e të cilave përmirësohet me kohë bazuar në përgjigjet e përdoruesve dhe kërkon ndërhyrje minimale. Për të arritur këtë, ne përshtatemi modelet e sekuencës nervore për të hartuar shprehjet drejtpërdrejt në SQL me shprehjen e plotë të saj, duke shmangur çdo përfaqësim të kuptimit të ndërmjetësuar. Këto modele janë vendosur menjëherë në internet për të kërkuar feedback nga përdoruesit e vërtetë për të vënë në shenjë pyetje të gabuara. Më në fund, popullariteti i SQL lehtëson mbledhjen e anotacioneve për parashikime të gabuara duke përdorur turmën, e cila përdoret drejtpërdrejt për të përmirësuar modelet tona. This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers.  Eksperimentet sugjerojnë se kjo qasje mund të përdoret shpejt për çdo domeni të ri objektiv, siç tregojmë duke mësuar një analizues semantik për një bazë të dhënash akademike online nga zero.', 'am': 'ፈጥኖ እና ለፍጥረት ቋንቋዎች የግንኙነቶችን ለመሥራት ቀላል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለዚህ ለማድረግ፣ የነዌራዊ ምርጫዎች ቃላትን ወደ SQL አቅራቢያ ለመስመር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የእውነቱ ተጠቃሚዎች መልስ ጥያቄን ለመጠየቅ ጥያቄዎችን ለመጠየቅ ወደዚህ ቁጥጥር በመስመር ላይ ይስደዳሉ፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ የSQL ህዝብ ብዙኃን በመጠቀም የስህተት ውይይት ለመሰብሰብ ያበረታል፣ ይህም ሞዴላዎቻችንን ለማሻል በተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ይህ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ በመካከለኛ መልዕክቶች ወይም የዳታ መቀመጫዎች አካባቢ ኢንጂንጂንጂር ሳይኖር አዲስ የጥያቄ የsemantic ፓርስር መሥራት አዲስ መንገድን ይከፍታል፡፡ ፈተናዎች ይህ ሥርዓት ወደ አዲስ አዲስ ዶሜን ፈጥኖ እንዲያስቀምጥ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք արագ և հեշտ բնական լեզվի ինտերֆեյսներ ստեղծելու մոտեցում նոր ոլորտների տվյալների բազաներին, որոնց արտադրողությունը ժամանակի ընթացքում բարելավվում է օգտագործողների արձագանքի վրա և պահանջում է մինիմա Սա հասնելու համար, մենք հարմարեցնում ենք նյարդային հաջորդականության մոդելները, որպեսզի քարտեզագրենք արտահայտությունները ուղղակի SQL-ի վրա իր ամբողջ արտահայտությամբ, անտեսելով ցանկացած միջին նշանակության արտահայտություն Այս մոդելները անմիջապես օգտագործվում են առցանց, որպեսզի իրական օգտագործողներից ստանան արձագանքներ սխալ հարցերի նշանակելու համար: Վերջապես, SQL-ի բնակչությունը հնարավորություն է տալիս ձայնագրություններ հավաքել սխալ կանխատեսումների համար, օգտագործելով ամբոխը, որը անմիջապես օգտագործվում է մեր մոդելների բարելավման համար: This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers.  Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մոտեցումը կարող է արագ օգտագործվել ցանկացած նոր նպատակային ոլորտի համար, ինչպես ցույց ենք տալիս սեմանտիկ վերլուծողի սովորելով առցանց ակադեմիական բազայի համար զրոյից:', 'az': 'Biz tələm və asanlıqla təbiətli dil interfejlərini yeni domenalar üçün verilən veritabanlara tərəf göstəririk, və onların performansı vaxtlarda istifadəçilərin reaksiyasına dayanan və minimal intervansı lazımdır. Bunu başa düşmək üçün, nöral sıralama modellərini SQL-ə düzgün ifadə edərək, hər bir orta məsələnin ifadə edilməsini yoldan çıxartmaq üçün müəyyən edirik. Bu modellər həqiqət istifadəçilərdən haqsız soruşmaları tələb etmək üçün online tərəfindən istifadə edilir. Sonunda, SQL məşhurluğu qövmünün istifadəsində yanlış tədbirlərin məlumatlarını toplamağa fayda verər, bu modellərimizi yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün doğrudan istifadə edilir. Bu tamamlama feedback dönüşü, həmçinin tərzim göstəriciləri və həmçinin database mühendisliyi olmadan, yüksək kaliteli semantik ayırıcıları inşa etmək üçün yeni yollar açar. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr bu metodların hər yeni məqsəd domeinə çabuk istifadə edilməsini iddia edirlər, çünki biz online akademik databasesini öyrəndik.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 분야의 데이터베이스에 자연 언어 인터페이스를 신속하고 가볍게 구축하는 방법을 제시했다. 그 성능은 시간의 추이에 따라 사용자의 피드백에 따라 향상되고 최소한의 관여가 필요하다.이를 실현하기 위해 우리는 신경 서열 모델을 이용하여 그 어떠한 중간 의미 표시를 돌아서 말을 완전한 표현 능력을 가진 SQL에 직접 비추었다.이러한 모델은 즉시 온라인으로 배치하여 실제 사용자의 피드백을 구하고 잘못된 조회를 표시한다.마지막으로 SQL의 유행은 그룹을 이용하여 오류 예측에 대한 주석을 수집하는 데 도움이 되고 그룹은 우리의 모델을 개선하는 데 직접 사용된다.이런 완전한 피드백 순환은 중간 표시나 특정한 데이터베이스 프로젝트가 없기 때문에 고품질 의미 해석기를 구축하기 위해 새로운 경로를 열었다.실험에 의하면 이러한 방법은 모든 새로운 목표 분야에 신속하게 배치할 수 있다. 마치 우리가 처음부터 온라인 학술 데이터베이스의 의미 해석기를 배운 것과 같다.', 'bn': 'আমরা দ্রুত এবং সহজে নতুন ডোমেইনের ডাটাবেসে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেস তৈরি করার একটি উপায় উপস্থাপন করি, যাদের কাজ ব্যবহারকারীর ফিডব্যাক ভিত্ত এটা অর্জনের জন্য আমরা নিউরেল সেকেন্ড মডেলের মাধ্যমে সরাসরি শব্দগুলোকে এসকিউএলের কাছে মানচিত্রের মাধ্যমে মানচিত্রের মাধ্যমে মানচ বাস্তব ব্যবহারকারীদের কাছ থেকে ফিডিব্যাক চাওয়ার জন্য এই মডেলগুলো সাথে অনলাইনে প্রেরণ করা হয়েছে যাতে তারা সঠিক প্ অবশেষে, এসকিউএলের জনপ্রিয় জনপ্রিয়তা জনগণের মাধ্যমে ভুল ভবিষ্যৎবাণী ব্যবহার করার জন্য বিবেচনা সংগ্রহ করার সুযোগ প্রদান করেছে, যা সর এই পুরোপুরি ফিডিব্যাক লুপ, কোন মাঝামাঝি প্রতিনিধিত্ব বা ডাটাবেস নির্দিষ্ট ইঞ্জিনিয়ার ছাড়া, উচ্চ মানের সেমেন্টি পরীক্ষার পরামর্শ প্রস্তাব করছে যে এই পদ্ধতি নতুন টার্গেট ডোমেইনের জন্য দ্রুত প্রাপ্ত হবে, যেহেতু আমরা অনলাইন একাডেমিক ডাটাবেসের জন্য একটি সেম', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament per construir ràpidament i fàcilment interfaces de llenguatge natural a bases de dades per a nous dominys, el rendiment dels quals millora amb el temps basat en el feedback dels usuaris i requereix una intervenció mínima. Per aconseguir això, adaptem models de seqüència neuronal per mapejar expressions directament a SQL amb la seva expressivitat completa, evitant qualsevol representació intermediària de significat. Aquests models s'implantan immediatament en línia per solicitar feedback dels usuaris reals per indicar preguntes incorrectes. Finalment, la popularitat d'SQL facilita recollir anotacions per prediccions incorrectes utilitzant la multitud, que s'utilitza directament per millorar els nostres models. Aquest bucle de feedback complet, sense representacions intermedies o enginyeria específica de bases de dades, obre noves maneres de construir analitzadors semàntics d'alta qualitat. Els experiments suggereixen que aquest enfocament pot ser desplegat ràpidament per a qualsevol nou domini objectiu, com demostram aprenent un analitzador semàntic per a una base de dades acadèmiques en línia des de zero.", 'et': 'Esitame lähenemisviisi looduskeeleliste liidesete kiireks ja lihtsaks ehitamiseks uute domeenide andmebaasidesse, mille jõudlus paraneb aja jooksul kasutajate tagasiside põhjal ning nõuab minimaalset sekkumist. Selle saavutamiseks kohandame närvijada mudeleid, et kaardistada väljendused otse SQL-i täieliku väljendusvõimega, möödudes mis tahes vahepealsest tähendusest. Need mudelid võetakse kohe võrgus kasutusele, et küsida reaalsetelt kasutajatelt tagasisidet ebaõigete päringute märkimiseks. Lõpuks hõlbustab SQL populaarsus märkuste kogumist ebaõigete prognooside jaoks, kasutades rahvamassi, mida kasutatakse otseselt meie mudelite täiustamiseks. See täielik tagasiside silmus, ilma vahepealsete esituste või andmebaasipõhise insenerita, avab uued viisid kvaliteetsete semantiliste parserite ehitamiseks. Eksperimentid näitavad, et seda lähenemisviisi saab kiiresti kasutusele võtta mis tahes uue sihtdomeeni puhul, nagu näitame, õppides algusest peale semantilist parserit veebipõhise akadeemilise andmebaasi jaoks.', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup k rychlému a snadnému vytváření rozhraní přirozeného jazyka k databázím pro nové domény, jejichž výkon se v průběhu času zlepšuje na základě zpětné vazby uživatelů a vyžaduje minimální zásahy. Abychom toho dosáhli, adaptujeme neuronové sekvenční modely tak, aby mapovaly výroky přímo do SQL s jeho plnou expresivitou, přičemž obejdeme jakékoliv mezipřední reprezentace významu. Tyto modely jsou okamžitě nasazeny online, aby vyžádaly zpětnou vazbu od skutečných uživatelů, aby označili nesprávné dotazy. A konečně, popularita SQL usnadňuje shromažďování anotací pro nesprávné predikce pomocí davu, který je přímo využíván k vylepšování našich modelů. Tato kompletní smyčka zpětné vazby, bez mezireprezentace nebo databázového specifického inženýrství, otevírá nové způsoby vytváření vysoce kvalitních sémantických parserů. Experimenty naznačují, že tento přístup lze rychle nasadit pro jakoukoliv novou cílovou doménu, jak ukazujeme učením sémantického parseru pro online akademickou databázi od nuly.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme tavan rakentaa nopeasti ja helposti luonnollisia kielirajapintoja tietokantoihin uusille toimialueille, joiden suorituskyky paranee ajan myötä käyttäjien palautteen perusteella ja vaatii minimaalisia toimenpiteitä. Tämän saavuttamiseksi sovellamme neurosekvenssimalleja, jotka kartoittavat lauseet suoraan SQL:ään sen täydellä ekspressiivisyydellä ohittaen kaikki välitavoitteet. Nämä mallit otetaan välittömästi käyttöön verkossa pyytääkseen palautetta todellisilta käyttäjiltä virheellisten kyselyjen merkitsemiseksi. Lopuksi SQL:n suosio helpottaa merkintöjen keräämistä väärille ennusteille käyttämällä joukkoa, jota käytetään suoraan malliemme parantamiseen. Tämä täydellinen palautesilmukka, ilman väliesityksiä tai tietokantakohtaista suunnittelua, avaa uusia tapoja rakentaa laadukkaita semanttisia parsereita. Kokeet viittaavat siihen, että tämä lähestymistapa voidaan ottaa nopeasti käyttöön millä tahansa uudella kohdeverkkotunnuksella, kuten osoitamme oppimalla semanttisen jäsentäjän akateemiselle verkkotietokannalle tyhjästä.', 'sw': 'Tunaweka mbinu za kujenga mahusiano ya lugha ya asili kwa haraka na kwa urahisi kwa ajili ya databases kwa ajili ya maeneo mapya, ambazo vitendo vyao vinaendelea kwa muda mrefu kwa kutumia mwitikio wa watumiaji, na inahitaji kuingilia hatua kidogo. Ili kufikia hili, tunachanganya mifano ya mfumo wa neura ili kutengeneza maneno moja kwa moja kwa moja kwenye SQL kwa ufahamu wake kamili, kupitia maoni yoyote ya kati. Mifano haya mara moja zimetumiwa mtandaoni ili kutafuta maoni kutoka kwa watumiaji wa kweli ili kuingiza maswali yasiyo sahihi. Mwisho, umaarufu wa SQL unawezesha kukusanya matangazo ya kutabiri isiyo sahihi kwa kutumia umati wa umma, ambao unatumiwa moja kwa moja kuboresha mifano yetu. Mpango huu kamili wa maoni, bila uwakilishi wa kati au ubunifu maalum wa database, unafungua njia mpya ya kujenga wabunge wa kiwango kikubwa. Majaribio yanapendekeza kwamba mbinu hii inaweza kutumika haraka kwa ajili ya maeneo mapya ya malengo, kama tunavyoonyesha kwa kujifunza mchanganyiko wa kimapenzi kwa ajili ya taarifa za kitaaluma za mtandaoni kutoka kwenye viwanja vya habari.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup brzom i lako izgraditi prirodne jezičke interfejse u baze podataka za nove domene, čija je učinka poboljšala tijekom vremena na temelju reakcije korisnika i zahtijeva minimalnu intervenciju. Da bi to postigli, prilagođavamo se modelima neuralne sekvence da mapiramo izraze direktno na SQL sa svojom punom ekspresivnošću, prelazeći bilo koje međuvremene predstave značenja. Ovi modeli su odmah raspoređeni na internetu kako bi tražili reakciju od pravih korisnika na zastavu nepravnih ispitivanja. Na kraju, popularnost SQL olakšava okupljanje annotacija za nepravde predviđanja koristeći gomilu, koja se direktno koristi za poboljšanje naših modela. Ovaj potpuni krug reakcije, bez prosječnih predstavljanja ili specifičnog inženjeringa baze podataka, otvara nove načine izgradnje semantičkih parsera visokokvalitete. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da se taj pristup može brzo rasporediti za bilo koju novu ciljnu domenu, kao što pokazujemo učeći semantički analizač internetske akademijske baze podataka iz ogrebotine.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akses kanggo mbang-mbang kanggo dianggap luwih dumateng kanggo mbang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo sabên pangan anyar Ditawak dhéwé, kéné sampek model sing nêran sekènsi nggambar aturan karo mêran nggambar aturan karo sêftlané, kuwi nggawe layang seneng pisan intermediate. model iki dadi ono wektu nggo online dadi winih kanggo ngubah perusahaan kelambak karo nganggo ujian sing dibutuhke Tulung, popularno sing Kemerdekaan nggawe popularno sing luwih nggawe akeh dolanan sing dibutungan kanggo dianggap sing dibutungan popularno sing nggawe model sing bisa dianggawe FullName User', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop k hitremu in enostavnemu gradnji naravnih jezikovnih vmesnikov v baze podatkov za nove domene, katerih učinkovitost se sčasoma izboljša na podlagi povratnih informacij uporabnikov in zahteva minimalno posredovanje. Da bi to dosegli, prilagodimo modele nevronskih zaporedj, da bi kartirali izraze neposredno v SQL s polno izraznostjo in obšli vse vmesne predstavitve pomena. Ti modeli so takoj uvedeni na spletu, da bi od resničnih uporabnikov zahtevali povratne informacije, da bi označili napačne poizvedbe. Nazadnje, priljubljenost SQL olajša zbiranje opomb za napačne napovedi z uporabo množice, ki se neposredno uporablja za izboljšanje naših modelov. Ta popolna zanka povratnih informacij, brez vmesnih predstavitev ali specifičnega inženiringa baze podatkov, odpira nove načine gradnje visokokakovostnih semantičnih razčlenjevalnikov. Eksperimenti kažejo, da je ta pristop mogoče hitro uvesti za katero koli novo ciljno domeno, kar pokažemo z učenjem semantičnega razčlenjevalnika za spletno akademsko bazo podatkov iz nič.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים גישה לבניין במהירות וקלות ממשקפי שפה טבעיים לבסיסי נתונים עבור שטחים חדשים, שהביצועים שלהם משתפרים במהלך הזמן מבוססים על תשובה משתמשת, ומדורשים התערבות מינימלית. כדי להשיג את זה, אנו מתאימים דוגמני רצף עצבי למפות מבטות ישירות ל SQL עם הפרשים מלאים שלה, מתעלמים מכל מייצגים משמעותיים בינוניים. דוגמנים אלה מופעילים באופן מיידי באינטרנט כדי להזמין חזרה משתמשים אמיתיים כדי לדגל שאלות לא נכונות. סוף סוף, הפופולריות של SQL מקדימה לאסוף ציונים לחזויות לא נכונות בשימוש בקהל, אשר משתמש ישירות לשפר את הדוגמנים שלנו. This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers.  הניסויים מציעים שהגישה הזאת יכולה להיפקד מהר לכל תחום מטרה חדש, כפי שאנחנו מראים על ידי ללמוד מעבד סמנטי למאגר נתונים אקדמיים באינטרנט מאפס.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da mazaɓa zuwa ka samu'a ga sauri da sauƙi ga ka samun interfekt na harshen asili zuwa danne-danne-dangannai, wanda ya baza mafarinsa a bayan lokaci, a kan bakin mai saukarwa na amfani da shi, kuma yana ƙayyade intake da ƙari. To, idan za mu isa wannan, za'a daidaita misalin sequence na neural zuwa karta magana dira zuwa SQL da cikakken fuskar kwamfyuta, idan za'a tafiyar da duk misalin masu tsakanin. An saka wannan misãlai yanzu a samu'in tare da waɗancan, dõmin su nẽmi motsa daga masu amfani da gaskiyar zuwa misãlai masu inganci. Haƙĩƙa, umarin SQL yana da amfani da kusantar kunnuwa wa'adi mai maras so da amfani da umarni, wanda aka yi amfani da shi don ya gyara misalinmu. Wannan cikakken loop na feedback, ba da wakilishi masu tsakanin, ko kuma masu basalin database na ƙayyade masu inganci, yana buɗe hanyõyi new wa'adin yin samun parser masu tsari na sifanci. Fijaroyi na ƙayyade cewa za'a saka wannan hanyari don a iya saka wa duk wuyan taga, kamar yadda Muke nuna kwamfyuta da za'a sanar da parse ɗin semantic wa danna akadi na kusa daga taɓa.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མགྱོགས་མྱུར་ངང་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག To achieve this, we adapt neural sequence models to map utterances directly to SQL with its full expressivity, bypassing any intermediate meaning representations. These models are immediately deployed online to solicit feedback from real users to flag incorrect queries. མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ། SQL ཡི་སྐད་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འཆར་བརྗོད་སྟངས་ནི་མི་མང་པོ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག This complete feedback loop, without intermediate representations or database specific engineering, opens up new ways of building high quality semantic parsers. Experiments suggest that this approach can be deployed quickly for any new target domain, as we show by learning a semantic parser for an online academic database from scratch.'}
{'en': 'Joint Modeling of Content and Discourse Relations in Dialogues', 'ar': 'النمذجة المشتركة للمحتوى وعلاقات الخطاب في الحوارات', 'pt': 'Modelagem Conjunta de Relações de Conteúdo e Discurso em Diálogos', 'es': 'Modelado conjunto de las relaciones de contenido y discurso en los diálogos', 'fr': 'Modélisation conjointe du contenu et des relations de discours dans les dialogues', 'ja': '対話におけるコンテンツと話題の関係の共同モデリング', 'zh': '语与言合建模', 'hi': 'संवादों में सामग्री और प्रवचन संबंधों का संयुक्त मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Совместное моделирование отношений содержания и дискурса в диалогах', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Comhpháirteach ar Ábhar agus ar Chaidreamh Dioscúrsa in Idirphlé', 'ka': 'დიალოგში შემდგომარების და დისკურსების შესახებ მოდელირება', 'hu': 'A tartalom- és beszédkapcsolatok közös modellezése párbeszédekben', 'el': 'Κοινή μοντελοποίηση περιεχομένου και συζητήσεων στους διαλόγους', 'kk': 'Диалогтарда мазмұны мен дискурстар қатынастарын үлгілеу', 'it': 'Modellazione congiunta dei contenuti e delle relazioni di dialogo nei dialoghi', 'lt': 'Joint Modeling of Content and Discourse Relations in Dialogues', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗുകളിലുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെയും വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും മോഡലിങ്ങ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'mt': 'Mudellar Konġunt tar-Relazzjonijiet tal-Kontenut u tad-Diskors fid-Djalogi', 'ms': 'Modeling Keseluruhan Kandungan dan Perhubungan Menjelaskan dalam Dialog', 'mn': 'Диалогдууд дэх Content and Discourse Relations Modeling', 'mk': 'Заедничко моделирање на содржината и дискурсирање на односите во дијалозите', 'no': 'Kopla til modellering av innhald og diskursrelasjonar i dialogvindauge', 'sr': 'Zajednički model sadržaja i diskurskih odnosa u dijalogima', 'pl': 'Wspólne modelowanie treści i relacji dyskusyjnych w dialogach', 'ro': 'Modelarea comună a relațiilor de conținut și discurs în dialoguri', 'si': 'සංවාදයේ සම්බන්ධතාවය සහ සංවාදය සම්බන්ධතාවය සම්බන්ධතාවය', 'sv': 'Gemensam modellering av innehåll och diskursrelationer i dialoger', 'ur': 'ڈیلوگوں میں موجود اور ڈیسکورس رابطے کی مدل ملی', 'so': 'Isku dar sameynta xiriirka gudaha iyo kala xiriirka diyaariyada', 'ta': 'உரையாடலில் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் மற்றும் விஷயங்கள் தொடர்புகளின் மாதிரியை இணை', 'uz': 'Dialog oynasida tarkibi va aloqa oʻrnatish modulini birlashtirish', 'vi': 'Liên hệ nội dung và thu phát trong thoại thoại', 'bg': 'Съвместно моделиране на съдържанието и дискурсните отношения в диалозите', 'da': 'Fælles modellering af indholds- og diskursrelationer i dialoger', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijke modellering van inhoud en discussieverhoudingen in dialoog', 'hr': 'Zajednički model sadržaja i diskurskih odnosa u dijalogima', 'de': 'Gemeinsame Modellierung von Inhalten und Diskursbeziehungen im Dialog', 'id': 'Modeling Konġunt dari Konten dan Hubungan Diskus dalam Dialog', 'ko': '대화 중의 내용과 언어 관계의 연합 모델링', 'sw': 'Kiunganisha Uhusiano na Mazungumzo katika Dialoga', 'tr': 'Däloglarda Mazmunlar we Gaýd etmek Derjesini Çykarmak', 'af': 'Aangesluit Modelering van Inhoud en Ontdekking Relasies in Dialoog', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'sq': 'Modelimi i përbashkët i përmbajtjes dhe diskutimi i marrëdhënieve në dialog', 'hy': 'Պատկերացումներում պարունակության միասնական մոդելավորումը և հաղորդակցման հարաբերությունները', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cبندی محتویات و رابطه\u200cهای صحبت در محاورها', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'D…ônaloqlarda M…ôzmun v…ô Diskurs ńįliŇükil…ôrin Modelin…ô QoŇüul', 'bs': 'Zajednički model sadržaja i diskurskih odnosa u dijalogima', 'ca': 'Modell Conjunt de Contats i Relacions de Discursos en Diàleg', 'et': 'Sisu- ja diskursussuhete ühine modelleerimine dialoogides', 'fi': 'Sisällön ja diskurssisuhteiden yhteinen mallinnus vuoropuheluissa', 'cs': 'Společné modelování obsahových a diskursních vztahů v dialogu', 'jv': 'Join', 'sk': 'Skupno modeliranje vsebinskih in diskurznih odnosov v dialogih', 'he': 'דוגמנית משותפת של התוכן ומערכת יחסים בדיולוגים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་ནང་དུ་ནང་དོན་དང་སླེབས་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མིན་དབྱིབས་མཐུན'}
{'en': 'We present a joint modeling approach to identify salient discussion points in spoken meetings as well as to label the discourse relations between speaker turns. A variation of our model is also discussed when discourse relations are treated as latent variables. Experimental results on two popular meeting corpora show that our joint model can outperform state-of-the-art approaches for both phrase-based content selection and discourse relation prediction tasks. We also evaluate our model on predicting the consistency among team members’ understanding of their group decisions. Classifiers trained with features constructed from our model achieve significant better predictive performance than the state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا مشتركًا للنمذجة لتحديد نقاط المناقشة البارزة في الاجتماعات المنطوقة وكذلك لتسمية علاقات الخطاب بين انعطافات المتحدثين. تتم أيضًا مناقشة أحد أشكال نموذجنا عندما يتم التعامل مع علاقات الخطاب على أنها متغيرات كامنة. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على اثنين من مجموعات الاجتماعات الشعبية أن نموذجنا المشترك يمكن أن يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب لكل من اختيار المحتوى القائم على العبارة ومهام التنبؤ بعلاقة الخطاب. نقوم أيضًا بتقييم نموذجنا في التنبؤ بالاتساق بين فهم أعضاء الفريق لقرارات مجموعتهم. المصنفات التي تم تدريبها باستخدام الميزات التي تم إنشاؤها من نموذجنا تحقق أداءً تنبؤيًا أفضل بكثير من أحدث التقنيات.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque de modelado conjunto para identificar los puntos de discusión más destacados en las reuniones orales, así como para etiquetar las relaciones del discurso entre los turnos de los oradores. También se discute una variación de nuestro modelo cuando las relaciones del discurso se tratan como variables latentes. Los resultados experimentales de dos cuerpos de reuniones populares muestran que nuestro modelo conjunto puede superar los enfoques más avanzados tanto para la selección de contenido basado en frases como para las tareas de predicción de relaciones discursivas. También evaluamos nuestro modelo para predecir la coherencia entre la comprensión de los miembros del equipo de las decisiones de su grupo. Los clasificadores entrenados con características construidas a partir de nuestro modelo logran un rendimiento predictivo significativamente mejor que los de última generación.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche de modélisation conjointe pour identifier les points de discussion saillants dans les réunions orales ainsi que pour étiqueter les relations de discours entre les intervenants. Une variante de notre modèle est également discutée lorsque les relations de discours sont traitées comme des variables latentes. Les résultats expérimentaux de deux corpus de réunions populaires montrent que notre modèle commun peut surpasser les approches de pointe pour les tâches de sélection de contenu basées sur des phrases et de prédiction de relations de discours. Nous évaluons également notre modèle en prédisant la cohérence entre les membres de l'équipe dans la compréhension de leurs décisions de groupe. Les classificateurs formés avec des caractéristiques construites à partir de notre modèle obtiennent des performances prédictives nettement meilleures que les systèmes de pointe.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem de modelagem conjunta para identificar pontos de discussão salientes em reuniões orais, bem como para rotular as relações discursivas entre os turnos do falante. Uma variação do nosso modelo também é discutida quando as relações discursivas são tratadas como variáveis latentes. Resultados experimentais em dois corpora de reuniões populares mostram que nosso modelo conjunto pode superar as abordagens de última geração para tarefas de seleção de conteúdo baseada em frases e predição de relações discursivas. Também avaliamos nosso modelo ao prever a consistência entre a compreensão dos membros da equipe sobre suas decisões de grupo. Classificadores treinados com recursos construídos a partir de nosso modelo obtêm desempenho preditivo significativamente melhor do que o estado da arte.', 'hi': 'हम बोली जाने वाली बैठकों में मुख्य चर्चा बिंदुओं की पहचान करने के साथ-साथ स्पीकर टर्न्स के बीच प्रवचन संबंधों को लेबल करने के लिए एक संयुक्त मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल की एक भिन्नता पर भी चर्चा की जाती है जब प्रवचन संबंधों को अव्यक्त चर के रूप में माना जाता है। दो लोकप्रिय बैठक कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा संयुक्त मॉडल वाक्यांश-आधारित सामग्री चयन और प्रवचन संबंध भविष्यवाणी कार्यों दोनों के लिए अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को मात दे सकता है। हम अपने समूह के निर्णयों की टीम के सदस्यों की समझ के बीच स्थिरता की भविष्यवाणी करने पर अपने मॉडल का भी मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल से निर्मित सुविधाओं के साथ प्रशिक्षित क्लासिफायर्स अत्याधुनिक की तुलना में महत्वपूर्ण बेहतर भविष्यवाणी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ja': '私たちは、口頭でのミーティングでの顕著な議論ポイントを特定し、話者の交代の間の話し合いの関係をラベル付けするための共同モデリングアプローチを提示します。我々のモデルのバリエーションは、話題関係を潜在変数として扱う場合にも議論される。2つの人気のある会議体の実験結果は、フレーズベースのコンテンツ選択と対話関係予測タスクの両方で、私たちの共同モデルが最先端のアプローチを上回ることができることを示しています。また、チームメンバーのグループ意思決定に対する理解の一貫性を予測するためのモデルを評価します。当社のモデルから構築された機能で訓練された分類子は、最先端のものよりも大幅に優れた予測性能を実現します。', 'zh': '建模法以识口语之奇论,记言者以更番之语。 语为潜变量时,亦议我模形变体。 两行会议语料库之实验结果表明,合形于短语,择言占事,皆优于先进之法。 又料我模样,以占团队成人团队决定之一致性。 用从我们的模样构建的特征训练的分类器可以得到最先进的测量性能。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем совместный подход к моделированию для выявления основных дискуссионных вопросов в устных встречах, а также для обозначения дискурсных отношений между выступающими. Вариант нашей модели также обсуждается, когда отношения дискурса рассматриваются как скрытые переменные. Экспериментальные результаты по двум популярным корпорациям собраний показывают, что наша совместная модель может превзойти самые современные подходы как к подбору контента на основе фраз, так и к прогнозированию отношений дискурса. Мы также оцениваем нашу модель на основе прогнозирования согласованности понимания членами команды своих групповых решений. Классификаторы, обученные функциям, построенным на основе нашей модели, достигают значительно лучших прогностических характеристик, чем современные.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige comhshamhaltaithe i láthair chun pointí plé suntasacha a aithint i gcruinnithe cainte chomh maith le lipéad a chur ar an gcaidreamh dioscúrsa idir sealanna cainteora. Pléitear freisin éagsúlacht dár múnla nuair a láimhseáiltear caidreamh dioscúrsa mar athróga folaigh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá chorpra cruinnithe a bhfuil an-tóir orthu gur féidir lenár gcomhshamhla sárobair a dhéanamh ar chuir chuige úrscothacha maidir le roghnú ábhair frása-bhunaithe agus tascanna tuartha maidir le caidreamh dioscúrsa. Déanaimid meastóireacht freisin ar ár múnla maidir le comhsheasmhacht tuiscint na mball foirne ar a gcinntí grúpa a thuar. Baineann aicmitheoirí oilte le gnéithe tógtha ónár múnla amach feidhmíocht thuarthach suntasach níos fearr ná an úrscothacht.', 'hu': 'Közös modellezési megközelítést mutatunk be a beszélt találkozók kiemelkedő vitapontjainak azonosítására, valamint a beszélő fordulatok közötti diskurzus kapcsolatok megjelölésére. Modellünk egy változatát akkor is megvitatjuk, amikor a diskurzus kapcsolatokat látens változóként kezeljük. Két népszerű találkozókorpuszon végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy közös modellünk mind a kifejezésalapú tartalom-kiválasztási, mind a diskurzus kapcsolat-előrejelzési feladatokban felülmúlhat a legkorszerűbb megközelítéseknél. Emellett értékeljük modellünket a csapattagok csoportdöntéseik következetességének előrejelzésére. A modellünkből készült funkciókkal képzett hirdetők jelentősen jobb prediktív teljesítményt érnek el, mint a legkorszerűbb.', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio di modellazione comune per identificare i punti salienti di discussione nelle riunioni parlate e per etichettare le relazioni di discorso tra i turni degli oratori. Una variazione del nostro modello viene discussa anche quando le relazioni di discorso sono trattate come variabili latenti. I risultati sperimentali su due corporate meeting popolari mostrano che il nostro modello comune può superare gli approcci all'avanguardia sia per la selezione dei contenuti basati sulle frasi che per le attività di predizione delle relazioni di discorso. Valutiamo anche il nostro modello per prevedere la coerenza tra la comprensione dei membri del team delle loro decisioni di gruppo. Gli inserzionisti formati con funzionalità costruite dal nostro modello ottengono prestazioni predittive significativamente migliori rispetto allo stato dell'arte.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ერთადერთი მოდელური პროგორმა, რომელიც საუბრალოდ საუბრალო დისკუქტის წერტილებების განსაზღვრებას, რომელიც საუბრალოდ საუბრალო კონფიგურაციების შე ჩვენი მოდელის განსხვავება ასევე განსხვავებულია, როდესაც განსხვავებული შესახებ განსხვავებულია როგორც განსხვავებულია. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ორი პოლუბური შეხვედრის კოპორაში ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელი შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც ფრაზების განსაზღვრებისთვი ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი მოდელის შესაბამისი მოდულის შესაბამისი წარმოდგენისათვის ჯგუფის განსხვავების შესახებ. კლასიფერები, რომლებიც მოდელიდან შექმნილია ფუნქციები, რომლებიც ჩვენი მოდელიდან შექმნილია მნიშვნელოვანი უკეთესი პროგრამეტური გამოყენება, ვიდრე', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια κοινή προσέγγιση μοντελοποίησης για τον εντοπισμό σημαντικών σημείων συζήτησης στις ομιλούμενες συναντήσεις καθώς και για την επισήμανση των σχέσεων συζήτησης μεταξύ των στροφών ομιλητών. Μια παραλλαγή του μοντέλου μας συζητείται επίσης όταν οι σχέσεις λόγου αντιμετωπίζονται ως λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο δημοφιλή σώματα συναντήσεων δείχνουν ότι το κοινό μας μοντέλο μπορεί να ξεπεράσει τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις τόσο για την επιλογή περιεχομένου με βάση φράσεις όσο και για την πρόβλεψη σχέσης λόγου. Επίσης αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας για την πρόβλεψη της συνέπειας μεταξύ των μελών της ομάδας όσον αφορά τις ομαδικές αποφάσεις τους. Οι ταξινομητές εκπαιδευμένοι με χαρακτηριστικά κατασκευασμένα από το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνουν σημαντικά καλύτερες προβλέψεις από ό,τι οι σύγχρονες.', 'mk': 'Презентираме заеднички моделирачки пристап за идентификување на значајни точки на дискусија на разговараните состаноци, како и за означување на дискурсните односи помеѓу говорниците. Варијација на нашиот модел, исто така, се дискутира кога дискурсните односи се третираат како лантни променливи. Експерименталните резултати на двата популарни состаноци покажуваат дека нашиот заеднички модел може да ги надмине најсовремените пристапи за селекцијата на содржина базирана на фрази и задачите за предвидување на дискурсните односи. Ние, исто така, го проценуваме нашиот модел за предвидување на константноста помеѓу разбирањето на членовите на тимот за нивните групни одлуки. Класификаторите обучени со карактеристики изградени од нашиот модел постигнуваат значително подобра предвидлива перформанса од најсовремената.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan pemodelan bersama untuk mengenalpasti titik diskusi yang penting dalam mesyuarat bercakap serta untuk label hubungan percakapan antara putaran pembicara. Variasi model kita juga didiskusikan apabila hubungan percakapan dianggap sebagai pembolehubah tersembunyi. Hasil percubaan pada dua korpra pertemuan populer menunjukkan bahawa model bersama kita boleh melaksanakan pendekatan state-of-the-art untuk kedua-dua pemilihan kandungan berdasarkan frasa dan tugas ramalan hubungan diskors. Kami juga menilai model kami untuk meramalkan konsistensi antara pemahaman ahli pasukan tentang keputusan kumpulan mereka. Kelasifikasi dilatih dengan ciri-ciri yang dibina dari model kita mencapai prestasi ramalan yang lebih baik dari yang terbaik.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame bendrą modeliavimo metodą, kuriuo siekiama nustatyti svarbius diskusijų punktus kalbėtuose susitikimuose ir pažymėti kalbėtojų pasikeitimų diskursinius santykius. Mūsų modelio variantas taip pat aptariamas, kai diskurso santykiai laikomi latentais kintamaisiais. Eksperimentiniai dviejų populiarių susitikimų korporų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų bendras modelis gali viršyti moderniausius metodus tiek frazėmis pagrįstos turinio atrankos, tiek diskursinių santykių prognozavimo užduočių atžvilgiu. Taip pat vertiname savo model į, pagal kurį numatoma, ar komandos nariai supranta savo grupių sprendimus nuosekliai. Klasifikatoriai, apmokyti pagal mūsų model į sukurtomis savybėmis, pasiekia gerokai geresnius prognozuojamuosius rezultatus nei naujausia.', 'kk': 'Біз сөйлейтін тұжырымдардың теңдеу үшін біріктірілген модель тұжырымдарын таңдап, сөйлейтін тұжырымдар арасындағы дискурстардың қатынасын белгілеу үшін біріктіреміз. Біздің үлгіміздің айырмашылығы де дискурстардың қатынасы келесі айнымалылықтар ретінде тұрғанда тұрады. Екі тапсырманың эксперименталық нәтижелері, біздің жалпы моделіміз сөздердің мазмұнын таңдау және белгілеу тапсырмаларының қатынау тапсырмаларына қатынау үшін күй- жалпы күй- жал Сонымен қатар, біз өз үлгімізді топ мүшелерінің топтардың шешімдерін түсіну үшін тәуелсіздігін бақылаймыз. Біздің моделімізден құрылған мүмкіндіктерімізге оқылған классификаторлар өзіміздің күйіне қарай жақсы таңдау мүмкіндіктеріне жеткізеді.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ konġunt ta' mudell biex nidentifikaw punti ta' diskussjoni importanti fil-laqgħat mitkellma kif ukoll biex nittikkettaw ir-relazzjonijiet ta' diskors bejn id-dawriet tal-kelliema. Varjazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna hija diskussa wkoll meta r-relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors jiġu ttrattati bħala varjabbli moħbija. Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ korpi popolari tal-laqgħat juru li l-mudell konġunt tagħna jista’ jwettaq approċċi l-aktar avvanzati kemm għall-għażla tal-kontenut ibbażat fuq il-frażi kif ukoll għall-kompiti ta’ tbassir tar-relazzjoni diskors. Nivvalutaw ukoll il-mudell tagħna dwar it-tbassir tal-konsistenza fost il-fehim tal-membri tat-tim tad-deċiżjonijiet tal-grupp tagħhom. Il-klassifikaturi mħarrġa b’karatteristiċi mibnija mill-mudell tagħna jiksbu prestazzjoni prevedibbli sinifikanti aħjar mill-aktar avvanzata.", 'ml': "സംസാരിക്കുന്ന കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താനും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ മാറ്റങ്ങളും സംസാരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പുതിയ മാറ്റങ്ങളായി പരി രണ്ടു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മീറ്റിംഗ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോറിയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ യൂട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി  We also evaluate our model on predicting the consistency among team members' understanding of their group decisions.  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി ക്ലാസിക്കേഴ്സുകാര്\u200dക്ക് സ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല പ്ര", 'mn': 'Бид илтгэгчийн хоорондын ярианы хоорондын харилцааны загварыг тодорхойлдохын тулд нэг загварын арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний загварын өөрчлөлт мөн ярианы харилцаа сүүлийн өөрчлөлт гэж үздэг үед ярианы харилцаа ярилцдаг. Хоёр олон нийтлэг уулзалтын корпора дахь туршилтын үр дүнд бидний нийтлэг загвар нь өгүүлбэртэй content selection болон ярианы таамаглалтын даалгаварын тулд улс төрийн урлагийн арга загваруудыг ашиглаж чадна. Бид бас багийн гишүүдийн бүлгийн шийдвэрийг ойлгохын тулд өөрсдийн загварыг тодорхойлдог. Бидний загвараас бүтээгдэхүүнээс сургалтын классификаторын хувьд урлагийн байдлаас илүү чухал таамаглах үйлдэл гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wspólne podejście do modelowania w celu identyfikacji istotnych punktów dyskusji w spotkaniach mówionych oraz oznaczenia relacji dyskursowych między zwrotami prelegentów. Odmiana naszego modelu jest również omawiana, gdy relacje dyskursowe są traktowane jako zmienne utajone. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch popularnych korpusach spotkań pokazują, że nasz wspólny model może przewyższyć najnowocześniejsze podejścia zarówno do selekcji treści opartych na frazach, jak i do prognozowania relacji dyskursu. Oceniamy również nasz model przewidywania spójności pomiędzy członkami zespołu zrozumienia ich decyzji grupowych. Klasyfikatory przeszkolone funkcjami zbudowanymi na podstawie naszego modelu osiągają znacznie lepszą wydajność predykcyjną niż nowoczesne.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein saman modelleringstilnærming for å identifisera salient diskusjonspunkt i praktiske møter, og for å merke diskusjonsbehandlingane mellom språkaren. Ein variasjon av modellen vår er også diskutert når diskursrelasjonar vert behandla som latente variasjonar. Eksperimentale resultat på to populære møte-korpora viser at vårt kople modell kan utføre tilnærmingar for både utvalet av innhaldet som er basert på frasar og diskursar i forhåndsvising av forhåndsvising. Vi evaluerer også modellen vårt på å foregå konsistens mellom gruppemedlemmer forståelse av gruppebeslutningane sine. Klassifikarar som treng med funksjonar konstruert frå modellen vårt gjer signifikante bedre forhåndsvising enn kunsttilstanden.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare comună de modelare pentru identificarea punctelor de discuție importante în cadrul întâlnirilor vorbite, precum și pentru etichetarea relațiilor de discurs dintre cursele vorbitorilor. O variație a modelului nostru este, de asemenea, discutată atunci când relațiile discursului sunt tratate ca variabile latente. Rezultatele experimentale asupra a două corpore populare de întâlnire arată că modelul nostru comun poate depăși abordările de ultimă generație atât pentru selecția conținutului bazată pe fraze, cât și pentru sarcinile de predicție a relațiilor discursului. De asemenea, evaluăm modelul nostru de predicție a coerenței dintre înțelegerea membrilor echipei asupra deciziilor lor de grup. Clasificatorii instruiți cu caracteristici construite din modelul nostru obțin performanțe predictive semnificativ mai bune decât cele de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo zajednički pristup modelima da identifikujemo tačke saliène diskusije na govornim sastancima, kao i da označimo diskurske odnose između okretanja govornika. Razlika našeg modela se takođe raspravlja kada se odnosi o diskursima tretiraju kao latentne promjene. Eksperimentalni rezultati dve popularne sastanke korpore pokazuju da naš zajednički model može izvršiti pristupe stanja umjetnosti i za izbor sadržaja na frazi i predviđanje veze. Takođe procjenjujemo naš model predviđanja konsekvencije među razumijevanjem članova tima o svojim grupnim odlukama. Klasifikatori koji su obučeni sa karakteristikama izgrađenim iz našeg modela postigli su značajno bolje predviđanje nego stanje umjetnosti.', 'si': 'අපි සම්බන්ධ මෝඩිල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වනවා කතා කරපු සංවේශනයේ සංවේශනයක් තියෙන්න සහ කතා කරපු සංවේශනය අපේ මොඩල් එකේ වෙනස් වෙනස් කරනවා කතාව සම්බන්ධ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් කතාව කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා අපි ඒවගේම අපේ මෝඩේල් අනුමාණය කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් අයගේ තීරණ ගැන අනුමාණය කරනවා. අපේ මොඩල් එකෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන ක්\u200dලාසිෆාර්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එකෙන් වැඩි', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab sameynta wadajirka ah si aan u caddeyno goobaha kala sheekeysiga ee shirarka lagu hadlo iyo sidoo kale in aan qorsheyno xiriirka hadalka ee uu hadlo u dhexeeyo. Sidoo kale waxaa loola hadlaa isbedelka modellkayaga marka xiriirka sheekeysiga looga dhaqdhaqaaqo sida isbedelka ugu dambeeya. Imtixaanka labada shirkad ee maarufu waxay muuqan karaan in qaababkayaga wadajirka ah uu ka sameyn karo qaababka farshaxanka ee ku saabsan doorashada waxyaabaha ku qoran ee ku qoran hadalka iyo shaqooyinka sii sheegidda xiriirka. Sidoo kale waxaynu qiimeynaynaa modellkayaga oo ku saabsan horumarinta ku saabsan sameynta xubnaha kooxda ee garashada go'aankooda kooxda. Qofka fasaxyada lagu tababariyey qaababka noocyada laga sameeyo waxay gaadhaan tababar aad u wanaagsan oo la sii sheego sida dowladda farshaxanka ah.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en gemensam modelleringsmetod för att identifiera viktiga diskussionspunkter i talarmöten samt för att märka diskursrelationerna mellan talarmöten. En variation av vår modell diskuteras också när diskursrelationer behandlas som latenta variabler. Experimentella resultat på två populära möteskorpor visar att vår gemensamma modell kan överträffa toppmoderna tillvägagångssätt för både frasbaserade innehållsval och prediktionsuppgifter för diskursrelationer. Vi utvärderar också vår modell för att förutsäga samstämmigheten mellan teammedlemmarnas förståelse för sina gruppbeslut. Annonsörer utbildade med funktioner konstruerade från vår modell uppnår signifikant bättre prediktiv prestanda än den senaste tekniken.', 'ta': 'பேசும் கூட்டத்தில் விற்பனை விவாதிப்பு புள்ளிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு இணைய மாதிரியான முறையை நாம் கூட்டுகிறோம் பேச பேச்சு தொடர்புகள் சமீபத்தில் மாறிகளாக கருதும் போது எங்கள் மாதிரியின் மாறுபாடு மாறுபாடுகளுக்கும் வ இரண்டு பிரபலமான கூட்டத்தின் முடிவுகளின் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் இணைய மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி செயல்களை வெளியேற்ற முடியும் சொற்றொடர் ச குழுவின் முடிவுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் குழுவின் தீர்வுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் கூட்டத்திற்குள் ஒரு  வகுப்பாளர்', 'ur': 'ہم ایک مشترک موڈلینگ طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ صحبت کی ملاقات میں صاف بحث پوینٹ پہچان سکیں اور صحبت کرنے والوں کے درمیان صحبت کی رابطہ لیبل کریں. ہمارے مدل کی تغییر بھی بحث کی جاتی ہے جبکہ بحث رابطے لٹینٹ ویرئیٹ کے طور پر چلتے ہیں۔ دو مشهور ملاقات کورپورا کی تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے ملک موڈل دو فریزوں کی بنیاد منصفات کا انتخاب اور مخالفت کا ارتباط پیش بینی کے کاموں کے لئے زیادہ قابل ہے. ہم نے اپنے مدل کو بھی مطابق کرلیا ہے کہ تیم جماعتوں کے درمیان ان ان کے گروپ فیصلے کے معاملہ میں ثابت قدم رہنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے مدل سے بنائے ہوئے فرصت کے ساتھ تعلیم دیے گئے کلاسفار بہترین پیش بینی کامیابی پر آتے ہیں', 'uz': "Biz suhbat talabatlarida suhbat talabatlarni aniqlash va gapiruvchilar orasidagi bogʻ'langanni aytish uchun bir bir qo'shish usuli. Uslubning o'zgarishlari kelajak o'zgarishlar deb hisoblanayotganda o'zgarishga qaramadi. Икки мазкур тўпланишга мувофиқ натижалар кўрсатади, бутун модели моделимиз ибодатли ибодатлар ва сўз асосида ўзгартириш вазифалари ва суҳбат баҳслариш вазифаларини бажаришга қодир бўлади. Biz guruh xususiyatlarining o'zgarishlarini tasavvur qilish uchun modelimizni qiymatimiz. Sinfchilar modelimizdan yaratilgan xossalar bilan o'rganadi, hozir davlatdan juda yaxshi kutilgan ishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mô hình chung để xác định các điểm thảo luận nổi bật trong các cuộc họp và để nhãn hiệu các quan hệ đối thoại giữa các diễn giả. Một thay đổi của mô hình của chúng ta cũng được thảo luận khi quan hệ đối tượng được xem như các biến số tiềm năng. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên hai cuộc gặp với người lớn cho thấy mô hình chung của chúng ta có thể sử dụng các phương pháp hiện đại cho cả việc chọn nội dung từ cụm từ và tính toán tương quan. Chúng tôi cũng đánh giá phương pháp dự đoán sự đồng nhất giữa sự hiểu biết của thành viên trong nhóm về quyết định của họ. Những chuyên gia cổ điển được rèn luyện với những tính năng được tạo ra từ mẫu đạt hiệu ứng dự đoán tốt hơn trạng thái hiện đại.', 'nl': "We presenteren een gezamenlijke modelleringsaanpak om belangrijke discussiepunten in gesproken vergaderingen te identificeren en de discoursrelaties tussen sprekers te labelen. Een variatie van ons model wordt ook besproken wanneer discoursrelaties worden behandeld als latente variabelen. Experimentele resultaten op twee populaire meeting corpora's tonen aan dat ons gezamenlijk model de state-of-the-art benaderingen kan overtreffen voor zowel frase-based content selectie als discours relation voorspelling taken. We evalueren ook ons model voor het voorspellen van de consistentie tussen het begrip van teamleden van hun groepsbeslissingen. Classifiers die zijn opgeleid met functies die zijn gebouwd op basis van ons model bereiken significant betere voorspellende prestaties dan de state-of-the-art.", 'bg': 'Представяме съвместен подход за моделиране за идентифициране на значими дискусионни точки в говоримите срещи, както и за етикетиране на дискурсните отношения между обръщенията на говорителите. Разликата в нашия модел също се обсъжда, когато дискурсните отношения се третират като латентни променливи. Експерименталните резултати на две популярни корпуси за срещи показват, че нашият съвместен модел може да надмине най-съвременните подходи както за подбор на съдържание въз основа на фрази, така и за задачи за предсказване на дискурсните взаимоотношения. Ние също така оценяваме нашия модел за прогнозиране на съгласуваността между разбирането на членовете на екипа за техните групови решения. Класификаторите, обучени с функции, изградени от нашия модел, постигат значително по-добра предсказуема ефективност от най-съвременните.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo zajednički pristup modelizaciji kako bi identificirali salične diskusije u govornim sastancima, kao i označili diskusije između okreta govornika. Razlika našeg modela se također raspravlja kada se odnosi o diskusiji tretiraju kao latentne promjene. Eksperimentalni rezultati dvije popularne sastanke korporacije pokazuju da naš zajednički model može nadmašiti podatke o stanju umjetnosti i za izbor sadržaja temeljenog na frazi i predviđanje veze. Također procjenjujemo naš model predviđanja konsekvencije među razumijevanjem članova tima o svojim odlukama grupe. Klasifikatori koji su obučeni sa karakteristikama izgrađenim iz našeg modela postigli su značajno bolje predviđanje nego stanje umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en fælles modellering tilgang til at identificere vigtige diskussionspunkter i talte møder samt til at mærke diskursrelationerne mellem talere vender. En variation af vores model diskuteres også, når diskursrelationer behandles som latente variabler. Eksperimentelle resultater på to populære mødekorpora viser, at vores fælles model kan overgå state-of-the-art tilgange til både sætningsbaseret indholdsvalg og diskursforudsigelse opgaver. Vi evaluerer også vores model for at forudsige konsistensen mellem teammedlemmernes forståelse af deres gruppebeslutninger. Husholdere, der er uddannet med funktioner konstrueret ud fra vores model, opnår betydelig bedre forudsigende ydeevne end den nyeste.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen gemeinsamen Modellierungsansatz, um wichtige Diskussionspunkte in gesprochenen Meetings zu identifizieren und die Diskursbeziehungen zwischen Rednerturns zu kennzeichnen. Eine Variation unseres Modells wird auch diskutiert, wenn Diskursbeziehungen als latente Variablen behandelt werden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei populären Meetingkorpora zeigen, dass unser gemeinsames Modell sowohl für phrasenbasierte Inhaltsauswahl als auch für Diskursrelationsvorhersagen moderne Ansätze übertreffen kann. Wir evaluieren auch unser Modell zur Vorhersage der Konsistenz zwischen dem Verständnis der Teammitglieder ihrer Gruppenentscheidungen. Klassifizierer, die mit Funktionen unseres Modells trainiert sind, erzielen eine deutlich bessere Vorhersageleistung als die modernsten.', 'ko': '우리는 구어 회의에서 현저한 토론점을 식별하고 말하는 사람의 전환점 간의 언어 관계를 표시하는 연합 모델링 방법을 제시했다.언어 관계가 잠재적인 변수로 간주될 때, 우리는 우리 모델의 변체에 대해서도 토론했다.두 개의 유행 회의 자료 라이브러리에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 연합 모델은 짧은 말의 내용 선택과 문장 관계 예측 임무를 바탕으로 최신 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리는 팀원들이 팀 결정에 대한 이해의 일치성을 예측하는 모델도 평가했다.우리의 모델을 이용하여 구축된 특징 훈련을 하는 분류기는 가장 선진적인 분류기보다 현저하고 좋은 예측 성능을 가지고 있다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan model kongsi untuk mengidentifikasi titik diskusi yang penting dalam pertemuan yang dibicarakan serta untuk label hubungan diskors antara putaran pembicara. Variasi model kita juga didiskusikan ketika hubungan diskors diperlakukan sebagai variabel latent. Hasil eksperimen pada dua korpora pertemuan populer menunjukkan bahwa model bersama kita dapat melaksanakan pendekatan state-of-the-art untuk kedua seleksi isi berdasarkan frasa dan tugas prediksi hubungan diskors. Kami juga mengevaluasi model kami untuk memprediksi konsistensi antara pemahaman anggota tim tentang keputusan kelompok mereka. Klasifikasi dilatih dengan ciri-ciri yang dibuat dari model kita mencapai prestasi prediksif yang lebih baik dari yang terbaik.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش مدلک مشترک را برای شناسایی کردن نقطه\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cای که در جلسه\u200cهای صحبت می\u200cشود و برای برچسب رابطه\u200cهای صحبت بین برچسب\u200cهای صحبت\u200cکننده نشان می\u200cدهیم. یک تغییر از مدل ما همچنین وقتی رابطه\u200cهای صحبت به عنوان تغییرات latent درباره\u200cی صحبت می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای در دو جلسه\u200cهای مشهور نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل مشترک ما می\u200cتواند برای انتخاب محتویات بنیاد عبارت و گفتگو\u200cهای مربوط به جلسه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی از موقعیت\u200cهای هنر بیشتر از آن انجام دهد. ما همچنین مدل خود را در پیش بینی کردن اتفاقی بین اعضای تیم درک تصمیمات گروهی آنها ارزیابی می کنیم. کلاس\u200cگران با ویژه\u200cهایی که از مدل ما ساخته شده\u200cاند آموزش داده شده\u200cاند، عملکرد پیش\u200cبینی بهتر از وضعیت هنر را به دست می\u200cآورند.', 'tr': 'G체rle첵채n 첵ygnaklarda so흫ky diskusi첵a noktalaryny tanamak 체챌in bir nusga g철rkezil첵채n nusga we g체rr체흫de첵채n 챌yky힊lary흫 arasyndaky g체rr체흫leri etiketle첵채n. Biz nusgamyzy흫 체첵tge힊igi hem diskurs bagla힊yklary ge챌ti흫 체첵tge힊ikleri di첵ip g철r체n첵채r. Iki me힊hur 첵ygnak korporatyny흫 experimental netijesi bizi흫 birlikde nusgamyzy흫 hem frazede da힊ary maksady흫 sa첵lamagy we g체rr체흫lemek t채blikleri 체챌in durum-t채blisasyny 챌ykaryp biljekdigini g철rkez. Mundan hem 철z nusgymyzy topar adamlary흫 kararyny d체힊체n첵채n 챌yky힊lygyny tahmin etmek 체챌in 챌yk첵arys. Bizi흫 modelimizden in힊a edilen 챌yky힊larymyz bilen bilinmeli 챌arpy힊챌ylar m철h체m 철ng철r체mli tany힊 ukyplarymyzdan has gowy tapyl첵arlar.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu ya muundo wa pamoja ili kutambua pointi za mjadala katika mikutano ya mazungumzo yanayozungumzwa na pia kuandika uhusiano wa mazungumzo kati ya mzungumzaji unageuka. Mabadiliko ya muundo wetu pia yanajadiliwa pale mahusiano ya mazungumzo yanapochukuliwa kama mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na makutano mawili maarufu yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu wa pamoja unaweza kutengeneza mbinu za hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa maudhui yanayotumika na utabiri wa mazungumzo. Pia tunatathmini mtindo wetu wa kutabiri umuhimu kati ya wanachama wa timu kuelewa maamuzi yao ya kikundi. Wataalamu walifundishwa na vipengele vilivyojengwa kutoka kwa mtindo wetu hupata ufanisi mkubwa wa kutabiri kuliko hali ya sanaa.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n joint modeling toegang om salient diskusie punte te identifiseer in gespreek meetings en om die diskursie verhouding tussen sprekkers draai te etiket. 'n Verandering van ons model word ook gespreek wanneer diskursie relasies as latente veranderlikes behandel word. Eksperimentele resultate op twee populêre vergadering korpora wys dat ons saamgevoerde model kan uitvoer staat-van-kuns toegang vir beide frase-gebaseerde inhoud-keuse en diskursie verwanting van voorskou-taak. Ons evalueer ons model ook op die voorskou van die konsistensie onder die verstanding van die groeplede van hul groepbesluite. Klassifiers wat opgelei is met funksies wat van ons model gebruik is, bereik beter voorskoubaar funksie as die staat van die kuns.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje modelimi të përbashkët për të identifikuar pikat kryesore të diskutimit në takimet e folura si dhe për të etiketuar marrëdhëniet diskursore midis ktheve të zëdhënësve. Një variacion i modelit tonë diskutohet gjithashtu kur marrëdhëniet diskursore trajtohen si variable të fshehta. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy korporata të takimit popullorë tregojnë se modeli ynë i përbashkët mund të kryejë qasje më të larta për të zgjedhur përmbajtjen bazuar në fraza dhe detyrat parashikuese të lidhjes diskurse. Ne gjithashtu vlerësojmë modelin tonë për parashikimin e konsistencës midis kuptimit të anëtarëve të ekipit për vendimet e tyre të grupit. Klasifikuesit e trajnuar me karakteristika të ndërtuara nga modeli ynë arrijnë performancë më të rëndësishme parashikuese sesa më i miri.', 'am': 'በንግግር ጉዳዮች ውስጥ የንግግር ግንኙነት እና በንግግር መካከል የንግግር ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ እናስቀራለን፡፡ የሞዴል ልውጤት ደግሞ የንግግር ግንኙነት የቀድሞው መለያየት ሲሆን ይነግራል፡፡ የሁለት ትልቁ መገናኘት ኮርፖር ላይ የሞከር ውጤቶች የግንኙነታችን ሞዴል የ-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነትን እና የንግግር ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል እና የንግግር ግንኙነት ለመቀበል ስርዓቶችን ለማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ የቡድን አባላት የነገራቸውን ማስታወቂያ ለመቀበል የምናስተውል ምሳሌያችንን እናስተውልታለን፡፡ Classifiers trained with features constructed from our model achieve significant better predictive performance than the state-of-the-art.', 'az': 'Biz danışdığımız toplantılarda süslü müzakirə nöqtələrini təsdiqləmək üçün birlikdə modellik tərzini göstəririk, danışanlar arasındakı müzakirə nöqtələrini etiketləmək üçün. Bizim modelimizin dəyişiklikləri də mübahisə edilir ki, söhbət əlaqələri latent dəyişikliklər kimi görünərlər. İki məşhur toplantı korporasının təcrübə sonuçlarını göstərir ki, bizim birlikdə modellərimiz hər cür ifadəli məlumat seçimləri və təcrübə törətmələri üçün istifadə edə bilər. Biz də modeliyimizi, grup üyelərinin dəyişikliklərinin anlaşılması barəsində təsdiqlənmək üçün təsdiqləyirik. Modelimizdən inşa edilmiş xüsusiyyətlərlə təhsil edilmiş klassifəçilər mövcud təhsil göstəricisindən daha yaxşı təhsil edirlər.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo zajednički pristup modelima da identifikujemo salične diskusije na govornim sastancima, kao i da označimo diskusije između okreta govornika. Razlika našeg modela se također raspravlja kada se odnosi o diskusiji tretiraju kao latentne promjene. Eksperimentalni rezultati dvije popularne sastanke korpore pokazuju da naš zajednički model može nadmašiti podatke o stanju umjetnosti za izbor sadržaja na frazi i predviđanje veze. Također procjenjujemo naš model o predviđanju konsekvencije među razumijevanjem članova tima o njihovim odlucima grupe. Klasifikatori koji su obučeni sa karakteristikama izgrađenim iz našeg modela postigli su značajno bolje predviđanje nego stanje umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament de modelació conjunta per identificar punts de discussió salients en reunions parlades i per etiquetar les relacions discursives entre girs d'orators. Una variació del nostre model també es discute quan les relacions de discurs es tracten com variables latents. Els resultats experimentals de dos grups populars mostran que el nostre model conjunt pot superar els enfocaments més avançats tant per seleccionar continguts basats en frases com per predir relacions discursives. També evaluem el nostre model de predir la consistencia entre la comprensió dels membres de l'equip de les seves decisions en grup. Els classificadors entrenats amb característiques construïdes a partir del nostre model aconsegueixen un rendiment predictiu significatiu millor que l'última.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ընդհանուր մոդելավորման մոտեցում, որպեսզի բացահայտենք խոսակցած հանդիպումների կարևոր քննարկումների կետերը, ինչպես նաև նշանակենք խոսակցական հարաբերությունները խոսակցական շրջանների միջև Մեր մոդելի տարբերությունը նույնպես քննարկվում է, երբ խոսակցության հարաբերությունները վերաբերվում են թաքնված փոփոխականների: Experimental results on two popular meeting corpora show that our joint model can outperform state-of-the-art approaches for both phrase-based content selection and discourse relation prediction tasks.  Մենք նաև գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը, որտեղ կանխատեսում ենք թիմի անդամների համապատասխանությունը խմբի որոշումների մասին: Մեր մոդելի վրա կառուցված հատկանիշներով վարժեցված դասակարգողները հասնում են ավելի լավ կանխատեսողական արդյունքներին, քան ամենաբարձր արդյունքները:', 'cs': 'Představujeme společný modelovací přístup k identifikaci významných diskusních bodů v mluvených setkáních a označení diskurzních vztahů mezi řečnickými obraty. Variace našeho modelu je také diskutována v případě, že diskurzní vztahy jsou považovány za latentní proměnné. Experimentální výsledky dvou populárních setkávacích korpusů ukazují, že náš společný model může překonat nejmodernější přístupy jak pro výběr obsahu založeného na frázích, tak pro predikci vztahu diskurzu. Také hodnotíme náš model předpovědi konzistence mezi členy týmu chápání jejich skupinových rozhodnutí. Klasifikátory vyškolené s funkcemi konstruovanými z našeho modelu dosahují výrazně lepšího prediktivního výkonu než moderní.', 'et': 'Esitame ühise modelleerimise lähenemisviisi, et tuvastada kõnelejate kohtumistel silmapaistvaid arutelupunkte ning märgistada kõnelejate vahelisi diskursussuhteid. Meie mudeli variatsiooni arutatakse ka siis, kui diskursussuhteid käsitletakse latentsete muutujatena. Kahe populaarse kohtumiskorpuse eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie ühine mudel suudab ületada kaasaegseid lähenemisviise nii fraasipõhise sisuvaliku kui ka diskursussuhete ennustamise ülesannete puhul. Samuti hindame oma mudelit, kuidas prognoosida meeskonna liikmete arusaamist oma grupi otsustest. Meie mudeli põhjal ehitatud funktsioonidega koolitatud klassifikaatorid saavutavad oluliselt parema prognoosivõime kui kaasaegsed.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি যৌথ মডেলিং পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছি যেখানে কথোপকথন আলোচনার বিষয়গুলো চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এবং কথোপকথনের মধ্যে যে সম্পর্কের কথ আমাদের মডেলের একটি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন আলোচনা করা হচ্ছে যখন কথোপকথন সম্পর্ক সাম্প্রতিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি দুই জনপ্রিয় মিটিং কোর্পোরার পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের যৌথ মডেল দেখাতে পারে যে বাক্য ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু নির্বাচন এবং কথোপকথনের ভব আমরা তাদের গ্রুপের সিদ্ধান্তের বুঝতে পারি তাদের দলের সদস্যদের মধ্যে একাত্মতা পূর্ণ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্ আমাদের মডেল থেকে নির্মিত বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীদের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং রাষ্ট্রীয় শিল্পের চেয়ে ভালো ভবিষ্', 'fi': 'Esitämme yhteisen mallinnusmenetelmän, jolla tunnistetaan puhuttujen tapaamisten keskeisiä keskustelukohtia sekä merkitään puhujien vuorojen välisiä diskurssisuhteita. Mallin variaatiosta keskustellaan myös silloin, kun diskurssisuhteita käsitellään piilevinä muuttujina. Kokeelliset tulokset kahdesta suositusta tapaamiskorpusta osoittavat, että yhteinen mallimme pystyy suoriutumaan huippuluokan lähestymistavoista sekä lausepohjaisessa sisällönvalinnassa että diskurssisuhteiden ennustamistehtävissä. Arvioimme myös malliamme siitä, kuinka johdonmukaista tiimin jäsenten ymmärrys ryhmäpäätöksistä on. Mallistamme valmistetuilla ominaisuuksilla koulutetut luokittelijat saavuttavat huomattavasti paremman ennakoivan suorituskyvyn kuin uusin tekniikka.', 'he': "אנחנו מציגים גישה מודלית משותפת לזהות נקודות דיון מפורסמות בפגישות מדברות, כמו גם לתייג את יחסי הדיור בין הפנים של הרופאים. שינוי של הדוגמא שלנו גם נדון כאשר יחסי דיבור מתייחסים לשינויים מוסתרים. תוצאות ניסויים על שני קבוצות פגישות פופולריות מראות שהמודל המשותף שלנו יכול להעביר גישות מצוינות לאמנות לשני משימות חיזוי תוכן מבוססים על ביטויים ושני משימות חיזוי יחסי דיבורים. We also evaluate our model on predicting the consistency among team members' understanding of their group decisions.  מסמכים מאומנים עם תכונות שנבנו מהמודל שלנו משיגים ביצועים צפויים משמעותיים יותר טובים מאשר מצב המיוחד.", 'jv': 'Awake dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo nggawe perusahaan winih sing nggawe gerakan karo nggawe gerakan karo nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan langgar sapa-suarané. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Perintah sing paling apik populer pêrung nggawe gerangkat dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno model kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno perbudhakan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelompok nggawe iCalImp', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata matsayi mai haɗi dõmin ka gane pointi na cũtarwa cikin meettori da aka yi wa magana da kuma ka sassautar da mazaɓa tsakanin mai saurãre. Kuma an yi jayayya da wani variant na misalinmu idan an yi abuni da mazaɓa kamar dabam-daban. Tajararin matsala a kan haɗuwa biyu na popular firma yana nuna cewa misalinmu na wadar da ke iya samar da halin-the-art zuwa ga duk zaɓen ci-bakin maganar da ka sami aikin muhimmin muhimmi da kuma ka sami aikin muhimmin muhimmada. Kayya, Munã ƙaddara misalinmu a kan ka yi bayani ga mataimaki a tsakanin ma'abũta jama'a da ke fahimta gareshi gareshi na jama'a. Mai kõra da wasu fasihi wanda aka gina daga misalinmu, suna da mafiya alhẽri ga mai basĩri daga halin-sanar.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo skupni modelirani pristop za prepoznavanje pomembnih razpravnih točk na govorjenih srečanjih in označevanje diskurznih odnosov med govorniki. Različica našega modela se obravnava tudi, ko se diskurzne odnose obravnavajo kot latentne spremenljivke. Eksperimentalni rezultati dveh priljubljenih korpusov srečanja kažejo, da lahko naš skupni model presega najsodobnejše pristope tako pri izbiri vsebine na osnovi fraz kot pri napovedovanju razmerja diskurza. Ocenjujemo tudi naš model napovedovanja doslednosti razumevanja članov ekipe o svojih skupinskih odločitvah. Klasifikatorji, usposobljeni s funkcijami, izdelanimi iz našega modela, dosegajo znatno boljšo napovedno zmogljivost kot najsodobnejši.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ལས་གནད་དོན་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་དང་ཁ་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་པའི་ནང ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གང་ཟག་ཞིག་ཀྱང་སྔོན་ཕྱུར་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཡང་བཤད་ཡོད། ངལ་ཚོགས་གྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྣམས་ལས་འགན་པའི་ཚོགས་སྡུད་ཁང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གཟུགས ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་གདམ་གསེས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་དབང་ཆ་གིས་མཐུན་རྣམས་གྲངས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་རེད། དབྱེ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔྱད་ནས་བཟོ་ཅན་མེད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གྲུབ་རྐྱེ'}
{'en': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'ar': 'تعدين الحجج باستخدام SVMs و RNNs', 'fr': "Exploration d'arguments avec SVM et RNN structurés", 'pt': 'Mineração de argumentos com SVMs e RNNs estruturados', 'es': 'Minería de argumentos con SVM y RNN estructurados', 'ja': '構造化SVMとRNNを使用した引数マイニング', 'zh': '用结构化 SVM 及 RNN 掘参数', 'hi': 'संरचित SVMs और RNNs के साथ तर्क खनन', 'ru': 'Майнинг аргументов со структурированными виртуальными машинами защиты и RNN', 'ga': 'Mianadóireacht Argóint le SVManna Struchtúrtha agus RNNs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων με δομημένα SVM και RNN', 'hu': 'Argumentált bányászat strukturált SVM-ekkel és RNN-ekkel', 'it': 'Argument Mining con SVM strutturati e RNN', 'lt': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған SVMs және RNN аргументтерді бағалау', 'mk': 'Аргументно рудање со структурирани SVM и RNN', 'ms': 'Penyembah Argumen dengan SVM dan RNN Struktur', 'ml': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'mt': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'mn': 'Структур SVMs болон RNN-тэй аргументын салбар', 'no': 'Argumentmining med strukturerte SVMs og RNN', 'ro': 'Argument Mining cu SVM structurate și RNN', 'pl': 'Górnictwo argumentów ze strukturalnymi SVM i RNN', 'sr': 'Rušenje argumenta sa strukturovanim SVMs i RNN-ima', 'so': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'sv': 'Argumentbrytning med strukturerade SVM och RNN', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட SVMs மற்றும் RNNs உடன் தருமதி குறைந்தது', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tranh luận với SVMs cấu trúc và RNN.', 'bg': 'Аргументен добив с структурирани SVM и RNN', 'hr': 'Rušenje argumenta s strukturovanim SVMs i RNN-ima', 'da': "Argumentminedrift med strukturerede SVM'er og RNN'er", 'id': 'Argument Mining dengan SVM dan RNN struktur', 'ko': '구조화 지원 벡터기 및 RNN의 매개변수 마이닝', 'fa': 'ذخیره آرژانس با SVMs و RNN ساخته شده', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo yaliyojengwa na SVMs na RNN', 'tr': 'Argument Ködleme', 'af': 'Argument Mining met Struktuurde SVMs en RNN', 'sq': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs', 'nl': "Argument Mining met gestructureerde SVM's en RNN's", 'am': 'አርጉም ማቀናጃ በተመሠረተ SVMs እና RNNs', 'de': 'Argument Mining mit strukturierten SVMs und RNNs', 'hy': 'Արգենտների հանքահանումը կառուցվածքային ՎԻՄ-ների և ՌՆՆ-ների միջոցով', 'bn': 'নির্মিত SVMs এবং RNNs সহ আর্গুমেন্ট মিনিং', 'bs': 'Rušenje argumenta sa strukturovanim SVMs i RNN-ima', 'az': 'Structured SVMs və RNN ilə Argument Mining', 'ca': 'Arguments Mining amb SVM i RNN estructurats', 'cs': 'Těžba argumentů se strukturovanými SVM a RNN', 'et': 'Argumentide kaevandamine struktureeritud SVMide ja RNNidega', 'fi': 'Argumentin louhinta strukturoiduilla SVM- ja RNN-laitteilla', 'sk': 'Argumentno rudarjenje s strukturiranimi SVM in RNN', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מכירת טיעונים עם SVMs ומבנים RNN', 'jv': 'argument Minng karo structural SVM lan DNNs', 'bo': 'Argument Mining with Structured SVMs and RNNs'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel factor graph model for argument mining, designed for settings in which the argumentative relations in a document do not necessarily form a tree structure. (This is the case in over 20 % of the web comments dataset we release.) Our model jointly learns elementary unit type classification and argumentative relation prediction. Moreover, our model supports SVM and RNN parametrizations, can enforce structure constraints (e.g., transitivity), and can express dependencies between adjacent relations and propositions. Our approaches outperform unstructured baselines in both web comments and argumentative essay datasets.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا للرسم البياني للعوامل لتعدين الحجج ، مصمم للإعدادات التي لا تشكل فيها العلاقات الجدلية في المستند بالضرورة بنية شجرة. (هذا هو الحال في أكثر من 20٪ من مجموعة بيانات تعليقات الويب التي نصدرها.) يتعلم نموذجنا بشكل مشترك تصنيف نوع الوحدة الأولية والتنبؤ بالعلاقة الجدلية. علاوة على ذلك ، يدعم نموذجنا معاملات SVM و RNN ، ويمكنه فرض قيود الهيكل (على سبيل المثال ، الانتقال) ، ويمكنه التعبير عن التبعيات بين العلاقات والاقتراحات المجاورة. تتفوق مناهجنا على خطوط الأساس غير المنظمة في كل من تعليقات الويب ومجموعات بيانات المقالات الجدلية.', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo de gráfico factorial novedoso para la minería de argumentos, diseñado para entornos en los que las relaciones argumentativas de un documento no forman necesariamente una estructura de árbol. (Este es el caso de más del 20% del conjunto de datos de comentarios web que publicamos). Nuestro modelo aprende conjuntamente la clasificación de tipos de unidades elementales y la predicción de relaciones argumentativas. Además, nuestro modelo admite parametrizaciones de SVM y RNN, puede imponer restricciones de estructura (por ejemplo, la transitividad) y puede expresar dependencias entre relaciones y proposiciones adyacentes. Nuestros enfoques superan a las líneas de base no estructuradas tanto en los comentarios web como en los conjuntos de datos de ensayos argumentativos.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau modèle de graphe factoriel pour l'exploration d'arguments, conçu pour les paramètres dans lesquels les relations argumentatives d'un document ne forment pas nécessairement une structure arborescente. (C'est le cas dans plus de 20\xa0% des ensembles de données de commentaires Web que nous publions.) Notre modèle apprend conjointement la classification des types d'unités élémentaires et la prédiction argumentative des relations. De plus, notre modèle prend en charge les paramétrisations SVM et RNN, peut appliquer des contraintes de structure (par exemple, la transitivité) et peut exprimer des dépendances entre des relations et des propositions adjacentes. Nos approches surpassent les lignes de base non structurées à la fois dans les commentaires Web et les ensembles de données de dissertations argumentatives.", 'pt': 'Propomos um novo modelo de gráfico de fatores para mineração de argumentos, projetado para ambientes em que as relações argumentativas em um documento não necessariamente formam uma estrutura em árvore. (Este é o caso em mais de 20% do conjunto de dados de comentários da web que lançamos.) Nosso modelo aprende conjuntamente a classificação elementar do tipo de unidade e a previsão de relação argumentativa. Além disso, nosso modelo suporta parametrizações SVM e RNN, pode impor restrições de estrutura (por exemplo, transitividade) e pode expressar dependências entre relações e proposições adjacentes. Nossas abordagens superam as linhas de base não estruturadas em comentários da web e conjuntos de dados de ensaios argumentativos.', 'ja': '引数マイニングのための新規の係数グラフモデルを提案します。これは、ドキュメント内の引数関係が必ずしもツリー構造を形成しないように設計されています。（これは、リリースするウェブコメントデータセットの20 ％以上に当てはまります。）我々のモデルは、基本単位型分類と議論的関係予測を共同で学ぶ。さらに、我々のモデルは、SVMおよびRNNパラメトリゼーションをサポートし、構造制約（例えば、トランジット性）を強制することができ、隣接関係と命題との間の依存関係を表現することができる。私たちのアプローチは、ウェブコメントと議論力のあるエッセイデータセットの両方で、構造化されていないベースラインを上回ります。', 'zh': '设新颖因子图模于参数,文档论未必成树构也。 (于吾所发过20%者网络论数集之,其然也。 我们模样共学单位分类和论证。 SVMRNN参数之化,可以强制(传递性),可以达邻命之赖。 吾法于网络论及议论文数集皆优于非结构化基线。', 'hi': 'हम तर्क खनन के लिए एक उपन्यास कारक ग्राफ मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो उन सेटिंग्स के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है जिसमें एक दस्तावेज़ में तर्कसंगत संबंध आवश्यक रूप से एक पेड़ संरचना नहीं बनाते हैं। (यह हमारे द्वारा जारी किए गए वेब टिप्पणियों के डेटासेट के 20% से अधिक में मामला है। हमारा मॉडल संयुक्त रूप से प्राथमिक इकाई प्रकार वर्गीकरण और तर्कसंगत संबंध भविष्यवाणी सीखता है। इसके अलावा, हमारा मॉडल एसवीएम और आरएनएन पैरामेट्रिज़ेशन का समर्थन करता है, संरचना बाधाओं (जैसे, पारगमन) को लागू कर सकता है, और आसन्न संबंधों और प्रस्तावों के बीच निर्भरता व्यक्त कर सकता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण दोनों वेब टिप्पणियों और तर्कसंगत निबंध डेटासेट में असंरचित आधार रेखाओं से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Предложена новая модель факторного графа для аргументационного майнинга, разработанная для условий, в которых аргументативные отношения в документе не обязательно образуют древовидную структуру. (Это относится к более чем 20% набора данных веб-комментариев, который мы выпускаем.) Наша модель совместно изучает классификацию типов элементарных единиц и прогнозирование аргументативных отношений. Кроме того, наша модель поддерживает параметры SVM и RNN, может обеспечивать соблюдение структурных ограничений (например, транзитивность) и может выражать зависимости между смежными отношениями и предложениями. Наши подходы превосходят неструктурированные базовые линии как в веб-комментариях, так и в наборах данных аргументативных эссе.', 'ga': 'Molaimid samhail graif fachtóir nua do mhianadóireacht argóinte, atá deartha le haghaidh suíomhanna nach gá go gcruthaíonn an caidreamh argóinteach i ndoiciméad struchtúr crann. (Is é seo an cás i níos mó ná 20% den tacar sonraí tuairimí gréasáin a eisímid.) Foghlaimíonn ár múnla le chéile rangú de chineál aonaid bhunúsacha agus tuar caidreamh argóinteach. Ina theannta sin, tacaíonn ár múnla le parametrizations SVM agus RNN, féadann sé srianta struchtúir a fhorfheidhmiú (m.sh., idirthuras), agus féadann sé spleáchais a chur in iúl idir caidrimh agus tairiscintí cóngaracha. Sáraíonn ár gcur chuige na bunlínte neamhstruchtúrtha i dtráchtanna gréasáin agus i dtacar sonraí aistí argóinteacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტიური ფაქტორის გრაფიკური მოდელს აპორმენტის მინდომის მინდომა, რომელიც აპორმენტიური შესახებ დოკუმენტიური შესახებ ექსტრუქტურის შესახებ (ეს არის საბოლო კომენტრების 20% დამატებული მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც ჩვენ გადასტარებთ.) ჩვენი მოდელი ერთადერთად ვისწავლის ელემენტური ერთეულების ტიპის კლასიფიკაცია და არგუმენტური შესახებ. მაგრამ ჩვენი მოდელი SVM და RNN პარამეტრიზაციების მხარდაჭირება, შეუძლია სტრუქტურის შედგა (მაგალითად, გადატანიზაცია) და შეუძლია გამოსახულოთ დასახულებელი პროგრამების და პროგრამების შ ჩვენი დახმარებები უფრო გავაკეთებენ არსტრუქტურებული ფესტური ხაზები საბეჭის კომენტრებში და არგუმენტური ესესის მონაცემებით.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο γραφήματος παραγόντων για την εξόρυξη ορίων, σχεδιασμένο για ρυθμίσεις στις οποίες οι διαφωνικές σχέσεις σε ένα έγγραφο δεν σχηματίζουν απαραίτητα μια δομή δέντρου. (Αυτό συμβαίνει σε πάνω από 20% του συνόλου δεδομένων σχολίων ιστού που απελευθερώνουμε.) Το μοντέλο μας μαθαίνει από κοινού την ταξινόμηση στοιχειώδους τύπου μονάδας και την πρόβλεψη επιχειρηματολογικής σχέσης. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας υποστηρίζει παραμετροποιήσεις και μπορεί να επιβάλει περιορισμούς δομής (π.χ. μεταβατικότητα) και να εκφράσει εξαρτήσεις μεταξύ γειτονικών σχέσεων και προτάσεων. Οι προσεγγίσεις μας ξεπερνούν τις μη δομημένες γραμμές βάσης τόσο στα σχόλια ιστού όσο και στα σύνολα δεδομένων επιχειρηματολογίας.', 'hu': 'Az argumentumbányászathoz egy új faktorgráf modellt javasolunk, amelyet olyan beállításokra terveztünk, amelyekben a dokumentumban található argumentatív kapcsolatok nem feltétlenül alkotnak faszerkezetet. (Ez a helyzet az általunk kiadott webes megjegyzések adathalmazának több mint 20%-ában.) Modellünk közösen tanul elemi egységtípus osztályozást és érvelő kapcsolat előrejelzést. Ezenkívül modellünk támogatja az SVM és RNN paramétereket, képes kényszeríteni a strukturális korlátozásokat (pl. tranzitivitás), és kifejezni a szomszédos kapcsolatok és javaslatok közötti függőségeket. Megközelítéseink felülmúlják a strukturálatlan bázisvonalakat mind a webes kommentek, mind az érvelő esszék adatkészletek esetében.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo modello di grafico dei fattori per l'estrazione di argomenti, progettato per impostazioni in cui le relazioni argomentative in un documento non formano necessariamente una struttura ad albero. (Questo è il caso in oltre il 20% del set di dati dei commenti web che rilasciamo.) Il nostro modello apprende congiuntamente la classificazione elementare del tipo di unità e la previsione argomentativa delle relazioni. Inoltre, il nostro modello supporta le parametrizzazioni SVM e RNN, può imporre vincoli di struttura (ad esempio, transitivity) e può esprimere dipendenze tra relazioni e proposizioni adiacenti. I nostri approcci superano le linee di base non strutturate sia nei commenti web che nei dataset di saggi argomentativi.", 'kk': 'Біз аргументтік құжаттың аргументтік қатынастары құжаттың құрылымына аргументтік құрылымына аргументтік қатынастарын құру үшін романдық фактор график үлгісін ұсынамыз. (Бұл біз шығармыз веб- таңбашалардың 20% артық деректер жиынында болады.) Біздің үлгіміз бірлікті бірлікті бірлікті классификацияны және аргументтік қатынастың алдын- ала үйренеді. Біздің үлгіміз SVM және RNN параметрлерін қолдайды, құрылғының шектерін (мысалы, жылжытылығы) көмектесе алады және келесі қатынастар мен ұсыныстар арасындағы тәуелдіктерді көрсетеді. Біздің жағдайларымыз веб түсініктері мен аргументалдық ессей деректер жиындарында құрылмаған негізгі сызықтарды жасайды.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują argument ų gavybos grafikos model į, skirtą nustatymams, kuriuose argumentaciniai santykiai dokumente nebūtinai sudaro medžio struktūrą. (Taip yra daugiau kaip 20 proc. interneto komentarų duomenų rinkinio, kurį skelbiame.) Mūsų modelis kartu mokosi elementarinio vieneto tipo klasifikavimo ir argumentacinių santykių prognozavimo. Be to, mūsų modelis remia SVM ir RNN parametrizacijas, gali nustatyti struktūrinius apribojimus (pvz., pereinamąjį laikotarpį) ir gali išreikšti priklausomybę tarp gretimų santykių ir pasiūlymų. Mūsų požiūris viršija nestruktūruotas bazines linijas tiek interneto komentaruose, tiek argumentaciniuose egzaminuose.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме нов факторски графски модел за рудање аргументи, дизајниран за поставувања во кои аргументативните односи во документот не мора да формираат структура на дрво. (Ова е случајот во повеќе од 20 отсто од веб коментарниот компјутер на податоци што ги објавуваме.) Нашиот модел заедно научи класификација на елементарниот тип на единица и предвидување на аргументативните односи. Покрај тоа, нашиот модел ги поддржува параметризациите на СВМ и РНН, може да ги спроведе структурните ограничувања (на пример транзитивноста) и може да изрази зависности помеѓу соседните односи и предлози. Нашите пристапи ги надминуваат неструктурираните основни линии во веб коментарите и аргументативните бази на податоци.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model graf faktor baru untuk penambangan argumen, direka untuk tetapan di mana hubungan argumen dalam dokumen tidak perlu membentuk struktur pokok. (Ini adalah kes dalam lebih dari 20% daripada set data ulasan web yang kita bebaskan.) Model kita bersama-sama belajar klasifikasi jenis unit dasar dan ramalan hubungan argumentatif. Selain itu, model kami menyokong parametrisasi SVM dan RNN, boleh memaksa keterangan struktur (contohnya, transitiviti), dan boleh mengekspresikan dependensi antara hubungan bersebelahan dan cadangan. Pendekatan kita melebihi garis dasar tidak terstruktur dalam kedua-dua ulasan web dan set data essai argumensif.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫാക്റ്റര്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നാം പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു, വാദ്യാഖ്യ മൈനിങ്ങിനുള്ള ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി, ഒരു രേഖയിലെ  (ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിട്ടുപോകുന്ന വെബിലെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ 20% കൂടുതല്\u200d കേസ് ഇതാണ്) നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒന്നിച്ച് പഠിക്കുന്ന ആദ്യതരത്തിന്റെ തരത്തിലുള്ള യൂണിറ്റിയിന്റെ തരത്തില്\u200d വിവ Moreover, our model supports SVM and RNN parametrizations, can enforce structure constraints (e.g., transitivity), and can express dependencies between adjacent relations and propositions.  നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d വെബ്ലിന്\u200dറെ അഭിപ്രായത്ത', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ grafika tal-fatturi għall-minjieri tal-argumenti, imfassal għal setturi li fihom ir-relazzjonijiet argumentattivi f’dokument ma jiffurmawx neċessarjament struttura tas-siġar. (Dan huwa l-każ f’aktar minn 20% tas-sett tad-dejta tal-kummenti fuq l-internet li nirrilaxxaw.) Il-mudell tagħna jitgħallem b’mod konġunt il-klassifikazzjoni tat-tip ta’ unit à elementari u t-tbassir tar-relazzjoni argumentattiva. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jappoġġja l-parametrizzazzjonijiet SVM u RNN, jista’ jinforza restrizzjonijiet strutturali (pereżempju, tranżitività), u jista’ jesprimi dipendenzi bejn relazzjonijiet u proposti maġenb xulxin. L-approċċi tagħna jaqbżu l-linji bażi mhux strutturati kemm fil-kummenti fuq l-internet kif ukoll fis-settijiet tad-dejta argumentattivi tas-sessjonijiet.', 'mn': 'Бид аргументын сүлжээний шинэ фактор график загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Документын аргументын харилцаа нь модны бүтцийг бий болгохгүй. (Энэ бол бидний хэвлэгдэх веб-сэтгэл өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн 20% хувь.) Бидний загвар нь нэгж төрлийн ангилалын хэлбэр, аргументын харилцааны таамаглал суралцдаг. Мөн бидний загвар нь SVM болон RNN параметризацийг дэмжиж, бүтэц хязгаарлалуудыг (жишээ нь шилжүүлэлт), ойролцоогоор харилцаа болон урам зорилгооны хооронд хамааралтай байдлыг илэрхийлж чадна. Бидний арга барилгууд веб комментарий болон аргументын эсийн өгөгдлийн санд бүтээгдэхүүнгүй суурь шугам гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit roman faktoregraf for argument-mining, utforma for innstillingar der argumentative forholdet i eit dokument ikkje nødvendig formar ei trestruktur. (Dette er tilfellet i over 20 % av datasettet for nettkommentarar vi utgjev.) Modellen vårt lærer samtidig elementær klassifikasjon og argumentativ forhåndsvising av einingar. I tillegg støttar modellen vårt SVM- og RNN- parametrisasjonar, kan utføra strukturbegrensningar (t.d. overflytting), og kan uttrykke avhengighet mellom tilhøyrande forhold og forslag. Nærmingane våre utfører ikkje strukturerte baselinjer i både nettkommentarar og argumentativ essêdatasett.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowy model wykresu czynnikowego dla wydobywania argumentów, przeznaczony dla ustawień, w których relacje argumentatywne w dokumencie niekoniecznie tworzą strukturę drzewa. (Dzieje się tak w przypadku ponad 20% publikowanych przez nas danych dotyczących komentarzy internetowych.) Nasz model wspólnie uczy się klasyfikacji elementarnego typu jednostki i przewidywania relacji argumentatywnych. Ponadto nasz model obsługuje parametryzacje SVM i RNN, może wymuszać ograniczenia strukturalne (np. przejściowość) oraz może wyrażać zależności między sąsiadującymi relacjami i propozycjami. Nasze podejścia przewyższają nieustrukturyzowane linie bazowe zarówno w komentarzach internetowych, jak i zbiorach danych argumentacyjnych esejów.', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou model de grafic factor pentru argument mining, conceput pentru setări în care relațiile argumentative dintr-un document nu formează neapărat o structură arborească. (Acesta este cazul în peste 20% din setul de date de comentarii web pe care îl lansăm.) Modelul nostru învață împreună clasificarea tipurilor de unități elementare și predicția relațiilor argumentative. Mai mult decât atât, modelul nostru suportă parametrizările SVM și RNN, poate impune constrângeri de structură (de exemplu, tranzitivitatea) și poate exprima dependențe între relațiile adiacente și propunerile. Abordările noastre depășesc liniile de bază nestructurate atât în comentariile web, cât și în seturile de date argumentative de eseuri.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo model novog faktora za rudarstvo argumentacija, dizajniran za postavke u kojima argumentativni odnosi u dokumentu ne oblikuju strukturu drveta. (Ovo je slučaj u preko 20% internetskih komentara koje objavljujemo.) Naš model zajedno uči elementarnu klasifikaciju tipa jedinica i predviđanje argumentativnih odnosa. Osim toga, naš model podržava parametrizacije SVM i RNN, može spriječiti ograničenja strukture (npr. prelaznost), i može izraziti zavisnost između bliskih odnosa i prijedloga. Naši pristupi iznose neostrukturne osnovne linije u web komentarima i argumentativnim setima podataka eseja.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, සැකසුම් සඳහා සැක (මේක තමයි අපි ප්\u200dරතිකාශ කරපු වෙබ් කිරීමේ දත්ත සැට 20% වඩා වැඩියි.) අපේ මොඩල් එක්කෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා අධ්\u200dයම යුනිට් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න තවත්, අපේ මොඩල් SVM සහ RNN පරාමිතිකරණය සහයෙන්, සංවිධානය අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපේ අවස්ථාවය නොස්ථාපනය වෙබ් කිරීම සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa tusaale tusaale ahaan sawir ah oo ku qoran qoraalka qiimeynta, taasoo lagu qoray qoraalaha ku saabsan xiriirka warshadowga ee dukumentiga aan si qasab ah u samayn dhismo geed ah. (Taasi waa xaalad ka badan 20% oo ka tirsan bogga shabakadda commentarada oo aynu bixino). Tusaalkayagu wuxuu si wadajir ah u baranayaa fasaxa kooxaha hoose ee noocyada kooxaha ah iyo ka sii sheegashada xiriirka arrimaha ku saabsan. Sidoo kale modellkayagu wuxuu taageeraa parameterizada SVM iyo RNN, wuxuu samayn karaa qasabka dhismaha (tusaale ahaan baaritaanka), wuxuuna muujin karaa ku xiriirta xiriirka iyo soo jeedinta. Dhaqdhaheenna waxay ka samaysaa aasaasyo aan la dhisay shabakada internetka iyo qoraalka macluumaadka sheekeysiga ah.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny faktor grafmodell för argumentbrytning, utformad för inställningar där argumentationsrelationerna i ett dokument inte nödvändigtvis bildar en trädstruktur. (Detta är fallet i över 20% av webbkommentarsdatauppsättningen vi släpper.) Vår modell lär sig gemensamt elementär enhetstypklassificering och argumenterande relationsförutsägelse. Dessutom stöder vår modell SVM- och RNN-parametrar, kan genomdriva strukturbegränsningar (t.ex. transitivitet) och kan uttrycka beroenden mellan angränsande relationer och propositioner. Våra tillvägagångssätt överträffar ostrukturerade baslinjer i både webbkommentarer och argumentativa uppsatsdataset.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய காரணி வரைபடம் மாதிரி வாய்ப்பு கருவிக்கு, வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகளின் வடிவமைப்பு, அதில் ஒரு ஆவணத்தில் தருவார்ப்பு தொடர் (நாம் விடுவோம் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் 20% க்கு மேற்பட்ட நிகழ்ச்சி) நமது மாதிரி ஒன்றாக தனிமத்தின் வகுப்பு வகுப்பு மற்றும் தர்க்கமான தொடர்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பு மேலும், எங்கள் மாதிரி SVM மற்றும் RNN அளபுருக்களுக்கு ஆதரிக்கிறது, கட்டும் கட்டுப்பாடுகளை நிர்வகிக்க முடியும் (உதாரணமாக மாற்றுதல்) மற்றும் அண்ட இணைய குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் வார்த்தைப்படுத்தும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் நிறுவப்படாத அடிப்படைகளை வெளியே செயல்படு', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی فکتور گراف موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جو آرکوم مینینگ کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے، جہاں ایک دکھانٹ میں بحث کے ارتباط کا ایک درخت ساختہ نہیں بناتے۔ (یہ ویب کی کمانٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے 20% سے زیادہ ہے جو ہم آزاد کرتے ہیں) ہماری مدل ایک دوسرے سے اولین یونیٹ کی طرح کلاسیفون اور ارتباطی نسبت کی پیش بینی سکھاتا ہے. اور ہماری مدل SVM اور RNN پارامیٹریزیزیزوں کی مدد کرتی ہے، ساختاری محدودیت کو مضبوط کر سکتی ہے (جیسے تغییرات) اور قریبی رابطہ اور پیشنهادوں کے درمیان اعتباری کا استعمال کر سکتی ہے۔ ہماری تقریبا ویب کی کمانٹروں اور بحثی ایسس ڈیٹ سٹ میں غیر ساختہ بنسٹ لینڈ کی عمدہ کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Biz hujjatdagi argumentlarni qidirish uchun novel faktor grafik modelini tahlil qilamiz. Hujjatdagi argumentlar murakkablarini bu daraxt tuzuvni yaratish kerak emas. (Bu hozir biz ajratish uchun veb- sahifaning 20% dan ortiq izohi.) Bizning modelimiz birlashtirilgan birinchi birinchi birinchi darajalashtirish va argumentative murojaat qilishni o'rganadi. Ko'rib, bizning modelimiz SVM va RNN parametrlarini qoʻllayapti, tuzuvlar tartiblarini (m. g. transition) bajarishi mumkin va taxminan aloqalarni ishlatish mumkin. Bizning murakkablarimiz veb- izohlarimiz va argumentative ma'lumotlar sahifasi haqida yaratilmagan asosiy sonlarini bajaradi.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình đồ thị nhân tạo mới cho việc khai thác tranh luận, được thiết kế cho các thiết lập mà các quan hệ tranh luận trong một tài liệu không cần thiết tạo thành một cấu trúc cây. (Đây là trường hợp trên 20='của tập tin chúng tôi phát tán trên mạng về các bình luận.) Mẫu của chúng tôi học cùng nhau hạng Robot căn bản và dự đoán các mối quan hệ. Hơn nữa, mẫu của chúng tôi hỗ trợ các mô hình SVM và RNN, có thể áp dụng các giới hạn cấu trúc (v.d. tính chuyển tiếp), và có thể thể xác định quan hệ phụ thuộc giữa các quan hệ xung quanh và các dự đoán. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực hiện những đường cơ bản không xây dựng trong cả các bình luận web và các tập tin tiểu luận.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов модел на факторна графика за аргументиране, предназначен за настройки, при които аргументативните отношения в документ не формират непременно дървесна структура. (Такъв е случаят с над 20% от уеб коментарите, които публикуваме.) Нашият модел съвместно научава класификация на типа елементарни единици и предсказване на аргументативните взаимоотношения. Освен това нашият модел поддържа параметризации, може да наложи структурни ограничения (напр. преходност) и може да изразява зависимости между съседни отношения и предложения. Нашите подходи надминават неструктурираните базови линии както в уеб коментарите, така и в наборите от данни за аргументативни есета.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw factor grafiekmodel voor argument mining voor, ontworpen voor omgevingen waarin de argumentatieve relaties in een document niet noodzakelijkerwijs een boomstructuur vormen. (Dit is het geval in meer dan 20% van de dataset webcommentaren die we vrijgeven.) Ons model leert gezamenlijk elementaire eenheidstypecolassificatie en argumentatieve relatieprognitie. Bovendien ondersteunt ons model SVM- en RNN-parametrisaties, kan structurele beperkingen afdwingen (bijv. transitiviteit) en kan afhankelijkheden tussen aangrenzende relaties en proposities uitdrukken. Onze benaderingen presteren beter dan ongestructureerde baselines in zowel webcommentaren als argumentatieve essay datasets.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny faktor grafmodel til argument mining, designet til indstillinger, hvor de argumentative relationer i et dokument ikke nødvendigvis danner en træstruktur. (Dette er tilfældet i over 20% af webkommentarsdatasættet, vi frigiver.) Vores model lærer i fællesskab elementær enhedstype klassifikation og argumenterende relationsforudsigelse. Desuden understøtter vores model SVM og RNN parametriseringer, kan håndhæve strukturelle begrænsninger (f.eks. transitivitet) og kan udtrykke afhængigheder mellem tilstødende relationer og forslag. Vores tilgange overgår ustrukturerede baselines i både webkommentarer og argumenterende essay datasæt.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo model novog grafika faktora za rudarstvo argumentacija, dizajniran za postavke u kojima argumentativni odnosi u dokumentu ne oblikuju strukturu drveta. (Ovo je slučaj u preko 20% internetskih komentara koje objavljujemo.) Naš model zajedno uči osnovnu klasifikaciju tipa jedinica i predviđanje argumentativnih odnosa. Osim toga, naš model podržava parametrizacije SVM i RNN, može primjenjivati ograničenja strukture (npr. prelaznost) i može izraziti zavisnost između susjednih odnosa i prijedloga. Naši pristupi iznose neostrukturirane osnovne linije u internetskim komentarima i argumentativnim podacima eseja.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Faktorgraphenmodell für Argument Mining vor, das für Settings entwickelt wurde, in denen die argumentativen Beziehungen in einem Dokument nicht unbedingt eine Baumstruktur bilden. (Dies ist bei über 20% des von uns veröffentlichten Web-Kommentaren der Fall.) Unser Modell lernt gemeinsam elementare Einheitentypklassifikation und argumentative Beziehungsvorhersage. Darüber hinaus unterstützt unser Modell SVM- und RNN-Parametrisierungen, kann Strukturbeschränkungen erzwingen (z.B. Transitivität) und Abhängigkeiten zwischen benachbarten Beziehungen und Propositionen ausdrücken. Unsere Ansätze übertreffen unstrukturierte Baselines sowohl in Web-Kommentaren als auch in argumentativen Essay-Datensätzen.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model graf faktor baru untuk pertambangan argumen, dirancang untuk pengaturan di mana hubungan argumen dalam dokumen tidak perlu membentuk struktur pohon. (Ini adalah kasus dalam lebih dari 20% dari set data komentar web yang kita bebaskan.) Model kita bersama belajar klasifikasi tipe unit dasar dan prediksi hubungan argumensif. Selain itu, model kami mendukung parametrisasi SVM dan RNN, dapat memaksa batas struktur (contohnya, transitivitas), dan dapat mengekspresikan ketergantuan antara hubungan dekat dan proposisi. Our approaches outperform unstructured baselines in both web comments and argumentative essay datasets.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa kiwango cha riwaya kwa ajili ya uchimbaji madini ya uchimbaji mijadala, uliobuniwa kwa mazingira ambayo mahusiano ya hoja katika nyaraka hazijaweza kujenga muundo wa mti. (Hii ni kesi katika zaidi ya asilimia 20 ya maoni ya mtandaoni ya taarifa tunayotoa.) Our model jointly learns elementary unit type classification and argumentative relation prediction.  Zaidi ya hayo, modeli yetu inaunga mkono vipimo vya SVM na RNN, inaweza kutekeleza vikwazo vya muundo (kama vile upatikanaji), na inaweza kuonyesha kutegemea kati ya mahusiano na mapendekezo ya karibu. Matokeo yetu yanafanya misingi yasiyo na ujenzi katika maoni ya mtandaoni na vyombo vya taarifa vinavyohusiana.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل گرافیک تازه برای خروج مذکور arguments، طراحی برای تنظیمات که رابطه\u200cهای مذکور در یک سند لازم نیست یک ساختار درخت ساخته شود. (این پرونده در بیش از ۲۰ درصد از مجموعه داده\u200cهای راهنمایی وب است که ما آزاد می\u200cکنیم.) مدل ما با همدیگر به عنوان مختصات واحد اصلی و ارتباط ارتباطی مطمئنی یاد می گیرد. علاوه بر این، مدل ما به پارامتریزیزی\u200cهای SVM و RNN حمایت می\u200cکند، می\u200cتواند محدودیت ساختاری (مثال تغییرات) را تحت تاثیر قرار دهد، و می\u200cتواند بستگی بین رابطه\u200cهای نزدیک و پیشنهاد را نشان دهد. نزدیک\u200cهای ما بیشتر از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cسازی\u200cهای ناساخته\u200cشده در هر رابطه\u200cهای وب و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': 'Biz argumint küçürmek üçin roman faktör grafiki nusgasyny teklip edip, bir senedeki argumint baglaşyklaryň ahyry struktury diýmek üçin düzenlenýäris. (Bu biziň bugün üýtgediğimiz web terjimeleriniň 20%-den fazla ýagdaýda. ) Biziň modelimiz birlikde elementer birim hili klasifikasyýa we argumentatik baglaýyşy öwrenýär. Mundan soňra, biziň modelimiz SVM we RNN parametrizatlaryny destekleýär, strukturyň çykyşlaryny (meselâ, g e çişik), we ýanyň golaý baglaşyklaryň we teklibleriň arasynda bağlygyny aýdyp biler. Biziň golaýlarymyz web töwziňlerde we argusiýat eser düzümlerinde döredilmedik baz hatlary çykarýar.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n roman faktoregraaf model vir argument mining, ontwerp vir instellings waarin die argumentatiewe verhouding in 'n dokument nie noodsaaklik 'n boomstruktuur formeer nie. (Hierdie is die geval in meer as 20% van die web kommentaar datastel wat ons verlos.) Ons model leer jointly elementary unit type classification and argumentative relation prediction. Ook, ons model ondersteun SVM en RNN parametrisasies, kan strukturebegrenkinge (bv. tranziwiteit) verplig en kan afhanklikhede tussen nabytige verhoudinge en voorstellings uitdruk. Ons toegang uitvoer ongestruktureerde basis lyne in beide web kommentaar en argumentatiewe essêerdatasse.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model grafik të faktorit të ri për minierën e argumenteve, të dizajnuar për rregullime në të cilat marrëdhëniet argumentuese në një dokument nuk formojnë domosdoshmërisht një strukturë pemësh. (Ky është rasti në mbi 20% të të dhënave të komenteve të internetit që lëshojmë.) Modeli ynë mëson së bashku klasifikimin elementar të njësisë dhe parashikimin e lidhjes argumentuese. Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë mbështet parametrizimet SVM dhe RNN, mund të zbatojë kufizimet e strukturës (për shembull tranzitiviteti) dhe mund të shprehë varësinë midis marrëdhënieve dhe propozimeve të pranishme. Our approaches outperform unstructured baselines in both web comments and argumentative essay datasets.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր գործոնների գծագրային մոդել բանավեճերի հանքահանման համար, որը նախագծված է այնպիսի միջոցների համար, որոնց մեջ փաստաթղթի բանավեճական հարաբերությունները պարտադիր չեն ձևավորում ծառի կառուցված (Սա տեղի է ունենում վեբ-մեկնաբանությունների ավելի քան 20 տոկոսի տվյալների համակարգում, որը մենք հրապարակում ենք): Մեր մոդելը միասին սովորում է տարրական միավորի տիպի դասակարգումը և բանավեճող հարաբերությունների կանխատեսումը: Ավելին, մեր մոդելը աջակցում է ՁԻԱՀ-ի և ՌՆԹ-ի պարամետրիզացիաները, կարող է պայքարել կառուցվածքի սահմանափակումները (օրինակ, անցումը) և կարող է արտահայտել կախվածությունը հարևանքների և առաջարկների միջև: Մեր մոտեցումները գերազանցում են ոչ կառուցվածքային հիմնական գծերը և վեբ-մոտեցումներում, և բանավեճող էսսերի տվյալների համակարգերում:', 'am': 'የሰነድ አካባቢ ግንኙነት የዛፍ ሥርዓት ባይደረግበት አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር የኖሮው አካባቢ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ምሳሌ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ (ይህ ጉዳዩ ከ20 በመቶ የበለጠ የመረቡን ዳታዎችን እናስወግዳለን) ሞዴሌያችን በተጠቃሚ የብሔራዊ ዓይነት መፍጠር እና የውይይት ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር ይማራሉ፡፡ ደግሞም ሞዴላያችን SVM እና RNN ምርጫዎች ይደግፋል፣ ግንኙነትን (ምሳሌ ጥቅረት) ያስችላል፡፡ የድረ ገጽ ማስታወቂያዎች እና የክርክረኛ የድምፅ አካባቢ ድረ-አካባቢዎች ውስጥ ያሉትን መሠረት ያሳርፋሉ፡፡', 'az': 'Biz Argument madenci üçün yeni faktor grafik modelini təbliğ edirik, beləcə bir dökümdə argumentativ əlaqələr əslində a ğac qurulması üçün hazırlanmışdır. (Bu bizim yayınladığımız web şəhadətlərin 20%-dən artıq olan məlumatdır.) Bizim modellərimiz birlikdə ilk birim növü klasifikasyonu və argumentativ əlaqəsini öyrənir. Əksinə, modellərimiz SVM və RNN parametrizaqlarını dəstəkləyir, strukturların sıxıntılarını (məsələn, keçişkilik) yerinə yetirə bilər və yaxın ilişkiler və təbliğlər arasında bağlılıqları ifadə edə bilər. Bizim yaxınlıqlarımız web komentarında və argumentativ essay veri qurularında qurulmamış baz çətinliklərdən üstün gəlir.', 'bn': 'আমরা যুক্তি মিনিং এর জন্য একটি উপন্যাসের ফ্যাক্টর গ্রাফ মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যেটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে, যেখানে একটি নথিতে যুক (ওয়েব মন্তব্যের ২০ শতাংশের মধ্যে এই ঘটনায় আমরা মুক্তি দেই)। আমাদের মডেল একসাথে মৌলিক ইউনিটের ধরনের বিভাগ এবং যুক্তিগত সম্পর্কের ভবিষ্যৎ শিখে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল এসভিএম এবং আরএনএন প্যারামিটারিজেশন সমর্থন করে, তারা কাঠামোর নিয়ন্ত্রণ বাধ্য করতে পারে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, অতিক্রম) এবং প্রস্তাবের মধ্ ওয়েব মন্তব্য এবং যুক্তিভাবে তথ্য সংক্রান্ত বেসাইটগুলোতে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে।', 'ko': '우리는 파라미터 발굴에 사용되는 새로운 인자도 모델을 제시했는데 문서에 사용되는 파라미터 관계가 반드시 트리 구조를 형성하는 설정은 아니다.(우리가 발표한 20% 이상의 인터넷 평론 데이터가 집중되어 있다.)우리의 모델은 기본 단원의 유형 분류와 논증 관계 예측을 연합하여 학습한다.또한 저희 모델은 SVM과 RNN 매개 변수화를 지원하여 구조적 제약(예를 들어 전달성)을 강제로 집행할 수 있고 인접 관계와 명제 간의 의존 관계를 표현할 수 있습니다.우리의 방법은 인터넷 평론과 논변문 데이터의 집중이 비구조화된 기선보다 낫다.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo model novog faktora za rudarstvo argumentacija, dizajniran za postavke u kojima argumentativni odnosi u dokumentu ne oblikuju strukturu drveta. (Ovo je slučaj u preko 20% internetskih komentara koje objavljujemo.) Naš model zajedno uči elementarnu klasifikaciju tipa jedinica i predviđanje argumentativnih odnosa. Osim toga, naš model podržava parametrizacije SVM i RNN, može spriječiti ograničenja strukture (npr. prelaznost) i izraziti zavisnosti između susjednih odnosa i prijedloga. Naši pristupi iznose neostrukturne bazne linije u web komentarima i argumentativnim setima podataka eseja.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue faktorigraafiku mudeli argumentide kaevandamiseks, mis on mõeldud seadistustele, kus dokumendi argumentatiivsed seosed ei pruugi tingimata moodustada puustruktuuri. (See kehtib enam kui 20% meie avaldatavatest veebikommentaaride andmekogumist.) Meie mudel õpib ühiselt elementaarüksuse tüübi klassifitseerimist ja argumentatiivse seose ennustamist. Lisaks toetab meie mudel SVM ja RNN parametrisatsioone, võib jõustada struktuuripiiranguid (nt transitiivsus) ja väljendada sõltuvusi naabersuhete ja ettepanekute vahel. Meie lähenemisviisid ületavad struktureerimata lähtejooni nii veebikommentaaride kui argumentatiivsete essee andmekogumite puhul.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový model faktorového grafu pro dolování argumentů, navržený pro nastavení, ve kterých argumentativní vztahy v dokumentu nemusí nutně tvořit stromovou strukturu. (To je případ více než 20% datové sady webových komentářů, kterou uvolníme.) Náš model se společně učí klasifikaci základních typů jednotek a predikci argumentativních vztahů. Navíc náš model podporuje parametrizace SVM a RNN, může vynucovat strukturní omezení (např. transitivitu) a může vyjádřit závislosti mezi sousedními vztahy a propozicemi. Naše přístupy překonávají nestrukturované základní linie jak ve webových komentářích, tak v argumentativních esejích datových sadách.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou model de gràfic de factors per a la mineria d'arguments, dissenyat per configuracions en les que les relacions argumentatives d'un document no formen necessariament una estructura d'arbre. (Això és el cas en més del 20% dels comentaris web que publicam.) El nostre model aprene conjuntament la classificació del tipus d'unitat elementari i la predicció de relacions argumentatives. A més, el nostre model suporta les parametritzacions SVM i RNN, pot aplicar restriccions estructurals (per exemple, transitivitat) i pot expressar dependencies entre les relacions i proposacions adjacents. Els nostres enfocaments superen les línies de base sense estructura tant en comentaris web com en conjunts de dades d'essais argumentatius.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta faktorigraafimallia argumenttien louhintaan, joka on suunniteltu asetuksiin, joissa dokumentin argumentatiiviset suhteet eivät välttämättä muodosta puurakennetta. (Tämä koskee yli 20% julkaisemastamme verkkokommenteista.) Mallimme oppii yhdessä perusyksikkötyypin luokittelun ja argumentoivan suhteen ennustamisen. Lisäksi mallimme tukee SVM- ja RNN-parametrisointia, voi pakottaa rakenteellisia rajoituksia (esim. transitiivisuutta) ja voi ilmaista riippuvuuksia vierekkäisten suhteiden ja proposiatioiden välillä. Lähestymistapamme suoriutuvat strukturoimattomista lähtökohdista sekä verkkokommenteissa että argumentoivissa essee-aineistoissa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake model neng bener Graf kanggo nggawe argument miner, dibenakno kanggo nggawe aturan sing dibenalke kelompok argument neng dokumen kuwi ora bisa ngebas dhéwé sampek butuh tentang. (Iki lak iso ngomong luwih 2% ning komentar web nambah data nambah.) Global bending"), ("Relative position to a reference point defines global bending direction and amount"), "bending Nambah, modelo nambah kudu nggunaké SVM lan DNN parametrirasaun, iso nggunakake sistem tigewake nggawe barang (isih, njot, kejahatan), lan iso nggambar dipulangan diputasane etiket keamanan tambah karo iso nggunakake Rasané awak dhéwé iso nggawe barang-barang sing bisa nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang web lan dataset sing dikarepaké', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל גרף גורם חדש למכרת טיעונים, מעוצב עבור הסדרות שבהן יחסי הטעון במסמך לא בהכרח יוצרים מבנה עץ. (זה המקרה ב-20 אחוזים ממערכת נתונים על האינטרנט שאנחנו משחררים.) המודל שלנו לומד ביחד מסוג יחידה יסודית וסוג חיזוי ביחסים מתווכחים. בנוסף, המודל שלנו תומך בפרמטריזציות SVM ו RNN, יכול להכריח מחסומות מבנה (למשל, מעבר), ויכול להביע תלויות בין יחסים סמוכים וההצעות. הגישויים שלנו עולים מעל קווי הבסיס לא מבושלים בשני הערות באינטרנט וגם קבוצות מידע ביטויים.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov model faktorskih grafov za rudarjenje argumentov, ki je zasnovan za nastavitve, v katerih argumentativna relacija v dokumentu ne tvori nujno drevesne strukture. (To velja za več kot 20% spletnih komentarjev, ki jih objavljamo.) Naš model skupaj uči klasifikacijo elementarnih vrst enot in napovedovanje argumentativnih relacij. Poleg tega naš model podpira parametrizacije SVM in RNN, lahko uveljavlja strukturne omejitve (npr. tranzitivnost) in lahko izrazi odvisnosti med sosednjimi relacijami in predlogi. Naši pristopi presegajo nestrukturirane osnovne črte v spletnih komentarjih in argumentativnih esejskih naborih podatkov.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani misali na faso na nowaya wa kungiya wa kunnufi, wanda aka ƙayyade wa tsaro masu yin husũma da ke cikin takarda, ba ya lazimta tsari wata itãce. (Wannan jarida ne cikin 20% na ɗayan kayan bayani da za'a saka shi.) Ana sanar da misalinmu na haɗi zuwa wani nau'in-nau'in da kuma babu wani abu na haɗi. Za kuma, misãlai kanmu yana ƙarfafa parametrikarin SvM da RNN, yana iya iya lazimta tsari (misali, transitinci), kuma yana iya iya bayyana bayani'anar tsakanin samuratan da suka samu. MataimakinMu na sami bakwai da ba'a samar da aka saɓa ba a cikin masu mawaɗar maganar ta da masu husũma.", 'bo': 'We propose a novel factor graph model for argument mining, designed for settings in which the argumentative relations in a document do not necessarily form a tree structure. (འདི་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་དྲ་བརྗོད་མཆན་སྡེར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་༢༠་ཙམ་ནང་དུ་འདུག) ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱིས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག Moreover, our model supports SVM and RNN parametrizations, can enforce structure constraints (e.g., transitivity), and can express dependencies between adjacent relations and propositions. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་དྲ་བརྗོད་བཤད་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བཟོས་མེད་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་'}
{'en': 'Bayesian Modeling of Lexical Resources for Low-Resource Settings', 'ar': 'نمذجة بايزي للمصادر المعجمية للإعدادات منخفضة الموارد', 'pt': 'Modelagem Bayesiana de Recursos Lexicais para Configurações de Poucos Recursos', 'es': 'Modelado bayesiano de recursos léxicos para entornos de bajos recursos', 'fr': 'Modélisation bayésienne des ressources lexicales pour les environnements à faibles ressources', 'ja': '低リソース設定のための語彙リソースのベイズモデリング', 'zh': '低资源置词法资源贝叶斯建模', 'ru': 'Байесовское моделирование лексических ресурсов для малоресурсных установок', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन सेटिंग्स के लिए लेक्सिकल संसाधनों के बायेसियन मॉडलिंग', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Bayesian ar Acmhainní Foclóra do Shocruithe Acmhainne Íseal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση Λεξικών Πόρων για Ρυθμίσεις Χαμηλού Πόρου', 'hu': 'Lexikai erőforrások bayesiai modellezése alacsony erőforrás-beállításokhoz', 'it': 'Modellazione bayesiana delle risorse lessicali per impostazioni a basso contenuto di risorse', 'lt': 'Bayesian Modelling of Lexical Resources for Low Resources Settings', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс параметрлері үшін лексикалық ресурстар үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ബെയിസിയന്\u200d മോഡോളിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Mudellar Bayesian ta’ Riżorsi Lessiċi għal Settijiet ta’ Riżorsi Baxxi', 'mn': 'Байзийн боловсрол бага боловсролын лексикийн нөөцийн загварын загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Bayesowskie modelowanie zasobów leksykalnych dla ustawień niskich zasobów', 'ro': 'Modelarea bayesiană a resurselor lexicale pentru setări cu resurse reduse', 'sr': 'Бајезски модел лексикалних ресурсова за ниски ресурс', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Bayesian Modeling of Lexical Resources for Low-Resource Settings', 'sv': 'Bayesian modellering av Lexical Resources för lågresursinställningar', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ thao túng ngôn ngữ học cho thiết lập ít tài nguyên', 'bg': 'Байезийско моделиране на лексикални ресурси за настройки с ниски ресурси', 'da': 'Bayesian modellering af Lexical Resources til indstillinger med lav ressource', 'hr': 'Modeliranje leksičkih resursa iz Bayesijskog stanja niskih resursa', 'de': 'Bayesische Modellierung Lexischer Ressourcen für ressourcenarme Einstellungen', 'id': 'Pemodeling Sumber Lexik Bayesian untuk Pengaturan Sumber Terrendah', 'ko': '저자원 환경에서 어휘자원의 베일스 모델링', 'sw': 'Msimamo wa Kibayesia wa rasilimali za Lexico kwa ajili ya Mpango wa rasilimali chini', 'tr': 'Açk Ressourt Däşemeleri üçin Leksik Ressurlaryň Modeli', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modelimi Bayesian i burimeve leksike për rregullimet e burimeve të ulta', 'nl': 'Bayesiaanse modellering van Lexical Resources voor Low Resource Settings', 'am': 'የባይስയന ሞዴልኤል የLexical Resources for Low-Resource Settings', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական ռեսուրսների բեյզիական մոդելավորումը ցածր ռեսուրսների սահմանափակումների համար', 'az': 'Aşağı-Ressourt Qurğuları üçün Leksik Ressourslərin Beyisiyalı Modeli', 'ca': 'Modell Bayesian de Recurss Lèxics per a Configuracions de Baix Recurss', 'fa': 'Modeling Bayesian of Lexical Resources for Low Resources Settings', 'cs': 'Bayesovské modelování Lexických zdrojů pro nastavení s nízkými zdroji', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদের জন্য বেয়েসিয়ান মডেল', 'bs': 'Bayesijsko modeliranje leksičkih resursa za nastave niskih resursa', 'et': 'Lexikaalsete ressursside bayesia modelleerimine vähese ressursi seadistuste jaoks', 'fi': 'Bayesian mallinnus Lexical Resources for Low Resource Settings', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Bayezijsko modeliranje leksičnih virov za nastavitve z nizkimi viri', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་བ་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་ཆུང་བའི་ཁུངས་ཆུང་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་མ་དབུགས'}
{'en': 'Lexical resources such as dictionaries and gazetteers are often used as auxiliary data for tasks such as part-of-speech induction and named-entity recognition. However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better. In this paper, we investigate a more robust approach : we stipulate that the lexicon is the result of an assumed generative process. Practically, this means that we may treat the lexical resources as observations under the proposed generative model. The lexical resources provide training data for the generative model without requiring separate data to estimate lexical feature weights. We evaluate the proposed approach in two settings : part-of-speech induction and low-resource named-entity recognition.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تُستخدم الموارد المعجمية مثل القواميس والمعاجم كبيانات مساعدة لمهام مثل استقراء جزء من الكلام والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة. ومع ذلك ، يتطلب التدريب التمييزي مع السمات المعجمية بيانات مشروحة لتقدير أوزان الميزات المعجمية بشكل موثوق وقد يؤدي إلى تعديل الميزات المعجمية على حساب الميزات التي يتم تعميمها بشكل أفضل. في هذه الورقة ، نتحرى عن نهج أكثر قوة: نشترط أن يكون المعجم نتيجة لعملية توليدية مفترضة. من الناحية العملية ، هذا يعني أننا قد نتعامل مع الموارد المعجمية على أنها ملاحظات في إطار النموذج التوليدي المقترح. توفر الموارد المعجمية بيانات تدريب للنموذج التوليدي دون الحاجة إلى بيانات منفصلة لتقدير أوزان الميزات المعجمية. نقوم بتقييم النهج المقترح في إعدادين: تحريض جزء من الكلام والتعرف على كيان مسمى منخفض الموارد.', 'fr': "Les ressources lexicales telles que les dictionnaires et les nomenclatures sont souvent utilisées comme données auxiliaires pour des tâches telles que l'induction d'une partie de la parole et la reconnaissance d'entités nommées. Cependant, l'entraînement discriminant avec des caractéristiques lexicales nécessite des données annotées pour estimer de manière fiable les pondérations des caractéristiques lexicales et peut entraîner un sur-ajustement des caractéristiques lexicales au détriment de caractéristiques qui se généralisent mieux. Dans cet article, nous étudions une approche plus robuste\xa0: nous stipulons que le lexique est le résultat d'un processus génératif supposé. Concrètement, cela signifie que nous pouvons traiter les ressources lexicales comme des observations selon le modèle génératif proposé. Les ressources lexicales fournissent des données d'apprentissage pour le modèle génératif sans nécessiter de données séparées pour estimer les pondérations des caractéristiques lexicales. Nous évaluons l'approche proposée dans deux contextes\xa0: l'induction d'une partie de la parole et la reconnaissance d'entités nommées à faibles ressources.", 'es': 'Los recursos léxicos, como diccionarios y diccionarios geográficos, se utilizan a menudo como datos auxiliares para tareas como la inducción de parte del habla y el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas. Sin embargo, el entrenamiento discriminativo con características léxicas requiere datos anotados para estimar de manera confiable los pesos de las características léxicas y puede resultar en un sobreajuste de las características léxicas a expensas de las características que se generalizan mejor. En este artículo, investigamos un enfoque más sólido: estipulamos que el léxico es el resultado de un supuesto proceso generativo. En la práctica, esto significa que podemos tratar los recursos léxicos como observaciones bajo el modelo generativo propuesto. Los recursos léxicos proporcionan datos de entrenamiento para el modelo generativo sin necesidad de datos separados para estimar los pesos de las características léxicas. Evaluamos el enfoque propuesto en dos entornos: inducción de parte del habla y reconocimiento de entidades nombradas de bajos recursos.', 'pt': 'Recursos lexicais, como dicionários e dicionários geográficos, são frequentemente usados como dados auxiliares para tarefas como indução de parte da fala e reconhecimento de entidade nomeada. No entanto, o treinamento discriminativo com características lexicais requer dados anotados para estimar de forma confiável os pesos das características lexicais e pode resultar em overfitting das características lexicais em detrimento das características que generalizam melhor. Neste artigo, investigamos uma abordagem mais robusta: estipulamos que o léxico é o resultado de um processo generativo assumido. Na prática, isso significa que podemos tratar os recursos lexicais como observações sob o modelo generativo proposto. Os recursos léxicos fornecem dados de treinamento para o modelo generativo sem exigir dados separados para estimar os pesos dos recursos léxicos. Avaliamos a abordagem proposta em dois cenários: indução de parte da fala e reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas com poucos recursos.', 'ja': '辞書や地名辞典などの語彙リソースは、音声部分誘導や名前付きエンティティ認識などのタスクの補助データとして使用されることが多い。しかしながら、語彙特徴を用いた識別訓練は、語彙特徴の重みを確実に推定するために注釈付きデータを必要とし、より一般化する特徴を犠牲にして語彙特徴を過剰に適合させる可能性がある。この論文では、より堅牢なアプローチを検討します。これは、語彙が仮定された生成プロセスの結果であることを規定しています。実際には、これは、提案された生成モデルの下で、語彙リソースを観察として扱うことができることを意味します。語彙リソースは、語彙特徴重みを推定するために別個のデータを必要とすることなく、生成モデルのための訓練データを提供する。提案されたアプローチを、音声誘導の一部と低資源の名前付きエンティティ認識の2つの設定で評価します。', 'ru': 'Лексические ресурсы, такие как словари и справочники, часто используются в качестве вспомогательных данных для таких задач, как введение части речи и распознавание именованных сущностей. Тем не менее, дискриминационное обучение с лексическими признаками требует аннотированных данных для надежной оценки веса лексических признаков и может привести к переоснащению лексических признаков за счет признаков, которые лучше обобщают. В этой статье мы исследуем более надежный подход: мы оговариваем, что лексикон является результатом предполагаемого генеративного процесса. На практике это означает, что мы можем рассматривать лексические ресурсы как наблюдения в рамках предлагаемой генеративной модели. Лексические ресурсы предоставляют обучающие данные для генеративной модели, не требуя отдельных данных для оценки весов лексических признаков. Мы оцениваем предлагаемый подход в двух условиях: индукция части речи и распознавание именованных сущностей с низким ресурсом.', 'zh': '词典与地名词典等词汇资源常以词性归、名实识数。 然词法特征之判别训练,带注之数,可以度词法权重,且可以致过度拟合词法,而牺牲泛化善也。 本文中,究其强大:词典假生事也。 实者,以词汇资为生成模型下之候也。 词法资为生成模形训练之数,而无独数以度词法权重。 二境之中,估其所出:词性归与低资源名实体相别。', 'hi': 'शब्दकोशों और गजेटियर जैसे लेक्सिकल संसाधनों का उपयोग अक्सर भाग-के-भाषण प्रेरण और नामित-इकाई मान्यता जैसे कार्यों के लिए सहायक डेटा के रूप में किया जाता है। हालांकि, लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं के साथ भेदभावपूर्ण प्रशिक्षण के लिए एनोटेट किए गए डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है ताकि लेक्सिकल फीचर वजन का मज़बूती से अनुमान लगाया जा सके और इसके परिणामस्वरूप उन सुविधाओं की कीमत पर लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं को ओवरफिट किया जा सकता है जो बेहतर सामान्यीकरण करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक अधिक मजबूत दृष्टिकोण की जांच करते हैं: हम यह निर्धारित करते हैं कि शब्दकोश एक अनुमानित उत्पादक प्रक्रिया का परिणाम है। व्यावहारिक रूप से, इसका मतलब है कि हम प्रस्तावित उत्पादक मॉडल के तहत टिप्पणियों के रूप में लेक्सिकल संसाधनों का इलाज कर सकते हैं। लेक्सिकल संसाधन लेक्सिकल फीचर वजन का अनुमान लगाने के लिए अलग-अलग डेटा की आवश्यकता के बिना उत्पादक मॉडल के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा प्रदान करते हैं। हम दो सेटिंग्स में प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच इंडक्शन और कम-रिसोर्स नामित-एंटिटी मान्यता।', 'ga': "Is minic a úsáidtear acmhainní foclóireachta ar nós foclóirí agus gazetteers mar shonraí cúnta le haghaidh tascanna ar nós ionduchtú cuid de chaint agus aithint eintiteas ainmnithe. Éilíonn oiliúint idirdhealaitheach le gnéithe foclóireachta, áfach, sonraí anótáilte chun meáchain na ngnéithe foclóireachta a mheas go hiontaofa agus d'fhéadfadh go ndéanfaí rófheistiú ar na gnéithe foclóireachta agus go gcosnófar gnéithe a ghinearálú níos fearr. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar chur chuige níos láidre: sonraímid gur toradh é an foclóir ar phróiseas giniúna toimhdithe. Go praiticiúil, ciallaíonn sé seo go bhféadfaimis caitheamh leis na hacmhainní foclóireachta mar bhreathnuithe faoin múnla giniúna molta. Soláthraíonn na hacmhainní foclóireachta sonraí oiliúna don tsamhail ghiniúna gan sonraí ar leith a bheith ag teastáil chun meáchain gnéithe foclóireachta a mheas. Déanaimid measúnú ar an gcur chuige atá beartaithe in dhá shuíomh: ionduchtú cuid cainte agus aithint eintiteas ainmnithe ar acmhainní íseal.", 'hu': 'A lexikai erőforrásokat, például a szótárakat és a lapozókat gyakran használják kiegészítő adatként olyan feladatokhoz, mint például a beszédrész-indukció és a nevezett entitások felismerése. A lexikai jellemzőkkel rendelkező diszkriminatív tréning azonban jegyzetelt adatokat igényel a lexikai jellemzők súlyának megbízható becsléséhez, és a lexikai jellemzők túlterhelését eredményezheti a jobb általánosító jellemzők rovására. Ebben a tanulmányban egy erőteljesebb megközelítést vizsgálunk: kimondjuk, hogy a lexikon egy feltételezett generációs folyamat eredménye. Gyakorlatilag ez azt jelenti, hogy a lexikai erőforrásokat megfigyelésként kezelhetjük a javasolt generatív modell szerint. A lexikai erőforrások képzési adatokat szolgáltatnak a generációs modell számára anélkül, hogy külön adatokat igényelnének a lexikai jellemzők súlyának becsléséhez. A javasolt megközelítést két beállításban értékeljük: beszédrész indukció és alacsony erőforrású nevezett entitás felismerés.', 'el': 'Λεξικό πόροι όπως λεξικά και φυλλάδια χρησιμοποιούνται συχνά ως βοηθητικά δεδομένα για εργασίες όπως η επαγωγή μέρους ομιλίας και η αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων. Ωστόσο, η διακριτική εκπαίδευση με λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά απαιτεί σχολιασμένα δεδομένα για την αξιόπιστη εκτίμηση των βαρών λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών και μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε υπερπροσαρμογή των λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών σε βάρος των χαρακτηριστικών που γενικεύονται καλύτερα. Στην παρούσα εργασία διερευνούμε μια πιο ισχυρή προσέγγιση: ορίζουμε ότι το λεξικό είναι αποτέλεσμα μιας υποτιθέμενης παραγωγικής διαδικασίας. Πρακτικά, αυτό σημαίνει ότι μπορούμε να αντιμετωπίσουμε τους λεξικούς πόρους ως παρατηρήσεις στο προτεινόμενο γενετικό μοντέλο. Οι λεξικοί πόροι παρέχουν δεδομένα κατάρτισης για το παραγωγικό μοντέλο χωρίς να απαιτούνται ξεχωριστά δεδομένα για την εκτίμηση των λεξικών βαρών χαρακτηριστικών. Αξιολογούμε την προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση σε δύο ρυθμίσεις: επαγωγή μέρους ομιλίας και αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας χαμηλού πόρου.', 'ka': 'ლექსიკური რესურსები, როგორც სიტყვები და დაზეზეტერი, ხშირად გამოიყენება როგორც დახმარებელი მონაცემებებისთვის, როგორც სიტყვების ინდექცია და სახელსახელსახელსა მაგრამ, დისკრიმინატიური განათლება ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებით უნდა მონაცემებული მონაცემები, რომელიც დარწმუნელად განათლება ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებით და შეიძლება შეიძლება ლექსიკალ ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გავაკეთებთ: ჩვენ დავწერეთ, რომ ლექსიკონი არის წარმოდგენებული გენერაციური პროცესის შედეგი. პრაქტიკურად, ეს ნიშნავს, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ლექსიკალური რესურსების შესახებ, როგორც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია დავამუშავოთ წარმოიქმნილი გენერ ლექსიკალური რესურსები განათლების მონაცემები გენერაციური მოდელისთვის უნდა გავაკეთოთ განსაკუთრებული მონაცემები, რომელიც ლექსიკალური ფუნქ ჩვენ გავამუშავებთ საკუთარი წარმოდგენა ორი პარამეტრებში: წარმოდგენის ინდექცია და საკუთარი რესურსების სახელ ინტერტიკის განახლება.', 'kk': 'Лексикалық ресурстар, мысалы сөздік және газеттердің көмекші мәліметтері, мысалы сөздік индукциясы және аталған мақсаттарды анықтау үшін, көмекші мәліметтер үшін қолданыла Бірақ лексикалық қасиеттермен дискриминациялық оқыту керек, лексикалық қасиеттердің жиілігін дұрыс оқыту үшін белгіленген деректерді оқыту керек және жалғастыру мүмкіндіктерінің лексикалық қасиеттерін жа Бұл қағазда, біз көптеген тәжірибеді зерттейміз: лексиканың генерациялық процесінің нәтижесі деп белгілейміз. Бұл лексикалық ресурстарды келтірілген генерациялық үлгілер ретінде қарай аламыз. Лексикалық ресурстар лексикалық мүмкіндіктерді бағалау үшін бөлек мәліметтерді талап ету үшін генерациялық моделінің оқыту деректерін береді. Екі параметрлерде қолданылатын тәсілді бағалаймыз: сөйлеу индукциясының бөлігі және аталған ресурстардың бағасы.', 'it': "Le risorse lessicali come dizionari e gazetter sono spesso utilizzate come dati ausiliari per attività come l'induzione di parte-of-speech e il riconoscimento di entità nominative. Tuttavia, l'allenamento discriminatorio con caratteristiche lessicali richiede dati annotati per stimare in modo affidabile i pesi delle caratteristiche lessicali e può portare a sovradimensionare le caratteristiche lessicali a scapito di caratteristiche che generalizzano meglio. In questo articolo, esaminiamo un approccio più robusto: stipuliamo che il lessico sia il risultato di un processo generativo ipotizzato. In pratica, ciò significa che possiamo trattare le risorse lessicali come osservazioni nell'ambito del modello generativo proposto. Le risorse lessicali forniscono dati di allenamento per il modello generativo senza richiedere dati separati per stimare i pesi delle caratteristiche lessicali. Valutiamo l'approccio proposto in due impostazioni: induzione part-of-speech e riconoscimento di entità nominative a basso contenuto di risorse.", 'lt': 'Leksiniai ištekliai, pavyzdžiui, žodynai ir gazetėliai, dažnai naudojami kaip pagalbiniai duomenys tokioms užduotims kaip kalbos skatinimas ir vardinio subjekto pripažinimas. Tačiau diskriminaciniam mokymui su leksiniais požymiais reikalingi anotuoti duomenys, kad būtų galima patikimai įvertinti leksinių požymių svorį, ir dėl to gali būti pernelyg didelis leksinių požymių pritaikymas geriau generalizuojančių požymių sąskaita. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame tvirtesnį požiūrį: nustatome, kad leksikonas yra numatomos kartos proceso rezultatas. Praktiškai tai reiškia, kad lexiniai ištekliai gali būti vertinami kaip stebėjimai pagal siūlomą kartos model į. Leksiniai ištekliai teikia mokymo duomenis, susijusius su generaciniu modeliu, nereikalaujant atskirų duomenų, kad būtų galima įvertinti lexinių savybių svorį. Mes vertiname siūlomą metodą dviem aplinkybėmis: kalbos indukcijos dalis ir mažai išteklių vadinamo subjekto pripažinimas.', 'mk': 'Лексикалните ресурси како што се речниците и весниците честопати се користат како помошни податоци за задачи како што се индукција на дел од говорот и препознавање на именуваниот ентитет. However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better.  Во овој весник истражуваме посилен пристап: поставуваме дека лексиконот е резултат на претпоставен генерациски процес. Практично, ова значи дека можеме да ги третираме лексичките ресурси како набљудувања под предложениот генеративен модел. Лексикалните ресурси обезбедуваат податоци за обука за генеративниот модел без потреба од одделни податоци за проценка на тежината на лексикалните карактеристики. Го проценуваме предложениот пристап во две поставувања: дел од индукцијата на говорот и признавање на ниски ресурси со име на ентитет.', 'ms': 'Lexical resources such as dictionaries and gazetteers are often used as auxiliary data for tasks such as part-of-speech induction and named-entity recognition.  Namun, latihan diskriminatif dengan ciri-ciri leksikal memerlukan data yang dicatat untuk menghargai berat ciri-ciri leksikal dengan yakin dan mungkin menyebabkan melebihi fitur-fitur leksikal pada biaya ciri-ciri yang menyebarkan lebih baik. In this paper, we investigate a more robust approach: we stipulate that the lexicon is the result of an assumed generative process.  Secara praktik, ini bermakna bahawa kita boleh memperlakukan sumber leksik sebagai pengamatan di bawah model generasi yang diusulkan. Sumber leksikal menyediakan data latihan untuk model generatif tanpa memerlukan data terpisah untuk menghargai berat ciri leksikal. Kami menilai pendekatan yang diusulkan dalam dua tetapan: sebahagian-dari-induksi-ucapan dan pengenalan-sumber-bernama-entiti rendah.', 'mt': 'Riżorsi lexiċi bħad-dikjararji u l-gazzetti ta’ spiss jintużaw bħala dejta awżiljarja għal kompiti bħall-induzzjoni ta’ parti mid-diskors u r-rikonoxximent ta’ entità msejħa. Madankollu, taħriġ diskriminatorju b’karatteristiċi lexiċi jeħtieġ dejta annotata biex jiġu stmati b’mod affidabbli l-piżijiet tal-karatteristiċi lexiċi u jista’ jirriżulta f’tagħmir żejjed tal-karatteristiċi lexiċi bi spejjeż ta’ karatteristiċi li jiġġeneralizzaw aħjar. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw approċċ aktar robust: nistipulaw li l-lexicon huwa r-riżultat ta’ proċess ġenerattiv preżunt. Prattikament, dan ifisser li nistgħu nittrattaw ir-riżorsi lexiċi bħala osservazzjonijiet taħt il-mudell ġenerattiv propost. Ir-riżorsi lexiċi jipprovdu dejta ta’ taħriġ għall-mudell ġenerattiv mingħajr ma jeħtieġu dejta separata biex jiġu stmati l-piżijiet tal-karatteristiċi lexiċi. Aħna jevalwaw l-approċċ propost f’żewġ ambjenti: l-induzzjoni ta’ parti mid-diskors u r-rikonoxximent ta’ entità msejħa riżorsi baxxi.', 'mn': 'Зөвлөгөө, сэтгэл судлаачид зэрэг сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулах болон нэрлэгдсэн хүмүүсийн санааны нэг хэсэг болон үйл ажиллагаанд тусламжтай өгөгдлийн хувьд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Гэхдээ хэлэлцэх чадвартай ялгаатай суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээний үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээний үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээний үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээний хэмжээсүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид илүү хүчтэй арга барилгыг судалж байна: бид лексикон гэдэг нь ойлгомжтой үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүн юм. Үнэндээ бид лексикийн эх үүсвэрийг үйлдвэрлэлийн загварын доор ажиглах боломжтой гэсэн үг юм. Лексикал нөөц бүтээгдэхүүний тоо хэмжээний хэмжээг тооцоолох боломжгүй өгөгдлийг бүтээгдэхүүний загварын дасгал өгөгдлийг өгдөг. Бид хоёр тохиолдолд санал өгсөн арга замыг үнэлэх: ярианы нэг хэсэг болон нэрлэгдэх бага нөөцийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, നിഘണ്ടുകളും ഗസേറ്ററുകളും പോലെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ആവശ്യമായ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.  എന്നാലും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശ്വാസത്തിലുള്ള വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തമായി വിചാരിക്കേണ്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതിനാല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d റോബോസ്റ്റ് നടപടിയെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയുടെ ഫലമാണെന ഇതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം നമുക്ക് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജനറല്\u200d മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ കീഴില്\u200d നോക്കാന ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d വേറെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ല രണ്ടു സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു; സംസാരം', 'no': 'Leksiske ressursar som ordbokar og gazetterar vert ofte brukte som hjelpedata for oppgåver, som del av taleinduksjon og gjenkjenning av namnet entitet. Dei diskriminasjonane treninga med leksiske funksjonar treng imidlertid markerte data for å sikkert vurdere vekten på leksiske funksjonar og kan resultere i å overpassa leksiske funksjonar på utkostnaden av funksjonar som generelliserer bedre. I denne papiren undersøker vi ein mer sterkt tilnærming: vi bestemmer at leksikonet er resultatet av ein anta generert prosess. Praktisk betyr dette at vi kan behandle dei leksiske ressursane som observasjonar under den foreslåde genererte modellen. Leksykiske ressursane gjev opplæringsdata for den genererande modellen utan å kreve separe data for å estimere vekt på leksiske funksjonar. Vi evaluerer foreslått tilnærming i to innstillingar: del av taleinduksjon og låg ressurs med namnet på entitet.', 'pl': 'Zasoby leksykalne, takie jak słowniki i gazetki, są często wykorzystywane jako dane pomocnicze do zadań, takich jak indukcja części mowy i rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek. Jednak trening dyskryminacyjny z cechami leksykalnymi wymaga adnotacji danych, aby wiarygodnie oszacować wagę cech leksykalnych i może skutkować nadmiernym dopasowaniem cech leksykalnych kosztem cech, które lepiej uogólniają. W artykule badamy bardziej solidne podejście: stwierdzamy, że leksykon jest wynikiem założonego procesu generacyjnego. Praktycznie oznacza to, że możemy traktować zasoby leksykalne jako obserwacje w proponowanym modelu generatywnym. Zasoby leksykalne dostarczają danych treningowych dla modelu generatywnego bez wymagania oddzielnych danych do oszacowania wag funkcji leksykalnych. Oceniamy proponowane podejście w dwóch ustawieniach: indukcji części mowy oraz rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek o niskich zasobach.', 'ro': 'Resursele lexicale, cum ar fi dicționarele și revistele, sunt adesea folosite ca date auxiliare pentru activități precum inducția parțială de vorbire și recunoașterea entităților denumite. Cu toate acestea, formarea discriminatorie cu caracteristici lexicale necesită date adnotate pentru a estima fiabil greutățile caracteristicilor lexicale și poate duce la supraadaptarea caracteristicilor lexicale în detrimentul caracteristicilor care generalizează mai bine. În această lucrare, investigăm o abordare mai robustă: stipulăm că lexiconul este rezultatul unui proces generativ presupus. Practic, aceasta înseamnă că putem trata resursele lexicale ca observații în cadrul modelului generativ propus. Resursele lexicale furnizează date de instruire pentru modelul generativ fără a necesita date separate pentru a estima greutățile caracteristicilor lexicale. Evaluăm abordarea propusă în două setări: inducția parțială de vorbire și recunoașterea entităților numite cu resurse reduse.', 'sr': 'Leksičke resurse poput rečenika i novinara često se koriste kao pomoćni podaci za zadatak poput indukcije govora i priznanja imena entiteta. Međutim, diskriminacijska obuka sa leksičkim karakteristikama zahteva annotirane podatke kako bi vjerovatno procenila težinu leksičkih karakteristika i mogla bi rezultirati da preusmjeravaju leksičke karakteristike na troškove karakteristika koje generalizuju bolje. U ovom papiru istražujemo jači pristup: predviđamo da je leksikon rezultat pretpostavljenog generativnog procesa. Praktično, to znači da možemo tretirati leksičke resurse kao promatranje pod predloženim generativnim modelom. Leksički resursi pružaju podatke o obuci za generativni model bez zahteva odvojenih podataka za procjenu težine leksičkih karakteristika. Procjenjujemo predloženi pristup u dva postavka: deo indukcije govora i priznanje niskog resursa imenovanog entiteta.', 'so': 'Xuquuqda Leksikada sida dictionary iyo wargeysyada inta badan waxaa loo isticmaalaa macluumaad ku habboon shaqooyinka sida qeyb ka mid ah dhamaanshaha hadalka iyo aqoonsashada aqoonsiga xaqa ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada takooriska ah ee la xiriira alaabta leksikarka waxaa looga baahan yahay macluumaad la xiriira si aamin ah loo qiimeeyo miisaanka leksikalka, waxaana suurtogal ah in la diro alaabta leksikalka kharashka qalabka ah oo si fiican u dhalashada. Qoraalkan waxaynu baaraynaa qaab ka sii badan oo khatar ah: waxaynu ku qoraynaa in leksikanka ay noqoto sababtii baaritaanka generashada. Sida caadiga ah, taasi waxaa loola jeedaa inaannu uga dareeleyno hantida leksikada sida observations hoosta modelka la soo jeeday. Xuquuqda leksikalka waxay u fidiyaan macluumaad waxbarasho tusaale-generative, iyadoon u baahnayn data gooni ah si ay u qiimeeyaan miisaanka xisaabta. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaababka la soo jeeday oo ku qoran labo hab: qeyb ka mid ah dhamaadka hadalka iyo aqoonsashada nolosha hoose ee magaca entity.', 'sv': 'Lexiska resurser som ordböcker och tidskrifter används ofta som hjälpdata för uppgifter som introduktion av taldelar och identifiering av namngivna entiteter. Diskriminerande träning med lexikala funktioner kräver dock kommenterade data för att tillförlitligt uppskatta lexikala funktionsvikter och kan resultera i överpassning av lexikala funktioner på bekostnad av funktioner som generaliserar bättre. I denna uppsats undersöker vi ett mer robust tillvägagångssätt: vi fastställer att lexikonet är resultatet av en antagen generativ process. Praktiskt sett innebär det att vi kan behandla lexikala resurser som observationer enligt den föreslagna generativa modellen. De lexikala resurserna ger träningsdata för den generativa modellen utan att behöva separata data för att uppskatta lexikala funktionsvikter. Vi utvärderar det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet i två inställningar: deltalsinduktion och lågresursidentifiering av namngivna entiteter.', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකිසිකල් ප්\u200dරභාවක් වගේ වචනාවක් සහ ජැස්ටර්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ව නමුත්, ලෙක්සිකල් අවශ්\u200dයතාවය සමග විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධානය අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න ලෙක්සිකල් අවශ්\u200dයතාවය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න ඕනේ ලෙක්සික මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්වාස කරන්නේ තරම් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ලෙක්සිකෝන් කියලා හිතන්නේ ප්\u200dර පාර්ථික විදියට, ඒකෙන් කියන්නේ අපි ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධතාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත මද්\u200dයාලයට පෙනෙක් දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය නැතුව පෙනෙක් දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අපි සැකසුම් දෙකක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගැන විශ්වාස කරනවා: කොටස් කිරීමක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිශා', 'ta': 'Lexical resources such as dictionaries and gazetteers are often used as auxiliary data for tasks such as part-of-speech induction and named-entity recognition.  ஆயினும், லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களுடன் வேறுபட்ட பயிற்சியை குறிப்பிட தகவல் தேவைப்படுகிறது மெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களின் எடையை நம்பிக்கையாக மதிப்பதற்கு மற் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இன்னும் ஒரு மேலும் துருக்கும் செயல்பாட்டை ஆராய்க்கிறோம்: லெக்சியன் ஒரு கருத்தப்பட்ட பொ முன்னிருந்த பொருள் மாதிரிக்கப்பட்ட பொருட்களின் கீழ் பார்வைகளாக இருக்கலாம். Lexical resources provide training data for the generative model without requiring separate data to estimate lexical features weights. இரண்டு அமைப்புகளில் நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம்: பேச்சு தொகுப்பில் பகுதி மற்றும் பெ', 'ur': 'لکسیکیسی سرمایہ جیسے لکھنے والے اور نگازٹر اکثر ایسے کاموں کے لئے مددگار ڈیٹے کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جیسے بات انڈیٹ اور نام انٹیٹ کی پہچان. لیکن، لکسیکل ویسٹیوں کے ساتھ تقسیم کی تعلیم کی ضرورت ہے کہ لکسیکل ویسٹیوں کے وزن کو مطمئن طور پر مضبوط اندازہ کریں اور شاید لکسیکل ویسٹیوں کو زیادہ مضبوط کرے جن کی ویسٹیوں کے خرچ میں بہتر ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک زیادہ مضبوط طریقہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں: ہم نے یہ مقرر کیا ہے کہ لکسون ایک مضبوط پیدائش کا نتیجہ ہے۔ اس کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ ہم پیشنهاد کی جنرائیٹ موڈل کے نیچے لکسیکل سراسروں کو نظر کے طور پر سمجھ سکتے ہیں. لکسیکل رسورسوں جنرائیٹ موڈل کے لئے تدریس ڈیٹا دیتے ہیں بغیر لکسیکل فوجیٹ وزن کے اندازے کے لئے مختلف ڈیٹا کی ضرورت نہیں ہے. ہم نے دو تنظیمات میں پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کا ارزش کیا ہے: بولنے کی ایک حصہ اور کم سرمایہ کا نام واقف ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Leksik xususiyatlari bilan ta'minlovchi taʼminlov, leksikal xossalarini ishlab chiqarish kerak va cheksiz xususiyatlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu xususiyatlarning yaxshi cheksiz sohasida o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir qanchalik robot usulida qidirib ko'raymiz: Lekson bir yetarli jarayonning natijasi natijasi natijasi natijasi natijasi natijasi. Bu narsa esa, biz talab qilingan generativ modelidagi qo'llanmalarni ko'rib turishimiz mumkin. Name Biz soʻzni ikkita moslamada qiymatimiz: gapirish qismlarini qiymatimiz va quyidagi narsalarning qismini qiymatimiz.", 'vi': 'Tài nguyên ngôn ngữ như từ điển và các tạp chí thiên văn thường được sử dụng như dữ liệu phụ cho các nhiệm vụ như phần diễn thuyết và nhận diện tên thực thể. Tuy nhiên, đào tạo độc tính với tính năng ngôn ngữ buộc phải có dữ liệu ghi chú để đánh giá đáng tin cậy về tỷ lệ sinh tố từ ngữ và có thể dẫn đến việc tăng cường tính năng ngôn ngữ trên mặt các tính năng tổng hợp tốt hơn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu một phương pháp mạnh mẽ hơn. Chúng tôi xác định rằng ngôn ngữ này là kết quả của một tiến trình mang thai giả. Thực tế, điều đó có nghĩa là chúng ta có thể coi các nguồn văn bản như các quan sát dưới phương pháp sinh sản dự kiến. Tài nguyên ngôn ngữ cung cấp dữ liệu đào tạo cho mô hình sinh sản mà không cần phải có dữ liệu riêng để ước lượng các tiêu đề. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp được đề xuất trong hai thiết lập:', 'bg': 'Лексикалните ресурси като речници и беседки често се използват като спомагателни данни за задачи като индукция на част от речта и разпознаване на наименовани обекти. Обаче дискриминационното обучение с лексикални особености изисква анотирани данни, за да се оцени надеждно теглото на лексикалните особености и може да доведе до пренасочване на лексикалните особености за сметка на особености, които се обобщават по-добре. В тази статия изследваме един по-стабилен подход: постановяваме, че лексиконът е резултат от предполагаем генеративен процес. На практика това означава, че можем да третираме лексикалните ресурси като наблюдения по предложения генеративен модел. Лексикалните ресурси предоставят данни за обучение за генеративния модел, без да са необходими отделни данни за оценка на теглото на лексикалните характеристики. Оценяваме предложения подход в две настройки: индукция на част от речта и разпознаване на име на субекти с нисък ресурс.', 'da': 'Lexiske ressourcer som ordbøger og tidsskrifter bruges ofte som hjælpedata til opgaver som induktion af en del af tale og genkendelse af navngivne enheder. Men diskriminerende træning med leksikalske funktioner kræver noterede data for pålideligt at estimere de leksikalske funktionsvægte og kan resultere i overtilpasning af de leksikalske funktioner på bekostning af funktioner, der generaliserer bedre. I denne artikel undersøger vi en mere robust tilgang: Vi fastslår, at leksikonet er resultatet af en antaget generativ proces. Praktisk set betyder det, at vi kan behandle leksikalske ressourcer som observationer under den foreslåede generative model. De leksikalske ressourcer giver træningsdata for den generative model uden at kræve separate data for at estimere leksikalske egenskabsvægte. Vi evaluerer den foreslåede tilgang i to indstillinger: Delvis-af-tale induktion og lav-ressource navngivet-entitet genkendelse.', 'nl': 'Lexicale bronnen zoals woordenboeken en gazetters worden vaak gebruikt als hulpgegevens voor taken zoals het induceren van een deel van de spraak en het herkennen van benamingen. Echter, discriminatieve training met lexicale kenmerken vereist geannoteerde gegevens om de lexicale kenmerkgewichten betrouwbaar te schatten en kan resulteren in overfitting van lexicale kenmerken ten koste van functies die beter generaliseren. In dit artikel onderzoeken we een robuustere aanpak: we stellen vast dat het lexicon het resultaat is van een verondersteld generatief proces. Praktisch betekent dit dat we de lexicale bronnen kunnen behandelen als waarnemingen volgens het voorgestelde generatieve model. De lexicale bronnen bieden trainingsgegevens voor het generatieve model zonder dat afzonderlijke gegevens nodig zijn om lexicale kenmerken gewichten te schatten. We evalueren de voorgestelde aanpak in twee settings: part-of-speech inductie en low-resource named-entity herkenning.', 'hr': 'Leksičke resurse poput riječi i novinara često se koriste kao pomoćni podaci za zadatke poput indukcije govora i priznanja imena entiteta. Međutim, diskriminacijska obuka s leksičkim karakteristikama zahtijeva annotirane podatke kako bi vjerno procijenilo težine leksičkih karakteristika i moglo bi dovesti do pretjeranja leksičkih karakteristika na troškove karakteristika koje su generalizirane bolje. U ovom papiru istražujemo jači pristup: predviđamo da je leksikon rezultat pretpostavljenog generativnog procesa. Praktično, to znači da možemo liječiti leksičke resurse kao promatranje pod predloženim generativnim modelom. Leksički resursi pružaju podatke o obuci za generativni model bez zahtjeva odvojenih podataka za procjenu težine leksičkih karakteristika. Procjenjujemo predloženi pristup u dvije postavke: dio indukcije govora i priznanje niskog resursa imenovanog entiteta.', 'de': 'Lexikale Ressourcen wie Wörterbücher und Gazetteer werden häufig als Hilfsdaten für Aufgaben wie Sprachteilinduktion und Named-Entity-Erkennung verwendet. Diskriminierendes Training mit lexikalischen Merkmalen erfordert jedoch annotierte Daten, um die lexikalischen Merkmalsgewichte zuverlässig abzuschätzen und kann dazu führen, dass die lexikalischen Merkmalsgewichte zu Lasten der besser verallgemeinernden Merkmale übertrieben werden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir einen robusteren Ansatz: Wir stellen fest, dass das Lexikon das Ergebnis eines vermuteten generativen Prozesses ist. Praktisch bedeutet dies, dass wir die lexikalischen Ressourcen als Beobachtungen nach dem vorgeschlagenen generativen Modell behandeln können. Die lexikalischen Ressourcen stellen Trainingsdaten für das generative Modell bereit, ohne dass separate Daten zur Schätzung lexikalischer Merkmalsgewichte erforderlich sind. Wir bewerten den vorgeschlagenen Ansatz in zwei Settings: Sprachteilinduktion und ressourcenschonende Named-Entity-Erkennung.', 'id': 'Sumber daya Lexik seperti kamus dan gazeter sering digunakan sebagai data bantuan untuk tugas seperti bagian dari induksi pidato dan pengenalan entitas bernama. Namun, pelatihan diskriminatif dengan ciri-ciri leksik membutuhkan data yang dicatat untuk memperkirakan secara kreatif berat ciri-ciri leksik dan mungkin menyebabkan melebihi ciri-ciri leksik pada biaya ciri-ciri yang menyebar lebih baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki pendekatan yang lebih kuat: kami menyatakan bahwa leksikon adalah hasil dari proses generasi yang dianggap. Secara praktis, ini berarti bahwa kita dapat memperlakukan sumber daya lexik sebagai pengamatan di bawah model generasi yang diusulkan. Sumber daya lexik menyediakan data pelatihan untuk model generasi tanpa membutuhkan data terpisah untuk memperkirakan berat fitur lexik. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan yang diusulkan dalam dua pengaturan: bagian dari induksi pidato dan pengenalan sumber daya rendah bernama-entitas.', 'ko': '사전과 지명록 등 어휘 자원은 일반적으로 작사성 귀납과 명명 실체 식별 등 임무의 보조 데이터로 사용된다.그러나 어휘특징을 가진 구분성 훈련은 주석된 데이터로 어휘특징의 중요성을 믿을 수 있게 평가해야 하고 어휘특징을 과도하게 의합하여 더 좋은 특징을 개괄하는 대가를 치르게 될 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 더욱 안정적인 방법을 연구했다. 우리는 어휘가 가설 생성 과정의 결과라고 규정했다.실제로 이것은 우리가 제시한 생성 모델에서 어휘 자원을 관찰할 수 있다는 것을 의미한다.어휘 자원은 생성 모델을 위해 훈련 데이터를 제공하고 단독의 데이터로 어휘 특징의 중요성을 평가할 필요가 없다.우리는 두 가지 환경에서 제시한 방법에 대해 평가를 실시했다. 그것이 바로 어성 귀납과 저자원 명명 실체 식별이다.', 'fa': 'منابع سکسیکی مثل لغت\u200cنامه\u200cها و گزارش\u200cکنندگان اغلب به عنوان داده\u200cهای کمک\u200cکننده برای کار\u200cهایی مانند بخشی از فعالیت سخنرانی و شناسایی\u200cنامه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cشوند. ولی تمرین جدایی با ویژه\u200cهای زبانی نیاز دارد که داده\u200cهای نوشته شده را به طور قابل تخمین وزن ویژه\u200cهای زبانی بررسی کند و ممکن است به نتیجه افزایش ویژه\u200cهای زبانی بر هزینه ویژه\u200cهایی که عمومی بهتر می\u200cکنند بررسی کند. در این کاغذ، ما روش قوی\u200cتر تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: ما تصمیم می\u200cدهیم که کلکسیون نتیجه یک فرایند نسل\u200cآوری است. در واقع، این معنی است که ما می توانیم منابع زبان\u200cشناسی را به عنوان مشاهده\u200cهای زیر مدل پیشنهاد نسل\u200cشناسی درمان کنیم. منابع زبان\u200cشناسی اطلاعات آموزش برای مدل ژنتریفی بدون نیاز به داده\u200cهای جدا برای تخمین وزن ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی می\u200cدهد. ما روش پیشنهاد را در دو تنظیمات ارزیابی می کنیم: بخشی از تولید سخنرانی و تشخیص منابع کم به نام entity.', 'sw': 'Rasilimali za Lexico kama vile dictionary na waandishi mara nyingi hutumiwa kama data za ushirika kwa kazi kama sehemu ya uzalishaji wa hotuba na kutambuliwa kwa entity. Hata hivyo, mafunzo ya ubaguzi na vipengele vya lexico yanahitaji takwimu zilizotajwa ili kudhani kwa uhakika wa kipimo cha vifaa vya lexico na inaweza kusababisha kusambaza vipengele vya lexico kwa gharama za vipengele vinavyotengeneza vizuri zaidi. Katika gazeti hili, tunachunguza mbinu za kibaguzi zaidi: tunapendekeza kuwa lexico ni matokeo ya mchakato wa jenerali unaotarajiwa. Kihalisi, hii inamaanisha kwamba tunaweza kutibu rasilimali za lexico kama mtazamo wa kizazi kilichopendekezwa. rasilimali za lexico zinatoa taarifa za mafunzo kwa muundo wa kizalendo bila kuhitaji takwimu tofauti za kadiria mizani ya vifaa vya lexico. Tutathmini mbinu zilizopendekezwa katika mazingira mawili: sehemu ya uzalishaji wa hotuba na rasilimali chini inayoitwa kutambua entity.', 'tr': 'Sözlükler we gazeteciler ýaly lukmançylyk çeşmeleri, sözleriniň bir parçasynda we adly zady tanamak üçin kömek maglumatlary hökmünde ulanýarlar. Ýöne diskriminçäk isleýçleri bilen diskriminçäk okuw hatlaryny gowy görkezilýän özellikleriň buýrukynda geçirmek üçin nädogry ýagtylan maglumatlary gerek. Bu kagyzda, biz özümiziň has güýçli bir nusgasyny barýarys: leksiýanyň janlaşdyrylýan bir prosesin netijesi diýip kabul edip bilýäris. Adatça, bu biziň teklif eden döredijilik nusgasynda lektik çeşmeleri özümize gözlemek üçin gözleýän bolmagymyzy aňladýar. Lektik çeşmeler jenerator modi üçin aýratyn maglumat taýýarlamak üçin leksiýa çyzgylygyny tahmin etmek üçin maglumat maglumatlaryny temin edýär. Biz teklip eden ýagdaýy iki düzümlerde deňleýäris: çykyş induksyonyň bir bölegi we kellämiz bar diýip atlandyrylýar.', 'af': "Leksiese hulpbronne soos woordeboekvorms en gazetters word dikwels gebruik as hulpbronne data vir werke soos deel-van-spreek-induksie en genoem-entiteit-herkening. Maar diskriminasiewe onderwyseling met leksiese funksies benodig annotateerde data om vertroulik die leksiese funksieweegte te evalueer en dalk kan resultaat in oorsaak van die leksiese funksies op die koste van funksies wat beter genereliseer. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek 'n meer kragtige toegang: ons stel dat die lexikon die resultaat van 'n aangenereerde genereerbare proses is. Praktiek, dit beteken dat ons die leksiese hulpbronne as observasies onder die voorgestelde genereerbare model kan behandel. Die leksiese hulpbronne verskaf onderwerp data vir die genereerdere model sonder om aparte data te benodig om leksiese funksie gewigte te evalueer. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde toegang in twee instellings: deel van spraak induksie en lae hulpbron genaamde entiteit-herken.", 'am': 'ሌክሲካዊ ሀብት እንደ መቃላት እና ጋዜጠኞች ብዙ ጊዜ እንደንግግር አካባቢ እና እንደ አካባቢ ማውቀት በሚመስል ስራዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚጠቀሙ ዳታ ናቸው፡፡ However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የበለጠ የረኀብ ሥርዓት እንመርምርዋለን፤ ሌክሲኮን የዘላለም ፕሮጀክት ፍጻሜ ነው ብለን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአሳማሚ፣ ይህ ምናልባት፣ የሊክሲ ሀብትን በተዘጋጀው የዘረኝነት ሞዴል ውስጥ ለማስተዋል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሊክሲካዊ ሀብት አካባቢ ሚዛን እንዲቆጠር የልዩ ዳታዎችን ሳይያስፈልጋቸው የተለየ የሊክሲካዊ ሚዛን የሚያስፈልጋቸው ዳታዎችን የሚያስተምር፡፡ በሁለቱ አስተያየት ውስጥ የተፈቀደውን ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፤ የንግግር ግንኙነት እና አካባቢ ማውቀትን እና የዝቅተኛ ክፍል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Burime leksike të tilla si fjalorët dhe gazetarët shpesh përdoren si të dhëna ndihmëse për detyra të tilla si nxitja e pjesës së fjalimit dhe njohja e njësisë së quajtur. However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better.  Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë një qasje më të fortë: ne përcaktojmë se lexikoni është rezultati i një procesi të supozuar gjenerativ. Praktikisht, kjo do të thotë se ne mund të trajtojmë burimet lexike si vëzhgime nën modelin e propozuar gjenerativ. The lexical resources provide training data for the generative model without requiring separate data to estimate lexical feature weights.  Ne vlerësojmë qasjen e propozuar në dy përqëndrime: pjesë e induksionit të fjalimit dhe njohjen e njësisë me emër të burimit të ulët.', 'az': 'Sözlüklər və gazetlər kimi, sözlər və gazetlər kimi, sözlərin bir parças ı induksyonu və adlı tərzlərin tanınması kimi məlumatlar üçün köməkçi məlumatlar kimi istifadə edilər. Lakin, leksik özellikləri ilə dəyişiklik təhsil edilən təhsil, leksik özelliklərin ağırlığını təmin etmək üçün təhsil edilmiş məlumatları lazımdır və daha xeyirli təhsil sahiblərinin xərclənməsində leksik özellikləri çox uyğunlaşdırmağa mümkün olar. Bu kağızda daha qüvvətli bir tərzim araşdırırıq: leksikon genetik prosesinin sonucu olduğunu iddia edirik. Həqiqətən, bu, təklif edilmiş generativ modellərin altındakı məlumatlar olaraq leksik resursları təhsil edə bilərik. Leksik kaynaklar generiktif modeli üçün təhsil verilən məlumatları təmin etmək üçün ayrı məlumatlar lazım olmadan təhsil edir. Biz təklif etdiyimiz tərzini iki tərzdə değerləşdiririk: sözlərin bir parçası induksyon və düşük çoxlu istifadə edirik.', 'bs': 'Leksički resursi poput riječi i novinara često se koriste kao pomoćni podaci za zadatak poput indukcije govora i priznanja imena entiteta. Međutim, diskriminacijska obuka sa leksičkim karakteristikama zahtijeva annotirane podatke kako bi vjerno procijenilo težine leksičkih karakteristika i moglo bi rezultirati da preusmjeravaju leksičke karakteristike na troškove karakteristika koje su bolje generalizirane. U ovom papiru istražujemo jači pristup: predviđamo da je leksikon rezultat pretpostavljenog generativnog procesa. Praktično, to znači da možemo tretirati leksičke resurse kao promatranje pod predloženim generativnim modelom. Leksički resursi pružaju podatke o obuci za generativni model bez zahteva odvojenih podataka za procjenu težine leksičkih karakteristika. Procjenjujemo predloženi pristup u dva postavka: deo indukcije govora i priznanje niskog resursa imenovanog entiteta.', 'hy': "Լեքսիկական ռեսուրսները, ինչպիսիք են բառարանները և ժապարակները, հաճախ օգտագործվում են որպես օգտագործական տվյալներ այնպիսի խնդիրների համար, ինչպիսիք են խոսքի ինդուկցիայի մասը և անվանված էության ճանաչելը: However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ավելի ուժեղ մոտեցում. մենք պարտադրում ենք, որ լեքսիկոնը ենթադրված սերունդային գործընթացի արդյունք է: Practically, this means that we may treat the lexical resources as observations under the proposed generative model.  Լեքսիկական ռեսուրսները տրամադրում են կրթության տվյալներ սերունդային մոդելի համար առանց առանձին տվյալների պահանջելու լեքսիկական հատկությունների կշիռը գնահատելու համար: Մենք գնահատում ենք առաջարկված մոտեցումը երկու միջավայրում' խոսքի ինդուկցիայի մի մասում և ցածր ռեսուրսների կոչվող էության ճանաչումը:", 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ যেমন সংবাদপত্র এবং গ্যাগেটারের মতো প্রায়শ ব্যবহার করা হয়, যেমন বক্তৃতা শিল্পের অংশ এবং নামের স্বীকৃতির মত কিন্তু লেক্সিক্সিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে বৈষম্য প্রশিক্ষণ চালানো দরকার, যাতে লেক্সিক্সিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের ওজন বিশ্বাস করা হয় এবং এর ফলে বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিষয়গ এই পত্রিকায় আমরা আরো কিছু রোবটস্ট উপায় অনুসন্ধান করি: আমরা উল্লেখ করি যে লেক্সিকোন জেনারেটিভ প্রক্রিয়ার ফল। প্রস্তাবিত জেনারেটিভ মডেলের অধীনে আমরা লেক্সিক্যাল সম্পদের পর্যবেক্ষণ হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করতে পারি। লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ জেনারেটিভ মডেলের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রদান করে লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের ওজন হিস আমরা প্রস্তাবিত দুই বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করি: বক্তৃতা শিল্পের অংশ এবং নামের নাম-বস্ত', 'ca': "Ressources lècsiques com diccionaris i periodistes sovint s'utilitzen com dades auxiliars per a tasques com l'inducció de la expressió i el reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada. No obstant això, l'entrenament discriminatiu amb característiques lècsiques requereix dades anotates per estimar de manera fiable el pes de les característiques lècsiques i pot resultar en sobreemportar les característiques lècsiques a costa de característiques que s'generalitzen millor. En aquest article investigam un enfocament més robust: estipulam que el lexicó és el resultat d'un procés presumit generador. Pràcticament, això vol dir que podem tractar els recursos lèxics com observacions sota el model generador proposat. Els recursos lèxics proporcionen dades de capacitació per al model generador sense requerir dades separades per estimar els pes de les característiques lèxices. Evaluam l'enfocament proposat en dos entorns: part-of-speech induction i low-resource named-entity recognition.", 'et': 'Lexikaalseid ressursse, nagu sõnaraamatuid ja väljaandeid, kasutatakse sageli abiandmetena selliste ülesannete jaoks nagu osa kõne indutseerimine ja nimetatud olemi tuvastamine. Kuid leksikaalsete omadustega diskrimineeriv koolitus nõuab anoteeritud andmeid leksikaalsete omaduste kaalu usaldusväärseks hindamiseks ja võib põhjustada leksikaalsete omaduste ülekoormamist paremini üldistavate omaduste arvelt. Käesolevas töös uurime tugevamat lähenemisviisi: me sätestame, et leksikon on eeldatava generatiivse protsessi tulemus. Praktiliselt tähendab see, et me võime käsitleda leksikaalseid ressursse kui vaatlusi kavandatud generatiivse mudeli alusel. Leksikaalsed ressursid annavad generatiivse mudeli koolitusandmeid, ilma et oleks vaja eraldi andmeid leksikaalse tunnuse kaalu hindamiseks. Hindame kavandatud lähenemisviisi kahes valdkonnas: kõneosa induktsioon ja madala ressursiga nimetatud olemi tuvastamine.', 'fi': 'Lexikaalisia resursseja, kuten sanakirjoja ja lehtisiä, käytetään usein aputietoina esimerkiksi puheen osan induktiossa ja nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisessa. Kuitenkin diskriminatiivinen koulutus leksikaalisilla ominaisuuksilla vaatii merkintöjä, jotta voidaan luotettavasti arvioida leksikaalisten ominaisuuksien painot ja voi johtaa leksikaalisten ominaisuuksien ylikuormitukseen paremmin yleistyvien ominaisuuksien kustannuksella. Tässä työssä tutkimme vankempaa lähestymistapaa: edellytämme, että sanasto on oletetun generatiivisen prosessin tulos. Käytännössä tämä tarkoittaa sitä, että voimme käsitellä sanastoresursseja havainnoina ehdotetussa generatiivisessa mallissa. Leksikaaliset resurssit tarjoavat koulutusdataa generatiiviseen malliin ilman erillistä dataa leksikaalisten ominaisuuksien painojen arvioimiseksi. Arvioimme ehdotettua lähestymistapaa kahdessa ympäristössä: puheen osa-induktio ja vähäresurssinen nimetyn entiteetin tunnistus.', 'cs': 'Lexické zdroje, jako jsou slovníky a věstníky, jsou často používány jako pomocná data pro úkoly, jako je indukce části řeči a rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit. Avšak diskriminační trénink s lexikálními rysy vyžaduje anotovaná data pro spolehlivý odhad lexikálních rysů a může vést k přeplnění lexikálních rysů na úkor funkcí, které se lépe zobecňují. V tomto článku zkoumáme robustnější přístup: stanovíme, že lexikon je výsledkem předpokládaného generativního procesu. Prakticky to znamená, že můžeme považovat lexikální zdroje za pozorování navrženého generativního modelu. Lexikální zdroje poskytují tréninková data pro generativní model, aniž by byla nutná samostatná data pro odhad lexikálních znaků. Navrhovaný přístup hodnotíme ve dvou nastaveních: indukci části řeči a rozpoznávání nízkých zdrojů jmenovaných entit.', 'jv': 'Pernak-pernik dipunangé (langgar) lan winih (langgar) politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang paper iki, awak dhéwé nyonggunaké téhiné nggawe gerakan: awak dhéwé nggawe barang kelikon iki dadi kaé mulasakno dadi apik gedhé. Awak dhéwé, kuwi kabèh lané, kita iso nggawe Perintah lewat cara-cara ngono nggawe barang nggawe model sing apik gedhéwé. AllProgressBar Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe akses dituruti iki aturan: pating-pating kotak dhéwé lan alam-pakan kelas nêmên.', 'ha': "@ item license (short name) A lokacin da ya yi amfani da mai fassarar aiki na leksisiki, yana da amfani da data mai taƙaita dõmin a yi ƙayyade masu nau'i na littafin leksisiki kuma yana iya ƙara ta shige masu hushi na leksisi da za'a ƙara masu buƙata masu iya ƙaranci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambayi wata hanyoyi ta ƙaranci: Ina so, kan haka, ma'anar cẽwa, za'a iya yi amfani da ruwan leksiya kamar an kula da shi a ƙarƙashin da aka faɗa. @ item license (short name) Tuna ƙaddara maganar da aka sake shi a cikin kayan daidaita biyu: rabin mai fassarar magana da kuma ƙasan-resource da aka sanar da sunan-gaskiyar.", 'sk': 'Lexikalni viri, kot so slovarji in listi, se pogosto uporabljajo kot pomožni podatki za opravila, kot sta indukcija dela govora in prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet. Vendar pa diskriminativno usposabljanje z leksikalnimi značilnostmi zahteva označene podatke za zanesljivo oceno teže leksikalnih značilnosti in lahko povzroči prekomerno prilagajanje leksikalnih značilnosti na račun značilnosti, ki se bolje posplošujejo. V prispevku raziskujemo robustnejši pristop: predvidevamo, da je leksikon rezultat domnevnega generativnega procesa. Praktično to pomeni, da lahko leksikalne vire obravnavamo kot opazovanja po predlaganem generativnem modelu. Leksikalni viri zagotavljajo podatke o usposabljanju generativnega modela, ne da bi za oceno teže leksikalnih značilnosti potrebovali ločene podatke. Predlagani pristop ocenjujemo v dveh okoljih: indukciji dela govora in prepoznavanju imenovanih entitet z nizkimi viri.', 'he': 'Lexical resources such as dictionaries and gazetteers are often used as auxiliary data for tasks such as part-of-speech induction and named-entity recognition.  עם זאת, אימון דיסקרטיבי עם תכונות לקסיות דורש נתונים מועטפים כדי להעריך באופן אמין את משקלי תכונות הלקסיות ויכול לגרום למתאים הלקסיים יתר על חשבון תכונות שגנרליזמו יותר טוב. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים גישה חזקה יותר: אנו מציינים שהלקסיקון הוא תוצאה של תהליך דורי הנחשב. Practically, this means that we may treat the lexical resources as observations under the proposed generative model.  המשאבים הלקסיים מספקים נתונים אימונים לדוגמא הדורתית מבלי לדרוש נתונים נפרדים כדי להעריך משקלי תכונות הלקסיות. אנו מעריכים את הגישה המוצעת בשני סדרות: חלק מהניתוח הנאום והזיהוי היחידות בשם משאבים נמוכים.', 'bo': 'འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གསར་གཏོད་པ་ཚོ་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཐོག་ཆས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྒུལ་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཆེན་དང However, discriminative training with lexical features requires annotated data to reliably estimate the lexical feature weights and may result in overfitting the lexical features at the expense of features which generalize better. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཆེ་ཤོག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ལག་ལེན་བྱས་ཙང་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་སྟོན་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྱི་འོག་ག The lexical resources provide training data for the generative model without requiring separate data to estimate lexical feature weights. ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ནང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་འཆར་ཟིན་བྲིས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིན་ཐང་།'}
{'en': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'ar': 'ضمان الجودة شبه الخاضع للإشراف مع الشبكات التوليدية ذات المجال المتكيف', 'es': 'Control de calidad semisupervisado con redes generativas adaptables al dominio', 'pt': 'Controle de qualidade semi-supervisionado com redes adaptáveis de domínio generativo', 'fr': 'Assurance qualité semi-supervisée avec réseaux génératifs adaptatifs au domaine', 'ja': '生成ドメインアダプティブネットを備えた半監督QA', 'zh': '用生成域自应网络者半监 QA', 'hi': 'जननात्मक डोमेन-अनुकूली जाल के साथ अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित QA', 'ru': 'Полунадзорный QA с генеративными адаптивными сетями домена', 'ga': 'QA Leath-Maoirsithe le Líonta Oiriúnaitheacha Fearainn Giniteacha', 'ka': 'QA- ს პროგრამეტური დომენის ადაპტიგური ქსელებით', 'it': 'QA semi-supervisionato con reti generative adattive a dominio', 'el': 'Ημι-εποπτευόμενη QA με Generative Domain Adaptive Nets', 'kk': 'Жалпы домен адаптері желімен жарты бақылау QA', 'lt': 'Puspriežiūros QA su generaciniais domenui pritaikytais tinklais', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'സെമി- സുപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട QA ജനററിവ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d- അഡാപ്റ്റീവ് നെറ്റുകളുമായി', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt minőségi felügyelet generált tartomány-adaptív hálózatokkal', 'mt': 'QA Semissorveljata b’Netwerks Ġenerattivi Adattattivi għad-Dominju', 'no': 'Halvoversikt QA med genererte domenetilpassande nett', 'mn': 'Бүтээлтийн домон адаптер сүлжээтэй QA-г хагас хяналттай', 'pl': 'Pół-nadzorowane QA z generatywnymi sieciami adaptacyjnymi do domen', 'ro': 'QA semisupravegheată cu rețele generative adaptive pentru domenii', 'sr': 'Полунадзорена КА са генерацивним доменом адаптивним мрежима', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාවිත ඩොමේන්- අඩාප්ටයිට් ජාලය සමඟ අධිපත්ත QA', 'so': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'sv': 'Halvövervakad QA med generativa domänanpassade nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'نصف-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trả thù câu duy nhất', 'hr': 'Polovično nadgledano QA sa generativnim domenom adaptivnim mrežama', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised QA met generatieve domeinadaptieve netten', 'bg': 'Полунадзорен контрол на качеството с генеративни домейн адаптивни мрежи', 'da': 'Halvtilsynet QA med genererede domæneadaptive nets', 'de': 'Halbüberwachte Qualitätssicherung mit generativen domänenadaptiven Netzen', 'fa': 'QA نصف نظارت شده با شبکه\u200cهای سابق دامنه\u200cای', 'ko': '도메인 기반 Adaptive Network 기반 반감시QA', 'id': 'QA Semi-Supervisi dengan Jaringan Adaptif Domain Generatif', 'sw': 'Wakati wa Semi-Supervishwa na QA kwa Mtandao wa Kijeneraji wa Domain-Adaptive', 'tr': 'Üstüne Tarama Aç ile Azizlenmiş QA', 'af': 'Semi- Superviseer QA met Genereerde Domein- Adaptiewe Netwerke', 'hy': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'bn': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets', 'bs': 'Polovično nadgledano QA sa generativnim domenama-adaptivnim mrežama', 'ca': 'QA semisupervisada amb xarxes generatives adaptadores al domini', 'cs': 'Polovičně kontrolované QA s generačními sítěmi adaptivními na doménu', 'fi': 'Osavalvottu laadunvarmistus generatiivisilla verkkotunnuksiin mukautuvilla verkoilla', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega kvaliteedi tagamine generatiivsete domeeniga kohandatavate võrkudega', 'az': 'Yarƒ±-g√∂zl…ôyirli QA, Generativ Domain-Adaptiv Aƒülarƒ± il…ô', 'jv': 'semi-MonVised qA karo Generative domain-Adjustable nets', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovano zagotavljanje kakovosti z generativnimi mrežami, ki se prilagajajo domeni', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ལུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་QA རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་བ', 'he': 'Semi-Supervised QA with Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of semi-supervised question answeringutilizing unlabeled text to boost the performance of question answering models. We propose a novel training framework, the Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models. We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution. Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains substantial improvement from unlabeled text.Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate\n      questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated\n      questions with human-generated questions for training question answering\n      models. We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on\n      reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the\n      model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data\n      distribution. Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains\n      substantial improvement from unlabeled text.\n    ', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة إجابة الأسئلة شبه الخاضعة للإشراف - باستخدام النص غير المصنف لتعزيز أداء نماذج الإجابة على الأسئلة. نقترح إطارًا تدريبيًا جديدًا ، الشبكات التوليدية ذات المجال المتكيف. في هذا الإطار ، نقوم بتدريب نموذج توليدي لتوليد أسئلة بناءً على النص غير المصنف ، ودمج الأسئلة الناتجة عن النموذج مع الأسئلة التي يولدها الإنسان لتدريب نماذج الإجابة على الأسئلة. نقوم بتطوير خوارزميات جديدة لتكييف المجال ، بناءً على التعلم المعزز ، لتخفيف التناقض بين توزيع البيانات المولدة من النموذج وتوزيع البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الإنسان. تظهر التجارب أن إطار العمل المقترح الخاص بنا يحصل على تحسن كبير من النص غير المصنف.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème de la réponse aux questions semi-supervisée, en utilisant du texte non étiqueté pour améliorer les performances des modèles de réponse aux questions. Nous proposons un nouveau cadre de formation, le Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. Dans ce cadre, nous formons un modèle génératif pour générer des questions basées sur le texte non étiqueté, et combinons des questions générées par des modèles avec des questions générées par des humains pour former des modèles de réponse aux questions. Nous développons de nouveaux algorithmes d'adaptation de domaine, basés sur l'apprentissage par renforcement, afin de réduire l'écart entre la distribution des données générées par le modèle et la distribution des données générées par l'homme. Les expériences montrent que le cadre proposé obtient une amélioration substantielle par rapport au texte non étiqueté.", 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema de respostas a perguntas semi-supervisionadas - utilizando texto não rotulado para aumentar o desempenho dos modelos de resposta a perguntas. Propomos uma nova estrutura de treinamento, as Redes Adaptativas de Domínio Generativas. Nesta estrutura, treinamos um modelo generativo para gerar perguntas com base no texto não rotulado e combinamos perguntas geradas pelo modelo com perguntas geradas por humanos para treinar modelos de resposta a perguntas. Desenvolvemos novos algoritmos de adaptação de domínio, baseados em aprendizado por reforço, para aliviar a discrepância entre a distribuição de dados gerada pelo modelo e a distribuição de dados gerada por humanos. Experimentos mostram que nossa estrutura proposta obtém melhorias substanciais de texto não rotulado.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de la respuesta semisupervisada a las preguntas, utilizando texto sin etiqueta para mejorar el rendimiento de los modelos de respuesta a preguntas. Proponemos un marco de entrenamiento novedoso, las Redes Adaptativas de Dominio Generativo. En este marco, entrenamos un modelo generativo para generar preguntas basadas en el texto sin etiqueta, y combinamos preguntas generadas por modelos con preguntas generadas por humanos para entrenar modelos de respuesta a preguntas. Desarrollamos algoritmos novedosos de adaptación de dominio, basados en el aprendizaje por refuerzo, para aliviar la discrepancia entre la distribución de datos generados por modelos y la distribución de datos generados por humanos. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro marco propuesto obtiene una mejora sustancial del texto sin etiqueta.', 'ja': '私たちは、質問回答モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、半監督型質問回答の問題を研究しています。私たちは、新しいトレーニングフレームワーク、Generative Domain - Adaptive Netsを提案します。このフレームワークでは、ラベル付けされていないテキストに基づいて質問を生成するための生成モデルを訓練し、質問応答モデルを訓練するためのモデル生成質問と人間生成質問を組み合わせます。私たちは、モデル生成データ分布と人間生成データ分布との間の乖離を緩和するために、強化学習に基づいて、新しいドメイン適応アルゴリズムを開発します。実験では、提案されたフレームワークがラベル付けされていないテキストから実質的な改善を得ることが示されています。', 'zh': '臣等考半监答 - 因未标之文本以重问模之性。 陈新训框架,生成域自适网络。 此框架之中,练一以成形,以生未标之本,合人工之问,以习问答。 开基化学新型域应算法,以轻模成之数据分布与人为生数据分布之异。 实验明,臣等所建框架未标本得实质性改进。', 'hi': 'हम अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित प्रश्न उत्तर देने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं- प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए लेबल रहित पाठ का उपयोग करते हैं। हम एक उपन्यास प्रशिक्षण ढांचे, उत्पादक डोमेन-अनुकूली नेट्स का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस ढांचे में, हम अनलेबल पाठ के आधार पर प्रश्न उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उत्पादक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और प्रशिक्षण प्रश्न उत्तर मॉडल के लिए मानव-जनित प्रश्नों के साथ मॉडल-जनित प्रश्नों को जोड़ते हैं। हम मॉडल-जनित डेटा वितरण और मानव-जनित डेटा वितरण के बीच विसंगति को कम करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने के आधार पर उपन्यास डोमेन अनुकूलन एल्गोरिदम विकसित करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित ढांचा बिना लेबल वाले पाठ से पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем проблему полуконтролируемого ответа на вопросы с использованием немаркированного текста для повышения производительности моделей ответов на вопросы. Мы предлагаем новую систему обучения, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. В этом контексте мы обучаем генеративную модель для генерации вопросов на основе немаркированного текста и комбинируем вопросы, сгенерированные моделью, с вопросами, сгенерированными человеком, для моделей ответов на обучающие вопросы. Мы разрабатываем новые алгоритмы адаптации домена, основанные на обучении подкреплению, чтобы уменьшить несоответствие между распределением данных, генерируемым моделью, и распределением данных, генерируемым человеком. Эксперименты показывают, что наша предлагаемая структура получает существенное улучшение по сравнению с немаркированным текстом.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le freagraí leath-mhaoirseachta ar cheisteanna – úsáid a bhaint as téacs gan lipéad chun feidhmíocht na samhlacha freagartha ceisteanna a threisiú. Molaimid creat nua oiliúna, na Líonta Fearainn-Adaptive Generative. Sa chreat seo, cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnla giniúna chun ceisteanna a ghiniúint bunaithe ar an téacs neamhlipéadaithe, agus comhcheanglaímid ceisteanna a chruthaítear le samhlacha le ceisteanna daonna chun samhlacha freagartha ceisteanna a oiliúint. Forbraímid halgartaim oiriúnaithe fearainn nua, bunaithe ar fhoghlaim athneartaithe, chun an neamhréireacht idir an dáileadh sonraí arna ghiniúint ag samhlacha agus an dáileadh sonraí arna ghiniúint ag an duine a mhaolú. Léiríonn turgnaimh go dtagann feabhas suntasach ar ár gcreat molta ó théacs gan lipéad.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της ημι-εποπτευόμενης απάντησης ερωτήσεων-χρησιμοποιώντας κείμενο χωρίς ετικέτα για να ενισχύσουμε την απόδοση των μοντέλων απάντησης ερωτήσεων. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο εκπαιδευτικό πλαίσιο, τα Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. Σε αυτό το πλαίσιο, εκπαιδεύουμε ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων βασισμένων στο κείμενο χωρίς ετικέτα και συνδυάζουμε ερωτήσεις που δημιουργούνται από μοντέλα με ερωτήσεις που δημιουργούνται από ανθρώπους για μοντέλα απάντησης ερωτήσεων κατάρτισης. Αναπτύσσουμε νέους αλγόριθμους προσαρμογής τομέων, βασισμένους στη μάθηση ενίσχυσης, για να μετριάσουμε τη διαφορά μεταξύ της κατανομής δεδομένων που παράγεται από το μοντέλο και της κατανομής δεδομένων που παράγεται από τον άνθρωπο. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο επιτυγχάνει ουσιαστική βελτίωση από το κείμενο χωρίς επισήμανση.', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a félig felügyelt kérdésválasz problémáját – címke nélküli szöveget használva a kérdésválaszadó modellek teljesítményének növelésére. Egy új képzési keretrendszert, a Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets-et javasoljuk. Ebben a keretben egy generációs modellt képzünk, amely a címke nélküli szövegen alapuló kérdéseket generál, és a modellek által generált kérdéseket az ember által generált kérdésekkel ötvözi a kérdésre válaszoló modellek képzéséhez. Új domain adaptációs algoritmusokat fejlesztünk ki, amelyek erősítési tanuláson alapulnak, hogy enyhítsük a modell által generált adatok elosztása és az ember által generált adatok elosztása közötti eltéréseket. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt keretrendszerünk jelentős javulást eredményez a címke nélküli szövegből.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრობლემა, რომელიც დავუკეთებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც საუკეთესებელი ტექსტის გამოყენებას გამოიყენებას, რომელიც არ უკეთესებელი ტექსტის გამოყ ჩვენ პრომენტის განვიყენება პრომენტის კონფიგურაცია, დემომინის ადაპტიგური ქსელები. ამ ფრამეტში ჩვენ განვიყავით გენერაციური მოდელი, რომ კითხვები შექმნა, რომლებიც არაფერი ტექსტიდან დაბაზიან, და მოდელის შექმნილი კითხვები ადამიანის შექმნილი კითხვებით, რომლებიც ჩვენ განვითარებთ ნომალური დიომენის ადაპტიფიკაციის ალგორტიმი, რომელიც უფრო სწავლობაზე დაბაზიან, რომ მოდელური განვითარებული მონაცემების გაყოფილების და ადამიანის განვითარებული მონაცე ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამების გასაკეთებელი ტექსტიდან მნიშვნელოვანი გასაკეთება.', 'it': "Studiamo il problema della risposta alle domande semi-supervisionata, utilizzando testo non etichettato per aumentare le prestazioni dei modelli di risposta alle domande. Proponiamo un nuovo quadro di formazione, le Reti Generative Domain-Adaptive. In questo contesto, addestriamo un modello generativo per generare domande basate sul testo non etichettato e combiniamo domande generate da modelli con domande generate dall'uomo per formare modelli di risposta alle domande. Sviluppiamo nuovi algoritmi di adattamento del dominio, basati sull'apprendimento di rinforzo, per alleviare la discrepanza tra la distribuzione dei dati generata dal modello e la distribuzione dei dati generata dall'uomo. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il quadro proposto ottiene miglioramenti sostanziali dal testo non etichettato.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame pusiau prižiūrimos klausimų atsakymo į klausimus problem ą, kuria siekiama padidinti klausimų atsakymo modelių veiksmingumą. Siūlome sukurti naują mokymo sistemą, kuria būtų sukurti bendrosios srities pritaikymo tinklai. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  Kuriame naujus srities pritaikymo algoritmus, pagrįstus stiprinamuoju mokymusi, siekiant sumažinti modelio sukauptų duomenų platinimo ir žmogaus sukauptų duomenų platinimo skirtumus. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų pasiūlyta sistema iš esmės pagerina nepažymėtą tekstą.', 'mk': 'We study the problem of semi-supervised question answering-utilizing unlabeled text to boost the performance of question answering models.  Предложуваме нова рамка за обука, Генеративните мрежи за адаптирање на домените. Во оваа рамка, обучуваме генеративен модел за генерирање прашања базирани на неозначениот текст, и комбинираме прашања генерирани од моделот со прашања генерирани од човек за обука на моделите за одговори на прашања. We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution.  Експериментите покажуваат дека нашата предложена рамка добива значително подобрување од неозначен текст.', 'kk': 'Біз жарты қарау сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін жауап бермеген мәтінді қолданудың мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз романдық оқыту бағдарламасын, құрылған доменге адаптациялық желілерді ұсынамыз. Бұл қоршауда, біз сұрақтарды жасау үшін генеративті үлгі ұқсатып, келтірілмеген мәтінде негізделген сұрақтарды жасау үшін адамдардың құрылған сұрақтарымен біріктіреміз. Біз романдық доменге адаптациялау алгоритмдерін жасап, күштеу оқытуға негізделген, үлгі құрылған деректер үлестірімі мен адамдар құрылған деректер үлестірімі арасындағы айырмашылығын кө Тәжірибелер қолданатын фрейміміздің мәтіннен көп жақсартуын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari masalah soalan setengah diawasi menjawab-menggunakan teks tidak berlebihan untuk meningkatkan prestasi model menjawab soalan. Kami cadangkan rangkaian latihan baru, Rangkaian Penyesuaian Domain Generatif. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  Kami mengembangkan algoritma penyesuaian domain baru, berdasarkan pembelajaran kuasa, untuk mengurangi ketidakpadanan antara distribusi data yang dijana oleh model dan distribusi data yang dijana oleh manusia. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kerangka yang kami cadangkan mendapat peningkatan yang besar dari teks yang tidak ditanda.', 'mt': "Aħna nistudjaw il-problema tat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet semisuperviżi li jużaw test mhux ittikkettat biex isaħħu l-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli tat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet. Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid ta' taħriġ, in-Netwerks Ġenerattivi li jadattaw għad-Dominju. F’dan il-qafas, a ħna nħarrġu mudell ġenerattiv biex niġġeneraw mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq it-test mhux ittikkettat, u nikkombinaw mistoqsijiet iġġenerati mill-mudell ma’ mistoqsijiet iġġenerati mill-bniedem għal mudelli ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet ta’ taħriġ. Aħna niżviluppaw algoritmi ġodda ta' adattament għad-dominji, ibbażati fuq tagħlim ta' rinfurzar, biex itaffu d-diskrepanza bejn id-distribuzzjoni tad-dejta ġġenerata mill-mudell u d-distribuzzjoni tad-dejta ġġenerata mill-bniedem. L-esperimenti juru li l-qafas propost tagħna jikseb titjib sostanzjali minn test mingħajr tikketta.", 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമിമി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യത്തിന് നമ്മള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ട്രെയിനിവ് ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ജനററിവ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d -അഡാപ്റ്റ ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്മെയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നു, അടയാളപ്പെടാത്ത വാചകത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാനും, മോഡ കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലായി നോവല്\u200d ഡോമെന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച ഡേറ്റ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ലേബി', 'mn': 'Бид хагас удирдагдсан асуултын асуудлыг судалж, асуулт хариултын загварын үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжгүй текст ашигладаг. Бид шинэ сургалтын хөтөлбөр, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets-г санал болгож байна. Энэ хэлбэрээр бид бүтээлч загварыг суралцах боломжгүй текст дээр үндсэн асуултуудыг бий болгохын тулд зохион бүтээгдэхүүний асуултуудыг хүн төрөлхтний гаргасан асуултуудтай холбоотой. Бид шинэ зохион байгуулалт алгоритмыг хөгжүүлж, загвар гаргасан өгөгдлийн хуваарилалт болон хүний үүсгэсэн өгөгдлийн хуваарилалтын хоорондын ялгааг багасгах боломжтой. Эмчилгээний туршилтууд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэлбэрээс илүү сайжруулагддаг.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem pół-nadzorowanej odpowiedzi na pytania – wykorzystując nieoznakowany tekst w celu zwiększenia wydajności modeli odpowiedzi na pytania. Proponujemy nowe ramy szkoleniowe, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. W tym kontekście szkolimy model generacyjny do generowania pytań opartych na nieoznakowanym tekście i łączymy pytania generowane modelem z pytaniami generowanymi przez człowieka dla modeli odpowiedzi na pytania szkoleniowe. Opracowujemy nowe algorytmy adaptacji domen, oparte na uczeniu się wzmacniającym, aby złagodzić rozbieżność między dystrybucją danych generowanych przez model a dystrybucją danych generowanych przez człowieka. Eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowane ramy uzyskują znaczną poprawę dzięki tekstowi nieoznakowanemu.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem polu nadziranog pitanja odgovarajući neopisivanim tekstom kako bi se povećala učinkovitost modela odgovaranja pitanja. Predlažemo novi okvir obuke, Generativne domene-adaptivne mreže. U ovom okviru treniramo generativni model kako bi stvorili pitanja na osnovu neizbeđenog teksta i kombinirali modelna pitanja sa ljudskim pitanjima za odgovore na pitanja odgovarajućih model a. Razvijamo algoritme za adaptaciju novog domena na osnovu učenja pojačanja, da smanjimo diskreciju između distribucije podataka iz modela i distribucije podataka iz ljudskih generacija. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi okvir dobija značajno poboljšanje od neopisivanog teksta.', 'no': 'Vi studerer problemet med halvoversikt spørsmål for å svara med ukjend tekst for å styra utviklinga av spørsmålmodeller for å svara på spørsmål. Vi foreslår eit nytt opplæringsrammeverk, det genererte domenetilpassande nettet. I dette rammeverket treng vi ein generelt modell for å laga spørsmål basert på den ugjennomsiktige teksten, og kombinerer modeller genererte spørsmål med menneske genererte spørsmål for opplæring av spørsmålmodeller. Vi utviklar algoritme for å adaptera novel domenet, basert på stipringslæring, for å redusera forskjellighet mellom modeller genererte datadistribusjon og den menneske genererte datadistribusjonen. Eksperimentar viser at vårt foreslått rammeverk får stor forbedring frå ugjennomsiktig tekst.', 'so': "Waxaynu baranaynaa dhibaatada su'aalaha halka la ilaaliyey si aan u isticmaalno qoraal aan la aqoon in loo kordhiyo sameynta sameynta sameynta su'aalaha. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa koorasyo waxbarasho ee warqada ah, shabakadda Generative Domain-Adaptive. Midabkan waxaynu ku tababarinnaa tusaale general ah si aan u soo saarno su'aalo ku saleysan matxafka aan la aqoon karin, waxaana ku soo wada ururinnaa su'aalo model la sameeyay oo ku saabsan su'aalo u jawaabta sameynta su'aalaha su'aalaha la tababariyey dadka. Waxaynu korinaynaa algorityo bedelashada deegaanka, taasoo ku saleysan waxbarashada kordhista, si aan u fududayno iskuulka u kala qaybinta danaha sameynta iyo kala qaybinta danaha dadka oo dhashay. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in dhaqdhaqaalahayaga la soo jeeday uu helo hagaajin aad u weyn oo laga helo qoraal aan la sheegin.", 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet med halvövervakat frågesvar – med hjälp av omärkt text för att öka prestandan hos frågesvarsmodeller. Vi föreslår en ny utbildningsram, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. I detta sammanhang tränar vi en generativ modell för att generera frågor baserade på den omärkta texten, och kombinerar modellgenererade frågor med mänskliga frågor för att utbilda frågesvarsmodeller. Vi utvecklar nya domänanpassningsalgoritmer, baserade på förstärkningsinlärning, för att lindra skillnaden mellan modellgenererad datadistribution och mänsklig genererad datadistribution. Experiment visar att vår föreslagna ram får betydande förbättringar av text utan märkning.', 'ta': 'நாம் பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வியின் பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம் கேள்வி பதில் மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக்க நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய பயிற்சி சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பொதுவான டோமைன்-Adaptive Network. இந்த சட்டத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்து கேள்விகளை அடிப்படையில் உருவாக்குவதற்கு, மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகளை மன நாம் மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவு பங்கீட்டிற்கும் மற்றும் மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவு பங்கீட்டுக்கும் இடையே வேறுபாட்டை குறைக்க வேண்டும். சோதனைகள் நம்முடைய பரிந்துரைய சட்டத்திலிருந்து பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் பெறுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم نصف نظارت والی سوال کے مسئلہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ سوال کی جواب دینے کی موڈل کو زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نوی تدریس فرمود کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، نسل ڈومین-اڈپٹیٹ نیٹ. اس فرمیٹ میں ہم ایک پیدا کرنے والی موڈل کی تطالب کرتے ہیں کہ سوال پیدا کرنے کے لئے بغیر پڑھے ہوئے متن پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور مدل پیدا کئے ہوئے سوال انسان کے پیدا کئے ہوئے سوال کے ساتھ تطالب کرنے کے لئے سوال جواب دینے کے لئے جمع کریں ہم نے نو ڈومین اڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈی تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد فرمود بغیر قابل نوشتہ پیغام سے بہت اچھی سوداگری حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema răspunsului la întrebări semi-supravegheat - utilizând textul fără etichete pentru a spori performanța modelelor de răspuns la întrebări. Propunem un nou cadru de instruire, Rețelele Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. În acest cadru, pregătim un model generativ pentru a genera întrebări bazate pe textul neetichetat și combinăm întrebările generate de model cu întrebările generate de om pentru a instrui modele de răspuns la întrebări. Dezvoltăm algoritmi noi de adaptare a domeniului, bazați pe învățarea de armare, pentru a atenua discrepanța dintre distribuția datelor generate de model și distribuția datelor generate de om. Experimentele arată că cadrul nostru propus obține îmbunătățiri substanțiale din textul neetichetat.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ අපි නියම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්, ප්\u200dරජාතික ඩොමේන් එක්ක අනුම මේ ප්\u200dරකාරයේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, සහ මනුෂ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් නිර්මාණය කරපු දත්ත විතරය සහ මිනිස්සු නිර්මාණය කරපු දත්ත විතරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් විතරයෙන් නිර පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් නැති පාළ', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik qo'llangan savol javob beruvchi muammolarini o'rganamiz, notoʻgʻri matnni ishlatish uchun savol modellarni bajarishni bajarish uchun. Biz yangi taʼminlovchi soʻzni, Generative Domain-Adaptive tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz. Bu freymda, biz notoʻgʻri matn asosida savollarni yaratish uchun generativ modelni o'rganamiz, model yaratilgan savollarni birlashtiramiz va inson yaratilgan savollarni o'rganish uchun maslahatlarni o'rganamiz. Biz yordam domen adapterining algorithini o'rganish asosida yaratishimiz model yaratilgan maʼlumot tarqatish va inson yaratilgan maʼlumot tarqatishni kamaytirish uchun. Tajribalar taʼminlovchi freymlar notoʻgʻri matnning juda katta yaxshi o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề trả lời câu hỏi nửa giám sát sử dụng các văn bản không có lỗi để tăng hiệu quả của các mô hình trả lời câu hỏi. Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở đào tạo mới, Hệ thống định hình Miền Đông. Trong lĩnh vực này, chúng tôi đào tạo một mô hình tạo tác động để tạo ra câu hỏi dựa trên văn bản chưa được sửa, và kết hợp các câu hỏi tạo ra từ mẫu với các câu hỏi được tạo ra để câu trả lời các mô hình. Chúng tôi phát triển các thuật to án nghiên cứu mới về lĩnh vực, dựa trên việc học củng cố, để giảm sự khác biệt giữa phân phối dữ liệu mô hình và phân phối dữ liệu nhân tạo. Thí nghiệm cho thấy trong phạm vi của chúng ta có những cải tiến lớn từ văn bản vô tội.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen het probleem van semi-supervised vragen beantwoorden, waarbij niet-gelabelde tekst wordt gebruikt om de prestaties van vragen beantwoordingsmodellen te verbeteren. We stellen een nieuw trainingskader voor, de Generative Domain Adaptive Nets. In dit kader trainen we een generatief model om vragen te genereren op basis van de niet-gelabelde tekst, en combineren we modelgegenereerde vragen met menselijke vragen voor trainingsvragenbeantwoordingsmodellen. We ontwikkelen nieuwe domeinadaptatiealgoritmes, gebaseerd op versterking learning, om de discrepantie tussen de door het model gegenereerde gegevensdistributie en de door mensen gegenereerde gegevensdistributie te verminderen. Uit experimenten blijkt dat ons voorgestelde kader substantiële verbeteringen verkrijgt door tekst zonder label.', 'bg': 'Проучваме проблема с полу-надзорния отговор на въпроси, използвайки незабелязан текст, за да подобрим ефективността на моделите за отговор на въпроси. Предлагаме нова обучителна рамка, генеративните домейн-адаптивни мрежи. В тази рамка обучаваме генеративен модел за генериране на въпроси въз основа на неетикетирания текст и комбинираме генерирани от модели въпроси с човешки въпроси за обучение на модели за отговор на въпроси. Разработваме нови алгоритми за адаптация на домейна, базирани на усвояване, за да облекчим несъответствието между генерираното от модела разпределение на данни и генерираното от човека разпределение на данни. Експериментите показват, че предложената ни рамка постига значително подобрение от незабелязания текст.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem polu nadziranog pitanja odgovarajući odgovor na neopisivan tekst kako bi se povećala učinkovitost modela odgovarajućih pitanja. Predlažemo novi okvir obuke, Generativne domene-adaptivne mreže. U ovom okviru treniramo generični model kako bi stvorili pitanja na temelju neizbiljnog teksta, i kombinirali modelna pitanja sa ljudskim pitanjima za odgovarajuće modele pitanja na obuku. Razvijamo algoritme za adaptaciju novog domena na temelju učenja pojačanja, kako bi se smanjili razlika između distribucije podataka koji su generirani modelom i distribucije podataka koji su generirani ljudima. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi okvir dobija značajno poboljšanje od neopisivanog teksta.', 'da': 'Vi studerer problemet med semi-overvåget spørgsmål besvarelse - bruger ikke mærket tekst til at øge ydeevnen af spørgsmål besvarelse modeller. Vi foreslår en ny træningsramme, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. I denne sammenhæng træner vi en generativ model til at generere spørgsmål baseret på den ikke-mærkede tekst, og kombinerer modellgenererede spørgsmål med menneskeskabte spørgsmål til træning af spørgsmålsbesvarelsesmodeller. Vi udvikler nye domænetilpasningsalgoritmer, baseret på forstærkningslæring, for at afhjælpe uoverensstemmelsen mellem den modellgenererede datadistribution og den menneskeskabte datadistribution. Eksperimenter viser, at vores foreslåede rammebestemmelser opnår betydelige forbedringer af ikke-mærket tekst.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah pertanyaan semi-mengawasi menjawab-menggunakan teks tanpa label untuk meningkatkan prestasi dari model menjawab pertanyaan. We propose a novel training framework, the Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets.  In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  Kami mengembangkan algoritma adaptasi domain baru, berdasarkan pembelajaran pemerintahan, untuk mengurangi diskrepansi antara distribusi data yang dihasilkan oleh model dan distribusi data yang dihasilkan oleh manusia. Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains substantial improvement from unlabeled text.', 'ko': '우리는 표기되지 않은 텍스트의 반감독 문답 문제를 이용하여 문답 모델의 성능을 향상시켰다.우리는 새로운 훈련 틀인 생성역 자동 적응 네트워크를 제시했다.이 구조에서 우리는 표기되지 않은 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 문제를 생성하고 모델이 생성한 문제와 인공적으로 생성된 문제를 결합시켜 문답 모델을 훈련한다.우리는 강화 학습을 바탕으로 하는 새로운 영역 적응 알고리즘을 개발하여 모델 생성의 데이터 분포와 인공 생성의 데이터 분포 간의 차이를 완화시켰다.실험에 의하면 우리가 제시한 프레임워크는 표기되지 않은 텍스트보다 실질적인 개선이 있었다.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل سؤال نصف نظارت را مطالعه می کنیم که با استفاده از متن غیر معتبر استفاده می کنیم تا عملکرد مدل جواب سوال را افزایش دهیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب تمرین نویس، شبکه\u200cهای متعادلانه به دامنی نسل. در این چهارچوب، ما یک مدل ژنترافی را آموزش می دهیم تا سوالات را بر اساس متن غیرقابل تولید کنیم، و سوالات تولید شده مدل را با سوالات تولید شده انسان برای پاسخ جواب سوالات را ترکیب کنیم. ما الگوریتم\u200cهای تغییرات دومین نو را توسعه می\u200cکنیم، بر اساس یادگیری افزایش، تا اختلاف بین توسعه داده\u200cهای تولید شده مدل و توسعه داده\u200cهای تولید شده انسان را کمتر کند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما از متن غیرقابل نوشته شده بهترین زیادی را می\u200cگیرد.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Problem der semi-überwachten Beantwortung von Fragen, wobei nicht beschrifteter Text verwendet wird, um die Leistung von Fragebeantwortungsmodellen zu steigern. Wir schlagen einen neuartigen Trainingsrahmen vor, die Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. In diesem Rahmen trainieren wir ein generatives Modell, um Fragen basierend auf dem nicht beschrifteten Text zu generieren, und kombinieren modellgenerierte Fragen mit menschlich generierten Fragen für Trainingsfragen-Antwortmodelle. Wir entwickeln neuartige Domänenanpassungsalgorithmen, die auf Verstärkungslernen basieren, um die Diskrepanz zwischen der modellgenerierten Datenverteilung und der vom Menschen generierten Datenverteilung zu verringern. Experimente zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagener Rahmen durch nicht beschrifteten Text erhebliche Verbesserungen erzielt.', 'tr': 'Biz ýarym-gözleýän soragyň soragynyň jogap etmäge söz berilmeýän metini öwrenip sorag nusgalarynyň täsirini artdyrmak üçin. Biz yeni bir eğitim çerçevesini teklip edip görýäris Bu çerýäde, biz janlaşdyrma nusgasyny ýazylmaz metin daýarylan soraglary döretmek üçin öwrülen nusgasyny we adam tarapyndan janlaşdyran soraglary üçin birleşdirdik. Biz döwletlere güçlendirmek öwrenmesine daýanýar, nusgala üretilen veri daýratmanyň we adam üretilen veri daýratmanyň arasyndaky aýratmanlygyny azaltmak üçin roman domeny adaptasyon algoritmalaryny geliştirdik. Testler biziň teklip eden frameworkymyzyň ýazylmaz metinden örän gowurak bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'We study the problem of semi-supervised question answering-utilizing unlabeled text to boost the performance of question answering models.  Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri trajnimi, rrjetet gjenerative të adaptueshme në domeni. Në këtë kuadër, ne trajnojmë një model gjenerativ për të gjeneruar pyetje të bazuara në tekstin pa shenjë, dhe kombinojmë pyetje të gjeneruara nga modeli me pyetje të gjeneruara nga njeriu për trajnimin e modeleve për përgjigjen e pyetjeve. Ne zhvillojmë algoritme të reja të përshtatjes në domeni, bazuar në mësimin e forcimit, për të lehtësuar mospërputhjen midis shpërndarjes së të dhënave të gjeneruara nga modeli dhe shpërndarjes së të dhënave të gjeneruara nga njerëzit. Eksperimentet tregojnë se kuadri ynë i propozuar merr përmirësim thelbësor nga teksti pa etiketë.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia tatizo la swali linalofuatiliwa na nusu kwa kutumia ujumbe usiotumiwa ili kuongeza utendaji wa mifano ya kujibu maswali. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa mafunzo ya riwaya, Mtandao wa Kijeneraji wa Domain-Adaptive. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  Tunaendeleza vipengele vya kuboresha kwa riwaya, kwa kutumia elimu ya kuboresha, ili kupunguza utofauti kati ya usambazaji wa taarifa zilizotengenezwa na usambazaji wa data kwa binadamu. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa pendekezo unapata maboresho makubwa kutoka kwenye ujumbe usioeleweka.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die probleem van die semi-ondersoekte vraag antwoord-gebruik van onbetekende teks om die prestasie van vraag antwoord model te verhoog. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe onderwerking raamwerk, die Genereerde Domein-Adaptiewe Netwerke. In hierdie raamwerk, ons tref 'n genereerbare model om vrae te genereer wat gebaseer is op die ongeabelde teks, en kombineer model genereerde vrae met mensgenereerde vrae vir onderwerp vraag antwoord model. Ons ontwikkel nuwe domein-adaptasie algoritme, gebaseer op versterking leer, om die verskeidigheid tussen die model genereerde data-verspreiding en die mensgenereerde data-verspreiding te verminder. Eksperimente wys dat ons voorgestelde raamwerk substantieel verbetering kry van ongeabelde teks.", 'am': 'የጥያቄን መልስ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የኖላው ትምህርት ፍሬማር፣ የዘላለም ዶሜን-አዳaptive መረብ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ፍሬማር፣ የዘረኝነት ምሳሌ፣ ጥያቄዎችን በጽሑፍ ለመፍጠር እናስተማርጋለን፣ እናም በሞዴል የተፈጠረውን ጥያቄዎችን በሰው አነስተኛ ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል ጥያቄዎች እናስማራለን፡፡ አካባቢ ትምህርት በመሠረት የኖሮው አዲስ ዶሜን አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃዎችን እና የሰው አካባቢ መከፋት እና የዳታ አካባቢነትን ለማሳየት እናቆማለን፡፡ Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains substantial improvement from unlabeled text.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք կես-վերահսկված հարցերի խնդիրը՝ պատասխանելով-օգտագործելով աննշան տեքստը, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք հարցերի պատասխանի մոդելների արտադրողությունը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ուսուցման շրջանակ՝ Գեներատիվ բնագավառի համապատասխանող ցանցեր: Այս շրջանակներում մենք պատրաստում ենք սերունդային մոդել, որպեսզի ստեղծենք հարցեր, որոնք հիմնված են բացահայտված տեքստի վրա, և համադրենք մոդելի ստեղծված հարցեր մարդկային ստեղծված հարցերի հետ, որոնք պատասխանում են հարցերին: Մենք զարգանում ենք նոր ոլորտի ադապտացիայի ալգորիթմներ, հիմնված ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրության վրա, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք մոդելի ստեղծված տվյալների տարբերությունը և մարդկային ստեղծված տվյալների տարածումը: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած շրջանակը նշանակալի բարելավում է առանց նշանակալի տեքստից:', 'az': 'Biz yarńĪ-g√∂zl…ôyirli sual problemini t…ôhsil edirik ki, sual cavab ver…ôn modell…ôrin performansńĪnńĪ artńĪrsńĪn. Biz yeni t…ôhsil qurńüusu, Generativ Domain-Adaptive Netl…ôr t…ôklif edirik. Bu √ßer√∂m…ôtd…ô, m…ôlumatńĪ t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn generikli modeli t…ôhsil edirik v…ô modell…ôr t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn modell…ôr t…ôhsil edilmiŇü suallarla birl…ôŇüdiririk. Biz yeni domenin uyńüunlaŇüdńĪrmasńĪ algoritmini d√ľz…ôltdik, m√∂hk…ôml…ôndirm…ôk √∂yr…ônm…ôsin…ô dayanan, modell…ô √ľr…ôkl…ônmiŇü veri dańüńĪtńĪmńĪ v…ô insan √ľr…ôkl…ônmiŇü veri dańüńĪtńĪmńĪ arasńĪndakńĪ f…ôrqliyi azaltmaq √ľ√ß√ľn. H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz t…ôblińü edilmiŇü frameworkl…ôrimizin …ôlam…ôtsiz m…ôtnd…ôn √ßox yaxŇüńĪlńĪqlarńĪnńĪ verir.', 'ca': "Estudem el problema de respondre a preguntes semisupervisades utilitzant text sense etiqueta per augmentar el rendiment de models de resposta a preguntes. Proposem un nou marc d'entrenament, les xarxes adaptadores al domini generatiu. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution.  Els experiments demostren que el nostre marc proposat obté una millora substancial amb text sense marca.", 'cs': 'Studujeme problém polovičně dohlížených odpovědí na otázky s využitím neoznačeného textu ke zvýšení výkonnosti modelů odpovědi na otázky. Navrhujeme nový vzdělávací rámec, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. V tomto rámci trénujeme generační model pro generování otázek založených na neoznačeném textu a kombinujeme otázky generované modelem s otázkami generovanými lidmi pro modely odpovědí na otázky školení. Vyvíjíme nové algoritmy adaptace domén založené na posilovacím učení, abychom zmírnili nesrovnalost mezi distribucí dat generovaných modelem a distribucí dat generovaných člověkem. Experimenty ukazují, že náš navržený rámec dosahuje výrazného zlepšení z neoznačeného textu.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem polu nadziranog pitanja odgovarajući odgovorima na neopisivan tekst kako bi se povećala učinkovitost modela odgovarajućih pitanja. Predlažemo novi okvir obuke, generativne domene-adaptivne mreže. U ovom okviru treniramo generični model kako bi stvorili pitanja na temelju neizbiljnog teksta, i kombinirali modelna pitanja sa ljudskim pitanjima za odgovarajuće modele odgovora na pitanja. Razvijamo algoritme za adaptaciju novog domena na osnovu učenja pojačanja, kako bi olakšali diskreciju između distribucije podataka koji su generirani modelom i distribucije podataka koji su generirani ljudima. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi okvir dobija značajno poboljšanje od neopisivanog teksta.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের উত্তর ব্যবহার করার জন্য সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণকারী প্রশ্নের সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি। আমরা একটি নোভেল প্রশিক্ষণ কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি, জেনারেটিভ ডোমেইন-এডপ্যাটিভ নেটওয়ার্ক। এই ফ্রেমে আমরা একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ দিচ্ছি যাতে প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা হয় না লেখার উপর ভিত্তি করে এবং মডেল-তৈরি করা প্রশ্নের সাথে মা We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution.  পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেম কাঠামো অলীকালীন লেখা থেকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প', 'fi': 'Tutkimme puolivalvotun kysymyksenvastauksen ongelmaa käyttämällä merkitsemätöntä tekstiä kysymyksenvastausmallien suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Ehdotamme uudenlaista koulutuskehystä, Generative Domain-Adaptive Nets. Tässä viitekehyksessä koulutamme generoivan mallin, joka tuottaa kysymyksiä merkitsemättömään tekstiin perustuen, ja yhdistämme mallipohjaiset kysymykset ihmisen aiheuttamiin kysymyksiin kysymysmallien kouluttamiseksi. Kehitämme uusia verkkotunnuksen sopeutumisalgoritmeja, jotka perustuvat vahvistuksen oppimiseen, helpottamaan mallin tuottaman datan ja ihmisen tuottaman datan jakautumisen välistä eroa. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu kehys parantaa huomattavasti merkitsemätöntä tekstiä.', 'et': 'Uurime pooljuhitava küsimustele vastamise probleemi, kasutades märgistamata teksti, et tõsta küsimustele vastamise mudelite jõudlust. Me pakume välja uudse koolitusraamistiku, genereeritud domeeniga kohanemisvõrgud. Selles raamistikus koolitame generatiivset mudelit, mis genereerib märgistamata tekstil põhinevaid küsimusi, ning kombineerime mudelil tekitatud küsimusi inimese tekitatud küsimustega küsimustele vastamise mudelite koolitamiseks. Töötame välja uudsed domeeni kohandamise algoritmid, mis põhinevad tugevdusõppel, et leevendada erinevusi mudelil genereeritud andmejaotuse ja inimese genereeritud andmejaotuse vahel. Katsed näitavad, et meie kavandatud raamistik parandab märgistamata teksti oluliselt.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerti perbudhakan langgar-sistem sing rumangké gerakan cecaturan langgar-sistem sing gak nggawe perusahaan seneng pisan nggawe barang model sing bisa cecaturan. We proposal a new translation frame, the Generative domain-Optive nets. Nang sandi iki, kita luwih akeh model sing generic kanggo ngelangul persian sing bisa nguasai gambaran seneng gawe jelangul, lan ujolan model-generated question karo perbudhakan-generated question kanggo nganggo persian sing bisa model sing apik. We create new domain modification Algorithms, supported on refforcement Learning, to alert the disc gap amongst the model-generated data Distribution and the Human-generated data Distribution. Perintah sing ngomong nik akeh nggawe barang kelas nang sampeyan ingkang bantuan bantuan nggambar kelas teks sing gak nggawe', 'ha': "Munã karanta matsayin tambayar wanda aka tsare na ƙara-sakan da ba'a yi amfani da matsayin da ba'a rubutu ba, dõmin ya boost aikin muhimmin masĩfa. Tuna goyyar da wani firam na zamani, The General Domen-Adoptive Nets. Daga wannan firam, Munã kõre wata misali mai jeniya dõmin mu ƙiƙiro masu tambayi a kan karatun matsayin da ba'a rubutu ba, kuma Mu haɗa masu tambayi wanda aka haife shi na mutane da tambayi masu tsari wa masu tambayi. We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution.  Tajarakin na nuna cewa, firam da aka buƙata, yana sami mai kyau daga matsayin da ba'a rubutu ba.", 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem polnadzorovanega odgovarjanja na vprašanja – z uporabo neoznačenega besedila za povečanje učinkovitosti modelov odgovarjanja na vprašanja. Predlagamo nov okvir usposabljanja, generativne domensko prilagodljive mreže. V tem okviru usposabljamo generativni model za ustvarjanje vprašanj, ki temeljijo na neoznačenem besedilu, in združujemo vprašanja, ki nastanejo na modelih, z vprašanji, ki jih ustvarijo človek, za usposabljanje modelov odgovarjanja na vprašanja. Razvijamo nove domenske prilagoditvene algoritme, ki temeljijo na učenju ojačevanja, da bi zmanjšali razlike med distribucijo podatkov, ki jih ustvari model, in distribucijo podatkov, ki jih ustvari človek. Poskusi kažejo, da je naš predlagani okvir bistveno izboljšan zaradi neoznačenega besedila.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གི་མཐུན་སྤྱོད་མི་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་གོང་མཐུན ང་ཚོས་གསར་བ་ལྟ་སློང་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་ལ་བཟོ་སྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models. We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution. Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains a substantial improvement from unlabeled text.', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של השאלות חצי-מפקחות עונות-השימוש טקסט ללא סימנים כדי להעלות את ההופעה של דוגמנים לענות על שאלות. אנו מציעים מסגרת אימונים חדשה, רשתות המתאימות לתחום הגנרטיבי. In this framework, we train a generative model to generate questions based on the unlabeled text, and combine model-generated questions with human-generated questions for training question answering models.  We develop novel domain adaptation algorithms, based on reinforcement learning, to alleviate the discrepancy between the model-generated data distribution and the human-generated data distribution.  Experiments show that our proposed framework obtains substantial improvement from unlabeled text.'}
{'en': 'From Language to Programs : Bridging Reinforcement Learning and Maximum Marginal Likelihood', 'ar': 'من اللغة إلى البرامج: جسر التعلم المعزز والحد الأقصى من الاحتمالية الهامشية', 'fr': "De la langue aux programmes\xa0: faire le pont entre l'apprentissage par renforcement et la probabilité marginale maximale", 'es': 'Del idioma a los programas: unir el aprendizaje por refuerzo y la máxima probabilidad marginal', 'pt': 'Da linguagem aos programas: unindo o aprendizado por reforço e a probabilidade marginal máxima', 'zh': '自语至序:桥接强学至大端可性', 'ja': '言語からプログラムへ：強化学習と最大限界可能性の橋渡し', 'hi': 'भाषा से कार्यक्रमों तक: ब्रिजिंग सुदृढीकरण सीखने और अधिकतम सीमांत संभावना', 'ru': 'От языка к программам: наведение мостов в обучении подкреплению и максимальная маргинальная вероятность', 'ga': 'Ó Theanga go Cláir: Foghlaim Neartú Idirlinne agus Dóchúlacht Imeallach Uasta', 'ka': 'ენიდან პროგრამებისგან: სწავლობა და მაქსიმალური მარიგინალური შესაძლებლობა', 'el': 'Από τη γλώσσα στα προγράμματα: Γέφυρα της μάθησης ενίσχυσης και της μέγιστης περιθωριακής πιθανότητας', 'hu': 'A nyelvtől a programokig: a megerősített tanulás és a maximális marginális valószínűség áthidalása', 'it': "Dalla lingua ai programmi: collegare l'apprendimento di rinforzo e la massima probabilità marginale", 'kk': 'Тілден бағдарламаларға: Бриджинг оқыту мен максималды максималды максималды ықтималдық', 'mk': 'Од јазик до програми: Приближување на зајакнувањето на учењето и максималната маргинална веројатност', 'lt': 'Nuo kalbos iki programų: stiprinamojo mokymosi ir didžiausios ribos galimybės', 'ms': 'Dari Bahasa ke Program: Bridging Reinforcement Learning and Maximum Marginal Probability', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളിലേക്കു്: പുനരുത്ഥാന പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാര്\u200dഗി', 'mn': 'Холбоос Программын хүртэл: Бриджинг нэмэгдүүлэх суралцах, хамгийн их Marginal Likelihood', 'mt': 'Mill-Lingwa għall-Programmi: Bridging Reinforcement Learning u Maximum Marginal Likelihood', 'no': 'Frå språk til programmer: Læring og maksimum Marginal Likelihood', 'pl': 'Od języka do programów: pomost uczenia się wzmacniającego i maksymalnego prawdopodobieństwa marginalnego', 'sr': 'Od jezika do programa: Učenje pojačanja i maksimalno Marginalno Likelihood', 'ro': 'De la limbă la programe: punerea în legătură cu învățarea consolidată și probabilitatea maximă marginală', 'sv': 'Från språk till program: Att överbrygga förstärkt lärande och maximal marginal sannolikhet', 'ta': 'மொழியிலிருந்து நிரல்களுக்கு முதலில் இருந்து: பிரிட்டிங் மீண்டும் நிரல் கற்றல் மற்றும் அதிகபட்ச ச ச', 'so': 'Luqada ilaa barnaamijyada: Bridging Reinfrastructure Learning and Maximum Sharciga Muxal', 'si': 'භාෂාවෙන් වැඩසටහන් වෙනුවෙන්: බ්\u200dරිජින්ග් විශාලනය ඉගෙනගන්න සහ අඩුම් මාර්ජිනාල් ලික්ලි', 'ur': 'زبان سے پروگراموں تک: بریجینگ reinforcement Learning and Maximum Marginal Likelihood', 'uz': 'Tildan dasturga: Tahrirlash tuzuvchi va eng katta chegara moslamalari', 'vi': 'Từ ngôn ngữ đến chương trình: Cắt góp cho việc học tập tăng cường và khả năng cao nhất', 'bg': 'От езика към програмите: свързване на засиленото обучение и максимална маргинална вероятност', 'hr': 'Od jezika do programa: učenje pojačanja i najveća Marginalna vjerojatnost', 'de': 'Von der Sprache zum Programm: Verstärkungslernen und maximale Marginalwahrscheinlichkeit überbrücken', 'id': 'Dari Bahasa ke Program: Bridging Reinforcement Learning dan Maximum Marginal Probability', 'da': 'Fra sprog til programmer: Brydning af forstærket læring og maksimal marginal sandsynlighed', 'nl': "Van taal naar programma's: Versterkingsonderwijs overbruggen en maximale marginale waarschijnlijkheid", 'ko': '언어부터 프로그램까지: 연결 강화 학습과 최대 한계 가능성', 'fa': 'از زبان به برنامه\u200cها: آموزش یادگیری و maximal Marginal Likelihood', 'sw': 'Kutoka lugha hadi Mipango: Kufundisha Kufundisha Maendeleo na Uwezekano wa Kubwa', 'af': 'Van Taal na Programme: Bridging versterking Leer en Maksimum Marginal Likelihood', 'sq': 'Nga gjuha në programe: Mësimi i forcimit dhe mundësia maksimale kufitare', 'hy': 'Լեզուց մինչև ծրագրեր. ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրության և առավելագույն մարգինալ հավանականության միավորումը', 'tr': 'Dilden programlerden: Bridging Devamlanmak öwrenme we Maksimal Marginal Likelihood', 'az': 'Dildən Proqramlara: Bridging reinforcement Learning and Maximum Marginal Likelihood', 'am': 'ከቋንቋ ጀምሮ እስከ ፕሮግራም ድረስ: Briding Reinfrast Learn and maximum Marginal likelihood', 'bn': 'ভাষা থেকে প্রোগ্রাম থেকে: ব্রিডিং পুনর্গঠন শিক্ষা এবং সর্বোচ্চ মার্মিনেল সুযোগ', 'cs': 'Od jazyka k programům: překlenování posílení učení a maximální marginální pravděpodobnost', 'ca': 'Del llenguatge als programes: Bringing Reinforcement Learning and Maximum Marginal Likelihood', 'bs': 'Od jezika do programa: Učenje pojačanja i maksimalno Marginalno Likelihood', 'fi': 'Kielestä ohjelmiin: Vahvistamisen ja marginaalisen todennäköisyyden yhdistäminen', 'et': 'Keelest programmideni: tugevdatud õppimine ja maksimaalne marginaalne tõenäosus', 'jv': 'Sumulai Langan Program: Bukak nggawe Bukak Sistem Jejaring lan Makar Marjin Likelihood', 'ha': '@ action: button', 'sk': 'Od jezika do programov: povezovanje okrepitvenega učenja in največje mejne verjetnosti', 'he': 'משפה לתוכניות: גבירת לימוד חיבור וסיכוי גבוה מקסים', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་འགྲོ་བ། འཕྲོ་རིམ་ཆེ་བསུབ་ཀློག་ནི་དང་ཤོག་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤོས'}
{'en': 'Our goal is to learn a semantic parser that maps natural language utterances into executable programs when only indirect supervision is available : examples are labeled with the correct execution result, but not the program itself. Consequently, we must search the space of programs for those that output the correct result, while not being misled by spurious programs : incorrect programs that coincidentally output the correct result. We connect two common learning paradigms, reinforcement learning (RL) and maximum marginal likelihood (MML), and then present a new learning algorithm that combines the strengths of both. The new algorithm guards against spurious programs by combining the systematic search traditionally employed in MML with the randomized exploration of RL, and by updating parameters such that probability is spread more evenly across consistent programs. We apply our learning algorithm to a new neural semantic parser and show significant gains over existing state-of-the-art results on a recent context-dependent semantic parsing task.spurious programs: incorrect programs that coincidentally output the correct\n      result. We connect two common learning paradigms, reinforcement learning\n      (RL) and maximum marginal likelihood (MML), and then present a new\n      learning algorithm that combines the strengths of both. The new algorithm\n      guards against spurious programs by combining the systematic search\n      traditionally employed in MML with the randomized exploration of RL, and\n      by updating parameters such that probability is spread more evenly across\n      consistent programs. We apply our learning algorithm to a new neural\n      semantic parser and show significant gains over existing state-of-the-art\n      results on a recent context-dependent semantic parsing task.\n    ', 'ar': 'هدفنا هو تعلم المحلل الدلالي الذي يخطط لألفاظ اللغة الطبيعية في البرامج القابلة للتنفيذ عندما يكون الإشراف غير المباشر متاحًا فقط: يتم تسمية الأمثلة بنتيجة التنفيذ الصحيحة ، ولكن ليس البرنامج نفسه. وبالتالي ، يجب علينا البحث في مساحة البرامج عن تلك التي تُخرج النتيجة الصحيحة ، مع عدم تضليل البرامج الزائفة: البرامج غير الصحيحة التي تُخرج النتيجة الصحيحة بالصدفة. نقوم بتوصيل نموذجين شائعين للتعلم ، التعلم المعزز (RL) والاحتمال الهامشي الأقصى (MML) ، ثم نقدم خوارزمية تعلم جديدة تجمع بين نقاط القوة في كليهما. تحمي الخوارزمية الجديدة من البرامج الزائفة من خلال الجمع بين البحث المنهجي المستخدم تقليديًا في MML والاستكشاف العشوائي لـ RL ، وعن طريق تحديث المعلمات بحيث يتم توزيع الاحتمالية بشكل متساوٍ عبر البرامج المتسقة. نحن نطبق خوارزمية التعلم الخاصة بنا على محلل دلالي عصبي جديد ونظهر مكاسب كبيرة على أحدث النتائج الحالية في مهمة تحليل دلالي تعتمد على السياق.', 'fr': "Notre objectif est d'apprendre un analyseur sémantique qui mappe les énoncés du langage naturel dans des programmes exécutables lorsque seule la supervision indirecte est disponible\xa0: les exemples sont étiquetés avec le résultat d'exécution correct, mais pas le programme lui-même. Par conséquent, nous devons rechercher dans l'espace des programmes ceux qui produisent le bon résultat, sans être induits en erreur par des programmes faux\xa0: des programmes incorrects qui produisent par hasard le bon résultat. Nous relions deux paradigmes d'apprentissage communs, l'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) et le maximum de vraisemblance marginale (MML), puis présentons un nouvel algorithme d'apprentissage qui combine les forces des deux. Le nouvel algorithme protège contre les programmes parasites en combinant la recherche systématique traditionnellement utilisée dans le MML avec l'exploration aléatoire de RL, et en mettant à jour les paramètres de telle sorte que la probabilité soit répartie de manière plus uniforme entre les programmes cohérents. Nous appliquons notre algorithme d'apprentissage à un nouvel analyseur sémantique neuronal et montrons des gains significatifs par rapport aux résultats de pointe existants sur une tâche récente d'analyse sémantique dépendante du contexte.", 'es': 'Nuestro objetivo es aprender un analizador semántico que mapea las expresiones del lenguaje natural en programas ejecutables cuando solo está disponible la supervisión indirecta: los ejemplos se etiquetan con el resultado de ejecución correcto, pero no el programa en sí. En consecuencia, debemos buscar en el espacio de los programas aquellos que generen el resultado correcto, sin dejarnos engañar por programas espurios: programas incorrectos que coincidentemente generan el resultado correcto. Conectamos dos paradigmas de aprendizaje comunes, el aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) y la probabilidad marginal máxima (MML), y luego presentamos un nuevo algoritmo de aprendizaje que combina las fortalezas de ambos. El nuevo algoritmo protege contra programas falsos al combinar la búsqueda sistemática empleada tradicionalmente en MML con la exploración aleatoria de RL, y al actualizar los parámetros de manera que la probabilidad se distribuya de manera más uniforme entre los programas consistentes. Aplicamos nuestro algoritmo de aprendizaje a un nuevo analizador semántico neuronal y mostramos ganancias significativas con respecto a los resultados de última generación existentes en una tarea reciente de análisis semántico dependiente del contexto.', 'pt': 'Nosso objetivo é aprender um analisador semântico que mapeia enunciados de linguagem natural em programas executáveis quando apenas supervisão indireta está disponível: exemplos são rotulados com o resultado de execução correto, mas não o programa em si. Consequentemente, devemos procurar no espaço de programas aqueles que produzem o resultado correto, sem sermos enganados por programas espúrios: programas incorretos que coincidem com o resultado correto. Conectamos dois paradigmas de aprendizado comuns, aprendizado por reforço (RL) e probabilidade marginal máxima (MML) e, em seguida, apresentamos um novo algoritmo de aprendizado que combina os pontos fortes de ambos. O novo algoritmo protege contra programas espúrios combinando a busca sistemática tradicionalmente empregada em MML com a exploração aleatória de RL e atualizando parâmetros de forma que a probabilidade seja distribuída de forma mais uniforme em programas consistentes. Aplicamos nosso algoritmo de aprendizado a um novo analisador semântico neural e mostramos ganhos significativos sobre os resultados de última geração existentes em uma tarefa recente de análise semântica dependente do contexto.', 'ja': '私たちの目標は、間接監視のみが利用可能な場合に、自然言語の発話を実行可能なプログラムにマッピングするセマンティック構文解析器を学ぶことです。例には正しい実行結果がラベル付けされていますが、プログラム自体はラベル付けされていません。 したがって、誤ったプログラムに誘導されないように、正しい結果を出力するプログラムのスペースを探さなければなりません。誤ったプログラムは、偶然にも正しい結果を出力します。 強化学習（ RL ）と最大限界尤度（ MML ）という2つの共通の学習パラダイムを結びつけ、両者の強みを組み合わせた新しい学習アルゴリズムを提示する。 新しいアルゴリズムは、MMLで従来採用されてきた体系的な探索とRLのランダム化された探索を組み合わせることによって、および確率が一貫したプログラム全体でより均等に広がるようにパラメータを更新することによって、偽プログラムからガードします。 私たちは、学習アルゴリズムを新しいニューラルセマンティック構文解析器に適用し、最近の文脈依存のセマンティック構文解析タスクで既存の最先端の結果よりも大きな利得を示します。', 'zh': '吾徒学一语义解析器,当惟间接监可用时,映自然语言语于可执行程序中:示例标有是行,非程本也。 故须于序空中搜索其输正者,并不得为虚程所误:偶输正者误程。 以二常之学,化(RL)之大端似然(MML)接之,然后建一新学算法,合二者之势。 新算法以将MML旧统搜索与RL随机探索相合,并因更新参数以防虚程,使概率均布。 吾将学算法用于新神经语义解析器,而关于近上下文语义解析务出比见先进之益。', 'hi': 'हमारा लक्ष्य एक शब्दार्थ पार्सर सीखना है जो प्राकृतिक भाषा के उच्चारण को निष्पादन योग्य कार्यक्रमों में मैप करता है जब केवल अप्रत्यक्ष पर्यवेक्षण उपलब्ध होता है: उदाहरणों को सही निष्पादन परिणाम के साथ लेबल किया जाता है, लेकिन प्रोग्राम ही नहीं। नतीजतन, हमें उन लोगों के लिए कार्यक्रमों के स्थान की खोज करनी चाहिए जो सही परिणाम आउटपुट करते हैं, जबकि नकली कार्यक्रमों द्वारा गुमराह नहीं किया जा रहा है: गलत प्रोग्राम जो संयोग से सही परिणाम आउटपुट करते हैं। हम दो सामान्य सीखने के प्रतिमानों, सुदृढीकरण सीखने (आरएल) और अधिकतम सीमांत संभावना (एमएमएल) को जोड़ते हैं, और फिर एक नया सीखने का एल्गोरिथ्म प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो दोनों की ताकत को जोड़ता है। नया एल्गोरिथ्म आरएल के यादृच्छिक अन्वेषण के साथ पारंपरिक रूप से एमएमएल में नियोजित व्यवस्थित खोज के संयोजन से नकली कार्यक्रमों के खिलाफ गार्ड करता है, और पैरामीटर को अपडेट करके जैसे कि संभावना लगातार कार्यक्रमों में अधिक समान रूप से फैली हुई है। हम अपने सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म को एक नए तंत्रिका शब्दार्थ पार्सर पर लागू करते हैं और हाल ही में संदर्भ-निर्भर शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग कार्य पर मौजूदा राज्य-के-कला परिणामों पर महत्वपूर्ण लाभ दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Наша цель - выучить семантический синтаксический анализатор, который преобразует высказывания на естественном языке в исполняемые программы, когда доступен только косвенный надзор: примеры помечены правильным результатом выполнения, но не самой программой. Следовательно, мы должны искать в пространстве программ те, которые выводят правильный результат, не будучи введенными в заблуждение ложными программами: некорректные программы, которые случайно выводят правильный результат. Мы соединяем две общие парадигмы обучения, обучение подкреплению (RL) и максимальную предельную вероятность (MML), а затем представляем новый алгоритм обучения, который сочетает в себе сильные стороны обоих. Новый алгоритм защищает от ложных программ, сочетая систематический поиск, традиционно используемый в MML, с рандомизированным исследованием RL, и обновляя параметры таким образом, что вероятность распределяется более равномерно между согласованными программами. Мы применяем наш алгоритм обучения к новому нейронному семантическому парсеру и показываем значительные преимущества по сравнению с существующими современными результатами в недавней контекстно-зависимой семантической задаче синтаксического анализа.', 'ga': 'Is é an sprioc atá againn ná parsálaí shéimeantach a fhoghlaim a mhapálann cainte nádúrtha teanga isteach i gcláir inrite nuair nach mbíonn ach maoirseacht indíreach ar fáil: lipéadaítear samplaí leis an toradh ceart feidhmiúcháin, ach ní lipéadaítear an clár féin. Mar thoradh air sin, ní mór dúinn spás na gclár a chuardach dóibh siúd a thugann an toradh ceart, ach nach bhfuil cláir bhréagacha á gcur amú acu: cláir mhíchearta a thugann an toradh ceart ar bhealach comhtharlaitheach. Nascaimid dhá pharaidím foghlama coitianta, foghlaim athneartaithe (RL) agus dóchúlacht imeallach uasta (MML), agus ansin i láthair algartam foghlama nua a chomhcheanglaíonn láidreachtaí an dá cheann. Cosnaíonn an t-algartam nua cláir bhréagacha tríd an gcuardach córasach a úsáidtear go traidisiúnta in MML a chomhcheangal le hiniúchadh randamach ar RL, agus trí pharaiméadair a nuashonrú ionas go scaiptear an dóchúlacht ar bhealach níos cothroime thar chláir chomhsheasmhacha. Cuirimid ár n-algartam foghlama i bhfeidhm ar pharsálaí néarach shéimeantach nua agus léirímid gnóthachain shuntasacha thar na torthaí úrscothacha atá ann cheana féin ar thasc parsála séimeantach a bhraitheann ar an gcomhthéacs le déanaí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი მიზეზი არის სემონტიკური პანელექტორის შესწავლობა, რომელიც მომხმარებელი პროგრამებში ჩემს მომხმარებული მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ დანახვა:  შემდეგ, ჩვენ უნდა პროგრამების სივრცე ძებნა, რომლებიც მარტივი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი გამოყენებს, მაგრამ არ შეცდომა პროგრამებით: შეცდომა პროგრამები, რომლებიც შე ჩვენ შევკავშირებთ ორი საერთო სწავლების პარადიგმები, სწავლების სწავლება (RL) და მაქსიმალური მარტინალური შესაძლებლობა (MML) და შემდეგ ახალი სწავლების ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც ორივეს ძალიან ახალი ალგორიტიმის დახმარება სპროგრამების განმავლობაში, რომლებიც სისტემატიკური ძიება, რომლებიც MML-ში გამოყენებული სისტემატიკური ძიება, რომლებიც RL-ის გამოყენებული გამოყენება და პრამიტების განახლებით ჩვენ ჩვენი სწავლის ალგორიტიმას ახალი ნეიროლური სმენტიკური პანსორიზისთვის აყენებთ და გამოჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა შემდეგ შე', 'hu': 'Célunk egy olyan szemantikai elemző megtanulása, amely a természetes nyelvi kimondásokat futtatható programokba térképezi, amikor csak indirekt felügyelet áll rendelkezésre: a példákat a megfelelő végrehajtási eredménnyel jelöljük, de magát a programot nem. Következésképpen keresnünk kell a programok területét azoknak, akik a helyes eredményt adják ki, miközben nem tévesztenek hamis programok: helytelen programok, amelyek véletlenül a helyes eredményt adják ki. Két közös tanulási paradigmát, a megerősítő tanulást (RL) és a maximális marginális valószínűséget (MML) összekapcsoljuk, majd bemutatunk egy új tanulási algoritmust, amely kombinálja mindkettő erősségeit. Az új algoritmus védi a hamis programokat azzal, hogy kombinálja az MML-ben hagyományosan alkalmazott szisztematikus keresést az RL randomizált feltárásával, és frissíti a paramétereket, hogy a valószínűség egyenletesebb legyen a konzisztens programok között. Tanulási algoritmusunkat egy új neurális szemantikai elemzőre alkalmazzuk, és jelentős előnyöket mutatunk a meglévő korszerű eredményekhez képest egy közelmúltbeli kontextusfüggő szemantikai elemzési feladat során.', 'el': 'Στόχος μας είναι να μάθουμε έναν σημασιολογικό αναλυτή που χαρτογραφεί τις εκφράσεις φυσικής γλώσσας σε εκτελέσιμα προγράμματα όταν υπάρχει μόνο έμμεση εποπτεία: τα παραδείγματα επισημαίνονται με το σωστό αποτέλεσμα εκτέλεσης, αλλά όχι το ίδιο το πρόγραμμα. Κατά συνέπεια, πρέπει να ψάξουμε στο χώρο των προγραμμάτων για εκείνα που παράγουν το σωστό αποτέλεσμα, χωρίς να παραπλανηθούμε από ψεύτικα προγράμματα: λανθασμένα προγράμματα που τυχαία παράγουν το σωστό αποτέλεσμα. Συνδέουμε δύο κοινά μαθησιακά παραδείγματα, την ενισχυτική μάθηση (και τη μέγιστη περιθωριακή πιθανότητα) και στη συνέχεια παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο μαθησιακό αλγόριθμο που συνδυάζει τις δυνάμεις και των δύο. Ο νέος αλγόριθμος προστατεύει από ψεύτικα προγράμματα συνδυάζοντας τη συστηματική αναζήτηση που χρησιμοποιείται παραδοσιακά στην ΜΛ με την τυχαία εξερεύνηση της και ενημερώνοντας παραμέτρους έτσι ώστε η πιθανότητα να κατανέμεται πιο ομοιόμορφα σε σταθερά προγράμματα. Εφαρμόζουμε τον μαθησιακό αλγόριθμο μας σε ένα νέο νευρωνικό σημασιολογικό αναλυτή και εμφανίζουμε σημαντικά οφέλη σε σχέση με τα υπάρχοντα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε μια πρόσφατη εργασία σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης που εξαρτάται από το περιβάλλον.', 'kk': 'Біздің мақсатымыз - табиғи тіл сөздерін орындалатын бағдарламаларға орындалатын семантикалық талдаушыларды оқыту, тек тіркелген бағдарламалар бар болса - мысалдар дұрыс орындалатын нәтижесімен жазылады, бірақ бағ Сондықтан, біз бағдарламалардың нәтижесін дұрыс шығару үшін керек нәтижесін іздеу керек, бірақ дұрыс бағдарламалар дұрыс шығарылмаған: дұрыс нәтижесін шығару дұрыс бағдарламалар Біз екі жалпы оқыту парадигмін қосып, оқыту (RL) және шектелік мүмкіндігін қосып, екеуінің күштерін біріктіретін жаңа оқыту алгоритмін таңдаймыз. Жаңа алгоритм жұмыс бағдарламаларға қарсы жұмыс істейтін жүйелік іздеу кәдімгі жұмыс істеу арқылы MML- де кездейсоқ RL зерттеу арқылы жұмыс істейтін жүйелік іздеу жүйелігін біріктіріп, мәліметтер Біз оқыту алгоритімізді жаңа невралдық семантикалық талдаушыларға қолданып, жаңа контекстік тәуелді семантикалық талдау тапсырмасының күйінің нәтижесін көрсетедік.', 'it': "Il nostro obiettivo è quello di imparare un parser semantico che mappa le espressioni del linguaggio naturale in programmi eseguibili quando è disponibile solo la supervisione indiretta: gli esempi sono etichettati con il risultato di esecuzione corretto, ma non il programma stesso. Di conseguenza, dobbiamo cercare nello spazio dei programmi quelli che producono il risultato corretto, senza essere ingannati da programmi falsi: programmi errati che producono casualmente il risultato corretto. Colleghiamo due paradigmi di apprendimento comuni, l'apprendimento di rinforzo (RL) e la probabilità massima marginale (MML), e quindi presentiamo un nuovo algoritmo di apprendimento che combina i punti di forza di entrambi. Il nuovo algoritmo protegge da programmi falsi combinando la ricerca sistematica tradizionalmente utilizzata in MML con l'esplorazione randomizzata di RL, e aggiornando i parametri in modo tale che la probabilità sia distribuita in modo più uniforme tra programmi coerenti. Applichiamo il nostro algoritmo di apprendimento a un nuovo parser semantico neurale e mostriamo guadagni significativi rispetto ai risultati attuali allo stato dell'arte su un recente compito di analisi semantica dipendente dal contesto.", 'lt': 'Mūsų tikslas – išmokti semantinio analizatoriaus, kuris žemėlapizuoja gamtos kalbos išraiškas į vykdomąsias programas, kai yra tik netiesioginė priežiūra: pavyzdžiai paženklinti teisingu vykdymo rezultatu, bet ne pačia program a. Taigi turime ieškoti programų erdvės tiems, kurie duoda teisingą rezultatą, tačiau juos neklaidina nesąžiningos programos: netinkamos programos, kurios atsitiktinai duoda teisingą rezultatą. Sujungiame du bendrus mokymosi paradigmus: stiprinamąjį mokymąsi ir didžiausią ribinę tikimybę (angl. maximum marginal probability, angl. MML), o vėliau pateikiame naują mokymosi algoritmą, kuris sujungia abiejų sričių stiprumus. Naujas algoritmas apsaugo nuo neigiamų programų, derindamas sisteminę paiešką, tradiciškai naudojamą MML, su atsitiktinių imčių tyrimu RL, ir atnaujindamas tokius parametrus, kad tikimybė būtų vienodesnė vienodomis programoms. Mes taikome savo mokymosi algoritmą naujam neurologiniam semantiniam analizatoriui ir parodome didelę pažangą, palyginti su esamais naujausiais rezultatais neseniai atlikus nuo konteksto priklausomą semantinio analizavimo užduotį.', 'mk': 'Нашата цел е да научиме семантичен анализатор кој ги мапира изразите на природниот јазик во извршливи програми кога е достапно само индиректно надзор: примерите се означени со точниот резултат на извршувањето, но не со самата програма. Поради тоа, мораме да го пребаруваме просторот на програмите за оние кои го изведуваат вистинскиот резултат, а не да бидат измамени од непријатни програми: непријатни програми кои случајно го изведуваат вистинскиот резултат. We connect two common learning paradigms, reinforcement learning (RL) and maximum marginal likelihood (MML), and then present a new learning algorithm that combines the strengths of both.  Новите алгоритми се заштитуваат од незгодни програми преку комбинација на систематското пребарување традиционално употребено во MML со случајно експлоатација на RL, и преку оновременување на параметрите како што веројатноста е поеднакво ширена низ константните програми. Го применуваме нашиот алгоритм за учење на нов нервен семантичен анализатор и покажуваме значителни напредоци во однос на постоечките најдобри резултати на неодамнешната семантична анализа зависна од контекст.', 'ms': 'Tujuan kami adalah untuk belajar penghurai semantik yang memetakan ungkapan bahasa semulajadi ke dalam program boleh laksana bila hanya pengawasan langsung tersedia: contoh ditabel dengan hasil lakonan yang betul, tetapi bukan program sendiri. Oleh sebab itu, kita mesti mencari ruang program untuk orang yang mengeluarkan hasil yang betul, walaupun tidak disesatkan oleh program yang teruk: program yang salah yang secara kebetulan mengeluarkan hasil yang betul. Kami menyambungkan dua paradigma pembelajaran umum, pembelajaran kuasa (RL) dan kemungkinan maksimum marginal (MML), dan kemudian menghasilkan algoritma pembelajaran baru yang menggabungkan kekuatan kedua-dua. Algoritma baru menjaga terhadap program yang teruk dengan menggabungkan pencarian sistemik yang tradisional digunakan dalam MML dengan pengeksplorasi rawak RL, dan dengan mengemaskini parameter sehingga kemungkinan disebarkan secara lebih seimbang di seluruh program konsisten. Kami melaksanakan algoritma pembelajaran kami pada penghurai semantik saraf baru dan menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan atas keputusan state-of-the-art yang wujud pada tugas hurai semantik tergantung konteks baru-baru ini.', 'mt': 'L-għan tagħna huwa li nitgħallmu analizzatur semantiku li jimmappa l-espressjonijiet tal-lingwa naturali fi programmi eżekuttivi meta tkun disponibbli biss superviżjoni indiretta: eżempji jiġu ttikkettati bir-riżultat korrett tal-eżekuzzjoni, iżda mhux il-programm innifsu. Konsegwentement, irridu nfittxu l-ispazju tal-programmi għal dawk li joħorġu r-riżultat korrett, filwaqt li ma jkunux żgwidati minn programmi spurjużi: programmi żbaljati li b’mod konċidentali joħorġu r-riżultat korrett. Aħna nikkollegaw żewġ paradigmi komuni tat-tagħlim, it-tagħlim rinfurzat (RL) u l-probabbiltà marġinali massima (MML), u mbagħad nippreżentaw algoritmu ġdid tat-tagħlim li jgħaqqad il-qawwiet tat-tnejn. L-algoritmu l-ġdid iħares kontra programmi spurjużi billi jikkombina t-tiftix sistematiku tradizzjonalment użat fl-MML mal-esplorazzjoni każwali tal-RL, u billi jaġġorna parametri b’tali mod li l-probabbiltà tinfirex b’mod aktar ekwu fost programmi konsistenti. Aħna napplikaw l-algoritmu tat-tagħlim tagħna għal analizzatur semantiku newrali ġdid u nuru kisbiet sinifikanti fuq ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati eżistenti fuq kompitu semantiku riċenti dipendenti fuq il-kuntest.', 'mn': 'Бидний зорилго бол байгалийн хэл илтгэлийг хөдөлгөөнтэй програм руу зураг авч үзэх юм. Зөвхөн буруу удирдлага байх үед жишээ нь зөв үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүнтэй тэмдэглэгддэг, гэхдээ програм өөрөө биш. Үүнээс бид зөв үр дүнг гаргадаг хүмүүсийн программын орон зайг хайх хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ буруу программын хувьд буруу байхгүй: зөв үр дүнг гаргадаг буруу програм. Бид хоёр нийтлэг суралцах парадигм, суралцах ухаан (RL) болон хамгийн их хязгаарлагч магадлал (MML) холбогдож, дараа нь хоёр талын хүчтэй холбоотой шинэ суралцах алгоритм гаргадаг. Шинэ алгоритм нь MML-д хэрэглэгддэг систематик хайлтыг санамсаргүй RL-ын судалгаагаар хадгалаж, мөн ийм параметрлүүдийг шинэчлэхээр магадлал тогтвортой програм дээр илүү тэнцүү тархаж байна. Бид суралцах алгоритмыг шинэ мэдрэлийн семантик хуваалцагч дээр ашиглаж, саяхан нөхцөлд хамааралтай семантик хуваалцах ажил дээр суралцах үйл явдал дээр чухал ашиг үзүүлдэг.', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രോഗ്രാമങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളിലേക്ക് സ്വാഭാവികമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാണ്: ന അതുകൊണ്ട് പ്രോഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d വഴിപിഴപ്പിക്കപ്പെടാതിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ശരിയായ ഫലം പുറത്ത് വരുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് നമുക്ക് പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളുടെ സ്ഥലം തെരഞ്ഞ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പൊതുവായ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പാര്\u200dഡിഡിമുകളെ ബന്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെയും ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാര്\u200dഗിനലിന്\u200dറെ സാധ്യതകളെയും (എ പുതിയ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സംരക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ പരിപാടികള്\u200d എംഎംഎലില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റേറ്റിക് തെരച്ചില്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത നമ്മുടെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പുതിയ നെയൂറല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കലാകാ', 'pl': 'Naszym celem jest nauka parsera semantycznego, który mapuje wypowiedzi języka naturalnego do programów wykonywalnych, gdy dostępny jest tylko pośredni nadzór: przykłady są oznaczone poprawnym wynikiem wykonania, ale nie samym programem. W konsekwencji musimy przeszukać przestrzeń programów w poszukiwaniu tych, które wydają poprawny wynik, nie dając się wprowadzić w błąd przez fałszywe programy: niepoprawne programy, które przypadkowo wydają poprawny wynik. Łączymy dwa wspólne paradygmaty uczenia się, uczenie wzmacniające (RL) i maksymalne marginalne prawdopodobieństwo (MML), a następnie przedstawiamy nowy algorytm uczenia się, który łączy mocne strony obu. Nowy algorytm chroni przed fałszywymi programami, łącząc systematyczne wyszukiwanie tradycyjnie stosowane w MML z randomizowaną eksploracją RL oraz aktualizując parametry takie, aby prawdopodobieństwo było bardziej równomiernie rozłożone na spójne programy. Stosujemy nasz algorytm uczenia się do nowego neuronowego parsera semantycznego i pokazujemy znaczące korzyści w stosunku do istniejących wyników najnowszego zadania parsowania semantycznego zależnego od kontekstu.', 'no': 'Målet vårt er å lære eit semantisk tolkar som karterer naturspråk- uttrykk i køyrbare program når berre indirekte oversikt er tilgjengeleg: eksemplar er merket med den rette køyringsflate, men ikkje programmet sjølv. I tillegg må vi søkja mellomrom på programmer for dei som utgår det rette resultatet, mens ikkje er mislukka av spurre program: feil program som utgår det rette resultatet tilfeldig. Vi koplar to felles læringsparadigm, reinforcementlæring (RL) og maksimal marginal sannsynlighet (MML), og så presenterer ein ny læringsalgoritme som kombinerer styrkene på begge. Den nye algoritmen garar mot spurre program ved å kombinere systemet søk tradisjonell arbeidt i MML med tilfeldige utforsking av RL, og ved å oppdatera parametrar slik at sannsynligheten blir sprett meir like over konsistent program. Vi bruker læringsalgoritmen vårt til ein ny neuralsemantisk tolkar og viser signifikante forskjeller over eksisterande tilstand av kunsten på ein nyleg kontekstavhengig semantisk tolking oppgåve.', 'sr': 'Naš cilj je naučiti semantički analitičar koji mapira prirodne jezičke reči u programe koje mogu izvršiti kada je dostupno samo indirektna nadzor: primjeri su označeni ispravnim rezultatom izvršenja, ali ne samim programom. Stoga, moramo pretražiti prostor programa za one koji izlaze ispravan rezultat, dok se ne pogrešni programi: nepravedni programi koji slučajno izlaze ispravan rezultat. Mi povezujemo dve zajedničke paradigme učenja, učenje pojačanja (RL) i maksimalnu marginalnu verovatnost (MML), i onda predstavljamo novi algoritam učenja koji kombinuje snage oboje. Novi algoritam čuva protiv spurnih programa kombinirajući sistematsku potragu tradicionalno zaposlenu u MML-u sa randomizovanom istraživanjem RL-a, i aktualizajući parametre takve da se verovatnoća širi jednako u konsekventnim programima. Primjenjujemo naš algoritam učenja na novog neurosemantičkog analizatora i pokazujemo značajne dobitke na postojećim rezultatima stanja umjetnosti na nedavnom zadatku semantičkog analizatora ovisnom o kontekstu.', 'ro': 'Scopul nostru este de a învăța un parser semantic care cartografiază expresiile limbajului natural în programe executabile atunci când este disponibilă doar supravegherea indirectă: exemplele sunt etichetate cu rezultatul execuției corecte, dar nu și programul în sine. În consecință, trebuie să căutăm în spațiul programelor pentru cei care dau rezultatul corect, fără a fi induși în eroare de programe false: programe incorecte care dau coincidență rezultatul corect. Conectăm două paradigme comune de învățare, învățarea de armare (RL) și probabilitatea marginală maximă (MML), și apoi prezentăm un nou algoritm de învățare care combină punctele forte ale ambelor. Noul algoritm protejează împotriva programelor false prin combinarea căutării sistematice utilizate în mod tradițional în MML cu explorarea randomizată a RL și prin actualizarea parametrilor astfel încât probabilitatea să fie răspândită mai uniform în programele coerente. Aplicăm algoritmul nostru de învățare la un nou parser semantic neural și arătăm câștiguri semnificative față de rezultatele de ultimă generație existente pe o sarcină recentă de analizare semantică dependentă de context.', 'so': "Ujeedkeennu waa in la barto qoraal saxda ah oo ku sawiraa hadalka afka asalka ah oo lagu sameeyo barnaamijyo la sameeyo marka la helo ilaalinta si toos ah oo kaliya: tusaalayaal waxaa lagu qoraa resultada la soo dejiyo saxda, laakiin barnaamijku qudhiisa ma aha. Sababtaas darteed waa inaannu raadinnaa booska kuwa soo saara resultinta saxda ah, iyadoo aan lagu khiyaanayn barnaamijyo dhaqdhaqaaqa ah: barnaamijyo khalad ah oo marka lagu jiro soo bixinaya midhihiisa saxda ah. Waxaynu xidhiidhinnaa laba iskuul oo caadiga ah, horumarinta waxbarashada (RL) iyo suurtagalka ugu badnaanta (MML), kadibna waxaynu soo bandhignaa qoraal cusub oo waxbarashada oo isku xiran xoogga labadooda. Qoraamihii cusub waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa baaritaanka habaarka ah ee MML iyo baaritaanka RL oo la soo bandhigi karo iyo soo kordhiya parameters sida suurtagalka ah si ugu dhaqdhaqaaqa loo kala firdhiyo barnaamijyada oo dhan. Waxaynu qoraalkayaga waxbarashada ugu soo bandhignaa qayb cusub oo neurada ah, waxaana muujinnaa faa'iido badan oo ku saabsan arimaha baarlamaanka ee xaaladda-farshaxanka.", 'si': 'අපේ අරමුණ තමයි සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂකය ඉගෙන ගන්න, ස්වාභාවික භාෂා කිරීමට ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් විතරයි: උද ඉතින්, අපි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරද අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ඉගෙනගන්න පාර්ඩිග්ම් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, උදව්වන්න ඉගෙනගන්න (RL) සහ විශේෂ මාර්ජික ප්\u200dරමාණය (MML), ඊට පස්සේ අල අළුත් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ආරක්ෂක විරුද්ධ වැඩසටහන් විරුද්ධ වැඩසටහන් විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂක වැඩසටහන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් MML අපි අපේ ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම්ව අලුත් න්\u200dයූරාල් සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම තියෙන්න තියෙන ස්ථානයේ අ', 'sv': 'Vårt mål är att lära oss en semantisk parser som kartlägger naturliga språkuttryck i körbara program när endast indirekt övervakning är tillgänglig: exempel märks med rätt exekveringsresultat, men inte själva programmet. Följaktligen måste vi söka i programutrymmet för dem som ger rätt resultat, utan att bli vilseledda av falska program: felaktiga program som slumpmässigt ger rätt resultat. Vi kopplar ihop två gemensamma lärparadigm, förstärkt lärande (RL) och maximal marginalsannolikhet (MML), och presenterar sedan en ny inlärningsalgoritm som kombinerar styrkorna hos båda. Den nya algoritmen skyddar mot falska program genom att kombinera den systematiska sökning som traditionellt används i MML med randomiserad utforskning av RL, och genom att uppdatera parametrar så att sannolikheten fördelas mer jämnt över konsekventa program. Vi tillämpar vår inlärningsalgoritm på en ny neural semantisk parser och visar betydande vinster jämfört med befintliga state-of-the-art resultat på en nyligen sammanhangsberoende semantisk parsning uppgift.', 'ta': 'எங்கள் இலக்கு ஒரு பெம்மான்டிக் பரிசோதனையை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்காகும், அது இயல்பான மொழியின் சொல்லை செயல்படுத்தும் நிரல்களில் மட்டும் சுட்டி கண்க அதனால், நாம் நிரல்களின் இடைவெளியில் சரியான முடிவை வெளியிடுபவர்களுக்காக தேட வேண்டும், பிரச்சனையான நிரல்களால் வழி கெடுக்கப்படாமல் இருக்க வ We connect two common learning paradigms, reinforcement learning (RL) and maximum marginal likelihood (MML), and then present a new learning algorithm that combines the strengths of both.  எம்எம்எலில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமையான தேடு பாதுகாப்புகளை சேர்க்கும் புதிய ஆல்பரிட்டம் பாதுகாப்பாளர்கள் மற்றும் குறிப்பிடாத பரிமாணங்களை புதிதாக்குதல்  நாங்கள் எங்கள் கற்றுக் கொடுக்கும் கலைப்புகளை புதிய புதிய பெமான்டிக் பரிசோதனைக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் தற்போதைய நிலையில் இருக்கும் ந', 'ur': 'ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ ایک سیمنٹی پارچر سیکھنا ہے جو طبیعی زبان کلمات کو چلنے والی پروگراموں میں مکاپ کرتا ہے جب صرف غلط نظر حاصل ہوتی ہے: مثالیں ٹھیک چلنے والی نتیجہ کے ساتھ لکھی جاتی ہیں لیکن پروگرام خود نہیں۔ اس کے نتیجے میں، ہمیں ان لوگوں کے لئے پروگراموں کی جگہ تلاش کرنا چاہیے جنہوں نے سمجھا نتیجہ اخراج کیا ہے، حالانکہ ان کے لئے غلطی پروگراموں کے ذریعے غلطی نہیں کی جاتی: غلطی پروگراموں کی جگہ جو غلطی نتیجہ کو ہم دو مشترک تعلیم پاراڈیگم کو متصل کرتے ہیں، مضبوط تعلیم (RL) اور سب سے زیادہ محدودیت (MML) اور پھر ایک نوی تعلیم الگوریتم کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو دونوں کی قوت کو متصل کرتا ہے۔ نیا الگوریٹم غلط پروگراموں کے خلاف نگہبانی کرتا ہے کہ MML میں غلط طریقے سے کامل ہونے والی سیستماتیک جستجوں کو اتصال کرتا ہے اور پارامیٹروں کو اتصال کرنے کے ذریعہ اس طرح کہ شانس قائم پروگراموں میں زیادہ برابر پھیلا جاتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے سیکھنے الگوریتم کو ایک نئورل سیمنٹی پارچر پر لازم کریں اور ایک اچھی کنٹنس-مستقل سیمنٹی پارچر کے کام پر موجود موجود state-of-the-art نتیجے پر اضافہ اضافہ کریں۔', 'uz': "Bizning maqsadimiz semantik parameterni o'rganish, asl tilning so'zlarini boshqarish dasturlariga qaraydi, faqat faqat indik taʼminlovchi mavjud boʻlsa. Masalan to ʻgʻri bajarish natijasi bilan yoziladi, lekin dastur quyidagi narsa emas. Shunday qilib, biz toʻgʻri natijaga chiqaradigan dasturlarning joyini qidirish kerak, balki kichik dasturlar yoʻqolishi mumkin: notoʻgʻri dastur toʻgʻri natijaga chiqaradi. Biz ikkita oddiy o'rganish paradotlarni bog'lash, ta'limni oshirish (RL) va maksimal o'rganish imkoniyatlarini (MML) qo'shish va keyin ikkita ta'lim algorithini birlashtiramiz, bu ikkita ta'lim nuqtlarini birlashtiradi. @ info Biz o'rganish algorithimizni yangi neyrolik semantik parameterga qo'llayapmiz va yangi xil tarkibi holatida, yangi qismiga ishlatadigan semantik parsing vazifasida juda muhim muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Mục tiêu của chúng ta là học một phân tích ngữ nghĩa mà bản đồ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên vào chương trình thực thi khi chỉ có sự giám sát trực tiếp tồn tại: ví dụ được đánh dấu với kết quả thực hiện chính xác, nhưng không phải chương trình. Do đó, chúng ta phải tìm kiếm không gian của các chương trình cho những người sản xuất đúng kết quả, trong khi không bị lừa dối bởi những chương trình giả tạo: những chương trình sai lầm ngẫu nhiên kết quả đúng. Chúng ta kết nối hai hệ lý thuyết học chung, phát triển học gia tăng (RL) và mức đoán phụ tối đa (MML) và sau đó tạo ra một thuật toán học mới kết hợp các điểm mạnh của cả hai. Thuật toán mới bảo vệ chống lại những chương trình giả tạo bằng cách kết hợp kết hợp các tìm kiếm có hệ thống theo truyền thống ở MML với việc dò tìm RL ngẫu nhiên, và bằng việc cập nhật các thông số khả năng xác suất được chia đều nhau. Chúng tôi áp dụng thuật to án học của mình vào một vị cha phân tích màu nhiệm mới, và cho thấy những lợi ích quan trọng trên kết quả hiện đại của thời trang nhờ vào một nhiệm vụ phân tích ngữ cảnh phụ thuộc gần đây.', 'bg': 'Нашата цел е да научим семантичен анализатор, който картографира речите на естествения език в изпълними програми, когато е налице само индиректен надзор: примерите са етикетирани с правилния резултат на изпълнение, но не и самата програма. Следователно, ние трябва да търсим пространството на програмите за тези, които извеждат правилния резултат, без да бъдем подведени от фалшиви програми: неправилни програми, които случайно извеждат правилния резултат. Свързваме две общи учебни парадигми, подсилващо обучение (РС) и максимална маргинална вероятност (ММЛ), и след това представяме нов учебни алгоритъм, който съчетава силните страни и на двете. Новият алгоритъм предпазва от фалшиви програми, като комбинира систематичното търсене, традиционно използвано в ММЛ, с рандомизираното проучване на РЛ и актуализира параметрите, така че вероятността да бъде разпределена по-равномерно между последователните програми. Ние прилагаме нашия алгоритъм за учене към нов неврален семантичен анализатор и показваме значителни ползи от съществуващите най-съвременни резултати при скорошна задача за семантично анализиране, зависеща от контекста.', 'nl': "Ons doel is om een semantische parser te leren die natuurlijke taaluitingen in uitvoerbare programma's in kaart brengt wanneer alleen indirecte supervisie beschikbaar is: voorbeelden worden gelabeld met het juiste uitvoeringsresultaat, maar niet het programma zelf. Bijgevolg moeten we de ruimte van programma's doorzoeken naar degenen die het juiste resultaat geven, terwijl we niet misleid worden door valse programma's: onjuiste programma's die toevallig het juiste resultaat geven. We verbinden twee gemeenschappelijke leerparadigma's, versterking learning (RL) en maximale marginale waarschijnlijkheid (MML), en presenteren vervolgens een nieuw leeralgoritme dat de sterke punten van beide combineert. Het nieuwe algoritme beschermt tegen valse programma's door de systematische zoektocht die traditioneel wordt gebruikt in MML te combineren met de gerandomiseerde verkenning van RL, en door parameters zodanig bij te werken dat de waarschijnlijkheid gelijkmatiger wordt verdeeld over consistente programma's. We passen ons leeralgoritme toe op een nieuwe neurale semantische parser en tonen significante voordelen ten opzichte van bestaande state-of-the-art resultaten op een recente context-afhankelijke semantische parser taak.", 'da': 'Vores mål er at lære en semantisk fortolker, der kortlægger naturlige sprogudtalelser i eksekverbare programmer, når kun indirekte overvågning er tilgængelig: Eksempler er mærket med det korrekte udførelsesresultat, men ikke selve programmet. Derfor må vi søge i pladsen af programmer for dem, der udsender det korrekte resultat, uden at blive vildledt af falske programmer: forkerte programmer, der tilfældigvis udsender det korrekte resultat. Vi forbinder to fælles læringsparadigmer, armering learning (RL) og maksimal marginal sandsynlighed (MML), og præsenterer derefter en ny læringsalgoritme, der kombinerer styrkerne ved begge dele. Den nye algoritme beskytter mod falske programmer ved at kombinere den systematiske søgning, der traditionelt anvendes i MML, med den randomiserede udforskning af RL, og ved at opdatere parametre, så sandsynligheden fordeles mere jævnt på tværs af konsekvente programmer. Vi anvender vores læringsalgoritme til en ny neural semantisk parser og viser betydelige gevinster i forhold til eksisterende state-of-the-art resultater på en nylig kontekst-afhængig semantisk parsing opgave.', 'de': 'Unser Ziel ist es, einen semantischen Parser zu erlernen, der natürliche Sprachäußerungen in ausführbare Programme abbildet, wenn nur indirekte Überwachung verfügbar ist: Beispiele werden mit dem richtigen Ausführungsergebnis markiert, aber nicht das Programm selbst. Folglich müssen wir den Raum von Programmen nach denen durchsuchen, die das richtige Ergebnis ausgeben, ohne von falschen Programmen irregeführt zu werden: falsche Programme, die zufällig das richtige Ergebnis ausgeben. Wir verbinden zwei gängige Lernparadigmen, Reinforcement Learning (RL) und Maximum Marginal Likelihood (MML), und stellen dann einen neuen Lernalgorithmus vor, der die Stärken beider Ansätze kombiniert. Der neue Algorithmus schützt vor gefälschten Programmen, indem er die systematische Suche, die traditionell in MML verwendet wird, mit der randomisierten Exploration von RL kombiniert und Parameter so aktualisiert, dass die Wahrscheinlichkeit gleichmäßiger über konsistente Programme verteilt wird. Wir wenden unseren Lernalgorithmus auf einen neuen neuronalen semantischen Parser an und zeigen signifikante Vorteile gegenüber bestehenden State-of-the-Art Ergebnissen einer aktuellen kontextabhängigen semantischen Parsing-Aufgabe.', 'hr': 'Naš cilj je naučiti semantički pretraživač koji mapira prirodne jezičke izraze u programe za izvršenje kada je dostupno samo indirektna nadzor: primjeri su označeni s ispravnim rezultatom izvršenja, ali ne samim programom. Stoga moramo pretražiti prostor programa za one koji izlaze ispravan rezultat, dok ne pogrešni programi: nepravedni programi koji slučajno izlaze ispravan rezultat. Mi povezujemo dvije zajedničke paradigme učenja, učenje pojačanja (RL) i maksimalnu marginalnu vjerojatnost (MML), a onda predstavljamo novi algoritam učenja koji kombinira snagu oboje. Novi algoritam čuva protiv spurnih programa kombinirajući sistematsku pretragu tradicionalno zaposlenu u MML-u s randomizovanom istraživanjem RL-a, i aktualizirajući parametre takve da se vjerojatnost širi jednako u konsekventim programima. Primjenjujemo naš algoritam učenja na novi neurosemantički analizač i pokazujemo značajne dobitke nad postojećim rezultatima stanja umjetnosti na nedavnom zadatku semantičkog analizanja ovisnom o kontekstu.', 'id': 'Tujuan kita adalah untuk belajar parser semantis yang memetakan ungkapan bahasa alam ke dalam program yang dapat dilaksanakan ketika hanya pengawasan indirekt tersedia: contoh-contoh ditabel dengan hasil eksekusi yang benar, tetapi bukan program sendiri. Oleh karena itu, kita harus mencari ruang program untuk orang-orang yang mengeluarkan hasil yang benar, sementara tidak disesatkan oleh program-program yang menyebalkan: program yang salah yang secara kebetulan mengeluarkan hasil yang benar. Kita menghubungkan dua paradigma belajar umum, pemerintahan belajar (RL) dan kemungkinan maksimum marginal (MML), dan kemudian mempersembahkan algoritma belajar baru yang menggabungkan kekuatan keduanya. Algoritma baru menjaga terhadap program yang mengganggu dengan menggabungkan pencarian sistematis yang tradisional digunakan di MML dengan eksplorasi RL secara acak, dan dengan memperbaharui parameter sehingga kemungkinan tersebar lebih evenly di seluruh program konsisten. Kami menerapkan algoritma belajar kami pada parser semantis saraf baru dan menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan atas hasil state-of-the-art yang ada pada tugas parsing semantis tergantung konteks baru-baru ini.', 'ko': '우리의 목표는 간접 감독만 사용할 수 있을 때 자연 언어 문장을 실행 가능한 프로그램에 비추는 의미 해석기를 배우는 것이다. 예시를 프로그램 자체가 아니라 정확한 실행 결과로 표시하는 것이다.따라서 우리는 프로그램 공간에서 정확한 결과를 출력하는 프로그램을 검색해야 하며, 허위 프로그램에 의해 오도되지 말아야 한다. 오류 프로그램은 공교롭게도 정확한 결과를 출력한다.우리는 두 가지 흔히 볼 수 있는 학습 모델인 강화학습(RL)과 최대한계유사(MML)을 연결한 다음에 새로운 학습 알고리즘을 제시하여 이들의 장점을 결합시켰다.새로운 알고리즘은 MML의 전통적인 시스템 검색과 RL의 무작위 검색을 결합시키고 파라미터를 업데이트하여 확률을 일치성 프로그램에 더욱 고르게 분포시켜 허위 프로그램을 방지한다.우리는 우리의 학습 알고리즘을 새로운 신경 의미 분석기에 응용하고 최근의 상하문 관련 의미 분석기 임무에서 기존의 최신 결과보다 현저한 개선을 나타낼 것이다.', 'sw': 'Lengo letu ni kujifunza mchambuzi wa lugha ya asili ambalo huramani maneno ya lugha ya asili katika programu za kutekelezwa wakati tu utangalizi wa moja kwa moja: mifano imeonyesha matokeo sahihi ya utekelezaji, lakini sio programu yenyewe. Kwa hiyo, ni lazima tutafuta nafasi ya programu kwa wale ambao wanatoa matokeo sahihi, wakati hatujapotezwa na programu zisizo sahihi: programu zisizo sahihi ambazo kwa wakati mwingine hutoa matokeo sahihi. Tunaweza kuunganisha vifaa viwili vya kujifunza kwa kawaida, kuimarisha elimu (RL) na uwezekano wa kiwango kikubwa (MML), na kisha kuweka wimbo mpya wa kujifunza kinachounganisha nguvu za wote. The new algorithm guards against spurious programs by combining the systematic search traditionally employed in MML with the randomized exploration of RL, and by updating parameters such that probability is spread more evenly across consistent programs.  Tunatumia algorithi yetu ya kujifunza kwa mchambuzi mpya wa sekta ya neura na kuonyesha mafanikio makubwa juu ya matokeo yanayotokana na hali ya sanaa juu ya kazi ya uchambuzi wa kimapenzi inayotegemea kwa muktadha wa karibuni.', 'tr': "Biziň maksadymyz, semantik tansçylary öwrenmek üçin tebigy dil sözlerini diňe diňe netijeli gözetleýän programlara görkezip bolýar: örnekler dogry işleýän netijesi bilen etilýärler, ýöne programyň özi däl. Şol sebäpli, biz programlaryň netijesi dogry netijesi netijesi netijesi ýok bolanlar üçin gözlemeli bolmaly, çünki ters bolan programlar däl nädogry netijesi boşarylýar. Biz iki orta öwrenmek paradigmany baglaşdyrýarys, öwrenmek (RL) we maksimum marginal mümkinçilik (MML) we soňra ikisiniň güçlerini birleştirilýän täze öwrenme algoritmini çykarýarys. Täze bir algoritm garaşýar MML'de sistematik arama düzenli işleýän sistematik arama sistemini tertibleyerek, RL'i tesirlenýän araştyrmalary bilen we olaryň önümlerini täze bir şekilde üýtgedip duran programlarda üýtgedir. Biz öwrenmek algoritmümüzü täze bir näyral semantik täzeleçine uygulapdyrys we ol bar durumda möhüm möhüm sanat netijesinde häzirki semantik täzeleýän netijesinde möhüm gazanýarys.", 'fa': 'هدف ما این است که یک بازیگر semantic را یاد بگیریم که کلمات زبان طبیعی را در برنامه\u200cهای اجرای قابل اجرایی نقشه می\u200cدهد، وقتی فقط بررسی غیرمستقیم موجود باشد: مثالها با نتیجه اجرای درست علامت زده می\u200cشوند، اما نه برنامه خود. بنابراین ما باید فضای برنامه\u200cها را برای کسانی که نتیجه درست را خروج می\u200cکنند جستجو کنیم، در حالی که توسط برنامه\u200cهای غلط نیستند: برنامه\u200cهای غلط که به طور اتفاقی نتیجه درست را خروج می\u200cکنند. ما دو پارادیگ یادگیری مشترک را ارتباط می\u200cدهیم، یادگیری افزایش (RL) و احتمال محدودیت محدودیت (MML) و بعد الگوریتم یادگیری جدید را نشان می\u200cدهیم که قدرت هر دو را ترکیب می\u200cکند. الگوریتم جدید محافظت کند در مقابل برنامه های شکسته با ترکیب جستجوی سیستماتی که به طور سنتی در MML استخدام می شود با جستجوی تصادفی RL، و با جستجوی پارامترانی که احتمالات به طور مساوی در برنامه های موجود پخش می شود. ما الگوریتم یادگیری خود را به یک تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی سیمانتیک عصبی جدید تفاوت می\u200cکنیم و به نتیجه\u200cهای موجود در حالت\u200cهای هنر در یک کار تجزیه\u200cی سیمانتیک بستگی به محیط اخیر نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'am': 'ጉዳያችን የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን ለመፍጠር ፕሮግራም ማርቀው ነው፤ ጉዳዩ ለጥቅቅ ጉዳይ ብቻ ሲኖር ነው፤ ምሳሌዎች በተግባር ውጤት ይታያል ነገር ግን ፕሮግራሙ ራሱ አይደለም። ስለዚህ የፕሮግራሙን ቦታ ለመፈለግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ሁለትን የትምህርት ተማሪ ተማሪ ተግባር እናበረታታለን (RL) እና መተማርነትን እናበረታታለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የሁለቱን ኃይልን የሚያጋልጥ አዲስ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናቀርባለን፡፡ አዲስ አልgorithም ፕሮግራሞቹን በተለየ የMML ውስጥ በተለየው የስርዓት መረጃ በተለየ እና RL በማጠቃለያቸው እና እንደዚህ በሙሉ ፕሮግራሞቹ ላይ በተለየ አዲስ ምርጫዎች በማሻሻሻል አዲስ አቋራጭ ይጠብቃሉ፡፡ ትምህርታችንን መግለጫ በአዲስ የናውሬል ሰሜናዊ ተማሪ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የ-art ፍጥረቶችን በመቀናኛውም የsemantic ማኅበረሰብ ስራ ላይ የሚያሳየው ትልቅ ግንኙነት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Մեր նպատակն է սովորել սեմանտիկ վերլուծում, որը քարտեզագրում է բնական լեզվի արտահայտությունները իրականացվող ծրագրերի մեջ, երբ հասանելի է միայն անուղղակի վերահսկողություն: օրինակները նշանված են ճիշտ իրականացման արդյունքով, բայց ոչ հենց ծրագիրը: Consequently, we must search the space of programs for those that output the correct result, while not being misled by spurious programs: incorrect programs that coincidentally output the correct result.  Մենք միացնում ենք երկու ընդհանուր ուսուցման պարադիգմեր' ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրություն (RL) և մեծագույն սահմանափակ հավանականություն (ՄՄL), և ապա ներկայացնում ենք նոր ուսուցման ալգորիթմ, որը միավորում է երկուսի ուժեղությունները: The new algorithm guards against spurious programs by combining the systematic search traditionally employed in MML with the randomized exploration of RL, and by updating parameters such that probability is spread more evenly across consistent programs.  Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր ուսուցման ալգորիթմը նոր նյարդային սեմանտիկ վերլուծում և ցույց ենք տալիս նշանակալի շահույթներ գոյություն ունեցող ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքների վրա վերջերս կախված կոնտեքստից սեմանտիկ վերլուծում:", 'af': "Ons doel is om 'n semantiese ontleerder te leer wat die natuurlike taal uitspraak in uitvoerbare programme kaart wanneer slegs indirekte supervisie beskikbaar is: voorbeelde word etiket gemaak met die korrekte uitvoering resultaat, maar nie die program self. Ons moet daarom die ruimte van programme soek vir die wat die korrekte resultaat uitvoer, terwyl nie verkeerd word deur spurious programme: verkeerde programme wat die korrekte resultaat afvoer nie. Ons verbind twee gemeenskaplike leer paradigme, versterking leer (RL) en maksimum marjinale waarskynlik (MML), en dan voorsien 'n nuwe leer algoritme wat die sterkte van beide kombinieer. Die nuwe algoritme wag teen spurious programme deur die sistematiese soektog wat tradisioneel in MML gebruik is met die randomiseerde oorskryfing van RL, en deur die opdatering van parameters sodat waarskynlik meer eenvoudig versprei word oor konsistente programme. Ons wend ons leer algoritme aan 'n nuwe neurale semantiese ontleerder toe en wys betekende verkrywings oor bestaande staat-van-die-kuns resultate op 'n onlangse konteks-afhanklike semantiese verwerking taak.", 'az': "Bizim məqsədimiz, təbiətli dil sözlərini icra edilə biləcək proqramlara xəritələndirən semantik ayırıcı öyrənməkdir: yalnız indir gözləmək faydalanır: məsəllər doğru icra etdiyim sonuçları ilə etiketlənir, amma proqramın özü deyildir. Beləliklə, düzgün sonuç çıxaranlar üçün proqramların yer araması lazımdır, çünki səhv proqramlar tarafından yanlış deyil: doğru sonuç çıxaran yanlış proqramlar. Biz iki ortaq öyrənmə paradigmi bağlayırıq, öyrənmə gücünü birləşdirən yeni öyrənmə algoritmi ilə birləşdiririk. Yeni algoritm mühafizə proqramlarına qarşı sistematik araştırmalarını MML'də təhsil edilmiş RL araştırması ilə birləşdirən və böyük mümkün olan parametrləri yeniləşdirərək müəyyən edilən proqramlar arasında daha düzgün yayılır. Biz öyrənmək algoritmümüzü yeni nöral semantik ayırıcıya uygulayıq və yeni kontekst bağlı semantik ayırış işlərində mövcud qənimətlər göstəririk.", 'sq': 'Qëllimi ynë është të mësojmë një analizues semantik që harton shprehjet e gjuhës natyrore në programe të zbatueshme kur vetëm mbikqyrje indirekte është në dispozicion: shembujt janë etiketuar me rezultatin e saktë të ekzekutimit, por jo vetë programi. Për shkak të kësaj, ne duhet të kërkojmë hapësirën e programeve për ata që nxjerrin rezultatin e saktë, duke mos u mashtruar nga programe të përçara: programe të gabuara që rastësisht nxjerrin rezultatin e saktë. We connect two common learning paradigms, reinforcement learning (RL) and maximum marginal likelihood (MML), and then present a new learning algorithm that combines the strengths of both.  Algoritmi i ri mbron kundër programeve të përçara duke kombinuar kërkimin sistematik tradicionalisht të përdorur në MML me eksplorimin e rastësizuar të RL dhe duke përditësuar parametrat e tilla që probabiliteti të shpërndahet në mënyrë më të barabartë nëpër programe konsistente. Ne aplikojmë algoritmin tonë të mësimit në një analizues të ri semantik nervor dhe tregojmë fitime të rëndësishme mbi rezultatet ekzistuese të larta në një detyrë të fundit të analizimit semantik të varur nga konteksti.', 'bn': 'আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি সেমেন্টিক বিশ্লেষক শিখতে যাচ্ছে যা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কথাবার্তা প্রোগ্রামে মানচিত্র করে যখন শুধুমাত্র পরিচালিত পর্যব তাই, যারা সঠিক ফলাফল আউটকে তাদের জন্য প্রোগ্রামের স্থান অনুসন্ধান করতে হবে, কিন্তু প্রোগ্রামের দ্বারা বিভ্রান্ত হচ্ছে না: যে প্রোগ্রাম য আমরা দুটি সাধারণ শিক্ষা প্যারাডিমের সাথে সংযুক্ত করি, শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করি (আরএল) এবং সর্বোচ্চ মার্মিনিয়াল সম্ভাবনা (এমএমএল), এবং তারপর একটি নতুন শিক্ এমএমএলে ব্যবস্থাপনার ঐতিহ্যবাহী অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে সংযুক্ত করে নতুন অ্যালগরিদম প্রোগ্রামের বিরুদ্ধে রক্ষাকারীদের রক্ষাকারীরা এমএমএল-এ ব্যবস্থাপনা করেছে এব আমরা আমাদের শিক্ষা আলগরিদম নতুন নিউরেল সেম্যান্টিক প্যারেজারের কাছে প্রয়োগ করি এবং সাম্প্রতিক কন্টেক্সটেক্সটেন্টিক পার্সিং কাজের উপর বিশ', 'bs': 'Naš cilj je naučiti semantički analitičar koji mapira prirodne jezičke izreke u programe koje mogu izvršiti kada je dostupno samo indirektno nadzor: primjeri su označeni sa ispravnim rezultatom izvršenja, ali ne samim programom. Stoga moramo pretražiti prostor programa za one koji izlaze ispravan rezultat, dok ne pogrešni programi: nepravedni programi koji slučajno izlaze ispravan rezultat. Povezujemo dve zajedničke paradigme učenja, učenje pojačanja (RL) i maksimalnu marginalnu vjerojatnost (MML), a onda predstavljamo novi algoritam učenja koji kombinira snagu oboje. Novi algoritam čuva protiv spurnih programa kombinirajući sistematsku pretragu tradicionalno zaposlenu u MML-u s randomizovanom istraživanjem RL-a, i aktualizajući parametre takve da se vjerojatnost širi jednako u konsekventnim programima. Primjenjujemo naš algoritam učenja na novi neurosemantički analizač i pokazujemo značajne dobitke na postojećim rezultatima stanja umjetnosti na nedavnom zadatku semantičkog analizanja ovisnom o kontekstu.', 'ca': "Our goal is to learn a semantic parser that maps natural language utterances into executable programs when only indirect supervision is available: examples are labeled with the correct execution result, but not the program itself.  En conseqüència, hem de buscar l'espai de programes per a aquells que produeixen el resultat correcte, mentre que no ens enganyen pels programes esportius: programes incorrects que produeixen el resultat correcte. Conectem dos paradigmes d'aprenentatge comuns, l'aprenentatge de reforç (RL) i la probabilitat máxima marginal (MML), i després presentem un nou algoritme d'aprenentatge que combina les forces dels dos. El nou algoritme guarda contra els programes despullosos combinant la cerca sistemàtica tradicionalment empregada en MML amb l'exploració aleatoritzada de RL, i actualitzant paràmetres de tal manera que la probabilitat s'estengui més uniformement en programes consistents. Aplicam el nostre algoritme d'aprenentatge a un nou analitzador semàntic neuronal i demostram avanços significatius sobre els resultats actuals d'una tasca d'analització semàntica recent que depèn del context.", 'et': 'Meie eesmärk on õppida semantilist parserit, mis kaardistab looduskeelseid väljendeid käivitatavateks programmideks, kui saadaval on ainult kaudne järelevalve: näited on märgistatud õige käivitamistulemusega, kuid mitte programm ise. Sellest tulenevalt peame otsima programmide ruumi nende jaoks, kes väljastavad õige tulemuse, samas kui meid ei eksitata valeprogrammid: valed programmid, mis juhuslikult väljastavad õige tulemuse. Ühendame kaks ühist õppeparadigmat, tugevdamisõppe (RL) ja maksimaalse marginaalse tõenäosuse (MML) ning esitame seejärel uue õppealgoritmi, mis ühendab mõlema tugevused. Uus algoritm kaitseb valeprogrammide eest, kombineerides MML-is traditsiooniliselt kasutatava süstemaatilise otsingu RL-i randomiseeritud uurimisega ja ajakohastades parameetreid nii, et tõenäosus jaotub ühtlasemalt järjepidevate programmide vahel. Rakendame oma õppealgoritmi uuele neuraalsemantilisele parserile ja näitame olulist kasu hiljutise kontekstist sõltuva semantilise parsimise ülesande olemasolevatest kaasaegsetest tulemustest.', 'fi': 'Tavoitteenamme on oppia semanttinen jäsentäjä, joka kartoittaa luonnollisen kielen lauseet suoritettaviksi ohjelmiksi, kun käytettävissä on vain epäsuora valvonta: esimerkit merkitään oikealla suoritustuloksella, mutta ei itse ohjelmaa. Siksi meidän on etsittävä ohjelmien tilasta niitä, jotka tuottavat oikean tuloksen, mutta ei harhaanjohtavia ohjelmia: virheellisiä ohjelmia, jotka tuottavat sattumalta oikean tuloksen. Yhdistämme kaksi yhteistä oppimisparadigmaa, vahvistusoppimisen (RL) ja maksimaalisen marginaalisen todennäköisyyden (MML) ja esittelemme uuden oppimisalgoritmin, joka yhdistää molempien vahvuudet. Uusi algoritmi suojaa vääriltä ohjelmilta yhdistämällä perinteisesti MML:ssä käytetty systemaattinen haku RL:n satunnaiseen tutkimiseen ja päivittämällä parametreja siten, että todennäköisyys jakautuu tasaisemmin johdonmukaisiin ohjelmiin. Sovellamme oppimisalgoritmiamme uuteen neurosemanttiseen jäsentäjään ja osoitamme merkittäviä hyötyjä nykyisiin viimeisimpiin tuloksiin verrattuna kontekstista riippuvassa semanttisessa jäsennystehtävässä.', 'cs': 'Naším cílem je naučit se sémantický parser, který mapuje výroky přirozeného jazyka do spustitelných programů, když je k dispozici pouze nepřímý dohled: příklady jsou označeny správným výsledkem provedení, ale ne samotným programem. V důsledku toho musíme prohledat prostor programů pro ty, které vydávají správný výsledek, aniž bychom byli uvedeni falešnými programy: nesprávnými programy, které náhodou vydávají správný výsledek. Propojujeme dva běžná učební paradigmata, zvýšené učení (RL) a maximální marginální pravděpodobnost (MML), a pak představujeme nový učební algoritmus, který kombinuje silné stránky obou. Nový algoritmus chrání před falešnými programy kombinací systematického vyhledávání tradičně používaného v MML s randomizovaným průzkumem RL a aktualizací parametrů tak, aby pravděpodobnost byla rozložena rovnoměrněji napříč konzistentními programy. Aplikujeme náš učební algoritmus na nový neuronový sémantický parser a ukazujeme významné zisky oproti stávajícím nejmodernějším výsledkům na nedávné kontextově závislé sémantické parsování úlohy.', 'jv': 'Kita goal punika kanggo alih semanti sing dibutuhke sistem anyar tentang kanggo ngilangno program sing bisa nguasai supoyo sing ora kebebasan: bisalahan kanggo ndelok akeh operasi sing beraksi ora ono program sing beraksi Yolah, awak dhéwé kudu ndhake Program-uteg iki dadi sing paling berarti dadi sing arep mbut, njuk supoyo Program-uteg sing ora bisa pasang dhéwé: program sing ora dadi sing berarti dadi sing bakal terus akeh operasi sing dadi. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing dibutuhke karo hal-iki, nguasai nggawe sistem pakan (RL) lan basa sing gak dhéwé. Unga unyané sistem sing gak dhéwé, sampek iso nggawe sistem sing gak dhéwé. Algorithm sistem bagian nguasai perkoro Program sing dibutuhi sistem sing ditambah nggawe sistem sistem sing ditambah basa gambar nggawe aturan RL karo ndelah sampek, lan nganggep sistem sing nyimpen parameterus liyane soko iso diandelah sing ngendalikno sakjane perkoro sing susahe sak program sing berarti. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno Algorithmu kanggo kelas sistem anyar semanti sing dibutuhke sistem anyar tentang karo state-of-the-arts barang nggawe barang sistem sing gawe nguasakno semanti nggawe sawetakno.', 'sk': 'Naš cilj je, da se naučimo semantičnega razčlenjevalnika, ki kartira izjave naravnega jezika v izvedljive programe, kadar je na voljo le posredni nadzor: primeri so označeni s pravilnim rezultatom izvedbe, ne pa s samim programom. Posledično moramo iskati prostor programov za tiste, ki izdajajo pravilen rezultat, ne da bi nas zavajali lažni programi: napačni programi, ki naključno izdajajo pravilen rezultat. Povežemo dve skupni učni paradigmi, ojačevalno učenje (RL) in maksimalno marginalno verjetnost (MML), nato pa predstavimo nov učni algoritem, ki združuje prednosti obeh. Novi algoritem varuje pred lažnimi programi, saj združuje sistematično iskanje, ki se tradicionalno uporablja v MML, z naključnim raziskovanjem RL in s posodabljanjem parametrov tako, da je verjetnost enakomerno porazdeljena med doslednimi programi. Naš učni algoritem uporabljamo za nov nevralni semantični razčlenjevalnik in pokažemo pomembne koristi v primerjavi z obstoječimi najsodobnejšimi rezultati pri nedavnem kontekstno odvisnem semantičnem razčlenjevanju.', 'he': 'המטרה שלנו היא ללמוד חוקר סמנטי שמפית את מילים שפה טבעית לתוכניות ניתנות להוציא תוכניות כאשר רק פיקוח אינדרי זמין: דוגמאות מוטבעות בתוצאה ההוצאה הנכונה, אבל לא בתוכנית עצמה. כתוצאה מכך, עלינו לחפש את המרחב של תוכניות עבור אלה שמוציאים את התוצאה הנכונה, בזמן שלא מוטעים על ידי תוכניות מרושעות: תוכניות לא נכונות שמוציאות במקרה את התוצאה הנכונה. אנו מחברים שני פרדיגמים למידה משותפים, למידה מחזקת (RL) וסיכוי גבול מקסימום (MML), ואז מציגים אלגוריתם למידה חדש שמשולב את הכוחות של שניהם. האלגוריתם החדש שומר נגד תוכניות מרגיעות על ידי שילוב החיפוש המערכת המסורתי המשתמש ב MML עם החיפוש האירועי של RL, ובידי העדכון פרמטרים כך שהסבירות מתפשטת באופן שווה יותר על תוכניות קבועות. אנו משתמשים באלגוריתם הלימודים שלנו בפרסם סמנטי עצבי חדש ולהראות היתרונות משמעותיות מעל תוצאות המצב האמנתי קיימות על משימה סמנטית תלויה בקשר לאחרונה.', 'ha': "Gagonmu na sani an sanar da wani parameter na semantic wanda ke karta magana na zaman cikin shiryoyin ayuka da za'a zartar da shi idan ana iya samar da shirin ayukan da ke iya lissafa guda kawai: An sanar misãlai da matsalan zartar da inganci, amma ba shirin ayukan. Saboda haka, za mu nẽmi filin shiryoyin ayuka wa waɗanda ke fitarwa matsalar gaske, idan ba za'a ɓatar da shiryoyin ayuka na tsohon: shiryoyin ayuka masu inganci, da a lokaci, za'a fitar matsalan da ke daidai. Tuna haɗa paradigi biyu na zaman learning, kuma ana ƙara learning (RL) da sannanan halarce (MML), kuma ana halatar da wata algorisi na karatun da ke haɗa ƙarfin dukansu. @ info: whatsthis Tuna amfani da algorityinmu zuwa wani sabo na semantic na neura kuma mu nuna marubuci mai girma kan fassarar-state-of-the-art kan a yanzu-muhimman aikin parse na semantic.", 'bo': 'Our goal is to learn a semantic parser that maps natural language utterances into executable programs when only indirect supervision is available: examples are labeled with the correct execution result, but not the program itself. Consequently, we must search the space of programs for those that output the correct result, while not being misled by spurious programs: incorrect programs that coincidentally output the correct result. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སློབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་གཉིས་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The new algorithm guards against spurious programs by combining the systematic search traditionally employed in MML with the randomized exploration of RL, and by updating parameters such that probability is spread more evenly across consistent programs. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་སྐྱེས་པ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Diversity driven attention model for query-based abstractive summarization', 'ar': 'نموذج الانتباه المدفوع بالتنوع للتلخيص التجريدي القائم على الاستعلام', 'pt': 'Modelo de atenção orientado à diversidade para sumarização abstrativa baseada em consulta', 'es': 'Modelo de atención impulsado por la diversidad para la sumarización abstractiva basada en consultas', 'fr': "Modèle d'attention axé sur la diversité pour la synthèse abstraite basée sur des requêtes", 'ja': 'クエリベースの抽象的な要約のための多様性駆動型アテンションモデル', 'zh': '询其抽象汇总之多样性驱动意模', 'hi': 'क्वेरी-आधारित अमूर्त summarization के लिए विविधता संचालित ध्यान मॉडल', 'ru': 'Модель внимания, основанная на разнообразии, для абстрактного обобщения на основе запросов', 'ga': 'Múnla aird bunaithe ar éagsúlacht le haghaidh achoimre teibí bunaithe ar cheist', 'el': 'Μοντέλο προσοχής με γνώμονα την ποικιλομορφία για αφηρημένη περίληψη βάσει ερωτήματος', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Sokszínűség vezérelt figyelemmodell lekérdezésen alapuló absztraktív összefoglaláshoz', 'it': 'Modello di attenzione basato sulla diversità per la sintesi astratta basata su query', 'lt': 'Apklausomis pagrįstos abstraktinės santraukos, pagrįstos įvairove, dėmesio modelis', 'kk': 'Сұраныс негіздеген абстрактивті тұжырымдамасының айырмашылығын басқару үлгісі', 'mk': 'Модел на внимание на различноста за апстрактивна резервација базирана на прашања', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാവേറ്റിവ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വ്യത്യാസം ശ', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ attenzjoni mmexxi mid-diversità għas-sommarju astrattiv ibbażat fuq mistoqsijiet', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчдийн анхаарлын загвар дээр суурилсан abstractive summarization', 'pl': 'Model uwagi oparty na różnorodności na abstrakcyjnym podsumowaniu opartym na zapytaniach', 'ro': 'Modelul de atenție orientat spre diversitate pentru rezumarea abstractivă bazată pe interogări', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Tusaale-dhaqaalaha warqadaha la xiriiray', 'sr': 'Raznolikost vodi model pažnje na osnovu zahteva abstraktivne sažetke', 'sv': 'Mångfaldsdriven uppmärksamhetsmodell för frågebaserad abstraktiv sammanfattning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سوال پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے مختلف توجه کی موڈل', 'no': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Màu tập trung dựa trên độ khác nhau cho việc tổng hợp trừu tượng', 'bg': 'Модел на вниманието, насочен към многообразието, за абстрактно обобщаване на базата на заявки', 'da': 'Mangfoldighedsdrevet opmærksomhedsmodel til forespørgselsbaseret abstraktiv opsummering', 'nl': 'Diversiteitsgedreven aandachtsmodel voor op query gebaseerde abstracte samenvatting', 'hr': 'Raznolikost vodi model pažnje na osnovu zahtjeva abstraktivne sažetke', 'de': 'Diversitätsgetriebenes Aufmerksamkeitsmodell für abfragebasierte abstrakte Zusammenfassung', 'ko': '다양성 구동의 조회 기반 추상적 요약 주의 모델', 'fa': 'مدل توجه مختلف برای جمع\u200cآوری مطلوب بر پایه سوال\u200cها', 'sw': 'Mfano wa tofauti uliendesha muundo wa kusikiliza kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa uchunguzi wa utafiti', 'tr': 'Çeşitlik sistemi üçin nähilli üns modi', 'af': 'Diversiteit gedrywe aanmerking model vir navraag gebaseerde abstraktiewe opsomming', 'sq': 'Modeli i vëmendjes së nxitur nga diversiteti për përmbledhjen abstraktive bazuar në pyetje', 'id': 'Model perhatian yang didorong oleh perbedaan untuk perhitungan abstraktif berdasarkan pertanyaan', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Բազմազանությունը հիմնված ուշադրության մոդելը հարցերով հիմնված վերացական համառոտագրության համար', 'bs': 'Raznolikost vodi model pažnje na osnovu zahteva abstraktivne sažetke', 'ca': 'Diversity driven attention model for query-based abstractive summarization', 'cs': 'Model pozornosti řízený rozmanitostí pro abstraktivní shrnutí založené na dotazech', 'et': 'Mitmekesisusest lähtuva tähelepanu mudel päringupõhise abstraktse kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'fi': 'Monimuotoisuuslähtöinen huomiomalli kyselypohjaiseen abstraktiin yhteenvetoon', 'az': 'Q톛b톛r-tabanl캼 abstraktiv toplama 칲칞칲n m칲xt톛lif t톛sirlik modeli', 'bn': 'অনুসন্ধান ভিত্তিক অক্ষরিক সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য ডিভার্সিটি মনোযোগ মডেল চালিয়েছে', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Model pozornosti, ki temelji na raznolikosti, za abstraktivno povzetek na poizvedbah', 'he': 'מודל תשומת לב מונע מהשוווה למסכם אסטרקטיבי מבוסס על שאלות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Diversity driven attention model for query-based abstractive summarization'}
{'en': 'Abstractive summarization aims to generate a shorter version of the document covering all the salient points in a compact and coherent fashion. On the other hand, query-based summarization highlights those points that are relevant in the context of a given query. The encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of generation of repeated phrases. In this work we propose a model for the query-based summarization task based on the encode-attend-decode paradigm with two key additions (i) a query attention model (in addition to document attention model) which learns to focus on different portions of the query at different time steps (instead of using a static representation for the query) and (ii) a new diversity based attention model which aims to alleviate the problem of repeating phrases in the summary. In order to enable the testing of this model we introduce a new query-based summarization dataset building on debatepedia. Our experiments show that with these two additions the proposed model clearly outperforms vanilla encode-attend-decode models with a gain of 28 % (absolute) in ROUGE-L scores.', 'ar': 'يهدف التلخيص التجريدي إلى إنشاء نسخة أقصر من المستند تغطي جميع النقاط البارزة بطريقة مضغوطة ومتماسكة. من ناحية أخرى ، يبرز التلخيص المستند إلى الاستعلام تلك النقاط ذات الصلة في سياق استعلام معين. لقد حقق نموذج التشفير-الحضور-فك الشفرة نجاحًا ملحوظًا في الترجمة الآلية ، والتلخيص الاستخراجي ، وأنظمة الحوار ، وما إلى ذلك ، لكنه يعاني من عيب إنشاء عبارات متكررة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا لمهمة التلخيص المستند إلى الاستعلام استنادًا إلى نموذج التشفير-الحضور-فك الترميز مع إضافتين رئيسيتين (1) نموذج انتباه الاستعلام (بالإضافة إلى نموذج انتباه المستند) الذي يتعلم التركيز على أجزاء مختلفة من الاستعلام في خطوات زمنية مختلفة (بدلاً من استخدام تمثيل ثابت للاستعلام) و (2) نموذج اهتمام جديد قائم على التنوع يهدف إلى التخفيف من مشكلة تكرار العبارات في الملخص. من أجل تمكين اختبار هذا النموذج ، قدمنا مجموعة بيانات تلخيص جديدة قائمة على الاستعلام مبنية على debatepedia. تُظهر تجاربنا أنه مع هاتين الإضافتين ، يتفوق النموذج المقترح بوضوح على نماذج الفانيليا للترميز والحضور وفك الشفرة مع زيادة قدرها 28٪ (مطلق) في درجات ROUGE-L.', 'es': 'El resumen abstractivo tiene como objetivo generar una versión más corta del documento que cubra todos los puntos más destacados de una manera compacta y coherente. Por otro lado, el resumen basado en consultas resalta los puntos que son relevantes en el contexto de una consulta determinada. El paradigma codificar-atener-decodificar ha logrado un éxito notable en la traducción automática, la sumarización extractiva, los sistemas de diálogo, etc., pero adolece del inconveniente de la generación de frases repetidas. En este trabajo, proponemos un modelo para la tarea de resumen basado en consultas basado en el paradigma codificar-atender-decodificar con dos adiciones clave (i) un modelo de atención a la consulta (además del modelo de atención al documento) que aprende a centrarse en diferentes partes de la consulta en diferentes pasos de tiempo (en lugar de usar un representación para la consulta) y ii) un nuevo modelo de atención basado en la diversidad que tiene por objeto mitigar el problema de repetir frases en el resumen. Para permitir la prueba de este modelo, introducimos un nuevo conjunto de datos de resumen basado en consultas basado en debatepedia. Nuestros experimentos muestran que con estas dos adiciones, el modelo propuesto supera claramente a los modelos de codificación, asistencia y decodificación convencionales con una ganancia del 28% (absoluta) en las puntuaciones ROUGE-L.', 'fr': "La synthèse abstraite vise à générer une version plus courte du document couvrant tous les points saillants de manière compacte et cohérente. D'autre part, la synthèse basée sur les requêtes met en évidence les points pertinents dans le contexte d'une requête donnée. Le paradigme encode-attend-décodage a connu un succès notable dans la traduction automatique, la synthèse extractive, les systèmes de dialogue, etc. Mais il souffre de l'inconvénient de générer des phrases répétées. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un modèle pour la tâche de synthèse basée sur les requêtes basé sur le paradigme encode-attend-décoder avec deux ajouts clés (i) un modèle d'attention à la requête (en plus du modèle d'attention au document) qui apprend à se concentrer sur différentes parties de la requête à différents pas temporels (au lieu d'utiliser un modèle statique représentation pour la requête) et (ii) un nouveau modèle d'attention basé sur la diversité qui vise à atténuer le problème de la répétition de phrases dans le résumé. Afin de permettre le test de ce modèle, nous introduisons un nouveau jeu de données de synthèse basé sur des requêtes basé sur debatepedia. Nos expériences montrent qu'avec ces deux ajouts, le modèle proposé surpasse clairement les modèles classiques d'encode-attend-décodage avec un gain de 28\xa0% (absolu) des scores ROUGE-L.", 'pt': 'A sumarização abstrativa visa gerar uma versão mais curta do documento cobrindo todos os pontos salientes de forma compacta e coerente. Por outro lado, a sumarização baseada em consulta destaca os pontos que são relevantes no contexto de uma determinada consulta. O paradigma codificar-assistir-decodificar obteve sucesso notável em tradução automática, sumarização extrativa, sistemas de diálogo, etc. Mas sofre com a desvantagem de geração de frases repetidas. Neste trabalho, propomos um modelo para a tarefa de sumarização baseada em consultas com base no paradigma codificar-atender-decodificar com duas adições principais (i) um modelo de atenção de consulta (além do modelo de atenção de documento) que aprende a se concentrar em diferentes partes do a consulta em diferentes etapas de tempo (em vez de usar uma representação estática para a consulta) e (ii) um novo modelo de atenção baseado em diversidade que visa aliviar o problema de repetição de frases no resumo. A fim de permitir o teste deste modelo, introduzimos um novo conjunto de dados de sumarização baseado em consulta construído no debatepedia. Nossos experimentos mostram que, com essas duas adições, o modelo proposto supera claramente os modelos de codificação-atendimento-decodificação de baunilha com um ganho de 28% (absoluto) nas pontuações do ROUGE-L.', 'ja': '抽象的な要約は、コンパクトで一貫した方法ですべての要点をカバーする文書の短いバージョンを生成することを目的としています。 一方、クエリベースの要約は、特定のクエリの文脈で関連するポイントを強調しています。 エンコード-アテンデコードパラダイムは、機械翻訳、抽出要約、ダイアログシステムなどで顕著な成功を収めています。 しかし、それは繰り返されるフレーズの生成の欠点に苦しんでいる。 この研究では、エンコード-出席-デコードパラダイムに基づくクエリベースの要約タスクのためのモデルを提案しており、2つの重要な追加があります（ i ）異なる時間ステップでクエリの異なる部分に焦点を当てることを学習するクエリ注意モデル（文書注意モデルに加えて）、および（ ii ）要約のフレーズを繰り返す問題を緩和することを目的とした新しい多様性ベースの注意モデル。 このモデルのテストを可能にするために、ディベートペディア上に構築された新しいクエリベースの要約データセットを導入します。 私たちの実験は、これらの2つの追加により、提案されたモデルが、ROUGE - Lスコアで28%（絶対）の利得を有するバニラエンコード-アテンド-デコードモデルを明らかに上回ることを示しています。', 'zh': '抽象总结旨在紧凑连贯的较短版本,涵盖所有要点。 其一,询摘要显于给定上下文之中。 编码-与-解码范式显功于机器翻译、提取性摘要、对话系统。 然有重复短语之病。 是故举一于编码 - - - 解码范者,询于摘要,加于二关键因素(i)(文档外),学于异时步长(非以静问)与(ii)新于多样性,旨在缓解摘要重短语也。 为能测试此模样,引入一新基查访的总结数据集,该数据集建立在 debatepedia 上。 臣等实验明,因此两加,所陈模形显优于常编码 - 参 - 解码模形,于ROUGE-L分数中增28%(绝对值)。', 'hi': 'Abstractive summarization का उद्देश्य एक कॉम्पैक्ट और सुसंगत फैशन में सभी मुख्य बिंदुओं को कवर करने वाले दस्तावेज़ का एक छोटा संस्करण उत्पन्न करना है। दूसरी ओर, क्वेरी-आधारित सारांशीकरण उन बिंदुओं को हाइलाइट करता है जो किसी दिए गए क्वेरी के संदर्भ में प्रासंगिक हैं। एन्कोड-अटेंड-डिकोड प्रतिमान ने मशीन अनुवाद, निष्कर्षण सारांश, संवाद प्रणाली, आदि में उल्लेखनीय सफलता प्राप्त की है। लेकिन यह दोहराए गए वाक्यांशों की पीढ़ी की कमी से ग्रस्त है। इस काम में हम दो प्रमुख परिवर्धन के साथ एन्कोड-अटेंड-डिकोड प्रतिमान के आधार पर क्वेरी-आधारित सारांशीकरण कार्य के लिए एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं (i) एक क्वेरी ध्यान मॉडल (दस्तावेज़ ध्यान मॉडल के अलावा) जो अलग-अलग समय चरणों में क्वेरी के विभिन्न हिस्सों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना सीखता है (क्वेरी के लिए एक स्थिर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करने के बजाय) और (ii) एक नया विविधता आधारित ध्यान मॉडल जिसका उद्देश्य सारांश में दोहराए जाने वाले वाक्यांशों की समस्या को कम करना है। इस मॉडल के परीक्षण को सक्षम करने के लिए हम डिबेटपीडिया पर एक नया क्वेरी-आधारित सारांश डेटासेट बिल्डिंग पेश करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि इन दो परिवर्धन के साथ प्रस्तावित मॉडल स्पष्ट रूप से रूज-एल स्कोर में 28% (निरपेक्ष) के लाभ के साथ वेनिला एनकोड-अटेंड-डिकोड मॉडल को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Абстрактное резюме направлено на то, чтобы подготовить более краткий вариант документа, охватывающий все основные моменты в компактной и последовательной форме. С другой стороны, обобщение на основе запроса выделяет те моменты, которые актуальны в контексте данного запроса. Парадигма encode-attend-decode достигла заметных успехов в машинном переводе, экстрактивном суммировании, диалоговых системах и т.д. Но он страдает от недостатка генерации повторяющихся фраз. В этой работе мы предлагаем модель для задачи обобщения на основе запроса, основанную на парадигме encode-attend-decode с двумя ключевыми дополнениями (i) модель внимания запроса (в дополнение к модели внимания документа), которая учится фокусироваться на различных частях запроса на разных временных этапах (вместо использования статического представления для запроса) и (ii) новую модель внимания на основе разнообразия, которая направлена на облегчение проблемы повторения фраз в сводке. Для тестирования этой модели мы вводим новый набор сводных данных на основе запросов, построенный на основе дебатов. Наши эксперименты показывают, что с этими двумя дополнениями предлагаемая модель явно превосходит модели с ванильным кодированием-присутствием-декодированием с увеличением на 28% (абсолютное значение) в баллах ROUGE-L.', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag achoimriú teibí leagan níos giorra den doiciméad a chruthú a chlúdóidh na pointí suntasacha go léir ar bhealach dlúth agus soiléir. Ar an taobh eile den scéal, cuireann achoimre ar cheisteanna béim ar na pointí sin atá ábhartha i gcomhthéacs fiosrúcháin ar leith. Tá rath suntasach bainte amach ag paraidím an ionchódaithe-freastail-díchódaithe maidir le haistriúchán meaisín, achoimriú eastóscach, córais dialóige, etc. San obair seo molaimid múnla don tasc achoimrithe ceist-bhunaithe bunaithe ar an paradigm ionchódú-freastal-díchódaithe le dhá phríomhbhreisiú (i) samhail aird ar cheist (i dteannta leis an tsamhail aird doiciméad) a fhoghlaimíonn conas díriú ar chodanna éagsúla de an cheist ag céimeanna difriúla ama (in ionad léiriú statach a úsáid don cheist) agus (ii) samhail aird nua bunaithe ar éagsúlacht a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige an fhadhb a bhaineann le frásaí a athrá san achoimre a mhaolú. D'fhonn an tsamhail seo a thástáil, tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí achoimrithe nua bunaithe ar cheisteanna a chuireann leis an bplé díospóireachta. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh, leis an dá bhreisiú seo, go sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta samhlacha ionchódaithe-freastal-díchódaithe fanaile le gnóthachan 28% (iomlán) i scóir ROUGE-L.", 'el': 'Η αφηρημένη περίληψη αποσκοπεί στη δημιουργία μιας συντομότερης έκδοσης του εγγράφου που καλύπτει όλα τα σημαντικά σημεία με συμπαγή και συνεκτικό τρόπο. Από την άλλη πλευρά, η περίληψη βάσει ερωτήματος επισημαίνει εκείνα τα σημεία που είναι σχετικά στο πλαίσιο ενός συγκεκριμένου ερωτήματος. Το παράδειγμα κωδικοποίησης-παρακολούθησης-αποκωδικοποίησης έχει επιτύχει αξιοσημείωτη επιτυχία στη μηχανική μετάφραση, την εξαγωγική σύνοψη, τα συστήματα διαλόγου, κλπ. Αλλά υποφέρει από το μειονέκτημα της δημιουργίας επαναλαμβανόμενων φράσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο για την εργασία σύνοψης βασισμένη στο πρότυπο κωδικοποίησης-παρακολούθησης-αποκωδικοποίησης με δύο βασικές προσθήκες (i) ένα μοντέλο προσοχής ερωτήματος (εκτός από το μοντέλο προσοχής εγγράφου) το οποίο μαθαίνει να εστιάζει σε διαφορετικά τμήματα του ερωτήματος σε διαφορετικά χρονικά βήματα (αντί να χρησιμοποιεί μια στατική αναπαράσταση για το ερώτημα) και (ii) ένα νέο μοντέλο προσοχής βασισμένο σε ποικιλομορφία που στοχεύει στην ανακούφιση του προβλήματος της επανάληψης φράσεων στην περίληψη. Προκειμένου να καταστεί δυνατή η δοκιμή αυτού του μοντέλου εισάγουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης βασισμένο σε ερωτήματα βασισμένο στη συζήτηση. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι με αυτές τις δύο προσθήκες το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο σαφώς ξεπερνά τα μοντέλα κωδικοποίησης-αποκωδικοποίησης βανίλιας με κέρδος 28% (απόλυτου) στις βαθμολογίες ROUGE-L.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív összefoglalás célja, hogy a dokumentum rövidebb változatát hozza létre, amely az összes kiemelkedő pontot kompakt és koherens módon lefedi. Másrészt a lekérdezésen alapuló összefoglalás kiemeli azokat a pontokat, amelyek relevánsak egy adott lekérdezés kontextusában. A kódolás-részvétel-dekódolás paradigma jelentős sikert ért el a gépi fordításban, az extraktív összefoglalásban, a párbeszédrendszerekben stb. De szenved az ismételt kifejezések generálásának hátrányától. Ebben a munkában a lekérdezésen alapuló összefoglaló feladat modelljét javasoljuk a kódolás-részvétel-dekódolás paradigmáján alapuló lekérdezésen alapuló feladat két kulcsfontosságú kiegészítéssel (i) egy lekérdezési figyelem modelljével (a dokumentumfigyelem modell mellett), amely megtanulja a lekérdezés különböző részeire fókuszálni különböző időlépésekben (statikus reprezentáció helyett), valamint (ii) egy új sokszínűség alapú figyelem modell, amely célja, hogy enyhítse az összefoglalóban szereplő kifejezések ismétlődésének problémáját. A modell tesztelésének lehetővé tétele érdekében bevezetünk egy új lekérdezésen alapuló összefoglaló adatkészletet, amely a debatepadiára épül. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy ezekkel a két kiegészítésekkel a javasolt modell egyértelműen felülmúlja a vanília kód-attend-dekód modelleket, 28% (abszolút) ROUGE-L pontszámokban.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური კოსტრაქტიფიკაციის მიზეზია, რომ დოკუმენტის კოსტრაქტიური ვერსია შექმნა, რომელიც ყველა სილიენტიური წერტილები კომპოქტიური და შესაძლებელი მეორე მხარედან, კითხვის დაბათი კითხვის კითხვის კითხვის კონტექსტში მნიშვნელოვანი წერტილებების შესახებ. პრადიგმა, რომელიც კოდირებულია მომხმარებული სისტემაში, ექსტრაქტიური სისტემაში, დიალოგის სისტემაში და განმავლობაში მიიღეთ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმატებითი წარმატებით. მაგრამ ეს მომხმა ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ შევძლებთ მოდელს კითხვის დაბათებული კითხვის საქმე პარადიგმა, რომელიც კითხვის განსხვავებული ნაწილზე (კითხვის დამატებით) განსხვავებული დროის განსხვავებული ნაწილზე (კითხვის დამატებით სტატიკალური გამოყენება) და i i) ახალი განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მოდელზე,  მიზეზია განხორციელების პრობლემას გახსნა რეზიუმენტში. ამ მოდელის ტესტის შესაძლებელად, ჩვენ ახალი კითხვის დაბათებული კითხვის მონაცემების საქაღალდე დიბაპედიაზე დავიყენებთ. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ამ ორი დამატებით მოდელის მოდელის გამოსახულებელად გამოიყენება განილია კოდის-ევკოდის მოდელის შესაძლებელად 28% (აბსოლუტური) პროგრამებში.', 'it': "La sintesi astratta mira a generare una versione più breve del documento coprendo tutti i punti salienti in modo compatto e coerente. D'altra parte, la sintesi basata su query evidenzia quei punti che sono rilevanti nel contesto di una data query. Il paradigma encode-attend-decode ha raggiunto un notevole successo nella traduzione automatica, nella sintesi estrattiva, nei sistemi di dialogo, ecc. Ma soffre dello svantaggio della generazione di frasi ripetute. In questo lavoro proponiamo un modello per l'attività di sintesi basata sulla query basato sul paradigma encode-attend-decode con due aggiunte chiave (i) un modello di attenzione della query (oltre al modello di attenzione del documento) che impara a concentrarsi su diverse porzioni della query in diversi passaggi temporali (invece di utilizzare una rappresentazione statica per la query) e (ii) un nuovo modello di attenzione basato sulla diversità che mira ad alleviare il problema della ripetizione delle frasi nella sintesi. Per consentire il test di questo modello introduciamo un nuovo set di dati di sintesi basato su query basato su debatepedia. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che con queste due aggiunte il modello proposto supera chiaramente i modelli di codifica-frequenza-decodifica vanilla con un guadagno del 28% (assoluto) nei punteggi ROUGE-L.", 'mk': 'Апстрактивната резултатација има за цел да генерира кратка верзија на документот која ги покрива сите основни точки на компактен и кохерентен начин. Од друга страна, резултатот базиран на прашања ги истакнува оние точки кои се релевантни во контекст на дадено прашање. Парадигмата encode-attend-decode постигна значителен успех во машинскиот превод, екстрактивната резултатација, дијалошките системи итн. Но страдаат од неуспехот на генерацијата на повторни фрази. Во оваа работа предлагаме модел за задачата за резултат базирана на прашања базирана на парадигмот код-присуство-декод со две клучни додатоци (i) модел на внимание на прашањата (покрај моделот на внимание на документот) кој научи да се фокусира на различни делови од прашањето во различни чекори на време (наместо да се користи статичко претставување за прашањето) и има за цел да го олесни проблемот со повторувањето на фразите во резултатот. Со цел да овозможиме тестирање на овој модел ние воведуваме нов набор на податоци за резултати базирани на прашања, кој се заснова на дебатepedia. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека со овие две додатоци предложениот модел јасно ги надминува моделите на ванилска кодефикација со 28 % (апсолутно) добивка од ROUGE-L оценките.', 'lt': 'Abstractive summarization aims to generate a shorter version of the document covering all the salient points in a compact and coherent fashion.  Kita vertus, klausimu grindžiamoje santraukoje pabrėžiami klausimai, kurie yra svarbūs tam tikro klausimo kontekste. Kodo-attend-decode paradigma pasiekė didelę sėkmę vertimo mašinomis, ekstraktyvinės santraukos, dialogo sistemų ir t. t. Tačiau ji kenčia nuo kartotinių frazių atsiradimo trūkumų. Šiame darbe siūlome klausimu pagrįstos santraukos užduoties model į, pagrįstą kodo-attend-decode paradigm a su dviem pagrindiniais papildymais: i) klausimo dėmesio modelis (be dokumento dėmesio modelio), kuris i šmoko sutelkti dėmesį į skirtingas klausimo dalis įvairiais laiko etapais (užuot naudojęs statinį atstovavimą klausimui) ir ii) naujas įvairovės pagrindu pagrįstas dėmesio modelis, kuris siekiama sušvelninti santraukoje pateiktų pakartotinių frazių problem ą. Kad būtų galima išbandyti šį model į, įvedame naują klausimu pagrįstą santraukų duomenų rinkinį, grindžiamą diskusijų tema. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad su šiais dviem papildymais siūlomas modelis akivaizdžiai viršija vanilės kodavimo ir dekodinimo modelius, o ROUGE-L rezultatų padidėjimas yra 28 % (absoliutus).', 'ms': 'Penapisan abstraktif bermaksud untuk menghasilkan versi pendek dokumen yang meliputi semua titik penting dalam cara kompat dan konsisten. Di sisi lain, pengringkasan berdasarkan pertanyaan menentukan titik-titik yang relevan dalam konteks pertanyaan yang diberi. Paradigma kod-attend-decode telah mencapai kejayaan yang luar biasa dalam terjemahan mesin, ringkasan ekstraktif, sistem dialog, dll. Tetapi ia menderita dari kelemahan generasi frasa berulang-ulang. In this work we propose a model for the query-based summarization task based on the encode-attend-decode paradigm with two key additions (i) a query attention model (in addition to document attention model) which learns to focus on different portions of the query at different time steps (instead of using a static representation for the query) and (ii) a new diversity based attention model which  bertujuan untuk mengurangi masalah mengulang frasa dalam ringkasan. Untuk memungkinkan ujian model ini, kami memperkenalkan set data ringkasan berasaskan pertanyaan baru yang dibina pada debatepedia. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa dengan dua tambahan ini model yang diusulkan jelas melebihi model vanilla encode-attend-decode dengan keuntungan 28% (mutlak) dalam skor ROUGE-L.', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം രേഖയുടെ പതിപ്പു് ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു മറുവശത്ത് കേള്\u200dക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു The encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of generation of repeated phrases.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു കീയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള കോഡ്-ഡെക്കോഡ് പാരാഡിഡിമിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ചോദ്യം ശ്രദ്ധി വ്യാഖ്യാനത്തില്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലളിപ്പിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഈ മോഡലിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണം പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് ഈ രണ്ടു കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു വ', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju abstrattiv għandu l-għan li jiġġenera verżjoni iqsar tad-dokument li tkopri l-punti ewlenin kollha b’mod kompatt u koerenti. Min-naħa l-oħra, is-sommarju bbażat fuq mistoqsijiet jenfasizza dawk il-punti li huma rilevanti fil-kuntest ta’ mistoqsija partikolari. Il-paradigma tal-kodiċi-attend-decode kisbet suċċess notevoli fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni, fil-qosor estrattiv, fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu, eċċ. Iżda tbati mill-iżvantaġġ tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ frażijiet ripetuti. F’din il-ħidma qed nipproponu mudell għall-kompitu ta’ sommarju bbażat fuq mistoqsijiet ibbażat fuq il-paradigm a ta’ kodifikazzjoni-attend-decode b’żewġ żidiet ewlenin (i) mudell ta’ attenzjoni għall-mistoqsijiet (minbarra mudell ta’ attenzjoni għad-dokumenti) li jitgħallem jiffoka fuq porzjonijiet differenti tal-mistoqsija fi stadji differenti ta’ żmien (minflok juża rappreżentazzjoni statika għall-mistoqsija) u (ii) mudell ġdid ta’ attenzjoni bbażat fuq id-diversità li għandu l-għan li jtaffi l-problema tar-ripetizzjoni tal-frażijiet fis-sommarju. Sabiex ikun possibbli l-ittestjar ta’ dan il-mudell a ħna nintroduċu sett ġdid ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju bbażat fuq mistoqsijiet li jibni fuq id-dibattitu. Our experiments show that with these two additions the proposed model clearly outperforms vanilla encode-attend-decode models with a gain of 28% (absolute) in ROUGE-L scores.', 'mn': 'Абстрактив тодорхойлолтын зорилго нь баримтын богино хувилбар бүх цэгүүдийг нийлүүлэхэд зорилгодог. Нөгөө талаар, query-ээр суурилсан тодорхойлолт нь өгөгдсөн query-ийн тухай холбоотой цэгүүдийг тодорхойлж байна. Кодлог-оролцогчдын парадигм нь машины орчуулалт, нэмэлт тодруулалт, диалог систем, т.д. гэх мэт машины амжилтыг хүртсэн. Гэхдээ энэ нь давтагдсан хэлбэрүүдийн үеэс хадгалагдсан. Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр түлхүүр нэмэлт (i) query анхаарлын загвар (баримт анхаарлын загварын нэмэлт) загвар дээр олон цаг хугацаанд анхаарлын төвлөрөх загварыг суралцаж суралцаж байна. Кверигийн өөр хэсгүүд дээр анхаарлын төвлөрөх загвар (кверигийн загварын загвар ашиглахын оронд) болон ii)  жинхэнэ хэлбэрийг давтах асуудлыг багасгах зорилго юм. Энэ загварын шалгалтыг боловсруулахын тулд бид хэлэлцээний талаар шинэ кверийн үндсэн хэвлэлийн өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний туршилтууд эдгээр хоёр нэмэлт загвараар тайлбарласан загвар нь РУGE-L тооны 28% (абсолют) нэмэлт загвараас тодорхой байдаг.', 'no': 'Abstraktiv samansering måtar å laga ein kortere versjon av dokumentet som dekkar alle salient punktane i eit kompakt og koherent måte. På den andre siden, spørjingsbaserte sammendrag markerer dei punkta som er relevante i konteksten av eit gitt spørjing. Paradigmen for koding av deltakar-dekode har oppnådd merkelig suksess i maskineomsetjinga, ekstraktiv samansering, dialogsystemet osv. Men det går frå lagring av gjentaande frasar. I denne arbeidet foreslår vi eit modell for sammendrag basert på paradigmet med to nøkkeladdisjonar (i tillegg til dokumentoppmerkingsmodul) som lærer å fokusera på ulike deler av spørjinga på ulike tidsstrekk (i staden for å bruka ein statisk representasjon for spørjinga) og ii) ein ny forskjellige oppmerkingsmodul som mål å gjenoppretta fraser i sammendragen. For å slå på testen av denne modellen introduserer vi ein ny dataset som bygger samanseringar på debattpedia på spørjingsbasert. Eksperimentane våre viser at med desse to tillegga foreslått modellen utfører vanylisk kode-modeller med 28% (absolutt) i ROUGE-L-poeng.', 'pl': 'Streszczenie ma na celu stworzenie krótszej wersji dokumentu obejmującego wszystkie istotne punkty w sposób zwarty i spójny. Z drugiej strony podsumowanie oparte na zapytaniu podkreśla te punkty, które są istotne w kontekście danego zapytania. Paradygmat kodowania-obecnego-dekodowania osiągnął znaczący sukces w tłumaczeniu maszynowym, ekstrakcyjnym podsumowaniu, systemach dialogowych itp. Ale cierpi z powodu wady generowania powtarzających się fraz. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy model zadania podsumowania opartego na zapytaniu opartego na paradygmacie kodowania-obecnego-dekodowania z dwoma kluczowymi dodatkami (i) model uwagi zapytania (oprócz modelu uwagi dokumentu), który uczy się skupiać na różnych częściach zapytania w różnych etapach czasu (zamiast używać statycznej reprezentacji dla zapytania) oraz (ii) nowy model uwagi oparty na różnorodności Ma na celu złagodzenie problemu powtarzania się fraz w streszczeniu. W celu umożliwienia testowania tego modelu wprowadzamy nowy zestaw danych podsumowujących oparty na zapytaniach oparty na debatepedii. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że z tymi dwoma dodatkami proponowany model wyraźnie przewyższa modele kodowania-obecności-dekodowania waniliowego o zysku 28% (absolutnego) w wynikach ROUGE-L.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul abstractiv urmărește generarea unei versiuni mai scurte a documentului care acoperă toate punctele principale într-un mod compact și coerent. Pe de altă parte, rezumarea bazată pe interogare evidențiază acele puncte care sunt relevante în contextul unei anumite interogări. Paradigma codare-participare-decodare a obținut un succes notabil în traducerea automată, rezumarea extractivă, sistemele de dialog, etc. Dar suferă de dezavantajul generarii de fraze repetate. În această lucrare propunem un model pentru activitatea de rezumare bazată pe interogare bazată pe paradigma codare-participare-decodare cu două adăugări cheie (i) un model de atenție a interogării (în plus față de modelul de atenție al documentului) care învață să se concentreze pe diferite porțiuni ale interogării în diferiți pași de timp (în loc să utilizeze o reprezentare statică pentru interogare) și (ii) un nou model de atenție bazat pe diversitate, care scopul de a atenua problema repetării frazelor din rezumat. Pentru a permite testarea acestui model introducem un nou set de date bazat pe interogare bazat pe dezbatepedia. Experimentele noastre arată că cu aceste două adăugări modelul propus depășește în mod clar modelele de codare-participare-decodare vanilie cu un câștig de 28% (absolut) în scorurile ROUGE-L.', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы құжаттың қысқа нұсқасын сәйкес және сәйкестік түрде барлық сәйкестік нұсқасын жасау үшін. Біріншіден, сұраныс негіздеген тұжырымдамасы келтірілген сұраныс контекстінде қатынастырылған нүктелерді бояулады. Қатысушыларды кодтау парадигмі машинаның аудармасында, шығарылған тұжырымдамасын, диалог жүйелерінде жұмыс істеді. Бірақ ол қайталанатын фреймдерді құруға болады. Бұл жұмыста біз сұраныс негіздеген тұжырымдама тапсырмасының үлгісін, екі кілт қосымша (i) сұраныс нақыштамасы үлгісін (құжаттың нақыштамасы үлгісіне қосымша), сұраныстың түрлі бөліктеріне басқа уақыт қадамдары (сұраныс үшін статикалық түрін қолдану орнына) басқа тізімінде сөздерді қайталау мәселесін көшірмелеу. Бұл үлгіні тексеру үшін, дискуссия үшін жаңа сұраныс негіздеген жазбалардың деректер жинағын келтіреміз. Біздің тәжірибеміз бұл екі қосымша қосымша келтірілген үлгілерді қатысушылар үлгілерінде 28% (абсолютті) болып, ROUGE-L пішімдерінде қатысушылар үлгілерін жасайды.', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka cilja je da stvori kraću verziju dokumenta koja pokriva sve salijantne tačke na kompaktnom i saslušnom načinu. Sa druge strane, sažetka na pitanju oslanja te tačke koje su relevantne u kontekstu određenog pitanja. Paradigma kodiranja-pristupnika-dekodiranja postigla je značajan uspjeh u prevodu mašine, ekstraktivnom sažetku, dijalogskim sistemima itd. Ali pati od povlačenja generacije ponovnih fraza. U ovom poslu predlažemo model za rezimetiranje zadataka na osnovu zahteva baziranog na paradigmu kodiranog pristupnika-dekodiranja sa dva ključna dodatka (i) model pažnje na pitanje (uz model pažnje dokumenta) koji nauči da se fokusira na različite dijelove zahteva na različitim vremenskim koracima (umjesto da koristi statičnu zastupnicu za zahtev) i ii) novi model pažnje na raznolikosti baziran na raznolikosti koji cilj je smanjiti problem ponavljanja rečenica u sažetku. Da bismo omogućili testiranje ovog model a, predstavljamo novi rezimetrirani sastav podataka na raspravama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da sa ovim dve dodatke predloženi model očigledno iznosi vanilne modele kodiranja-dekodiranja sa dodatakom od 28% (apsolutno) u rezultatima ROUGE-L.', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය සම්පූර්ණයක් අදහස් කරනවා විස්තාරයේ පොඩි විස්තරයක් සංවිධානය සහ සම්පූර්ණ විස්තරයෙන් හැම සැල අනිත් පැත්තෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නය අධිර්\u200dයාත්මක සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙ එන්කෝඩ් අංකෝඩ්-අංකෝඩ්-අංකෝඩ් පාර්ඩිග්ම් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුණා පරිවර්තනය, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවාදය පද්ධති මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙලාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න. මේ මොඩේලයේ පරීක්ෂණය සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න අපි අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අධ්\u200dයාත්මක දත්ත සූද්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ අයිති දෙකක් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැනිලා කොඩ් අංකෝඩ් අංකෝඩ් අංකෝඩ් අංකෝඩ් අ', 'so': "Qiimeynta jimicsiga ah wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu sameeyo warqad gaaban ee dukumentiga oo ku qoran barta saldhigga oo dhan qaab heshiis ah iyo isku xiran. Xiriirinta qoraalka lagu qorayo wuxuu ku qoran yahay goobaha ay ku xiran yihiin qoraalka la qoray. Qodxada-attend-decode paradigm wuxuu liibaanay faa'iido weyn oo ku qoran turjumaadda machine, jimicsiyada dhaqaalaha, koorsiga, nidaamka diyaarinta, etc. Laakiin waxay ka dhibaataysaa dib u dhigidda rasmiga ah oo la soo noqdo. Shaqadan waxaan ku soo jeedaynaa tusaale u sameynta sameynta qoraalka oo ku saleysan qoraalka koordid-decode paradigm labada darajadooda (i) iyo model wargelinta ah (ku qoran sameynta warqada xanaaneynta) kaasoo baranaya inuu ku kalsooneeyo qayb kala duduwan oo warqadaha xilliyada kala duduwan (badalta isticmaalka qaabilaada static-decode) iyo model cusub oo ku saabsan warbixinta oo kala duduwan ah waxay u jeedaa inuu fududeeyo dhibaatada soo celinta hadalka xagaaga. Si aan u fududeyno imtixaanka modeligan, waxaan soo bandhigaynaa dhismo macluumaad ah oo lagu qoray warqada cusub oo ku qoran debatepedia. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in labadan daraf lagu soo jeedo tusaalaha la soo jeeday ay si cad ayuu u muujiyaa modelalka qodqod-ka-gala vanilla ah oo faa'iido ah 28% (absolute) oo lagu kordhiyey scoraha ROUGE-L.", 'sv': 'Abstraktiv sammanfattning syftar till att skapa en kortare version av dokumentet som täcker alla viktiga punkter på ett kompakt och sammanhängande sätt. Å andra sidan belyser frågebaserad sammanfattning de punkter som är relevanta i samband med en viss fråga. Koda-delta-avkoda paradigmet har uppnått anmärkningsvärda framgångar inom maskinöversättning, extraktiv sammanfattning, dialogsystem, etc. Men det lider av nackdelen med att generera upprepade fraser. I detta arbete föreslår vi en modell för den frågebaserade sammanfattningsuppgiften baserad på paradigmet encode-attend-decode med två viktiga tillägg (i) en frågeuppmärksamhetsmodell (förutom dokumentuppmärksamhetsmodell) som lär sig fokusera på olika delar av frågan vid olika tidsteg (istället för att använda en statisk representation för frågan) och (ii) en ny mångfaldsbaserad uppmärksamhetsmodell som Syftet är att lindra problemet med att upprepa fraser i sammanfattningen. För att möjliggöra testning av denna modell introducerar vi en ny frågebaserad sammanfattningsdatauppsättning som bygger på debatepedia. Våra experiment visar att med dessa två tillägg den föreslagna modellen tydligt överträffar vanilj encode-attend-decode modeller med en ökning på 28% (absolut) i ROUGE-L poäng.', 'ta': 'Abstractive சுருக்கம் மற்றொரு பக்கத்தில், கேள்வி அடிப்படையிலான சுருக்கம் Name இந்த வேலையில் நாம் கேள்வி அடிப்படையில் குறியீட்டு- சேர்க்க- குறியீட்டு அளபுருவை அடிப்படையில் கோரிக்கு ஒரு மாதிரி பரிந்துரை சுருக்கத்தில் திரும்பச் சொற்றொடர்களை எளிதாக்க வேண்டும். இந்த மாதிரியின் சோதனையை செயல்படுத்துவதற்காக நாம் புதிய கேள்வி சுருக்கல் தகவல் அமைப்பை விவாதத்தில் உள்ள தகவல் அமைப்பை  எங்கள் சோதனைகள் இந்த இரண்டு கூட்டுதல் காண்பிக்கிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வெளிப்படையாக செயல்படுத்தும் வாய்லா குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகளை க', 'ur': 'آب تراکٹیوں کی تعریف کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ دفتر کی ایک چھوٹی نسخہ پیدا کرے جو ایک پیچیدہ اور مہربانی طریقہ میں تمام سیلین پوینٹوں کو پورے کرتی ہے. اور دوسری طرف، سوال پر بنیاد رکھا گیا اُن پوینٹوں کو ہیلائیٹ کرتا ہے جن کو ایک دکھایا ہوا سوال کے متعلق معاملہ ہے. Encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of repeated phrases. ہم اس کام میں ایک مدل کریں گے کہ کوئر کی بنیادی سامنے ٹاکس کے لئے دو کلی اضافہ کے بغیر دو کلی اضافہ کے بغیر ایک کوئر کی توجه موڈل (دکمیٹ توجه موڈل کے بغیر) کی مختلف ٹکڑوں پر متمرکز کرنا سکھتا ہے (کوئر کے بغیر ایک ایسی نمونہ کا استعمال کرنا) اور (i i) نئی مختلف توجه موڈل کے بغیر، جو اس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ جمعیت میں جمعیت کے بارے میں جمعیت کا مسئلہ ہلکا کرے۔ اس موڈل کی آزمائش کو قابل کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک نئی کوئریہ بنیادی ڈیٹ سٹ کو بحث پڑھنے پر معلوم کیا ہے. ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ان دو اضافہ کے ساتھ پیشنهاد کی موڈل واضح طور پر وینلیا اکڈ-آڈ-ڈکوڈ موڈل سے 28% (بالکل) فائدہ حاصل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Boshqa tomonda, soʻrov asosida hisoblash koʻrsatilgan soʻrov davomida muhim boʻlgan narsalarni koʻrsatish. Name Bu vazida, biz kodlash usuli bilan ikki kalit qoʻshish (i) qoʻshish modeli (hujjatning taʼminlovchi modeliga qoʻllaniladi) va boshqa vaqt soʻzlarida boshqa qismlarni foydalanish imkoniyatini o'rganamiz (soʻrov uchun statik represent) va (ii) yangi xizmatni asosida yaratish modeli Qisqacha soʻzlarni takrorlash muammolarini ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu modelni sinovlash uchun, biz debatepedia bilan yangi soʻrov asosida yangi qisqartmalar maʼlumot moslamasini ishga tushirish uchun. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz shu ikki qoʻshish bilan ilova qilingan modellar bilan bog'liq narsalarning 28% (absolute) sohasida vanillar kodlash modellarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt hấp dẫn nhằm tạo ra một phiên bản ngắn hơn của tài liệu bao gồm tất cả các điểm nổi bật theo một cách gọn và đồng nhất. Mặt khác, các bản tóm tắt dựa trên các câu hỏi nhấn mạnh những điểm có liên quan trong một câu hỏi đã đưa ra. Mô hình mã hóa tham dự giải đã đạt được một thành công đáng chú ý trong việc dịch chuyển máy, tóm tắt kim tử, hệ thống hộp thoại, v.v. nhưng nó phải chịu hậu quả khi phát đoạn văn lặp đi lặp lại. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình cho nhiệm vụ tổng kết dựa trên khả năng mã hóa tham gia giải mã hai phần chính: một mô hình chú ý truy vấn (thêm mô hình mẫu tập trung tài liệu) mà học tập trung vào các phần khác nhau của câu hỏi ở các bước thời gian khác nhau (thay vì sử dụng các mô hình trưng tĩnh cho yêu cầu) và (liền) một mô hình chú ý đa dạng mới dựa vào các phần khác nhau. Mục đích giảm bớt vấn đề lặp lại những cụm từ trong bản tóm tắt. Để tiến hành thử nghiệm mẫu này, chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu một tập tin đầy đủ dữ liệu dựa trên các câu hỏi về khoa học. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy, với hai loại thêm này, mẫu đã đề xuất rõ ràng hơn mẫu mã hóa vani với một lợi thế cao hơn cả trong số các loại ROG-L.', 'da': 'Abstraktiv sammenfatning sigter mod at generere en kortere version af dokumentet, der dækker alle de vigtigste punkter på en kompakt og sammenhængende måde. På den anden side fremhæver forespørgselsbaseret opsummering de punkter, der er relevante i forbindelse med en given forespørgsel. Kode-deltage-dekode paradigmet har opnået bemærkelsesværdig succes i maskinoversættelse, ekstraktiv opsummering, dialogsystemer osv. Men det lider af ulempen ved generering af gentagne sætninger. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en model for den forespørgselsbaserede opsummeringsopgave baseret på kode-attend-decode paradigmet med to nøgletilføjelser (i) en forespørgselsopmærksomhedsmodel (ud over dokumentopmærksomhedsmodel), der lærer at fokusere på forskellige dele af forespørgslen på forskellige tidstrin (i stedet for at bruge en statisk repræsentation til forespørgslen) og (ii) en ny diversity baseret opmærksomhedsmodel, som Formålet er at afhjælpe problemet med gentagelse af sætninger i resuméet. For at gøre det muligt at teste denne model introducerer vi et nyt forespørgselsbaseret sammenfattende datasæt baseret på debatepedia. Vores eksperimenter viser, at med disse to tilføjelser den foreslåede model klart overgår vanilje encode-attend-decode modeller med en gevinst på 28% (absolut) i ROUGE-L scorer.', 'de': 'Abstraktive Zusammenfassung zielt darauf ab, eine kürzere Version des Dokuments zu generieren, die alle wesentlichen Punkte kompakt und kohärent abdeckt. Andererseits hebt die abfragebasierte Zusammenfassung jene Punkte hervor, die im Kontext einer bestimmten Abfrage relevant sind. Das Code-Attest-Decode-Paradigma hat bemerkenswerte Erfolge in der maschinellen Übersetzung, extraktiven Zusammenfassung, Dialogsystemen usw. erzielt, leidet aber unter dem Nachteil der Generierung wiederholter Phrasen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Modell für die abfragebasierte Zusammenfassungsaufgabe vor, das auf dem Code-Attention-Decode-Paradigma basiert und zwei Schlüsseladditionen enthält (i) ein Abfrageaufmerksamkeitsmodell (zusätzlich zum Dokumenteaufmerksamkeitsmodell), das lernt, sich auf verschiedene Abschnitte der Abfrage zu verschiedenen Zeitschritten zu konzentrieren (anstatt eine statische Darstellung für die Abfrage zu verwenden) und (ii) ein neues diversitätsbasiertes Aufmerksamkeitsmodell, das Ziel ist es, das Problem der Wiederholung von Phrasen in der Zusammenfassung zu lindern. Um das Testen dieses Modells zu ermöglichen, führen wir einen neuen abfragebasierten Zusammenfassungsdatensatz ein, der auf debatepedia aufbaut. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell mit diesen beiden Ergänzungen deutlich übertrifft Vanille Encode-Attest-Decode Modelle mit einer Verstärkung von 28% (Absolut) in ROUGE-L Scores.', 'nl': 'Abstractieve samenvatting beoogt een kortere versie van het document te genereren die alle belangrijke punten op een compacte en coherente manier bestrijkt. Aan de andere kant benadrukt query-based samenvatting de punten die relevant zijn in de context van een bepaalde query. Het coderen-bijwonen-decode paradigma heeft opmerkelijk succes bereikt in machinevertaling, extractieve samenvatting, dialoogsystemen, enz. Maar het lijdt onder het nadeel van het genereren van herhaalde zinnen. In dit werk stellen we een model voor de query-based samenvattingstaak voor gebaseerd op het coderen-bijwonen-decode paradigma met twee belangrijke toevoegingen (i) een query attention model (in aanvulling op document attention model) dat leert om te focussen op verschillende delen van de query op verschillende tijdstappen (in plaats van een statische representatie voor de query) en (ii) een nieuw diversity based attention model dat Doel is het probleem van herhaling van zinnen in de samenvatting te verlichten. Om het testen van dit model mogelijk te maken introduceren we een nieuwe query-based summarization dataset gebaseerd op debattepedia. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model met deze twee toevoegingen duidelijk beter presteert dan vanille encode-bijwonen-decode modellen met een aanwinst van 28% (absoluut) in ROUGE-L scores.', 'hr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka cilja je proizvesti kraća verzija dokumenta koja pokriva sve salijantne to čke na kompaktnom i saslušnom načinu. S druge strane, sažetka temeljena na pitanju ukazuje na te točke koje su relevantne u kontekstu određenog pitanja. paradigma kodiranja-pristupnika-dekodiranja postigla je značajan uspjeh u prevodu strojeva, ekstraktivnom sažetku, dijalogskim sustavima itd. Ali pati od povlačenja generacije ponovnih fraza. U ovom poslu predlažemo model za rezimetiranje zadataka na osnovu zahtjeva temeljenog na paradigmu kodiranog pristupnika-dekodiranja s dvije ključne dodatke (i) model pažnje na zahtjev (uz model pažnje na dokumentima) koji uči fokusirati se na različite dijelove zahtjeva na različitim vremenskim koracima (umjesto upotrebe statičkog zastupanja zahtjeva) i ii) novi model pažnje bazirani na raznolikosti koji cilj je smanjiti problem ponavljanja rečenica u sažetku. Da bismo omogućili testiranje ovog model a, predstavljamo novu sagradu podataka o rezimetiranju podataka na temelju zahtjeva na pitanju. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da s ovim dvije dodatke predloženi model očigledno iznosi modele za kodiranje vanile sa dodatak od 28% (apsolutno) u rezultatima ROUGE-L.', 'bg': 'Абстрактното обобщаване цели да генерира по-кратка версия на документа, обхващаща всички важни точки по компактен и съгласуван начин. От друга страна, обобщаването на базата на заявка подчертава онези точки, които са от значение в контекста на дадена заявка. Парадигмата за кодиране-присъствие-декодиране постига забележителен успех в машинния превод, екстрактивното обобщаване, диалоговите системи и др., но страда от недостатъка на генерирането на повтарящи се фрази. В тази работа предлагаме модел за задача за обобщаване на базата на заявка, базирана на парадигмата кодиране-присъствие-декодиране с две ключови допълнения (i) модел на внимание на заявката (в допълнение към модела на внимание на документа), който се научава да се фокусира върху различни части от заявката в различни етапи от времето (вместо да използва статично представяне за заявката) и (ii) нов модел на внимание, базиран на разнообразие, който има за цел да облекчи проблема с повтарящите се фрази в резюмето. За да позволим тестването на този модел, ние въвеждаме нов набор от данни за обобщаване, базиран на заявка, базиран на дебатепедия. Нашите експерименти показват, че с тези две допълнения предложеният модел очевидно превъзхожда ваниловите кодове, присъстващи и декодирани модели с увеличение от 28% (абсолютно) в оценките на ROUGE-L.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa kidini unalenga kutengeneza toleo fupi la nyaraka linalohusu vituo vyote vya mauzo katika mfumo wa makubaliano na pamoja. Kwa upande mwingine, muhtasari wa utafiti unaonyesha pointi hizo zinazohusiana katika muktadha wa swali lililopewa. Mfano wa kuweka taarifa za kodi umefanikiwa kwa mafanikio makubwa katika tafsiri ya mashine, muhtasari wa kiuchumi, mfumo wa mazungumzo na kadhalika. Lakini inaumia kutokana na uzalishaji wa maneno yanayorudiwa. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza mfano wa juhudi la muhtasari lililoko kwenye utafiti kulingana na upande wa kodi-decode na kuongezea miwili muhimu (i) modeli ya utafiti wa maswali (pamoja na modeli ya maoni ya dokumentari) ambayo inajifunza kuchekeza kwenye sehemu mbalimbali za utafiti katika hatua tofauti za wakati (badala ya kutumia uwakilishi wa takwimu kwa ajili ya swali) na (ii) model mpya ya mitazamo inayohusiana na utafiti ambao lengo la kupunguza tatizo la kurudia maneno katika kipindi cha muhtasari. Ili kuwezesha jaribio la mtindo huu tunaanzisha taarifa mpya ya muhtasari wa utafiti katika jengo la mjadala wa mijadala. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa, kwa kuongezea hizi mbili zilizopendekezwa, mifano hiyo inaonyesha wazi inaonyesha mifano ya kuweka kumbukumbu ya ukomo wa kimaadili kwa kiwango cha asilimia 28 (sawa kabisa) katika vipindi vya ROUGE-L.', 'ko': '요약 요약의 목적은 모든 요점을 치밀하고 일관되게 포함하는 짧은 버전의 파일을 만드는 것이다.다른 한편, 조회의 요약을 바탕으로 주어진 조회의 상하문과 관련된 요점을 강조했다.인코딩-디코딩 모델은 기계 번역, 요약 추출, 대화 시스템 등에서 현저한 성공을 거두었지만 중복된 단어를 생성하는 단점이 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 인코딩-참여-디코딩 모델을 바탕으로 하는 조회 기반의 요약 임무 모델을 제시했다. 그 중에서 두 가지 관건을 추가했다. (i) 하나의 조회 주의 모델(문서 주의 모델 제외), 이 모델은 서로 다른 시간에 조회의 다른 부분(조회의 정적 표시를 사용하지 않음)과 (ii)의 새로운 다양성을 바탕으로 하는 주의 모델, 이 모델 학습에 집중되었다.요약에서 반복되는 구문 문제를 완화하도록 설계되었습니다.이 모델을 테스트할 수 있도록, 우리는 새로운 조회 기반 요약 데이터 집합을 도입했는데, 이 데이터 집합은 DeBate Media에 구축되었다.우리의 실험에 의하면 이 두 가지 첨가를 통해 제시된 모델은 바닐라 코딩-코딩 모델보다 현저히 우수하고 연지-L 점수에서 28%(절대)의 이익을 얻었다.', 'id': 'Penapisan abstraktif bermaksud untuk menghasilkan versi pendek dokumen yang meliputi semua titik penting dalam cara kompakt dan konsisten. Di sisi lain, perhatian berdasarkan pertanyaan memperlihatkan titik-titik yang relevan dalam konteks pertanyaan tertentu. The encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of generation of repeated phrases.  Dalam pekerjaan in i kami mengusulkan model untuk tugas perhatian berdasarkan pertanyaan berdasarkan paradigm a kode-attend-decode dengan dua tambahan kunci (i) model perhatian pertanyaan (selain model perhatian dokumen) yang belajar fokus pada berbagai bagian dari pertanyaan pada langkah waktu yang berbeda (selain menggunakan represisi statis untuk pertanyaan) dan (ii) model perhatian berbagai jenis yang baru berdasarkan bermaksud mengurangi masalah mengulangi frasa dalam ringkasan. Untuk memungkinkan pengujian model ini kami memperkenalkan sebuah dataset ringkasan berdasarkan pertanyaan yang baru bangun pada debatepedia. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa dengan dua tambahan ini model yang diusulkan jelas melampaui batas model vanilla encode-attend-decode dengan keuntungan 28% (mutlak) dalam skor ROUGE-L.', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw toplanty senediň gysga sürümini kompleks we möhüm şeklinde örän süýşikli noktalaryny bejermek amaçlary. Diňe tarapyndan, sorag tabanly sumlaýyşy berilen soragyň kontekstinde baglanýan noktalary ýagtylamaky mümkin edýär. Otomatik terjime, laýyk sistemalar we bölümlerde möhüm baýramlar çykyp biler. Emma bu ýerde tekrarlanan sözlerniň geri çekilmesinden bolar. Bu i şde biz sorag tabanly toparlama täblisiniň bir nusgasyny iki a ç ekleme täblisasynda tabanly kodla-attend-decode paradigm üçin bir nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris (i) sorag uzmanysynyň nusgasyna gollanmaky üçin farklı wagt adımlarda fokus etmegi öwrenýär (query üçin statik terjime etmek yerine) we (ii) täze näçe görnöşikli üns modeli. Işdirişde sözlerni gaýtalamak üçin meseläni azaltmak üçin amaçlarýar. Bu modeliniň synaglamasyny mümkin etmek üçin biz debipediýada täze bir query tabanly tertibleme datasyny guruldyrýarys. Biziň deneylerimiz bu iki eklemek bilen teklip eden nusgalaryň, ROUGE-L अ अ अंदर 28% (absolut) düzümlerinde vanilla kodlama nusgalarynyň üstüni çykarýandygyny görkez.', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری مطلوب هدف می\u200cدهد که نسخه کوتاه\u200cتر از سند را تولید کند که همه نقطه\u200cهای استفاده\u200cکننده را در یک شکل پیچیده و هماهنگ می\u200cکند. از طرف دیگر، جمع\u200cآوری بر پایه سوال\u200cها آن نقطه\u200cهایی را که در محیط یک سوال داده\u200cاند ارائه می\u200cدهد. پارادیگ\u200cهای کود-حاضر-دیکود در ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین، جمع\u200cآوری خارجی، سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ و غیر از این موفقیت مشخص شده است. ولی آن از بازگشت نسل جمله\u200cهای تکرار رنج می\u200cدهد. در این کار ما یک مدل برای عملیات جمع کردن بر پایه پارادیگ کودک-حاضر-دیکود با دو اضافه کلید (i) یک مدل توجه به سوال (علاوه بر مدل توجه به سند) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یاد می\u200cگیرد روی بخش\u200cهای مختلف از سوال در قدم\u200cهای زمان مختلف تمرکز کند هدف این است که مشکل تکرار کردن عبارت در جمع کمتر شود. برای اینکه آزمایش این مدل را فعال کنیم، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری جدید بر روی بحث\u200cپدیدگی معرفی می\u200cکنیم. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که با این دو اضافه\u200cها مدل پیشنهاد مشخصاً از مدل\u200cهای وینیلا\u200cای که در امتیاز\u200cهای ROUGE-L به سود 28% (مطلق) می\u200cرسد، قابل انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi abstraktiv synon të gjenerojë një version më të shkurtër të dokumentit që mbulon të gjitha pikat kryesore në një mënyrë kompakte dhe koherente. Nga ana tjetër, përmbledhje e bazuar në pyetje thekson ato pika që janë të rëndësishme në kontekstin e një pyetje të caktuar. Paradigma e kodifikimit-pjesëmarrjes-dekodimit ka arritur sukses të rëndësishëm në përkthimin e makinave, përmbledhjen ekstraktive, sistemet e dialogut, etj. Por vuan nga dëmi i gjeneratës së frazave të përsëritura. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një model për detyrën e përmbledhjes bazuar në pyetje bazuar në paradigm ën e kodifikimit-pjesëmarrjes-dekodimit me dy shtime kyçe (i) një model vëmendjeje pyetjeje (përveç modelit të vëmendjes së dokumentit) që mëson të përqëndrohet në pjesë të ndryshme të pyetjes në hapa të ndryshme kohore (në vend të përdorimit të një përfaqësimi statik për pyetjen) dhe (ii) një model të ri vëmendjeje bazuar në diversitet që synon të lehtësojë problem in e përsëritjes së frazave në përmbledhje. Me qëllim që të mundësojmë testimin e këtij modeli ne futim një grup të ri të dhënash të përmbledhjes bazuar në pyetje që ndërton në debatepedia. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se me këto dy shtime modeli i propozuar ekziston qartë modelet vanilla encode-attend-decode me një fitim prej 28% (absolute) në rezultatet ROUGE-L.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በሌላው ክፍል፣ የተጠያየቁትን አቀማመጥ በተሰጠው ጥያቄ ውስጥ ያሉትን ነጥቦች ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ-አቀማመጥ ማተርጓሜ፣ የውጤት ማሳተሚያ፣ የጥያቄ ማቀናጃ፣ የጥያቄ ስርዓት እና ማህበረሰብ አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ በሁለት ቁልፎች ጨዋታ (i) የሚጠያየቅ ጥያቄ ሞዴል (ከሰነድ ጥያቄ ክፍል በቀር) በተለየ በተለየ ሰዓት ደረጃዎች ላይ የተጠቃሚ ክፍሎች ማምረጥ እና (ለጥያቄው ጥያቄ ክፍል ለመጠየቅ) እና (ii) አዲስ የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ጥያቄ ምሳሌ በመጠቀም የሚተማርከው በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ የንግግሮችን መቀነስ ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ሞዴል መሞከሪያ ለማስችል አዲስ የጥያቄ አዲስ የዳታዎችን ማሳተሚያ ማነሳትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን እነዚህን ሁለት ጨዋታ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በሮUGE-L scores ውስጥ 28% (ፈጽሞ) የሚጠቅመውን የvaniሊ የኮድድ-አካባቢ ሞዴል እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Abstraktiewe opsomming doel om 'n kortste weergawe van die dokument te genereer wat al die salient punte oordek in 'n kompakte en koherende modus. Op die ander kant verlig die punte wat relevant is in die konteks van 'n gegewe navraag. Die enkode-attend-decode paradigm het notaabele sukses in masjien vertaling, ekstraktiewe opsomming, dialoog stelsels, ens. Maar dit lyf van die teken van geslagte van herhaalde frase. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n model vir die navraag-gebaseerde opsomming taak gebaseer op die enkode-attend-decode paradigm met twee sleutel byvoegings (i) â\x80\x99n navraag aandag model (in addition to document attention model) wat leer om te fokus op verskillende dele van die navraag op verskillende tydstrappe (in plaas van gebruik van 'n statiese verskyning vir die navraag) en (ii) â\x80\x99n nuwe verskillende vers bepaal om die probleem van herhaal van frase in die opsomming te verminder. Om die toets van hierdie model te aktiveer, introduseer ons 'n nuwe navraag gebaseerde opsomming datastel gebou op debatepedia. Ons eksperimente wys dat met hierdie twee byvoegings die voorgestelde model duidelik uitvoer van vanilla encode-attend-decode modele met 'n verskaf van 28% (absoluut) in ROUGE-L skaars.", 'az': 'Abstraktiv təmizlənmə məqsədilə belədinin qısa bir versiyonu yaratmaq və kompakt və müvafiq şəkildə bütün salient nöqtələri örtünmək istəyir. Digər tərəfindən, sorğu-tabanlı təmizlənmə verilən sorğu-sualının məlumatında olan nöqtələri işıqlandırır. Kod-attend-decode paradigmi makinelərin çevirilməsində, ekstraktif təmizlənməsində, dialoglar sistemlərində və ya da başa düşdü. Lakin bu, yenidən təkrar sözlərin təkrarlanmasından başa düşdü. Bu i şlərdə biz cöcətlərin dəyişdirilməsi üçün model i təklif edirik ki, cöcətlərin dəyişdirilməsini müxtəlif vaxt adımlarında (query üçün statik göstərilməsi yerinə istifadə etmək üçün) və ii) yeni müxtəlif dəyişdirilməsi dəyişdirilməsi modeli ilə cöcətlərin dəyişdirilməsini öyrənir. məqsədilə sözlərin təkrarlanmasının problemini azaltmaq istəyir. Bu modelinin sınamasını qabilleştirmək üçün debatepediya üzerində yeni query tabanlı təmizləmə verilən qurma qurmasını tanıyırıq. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz bu iki əlavə ilə təklif edilmiş modellərin görünür ki, vanilla encode-decode modelləri ROUGE-L dərəcələrində 28% (absolut) dərəcələri ilə istifadə edir.', 'hy': 'Աբստրակտիվ համառոտագրությունը նպատակում է ստեղծել փաստաթղթի կարճ տարբերակը, որը կծածկում է բոլոր կարևոր կետերը համակտիվ և կոնկրետ կերպով: On the other hand, query-based summarization highlights those points that are relevant in the context of a given query.  Կոդե-մասնակցություն-կոդավորման պարադիգման մեքենայի թարգմանման, արտադրողական համառոտագրման, երկխոսային համակարգերի և այլն հաջողություն է հասել: Սակայն այն կրկնվող արտահայտությունների սերունդ է տառապում: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք հարցում հիմնված համառոտագրման առաջադրանքի մոդել, որը հիմնված է կոդե-մասնակցել-կոդե պարադիգմայի վրա երկու կարևոր ավելացումներով i) հարցում ուշադրության մոդել (բացի փաստաթղթի ուշադրության մոդելի), որը սովորում է կենտրոնանալ հարցում տարբեր մասերի վրա տարբեր ժամանակային քայլերում (հարցում ստատիկ ներկայացում օգտագործելու փոխարեն նպատակով է նվազեցնել համառոտագրության բացահայտումների խնդիրը: Այս մոդելի փորձարկումները հնարավորելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր հարցով հիմնված համառոտագրման տվյալների համակարգ, որը հիմնված է քննարկումների հիմքում: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս երկու ավելացումների միջոցով առաջարկված մոդելը ակնհայտորեն գերազանցում է վանիլիայի կոդե-մասնակցության-կոդե մոդելները, որն ավելացնում է 28 տոկոսով (բացարձակ) ROUGe-L-ի գն', 'bs': 'Abstraktivna sažetka cilja je da stvori kraća verzija dokumenta koja pokriva sve salijante to čke na kompaktnom i saslušnom načinu. S druge strane, sažetak na pitanju oslanja te tačke koje su relevantne u kontekstu određenog pitanja. Paradigma kodiranja-pristupnika-dekodiranja postigla je značajan uspjeh u prevodu strojeva, ekstraktivnom sažetku, dijalogskim sistemima itd. Ali pati od povlačenja generacije ponovnih fraza. U ovom poslu predlažemo model za rezimetiranje zadataka na osnovu zahtjeva temeljenog na paradigmu kodiranog pristupnika-dekodiranja s dvije ključne dodatke (i) model pažnje na zahtjev (uz model pažnje na dokumentima) koji nauči fokusirati se na različite dijelove zahtjeva na različitim vremenskim koracima (umjesto upotrebe statične predstave za zahtjev) i ii) novi model pažnje bazirani na raznolikosti koji cilj je smanjiti problem ponavljanja rečenica u sažetku. Da bismo omogućili testiranje ovog model a, predstavljamo novu skupinu podataka za rezimetiranje na pitanju na temelju debatipedije. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da sa ovim dvije dodatke predloženi model jasno iznosi modele za kodiranje vanile sa dodatkom od 28% (apsolutno) u rezultatima ROUGE-L.', 'ca': "La resumensió abstracta mira a generar una versió més curta del document que cobri tots els punts salients d'una manera compacta i coherent. D'altra banda, el resum basat en preguntes destaca els punts que són rellevants en el context d'una pregunta dada. The encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of generation of repeated phrases.  En aquesta feina proposem un model per a la tasca de resum basada en preguntes basada en el paradigma de codificació-asistència-decode amb dues afeccions clau: i) un model d'atenció a la pregunta (a més del model d'atenció documental) que aprenen a centrar-se en diferents porcions de la pregunta en diferents passos de temps (en lloc d'utilitzar una representació estática per la pregunta) i ii) un nou model d'atenció basat en la diversitat que aims to alleviate the problem of repeating phrases in the summary.  Per poder testar aquest model introduim un nou conjunt de dades de resum basat en preguntes basat en debatepedia. Els nostres experiments demostren que amb aquestes dues afeccions el model proposat supera clarament els models de codificació de vànilla amb un guany de 28% (absolut) en puntuacions ROUGE-L.", 'cs': 'Abstrakční shrnutí má za cíl vytvořit kratší verzi dokumentu, která pokrývá všechny významné body kompaktním a soudržným způsobem. Na druhou stranu shrnutí založené na dotazu zdůrazňuje body, které jsou relevantní v kontextu daného dotazu. Paradigma kódování-účast-dekódování dosáhlo pozoruhodného úspěchu v strojovém překladu, extraktivní shrnutí, dialogových systémech atd. Ale trpí nevýhodou generování opakovaných frází. V této práci navrhujeme model pro dotazovou souhrnnou úlohu založený na paradigmatu kódovat-docházet-dekódovat se dvěma klíčovými doplňky (i) model pozornosti dotazu (kromě modelu pozornosti dokumentu), který se učí zaměřit na různé části dotazu v různých časových krocích (namísto použití statické reprezentace pro dotaz) a (ii) nový model pozornosti založený na diverzitě založený na modelu pozornosti Cílem je zmírnit problém opakování frází v souhrnu. Abychom umožnili testování tohoto modelu, představujeme novou souhrnnou datovou sadu založenou na dotazech na debatepedii. Naše experimenty ukazují, že s těmito dvěma přídavky navržený model jasně předčí vanilkové kódování-docházka-dekódování modely s ziskem 28% (absolutní) v ROUGE-L skóre.', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmän tarkoituksena on luoda asiakirjasta lyhyempi versio, joka kattaa kaikki keskeiset kohdat tiiviisti ja johdonmukaisesti. Toisaalta kyselypohjainen yhteenveto korostaa niitä kohtia, jotka ovat merkityksellisiä tietyn kyselyn yhteydessä. Koodi-osallistu-dekoodi paradigma on saavuttanut huomattavaa menestystä konekäännöksessä, ekstraktiivisessa yhteenvedossa, dialogijärjestelmissä jne., mutta se kärsii toistuvien lauseiden tuottamisen haittatekijöistä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kyselyyn perustuvaa yhteenvetotehtävää koskevaa mallia, joka perustuu encode-attend-decode paradigmaan ja jossa on kaksi avainlisäystä (i) kyselyn huomiomalli (dokumentin huomiomallin lisäksi), joka oppii keskittymään kyselyn eri osiin eri aikavaiheissa (sen sijaan, että käytettäisiin staattista esitystä kyselyyn) ja (ii) uusi monimuotoisuuteen perustuva huomiomalli, joka tavoitteena on lieventää tiivistelmän lauseiden toistamista koskevaa ongelmaa. Mallin testaamisen mahdollistamiseksi esittelemme uuden kyselypohjaisen yhteenvetoaineiston, joka perustuu debatepediaan. Kokeet osoittavat, että näillä kahdella lisäyksellä ehdotettu malli suoriutuu selvästi vaniljan koodaus-läsnäolo-dekoodaamismalleista 28%:n voitolla ROUGE-L-pisteissä.', 'bn': 'আবত্ত্রিক সংক্ষেপের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি চুক্তি এবং সামান্য ফ্যাশনে যে সমস্ত ব্যবস্থাপনার বিন্দুকে ঢেকে রাখা হয়েছে তার সং অন্যদিকে, অনুসন্ধানের ভিত্তিক সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষিপ্ত বিন্দুগুলোকে উল্লেখ করে দেয়া হয়েছে যা একটি প্রশ্নের প্রেক্ এনকোড- অংশগ্রহণকারী - ডেকোড প্যারাডিম মেশিন অনুবাদ, এক্সটেক্টিভ সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ, ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম ইত্যাদি সফল হয়েছে। কিন্তু এটি প্রজন্মে এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি কোড-অংশগ্রহণ-ডেকোড প্যারাডিমের ভিত্তিতে প্রশ্নের ভিত্তিক সংক্রান্ত কাজের জন্য একটি মডেল (i) যা একটি অনুসন্ধানের মনোযোগ মডেল (নথির মনোযোগ মডেল ছাড়া) যা বিভিন্ন সময়ের প্রেক্ষাপগুলো গ্রীষ্মে বাক্য পুনরাবারের সমস্যা কমানোর উদ্দেশ্য। এই মডেলের পরীক্ষা সক্রিয় করার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন কোয়েরি ভিত্তিক সংক্ষেপের তথ্য বিন্যাসেট বিভাগে বিতর্ক পেডিয়ার উপর একটি নত আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই দুটি যোগ দিয়ে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল পরিষ্কার করে প্রস্তাবিত ভ্যানিলা কোড-অংশগ্রহণকারী মডেলের মাধ্যমে ২৮%', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtliku kokkuvõtte eesmärk on luua dokumendi lühem versioon, mis hõlmab kõiki olulisi punkte kompaktselt ja sidusalt. Teisest küljest toob päringupõhine kokkuvõte esile need punktid, mis on antud päringu kontekstis olulised. Kodeeri-osale-dekodeerimise paradigma on saavutanud märkimisväärset edu masintõlkes, ekstraktiivses kokkuvõttes, dialoogisüsteemides jne, kuid see kannatab korduvate fraaside genereerimise puuduse all. Käesolevas töös pakume välja päringupõhise kokkuvõtlusülesande mudeli, mis põhineb kodeerimise-osalemise-dekodeerimise paradigmal kahe võtmetäiendusega (i) päringu tähelepanu mudel (lisaks dokumendi tähelepanu mudelile), mis õpib keskenduma päringu erinevatele osadele erinevatel ajasammudelitel (selle asemel, et kasutada päringu staatilist esitust) ja (ii) uus mitmekesisuspõhine tähelepanu mudel, mis eesmärk on leevendada kokkuvõttes esitatud lausete kordamise probleemi. Selle mudeli testimise võimaldamiseks tutvustame uut päringupõhist kokkuvõtlusandmekogumit, mis põhineb debatepedial. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et nende kahe täiendusega ületab kavandatud mudel selgelt vanilje kodeerimise-osalemise-dekodeerimise mudeleid, saavutades ROUGE-L skoori 28% (absoluutse) võimsuse.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan absolute Digawe "kode-partite-decode" In this job we proposal a model for the query-bazed sumalization task bazed on the decode-parti-decode paradigm with 2 key Additions (i) a query atenation model (in Addition to document atenation model) that Learns to Focal on Variable parts of the query at Variable time phases (instead of use a Statc representation for the query) and (i i) a new multi-reference model that InsertInsert" [Entry] "at the beginning Digawe bisa ngubah ujian sisal model iki, kita ngemulai perusahaan dataset sing gagale batir dhéwé online Awak dhéwé éntuk perperusahaan karo nambah iki dadi nambah sing bisa perusahaan model sing nyimpen karo perusahaan', 'ha': "@ action: button Ga da wani gefen, surori mai bassi da aka tambaya yana ƙayyade waɗannan points da ke da amfani da cikin muhimman tambayar da aka ba. @ info: whatsthis Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani motali na aikin kurarin wanda aka bazata wajen canza-kode-kodi da shiryoyin biyu maɓalli (i) da wata motel wa muhalli masu tambaya (da kuma, a ƙara da misãlin muhalli masu nuna ko dokuman) wanda za'a yi amfani da fokus a kan rabo-rabo na daban-daban tambayar (kuma ba mu yi amfani da wani tsarin static wa tambayar) da wata motel na daban-daban-daban-daban-daban Yana nufin ya sauƙaƙara matsayin da za'a dubu magana a ƙara. In order to enable the testing of this model we introduce a new query-based summarization dataset building on debatepedia.  Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa, da waɗannan biyu zaɓaniyar da aka buƙata, misalin ya fita bayani da misãlai-kode-kode-wanda ya yi amfani da 28% (cikakken) a cikin scorar RUGE-L.", 'he': 'המסכם המתוקף מכוון לייצר גרסה קצרה יותר של המסמך שמכסה את כל נקודות המפורסמות באופן חד ומתואם. מצד שני, סכם מבוסס על שאלות מרגיש את הנקודות הרלוונטיות בהקשר של שאלה מסוימת. פרדיגמה הקוד-השתתף-לפענוח השיגה הצלחה משמעותית בתרגום מכונות, בסדרה חיצונית, מערכות דיאלוגים וכו"כ. אך היא סובלת מהחסרות הדור של ביטויים חוזרים. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים מודל למשימת התשובה המבוססת על השאלות המבוססת על פרדיגמה קוד-присут-decode עם שתי תוספות מפתחיות (i) מודל תשומת לב לשאול (בנוסף למודל תשומת לב מסמכים) שמלמד להתמקד בחלקים שונים של השאלה בשלבים שונים של זמן (במקום להשתמש באמצעות מייצג סטטי עבור השאלה) ו מטרה להקל על הבעיה של משפטים חוזרים בסsummary. כדי לאפשר את הבדיקה של המודל הזה אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים מסוממת על שאלות חדשה בניין על דיברופדיה. Our experiments show that with these two additions the proposed model clearly outperforms vanilla encode-attend-decode models with a gain of 28% (absolute) in ROUGE-L scores.', 'sk': 'Cilj abstraktivnega povzetka je ustvariti krajšo različico dokumenta, ki zajema vse pomembne točke na kompakten in skladen način. Po drugi strani pa povzetek na podlagi poizvedbe poudarja tiste točke, ki so pomembne v kontekstu dane poizvedbe. Paradigma kodiranja-udeležba-dekodiranja je dosegla velik uspeh pri strojnem prevajanju, ekstraktivnem povzemanju, dialognih sistemih itd., vendar trpi zaradi pomanjkljivosti generacije ponavljajočih se fraz. V tem delu predlagamo model za nalogo povzetka poizvedbe, ki temelji na paradigmi kodiranja-udeležbe-dekodiranja z dvema ključnima dodatkoma (i) model pozornosti poizvedbe (poleg modela pozornosti dokumenta), ki se nauči osredotočati na različne dele poizvedbe v različnih časovnih korakih (namesto uporabe statične reprezentacije za poizvedbo) in (ii) nov model pozornosti, ki temelji na raznolikosti Namen tega je olajšati problem ponavljanja stavkov v povzetku. Da bi omogočili testiranje tega modela, smo predstavili nov poizvedbeni nabor podatkov o povzetku, ki temelji na debatepediji. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da predlagani model s teh dvema dodatkoma jasno presega vanilijeve kodiranje-udeležba-dekodiranje modelov z 28% (absolutno) povečanjem ROUGE-L rezultatov.', 'bo': 'Abstractive summarization aims to generate a shorter version of the document covering all the salient points in a compact and coherent fashion. ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་བཅུད་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་རྣམས་མཐོང་བྱེད་འདུག The encode-attend-decode paradigm has achieved notable success in machine translation, extractive summarization, dialog systems, etc. But it suffers from the drawback of generation of repeated phrases. In this work we propose a model for the query-based summarization task based on the encode-attend-decode paradigm with two key additions (i) a query attention model (in addition to document attention model) which learns to focus on different portions of the query at different time steps (instead of using a static representation for the query) and (ii) a new diversity based attention model which དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་བཅུད་དོན་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཚིག་རྐང་བསྐྱར་ཡོད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གཏོང་བྱེད། དབྱེ་རིགས་འདིའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་ང་ཚོར Our experiments show that with these two additions the proposed model clearly outperforms vanilla encode-attend-decode models with a gain of 28% (absolute) in ROUGE-L scores.'}
{'en': 'Get To The Point : Summarization with Pointer-Generator Networks', 'pt': 'Vá direto ao ponto: sumarização com redes de gerador de ponteiro', 'ar': 'الوصول إلى النقطة المهمة: التلخيص مع شبكات Pointer-Generator', 'es': 'Ir al grano: resumen con redes de generadores de punteros', 'fr': 'Allez droit au but\xa0: Récapitulatif avec les réseaux pointeur-générateur', 'ja': '要点を突き止める：ポインタジェネレータネットワークでの要約', 'zh': '切中要害:用指针生成器网络总结', 'hi': 'बिंदु पर जाओ: सूचक-जनरेटर नेटवर्क के साथ Summarization', 'ru': 'Подведение итогов с помощью сетей Pointer-Generator', 'ga': 'Faigh Go Pointe: Achoimre le Líonraí Pointeoir-Ghineadóir', 'el': 'Πάρτε στο θέμα: Συνοπτική παρουσίαση με δίκτυα δεικτών-γεννήτριας', 'hu': 'Térj a pontra: Összefoglalás Pointer-Generator hálózatokkal', 'ka': 'მონიშნელი გენერატორიის ქსელებით გადასვლა:', 'it': 'Arrivare al punto: Sintesi con le reti Pointer-Generator', 'kk': 'Меңзер жасаушы желілерімен тұжырымдамасы:', 'mk': 'Дојди до точката: Резултат со мрежите за генерање на покажувачи', 'lt': 'Prieiti prie taško: santrauka su rodytuvų generatorių tinklais', 'ms': 'Dapatkan Ke Titik: Ringkasan dengan Rangkaian Penjana-Penuding', 'mt': 'Ikollok sal-Punt: Sommarju man-Netwerks tal-Puntaturi Ġeneraturi', 'mn': 'Нэг цэгт руу оч: Pointer-Generator сүлжээний нийлүүлэлт', 'ml': 'പോയിന്റിലേക്ക് പോകുക: പോയിന്റര്\u200d ജെനററേറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുമായി ചുരുക്കം', 'no': 'Hent til punktet: Samandrag med peikaregenereringsnettverk', 'pl': 'Dostań się do rzeczy: Podsumowanie za pomocą sieci wskaźników-generatorów', 'ro': 'Ajunge la punct: Rezumat cu rețelele Pointer-Generator', 'sr': 'Dođite do tačke: Summarizacija sa mrežama za generiranje pokazatelja', 'si': 'පොයින්ට් වෙනුවෙන්: සංකේතකය නිර්මාණකය සමග සංකේතය', 'so': 'Rugta Point: Summary with Pointer-Generator Network', 'ta': 'புள்ளிக்கு பெறு: சுருக்கம்- உருவாக்கி வலைப்பின்னல்களுடன் சுருக்கம்', 'sv': 'Kom till punkten: Sammanfattning med Pointer-Generator nätverk', 'ur': 'Pointer-Generator Networks کے ساتھ پوینٹ کی طرف جاؤ', 'uz': 'Yangi xat keldiComment', 'vi': 'Tới điểm chính: Tóm tắt với Hệ thống tìm số bộ phát số.', 'bg': 'Стигнете до точката: обобщаване с мрежи за генериране на показатели', 'nl': 'Get To The Point: Samenvatting met Pointer-Generator Netwerken', 'da': 'Kom til punktet: Resumé med Pointer-Generator netværk', 'hr': 'Dođite do točke: Summarizacija sa mrežama proizvođača pokazatelja', 'ko': '핵심: 포인터 생성기 네트워크를 사용하여 요약', 'de': 'Get To The Point: Zusammenfassung mit Pointer-Generator Netzwerken', 'id': 'Pergi ke titik: Ringkasan dengan Rangkaian Penunjuk-Generator', 'fa': 'بروید به نقطه: جمع کردن با شبکه\u200cهای تولید نقاشی', 'af': 'Kry na die punt: Opsomming met wyser- Genereerder Netwerke', 'tr': "Nokta'ya git: İmleç Üretici Ağlarıyla Toplaşum", 'sw': 'Nenda kwenye Point: Ujumbe wa muhtasari na Mtandao wa Mtengenezaji', 'sq': 'Shko tek pika: përmbledhje me rrjetet e gjeneratorit të piktorëve', 'am': 'ማጠቃለያ ከPointer-Generator Network', 'hy': 'Գնալ դեպի կետ. համառոտագրություն կետերի-գեներատորի ցանցերի հետ', 'bn': 'বিন্দুতে যাও: পয়েন্টার- জেনারেটর নেটওয়ার্কের সারসংক্ষেপ', 'az': 'Nöqtəyə get: İşaretçi-Generator Ağları ilə toplama', 'bs': 'Dođite do točke: Summarizacija sa mrežama za generiranje pokazatelja', 'ca': 'Llavors al punt: Resumen les xarxes de generador de punts', 'et': 'Mine punkti juurde: kokkuvõte Pointer-Generator võrkudega', 'cs': 'Dostaňte se k věci: Shrnutí pomocí sítí ukazového generátoru', 'fi': 'Siirry asiaan: Yhteenveto Pointer Generator Networks -verkostojen avulla', 'jv': 'Get to The Point: Cummarition with cursor-Genertor networks', 'he': 'הגיע לנקודה: סדרה עם רשתות גינרטור נקודות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Pridi do točke: Povzetek z omrežji kazalcev-generatorjev', 'bo': 'Get to The Point: Summarization with Pointer-Generator Networks'}
{'en': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models have provided a viable new approach for abstractive text summarization (meaning they are not restricted to simply selecting and rearranging passages from the original text). However, these models have two shortcomings : they are liable to reproduce factual details inaccurately, and they tend to repeat themselves. In this work we propose a novel architecture that augments the standard sequence-to-sequence attentional model in two orthogonal ways. First, we use a hybrid pointer-generator network that can copy words from the source text via pointing, which aids accurate reproduction of information, while retaining the ability to produce novel words through the generator. Second, we use coverage to keep track of what has been summarized, which discourages repetition. We apply our model to the CNN / Daily Mail summarization task, outperforming the current abstractive state-of-the-art by at least 2 ROUGE points.', 'ar': 'قدمت نماذج التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل نهجًا جديدًا قابلاً للتطبيق لتلخيص النص التجريدي (بمعنى أنها لا تقتصر على مجرد اختيار وإعادة ترتيب فقرات من النص الأصلي). ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه النماذج بها عيبان: فهي عرضة لإعادة إنتاج التفاصيل الواقعية بشكل غير دقيق ، وتميل إلى تكرار نفسها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح بنية جديدة تزيد من نموذج الانتباه القياسي من التسلسل إلى التسلسل بطريقتين متعامدتين. أولاً ، نستخدم شبكة توليد مؤشرات هجينة يمكنها نسخ الكلمات من النص المصدر عبر التأشير ، مما يساعد على إعادة إنتاج المعلومات بدقة ، مع الاحتفاظ بالقدرة على إنتاج كلمات جديدة من خلال المولد. ثانيًا ، نستخدم التغطية لتتبع ما تم تلخيصه ، مما لا يشجع على التكرار. نطبق نموذجنا على مهمة تلخيص CNN / Daily Mail ، متفوقًا على أحدث التقنيات التجريدية الحالية بنقطتي ROUGE على الأقل.', 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales de secuencia a secuencia han proporcionado un nuevo enfoque viable para el resumen de textos abstractivos (lo que significa que no se limitan a seleccionar y reorganizar pasajes del texto original). Sin embargo, estos modelos tienen dos defectos: pueden reproducir datos fácticos de forma inexacta y tienden a repetirse. En este trabajo proponemos una arquitectura novedosa que aumenta el modelo atencional estándar de secuencia a secuencia de dos maneras ortogonales. En primer lugar, utilizamos una red híbrida de generadores de punteros que puede copiar palabras del texto fuente mediante señalamiento, lo que ayuda a la reproducción precisa de la información, al tiempo que conserva la capacidad de producir palabras novedosas a través del generador. En segundo lugar, utilizamos la cobertura para hacer un seguimiento de lo que se ha resumido, lo que desalienta la repetición. Aplicamos nuestro modelo a la tarea de resumen de CNN/Daily Mail, superando al actual estado de la técnica abstractiva en al menos 2 puntos ROUGE.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de sequência a sequência neurais forneceram uma nova abordagem viável para resumo abstrato de texto (o que significa que eles não estão restritos a simplesmente selecionar e reorganizar passagens do texto original). No entanto, esses modelos têm duas deficiências: são propensos a reproduzir detalhes factuais de forma imprecisa e tendem a se repetir. Neste trabalho propomos uma nova arquitetura que aumenta o modelo atencional padrão sequência-a-sequência de duas maneiras ortogonais. Primeiro, usamos uma rede híbrida de ponteiro-gerador que pode copiar palavras do texto de origem por meio de apontamento, o que ajuda na reprodução precisa das informações, mantendo a capacidade de produzir novas palavras por meio do gerador. Em segundo lugar, usamos a cobertura para acompanhar o que foi resumido, o que desencoraja a repetição. Aplicamos nosso modelo à tarefa de sumarização CNN/Daily Mail, superando o atual estado da arte abstrato em pelo menos 2 pontos ROUGE.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux séquence-à-séquence ont fourni une nouvelle approche viable pour la synthèse de textes abstraits (ce qui signifie qu'ils ne se limitent pas à la simple sélection et à la réorganisation des passages du texte original). Cependant, ces modèles présentent deux inconvénients\xa0: ils sont susceptibles de reproduire des détails factuels de manière inexacte et ils ont tendance à se répéter. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle architecture qui augmente le modèle d'attention séquence-séquence standard de deux manières orthogonales. Tout d'abord, nous utilisons un réseau hybride pointeur-générateur qui peut copier des mots du texte source par pointage, ce qui facilite la reproduction précise des informations, tout en conservant la capacité de produire de nouveaux mots via le générateur. Deuxièmement, nous utilisons la couverture pour suivre ce qui a été résumé, ce qui décourage les répétitions. Nous appliquons notre modèle à la tâche de synthèse CNN/Daily Mail, surpassant l'état actuel de la technologie abstraite d'au moins 2 points ROUGE.", 'ja': 'ニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、抽象的なテキストの要約のための実行可能な新しいアプローチを提供してきた（つまり、それらは単に元のテキストからのパッセージを選択し、再配置することに限定されない）。しかし、これらのモデルには2つの欠点があります。事実の詳細を不正確に再現する可能性があり、繰り返す傾向があります。この作品では、標準的なシーケンス間注目モデルを2つの直交する方法で拡張する新規アーキテクチャを提案します。まず、ポインティングを介してソーステキストから単語をコピーできるハイブリッドポインタジェネレータネットワークを使用します。これは、情報の正確な再現を支援すると同時に、ジェネレータを介して新規の単語を生成する能力を保持します。第二に、カバレッジを使用して要約された内容を追跡し、繰り返しを抑制します。当社は、CNN/デイリーメールの要約タスクに当社のモデルを適用し、現在の抽象的な最先端のルージュポイントを少なくとも2ポイント上回っています。', 'zh': '神经序象本摘要供一可行之法(非唯简于始重新排列段落)也。 然有二短:其易失而复见者,往往而复之。 于此一新架构,当架构以二正交增其序。 先用混合指生成器网络,网络可指源文本复制单词,此有助于确复制信息,兼存生成器生新单词之力也。 其次,吾以覆盖率迹之,不劝复也。 吾以吾法施于CNN / Daily Mail摘要务,少于抽象之术2 ROUGE。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल ने अमूर्त पाठ सारांशीकरण के लिए एक व्यवहार्य नया दृष्टिकोण प्रदान किया है (जिसका अर्थ है कि वे मूल पाठ से मार्ग ों को चुनने और पुनर्व्यवस्थित करने तक सीमित नहीं हैं)। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों में दो कमियां हैं: वे तथ्यात्मक विवरणों को गलत तरीके से पुन: पेश करने के लिए उत्तरदायी हैं, और वे खुद को दोहराते हैं। इस काम में हम एक उपन्यास वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो मानक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम चौकस मॉडल को दो ओर्थोगोनल तरीकों से बढ़ाता है। सबसे पहले, हम एक हाइब्रिड पॉइंटर-जनरेटर नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हैं जो पॉइंटिंग के माध्यम से स्रोत पाठ से शब्दों की प्रतिलिपि बना सकता है, जो जनरेटर के माध्यम से उपन्यास शब्दों का उत्पादन करने की क्षमता को बनाए रखते हुए जानकारी के सटीक प्रजनन में सहायता करता है। दूसरा, हम कवरेज का उपयोग संक्षेप में क्या किया गया है, जो पुनरावृत्ति को हतोत्साहित करता है, का ट्रैक रखने के लिए करते हैं। हम सीएनएन / डेली मेल सारांशीकरण कार्य के लिए अपने मॉडल को लागू करते हैं, कम से कम 2 रूज बिंदुओं द्वारा वर्तमान अमूर्त राज्य-के-कला से आगे निकलते हैं।', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели последовательности к последовательности обеспечили жизнеспособный новый подход к абстрактному обобщению текста (то есть они не ограничиваются простым выбором и перестановкой отрывков из исходного текста). Однако эти модели имеют два недостатка: они способны неточно воспроизводить фактические детали, и они, как правило, повторяются. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую архитектуру, которая дополняет стандартную модель внимания последовательности к последовательности двумя ортогональными способами. Во-первых, мы используем гибридную сеть указатель-генератор, которая может копировать слова из исходного текста через указатель, что помогает точному воспроизведению информации, сохраняя при этом возможность создавать новые слова через генератор. Во-вторых, мы используем охват для отслеживания того, что было обобщено, что препятствует повторению. Мы применяем нашу модель к задаче суммирования CNN / Daily Mail, опережая текущее абстрактное состояние как минимум на 2 пункта ROUGE.', 'ga': 'Chuir samhlacha néaracha seicheamh-go-seicheamh cur chuige nua inmharthana ar fáil maidir le hachoimriú teibí téacs (rud a chiallaíonn nach bhfuil siad teoranta do sleachta as an mbuntéacs a roghnú agus a atheagrú). Mar sin féin, tá dhá easnamh ag na samhlacha seo: tá siad faoi dhliteanas sonraí fíorasacha a atáirgeadh go mícheart, agus tá claonadh acu iad féin a athrá. Sa saothar seo molaimid ailtireacht úrnua a chuireann leis an múnla caighdeánach airdeach seicheamh-go-seicheamh ar dhá bhealach orthogonal. Ar an gcéad dul síos, bainimid úsáid as líonra hibrideach pointeoir-ghineadóir atá in ann focail a chóipeáil ón téacs foinse trí phointeáil, rud a chabhraíonn le atáirgeadh cruinn faisnéise, agus an cumas ag an am céanna focail úra a tháirgeadh tríd an gineadóir. Ar an dara dul síos, bainimid úsáid as clúdach chun súil a choinneáil ar a bhfuil achoimre déanta air, rud a dhíspreagann athrá. Cuirimid ár múnla i bhfeidhm ar thasc achoimrithe CNN / Daily Mail, ag déanamh níos fearr ná an stát teibí reatha le 2 phointe ROUGE ar a laghad.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური ტექსტის სიმბოლოებისთვის ნეიროლური სიმბოლოებისთვის მოდელები დაახლოებით ახალი პროგორმაცია (ეს ნიშნავს, რომ ისინი არ დავუდგენია მხოლოდ ორიველური ტექსტიდან გა მაგრამ, ეს მოდელები აქვს ორი შესაძლებლობა: ისინი შეუძლებელია ფაქტიური დეტალების შესაძლებლობა არასწორად გავამრავლოთ, და ისინი თავიდან გავამრავლებენ. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პრომენტური აქტიქტიქტიკური პროგრამეტში, რომელიც სტანდარტური სერექტიკური მოდელს ორ ორტოდონალური გაზრუნდება. პირველად, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ჰიბრიდის მონექტორის გენერატორის ქსელის, რომელიც შეიძლება წერტილის ტექსტიდან სიტყვების კოპორტირება, რომელიც ინფორმაციის წარმოადგენის მარტივი გამოყენება, რო მეორე, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი, რომელიც განხორცის განხორციას. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს CNN / Daily Mail summarization Task-ზე დავყენებთ, რომელიც მიმდინარე აბსტრაქტიგური სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატის', 'hu': 'A neurális szekvencia-sorrend modellek életképes új megközelítést nyújtottak az absztraktív szövegösszefoglaláshoz (azaz nem korlátozódnak az eredeti szövegből való egyszerű kiválasztásra és átrendezésre). Ezeknek a modelleknek azonban két hiányossága van: hajlamosak a tényszerű részleteket pontatlanul reprodukálni, és hajlamosak megismételni magukat. Ebben a munkában olyan új architektúrát javasolunk, amely két ortogonális módon bővíti a standard szekvencia-szekvencia figyelemmodellt. Először is olyan hibrid mutató-generátor hálózatot használunk, amely mutatással képes szavakat másolni a forrásszövegből, ami segíti az információk pontos reprodukálását, miközben megtartja a generátoron keresztül új szavak előállítását. Másodszor, lefedettséget használunk arra, hogy nyomon kövessük az összefoglalt dolgokat, ami elriasztja az ismétlést. Modellünket a CNN / Daily Mail összefoglaló feladatra alkalmazzuk, legalább 2 ROUGE ponttal felülmúlva a jelenlegi absztraktív állapotot.', 'el': 'Νευρικά μοντέλα αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας έχουν παράσχει μια βιώσιμη νέα προσέγγιση για την αφηρημένη σύνοψη κειμένου (που σημαίνει ότι δεν περιορίζονται στην απλή επιλογή και αναδιάταξη αποσπασμάτων από το αρχικό κείμενο). Ωστόσο, αυτά τα μοντέλα έχουν δύο ελλείψεις: είναι πιθανό να αναπαράγουν ανακριβή στοιχεία και τείνουν να επαναλαμβάνονται. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική που ενισχύει το πρότυπο μοντέλο προσοχής ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας με δύο ορθογώνιους τρόπους. Πρώτον, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα υβριδικό δίκτυο δείκτη-γεννήτριας που μπορεί να αντιγράψει λέξεις από το αρχικό κείμενο μέσω του δείκτη, το οποίο βοηθά στην ακριβή αναπαραγωγή πληροφοριών, διατηρώντας παράλληλα την ικανότητα παραγωγής νέων λέξεων μέσω της γεννήτριας. Δεύτερον, χρησιμοποιούμε την κάλυψη για να παρακολουθούμε τι συνοψίστηκε, πράγμα που αποθαρρύνει την επανάληψη. Εφαρμόζουμε το μοντέλο μας στην εργασία σύνοψης της καθημερινής αλληλογραφίας, ξεπερνώντας την τρέχουσα αφηρημένη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας κατά τουλάχιστον δύο σημεία.', 'it': "I modelli sequenza-sequenza neurale hanno fornito un nuovo approccio praticabile per la sintesi astratta del testo (nel senso che non si limitano alla semplice selezione e riorganizzazione dei passaggi dal testo originale). Tuttavia, questi modelli presentano due carenze: sono suscettibili di riprodurre i dettagli fattuali in modo impreciso e tendono a ripetersi. In questo lavoro proponiamo una nuova architettura che aumenta il modello standard di attenzione sequenza-sequenza in due modi ortogonali. In primo luogo, utilizziamo una rete ibrida puntatore-generatore che può copiare parole dal testo sorgente tramite puntamento, che aiuta la riproduzione accurata delle informazioni, pur mantenendo la capacità di produrre parole nuove attraverso il generatore. In secondo luogo, usiamo la copertura per tenere traccia di ciò che è stato riassunto, che scoraggia la ripetizione. Applichiamo il nostro modello al compito di sintesi CNN / Daily Mail, superando lo stato astratto attuale dell'arte di almeno 2 punti ROUGE.", 'lt': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models have provided a viable new approach for abstractive text summarization (meaning they are not restricted to simply selecting and rearranging passages from the original text).  Tačiau šie modeliai turi du trūkumus: jie gali neteisingai atskleisti faktinius duomenis ir paprastai pasikartoti. Šiame darbe siūlome naują architektūrą, kuri dviem ortogonaliais būdais padidintų standartinį sekos-sekos dėmesio model į. Pirma, mes naudojame hibridinį indikatorių generatorių tinklą, kuris gali kopijuoti žodžius iš išorinio teksto nurodydamas, kuris padeda tiksliai atkurti informaciją, kartu išlaikydamas galimybę per generatorių gaminti naujus žodžius. Antra, mes naudojame aprėptį, kad stebėtume tai, kas apibendrinta, ir tai atgraso nuo kartojimo. Mes taikome savo model į CNN / Daily Mail santraukos uždaviniui, dabartinę abstrakcinę pažangą viršijant mažiausiai 2 ROUGE punktais.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്രഞ്ചില്\u200d നിന്നും സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ മാറ്റം ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു (അതിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം മൂലപ്രകാരം  എന്നാലും ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ടു കുഴപ്പമുണ്ട്: യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പുനരുത്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരവാദിത്തമാണ്,  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധാരണ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിനെ രണ്ട് ഓര്\u200dടോഗോണിയല്\u200d വഴികള ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് പോയിന്റര്\u200d ജെന്ററര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് സ്രോതസ്സ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d  രണ്ടാമത്തേത്, നമ്മള്\u200d കേപ്പറേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ചുരുക്കിയിട്ടുള്ളതിനെ സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d, അത് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സിഎന്\u200d/ഡെയിലി മെയില്\u200d ചുരുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലിയിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന അസ', 'ms': 'Model jujukan-ke-jujukan saraf telah menyediakan pendekatan baru yang boleh dijalankan untuk pengringkasan teks abstraktif (bermakna ia tidak diharamkan untuk hanya memilih dan mengatur semula laluan dari teks asal). Namun, model-model ini mempunyai dua kekurangan: ia berkemungkinan untuk mengembalikan perincian fakta dengan tidak tepat, dan mereka cenderung untuk mengulangi diri mereka sendiri. Dalam kerja ini kami melamar arkitektur baru yang menambah model perhatian rangkaian-ke-rangkaian piawai dalam dua cara ortogonal. Pertama, kita menggunakan rangkaian penunjuk-generator hibrid yang boleh salin perkataan dari teks sumber melalui penunjuk, yang membantu penyembahan maklumat yang tepat, sementara menyimpan kemampuan untuk menghasilkan perkataan baru melalui penjana. Kedua, kami menggunakan penyamaran untuk mengikuti apa yang telah dikumpulkan, yang menghina pengulangan. Kami melaksanakan model kami untuk tugas ringkasan mel CNN / Daily Mail, melampaui keadaan abstraktif semasa dengan sekurang-kurangnya 2 titik ROUGE.', 'mt': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models have provided a viable new approach for abstractive text summarization (meaning they are not restricted to simply selecting and rearranging passages from the original text).  However, these models have two shortcomings: they are liable to reproduce factual details inaccurately, and they tend to repeat themselves.  F’dan ix-xogħol qed nipproponu arkitettura ġdida li żżid il-mudell standard ta’ attenzjoni minn sekwenza għal sekwenza b’żewġ modi ortogonali. L-ewwel nett, a ħna nużaw netwerk ibridu tal-ġeneratur tal-puntaturi li jista’ jikkopja l-kliem mit-test tas-sors permezz tal-punteġġ, li jgħin ir-riproduzzjoni preċiża tal-informazzjoni, filwaqt li nżammu l-kapaċità li jipproduċu kliem ġdid permezz tal-ġeneratur. It-tieni nett, aħna nużaw kopertura biex inżommu t-traċċa ta’ dak li ġie sommarjat, li jiskoraġġixxi r-repetizzjoni. Aħna napplikaw il-mudell tagħna għall-kompitu ta’ sommarju tas-CNN/Daily Mail, li jaqbeż l-aħħar avvanz astrattiv attwali b’mill-inqas 2 punti ROUGE.', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн дарааллаас дарааллаар шинэ арга загвар нь abstractive text summarization гэх мэт шинэ арга загвар өгсөн (үүнийг анхны текстээс зөвхөн загварыг сонгож, дахин загварчлахад хязгаарлагдахгүй гэсэн үг юм). Гэхдээ эдгээр загварууд хоёр алдагдлыг харуулдаг. Тэд үнэндээ тухайн тодорхойлолт буруу үржүүлэх боломжтой. Тэд өөрсдийгөө давтаж чаддаг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид стандарт дарааллаас хоёр ортогон аргаар удирдлагатай загварыг нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ архитектур санал өгдөг. Эхлээд, бид эх үүсвэрийн текстээс үгийг хуулбарлаж чадна. Энэ нь мэдээллийн зөв үржүүлэхэд тусалж чадна. Хоёрдугаар, бид давтамжлалтыг зогсоохын тулд мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг CNN/Daily Mail-ын цуглуулалтын ажилд хэрэглэдэг. Одоогийн abstractive state-of-the-art-г хамгийн багахан 2 ROUGE цэгээр хийдэг.', 'mk': 'Неуралните модели од секвенца до секвенца обезбедија нов пристап за апстрактивна резултатација на текстот (што значи дека тие не се ограничени само на избор и реорганизација на премините од оригиналниот текст). Сепак, овие модели имаат две недостатоци: тие можат да ги репродуктираат фактичните детали неправилно и тие се повторуваат себеси. Во оваа работа предложуваме нова архитектура која го зголемува стандардниот модел на внимание од секвенца до секвенца на два ортогонални начини. Прво, користиме хибридна мрежа на генератори на покажувачи која може да копира зборови од изворот текст преку покажување, што помага во прецизната репродукција на информациите, при што ја задржува способноста да произведува нови зборови преку генераторот. Второ, користиме покривање за да го следиме она што е резимирано, што го одвратува повторувањето. Го применуваме нашиот модел на задачата за резултат на CNN / Daily Mail, надминувајќи ја актуелната апстрактивна техничка состојба со најмалку 2 ROUGE поени.', 'kk': 'Невралдық реттеу- мен реттеу үлгілері абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасының жаңа тұжырымдамасын келтірді (мәлімет, олар бастапқы мәтіннен пайдалануларды таңдау мен қайта орнату үшін шектелмейді). Бірақ бұл үлгілердің екі жеткізіліктері бар: олар дұрыс емес егжей- тегжейлерді қайталауға мүмкіндік береді, және олар өздерін қайталауға әсер етеді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз романдық архитектурасын ұсынамыз, стандартты реттеу мен реттеу үлгісін екі ортогоналдық түрде көтеретін. Біріншіден, біз көзінің мәтінінен сөздерді көшірмелеу арқылы, мәліметтің дұрыс репродукциясын көмектесетін, жасаушы арқылы жаңа сөздерді жасау мүмкіндігін сақтап тұрған гибрид меңзер генераторының Екіншіден, қайталануды бұғаттау үшін мәліметті қолданамыз. Біз моделімізді CNN / Daily Mail жинақтау тапсырмасына қолданып, назардағы абстрактивті орындау күйін кемінде 2 ROUGE нүктелеріне шешу үшін.', 'pl': 'Neuronowe modele sekwencji-sekwencji zapewniły realne nowe podejście do abstrakcyjnego podsumowania tekstu (co oznacza, że nie ograniczają się one do wyboru i przestawienia fragmentów tekstu oryginalnego). Modele te mają jednak dwie niedociągnięcia: mogą one nieprawidłowo odtwarzać szczegóły faktyczne i mają tendencję do powtarzania się. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nową architekturę, która rozszerza standardowy model uwagi sekwencji-sekwencji na dwa sposoby ortogonalne. Po pierwsze, używamy hybrydowej sieci wskaźnika-generatora, która może kopiować słowa z tekstu źródłowego poprzez wskazywanie, co pomaga dokładnej reprodukcji informacji, zachowując jednocześnie możliwość wytwarzania nowych słów za pośrednictwem generatora. Po drugie, używamy pokrycia, aby śledzić to, co zostało podsumowane, co zniechęca do powtarzania. Nasz model stosujemy do zadania podsumowywania CNN do Daily Mail, przewyższając obecny stan abstrakcyjny o co najmniej dwa punkty ROUGE.', 'no': 'Neuralsekvens- til- sekvensmodeller har tilgjengeleg ein nytt tilnærming for abstraktiv tekstsamansering (som tyder at dei ikkje er begrenset til å velja og ordna passar frå den opprinnelige teksten). Desse modelane har imidlertid to shortcomings: dei kan gjenoppretta faktiske detaljar uavhengig, og dei treng å gjenoppretta seg selv. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt arkitektur som aukar standardsrekkjefølgje til sekvens attentionalt modell på to orthogonale måtar. Først bruker vi eit hybrid- peikarenerator- nettverk som kan kopiera ord frå kjeldeteksten via peikaren, som hjelper nøyaktig reproduksjon av informasjon, medan du lagrar kapasiteten til å produsera novelle ord gjennom generatoren. Andre, bruker vi dekninga for å halda spor på det som er samansert, som avbrytar gjentakinga. Vi bruker modellen vårt til CNN / Daily Mail summarization task, som utfører den gjeldande abstraktive tilstanden av kunsten med minst 2 ROUGE punkt.', 'ro': 'Modelele secvență la secvență neurală au oferit o nouă abordare viabilă pentru rezumarea textului abstractiv (ceea ce înseamnă că nu se limitează la simpla selectare și rearanjare a pasajelor din textul original). Cu toate acestea, aceste modele prezintă două deficiențe: sunt susceptibile să reproducă inexact detaliile de fapt și tind să se repete. În această lucrare propunem o arhitectură nouă care mărește modelul standard de atenție secvență-secvență în două moduri ortogonale. În primul rând, folosim o rețea hibridă generatoare de pointer care poate copia cuvinte din textul sursă prin indicare, care ajută la reproducerea precisă a informațiilor, păstrând în același timp capacitatea de a produce cuvinte noi prin intermediul generatorului. În al doilea rând, folosim acoperirea pentru a ține evidența a ceea ce a fost rezumat, ceea ce descurajează repetarea. Aplicăm modelul nostru la sarcina de sintetizare CNN / Daily Mail, depășind actuala stare abstractivă cu cel puțin 2 puncte ROUGE.', 'so': "Tusaalada xilliga-xilliga waxaa laga keenay qaab cusub oo la suurtagal ah oo loo soo bandhigi karo qoraalka la'aanta (taas oo micneheedu aysan ku xadgudbin si kaliya looga doorto oo dib looga beddeliyo baasabooyinka asalka ah). Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalahan waxay leeyihiin laba cudur oo gaaban: waxaa waajib ah in ay dib u soo celiyaan macluumaad xaqiiq ah si khatar ah, waxayna isceliyaan. Shaqodaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa dhismo saxda ah oo ku kordhiya muusikada xiliga ah oo xiliga xiliga ah laba qaab oo habboon ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakad hibrid-pointer-generator, kaasoo ka koobi kara erayo laga qorayo qoraalka asalka ah, kaas oo u caawinaya soo saarista macluumaadka saxda ah, iyadoo sii haysta awoodda ku sameynta hadalka saxda ah ee dhaliyaha. Second, waxaynu isticmaalnaa dabool, si aan u sii soconno waxa lagu soo koobay, taasoo burburinaya dib u soo celinta. Tusaale ahaan waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa CNN/Daily Mail-summariisa, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa xaaladda la'aanta ah oo aad u samaysaneyso ugu yaraan 2 ROUGE goor.", 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල ක්\u200dරමණාව- to- sequence මෝඩේල්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශිත අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ලැබුනා (අදහස් වෙන්නේ ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය පැත්තෙන් පැත් නමුත්, මේ මොඩල් දෙන්නෙක් අවුලක් තියෙනවා: ඔවුන් ඇත්තටම විස්තර විස්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් ඔ මේ වැඩේ අපි නියම විද්\u200dයාපාරයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණික විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණික විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් අවධ මුලින්ම, අපි හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් පෙන්ටර් ජෙනේටර් ජාලයෙක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් වචනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වචනය පෙන්වන්න, ඒක පෙන්වන්න පුළ දෙවෙනියි, අපි ආවරණය පාවිච්චි කරනවා කියලා සම්පූර්ණය කරලා තියාගන්න, ඒකෙන් ආවරණය කරනවා. අපි අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක CNN / Daily mail සංශ්\u200dයාපනය වැඩකට ඇතුළත් කරනවා, දැන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් අඩුම 2 ROUGE පින්තූරෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථා', 'sv': 'Neural sekvens-till-sekvens modeller har gett ett livskraftigt nytt tillvägagångssätt för abstraktiv textsammanfattning (vilket innebär att de inte begränsas till att bara välja och ändra passager från originaltexten). Dessa modeller har dock två brister: de kan reproducera faktiska detaljer felaktigt och de tenderar att upprepa sig. I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny arkitektur som förstärker standardsekvens-till-sekvens uppmärksamhetsmodellen på två ortogonala sätt. För det första använder vi ett hybrid pekare-generatornätverk som kan kopiera ord från källtexten via pekande, vilket underlättar korrekt återgivning av information, samtidigt som vi behåller förmågan att producera nya ord genom generatorn. För det andra använder vi täckning för att hålla reda på vad som har sammanfattats, vilket motverkar upprepning. Vi tillämpar vår modell på CNN / Daily Mail sammanfattningsuppgift och överträffar nuvarande abstrakta state-of-the-art med minst 2 ROUGE poäng.', 'sr': 'Modeli neurološke sekvence do sekvence pružili su održivi novi pristup za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta (znači da nisu ograničeni samo izabrati i ponovno organizirati prolaze iz originalnog teksta). Međutim, ovi modeli imaju dva nedostatka: oni su odgovorni da nepravedno razmnožavaju činjenične detalje, a oni se obično ponavljaju. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja povećava standardni model pažnje na sekvencu na dva ortogonala način a. Prvo, koristimo hibridnu mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja može kopirati riječi iz izvornog teksta putem pokazivanja, koja pomaže to čnom reprodukcijom informacija, dok zadržavamo sposobnost proizvodnje novih reči kroz generator. Drugo, koristimo pokrivanje da pratimo ono što je sažeto, što ometa ponavljanje. Primjenjujemo naš model na sažetak CNN / Daily Mail zadatak, iznosi trenutno abstraktivno stanje umjetnosti najmanje 2 to čke ROUGE.', 'ur': 'نائرئرال سفارش-تا-سفارشی موڈل نے آب تراکٹیو ٹیکسٹ سفارش کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے (یعنی یہ صرف اوریل ٹیکسٹ سے مسافروں کو انتخاب کرنے اور دوبارہ تغییر کرنے کے لئے محدود نہیں ہیں)۔ لیکن ان نمائندوں کے لئے دو کمزوریں ہیں: وہ حقیقی جزئیات کو غلط طور پر دوبارہ پیدا کریں گے اور وہ اپنے آپ کو دوبارہ تکرار کریں گے۔ ہم اس کام میں ایک نوی معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو استاندارڈ سٹارڈ سے سٹارڈ کے ذریعہ دو اورٹوگونال طریقے سے اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ پہلی بار، ہم ایک ہیبریڈ پینٹر-جینراٹر نیٹ ورک استعمال کرتے ہیں جو سینٹر کے ذریعہ سے کلمات کو سینٹر کر سکتا ہے، جو سینٹر کے مطابق معلومات کی دقیق بازگشت کی مدد کرتی ہے، جرائٹر کے ذریعہ نو کلمات پیدا کرنے کی قابل دوسرا، ہم کاوٹ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اسے چھوڑ دیے جاتے ہیں جو دوبارہ تکرار کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے مدل کو CNN / Daily Mail summarization Task پر لازم کیا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ ذریعہ 2 ROUGE پوئنٹوں کے ذریعہ موجود abstractive state-of-the-art کو اضافہ کر رہے ہیں.', 'ta': 'புதிய தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகள் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட உரை சுருக்குதலுக்கு ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை அளித்துள்ளார்கள் (அதனால் அவை மட்டும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவும் மற் ஆனால், இந்த மாதிரிகளில் இரண்டு சிறிது குறைப்புகள் இருக்கின்றன: அவர்கள் உண்மையின் விவரங்களை சரியாக புதுப்பிக்க வேண்டும்,  In this work we propose a novel architecture that augments the standard sequence-to-sequence attentional model in two orthogonal ways.  முதலில், நாம் ஒரு ஹைப்ரி புள்ளியின் உருவாக்கி வலைப்பின்னலை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது மூல உரையிலிருந்து வார்த்தைகளை நகலெடுக்க முடியும், அது தகவல இரண்டாவது, நாம் மறைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி சுருக்கப்பட்டதை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அது திரும்ப திரும்ப நிறு நாங்கள் எங்கள் மாதிரியை CNN/Daily Mail சுருக்கும் பணிக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், தற்போதைய செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்படுத்தும் தற்போதைய செயல்படுத', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu modellarda ikkita qisqartmalar bor: ular haqiqiqiy detaljerni qayta qayta olish kerak, va ular o'zimni qaytadi. Bu ishda biz novel arxituvchisini tahrirlash talab qilamiz. Andoza seksirlik va seksirlik modelini ikkita orthogonal usulda qo'shish mumkin. Birinchisi, biz birinchi harfdagi harfr pochta- generator tarmoqdan foydalanamiz. Bu so'zlarni yangilash imkoniyatini yordamida nusxa olish mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz kichiklashtirilgan narsalarni saqlash uchun foydalanamiz. Bu qayta takrorlanishni istaydi. Biz modelimizni CNN/Kun Mail muhim vazifasiga qoʻllamiz. Joriy abstractiv holatni minimum ikki nuqta bilan bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Mẫu phân tử thần kinh đã cung cấp một phương pháp mới khả thi cho việc tổng hợp văn bản trừu tượng (nghĩa là chúng không chỉ cần chọn và sắp xếp đoạn từ văn bản gốc). Tuy nhiên, những mô hình này có hai thiếu sót: chúng có khả năng mô phỏng những chi tiết bằng chứng thiếu chính xác, và chúng có xu hướng lặp lại. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc mới nâng cao trình độ chú ý tiêu chuẩn của dãy-tới chuỗi bằng hai cách thẳng. Đầu tiên, chúng ta sử dụng một mạng lưới đèn rọi điện nhân tạo, có thể sao chép từ đoạn nguồn bằng cách chỉ, hỗ trợ việc sao chép chính xác thông tin, trong khi giữ lại khả năng tạo ra những từ mới qua máy phát điện. Thứ hai, chúng ta sử dụng việc che đậy để theo dõi những gì đã được tổng hợp, làm nản lòng tái diễn. Chúng tôi áp dụng mẫu của mình cho việc tổng kết thư tín CNN/ Daily, vượt quá khả năng thực hiện trạng thái trừu tượng của nghệ thuật bằng ít nhất hai điểm ROG.', 'nl': 'Neurale sequence-to-sequence modellen hebben een haalbare nieuwe benadering voor abstractieve tekstsamenvatting opgeleverd (wat betekent dat ze niet beperkt zijn tot het selecteren en herschikken van passages uit de oorspronkelijke tekst). Deze modellen hebben echter twee tekortkomingen: ze kunnen feitelijke details onnauwkeurig reproduceren en ze hebben de neiging zichzelf te herhalen. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe architectuur voor die het standaard sequence-to-sequence attentional model op twee orthogonale manieren aanvult. Ten eerste gebruiken we een hybride pointer-generator netwerk dat woorden uit de brontekst kan kopiëren via wijzen, wat een nauwkeurige reproductie van informatie helpt, terwijl de mogelijkheid behouden blijft om nieuwe woorden te produceren via de generator. Ten tweede gebruiken we dekking om bij te houden wat is samengevat, wat herhaling ontmoedigt. We passen ons model toe op de CNN of Daily Mail samenvattingstaak, waarbij we de huidige abstracte state-of-the-art met minstens twee ROUGE punten overtreffen.', 'da': 'Neurale sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller har givet en levedygtig ny tilgang til abstraktiv tekst resuméering (hvilket betyder, at de ikke er begrænset til blot at vælge og omarrangere passager fra den oprindelige tekst). Disse modeller har imidlertid to mangler: De er tilbøjelige til at gengive faktiske oplysninger unøjagtigt, og de har tendens til at gentage sig selv. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny arkitektur, der udvider standard sekvens-til-sekvens opmærksomhedsmodellen på to retvinklede måder. For det første bruger vi et hybrid pointer-generator netværk, der kan kopiere ord fra kildeteksten via pegning, hvilket hjælper med nøjagtig reproduktion af information, samtidig med at vi bevarer evnen til at producere nye ord gennem generatoren. For det andet bruger vi dækning til at holde styr på, hvad der er opsummeret, hvilket afskrækker gentagelser. Vi anvender vores model til CNN / Daily Mail opsummering opgave, der overgår den nuværende abstrakte state-of-the-art med mindst 2 ROUGE point.', 'id': 'Model rangkaian-ke-rangkaian saraf telah menyediakan pendekatan baru yang rentan untuk pengiraan teks abstraktif (artinya mereka tidak terbatas hanya untuk memilih dan mengatur ulang kalimat dari teks asli). Namun, model-model ini memiliki dua kekurangan: mereka mungkin mereproduksi rincian fakta dengan tidak tepat, dan mereka cenderung untuk mengulangi diri mereka sendiri. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan arsitektur baru yang meningkatkan model perhatian rangkaian-ke-rangkaian standar dalam dua cara ortogonal. Pertama, kita menggunakan jaringan penunjuk-generator hibrid yang dapat menyalin kata-kata dari teks sumber melalui penunjuk, yang membantu reproduksi akurat informasi, sementara memelihara kemampuan untuk menghasilkan kata-kata baru melalui generator. Kedua, kita menggunakan penyamaran untuk melacak apa yang telah tersingkatkan, yang menghina pengulangan. Kami menerapkan model kami untuk tugas ringkasan CNN / Daily Mail, melampaui keadaan abstraktif saat ini dengan setidaknya 2 titik ROUGE.', 'bg': 'Моделите от неврална последователност към последователност осигуряват жизнеспособен нов подход за абстрактно обобщаване на текста (което означава, че те не се ограничават само до избор и пренареждане на пасажи от оригиналния текст). Тези модели обаче имат два недостатъка: те са склонни да възпроизведат неточно фактически детайли и са склонни да се повтарят. В тази работа предлагаме нова архитектура, която увеличава стандартния модел на вниманието последователност към последователност по два правоъгълни начина. Първо, ние използваме хибридна мрежа показалец-генератор, която може да копира думи от изходния текст чрез насочване, което спомага за точното възпроизвеждане на информация, като същевременно запазва способността да произвежда нови думи чрез генератора. Второ, ние използваме покритие, за да следим какво е обобщено, което обезкуражава повторението. Прилагаме модела си към задачата за обобщаване на ежедневната поща, надминавайки сегашното абстрактно състояние на изкуството с поне 2 точки.', 'hr': 'Modeli neurološke sekvence do sekvence pružili su održivi novi pristup za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta (znači da nisu ograničeni samo izabrati i ponovno organizirati prolaze iz originalnog teksta). Međutim, ovi modeli imaju dvije nedostatke: oni su odgovorni da nepravedno reproduktuju činjenične detalje, a oni se obično ponavljaju. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja povećava standardni model pozornosti na dva ortogonalna način a. Prvo, koristimo hibridnu mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja može kopirati riječi iz izvornog teksta putem pokazivanja, koja pomaže to čnom reprodukcijom informacija, dok zadržavamo sposobnost proizvodnje novih riječi kroz generator. Drugo, koristimo pokrivanje kako bi pratili ono što je sažeto, što ometa ponavljanje. Primjenjujemo naš model na zadatak za sažetak CNN / Daily Mail, iznad trenutnog abstraktivnog stanja umjetnosti najmanje 2 to čke ROUGE.', 'de': 'Neurale Sequenzmodelle bieten einen praktikablen neuen Ansatz für die abstraktive Textzusammenfassung (d.h. sie beschränken sich nicht auf die einfache Auswahl und Neuanordnung von Passagen aus dem Originaltext). Diese Modelle weisen jedoch zwei Mängel auf: Sie können sachliche Details ungenau wiedergeben und neigen dazu, sich zu wiederholen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neuartige Architektur vor, die das Standard Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Aufmerksamkeitsmodell auf zwei orthogonale Arten erweitert. Zunächst verwenden wir ein hybrides Zeiger-Generator-Netzwerk, das Wörter aus dem Quelltext durch Zeigen kopieren kann, was die genaue Wiedergabe von Informationen unterstützt, während die Fähigkeit beibehalten wird, neue Wörter durch den Generator zu produzieren. Zweitens verwenden wir Coverage, um zu verfolgen, was zusammengefasst wurde, was Wiederholungen verhindert. Wir wenden unser Modell auf die Zusammenfassungsaufgabe CNN und Daily Mail an und übertreffen den aktuellen abstraktiven Stand der Technik um mindestens zwei ROUGE Punkte.', 'ko': '신경 서열에서 서열 모델까지는 추상적인 텍스트 요약에 새로운 방법을 제공할 수 있다. (이것은 단순히 원시 텍스트에서 단락을 선택하고 다시 배열하는 데 국한되지 않는다는 것을 의미한다.)그러나 이 모델들은 두 가지 단점이 있다. 그것은 사실의 세부 사항을 정확하게 재현하지 못할 뿐만 아니라, 종종 자신을 되풀이하기도 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 두 가지 정교한 방식으로 표준 서열에서 서열 주의 모델까지 강화하는 새로운 구조를 제시했다.우선, 우리는 혼합 포인터 생성기 네트워크를 사용하는데, 포인터를 통해 원본 텍스트에서 단어를 복제할 수 있으며, 이것은 정보를 정확하게 재현하는 데 도움이 되고, 생성기를 통해 새로운 단어를 생성하는 능력을 보존할 수 있다.둘째, 우리는 보도를 이용하여 총결산의 내용을 추적하는데 이것은 중복을 장려하지 않는다.우리는 현재 가장 선진적인 추상 기술보다 적어도 두 개의 연지 포인트가 높은 CNN/데일리메일 요약 작업에 우리의 모델을 응용할 것이다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای ترکیب\u200cهای عصبی به ترکیب یک روش جدید قابل قابل قابل پیشنهاد برای ترکیب متن abstractive (یعنی آنها محدود نیستند به ساده انتخاب کردن و دوباره ترکیب عبارت از متن اصلی). با این حال، این مدلها دو تنگدستی دارند: آنها می توانند جزئیات حقیقی را به طور غیر دقیق تولید کنند، و عادت دارند خودشان را تکرار کنند. در این کار ما یک معماری نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مدل توجهی استاندارد را به دو طریق اورژگونال افزایش می\u200cدهد. اول، ما از شبکه\u200cی ژنراتور نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cی هیbrid استفاده می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند کلمات را از متن منبع با توجه به طریق نشان\u200cدهنده کپی کند، که به بازگشت اطلاعات دقیق کمک می\u200cکند، در حالی که توانایی برای تولید کلمات نو در طریق ژ دوم، ما از پوشش استفاده می کنیم تا دنبال چیزی که جمع شده است، که تکرار را نابود می کند. ما مدل خود را به کار جمع کردن نامه\u200cهای CNN / Daily Mail، به حداقل ۲ نقطه\u200cهای ROUGE برتری می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa kawaida umetoa mbinu mpya yenye uwezekano wa kupata muhtasari wa maandishi yasiyo na maana (maana hayana vizuizi tu ya kuchagua na kubadilisha njia kutoka kwenye maandishi ya asili). Hata hivyo, mifano hii ina upungufu wa viwili: wanatakiwa kurudisha maelezo ya ukweli si sahihi, na wanaendelea kujirudia tena. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza ujenzi wa riwaya unaoongeza muundo wa kiwango cha ufuatiliaji wa mfululizo wa hali ya kawaida kwa njia mbili za kigezo. Kwanza, tunatumia mtandao wa mtengenezaji wa hebrid ambao unaweza kulipia maneno kutoka kwenye maandishi ya chanzo kupitia pointing, ambayo inasaidia uzalishaji wa taarifa sahihi, wakati tunabaki uwezo wa kutengeneza maneno ya riwaya kupitia muundo. Pili, tunatumia habari za kuendelea kufuatilia kile kilichosimuliwa, ambacho kinakataa kurejea tena. Tunatumia mifano yetu kwenye jukumu la muhtasari wa jumbe la CNN/Daily Mail, kwa kuonyesha hali ya sanaa ya sasa isiyo na maana ya dola 2.', 'tr': 'Nural hat-ka-hat nusgalary abstraktiw metin toplamak üçin bir täze metod berildi (şol diňe orijinal metinden geçişleri saýlamak we täzelemek üçin muglanmaýar). Ýöne bu nusgalaryň ikisi ýok bolmagy ýok. Bu nusgalaryň aslynda dogry ýagdaýy täzeden geçirmegi mümkin edýär we olaryň özlerini gaýtalap bilýärler. Bu işde biz bir roman arhitektura teklip edip, standart sequence-to-sequence titizliklerini iki düzgün şeklinde üýtgedýäris. Ilkinji gezek, çeşme metinden sözleri görkezilip biljek hybrid baglaýyşçy ýataryşçy a ňlygy ullanýarys. Bu şekilde janlaýyşçy bilen täze sözleri ýüklemek üçin kömek edip bilýär. Ikinjisi, guýruky hasaplanýan zady bozmak üçin ullanýarys. Biziň modelimizi CNN / günlük e-mailyň jemgyýetişligine uygulaýarys, häzirki abstraktiw durumyny iň azyndan 2 ROUGE bilen çykyp gitýäris.', 'af': "Neurale volgorde- na- volgorde modele het 'n beskikbaar nuwe toegang verskaf vir abstraktiewe teks opsomming (beteken dat hulle nie beperk word na eenvoudig kies en herstel wagwoorde van die oorspronklike teks). Maar hierdie modele het twee kortpad: hulle is waarskynlik om faktuele besonderhede onregverdig te reproduseer, en hulle tendeer om hulleself te herhaal. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe arkitektuur wat die standaard volgorde-na-volgorde aandag model op twee orthogonale maniere vergroot. Eerste, ons gebruik 'n hybrid wyser-genereerder netwerk wat kan kopieer woorde van die bron teks deur wysing, wat ondersteun die presies reproduksie van inligting, terwyl die moontlikheid hou om novele woorde deur die genereerder te produseer. Tweede, ons gebruik omdekking om te hou snit van wat is opsomming, wat afskakel herhaal. Ons toewend ons model aan die CNN / Daily Mail opsomming taak, uitvoer die huidige abstractive status-of-the-art deur minste 2 ROUGE punte.", 'sq': 'Modelet e sekuencës në sekuencë neurone kanë dhënë një qasje të re të jetueshme për përmbledhjen abstraktive të tekstit (që do të thotë se a to nuk janë të kufizuara vetëm për zgjedhjen dhe riorganizimin e pasazheve nga teksti origjinal). Megjithatë, këto modele kanë dy mungesa: ato mund të riprodhojnë saktësisht detajet faktike dhe ato kanë tendencë të përsëriten vetveten. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të re që rrit model in standard të vëmendjes sekuencë-në-sekuencë në dy mënyra ortogonale. Së pari, ne përdorim një rrjet hibridik gjenerator-tregues që mund të kopjojë fjalët nga teksti burimi nëpërmjet tregimit, që ndihmon riprodhimin e saktë të informacionit, duke mbajtur aftësinë për të prodhuar fjalë të reja nëpërmjet gjeneratorit. Së dyti, ne përdorim mbulimin për të mbajtur gjurmën e asaj që është përmbledhur, që pengon përsëritjen. Ne aplikojmë modelin tonë në detyrën e përmbledhjes së CNN / Daily Mail, duke kaluar përmbushjen e gjendjes abstraktive aktuale me të paktën 2 pikë ROUGE.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ነገር ግን እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች ሁለት ጉዳይ ናቸው፤ የእውነቱን ዝርዝሮች በከንቱ ማድረግ አለባቸው እናም ራሳቸውን ለመመለስ ይገባቸዋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የዳርቻውን የግንኙነት የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን በሁለት ተርትዮናዊ መንገድ ያሳድጋል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ የኬብሪድ ነጥብ-አዲስ መረብ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ከኩነቶች ጽሑፍ ቃላትን በመቀነስ ይችላል፡፡ Second, we use coverage to keep track of what has been summarized, which discourages repetition.  ሞዴልናችንን ወደ CNN/Daily Mail ማቀናጃ አድራሻ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የ-art-state-of-the-art በሚያንስ በ2 ROUGE ነጥብ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Nöral sequence-to-sequence modelləri abstraktiv metin toplaması üçün müəyyən edilən yeni tərzim təyin etdilər (bu anlamına gəlir ki, onlar sadəcə orijinal metindən keçiş seçməyə və yenidən düzəltməyə qadağan deyillər). Ancaq bu modellərdə iki zəiflik var: onlar həqiqət ayrıntıları doğru olaraq yenidən dəyişdirə bilərlər və özlərini yenidən dəyişdirə bilərlər. Bu işdə biz yeni bir arhitektura təklif edirik ki, standart sequence-to-sequence modelini iki orthogonal yolla artırar. İlk dəfə, biz bir hibrid işaretçi-generator a ğını istifadə edirik ki, məlumatların doğru yenilənməsinə kömək edər, generator vasitəsilə yeni sözlər yaratmaq bacarılığına kömək edər. İkincisi, təkrarlanan nəyi gözləmək üçün örtükləri istifadə edirik ki, bu təkrarlarını dəyişdirər. Bizim modelimizi CNN / Daily Mail summarization işinə istifadə edirik, şimdiki abstraktiv-of-the-art-state-of-the-at least 2 ROUGE noktalarına istifadə edirik.', 'bs': 'Modeli neurološke sekvence do sekvence pružili su održivi novi pristup za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta (znači da nisu ograničeni samo odabrati i ponovno organizirati prolaze iz originalnog teksta). Međutim, ovi modeli imaju dva nedostatka: oni su odgovorni da nepravedno razmnožavaju činjenične detalje, a oni se obično ponavljaju. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja povećava standardni model pozornosti na dva ortogonala način a. Prvo, koristimo hibridnu mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja može kopirati riječi iz izvornog teksta putem pokazivanja, koja pomaže to čnom reprodukcijom informacija, dok zadržavamo sposobnost proizvodnje novih riječi kroz generator. Drugo, koristimo pokrivanje kako bi pratili ono što je sažeto, što ometa ponavljanje. Primjenjujemo naš model na zadatak sažetke CNN / Daily Mail, iznosi trenutno abstraktivno stanje umjetnosti najmanje 2 to čke ROUGE.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հաջորդականությունը հաջորդականության մոդելները տրամադրել են ապշեցուցիչ նոր մոտեցում վերացական տեքստի համառոտագրման համար (նշանակում է, որ դրանք չեն սահմանափակվում պարզապես ընտրելու և վերադասավորելու սկզբնական տեքստի հատվածներից Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելները երկու թերություն ունեն: Դրանք հավանական են անճշգրիտ վերարտադրելու փաստական մանրամասները, և նրանք հակված են կրկնվել: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ճարտարապետություն, որը բարձրացնում է ստանդարտ հաջորդականության ուշադրության մոդելը երկու օրթոգոնալ ձևով: First, we use a hybrid pointer-generator network that can copy words from the source text via pointing, which aids accurate reproduction of information, while retaining the ability to produce novel words through the generator.  Երկրորդ, մենք օգտագործում ենք ծածկումը, որպեսզի հետևենք այն, ինչ համառոտագրվել է, ինչն անխուսափելի է կրկնվում: Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր մոդելը CNN-ի և Daily Post-ի համառոտագրման հանձնարարության համար, առավել լավ ներկայիս վերացական տեխնոլոգիայի արդյունքում, առնվազն 2 ROUge-ով:', 'bn': 'নিউরেল সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্ড মডেল আটকানোর জন্য একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রদান করেছে (এর মানে তারা শুধুমাত্র মূল ল লেখা থেকে পাসগুলো নির্বাচন করা এবং পু তবে এই মডেলগুলোর মধ্যে দুটি অসংক্রান্ত রয়েছে: তাদের বাস্তবতার বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত পুনরায় প্রকাশ করা উচিত এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস স্থাপনের প্রস্তাব করছি যা স্ট্যান্ডার্ডেন্ড সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্ডের মোডেল দুই প্রান্ত ভাবে দেখান First, we use a hybrid pointer-generator network that can copy words from the source text via pointing, which aids accurate reproduction of information, while retaining the ability to produce novel words through the generator.  দ্বিতীয়, আমরা কাভারেজ ব্যবহার করি সারসংক্ষিপ্ত কিছু রাখার জন্য, যা পুনরাবৃত্তিকে বিরক্ত করে। আমরা আমাদের মডেল সিএনএন/ডেইলি মেইলের সার্মিজেশন কাজে প্রয়োগ করি, বর্তমান অক্ষম-শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি অন্তত ২ রুজের বিন্দুতে প্রদর্শন করি।', 'ca': "Els models de seqüència a seqüència neuronal han proporcionat un nou enfocament viable per a la resumida abstractiva del text (que vol dir que no estan limitats a simplement seleccionar i rearrangar passatges del text original). Tot i així, aquests models tenen dues deficiències: poden reproducir els detalls de fet inaccuradament i tendeixen a repetir-se. En aquest treball proposem una arquitectura nova que augmenta el model d'atenció de seqüència a seqüència normal de dues maneres ortogonals. En primer lloc, utilitzem una xarxa híbrida de generadors de punts que pot copiar paraules del text de font mitjançant punts, que ajuda a reproducir exactament la informació, mantenint l'habilitat de produir paraules noves mitjançant el generador. Segon, utilitzem cobertura per aconseguir el que s'ha resumit, que desanima la repetició. Aplicam el nostre model a la tasca de resum CNN/Daily Mail, superant l'actual estat d'avançat abstractiu en almenys 2 punts ROUGE.", 'et': 'Neuraalsed jada järjestusest järjestuseni mudelid on pakkunud teostatava uue lähenemisviisi abstraktsele teksti kokkuvõtmisele (mis tähendab, et need ei piirdu lihtsalt algtekstist lõikude valimise ja ümberkorraldamisega). Nendel mudelitel on siiski kaks puudust: need võivad faktilisi üksikasju ebaõigesti reprodutseerida ja nad kipuvad ennast kordama. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse arhitektuuri, mis täiendab standardset järjestusest järjestuseni tähelepanu mudelit kahel ortogonaalsel viisil. Esiteks kasutame hübriidkursori-generaatori võrku, mis suudab kopeerida sõnu lähtetekstist osutamise kaudu, mis aitab täpselt infot reprodutseerida, säilitades samas võime luua uudseid sõnu generaatori kaudu. Teiseks kasutame katvust, et jälgida, mida on kokku võetud, mis takistab kordamist. Me rakendame oma mudelit CNN / Daily Maili kokkuvõtliku ülesande jaoks, ületades praegust abstraktiivset tehnika taset vähemalt 2 ROUGE punkti.', 'fi': 'Neuroiden sekvenssimallit ovat tarjonneet toteuttamiskelpoisen uuden lähestymistavan abstraktiiviseen tekstin yhteenvedoon (eli ne eivät rajoitu pelkästään alkuperäisen tekstin kohtien valintaan ja uudelleenjärjestelyyn). Näissä malleissa on kuitenkin kaksi puutetta: ne voivat toistaa virheellisesti tosiasioita ja ne toistuvat usein. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta arkkitehtuuria, joka laajentaa standardia sekvenssi-sekvenssiin-huomiomallia kahdella ortogonaalisella tavalla. Ensinnäkin käytämme hybridi pointer-generaattoriverkkoa, joka voi kopioida sanoja lähdetekstistä osoittimen avulla, mikä auttaa tiedon tarkkaa toistoa säilyttäen samalla kyvyn tuottaa uusia sanoja generaattorin kautta. Toiseksi käytämme peittoa pitääksemme kirjaa siitä, mitä on tiivistetty, mikä estää toistoa. Sovellamme malliamme CNN / Daily Mail -yhteenvetotehtävään, joka ylittää nykyiset abstraktiiviset huipputasot vähintään kahdella ROUGE-pisteellä.', 'cs': 'Neurální modely posloupnosti posloupnosti poskytly životaschopný nový přístup pro abstraktivní shrnutí textu (což znamená, že nejsou omezeny pouze na výběr a přerozdělování pasáží z původního textu). Tyto modely však mají dvě nedostatky: mohou nepřesně reprodukovat faktické detaily a mají tendenci se opakovat. V této práci navrhujeme novou architekturu, která rozšiřuje standardní model pozornosti sekvence na sekvenci dvěma ortogonálními způsoby. Nejprve používáme hybridní ukazatel-generátor síť, která dokáže kopírovat slova ze zdrojového textu prostřednictvím ukazování, což napomáhá přesné reprodukci informací, přičemž si zachovává schopnost produkovat nová slova prostřednictvím generátoru. Za druhé používáme pokrytí, abychom sledovali, co bylo shrnuto, což odrazuje opakování. Náš model aplikujeme na úlohu shrnutí CNN a Daily Mail a překonáváme současný abstraktivní stav techniky alespoň o dva ROUGE body.', 'jv': 'modells politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki kita supoyo un architecture sing berarti dadi sabên sekondirne-to-sekondirne kuwi tanggal kuwi tindang duruh ortoggonal. Awak dhéwé Digawe, kita wis digawe asar tentang kanggo tinggal ing digawe Awak dhéwé ngewehke model nang dadi "MT/dienet mail" dadi resmi, iso nggawe barang sistem apstracative durum-of-the-arts nganggo barang 2 LOUGE kuwi.', 'sk': 'Modeli živčnega zaporedja do zaporedja so zagotovili izvedljiv nov pristop za abstraktivno povzetek besedila (kar pomeni, da niso omejeni na preprosto izbiro in preurejanje odlomkov iz izvirnega besedila). Vendar imajo ti modeli dve pomanjkljivosti: lahko nepravilno reproducirajo dejanske podrobnosti in se ponavljajo. V tem delu predlagamo novo arhitekturo, ki povečuje standardni model pozornosti od zaporedja do zaporedja na dva pravokotna načina. Najprej uporabljamo hibridno omrežje kazalcev-generatorja, ki lahko kopira besede iz izvornega besedila preko kazalcev, kar pomaga natančno reprodukcijo informacij, hkrati pa ohranja sposobnost proizvajanja novih besed preko generatorja. Drugič, uporabljamo pokritost, da spremljamo, kaj je bilo povzeto, kar odvrača ponavljanje. Naš model uporabljamo za nalogo povzetka CNN / Daily Mail, ki presega trenutno abstraktivno stanje tehnike za najmanj 2 ROUGE točki.', 'he': 'דוגמני רצף לרצף נוירואלים סיפקו גישה חדשה אפשרית לסיום טקסט אסטרקטיבי (מה שאומר שהם לא מוגבלים רק לבחור ומארגן מחדש מעברים מהטקסט המקורי). עם זאת, לדוגמנים האלה יש שני חסרויות: הם סבירים לשחזר פרטים עובדים לא בדיוק, והם נוטים לחזור על עצמם. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה חדשה שמגבירה את דוגמנית תשומת לב סטנדרטית רצף-לרצף בשני דרכים אורתוגיות. ראשית, אנו משתמשים ברשת גינרטור-מצביעים היברידית שיכולה לעתק מילים מהטקסט המקורי דרך הצביעה, אשר עוזר לשחזור מדויק של מידע, בזמן שמחזיק את היכולת לייצר מילים חדשות דרך הגנרטור. שנית, אנחנו משתמשים בכיסוי כדי לעקוב אחרי מה שנרשמו, מה שמנענע מהחזרה. אנו משתמשים בדוגמא שלנו למשימה של סי-אן-איי-דיילי-מייל, ביצוע את המצב המאוחד הנוכחי על ידי לפחות 2 נקודות ROUGE.', 'ha': "Neural sequence-to-sequence models have provided a viable new approach for abstractive text summarization (meaning they are not restricted to simply selecting and rearranging passages from the original text).  A lokacin da, waɗannan misãlai sun samu biyu masu basu'a: ana kamata su kõma baya-daki masu yiwuwa, kuma suna fara a sake bayan rãyukansu. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani matsayin nowaya wanda ke ƙara matsayin cikin sauri biyu. Kayyan, za mu yi amfani da wani jerin mai shiryarwa na Hybrid, wanda zai iya kofi magana daga matsayin kwanan na ƙarƙashin haske, da kuma yana taimako da manunufi masu inganci, kuma yana tsare awon ya sami maganar nowaya a tsakanin mai gauraya. Da na ƙara, za mu yi amfani da rufaffiyar don mu tsare kan abin da aka ƙara shi, wanda ke tsaurar da dukaci. Tuna samun shirin ayuka zuwa aikin tsumarni na CNN/Daily-mail, da kuma ke samun halin da ke kai yanzu-sanar da kuma idan an rage 2 points.", 'bo': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models have provided a viable new approach for abstractive text summarization (meaning they are not restricted to simply selecting and rearranging passages from the original text). ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་གཟུགས་འདི་དག་ཚང་མེད་གཉིས་ཡོད།དེ་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་དང་བདེན་མེད་པར་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བརྩོན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་དམིགས་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། First, we use a hybrid pointer-generator network that can copy words from the source text via pointing, which aids accurate reproduction of information, while retaining the ability to produce novel words through the generator. གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདི་CNN/Daily Mail བཅུག་སྡུད་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ་ལས་ད་ལྟོའི་མ་ཤེས'}
{'en': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramid for Optimization-Based Multi-Document Summarization', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Supervisionado de Pirâmide Automática para Resumo de Vários Documentos Baseado em Otimização', 'ar': 'التعلم الخاضع للإشراف للهرم التلقائي لتلخيص متعدد المستندات القائم على التحسين', 'es': 'Aprendizaje supervisado de pirámide automática para el resumen de varios documentos basado en la optimización', 'fr': "Apprentissage supervisé de la pyramide automatique pour la synthèse multi-documents basée sur l'optimisation", 'ru': 'Контролируемое обучение автоматической пирамиды для многодокументного суммирования на основе оптимизации', 'ja': '最適化ベースのマルチドキュメント要約のための自動ピラミッドの監修学習', 'zh': '盖优化之多文档总者自金字塔督学', 'hi': 'ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन-आधारित बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए स्वचालित पिरामिड की पर्यवेक्षित सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim faoi Mhaoirseacht ar Phirimid Uathoibríoch le haghaidh Achoimriú Ildhoiciméad Bunaithe ar bharrfheabhsú', 'el': 'Επίβλεπτη Μάθηση της Αυτόματης Πυραμίδας για Σύνοψη Πολυεγγράφων με βάση τη Βελτιστοποίηση', 'hu': 'Automatikus piramis felügyeleti tanulása optimalizálási alapú többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური პირამიდის მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემები პირამიდის გამოყენება', 'kk': 'Оптимизация негіздеген көп құжат тұжырымдамасының автоматты пирамиданы бақылау', 'it': "Apprendimento supervisionato della piramide automatica per la sintesi multi-documento basata sull'ottimizzazione", 'ms': 'Pemelajaran Piramid Automatik Dipengawasi untuk Penapisan Dokumen Berberapa Berasas Optimisasi', 'mk': 'Супервизирано учење на автоматска пирамида за оптимизација базирана на мултидокументи', 'ml': 'ഓപ്റ്റോമിഷഷന്\u200d - അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വയം പ്രൈമിഡിന്റെ പഠനം', 'mn': 'Олон-баримт дээрх олон бичлэг дээр автоматтын пирамидын суралцах', 'no': 'Overvakt læring av automatisk pyramid for optimalisering av fleire dokumentsammendrag', 'pl': 'Nadzorowane uczenie się automatycznej piramidy dla optymalizacji opartej na wielu dokumentach', 'lt': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramid for Optimization-Based Multi-Document Summarization', 'ro': 'Învățarea supravegheată a piramidei automate pentru rezumarea mai multor documente bazate pe optimizare', 'sr': 'Nadzoreno učenje automatske piramide za sažetak na optimizaciji na osnovu višestrukog dokumenta', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පිරාමිඩ්ගේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පිරාමිඩ්ගේ ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramid for Optimization-Based Summarization', 'sv': 'Övervakad inlärning av automatisk pyramid för optimeringsbaserad sammanfattning av flera dokument', 'ta': 'விருப்பத்தேர்வு அடிப்படையான பல- ஆவண சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'Optimization-Based Multi-Document Summarization', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Superviż tal-Piramida Awtomatika għas-Sommarju Multi-Dokument Ibbażat fuq l-Optimizzazzjoni', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình đầu tư kim tự động theo dõi', 'bg': 'Наблюдавано обучение на автоматична пирамида за обобщаване на множество документи въз основа на оптимизация', 'hr': 'Nadzoreno učenje automatske piramide za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta na osnovu optimizacije', 'da': 'Overvåget læring af automatisk pyramide til optimeringsbaseret flerdokumentopsummering', 'nl': 'Toezichtig leren van automatische piramide voor optimalisatie-gebaseerde multi-document samenvatting', 'de': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramide für optimierungsbasierte Multi-Document Summarisation', 'id': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramid for Optimization-Based Multi-Document Summarization', 'ko': '최적화된 다중 문서 요약 자동 피라미드 감독 학습 기반', 'fa': 'یادگیری از پیرامید خودکار برای جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای بسیاری از سند\u200cهای بهترین\u200cسازی', 'sw': 'Kusoma Ujumbe wa Pyramid wa kujitegemea kwa ajili ya Ujumbe wa Makala mengi', 'tr': 'Optimizasyn Daha Sened Toparçysy üçin Otomatik Pyramidyň Öwrenmesi', 'sq': 'Mësimi i mbikqyrur i Piramidës Automatike për përmbledhjen e shumëdokumenteve të bazuar në optimizacion', 'af': 'Besig om te leer van outomatiese piramide vir optimaliseer- gebaseerde Multi- Document Opsomming', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Optimizasyon-Based Multi-Document Summarization 칲칞칲n Avtomatik Piramid 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'hy': 'Supervised Learning of Automatic Pyramid for Optimization-Based Multi-Document Summarization', 'bs': 'Nadzoreno učenje automatske piramide za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta na osnovu optimizacije', 'bn': 'অপটিমেশন- ভিত্তিক মাল্টিক ডকুমেন্ট সামারিজেশনের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রাইমিডের শিক্ষা', 'ca': "Aprendència supervisada de piràmide automàtica per a una resumida multidocumental basada en l'optimització", 'cs': 'Kontrolované učení automatické pyramidy pro optimalizaci založené na více dokumentů shrnutí', 'et': 'Automaatse püramiidi juhitav õppimine optimeerimisel põhineva mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'fi': 'Automaattisen pyramidin ohjattu oppiminen optimointiin perustuvaan usean asiakirjan yhteenvetoon', 'jv': 'super Vised Learning of Automatically Pirramid for Optimisation-bazed Multi-document Cumarination', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nadzorovano učenje avtomatske piramide za povzetek več dokumentov na osnovi optimizacije', 'he': 'למידת פירמידה אוטומטית שמבוססת על אופטימיזציה', 'bo': 'རྫུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་Pyramid་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་མང་ཆེ་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་Summarization'}
{'en': 'We present a new supervised framework that learns to estimate automatic Pyramid scores and uses them for optimization-based extractive multi-document summarization. For learning automatic Pyramid scores, we developed a method for automatic training data generation which is based on a genetic algorithm using automatic Pyramid as the fitness function. Our experimental evaluation shows that our new framework significantly outperforms strong baselines regarding automatic Pyramid, and that there is much room for improvement in comparison with the upper-bound for automatic Pyramid.', 'ar': 'نقدم إطار عمل جديدًا خاضعًا للإشراف يتعلم تقدير درجات الهرم التلقائي ويستخدمها للتلخيص الاستخراجي متعدد المستندات القائم على التحسين. لتعلم درجات الهرم التلقائي ، قمنا بتطوير طريقة لتوليد بيانات التدريب التلقائي والتي تعتمد على خوارزمية جينية باستخدام الهرم التلقائي كوظيفة للياقة البدنية. يوضح تقييمنا التجريبي أن إطار عملنا الجديد يتفوق بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس القوية فيما يتعلق بالهرم التلقائي ، وأن هناك مجالًا كبيرًا للتحسين مقارنة بالحد الأعلى للهرم التلقائي.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau cadre supervisé qui apprend à estimer les scores Pyramid automatiques et les utilise pour la synthèse multi-documents extractive basée sur l'optimisation. Pour l'apprentissage des scores Pyramid automatiques, nous avons développé une méthode de génération automatique de données d'entraînement qui repose sur un algorithme génétique utilisant Pyramid automatique comme fonction de fitness. Notre évaluation expérimentale montre que notre nouveau cadre surpasse de manière significative les lignes de base solides concernant la Pyramide automatique, et qu'il y a beaucoup de place à amélioration par rapport à la limite supérieure de la Pyramide automatique.", 'es': 'Presentamos un nuevo marco supervisado que aprende a estimar las puntuaciones automáticas de Pyramid y las utiliza para la sumarización extractiva de varios documentos basada en la optimización. Para aprender las puntuaciones Pyramid automáticas, desarrollamos un método para la generación automática de datos de entrenamiento que se basa en un algoritmo genético que utiliza Pyramid automático como función de acondicionamiento físico. Nuestra evaluación experimental muestra que nuestro nuevo marco supera significativamente a las líneas de base sólidas con respecto a Pyramid automática, y que hay mucho margen de mejora en comparación con el límite superior de Pyramid automática.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova estrutura supervisionada que aprende a estimar as pontuações automáticas da Pyramid e as usa para sumarização extrativa de vários documentos baseada em otimização. Para aprender as pontuações automáticas do Pyramid, desenvolvemos um método para geração automática de dados de treinamento que é baseado em um algoritmo genético usando o Pyramid automático como função de fitness. Nossa avaliação experimental mostra que nossa nova estrutura supera significativamente as linhas de base fortes em relação à Pirâmide automática e que há muito espaço para melhorias em comparação com o limite superior da Pirâmide automática.', 'ja': '自動ピラミッドスコアを推定し、最適化ベースの抽出マルチドキュメントの要約に使用するために学習する新しい監督されたフレームワークを提示します。自動ピラミッドスコアを学習するために、自動ピラミッドをフィットネス関数として用いた遺伝的アルゴリズムに基づいた自動トレーニングデータ生成方法を開発した。私たちの実験的評価は、新しいフレームワークが自動ピラミッドに関する強力なベースラインを大幅に上回っており、自動ピラミッドの上限と比較して改善の余地が大きいことを示しています。', 'zh': '建一新监框架,当框架学度自金字塔分数,施于优化者取式多文档摘要。 学自金字塔分数,发一法自生,以自金字塔为适应度函数。 吾实验评估,新框架显优于金字塔强基线,且比于自金字塔之上限,大有改易。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую контролируемую структуру, которая учится оценивать автоматические оценки пирамид и использует их для оптимизации на основе извлечения нескольких документов. Для изучения автоматических баллов Пирамиды нами был разработан метод автоматической генерации обучающих данных, который основан на генетическом алгоритме с использованием автоматической Пирамиды в качестве функции пригодности. Наша экспериментальная оценка показывает, что наша новая структура значительно превосходит сильные базовые линии в отношении автоматической пирамиды, и что есть много возможностей для улучшения по сравнению с верхней границей для автоматической пирамиды.', 'hi': 'हम एक नया पर्यवेक्षित ढांचा प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो स्वचालित पिरामिड स्कोर का अनुमान लगाना सीखता है और अनुकूलन-आधारित निष्कर्षण बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशके लिए उनका उपयोग करता है। स्वचालित पिरामिड स्कोर सीखने के लिए, हमने स्वचालित प्रशिक्षण डेटा पीढ़ी के लिए एक विधि विकसित की है जो फिटनेस फ़ंक्शन के रूप में स्वचालित पिरामिड का उपयोग करके आनुवंशिक एल्गोरिथ्म पर आधारित है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा नया ढांचा स्वचालित पिरामिड के बारे में मजबूत बेसलाइन को काफी बेहतर बनाता है, और यह कि स्वचालित पिरामिड के लिए ऊपरी-बाध्य की तुलना में सुधार के लिए बहुत जगह है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid creat nua maoirsithe i láthair a fhoghlaimíonn conas scóir uathoibríocha Pirimid a mheas agus a úsáideann iad le haghaidh achoimriú ildhoiciméad eastóscach bunaithe ar bharrfheabhsú. Chun scóir uathoibrithe Pirimide a fhoghlaim, d’fhorbraíomar modh chun sonraí oiliúna uathoibríocha a ghiniúint atá bunaithe ar algartam géiniteach a úsáideann Pirimid Uathoibríoch mar an fheidhm aclaíochta. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht thurgnamhach go sáraíonn ár gcreat nua bunlínte láidre maidir le Pirimid Uathoibríoch, agus go bhfuil go leor spáis le feabhsú i gcomparáid leis an teorainn uachtarach le haghaidh Pirimid Uathoibríoch.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο εποπτευμένο πλαίσιο που μαθαίνει να εκτιμά αυτόματα αποτελέσματα Πυραμίδας και τα χρησιμοποιεί για εξορυκτική σύνοψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων βασισμένη στη βελτιστοποίηση. Για την εκμάθηση αυτόματων βαθμολογιών Πυραμίδας, αναπτύξαμε μια μέθοδο αυτόματης δημιουργίας δεδομένων προπόνησης η οποία βασίζεται σε έναν γενετικό αλγόριθμο που χρησιμοποιεί την αυτόματη Πυραμίδα ως λειτουργία γυμναστικής. Η πειραματική μας αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι το νέο μας πλαίσιο ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις ισχυρές βάσεις όσον αφορά την αυτόματη Πυραμίδα, και ότι υπάρχει πολύ περιθώριο βελτίωσης σε σύγκριση με το ανώτερο όριο για την αυτόματη Πυραμίδα.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új felügyelt keretrendszert, amely megtanulja becsülni az automatikus Pyramid pontszámokat, és ezeket optimalizáláson alapuló extraktív többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz használja. Az automatikus Pyramid pontszámok elsajátításához kifejlesztettük az automatikus edzési adatok generálására szolgáló módszert, amely egy genetikai algoritmuson alapul, mely automatikus Pyramidot használ fitnesz funkcióként. Kísérleti értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy új keretrendszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja az automatikus piramis erős alapvonalait, és hogy sok hely van a fejlesztésre az automatikus piramis felső határához képest.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემულებული ფრამეტრი, რომელიც სწავლის ავტომატური პირამიდის მონაცემების განსაზღვრებისთვის და გამოყენებას გამოყენებას ავტომატური მრავალე დოკუმე ავტომატიკური პირამიდის მონაცემებისთვის, ჩვენ ავტომატიკური მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის მეტი დავიწყეთ, რომელიც გენეტიკური ალგორიტიმზე გამოყენებული ავტომატიკური ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრება ჩვენი ახალი ფემპერიმენტი ძალიან გავაკეთებს ძალიან ფემპერიმენტიური ფემპერიმენტის შესახებ, და არსებობს ძალიან ადგილის დასაზღვრება სამუშ', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo framework supervisionato che impara a stimare i punteggi automatici Pyramid e li utilizza per la sintesi estrattiva multi-documento basata sull'ottimizzazione. Per imparare i punteggi Pyramid automatici, abbiamo sviluppato un metodo per la generazione automatica dei dati di allenamento basato su un algoritmo genetico che utilizza Pyramid automatico come funzione fitness. La nostra valutazione sperimentale mostra che il nostro nuovo framework supera significativamente le forti linee di base per quanto riguarda la Piramide automatica e che c'è molto spazio per migliorare rispetto al limite superiore per la Piramide automatica.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame naują prižiūrėtą sistemą, kuri išmoko įvertinti automatinius piramidų rezultatus ir naudoja juos optimizavimo pagrindu pagrįstoms ekstraktyvioms daugiadokumentėms santraukoms. Automatinių piramidų rezultatų mokymui sukūrėme automatinio mokymo duomenų generavimo metodą, kuris grindžiamas genetiniu algoritmu, naudojant automatinį piramidą kaip tinkamumo funkciją. Mūsų eksperimentinis vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų nauja sistema gerokai viršija tvirtas bazines linijas, susijusias su automatine piramide, ir kad yra daug galimybių pagerinti, palyginti su automatinės piramidės viršutine riba.', 'kk': 'Біз автоматты пирамид нөмірлерін бағалау үшін, оларды оптимизациялауға негізделген көп құжаттарды қолданатын жаңа бақылау бағдарламасын көрсетедік. Автоматты пирамид нөмірлерін оқыту үшін, біз автоматты оқыту деректерін құру әдісін жасадық. Бұл генетикалық алгоритм автоматты пирамиды қолдану функциясы ретінде негізделген. Біздің тәжірибелікті бағалауымыз, жаңа фрейміміздің автоматты пирамида туралы күшті негізгі сызықтарды өзгертеді, және автоматты пирамида үшін жоғары сызықтарды салыстыру үшін көп орын бар.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нова надгледувана рамка која научи да ги проценува автоматските пирамидни резултати и ги користи за оптимизација базирана екстрактивна мултидокументарна резултатација. За учење автоматски пирамидски резултати, развивме метод за автоматска обука генерација на податоци кој е базиран на генетски алгоритм користејќи автоматска пирамида како функција на соодветност. Нашата експериментална проценка покажува дека нашата нова рамка значително ги надминува силните основни линии во врска со автоматската пирамида, и дека има многу место за подобрување во споредба со горната граница за автоматска пирамида.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan kerangka terkawal baru yang belajar untuk menghargai skor Pyramid automatik dan menggunakannya untuk pengiraan multi-dokumen ekstraktif berasaskan optimasi. Untuk belajar skor piramid automatik, kami mengembangkan kaedah untuk generasi data latihan automatik yang berdasarkan algoritma genetik menggunakan piramid automatik sebagai fungsi fitness. Evaluasi percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa kerangka baru kami jauh lebih kuat garis dasar yang berkaitan dengan Piramid Automatik, dan bahawa terdapat banyak ruang untuk peningkatan dibandingkan dengan batas atas untuk Piramid Automatik.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് സ്വയം പ്രൈമിഡ് സ്കോര്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സ്വയം പ്രൈമിഡ് സ്കോര്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഡേറ്റാ തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് സ്വയം പൈരിമിഡിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാന', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw qafas ġdid sorveljat li jitgħallem jistma l-punteġġi awtomatiċi tal-Piramidi u jużahom għal sommarju multidokumentu estrattiv ibbażat fuq l-ottimizzazzjoni. Għat-tagħlim tal-punteġġi awtomatiċi tal-Piramidi, żviluppajna metodu għall-ġenerazzjoni tad-dejta tat-taħriġ awtomatiku li huwa bbażat fuq algoritmu ġenetiku li juża l-Piramida awtomatika bħala l-funzjoni tal-idoneità. L-evalwazzjoni sperimentali tagħna turi li l-qafas il-ġdid tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi b’saħħithom fir-rigward tal-Piramida awtomatika, u li hemm ħafna lok għal titjib meta mqabbel mal-limitu ta’ fuq għall-Piramida awtomatika.', 'mn': 'Бид автоматжуулан Пирамидын тоонуудыг тооцоолж сурсан шинэ удирдлагатай системийг тайлбарлаж, нэмэгдүүлэх үндсэн олон баримтын тооцоолж ашигладаг. Автоматик Пирамидын тоонуудыг сурах үед бид автоматик суралцах өгөгдлийн үйлдвэрлэлийн аргыг хөгжүүлсэн. Энэ нь генетик алгоритм дээр автоматик Пирамидыг хэрэглэж байдаг. Бидний туршилтын шалгалт нь бидний шинэ хэмжээсүүд автоматик Пирамидыг харьцуулахад маш их суурь шугам гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit nytt oversikt rammeverk som lærer å estimere automatiske pyramid- poeng og brukar dei for optimalisering basert ekstraktivt multidokumentsamansering. For å lære automatiske pyramidescorer, utvikla vi ein metode for automatisk opplæring av data som er basert på ein genetisk algoritme ved bruk av automatisk pyramid som funksjonen. Vår eksperimentell evaluering viser at vår nye rammeverket utfører sterke baselinjer med automatisk pyramid, og at det finst mye plass for forbetringa i sammenligning med den øvre bindinga for automatisk pyramid.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un nou cadru supravegheat care învață să estimeze scorurile automate Pyramid și să le folosească pentru rezumarea extractivă multi-document bazată pe optimizare. Pentru a învăța scorurile automate Pyramid, am dezvoltat o metodă de generare automată a datelor de antrenament care se bazează pe un algoritm genetic folosind Pyramid automat ca funcție de fitness. Evaluarea experimentală arată că noul nostru cadru depășește semnificativ liniile de bază puternice în ceea ce privește Piramida automată și că există mult loc de îmbunătățire în comparație cu limita superioară a Piramidei automate.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowy nadzorowany framework, który uczy się oszacować automatyczne wyniki Piramidy i wykorzystuje je do optymalizacji opartej na ekstrakcyjnym podsumowaniu wielu dokumentów. Do nauki automatycznych wyników Piramidy opracowaliśmy metodę automatycznego generowania danych treningowych opartą na algorytmie genetycznym wykorzystującym automatyczną Piramidę jako funkcję fitness. Nasza eksperymentalna ocena pokazuje, że nasz nowy framework znacznie przewyższa silne linie bazowe w zakresie automatycznej Piramidy i że jest dużo miejsca do poprawy w porównaniu z górną granicą dla automatycznej Piramidy.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novi nadzorni okvir koji nauči da procenjuje automatske piramidske rezultate i koristi ih za optimizaciju ekstraktivne multidokumente. Za naučenje automatskih piramidskih rezultata, razvili smo metodu za generaciju automatskih obuke podataka koji se temelji na genetskom algoritmu koristeći automatsku piramidu kao funkciju pristojnosti. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da naš novi okvir značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije u vezi automatske piramide i da postoji mnogo mesta za poboljšanje u usporedbi sa gornjem okviru za automatsku piramidu.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් පරීක්ෂණා කරපු පරීක්ෂණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පිරාමිඩ් පරීක්ෂණයක් අනුමාණය කරන්න සහ ඔවුන්ව ප්\u200dරයෝ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පිරාමිඩ් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වනවා අපේ අළුත් පරීක්ෂණය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පිරාමිඩ් ගැන ශක්තිමත් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa shirkad cusub oo la ilaaliyey oo baranaya in lagu qiimeeyo qiimeynta iskuulka Pyramid, waxaadna u isticmaalaynaa in loo soo fududeeyo jimicsiga dukumentiyada badan. Waxbarashada iskuullada Pyramid oo automatic ah ayaannu horumarinnay qaab u ah sameynta danbiyada macluumaadka oo automatic waxbarashada, taasoo ku saleysan algorithm genetic using automatic Pyramid as a shaqo haboon. Qiimeynta baaritaanka ah waxay muuqataa in qashinkayaga cusub ay si muhiim ah u muuqato saldhigyo xoog leh oo ku saabsan Pyramid automatic, iyo in horumarinta loo barwaaqaysto barwaaqo u eg Pyramid.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett nytt övervakat ramverk som lär sig att uppskatta automatiska Pyramidpoäng och använder dem för optimeringsbaserad extraktiv multi-dokument sammanfattning. För att lära sig automatiska Pyramidpoäng har vi utvecklat en metod för automatisk träningsdatagenerering som bygger på en genetisk algoritm med automatisk Pyramid som träningsfunktion. Vår experimentella utvärdering visar att vårt nya ramverk avsevärt överträffar starka baslinjer för automatisk Pyramid, och att det finns mycket utrymme för förbättringar jämfört med övre gränsen för automatisk Pyramid.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது தானாகவே பிரைமிட் மதிப்பெண்களை மதிப்பிட கற்றுக் கொள்ள கற்றுக் கொண தானியங்கி பிரைமிட் மதிப்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு, நாங்கள் தானாகவே பயிற்சி தரவு உருவாக்க ஒரு முறையை உருவாக்கினோம். எங்கள் சோதனையின் மதிப்பெண்கள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் புதிய சட்டத்தில் தானாகவே பிரைமிட் பற்றிய வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் தானியங', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی نظارت والی فرمیک کو پیش کیا ہے جو اپنی پیرامیڈ اسکوروں کا اندازہ سکھاتا ہے اور ان کو اچھی طرح سے استعمال کرتا ہے اور ان کو اچھی طرح سے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ آٹوٹ پیرامیڈ اسکوروں کی تعلیم کے لئے ہم نے آٹوٹ ٹرینگ ڈیٹ کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ اختیار کی ہے جو آٹوٹ پیرامیڈ کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے ایک ژنتیکی الگوریٹم پر بنیاد ہے. ہماری آزمائش کی ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارے نئی فرمود کو اٹوٹوٹ پیرامیڈ کے بارے میں مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں سے زیادہ زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور یہ کہ اٹوٹ پیرامیڈ کے بارے میں بہت سی جگہ ہے', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik Pyramid scorlarini qiymatlashni o'rganadigan yangi taʼminlovchi freymni hozir qilamiz va ularni optimiz asosida yaratilgan muloqat hujjatning tahrirlash uchun foydalanamiz. Name Bizning tajriba qiymatimizni ko'rsatadi, yangi freymmiz avtomatik Pyramid haqida yaxshi asboblarni bajaradi, va avtomatik Pyramid uchun yuqori chegaraga o'xshash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở giám sát mới học ước lượng kim tự động. và sử dụng chúng để tổng kết khai thác các văn bản khai thác khuếch đại. Để học được điểm Kim tự động của Pyramid, chúng tôi đã phát triển một phương pháp sản xuất dữ liệu huấn luyện tự động dựa trên thuật toán di truyền sử dụng tự động Pyramid như là chức năng thể hình. Bài đánh giá thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy cơ quan mới của chúng ta vượt trội hơn nhiều so với hình nền tự động Kim tự động, và có nhiều cơ hội tốt hơn so với hình nón tự động.', 'bg': 'Представяме нова надзорна рамка, която се научава да оценява автоматичните резултати на пирамидите и ги използва за оптимизирано извличане на множество документи. За изучаване на автоматични резултати от пирамидите разработихме метод за автоматично генериране на данни за тренировка, който се основава на генетичен алгоритъм, използващ автоматична пирамида като фитнес функция. Нашата експериментална оценка показва, че новата ни рамка значително превъзхожда силните базови линии по отношение на автоматичната пирамида и че има много място за подобрение в сравнение с горната граница на автоматичната пирамида.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novi nadzorni okvir koji nauči procjenu automatskih piramidskih rezultata i koristi ih za optimizaciju ekstraktivnih višestrukih dokumenta. Za učenje automatskih piramidskih rezultata, razvili smo metodu za generaciju automatskih obuke podataka koji se temelji na genetskom algoritmu koristeći automatsku piramidu kao funkciju pristojnosti. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da naš novi okvir značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije u vezi automatske piramide i da postoji mnogo mjesta za poboljšanje u usporedbi s gornjem okviru za automatsku piramidu.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny overvåget ramme, der lærer at estimere automatiske Pyramid scores og bruger dem til optimeringsbaseret ekstraktiv multi-dokument resuméering. Til at lære automatiske Pyramid scores har vi udviklet en metode til automatisk træningsdatagenerering, som er baseret på en genetisk algoritme, der bruger automatisk Pyramid som fitnessfunktion. Vores eksperimentelle evaluering viser, at vores nye rammer i høj grad overgår stærke basislinjer med hensyn til automatisk pyramide, og at der er meget plads til forbedringer i forhold til den øvre grænse for automatisk pyramide.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuw supervised framework dat leert automatische Pyramid scores te schatten en deze gebruikt voor optimalisatie-gebaseerde extractieve multi-document samenvatting. Voor het leren van automatische Pyramid scores hebben we een methode ontwikkeld voor het automatisch genereren van trainingsgegevens die is gebaseerd op een genetisch algoritme met behulp van automatische Pyramid als fitnessfunctie. Onze experimentele evaluatie toont aan dat ons nieuwe framework aanzienlijk beter presteert dan de sterke basislijnen met betrekking tot automatische piramide, en dat er veel ruimte is voor verbetering in vergelijking met de bovengrens voor automatische piramide.', 'de': 'Wir stellen ein neues überwachtes Framework vor, das lernt, automatische Pyramiden-Scores zu schätzen und diese für die optimierungsbasierte extraktive Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente verwendet. Für das Erlernen automatischer Pyramid Scores haben wir eine Methode zur automatischen Trainingsdatengenerierung entwickelt, die auf einem genetischen Algorithmus basiert, der automatische Pyramid als Fitnessfunktion verwendet. Unsere experimentelle Auswertung zeigt, dass unser neues Framework starke Baselines in Bezug auf automatische Pyramide deutlich übertrifft und dass es viel Raum für Verbesserungen im Vergleich zur Obergrenze für automatische Pyramide gibt.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan rangkaian baru yang diawasi yang belajar untuk memperkirakan skor Piramid otomatis dan menggunakannya untuk perhitungan ekstraktif multi-dokumen berdasarkan optimisasi. Untuk belajar skor piramida otomatis, kami mengembangkan metode untuk generasi data latihan otomatis yang berdasarkan algoritma genetik menggunakan piramida otomatis sebagai fungsi fitness. Evaluasi eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa cadangan baru kami jauh lebih kuat dari garis dasar yang kuat mengenai Piramid otomatis, dan bahwa ada banyak ruang untuk peningkatan dibandingkan dengan batas atas untuk Piramid otomatis.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 감독 프레임워크를 제시했다. 이 프레임워크는 자동 피라미드 점수를 평가하고 최적화된 추출식 다중 문서 요약에 사용한다.자동 피라미드 점수를 배우기 위해 우리는 유전 알고리즘을 바탕으로 하는 자동 트레이닝 데이터 생성 방법을 개발했는데 이 알고리즘은 자동 피라미드를 적응도 함수로 사용한다.우리의 실험 평가에 의하면 우리의 새로운 구조는 자동 피라미드에 대한 강한 기선보다 현저히 우수하고 자동 피라미드의 상한선에 비해 매우 큰 개선 공간이 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo mpya uliothibitiwa ambao unajifunza kutathmini vipindi vya Pyramid binafsi na tunatumia kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa nyaraka nyingine za mifano. Kwa kujifunza vipimo vya Pyramid vya kujitegemea, tulitengeneza njia ya utoaji wa taarifa za mafunzo ya kujitegemea, ambayo inategemea utaratibu wa jeneti kwa kutumia Pyramid binafsi kama kazi ya usahihi. Utafiti wetu wa majaribio unaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu mpya unafanya vizuri zaidi kuhusu Pyramid binafsi, na kwamba kuna nafasi nyingi ya kuboresha ukilinganishwa na Pyramid aliye juu.', 'fa': 'ما یک چهارچوب جدید تحت نظر قرار می دهیم که یاد می گیرد تا امتیاز پیرامید خودکار را ارزیابی کند و آنها را برای عمومی\u200cسازی چندین سند استفاده کند. برای یادگیری امتیاز پیرامید خودکار، ما یک روش برای تولید داده های آموزش خودکار توسعه کردیم که بر اساس الگوریتم ژنتیکی با استفاده از پیرامید خودکار به عنوان فعالیت مناسب است. ارزیابی آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که چهارچوب جدید ما خیلی بیشتر از خطوط بنیادی قوی در مورد پیرامید اتوماتیک انجام می دهد، و اینکه جای زیادی برای بهبود در مقایسه با پیرامید بالا وجود دارد.', 'tr': 'Biz öz pyramid notlaryny hasaplamak üçin täze bir gözlemli çerçewçiliki görkezip, we olary optimizasiýa tabanly ekstra multi-sened toplamak üçin ullanýarys. Otomatik pyramid sanlaryny öwrenmek üçin, awtomatik okuwçy data döretmek üçin bir yöntem geliştirdik. Bu sistemi awtomatik pyramid üýtgetmegi üçin bir genetic algoritmä döredildi. Synaniýaly çykyşymyz ýagdaýymyz täze çerýämiz awtomatik piramide hakynda gaty tagamlar çykýandygyny görkezýär we üst-de awtomatik pyramid bilen karşılaşykda köp ýer bar.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n nuwe ondersoekte raamwerk wat leer om outomatiese pyramide telling te estimere en dit gebruik vir optimaliseer-gebaseerde ekstraktiewe multi-dokument opsomming. Vir die leer van outomatiese pyramide telling, ontwikkel ons 'n metode vir outomatiese onderwerking data genereering wat is gebaseer op 'n geneetiese algoritme gebruik van outomatiese pyramide as die toepassing funksie. Ons eksperimentale evaluering wys dat ons nuwe raamwerk betekeurig sterke basisline aangaande outomatiese piramide uitvoer, en dat daar is baie kamer vir verbetering in vergelyking met die bo-gebind vir outomatiese piramide.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një kuadër të ri të mbikqyrur që mëson të vlerësojë rezultatet automatike të Piramidës dhe i përdor a to për një përmbledhje ekstraktive me shumë dokumente bazuar në optimizacion. Për mësimin e rezultateve automatike të Piramidës, kemi zhvilluar një metodë për trajnimin automatik të gjenerimit të të dhënave që është bazuar në një algoritëm gjenetik duke përdorur Piramidën automatike si funksion të përshtatshmërisë. Our experimental evaluation shows that our new framework significantly outperforms strong baselines regarding automatic Pyramid, and that there is much room for improvement in comparison with the upper-bound for automatic Pyramid.', 'am': 'አዲስ የተጠበቀው ፍሬም በፕሪamid scores እንዲያስተምር እና ለብዙዎች የሰነድ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ እንዲጠቀሙ እናስጠጋቸዋለን፡፡ የPyramid ሁኔታዎችን ለመማር፣ የgenetic አልጎሪትም በሐሳብ Pyramid ጥያቄ በመጠቀም የተመሠረተውን የዳታ ትውልድ መፍጠርን ለራሱ ማስተማርን ሥርዓት አግኝተናል፡፡ ፈተና ማሳየት አዲስ ፍሬማችን በራሱ Pyramid ላይ የተደረገውን የበረታች መሠረት ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր վերահսկված շրջանակ, որը սովորում է գնահատել ավտոմատիկ Պիրամիդ գնահատականները և օգտագործում է դրանք օպտիմացիայի հիմնված բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման համար: Հայրամիդ ավտոմատիկ գնահատականների ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք ստեղծեցինք մեթոդ ավտոմատիկ ուսուցման տվյալների ստեղծման համար, որը հիմնված է գենետիկ ալգորիթմի վրա, օգտագործելով ավտոմատիկ Պայրամիդ որպես ֆունկցիա համապատասխանատ Մեր փորձարկվող գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր նոր շրջանակը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է ուժեղ հիմնական գծերը ավտոմատիկ Պիրամիդի վերաբերյալ, և որ շատ տեղ կա զարգացման համար, համեմատած ավտոմատիկ Պիրամիդի', 'az': 'Biz avtomatik Piramid nöqtələrini təmin etmək üçün öyrənən yeni gözləyirli framework ü göstəririk və onları optimizasiya tabanlı ekstraktif çoxlu döküm təmizləmək üçün istifadə edirik. Avtomatik Piramid nöqtələrini öyrənmək üçün, fitness fonksiyonu olaraq avtomatik təhsil məlumatları təhsil etmək üçün bir metodu təhsil etdik. Bizim təcrübəmiz təcrübəmiz göstərir ki, yeni frameyimiz automatik piramidə haqqında möhkəm təcrübə çətinliklərdən daha çox yüksək tərəflərimizi ilə müqayisədə yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün çox yer var.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন পর্যবেক্ষিত ফ্রেম উপস্থাপন করি যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রাইমিড স্কোর হিসেবে শিখতে শিখে এবং সেগুলো ব্যবহার করতে পারি অপমিশন ভিত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রাইমিড স্কোর শিখার জন্য আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য প্রজন্মের জন্য একটি পদ্ধতি উন্নয়ন করেছি যা স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রশি আমাদের পরীক্ষার মূল্য দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের নতুন কাঠামো স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পিরামিদের ব্যাপারে শক্তিশালী ভিত্তিতে পারে, আর স্বয়ংক্রিয় পিরামিডে', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novi nadzorni okvir koji nauči procjenu automatskih piramidskih rezultata i koristi ih za optimizaciju ekstraktivne multidokumentacije. Za učenje automatskih piramidskih rezultata, razvili smo metodu za generaciju automatskih treninga podataka koji se temelji na genetskom algoritmu koristeći automatsku piramidu kao funkciju pristojnosti. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da naš novi okvir značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije u vezi automatske piramide i da postoji mnogo mjesta za poboljšanje u usporedbi sa gornjem okviru za automatsku piramidu.', 'ca': "Presentam un nou marc supervisat que aprenen a estimar les puntuacions automàtiques de la piràmide i les utilitzen per a una resumida extractiva multidocumental basada en l'optimització. Per aprendre puntuacions automàtiques de la piràmide, vam desenvolupar un mètode d'entrenament automàtic generació de dades basat en un algoritme genètic utilitzant la piràmide automàtica com a funció d'aptitud. La nostra evaluació experimental mostra que el nostre nou marc supera significativament les fortes línies de base en relació a la Piràmide Automàtica, i que hi ha molt espai per millorar en comparació amb el límit superior de la Piràmide Automàtica.", 'cs': 'Představujeme nový monitorovaný framework, který se naučí odhadovat automatické skóre Pyramid a využívá je pro extraktivní souhrn více dokumentů založený na optimalizaci. Pro výuku automatických pyramidových skórí jsme vyvinuli metodu automatického generování tréninkových dat, která je založena na genetickém algoritmu s využitím automatické pyramidy jako funkce fitness. Naše experimentální hodnocení ukazuje, že náš nový rámec výrazně překonává silné základní linie týkající se automatické pyramidy a že ve srovnání s horní hranicí pro automatickou pyramidu existuje mnoho prostoru pro zlepšení.', 'et': 'Tutvustame uut järelevalveraamistikku, mis õpib hindama automaatseid püramiidi skoore ja kasutab neid optimeerimispõhiseks ekstraktiivseks mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtteks. Automaatsete püramiidide skooride õppimiseks töötasime välja meetodi automaatseks treeninguandmete geneetiliseks algoritmiks, mis põhineb füüsilise funktsioonina automaatsel püramiidil. Meie eksperimentaalne hindamine näitab, et meie uus raamistik on automaatse püramiidi osas oluliselt tugevamad lähtejooned ning et automaatse püramiidi ülemise piiriga võrreldes on palju arenguruumi.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden valvotun viitekehyksen, joka oppii arvioimaan automaattisia pyramidipitoisuuksia ja käyttää niitä optimointiin perustuvaan ekstraktiiviseen moniasiakirjayhteenvetoon. Automaattisten pyramidipitoisuuksien oppimiseksi kehitimme menetelmän automaattiseen harjoitusdatan tuottamiseen, joka perustuu geneettiseen algoritmiin, jossa kuntotoimintona käytetään automaattista pyramidia. Kokeellinen arviointimme osoittaa, että uusi viitekehys ylittää merkittävästi vahvat lähtökohdat automaattisen pyramidin osalta ja että parantamisen varaa on paljon verrattuna automaattisen pyramidin ylärajaan.', 'jv': 'We present a new super Vised frame that rns to assess automatically Pirramid points and use it for Optimisation-supported extraactive multi-document sumalization. Nyong sisanjur automatically piramik gambar, kita ngubah gunakake data Generation automatically singular Rasané awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno sing nggawe sistem sing luwih hayo nggawe barang akeh basa sing nggawe barang pengguna nyeasakno ora bisa basa piramid iki, lan ujaran kanggo ngerasahan kanggo ngerasakno karo akeh terakhir dhéwé, ning terakhir iki.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov nadzorovan okvir, ki se nauči ocenjevati avtomatske rezultate piramid in jih uporablja za optimizacijsko ekstraktivno povzetek večdokumentov. Za učenje avtomatskih piramidnih rezultatov smo razvili metodo za avtomatsko generiranje podatkov o vadbi, ki temelji na genetskem algoritmu, ki uporablja avtomatsko piramido kot fitnes funkcijo. Naša eksperimentalna ocena kaže, da je naš novi okvir bistveno boljši od močnih izhodiščnih linij glede avtomatske piramide in da je veliko prostora za izboljšave v primerjavi z zgornjo mejo avtomatske piramide.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים מסגרה חדשה מבוקשת שתלמד להעריך נקודות פירמידה אוטומטיות ומשתמשים בהן לסיוריזציה מולטימציה ממספרת מסמכים. כדי ללמוד נקודות פירמידה אוטומטיות, פיתחנו שיטה ליצירת נתונים אוטומטיים שמבוססת על אלגוריתם גנטי בשימוש פירמידה אוטומטית בתפקיד התאימה. Our experimental evaluation shows that our new framework significantly outperforms strong baselines regarding automatic Pyramid, and that there is much room for improvement in comparison with the upper-bound for automatic Pyramid.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani firam na tsari wanda yake iya amfani da yin ƙidãya ga kwanan-farat PPURMid kuma yana amfani da su zuwa masu kwamfyuta da aka ƙayyade masu ƙararin multi-dokuman. Ko da za'a sanar da kimar Pymido farat ɗaya, mun buɗe wata hanyoyi wa danna data farat ɗaya, wanda aka ƙaddara a kan algoritm na jeniya, don ka yi amfani da PPPramid farat ɗaya kamar funnin gyare. Kayan jarrabai na nuna cewa, firam-yanmu na samar masu ƙarfi masu hususan farat PirMid farat ɗaya, kuma there na da sauri mai girma ga gyarata sami da sami-bunkin da ke farat ɗaya.", 'bo': 'We present a new supervised framework that learns to estimate automatic Pyramid scores and uses them for optimization-based extractive multi-document summarization. For learning automatic Pyramid scores, we developed a method for automatic training data generation which is based on a genetic algorithm using automatic Pyramid as the fitness function. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པས་ང་ཚོའི་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་གསར་བ་ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་Pyramid་དང་འཁྲིལ'}
{'en': 'Selective Encoding for Abstractive Sentence Summarization', 'ar': 'ترميز انتقائي لتلخيص الجملة التلخيصية', 'fr': 'Encodage sélectif pour la synthèse de phrases abstraites', 'pt': 'Codificação seletiva para sumarização de sentenças abstratas', 'es': 'Codificación selectiva para el resumen abstractivo de oraciones', 'ja': '抽象文の要約のための選択的エンコーディング', 'zh': '抽象句摘要之选择性编码', 'hi': 'Abstractive वाक्य Summarization के लिए चयनात्मक एन्कोडिंग', 'ru': 'Селективное кодирование для резюмирования абстрактного предложения', 'ga': 'Ionchódú Roghnach le haghaidh Achoimriú Pianbhreithe Teibí', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური სიტყვების კონფიგურაციის მონიშნული კოდირება', 'hu': 'Szelektív kódolás absztrakt mondat összefoglalásához', 'el': 'Επιλεκτική κωδικοποίηση για περίληψη φράσεων', 'mk': 'Селективно кодирање за апстрактивна реченица', 'lt': 'Atrankinis kodavimas abstrakcinio sakinio santraukai', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ശാസ്ത്രത്തിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം', 'it': 'Codifica selettiva per la sintesi astratta delle frasi', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті сөз тұжырымдамасын таңдау кодтамасы', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Selektif untuk Penapisan Sentensi Abstractif', 'pl': 'Kodowanie selektywne dla streszczenia zdań abstrakcyjnych', 'mt': 'Kodifikazzjoni Selettiva għas-Sommarju tas-Sentenza Abstrattiva', 'ro': 'Codificare selectivă pentru rezumarea sentințelor abstracte', 'mn': 'Абстрактив өгүүлбэр дээр сонголт кодлог', 'no': 'Utvald koding for abstraktiv samansetting av teikn', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය වාක්ය සංසුරකරණය සඳහා තෝරාගන්න සංකේතනය', 'so': 'Qodeynta doorashada ee dhamaystirka xukunka', 'sv': 'Selektiv kodning för sammanfattning av abstrakta meningar', 'sr': 'Selektivno kodiranje za sažetak abstraktivnih rečenica', 'ur': 'Abstractive Sentence Summarization', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் சுருக்கம்', 'uz': 'Hisobot hisoboti uchun tanlangan kodlash usuli', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Selectieve codering voor abstracte zinssamenvatting', 'bg': 'Селективно кодиране за обобщаване на абстрактните изречения', 'da': 'Selektiv kodning til abstrakt sætningsopsummering', 'hr': 'Selektivno kodiranje za sažetak abstraktivnih izraza', 'de': 'Selektive Kodierung für abstraktive Satzsumme', 'id': 'Pengenkodan Selektif untuk Penapisan Sentensi Abstraktif', 'fa': 'رمزبندی انتخاب\u200cکننده برای جمع\u200cآوری کلمه\u200c', 'sw': 'Ufunguo wa Uchaguzi wa Ujumbe wa Hukumu', 'ko': '추상문 요약의 선택적 인코딩', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw sözler jeminatlamak üçin saýlaw ködleme', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'af': 'Kies Enkodering vir Abstractive Sentence Opsomming', 'sq': 'Kodifikimi selektiv për përmbledhjen e fjalëve abstraktive', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Selective Encoding for Abstractive Sentence Summarization', 'ca': 'Codificació selectiva per a resumir les sentences abstractes', 'az': 'Abstraktiv Sözü Toplaşdırması üçün seçici Kodlama', 'bs': 'Selektivno kodiranje za sažetak abstraktivnih izraza', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtliku lause kokkuvõtliku valikuline kodeering', 'fi': 'Abstraktin lauseen tiivistelmän selektiivinen koodaus', 'cs': 'Selektivní kódování pro shrnutí abstrakčních vět', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello worldkey echo', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Selektivno kodiranje za povzetek povzetka povzetka povzetka stavka', 'he': 'קידוד בוחר לסומריזציה משפטית', 'bo': 'ཕྱིར་མཚོན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྟངས་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'We propose a selective encoding model to extend the sequence-to-sequence framework for abstractive sentence summarization. It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder. The sentence encoder and decoder are built with recurrent neural networks. The selective gate network constructs a second level sentence representation by controlling the information flow from encoder to decoder. The second level representation is tailored for sentence summarization task, which leads to better performance. We evaluate our model on the English Gigaword, DUC 2004 and MSR abstractive sentence summarization datasets. The experimental results show that the proposed selective encoding model outperforms the state-of-the-art baseline models.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذج ترميز انتقائي لتوسيع إطار التسلسل إلى التسلسل لتلخيص الجملة التجريدية. وهو يتألف من مشفر الجملة ، وشبكة بوابة انتقائية ، ووحدة فك ترميز مجهزة للانتباه. تم بناء مشفر الجملة ومفكك التشفير مع الشبكات العصبية المتكررة. تنشئ شبكة البوابة الانتقائية تمثيلاً للجملة من المستوى الثاني من خلال التحكم في تدفق المعلومات من جهاز التشفير إلى وحدة فك التشفير. تم تصميم تمثيل المستوى الثاني لمهمة تلخيص الجملة ، مما يؤدي إلى أداء أفضل. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا على مجموعات بيانات تلخيص الجملة التجريدية باللغة الإنجليزية Gigaword و DUC 2004 و MSR. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذج الترميز الانتقائي المقترح يتفوق على أحدث النماذج الأساسية.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle de codage sélectif pour étendre le cadre séquence à séquence pour la synthèse de phrases abstraites. Il se compose d'un codeur de phrase, d'un réseau de portes sélectives et d'un décodeur équipé de l'attention. Le codeur et le décodeur de phrases sont construits avec des réseaux neuronaux récurrents Le réseau de portes sélectives construit une représentation de phrase de second niveau en contrôlant le flux d'informations entre le codeur et le décodeur. La représentation de deuxième niveau est adaptée à la tâche de synthèse des phrases, ce qui permet d'améliorer les performances. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur les ensembles de données de synthèse de phrases abstraites en anglais Gigaword, DUC 2004 et MSR. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle de codage sélectif proposé surpasse les modèles de base de pointe.", 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo de codificación selectiva para extender el marco de secuencia a secuencia para el resumen abstractivo de oraciones. Consiste en un codificador de oraciones, una red de puertas selectivas y un decodificador equipado con atención. El codificador y el decodificador de frases están construidos con redes neuronales recurrentes. La red de puertas selectivas construye una representación de oración de segundo nivel controlando el flujo de información desde el codificador al decodificador. La representación de segundo nivel está diseñada para la tarea de resumen de oraciones, lo que conduce a un mejor rendimiento. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en los conjuntos de datos de resumen abstractivo de oraciones en inglés Gigaword, DUC 2004 y MSR. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el modelo de codificación selectiva propuesto supera a los modelos de referencia más avanzados.', 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo de codificação seletiva para estender a estrutura de sequência a sequência para sumarização de sentenças abstratas. Consiste em um codificador de sentença, uma rede de portas seletivas e um decodificador equipado com atenção. O codificador e o decodificador de sentenças são construídos com redes neurais recorrentes. A rede de portas seletivas constrói uma representação de sentença de segundo nível controlando o fluxo de informações do codificador para o decodificador. A representação de segundo nível é adaptada para tarefa de sumarização de frases, o que leva a um melhor desempenho. Avaliamos nosso modelo nos conjuntos de dados de sumarização de frases abstratas do Inglês Gigaword, DUC 2004 e MSR. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o modelo de codificação seletiva proposto supera os modelos de linha de base de última geração.', 'ja': '抽象文要約のシーケンスツーシーケンスフレームワークを拡張するための選択的符号化モデルを提案します。文エンコーダ、選択ゲートネットワーク、注意を払うデコーダで構成されています。文エンコーダとデコーダは、反復ニューラルネットワークで構築されています。選択ゲートネットワークは、エンコーダからデコーダへの情報フローを制御することによって、第２のレベルの文章表現を構築する。第2レベルの表現は、より良いパフォーマンスにつながる文章要約タスクに合わせて調整されています。私たちは、英語のGigaword、DUC 2004およびMSR抽象的な文章要約データセットに基づいてモデルを評価します。実験結果は、提案された選択的符号化モデルが最先端のベースラインモデルを上回ることを示している。', 'zh': '建选择性编码模形,以广其序框架以象句汇。 一句编码器,一选择性门网络,一解码器。 句编码器与解码器,以递归神经网络构也。 选择性门网络制自编码器至解码器信息流以构第二级句。 第二级言总任务量身制,可以得善。 我于英语Gigaword,DUC 2004与MSR抽象句摘要数集上评我形势。 实验结果表明,选择性编码先基线。', 'hi': 'हम अमूर्त वाक्य सारांशीकरण के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ढांचे का विस्तार करने के लिए एक चयनात्मक एन्कोडिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसमें एक वाक्य एन्कोडर, एक चयनात्मक गेट नेटवर्क और एक ध्यान सुसज्जित डिकोडर शामिल हैं। वाक्य एन्कोडर और डिकोडर आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ बनाए जाते हैं। चयनात्मक गेट नेटवर्क एनकोडर से डिकोडर तक सूचना प्रवाह को नियंत्रित करके एक दूसरे स्तर के वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण करता है। दूसरे स्तर का प्रतिनिधित्व वाक्य सारांशीकरण कार्य के लिए तैयार किया गया है, जो बेहतर प्रदर्शन की ओर जाता है। हम अंग्रेजी गीगावर्ड, DUC 2004 और MSR abstractive वाक्य summarization datasets पर हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित चयनात्मक एन्कोडिंग मॉडल अत्याधुनिक बेसलाइन मॉडल को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем модель селективного кодирования для расширения структуры последовательности к последовательности для абстрактного обобщения предложений. Он состоит из кодировщика предложений, сети селективных ворот и декодера, оборудованного вниманием. Кодер предложения и декодер построены с рекуррентными нейронными сетями. Сеть селективных затворов строит представление предложения второго уровня путем управления информационным потоком от кодера к декодеру. Представление второго уровня адаптировано для задачи обобщения предложений, что приводит к лучшей производительности. Мы оцениваем нашу модель на основе английских наборов данных Gigaword, DUC 2004 и MSR для абстрактного обобщения предложений. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемая модель селективного кодирования превосходит современные базовые модели.', 'ga': "Molaimid samhail ionchódaithe roghnaíoch chun an creat seicheamh-go-seicheamh a leathnú le haghaidh achoimre abairtí teibí. Tá sé comhdhéanta d'ionchódóir abairte, líonra geata roghnach, agus díchódóir aire-fheistithe. Tógtar an t-ionchódóir abairtí agus an díchódóir le líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha. Tógann an líonra geata roghnach léiriú abairte dara leibhéal tríd an sreabhadh faisnéise a rialú ón ionchódóir go dtí an díchódóir. Déantar an ionadaíocht dara leibhéal a shaincheapadh don tasc achoimrithe pianbhreithe, as a dtagann feidhmíocht níos fearr. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár múnla ar thacair sonraí achoimre abairtí teibí Gigaword, DUC 2004 agus MSR. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an tsamhail ionchódaithe roghnaíoch atá beartaithe na samhlacha bunlíne den scoth.", 'hu': 'Szelektív kódolási modellt javasolunk az absztraktív mondatok összefoglalásához szükséges szekvencia-szekvencia keretrendszer kiterjesztésére. Egy mondatkódolóból, egy szelektív kapuhálózatból és egy figyelemfelszerelt dekóderből áll. A mondatkódoló és dekódoló visszatérő neurális hálózatokkal van felépítve. A szelektív kapu-hálózat egy második szintű mondat ábrázolását építi fel úgy, hogy szabályozza az információáramlást a kódolótól a dekódolóig. A második szintű ábrázolás a mondat összefoglalási feladatra szabott, ami jobb teljesítményt eredményez. Modellünket az angol Gigaword, DUC 2004 és MSR absztraktív mondat összefoglaló adatkészletek alapján értékeljük. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt szelektív kódolási modell felülmúlja a korszerű alapmodelleket.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο επιλεκτικής κωδικοποίησης για να επεκτείνουμε το πλαίσιο ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία για την αφηρημένη περίληψη προτάσεων. Αποτελείται από έναν κωδικοποιητή προτάσεων, ένα επιλεκτικό δίκτυο πυλών, και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή εξοπλισμένο με προσοχή. Ο κωδικοποιητής και ο αποκωδικοποιητής προτάσεων είναι κατασκευασμένοι με επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Το επιλεκτικό δίκτυο πυλών κατασκευάζει μια αναπαράσταση προτάσεων δεύτερου επιπέδου ελέγχοντας τη ροή πληροφοριών από τον κωδικοποιητή στον αποκωδικοποιητή. Η αναπαράσταση δεύτερου επιπέδου είναι προσαρμοσμένη για εργασία σύνοψης προτάσεων, η οποία οδηγεί σε καλύτερη απόδοση. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας με βάση τα σύνολα δεδομένων αφηρημένης σύνοψης προτάσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιλεκτικής κωδικοποίησης ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα βάσης.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აბსტრაქტიგური სიმბოლოების შესაძლებლობისთვის სექციური კოდირების მოდელის გავამრავლებთ. ეს არის სიტყვების კოდირებისგან, არჩეულებული გეტატის ქსელის და დააყენებული აკოდირებისგან. სიტყვების კოდერი და დეკოდერი რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელებით შექმნა. მონიშნული ქსელის ქსელი კონტრუქტურებს მეორე დონე სიტყვების გამოსახულება, რომელიც ინფორმაციის გარეშე კონტრუქტურებაში კონტროლისტურ მეორე დონე გამოსახულება შესაძლებელია, რომელიც უფრო მეტი გამოსახულება. ჩვენ ინგლისური Gigaword, DUC 2004 და MSR აბსტრაქტიგური სიტყვების საზოგადოებაზე ჩვენი მოდელის გავამუშავებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენებენ, რომ მოძლევებული ელექციური კოდირების მოდელი უფრო გავაკეთებს ხელსაწყოთა მოდელს.', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello di codifica selettiva per estendere il framework sequenza-sequenza per la sintesi astratta delle frasi. È costituito da un codificatore di frasi, una rete selettiva di gate e un decoder dotato di attenzione. Il codificatore di frasi e il decoder sono costruiti con reti neurali ricorrenti. La rete selettiva di gate costruisce una rappresentazione di frase di secondo livello controllando il flusso di informazioni dall'encoder al decoder. La rappresentazione di secondo livello è personalizzata per il compito di sintesi delle frasi, che porta a migliori prestazioni. Valutiamo il nostro modello in inglese Gigaword, DUC 2004 e MSR. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il modello di codifica selettiva proposto supera i modelli di base all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Предложуваме селективен модел на кодирање за проширување на рамката од секвенца до секвенца за апстрактивна реченица. It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder.  Кодерот на речениците и декодерот се изградени со рецидентни нервни мрежи. Селективната мрежа на порти конструира претставување на реченици на второ ниво со контрола на протокот на информации од кодер до декодер. Претставувањето на второто ниво е прилагодено за задачата за резултат на речениците, што води до подобра резултатност. Ние го проценуваме нашиот модел на англискиот Гигаворд, ДУЦ 2004 и MSR апстрактивни набори на податоци за резултати на речениците. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот селективен кодирачки модел ги надминува најдобрите основни модели.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന കോഡിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ സംഖ്യയ്ക്കുള വാക്കിന്റെ കോഡെര്\u200d, തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഗേറ്റ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കും, ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്ക വാക്കിന്റെ എന്\u200dകോഡെരും ഡെക്കോഡെരും ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ക തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ഗേറ്റ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും കോഡോഡിറ്റരിലേക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d  രണ്ടാമത്തെ നില പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള ജോലിക്കായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഗിഗാവോര്\u200dഡ്, ഡിയുസി 2004 എന്നിട്ടും എസ്എംഎംഎംഎംഎംഎംഎംഎംഎംഎല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ സംസ്കാര പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന കോഡിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ മോഡല്\u200d നിലവ', 'mt': 'We propose a selective encoding model to extend the sequence-to-sequence framework for abstractive sentence summarization.  Din tikkonsisti f’kodifikatur tas-sentenzi, netwerk selettiv tal-gate, u dekoder mgħammar bl-attenzjoni. Il-kodifikatur u d-dekoder tas-sentenzi jinbnew b’netwerks newrali rikorrenti. In-netwerk selettiv tal-gate jibni rappreżentazzjoni tas-sentenza tat-tieni livell billi jikkontrolla l-fluss tal-informazzjoni minn kodifikatur għal dekoder. Ir-rappreżentanza tat-tieni livell hija mfassla apposta għall-kompitu ta’ sommarju tas-sentenzi, li jwassal għal prestazzjoni aħjar. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell tagħna dwar is-settijiet tad-dejta dwar is-sommarju tas-sentenzi abstrattivi tal-Ingliż Gigaword, DUC 2004 u MSR. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell ta’ kodifikazzjoni selettiva propost jaqbeż il-mudelli ta’ linja bażi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'kk': 'Біз таңдау кодтамасын таңдау үлгісін абстрактивті сөздердің тәртібін кеңейту үшін таңдау үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл сөздің кодтамасы, таңдалған қапшықтар желінен және қарау құрылған декодтамасынан тұрады. Сөздің кодері мен декодері қайталанатын неврал желімен құрылады. Таңдалған қапшық желі екінші деңгейіндегі мәліметті кодерден декодерге бақылап құрады. Екінші деңгейіндегі мәліметтің тұжырымдамасының тапсырмасы үшін өзгертілген, бұл жақсы істеу үшін болады. Біз ағылшын тіліндегі Gigaword, DUC 2004 және MSR абстрактивті мәтіндерді жазылу деректерінің үлгісін бағалаймыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер таңдалған таңдалған кодтамас үлгісі суреттің негізгі үлгілерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Siūlome pasirinktinį kodavimo model į, kad būtų išplėsta eilės po eilės sistema abstrakčiam sakinio apibendrinimui. Jį sudaro sakinių kodatorius, atrankinis vartų tinklas ir dėmesio įrengtas dekoderis. Pasakymų kodatorius ir dekoderis yra sukurti su pasikartojančiais nerviniais tinklais. Pasirinktinis vartų tinklas sukuria antrojo lygio sakinio atstovavimą, kontroliuodamas informacijos srautą nuo koduotojo iki dekoderio. Antrojo lygio atstovavimas pritaikytas sakinių santraukos uždaviniui, dėl kurio bus geriau vykdomi veiksmai. Vertiname savo anglų Gigaword, DUC 2004 ir MSR abstrakčių sakinių santraukų duomenų rinkinius. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas atrankinis kodavimo modelis atitinka naujausius pradinius modelius.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model pengekodan selektif untuk memperluas rangkaian urutan-ke-urutan untuk ringkasan kalimat abstraktif. Ia terdiri dari pengekod kalimat, rangkaian pintu selektif, dan pengekod yang dilengkapi perhatian. The sentence encoder and decoder are built with recurrent neural networks.  Rangkaian pintu selektif membina mewakili kalimat tahap kedua dengan mengawal aliran maklumat dari pengekod ke pengekod. Perwakilan aras kedua disesuaikan untuk tugas pengringkasan kalimat, yang membawa kepada prestasi yang lebih baik. Kami menilai model kami pada set data penghuraian kalimat Inggeris Gigaword, DUC 2004 dan MSR abstraktif. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model pengekodan selektif yang direncanakan melebihi model dasar state-of-the-art.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit selektiv kodingsmodell for å utvida framlegget til sekvens-til-sekvens for abstraktiv setjing. Det inneheld eit setningskoder, eit utvald gatnettverk, og eit oppmerksomsikt med dekoder. Setningskooderen og dekoderen er bygd med gjentaande neuralnettverk. Den valde portanettverket konstruerer eit andre nivåsetninga ved å kontrollera informasjonsflyttet frå kodaren til dekoder. Den andre nivået representasjonen er tilpassa for setjingsammendrag, som fører til bedre utvikling. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt på engelske Gigaword, DUC 2004 og MSR abstraktive setningsdata. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at den foreslåde selektive kodingsmodellen utfører baseline-modellen for kunsttilstanden.', 'mn': 'Бид сонголт кодломжтой загварыг abstractive өгүүлбэрийн тодорхойлолтын дарааллаар-дарааллаар нэмэгдүүлэх хэлбэрийг санал болгоно. Энэ нь өгүүлбэр коддогч, сонголт хаалтын сүлжээ, анхаарал хангамжтай загвартай байдаг. Холбооны кодер болон шийдвэрлэгч дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр бүтээж байна. Шинэ сонголт хаалтын сүлжээнд хоёр дахь хэмжээний өгүүлбэрийг коддоос шилжүүлэх хүртэл удирдаж байдаг. Хоёр дахь түвшинд үзүүлэлт нь өгүүлбэрийн жинхэнэ үйл ажиллагаанд зохион байдаг. Энэ нь илүү сайн үйл ажиллагаанд хүргэж чадна. Бид Англи хэлний Gigaword, DUC 2004, MSR abstractive sentence summarization datasets дээр загварыг үнэлдэг. Шинэ туршилтын үр дүн нь сонголт кодлох загвар нь урлагийн суурь шугам загваруудыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model de codificare selectivă pentru extinderea cadrului secvență-la-secvență pentru rezumarea abstractivă a propozițiilor. Constă dintr-un codificator de propoziții, o rețea selectivă de porți și un decoder echipat cu atenție. Encoder de propoziţii şi decodor sunt construite cu reţele neurale recurente. Rețeaua de porți selective construiește o reprezentare a frazei de nivel al doilea, controlând fluxul de informații de la encoder la decoder. Reprezentarea de nivel al doilea este adaptată pentru sarcina de rezumare a frazelor, ceea ce duce la o performanță mai bună. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe seturile de date de rezumare abstractivă a frazelor Gigaword, DUC 2004 și MSR în limba engleză. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul de codificare selectivă propus depășește modelele de bază de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy selektywny model kodowania, aby rozszerzyć ramy sekwencji do sekwencji dla abstrakcyjnego podsumowania zdań. Składa się z kodera zdań, selektywnej sieci bramy i dekodera wyposażonego w uwagę. Koder zdań i dekoder są zbudowane z powtarzających się sieci neuronowych. Sieć selektywnych bram konstruuje reprezentację zdań drugiego poziomu poprzez kontrolę przepływu informacji z kodera do dekodera. Reprezentacja drugiego poziomu jest dostosowana do zadań podsumowywania zdań, co prowadzi do lepszej wydajności. Oceniamy nasz model na podstawie zbiorów danych abstrakcyjnego podsumowania zdań angielskich Gigaword, DUC 2004 i MSR. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowany model kodowania selektywnego przewyższa najnowocześniejsze modele bazowe.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en selektiv kodningsmodell för att utöka sekvens-till-sekvensramverket för abstraktiv meningssammanfattning. Den består av en meningskoder, ett selektivt grindnätverk och en uppmärksamhetsutrustning avkodare. Fraskodaren och avkodaren är byggda med återkommande neurala nätverk. Det selektiva grindnätverket konstruerar en andra nivå mening representation genom att styra informationsflödet från kodare till avkodare. Den andra nivån representation är skräddarsydd för meningsuppfattningsuppgifter, vilket leder till bättre prestanda. Vi utvärderar vår modell på engelska Gigaword, DUC 2004 och MSR abstrakta meningssammanfattningsdata. De experimentella resultaten visar att den föreslagna selektiva kodningsmodellen överträffar de senaste baslinjemodellerna.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo selektivni model kodiranja da proširi okvir sekvence do sekvence za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice. To se sastoji od kodera rečenice, selektivne mreže vrata i pažnje opremljenog dekodera. Koder i dekoder rečenice su izgrađeni sa rekonstruiranim neuralnim mrežama. Selektivna mreža vrata izgradi zastupanje druge rečenice na nivou kontroliranjem informacijskog toka od kodera do dekodera. Druga razina predstavlja se prilagođena za zaključavanje rečenica, što vodi do boljih izvođenja. Procjenjujemo naš model na engleskom Gigaword, DUC 2004 i MSR sažetke podataka za sažetak abstraktivnih rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi selektivni model kodiranja iznosi početne modele stanja umjetnosti.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model kooban oo la doortay in la sii wado qalabka xiliga-iyo-xilliga, si loo soo saaro dhamaanka qeybta ah. Waxaa ka mid ah codsiga qoraalka, shabakadda doorashada iyo hagitaanka. Qoraalka erayga waxaa lagu dhisaa shabakada naafada ee soo socda. Shabakadda doorashada la doortay wuxuu dhisaa qeybta heerka labaad ee la wakiilo si uu u maamulo boosaska macluumaadka codsiga. Heerka labaad waxaa lagu dabarayaa shaqada dhameystirka xafiiska, taasoo ku hoggaamiya sameynta wanaagsan. Tusaalka aan ku qiimeynaynaa qoraalka ku saabsan Ingiriiska Gigaword, DUC 2004 iyo macluumaadka xafiiska xafiiska ah ee MSR. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modelka kooban ee la soo jeeday uu ka muujiyo muusikada asalka farshaxanka.', 'si': 'අපි තෝරාගන්න තෝරාගන්න සංකේතනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. ඒකේ වාක්ය සංකේතකයෙක්, තෝරාගන්න ගේට් ජාලයෙක්, අවධානයක් සංකේතකයෙක්. වාක්ය සංකේතකය සහ සංකේතකය නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. තෝරාගන්න ගේට් ජාලයෙන් දෙවෙනි මට්ටම් වචනයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා කෝඩාර් වලින් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවාහනය කරනව දෙවෙනි ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විශේෂය සම්පූර්ණය වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒකෙන් හොඳ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජිගාවර්ඩ්, DUC 2004 සහ MSR වාර්තාවක් වාර්තාවක් සංශ්\u200dය සංශ්\u200dයාවක් ගොනුවක් ගැන අපේ මඩ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත සංකේතනය මදුල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරති', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட குறியீட்டு மாதிரி தொடர் சுருக்கம் இது ஒரு வாக்கு குறியீடு, ஒரு தேர்வு வாயில் வலைப்பின்னல், மற்றும் ஒரு கவனம் குறியீட்டாளர். வாக்கியத்தின் குறியீடு மற்றும் குறியீட்டாளர் மறுநிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணையத்தின் மூலம் உருவாக்கப் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வாயில் வலைப்பின்னல் குறியீட்டிலிருந்து தகவல் மாற்றியை கட்டுப்படுத்தி இரண்டாவது நி இரண்டாவது நிலை குறிப்பிடுதல் வாக்கியத்தின் சுருக்குதல் செயலுக்கு வரையறுக்கப்பட்டது, அது சிறந்த செயல்பாட நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் கிகாவோர்டு, DUC 2004 மற்றும் எம்எம்ஆர் வாக்கியின் சுருக்கம் தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் மாதிரி சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم ایک انتخاب اکنوڈینگ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ آپٹراکتیوں جماعت کے لئے سفارشی سے سفارش کرے۔ یہ ایک جماعت کا کوڈر ہے، ایک انتخاب گریٹ نیٹ ورک اور ایک توجه کا دکوڈر ہے. sentence encoder and decoder are built with recurrent neural networks. گزینٹیو گیٹ نیٹ ورک ایک دوسری سطح سطح کا نمایش بناتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے انکوڈر سے ڈکوڈر تک معلومات جاری کو کنٹرول کر رہا ہے. دوسری سطح نمایش جمع کرنے کے لئے تغییر کی جاتی ہے، جو بہتر عملکرد کی طرف چلتی ہے. ہم انگلیسی Gigaword، DUC 2004 اور MSR مفصل جمع کرنا ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہماری مدل کا ارزش کرتے ہیں. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد گزینٹیوں اکنوڈینگ موڈل کی حالت-آرتی بیس لین موڈل سے کام نہیں لیتا۔', 'uz': "Biz cheksiz kodlash usulini avtomatik soʻzni kichiklashtirish uchun seksiz cheksiz chegarasini oshirish imkoniyatini tahlil qilamiz. Name @ info: whatsthis Name Ikkinchi darajada tashkilotni birinchi darajaga tahrirlash vazifasi qo'shiladi. Bu yaxshi bajarish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Biz ingliz tilidagi gigaword, DUC 2004 va MSR tahrirlash tugmasining modelimizni qiymatimiz. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, talab qilingan tanlangan kodlash modeli asl asosiy modellarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình mã hóa chọn lọc để mở rộng quy trình phân tử cho việc tổng kết đoạn. Nó bao gồm một bộ mã hóa câu, một mạng lưới cổng chọn lọc, và một bộ giải mã được trang bị chú ý. Câu nói mã hóa và bộ giải được xây dựng bằng mạng thần kinh thường xuyên. Mạng cổng chọn tạo ra một mức án thứ hai bằng cách điều khiển dòng thông tin từ bộ mã hóa đến bộ giải. Việc đại diện cấp hai được phù hợp cho việc tóm tắt các bản án, dẫn đến hiệu quả tốt hơn. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi về hệ thống dữ liệu về tổng hợp bản án ở Anh Gigaword, hạn gô và MSR. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mẫu mã hóa được đề xuất vượt trội các mẫu cơ bản hiện đại.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en selektiv kodningsmodel for at udvide sekvens-til-sekvensrammen for abstraktiv sætningsopsummering. Den består af en sætningskoder, et selektivt gatenetværk og en opmærksomhedsudstyret dekoder. Sætningskoderen og dekoderen er bygget med tilbagevendende neurale netværk. Det selektive gatenetværk konstruerer en anden niveau sætning repræsentation ved at styre informationsstrømmen fra encoder til dekoder. Det andet niveau repræsentation er skræddersyet til sætningsopsummering opgave, hvilket fører til bedre ydeevne. Vi evaluerer vores model på de engelske Gigaword, DUC 2004 og MSR abstractive sætning summering datasæt. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede selektive kodningsmodel overgår de avancerede basismodeller.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме селективен модел на кодиране за разширяване на рамката последователност към последователност за абстрактно обобщаване на изречения. Състои се от кодер на изречения, селективна портална мрежа и декодер, оборудван с внимание. Кодирачът и декодерът на изреченията са изградени с повтарящи се невронни мрежи. Селективната портална мрежа изгражда представяне на изречение от второ ниво чрез контролиране на информационния поток от кодера към декодера. Представянето на второ ниво е съобразено със задачата за обобщаване на изреченията, което води до по-добро представяне. Ние оценяваме нашия модел на английски гигадума, DUC 2004 и MSR абстрактно обобщаване на изречения набор от данни. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният селективен модел на кодиране надминава съвременните базови модели.', 'nl': 'We stellen een selectief coderingsmodel voor om het sequence-to-sequence framework voor abstractieve zinssamenvatting uit te breiden. Het bestaat uit een zinnencoder, een selectief poortnetwerk en een aandacht uitgeruste decoder. De zinnencoder en decoder zijn gebouwd met terugkerende neurale netwerken. Het selectieve poortnetwerk construeert een tweede niveau zinsweergave door de informatiestroom van encoder naar decoder te controleren. Het tweede niveau representatie is aangepast voor zinssamenvattingstaak, wat leidt tot betere prestaties. We evalueren ons model op de Engelse Gigaword, DUC 2004 en MSR abstracte zinssamenvattingsdatasets. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde selectieve coderingsmodel beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art baseline modellen.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo selektivni model kodiranja da proširi okvir sekvence do sekvence za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice. To se sastoji od kodera rečenice, selektivne mreže vrata i pažnje opremljenog dekodera. Koder i dekoder rečenica su izgrađeni s rekonstruiranim nervnim mrežama. Selektivna mreža vrata konstruira zastupanje druge rečenice na razini kontrolirajući tok informacija od kodera do dekodera. Druga razina predstavlja se prilagođena za zaključavanje kazne, što vodi do boljih učinka. Procjenjujemo naš model o sažetkama podataka o engleskom Gigaword, DUC 2004 i MSR abstraktivnim rečenicama. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi selektivni model kodiranja iznosi početne modele stanja umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein selektives Codierungsmodell vor, um das Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Framework für die abstraktive Satzsummung zu erweitern. Es besteht aus einem Satz-Encoder, einem selektiven Gate-Netzwerk und einem aufmerksamkeitsstarken Decoder. Satzkodierer und -decoder sind mit wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzen aufgebaut. Das selektive Gate-Netzwerk konstruiert eine zweite Satzdarstellung, indem es den Informationsfluss vom Encoder zum Decoder steuert. Die Repräsentation der zweiten Ebene ist auf die Aufgabe der Satzungszusammenfassung zugeschnitten, was zu einer besseren Leistung führt. Wir evaluieren unser Modell anhand der englischen Gigaword-, DUC 2004- und MSR-Datensätze zur abstraktiven Satzzusammenfassung. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene selektive Kodierungsmodell die aktuellen Baseline-Modelle übertrifft.', 'ko': '우리는 추상적인 문장 요약의 서열을 서열 구조로 확장하기 위해 선택적 인코딩 모델을 제시했다.그것은 문장 인코더, 선택문 네트워크, 주의력을 갖춘 디코더로 구성되어 있다.문장 인코딩과 디코딩은 귀속 신경 네트워크를 채택한다.선택문 네트워크는 인코더에서 디코더로의 정보 흐름을 제어함으로써 2급 문장 표시를 구성한다.두 번째 단계는 문장 요약 작업을 위한 맞춤형 작업으로 더욱 좋은 성능을 낼 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리는 영문 Gigaword,DUC 2004와 MSR 추상문 요약 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델을 평가했다.실험 결과에 의하면 제시된 선택적 인코딩 모델은 기존의 기선 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل رمزبندی انتخاب را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها این از یک رمزگر جمله، شبکه دروازه انتخاب کننده و یک رمزگر توجه آماده شده است. رمز و dekoder جمله با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره ساخته می\u200cشوند. شبکه دروازه انتخاب\u200cکننده یک جمله\u200cی سطح دوم را با کنترل جریان اطلاعات از کوډر تا dekoder ساخته می\u200cکند. نمایش سطح دوم برای عملیات جمع کردن مجازات تغییر داده می شود که به عملیات بهتر هدایت می کند. ما مدل خود را بر روی مجموعه\u200cهای جمع کردن مجموعه\u200cهای انگلیسی Gigaword، DUC ۲۰۰۴ و MSR ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که مدل رمزبندی انتخاب\u200cکننده\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط هنر را اجرا می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model pengekodan selektif untuk memperluas rangkaian urutan-ke-urutan untuk ringkasan kalimat abstraktif. Ini terdiri dari pengekoder kalimat, jaringan gerbang selektif, dan pengekoder peralatan perhatian. Pengekoder dan dekoder kalimat dibangun dengan jaringan saraf yang berkurang. Jaringan gerbang selektif membangun representation kalimat tingkat kedua dengan mengontrol aliran informasi dari pengekode ke pengekode. Perwakilan tingkat kedua disesuaikan untuk tugas ringkasan kalimat, yang mengarah ke prestasi yang lebih baik. Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada Gigaword Inggris, DUC 2004 dan MSR abstraktif kalimat dataset. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model pengekodan selektif yang diusulkan melampaui batas model dasar state-of-the-art.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza modeli ya kodi ya chaguo ya kuongeza mfumo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa muhtasari wa hukumu isiyo na maana. Inajumuisha kodi ya hukumu, mtandao wa mlango wa chaguo, na mwangalizi unaoandaliwa. Encodi na decodi ya hukumu imejengwa kwa mitandao ya kijamii yanayoendelea. The selective gate network constructs a second level sentence representation by controlling the information flow from encoder to decoder.  Uwakilishaji wa ngazi ya pili unafuatiliwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya muhtasari wa hukumu, ambayo inapelekea kufanya kazi bora zaidi. Tunatathmini mfano wetu katika takwimu za muhtasari wa hukumu ya Kiingereza Gigaword, DUC 2004 na MSR. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya kodi ya chaguo inaonyesha mifano ya msingi wa sanaa.', 'tr': 'Biz saýlaw bir ködleme nusgasyny abstraktiv sözlemler üçin sequence-to-sequence çerçevesini uzatmak üçin teklip edip görýäris. Bu sözlem kodçysy, saýlaw gapysynyň a ňlasy we üns kodçysy bar. Sözleme ködleme we kodçödleme tekrarly näyral şebekleri bilen inşa edildi. Saýlaw geçmek a ňry koderden kodlemek üçin ikinji düzüm sözlemi teşkerýär Ikinji dereje janlaşyk sözleriň jemgyýetişdirim zady üçin düzenlenýär, bu da gowy başaryşlara geler. Biz iňlis dilinde Gigaword, DUC 2004 we MSR hilli sözlerimizi terjime etmek üçin nusgamyzy çykýarys Synaniýaly netijeler teklip eden saýlaw ködleme nusgasynda sungat çykyş nusgasyny üstün edýär.', 'am': 'የተመረጠውን የፊደል አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ቁጥጥር ማሳሰሪያ ለመዘረጋ እናስጀምራለን፡፡ It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder.  የፊደል ቅርጽ አቋራጭ የተመረጠው የዌብ መክፈት የሁለተኛ ደረጃ ቁጥጥር ማቀናጃ ክፍተቶችን ከመክፈት ወደ አዲስ መስኮት በመቆጣጠር ይሠራል። ሁለተኛው ደረጃ መልዕክት ለፍርድ ማሳነስ ስራ ነው፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ጊጋword፣ ዲዩሲ 2004 እና አሜስር አካባቢ የውይይት ዳታዎችን እናስተውሉናለን፡፡ የፈተናው ውጤቶች የተዘጋጀው ምርጫ የሆኑት የፊደል ኮድ ሞዴል የ-አርእስት መደገፊያ ሥርዓት መደገፊያውን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të kodimit selektiv për të zgjeruar kuadrin sekuencë-në-sekuencë për përmbledhjen abstraktive të fjalëve. Përbëhet nga një kodues fjalësh, një rrjet zgjedhor portë dhe një dekoder i pajisur me vëmendje. Koduesi dhe dekodimi i fjalëve janë ndërtuar me rrjete neurale të përsëritura. Rrjeti selektiv i portës ndërton një përfaqësim të fjalëve të nivelit të dytë duke kontrolluar rrjedhjen e informacionit nga koduesi në dekoder. Përfaqësuesi i nivelit të dytë është i përshtatur për detyrën e përmbledhjes së fjalëve, e cila shpie në performancë më të mirë. Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë në Gigaword Anglez, DUC 2004 dhe MSR abstraktive sentence summary datasets. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli i propozuar i kodimit selektiv ekziston mbi modelet bazë më të moderne.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք ընտրական կոդավորման մոդել, որպեսզի ընդլայնվի հաջորդականության հաջորդականությունը վերացրատիվ նախադասությունների համառոտագրման համար: It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder.  Վերջին անգամ նյարդային ցանցերով են կառուցվում նախադասությունների կոդերը և կոդերը: Ընտրական դարպասի ցանցը կառուցում է երկրորդ մակարդակի նախադասությունների ներկայացումը, կառավարելով տեղեկատվության հոսքը կոդավորից դեպի կոդավոր: Երկրորդ մակարդակի ներկայացումը պատրաստված է նախադասությունների համառոտագրման խնդրի համար, ինչը հանգեցնում է ավելի լավ արդյունքների: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը Անգլերեն Գիգավորդի, 2004 թ․-ի և MSR-ի վերացական նախադասությունների համառոտագրման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված ընտրական կոդավորման մոդելը գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր հիմնական մոդելները:', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n selektiewe enkodering model om die sekvens-na-sekvens raamwerk te uitbrei vir abstraktiewe sentence opsomming. Dit bestaan van 'n setkoder, 'n selektiewe poortnetwerk, en 'n aandag beskikbaar dekoder. Die setkoder en dekoder word gebou met herhaalde neuralnetwerke. Die selektiewe poort netwerk konstrukteer 'n tweede vlak voorstelling deur die inligting vloei van enkoder na dekoder te beheer. Die tweede vlak verteenwoording is vergroot vir sentence opsomming taak, wat lei na beter prestasie. Ons evalueer ons model op die Engelse Gigaword, DUC 2004 en MSR abstractive sentence summarization datasets. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde selektiewe enkoderingsmodeel uitvoer die state-of-the-art baseline modele.", 'ca': "Proposem un model de codificació selectiu per estendre el marc de seqüència a seqüència per a resumir les frases abstractes. It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder.  El codificador de frases i el decodificador estan construïts amb xarxes neurals recurrents. La xarxa selectiva de porta construeix una representació de frases de segon nivell controlant el flux d'informació del codificador al codificador. La representació del segon nivell està adaptada a la tasca de resum de frases, que porta a millor rendiment. Evaluam el nostre model en els conjunts de dades de resum abstract de frases angleses Gigaword, DUC 2004 i MSR. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el model de codificació selectiva proposat supera els models de base més avançats.", 'az': 'Biz seçici kodlama modelini abstraktiv cümlələr təmizlənməsi üçün sequence-to-sequence framework ünü uzatmaq üçün təklif edirik. Bu cümlənin kodlayıcısı, seçici qapı a ğı və gözləmə müəyyən edilmiş kodlayıcıdır. Sözlük kodlayıcı və dekoder yenidən nöral ağları ilə inşa edilir. Seçimli qapı a ğı ikinci səviyyə cümləsini kodlayıcıdan dekoderə daxil edir. İkinci səviyyə göstəricisi cümlələr yığışdırma işləri üçün təmizlənir, bu da daha yaxşı performans olar. Biz İngilis Gigaword, DUC 2004 və MSR abstraktiv cümlələrin qurğulaması verilənlərin modelini değerlendiririk. Müxtəlif sonuçlar təbliğ edilən seçimli kodlama modeli sanat səviyyəsi modellərinin vəziyyətini aşkar edər.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo selektivni model kodiranja da proširi okvir sekvence do sekvence za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice. To se sastoji od kodera rečenice, selektivne mreže vrata i pažnje opremljenog dekodera. Koder i dekoder rečenice su izgrađeni sa rekonstruiranim neuralnim mrežama. Selektivna mreža vrata konstruira zastupanje druge rečenice na nivou kontroliranjem informacijskog toka od kodera do dekodera. Druga razina predstavlja se prilagođena za zaključavanje kazne, što vodi do boljih učinka. Procjenjujemo naš model na engleskom Gigaword, DUC 2004 i MSR sažetke podataka za sažetak abstraktivnih rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi selektivni model kodiranja iznosi početne modele stanja umjetnosti.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নির্বাচিত এনকোডিং মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে সংক্রান্ত বাক্য সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত কার্যক্রম বাড়াতে পারে। এটি একটি বাক্য এনকোডার, একটি নির্বাচিত গেট নেটওয়ার্ক, আর একটি মনোযোগ প্রদান করা ডেকোডার। পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা এই বাক্য এনকোডার এবং ডেকোডার নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে। নির্বাচিত গেট নেটওয়ার্কের নেটওয়ার্ক এনকোডার থেকে তথ্য প্রবাহ নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে দ্বিতীয় স্তরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের দ্বিতীয় পর্যায়ে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হচ্ছে শাস্তির সারসংক্ষেপের কাজের জন্য, যা ভালো কর্মসূচির কাজে প্রদর আমরা ইংরেজি গিগাওয়ার্ড, ডিউসি ২০০৪ এবং এমএসআর সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত বাক্যের সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষিপ্ত তথ্যের ম পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত নির্বাচিত এনকোডিং মডেলের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বেসাইলাইন মডেল প্রদর্', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme selektivní kódovací model pro rozšíření rámce sekvence na sekvenci pro abstraktivní shrnutí vět. Skládá se z snímače vět, selektivní brány sítě a dekodéru vybaveného pozorností. Kodér vět a dekodér jsou postaveny s rekurentními neuronovými sítěmi. Selektivní bránová síť konstruuje reprezentaci věty druhé úrovně řízením toku informací z kodéru do dekodéru. Druhá úroveň reprezentace je přizpůsobena pro úlohu shrnutí vět, což vede k lepšímu výkonu. Náš model hodnotíme na souborech abstraktivních vět anglického Gigaword, DUC 2004 a MSR. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený model selektivního kódování předčí nejmodernější základní modely.', 'et': 'Pakume välja selektiivse kodeerimismudeli, et laiendada abstraktse lause kokkuvõtte jadast järjestusse raamistikku. See koosneb lausekodeerijast, valikulisest väravavõrgust ja tähelepanu varustatud dekoodrist. Lausekooder ja dekooder on ehitatud korduvate närvivõrkudega. Selektiivne väravavõrk ehitab teise taseme lause esituse, kontrollides infovoogu kodeerijast dekooderisse. Teise taseme esindus on kohandatud lause kokkuvõtlikuks ülesandeks, mis toob kaasa parema tulemuse. Hindame oma mudelit inglise gigaword, DUC 2004 ja MSR abstraktse lause kokkuvõtte andmekogumite põhjal. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud selektiivne kodeerimismudel ületab kaasaegseid baasmudeleid.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme valikoivaa koodausmallia abstraktiivisen lauseen yhteenvedon sekvenssistä sekvenssiin. Se koostuu lausekooderista, valikoivasta porttiverkosta ja huomiovarustellusta dekooderista. Lausekooderi ja dekooderi on rakennettu toistuvilla hermoverkoilla. Valikoiva porttiverkko rakentaa toisen tason lauseen esityksen ohjaamalla tiedonkulkua kooderista dekooderiin. Toisen tason esitys on räätälöity lauseiden yhteenvetotehtävään, mikä johtaa parempaan suorituskykyyn. Arvioimme malliamme englanninkielisistä Gigaword-, DUC 2004- ja MSR-abstraktiivisista lauseyhteenvedoista. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu selektiivinen koodausmalli on parempi kuin uusimmat perusmallit.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo selektivni model kodiranja za razširitev okvira zaporedja v zaporedje za abstraktivno povzetek stavkov. Sestavljen je iz kodirnika stavkov, selektivnega omrežja vrat in pozornosti opremljenega dekoderja. Koder stavkov in dekoder sta zgrajena s ponavljajočimi se nevronskimi omrežji. Selektivno mrežo vrat konstruira predstavitev stavka na drugi ravni z nadzorom pretoka informacij od kodirja do dekoderja. Predstavitev druge stopnje je prilagojena nalogi povzetka stavkov, kar vodi k boljši uspešnosti. Naš model ocenjujemo na podlagi angleških Gigaword, DUC 2004 in MSR abstraktivnih povzetkov stavkov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani selektivni model kodiranja presega najsodobnejše osnovne modele.', 'ha': "Munã buɗe wani misali na kodi ya iya ƙãra firam-biyu-sequence wa kurejarin cewa na baka-baka. It consists of a sentence encoder, a selective gate network, and an attention equipped decoder.  An samar da kode na kalma da kodi da zane'urar neura wanda aka dace. Yin girgije na zaɓen, yana samar da shaidar daraja na daban na rubutu da ya yi tsari da shirin cire daga koda zuwa koda. Halilin daraja na biyu ana ƙara wa aikin kurshen kalma, wanda ke iya ƙara mafiya performance. Tuna ƙaddara misalinmu a kan tsarin sarrafiya ga Gigaword na Ingiriya, DUC 2004 da MAR masu baka marufullo. Matarin da aka jarraba ya nuna cewa, misãlin kode ɗin da aka buƙata yana ƙaranci cikin halin-rubutun-kunna.", 'jv': 'Gender Amarok konderor echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Laptop" and "Desktop Display routing Awak dhéwé éntukno model dhéwé ning kelas Gegaword, DUT 2004 lan SMR nambah data nambah Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל קידום selektiv כדי להאריך את מסגרת הרצף לרצף לסכם משפטים אסטרקטיביים. זה מורכב ממקוד משפטים, רשת שער selektiv, ומקוד תשומת לב מוכשר. The sentence encoder and decoder are built with recurrent neural networks.  The selective gate network constructs a second level sentence representation by controlling the information flow from encoder to decoder.  היציגה ברמה השנייה מתאימה למשימת ציבור משפטים, מה שמוביל להופעה טובה יותר. אנו מעריכים את המודל שלנו על הגיגוורד האנגלי, DUC 2004 ו MSR אסטרקטיבי מסט מידע משפטים. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהמודל הקודד הבחורי המוצע מתגבר על המודלים הבסיסיים המאוחרים ביותר.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་འདེམས་པའི་གདམ་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་གསལ་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་རྗེས་འབྲས་འདོར་བ འདི་ལ་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་གསང་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་གདམ་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་དུས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ཚིག་གྲངས་གསང་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྤྱད་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ The selective gate network constructs a second level sentence representation by controlling the information flow from encoder to decoder. འདིའི་གནས་རིམ་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ཚིག་རྟགས་བསྡུས་བྱས་བའི་ལས་འགུལ་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུགས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་Gigaword, DUC 2004དང་ MSR abstractive sentence summarization datasets་ཐོག་ལས་རྩིས་བཏོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གནད་སྡུད་དག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གདམ་གསེས་པའི་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དེ་སྣང་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Towards an Automatic Turing Test : Learning to Evaluate Dialogue Responses', 'ar': 'نحو اختبار Turing التلقائي: تعلم تقييم استجابات الحوار', 'pt': 'Rumo a um Teste de Turing Automático: Aprendendo a Avaliar as Respostas do Diálogo', 'es': 'Hacia una prueba de Turing automática: aprender a evaluar las respuestas al diálogo', 'fr': 'Vers un test de Turing automatique\xa0: apprendre à évaluer les réponses au dialogue', 'ja': '自動チューリングテストに向けて：対話応答を評価するための学習', 'ru': 'На пути к автоматическому тесту Тьюринга: учимся оценивать диалоговые ответы', 'zh': '迈向自图灵试:学评对应', 'hi': 'एक स्वचालित ट्यूरिंग टेस्ट की ओर: संवाद प्रतिक्रियाओं का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए सीखना', 'ga': 'I dTreo Tástála Uathoibríoch Turing: Foghlaim conas Freagraí Idirphlé a Mheasúnú', 'ka': 'ავტომატური ტესტის გადასწავლობა: დიალოგის პარამეტრების განსაზღვრებას შესწავლობა', 'hu': 'Egy automatikus Turing teszt felé: megtanulni a párbeszéd válaszainak értékelését', 'el': 'Προς ένα αυτόματο τεστ Τούρινγκ: Μάθετε να αξιολογείτε τις απαντήσεις του διαλόγου', 'it': 'Verso un test Turing automatico: imparare a valutare le risposte al dialogo', 'mk': 'Towards an Automatic Turing Test: Learning to Evaluate Dialogue Responses', 'kk': 'Автоматты түрлендіру сынағына: Диалог жауаптарын оқыту', 'lt': 'Automatinio apsisukimo bandymo link: mokymasis įvertinti dialogo atsakymus', 'ms': 'Ke Ujian Putaran Automatik: Belajar untuk menilai Balasan Dialog', 'mt': 'Towards an Automatic Turing Test: Learning to Evaluate Dialogue Responses', 'ml': 'സ്വയം തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന പരീക്ഷണത്തിലേക്കു്: ഡയലോഗിന്റെ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനു് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Автоматтын шалгалтын шалгалт рүү: Диалог хариултыг үнэлэхэд суралцах', 'no': 'Til ein automatisk tørringstest: Læring for å evaluera dialogsvar', 'pl': 'W kierunku automatycznego testu Turinga: nauka oceny odpowiedzi dialogowych', 'ro': 'Către un test Turing automat: învățarea evaluării răspunsurilor la dialog', 'sr': 'Do automatskog testa trljanja: učenje za procjenu odgovora dijaloga', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයක් වලට: සංවාදය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Imtixaanka iskaa u jeedista: Waxbarashada qiimeynta jawaabaha diyaariga', 'sv': 'Mot ett automatiskt Turingtest: Att lära sig att utvärdera dialogsvar', 'ur': 'آٹوٹی تورینگ آزمائش کی طرف: ڈیالوگ جواب مطالبہ کرنے کے لئے سیکھ رہی ہے', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்கமாக திரும்பும் சோதனைக்கு மேல்: உரையாடல் பதிலைப் பார்க்க கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới một bài kiểm tra chuyển động tự động: học cách đánh giá đối tượng', 'bg': 'Към автоматичен тест на Тюринг: Научете се да оценявате отговорите на диалога', 'nl': 'Naar een automatische Turing-test: Leren dialoogreacties te evalueren', 'hr': 'Prema automatskom testu trljanja: učenje za procjenu odgovora dijaloga', 'da': 'På vej mod en automatisk Turingtest: Lære at evaluere dialogsvar', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einem automatischen Turing-Test: Lernen, Dialogantworten zu bewerten', 'id': 'Ke ujian Turing Otomatis: Belajar untuk menilai Respon Dialog', 'ko': '방향 자동 도령 테스트: 학습 평가 대화 반응', 'fa': 'به سمت آزمایش تورینگ خودکار: یاد گرفتن برای ارزیابی پاسخ\u200cهای گفتگو', 'sw': 'Upande kwenye jaribio la Kupitia Kupitia Huduma: Kujifunza Kupima Jawabu ya Tathmini Dialog', 'af': "Gaan na 'n Outomatiese Turing Toestel: Leer na Evalueer Dialoog Antwoordes", 'tr': 'Otomatik Köwürme Testi üçin: Dialog jogaplaryny Taýýarlamak üçin öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Për një provë automatike kthese: Mësimi për të vlerësuar përgjigjet e dialogut', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ փորձարկում՝ դառնալ դասախոսության պատասխաններ գնահատելու սովորելը', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে টার্নিং পরীক্ষা: ডায়ালগ প্রতিক্রিয়া পরীক্ষা শিখানো', 'bs': 'Do automatskog testa trljanja: učenje za procjenu odgovora dijaloga', 'az': 'Avtomatik Turing Test t…ôr…ôfind…ô: Dialoog cavablarńĪnńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'ca': 'Vers un test de gir automàtic: Aprendre a evaluar les respostes del diàleg', 'cs': 'K automatickému Turingově testu: Naučit se hodnotit dialogové reakce', 'et': 'Automaatse Turingi testi suunas: dialoogi vastuste hindamise õppimine', 'fi': 'Kohti automaattista Turing-testiä: Oppiminen arvioimaan dialogivastauksia', 'jv': 'To ard an Automated turing Test: Learning to invalue Dialog responses', 'he': 'לכיוון מבחן סיבוב אוטומטי: ללמוד להעריך תגובות לדיולוג', 'sk': 'Na poti k avtomatskemu Turingovemu testiranju: učenje ocenjevanja odzivov dialoga', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་Turing བརྟག་ཞིབ་གི་ཐོག་ཏུ། ཌའི་ལོག་འཆར་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ལྟ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Automatically evaluating the quality of dialogue responses for unstructured domains is a challenging problem. Unfortunately, existing automatic evaluation metrics are biased and correlate very poorly with human judgements of response quality (Liu et al., 2016). Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialogue research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations. In response to this challenge, we formulate automatic dialogue evaluation as a learning problem. We present an evaluation model (ADEM)that learns to predict human-like scores to input responses, using a new dataset of human response scores. We show that the ADEM model’s predictions correlate significantly, and at a level much higher than word-overlap metrics such as BLEU, with human judgements at both the utterance and system-level. We also show that ADEM can generalize to evaluating dialogue mod-els unseen during training, an important step for automatic dialogue evaluation.', 'ar': 'يعد التقييم التلقائي لجودة استجابات الحوار للمجالات غير المهيكلة مشكلة صعبة. لسوء الحظ ، فإن مقاييس التقييم التلقائي الحالية متحيزة وترتبط بشكل سيئ للغاية مع الأحكام البشرية لجودة الاستجابة (Liu et al. ، 2016). ومع ذلك ، فإن وجود إجراء تقييم تلقائي دقيق أمر بالغ الأهمية لبحوث الحوار ، لأنه يسمح بنماذج أولية سريعة واختبار نماذج جديدة بتقييمات بشرية أقل تكلفة. استجابة لهذا التحدي ، نصوغ تقييم الحوار التلقائي كمشكلة في التعلم ، ونقدم نموذج تقييم (ADEM) يتعلم التنبؤ بالدرجات المشابهة للإنسان لإدخال الاستجابات ، باستخدام مجموعة بيانات جديدة لنتائج الاستجابة البشرية. نوضح أن تنبؤات نموذج ADEM ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا ، وعلى مستوى أعلى بكثير من مقاييس تداخل الكلمات مثل BLEU ، مع الأحكام البشرية على مستوى النطق والنظام. نظهر أيضًا أن ADEM يمكنه التعميم على تقييم نماذج الحوار غير المرئية أثناء التدريب ، وهي خطوة مهمة لتقييم الحوار التلقائي.', 'pt': 'Avaliar automaticamente a qualidade das respostas de diálogo para domínios não estruturados é um problema desafiador. Infelizmente, as métricas de avaliação automática existentes são tendenciosas e se correlacionam muito mal com os julgamentos humanos da qualidade da resposta (Liu et al., 2016). No entanto, ter um procedimento de avaliação automática preciso é crucial para a pesquisa de diálogo, pois permite prototipagem rápida e teste de novos modelos com avaliações humanas menos dispendiosas. Em resposta a esse desafio, formulamos a avaliação automática do diálogo como um problema de aprendizagem. Apresentamos um modelo de avaliação (ADEM) que aprende a prever pontuações semelhantes às humanas para inserir respostas, usando um novo conjunto de dados de pontuações de respostas humanas. Mostramos que as previsões do modelo ADEM correlacionam-se significativamente e em um nível muito mais alto do que as métricas de sobreposição de palavras, como BLEU, com julgamentos humanos tanto no nível de enunciado quanto no nível do sistema. Também mostramos que o ADEM pode generalizar para avaliar modelos de diálogo não vistos durante o treinamento, um passo importante para a avaliação automática do diálogo.', 'fr': "L'évaluation automatique de la qualité des réponses au dialogue pour les domaines non structurés est un véritable défi. Malheureusement, les mesures d'évaluation automatique existantes sont biaisées et sont très mal corrélées avec les jugements humains de la qualité de la réponse (Liu et al., 2016). Cependant, disposer d'une procédure d'évaluation automatique précise est crucial pour la recherche sur le dialogue, car elle permet de prototyper et de tester rapidement de nouveaux modèles avec des évaluations humaines moins coûteuses. En réponse à ce défi, nous formulons l'évaluation automatique du dialogue comme un problème d'apprentissage. Nous présentons un modèle d'évaluation (ADEM) qui apprend à prédire des scores de type humain pour entrer des réponses, à l'aide d'un nouvel ensemble de données de scores de réponse humaine. Nous montrons que les prévisions du modèle ADEM sont corrélées de manière significative, et à un niveau beaucoup plus élevé que les métriques de chevauchement de mots telles que BLEU, avec des jugements humains à la fois au niveau de l'énoncé et au niveau du système. Nous montrons également que l'ADEM peut généraliser l'évaluation de modèles de dialogue non vus pendant la formation, une étape importante pour l'évaluation automatique des dialogues.", 'es': 'La evaluación automática de la calidad de las respuestas de diálogo para los dominios no estructurados es un problema difícil. Desafortunadamente, las métricas de evaluación automática existentes están sesgadas y se correlacionan muy mal con los juicios humanos sobre la calidad de la respuesta (Liu et al., 2016). Sin embargo, contar con un procedimiento de evaluación automática preciso es crucial para la investigación del diálogo, ya que permite la creación rápida de prototipos y pruebas de nuevos modelos con evaluaciones humanas menos costosas. En respuesta a este desafío, formulamos la evaluación automática del diálogo como un problema de aprendizaje. Presentamos un modelo de evaluación (ADEM) que aprende a predecir puntuaciones similares a las humanas para las respuestas de entrada, utilizando un nuevo conjunto de datos de puntajes de respuesta humana. Mostramos que las predicciones del modelo ADEM se correlacionan significativamente, y a un nivel mucho más alto que las métricas de superposición de palabras, como BLEU, con juicios humanos tanto a nivel de enunciado como de sistema. También mostramos que ADEM puede generalizar la evaluación de modelos de diálogo que no se han visto durante la capacitación, un paso importante para la evaluación automática del diálogo.', 'hi': 'असंरचित डोमेन के लिए संवाद प्रतिक्रियाओं की गुणवत्ता का स्वचालित रूप से मूल्यांकन करना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है। दुर्भाग्य से, मौजूदा स्वचालित मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पक्षपाती हैं और प्रतिक्रिया गुणवत्ता के मानव निर्णयों के साथ बहुत खराब सहसंबंधित हैं (लियू एट अल। फिर भी एक सटीक स्वचालित मूल्यांकन प्रक्रिया होना संवाद अनुसंधान के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है, क्योंकि यह कम महंगे मानव मूल्यांकन के साथ नए मॉडलों के तेजी से प्रोटोटाइप और परीक्षण की अनुमति देता है। इस चुनौती के जवाब में, हम सीखने की समस्या के रूप में स्वचालित संवाद मूल्यांकन तैयार करते हैं। हम एक मूल्यांकन मॉडल (एडीईएम) प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो मानव प्रतिक्रिया स्कोर के एक नए डेटासेट का उपयोग करके इनपुट प्रतिक्रियाओं के लिए मानव जैसे स्कोर की भविष्यवाणी करना सीखता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एडीईएम मॉडल की भविष्यवाणियां काफी हद तक सहसंबंधित हैं, और शब्द-ओवरलैप मीट्रिक जैसे कि BLEU की तुलना में बहुत अधिक स्तर पर, उच्चारण और सिस्टम-स्तर दोनों पर मानव निर्णयों के साथ। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि एडीईएम प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अनदेखी संवाद मॉड-एल्स का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए सामान्यीकृत कर सकता है, जो स्वचालित संवाद मूल्यांकन के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम है।', 'zh': '自料非结构化域之对,一挑战性也。 不幸者,今自料指标有偏见,且与人相应殊不相关(Liu等,2016)。 然有准的自评程序于对话研究至重,盖许以更少的成本对新模形速原型设计测试。 为此一挑战,自言以为学。 吾为质(ADEM),以人之新数集之,学占类之分以输之。 吾明ADEM形之占有显相关性,而重于远高于单词指标(如BLEU)之平,于语统皆有人焉。 又明ADEM可推至评练之间不见对模组,此自对评估之要也。', 'ja': '非構造化ドメインのダイアログ応答の品質を自動的に評価することは困難な問題です。 残念ながら、既存の自動評価指標は偏りがあり、応答品質の人間の判断との相関性が非常に低い（ Liu et al., 2016 ）。 しかし、正確な自動評価手順を持つことは、対話研究にとって重要であり、高価な人間による評価を少なくして新しいモデルの迅速なプロトタイピングとテストを可能にする。 この課題に対応して、学習問題として自動対話評価を策定します。人間の反応スコアの新しいデータセットを使用して、反応を入力するために人間のようなスコアを予測することを学習する評価モデル（ ADEM ）を提示します。 Ademモデルの予測は、発話とシステムレベルの両方で人間の判断と、BLEUなどの単語重複指標よりもはるかに高いレベルで有意に相関していることを示しています。 また、自動対話評価の重要なステップであるトレーニング中に見えない対話モデルを評価することに、Ademが一般化できることを示した。', 'ru': 'Автоматическая оценка качества диалоговых ответов для неструктурированных доменов является сложной проблемой. К сожалению, существующие метрики автоматической оценки являются предвзятыми и очень плохо коррелируют с человеческими суждениями о качестве ответа (Liu et al., 2016). Тем не менее наличие точной автоматической процедуры оценки имеет решающее значение для исследований в рамках диалога, поскольку она позволяет быстро создавать прототипы и тестировать новые модели с меньшим количеством дорогостоящих оценок. В ответ на этот вызов мы формулируем автоматическую оценку диалога как проблему обучения. Мы представляем модель оценки (ADEM), которая учится прогнозировать человекоподобные оценки для входных ответов, используя новый набор данных о человеческих оценках ответа. Мы показываем, что предсказания модели ADEM значительно коррелируют, и на уровне гораздо выше, чем метрики наложения слов, такие как BLEU, с человеческими суждениями как на уровне высказываний, так и на уровне системы. Мы также показываем, что АДЕМ может обобщить оценку модулей диалога, невидимых во время обучения, что является важным шагом для автоматической оценки диалога.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb dhúshlánach í cáilíocht na bhfreagraí idirphlé le haghaidh fearainn neamhstruchtúrtha a mheas go huathoibríoch. Ar an drochuair, tá méadracht mheastóireachta uathoibríocha atá ann cheana féin claonta agus comhghaolú go han-lag le breithiúnais dhaonna ar cháilíocht freagartha (Liu et al., 2016). Mar sin féin tá sé ríthábhachtach nós imeachta meastóireachta uathoibríoch cruinn a bheith ann do thaighde idirphlé, toisc go gceadaíonn sé fréamhshamhaltú tapa agus tástáil a dhéanamh ar shamhlacha nua le luachálacha daonna níos lú. Mar fhreagra ar an dúshlán seo, foirmímid meastóireacht uathoibríoch idirphlé mar fhadhb foghlama. Cuirimid i láthair samhail meastóireachta (ADEM) a fhoghlaimíonn a thuar scóir cosúil le daoine ar fhreagraí ionchur, ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí nua scóir fhreagra daonna. Léirímid go bhfuil comhghaol suntasach idir tuar na samhla ADEM, agus ag leibhéal i bhfad níos airde ná méadracht forluí focal ar nós BLEU, le breithiúnais dhaonna ar leibhéal na cainte agus ar leibhéal an chórais. Léirímid freisin gur féidir le ADEM ginearálú chuig meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí idirphlé nach bhfeictear le linn na hoiliúna, céim thábhachtach le haghaidh meastóireachta idirphlé uathoibríoch.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας των απαντήσεων διαλόγου για μη δομημένους τομείς είναι ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα. Δυστυχώς, οι υπάρχουσες μετρήσεις αυτόματης αξιολόγησης είναι προκατειλημμένες και συσχετίζονται πολύ άσχημα με τις ανθρώπινες κρίσεις για την ποιότητα απόκρισης (κ.α., 2016). Ωστόσο, η ύπαρξη μιας ακριβούς αυτόματης διαδικασίας αξιολόγησης είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για την έρευνα διαλόγου, καθώς επιτρέπει την ταχεία δημιουργία πρωτοτύπων και τη δοκιμή νέων μοντέλων με λιγότερες ακριβές ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις. Σε απάντηση σε αυτή την πρόκληση, διατυπώνουμε την αυτόματη αξιολόγηση διαλόγου ως μαθησιακό πρόβλημα. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο αξιολόγησης (ADEM) που μαθαίνει να προβλέψει ανθρώπινες βαθμολογίες στις απαντήσεις εισόδου, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων βαθμολογιών ανθρώπινης απόκρισης. Δείχνουμε ότι οι προβλέψεις του μοντέλου συσχετίζονται σημαντικά, και σε επίπεδο πολύ υψηλότερο από τις μετρήσεις επικάλυψης λέξεων όπως η BLEU, με τις ανθρώπινες κρίσεις τόσο σε επίπεδο έκφρασης όσο και σε επίπεδο συστήματος. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η ADEM μπορεί να γενικεύσει την αξιολόγηση των μεθόδων διαλόγου που δεν φαίνονται κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, ένα σημαντικό βήμα για την αυτόματη αξιολόγηση του διαλόγου.', 'hu': 'A strukturálatlan területekre vonatkozó párbeszédválaszok minőségének automatikus értékelése kihívást jelent. Sajnos a meglévő automatikus értékelési mutatók elfogultak, és nagyon rosszul korrelálnak a válaszminőség emberi megítéléseivel (Liu et al., 2016). A pontos automatikus értékelési eljárás azonban kulcsfontosságú a párbeszédkutatás szempontjából, mivel lehetővé teszi az új modellek gyors prototípuskészítését és tesztelését, kevesebb drága emberi értékeléssel. Erre a kihívásra reagálva tanulási problémaként automatikus párbeszédértékelést fogalmazunk meg. Bemutatunk egy értékelési modellt (ADEM), amely megtanulja előrejelezni az emberi válasz pontszámokat a beviteli válaszokhoz, felhasználva az emberi válasz pontszámokat. Megmutatjuk, hogy az ADEM modell előrejelzései jelentősen korrelálnak, és sokkal magasabb szinten, mint a szó-átfedési mutatók, mint például a BLEU, az emberi ítélőképességekkel mind a kimondás, mind a rendszer szintjén. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy az ADEM általánosítani tudja az edzés során láthatatlan párbeszédmódok értékelésére, ami fontos lépés az automatikus párbeszédértékelés szempontjából.', 'ka': 'არსტრუქტურებული დიალოგის პასუხისთვის ავტომატურად გაუმუშავება საქმე პრობლემა. მართლად, მსგავსი ავტომატიკური განსაზღვრების მეტრიკები არიან წარმოდგენა და ძალიან ცოტა განსაზღვრებით ადამიანის განსაზღვრების გასაწყვებით (Liu et al., 2016). მაგრამ მარტივი ავტომატიკური განსაზღვრების პროცემი გასაკეთებელია დიალოგის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რადგან ის შეუძლებელია სიჩქარე პროტოტიპის და ახალი მოდელების ტესტირება, რომ ამ გამოცდილების გარეშე, ჩვენ ავტომატური დიალოგის გარეშე როგორც სწავლის პრობლემა. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ მოდელს, რომელიც ვისწავლის ადამიანის განსაკუთრებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც ადამიანის განსაკუთრების განსაკუთრებისთვის ახალი მონაცემების მონაცემების ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ADEM მოდელის წინასწორება მნიშვნელოვანია, და სიტყვების მეტრიკაზე მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორც BLEU, ადამიანის წინასწორება და სისტემის დონეში. ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ADEM შეუძლია გენერალიზაცია დიალოგის მოდულების შესახებ, რომელიც არ შეიძლია განაკეთებული მოდულების შესახებ, გასანიშვნელოვანი მოდულ', 'it': "Valutare automaticamente la qualità delle risposte al dialogo per i domini non strutturati è un problema impegnativo. Purtroppo, le metriche di valutazione automatiche esistenti sono parziali e correlano molto male con i giudizi umani sulla qualità della risposta (Liu et al., 2016). Tuttavia, disporre di una procedura di valutazione automatica accurata è fondamentale per la ricerca sul dialogo, in quanto consente la prototipazione rapida e la sperimentazione di nuovi modelli con valutazioni umane meno costose. In risposta a questa sfida, formuliamo la valutazione automatica del dialogo come un problema di apprendimento. Presentiamo un modello di valutazione (ADEM) che impara a predire punteggi simili all'uomo per inserire le risposte, utilizzando un nuovo set di dati di punteggi di risposta umana. Mostriamo che le previsioni del modello ADEM correlano significativamente, e ad un livello molto superiore alle metriche di sovrapposizione di parole come BLEU, con i giudizi umani sia a livello di pronuncia che di sistema. Dimostriamo anche che ADEM può generalizzare alla valutazione di modi di dialogo invisibili durante l'allenamento, un passo importante per la valutazione automatica del dialogo.", 'kk': 'Құрылмаған доменлер үшін диалог жауаптарының сапатын автоматты түрде бағалау - мәселе. Кешіріңіз, бар автоматты оқу метрикалары қарсы және адамдардың жауап сапасы (Liu et al., 2016). Бірақ автоматты түрде оқу процедуры бар, диалогтың зерттеулері үшін маңызды, себебі ол жаңа моделдерді тез ету және тез ету мүмкіндігі артық адамның бағалауы артық. Бұл мәселеге жауап беру үшін, біз оқыту мәселесі ретінде автоматты диалогты бағалау үшін формуладық. Біз адамдардың жауап беру үлгісін көрсету үлгісін (ADEM) көрсету үлгісін көрсету үшін, адамдардың жауап беру нәтижелерін жаңа деректер жиынын қолдануға үйренеміз. Біз ADEM үлгісінің бағдарламалары маңызды сәйкес келеді деп көрсетедік, және сөздерді BLEU секілді метрикалардан артық көптеген деңгейде, адамдардың сөздері мен жүйелік деңгейіндегі дәрежелерімен қарай Мұндай-ақ ADEM бақылау кезінде көрсетілмеген диалог модульдерді оқу үшін жалпы түрде, автоматты диалогты бақылау үшін маңызды қадам болады деп көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Automatinis dialogo atsakų į nesukurtas sritis kokybės vertinimas yra sudėtinga problem a. Deja, esami automatinio vertinimo rodikliai yra pusiausvyriniai ir labai blogai koreliuoja su žmogaus atsako kokybės vertinimais (Liu et al., 2016 m.). Vis dėlto dialogo moksliniams tyrimams labai svarbu turėti tikslią automatinio vertinimo procedūrą, nes ji leidžia greitai nustatyti ir išbandyti naujus modelius, kuriuose atliekami mažiau brangūs žmogaus vertinimai. Atsakydami į šį iššūkį, kaip mokymosi problem a parengiame automatinį dialogo vertinimą. Pateikiame vertinimo model į (ADEM), kuris mokosi prognozuoti žmogaus panašius rezultatus į įvestus atsakus, naudojant naują žmogaus atsako rezultatų duomenų rinkinį. Mes parodome, kad ADEM modelio prognozės gerokai koreliuoja, o lygiu gerokai didesniu nei žodžių dubliavimosi metrijos, pvz., BLEU, su žmogaus vertinimais tiek išraiškos, tiek sistemos lygiu. Taip pat rodome, kad ADEM gali apskritai vertinti mokymo metu nepastebimus dialogo modulius, kurie yra svarbus žingsnis automatiniam dialogo vertinimui.', 'mk': 'Автоматска оценка на квалитетот на одговорите на дијалогот за неструктурирани домени е предизвикувачки проблем. За жал, постоечките автоматски метрики за проценка се предрасудени и многу лошо се поврзани со човечките проценки за квалитетот на одговорот (Liu и други, 2016). Сепак, имањето прецизна автоматска процедура на евалуација е клучна за дијалоготското истражување, бидејќи овозможува брзо прототипирање и тестирање на новите модели со помалку скапи човечки евалуации. Како одговор на овој предизвик, формулираме автоматска проценка на дијалогот како проблем со учењето. Презентираме модел на проценка (АДЕМ) кој научи да предвидува човечки резултати за внесување одговори, користејќи нови податоци на резултатите на човечкиот резултат. Ние покажуваме дека предвидувањата на моделот АДЕМ значително се корелираат, и на ниво многу повисоко од метриката на зборовите кои се прекриваат, како што е БЛЕУ, со човечките пресуди на ниво на изразување и систем. We also show that ADEM can generalize to evaluating dialogue mod-els unseen during training, an important step for automatic dialogue evaluation.', 'ms': "Menemeliti secara automatik kualiti balasan dialog bagi domain tidak terstruktur adalah masalah yang mencabar. Malangnya, metrik penilaian automatik yang wujud adalah biased dan berkorrelasi sangat buruk dengan penilaian manusia kualiti balas (Liu et al., 2016). Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialogue research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations.  Sebagai balasan kepada cabaran ini, kita membentuk penilaian dialog automatik sebagai masalah pembelajaran. Kami perkenalkan model penilaian (ADEM) yang belajar meramalkan skor seperti manusia untuk masukkan balasan, menggunakan set data baru skor balasan manusia. We show that the ADEM model's predictions correlate significantly, and at a level much higher than word-overlap metrics such as BLEU, with human judgements at both the utterance and system-level.  Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa ADEM boleh menyeluruhkan untuk menilai mod-els dialog yang tidak terlihat semasa latihan, langkah penting untuk penilaian dialog automatik.", 'mt': 'L-evalwazzjoni awtomatika tal-kwalità tar-reazzjonijiet għad-djalogu għal dominji mhux strutturati hija problem a ta’ sfida. Sfortunatament, il-metriċi tal-evalwazzjoni awtomatika eżistenti huma preġudizzjati u jikkorrelaw ħażin ħafna mal-ġudizzji umani tal-kwalità tar-rispons (Liu et al., 2016). Madankollu, il-proċedura ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatika preċiża hija kruċjali għar-riċerka tad-djalogu, peress li tippermetti prototip rapidu u ttestjar ta’ mudelli ġodda b’evalwazzjonijiet umani inqas għaljin. Bħala tweġiba għal din l-isfida, a ħna nformulaw evalwazzjoni awtomatika tad-djalogu bħala problem a tat-tagħlim. Aħna nippreżentaw mudell ta’ evalwazzjoni (ADEM) li jitgħallem jipprevedi punteġġi simili għall-bniedem biex jintbagħtu risponsi, bl-użu ta’ sett ta’ dejta ġdid ta’ punteġġi ta’ rispons uman. Aħna nuru li t-tbassir tal-mudell ADEM jikkorrelata b’mod sinifikanti, u f’livell ferm ogħla mill-metriċi li jikkoinċidu l-kliem bħall-BLEU, mal-ġudizzji umani kemm fil-livell tal-espressjoni kif ukoll fil-livell tas-sistema. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-ADEM tista’ tiġġeneralizza għall-evalwazzjoni ta’ modi ta’ djalogu li ma jidhrux waqt it-taħriġ, pass importanti għall-evalwazzjoni awtomatika tad-djalogu.', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүнгүй газрын хариултын чадварыг автоматаар үнэлэх нь хэцүү асуудал юм. Харамсалтай нь оршиж буй автоматическийн оюутнуудын метрик нь хүний хариу үйлдэл чанарын шийдвэрлэлтэй маш муу харьцуулагддаг. Гэвч шууд автоматжуулалтын үнэлгээ хийх процедур нь диалог судалгаанд чухал. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь хурдан прототип, шинэ загваруудыг бага үнэтэй хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээр шалгах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ сорилтын хариултаар бид автоматически диалог суралцах асуудал гэж тодорхойлж байна. Бид хүн төрөлхтний адилхан тоонуудыг хариу өгөгдлийн шинэ өгөгдлийн санг ашиглаж, хариу өгөгдлийн загварыг таамаглах боломжтой. Бид ADEM загварын таамаглал маш чухал холбоотой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн BLEU гэх мэт үгнээс илүү өндөр хэмжээнд хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжлэл болон системийн түвшинд холбоотой. Мөн бид ADEM нь сургалтын үед харагдаагүй диалог модуль-үүдийг үнэлгээд, автоматтын диалог шалгахад чухал алхам гэж үзүүлж чадна.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna ocena jakości odpowiedzi dialogowych dla domen nieustrukturyzowanych jest problemem wymagającym. Niestety istniejące wskaźniki automatycznej oceny są stronnicze i bardzo słabo korelują z ludzkimi ocenami jakości odpowiedzi (Liu et al., 2016). Jednak posiadanie dokładnej procedury automatycznej oceny ma kluczowe znaczenie dla badań dialogowych, ponieważ umożliwia szybkie tworzenie prototypów i testowanie nowych modeli z mniejszymi kosztami ocen ludzi. W odpowiedzi na to wyzwanie formułujemy automatyczną ocenę dialogu jako problem uczenia się. Przedstawiamy model oceny (ADEM), który uczy się przewidywać wyniki podobne do człowieka do odpowiedzi wejściowych, wykorzystując nowy zestaw danych wyników odpowiedzi ludzkiej. Pokazujemy, że prognozy modelu ADEM znacząco korelują z ludzkimi ocenami zarówno na poziomie wypowiedzi, jak i systemu. Pokazujemy również, że ADEM może uogólnić do oceny modów dialogowych niewidocznych podczas treningu, ważnym krokiem do automatycznej oceny dialogu.', 'no': 'Det er eit vanskeleg problem for å evaluera kvaliteten på dialogsvarar for ikkje strukturert domene. Dei eksisterande automatiske evalueringsmetrikar er forstådd og korrelatert svært slik med menneskelige uttrykk av svarkvalitet (Liu et al., 2016). Men å ha eit nøyaktig automatisk evalueringsprosedyr er viktig for dialogforskning, fordi det tillater rask prototyping og testing av nye modeller med mindre dykkare menneske evalueringar. I svar på denne utfordringa formerer vi automatisk dialogevaluering som eit læringsproblem. Vi presenterer eit evalueringsmodell (ADEM) som lærer å forhåndsvisa menneskelige poeng til innskrivingssvar, med ein ny dataset av menneskelige svarpoeng. Vi viser at forebygginga av ADEM-modellen er korrelatert betydelig, og på eit nivå mykje høgare enn ordoverlapping av metrikar som BLEU, med menneske sprøytebruk både uttalen og systemnivået. Vi viser også at ADEM kan generalisere å evaluera modular for dialogvindauget som ikkje er vist under opplæring, ein viktig steg for automatisk dialogevaluering.', 'ro': 'Evaluarea automată a calității răspunsurilor la dialog pentru domeniile nestructurate reprezintă o problemă provocatoare. Din păcate, măsurătorile de evaluare automată existente sunt părtinitoare și corelează foarte slab cu judecățile umane privind calitatea răspunsului (Liu et al., 2016). Cu toate acestea, existența unei proceduri automate precise de evaluare este esențială pentru cercetarea dialogului, deoarece permite prototiparea rapidă și testarea de noi modele cu mai puține evaluări umane costisitoare. Ca răspuns la această provocare, formulăm evaluarea automată a dialogului ca o problemă de învățare. Prezentăm un model de evaluare (ADEM) care învață să prezică scorurile de tip uman pentru a introduce răspunsurile, folosind un nou set de date de scoruri de răspuns uman. Aratăm că predicțiile modelului ADEM corelează semnificativ și la un nivel mult mai mare decât măsurătorile de suprapunere a cuvintelor, cum ar fi BLEU, cu judecățile umane atât la nivel de rostire, cât și la nivel de sistem. De asemenea, demonstrăm că ADEM poate generaliza la evaluarea modurilor de dialog nevăzute în timpul antrenamentului, un pas important pentru evaluarea automată a dialogului.', 'sr': 'Automatski procjenjivanje kvalitete odgovora na dijalog za nestrukturirane domene je izazovan problem. Nažalost, postojeće automatske procjene metrike su predrasude i vrlo loše povezuju sa ljudskim procenama kvalitete odgovora (Liu et al., 2016). Ipak, imati tačnu proceduru automatske procjene je ključno za istraživanje dijaloga, jer omogućava brzo prototipiranje i testiranje novih modela sa manjim skupim ljudskim procjenama. U odgovoru na ovaj izazov, formuliramo automatsku procjenu dijaloga kao problem učenja. Predstavljamo model procjene (ADEM) koji nauèi da predviða ljudske rezultate kao rezultate na ulazak odgovora, koristeći novu setu podataka rezultata ljudskih odgovora. Pokazujemo da predviđanja model a ADEM značajno povezuju, a na nivou mnogo viša od metrika reči, poput BLEU, sa ljudskim procenama na razini reči i sistema. Takođe pokazujemo da ADEM može generalizovati procjenu modala dijaloga koji se ne vidi tokom treninga, važan korak za automatsku procjenu dijaloga.', 'si': 'ස්ථාපනය නැති ඩෝමේන් වලට සංවාදය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අවාසනාවට, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණය ගැන මිනිස්සු විශ නමුත් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයක් තියෙන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසය සඳහා සංවාදය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරී මේ අභ්\u200dයානයට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සංවාදය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඉගෙන ප්\u200dර අපි මිනිස්සු වගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා (ADEM) අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ADEM මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම වචනයක් වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා ව අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ADEM සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් සංවාද මොඩ්ලෝස් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ස්වය', 'sv': 'Att automatiskt utvärdera kvaliteten på dialogsvar för ostrukturerade domäner är ett utmanande problem. Tyvärr är befintliga automatiska utvärderingsmetoder partiska och korrelerar mycket dåligt med mänskliga bedömningar av svarskvalitet (Liu et al., 2016). Ändå är det viktigt att ha ett korrekt automatiskt utvärderingsförfarande för dialogforskning, eftersom det möjliggör snabb prototypning och testning av nya modeller med färre dyra mänskliga utvärderingar. Som svar på denna utmaning formulerar vi automatisk dialogutvärdering som ett inlärningsproblem. Vi presenterar en utvärderingsmodell (ADEM) som lär sig att förutsäga människoliknande poäng till inmatning av svar, med hjälp av en ny datauppsättning av mänskliga responspoäng. Vi visar att ADEM-modellens förutsägelser korrelerar signifikant, och på en nivå som är mycket högre än ord-överlappningsmätningar som BLEU, med mänskliga bedömningar på både yttrande- och systemnivå. Vi visar också att ADEM kan generalisera till att utvärdera dialogmods som inte syns under träning, ett viktigt steg för automatisk dialogutvärdering.', 'ur': 'غیر ساختہ ڈومین کے لئے ڈالیلوگ کے جواب کے کیفیت کا مطالعہ اپنے ساتھ مطالعہ کرنا ایک مشکل ہے. بدبختی کے ساتھ، موجود موجود آٹوٹی ارزیابی میٹریک بہت برابر ہے اور انسان کے جواب کیفیت کے فیصلے سے بہت برابر تعلق ہے (Liu et al., 2016). لیکن ایک دقیق آٹوٹی ارزیابی پردازش کے لئے ضروری ہے، کیونکہ یہ بہت کم گران انسان کی ارزیابی کے ساتھ نئی نمڈلوں کی آزمائش اور آزمائش کی اجازت دیتا ہے. اس چالوں کے جواب میں، ہم نے اپنا سیکھنا مسئلہ کے طور پر اٹوماٹیک ڈالیوں کا ارزش بنایا ہے. ہم ایک ارزیابی موڈل (ADEM) کو پیش آتے ہیں جو انسان جیسی اسکور کو پیش آتے ہیں، انسان کی جواب کے ساتھ نیا ڈاٹ سٹ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ADEM موڈل کی پیش بینی اچھی طرح تعلق ہے، اور ایک سطح سے زیادہ زیادہ بلند ہے کلمات کے متریک جیسے BLEU، کلمات اور سیستم سطح میں انسان کے فیصلے کے ساتھ۔ ہم نے بھی دکھایا ہے کہ ADEM ٹرینگ میں غیر دیکھے ہوئے ڈیلوگو ڈیلوگو ڈیلوگو ڈیلوگو ڈیلوگو کا ارزش کرنا ہے، ایک اٹوٹیٹ ڈیلوگو کی ارزش کے لئے اہم قدم ہے.', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கப்படாத களங்களுக்கான உரையாடல் விடைகளின் தரம் தானாகவே மதிப்பிடுதல் சவால் பிரச்சனையாகும். துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, இருக்கும் தன்னியக்கமான மதிப்பீடு முறைகள் பிரிந்து மற்றும் மனித த தீர்ப்புகளில் மிகவும் தவறான தீர்ப்புகளை இண இன்னும் ஒரு சரியான தானியங்கி மதிப்பு செயல்பாடு இருக்கும் உரையாடல் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு முக்கியமானது, ஏனென்றால் அது விரைவான முனைமாதிரிகளை முற In response to this challenge, we formulate automatic dialogue evaluation as a learning problem. We present an evaluation model (ADEM)that learns to predict human-like scores to input responses, using a new dataset of human response scores.  ADEM மாதிரியின் முன்னாட்சிகள் முக்கியமாக இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். பிலியுவை போன்ற வார்த்தை மேல் மேற்படுத்தும் மெட் பயிற்சியில் தெரியாத உரையாடல் மூலக்கோடுகளை பரிசோதிக்க ADEM பொதுவாக்க முடியும் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். தானாகவே உரைய', 'ml': "സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഡൊമെനുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡയലോഗിന്റെ ഉത്തരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം വിലാസപ്പെടു ഭാഗ്യവശാലം, നിലവിലുള്ള സ്വയമായ വിലാസപ്രകാരം മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d പരസ്പരം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രതികരണത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവിധികളുമായി മനുഷ് Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialogue research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations.  ഈ വ്യാല്\u200dവെല്ലിന്റെ പ്രതികരിക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം ഡയലോഗിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമായി നിര്\u200dമ് മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലുള്ള സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d (ADEM) നാം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരുടെ പുത We show that the ADEM model's predictions correlate significantly, and at a level much higher than word-overlap metrics such as BLEU, with human judgements at both the utterance and system-level.  ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് മോഡ് എലുകളെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ADEM സാധ്യമാക്കുന്നു എന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d കാ", 'so': 'Sida rasmi ah qiimeynta sameynta jawaabaha dialogka ee degmooyinka aan la dhisin waa dhibaato adag. Nasiib xumaatooyin, qiimeynta iskaa ah ee heysta waa mid aad u baahan, wuxuuna la xiriiraa xukunka ku saabsan qiimeynta qaabilaada (Liu et al., 2016). Si kastaba ha ahaatee in lagu haysto baaritaanka qiimeynta si saxda ah oo rasmi ah ayaa muhiim u ah baaritaanka baaritaanka dialogka, sababtoo ah waxay u ruqsan kartaa sameynta dhaqso iyo imtixaanka modelalka cusub oo ay ku jiraan qiimeynta qiimaha qaaliga ah ee dadku. Dhawaaqsan dhibaatadan, waxaynu u sameynaa qiimeynta dialogue oo automatic ah sida dhibaato waxbarasho ah. Tusaale qiimeynta (ADEM) oo baranaya in uu horumariyo qiimeynta qiimeynta dadka oo isku mid ah in ay jawaabo input lagu sameeyo, waxaynu isticmaalnaa koob cusub oo kooban kooxaha jawaabta dadka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka AADEM uu ku xiran yahay mid aad u weyn, iyo heer ka sarreeya qaababka word-overlap, sida BLEU, waxay ku leeyihiin xukunka dadka ee hadalka iyo heerka nidaamka. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in ADEM uu horumarinayo in lagu qiimeeyo qaababka dialogue-els oo aan la arkayn xilliga waxbarashada, waa tallaabo muhiim ah oo lagu qiimeeyo baaritaanka dialog-ka.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Afsuski, mavjud avtomatik qiymatlash metriklari qo'llanmagan va javob sifatida qo'llanmalar (Liu et al., 2016). Шундай қилиб, уни аниқ автоматик аниқлаб кўриш вазифаси мулоқот таҳлилишининг учун муҳим, чунки у тез prototyping ва янги modelларни аниқлаш мумкин. Шундай қилиб, у қизиқ одам qiymatlarini qiymatida yaratish juda muhim. Bu qiymatga javob berish uchun biz avtomatik muloqat qiymatini o'rganish muammosi deb o'ylaymiz. Biz bir qiymati modelini hozir qilamiz, biz odamning qiymatga oʻxshagan qiymatlar javoblarini ko'rib chiqishni o'rganadi, yangi inson javob qiymatlarini foydalanish mumkin. Biz ADEM modelining predictions muhimiy bog'liq, va so'zlar BLEU kabi so'zlardan yuqori metriklarga ko'p darajada, inson so'zlar va tizim darajada qo'llanmalar bilan juda katta. Биз ҳам кўрсатамиз, ADEM тайёр вақтида эътибор бермайдиган muloqat модул мобилларини аниқлаш учун, автоматик мулоқот тафтиш учун автоматик тафтиш қиймати muhim қадамидир.", 'vi': 'Tự động đánh giá chất lượng phản ứng đối thoại cho lĩnh vực không xây dựng là một vấn đề khó khăn. Đáng tiếc, tỉ lệ đánh giá tự động hiện tại bị thiên vị và không phù hợp tốt với các phán xét về chất lượng phản ứng của con người (Liu et al., 206). Tuy nhiên, việc có một thủ tục đánh giá chính thức chính xác là rất quan trọng cho nghiên cứu về cuộc đối thoại, vì nó cho phép mô phỏng nhanh chóng và thử nghiệm các mô hình mới với giá rẻ hơn. Để đáp ứng thách thức này, chúng tôi đặt đánh giá cuộc đối thoại tự động như một vấn đề học tập. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình đánh giá (ADEM)người học dự đoán điểm giống người để nhập đáp ứng, sử dụng một tập tin mới về điểm đáp ứng của con người. Chúng tôi cho thấy dự đoán của ADEM phù hợp đáng kể, và ở một mức độ cao hơn so với âm lượng áp đảo từ, như tiếng bíp, với các phán đoán con người ở cả mức phát âm lẫn hệ thống. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy ADEM có thể tổng hợp để đánh giá những cách đối thoại không ai nhìn thấy trong khi huấn luyện, một bước quan trọng cho việc đánh giá cuộc đối thoại tự động.', 'nl': 'Het automatisch evalueren van de kwaliteit van dialoogreacties voor ongestructureerde domeinen is een uitdagend probleem. Helaas zijn bestaande automatische evaluatiestatistieken bevooroordeeld en correleren ze zeer slecht met menselijke beoordelingen van responskwaliteit (Liu et al., 2016). Een nauwkeurige automatische evaluatieprocedure is echter cruciaal voor dialoogonderzoek, omdat het snelle prototyping en testen van nieuwe modellen mogelijk maakt met minder dure menselijke evaluaties. Als antwoord op deze uitdaging formuleren we automatische dialoogevaluatie als leerprobleem. We presenteren een evaluatiemodel (ADEM) dat leert om menselijke scores te voorspellen om reacties in te voeren, met behulp van een nieuwe dataset van menselijke responsscores. We tonen aan dat de voorspellingen van het ADEM-model significant correleren, en op een niveau veel hoger dan woordoverlappingsmetrieken zoals BLEU, met menselijke oordelen op zowel het uitspreken als het systeem-niveau. We laten ook zien dat ADEM kan generaliseren naar het evalueren van dialoogmod-els ongezien tijdens training, een belangrijke stap voor automatische dialoogevaluatie.', 'da': 'Automatisk evaluering af kvaliteten af dialogsvar for ustrukturerede domæner er et udfordrende problem. Desværre er eksisterende automatiske evalueringsmålinger partiske og korrelerer meget dårligt med menneskelige vurderinger af responskvalitet (Liu et al., 2016). Men en nøjagtig automatisk evalueringsprocedure er afgørende for dialogforskning, da den muliggør hurtig prototype og test af nye modeller med færre dyre menneskelige evalueringer. Som svar på denne udfordring formulerer vi automatisk dialogevaluering som et læringsproblem. Vi præsenterer en evalueringsmodel (ADEM), der lærer at forudsige menneskelignende scores til input svar ved hjælp af et nyt datasæt af menneskelige responsscores. Vi viser, at ADEM-modellens forudsigelser korrelerer betydeligt, og på et niveau, der er meget højere end ord-overlapning metrics som BLEU, med menneskelige dømme på både ytrings- og systemniveau. Vi viser også, at ADEM kan generalisere sig til at evaluere dialogmodninger, der ikke ses under træning, et vigtigt skridt for automatisk dialog evaluering.', 'bg': 'Автоматичната оценка на качеството на отговорите на диалога за неструктурирани домейни е предизвикателен проблем. За съжаление, съществуващите показатели за автоматична оценка са предубедени и корелират много слабо с човешките преценки за качеството на отговора (Лю и др., 2016). Въпреки това наличието на точна автоматична процедура за оценка е от решаващо значение за изследванията на диалога, тъй като позволява бързо прототипиране и тестване на нови модели с по-малко скъпи човешки оценки. В отговор на това предизвикателство формулираме автоматична оценка на диалога като обучителен проблем. Представяме модел за оценка (АДЕМ), който се научава да предвижда подобни на човека резултати за въвеждане на отговори, използвайки нов набор от данни от оценки на човешките отговори. Показваме, че прогнозите на модела корелират значително и на ниво много по-високо от показателите за припокриване на думи като например с човешките преценки както на ниво произнасяне, така и на системно ниво. Показваме също, че АДЕМ може да обобщи до оценяване на модулите на диалога, които не са забелязани по време на обучението, което е важна стъпка за автоматичната оценка на диалога.', 'hr': 'Automatski procjenjivanje kvalitete odgovora na dijalog za nestrukturirane domene je izazovan problem. Nažalost, postojeće automatske procjene metrike su predrasude i vrlo loše se odnose na ljudske procjene kvalitete odgovora (Liu et al., 2016). Međutim, postojanje točne postupke automatske procjene ključno je za istraživanje dijaloga, jer omogućava brzo prototipiranje i testiranje novih modela s manjim skupim ljudskim procjenama. U odgovoru na ovaj izazov, formuliramo automatsku procjenu dijaloga kao problem učenja. Predstavljamo model procjene (ADEM) koji uči predvidjeti ljudske rezultate kao rezultate na ulazak odgovora, koristeći novu skupu podataka rezultata ljudskih odgovora. Pokazujemo da predviđanja model a ADEM značajno povezuju, a na razini mnogo viša od metrika poput BLEU-a, s ljudskim osuđivanjima na razini govora i sustava. Također pokazujemo da ADEM može generalizirati procjenu moda dijaloga koji se ne vidi tijekom obuke, važan korak za automatsku procjenu dijaloga.', 'de': 'Die automatische Bewertung der Qualität von Dialogantworten für unstrukturierte Domänen ist ein herausforderndes Problem. Leider sind bestehende automatische Auswertungsmetriken verzerrt und korrelieren sehr schlecht mit menschlichen Einschätzungen der Antwortqualität (Liu et al., 2016). Ein genaues automatisches Evaluierungsverfahren ist jedoch für die Dialogforschung von entscheidender Bedeutung, da es ein schnelles Prototyping und Testen neuer Modelle mit weniger teuren menschlichen Auswertungen ermöglicht. Als Antwort auf diese Herausforderung formulieren wir die automatische Dialogbewertung als Lernproblem. Wir präsentieren ein Evaluationsmodell (ADEM), das lernt, menschenähnliche Scores für Eingabeantworten vorherzusagen, indem ein neuer Datensatz menschlicher Response Scores verwendet wird. Wir zeigen, dass die Vorhersagen des ADEM-Modells signifikant korrelieren, und zwar auf einer Ebene, die viel höher ist als Wortüberlappungsmetriken wie BLEU, mit menschlichen Urteilen sowohl auf Äußerungs- als auch auf Systemebene. Wir zeigen auch, dass ADEM auf die Auswertung von Dialogmods verallgemeinern kann, die während des Trainings unsichtbar sind, ein wichtiger Schritt für die automatische Dialogbewertung.', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi secara otomatis kualitas respons dialog untuk domain yang tidak terstrukturasi adalah masalah yang menantang. Sayangnya, metrik evaluasi otomatis yang ada adalah bias dan berkorelasi sangat buruk dengan penilaian manusia kualitas respon (Liu et al., 2016). Namun memiliki prosedur evaluasi otomatis akurat adalah penting untuk penelitian dialog, karena memungkinkan prototip cepat dan menguji model baru dengan evaluasi manusia yang lebih mahal. Sebagai respon kepada tantangan ini, kami menyusun evaluasi dialog otomatis sebagai masalah belajar. Kami mempersembahkan model evaluasi (ADEM) yang belajar untuk memprediksi skor seperti manusia untuk masukan respon, menggunakan set data baru dari skor respon manusia. Kami menunjukkan bahwa prediksi model ADEM berkorelasi secara signifikan, dan pada tingkat yang jauh lebih tinggi dari metrik saling meliputi seperti BLEU, dengan penilaian manusia pada tingkat kata dan sistem. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa ADEM dapat menyebarkan untuk mengevaluasi dialog mod-els yang tidak terlihat selama latihan, langkah penting untuk evaluasi dialog otomatis.', 'ko': '비구조화 분야의 대화 응답의 질을 자동으로 평가하는 것은 도전적인 문제다.불행하게도 기존의 자동 평가 지표는 편차가 있어 반응의 질에 대한 인류의 판단과 관련성이 떨어진다(Liu 등, 2016년).그러나 정확한 자동 평가 프로그램을 갖추는 것은 대화 연구에 매우 중요하다. 왜냐하면 새로운 모델을 신속하게 원형으로 제작하고 테스트할 수 있기 때문에 더 적은 인력으로 평가해야 하기 때문이다.이 도전에 대응하기 위해 우리는 자동 대화 평가를 학습 문제로 삼을 것이다.우리는 새로운 인류 반응 점수 데이터 집합을 사용하여 입력 반응을 예측하는 유인 점수를 학습하는 평가 모델(ADEM)을 제시했다.우리는 ADEM모델의 예측이 인간의 말과 시스템 차원에서의 판단과 현저한 관련성을 가지며 BLEU 등 단어가 지표를 중첩하는 수준보다 훨씬 높다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 또 ADEM이 평가 훈련 과정에서 볼 수 없는 대화 모델로 확대할 수 있다는 것을 밝혔는데 이것은 자동 대화 평가의 중요한 단계이다.', 'sw': 'Kupitia ubora wa majibu ya mazungumzo kwa ajili ya maeneo yasiyotengenezwa ni tatizo la changamoto. Kwa bahati mbaya, mbinu za uchunguzi wa kujitegemea zinapingana na zinazohusiana na maamuzi ya binadamu kwa kiwango cha majibu (Liu et al., 2016). Hata hivyo, kuwa na upasuaji sahihi wa kujitegemea ni muhimu kwa utafiti wa mazungumzo, kwa sababu inaruhusu kuandika na kujaribu mifano mpya yenye thamani ndogo ya uchunguzi wa binadamu. Katika majibu ya changamoto hii, tunatengeneza utafiti wa mazungumzo ya kibinafsi kama tatizo la kujifunza. Tunatoa mfano wa uchunguzi (ADEM) ambao unajifunza kutabiri score kama binadamu za kujibu, kwa kutumia seti mpya ya taarifa za majibu ya binadamu. Tunaonyesha kwamba utabiri wa mifano ya ADEM unahusiana na kiasi kikubwa, na kwa kiwango kikubwa zaidi ya mitindo ya juu ya maneno kama vile BLEU, na hukumu za binadamu katika lugha na mfumo. We also show that ADEM can generalize to evaluating dialogue mod-els unseen during training, an important step for automatic dialogue evaluation.', 'fa': 'با خودکار ارزیابی کیفیت واکنش\u200cهای محاورۀ محاورۀ ساخته نشده\u200cها مشکل سختی است. متأسفانه، متریک ارزیابی خودکار موجود در حال حاضر با قضاوت های انسانی از کیفیت پاسخ (Liu et al., 2016) بسیار بد ارتباط دارند. ولی داشتن یک روش ارزیابی خودکار دقیق برای تحقیقات محاورش مهم است، زیرا این اجازه می دهد که پیش\u200cتایپ سریع و آزمایش مدلهای جدید با ارزیابی\u200cهای انسان گران کمتر باشد. در پاسخ به این چالش، ما به عنوان یک مشکل یادگیری ارزیابی گفتگوی خودکار را فرمول می\u200cکنیم. ما مدل ارزیابی (ADEM) را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم که امتیاز\u200cهای مانند انسان را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند تا پاسخ\u200cهای ورودی، با استفاده از مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید از امتیاز پاسخ انسان. ما نشان می دهیم که پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مدل ADEM به معنی مرتبط است، و در سطح بسیار بالاتر از متریک\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای مثل BLEU، با تصمیم\u200cهای انسان در هر دو سطح سخنرانی و سیستم است. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که ADEM می تواند برای ارزیابی mod-els صحبت در زمان آموزش غیر مشاهده باشد، یک قدم مهم برای ارزیابی گفتگوی خودکار باشد.', 'tr': 'Baglanmaýan alanlar üçin dialog jogaplarynyň mykdatyny otomatik çykmak kynçylyk meseledir. Gynansakda, bolan awtomatik deňlemek metrikleri ýüz tutylyp barýar we adamlaryň jogabatyň howpsuzlyklary bilen örän ýadaw deňleýärler (Liu et., 2016). Ýöne dogry awtomatik deňlenme prosedüsü bar, diýoly araştyrmalar üçin has möhüm, sebäbi täze prototyp we täze nusgalary azajyk kiçi deňlenmeler bilen testi edip biler. Bu kynçylyga jogap bermek üçin, öwrenmek meselesi hökmünde awtomatik dialog deňlenmesini çykýarys Biz çykyş nusgasyny (ADEM) adam ýaly çykyşlaryny janlaşdyrmak üçin öwrenýärdik, adam janlaşdyrma notlarynyň täze datajylary ullanýarys. ADEM nusgasynyň öngörümleri möhüm bir şekilde ylalaşýandygyny we s özleriň üstünde BLEU ýaly metriklerden köpräk ýokary, adamlaryň sözleriň we sistem derejesinde düşünmeleri bar. Biz hem ADEM okuwçysy wagtynda görmeden dialoog modlerini döredilemegi mümkin edip bilýäris, awtomatik dialogyň deňlemesi üçin wajyp adım görkezip bileris.', 'af': "Automaties evalueer die kwaliteit van dialoog reaksies vir onstruktureerde domeine is 'n pragtige probleem. Ongelukkig, bestaande automatiese evalueringsmetries is voorspoedig en baie slegte verbreek met menslike oordelings van antwoord kwaliteit (Liu et al., 2016). Maar om 'n presies outomatiese evalueringsprosedure te hê, is daar belangrik vir dialoog ondersoek, omdat dit toelaat vinnige prototiping en toets van nuwe modele met minder kosbare menslike evaluerings. In antwoord na hierdie uitdrukking, formeer ons outomatiese dialoog evaluering as 'n leerprobleem. Ons stel 'n evalueringsmodel (ADEM) wat leer om menslike telling te voorskou na invoer antwoordes, gebruik 'n nuwe datastel van menslike antwoordespaarders. Ons wys dat die ADEM model se voorskoue betekeurig vergelyk, en op 'n vlak baie hoër a s woord oorvloei metrike soos BLES, met menslike oordelinge by beide die uitspraak en stelsel-vlak. Ons wys ook dat ADEM kan generelliseer om dialoog mod-els te evalueer wat onverskyn is tydens onderriging, 'n belangrike stap vir outomatiese dialoog evaluering.", 'sq': 'Automatically evaluating the quality of dialogue responses for unstructured domains is a challenging problem.  Fatkeqësisht, metrikat ekzistuese të vlerësimit automatik janë të paragjykuara dhe korrelohen shumë keq me vlerësimet njerëzore të cilësisë së përgjigjes (Liu et al., 2016). Megjithatë, të kesh një procedurë të saktë automatike vlerësimi është vendimtare për kërkimet e dialogut, pasi lejon prototipin e shpejtë dhe testimin e modeleve të reja me vlerësime njerëzore më të shtrenjta. Si përgjigje ndaj kësaj sfide, ne formulojmë vlerësimin automatik të dialogut si një problem mësimi. Ne paraqesim një model vlerësimi (ADEM) që mëson të parashikojë rezultatet si njerëzit për të hyrë përgjigjet, duke përdorur një grup të ri të të dhënave të rezultateve të përgjigjes njerëzore. Ne tregojmë se parashikimet e modelit ADEM korrelohen në mënyrë të konsiderueshme dhe në një nivel shumë më të lartë se metrikat e përmbysjes s ë fjalëve të tilla si BLEU, me gjykimet njerëzore në nivelin e shprehjes dhe të sistemit. Ne tregojmë gjithashtu se ADEM mund të gjeneralizohet në vlerësimin e moduleve të dialogut të padukshëm gjatë trajnimit, një hap i rëndësishëm për vlerësimin automatik të dialogut.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በመከፋት፣ የአሁኑ አውቶማቲካዊ ማስታወቂያ ማተሚያዎች በተቃራኒ እና የሰው የድምፅ ፍርድ (ሊউ እና አል 2016) ይደሰታሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን የተፈጸመ የራሱ ማስታወቂያ ፕሮጀክት ስላለው ለመማረቂያ ግድ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጥያቄ ለመመልስ፣ የራሳቸውን የጦማሪያን ማስተማር ጉዳይ ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ የሰው መለያየት መለያየትን ለመፍጠር የሚማርን አዲስ የዳታተር ቁጥር በመጠቀም አዲስ የደብዳቤ ቁጥር እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የADEM ሞዴል ውይይት በሚያሳየው እና እንደ BLEU በሚመስል ቃላት ከላይ በሚያነካው ሚትሪኮች በላይ በሚያሳየው እና በንግግር እና በሲስተም ደረጃ ላይ ከሰው ፍርድ ጋር ነው፡፡ እናም ADEM በማስተማር ጊዜ ያልታወቀ ዳይሎችን ማሻሻል እንዲችል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անկառուցված բնագավառների պատասխանների որակի ավտոմատ գնահատումը դժվար խնդիր է: Դժբախտաբար, գոյություն ունեցող ավտոմատիկ գնահատման չափումները կողմնակի են և շատ վատ կապված են պատասխանի որակի մարդկային գնահատականների հետ (Լյու և այլն., 2016 թ․։ Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialogue research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations.  Որպես պատասխան այս մարտահրավերին, մենք ավտոմատիկ խոսակցության գնահատումը ձևավորում ենք որպես ուսուցման խնդիր: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք գնահատման մոդել, որը սովորում է կանխագուշակել մարդկային նման գնահատականներ արձագանքների ներկայացման համար, օգտագործելով մարդկային արձագանքի նոր տվյալներ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ԱԴԵՄ մոդելի կանխատեսումները նշանակալիորեն կապված են և շատ ավելի բարձր մակարդակում, քան բառերի կապված մետրիկները, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ ԲԼԵՎ-ը, մարդկային դատողությունների հետ արտահայտության և համակարգի մակարդակում: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ԱԴԵՄ-ը կարող է ընդհանրացնել դասախոսության մոդելների գնահատման համար, որոնք չեն տեսնում ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում, մի կարևոր քայլ ավտոմատիկ դասախոսության գնահատման համար:', 'az': 'QurńüulmamńĪŇü domenalar √ľ√ß√ľn dialog cavablarńĪnńĪn kalitetini avtomatik t…ôŇükil etm…ôsi √ß…ôtin bir problemdir. Nec…ô olaraq, mevcut avtomatik deńüerlendirm…ô metrikl…ôri t…ôr…ôfind…ôn uzaqlaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr v…ô insanlarńĪn cavab qiym…ôti il…ô √ßox pislik edirl…ôr (Liu et al., 2016). Ancaq dońüru bir avtomatik deńüerlendirm…ô proqramńĪ olmaq Dialog araŇütńĪrmalarńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox m√∂vcuddur, √ß√ľnki bu, daha az mal insan deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôri il…ô yeni modell…ôrin tez prototipin…ô v…ô sńĪnamasńĪna izin verir. Bu √ß…ôtinlikl…ôr…ô cavab verm…ôkd…ô, √∂yr…ônm…ô problemi olaraq avtomatik dijalog deńüerlendirm…ôsini form√ľl…ôyirik. Biz insan kimi d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri t…ôdbir etm…ôyi √∂yr…ôn…ôn t…ôdbir modeli g√∂st…ôririk, insan cavab d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrinin yeni d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrini istifad…ô edirik. Biz ADEM modelinin t…ôdbirl…ôri m√∂vcuddur v…ô BLEU kimi s √∂zl…ôrin v…ô sistem seviyy…ôtind…ô insanlarńĪn h√∂kml…ôri il…ô daha y√ľks…ôk bir seviyy…ôd…ô g√∂st…ôririk. Biz d…ô g√∂st…ôririk ki, ADEM t…ôhsil sńĪrasńĪnda g√∂rm…ôdiyimiz dijalog mod √ľll…ôrini t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, avtomatik dijalońüu t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn vacib bir adńĪm olar.', 'bn': 'অক্ষরিত ডোমেনের জন্য ডায়ালগের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মান স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মূল্যায়ন করা হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জাল সমস্ দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, বিদ্যমান স্বয়ংক্রিয় মূল্যায়ন মেটিক বিদ্রোহী এবং মানুষের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মানের বিচারের মাধ্যমে খুব খারা Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialogue research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations.  এই চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রতিক্রিয়ায় আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডায়ালগের মূল্য গঠন করি শিক্ষার সমস্যা হিসেবে। আমরা একটি মূল্যায়ন মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা মানুষের মত স্কোর ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে শিখতে পারে, মানুষের প্রতিক্রিয়া স্কোর ব্যবহার করে নতুন তথ্যে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এডেম মডেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, এবং শব্দ-আপাতপূর্ণ মেট্রিকের মতো বিলিউ-এর চেয়ে বেশী স্তরে মানুষের বিচার এবং সিস আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে এডিএম প্রশিক্ষণের সময় অদৃশ্য ডায়ালগ মোড-এল পরিচালনা করতে পারে, স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডায়ালগ মূল্যের মূল্য', 'bs': 'Automatski procjenjivanje kvalitete odgovora na dijalog za nestrukturirane domene je izazovan problem. Nažalost, postojeće automatske procjene metrike su predrasude i vrlo loše povezuju sa ljudskim procenama kvalitete odgovora (Liu et al., 2016). Međutim, imati tačnu proceduru automatske procjene je ključno za istraživanje dijaloga, jer omogućava brzo prototipiranje i testiranje novih modela sa manjim skupim ljudskim procjenama. U odgovoru na ovaj izazov, formuliramo automatsku procjenu dijaloga kao problem učenja. Predstavljamo model procjene (ADEM) koji uči predvidjeti ljudske rezultate kao rezultate za ulazak odgovora, koristeći novu skupu podataka rezultata ljudskih odgovora. Pokazujemo da predviđanja model a ADEM značajno povezuju, a na nivou mnogo viša od metrika poput BLEU-a, sa ljudskim procenama na razini govora i sistema. Također pokazujemo da ADEM može generalizirati procjenu modala dijaloga koji se ne vidi tijekom treninga, važan korak za automatsku procjenu dijaloga.', 'ca': "Evaluar automàticament la qualitat de les respostes al diàleg en dominis no estructurats és un problem a difícil. Unfortunately, existing automatic evaluation metrics are biased and correlate very poorly with human judgements of response quality (Liu et al., 2016).  Però tenir un procediment d'evaluació automàtica exacte és crucial per a la recerca del diàleg, perquè permet prototipar ràpidament i testar nous models amb menys cara evaluació humana. En resposta a aquest repte, formulem l'evaluació automàtica del diàleg com un problema d'aprenentatge. Presentam un model d'evaluació (ADEM) que apreneix a predir puntuacions similars a humans per introduir respostes, utilitzant un nou conjunt de dades de puntuacions de resposta humana. Mostrem que les prediccions del model ADEM correlacionen significativament, i a un nivell molt més alt que les metètriques de sobreposició de paraules com BLEU, amb els judicis humans tant a nivell d'expressió com sistemàtic. We also show that ADEM can generalize to evaluating dialogue mod-els unseen during training, an important step for automatic dialogue evaluation.", 'cs': 'Automatické vyhodnocování kvality dialogových odpovědí pro nestrukturované domény je náročným problémem. Stávající metriky automatického vyhodnocování jsou bohužel zaujaté a velmi špatně korelují s lidskými hodnoceními kvality odezvy (Liu et al., 2016). Přesný postup automatického hodnocení je však klíčový pro dialogový výzkum, protože umožňuje rychlé vytváření prototypů a testování nových modelů s nižšími náklady lidských hodnocení. V reakci na tuto výzvu formulujeme automatické hodnocení dialogu jako problém učení. Představujeme vyhodnocovací model (ADEM), který se učí předpovídat lidské skóre na vstupní odpovědi s využitím nové datové sady skóre lidské odezvy. Ukazujeme, že predikce modelu ADEM významně korelují s lidskými úsudky na úrovni výroku i systému na úrovni mnohem vyšší než metriky překrývání slov, jako je BLEU. Dále ukazujeme, že ADEM může zobecnit na vyhodnocování dialogových modů neviditelných během tréninku, což je důležitý krok pro automatické vyhodnocování dialogu.', 'fi': 'Vuoropuhelun vastausten laadun automaattinen arviointi ei-rakenteellisilla aloilla on haastava ongelma. Valitettavasti nykyiset automaattiset arviointimittarit ovat puolueellisia ja korreloivat hyvin huonosti ihmisten vastauslaadun arviointiin (Liu et al., 2016). Tarkka automaattinen arviointimenettely on kuitenkin ratkaisevan tärkeää dialogitutkimuksen kannalta, sillä se mahdollistaa uusien mallien nopean prototyypin ja testauksen, joissa ihmisarvioinnit ovat edullisempia. Vastauksena tähän haasteeseen muotoilemme automaattisen vuoropuhelun arvioinnin oppimisongelmaksi. Esitämme arviointimallin (ADEM), joka oppii ennustamaan ihmisen kaltaisia pisteitä vastausten syöttämiseen käyttämällä uutta datajoukkoa ihmisen vastepisteistä. Osoitamme, että ADEM-mallin ennusteet korreloivat merkittävästi ja paljon korkeammalla tasolla kuin sanan päällekkäisyysmittarit, kuten BLEU, ihmisten arviointien kanssa sekä lause- että järjestelmätasolla. Osoitamme myös, että ADEM voi yleistää dialogimuodojen arviointiin koulutuksen aikana, mikä on tärkeä askel automaattisessa dialogin arvioinnissa.', 'et': 'Struktureerimata valdkondade dialoogivastuste kvaliteedi automaatne hindamine on keeruline probleem. Kahjuks on olemasolevad automaatsed hindamismeetodid erapooletud ja seonduvad väga halvasti inimeste hinnangutega reageerimise kvaliteedi kohta (Liu et al., 2016). Kuid täpne automaatne hindamismenetlus on dialoogiuuringute jaoks äärmiselt oluline, sest see võimaldab uute mudelite kiiret prototüüpimist ja testimist vähem kulukate inimhinnangutega. Vastuseks sellele väljakutsele sõnastame automaatse dialoogi hindamise õppeprobleemina. Esitame hindamismudeli (ADEM), mis õpib ennustama inimese sarnaseid tulemusi vastuste sisestamiseks, kasutades uut andmekogumit inimese vastuste tulemustest. Näitame, et ADEM mudeli prognoosid korreleeruvad märkimisväärselt ja palju kõrgemal tasemel kui sõna kattuvuse mõõdikud, näiteks BLEU, inimlike hinnangutega nii väljenduse kui süsteemi tasandil. Samuti näitame, et ADEM suudab üldistada dialoogimudelite hindamisele, mis on oluline samm dialoogi automaatsel hindamisel.', 'sk': 'Samodejno ocenjevanje kakovosti odzivov dialoga za nestrukturirana področja je zahteven problem. Žal so obstoječe meritve avtomatičnega ocenjevanja pristranske in zelo slabo povezane s človeškimi presojami kakovosti odziva (Liu et al., 2016). Vendar pa je natančen avtomatski postopek ocenjevanja ključnega pomena za raziskave dialoga, saj omogoča hitro prototipiranje in testiranje novih modelov z manj dragimi ocenami ljudi. V odgovor na ta izziv oblikujemo avtomatsko ocenjevanje dialoga kot učni problem. Predstavljamo ocenjevalni model (ADEM), ki se nauči napovedati človeku podobne rezultate za vnos odzivov z uporabo novega nabora podatkov človeških rezultatov. Pokazali smo, da so napovedi modela ADEM bistveno korelacije in na ravni veliko višje od meritev prekrivanja besed, kot je BLEU, s človeškimi presojami tako na izgovorni kot sistemski ravni. Prav tako pokažemo, da lahko ADEM posploši na ocenjevanje načinov dialoga, ki jih med usposabljanjem ne vidimo, kar je pomemben korak za avtomatsko ocenjevanje dialoga.', 'ha': "Automatically evaluating the quality of dialogue responses for unstructured domains is a challenging problem.  Babu'am, metrikiya da ke iya ƙaddara da ɗabi'a farat ɗaya na sami da hakakin mutane mai maras da sifar ajiya (Liu et al., 2016). Kayya, kuma a da wata surar evaluation farat ɗaya, yana da muhimu wa research na zauren zauren akwatin bayani, kamar yadda yana yarda yin misãlai da kuma a jarraba misãlai na daban da yana da qiimako kaɗan ga mutum. In a karɓa wa wannan tsummar, muna ƙayyade kafin zauren akwatin bayani farat ɗaya kamar wata masĩfa na karanta. Tuna gabatar da wani misali na ƙaddara (ADEM) wanda yana sanar da za'a gabatar da lissafar mutane kamar son inputin, da wani tsari na tsarin mutane na sami. Tuna nũna cewa misalin ADEM na da muhimmi, kuma a cikin wata daraja mafi girma daga metric-nauyi kamar BLEU, da masu yin hukunci ga mutum duk maganar da tsari. Kayya, Munã nũna ADEM za'a iya ƙara domin ka ƙaddara tun-jerin zauren akwatin bayani a lokacin da ba'a sani ba, kuma yana da wata ƙyama muhimu wa kafin ƙayyade zauren akwatin bayani farat ɗaya.", 'he': 'הערכה אוטומטית של איכות התגובות לדיולוג לתחומים לא מבושלים היא בעיה מאתגרת. למרבה הצער, מטריות הערכה אוטומטית קיימות משותפות ומתאמות באופן גרוע מאוד עם שיפוטים אנושיים של איכות תגובה (Liu et al., 2016). עם זאת, יש תהליך עריכה אוטומטי מדויק הוא קריטי למחקר דיאלוג, כיוון שהוא מאפשר אבטיפוס מהיר ובדיקות של דוגמנים חדשים עם עריכות אנושיות פחות יקרות. בתגובה לאתגר הזה, אנחנו מייצרים עריכת דיאלוג אוטומטית כבעיה ללמוד. אנחנו מציגים מודל עריכה (ADEM) שלמד לחזות נקודות דומות לאדם לתגובות הכניסה, בשימוש בסט נתונים חדש של נקודות התגובה האדם. אנו מראים שהצפויות של דוגמנית ADEM מתחברות באופן משמעותי, וברמה הרבה יותר גבוהה ממטריקות כפולות מילים כמו BLEU, עם השיפוטים האנושיים ברמה של ביטוי ומערכת. אנחנו גם מראים כי ADEM יכול להתפשט להערכה דיאלוג מודל-אלס בלתי נראה במהלך האימונים, צעד חשוב להערכה אוטומטית דיאלוג.', 'jv': 'Automatically asserting the quality of dialog responses Lahorno, kalih-alah, kuwi lunak-alah sistem sing perusahaan karo perusahaan karo hal-alah sing gak soalé karo perusahaan kuwi kapan pangan (Liu et al, 2011). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ing gambar kanggo urwi iki, kita ngupakake permaneh seneng pisan dialog maneh kanggo kelas bot Anyone Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerasakno nang model DEEM adalah luwih dumadhi, lan ning langgar-dumadhi luwih dumadhi kuwi nggawe barang-dumadhi, ngono nggawe barang-dumadhi uwong, lan uwong sing bakal terus tambah lan nambah sistem. Awak dhéwé mungkin ngerasakno Da KEM iso nggawe Ngubah nggawe mod-el karo dialog kuwi ora bisa jarang, seneng basa sing dikarepaké kanggo ujian dialog auto', 'bo': "རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་དབྱིབས་མེད་པའི་ཁྲོད་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཚད་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་པ Unfortunately, existing automatic evaluation metrics are biased and correlate very poorly with human judgements of response quality (Liu et al., 2016). Yet having an accurate automatic evaluation procedure is crucial for dialog research, as it allows rapid prototyping and testing of new models with fewer expensive human evaluations. གདོང་ལེན་འདི་ལ་ལན་པ་ལས་འོང་གིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་དཔྱད་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ We present an evaluation model (ADEM)that learns to predict human-like scores to input responses, using a new data set of human response scores. We show that the ADEM model's predictions correlate significantly, and at a level much higher than word-overlap metrics such as BLEU, with human judgements at both the utterance and system-level. ང་ཚོས་ADEM་གིས་མཐུན་སྣེ་མི་ཡོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་མི་མཐུན"}
{'en': 'Visualizing and Understanding Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'تصور وفهم الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Visualisation et compréhension de la traduction automatique neuronale', 'pt': 'Visualização e compreensão da tradução automática neural', 'es': 'Visualización y comprensión de la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳の視覚化と理解', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद को विज़ुअलाइज़ करना और समझना', 'ru': 'Визуализация и понимание нейронного машинного перевода', 'zh': '可视化和解神经机器翻译', 'ga': 'Amharc agus Tuiscint ar Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Οπτικοποίηση και κατανόηση της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás megjelenítése és megértése', 'it': 'Visualizzazione e comprensione della traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Невралдық машинаның аудармасын көрсету мен түсіну', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Viżwalizzazzjoni u l-Ftehim tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'no': 'Visualisering og forståking av neuralmaskineomsetjing', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийг харах болон ойлгох', 'pl': 'Wizualizacja i zrozumienie neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Vizualizarea și înțelegerea traducerii automate neurale', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimas vaizduojant ir suprantant', 'sr': 'Visualizacija i razumevanje Neuralnog prevoda mašine', 'si': 'බලන්න සහ තේරුම් ගන්න න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය', 'so': 'Tarjumista maskinenta Neural', 'sv': 'Visualisera och förstå neural maskinöversättning', 'ur': 'نائرل ماشین ترجمہ کی تصویر اور سمجھنے', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch sang hình thức và hiểu về máy thần kinh', 'da': 'Visualisering og forståelse af neural maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'Визуализиране и разбиране на невралния машинен превод', 'nl': 'Visualiseren en begrijpen van neuronale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Visualizacija i razumijevanje Neuralnog prevoda stroja', 'de': 'Visualisieren und Verstehen neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung', 'id': 'Mengvisualisasi dan Memahami Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ko': '가시화 및 이해 신경', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'af': 'Visualiseer en verstaan Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Duke vizualizuar dhe kuptuar përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'tr': 'Neural Makina terjimesini görkez we düşündirmek', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն տեսնելը և հասկանալը', 'az': 'N칬ral ma코in t톛rc칲m칲n칲 g칬r칲n칲r v톛 anlay캼r', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ দেখা ও বুঝতে পারে', 'bs': 'Visualizacija i razumijevanje neuronskog prevoda mašine', 'ca': 'Visualitzar i entendre la traducció de la màquina neuronal', 'cs': 'Vizualizace a porozumění neuronovému strojovému překladu', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke visualiseerimine ja mõistmine', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen konekäännöksen visualisointi ja ymmärtäminen', 'jv': 'Visual karo sampeyan Jaringan Manual Tubagian', 'he': 'Visualizing and Understanding Neural Machine Translation', 'sk': 'Vizualizacija in razumevanje nevralnega strojnega prevajanja', 'ha': 'Translate this string will be used to name widget of this widget', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བ་དང་ཡིད་པའི་སྐྱེལ་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress in recent years, it is hard to interpret its internal workings due to the continuous representations and non-linearity of neural networks. In this work, we propose to use layer-wise relevance propagation (LRP) to compute the contribution of each contextual word to arbitrary hidden states in the attention-based encoder-decoder framework. We show that visualization with LRP helps to interpret the internal workings of NMT and analyze translation errors.', 'ar': 'بينما حققت الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) تقدمًا ملحوظًا في السنوات الأخيرة ، فمن الصعب تفسير أعمالها الداخلية بسبب التمثيلات المستمرة وعدم الخطية للشبكات العصبية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح استخدام انتشار الملاءمة الطبقي (LRP) لحساب مساهمة كل كلمة سياقية في الحالات المخفية التعسفية في إطار عمل وحدة فك التشفير القائم على الانتباه. نظهر أن التخيل باستخدام LRP يساعد في تفسير الأعمال الداخلية لـ NMT وتحليل أخطاء الترجمة.', 'es': 'Si bien la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) ha progresado notablemente en los últimos años, es difícil interpretar su funcionamiento interno debido a las representaciones continuas y la no linealidad de las redes neuronales. En este trabajo, proponemos utilizar la propagación de relevancia por capas (LRP) para calcular la contribución de cada palabra contextual a estados ocultos arbitrarios en el marco de codificador-decodificador basado en la atención. Demostramos que la visualización con LRP ayuda a interpretar el funcionamiento interno de NMT y a analizar los errores de traducción.', 'pt': 'Embora a tradução automática neural (NMT) tenha feito um progresso notável nos últimos anos, é difícil interpretar seu funcionamento interno devido às representações contínuas e à não linearidade das redes neurais. Neste trabalho, propomos usar a propagação de relevância por camadas (LRP) para calcular a contribuição de cada palavra contextual para estados ocultos arbitrários no framework codificador-decodificador baseado em atenção. Mostramos que a visualização com LRP ajuda a interpretar o funcionamento interno do NMT e analisar erros de tradução.', 'fr': "Alors que la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) a fait des progrès remarquables ces dernières années, il est difficile d'interpréter son fonctionnement interne en raison des représentations continues et de la non-linéarité des réseaux de neurones. Dans ce travail, nous proposons d'utiliser la propagation de pertinence par couche (LRP) pour calculer la contribution de chaque mot contextuel à des états cachés arbitraires dans le cadre encodeur-décodeur basé sur l'attention. Nous montrons que la visualisation avec LRP aide à interpréter le fonctionnement interne de la NMT et à analyser les erreurs de traduction.", 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）は近年顕著な進歩を遂げているが、ニューラルネットワークの連続的な表現と非線形性のために、その内部動作を解釈することは困難である。この研究では、レイヤーごとの関連性伝播（ ＬＲＰ ）を使用して、注意に基づくエンコーダデコーダフレームワークにおける任意の隠れた状態への各文脈的な単語の寄与を計算することを提案する。LRPを使用した視覚化は、NMTの内部動作を解釈し、翻訳エラーを分析するのに役立つことを示しています。', 'zh': '虽神经机器翻译(NMT)近年显进,而神经网络连示非线性,难解其内事。 于是建议用逐层相关性传播(LRP)计上下文单词于编码器 - 解码器框架中隐匿之效。 吾明用LRP可视化有助于说NMT内理析译非也。', 'hi': 'जबकि तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) ने हाल के वर्षों में उल्लेखनीय प्रगति की है, तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के निरंतर प्रतिनिधित्व और गैर-रैखिकता के कारण इसके आंतरिक कामकाज की व्याख्या करना मुश्किल है। इस काम में, हम ध्यान-आधारित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर ढांचे में मनमाने ढंग से छिपे हुए राज्यों के लिए प्रत्येक प्रासंगिक शब्द के योगदान की गणना करने के लिए परत-वार प्रासंगिकता प्रसार (एलआरपी) का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि एलआरपी के साथ विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन एनएमटी के आंतरिक कामकाज की व्याख्या करने और अनुवाद त्रुटियों का विश्लेषण करने में मदद करता है।', 'ru': 'В то время как нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) добился значительного прогресса в последние годы, трудно интерпретировать его внутренние работы из-за непрерывных представлений и нелинейности нейронных сетей. В этой работе мы предлагаем использовать послойное распространение релевантности (LRP) для вычисления вклада каждого контекстного слова в произвольные скрытые состояния в основанной на внимании структуре кодировщик-декодер. Показано, что визуализация с помощью LRP помогает интерпретировать внутренние работы НМТ и анализировать ошибки перевода.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta le blianta beaga anuas ar néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT), tá sé deacair a oibriú inmheánach a léirmhíniú mar gheall ar léiriú leanúnach agus neamhlíneacht na ngréasán néaraíoch. San obair seo, molaimid úsáid a bhaint as iomadú ábharthacht ciseal-ciallmhar (LRP) chun rannchuidiú gach focal comhthéacsúla le stáit fholaithe treallach sa chreat ionchódóra-díchódóra aird-bhunaithe. Léirímid go gcabhraíonn léirshamhlú le LRP chun oibriú inmheánach NMT a léirmhíniú agus anailís a dhéanamh ar earráidí aistriúcháin.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე წლის შემდეგ ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) გავაკეთეთ შესანიშნავი პროგრესი, საშუალური სამუშაო მუშაო გაგრძელება ნეიროლური ქსელების მუშაოდ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდა გამოყენოთ ყველა კონტექსტური სიტყვის არბრიტური დახურებული სტატუსების გარეშე, რომელიც აღმოჩენებული კონტექსტური სიტყვის გამოყენებას (LRP) სტატურაციას ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ვიზუალიზაცია LRP-ით დახმარებს NMT-ის ინტერპუქციების შეცდომის ანალიზაცია.', 'el': 'Ενώ η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση έχει σημειώσει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο τα τελευταία χρόνια, είναι δύσκολο να ερμηνευθεί η εσωτερική λειτουργία της λόγω της συνεχούς αναπαράστασης και της μη γραμμικότητας των νευρωνικών δικτύων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε τη χρήση της διάδοσης σχετικότητας σε επίπεδο για τον υπολογισμό της συμβολής κάθε λέξης σε αυθαίρετες κρυφές καταστάσεις στο πλαίσιο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή με βάση την προσοχή. Δείχνουμε ότι η απεικόνιση με τη βοήθεια βοηθά στην ερμηνεία της εσωτερικής λειτουργίας της και στην ανάλυση των μεταφραστικών σφαλμάτων.', 'hu': 'Míg a neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) az elmúlt években jelentős előrelépést ért el, a neurális hálózatok folyamatos reprezentációja és nem linearitása miatt nehéz értelmezni belső működését. Ebben a munkában azt javasoljuk, hogy a rétegbölcső relevancia propagation (LRP) használatával kiszámítsuk az egyes kontextuális szók hozzájárulását a figyelem-alapú kódoló-dekóder keretrendszer tetszőleges rejtett állapotához. Megmutatjuk, hogy az LRP-vel történő vizualizáció segít az NMT belső működésének értelmezésében és a fordítási hibák elemzésében.', 'it': "Mentre la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) ha fatto notevoli progressi negli ultimi anni, è difficile interpretare il suo funzionamento interno a causa delle continue rappresentazioni e non linearità delle reti neurali. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di utilizzare la propagazione della rilevanza a livello (LRP) per calcolare il contributo di ogni parola contestuale agli stati nascosti arbitrari nel framework encoder-decoder basato sull'attenzione. Mostriamo che la visualizzazione con LRP aiuta a interpretare il funzionamento interno di NMT e analizzare gli errori di traduzione.", 'lt': 'Nors pastaraisiais metais neurologinis mašin ų vertimas (NMT) padarė pastebimą pažangą, sunku aiškinti savo vidaus veikimą dėl nuolatinio nervų tinklų atstovavimo ir nelinijarumo. In this work, we propose to use layer-wise relevance propagation (LRP) to compute the contribution of each contextual word to arbitrary hidden states in the attention-based encoder-decoder framework.  Mes rodome, kad vizualizavimas su LRP padeda aiškinti NMT vidaus veikimą ir analizuoti vertimo klaidas.', 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармасы (NMT) соңғы жылдарда белгілі жұмыс істегенде, невралдық желілердің ішкі жұмыстарын түсініп тұрған және сызық желілердің сызықтығы емес сияқты түсініктемесі Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз қабаттың көмегімен көмектесетін пропагациясын (LRP) қолдану үшін, әрбір контексті сөздің көмектесетін жасырылған күйлеріне бағытталған кодер- декодер фреймінде қатынасын есептеу үшін LRP арқылы визуализация NMT ішкі жұмыстарын түсініп, аудармалардың қатесін талдау үшін көмектеседі.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കു ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആലോചിക്കുന്നത് എല്\u200dആര്\u200dപി (LRP) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഓരോ അഭിപ്രായത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കിന്റെയും പങ്ക് കണക്കാക്കുന്നതാണ്. ആലോ We show that visualization with LRP helps to interpret the internal workings of NMT and analyze translation errors.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што неуралниот машински превод (НМТ) постигна извонреден напредок во последниве години, тешко е да се интерпретира своето внатрешно работење поради континуираните претставувања и нелинијарноста на неуралните мрежи. Во оваа работа, предлагаме да се користи пропагација на релевантност по слој (LRP) за да се пресмета придонесот на секој контекстен збор во арбитралните скриени држави во рамката на кодер-декодер базирана на внимание. Покажуваме дека визуелизацијата со LRP помага да се интерпретира внатрешното функционирање на NMT и да се анализираат грешките во преводот.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) гайхалтай хөгжүүлэлт гарч ирсэн ч, мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үргэлжлүүлэлт болон шугамын биш байдлын тулд дотоод ажиллах нь хэцүү байдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид анхаарлын коддогч-агуулагч хэлбэрээр нуугдаж буй орнуудыг тооцохын тулд давхар хамааралтай хөгжүүлэлт (LRP) хэрэглэх санал өгдөг. Бид LRP-тэй харагдах нь NMT-ийн дотоод ажиллагааны тухай дүрслэж, орчуулалтын алдаа шинжилгээнд тусалдаг.', 'ms': 'Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, ia sukar untuk menerangkan kerja dalamnya disebabkan perwakilan terus menerus dan tidak-lineariti rangkaian saraf. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan penyebaran relevansi lapisan-wise (LRP) untuk menghitung kontribusi setiap perkataan kontekstual ke keadaan tersembunyi secara arbitrari dalam kerangka pengekod-pengekod berdasarkan perhatian. Kami menunjukkan bahawa visualisasi dengan LRP membantu untuk menerangkan kerja dalaman NMT dan menganalisis ralat terjemahan.', 'no': 'Mens omsetjinga av neuralmaskinen (NMT) har lagt merkelig framgang i tidlegare år, er det vanskeleg å tolka interne arbeid på grunn av dei kontinuerlege representasjonane og ikkje-lineariteten av neuralnettverk. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi å bruka utvikling av relevante laget (LRP) for å rekna ut bidraga til kvar kontekstalt ord til tilfeldig gøymde tilstandar i framlegget med koderingskoderingsbasert på oppmerksomhet. Vi viser at visualisering med LRP hjelper til å tolka interne arbeid av NMT og analysera omsetjingsfeilar.', 'pl': 'Chociaż neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) poczyniło w ostatnich latach znaczące postępy, trudno jest zinterpretować jego wewnętrzne działanie ze względu na ciągłą reprezentację i nieliniowość sieci neuronowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy wykorzystanie propagacji relevantności warstwowej (LRP) do obliczenia wkładu każdego kontekstowego słowa do dowolnych ukrytych stanów w ramach kodera-dekodera opartego na uwadze. Pokazujemy, że wizualizacja z LRP pomaga interpretować wewnętrzne działanie NMT i analizować błędy tłumaczeniowe.', 'ro': 'În timp ce traducerea automată neurală (NMT) a făcut progrese remarcabile în ultimii ani, este greu de interpretat funcționarea sa internă datorită reprezentărilor continue și non-linearității rețelelor neurale. În această lucrare, propunem să folosim propagarea relevanței straturilor (LRP) pentru a calcula contribuția fiecărui cuvânt contextual la stările ascunse arbitrare în cadrul encoder-decoder bazat pe atenție. Noi arătăm că vizualizarea cu LRP ajută la interpretarea funcționării interne a NMT și analiza erorilor de traducere.', 'sr': 'Iako je neuronski prevod (NMT) u poslednjih godina ostvario izvanredan napredak, teško je interpretirati svoje unutrašnje radnje zbog kontinualnih predstavljanja i neolinearnosti neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo da koristimo propagaciju relevantnosti na slojevima (LRP) kako bi računali doprinos svake kontekstualne reči proizvoljno skrivene države u okviru kodera na pažnji. Pokazujemo da vizualizacija sa LRP pomaže da interpretira unutrašnje radnje NMT-a i analizira greške prevođenja.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින් න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් අවුරුදු වලින්, ඒක ඇතුළත් වැඩක් අභ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සම්පූර්ණ වචනයක්ම පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සම්පූර්ණ වචනයක්ම සඳහා අවධානය ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ LRP එක්ක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට උදව් කරනවා NMT එකේ ඇතුළු වැඩ කරන්න සහ පරිවර්තන වැරදිල', 'so': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress in recent years, it is hard to interpret its internal workings due to the continuous representations and non-linearity of neural networks.  Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno ogeysiiska caadiga ah (LRP) si aan u xisaabinno bixinta warqad kasta oo joogtada ah, si aan u xisaabno wadamada qarsoon oo ku qoran qorshaha qodeynta. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in muuqashada LRP uu caawinayo turjubaanka shaqaalaha gudaha ee NMT iyo in aan baaritaanno qaladka turjumaadda.', 'sv': 'Medan neural maskinöversättning (NMT) har gjort anmärkningsvärda framsteg under de senaste åren, är det svårt att tolka dess interna funktion på grund av kontinuerliga representationer och icke-linjäritet av neurala nätverk. I detta arbete föreslår vi att man använder lagervis relevans propagation (LRP) för att beräkna bidraget från varje kontextuellt ord till godtyckliga dolda tillstånd i det uppmärksamhetsbaserade encoder-dekoder ramverket. Vi visar att visualisering med LRP hjälper till att tolka NMT:s interna funktion och analysera översättningsfel.', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) اثر اثر سے اثر اثر کے لئے اثر اثر ہے، اور نیورل نیٹ ورک کے داخلی کارکنوں کا تعبیر کرنے کا مشکل ہے. اس کام میں ہم پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ہر متوسط کلام کی کمپیوٹ کریں ہر متوسط کلام کی کمپیوٹر کے ذریعہ ذریعہ چھپائی حالت کے ذریعہ ذریعہ سے محفوظ کریں. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ LRP کے ذریعہ تصویزی NMT کے داخلی کارکنوں کی تعبیر کرنے کی مدد کرتی ہے اور ترجمہ خطاؤں کی تحلیل کرتی ہے.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் செய்துள்ளது, நிலையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களின் தொடர்ந்து கொண்டு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் அடுக்கு விளக்கத்தை உபயோகிக்க உபயோகப்படுத்த வேண்டும் ஒவ்வொரு தற்போதைய வார்த்தையின் பங்கை கணக்கிடுவதற்கு, பிரச்சனையில்  LRP உடன் பார்வை காட்டுகிறது NMT இன் உள்ளார்ந்த பணிகளை விளக்க உதவுகிறது மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பிழைகளை ஆய்வு செய்ய', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li t-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) għamlet progress notevoli f’dawn l-aħħar snin, huwa diffiċli li wieħed jinterpreta x-xogħol intern tiegħu minħabba r-rappreżentazzjonijiet kontinwi u n-nonlinearità tan-netwerks newrali. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu li jintużaw il-propagazzjoni tar-rilevanza skont is-saffi (LRP) biex tiġi kkalkulata l-kontribuzzjoni ta’ kull kelma kuntestwali għal stati arbitrarji moħbija fil-qafas ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni. Aħna nuru li l-viżwalizzazzjoni bl-LRP tgħin fl-interpretazzjoni tal-ħidmiet interni tal-NMT u fl-analiżi tal-iżbalji tat-traduzzjoni.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yangi yil ichida neyrolik tarjima (NMT) taʼminlovchi darajada o'zgarishga ega bo'lganda, yangi yillar davom etish va tarmoq tarmoqlarining davom etishni sababi ichki ishlarni o'rganish juda qiyin. Bu ishda, biz qatlam chegara muhim propaganda (LRP) dan foydalanishni talab qilamiz, har bir xil so'zni arbitratik bekitilgan soʻzlarga hisoblash uchun foydalanamiz. @ info", 'vi': 'Mặc dù dịch thiết bị thần kinh (NMB) đã có tiến triển đáng kể trong những năm gần đây, nhưng khó có thể hiểu được hoạt động nội bộ của nó do các biểu hiện liên tục và không-tuyến của các mạng thần kinh. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng hệ thống truyền tải liên quan cấp lớp để tính to án sự đóng góp của mỗi từ ngữ ứng với các bang ngầm ngẫu nhiên trong bộ mã hóa tập trung. Chúng tôi cho thấy sự mường tượng với RPP giúp giải thích hoạt động nội bộ của NMT và phân tích lỗi dịch.', 'nl': 'Hoewel neuronale machinevertaling (NMT) de afgelopen jaren opmerkelijke vooruitgang heeft geboekt, is het moeilijk om de interne werking ervan te interpreteren vanwege de continue representatie en non-lineariteit van neurale netwerken. In dit werk stellen we voor om laagwise relevantie propagation (LRP) te gebruiken om de bijdrage van elk contextueel woord te berekenen aan willekeurige verborgen toestanden in het attentie-based encoder-decoder framework. We laten zien dat visualisatie met LRP helpt om de interne werking van NMT te interpreteren en vertaalfouten te analyseren.', 'bg': 'Макар невронният машинен превод (НМТ) да има забележителен напредък през последните години, е трудно да се интерпретира вътрешната му работа поради непрекъснатите представи и нелинейността на невронните мрежи. В тази работа предлагаме да се използва пластово разпространение на релевантността (ЛРП), за да се изчисли приносът на всяка контекстуална дума към произволни скрити състояния в базираната на вниманието рамка на кодер-декодер. Показваме, че визуализацията с ЛРП помага да се интерпретира вътрешната работа на НМТ и анализира грешките в превода.', 'da': "Mens neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) har gjort bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt i de seneste år, er det svært at fortolke sine interne virkninger på grund af de kontinuerlige repræsentationer og ikke-linearitet af neurale netværk. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at bruge lag-wise relevance propagation (LRP) til at beregne bidraget fra hvert kontekstuelt ord til vilkårlige skjulte tilstande i den opmærksomhedsbaserede encoder-dekoder ramme. Vi viser, at visualisering med LRP hjælper med at fortolke NMT's interne arbejde og analysere oversættelsesfejl.", 'de': 'Während die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) in den letzten Jahren bemerkenswerte Fortschritte gemacht hat, ist es aufgrund der kontinuierlichen Repräsentation und Nichtlinearität neuronaler Netze schwierig, ihre internen Abläufe zu interpretieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, mittels Layer-Wise Relevance Propagation (LRP) den Beitrag jedes kontextuellen Wortes zu beliebigen versteckten Zuständen im aufmerksamkeitsbasierten Encoder-Decoder-Framework zu berechnen. Wir zeigen, dass Visualisierung mit LRP hilft, die internen Abläufe von NMT zu interpretieren und Übersetzungsfehler zu analysieren.', 'id': 'Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam bertahun-tahun terakhir, sulit untuk menerangkan pekerjaan dalamnya karena representation terus menerus dan non-linearitas jaringan saraf. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan propagasi relevansi lapisan-wise (LRP) untuk menghitung kontribusi setiap kata kontekstual ke negara tersembunyi secara arbitrar dalam rangka pengekoder-dekoder berdasarkan perhatian. Kami menunjukkan bahwa visualisasi dengan LRP membantu untuk menerjemahkan fungsi internal NMT dan menganalisa kesalahan terjemahan.', 'ko': '최근 들어 신경기계번역(NMT)이 눈에 띄게 진전됐지만, 신경망의 연속적 표시와 비선형성 때문에 내부 작업을 설명하기 어렵다.이 작업에서, 우리는 주의를 바탕으로 하는 인코더 - 디코더 프레임워크의 모든 상하문 단어가 임의로 숨겨진 상태에 대한 기여를 계산하기 위해 층별 관련 전파 (LRP) 를 사용하는 것을 권장합니다.LRP 시각화는 NMT의 내부 작동 원리를 설명하고 번역 오류를 분석하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 보여줍니다.', 'sw': 'Wakati utafsiri wa mashine ya kiutaratibu (NMT) umefanya maendeleo ya ajabu katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, ni vigumu kutafsiri kazi zake za ndani kwa sababu ya uwakilishi unaoendelea na ukweli wa mitandao ya neura. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia propaganda inayohusiana na vipande vyema (LRP) kuhesabu mchango wa kila neno la kawaida kwa mataifa yanayofichikana kwa kiholela katika mfumo wa kodi-decodir. Tunaonyesha kwamba kuonekana kwa LRP inasaidia kutafsiri kazi za ndani za NMT na kuchambua makosa ya tafsiri.', 'tr': "Nyöral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) geçen ýyllarda örän möhüm ösümli boldy bolsa, nöral şebekeleriň daşary täsirli täsirlerle terjime etmek kyn. Bu işde, biz gaty ajaýyp şeklinde nähili möhüm döwletlerni (LRP) tenzim edip, üns koder-dekoder çerçevesinde her näme sözüň nähili möhüm bolmagyny hasaplamak üçin teklip berýäris. LRP bilen görselleştirilişi NMT'yň içi işlerini çykarmak we terjime hatalaryny çözümlemek üçin kömek edip otyrýarys.", 'fa': 'در حالی که ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی (NMT) در سالهای اخیر پیشرفت فوق العاده\u200cای انجام داده است، کار داخلی خود را به دلیل نمایش\u200cهای دائمی و غیرخط شبکه\u200cهای عصبی تعبیر کردن سخت است. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از گسترش ارتباط با طبقه\u200cای استفاده کنیم تا توجه هر کلمه متوسط به وضعیت مخفی قابل توجه در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ما نشان می دهیم که visualization با LRP کمک می کند تا تعبیر کارهای داخلی NMT را انجام دهد و اشتباهی ترجمه را تحلیل کند.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa përkthimi i makinave nervore (NMT) ka bërë përparim të shquar në vitet e fundit, është e vështirë të interpretohet puna e tij e brendshme për shkak të përfaqësimeve të vazhdueshme dhe jo-linearitetit të rrjeteve nervore. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë të përdorim përhapjen e rëndësisë në mënyrë të nivelit (LRP) për të llogaritur kontributin e çdo fjale kontekstuale në shtetet e fshehura arbitrare në kuadrin e koduesit-dekoderit bazuar në vëmendje. Ne tregojmë se vizualizimi me LRP ndihmon për të interpretuar funksionimet e brendshme të NMT dhe për të analizuar gabimet e përkthimit.', 'af': 'Terwyl die neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) in onlangse jaar betekende vordering gemaak het, is dit moeilik om sy interne werke te interpreteer vanweë die voortdurende vertalings en nie-lineariteit van neurale netwerke. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons om laag wys relevante propagasie (LRP) te gebruik om die bydraag van elke kontekslike woord te bereken na arbitrieële verborge staatste in die aandag-gebaseerde enkoder-dekoder raamwerk. Ons wys dat visualisering met LRP hulp om die interne werke van NMT te interpreteer en om vertaling foute te analyseer.', 'am': 'ባለፈው ዓመታት ውስጥ የፀሐይ መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ (NMT) ባደረገ ጊዜ፣ በዘወትር ብሔራዊ ድረ ገጽ እና የደዌብ መረብ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ምክንያት ግልፅ ማተርጉም ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የደረጃ-ጥበበኛ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ፕሮግራም (LRP) የሚጠቅመውን የአሁኑን ቃላት ለጥብቅ የተሰወረውን ሀገሮች በተመለከተው የencoder-decoder ፍሬም ለመቁጠር እናስባለን፡፡ ከLRP ጋር ማስታወቂያውን የNMT ውስጥነት ስርዓቶችን ለመተረጉም እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hr': 'Iako je neuronski prevod (NMT) u posljednjih godina ostvario izvanredan napredak, teško je interpretirati svoje unutrašnje radnje zbog neprestano predstavljanja i neolinearnosti neuronskih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo da koristimo propagaciju relevantnosti na slojevima (LRP) kako bi računali doprinos svake kontekstne riječi proizvoljno skrivene države u okviru kodera na temelju pažnje. Pokazujemo da vizualizacija s LRP pomaže interpretirati unutrašnje radnje NMT-a i analizirati greške prevođenja.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) վերջին տարիների ընթացքում զարմանալի առաջընթաց է արել, դժվար է թարգմանել իր ներքին գործողությունները նյարդային ցանցերի անընդհատ ներկայացումների և ոչ գծային ցանցերի պատճառով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել շերտի առումով նշանակալի տարածումը (LRP) յուրաքանչյուր կոնտեքստալ բառի ներդրումը հաշվարկելու համար ուշադրության հիմնված կոդեր-կոդերի շրջանակում կամավոր թաքնված վիճակների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ LRP-ի վիզուալիզացիան օգնում է մեկնաբանել NMT-ի ներքին գործողությունները և վերլուծել թարգմանման սխալները:', 'az': 'NMT son illərdə müəyyən bir tədbir yaratdığı halda, nöral ağlarının sürəkli göstərilmələri və dəyişiklik olmadığı üçün içəri işləri yozmaq çətindir. Bu işdə, biz hər bir müxtəlif sözün gizli durumlarına dikkati kodlayıcı frameworkdə gizlənmiş vəziyyətlərə istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. LRP ilə vizualizasyon NMT içəri işləri yoxlamağa və tercümə hatalarını analiz etməyə kömək edir.', 'bs': 'Iako je neuronski prevod (NMT) u posljednjih godina ostvario izvanredan napredak, teško je interpretirati svoje unutrašnje radnje zbog kontinualnih predstavljanja i neolinearnosti neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo da koristimo propagaciju relevantnosti na slojevima (LRP) kako bi računali doprinos svake kontekstne riječi proizvoljno skrivene države u okviru kodera na pažnji. Pokazujemo da vizualizacija sa LRP pomaže interpretirati unutrašnje radnje NMT-a i analizirati greške prevođenja.', 'ca': "Mentre la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) ha fet progrés notables en els últims anys, és difícil interpretar els seus treballs interns degut a les representacions constants i la no linearitat de les xarxes neurals. En aquesta feina, proposem utilitzar la propagació de relevància per capa (LRP) per calcular la contribució de cada paraula contextual a estats ocults arbitraris en el marc de codificador-decodificador basat en l'atenció. Mostrem que la visualització amb LRP ajuda a interpretar el funcionament intern de la NMT i a analitzar els errors de traducció.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) চমৎকার অগ্রগতি তৈরি করেছে, কিন্তু নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের চলমান প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং অলীকার এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রত্যেক বিদ্যমান শব্দের অবদান হিসেবে মনোযোগ দেয়া কোডার-ডেকোডার ফ্রেম্যাকেজে লুকিয়ে রাখা রাষ্ট্রের অংশ গণনা করতে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি এলআরপির দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এনএমটির অভ্যন্তরীণ কার্যক্রম ব্যাখ্যা করার সাহায্য করছে এবং অনুবাদের ত্রুটি বিশ', 'cs': 'Zatímco neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) dosáhl v posledních letech pozoruhodného pokroku, je těžké interpretovat jeho vnitřní fungování kvůli kontinuální reprezentaci a nelinearitě neuronových sítí. V této práci navrhujeme použití vrstvě-wise relevance propagace (LRP) k výpočtu přínosu jednotlivých kontextových slov na libovolné skryté stavy v rámci pozornosti-based encoder-decoder frameworku. Ukazujeme, že vizualizace s LRP pomáhá interpretovat interní fungování NMT a analyzovat překladové chyby.', 'fi': 'Vaikka neurokonekäännös (NMT) on edistynyt merkittävästi viime vuosina, sen sisäistä toimintaa on vaikea tulkita hermoverkkojen jatkuvien esitysten ja epälineaarisuuden vuoksi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kerrosviisasta relevanssin propagaatiota (LRP) laskemaan kunkin kontekstuaalisen sanan osuuden mielivaltaisiin piilotiloihin huomiopohjaisessa kooderi-dekooderikehyksessä. Osoitamme, että visualisointi LRP:llä auttaa tulkitsemaan NMT:n sisäistä toimintaa ja analysoimaan käännösvirheitä.', 'et': 'Kuigi neuraalne masintõlge (NMT) on viimastel aastatel teinud märkimisväärseid edusamme, on selle sisemist toimimist raske tõlgendada, sest neuraalvõrgustikud esindavad pidevalt ja mittelineaarselt. Selles töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada kihilist relevantsuse propagatsiooni (LRP), et arvutada iga kontekstipõhise sõna panus meelevaldsetesse peidetud olekutesse tähelepanupõhises kodeerija-dekooderi raamistikus. Näitame, et visualiseerimine LRP abil aitab tõlgendada NMT sisemist toimimist ja analüüsida tõlkevige.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko je nevronski strojni prevod (NMT) v zadnjih letih dosegel izjemen napredek, je zaradi stalnih reprezentacij in nelinearnosti nevronskih omrežij težko interpretirati njegovo notranje delovanje. V tem delu predlagamo uporabo slojnega razmnoževanja relevantnosti (LRP) za izračun prispevka vsake kontekstualne besede k poljubnim skritim stanjem v okviru kodirnika-dekoderja, ki temelji na pozornosti. Pokazali smo, da vizualizacija z LRP pomaga interpretirati notranje delovanje NMT in analizirati napake pri prevajanju.', 'jv': 'Mungkin teljamahan ing coral (NMT)sing dumadhi kapan dumadhi kapan dumadhi, kuwi susahe kanggo ngertatakno operasi daong kapan karo cah nyong lanjut sampeyan karo cah nyong lanjut sampeyan karo netwisan sing paling dumadhi. Nang gunggo iki, kita nggunakake nggawe Layer-Wise Relance Awak dhéwé éntuk ngeralakno karo LPP luwih ngéwangi kanggo ngerngeralakno cara-cara sing di NMT karo pangkat kanggo ngeralakno eror', 'he': 'בעוד התרגום המכונה העצבית (NMT) עשה התקדמות מדהימה בשנים האחרונות, קשה לפרש את הפעולות הפנימיות שלה בגלל היציגות המתמשכות ולא לינריות של רשתות העצביות. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים להשתמש בהרבות רלוונטיות בשכבה (LRP) כדי לחשב את התרומה של כל מילה קונטקסטלית למדינות מסתורות רציניות במסגרת קודד-קידור מבוססת תשומת לב. We show that visualization with LRP helps to interpret the internal workings of NMT and analyze translation errors.', 'ha': 'Meni translation of neural mashine (NMT) has made significant forward in some few years laten, it is harsh to interpret its aikin guda owa ga the continuous presence and non-line-arity of the neural Networks. Daga wannan aikin, Munã kwaɗayin mu yi amfani da bayani na zance-zane-zane (LRP) don a ƙidãya rabon da ko wani magana na takarda zuwa arbita halarcen da aka ɓõye cikin firam-kode-na-bincike. Tuna nũna cewa suruya da LRP yana taimako da fassarar aiki na guda na NMT kuma mu yi analyza masu ɓarna.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་འཕེལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་པའི་གདོང་རིས་གདོང་ལེན་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་མིང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་རེ་རེད་བཅས་ཀྱིས་གསལ We show that visualization with LRP helps to interpret the internal workings of NMT and analyze translation errors.'}
{'en': 'Detecting annotation noise in automatically labelled data', 'ar': 'الكشف عن ضوضاء التعليقات التوضيحية في البيانات المصنفة تلقائيًا', 'pt': 'Detectando ruído de anotação em dados rotulados automaticamente', 'fr': "Détection du bruit d'annotation dans les données étiquetées automatiquement", 'es': 'Detección de ruido de anotación en datos etiquetados automáticamente', 'ja': '自動ラベル付けされたデータのアノテーションノイズの検出', 'zh': '检自标数中注噪声', 'ru': 'Обнаружение шума аннотации в автоматически помеченных данных', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए गए डेटा में एनोटेशन शोर का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Torann nótaí a bhrath i sonraí a lipéadaítear go huathoibríoch', 'ka': 'ავტომატურად ჩატვირთებული მონაცემებში მონიშნული სიტყვის განახლება', 'hu': 'Jegyzetelési zaj észlelése automatikusan feliratozott adatokban', 'kk': 'Автоматты жарлық деректерінде белгілеу дыбысты анықтау', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση θορύβου σχολιασμού σε αυτόματα επισημασμένα δεδομένα', 'it': 'Rilevamento del rumore di annotazione nei dati etichettati automaticamente', 'lt': 'Detecting annotation noise in automatically labelled data', 'ms': 'Mengesan bunyi anotasi dalam data yang ditabel secara automatik', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta ta’ storbju ta’ annotazzjoni f’dejta ttikkettata awtomatikament', 'mn': 'Автоматаар нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн дотор нотолгоо дуугарах', 'no': 'Oppdagar notasjonsstøy i automatisk merkelige data', 'mk': 'Детектирање на бучава на анотација во автоматски означени податоци', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie szumów adnotacyjnych w automatycznie etykietowanych danych', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d അറ്റാന്\u200dറേഷന്\u200d ശബ്ദം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje buke annotacije u automatskim označenim podacima', 'sv': 'Identifiera anteckningsbrus i automatiskt märkta data', 'ro': 'Detectarea zgomotului de adnotare în datele etichetate automat', 'ur': 'اٹوٹر غږ کو اٹوٹ لیبل ڈیٹا میں پتہ لیا جاتا ہے', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්තේ නිරීක්ෂණ ශබ්දය හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Detecting annotation noise in automatically labelled data', 'ta': 'தானாகவே குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலில் அறிவிப்பு ஒலியை கண்டறிதல்', 'uz': 'Taò¥rifi', 'vi': 'Phát hiện nhiễu chú thích trong dữ liệu có nhãn tự động', 'nl': 'Annotatiegruis detecteren in automatisch gelabelde gegevens', 'da': 'Registrering af annotationsstøj i automatisk mærkede data', 'bg': 'Откриване на шум от анотация в автоматично етикетирани данни', 'id': 'Mengeteksi kebisingan anotasi dalam data yang otomatis ditabel', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje buke annotacije u automatskim označenim podacima', 'ko': '자동 표시 데이터에서 주석 잡음 검출', 'de': 'Erkennung von Annotationsrauschen in automatisch beschrifteten Daten', 'fa': 'شناسایی صدای اخطار در داده\u200cهای خودکار', 'af': 'Kies annotasie ruis in outomatiese etiketeerde data', 'sw': 'Kugundua sauti za matangazo katika taarifa zinazoonyeshwa automatically', 'tr': 'Otomatik etilen maglumaty içinde ýazgyrlyk goşuny açylýa', 'am': 'Detecting annotation noise in automatically labelled data', 'hy': 'Նոտացիայի աղմուկ հայտնաբերելը ինքնաբերաբար նշանակված տվյալներում', 'az': 'Avtomatik etiketl…ônmiŇü m…ôlumatlarda n√∂qt…ô s…ôsini keŇüif edir', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar zhurmën e anotacionit në të dhënat me etiketë automatike', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে লেবেল করা তথ্যের মধ্যে অ্যান্টারেশন শব্দ সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje buke annotacije u automatskim označenim podacima', 'et': 'Anotatsioonimüra tuvastamine automaatselt märgistatud andmetes', 'ca': "Detectar soroll d'anotació en dades etiquetades automàticament", 'cs': 'Detekce anotace šumu v automaticky označených datech', 'fi': 'Huomautuskohinan havaitseminen automaattisesti merkityissä tiedoissa', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'גילוי רעש הערות במידע המתווים באוטומטית', 'ha': 'Ana gane saurin alama cikin data da aka rubũta farat ɗaya', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje hrupa pri opombah v samodejno označenih podatkih', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་བརྗོད་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲ་སྐད་བཙལ་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a method for error detection in automatically annotated text, aimed at supporting the creation of high-quality language resources at affordable cost. Our method combines an unsupervised generative model with human supervision from active learning. We test our approach on in-domain and out-of-domain data in two languages, in AL simulations and in a real world setting. For all settings, the results show that our method is able to detect annotation errors with high precision and high recall.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة لاكتشاف الأخطاء في النص المشروح تلقائيًا ، بهدف دعم إنشاء موارد لغوية عالية الجودة بتكلفة معقولة. تجمع طريقتنا بين النموذج التوليدي غير الخاضع للرقابة والإشراف البشري من التعلم النشط. نحن نختبر نهجنا على البيانات داخل المجال وخارج النطاق بلغتين ، في محاكاة AL وفي بيئة العالم الحقيقي. بالنسبة لجميع الإعدادات ، تُظهر النتائج أن طريقتنا قادرة على اكتشاف أخطاء التعليقات التوضيحية بدقة عالية واسترجاع عالي.', 'es': 'Introducimos un método para la detección de errores en texto anotado automáticamente, destinado a apoyar la creación de recursos lingüísticos de alta calidad a un precio asequible. Nuestro método combina un modelo generativo no supervisado con la supervisión humana del aprendizaje activo. Probamos nuestro enfoque en datos dentro y fuera del dominio en dos idiomas, en simulaciones de AL y en un entorno real. Para todos los ajustes, los resultados muestran que nuestro método es capaz de detectar errores de anotación con alta precisión y alta recuperación.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une méthode de détection des erreurs dans le texte annoté automatiquement, visant à soutenir la création de ressources linguistiques de haute qualité à un coût abordable. Notre méthode combine un modèle génératif non supervisé avec une supervision humaine issue d'un apprentissage actif. Nous testons notre approche sur des données internes et hors domaine dans deux langues, dans des simulations AL et dans un environnement réel. Pour tous les paramètres, les résultats montrent que notre méthode est capable de détecter les erreurs d'annotation avec une grande précision et un rappel élevé.", 'pt': 'Introduzimos um método para detecção de erros em texto anotado automaticamente, visando apoiar a criação de recursos linguísticos de alta qualidade a um custo acessível. Nosso método combina um modelo generativo não supervisionado com supervisão humana de aprendizado ativo. Testamos nossa abordagem em dados no domínio e fora do domínio em dois idiomas, em simulações de AL e em um cenário do mundo real. Para todas as configurações, os resultados mostram que nosso método é capaz de detectar erros de anotação com alta precisão e alta revocação.', 'ja': '手頃な価格で高品質な言語リソースの作成をサポートすることを目的に、自動的に注釈付きテキストでエラー検出を行う方法を導入しました。私たちの方法は、監督されていない生成モデルとアクティブラーニングからの人間の監督を組み合わせています。私たちは、2つの言語、ALシミュレーション、および現実の世界で、ドメイン内およびドメイン外のデータに関するアプローチをテストします。すべての設定で、メソッドが高精度かつ高リコールでアノテーションエラーを検出できることを示しています。', 'zh': '我们介绍了一种在自己注文本中错误检测的方法,指赞以理本创造高质量的语言资源。 吾道将无监生成模型与自学者工相监也。 二语试于AL、真实世界中数术。 凡诸设置,结果表明吾法能以高精度高召率检注谬误。', 'ru': 'Введем метод обнаружения ошибок в автоматически аннотированном тексте, направленный на поддержку создания качественных языковых ресурсов по доступной цене. Наш метод сочетает в себе неконтролируемую генеративную модель с человеческим надзором от активного обучения. Мы тестируем наш подход к внутридоменным и внедоменным данным на двух языках, в моделировании AL и в реальных условиях. Для всех настроек результаты показывают, что наш метод способен обнаруживать ошибки аннотации с высокой точностью и высоким отзывом.', 'hi': 'हम स्वचालित रूप से एनोटेट किए गए पाठ में त्रुटि का पता लगाने के लिए एक विधि पेश करते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य सस्ती लागत पर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले भाषा संसाधनों के निर्माण का समर्थन करना है। हमारी विधि सक्रिय सीखने से मानव पर्यवेक्षण के साथ एक असुरक्षित उत्पादक मॉडल को जोड़ती है। हम दो भाषाओं में इन-डोमेन और आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटा पर अपने दृष्टिकोण का परीक्षण करते हैं, एएल सिमुलेशन में और एक वास्तविक दुनिया सेटिंग में। सभी सेटिंग्स के लिए, परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि उच्च परिशुद्धता और उच्च याद के साथ एनोटेशन त्रुटियों का पता लगाने में सक्षम है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach modh chun earráidí a bhrath i dtéacs a bhfuil anót uathoibríoch air, atá dírithe ar thacú le cruthú acmhainní teanga ar ardchaighdeán ar chostas réasúnta. Comhcheanglaíonn ár modh múnla giniúna gan mhaoirseacht le maoirseacht dhaonna ón bhfoghlaim ghníomhach. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár gcur chuige maidir le sonraí laistigh agus lasmuigh den fhearann in dhá theanga, in ionsamhlúcháin AL agus i suíomh fíordhomhanda. Maidir le gach socrú, léiríonn na torthaí go bhfuil ár modh in ann earráidí nótaí a bhrath le cruinneas ard agus ard-aisghairm.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια μέθοδο ανίχνευσης σφαλμάτων σε αυτόματα σχολιασμένο κείμενο, με στόχο την υποστήριξη της δημιουργίας γλωσσικών πόρων υψηλής ποιότητας σε προσιτό κόστος. Η μέθοδός μας συνδυάζει ένα μοντέλο χωρίς επίβλεψη γενιάς με την ανθρώπινη επίβλεψη από την ενεργό μάθηση. Δοκιμάζουμε την προσέγγισή μας σε δεδομένα εντός και εκτός πεδίου σε δύο γλώσσες, σε προσομοιώσεις και σε πραγματικό περιβάλλον. Για όλες τις ρυθμίσεις, τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας είναι σε θέση να ανιχνεύει σφάλματα σχολιασμού με υψηλή ακρίβεια και υψηλή ανάκληση.', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy automatikusan jegyzetelt szövegben lévő hibaészlelési módszert, amelynek célja, hogy támogassa a kiváló minőségű nyelvi erőforrások létrehozását megfizethető költségek mellett. Módszerünk egy felügyelet nélküli generációs modellt ötvöz az aktív tanulásból származó emberi felügyelettel. A megközelítésünket domain belüli és domain kívüli adatokon teszteljük két nyelven, AL szimulációkban és valós környezetben. Minden beállítás esetében az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk nagy pontossággal és nagy visszahívással képes felismerni a jegyzetelési hibákat.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ავტომატურად აღმოჩნეთ ტექსტის შეცდომის განახლებისთვის მეტი, რომელიც უფრო უფრო კარგად ენის რესურსის შექმნის შესაძლებელად დაეყენება. ჩვენი მეთოდი აკეთეული სწავლების შემდეგ ადამიანის ნახვა მოდელის შემდეგ დამყენება. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ჩვენი მოწყობილობა დიომინში და გარეშე დიომინის მონაცემებში ორი ენაში, AL სიმულაციაში და რეალური მსოფლიოში. ყველა პარამეტრებისთვის, შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მეტი შეუძლია აღმოჩვენოთ შეცდომების შეცდომები, რომელიც უფრო მართლად და უფრო მართ', 'kk': 'Біз автоматты түрде белгіленген мәтінде қате анықтау әдісін келтіреміз. Бұл әдісі барлық бағаттары бойынша сапатты тіл ресурстарын құру үшін көмектесетін. Біздің әдіміміз белсенді үйренуден адамдарды қарау үлгісімен біріктіреді. Біз доменге және доменге тыс деректерімізді екі тілде, AL симуляцияларында және шын әлемді баптауларында тексереміз. Барлық параметрлер үшін, нәтижелер біздің әдіміміздің оң дұрыс және жоғары еске салу қатесін табуға болады.', 'it': "Introducemo un metodo per il rilevamento degli errori nel testo annotato automaticamente, volto a supportare la creazione di risorse linguistiche di alta qualità a costi accessibili. Il nostro metodo combina un modello generativo non supervisionato con la supervisione umana dall'apprendimento attivo. Testiamo il nostro approccio su dati in-domain e out-domain in due lingue, in simulazioni AL e in un ambiente reale. Per tutte le impostazioni, i risultati mostrano che il nostro metodo è in grado di rilevare gli errori di annotazione con alta precisione e richiamo elevato.", 'ml': 'പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിനുള്ള വിലയ്ക്ക് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാനുള്ള ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ഭാ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ജനറലിവ് മാതൃകയെ സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് മനുഷ്യന്\u200d നിരീ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളിലും, അല്\u200d സിമാലേഷനിലും, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക സെറ്റിങ്ങിലുമായി നമ്മുടെ സ്വീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. For all settings, the results show that our method is able to detect annotation errors with high precision and high recall.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме метод за детекција на грешки во автоматски анотиран текст, чија цел е поддршка на создавањето висококвалитетни јазички ресурси за пристапна цена. Нашиот метод комбинира ненадгледуван генерациски модел со човечкиот надзор од активно учење. Го тестираме нашиот пристап на податоци во домен и надвор од домен на два јазици, во симулации на АЛ и во реално светско место. За сите поставувања, резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот метод е во можност да ги детектира грешките на анотација со висока прецизност и висока враќање.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame klaidų nustatymo automatiškai anotuotame tekste metodą, kuriuo siekiama remti aukštos kokybės kalbų išteklių kūrimą prieinamomis kainomis. Mūsų metodas derina nepastebimą kartos model į su žmogaus priežiūra iš aktyvaus mokymosi. Bandome savo požiūrį į domeninius ir ne domeninius duomenis dviem kalbomis, JL simuliacijomis ir realiame pasaulyje. Visų nustatymų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali nustatyti anotacijų klaidas labai tiksliai ir labai prisimintai.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kaedah untuk pengesan ralat dalam teks yang dicatat secara automatik, yang bertujuan untuk menyokong ciptaan sumber bahasa berkualiti tinggi dengan biaya yang boleh diterima. Kaedah kami menggabungkan model generatif yang tidak diawasi dengan pengawasan manusia dari pembelajaran aktif. Kami menguji pendekatan kami pada data dalam domain dan luar domain dalam dua bahasa, dalam simulasi AL dan dalam setting dunia nyata. Untuk semua tetapan, keputusan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami mampu mengesan ralat anotasi dengan ketepatan tinggi dan pengingatan tinggi.', 'mn': 'Бид автоматаар анзаарсан текст дээр алдаа гаргах аргыг тайлбарлаж, үнэ цэнэтэй хэлний баялаг бүтээхийг дэмжих зорилготой. Бидний арга нь хүн төрөлхтний сургалтын ажиллагааны ажиллагаанаас дамжуулагүй бүтээлч загварыг нэгтгэдэг. Бид хоёр хэл, AL шинжлэх ухаан болон бодит ертөнцийн хэмжээнд өөрсдийнхөө арга замыг шалгаж үздэг. Бүх тохиолдолд, үр дүнд бидний арга нь өндөр тодорхой, өндөр санамжлалтай анзаарлын алдаа олж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy metodę wykrywania błędów w automatycznie adnotacyjnym tekście, mającą na celu wspieranie tworzenia wysokiej jakości zasobów językowych po przystępnych kosztach. Nasza metoda łączy w sobie model generacyjny bez nadzoru z nadzorem człowieka z aktywnego uczenia się. Testujemy nasze podejście na danych wewnątrz domeny i poza domeną w dwóch językach, w symulacjach AL i w świecie rzeczywistym. W przypadku wszystkich ustawień wyniki pokazują, że nasza metoda jest w stanie wykryć błędy adnotacji z wysoką precyzją i wysoką odzyskiwaniem.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu metodu għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ żbalji f’test awtomatikament annotat, immirat lejn l-appoġġ tal-ħolqien ta’ riżorsi lingwistiċi ta’ kwalità għolja bi prezz raġonevoli. Il-metodu tagħna jikkombina mudell ġenerattiv mhux sorveljat mas-superviżjoni tal-bniedem mit-tagħlim attiv. Aħna nistestjaw l-approċċ tagħna fuq dejta f’dominju u barra mid-dominju f’żewġ lingwi, f’simulazzjonijiet AL u f’ambjent dinji reali. Għall-konfigurazzjonijiet kollha, ir-riżultati juru li l-metodu tagħna huwa kapaċi jidentifika żbalji ta’ annotazzjoni bi preċiżjoni għolja u b’recall għoli.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo metodu za otkrivanje grešaka u automatski annotiranom tekstu, ciljanu na podršku stvaranja visokokvalitetnih jezičkih resursa za dostupne troškove. Naša metoda kombinira neodređeni generativni model sa ljudskim nadzorom iz aktivnog učenja. Testiramo naš pristup podacima u domenu i izvan domena na dva jezika, u AL simulaciji i u stvarnom stanju svijeta. Za sve postavke, rezultati pokazuju da je naš metod u mogućnosti da otkrije greške annotacije sa visokom preciznošću i visokom sećanju.', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් පිළිබඳු පාළිබඳ හොයාගන්න විධානයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත විශේ අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් නැති ප්\u200dරභාවිත විධානයක්. අපි භාෂාවක් දෙකක් වලින්, AL සිම්යුලේස් වලින් සහ ඇත්ත ලෝකය සැකසුම් වලින් අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා. සියලුම සැකසුම් සඳහා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර වැරදි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein metode for oppdaging av feil i automatisk oppmerkte tekst, med mål på å støtte opprettinga av høg kvalitetspråk- ressursar med tilgjengelege kostnader. Metoden vårt kombinerer eit ugjennomsiktig generelt modell med menneskeovervaking frå aktiv læring. Vi tester tilnærminga vårt på innedomene og uten domene-data i to språk, i AL simulasjonar og i eit verdsinnstilling. For alle innstillingane viser resultatet at metoden vårt kan finna oppmerkingsfeilar med høg nøyaktig og høg rekning.', 'ro': 'Introducem o metodă de detectare a erorilor în textul adnotat automat, menită să sprijine crearea de resurse lingvistice de înaltă calitate la costuri accesibile. Metoda noastră combină un model generativ nesupravegheat cu supravegherea umană din învățarea activă. Testăm abordarea noastră pe date din domeniu și din afara domeniului în două limbi, în simulări AL și într-un cadru real. Pentru toate setările, rezultatele arată că metoda noastră este capabilă să detecteze erorile de adnotare cu precizie ridicată și rechemare ridicată.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab baaritaanka qaladka ah oo aad u baahan tahay macluumaad aad u baahan tahay. Metalkeenu wuxuu isku darsadaa model aan la ilaalinayn oo lagu ilaaliyo dadka waxbarashada fircoon. Waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa macluumaadkayaga gudaha iyo macluumaadka gudaha ah oo aan aheyn labada luqadood, tusaalaha AL iyo qaabka caalamiga ah. Sababadaha oo dhan waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaababkayaga uu awoodo inuu ogaado qaladyada qalloocsiga oo aad u sahlan iyo xusuusta sarreeya.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en metod för felupptäckt i automatiskt kommenterad text, som syftar till att stödja skapandet av högkvalitativa språkresurser till överkomliga kostnader. Vår metod kombinerar en oövervakad generativ modell med mänsklig handledning från aktivt lärande. Vi testar vårt tillvägagångssätt på in-domain och out-of-domain data på två språk, i AL-simuleringar och i en verklig värld miljö. För alla inställningar visar resultaten att vår metod kan upptäcka anteckningsfel med hög precision och hög återkallelse.', 'ta': 'நாம் பிழை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான முறையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் தானாகவே குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட உரையில், அதிக தரமான மொழி மொழி மூலங்களை உரு நம்முடைய முறைமையில் செயற்படுத்தலிலிருந்து ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத உருவம் மாதிரியை சேர்க்கிறது. நாம் களம் மற்றும் களம் முடியாத தகவல்களை இரண்டு மொழிகளில், AL பாவனைகளில் மற்றும் உண்மையான உலக அமைப்பில் சோதிக்கிறோம். For all settings, the results show that our method is able to detect annotation errors with high precision and high recall.', 'ur': 'ہم نے خطا شناسایی کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے، جو اپنے ساتھ اظہار کیا گیا ہے، اور اس کا مطابق ہے کہ بہت سی کیفیت زبان کے منبع بنانے کی مدد کریں۔ ہمارا طریقہ ایک غیر قابل تولید موڈل کو فعال تعلیم سے انسان کی نظر سے ملتا ہے۔ ہم دونوں زبانوں میں آل سیمولیزوں میں اور ایک حقیقی دنیا کے تنظیم میں اپنے طریقے کو آزماتے ہیں۔ تمام تنظیمات کے لئے، نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ بلند دقیق اور بلند یاد کرنے کے ساتھ اظہار کی خطاؤں کو پہچان سکتا ہے.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Our method combines an unsupervised generative model with human supervision from active learning.  Biz domen va domen maʼlumotlarimizni ikki tillarda, AL simuliyatlarida va haqiqiqiy dunyo moslamada tekshirishingiz mumkin. Hamma moslamalar uchun natijalar bu usulning taʼminlovchi xatolarini aniqlashga imkoniyatli va eng yuqori eslab qolish bilan aniqlash mumkin.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để phát hiện lỗi trong văn bản tự động được ghi chú, nhằm hỗ trợ việc tạo nguồn ngôn ngữ chất lượng cao với giá hợp lý. Phương pháp của chúng tôi kết hợp một mô hình gen không giám sát với con người. Chúng tôi kiểm tra phương pháp của chúng ta trên dữ liệu nội bộ và ngoài lãnh thổ bằng hai ngôn ngữ, bằng A.L. và trong một môi trường thế giới thực. Với tất cả các thiết lập, kết quả cho thấy phương pháp này có khả năng phát hiện lỗi ghi chú với độ chính xác và hồi phục cao.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме метод за откриване на грешки в автоматично анотиран текст, насочен към подпомагане на създаването на висококачествени езикови ресурси на достъпна цена. Нашият метод съчетава ненадзорен генеративен модел с човешки надзор от активно учене. Тестваме подхода си върху данни в домейн и извън домейн на два езика, в симулации и в реална среда. За всички настройки резултатите показват, че нашият метод е способен да открива анотационни грешки с висока прецизност и висока припомняне.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een methode voor foutdetectie in automatisch geannoteerde tekst, gericht op het ondersteunen van het creëren van hoogwaardige taalbronnen tegen betaalbare kosten. Onze methode combineert een niet-begeleid generatief model met menselijke supervisie vanuit actief leren. We testen onze aanpak op in-domain en out-of-domain data in twee talen, in AL simulaties en in een real world setting. Voor alle instellingen tonen de resultaten aan dat onze methode annotatiefouten met hoge precisie en hoge terugroepactiviteit kan detecteren.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en metode til fejldetektering i automatisk annoteret tekst, der har til formål at understøtte oprettelsen af sprogressourcer af høj kvalitet til overkommelige omkostninger. Vores metode kombinerer en ikke-overvåget generativ model med menneskelig overvågning fra aktiv læring. Vi tester vores tilgang på data inden for og uden for domænet på to sprog, i AL-simuleringer og i en virkelig verden. For alle indstillinger viser resultaterne, at vores metode er i stand til at registrere annotationsfejl med høj præcision og høj tilbagekaldelse.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo metodu otkrivanja grešaka u automatski annotiranom tekstu, cilj podržavanja stvaranja visokokvalitetnih jezičkih resursa na dostupne troškove. Naš metod kombinira neodređeni generativni model sa ljudskim nadzorom iz aktivnog učenja. Testiramo naš pristup podacima u domenu i izvan domena na dva jezika, u AL simulaciji i u stvarnom svijetu. Za sve postavke, rezultati pokazuju da je naš metod sposoban otkriti greške annotacije sa visokom preciznošću i visokom sjećanju.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan metode untuk deteksi kesalahan dalam teks yang secara otomatis dicatat, yang bertujuan untuk mendukung penciptaan sumber daya bahasa kualitas tinggi dengan biaya yang dapat diterima. Metode kita menggabungkan model generasi yang tidak diawasi dengan pengawasan manusia dari belajar aktif. Kami menguji pendekatan kami pada data di domain dan luar domain dalam dua bahasa, dalam simulasi AL dan dalam setting dunia nyata. Untuk semua pengaturan, hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa metode kita dapat mendeteksi kesalahan anotasi dengan presisi tinggi dan ingatan tinggi.', 'de': 'Wir führen eine Methode zur Fehlererkennung in automatisch kommentierten Texten ein, die die Erstellung hochwertiger Sprachressourcen zu erschwinglichen Kosten unterstützt. Unsere Methode kombiniert ein unbeaufsichtigtes generatives Modell mit menschlicher Betreuung durch aktives Lernen. Wir testen unseren Ansatz an In-Domain- und Out-of-Domain-Daten in zwei Sprachen, in AL-Simulationen und in einem realen Umfeld. Für alle Einstellungen zeigen die Ergebnisse, dass unsere Methode in der Lage ist, Annotationsfehler mit hoher Präzision und hohem Abruf zu erkennen.', 'tr': 'Biz öz-özünde näbelli edilen metin içinde hata tapylmak üçin bir yöntem girdirýäris. Bu yöntemi beýleki kwalitet dilleriniň beýleki bahalaryny bejermek üçin gollanýar. Biziň ýüregimiz janlaşdyrmadyk döredijilik nusgasyny adamlaryň üstünden janlaşdyrylygyny bilen birleşýär. Biz öz metodumuzu domain ve out-of-domain verilerini iki dilde, AL simulasyonlarda ve gerçek dünya düzeninde test ediyoruz. Hemme düzümler üçin, netijelerimiz ýokary dogry we ýokary hatyrlamak bilen duýdurma hatalarymyzy tanap bilýändigini görkez.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu ya kutambua makosa katika ujumbe unaotarajiwa, kwa lengo la kuunga mkono uumbaji wa rasilimali za lugha za juu kwa gharama za thamani. Utawala wetu unaunganisha muundo wa kizazi usio na uhakika na ufuatiliaji wa binadamu kutoka kwa kujifunza haraka. Tunajaribu hatua yetu kuhusu taarifa za ndani na nje ya ndani kwa lugha mbili, kwa simulizi za AL na katika mazingira ya dunia halisi. Kwa mazingira yote, matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inaweza kugundua makosa ya uchunguzi kwa urahisi mkubwa na kukumbuka kwa kiwango kikubwa.', 'fa': 'ما روش شناسایی خطاها را در متن\u200cهای خودکار آگاهی شده معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که هدف می\u200cگیریم به پشتیبانی آفرینش منابع زبان\u200cهای زیادی با هزینه\u200cهای قابل دسترسی داشته باشد. روش ما یک مدل نسل غیر قابل توجه با نظارت انسان از یادگیری فعال ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما روش\u200cهایمان را در دو زبان آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، در شبیه\u200cسازی AL و در یک تنظیم جهانی واقعی. برای همه تنظیمات، نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما می\u200cتواند اشتباه\u200cهای آگاهی را با دقیق و یادآوری بالا تشخیص دهد.', 'sq': 'Ne futim një metodë për zbulimin e gabimeve në tekst të anotuar automatikisht, që synon të mbështesë krijimin e burimeve të cilësisë së lartë gjuhësh me kosto të pranueshme. Metoda jonë kombinon një model gjenerativ pa mbikqyrje me mbikqyrjen njerëzore nga mësimi aktiv. Ne testojmë qasjen tonë në të dhënat në domeni dhe jashtë domeni në dy gjuhë, në simulime AL dhe në një ambient të botës reale. Për të gjitha rregullimet, rezultatet tregojnë se metoda jonë është në gjendje të zbulojë gabimet e anotacionit me saktësi të lartë dhe kujtim të lartë.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n metode vir fout opdekking in outomaties opmerkteerde teks, bedoel om die skepping van hoë- kwaliteit taal hulpbronne te ondersteun op beskikbaar koste. Ons metode kombinieer 'n ononderwerpende genereerbare model met menslike supervisie van aktiewe leer. Ons probeer ons toegang op in-domein en uit-domein data in twee tale, in AL simulasies en in 'n regte wêreld instelling. Vir alle instellings, vertoon die resultate dat ons metode kan beskry annotasie foute met hoë presisie en hoë rekening.", 'am': 'የስህተት ማግኘት የስህተት ማግኘት ሥርዓት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ትምህርት ከቻለ ትምህርት ጋር የሰው ስልጣንን ማቀናቀል ያልጠበቀ አዳራዊ ምሳሌ ያጋራል፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋ፣ በAL ምሳሌ እና እውነተኛ ዓለማዊ አካባቢ ውስጥ እና ውጭ የሌለው ዳታዎችን እናፈትናለን፡፡ ሁሉም በማስተካከል ፍጻሜ ይታያል፤ የሥርዓታችን ስህተቶችን ከፍተኛ ቁጥርና ከፍተኛ ማስታወስ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սխալների հայտնաբերման մեթոդ ավտոմատ annoտորացված տեքստում, որի նպատակով է աջակցել բարձր որակի լեզվի ռեսուրսների ստեղծումը հասանելի գնով: Մեր մեթոդը համադրում է անվերահսկված սերունդային մոդել մարդկային վերահսկողության հետ ակտիվ սովորելուց: Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մոտեցումը տիեզերական և տիեզերական տվյալների վրա երկու լեզուներով, Ալ-սիմուլյացիաներում և իրական աշխարհում: Բոլոր համակարգերի համար արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը կարողանում է բարձր ճշգրտությամբ և հիշողությամբ հայտնաբերել annoտացիայի սխալները:', 'az': 'Biz öz-özünə bildirilmiş mətndə xəta keşfinin yolunu təşkil edirik. Bu, yüksək kaliteli dil kaynaqlarının yaratmasını mümkün qiymətlərə dəstəkləmək üçün. Bizim metodumuz fəaliyyətli öyrənməkdən insanların nəzarətindən istifadə edilməmiş nəticə modelini birləşdirir. İki dildə, AL simulasyonlarında və gerçek dünya qurğularında tərzimizi sınayırıq. Bütün ayarlar üçün, sonuçları göstərir ki, metodumuzun yüksək dəqiqliyyat və yüksək hatırlama ilə annotasyon xətalarını keçə bilər.', 'bn': 'আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিরক্তিকর টেক্সটে ভুল সনাক্ত করার একটি পদ্ধতি তুলে ধরি, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে উচ্চমান ভাষার সম্পদের সৃষ্টি করার জন আমাদের পদ্ধতি একটি অরক্ষিত জেনারেটিভ মডেলের সাথে সক্রিয় শিক্ষা থেকে মানুষের পর্যবেক্ষণের সাথে একত্রি আমরা ডোমেইন এবং ডোমেইনের বাইরে ডাটা দুই ভাষায়, এল সিমুলেশনে এবং সত্যিকারের বিশ্বের সেটে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পরীক্ষা করি। সকল বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি উচ্চপরিসূচক এবং উচ্চ স্মরণের মাধ্যমে বিরক্তিকর ভুল সনাক্ত করতে প', 'ko': '우리는 고품질 언어 자원의 창설을 합리적인 비용으로 지원하기 위해 자동 주석 텍스트에서 오류 검사를 하는 방법을 소개했다.우리의 방법은 무감독의 생성 모델과 인류가 자발적으로 학습하는 감독을 결합시켰다.우리는 두 가지 언어로 역내와 역외 데이터에서 우리의 방법을 테스트하여 시뮬레이션과 실제 환경에서 테스트한다.결과적으로 모든 설정에 대해 우리의 방법은 높은 정밀도와 높은 리콜율로 주석 오류를 검출할 수 있다.', 'cs': 'Představujeme metodu detekce chyb v automaticky anotovaném textu, zaměřenou na podporu tvorby kvalitních jazykových zdrojů za přijatelnou cenu. Naše metoda kombinuje bez dozoru generativní model s lidským dohledem z aktivního učení. Testujeme náš přístup na doménových a mimo doménových datech ve dvou jazycích, v simulacích AL a v reálném světě. U všech nastavení ukazují výsledky, že naše metoda dokáže detekovat chyby anotace s vysokou přesností a vysokou volbou.', 'ca': "Introduïm un mètode de detecció d'errors en text anotat automàticament, destinat a sostenir la creació de recursos lingüístics d'alta qualitat a un cost abordable. El nostre mètode combina un model generador sense supervisió amb la supervisió humana de l'aprenentatge actiu. We test our approach on in-domain and out-of-domain data in two languages, in AL simulations and in a real world setting.  Per a totes les opcions, els resultats mostren que el nostre mètode és capaç de detectar errors d'anotació amb alta precisió i alta recordació.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo metodu otkrivanja grešaka u automatski annotiranom tekstu, cilj podržavanja stvaranja visokokvalitetnih jezičkih resursa na dostupne troškove. Naša metoda kombinira neodređeni generativni model sa ljudskim nadzorom iz aktivnog učenja. Testiramo naš pristup podacima u domenu i izvan domena na dva jezika, u AL simulaciji i u stvarnom svijetu. Za sve postavke, rezultati pokazuju da je naš metod u mogućnosti otkriti pogreške annotacije sa visokom preciznošću i visokom sjećanju.', 'et': 'Tutvustame automaatselt annoteeritud tekstis veatuvastuse meetodit, mille eesmärk on toetada kvaliteetsete keeleressursside loomist taskukohase hinnaga. Meie meetod ühendab järelevalveta generatiivse mudeli inimese järelevalvega aktiivsest õppimisest. Testime oma lähenemisviisi domeenisisestele ja välistele andmetele kahes keeles, AL simulatsioonides ja reaalses maailmas. Kõigi seadete puhul näitavad tulemused, et meie meetod suudab tuvastada märgistusvigu suure täpsusega ja kõrge tagasikutsumisega.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme menetelmän virheiden havaitsemiseen automaattisesti merkityssä tekstissä, jonka tavoitteena on tukea korkealaatuisten kieliresurssien luomista kohtuuhintaan. Menetelmämme yhdistää valvomattoman generatiivisen mallin aktiivisesta oppimisesta saatavaan ihmisen ohjaukseen. Testaamme lähestymistapaamme toimialueen sisäiseen ja ulkopuoliseen dataan kahdella kielellä, AL-simulaatioissa ja reaalimaailmassa. Kaikkien asetusten osalta tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme pystyy havaitsemaan merkintävirheet erittäin tarkasti ja tarkasti.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים שיטה לגילוי שגיאות בטקסט מוכתב באוטומטית, המתכוונת לתמוך לייצור משאבי שפה איכות גבוהה במחיר שכיר. השיטה שלנו משלבת מודל דור לא משגיח עם פיקוח אנושי מלמדה פעילה. אנחנו בודקים את הגישה שלנו על נתונים מחוץ לתחום ובשתי שפות, בסימולציות אל.איי. ובסביבת עולם אמיתי. לכל ההגדרות, התוצאות מראות שהשיטה שלנו מסוגלת לגלות שגיאות הערות עם מדויקה גבוהה ובזיכרון גבוה.', 'ha': "Mu ƙara wata hanyo wa gano ɓat a cikin littãfin da aka yi zartar da shi farat ɗaya, don ya yi amfani da taimakon ya ƙiƙira rukunan lugha masu nau'in da za'a cika. Kayan hanyõyinmu na koma da wata misali wanda ba'a tsare shi ba da tsare wa mutane daga karatun ta fara. We test our approach on in-domain and out-of-domain data in two languages, in AL simulations and in a real world setting.  Ga duk kewayen, matsala za'a nuna cewa metoden mu na iya iya gano ɓata mai zartar da haske da tsawo da tsawo.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo metodo za odkrivanje napak v samodejno označenem besedilu, katere cilj je podpirati ustvarjanje visokokakovostnih jezikovnih virov po dostopnih cenah. Naša metoda združuje nenadzorovan generativni model s človeškim nadzorom iz aktivnega učenja. Naš pristop preizkušamo na domenskih in zunajdomenskih podatkih v dveh jezikih, v simulacijah AL in v realnem svetu. Rezultati pri vseh nastavitvah kažejo, da lahko naša metoda z visoko natančnostjo in visokim odpoklicem zazna napake pri pripombah.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah kelompok nggawe kelompok nggawe kelangan kelangan anyar tentang, iki dadi supoyo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelangan sing luwih apik tur angel. Awakdhéwé éntukno ngerasai model sing gak nggawe nguasai perbudhakan karo mulasai uwong. We test their method on in-domain and out-of-domain data in 2 language, in AL Simations and in a true world settings. If you do not have an option, you can use it here. Genjer-genjer saiki, dadi lho ngomong nik akeh iso diantekake perusahaan anyari dadi sing apik dadi apik lan bantuan sing apik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྟོགས་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ། དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྙ ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་མི་རྣམས་ལྡན་མེད་པའི་མིན་དཔེ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད། We test our approach on in-domain and out-of-domain data in two languages, in AL simulations and in a real world setting. སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནོ'}
{'en': 'Abstractive Document Summarization with a Graph-Based Attentional Neural Model', 'ar': 'تلخيص مستند تجريدي باستخدام نموذج عصبي متعمد قائم على الرسم البياني', 'pt': 'Resumo Abstrativo de Documentos com um Modelo Neural de Atenção Baseado em Gráficos', 'fr': "Synthèse de documents abstraits à l'aide d'un modèle neuronal attentionnel basé sur un graphique", 'es': 'Resumen abstractivo de documentos con un modelo neuronal atencional basado en gráficos', 'zh': '盖图形之注意神经象之抽文档摘要', 'ja': 'グラフベースの熱心なニューラルモデルを用いた抽象的な文書の要約', 'hi': 'एक ग्राफ-आधारित चौकस तंत्रिका मॉडल के साथ अमूर्त दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण', 'ru': 'Абстрактное обобщение документа с помощью графической нейронной модели', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Dhoiciméad Teibí le Múnla Néarach Aireach Bunaithe ar Ghraf', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Συνοπτική Περίληψη Έγγραφου με ένα Προσεκτικό Νευρικό Μοντέλο Βασισμένο σε Γράφημα', 'hu': 'Absztrakt dokumentum összefoglalása grafikon alapú figyelmi idegi modellel', 'it': 'Sintesi astratta del documento con un modello neurale attento basato su grafico', 'kk': 'Графика негіздеген нақты невралдық үлгісімен абстрактивті құжат тұжырымдамасы', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvi dokumento santrauka su grafiku pagrįstu dėmesio neurologiniu modeliu', 'mk': 'Апстрактивна резервација на документот со графички нервен модел на внимание', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡലുമായി അബ്സ്ട്രാക്ടിക്വേറ്റിവ് രേഖയുടെ ചുരു', 'ms': 'Comment', 'mt': 'Sommarju Abstrattiv tad-Dokument b’Mudell Newrali Attenzjali bbażat fuq Grafika', 'pl': 'Streszczenie dokumentu za pomocą modelu uważnego neuronu opartego na wykresie', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Rezumatul documentului abstract cu un model neutru atențional bazat pe grafic', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ්- අධාරිත සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරාල මෝඩල් එක්ක අවස්ථාවක් ලිපින්ත සංකේතනය', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka dokumenta sa pozornim neuralnim modelom na grafiku', 'so': 'Abstractive document summarization with a Graph-based Attention Model', 'ta': 'சுருக்கம்', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv dokumentsammanfattning med en grafbaserad uppmärksamhetsnerral modell', 'ur': 'گراف بنیادی اچھی نئورل موڈل کے ساتھ آب تراکٹیوں ڈوکیم جماریز', 'mn': 'Абстрактив баримт дээр график-сан сонирхолтой мэдрэлийн загвартай', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tóm tắt tài liệu với mô hình thần kinh theo dáng đồ họa', 'bg': 'Обобщение на абстрактивен документ с графичен модел на вниманието', 'da': 'Abstraktiv dokumentopsummering med en grafbaseret Attentional Neural Model', 'nl': 'Abstracte samenvatting van documenten met een grafiek-gebaseerd attentieneuraal model', 'hr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka dokumenta s uzornim neuronskim modelom na grafiku', 'id': 'Penapisan Dokumen Abstraktif dengan Model Neural Perhatian Berdasarkan Graf', 'fa': 'جمعیت سند abstractive با یک مدل عصبی متوجه بر اساس گراف', 'ko': '그림에 기초한 주의 신경 모형의 발췌문', 'de': 'Abstraktive Zusammenfassung des Dokuments mit einem graphenbasierten aufmerksamen neuronalen Modell', 'tr': 'Sened Ta첵첵arlama', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa nyaraka za Abstractive kwa kutumia Modeli ya Tamko yenye msingi wa Tafsiri', 'sq': 'Summarizimi abstraktiv i dokumentit me një model nervor të vëmendjes me bazë grafike', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Grafik-tabanlńĪ Attentional Neural Modeli il…ô Abstraktiv D…ôst…ô ToplaŇüdńĪrma', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ-ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল দিয়ে আবশ্যক নথির সামার্জার', 'ca': "Resumen abstractiu del documentamb un model neuronal d'atenció basat en gràfics", 'bs': 'Summarizacija abstraktivnog dokumenta sa pozornim neuronskim modelom na grafiku', 'cs': 'Abstraktní shrnutí dokumentů s grafovým pozornostním neuronovým modelem', 'et': 'Dokumendi kokkuvõte graafikapõhise tähelepanuväärse närvimudeliga', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmä dokumentin yhteenveto graafisella hermomallilla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Povzetek abstraktivnega dokumenta z grafičnim osnovnim zornim živčnim modelom', 'he': 'Abstractive Document Summarization with a Graph-Based Attentional Neural Model', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཡིག་གེ་མཛོད་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ', 'jv': 'Cumulate'}
{'en': 'Abstractive summarization is the ultimate goal of document summarization research, but previously it is less investigated due to the immaturity of text generation techniques. Recently impressive progress has been made to abstractive sentence summarization using neural models. Unfortunately, attempts on abstractive document summarization are still in a primitive stage, and the evaluation results are worse than extractive methods on benchmark datasets. In this paper, we review the difficulties of neural abstractive document summarization, and propose a novel graph-based attention mechanism in the sequence-to-sequence framework. The intuition is to address the saliency factor of summarization, which has been overlooked by prior works. Experimental results demonstrate our model is able to achieve considerable improvement over previous neural abstractive models. The data-driven neural abstractive method is also competitive with state-of-the-art extractive methods.', 'ar': 'التلخيص التجريدي هو الهدف النهائي لبحوث تلخيص المستندات ، ولكن في السابق لم يتم التحقيق فيه كثيرًا بسبب عدم نضج تقنيات إنشاء النص. تم إحراز تقدم مثير للإعجاب مؤخرًا في تلخيص الجملة التجريدي باستخدام النماذج العصبية. لسوء الحظ ، لا تزال محاولات تلخيص المستند التجريدي في مرحلة بدائية ، ونتائج التقييم أسوأ من الأساليب الاستخراجية في مجموعات البيانات المعيارية. في هذه الورقة ، نراجع صعوبات تلخيص المستند التجريدي العصبي ، ونقترح آلية اهتمام جديدة قائمة على الرسم البياني في إطار التسلسل إلى التسلسل. الحدس هو معالجة عامل البروز للتلخيص ، والذي تم تجاهله من خلال الأعمال السابقة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا قادر على تحقيق تحسن كبير مقارنة بالنماذج التجريدية العصبية السابقة. الطريقة التجريدية العصبية القائمة على البيانات هي أيضًا منافسة لأحدث الأساليب الاستخراجية.', 'es': 'La sumarización abstractiva es el objetivo final de la investigación de resumen de documentos, pero anteriormente se investigaba menos debido a la inmadurez de las técnicas de generación de textos. Recientemente se ha logrado un progreso impresionante en la sumarización abstractiva de oraciones utilizando modelos neuronales. Desafortunadamente, los intentos de resumir documentos abstractivos aún se encuentran en una etapa primitiva, y los resultados de la evaluación son peores que los métodos extractivos en los conjuntos de datos de referencia. En este artículo, revisamos las dificultades de la sumarización abstractiva de documentos neuronales y proponemos un novedoso mecanismo de atención basado en gráficos en el marco de secuencia a secuencia. La intuición consiste en abordar el factor prominente de la síntesis, que ha sido pasado por alto en trabajos anteriores. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo es capaz de lograr una mejora considerable con respecto a los modelos abstractivos neuronales anteriores. El método abstractivo neuronal basado en datos también compite con los métodos extractivos de última generación.', 'pt': 'A sumarização abstrativa é o objetivo final da pesquisa de sumarização de documentos, mas anteriormente é menos investigada devido à imaturidade das técnicas de geração de texto. Recentemente, um progresso impressionante foi feito na sumarização de sentenças abstratas usando modelos neurais. Infelizmente, as tentativas de sumarização de documentos abstrativos ainda estão em um estágio primitivo, e os resultados da avaliação são piores do que os métodos extrativos em conjuntos de dados de referência. Neste artigo, revisamos as dificuldades da sumarização de documentos abstrativos neurais e propomos um novo mecanismo de atenção baseado em grafos na estrutura de sequência a sequência. A intuição é abordar o fator de saliência da sumarização, que foi negligenciado por trabalhos anteriores. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo é capaz de alcançar melhorias consideráveis em relação aos modelos abstrativos neurais anteriores. O método abstrativo neural orientado a dados também é competitivo com métodos extrativos de última geração.', 'fr': "La synthèse abstraite est le but ultime de la recherche sur la synthèse de documents, mais auparavant, elle était moins étudiée en raison de l'immaturité des techniques de génération de texte. Récemment, des progrès impressionnants ont été réalisés en matière de synthèse de phrases abstraites à l'aide de modèles neuronaux. Malheureusement, les tentatives de synthèse de documents abstraits en sont encore à un stade primitif et les résultats de l'évaluation sont pires que les méthodes extractives sur des ensembles de données de référence. Dans cet article, nous passons en revue les difficultés de la synthèse de documents abstraits neuronaux et proposons un nouveau mécanisme d'attention basé sur des graphes dans le cadre séquence-séquence à séquence. L'intuition est d'aborder le facteur de prépondérance de la synthèse, qui a été négligé par les travaux antérieurs. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre modèle est capable d'obtenir des améliorations considérables par rapport aux modèles neuronaux abstraits précédents. La méthode d'abstraction neuronale pilotée par les données est également compétitive avec les méthodes d'extraction de pointe.", 'zh': '象摘要者,文档摘要之最终目标也,然文本成技之不成,前之少见也。 近者,用神经象句总结得深进。 不幸者,抽象文档摘要试犹处原始,评估比准数集上提取之法更差。 本文综述神经抽象文档总难点,立图序框架注意机制。 直觉者,总结之显著性,忽于前作也。 实验结果表明,比于前神经,吾道之大者也。 凡数驱神经抽象之法,亦与最先进之法竞。', 'ja': '抽象的な要約は、文書要約研究の最終的な目標であるが、テキスト生成技術の未熟さのため、以前はあまり調査されていなかった。最近では、ニューラルモデルを用いた抽象的な文のまとめが印象的に進んでいる。残念ながら、抽象的な文書要約の試みはまだ原始的な段階であり、評価結果はベンチマークデータセットの抽出方法よりも悪い。本稿では、ニューラル抽象化文書の要約の難しさを検討し、シーケンスツーシーケンスフレームワークにおける新規のグラフベースの注目メカニズムを提案する。直感は、これまでの研究で見落とされてきた要約の顕著性因子に対処することである。実験結果は、私たちのモデルが以前のニューラル抽象モデルよりもかなりの改善を達成することができることを示しています。データ駆動型ニューラル抽象化手法は、最先端の抽出手法とも競合する。', 'ru': 'Абстрактное обобщение является конечной целью исследования обобщения документа, но ранее оно менее изучалось из-за незрелости методов генерации текста. Недавно был достигнут впечатляющий прогресс в абстрактном обобщении предложений с использованием нейронных моделей. К сожалению, попытки абстрактного обобщения документов все еще находятся на примитивной стадии, а результаты оценки хуже, чем методы извлечения на базовых наборах данных. В данной работе мы рассмотрим трудности нейронного абстрактного обобщения документов и предложим новый механизм внимания на основе графа в рамках последовательности-последовательности. Интуиция заключается в том, чтобы рассмотреть фактор подведения итогов, который был упущен из виду предыдущими работами. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель способна достичь значительного улучшения по сравнению с предыдущими нейронными абстракционными моделями. Метод нейронной абстракции, основанный на данных, также конкурирует с современными методами извлечения.', 'hi': 'Abstractive summarization दस्तावेज़ summarization अनुसंधान का अंतिम लक्ष्य है, लेकिन पहले यह पाठ पीढ़ी तकनीकों की अपरिपक्वता के कारण कम जांच की है। हाल ही में प्रभावशाली प्रगति तंत्रिका मॉडल का उपयोग कर abstractive वाक्य summarization करने के लिए किया गया है। दुर्भाग्य से, अमूर्त दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण पर प्रयास अभी भी एक आदिम चरण में हैं, और मूल्यांकन परिणाम बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर निष्कर्षण विधियों से भी बदतर हैं। इस पेपर में, हम तंत्रिका अमूर्त दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण की कठिनाइयों की समीक्षा करते हैं, और अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ढांचे में एक उपन्यास ग्राफ-आधारित ध्यान तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। अंतर्ज्ञान सारांशीकरण के सैलिएंसी कारक को संबोधित करना है, जिसे पहले के कार्यों द्वारा अनदेखा किया गया है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल पिछले तंत्रिका अमूर्त मॉडल पर काफी सुधार प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है। डेटा-संचालित तंत्रिका अमूर्त विधि भी अत्याधुनिक निष्कर्षण विधियों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है।', 'ga': 'Is é an t-achoimriú teibí an sprioc deiridh le taighde achoimrithe doiciméad, ach roimhe seo ní dhéantar níos lú imscrúduithe air mar gheall ar neamhaibíocht teicnící giniúna téacs. Le déanaí tá dul chun cinn suntasach déanta ar achoimriú abairtí teibí ag baint úsáide as samhlacha néaracha. Ar an drochuair, tá iarrachtaí ar achoimriú doiciméad teibí fós ag céim primitive, agus tá na torthaí meastóireachta níos measa ná modhanna eastóscacha ar thacair sonraí tagarmhairc. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid athbhreithniú ar na deacrachtaí a bhaineann le hachoimriú doiciméad teibí néaraíoch, agus molaimid meicníocht aire nua bunaithe ar ghraif sa chreat seicheamh-go-seicheamh. Is éard atá i gceist leis an intuition aghaidh a thabhairt ar fhachtóir suntasacht an achoimrithe, rud a ndearnadh dearmad air ag oibreacha roimhe seo. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil ár samhail in ann feabhas suntasach a bhaint amach ar mhúnlaí néaracha teibí roimhe seo. Tá an modh neural aibitheach faoi thiomáint sonraí iomaíoch freisin le modhanna eastóscacha den scoth.', 'el': 'Η αφηρημένη σύνοψη είναι ο απώτερος στόχος της έρευνας συνοψίας εγγράφων, αλλά προηγουμένως διερευνάται λιγότερο λόγω της ανώριμης τεχνικής δημιουργίας κειμένου. Πρόσφατα έχει σημειωθεί εντυπωσιακή πρόοδος στην αφηρημένη σύνοψη προτάσεων χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Δυστυχώς, οι προσπάθειες για αφηρημένη σύνοψη εγγράφων εξακολουθούν να βρίσκονται σε πρωτόγονο στάδιο και τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης είναι χειρότερα από τις εξαγωγικές μεθόδους σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τις δυσκολίες της νευρωνικής αφηρημένης συνοψίας εγγράφων, και προτείνουμε έναν νέο μηχανισμό προσοχής βασισμένο σε γραφήματα στο πλαίσιο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας. Η διαίσθηση είναι να αντιμετωπιστεί ο παράγοντας σπουδαιότητας της συνοψίας, ο οποίος έχει παραβλεφθεί από προηγούμενα έργα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει σημαντική βελτίωση σε σχέση με προηγούμενα νευρικά αφηρημένα μοντέλα. Η βασισμένη σε δεδομένα νευρολογική αφαιρετική μέθοδος είναι επίσης ανταγωνιστική με τις προηγμένες εξαγωγικές μεθόδους.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív összefoglalás a dokumentumösszefoglaló kutatás végső célja, de korábban kevésbé vizsgálták a szöveggenerációs technikák éretlensége miatt. A közelmúltban lenyűgöző előrelépés történt az absztraktív mondatok összefoglalásában neurális modellek segítségével. Sajnos az absztraktív dokumentumok összefoglalására irányuló kísérletek még mindig primitív szakaszban vannak, és az értékelési eredmények rosszabbak, mint a benchmark adatkészletek extraktív módszerei. Ebben a tanulmányban áttekintjük a neurális absztraktív dokumentum összefoglalásának nehézségeit, és javaslatot teszünk egy új gráf alapú figyelemmechanizmusra a szekvencia-szekvencia keretrendszerben. Az intuíció az összefoglalás kiemelkedő tényezőjével foglalkozik, amelyet korábbi munkák figyelmen kívül hagytak. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentős javulást ér el a korábbi neurális absztraktív modellekhez képest. Az adatvezérelt neurális absztraktív módszer a legmodernebb extraktív módszerekkel is versenyképes.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლობა არის კოკუმენტის სიმბოლოების საკუთარი მიზეზი, მაგრამ წინ იგი აკეთებულია ტექსტის შემყვარების ტექნოგიების არაფერი. აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოების შესახებ ნეიროლური მოდელების გამოყენებაში აღმოქმედებული პროგრესი მოქმედება. მართლად, აბსტრაქტიური დოკუმენტის სისუბუზაციის მოცდილობები პრიმიტიური ფაეზში არიან, და შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბა ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ შევხედავთ ნეიროლური აბსტრაქტიგური დოკუმენტის სიმბოლოების შესახებ და პრომენტური გრაფიკური აღმოჩენების მექანსიმის შესახებ. ინტევიცია არის საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი ფაქტორის გადაწყენება, რომელიც წინ მუშაობით გადაწყენებულია. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელია წინა ნეიროლური აბსტრაქტიური მოდელის შესაძლებლობად გააკეთება. მონაცემების ნეიროლური აბსტრაქტიგური მეტი კონპექტიგურია კონპექტრექტიგური მეტისთან.', 'it': "La sintesi astratta è l'obiettivo finale della ricerca di sintesi dei documenti, ma in precedenza è meno indagata a causa dell'immaturità delle tecniche di generazione del testo. Recentemente sono stati fatti notevoli progressi nella sintesi astratta delle frasi utilizzando modelli neurali. Purtroppo, i tentativi di sintesi astratta dei documenti sono ancora in una fase primitiva e i risultati della valutazione sono peggiori dei metodi estrattivi sui set di dati di benchmark. In questo articolo, esaminiamo le difficoltà della sintesi neurale astratta dei documenti, e proponiamo un nuovo meccanismo di attenzione basato su grafici nel framework sequenza-sequenza. L'intuizione è quella di affrontare il fattore saliente della sintesi, che è stato trascurato dalle opere precedenti. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello è in grado di ottenere un notevole miglioramento rispetto ai precedenti modelli neurali astratti. Il metodo astratto neurale basato sui dati è anche competitivo con metodi estrattivi all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы - құжатты тұжырымдамасын зерттеудің ең соңғы мақсаты, бірақ бұрынғы мәтін құру техникаларының тұжырымдамасыздығының себебі бұл зертте Невралдық үлгілерді қолдану үшін абстрактивті сөйлемелерді жаңарту үшін жақсы жұмыс істеді. Кешіріңіз, абстрактивті құжаттарды тұжырымдастыру әрекеттері әлі приниматты сәтте тұрады, және оқу нәтижелері бағыттау деректер жиындарындағы шығыс әдістерден артық. Бұл қағазда, біз невралдық абстрактивті құжаттардың тәжірибесін тексеріп, жаңа графикалық негіздеген қызықтық механизмін реттеу-реттеу фреймінде ұсынамыз. Интуиция - алдыңғы жұмыс істеген тұлғастыру факторына көшірмелеу. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің үлгімізді алдыңғы невралдық абстрактивтік үлгілерде көп жақсарту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Деректерді көмектесетін невралдық абстрактивті әдіс сондай-ақ әдістер күйінде әсер етеді.', 'mk': 'Апстрактивната резултатирање е крајната цел на истражувањето за резултатирање на документите, но претходно е помалку истражена поради незрелоста на техниките за генерација на текст. Неодамна е постигнат импресивен напредок во апстрактивната реченица резултат со користење на неврални модели. За жал, обидите за апстрактивна резултатација на документите се сé уште во примитивна фаза, а резултатите на проценката се полоши од екстрактивните методи на наборот на податоци за benchmark. In this paper, we review the difficulties of neural abstractive document summarization, and propose a novel graph-based attention mechanism in the sequence-to-sequence framework.  Интуицијата е да се обраќа на факторот на ослободување на резултатот, кој е пропуштен од претходните дела. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел е способен да постигне значително подобрување во однос на претходните невропски апстрактивни модели. Неуралниот апстрактивен метод од податоци е, исто така, конкурентен со најсовремените екстрактивни методи.', 'ms': 'Penapisan abstraktif adalah tujuan utama penelitian pengapisan dokumen, tetapi sebelumnya ia kurang diseliti kerana ketidakdewasa teknik generasi teks. Kemajuan yang menakjubkan baru-baru ini telah dilakukan untuk ringkasan kalimat abstraktif menggunakan model saraf. Malangnya, percubaan untuk ringkasan dokumen abstraktif masih dalam tahap primitif, dan hasil penilaian lebih teruk daripada kaedah ekstraktif pada set data benchmark. Dalam kertas ini, kita meninjau kesulitan penghuraian dokumen abstraktif saraf, dan mencadangkan mekanisme perhatian berbasis graf baru dalam rangkaian urutan-ke-urutan. Intuisi adalah untuk mengatasi faktor salinsi pengringkasan, yang telah diabaikan oleh kerja-kerja terdahulu. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan model kita mampu mencapai peningkatan yang besar daripada model abstraktif saraf sebelumnya. Kaedah abstraktif saraf yang dipimpin oleh data juga bersaing dengan kaedah ekstraksi terbaik.', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvi santrauka yra galutinis dokumentų santraukų mokslinių tyrimų tikslas, tačiau anksčiau ji mažiau tiriama dėl tekstų kūrimo metodų nesubrendymo. Recently impressive progress has been made to abstractive sentence summarization using neural models.  Deja, bandymai pateikti abstraktišką dokumentų santrauką vis dar yra pirminiame etape, o vertinimo rezultatai yra blogesni nei lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių gavybos metodai. Šiame dokumente mes peržiūrime nervų abstrakcinio dokumento santraukos sunkumus ir siūlome naują dėmesio mechanizmą, pagrįstą grafiku, kiekvienos sekos sistemoje. Įsivaizduojama spręsti santraukos druskos koeficientą, kurį praleido ankstesni darbai. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų model is gali gerokai pagerinti ankstesnius neuroabstrakcinius modelius. Duomenų pagrindu pagrįstas neurologinis abstrakcinis metodas taip pat yra konkurencingas naujausiais gavybos metodais.', 'ml': 'അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം രേഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ അവസാനത്തെ ലക്ഷ്യമാണ്. പക്ഷെ മുമ്പ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമു ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ സംസാരിപ്പിനായി അടുത്തുതന്നെ ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, നിര്\u200dജ്ജീവമായ രേഖയുടെ സംസ്കാരത്തില്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന ശ്രമം ഇപ്പോഴും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റേജിലാണ്. അതിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d അബ്ട്രാക്രാവേറ്റിവ് രേഖയുടെ കുറിപ്പിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ നോവല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് അടിസ ഇതിനുമുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് മാറ്റിവെച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സാധനങ്ങളുടെ കാര്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് മാറ്റുന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന് മുമ്പുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d അസ്ട്രാവേറ്റിവ് മോഡലുകളില്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴി ഡേറ്റാ നടത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതിയിലും മത്സരിക്കുന്നു. ആർട്ടിന്റെ സ്ഥിതി', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju abstrattiv huwa l-għan aħħari tar-riċerka dwar is-sommarju tad-dokumenti, iżda qabel huwa inqas investigat minħabba l-immaturità tat-tekniki tal-ġenerazzjoni tat-test. Recently impressive progress has been made to abstractive sentence summarization using neural models.  Sfortunatament, it-tentattivi dwar is-sommarju tad-dokumenti astrattivi għadhom fi stadju primitiv, u r-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni huma agħar minn metodi estrattivi dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nirrevedu d-diffikultajiet tas-sommarju tad-dokument astrattiv newrali, u nipproponu mekkaniżmu ġdid ta’ attenzjoni bbażat fuq grafika fil-qafas ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza. L-intwizzjoni hija li jiġi indirizzat il-fattur tas-salinċja tas-sommarju, li ġie injorat minn xogħlijiet preċedenti. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi jikseb titjib konsiderevoli fuq mudelli astrattivi newrali preċedenti. The data-driven neural abstractive method is also competitive with state-of-the-art extractive methods.', 'mn': 'Абстрактив тодорхойлолт бол баримтын тодорхойлолтын судалгааны хамгийн төгсгөл зорилго, гэхдээ өмнө нь текст үеийн техникуудын амьдралын шалтгаанаас бага шалгалт өгсөн. Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн загварыг ашиглан хэлбэрүүдийг хадгалахын тулд гайхалтай дасгал хөгжлийг хийгдсэн. Харамсалтай нь, абстрактив баримтуудын жинхэнэ хэвлэлийн хичээл нь одоо ч анхны шатанд байдаг. Үүний үндсэн үзүүлэлт нь банкварын өгөгдлийн санд нэмэгдүүлэх арга замыг илүү муу. Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэлийн abstractive баримтын хэцүү асуудлыг судалж, дарааллаас дарааллаар анхаарлын механизм шинэ график дээр суурилсан. Өмнөх үйл ажиллагаар давхарсан цэвэрлэлтийн хэмжээсүүдийг давхарлах гэсэн бодол юм. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өмнөх мэдрэлийн abstractive загваруудын хувьд их сайжруулах боломжтой байдаг. Дасгал өгөгдлийн дамжуулагдсан мэдрэлийн abstractive арга нь мөн урлагийн дамжуулагч арга замаар өрсөлдөг.', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne podsumowanie jest ostatecznym celem badań nad podsumowaniem dokumentów, ale wcześniej jest ona mniej badana ze względu na niedojrzałość technik generowania tekstu. Ostatnio poczyniono imponujące postępy w abstrakcyjnym podsumowaniu zdań za pomocą modeli neuronowych. Niestety, próby abstrakcyjnego podsumowania dokumentów są nadal w fazie prymitywnym, a wyniki oceny są gorsze niż metody ekstrakcyjne na zbiorach danych referencyjnych. W niniejszym artykule przeglądamy trudności związane z abstrakcyjnym streszczeniem dokumentów neuronowych oraz proponujemy nowy mechanizm uwagi oparty na wykresie w ramach sekwencji-sekwencji. Intuicja polega na odniesieniu się do ważności czynnika podsumowania, który został pominięty przez wcześniejsze prace. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model jest w stanie osiągnąć znaczną poprawę w stosunku do poprzednich modeli abstrakcyjnych neuronów. Metoda abstrakcyjna neuronowa oparta na danych jest również konkurencyjna z najnowocześniejszymi metodami ekstrakcyjnymi.', 'no': 'Abstraktiv samandrasjon er det ultime målet for samandrasjon av dokumentet, men tidlegare er det mindre undersøkt på grunn av nedrådigheten av teknikka for tekstgenerering. Nyleg er uttrykkelig framgang til abstraktiv setningsammendrag ved hjelp av neiralmodeller. Dessverre er forsøk på abstraktiv dokumentsamansering fortsatt i ein primitiv stad, og evalueringsresultatet er verre enn ekstraktiv metodar på benchmarkdatasett. I denne papiret gjennomgår vi vanskelighetane for sammendraging av neiralabstraktive dokument, og foreslår ein nytt grafikkbasert oppmerksmekanisme i framlegget for sekvens-til-sekvens. Intuisjonen er å adressera saliensfaktoren for sammendrag, som er oversikt av førre arbeid. Eksperimentale resultat viser modellen vårt kan oppnå mykje forbedringar over tidlegare neuralabstraktive modeller. Data-driven neuralabstraktive metoden er også konkursant med tilstanden av kunsten ekstraktiv metodar.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul abstract este scopul final al cercetării de rezumare a documentelor, dar anterior este mai puțin investigat datorită imaturității tehnicilor de generare a textului. Recent s-au făcut progrese impresionante în rezumarea abstractivă a propozițiilor folosind modele neurale. Din păcate, încercările de rezumare abstractivă a documentelor sunt încă într-o etapă primitivă, iar rezultatele evaluării sunt mai rele decât metodele extractive pe seturile de date de referință. În această lucrare, analizăm dificultățile rezumatului documentelor abstractive neurale și propunem un nou mecanism de atenție bazat pe grafice în cadrul secvență-la-secvență. Intuiția este de a aborda factorul salient al rezumatului, care a fost trecut cu vederea de lucrările anterioare. Rezultatele experimentale demonstreaza ca modelul nostru este capabil sa obtina imbunatatiri considerabile fata de modelele neurale abstractive anterioare. Metoda abstractivă neurală bazată pe date este, de asemenea, competitivă cu metodele extractive de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka je konačni cilj istraživanja sažetanja dokumenta, ali prethodno je manje istražena zbog nezadovoljstva tehnika generacije teksta. Nedavno je napravljen impresivni napredak za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice koristeći neuralne modele. Nažalost, pokušaji za sažetak abstraktivnog dokumenta su još uvijek u primitivnoj fazi, a rezultati procjene su gore od ekstraktivnih metoda na setama podataka o kriteriji. U ovom papiru pregledamo poteškoće sažetke neuralne abstraktivne dokumente i predlažemo novi mehanizam pažnje na grafiku u okviru sekvence do sekvence. intuicija je da se obratimo faktoru salijencije sažetanja, koji je pretjerao prethodni rad. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može ostvariti značajno poboljšanje u prethodnim nervnim abstraktivnim modelima. Neuralna abstraktivna metoda podataka takođe je konkurentna sa state-of-the-art ekstraktivnim metodama.', 'si': 'අවශ්\u200dය සංවේදනය තමයි ලිපිනය සංවේදනයේ අන්තිම අරමුණ අරක්ෂාව, ඒත් කලින් ඒක පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පාළි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරභාවිත ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරභාවිත වාක්ය ප්\u200dරභාවිත වාක්ය ප්\u200dරභාවිත ව අවාසනාවෙන්න, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තාමත් ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම විස්තර පද්ධතිය බ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒක කලින් වැඩ වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් පසුගිය න්\u200dයුරා දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු න්\u200dයූරල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta jimicsigu waa goalka ugu dambeeya baaritaanka qoraalka ee summarinta, laakiin horay looga baaraandegay tusaale ahaan teknikada farshaxanka. Dhab u soo dhowaaday horumar wanaagsan waxaa loo sameeyey si loo soo qoro qoraalka nidaamka ah oo lagu isticmaalo modelalka neurada. Nasiib walbahaan waxaa jirta jarrabka ku saabsan dhamaadka dukumentiyada oo aan waxtar lahayn weli waxay ku jirtaa marxalad hore, resultinta qiimeyntuna way ka sii xumaatay habab la soo saaro oo ku qoran taariikhda benchmark. Warqaddan, waxaynu ka fiirinnaa dhibaatada ku saabsan qoraalka neurada ah oo ka tirsan kara, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa meymisyo warqad ah oo ku qoran qoraalka sawir-ka-sawir. Qoraalka waxaa loola jeedaa xaaladaha qiimaha, kaas oo horay loo eegay shaqaalaha. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqan kara modellkayaga inuu helo beddelmo aad u fiican sameynta sameynta neurada ee hore. The data-driven neural abstractive method is also competitive with state-of-the-art extractive methods.', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv sammanfattning är det yttersta målet för dokumentsammanfattningsforskningen, men tidigare är den mindre undersökt på grund av omogna textgenereringstekniker. Nyligen har imponerande framsteg gjorts för abstraktiv meningssammanfattning med hjälp av neurala modeller. Tyvärr är försök till abstraktiv dokumentsammanfattning fortfarande i ett primitivt skede, och utvärderingsresultaten är sämre än extraktionsmetoder på benchmarkdatauppsättningar. I denna uppsats går vi igenom svårigheterna med neural abstraktiv dokumentsammanfattning, och föreslår en ny grafbaserad uppmärksamhetsmekanism i sekvens-till-sekvens ramverket. Intuitionen är att ta itu med sammanfattningens framträdande faktor, som har förbisetts av tidigare verk. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell kan uppnå betydande förbättringar jämfört med tidigare neurala abstraktiva modeller. Den datadrivna neurala abstraktiva metoden är också konkurrenskraftig med toppmoderna extraktiva metoder.', 'ta': 'குறுக்கீட்டு சுருக்கம் ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்க ஆராய்ச்சியின் இறுதியாகும், ஆனால் முன்பு அது உரை உரை உருவாக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பமா சமீபத்தில் புதிய மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி வாக்கிய சுருக்கம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. துரதிருஷ்டவசமாக, செயல்படாத ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம் முயற்சி இன்னும் முதல் நிலையில் இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் முடிவு முடிவுகள் பென்மார்க் தரவுத் In this paper, we review the difficulties of neural abstractive document summarization, and propose a novel graph-based attention mechanism in the sequence-to-sequence framework.  முன்னால் செயல்களால் புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள விற்பனைக் காரணியை முடியும் என்பது தெரியும். பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் எங்கள் மாதிரியை காட்டுகிறது முந்தைய புதிய புதிய செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரிகளை மேலும் முன்னோ தரவு இயக்கப்பட்ட புதிய செயல்பாடு முறைமை', 'ur': 'آب تراکٹیوں کی آب تراکٹیوں کا آخر موقع ہے سند تراکٹیوں کی تحقیقات، لیکن پہلے یہ ٹکسٹ نسل تکنیک کی ناپاکیزگی کے باعث کم تحقیق کی جاتی ہے. اچھے سے اچھے سے اثر دینے والی پیشرفت کی گئی ہے کہ نئورل موڈل کے مطابق اثر دینے والی جماعت کا ذکر کرنا ہے. بدبختی کے ساتھ، آب تراکٹیوں ڈیسمنٹ جمع کرنے کی کوشش ابھی ایک پہلی مرحلہ میں ہے، اور ارزیابی نتیجے بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر اخلاق طریقے سے بدتر ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے نئورل غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر نظریہ یہ ہے کہ اسلام کے ذریعہ سے آسانی کا فاکتور تلاش کریں، جسے پہلے کے کاموں کے ذریعہ دور کر دیا گیا ہے. Experimental results demonstrate our model can achieve considerable improvement over previous neural abstractive models. ڈیٹا چلنے والی نیورال آب تراکٹی طریقہ بھی ایسی طریقے سے مسابقه ہے', 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt tích cực là mục tiêu cuối cùng của việc nghiên cứu tổng hợp tài liệu, nhưng trước đây nó đã ít bị điều tra do sự thiếu kỹ thuật tạo ra văn bản. Gần đây đã có tiến triển ấn tượng với việc tổng kết đoạn từ bằng các mô hình thần kinh. Thật không may, việc tổng hợp tài liệu trừu tượng vẫn đang ở giai đoạn nguyên sơ, và kết quả đánh giá còn tệ hơn cách khai thác các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xem xét các khó khăn của việc tổng hợp tài liệu trừu tượng thần kinh, và đề xuất một cơ chế chú ý dựa vào đồ thị mới trong cấu trúc dãy-tới-dãy. Trực giác là phải giải quyết vấn đề nổi bật của sự mô phỏng, mà đã bị bỏ qua bởi những tác phẩm trước đây. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có khả năng đạt được tiến bộ đáng kể hơn các mô hình trừu tượng trước. Phương pháp trừu tượng dựa trên dữ liệu cũng cạnh tranh với các phương pháp khai thác nghệ thuật.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda tasavvur qilingan muvaffaqiyatlar neural modellari yordamida to'xtatish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi. Afsuski, obʼektlar hujjatni ajratishda harakat qilishda harakat qilingan odamlarning birinchi darajada mavjud. Qiymati natijalari benchmark maʼlumot bazasidan ajratish usullaridan yomon. Bu hujjatda, biz neyrol abstraktiv hujjatning qismlarini ko'rib chiqishimiz muammolarini ko'rib chiqaramiz va davom etish uchun novel grafik asosida foydalanuvchi mechanisiyasini davom etishingiz mumkin. Bu muhimlik esa, birinchi ishlab chiqarishdan oldin tashkilotni ajratish muvaffaqiyatlariga qarang. Tekshirish natijalari modelimizning oldingi neyrol abstraktiv modellariga juda katta yaxshi yaxshi ko'ra oladi. Name", 'bg': 'Абстрактивното обобщаване е крайната цел на изследванията за обобщаване на документи, но преди това е по-малко изследвано поради незрялостта на техниките за генериране на текст. Напоследък е постигнат впечатляващ напредък в абстрактното обобщаване на изреченията с помощта на невронни модели. За съжаление опитите за абстрактно обобщаване на документите са все още в примитивен етап, а резултатите от оценката са по-лоши от екстрактивните методи на сравнителни набори от данни. В настоящата статия разглеждаме трудностите при обобщаването на невронните абстрактни документи и предлагаме нов графичен механизъм за внимание в рамката последователност към последователност. Интуицията е да се обърне внимание на фактора на очевидността на обобщаването, който е бил пренебрегнат от предишни творби. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел е в състояние да постигне значително подобрение спрямо предишните невронни абстрактни модели. Воденият от данни неврален абстрактен метод също е конкурентен с най-съвременните екстрактивни методи.', 'nl': 'Abstractieve samenvatting is het uiteindelijke doel van documentsamenvattingsonderzoek, maar eerder is het minder onderzocht vanwege de onvolwassenheid van tekstgenereringstechnieken. Recent is indrukwekkende vooruitgang geboekt op het gebied van abstractieve zinssamenvatting met behulp van neurale modellen. Helaas bevinden pogingen tot abstracte samenvatting van documenten zich nog in een primitief stadium, en de evaluatieresultaten zijn slechter dan extractieve methoden op benchmarkdatasets. In dit artikel bespreken we de moeilijkheden van neuronale abstractieve documentsamenvatting en stellen we een nieuw grafiekgebaseerd aandachtsmechanisme voor in het sequentie-to-sequence framework. De intuïtie is om de opvallende factor van samenvatting aan te pakken, die door eerdere werken over het hoofd is gezien. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijke verbeteringen kan bereiken ten opzichte van eerdere neurale abstractieve modellen. De data-gedreven neurale abstractieve methode is ook concurrerend met state-of-the-art extractieve methoden.', 'da': 'Abstraktiv opsummering er det endelige mål for dokumentopsummering forskning, men tidligere er den mindre undersøgt på grund af umodnheden af tekstgenereringsteknikker. For nylig er der gjort imponerende fremskridt med abstraktiv sætningsopsummering ved hjælp af neurale modeller. Desværre er forsøgene på abstraktiv dokumentopsummering stadig i et primitivt stadie, og evalueringsresultaterne er værre end ekstraktionsmetoder på benchmarkdatasæt. I denne artikel gennemgår vi vanskelighederne ved neural abstraktiv dokumentopsummering, og foreslår en ny grafbaseret opmærksomhedsmekanisme i sekvens-til-sekvens rammerne. Intuitionen er at behandle opsummeringsfaktoren, som tidligere værker har overset. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model er i stand til at opnå betydelige forbedringer i forhold til tidligere neurale abstraktive modeller. Den datadrevne neurale abstraktive metode er også konkurrencedygtig med state-of-the-art ekstraktive metoder.', 'de': 'Abstraktive Zusammenfassung ist das ultimative Ziel der Dokumentenverfassungsforschung, wird aber bisher aufgrund der Unreife von Texterstellungstechniken weniger untersucht. In letzter Zeit wurden beeindruckende Fortschritte bei der abstraktiven Satzsummierung mittels neuronaler Modelle erzielt. Leider befinden sich Versuche zur abstraktiven Zusammenfassung von Dokumenten noch in einem primitiven Stadium, und die Auswertungsergebnisse sind schlechter als extraktive Methoden auf Benchmark-Datensätzen. In diesem Beitrag beleuchten wir die Schwierigkeiten der neuronalen abstraktiven Zusammenfassung von Dokumenten und schlagen einen neuartigen graphenbasierten Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus im Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Framework vor. Die Intuition besteht darin, den von früheren Arbeiten übersehenen Signifikanzfaktor der Zusammenfassung anzusprechen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell in der Lage ist, erhebliche Verbesserungen gegenüber früheren neuronalen abstraktiven Modellen zu erzielen. Die datengetriebene neuronale abstraktive Methode ist auch mit modernsten extraktiven Methoden konkurrierend.', 'hr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka je konačni cilj istraživanja sažetanja dokumenta, ali prethodno se manje istražuje zbog nezadovoljstva tehnika proizvodnje teksta. Nedavno je napredovao impresivni napredak za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice koristeći nervne modele. Nažalost, pokušaji za sažetak abstraktivnog dokumenta još uvijek su u primitivnoj fazi, a rezultati procjene su gore od ekstraktivnih metoda na bazama podataka. U ovom papiru pregledamo poteškoće sažetka neuralnog abstraktivnog dokumenta i predlažemo novi mehanizam pažnje na grafiku u okviru sekvencije do sekvencije. intuicija je riješiti faktor salijencije sažetka, koji je pretjerao prethodni rad. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model u mogućnosti ostvariti značajno poboljšanje u prethodnim nervnim abstraktivnim modelima. Neuralna abstraktivna metoda podataka također je konkurentna s state-of-the-art ekstraktivnim metodama.', 'id': 'Persingkatan abstraktif adalah tujuan utama dari penelitian persingkatan dokumen, tapi sebelumnya lebih kurang diteliti karena ketidakdewasa dari teknik generasi teks. Recently impressive progress has been made to abstractive sentence summarization using neural models.  Sayangnya, percobaan untuk resumsi dokumen abstraktif masih dalam tahap primitif, dan hasil evaluasi lebih buruk dari metode ekstraktif pada set data benchmark. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperlihatkan kesulitan dari persembahan dokumen abstraktif saraf, dan mengusulkan mekanisme perhatian berbasis grafik baru dalam rangka urutan ke urutan. Intuisi adalah untuk mengatasi faktor salinsi dari ringkasan, yang telah diabaikan oleh pekerjaan sebelumnya. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan model kita mampu mencapai peningkatan yang konsiderel atas model abstraktif saraf sebelumnya. Metode abstraktif saraf yang didorong data juga kompetitif dengan metode ekstraksi terbaik.', 'fa': 'تعداد ابزاری هدف نهایی تحقیقات جمع کردن سند است، ولی قبلاً به دلیل ناگواری تکنیک\u200cهای نسل متن تحقیقات کمتر می\u200cشود. اخیراً پیشرفت تحت تاثیر قرار گرفته شده است تا با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای عصبی تعداد جمله\u200cهای abstractive انجام شود. متأسفانه، تلاش به جمع کردن سند abstractive هنوز در یک مرحله اولیه هستند، و نتایج ارزیابی از روش\u200cهای استخراج در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنجیره بدتر است. در این کاغذ، ما مشکلات جمع کردن سند عصبی را تحقیق می کنیم، و یک مکانیسم توجه بر اساس گراف تازه را در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار نظر این است که با کارهای قبل از آن به عنوان تعداد تغییر داده شده است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما می\u200cتواند در مورد مدل\u200cهای اثبات عصبی قبل بهترین رسیده باشد. روش اثبات عصبی با داده ها همچنین با روش های اثبات هنری رقابت کننده است.', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw toplamak - sened toplamak araştyrmasynyň iň soňky maksady, ýöne öňki metin döretmek teknikleriniň ýagdaýlygyna sebäpli az maslahat edildi. Son zamanlarda näyral nusgalary ulanyp çykarmak üçin täsirli ilerlemek başarmady. Gynansakda, abstraktiw sened toplamagyna synanyşýar hala primitive sahypada bolýar we çykyş netijesi benchmark veri setirlerinde ekstra metodlardan has gowydyr. Bu kagyzda, biz näyral abstraktiv desktaplaryň gysgynlaryny barlaýarys we daşary-terjime çerçevesinde novel tabanly üns mekanizmasyny teklip edip görýäris. Syýasy, öňki işleri tarapyndan gözden geçirilen süýtgelik faktörüni çözmelidir. Testiýat netijelerimiz nusgasymyzyň öňki neural abstraktiw nusgalarynda möhüm gelişmeleri başaryp biljekdigini görkezýär. Berüvler tarapyndan neural abstraktiw yöntemi hem sanat çekişim yöntemleri bilen döwletlidir.', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi abstraktiv është qëllimi përfundimtar i kërkimit të përmbledhjes së dokumenteve, por më parë është më pak hetuar për shkak të papriturisë së teknikave të gjenerimit të tekstit. Kohët e fundit është bërë përparim mbresëlënës në përmbledhjen abstrakte të fjalëve duke përdorur modele neuronale. Fatkeqësisht, përpjekjet për përmbledhjen abstraktive të dokumenteve janë ende në një fazë primitive dhe rezultatet e vlerësimit janë më të këqija se metodat e nxjerrjes në bazat e të dhënave. Në këtë letër, ne shqyrtojmë vështirësitë e përmbledhjes së dokumenteve abstraktive nervore dhe propozojmë një mekanizëm të ri vëmendjeje të bazuar në grafik në kuadrin sekuencë-në-sekuencë. Intuicioni është të trajtojmë faktorin e rëndësishëm të përmbledhjes, i cili është harruar nga veprat e mëparshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë është në gjendje të arrijë përmirësim të konsiderueshëm mbi modelet e mëparshëm abstraktive neuronale. Metoda abstraktive nervore e bazuar në të dhëna është gjithashtu konkurruese me metodat ekstraktive më të larta.', 'af': "Abstraktiewe opsomming is die uiteindelike doel van dokumentopsomming ondersoek, maar voorheen is dit minder ondersoek vanweë die onversadigheid van teks generasie teknike. Onlangs inpresief vordering is gemaak om abstraktiewe setopsomming te gebruik neurale modele. Ongelukkig is probeers op abstraktiewe dokument opsomming nog steeds in 'n primitiewe stadium, en die evalueringsresultate is verder as ekstraktiewe metodes op benchmark datastelle. In hierdie papier, ons hersien die moeilikhedes van neurale abstraktiewe dokument opsomming, en voorstel 'n nuwe graafgebaseerde aandag mekanisme in die sekvens-na-sekvens raamwerk. Die intuisie is om die saliensfaktor van opsomming te adres, wat deur voorheen werke oorskou is. Eksperimentale resultate wys ons model in staat om betekende verbetering te bereik oor vorige neurale abstraktiewe modele. Die data-gedrywe neurale abstraktiewe metode is ook medelykbaar met staat-van-kuns ekstraktiewe metodes.", 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa kutolewa ni lengo la mwisho la utafiti wa muhtasari wa nyaraka, lakini kabla ya hapo haujachunguliwa kidogo kutokana na ukosefu wa teknolojia za vizazi vya maandishi. Maendeleo ya kushangaza hivi karibuni yametengenezwa kwa ajili ya kutoa muhtasari wa hukumu hiyo kwa kutumia mifano ya taratibu. Kwa bahati mbaya, jaribio la kuharibu taarifa za nyaraka za kibaguzi bado zinaendelea katika jukwaa la msingi, na matokeo ya uchunguzi ni mbaya zaidi ya njia za kutolewa kwenye seti za taarifa za bendera. Katika gazeti hili, tunapitia matatizo ya muhtasari wa nyaraka za ubongo, na tunapendekeza mfumo wa uangalizi wa picha za riwaya katika mfumo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo. Uelezo ni kuhusiana na sababu ya mauzo ya muhtasari, ambayo imepitiwa na kazi za kabla. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha muundo wetu unaweza kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya mifano ya ubongo uliopita. Utawala wa ubongo unaoendeshwa na taarifa pia una ushindani na njia za kutolewa kwa sanaa.', 'am': 'የሥርዓት ግንኙነት የሰነድ ማሳነቂያ ትርጓሜ መጨረሻ ነው፤ ነገር ግን ከዚህ በፊት የጽሑፍ ትውልድ ስህተት ስህተት ግንኙነት ምክንያት ትንሽ ምርመራ የለውም፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ ያማረ ግንኙነት በናውሮል ሞዴላዎችን በመጠቀም የቁጥጥር ማሳሰሪያ ተደረገ፡፡ ክቡር፣ የዶሴ ሰነድ ማሳየት ገና በመጀመሪያ ደረጃ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የናውሬል አካባቢ ሰነድ ማሳየት ችግርን እናየዋለን፡፡ እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የኖረብ የክፍተት ስህተት አካባቢዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የውይይት ግንኙነት አስቀድሞ ሥራ የተለየውን የድጋፍ ውጤት ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ሞዴላዎቻችን አስቀድሞ የናውሮው አካባቢ አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ የዳታ-የሚነዳው የነጥብ አካባቢ ሥርዓት በሀገር-አርእስት የውጭ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡', 'ko': '요약 요약은 문서 요약 연구의 최종 목표이지만 텍스트 생성 기술이 성숙하지 않아 이전에 요약에 대한 연구가 비교적 적었다.최근 신경모형을 이용한 추상적인 문장 요약이 인상적인 진전을 거두었다.유감스럽게도 추상적인 문서 요약의 시도는 아직 초급 단계이며 평가 결과는 기준 데이터 집합의 추출 방법보다 더 나쁘다.본고에서 우리는 신경 추상적인 문서 요약의 어려움을 되돌아보고 서열에서 서열 구조까지 새로운 그림 기반의 주의 메커니즘을 제시했다.직각은 총결의 현저한 요소를 해결하기 위해 이전의 업무에서 소홀히 한 것이다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 이전의 신경 추상 모델보다 매우 큰 개선이 있었다.데이터 구동의 신경 추상적 방법도 가장 선진적인 추출 방법과 경쟁한다.', 'hy': 'Ապլակտիվ համառոտագրությունը փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման հետազոտության վերջնական նպատակն է, բայց նախկինում այն ավելի քիչ հետազոտում է տեքստի ստեղծման տեխնիկայի անհասունության պատճառով: Վերջերս տպավորիչ առաջընթաց է արվել վերացական նախադասությունների համառոտագրման համար՝ օգտագործելով նյարդային մոդելներ: Դժբախտաբար, վերացրատիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման փորձերը դեռ պարզունակ փուլում են, և գնահատման արդյունքները ավելի վատ են, քան համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վերացրատիվ մեթոդները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերլուծում ենք նյարդային վերացական փաստաթղթի համառոտագրման դժվարությունները և առաջարկում ենք գրաֆիկի հիմնված ուշադրության նոր մեխանիզմ հաջորդականության շրջանակում: The intuition is to address the saliency factor of summarization, which has been overlooked by prior works.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարողանում է նշանակալի բարելավում հասնել նախորդ նյարդային վերացրատիվ մոդելների դեպքում: Տվյալներով հիմնված նեյրոնային վերացրատիվ մեթոդը նաև մրցակցում է ամենաբարձր վերացրական մեթոդների հետ:', 'ca': "Abstractive summarization is the ultimate goal of document summarization research, but previously it is less investigated due to the immaturity of text generation techniques.  Recentment s'ha aconseguit un progrés impressionant en la resumida abstracta de frases utilitzant models neuronals. Malauradament, els intents de resumir els documents abstracts encara estan en una etapa primitiva, i els resultats de l'evaluació són pitjors que els mètodes extractius dels conjunts de dades de referència. En aquest paper, examinem les dificultats de la resumització neuroabstracta dels documents i proposem un nou mecanisme d'atenció basat en gràfics en el marc de seqüència a seqüència. La intuïció és abordar el factor de saliència del resum, que ha estat ignorat per treballs anteriors. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre model és capaç d'aconseguir una millora considerable en comparació amb models neuroabstractius anteriors. El mètode abstractiu neuronal basat en les dades també és competitiu amb mètodes extractius més avançats.", 'az': 'Abstraktiv qeyd edilməsi belədə qeyd edilmə araştırmalarının son amacı, amma əvvəllər mətn nəsillərinin təhsil edilməsi üçün daha az araşdırılmışdır. Son zamanlarda nöral modelləri vasitəsilə abstraktiv cümlələri təmizləmək üçün təsirli tədbir edildi. Necə olaraq, abstraktiv dökümət təmizlənməsi üçün çalışmalar hələ də ilk dəfə içindədir, və değerlendirmə sonuçları benchmark veri qutularında ekstraktif metodlardan daha pisdir. Bu kağıtda, biz nöral abstraktiv döküm təmizlənməsinin çətinliklərini incidirik və seçmə-seçmə çerçivesində yeni grafik tabanlı dikkati mehanizmini təbliğ edirik. Düşünüş, əvvəlki əməllər tarafından keçmişdir. Əvvəlki nöral abstraktiv modellərdən çox yaxşılıq edə biləcəyini göstərir. Məlumatları təşkil edən nöral abstraktiv yöntemi də art ıq təşkil metodları ilə müqayisədir.', 'bn': 'কিন্তু পূর্ববর্তীতে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের অসম্ভবতার কারণে এটা তদন্ত করা হয়েছে। সম্প্রতি নিউরেল মডেল ব্যবহার করে আকর্ষণীয় কারাদণ্ড সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষিপ্ত করা হয়েছে। দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, অস্বীকৃত নথির সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের প্রচেষ্টা এখনো প্রাথমিক পর্যায়ে রয়েছে এবং মূল্যায়নের ফলাফল বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিউরেল অস্বীকৃতিক নথির সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের কষ্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ করি এবং সেক্রেক্সের ফ্রেম্যাকেমে একটি নবনের গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক মন The intuition is to address the saliency factor of summarization, which has been overlooked by prior works.  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে আমাদের মডেল পূর্ববর্তী নিউরেল অবত্রাক্ত মডেলের উপর বেশী উন্নতি পাবে। ডাটা চালানো নিউরেল অক্ষরিক পদ্ধতিও প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা।', 'bs': 'Abstraktivna sažetka je konačni cilj istraživanja sažetanja dokumenta, ali prethodno je manje istražena zbog nezadovoljstva tehnika proizvodnje teksta. Nedavno je napredovao impresivni napredak za sažetak abstraktivne rečenice koristeći neuralne modele. Nažalost, pokušaji za sažetak abstraktivnog dokumenta još uvijek su na primitivnoj fazi, a rezultati procjene su gore od ekstraktivnih metoda na setama podataka o kriteriji. U ovom papiru pregledamo poteškoće sažetka neuralnog abstraktivnog dokumenta i predlažemo novi mehanizam pažnje na grafiku u okviru sekvence do sekvence. intuicija je da se obratimo faktoru salicije sažetanja, koji je pretjerao prethodni rad. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model u mogućnosti ostvariti značajno poboljšanje u prethodnim nervnim abstraktivnim modelima. Neuralna abstraktivna metoda podataka također je konkurentna sa state-of-the-art ekstraktivnim metodama.', 'fi': 'Abstraktiivinen tiivistelmä on dokumenttien tiivistelmätutkimuksen perimmäinen tavoite, mutta aiemmin sitä on tutkittu vähemmän tekstintuotantotekniikoiden kypsyyden vuoksi. Viime aikoina on tapahtunut vaikuttavaa edistystä abstraktissa lauseiden yhteenvedossa neuromallien avulla. Abstraktiivisen dokumentin yhteenvedon yritykset ovat valitettavasti vielä alkukantaisessa vaiheessa, ja arviointitulokset ovat huonompia kuin vertailuaineistojen ekstraktiviset menetelmät. Tässä työssä tarkastelemme neuroabstraktiivisen dokumentin yhteenvedon vaikeuksia ja ehdotamme uutta graafiseen huomiomekanismiin perustuvaa sekvenssi-to-sekvenssin viitekehyksessä. Intuitiona on käsitellä tiivistelmän näkyvää tekijää, jota aikaisemmat teokset ovat unohtaneet. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy saavuttamaan huomattavan parannuksen aikaisempiin neuroabstraktiivisiin malleihin verrattuna. Datavetoinen neuroabstraktiivinen menetelmä kilpailee myös uusimpien uuttamismenetelmien kanssa.', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtlik kokkuvõte on dokumendi kokkuvõtliku uurimise lõppeesmärk, kuid varem on seda vähem uuritud teksti genereerimise tehnikate ebaküpsuse tõttu. Hiljuti on tehtud muljetavaldavaid edusamme abstraktse lausete kokkuvõtliku koostamise osas neuromudelite abil. Kahjuks on abstraktse dokumendi kokkuvõtte katsed endiselt algelises staadiumis ja hindamistulemused on halvemad kui ekstraheerimismeetodid võrdlusandmekogumites. Käesolevas töös vaatame üle neuroabstraktse dokumendi kokkuvõtte raskused ja pakume välja uue graafikapõhise tähelepanumehhanismi järjestusest järjestuseni raamistikus. Intuitsiooni eesmärk on käsitleda kokkuvõtliku silmapaistvuse faktorit, mida varasemad tööd on eiranud. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab saavutada märkimisväärset paranemist võrreldes varasemate neuroabstraktiivsete mudelitega. Andmepõhine neuroabstraktiivne meetod konkureerib ka kaasaegsete ekstraheerimismeetoditega.', 'cs': 'Abstrakční shrnutí je konečným cílem výzkumu shrnutí dokumentů, ale dříve je méně zkoumáno kvůli nedospělosti technik generování textu. V poslední době bylo dosaženo působivého pokroku v abstraktivním shrnutí vět pomocí neuronových modelů. Bohužel pokusy o abstraktivní shrnutí dokumentů jsou stále v primitivní fázi a výsledky hodnocení jsou horší než extrakční metody na referenčních datových sadách. V tomto článku zkoumáme obtíže neuronového abstraktivního shrnutí dokumentů a navrhujeme nový mechanismus pozornosti založený na grafech v sekvenčním rámci. Intuití je řešit významný faktor shrnutí, který byl předešlými díly přehlížen. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model je schopen dosáhnout výrazného zlepšení oproti předchozím neuronovým abstraktivním modelům. Datově řízená neuronová abstraktivní metoda je rovněž konkurenceschopná nejmodernějším extrakčním metodám.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan absolute text-editor-action Laih Nang pepul iki, kita ngubah nglanggar kuwi kesempatan kanggo resmi nggawe dokumen apakno, lan supoyo nganggep kuwi nyugane nggawe barang seneng operasi sing basa gambar nggawe tarjamahan ning sekèns-to-sekèns. Percentage Perintah sing dipunsersal maneh da model sing iso nggawe akeh lanjut bantuan ngono model sing nguasai Nyural. Perintah sing dibutuhke data podho alas-alas sing ngendalikno karo hal-hal-layar extraksif maneh.', 'he': 'Abstractive summarization is the ultimate goal of document summarization research, but previously it is less investigated due to the immaturity of text generation techniques.  Recently impressive progress has been made to abstractive sentence summarization using neural models.  Unfortunately, attempts on abstractive document summarization are still in a primitive stage, and the evaluation results are worse than extractive methods on benchmark datasets.  במסמך הזה, אנו מבקרים את הקשיחות של מסמך אוסטרקטיבי עצבי, ומציעים מנגנון תשומת לב מבוסס בגרף חדש במסגרת הרצף לרצף. האינטואיציה היא להתייחס לגורם המsaliency של הסכם, אשר התעלמו על ידי עבודות קודמות. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהדוגמא שלנו מסוגלת להשיג שיפור משמעותי על דוגמאות אוסטרקטיביות עצביות קודמות. השיטה העצבית המונעת על הנתונים היא גם תחרותית עם שיטות חיפוש חדשות.', 'ha': "Abstractive summarization is the ultimate goal of document summarization research, but previously it is less investigated due to the immaturity of text generation techniques.  An samar da kewayi mai fasahawa a yanzu tsari ga cewa, don a yi amfani da misalin neural. Babu'a, jararin kurarin takardar ta kasa, yana cikin wani juyi na farko, kuma matsalan evaluation sun fi sharri daga hanyar zartar da su kan tsari na-bangon ayuka. Daga wannan takardan, muna juyin musamman masu ƙararin takardar neura na kanana, kuma tuna buƙata wani matsayin muhalli na fassarar grafi a cikin firam-dubu-sequence. @ info: whatsthis Matarin jarrabai ya nuna misalinmu yana iya iya iya ƙari mai girma bisa misãlai na farko. @ info: tooltip", 'sk': 'Abstraktivna povzetka je končni cilj raziskav povzetka dokumentov, vendar je pred tem manj raziskana zaradi nezrelosti tehnik generiranja besedila. V zadnjem času je bil dosežen impresiven napredek pri abstraktivnem povzemanju stavkov z uporabo nevronskih modelov. Na žalost so poskusi abstraktivnega povzetka dokumentov še vedno v primitivni fazi, rezultati vrednotenja pa so slabši od ekstraktivnih metod na referenčnih naborih podatkov. V prispevku pregledujemo težave nevronske abstraktivne povzetke dokumentov in predlagamo nov grafski mehanizem pozornosti v okviru zaporedja do zaporedja. Intuitija je obravnavati dejavnik prepoznavnosti povzetka, ki je bil spregledan v predhodnih delih. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš model sposoben doseči precejšnje izboljšave v primerjavi s prejšnjimi nevronskimi abstraktivnimi modeli. Podatkovno usmerjena nevralna abstraktivna metoda je konkurenčna tudi z najsodobnejšimi ekstraktivnimi metodami.', 'bo': 'Abstractive summarization is the ultimate goal of document summarization research, but previously it is less investigated due to the immaturity of text generation techniques. འཕྲལ་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་འཕེལ་རིམ་འདི་དག་གི་ཚིག་རྩ་བ་ནས་བསྟར་བའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ། ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་དགོས་པའི་ཡིག་གེའི་བཅུད་སྐོར་ལས་བློ་གཏོང་རྩོལ་བ་དེ་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་ནང་ཡོད། In this paper, we review the difficulties of neural abstractive document summarization, and propose a new graph-based attention mechanism in the sequence-to-sequence framework. ཐད་ཚོར་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཡར་ཕྲས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། Experimental རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བའི་མཐོ་རིམ་སྔོན་གྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སུ་ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནས་དབུས་གཞུང་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་དབུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Probabilistic Typology : Deep Generative Models of Vowel Inventories', 'ar': 'التصنيف الاحتمالي: النماذج التوليدية العميقة لقوائم الحروف المتحركة', 'es': 'Tipología probabilística: modelos generativos profundos de inventarios vocálicos', 'pt': 'Tipologia Probabilística: Modelos Gerativos Profundos de Inventários Vogais', 'fr': "Typologie probabiliste\xa0: modèles génératifs profonds d'inventaires de voyelles", 'ja': '確率論的類型論：母音目録の深層生成モデル', 'zh': '概率类型学:元音库深成模', 'hi': 'संभाव्य टाइपोलॉजी: स्वर सूची के गहरे उत्पादक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Вероятностная типология: Глубокои ̆ генеративныи ̆ модели кадастров гласных', 'ga': 'Tíopeolaíocht Dhóchúil: Samhlacha Domhainghinteacha d’Fardail Gutaí', 'ka': 'შესაბამისი ტიპოლოგია: ძალიან დავიწყებული სიტყვანის მოდელები', 'hu': 'Valószínűsíthető típus: Mély generációs modellek a hangleltárak', 'el': 'Πιθανολογική Τυπολογία: Βαθιά Generative Μοντέλα Αποθηκών Βρυξελλών', 'it': 'Tipologia Probabilistica: Modelli Generativi Profondi di Inventari Vocali', 'lt': 'Tikėtina tipologija: gilūs generaciniai riebalų inventorių modeliai', 'kk': 'Мүмкін типология: Дыбыс құрылғысының түпнұсқасы үлгілері', 'ml': 'സാധ്യതയുള്ള ടൈപ്പോളോഗി: വോവെല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dവെന്റോറികളുടെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mk': 'Веројатна типологија: Длабоки генеративни модели на листови', 'mt': 'Tipoloġija Probabilistika: Mudelli Ġenerattivi Profondi ta’ Inventarji tal-Vowel', 'no': 'Probabilistic Typology: Deep Generative Modeller for Vowel Inventories', 'ro': 'Tipologie probabilistică: Modele generative profunde ale inventarelor voalelor', 'mn': 'Магадгүй хэлбэр: Гүн төрөлхтний дуу санааны загварууд', 'pl': 'Typologia prawdopodobna: Głębokie modele generacyjne inwentaryzacji węgla', 'ms': 'Tipologi Kemungkinan: Model Generatif Dalam Inventar Vowel', 'sr': 'Verovatno tipologija: duboki generativni modeli proizvođača glasova', 'si': 'සමහර විශ්වාසික වර්තනය: ගොඩක් ජීවිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක වර්තනය', 'so': 'Typology: Deep Generative Models of Vowel Inventories', 'ta': 'சாத்தியமான Typology: ஆழமான உருவாக்க மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரிகள்', 'sv': 'Probabilistisk typologi: Djupa generativa modeller av Vowel Inventarier', 'ur': 'احتمالات طریق شناسی: عمیق پیدا کرنے والے موڈل Vowel Inventories کی', 'uz': "Muhimlik tipologi: Vowel Inventories' ning eng katta yaratish modellari", 'vi': 'Định nghĩa điển hình: Chế độ phát triển sâu của danh sách', 'hr': 'Vjerojatno tipologija: duboki generativni modeli proizvođača glasova', 'de': 'Probabilistische Typologie: Deep Generative Modelle von Vowel Inventars', 'bg': 'Вероятна типология: Дълбоки генеративни модели на инвентаризация на гласниците', 'da': 'Probabilistisk Typologi: Dybe Generative Models of Vowel Inventaries', 'nl': 'Probabilistische Typologie: Diepe Generatieve Modellen van Vowelinventarissen', 'fa': 'گونه\u200cشناسی احتمالات: مدل\u200cهای نسل عمیق از ماده\u200cهای صوتی', 'tr': 'Mümkün Tikoloji: Derin Senedici Ses Girişimleri', 'ko': '확률 유형학: 모음 목록의 심층 생성 모델', 'sw': 'Utoaji wa uwezekano: Utawala wa Kizalendo wa Kiingereza wa Vowel', 'am': 'የፎዌል ምርጫዎች', 'id': 'Tipologi Kemungkinan: Model Generatif Dalam Inventar Vowel', 'hy': 'Հավանական տիպոլոգիա. խորը գեներատիվ մոդելներ', 'az': 'M칲mk칲nl칲k Tikoloji: Q캼sqa S톛s 캻stifad톛칞il톛rinin Deep Generative Models of Vowel Inventories', 'af': 'Waarskynlik Tikolologie: Deep Genereerde Modelle van Vowel Inventories', 'sq': 'Tipologjia e mundshme: Modele gjenerative të thella të inventarive të vogla', 'bn': 'সম্ভবত টাইপলোগি: ভোয়েল ইন্টারিয়ার গভীর গভীর গভীর মোডেল', 'ca': "Tipologia Probabilista: Models Generatius Profunds d'Inventaris Vowel", 'bs': 'Vjerojatno tipologija: duboki generativni modeli proizvođača glasova', 'cs': 'Pravděpodobnostní typologie: Hluboké generační modely inventářů látek', 'et': 'Tõenäoline tüpoloogia: sügavad generatiivsed mudelid Vowel Inventories', 'fi': 'Todennäköinen typologia: Vowel Inventories syvägeneratiiviset mallit', 'jv': 'Genjer-Genjer Dijejer', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Verjetna tipologija: globoki generativni modeli zalog glasov', 'he': 'טיפולוגיה סבירה: דוגמנים גנרטיביים עמוקים של מלאי הקלעים', 'bo': 'Probabilistic Typology: Deep Generative Models of Vowel Inventories'}
{'en': 'Linguistic typology studies the range of structures present in human language. The main goal of the field is to discover which sets of possible phenomena are universal, and which are merely frequent. For example, all languages have vowels, while mostbut not alllanguages have an /u/ sound. In this paper we present the first probabilistic treatment of a basic question in phonological typology : What makes a natural vowel inventory? We introduce a series of deep stochastic point processes, and contrast them with previous computational, simulation-based approaches. We provide a comprehensive suite of experiments on over 200 distinct languages.', 'ar': 'يدرس التصنيف اللغوي مجموعة التراكيب الموجودة في اللغة البشرية. الهدف الرئيسي من هذا المجال هو اكتشاف أي مجموعة من الظواهر المحتملة تكون عالمية وأيها متكررة فقط. على سبيل المثال ، تحتوي جميع اللغات على أحرف متحركة ، بينما تحتوي معظم اللغات - وليس جميعها - على صوت / u /. في هذا البحث نقدم أول معالجة احتمالية لسؤال أساسي في علم التصنيف الصوتي: ما الذي يجعل جرد حروف العلة الطبيعية؟ نقدم سلسلة من عمليات النقطة العشوائية العميقة ، ونقارنها مع المناهج الحسابية السابقة القائمة على المحاكاة. نحن نقدم مجموعة شاملة من التجارب على أكثر من 200 لغة متميزة.', 'es': 'La tipología lingüística estudia la gama de estructuras presentes en el lenguaje humano. El objetivo principal del campo es descubrir qué conjuntos de fenómenos posibles son universales y cuáles son meramente frecuentes. Por ejemplo, todos los idiomas tienen vocales, mientras que la mayoría de los idiomas, aunque no todos, tienen un sonido /u/. En este artículo presentamos el primer tratamiento probabilístico de una pregunta básica en tipología fonológica: ¿Qué hace un inventario de vocales naturales? Presentamos una serie de procesos puntuales estocásticos profundos y los contrastamos con los enfoques computacionales anteriores basados en simulación. Ofrecemos un conjunto completo de experimentos en más de 200 idiomas distintos.', 'fr': "La typologie linguistique étudie l'éventail des structures présentes dans le langage humain. L'objectif principal du domaine est de découvrir quels ensembles de phénomènes possibles sont universels et quels sont ceux qui sont simplement fréquents. Par exemple, toutes les langues ont des voyelles, alors que la plupart des langues, mais pas toutes, ont un son /u/. Dans cet article, nous présentons le premier traitement probabiliste d'une question fondamentale en typologie phonologique\xa0: Qu'est-ce qui fait un inventaire des voyelles naturelles\xa0? Nous introduisons une série de processus ponctuels stochastiques profonds, et nous les opposons aux approches computationnelles basées sur la simulation précédentes. Nous proposons une suite complète d'expériences sur plus de 200 langues différentes.", 'pt': 'A tipologia linguística estuda a gama de estruturas presentes na linguagem humana. O principal objetivo do campo é descobrir quais conjuntos de fenômenos possíveis são universais e quais são apenas frequentes. Por exemplo, todas as línguas têm vogais, enquanto a maioria – mas não todas – as línguas têm um som /u/. Neste artigo apresentamos o primeiro tratamento probabilístico de uma questão básica em tipologia fonológica: O que faz um inventário vocálico natural? Apresentamos uma série de processos de pontos estocásticos profundos e os contrastamos com abordagens computacionais anteriores baseadas em simulação. Fornecemos um conjunto abrangente de experimentos em mais de 200 idiomas distintos.', 'ja': '言語類型論は、人間の言語に存在する構造の範囲を研究する。この分野の主な目標は、どの可能性のある現象のセットが普遍的で、どのセットが単に頻繁であるかを発見することです。例えば、すべての言語には母音がありますが、ほとんどの言語には/u/の音があるわけではありません。この論文では、音声学的類型論における基本的な質問の最初の確率論的な扱いを紹介します：自然母音目録を作るものは何か？一連の確率論的な深い点プロセスを紹介し、これまでの計算的、シミュレーションベースのアプローチと対比させます。200以上の異なる言語の包括的な実験スイートを提供しています。', 'ru': 'Лингвистическая типология изучает спектр структур, присутствующих в человеческом языке. Основная цель поля состоит в том, чтобы выяснить, какие наборы возможных явлений являются универсальными, а какие всего лишь частыми. Например, все языки имеют гласные, в то время как большинство - но не все языки имеют звук/u/. В этой статье мы представляем первое вероятностное рассмотрение основного вопроса в фонологической типологии: Что составляет натуральную гласную инвентаризацию? Введем ряд глубинных стохастических точечных процессов и сравним их с предыдущими вычислительными, имитационными подходами. Мы предоставляем полный набор экспериментов над более чем 200 различными языками.', 'zh': '言语类型学治人语之结构也。 其大要则遍矣,其数则频矣。 如诸言语皆有元音,而多(非全)语有 /u/ 音也。 本文中,我们发出语音类型学中一本问的第一概率处理:是什么自然元音清单? 我们说了一系深度随机点,并将他们与先前基于仿真计算的方法。 200 多种不同言备实验。', 'hi': 'भाषाई टाइपोलॉजी मानव भाषा में मौजूद संरचनाओं की सीमा का अध्ययन करती है। क्षेत्र का मुख्य लक्ष्य यह पता लगाना है कि संभावित घटनाओं के कौन से सेट सार्वभौमिक हैं, और जो केवल अक्सर होते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, सभी भाषाओं में स्वर होते हैं, जबकि अधिकांश-लेकिन सभी नहीं-भाषाओं में एक / u / ध्वनि होती है। इस पेपर में हम ध्वन्यात्मक टाइपोलॉजी में एक बुनियादी प्रश्न का पहला संभाव्य उपचार प्रस्तुत करते हैं: क्या एक प्राकृतिक स्वर सूची बनाता है? हम गहरी स्टोकेस्टिक बिंदु प्रक्रियाओं की एक श्रृंखला पेश करते हैं, और उन्हें पिछले कम्प्यूटेशनल, सिमुलेशन-आधारित दृष्टिकोणों के साथ विपरीत करते हैं। हम 200 से अधिक अलग-अलग भाषाओं पर प्रयोगों का एक व्यापक सूट प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanann tíopeolaíocht theangeolaíoch staidéar ar an raon struchtúr atá sa teanga dhaonna. Is é príomhsprioc na páirce fáil amach cé na tacair d’fheiniméin fhéideartha atá uilíoch, agus nach mbíonn iontu ach go minic. Mar shampla, tá gutaí ag gach teanga, agus tá fuaim /u/ ag an gcuid is mó de na teangacha — ach ní iad go léir. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair an chéad láimhseáil dóchúlachta ar cheist bhunúsach sa tíopeolaíocht fhóineolaíoch: Cad a dhéanann fardal gutaí nádúrtha? Cuirimid sraith de phróisis dhomhain phointe stochastic isteach, agus cuirimid i gcodarsnacht iad le cineálacha cur chuige ríomhaireachtúla, bunaithe ar ionsamhlúchán. Cuirimid sraith chuimsitheach turgnamh ar fáil ar bhreis is 200 teanga ar leith.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi tipológia az emberi nyelvben jelen lévő struktúrák skáláját vizsgálja. A terület fő célja, hogy felfedezze, mely lehetséges jelenségek egyetemes, és melyek pusztán gyakoriak. Például minden nyelvnek van magánhangzója, míg a legtöbb, de nem minden nyelvnek van /u/ hangja. Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk egy fonológiai tipológia alapkérdésének első valószínűségi kezelését: Mi tesz egy természetes magánhangzó leltárt? Számos mély sztochasztikus pontfolyamatot vezetünk be, amelyeket a korábbi számítástechnikai, szimulációs alapú megközelítésekkel szembesülünk. Átfogó kísérletcsomagot kínálunk több mint 200 különböző nyelven.', 'el': 'Η γλωσσολογική τυπολογία μελετά το φάσμα των δομών που υπάρχουν στην ανθρώπινη γλώσσα. Ο κύριος στόχος του πεδίου είναι να ανακαλύψει ποια σύνολα πιθανών φαινομένων είναι καθολικά και ποια είναι απλά συχνά. Για παράδειγμα, όλες οι γλώσσες έχουν φωνήεντα, ενώ οι περισσότερες-αλλά όχι όλες-γλώσσες έχουν ήχο /u/. Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζεται η πρώτη πιθανολογική αντιμετώπιση ενός βασικού ερωτήματος στη φωνολογική τυπολογία: Τι κάνει μια φυσική απογραφή φωνήψεων; Εισάγουμε μια σειρά από βαθιές στοχαστικές σημειακές διεργασίες και τις αντιπαραβάλλουμε με προηγούμενες υπολογιστικές προσεγγίσεις βασισμένες σε προσομοίωση. Παρέχουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη σειρά πειραμάτων πάνω από 200 διακριτές γλώσσες.', 'lt': 'Linguistinės tipologijos tyrimai apima įvairias struktūras žmogaus kalba. Pagrindinis šios srities tikslas – nustatyti, kurie galimi reiškiniai yra universal ūs ir paprasčiausiai dažni. For example, all languages have vowels, while most-but not all-languages have an /u/ sound.  Šiame dokumente pristatysime pirmąjį probabilistinį pagrindinio klausimo klausimą fonologinėje tipologijoje: kas sudaro natūralų žolių inventorių? Įdiegiame daugybę giliųjų stochastinių taškų procesų ir juos kontrastuojame su ankstesniais skaičiavimo ir modeliavimo metodais. Pateikiame išsamų eksperimentų rinkinį daugiau kaip 200 skirtingų kalbų.', 'ka': 'ლთნდვისტიკური ტიპოლოგია ადამიანის ენაში არსებობს სტრუქტურების დისპეზი. პირველი მიზეზი არის აღმოჩნოთ, რომელიც შესაძლებელი ფენომენების ნაწილი უნივერსოლურია და რომელიც მხოლოდ ხშირია. მაგალითად, ყველა ენების სიტყვარები აქვს, მაგრამ უფრო- მაგრამ არა ყველა ენების სიტყვარები აქვს /u/ სიტყვა. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ფონოლოგიური ტიპოლოგიაში პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველ პირველ პირველ პირველ პირველ პირვე ჩვენ შევცვალობთ მნიშვნელოვანი სტაქტიკური პროცესების სერვერი, და ისინი წინა კომპუტაციალური, სიმულაციური გადაწყვეტილებით გადავცვალობთ. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტების უფრო მეტი 200 განსხვავებული ენების სუტექტირებული სუტექტი დავიყენებთ.', 'it': "La tipologia linguistica studia la gamma di strutture presenti nel linguaggio umano. L'obiettivo principale del campo è quello di scoprire quali serie di possibili fenomeni sono universali e quali sono semplicemente frequenti. Ad esempio, tutte le lingue hanno vocali, mentre la maggior parte delle lingue, ma non tutte, hanno un suono /u/. In questo articolo presentiamo il primo trattamento probabilistico di una domanda di base nella tipologia fonologica: Cosa rende un inventario vocale naturale? Introduciamo una serie di processi di punti stocastici profondi e li confrontiamo con precedenti approcci computazionali basati sulla simulazione. Forniamo una suite completa di esperimenti su oltre 200 lingue distinte.", 'kk': 'Лингистикалық типтология адамдар тілінде бар құрылымдардың аумағын зерттеді. Орындағы негізгі мақсат - мүмкін пайдаланулардың қандай бағдарламаларды анықтау және қандай бағдарламаларды көбірек анықтау. Мысалы, барлық тілдерде дыбыс бар, бірақ барлық тілдерде /u/ дыбыс болмайды. Бұл қағазда фологиялық типтологияда бірінші маңыздылық сұрақтың тәжірибесін таңдаймыз: Табиғи дыбыс инвентариясы не болады? Біз бірнеше түсті стохастикалық нүкте процестерді таңдап, оларды алдыңғы есептеп, симулациялық негіздеген келесімдермен қарсылып көрдік. Біз 200-ден артық тілдер туралы тәжірибелер тәжірибелерін келтіреміз.', 'mk': 'Лингвистичката типологија го проучува опсегот на структури присутни на човечкиот јазик. Главната цел на теренот е да се открие кој сет можни феномени се универзални и кои се само често. На пример, сите јазици имаат гласини, додека повеќето, но не сите јазици имаат /u/ sound. Во овој весник го претставуваме првиот веројатен третман на основното прашање во фонолошката типологија: Што прави природен инвентор на гласови? Ние воведуваме серија на процеси на длабока стохастична точка, и ги контрастираме со претходните пресметувачки, симулациски пристапи. Ние обезбедуваме комплетен куп експерименти на повеќе од 200 различни јазици.', 'ms': 'Linguistic typology studies the range of structures present in human language.  Tujuan utama lapangan adalah untuk mencari yang set fenomena yang mungkin adalah universal, dan yang hanya sering. Contohnya, semua bahasa mempunyai vokal, sementara kebanyakan- tetapi tidak semua- bahasa mempunyai /u/ sound. In this paper we present the first probabilistic treatment of a basic question in phonological typology: What makes a natural vowel inventory?  Kami memperkenalkan satu siri proses titik stokastik yang dalam, dan mengembangkannya dengan pendekatan komputasi terdahulu, berdasarkan simulasi. Kami menyediakan sekumpulan eksperimen yang meliputi dalam lebih dari 200 bahasa yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ലിന്\u200dഗ്വിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ടൈപ്പോളജി പഠിക്കുന്നു മനുഷ്യനാഭാഷയില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ  ഭൂമിയിലെ പ്രധാന ലക്ഷ്യം ഏത് സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളാണെന്ന് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനാണ് സാധ്യതയുള്ളത്, അത് സാധാരണയാണ്. For example, all languages have vowels, while most-but not all-languages have an /u/ sound.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഫോളോളജിക്കല്\u200d ടൈപ്പോളജിയില്\u200d ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. എന്ത നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ആഴമുള്ള സ്റ്റോക്സിക് പ്രക്രിയകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, മുമ്പുള്ള കണക്കൂട്ടലിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ് 200 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ സ്യൂട്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു.', 'mt': "It-tipoloġija lingwistika tistudja l-firxa ta’ strutturi preżenti fil-lingwa umana. The main goal of the field is to discover which sets of possible phenomena are universal, and which are merely frequent.  Pereżempju, il-lingwi kollha għandhom vowels, filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tal-lingwi iżda mhux kollha għandhom /u/ sound. F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw l-ewwel trattament probabilistiku ta’ mistoqsija bażika fit-tipoloġija fonoloġika: X’jagħmel inventarju naturali tal-vowel? Aħna nintroduċu serje ta’ proċessi ta’ punti stokastiċi profondi, u nikkuntrastawhom ma’ approċċi komputattivi u bbażati fuq simulazzjoni preċedenti. Aħna nipprovdu ġabra komprensiva ta' esperimenti fuq aktar minn 200 lingwa distinta.", 'pl': 'Typologia językowa bada zakres struktur obecnych w języku ludzkim. Głównym celem tej dziedziny jest odkrycie, które zestawy możliwych zjawisk są uniwersalne, a które są jedynie częste. Na przykład wszystkie języki mają samogłoski, podczas gdy większość – ale nie wszystkie – języki mają dźwięk /u/. W artykule przedstawiamy pierwsze prawdopodobieństwo traktowania podstawowego pytania typologii fonologicznej: Co tworzy naturalną inwentaryzację samogłosek? Wprowadzamy szereg głębokich procesów stochastycznych i kontrastujemy je z poprzednimi metodami obliczeniowymi opartymi na symulacjach. Zapewniamy kompleksowy pakiet eksperymentów na ponad 200 różnych językach.', 'no': 'Lingvistiske typologikk studierer området av strukturar som finst i menneskelig språk. Målet på feltet er å oppdaga kva sett av moglege fenomenar er universelt, og som er berre ofte. For eksempel har alle språk lyd, mens dei fleste, men ikkje alle språk har ein /u/ lyd. I denne papiret viser vi den første sannsynlige behandlinga av ein grunnleggjande spørsmål i fonologisk typologi: Kva gjer eit naturlig vokelinventor? Vi introduserer ein serie av dype stokastiske prosessar og kontrast dei med førre databaserte, simulasjonsbaserte tilnærmingar. Vi tilbyr eit komplett pakke av eksperimenter på over 200 ulike språk.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хэл дээр байгаа бүтээлүүдийг судалдаг. Салбарын гол зорилго нь ямар төрлийн боломжтой явдал ертөнцөд байдгийг олж мэдэх ба энэ нь ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн байдаг. Жишээлбэл, бүх хэл нь эмэгтэй, ихэнх хэл биш ч /u/ дуу байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид фонологийн хэлбэрийн анхны магадлалын эмчилгээ үзүүлнэ: Байгалийн дуу бүтээгдэхүүнийг юу хийдэг вэ? Бид хэдэн гүн гүнзгий стокатик цэгүүдийг танилцуулж, өмнөх тооцоололтын, симулацийн суурилсан арга баримтуудыг харьцуулж байна. Бид 200 гаруй төрлийн хэл дээр туршилтуудын бүрэн хэмжээг хангадаг.', 'sr': 'Lingistička tipologija ispitiva raspon struktura koje postoje na ljudskom jeziku. Glavni cilj polja je otkriti koji su seti mogućih fenomena univerzalni i koji su samo često. Na primer, svi jezici imaju povraćanja, dok većina jezika nemaju /u/ zvuk. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo verovatno liječenje osnovnog pitanja u fonološkoj tipologiji: Šta čini prirodni izvor povraćanja? Predstavljamo niz dubokih stokastičnih procesa, i kontrastiramo ih sa prethodnim računalnim, simulacijskim pristupima. Mi pružamo sveobuhvatan apartman eksperimenata na preko 200 različitih jezika.', 'ro': 'Tipologia lingvistică studiază gama de structuri prezente în limbajul uman. Scopul principal al domeniului este de a descoperi care seturi de fenomene posibile sunt universale și care sunt pur și simplu frecvente. De exemplu, toate limbile au vocale, în timp ce majoritatea limbilor, dar nu toate, au un sunet /u/. În această lucrare prezentăm primul tratament probabilistic al unei întrebări de bază în tipologia fonologică: Ce face un inventar vocal natural? Introducem o serie de procese punctuale stocastice profunde și le contrastăm cu abordările computaționale anterioare bazate pe simulare. Oferim o suită cuprinzătoare de experimente pe peste 200 de limbi distincte.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු භාෂාවට තියෙන සංස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන අරමුණ තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන අරමුණ තමයි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සැකසුම් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධාන සැකසුම් වලි උදාහරණයෙන්, ඔක්කොම භාෂාවට වලින් වලින් තියෙනවා, හැමෝම භාෂාවට හැමෝම භාෂාවක්ම /u/ ශබ් මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරථම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: මොකක්ද ස්වභාවික වෝල් සංවිධ අපි ගොඩක් ස්ටොචාස්ටික් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් සිරීස් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ව පිරිසිදු ගණන්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා අපි විශේෂ භාෂාවට වඩා ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ භාෂාවක් 200 ක් විතරක් පරීක්ෂණයක් සුදුම් කරනවා.', 'so': "Iskuulaadka luqada Finnishku wuxuu baranayaa dhismo kala duduwan oo ku qoran luqada dadka. Ujeedada ugu horeeya ee duurka waa in la ogaado nooca badan oo suurtagal ah ay yihiin caalami, kuwaas oo marar badan. Tusaale ahaan luqadaha oo dhammu waxay leeyihiin nidar, inta badan laakiin luuqadaha oo dhan ma ahan cod. Qoraalkan waxaan ka keenaynaa daryeelka ugu horeeya ee su'aalaha aasaasiga ah ee ku saabsan qoraalka nolojiga: Maxaa sameeyaa qoraal dabiicadeed? Waxaynu soo bandhignaa koorasyo badan oo aad u dheer, waxaana la kala duwanaynaa qaabab hore oo xisaab ah oo simaalo ah. We provide a comprehensive suite of experiments on over 200 distinct languages.", 'sv': 'Språktypologi studerar utbudet av strukturer som finns i det mänskliga språket. Huvudmålet med fältet är att upptäcka vilka uppsättningar av möjliga fenomen som är universella och vilka som bara är frekventa. Till exempel har alla språk vokaler, medan de flesta men inte alla språk har ett /u/-ljud. I denna uppsats presenterar vi den första sannolikhetsbehandlingen av en grundläggande fråga inom fonologisk typologi: Vad gör en naturlig vokal inventering? Vi introducerar en serie djupa stokastiska punktprocesser och kontrasterar dem med tidigare beräkningsbaserade simuleringsbaserade metoder. Vi erbjuder en omfattande uppsättning experiment på över 200 olika språk.', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு மொழியில் இருக்கும் அமைப்புகளின் விளிம்பை படிக்கிறது. புலத்தின் முக்கிய இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் எந்த சாத்தியமான பொருள் பொருளாக இருக்கிறது என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும உதாரணத்திற்கு, அனைத்து மொழிகளுக்கும் சத்திரங்கள் இருக்கின்றன, ஆனால் பெரும்பாலான மொழிகளுக்கும் /u/ ஒ In this paper we present the first probabilistic treatment of a basic question in phonological typology: What makes a natural vowel inventory?  நாம் ஒரு தொகுதி ஆழமான புள்ளி செயல்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் முந்தைய கணக்கில், பாவனைசார்ந்த முறைமைகளை மாற்ற 200 க்கு மேல் வித்தியாசமான மொழிகளில் ஒரு முழுமையான சோதனைகளை வழங்குகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'Linguistic typology studies the range of structures present in human language. کھیتی کی اصلی هدف یہ ہے کہ کس طرح ممکن اتفاقات کا مجموعہ معلوم ہوتا ہے اور وہ صرف اکثر ہے۔ مثال، تمام زبانوں کے لئے نہائل ہیں، حالانکہ اکثر زبانوں کے لئے /u/ صدا نہیں ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک بنیادی سؤال کے پہلی احتمال کا تحقیق پیش کرتے ہیں: ایک طبیعی آواز کی مخلوقات کیا بناتا ہے؟ ہم ایک سری عمیق سٹوکسٹیک پوینٹ پرسس کو معرفی کرتے ہیں اور ان سے پہلے کامپیوتر کی، سیمولیسی بنیاد کی طریقے سے مخالفت کرتے ہیں۔ ہم 200 مختلف زبانوں پر آزمائش کا ایک گھیرا سامان دیتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Lingʻik turologi inson tilda mavjud structural tartibi o'rganadi. Davlatning asosiy maqsadi bu narsalarni ko'rsatish mumkinligini ko'rsatish mumkin, va bu oddiy narsa ko'p. Masalan, hamma tillar orqali qoʻllangan, ammo ko'pchilik tilda hamma tillar /u/ tovush bor. Bu hujjatda, biz fonological tibbologida asosiy savol uchun birinchi muammolarni ko'rib chiqaramiz: asosiy vowel muvaffaqiyatlarini qanday qiladi? Biz bir necha ko'pchilik vosita jarayonlarini ko'rib chiqaramiz va ularni oldingi kompyuterga, simuliyat asosiy usullar bilan birlashtiramiz. Biz 200 dan ortiq bir xil tillarda katta tizim qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ học học nghiên cứu các kiến trúc có trong ngôn ngữ con người. Mục tiêu chính của lĩnh vực là tìm ra các hiện tượng có thể là phổ biến, và chỉ là thường xuyên. Ví dụ, mọi ngôn ngữ đều có các nguyên âm, trong khi hầu hết các ngôn ngữ đều có một âm thanh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi trình bày lần đầu tiên giải pháp về một câu hỏi cơ bản trong loại ngôn ngữ âm học: Điều gì làm nên bản khai âm tự nhiên? Chúng tôi giới thiệu một loạt các thủ tục lập trường, và tương phản chúng với các phương pháp tính toán, dựa trên giả lập trước. Chúng tôi cung cấp một loạt các thí nghiệm trên một ngôn ngữ lớn hơn 200.', 'hr': 'Lingistička tipološka ispitivanja raspona struktura prisutnih na ljudskom jeziku. Glavni cilj polja je otkriti koji su seti mogućih fenomena univerzalni i koji su samo često. Na primjer, svi jezici imaju povraćanja, dok većina jezika nemaju /u/ zvuk. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo vjerojatno liječenje osnovnog pitanja u fonološkoj tipologiji: Što čini prirodni izvor povraćanja? Predstavljamo niz dubokih stokastičnih procesa i kontrastiramo ih sa prethodnim računalnim pristupima na simulaciji. Mi pružamo sveobuhvatni apartman eksperimenata na preko 200 različitih jezika.', 'bg': 'Лингвистичната типология изучава обхвата на структурите, присъстващи в човешкия език. Основната цел на полето е да открие кои групи от възможни явления са универсални и кои са просто чести. Например, всички езици имат гласни, докато повечето, но не всички езици имат звук /у/. В настоящата статия представяме първото вероятностно третиране на основен въпрос във фонологичната типология: Какво прави естествения опис на гласните? Въвеждаме серия от дълбоки стохастични точкови процеси и ги контрастираме с предишни изчислителни, симулационни подходи. Ние предлагаме цялостен набор от експерименти на над 200 различни езика.', 'nl': 'Linguïstische typologie bestudeert het scala van structuren in menselijke taal. Het belangrijkste doel van het veld is te ontdekken welke sets van mogelijke fenomenen universeel zijn en welke slechts frequent. Alle talen hebben bijvoorbeeld klinkers, terwijl de meeste, maar niet alle talen een /u/ geluid hebben. In dit artikel presenteren we de eerste probabilistische behandeling van een basisvraag in fonologische typologie: Wat maakt een natuurlijke klinkerinventaris? We introduceren een reeks diepe stochastische puntprocessen, en contrasteren ze met eerdere computationele, simulatiegebaseerde benaderingen. We bieden een uitgebreide reeks experimenten op meer dan 200 verschillende talen.', 'da': 'Sprog typologi studerer rækken af strukturer til stede i menneskeligt sprog. Hovedformålet med feltet er at opdage, hvilke sæt af mulige fænomener der er universelle, og hvilke blot er hyppige. For eksempel har alle sprog vokaler, mens de fleste sprog, men ikke alle sprog, har en /u/ lyd. I denne artikel præsenterer vi den første sandsynlighedsbehandling af et grundlæggende spørgsmål i fonologisk typologi: Hvad gør en naturlig vokal opgørelse? Vi introducerer en række dybe stokastiske punktprocesser og kontrasterer dem med tidligere beregningsmæssige, simuleringsbaserede tilgange. Vi tilbyder en omfattende pakke af eksperimenter på over 200 forskellige sprog.', 'de': 'Linguistische Typologie untersucht das Spektrum der Strukturen, die in der menschlichen Sprache vorhanden sind. Das Hauptziel des Feldes ist es herauszufinden, welche Sätze möglicher Phänomene universell und welche nur häufig sind. Zum Beispiel haben alle Sprachen Vokale, während die meisten, aber nicht alle Sprachen einen /u/ Klang haben. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die erste probabilistische Behandlung einer grundlegenden Frage in der phonologischen Typologie vor: Was macht ein natürliches Vokal-Inventar aus? Wir stellen eine Reihe von tiefen stochastischen Punktprozessen vor und stellen sie mit früheren computergestützten, simulationsbasierten Ansätzen gegenüber. Wir bieten eine umfassende Reihe von Experimenten auf über 200 verschiedenen Sprachen.', 'fa': 'نوع\u200cشناسی لینگ\u200cویستیک مدت ساختاری که در زبان انسان وجود دارند تحقیق می\u200cکند. هدف اصلی این میدان اینه که کشف کنیم که کدام مجموعه\u200cهای پدیده\u200cهای ممکن جهانی هستند، و این فقط اغلب هستند. برای مثال، همه زبانها صدا دارند، در حالی که بیشترین زبانها نه همه زبانها صدا دارند. در این کاغذ ما اولین درمان احتمالاتی از یک سوال بنیادی در تایپولوژی فونیولوژیکی را نشان می دهیم: چی یک اختراع صوتی طبیعی را می سازد؟ ما مجموعه\u200cای از فرایند\u200cهای عمیق استاکستیک را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، و آنها را با طریق\u200cهای کامپیوتری پیشین، بنیاد شبیه\u200cسازی متصل می\u200cکنیم. ما یک suite کامل از آزمایشات را در بیش از ۲۰۰ زبان متفاوت فراهم می کنیم.', 'id': 'Tipologi bahasa mempelajari jangkauan struktur yang ada dalam bahasa manusia. Tujuan utama dari lapangan adalah untuk menemukan yang set fenomena yang mungkin universal, dan yang hanya sering. Contohnya, semua bahasa memiliki suara, sementara kebanyakan-tetapi tidak semua-bahasa memiliki /u/ suara. Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan perawatan probabilis pertama pertanyaan dasar dalam tipologi fonologi: apa yang membuat inventaris vowel alami? Kami memperkenalkan serangkaian proses titik stokastik yang dalam, dan mengembangkannya dengan pendekatan komputasi sebelumnya, berdasarkan simulasi. We provide a comprehensive suite of experiments on over 200 distinct languages.', 'sw': 'Utamaduni wa lugha unasoma mfumo uliopo katika lugha ya binadamu. Lengo kuu la uwanja ni kugundua aina gani ambazo zinawezekana ni ya ulimwengu, na ambazo ni mara nyingi. Kwa mfano, lugha zote zina ahadi, wakati wengi lakini si lugha zote zina sauti/u/ sauti. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha matibabu ya kwanza ya swali la msingi katika a in a ya kifolojia: Nini kinachotengeneza uzalishaji wa kuapa asili? Tunaonyesha mfululizo wa michakato ya kina yenye mfululizo, na kuwalinganisha na mbinu za zamani za kompyuta, za simulizi. We provide a comprehensive suite of experiments on over 200 distinct languages.', 'ko': '언어 유형학은 인류 언어에 존재하는 각종 구조를 연구한다.이 분야의 주요 목표는 어떤 가능한 현상이 보편적이고 어떤 것이 빈번한지를 발견하는 것이다.예를 들어 모든 언어는 모음이 있지만 대부분이지만 모든 언어가 /u/음이 있는 것은 아니다.본고에서 우리는 음성 유형학에서 기본적인 문제의 첫 번째 확률 처리를 제시했다. 무엇이 자연 모음 목록입니까?우리는 일련의 심층 랜덤 포인트 과정을 소개하고 이를 이전에 시뮬레이션을 바탕으로 한 계산 방법과 비교했다.우리는 200여 종의 서로 다른 언어에 전면적인 실험을 제공했다.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk tipologiýa adam dilinde bar ýagdaýlaryň görnüşini öwredýär. Alanyň esasy maksady şu ýagdaýyň haýsy mümkin parçalaryň uniwersaly bolandygyny tapmak we bu birnäçe köplenç bolup geçirilýär. mysal bolsa, ähli diller sözleri bar, ýöne köp diller /u/ sesi ýok. Bu kagyzda fonolojik tipologiýada ilkinji gezek ajaýyp soragynyň mümkinçiligini görkezip berýäris: tebigy sesli a çarlygy näme edip bilýär? Bir sürü derin stokastik noktalar işlemlerini tanıtıyoruz ve önceki hesaplama tabanlı golamlarla karşılaştırıyoruz. Biz 200-den köp dilden daşary bir deneyler saýlaýrys.', 'af': "Linguistiese tipologie studeer die omvang van strukture wat in die menslike taal voorsien is. Die hoofdoel van die veld is om te ontdek wat stelle van moontlike fenomene universele is, en wat net dikwels is. Byvoorbeeld, al die tale het voëls, terwyl mees- but nie alle- tale het 'n /u/ klank. In hierdie papier stel ons die eerste waarskynlik behandeling van 'n basiese vraag in fonologiese tipologie: Wat maak 'n natuurlike voel inventorie? Ons introduseer 'n reeks van diep stokastike punt prosesse en kontras hulle met vorige rekenaar, simulasie-gebaseerde toegang. Ons verskaf 'n komplettende suite van eksperimente op meer 200 verskillende tale.", 'sq': 'Tipologjia gjuhësore studion gamën e strukturave të pranishme në gjuhën njerëzore. Qëllimi kryesor i fushës është të zbulojmë se cilat grupe fenomenesh të mundshme janë universale dhe të cilat janë thjesht të shpeshta. Për shembull, të gjitha gjuhët kanë fjalë, ndërsa shumica-por jo të gjitha-gjuhët kanë një /u/ sound. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim trajtimin e parë probabilist të një pyetje bazë në tipologjinë fonologjike: çfarë bën një inventar natyror të vogël? Ne paraqesim një seri procesesh të thella stokastike dhe i kontrastojmë ato me metodat e mëparshme të llogaritjes, të bazuara në simulim. Ne ofrojmë një kompleks eksperimentesh në mbi 200 gjuhë të ndryshme.', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক টাইপোলজি মানব ভাষায় উপস্থিত কাঠামোর সীমা গবেষণা করছে। ক্ষেত্রের প্রধান লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে আবিষ্কার করা যায় কোন সম্ভাব্য ঘটনা সার্বাভাবিক, আর যা মাত্র প্রায়শই। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, সমস্ত ভাষাগুলোর প্রতিশ্রুতি রয়েছে, যদিও বেশীরভাগ ভাষার মধ্যে /u/ sound নেই। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ফোলোজিক্যাল টাইপোলজিয়ার একটি মৌলিক প্রশ্নের প্রথম সম্ভাব্য চিকিৎসা উপস্থাপন করছি: প্রাকৃতিক প্রতিজ আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি গভীর স্টোকাস্টিক পয়েন্ট প্রক্রিয়াকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি এবং তাদের পূর্ববর্তী গণনায়, সিমুলেশন ভিত্ত আমরা ২০০ বিভিন্ন ভাষায় পরীক্ষার সম্পূর্ণ স্যুট প্রদান করি।', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ጥያቄ መግለጫ በሰው ቋንቋ ውስጥ ያሉትን ሥርዓቶች ያስተምራል፡፡ የሜዳው መጀመሪያ ጉዳይ የቻልባዊ አካባቢ የሆነውን ነገር ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ ቋንቋዎች ሁሉ ስእለቶች አላቸው፣ ብዙዎቹ ግን ቋንቋዎች ሁሉ አይደሉም /u/ ድምፅ አላቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የመጀመሪያውን የፎሎጂ ጥያቄ ጥያቄን ለመቀበል የምናስፈልገው የፍጥረት ስእለት ማሳየት ምን ነው? ብዙ ጥልቅ የጥልቅ ጥቁር ነጥቦችን እናሳውቃቸዋለን፣ የቀድሞው ሰብሰባዊ፣ በተመሳሳይ ሥርዓት እናተካክላቸዋለን፡፡ በ200 ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የውጤት ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեզվաբանական տիպոլոգիան ուսումնասիրում է մարդկային լեզում գոյություն ունեցող կառուցվածքների շարքը: The main goal of the field is to discover which sets of possible phenomena are universal, and which are merely frequent.  Օրինակ, բոլոր լեզուներն ունեն ձայներ, մինչդեռ բոլոր լեզուների մեծամասնությունը, բայց ոչ բոլոր լեզուներն ունեն ձայներ։ In this paper we present the first probabilistic treatment of a basic question in phonological typology: What makes a natural vowel inventory?  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շարք խորը սթոշատիկ կետի գործընթացներ և հակադրում ենք դրանք նախկին հաշվարկների, սիմուլյացիայի հիմնված մոտեցումների հետ: Մենք տրամադրում ենք մի ամբողջական փորձարկումներ ավելի քան 200 տարբեր լեզուներով:', 'az': 'Linguistik tipologiya insan dilində bulunan yapıların səviyyəsini təhsil edir. Bu sahənin ən böyük məqsədi mümkün fenomenlərin nəyi universel və çox sıxıntılı olduğunu keçməkdir. Məsələn, bütün dillərin səsi var, lakin çox dillərin /u/ səsi olmadığı üçün. Bu kağızda fonolojik tipologiyada ilk mümkün olaraq bir sual təhsil edirik: təbiətli səs in şaatçısı nədir? Biz bir çox çətin stokastik nöqtələri təşkil edirik və əvvəlki hesablama, simulasiya tabanlı təsirlərlə qarşılaşırıq. Biz 200-dən fazla müxtəlif dillərdə müxtəlif təcrübələr təyin edirik.', 'et': 'Keeleline tüpoloogia uurib inimkeeles esinevate struktuuride ulatust. Valdkonna peamine eesmärk on avastada, millised võimalikud nähtused on universaalsed ja millised on lihtsalt sagedased. Näiteks on kõigil keeltel vokaalid, kuid mitte kõigil keeltel on hääl /u/. Käesolevas töös tutvustame fonoloogilise tüpoloogia põhiküsimuse esimest tõenäosuslikku käsitlust: Mis teeb loomuliku vokaalide inventuuri? Tutvustame mitmeid sügavate stohhastiliste punktide protsesse ja kontrasteerime neid varasemate arvutuslike, simulatsioonipõhiste lähenemisviisidega. Pakume laiaulatuslikku eksperimentide komplekti üle 200 erineva keele.', 'bs': 'Lingistička tipologija ispitiva raspon struktura koje postoje na ljudskom jeziku. Glavni cilj polja je otkriti koji su seti mogućih fenomena univerzalni i koji su samo često. Na primjer, svi jezici imaju povjete, dok većina jezika ne imaju /u/ zvuk. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo verovatno liječenje osnovnog pitanja u fonološkoj tipologiji: Što čini prirodni inventar povraćanja? Predstavljamo niz dubokih stokastičnih procesa, i suprotstavljamo ih sa prethodnim računalnim, simulacijskim pristupima. Mi pružamo sveobuhvatan apartman eksperimenata na preko 200 različitih jezika.', 'cs': 'Jazyková typologie studuje rozsah struktur přítomných v lidském jazyce. Hlavním cílem oboru je zjistit, které soubory možných jevů jsou univerzální a které jsou pouze časté. Například všechny jazyky mají samohlásky, zatímco většina jazyků má zvuk /u/. V tomto článku představujeme první pravděpodobnostní léčbu základní otázky fonologické typologie: Co dělá přirozený inventář samohlásek? Představujeme řadu hlubokých stochastických bodových procesů a kontrastujeme je s předchozími výpočetními, simulačními přístupy. Poskytujeme komplexní sadu experimentů na více než 200 různých jazycích.', 'fi': 'Kielellinen typologia tutkii ihmisen kielessä esiintyvien rakenteiden kirjoa. Kentän päätavoitteena on selvittää, mitkä mahdolliset ilmiöt ovat yleismaailmallisia ja mitkä ovat vain yleisiä. Esimerkiksi kaikilla kielillä on vokaaleja, kun taas useimmilla kielillä on /u/-ääni. Tässä työssä esitellään fonologisen typologian peruskysymyksen ensimmäinen todennäköisyyskäsittely: Mikä tekee luonnollisen vokaaliinventaarion? Esittelemme sarjan syvästokastisia pisteprosesseja ja vertaamme niitä aikaisempiin laskennallisiin simulaatiopohjaisiin lähestymistapoihin. Tarjoamme kattavan valikoiman kokeiluja yli 200 eri kielellä.', 'ca': "La tipologia lingüística estudia la gama d'estructures presents en el llenguatge humà. L'objectiu principal del camp és descobrir quins grups de fenomens possibles són universals i que són simplement freqüents. For example, all languages have vowels, while most-but not all-languages have an /u/ sound.  En aquest article presentem el primer tractament probabilista d'una pregunta bàsica en la tipologia fonològica: Què fa un inventari natural de vowels? Introduïm una sèrie de processos de punts estàstics profunds, i els contrastem amb abords anteriors basats en simulació. We provide a comprehensive suite of experiments on over 200 distinct languages.", 'jv': 'Tiperbudhakan langkung Tarjamahan sing dipunanggé ning parang iki dadi kanggo kedagatan iki apa sing berarti apa perusahaan, lan iki dadi akeh apik dhéwé. Ballot, wong limun sumung dibenakake, njuk dianggo wong-wong liyane mung liyane: /u/sung. Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan langkung sampeyan kawet sekang pangrungan kelas nang tikipon parangan: sing diandelah sing apik dhéwé, awak dhéwé ngerasakno parangan sing apik ? Awak dhéwé ngéwé éntukno sistem sing nggawe stokastik dadi, lan ingkang karbote panelusuran mulasar Awak dhéwé ngewehke nggawe winih kanggo tukang karo 200 luwih akeh luwih apik.', 'sk': 'Jezikovna tipologija preučuje obseg struktur, prisotnih v človeškem jeziku. Glavni cilj polja je odkriti, kateri nabori možnih pojavov so univerzalni in kateri so zgolj pogosti. Na primer, vsi jeziki imajo samoglasnike, medtem ko ima večina – vendar ne vsi – zvok /u/. V prispevku predstavljamo prvo verjetnostno obravnavo osnovnega vprašanja v fonološki tipologiji: Kaj naredi naravni inventar samoglasnikov? Predstavljamo vrsto globokih stohastičnih točkovnih procesov in jih kontrastiramo s prejšnjimi računalniškimi, simulacijskimi pristopi. Nudimo celovit nabor eksperimentov na več kot 200 različnih jezikih.', 'ha': "Taƙailogi na cikin linguistic na karanta ƙidãya masu tsari da ke da cikin harshen mutum. Gabincin bangon field ne dõmin ka gane wanne masu yiwuwa masu iya ƙayyade abu na universal, da kuma masu sauri ne. For example, all languages have vowels, while most-but not all-languages have an /u/ sound.  Ga wannan takarda, Munã halatar da mataimaki na farkon mataimaki a matsayin tambayar kima a cikin folojiki: Mẽne ne ke sami wani rabon sarauta a kangara? Tuna fara da wasu masu kashewa na-point, kuma Muke tsohitar da su a gabani na matsayin da aka samu'a. Munã samar da jarrabi masu kamfata cikin 200 masu cikin harshen dabam-dabam.", 'he': 'טיפולוגיה שפתית חוקרת את טווח המבנים הנוכחים בשפה האנושית. המטרה העיקרית של השדה היא לגלות אילו סדרות של תופעות אפשריות הן אוניברסליות, והן פשוט תדירות. לדוגמה, לכל שפות יש נדרים, בעוד לרוב-אבל לא כל-שפות יש /u/ קול. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מציגים את הטיפול הסביר הראשון של שאלה בסיסית בטיפולוגיה פונולוגית: אנחנו מציגים סדרה של תהליכים עמוקים של נקודות סטוקאסטיות, ולהשתנות בהם עם גישות מחשביות קודמות, מבוססות על סימולציה. אנחנו מספקים סוויטה כללית של ניסויים על מעל 200 שפות בודדות.', 'bo': 'Linguistic typology studies the range of structures present in human language. སྒེར་གྱི་རྩ་བའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་མཐོང་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གང་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་རྟོགས་ན། དཔེར་ན། སྐད་རིགས་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་འཁྲིད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་སྐད་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་མིན་འདུག /u/ སྐད་ཡིག་དང་། འོག ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་ཀར་བའི་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་མི་ཁྱད་པར་བརྟན་པར་ཆ་༢༠༠་ཙམ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་བསྡུར་ཚན་ཡོད་པ་བྱིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'ar': 'تعلم متعدد المعايير الخصوم لتجزئة الكلمة الصينية', 'fr': 'Apprentissage multi-critères contradictoire pour la segmentation des mots chinois', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Adversarial Multicritérios para Segmentação de Palavras em Chinês', 'es': 'Aprendizaje contradictorio de múltiples criterios para la segmentación de palabras en chino', 'ja': '中国語の単語セグメンテーションのための対立的な多基準学習', 'zh': '汉语分词者对抗性多格学', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल बहु मानदंड चीनी शब्द विभाजन के लिए सीखना', 'ru': 'Состязательное многокритериальное обучение для сегментации китайского слова', 'ga': 'Ilchritéir Sháraíochta ag Foghlaim le haghaidh Deighilt Focal Síneach', 'ka': 'ჩინეთის სიტყვების სიგრძნობის მეტი კრიტერიების სწავლება', 'hu': 'Adversariális többkritériumos tanulás a kínai szószegmentációhoz', 'el': 'Αντίθετα εκμάθηση πολλαπλών κριτηρίων για την κινεζική τμηματοποίηση λέξεων', 'it': 'Apprendimento multiplo avverso per la segmentazione di parole cinesi', 'kk': 'Қытай сөз сегментациясы үшін көптеген көптеген критериялар оқу', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujami daugiakriteriniai mokymosi kinų žodžių segmentacijai kriterijai', 'mk': 'Научи противречни мултикритерии за сегментација на кинески зборови', 'mn': 'Хятад үгийн хэвлэлийн тухай олон шалтгаан суралцах', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Multi-Kriteria Berlawan untuk Segmentasi Kata Cina', 'no': 'Rekursarialt fleire kriteria læring for kinesisk ordsegmentasjon', 'pl': 'Uczenie się wielu kryteriów przeciwnych dla segmentacji słów chińskich', 'ro': 'Învățare adversară multi-criterii pentru segmentarea cuvintelor chinezești', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് വാക്ക് വേര്\u200dഡ് വേര്\u200dപെരുമാറ്റുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി മുന്\u200dഗണന പല-ക്രിറ്ററിയ പഠിപ്പിക്', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Multikriterju Adversarju għal Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Ċiniżi', 'sr': 'Adversarialno višekriterijsko učenje za kinesku segmentaciju riječi', 'si': 'චීනි වචන සෙග්ටමින්ටර් සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විදියට ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning för kinesiska ordsegmentering', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iskuulaadka kala duduwan ee qeybinta hadalka Shiinaha', 'ur': 'چینی ویڈ سپٹمنٹ کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے مخالف بہت سی منصوبات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chương trình giáo huấn cho phân đoạn chữ Trung Quốc', 'bg': 'Рекламно многокритерийно обучение за сегментация на китайски думи', 'da': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning for Kinesisk ordsegmentering', 'hr': 'Adversarialno višekriterijsko učenje za kinesku segmentaciju riječi', 'nl': 'Tegenstrijdig Multi-Criteria Leren voor Chinese Woord Segmentatie', 'de': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning für chinesische Wortsegmentierung', 'ko': '중국어 분사의 대항식 다중 준칙 학습', 'fa': 'آموزش کلمه\u200cهای متفاوتی برای جدایی کلمه چینی', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Multi-Kriteria Adversarial untuk Segmentasi Kata Cina', 'sw': 'Kifundo cha Kugaidi Zaidi cha Zaidi kwa ajili ya Kugawanywa kwa neno la China', 'sq': 'Mësimi kundërshtar i shumëkritereve për segmentimin e fjalëve kineze', 'tr': 'Çinçe söz segmentasiýasy üçin öwrenmek üçin näçe Kriteriýasy', 'af': 'Adversariale Multi-Criteria Leer vir Sjinese Woord Segmentasie', 'am': 'የቻይና ቃላት አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի բառերի սեգմենցիայի համար բազմաթիվ հանգամանքներ սովորելը', 'az': '칂in Kelimi Segmentasyon 칲칞칲n 칬yr톛nm톛k m칲톛llif 칞oxlu Kriteri', 'bn': 'চীনা শব্দ বিভাগের জন্য পার্থক্যের মাল্টিক ক্রিয়ারিয়া শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Adversarialno višekriterijsko učenje za kinesku segmentaciju riječi', 'ca': 'Aprendència multicritèria adversaria per la segmentació de paraules xinesa', 'cs': 'Nepříznivé vícekritérií učení pro segmentaci čínských slov', 'et': 'Hiina sõna segmentatsiooni jaoks mõeldud mitmekriteeriumiline õppimine', 'fi': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'jv': 'Perusahaan Multi-Kreteri sing Ngerti kanggo Kegambar Kemerdekaan Winih', 'sk': 'Neželeno večkriterijsko učenje za segmentacijo kitajskih besed', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Adversarial Multi-Criteria Learning for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་རྗེས་སུ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཆེ་བ་མང་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Different linguistic perspectives causes many diverse segmentation criteria for Chinese word segmentation (CWS). Most existing methods focus on improve the performance for each single criterion. However, it is interesting to exploit these different criteria and mining their common underlying knowledge. In this paper, we propose adversarial multi-criteria learning for CWS by integrating shared knowledge from multiple heterogeneous segmentation criteria. Experiments on eight corpora with heterogeneous segmentation criteria show that the performance of each corpus obtains a significant improvement, compared to single-criterion learning. Source codes of this paper are available on Github.', 'pt': 'Diferentes perspectivas linguísticas causam muitos critérios de segmentação diversos para a segmentação de palavras chinesas (CWS). A maioria dos métodos existentes se concentra em melhorar o desempenho de cada critério único. No entanto, é interessante explorar esses diferentes critérios e explorar seus conhecimentos subjacentes comuns. Neste artigo, propomos aprendizagem multicritério adversarial para CWS, integrando conhecimento compartilhado de vários critérios de segmentação heterogêneos. Experimentos em oito corpora com critérios de segmentação heterogêneos mostram que o desempenho de cada corpus obtém uma melhora significativa em relação ao aprendizado de critério único. Os códigos-fonte deste artigo estão disponíveis no Github.', 'fr': "Les différentes perspectives linguistiques entraînent de nombreux critères de segmentation différents pour la segmentation des mots chinois (CWS). La plupart des méthodes existantes se concentrent sur l'amélioration de la performance pour chaque critère. Cependant, il est intéressant d'exploiter ces différents critères et d'explorer leurs connaissances sous-jacentes communes. Dans cet article, nous proposons un apprentissage multicritère contradictoire pour le SCF en intégrant des connaissances partagées à partir de plusieurs critères de segmentation hétérogènes. Des expériences sur huit corpus avec des critères de segmentation hétérogènes montrent que les performances de chaque corpus obtiennent une amélioration significative par rapport à l'apprentissage à un seul critère. Les codes sources de ce document sont disponibles sur Github.", 'ar': 'تؤدي وجهات النظر اللغوية المختلفة إلى العديد من معايير التجزئة المتنوعة لتجزئة الكلمات الصينية (CWS). تركز معظم الأساليب الحالية على تحسين الأداء لكل معيار على حدة. ومع ذلك ، فمن المثير للاهتمام استغلال هذه المعايير المختلفة والتنقيب عن معارفهم الأساسية المشتركة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح التعلم العدائي متعدد المعايير لـ CWS من خلال دمج المعرفة المشتركة من معايير التجزئة المتعددة غير المتجانسة. تظهر التجارب على ثماني مجموعات بمعايير تجزئة غير متجانسة أن أداء كل مجموعة يحصل على تحسن كبير ، مقارنة بالتعلم بمعيار واحد. رموز المصدر لهذه الورقة متاحة على جيثب.', 'es': 'Las diferentes perspectivas lingüísticas provocan muchos criterios de segmentación diversos para la segmentación de palabras en chino (CWS). La mayoría de los métodos existentes se centran en mejorar el rendimiento de cada criterio individual. Sin embargo, es interesante explotar estos diferentes criterios y extraer su conocimiento subyacente común. En este artículo, proponemos el aprendizaje contradictorio de múltiples criterios para CWS mediante la integración del conocimiento compartido de múltiples criterios de segmentación heterogéneos. Los experimentos en ocho cuerpos con criterios de segmentación heterogéneos muestran que el rendimiento de cada corpus obtiene una mejora significativa, en comparación con el aprendizaje de un solo criterio. Los códigos fuente de este documento están disponibles en Github.', 'ja': '異なる言語学的視点は、中国語の単語セグメンテーション（ CWS ）のための多くの多様なセグメンテーション基準を引き起こす。ほとんどの既存の方法は、単一の基準ごとにパフォーマンスを向上させることに焦点を当てています。しかし、これらの異なる基準を活用し、それらの共通の基礎知識をマイニングすることは興味深い。本稿では，複数の異種セグメンテーション基準からの共有知識を統合することにより， CWSの対抗的な多基準学習を提案する．不均一なセグメンテーション基準を備えた8つのコーパスの実験では、各コーパスのパフォーマンスが単一基準の学習と比較して有意な改善を得ることが示されています。本稿のソースコードはGithubで入手可能である。', 'zh': '异言视角致汉语分词(CWS)多异分词。 多见法侧重于增单一标准性能。 然用此异而掘其所同基础知识甚有趣也。 于本文中,整合自多异构分格共享,立CWS对抗性多法。 异构八者语料库实验明,比于单学,语料库性显改。 本文源代码可于Github上得之。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न भाषाई दृष्टिकोण चीनी शब्द विभाजन (CWS) के लिए कई विविध विभाजन मानदंडों का कारण बनता है। अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीके प्रत्येक एकल मानदंड के लिए प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, इन विभिन्न मानदंडों का शोषण करना और उनके सामान्य अंतर्निहित ज्ञान को खनन करना दिलचस्प है। इस पेपर में, हम कई विषम विभाजन मानदंडों से साझा ज्ञान को एकीकृत करके सीडब्ल्यूएस के लिए प्रतिकूल बहु-मानदंड सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विषम विभाजन मानदंडों के साथ आठ कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रत्येक कॉर्पस का प्रदर्शन एकल-मानदंड सीखने की तुलना में एक महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है। इस पेपर के स्रोत कोड Github पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Различные лингвистические перспективы вызывают множество различных критериев сегментации для сегментации китайского слова (CWS). Большинство существующих методов нацелены на улучшение показателей по каждому отдельному критерию. Однако интересно использовать эти различные критерии и извлекать из них общие базовые знания. В этой статье мы предлагаем состязательное многокритериальное обучение для CWS путем интеграции общих знаний из нескольких гетерогенных критериев сегментации. Эксперименты на восьми телах с критериями гетерогенной сегментации показывают, что эффективность каждого тела значительно улучшается по сравнению с обучением по одному критерию. Исходные коды этой статьи доступны на Github.', 'ga': 'Is iomaí critéar éagsúil deighilte is cúis le peirspictíochtaí teanga éagsúla le haghaidh deighilt focal Síneach (CWS). Díríonn an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann cheana ar fheidhmíocht a fheabhsú do gach critéar amháin. Is spéisiúil, áfach, na critéir éagsúla seo a shaothrú agus a mbuneolas coiteann a mhianadóireacht. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid foghlaim sháraíochta ilchritéir le haghaidh CWS trí eolas roinnte a chomhtháthú ó chritéir deighilte ilchineálach. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar ocht gcorpas ina bhfuil critéir deighilte ilchineálacha go bhfuil feabhas suntasach tagtha ar fheidhmíocht gach corpais, i gcomparáid le foghlaim aonchritéar. Tá cóid foinse an pháipéir seo ar fáil ar Github.', 'hu': 'A különböző nyelvi perspektívák számos különböző szegmentációs kritériumot okoznak a kínai szószegmentáció (CWS). A legtöbb meglévő módszer az egyes kritériumok teljesítményének javítására összpontosít. Érdekes azonban kihasználni ezeket a különböző kritériumokat és kihasználni azok közös alapjait. Ebben a tanulmányban a CWS számára több heterogén szegmentációs kritériumokból származó megosztott tudás integrálásával javasoljuk az ellentétes több kritériumot érintő tanulást. Heterogén szegmentációs kritériumokkal rendelkező nyolc korpuszon végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az egyes korpuszok teljesítménye jelentős javulást ér el az egykritériumos tanuláshoz képest. A tanulmány forráskódja elérhető a Github-on.', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული ლენგურისტიკური პერსპექტიკები უფრო განსხვავებული სექმენტიკური კრიტირები ჩინეთის სიტყვების სექმენტიკურად (CWS). ყველა ერთი კრიტერიისთვის უფრო მხოლოდ არსებობს პროცემების კონუქტირებაზე. თუმცა, ეს განსხვავებული კრიტერიტების გამოყენება და საერთო საშუალო ცნობილების გამოყენება საინტერესოა. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ უნდა გავიწყვებთ, რომ CWS-ის განსაკუთრებული მრავალ კრიტერიტების სწავლებას, რამდენიმე heterogeneous segmentation კრიტერიტების განსაკუთრებით ერთადერთი ცო 8 კოპორაზე ეტეეროგენური სექმენტის კრიტერიტებით გამოცდილობა ჩვენებს, რომ ყოველ კოპპუსის გამოცდილობა მიიღება მნიშვნელოვანი დააწყება, რომელიც ერთი კრიტერი ჲგჲ£ დჲჟოჲეაპ კჲე£ა ვ ნა დთრსბ.', 'el': 'Διαφορετικές γλωσσικές προοπτικές προκαλούν πολλά διαφορετικά κριτήρια κατάτμησης για την κινεζική κατάτμηση λέξεων (CWS). Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι επικεντρώνονται στη βελτίωση της απόδοσης για κάθε κριτήριο. Ωστόσο, είναι ενδιαφέρον να εκμεταλλευτούν αυτά τα διαφορετικά κριτήρια και να εξορυχθούν οι κοινές βασικές γνώσεις τους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε την αντικρουόμενη εκμάθηση πολλαπλών κριτηρίων για το CWS ενσωματώνοντας κοινή γνώση από πολλαπλά ετερογενή κριτήρια κατακερματισμού. Τα πειράματα σε οκτώ σώματα με ετερογενή κριτήρια κατακερματισμού δείχνουν ότι η απόδοση κάθε σώματος επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση σε σύγκριση με την εκμάθηση ενός κριτηρίου. Οι πηγαίοι κωδικοί αυτού του άρθρου είναι διαθέσιμοι στο Github.', 'it': "Diverse prospettive linguistiche causano molti diversi criteri di segmentazione per la segmentazione delle parole cinesi (CWS). La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti si concentra sul miglioramento delle prestazioni per ogni singolo criterio. Tuttavia, è interessante sfruttare questi diversi criteri e sfruttare le loro conoscenze di base comuni. In questo articolo, proponiamo l'apprendimento multi-criterio avversario per CWS integrando conoscenze condivise da molteplici criteri di segmentazione eterogenei. Esperimenti su otto corpi con criteri di segmentazione eterogenei mostrano che le prestazioni di ciascun corpo ottengono un miglioramento significativo, rispetto all'apprendimento a singolo criterio. I codici sorgente di questo articolo sono disponibili su Github.", 'kk': 'Түрлі лингвистикалық перспективтер қытайша сөз сегментациясы (CWS) үшін көптеген сегментациялық критерияларын сеңдейді. Бар әрбір критерия үшін әрекетті жақсартуға көбірек әдістер көмектеседі. Бірақ, бұл түрлі критерияларды жұмыс істеу және олардың жалпы білімдерін бағалау қызықты. Бұл қағазда, біз CWS үшін бірнеше гетероген сегментациялық критерияларынан бөлікті білімдерді біріктіру арқылы негатриялық көп критериялық оқытуды ұсынамыз. Сегіз корпораға тегероген сегментациялық критерияларының тәжірибесі, әрбір корпустың істеуі бір критериялық оқытуға салыстырып, маңызды жақсартылығын көрсетеді. Бұл қағаздың көзі кодтары Github- да бар.', 'lt': 'Skirtingos kalbinės perspektyvos sukelia daug įvairių Kinijos žodžių segmentacijos kriterijų (CWS). Daugumoje esamų metodų daugiausia dėmesio skiriama kiekvieno kriterijaus veiksmingumui gerinti. Vis dėlto įdomu išnaudoti šiuos skirtingus kriterijus ir panaudoti jų bendrąsias pagrindines žinias. Šiame dokumente siūlome prieštaringą daugiakriterišką CWS mokymąsi integruojant bendras žinias iš įvairių įvairiapusių segmentacijos kriterijų. Eksperimentai su a štuoniais korporais su heterogeniniais segmentacijos kriterijais rodo, kad kiekvieno korpuso veiksmingumas gerokai pagerėja, palyginti su vieno kriterijaus mokymusi. Šio dokumento šaltiniai pateikiami Github tinklalapyje.', 'ms': 'Perspektif bahasa berbeza menyebabkan banyak kriteria segmen berbeza untuk segmen perkataan Cina (CWS). Most existing methods focus on improve the performance for each single criterion.  Namun, ia menarik untuk mengeksploitasi kriteria-kriteria yang berbeza ini dan mengembangkan pengetahuan dasar umum mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pembelajaran berbagai kriteria musuh untuk CWS dengan mengintegrasikan pengetahuan berkongsi dari kriteria segmentasi berbilang heterogen. Eksperimen pada lapan korpra dengan kriteria segmen heterogeni menunjukkan bahawa prestasi setiap korpus mendapatkan peningkatan yang signifikan, dibandingkan dengan pelajaran-kriteria tunggal. Kod sumber kertas ini tersedia pada Github.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d ചൈനീസ് വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗ നിലവിലുള്ള മികച്ച രീതികളില്\u200d ഓരോ വ്യവസ്ഥയ്ക്കും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും, അവയുടെ പൊതുവായ അറിവ് കുറവാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് വളരെ ര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിരോധമായ പല ക്രിയറികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സിഡബ്ലിസിന് വേണ്ടി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച എല്ലാ കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെയും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒറ്റയ്ക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d തുല്യമായ ഒരു മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ സ്രോതസ്സ് കോഡുകള്\u200d ഗിത്തുബില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Perspettivi lingwistiċi differenti jikkawżaw ħafna kriterji ta’ segmentazzjoni differenti għas-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem Ċiniż (CWS). Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi eżistenti jiffukaw fuq it-titjib tal-prestazzjoni għal kull kriterju uniku. Madankollu, huwa interessanti li dawn il-kriterji differenti jiġu sfruttati u li l-għarfien sottostanti komuni tagħhom jinħadem fil-minjieri. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu tagħlim avversarju b’diversi kriterji għas-CWS billi nintegraw l-għarfien kondiviż minn diversi kriterji ta’ segmentazzjoni eteroġena. L-esperimenti fuq tmien korpi b’kriterji ta’ segmentazzjoni eteroġeniċi juru li l-prestazzjoni ta’ kull korpus tikseb titjib sinifikanti, meta mqabbel mat-tagħlim ta’ kriterju wieħed. Il-kodiċijiet tas-sors ta’ din id-dokument huma disponibbli fuq Github.', 'mk': 'Different linguistic perspectives causes many diverse segmentation criteria for Chinese word segmentation (CWS).  Повеќето постоечки методи се фокусираат на подобрување на перформансата за секој единствен критериум. Сепак, интересно е да се искористат овие различни критериуми и да се минираат нивните заеднички основни знаења. Во овој документ, предложуваме непријателско мултикритериумско учење за ЦВС со интеграција на споделено знаење од многуте хетерогени критериуми за сегментација. Експериментите на осум корпора со хетерогенски критериуми за сегментација покажуваат дека успехот на секој корпус постигнува значително подобрување, во споредба со еднокритериумското учење. Изворните кодови на оваа хартија се достапни на Гитуб.', 'mn': 'Өөр өөр хэлний үзэл нь Хятад үгийн хэлбэрийн загварын олон төрлийн загварын шаардлагатай. Хамгийн ихэнх арга зам нь нэг шалтгаан бүрт ажиллагааг сайжруулахад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр өөр шалтгаануудыг ашиглаж, ерөнхий үндсэн мэдлэгийг цэвэрлэх нь сонирхолтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CWS-ийн хувьд хэдэн гетерогены хэмжээсүүдийн хуваалтын мэдлэг бүрдүүлж эсрэг олон хэмжээсүүдийг суралцаж байна. 8 корпора-ын туршилт нь нэг хэмжээст суралцахаас харьцуулахад корпорус бүр үр дүнтэй сайжруулах нь чухал сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ цаасын эх үүсвэрийн код Github дээр гарч байна.', 'no': 'Dei ulike lingviske perspektiva fører til mange ulike segmenteringskriterier for kinesisk ordsegmentering (CWS). Dei fleste eksisterande metodane fokuserer på å forbetra utviklinga for kvar enkelt kriteriet. Det er imidlertid interessant å bruka desse forskjellige kriteriene og minne sine felles underliggende kunnskap. I denne papiret foreslår vi negativt fleire kriterier å lære for CWS ved å integrere delte kunnskap frå fleire heterogeneske segmenteringskriterier. Eksperimentar på åtte korporar med heterogenene segmentasjonsskriterier viser at utviklinga av kvar korpus får ein betydelig forbedring, sammenlignet med læring av enkelte kriterier. Kjeldekode for denne papiret er tilgjengeleg på Github.', 'pl': 'Różne perspektywy językowe powodują wiele zróżnicowanych kryteriów segmentacji słów chińskich (CWS). Większość istniejących metod skupia się na poprawie wydajności dla każdego pojedynczego kryterium. Interesujące jest jednak wykorzystanie tych różnych kryteriów i wydobycie ich wspólnej wiedzy podstawowej. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wielokrytalne uczenie się dla CWS poprzez integrację wspólnej wiedzy z wielu heterogenicznych kryteriów segmentacji. Eksperymenty na ośmiu korpusach o heterogenicznych kryteriach segmentacji pokazują, że wydajność każdego korpusu uzyskuje znaczącą poprawę w porównaniu do uczenia się pojedynczego kryterium. Kody źródłowe niniejszego artykułu są dostępne na Github.', 'ro': 'Perspectivele lingvistice diferite determină multe criterii de segmentare diverse pentru segmentarea cuvintelor chinezești (CWS). Majoritatea metodelor existente se concentrează pe îmbunătățirea performanței pentru fiecare criteriu unic. Cu toate acestea, este interesant să exploatăm aceste criterii diferite și să exploatăm cunoștințele lor comune de bază. În această lucrare, propunem învățarea adversară multi-criterii pentru CWS prin integrarea cunoștințelor partajate din criterii multiple de segmentare eterogene. Experimentele pe opt corpuri cu criterii de segmentare eterogene arată că performanța fiecărui corp obține o îmbunătățire semnificativă, comparativ cu învățarea pe un singur criteriu. Codurile sursă ale acestei lucrări sunt disponibile pe Github.', 'sr': 'Različite jezičke perspektive uzrokuju mnoge različite kriterije segmentacije za kinesku segmentaciju riječi (CWS). Većina postojećih metoda se fokusirala na poboljšanje učinka svakog kriterija. Međutim, interesantno je iskoristiti te različite kriterije i rudarstvo njihovih zajedničkih temeljnih znanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo protivno učenje multikriterija za CWS integracijom zajedničkog znanja iz višestrukih heterogeneznih kriterija segmentacije. Eksperimenti na osam korporacija sa heterogeneznim kriterijama segmentacije pokazuju da funkcija svakog korpora dobija značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi sa učenjem jednokriterija. Izvorni kodovi ove papire su dostupni na Githubu.', 'si': 'වෙනස් භාෂාවික විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් චීනි වචන විශේෂ විශේෂ (CWS) වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් සෙ හැම විශේෂයෙක්ම විශේෂයෙක්ම විශේෂය වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අවධානය කරන්න. නමුත්, මේ වෙනස් විශේෂ අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න පුළුවන්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ CWS වෙනුවෙන් විරෝධ විශේෂ විශේෂ වලින් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ හැම කොර්පෝස්ටර් 8ක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට හැම කොර්පෝස්ටර් ගැන ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ම ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩ මේ පත්තරේ මුළු කෝඩ් තියෙන්නේ Github වල.', 'so': 'Fiiriga luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay leedahay qeybo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan qeybinta qoraalka Shiino (CWS). Inta badan qaababka joogta ah waxay ku kalsoonaadaan horumarinta horumarinta qofka isku qiimeeya. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waa xiiso inaad isticmaasho qiimahaan kala duduwan oo aad u kaydsatid aqoontooda hoose ee caadiga ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa wax barashada CWS oo ka gees ah, si aan aqoonta loo qeybiyo qeybaha kala duduwan oo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka siddeed shirkadood oo ay ku jiraan qeybaha jimicsiga ah waxay muuqataa in tababarka qof kastaaba uu helaa hagaajin aad u weyn, barbarta waxbarashada gaarka ah. Qoidaha warqaddan waxaad ka heleysaa Github.', 'sv': 'Olika språkliga perspektiv orsakar många olika segmenteringskriterier för kinesiska ordsegmentering (CWS). De flesta befintliga metoderna fokuserar på att förbättra resultaten för varje enskilt kriterium. Det är dock intressant att utnyttja dessa olika kriterier och utvinna deras gemensamma underliggande kunskap. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi kontradiktorisk multi-criteria learning för CWS genom att integrera delad kunskap från flera heterogena segmenteringskriterier. Experiment på åtta korpus med heterogena segmenteringskriterier visar att prestationen för varje korpus erhåller en signifikant förbättring jämfört med enskriterielärande. Källkoder för denna uppsats finns tillgängliga på Github.', 'ta': 'Different linguistic perspectives causes many diverse segmentation criteria for Chinese word segmentation (CWS).  பெரும்பாலான இருக்கும் முறைகளில் ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்பிற்கும் முன்னேற்றத்தை மேம்படுத்தும் பொ ஆனால், இந்த வேறு நிறைவேறு நிறுவனங்களை பயன்படுத்தி அவர்களுடைய பொது அடிப்படையான அறிவை குறைக்க ஆர்வமானது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் CWS க்கான பல்வேறு நிறுவனங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முன்னோடுகிறோம் பல வெற்றி பிரிவு வகுப்பு முறைகளிலிருந எட்டு நிறுவனத்தில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் வெற்றிகரமான பிரிவு குறிப்புகளுடன் காட்டுகிறது ஒவ்வொரு குறும்புகளின் செயல்பாடு ஒரு முக்கியமான முன் இந்த தாளின் மூல குறியீடுகள் கித்துப் மீது கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'مختلف زبان کی نظریں چینی لفظ (CWS) کے لئے بہت سی مختلف سیگنٹ کیٹریٹی کرتی ہیں۔ سب سے زیادہ موجود طریقے ہر ایک کریٹریر کے لئے فعالیت کو بہتر کرنا چاہتے ہیں. لیکن یہ بہت اچھا ہے کہ ان مختلف مقداروں کو استعمال کریں اور ان کے معاملہ علم کو کم کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم CWS کے لئے مخالف مخالف بہت سی کریٹریتوں کی تعلیم دینے کے ذریعہ مشترک علم کو متحد کر رہے ہیں۔ آٹھ کورپورا کے آزمائش کے ساتھ مختلف سیگنٹ کیٹریٹیوں کے ساتھ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہر کورپوس کی فعالیت ایک کریٹریٹر کی تعلیم کے مقابلہ میں ایک بڑی زیادتی حاصل کرتی ہے اس کاغذ کے سراسر کوڈ Github پر موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info Koʻpchilik mavjud usullar har bir bir kriteri uchun bajarish imkoniyatini oshirish uchun foydalanadi. Lekin, bu turli kriteridan foydalanishga qiziqarli bo'ladi va ularning umumiy asosiy bilimni qo'yish uchun juda qiziqarli. Bu qogʻozda, biz CWS uchun tizim tizimini o'rganishni ko'pchilik darajalarini bir necha katta ajratish darajalaridan birlashtirish mumkin. Har bir corpusning jarayonini o'rganish imtiyozlarini ko'rsatadi, har bir xil o'rganishdan ham juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishga ega. Bu qogʻozning manbasi Github'da mavjud.", 'vi': 'Nhiều triển vọng ngôn ngữ khác nhau gây ra nhiều tiêu chuẩn phân chia từ Trung Quốc. Hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại tập trung vào việc cải thiện lợi nhuận cho mỗi tiêu chuẩn. Tuy nhiên, rất thú vị khi tận dụng những tiêu chuẩn khác nhau và khai thác những kiến thức cơ bản chung của chúng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị học nhiều tiêu chuẩn khác nhau cho RWS bằng cách trộn những kiến thức chia sẻ với nhiều tiêu chuẩn khác nhau. Thí nghiệm trên tám cơ thể với các tiêu chuẩn phân biệt khác nhau cho thấy khả năng của mỗi cơ thể đạt được một tiến bộ đáng kể so với việc học bài độc lập. Mật mã gốc của tờ giấy này có ở Gitmo.', 'da': 'Forskellige sproglige perspektiver forårsager mange forskellige segmenteringskriterier for kinesisk ordsegmentering (CWS). De fleste eksisterende metoder fokuserer på at forbedre resultaterne for hvert enkelt kriterium. Det er imidlertid interessant at udnytte disse forskellige kriterier og udnytte deres fælles underliggende viden. I denne artikel foreslår vi modstridende multi-criteria learning for CWS ved at integrere delt viden fra flere heterogene segmenteringskriterier. Eksperimenter på otte korpuser med heterogene segmenteringskriterier viser, at præstationen af hvert korpus opnår en betydelig forbedring sammenlignet med enkeltkriteriet læring. Kildekoder til dette papir er tilgængelige på Github.', 'nl': "Verschillende linguïstische perspectieven veroorzaken veel verschillende segmentatiecriteria voor Chinese woordsegmentatie (CWS). De meeste bestaande methoden richten zich op het verbeteren van de prestaties voor elk criterium. Het is echter interessant om deze verschillende criteria te benutten en hun gemeenschappelijke onderliggende kennis te ontginnen. In dit artikel stellen we tegenstrijdig multi-criteria leren voor CWS voor door gedeelde kennis van meerdere heterogene segmentatiecriteria te integreren. Experimenten op acht corpora's met heterogene segmentatiecriteria tonen aan dat de prestaties van elk corpus een significante verbetering krijgen ten opzichte van single-criterium learning. Broncodes van dit artikel zijn beschikbaar op Github.", 'bg': 'Различните лингвистични перспективи предизвикват много различни критерии за сегментация на китайските думи. Повечето съществуващи методи се фокусират върху подобряване на ефективността за всеки отделен критерий. Интересно е обаче да се използват тези различни критерии и да се извличат техните общи основни познания. В настоящата статия предлагаме съперническо многокритерийно обучение за ХХС чрез интегриране на споделени знания от множество хетерогенни критерии за сегментиране. Експериментите върху осем корпуса с хетерогенни критерии за сегментиране показват, че представянето на всеки корпус получава значително подобрение в сравнение с обучението по един критерий. Източниците на тази статия са достъпни в Гитхъб.', 'hr': 'Različite jezičke perspektive uzrokuju mnoge različite kriterije segmentacije za kinesku segmentaciju riječi (CWS). Većina postojećih metoda usredotoči se na poboljšanje učinka svakog kriterija. Međutim, interesantno je iskoristiti te različite kriterije i rudarstvo njihovih zajedničkih temeljnih znanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo protivno učenje multikriterija za CWS integriranjem zajedničkih znanja iz višestrukih heterogenenih kriterija segmentacije. Eksperimenti o osam tijela s heterogeneznim kriterijama segmentacije pokazuju da učenje svakog korpusa dobiva značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi s učenjem jednokriterija. Izvorni kodovi ove papire su dostupni na Githubu.', 'de': 'Unterschiedliche linguistische Perspektiven führen zu vielen unterschiedlichen Segmentierungskriterien für die chinesische Wortsegmentierung (CWS). Die meisten bestehenden Methoden konzentrieren sich auf die Verbesserung der Leistung für jedes einzelne Kriterium. Es ist jedoch interessant, diese verschiedenen Kriterien zu nutzen und ihr gemeinsames Grundwissen zu gewinnen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir kontradiktorielles multikriterielles Lernen für CWS vor, indem gemeinsames Wissen aus mehreren heterogenen Segmentierungskriterien integriert wird. Experimente an acht Korporen mit heterogenen Segmentierungskriterien zeigen, dass die Leistung jedes Korpus gegenüber dem Einzelkriterium-Lernen signifikant verbessert wird. Quellcodes dieses Artikels sind auf Github verfügbar.', 'id': 'Perspektif bahasa berbeda menyebabkan banyak kriteria segmentasi berbeda untuk segmentasi kata Cina (CWS). Most existing methods focus on improve the performance for each single criterion.  Namun, menarik untuk mengeksploitasi kriteria-kriteria yang berbeda ini dan mengurangi pengetahuan dasar umum mereka. In this paper, we propose adversarial multi-criteria learning for CWS by integrating shared knowledge from multiple heterogeneous segmentation criteria.  Eksperimen pada delapan korpra dengan kriteria segmen heterogene menunjukkan bahwa prestasi setiap korpus mendapatkan peningkatan yang signifikan, dibandingkan dengan pelajaran satu-kriteria. Kode sumber kertas ini tersedia di Github.', 'fa': 'منظورهای زبان متفاوتی باعث میشه kriteria جدایی متفاوتی برای جدایی کلمات چینی (CWS) باشد. بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود روی عملکرد برای هر یک مقدار تمرکز می\u200cکند. اما جالب است که این شرایط مختلف را استفاده کنیم و دانش عمومی را خرید کنیم. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای CWS آموزش چندین مقدار مخالفت را با جمع کردن علم مشترک از مقدار جدایی متفاوت متفاوت از مجموعه\u200cهای متفاوت. تجربه\u200cهای هشت شرکت با شرکت\u200cهای جدایی متفاوتی نشان می\u200cدهد که عملکرد هر شرکت یک بهترین بزرگی را در مقایسه با یادگیری یک مقدار متفاوت می\u200cگیرد. کدهای منبع این کاغذ در گیتوب دسترسی دارند.', 'ko': '서로 다른 언어학적 시각은 중국어 분사 기준의 다양성을 초래했다.기존의 대다수 방법은 모든 표준의 성능을 향상시키는 데 중점을 두고 있다.그러나 이러한 서로 다른 기준을 이용하여 그들의 공통된 기초 지식을 발굴하는 것은 매우 흥미롭다.본고에서 우리는 CWS에 대한 대항식 다중 준칙 학습을 제시했고 여러 개의 이구분할 준칙으로부터의 공유 지식을 통합시켰다.8개의 이구적 절분 기준을 가진 원료 라이브러리에서 실시한 실험에 따르면 단일 표준 학습에 비해 모든 원료 라이브러리의 성능이 현저히 향상되었다.본문의 원본 코드는 Github에서 얻을 수 있습니다.', 'sw': 'Kwa mtazamo tofauti wa lugha unasababisha vigezo vingi vya mchanganyiko tofauti kwa mchanganyiko wa maneno ya China (CWS). mbinu nyingi zilizopo zinalenga kuboresha ufanisi wa kila kipimo. Hata hivyo, ni jambo la kuvutia kutumia vigezo hivi tofauti na kupunguza maarifa yao ya msingi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza vigezo vingi vingi vya upinzani vya kujifunza kwa ajili ya CWS kwa kuunganisha maarifa yanayoshirikiana na vigezo vingi vya kujitenga kwa jinsia mbalimbali. Experiments on eight corpora with heterogeneous segmentation criteria show that the performance of each corpus obtains a significant improvement, compared to single-criterion learning.  Alama za chanzo cha gazeti hili zinapatikana kwenye Github.', 'af': "Verskillende lingvisiese perspeksies veroorsaak baie verskillende segmentasie kriterie vir Sjinese woord segmentasie (CWS). Mees bestaande metodes fokus op die prestasie vir elke enkele kriterie op die verbetering van die prestasie. Maar dit is interessant om hierdie verskillende kriteriërs te gebruik en hulle gemeenskap ondersteunde kennis te minne. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons teenstandaarlike multikriteriër leer vir CWS deur gedeelde kennis te integreer van veelvuldige heterogeneese segmentasie kriteriërs. Eksperimente op agt korpora met heterogeneese segmentasie kriteriërs wys dat die prestasie van elke korporus 'n betaling verbetering kry, vergelyk met enkele kriteriër leer. Bronkodes van hierdie papier is beskikbaar op Github.", 'sq': 'Perspektivat e ndryshme gjuhësore shkaktojnë shumë kritere të ndryshme të segmentimit për segmentimin e fjalëve kineze (CWS). Shumica e metodave ekzistuese përqëndrohen në përmirësimin e performancës për çdo kriter të vetëm. Megjithatë, është interesante të shfrytëzojmë këto kritere të ndryshme dhe të minierojmë njohuritë e tyre të përbashkëta bazë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë mësimin kundërshtar me shumë kritere për CWS duke integruar njohurinë e përbashkët nga kritere të shumta heterogjene të segmentimit. Eksperimentet në tetë korpra me kritere heterogjene të segmentimit tregojnë se performanca e çdo korpus merr një përmirësim të rëndësishëm krahasuar me mësimin e një kriteri të vetëm. Kodet e burimit të këtij letre janë në dispozicion në Github.', 'tr': "Çinçe söz segmentasyonuň(CWS) üçin dürli dil görnüşleri birnäçe dürli segmentasyk kriterileri sebäp edýär. Iň köp bar yöntemler her kriteriň etkinlik gowuralygyna üns berýär. Ýöne bu dürli kriteriýalary ulanmak we olaryň orta bilimi taýýarlamak gyzykly. Bu kagyzda, bir näçe heterogenen segmentasyon kriteriýasyndan paylaşyk bilgileri birleşerek CWS üçin näsaz kriteriýaly öwrenmegi teklip edýäris. Eterogenen segmentasiýa kriteriýasy bilen sekiz korpora örän tejribeler her korpusyň etkinleşigi ýeke kriteriýa öwrenmesi bilen guruldygyny görä örän gowurak gazanýar. Bu kagyzyň çeşme ködleri Github'da bar.", 'am': 'Different linguistic perspectives causes many diverse segmentation criteria for Chinese word segmentation (CWS).  አብዛኛዎቹም የሚኖሩት ሥርዓቶች ለሁሉም ትክክለኛውን እንዲያሳድጉ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህን ልዩ ክፍሎች ለመጠቀም እና የዋና እውቀታቸውን ለመቀነስ የሚወስድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለCWS ማስተማርን በተቃዋሚ ብዙዎች አካባቢዎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የስምንት ኮርፖራ ክፍተቶችን በተለየ የኮርፓስ ትምህርት በተለይ ትምህርት ትምህርት ይታያል፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ ጽሑፎች የኩነቶች ጽሑፎች በጊቱብ ላይ ይገኛሉ።', 'hy': 'Տարբեր լեզվաբանական տեսանկյուններ են պատճառում Չինաստանի բառերի սեգրեգացիայի բառերի բազմազան սահմանափակումներ: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է յուրաքանչյուր մեթոդի արդյունավետության բարելավման վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, հետաքրքիր է օգտագործել այս տարբեր հանգամանքները և հանել նրանց ընդհանուր հիմնական գիտելիքները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հակառակ բազմաչափ հարցեր սովորելու CW-ի համար, ինտեգրելով ընդհանուր գիտելիքները բազմաթիվ հետերգենային սեգրեգացիայի հարցերից: Ութ մարմնի փորձարկումները, որոնք ունեն հետրոգեն սեգմետրացիայի չափումներ, ցույց են տալիս, որ յուրաքանչյուր մարմնի արտադրողությունը նշանակալի բարելավում է, համեմատած մեկ չափումների սովորելուն: Source codes of this paper are available on Github.', 'az': 'Çin söz segmentasyonu (CWS) üçün müxtəlif dil perspektivləri çoxlu müxtəlif segmentasyon kriterilərinə bənzəyir. Ən çox mövcuddur metodlar hər kriteria üçün performansını yaxşılaşdırmağa odaqlanır. Ancaq bu müxtəlif kriteriləri istifadə etmək və onların ortaq bilgisini qurmaq məqsədilə maraqlıdır. Bu kağızda, CWS üçün müxtəlif çoxlu kriteria öyrənməyi təklif edirik, çoxlu heterogenel segmentasyon kriterilərindən paylaşılan bilgiləri birləşdirərək. Sekiz korpora müxtəlif segmentasyon kriteriləri olan təcrübələrin hər korpusun təcrübəsi ilə müxtəlif bir təcrübə öyrənməsi ilə müqayisədə möhkəm bir xeyir qazandığını göstərir. Bu kağızın mənbə kodları Github üzerində faydalanır.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ভাষার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি চীনা শব্দ বিভক্তির (সিডিউএস) জন্য অনেক বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভক্ত বৈভক্তিক মূল্যের ক বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রত্যেক মূল্যের প্রভাব উন্নত করার দিকে মনোযোগ দেয়। তবে এই বিভিন্ন ধরনের মূল্য ব্যবহার করা এবং তাদের সাধারণ ভিত্তিক জ্ঞান কমানোর জন্য এটা মজার। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিরোধী বহুবিরোধী ক্রিয়ারিয়া প্রস্তাব করছি সিডিউএসের জন্য শিক্ষা প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন জ্ঞান Experiments on eight corpora with heterogeneous segmentation criteria show that the performance of each corpus obtains a significant improvement, compared to single-criterion learning.  এই কাগজের সূত্র কোড গিথুবে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'Različite jezičke perspektive uzrokuju mnoge različite kriterije segmentacije za kinesku segmentaciju riječi (CWS). Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na poboljšanje učinka svakog kriterija. Međutim, interesantno je iskoristiti te različite kriterije i rudarstvo njihovih zajedničkih temeljnih znanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo protivno učenje multikriterija za CWS integriranjem zajedničkih znanja iz višestrukih heterogenenih kriterija segmentacije. Eksperimenti o osam tijela s heterogenenim kriterijama segmentacije pokazuju da učenje svakog korpusa dobija značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi s učenjem jednokriterija. Izvorni kodovi ove papire su dostupni na Githubu.', 'ca': "Les diferents perspectives lingüístices provoquen molts criteris de segmentació diferents per a la segmentació de paraules xineses (CWS). La majoria dels mètodes existents es centren en millorar el rendiment de cada criteri. Però és interessant explotar aquests diferents criteris i minerar el seu coneixement subjacent comú. In this paper, we propose adversarial multi-criteria learning for CWS by integrating shared knowledge from multiple heterogeneous segmentation criteria.  Els experiments de vuit corpores amb criteris de segmentació heterogenea mostran que el rendiment de cada corpus obté una millora significativa, comparat amb l'aprenentatge d'un únic criteri. Els codis fonts d'aquest article estan disponibles a Github.", 'cs': 'Různé jazykové perspektivy způsobují mnoho různých segmentačních kritérií pro segmentaci čínských slov (CWS). Většina stávajících metod se zaměřuje na zlepšení výkonnosti každého jednotlivého kritéria. Je však zajímavé využít těchto různých kritérií a vytěžit jejich společné základní znalosti. V tomto článku navrhujeme kontroverzní multikriteriální učení pro CWS integrováním sdílených znalostí z několika heterogenních segmentačních kritérií. Experimenty na osmi korpusech s heterogenními segmentačními kritérii ukazují, že výkonnost jednotlivých korpusů dosahuje významného zlepšení oproti jednokriteriálnímu učení. Zdrojové kódy tohoto článku jsou k dispozici na Githubu.', 'et': 'Erinevad keelelised vaatenurgad põhjustavad hiina sõna segmenteerimise (CWS) mitmesuguseid segmenteerimiskriteeriume. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid keskendub iga kriteeriumi tulemuslikkuse parandamisele. Siiski on huvitav kasutada neid erinevaid kriteeriume ja kaevandada nende ühiseid alusteadmisi. Käesolevas töös pakume CWS-i jaoks konkurentsivõimelist mitmekriteeriumilist õppimist, integreerides jagatud teadmisi mitmetest heterogeensetest segmenteerimiskriteeriumidest. Kaheksa korpusega läbiviidud eksperimendid heterogeensete segmenteerimiskriteeriumidega näitavad, et iga korpuse jõudlus saavutab olulise paranemise võrreldes ühe kriteeriumiga õppimisega. Selle artikli lähtekoodid on kättesaadavad Githubis.', 'fi': 'Erilaiset kielelliset nﾃ､kﾃｶkulmat aiheuttavat monia erilaisia segmentointikriteerejﾃ､ kiinalaiselle sanasegmentoinnille (CWS). Useimmissa nykyisissﾃ､ menetelmissﾃ､ keskitytﾃ､ﾃ､n parantamaan kunkin yksittﾃ､isen kriteerin suorituskykyﾃ､. On kuitenkin mielenkiintoista hyﾃｶdyntﾃ､ﾃ､ nﾃ､itﾃ､ erilaisia kriteerejﾃ､ ja loukata niiden yhteistﾃ､ taustatietoa. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme kontradikaalista monikriteeristﾃ､ oppimista CWS:lle integroimalla jaettua tietoa useista heterogeenisistﾃ､ segmentointikriteereistﾃ､. Kahdeksalla eri segmentointikriteereillﾃ､ varustetulla korpusella tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, ettﾃ､ kunkin korpusen suorituskyky paranee merkittﾃ､vﾃ､sti verrattuna yhden kriteerin oppimiseen. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n artikkelin lﾃ､hdekoodit ovat saatavilla Githubissa.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Awak dhéwé sing isih perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno sapa criteri sing gak dhéwé. Nanging, sing paling-alam kuwi nggawe barang-alam iki banget karo koyok ngerti tindang kuwi kesalahan kanggo ngerasakno. Nanging kuwi iki, kita mudhaya karo pakan-pakan liyane sing sampeyan karo CWS Gebudhakan langkung sampeyan luwih dumadhi karo akeh opera sing perusahaan podho akeh dumadhi iki, nik nik awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan akeh bantuan sampeyan ingkang sampeyan tapi iki. Peringkat-kode sing paling iki dipunanggé kanggo Gethob', 'he': 'פרספקטיבות שפתיות שונות גורמות לקריטריונים רבים של סגמנציה של מילים סינית (CWS). רוב השיטות הקיומות מתמקדות בשיפור ביצועים לכל קריטוריון אחד. However, it is interesting to exploit these different criteria and mining their common underlying knowledge.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים לימוד רבי קריטורים נוגדים עבור CWS על ידי השתלב ידע משותף ממספר קריטורים של סגמנציה heterogeneous. ניסויים על שמונה גופות עם קריטורי סגמנציה heterogeneous מראים שהביצוע של כל גופוס מקבל שיפור משמעותי, בהשוואה ללמוד קריטוריון אחד. קודים מקורים של הנייר הזה זמינים על Github.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Most existing methods focus on improve the performance for each single criterion.  Ina son amfani da waɗannan ma'abũta dabam-dabam kuma a ƙara ma'abũcin sanitarsu. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade masu motsi da wasu kalria masu motsi da ke karanta wa CWS, da kuma Mu haɗa ilmi wanda aka yi raba daga karatun masu yawa na segment. Tajararin akan takis na koma da jarida segenous segment sun nuna cewa karatun kõwace korbas yana da mai kyãwo mai girma, sammenlikin da aka karanta littafin sigarin. Kodi na wannan takardar, za'a iya sãmun GiThb.", 'sk': 'Različni jezikovni vidiki povzročajo veliko različnih meril segmentacije kitajskih besed (CWS). Večina obstoječih metod se osredotoča na izboljšanje uspešnosti za vsako merilo. Vendar pa je zanimivo izkoristiti ta različna merila in izkoristiti njihovo skupno osnovno znanje. V prispevku predlagamo kontradikcijsko večkriterijsko učenje za CWS z integracijo skupnega znanja iz več heterogenih segmentacijskih kriterijev. Eksperimenti na osmih korpusih z heterogenimi segmentacijskimi kriteriji kažejo, da zmogljivost vsakega korpusa doseže znatno izboljšanje v primerjavi z enim merilom učenja. Izvorne kode tega članka so na voljo na Githubu.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣེ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ནི་རྒྱ་ཡིག་གི་ཐོག་རིམ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཚད་རེ་རེས་སྔར་བས་སྐྱོང་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདི་དག་ལས་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱིབས་རྩལ་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་། In this paper, we propose adversarial multi-criteria learning for CWS by integrating shared knowledge from multiple heterogeneous segmentation criteria. By integrating shared knowledge from multiple heterogeneous segmentation criteria. སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་གཉིས་ལས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ན། མི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་རེ་རེ་བ་ལ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ཐོག་མའི་ཨང་རྩིས་མངོན་པ Github ཐོག་ཏུ་སྤྱོད་རུང་།'}
{'en': 'Robust Incremental Neural Semantic Graph Parsing', 'ar': 'تحليل قوي للرسم البياني الدلالي العصبي المتزايد', 'fr': 'Analyse graphique sémantique neuronale incrémentielle robuste', 'pt': 'Análise de gráfico semântico neural incremental robusto', 'es': 'Análisis sólido de gráficos semánticos neuronales incrementales', 'ja': '堅牢な増分ニューラルセマンティックグラフ解析', 'zh': '鲁棒增量神经语义图解析', 'hi': 'मजबूत वृद्धिशील तंत्रिका शब्दार्थ ग्राफ पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Устойчивый инкрементный анализ нейронного семантического графа', 'ga': 'Parsáil Ghraf Shéimeantach Incriminteach Incriminteach Néarach', 'ka': 'პრობსტური განვითარებული ნეიროლური სემანტიკური გრაფის გადაწყვეტი', 'hu': 'Robusztus inkrementális neurális szemantikus grafikai elemzés', 'el': 'Ισχυρή ανάλυση αυξητικών νευρωνικών σημαντικών γραφημάτων', 'it': 'Analisi del grafico semantico neurale incrementale robusta', 'lt': 'stiprus didėjantis neurologinio sementinio grafiko analizavimas', 'kk': 'Робст күшейту невралдық семантикалық графикалық талдау', 'mk': 'Robust Incremental Neural Semantic Graph Parsing', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Graf Semantik Neural Meningkatkan Kuat', 'mn': 'Бордог нэмэлт мэдрэлийн семантик график шалгалт', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഗ്രാഫ് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് റോബസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുക', 'mt': 'Analiżi b’saħħitha tal-Grafika Semantika Newrali inkrementali', 'no': 'Sterkt inkremental neuralsemantisk tolking', 'ro': 'Analizarea graficului semantic neural incremental robust', 'pl': 'Solidny przyrostowy neuronowy wykres semantyczny', 'sr': 'Jako povećavajuće neuralne semantičke grafike', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka sawirada ee Neural Semantic Graph', 'si': 'සාධාරණ විශාල සිමාන්තික ග්\u200dරාෆ් විශාලනය', 'sv': 'Robust inkrementell neural semantisk graftolkning', 'ta': 'சுழற்றுக', 'ur': 'مضبوط مضبوط نیورال سیمانٹی گراف پارسینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Máy quét tinh thần thần kỳ kỳ diệu', 'bg': 'Здрава ингрементална неврална семантична графика', 'da': 'Robust inkrementel neural semantisk graffortolkning', 'nl': 'Robuuste incrementele neurale semantische grafiekparsing', 'hr': 'Jako povećano neuralno semantičko analiziranje grafa', 'de': 'Robuste inkrementelle neuronale semantische Graphenanalyse', 'ko': '노봉 증량 신경 어의도 분석', 'id': 'Analisasi Graf Semantik Neural Incremental yang Kuat', 'fa': 'تجزیه گراف\u200cهای عصبی استوار', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha Graph ya Kitendo cha Semantic Neural', 'sq': 'Analizimi i fortë i grafikut neuronal Semantik', 'tr': 'Zatlaýyn Zatlaýyn Neural Semantik Grafik', 'af': 'Robust Incremental Neurale Semantiese Graaf Ontlegging', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Ռուժեղ աճող նյարդային սեմանտիկ գրաֆի վերլուծությունը', 'az': 'Qüvvətli Incremental Neural Semantic Graph Parsing', 'bn': 'বাস্তব নিউরেল সেম্যান্টিক গ্রাফ পার্সিং করুন', 'ca': 'Analització robusta de gràfics neurosemàtics incrementals', 'et': 'Tugev kasvav närvide semantiline graafika parsimine', 'cs': 'Robustní inkrementální neuronová sémantická analýza grafů', 'bs': 'Jako povećano neuralno semantičko analiziranje grafa', 'fi': 'Robust Incremental Neural Semantic Graph Parsing', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Robustno Incrementalno nevralno semantično razčlenitev grafov', 'he': 'בדיקת גרף סמנטית נוירואלית עצומה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Robust Incremental Neural Semantic Graph Parsing'}
{'en': 'Parsing sentences to linguistically-expressive semantic representations is a key goal of Natural Language Processing. Yet statistical parsing has focussed almost exclusively on bilexical dependencies or domain-specific logical forms. We propose a neural encoder-decoder transition-based parser which is the first full-coverage semantic graph parser for Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS). The model architecture uses stack-based embedding features, predicting graphs jointly with unlexicalized predicates and their token alignments. Our parser is more accurate than attention-based baselines on MRS, and on an additional Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark, and GPU batch processing makes it an order of magnitude faster than a high-precision grammar-based parser. Further, the 86.69 % Smatch score of our MRS parser is higher than the upper-bound on AMR parsing, making MRS an attractive choice as a semantic representation.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل الجمل إلى التمثيلات الدلالية المعبرة لغويًا هدفًا رئيسيًا لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، فقد ركز التحليل الإحصائي بشكل حصري تقريبًا على التبعيات ثنائية اللغة أو الأشكال المنطقية الخاصة بالمجال. نقترح محللًا يعتمد على الانتقال إلى وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير العصبي وهو أول محلل للرسم البياني الدلالي للتغطية الكاملة للدلالات العودية الدنيا (MRS). تستخدم بنية النموذج ميزات التضمين القائمة على التكديس ، وتتوقع الرسوم البيانية بالاشتراك مع المسندات غير المرنة ومحاذاة الرموز الخاصة بهم. المحلل اللغوي الخاص بنا أكثر دقة من خطوط الأساس القائمة على الانتباه في MRS ، وعلى معيار إضافي لتمثيل المعنى المجرد (AMR) ، ومعالجة دفعة GPU تجعله ترتيبًا من حيث الحجم أسرع من المحلل اللغوي عالي الدقة المستند إلى القواعد. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن درجة Smatch 86.69٪ لمحلل MRS الخاص بنا أعلى من الحد الأعلى في تحليل AMR ، مما يجعل MRS خيارًا جذابًا كتمثيل دلالي.', 'es': 'El análisis de oraciones en representaciones semánticas lingüísticamente expresivas es un objetivo clave del procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, el análisis estadístico se ha centrado casi exclusivamente en las dependencias biléxicas o en las formas lógicas específicas del dominio. Proponemos un analizador basado en transiciones de codificador-decodificador neuronal que es el primer analizador de gráficos semánticos de cobertura completa para la semántica de recursión mínima (MRS). La arquitectura del modelo utiliza funciones de incrustación basadas en pilas, que predican gráficos junto con predicados no lexicalizados y sus alineaciones de tokens. Nuestro analizador es más preciso que las líneas de base basadas en la atención en MRS y en un punto de referencia adicional de Representación de Significado Abstracto (AMR), y el procesamiento por lotes de GPU hace que sea un orden de magnitud más rápido que un analizador basado en gramática de alta precisión. Además, la puntuación Smatch del 86,69% de nuestro analizador MRS es más alta que el límite superior del análisis AMR, lo que convierte a MRS en una opción atractiva como representación semántica.', 'pt': 'Analisar frases para representações semânticas linguisticamente expressivas é um objetivo fundamental do Processamento de Linguagem Natural. No entanto, a análise estatística concentrou-se quase exclusivamente em dependências bilexicais ou formas lógicas específicas de domínio. Propomos um analisador baseado em transição codificador-decodificador neural que é o primeiro analisador gráfico semântico de cobertura completa para Semântica de Recursão Mínima (MRS). A arquitetura do modelo usa recursos de incorporação baseados em pilha, prevendo gráficos em conjunto com predicados não lexicalizados e seus alinhamentos de token. Nosso analisador é mais preciso do que as linhas de base baseadas em atenção no MRS e em um benchmark adicional de Representação Abstrata de Significado (AMR), e o processamento em lote de GPU o torna uma ordem de magnitude mais rápido do que um analisador baseado em gramática de alta precisão. Além disso, a pontuação Smatch de 86,69% do nosso analisador MRS é maior do que o limite superior na análise AMR, tornando o MRS uma opção atraente como representação semântica.', 'fr': "L'analyse de phrases en représentations sémantiques expressives sur le plan linguistique est un objectif clé du traitement du langage naturel. Pourtant, l'analyse statistique s'est concentrée presque exclusivement sur les dépendances bilexicales ou les formes logiques spécifiques à un domaine. Nous proposons un analyseur basé sur la transition encodeur-décodeur neuronal qui est le premier analyseur de graphe sémantique à couverture complète pour la sémantique de récursivité minimale (MRS). L'architecture du modèle utilise des fonctionnalités d'intégration basées sur la pile, prédisant des graphiques conjointement avec des prédicats non lexicaux et leurs alignements de jetons. Notre analyseur est plus précis que les lignes de base basées sur l'attention sur MRS et sur un banc d'essai AMR (Abstract Meaning Representation) supplémentaire, et le traitement par lots GPU le rend d'un ordre de grandeur plus rapide qu'un analyseur grammatical de haute précision. De plus, le score Smatch de 86,69\xa0% de notre analyseur MRS est supérieur à la limite supérieure de l'analyse AMR, ce qui fait de MRS un choix attrayant en tant que représentation sémantique.", 'ja': '文を言語的に表現された意味表現に解析することは、自然言語処理の主要な目標です。しかしながら、統計解析は、ほぼ完全に二元論的依存関係またはドメイン固有の論理形式に焦点を当てている。私たちは、最小再帰セマンティクス（ MRS ）のための最初のフルカバレッジセマンティックグラフ構文解析器である、ニューラルエンコーダーデコーダー遷移ベースの構文解析器を提案します。モデルアーキテクチャは、スタックベースの埋め込み機能を使用し、非フレキシカル化された述語とそのトークンアライメントと合同でグラフを予測します。当社の構文解析器は、MRSと追加の抽象意味表現（ AMR ）ベンチマークの注意ベースラインよりも正確であり、GPUバッチ処理により、高精度の文法ベースの構文解析器よりも高速な大きさのオーダーになります。さらに、当社のMRSパーサーの86.69% Smatchスコアは、AMR構文解析の上限よりも高く、MRSを意味論的表現として魅力的な選択肢にしています。', 'zh': '以句解析言语义自然语言之要也。 然计解析几尽于双性赖特定于域之逻辑。 建一基于神经编码器-解码器之解析器,其最小递归语义(MRS)首覆语义图解析器。 模型体系结构用基堆栈之嵌功,将图形与非规则化者谓词与令牌齐占。 吾解析器视 MRS 上基于注意之基线,而依于额外抽象之义以表 (AMR) 准,GPU 批处理使比于语法之高精度解析器速数量级。 此外,吾 MRS 解析器之 86.69% Smatch ,分数高于 AMR 解析之上限,使 MRS 为吸引力语义择焉。', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ предложений в лингвистически-экспрессивных семантических представлениях является ключевой целью обработки естественного языка. Тем не менее, статистический синтаксический анализ сосредоточен почти исключительно на билексических зависимостях или логических формах, специфичных для конкретной области. Мы предлагаем нейронный парсер на основе кодера-декодера, который является первым полномасштабным семантическим графовым парсером для минимальной рекурсионной семантики (MRS). Архитектура модели использует функции встраивания на основе стека, предсказывая графики вместе с нелексикализованными предикатами и их выравниваниями маркеров. Наш парсер более точен, чем основанные на внимании базовые линии на MRS, и на дополнительном абстрактном представлении смысла (AMR), и пакетная обработка GPU делает его на порядок быстрее, чем высокоточный парсер на основе грамматики. Кроме того, 86,69% баллов Smatch нашего синтаксического анализатора MRS выше, чем верхняя граница при синтаксическом анализе AMR, что делает MRS привлекательным выбором в качестве семантического представления.', 'hi': 'भाषाई रूप से अभिव्यंजक शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए वाक्यों को पार्स करना प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण का एक प्रमुख लक्ष्य है। फिर भी सांख्यिकीय पार्सिंग ने लगभग विशेष रूप से बिलेक्सिकल निर्भरताओं या डोमेन-विशिष्ट तार्किक रूपों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। हम एक तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो न्यूनतम पुनरावृत्ति शब्दार्थ (एमआरएस) के लिए पहला पूर्ण-कवरेज शब्दार्थ ग्राफ पार्सर है। मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर स्टैक-आधारित एम्बेडिंग सुविधाओं का उपयोग करता है, जो अनलेक्सिकलाइज्ड विधेय और उनके टोकन संरेखण के साथ संयुक्त रूप से ग्राफ की भविष्यवाणी करता है। हमारा पार्सर MRS पर ध्यान-आधारित बेसलाइन की तुलना में अधिक सटीक है, और एक अतिरिक्त सार अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (AMR) बेंचमार्क पर, और GPU बैच प्रसंस्करण इसे उच्च परिशुद्धता व्याकरण-आधारित पार्सर की तुलना में तेजी से परिमाण का एक आदेश बनाता है। इसके अलावा, हमारे MRS पार्सर का 86.69% Smatch स्कोर AMR पार्सिंग पर ऊपरी-बाउंड से अधिक है, जिससे MRS एक शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के रूप में एक आकर्षक विकल्प बन जाता है।', 'ga': 'Príomhsprioc de Phróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha is ea abairtí a pharsáil chuig léiriúcháin shéimeantacha atá léirithe go teanga. Mar sin féin dhírigh parsáil staitistiúil beagnach go huile is go hiomlán ar spleáchais bileicseacha nó ar fhoirmeacha loighciúla a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann. Molaimid parsálaí trasdul-bhunaithe ionchódóra-díchódóra néaraigh, arb é an chéad pharsálaí grafa shéimeantach lán-chlúdach le haghaidh Séimeantaic Aischur Íosta (MRS). Úsáideann an ailtireacht mhúnla gnéithe leabaithe stack-bhunaithe, ag tuar graif i gcomhpháirt le réamhfhocail neamhleicseála agus a n-ailínithe comharthaí. Tá ár parsálaí níos cruinne ná bunlínte aird-bhunaithe ar MRS, agus ar thagarmharc breise um Léiriú Brí Teibí (AMR), agus déanann próiseáil bhaisc GPU ord méide níos tapúla ná parsálaí ardchruinneas bunaithe ar ghramadach. Ina theannta sin, tá an scór Sleamhnáin 86.69% dár parsálaí MRS níos airde ná an teorainn uachtarach ar pharsáil AMR, rud a fhágann gur rogha tharraingteach MRS mar léiriú shéimeantach.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση προτάσεων σε γλωσσικά εκφραστικές σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις είναι βασικός στόχος της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, η στατιστική ανάλυση έχει επικεντρωθεί σχεδόν αποκλειστικά σε διεξικές εξαρτήσεις ή λογικές μορφές που αφορούν τον τομέα. Προτείνουμε έναν αναλυτή νευρωνικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση, ο οποίος είναι ο πρώτος σημασιολογικός αναλυτής γραφής πλήρους κάλυψης για τη Σημασία Ελάχιστης Ανακύκλωσης (MRS). Η αρχιτεκτονική του μοντέλου χρησιμοποιεί δυνατότητες ενσωμάτωσης με βάση τη στοίβα, προβλέποντας γραφήματα από κοινού με μη εξισορροπημένες προβλέψεις και τις ευθυγραμμίσεις συμβολαίων τους. Ο αναλυτής μας είναι πιο ακριβής από τις γραμμές βάσης που βασίζονται στην προσοχή σε MRS, και σε ένα πρόσθετο σημείο αναφοράς αναπαράστασης αφηρημένης έννοιας (και η επεξεργασία παρτίδων το καθιστά μια σειρά μεγέθους γρηγορότερη από έναν αναλυτή υψηλής ακρίβειας βασισμένο στη γραμματική. Επιπλέον, η βαθμολογία 86.69% Smatch του αναλυτή είναι υψηλότερη από το ανώτερο όριο στην ανάλυση, καθιστώντας το μια ελκυστική επιλογή ως σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση.', 'hu': 'A mondatok értelmezése nyelvi-expresszív szemantikai reprezentációkra a Natural Language Processing kulcsfontosságú célja. A statisztikai elemzés azonban szinte kizárólag a kétexikus függőségekre vagy a domain-specifikus logikai formákra összpontosított. Egy neurális kódoló-dekódoló átmenet alapú elemzőt javasolunk, amely az első teljes lefedettségű szemantikai gráf elemző a Minimális Recursion Semantics (MRS). A modell architektúra stack alapú beágyazási funkciókat használ, amelyek grafikonokat jelenítenek meg a nem exilizált predikátumokkal és azok token igazításaival együtt. Az elemzőnk pontosabb, mint az MRS figyelem-alapú alapvonalai, és egy további Absztrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) referenciaérték alapján, és GPU batch processzor nagyságrendje gyorsabb, mint egy nagy pontosságú nyelvtani alapú elemző. Továbbá, az MRS elemzőnk 86,69%-os Smatch pontszáma magasabb, mint az AMR elemzés felső határa, így az MRS vonzó választás szemantikai ábrázolásként.', 'it': "Interpretare frasi a rappresentazioni semantiche linguisticamente espressive è un obiettivo chiave del Natural Language Processing. Eppure l'analisi statistica si è concentrata quasi esclusivamente sulle dipendenze bilessiche o sulle forme logiche specifiche del dominio. Proponiamo un parser basato su transizioni encoder-decoder neurale che è il primo parser grafico semantico a copertura completa per Semantics di Recursion Minimal (MRS). L'architettura del modello utilizza funzionalità di embedding basate su stack, predicendo i grafici insieme ai predicati non esiliati e ai loro allineamenti token. Il nostro parser è più accurato delle linee di base basate sull'attenzione su MRS, e su un ulteriore benchmark AMR (Abstract Meaning Representation), e l'elaborazione batch GPU lo rende un ordine di grandezza più veloce di un parser basato sulla grammatica ad alta precisione. Inoltre, il punteggio Smatch dell'86,69% del nostro parser MRS è superiore al limite superiore dell'analisi AMR, rendendo MRS una scelta attraente come rappresentazione semantica.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinis gamtos kalbų apdorojimo tikslas – analizuoti sakinius kalbomis išreikštoms semantinėms atstovybėms. Vis dėlto statistinis analizavimas daugiausia dėmesio skyrė beveik išimtinai dvišaliams priklausomybėms arba konkrečioms sritims būdingoms logiškoms formoms. Siūlome neurologinio kodavimo dekoderio pereinamojo laikotarpio analizatorių, kuris yra pirmasis visapusiškas semantinis grafikos analizatorius mažiausios rekursijos Semantikams (MRS). Modelio architektūra naudoja stack-based embedding savybes, prognozuoja grafikus kartu su neksikalizuotais predikatais ir jų žymenų sureguliavimu. Mūsų analizatorius yra tikslesnis nei dėmesiu pagrįstos pagrindinės MRS ir papildomo Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) lyginamojo rodiklio, o GPU serijos apdorojimas daro jo dydžio eilutę greitesnę nei labai tikslus gramatinis analizatorius. Be to, mūsų MRS analizatoriaus 86,69 % Smatch rezultatas yra didesnis už viršutinę ribą atliekant AMR analizavimą, todėl MRS yra patrauklus pasirinkimas kaip semantinis atstovavimas.', 'mk': 'Анализирањето на речениците на јазички-изразни семантични претставувања е клучна цел на природното обработување јазик. Сепак, статистичката анализа се фокусира речиси исклучително на билексичните зависности или логични форми специфични за доменот. Ние предложуваме анализатор базиран на нервен кодер-декодер на транзиција кој е првиот семантички графски анализатор со целосно покривање за минимална рекурсија семантика (МРС). Моделот на архитектура користи вградувачки карактеристики базирани на групи, предвидувајќи графики заедно со неексикализираните предикати и нивните знаци. Нашиот анализатор е попрецизен од базите на МРС базирани на внимание, и на дополнителна рецентрација на Апстрактно значење (АМР), а процесот на GPU партија го прави редот на големина побрз од анализатор базиран на висока прецизност граматика. Покрај тоа, 86,69 отсто од нашиот МРС анализатор е повисок од горната граница на анализата на АМР, што го прави МРС атрактивен избор како семантична претстава.', 'ms': 'Menghurai kalimat ke perwakilan semantik secara bahasa-ekspresif adalah tujuan utama Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami. Namun penghuraian statistik telah fokus hampir eksklusif pada dependensi bileks atau bentuk logik khusus domain. Kami cadangkan penghurai berasaskan pengekod-dekoder saraf yang merupakan penghurai graf semantik penuh penutup pertama untuk Semantik Pengulangan Minimal (MRS). Arkitektur model menggunakan ciri-ciri penyambungan berdasarkan tumpukan, meramalkan graf bersama-sama dengan predikat tidak eksikal dan aliran token mereka. Penghurai kami lebih tepat daripada garis dasar yang berdasarkan perhatian pada MRS, dan pada tanda benchmark Perwakilan Maksud Abstrakt (AMR) tambahan, dan pemprosesan batch GPU membuatnya tertib ukuran lebih cepat daripada penghurai berdasarkan grammar ketepatan tinggi. Lagipun, skor Smatch 86.69% dari penghurai MRS kita lebih tinggi daripada batas atas dalam penghurai AMR, menjadikan MRS pilihan menarik sebagai perwakilan semantik.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ-എക്സ്പ്രെയിസ്റ്റിക്ക് സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവ എന്നിട്ടും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ബിലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനെയോ ഡൊമൈന്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ലോ നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതാണ് മിനിമില്\u200d റിക്രഷന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്സി മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള എംബെഡിങ്ങിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു എംആര്\u200dഎസിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്, കൂടുതല്\u200d അബ്രാക്ട്രേറ്റ് റിപ്പെന്\u200dസി അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ MRS പരാജയപ്രകാരം 86.69% സ്മാച്ച് സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് എംആര്\u200d പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d ബന്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sentenzi għal rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi lingwistikament espressivi hija għan ewlieni tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Madankollu l-analiżi statistika ffokat kważi esklussivament fuq id-dipendenzi bilessiċi jew forom loġiċi speċifiċi għad-dominju. Aħna nipproponu analizzatur ibbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni tal-kodifikatur-dekoder newrali li huwa l-ewwel analizzatur semantiku tal-grafika b’kopertura sħiħa għas-Semanti ta’ Rikors Minimu (MRS). L-arkitettura tal-mudell tuża karatteristiċi ta’ inkorporazzjoni bbażati fuq pilastri, li jipprevedu grafiċi flimkien ma’ predikati mhux eksikalizzati u l-allinjamenti tat-tokens tagħhom. Il-analizzatur tagħna huwa aktar preċiż mil-linji bażi bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni fuq l-MRS, u fuq punt ta’ riferiment addizzjonali għar-Rappreżentanza tat-Tip Abstrat (AMR), u l-ipproċessar tal-lott GPU jagħmilha ordni ta’ daqs aktar mgħa ġġel minn analizzatur ibbażat fuq grammatika ta’ preċiżjoni għolja. Barra minn hekk, il-punteġġ Smatch ta’ 86.69% tal-analizzatur tal-MRS tagħna huwa ogħla mil-limitu ta’ fuq tal-analizzazzjoni tal-AMR, li jagħmel l-MRS għa żla attraenti bħala rappreżentanza semantika.', 'no': 'Tolking av setningar til språk- uttrykk semantiske representasjonar er ein nøkkelmål for naturspråk- handsaming. Men statistiske tolking har fokusert nesten eksklusivt på bileksiske avhengighet eller domenespesifikke logiske formar. Vi foreslår ein oversikningsbasert analyser som er den første fullstendige semantiske analyseren for minimale rekursjonsssemiantikk (MRS) for ein neuralkoder-dekoder. Modell-arkitekturen brukar innbyggingsfunksjonar på stakkebasert, forhåndsvising av grafen saman med ikkje-avspesialiserte predikatar og teiknstillingane sine. Tolkaren vårt er meir nøyaktig enn oppmerksbaserte baselinjer på MRS, og på ein ekstra abstrakt middelverdingsrepresentasjon (AMR) benchmarkt, og GPU-batch-prosessering gjer det ein rekkjefølgje av storleiken raskare enn ein høg-presisjonsbasert grammatisk tolkar. I tillegg er det 86,69% Smatch- poenget av MRS- tolkaren vårt høgare enn den øvre binda på AMR- tolkinga, som gjør MRS ein attraktiv val som ein semantisk representasjon.', 'ka': 'სიმბოლოების სიმპანტიკური გამოსახულების გადაწყვეტილება არის ჩვენი ენერგიის პროცესის გასაკეთებელი მიზეზი. მაგრამ სტატისტიკალური პარასუზაცია უფრო გამოიყენება ბილექსიკალური დაახლოებისთვის ან დიომინის განსაკუთრებული ლოგიკური ფორმებზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ მინუს რეკურსიის Semantics (MRS) პირველი სემონტიკური გრაფიკის პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი სიმენტიკური გრაფიკის პანსერაცია. მოდელური არქტიქტიკური გამოყენება სტაკის დაბაზული ინბექტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენება, რომლებიც გრაფიკური გადაწყენება, რომლებიც არ გამოყენებული პრედიკატე ჩვენი პანსერტი უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე დაახლოებით ბაზი ხაზები MRS-ზე, და დამატებული აბსტრაქტიკური განსაზღვრება (AMR) ბანქმერზე, და GPU ბაზის პროცესი იქნება მაგრამის პროცესი უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე დამატებით, ჩვენი MRS პროცენტრის 86.69% სიმაღლე უფრო მეტია, ვიდრე AMR პროცენტაციაში, რომელიც MRS ატრაქტიური გამოყენება როგორც სმენტიკური გამოყენება.', 'pl': 'Analiza zdań do językowo-ekspresyjnych reprezentacji semantycznych jest kluczowym celem przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Jednak analiza statystyczna koncentrowała się prawie wyłącznie na zależnościach dwuekscyjnych lub specyficznych dla domeny form logicznych. Proponujemy parser oparty na przejściu kodera-dekodera neuronowego, który jest pierwszym pełnym pokryciem semantycznym parser wykresów semantycznych dla semantyki minimalnej recursji (MRS). Architektura modelu wykorzystuje funkcje osadzania oparte na stosie, przewidując wykresy razem z nieekskalizowanymi predykatami i ich wyrównaniami tokenów. Nasz parser jest dokładniejszy od linii bazowych opartych na uwadze na MRS i na dodatkowym referencji Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a przetwarzanie wsadowe GPU sprawia, że jest on o rząd wielkości szybszy niż precyzyjny parser oparty na gramatyce. Ponadto wynik 86.69% Smatch naszego parsera MRS jest wyższy niż górna granica parsowania AMR, co sprawia, że MRS jest atrakcyjnym wyborem jako reprezentacja semantyczna.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді лингвистикалық-экспрессиялық семантикалық түрінде талдау - Natural Language Processing - негізгі мақсат. Бірақ статистикалық талдауы билексикалық тәуелдіктеріне немесе доменге тәуелдік логикалық пішімдеріне тәуелді. Біз невралдық кодерлерді декодерлерді ауыстыру негізінде талдауға ұсынамыз. Бұл - минималдық қайталану семантикалық (MRS) үшін бірінші толық мәтіннің семантикалық график талдаушысы. Бұл үлгі архитектурасы stack- негіздеген ендіру мүмкіндіктерін қолданады, графиктерді өзгертілмеген предикаттармен және оның белгілерін біріктіру үшін қолданады. Біздің парзеріміз MRS негізгі негізгі сызықтардан да, және қосымша абстрактік Meaning Representation (AMR) белгісінің белгісінен дұрыс болады. GPU баптаулары негізгі грамматиканың негізгі парзерінен жылдам шектеу ретінде болады. Келесіден, МRS талдаушысының 86,69% жиілік нәтижесі AMR талдауындағы жоғары нәтижесінен артық. МRS дегенді семантикалық таңдау ретінде жақсы таңдау болады.', 'ro': 'Interpretarea frazelor în reprezentări semantice expresive lingvistice este un obiectiv cheie al procesării limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, analiza statistică s-a concentrat aproape exclusiv pe dependențe bilexice sau forme logice specifice domeniului. Propunem un parser bazat pe tranziție codificator-decodor neural, care este primul parser semantic cu acoperire completă pentru Semantica Recursie Minimală (MRS). Arhitectura modelului utilizează caracteristici de încorporare bazate pe stivă, predicând grafice împreună cu predicate neexcalizate și alinierea lor de token. Analizorul nostru este mai precis decât liniile de bază bazate pe atenție pe MRS, și pe un benchmark suplimentar de reprezentare a semnificației abstracte (AMR), iar procesarea pe loturi GPU îl face un ordin de mărime mai rapid decât un analizor bazat pe gramatică de înaltă precizie. Mai mult, scorul Smatch de 86,69% al parserului nostru MRS este mai mare decât limita superioară a analizării AMR, făcând MRS o alegere atractivă ca reprezentare semantică.', 'sr': 'Očitanje rečenica na jezički izražene semantičke predstave je ključni cilj procesa prirodnog jezika. Ipak, statističko analiziranje se usredotočilo skoro ekskluzivno na biliksičke zavisnosti ili logičke oblike domena. Предложимо невралног кодера-декодера преходног парзера који је први semантични парзер за минималне рекурсионне семантике (MRS) преходног прехода. Modelna arhitektura koristi ugrađene karakteristike na staklama, predviđajući grafike zajedno sa neekseksikaliranim predikatima i njihovim znakovima. Naš analizator je precizniji od pažnje baziranih osnovnih linija na MRS-u, i na dodatnoj kriteriji abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR), a obrađivanje GPU serije čini to redom veličine bržim od analizatora na visokoj preciznoj gramatici. Nadalje, 86,69% Smatch rezultata našeg MRS analizatora je veća od gornjeg povezanog na analizanju AMR-a, čineći MRS privlačnim izborom kao semantičku predstavu.', 'so': "Heshiiska lagu sameeyo qeybaha luqada ku qoran oo ku qoran, waa goal muhiimka ah ee baaraandegista afka asalka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee baaritaanka takhasuska ah waxay si gaar ah ugu kalsoonaaday ku xirnaanta bilowga ama foomka caqliga ah ee gudaha. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa baaritaanka koox-decoder-based baaritaanka koox-decoder (MRS). Tusaalada waxaa lagu isticmaalaa tababaro ku saleysan, waxaana la sii sheegayaa tallaabooyin si wadajir ah oo la wada shaqeeyo la'aan iyo isbedelka calaamada. Parameradeena waa ka saxdaan qoraal ka hooseeya MRS, iyo qoraal dheer oo Abstract meaninging Representation (AMR), iyo baaritaanka GPU batch ayaa ka dhigaya mid aad u dhaqsaysan oo ka dhigta koronta grammar-based ParParParser. Intaas waxaa dheer, 86.69% Smatch score ee MRS Parser waa ka sarreeya barxadda AMR, wuxuuna MRS ka dhigaa doorasho jilicsan oo u eg qayb semantic ah.", 'si': 'භාෂාවික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ස්වභාවි නමුත් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය බිල්සිකිසිකල් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් කෝඩාර්-ඩිකෝඩර් ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා මුලින්ම සම්පූර්ණ ස්මාන්තික Name අපේ පරීක්ෂකයා අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා පරීක්ෂක ප්\u200dරධානය (AMR) බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලට, GPU batch පරීක්ෂකයෙන් ඒක ප්\u200dරධානය වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරධ තවත්, අපේ MRS පරිශීලකයේ 86.69% ස්මාච් ස්කෝර් එක AMR පරිශීලකයෙන් ඉහළ පැත්තට වඩා විශේෂයි, MRS වලට ස්මාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිශීලකය', 'sv': 'Att tolka meningar till språkligt uttrycksfulla semantiska representationer är ett viktigt mål för Natural Language Processing. Ändå har statistisk tolkning fokuserat nästan uteslutande på bilexiska beroenden eller domänspecifika logiska former. Vi föreslår en neural encoder-dekoder övergångsbaserad parser som är den första full täckning semantisk grafparser för Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS). Modellarkitekturen använder stapelbaserade inbäddningsfunktioner som förutspår grafer tillsammans med icke-exkaliserade predikater och deras token-justeringar. Vår parser är mer exakt än uppmärksamhetsbaserade baslinjer på MRS, och på ett ytterligare AMR-riktmärke (Abstrakt Meaning Representation), och GPU batchbehandling gör den till en storleksordning snabbare än en högprecisionsgrammatisk-baserad parser. Dessutom är 86,69% Smatch score i vår MRS parser högre än den övre gränsen på AMR parsing, vilket gör MRS till ett attraktivt val som semantisk representation.', 'mn': 'Холбоонуудыг хэлний хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж байгаа semantic илэрхийлэл гэдэг бол Байгалийн хэл Процессийн чухал зорилго юм. Гэхдээ статистикийн хуваалцах нь бараг хоорондын хоорондын хамааралтай хамааралтай эсвэл холбоотой логикийн хэлбэрээр төвлөрсөн. Бид мэдрэлийн кодлогчийн шилжилт дээр суурилсан хуваалцагчийг санал болгож байна. Энэ бол хамгийн бага дахин дахин дахин дуусах семантик (MRS) гэх анхны бүрэн дүүрэн график хуваалцагч юм. Загварын архитектур нь загвар дээр суурилсан нэгтгэх чадваруудыг ашигладаг. Графикийг хуваалцаагүй хэмжээсүүд болон тэдний тэмдэглэгдэх хэмжээсүүдтэй хамтдаа таамагладаг. Манай ажиллаач МРС дээр анхаарлын үндсэн суурь шулуунаас илүү тодорхой, нэмэлт Абстрактын Meaning Representation (AMR) багц дээр, GPU багш процесс үүнийг өндөр тодорхой граммаар суурилсан ажиллаачаас илүү хурдан гаргадаг. Дараа нь бидний MRS хуваарьчийн 86.69% нь AMR хуваарьчилгаанаас илүү өндөр, МRS-г semantic хэлбэрээр татах сонголт болгодог.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் முக்கிய மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் முக்கிய கோளாகும். ஆனாலும் புள்ளிவிவரமான பாசிங்கு கிடைக்கும் பிளாவியல் சார்ந்துள்ள சார்புகள் அல்லது களம் குறிப்பிட்ட துண நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறியீட்டு குறைந்தபட்ச திரும்ப திரும்ப திரும்ப திரும்ப திரும்ப செயல்பாட்டிற்கான முதல் முழு பகுதி பெம்பென் Name எம்ஆர்எஸ் மீது கவனத்தை அடிப்படையான அடிப்படை கோடுகளை விட அதிக சரியாக இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் கூடுதலான தொகுப்பு பிரதிநிகழ்வு (AMR) பெங்குத்தகத்தின் மீது, ஜிபியு பாட் செயல் மேலும், எம்ஆர்எஸ் பாடலில் 86.69% சிமாத்திர மதிப்புக்குறிப்பு AMR காட்சியை விட மேல் பிணைத்திருக்கும் மதிப்புப் பெரிய தேர்வ', 'ur': 'زبان کے مطابق زبان کے مطابق مطابق سیمنٹی نمونٹیوں کے بارے میں مطالعہ کرنا طبیعی زبان پرینس کا کلی هدف ہے. لیکن ایسٹیسٹیکل پارسینگ تقریباً صرف بیلکسیکل اعتباری یا ڈومین خاص منطقی فرموں پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے. ہم ایک نئورل کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر کی تغییر-بنیاد پارچر کی پیشنهاد کریں جو نہایت کم پھیر سیمانٹیکس (MRS) کے لئے پہلی پورے پورے پورے-پورے سیمانٹیک گراف پارچر ہے. Model architecture uses stack-based embedding features, predicting graphs jointly with unlexicalized predicates and their token alignments. ہمارا پارچر MRS کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ دقیق ہے، اور ایک اضافہ مطلب معنی بنچم مارک پر، اور جی پی یو پی پٹ پرسس اس کو ایک اچھی دقیق گرم مارک بنچم سے زیادہ تیز آرام دیتا ہے. اور اس کے بعد، ہمارے MRS پارچر کا 86.69% اسماچ اسکور AMR پارچینگ کے اوپر سے زیادہ ہے، جو MRS کو سیمانٹی تصویر کے طور پر جذاب کا انتخاب بناتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Luyện tập câu theo ngữ pháp cho các biểu tượng tôn giáo theo ngữ pháp là mục tiêu chủ chốt của Quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên phân tích thống kê đã tập trung gần như độc nhất vào các mối quan hệ tỷ lệ hoặc các dạng logic miền. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phân tách mã hóa thần kinh thần kinh thần kinh thần kinh thần kinh thần kinh thần kinh phân phân tích kỳ (MRS). Kiểu kiến trúc này dùng tính năng nhúng kiểu chồng, dự đoán biểu đồ với tình trạng khó khăn không trục xuất và tính tương thích của nó. Vị cha của chúng ta chính xác hơn các căn cứ dựa trên MRS, và trên một tiêu chuẩn xuất sắc Tức cười (AMR) khác, và sản xuất hàng loạt sản xuất của GPU làm cho nó trở nên kích thước nhanh hơn một phân tách văn học chính xác cao. Hơn nữa, 86.69 Rất nhiều điểm kích thích của chúng ta so với tỉ lệ cao trên của AMR phân tích, hấp dẫn BÀ.', 'uz': "Name Lekin statistik parsing faqat bileksiya ishlatuvchilarga yoki domen-specific logical formatlariga foydalanadi. Biz birinchi tarjima- kodlash asosida tarjima qilamiz, bu minimal qayta takrorlanish semantik (MRS) uchun birinchi kam soʻzlik semantik grafik parametrlari. Name Bizning tarkibimiz MRS asosidagi asosiy asosiy asoslaridan ko'proq aniqlik, va qoʻshimcha Abstract Representation (AMR) haqida, GPU batch boshqaruvchisi buni yuqori faqat grammatika asosida tez soatga ajratishga tayyorlaydi. Ko'rsatilgan, MRS parametrlarining 86.69% Smatch scori AMR parsing yuqoriga bog'liq juda katta, MRS semantik tashkilotlari sifatida qiziqarli tanlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'Разглеждането на изречения до лингвистично изразителни семантични представи е ключова цел на естествената обработка на езика. Въпреки това статистическият анализ се фокусира почти изключително върху двустранни зависимости или специфични за домейна логически форми. Предлагаме невронен кодер-декодер базиран на преход парсер, който е първият семантичен графичен парсер с пълно покритие за семантична семантика на минималната рекурсия (МРС). Архитектурата на модела използва функциите за вграждане, базирани на стак, като предвижда графики заедно с неексикализирани предикати и техните символни подравнявания. Нашият анализатор е по-точен от базираните на вниманието базови линии на MRS и на допълнителен показател за представяне на абстрактно значение (АМР), а обработката на партиди на GPU го прави по-бърз от високопрецизния граматичен анализатор. Освен това, 86.69% скор на нашия анализатор е по-висок от горната граница на анализа на АМР, което прави МРС привлекателен избор като семантично представяне.', 'nl': 'Het analyseren van zinnen naar taalkundig-expressieve semantische representaties is een belangrijk doel van Natural Language Processing. Toch heeft statistische parsing zich bijna uitsluitend gericht op bilexische afhankelijkheden of domeinspecifieke logische vormen. We stellen een neuronale encoder-decoder transitie-gebaseerde parser voor die de eerste volledige dekking semantische grafiekparser is voor Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS). De modelarchitectuur maakt gebruik van stack-gebaseerde insluitingsfuncties, waarbij grafieken worden voorspeld samen met niet-geëxicaliseerde predicaten en hun tokenuitlijningen. Onze parser is nauwkeuriger dan aandachtsgebonden baselines op MRS, en op een extra Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark, en GPU batch verwerking maakt het een orde van grootte sneller dan een zeer nauwkeurige grammatica gebaseerde parser. Verder is de 86.69% Smatch score van onze MRS parser hoger dan de bovengrens op AMR parsing, waardoor MRS een aantrekkelijke keuze is als semantische representatie.', 'da': 'Tolkning af sætninger til sprogligt udtryksfulde semantiske repræsentationer er et centralt mål for Natural Language Processing. Alligevel har statistisk parsing fokuseret næsten udelukkende på bileksiske afhængigheder eller domænespecifikke logiske former. Vi foreslår en neural encoder-dekoder overgangsbaseret parser, som er den første fuld dækning semantiske grafparser til Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS). Modelarkitekturen bruger stakbaserede integreringsfunktioner, der forudsiger grafer sammen med ikke-ekskaliserede prædikater og deres token-justeringer. Vores parser er mere nøjagtig end opmærksomhedsbaserede basislinjer på MRS, og på en ekstra abstract meaning repræsentation (AMR) benchmark, og GPU batchbehandling gør det til en størrelsesorden hurtigere end en høj præcision grammatisk baseret parser. Desuden er 86,69% Smatch scoren af vores MRS parser højere end den øvre grænse på AMR parsing, hvilket gør MRS til et attraktivt valg som en semantisk repræsentation.', 'hr': 'Očitanje rečenica za semantičke predstave jezika jezika je ključni cilj procesiranja prirodnog jezika. Ipak, statistička analiza usredotočila se skoro isključivo na biliksičke zavisnosti ili logičke oblike specifične domene. Predlažemo analizatoru na transiciji osnovanog na neuronskom koderu koji je prvi semantički analizač semantičkog grafika punog pokrivanja za minimalne semantike rekursije (MRS). Modelna arhitektura koristi ugrađene karakteristike na staklama, predviđajući grafike zajedno s nepleksikaliziranim predikatima i njihovim znakovima. Naš analizator je precizniji od osnovnih linija na pažnji na MRS-u, i na dodatnoj kritičnoj mjeri abstrakta (AMR) zastupanja, a obradivanje GPU serije čini to redom veličine bržim od vrhunskog gramatičkog analizatora. Nadalje, 86,69% rezultata Smatch našeg analizatora MRS je veća od gornjeg povezanog na analizanju AMR-a, čineći MRS privlačnim izborom kao semantičku predstavu.', 'id': 'Menganalisis kalimat ke representation semantis secara bahasa-ekspresif adalah tujuan utama dari Proses Bahasa Alami. Namun penghuraian statistik telah fokus hampir eksklusif pada dependensi bileksis atau bentuk logis spesifik domain. Kami mengusulkan parser berasasi transisi pengkode saraf yang merupakan parser grafik semantis penuh penutup pertama untuk Semantik Minimal Recursion (MRS). Arkitektur model menggunakan fitur embedding berdasarkan tumpukan, memprediksi grafik bersama-sama dengan predikat tidak eksikal dan penyesuaian token mereka. Analser kami lebih akurat dari garis dasar yang berdasarkan perhatian pada MRS, dan pada benchmark tambahan Representasi Arti Abstrakt (AMR), dan proses batch GPU membuatnya tertib besar lebih cepat daripada parser berdasarkan gramatika dengan presisi tinggi. Selain itu, skor Smatch 86.69% dari pemeriksa MRS kita lebih tinggi dari batas atas dalam pemeriksa AMR, membuat MRS pilihan menarik sebagai sebuah representation semantis.', 'de': 'Das Parsen von Sätzen in sprachlich-expressive semantische Darstellungen ist ein zentrales Ziel der Natural Language Processing. Dabei konzentrierte sich das statistische Parsing fast ausschließlich auf bilexische Abhängigkeiten oder domänenspezifische logische Formen. Wir schlagen einen neuronalen Encoder-Decoder-Übergangs-basierten Parser vor, der der erste semantische Graphenparser mit voller Abdeckung für Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS) ist. Die Modellarchitektur verwendet stackbasierte Einbettungsfunktionen, die Graphen zusammen mit nicht exkalisierten Prädikaten und deren Token-Ausrichtungen vorhersagen. Unser Parser ist genauer als aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Baselines auf MRS und auf einem zusätzlichen AMR-Benchmark (Abstract Meaning Representation), und GPU-Batch-Verarbeitung macht ihn um eine Größenordnung schneller als ein hochpräziser grammatikbasierter Parser. Darüber hinaus ist der 86,69% Smatch Score unseres MRS Parsers höher als die Obergrenze für AMR Parsing, was MRS zu einer attraktiven Wahl als semantische Darstellung macht.', 'ko': '문장을 언어 표현 능력을 가진 의미 표징으로 해석하는 것은 자연 언어 처리의 관건적인 목표이다.그러나 통계 분석은 거의 양방향 의존이나 영역의 특정한 논리 형식에만 집중된다.우리는 신경 코딩 변환을 기반으로 하는 해석기를 제시했는데 이것은 가장 작은 귀속어의(MRS)에 사용되는 전체 덮어쓰기 어의도 해석기이다.이 모델 아키텍처는 스택에 기반한 내장 기능을 사용하여 비Exilicalized 술어와 태그를 정렬하여 그래픽을 예측합니다.GPU 배치 처리는 MRS와 추가 추상적 의미표현(AMR) 기준을 기반으로 하는 주의 기반 베이스라인보다 정확합니다. GPU 배치 처리는 고정밀 구문을 기반으로 하는 파서보다 수량 레벨이 빠릅니다.또한 MRS 해석기의 86.69%의 Smatch 점수가 AMR 해석의 상한선보다 높아서 MRS는 매력적인 의미 표시 선택이 되었다.', 'tr': "Sözleri dil-görkezilýän semantik suratlara gözlemek tebigy dil işlemeginiň a çyk maksady. Ýöne Statistikleri gözlemek bileksikaly baglançlyklaryň ýa-da domain hili logik biçimlerine üns berildi. Biz neiral ködleme tarlasynda geçiştirme teklif edip, bu da ilkinji dolu kapsamçy semantik grafik çözümleyici Minimal Rekursyon Semantik (MRS) üçin. Bu nusga arhitektura stack-tabanly içinden daşary çykyşlary ulanýar, grafikleri geçirilmeýän predikatlar we olaryň token çykyşlaryny bilen birleşdirir. Bizim çözümlerimiz MRS üzerinde üns tabanlı temel çizgilerinden ve ekleme Abstrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) çizgilerinden dogry, we GPU batch işlemleri bu şekilde büyüklük düzgün gramatik tabanlı çözümlerden hızlı bir şekilde yaratır. Daha da, 86.69% MRS parsörümizdeki küçük noktalar AMR parsasynda üst bağlı noktalardan yüksekdir. MRS'yi semantik temsil olarak çekici bir seçim yapar.", 'af': "Verwerking van setinge na lingwisies-uitdrukking semantiese voorstellings is 'n sleutel doel van Natuurlike Taal Prosessering. Maar statistiese verwerking het amper eksklusief gefokus op bileksiese afhanklikhede of domein-spesifieke logiese vorms. Ons voorstel 'n neurale enkoder-dekoder oorgang-gebaseerde parser wat is die eerste volledige omdekking semantiese graaf parser vir Minimale Rekursie Semantieke (MRS). Die model-arkitektuur gebruik stack-gebaseerde inbêer funksies, voorskou grafieke saam met onbepaalde predikate en hul token-oplyn. Ons ontleerder is meer presies as aandag-gebaseerde basisline op MRS, en op 'n addisionele Abstrakte Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark, en GPU-batch-prosessering maak dit 'n volgorde van grootheid vinniger as 'n hoë-presies grammar-gebaseerde ontleerder. Verder, die 86.69% Smatch aantal van ons MRS-ontleerder is hoër as die bo-gebind op AMR-ontleeding, maak MRS 'n atraktiewe keuse as 'n semantiese voorstelling.", 'sw': 'Kuchapisha hukumu kwa uwakilishi wa lugha yenye utani lengo la utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Yet statistical parsing has focussed almost exclusively on bilexical dependencies or domain-specific logical forms.  Tunapendekeza mchambuzi wa kodi ya neura anayeishi mpito ambao ni mchambuzi wa kwanza wa mpiga kurasa za mpiga picha za kwanza za kwa ajili ya matokeo ya kidogo (MRS). Ujengo wa modeli unatumia vipengele vya vifaa vilivyosimamia msingi, kutabiri picha kwa pamoja na utambulisho usio na ukosefu wa mifano na viwango vyao vya alama. Mchangiaji wetu ni sahihi zaidi ya misingi ya msingi yenye msingi wa hisia za MRS, na katika bendera ya ziada ya Uwakilishaji (AMR), na upasuaji wa bati ya GPU inafanya kuwa amri ya kuongezeka haraka zaidi ya chama kinachostahili. Zaidi ya hayo, vipindi 86.69 vya Uvumbuzi wa MRS ni bora kuliko vizuizini vya juu juu juu kwenye mabunge ya AMR, na vifanya MRS kuwa chaguo zuri kama uwakilishi wa kimapenzi.', 'fa': 'تحلیل کردن جمله\u200cها به نمایش\u200cهای semantic با زبان\u200cشناسی و منظور زبان\u200cشناسی یک هدف کلید تحلیل زبان طبیعی است. ولی تحلیل آماری تقریباً به خاص بستگی\u200cهای بیلکسیکی یا فرم\u200cهای منطقی ویژه\u200cی دامنی تمرکز کرده است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک جداکنده\u200cای که بر اساس تغییر\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200c معماری مدل از ویژه\u200cهای پیوند\u200cبندی بر پایه\u200cهای استک استفاده می\u200cکند، پیش\u200cبینی گراف\u200cها همراه با پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای غیر محیط\u200cشده و تعیین\u200cبندی\u200cهای نشانه\u200cهایشان استفاده می\u200cکند. ویرایشگر ما دقیق تر از خطوط بنیادی بنیاد توجه بر MRS است، و روی یک نقشه معنی اضافی (AMR) معنی اضافی است، و پردازش گروه GPU آن را سریع تر از یک ویرایشگر گرم دقیق بالا می کند. بعلاوه، امتياز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز ما 86.69 درصد از مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز مرکز بالاتر است، و MRS را به عنوان یک نمایش سنتانی انتخاب جذاب می کند.', 'sq': 'Analizimi i fjalëve në përfaqësimet semantike shprehëse gjuhësore është një qëllim kryesor i procesit të gjuhës natyrore. Megjithatë analiza statistike është përqëndruar pothuajse ekskluzivisht në varësitë bileksuale apo forme logjike specifike për domenin. Ne propozojmë një analizues të bazuar në transicionin e koduesit-dekoderit nervor i cili është analizuesi i parë i plotë i grafikës semantike për rekursionin minimal Semantik (MRS). The model architecture uses stack-based embedding features, predicting graphs jointly with unlexicalized predicates and their token alignments.  Analizatori ynë është më i saktë se linjat bazë bazuar në vëmendje në MRS, dhe në një referencë shtesë për përfaqësimin e kuptimit abstrakt (AMR), dhe procesimi i partisë GPU e bën atë një rend të madhësisë më të shpejtë se një analizues bazuar në gramatikë me precizion të lartë. Për më tepër, rezultati i Smatch 86.69% i analizuesit tonë MRS është më i lartë se limiti i lartë në analizimin AMR, duke bërë MRS një zgjedhje tërheqëse si një përfaqësim semantik.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ምሳሌ ስሜናዊ መልዕክቶችን ማግኘት የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም መክፈት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የstatistical parsing በተለየ ቢልባሲካዊ ተጠቃሚዎች ወይም ዶሜን-specific logical ፎቶችን በተለየ ነው፡፡ የናቡር የኮድ ኮድዶር-አካባቢ ፕሮግራም መጀመሪያ የሙሉ የsemantic graph ተማሪ ነው፡፡ ሞዴል መሠረት በMRS እና በተጨማሪው አካባቢ (AMR) የክፍለ መልዕክት፣ የGPU ባርክ ክፍተት በክፍለ ቁጥጥር ላይ ክፍተት ፈጥኖ ይደረጋል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር የMRS ፓርላማ 86.69 በመቶ ሰምጣክ ክፍል በAMR ማኅበረሰብ ላይ ካለው ከፍተኛ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեզվաբանական-արտահայտված սեմանտիկ ներկայացումների նախադասությունների վերլուծումը բնական լեզվի վերլուծության հիմնական նպատակն է: Սակայն վիճակագրական վերլուծությունը կենտրոնացել է գրեթե միայն երկլեքսիկական կախվածությունների կամ բնագավառի կոնկրետ տրամաբանական ձևերի վրա: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային կոդեր-կոդեր հաղորդակցման հիմքում հիմնված վերլուծում, որը առաջին ամբողջական սեմանտիկ գրաֆիկի վերլուծում է մինիմալ ռեկուրսիայի սեմանտիկայի (ՄՌՍ) համար: Մոդելի ճարտարապետությունը օգտագործում է հավաքական ներդրման հատկություններ, կանխատեսելով գրաֆիկները միասին առանց էլեքսիկական նախադասությունների և դրանց նշանների հավասարումների հետ: Our parser is more accurate than attention-based baselines on MRS, and on an additional Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark, and GPU batch processing makes it an order of magnitude faster than a high-precision grammar-based parser.  Ավելին, մեր ՄՌՍ վերլուծողի 86.69 տոկոսը ավելի բարձր է, քան AMR վերլուծման վերևի սահմանը, ինչը դարձնում է ՄՌՍ-ը գրավիչ ընտրություն, որպես սեմանտիկ ներկայացում:', 'az': "Sözümləri dilində ifadə edən semantik göstəricilərə ayırmaq təbiətli dil işləməsinin düzgün məqsədi. Halbuki statistik ayırması çox az qala biliksik bağlılıqlarına və domain-specific logic formlarına odaqlandı. Biz Nural Koder-Dekoder-Transition-Based Parser təklif edirik. Bu, Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS) üçün ilk tamamlama semantik Grafik Parlayıcıdır. Model arhitektura stack tabanlı inşa edilən fəaliyyətlərdən istifadə edir, grafələri müəyyən edilməmiş predikatlarla birlikdə təmin edir. Bizim parçacımız MRS'nin gözləmə səhifələrindən daha doğrudur, həmçinin daha çox abstrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark üstündə və GPU batch işləməsi onu yüksək precision grammatik vasitəsindən daha hızlı bir parçalayır. Daha sonra, MRS analizacımızın 86.69% küçük nöqtəsi AMR analizasyonda yüksək bağlı nöqtəsindən yüksək, MRS'nin semantik göstəricisi kimi seçici seçim etdi.", 'bn': 'ভাষাভাষিক-এক্সপ্রেক্ষিক প্রতিনিধিত্বের পার্সিং বাক্য পার্সিং করা হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার একট কিন্তু পরিসংখ্যানের পরিসংখ্যান পার্জিং প্রায় শুধুমাত্র বিলাবিস্তারিক নির্ভর অথবা ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট ব আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি একটি নিউরেল এনকোডার-ডেকোডার বিনিময় প্রস্তাব-ভিত্তিক সংক্রান্ত সেম্যান্টিক গ্রাফার প্রথম সম্পূর্ণ কাভারেজে মডেল স্ট্যাক ভিত্তিক প্রতিষ্ঠান ব্যবহার করে, অক্সিক্সিক্সিকালের প্রতীক এবং তাদের চিহ্নের সাথে যুক্ত ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্ আমাদের ব্যাচার এমআরএস-এর উপর মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে বেশি সঠিক এবং অতিরিক্ত আবট্রাক্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব (এএমআর) বেঞ্চমার্ক এবং জিপিউ ব্যাচ প্রক্রিয়া এছাড়াও, আমাদের এমআরএস পার্সিং এর উপরের স্ম্যাচ স্কোর ৮৬. ৬৯% স্ম্যাচ স্কোর বেশি বেশী বেশী, এমআরএস সেমেন্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব হিসেবে এক আ', 'cs': 'Analýza vět do lingvisticky expresivních sémantických reprezentací je klíčovým cílem zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Statistická analýza se však zaměřila téměř výhradně na bilexické závislosti nebo doménově specifické logické formy. Navrhujeme přechodový parser založený na neuronovém kodéru a dekodéru, který je prvním sémantickým parserem plného pokrytí pro minimalní rekurzní sémantiku (MRS). Architektura modelu používá funkce vkládání založené na zásobníku, předpovídající grafy společně s neexikalizovanými predikáty a jejich zarovnáním tokenů. Náš parser je přesnější než základní čáry založené na pozornosti na MRS a na dalším benchmarku Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) a dávkové zpracování GPU ho činí o řád velikosti rychlejší než vysoce přesný parser založený na gramatice. Dále je 86,69% Smatch skóre našeho MRS parseru vyšší než horní hranice při AMR parsování, což dělá MRS atraktivní volbu jako sémantickou reprezentaci.', 'ca': "L'analització de frases a representacions semàntiques lingüísticament expressives és un objectiu clau del processament de llenguatges naturals. Yet statistical parsing has focussed almost exclusively on bilexical dependencies or domain-specific logical forms.  Proposem un analitzador basat en la transició del codificador-decodificador neural que és el primer analitzador semàntic de gràfics de cobertura completa per a Semàtics de Recursió Mínima (MRS). L'arquitectura model utilitza característiques d'incorporació basades en piles, predint gràfics juntament amb predicats no exicalitzats i els seus alliniaments de fitxes. El nostre analitzador és més precis que les línies de base basades en l'atenció en la ressonància magnètica, i en un punt de referència adicional de representació de significat abstract (AMR), i el processament de lots GPU el fa un ordre de magnitud més ràpid que un analitzador basat en gramàtica d'alta precisió. També, la puntuació Smatch del 86,69% del nostre analitzador de ressonància magnètica és més alta que la superfície de l'analització AMR, fent que la ressonància magnètica sigui una elecció atractiva com a representació semàntica.", 'et': 'Loomuliku keele töötlemise põhieesmärk on lausete parsimine keeleliselt ekspressiivseteks semantilisteks esitusteks. Ent statistiline parsimine on keskendunud peaaegu eranditult kaksiksõltuvustele või domeenispetsiifilistele loogilistele vormidele. Pakume välja neurokodeeri-dekooderi üleminekupõhise parseri, mis on esimene täieliku katvusega semantiline graafiku parser minimaalse rekursioonisemantika jaoks (MRS). Mudeli arhitektuur kasutab virnapõhiseid manustamisfunktsioone, ennustades graafikuid koos täpsustamata predikaatide ja nende märkide joondustega. Meie parser on täpsem kui tähelepanu põhinevad baasjooned MRS ja täiendav Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) võrdlusalus ja GPU partiitöötlus muudavad selle suurusjärgu kiiremaks kui suure täpsusega grammatikapõhine parser. Lisaks on meie MRS parser 86,69% Smatch skoor kõrgem kui ülemine piir AMR parsimisel, muutes MRS atraktiivseks valikuks semantilise esitusena.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden jäsentäminen kielellisesti ekspressiivisiksi semanttisiksi representaatioiksi on luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn keskeinen tavoite. Kuitenkin tilastollinen jäsennys on keskittynyt lähes yksinomaan kaksikerroksisiin riippuvuuksiin tai toimialueekohtaisiin loogisiin muotoihin. Ehdotamme neurokooderi-dekooderi-siirtymään perustuvaa parseria, joka on ensimmäinen täyden kattavuuden semanttinen graafiparseri Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS) varten. Malliarkkitehtuuri käyttää pinopohjaisia upotusominaisuuksia, jotka ennustavat kaavioita yhdessä täsmentämättömien predikaattien ja niiden merkkien linjausten kanssa. Analysoijamme on tarkempi kuin huomiopohjaiset peruslinjat MRS:ssä, ja ylimääräinen Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) -vertailuarvo ja GPU-eräkäsittely tekevät siitä suuruusluokkaa nopeamman kuin erittäin tarkka kieliopillinen jäsentäjä. Lisäksi MRS-jäsentäjämme 86,69% Smatch-pistemäärä on korkeampi kuin AMR-jäsennyksen yläraja, mikä tekee MRS:stä houkuttelevan valinnan semanttisena esityksenä.', 'bs': 'Očitanje rečenica za semantičke predstave jezika jezika je ključni cilj procesa prirodnog jezika. Ipak, statističko analiziranje se usredotočilo skoro isključivo na biliksičke zavisnosti ili logičke oblike specifične domene. Predlažemo pretraživač na transiciji osnovanog na neuronskom koderu koji je prvi semantički analizač semantičkog grafika punog pokrivanja za minimalne semantike rekursije (MRS). Modelna arhitektura koristi ugrađene karakteristike na staklama, predviđajući grafike zajedno sa nepleksikalnim predikatima i njihovim znakovima. Naš analizator je precizniji od osnovnih linija na pažnji na MRS-u, i na dodatnoj kriteriji abstraktivnog značajnog predstavljanja (AMR), a obradivanje GPU serije čini to naredbom veličine bržim od analizatora na visokoj preciznoj gramatici. Nadalje, 86,69% rezultata Smatch našeg analizatora MRS je veća od gornjeg povezanog na analizanju AMR-a, čineći MRS privlačnim izborom kao semantičku predstavu.', 'jv': "Yukoning Language Awak dhéwé nggunakake karo nggawe koder-decoder nggawe mulasar tentang karo perusahaan semanti nggawe barang nggawe para minimal recurrsion semanti c (MR). architecture We'll see. Tulung, akeh liyane", 'he': "מעבדת משפטים לייצגות סמנטיות שפתיים מבטאות היא מטרה מפתחת של מעבדת שפת טבעית. אבל בדיקת סטטיסטיקה התמקדה כמעט בלעדית בתלויות בילקסיות או צורות הגיוניות ספציפיות לתחום. אנו מציעים מעבד מבוסס על מעבר קודד-קידור עצבי שהוא מעבד גרף סמנטי הכיסוי המלא הראשון לסמנטיקה מינימלית (MRS). הארכיטקטורה של המודל משתמשת בתוכניות קישור מבוססות על ערימות, צפוי גרפים ביחד עם תוכניות בלתי סקסיות ומתאימות הסימנים שלהם. המחקר שלנו מדויק יותר מאשר קווי הבסיס שמבוססים על תשומת לב על MRS, ובנקודת הבסיס של מייצג משמעות אבסטרטקטית (Abstract Meaning Representation, AMR) נוספת, והעיבוד במחלקה GPU עושה את זה סדר גודל מהיר יותר מאשר המחקר המבוסס על גרמטיקה מדויקה גבוהה. חוץ מזה, נקודת הסמוטץ' של 86.69% של המחקר MRS שלנו היא גבוהה יותר מהגבוהה ביותר על המחקר AMR, מה שעושה MRS בחירה מושכת כייצוג סמנטי.", 'sk': 'Razčlenitev stavkov v jezikovno izrazite semantične reprezentacije je ključni cilj obdelave naravnega jezika. Vendar se je statistično razčlenjevanje osredotočilo skoraj izključno na dvostranske odvisnosti ali domensko specifične logične oblike. Predlagamo razčlenjevalnik, ki temelji na prehodu na nevronskem kodirju-dekodirju, ki je prvi semantični grafski razčlenjevalnik s polno pokritostjo za minimalno rekursijsko semantiko (MRS). Arhitektura modela uporablja funkcije vdelave na podlagi skladišča, ki napovedujejo grafe skupaj z nezahtevnimi predikati in njihovimi poravnavi žetonov. Naš razčlenjevalnik je natančnejši od osnovnih črt na podlagi pozornosti pri MRS in dodatni referenčni vrednosti za predstavljanje abstraktnega pomena (AMR) ter serijska obdelava GPU omogoča, da je velikost hitrejši od visoko natančnega slovničnega razčlenjevalnika. Poleg tega je 86,69% Smatch ocena našega razčlenjevalnika MRS višja od zgornje meje pri razčlenjevanju AMR, zaradi česar je MRS privlačna izbira kot semantična predstavitev.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Babu da parse na statistical ya fokus tsakanin bayani kawai a kan baka-bilsi ko fomat masu ƙayyade lokalogi. Tuna goyyade wani parse na kode-kode-danne ga transitional na neural wanda ke zama na farkon rufe-rufe grammar na semantic parser wa masu kyauta da Cikakken Resursion na ƙarami (MRS). Ana amfani da tsarin ayuka na fasa-bane masu tsari, mai bastarwa grafyutan da aka yi amfani da kuma masu daidaita ayukansu. Parser ɗin mu ne mafi daidaita ko bango masu bincike a kan MRS, da kuma a kan wata ƙara na `%s' da ake yiwuwa Reposition (AMR), da kuma batch-batch na GPU, yana kasa wani umurni da ya girma sauri don a ƙayyade tally-tally grammar-based Parser. Furan, score na 86.69% Smatch na MRS Parser ɗin shine mafi girma daga rufe kan parse na AMR, kuma ya sanya MRS wata zafi mai zura kamar mataimaki.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག Yet statistical parsing has focused almost exclusively on bilexical dependencies or domain-specific logical forms. We propose a neural encoder-decoder transition-based parser which is the first full-coverage semantic graph parser for Minimal Recursion Semantics (MRS). Model architecture uses stack-based embedding features, predicting graphs jointly with unlexicalized predicates and their token alignments. Our parser is more accurate than attention-based baselines on MRS, and on an additional Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) benchmark, and GPU batch processing makes it an order of magnitude faster than a high-precision grammar-based parser. Further, the 86.69% Smatch score of our MRS parser is higher than the upper-bound on AMR parsing, making MRS an attractive choice as a semantic representation.'}
{'en': 'Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Based on a Novel Tagging Scheme', 'fr': "Extraction conjointe d'entités et de relations sur la base d'un nouveau schéma de marquage", 'ar': 'الاستخراج المشترك للكيانات والعلاقات بناءً على مخطط وضع العلامات على المستجدات', 'es': 'Extracción conjunta de entidades y relaciones basada en un nuevo esquema de etiquetado', 'pt': 'Extração conjunta de entidades e relações com base em um novo esquema de marcação', 'hi': 'एक उपन्यास टैगिंग योजना के आधार पर संस्थाओं और संबंधों का संयुक्त निष्कर्षण', 'zh': '盖新型标方案之实体与合而取之也', 'ja': '新規タグ付けスキームに基づくエンティティと関係の共同抽出', 'ru': 'Совместное извлечение сущностей и отношений на основе новой схемы маркировки', 'ga': 'Comheastóscadh Aonán agus Caidrimh Bunaithe ar Scéim Chlibeála Úrscéalta', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი ელემენტების და შესაბამისათვის გამოყენება ნოგელი მაგრამების სქემიდან', 'hu': 'Szervezetek és kapcsolatok közös kivonata új címkézési rendszer alapján', 'el': 'Κοινή εξαγωγή οντοτήτων και σχέσεων με βάση ένα νέο σύστημα σήμανσης', 'it': 'Estrazione congiunta di entità e relazioni basate su un nuovo schema di etichettatura', 'lt': 'Bendras subjektų ir santykių ekstraktas pagal naują ženklinimo sistemą', 'kk': 'Жаңа тегтер сұлбасына негізделген нысандар мен қатынастарын тарқату', 'mk': 'Заедничка екстракција на ентитети и односи врз основа на нов шем на означување', 'ml': 'Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Based on a Novel Tagging Scheme', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Perkongsian Entiti dan Hubungan Berdasarkan Skema Tagging Novel', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni Konġunta ta’ Entitajiet u Relazzjonijiet Ibbażata fuq Skema Ġdida ta’ Tagging', 'mn': 'Нэгдсэн, харилцааны холбоотой холбоотой нийлүүлэлт', 'ro': 'Extragerea comună a entităților și relațiilor pe baza unui nou sistem de etichetare', 'pl': 'Wspólna ekstrakcja podmiotów i relacji w oparciu o nowy system tagowania', 'no': 'Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Based on a Novel Tagging Scheme', 'sr': 'Zajednička izvlačenja područja i odnosa na osnovu novog šema oznake', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Iska saarista iyo xiriirka ku saleysan qorshaha hagitaanka bannaanka', 'sv': 'Gemensam utvinning av enheter och relationer baserat på ett nytt märkningssystem', 'ta': 'நிலை ஒட்டுதல் முறைமையை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளீடுகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை சேர்த்து வெளியேற்று', 'ur': 'نوئل ٹاگنگ سیم پر بنیاد رکھی ہوئی ایٹیونیٹوں اور رابطے کی جوئی نکالی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sơ tán đặc biệt các đơn vị và quan hệ Kết quả theo một kế hoạch đánh dấu tiểu thuyết', 'bg': 'Съвместно извличане на субекти и отношения въз основа на нова схема за етикетиране', 'da': 'Fælles uddrag af enheder og relationer baseret på en ny mærkningsordning', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijke extractie van entiteiten en relaties op basis van een nieuw labelschema', 'hr': 'Zajednička izvlačenja područja i odnosa na temelju novog programa oznake', 'id': 'Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Based on a Novel Tagging Scheme', 'ko': '새로운 표기 방안에 기초한 실체와 관계 연합 추출', 'fa': 'استخراج شرکت\u200cها و ارتباطات متحده بر روی نقشه\u200cی نقشه\u200cهای نوئل', 'de': 'Gemeinsame Extraktion von Entitäten und Beziehungen basierend auf einem neuartigen Tagging-Schema', 'tr': 'Tägler Taýgyny Buýruk', 'af': "Gekoppelde uitpakking van eenhede en Relasies gebaseer op 'n Novel etiket skema", 'sw': 'Kitengo cha Kutengwa na Kuhusiana Kutokana na Mpango wa Uchaguzi wa Sayansi', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i përbashkët i njësive dhe marrëdhënieve bazuar në një skemë të re etiketash', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Միակությունների և հարաբերությունների միավոր արտահանումը, հիմնված նոր նշանակման ծրագրի վրա', 'az': 'Novel Tagging Scheme vasit…ôsil…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü Entit…ôl…ôrin v…ô ńįliŇükil…ôrin', 'bn': 'একটি নোভেল ট্যাগিং বিন্যাসের ভিত্তিক এন্টিটি এবং সম্পর্কের সংযুক্ত করুন', 'cs': 'Společná extrakce subjektů a vztahů na základě nového označovacího systému', 'ca': "Extracció conjunta d'entitats i relacions basada en un nou esquema d'etiquetage", 'bs': 'Zajednička izvlačenja područja i odnosa na temelju novog šema oznake', 'fi': 'Yhteinen hankinta yhteisöistä ja suhteista uuden merkintäjärjestelmän perusteella', 'et': 'Ühine väljavõte üksustest ja suhetest uue märgistusskeemi alusel', 'jv': 'Join', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Skupni izvleček subjektov in odnosov na podlagi nove sheme označevanja', 'he': 'Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Based on a Novel Tagging Scheme', 'bo': 'Novel Tagging Scheme Based on Entities and Relations Extraction'}
{'en': 'Joint extraction of entities and relations is an important task in information extraction. To tackle this problem, we firstly propose a novel tagging scheme that can convert the joint extraction task to a tagging problem.. Then, based on our tagging scheme, we study different end-to-end models to extract entities and their relations directly, without identifying entities and relations separately. We conduct experiments on a public dataset produced by distant supervision method and the experimental results show that the tagging based methods are better than most of the existing pipelined and joint learning methods. What’s more, the end-to-end model proposed in this paper, achieves the best results on the public dataset.', 'ar': 'يعتبر الاستخراج المشترك للكيانات والعلاقات مهمة مهمة في استخراج المعلومات. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح أولاً مخططًا جديدًا لوضع العلامات يمكنه تحويل مهمة الاستخراج المشتركة إلى مشكلة وضع علامات .. ثم ، بناءً على مخطط العلامات الخاص بنا ، ندرس نماذج مختلفة شاملة لاستخراج الكيانات وعلاقاتها مباشرةً ، دون تحديد الكيانات والعلاقات بشكل منفصل. نجري تجارب على مجموعة بيانات عامة تم إنتاجها بواسطة طريقة إشراف بعيدة وتظهر النتائج التجريبية أن الأساليب القائمة على وضع العلامات أفضل من معظم طرق التعلم القائمة على خطوط الأنابيب والمشتركة. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن النموذج الشامل المقترح في هذه الورقة يحقق أفضل النتائج في مجموعة البيانات العامة.', 'es': 'La extracción conjunta de entidades y relaciones es una tarea importante en la extracción de información. Para abordar este problema, primero proponemos un esquema de etiquetado novedoso que puede convertir la tarea de extracción conjunta en un problema de etiquetado. Luego, en función de nuestro esquema de etiquetado, estudiamos diferentes modelos de extremo a extremo para extraer entidades y sus relaciones directamente, sin identificar entidades y relaciones por separado. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en un conjunto de datos público producido por el método de supervisión a distancia y los resultados experimentales muestran que los métodos basados en el etiquetado son mejores que la mayoría de los métodos de aprendizaje en línea y conjuntos existentes. Además, el modelo integral propuesto en este documento logra los mejores resultados en el conjunto de datos públicos.', 'pt': 'A extração conjunta de entidades e relações é uma tarefa importante na extração de informações. Para resolver este problema, primeiro propomos um novo esquema de marcação que pode converter a tarefa de extração conjunta em um problema de marcação. Então, com base em nosso esquema de marcação, estudamos diferentes modelos de ponta a ponta para extrair entidades e suas relações diretamente, sem identificar entidades e relações separadamente. Conduzimos experimentos em um conjunto de dados público produzido pelo método de supervisão à distância e os resultados experimentais mostram que os métodos baseados em marcação são melhores do que a maioria dos métodos existentes de aprendizado em pipeline e conjunto. Além disso, o modelo de ponta a ponta proposto neste artigo alcança os melhores resultados no conjunto de dados público.', 'fr': "L'extraction conjointe d'entités et de relations est une tâche importante dans l'extraction d'informations. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons tout d'abord un nouveau schéma de marquage qui peut convertir la tâche d'extraction conjointe en problème de marquage. Ensuite, sur la base de notre schéma de marquage, nous étudions différents modèles de bout en bout pour extraire directement les entités et leurs relations, sans identifier les entités et les relations séparément. Nous menons des expériences sur un ensemble de données public produit par la méthode de supervision à distance et les résultats expérimentaux montrent que les méthodes basées sur le marquage sont meilleures que la plupart des méthodes d'apprentissage pipeline et conjointes existantes. De plus, le modèle de bout en bout proposé dans cet article permet d'obtenir les meilleurs résultats sur l'ensemble de données public.", 'ja': '実体と関係の共同抽出は、情報抽出における重要なタスクである。この問題に取り組むために、まず、共同抽出タスクをタグ付け問題に変換できる新しいタグ付けスキームを提案します。次に、私たちのタグ付けスキームに基づいて、エンティティと関係を別々に識別することなく、エンティティとその関係を直接抽出するための異なるエンドツーエンドモデルを研究します。遠隔監視法で作成された公開データセットの実験を行っており、実験結果は、タグ付けベースの方法が既存のほとんどのパイプラインおよび共同学習方法よりも優れていることを示しています。さらに、この論文で提案されたエンドツーエンドのモデルは、パブリックデータセットで最高の結果を達成します。', 'hi': 'संस्थाओं और संबंधों का संयुक्त निष्कर्षण सूचना निष्कर्षण में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। इस समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम सबसे पहले एक उपन्यास टैगिंग योजना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संयुक्त निष्कर्षण कार्य को टैगिंग समस्या में परिवर्तित कर सकता है। फिर, हमारी टैगिंग योजना के आधार पर, हम अलग-अलग इकाइयों और संबंधों की पहचान किए बिना, संस्थाओं और उनके संबंधों को सीधे निकालने के लिए अलग-अलग एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम दूर के पर्यवेक्षण विधि द्वारा उत्पादित एक सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं और प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि टैगिंग आधारित तरीके मौजूदा पाइपलाइन और संयुक्त सीखने के तरीकों में से अधिकांश से बेहतर हैं। क्या अधिक है, इस पेपर में प्रस्तावित एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल, सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर सबसे अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Совместное извлечение субъектов и отношений является важной задачей в извлечении информации. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы сначала предлагаем новую схему тегирования, которая может преобразовать совместную задачу извлечения в задачу тегирования. Затем, основываясь на нашей схеме тегирования, мы изучаем различные сквозные модели для извлечения сущностей и их отношений напрямую, не идентифицируя сущности и отношения отдельно. Мы проводим эксперименты с открытым набором данных, полученным методом дистанционного наблюдения, и экспериментальные результаты показывают, что методы на основе меток лучше, чем большинство существующих методов трубопроводного и совместного обучения. Более того, сквозная модель, предложенная в этой статье, достигает наилучших результатов в публичном наборе данных.', 'zh': '实体与合取者,信取中之要务也。 凡此一事,首建新标,可转相提挈。 然后,我们标记方案,我们研究不同的端模形以直提取实体,而没有独别实体和关系。 远程监法所生公共数据集上实验实验结果表明,基于标记之法,优于今者多流水线合从学术。 更要本文端到端模在公共数据集上取最佳。', 'ga': "Is tasc tábhachtach é eastóscadh comhpháirteach eintiteas agus caidreamh. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, molaimid ar dtús scéim clibeála nua a d'fhéadfadh fadhb na clibeála a bhaint as an tasc eastósctha comhpháirteach. gan aonáin agus caidrimh a shainaithint ar leithligh. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí poiblí arna dtáirgeadh ag modh maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin agus léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil na modhanna atá bunaithe ar chlibeáil níos fearr ná an chuid is mó de na modhanna comhfhoghlama píblíne agus foghlama atá ann cheana féin. Ina theannta sin, baintear amach na torthaí is fearr ar an tacar sonraí poiblí sa mhúnla deireadh go deireadh atá molta sa pháipéar seo.", 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციაში ერთადერთი ინტერქტაქტიების და შესახებ მნიშვნელოვანი დავალება. ჱა ეა პაჱოპაგთმ რჲჱთ ოპჲბლვმ, ოყპგჲ ოპველადამვ ნჲგთნჟკა ჟვკმა ჱა რვდპაუთწ, კჲწრჲ მჲზვ ეა ოპვგყპნვმ ჟყღჲრჲ თჱეპყკუთწ ნა ოპჲბლვმ ჱა რ შემდეგ, ჩვენი მაგრამების სქემიდან, ჩვენ განსხვავებული საკუთარი მოდელების განსხვავება, რომ ინტერტიკები და შესახებ ექსტრაქტირებული, განსხვავებული ინტერტიკები და შესახებ განს ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ საზოგადო მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც განმავლობაში გავაკეთებულია და ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები გამოიყენებენ, რომ ტეგერიმენტის და რაც უფრო მეტია, საკუთარი მოდელი, რომელიც ამ დონეში მოწყვეტილია, მიიღება უფრო მკეთესი შედეგები საზოგადო მონაცემების სეტში.', 'hu': 'Az egységek és kapcsolatok közös kitermelése fontos feladat az információkitermelésben. A probléma megoldása érdekében először egy új címkézési rendszert javasolunk, amely a közös extrakciós feladatot címkézési problémává alakíthatja. Ezután a címkézési sémánk alapján különböző end-to-end modelleket tanulmányozunk az entitások és kapcsolataik közvetlen kivonására, anélkül, hogy külön azonosítanánk entitásokat és kapcsolatokat. Távoli felügyeleti módszerrel előállított nyilvános adatkészleten végzünk kísérleteket, és a kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a címkézésen alapuló módszerek jobb, mint a meglévő pipelined és közös tanulási módszerek többsége. Ráadásul a tanulmányban javasolt end-to-end modell a legjobb eredményeket éri el a nyilvános adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Η κοινή εξαγωγή οντοτήτων και σχέσεων αποτελεί σημαντικό καθήκον στην εξαγωγή πληροφοριών. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε πρώτα ένα νέο σύστημα επισήμανσης που μπορεί να μετατρέψει την κοινή εργασία εξαγωγής σε ένα πρόβλημα επισήμανσης. Στη συνέχεια, με βάση το σχέδιό μας, μελετάμε διαφορετικά μοντέλα για να εξάγουμε οντότητες και τις σχέσεις τους άμεσα, χωρίς να προσδιορίζουμε οντότητες και σχέσεις ξεχωριστά. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε ένα δημόσιο σύνολο δεδομένων που παράγεται με μέθοδο απομακρυσμένης επίβλεψης και τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι μέθοδοι που βασίζονται στην επισήμανση είναι καλύτερες από τις περισσότερες από τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους αγωγής και κοινής μάθησης. Επιπλέον, το ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο που προτείνεται στην παρούσα εργασία επιτυγχάνει τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα στο δημόσιο σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'it': "L'estrazione congiunta di entità e relazioni è un compito importante nell'estrazione delle informazioni. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo in primo luogo un nuovo schema di tagging che può convertire l'attività di estrazione congiunta in un problema di tagging. Quindi, sulla base del nostro schema di tagging, studiamo diversi modelli end-to-end per estrarre direttamente le entità e le loro relazioni, senza identificare entità e relazioni separatamente. Conduciamo esperimenti su un set di dati pubblico prodotto con metodo di supervisione a distanza e i risultati sperimentali mostrano che i metodi basati sul tagging sono migliori della maggior parte dei metodi di apprendimento pipelined e congiunto esistenti. Inoltre, il modello end-to-end proposto in questo articolo, raggiunge i migliori risultati sul set di dati pubblici.", 'kk': 'Бірлескен нысандар мен қатынастарды тарқату - мәліметті тарқату үшін маңызды тапсырма. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін біріншіден, біріншіден, жалпы тарқату тапсырмасын тегтерді мәселеге аударуға болады. Содан кейін белгілеу сұлбасымыздың негізінде біз басқа соңындағы үлгілерді бір-бірінен қатынастарын түсіргендерді және қатынастарын түсіргендерді зерттейміз. Біз қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау әдісімен жасалған көпшілік деректер жиынында тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер тегтердің негізделген тәжірибелердің көпшілігі бар Бұл қағаздың аяқтау үлгісі, көпшілік деректер жиынының ең жақсы нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Bendras subjektų gavimas ir santykiai yra svarbi informacijos gavimo užduotis. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, pirmiausia siūlome naują ženklinimo sistemą, kuri galėtų pakeisti bendrą gavybos užduotį į ženklinimo problemą.. Tuomet, remdamiesi mūsų ženklinimo sistema, mes tiriame skirtingus modelius nuo vienos iki kitos, kad tiesiogiai išgautume subjektus ir jų santykius, nenustatant subjektų ir santykių atskirai. Atliekame eksperimentus su viešuoju duomenų rinkiniu, parengtu taikant nuotolinę priežiūrą, ir eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad ženklinimo metodai yra geresni nei dauguma esamų vamzdynų ir bendrų mokymosi metodų. Be to, šiame dokumente siūlomas galutinis modelis pasiekia geriausius viešųjų duomenų rinkinio rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Заедничката екстракција на ентитетите и односите е важна задача во екстракцијата на информации. За да го решиме овој проблем, прво предложуваме нова шема за означување која може да ја претвори заедничката задача за извлекување во проблем за означување.. Then, based on our tagging scheme, we study different end-to-end models to extract entities and their relations directly, without identifying entities and relations separately.  Ние спроведуваме експерименти на јавен податок произведен со далечен метод на надзор и експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека методите базирани на означувањето се подобри од повеќето постојани гасоводени и заеднички методи на учење. Покрај тоа, моделот од крај до крај предложен во овој весник, постигнува најдобри резултати на јавните податоци.', 'ml': 'Joint extraction of entities and relations is an important task in information extraction.  ഈ പ്രശ്നം നോക്കാന്\u200d, ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ടാഗിങ്ങ് പദ്ധതിയെ മാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. യൂട്ട് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന പിന്നെ, നമ്മുടെ ടാഗിങ്ങ് സ്ക്രീമിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത അവസാന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു, വസ്തുക്കളെയും ബന്ധങ്ങളെയ ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതിയിലൂടെ ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഒരു പൊതുവിന്\u200dറെ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റില്\u200d നാം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം അവസാനിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d, പൊതു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Joint extraction of entities and relations is an important task in information extraction.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kita pertama-tama melamar skema tag baru yang boleh tukar tugas ekstraksi bersama ke masalah tag.. Kemudian, berdasarkan skema tag kami, kami mempelajari model yang berbeza akhir-akhir untuk mengekstrak entiti dan hubungan mereka secara langsung, tanpa mengidentifikasi entiti dan hubungan secara terpisah. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data awam yang dihasilkan oleh kaedah pengawasan jauh dan hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah berdasarkan tag lebih baik daripada kebanyakan kaedah pembelajaran yang ada. Lagipun, model akhir-akhir yang diusulkan dalam kertas ini, mencapai keputusan terbaik pada set data awam.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni konġunta ta’ entitajiet u relazzjonijiet hija kompitu importanti fl-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, l-ewwel nett nipproponu skema ġdida ta’ tikkettar li tista’ tikkonverti l-kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni konġunta f’problema ta’ tikkettar.. Then, based on our tagging scheme, we study different end-to-end models to extract entities and their relations directly, without identifying entities and relations separately.  Għandna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq sett ta’ dejta pubblika prodott permezz ta’ metodu ta’ superviżjoni mill-bogħod u r-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodi bbażati fuq it-tikkettar huma a ħjar mill-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi ta’ tagħlim ippjanati u konġunti eżistenti. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell minn tarf sa tarf propost f’dan id-dokument jikseb l-aħjar riżultati fuq is-sett ta’ dejta pubblika.', 'no': 'Kopla ekstrahering av einingar og relasjonar er ein viktig oppgåve i utpakking av informasjon. For å løsa dette problemet, først foreslår vi eit roman merkingsskjema som kan konvertera den samsvarte utpakkingsprogrammet til eit merkingsprogram & # 160; … Deretter, basert på merkingsskjema vårt, studerer vi ulike sluttmodeller for å pakka ut einingar og forholdene deres direkte, utan å identifisera einingar og forholdar separe. Vi gjer eksperimenter på eit offentleg dataset som er produsert av distant oversiktsmetode og eksperimentelle resultatene viser at merkingsbaserte metodane er bedre enn dei fleste av dei eksisterande røyringsmetodane og kople læringsmetodane. Det som er meir, er modellen til slutten som foreslått i denne papiret, å oppnå dei beste resultatene på den offentlige dataset.', 'pl': 'Wspólna ekstrakcja podmiotów i relacji jest ważnym zadaniem w ekstrakcji informacji. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, najpierw proponujemy nowy schemat tagowania, który może przekształcić wspólne zadanie ekstrakcji na problem tagowania. Następnie, w oparciu o nasz schemat tagowania, badamy różne modele end-to-end, aby wyodrębnić podmioty i ich relacje bezpośrednio, bez identyfikowania oddzielnie podmiotów i relacji. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na publicznym zbiorze danych wytwarzanym metodą nadzoru na odległość, a wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że metody oparte na tagowaniu są lepsze niż większość istniejących metod nauki pipelined i wspólnych. Co więcej, zaproponowany w niniejszym artykule model end-to-end osiąga najlepsze wyniki na publicznym zbiorze danych.', 'ro': 'Extragerea în comun a entităților și relațiilor este o sarcină importantă în extragerea informațiilor. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem în primul rând o nouă schemă de etichetare care poate converti sarcina comună de extragere într-o problemă de etichetare. Apoi, pe baza schemei noastre de etichetare, studiem diferite modele end-to-end pentru a extrage entitățile și relațiile lor direct, fără a identifica entitățile și relațiile separat. Realizăm experimente pe un set de date public produs prin metoda de supraveghere la distanță, iar rezultatele experimentale arată că metodele bazate pe etichetare sunt mai bune decât majoritatea metodelor de învățare pipelined și comun existente. Mai mult, modelul end-to-end propus în această lucrare, obține cele mai bune rezultate pe setul de date publice.', 'sr': 'Zajednička izvlačenja entitata i odnosa je važan zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Da bi se riješili ovog problem a, prvo predlažemo novu režimu označavanja koja može pretvoriti zajednički izvlačeni zadatak u problem označavanja. Onda, na osnovu našeg šema označavanja, proučavamo različite modele kraja do kraja da izvučemo entitate i njihove odnose direktno, bez identifikacije entiteta i odnosa odvojeno. Mi provodimo eksperimente na javnoj seti podataka proizvođenoj udaljenim metodom nadzora i eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da su metode bazirane na etiketi bolje od većine postojećih metoda naftne i zajedničke učenja. Što je još, model kraja do kraja predložen u ovom papiru postiže najbolji rezultat na javnom setu podataka.', 'so': 'Dalbashada wadajirka ah iyo xiriirka waa shaqo muhiim ah oo la soo saaro macluumaadka. Si aan u xambaarano dhibaatadan ugu horeeyo waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qorshaha warqadda tagsiga oo u beddelin karta shaqada wadajirka ah oo dhibaato la tago... Markaas waxaynu ku baranaynaa qaabab kala duduwan dhammaadka ugu dambeeya si aan u soo saarno alaabta iyo xiriirkooda si toos ah, ayan u aqoonsan waxyaabaha iyo xiriirka gooni ah. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan macluumaadka dadweynaha oo soo saaray qaababka ilaalinta oo fog, waxayna muuqaneysaa in qaababka baaritaanka lagu soo bandhigayo ay ka wanaagsan yihiin hababka aad ku jirto oo ka mid ah qaababka waxbarashada wadajirka ah. Waxa dheeraad ah, modelka ugu dambaysta ee warqadan laga soo jeeday, wuxuu gaadhaa resultada ugu wanaagsan ee ku saabsan macluumaadka dadweynaha.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක්. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් නියම් ටැග් ස්කම්පයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ඊට පස්සේ, අපේ ටැගින් සැකසුමේ අධ්\u200dයය, අපි වෙනස් අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම අන අපි සාමාජික දත්ත සූදානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා දුරස්ථාන බලන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවන් සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවන් පෙන්වන්න පුළ තව මොකක්ද තියෙන්නේ, අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි, මේ පත්තියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ, සාමාන්\u200dය දත්', 'sv': 'Gemensam utvinning av enheter och relationer är en viktig uppgift vid informationsutvinning. För att ta itu med detta problem föreslår vi först ett nytt märkningssystem som kan omvandla den gemensamma extraktionsuppgiften till ett märkningsproblem. Sedan studerar vi, baserat på vårt märkningssystem, olika end-to-end modeller för att extrahera entiteter och deras relationer direkt, utan att identifiera entiteter och relationer separat. Vi genomför experiment på en offentlig datauppsättning producerad med fjärrövervakning och de experimentella resultaten visar att märkningsbaserade metoderna är bättre än de flesta av de befintliga pipelinerade och gemensamma inlärningsmetoderna. Dessutom uppnår den end-to-end-modell som föreslås i denna uppsats de bästa resultaten på den offentliga datauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'பொருள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை ஒன்றாக வெளியேற்றுதல் தகவல் பெறுதலில் முக்கியமான செயல். இந்த பிரச்சனையை எதிர்பார்க்க, முதலில் நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறியீட்டு திட்டத்தை மாற்றுகிறோம். அது இணைய பிரிப்பு பணியை  பின்னர், எங்கள் ஒட்டு முறைமையை அடிப்படையில், நாம் வேறு முடிவு முடிவு மாதிரிகளை படிக்க வேண்டும் பொருள் மற்றும் அவங்கள் தொடர்ப தூரத்தில் கண்காணிப்பு முறைமையால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பொது தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காட்டும் அடி மேலும், இந்த காகிதத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவு மாதிரி என்ன, பொது தரவு அமைப்பில் சிறந்த முடிவுகள் பெறுகி', 'mn': 'Объектуудыг, харилцааныг хамтдаа гаргах нь мэдээллийн гаргахад чухал ажил юм. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид эхлээд нэг шинэ маркингийн төлөвлөгөө шинээр гаргах үйлдлийг маркингийн асуудлыг шилжүүлж чадна. Дараа нь бидний маркингийн төлөвлөгөө дээр өөр төгсгөлийн загваруудыг судалж, биетүүд болон харилцааныг шууд гаргаж, биетүүд болон харилцааныг ялгаатай тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Бид олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтыг хол дахь удирдлагын арга замаар бүтээсэн бөгөөд туршилтын үр дүнд маркингийн суурь арга замаар суралцах арга замаар ихэнх хоолон болон нийлбэр суралцах арга зама Хамгийн чухал нь, энэ цаасан дээр төгсгөлийн загвар нь олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'ur': 'انٹیٹیوں اور رابطے کے جوڑے نکالنے کے لئے اطلاعات نکالنے میں ایک اہم کام ہے. اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم پہلی بار ایک نئی ٹاگ گینگ سیکھی پیشنهاد کریں جو joint extraction task کو ایک ٹاگ گینگ مسئلہ میں تبدیل کر سکتا ہے.. پھر، ہمارے ٹاگ کرنے کے طریقے پر، ہم مختلف آخر و آخر موڈل کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں کہ ایک چیز اور ان کی رابطہ مستقیما نکالیں، بغیر کسی طرح کی تعلیم اور رابطہ نہ کریں۔ ہم ایک عمومی ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں جو دور سوپرینز طریقے سے پیدا ہوئی ہے اور آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ٹیگ بنیادی طریقے بہت سے بہتر ہیں اور اس کاغذ میں جو کچھ زیادہ ہے، آخر-to-end موڈل کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے، سب سے بہترین نتیجے حاصل کرتی ہیں جمهوری ڈیٹ سٹ پر.', 'uz': "Name Bu muammolani boshqarish uchun birinchi marta, biz birinchi marta ajratish vazifani tagging muammolaga aylantirish uchun novel tagging qolipini tahlil qilamiz. Keyin, biz tag qolipimizning asosida, biz bir necha oxirigi modellarni o'rganamiz, butun narsalarni va ularning aloqalarini aniqlash uchun boshqa shakllarni o'rganamiz. We conduct experiments on a public dataset produced by distant supervision method and the experimental results show that the tagging based methods are better than most of the existing pipelined and joint learning methods.  Ko'p narsa, bu hujjatdagi oxirigi modeli rivojlanishga ega bo'ladi, public maʼlumotlar satrining eng yaxshi natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc chia sẻ các thực thể và quan hệ là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc trích xuất thông tin. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị đầu tiên một kế hoạch đánh dấu mới có thể chuyển nhiệm vụ khai thác chung thành một vấn đề. Sau đó, dựa trên bảng hiệu của chúng tôi, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các mô hình cuối cùng khác nhau để trích các thực thể và quan hệ trực tiếp của họ, mà không phân biệt thực thể và quan hệ. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu công cộng sản xuất bởi phương pháp giám sát xa xôi và kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy rằng các phương pháp theo dấu hiệu tốt hơn hầu hết các phương pháp cung cấp ống dẫn và kết hợp đồng. Hơn nữa, mẫu cuối cùng được đề xuất trong tờ giấy này đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trên bộ dữ liệu công cộng.', 'hr': 'Zajednička izvlačenja subjekta i odnosa je važan zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, prvo predlažemo novu mješavinu koja može pretvoriti zajednički izvlačeni zadatak u problem označavanja. Onda, na temelju našeg programa označavanja, proučavamo različite modele kraja do kraja kako bi izravno izvukli entitate i njihove odnose, bez identifikacije entiteta i odnosa odvojeno. Mi provodimo eksperimente na javnoj seti podataka proizvođenoj daljinskim metodom nadzora i eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da su metode temeljene na etiketi bolje od većine postojećih metoda učenja na cijevima i zajedničkim metodama učenja. Što je još, model kraja do kraja predložen u ovom papiru postiže najbolji rezultat na javnoj seti podataka.', 'bg': 'Съвместното извличане на субекти и отношения е важна задача при извличането на информация. За да се справим с този проблем, първо предлагаме нова схема за етикетиране, която може да превърне съвместната задача за извличане в проблем с етикетирането. След това, въз основа на нашата схема за маркиране, изучаваме различни модели от край до край, за да извличаме субекти и техните взаимоотношения директно, без да идентифицираме субекти и взаимоотношения отделно. Провеждаме експерименти върху публичен набор от данни, произведен по метода на дистанционен надзор, а експерименталните резултати показват, че методите, базирани на маркиране, са по-добри от повечето съществуващи тръбопроводи и съвместни методи за обучение. Нещо повече, моделът от край до край, предложен в настоящата статия, постига най-добри резултати в публичния набор от данни.', 'da': 'Fælles udvinding af enheder og relationer er en vigtig opgave i informationsudvinding. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi først en ny tagging ordning, der kan konvertere den fælles udtrækningsopgave til et tagging problem.. Derefter studerer vi forskellige end-to-end modeller ud fra vores mærkningsskema for at udtrække enheder og deres relationer direkte, uden at identificere enheder og relationer separat. Vi udfører eksperimenter på et offentligt datasæt produceret ved fjernovervågningsmetode, og de eksperimentelle resultater viser, at de tagging baserede metoder er bedre end de fleste eksisterende pipelined og fælles læringsmetoder. Desuden opnår den end-to-end model, der foreslås i denne artikel, de bedste resultater på det offentlige datasæt.', 'de': 'Die gemeinsame Extraktion von Entitäten und Beziehungen ist eine wichtige Aufgabe in der Informationsextraktion. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir zunächst ein neuartiges Tagging-Schema vor, das die gemeinsame Extraktionsaufgabe in ein Tagging-Problem umwandeln kann. Basierend auf unserem Tagging-Schema untersuchen wir dann verschiedene End-to-End-Modelle, um Entitäten und ihre Beziehungen direkt zu extrahieren, ohne Entitäten und Beziehungen separat zu identifizieren. Wir führen Experimente an einem öffentlichen Datensatz durch, der mittels Fernüberwachungsmethode erstellt wurde, und die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Tagging-basierten Methoden besser sind als die meisten der bestehenden Pipelined- und Joint-Learning-Methoden. Darüber hinaus erzielt das in diesem Papier vorgeschlagene End-to-End-Modell die besten Ergebnisse auf dem öffentlichen Datensatz.', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijke extractie van entiteiten en relaties is een belangrijke taak in informatieextractie. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we eerst een nieuw tagging schema voor dat de gezamenlijke extractie taak kan omzetten in een tagging probleem. Vervolgens bestuderen we op basis van ons taggingschema verschillende end-to-end modellen om entiteiten en hun relaties direct te extraheren, zonder entiteiten en relaties afzonderlijk te identificeren. We voeren experimenten uit op een publieke dataset geproduceerd door middel van remote supervision methode en de experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de tagging gebaseerde methoden beter zijn dan de meeste bestaande pipeline en gezamenlijke leermethoden. Bovendien bereikt het in dit document voorgestelde end-to-end model de beste resultaten op de publieke dataset.', 'ko': '실체와 관계의 연합 추출은 정보 추출의 중요한 임무이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 먼저 새로운 라벨 방안을 제기하여 연합 추출 임무를 라벨 문제로 전환시킬 수 있다.그 다음에 우리의 표기 방안을 바탕으로 우리는 서로 다른 끝에서 끝까지의 모델을 연구하여 실체와 그 관계를 직접 추출하고 실체와 관계를 단독으로 식별할 필요가 없다.우리는 원격 모니터링 방법으로 생성된 공공 데이터 집합에서 실험을 실시했는데 실험 결과 라벨을 바탕으로 하는 방법이 기존의 대다수 유수선과 연합 학습 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.그 밖에 본고가 제시한 단말기부터 단말기까지의 모델은 공공 데이터 집합에서 가장 좋은 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza vifaa na mahusiano ni kazi muhimu katika utoaji wa habari. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, kwa mara ya kwanza tunapendekeza mpango wa kutumia riwaya ambao unaweza kubadilisha kazi ya kutengeneza pamoja katika tatizo la kuchagua.. Kisha, kwa mujibu wa mpango wetu wa wimbo, tunasoma mifano tofauti ya mwisho wa mwisho ili kutengeneza vitu na mahusiano yao moja kwa moja, bila kutambua vitu na mahusiano tofauti. We conduct experiments on a public dataset produced by distant supervision method and the experimental results show that the tagging based methods are better than most of the existing pipelined and joint learning methods.  Kilicho zaidi, mtindo wa mwisho wa mwisho unapendekezwa katika gazeti hili, unapata matokeo bora kwenye seti ya taarifa za umma.', 'id': 'Joint extraction of entities and relations is an important task in information extraction.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kita pertama-tama mengusulkan skema tagging baru yang dapat mengubah tugas ekstraksi bersama menjadi masalah tagging .. Kemudian, berdasarkan skema tagging kami, kami mempelajari model akhir-akhir berbeda untuk mengekstrak entitas dan hubungan mereka secara langsung, tanpa mengidentifikasi entitas dan hubungan secara terpisah. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data publik yang diproduksi oleh metode pengawasan jauh dan hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode berdasarkan tag lebih baik dari kebanyakan metode pembelajaran yang ada. Lagipula, model akhir-akhir yang diusulkan di koran ini, mencapai hasil terbaik pada set data publik.', 'fa': 'استخراج شرکتها و رابطه های مشترک یک کار مهم در استخراج اطلاعات است. برای حل این مشکل، اول ما یک برنامه نقاشی نویسی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که می تواند وظیفه استخراج مشترک را به یک مشکل نقاشی تغییر دهد. بعدش، بر اساس برنامه\u200cهای نقاشی نشان\u200cگیری ما، ما مدل\u200cهای متفاوتی را برای اخراج کردن شرکت\u200cها و رابطه\u200cهایشان مطالعه می\u200cکنیم، بدون شناسایی شرکت\u200cها و رابطه\u200cهایشان جدا. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی که توسط روش نظارت دور تولید می\u200cکنیم انجام می\u200cدهیم و نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cگیری از بیشتر روش\u200cهای آموزش لوله\u200cهای موجود بهتر از بیشتر روش\u200cهای لو بیشتر از این، مدل پایان و پایان در این کاغذ پیشنهاد شده، بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی را می\u200cرساند.', 'tr': 'Berekler we baglaýyşlaryň kop açylygy maglumatlary açmakda möhüm zadyr. Bu meseläni çözmek üçin ilkinji gezek, birleşik harplaryň işini tägleme meselä üýtgedip biljek täze taýýarlama taslamasyny teklip edip bilýäris.. Soňra, etiketlemegimiziň taslamasyna daýanýar, birnäçe iş we ilişkilerini aýratyn tanamadan, birnäçe taýdan soňra nusgalary öwrenip barýarys. Biz halk dataýatlary üstünde örenýän deneyler çykarýarys we deneyler netijesi çykarýarys, etiketleme tabanly metodlaryň köpüsi pipeliniň we birleşik öwrenme metodlaryndan gowydygyny görkez. Daha da soňky nusga bu kagyzda teklip eden nusga kamu veri setiginiň iň gowy netijesini çykar.', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e përbashkët e njësive dhe marrëdhënieve është një detyrë e rëndësishme në nxjerrjen e informacionit. To tackle this problem, we firstly propose a novel tagging scheme that can convert the joint extraction task to a tagging problem..  Pastaj, bazuar në skemën tonë të etiketave, ne studiojmë modele të ndryshme nga fundi në fund për të nxjerrë njësitë dhe marrëdhëniet e tyre drejtpërdrejt, pa identifikuar njësitë dhe marrëdhëniet veçanërisht. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në një grup të dhënash publike të prodhuar nga metoda mbikqyrjeje e largët dhe rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metodat bazuar në etiketë janë më të mira se shumica e metodave ekzistuese të përbashkëta të mësimit. Përveç kësaj, modeli përfundimtar i propozuar në këtë letër, arrin rezultatet më të mira në grupin publik të të dhënave.', 'af': "Gesamelede uitpakking van entiteite en relasies is 'n belangrike taak in inligting uitpakking. Om hierdie probleem te probeer, voorstel ons eerste 'n roman merking skema wat die joint uittrekking taak kan omskakel na 'n merking probleem... Dan, gebaseer op ons merking skema, ondersoek ons verskillende einde-na-einde modele om entiteite en hulle relasies direk te uitpak, sonder om entiteite en relasies te identifiseer individueel. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op 'n publieke datastel wat deur afgeleë supervisie metode produseer is en die eksperimentele resultate wys dat die merking gebaseerde metodes beter is as meeste van die bestaande pipelinede en joint leer metodes. Wat meer is, die einde-tot-einde model wat in hierdie papier voorgestel is, bereik die beste resultate op die openbare datastel.", 'az': 'Birliklərin və ilişkilərin birlikdə çıxarılması məlumatlar çıxarılmasında möhüm bir işdir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün ilk dəfə yeni etiketləmə taslağı təklif edirik ki, birlikdə istifadə etmə işini etiketləmə probleminə çevirə bilər. Sonra, etiketləmə taslağımıza dayanan, bircə-bircə dəfə məlumatları və ilişkilerini tərk etmək üçün fərqli sonun-sonun modellərini təhsil edirik. Biz uzaq gözləmə metodları ilə ürəkləndirilmiş halkı verilən qurbanlar üzərində təcrübələr edərik və təcrübə sonuçları etiketləmə dayanan metodların çoxundan daha yaxşıdır. Daha çox, bu kağızda təbliğ edilən sonun-sonun modeli halkı verilənlərin ən yaxşı sonuçlarını başa düşər.', 'am': 'አካባቢዎችን እና ግንኙነትን በመግለጫ ማስታወቂያውን ማውጣት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀናቀል በመጀመሪያ የኖሮ ተርጓሚዎች ፕሮግራሙን ለመቀላቀል የሚችል ተሳታፊ ስራ ወደ ተግኘት መከራ ይለወጥ…. ከዚህም በኋላ በአካባቢው እና ግንኙነታችንን በተለየ ሳይታወቅ የተለየን አካል እና ግንኙነቶችን ለመውጣት የተለየን የፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ሞዴላዎችን እናስተምራለን፡፡ የሩቅ ተመልካች ሥርዓት በተደረገው የህዝብ ዳታተር ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም የበለጠ፣ በዚህ ገጽ የመጨረሻው ሞዴል፣ የህዝባዊ ዳታው ማድረግ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': "Կանգների և հարաբերությունների միասին վերացումը տեղեկատվության վերացման կարևոր խնդիր է: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջին հերթին առաջարկում ենք նոր նշանակման ծրագիր, որը կարող է փոխակերպել միասին վերացման խնդիրը նշանակման խնդիր: Հետո, հիմնված մեր նշանակման սխեմայի վրա, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր վերջ-վերջ մոդելներ' առանց առանձին նշանակելու միավորները և նրանց հարաբերությունները: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում հանրային տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որը ստեղծվում է հեռավոր վերահսկողության մեթոդի միջոցով, և փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նշաններով հիմնված մեթոդները ավելի լավ են, քան գոյություն ունեցող խողովա Ավելին, այս թղթի մեջ առաջարկված վերջ-վերջ մոդելը հասնում է հանրային տվյալների համակարգի լավագույն արդյունքները:", 'cs': 'Společná extrakce subjektů a vztahů je důležitým úkolem v extrakci informací. Pro řešení tohoto problému nejprve navrhujeme nové tagovací schéma, které může převést společnou extrakční úlohu na tagovací problém. Na základě našeho tagovacího schématu pak studujeme různé end-to-end modely, abychom extrahovali entity a jejich vztahy přímo, aniž bychom identifikovali entity a vztahy odděleně. Provádíme experimenty na veřejném datovém souboru vytvořeném metodou vzdáleného dohledu a experimentální výsledky ukazují, že metody založené na tagingu jsou lepší než většina stávajících pipelined a společných učebních metod. Navíc koncový model navržený v tomto článku dosahuje nejlepších výsledků na veřejném datovém souboru.', 'bn': 'বস্তু এবং সম্পর্কের সাথে যুক্ত করা তথ্য বের করার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। এই সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা প্রথমে একটি নোভেল ট্যাগিং পরিকল্পনা প্রস্তাব করি যা যৌথ বিনিময়ের কাজ ট্যাগিং সমস্যার কাছ তারপর, আমাদের ট্যাগিং পরিকল্পনার ভিত্তিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল শিক্ষা করি যাতে বস্তুগুলো এবং তাদের সম্পর্ক সরাসরি বের করে নেয় আমরা দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের পদ্ধতি দ্বারা পাবলিক ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি এবং পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে ট্যাগিং ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি বিদ্যমান পাইপে আরো যা আছে, এই কাগজটিতে শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, পাবলিক ডাটাসেটের সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে।', 'ca': "L'extracció conjunta d'entitats i relacions és una tasca important en l'extracció d'informació. Per abordar aquest problem a, primer proposem un nou esquema d'etiquetage que pot convertir la tasca d'extracció conjunta en un problema d'etiquetage.. Llavors, basant-nos en el nostre esquema d'etiquetage, estudiem diferents models de final a final per extrair les entitats i les seves relacions directament, sense identificar entitats i relacions separadament. We conduct experiments on a public dataset produced by distant supervision method and the experimental results show that the tagging based methods are better than most of the existing pipelined and joint learning methods.  I més, el model de final a final proposat en aquest paper, aconsegueix els millors resultats en el conjunt de dades públices.", 'bs': 'Zajednička izvlačenja entitata i odnosa je važan zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Da bi se riješili ovog problem a, prvo predlažemo novu programu označavanja koja može pretvoriti zajednički izvlačeni zadatak u problem označavanja. Onda, na temelju našeg šema označavanja, proučavamo različite modele kraja do kraja da izvučemo entitate i njihove odnose direktno, bez identifikacije entiteta i odnosa odvojeno. Mi provodimo eksperimente na javnom setu podataka proizvođenom dalekim metodom nadzora i eksperimentalnim rezultatima pokazuju da su metode temeljne na etiketi bolje od većine postojećih metoda učenja na cijevima i zajedničkim metodama učenja. Što je još, model kraja do kraja predložen u ovom papiru postiže najbolji rezultat na javnom setu podataka.', 'et': 'Üksuste ja suhete ühine kaevandamine on oluline ülesanne teabe kaevandamisel. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume esmalt välja uue sildistamisskeemi, mis võib muuta ühise ekstraheerimisülesande sildistamisprobleemiks. Seejärel uurime oma sildistamisskeemi põhjal erinevaid otsast otsa mudeleid, et ekstraheerida olemeid ja nende suhteid otse, ilma et oleksid ja suhteid eraldi identifitseeriksime. Teostame katseid kaugjärelevalve meetodil toodetud avaliku andmekogumiga ning katsetulemused näitavad, et sildistamisel põhinevad meetodid on paremad kui enamik olemasolevatest toru- ja ühisõppemeetoditest. Lisaks sellele saavutatakse käesolevas dokumendis pakutud otsast otsani mudel avaliku andmekogumi puhul parimad tulemused.', 'fi': 'Yhteisöjen ja suhteiden yhteinen hankinta on tärkeä tehtävä tiedonhankinnassa. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme ensin uutta merkintäjärjestelmää, joka voi muuntaa yhteisen poistotehtävän merkintäongelmaksi. Tämän jälkeen tutkimme koodausjärjestelmämme pohjalta erilaisia end-to-end malleja, joiden avulla voimme poimia entiteettejä ja niiden suhteita suoraan tunnistamatta entiteettejä ja suhteita erikseen. Teemme kokeita etävalvontamenetelmällä tuotetulla julkisella aineistolla ja kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tagging-pohjaiset menetelmät ovat parempia kuin useimmat olemassa olevista putkiohjatuista ja yhteisistä oppimismenetelmistä. Lisäksi tässä asiakirjassa ehdotetulla end-to-end-mallilla saavutetaan parhaat tulokset julkisessa aineistossa.', 'jv': 'Join Mbok iso nggawe perusahaan iki, kita ngubah dhéwé nggawe boton sing apik batir Nanging, basa nambah ning alam sing ditambah, kita gambar model sing saben tanggal sampeyan karo ingkang sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan mruput, iso nggawe barang sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan sampeyan. Anyone Awak dhéwé, model sing tuku-tuku nggawe uwis rampung kuwi mau, iso dianggawe dataset publikasi sing luwih apik.', 'he': 'מחילוץ משותף של יחסים יחסים הוא משימה חשובה בחילוץ מידע. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו קודם כל מציעים מערכת תגים חדשה שיכולה להפוך את משימה החילוץ המשותפת לבעיה תגים .. ואז, בהתבסס על מערכת התגים שלנו, אנחנו לומדים דוגמנים שונים סוף-סוף כדי לחלץ יחסים וביחסים שלהם ישירות, בלי לזהות יחסים וביחסים נפרדים. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצת מידע ציבורית שנוצרת בשיטת פיקוח מרוחקה והתוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהשיטות המבוססות על תגים טובות יותר מרוב שיטות הלימוד הקיומות והמשותפות. ויותר מזה, המודל הסוף לסוף שהצע בעיתון הזה, משיג את התוצאות הטובות ביותר על קבוצת המידע הציבורי.', 'bo': 'དབང་ཆ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚོ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་ཆོག་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་པོ་མཐའ་ནས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆོག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་ལས་འཆར་གཞི་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མི་དབྱིབས་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་གསལ་ We conduct experiments on a public dataset produced by distant supervision method and the experimental results show that the tagging based methods are better than most of the existing pipelined and joint learning methods. མཐོང་ན། མཇུག་མམ་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་ཤོས་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།', 'ha': "@ action: button To, za mu yi motsa ga wannan mataimaki, ana buƙata farkon da za'a buƙata wani shirin tagogi wanda zai iya mayar da aikin shirin cire zuwa wata matsalar tagogi... Sa'an nan, a kan karatun kwamfyutan tagogi, muna karatun misãlai daban-ƙari zuwa zuwa ga su fitar masu abun da mazaɓa da mazauninsu zuwa hanya, bã da gane abubuwa da haɗi dabam-daba. Mu sami jarrabo a kan tsarin mutane da aka samar da metoden tsari mai nĩsa kuma matsalan jarrabãwa yana nũna cewa metoden tagogi ne mafi alhẽri daga mafi yawansu masu da ke da pipiblet da shirin ayuka. Da abin da yake ƙaranci, misalin ƙarama wanda aka buƙata cikin wannan takarda, yana s ãmu mafi kyaun matsala a samun mutane.", 'sk': 'Skupno pridobivanje subjektov in odnosov je pomembna naloga pri pridobivanju informacij. Za reševanje tega problema najprej predlagamo novo shemo označevanja, ki lahko skupno ekstrakcijo pretvori v problem označevanja. Nato na podlagi naše sheme označevanja preučujemo različne modele od konca do konca za neposredno pridobivanje entitet in njihovih relacij, ne da bi identificirali entitete in relacije ločeno. Izvajamo poskuse na javnem naboru podatkov, izdelanem z metodo daljnega nadzora, rezultati pa kažejo, da so metode označevanja boljše od večine obstoječih cevovodnih in skupnih učnih metod. Poleg tega model od konca do konca, predlagan v tem članku, dosega najboljše rezultate v javnem naboru podatkov.'}
{'en': 'Unifying Text, Metadata, and User Network Representations with a Neural Network for Geolocation Prediction', 'ar': 'توحيد النص والبيانات الوصفية وتمثيلات شبكة المستخدم مع شبكة عصبية للتنبؤ بتحديد الموقع الجغرافي', 'es': 'Unificación de representaciones de texto, metadatos y redes de usuarios con una red neuronal para la predicción de geolocalización', 'pt': 'Unificação de texto, metadados e representações de rede de usuário com uma rede neural para previsão de geolocalização', 'fr': "Unification de représentations de texte, de métadonnées et de réseaux d'utilisateurs avec un réseau de neurones pour la prédiction de géolocalisation", 'ja': 'ジオロケーション予測のためのニューラルネットワークを使用したテキスト、メタデータ、およびユーザーネットワーク表現の統一', 'zh': '以文本、元数、用户网络示与地理占候之神经网络同', 'hi': 'Geolocation भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ पाठ, मेटाडेटा, और उपयोगकर्ता नेटवर्क अभ्यावेदन को एकीकृत करना', 'ru': 'Объединение текста, метаданных и представлений пользовательской сети с нейронной сетью для прогнозирования геолокации', 'ga': 'Téacs, Meiteashonraí, agus Léirithe Líonra Úsáideoirí a Aontú le Líonra Néarach le haghaidh Tuar Geolocation', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Szöveg-, metaadat- és felhasználói hálózati reprezentációk egységesítése Neurális hálózattal a geolokáció előrejelzéséhez', 'el': 'Ενοποίηση αναπαραστάσεων κειμένου, μεταδεδομένων και δικτύων χρηστών με ένα Νευρικό Δίκτυο για πρόβλεψη γεωεντοπισμού', 'mk': 'Name', 'it': 'Unificazione delle rappresentazioni di testo, metadati e rete utente con una rete neurale per la previsione della geolocalizzazione', 'kk': 'Географиялық орналасуы үшін нейрондық желімен мәтін, метадеректерді және пайдаланушылардың желіңізді біріктіру', 'lt': 'Sujungti teksto, metaduomenų ir naudotojų tinklo atstovavimus su nerviniu geolokacijos prognozavimo tinklu', 'mt': 'L-unifikazzjoni tar-Rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-Test, tal-Metadejta u tan-Netwerk tal-Utenti ma’ Netwerk Newrali għat-Tbassir tal-Ġeolokazzjoni', 'mn': 'Unifying Text, Metadata, and User Network Representations with a Neural Network for Geolocation Prediction', 'ml': 'വാചകം, മെറ്റാഡാട്ട, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ശൃംഖല പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Teks, Metadata, dan Rangkaian Pengguna dengan Rangkaian Neural untuk Prediksi Geolokasi', 'pl': 'Ujednolicenie reprezentacji tekstu, metadanych i sieci użytkowników z siecią neuronową do prognozowania geolokalizacji', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Unificarea reprezentărilor textului, metadatelor și rețelei utilizatorilor cu o rețea neurală pentru predicția geolocalizării', 'sr': 'Unifikovani tekst, metadata i predstavljanja mreže korisnika sa neuronskom mrežom za predviđanje geolokacije', 'si': 'පාළුව, මෙටාඩාටා සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජක ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සමග භූතිත්වය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සමග ප්\u200dරතිස්', 'so': 'Ku qabsashada Text, Metadata, and User Network Representations with a Neural Network for Geolocation', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'F철rena text-, metadata- och anv채ndarn채tverksrepresentationer med ett neuralt n채tverk f철r f철ruts채gelse av geolokalisering', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hợp nhất văn bản, siêu dữ liệu và mạng người dùng với mạng thần kinh cho định vị địa hình', 'bg': 'Унифициране на текстови, метаданни и потребителски мрежи с неврална мрежа за прогнозиране на геолокация', 'hr': 'Unifikacija teksta, metapodataka i predstavljanja mreže korisnika sa neuronskom mrežom za predviđanje geolokacije', 'da': 'Forening af tekst-, metadata- og brugernetværksrepræsentationer med et neuralt netværk til forudsigelse af geolocation', 'nl': 'Het verenigen van tekst-, metadata- en gebruikersnetwerkrepresentaties met een neuraal netwerk voor geolocatie voorspelling', 'de': 'Vereinheitlichung von Text-, Metadaten- und Benutzernetzwerkdarstellungen mit einem neuronalen Netzwerk zur Geolocation Prediction', 'id': 'Unifikasi Teks, Metadata, dan Perwakilan Jaringan Pengguna dengan Jaringan Neural untuk Prediksi Geolokasi', 'fa': 'متن ، متداده و نمایش شبکه کاربر با یک شبکه عصبی برای پیش\u200cبینی جایگاهی جغرافی', 'sw': 'Wawakilishi wa Umoja wa Matambo, Metadata, na Mtandao wa Mtumiaji wa Mtandao wa Utawala wa Utawala', 'tr': 'Metin, Metadata we Ullançy Aýry Representations with a Neural Network for Geolocation Prediction', 'ko': '신경 네트워크로 텍스트, 메타데이터와 사용자 네트워크를 통일하여 지리적 위치 예측에 사용', 'sq': 'Duke bashkuar përfaqësimet e tekstit, metatë dhe rrjetit të përdoruesve me një rrjet nervor për parashikimin e gjeolokalimit', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'Text, Metadata, and User Network References with a Neural Network for Geolocation Preferences', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Metin, Metadata və İstifadəçi Ağ Təşkilatlarını Geolokasyon Önümüzlərinin Nöral Ağı ilə birləşdirilən', 'bn': 'জিওলোকশনের জন্য নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে টেক্সট, মেটাডাটা, এবং ব্যবহারকারী নেটওয়ার্ক প্রতিনিধিত্ব', 'bs': 'Unifikacija teksta, metadata i predstavljanja mreže korisnika sa neuronskom mrežom za predviđanje geolokacije', 'ca': "Unificar representacions de text, metadades i xarxa d'usuaris amb una xarxa neuronal de predicció de geolocalització", 'cs': 'Sjednocování reprezentací textu, metadat a uživatelské sítě s neuronovou sítí pro predikci geolokace', 'et': 'Teksti-, metaandmete ja kasutajavõrgu esinduste ühtlustamine geolokatsiooni prognoosimiseks neuraalse võrguga', 'fi': 'Teksti-, metadata- ja käyttäjäverkon esitysten yhtenäistäminen geolokaation ennustamista varten tarkoitetulla neuraalisella verkostolla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Poenotenje besedila, metapodatkov in predstavitev uporabniškega omrežja z nevralnim omrežjem za napoved geolokacije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מייצגים טקסט, מטאנתונים ורשת משתמשים מאחדים עם רשת נוירולית לציון גיאולוקציה', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་དང་གནས་ཡུལ་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་རྟོགས་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel geolocation prediction model using a complex neural network. Geolocation prediction in social media has attracted many researchers to use information of various types. Our model unifies text, metadata, and user network representations with an attention mechanism to overcome previous ensemble approaches. In an evaluation using two open datasets, the proposed model exhibited a maximum 3.8 % increase in accuracy and a maximum of 6.6 % increase in accuracy@161 against previous models. We further analyzed several intermediate layers of our model, which revealed that their states capture some statistical characteristics of the datasets.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا للتنبؤ بتحديد الموقع الجغرافي باستخدام شبكة عصبية معقدة. جذب التنبؤ بالموقع الجغرافي في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي العديد من الباحثين لاستخدام المعلومات من أنواع مختلفة. يوحد نموذجنا النصوص والبيانات الوصفية وتمثيلات شبكة المستخدم بآلية انتباه للتغلب على مناهج المجموعات السابقة. في تقييم باستخدام مجموعتي بيانات مفتوحتين ، أظهر النموذج المقترح زيادة في الدقة بنسبة 3.8٪ كحد أقصى وزيادة بنسبة 6.6٪ في الدقة @ 161 مقارنة بالنماذج السابقة. قمنا أيضًا بتحليل عدة طبقات وسيطة لنموذجنا ، والتي كشفت أن حالاتها تلتقط بعض الخصائص الإحصائية لمجموعات البيانات.', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo novedoso de predicción de geolocalización que utiliza una red neuronal compleja. La predicción de geolocalización en las redes sociales ha atraído a muchos investigadores a utilizar información de varios tipos. Nuestro modelo unifica el texto, los metadatos y las representaciones de la red de usuarios con un mecanismo de atención para superar los enfoques conjuntos anteriores. En una evaluación que utilizó dos conjuntos de datos abiertos, el modelo propuesto mostró un aumento máximo del 3,8% en la precisión y un aumento máximo del 6,6% en la precisión @161 en comparación con los modelos anteriores. Además, analizamos varias capas intermedias de nuestro modelo, que revelaron que sus estados capturan algunas características estadísticas de los conjuntos de datos.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau modèle de prédiction de géolocalisation utilisant un réseau neuronal complexe. La prédiction de géolocalisation dans les médias sociaux a incité de nombreux chercheurs à utiliser des informations de différents types. Notre modèle unifie le texte, les métadonnées et les représentations du réseau d'utilisateurs avec un mécanisme d'attention pour surmonter les approches d'ensemble précédentes. Dans une évaluation utilisant deux ensembles de données ouverts, le modèle proposé présentait une augmentation maximale de 3,8\xa0% de la précision et une augmentation maximale de 6,6\xa0% de la précision @161 par rapport aux modèles précédents. Nous avons ensuite analysé plusieurs couches intermédiaires de notre modèle, qui ont révélé que leurs états capturent certaines caractéristiques statistiques des ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Propomos um novo modelo de previsão de geolocalização usando uma rede neural complexa. A previsão de geolocalização em mídias sociais tem atraído muitos pesquisadores a utilizar informações de diversos tipos. Nosso modelo unifica texto, metadados e representações de rede do usuário com um mecanismo de atenção para superar as abordagens anteriores de conjunto. Em uma avaliação usando dois conjuntos de dados abertos, o modelo proposto exibiu um aumento máximo de 3,8% na precisão e um aumento máximo de 6,6% na precisão@161 em relação aos modelos anteriores. Analisamos ainda várias camadas intermediárias do nosso modelo, que revelaram que seus estados capturam algumas características estatísticas dos conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': '複雑なニューラルネットワークを使用した新たな地理位置予測モデルを提案します。ソーシャルメディアにおける地理位置予測は、様々な種類の情報を使用する多くの研究者を惹きつけてきた。当社のモデルは、テキスト、メタデータ、およびユーザーネットワーク表現を、以前のアンサンブルアプローチを克服するための注意メカニズムと統一します。2つのオープンデータセットを使用した評価では、提案されたモデルは、以前のモデルと比較して、精度が最大3.8%増加し、精度が最大6.6%増加した@ 161。我々はさらに、我々のモデルのいくつかの中間層を分析し、それらの状態がデータセットのいくつかの統計的特徴を捕捉することを明らかにした。', 'hi': 'हम एक जटिल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके एक उपन्यास जियोलोकेशन भविष्यवाणी मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सोशल मीडिया में जियोलोकेशन भविष्यवाणी ने कई शोधकर्ताओं को विभिन्न प्रकार की जानकारी का उपयोग करने के लिए आकर्षित किया है। हमारा मॉडल पाठ, मेटाडेटा और उपयोगकर्ता नेटवर्क अभ्यावेदन को पिछले पहनावा दृष्टिकोणों को दूर करने के लिए एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एकीकृत करता है। दो खुले डेटासेट का उपयोग करके मूल्यांकन में, प्रस्तावित मॉडल ने सटीकता में अधिकतम 3.8% की वृद्धि और पिछले मॉडल के खिलाफ accuracy@161 में अधिकतम 6.6% की वृद्धि का प्रदर्शन किया। हमने आगे अपने मॉडल की कई मध्यवर्ती परतों का विश्लेषण किया, जिससे पता चला कि उनके राज्य डेटासेट की कुछ सांख्यिकीय विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करते हैं।', 'zh': '吾言杂神经网络者新型地理占模形。 社交媒体中地理占引诸治人用各种类型信息。 吾法将文本、元数与用户网络示与注意机同,以克旧法。 凡用两开数集之评,比之前模,精增3.8%,accuracy@161增6.6%。 析其形数中间层,发其数集之数。', 'ru': 'Предложена новая модель прогнозирования геолокации с использованием сложной нейронной сети. Прогнозирование геолокации в социальных сетях привлекло многих исследователей к использованию информации различных типов. Наша модель объединяет тексты, метаданные и представления пользовательских сетей с механизмом внимания для преодоления предыдущих ансамблевых подходов. При оценке с использованием двух открытых наборов данных предлагаемая модель показала максимальное увеличение точности на 3,8% и максимальное увеличение точности на 6,6% при161 по сравнению с предыдущими моделями. Далее мы проанализировали несколько промежуточных слоев нашей модели, которые показали, что их состояния фиксируют некоторые статистические характеристики наборов данных.', 'ga': 'Molaimid samhail thuar geolocation nua ag baint úsáide as gréasán néaraíoch casta. Mheall tuar geolocation sna meáin shóisialta go leor taighdeoirí chun faisnéis de chineálacha éagsúla a úsáid. Déanann ár múnla aontú téacs, meiteashonraí, agus léiriúcháin líonra úsáideoirí le meicníocht aird chun cur chuige ensemble roimhe seo a shárú. I meastóireacht a bhain úsáid as dhá thacar sonraí oscailte, léirigh an tsamhail bheartaithe uasmhéadú 3.8% ar chruinneas agus uasmhéadú 6.6% ar chruinneas@161 i gcomparáid le samhlacha roimhe seo. Rinneamar anailís bhreise ar roinnt sraitheanna idirmheánacha dár múnla, a léirigh go bhfuil tréithe staitistiúla áirithe de na tacair sonraí ag a gcuid stáit.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის გეოლოკაციის წინაწერის მოდელს გამოყენებული კომპლექსი ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება. სოციალური მედიაში გეოლოკაციის წინასწარმოდგენა მრავალური მსგავსიერებელი განსხვავებული ტიპის ინფორმაციის გამოყენება. ჩვენი მოდელი ერთიანდება ტექსტი, მეტადატა და მომხმარებელი ქსელის გამოსახულებები, რომლებიც აღმოჩენებული მექანიზმისთვის, რომ წინასწინასწინასწინასწორ შესაძლებელია ორი გახსნილი მონაცემების გამოყენებაში, მოდელის მაქსიმალური 3,8%-ის წარმოდგენება და მაქსიმალური 6,6%-ის წარმოდგენება accuracy@161 წინა მოდელების გარეშე. ჩვენ მეტი მოდელის განსხვავებული განსხვავებული სიახლეების ანალიზაცია, რომლებიც გაჩვენეთ, რომ ისინი ქვეყნები მონაცემების სტატისტიკური განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο πρόβλεψης γεωθέσης χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνθετο νευρικό δίκτυο. Η πρόβλεψη γεωεντοπισμού στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης έχει προσελκύσει πολλούς ερευνητές να χρησιμοποιούν πληροφορίες διαφόρων τύπων. Το μοντέλο μας ενοποιεί κείμενο, μεταδεδομένα και αναπαραστάσεις δικτύων χρηστών με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής για να ξεπεράσει προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις συνόλων. Σε μια αξιολόγηση με χρήση δύο ανοικτών συνόλων δεδομένων, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο παρουσίασε μέγιστη 3,8% αύξηση της ακρίβειας και μέγιστη 6,6% αύξηση accuracy@161 έναντι προηγούμενων μοντέλων. Αναλύσαμε περαιτέρω διάφορα ενδιάμεσα στρώματα του μοντέλου μας, τα οποία αποκάλυψαν ότι οι καταστάσεις τους καταγράφουν κάποια στατιστικά χαρακτηριστικά των συνόλων δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Egy új geolokációs előrejelzési modellt javasolunk komplex neurális hálózattal. A geolokáció előrejelzése a közösségi médiában sok kutatót vonzott arra, hogy különböző típusú információkat használjon. Modellünk egyesíti a szöveget, a metaadatokat és a felhasználói hálózati reprezentációkat egy figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmussal a korábbi együttes megközelítések leküzdésére. Egy két nyílt adatkészletet felhasználó értékelés során a javasolt modell maximálisan 3,8%-os pontosságnövekedést mutatott, és maximálisan 6,6%-os növekedést mutatott. accuracy@161 a korábbi modellekhez képest. Továbbá elemeztük modellünk több köztes rétegét, amelyek kimutatták, hogy állapotuk az adatkészletek statisztikai jellemzőit rögzítik.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują geolokacijos prognozavimo model į naudojant sudėtingą nervų tinklą. Geolokacijos prognozės social in ėje žiniasklaidoje privertdaugelį mokslininkų naudotis įvairių tipų informacija. Mūsų modelis suvienodina teksto, metaduomenų ir naudotojų tinklo atstovavimus su dėmesio mechanizmu, siekiant įveikti ankstesnius komplekso metodus. Vertinant du atvirus duomenų rinkinius, siūlomas modelis parodė, kad tikslumas padidėjo ne daugiau kaip 3,8 %, o tikslumas padidėjo ne daugiau kaip 6,6 %. accuracy@161  against previous models.  Toliau išanalizavome keletą tarpinių mūsų modelio sluoksnių, kurie atskleidė, kad jų valstybėse pateikiamos tam tikros statistinės duomenų rinkinių charakteristikos.', 'ms': 'We propose a novel geolocation prediction model using a complex neural network.  Ramalan geolokasi dalam media sosial telah menarik banyak peneliti untuk menggunakan maklumat berbagai jenis. Model kami menyatukan persembahan teks, metadata, dan rangkaian pengguna dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk mengatasi pendekatan ensemble terdahulu. Dalam penilaian menggunakan dua set data terbuka, model yang direncanakan menunjukkan peningkatan maksimum 3.8% dalam ketepatan dan peningkatan maksimum 6.6% dalam accuracy@161 - melawan model terdahulu. Kami lebih lanjut menganalisis beberapa lapisan sementara model kami, yang menunjukkan bahawa negara-negara mereka menangkap beberapa ciri-ciri statistik set data.', 'it': 'Proponiamo un nuovo modello di previsione della geolocalizzazione utilizzando una complessa rete neurale. La previsione della geolocalizzazione nei social media ha attirato molti ricercatori ad utilizzare informazioni di vario tipo. Il nostro modello unifica testi, metadati e rappresentazioni della rete degli utenti con un meccanismo di attenzione per superare i precedenti approcci ensemble. In una valutazione basata su due set di dati aperti, il modello proposto ha mostrato un aumento massimo del 3,8% in accuratezza e un aumento massimo del 6,6% in accuracy@161 contro i modelli precedenti. Abbiamo ulteriormente analizzato diversi strati intermedi del nostro modello, che hanno rivelato che i loro stati catturano alcune caratteristiche statistiche dei set di dati.', 'kk': 'Біз жалпы невралдық желі қолданатын романдық географиялық таңдау үлгісін таңдаймыз. Жалпы медиақтағы географиялық орналасуын бақылау көптеген зерттеушілерді түрлі түрлердің мәліметін қолдану үшін көптеген. Біздің үлгіміз мәтін, метадеректерді және пайдаланушылардың желімізді біріктіреді. Алдыңғы қатынау механизмі болды. Екі ашылған деректер қорларын бағалау үшін, келтірілген үлгі дұрыстығын 3,8% деген максимумы және 6,6% деген максимумы accuracy@161 Алдыңғы моделдерге қарсы. Біз өзіміздің үлгіміздің бірнеше орташа қабаттарды анализ етіп, олардың күйлері деректер жиындарының статистикалық қасиеттерін алады.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нов модел за предвидување на геолокацијата користејќи комплексна нервна мрежа. Предвидувањето на геолокацијата во социјалните медиуми привлече многу истражувачи да користат информации од различни видови. Нашиот модел ги обединува текстовите, метаданите и корисничките мрежни претставувања со механизам на внимание за надминување на претходните ансембли пристапи. Во проценката со користење на два отворени податоци, предложениот модел покажа максимално зголемување на точноста од 3,8 отсто и максимално зголемување на точноста од 6,6 отсто accuracy@161 - против претходните модели. Понатаму анализиравме неколку меѓувремени слоеви на нашиот модел, кои открија дека нивните држави заземаат некои статистички карактеристики на податоците.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ tbassir tal-ġeolokazzjoni bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali kumpless. It-tbassir tal-ġeolokazzjoni fil-midja soċjali attira ħafna riċerkaturi biex jużaw informazzjoni ta’ diversi tipi. Our model unifies text, metadata, and user network representations with an attention mechanism to overcome previous ensemble approaches.  F’evalwazzjoni bl-użu ta’ żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta miftuħa, il-mudell propost wera żieda massima ta’ 3.8% fil-preċiżjoni u żieda massima ta’ 6.6% fil- accuracy@161  against previous models.  Aħna analizzaw aktar diversi saffi intermedji tal-mudell tagħna, li żvelaw li l-istati tagħhom jaqbdu xi karatteristiċi statistiċi tas-settijiet tad-dejta.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കുഴപ്പമുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d സ്ഥലം പ്രവചിക്കുന് സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളിലുള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d പല തരം തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d അനേകം പരിശീലന്മാരെ ആകര്\u200dഷിച്ചി നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ്, മെറ്റേഡാറ്റ, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കും പ്രതിനിധികളാക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് എൻസ രണ്ടു തുറന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് ഒരു വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d 3. 8 accuracy@161 മുമ്പുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി. നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d തമ്മിലുള്ള തട്ടുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ചു. അത് അവരുടെ രാജ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റുകളുടെ സ്', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou model de predicție a geolocației folosind o rețea neuronală complexă. Prevederea geolocalizării în social media a atras mulți cercetători să folosească informații de diferite tipuri. Modelul nostru unifică textul, metadatele și reprezentările rețelei de utilizatori cu un mecanism de atenție pentru a depăși abordările anterioare de ansamblu. Într-o evaluare utilizând două seturi de date deschise, modelul propus a prezentat o creștere de maxim 3,8% a preciziei și o creștere de maxim 6,6% a accuracy@161 împotriva modelelor anterioare. Am analizat mai multe straturi intermediare ale modelului nostru, ceea ce a arătat că stările lor captează unele caracteristici statistice ale seturilor de date.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt geoplasseringsmodell med eit kompleks neuralnettverk. Forhåndsvising av geoplassering i sosiale media har attrakta mange forskere til å bruka informasjon om ulike typar. Modellen vårt inneheld tekst, metadata og nettverksrepresentasjonar med eit oppmerksmekanisme for å overføra tidlegare tilnærmingar med ensemble. I eit evaluering med to opne datasett viste den foreslåde modellen maksimum 3,8 % økt nøyaktighet og maksimum 6,6 % økt i accuracy@161 mot førre modeller. Vi analysere fleire gjennomsnittslag av modellen vårt, som viste at tilstandane sine hentar nokre statistiske karakteristikk av dataset.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowy model przewidywania geolokalizacji wykorzystujący złożoną sieć neuronową. Przewidywanie geolokalizacji w mediach społecznościowych przyciągnęło wielu badaczy do korzystania z informacji różnego rodzaju. Nasz model ujednolica tekst, metadane i reprezentacje sieci użytkowników z mechanizmem uwagi, aby przezwyciężyć poprzednie podejścia zespołowe. W ocenie z wykorzystaniem dwóch otwartych zbiorów danych proponowany model wykazał maksymalny 3,8% wzrost dokładności i maksymalny 6,6% wzrost accuracy@161 w stosunku do poprzednich modeli. Przeanalizowaliśmy również kilka warstw pośrednich naszego modelu, co wykazało, że ich stany przechwytują pewne cechy statystyczne zbiorów danych.', 'mn': 'Бид комплекс мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан шинэ географийн байрлал таамаглах загварыг санал болгож байна. Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн газрын байрлал таамаглалт олон судлаачид өөр төрлийн мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой болсон. Бидний загвар нь текст, мета-өгөгдлийг, хэрэглэгчийн сүлжээнд анхаарлын механизм үүсгэдэг. Хоёр нээлттэй өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан дүгнэлт дээр санал өгсөн загвар нь тодорхойлолтын хамгийн их 3.8% нэмэгдсэн ба хамгийн их 6.6% нэмэгдсэн. accuracy@161 Өмнөх загваруудын эсрэг. Бид өөрсдийн загварын дундаж хэдэн давхар давхар шинжилгээ хийсэн бөгөөд тэдний улс орнууд өгөгдлийн сангийн статистикийн хэмжээсүүдийг барьдаг гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi model predviđanja geolokacije koristeći kompleksno neuralnu mrežu. Predviđanje geolokacije u društvenim medijima privuklo je mnoge istraživače da koriste informacije o različitim vrstama. Naš model ujedinjuje tekst, metadata i zastupanje mreže korisnika sa pažnjom mehanizam za prevladanje prethodnih pristupa. U procjeni koristeći dve otvorene podatke, predloženi model je pokazao maksimalno povećanje točnosti od 3,8%, a maksimalno povećanje od 6,6%. accuracy@161 protiv prethodnih modela. Dalje smo analizirali nekoliko prosječnih slojeva našeg modela, koji su otkrili da njihova država uhvate neke statističke karakteristike podataka.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny modell för geolokalisering med hjälp av ett komplext neuralt nätverk. Geolokalisering förutsägelse i sociala medier har lockat många forskare att använda information av olika slag. Vår modell förenar text, metadata och användarnätverksrepresentationer med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att övervinna tidigare ansatser. I en utvärdering med hjälp av två öppna datauppsättningar uppvisade den föreslagna modellen en maximal 3,8% ökning av noggrannheten och en maximal 6,6% ökning av noggrannheten. accuracy@161 mot tidigare modeller. Vi analyserade vidare flera mellanlager av vår modell, vilket visade att deras tillstånd fångar vissa statistiska egenskaper hos datauppsättningarna.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න. සාමාජික මිඩියාවේ භූතික්ෂණ ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විවිධ වර්ගයක් තොරතුරු භාවිතානය කර අපේ මොඩල් එකතු කරනවා පාළුව, මෙටාඩේටා සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකය ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් අවධානයක් තියෙනවා පිළිබඳ අ විවෘත දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් භාවිතා විශ්ලේෂණයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විවෘත 3.8% විශාලය සහ 6.6% විශාලයෙන් විශාල accuracy@161 මුලින් මෝඩේල් එක්ක. අපි තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා අපේ මොඩල් එකේ අතර අතර අතර විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ ජාතියේ තැන', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model ka hor-dhigista meelaha saxda ah oo lagu isticmaalayo shabakadda neurada adag. Waxyaabaha la soo sheegay ee ku qoran shabakadda bulshada waxaa soo saaray baaritaan badan inay isticmaalaan macluumaad kala duduwan. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku qoraa qoraal, metadata, iyo shabakadda isticmaalayaasha, waxayna leedahay macquul aad u haysato in ay ka adkaato qaababka hore. Qiimeynta lagu isticmaalayo laba databases oo furan, modelkii la soo jeeday wuxuu tusay ugu badnaan saxda 3,8% korodhsan iyo korodha ugu badnaan 6,6% korodhsan accuracy@161 dhimista hore. Waxaannu kaloo analyeennay qaar ka mid ah qaababkayaga dhexe, taas oo muuqatay in dowladoodu ay qabsadaan takhasusyada takhasuska ah.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی جائولسی پیش بینی موڈل کو پیچیدہ نئورل نیٹورک کے مطابق پیش بینی کریں گے۔ سوسیل میڈیا میں جئئوٹ کی پیش بینی نے بہت سے پھیرنے والوں کو مختلف طریقوں کے معلومات کا استعمال کرنے کے لئے آراستہ کیا ہے۔ ہمارا موڈل پیغام، میٹا ڈیٹا اور کارساز نیٹ ورک نمایشگروں کو ایک دکھانے کی مکانیسم کے ساتھ پہلے آنسمبل کے رستوں پر غالب کرنے کے لئے متحد کرتا ہے. دو کھولے ڈاٹ سٹ کے استعمال کے مطابق ارزیابی میں، پیشنهاد کی موڈل نے حد سے 3.8% مطابق اضافہ کی اور حد سے 6.6% اضافہ کی accuracy@161 اگلے موڈل کے خلاف۔ ہم نے اپنے مدل کے چند میانہ لائٹوں کو تحقیق کیا ہے، جو ان کے ملکوں نے ڈاٹسٹ کے کچھ ایسٹیسٹ کی تعریفیں پکڑی ہیں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு சிக்கலான புதிய புதிய புவியியல் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பூக்கி முன்வாக்கம் பல ஆராய்ச்சிகளை பயன்படுத்தி பல வகைகளின் தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. எங்கள் மாதிரி உரையையும், metadata, மற்றும் பயனர் வலைப்பின்னலையும் குறிப்பிடுகிறது முந்தைய முறைமையையும் மேற்கொள இரண்டு திறந்த தரவுத்தளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு மதிப்பில், பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி சரியாக 3. 8% அதிகப்பட்ச அதிகரிப்பை காட்டினார்கள accuracy@161 முந்தைய மாதிரிகளுக்கு எதிராக. நாங்கள் மேலும் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் நடுநிலை அடுக்குகளை ஆய்வு செய்தோம், அது அவர்கள் நாடுகள் தரவு அமைப்புகளின் சில புள்ளிவ', 'uz': "Biz murakkab neyrol tarmoqni ishlatish uchun novel joylashtirish modeli rivojlanamiz. Name Our model unifies text, metadata, and user network representations with an attention mechanism to overcome previous ensemble approaches.  Ikki ochiq maʼlumotlar tarkibi bilan qiymatda, talab qilingan modeli tasdiqligini 3.8% oshirish va 6.6% katta ko'payishi mumkin. accuracy@161 Oldingi modellar uchun. Biz modelimizning bir necha intermediate qatlamlarini analyzerdik. Bu holatlarining davlatlari maʼlumotlar satrlarining bir statistika xizmatlarini qabul qiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình dự đoán địa vị mới sử dụng mạng thần kinh phức tạp. Dự đoán địa vị trong các phương tiện xã hội đã thu hút nhiều nhà nghiên cứu sử dụng thông tin về nhiều loại. Mô hình của chúng tôi hợp nhất các biểu tượng về văn bản, siêu dữ liệu và mạng người dùng với một cơ chế tập trung để vượt qua các phong cách kết hợp trước. Trong một cuộc đánh giá dựa trên hai bộ dữ liệu mở, mẫu đề nghị hiển thị một khả năng cao cao độ chính xác cao tối đa và một tăng cao tối đa accuracy@161 so với mẫu trước. Chúng tôi đã phân tích thêm các lớp trung cấp của mô hình, cho thấy các bang của chúng thu được một số chi tiết thống kê của các tập tin.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw geolocatie voorspellingsmodel voor met behulp van een complex neuraal netwerk. Geolocatie voorspelling in sociale media heeft veel onderzoekers aangetrokken om informatie van verschillende soorten te gebruiken. Ons model verenigt tekst, metadata en gebruikersnetwerkrepresentaties met een aandachtsmechanisme om eerdere ensemblebenaderingen te overwinnen. In een evaluatie met behulp van twee open datasets vertoonde het voorgestelde model een maximum 3,8% toename in nauwkeurigheid en een maximum van 6,6% toename in accuracy@161 ten opzichte van eerdere modellen. We hebben verder verschillende tussenlagen van ons model geanalyseerd, waaruit bleek dat hun toestand enkele statistische kenmerken van de datasets vastlegt.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny geolocation forudsigelse model ved hjælp af et komplekst neuralt netværk. Geolokalisering forudsigelse i sociale medier har tiltrukket mange forskere til at bruge information af forskellige typer. Vores model forener tekst, metadata og brugernetværksrepræsentationer med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at overvinde tidligere ensembletilgange. I en evaluering ved hjælp af to åbne datasæt viste den foreslåede model en højst 3,8% stigning i nøjagtigheden og en højst 6,6% stigning i nøjagtigheden. accuracy@161 mod tidligere modeller. Vi analyserede yderligere flere mellemliggende lag af vores model, hvilket afslørede, at deres tilstande fanger nogle statistiske karakteristika af datasættene.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов модел за прогнозиране на геолокация, използващ сложна невронна мрежа. Прогнозирането на геолокация в социалните медии привлича много изследователи да използват информация от различни видове. Нашият модел обединява текстови, метаданни и потребителски мрежови изображения с механизъм за внимание, за да преодолее предишните ансамбълни подходи. При оценка, използваща два открити набора от данни, предложеният модел показва максимум 3,8% увеличение на точността и максимум 6,6% увеличение на точността. accuracy@161 спрямо предишните модели. Освен това анализирахме няколко междинни слоя на нашия модел, което разкри, че техните състояния улавят някои статистически характеристики на наборите от данни.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi model predviđanja geolokacije koristeći kompleksni neuralnu mrežu. Predviđanje geolokacije u društvenim medijima privuklo je mnoge istraživače da koriste informacije o različitim vrstama. Naš model ujedinjava tekst, metapodatke i zastupanje mreže korisnika s pažnjom mehanizam za prevladanje prethodnih pristupa. U procjeni koristeći dvije otvorene podatke, predloženi model pokazao je maksimalno povećanje točnosti od 3,8% i maksimalno povećanje od 6,6%. accuracy@161 protiv prethodnih modela. Dalje smo analizirali nekoliko posredničkih slojeva našeg modela, koji su otkrili da njihova država uhvate neke statističke karakteristike podataka.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Geolokalisierungsmodell vor, das ein komplexes neuronales Netzwerk verwendet. Geolocation Vorhersage in sozialen Medien hat viele Forscher angezogen, Informationen verschiedener Art zu verwenden. Unser Modell vereinheitlicht Text, Metadaten und Benutzernetzwerkdarstellungen mit einem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um bisherige Ensemble-Ansätze zu überwinden. In einer Auswertung mit zwei offenen Datensätzen zeigte das vorgeschlagene Modell einen maximalen 3,8% Anstieg der Genauigkeit und einen maximalen 6,6% Anstieg der accuracy@161 gegen frühere Modelle. Wir analysierten weiter mehrere Zwischenschichten unseres Modells, die zeigten, dass ihre Zustände einige statistische Merkmale der Datensätze erfassen.', 'fa': 'ما از یک شبکه عصبی پیچیده می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل پیش\u200cبینی جامعه\u200cهای تازه با استفاده از شبکه عصبی پیچیده است. پیش\u200cبینی جامعه\u200cای در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بسیاری از تحقیقات\u200cکنندگان را برای استفاده از اطلاعات از نوع\u200cهای مختلف جغرافی جذب کرده است. مدل ما متن، metadata و شبکه کاربر را با یک مکانیسم توجه برای تغییر رسیدن نزدیک پیشینیان متحد می کند. در یک ارزیابی با استفاده از دو مجموعه داده باز، مدل پیشنهاد حداکثر افزایش دقیق ۳.۸ درصد و حداکثر افزایش ۶.۶ درصد را نشان داد accuracy@161 در مقابل مدل قبلی. ما چند لایه\u200cهای بین\u200cالمللی از مدل خودمان را تحلیل کردیم که نشان دادند که ایالت\u200cهایشان بعضی از ویژگی\u200cهای آمار\u200cشناسی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را می\u200cگیرند.', 'ko': '복잡한 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 지리적 위치 예측 모델을 제시했다.소셜 미디어의 지리적 위치 예측은 많은 연구자들이 다양한 유형의 정보를 사용하도록 끌어들였다.우리의 모델은 텍스트, 메타데이터와 사용자 네트워크 표시와 주의 메커니즘을 결합시켜 이전의 집적 방법을 극복한다.두 개의 개방형 데이터 세트를 사용한 평가에서 제시된 모델의 정확도는 최고 3.8%, 정확도는 최고 6.6% 높아졌다accuracy@161이전 차종과 비교하다.우리는 모델의 몇 개의 중간층을 한층 더 분석하여 그들의 상태가 데이터 집합의 일부 통계적 특징을 포획한 것을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model prediksi geolokasi baru menggunakan jaringan saraf kompleks. Prediksi geolokasi di media sosial telah menarik banyak peneliti untuk menggunakan informasi berbagai jenis. Model kami menyatukan teks, metadata, dan representation jaringan pengguna dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk mengatasi pendekatan ensemble sebelumnya. Dalam evaluasi menggunakan dua set data terbuka, model yang diusulkan menunjukkan maksimum 3,8% peningkatan akurasi dan maksimum 6,6% peningkatan accuracy@161  against previous models.  Kami lebih lanjut menganalisis beberapa lapisan intermediate dari model kami, yang mengungkapkan bahwa negara-negara mereka menangkap beberapa karakteristik statistik dari set data.', 'sw': 'We propose a novel geolocation prediction model using a complex neural network.  Utabiri wa utekelezaji katika mitandao ya kijamii umewavutia watafiti wengi kutumia taarifa za aina mbalimbali. Mfano wetu unaunganisha ujumbe, taarifa za meta, na mtandao wa watumiaji wa mtandao wa intaneti wakiwa na mfumo wa kuchukua hatua zilizopita. Katika tathmini kwa kutumia seti mbili za taarifa zilizofungwa, modeli ya pendekezo ilionyesha kuongezeka kwa kiwango cha asilimia 3.8 na kuongezeka kwa asilimia 6.6 accuracy@161 dhidi ya mifano iliyopita. Tulichambua vipande kadhaa vya mifano yetu vya kati, ambavyo vilionyesha kwamba majimbo yao yamekwisha takwimu za takwimu za taarifa.', 'tr': 'Biz taýýarlan ýerleşdirim sistemasyny karmaşık näyral şebekesini ulanarak taýýarlama nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Sosyal medýýatlaryň ýerleşdirim öňünden näçe hili bilgi ulanmak üçin köp araştyrçylary çekdi. Biziň modelimiz metin, metadata we wužiwarlaryň şebeke meýdançasyny öňki köp bolup geçirmek üçin üns meýdançasyny birleşýär. Ýüklenmek üçin iki a çyk veri düzümlerini ulanýan çözümlerde, teklip eden nusga düzümlerniň dogrylygyny 3.8% ýüklemesini we 6.6% ýüklemesini kösterdi. accuracy@161 Öňki modellere garşy Biz nusgamyzyň birnäçe orta kalamlaryny çözdik. Bu durumlaryň data setirleriniň birnäçe statistik karakterlerini çykarýandygyny görkezilýär.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n roman geoligging voorskou model met 'n kompleks neuralnetwerk. Name Ons model eenmaak teks, metadata en gebruikernetwerk voorstellings met 'n aandag mekanisme om vorige ensemble toegang te oorwin. In 'n evaluering gebruik twee oop datastelle, het die voorgestelde model 'n maksimum 3.8% verhoog in presisiteit en 'n maksimum van 6.6% verhoog in accuracy@161 teen vorige modele. Ons het verder verskeie middellage van ons model analiseer, wat die staatskappe van hulle staatskappe sommige statistiese karakteristieke van die datastelle opgeneem het.", 'am': 'የአሁኑን የቦታ መጠቀሚያ ለመፍጠር ሞዴል በተጨማሪው የነዌብ መረብ በመጠቀም እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ውስጥ የስልጣን ውይይት ብዙዎችን አስተማሪዎችን የልዩ ዓይነቶች መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም አቀረበ፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ጽሑፍን፣ መትዳራትን እና የተጠቃሚውን መረብ በመጠቀም የፊተኛውን የስንስቢል ልማድ ማድረግ የሚያስፈልጋቸውን አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በሁለት ክፍት ዳታተሮችን በመጠቀም በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ቁጥጥር 3.8 በመቶ የሚያበዛ እና በመቶው 6.6 በመቶ የሚጨመር ማድረግ ነው፡፡ accuracy@161 የቀድሞው ዓይነቶች ላይ አካሄዳቸው የዳታ አካሄዱን የቁጥጥር ስርዓት መያዛቸው እንደሆነ እናሳውቀው ነበር፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të ri parashikimi të gjeolokalimit duke përdorur një rrjet nervor kompleks. Parashikimi i gjeolokalimit në media sociale ka tërhequr shumë kërkues për të përdorur informacion të llojeve të ndryshme. Modeli ynë bashkon tekstin, metatë dhe përfaqësimet e rrjetit të përdoruesve me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje për të kapërcyer qasjet e mëparshme. Në një vlerësim duke përdorur dy grupe të dhënash të hapura, modeli i propozuar ekspozoi një rritje maksimale prej 3.8% në saktësi dhe një rritje maksimale prej 6.6% në accuracy@161 - kundër modeleve të mëparshëm. Ne analizuam më tej disa shtresa të ndërmjetësuara të modelit tonë, që zbuloi se shtetet e tyre kapin disa karakteristika statistike të të dhënave.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր երկրագծի կանխատեսման մոդել օգտագործելով բարդ նյարդային ցանց: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների գեոտեղադրության կանխատեսումը շատ հետազոտողներին գրավել է օգտագործել տարբեր տեսակի տեղեկատվություն: Մեր մոդելը միավորում է տեքստի, մետատվյալների և օգտագործողների ցանցի ներկայացումները ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք նախորդ համակարգչային մոտեցումները: Երկու բաց տվյալների համակարգերի օգտագործման արդյունքում առաջարկված մոդելը ցույց տվեց ճշգրտության աճը 3.8 տոկոսով և աճը 6.6 տոկոսով accuracy@161 - նախորդ մոդելների դեմ: Մենք նաև վերլուծեցինք մեր մոդելի մի քանի միջին շերտերը, որոնք բացահայտեցին, որ իրենց նահանգները վերցնում են տվյալների որոշ վիճակագրական հատկություններ:', 'az': 'Biz yeni geolokasyon tədbir modelini kompleks nöral a ğ vasitəsilə təklif edirik. Sosyal media içindəki geolokasyon tədbirləri müxtəlif növlərin məlumatlarını istifadə etmək üçün çoxlu araştırmacıları təşkil etdi. Bizim modellərimiz məktub, metadata və istifadəçilər şəbəkəsini əvvəlki ensemble yaxınlıqlarını üstün etmək üçün məlumatları birləşdirir. İki a çıq verilən qurğular vasitəsilə müəyyən edilən tədbir modeli tam 3,8%-in artırılmasını və 6,6%-in artırılmasını göstərdi. accuracy@161 əvvəlki modellərə qarşı. Daha sonra modelimizin bir neçə orta səviyyələrini analiz etdik ki, onların durumlarının verilənlərin bəzi statistik özelliklərini alırlar.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou model de predicció de geolocalització utilitzant una xarxa neural complex a. La predicció de la geolocalització dels mitjans socials ha atraït molts investigadors a utilitzar informació de diversos tipus. El nostre model unifica representacions de text, metadades i xarxa d'usuaris amb un mecanisme d'atenció per superar els enfocaments anteriors. En una evaluació utilitzant dos conjunts de dades oberts, el model proposat mostrava un increment máxim del 3,8% en la precisió i un increment máxim del 6,6% en accuracy@161 contra models anteriors. També vam analitzar diverses capes intermedies del nostre model, que van revelar que els seus estats capturen algunes característiques estadístiques dels conjunts de dades.", 'bn': 'We propose a novel geolocation prediction model using a complex neural network.  সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য ব্যবহারের জন্য অনেক গবেষক আকর্ষণ করেছে। আমাদের মডেল লেখা, মেটেডাটা এবং ব্যবহারকারী নেটওয়ার্ক প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে পূর্ববর্তী এনসেম্পেলের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিজ দুই খোলা ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে মূল্যের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল সঠিকভাবে ৩. ৮% বৃদ্ধি এবং সর্বোচ্চ ৬. accuracy@161 পূর্ববর্তী মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে। আমরা আমাদের মডেলের বেশ কয়েকটি মাধ্যমীন স্তর বিশ্লেষণ করেছি, যা প্রকাশ করেছে যে তাদের রাষ্ট্র তথ্যের কিছু পরিসংখ্যানের', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi model predviđanja geolokacije koristeći kompleksno neuralnu mrežu. Predviđanje geolokacije u društvenim medijima privuklo je mnoge istraživače da koriste informacije o različitim vrstama. Naš model ujedinjuje tekst, metadata i zastupanje mreže korisnika sa pažnjom mehanizam za prevladanje prethodnih pristupa. U procjeni koristeći dvije otvorene podatke, predloženi model pokazao je maksimalno povećanje točnosti od 3,8%, a maksimalno povećanje od 6,6%. accuracy@161 protiv prethodnih modela. Dalje smo analizirali nekoliko prosječnih slojeva našeg modela, koji su otkrili da njihova država uhvate neke statističke karakteristike podataka.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue geolokatsiooni ennustamise mudeli, mis kasutab kompleksset närvivõrku. Geolokatsiooni ennustamine sotsiaalmeedias on meelitanud palju teadlasi kasutama erinevat tüüpi teavet. Meie mudel ühendab teksti, metaandmeid ja kasutaja võrgu esitusi tähelepanumehhanismiga, et ületada varasemad ansambli lähenemisviisid. Kahe avatud andmekogumi hindamisel suurenes kavandatud mudeli täpsus maksimaalselt 3,8% ja maksimaalselt 6,6% ulatuses. accuracy@161 võrreldes varasemate mudelitega. Lisaks analüüsisime mudeli mitmeid vahekihti, mis näitasid, et nende olekud hõlmavad mõningaid statistilisi omadusi andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta geolokaation ennustusmallia käyttäen monimutkaista hermoverkkoa. Geopaikannuksen ennustaminen sosiaalisessa mediassa on houkutellut monia tutkijoita käyttämään erityyppistä tietoa. Mallimme yhdistää tekstin, metadatan ja käyttäjäverkon esitykset huomiomekanismilla aiempien kokoonpanolähestymistapojen voittamiseksi. Kahden avoimen aineiston arvioinnissa ehdotetun mallin tarkkuus kasvoi enintään 3,8% ja tarkkuus enintään 6,6%. accuracy@161 aiempiin malleihin verrattuna. Lisäksi analysoimme useita mallimme välikerroksia, jotka paljastivat, että niiden tilat kuvaavat aineistojen tilastollisia ominaisuuksia.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový geolokační model s využitím komplexní neuronové sítě. Geolokační predikce v sociálních médiích přilákala mnoho výzkumníků k využití informací různých typů. Náš model sjednocuje text, metadata a reprezentace uživatelské sítě s mechanismem pozornosti, aby překonal předchozí souborové přístupy. V hodnocení pomocí dvou otevřených datových souborů navržený model vykazoval maximální 3,8% zvýšení přesnosti a maximální 6,6% zvýšení přesnosti accuracy@161 oproti předchozím modelům. Dále jsme analyzovali několik mezivrstev našeho modelu, které odhalily, že jejich stavy zachycují některé statistické charakteristiky datových souborů.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov model napovedi geolokacije z uporabo kompleksnega nevronskega omrežja. Napovedovanje geolokacije v družbenih omrežjih je pritegnilo mnoge raziskovalce k uporabi informacij različnih vrst. Naš model združuje besedilo, metapodatke in uporabniške mrežne predstavitve z mehanizmom pozornosti za premagovanje prejšnjih pristopov ansambla. Pri oceni z uporabo dveh odprtih naborov podatkov je predlagani model pokazal največ 3,8-odstotno povečanje natančnosti in največ 6,6-odstotno povečanje natančnosti. accuracy@161 v primerjavi s prejšnjimi modeli. Nadalje smo analizirali več vmesnih plasti modela, ki so pokazale, da njihova stanja zajemajo nekatere statistične značilnosti naborov podatkov.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מודל חיזוי גיאומיקוד חדש בשימוש ברשת עצבית מורכבת. חיזוי הגיאוליקציה בתקשורת חברתית משך חוקרים רבים להשתמש במידע מסוגים שונים. המודל שלנו מאחד טקסט, מטאנתות, וייצגות רשת משתמשים עם מנגנון תשומת לב כדי להתגבר על גישות אסמבל קודמות. בערכה באמצעות שתי קבוצות נתונים פתוחות, המודל המוצע הוציא עלייה במקסימום של 3.8% בדיקת ומקסימום של 6.6% accuracy@161 נגד דוגמנים קודמים. ניתחנו עוד מספר שכבות בינותיות של הדוגמא שלנו, אשר חשפו שהמדינות שלהם שותפות כמה מיוחדים סטטיסטיים של קבוצת הנתונים.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani misali na'urar gafaka da ke amfani da wani zanen neural mai adadi. Kayyari na Geolocation a cikin mitandai da jamii, ya ƙãga mutane mãsu yawa su yi amfani da wasu masu motsi na daban-daban. @ info: tooltip Idan an ƙayyade amfani da tsari biyu masu buɗe, motel ɗin da aka buƙata, ya nuna ɗayan faɗi na tsari 3,8 kuma ya ƙara girmar %6,6 accuracy@161 @ action: button Ko da yawa muka yi anayya cikin wasu jama'a masu tsakiya daga misalinmu, abin da ya sanar da cewa mataimakonsu sunã kãma wasu taki'a na danne.", 'bo': 'We propose a novel geolocation prediction model using a complex neural network. སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནས་ཡུལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མཁན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག accuracy@161 སྔོན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་དག་བཀག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་འཇུག་རིས་ལ་གཞན་ཤས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem dadi jeogras tuatahirne gambar nggawe netwisan karo pakem. Name Nambah model sing digawe Teks, metadata lan tambah pengguna-pengguna kuwi tindakan kanggo nguasai manipulan kanggo ngilanggar diandelak oleh dumadhi. Where\'s the data set accuracy@161 Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan langkung sampeyan kanggo didasakno ning model sing nyebuté, iki dadi nyimpen dhéwé durung nggawe barang istatistikse karo dataset'}
{'en': 'Multi-Task Video Captioning with Video and Entailment Generation', 'ar': 'متعدد المهام Captioning الفيديو مع الفيديو وتوليد الاستثارة', 'fr': "Sous-titrage vidéo multitâche avec génération de vidéo et d'implication", 'pt': 'Legendagem de vídeo multitarefa com geração de vídeo e vinculação', 'es': 'Subtítulos de vídeo multitarea con generación de vídeo y implicación', 'ja': '動画とエンテイルメント生成によるマルチタスク動画キャプション作成', 'zh': '有视频涵之多任务视频字幕', 'hi': 'मल्टी-टास्क वीडियो वीडियो कैप्शनिंग वीडियो और Entailment जनरेशन के साथ', 'ru': 'Многозадачность Видео Подписи с Видео и Генерация Влечения', 'ga': 'Fortheidealú Físe Ilthasc le Giniúint Físe agus Ealaíne', 'hu': 'Többfeladatú videó feliratozás videó és kiterjesztés generálással', 'ka': 'Multi-Task Video Captioning with Video and Entailment Generation', 'el': 'Λέξεις βίντεο πολλαπλών εργασιών με δημιουργία βίντεο και εμπλουτισμού', 'it': 'Didascalia video multi-task con generazione di video e Entailment', 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырмалар видео айдары видео мен бүтін құру', 'lt': 'Daugiaužduočių vaizdo įrašymas su vaizdo ir problemų generacija', 'mk': 'Повеќезадачно снимање на видео со генерација на видео и проблеми', 'ms': 'Capsyen Video Beberapa Tugas dengan Jenerasi Video dan Kesakitan', 'mn': 'Multi-Task Video Caption with Video and Entailment Generation', 'ml': 'വീഡിയോ വെയിലേമെന്റ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലി വീഡിയോ ക്യാപ്റ്റിങ്', 'mt': 'Kapazzjonar Multi-Task tal-Vidjo bil-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Vidjo u l-Problemi', 'no': 'Videotittel for fleire oppgåver med generering av video og fullføring', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowe napisy wideo z generowaniem wideo i rozszerzeń', 'ro': 'Captionare video multi-sarcină cu generarea video și extindere', 'sr': 'Višezadatačni video snimanje sa generacijom video i kompleta', 'si': 'වීඩියෝ සහ අවසානය සමඟ ගොඩක් කාර්ය විඩියෝ විදියෝ කැපිටන් කරන්න', 'so': 'Fiidiyowga shaqo badan oo la qabsashada fiidiyowga iyo korsashada', 'sv': 'Bildtext för flera aktiviteter med video- och extailment-generering', 'ur': 'Multi-Task Video Captioning with Video and Entailment Generation', 'ta': 'வீடியோ மற்றும் தகவல் உருவாக்கத்துடன் பல பணி வீடியோ பிடிப்பு', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Truyền ảnh đa tác vụ ảnh với Thế Hệ Video và Kiểu Lên', 'bg': 'Многозадачи видео записи с генериране на видео и видео', 'nl': 'Video-ondertiteling met meerdere taken met video- en verbeteringsgeneratie', 'hr': 'Višezadatačni video snimanje s generacijom video i kompleta', 'da': 'Videobilledtekster med flere opgaver med video- og udvidelsesgenerering', 'de': 'Multi-Task-Videobeschriftung mit Video- und Entailment-Generierung', 'ko': '다중 작업 영상 자막과 영상 생성', 'fa': 'ویدئو چندین کار با تولید ویدئو و تمام', 'id': 'Capsi Video Multi-Task dengan Generasi Video dan Kesulitan', 'sw': 'Video mbalimbali kwa Video na Uzalishaji wa Video na Ujumbe', 'tr': 'Multi-Task Video Käpşenler Wideo we Tamamlama Däpli', 'sq': 'Video me shumë detyra me gjenerimin e video dhe problemeve', 'af': 'Multi-Task Video Caption met Video en Entailment Generasie', 'am': 'የቪዲዮ እና የመግለጫ አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Բազմախնդիրներ ունեցող տեսագրություն տեսագրության և հիվանդության ստեղծման միջոցով', 'az': 'Multi-Task Video Captioning with Video and Entailment Generation', 'bn': 'ভিডিও এবং ইমেইলেমেন্ট প্রজন্মের সাথে বহুবার কাজের ভিডিও ক্যাপ্টেশন', 'bs': 'Višezadatačni video snimanje sa generacijom video i kompleta', 'ca': 'Multi-Task Video Captioning with Video and Entailment Generation', 'cs': 'Víceúlohové video titulky s generováním videa a vylepšení', 'et': 'Mitme ülesandega videopildistamine koos video ja ühenduse genereerimisega', 'fi': 'Multi-Task Video Captaining with Video and Entailment Generation', 'jv': 'Multi-task Video Caption with Video and Entayment Generation', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Večopravilno snemanje videoposnetkov z ustvarjanjem videoposnetkov in povezav', 'he': 'תוכנית וידאו במשימות רבות עם יצירת וידאו ומחלה', 'bo': 'བརྙན་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་ཆ་ཚན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་མི་མང་བོའི་བརྙན་རིས་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Video captioning, the task of describing the content of a video, has seen some promising improvements in recent years with sequence-to-sequence models, but accurately learning the temporal and logical dynamics involved in the task still remains a challenge, especially given the lack of sufficient annotated data. We improve video captioning by sharing knowledge with two related directed-generation tasks : a temporally-directed unsupervised video prediction task to learn richer context-aware video encoder representations, and a logically-directed language entailment generation task to learn better video-entailing caption decoder representations. For this, we present a many-to-many multi-task learning model that shares parameters across the encoders and decoders of the three tasks. We achieve significant improvements and the new state-of-the-art on several standard video captioning datasets using diverse automatic and human evaluations. We also show mutual multi-task improvements on the entailment generation task.', 'ar': 'شهدت عملية التعليق على الفيديو ، وهي مهمة وصف محتوى الفيديو ، بعض التحسينات الواعدة في السنوات الأخيرة باستخدام نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل ، لكن التعلم الدقيق للديناميكيات الزمنية والمنطقية التي تنطوي عليها المهمة لا يزال يمثل تحديًا ، لا سيما بالنظر إلى النقص من البيانات المشروحة الكافية. نقوم بتحسين التسميات التوضيحية للفيديو من خلال مشاركة المعرفة مع مهمتين من مهام التوليد الموجه ذات الصلة: مهمة تنبؤ بالفيديو غير خاضعة للإشراف موجهة مؤقتًا لتعلم تمثيلات أكثر ثراءً لشفرات الفيديو الواعية بالسياق ، ومهمة إنشاء لغة موجهة منطقيًا لتعلم أفضل أداة فك ترميز مقاطع الفيديو التوضيحية التوكيلات. لهذا ، نقدم نموذجًا تعليميًا متعدد المهام متعدد المهام يشارك المعلمات عبر أجهزة التشفير وأجهزة فك التشفير للمهام الثلاث. نحن نحقق تحسينات كبيرة وأحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في العديد من مجموعات بيانات التسميات التوضيحية للفيديو القياسية باستخدام تقييمات تلقائية وبشرية متنوعة. نعرض أيضًا تحسينات متبادلة متعددة المهام في مهمة التوليد المطلوبة.', 'fr': "Le sous-titrage vidéo, qui consiste à décrire le contenu d'une vidéo, a connu des améliorations prometteuses ces dernières années avec les modèles séquence à séquence, mais l'apprentissage précis des dynamiques temporelles et logiques impliquées dans la tâche reste un défi, en particulier compte tenu du manque de données annotées suffisantes. Nous améliorons le sous-titrage vidéo en partageant les connaissances avec deux tâches de génération dirigée connexes\xa0: une tâche de prédiction vidéo non supervisée dirigée dans le temps pour apprendre des représentations d'encodeur vidéo contextuelles plus riches et une tâche de génération d'implication linguistique dirigée logiquement pour apprendre de meilleurs sous-titres impliquant des vidéos représentations du décodeur. Pour cela, nous présentons un modèle d'apprentissage multitâche plusieurs-à-plusieurs qui partage des paramètres entre les encodeurs et les décodeurs des trois tâches. Nous réalisons des améliorations significatives et une nouvelle technologie sur plusieurs ensembles de données de sous-titrage vidéo standard à l'aide de diverses évaluations automatiques et humaines. Nous montrons également des améliorations mutuelles multi-tâches sur la tâche de génération d'implication.", 'es': 'La subtitulación de vídeo, la tarea de describir el contenido de un vídeo, ha experimentado algunas mejoras prometedoras en los últimos años con los modelos secuencia a secuencia, pero aprender con precisión las dinámicas temporales y lógicas involucradas en la tarea sigue siendo un desafío, especialmente dada la falta de datos anotados suficientes. Mejoramos los subtítulos de vídeo al compartir conocimientos con dos tareas relacionadas de generación dirigida: una tarea de predicción de vídeo no supervisada dirigida temporalmente para aprender representaciones de codificadores de vídeo más ricas y sensibles al contexto, y una tarea de generación de implicación de lenguaje dirigida lógicamente para aprender mejor los subtítulos que implican vídeo representaciones de decodificador. Para ello, presentamos un modelo de aprendizaje multitarea de muchos a muchos que comparte parámetros entre los codificadores y decodificadores de las tres tareas. Logramos mejoras significativas y el nuevo estado de la técnica en varios conjuntos de datos de subtítulos de vídeo estándar mediante diversas evaluaciones automáticas y humanas. También mostramos mejoras mutuas de tareas múltiples en la tarea de generación de implicación.', 'pt': 'Legendagem de vídeo, a tarefa de descrever o conteúdo de um vídeo, tem visto algumas melhorias promissoras nos últimos anos com modelos de sequência a sequência, mas aprender com precisão a dinâmica temporal e lógica envolvida na tarefa ainda permanece um desafio, especialmente devido à falta de de dados anotados suficientes. Melhoramos a legendagem de vídeo compartilhando conhecimento com duas tarefas relacionadas de geração direcionada: uma tarefa de previsão de vídeo não supervisionada e direcionada temporalmente para aprender representações de codificador de vídeo com reconhecimento de contexto mais ricas e uma tarefa de geração de vinculação de linguagem direcionada logicamente para aprender melhor decodificador de legenda de vídeo. representações. Para isso, apresentamos um modelo de aprendizado multitarefas muitos para muitos que compartilha parâmetros entre os codificadores e decodificadores das três tarefas. Alcançamos melhorias significativas e o novo estado da arte em vários conjuntos de dados de legendas de vídeo padrão usando diversas avaliações automáticas e humanas. Também mostramos melhorias multitarefa mútuas na tarefa de geração de vinculação.', 'zh': '视频字幕言视频之务,近年以来,序至序列模形已见有欲之改,而正学之日月与逻辑动力学犹一挑战,特虑乏足之注数。 吾以两相关定向生成事共享视频字幕:一曰时向无监视频占,学以富上下文感知视频编码器,一曰逻辑向言成务,学以学视频字幕解码器。 为此多任务学,三编码器与解码器共参数。 用诸自与人工评估,于数视频字幕数集上成大改进新之最先进之术。 展涵养之相多任务。', 'hi': 'वीडियो कैप्शनिंग, एक वीडियो की सामग्री का वर्णन करने का कार्य, ने हाल के वर्षों में अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के साथ कुछ आशाजनक सुधार देखे हैं, लेकिन कार्य में शामिल अस्थायी और तार्किक गतिशीलता को सही ढंग से सीखना अभी भी एक चुनौती बनी हुई है, विशेष रूप से पर्याप्त एनोटेट डेटा की कमी को देखते हुए। हम दो संबंधित निर्देशित-पीढ़ी के कार्यों के साथ ज्ञान साझा करके वीडियो कैप्शनिंग में सुधार करते हैं: समृद्ध संदर्भ-जागरूक वीडियो एनकोडर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक अस्थायी रूप से निर्देशित असुरक्षित वीडियो भविष्यवाणी कार्य, और बेहतर वीडियो-अनिवार्य कैप्शन डिकोडर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक तार्किक रूप से निर्देशित भाषा अनिवार्य पीढ़ी का कार्य। इसके लिए, हम एक कई-से-कई बहु-कार्य सीखने का मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो तीन कार्यों के एनकोडर और डिकोडर में पैरामीटर साझा करता है। हम विभिन्न स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन का उपयोग करके कई मानक वीडियो कैप्शनिंग डेटासेट पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार और नए अत्याधुनिक प्राप्त करते हैं। हम भी entailment पीढ़ी के कार्य पर पारस्परिक बहु-कार्य सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Видео субтитры, задача описания содержания видео, были отмечены некоторые многообещающие улучшения в последние годы с последовательными моделями, но точное изучение временной и логической динамики, связанной с задачей по-прежнему остается проблемой, особенно учитывая отсутствие достаточных аннотированных данных. Мы улучшаем субтитры к видео, делясь знаниями с двумя связанными задачами направленного генерации: задача временного неконтролируемого предсказания видео, чтобы узнать более богатые контекстно-зависимые представления кодировщика видео, и задача логически направленного создания языка, чтобы узнать лучшие представления декодера субтитров к видео. Для этого мы представляем много-многую многозадачную модель обучения, которая делится параметрами между кодерами и декодерами трех задач. Мы добились значительных улучшений и нового уровня развития в нескольких стандартных наборах данных для субтитров к видео с использованием различных автоматических и человеческих оценок. Мы также демонстрируем взаимные многозадачные улучшения в задаче генерации влечения.', 'ja': 'ビデオのコンテンツを記述するタスクであるビデオキャプションは、近年、シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルでいくつかの有望な改善を見てきたが、タスクに関わる時間的および論理的ダイナミクスを正確に学習することは、特に十分な注釈付きデータの欠如を考えると、依然として課題である。 私たちは、より豊かな文脈を認識するビデオエンコーダー表現を学習するための一時的に指向された監督されていないビデオ予測タスクと、より良いビデオエンタイピングキャプションデコーダー表現を学習するための論理的に指向された言語エンテイメント生成タスクの2つの関連するディレクティブ生成タスクと知識を共有することによって、ビデオキャプションを改善します。 このため、3つのタスクのエンコーダとデコーダ間でパラメータを共有する多対多のマルチタスク学習モデルを提示する。 当社は、多様な自動評価および人間による評価を使用して、いくつかの標準的なビデオキャプションデータセットで大幅な改善と最新のものを実現しています。 また、エンテイメント生成タスクについても相互のマルチタスク改善を示しています。', 'ga': 'Tá roinnt feabhsuithe geallta le blianta beaga anuas i dtaca le samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh le fotheidealú físeáin, an tasc a bhaineann le cur síos a dhéanamh ar ábhar físeáin, ach tá sé fós ina dhúshlán dinimic ama agus loighciúil an taisc a fhoghlaim go cruinn, go háirithe i bhfianaise na heaspa. de shonraí leordhóthanacha anótáilte. Feabhsaítear an fotheidealú físeáin trí eolas a roinnt le dhá thasc a bhaineann le giniúint dhírithe: tasc réamh-mheastacháin físe gan mhaoirseacht faoi stiúir ama chun léirithe ionchódóra físeáin níos saibhre atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs a fhoghlaim, agus tasc giniúna teagmhála teanga atá treoraithe go loighciúil chun díchódóir fotheideal físeáin níos fearr a fhoghlaim. uiríll. Chuige seo, cuirimid i láthair samhail foghlama il-tasc go leor go leor a roinneann paraiméadair ar fud na ionchódóirí agus díchódóirí na dtrí thasc. Bainimid amach feabhsuithe suntasacha agus an nua-aimseartha ar roinnt tacar sonraí caighdeánacha fortheidealaithe físeáin ag baint úsáide as measúnuithe uathoibríocha agus daonna éagsúla. Léirímid freisin feabhsuithe frithpháirteacha ilthasc ar an tasc giniúna eibleachta.', 'el': 'Οι λεζάντες βίντεο, το καθήκον της περιγραφής του περιεχομένου ενός βίντεο, έχουν δει μερικές ελπιδοφόρες βελτιώσεις τα τελευταία χρόνια με μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία, αλλά η ακριβής εκμάθηση της χρονικής και λογικής δυναμικής που εμπλέκεται στην εργασία εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση, ειδικά λόγω της έλλειψης επαρκών σχολιασμένων δεδομένων. Βελτιώνουμε τις λεζάντες βίντεο μοιράζοντας γνώσεις με δύο συναφείς εργασίες κατευθυνόμενης γενιάς: μια προσωρινή εργασία πρόβλεψης βίντεο χωρίς επίβλεψη για την εκμάθηση πλουσιότερων αναπαραστάσεων κωδικοποιητών βίντεο με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος και μια λογικά κατευθυνόμενη εργασία δημιουργίας γλώσσας για την εκμάθηση καλύτερων αναπαραστάσεων αποκωδικοποιητών λεζάντας. Για το σκοπό αυτό, παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο εκμάθησης πολλών προς πολλών εργασιών που μοιράζεται παραμέτρους σε όλους τους κωδικοποιητές και αποκωδικοποιητές των τριών εργασιών. Επιτυγχάνουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις και τη νέα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε αρκετά τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων λεζάντας βίντεο χρησιμοποιώντας ποικίλες αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης αμοιβαίες βελτιώσεις πολλαπλών εργασιών στο έργο δημιουργίας συνεπειών.', 'hu': 'A videófeliratozás, a videó tartalmának leírását célzó feladat az elmúlt években ígéretes fejlődést mutatott a sorozat-sorozat modellekkel, de a feladat időbeli és logikai dinamikájának pontos megismerése továbbra is kihívást jelent, különösen a megfelelő jegyzetelt adat hiányában. Javítjuk a videó feliratozását azáltal, hogy megosztjuk a tudást két kapcsolódó irányított generációs feladattal: egy ideiglenesen irányított, felügyelet nélküli videó előrejelzési feladattal, amely gazdagabb környezettudatos videókódoló reprezentációkat tanul meg, és egy logikailag irányított nyelvi vonatkozású generációs feladattal, amely jobb videófeliratozási dekódoló reprezentációkat tanul meg. Ehhez bemutatunk egy sok-sok többfeladatú tanulási modellt, amely megosztja a paramétereket a három feladat kódolói és dekódolói között. Jelentős fejlesztéseket és új korszerűséget érünk el számos standard videofeliratozási adatkészleten, különböző automatikus és emberi értékelésekkel. Emellett kölcsönös többfeladatos fejlesztéseket mutatunk a vonatkozó generációs feladat terén.', 'ka': 'ვიდეო შესახებ, ვიდეოს შესახებ შესახებ, შემდეგ წლის შემდეგ მოდელების შესახებ, მაგრამ მართლად დავისწავლოთ ტემპალური და ლოგიური დინამიკის განსახულება დარჩენა, განსაკუთრებით შესაძლებელი მონაცემები არსებობით. ჩვენ ვიდეო კონტექტირებას უფრო დირექტირებული ვიდეო კონტექტირების გამოსახულება, და ლოგიკურად დაწყვეტირებული ენერგიის დასახულება, რომელიც უფრო დირექტირებულია ვიდეო კონტექტირების გამოსახულება. ამისთვის, ჩვენ მრავალ დავასწავლოთ მრავალ დავასწავლობის მოდელი, რომელიც სამი დავასწავლობის კოდერების და დეკოდერების პარამეტრების გარეშე დავყენებთ. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთესებები და ახალი სტანდარტული ვიდეო შესახებ განსხვავებული ავტომატური და ადამიანის გაუკეთესებების გამოყენებას. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი მრავალური მრავალური საქმების უფრო მეტი საქმების დავიწყებთ.', 'it': "La didascalia video, il compito di descrivere il contenuto di un video, ha visto alcuni promettenti miglioramenti negli ultimi anni con modelli sequenza-sequenza, ma imparare con precisione le dinamiche temporali e logiche coinvolte nel compito rimane ancora una sfida, soprattutto data la mancanza di dati annotati sufficienti. Miglioriamo la didascalia video condividendo le conoscenze con due attività di generazione diretta correlate: un'attività di previsione video non supervisionata temporalmente diretta per imparare rappresentazioni di codificatori video più ricche consapevoli del contesto e un'attività di generazione di linguaggio logicamente diretta per imparare migliori rappresentazioni di decodificatori video che comportano sottotitoli. Per questo, presentiamo un modello di apprendimento multi-task molti-a-molti che condivide i parametri tra gli encoder e decoder dei tre compiti. Otteniamo miglioramenti significativi e il nuovo stato dell'arte su diversi set di dati standard per la didascalia video utilizzando diverse valutazioni automatiche e umane. Mostriamo anche miglioramenti reciproci multi-task sul compito di generazione di implicazione.", 'lt': 'Vaizdo įrašymas, užduotis aprašyti vaizdo turinį, pastaraisiais metais pastebėjo keletą žadančių patobulinimų taikant sekos-sekos modelius, tačiau tikslus laikų ir loginės dinamikos, susijusios su užduotimi, mokymasis vis dar yra iššūkis, ypač atsižvelgiant į tai, kad trūksta pakankamai užrašytų duomenų. Geriname vaizdo įrašą dalijantis žiniomis su dviem susijusiomis tiesioginės kartos užduotimis: laikinai nukreipta nepastebima vaizdo prognozavimo užduotis, skirta išmokti turtingesnius kontekste žinomus vaizdo kodatorių rodymus, ir logiškai nukreipta kalbų įtraukimo generavimo užduotis, skirta geriau išmokti vaizdo kodorių rodymus su vaizdo įrašais. Šiuo atžvilgiu pristatome daugelio daugiafunkcinio mokymosi model į, kuriame dalijami parametrai tarp trijų užduočių kodorių ir dekoderių. Įgyvendinant keletą standartinių vaizdo įrašų duomenų rinkinių, naudojant įvairius automatinius ir žmogiškuosius vertinimus, pasiekiame reikšmingų patobulinimų ir naujų pažangų. Taip pat parodome tarpusavio kelių užduočių patobulinimus, susijusius su įtraukiamos kartos užduotimi.', 'kk': 'Видеоның айдарылығы, видеоның мазмұнын анықтау тапсырмасы, соңғы жылдарда sequence-to-sequence үлгілерімен бірнеше жақсартылығын көрген, бірақ тапсырманың уақытша және логикалық динамикасын дұрыс оқыту әлі білмейді, өзгертілген деректер Біз бейне айдарылығын білімдерді екі қатынас бар құрылған тапсырмаларымен бөлістіріп жасаймыз: уақытша бөлістірілмеген видео алдын- алдын- алатын тапсырмасы, бақытты контексті түсіндірілген видео кодтарының кеңейтулерін үйрену үшін, логикалық тү Бұл үшін біз үш тапсырманың кодерлері мен декодерлердің параметрлерін ортақтастыратын көптеген бірнеше тапсырманың оқыту үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз әртүрлі автоматты және адамдардың оқиғаларын қолдану үшін бірнеше стандартты видео айдарындағы деректер қорларының жаңа жақсартылығын жеткіземіз. Мұндай-ақ біз бірнеше тапсырманы құру тапсырмасына көп тапсырманың жақсартуларын көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Video captioning, the task of describing the content of a video, has seen some promising improvements in recent years with sequence-to-sequence models, but accurately learning the temporal and logical dynamics involved in the task still remains a challenge, especially given the lack of sufficient annotated data.  Kami meningkatkan penapisan video dengan berkongsi pengetahuan dengan dua tugas generasi-arah yang berkaitan: tugas ramalan video yang tidak diawasi secara sementara untuk belajar perwakilan pengekod video yang lebih kaya yang sedar-konteks, dan tugas generasi penyelesaian bahasa yang mengarah secara logik untuk belajar perwakilan pengekod tajuk yang mengandungi video yang lebih baik. Untuk ini, kami memperkenalkan model pembelajaran multi-tugas yang berkongsi parameter di seluruh pengekod dan pengekod tiga tugas. Kami mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan keadaan baru pada beberapa set data video standar menggunakan penilaian automatik dan manusia berbeza. Kami juga menunjukkan perbaikan berbilang tugas dalam tugas generasi.', 'mk': 'Запишувањето на видео, задачата за опишување на содржината на видео, има видено некои ветувачки подобрувања во последниве години со модели од секвенца до секвенца, но точно учењето на температурната и логичката динамика вклучена во задачата сé уште е предизвик, особено со оглед на недостатокот на доволно анотирани подато Ние го подобруваме видео насловувањето со споделување на знаење со две поврзани задачи на директивна генерација: привремено директивна ненадгледувана задача за предвидување на видео за научување на побогати претставувања на видео кодер со контекст, и логично директивна задача за генерација на јазик за научување подобри претставувања на виде За ова, претставуваме многу-многу мултизадачни модели за учење кои ги споделуваат параметрите низ кодерите и декодерите на трите задачи. Ние постигнуваме значителни подобрувања и новите најнови на неколку стандардни видео-насловни датотеки користејќи различни автоматски и човечки проценки. Исто така, покажуваме взаемни подобрувања на мултизадачите во врска со задачата на генерацијата на вмешаност.', 'ml': 'വീഡിയോ പിടിക്കുന്നതും, ഒരു വീഡിയോ ഉള്ളടക്കം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ജോലി, അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d കുറച്ച് വാഗ്ദത്തീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കണ്ടിട്ടുണ്ട്, പക്ഷെ ജോലിയില്\u200d  നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലുള്ള രണ്ടു തലമുറതലമുറതലമുറകളുടെ ജോലികളുമായി വീഡിയോ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വീഡിയോ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മുന്നറിയിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വീഡിയോ കോണ്\u200d ഇതിനു വേണ്ടി, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പലതും പണിയായ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് മൂന്ന് ജോലികളുടെ കോഡികോഡ വ്യത്യസ്തോട്ടോമിറ്റിയും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റോമിറ്റിയും ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ക്യാപ്റ്റന പ്രവർത്തക തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ ജോലിയിൽ നമ്മൾ പരസ്പരം പല ജോലികളുടെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും കാണ', 'mn': 'Видео бичлэгийн тодорхойлолтыг тайлбарлах үйл ажил нь сүүлийн жилүүд дарааллаар дарааллаар давтагдсан загваруудыг харсан. Гэхдээ ажлын хугацаанд оролцсон хугацааны, логикийн хөдөлгөөн шууд суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд шаардлагатай байдаг. Ялангуяа хангалттай мэдээллийн алда Бид мэдлэгийг хоёр холбоотой бүтээлтийн даалгавартай хуваалцаж бичлэгийн загварыг сайжруулж, хугацааны даалгавартай бичлэгийн тодорхойлолтгүй даалгаварын даалгаварыг сайжруулж, баян ухаантай бичлэгийн кодчуудын илэрхийллийг сурах, логикийн даалгавартай хэл бүтээлтийн даалгавар нь ил Үүний тулд бид маш олон ажлын суралцах загварыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь 3 ажлын коддогч болон хуваалцагчид харьцуулдаг. Бид өөр өөр өөр автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлтийг ашиглан олон стандарт бичлэгийн хэвлэлийн шинэ сайжруулалт болон урлагийн шинэ байдал гаргадаг. Бид мөн олон ажлын сайжруулалтыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Videotittel, oppgåva for å beskrive innhaldet i eit video, har sett nokre foretrukkende forbedringar i tidlegare år med sequence-to-sequence-modeller, men nøyaktig læring av tidlegare og logiske dynamikken som er involvert i oppgåva fortsatt er eit utfordring, særleg gjeven at mangelse av tilstrekkelige annoterarte data. Vi forbedrar videotittel ved å dele kunnskap med to relaterte direkterte oppgåver: ei tidlegare usynleg video-forhåndsvising-oppgåve for å lære rikre representasjonar av video-koderinga med kontekst-oppgåver, og ein logisk direkte språk-oppgåve for å lære betre representasjonar av titteldekoder. For dette presenterer vi ein mange til mange multioppgåver læringsmodell som deler parametrar over kodingar og dekoderar av dei tre oppgåva. Vi oppnår signifikante forbedringar og den nye kunsttilstanden på fleire standard videotittelsett med forskjellige automatiske og menneske evalueringar. Vi viser også samanlige fleire oppgåver forbetringar på oppgåva for oppgåve for oppgåve med oppgåve.', 'mt': 'Il-video captioning, il-kompitu li jiġi deskritt il-kontenut ta’ video, wera xi titjib promettenti f’dawn l-a ħħar snin b’mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza, iżda t-tagħlim preċiż tad-dinamika temporali u loġika involuta fil-kompitu għadu sfida, speċjalment minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta annotata suffiċjenti. Aħna ntejbu l-intestatura tal-vidjo billi nqasmu l-għarfien ma’ żewġ kompiti relatati ta’ ġenerazzjoni diretta: kompitu ta’ tbassir tal-vidjo mhux sorveljat dirett temporanjament biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet aktar rikki tal-kodifikatur tal-vidjo li jkunu konxji mill-kuntest, u kompitu ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ involviment lingwistiku dirett loġikament biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet a ħjar tad-dekoder tal-intestatura Għal dan il-għan, qed nippreżentaw mudell ta’ tagħlim multikompiti li jaqsam il-parametri mal-kodifikaturi u d-dekoderi tat-tliet kompiti. Aħna nilħqu titjib sinifikanti u l-aktar avvanzat ġdid fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta standard dwar il-video captioning bl-użu ta’ evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi u umani varji. We also show mutual multi-task improvements on the entailment generation task.', 'pl': 'Podpisy wideo, czyli zadanie opisujące treść wideo, odnotowały w ostatnich latach pewne obiecujące ulepszenia modeli sekwencji do sekwencji, ale dokładne poznanie dynamiki czasowej i logicznej związanej z tym zadaniem nadal pozostaje wyzwaniem, zwłaszcza biorąc pod uwagę brak wystarczającej ilości adnotacji danych. Poprawiamy napisy wideo dzieląc się wiedzą z dwoma powiązanymi zadaniami generowania kierowanego: czasowo ukierunkowanym zadaniem przewidywania wideo bez nadzoru, aby nauczyć się bogatszych kontekstowych reprezentacji koderów wideo, oraz logicznie ukierunkowanym zadaniem generowania języka, aby nauczyć się lepszych reprezentacji dekoderów wideo. W tym celu przedstawiamy wielozadaniowy model uczenia się, który współdzieli parametry dla koderów i dekoderów trzech zadań. Osiągamy znaczące ulepszenia i nowy state-of-the-art w kilku standardowych zestawach danych do napisów wideo przy użyciu różnorodnych automatycznych i ludzkich ocen. Pokazujemy również wzajemne ulepszenia wielozadaniowe w zadaniu generowania zaangażowania.', 'ro': 'Subtitrarea video, sarcina de a descrie conținutul unui videoclip, a văzut unele îmbunătățiri promițătoare în ultimii ani cu modele secvență-la-secvență, dar învățarea cu precizie a dinamicii temporale și logice implicate în sarcină rămâne încă o provocare, mai ales având în vedere lipsa de date adnotate suficiente. Îmbunătățim subtitrarea video prin împărtășirea cunoștințelor cu două sarcini conexe de generație direcționată: o sarcină de predicție video nesupravegheată, direcționată temporal, pentru a învăța reprezentări mai bogate conștiente de context, și o sarcină de generare a implicării limbajului direcționat logic, pentru a învăța reprezentări mai bune ale decodorului de subtitrare video. Pentru aceasta, vă prezentăm un model de învățare multi-la-multi multi-task care împărtășește parametrii între codificatoarele și decodoarele celor trei sarcini. Realizăm îmbunătățiri semnificative și noua tehnologie de ultimă generație pe mai multe seturi de date standard de subtitrare video folosind diverse evaluări automate și umane. De asemenea, prezentăm îmbunătățiri reciproce în ceea ce privește activitatea de generare a implicațiilor.', 'si': 'වීඩියෝ කැප්සයින්, වීඩියෝ එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන වැඩය, අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින් පොරොන්දු විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැකලා තියෙනවා, ඒත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතර අපි වීඩියෝ කැප්සයින් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වීඩියෝ කාර්ය දෙකක් සමඟ සම්බන්ධ වීඩියෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: කාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය වීඩියෝ කොඩිය මේකට, අපි ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් කොඩොර්ඩර් වලින්  අපි විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සහ අළුත් විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක වීඩියෝ කැප්සයින් දත්ත සේට් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩ කරන්න.', 'sv': 'Videotextning, uppgiften att beskriva innehållet i en video, har under de senaste åren sett några lovande förbättringar med sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller, men att korrekt lära sig den tidsmässiga och logiska dynamiken i uppgiften är fortfarande en utmaning, särskilt med tanke på bristen på tillräckliga kommenterade data. Vi förbättrar bildtextning genom att dela kunskap med två relaterade riktade generationsuppgifter: en temporärt riktad, oövervakad videoförutsägelseuppgift för att lära sig rikare sammanhangsberoende videokodningsrepresentationer, och en logiskt riktad språkgenererande uppgift för att lära sig bättre bildtextningskoderarepresentationer. För detta presenterar vi en många-till-många multi-task inlärningsmodell som delar parametrar över kodare och avkodare för de tre uppgifterna. Vi uppnår betydande förbättringar och den nya state-of-the-art på flera standarddataset för bildtexter med hjälp av olika automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar. Vi visar också ömsesidiga fleruppgiftsförbättringar på uppgiften att generera inneboende uppgifter.', 'sr': 'Video snimanje, zadatak opisa sadržaja video, vidio je neke obećavajuće poboljšanje u poslednjih godina sa modelima sekvence do sekvence, ali precizno učenjem temporalne i logičke dinamike uključene u zadatak još uvijek je izazov, posebno s obzirom na nedostatak dovoljno annotiranih podataka. Mi poboljšavamo video snimanje podijeljenjem znanja sa dva povezanog zadatka direktivne generacije: privremeno usmjeren zadatak neodređenog video predviđanja kako bi naučili bogatije predstave video kodera sa kontekstom svjesnim i logički usmjeren zadatak generacije jezika kako bi naučili bolje predstavljanje video dekodera. Za to predstavljamo model multi task učenja koji deli parametre preko kodera i dekodera tri zadatka. Postigli smo značajne poboljšanje i novo stanje umjetnosti na nekoliko standardnih video snimka podataka koristeći različite automatske i ljudske procjene. Takođe pokazujemo zajedničke poboljšanje multizadataka o zadatku generacije želje.', 'so': 'Shaqada fiidiyowga, sawirida waxyaabaha ku jira fiidiyowga, wuxuu arkay qaar horumarinta loo ballanqaaday ee ugu dhowaaday sanadkii uu ku jiro tusaalooyin soo socota, laakiin si saxda ah u barashada dhaqdhaqaalaha waqtiga iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha shaqada ku saabsan wuxuu sii jiraa dhibaato, has a yeeshee baahida macluumaad ku filan. Waxaannu horumarinaa aragtida fiidiyowga si loo sharaxayo aqoonta oo la xiriira laba shaqooyin oo la hagayo la taliyey: shaqada si ku meelgaar ah loo soo jeedo oo aan lagu dhawro fiidiyowga si loo barto wakiilayaasha taajirka ah ee fiidiyowga kooxerada ku qoran, iyo shaqada la hago luqada aqoonsan oo la baro farsamada fiidiyowga oo ku saabsan farsamada codcodcodka. Taas darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaa model waxbarasho oo badan oo shaqo kala duduwan, kaas oo qayb ka dhiga parameters oo ku qoran koordiyuhu iyo koodeynta saddexda shaqadooda. Waxaannu heli karnaa horumarin badan iyo xaalada cusub ee farshaxanka ee fiidiyowga ee kamid ah oo ku qoran sawirida macluumaadka oo kala duduwan isticmaalaya qiimeynta maamulka ah iyo dadka. We also show mutual multi-task improvements on the entailment generation task.', 'ta': 'வீடியோ பிடிப்பு, வீடியோவின் உள்ளடக்கத்தை விவரிப்பதின் செயல், சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் சில வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றங்களை பார்த்துள்ளார்கள், ஆனால் வேலையில் உள்ள தற்காலிக மற்றும் த நாம் வீடியோ பெட்டியை இரண்டு தொடர்புடைய நேர்வழி தலைமுறை பணிகளுடன் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் மூலம் மேம்படுத்துகிறோம்: நேராக நேர்வழி காப்பாற்றப்படாத வீடியோ முன்காட்சி பணியை கற்று இதுக்கு, நாம் பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அது குறியீடுகள் மற்றும் மூன்று பணிகளின் குறியீடு நாம் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை பெறுகிறோம் மற்றும் பல நிலையான வீடியோ பெறுவதில் புதிய நிலையில் மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகள நாம் அறிவில்லாத தலைமுறையில் பல பணி முன்னேற்றங்களை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'ویڈیو کاپٹینگ، ایک ویڈیو کے منصوبے کی توصیف کرنے کی کوشش، اگلوں سالوں میں بہترین وعدہ کی تغییرات دیکھی ہے، لیکن اس کام میں مشغول ہونے والی موقتی اور منطقی ڈینمانیک کو دقیق سیکھ رہی ہے، مخصوصاً ہم ویڈیو کیپٹیونٹ کو ترجیح دیتے ہیں، دو مرتبہ کی نسبت علم کے ساتھ تقسیم کرنے کے ذریعہ: ایک موقتی طریقے سے غیر قابل تغییر کی ویڈیو پیش بینی کا کام ہے جو بہتر متعلق جاننے والی ویڈیو کیپٹر کی نمایش سکھائے، اور ایک منطقی طریقے سے منطقی زبان کی تولید کی نسل کا کام ہے اس کے لئے ہم ایک بہت سے متعدد دنیا کی تعلیم مدل کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو تین دنیا کی کوڈروں اور دکوڈروں کے درمیان پارامتروں کو شریک کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے بہت سی استاندارڈ ویڈیو کیپٹینگ ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مختلف آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق اضافہ کی اور نئی آرتی کی حالت کو پہنچ لیا ہے. ہم نے بھی ایک دوسرے سے بہت سے کاموں کی تدبیر کی نشانی دکھائی ہے۔', 'uz': "Comment Biz ikkita bog'liq tashkilotlar bilan o'rganish bilan video tashkilotni ajratishni bajaramiz: vaqtda qo'llanilmaydigan video kodlash vazifasini o'rganish uchun vaqtda ishlatiladi. Video kodlash xususiyatlarini o'rganish uchun tadbirkorlik foydalanish, va yolg'on bilan bog'langan tillar taʼminlovchi foydalanish uchun yaxshi foydalanuvchi Bu uchun, biz ko'pchilik vazifalar o'rganish modelini ko'pchiligimiz, bu uchta vazifalarning parametrlarini kodlash va kodlash usulini qaytadi. Biz ko'pchilik avtomatik va inson qiymatlari bilan bir nechta standard video tashkilotlari haqida juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishni bajaramiz. Biz ilmiy avlod vazifalari bilan bir necha vazifani ko'plab o'zgarishni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Đoạn video, nhiệm vụ mô tả nội dung của một video, đã thấy một vài cải tiến hứa hẹn trong những năm gần đây với các mô hình lặp lại, nhưng việc học chính xác các tính năng về thời gian và logic liên quan đến nhiệm vụ vẫn là một thử thách, đặc biệt khi thiếu dữ liệu ghi chú đầy đủ. Chúng tôi cải thiện phần đánh giá video bằng cách chia sẻ kiến thức với hai nhiệm vụ đời tư trực tiếp liên quan: một nhiệm vụ dự đoán video được hướng dẫn tạm thời hướng dẫn để học các biểu tượng mã hóa video nhận diện nhiều ngữ cảnh hơn, và một nhiệm vụ sản xuất ngôn ngữ dẫn thẳng tới học các biểu tượng giải mã video tốt hơn. Cho việc này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình đa nhiệm vụ nhiều đến nhiều, chia sẻ các thông số giữa bộ mã hóa và bộ giải của ba nhiệm vụ. Chúng ta đạt được những cải tiến đáng kể và tiến bộ mới nhất trên nhiều bộ nhớ video tiêu chuẩn bằng cách đánh giá tự động và con người khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy tiến bộ nhiều nhiệm vụ có nhiều nhiệm vụ thế hệ.', 'bg': 'Видео надписите, задачата за описване на съдържанието на видео, са видели някои обещаващи подобрения през последните години с модели последователност по последователност, но точното изучаване на времевата и логическата динамика, свързана със задачата, все още остава предизвикателство, особено предвид липсата на достатъчно анотирани данни. Подобряваме видео надписите чрез споделяне на знания с две свързани задачи за насочено генериране: задача за времево насочено, без надзор, за да научим по-богати изображения на видео кодер, осъзнаващи контекста, и задача за генериране на логически насочени езикови обвързвания, за да научим по-добри изображения за декодиране на надписи, включващи видео. За тази цел представяме многозадачен модел на обучение, който споделя параметри между кодерите и декодерите на трите задачи. Постигаме значителни подобрения и новите съвременни технологии на няколко стандартни набора от данни за видеонадписи с помощта на разнообразни автоматични и човешки оценки. Показваме и взаимни подобрения на многозадачите по задачата за генериране на обвързване.', 'da': 'Videobilledtekster, som er opgaven med at beskrive indholdet af en video, har i de seneste år set nogle lovende forbedringer med sekvens til sekvens modeller, men præcist at lære den tidsmæssige og logiske dynamik involveret i opgaven er stadig en udfordring, især i betragtning af manglen på tilstrækkelige noterede data. Vi forbedrer videobilledteksterne ved at dele viden med to relaterede direkte generationsopgaver: en midlertidigt rettet videoforudsigelsesopgave uden opsyn for at lære mere omfattende kontekstbevidste videokoderepræsentationer, og en logisk rettet sproggenereringsopgave for at lære bedre video-medførende billedteksternes repræsentationer. Til dette præsenterer vi en mange-til-mange multi-opgave læringsmodel, der deler parametre på tværs af encodere og dekodere for de tre opgaver. Vi opnår betydelige forbedringer og den nye state-of-the-art på flere standard videosæt ved hjælp af forskellige automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer. Vi viser også gensidige multi-task forbedringer på medfølgende generationsopgaver.', 'nl': 'Videoondertiteling, de taak om de inhoud van een video te beschrijven, heeft de afgelopen jaren een aantal veelbelovende verbeteringen doorgemaakt met sequentiemodellen, maar nauwkeurig leren van de temporele en logische dynamiek van de taak blijft nog steeds een uitdaging, vooral gezien het ontbreken van voldoende geannoteerde gegevens. We verbeteren de ondertiteling van video door kennis te delen met twee gerelateerde taken voor gerichte generatie: een tijdgerichte, onbeheerde videovoorspellingstak om rijkere contextbewuste videoencoderrepresentaties te leren, en een logisch gestuurde taak voor het genereren van taalimplicaties om betere video-gerelateerde ondertitelingsdecoderrepresentaties te leren. Hiervoor presenteren we een veel-tot-veel multitask leermodel dat parameters deelt tussen de encoders en decoders van de drie taken. We bereiken significante verbeteringen en de nieuwe state-of-the-art op verschillende standaard video ondertiteling datasets met behulp van diverse automatische en menselijke evaluaties. Ook laten we wederzijdse multitasking verbeteringen zien op de invoegment generation taak.', 'hr': 'Video snimanje, zadatak opisa sadržaja video, vidjela je neke obećavajuće poboljšanje u posljednjih godina s modelima sekvence do sekvence, ali precizno učenje temporalne i logičke dinamike uključene u zadatak još uvijek je izazov, posebno s obzirom na nedostatak dovoljno annotiranih podataka. Mi poboljšavamo snimke podijeljenjem znanja sa dvije vezane zadatke za određenu generaciju: privremeno usmjeren zadatak neodređenog predviđanja video-a kako bi naučili bogatije predstave video kodera s kontekstom svjesnim, te zadatak za proizvodnju jezika koji je logički usmjeren kako bi naučili bolje predstave za dekoder snimka. Za to predstavljamo model multi task učenja koji dijeli parametre preko kodera i dekodera tri zadatka. Postigli smo značajne poboljšanje i novo stanje umjetnosti na nekoliko standardnih video snimka podataka koristeći različite automatske i ljudske procjene. Također pokazujemo zajedničke poboljšanje višezadataka o zadatku generacije želja.', 'de': 'Die Video-Untertitelung, die Aufgabe, den Inhalt eines Videos zu beschreiben, hat in den letzten Jahren einige vielversprechende Verbesserungen mit Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modellen erlebt, aber das genaue Erlernen der zeitlichen und logischen Dynamik, die mit der Aufgabe verbunden ist, bleibt nach wie vor eine Herausforderung, insbesondere angesichts des Fehlens ausreichender annotierter Daten. Wir verbessern die Untertitelung von Videos, indem wir Wissen mit zwei verwandten Aufgaben der gerichteten Generierung teilen: einer zeitlich gesteuerten, unbeaufsichtigten Videovorhersageaufgabe, um umfassendere kontextbezogene Video-Encoder-Darstellungen zu erlernen, und einer logisch gesteuerten Sprachgenerierungsaufgabe, um bessere Video-Dekoder-Darstellungen zu erlernen. Dazu stellen wir ein Viel-zu-Viel-Lernmodell vor, das Parameter über die Encoder und Decoder der drei Aufgaben hinweg teilt. Wir erzielen signifikante Verbesserungen und den neuen Stand der Technik auf mehreren Standard-Video-Untertiteldatensätzen durch verschiedene automatische und menschliche Auswertungen. Wir zeigen auch gegenseitige Multi-Task Verbesserungen bei der Implementierungs-Generierung.', 'id': 'Video captioning, tugas untuk menjelaskan isi video, telah melihat beberapa peningkatan yang berjanji dalam tahun-tahun terakhir dengan model urutan-urutan, tetapi dengan akurat belajar dinamika temporal dan logis yang terlibat dalam tugas masih menjadi tantangan, terutama karena kekurangan data yang cukup dicatat. Kami meningkatkan captioning video dengan berbagi pengetahuan dengan dua tugas generasi direksi terkait: tugas prediksi video yang tidak direksi secara sementara untuk mempelajari represensi video pengekode konteks yang lebih kaya, dan tugas generasi bahasa yang direksi logis untuk mempelajari represensi dekoder caption yang lebih baik. Untuk ini, kami mempersembahkan model belajar multi-tugas yang berbagi parameter di seluruh pengekoder dan pengekoder dari tiga tugas. Kami mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan state-of-the-art baru pada beberapa set data video standar menggunakan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia berbeda. Kami juga menunjukkan perbaikan multi-tugas bersama dalam tugas generasi.', 'ko': '영상 자막, 즉 영상 내용을 묘사하는 임무는 최근 몇 년 동안 서열에서 서열 모델에 이르기까지 희망적인 개선을 얻었지만 임무에 관련된 시간과 논리적 동태를 정확하게 학습하는 것은 여전히 도전이다. 특히 충분한 주석 데이터가 부족한 상황에서.우리는 두 가지 관련 방향 생성 임무 공유 지식을 통해 영상 자막을 개선한다. 한 시간 방향의 무감독 영상 예측 임무를 통해 더욱 풍부한 상하문 감지 영상 인코더를 배우고 논리적 방향의 언어 함축 생성 임무를 통해 더 좋은 영상 함축 자막 인코더 표현을 배운다.이를 위해 우리는 세 가지 임무의 인코더와 디코더 사이에 매개 변수를 공유하는 다중 임무 학습 모델을 제시했다.우리는 다양한 자동과 인공 평가를 사용하는 몇 가지 표준 영상 자막 데이터 집합에서 중대한 개선과 최신 수준을 실현했다.우리는 또한 생성 임무에 포함된 상호 다중 임무 개선을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Kuelelewa kwa video, jukumu la kuelezea maudhui ya video, limeona baadhi ya maendeleo ya kuahidini katika miaka ya hivi karibuni yenye mifano ya mfululizo wa mfululizo, lakini kwa hakika kujifunza mbinu za muda na za kisiasa zinazohusika na kazi hiyo bado ni changamoto, has a kwa sababu ya ukosefu wa taarifa za kutosha. Tunaweza kuboresha picha za video kwa kushirikiana maarifa na kazi mbili zinazohusiana na vizazi vinavyoongozwa: jukumu la kutabiri kwa muda usio na muda mrefu lililoongozwa la video ili kujifunza maonesho makubwa ya video yanayofahamika na muktadha, na jukumu la kizazi kinachoongozwa kwa lugha inayofahamika ili kujifunza maamuzi bora ya video yanayohusiana na kupunguza video. Kwa hili, tunaweka mtindo wa kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi na nyingi ambalo linasambaza parameters kote na kupunguza kazi hizo tatu. Tunaweza kupata maboresho makubwa na hali mpya ya sanaa katika video mbalimbali za kawaida zinazoonyesha taarifa kwa kutumia tathmini mbalimbali za kujitegemea na binadamu. Pia tunaonyesha maendeleo ya kazi nyingi katika kazi za vizazi vinavyofahamika.', 'tr': 'Video goýduşgulary, bir wideoň maksadyny tasvir etmek üçin soňky ýyllarda sequence-to-sequence modelleri bilen wajyp söz berýän gelişmeleri gördü, ýöne işiň içinde temporal we logik dinamiklerini dogry öwrenmek häzir bir kynçylyk ýok, ýöne-de ýeterlik täsir edilen maglumatlaryň ýok bolmagynyň sebäbi. Biz bilim ködlemelerini iki görnüş tarapyndan paylaşdyrmak üçin wideo kelläni gowlaşdyrýarys: wagtlar üçin peýdalanmamış wideo öngörümlerini çaklamak üçin baýlyk konteks ködlemelerini öwrenmek üçin bir täsiýeti we logik görnüşli dil jemgyýet täsiýeti we video ködlemelerini gowurak öwrenmek üçin daha gowy görnüş görevlerini Bu üçin bir näçe-birnäçe multi-täblik öwrenmek nusgasyny görkezip, üç işiň üstünde parameterleri paýlaşýar. Biz möhüm gelişmeleri we sungatyň täze möhüm durumyny birnäçe standart video kapisiýa çykyşlygynda ýetip bilýäris. Biz hem birnäçe zadyň esaslaşdyrylygy döredijilik işinde birnäçe zadyň gelişmelerini görkeýäris.', 'af': "Videotitering, die taak van die inhoud van 'n video beskrywing, het 'n paar beloftende verbeteringe in onlangse jaar gesien met sekwensies-na-sekwensiemodele, maar presies leer die tydelike en logiese dinamike wat in die taak betrokke is, nog steeds 'n uitdrukking bly, veral gegee het die mankaak van genoeg annotateerde data. Ons verbeter video-kapsiening deur die deel van kennis met twee verwante direkte-generasie-taak:  'n tydelik-voorskou-taak om ryker konteks-bewyse video-enkoder voorstellings te leer, en 'n logiese-direkte taal-besluit-opslag-taak om beter video-inkoder voorstellings te leer. Vir hierdie stel ons 'n baie na-veel multi-taak leer model wat parameters deel oor die enkodere en dekodere van die drie taak. Ons bereik betekende verbeteringe en die nuwe staat van die kuns op verskeie standaard video-kapsiestel met verskeie automatiese en menslike evaluering. Ons wys ook gemeenskaplike multi-taak verbeteringe op die aanhouding generasie-taak.", 'fa': 'عنوان ویدئو، وظیفه توصیف محتوای یک ویدئو، در سالهای اخیر چند پیشرفت قول\u200cدهنده را با مدل\u200cهای رد-به-رد دیده است، ولی دقیقاً یاد گرفتن دینامیک\u200cهای موقتی و منطقی که در این وظیفه درگیر شده\u200cاند، هنوز یک چالش باقی مانده است، مخصوصا با وجود lack of sufficient ما با تقسیم علم با دو کار نسل رابطه به ویدئو را بهتر می\u200cکنیم: یک کار پیش\u200cبینی ویدئو را به طور موقتی هدایت نمی\u200cکنیم تا نمایش\u200cهای ویدئو کورده\u200cکننده\u200cی محیط\u200cهای ثروتمند\u200cتر را یاد بگیریم، و یک کار نسل\u200cهای رابطه\u200cی منطقی برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی عنوان ویدئ برای این، ما یک مدل یادگیری بسیاری به بسیاری از کارها را پیشنهاد می کنیم که پارامترها را در سراسر رمزگذاران و dekoder های سه کار تقسیم می کند. ما به بهترین شدید و وضعیت جدید هنر در چندین مجموعه\u200cهای عنوان ویدئو استاندارد با استفاده از ارزیابهای خودکار و انسان مختلف رسیدیم. ما همچنین بهترین کارهای زیادی را در مورد وظیفه\u200cی نسل\u200cهای پیوسته نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sq': 'Video titullimi, detyra e përshkrimit të përmbajtjes së një video, ka parë disa përmirësime premtuese në vitet e fundit me modele sekuencë-në-sekuencë, por mësimi me saktësi i dinamikës së përkohshme dhe logjike të përfshirë në detyrë mbetet ende një sfidë, veçanërisht duke patur parasysh mungesën e të dhënave të mjaftueshme të anotuara. Ne përmirësojmë regjistrimin e video duke ndarë njohuritë me dy detyra të gjeneratës së drejtuar të lidhura: një detyrë paraparashikimi video të drejtuar përkohësisht pa mbikqyrje për të mësuar përfaqësime më të pasura të koduesve video të ndërgjegjshëm në kontekst dhe një detyrë e gjeneratës së përfshirjes në gjuhë të drejtuar logjikisht për të mësuar përfaqësime më të mira të koduesve të Për këtë, ne paraqesim një model mësimi shumë-shumë-detyrash që ndan parametrat nëpër koduesit dhe dekoderët e tre detyrave. Ne arrijmë përmirësime të rëndësishme dhe state-of-the-art të reja në disa grupe të dhënash standarte video titullimi duke përdorur vlerësime të ndryshme automatike dhe njerëzore. We also show mutual multi-task improvements on the entailment generation task.', 'am': 'የቪዲዮ አካባቢ፣ የቪዲዮን ውይይት ማሳየት ሥራ፣ በቅርብ ዓመታት ውስጥ በተስፋት ላይ በተለየ ሁኔታዊ እና በተጨማሪው ሞዴላዎችን አየ፣ ነገር ግን በትክክል በሥራው ውስጥ የሚጠቅመውን የጊዜው እና የሎጂ dydynamics የሚማር፣ በተጨማሪም የተጠቃሚ የዳታ ጥቃት ገና ይኖራል፡፡ የቪዲዮ እውቀትን በሁለት የተቀናቀለ የትውልድ ትውልድ ስራዎችን በማጋራት እናሳድጋለን፤ ትክክለኛውን የቪዲዮ ቅድሚያ ስራ ትልቅ የሆኑት የቪዲዮ የድምፅ አካባቢዎችን ማምረን እና የሚሻለውን የቪዲዮ አካውንድ አካባቢዎችን ለመማር በመግለጥ የሚታወቀውን የቋንቋ ትውልድ ትውልድ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት በሦስቱ ስራ ውስጥ አካባቢዎችን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ We achieve significant improvements and the new state-of-the-art on several standard video captioning datasets using diverse automatic and human evaluations.  እናም በተወው ትውልድ ትውልድ ስራ ላይ የተለየውን የብዙ ስራ ማድረግ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Տեսագրությունը, տեսագրության պարունակությունը նկարագրելու խնդիրը, տեսել է որոշ խոստացնող բարելավումներ վերջին տարիների ընթացքում հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդելների հետ, բայց ճշգրիտ ուսումնասիրելը ժամանակական և տրամաբանական դինամիկայի հետ կապված խնդիրը դեռևս դեռևս մարտահրավեր է, հա Մենք բարելավում ենք տեսահոլովակը կիսվելով գիտելիքներով երկու կապված ուղղակի սերունդ առաջադրանքների հետ. ժամանակական ուղղությամբ անվերահսկված տեսահոլովակի կանխատեսման առաջադրանքների հետ, որպեսզի սովորենք ավելի հարուստ կոնտեքստի գիտակցած տեսահոլովակի կոդերի ներկայացումներ, և տրամաբանական ուղղությամբ Այս ամենի համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմաթիվ ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որը կիսում է պարամետրերը երեք խնդիրների կոդավորների և կոդավորների միջև: Մենք հասնում ենք նշանակալի բարելավումներին և նոր տեխնոլոգիաներին մի քանի ստանդարտ վիդեոգրաֆիզիոն տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, օգտագործելով բազմազան ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումներ: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս բազմախնդիրների փոխադարձ բարելավումներ ներգրավված սերնդի խնդիրների վրա:', 'az': 'Video captioning, video içərisində müəyyən ediləni təsdiqləmə görevi, son illərdə sequence-to-sequence modelləri ilə və ’ d verilən yaxşılıqları gördü, amma işdə olan temporal və logic dinamiklərin tamamilə öyrənməsini hələ də çətin deyildir, özlərinə də yetər bilən məlumatlar yoxdur. Biz biliyi iki nəsli ilə paylaşdırmaq üçün video başlığını yaxşılaşdırırıq: daha qüvvətli kontekst kodlayıcı video kodlayıcısını öyrənmək üçün vaxtlı tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə edilməmiş video tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərz Buna görə biz çox çox iş öyrənmə modelini göstəririk ki, bu üç işin kodlayıcıların və dekoderlərin parametrlərini paylaşır. Biz müxtəlif avtomatik və insan değerlendirmələrini istifadə edən neçə-neçə standart video captioning veri qurularında möhkəm düzəltmələri və yeni məhsullarını başa çatdıq. Biz də çoxlu işlər yaratdığımız nəsil işləri barəsində bir-birimizə daha yaxşı göstəririk.', 'bn': 'ভিডিও ক্যাপ্টেশন, ভিডিওর বিষয়বস্তু বর্ণনা করার কাজ, সাম্প্রতিক বছরে কিছু প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল উন্নতি দেখেছে, কিন্তু সঠিকভাবে কাজের মধ্যে যুক্ত সময় এবং লজিক্যাল ডায়াম্যানিক শিখছে তা  We improve video captioning by sharing knowledge with two related directed-generation tasks: a temporally-directed unsupervised video prediction task to learn richer context-aware video encoder representations, and a logically-directed language entailment generation task to learn better video-entailing caption decoder representations.  এর জন্য আমরা অনেক মাল্টিক কাজের শিক্ষা মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা এনকোডার এবং তিনটি কাজের ডিকোডার শেয়ার করে। আমরা বিভিন্ন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্য ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন মানুষের মূল্য ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন ভিডিও ক্যাপ্টেশনের এছাড়াও আমরা প্রজন্মের প্রজন্মের কাজে মাল্টিক কাজের উন্নতি দেখাচ্ছি।', 'ca': "La capturació del vídeo, la tasca de descriure el contingut d'un vídeo, ha vist algunes millores prometedores en els últims anys amb models de seqüència a seqüència, però aprendre amb precisió la dinàmica temporal i lògica involucrada en la tasca encara és un repte, especialment tenint en compte la falta de suficients dades anotates. millorem la capturació de vídeos compartint coneixements amb dues tasques relacionades de generació directa: una tasca de predicció de vídeos no supervisada dirigida temporalment per aprendre representacions de codificadors de vídeos més rics i conscients del contexte, i una tasca de generació d'involucració lingüística dirigida lògicament per aprendre millors representacions de codificadors de títulos amb vídeos. Per això, presentem un model d'aprenentatge multitascat que comparteix paràmetres a través dels codificadors i decoders de les tres tasques. Obtenim millors significatives i la nova actualitat en diversos conjunts de dades estandards de captionització de vídeo utilitzant diverses evaluacions automàtiques i humanes. We also show mutual multi-task improvements on the entailment generation task.", 'cs': 'Video titulky, úkol popsat obsah videa, zaznamenal v posledních letech některá slibná zlepšení s modely sekvence na sekvenci, ale přesné učení časové a logické dynamiky úkolu stále zůstává výzvou, zejména vzhledem k nedostatku anotovaných dat. Zlepšujeme titulky videa sdílením znalostí se dvěma souvisejícími úkoly řízené generace: časově řízeným úkolem předpovědi videa bez dohledu, abychom se naučili bohatší reprezentace kodérů videa s vědomím kontextu, a logicky řízeným úkolem generování jazyka zahrnujícím lepší reprezentace dekodérů titulků. Za tímto účelem představujeme mnoho až mnoho víceúlohový model učení, který sdílí parametry napříč snímači a dekodéry těchto tří úloh. Dosahujeme významných zlepšení a nového stavu techniky na několika standardních datových sadách pro titulky videa pomocí různých automatických a lidských hodnocení. Ukazujeme také vzájemné vylepšení více úkolů v oblasti generování implikací.', 'bs': 'Video snimanje, zadatak opisa sadržaja video, vidjela je neke obećavajuće poboljšanje u posljednjih godina s modelima sekvence do sekvence, ali precizno učenjem temporalne i logičke dinamike uključene u zadatak još uvijek je izazov, posebno s obzirom na nedostatak dovoljno annotiranih podataka. Mi poboljšavamo video snimanje podijeljenjem znanja sa dva povezanog zadatka direktivne generacije: privremeno usmjeren zadatak neodređenog video predviđanja kako bi naučili bogatije predstave video kodera sa kontekstom svjesnim, i zadatak koji je logički usmjeren na generaciju jezika kako bi naučili bolje predstavljanje video dekodera. Za to predstavljamo model multi task učenja koji dijeli parametre preko kodera i dekodera tri zadatka. Postigli smo značajne poboljšanje i novo stanje umjetnosti na nekoliko standardnih video snimka podataka koristeći različite automatske i ljudske procjene. Također pokazujemo zajedničke poboljšanje multizadataka o zadatku generacije želje.', 'et': 'Videopealdiste kirjeldamine, video sisu kirjeldamine, on viimastel aastatel näinud mõningaid paljutõotavaid edusamme jadast jadani mudelitega, kuid ülesandega seotud ajalise ja loogilise dünaamika täpne õppimine on endiselt väljakutseks, eriti arvestades piisavalt märgitud andmete puudumist. Täiustame videote pealdist, jagades teadmisi kahe seotud suunatud generatsiooni ülesandega: ajutiselt suunatud järelevalveta video ennustamise ülesanne, et õppida rikkalikumaid kontekstiteadlikke videokodeerijaid, ja loogiliselt suunatud keele kaasamise ülesanne, et õppida paremini video-sisaldavaid pealdiste dekooderite esitusi. Selleks esitame paljudest paljudele mitme ülesandega õppemudeli, mis jagab parameetreid kolme ülesande kodeerijate ja dekoodrite vahel. Me saavutame märkimisväärseid täiustusi ja uue tehnika taseme mitmetes standardsetes videote pealdiste andmekogumites, kasutades erinevaid automaatseid ja inimlikke hinnanguid. Samuti näitame vastastikust mitmeülesannete täiustamist kaasamise loomise ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Videon sisällön kuvaamiseen liittyvässä videokuvatekstissä on viime vuosina tapahtunut lupaavia parannuksia sekvenssimallien avulla, mutta tehtävään liittyvän ajallisen ja loogisen dynamiikan tarkka oppiminen on edelleen haasteellista, varsinkin kun huomioidaan riittävästi merkintöjä sisältävää dataa. Parannamme videon tekstitystä jakamalla tietoa kahdella toisiinsa liittyvällä ohjatulla generointitehtävällä: ajallisesti ohjatulla valvomattomalla videon ennustamistehtävällä, jolla opitaan rikkaampia kontekstitietoisia videon koodausesityksiä, ja loogisesti ohjatulla kielellisellä implementointitehtävällä, jolla opitaan parempia videon dekooderiesityksiä. Tätä varten esittelemme moniosaisen oppimismallin, joka jakaa parametrit kolmen tehtävän koodereissa ja dekooderissa. Saamme aikaan merkittäviä parannuksia ja uusinta tekniikkaa useissa standardivideokuvaustiedoissa käyttämällä erilaisia automaattisia ja inhimillisiä arviointeja. Osoitamme myös keskinäisiä monitehtäviä parantavia parannuksia osallisuuden tuottamisessa.', 'jv': 'Video caption We mended video captioning by sharing knowings with 2 connected directions-Generation tasks Ngomongke iki, kita ngaweh sistem sing sampeyan akeh-sampeyan Multi-task kang angkang dadi parameters karo koder karo decoder sing telu tasks @item:checkbox Awake dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing nyebutaké plural-task lan ngawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistêm nggawe', 'he': 'צילום וידאו, המשימה לתאר את התוכן של וידאו, ראתה כמה שיפורים מבטיחים בשנים האחרונות עם דוגמנים רצף-לרצף, אך ללמוד מדויק את הדינמיקה הזמנית וההגיונית שמעורבת במשימה עדיין אתגר, במיוחד בהתחשב בהפסקת נתונים מוצבים מספיק. אנחנו משתפרים את הכותרת וידאו על ידי שיתוף ידע עם שתי משימות של דור מיועד קשורות: משימה של חיזוי וידאו לא מועקב באופן זמני בשביל זה, אנו מציגים מודל למידה רבה-רבה של משימות רבות שמחלק פרמטרים ברחבי הקודים והקידורים של שלושת המשימות. אנחנו משיגים שיפורים משמעותיים והמצב החדש של האומנות על מספר קופסאות נתונים סטנדרטיים שמשתמשים בהערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות רבות. אנחנו גם מראים שיפורים בין משימות רבות על משימת דור התעסקות.', 'ha': "Surakin video, aikin bayyana wanda ke cikin wani video, ya ga wasu improve mai kyau masu yi wa'adi a cikin shekara na farko da misãlai-dubi'in-sequence, kuma amma yana karanta mutane da ke cikin aikin da aka yi amfani da shi daidai, sai yana da wata tsoho, haske da haske da kuma ba da haske da data mai isa ya sanata. Tuna ƙara fanikin video game da sharing ilimi da aiki biyu masu shirya masu aiki biyu: wani aikin wanda aka yi shirya da bayani na jinkiri da ba'a tsare wa video ya zama mai amfani da shi ba don ya iya sanar da masu riki tsarin video-encodinga masu fahimta, da wani aikin wanda aka shirya da harshen da aka bada mulki-lingui zuwa wani aikin da za'a sanar da mafi alhẽri video-wanda ke samu da babban rubuciyar. Ga wannan, Munã gaura wata misali da aka sanar wa-aikin masu yawa masu yawa wanda ke raba parameteri kodi da kodi-na'yan aikin uku. Tuna sami mafiya kyauta masu girma da halin-sanaren-na kan tsari masu motsi na mutane da ke yi amfani da ƙaddara masu farat-farat da mutane. Kuma Munã nũna wa aikin mutane masu kyauta a kan aikin waɗannan da ba su sani ba.", 'sk': 'Video napisovanje, naloga opisovanja vsebine videoposnetka, je v zadnjih letih doživelo nekaj obetavnih izboljšav z modeli zaporedja do zaporedja, vendar natančno učenje časovne in logične dinamike, vključene v nalogo, še vedno ostaja izziv, zlasti zaradi pomanjkanja zadostnih označenih podatkov. Izboljšujemo video napisovanje z izmenjavo znanja z dvema povezanima nalogama usmerjene generacije: začasno usmerjeno nenadzorovano video napovedovanje, da se naučimo bogatejših kontekstnih predstavitev video kodirnikov, in logično usmerjeno jezikovno nalogo za ustvarjanje boljših predstavitev videodekodirnih napisov, ki vključujejo video napisov. V ta namen predstavljamo model večopravilnega učenja, ki deli parametre preko kodirnikov in dekodirnikov treh nalog. S pomočjo različnih avtomatskih in človeških ocen dosegamo pomembne izboljšave in novo najsodobnejše vrednosti na številnih standardnih naborih podatkov za video napise. Prikazujemo tudi vzajemne večnalne izboljšave pri nalogi ustvarjanja vključevanja.', 'bo': 'Video captioning, the task of describing the content of a video, has seen some promising improvements in recent years with sequence-to-sequence models, but accurately learning the temporal and logical dynamics involved in the task still remains a challenge, especially given the lack of sufficient annotated data. ང་ཚོས་བརྙན་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ནུས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། For this, we present a many-to-many multi-task learning model that shares parameters across the encoders and decoders of the three tasks. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་པ་དང་ཚད་གཞི་རྩོལ་བའི་བརྙན་ཐོག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Enriching Complex Networks with Word Embeddings for Detecting Mild Cognitive Impairment from Speech Transcripts', 'ar': 'إثراء الشبكات المعقدة بتضمين الكلمات لاكتشاف الإعاقة المعرفية المعتدلة من نصوص الكلام', 'es': 'Enriquecimiento de redes complejas con incrustaciones de palabras para detectar el deterioro cognitivo leve a partir de transcripciones del habla', 'fr': 'Enrichir les réseaux complexes avec des intégrations de mots pour détecter les troubles cognitifs légers à partir de transcriptions vocales', 'pt': 'Enriquecendo redes complexas com Word Embeddings para detectar comprometimento cognitivo leve de transcrições de fala', 'ja': '音声トランスクリプトから軽度の認知障害を検出するための単語埋め込みによる複雑なネットワークの充実', 'ru': 'Обогащение сложных сетей вложениями слов для обнаружения легких когнитивных нарушений из расшифровок речи', 'zh': '用词嵌繁网络,以检音转录轻识障碍', 'hi': 'भाषण टेपों से हल्के संज्ञानात्मक हानि का पता लगाने के लिए Word Embeddings के साथ जटिल नेटवर्क को समृद्ध करना', 'ga': 'Líonraí Coimpléascacha a Shaibhriú le Leabú Focal chun Lagú Cognaíoch Éadrom a Bhrath ó Thréisscríbhinní Cainte', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εμπλουτισμός σύνθετων δικτύων με ενσωματωμένες λέξεις για την ανίχνευση ήπιων γνωστικών διαταραχών από μεταγραφές ομιλίας', 'hu': 'Komplex hálózatok gazdagítása szóbeágyazásokkal a beszédátvitelekből származó enyhe kognitív károsodás felismerésére', 'it': 'Arricchire reti complesse con embedding di parole per rilevare un lieve deterioramento cognitivo da trascrizioni vocali', 'kk': 'Ол транскрипттерден қалқым коgnitivті мәселелерді анықтау үшін сөз ендіру үшін толық желілерді жақсарту', 'mk': 'Богатство на комплексни мрежи со вклопување на зборови за детектирање на лесно когнитивно оштетување од преписите на говорот', 'lt': 'Kompleksinių tinklų, kuriuose įrašomi žodžiai, turtinimas siekiant nustatyti lengvą pažintinį sutrikimą iš kalbos transkripcijų', 'ms': 'Menkaya Rangkaian Kompleks dengan Penjelmaan Perkataan untuk mengesan cacat pengetahuan ringan dari Transkrip Cahaya', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുമായി കോമ്പ്ളെക്സ് നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക ക ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മാ', 'no': 'Å forstørra komplekse nettverk med ord- innbygging for å finna mild kognitiv innbygging frå taleoverskrifter', 'pl': 'Wzbogacanie złożonych sieci o wbudowania słów do wykrywania łagodnych zaburzeń poznawczych z transkryptów mowy', 'ro': 'Îmbogățirea rețelelor complexe cu încorporări Word pentru detectarea deficiențelor cognitive ușoare din transcrierile vorbirii', 'sr': 'Objaèavanje kompleksnih mreža sa ukljuèenjem reèi za otkrivanje blage kognitivne štete iz reèi Transkripta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Enriching Complex Network with Word Embeddings for Detecting Mild Cognitive Impairment from Speech Transcripts', 'mt': 'L-arrikkiment tan-Netwerks Komplessi b’Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem biex jiġi identifikat indeboliment konoxxittiv ħafif mit-Traskrizzjonijiet tal-kelma', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн Транскриптүүдийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн Сүүлийн', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Berika komplexa nätverk med Word Embeddings för att upptäcka mild kognitiv försämring från taltranskript', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Làm gián đoạn mạng phức tạp với môi trường từ để phát hiện khống chế năng lực từ kênh truyền chữ', 'hr': 'Ujačavanje kompleksnih mreža sa uključenim riječima za otkrivanje blage kognitivne oštećenja iz govornih prijevoza', 'da': 'Berigelse af komplekse netværk med Word Embeddings til detektering af mild kognitiv nedsættelse fra taletransskript', 'bg': 'Обогатяване на сложни мрежи с вграждания на думи за откриване на леки когнитивни увреждания от речни транскрипти', 'nl': 'Complexe netwerken verrijken met Word Embeddings voor het detecteren van lichte cognitieve stoornissen van spraaktranscripten', 'fa': 'افزایش شبکه\u200cهای پیچیده با استخراج کلمات برای شناسایی تأثیر آگاهی پیچیده از ترنسکرپهای سخنرانی', 'ko': '단어를 통해 풍부하고 복잡한 네트워크에 삽입하여 음성 기록에서 경미한 인지 손상을 검출하다', 'id': 'Menikahi Rangkaian Kompleks dengan Pencampuran Kata untuk mendeteksi cacat Cognitif ringan dari Transkrip Bicara', 'de': 'Anreicherung komplexer Netzwerke mit Word Embeddings zur Erkennung leichter kognitiver Beeinträchtigungen durch Sprachtranskripte', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Komplex ukiwa na Mazungumzo ya Neno kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Mpango wa Kihafidhina Cha Cha Kupitia Habari', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Duke pasur rrjete komplekse me përfshirje fjalësh për zbulimin e dobësisë së lehtë njohurore nga transkriptet e fjalës', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի ներգրավված բառերի միջոցով բարդ համակարգչային խնդիրներ հայտնաբերելու համար', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k Transkriptl톛rd톛n S톛fl톛t Cognitive Impairment Detected for Complex Networks with Word Embeddings', 'ca': 'Enriqueixer xarxes complexes amb incorporacions de paraules per detectar una deficiència cognitiva leve a partir de les transcripcions de voz', 'bs': 'Ujačavanje kompleksnih mreža sa uključenim riječima za otkrivanje blage kognitivne utjecaje iz govornih transkripta', 'bn': 'Enriching Complex Networks with Word Embeddings for Detecting Mild Cognitive Impairment from Speech Transcripts', 'cs': 'Obohacení komplexních sítí o vložení slov pro detekci mírných kognitivních poruch z přepisů řeči', 'tr': 'S철zler A흫lamak 체챌in kompleks 힊ebekeleri s철zlerden A흫lamak 체챌in s철zler bilen birle힊tiril첵채r', 'fi': 'Monimutkaisten verkkojen rikastaminen sanaupotusten avulla lievän kognitiivisen häiriön havaitsemiseksi puheensiirtojen avulla', 'et': 'Keerukate võrkude rikastamine sõnapõimimistega kergete kognitiivsete häirete tuvastamiseks kõnetranskriptidest', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Obogatenje kompleksnih omrežij z vdelavami besed za odkrivanje blagih kognitivnih motenj iz govornih prepisov', 'he': 'העשיר רשתות מורכבות עם קידום מילים כדי לגלות פגיעה מזהותית קלה', 'bo': 'མཇུག་བསྡུ་བའི་དྲ་བ་ཚོགས་སྦྱར་བའི་ཡིག་ཚན་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་དུ་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is a mental disorder difficult to diagnose. Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, have been used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large-scale assessments. MCI disfluencies produce non-grammatical speech that requires manual or high precision automatic correction of transcripts. In this paper, we modeled transcripts into complex networks and enriched them with word embedding (CNE) to better represent short texts produced in neuropsychological assessments. The network measurements were applied with well-known classifiers to automatically identify MCI in transcripts, in a binary classification task. A comparison was made with the performance of traditional approaches using Bag of Words (BoW) and linguistic features for three datasets : DementiaBank in English, and Cinderella and Arizona-Battery in Portuguese. Overall, CNE provided higher accuracy than using only complex networks, while Support Vector Machine was superior to other classifiers. CNE provided the highest accuracies for DementiaBank and Cinderella, but BoW was more efficient for the Arizona-Battery dataset probably owing to its short narratives. The approach using linguistic features yielded higher accuracy if the transcriptions of the Cinderella dataset were manually revised. Taken together, the results indicate that complex networks enriched with embedding is promising for detecting MCI in large-scale assessments.', 'ar': 'يعد ضعف الإدراك الخفيف (MCI) اضطرابًا عقليًا يصعب تشخيصه. تم استخدام الميزات اللغوية ، بشكل أساسي من الموزعين ، لاكتشاف MCI ، ولكن هذا غير مناسب للتقييمات واسعة النطاق. ينتج عن اختلالات MCI كلام غير نحوي يتطلب تصحيحًا يدويًا أو عالي الدقة تلقائيًا للنصوص. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بنمذجة النصوص في شبكات معقدة وقمنا بإثرائها بتضمين الكلمات (CNE) لتمثيل النصوص القصيرة التي تم إنتاجها في التقييمات النفسية العصبية بشكل أفضل. تم تطبيق قياسات الشبكة باستخدام مصنفات معروفة لتحديد MCI تلقائيًا في النصوص ، في مهمة تصنيف ثنائية. تم إجراء مقارنة مع أداء الأساليب التقليدية باستخدام Bag of Words (BoW) والميزات اللغوية لثلاث مجموعات بيانات: DementiaBank باللغة الإنجليزية ، و Cinderella و Arizona-Battery باللغة البرتغالية. بشكل عام ، قدمت CNE دقة أعلى من استخدام الشبكات المعقدة فقط ، بينما كان Support Vector Machine متفوقًا على المصنفات الأخرى. قدم CNE أعلى درجات الدقة لـ DementiaBank و Cinderella ، لكن BoW كان أكثر كفاءة لمجموعة بيانات Arizona-Battery ربما بسبب رواياته القصيرة. أسفر النهج الذي يستخدم الميزات اللغوية عن دقة أعلى إذا تمت مراجعة نسخ مجموعة بيانات سندريلا يدويًا. مجتمعة ، تشير النتائج إلى أن الشبكات المعقدة المخصبة بالتضمين واعدة للكشف عن MCI في التقييمات واسعة النطاق.', 'pt': 'O Comprometimento Cognitivo Leve (CCL) é um transtorno mental de difícil diagnóstico. Recursos linguísticos, principalmente de parsers, têm sido usados para detectar MCI, mas isso não é adequado para avaliações em larga escala. As disfluências MCI produzem fala não gramatical que requer correção manual ou automática de alta precisão das transcrições. Neste artigo, modelamos transcrições em redes complexas e as enriquecemos com incorporação de palavras (CNE) para melhor representar textos curtos produzidos em avaliações neuropsicológicas. As medidas de rede foram aplicadas com classificadores conhecidos para identificar automaticamente o MCI em transcrições, em uma tarefa de classificação binária. Foi feita uma comparação com o desempenho de abordagens tradicionais usando Bag of Words (BoW) e recursos linguísticos para três conjuntos de dados: DementiaBank em inglês e Cinderella e Arizona-Battery em português. No geral, o CNE forneceu maior precisão do que usando apenas redes complexas, enquanto o Support Vector Machine foi superior a outros classificadores. O CNE forneceu as mais altas precisões para DementiaBank e Cinderella, mas o BoW foi mais eficiente para o conjunto de dados Arizona-Battery provavelmente devido às suas narrativas curtas. A abordagem usando recursos linguísticos rendeu maior precisão se as transcrições do conjunto de dados Cinderela fossem revisadas manualmente. Em conjunto, os resultados indicam que redes complexas enriquecidas com incorporação são promissoras para detectar MCI em avaliações de larga escala.', 'es': 'El deterioro cognitivo leve (DCL) es un trastorno mental difícil de diagnosticar. Se han utilizado características lingüísticas, principalmente de analizadores, para detectar el DCL, pero esto no es adecuado para evaluaciones a gran escala. Las disfluencias de MCI producen un discurso no gramatical que requiere una corrección manual o automática de alta precisión de las transcripciones. En este artículo, modelamos transcripciones en redes complejas y las enriquecimos con la incrustación de palabras (CNE) para representar mejor los textos cortos producidos en evaluaciones neuropsicológicas. Las mediciones de red se aplicaron con clasificadores bien conocidos para identificar automáticamente el MCI en las transcripciones, en una tarea de clasificación binaria. Se realizó una comparación con el rendimiento de los enfoques tradicionales utilizando Bag of Words (BoW) y características lingüísticas para tres conjuntos de datos: DementiaBank en inglés y Cinderella y Arizona-Battery en portugués. En general, CNE proporcionó mayor precisión que el uso de redes complejas, mientras que Support Vector Machine fue superior a otros clasificadores. CNE proporcionó las más altas precisiones para DementiaBank y Cinderella, pero BoW fue más eficiente para el conjunto de datos Arizona-Battery probablemente debido a sus breves narrativas. El enfoque que utiliza características lingüísticas produjo una mayor precisión si las transcripciones del conjunto de datos de Cenicienta se revisaban manualmente. En conjunto, los resultados indican que las redes complejas enriquecidas con incrustación son prometedoras para detectar el MCI en evaluaciones a gran escala.', 'fr': "Le trouble cognitif léger (TCL) est un trouble mental difficile à diagnostiquer. Les caractéristiques linguistiques, provenant principalement des analyseurs, ont été utilisées pour détecter les MCI, mais cela ne convient pas aux évaluations à grande échelle. Les disfluences MCI produisent un discours non grammatical qui nécessite une correction manuelle ou automatique de haute précision des transcriptions. Dans cet article, nous avons modélisé les transcriptions en réseaux complexes et les avons enrichies avec l'intégration de mots (CNE) afin de mieux représenter les textes courts produits lors d'évaluations neuropsychologiques. Les mesures de réseau ont été appliquées avec des classificateurs connus pour identifier automatiquement les MCI dans les transcriptions, dans une tâche de classification binaire. Une comparaison a été faite avec les performances des approches traditionnelles utilisant Bag of Words (BoW) et des caractéristiques linguistiques pour trois ensembles de données\xa0: DementiaBank en anglais et Cinderella et Arizona-Battery en portugais. Dans l'ensemble, le CNE a fourni une précision supérieure à l'utilisation de réseaux complexes, tandis que Support Vector Machine était supérieur aux autres classificateurs. CNE a fourni les plus hautes précisions pour DementiaBank et Cinderella, mais BoW a été plus efficace pour le jeu de données Arizona-Battery probablement en raison de ses courts récits. L'approche utilisant des caractéristiques linguistiques a permis d'obtenir une plus grande précision si les transcriptions de l'ensemble de données Cendrillon étaient révisées manuellement. Dans l'ensemble, les résultats indiquent que les réseaux complexes enrichis par intégration sont prometteurs pour la détection des MCI dans les évaluations à grande échelle.", 'ja': '軽度認知障害（ MCI ）は診断が困難な精神障害です。 主に構文解析器からの言語的特徴は、MCIを検出するために使用されてきたが、これは大規模な評価には適していない。 MCIの不流動は、手動または高精度の自動補正トランスクリプトを必要とする非文法的発話を生じさせる。 この論文では、トランスクリプトを複雑なネットワークにモデル化し、神経心理学的評価で生成された短いテキストをよりよく表現するために、単語埋め込み（ CNE ）で豊かにしました。 ネットワーク測定は、バイナリ分類タスクにおいて、トランスクリプト内のＭＣＩを自動的に識別するために周知の分類子と共に適用された。 英語のDementiaBank、ポルトガル語のCinderella and Arizona - Batteryの3つのデータセットについて、Bag of Words （ BoW ）と言語学的特徴を使用して、従来のアプローチのパフォーマンスと比較した。 全体的に、CNEは複雑なネットワークのみを使用するよりも高い精度を提供し、一方、Support Vector Machineは他の分類子よりも優れていました。 CNEは、DementiaBankとCinderellaに最高の精度を提供しましたが、BoWは、おそらくその短い説明のために、アリゾナ-バッテリーデータセットにとってより効率的でした。 言語学的特徴を用いたアプローチは、シンデレラデータセットの転写が手動で改訂された場合、より高い精度をもたらした。 まとめると、埋め込みを豊富に含む複雑なネットワークは、大規模評価におけるMCIの検出に有望であることが示されている。', 'zh': '轻度认知障碍(MCI)难诊之精神障碍。 大抵解析器言已用检 MCI,然非大评估也。 MCI 不流则生非语法语音,手动高精度自正成绩单。 于本文中,将转录本建模入杂网络中,并因词嵌(CNE)丰之,以善神经心理学估之短文本。 网络量与众所知之器并用,以自动识别转录本中之MCI。 比之旧法,单词囊(BoW)、三集语:英语中DementiaBank、葡萄牙语灰姑娘、Arizona-Battery。 总体而言,CNE精度高于杂网络,而支向量机优于器。 CNE为DementiaBankCinderella至准确性,然BoW于Arizona-Battery数集之效率益高,盖叙日浅也。 若手动改灰姑娘数集之转录,则言语特征之法生准确性。 综上所述,结果表明,富含嵌杂网络有望于大估中检测MCI。', 'ru': 'Легкое когнитивное нарушение (MCI) - это психическое расстройство, которое трудно диагностировать. Лингвистические особенности, в основном из парсеров, использовались для обнаружения MCI, но это не подходит для крупномасштабных оценок. Выпуклости MCI производят неграмматическую речь, которая требует ручной или высокоточной автоматической коррекции расшифровок. В этой статье мы смоделировали транскрипты в сложные сети и обогатили их вложением слов (CNE), чтобы лучше представлять короткие тексты, полученные в нейропсихологических оценках. Измерения сети применялись с хорошо известными классификаторами для автоматической идентификации MCI в расшифровках, в задаче двоичной классификации. Было проведено сравнение с эффективностью традиционных подходов с использованием Bag of Words (BoW) и лингвистических особенностей для трех наборов данных: DementiaBank на английском языке и Cinderella и Arizona-Batteries на португальском языке. В целом, CNE обеспечивал более высокую точность, чем использование только сложных сетей, в то время как Support Vector Machine превосходила другие классификаторы. CNE обеспечил самую высокую точность для DementiaBank и Cinderella, но BoW был более эффективным для набора данных Arizona-Batteries, вероятно, из-за его коротких описаний. Подход, основанный на использовании лингвистических признаков, обеспечивал более высокую точность, если транскрипции набора данных Золушки пересматривались вручную. Взятые вместе, результаты показывают, что сложные сети, обогащенные внедрением, являются многообещающими для обнаружения MCI в крупномасштабных оценках.', 'hi': 'हल्के संज्ञानात्मक हानि (एमसीआई) एक मानसिक विकार है जिसका निदान करना मुश्किल है। भाषाई विशेषताओं, मुख्य रूप से पार्सर से, एमसीआई का पता लगाने के लिए उपयोग किया गया है, लेकिन यह बड़े पैमाने पर आकलन के लिए उपयुक्त नहीं है। MCI disfluencies गैर व्याकरणिक भाषण है कि मैन्युअल या उच्च परिशुद्धता टेपों के स्वचालित सुधार की आवश्यकता होती है उत्पादन. इस पेपर में, हमने जटिल नेटवर्क में टेपों को मॉडल किया और न्यूरोसाइकोलॉजिकल आकलन में उत्पादित छोटे ग्रंथों का बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए उन्हें शब्द एम्बेडिंग (सीएनई) के साथ समृद्ध किया। नेटवर्क माप को एक बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य में, टेपों में एमसीआई की स्वचालित रूप से पहचान करने के लिए प्रसिद्ध क्लासिफायरके साथ लागू किया गया था। बैग ऑफ वर्ड्स (बीओडब्ल्यू) और तीन डेटासेट के लिए भाषाई विशेषताओं का उपयोग करके पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोणों के प्रदर्शन के साथ तुलना की गई थी: अंग्रेजी में डिमेंशियाबैंक, और पुर्तगाली में सिंड्रेला और एरिज़ोना-बैटरी। कुल मिलाकर, सीएनई ने केवल जटिल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करने की तुलना में उच्च सटीकता प्रदान की, जबकि समर्थन वेक्टर मशीन अन्य क्लासिफायरों से बेहतर थी। CNE ने डिमेंशियाबैंक और सिंड्रेला के लिए उच्चतम सटीकता प्रदान की, लेकिन BoW एरिज़ोना-बैटरी डेटासेट के लिए अधिक कुशल था, शायद इसकी छोटी कथाओं के कारण। भाषाई विशेषताओं का उपयोग करने वाले दृष्टिकोण ने उच्च सटीकता प्राप्त की यदि सिंड्रेला डेटासेट के प्रतिलेखन को मैन्युअल रूप से संशोधित किया गया था। एक साथ लिया गया, परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि एम्बेडिंग के साथ समृद्ध जटिल नेटवर्क बड़े पैमाने पर मूल्यांकन में एमसीआई का पता लगाने के लिए आशाजनक है।', 'ga': 'Is neamhord meabhrach é Lag Cognaíoch Éadrom (MCI) ar deacair é a dhiagnóiseadh. Baineadh úsáid as gnéithe teanga, ó pharsálaithe go príomha, chun MCI a bhrath, ach níl sé seo oiriúnach do mheasúnuithe ar scála mór. Cruthaíonn éagsúlachtaí MCI caint neamhghramadaí a éilíonn ceartú uathoibríoch láimhe nó ardchruinneas ar thrascríbhinní. Sa pháipéar seo, rinneamar athscríbhinní a mhúnlú ina líonraí casta agus shaibhríomar iad le neadú focal (CNE) chun ionadaíocht níos fearr a dhéanamh ar théacsanna gearra a tháirgtear i measúnuithe néarshíceolaíocha. Cuireadh na tomhais líonra i bhfeidhm le haicmitheoirí aitheanta chun MCI a shainaithint go huathoibríoch i dtraipisí, i dtasc aicmithe dénártha. Rinneadh comparáid le feidhmíocht na gcur chuige traidisiúnta ag baint úsáide as Bag of Words (BoW) agus gnéithe teangeolaíocha do thrí thacar sonraí: DementiaBank i mBéarla, agus Cinderella agus Arizona-Battery sa Phortaingéilis. Tríd is tríd, sholáthair CNE cruinneas níos airde ná úsáid a bhaint as líonraí casta amháin, agus bhí Meaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta níos fearr ná aicmitheoirí eile. Chuir CNE na beachtas is airde ar fáil do DementiaBank agus Cinderella, ach bhí BoW níos éifeachtaí don tacar sonraí Arizona-Battery is dócha mar gheall ar a chuid scéalta gearra. Bhí cruinneas níos airde mar thoradh ar an gcur chuige a bhain úsáid as gnéithe teangeolaíochta dá ndéanfaí athbhreithniú de láimh ar na tras-scríbhinní de thacar sonraí Cinderella. Nuair a chuirtear le chéile iad, léiríonn na torthaí go bhfuil líonraí casta atá saibhrithe le neadú geallta maidir le MCI a bhrath i measúnuithe ar mhórscála.', 'ka': 'მალკჲ კჲნდნთრთგნჲ ნაოაენაŒვ (MCI) ვ ჟვკაკჲ რპსენჲ ეა ეთდნჲჱთპა. Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, have been used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large-scale assessments. MCI განსხვავება განსხვავებულია, რომელიც არ გრამიმატიკური სიტყვას, რომელიც მოჭირდება პროგრამეტური ან მარტიკური განსხვავება ტრანქრიპტების მარტიკური ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში კომპლექციურ ქსელში მოდელურებდით ტრანსკრიპტები და დავიღებდით სიტყვებით დაყენებული (CNE) სიტყვებით, რომ უფრო უკეთესი კომპოქციოლოგიური ქსელის განზომილებები ძალიან უცნობილი კლასიფიკაციებით გამოყენებულია, რომ ავტომატურად განცნობა MCI ტრანსკრიპტებში, ბიინერი კლასიფიკაციის დავალებში. სამი მონაცემებისთვის სიტყვების ბაგი (BoW) და ლინგურისტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენებას დამყენებულია: DementiaBank ინგლისურად, Cinderella და Arizona-Battery პორტეგურად. ყველაფერად, CNE უფრო მეტი წესიერება იყო, ვიდრე მხოლოდ კომპლექსიკური ქსელების გამოყენება, როცა Vector მაქსინის დაეხმარება უფრო მეტი CNE-ს დემენტიაბანკის და სინდერელელის უფრო მაღლესი წარმოდგენა, მაგრამ ბოW იყო უფრო ეფექტიური არიზონია-ბატერიის მონაცემების სეტატისთვის შესაძლოა მისი კონტ პროგრამა, რომელიც სინგურილისტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენება, იქნება უფრო მეტი წესია თუ სინდერელური მონაცემების რედაქტირება ხელსახურად განახლებ შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი წარმოდგენა, რომ კომპლექსი ქსელები, რომლებიც შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მონა', 'hu': 'Az enyhe kognitív károsodás (MCI) egy mentális rendellenesség nehéz diagnosztizálni. Nyelvi tulajdonságokat, főként elemzőkből, használtak az MCI felismerésére, de ez nem alkalmas nagyszabású értékelésekre. Az MCI diszfluenciák nem nyelvtani beszédet eredményeznek, amely az átiratok manuális vagy nagy pontosságú automatikus korrekcióját igényli. Ebben a tanulmányban komplex hálózatokba modelleztük az átiratokat, és szóbeágyazással (CNE) gazdagítottuk, hogy jobban reprezentálják a neuropszichológiai értékelésekben készült rövid szövegeket. A hálózati méréseket jól ismert osztályozókkal végeztük, hogy automatikusan azonosítsák az MCI-t átiratokban, bináris osztályozási feladatban. Összehasonlítottuk a hagyományos megközelítések teljesítményét a Bag of Words (BoW) használatával, valamint a nyelvi jellemzőkkel három adathalmaz esetében: DementiaBank angolul, Hamupipőke és Arizona-Battery portugálul. Összességében a CNE nagyobb pontosságot biztosított, mint csak komplex hálózatok használata, míg a Support Vector Machine jobb volt más osztályozóknál. A CNE biztosította a legnagyobb pontosságot a DementiaBank és Hamupipőke számára, de a BoW hatékonyabb volt az Arizona-Battery adatkészletben valószínűleg rövid narratívái miatt. A nyelvi jellemzőket alkalmazó megközelítés nagyobb pontosságot eredményezett, ha a Hamupipőke adatkészlet átiratait manuálisan felülvizsgálták. Összességében az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a beágyazással gazdagított komplex hálózatok ígéretesek az MCI nagyszabású értékelések során történő kimutatására.', 'el': 'Η ήπια γνωστική διαταραχή είναι μια ψυχική διαταραχή που είναι δύσκολο να διαγνωστεί. Γλωσσολογικά χαρακτηριστικά, κυρίως από αναλυτές, έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί για την ανίχνευση MCI, αλλά αυτό δεν είναι κατάλληλο για αξιολογήσεις μεγάλης κλίμακας. Οι δυσλειτουργίες παράγουν μη γραμματική ομιλία που απαιτεί χειροκίνητη ή αυτόματη διόρθωση των μεταγραφών υψηλής ακρίβειας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, μοντελοποιήσαμε τις μεταγραφές σε σύνθετα δίκτυα και τις εμπλουτίσαμε με την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων (ΚΝΕ) για να αναπαραστήσουμε καλύτερα τα σύντομα κείμενα που παράγονται σε νευροψυχολογικές αξιολογήσεις. Οι μετρήσεις του δικτύου εφαρμόστηκαν με γνωστούς ταξινομητές για τον αυτόματο προσδιορισμό των ΜΚΔ σε μεταγραφικά, σε μια εργασία δυαδικής ταξινόμησης. Πραγματοποιήθηκε σύγκριση με την απόδοση των παραδοσιακών προσεγγίσεων με τη χρήση του σάκου των λέξεων (BoW) και των γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών για τρία σύνολα δεδομένων: την DementiaBank στα αγγλικά και τη Σταχτοπούτα και την Αριζόνα-Μπαταρία στα πορτογαλικά. Συνολικά, το CNE παρείχε υψηλότερη ακρίβεια από τη χρήση μόνο σύνθετων δικτύων, ενώ η μηχανή υποστήριξης ήταν ανώτερη από άλλους ταξινομητές. Το CNE παρείχε τις υψηλότερες ακρίβειες για την DementiaBank και τη Σταχτοπούτα, αλλά η BoW ήταν πιο αποτελεσματική για το σύνολο δεδομένων Αριζόνα-Battery πιθανώς λόγω των σύντομων αφηγήσεων του. Η προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά επέφερε μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια εάν οι μεταγραφές του συνόλου δεδομένων της Σταχτοπούτας αναθεωρήθηκαν χειροκίνητα. Συνοπτικά, τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι πολύπλοκα δίκτυα εμπλουτισμένα με ενσωμάτωση είναι ελπιδοφόρα για την ανίχνευση MCI σε αξιολογήσεις μεγάλης κλίμακας.', 'it': "Il lieve deterioramento cognitivo (MCI) è un disturbo mentale difficile da diagnosticare. Le caratteristiche linguistiche, principalmente da parser, sono state utilizzate per rilevare MCI, ma questo non è adatto per valutazioni su larga scala. Le disfluenze MCI producono discorsi non grammaticali che richiedono la correzione automatica manuale o di alta precisione delle trascrizioni. In questo articolo, abbiamo modellato le trascrizioni in reti complesse e le abbiamo arricchite con word embedding (CNE) per rappresentare meglio i brevi testi prodotti nelle valutazioni neuropsicologiche. Le misurazioni di rete sono state applicate con noti classificatori per identificare automaticamente MCI nelle trascrizioni, in un compito di classificazione binaria. È stato fatto un confronto con le prestazioni degli approcci tradizionali utilizzando Bag of Words (BoW) e le caratteristiche linguistiche per tre set di dati: DementiaBank in inglese, Cenerentola e Arizona-Battery in portoghese. Nel complesso, CNE ha fornito una maggiore precisione rispetto all'utilizzo solo di reti complesse, mentre Support Vector Machine era superiore ad altri classificatori. La CNE ha fornito le più alte accuratezza per DementiaBank e Cenerentola, ma BoW è stato più efficiente per il dataset Arizona-Battery probabilmente a causa delle sue brevi narrazioni. L'approccio che utilizza caratteristiche linguistiche ha dato maggiore precisione se le trascrizioni del dataset Cenerentola sono state riviste manualmente. Nel complesso, i risultati indicano che reti complesse arricchite dall'embedding sono promettenti per rilevare MCI nelle valutazioni su larga scala.", 'mk': 'Мало Когнитивно оштетување (MCI) е ментално оштетување тешко да се дијагнозира. Лингвистичките карактеристики, главно од анализатори, се користат за детектирање на MCI, но ова не е соодветно за големи проценки. MCI дифленциите произведуваат неграматичен говор кој бара рачно или висока прецизност автоматска корекција на транскриптите. Во овој весник, ги моделиравме транскриптите во комплексни мрежи и ги богативме со вградување на зборови (СНЕ) за подобро да ги претставуваме кратките тексти произведени во невропсихолошки проценки. Мерањата на мрежата беа применети со познати класификатори за автоматски да се идентификува MCI во транскриптите, во бинарна класификација задача. Беше направена споредба со изведувањето на традиционалните пристапи користејќи го Баг of Words (BoW) и јазичните карактеристики за три податоци: DementiaBank на англиски, и Пепелашка и Аризона-батерија на португалски. Вкупно, СНЕ обезбеди поголема прецизност отколку користењето само комплексни мрежи, додека Поддржувачката векторна машина беше супериорна од другите класификатори. ЦНЕ обезбеди највисоки точности за DementiaBank и Пепелашка, но БоW беше поефикасен за податоците на Аризона-батерија најверојатно поради нејзините кратки приказни. Пристапот со користење на лингвистичките карактеристики даде поголема прецизност ако транскриптите на компјутерот на податоци на Пепелашката се ревидираат рачно. Земени заедно, резултатите покажуваат дека комплексните мрежи богати со вградување ветуваат за детектирање на МЦИ во големи проценки.', 'lt': 'Lengvas pažintinis sutrikimas yra sunku diagnozuoti protinį sutrikimą. MCI aptikti buvo naudojami kalbiniai požymiai, daugiausia iš analizatorių, tačiau tai netinka didelio masto vertinimams. MCI trūkumai sukelia ne gramatinę kalbą, kuri reikalauja rankiniu arba aukšto tikslumo automatinio transkripcijų koregavimo. Šiame dokumente modeliavome transkripcijas į sudėtingus tinklus ir praturtėjome juos žodžių įtraukimu (CNE), kad geriau būtų galima pateikti trumpus tekstus, gautus neuropsichologiniuose vertinimuose. Tinklo matavimai buvo atliekami kartu su gerai žinomais klasifikatoriais, siekiant automatiškai nustatyti MCI transkriptais, atliekant dvigubą klasifikavimo užduotį. Palyginta su tradicinių metodų, taikomų naudojant žodžių maišelį (BoW), ir kalbinių požymių trims duomenų rinkiniams: DementiaBank anglų kalba, Cinderella ir Arizona-Battery portugalų kalba. Apskritai CNE užtikrino didesnį tikslumą nei naudojant tik sudėtingus tinklus, o paramos vektorių mašina buvo didesnė už kitus klasifikatorius. CNE pateikė didžiausią tikslumą DementiaBank ir Cinderella, tačiau BoW buvo veiksmingesnė Arizonos baterijos duomenų rinkinyje, tikriausiai dėl trumpų jos pasakojimų. The approach using linguistic features yielded higher accuracy if the transcriptions of the Cinderella dataset were manually revised.  Iš visų rezultatų matyti, kad sudėtingi tinklai, kuriuose įterpiama daug lėšų, žada nustatyti MCI atliekant didelio masto vertinimus.', 'ml': 'മാല്\u200dഡ് കോണ്\u200dഗ്നിവിറ്റിവ് എംസിഐ (എംസി) കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. ലിന്\u200dഗ്വിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകള്\u200d, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും എംസിഐ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന എംസിഐ ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളുടെ കൈകാര്യം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായി സംസാരിക്കേണ്ട സംസാരം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ടെന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രശ്നമായ വെക്കുകളിലേക്ക് മാതൃകയാക്കി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും ചെയ്തു. ന്യൂരോസിക്കല്\u200d  ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d എംസിഐ സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് അളവുകള്\u200d നല്ല പരിഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരു മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും ബാഗ് ഓഫ് വാര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പാരമ്പര്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു തുല്യമാക്കിയിരുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷി പൊതുവായി, സിനെയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ നെറ്ററുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനേക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായ വിശേഷതയുണ്ടായി CNE provided the highest accuracies for DementiaBank and Cinderella, but BoW was more efficient for the Arizona-Battery dataset probably owing to its short narratives.  ഭാഷ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യം കൈകാര്യം മാറ്റിയെടുക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായി ക ഒരുമിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന, ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്നു, എംസിഐ വിശ്വാസങ്ങളില്\u200d എംസ', 'ms': 'Kecacatan Cognitif ringan (MCI) adalah gangguan mental yang sukar untuk dijanjosi. Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, have been used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large-scale assessments.  Kegagalan MCI menghasilkan ucapan bukan-grammatik yang memerlukan perbaikan automatik manual atau ketepatan tinggi bagi transkrip. Dalam kertas ini, kami memmodelkan transkripsi ke dalam rangkaian kompleks dan memperkaya mereka dengan penerbangan perkataan (CNE) untuk mewakili lebih baik teks pendek yang dihasilkan dalam penilaian neuropsikologi. Keukuran rangkaian telah dilaksanakan dengan pengklasifikasi yang diketahui untuk mengenalpasti MCI secara automatik dalam transkrip, dalam tugas pengklasifikasi binari. Perbandingan dibuat dengan prestasi pendekatan tradisional menggunakan Bag of Words (BoW) dan ciri-ciri bahasa untuk tiga set data: DementiaBank dalam bahasa Inggeris, dan Cinderella dan Arizona-Battery dalam bahasa Portugis. Secara keseluruhan, CNE menyediakan ketepatan yang lebih tinggi daripada menggunakan hanya rangkaian kompleks, sementara Mesin Vektor Sokongan lebih tinggi daripada pengklasifikasi lain. CNE provided the highest accuracies for DementiaBank and Cinderella, but BoW was more efficient for the Arizona-Battery dataset probably owing to its short narratives.  pendekatan menggunakan ciri-ciri bahasa memberikan ketepatan yang lebih tinggi jika transkripsi set data Cinderella diubah secara manual. Bersama-sama, keputusan menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian kompleks yang diperiksa dengan penyembelihan adalah berjanji untuk mengesan MCI dalam penilaian skala besar.', 'mt': 'Indeboliment Konjittiv ħafif (MCI) huwa disturb mentali diffiċli biex jiġi dijanjostikat. Ġew użati karatteristiċi lingwistiċi, l-aktar minn analizzaturi, biex jinstabu MCI, iżda dan mhuwiex xieraq għal valutazzjonijiet fuq skala kbira. MCI disfluencies produce non-grammatical speech that requires manual or high precision automatic correction of transcripts.  In this paper, we modeled transcripts into complex networks and enriched them with word embedding (CNE) to better represent short texts produced in neuropsychological assessments.  Il-kejl tan-netwerk ġie applikat ma’ klassifikaturi magħrufa sew biex jiġu identifikati awtomatikament l-MCI fit-traskrizzjonijiet, f’kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja. Sar paragun mal-prestazzjoni ta’ approċċi tradizzjonali bl-użu ta’ Bag of Words (BoW) u karatteristiċi lingwistiċi għal tliet settijiet ta’ dejta: DementiaBank bl-Ingliż, u Cinderella u Arizona-Battery bil-Portugiż. B’mod ġenerali, is-CNE pprovdiet preċiżjoni ogħla mill-użu ta’ netwerks kumplessi biss, filwaqt li l-Magna tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ kienet superjuri għal klassifikaturi oħra. CNE pprovdiet l-ogħla preċiżjonijiet għal DementiaBank u Cinderella, iżda BoW kienet aktar effiċjenti għas-sett tad-dejta Arizona-Battery probabbilment minħabba n-narrattivi qosra tagħha. L-approċċ bl-użu ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi kellu preċiżjoni ogħla jekk it-traskrizzjonijiet tas-sett tad-dejta taċ-Ċindelli kienu riveduti manwalment. Meta jitqiesu flimkien, ir-riżultati jindikaw li n-netwerks kumplessi arrikkiti bl-inkorporazzjoni huma promettenti biex jinstabu MCI f’valutazzjonijiet fuq skala kbira.', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл ухааны эмгэг (MCI) гэдэг нь сэтгэл санааны эмгэгийг тодорхойлох хэцүү. Гэхдээ энэ нь том хэмжээний шалгалтын тулд хэрэглэгддэггүй. MCI алдагдал нь гар эсвэл өндөр тодорхой тодорхойлолтын автоматик шууд засах шаардлагатай грамматик биш илтгэл гаргадаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нарийн комплекс сүлжээнд шинжлэх хувилбаруудыг загварлаж, мэдрэлийн сэтгэл зүйн судалгаанд гаргасан богино текстүүдийг илүү баялагдсан. Холбооны хэмжээсүүд нь хоёр дахь хэмжээсүүд дээр MCI-г автоматаар тодорхойлдохын тулд сайн мэддэг хэлбэртэй хэрэглэгдсэн. Хоёр дахин өгөгдлийн санг ашигласнаар уламжлалтын арга барилгуудтай харьцуулсан: DementiaBank, Cinderella, Arizona-Battery-г Португийн хэлний хэлний хэлний арга барилгуудтай харьцуулсан. Ерөнхийдөө, CNE зөвхөн комплекс сүлжээг ашиглахаас илүү нарийвчлалтай болгосон. Харин Вектор машин дэмжих нь бусад хэлбэрээс илүү өндөр байсан. CNE нь DementiaBank, Cinderella-ын хамгийн өндөр тохиромжтой байдлыг өгсөн. Гэхдээ BoW Аризона-Батареийн өгөгдлийн санд бага зэрэг түүхийн тулд илүү үр дүнтэй байсан. Хэрэв хэлний чадварыг ашиглах арга нь Циндерэлийн өгөгдлийн сангийн хувилбаруудыг гар дахин шинэчлэх боломжтой болсон юм. Бүгдээрээ нийлүүлсэн үр дүн нь комплекс сүлжээний баялагдсан нь том хэмжээний шалгалттай MCI-г олж мэдэх гэдэгт итгэдэг.', 'no': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) er vanskeleg for å diagnossera psykiske forskjeller. Linguistiske funksjonar, hovudsakelig frå tolkarar, er brukte for å finna MCI, men dette er ikkje passande for store skala vurdering. MCI-forskjellingar produserer ikkje-grammatisk tale som krev manuelt eller høg presisjon automatisk korrigering av transkriptar. I denne papiret modeller vi transkript i komplekse nettverk og røykte dei med ord innebygging (CNE) for å betre representera korte tekstar produsert i neuropsikologiske vurdering. Nettverksverdiane vart brukte med godt kjende klassifikatorar for å automatisk identifisera MCI i transkript i ein binær klassifikasjonskoppgåve. A comparison was made with the performance of traditional approaches using Bag of Words (BoW) and linguistic features for three datasets: DementiaBank in English, and Cinderella and Arizona-Battery in Portuguese. Generelt, CNE oppgav høgare nøyaktighet enn å bruka berre komplekse nettverk, mens støtte vektormaskina var over andre klassifikatorar. CNE oppgav den høgste akkuraten for DementiaBank og Cinderella, men BoW var meir effektivt for datasettet Arizona-Battery sannsynligvis på grunn av korte narrativ. Tilnærminga ved bruk av lingviske funksjonar gjev høgare nøyaktighet dersom transkriptane av Cinderella- datasettet er gjennomsett manuelt. Resultatet er tatt saman, som tyder på at komplekse nettverk som er røyd med innbygging er foreslått for å finna MCI i stor skala vurdering.', 'pl': 'Łagodne zaburzenia poznawcze (MCI) to trudne do zdiagnozowania zaburzenie psychiczne. Funkcje językowe, głównie z parserów, zostały wykorzystane do wykrywania MCI, ale nie nadaje się to do ocen na dużą skalę. Dysfunkcje MCI produkują mowę niegramatyczną, która wymaga ręcznej lub precyzyjnej automatycznej korekcji transkrypcji. W artykule zamodelowaliśmy transkrypcje w złożone sieci i wzbogaciliśmy je o osadzenie słów (CNE), aby lepiej reprezentować krótkie teksty powstałe w ocenach neuropsychologicznych. Pomiary sieciowe zostały zastosowane za pomocą dobrze znanych klasyfikatorów w celu automatycznej identyfikacji MCI w transkryptach, w zadaniu klasyfikacji binarnej. Przeprowadzono porównanie z wydajnością tradycyjnych metod wykorzystujących Bag of Words (BoW) i cech językowych dla trzech zbiorów danych: DementiaBank w języku angielskim oraz Kopciuszek i Arizona-Battery w języku portugalskim. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, CNE zapewniło większą dokładność niż używanie tylko złożonych sieci, podczas gdy Support Vector Machine było lepsze od innych klasyfikatorów. CNE zapewniło najwyższe dokładności dla DementiaBanku i Kopciuszka, ale BoW był bardziej efektywny dla zbioru danych Arizona-Battery prawdopodobnie dzięki jego krótkim narracjom. Podejście wykorzystujące cechy językowe dało większą dokładność, jeśli transkrypcje zbioru danych Kopciuszka zostały ręcznie poprawione. Podsumowując wyniki wskazują, że złożone sieci wzbogacone o osadzenie są obiecujące do wykrywania MCI w ocenach dużej skali.', 'ro': 'Insuficiența cognitivă ușoară (MCI) este o tulburare mentală dificil de diagnosticat. Caracteristicile lingvistice, în principal de la parsers, au fost utilizate pentru a detecta MCI, dar acest lucru nu este potrivit pentru evaluări la scară largă. Disfluențele MCI produc vorbire non-gramaticală care necesită corecția automată manuală sau de înaltă precizie a transcrierilor. În această lucrare, am modelat transcrierile în rețele complexe și le-am îmbogățit cu word embedding (CNE) pentru a reprezenta mai bine textele scurte produse în evaluările neuropsihologice. Măsurătorile rețelei au fost aplicate cu clasificatori bine cunoscuți pentru a identifica automat MCI în transcrieri, într-o sarcină de clasificare binară. S-a făcut o comparație cu performanța abordărilor tradiționale folosind Bag of Words (BoW) și caracteristicile lingvistice pentru trei seturi de date: DementiaBank în limba engleză și Cenușăreasa și Arizona-Battery în portugheză. În general, CNE a oferit o precizie mai mare decât utilizarea numai a rețelelor complexe, în timp ce Suport Vector Machine a fost superioară altor clasificatori. CNE a oferit cele mai mari precizii pentru DementiaBank și Cenușăreasa, dar BoW a fost mai eficient pentru setul de date Arizona-Battery probabil datorită povestirilor sale scurte. Abordarea folosind caracteristici lingvistice a dat o precizie mai mare dacă transcrierile setului de date Cenușăreasa au fost revizuite manual. Împreună, rezultatele indică faptul că rețelele complexe îmbogățite cu încorporarea sunt promițătoare pentru detectarea ICM în evaluări la scară largă.', 'sr': 'Milo kognitivno oštećenje (MCI) je mentalni poremećaj teško dijagnosticirati. Lingističke karakteristike, uglavnom od parsera, su korištene za otkrivanje MCI, ali ovo nije odgovarajuće za velike procjene. Nedostatak MCI proizvodi ne-gramatični govor koji zahteva ručnu ili visoku preciznu automatsku korekciju transkripta. U ovom papiru smo modelili transkripte u kompleksne mreže i obogatili ih riječima uključenim (CNE) kako bi bolje predstavili kratke tekste proizvođene u neuropsihološkim procenama. Mjere mreže su primjenjene sa poznatim klasifikatorima da bi automatski identifikovali MCI u transkriptima, u binarnom klasifikacijskom zadatku. Upoređeno je sa izvođenjem tradicionalnih pristupa koristeći vrećicu riječi (BoW) i jezičke karakteristike za tri dataseta: DementiaBank na engleskom jeziku, Pepeljuga i Arizona-baterija na portugalskom jeziku. Generalno, CNE je pružila veću tačnost nego koristiti samo kompleksne mreže, dok je podrška vektorskoj mašini bila superior od drugih klasifikatora. CNE je pružio najvišu tačnost za DementiaBank i Pepeljugu, ali BoW je bio efikasniji za setu podataka Arizona-Baterije vjerojatno zbog kratkih prièa. Pristup korištenjem jezičkih karakteristika izazvao je veću tačnost ako su prepisa podataka o pepeljugu manuelno pregledani. Zajedno, rezultati ukazuju na to da je kompleksna mreža obogaćena sa uključenjem obećavajuće za otkrivanje MCI u velikim procenama.', 'so': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) waa dhibaato dhimir oo ku adag in la ogaado. Xiriikhda luqada ee qoraalka ah, sida ugu badan baarlamayaasha waxaa loo isticmaalay in lagu ogaado MCI, laakiin taas uma habboona qiimeynta aad u badan. Shaqoyinka MCI waxay soo saaraan hadal aan grammatical aheyn oo u baahan karta hagitaanka qoraalka ama saxda koronta. Warqaddan ayaan qoraalka u qornay shabakado adag, waxaana ku hodanaynay hadal ku qoran (CNE) si aan uga dhigno qoraal gaaban oo loo soo qoray qiimeynta neuropsykologiga. Shabakada shabakadda waxaa lagu codsaday fasaxyo aad u yaqaan si ay u aqoonsadaan maamulka MCI oo ku qoran qoraalka qoraalka, oo lagu qoray shaqo fasax labaad ah. Waxaa la sameyn jiray dabiicadda qaababka caadiga ah ee isticmaalaya Bag of Words (BoW) iyo luuqadaha luuqadaha ee saddex databases: DementiaBank afka Ingiriis, Cinderella iyo Arizona-Battery afka Burtuqiis. Overall, CNE provided higher accuracy than using only complex networks, while Support Vector Machine was superior to other classifiers.  CNE wuxuu si saxda ugu sarreeyey DeentiaBank iyo Cinderella, laakiin BoW wuxuu ka faa’iido badan yahay garsoorida Arizona-Battery sababtoo ah taariikhdiisa gaaban. Isticmaalka isticmaalka aqoonta luqada waxaa soo saaray saxda sare, haddii qoraalka macluumaadka qaramaanka lagu soo beddelo. Inta la soo wada ururiyo waxaa laga muujiyaa in shabakado adag oo lagu hodanayo oo lagu hodanayo hodantinimada waxaa loo ballanqaadaa in aad qiimeynta MCI ku hesho.', 'kk': 'Қысқа коgnitive Impairment (MCI) деген диагностикалық психикалық белсендігі. Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, are used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large scale assessments. MCI бұзулары грамматикалық емес сөздерді жасайды, оның қолмен немесе жоғары дұрыс түзетуі автоматты түрде қажет. Бұл қағазда, біз комплекс желіне транскрипттерді моделдеп, оны нейропсихологиялық оқиғаларда жасалған қысқа мәтіндерді жақсы көрсету үшін сөздерді (CNE) ендіру үшін қысқа мә Желі өлшемдері білетін классификаторлармен автоматты түрде транскриптерде MCI анықтау үшін, бинарлық классификациялау тапсырмасында қолданылды. Үш деректер қорларының Баг (BoW) мен лингвистикалық қасиеттерін қолдану үшін әдімгі арқылы әдеттегі арқылы салыстырылған: DementiaBank ағылшын тілінде, Cinderella және Arizona-Battery португалық тілінде. Жалпы, CNE тек комплекс желілерді қолдану арқылы, вектор машинасын қолдау арқылы басқа классификацияларға артық болғанда артық дұрыс берді. CNE DementiaBank және Cinderella үшін ең жоғары дұрыстығын келтірді, бірақ BoW Аризона- Батарея деректер қорларының қысқа түсініктерінің себебі болуы мүмкін. Лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді қолдану арқылы, егер Шызық деректер жиының транскриптері қолмен қайталанған болса, оның дұрыстығы жоғары болады. Бірлескен, нәтижелер көптеген комплекс желілерді ендіру үлкен масштабында MCI анықтау үшін үлкен желілерді көрсетеді.', 'si': 'මල්ඩ් කොන්ජින්ටිව් අවධානයක් (MCI) මානසික අවධානයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න අමාරුයි. ලින්ගුයිස්ටික් විශේෂතාවක්, විශේෂකයෙන්, MCI ව හොයාගන්න පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒත් මේක ලොකු විශේෂ MCI අවශ්\u200dයය නොග්\u200dරාම්තික කියන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නැහැ කිරීමට ස්වයංක්\u200d මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණ ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා එයාලට වචන සම්පූර්ණය (CNE) වචන සඳහා විශේෂය ක ජාලය විශාලය ස්වයංක්\u200dරිප්ටයෙන් MCI විශාලයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත විශාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන A comparison is done with the Perfection of Western approach with the Bag of Words (BoW) and Linguist Feathers for three data sets: DemoentoaBank in English, and Cinderella and Arizone-Butter in Portugees. සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, CNE විශ්වාසික ජාලය භාවිතා කරන්න වඩා වඩා විශ්වාසිකතාවක් දුන්න, වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් සහ CNE දෙන්නා ඩෙමෙන්ටියාබැන්ක් සහ සින්ඩෙරෙලා වෙනුවෙන් හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, නමුත් BoW තමයි ඇරිසෝනා-බැට්\u200dරි බැට්\u200dරි ඩේ භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරන විදිහට වඩා වැඩි සින්ඩරෙලා තොරතුරු සැකසුම්ගේ පරික්ෂණාවක් පරික්ෂණය එකට ගත්තා, ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ සංපුර්ණ ජාලය සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ MCI විශාල විශා', 'sv': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) är en psykisk störning svår att diagnostisera. Språkliga egenskaper, främst från tolkare, har använts för att upptäcka MCI, men detta är inte lämpligt för storskaliga bedömningar. MCI disfluenser producerar icke-grammatiskt tal som kräver manuell eller hög precision automatisk korrigering av transkript. I denna uppsats modellerade vi transkript till komplexa nätverk och berikade dem med word embedding (CNE) för att bättre representera korta texter producerade i neuropsykologiska bedömningar. Nätverksmätningarna genomfördes med välkända klassificerare för att automatiskt identifiera MCI i transkript, i en binär klassificeringsuppgift. En jämförelse gjordes med resultaten av traditionella tillvägagångssätt med hjälp av Bag of Words (BoW) och språkliga funktioner för tre datauppsättningar: DementiaBank på engelska och Askungen och Arizona-Battery på portugisiska. Sammantaget gav CNE högre noggrannhet än att enbart använda komplexa nätverk, medan Support Vector Machine var överlägsen andra klassificerare. CNE gav högsta noggrannhet för DementiaBank och Askungen, men BoW var effektivare för Arizona-Battery datauppsättningen troligen på grund av dess korta berättelser. Metoden med språkliga egenskaper gav högre noggrannhet om transkriptionerna av Askungens dataset reviderades manuellt. Sammantaget indikerar resultaten att komplexa nätverk berikade med inbäddning lovar att upptäcka MCI i storskaliga bedömningar.', 'ta': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is a mental disorder difficult to diagnose.  முக்கியமாக MCI கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் இது பெரிய அளவு மதிப்புகளுக்கு பொருத்தமானது. MCI தெளிவுகள் கைமுறை அல்லது உயர் தெளிவான தானியங்கி எழுத்துருத்து திருத்தம் தேவைப்படும் பேச்சை உருவாக்குகிறது. இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் சிக்கலான வலைப்பின்னல்களை மாற்றியமைத்தோம் மற்றும் சொல்லில் உள்ளடக்கம் (CNE) சிறிய உருக்களை பிரதிநிதித்து நரம Name Name மொத்தமாக, CNE சிக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்துவதை விட அதிக சரிபார்வையை வழங்கினார், மற்ற வகுப்பாடுகளை ஆதரிக்கும் போ CNE டெமென்டென்டியாபாங்க் மற்றும் சிகர்லாவுக்கு அதிக சரிபார்த்துள்ளது, ஆனால் போவி அரிசோனா- பேட்டரி தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு மிக சிறிய வர மொழி குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் அணுகல் சிட்டர்லா தகவல் அமைப்பின் எழுத்துக்களை கைமுறைமாற்றியிருந்தால் அதிக சரிபார்த ஒன்றாக எடுக்கப்பட்டது, முடிவுகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது உள்ளமைப்புடன் சிக்கலான வலைப்பின்னல்கள் செலுத்தப்பட்டது பெரிய அளவு மதிப்பில', 'ur': 'مضبوط معلومات (MCI) ایک روانی اختلاف ہے جسے تشخیص کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے. Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, are used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large-scale assessments. MCI تغییرات غیر گراماتیکی بات پیدا کرتی ہیں جن کی مہمانی یا بلند دقیق ترنسکرپٹوں کی استعمال کرتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ترنسکرپٹوں کو پیچیدہ نیٹ ورک میں ڈال دیا اور ان کو کلمات میں جمع کرنا (CNE) کے ذریعہ ثروت بخشی کہ نیروروروسی ارزیابی میں پیدا ہوئے چھوٹے پیغام کو اچھی طرح دکھائیں۔ نیٹ ورک اندازے بہتر جانے والی کلاسپیر کے ساتھ استعمال کیے گئے ہیں کہ ترنسکرپٹوں میں MCI کو اپنا پہچان کریں، ایک دوئی کلاسپیٹ کے کام میں۔ تین ڈاٹ سٹ کے بغ (بوW) اور زبان شناسی ویروں کے استعمال کے مطابق ایک مقایسہ کی گئی تھی: انگلیسی میں DementiaBank اور سیندرلا اور آریزونا-باتری پورچوٹیز میں پورچوٹیز میں۔ کل، CNE نے صرف پیچیدہ نیٹ ورک استعمال سے زیادہ بالا دقیق پیدا کیا تھا، حالانکہ ویکتور ماشین کی مدد دوسرے کلاسیفوں سے زیادہ بہتر تھا. CNE نے DementiaBank اور Cinderella کے لئے سب سے زیادہ بالاترین دقیقات پیدا کی، لیکن BoW آریزونا-بٹری ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے زیادہ مفید تھا شاید اس کی کوتاہ داستان کے باعث۔ اگر سینڈرلی ڈاٹ سٹ کے ترنسکریپٹوں کو ہاتھ سے دوباره بدل دیا گیا تو زبان شناسی ویژے کے استعمال سے زیادہ دقیق ہوا۔ ایک ساتھ جمع کئے گئے، نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ پیچیدہ نیٹ ورک مکمل ہونے کے ذریعہ ثروت رکھے گئے ہیں ان کے لئے MCI کو بہت بڑی مقدار ارزیابی میں آگاہ کرنے کا وعدہ ہے.', 'uz': "Boy kognitiv muvaffaqiyatli (MCI) diagnostish qiyin edi. Lingvistika moslamalari, balki parserdagi MCI'ni aniqlash uchun ishlatiladi, ammo bu katta qiymatlar uchun yetarli emas. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz murakkab tarmoqlarga skriptlarni modellashdik va ularni qisqarli so'zlar (CNE) bilan ishlab chiqarish uchun bir necha matnlarni neuropsykologik qiymatlarida yaratgan qisqa matnlarni ko'rsatish uchun. The network measurements were applied with well-known classifiers to automatically identify MCI in transcripts, in a binary classification task.  Name Umumiy CNE faqat murakkab tarmoqni ishlatishdan foydalanishidan foydalanishi mumkin, va Vector Mashini boshqa klassiflarga ko'proq edi. Name Tilning xossalaridan foydalanish imkoniyatini qoʻllanmalar maʼlumotlar saqlash qoʻlbola qoʻllanmagan boʻlsa, eng yaxshi aniqligiga ega beradi. Birlashtirilgan natijalar esa katta qiymatda MCI qiymatlarini aniqlash uchun murakkab tarmoq tarmoqlarini anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Công tác tác tác tác nhận thức nhẹ (MCI) là một rối loạn thần kinh khó chẩn đoán. Các tính năng ngôn ngữ, chủ yếu là của cha phân, đã được dùng để phát hiện MCI, nhưng nó không phù hợp cho các đánh giá lớn. Các biến số MCI sản xuất ngôn ngữ không biểu ngữ cần chỉnh sửa bằng tay hay chính xác cao độ các ghi chép. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi đã mô hình hóa các văn bản thành các mạng lưới phức tạp và làm chúng thêm bằng cách ghép từ (CNE) để đại diện tốt hơn các văn bản ngắn được sản xuất trong các đánh giá thần kinh. Các kích thước mạng được áp dụng với những phân loại nổi tiếng để tự động xác định MCI trong các bản sao, trong một nhiệm vụ phân hạng nhị phân. Một cuộc so sánh với kết quả của các phương pháp truyền thống sử dụng Túi Ngôn ngữ (BoW) và các tính năng ngôn ngữ cho ba bộ dữ liệu: DementiachBank in English, và Cinderella and Arizona-Battery in Portuguery. Trên to àn bộ, CNE cung cấp độ chính xác cao hơn sử dụng chỉ các mạng phức tạp, trong khi cỗ máy Véc-tơ hỗ trợ cấp cao hơn các phân loại khác. CNE cung cấp kết quả cao nhất cho DementiaBank và Cinderella, nhưng BofW còn làm việc hiệu quả hơn cho bộ dữ liệu Arizona-Battery mà có lẽ nhờ những lời kể ngắn. Cách tiếp cận sử dụng các tính năng ngôn ngữ có độ chính xác cao hơn nếu các ghi chép của bộ dữ liệu Lọ Lem bị chỉnh sửa tự. Kết quả tổng hợp cho thấy các mạng nối phức tạp được thêm vào có hứa hẹn phát hiện MCI trong các đánh giá quy mô lớn.', 'da': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) er en mental lidelse svær at diagnosticere. Sprogiske træk, hovedsageligt fra fortolkere, er blevet brugt til at detektere MCI, men dette er ikke egnet til store vurderinger. MCI diskfluenser producerer ikke-grammatisk tale, der kræver manuel eller høj præcision automatisk korrektion af udskrifter. I denne artikel modellerede vi transskriptioner i komplekse netværk og berigede dem med word embedding (CNE) for bedre at repræsentere korte tekster produceret i neuropsykologiske vurderinger. Netværksmålingerne blev anvendt med velkendte klassificerere til automatisk at identificere MCI i udskrifter, i en binær klassificering opgave. En sammenligning blev foretaget med resultaterne af traditionelle tilgange ved hjælp af Bag of Words (BoW) og sproglige funktioner for tre datasæt: DementiaBank på engelsk og Askepot og Arizona-Battery på portugisisk. Samlet set leverede CNE højere nøjagtighed end kun at bruge komplekse netværk, mens Support Vector Machine var bedre end andre klassificerere. CNE leverede de højeste nøjagtigheder for DementiaBank og Askepot, men BoW var mere effektiv for Arizona-Battery datasættet sandsynligvis på grund af dens korte fortællinger. Fremgangsmåden med sproglige funktioner gav større nøjagtighed, hvis transskriptionerne af Askepot datasættet blev revideret manuelt. Samlet tyder resultaterne på, at komplekse netværk beriget med integrering lover at detektere MCI i store vurderinger.', 'bg': 'Лекото когнитивно увреждане е психично разстройство, трудно диагностицирано. Лингвистични характеристики, предимно от анализатори, са използвани за откриване на MCI, но това не е подходящо за мащабни оценки. Дифлуансите на MCI произвеждат неграматична реч, която изисква ръчна или прецизна автоматична корекция на транскрипциите. В тази статия моделирахме транскрипциите в сложни мрежи и ги обогатихме с вграждане на думи (ЦНС), за да представим по-добре кратките текстове, произведени в невропсихологичните оценки. Мрежовите измервания бяха приложени с добре познати класификатори за автоматично идентифициране на МКЗ в транскрипти, в задача за двоична класификация. Направено е сравнение с представянето на традиционни подходи, използващи торба с думи и лингвистични характеристики за три набора данни: ДемениаБанк на английски и Пепеляшка и Аризона-Батерия на португалски. Като цяло CNE осигурява по-висока точност, отколкото използването само на сложни мрежи, докато Support Vector Machine е по-добра от другите класификатори. CNE осигурява най-висока точност за DementieBank и Пепеляшка, но BoW е по-ефективен за набора от данни Аризона-Батерия вероятно поради кратките си разкази. Подходът, използващ лингвистични характеристики, дава по-голяма точност, ако транскрипциите на набора от данни Пепеляшка бъдат преразгледани ръчно. Взети заедно, резултатите показват, че сложните мрежи, обогатени с вграждане, са обещаващи за откриване на МКЗ при мащабни оценки.', 'nl': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is een psychische stoornis die moeilijk te diagnosticeren is. Taalkundige kenmerken, voornamelijk van parsers, zijn gebruikt om MCI te detecteren, maar dit is niet geschikt voor grootschalige beoordelingen. MCI disfluences produceren niet-grammaticale spraak die handmatige of hoge precisie automatische correctie van transcripten vereist. In dit artikel hebben we transcripten gemodelleerd in complexe netwerken en verrijkt met woord embedding (CNE) om korte teksten die geproduceerd worden in neuropsychologische beoordelingen beter weer te geven. De netwerkmetingen werden toegepast met bekende classificatoren om MCI automatisch te identificeren in transcripten, in een binaire classificatietaak. Er werd een vergelijking gemaakt met de prestaties van traditionele benaderingen met Bag of Words (BoW) en taalkundige kenmerken voor drie datasets: DementiaBank in het Engels en Assepoester en Arizona-Battery in het Portugees. Over het algemeen bood CNE een hogere nauwkeurigheid dan alleen complexe netwerken, terwijl Support Vector Machine superieur was aan andere classificatoren. CNE leverde de hoogste nauwkeurigheiden voor DementiaBank en Assepoester, maar BoW was efficiënter voor de Arizona-Battery dataset waarschijnlijk vanwege de korte verhalen. De aanpak met linguïstische kenmerken leverde een hogere nauwkeurigheid op als de transcripties van de Assepoester dataset handmatig werden herzien. Samengevat geven de resultaten aan dat complexe netwerken verrijkt met embedding veelbelovend zijn voor het detecteren van MCI in grootschalige assessments.', 'de': 'Eine leichte kognitive Beeinträchtigung (MCI) ist eine psychische Störung, die schwer zu diagnostizieren ist. Sprachliche Merkmale, hauptsächlich von Parsern, wurden verwendet, um MCI zu erkennen, aber dies ist nicht geeignet für groß angelegte Assessments. MCI-Störungen erzeugen nicht-grammatische Sprache, die manuelle oder hochpräzise automatische Korrektur von Transkripten erfordert. In diesem Beitrag haben wir Transkripte in komplexe Netzwerke modelliert und mit Word Embedding (CNE) angereichert, um kurze Texte aus neuropsychologischen Assessments besser darzustellen. Die Netzwerkmessungen wurden mit bekannten Klassifikatoren angewendet, um MCI in Transkripten automatisch in einer binären Klassifikationsaufgabe zu identifizieren. Ein Vergleich wurde mit der Leistung traditioneller Ansätze unter Verwendung von Bag of Words (BoW) und linguistischen Merkmalen für drei Datensätze vorgenommen: DementiaBank auf Englisch und Cinderella und Arizona-Battery auf Portugiesisch. Insgesamt bot CNE eine höhere Genauigkeit als nur komplexe Netzwerke, während Support Vector Machine anderen Klassifikatoren überlegen war. CNE lieferte die höchsten Genauigkeiten für DementiaBank und Cinderella, aber BoW war für den Arizona-Battery Datensatz wahrscheinlich aufgrund seiner kurzen Erzählungen effizienter. Der Ansatz mit linguistischen Merkmalen ergab eine höhere Genauigkeit, wenn die Transkriptionen des Cinderella-Datensatzes manuell überarbeitet wurden. Zusammenfassend zeigen die Ergebnisse, dass komplexe Netzwerke, die mit Einbettung angereichert sind, vielversprechend für den Nachweis von MCI in großen Assessments sind.', 'hr': 'Mlijeko kognitivno oštećenje (MCI) je teško dijagnosticirati mentalni poremećaj. Lingističke funkcije, uglavnom od parsera, koriste su za otkrivanje MCI, ali to nije odgovarajuće za velike procjene. MCI nestajenja proizvode neogramatični govor koji zahtijeva ručnu ili visoku preciznu automatsku korekciju transkripta. U ovom papiru smo modelili transkript u kompleksne mreže i obogatili ih riječima ugrađenim (CNE) kako bi bolje predstavili kratke tekste proizvođene u neuropsihološkim procjenama. Mjere mreže su primjenjene s poznatim klasifikatorima da bi automatski identificirali MCI u transkriptima u dvojnom zadatku klasifikacije. Uspoređeno je s učinkom tradicionalnih pristupa korištenjem Bag of Words (BoW) i jezičkih karakteristika za tri dataseta: DementiaBank na engleskom jeziku, Pepeljuga i Arizona-Battery na portugalskom jeziku. Ukupno, CNE je pružio veću preciznost nego koristiti samo kompleksne mreže, dok je podrška vektorskoj stroji bila nadmašica drugim klasifikatorima. CNE je pružio najvišu preciznost za DementiaBank i Pepeljugu, ali BoW je bio učinkovitiji za komplet podataka Arizona-baterije vjerojatno zbog kratkih priča. Pristup korištenjem jezičkih karakteristika izazvao je veću preciznost ako su prijenos podataka o pepeljugu manuelno pregledani. Zajedno, rezultati ukazuju na to da je kompleksna mreža obogaćena sa uključenjem obećava za otkrivanje MCI u velikoj procjeni.', 'id': 'Kecacatan Cognitif ringan (MCI) adalah gangguan mental yang sulit didiagnosis. Karakteristik bahasa, terutama dari parser, telah digunakan untuk mendeteksi MCI, tetapi ini tidak cocok untuk penilaian skala besar. Kegagalan MCI menghasilkan pidato non-grammatik yang membutuhkan koreksi otomatis manual atau presisi tinggi transkrip. Dalam kertas ini, kami memmodelir transkripsi ke jaringan kompleks dan memperkaya mereka dengan penerbangan kata (CNE) untuk mewakili lebih baik teks pendek yang diproduksi dalam penilaian neuropsikologi. Ukuran jaringan diterapkan dengan klasifikasi yang dikenal untuk mengidentifikasi MCI secara otomatis dalam transkrip, dalam tugas klasifikasi binari. Perbandingan dibuat dengan pertunjukan pendekatan tradisional menggunakan Bag of Words (BoW) dan fitur bahasa untuk tiga set data: DementiaBank dalam bahasa Inggris, Cinderella dan Arizona-Battery dalam bahasa Portugis. Secara umum, CNE menyediakan akurasi yang lebih tinggi daripada menggunakan hanya jaringan kompleks, sementara Support Vector Machine lebih tinggi dari klasifikasi lain. CNE menyediakan akurasi tertinggi untuk DementiaBank dan Cinderella, tapi BoW lebih efisien untuk dataset Arizona-Battery mungkin karena cerita pendek. pendekatan menggunakan fitur bahasa memberikan akurasi yang lebih tinggi jika transkripsi dari set data Cinderella secara manual diubah. Bersama-sama, hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa jaringan kompleks yang diperiksa dengan embedding berjanji untuk mendeteksi MCI dalam penilaian skala besar.', 'fa': 'تفاوت آگاهی (MCI) یک بیماری روانی برای تشخیص مشکل است. ویژگی\u200cهای لینگ\u200cویستیک، در اصل از پارسال\u200cها، برای شناسایی MCI استفاده شده\u200cاند، ولی این برای ارزیابی مقیاس بزرگ مناسب نیست. ناتوانی MCI سخنرانی غیر گراماتیکی را تولید می\u200cکند که نیاز به اصلاح دستی یا دقیق بالا از ترجمه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما ترجمه\u200cها را به شبکه\u200cهای پیچیده ساختیم و آنها را با کلمه\u200cهای پیچیده (CNE) ثروتمند کردیم تا بهتر نشان دهیم متن\u200cهای کوتاه تولید شده در ارزیابهای عصبی روانشناسی. اندازه\u200cهای شبکه با گروهی شناخته شده\u200cاند برای خودکار شناسایی MCI در ترجمه\u200cها، در یک کار گروهی دوگانه کاربرد شد. یک مقایسه با اجرای دستورات سنتی با استفاده از Bag of Words (BoW) و ویژگی زبان\u200cشناسی برای سه دستورات داده: DementiaBank در انگلیسی، سیندرلا و آریزونا-باتری در پورتوژیک ساخته شد. در کل، CNE دقیق بیشتری از استفاده از فقط شبکه پیچیده داد، در حالی که دستگاه پشتیبانی ویکتور بیشتر از بقیه گروهی بود. CNE بهترین دقیقات برای DementiaBank و سیندرلا را پیشنهاد داد، ولی BoW برای مجموعه داده های آریزونا-باتری احتمالا به خاطر داستانهای کوتاه\u200cاش موثرتر بود. روش استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی دقیق بالاتر می\u200cشود اگر ترجمه\u200cهای مجموعه داده\u200cهای سیندرلا به دستی تغییر داده شود. این نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که شبکه\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cای که با استخراج دارند برای کشف MCI در ارزیابی\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ قول می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '경도인지장애(MCI)는 진단하기 어려운 정신장애다.주로 해석기에서 나온 언어 특징은 MCI를 측정하는 데 사용되었지만 대규모 평가에는 적합하지 않다.MCI가 유창하지 않으면 문법에 맞지 않는 음성이 발생할 수 있으므로 수동 또는 고정밀 자동 정정 복사본이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 성적표를 복잡한 네트워크로 모델링하고 단어삽입(CNE)을 통해 이를 풍부하게 함으로써 신경심리학 평가에서 발생한 짧은 텍스트를 더욱 잘 나타낼 것이다.이원 분류 임무에서 네트워크 측정은 유명 분류기와 함께 응용하여 복사본의 MCI를 자동으로 식별한다.세 개의 데이터 집합이 단어봉투(BoW)와 언어 특징을 사용하는 전통적인 방법의 성능을 비교했다. 영어는 디멘터리 뱅크, 포르투갈어는 신데렐라와 애리조나 배터리였다.전체적으로 CNE는 복잡한 네트워크만 사용하는 것보다 정확도를 높였고, 벡터기는 다른 분류기보다 우수했다.CNE는 Dementia Bank와 신데렐라에 가장 높은 정확도를 제공했지만, BoW가 아리조나의 배터리 데이터 집합에 대한 효율이 높은 것은 서술이 짧기 때문일 것이다.신데렐라 데이터 집합의 복사본을 인공적으로 수정하면 언어 특징을 사용하는 방법이 더욱 정확해진다.종합하면 풍부한 복잡한 네트워크를 끼워 넣으면 대규모 평가에서 MCI를 측정할 수 있다는 연구결과가 나왔다.', 'sw': 'MCI ni ugonjwa wa kisaikolojia unaotambua vigumu. Tamko za lugha, hasa kutoka mabango, zimetumika kutambua chama cha MCI, lakini hii si sahihi kwa tathmini kubwa. Uchambuzi wa MCI unatengeneza hotuba isiyo na grammati inayohitaji kuboreshwa kwa manufaa au sahihi moja kwa moja. Katika gazeti hili, tuliunda maandiko katika mitandao magumu na kuwatajirisha kwa maneno yanayoandikwa (CNE) ili kuwakilisha ujumbe mfupi mfupi uliotengenezwa katika tafiti za kisaikolojia. Upasuaji wa mtandao ulitumiwa na wataalamu wanaojulikana vizuri ili kujitambua MCI kwa kujitegemea katika maandishi, katika kazi ya kutafsiri mbili. A comparison was made with the performance of traditional approaches using Bag of Words (BoW) and linguistic features for three datasets: DementiaBank in English, and Cinderella and Arizona-Battery in Portuguese.  Kwa ujumla, CNE ilitoa ufanisi mkubwa zaidi kuliko kutumia mitandao ya tatizo tu, wakati mashine ya kuunga mkono Vector ilikuwa bora kuliko wataalamu wengine. CNE ilitoa ukweli wa juu kwa Benki ya DementiaBank na Cinderella, lakini BoW alikuwa na ufanisi zaidi kwa ajili ya seti ya data za Arizona-Batteria pengine kutokana na simulizi zake fupi. Hatua hii ya kutumia vipengele vya lugha ilileta uhakika mkubwa kama uandikaji wa taarifa za Washindi ulibadilishwa kwa mikononi. Matokeo yaliyochukuliwa pamoja, yanaonyesha kuwa mitandao magumu yenye utajiri wa kuingia ni ahadi ya kutambua chama cha MCI kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'af': "Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is 'n mental disorder moeilik om te diagnoseer. Linguistiese funksies, hoofsaaklik van verwerkers, is gebruik om MCI te ontdek, maar hierdie is nie geskik vir groot-skaal evaluering nie. MCI afsluitings produseer nie- grammatiese spreek wat hand of hoë presisie outomatiese korreksie van transkripte benodig. In hierdie papier, ons het transkripte in komplekse netwerke modelleer en hulle met woord inbêring (CNE) verryk om kort teks te verteenwoordig wat in neuropsihologiese vurderings produseer word. Name 'n Vergelyking is gemaak met die prestasie van tradisionele toepassings met gebruik van Bag of Words (BoW) en lingwisiese funksies vir drie datastelle: DementiaBank in Engels en Cinderella en Arizona-Battery in Portugese. Algemeen, CNE het hoër presisie verskaf as net komplekse netwerke te gebruik, terwyl ondersteun vektor masjien was superior na ander klassifiseerders. CNE het die hoogste presies vir DementiaBank en Cinderella verskaf, maar BoW was meer effektief vir die Arizona-Battery datastel waarskynlik omdat sy kort narraties gegee het. Die toegang met die gebruik van lingwisiese funksies het hoër presisie gegee as die transkripsies van die Cinderella datastel hand hersien is. Gevang saam, die resultate wys dat komplekse netwerke wat met inbêding verryk is, is belofte om MCI in groot skaal-evaluerings te ontdek.", 'sq': 'Dështimi i lehtë i njohjes (MCI) është një sëmundje mentale e vështirë për të diagnostikuar. Karakteristikat gjuhësore, kryesisht nga analizuesit, janë përdorur për të zbuluar MCI, por kjo nuk është e përshtatshme për vlerësime në shkallë të madhe. Mungesat e MCI prodhojnë fjalim jo-grammatik që kërkon korrigjim automatik manual apo të saktësisë së lartë të transkripteve. In this paper, we modeled transcripts into complex networks and enriched them with word embedding (CNE) to better represent short texts produced in neuropsychological assessments.  The network measurements were applied with well-known classifiers to automatically identify MCI in transcripts, in a binary classification task.  Një krahasim u bë me shfaqjen e metodave tradicionale duke përdorur Bag of Words (BoW) dhe karakteristikat gjuhësore për tre grupe të dhënash: DementiaBank në anglisht dhe Cinderella dhe Arizona-Battery në portugal. Në përgjithësi, CNE ofroi saktësi më të lartë sesa përdorimi i vetëm rrjeteve komplekse, ndërsa Meksina e Vektorit e Mbështetjes ishte më e lartë se klasifikuesit e tjerë. CNE ofroi saktësitë më të larta për DementiaBank dhe Cinderella, por BoW ishte më efikas për të dhënat Arizona-Bateria ndoshta për shkak të tregimeve të saj të shkurtra. Përqasja duke përdorur karakteristikat gjuhësore jepte saktësi më të lartë në qoftë se transkriptimet e të dhënave të Cinderella janë revizuar manualisht. Të marrë së bashku, rezultatet tregojnë se rrjetet komplekse të pasuruar me përfshirje janë premtuese për zbulimin e MCI në vlerësime të shkallës së madhe.', 'tr': "Aýratyn Bilişik Mazmunlyk (MCI) duýwany tanyşmak kynçylykdyr. Çaltylyk hatlary, iň bellenen tansçylardan, MCI aňlamak üçin ullanýar, ýöne bu ýerde Ullakan ölçümler üçin uygun däl. MCI arkalanyşyklar elimden we ýokary dogry hatlary otomatik düzeltmek gereken gramatik sözleri üretýär. Bu kagyzda, karmaşık şebekelere terjime etdik we olaryny närologik değerlendirmelerde üretilen kiçi metinleri gowy görkezmek üçin baglaşdyrdyk. unit-format Däpli sözler Bag of Words (BoW) we üç sany gurşamlar üçin adaty golaýlaryň eserleşmesi bilen guruldy: DementiaBank iňlisçe, Cinderella we Arizona-Battery portugalça. Hemme üçin, CNE diňe karmaşık şebekeleri ulanmakdan has ýokaryny temin etdi, we vektör maşyny başga klassiflere has üstündir. CNE DementiaBank we Cinderella üçin iň ýokary derejesini berdi ýöne, ýöne BoW Arizona-Battery veri setiriniň biraz gürrüňleriň sebäpli üýtgedi. lingwistiki karakterlerden ullanyşyň ýaryşy, eger Cinderella veri düzümleriniň ellen üýtgedilen ýaryşynyň has dogrylygyny ýok edip biler. Birlikde çykylýan netijeler, düzümlenme bilen baglanýan karmaşık şebekeleriň uly ölçekde MCI'i tapmak üçin söz berýär.", 'az': "Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) diagnosticə çəkmək zordur. Linguistik xüsusiyyətlər, əksəriyyətli analizacılardan, MCI keşfetmək üçün istifadə edilmişdir, amma bu böyük ölçüdə ölçülərə uyğun deyil. MCI xəstəliyi, əlavə və yüksək dəqiqliyyat tərzlərinin avtomatik düzəltməsi lazımdır. Bu kağızda, kompleks ağlara transkriptləri modelləyib, nöropiklojik ölçülərdə ürəklənmiş qısa mətnləri daha yaxşı göstərmək üçün (CNE) sözlərlə zenginləşdirdik. Ağ ölçüləri bilən klassifikatçılar ilə öz-özünə MCI'ni transkriptlərdə tanıtmaq üçün uyğunlaşdırıldı, ikili klassifikat işində. Üç veri qurğuları üçün Cənnətlə sözlər (BoW) və dil qurğuları istifadə edərək, İngilizce DementiaBank, Cinderella və Arizona-Battery vasitəsilə müxtəlif fikirlərin istifadəsi ilə qarşılaşdırıldı. Üstündə, CNE yalnız kompleks ağları istifadə etməkdən daha yüksək doğruluğu göstərdi, lakin Vektör Makinasını dəstəkləndirmək digər klassifikatlara daha üstün idi. CNE DementiaBank və Cinderella üçün ən yüksək nöqsanlıqları təmin etdi, amma BoW qısa hekayələrinə görə Arizona-Bateriya veri qurması üçün daha faydalı idi. Əgər Cinderella veri quruluğunun transkriptlərinin əlində dəyişməsi olarsa, dil fəaliyyətlərini istifadə etmək üçün daha yüksək doğruluğu olardı. Sonuçlar birlikdə toplanmışdır ki, çox ölçülü ölçülərdə MCI'nin keşfetməsi üçün müxtəlif şəbəkələr in şa edilmiş kompleks şəbəkələrinin yayıldığını göstərir.", 'am': 'ሚር ኮንgnitive አካባቢ (MCI) ማውጣት በሚችል የልብ ሽብር ነው፡፡ የLinguistic ምርጫዎች፣ አብዛኛውም ከፓርራር፣ MCI ለማግኘት ተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፣ ነገር ግን ይህ ትልቅ ሚዛን ማስታወሻ አይገባም፡፡ የሜክሲ ውጤት የጽሑፍ ጽሑፎች ማቀናጃ አውቶማዊ አስተካክሎት የሚያስፈልገውን የግራማቲካዊ ንግግር ማድረግ የሚያስፈልገዋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ላይ የተጻፈውን ጽሑፎችን ወደ ትክክለኛ መረብ እና በ (CNE) ቃላት የተዘጋጀውን አነስተኛ ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም እና በኔሮፖሊካዊ ድምፅ ውስጥ የተደረገውን አነስተኛ ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም አከበርናቸው፡፡ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች በሀብት መግለጫ ላይ የባክ ቃላት (BoW) እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል ይደረጋል፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ የዴሜንቲካ ባንክ እና በፖርቱጋሊስ ውስጥ ሲንጋሌ እና አርዞን-ባትሪ ይደረጋል፡፡ በሁል ጊዜ CNE በተጨማሪው መረብ ብቻ ከመጠቀም የበለጠ እርግጠኝነት አቀረበ፡፡ CNE ለዴሞንቲካ ባንክ እና ለሴንቨርስሊላ ከፍተኛ እርግጠኝነት ሰጥቷል፤ ነገር ግን ቦW በአርዞና-ቢትሪ ዳታተር የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የቋንቋዊ ምርጫዎች የሚጠቀም ሥርዓት የCinderella ዳታ ጽሑፎችን በእጃቸው የተሰወረ እንደሆነ ከፍተኛ እርግጠት አቀረበ፡፡ በተሰበሰቡ ጊዜ ፍሬዎቹ በተለየ ትልቅ ጉዳይ የMCI ድምፅ ማግኘት ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is a mental disorder difficult to diagnose.  Լեզվային առանձնահատկությունները, հիմնականում վերլուծողներից, օգտագործվել են MCA-ի հայտնաբերման համար, բայց սա համապատասխան չէ մեծ մասշտաբի գնահատման համար: ՄԻԿ-ի անհեղությունները ստեղծում են ոչ գրամատիկ խոսք, որը պահանջում է ձեռքի կամ բարձր ճշգրտություն ավտոմատիկ ուղղություն հաղորդագրություններին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մոդելներ ենք կազմակերպել բարդ ցանցերով և հարստացրել դրանք բառերի ներգրավման (CNE) միջոցով, որպեսզի ավելի լավ ներկայացնենք կարճ տեքստերը, որոնք արտադրվում են նեյրոհոգեբանական գնահատականներում: Համակարգման չափումները կիրառվեցին լավ հայտնի դասակարգողների հետ, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերեն MCA-ը վերագրություններում, երկարային դասակարգման գործում: Համեմատությունը կատարվել է ավանդական մոտեցումների արտադրության հետ օգտագործելով Բառերի Բարկի (BoW) և լեզվաբանական հատկություններ երեք տվյալների համակարգերի համար. Dement Bank-ը անգլերենում, Cinder lla-ը և Արիզոնա-Բատտերիան-պորտուգալերենում: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, CNE-ն ավելի ճշգրիտ էր, քան միայն բարդ ցանցեր օգտագործելը, մինչդեռ աջակցության մեքենան ավելի լավ էր, քան այլ դասակարգում: CNE-ը տրամադրեց Dement Bank-ի և Cinder-ի ամենաճշգրիտությունը, բայց BoW-ը ավելի արդյունավետ էր Արիզոնա-Բատտերիայի տվյալների համակարգի համար, հավանաբար իր կարճ պատմությունների պատճառով: Լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններ օգտագործող մոտեցումը ավելի ճշգրիտ կդարձնի, եթե Cinder lla տվյալների համակարգի վերագրությունները ձեռքով վերափոխվեն: Համադրված, արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ներգրավման միջոցով հարուստ բարդ ցանցերը խոստանում են MCI ի հայտնաբերման համար մեծ մասշտաբ գնահատումներում:', 'bs': 'Milo kognitivno oštećenje (MCI) je mentalni poremećaj teško dijagnosticirati. Lingističke karakteristike, uglavnom od parsera, su korištene za otkrivanje MCI, ali ovo nije odgovarajuće za velike procjene. Nedostatak MCI proizvodi neogramatični govor koji zahtijeva ručnu ili visoku preciznu automatsku korekciju transkripta. U ovom papiru smo modelili transkript u kompleksne mreže i obogatili ih riječima ugrađenim (CNE) kako bi bolje predstavili kratke tekste proizvođene u neuropsihološkim procjenama. Mjere mreže su primjenjene sa poznatim klasifikatorima da bi automatski identifikovali MCI u transkriptima, u dvojnom zadatku klasifikacije. Upoređeno je s učinkom tradicionalnih pristupa koristeći vrećicu riječi (BoW) i jezičke karakteristike za tri dataseta: DementiaBank na engleskom jeziku, Pepeljuga i Arizona-baterija na portugalskom jeziku. Generalno, CNE je pružila veću tačnost nego koristiti samo kompleksne mreže, dok je podrška vektorskoj mašini bila superior od drugih klasifikatora. CNE je pružio najvišu tačnost DementiaBank i Pepeljuge, ali BoW je bio učinkovitiji za setu podataka Arizona-baterija vjerojatno zbog kratkih priča. Pristup korištenjem jezičkih karakteristika izazvao je veću preciznost ako su prepisa podataka o pepeljugu manuelno pregledane. Zajedno, rezultati ukazuju na to da je kompleksna mreža obogaćena uključenom obećavajuće za otkrivanje MCI u velikoj procjeni.', 'ca': "La deficiència cognitiva leve és un trastorn mental difícil de diagnosticar. Les característiques lingüístiques, principalment dels analistes, han estat utilitzades per detectar ICM, però això no és adequat per a valoracions a gran escala. Les disfluències MCI produeixen un discurs no gramàtic que requereix correcció automàtica manual o d'alta precisió de les transcripcions. En aquest paper, vam modelar les transcripcions en xarxes complexes i les vam enriquecer amb l'incorporació de paraules (CNE) per representar millor textos curts produïts en valoracions neuropsicològiques. Les mesures de xarxa van ser aplicades amb classificadors coneguts per identificar automàticament l'ICM en transcripts, en una tasca de classificació binaria. Es va fer una comparació amb el desenvolupament d'enfocaments tradicionals utilitzant Bag of Words (BoW) i característiques lingüístices per tres conjunts de dades: DementiaBank en anglès, Cinderella i Arizona-Battery en portuguès. En general, la CNE proporcionava més precisió que només utilitzar xarxes complexes, mentre la Support Vector Machine era superior a altres classificadors. CNE provided the highest accuracies for DementiaBank and Cinderella, but BoW was more efficient for the Arizona-Battery dataset probably owing to its short narratives.  L'enfocament que utilitzava característiques lingüístices donava més precisió si les transcripcions del conjunt de dades Cinderella fossin revisades manualment. Junts, els resultats indican que les xarxes complexes enriquecidas amb l'incorporació prometen detectar ICM en evaluacions a gran escala.", 'cs': 'Mírná kognitivní porucha (MCI) je duševní porucha obtížně diagnostikovatelná. K detekci MCI byly použity jazykové prvky, zejména z parserů, ale to není vhodné pro rozsáhlé hodnocení. Diskluence MCI produkují negramatickou řeč, která vyžaduje ruční nebo vysoce přesnou automatickou korekci přepisů. V tomto článku jsme modelovali transkripty do složitých sítí a obohatili je o slovní embedding (CNE), abychom lépe reprezentovali krátké texty produkované v neuropsychologických hodnoceních. Síťová měření byla aplikována s dobře známými klasifikátory pro automatickou identifikaci MCI v transkriptech, v binární klasifikaci úlohy. Bylo provedeno srovnání s výkonností tradičních přístupů využívajících Bag of Words (BoW) a jazykových vlastností pro tři datové sady: DementiaBank v angličtině a Popelka a Arizona-Battery v portugalštině. Celkově CNE poskytovala vyšší přesnost než používání pouze složitých sítí, zatímco Support Vector Machine byl lepší než ostatní klasifikátory. CNE poskytlo nejvyšší přesnosti pro DementiaBank a Popelku, ale BoW byl pro datovou sadu Arizona-Battery efektivnější pravděpodobně díky jejím krátkým příběhům. Přístup používající jazykové vlastnosti přinesl vyšší přesnost, pokud byly přepisy datové sady Popelky revidovány ručně. Výsledky souhrnně ukazují, že komplexní sítě obohacené o embedding jsou slibné pro detekci MCI v rozsáhlých hodnoceních.', 'bn': 'মাল্ড কনফিনিটিভ এপ্রেমেন্ট (এমসিআই) একটি মানসিক অসুস্থ। লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য, বিশেষ করে পার্সার থেকে এমসিআই সনাক্ত করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু এটা বিশাল পরিমাণ মূল্যের জন্ এমসিআই সংক্রান্ত অগ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল বাক্য উৎপাদন করে যা ব্যবহারকারীদের নিয়ন্ত্রণ বা উচ্চপরিসূচিত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাব এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কমপ্লেক্স নেটওয়ার্কে ট্রান্সক্রিপ্টগুলোর মডেল করেছিলাম আর তাদের সমৃদ্ধ করেছিলাম শব্দ বিভিন্ন (সিএনএন) দ্বারা সং স্বয়ংক্রিপ্টে MCI স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত করার জন্য নেটওয়ার্ক পরিমাপ প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে বাইনারি শ্রেণীকরণ কাজে। তিনটি ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে ঐতিহ্যবাহী উপায়ের প্রচণ্ড তুলনায় তুলনা করা হয়েছিল: ইংরেজি ভাষায় ডেমেন্টেয়াব্যাংক, আর্জিনা ব্যাটারি আর্জোনা ব্যাটারি। সাধারণত, সিনেই শুধুমাত্র কমপ্লেক্স নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করার চেয়ে বেশী সঠিকভাবে প্রদান করেছে, যদিও সমর্থন করে ভেক্টর মে ডেমেন্টিয়াব্যাংক এবং সিনেডার্লার জন্য সিনেই সর্বোচ্চ সঠিক তথ্য প্রদান করেছেন, কিন্তু বোউড আরিজোনা-ব্যাটারি ডাটাটারি সেটের জন্যে  The approach using linguistic features yielded higher accuracy if the transcriptions of the Cinderella dataset were manually revised.  একসাথে গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে, ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বিশাল পরিমাণে এমসিআই খুঁজে বের করার জন্য জটিল নেটওয়ার্ক সমৃদ্ধ হয়েছে।', 'et': 'Kerge kognitiivne kahjustus (MCI) on psüühikahäire, mida on raske diagnoosida. MCI tuvastamiseks on kasutatud keelelisi omadusi, peamiselt parseritest, kuid see ei sobi laiaulatuslikuks hindamiseks. MCI disfluentsus toodab mittegrammatilist kõnet, mis nõuab käsitsi või suure täpsusega automaatset transkriptsioonide parandamist. Käesolevas töös modelleerisime transkriptsioone keerukateks võrgustikeks ja rikastasime neid sõna manustamisega (CNE), et paremini esindada neuropsühholoogilistes hinnangutes toodetud lühikesi tekste. Võrgumõõtmisi rakendati tuntud klassifitseerijatega, et automaatselt tuvastada MCI transkriptsioonides binaarse klassifitseerimise ülesandes. Võrreldi traditsiooniliste lähenemisviiside tulemuslikkust, kasutades Bag of Words (BoW) ja keelelisi omadusi kolme andmekogumi puhul: DementiaBank inglise keeles ja Tuhkatriinu ja Arizona-Battery portugali keeles. Üldiselt pakkus CNE suuremat täpsust kui ainult keerukate võrkude kasutamine, samas kui Support Vector Machine oli teistest klassifitseerijatest parem. CNE pakkus Dementiapangale ja Tuhkatriinule kõige suuremat täpsust, kuid BoW oli Arizona-Battery andmekogumi jaoks tõenäoliselt tänu lühikestele jutustustele tõhusam. Keelelisi omadusi kasutav lähenemine andis suurema täpsuse Tuhkatriinu andmekogumi transkriptsioonide käsitsi läbivaatamisel. Kokkuvõttes näitavad tulemused, et keerukad võrgustikud, mis on rikastatud integreerimisega, on paljutõotav MCI avastamiseks ulatuslikes hindamistes.', 'fi': 'Lievä kognitiivinen häiriö on vaikea diagnosoida. MCI:n havaitsemiseen on käytetty pääasiassa jäsentäjien kieliominaisuuksia, mutta tämä ei sovellu laajamittaisiin arviointeihin. MCI-disfluenssit tuottavat ei-kieliopillista puhetta, joka edellyttää manuaalista tai tarkkaa automaattista transkriptioiden korjausta. Tässä työssä mallinsimme transkriptit monimutkaisiksi verkostoiksi ja rikastimme niitä sanalla embedding (CNE) edustamaan neuropsykologisissa arvioinneissa tuotettuja lyhyitä tekstejä paremmin. Verkostomittauksia sovellettiin tunnettujen luokittelijoiden avulla tunnistamaan automaattisesti MCI transkriptioissa binääriluokittelutehtävässä. Vertailtiin perinteisten lähestymistapojen suorituskykyä käyttäen Bag of Words (BoW) ja kielellisiä ominaisuuksia kolmelle aineistolle: DementiaBank englanniksi ja Cinderella ja Arizona-Battery portugaliksi. Kaiken kaikkiaan CNE tarjosi paremman tarkkuuden kuin vain monimutkaisten verkkojen käyttö, kun taas Support Vector Machine oli muita luokittelijoita parempi. CNE tarjosi korkeimmat tarkkuudet DementiaBankille ja Cinderellalle, mutta BoW oli tehokkaampi Arizona-Batteryn aineistossa luultavasti lyhyiden kertomusten vuoksi. Kielellisiä ominaisuuksia hyödyntävä lähestymistapa tuotti paremman tarkkuuden, jos Tuhkimon aineiston transkriptioita tarkistettiin manuaalisesti. Tulokset yhdessä osoittavat, että upotuksella rikastetut monimutkaiset verkot ovat lupaavia MCI:n havaitsemisessa laajoissa arvioinneissa.', 'sk': 'Blaga kognitivna okvara (MCI) je duševna motnja, ki jo je težko diagnosticirati. Jezikovne značilnosti, predvsem iz razčlenjevalnikov, so bile uporabljene za odkrivanje MCI, vendar to ni primerno za obsežne ocene. Disfluencije MCI proizvajajo neslovnični govor, ki zahteva ročno ali visoko natančno avtomatsko popravljanje transkripcij. V tem prispevku smo modelirali transkripce v kompleksne mreže in jih obogatili z besedilnim vključevanjem (CNE), da bi bolje predstavili kratka besedila pri nevropsiholoških ocenah. Mrežne meritve so bile uporabljene z znanimi klasifikatorji za samodejno identifikacijo MCI v transkripcih, v opravilu binarne klasifikacije. Primerjava je bila opravljena z uspešnostjo tradicionalnih pristopov z uporabo vrečke besed (BoW) in jezikovnih značilnosti za tri nabore podatkov: DementiaBank v angleščini ter Pepelka in Arizona-Battery v portugalščini. Na splošno je CNE zagotovil večjo natančnost kot uporaba samo kompleksnih omrežij, medtem ko je bil Support Vector Machine boljši od drugih klasifikatorjev. CNE je zagotovil najvišjo natančnost za DementiaBank in Pepelko, vendar je bil BoW učinkovitejši za Arizona-Battery podatkovni nabor verjetno zaradi kratkih pripovedi. Pristop z uporabo jezikovnih značilnosti je prinesel večjo natančnost, če so bile transkripcije zbirke podatkov Pepelke ročno revidirane. Rezultati skupaj kažejo, da so kompleksna omrežja obogatena z vdelavo obetavna za odkrivanje MCI v obsežnih ocenah.', 'ha': "Madari Cognitive Empire (MCI) wata taɓa mai nauyi na gane. Furofati na Linguistic, mainli daga parser, an yi amfani da su gano MCI, kuma amma ba shi daidai wa kima mai girma. @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Muka sami takardar mistakarda zuwa garwayan masu husũma kuma Muka wadãta su da magana wanda aka shigar (CNE) dõmin ka ƙara matsayin ƙaranci da aka samu cikin hanyoyin neurologi. An amfani da tsari na wagon kwamfyutan su sami fasallar da aka sani, dõmin a gane MCI farat ɗaya cikin rubutun, cikin wani aikin mai fassarar-biyu. An samfani da faransa na hanyoyin zaman hanyoyin bayani da ya yi amfani da Bag of words (BoW) da linguistic wasu tsaro na tsari uku: DamentaaBank cikin Ingiriya, da Cinder lla da Arzona-batariy cikin Portugal. Gamma, CNE ya ga tsari mafi girma daga yin amfani da zanen murakkali kawai, kuma a lokacin da ake ƙarfafa Maintainer @ info Mataimakin ya yi amfani da wasu fassarar harsheski, ya ƙẽtare tsarin da aka canza tsarin Cinder da hannun. Ana haɗa shi, matsala na nuna cewa, mitandao masu husũma da aka wadãtar da su da faɗaɗawa yana yi wa'adi ga gane MCI cikin ƙaddara girma.", 'he': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) is a mental disorder difficult to diagnose.  תכונות שפתיות, בעיקר ממעבירים, השתמשו כדי לגלות MCI, אבל זה לא מתאים להערכות בקנה מידה גדולה. חסרות MCI יוצרות נאום לא גרמטי שדורש תיקון אוטומטי ידני או מדויק גבוה של התסריטים. בעיתון הזה, דגמנו את התסריטים לרשתות מורכבות ומעשירים אותם באמצעות הכנסת מילים (CNE) כדי לייצג טוב יותר טקסטים קצרים שנוצרים בהערכות נוירופסיכולוגיות. המדידות הרשת הופעו עם מסווגים ידועים היטב כדי לזהות באופן אוטומטי MCI בתסריטים, בתפקיד מסווגים בינרי. השוואה נעשתה עם ההופעה של גישות מסורתיות באמצעות שק של מילים (BoW) והתכונות לשוניות לשלושה קבוצות נתונים: DementiaBank באנגלית, וסינדרלה ואריזונה-Battery בפורטוגזית. באופן כללי, CNE סיפק מדויקת גבוהה יותר מאשר להשתמש רק ברשתות מורכבות, בעוד מכונת ויקטורים תמיכה הייתה מעלית על מסמכים אחרים. סי.אן.אי. סיפקה את הדיקויות הגבוהות ביותר עבור דמנטיה בנק וסינדרלה, אבל בוו היתה יותר יעילה עבור קבוצת נתונים אריזונה-Battery כנראה בגלל הסיפורים הקצרים שלה. הגישה באמצעות תכונות שפתיים הביאה מדויקה גבוהה יותר אם התכתיבות של קבוצת הנתונים של סינדרלה היו משופעות ידנית. Taken together, the results indicate that complex networks enriched with embedding is promising for detecting MCI in large-scale assessments.', 'jv': 'Meld CoGNative impeairment (XMI) iku kelas aku sing apik dadi. structural navigation M Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé model urip lan tambah sing komplikasi lan nggawe barang kelas embedding word (SEE) nganggep gampang kuwi nggawe sistem sing luwih apik dhéwé Purge events older than <<spin\\-button>> days Name default:LTR C Ndoleh gambar pergambar aturan anyar nggambar luwih dumadhi kanggo sabên nggambar kelas Jejaring', 'bo': 'Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI)ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་དབུལ་གྱི་དབུལ་ཕྱོགས་ཅིག་རེད། Linguistic features, mainly from parsers, are used to detect MCI, but this is not suitable for large-scale assessments. MCI disfluencies produce non-grammatical speech that requires manual or high precision automatic correction of transcripts. In this paper, we modeled transcripts in to complex networks and enriched them with word embedding (CNE) to better represent short texts produced in neuropsychological assessments. དྲ་བ་ཚད་འཛིན་པ་ཚོ་ནི་ཕན་འབྲས་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་ཚུལ་ནང་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་Bag of Words (BoW)དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསུམ་གྱི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཟོ་བ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ཡོངས་ཁྱབ་པར་CNE་ཡིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བའི་དྲ་བ་ཁོ་ན་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་མང་ཆེ་བ་བྱིན་ཡོད། CNE provided the highest accuracies for DementiaBank and Cinderella, but BoW was more efficient for the Arizona-Battery dataset probably owing to its short narratives. སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལག་ཐོག་ཏུ་བསྐྱར་གསོ རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་བ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡོད་པ་ནི་མཐུན་རྩོལ་བ་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིབ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Chat Detection in an Intelligent Assistant : Combining Task-oriented and Non-task-oriented Spoken Dialogue Systems', 'ar': 'اكتشاف الدردشة في مساعد ذكي: الجمع بين أنظمة الحوار المنطوق الموجهة نحو المهام وغير الموجهة نحو المهام', 'pt': 'Detecção de bate-papo em um assistente inteligente: combinando sistemas de diálogo falado orientados a tarefas e não orientados a tarefas', 'es': 'Detección de chat en un asistente inteligente: combinación de sistemas de diálogo oral orientados a tareas y no orientados a tareas', 'fr': 'Détection des conversations dans un assistant intelligent\xa0: combinaison de systèmes de dialogue vocal orientés tâches et non orientés tâches', 'ja': 'インテリジェントアシスタントでのチャット検出：タスク指向と非タスク指向のスポークンダイアログシステムの組み合わせ', 'zh': '智能助手聊检测,合向非乡口语同', 'ru': 'Обнаружение чата в интеллектуальном помощнике: объединение систем разговорного диалога, ориентированных на задачу и не ориентированных на задачу', 'hi': 'एक बुद्धिमान सहायक में चैट डिटेक्शन: कार्य-उन्मुख और गैर-कार्य-उन्मुख बोले गए संवाद प्रणालियों का संयोजन', 'ga': 'Brath Comhrá i gCúntóir Chliste: Córais Agallaimh Labhartha Tasc-dhírithe agus Neamh-Tasc-dhírithe a Chomhcheangail', 'ka': 'ინტელექტური სტისტიენტის ფარატის განსახულება: დავალების ორიენტირებული და არ დავალების ორიენტირებული დიალოგის სისტემების შეერთება', 'hu': 'Csevegésérzékelés intelligens asszisztensben: feladatorientált és nem feladatorientált beszélő párbeszédrendszerek kombinációja', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση συνομιλίας σε έναν έξυπνο βοηθό: Συνδυασμός συστημάτων διαλόγου προσανατολισμένων στην εργασία και μη προσανατολισμένων στην εργασία', 'it': 'Rilevamento chat in un assistente intelligente: combinazione di sistemi di dialogo vocale orientati alle attività e non orientati alle attività', 'kk': 'Ағылшын көмекшіден сұхбат анықтау: Тапсырма бағытталған және тапсырма бағытталмаған тапсырма диалогы жүйелерді біріктіру', 'mk': 'Детектирање на разговорот во интелигентен помошник: Комбинирање на системи за разговор ориентирани на задачите и не ориентирани на задачите', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Sembang dalam Pembantu Intelligent: Menggabungkan Sistem Dialog Bercakap Berorientasi Tugas dan Tidak Berorientasi Tugas', 'lt': 'Pažangiojo padėjėjo aptikimas: į užduotis orientuotų ir į užduotis orientuotų dialogo sistemų derinimas', 'ml': 'ജോലി തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും ജോലിയില്ലാത്ത സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': 'Id-Detezzjoni tat-Tibdil f’Assistent Intelliġenti: Il-Kombinazzjoni ta’ Sistemi ta’ Djalogu Ftehimiet orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol u Mhux orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie czatu w inteligentnym asystencie: łączenie systemów dialogu mówionego zorientowanego na zadania i niezorientowanego na zadania', 'mn': 'Оюун ухаантай тусламжтайгаар ярианы нээлт: Тапсыг дамжуулан, ажлыг дамжуулан бус ярианы диалог системүүдийг холбох', 'ro': 'Detectarea conversațiilor într-un asistent inteligent: combinarea sistemelor de dialog vorbit orientate spre sarcini și non-orientate spre sarcini', 'no': 'Prateoppdaging i ein intelligent assistent: Kombinerer oppgåveorientert og ikkje-oppgåveorientert språkedialogsystemer', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje razgovora u inteligentnim pomoćniku: Kombiniranje sustava razgovornog dijaloga s orijentacijom na zadatku i neodređenih na zadatku', 'si': 'බුද්ධිමත් සහායකයෙක් තියෙන සංවාදය හොයාගන්න: වැඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ නොවැඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සංවා', 'ta': 'புலன்மை உதவியாளரில் அரட்டை கண்டுபிடிப்பு: பணியின் திசையாக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் செயல் இல்லாத த திருத்தி உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள்', 'so': 'Heeganka talada: Combining shaqo-oriented and Non-oriented Dialog Systems', 'sv': 'Chattdekänning i en intelligent assistent: Kombinera uppgiftsorienterade och icke-uppgiftsorienterade taldialogsystem', 'ur': 'Intelligent Assistant میں Chat Detection: Combining Task-oriented and Non-task-oriented Spoken Dialog Systems', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'phát hiện trò chuyện bằng một trợ lý thông minh: kết hợp hệ thống ngôn ngữ liên lạc', 'bg': 'Откриване на чат в интелигентен асистент: Комбиниране на системи за говорен диалог, ориентирани към задачи и неспециализирани към задачи', 'da': 'Chatregistrering i en intelligent assistent: Kombination af opgaveorienterede og ikke-opgaveorienterede taledialogsystemer', 'nl': 'Chatdetectie in een intelligente assistent: het combineren van taakgerichte en niet-taakgerichte gesproken dialoogsystemen', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje razgovora u inteligentnim pomoćniku: Kombiniranje sustava razgovornog dijaloga s orijentacijom na zadatke i ne orijentacijom na zadatke', 'id': 'Deteksi Chat dalam Asisten Intelligent: Menggabungkan Sistem Dialog Berbicara Orientasi Tugas dan Tidak Orientasi Tugas', 'de': 'Chat-Erkennung in einem intelligenten Assistenten: Kombination aufgabenorientierter und nicht aufgabenorientierter gesprochener Dialogsysteme', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن گفتگوی در یک کمک هوشمند: ترکیب سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی گفتگوی با مسیر مسیر کار و مسیر کار', 'sw': 'Chat Detection in an Intelligent Assistant: Combining Task-oriented and Non-task-oriented Spoken Dialogue Systems', 'tr': 'Golakal bir kömekçi içinde sohbet açma: Görev orientasynda we daýrek-orientasiz söz dialoglary birleştirmek', 'af': "Gespraak Opdekking in 'n Inteligente Assistent: Kombineer Opdrag-orienteerde en Nie-taak-orienteerde Spoken Dialoog Systeme", 'sq': 'Detektimi i bisedës në një asistent inteligjent: kombinimi i sistemeve të dialogut të biseduar të orientuar në punë dhe jo-orientuar në punë', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Խոսակցության հայտնաբերումը խելացի օգնականի միջոցով. համեմատել առաջադրանքների և ոչ առաջադրանքների ուղղությամբ խոսվող խոսակցության համակարգերը', 'az': 'Akıllı Yardımcısında sohbet keşfini: Göndərilən və qeyri-tərəfli Sözlü Dialoog Sistemlərini birləşdirən', 'bn': 'বুদ্ধিমান সহকারীর মধ্যে আড্ডা ডিটেক্টর: কাজের দিকে যোগাযোগ করা হচ্ছে এবং কাজের অনুপ্রাপ্ত নয়-কাজের মুখোমুখি ডায়ালগ সিস্', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje razgovora u inteligentnim pomoćniku: Kombiniranje sustava razgovornog dijaloga s orijentacijom na zadatke i ne orijentacijom na zadatke', 'cs': 'Detekce chatu v inteligentním asistentě: Kombinace systémů mluveného dialogu orientovaného na úkoly a neúkoly orientovaného na úkoly', 'ko': '지능 조수에서의 채팅 탐지: 임무와 비임무를 결합한 구어 대화 시스템', 'et': 'Vestluse tuvastamine nutikas assistendis: Ülesandepõhiste ja mitteülesandepõhiste kõneleva dialoogi süsteemide kombineerimine', 'ca': 'Detecció de converses en un assistent intel·ligent: Combinar sistemes de diàleg parlat orientat a les tasques i no orientat a les tasques', 'fi': 'Keskustelun tunnistus 채lykk채채ss채 avustajassa: teht채v채l채ht철isten ja ei-teht채v채l채ht철isten puhedialogij채rjestelmien yhdist채minen', 'jv': '#a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello!', 'he': 'גילוי השיחה בעוזר אינטליגנטי: שילוב מערכות דיאלוג מדברים ממשימות ולא ממשימות', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje klepeta v inteligentnem pomočniku: združevanje sistemov govorjenega dialoga, usmerjenih v opravila, in sistemov govorjenega dialoga, ki niso usmerjeni v opravila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་རོགས་སྤྱོད་པ་ཞིག་གི་གླེང་མོལ'}
{'en': 'Recently emerged intelligent assistants on smartphones and home electronics (e.g., Siri and Alexa) can be seen as novel hybrids of domain-specific task-oriented spoken dialogue systems and open-domain non-task-oriented ones. To realize such hybrid dialogue systems, this paper investigates determining whether or not a user is going to have a chat with the system. To address the lack of benchmark datasets for this task, we construct a new dataset consisting of 15,160 utterances collected from the real log data of a commercial intelligent assistant (and will release the dataset to facilitate future research activity). In addition, we investigate using tweets and Web search queries for handling open-domain user utterances, which characterize the task of chat detection. Experimental experiments demonstrated that, while simple supervised methods are effective, the use of the tweets and search queries further improves the F_1-score from 86.21 to 87.53._1-score from 86.21 to 87.53. ', 'ar': 'يمكن اعتبار المساعدين الأذكياء الذين ظهروا مؤخرًا على الهواتف الذكية والإلكترونيات المنزلية (على سبيل المثال ، Siri و Alexa) على أنهم هجائن جديدة لأنظمة الحوار المنطوق ذات المهام المحددة والمخصصة للمجال المفتوح والأنظمة غير الموجهة للمهام. لتحقيق أنظمة الحوار الهجين هذه ، تبحث هذه الورقة في تحديد ما إذا كان المستخدم سيجري محادثة مع النظام أم لا. لمعالجة النقص في مجموعات البيانات المعيارية لهذه المهمة ، نقوم ببناء مجموعة بيانات جديدة تتكون من 15،160 نطقًا تم جمعها من بيانات السجل الحقيقي لمساعد ذكي تجاري (وسنصدر مجموعة البيانات لتسهيل نشاط البحث في المستقبل). بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نتحرى عن استخدام التغريدات واستعلامات بحث الويب للتعامل مع أقوال مستخدم المجال المفتوح ، والتي تميز مهمة اكتشاف الدردشة. أظهرت التجارب التجريبية أنه في حين أن الطرق البسيطة الخاضعة للإشراف فعالة ، فإن استخدام التغريدات واستعلامات البحث يحسن درجة F_1 من 86.21 إلى 87.53.', 'fr': "Les assistants intelligents récemment apparus sur les smartphones et les appareils électroniques domestiques (par exemple, Siri et Alexa) peuvent être considérés comme de nouveaux hybrides de systèmes de dialogue vocal orientés tâches spécifiques à un domaine et de systèmes non orientés tâches dans un domaine ouvert. Pour réaliser de tels systèmes de dialogue hybrides, cet article cherche à déterminer si un utilisateur va ou non discuter avec le système. Pour pallier le manque d'ensembles de données de référence pour cette tâche, nous construisons un nouveau jeu de données composé de 15 160 énoncés collectés à partir des données de journal réelles d'un assistant intelligent commercial (et nous publierons l'ensemble de données pour faciliter les futures activités de recherche). En outre, nous étudions l'utilisation de tweets et de requêtes de recherche sur le Web pour gérer les énoncés d'utilisateurs de domaine ouvert, qui caractérisent la tâche de détection de chat. Des expériences expérimentales ont démontré que, bien que les méthodes supervisées simples soient efficaces, l'utilisation des tweets et des requêtes de recherche améliore encore le score F_1 de 86,21 à 87,53.", 'es': 'Los asistentes inteligentes recientemente surgidos en teléfonos inteligentes y dispositivos electrónicos domésticos (por ejemplo, Siri y Alexa) pueden considerarse híbridos novedosos de sistemas de diálogo oral orientados a tareas específicas de dominio y sistemas de dominio abierto no orientados a tareas. Para realizar estos sistemas de diálogo híbridos, este artículo investiga cómo determinar si un usuario va a tener o no una conversación con el sistema. Para abordar la falta de conjuntos de datos de referencia para esta tarea, construimos un nuevo conjunto de datos que consta de 15,160 enunciados recopilados de los datos de registro reales de un asistente inteligente comercial (y publicaremos el conjunto de datos para facilitar la actividad de investigación futura). Además, investigamos el uso de tuits y consultas de búsqueda web para manejar las declaraciones de los usuarios de dominio abierto, que caracterizan la tarea de detección de chat. Los experimentos experimentales demostraron que, si bien los métodos supervisados simples son efectivos, el uso de los tuits y las consultas de búsqueda mejora aún más la puntuación F_1 de 86,21 a 87,53.', 'pt': 'Assistentes inteligentes emergidos recentemente em smartphones e eletrônicos domésticos (por exemplo, Siri e Alexa) podem ser vistos como novos híbridos de sistemas de diálogo falado orientados a tarefas específicas de domínio e sistemas não orientados a tarefas de domínio aberto. Para realizar tais sistemas de diálogo híbridos, este artigo investiga determinar se um usuário vai ou não conversar com o sistema. Para resolver a falta de conjuntos de dados de referência para esta tarefa, construímos um novo conjunto de dados composto por 15.160 enunciados coletados dos dados reais de log de um assistente inteligente comercial (e liberaremos o conjunto de dados para facilitar futuras atividades de pesquisa). Além disso, investigamos o uso de tweets e consultas de pesquisa na Web para lidar com enunciados de usuários de domínio aberto, que caracterizam a tarefa de detecção de bate-papo. Experimentos experimentais demonstraram que, embora métodos supervisionados simples sejam eficazes, o uso de tweets e consultas de pesquisa melhora ainda mais o F_1-score de 86,21 para 87,53.', 'ja': '最近登場したスマートフォンやホームエレクトロニクス（ SiriやAlexaなど）のインテリジェントアシスタントは、ドメイン固有のタスク指向の口頭対話システムとオープンドメインの非タスク指向のシステムの新規ハイブリッドと見なすことができます。このようなハイブリッドダイアログシステムを実現するために、本稿では、ユーザがシステムとチャットを行うかどうかを判断することについて検討する。このタスクのベンチマークデータセットの不足に対処するために、商用インテリジェントアシスタントの実際のログデータから収集された15,160の発話からなる新しいデータセットを構築します（そして将来の研究活動を容易にするためにデータセットをリリースします）。さらに、オープンドメインのユーザー発言を扱うためのツイートやウェブ検索クエリを使用して調査し、チャット検出のタスクを特徴づけています。実験的実験は、単純な監督下の方法が効果的であるが、ツイートと検索クエリを使用すると、F_1スコアが86.21から87.53にさらに向上することを実証した。', 'zh': '近于智能手机、家用电子产品(如Siri、Alexa)之智可以见者为特定域之语,非任务导之音系统之新混合体。 为此混合对话系统,本文研定用户与系统聊天。 为此数集者,构一新集,含商业智能助手之实日志数之15,160一言(发数集以趣未来之)。 又以推文、 Web 搜访开放域用户语,聊天检度之征也。 实验实验明,虽简督有效,而用推文搜访更F_1分数自86.21至87.53。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में स्मार्टफोन और होम इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स (जैसे, सिरी और एलेक्सा) पर उभरे हुए बुद्धिमान सहायकों को डोमेन-विशिष्ट कार्य-उन्मुख बोले जाने वाले संवाद प्रणालियों और ओपन-डोमेन गैर-कार्य-उन्मुख लोगों के उपन्यास संकर के रूप में देखा जा सकता है। इस तरह के हाइब्रिड संवाद प्रणालियों को महसूस करने के लिए, यह पेपर यह निर्धारित करने की जांच करता है कि उपयोगकर्ता सिस्टम के साथ चैट करने जा रहा है या नहीं। इस कार्य के लिए बेंचमार्क डेटासेट की कमी को दूर करने के लिए, हम एक नए डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं जिसमें एक वाणिज्यिक बुद्धिमान सहायक के वास्तविक लॉग डेटा से एकत्र किए गए 15,160 कथन शामिल हैं (और भविष्य की अनुसंधान गतिविधि को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए डेटासेट जारी करेंगे)। इसके अलावा, हम ओपन-डोमेन उपयोगकर्ता कथनों को संभालने के लिए ट्वीट्स और वेब खोज क्वेरी का उपयोग करके जांच करते हैं, जो चैट डिटेक्शन के कार्य को चिह्नित करता है। प्रयोगात्मक प्रयोगों ने प्रदर्शित किया कि, जबकि सरल पर्यवेक्षित तरीके प्रभावी हैं, ट्वीट्स और खोज प्रश्नों का उपयोग 86.21 से 87.53 तक F_1-स्कोर में और सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'Недавно появившиеся интеллектуальные ассистенты на смартфонах и домашней электронике (например, Siri и Alexa) можно рассматривать как новые гибриды доменно-ориентированных систем разговорного диалога, ориентированных на конкретные задачи, и систем открытого домена, не ориентированных на задачи. Чтобы реализовать такие гибридные диалоговые системы, в данной статье исследуется вопрос о том, будет ли пользователь общаться с системой. Чтобы решить проблему отсутствия эталонных наборов данных для этой задачи, мы создадим новый набор данных, состоящий из 15 160 выражений, собранных из реальных данных журнала коммерческого интеллектуального помощника (и выпустим набор данных для облегчения будущей исследовательской деятельности). Кроме того, мы исследуем использование твитов и поисковых запросов для обработки фраз пользователей с открытым доменом, которые характеризуют задачу обнаружения чата. Экспериментальные эксперименты показали, что, хотя простые контролируемые методы эффективны, использование твитов и поисковых запросов дополнительно улучшает показатель F_1 с 86,21 до 87,53.', 'ga': 'Is féidir breathnú ar chúntóirí cliste a tháinig chun cinn le déanaí ar fhóin chliste agus leictreonaic baile (m.sh., Siri agus Alexa) mar hibridí núíosacha de chórais idirphlé labhartha atá sainiúil don fhearann agus d’fhearainn oscailte nach bhfuil dírithe ar thasc. Chun córais chomhphlé hibrideacha den sórt sin a bhaint amach, déanann an páipéar seo imscrúdú ar chinneadh an mbeidh úsáideoir ag dul i mbun comhrá leis an gcóras nó nach bhfuil. Chun dul i ngleic leis an easpa tacar sonraí tagarmharcála don tasc seo, tógaimid tacar sonraí nua comhdhéanta de 15,160 caint a bhailítear ó fhíorshonraí logála cúntóir tráchtála cliste (agus scaoilfimid an tacar sonraí chun gníomhaíocht taighde amach anseo a éascú). Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú trí úsáid a bhaint as tweets agus fiosruithe cuardaigh Gréasáin chun cainteanna úsáideoirí fearainn oscailte a láimhseáil, arb iad is sainairíonna iad an tasc a bhaineann le comhrá a bhrath. Léirigh turgnaimh thurgnamhach, cé go bhfuil modhanna maoirsithe simplí éifeachtach, cuireann úsáid tweets agus fiosruithe cuardaigh tuilleadh feabhais ar an scór F_1 ó 86.21 go 87.53.', 'hu': 'Az okostelefonokkal és otthoni elektronikával kapcsolatos intelligens asszisztensek (például Siri és Alexa) új hibrideként tekinthetők a tartományspecifikus feladatorientált beszélő párbeszédrendszerek és a nyílt domain nem feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerek új hibridjeinek. Az ilyen hibrid párbeszédrendszerek megvalósításához a tanulmány azt vizsgálja, hogy egy felhasználó beszélgetni fog-e a rendszerrel. Az ehhez a feladathoz szükséges benchmark adatkészletek hiányának orvoslása érdekében új adatkészletet építünk fel, amely egy kereskedelmi intelligens asszisztens valós naplóadataiból összegyűjtött 15 160 kimondásból áll (és kiadjuk az adatkészletet a jövőbeni kutatási tevékenység megkönnyítése érdekében). Ezenkívül tweetek és webes keresési lekérdezések segítségével vizsgáljuk a nyílt domain felhasználói kimondások kezelésére, amelyek jellemzik a chat észlelését. Kísérleti kísérletek kimutatták, hogy bár az egyszerű felügyelt módszerek hatékonyak, a tweetek és keresési lekérdezések használata tovább javítja az F_1 pontszámot 86,21-ről 87,53-ra.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα αναδύθηκαν ευφυείς βοηθοί σε έξυπνα τηλέφωνα και οικιακά ηλεκτρονικά (π.χ. Siri και Alexa) μπορούν να θεωρηθούν ως καινοτόμα υβρίδια συστημάτων προφορικού διαλόγου που βασίζονται σε συγκεκριμένες εργασίες και ανοιχτών συστημάτων μη προσανατολισμένων σε εργασίες. Για την υλοποίηση τέτοιων υβριδικών συστημάτων διαλόγου, η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά αν ένας χρήστης πρόκειται να έχει μια συνομιλία με το σύστημα ή όχι. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί η έλλειψη δεδομένων αναφοράς για αυτό το έργο, κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από 15,160 δηλώσεις που συλλέγονται από τα πραγματικά δεδομένα καταγραφής ενός εμπορικού έξυπνου βοηθού (και θα απελευθερώσουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων για να διευκολύνουμε τη μελλοντική ερευνητική δραστηριότητα). Επιπλέον, ερευνούμε τη χρήση tweets και ερωτήματα αναζήτησης για τον χειρισμό προφορών χρηστών ανοιχτού τομέα, οι οποίες χαρακτηρίζουν το καθήκον της ανίχνευσης συνομιλίας. Πειραματικά πειράματα έδειξαν ότι, ενώ οι απλές εποπτευόμενες μέθοδοι είναι αποτελεσματικές, η χρήση των tweets και των ερωτήσεων αναζήτησης βελτιώνει περαιτέρω την βαθμολογία από 86.21 έως 87.53.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე მოხდა ინტელექტური აზიანტები სტრიმენტების და სახლის ელექტრონიკაში (მაგალითად, Siri და Alexa) შეიძლება იყვანოთ როგორც პრომენტიური ჰიბრიტები დიომინის კონფიფიკური რაოდენური დავაკეთ ამ ჰიბრიდის დიალოგის სისტემების შესახებ, ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს თუ არა მომხმარებელი სისტემისთან საუბარება იქნება. ამ დავალების მონაცემების მონაცემების არსებობის შესახებ, ჩვენ კონფიგურაცით ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 15 160 სიტყვების მონაცემების რეალური ლოგურაციის მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემე დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ, რომელიც გახსნა დიომინის მომხმარებელი სიტყვების გამოყენებაზე, რომელიც ფარტის განსხვავების რაქაღალდეს გამოყენება. ექსპერიმენტიური ექსპერიმენტები გამოწვება, რომ, მაგრამ მარტივი დანარწმუნებული მეტოვები ეფექტიურია, ტვიტების გამოყენება და საძებნა კითხვების შესაძლებლობა უფრო მეტად გა', 'mk': 'Неодамна појавени интелигентни асистенти за паметни телефони и домашна електроника (на пример, Сири и Алекса) може да се сметаат за нови хибриди на системи за говорен дијалог ориентирани кон задачите специфични за домен и системи за отворен домен кои не се ориентирани кон задачите. За да се остварат вакви системи на хибриден дијалог, овој весник истражува дали корисникот ќе разговара со системот или не. За да го решиме недостатокот на податоци за оваа задача, ќе изградиме нов податок составен од 15.160 изрази собрани од вистинските податоци на комерцијалниот интелигентен асистент (и ќе го ослободиме податокот за олеснување на идната истражувачка активност). Покрај тоа, истражуваме користејќи твитови и интернет пребарувања за решавање на изразите на корисниците на отворен домен, кои ја карактеризираат задачата за детекција на разговори. Експерименталните експерименти покажаа дека, иако едноставните надгледувани методи се ефикасни, употребата на твитови и барања за пребарување понатаму го подобрува F_1-резултатот од 86,21 на 87,53.', 'it': "Gli assistenti intelligenti recentemente emersi su smartphone e elettronica domestica (ad esempio Siri e Alexa) possono essere visti come nuovi ibridi di sistemi di dialogo parlato orientati ai compiti specifici del dominio e di sistemi di dialogo parlato non orientati ai compiti aperti a dominio aperto. Per realizzare tali sistemi ibridi di dialogo, questo articolo indaga se un utente sta per avere o meno una chiacchierata con il sistema. Per affrontare la mancanza di set di dati benchmark per questo compito, costruiamo un nuovo set di dati composto da 15.160 dichiarazioni raccolte dai dati reali di log di un assistente intelligente commerciale (e rilasceremo il set di dati per facilitare le future attività di ricerca). Inoltre, indaghiamo utilizzando tweet e query di ricerca Web per gestire le dichiarazioni degli utenti a dominio aperto, che caratterizzano il compito di rilevamento della chat. Esperimenti sperimentali hanno dimostrato che, mentre semplici metodi supervisionati sono efficaci, l'uso dei tweet e delle query di ricerca migliora ulteriormente il punteggio F_1 da 86,21 a 87,53.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы смартфон және үй электроникасында (мысалы, Siri және Alexa) интеллекті көмекшілер доменге ерекше тапсырманың айналған диалог жүйелері және ашық-доменге бағытталған жоқ-тапсырманың жаңа гибридтері ретінде көр Бұл гибридтік диалог жүйелерін түсіну үшін, пайдаланушының жүйесімен сұхбат етуді анықтайды. Бұл тапсырманың бақылау деректер қорларының жоқ болмасын өзгерту үшін, біз коммерциялық интелигенттік көмекшісінің шын журналындағы 15 160 сөз тізбектерінен жинақталған жаңа деректер қорларын құрамыз (және келесі зертте Қосымша, бұл шартты анықтау тапсырмасын таңдау үшін "open-domain" пайдаланушылардың сөздерін қадағалау үшін tweets және Веб іздеу сұрауларын қолданып зерттейміз. Эксперименталдық тәжірибелер кәдімгі қарапайым бақылау әдістері эффективні болғанда, tweets және іздеу сұралдарының қолдануы 86,21- 87,53 жылдамасынан F_1- нұсқасын жақсартады', 'ms': 'Pembantu cerdas yang baru-baru ini muncul pada telefon cerdas dan elektronik rumah (cth., Siri dan Alexa) boleh dilihat sebagai hibrid baru bagi sistem dialog berbicara orientasi tugas-spesifik domain dan sistem dialog buka-domain bukan-orientasi tugas. Untuk menyedari sistem dialog hibrid tersebut, kertas ini menyelidiki menentukan sama ada pengguna akan bercakap dengan sistem atau tidak. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan set data benchmark untuk tugas ini, kami membina set data baru yang terdiri dari 15,160 ungkapan yang dikumpulkan dari data log sebenar pembantu cerdas komersial (dan akan melepaskan set data untuk memudahkan aktiviti kajian masa depan). In addition, we investigate using tweets and Web search queries for handling open-domain user utterances, which characterize the task of chat detection.  Eksperimen eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa, walaupun kaedah mudah yang dijaga berkesan, penggunaan tweet dan pertanyaan carian lebih meningkatkan skor F_1 dari 86.21 kepada 87.53.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atsiradę pažangieji pagalbininkai pažangiųjų telefonų ir namų elektronikos srityje (pvz., Siri ir Alexa) gali būti laikomi naujais konkrečiai sričiai skirtų kalbos dialogo sistemų ir į užduotis nepriklausančių atvirojo sričių hibridiais. Siekiant sukurti tokias hibridines dialogo sistemas, šiame dokumente nagrinėjama, ar naudotojas ketina kalbėti su sistema arba ne. Siekiant pašalinti šios užduoties lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių trūkumą, sukuriame naują duomenų rinkinį, sudarytą iš 15 160 žodžių, surinktų iš tikrųjų komercinio protingo asistento žurnalo duomenų (ir paskelbsime duomenų rinkinį, kad palengvintume būsimą mokslinių tyrimų veiklą). Be to, mes tiriame naudojant tweetus ir interneto paieškos klausimus tvarkant atviro domeno naudotojų išraiškas, kurios apibūdina pokalbio aptikimo užduotį. Eksperimentiniai eksperimentai parodė, kad nors paprasti prižiūrimi metodai yra veiksmingi, tweetų ir paieškos klausimų naudojimas dar labiau pagerina F_1 rezultatą nuo 86,21 iki 87,53.', 'ml': 'Recently emerged intelligent assistants on smartphones and home electronics (e.g., Siri and Alexa) can be seen as novel hybrids of domain-specific task-oriented spoken dialogue systems and open-domain non-task-oriented ones.  ഈ ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d, ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവ് സിസ്റ്റത്തോടൊപ്പം സംസാരിക്കുമോ എന്ന് തീരുമാനിക ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ കുറവില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കച്ചവടത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങള കൂടാതെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെബ് തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ടൂട്ടുകളും തെരച്ചില പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, എളുപ്പമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാണെങ്കില്\u200d ട്വിറ്റു', 'pl': 'Ostatnio pojawiające się inteligentne asystenty na smartfonach i elektronice domowej (np. Siri i Alexa) mogą być postrzegane jako nowe hybrydy systemów dialogu mówionego zorientowanego na zadania specyficzne dla domeny oraz systemów dialogu mówionego w otwartej domenie niezorientowanych na zadania. Aby zrealizować takie hybrydowe systemy dialogu, niniejszy artykuł bada, czy użytkownik będzie miał zamiar porozmawiać z systemem. Aby rozwiązać brak referencyjnych zbiorów danych do tego zadania, budujemy nowy zbiór danych składający się z 15,160 wypowiedzi zebranych z rzeczywistych danych dziennika komercyjnego inteligentnego asystenta (i udostępnimy zbiór danych w celu ułatwienia przyszłych działań badawczych). Ponadto badamy wykorzystanie tweetów i zapytań internetowych do obsługi wypowiedzi użytkowników w otwartej domenie, które charakteryzują zadanie wykrywania czatu. Eksperymenty eksperymentalne wykazały, że choć proste nadzorowane metody są skuteczne, wykorzystanie tweetów i zapytań wyszukiwania dodatkowo poprawia wynik F_1 z 86.21 do 87.53.', 'no': 'Nyleg oppståand e intelligent assistent på smartphones og heimeklokonikk (f.eks. Siri og Alexa) kan verta sett som novelle hybridar av domenespesifikke oppgåve-orientert talte dialogsystemar og open-domain-non-task-orienterte. For å forstå slike hybriddialogsystemar, vil denne papiret utforske om ein brukar skal ha eit prat med systemet. For å handtere manglinga av benchmarkdatasett for denne oppgåva, konstruerer vi ein ny dataset som inneheld 15.160 uttrykk samla frå den verkelege loggdata til ein kommersiell intelligent assistent (og vil opna dataset for å gjera framtidige forskningsaktivitet). I tillegg undersøker vi med tweets og nettsøkjespørjingar for handtering av uttrykk frå brukaren av open-domain, som teiknar oppgåva for prateoppdaging. Eksperimentale eksperimenter viste at, mens enkle oversikte metodar er effektiv, bruken av tweeten og søkjespørsmålene forbetrar F_1-poeng frå 86,21 til 87,53.', 'mt': 'Assistenti intelliġenti li ħarġu dan l-aħħar fuq l-smartphones u l-elettronika tad-dar (pereżempju Siri u Alexa) jistgħu jitqiesu bħala ibridi ġodda ta’ sistemi ta’ djalogu bil-kelma orjentati lejn kompiti speċifiċi u dawk b’dominju miftuħ mhux orjentati lejn kompiti. Biex jitwettqu dawn is-sistemi ta’ djalogu ibridu, dan id-dokument jinvestiga li jiddetermina jekk utent huwiex se jkollu taħlita mas-sistema jew le. Biex nindirizzaw in-nuqqas ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta referenzjarji għal dan il-kompitu, a ħna nibnu sett ta’ dejta ġdid li jikkonsisti minn 15,160 espressjoni miġbura mid-dejta reali tar-reġistru ta’ assistent intelliġenti kummerċjali (u se nirrelaxxaw is-sett ta’ dejta biex tiġi ffaċilitata l-attività futura tar-riċerka). Barra minn hekk, ninvestigaw bl-użu ta’ tweets u mistoqsijiet ta’ tiftix fuq l-internet għall-immaniġġjar ta’ espressjonijiet ta’ utenti b’dominju miftuħ, li jikkaratterizzaw il-kompitu ta’ detezzjoni ta’ chat. Esperimenti sperimentali wrew li, filwaqt li metodi sempliċi sorveljati huma effettivi, l-użu tat-tweets u l-mistoqsijiet tat-tiftix itejjeb aktar il-punteġġ F_1 minn 86.21 sa 87.53.', 'mn': 'Саяхан ухаантай тусламжтайгаар smartphones, гэр бүлийн электроник (жишээ нь Siri болон Alexa) холбоотой ажлын тусламжтайгаар ярианы систем болон нээлттэй холбоотой ажлын тусламжтайгаар шинэ гибрид гэж үздэг. Эдгээр гибрид диалог системийг ойлгохын тулд хэрэглэгчийн системтэй ярилцлага хийх эсэхийг шалгаж байна. Энэ ажлын банк өгөгдлийн сангийн алдагдлыг олохын тулд бид худалдааны ухааны тусламжийн жинхэнэ лог өгөгдлийн сангийн 15.160 илтгэл бүрдүүлсэн шинэ өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна (мөн дараагийн судалгааны үйл ажиллагааг дэмжихийн тулд өгөгд Мөн бид нээлттэй холбоотой хэрэглэгчийн яриаг удирдах tweets болон веб хайлтын квадратуудыг ашиглаж судалдаг. Энэ нь ярианы нээлттэй холбоотой ажлыг харуулдаг. Эмчилгээний туршилтууд нь энгийн удирдлагын аргыг үр дүнтэй байхдаа tweets болон хайлтын квадратуудын хэрэглээ 86.21-аас 87.53 руу илүү сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'sr': 'Nedavno se pojavili inteligentni asistenti na pametnim i domaćim elektronikama (npr. Siri i Aleksa) mogu smatrati novim hibridima rečenih dijalogskih sustava na domenu specifičnih zadataka i neodređenih na otvorenom domenu. Da bi shvatio takve hibridne dijalogske sisteme, ovaj papir istražuje da li će korisnik razgovarati sa sistemom ili ne. Da bi se obratili nedostatku referentnih seta podataka za ovaj zadatak, izgradili smo novi set podataka koji sastoji od 15.160 reči prikupljenih iz pravih podataka dnevnika komercijalnog inteligentnog asistenta (i oslobodili ćemo set podataka kako bi olakšali buduću istraživačku aktivnost). Osim toga, istražujemo korištenje tweets i web pretraživanja za rješavanje reči korisnika otvorenog domena, koje karakteriziraju zadatak otkrivanja razgovora. Eksperimentalni eksperimenti pokazali su da, iako su jednostavne nadzorne metode efikasne, korištenje tweeta i pretraživanja još više poboljšava F_1 rezultat od 86,21 do 87,53.', 'ro': 'Asistenții inteligenți recent apăruți în domeniul smartphone-urilor și electronicelor de acasă (de exemplu, Siri și Alexa) pot fi văzuți ca hibrizi noi de sisteme de dialog vorbit orientate spre sarcini specifice domeniului și de sisteme de dialog vorbit orientate spre sarcini deschise, fără sarcini. Pentru a realiza astfel de sisteme hibride de dialog, această lucrare investighează determinarea dacă un utilizator va avea sau nu un chat cu sistemul. Pentru a rezolva lipsa seturilor de date de referință pentru această sarcină, construim un nou set de date format din 15.160 de afișări colectate din datele reale din jurnal ale unui asistent inteligent comercial (și vom lansa setul de date pentru a facilita activitatea de cercetare viitoare). În plus, investigăm utilizând tweet-uri și interogări de căutare Web pentru gestionarea declarațiilor utilizatorilor în domeniu deschis, care caracterizează sarcina detectării chat-ului. Experimentele experimentale au demonstrat că, deși metodele simple supravegheate sunt eficiente, utilizarea tweeturilor și interogărilor de căutare îmbunătățește și mai mult scorul F_1 de la 86,21 la 87,53.', 'so': "Caawiyayaasha waxgarasho leh e e ugu dhowaad soo baxay telefoonka smartiga ah iyo elektaroonikada guriga (tusaale ahaan Siri iyo Alexa) waxaa looga muujin karaa hiwaayadaha hore oo ku qoran nidaamka dialogka ee domain-specific shaqo-ku-qoran iyo goobaha furan oo aan shaqo-oriented. Si aad u ogaato nidaamka diyaarinta hibridka oo kale, warqaddaas ayaa baaraya in uu qorsheynayo in isticmaaluhu uu la hadlo nidaamka. To address the lack of benchmark datasets for this task, we construct a new dataset consisting of 15,160 utterances collected from the real log data of a commercial intelligent assistant (and will release the dataset to facilitate future research activity).  Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu baaritaannaa warqadaha isticmaalka tweetyada iyo bogagga raadinta si aan u xafiirinno hadallada isticmaalaha furan ee internetka, kaas oo ku sawiraa shaqo baaritaanka chat. Imtixaanka baaritaanka waxaa lagu muujiyey in marka isticmaalka tweetka iyo su'aalaha la ilaaliyo oo fudud ay faa’iido u leeyihiin isticmaalka iskuulaadka iyo codsiga raadinta ayaa sii kordhinaya iskuulka F_1-kooxda laga bilaabo 86.21-87.53.", 'sv': 'Nyligen uppkomna intelligenta assistenter inom smartphones och hemelektronik (t.ex. Siri och Alexa) kan ses som nya hybrider av domänspecifika uppgiftsorienterade talade dialogsystem och öppna domäner icke-uppgiftsorienterade system. För att förverkliga sådana hybrida dialogsystem undersöker denna uppsats huruvida en användare ska ha en chatt med systemet eller inte. För att åtgärda bristen på benchmarkdatauppsättningar för denna uppgift bygger vi en ny datauppsättning bestående av 15 160 yttranden insamlade från verkliga loggdata från en kommersiell intelligent assistent (och kommer att släppa datauppsättningen för att underlätta framtida forskningsaktiviteter). Dessutom undersöker vi med hjälp av tweets och webbsökningsfrågor för hantering av användaryttringar med öppen domän, vilka karaktäriserar uppgiften med chattdetektering. Experimentella experiment visade att även om enkla övervakade metoder är effektiva, användningen av tweets och sökfrågor ytterligare förbättrar F_1-poängen från 86,21 till 87,53.', 'si': 'මුලින්ම ස්මාර්ම්ටන්ට් සහ ගෙදර් එලෙක්ට්\u200dරොනික් වලින් බුද්ධිමත් උදව්වක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් සිරී සහ ඇලෙක්සා (උදාහරණයෙන්, සිරී ස මේ හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් සංවාදය පද්ධතියට තේරුම් ගන්න, මේ පත්තේ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් පද්ධතිය සමඟ කතා කරන්න මේ වැඩ සඳහා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි අළුත් දත්ත සැට් හදන්නේ අලුත් දත්ත සැට 15,160 කතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වික ඒවගේම, අපි ට්විට් සහ වෙබ් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම කතාව හොයාගන්න වැඩක් ප පරීක්ෂණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණාත්මක විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා, ට්විට', 'ur': 'اس سے اگلے سمٹروفون اور گھر الکترونیک (جیسے Siri اور الکسا) کے ذریعہ ذریعہ مددگاروں کو دومین کے مطابق مشخص کام کی صحبت کی سیستموں اور کھولے-دامین غیر-تابع-oriented سیستموں کے نو ہیبراڈ کے طور پر دیکھ سکتے ہیں. اس طرح ہیبراڈ ڈیلوگ سیسٹم کو جاننے کے لئے، یہ کاغذ تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ ایک کارساز سیسٹم کے ساتھ بات کرے گا یا نہ کرے۔ اس کام کے لئے بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے ناکام ہونے کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نئی ڈاٹ سٹ بنائی ہے جو 15.160 کلمات میں سے ایک تجارتی ذهن آسانس کے حقیقی لاگ ڈاٹ سے جمع کئے گئے ہیں (اور ڈاٹ سٹ کو آسان کرنے کے لئے آسان کریں گے)۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم ٹیوٹ اور ویب تلاش کوریس کے استعمال سے تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جو کھولی دامین کارساز کلمات کے تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، جو چاٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کا کام کرتا ہے. تجربے کی آزمائش نے دکھائی کہ، حالانکہ سادہ تحقیق کی طریقے اثر ہیں، ٹیوٹوں اور جستجوں کا استعمال 86.21 سے 87.53 سے زیادہ اثر دیتا ہے.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் இறங்கிய புதிய உதவியாளர்கள் ஸ்மார்ட்போன்கள் மற்றும் வீட்டு மின்னஞ்சல் மின்னஞ்சல்கள் (உ. ம். சிரி மற்றும் அலெக்சா) டொமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட பணி திசைக்கப இத்தகைய ஹைப்ரிட் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளை அறிந்து கொள்ள, இந்த தாள் கணினியில் ஒரு பயனர் உரையாடல் இருக்குமா என்பதை தீர்மானிக இந்த பணிக்கான பெங்க்மேக் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை முடியாது, நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம், ஒரு வியாபாரத்திற்கு புதிய புதிய தகவல் செயல்பாட்டில் இருந்த மேலும், நாம் திறந்த டொமைன் பயனர் சொல்லுகளை கையாளும் பொருட்டு tweets மற்றும் வலை தேடுதல் கேள்விகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், இது அரட சோதனையின் சோதனைகள் எளிதாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முறைகள் செயல்படுத்தப்படும் போது, தொடர்கள் மற்றும் தேடுதல் கேள்விகள் மேலும் F_ 1- மதிப்பு 86. 21 வரை 8', 'uz': "Yaqinda ochilgan smartphone va uy elektronika (m.g. Siri va Alexa) yordamchilar domen-specific vazifaning muloqat tizimi va vazifa emas emas boʻlgan muloqat tizimlari sifatida ko'ra oladi. Bu huddi hybrid dialogi tizimini aniqlash uchun, bu qogʻoz foydalanuvchi tizim bilan talab qilishini aniqlaydi. Bu vazifa uchun benchmark maʼlumotlar maʼlumotlarini talab qilish uchun, biz bir tizimni qiziqarish amalga oshirish uchun 15,160 ta'minlovchi maʼlumotlar soʻzlarini yaratib turamiz. Koʻrsatgich, bu chat topish vazifasini aniqlash uchun ochiq domen foydalanuvchi soʻzlarini qoʻllash uchun Twitterlar va veb qidirish soʻrovlarini bajaramiz. Tekshirish imtiyozlarini ko'rsatadi, oddiy boshqaruvchi usullar ishlayotganda, Twitterdan foydalanish va qidirish soʻrovlari 86.21 dan 87.53dan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Trợ lý thông minh vừa xuất hiện về điện thoại thông minh và điện tử tại quê (v.d. Siri, Siri và Alexa) có thể được xem như là những người lai tạo mới của các hệ thống thoại ngôn ngữ vu- Để thực hiện hệ thống đối thoại lai, tờ giấy này sẽ tìm hiểu xem người dùng có định nói chuyện với hệ thống hay không. Để giải quyết sự thiếu các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập tin mới, gồm có 15,160 từ những phát từ dữ liệu ghi chép thực sự của một trợ lý lý thông minh thương mại (và sẽ công bố bộ dữ liệu để hỗ trợ nghiên cứu tương lai). Ngoài ra, chúng tôi điều tra bằng việc sử dụng Twitter và tìm kiếm trên mạng để xử lý những lời người dùng mở miền, đặc trưng cho nhiệm vụ phát hiện chat. Thử nghiệm đã chứng minh rằng, trong khi các phương pháp đơn giản được giám sát có hiệu quả, việc sử dụng Twitter và tìm kiếm cải tiến việc tìm kiếm nhiều hơn trong số số lượng chữ "F".', 'da': 'Nyligt opståede intelligente assistenter inden for smartphones og hjemmeelektronik (f.eks. Siri og Alexa) kan ses som nye hybrider af domænespecifikke opgaveorienterede taledialogsystemer og åbent domæne ikke-opgaveorienterede systemer. For at realisere sådanne hybride dialogsystemer undersøger denne artikel at afgøre, om en bruger skal have en chat med systemet eller ej. For at afhjælpe manglen på benchmark datasæt til denne opgave konstruerer vi et nyt datasæt bestående af 15.160 udtalelser indsamlet fra virkelige logdata fra en kommerciel intelligent assistent (og vil frigive datasættet for at lette fremtidig forskningsaktivitet). Derudover undersøger vi ved hjælp af tweets og websøgeforespørgsler til håndtering af åbent domæne brugerudtalelser, som karakteriserer opgaven med chat detektering. Eksperimentelle eksperimenter viste, at selvom simple overvågede metoder er effektive, forbedrer brugen af tweets og søgeforespørgsler F_1-scoren yderligere fra 86,21 til 87,53.', 'bg': 'Наскоро възникналите интелигентни асистенти на смартфони и домашна електроника (например Сири и Алекса) могат да се разглеждат като нови хибриди на специфични за задачата системи за говорен диалог и такива с отворен домейн, които не са насочени към задачите. За реализиране на такива хибридни диалогови системи, тази статия изследва дали потребителят ще разговаря със системата или не. За да се справим с липсата на референтни набори от данни за тази задача, ние конструираме нов набор от данни, състоящ се от 15 160 изказвания, събрани от реалните дневници на търговски интелигентен асистент (и ще пуснем набора от данни, за да улесним бъдещата научноизследователска дейност). Освен това изследваме използването на туитове и заявки за търсене в интернет за обработка на потребителски изказвания с отворен домейн, които характеризират задачата за откриване на чат. Експерименталните експерименти показват, че макар простите надзорни методи да са ефективни, използването на туитове и заявки за търсене допълнително подобрява оценката от 86.21 на 87.53.', 'hr': 'Nedavno se pojavili inteligentni asistenti na pametnim i domaćim elektronikama (npr. Siri i Alexa) smatraju novim hibridima razgovornih sustava dijaloga s specifičnim zadacima i otvorenim domenima koji nisu orijentirani na zadacima. Da bi shvatio takve hibridne dijalogske sustave, ovaj papir istražuje utvrđivanje da li će korisnik razgovarati s sustavom ili ne. Za rješavanje nedostatka standardnih podataka za ovaj zadatak, izgradimo novi sastav podataka koji se sastoji od 15.160 izjava prikupljenih iz pravih podataka o dnevniku komercijalnog inteligentnog asistenta (i oslobodićemo sastav podataka kako bi olakšali buduću istraživačku aktivnost). Osim toga, istražujemo korištenje tweets i web pretraživanja za rješavanje riječi korisnika otvorenog domena, koje karakteriziraju zadatak otkrivanja razgovora. Eksperimentalni eksperimenti pokazali su da, iako su jednostavne nadzorne metode učinkovite, korištenje tweeta i pretraživanja ispitivanja dalje poboljšava F_1 rezultat od 86,21 do 87,53.', 'nl': 'Recent verschenen intelligente assistenten op smartphones en huishoudelijke elektronica (bijvoorbeeld Siri en Alexa) kunnen worden gezien als nieuwe hybriden van domeinspecifieke taakgerichte gesproken dialoogsystemen en open-domein niet-taakgerichte systemen. Om dergelijke hybride dialoogsystemen te realiseren, onderzoekt dit artikel of een gebruiker wel of niet een praatje met het systeem gaat maken. Om het gebrek aan benchmark datasets voor deze taak aan te pakken, bouwen we een nieuwe dataset bestaande uit 15.160 uitingen verzameld uit de echte loggegevens van een commerciële intelligente assistent (en zullen we de dataset vrijgeven om toekomstige onderzoeksactiviteiten te vergemakkelijken). Daarnaast onderzoeken we het gebruik van tweets en zoekopdrachten op het web om open-domein gebruikersuitingen te behandelen, die kenmerkend zijn voor de taak van chatdetectie. Experimentele experimenten toonden aan dat, hoewel eenvoudige begeleide methoden effectief zijn, het gebruik van de tweets en zoekopdrachten de F_1-score verder verbetert van 86.21 tot 87.53.', 'de': 'Neu aufgetauchte intelligente Assistenten auf Smartphones und Heimelektronik (z.B. Siri und Alexa) können als neuartige Hybride von domänenspezifischen aufgabenorientierten gesprochenen Dialogsystemen und aufgabenorientierten Open-Domain-Systemen gesehen werden. Um solche hybriden Dialogsysteme zu realisieren, wird untersucht, ob ein Benutzer mit dem System chatten wird oder nicht. Um das Fehlen von Benchmark-Datensätzen für diese Aufgabe zu beheben, konstruieren wir einen neuen Datensatz, der aus 15,160 Äußerungen besteht, die aus den realen Protokolldaten eines kommerziellen intelligenten Assistenten gesammelt wurden (und werden den Datensatz veröffentlichen, um zukünftige Forschungsaktivitäten zu erleichtern). Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir mittels Tweets und Web-Suchabfragen die Handhabung von Open-Domain-User-Äußerungen, die die Aufgabe der Chat-Erkennung charakterisieren. Experimentelle Experimente zeigten, dass zwar einfache überwachte Methoden effektiv sind, aber die Verwendung der Tweets und Suchanfragen den F_1-Score von 86.21 auf 87.53 weiter verbessert.', 'id': 'Asisten intelijen yang baru-baru ini muncul pada ponsel cerdas dan elektronik rumah (contohnya Siri dan Alexa) dapat dilihat sebagai hibrid baru dari sistem dialog berbicara orient tugas-spesifik domain dan sistem dialog buka-domain bukan orient tugas. Untuk menyadari sistem dialog hibrid seperti ini, kertas ini menyelidiki menentukan apakah pengguna akan berbicara dengan sistem atau tidak. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan set data benchmark untuk tugas ini, kami membangun set data baru yang terdiri dari 15.160 ucapan yang dikumpulkan dari data log nyata dari asisten intelijen komersial (dan akan melepaskan set data untuk memudahkan aktivitas penelitian di masa depan). In addition, we investigate using tweets and Web search queries for handling open-domain user utterances, which characterize the task of chat detection.  Eksperimen eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa, meskipun metode sederhana yang diawasi efektif, penggunaan tweet dan pertanyaan pencarian lebih memperbaiki skor F_1 dari 86.21 sampai 87.53.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, wasaidizi wa akili waliojitokeza kwenye simu za mkononi na elektroniki za nyumbani (kwa mfano, Siri na Alexa) wanaweza kuonekana kama mifumo ya kisasa ya mazungumzo yenye mijadala maalum ya ndani na zile ambazo hazijumuishwa kwa kazi. Kutambua mfumo wa mazungumzo kama hizi ya hybrid, gazeti hili linachunguza kama mtumiaji atakuwa na mazungumzo na mfumo. Ili kukabiliana na ukosefu wa taarifa za bendera kwa kazi hii, tunajenga seti mpya ya takwimu inayojumuisha hotuba 15,160 zilizokusanywa kutoka kwenye data halisi za kuandika kwa msaidizi wa kibiashara (na tutatoa seti ya taarifa ili kusaidia shughuli za utafiti mustakabali). In addition, we investigate using tweets and Web search queries for handling open-domain user utterances, which characterize the task of chat detection.  Majaribio ya majaribio yalionyesha kuwa, wakati mbinu rahisi zilizofuatiliwa zina ufanisi, matumizi ya twita na kutafuta yanaboresha vipindi vya F_1 kutoka 86.21 hadi 87.53.', 'ko': '최근 등장한 스마트폰과 가정용 전자기기의 스마트 조수(예를 들어 시리와 알렉사)는 특정 분야에서 임무를 위한 구어 대화 시스템과 개방 분야에서 임무를 위한 대화 시스템이 아닌 신형 혼합체로 볼 수 있다.이러한 혼합 대화 시스템을 실현하기 위해 본고는 사용자가 이 시스템과 채팅을 해야 하는지의 여부를 연구했다.이 임무의 기준 데이터 집합이 부족한 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 비즈니스 스마트 조수의 실제 로그 데이터에서 수집한 15160개의 언어를 포함하는 새로운 데이터 집합을 구축했다. (미래의 연구 활동을 추진하기 위해 이 데이터 집합을 발표할 것이다.)또한 트위터와 웹 검색 조회를 이용하여 개방역 사용자의 말을 처리하는 것이 채팅 탐지 임무의 특징이다.실험에 따르면 간단한 감독 방법은 효과가 있지만 트윗과 검색 검색을 통해 F 1 점수를 86.21에서 87.53으로 높였다.', 'fa': 'اخیراً دستیاران هوشمند در هوشمند و الکترونیک خانه (مثلاً سیری و الکسا) به عنوان هیبراید نویس از سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو با وظیفه\u200cای مشخص\u200cشده به دامنه\u200cی ویژه\u200cای و سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو\u200cهای غیر وظیفه\u200cای باز-دامنه می\u200cبینند. برای فهمیدن این سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی هیبرید، این کاغذ تحقیق می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند یک کاربر با سیستم صحبت کند یا نه. برای حل کردن کمبود داده\u200cهای مقداری برای این کار، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید از ۱۵.۶۰ کلمه\u200cای که از داده\u200cهای واقعی مجموعه\u200cشده از یک دستیاری هوشمند تجارتی جمع شده است (و مجموعه داده\u200cها را برای آسان فعالیت تحقیقات آینده آزاد می\u200cکنیم). علاوه بر این، ما با استفاده از توئیت و جستجوهای وب برای کنترل سخنرانی\u200cهای کاربر دامنه باز تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که وظیفه\u200cی شناسایی گفتگو را تشکیل می\u200cدهد. تجربه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان داده\u200cاند که در حالی که روش\u200cهای ساده\u200cی نظارت\u200cکننده\u200cای موثر هستند، استفاده از توئیت\u200cها و سوال\u200cهای جستجو\u200cها بیشتر امتیاز F_1 را از 86.21 تا 87.53 بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'Asistentët inteligjentë të shfaqur kohët e fundit në telefonat e zgjuar dhe elektronikën e shtëpisë (për shembull, Siri dhe Aleksa) mund të shihen si hibridi të rinj të sistemeve të dialogut të folur të orientuar ndaj detyrave specifike në domeni dhe të sistemeve të dialogut të hapur jo të orientuar ndaj detyrave. Për të realizuar sisteme të tilla të dialogut hibridë, kjo letër heton nëse një përdorues do të ketë apo jo një bisedë me sistemin. Për të trajtuar mungesën e grupeve të të dhënash për këtë detyrë, ne ndërtojmë një grup të ri të të dhënash që përbëhet nga 15,160 shprehje të mbledhura nga të dhënat reale të një asistenti inteligjent komercial (dhe do të lëshojmë grupin e të dhënash për të lehtësuar veprimtarinë e ardhshme të kërkimit). Përveç kësaj, ne hetojmë duke përdorur tweets dhe pyetje për kërkim në internet për trajtimin e shprehjeve të përdoruesve të dominiu të hapur, që karakterizojnë detyrën e zbulimit të bisedës. Eksperimentet eksperimentale treguan se ndërsa metodat e thjeshta të mbikqyrura janë efektive, përdorimi i tweeteve dhe kërkimeve të kërkimit përmirëson më tej rezultatin F_1 nga 86.21 në 87.53.', 'af': "Onlangs gekom inteligente assistente op smartphones en tuis elektroniese (bv. Siri en Alexa) kan gesien word as nuwe hybride van domein-spesifieke taak-orienteerde praat dialoog stelsels en open-domein nie-taak-orienteerde. Om sodanige hibride dialoog stelsels te besef, hierdie papier ondersoek om te bepaal of 'n gebruiker 'n gesprek met die stelsel gaan hê of nie. Om die ontbreek van benchmarkdatastel vir hierdie taak te adres, bou ons 'n nuwe datastel wat bestaan van 15,160 uitspraak wat versamel word van die regte log data van 'n kommersiele intelligent assistent (en sal die datastel verlos om toekomstige ondersoek aktiviteit te eenvoudig). In addition, we investigate using tweets and Web search queries for handling open-domain user utterances, which characterize the task of chat detection. Eksperimentale eksperimente het bevestig dat, terwyl eenvoudige ondersoekte metodes effektief is, die gebruik van die tweets en soektog vrae verder die F_1-telling van 86,21 tot 87,53 verbeter.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ጊዜ በሳምፎች እና በቤት ኢሌክትሪክ (ምሳሌ ሲሪ እና አሌክሳይ) የተለየ የዶሜን አካባቢ የተናገረው የስራ አካባቢ ስብሰባዎች እና የዶሜን-ስራ-ስራ-ያልታወቀ ስልጣን ስርዓቶች ሲታይ ይታያል፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ የhybrid ዳይሞክራዊ ስርዓት ለማወቅ፣ ይህ ገጽ ከሲስተም ጋር ማነጋገር ይችላል፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ የbenchmark ዳታዎችን ለማግኘት፣ የንግድ intelligent ተሟጋቾችን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን አዲስ አዲስ የዳታ ማተሚያ ሰርቨር አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የትዊተሮች እና የዌብ መረጃ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም እና የአካባቢ ስራዎችን ለክፍት የዶሜን ተጠቃሚዎች ቃላትን በመስጠት እናምርመራለን፡፡ ፈተና ፈተናዎች ከ86.21 ጀምሮ እስከ 87.53 ድረስ ቀላል ተሟጋቾች የሀብት እና የኢትዮጵያውያን ጥያቄ እየጨመረ የF_1 ነጥብ እየጨመረ ጥያቄ እያሳየቱ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Soňky wagtlar smartphones we öýde elektronikadan akylly kömekleyiciler (meselâ, Siri we Alexa) domeniň spesifikaly zady g örkezilýän dialog sistemalarynyň atly hybridleri we aç-domeniň görkezilýän zady däldir. Bu ýaly hybrid диалог sistemlerine göz öňlemek üçin, bu käbir ulançyň sistemi bilen sohbet etmegini kararylýar. Bu zadyň üçin benchmark veri setirleriniň ýok bolmagyny çözmek üçin, 15.160 sany bir kommersiýa intellekt asysteniň hakyky günlük maglumatyndan toplanýan bir günlük setirlerini çykarýarys (we veri setirlerini gelejek araştyrymy etkinleştirmek üçin azaltýarys). Üstelik, biz tweets we Web arama soraglaryny açyk-domenyň sözlerini janlaşdyrmak üçin inceleýäris. Bu suhbet keşfiniň göresini tanyşdyrmak üçin karakterlerdir. Experimental deneyler, basit gözleýän yöntemler täsirli bolup görünýärdi, tweets we gözlemek soraglarynyň ulanmagy 86,21 we 87,53-nji derejesinden gowy görýär.', 'az': 'Son zamanlarda Smartphones və Ev Elektroniklərindəki zeki yardımçılar (məsələn, Siri və Alexa) domena-specifik task-oriented danışma sistemlərinin yeni hibridləri və açıq-domain-non-task-oriented sistemlərinin yeni hibridləri g örülür. Bu hibrid dialogların sistemlərini anlamaq üçün bu kağıt sistemi ilə sohbet edəcəyini müəyyən edir və ya yoxdur. Bu işin benchmark veri qurularını çəkmək üçün yeni veri qurularını təklif edən ticarət intellekt yardımcısının gerçek log məlumatından toplanmış 15.160 söz qurulmuş bir veri quruları inşa edirik (və gələcək araştırma fəaliyyətini asanlaşdırmaq üçün veri qurularını yayınlayacağıq). Əvvəlcə, söhbət keşirməsi üçün açıq-domain istifadəçilərinin sözlərini idarə etmək üçün tweets və Web arama suallarını istifadə edirik. Experimental təcrübələri göstərdilər ki, sadəcə gözləmə metodları etkilidir, twetlərin və arama soruşmalarının istifadəsi 86,21-87,53-dən daha çox F_1-scoresini daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս զարգացած խելացի օգնականներ՝ խելացի հեռախոսներում և տնային էլեկտրոնային տեխնոլոգիայում (օրինակ Սիրին և Ալեքսան) կարելի է դիտարկել որպես նոր հիբրիդիներ, որոնք նշանակում են բնագավառի մասնավոր խնդիրներին ուղղություն ունեցող խոսակցային համա Այսպիսի հիբրիդ հաղորդակցման համակարգերի իրականացնելու համար այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է, թե արդյոք օգտագործողը պատրաստվում է խոսել համակարգի հետ, թե ոչ: Այս խնդրի վերաբերյալ համեմատային տվյալների բացակայությունը լուծելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը կազմված է 15.160 արտահայտություններից, որոնք հավաքվել են առևտրային ինտելեկտ օգնականի իրական օրագիր տվյալներից (և կհրապարակենք տվյալների համա Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, օգտագործելով թվիթեր և վեբ որոնման հարցեր բաց բնագավառի օգտագործողների արտահայտությունների վերաբերյալ, որոնք բնորոշում են զրույցի հայտնաբերման խնդիրը: Տարբերական փորձարկումները ցույց տվեցին, որ մինչդեռ պարզ վերահսկված մեթոդները արդյունավետ են, թվիթերի և որոնման հարցերի օգտագործումը ևս բարելավում է F_1-գնահատականը 86.21-ից 87.53-ին:', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি স্মার্ট ফোন এবং বাড়ির ইলেক্ট্রোনিক্স (যেমন সিরি এবং আলেক্সা) বুদ্ধিমান সহকারীদেরকে ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট কাজের ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম এবং খোলা  To realize such hybrid dialogue systems, this paper investigates determining whether or not a user is going to have a chat with the system.  এই কাজের জন্য বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের অভাব নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট নির্মাণ করি, যার মধ্যে একটি বাণিজ্যিক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিজ্ঞ সহকারীর বাস্তবতা থেকে  এছাড়াও, আমরা টুইট এবং ওয়েব অনুসন্ধান ব্যবহার করে খোলা ডোমেইন ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য হাতে অনুসন্ধান করি, যা চ্যাট আবিষ্কারের কাজের ক্ পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা প্রমাণিত হয়েছে যে যদিও সাধারণ পর্যবেক্ষণের পদ্ধতি কার্যকর, তবে টুইট এবং অনুসন্ধানের ব্যবহার এবং এফ১ স্কোর ৮৬.', 'bs': 'Nedavno se pojavili inteligentni asistenti na pametnim i domaćim elektronikama (npr. Siri i Alexa) mogu smatrati novim hibridima govornih dijalogskih sustava na domenu specifičnih zadataka i na otvorenom domenu ne orijentiranih zadataka. Da bi shvatio takve hibridne dijalogske sisteme, ovaj papir istražuje utvrđivanje da li će korisnik razgovarati sa sistemom ili ne. Za rješavanje nedostatka baznih podataka za ovaj zadatak, izgradimo novi set podataka koji se sastoji od 15.160 izjava prikupljenih iz pravih podataka dnevnika komercijalnog inteligentnog asistenta (i oslobodićemo set podataka kako bi olakšali buduću istraživačku aktivnost). Osim toga, istražujemo korištenje tweets i web pretraživanja za rješavanje riječi korisnika otvorenog domena, koje karakteriziraju zadatak otkrivanja razgovora. Eksperimentalni eksperimenti pokazali su da, iako su jednostavne nadzorne metode učinkovite, korištenje tweeta i pretraživanja ispitivanja dalje poboljšava F_1 rezultat od 86,21 do 87,53.', 'cs': 'V poslední době vzniklé inteligentní asistenti na smartphonech a domácí elektronice (např. Siri a Alexa) lze považovat za nové hybridy mluvených dialogových systémů zaměřených na doménu a neorientovaných na úkoly. Pro realizaci takových hybridních dialogových systémů zkoumá tento článek zjištění, zda uživatel bude mít či nikoli chat se systémem. Abychom řešili nedostatek referenčních datových souborů pro tento úkol, sestáváme nový datový soubor sestávající z 15,160 výroků shromážděných z reálných log dat komerčního inteligentního asistenta (a zveřejníme datový soubor pro usnadnění budoucí výzkumné činnosti). Kromě toho zkoumáme využití tweetů a webových vyhledávacích dotazů pro zpracování otevřených domén uživatelských výroků, které charakterizují úlohu detekce chatu. Experimentální experimenty ukázaly, že i když jsou účinné jednoduché kontrolované metody, použití tweetů a vyhledávacích dotazů dále zlepšuje F_1-skóre z 86.21 do 87.53.', 'ca': "Assistents intel·ligents emergents recentment en telèfons intel·ligents i electrònica domèstica (per exemple Siri i Alexa) poden ser vists com noves híbrids de sistemes de diàleg parlat orientat a tasques específices i de diàleg obert no orientat a tasques. Per adonar-se d'aquests sistemes de diàleg híbrid, aquest article investiga si un usuari parlarà amb el sistema o no. Per abordar la falta de conjunts de dades de referència per aquesta tasca, construirem un nou conjunt de dades compost de 15.160 expressions recollides a partir de les dades reals de registre d'un assistent intel·ligent comercial (i publicarem el conjunt de dades per facilitar l'activitat futura de recerca). A més, investigam fent servir tweets i preguntes a la Web per manipular expressions d'usuaris de domini obert, que caracteritzen la tasca de la detecció de charles. Els experiments experimentals van demostrar que, tot i que els mètodes simples supervisats són efectius, l'ús dels tweets i les preguntes de cerca millora encara més la puntuació F_1 de 86,21 a 87,53.", 'et': 'Hiljuti tekkinud nutitelefonide ja koduelektroonika intelligentseid assistente (nt Siri ja Alexa) võib vaadelda domeenispetsiifiliste ülesannetele orienteeritud kõneleva dialoogi ja avatud domeeni mitteülesannetele orienteeritud süsteemide uudsete hübriididena. Selliste hübriiddialoogisüsteemide realiseerimiseks uuritakse käesolevas artiklis, kas kasutaja peab süsteemiga vestlema või mitte. Selleks et lahendada võrdlusandmekogumite puudumist selle ülesande jaoks, ehitame uue andmekogumi, mis koosneb 15 160 sõnastusest, mis on kogutud ärilise intelligentse assistendi tegelikest logiandmetest (ja avaldame andmekogumi tulevase teadustegevuse hõlbustamiseks). Lisaks uurime vestluse tuvastamise ülesannet iseloomustavaid säutseid ja veebiotsingupäringuid avadomeeni kasutajate väljendite käsitlemiseks. Eksperimentaalsed katsed näitasid, et kuigi lihtsad järelevalvemeetodid on tõhusad, parandab säutsude ja otsingupäringute kasutamine F_1-skoori veelgi 86,21-lt 87,53-le.', 'fi': '횆skett채in syntyneet 채lykk채채t avustajat 채lypuhelimissa ja kotielektroniikassa (esim. Siri ja Alexa) voidaan n채hd채 uudenlaisina hybridein채 toimialueekohtaisista teht채v채l채ht철isist채 puhedialogij채rjestelmist채 ja avoimista ei-teht채v채l채ht철isist채. T채llaisten hybridi-dialogij채rjestelmien toteuttamiseksi t채ss채 ty철ss채 selvitet채채n, aikooko k채ytt채j채 keskustella j채rjestelm채n kanssa vai ei. Korjaamme vertailuaineistojen puutteen t채h채n teht채v채채n rakentamalla uuden aineiston, joka koostuu 15 160 lauseesta, jotka on ker채tty kaupallisen 채lykk채채n avustajan todellisista lokitiedoista (ja julkaisemme aineiston tulevaisuuden tutkimustoiminnan helpottamiseksi). Lis채ksi tutkimme tweettien ja verkkohakujen k채ytt철채 avoimen verkkotunnuksen k채ytt채jien sanomien k채sittelyyn, jotka luonnehtivat chatin havaitsemista. Kokeelliset kokeet osoittivat, ett채 vaikka yksinkertaiset valvotut menetelm채t ovat tehokkaita, twiittien ja hakukyselyjen k채ytt철 parantaa F_1-pistem채채r채채 entisest채채n 86,21:sta 87,53:een.', 'ha': "Ana iya gane mataimaki masu da ke samun mataimaki a yanzu masu samun hoton na Smarton da ke gida (misali, Siri da Aleca) kamar sauraren kybris na danna-masu shirya na danganta na zauren akwatin bayanin-da aka yi farin ciki da kuma masu buɗe-Domen na-orin-aiki. To, dõmin ka gane tsarin zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren ayuka, wannan takardar na gane ko ba zai iya yi amfani da shi ba da musamman na'ura. To, dõmin ka yi magana ga mangawa na danne-bangon ayuka wa wannan aikin, mu gina wani tsari na danne na haɗi da magana 15,160 wanda aka samu daga data masu gaskiyar log daga wani mataimaki mai aikin ciniki (kuma za'a sakar da data don ya yi amfani da aikin aiki na gaba). Da wannan, muna yin ƙidãya a amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu buɗe-Domen da ake amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu buɗe-Domen, wanda ke ƙayyade aikin zai gano na mazaɓa. Tajarakin jarrabai sun nuna cewa, a lokacin da metoden da aka lissafa masu amfani da shiryayyu sun kasance masu amfani da amfani da watumin Twitter da tambayar search yana ƙara ƙara kowon F_1 daga 86.21 zuwa 87.53.", 'sk': 'Nedavno nastale inteligentne pomočnike na pametnih telefonih in domači elektroniki (npr. Siri in Alexa) je mogoče obravnavati kot nove hibride sistemov govornega dialoga, usmerjenih v naloge, in sistemov govornega dialoga, usmerjenih v odprto domeno, ki niso usmerjeni v naloge. Za uresničitev takšnih hibridnih dialogskih sistemov v prispevku raziskujemo, ali bo uporabnik klepetal s sistemom ali ne. Da bi odpravili pomanjkanje referenčnih naborov podatkov za to nalogo, izdelamo nov nabor podatkov, sestavljen iz 15.160 izjav, zbranih iz resničnih dnevniških podatkov komercialnega inteligentnega asistenta (in ga bomo objavili za olajšanje prihodnjih raziskovalnih dejavnosti). Poleg tega raziskujemo uporabo tweetov in spletnih iskalnih poizvedb za obdelavo uporabniških izjav odprte domene, ki značajo nalogo zaznavanja klepeta. Eksperimentalni poskusi so pokazali, da čeprav so preproste nadzorovane metode učinkovite, uporaba tweetov in iskalnih poizvedb dodatno izboljša F_1-rezultat s 86,21 na 87,53.', 'he': "עוזרים אינטליגנטיים שנוצאים לאחרונה בטלפונים חכמים והאלקטרוניקה בבית (למשל סירי ואלכסה) יכולים להיראות כאיברידים חדשים של מערכות דיאלוג מדברים מסויימות למשימות מסויימות למשימות ולא מסויימות למשימות. To realize such hybrid dialogue systems, this paper investigates determining whether or not a user is going to have a chat with the system.  כדי להתמודד עם חוסר קבוצת מידע רמז למשימה הזאת, אנו בונים קבוצת מידע חדשה שמכילה 15,160 מבטאות שנאספו מהמידע האמיתי של עוזר אינטליגנטי מסחרי (ונפרסם את קבוצת מידע כדי להקל פעילות מחקר עתידית). חוץ מזה, אנו חוקרים באמצעות טוויטים וביקשות חיפוש באינטרנט לטפל במאמרים של משתמשים בתחום פתוח, שמתאימים את המשימה של זיהוי צ'אט. ניסויים ניסיוניים הראו כי, בעוד שיטות שולטות פשוטות הן יעילות, השימוש של הטוויטים ובבקשות חיפוש משפר עוד את נקודת F_1 מ-86.21 ל-87.53.", 'jv': 'Nehase bukane deplase pamunting Assts on pamunts karo peter electrons (isim, sir dan aleks) can be see as new HyBridge of domain-special task-Oriented spoken dialog sistems and open-domain nontask-Oriented on e. Ngawe ngerasai sistem HyBridge-dialog sing dikarepaké, pepperuh iki ngono nggunakake tresnaning bakal dumadhi nganggo sistem. Ngawe mbukake data sing ora nggawe perbudhakan kanggo nggawe operasi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe dataset sing mpujur karo In Addition, we istrage use Tuts and web Search query for manipulating open-domain user words, that character character the task of conversation detection. Name', 'bo': 'Recently emerged intelligent assistants on smartphones and home electronics (e.g. Siri and Alexa) can be seen as novel hybrids of domain-specific task-oriented spoken dialog systems and open-domain non-task-oriented ones. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ལམ་ལ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ན་མིན་འདུག To address the lack of benchmark datasets for this task, we construct a new data set consisting of 15,160 utterances collected from the real log data of a commercial intelligent assistant (and will release the dataset to facilitate the future research activity). འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་tweets་དང་དྲ་རྒྱ་འཚོལ་བྱེད་པའི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་domain་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། Experimental experiments demonstrated that, while simple supervised methods are effective, the use of the tweets and search queries further improves the F_1-score from 86.21 to 87.53.'}
{'en': 'A Neural Local Coherence Model', 'ar': 'نموذج التماسك العصبي المحلي', 'fr': 'Un modèle de cohérence locale neuronale', 'pt': 'Um modelo de coerência local neural', 'es': 'Un modelo de coherencia local neuronal', 'ja': '神経局所コヒーレンスモデル', 'zh': '神经局部相干模形', 'ru': 'Модель нейронной локальной когерентности', 'hi': 'एक तंत्रिका स्थानीय सुसंगतता मॉडल', 'ga': 'Múnla Comhtháthaithe Áitiúil Néarach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής τοπικής συνοχής', 'hu': 'Neurális helyi koherencia modell', 'it': 'Un modello di coerenza locale neurale', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Neuralinės vietos sanglaudos modelis', 'kk': 'Нейрондық жергілікті согластыру үлгісі', 'ms': 'Model Kesesuaian Setempat Neural', 'ml': 'ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d കോഹെറന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200dName', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл орон нутгийн соёлын загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Koerenza Lokali Newrali', 'pl': 'Neuralny model spójności lokalnej', 'ro': 'Un model de coerență locală neurală', 'sr': 'Neuralni model lokalne koherencije', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරල් ස්ථානික සංවේදනය මඩේල්', 'so': 'Modeel of herence deegaanka', 'sv': 'En neural lokal sammanhållningsmodell', 'ta': 'ஒரு புதிய உள்ளார்ந்த இணைப்பு மாதிரி', 'ur': 'ایک نئورل محلی محترم موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình liên kết thần kinh cục bộ', 'da': 'En neural lokal sammenhængsmodel', 'bg': 'Модел на неврална локална съгласуваност', 'nl': 'Een neuraal lokaal coherentiemodel', 'hr': 'Model neurološke lokalne koherencije', 'ko': '일종의 신경 국부 상간 모형', 'id': 'Model Koerensi Lokal Neural', 'fa': 'یک مدل هماهنگی محلی عصبی', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Ushirikiano wa Ndani', 'de': 'Ein neuronales lokales Kohärenzmodell', 'tr': 'Nöral ýerleşdirim Mazmunlary', 'sq': 'Një model koherence lokale neurone', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': '썎状污夠牥楬씠즞犙汦駉浮駉䴠摯汥੩', 'ca': 'A Neural Local Coherence Model', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Model neurološke lokalne koherencije', 'af': 'Name', 'et': 'Neuraalse kohaliku sidususe mudel', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen paikallinen koherenssimalli', 'cs': 'Model neuronové lokální soudržnosti', 'sk': 'Model nevralne lokalne koherence', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'model Ketoken Neral', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Neural Local Coherence Model'}
{'en': 'We propose a local coherence model based on a convolutional neural network that operates over the entity grid representation of a text. The model captures long range entity transitions along with entity-specific features without loosing generalization, thanks to the power of distributed representation. We present a pairwise ranking method to train the model in an end-to-end fashion on a task and learn task-specific high level features. Our evaluation on three different coherence assessment tasks demonstrates that our model achieves state of the art results outperforming existing models by a good margin.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذج تماسك محلي يعتمد على شبكة عصبية تلافيفية تعمل عبر تمثيل شبكة الكيان للنص. يلتقط النموذج انتقالات الكيانات طويلة المدى جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات الخاصة بالكيان دون فقدان التعميم ، وذلك بفضل قوة التمثيل الموزع. نقدم طريقة ترتيب زوجي لتدريب النموذج بطريقة شاملة على مهمة ما وتعلم ميزات عالية المستوى خاصة بالمهمة. يوضح تقييمنا لثلاث مهام مختلفة لتقييم التماسك أن نموذجنا يحقق أحدث النتائج التي تفوقت على النماذج الحالية بهامش جيد.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle de cohérence locale basé sur un réseau neuronal convolutif qui fonctionne sur la représentation en grille d'entité d'un texte. Le modèle capture les transitions d'entités à longue portée ainsi que les caractéristiques spécifiques à l'entité sans perdre la généralisation, grâce à la puissance de la représentation distribuée. Nous présentons une méthode de classement par paires pour entraîner le modèle de bout en bout sur une tâche et apprendre des fonctionnalités de haut niveau spécifiques à une tâche. Notre évaluation de trois tâches d'évaluation de la cohérence différentes démontre que notre modèle atteint des résultats de pointe surpassant de loin les modèles existants.", 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo de coerência local baseado em uma rede neural convolucional que opera sobre a representação da grade de entidades de um texto. O modelo captura transições de entidade de longo alcance junto com recursos específicos de entidade sem perder a generalização, graças ao poder da representação distribuída. Apresentamos um método de classificação de pares para treinar o modelo de ponta a ponta em uma tarefa e aprender recursos de alto nível específicos da tarefa. Nossa avaliação em três diferentes tarefas de avaliação de coerência demonstra que nosso modelo alcança resultados de última geração superando os modelos existentes por uma boa margem.', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo de coherencia local basado en una red neuronal convolucional que opera sobre la representación de cuadrícula de entidad de un texto. El modelo captura transiciones de entidades de largo alcance junto con características específicas de la entidad sin perder la generalización, gracias al poder de la representación distribuida. Presentamos un método de clasificación por parejas para entrenar al modelo de manera integral en una tarea y aprender las características de alto nivel específicas de la tarea. Nuestra evaluación de tres tareas diferentes de evaluación de la coherencia demuestra que nuestro modelo logra resultados de vanguardia que superan a los modelos existentes por un buen margen.', 'ja': 'テキストのエンティティグリッド表現上で動作する畳み込みニューラルネットワークに基づいたローカルコヒーレンスモデルを提案します。このモデルは、分散表現のパワーのおかげで、一般化を失うことなく、エンティティ固有の機能と共に長距離エンティティのトランジションをキャプチャします。タスクについてエンドツーエンドでモデルをトレーニングし、タスク固有のハイレベル機能を学習するためのペアワイズランキング方法を提示します。3つの異なるコヒーレンス評価タスクに関する当社の評価は、当社のモデルが、既存のモデルをかなりのマージンで上回る最先端の結果を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '吾立卷积神经网络之局一致性,当以文本网格行。 分布式之强大,得长距离转特定,不失泛化也。 立成对排名之法,以端训练任务其形,而学特定于高第。 三者不同一致性质之质也,取优于今最新也。', 'hi': 'हम एक convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क है कि एक पाठ के इकाई ग्रिड प्रतिनिधित्व पर संचालित पर आधारित एक स्थानीय सुसंगतता मॉडल का प्रस्ताव है. मॉडल वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व की शक्ति के लिए धन्यवाद, सामान्यीकरण खोने के बिना इकाई-विशिष्ट सुविधाओं के साथ लंबी दूरी के इकाई संक्रमण को कैप्चर करता है। हम एक कार्य पर एक एंड-टू-एंड फैशन में मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने और कार्य-विशिष्ट उच्च स्तर की सुविधाओं को सीखने के लिए एक जोड़ीवार रैंकिंग विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। तीन अलग-अलग सुसंगतता मूल्यांकन कार्यों पर हमारा मूल्यांकन दर्शाता है कि हमारा मॉडल एक अच्छे मार्जिन से मौजूदा मॉडल को पछाड़ने वाले कला परिणामों की स्थिति प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем модель локальной когерентности, основанную на сверточной нейронной сети, которая работает над представлением текста в виде сетки сущностей. Модель захватывает большие переходы сущностей наряду с специфическими для сущностей особенностями, не теряя обобщения, благодаря силе распределенного представления. Мы представляем метод попарного ранжирования для обучения модели сквозным образом на задаче и изучения специфических для задачи функций высокого уровня. Наша оценка по трем различным задачам оценки согласованности показывает, что наша модель достигает современных результатов, превосходящих существующие модели с хорошим запасом.', 'ga': 'Molaimid múnla comhleanúnachais áitiúil a bheidh bunaithe ar líonra néarúil comhbheartaithe a fheidhmíonn thar léiriú greille aonáin ar théacs. Gabhann an tsamhail aistrithe aonáin fadraoin mar aon le gnéithe a bhaineann go sonrach le haonáin gan ginearálú a chailleadh, a bhuí le cumhacht na hionadaíochta dáilte. Cuirimid i láthair modh rangú péirewise chun an tsamhail a oiliúint ar bhealach ceann go ceann ar thasc agus chun gnéithe ardleibhéil a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc a fhoghlaim. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht ar thrí thasc measúnaithe comhleanúnachais dhifriúla go n-éiríonn lenár múnla torthaí den scoth a sháraíonn na samhlacha atá ann cheana féin le corrlach maith.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მუშაობთ ლოკალური კონგუროლური ნეიროლური ქსელის დაბაზედ, რომელიც ტექსტის რედაქტირებას ინტერტიკური ქსელის მხარეს გამოყენება. მოდელეში განსაზღვრებული ელექტიკის გადატანა განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით გენერალიზაციას გაუშვება ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენეთ მოდელს დასასრულებელი მოდელზე დასასრულებელი მოდელზე და დავასწავლობთ რაოდენობის განსაკუთრებული მაღალი მოდელზე. ჩვენი განსაზღვრება სამი განსხვავებული კონექციენტის დავამუშავება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძ', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα τοπικό μοντέλο συνοχής βασισμένο σε ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο που λειτουργεί πάνω από την αναπαράσταση πλέγματος οντότητας ενός κειμένου. Το μοντέλο συλλαμβάνει μεταβάσεις οντότητας μεγάλης εμβέλειας μαζί με χαρακτηριστικά ειδικά για οντότητα χωρίς να χάνει τη γενίκευση, χάρη στη δύναμη της κατανεμημένης αναπαράστασης. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο κατάταξης ζευγαριών για να εκπαιδεύσετε το μοντέλο με τρόπο τέλους σε μια εργασία και να μάθετε ειδικά χαρακτηριστικά υψηλού επιπέδου. Η αξιολόγησή μας σε τρεις διαφορετικές εργασίες αξιολόγησης συνοχής αποδεικνύει ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας που ξεπερνούν τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα με καλό περιθώριο.', 'hu': 'Helyi koherencia modellt javasolunk, amely egy szöveg entitásrács reprezentációján keresztül működik, konvolúciós neurális hálózaton alapul. A modell az elosztott reprezentáció erejének köszönhetően hosszú távú entitási átmeneteket és entitásspecifikus jellemzőket rögzít anélkül, hogy elveszítené az általánosítást. Bemutatunk egy páros rangsorolási módszert, amelynek segítségével a modell végtől végig képezhető egy feladatra, és megtanulható a feladatspecifikus magas szintű funkciók. Három különböző koherencia-értékelési feladatra vonatkozó értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy modellünk a legkorszerűbb eredményeket ér el jó áron felül a meglévő modelleknél.', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello di coerenza locale basato su una rete neurale convoluzionale che opera sulla rappresentazione della griglia di entità di un testo. Il modello cattura transizioni di entità a lungo raggio insieme a caratteristiche specifiche di entità senza perdere generalizzazione, grazie al potere della rappresentazione distribuita. Presentiamo un metodo di posizionamento a coppie per addestrare il modello in modo end-to-end su un compito e imparare caratteristiche di alto livello specifiche per attività. La nostra valutazione su tre diversi compiti di valutazione della coerenza dimostra che il nostro modello raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia superiori ai modelli esistenti con un buon margine.", 'kk': 'Біз жергілікті сәйкестік үлгісін мәтін түсіндіру үшін жұмыс істейтін жергілікті невралдық желіне негізделген невралдық желіне қолданып тастаймыз. Бұл үлгі жалпы түрлендіру үшін, үлестірілген кеңістіктердің күшін ұзын ауқымдарды ұзын ауқымдарды ұстайды. Біз үлгісін бір тапсырманың соңғы- соңғы режімінде оқыту және тапсырманың ерекше жоғары деңгейінің мүмкіндіктерін оқыту үшін екі жоғары жоғары жоғары жоға Біздің үш түрлі согластық оқу тапсырмаларының оқиғаларымызды көрсету үшін моделіміздің оқиғаларының күйін жақсы шектеу арқылы бар моделдердің күйін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome vietos nuoseklumo model į, pagrįstą konvoliuciniu nerviniu tinklu, kuris veikia per subjekto tinklo atstovavimą tekstui. Modelis apima ilgalaikius ūkio subjektų perėjimus kartu su konkrečiais ūkio subjektams būdingomis savybėmis, tačiau dėl paskirstyto atstovavimo galios nesumažėja generalizacijos. Pateikiame parių klasifikavimo metodą, pagal kurį modelis mokomas nuo pabaigos į užduotį ir mokomas su užduotimi susijusių aukšto lygio savybių. Mūsų atliktas trijų skirtingų nuoseklumo vertinimo užduočių vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia geriausius rezultatus, palyginti su esamais modeliais, geru maržu.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പാഠത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ ശരീരത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രിഡിന്റെ മേല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രാദേശികമായ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല സാധാരണ പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിഫലങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം മോഡല്\u200d നീണ്ട നീണ്ട ശേഖരം പിടിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നു ഒരു ജോലിക്ക് അവസാന രീതിയില്\u200d മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനും ജോലിക്ക് പ്രത്യേകം ഉയര്\u200dന്ന നിലയില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാനും ഒരു ജോട് മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിഗണന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വിശ്വാസം നല്ല മാര്\u200dഗിനില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model kesehatan setempat berdasarkan rangkaian saraf konvolutional yang berfungsi di atas perwakilan grid entiti teks. Model menangkap transisi entiti jangkauan panjang bersama dengan ciri-ciri entiti-khusus tanpa kehilangan generalisasi, berkat kuasa perwakilan yang disebarkan. Kami memperkenalkan kaedah peringkat sepasang untuk melatih model dalam cara akhir-akhir pada tugas dan belajar ciri-ciri tahap tinggi khusus tugas. Evaluasi kami pada tiga tugas penilaian kesehatan yang berbeza menunjukkan bahawa model kami mencapai keputusan terbaik melampaui prestasi model yang ada dengan margin yang baik.', 'mn': 'Бид энзитуудын хэлбэрийн зураг дээр ажилладаг холбоотой мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан орон нутгийн холбоотой загварыг санал болгож байна. Загвар нь хуваагдсан үзүүлэлтийн хүчирхэг байдлын талаар хуваагдсан загвар нь урт загварын загварын шилжилт байдаг. Бид загварыг төгсгөл, төгсгөл хэмжээнд суралцах, ажлын төвөгтэй өндөр хэмжээний талаар суралцах хоёр дахь загварын аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний гурван өөр нэгдлийн оюутнуудын үнэлгээ нь бидний загвар нь урлагийн үр дүнд оршиж буй загваруудыг сайн загвараар үр дүнтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudell ta’ koerenza lokali bbażat fuq netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali li jopera fuq ir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-grilja tal-entità ta’ test. Il-mudell jaqbad tranżizzjonijiet ta’ entitajiet fuq medda twila flimkien ma’ karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-entità mingħajr ma tintilef il-ġeneralizzazzjoni, bis-saħħa tar-rappreżentanza distribwita. Aħna nippreżentaw metodu ta’ klassifikazzjoni bejn il-pari biex in ħarrġu l-mudell b’mod minn tarf sa tarf fuq kompitu u nitgħallmu karatteristiċi ta’ livell għoli speċifiċi għall-kompitu. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna dwar tliet kompiti differenti ta’ valutazzjoni ta’ koerenza turi li l-mudell tagħna jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati li jaqbżu l-mudelli eżistenti b’marġini tajjeb.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein lokal konsekvensmodell basert på eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk som fungerer over einingar- rutenettet som representerer eit tekst. Modellen får overgangar av lang område for entitet saman med entitetsspesifikke funksjonar utan å løysa generellisering, takk på kraft på distribuert representasjon. Vi presenterer ein par rankingsmetode for å trena modellen på ein sluttmodus på ei oppgåve og lære oppgåve-spesifikke høg nivå-funksjonar. Vårt evaluering på tre ulike konsekvensevalueringsoppgåver viser at modellen vårt gjer tilstand til kunstresultatet som utfører eksisterande modeller med ein god margin.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy lokalny model spójności oparty na konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej, która działa na przedstawieniu siatki jednostki tekstu. Model rejestruje przejścia jednostek o dużym zasięgu wraz z cechami specyficznymi dla jednostek bez utraty uogólnienia, dzięki mocy reprezentacji rozproszonej. Przedstawiamy metodę rankingu parowego, aby szkolić model w sposób end-to-end na zadanie i uczyć się specyficznych funkcji wysokiego poziomu. Nasza ocena trzech różnych zadań oceny spójności pokazuje, że nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki przewyższające istniejące modele.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model de coerență locală bazat pe o rețea neuronală convoluțională care funcționează peste reprezentarea rețelei entității unui text. Modelul surprinde tranzițiile entităților cu rază lungă de acțiune împreună cu caracteristicile specifice entității fără a pierde generalizarea, datorită puterii reprezentării distribuite. Vă prezentăm o metodă de clasificare pereche pentru a instrui modelul într-un mod end-to-end pe o sarcină și a învăța caracteristici de nivel înalt specific sarcinii. Evaluarea noastră privind trei sarcini diferite de evaluare a coerenței demonstrează că modelul nostru obține rezultate de ultimă generație superioară modelelor existente cu o marjă bună.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo lokalni model saslušnosti na osnovu konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja funkcioniše preko predstavljanja entitetske mreže teksta. Model uhvati prelaze dugog dometa entiteta zajedno sa specifičnim karakteristikama entiteta bez oslobađanja generalizacije zahvaljujući moći raspodjeljenog predstavljanja. Predstavljamo metodu određenog reda za trening model a na kraju do kraja na zadatku i naučimo posebne osobine visokog nivoa na zadatku. Naša procjena o tri različita zadatka za procjenu saslušnosti pokazuje da naš model postiže stanje rezultata umjetnosti iznad izvršenja postojećih modela na dobroj marži.', 'si': 'අපි ස්ථානික සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. මොඩේල් ලොකු විස්තාරයක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සමග ඉන්න විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් සමග සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවර්තනය නැතුව, විදුලි ප්\u200d අපි මොඩල් එක අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ක්\u200dරියාවෙන් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙන්නේ. අපේ වෙනස් සංවිධානය තුනක් විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක හොඳ මාර්ගයෙන් තියෙනවා කියලා', 'mk': 'We propose a local coherence model based on a convolutional neural network that operates over the entity grid representation of a text.  Моделот ги фаќа транзициите на ентитетите на долго растојание заедно со фигурностите специфични за ентитетите без губење на генерализацијата, благодарение на моќта на дистрибуираната претставност. Презентираме метод од парови за рангирање за обука на моделот од крај до крај на задача и научи специфични функции на високо ниво. Нашата проценка на три различни задачи за проценка на кохеренцијата покажува дека нашиот модел постигнува најдобри резултати над постоечките модели со добра маргина.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa tusaale-wadajir ah oo ku saleysan shabakadda neuro-qabsiga oo ka shaqeeya xarunta macluumaadka ku qoran. Tusaale wuxuu qabsadaa baaritaanka jidhka oo aad u dheer ku wareegsan, iyadoo ay leedahay tayooyin gaar ah oo aan la bilaabayn dhalashada, waxaana ku mahad leh xoogga loo qeybiyay. Waxaannu qabannaa qaab aad leedahay labada nooc oo caqli ah si a an u tababarinno modelka ugu dhammaadka ugu dambaysta iyo si aan u barno gaar ah heerka sare. Qiimeyntayada ku saabsan saddex shaqooyin oo kala duduwan ee qiimeynta iskaashatada ayaa caddaynaya in modellkayagu uu gaadho xaaladda arimaha farshaxanka oo uu sameynayo modellada joogta oo ku qoran marxalad wanaagsan.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en lokal sammanhållningsmodell baserad på ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk som fungerar över entitetsrutnätet representation av en text. Modellen fångar entitetsövergångar med lång räckvidd tillsammans med entitetsspecifika funktioner utan att förlora generalisering, tack vare kraften i distribuerad representation. Vi presenterar en parvis rankningsmetod för att träna modellen på ett heltäckande sätt på en uppgift och lära sig uppgiftsspecifika högnivåfunktioner. Vår utvärdering av tre olika konsekvensbedömningsuppgifter visar att vår modell uppnår toppmoderna resultat som överträffar befintliga modeller med god marginal.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு முழுமையான பாதுகாப்பு வலைப்பின்னலை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு உள்ளூர் இணைப்பு மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது உரைய Name We present a pairwise ranking method to train the model in an end-to-end fashion on a task and learn task-specific high level features.  மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமான காரியங்களில் நம் மதிப்பு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு நல்ல முறையில் இருக்கும் மாதிரிகளை செ', 'ur': 'ہم ایک محلی موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک متن کی تصویر کے ذریعہ ایک کنوولیوشن نیورال نیٹورک پر بنیاد ہے۔ Model captures long range entity transitions along with entity-specific features without loosing generalization, thanks to the power of distributed representation. ہم ایک جوڑی رانڈ طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک کام پر موڈل کی تعلیم کریں اور ایک کام کے مطابق اچھی سطح کے مطابق تعلیم کریں. ہمارا ارزیابی تین مختلف مشترک ارزیابی کاموں کے بارے میں دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری مدل اچھی مرز سے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz matnning tashkilotlarini boshqarishi mumkin neyron tarmoq asosida ishlab chiqaradigan lokal bir modelni tahlil qilamiz. Name Vazifani oxiriga o'rganish va vazifa muhit darajada o'rganish uchun modelni o'rganish uchun bir ikki xil chegara boshqaruvchi usuli. Bizning uchta boshqa bir xil vazifalar haqida qiymatmiz esa modelmiz yaxshi darajada mavjud modellarni bajarayotgan sanam natijalarini bajarishimizni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình sự tương đồng địa phương dựa trên một mạng thần kinh rối loạn hoạt động qua các đại diện mạng lưới thực thể của một văn bản. Mô hình thu được sự chuyển tiếp của thực thể dài hạn cùng với tính năng đặc trưng của thực thể mà không mất đi sự tổng hợp, nhờ vào sức mạnh của phân phát. Chúng tôi trình bày phương pháp xếp hạng kép để huấn luyện mô hình theo cách đích thực trong một nhiệm vụ và học các tính năng cao cấp đặc nhiệm. Bài đánh giá về ba nhiệm vụ đánh giá sự đồng bộ khác nhau chứng minh rằng mô hình của chúng ta đạt được kết quả hiện đại vượt trội các mô hình hiện có với một khoảng cách tốt.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме модел на локална съгласуваност, базиран на конволюционна невронна мрежа, която работи върху представянето на текст в мрежата на единиците. Моделът улавя преходи на обекти от дълъг обхват заедно със специфични за единицата функции, без да губи обобщението, благодарение на силата на разпределеното представяне. Представяме метод за класиране по двойки, за да обучим модела от край до край върху задача и да научим специфични за задачата функции на високо ниво. Нашата оценка на три различни задачи за оценка на съгласуваността показва, че нашият модел постига най-съвременни резултати над съществуващите модели с добър марж.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo lokalni model saslušnosti na temelju konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja djeluje preko mreže entiteta predstavljanja teksta. Model uključuje prijenos dugog raspona entiteta zajedno s specifičnim karakteristikama entiteta bez oslobađanja generalizacije zahvaljujući moći raspodjeljenog predstavljanja. Predstavljamo metodu za određene redove za treniranje model a na kraju do kraja na zadatku i naučiti određene karakteristike visoke razine zadatka. Naša procjena o tri različita zadatka za procjenu saslušnosti pokazuje da naš model postigne stanje rezultata umjetnosti iznad izvršenja postojećih modela dobrom marginom.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en lokal kohærens model baseret på et konvulutivt neuralt netværk, der opererer over entitetsgitterets repræsentation af en tekst. Modellen indfanger overgange til enheder med lang rækkevidde sammen med enhedsspecifikke funktioner uden at miste generalisering takket være styrken i distribueret repræsentation. Vi præsenterer en parvis ranking metode til at træne modellen på en end-to-end måde på en opgave og lære opgavespecifikke højt niveau funktioner. Vores evaluering af tre forskellige sammenhængsvurderingsopgaver viser, at vores model opnår topmoderne resultater, der med god margin overgår eksisterende modeller.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model koerensi lokal berdasarkan jaringan saraf konvolusi yang beroperasi di atas representation jaringan entitas teks. Model menangkap transisi entitas jangkauan panjang bersama dengan ciri-ciri entity-spesifik tanpa kehilangan generalisasi, berkat kekuatan representation yang disebarkan. Kami mempersembahkan metode peringkat sepasang untuk melatih model dengan cara akhir-akhir pada tugas dan belajar ciri-ciri tingkat tinggi spesifik tugas. Evaluasi kami pada tiga tugas penilaian koerensi yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa model kami mencapai hasil terbaik lebih dari performing model yang ada dengan margin yang baik.', 'nl': 'We stellen een lokaal coherentiemodel voor gebaseerd op een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk dat opereert over de entiteitsraster representatie van een tekst. Het model vangt entiteitsovergangen op lange afstand samen met entiteitsspecifieke kenmerken op zonder de generalisatie te verliezen, dankzij de kracht van gedistribueerde representatie. We presenteren een pairwise ranking methode om het model op een end-to-end manier te trainen op een taak en taakspecifieke high level features te leren. Onze evaluatie van drie verschillende coherentiebeoordelingstaken toont aan dat ons model state-of-the-art resultaten behaalt die bestaande modellen met een goede marge overtreffen.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein lokales Kohärenzmodell vor, das auf einem convolutionalen neuronalen Netzwerk basiert, das über die Entitätsraster-Darstellung eines Textes operiert. Das Modell erfasst Entity-Übergänge mit langer Reichweite und entity-spezifischen Features, ohne die Verallgemeinerung zu verlieren, dank der Macht der verteilten Repräsentation. Wir präsentieren eine paarweise Rankingmethode, um das Modell Ende-zu-Ende an einer Aufgabe zu trainieren und aufgabenspezifische High Level Features zu erlernen. Unsere Bewertung von drei verschiedenen Kohärenzbewertungsaufgaben zeigt, dass unser Modell State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse erzielt, die bestehende Modelle deutlich übertreffen.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza muundo wa ushirikiano wa eneo hilo kwa kutumia mtandao wa kikatili wa neura unaoendelea kuhusiana na kituo hicho cha ujumbe wa maandishi. Mfano huo unachukua upatikanaji wa vifaa vingi kwa muda mrefu pamoja na vipengele maalum bila kutoa uzalishaji, shukrani kwa nguvu ya uwakilishaji. Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu za rangi mbili za kufundisha muundo katika mtindo wa mwisho wa mwisho kwa juhudi na kujifunza vipengele vya juu vya kazi. Tathmini zetu kuhusu kazi tatu tofauti za pamoja zinaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inafanikiwa hali ya matokeo ya sanaa yanayotokana na mifano inayotokana na marufuku mazuri.', 'tr': 'Biz yerel bir birleşme modelini tekniğin oluşturduğu konvolusyonal nöral a ğ üzerinde temel eden bir sistem kuracağını teklif ediyoruz. Bu model birnäçe faýllary boşatmadan, beýleki çykyşyň güýçleri üçin uzyn interval taýýarlar. Biz nusgasyny soňunda-soňunda bir işe öwrenmek we taýýarlanmak üçin çift derejede düzümlenme yöntemi görkeýäris. Biziň çykyşymyz üç dürli kohereket çykyşlygymyzda çykyşlygymyz nusgasymyzyň bolan nusgalarynyň gowy gabat bilen çykyşlygyny görkezýär.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل هماهنگی محلی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس شبکه عصبی که بر روی نمایش شبکه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای از یک متن عملکرد می\u200cکند. مدل تغییرات اجتماعی طولانی را با ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای بدون آزاد کردن عمومی، به سپاس قدرت نمایش پراکنده می\u200cگیرد. ما یک روش صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی جفت را برای آموزش مدل را در یک روش پایان و پایان بر روی یک کار نشان می\u200cدهیم و ویژگی\u200cهای سطح بالا به کار خاص یاد می\u200cگیریم. ارزیابی ما در سه کار ارزیابی هماهنگی متفاوت نشان می دهد که مدل ما به وضعیت نتیجه هنری از انجام مدل موجود با یک مرز خوب رسیده است.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model koherence lokale bazuar në një rrjet nervor konvolutiv që funksionon mbi përfaqësimin e rrjetit të njësisë të një teksti. Modeli përfshin tranzicionet e njësisë me distancë të gjatë së bashku me karakteristikat specifike të njësisë pa humbur gjeneralizimin, falë fuqisë së përfaqësimit të shpërndarë. Ne paraqesim një metodë renditjeje të barabartë për të trajnuar model in në një mënyrë nga fundi në fund në një detyrë dhe për të mësuar karakteristika të nivelit të lartë specifike për detyrat. Vlerësimi ynë mbi tre detyra të ndryshme të vlerësimit të konsistencës tregon se modeli ynë arrin rezultate më të larta se modelet ekzistuese me një margin të mirë.', 'am': 'አካባቢው ግንኙነት በጽሑፍ መልዕክት ላይ የሚሠራ የኔትራዊ መረብ በመሠረት የቅርብ ብሔራዊ ሞዴል እናሳስባለን፡፡ ሞዴል የረጅም ጉዳይ አካባቢ ምርጫዎችን በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ምርጫዎች እና ማሳየትን ሳይፈታ እና የተከፈለ መልዕክት አመሰግናለሁ፡፡ ሁለትን ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃ ማሳየት እናስገድዳለን፤ ሞዴላውን ለመጨረሻ ለፍጻሜ ማስተምር እና ለስራ-ቁጥጥር ከፍተኛ ደረጃዎች ምርጫዎችን እናስተምር፡፡ የሦስት የተለያዩ የድምፅ አካሄድ ስራዎችን ማረጋገጥ ሞዴሌያችን በመልካም ማሳየት የሚኖረውን የዐርድ ፍሬዎችን የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n plaaslike koherensies model gebaseer op 'n konvolusieele neuralnetwerk wat werk oor die entiteit rooster verteenwoordigheid van 'n teks. Die model neem lank omvang entiteit oordragte saam met entiteit-spesifieke funksies sonder om generalisering te laat loos, dankie aan die krag van verspreidige voorstelling. Ons stel 'n paarspesifiseer ranking metode om die model in 'n einde-tot-einde mod op' n taak te trek en leer die taak-spesifieke hoë vlak funksies. Ons evaluering op drie verskillende koherensies-evalueringstaake bevestig dat ons model bereik staat van die kuns-resultate wat bestaande modele uitvoer deur 'n goeie marge.", 'ko': '우리는 권적신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 국부 일치성 모델을 제시했는데 이 네트워크는 텍스트의 실체 격자 표시에서 운행된다.분포식 표시의 강력한 기능 때문에 이 모델은 범화를 잃지 않는 상황에서 원격 실체 전환과 실체에 특정한 특징을 포착했다.우리는 일대일 정렬 방법을 제시하여 처음부터 끝까지 모델에 대해 임무 훈련을 하고 임무에 특정한 고급 특징을 배운다.세 가지 서로 다른 일치성 평가 임무에 대한 평가에 따르면 우리의 모델은 기존 모델보다 더 좋은 최신 결과를 얻었다.', 'az': 'Biz bir mətnin göstərilməsi üzərində işlədən yerli bir konservasiya modeli təklif edirik. Model, dağıtılmış göstəricilərin gücünün sayəsində uzaq səviyyənin dəyişikliklərini bir-birinin özellikləri ilə birlikdə çox uzaq səviyyənin dəyişikliklərini alır. Biz modelini sona-sona təhsil etmək üçün çift dərəcə metodlarını göstəririk və işin müəyyən edilmiş yüksək dərəcə özelliklərini öyrənirik. Bizim üç müxtəlif coherenci təcrübəsinin müəyyən etdiyi təcrübələrimiz modellərimizin mövcuddur modellərin yaxşı margin ilə müəyyən edilməsini göstərir.', 'ca': "Proposem un model de coerència local basat en una xarxa neural convolutiva que funciona sobre la representació de la xarxa d'entitats d'un text. El model captura transicions d'entitats a llarg distància juntament amb característiques específices d'entitats sense perdre la generalització, gràcies al poder de la representació distribuida. Presentam un mètode de classement parell per a entrenar el model de manera final a final en una tasca i aprendre característiques específices per a tasques d'alt nivell. La nostra avaluació de tres tasques diferents d'avaluació de coerència demostra que el nostre model aconsegueix resultats més avançats que els models existents amb un bon marge.", 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք տեղական համապատասխանատվության մոդել, որը հիմնված է կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի վրա, որը գործում է տեքստի էության ցանցի ներկայացման վրա: The model captures long range entity transitions along with entity-specific features without loosing generalization, thanks to the power of distributed representation.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի զույգ դասակարգման մեթոդ, որպեսզի մոդելը վերջ-վերջ սովորեցնենք մի խնդրի վրա և սովորենք բարձր մակարդակի առանձնահատկություններ: Մեր գնահատումը երեք տարբեր հետաքրքիր գնահատման առաջադրանքների վրա ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը լավ տարբերակով հասնում է լավագույն արդյունքներ, որոնք գերազանցում են գոյություն ունեցող մոդելները:', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme lokální koherenční model založený na konvoluční neuronové síti, která pracuje nad reprezentací entity sítě textu. Model zachycuje dlouhodobé přechody entit spolu s vlastnostmi specifickými entity bez ztráty zobecnění, díky síle distribuované reprezentace. Představujeme párovou metodu hodnocení, která umožňuje trénovat model v komplexním způsobu na úkol a naučit se specifické funkce na vysoké úrovni. Naše hodnocení tří různých úkolů posuzování koherence ukazuje, že náš model dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků, které překonávají stávající modely.', 'et': 'Pakume välja kohaliku sidususe mudeli, mis põhineb konvolutsioonilisel närvivõrgul, mis töötab teksti olemivõrgu kujutamisel. Mudel jäädvustab tänu hajutatud esituse võimsusele pikaajalised olemi üleminekud koos olemipõhiste funktsioonidega ilma üldistamist kaotamata. Esitame paarijärgulise järjestuse meetodi, et treenida mudelit otsast otsani ülesandel ja õppida ülesandespetsiifilisi kõrgetasemelisi funktsioone. Meie hindamine kolme erineva sidususe hindamise ülesande kohta näitab, et meie mudel saavutab tehnika tasemel tulemusi, mis ületavad olemasolevaid mudeleid hästi.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি স্থানীয় সংযোগ মডেলের প্রস্তাব করছি যা একটি টেক্সটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বে কাজ করে একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলটি বিতরণের ক্ষমতার ক্ষেত্রে বিতরণের ক্ষমতার ক্ষেত্রে দীর্ঘ সীমাবদ্ধ বস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর সাথে সাথে বিশেষ বৈশ আমরা একটি জোড়া রেঙ্কিং পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যাতে মডেল শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয় এবং কাজের জন্য নির্দিষ্ট উচ্চপর্যায়ের বৈশিষ্ট্য শ Our evaluation on three different coherence assessment tasks demonstrates that our model achieves state of the art results outperforming existing models by a good margin.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme paikallista koherenssimallia, joka perustuu konvolutionaaliseen neuroverkkoon, joka toimii tekstin entiteettiruudukkoesityksen yli. Malli tallentaa pitkän kantaman entiteettisiirtymät sekä entiteettikohtaiset ominaisuudet menettämättä yleistymistä hajautetun edustuksen voiman ansiosta. Esittelemme parikohtaisen ranking-menetelmän mallin kouluttamiseksi päästä päähän tehtävään ja tehtäväkohtaisten korkean tason ominaisuuksien oppimiseksi. Arviointi kolmesta erilaisesta johdonmukaisuuden arviointitehtävästä osoittaa, että mallimme saavuttaa huipputason tulokset, jotka ylittävät nykyiset mallit hyvällä marginaalilla.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo lokalni model saslušnosti na osnovu konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja funkcioniše preko predstavljanja mreže entiteta teksta. Model uhvati prijenos dugog dometa entiteta zajedno s specifičnim karakteristikama entiteta bez oslobađanja generalizacije zahvaljujući moći raspodjeljenog predstavljanja. Predstavljamo metodu za određene redove za trening model a na kraju do kraja na zadatku i naučiti posebne osobine visokog nivoa na zadatku. Naša procjena o tri različita zadatka za procjenu saslušnosti pokazuje da naš model postigne stanje rezultata umjetnosti iznad izvršenja postojećih modela na dobroj marži.', 'ha': "Munã goyyar da wani misali na lokacin da ke samu'a, a kan wata shirin neural da ke aiki a kan shaidar abun da aka rubũta wani matsayi. Modelen na kãma shifo masu cikin cikin kwanan tsawo da wasu shiryoyin abun da ba'a sami da tsari masu yiwuwa ba da mai cire-gabatar da, masu gõdiya ga ƙarfin mai nunawa. Tuna nuna wata hanyor danganta biyu masu shirya motel cikin tsarin mai ƙara zuwa ƙarshen aikin kuma Mu sanar da wasu tayari masu ƙayyade daraja na aikin. Kaimakanmu a kan aikin hanyarmu uku dabam-dabam sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana sãmu halin fassarar sananni da ke samar da misãlai masu da mai kyau.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo model lokalne koherence, ki temelji na konvolucijskem nevronskem omrežju, ki deluje preko entitetne mreže predstavitve besedila. Model zajema prehode entitet dolgega razpona skupaj s specifičnimi značilnostmi entitete brez izgube posploševanja, zahvaljujoč moči porazdeljene reprezentacije. Predstavljamo metodo pare razvrščanja za usposabljanje modela od konca do konca na nalogi in učenje specifičnih funkcij na visoki ravni. Naše ocenjevanje treh različnih nalog ocenjevanja skladnosti kaže, da naš model dosega najsodobnejše rezultate, ki presegajo obstoječe modele za dobro maržo.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מודל תואם מקומי מבוסס על רשת עצבית משתנה שמפעילה מעל רשת היחידות של טקסט. הדוגמנית תופסת שינויים של יחידות לטווח ארוך יחד עם תכונות ספציפיות של יחידות בלי לאבד את הגנרליזציה, תודות לכוח של מייצג מופזר. אנו מציגים שיטת דירה זוגות כדי לאמן את המודל באופן סוף-סוף על משימה וללמד תכונות רמה גבוהה מסויימות למשימה. הערכה שלנו על שלושה משימות הערכת התשובה שונות מראה שהמודל שלנו משיג תוצאות מוקדמות יותר ממוצאות מודלים קיימות על ידי גבול טוב.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem koheres lokal sing basa batasan karo netwisan karo konvolution model Awake dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dadi nggawe modèl kanggo ngwalih end-to-end modèl kuwi nggawe lan mulai task-special kuwi barang dhéwé. Awakdhéwé éntuk tanggal telu nggawe coherencia perusahaan karo akeh pisan anyar tentang kanggo dianggawe modèl dhéwé kuwi tindakan sistem sing beraksi perusahaan model sing bisa ngelarang akeh tur angel.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་སྡུད་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། The model captures long range entity transitions along with entity-specific features without loosing general lization, thanks to the power of distributed representation. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལ་ཕྱོགས་པའི་སྣ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱེས་ལྡན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་དང་ལས་འགུལ་སྟངས་དམ ང་ཚོའི་རིག་ཚན་མ་འདྲ་བྱས་པའི་མཉམ་བསྡུར་གྱི་ལས་འགན་གསུམ་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་ད'}
{'en': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'fr': 'Grammaires à couverture étendue pilotées par les données pour la génération de langage naturel opinionnée (ONLG)', 'es': 'Gramáticas de amplia cobertura basadas en datos para la generación de lenguaje natural con opiniones (ONLG)', 'ar': 'قواعد نحوية واسعة النطاق تستند إلى البيانات لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية المستندة إلى الآراء (ONLG)', 'pt': 'Gramática de ampla cobertura orientada por dados para geração de linguagem natural opinativa (ONLG)', 'ja': 'オピニオン化された自然言語生成（ ONLG ）のためのデータ駆動型広範囲文法', 'zh': '数驱之广覆语法,以固执己之自然语言成 (ONLG)', 'hi': 'Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) के लिए डेटा-संचालित ब्रॉड-कवरेज व्याकरण', 'ru': 'Широкополосные грамматики на основе данных для генерации естественного языка (ONLG)', 'ga': 'Gramadach Leathan-Chlúdach Tiomáinte ag Sonraí do Ghiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha Thuairimithe (ONLG)', 'el': 'Γραμμικές ευρείας κάλυψης βασισμένες στα δεδομένα για τη δημιουργία Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONG)', 'ka': 'Data- Driven Broad- Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'hu': 'Adatvezérelt, széles körű lefedettségi nyelvtanfolyamok a véleményezett természetes nyelv generálásához (ONLG)', 'it': 'Grammatici ad ampia copertura basati sui dati per la generazione del linguaggio naturale opinionato (ONLG)', 'lt': 'Duomenų pagrindu grindžiamos plataus masto gamtos kalbų kūrimo grafikos (ONLG)', 'mk': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'ms': 'Grammar Penutupan Lebar Pemacu Data untuk Jenerasi Bahasa Alami (ONLG)', 'kk': 'Деректер- драйвер жасалған натуралды тілді құру үшін жасау үшін жасалған жасалған жасалған мақсатты граматтары (ONLG)', 'ml': 'ഓപ്നിനിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ഡ്രൈവ് ബ്രൌഡ്- കോവറജ് ഗ്രാമാറ്റര്\u200d (ONLG)', 'mt': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'mn': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'no': 'Data-Driver Broad-Coverage Grammar for Opinionate Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'pl': 'Gramatyka oparta na danych o szerokim zasięgu dla opinionowanego języka naturalnego (ONG)', 'ro': 'Grammatice bazate pe date cu acoperire largă pentru generarea limbajului natural opinionat (ONLG)', 'sr': 'Dat-Driver Brod-Coverage Grammars for Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Datadriven bred täckning Grammar för Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'ur': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'ta': 'செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட இயக்கி விரிவான- அலங்காரம் சிக்கல்கள் (ONLG)', 'so': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chương trình truyền thông/ bao quát cho Thông tin tự động:', 'da': 'Datadrevet bredt dækkende Grammar for Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'bg': 'Граматики с широко покритие, задвижвани от данни, за генериране на естествени езици (ОНЛГ)', 'hr': 'Dati-Driver Brod-Coverage Grammars for Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'id': 'Data Drive-Wide-Coverage Grammar untuk Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'de': 'Datengestützte Grammatik für die Generierung von Opinionated Natural Language (ONNG)', 'nl': 'Datagedreven Grammatica voor Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONNG)', 'fa': 'گرم\u200cداران گسترده\u200cهای اطلاعات- رانندگی برای نسل زبان طبیعی معلوم شده (ONLG)', 'ko': '자기 의견을 고집하는 자연 언어 생성 (ONLG) 의 데이터 구동을 지원하는 광범위한 덮어쓰기 문법', 'af': 'Data- Driven Broad- Coverage Grammars vir Opinioneerde Natuurlike Taal Generasie (ONLG)', 'sw': 'Grammari ya Habari za Kitaarifa kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Lugha ya asili (ONLG)', 'sq': 'Gramat e mbulesës së gjerë të të dhënave për gjenerimin e gjuhës natyrore (ONLG)', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Տվյալների շարժման լայն ծածկույթի գրամամարներ բնական լեզուների ստեղծման համար (ՕՆԼԳ)', 'tr': 'Opiniýatly Täbiýal Diller döredişi üçin Maglumat-Döwürme Aramlary (ONLG)', 'az': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার জন্য ডাটা ড্রাইভেন ব্রাড- কাভারেজ গ্রামার (ONLG)', 'ca': 'Grammars de cobertura amplia guiats per a la generació de llenguatges naturals (ONLG)', 'bs': 'Dati-Driver Brod-Coverage Grammars for Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'fi': 'Data-Driven Broad-Coverage Grammars for Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)', 'et': 'Andmepõhised laiapõhjalised grammatikad arvamusliku looduskeele genereerimiseks (ONLG)', 'cs': 'Datově řízené široké pokrytí gramatiky pro opinionované generování přirozeného jazyka (ONNG)', 'jv': 'data-driven Brad-Coverage Gramm for Opininated Digital Language Generation (ANLG)', 'sk': 'Podatkovno usmerjene široko pokritostne grammatike za mnenje naravnega jezika (ONLG)', 'he': 'Grammars-כיסוי רחב מונעים מידע לייצור שפות טבעיות (ONLG)', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG)'}
{'en': 'Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) is a new, challenging, task that aims to automatically generate human-like, subjective, responses to opinionated articles online. We present a data-driven architecture for ONLG that generates subjective responses triggered by users’ agendas, consisting of topics and sentiments, and based on wide-coverage automatically-acquired generative grammars. We compare three types of grammatical representations that we design for ONLG, which interleave different layers of linguistic information and are induced from a new, enriched dataset we developed. Our evaluation shows that generation with Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima’an, 2008) inspired grammar gets better language model scores than lexicalized grammars ‘a la Collins (2003), and that the latter gets better human-evaluation scores. We also show that conditioning the generation on topic models makes generated responses more relevant to the document content.', 'ar': "يعد إنشاء اللغة الطبيعية منفتح (ONLG) مهمة جديدة مليئة بالتحديات تهدف إلى إنشاء ردود شبيهة بالبشر وذاتية على المقالات ذات الآراء على الإنترنت. نقدم بنية تعتمد على البيانات لـ ONLG والتي تولد ردودًا ذاتية يتم تشغيلها بواسطة أجندات المستخدمين ، وتتألف من الموضوعات والمشاعر ، وتستند إلى التغطية الواسعة للقواعد النحوية المكتسبة تلقائيًا. نقارن ثلاثة أنواع من التمثيلات النحوية التي نصممها لـ ONLG ، والتي تشتبك طبقات مختلفة من المعلومات اللغوية ويتم استحداثها من مجموعة بيانات جديدة ومُخصبة قمنا بتطويرها. يُظهر تقييمنا أن الجيل باستخدام Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an، 2008) المستوحى من القواعد النحوية يحصل على درجات أفضل لنموذج اللغة من القواعد اللغوية المعجمية `` a la Collins (2003) ، وأن الأخير يحصل على درجات تقييم بشري أفضل. نظهر أيضًا أن تكييف الجيل على نماذج الموضوع يجعل الردود التي تم إنشاؤها أكثر صلة بمحتوى المستند.", 'es': "La Generación de Lenguaje Natural con Opiniones (ONLG) es una tarea nueva y desafiante que tiene como objetivo generar automáticamente respuestas subjetivas y humanas a artículos de opinión en línea. Presentamos una arquitectura basada en datos para ONLG que genera respuestas subjetivas activadas por las agendas de los usuarios, que consisten en temas y sentimientos, y basadas en gramáticas generativas de amplia cobertura adquiridas automáticamente. Comparamos tres tipos de representaciones gramaticales que diseñamos para ONLG, que entrelazan diferentes capas de información lingüística y se inducen a partir de un conjunto de datos nuevo y enriquecido que desarrollamos. Nuestra evaluación muestra que la generación con gramática inspirada en la Realización Relacional (Tsarfaty y Sima'an, 2008) obtiene mejores puntuaciones de modelos lingüísticos que las gramáticas lexicalizadas `a la Collins (2003), y que esta última obtiene mejores puntuaciones en la evaluación humana. También demostramos que condicionar la generación a modelos temáticos hace que las respuestas generadas sean más relevantes para el contenido del documento.", 'pt': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) é uma tarefa nova e desafiadora que visa gerar automaticamente respostas subjetivas e humanas a artigos opinativos online. Apresentamos uma arquitetura orientada a dados para ONLG que gera respostas subjetivas acionadas pelas agendas dos usuários, composta por tópicos e sentimentos, e baseada em gramáticas generativas adquiridas automaticamente de ampla cobertura. Comparamos três tipos de representações gramaticais que projetamos para o ONLG, que intercalam diferentes camadas de informação linguística e são induzidas a partir de um novo e enriquecido conjunto de dados que desenvolvemos. Nossa avaliação mostra que a geração com gramática inspirada no Relacionamento-Realização (Tsarfaty e Sima'an, 2008) obtém melhores pontuações de modelo de linguagem do que gramáticas lexicalizadas `a la Collins (2003), e que esta última obtém melhores pontuações de avaliação humana. Mostramos também que condicionar a geração em modelos de tópicos torna as respostas geradas mais relevantes para o conteúdo do documento.", 'fr': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) est une nouvelle tâche stimulante qui vise à générer automatiquement des réponses subjectives et ressemblant à des humains à des articles d'opinion en ligne. Nous présentons une architecture pilotée par les données pour ONLG qui génère des réponses subjectives déclenchées par les agendas des utilisateurs, composées de sujets et de sentiments, et basées sur des grammaires génératives acquises automatiquement à large couverture. Nous comparons trois types de représentations grammaticales que nous concevons pour ONLG, qui entrelacent différentes couches d'informations linguistiques et sont induites à partir d'un nouveau jeu de données enrichi que nous avons développé. Notre évaluation montre que la génération avec une grammaire inspirée de la réalité relationnelle (Tsarfaty et Sima'an, 2008) obtient de meilleurs scores de modèle linguistique que les grammaires lexicalisées `a la Collins (2003), et que cette dernière obtient de meilleurs scores d'évaluation humaine. Nous montrons également que le conditionnement de la génération sur des modèles thématiques rend les réponses générées plus pertinentes par rapport au contenu du document.", 'ja': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation （ ONLG ）は、オンラインでの意見記事に対する人間のような主観的な反応を自動的に生成することを目的とした、新しい、挑戦的なタスクです。私たちは、トピックと感情から構成され、自動的に獲得される生成文法に基づいて、ユーザーの議題によってトリガーされる主観的な応答を生成する、ONLGのためのデータ駆動型アーキテクチャを提示します。私たちは、ONLGのために設計した3種類の文法表現を比較します。これは、異なる層の言語情報を交差させ、私たちが開発した新しい豊富なデータセットから誘導されます。私たちの評価は、Relational - Realizational （ Tsarfaty and Sima 'an, 2008 ）のインスパイアされた文法を持つ世代は、語彙化された文法` a la Collins （ 2003 ）よりも優れた言語モデルスコアを取得し、後者はより優れた人間評価スコアを取得することを示しています。また、トピックモデルで生成を調整すると、生成された応答がドキュメントコンテンツに関連性が高くなることも示されています。", 'hi': "ओपिनियनेट नेचुरल लैंग्वेज जनरेशन (ONLG) एक नया, चुनौतीपूर्ण, कार्य है जिसका उद्देश्य स्वचालित रूप से मानव-जैसे, व्यक्तिपरक, ऑनलाइन राय वाले लेखों के लिए प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करना है। हम ONLG के लिए एक डेटा-संचालित आर्किटेक्चर प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो उपयोगकर्ताओं के एजेंडा द्वारा ट्रिगर की गई व्यक्तिपरक प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करता है, जिसमें विषय और भावनाएं शामिल हैं, और व्यापक कवरेज के आधार पर स्वचालित रूप से अधिग्रहित उत्पादक व्याकरण। हम तीन प्रकार के व्याकरणिक अभ्यावेदनों की तुलना करते हैं जिन्हें हम ONLG के लिए डिज़ाइन करते हैं, जो भाषाई जानकारी की विभिन्न परतों को आपस में जोड़ते हैं और हमारे द्वारा विकसित एक नए, समृद्ध डेटासेट से प्रेरित होते हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि रिलेशनल-अहसास (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) प्रेरित व्याकरण के साथ पीढ़ी को लेक्सिकलाइज्ड व्याकरण 'ए ला कॉलिन्स (2003) की तुलना में बेहतर भाषा मॉडल स्कोर मिलता है, और यह कि उत्तरार्द्ध को बेहतर मानव-मूल्यांकन स्कोर मिलता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि विषय मॉडल पर पीढ़ी को कंडीशनिंग उत्पन्न प्रतिक्रियाओं को दस्तावेज़ सामग्री के लिए अधिक प्रासंगिक बनाती है।", 'zh': '执己者自然语言生(ONLG)一新也;有挑战性者,自生在线执文之类也。 供ONLG数驱之架构,架构生用户议程应,主情成之,盖自生语法。 较之三ONLG之语法,交错异辞,从吾所发,丰数聚诱。 吾评者,有成(Tsarfaty与Simaan,2008)发语法之生,胜于词汇化语法得言,a la Collins(2003)得人之数。 又明以主题模形调生成之应文档更相关也。', 'ru': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) - это новая, сложная, задача, которая направлена на автоматическую генерацию человеческих, субъективных, реакций на статьи в Интернете. Мы представляем управляемую данными архитектуру для ONLG, которая генерирует субъективные ответы, вызванные повестками дня пользователей, состоящую из тем и настроений и основанную на широкомасштабных автоматически приобретаемых генеративных грамматиках. Мы сравниваем три типа грамматических представлений, которые мы разрабатываем для ONLG, которые переплетают различные слои лингвистической информации и индуцируются из нового, обогащенного набора данных, который мы разработали. Наша оценка показывает, что поколение, вдохновленное грамматикой Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008), получает лучшие баллы языковой модели, чем лексикализованные грамматики `a la Collins '(2003), и что последний получает лучшие баллы человеческой оценки. Мы также показываем, что кондиционирование генерации по тематическим моделям делает сгенерированные ответы более релевантными содержанию документа.", 'ga': 'Is tasc nua dúshlánach é Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige freagairtí cosúil le daoine, suibiachtúla, a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch ar ailt faoi thuairimí ar líne. Cuirimid ailtireacht sonraí-tiomáinte i láthair do ONLG a ghineann freagraí suibiachtúla arna dtionscnamh ag cláir oibre na n-úsáideoirí, comhdhéanta de thopaicí agus de mheon, agus atá bunaithe ar chlúdach leathan gramadaí giniúna a fhaightear go huathoibríoch. Déanaimid comparáid idir trí chineál léirithe gramadaí a dhearaimid do ONLG, a idirdhuilleann sraitheanna éagsúla faisnéise teanga agus a tharlódh ó thacar sonraí nua saibhrithe a d’fhorbair muid. Léiríonn ár measúnú go bhfaigheann giniúint a bhfuil an ghramadach Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty agus Sima’an, 2008) scóir eiseamláire teanga níos fearr acu ná na gramadaí foclóirithe `a la Collins (2003), agus go bhfaigheann an dara ceann scóir mheastóireachta daonna níos fearr. Léirímid freisin go bhfágann riochtú na giniúna ar shamhlacha topaicí freagraí ginte níos ábhartha d’ábhar an doiciméid.', 'it': "Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG) è un nuovo, impegnativo, compito che mira a generare automaticamente risposte umane, soggettive, agli articoli opinionati online. Presentiamo un'architettura data-driven per ONLG che genera risposte soggettive innescate dalle agende degli utenti, costituite da argomenti e sentimenti, e basate su grammatiche generative acquisite automaticamente. Confrontiamo tre tipi di rappresentazioni grammaticali che progettiamo per ONLG, che interlacciano diversi livelli di informazioni linguistiche e sono indotte da un nuovo set di dati arricchito che abbiamo sviluppato. La nostra valutazione mostra che le generazioni con grammatica ispirata alla Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty e Sima'an, 2008) ottengono punteggi migliori rispetto alle grammatiche lessicalizzate `a la Collins (2003), e che quest'ultima ottiene punteggi migliori di valutazione umana. Dimostriamo anche che condizionando la generazione su modelli di argomento, le risposte generate sono più rilevanti per il contenuto del documento.", 'hu': "Az Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) egy új, kihívást jelentő feladat, amelynek célja, hogy automatikusan emberszerű, szubjektív válaszokat generáljon a véleményezett cikkekre online. Olyan adatközpontú architektúrát mutatunk be az ONLG számára, amely a felhasználók napirendje által kiváltott szubjektív válaszokat generál, témákból és érzelmekből álló, széles körű, automatikusan beszerzett generációs nyelvtani nyelveken alapul. Az ONLG számára tervezett nyelvtani reprezentációk három típusát hasonlítjuk össze, amelyek a nyelvi információk különböző rétegeit összekapcsolják és az általunk kifejlesztett új, gazdagabb adatkészletből indukálnak. Értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy a Relációs-Realizációs generáció (Tsarfaty és Sima'an, 2008) inspirálta nyelvtan jobb nyelvi modellpontszámot kap, mint a lexikalizált nyelvtani `a la Collins (2003), és hogy ez utóbbi jobb emberi értékelési pontszámot kap. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a generáció témamodellekre történő kondícionálása a generált válaszok relevánsabbá teszi a dokumentum tartalmát.", 'ka': "მონაცემებული თავისუფალური ენერგიის განვითარება (ONLG) არის ახალი, შესაძლებელი, რაოდენობა, რომელიც მინდა ავტომატურად განვითარება ადამიანის სურათვის, subjekტიური, განსხვავებების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ მომხმარებელი მონაცემების არქტიქტურაციას ONLG-სთვის, რომელიც გამოიყენებელი გეგნეტებით გამოიყენება სუბექტიური პასუხი, რომელიც გამოყენებელი გეგნეტებით და სენტიმენტებით ჩვენ სამი ტიპის გრამეტური გამოსახულებების შემდგენება, რომლებიც ONLG-ის გამოსახულება, რომლებიც განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის განსხვავებული სინაცემები და რომლებიც ჩვენ განვითარებულია ახა ჩვენი განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ რეალური-რეალიზაციალური (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) გრამმარია იყოს უკეთესი ენის მოდელური მოდელური მოდულები, ვიდრე ლექსიკალიზაციული გრამმარი `a la Collins (2003) და რომ შემდეგ იყოს უკეთე ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ დავიწყება ტემიკური მოდელების შესახებ დავიწყება განსხვავებების შესახებ დოკუმენტის შესახებ უფრო შესახებ.", 'el': 'Η δημιουργία μιας νέας, προκλητικής, εργασίας που στοχεύει στην αυτόματη δημιουργία ανθρώπινων, υποκειμενικών απαντήσεων σε άρθρα με γνώμες στο διαδίκτυο. Παρουσιάζουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική βασισμένη στα δεδομένα για το που παράγει υποκειμενικές απαντήσεις που ενεργοποιούνται από τις ατζέντες των χρηστών, που αποτελείται από θέματα και συναισθήματα, και βασίζεται σε ευρείας κάλυψης αυτόματα αποκτηθείσες γενειακές γραμματικές. Συγκρίνουμε τρεις τύπους γραμματικών αναπαραστάσεων που σχεδιάζουμε για το οι οποίες διασυνδέουν διαφορετικά στρώματα γλωσσικών πληροφοριών και προκαλούνται από ένα νέο, εμπλουτισμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που αναπτύξαμε. Η αξιολόγησή μας δείχνει ότι η γενιά με γραμματική εμπνευσμένη από τη Σχετική-Συνειδητοποίηση (Τσάρφος και Σιμάν, 2008) παίρνει καλύτερες βαθμολογίες γλωσσικών μοντέλων από τις λεξικαλισμένες γραμματικές και ότι η τελευταία παίρνει καλύτερες βαθμολογίες ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι ο όρος της δημιουργίας σε μοντέλα θεμάτων καθιστά τις παραγόμενες απαντήσεις πιο σχετικές με το περιεχόμενο του εγγράφου.', 'lt': "Nuomonės gamtinės kalbos generacija (ONLG) yra nauja, sunki užduotis, kuria siekiama automatiškai sukurti žmonėms panašius subjektyvius atsakymus į nuomones teikiamus straipsnius internete. We present a data-driven architecture for ONLG that generates subjective responses triggered by users' agendas, consisting of topics and sentiments, and based on wide-coverage automatically-acquired generative grammars.  Palyginame tris gramatinius rodmenis, kuriuos sukuriame ONLG, kurie tarpusavyje palieka skirtingus kalbinės informacijos sluoksnius ir yra sukuriami iš naujo, praturtinto duomenų rinkinio, kurį sukūrėme. Mūsų vertinimas rodo, kad karta su santykinės realizacijos (Tsarfaty ir Sima'an, 2008 m.) įkvėpta gramatika gauna geresnius kalbos modelio rezultatus nei leksikalizuotos gramatikos `a la Collins (2003 m.), ir kad pastaroji gauna geresnius žmogaus vertinimo rezultatus. Taip pat rodome, kad pritaikydami kartą teminiams modeliams, gaunami atsakymai tampa svarbesni dokumento turiniui.", 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രജനനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ONLG) ഒരു പുതിയ, വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന, ജോലിയാണ്, അത് മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയുള്ള പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈനില്\u200d ഉത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഡേറ്റാ ഓണ്\u200dജിയിലേക്ക് ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. അത് ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഏജന്\u200dഡാസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉത്തരവുണ്ടാക്ക നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു തരം ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളെ തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. നാം ONLG-ന് വേണ്ടി ഡിസൈനര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് വ്യത്യസ്ത തലകളിലെ ഭാഷ വി നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന തലമുറയുടെ (സാര്\u200dഫാറ്റി സിമാന്\u200d 2008) ഗ്രാമാര്\u200dക്ക് ലെക്സിക്സിക്സിക്കേഷന്\u200d ഗ്രാമാലിന്\u200dസി പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലിലെ തലമുറകള്\u200d നിലനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് രേഖയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കം കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഉത്തരങ', 'kk': 'Тәуелді тілді жасау (ОНЛГ) нұсқасы - жаңа, әсер ететін, адамдар сияқты, мақсатты, онлайн мақалаларға жауап беру мақсатын автоматты түрде құру үшін тапсырма. Біз ONLG үшін деректерді басқару архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Бұл пайдаланушылардың күнделіктерінің күнделікті жауаптарды жасайтын, тақырыптар мен сезімдерінен тұрады, және автоматты түрде қабылдайтын жауапты граммалар негізін Біз ONLG үшін құрылған үш түрлі грамматикалық түрлерді салыстырып, тілдік мәліметтердің түрлі қабаттарын қалдырып, жаңа, бағатталған деректер жиынынан құрылады. Біздің оқытуымыз, қатынастық-реализациялық (Царфати және Сима\'ан, 2008) грамматикасы лексикализациялық граммалардың "a la Collins" (2003) дегеннен жақсы тіл үлгі нөмірлерін көрсетеді. Соңғылар адамды оқыту нөмірлерін жақсы көрсетеді. Құжаттың мазмұнына жауап беру үлгілерінде тәртібі құжаттың мазмұнына жауап беру үшін болады.', 'ms': "Penjanaan Bahasa Alami (ONLG) adalah tugas baru, mencabar, yang bertujuan untuk secara automatik menghasilkan tindak balas seperti manusia, subjektif, kepada artikel yang disampaikan secara online. Kami perkenalkan arkitektur pemacu data untuk ONLG yang menghasilkan tindak balas subjektif yang dipicu oleh agenda pengguna, yang terdiri dari topik dan perasaan, dan berdasarkan gramatik generatif yang diberikan secara automatik menutup lebar. Kita membandingkan tiga jenis perwakilan grammatik yang kita rancangkan untuk ONLG, yang menyimpan lapisan-lapisan maklumat bahasa yang berbeza dan dihidupkan dari set data yang baru dan kaya yang kita kembangkan. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahawa generasi dengan Gramatika yang diinspirasi Relational-Realization (Tsarfaty dan Sima'an, 2008) mendapat skor model bahasa yang lebih baik daripada gramatika leksikalisasi `a la Collins (2003), dan yang kedua mendapat skor penilaian manusia yang lebih baik. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pengkondisi generasi pada model topik membuat respons yang dijana lebih berkaitan dengan kandungan dokumen.", 'mk': "Опинионираната генерација на природен јазик (ONLG) е нова, предизвикувачка, задача која има за цел автоматски генерирање на човечки, субјективни, одговори на онлајн мислење на написи. Презентираме архитектура за ОНЛГ која генерира субјективни одговори предизвикани од агенди на корисниците, составена од теми и чувства, и базирана на широко покривање автоматски добиени генеративни граматики. Ние ги споредуваме три видови граматични претставувања кои ги дизајнираме за ОНЛГ, кои меѓуоставаат различни слоеви на јазички информации и се индустрирани од нов, богат податок кој го развивме. Нашата евалуација покажува дека генерацијата со граматиката инспирирана на Релативно-Реализационално (Царфати и Сима'ан, 2008) добива подобри резултати на јазичкиот модел отколку лексикализираните граматики `а ла Колинс (2003), и дека втората добива подобри резултати за човековата евалуаци Исто така покажуваме дека условувањето на генерацијата на темски модели ги прави генерираните одговори поврзани со содржината на документот.", 'pl': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONNG) to nowe, wymagające, zadanie, którego celem jest automatyczne generowanie ludzkich, subiektywnych odpowiedzi na opiniowane artykuły online. Prezentujemy architekturę opartą na danych dla ONNG, która generuje subiektywne odpowiedzi wywoływane przez agendy użytkowników, składające się z tematów i sentymentów oraz oparte na szerokim zasięgu automatycznie nabytych gramatykach generacyjnych. Porównujemy trzy rodzaje reprezentacji gramatycznych, które projektujemy dla ONG, które przeplatają się różne warstwy informacji językowych i są indukowane z nowego, wzbogaconego zbioru danych, który opracowaliśmy. Nasza ocena pokazuje, że pokolenie z gramatyką inspirowaną relacyjno-realizacyjną (carafaty i Sima'an, 2008) otrzymuje lepsze wyniki modelu językowego niż leksykalizowane gramatyki `a la Collins (2003), a ta ostatnia otrzymuje lepsze wyniki oceny ludzkiej. Pokazujemy również, że uwarunkowanie generowania modeli tematycznych sprawia, że generowane odpowiedzi są bardziej odpowiednie dla treści dokumentu.", 'mt': "Il-Ġenerazzjoni Opinjonata tal-Lingwi Naturali (ONLG) hija kompitu ġdid, ta’ sfida, li għandu l-għan li jiġġenera awtomatikament reazzjonijiet simili għall-bniedem, soġġettivi, għall-artikoli Opinjonati onlajn. Aħna nippreżentaw arkitettura bbażata fuq id-dejta għall-ONLG li tiġġenera reazzjonijiet suġġettivi kkawżati mill-a ġendi tal-utenti, li jikkonsistu f’suġġetti u sentimenti, u bbażati fuq grammi ġenerattivi akkwistati awtomatikament b’kopertura wiesgħa. Aħna nqabblu tliet tipi ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet grammatiċi li niddisinjaw għall-ONLG, li jitħallew bejn saffi differenti ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika u huma indotti minn sett ta’ dejta ġdid u arrikkit li żviluppajna. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna turi li l-ġenerazzjoni bil-gramma ispirata mir-Relazzjoni-Realizzazzjoni (Tsarfaty u Sima'an, 2008) tikseb punteġġi a ħjar tal-mudell lingwistiku minn grammi lexikalizzati `a la Collins (2003), u li din tal-aħħar tikseb punteġġi aħjar tal-evalwazzjoni umana. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-kundizzjonar tal-ġenerazzjoni fuq mudelli tematiċi jagħmel ir-reazzjonijiet iġġenerati aktar rilevanti għall-kontenut tad-dokument.", 'mn': "Найгалийн хэл төрөлхтөн (ONLG) нь хүн төрөлхтний адил, сэтгэл татвартай, хариулт онлайн баримтуудыг автоматаар бүтээх зорилго юм. Бид НОЛГ-ын өгөгдлийн хөтөлбөрийн архитектурыг тайлбарлаж, хэрэглэгчийн ажиллагааны үйлдвэрлэл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, автоматаар автоматжуулан автоматжуулан автоматжуулсан генерал грамматуудын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл гаргадаг. Бид ONLG-д зохион байгуулсан гурван төрлийн грамматикийн үзүүлэлтийг харьцуулдаг. Энэ нь хэлний мэдээллийн өөр хэлбэрүүдийг харьцуулж, бидний хөгжүүлсэн шинэ, баян өгөгдлийн санаас үүсгэгддэг. Бидний оюутнууд харилцааны-реализацийн (Царфати, Сима'ан, 2008) үеийнхээ грамматаас илүү сайн хэл загваруудын оноо авдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид мөн сэдвийн загварын үеийнхөө үеийнхөө нөхцөл байдал баримтын contentmentтэй илүү чухал хариулт өгдөг.", 'ro': "Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG) este o sarcină nouă, provocatoare, care își propune să genereze automat răspunsuri asemănătoare cu oamenii, subiective, la articolele opinionate online. Prezentăm o arhitectură bazată pe date pentru ONLG care generează răspunsuri subiective declanșate de agendele utilizatorilor, constând din subiecte și sentimente și bazate pe gramatici generative dobândite automat. Comparăm trei tipuri de reprezentări gramaticale pe care le proiectăm pentru ONLG, care interleagă diferite straturi de informație lingvistică și sunt induse dintr-un set de date nou, îmbogățit pe care l-am dezvoltat. Evaluarea noastră arată că generația cu gramatică inspirată de Relațională-Realizare (Tsarfaty și Sima'an, 2008) obține scoruri mai bune de model lingvistic decât gramaticile lexicalizate `a la Collins (2003), iar aceasta din urmă obține scoruri mai bune de evaluare umană. De asemenea, arătăm că condiționarea generației pe modele de subiecte face răspunsurile generate mai relevante pentru conținutul documentului.", 'no': "Oppretting av naturspråk (ONLG) er ein ny, vanskeleg, oppgåve som må automatisk laga menneskelig, subjektiv, svar på oppsettet på nettet. Vi presenterer ein datadrivt arkitektur for ONLG som lagar subjektiv svar som gjeld av brukaragentagenda, som inneheld emne og sentimentar, og basert på breiddekkevne automatisk gjennomførte generativ grammar. Vi samanliknar tre typar grammatiske representasjonar som vi design for ONLG, som innebygger ulike lag av språk-informasjon og er indusert frå ein ny, røyd dataset vi utvikla. Vårt evaluering viser at generasjonen med Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) inspirerte grammar får bedre språk-modellescorer enn lexicalized grammar `a la Collins (2003), og at dei siste får bedre menneskeevalueringsscorer. Vi viser også at resultatet av generering på emnemodular gjer oppretta svar meir relevant for dokumentinnhaldet.", 'si': "ඔප්පිනියෝජිත භාෂාව නිර්මාණය (ONLG) තමයි අළුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, වැඩක්, මිනිස්සු වගේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අන්ලයා අපි ONLG වෙනුවෙන් දත්ත ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරවෘතිය කරනවා ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෝග නියෝජිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘතිය කරනවා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෝ අපි විවෘත කරන්නේ ONLG වෙනුවෙන් විවෘත කරන විවෘත තුනක් වර්ගයක් තුනක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වර්ගයක් භාෂාවික තොරතුරු වලින් වෙ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා ලෙක්සිකල් විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපිත විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය ලෙක්සික අපි පෙන්වන්නම් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර", 'sv': "Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG) är en ny, utmanande, uppgift som syftar till att automatiskt generera människoliknande, subjektiva, svar på åsikter på artiklar online. Vi presenterar en datadriven arkitektur för ONLG som genererar subjektiva svar utlösta av användarnas agendor, bestående av ämnen och känslor, och baserat på bred täckning automatiskt förvärvade generativa grammatik. Vi jämför tre typer av grammatiska representationer som vi designar för ONLG, som sammanflätar olika lager av språklig information och induceras från en ny, berikad datauppsättning vi utvecklat. Vår utvärdering visar att generation med Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty och Sima'an, 2008) inspirerad grammatik får bättre språkmodellpoäng än lexikaliserade grammatik `a la Collins (2003), och att den senare får bättre human-evalueringspoäng. Vi visar också att konditionering av genereringen på ämnesmodeller gör genererade svar mer relevanta för dokumentinnehållet.", 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கம் (ONLG) ஒரு புதிய, சவாலிக்கும், பணி நாம் ONLG க்கான தகவல் இயக்கி உருவாக்கத்தை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். அது பயனர்களின் செயலாக்கங்கள் துவங்கிய பொருள்களை உருவாக்குகிறது, தலைப்புகள் மற்றும் உணர்வுகள் உள்ளன,  நாம் ONLG வடிவமைக்கும் மூன்று வகையான குறிப்புகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். அது வேறு மொழியில் தகவல்களை இடைவெளியேற்றி புதிய, வளர்ந்த தகவல் அமைப்பி நம்முடைய மதிப்பு தெரியும் தொடர்புடைய (சார்பாடி மற்றும் சிமாவான்) பிரார்த்தனை செய்யும் வரைப்படம் மொழி மாதிரி மதிப்புகளை விட சிறந்த மதிப்பெண்கள் கிடைக்கும் 'la நாம் மற்றும் காட்டுகிறோம் பின்னணி மாதிரிகளில் தலைமுறையின் நிபந்தனையை காட்டுகிறது ஆவண உள்ளடக்கத்திற்", 'sr': "Razmišljana generacija prirodnog jezika (ONLG) je novi, izazovni zadatak koji je cilj da automatski stvori ljudski, subjektivni odgovor na opisane članke na internetu. Predstavljamo arhitekturu podataka za ONLG koja stvara subjektivne odgovore koje su izazvale programi korisnika, sastavljajući od teme i osjećaja, i zasnovana na automatski nabavljenim generativnim gramama širokog pokrivanja. Uspoređujemo tri vrste gramatičkih predstavljanja koje dizajniramo za ONLG, koji ostavljaju različite slojeve jezičkih informacija i koji su indukovani iz novog, bogatskog seta podataka koje smo razvili. Naša procjena pokazuje da je generacija sa odnosima realizacijom (Tsarfaty i Sima'an, 2008) inspirisana gramatika dobila bolji rezultat jezičkih modela od leksikaliziranih gramara `a la Collins (2003), a da je poslednja dobila bolji rezultat procjene ljudske procjene. Takođe pokazujemo da uvjetovanje generacije o modelima teme čini stvaranje odgovora važnijim za sadržaj dokumenta.", 'so': "Generation of afka dabiicadda ah (ONLG) waa wax cusub, tacliin, shaqo oo si automati ah u sameeya jawaabooyin ku saabsan warqadaha internetka ka soo jeeda. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismaha lagu wado ee ONLG, kaas oo soo saara jawaabo muhiim ah oo ka soo baxay agendasha isticmaalayaasha, kuwaas oo ka mid ah maadooyinka iyo fikirrada, waxaana ku saleysan daboolka oo ballaadhan xarumaha dhaqaalaha. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa saddex noocyo oo grammatika ah oo aan u qorno ONLG, taasoo ka soo daabacsan sawir kala duduwan oo macluumaad luuqadeed ah, waxaana laga soo bandhigayaa sawirada cusub oo hodanka ah. Qiimeyntayada ayaa muuqata qarniga ku leh Relational-Realization (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) oo lagu hamdhiyey grammar waxay helaan qiimeeya afka oo ka fiican qorshaha la collins (2003), qoyska dambeena waxay helaan scoro ka fiican qiimeynta dadka. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in shuruudaha ku saabsan muusikada madaxa lagu sameynayo jawaabo ka mid ah kuwa ku saabsan waxyaabaha dukumentiga.", 'ur': "نظر اندازے کی طبیعی زبان پیدائش (ONLG) ایک نئی، مشکل کرنے والی، کام ہے جو انسان کی طرح، سرگوشی، نظر اندازے کے متعلق آنلاین کی جواب دینے کا ارادہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم ONLG کے لئے ایک ڈیٹا چلنے والی معماری پیش کرتے ہیں جو کارساز کے اگنڈ کے ذریعے سرپرست جواب دیتا ہے، موضوع اور احساسات میں سے ہے، اور اپنے ساتھ حاصل کئے ہوئے پیدا کئے ہوئے پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم تین نوع گراماتیکی تصویر کی مثالیں مقایسہ کرتے ہیں جو ہم ONLG کے لئے طراحی کرتے ہیں، جو زبان شناسی معلومات کے مختلف لائٹوں کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں اور ہم نے ایک نو، ثروت دار ڈاٹ سٹ سے پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارا ارزیابی دکھاتا ہے کہ نسل رابطۂ حقیقی اور سیماٰن کے ساتھ (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) گراماری کے ذریعہ سے بہتر زبان کی نمونڈ نمونڈ اسکو لکسیکلیز گراماری `a la Collins (2003) سے پہلے حاصل کرتا ہے، اور یہ کہ آخر انسان کی ارزیابی اسکور بہتر ہوتی ہے ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ٹوپ موڈل کے بارے میں نسل کی کنڈیسی کرنا ڈوکیٹ موڈل کے بارے میں بہت اچھے جواب دیتا ہے", 'vi': "Kết nối ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có tổ chức một nhiệm vụ mới, đầy thử thách, nhằm tự động tạo ra các phản ứng như con người, chủ quan, theo chủ nghĩa trực tuyến. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiến trúc dựa trên dữ liệu cho một tổ chức NILG, tạo ra các phản ứng chủ quan được kích hoạt bởi các chương trình của người dùng, gồm các chủ đề và cảm xúc, và dựa trên các tạp chí tự động đạt được. Chúng tôi so sánh ba kiểu biểu tượng theo ngữ pháp mà chúng tôi thiết kế cho một dạng mô tả theo dạng liên kết với các lớp khác nhau của thông tin ngôn ngữ và được tạo ra từ một bộ dữ liệu mới, đầy ắp hơn mà chúng tôi đã phát triển. Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi cho thấy thế hệ với Triển vọng-Thực Vật tương đối (Tsarfaty và Sima'an, kế thừa) bắt nguồn từ ngữ pháp sẽ đạt được điểm số mô hình ngôn ngữ tốt hơn các tạp từ ngữ học'a la Collins (hồng) và sau đó đạt được điểm đánh giá con người tốt hơn. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy việc điều chỉnh sản phẩm về các mẫu vật chủ đề làm các phản ứng phát ra liên quan hơn tới nội dung tài liệu.", 'uz': "Name Biz ONLG uchun maʼlumot drayveri arxivchisi hozir qilamiz, bu foydalanuvchilar agendaslari bilan ishga tushirilgan muammolar va hissiyotlarni yaratish va butunlay avtomatik olingan generativ grammatika asosida yaratish mumkin. Biz ONLG uchun dizayni uch turli grammatik representariga kamaytamiz. Bu bir xil tillar haqida boshqa qatlam maʼlumotni qo'yish va biz tuzib borilgan yangi taxminan maʼlumotlar tarkibidan ishlab chiqaradi. Bizning qiymatlarimizni ko'rsatadi, tashkilotlar (Tsarfati va Sima) bilan ishlatadigan avlod grammatika `la Collins' ga o'xshash tilning modeli qiymatidan yaxshi darajaga ega bo'ladi, va keyingi inson qiymatlarini yaxshi qiymatga ega. Шунингдек, биз ҳам кўрсатамиз, mavzu modellari ҳозирги вазиятлар ҳужжат таркибида жуда муҳим жавобларини чиқаради.", 'da': "Opinioned Natural Language Generation (ONLG) er en ny, udfordrende opgave, der har til formål at automatisk generere menneskelige-lignende, subjektive, svar på meningsfyldte artikler online. Vi præsenterer en datadrevet arkitektur for ONLG, der genererer subjektive svar udløst af brugernes dagsordener, bestående af emner og følelser, og baseret på bred dækning automatisk erhvervede generative grammatik. Vi sammenligner tre typer grammatiske repræsentationer, som vi designer til ONLG, som sammenfletter forskellige lag af sproglig information og er fremkaldt af et nyt, beriget datasæt, vi har udviklet. Vores evaluering viser, at generation med Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty og Sima'an, 2008) inspireret grammatik får bedre sprogmodel scores end leksikaliserede grammatik `a la Collins (2003), og at sidstnævnte får bedre menneskelige evalueringsscores. Vi viser også, at betingelse af genereringen på emnemodeller gør genererede svar mere relevante for dokumentindholdet.", 'bg': 'Генерацията на естествения език (ОЛГ) е нова, предизвикателна задача, която има за цел автоматично генериране на човешки, субективни, отговори на мнения онлайн. Представяме базирана на данни архитектура, която генерира субективни отговори, задействани от дневния ред на потребителите, състояща се от теми и сентименти и базирана на широкообхватни автоматично придобити генеративни граматики. Сравняваме три вида граматически представяния, които проектираме за ОНЛГ, които преплитат различни слоеве езикова информация и са индуцирани от нов, обогатен набор от данни, който разработихме. Нашата оценка показва, че поколение с вдъхновена от относително-реализационна граматика (Царфати и Симан, 2008) получава по-добри резултати от лексикализираните граматики а ла Колинс (2003), а последното получава по-добри оценки за човешка оценка. Показваме също, че обусловяването на генерирането на тематични модели прави генерираните отговори по-подходящи за съдържанието на документа.', 'nl': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONNG) is een nieuwe, uitdagende taak die gericht is op het automatisch genereren van menselijke, subjectieve reacties op opinioneerde artikelen online. We presenteren een data-driven architectuur voor ONG die subjectieve reacties genereert die worden veroorzaakt door de agenda's van gebruikers, bestaande uit onderwerpen en sentimenten, en gebaseerd op brede dekking automatisch verkregen generatieve grammatica's. We vergelijken drie soorten grammaticale representaties die we voor ONG ontwerpen, die verschillende lagen van linguïstische informatie doorkruisen en worden geïnduceerd uit een nieuwe, verrijkte dataset die we hebben ontwikkeld. Onze evaluatie toont aan dat generatie met Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) geïnspireerde grammatica betere taalmodel scores krijgt dan lexicaliseerde grammatica `a la Collins (2003), en dat laatstgenoemde betere human-evaluatie scores krijgt. We laten ook zien dat het conditioneren van de generatie op topic modellen gegenereerde reacties relevanter maakt voor de inhoud van het document.", 'hr': "Razmišljana generacija prirodnog jezika (ONLG) je novi, izazovni zadatak koji je cilj automatski stvoriti ljudske slične, subjektivne, odgovore na temeljne članke. Predstavljamo arhitekturu podataka za ONLG-u koja stvara subjektivne odgovore koje su izazvale programi korisnika, sastavljajući od teme i osjećaja, i temeljiti na automatski prikupljenim generativnim gramama širokog pokrivanja. Uspoređujemo tri vrste gramatičkih predstavljanja koje dizajniramo za ONLG, koji ostavljaju različite slojeve jezičkih informacija i induciraju se iz novog, bogatih podataka koje smo razvili. Naša procjena pokazuje da je generacija s odnosima realizacijom (Tsarfaty i Sima'an, 2008) inspirisana gramatika dobila bolji rezultat jezičkih modela od leksikaliziranih gramara `a la Collins (2003) i da je posljednja dobila bolji rezultat procjene ljudske procjene. Također pokazujemo da uvjetovanje generacije o modelima teme čini uzrokovane odgovore važnijim sadržaju dokumenta.", 'id': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) adalah tugas baru, menantang, yang bermaksud untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan manusia-seperti, subjektif, respon kepada artikel opinionated online. Kami mempersembahkan arsitektur data-driven untuk ONLG yang menghasilkan tanggapan subjektif yang dipicu oleh agenda pengguna, yang terdiri dari topik dan perasaan, dan berdasarkan jangkauan lebar gramatika generatif yang diberikan secara otomatis. Kami membandingkan tiga jenis represisi grammatik yang kami desain untuk ONLG, yang menginterleave lapisan-lapisan informasi bahasa yang berbeda dan diinduksi dari set data yang baru dan kaya yang kami kembangkan. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa generasi dengan Gramatika yang diinspirasi Relational-Realization (Tsarfaty dan Sima'an, 2008) mendapatkan skor model bahasa yang lebih baik daripada gramatika leksikalisasi `a la Collins (2003), dan bahwa akhir mendapatkan skor evaluasi manusia yang lebih baik. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa kondisi generasi pada model topik membuat reaksi yang dihasilkan lebih relevan untuk isi dokumen.", 'de': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONNG) ist eine neue, herausfordernde Aufgabe, die darauf abzielt, automatisch menschenähnliche, subjektive Antworten auf Meinungen online zu generieren. Wir präsentieren eine datengetriebene Architektur für ONNG, die subjektive Antworten generiert, ausgelöst durch die Agenda der Nutzer, bestehend aus Themen und Sentiments und basierend auf einer breiten Abdeckung automatisch erworbenen generativen Grammatik. Wir vergleichen drei Arten von grammatischen Repräsentationen, die wir für ONNG entwerfen, die verschiedene Schichten von linguistischen Informationen ineinander greifen und aus einem neuen, angereicherten Datensatz hervorgehen, den wir entwickelt haben. Unsere Evaluation zeigt, dass Generation mit Relational-Realizational (Zarfaty und Sima'an, 2008) inspirierter Grammatik bessere Sprachmodelle erzielt als lexikalisierte Grammatiken `a la Collins (2003), und dass letztere bessere human-evaluation Scores erhält. Außerdem zeigen wir, dass die Konditionierung der Generierung auf Themenmodelle generierte Antworten relevanter für den Dokumenteninhalt macht.", 'ko': "독선적인 자연언어 생성(ONLG)은 온라인에서 독선적인 문장에 대한 인간과 유사한 주관적인 반응을 자동으로 생성하기 위한 새로운, 도전적인 임무다.우리는 온LG에 데이터 구동의 체계 구조를 제공했다. 이 체계 구조는 자동으로 얻어지는 생성 문법을 바탕으로 사용자의 의사일정에 의해 촉발되는 주관적인 응답을 생성하고 주제와 정서를 포함한다.우리는 우리가 ONLG를 위해 디자인한 세 가지 유형의 문법을 비교했는데 그것이 서로 다른 언어 정보층을 교차시켰고 우리가 개발한 새로운, 풍부한 데이터로부터 집중적으로 귀납된 것이다.우리의 평가에 따르면 관계 실현(Tsarfaty와Sima'an, 2008)에서 계발된 문법 생성은 어휘화 문법 a la Collins(2003)보다 더 좋은 언어 모델 점수를 얻었고 후자는 더 좋은 인류 평가 점수를 얻었다.또한 테마 모델의 생성을 조절하면 생성된 응답이 문서 내용과 더욱 관련이 있음을 나타낸다.", 'sw': "Uzalishaji wa lugha ya asili (ONLG) ni mpya, changamoto, kazi inayolenga kutengeneza kwa urahisi kutengeneza maoni yanayofanana na binadamu, madai, majibu ya makala yanayofikiriwa mtandaoni. Tunaweza kutengeneza majengo yanayoendeshwa na taarifa kwa ajili ya ONLG ambayo inatengeneza miitikio yenye mada na hisia za watumiaji, pamoja na mada na hisia, na kwa kutumia vipande vya habari vya vizazi vilivyojipatikana kwa urahisi. Tunawalinganisha aina tatu ya maoni ya grammatiki ambayo tunatengeneza kwa ajili ya ONLG, ambayo inaacha vipande tofauti vya taarifa za lugha na kuanzishwa kutoka kwenye seti mpya, zenye taarifa zilizotengenezwa. Utafiti wetu unaonyesha kwamba kizazi chenye uhusiano (Tsarfaty na Sima'an, 2008) kinachohamasishwa kinapata vipimo vizuri vya lugha kuliko vibonzo vilivyotokana na ukoloni wa la Collins (2003), na kwamba baadae hupata score bora za uchunguzi wa binadamu. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba hali ya kizazi kwenye mifano ya mada inasababisha majibu yanayohusiana zaidi na maudhui ya nyaraka.", 'tr': "Iňleşik Doýal Dil Jeşirmesi (ONLG) täze, kynçylyk, adam ýaly, subjektiv, terjime eden makalary internede üýtgetmek üçin maksady. Ullançylaryň agentalary tarapyndan netijeli jogaplary döreden ONLG üçin data-ýüze guruldyran arhitektura görkezip berýäris, meýdanlar we duýgular bar we öz-özüne ýazylan janlaşyk grammalaryna daýanýar. Biz ONLG üçin tasarlanýan üç çeşit gramatik suratlaryny karşılaştyrýarys we bu üçin farklı dil maglumatynyň içine alyp, täze we zene-baglanýan düzümlendirdik. Biziň deňleşdirmegimiz ýagdaýymyz görkezýär: Relatival-Realizational (Tsarfaty we Sima'an, 2008) gramatika görnüşlerden gowy dil nusgalaryny leksikilizat grammarlardan `a la Collins(2003), we soňky adamlaryň deňleşdirmeleri gowy bolar. Biz hem döwletleri tema nusgalarynda ýagdaýlaýan nusgalary sened içerisine has baglanýar.", 'af': "Onbekende Natuurlike Taal Generasie (ONLG) is 'n nuwe, pragtige, taak wat doel om outomaties menslike, subjektive, antwoordes te genereer na bepaalde aktikels online. Ons stel 'n data-gedrywe arkitektuur vir ONLG wat subjektiewe reaksies genereer wat deur gebruikers se agende gebruik word, bestaan van onderwerpe en sentimente, en gebaseer op wyd-dekking automaties-aangenereerde genereerbare gramme. Ons vergelyk drie tipes grammatiese voorstellings wat ons ontwerp vir ONLG, wat verskillende lage van lingwisiese inligting interlaat en word ingevolg van 'n nuwe, verryk datastel wat ons ontwikkel het. Ons evaluasie wys dat generasie met Relational-Realizasie (Tsarfaty en Sima'an, 2008) inspireerde grammatiek beter taal modelles kry as lexicaliseerde grammare `a la Collins (2003), en dat die laaste beter mensevaluasie telling kry. Ons wys ook dat voorwaarding van die generasie op onderwerp modele genereerde reaksies meer relevant aan die dokumentinhoud.", 'fa': "نسل زبان طبیعی (ONLG) معلوم شده، یک کار جدید، سخت\u200cگیری است که هدف خودکار برای تولید کردن مقاله\u200cهایی که مانند انسان، مسئولیت\u200cکننده، پاسخ\u200cهای متوجه شده در اینترنت هستند. ما یک معماری راهنمایی به اطلاعات برای ONLG پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که پاسخ\u200cهای موجود را توسط برنامه\u200cهای کاربران تولید می\u200cکند، که از موضوع و احساسات وجود دارد، و بر اساس برنامه\u200cهای موجود ژنترافی که به طور خودکار می\u200cگیرند، بسازند. ما سه نوع نمایش گراماتیک را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم که برای ONLG طراحی می\u200cکنیم، که لایه\u200cهای مختلف اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی را ترکیب می\u200cدهد و از یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید و ثروتمندی که ما توسعه دادیم، توسعه می\u200cدهیم. ارزیابی ما نشان می دهد که نسل با ارتباط و واقعیت رابطه (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) نقطه\u200cهای مدل زبانی بهتر از نقطه\u200cهای لاکلینس (۲۰۰۳) می\u200cگیرد و آخرین نقطه\u200cهای ارزیابی انسان بهتر می\u200cگیرد. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که تولید نسل در مورد مدل موضوع جواب های تولید به محتوای سند بیشتر ارتباط دارد.", 'sq': "Gjenerimi i Fjalës Natyrore i Opinionuar (ONLG) është një detyrë e re, sfiduese, që synon të gjenerojë automatikisht përgjigje njerëzore, subjektive, ndaj artikujve të opinionuar në internet. Ne paraqesim një arkitekturë të bazuar në të dhëna për ONLG që gjeneron përgjigje subjektive të shkaktuara nga axhendat e përdoruesve, që përbëhet nga temat dhe ndjenjat dhe bazuar në gramatikat gjenerative të fituara automatikisht me mbulim të gjerë. Ne krahasojmë tre lloje përfaqësimesh grammatike që ne dizajnojmë për ONLG, që ndërlejojnë shtresa të ndryshme informacioni gjuhësor dhe janë induktuar nga një grup i ri i pasur i të dhënave që kemi zhvilluar. Vlerësimi ynë tregon se gjenerata me gramatikën e frymëzuar nga Relational-Realization (Tsarfaty dhe Sima'an, 2008) merr rezultate më të mira të modelit gjuhësor se gramatikët e lexikalizuara `a la Collins (2003) dhe se e fundit merr rezultate më të mira të vlerësimit njerëzor. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se kushtëzimi i gjeneratës në modelet tematike bën përgjigjet e gjeneruara më të rëndësishme për përmbajtjen e dokumentit.", 'am': "የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ትውልድ (ONLG) አዲስ፣ አቃላፊ፣ የሥርዓት፣ የሰው ምሳሌ፣ ታዋቂ፣ መልዕክቶችን በመስመር ላይ ለመፍጠር የሚችል አዲስ ነው፡፡ ለONLG የተነሳውን የዳታ መሠረት አቀናቅል እና የጦማሪያዎች እና አስተያየት፣ በተጨማሪም ላይ የተገኘውን የዘላለም አነስተኛዊ ግራማር በተመሳሳይ፣ የሥልጣናት መልስ የሚያደርገውን አቀናቅለናል፡፡ ለONLG የምናሳውቀውን ሦስት ዓይነት የgrammatik መልዕክቶች እናሳያታለን፤ ይህም የቋንቋዊ መረጃዎችን በተለየ እና ከአዲስ ባለጠጋ ሀብት ካደረግነው ከዳታ ማዕከል ነው፡፡ Our evaluation shows that generation with Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) inspired grammar gets better language model scores than lexicalized grammars `a la Collins (2003), and that the latter gets better human-evaluation scores.  እናሳየዋለን ትውልድ በጉዳዩ ምሳሌዎች ላይ እንዳደረገ እናሳያቸዋለን፤ ሰነድ ማኅበረሰብ ላይ የተጠቃሚ መልስ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡", 'hy': "Պատկերացված բնական լեզուների ստեղծումը (ՕՆԼԳ) նոր, դժվար խնդիր է, որը նպատակում է ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծել մարդկային նման, սուբյեկտիվ, պատասխաններ առցանց հայտարարված հոդվածներին: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՕՆԼԳ-ի տվյալների հիմնված ճարտարապետություն, որը ստեղծում է սուբյեկտիվ արձագանքներ, որոնք առաջացնում են օգտագործողների ծրագրերով, որոնք կազմված են թեմաներից և զգացմունքներից և հիմնված են մեծ ծավալների ավտոմատ ձեռք բերված սերունդայի Մենք համեմատում ենք երեք տեսակի գրամատիկ ներկայացումներ, որոնք մենք ստեղծում ենք ՕՆԼԳ-ի համար, որոնք փոխարեն լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի տարբեր շերտեր և արտադրվում են մեր զարգացած նոր, հարուստ տվյալների համակարգում: Our evaluation shows that generation with Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) inspired grammar gets better language model scores than lexicalized grammars `a la Collins (2003), and that the latter gets better human-evaluation scores.  Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սերունդը թեմային մոդելների վրա պայմանավորելը դարձնում է ստեղծված պատասխանները ավելի կարևոր փաստաթղթի պարունակության հետ:", 'bn': "প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্ম (ONLG) একটি নতুন, চ্যালেঞ্জ, কাজ, যার উদ্দেশ্যে অনলাইনে মনোযোগ দেয়া প্রবন্ধের প্রতি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানুষের মতো,  We present a data-driven architecture for ONLG that generates subjective responses triggered by users' agendas, consisting of topics and sentiments, and based on wide-coverage automatically-acquired generative grammars.  আমরা তিনটি ধরনের গ্রামাটিক্যাল প্রতিনিধিত্বের তুলনা করি যা আমরা ওনএলজির জন্য ডিজাইন করি, যা ভাষার বিভিন্ন ধরনের ভাষাগত তথ্যের মধ্যে রেখে যায় আমাদের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রজন্ম সম্পর্ক-রিয়ালিজেশনের (সার্ফাতি এবং সিমা'য়ান ২০০৮) অনুপ্রাণিত গ্রামারের ভাষার মডেলের চেয়ে ভালো স্কোর পাওয়া যাচ্ছে লেক্স আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে বিষয় মডেলে প্রজন্মের পরিস্থিতি তৈরি করা হয়েছে নথিপত্রের বিষয়বস্তুর সাথে আরো জরুরী প", 'bs': "Razmišljana generacija prirodnog jezika (ONLG) je novi, izazovni zadatak koji je cilj automatski stvoriti ljudske slične, subjektivne odgovore na opisane članke na internetu. Predstavljamo arhitekturu podataka za ONLG-u koja stvara subjektivne odgovore koje su izazvale programi korisnika, sastavljajući od tema i osjećaja, i temeljiti na automatski prikupljenim generativnim gramama širokog pokrivanja. Uspoređujemo tri vrste gramatičkih predstavljanja koje dizajniramo za ONLG, koje interostavljaju različite slojeve jezičkih informacija i koje su indukovane iz novog, bogatskog seta podataka koje smo razvili. Naša procjena pokazuje da generacija sa Relational-Realizacionom (Tsarfaty i Sima'an, 2008) inspirisana gramatika dobija bolji rezultat jezičkih modela od leksikaliziranih gramara `a la Collins (2003), a da poslednja dobija bolji rezultat procjene ljudskih procjena. Također pokazujemo da uvjetovanje generacije o modelima teme čini generativne odgovore važnijim za sadržaj dokumenta.", 'ca': "La Generació de Llingua Natural Opinionada (ONLG) és una tasca nova, desafiadora, que busca generar automàticament respostes humanes, subjectives, a articles opinionats en línia. Presentam una arquitectura basada en dades per ONLG que genera respostes subjectives desencadenades per les agendes dels usuaris, que consisteixen en temes i sentiments, i basades en gramàtiques generatives adquirides automàticament a gran cobertura. Comparem tres tipus de representacions gramàtiques que dissenyem per ONLG, que interdeixen diferents capes d'informació lingüística i són induïdes d'un nou conjunt de dades enriquegut que vam desenvolupar. La nostra evaluació mostra que la generació amb la gramàtica inspirada en Relational-Realization (Tsarfaty i Sima'an, 2008) obté millors puntuacions del model de llenguatge que les gramàtiques lexicalitzades `a la Collins (2003), i que aquesta última obté millors puntuacions d'evaluació humana. També demostram que condicionar la generació en models temàtics fa que les respostes generades siguin més rellevants al contingut del document.", 'et': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) on uus, keeruline ülesanne, mille eesmärk on automaatselt genereerida inimlikke, subjektiivseid vastuseid arvamuslikele artiklitele internetis. Esitleme ONLGi andmepõhist arhitektuuri, mis tekitab subjektiivseid vastuseid kasutajate tegevuskavadest, mis koosnevad teemadest ja tunnetustest ning põhineb laiaulatuslikul automaatselt omandatud generatiivsetel grammatikatel. Me võrdleme kolme tüüpi grammatilisi representatsioone, mida me ONLG jaoks kujundame, mis vahetavad erinevaid keelelise informatsiooni kihte ja mis on indutseeritud meie väljatöötatud uuest rikastatud andmekogumist. Meie hinnang näitab, et suhtelise-realisatsiooni (Tsarfaty ja Sima'an, 2008) inspireeritud grammatika põlvkond saab parema keelemudeli skoori kui leksikaliseeritud grammatika `a la Collins (2003), ning viimane saab parema inimhinnangu skoori. Samuti näitame, et teemamudelite generatsiooni tingimine muudab genereeritud vastused dokumendi sisu jaoks asjakohasemaks.", 'cs': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONNG) je nový, náročný úkol, jehož cílem je automaticky generovat subjektivní reakce na názorné články online. Představujeme datově řízenou architekturu pro ONNG, která generuje subjektivní reakce spouštěné agendami uživatelů, skládající se z témat a sentimentů a založené na širokém pokrytí automaticky získaných generativních gramatik. Porovnáváme tři typy gramatických reprezentací, které navrhujeme pro ONG, které prolínají různé vrstvy jazykových informací a jsou indukovány z nového, obohaceného datového souboru, který jsme vyvinuli. Naše hodnocení ukazuje, že generace s gramatikou inspirovanou relačně-realizací (carafaty and Sima'an, 2008) dostává lepší výsledky jazykového modelu než lexikalizované gramatiky `a la Collins (2003), a že druhá dostává lepší hodnocení lidí. Dále ukazujeme, že podmínění generace na tématické modely způsobuje relevantnější generované odpovědi pro obsah dokumentu.", 'fi': "Opinionated Natural Language Generation (ONLG) on uusi, haastava tehtävä, jonka tavoitteena on luoda automaattisesti ihmismäisiä, subjektiivisia vastauksia mielipiteittäisiin artikkeleihin verkossa. Esittelemme ONLG:lle datavetoisen arkkitehtuurin, joka tuottaa subjektiivisia vastauksia käyttäjien agendasta, joka koostuu aiheista ja tunteista ja perustuu laajalle kattavuuteen automaattisesti hankittuihin generatiivisiin kielioppiin. Vertaamme kolmentyyppisiä kieliopillisia representaatioita, joita suunnittelemme ONLG:lle, jotka yhdistävät kielellisen tiedon eri kerroksia ja jotka indusoidaan kehittämästämme uudesta rikastetusta aineistosta. Arviointi osoittaa, että sukupolvet, joilla on relaatiooivallus (Tsarfaty ja Sima'an, 2008), saavat parempia kielimallipisteitä kuin leksikalisoidut kieliopit `a la Collins (2003), ja että jälkimmäinen saa parempia ihmisarviointipisteitä. Osoitamme myös, että sukupolvien ehdollistaminen aihemalleihin tekee luoduista vastauksista dokumentin sisällön kannalta merkityksellisempiä.", 'az': "Düşünülmüş Təbiətli Dil Yaratılması (ONLG) yeni, çətin, insan kimi, subjektiv, fikirləşdirilmiş maddələrə online cavab vermək niyyətində olan bir işdir. Biz ONLG üçün data-driven arhitektura təşkil edirik ki, istifadəçilərin agentlarından təşkil edilmiş subjektiv cavab verər, məsələlərdən və duygulardan olub, avtomatik olaraq qazanılan geniş örtük gramalara dayanan. Biz ONLG üçün dizayn etdiyimiz üç cür gramatik tərzlərini salırıq ki, dil məlumatının müxtəlif səviyyələrini araşdırır və yeni, zengin verilən quruluşdan təşkil edilir. Bizim değerlendirmək göstərir ki, Relatival-Realizational nəsili (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) gramatika ilham verilmiş dil modeli nöqtələrindən daha yaxşı dil modeli nöqtələri `a la Collins' (2003) və sonuncu insan değerlendirməsi nöqtələrindən daha yaxşıdır. Biz də belə göstəririk ki, məsələn modellərində nəsillərin məsələlərini təsirləndirmək səhifələrin məzmunlarına daha münasibətli cavab verər.", 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Tuna halatar da wani matsayi wanda aka yi tafiyar da shi na danganta ga ANLG, wanda ke ƙara masu da matsayi wanda aka farata na da shirin mãsu amfani da shi, yana cikin maɓalli da hisãbi, da kuma a kan zane-rufe grammati na farat-farat da aka samu. We compare three types of grammatical representations that we design for ONLG, which interleave different layers of linguistic information and are induced from a new, enriched dataset we developed.  Anansa na nũna cewa kizaluman da ke da Relative-Riization (Tsarfaty da Sima'an, 2008) wanda aka yi wahayi na grammar yana da mafi kyaun matsalon na harshen ko karatun a la Collins (2003), kuma ƙarshen yana da kyakkyawan muhalli ga mutum. Tuna nũna cewa, kiyayen kizayen kan misalin madaidaici, yana ƙara mataimaki masu da muhimmi zuwa maɓallin takardan.", 'he': "הדורה של שפות טבעיות (ONLG) היא משימה חדשה, מאתגרת, שמתכוונת לייצר אוטומטית תגובות כאילו אנושיות, סוביקטיביות, למאמרים מודעים באינטרנט. אנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה מונעת על נתונים עבור ONLG שמייצרת תגובות סוביקטיביות שנגרמו על ידי סדר הנושאים של המשתמשים, שמכילה בנושאים ומרגשות, ומבוססת על כיסוי רחב גרמטיקות דורתיות שנרכשו באופן אוטומטי. אנחנו משוותים שלושה סוגים של מיצוגים גרמטיים שאנחנו מעצבים עבור ONLG, אשר משאירים שכבות שונות של מידע שפתי והופכים ממערכת נתונים חדשה ומעשירה שפיתחנו. Our evaluation shows that generation with Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) inspired grammar gets better language model scores than lexicalized grammars `a la Collins (2003), and that the latter gets better human-evaluation scores.  אנחנו גם מראים ששינוי הדור על דוגמנים נושאיים גורם לתגובות יוצרות יותר רלוונטיות לתוכן המסמך.", 'sk': "Opionirana generacija naravnega jezika (ONLG) je nova, zahtevna naloga, katere cilj je samodejno ustvarjanje človeških, subjektivnih odzivov na mnenjske članke na spletu. Predstavljamo podatkovno usmerjeno arhitekturo za ONLG, ki ustvarja subjektivne odzive, ki jih sprožijo agende uporabnikov, sestavljene iz teme in občutkov ter temelji na široki pokritosti, avtomatično pridobljenih generativnih slovnic. Primerjamo tri vrste slovničnih reprezentacij, ki jih oblikujemo za ONLG, ki prepletajo različne plasti jezikovnih informacij in so inducirane iz novega, obogatenega nabora podatkov, ki smo ga razvili. Naša ocena kaže, da generacija z relacijsko-realizacijsko slovnico (Tsarfaty in Sima'an, 2008) navdihnjeno slovnico dobi boljše rezultate jezikovnega modela kot leksikalizirana slovnica `a la Collins (2003), slednja pa dobi boljše rezultate človeške ocene. Pokazujemo tudi, da prilagajanje generacije na tematske modele naredi ustvarjene odgovore bolj relevantne za vsebino dokumenta.", 'jv': "Opinioned Language Generation (NGLG) iku bagian, ngjelongipun, nggawe ngupakan ngendalikno otomatik tau oleh dumadhi-sanga, sujang-suaraning, gambaran kanggo ngerayakno artiklong sing ngaturaken online. Awak dhéwé nambah akeh data-condensed architecture kanggo NGLG sing sumulakno perusahaan responsibé sing ngedolong nggawe ngupakan kelompok nggawe ngubah-perusahaan lan ijol-ijolan, lan sumulakno lan ijol-ijolan winih-ijolan winih-ijol-ijol-ijol-ijol-ijol-ijolan winih. Awak dhéwé pisan karo telu kalih basa gambar dengané karo NGLG sing dibenalke nggawe lan alam-alam sing ngewehke nggawe informasi lengrungan barang dhéwé lan sekondiki dhéwé: Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno meraké kelompok ngéwé karo Relal-Actualisation (Carfé karo Sima'an, 2008) sak kelompok ngéwé, dadi kelompok langkung model sing luwih apik karo lejikap duluran 'a la Colins' (2003), lan sak kedahké olèhku ngéwé éntuk uwong-jewisan uwong. Awak dhéwé mulai ngono nglanggar sampeyan winih lan model sing paling nggawe barang manut karo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Dokumen.", 'bo': "མ་ཤེས་པའི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏམ། ང་ཚོས་ONLG ལ་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གཙོ་ཆོག་ཅིག་འཆར་ཡོད་པ་དེ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རིམ་གྱི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན ང་ཚོས་ONLG(grammatical representations)དང་དུས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཆས་གསུམ་དང་དེ་དག་གི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་གཞན་དང་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ནས་བཟོ་རྒྱུས་བའ Our evaluation shows that generation with Relational-Realizational (Tsarfaty and Sima'an, 2008) inspired grammar gets better language model scores than lexicalized grammars `a la Collins (2003), and that the latter gets better human-evaluation scores. འུ་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཁང་གི་མི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྣམས་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་ལ་མཐུན་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་"}
{'en': 'Learning to Ask : Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'تعلم السؤال: توليد الأسئلة العصبية لفهم القراءة', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a perguntar: geração de perguntas neurais para compreensão de leitura', 'fr': 'Apprendre à poser\xa0: génération de questions neuronales pour la compréhension en lecture', 'es': 'Aprender a hacer: generación de preguntas neuronales para la comprensión lectora', 'ja': '質問することを学ぶ：理解を読むための神経質問生成', 'zh': '学问:读解神经生', 'hi': 'पूछने के लिए सीखना: पढ़ने की समझ के लिए तंत्रिका प्रश्न पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Учимся задавать: генерация нейронных вопросов для понимания прочитанного', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Fiafraí: Giniúint Ceisteanna Néaracha don Léamhthuiscint', 'ka': 'შესწავლის შესახებ: ნეიროლური კითხვის შექმნა', 'el': 'Μαθαίνοντας να ρωτάς: Δημιουργία νευρωνικών ερωτήσεων για την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης', 'hu': 'Megtanulás feltenni: Neurális kérdések generálása az olvasáshoz', 'it': 'Imparare a porre: Generazione di domande neurali per la comprensione della lettura', 'lt': 'Mokymasis paklausti: Neuralinių klausimų generacija supratimui skaityti', 'kk': 'Сұрақ үйрену: Нейралық сұрақ Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'mk': 'Научи да прашуваш: Генерација на нервни прашања за читање на разбирање', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk bertanya: Penjanaan soalan saraf untuk membaca pemahaman', 'ml': 'ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു: വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ജനറല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex jistaqsi: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet Newrali għall-Qtar Komprensjoni', 'mn': 'Суух суралцах: Суудлын мэдрэлийн асуулт бий болгох', 'pl': 'Nauka zadawania: Generowanie neuronowych pytań dla zrozumienia czytania', 'no': 'Læring å spørja: Neural Question Generation for reading Comprehension', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a pune: Generarea de întrebări neurale pentru înțelegerea citirii', 'sr': 'Naučenje pitanja: Generacija neuroloških pitanja za čitanje kompresije', 'si': 'Query', 'so': 'Learning to Ask: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'sv': 'Att lära sig ställa: Neural Question Generation för läsförståelse', 'ta': 'கேட்பதற்கு கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது: படிப்பது முடிப்பதற்கான நபர் கேள்வி உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'پوچھنے کے لئے سیکھنا: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'uz': 'Soò£rov olishni oò£qish', 'vi': 'Học hỏi: Thế hệ câu hỏi thần kinh cho sự hiểu biết', 'nl': 'Leren stellen: Neurale vragengeneratie voor leesbegrip', 'hr': 'Naučenje pitanja: Generacija neuroloških pitanja za čitanje kompresije', 'bg': 'Научете се да задавате: генериране на неврални въпроси за разбиране на четенето', 'de': 'Lernen zu fragen: Neurale Fragegeneration für Leseverständnis', 'id': 'Belajar bertanya: Generasi Pertanyaan Neural untuk Membaca Komprensi', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای پرسیدن: نسخه سوال عصبی برای خواندن تفکیر', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kuuliza: Uzalishaji wa maswali ya asili kwa ajili ya kusoma Kufunguliwa', 'da': 'Lære at stille: Neural spørgsmål Generation for Læseforståelse', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të pyetur: Gjenerimi i Pyetjeve Neurale për leximin e kuptimit', 'ko': '학습 질문: 읽기와 이해의 신경 문제 생성', 'hy': 'Հարցնելու սովորելը՝ ընկալում կարդալու համար նյարդային հարցեր ստեղծելը', 'tr': 'Soramak öwrenmek: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'af': 'Leer om te vra: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'am': 'ለመጠየቅ ማስተማር: የውይይት ጥያቄ Generation for reading Completion', 'bs': 'Naučenje pitanja: Generacija neuroloških pitanja za čitanje kompresije', 'bn': 'Learning to Ask: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'ca': 'Aprendre a preguntar: Generació de preguntes neuronals per llegir la comprensió', 'et': 'Õppimine küsima: neuroalsete küsimuste genereerimine lugemise mõistmiseks', 'cs': 'Učení se ptát: Generování nervových otázek pro porozumění čtení', 'az': 'Soru≈ümaq √∂yr…ônm…ôk: Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension', 'fi': 'Oppiminen kysymään: Neurokysymysten luominen lukemisen ymmärtämiseen', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Učenje vprašanja: Generacija nevronskih vprašanj za razumevanje branja', 'he': 'ללמוד לשאול: דנרציה של שאלות עצביות לקרוא בינה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འདྲི་དགོས་པ། Neural Question Generation for Reading Comprehension'}
{'en': 'We study automatic question generation for sentences from text passages in reading comprehension. We introduce an attention-based sequence learning model for the task and investigate the effect of encoding sentence- vs. paragraph-level information. In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline ; it is instead trainable end-to-end via sequence-to-sequence learning. Automatic evaluation results show that our system significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art rule-based system. In human evaluations, questions generated by our system are also rated as being more natural (i.e.,, grammaticality, fluency) and as more difficult to answer (in terms of syntactic and lexical divergence from the original text and reasoning needed to answer).i.e.,,\n      grammaticality, fluency) and as more difficult to answer (in terms of\n      syntactic and lexical divergence from the original text and reasoning\n      needed to answer).\n    ', 'ar': 'ندرس التوليد التلقائي للأسئلة للجمل من مقاطع نصية في الفهم المقروء. نقدم نموذج التعلم التسلسلي القائم على الانتباه للمهمة والتحقيق في تأثير ترميز الجملة مقابل المعلومات على مستوى الفقرة. على عكس جميع الأعمال السابقة ، لا يعتمد نموذجنا على القواعد المصنوعة يدويًا أو خط أنابيب معالجة اللغات الطبيعية المعقد ؛ إنه بدلاً من ذلك يمكن تدريبه من طرف إلى طرف عبر التعلم من التسلسل إلى التسلسل. تظهر نتائج التقييم التلقائي أن نظامنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث النظم القائمة على القواعد. في التقييمات البشرية ، يتم تصنيف الأسئلة التي يولدها نظامنا أيضًا على أنها أكثر طبيعية (أي القواعد النحوية والطلاقة) وأكثر صعوبة في الإجابة (من حيث الاختلاف النحوي والمعجمي عن النص الأصلي والمنطق المطلوب للإجابة).', 'pt': 'Estudamos a geração automática de perguntas para frases de passagens de texto em compreensão de leitura. Introduzimos um modelo de aprendizado de sequência baseado em atenção para a tarefa e investigamos o efeito da codificação de informações em nível de sentença versus parágrafo. Ao contrário de todos os trabalhos anteriores, nosso modelo não se baseia em regras artesanais ou em um pipeline sofisticado de PNL; em vez disso, é treinável de ponta a ponta por meio de aprendizado de sequência a sequência. Os resultados da avaliação automática mostram que nosso sistema supera significativamente o sistema baseado em regras de última geração. Nas avaliações humanas, as questões geradas pelo nosso sistema também são classificadas como mais naturais (ou seja, gramaticalidade, fluência) e mais difíceis de responder (em termos de divergência sintática e lexical do texto original e raciocínio necessário para responder).', 'es': 'Estudiamos la generación automática de preguntas para oraciones a partir de pasajes de texto en comprensión lectora. Introducimos un modelo de aprendizaje de secuencias basado en la atención para la tarea e investigamos el efecto de codificar información a nivel de oración frente a párrafo. A diferencia de todos los trabajos anteriores, nuestro modelo no se basa en reglas elaboradas a mano ni en un sofisticado proceso de PNL, sino que se puede entrenar de principio a fin mediante el aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia. Los resultados de la evaluación automática muestran que nuestro sistema supera significativamente al sistema basado en reglas de última generación. En las evaluaciones humanas, las preguntas generadas por nuestro sistema también se califican como más naturales (es decir, gramaticalidad, fluidez) y más difíciles de responder (en términos de divergencia sintáctica y léxica del texto original y el razonamiento necesario para responder).', 'fr': "Nous étudions la génération automatique de questions pour des phrases à partir de passages de texte en compréhension de lecture. Nous introduisons un modèle d'apprentissage séquentiel basé sur l'attention pour la tâche et étudions l'effet du codage des informations au niveau des phrases par rapport aux informations au niveau du paragraphe. Contrairement à tous les travaux précédents, notre modèle ne repose pas sur des règles artisanales ou sur un pipeline de NLP sophistiqué\xa0; il peut être entraîné de bout en bout via un apprentissage séquence-à-séquence. Les résultats de l'évaluation automatique montrent que notre système surpasse largement le système basé sur des règles de pointe. Dans les évaluations humaines, les questions générées par notre système sont également considérées comme étant plus naturelles (grammaticalité, fluidité) et plus difficiles à répondre (en termes de divergence syntaxique et lexicale par rapport au texte original et de raisonnement nécessaire pour répondre).", 'ja': '読解における文章の文章からの自動的な質問生成を研究している。我々は、タスクの注意に基づくシーケンス学習モデルを導入し、文と段落レベルの情報をエンコードする効果を調査する。これまでのすべての研究とは対照的に、私たちのモデルは手作りのルールや洗練されたNLPパイプラインに依存していません。代わりに、シーケンス間学習を介してエンドツーエンドでトレーニング可能です。自動評価の結果、当社のシステムは最先端のルールベースのシステムを大幅に上回っています。人間の評価では、私たちのシステムによって生成された質問は、より自然（すなわち、文法性、流暢性）であり、より答えにくいと評価されています（元のテキストからの構文的および辞書的乖離、および答えるために必要な推論の観点から）。', 'zh': '考观中文本段落句自成。 引入一体,研编码句段。 比之前事,不依于手工之法,杂NLP管道。 反此者,可以序学端到端也。 自评结果表明,吾统明优于先进之统。 凡人伦评估,系统自然(即语法性,流利性)与更难对(句法、词汇、文本之差,及应对之理)。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем автоматическую генерацию вопросов для предложений из текстовых отрывков в понимании чтения. Мы вводим модель обучения последовательности, основанную на внимании, для задачи и исследуем эффект кодирования информации на уровне предложения по сравнению с информацией на уровне абзаца. В отличие от всех предыдущих работ, наша модель не опирается на правила ручной работы или сложный трубопровод NLP; вместо этого ее можно обучать сквозным путем обучения последовательности к последовательности. Результаты автоматической оценки показывают, что наша система значительно превосходит современную систему, основанную на правилах. В оценках человека вопросы, порожденные нашей системой, также оцениваются как более естественные (т.е. грамматичность, беглость) и как более сложные для ответа (с точки зрения синтаксических и лексических расхождений с исходным текстом и рассуждений, необходимых для ответа).', 'hi': 'हम पढ़ने की समझ में पाठ मार्ग से वाक्यों के लिए स्वचालित प्रश्न पीढ़ी का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम कार्य के लिए एक ध्यान-आधारित अनुक्रम सीखने के मॉडल को पेश करते हैं और वाक्य- बनाम पैराग्राफ-स्तर की जानकारी को एन्कोडिंग के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। पिछले सभी कामों के विपरीत, हमारा मॉडल हाथ से तैयार किए गए नियमों या एक परिष्कृत एनएलपी पाइपलाइन पर भरोसा नहीं करता है; यह इसके बजाय अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने के माध्यम से एंड-टू-एंड को प्रशिक्षित करने योग्य है। स्वचालित मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा सिस्टम अत्याधुनिक नियम-आधारित प्रणाली को काफी बेहतर बनाता है। मानव मूल्यांकन में, हमारे सिस्टम द्वारा उत्पन्न प्रश्नों को भी अधिक प्राकृतिक (यानी, व्याकरणिकता, प्रवाह) के रूप में रेट किया जाता है और उत्तर देना अधिक कठिन होता है (मूल पाठ और उत्तर देने के लिए आवश्यक तर्क से वाक्यात्मक और शाब्दिक विचलन के संदर्भ में)।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar ghiniúint uathoibríoch cheist le haghaidh abairtí as sleachta téacs sa léamhthuiscint. Tugaimid isteach samhail foghlama seichimh aird-bhunaithe don tasc agus fiosraíonn muid an éifeacht atá le hionchódú faisnéise ar leibhéal abairte vs. I gcodarsnacht leis an obair go léir roimhe seo, níl ár múnla ag brath ar rialacha lámhdhéanta nó ar phíblíne NLP sofaisticiúla; ina ionad sin is féidir é a oiliúint ó cheann ceann go ceann trí fhoghlaim seicheamh go seicheamh. Léiríonn torthaí meastóireachta uathoibríocha go sáraíonn ár gcóras go suntasach an córas úrscothach atá bunaithe ar rialacha. I meastóireachtaí daonna, meastar go bhfuil ceisteanna a ghineann ár gcóras níos nádúrtha (i.e., gramadaí, líofacht) agus níos deacra a fhreagairt (i dtéarmaí éagsúlachta comhréire agus foclóireachta ón mbuntéacs agus an réasúnaíocht is gá a fhreagairt).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ავტომატიკური კითხვების შექმნა ტექსტის გადასწავლისთვის ტექსტის გადასწავლისთვის. ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ მონაცემების შესწავლების მოდელს დააყენებული მოდელს საქმებისთვის და ინფორმაციას კოდირება სიტყვების ეფექტის შესახებ - პრაგრაფიკის დ ყველა წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო შემდეგ ჩვენი მოდელი არ დარწმუნდება ხელის შექმნილი წესები ან სოფისტიკური NLP გარეშე; მაშინ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შესწავლება. ჩვენი სისტემა მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სისტემა, რომელიც ხელსაწყოთა სისტემა დაბათებულია. ადამიანის განსაზღვრებში, ჩვენი სისტემიდან შექმნილი კითხვები უფრო მეტად ნახვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ', 'hu': 'Automatikus kérdések generálását tanulmányozzuk a szövegrészekből származó mondatok olvasási értésében. Bevezetünk egy figyelem alapú szekvencia tanulási modellt a feladathoz, és vizsgáljuk a mondat- és bekezdésszintű információk kódolásának hatását. Az összes korábbi munkával ellentétben modellünk nem támaszkodik kézzel készített szabályokra vagy kifinomult NLP csővezetékre; Ez inkább szekvencia-szekvencia tanulás segítségével végig képezhető. Az automatikus értékelési eredmények azt mutatják, hogy rendszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja a korszerű szabályalapú rendszert. Az emberi értékelésekben a rendszerünk által generált kérdéseket természetesebbnek (nyelvtanitásnak, folyékonyságnak) és nehezebbnek minősítik (az eredeti szövegtől való szintaktikai és lexikai eltérés és a válaszhoz szükséges érvelés szempontjából).', 'it': "Studiamo la generazione automatica di domande per frasi da passaggi di testo nella comprensione della lettura. Introduciamo un modello di apprendimento sequenziale basato sull'attenzione per il compito e analizziamo l'effetto della codifica delle informazioni a livello di frase vs. paragrafo. A differenza di tutti i lavori precedenti, il nostro modello non si basa su regole artigianali o su una sofisticata pipeline NLP; è invece trainable end-to-end tramite l'apprendimento sequenziale. I risultati della valutazione automatica mostrano che il nostro sistema supera significativamente il sistema basato su regole all'avanguardia. Nelle valutazioni umane, anche le domande generate dal nostro sistema sono valutate come più naturali (cioè, grammaticalità, fluidità) e come più difficili da rispondere (in termini di divergenza sintattica e lessicale dal testo originale e ragionamento necessario per rispondere).", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame automatinį klausimų susidarymą teksto dalių sakiniuose skaitant supratimą. Įdiegiame dėmesiu pagrįstą mokymosi sekos model į užduoties atžvilgiu ir tiriame sakinių kodavimo ir straipsnio lygio informacijos poveikį. Priešingai nuo visų ankstesnių darbų, mūsų modelis nesiremia rankiniu būdu veikiančiomis taisyklėmis ar sudėtingu NLP vamzdynu; vietoj to jis gali būti traukiamas iš vienos eilės į kitos. Automatiniai vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema gerokai viršija naujausią taisyklių sistemą. Žmogaus vertinimuose mūsų sistemos sukelti klausimai taip pat vertinami kaip natūralesni (t. y., gramatiškumas, lankstumas) ir sunkiau atsakyti (sintaksinio ir leksinio skirtumo nuo pradinio teksto ir atsakymui reikalingo motyvavimo atžvilgiu).', 'mk': 'Студираме автоматска генерација на прашања за реченици од текстови во читање разбирање. Ние воведуваме модел за учење на секвенца базиран на внимание за задачата и го истражуваме ефектот на кодирање на речениците против нивото на параграф информации. За разлика од претходната работа, нашиот модел не се потпира на рачно направени правила или софистициран нафтовод НЛП; наместо тоа е возливо од крај до крај преку учење од секвенца до секвенца. Автоматски резултати на проценката покажуваат дека нашиот систем значително го надминува најсовремениот систем базиран на правила. Во човечките проценки, прашањата генерирани од нашиот систем, исто така, се оценуваат како поприродни (т.е., граматикалитет, течност) и како потешко да се одговори (во поглед на синтактичка и лексикална разлика од оригиналниот текст и размислување потребно за одговор).', 'el': 'Μελετάμε την αυτόματη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων για προτάσεις από αποσπάσματα κειμένου στην κατανόηση ανάγνωσης. Εισάγουμε ένα μοντέλο εκμάθησης ακολουθίας βασισμένο στην προσοχή για την εργασία και διερευνούμε την επίδραση της κωδικοποίησης πληροφοριών σε επίπεδο πρότασης έναντι παραγράφου. Σε αντίθεση με όλες τις προηγούμενες εργασίες, το μοντέλο μας δεν βασίζεται σε χειροποίητους κανόνες ή έναν εξελιγμένο αγωγό. Αντίθετα, είναι εκπαιδευτή από το τέλος προς το τέλος μέσω της μάθησης από ακολουθία προς ακολουθία. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτόματης αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι το σύστημά μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά το σύγχρονο σύστημα βασισμένο σε κανόνες. Στις ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις, οι ερωτήσεις που δημιουργούνται από το σύστημά μας αξιολογούνται επίσης ως πιο φυσικές (δηλ. γραμματικότητα, ευχέρεια) και ως πιο δύσκολο να απαντηθούν (όσον αφορά τη συντακτική και λεξική απόκλιση από το αρχικό κείμενο και τη λογική που απαιτείται για την απάντηση).', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari generasi soalan automatik untuk kalimat dari laluan teks dalam pemahaman pembacaan. Kami memperkenalkan model pembelajaran urutan berdasarkan perhatian untuk tugas dan menyelidiki kesan pengekodan kalimat vs. aras paragraf maklumat. Berbeza-beza dengan semua kerja sebelumnya, model kita tidak bergantung pada peraturan buatan tangan atau saluran paip NLP yang canggih; ia boleh dilatih akhir-akhir melalui pembelajaran urutan-ke-urutan. Keputusan penilaian automatik menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita jauh melebihi sistem berdasarkan peraturan state-of-the-art. Dalam penilaian manusia, soalan yang dihasilkan oleh sistem kita juga diangkat sebagai lebih semulajadi (iaitu, grammatikal, lengkap) dan lebih sukar untuk dijawab (dalam terma pelbagaian sintaktik dan leksikal dari teks asal dan alasan yang diperlukan untuk menjawab).', 'mt': "Aħna nistudjaw il-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta' mistoqsijiet għal sentenzi minn passaġġi tat-test fil-fehim tal-qari. Aħna nintroduċu mudell ta' tagħlim tas-sekwenza bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni għall-kompitu u ninvestigaw l-effett tal-kodifikazzjoni ta' informazzjoni tas-sentenza kontra l-livell tal-paragrafu. B’kuntrast max-xogħol preċedenti kollu, il-mudell tagħna ma jiddependix fuq regoli maħduma bl-idejn jew fuq pajpijiet sofistikati tal-NLP; minflok ikun jista’ jitħarreġ minn tarf għal tarf permezz ta’ tagħlim minn sekwenza għal sekwenza. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni awtomatika juru li s-sistema tagħna hija ogħla b’mod sinifikanti mis-sistema msejsa fuq ir-regoli l-aktar avvanzati. Fl-evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem, il-mistoqsijiet i ġġenerati mis-sistema tagħna huma kklassifikati wkoll bħala aktar natural i (jiġifieri, il-grammatika, il-fluwidità) u bħala aktar diffiċli biex wieħed iwieġeb (f’termini ta’ diverġenza sintattika u lexika mit-test oriġinali u r-raġunament meħtieġ biex wieħed iwieġeb).", 'kk': 'Автоматты сұрақ құру үшін мәтін жолдарының түсініктерін оқу үшін сұрақтарды оқу. Біз тапсырманың назарындағы тәртіпке негізделген сәйкестік оқыту үлгісін таңдап, кодтамасының мәліметінің нәтижесін зерттеп береміз. Бүкіл алдыңғы жұмыстың қарсы, біздің моделіміз қол құрылған ережелеріне немесе жұмыс NLP конепциясына сенбейді. оның орнына соңғы-соңғы оқытуға арналған. Автоматтық оқу нәтижелері жүйеміздің орындалған ережелердің күйіне негізделген жүйеңіздің күйіне жеткізілікті деп көрсетеді. Адам оқиғаларында жүйеміздің құрылған сұрақтары да көптеген табиғи (т.е. грамматикалық, жылдамдығы) деп оқиғалады, және жауап беру қажетті (негізгі мәтіннен синтактикалық және лексикалық айырмашылығы мен жауап беру', 'no': 'Vi studerer automatisk spørsmål for setningar frå tekstpassar i lesing av forståelse. Vi introduserer eit oppmerksomsetjingsbasert læringsmodell for oppgåva og undersøker effekten av teiknkodingsinformasjon mot avsnittnivå. I contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline; det er i staden for å trenga slutt-til-slutt via sekvens-til-sekvens-læring. Automatiske evalueringsresultat viser at systemet vårt utfører ståten av kunstregelsystemet betydelig. I menneske evalueringar blir spørsmål som er generert av systemet vårt også ratert som meir naturleg (t.d., grammatisk, flukt) og så vanskeleg å svara (ved høve av syntaktisk og leksisk forskjelling frå den opprinnelige teksten og grunnlag som trengst for å svara).', 'pl': 'Badamy automatyczne generowanie pytań dla zdań z fragmentów tekstowych w rozumieniu czytania. Wprowadzamy model uczenia się sekwencji oparty na uwadze dla zadania i badamy efekt kodowania informacji na poziomie zdania vs. akapitu. W przeciwieństwie do wszystkich poprzednich prac nasz model nie opiera się na ręcznie wykonanych regułach czy wyrafinowanym rurociągu NLP; jest zamiast tego trenowalny od końca do końca poprzez uczenie się sekwencji do sekwencji. Wyniki automatycznej oceny pokazują, że nasz system znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejszy system oparty na regułach. W ocenach ludzkich pytania generowane przez nasz system oceniane są również jako bardziej naturalne (tj. gramatyczność, płynność) oraz trudniejsze do odpowiedzi (pod względem odchylenia składni i leksykalicznego od tekstu oryginalnego i rozumowania potrzebnego do odpowiedzi).', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം ചോ ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ശിക്ഷ മോഡലിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങ് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശോധിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline;  അതിനു പകരം പരിശീലിക്കാവുന്ന അവസാനം അവസാനിക്കുന്നത് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മുതല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം പഠി സ്വയം വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു- ആര്\u200dട്ട മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ സ്വാഭാവികമാണെന്നും വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട', 'mn': 'Бид өгүүлбэрээс автоматик асуулт бий болгохыг судалдаг. Бид ажлын төлөө анхаарлын үндсэн дарааллын суралцах загварын загварыг танилцуулж, өгүүлбэрийн шинжлэх ухааны үр дүнг судалж байна. Өмнөх бүх ажлын эсрэг бидний загвар нь гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй хууль эсвэл сайхан NLP хоолойн шугам дээр байхгүй. дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах боломжтой. Автоматикийн оюутнуудын үр дүнд бидний систем урлагийн дүрэм дээр суурилсан системийг үнэхээр илүү үр дүнтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудад бидний системээс гаргасан асуултууд мөн байгалийн (яг л грамматик, шингэнт) болон хариултын тулд илүү хэцүү (анхны текстээс, хариултын тулд шаардлагатай шалтгааныг илүү хэцүү хэлбэртэй).', 'so': "We study automatic question generation for sentences from text passages in reading comprehension.  Waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa model waxbarasho oo ku saleysan taxadirka waxbarashada, waxaana baaraynaa saameynta qoraalka koowaad-vs. Iska duwan dhammaan shaqada hore, modellkayagu kuma xirna sharciyada gacmaha shaqada ama dhaqdhaqaaqa NLP; waxay ku jirtaa waxbarashada dhammaadka ugu horeysa dhammaadka Shaqoyinka qiimeynta waxaa muujiya in nidaamkayagu uu si muhiim ah u sameeyo nidaamka sharciga farshaxanka. Qiimeynta biniaadamka waxaa sidoo kale lagu tiriyaa su'aalaha nidaamkayaga soo dhashay inay noqdaan asal badan (tusaale ahaan grammatika, faa'iidada) iyo in ay ugu adag yihiin in la jawaabo (sida kala duwanaanshaha muuqashada iyo iskala xiriirka qoraalka asalka ah iyo sababta loo baahan yahay inay jawaabaan).", 'sv': 'Vi studerar automatisk frågegenerering för meningar från textavsnitt i läsförståelse. Vi introducerar en uppmärksamhetsbaserad sekvensinlärningsmodell för uppgiften och undersöker effekten av kodning av mening- vs. paragrafnivå information. Till skillnad från allt tidigare arbete förlitar vår modell sig inte på handgjorda regler eller en sofistikerad NLP pipeline; Det är istället trainable end-to-end via sekvens-to-sekvens lärande. Automatiska utvärderingsresultat visar att vårt system avsevärt överträffar det toppmoderna regelbaserade systemet. I mänskliga utvärderingar bedöms frågor som genereras av vårt system också som mer naturliga (dvs., grammatik, flytande) och som svårare att besvara (i termer av syntaktisk och lexikal avvikelse från originaltexten och resonemang som behövs för att besvara).', 'sr': 'Proučavamo automatsku generaciju pitanja za rečenice iz tekstskih prolaza u čitanju razumijevanja. Predstavljamo model učenja na pažnji bazirani na sekvenci za zadatak i istražujemo učinak informacija o kodiranju rečenice protiv nivoa paragrafa. Za suprotnost svim prethodnim poslovima, naš model se ne oslanja na pravila koje su napravljene rukama ili sofisticiranu NLP pipeline; Umesto toga je trenirala kraj do kraja putem učenja sekvence do sekvence. Rezultati automatske procjene pokazuju da naš sistem značajno nadmašuje stanje umjetničkog pravila. U ljudskim procjenama, pitanja koje su stvorene našim sistemom takođe su procenjene kao prirodnije (tj., gramatičnost, tekućina) i teže odgovoriti (u smislu sintaktičke i leksičke razlike od originalnog teksta i razloga potrebne za odgovor).', 'ro': 'Studiem generarea automată de întrebări pentru propoziții din pasaje de text în înțelegerea citirii. Introducem un model de învățare a secvențelor bazat pe atenție pentru sarcină și investigăm efectul codării informațiilor la nivel de frază vs. paragraf. Spre deosebire de toate lucrările anterioare, modelul nostru nu se bazează pe reguli realizate manual sau pe o conductă sofisticată NLP; este în schimb instruibil de la capăt la capăt prin învățare secvență la secvență. Rezultatele evaluării automate arată că sistemul nostru depășește semnificativ sistemul bazat pe reguli de ultimă generație. În evaluările umane, întrebările generate de sistemul nostru sunt, de asemenea, evaluate ca fiind mai naturale (adică, gramaticalitate, fluență) și ca fiind mai dificil de răspuns (în termeni de divergență sintactică și lexicală față de textul original și raționamentul necesar pentru a răspunde).', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் தானாகவே கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்திற்கு உரை கடவுகளை படிக்கும் பொழுது தானாகவே படிக்கிறோம். நாம் பணிக்கு ஒரு கவனத்தை அடிப்படையான தொடர் கற்றுக்கொள்ள மாதிரியை அறிவிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் குறியீட்டு வாக்கியத்தை மற்று In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline;  பின்வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி கற்றுக்கொண்டு பயிற்சி முடியும் முடிவுக்கு பதிலாக உள்ளது. தானாகவே evaluation results show that our system significantly outperforms the state- of- the- art rule- based system. மனித மதிப்புகளில், எங்கள் கணினியில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகள் மிகவும் இயற்கையாக இருக்கும் (அதாவது, சிறந்த, விளைவுகள்) மற்றும் பதில் கொடுக்க கடினமாக இருக்கும் (மூல உரைய', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා පාළ පාසල් වලින් පාසල් වලින්. අපි අවධානය අධික පරික්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කාර්යය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ සංකේතන පරීක්ෂණය සඳ මුලින්ම වැඩට වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ මොඩල් අත් කරපු නීතියක් නෙවෙයි, නැත්තම් සොපිස්ටික් NLP පායිප්ලින් එකක ඒක වෙනුවෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් න මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයේදී, අපේ පද්ධතියෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වගේම ස්වභාවික විශ්ලේෂණය වගේම (ඉතින්, විශ්ලේෂණය, ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'ur': 'ہم اپنی سؤال کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے متن پھیرنے کے مطابق عبارت کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اس کام کے لئے ایک توجه پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے سیکھنے کے نمونڈل کو معرفی کر دیتے ہیں اور اکنوڈینڈ مجلس کے اثر کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں - پاراگراف-سطح معلومات کے ساتھ۔ تمام پہلے کاروں کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارا مدل ہاتھ بنایا ہوا قانون یا ایک مصنوعی NLP پیپ لین پر اعتماد نہیں کرتا، یہ اس کے بدلے سفارشی کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ انتظام کرنے والی ہے۔ اپنا سیسٹم بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ آرت کے قانون کی سیسٹم کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ انسان کی ارزیابی میں، ہمارے سیستم سے پیدا ہوئے سوال بھی زیادہ طبیعی (یعنی، گراماتیکی، طبیعی) اور جواب دینے کے لئے زیادہ مشکل ہیں (سینٹکتیکی اور لکسیکی اختلاف کے مطابق اصلی متن سے اور جواب دینے کے لئے لازم ہے).', 'uz': "Matn maxfiy soʻzlaridan o'qish uchun avtomatik savol yaratishni o'rganamiz. Biz vazifani o'rganish modelini o'rganish va maxfiy soʻzni kodlash muvaffaqiyatlarini tahrirlash. In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline;  uning o'rganish orqali o'rganishga o'rganadi. Avtomatik qiymatlar natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, bizning tizimmiz hodisa boshqaruvchi qoidalar asosiy tizimini bajaradi. Inson qiymatlarida, bizning tizimimizning yaratilgan savollar esa asl soddalik (balki, grammatika, fluktsiya) va javob berish juda qiyin edi (asl matnning asl va leksik ajratilishi va javob berish kerak bo'lgan sabablarga ko'proq).", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu thế hệ câu hỏi tự động cho câu từ đoạn văn trong sự thấu hiểu. Chúng tôi đưa ra một mô hình học trình tập trung dựa trên công việc và điều tra kết quả của việc mã hóa thông tin vào các đoạn. Trái với những tác phẩm trước đây, mẫu của chúng ta không dựa trên những quy tắc nhân tạo hay một đường ống khôn ngoan của NMB; Nó được huấn luyện từ cuối đến cuối thông qua các chuỗi-tới-trình học. Kết quả đánh giá tự động cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta vượt trội hơn hệ thống quy định. Trong phần đánh giá của con người, câu hỏi tạo ra bởi hệ thống của chúng ta cũng được cho là tự nhiên hơn (v.d., ngữ pháp, khéo léo, khéo léo) và khó trả lời (theo cách nhìn khác biệt ngôn ngữ và ngôn ngữ bản gốc cần để trả lời).', 'nl': 'We bestuderen automatische vragengeneratie voor zinnen uit tekstpassages in leesbegrip. We introduceren een attentie-based sequence learning model voor de taak en onderzoeken het effect van het coderen van zin- vs. alinea-niveau informatie. In tegenstelling tot al het voorgaande werk is ons model niet afhankelijk van handgemaakte regels of een verfijnde NLP-pijplijn; Het is in plaats daarvan end-to-end traceerbaar via sequence-to-sequence learning. Automatische evaluatieresultaten tonen aan dat ons systeem aanzienlijk beter presteert dan het state-of-the-art regelgebaseerde systeem. In menselijke evaluaties worden vragen gegenereerd door ons systeem ook beoordeeld als natuurlijker (d.w.z. grammaticaliteit, vloeiendheid) en als moeilijker te beantwoorden (in termen van syntactische en lexicale afwijking van de oorspronkelijke tekst en redenering die nodig is om te beantwoorden).', 'da': 'Vi studerer automatisk spørgsmålstegnelse for sætninger fra tekstpassager i læseforståelse. Vi introducerer en opmærksomhedsbaseret sekvenslæringsmodel til opgaven og undersøger effekten af kodning af sætning vs. afsnitsniveau information. I modsætning til alt tidligere arbejde er vores model ikke afhængig af håndlavede regler eller en sofistikeret NLP pipeline; Det er i stedet træningsbart end-to-end via sekvens-to-sekvens læring. Automatiske evalueringsresultater viser, at vores system overgår det avancerede regelbaserede system betydeligt. I menneskelige evalueringer vurderes spørgsmål genereret af vores system også som mere naturlige (dvs.,,, grammaticalitet, flydende) og som vanskeligere at besvare (med hensyn til syntaktisk og leksiksk afvigelse fra den oprindelige tekst og ræsonnement, der er nødvendig for at besvare).', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die automatische Fragegenerierung für Sätze aus Textpassagen im Leseverständnis. Wir führen ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Sequenzlernmodell für die Aufgabe ein und untersuchen den Effekt der Codierung von Informationen auf Satz- vs. Absatzebene. Im Gegensatz zu allen bisherigen Arbeiten basiert unser Modell nicht auf handgefertigten Regeln oder einer ausgeklügelten NLP-Pipeline; Stattdessen ist es durch Sequenz-to-Sequenz-Lernen von Ende zu Ende trainierbar. Automatische Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen, dass unser System das moderne regelbasierte System deutlich übertrifft. In menschlichen Auswertungen werden Fragen, die von unserem System generiert werden, auch als natürlicher (d.h. Grammatikalität, Fließfähigkeit) und als schwieriger zu beantworten (in Bezug auf syntaktische und lexikalische Abweichungen vom Originaltext und die zu beantwortenden Argumentationen).', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari generasi pertanyaan otomatis untuk kalimat dari kalimat teks dalam pemahaman membaca. Kami memperkenalkan model pelajaran urutan berdasarkan perhatian untuk tugas dan menyelidiki efek pengekodan kalimat vs. tingkat paragraf informasi. Berbeda dengan semua pekerjaan sebelumnya, model kita tidak bergantung pada aturan yang dibuat tangan atau pipa NLP yang sophistik; sebaliknya bisa dilatih dari akhir ke akhir melalui pelajaran dari urutan ke urutan. Hasil evaluasi otomatis menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita jauh melebihi sistem terbaik berdasarkan aturan. In human evaluations, questions generated by our system are also rated as being more natural (i.e.,, grammaticality, fluency) and as more difficult to answer (in terms of syntactic and lexical divergence from the original text and reasoning needed to answer).', 'fa': 'ما نسل سوال خودکار را برای جمله\u200cهای متن در خواندن درک مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. ما یک مدل یادگیری را بر پایه توجه برای کار معرفی می کنیم و تاثیر محکوم کردن محکوم- علیه مرحله پاراگراف- را تحقیق می کنیم. در مقابل تمام کارهای قبلی، مدل ما به قوانین ساخته شده دست یا لوله NLP متفاوت اعتماد ندارد. به جای این است که از طریق یادگیری سر و پایان آموزشی سر و پایان قابل آموزشی است. نتایج ارزیابی خودکار نشان می دهد که سیستم ما به طور معنی سیستم قانون بنیاد هنر را اجرا می کند. در ارزیابی انسان، سؤال های توسط سیستم ما هم به عنوان طبیعی بیشتری (یعنی، گراماتیک، طبیعی) ارزیابی می\u200cشوند و به عنوان جواب سخت\u200cتر (به عنوان تفاوت سنتاکتیک و زبان\u200cشناسی از متن اصلی و دلیل\u200cهای نیاز برای پاسخ\u200cدادن) می\u200cشوند.', 'bg': 'Изследваме автоматично генериране на въпроси за изречения от текстови пасажи в разбирането за четене. Въвеждаме базиран на вниманието модел за обучение на последователност за задачата и изследваме ефекта от кодирането на изречение спрямо абзац информация. За разлика от всички предишни работи, нашият модел не разчита на ръчно изработени правила или усъвършенстван тръбопровод за НЛП; Вместо това може да се обучава от край до край чрез обучение от последователност до последователност. Резултатите от автоматичната оценка показват, че нашата система значително надминава най-съвременната система, базирана на правила. В човешките оценки въпросите, генерирани от нашата система, също се оценяват като по-естествени (т.е., граматичност, плавност) и като по-трудни за отговор (по отношение на синтактично и лексикално отклонение от оригиналния текст и разсъждения, необходими за отговор).', 'hr': 'Proučavamo automatsku generaciju pitanja za rečenice iz tekstskih prolaza u čitanju razumijevanja. Predstavljamo model učenja na temelju pažnje osnovanog sekvencije za zadatak i istražujemo učinak informacija o kodiranju kazne protiv razine odstavka. Za suprotnost svim prethodnim poslovima, naš model se ne oslanja na pravila koje su napravljene rukama ili sofisticiranu cijevinu NLP-a; umjesto toga je trenirala kraj do kraja putem učenja sekvence do sekvence. Rezultati automatske procjene pokazuju da naš sustav značajno nadmašuje stanje umjetničkog pravila. U ljudskim procjenama, pitanja koje su proizvedene našim sustavom također procijenjene su prirodnije (tj., gramatičnost, tekućina) i teže odgovoriti (u smislu sintaktičke i leksičke razlike od originalnog teksta i razloga potrebne za odgovor).', 'sw': 'Tunafundisha kizazi cha maswali binafsi kwa ajili ya hukumu kutoka kwa njia za maandishi katika kusoma ufahamu. Tunaonyesha muundo wa kujifunza kwa mfululizo wa msingi wa ufundi wa kazi na kuchunguza matokeo ya hukumu - vs. taarifa za kiwango cha paragraph. Tofauti na kazi zote zilizopita, muundo wetu hautegemea sheria zilizo na mikono au pipeline ya NLP yenye utaalamu; badala yake ni mafunzo ya mwisho mwishoni kupitia kujifunza kwa mfululizo. Matokeo ya uchunguzi binafsi yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unafanya kazi kwa kiasi kikubwa na mfumo wa utawala wa sanaa. Katika tathmini za binadamu, maswali yaliyotengenezwa na mfumo wetu pia yanakadiriwa kuwa ni asili zaidi (yaani, grammati, ufanisi) na ni vigumu zaidi kujibu (kwa kujaribu tofauti za kibiashara na kiukweli kutoka kwa maandishi ya asili na sababu zinazohitajika kujibu).', 'af': "Ons leer outomatiese vraag genereering vir teikene van teks wagte in lees verstanding. Ons introduseer 'n aandag-gebaseerde sekvens leer model vir die taak en ondersoek die effek van enkodering seting- teen paragraaf-vlak inligting. In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline; Dit is in plaas wat die einde-na-einde deur sekwensie-na-sekwensie leer is. Outomatiese evalueringsresultate vertoon dat ons stelsel betekeurig uitvoer die staat van die kuns reël-gebaseerde stelsel. In menslike evaluasies word vrae wat deur ons stelsel genereer is ook as meer natuurlik (i.e., grammatiese, fluiditeit) en so moeilik om te antwoord (in terms of syntaktiese en leksiese verskil van die oorspronklike teks en redening nodig om te antwoord).", 'sq': "Ne studiojmë gjenerimin automatik të pyetjeve për fjalimet nga kalimet e tekstit në kuptimin e leximit. Ne futim një model mësimi të sekuencës bazuar në vëmendje për detyrën dhe hetojmë efektin e kodimit të fjalëve kundër informacionit të nivelit të paragrafit. Në kundërshtim me të gjitha punët e mëparshme, modeli ynë nuk mbështetet në rregullat e ndërtuar me dorë apo një tubacion të sofistikuar NLP; është në vend të kësaj e trajnuar nga fundi në fund nëpërmjet mësimit nga sekuenca në sekuencë. Rezultatet automatike të vlerësimit tregojnë se sistemi ynë është më i mirë se sistemi i rendit më i lartë. Në vlerësimet njerëzore, pyetjet e gjeneruara nga sistemi ynë vlerësohen gjithashtu si të jenë më natyrore (pra, grammaticiteti, fluenca) dhe më të vështira për t'u përgjigjur (në lidhje me dallimin sintaktik dhe lexik nga teksti origjinal dhe arsyetimin e nevojshëm për t'u përgjigjur).", 'am': 'ጥያቄን ትውልድ ከጽሑፍ መግቢያ መግለጫ በማንበብ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የሥርዓት ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን ለማድረግ እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ ከቀድሞው ሥራ ሁሉ ተቃራኒ፣ ሞዴላያችን በእጁ በተሰራ ሥርዓቶች ወይም በንጹሕ የNLP ፖሊስ አይደገፍም፤ በ ግንኙነት ለመተማር መጨረሻ ይቻላል:: አውቶማቲካዊ ምርጫዎች ፍሬዎችን ሲያሳየው የሥርዓት-የሕግ-የሥርዓት-ሥርዓት-ሥርዓት-ሥርዓት ሥርዓት የተደረገ ሲሆን ነው፡፡ በሰው ማስታወቂያው፣ የስርዓታችን ጥያቄዎች ደግሞ አብዛኛዎቹ ፍጥረታዊ (ምናልባት፣ grammaticality፣ ፍጥረት) እና መልስ እንደሚችል ይቆጠራሉ፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz sözleri metin geçiklerinden okamak üçin otomatik soragy döredip okaýarys. Biz buýruk üçin üns tabanly bir dizim öwrenmesi nusgyny çykaryp, we ködleme sözleriniň täsirini çykaryp, paragraf derejesi bilen baglanýarys. Öňki işiň ählisiniň garşynda, biziň modelimiz elimizden çykan kurallara ýa-da soňky bir NLP pipeline ynanmaýar; bu ýerde yzarlama-tertibe öwrenmek üçin soňra taýýarlanabilir. Otomatik deňlenme netijesi biziň sistemimiziň sungat düzgünlerine daşary ýigrendigini görkezýär. Adamlar deňleşenlerde, sistemamyzyň tarapyndan üretilen soraglary daşary dogry hökmünde (diýmek bolsa, gramatika, akyllyk) we jogaplamak kyn (başlangyç metinden syntaktik we leksiýaly döwletlere görä) deňleşenler.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ավտոմատիկ հարցերի ստեղծման վերաբերյալ կարդալու ընկալության տեքստի հատվածներից արտահայտված նախադասությունների համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուշադրության վրա հիմնված հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության մոդել աշխատանքի համար և ուսումնասիրում ենք նախադասությունների կոդավորման արդյունքը համեմատած պարբերակի մակարդակի ինֆորմացիայի վրա: Ի հակադրություն նախորդ բոլոր աշխատանքների, մեր մոդելը չի հիմնված ձեռագործ կանոնների կամ բարդ ՆԼՊ խողովակաշարի վրա: այն փոխարենը վերջ-վերջ սովորելի է հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության միջոցով: Ավտոմատիկ գնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր կանոններով հիմնված համակարգը: Մարդկային գնահատումներում մեր համակարգի կողմից առաջացած հարցերը նաև գնահատվում են որպես ավելի բնական հարցեր (այսինքն, գրամատիկական, ճկուն) և ավելի դժվար պատասխան տալու հարցեր (սինտակտիկ և լեքսիկական տարբերությունների առումով սկզբնական տեքստից և պատասխանի համար հարկավոր մտածողություններից', 'ko': '우리는 읽기와 이해에서 텍스트 단락에서 자동으로 문장을 생성하는 문제를 연구했다.우리는 주의를 바탕으로 하는 서열 학습 모델을 도입하고 문장과 단락 정보를 인코딩하는 효과를 연구했다.이전 모든 작업에 비해 우리 모델은 수동으로 제작된 규칙이나 복잡한 NLP 파이프에 의존하지 않습니다.반대로 순서부터 순서까지의 학습을 통해 처음부터 끝까지 교육을 받을 수 있다.자동 평가 결과에 의하면 우리의 시스템은 가장 선진적인 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 시스템보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.인류 평가에서 우리 시스템이 생성한 문제도 더욱 자연스러운(즉 문법성, 유창성)과 더 어려운 대답(문법과 어휘와 원문의 차이, 그리고 대답에 필요한 추리로 평가된다.', 'az': 'Biz mətn keçmişindən sözlər üçün otomatik sual nəzəriyyəti öyrənirik. Biz işin məlumatı üçün dikkati-tabanlı seçmə modelini təşkil edirik və kodlama sözlərinin və paragraf-seviyyəti məlumatının etkisini incidirik. Bütün əvvəlki işlərə qarşı modellərimiz əl yaratdığı qaydalara və ya sofistikli NLP pipeline təvəkkül etməz. Bu, sequence-to-sequence öyrənməsi vasitəsilə təhsil edilə bilər. Avtomatik değerlendirmə sonuçları sistemimizin möcüzə olaraq, sanat qüvvəsi sisteminin üstünlüyünü göstərir. İnsanların değerlendirmələrində sistemimizin yaratdığı suallar da daha təbiətli (i.e. gramatik, fərqli) və cavab vermək üçün daha çətin (sintaktik və leksik fərqli olaraq başlangıç metindən və cavab vermək üçün ehtiyacı olan razılıq olaraq).', 'cs': 'Studujeme automatické generování otázek pro věty z textových pasáží v porozumění čtení. Představujeme model sekvenčního učení založený na pozornosti pro daný úkol a zkoumáme vliv kódování informací na úrovni věty versus odstavce. Na rozdíl od všech předchozích prací se náš model nespoléhá na ručně vytvořená pravidla nebo sofistikované NLP potrubí; je namísto toho trénovatelný end-to-end prostřednictvím sekvence-to-sekvence učení. Výsledky automatického vyhodnocení ukazují, že náš systém výrazně překonává nejmodernější systém založený na pravidlech. V lidském hodnocení jsou otázky generované naším systémem hodnoceny také jako přirozenější (tj. gramatičnost, plynulost) a jako obtížnější odpovědět (z hlediska syntaktické a lexikální odchylky od původního textu a odůvodnění potřebné k odpovědi).', 'bn': 'আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশ্ন প্রজন্মের জন্য প্রশ্ন পড়তে থাকি লেখা পাসপেজের জন্য। আমরা কাজের জন্য একটি মনোযোগের ভিত্তিক সেকেন্ডের শিক্ষা মডেল চিহ্নিত করি এবং এনকোডিং বাক্যের প্রভাব তদন্ত করি। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিরুদ্ধে আমাদের মডেল হাতে কাজ করা নিয়ম বা এনএলপি পাইপেলাইনের উপর নির্ভর করে না। এটা প্রশিক্ষণের পরিবর্তে প্রশিক্ষণীয় শেখার মাধ্যমে। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক শিল্প-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্ মানুষের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে আমাদের সিস্টেমের দ্বারা উৎপাদন করা প্রশ্ন আরো প্রাকৃতিক হিসেবে হিসেবে হিসেবে হিসেবে গ্রহণ করা হয় (যেমন, গ্রামাটিক্যালিটিক, ফ্লু', 'bs': 'Proučavamo automatsku generaciju pitanja za rečenice iz tekstskih prolaza u čitanju razumijevanja. Predstavljamo model učenja na temelju pažnje osnovanog sekvence za zadatak i istražujemo učinak informacija o kodiranju rečenice protiv nivoa paragrafa. Za suprotnost svim prethodnim poslovima, naš model se ne oslanja na pravila koje su napravljene rukama ili sofisticiranu cijevinu NLP-a; umjesto toga je trenirala kraj do kraja putem učenja sekvence do sekvence. Rezultati automatske procjene pokazuju da naš sistem značajno nadmašuje stanje umjetničkog pravila. U ljudskim procjenama, pitanja koje su proizvedene našim sistemom također su procjenjene kao prirodnije (tj., gramatičnost, tečnost) i kao teže odgovoriti (u smislu sintaktičke i leksičke razlike od originalnog teksta i razloga potrebne za odgovor).', 'ca': "Estudem la generació automàtica de preguntes per a frases de passages de text en la comprensió lectora. Introduïm un model d'aprenentatge de seqüències basat en l'atenció per a la tasca i investigam l'efecte de codificar frases contra informació de nivell de paràgraf. A diferent de tota la feina anterior, el nostre model no es basa en normes artificials ni en un sofisticat gasoducte NLP; és, en canvi, entrenable de cap a cap mitjançant l'aprenentatge de seqüència a seqüència. Els resultats de l'evaluació automàtica mostren que el nostre sistema supera significativament el sistema basat en normes més modernes. En les evaluacions humanes, les preguntes generades pel nostre sistema també són més naturals (és a dir, gramàtica, fluïtat) i més difícils de respondre (en termes de divergència sinàctica i lècsica del text original i el raonament necessari per respondre).", 'et': 'Uurime automaatset küsimuste genereerimist tekstilõikudest lugemise mõistmise lausete jaoks. Tutvustame ülesandele tähelepanupõhise jadaõppe mudeli ning uurime lause- või paragrahvitaseme teabe kodeerimise mõju. Erinevalt kõigist varasematest töödest ei tugine meie mudel käsitsi valmistatud reeglitele ega keerukale uue tööprogrammi torujuhtmele; See on selle asemel koolitatav otsast otsa järjestusesse õppimise kaudu. Automaatse hindamise tulemused näitavad, et meie süsteem ületab oluliselt kaasaegset reeglipõhist süsteemi. Inimhinnangutes hinnatakse meie süsteemi tekitatud küsimusi ka loomulikumaks (st,, grammatilisuseks, sujuvamaks) ja raskemaks vastata (süntaktilise ja leksikaalse lahknevuse poolest originaaltekstist ja vastamiseks vajalikust arutlusest).', 'fi': 'Tutkimme automaattista kysymysten tuottamista lauseille tekstikohtien lukemisen ymmärtämisessä. Esittelemme tehtävään huomiopohjaisen sekvenssiooppimisen mallin ja tutkimme lauseiden ja kappaletason tietojen koodauksen vaikutusta. Toisin kuin kaikki aiemmat työt, mallimme ei perustu käsin tehtyihin sääntöihin tai hienostuneeseen NLP-putkeen. Se on sen sijaan koulutettavissa päästä päähän sekvenssistä sekvenssiin oppimisen kautta. Automaattisen arvioinnin tulokset osoittavat, että järjestelmämme suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin kuin uusin sääntöpohjainen järjestelmä. Ihmisten arvioinneissa järjestelmämme synnyttämät kysymykset luokitellaan myös luonnollisemmiksi (eli kieliopillisemmiksi, sujuvammiksi) ja vaikeammiksi vastata (syntaktisiksi ja sanastollisiksi eroiksi alkuperäisestä tekstistä ja vastaamiseen tarvittavasta päättelystä).', 'sk': 'Proučujemo avtomatsko ustvarjanje vprašanj za stavke iz besedilnih odlomkov v razumevanju branja. Za nalogo predstavimo model učenja zaporedja, ki temelji na pozornosti in raziskujemo učinek kodiranja stavkov v primerjavi z odstavkom. V nasprotju z vsemi prejšnjimi deli naš model ne temelji na ročno izdelanih pravilih ali prefinjenem plinovodu NLP; Namesto tega se lahko usposablja od konca do konca z učenjem od zaporedja do zaporedja. Rezultati avtomatskega ocenjevanja kažejo, da naš sistem znatno presega najsodobnejši sistem, ki temelji na pravilih. V človeških vrednotenjih so vprašanja, ki jih ustvari naš sistem, ocenjena tudi kot bolj naravna (tj. slovničnost, tekočina) in težje odgovoriti (v smislu sintaktične in leksikalne razlike od izvirnega besedila in razlogov, potrebnih za odgovor).', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים דור שאלות אוטומטיות למשפטים ממעברים טקסטים בהבנה קריאה. אנחנו מציגים מודל לימוד רצף שמבוסס על תשומת לב למשימה ולחקור את ההשפעה של קידום משפט נגד מידע רמה פראגמה. בניגוד לכל העבודה הקודמת, המודל שלנו לא סומך על חוקים מיוחדים או צינור NLP מתוחכם; במקום זה אפשרי להתאמן מסוף לסוף דרך לימוד מסורה לסורה. תוצאות הערכה אוטומטית מראות שהמערכת שלנו יוצאת יותר משמעותית מהמערכת המבוססת על החוקים המאוחרים. בערכות אנושיות, שאלות שנוצרות על ידי המערכת שלנו גם מוערכות כאלה טבעיות יותר (כלומר, גרמטיקה, נוזלות) וכקשות יותר לענות (במונחים של ההבדל סינטקטי ולקסיקלי מהטקסט המקורי וההגיון הנדרש לענות).', 'ha': "Kana karatun danne masu tambayar farat ɗaya wa saurãren kwanan gaske daga matsayin da ke karatun littãfi. Tuna nuna wani misali na karanta masu bincike wa aikin, kuma Munã jãyayya mai amfani da haske-ko-zane-zane-zane-zane. Tsamman da duk aikin da ya gabãta, misalinmu bã ya dõgara a kan kanuni da hannayen hannayen hannayen da aka samu'a da pilin NLP; shi ne mai amfani da ƙari-zuwa-ƙari @ action: button Daga ƙidãyayyuta mutum, za'a yi tambayar wanda aka ƙãga halittar na'ananmu kamar yana da mafi natsuwa (misali, grammati, tumbakin) kuma yana da mafi tsananin su karɓa (cikin masu gauraya da diffaniki na littãfin na farko da saba da za'a buƙata).", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé milih perusahaan langgar sampeyan kanggo Kemerdekaan kapan kelas teks Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tapi nggambar barang seneng pisan seneng pisan banget nggawe barang nggambar barang nggambar barang Bukakipun kaé kabèh wong trabah sing rawe, model sing bisa ngewehi manut karo sistem sing apik lan basa sing sampeyan NLP; Learn Mode Adverture Pintualisan uwong, suarané sing gagalé ning sistem awak dhéwé kuwi basa sing katêpakan (i.e.g.gram, ajerané) lan tambah kuwi susahé awak (terus sakjane sistem sing apik lan luwih-suarané sing apik dhéwé) lan tambah kuwi susahé awak dhéwé.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཡི་གེའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་མི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་རྟོགས་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་གནད་དོན་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་གྲལ་རིམ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་ལྟ་ཀློག In contrast to all previous work, our model does not rely on hand-crafted rules or a sophisticated NLP pipeline; or འདི་ལྟར་རྗེས་སུ་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་གྱིས་མཇུག་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མིང་རིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན་ཡིན་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་ཀྱང་རང་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning to Generate Market Comments from Stock Prices', 'ar': 'تعلم إنشاء تعليقات السوق من أسعار الأسهم', 'fr': 'Apprendre à générer des commentaires de marché à partir des cours des actions', 'es': 'Aprender a generar comentarios en el mercado a partir de los precios', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a gerar comentários de mercado a partir dos preços das ações', 'ja': '株価から市場コメントを生成する方法を学ぶ', 'zh': '学成市论于股票价格', 'hi': 'शेयर कीमतों से बाजार टिप्पणियाँ उत्पन्न करने के लिए सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение генерации рыночных комментариев на основе цен на акции', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas Tuairimí Margaidh a Ghiniúint ó Phraghsanna Stoic', 'ka': 'მარკეტის კომენტრების შექმნა', 'hu': 'Megtanulás a piaci megjegyzések generálására a részvényárak alapján', 'el': 'Μάθετε να δημιουργείτε σχόλια αγοράς από τις τιμές μετοχών', 'it': 'Imparare a generare commenti di mercato dai prezzi azionari', 'kk': 'Мекет мәліметтерін құру үшін оқыту', 'lt': 'Mokymasis pateikti rinkos pastabas iš akcijų kainų', 'mk': 'Научи да генерира пазарни коментари од цените на акциите', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk menghasilkan komen pasar dari harga saham', 'ml': 'മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex tiġġenera Kummenti tas-Suq mill-Prezzijiet tal-istokk', 'mn': 'Зах зээл санхүүгийн үнэтэй тэмдэглэгдэхийг суралцсан.', 'pl': 'Nauka generowania komentarzy rynkowych z cen akcji', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a genera comentarii de piață din prețurile acțiunilor', 'no': 'Læring for å laga markedskommentarar frå stokkprøver', 'sr': 'Naučenje za generiranje komentara tržišta iz cena', 'so': 'Waxbarashada ka sameynta qiimaha suuqa', 'sv': 'Lär dig att generera marknadskommentarer från aktiekurser', 'si': 'ස්ටෝක් වලින් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ta': 'விலைகளிலிருந்து சந்தை குறிப்புகளை உருவாக்க கற்றுக்கொள்வது', 'ur': 'Stock Prices سے بازار کی کمانٹ جوڑنے کی سیکھ رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Market izohlarini qiymatdan yaratish', 'vi': 'Học để lấy lại bình luận thị trường', 'bg': 'Научете се да генерирате пазарни коментари от цените на акциите', 'nl': 'Leren om marktopmerkingen te genereren vanuit aandelenkoersen', 'hr': 'Naučenje proizvodnje komentara tržišta iz cijena', 'de': 'Lernen, Marktkommentare aus Aktienkursen zu generieren', 'da': 'Lære at generere markedskommentarer fra aktiekurser', 'ko': '주가에 따라 시장 평론을 생성하는 것을 배우다', 'sw': 'Learning to Generate Market Comments from Stock Prices', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای ایجاد توضیح بازار از قیمت\u200cها', 'id': 'Belajar untuk menghasilkan komentar pasar dari harga saham', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të gjeneruar komente të tregut nga çmimet e aksioneve', 'am': 'የመድረክ ምልክቶች', 'az': '慈쑺犱쑬熱焠祩쥭璙쥬犙湩쥤溙倠쑡쒟璱吠駉捲볃쥭沙駉楲楮礠牡瑡慭ⁱ뛃特駉浮駉੫', 'af': 'Leer om Merkkommentaar te genereer van Stoor Pries', 'bs': 'Naučenje proizvodnje komentara tržišta iz cena', 'tr': 'pazar töwzihlerini Stock Hasaplardan döretmäge öwrenmek', 'hy': 'Սովորել շուկայի մեկնաբանություններ ստեղծել արժեքներից', 'ca': "Aprendre a generar comentaris del mercat a partir dels preus d'acció", 'et': 'Õppimine genereerida turukomplekte aktsiahindadest', 'bn': 'চিহ্নিত মূল্য থেকে মার্কেট মন্তব্য তৈরি করতে শিখা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Naučit se generovat tržní komentáře z cen akcií', 'fi': 'Oppiminen luomaan markkinakommentteja osakehinnoista', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'sk': 'Učenje ustvarjanja tržnih komentarjev iz cen delnic', 'he': 'ללמוד ליצור תגובות שוק ממחירי המניות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དངུལ་སུ་དངུལ་ཐང་ཐོག་གི་བཤད་སྐོར་དང་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a novel encoder-decoder model for automatically generating market comments from stock prices. The model first encodes both short- and long-term series of stock prices so that it can mention short- and long-term changes in stock prices. In the decoding phase, our model can also generate a numerical value by selecting an appropriate arithmetic operation such as subtraction or rounding, and applying it to the input stock prices. Empirical experiments show that our best model generates market comments at the fluency and the informativeness approaching human-generated reference texts.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا جديدًا لوحدة فك التشفير لتوليد تعليقات السوق تلقائيًا من أسعار الأسهم. يشفر النموذج أولاً كلاً من سلسلة أسعار الأسهم قصيرة وطويلة الأجل بحيث يمكنه ذكر التغيرات قصيرة وطويلة الأجل في أسعار الأسهم. في مرحلة فك التشفير ، يمكن لنموذجنا أيضًا إنشاء قيمة عددية عن طريق اختيار عملية حسابية مناسبة مثل الطرح أو التقريب ، وتطبيقها على أسعار مخزون المدخلات. تظهر التجارب التجريبية أن أفضل نموذج لدينا يولد تعليقات السوق في الطلاقة والمعلوماتية التي تقترب من النصوص المرجعية التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الإنسان.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um novo modelo de codificador-decodificador para gerar automaticamente comentários de mercado a partir dos preços das ações. O modelo primeiro codifica séries de preços de ações de curto e longo prazo para que possa mencionar mudanças de curto e longo prazo nos preços das ações. Na fase de decodificação, nosso modelo também pode gerar um valor numérico selecionando uma operação aritmética apropriada, como subtração ou arredondamento, e aplicando-a aos preços das ações de entrada. Experimentos empíricos mostram que nosso melhor modelo gera comentários de mercado na fluência e na informatividade aproximando-se de textos de referência gerados por humanos.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un nouveau modèle encodeur-décodeur permettant de générer automatiquement des commentaires de marché à partir des cours des actions. Le modèle code d'abord les séries de cours des actions à court et à long terme afin de pouvoir mentionner les variations à court et à long terme des cours des actions. Lors de la phase de décodage, notre modèle peut également générer une valeur numérique en sélectionnant une opération arithmétique appropriée, telle que la soustraction ou l'arrondi, et en l'appliquant aux cours des actions d'entrée. Des expériences empiriques montrent que notre meilleur modèle génère des commentaires de marché à la fluidité et à l'informativité des textes de référence générés par l'homme.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un novedoso modelo de codificador-decodificador para generar automáticamente comentarios de mercado a partir de los precios de las acciones. El modelo primero codifica series de precios de acciones a corto y largo plazo para poder mencionar los cambios a corto y largo plazo en los precios de las acciones. En la fase de decodificación, nuestro modelo también puede generar un valor numérico al seleccionar una operación aritmética adecuada, como la resta o el redondeo, y aplicarla a los precios de las acciones de entrada. Los experimentos empíricos muestran que nuestro mejor modelo genera comentarios del mercado con la fluidez y la capacidad de información que se aproximan a los textos de referencia generados por el hombre.', 'ja': '本稿では、株価から市場コメントを自動生成するための新たなエンコーダデコーダモデルを紹介する。最初のモデルは、株価の短期的および長期的な変化について言及できるように、株価の短期的および長期的なシリーズの両方をコード化します。復号化フェーズでは、当社のモデルは、減算や丸めなどの適切な算術演算を選択し、入力された株価に適用することにより、数値を生成することもできます。実証実験は、当社の最良のモデルが、人間が生成する参照テキストに近づく流暢さと情報性で市場のコメントを生成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर स्वचालित रूप से शेयर कीमतों से बाजार की टिप्पणियां उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उपन्यास एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है। मॉडल पहले स्टॉक की कीमतों की अल्पकालिक और दीर्घकालिक श्रृंखला दोनों को एन्कोड करता है ताकि यह स्टॉक की कीमतों में अल्पकालिक और दीर्घकालिक परिवर्तनों का उल्लेख कर सके। डिकोडिंग चरण में, हमारा मॉडल एक उपयुक्त अंकगणितीय ऑपरेशन जैसे घटाव या गोलाई का चयन करके और इसे इनपुट स्टॉक की कीमतों पर लागू करके एक संख्यात्मक मूल्य भी उत्पन्न कर सकता है। अनुभवजन्य प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल प्रवाह पर बाजार की टिप्पणियां उत्पन्न करता है और मानव-जनित संदर्भ ग्रंथों के पास आने वाली सूचनात्मकता।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена новая модель кодировщик-декодер для автоматического генерирования рыночных комментариев на основе цен на акции. Сначала модель кодирует как краткосрочные, так и долгосрочные ряды цен на акции, с тем чтобы она могла упомянуть краткосрочные и долгосрочные изменения цен на акции. На этапе декодирования наша модель также может генерировать числовое значение, выбирая соответствующую арифметическую операцию, такую как вычитание или округление, и применяя ее к входным ценам акций. Эмпирические эксперименты показывают, что наша лучшая модель генерирует рыночные комментарии при беглости и информативности, приближающейся к человеческим справочным текстам.', 'zh': '本文发新编码器-解码器,从股票价格自成市论。 先编码于短期股票价格次,以股票价格短期,以长变化。 解码之道,吾形可得而择也(若减法若四舍五入),则输股票价格以成数直。 实验实者,近人之参考文本流畅性与信息性成市论也。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra nua i láthair chun tuairimí margaidh a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch ó phraghsanna stoic. Ionchódaíonn an tsamhail ar dtús sraitheanna gearrthéarmacha agus fadtéarmacha praghsanna stoic ionas gur féidir léi athruithe gearrthéarmacha agus fadtéarmacha ar phraghsanna stoic a lua. Sa chéim díchódaithe, is féidir lenár múnla luach uimhriúil a ghiniúint freisin trí oibríocht uimhríochta cuí a roghnú mar dhealú nó slánú, agus é a chur i bhfeidhm ar na praghsanna stoic ionchuir. Léiríonn turgnaimh eimpíreacha go ngineann ár múnla is fearr tuairimí margaidh ag an líofacht agus an fhaisnéis atá ag druidim le téacsanna tagartha daonna-ghinte.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს პრომენტის კოდერის რეკოდერის მოდელის მარტიკის კომენტრების ავტომატურად შექმნა. მოდელის პირველი კონტაქტი და ძლიერი სიერეული კონტაქტის უვნებების შესახებ, რომ ის შეუძლიათ კონტაქტი და ძლიერი ცვლილებების შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება მრიცხველი მნიშვნელობის შექმნა, როგორც გადატანა ან გადატანა ან გადატანა, და გადაყენება შესაძლებელი არიტემეტური პროგრამაში. იმპერიკალური ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი უკეთესი მოდელი იქნება ბაზეტის კომენტაქტები ფუნქციაში და ინფორმატიურობა, რომელიც ადამიანის შექმნილი რეფერიმე', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα νέο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για την αυτόματη δημιουργία σχολίων αγοράς από τις τιμές μετοχών. Το μοντέλο κωδικοποιεί αρχικά τόσο βραχυπρόθεσμες όσο και μακροπρόθεσμες σειρές τιμών μετοχών ώστε να μπορεί να αναφέρει βραχυπρόθεσμες και μακροπρόθεσμες αλλαγές στις τιμές μετοχών. Στη φάση αποκωδικοποίησης, το μοντέλο μας μπορεί επίσης να δημιουργήσει μια αριθμητική τιμή επιλέγοντας μια κατάλληλη αριθμητική λειτουργία όπως αφαίρεση ή στρογγυλοποίηση, και εφαρμόζοντάς την στις τιμές των μετοχών εισόδου. Εμπειρικά πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας δημιουργεί σχόλια της αγοράς σχετικά με την ευχέρεια και την πληροφορικότητα που πλησιάζει τα κείμενα αναφοράς που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új útmérő-dekódoló modellt mutat be a piaci észrevételek automatikus generálására a részvényárak alapján. A modell először a rövid és hosszú távú részvényárak sorozatait kódolja, hogy megemlítse a részvényárak rövid és hosszú távú változásait. A dekódolás fázisában modellünk numerikus értéket is generálhat egy megfelelő számtani művelet kiválasztásával, például kivonással vagy kerekítéssel, és azt az input részvényárakra alkalmazza. Empirikus kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a legjobb modellünk piaci megjegyzéseket generál az ember által generált referenciaszövegek folyékonyságára és informatikai képességére.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un nuovo modello encoder-decoder per generare automaticamente commenti di mercato dai prezzi delle azioni. Il modello codifica in primo luogo serie sia a breve che a lungo termine dei prezzi azionari in modo da poter menzionare le variazioni a breve e lungo termine dei prezzi azionari. Nella fase di decodifica, il nostro modello può anche generare un valore numerico selezionando un'operazione aritmetica appropriata come sottrazione o arrotondamento, e applicandolo ai prezzi azionari input. Esperimenti empirici dimostrano che il nostro modello migliore genera commenti di mercato sulla fluidità e l'informatività che si avvicinano ai testi di riferimento generati dall'uomo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бағаттардан рынктың түсініктемелерін автоматты түрде құру үшін романдық кодер- декодер үлгісін көрсетеді. Бірінші үлгі құрылғы бағаларының қысқа және ұзын уақытты және ұзын уақытты өзгерістерін есептеп береді. Декодтау этапында, біздің үлгіміз сондай-ақ сандық мәнін таңдауға болады. Бұл арифметикалық операцияны, мысалы, алып тастау немесе айналдыруға және енгізу бағаларына қолданады. Эмпирикалық тәжірибелер біздің ең жақсы моделіміз үлгілеріміз жылдамдығында, адамдардың құрылған сілтеме мәтіндеріне жақын мәліметтік түсініктерді жасайды де', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува нов модел на кодер-декодер за автоматски генерирање на пазарни коментари од цените на акциите. Моделот прво ги кодира краткорочните и долгорочните серии цени на акциите за да може да ги спомени краткорочните и долгорочните промени во цените на акциите. Во фазата на декодирање, нашиот модел може, исто така, да генерира броевна вредност со изборот на соодветна арифметичка операција како што е отстранувањето или окружувањето, и апликацијата на цените на внатрешните акции. Империските експерименти покажуваат дека нашиот најдобар модел генерира пазарни коментари на течноста и информативноста приближувајќи се до референциските тексти генерирани од човекот.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas naujas kodavimo kodavimo modelis, pagal kurį automatiškai gaunamos rinkos pastabos iš akcijų kainų. Pirmiausia modelis koduoja tiek trumpalaikes, tiek ilgalaikes atsargų kainas, kad jame būtų galima paminėti trumpalaikius ir ilgalaikius atsargų kainų pokyčius. Dekodavimo etape mūsų modelis taip pat gali sukurti skaitmeninę vertę, pasirinkdamas atitinkamą aritmetinę operaciją, pvz., atskaitymą arba apvalinimą, ir jį taikant žaliavų kainoms. Imperijos eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų geriausias modelis sukuria rinkos komentarus dėl skaidrumo ir informuotumo, artėjančių prie žmogaus sukurtų etaloninių tekstų.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan model penyekod-penyekod baru untuk menghasilkan komentar pasar secara automatik dari harga saham. Model pertama mengekodkan kedua-dua seri harga stok jangka pendek dan panjang supaya ia boleh menyebutkan perubahan jangka pendek dan panjang dalam harga stok. Dalam fase penyahkodan, model kita juga boleh menghasilkan nilai nombor dengan memilih operasi aritmetik yang sesuai seperti tolak atau pusingan, dan melaksanakannya pada harga stok input. Eksperimen empirik menunjukkan bahawa model terbaik kita menghasilkan komentar pasar pada keseluruhan dan informasi mendekati teks rujukan yang dihasilkan manusia.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സ്റ്റോക്ക് വിലയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വയം മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റിന്റെ കാര്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d  മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യം ചെറുതായി- നീണ്ട നീണ്ട കാലാവധി സ്റ്റോക്കിന്റെ വിലയ്ക്കുള്ള സിറ്റ് വില കൂടുതല്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ഫേസില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു സംഖ്യ മൂല്ല്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതാണ്. അതിന്റെ അച്ചടിവാക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പോലെയോ ചട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത എമിരിക്കല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d മാര്\u200dക്കെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell ġdid ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder għall-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ kummenti tas-suq mill-prezzijiet tal-istokk. Il-mudell l-ewwel jikkodifika kemm serje ta’ prezzijiet tal-ħażniet fuq medda qasira kif ukoll fuq medda twila ta’ żmien sabiex ikun jista’ jsemmi bidliet fuq medda qasira u twila ta’ żmien fil-prezzijiet tal-ħażniet. Fil-fażi tad-dekodifikazzjoni, il-mudell tagħna jista’ jiġġenera wkoll valur numeriku billi jagħżel operazzjoni aritmetika xierqa bħat-tnaqqis jew it-tqarrib, u japplikah għall-prezzijiet tal-istokk tad-dħul. L-esperimenti empiriċi juru li l-aħjar mudell tagħna jiġġenera kummenti tas-suq bil-fluwenza u l-informatività li jmorru lejn it-testi ta’ referenza ġġenerati mill-bniedem.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас худалдааны үнээс автоматаар зах зээл зах зээлийг автоматаар бий болгох шинэ коддогч загвар өгдөг. Эхлээд загвар нь богино, урт хугацааны үнэ хоёуланг коддог бөгөөд энэ нь богино, урт хугацааны үндэсний өөрчлөлтийг хэлж чадна. Загварын загвар нь бидний загвар нь тоон утга бий болгож, хасах эсвэл хөндлөн арифметик үйл ажиллагааг сонгож, үүнийг орлуулах үндэслэлд ашиглаж болно. Эрүүгийн туршилтууд бидний хамгийн сайн загварын зах зээлийн шингэний сэтгэл хөдлөл болон хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлд хүрэх мэдээллийн мэдээллийн тухай бий болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit roman koderingsmodell for automatisk laga markedskommentarar frå stokkprisar. Modellen kodar først både kort - og lang- tidspunkt stokkpriser slik at han kan gjere kort - og lang- tidspunkt endringar i stokkpriser. I dekoderfasen kan modellen vårt også laga eit numerisk verdi ved å velja eit tilpassande aritmetisk operasjon, som subtraksjon eller runding, og bruka det på inndatastokkprisane. Empirical experiments show that our best model generates market comments at the fluency and the informativeness approaching human generated reference texts.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nowy model kodera-dekodera umożliwiający automatyczne generowanie komentarzy rynkowych z cen akcji. Model najpierw koduje zarówno krótko- jak i długoterminowe szeregi cen akcji, tak aby mógł wspominać krótko- i długoterminowe zmiany cen akcji. W fazie dekodowania nasz model może również generować wartość liczbową, wybierając odpowiednią operację arytmetyczną, taką jak odejmowanie lub zaokrąglenie, i stosując ją do wejściowych cen akcji. Eksperymenty empiryczne pokazują, że nasz najlepszy model generuje komentarze rynkowe o płynności i informacyjności zbliżającej się do tekstów referencyjnych generowanych przez człowieka.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un nou model de encoder-decoder pentru generarea automată a comentariilor pieței din prețurile acțiunilor. Modelul codează mai întâi seriile de prețuri ale acțiunilor atât pe termen scurt, cât și pe termen lung, astfel încât să poată menționa modificările pe termen scurt și lung ale prețurilor acțiunilor. În faza de decodare, modelul nostru poate genera, de asemenea, o valoare numerică prin selectarea unei operații aritmetice adecvate, cum ar fi scăderea sau rotunjirea, și aplicarea acesteia la prețurile stocurilor de intrare. Experimentele empirice arată că cel mai bun model al nostru generează comentarii de piață la fluența și informativitatea abordării textelor de referință generate de om.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa soo bandhiga muuqashada codcodsiga warqadda, kaas oo si automatic ah u sameynaya qiimaha suuqa. Tusaalada marka hore waxaa ku qoran qiimaha shirkadda oo gaaban iyo waqti dheer, si ay u sheegto isbedelka qiimaha shirkadda oo gaaban iyo waqti dheer. Fasaxa deynta, modellkayagu wuxuu ku sameyn karaa qiimaha tiro ah, marka uu doorto haboon shaqo arithmetic, tusaale ahaan kalajarid ama isku wareejiyo, wuxuuna ku dalban karaa qiimaha guriga kirada. Imtixaanka jimicsiga ah waxay muujinayaan in qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan ay ka samaysaa muuqashada suuqa iyo faa’iidada iyo qoraalka referanshaha ee qof ka soo dhashay.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ස්ටෝක් විශාල වලින් මාර්කට් කිරීමක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් නිර්මාණය ක මොඩල් එක පළමුවෙන් කොටස් හා ලොකු කාලයක් තියෙන්නේ ස්ටෝක් විශාල විශාල වෙනස් කියලා කියන්න පුළුවන්. ඩිකෝඩින් පද්ධතියේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක අංක අගයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, සම්පූර්ණ අංක අගයක් තෝරාගන්න සඳහා අ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා කියලා, මිනිස්සු සිද්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරත', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi model kodera za automatski proizvedenje komentara tržišta iz cena dionica. Model prvi kodira i kratkoročnu i dugoročnu seriju dionica kako bi spomenuo kratkoročne i dugoročne promjene dionica. U fazi dekodiranja, naš model može takođe stvoriti numeričku vrijednost odabrati odgovarajuću aritmetičku operaciju kao što je oduzetanje ili okrujanje, i primjenjivati ga na cene ulaznog stoka. Empirički eksperimenti pokazuju da naš najbolji model stvara komentare na tržištu na tekućini i informativnost koja se približava referentnim tekstima koji su generirani ljudima.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en ny encoder-dekoder modell för att automatiskt generera marknadskommentarer från aktiekurser. Modellen kodar först både kortsiktiga och långsiktiga serier av aktiekurser så att den kan nämna kortsiktiga och långsiktiga förändringar i aktiekurser. I avkodningsfasen kan vår modell också generera ett numeriskt värde genom att välja en lämplig aritmetisk operation som subtraktion eller avrundning, och tillämpa det på insatsvaror. Empiriska experiment visar att vår bästa modell genererar marknadskommentarer på fluensen och informativiteten som närmar sig människogenererade referenstexter.', 'ta': '@ info இந்த மாதிரி முதலில் குறியீடு மற்றும் நீண்ட நீண்ட நீண்ட விலைக்கான தொகுதி விலைகளையும் குறியீட்டுக் குறியீட் குறியீட்டு நிலையில், எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு எண் மதிப்பை உருவாக்கலாம், ஒரு பொருத்தமான ஆரித்மீடிக் செயல்பாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து, கழித்தல் அல்லது  விளைவுகளில் எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி சந்தையின் குறிப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் அறிவில்லாமல் மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மேற்கோள்', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایسٹک کے قیمت سے مارکیٹ کی کمانٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک نوم اکوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل پیش کرتا ہے. موڈل پہلے چھوٹی اور طویل مدت سٹاک کے قیمت دونوں کو کوڈ کرتا ہے تاکہ اسے چھوٹی اور طویل مدت کے بدلنے کا ذکر کرے۔ ڈیکڈینگ فاز میں، ہماری مدل بھی ایک عدد کی ارزش پیدا کر سکتا ہے، جیسے ٹکڑا یا راونڈ، اور اسے اینپیٹ سٹاک قیمت پر لازم کر سکتا ہے. امپراتیک تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا بہترین نمونڈل فلونٹ کے بارے میں مارکیٹ کی کمانٹ پیدا کرتا ہے اور انسان کے پیدا ہوئے رسنٹ ٹیکسٹ کے قریب معلومات کی کمانٹ پیدا کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một mô hình mã hóa mới để tự động tạo ra bình luận thị trường từ giá cổ phiếu. Mô hình đầu tiên mã hóa cả chuỗi bán cổ phiếu ngắn và dài hạn để nó có thể đề cập tới thay đổi trong giá cổ phiếu trong thời gian ngắn và dài. Trong giai đoạn giải mã, mẫu của chúng ta cũng có thể tạo ra một giá trị số bằng cách chọn một thao tác số thích hợp như phép trừ hay bao vây, và áp dụng nó vào giá trị cổ phiếu nhập. Những thí nghiệm hiện đại cho thấy mẫu tốt nhất của chúng ta tạo ra các nhận xét thị trường về sự khéo léo và khôn ngoan khi tiếp cận các văn bản quan điểm.', 'uz': "Name Name Kodlash usulida modelimiz qiymatni yaratish mumkin, bir xil aritmetik amalni tanlash mumkin va uni kiritish qiymatga qoʻllash mumkin. Empirik tajribalarimizning eng yaxshi modelimiz suhbat va haqiqiqiylik qo'shilgan qo'shimcha reference textlariga ega bo'ladi.", 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een nieuw encoder-decoder-model voor het automatisch genereren van marktopmerkingen op basis van aandelenkoersen. Het model codeert eerst zowel korte- als lange termijn reeksen van aandelenkoersen, zodat het korte- en lange termijn veranderingen in aandelenkoersen kan vermelden. In de decoderingsfase kan ons model ook een numerieke waarde genereren door een geschikte rekenkundige bewerking zoals aftrekken of afronden te selecteren en deze toe te passen op de invoerkoersen van aandelen. Empirische experimenten tonen aan dat ons beste model marktcommentaar genereert op de vloeiende en informatieve benadering van door mensen gegenereerde referentieteksten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi model kodera za automatski proizvedenje komentara tržišta iz cijena dionica. Model prvo kodira i kratkoročne i dugoročne cijene dionica kako bi spomenuo kratkoročne i dugoročne promjene dionica. U fazi dekodiranja, naš model može također stvoriti brojnu vrijednost izabrati odgovarajuću aritmetičku operaciju kao što je oduzimanje ili okruženje, i primjenjivati ga na cijene ulaznih dionica. Empirički eksperimenti pokazuju da naš najbolji model proizvodi komentare tržišta na tekućini i informativnosti koji se približava referentnim tekstima koji su proizvedeni ljudima.', 'da': 'Dette papir præsenterer en ny encoder-dekoder model til automatisk generering af markedskommentarer fra aktiekurserne. Modellen koder først både kort- og langsigtede aktiekursserier, så den kan nævne korte og langsigtede ændringer i aktiekurserne. I afkodningsfasen kan vores model også generere en numerisk værdi ved at vælge en passende aritmetisk operation såsom subtraktion eller afrunding, og anvende den på input aktiekurserne. Empiriske eksperimenter viser, at vores bedste model genererer markedskommentarer på den flydende og informative måde, der nærmer sig menneskeskabte referencetekster.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нов модел кодер-декодер за автоматично генериране на пазарни коментари от цените на акциите. Моделът първо кодира както краткосрочни, така и дългосрочни серии от цените на акциите, така че да може да се споменават краткосрочни и дългосрочни промени в цените на акциите. В фазата на декодиране нашият модел може също да генерира числова стойност, като избере подходяща аритметична операция като изваждане или закръгляване и я прилага към входните цени на запасите. Емпиричните експерименти показват, че най-добрият ни модел генерира пазарни коментари при плавността и информативността, доближаващи се до генерираните от човека референтни текстове.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag präsentiert ein neuartiges Encoder-Decoder-Modell zur automatischen Generierung von Marktkommentaren aus Aktienkursen. Das Modell kodiert zunächst sowohl kurz- als auch langfristige Reihen von Aktienkursen, um kurz- und langfristige Kursänderungen zu erwähnen. In der Dekodierungsphase kann unser Modell auch einen numerischen Wert generieren, indem eine geeignete arithmetische Operation wie Subtraktion oder Rundung ausgewählt und auf die Eingangskurse angewendet wird. Empirische Experimente zeigen, dass unser bestes Modell Marktkommentare über die Fluenz und Informationsfähigkeit generiert, die sich menschlich generierten Referenztexten nähern.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model kode-dekoder baru untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan komentar pasar dari harga saham. Model pertama-tama mengkode seri harga saham jangka pendek dan panjang sehingga dapat menyebutkan perubahan harga saham jangka pendek dan panjang. Dalam fase dekoding, model kita juga dapat menghasilkan nilai numerik dengan memilih operasi aritmetik yang sesuai seperti tolak atau pusingan, dan menerapkannya pada harga saham masukan. Eksperimen kerajaan menunjukkan bahwa model terbaik kita menghasilkan komentar pasar pada fluency dan informasi mendekati teks referensi yang dihasilkan manusia.', 'ko': '본고는 주식 가격에 따라 시장 평론을 자동으로 생성하는 새로운 인코더 - 디코더 모델을 제시했다.이 모델은 주식 가격의 단기와 장기 서열을 먼저 코딩하여 주식 가격의 단기와 장기 변화를 언급하도록 한다.디코딩 단계에서 우리는 적당한 수치를 선택하여 주식 가격을 생성할 수 있다.실증 실험에 의하면 우리의 가장 좋은 모델은 유창성과 정보량이 인류가 생성한 참고 텍스트에 가까울 때 시장 평론을 생성한다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta muundo wa kudhibiti riwaya kwa ajili ya kutengeneza maoni ya soko kutoka kwa bei za soko. Mfano wa kwanza unajumuisha mfululizo wa bei za bidhaa fupi na muda mrefu ili kutaja mabadiliko ya muda mrefu katika bei za bidhaa. Katika kiwango cha kupungua, mwelekeo wetu unaweza pia kutengeneza thamani ya tarakimu kwa kuchagua operesheni muhimu ya kiarithmetic kama vile unyanyapaa au kuingiza, na kutumia bei za bidhaa za ndani. Majaribio ya msisimu yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu bora unaotengeneza maoni ya soko kwa ufanisi na taarifa zinazokaribia ujumbe wa maoni unaotengenezwa kwa binadamu.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل رمانی برای تولید توضیح بازار از قیمت\u200cهای سهام نشان می\u200cدهد. اولین مدل هر سری قیمت\u200cهای کوتاه و طولانی را به عنوان تغییرات کوتاه و طولانی در قیمت\u200cهای سهام می\u200cدهد. در مراحل دکوندن، مدل ما می تواند با انتخاب یک عملیات عدد مناسبی مثل برداشتن یا گردش کردن آن را به قیمت ذخیره وارد تولید کند. آزمايشات امپراطوري نشون ميده که بهترين مدل ما توضيح هاي بازار در طبيعت و اطلاعات نزديک متن هاي مربوط به توليد انسان هستند', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz menkullardan bazar töwziýetlerini otomatik ýasalamak üçin roman kodeýan nusgasyny görkezýär. İlk model hem kısa-hem uzun-zamanlı stok fiyatlarını kodlayar böylece, kısa-hem uzun-zamanlı stok fiyatlarında değerlendirilebilir. Bu dekodin fāzisinde, modelimiz gerekli bir aritmetik işlemi saýlamak üçin sayıt değerini saýlamak ve giriş stock fiirlerine uygulap biler. Wagtlaýyk deneyler biziň iň gowy nusgymyz aklymyzda bazar töwürmelerini döretýär we ynsan döredilen referens metinlerine golaýlaýan informatiýatlyk döretýär.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n roman enkoder- dekoder model voor te genereer markkommentaar van stoor presies outomaties. Die model enkodeer eerste beide kort- en lang- term reeks van stoorprose sodat dit kort- en lang- tyd veranderinge in stoorprose kan aanwys. In die dekodering fase kan ons model ook 'n numeriese waarde genereer deur 'n geskikte aritmetiese operasie te kies soos subtrahering of rounding, en dit a an die invoer stoor presies toewend. Enigeriese eksperimente wys dat ons beste model genereer markkommentaar by die fluiditeit en die inligtigheid wat by mens genereerde verwysingstekste naby kom.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një model të ri kodues-dekoderi për të krijuar automatikisht komentet e tregut nga çmimet e aksioneve. Modeli kodon së pari si serinë afat-shkurtër ashtu edhe afat-gjatë të çmimeve të aksioneve në mënyrë që të përmend ndryshimet afat-shkurtra dhe afat-gjata në çmimet e aksioneve. Në fazën e dekodimit, modeli ynë mund të gjenerojë gjithashtu një vlerë numërore duke zgjedhur një operacion aritmetik të përshtatshëm të tillë si heqja ose rrotullimi, dhe duke e aplikuar atë në çmimet e aksioneve. Eksperimentet perandore tregojnë se modeli ynë më i mirë gjeneron komentet e tregut në fluencën dhe informacionalitetin që afrohet teksteve të gjeneruara nga njerëzit.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የኢሜያል ኮድድ-አዲስ ዶላር የገበያ ማህበራዊ አስተያየት ከstock ዋጋ መፍጠር የሚያቀርብ ነው፡፡ ሞዴል አስቀድሞ አቋራጭ እና ረጅም የቆመ የstock ዋጋ ክፍሎች ቆጥሮአል፤ የቆራጭ እና የረጅም ጊዜ ለውጥ በstock ዋጋ እንዲያወጣ ይችላል። በ አካባቢ ደረጃ ውስጥ ሞዴላታችን እንደማታነስ ወይም በመጫወት በሚያስፈልገው የአርትሜቲካ ክፍል በቁጥር ማፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ የኢሜሪካ ፈተናዎች የሻለ ሞዴል የግንኙነት እና የህዝብ መልዕክት ጽሑፎችን ለመቅረብ የሚያደርገው ማህበራዊ አስተያየት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է նոր կոդեր-կոդեր մոդել, որն ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծում է շուկայական մեկնաբանություններ արժեքներից: Սկզբում մոդելը կոդավորում է նաև կարճ և երկարաժամկետ արժեքների շարքերը, որպեսզի այն նշեր արժեքների կարճ և երկարաժամկետ փոփոխությունները: Մեր մոդելը կարող է նաև թվային արժեք ստեղծել, ընտրելով համապատասխան թվային գործողություն, ինչպիսիք են հանումը կամ շրջանցումը, և կիրառելով այն ներմուծների արժեքների վրա: Իմպրիկական փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր լավագույն մոդելը ստեղծում է շուկայի մեկնաբանություններ հեշտության և ինֆորմատիվության վրա, որոնք մոտենում են մարդկային ստեղծված հաղորդակցման տեքստերին:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt mağaza fiyatlarından pazar şəkillərini avtomatik olaraq yaratmaq üçün yeni kodlayıcı modeli göstərir. Model ilk dəfə hər ikisini qısa və uzun-müddət səhifələrini kodlayır ki, bu səhifələrdə qısa və uzun-müddət dəyişiklikləri danışa bilər. Dekodlama fəsasında, modellərimiz də sayısal qiyməti yarada bilər, çəkilmək və çəkilmək kimi uyğun aritmetik operasyonu seçərək və onu girdi stok qiymətlərinə uyğunlaşdıra bilər. Empirical experiments show that our best model generates market comments at the fluency and the informative approach to human generated reference texts.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi model kodera za automatski proizvedenje komentara tržišta iz cena dionica. Model prvo kodira i kratkoročnu i dugoročnu seriju cijena dionica kako bi spomenuo kratkoročne i dugoročne promjene dionica. U fazi dekodiranja, naš model može također stvoriti brojnu vrijednost odabrati odgovarajuću aritmetičku operaciju kao što je oduzetanje ili okrujanje, i primjenjivati ga na cijene ulaznih dionica. Empirički eksperimenti pokazuju da naš najbolji model stvara komentare na tržištu na tekućini i informativnost koja se približava referentnim tekstima koji su generirani ljudima.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un nou model de codificador-decoder per generar automàticament comentaris de mercat a partir dels preus d'acció. El model codifica primer les sèries de preus a curt i llarg termini d'accions per poder mencionar canvis a curt i llarg termini en els preus d'accions. En la fase de decodificació, el nostre model també pot generar un valor numèric seleccionant una operació aritmètica apropiada com la subtracció o arredonament, i aplicant-la als preus d'acció d'entrada. Els experiments empírics demostren que el nostre millor model genera comentaris de mercat a la fluïtat i la informacivitat que s'aproxima dels textos de referència generats pels humans.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi kooderi-dekooderimalli, jolla voidaan automaattisesti tuottaa markkinakommentteja osakehinnoista. Malli koodaa ensin sekä lyhyen että pitkän aikavälin osakekurssisarjan siten, että se voi mainita lyhyen ja pitkän aikavälin osakekurssien muutokset. Dekoodausvaiheessa mallimme voi myös tuottaa numeerisen arvon valitsemalla sopivan aritmeettisen toiminnon, kuten vähennyksen tai pyöristyksen, ja soveltamalla sitä syöttövarastojen hintoihin. Empiiriset kokeet osoittavat, että paras mallimme tuottaa markkinakommentteja ihmisen tuottamien viitetekstien sujuvuudesta ja informatiivisuudesta.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বাজারের দাম থেকে মন্তব্য তৈরি করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাস এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল উপস্থা মডেল প্রথমে সংক্ষিপ্ত এবং দীর্ঘমেয়াদ দামের সিরিজ সংখ্যা স্ট্যাকের দাম উল্লেখ করে যাতে স্ট্যাকের দামের সংক্ ডিকোডিং পর্যায়ে আমাদের মডেল একটি সংখ্যার মূল্য তৈরি করতে পারে যেমন সাবট্র্যাক্টেশন অথবা রাউন্টিং করে এবং ইনপুট স্টকের দামে প্রয়োগ করতে পারে। Empirical experiments show that our best model generates market comments at the fluency and the informativeness approaching human-generated reference texts.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje nový kodér-dekodér model pro automatické generování tržních komentářů z cen akcií. Model nejprve kóduje jak krátkodobé, tak dlouhodobé řady cen akcií, tak aby mohl zmínit krátkodobé a dlouhodobé změny cen akcií. Ve fázi dekódování může náš model také generovat číselnou hodnotu výběrem vhodné aritmetické operace, jako je odečtení nebo zaokrouhlení, a aplikací na vstupní ceny akcií. Empirické experimenty ukazují, že náš nejlepší model generuje tržní komentáře ohledně plynulosti a informativity přibližujících se lidským referenčním textům.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on esitatud uus kodeerija-dekooder mudel, mis automaatselt genereerib turukomplekte aktsiahindadest. Mudel kodeerib kõigepealt nii lühi- kui ka pikaajalised aktsiahindade seeriad, et saaks mainida aktsiahindade lühi- ja pikaajalisi muutusi. Dekodeerimise faasis saab meie mudel luua ka numbrilise väärtuse, valides sobiva aritmeetilise toimingu, näiteks lahutamise või ümardamise, ja rakendades seda sisendvarude hindadele. Empiirilised eksperimendid näitavad, et meie parim mudel tekitab turukomplekte, mis lähenevad inimese loodud viitetekstidele, sujuvalt ja informatiivselt.', 'jv': "Perintah sing nyimpen param koder-decoder anyar tentang nggawe perusahaan komentar neng penting nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang. Model sing ditambah mbutusa butuh-butuh gawe mbutusa sistem dadi penting, dadi iso dianggawe barang langgar sampeyan mbutusa barang Where's the decoding phase Wanggalih sing perbudhakan bener tentang ngomong nik model sing luwih apik nyimpen komentar entah karo dolanan sing ngedol karo informasi sing nggawe texts sing gagetwé perbudhakan", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da wata motel na koden-kode-koda farat-ɗabi'a wa ya ƙãga masu buƙata masu buƙata daga qiimar shaidar. @ info: whatsthis Daga fasa kodi, misalinmu yana iya ƙiƙiro kima mai ƙayyade, kuma yana iya cire shi zuwa qiimar abun cikin shirin ayuka. Tajarurin Empirical na nũna cewa, misalinmu mafi kyãwo yana samar da ma'abucin suuɓan da mai amfani da kuma ma'anar ta kusanta matsayin misalin mutane wanda aka haife.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג מודל קודד-מפענח חדש כדי ליצור אוטומטית תגובות שוק ממחירי המניות. The model first encodes both short- and long-term series of stock prices so that it can mention short- and long-term changes in stock prices.  בשלב הפענוח, המודל שלנו יכול גם ליצור ערך מספרי על ידי לבחור פעולה ארתמטית מתאימה כמו החסירה או הסיבוב, ולהפעיל אותו למחירי המניות. ניסויים אימפריים מראים שהמודל הטוב ביותר שלנו יוצר תגובות שוק על הנוזל והמידעיות מתקרבות לטקסטים התייחסות שנgenerו ע"י האדם.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen nov model kodirnika-dekoderja za samodejno generiranje tržnih komentarjev iz cen delnic. Model najprej kodira tako kratkoročne kot dolgoročne vrste cen delnic, tako da lahko omenja kratkoročne in dolgoročne spremembe cen delnic. V fazi dekodiranja lahko naš model ustvari tudi numerično vrednost tako, da izbere ustrezno aritmetično operacijo, kot je odštevanje ali zaokroževanje, in jo uporabi za cene vhodnih zalog. Empirični eksperimenti kažejo, da naš najboljši model ustvarja tržne komentarje glede tekočosti in informativnosti, ki se približujejo referenčnim besedilom, ki jih ustvari človek.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་གཏོང་མཁན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔེ་སྟོན་པ་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཉེན་ཁ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཞག The model first encodes both short-and long-term stock prices so that it can mention short-and long-term changes in stock prices. In the decoding phase, our model can also generate a numerical value by selecting an appropriate arithmetic operation such as subtraction or rounding, and applying it to the input stock prices. གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་གི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ལས་འོང་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་བདེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྩོན་འགྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་འགྲེལ་གྱི་ཡ'}
{'en': 'Can Syntax Help? Improving an LSTM-based Sentence Compression Model for New Domains', 'ar': 'هل يمكن أن يساعد بناء الجملة؟ تحسين نموذج ضغط الجمل المستند إلى LSTM للمجالات الجديدة', 'fr': "Est-ce que Syntax peut aider\xa0? Amélioration d'un modèle de compression de phrase basé sur LSTM pour de nouveaux domaines", 'es': '¿Puede ayudar la sintaxis? Mejora de un modelo de compresión de oraciones basado en LSTM para nuevos dominios', 'pt': 'A sintaxe pode ajudar? Melhorando um modelo de compressão de sentença baseado em LSTM para novos domínios', 'ja': '構文は役に立ちますか？新しいドメインのためのLSTMベースの文章圧縮モデルの改善', 'zh': '语法可资乎? 为新域改入 LSTM 句压缩模形', 'hi': 'क्या सिंटैक्स मदद कर सकता है? नए डोमेन के लिए एक LSTM-आधारित वाक्य संपीड़न मॉडल में सुधार', 'ru': 'Может ли синтаксис помочь? Улучшение модели сжатия предложений на основе LSTM для новых доменов', 'ga': 'An féidir le Comhréir Cabhrú? Samhail Chomhbhrú Pianbhreithe bunaithe ar LSTM a fheabhsú le haghaidh Fearainn Nua', 'ka': 'შეიძლება სინტაქსის დახმარება? LSTM- ის დაბათებული სიტყვის კომპრესის მოდელი ახალი დომენებისთვის', 'hu': 'Segíthet a szintaxis? LSTM-alapú mondattömörítő modell fejlesztése új tartományokhoz', 'el': 'Μπορεί η Συνταξική να βοηθήσει; Βελτίωση ενός μοντέλου συμπίεσης προτάσεων βάσει LSTM για νέους τομείς', 'it': 'La sintassi può aiutare? Miglioramento di un modello di compressione delle frasi basato su LSTM per i nuovi domini', 'lt': 'Can Syntax Help?  Naujų domenų bausmės spaudimo modelio, pagrįsto LSTM, tobulinimas', 'kk': 'Синтаксис көмегі болады ба? Жаңа домендердің LSTM- негіздеген сөз компрессиясы үлгісін жасау', 'mk': 'Може ли синтаксична помош? Improving an LSTM-based Sentence Compression Model for New Domains', 'ms': 'Boleh Bantuan Sintaks? Menembak Model Pemampatan Hukuman berdasarkan LSTM untuk Domain Baru', 'mt': 'Is-Sintassa tista’ tgħin? It-titjib ta’ Mudell ta’ Kompressjoni tas-Sentenzi bbażat fuq LSTM għal Domani Ġodda', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമോ? പുതിയ ഡോമെനുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള LSTM-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d', 'mn': 'Синтаксис тусламж болох уу? Шинэ домойнуудын LSTM-д суурилсан өгүүлбэр хайлтын загвар сайжруулах', 'no': 'Kan syntakshjelp? Å forbetra eit LSTM-basert setningsmodul for nye domene', 'ro': 'Sintaxa poate ajuta? Îmbunătățirea unui model de comprimare a sentințelor bazat pe LSTM pentru domenii noi', 'pl': 'Czy Syntax może pomóc? Poprawa modelu kompresji zdań opartego na LSTM dla nowych domen', 'sr': 'Može li sintaksa pomoć? Poboljšanje modela za kompresiju kazne na LSTM-u za nove domene', 'si': 'වාක්ෂික උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද? Name', 'so': 'Caawimaadda canshuurta? Horumarinta dhaqdhaqaaq degenaansho ku saleysan LSTM', 'ta': 'நெறி உதவி முடியுமா? Name', 'sv': 'Kan Syntax hjälpa? Förbättra en LSTM-baserad meningskompressionsmodell för nya domäner', 'ur': 'سینٹکس مدد کر سکتا ہے؟ Name', 'uz': 'Tashkilot yordam beradi? Name', 'vi': 'Giúp cú pháp nhé? Thay đổi một mô hình nén giọng điệu cho miền mới', 'bg': 'Синтаксисът може ли да помогне? Подобряване на базиран модел за компресиране на изречения за нови домейни', 'nl': 'Kan Syntax helpen? Verbeteren van een op LSTM gebaseerd zinscompressiemodel voor nieuwe domeinen', 'da': 'Kan Syntax hjælpe? Forbedring af en LSTM-baseret sætningskompressionsmodel for nye domæner', 'hr': 'Može li sintaksija pomoći? Poboljšanje modela kompresije kazne na LSTM-u za nove domene', 'de': 'Kann Syntax helfen? Verbesserung eines LSTM-basierten Satzkomprimierungsmodells für neue Domains', 'ko': '문법이 도움이 됩니까?LSTM 기반의 새로운 영역 문장 압축 모델 개선', 'id': 'Bisakah Sintaks membantu? Menembangkan model kompresi kalimat berdasarkan LSTM untuk Domain Baru', 'sw': 'Unaweza kusaidia kodi? Kuboresha Mradi wa Makosa ya Udhibiti wa Hukumu wa LSTM kwa ajili ya Domain mpya', 'fa': 'میتونه کمک سینتکس کنه؟ بهتر کردن مدل فشار کلمه بر اساس LSTM برای دامنهای جدید', 'af': 'Kan Sintaks Hulp? Name', 'tr': 'Sintaks Ýardamy Mümkin edip bilermi? Täze ködler üçin bir LSTM tabanly söz sykmak nusgasyny geliştir', 'sq': 'A mund të ndihmojë Sintaksi? Përmirësimi i modelit të kompresimit të dënimeve bazuar në LSTM për domenet e reja', 'hy': 'Կարո՞ղ է սինտաքսի օգնությունը: LSMT-ի հիմնված նախադասությունների կոմպրեսի նոր վայրերի համար կատարվող մոդելի բարելավումը', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'সিন্যাক্স সাহায্য করতে পারে? নতুন ডোমেনের জন্য LSTM ভিত্তিক শাস্তি কম্পোরেশন মডেল উন্নত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Pot ajudar la sintaxi? millorar un model de compresió de sentences basat en LSTM per als nous dominis', 'bs': 'Može li sintaksija pomoći? Poboljšanje modela za kompresiju kazne na LSTM-u za nove domene', 'az': 'Sintaks Yardımı? Yeni Domenilər üçün LSTM tabanlı Sözü Kompresyon Modelini yaxşılaşdırma', 'cs': 'Může Syntax pomoci? Vylepšení modelu komprese vět založeného na LSTM pro nové domény', 'et': 'Kas süntaks saab aidata? LSTM-põhise lausetihendusmudeli täiustamine uute domeenide jaoks', 'fi': 'Voiko Syntaksi auttaa? LSTM-pohjaisen lausepakkausmallin parantaminen uusille verkkotunnuksille', 'jv': 'Pues Senaksi Tulungan? Gambar Urip Sampeyan Sentense Compresion model nggo New domain', 'sk': 'Lahko Sintaksa pomaga? Izboljšanje modela stiskanja stavkov, ki temelji na LSTM, za nove domene', 'he': 'Can Syntax Help?  שיפור מודל לחיצת גזרות מבוסס על LSTM עבור שדות חדשים', 'ha': 'QDialogButtonBox @ action', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ལ་རོགས་རམ་ཆ་ཡིན་ནམ LSTM་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསར་བ་ལ་ཡར་སྐྱེལ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression. We hypothesize that syntactic information helps in making such models more robust across domains. We propose two major changes to the model : using explicit syntactic features and introducing syntactic constraints through Integer Linear Programming (ILP). Our evaluation shows that the proposed model works better than the original model as well as a traditional non-neural-network-based model in a cross-domain setting.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس كيفية تحسين قابلية المجال لنموذج الشبكة العصبية للذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) القائمة على الحذف لضغط الجملة. نحن نفترض أن المعلومات النحوية تساعد في جعل مثل هذه النماذج أكثر قوة عبر المجالات. نقترح تغييرين رئيسيين على النموذج: استخدام ميزات نحوية صريحة وإدخال قيود نحوية من خلال البرمجة الخطية الصحيحة (ILP). يوضح تقييمنا أن النموذج المقترح يعمل بشكل أفضل من النموذج الأصلي بالإضافة إلى النموذج التقليدي القائم على الشبكة غير العصبية في إعداد عبر المجال.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos como melhorar a adaptabilidade de domínio de um modelo de rede neural Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) baseado em exclusão para compressão de sentenças. Nossa hipótese é que as informações sintáticas ajudam a tornar esses modelos mais robustos em todos os domínios. Propomos duas grandes mudanças no modelo: usar recursos sintáticos explícitos e introduzir restrições sintáticas por meio de Programação Linear Inteira (ILP). Nossa avaliação mostra que o modelo proposto funciona melhor do que o modelo original, bem como um modelo tradicional baseado em rede não neural em um ambiente de domínio cruzado.', 'es': 'En este artículo, estudiamos cómo mejorar la adaptabilidad de dominio de un modelo de red neuronal de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) basado en deleciones para la compresión de oraciones. Presumimos que la información sintáctica ayuda a que estos modelos sean más sólidos en todos los dominios. Proponemos dos cambios principales en el modelo: el uso de características sintácticas explícitas y la introducción de restricciones sintácticas a través de la Programación Lineal de Enteros (ILP). Nuestra evaluación muestra que el modelo propuesto funciona mejor que el modelo original, así como un modelo tradicional basado en redes no neuronales en un entorno multidominio.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions comment améliorer l'adaptabilité du domaine d'un modèle de réseau neuronal LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) basé sur la suppression pour la compression de phrases. Nous émettons l'hypothèse que les informations syntaxiques contribuent à rendre ces modèles plus robustes dans tous les domaines. Nous proposons deux changements majeurs au modèle\xa0: l'utilisation de fonctionnalités syntaxiques explicites et l'introduction de contraintes syntaxiques par le biais de la programmation linéaire en nombres entiers (ILP). Notre évaluation montre que le modèle proposé fonctionne mieux que le modèle original ainsi qu'un modèle traditionnel basé sur un réseau non neuronal dans un contexte interdomaine.", 'ja': '本稿では、文圧縮のための削除ベースの長期短期記憶（ LSTM ）ニューラルネットワークモデルのドメイン適応性を改善する方法を研究する。構文情報は、ドメイン間でそのようなモデルをより堅牢にするのに役立つと仮定しています。明示的な構文機能を使用し、整数線形プログラミング（ ILP ）を通じて構文制約を導入するという2つの大きな変更をモデルに提案します。私たちの評価では、提案されたモデルは、元のモデル、およびクロスドメイン設定における従来の非神経ネットワークベースのモデルよりも優れていることが示されています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम अध्ययन करते हैं कि वाक्य संपीड़न के लिए विलोपन-आधारित लॉन्ग शॉर्ट-टर्म मेमोरी (एलएसटीएम) तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल की डोमेन अनुकूलन क्षमता में सुधार कैसे किया जाए। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि वाक्यात्मक जानकारी डोमेन में ऐसे मॉडल को और अधिक मजबूत बनाने में मदद करती है। हम मॉडल में दो प्रमुख परिवर्तनों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: स्पष्ट वाक्यात्मक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करना और पूर्णांक रैखिक प्रोग्रामिंग (आईएलपी) के माध्यम से वाक्यात्मक बाधाओं को पेश करना। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल मूल मॉडल के साथ-साथ क्रॉस-डोमेन सेटिंग में एक पारंपरिक गैर-तंत्रिका-नेटवर्क-आधारित मॉडल की तुलना में बेहतर काम करता है।', 'zh': '于本文中,考其所以崇基删长短期记(LSTM)神经网络形于句压缩之域适应性。 吾设句法信有助于各个领域益壮。 臣等议对模型两大更张:用显式语法特征及整数线性规画 (ILP) 引入语法约束。 吾之评估,跨域置中,则形胜于本,及古非神经网络之效也。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы изучаем, как улучшить адаптируемость к домену нейронной сетевой модели длительной краткосрочной памяти (LSTM) на основе делеций для сжатия предложений. Мы предполагаем, что синтаксическая информация помогает сделать такие модели более надежными во всех доменах. Мы предлагаем два основных изменения модели: использование явных синтаксических признаков и введение синтаксических ограничений с помощью целочисленного линейного программирования (ILP). Наша оценка показывает, что предлагаемая модель работает лучше, чем исходная модель, а также традиционная модель, не основанная на нейронной сети, в междоменной среде.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar conas feabhas a chur ar inoiriúnaitheacht fearainn samhail líonra néarúil Cuimhne Fada Gearrthéarmach (LSTM) atá bunaithe ar scriosadh le haghaidh comhbhrú pianbhreithe. Tugaimid hipitéis go gcabhraíonn faisnéis chomhréire le samhlacha den sórt sin a dhéanamh níos láidre trasna na bhfearann. Molaimid dhá athrú mhóra ar an tsamhail: úsáid a bhaint as gnéithe sainréire comhréire agus srianta comhréire a thabhairt isteach trí Chlárú Líneach Slánuimhir (ILP). Léiríonn ár measúnú go n-oibríonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe níos fearr ná an tsamhail bhunaidh chomh maith le samhail thraidisiúnta neamh-néar-bhunaithe líonra i suíomh tras-fearainn.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε πώς μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε την προσαρμοστικότητα του τομέα ενός μοντέλου νευρωνικού δικτύου μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης που βασίζεται στη διαγραφή για συμπίεση προτάσεων. Υποθέτουμε ότι οι συντακτικές πληροφορίες βοηθούν στο να γίνουν τέτοια μοντέλα πιο ισχυρά σε όλους τους τομείς. Προτείνουμε δύο σημαντικές αλλαγές στο μοντέλο: τη χρήση ρητών συντακτικών χαρακτηριστικών και την εισαγωγή συντακτικών περιορισμών μέσω Ακέραιου Γραμμικού Προγραμματισμού (ILP). Η αξιολόγησή μας δείχνει ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο λειτουργεί καλύτερα από το αρχικό μοντέλο καθώς και ένα παραδοσιακό μη νευρωνικό μοντέλο βασισμένο σε ένα περιβάλλον μεταξύ τομέων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt tanulmányozzuk, hogyan lehet javítani a deletion alapú Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neurális hálózati modell domain adaptabilitását mondattömörítéshez. Feltételezzük, hogy a szintaktikus információk segítenek az ilyen modellek robusztusabbá tételében a tartományok között. Két jelentős változtatást javasolunk a modellben: explicit szintaktikus funkciók használatával és szintaktikus korlátozások bevezetésével az egész lineáris programozással (ILP). Értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy a javasolt modell jobban működik, mint az eredeti modell, valamint egy hagyományos, nem neurális hálózat alapú modell egy cross-domain környezetben.', 'it': "In questo articolo, studiamo come migliorare l'adattabilità del dominio di un modello di rete neurale LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) basato sulla cancellazione per la compressione delle frasi. Ipotizziamo che le informazioni sintattiche aiutino a rendere tali modelli più robusti tra i domini. Proponiamo due importanti modifiche al modello: utilizzare funzionalità sintattiche esplicite e introdurre vincoli sintattici attraverso Integer Linear Programming (ILP). La nostra valutazione mostra che il modello proposto funziona meglio del modello originale e di un modello tradizionale basato su reti non neurali in un ambiente cross-domain.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, өшіруге негізделген ұзын- қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) негізделген доменнің адаптациясын қалай жақсарту үшін зерттейміз. Біз синтактикалық мәліметтер осы үлгілерді доменге көмектеседі. Біз үлгінің екі негізгі өзгерістерін таңдаймыз: синтактикалық мүмкіндіктерді қолдану мен синтактикалық шектерді толық сызық бағдарламасы (ILP) арқылы келтіру. Біздің бағалауымыз келтірілген үлгі бастапқы үлгіден жақсы жұмыс істейді, және әдетті неврал желі негізделген үлгілер көшерек домен параметрлерінде.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes tiriame, kaip pagerinti sričių prisitaikymą prie išbraukimo pagrįsto ilgalaikio trumpalaikio atminties (LSTM) nervinio tinklo modelio spaudimui. Mes hipotezuojame, kad sintetinė informacija padeda užtikrinti tokių modelių patikimumą įvairiose srityse. Siūlome du pagrindinius modelio pakeitimus: naudoti aiškias sintaktines savybes ir įvesti sintaktinius apribojimus per visą linijinę programavimą. Mūsų vertinimas rodo, kad siūlomas modelis veikia geriau nei pradinis modelis, taip pat tradicinis ne nervų tinklu grindžiamas modelis įvairiose srityse.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ, ние студираме како да ја подобриме адаптабилноста на доменот на моделот на нервната мрежа за компресија на речениците на долгорочна краткорочна меморија (LSTM) базирана на избришување. Ние хипотезираме дека синтактичките информации помагаат да се направи вакви модели посилни во сите домени. Предложуваме две големи промени во моделот: користење експлицитни синтактички карактеристики и воведување синтактички ограничувања преку целосно линијарно програмирање (ILP). Нашата оценка покажува дека предложениот модел функционира подобро од оригиналниот модел, како и традиционален модел базиран на неурална мрежа во крстодоменско поставување.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari bagaimana untuk meningkatkan kemampuan penyesuaian domain bagi model rangkaian saraf Memori Jarak Panjang (LSTM) berdasarkan pemadaman kalimat. Kami hipotesis bahawa maklumat sintaktik membantu membuat model tersebut lebih kuat di seluruh domain. Kami cadangkan dua perubahan utama kepada model: menggunakan ciri-ciri sintaktik secara eksplicit dan memperkenalkan keterangan sintaktik melalui Program Lingkar Integer (ILP). Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan berfungsi lebih baik daripada model asal serta model tradisional bukan-saraf-berdasarkan rangkaian dalam tetapan cross-domain.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാക്ക് ചുരുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നീക്കം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്ന നീളം മെമ്മറി (LSTM) നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ സിന്റാക്ടിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത്തരം മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൊള്ളാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. മോഡലിന്റെ രണ്ട് പ്രധാന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു: വ്യക്തമായ സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ഇന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ മോഡലിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലതാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, പിന്', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw kif nistgħu ntejbu l-adattabilità tad-dominju ta’ mudell tan-netwerk newrali għal kompressjoni tas-sentenza bbażat fuq it-tħassir tal-Memorja fit-Tul ta’ Terminu Qasir (LSTM). Aħna niipotesizzaw li l-informazzjoni sintattika tgħin biex dawn il-mudelli jsiru aktar robusti fid-dominji kollha. Aħna nipproponu żewġ bidliet maġġuri fil-mudell: l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi sintattiċi espliċiti u l-introduzzjoni ta’ restrizzjonijiet sintattiċi permezz ta’ Programmar Linjari Integri (ILP). L-evalwazzjoni tagħna turi li l-mudell propost jaħdem a ħjar mill-mudell oriġinali kif ukoll mudell tradizzjonali mhux ibbażat fuq netwerk newrali f’ambjent transdomestiku.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлбэрийн дараа нь устгах богино хугацааны санамж (LSTM) мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг хэрхэн сайжруулах талаар судалж байна. Бид синтактик мэдээлэл нь ийм загваруудыг илүү хүчтэй болгодог гэдгийг ойлгож байна. Бид загварын хоёр чухал өөрчлөлт санал дэвшүүлнэ: тодорхой синтактик чадварыг ашиглан, шинжлэх ухааны хязгаар бүтэц шугам програмчлалын (ILP) аргаар нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бидний оюутнууд санал өгсөн загвар эхний загвараас илүү ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн уламжлалт мэдрэлийн сүлжээгүй загвар нь олон хэмжээний хэмжээнд байдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi korleis domenetilpassabilitet skal forbedrast på ein sletting- basert langsiktig minne (LSTM) for neuralnettverksmodell for setningskomprimering. Vi hypotiserer at syntaktiske informasjon hjelper til å gjera slike modeller meir sterkt over domene. Vi foreslår to store endringar i modellen: bruk eksplisitt syntaktiske funksjonar og introdusere syntaktiske begrensningar gjennom heiltal linjerprogram (ILP). Vårt evaluering viser at den foreslåde modellen fungerer bedre enn den originale modellen, og ein tradisjonell ikkje-neuralnettverksbasert modell i eit krysdomeneinnstilling.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy, jak poprawić zdolność adaptacyjną domeny modelu sieci neuronowej opartego na delecji Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) dla kompresji zdań. Zakładamy hipotezę, że informacje składnicze pomagają w zwiększeniu solidności takich modeli w różnych domenach. Proponujemy dwie główne zmiany modelu: wykorzystanie wyraźnych funkcji składni i wprowadzenie ograniczeń składni poprzez programowanie liniowe Integer (ILP). Z naszej oceny wynika, że proponowany model działa lepiej niż oryginalny model, jak również tradycyjny model oparty na sieci neuronowej w ustawieniu między domenami.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დომენში ვისწავლით როგორ დავიწყებთ დემომინის ადაპტირებულობას წაშლად დაფარდებული ძლიერი სიმხმარების (LSTM) ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს კომპრექციისთვის. ჩვენ ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ სინტაქტიული ინფორმაცია უფრო ძალიან ძალიან მოდელების შექმნა. ჩვენ მოდელში ორი მნიშვნელოვანი ცვლილებების შესაძლებლობა: გამოყენებული სინტაქტიური ფუნქციების გამოყენება და სინტაქტიური ზომილებების შესაძლებლობა Integer Linear Programming (ILP). ჩვენი განსაზღვრება გამოჩვენება, რომ მოდელი უფრო მუშაობს, ვიდრე ორიგინალური მოდელზე, როგორც ტრადიციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის მუშაობის მოდელი კრისი დი', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo kako da poboljšamo adaptabilnost domena dugoročne memorije (LSTM) neuralne mreže za kompresiju rečenica na osnovu delecije. Pretpostavljamo da sintaktičke informacije pomažu u stvaranju takvih modela jača preko domena. Predlažemo dve velike promjene modela: korištenje eksplicitih sintaktičkih karakteristika i uvođenje sintaktičkih ograničenja putem kompletnog linijskog programiranja (ILP). Naša procjena pokazuje da predloženi model radi bolje od originalnog modela, kao i tradicionalnog modela na neuralnoj mreži u krstodomenu postavku.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem cum să îmbunătățim adaptabilitatea domeniului unui model de rețea neurală LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) bazat pe ștergere pentru compresia propozițiilor. Ipotezăm că informațiile sintactice ajută la a face astfel de modele mai robuste în domenii. Propunem două modificări majore ale modelului: utilizarea caracteristicilor sintactice explicite și introducerea constrângerilor sintactice prin Programarea Lineară Integer (ILP). Evaluarea noastră arată că modelul propus funcționează mai bine decât modelul original, precum și un model tradițional non-neural-bazat pe rețea într-un cadru cross-domeniu.', 'so': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression.  Waxaynu leenahay fikrada macluumaadka la xiriira, taasoo caawinaya in lagu sameeyo tusaalooyinkaas oo kale si ka badan looga isticmaalo gudaha. Tusaalada waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba isbedelyo oo waaweyn: isticmaalka qalabka muuqashada oo cad iyo baahida isku-qabsiga oo lagu soo bandhigayo qorshaha qoraalka caadiga ah (ILP). Qiimeyntayada ayaa muuqanaya in qaababka la soo jeeday uu ka shaqeeyo mid ka wanaagsan qaabkii asalka ahaa iyo sidoo kale qaab qaab asal ah oo aan neural-neural-network ku saleysan.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi hur man kan f철rb채ttra dom채nanpassningsf철rm책gan hos en deletionsbaserad Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural n채tverksmodell f철r meningskompression. Vi antar att syntaktisk information hj채lper till att g철ra s책dana modeller mer robusta 철ver dom채ner. Vi f철resl책r tv책 stora f철r채ndringar i modellen: att anv채nda explicita syntaktiska funktioner och inf철ra syntaktiska begr채nsningar genom Integer Linear Programming (ILP). V책r utv채rdering visar att den f철reslagna modellen fungerar b채ttre 채n den ursprungliga modellen samt en traditionell icke-neural-n채tverksbaserad modell i en gr채ns철verskridande milj철.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், வாக்கு சுருக்குவதற்கான நீளம் சிறிய நினைவகம் (LSTM) புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி முறைமை நாங்கள் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு தகவல்கள் இவ்வாறு மாதிரிகளை மேலும் களங்கள் முழுவதும் மாற்றியமைக்க உதவுகிறது. மாதிரிக்கு இரண்டு முக்கிய மாற்றங்களை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்: வெளிப்படையான ஒத்திசைவு தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்தி முழு கோடு நிரல நம்முடைய பிரச்சனைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரி முதல் மாதிரியை விட சிறந்ததாக செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு குறும்பரப்பு அமைப்பில் ஒரு பாரம்', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں پڑھتے ہیں کہ کس طرح ڈومین اڈپٹیٹیٹ کی آدپٹیٹ کی عمدہ کرنا چاہتے ہیں لگ ٹر ٹر میمور (LSTM) نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل جمع کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ سینٹکتیک معلومات اس مدل کو دومین میں زیادہ مضبوط بنانے کے لئے مدد کرتی ہے۔ ہم مدل کے دو اہم بدلنے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں: صریح سینٹاکتیک فکرتوں کے استعمال کرتے ہیں اور سینٹاکتیک محدودیتوں کو Integer Linear Programming (ILP) کے ذریعہ معلوم کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا ارزیابی دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد مدل اصلی مدل سے بہتر کام کرتا ہے اور ایک کرس ڈومین سیٹینٹ میں غیر نئورل-نیٹورک-بنیادی مدل بھی بہتر کام کرتا ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද වාර්තාව සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා වාර්තාව සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය අපි හිතාගන්නවා සංවේදනය තොරතුරු ඒ වගේ මොඩේල් වලට වඩා ශක්තිමත් වෙන්න උදව් කරනවා කියලා. අපි මොඩල් එකට ප්\u200dරධාන වෙනස් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා: පැහැදිලි සංකේතික විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා සහ සංකේතික විශ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට වඩා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට වඩා හොඳ වැඩ කරන්න', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu làm thế nào để cải thiện khả năng thích ứng miền của mô hình mạng thần kinh viễn cảnh ngắn hạn (LSTM) cho việc ép bản án. Chúng tôi giả định rằng thông tin cú pháp giúp làm cho các mô hình này bền vững hơn trong mỗi miền. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai thay đổi lớn trong mô hình: sử dụng các tính năng cấu tạo cú pháp và áp đặt các giới hạn cú pháp qua cài đặt tuyến nội tạng (ILP). Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi cho thấy kiểu mẫu này hoạt động tốt hơn mẫu gốc cũng như một mô hình truyền thống không-thần kinh-kết-nối-với-hệ-thần-hậu trong một thiết lập chéo miền.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz gap kompyuterni o'chirish uchun uzun uzun xotira (LSTM) xotirasi neyron tarmoq modeli qanday o'rganishni o'rganamiz. Biz o'zimiz, bunday qo'yish haqida maʼlumot qo'shishga yordam beradi. Biz modelga ikkita muhim oʻzgarishni tahlil qilamiz: shaxsiy syntactik xususiyatlaridan foydalanish va birinchi necha chiziq dasturi (ILP) orqali bir nechta sintaktik tartiblarni koʻrsatish. Bizning qiymatlarimizni ko'rsatishimiz, talab qilingan model asl modeldan yaxshi ishlayapti, va bir nechta tarmoq asosiy modeli boshqa domen moslamalarida ishlayapti.", 'bg': 'В тази статия изследваме как да подобрим адаптивността на домейна на модел на невронна мрежа за компресиране на изречения, базирана на изтриване на базата на дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ). Хипотезата ни е, че синтактичната информация помага да направим такива модели по-стабилни в различните области. Предлагаме две основни промени в модела: използване на изрични синтактични функции и въвеждане на синтактични ограничения чрез цялостно линейно програмиране (ИЛП). Нашата оценка показва, че предложеният модел работи по-добре от първоначалния модел, както и традиционния модел, базиран на невронна мрежа в междудомейнна обстановка.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bestuderen we hoe we het aanpassingsvermogen van een op deletie gebaseerd Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neuraal netwerkmodel voor zinscompressie kunnen verbeteren. We veronderstellen dat syntactische informatie helpt om dergelijke modellen robuuster te maken over domeinen. We stellen twee belangrijke wijzigingen voor aan het model: het gebruik van expliciete syntactische functies en het invoeren van syntactische beperkingen via Integer Linear Programming (ILP). Onze evaluatie toont aan dat het voorgestelde model beter werkt dan het oorspronkelijke model en een traditioneel niet-neuraal-netwerk-gebaseerd model in een cross-domein setting.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi, hvordan man kan forbedre domænetilpasningsevnen af en sletningsbaseret Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural netværksmodel til sætningskompression. Vi antager, at syntaktisk information hjælper med at gøre sådanne modeller mere robuste på tværs af domæner. Vi foreslår to store ændringer af modellen: brug af eksplicitte syntaktiske funktioner og indførelse af syntaktiske begrænsninger gennem Integer Linear Programmering (ILP). Vores evaluering viser, at den foreslåede model fungerer bedre end den oprindelige model såvel som en traditionel ikke-neural-netværksbaseret model i en tværgående indstilling.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, wie die Domänenanpassbarkeit eines Deletion-basierten Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neuronalen Netzwerkmodells für Satzkomprimierung verbessert werden kann. Wir gehen davon aus, dass syntaktische Informationen dazu beitragen, solche Modelle domänenübergreifend robuster zu machen. Wir schlagen zwei wesentliche Änderungen am Modell vor: Verwendung expliziter syntaktischer Merkmale und Einführung syntaktischer Einschränkungen durch Integer Linear Programming (ILP). Unsere Auswertung zeigt, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell besser funktioniert als das ursprüngliche Modell sowie ein traditionelles nicht-neuronales Netzwerk-basiertes Modell in einem domänenübergreifenden Setting.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo kako poboljšati prilagodljivost domena dugoročne memorije (LSTM) neuralne mreže za kompresiju rečenica na temelju delecije. Pretpostavljamo da sintaktičke informacije pomažu u stvaranju takvih modela jača preko domena. Predlažemo dvije velike promjene modela: korištenje pojasnih sintaktičkih karakteristika i uvođenje sintaktičkih ograničenja putem kompletnog linijskog programiranja (ILP). Naša procjena pokazuje da predloženi model radi bolje od originalnog modela, kao i tradicionalni model koji se temelji na neuralnoj mreži u prekršenom domenu.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 삭제에 기반한 장단시간기억(LSTM) 신경 네트워크 문장 압축 모델의 역적응성을 어떻게 향상시키는지 연구했다.우리는 문법 정보가 이런 모델을 서로 다른 분야에서 더욱 건장하게 하는 데 도움이 된다고 가정한다.우리는 모델에 대해 두 가지 주요 수정을 제시했는데 그것이 바로 현식 문법 특징을 사용하고 정수선형 계획(ILP)을 통해 문법 제약을 도입하는 것이다.우리의 평가에 의하면 크로스 환경에서 이 모델은 원시 모델과 전통적인 비신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 모델보다 더욱 잘 작동한다.', 'id': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression.  Kami hipotesis bahwa informasi sintaks membantu membuat model tersebut lebih kuat di seluruh domain. Kami mengusulkan dua perubahan utama pada model: menggunakan ciri-ciri sintaksi eksplicit dan memperkenalkan batas sintaksi melalui Programmasi Linar Integer (ILP). Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan bekerja lebih baik dari model asli serta model tradisional bukan-saraf-jaringan-berdasarkan dalam setting cross-domain.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مطالعه می\u200cکنیم چگونه برای تزریق کردن مجموعه\u200cی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (LSTM) یک حافظه کوتاه\u200cی طولانی بر پایه\u200cی حذف کردن قابلیت دومین را بهتر کنیم. ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات سنتاکتیک در ساختن چنین مدل\u200cها در سرزمین قوی\u200cتر کمک می\u200cکند. ما دو تغییر بزرگ برای مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک روشن و محدودیت\u200cهای سنتاکتیک از طریق برنامه\u200cریزی کلی خط (ILP) معرفی می\u200cکنیم. ارزیابی ما نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد بهتر از مدل اصلی کار می کند و یک مدل غیر عصبی شبکه سنتی در یک تنظیمات مختلف دومین کار می کند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, suçlamak üçin ýüzünde durmuş Uzun Täze Hata (LSTM) neiral a ňla nusgasyny nädip gowurabileceğini öwrenýärdik. Sintaktik bilgi, bu modelleri alanlarda daha güçlü şekilde yaratmak için yardımcı olacağını tahmin ediyoruz. Biz model üçin iki esasy üýtgewleri teklip edip görýäris: aşyk sintaktik üýtgewleri ullanýar we sintaktik çykyşlar (ILP) bilen hat çykyş edip görkezilýän. Biziň deňleşmerimiz teklip eden nusganyň ilkinji nusgadan has gowy işleýändigini görkezýär. we däpli nusga-netral-netek daşary bir nusgada daşary-domeny düzümlerniň içinde.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons studeer hoe om die domein aanpasbaarheid van 'n uitvee-gebaseerde Lang Kort Term Geheue (LSTM) neurale netwerk model vir sentence komprimering te verbeter. Ons hipotesis dat sintaktieke inligting hulp om sodanige modele meer kragtiger te maak oor domeine. Ons stel twee grootste veranderinge aan die model voorstel: gebruik eksplisiese sintaktieke funksies en introduseer sintaktieke beheinings deur heelteger Lineêre Programming (ILP). Ons evaluasie wys dat die voorgestelde model beter werk as die oorspronklike model en ook 'n tradisionele nie-neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde model in' n kruisdomein instelling.", 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት፣ የዶሜን አካባቢ የረጅም አቋራጭ-የረዘመ ማሰሪያ (LSTM) የኔትራዊ መረብ ሞዴል ለፍርድ ክስ እንዴት እንዲያሳድግ እናስተምራለን፡፡ We hypothesize that syntactic information helps in making such models more robust across domains.  በዓይነቱ ላይ ሁለት ታላላቅ ለውጦችን እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ማስታወቂያችን የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ከመጀመሪያው ሞዴል የበለጠ እንደሆነ እናም በክፍለ ዳግመኛ የኔural-network-based ሞዴል እንደተደረገ ነው፡፡', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma namna ya kuboresha uwezekano wa kuboresha mahali kwa kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu ya kufutwa (LSTM) ya mtandao wa neura kwa shinikizo la hukumu. Tunapata imani kwamba taarifa za ushirikiano zinasaidia kufanya mifano kama hizi zinavurugwa zaidi katika maeneo mbalimbali. Tunazipendekeza mabadiliko makubwa mawili katika mtindo huo: kwa kutumia vipengele vya wazi vya ushirikiano na kutengeneza vizuizi vya ushirikiano kupitia programu ya Ujumbe (ILP). Utafiti wetu unaonyesha kuwa muundo huu unapendekezwa unafanya kazi vizuri zaidi ya mifano ya asili na pia mfano wa asili ya kijamii katika mazingira ya ndani.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, sözlər kompresiyonu üçün uzun qısqa-Term Memory (LSTM) nöral a ğ modelini necə düzəltməyi öyrənirik. Biz sintaktik məlumatların bu modelləri domenlərin arasında daha qüvvətli olmasına kömək edir. Biz model üçün iki böyük dəyişiklik təklif edirik: açıq sintaktik xüsusiyyətləri istifadə edir və sintaktik dəyişiklikləri tamamlayır. Bizim değerlendirmək göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin orijinal modellərdən daha yaxşı işləyir, həmçin in neyral a ğ-tabanlı modellərdən daha yaxşı işləyir.', 'sq': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression.  Ne hipotezojmë se informacioni sintaktik ndihmon në bërjen e modeleve të tilla më të fortë në të gjithë domenat. Ne propozojmë dy ndryshime të mëdha në modelin: përdorimin e karakteristikave sintaktike të qarta dhe futjen e kufizimeve sintaktike nëpërmjet Programimit Integer Linear (ILP). Vlerësimi ynë tregon se modeli i propozuar funksionon më mirë se modeli origjinal si dhe një model tradicional jo-nervor-rrjeti në një vendosje ndërdomenie.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես բարելավել բաժանման հիմքում հիմնված երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության (LSMT) նյարդային ցանցի մոդելը նախադասությունների ճնշումների համար: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ սինտակտիկ ինֆորմացիան օգնում է այս մոդելները ավելի ուժեղ դարձնել բնագավառներում: We propose two major changes to the model: using explicit syntactic features and introducing syntactic constraints through Integer Linear Programming (ILP).  Մեր գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան սկզբնական մոդելը, ինչպես նաև ավանդական ոչ նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոդելը շրջապատային միջավայրում:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo kako poboljšati adaptabilnost domena dugoročne memorije (LSTM) neuralne mreže za kompresiju rečenica na temelju delecije. Pretpostavljamo da sintaktička informacija pomaže u stvaranju takvih modela jača preko domena. Predlažemo dvije velike promjene modela: korištenje pojasnih sintaktičkih karakteristika i uvođenje sintaktičkih ograničenja putem kompletnog linijskog programiranja (ILP). Naša procjena pokazuje da predloženi model radi bolje od originalnog modela, kao i tradicionalnog modela na neuralnoj mreži koji se temelji na krstodomenu.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku studujeme, jak zlepšit adaptabilitu domény modelu LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pro kompresi vět založeného na deleci. Předpokládáme hypotézu, že syntaktické informace pomáhají zvýšit robustní modely napříč doménami. Navrhujeme dvě hlavní změny modelu: použití explicitních syntaktických funkcí a zavedení syntaktických omezení prostřednictvím integer lineárního programování (ILP). Naše hodnocení ukazuje, že navržený model funguje lépe než původní model, stejně jako tradiční non-neuronový model založený na síti v různých doménách.', 'ca': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression.  Suposem que la informació sinàctica ajuda a fer aquests models més robustos en tots els dominis. Proposem dos canvis importants al model: utilitzar característiques sinàctiques explícites i introduir restriccions sinàctiques a través de la programació linear intega (ILP). La nostra evaluació demostra que el model proposat funciona millor que el model original i un model tradicional no basat en xarxa neuronal en un entorn transdomínic.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গবেষণা করছি কিভাবে মুছে ফেলার জন্য একটি দীর্ঘ শর্ট-টার্ম ম মেমোরি (এলসিএম) নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল বাড়িয়ে দেওয়া যায়। আমরা হিসেবে বিশ্বাস করি যে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক তথ্য সাহায্য করে এই ধরনের মডেলের মাধ্যমে ডোমেইনের সারা দিক আমরা মডেলের দুটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরিবর্তন প্রস্তাব করছি: সুস্পষ্ট সিন্ট্যাকটিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে সিনিট্যাক্টিক নিয়ম ব্যবহার কর আমাদের মুল্যায়ন দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল প্রাথমিক মডেলের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ করে এবং একটি প্রথাগত নিউরেল-নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ম', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan, miten voidaan parantaa poistopohjaisen pitkän aikavälin muistin (Long Short-Term Memory, LSTM) neuroverkkomallin sopeutumiskykyä lausekompressioon. Oletamme, että syntaktinen tieto auttaa tekemään näistä malleista vankempia eri toimialueilla. Ehdotamme kahta suurta muutosta malliin: eksplisiittisten syntaktisten ominaisuuksien käyttöä ja syntaktisten rajoitusten käyttöönottoa kokonaislineaarisen ohjelmoinnin (ILP) avulla. Arviointi osoittaa, että ehdotettu malli toimii paremmin kuin alkuperäinen malli sekä perinteinen ei-neuroverkkopohjainen malli monialaisessa ympäristössä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime, kuidas parandada kustutuspõhise pikaajalise mälu (LSTM) närvivõrgu mudeli domeeni kohanemisvõimet lausete tihendamiseks. Me oletame, et süntaktiline teave aitab muuta selliseid mudeleid tugevamaks eri valdkondades. Pakume mudelile välja kaks olulist muudatust: selgete süntaktiliste funktsioonide kasutamine ja süntaktiliste piirangute kehtestamine täieliku lineaarse programmeerimise (ILP) kaudu. Meie hinnang näitab, et kavandatud mudel töötab paremini kui algne mudel, samuti traditsiooniline mitteneuraalvõrgupõhine mudel valdkondadevahelises keskkonnas.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים איך לשפר את יכולת ההתאמה בתחום של דוגמא רשת עצבית של זיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר (LSTM) מבוסס על מחיקה. אנחנו מניחים שמידע סינטקטי עוזר להפוך דוגמנים כאלה חזקים יותר ברחבי תחומות. אנו מציעים שני שינויים גדולים לדוגמא: להשתמש בתוכניות סינטאקטיות ברורות והציגה של מחסומות סינטאקטיות באמצעות תוכנית לינרית שלמה (ILP). הערכה שלנו מראה שהמודל המוצע עובד טוב יותר מהמודל המקורי, כמו גם מודל מסורתי לא-עצבי-מבוסס ברשת בסיס בין שטחים.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardar, Munã karanta yadda za mu kyautata adaptati da Domen na tsari wa wata motsi na jerin Naurar-Lokaci na Long-Long-Long-Cire (LstanM) wa danna-ƙari ga ƙanshi. Tuna kai'antari da information ta samurata yana taimakon ka sami misãlai da za'a karɓi kowanka. Tuna goyyar da musanyi biyu masu girma ga shirin ayuka: ka yi amfani da shiryoyin shiryoyin shiryoyin linje na Intel (ILP). Bayaniyarmu yana nũna cẽwa misalin da aka sake shi yana aiki mafi alhẽri daga misali na farko, da kuma wata misali na'urar-taruwar-neural a cikin tsarin-guda.", 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo, kako izboljšati domensko prilagodljivost modela nevronskega omrežja, ki temelji na izbrisu dolgega kratkoročnega pomnilnika (LSTM), za stiskanje stavkov. Domnevamo, da sintaktične informacije pomagajo pri izboljšanju robustnosti takih modelov v vseh domenah. Predlagamo dve glavni spremembi modela: uporabo eksplicitnih sintaktičnih značilnosti in uvedbo sintaktičnih omejitev prek celotnega linearnega programiranja (ILP). Naša ocena kaže, da predlagani model deluje bolje kot prvotni model in tradicionalni model, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju, v meddomenskem okolju.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we read about the domain Adjustment of a delete-supported long-Terminal Network model (LTT M) Neral network model for Sentencement. Awak dhéwé ngerasasi sistem sing paling-sistem luwih ngéwangan ngono kuwi model sing luwih apik pada sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke ning model: nggunakake sistem sing dibutungan seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang kelangan seneng akèh "Entger Linary Program" (IBP). Awakdhéwé éntuk ngéwé éntuk sistem sing luwih apik karo model sing apik karo model sing apik dadi, lan padha sistem sing semplikeke biyanan ne-Neral-network-basa nang teka-domain.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we study how to improve the domain adaptability of a deletion-based Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) neural network model for sentence compression. ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབུས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། We propose two major changes to the model: using explicit syntactic features and introducing syntactic constraints through Integer Linear Programming (ILP). Our evaluation shows that the proposed model works better than the original model as well as a traditional non-neural-network-based model in a cross-domain setting.'}
{'en': 'Transductive Non-linear Learning for Chinese Hypernym Prediction', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem não linear transdutiva para previsão de hiperônimos chineses', 'es': 'Aprendizaje no lineal transductivo para la predicción de hipernemios chinos', 'ar': 'التعلم غير الخطي التحويلية للتنبؤ التشعبي الصيني', 'fr': "Apprentissage non linéaire par transducteur pour la prédiction de l'hypernym chinois", 'zh': '中文超名词占者转导非线性学', 'ja': '中国語ハイパーニム予測のための帰納的非線形学習', 'ru': 'Трансдуктивное нелинейное обучение для китайского предсказания гипернима', 'hi': 'Transductive गैर रैखिक चीनी Hypernym भविष्यवाणी के लिए सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Thras-líneach Neamhlíneach do Thuar Hipirinim na Síne', 'hu': 'Transzduktív nemlineáris tanulás a kínai hipernim jósláshoz', 'el': 'Μεταβατική μη γραμμική μάθηση για την κινεζική πρόβλεψη υπερνύμων', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Apprendimento Transduttivo Non-Lineare per la Predizione Ipernica Cinese', 'mk': 'Трансдуктивно нелинијарно учење за предвидување на кинески хиперими', 'kk': 'Қытай гипернимді таңдау үшін сызық емес оқыту', 'lt': 'Transdukcinis nelinijinis mokymasis Kinijos hipernimo prognozėje', 'ml': 'Transductive Non-linear Learning for Chinese Hypernym Prediction', 'mn': 'Хятад Хиперним таамаглалтын хувьд шугам бус суралцах', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Non-linear Transductive untuk Prediksi Hipernim Cina', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Transduttiv Mhux Linjari għal Predizzjoni ta’ Ipernim Ċiniż', 'no': 'Transduktiv ikkje-lineær læring for kinesisk hypernimforordning', 'pl': 'Transdukcyjne uczenie się nieliniowe dla prognozowania hipernimów chińskich', 'ro': 'Învățare transductivă non-liniară pentru predicția hipernimului chinez', 'sr': 'Transduktivno neolinearno učenje za kinesku hipernimu predviđanje', 'so': 'Waxbarashada qoraalka ah ee Shiinaha Hypernym', 'sv': 'Transduktivt icke-linjärt lärande för kinesisk hypernym förutsägelse', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'چین ہیپر نیم پیش ڈیکل کے لئے غیر لینی سیکھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch chuyển động Trình học không tuyến tính cho động mạch', 'bg': 'Трансдуктивно нелинейно обучение за прогнозиране на китайски хиперними', 'hr': 'Transduktivno neolinearno učenje za kinesku hipernimu predviđanje', 'nl': 'Transductief Niet-lineair Leren voor Chinese Hyperniem Voorspelling', 'da': 'Transduktiv ikke-lineær læring for kinesisk hypernym forudsigelse', 'ko': '비선형 학습에 기초한 중국어 초사 예측', 'de': 'Transduktives nichtlineares Lernen für die Vorhersage chinesischer Hypernyme', 'fa': 'یادگیری غیر خطی برای پیشنهاد هیپرنیم چینی', 'sw': 'Ufunzi usio na msingi kwa ajili ya Utawala wa Kichina wa Hypernym', 'af': 'Oordruktiewe Onlineêre Leer vir Sjinese Hypernyme Voorskou', 'id': 'Transductive Non-linear Learning for Chinese Hypernym Prediction', 'tr': 'Çinçe Hipernim Wagdaýy üçin çyzgyly öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi Transduktiv jo-linear për parashikimin e hipernimit kinez', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի հիպերնիմի կանխատեսման համար թարգմանական ոչ գծային սովորելը', 'az': 'Çincə Hipernim Öyrənməsi üçün dəyişiklik-çizgi Öyrənmə', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Transduktivno neolinearno učenje za kinesku hipernimu predviđanje', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge no linear transdutiu per la predicció de l'hipernim xinès", 'cs': 'Transduktivní nelineární učení pro predikci čínských hypernymů', 'et': 'Transduktiivne mittelineaarne õpe hiina hüpernüümide prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Transduktiivinen ei-lineaarinen oppiminen kiinalaisten hypernyymien ennustamiseen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'למידה לא לינרית טרנסודקטיבית לקיום היפרנימי סיני', 'sk': 'Transduktivno nelinearno učenje za napoved kitajskega hipernima', 'bo': 'འདྲ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཧའི་པར་མིང་གི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ལ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་སྦྱོར་བ།'}
{'en': 'Finding the correct hypernyms for entities is essential for taxonomy learning, fine-grained entity categorization, query understanding, etc. Due to the flexibility of the Chinese language, it is challenging to identify hypernyms in Chinese accurately. Rather than extracting hypernyms from texts, in this paper, we present a transductive learning approach to establish mappings from entities to hypernyms in the embedding space directly. It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules. Experiments on real-world datasets illustrate that our approach outperforms previous methods for Chinese hypernym prediction.', 'ar': 'يعد العثور على الكلمات التشعبية الصحيحة للكيانات أمرًا ضروريًا لتعلم التصنيف ، وتصنيف الكيانات الدقيق ، وفهم الاستعلام ، وما إلى ذلك ، نظرًا لمرونة اللغة الصينية ، فمن الصعب تحديد Hypernyms في اللغة الصينية بدقة. بدلاً من استخراج Hypernyms من النصوص ، نقدم في هذه الورقة نهجًا تعليميًا تحويليًا لإنشاء تعيينات من الكيانات إلى hypernyms في مساحة التضمين مباشرةً. فهو يجمع بين نماذج إسقاط التضمين الخطي وغير الخطي ، مع القدرة على ترميز القواعد التعسفية الخاصة باللغة. توضح التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نهجنا يتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب السابقة للتنبؤ بالتشعب الصيني.', 'es': 'Encontrar los hiperónimos correctos para las entidades es esencial para el aprendizaje de la taxonomía, la categorización detallada de las entidades, la comprensión de consultas, etc. Debido a la flexibilidad del idioma chino, es difícil identificar los hiperónimos en chino con precisión. En lugar de extraer hiperónimos de los textos, en este artículo presentamos un enfoque de aprendizaje transductivo para establecer asignaciones de entidades a hiperónimos en el espacio de incrustación directamente. Combina modelos de proyección incrustados lineales y no lineales, con la capacidad de codificar reglas arbitrarias específicas del lenguaje. Los experimentos en conjuntos de datos del mundo real ilustran que nuestro enfoque supera a los métodos anteriores para la predicción de hipernimos chinos.', 'fr': "Trouver les hyperonymes corrects pour les entités est essentiel pour l'apprentissage de la taxonomie, la catégorisation fine des entités, la compréhension des requêtes, etc. En raison de la flexibilité de la langue chinoise, il est difficile d'identifier les hyperonymes en chinois avec précision. Plutôt que d'extraire des hyperonymes de textes, nous présentons dans cet article une approche d'apprentissage par transducteur pour établir des mappages entre des entités et des hyperonymes dans l'espace d'intégration directement. Il combine des modèles de projection d'intégration linéaires et non linéaires, avec la capacité de coder des règles spécifiques à un langage arbitraire. Des expériences sur des ensembles de données du monde réel montrent que notre approche surpasse les méthodes précédentes de prédiction de l'hyperonyme chinois.", 'pt': 'Encontrar os hiperônimos corretos para entidades é essencial para o aprendizado de taxonomia, categorização refinada de entidades, compreensão de consultas, etc. Devido à flexibilidade do idioma chinês, é um desafio identificar com precisão os hiperônimos em chinês. Em vez de extrair hiperônimos de textos, neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem de aprendizagem transdutiva para estabelecer mapeamentos de entidades para hiperônimos diretamente no espaço de incorporação. Ele combina modelos de projeção de incorporação linear e não linear, com a capacidade de codificar regras específicas de linguagem arbitrária. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados do mundo real ilustram que nossa abordagem supera os métodos anteriores para previsão de hiperônimos chineses.', 'ja': 'エンティティの正しい超ニームを見つけることは、分類学学習、細かいエンティティの分類、クエリの理解などに不可欠です。中国語の柔軟性のため、正確に中国語の超漢字を識別することは困難です。本稿では、テキストから超ニームを抽出するのではなく、エンティティから埋め込み空間の超ニームへのマッピングを直接確立するための変換学習アプローチを提示する。線形および非線形埋め込み投影モデルを組み合わせ、任意の言語固有のルールをエンコードすることができます。現実のデータセットでの実験は、私たちのアプローチが中国語のハイパーニム予測の以前の方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '求是超名词学、细粒度实、询解之要。 以中文之灵活性,正识中文之超名有挑战性也。 本文中,发一转导学术,不从文本提取超义词,以直嵌空立实至超义词映射。 合线性非线性,有编码任言特定则之能。 于今世界数据集实验,吾法优于前中国超数测之。', 'ru': 'Поиск правильных гипернимов для сущностей необходим для изучения таксономии, тонкой категоризации сущностей, понимания запросов и т. д. В связи с гибкостью китайского языка, трудно определить гипернимы на китайском языке точно. Вместо того, чтобы извлекать гипернимы из текстов, в этой статье мы представляем трансдуктивный подход к обучению для установления сопоставлений от сущностей к гипернимам непосредственно в пространстве вложений. Он сочетает в себе линейные и нелинейные модели проекции вложений с возможностью кодирования произвольных правил, специфичных для языка. Эксперименты с реальными наборами данных показывают, что наш подход превосходит предыдущие методы китайского гипернима.', 'hi': 'संस्थाओं के लिए सही hypernyms ढूँढना वर्गीकरण सीखने, ठीक दाने दार इकाई वर्गीकरण, क्वेरी समझ, आदि के लिए आवश्यक है। चीनी भाषा के लचीलेपन के कारण, चीनी भाषा में हाइपरनिम्स की सटीक पहचान करना चुनौतीपूर्ण है। ग्रंथों से हाइपरनिम्स निकालने के बजाय, इस पेपर में, हम सीधे एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में संस्थाओं से हाइपरनिम्स तक मैपिंग स्थापित करने के लिए एक ट्रांसडक्टिव लर्निंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यह रैखिक और गैर-रैखिक एम्बेडिंग प्रोजेक्शन मॉडल को जोड़ती है, जिसमें मनमाने ढंग से भाषा-विशिष्ट नियमों को एन्कोडिंग करने की क्षमता होती है। वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण चीनी हाइपरनिम भविष्यवाणी के लिए पिछले तरीकों से बेहतर है।', 'ga': "Tá sé ríthábhachtach na hipearnainmneacha cearta a aimsiú d'eintitis le haghaidh foghlaim tacsanomaíochta, catagóiriú aonán mínghlanta, tuiscint ar fhiosrúcháin, etc. Mar gheall ar sholúbthacht na teanga Síneach, tá sé dúshlánach hipearainmneacha sa tSínis a aithint go cruinn. In áit hipearnam a bhaint as téacsanna, cuirimid i láthair sa pháipéar seo cur chuige foghlama tras-aistrithe chun mapálacha a bhunú ó aonáin go hipearainmneacha sa spás neadaithe go díreach. Comhcheanglaíonn sé samhlacha teilgin leabaithe líneacha agus neamhlíneacha, a bhfuil an cumas ann rialacha treallach a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga a ionchódú. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí ón bhfíorshaol go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige na modhanna a bhí ann roimhe seo chun hipearainmneacha na Síne a thuar.", 'ka': 'ინტერტიების მარტივი ჰიპერნიმები ძებნა რაქტონომის სწავლებისთვის, კატეგორიზაციისთვის კოტეგორიზაციისთვის, კითხვის გაგრძნობისთვის და განსაკუთრებისთვის. ჩინეთიური ენის ტრაქტიბულობისთვის შესაძლებლობად,  ტექსტიდან ჰიპერნიმის გამოყენება, ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ტრანექსუტიური სწავლების მიღება, რომ განსაზღვრებით ჰიპერნიმისგან ჰიპერნიმისგან დავაკეთებთ სამყარო ის კომბიზებს ლინიერი და არლინიერი დაყენებული პროექციის მოდელების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებლობა. ექსპერიმენტები რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ ილუსტრავს, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები უფრო წინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინ', 'hu': 'Az entitások megfelelő hiperniméinek megtalálása elengedhetetlen a taxonómia tanulásához, a finom szemű entitáskategorizáláshoz, a lekérdezések megértéséhez stb. A kínai nyelv rugalmassága miatt kihívást jelent a hipernimék pontos azonosítása a kínai nyelven. A szövegekből való hipernímek kivonása helyett ebben a tanulmányban egy transzduktív tanulási megközelítést mutatunk be az entitásoktól a hipernímekig való leképezést közvetlenül a beágyazási térben. Kombinálja a lineáris és nemlineáris beágyazási vetítési modelleket, és képes tetszőleges nyelvspecifikus szabályokat kódolni. A valós adatkészletekkel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk felülmúlja a korábbi módszereket a kínai hiperním-előrejelzésre.', 'el': 'Η εύρεση των κατάλληλων υπερωνύμων για οντότητες είναι απαραίτητη για την εκμάθηση της ταξινομίας, την κατηγοριοποίηση των λεπτομερών οντοτήτων, την κατανόηση των ερωτήσεων κ.λπ. Λόγω της ευελιξίας της κινεζικής γλώσσας, είναι δύσκολο να εντοπιστούν με ακρίβεια τα υπερωνύμια στα κινεζικά. Αντί να εξάγουμε υπερνύματα από κείμενα, στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μεταγωγική μαθησιακή προσέγγιση για την καθιέρωση αντιστοιχίσεων από οντότητες σε υπερνύμια στον ενσωματωμένο χώρο άμεσα. Συνδυάζει γραμμικά και μη γραμμικά μοντέλα προβολής ενσωμάτωσης, με την ικανότητα κωδικοποίησης αυθαίρετων γλωσσικών κανόνων. Τα πειράματα σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους για την πρόβλεψη των κινεζικών υπερνύμων.', 'kk': 'Нәтижелер үшін дұрыс гипернимдерді табу, таксономиялық оқыту, жақсы бағалау, сұраныс түсіну, т.б. үшін. Қытай тілінің гипернимдерін дұрыс қытайша анықтау қиын. Мәтіндерден гипернимдерді тарқатуға орнына, осы қағаздың орнына, біз оның орындағы гипернимдерге тікелей ендіру орындағы картаптарын құру үшін аударылық оқыту арқылы көрсетеді. Бұл сызықты және сызықты емес ендіру үлгілерін біріктіреді. Бұл сызықты және сызықты түрлі ережелерді кодтау мүмкіндігімен біріктіреді. Шын әлемдегі деректер жиындарының тәжірибелері, біздің тәжірибеміздің алдыңғы тәжірибелеріміз Қытай гипернимді таңдау арқылы жасайды.', 'it': "Trovare gli ipernimi corretti per le entità è essenziale per l'apprendimento tassonomico, la categorizzazione delle entità a grana fine, la comprensione delle query, ecc A causa della flessibilità della lingua cinese, è difficile identificare gli ipernimi in cinese con precisione. Anziché estrarre ipernimi dai testi, in questo articolo presentiamo un approccio di apprendimento trasttivo per stabilire mappature da entità a ipernimi direttamente nello spazio di embedding. Combina modelli di proiezione di incorporamento lineare e non lineare, con la capacità di codificare regole arbitrarie specifiche del linguaggio. Esperimenti su set di dati reali dimostrano che il nostro approccio supera i metodi precedenti per la previsione dell'ipernimo cinese.", 'lt': 'Dėl kinų kalbos lankstumo sunku tiksliai nustatyti hipernimus kinų kalba. Užuot ištraukę hipernymus iš tekstų, šiame dokumente mes pristatome transdukcinio mokymosi metodą, kuriuo siekiama nustatyti žemėlapius nuo subjektų tiesiogiai į hipernymus įterpimo erdvėje. Jame derinami linijiniai ir nelinijiniai įterpimo projektavimo modeliai ir gebėjimas koduoti savavališkas kalbai skirtas taisykles. Realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris yra didesnis už ankstesnius Kinijos hiperinimo prognozės metodus.', 'mk': 'Поради флексибилноста на кинескиот јазик, тешко е точно да се идентификуваат хипернимите на кинески јазик. Наместо да ги извадиме хипернимите од текстовите, во оваа хартија, претставуваме трансдуктивен пристап на учење за воспоставување на мапи од ентитети до хиперними во вставниот простор директно. Комбинира линијарни и нелинијарни проекциски модели за вградување, со капацитетот на кодирање на арбитрални правила специфични за јазикот. Експериментите на базите на податоци на реалниот свет илустрираат дека нашиот пристап ги надминува претходните методи за предвидување на кинеските хиперними.', 'ms': 'Mencari hipernim yang betul bagi entiti adalah penting untuk belajar taksonomi, kategorisasi entiti-benih-baik, pemahaman tanya, dll. Kerana fleksibiliti bahasa Cina, ia mencabar untuk mengenalpasti hipernim dalam bahasa Cina dengan tepat. Daripada mengekstrak hipernim dari teks, dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan pendekatan pembelajaran transduktif untuk menetapkan peta dari entiti ke hipernim dalam ruang penyembedding secara langsung. It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules.  Eksperimen pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita melebihi kaedah terdahulu untuk ramalan hipernim Cina.', 'ml': 'ശരിയായ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് ടാക്സോനോമി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നല്ല ഗ്രാന്റിയുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വിഭാഗവും, ചൈനീസ് ഭാഷയുടെ സ്വാഭാവ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dണിമുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d പകരം, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നേരിട്ടുള്ള സ്ഥലത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹൈപ്പെ It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules.  യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനിന്ന് മുമ്പ് ചൈനീസ് ഹ', 'mt': 'Is-sejba tal-iperinimi korretti għall-entitajiet hija essenzjali għat-tagħlim tat-tassonomija, għall-kategorizzazzjoni tal-entitajiet b’għeneb fin, għall-fehim tal-mistoqsijiet, eċċ. Minħabba l-flessibbiltà tal-lingwa Ċiniża, huwa diffiċli li jiġu identifikati l-iperinimi b’mod preċiż fiċ-Ċiniż. Minflok l-estrazzjoni ta’ iperinimi mit-testi, f’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ ta’ tagħlim trasduttiv biex nistabbilixxu mappings minn entitajiet għal iperinimi fl-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni direttament. It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules.  L-esperimenti fuq settijiet tad-dejta tad-dinja reali juru li l-approċċ tagħna huwa akbar minn metodi preċedenti għat-tbassir tal-ipernimi Ċiniżi.', 'no': 'Finn korrekte hypernymar for einingar er viktig for å lære taksonomikk, kategorisering av fin-kornerte einingar, spørjingskontrering osv. På grunn av fleksibiliteten av kinesisk språk er det vanskeleg å identifisera hypernymar i kinesisk nøyaktig. I staden for å pakka ut hypernymar frå tekstar, i denne papiret viser vi ein transduktiv læringstilnærming for å oppretta mappingar frå einingar til hypernymar i innbyggingsrommet direkte. Det kombinerer lineære og ikkje-lineære innbyggingsmodeller med kapasiteten for koding av tilfeldige språksspesifikke reglar. Eksperimentar på verkeleg datasett illustrerer at tilnærminga vårt utfører førre metoder for kinesiske hypernymforhåndsvising.', 'pl': 'Znalezienie właściwych hipernimów dla podmiotów jest niezbędne do nauki taksonomii, precyzyjnej kategoryzacji podmiotów, zrozumienia zapytań itp. Ze względu na elastyczność języka chińskiego trudno jest dokładnie zidentyfikować hipernimy w języku chińskim. Zamiast wyodrębniać hipernimy z tekstów, w niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy transduktywne podejście uczenia się, aby ustalić mapowanie od podmiotów do hipernimów bezpośrednio w przestrzeni osadzania. Łączy liniowe i nieliniowe modele projekcji osadzenia, z możliwością kodowania dowolnych reguł językowych. Eksperymenty na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych ilustrują, że nasze podejście przewyższa poprzednie metody przewidywania chińskich hipernimów.', 'ro': 'Găsirea hipernimelor corecte pentru entități este esențială pentru învățarea taxonomică, clasificarea entităților cu granule fine, înțelegerea interogărilor etc. Datorită flexibilității limbii chineze, este dificil să identificăm hipernimele în chineză cu precizie. În loc să extragem hipernime din texte, în această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare de învățare transductivă pentru a stabili mapări de la entități la hipernime în spațiul de încorporare direct. Combină modele de proiecție liniară și neliniară, cu capacitatea de codificare a regulilor specifice limbajului arbitrar. Experimentele pe seturi de date din lumea reală ilustrează faptul că abordarea noastră depășește metodele anterioare pentru predicția hipernimului chinez.', 'si': 'මුළුවන්ට සඳහා හරිම හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් තියෙන්න, හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් විද්\u200dයාවක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න, ඉතින්. චීනි භාෂයේ ස ලිපින් වලින් හායිපර්නිම් වලින් පිටපත් වලින් පිටපත් වලින් පිටපත් වලින්, අපි පිටපත් වලින් පිටපත් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ද ඒක සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ලේනියර් සහ නොලේනියර් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණ මොඩේල්ස්, සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව විශේෂ නීතිය ස ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ විදිහට චීනි හායිපර්නිම් අනුව', 'sr': 'Pronaći ispravne hipernime za entitate je ključno za učenje taksonomije, kategoriju finog zrnca entiteta, ispitivanje razumijevanja itd. Zbog fleksibilnosti kineskog jezika, teško je identifikovati hipernimu na kineskom jeziku tačno. Umesto izvlačenja hipernima iz tekstova, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo transduktivni pristup učenja kako bi uspostavili mape od entitata do hipernima u smeštanju prostora direktno. Kombinuje linearne i ne-linearne modele ugrađenja projekcija, sa kapacitetom kodiranja arbitrarnih pravila specifičnih jezika. Eksperimenti na podacima stvarnog sveta pokazuju da naš pristup iznosi prethodne metode za predviđanje kineskog hipernuma.', 'so': 'Finnishka saxda ah ee jidhka waxaa muhiim u ah barashada canshuuraha, qeybinta saxda ah, wargelinta garashada, tusaale ahaan xilligaaga afka Shiino darteed, waxaa dhibaataysan in si saxda ah looga aqoonsado koronta Shiino. Hadii aan ka soo saarno qoraalkan, waxan warqaddan ka keenaynaa qaab waxbarasho la beddelayo si aan u dhisno sawirro sawirro ah oo ay ka imaaneyso sawirro-sawirro-sawirro-sawirro-sawirro-sawirro-sawirro-sawirro. Waxay ku soo ururisaa samooyin sawir ah oo aan linear ahayn, kaas oo awoodda ku qoran sharciyada qoraalka kala duduwan ee luqada caadiga ah. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka dunida ee runta ah waxay ka muuqataa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu sameeyo qaabab hore oo uu ku sameeyo wax ka sii sheego hore ee Shiino.', 'sv': 'Att hitta rätt hypernymer för enheter är viktigt för taxonomi lärande, finkornig entitetskategorisering, frågeförståelse etc. På grund av flexibiliteten i det kinesiska språket är det svårt att identifiera hypernymer på kinesiska korrekt. Istället för att extrahera hypernymer från texter presenterar vi i denna uppsats en transduktiv inlärningsmetod för att etablera mappning från entiteter till hypernymer direkt i inbäddningsutrymmet. Den kombinerar linjära och icke-linjära inbäddningsprojektionsmodeller, med förmågan att koda godtyckliga språkspecifika regler. Experiment på verkliga datauppsättningar visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar tidigare metoder för kinesisk hypernymprediktion.', 'ta': 'சரியான உயரம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருள்களுக்கு வரிசைப்படுத்தல், நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட பொருள் வகைப்படுத்தல், கேள்வி புரிந்து கொள்ளுதல் முக்கியமானது. சீன மொழியின் flexibility காரணத் உரையிலிருந்து ஹைப்பரிம்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு பதிலாக, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மாற்று கற்றுப் பொருளிலிருந்து பொருள் வரைபடங்களை நே அது கோடு மற்றும் கோடு இல்லாத திட்டப்பணி மாதிரிகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது, ஆர்டிரி மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட விதிமுறை உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள முன்னோக்கம் சீன ஆப்பர்னிம் முன்னேற்ற முறையில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ur': 'ایٹنیٹیوں کے لئے ٹھیک ہیرنیم تلاش کرنے کا ضرورت ہے تاکسونومی سیکھنے کے لئے، پاکیزہ دانے کے واسطے اختیار کرنے کے لئے، سؤال سمجھنے کے باعث، چین زبان کی مہربانی کے باعث، چین میں ہیرنیم کو دقیق پہچان کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہیپر نیم کو اٹھانے کے بدلے ہم ایک تغییر سیکھنے کا طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ موجودات سے ہیپر نیم کو سیدھے مضبوط جگہ میں مضبوط کریں۔ یہ خطوط اور غیر خطوط انڈینگ پروژیکشن موڈل کو ترکیب کرتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے کوڈینگ کی قابلیت کے ساتھ مختلف زبان کے خاص قوانین کے ساتھ۔ حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ چین ہیرنیم کی پیش بینی کے لئے پہلے طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'mn': 'Объектуудын зөв гиперним олох нь татекономик суралцах, цэвэрхэн жингийн бүтээгдэхүүний хуваарилалт, квадрат ойлголтын тулд чухал юм. Хятад хэл дээр гиперним гэдгийг тодорхойлох нь хэцүү. Энэ цаасан дээр гиперним зураг гаргахын оронд бид бүтээгдэхүүнээс гиперним руу шууд оролцох орон зайд газрын зураг бүтээх боломжтой суралцах арга зам өгдөг. Энэ нь шулуун болон шулуун биш шулуун бүрдүүлэх загваруудыг нэгтгэдэг. Өөрөөр хэлний тодорхой дүрмийг кодлох чадвартай. Бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний арга нь Хятад гиперним таамаглалтын өмнөх арга замыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'uz': "Name Ushbu qogʻozdagi hypernymlarni matnlarni chiqarishdan tashqari, biz obʼektlarni saqlash uchun transductiv o'rganish usulini koʻrsatish uchun o'rganamiz. Ular arbitrary tilning xossalari qoidalarini kodlash imkoniyatini qoʻyish mumkin. Mavjud dunyo maʼlumotlar tizimida tajribalarimiz esa bizning usuli Xitoycha hypernym predictions uchun oldingi usullarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tìm các siêu dốc đúng cho các thực thể là thiết yếu cho việc học về taxonomy, loại sang lớp phân loại thực thể mĩ, hiểu các câu hỏi, v. nhờ sự linh hoạt của ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc, nó thách thức xác định các siêu âm trong Trung Quốc một cách chính xác. Thay vì lấy thêm các siêu nữ từ các văn bản, trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp học chuyển động để thiết lập bản đồ từ các thực thể đến các siêu nữ trong không gian này. Nó kết hợp các mô hình rải dự đoán đường tuyến và không tuyến, với khả năng mã hóa các quy định ngôn ngữ ngẫu nhiên. Thí nghiệm trên các tập tin trên thế giới thực chứng minh phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội các phương pháp tiên đoán siêu rung Trung Quốc.', 'bg': 'Намирането на правилните хиперними за единици е от съществено значение за таксономичното обучение, фината категоризация на единиците, разбирането на заявките и т.н. Поради гъвкавостта на китайския език е трудно да се идентифицират хипернимите на китайски точно. Вместо да извличаме хиперними от текстове, в тази статия представяме трансдуктивен подход за учене, който да установи директно картографиране от обекти към хиперними в вграждащото пространство. Той съчетава линейни и нелинейни вграждащи проекционни модели, с капацитета за кодиране на произволни езикови специфични правила. Експерименти с набори от данни от реалния свят илюстрират, че нашият подход надминава предишните методи за прогнозиране на китайски хиперними.', 'nl': "Het vinden van de juiste hyperniemen voor entiteiten is essentieel voor het leren van taxonomie, fijngranige entiteitacategorisering, het begrijpen van query's, enz. Vanwege de flexibiliteit van de Chinese taal is het lastig om hyperniemen in het Chinees nauwkeurig te identificeren. In plaats van hyperniemen uit teksten te extraheren, presenteren we in dit artikel een transductieve leerbenadering om mappings van entiteiten naar hyperniemen direct in de inbeddingsruimte vast te stellen. Het combineert lineaire en niet-lineaire inbeddingsprojectiemodellen, met de capaciteit om willekeurige taalspecifieke regels te coderen. Experimenten met real-world datasets laten zien dat onze aanpak beter presteert dan eerdere methoden voor Chinese hyperniem voorspelling.", 'da': 'At finde de korrekte hypernymer for enheder er afgørende for taxonomi læring, finkornet entitetskategorisering, forespørgselsforklaring osv. På grund af fleksibiliteten i det kinesiske sprog er det udfordrende at identificere hypernymer på kinesisk præcist. I stedet for at udtrække hypernymer fra tekster, præsenterer vi i denne artikel en transduktiv læringstilgang til at etablere kortlægninger fra entiteter til hypernymer direkte i indlejringsrummet. Det kombinerer lineære og ikke-lineære indlejringsprojektionsmodeller, med evnen til at kode vilkårlige sprogspecifikke regler. Eksperimenter med virkelige datasæt illustrerer, at vores tilgang overgår tidligere metoder til kinesisk hypernymforudsigelse.', 'hr': 'Pronaći ispravnu hipernimu za entitate je ključno za učenje taksonomije, kategoriju finog zrnca entiteta, ispitivanje razumijevanja itd. Zbog fleksibilnosti kineskog jezika, teško je precizno identificirati hipernimu na kineskom jeziku. Umjesto izvlačenja hipernima iz teksta, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo transduktivni pristup učenja kako bi uspostavili mapiranje od entitata do hipernima direktno u ugrađenom prostoru. Kombinacija linearnih i neolinearnih modela ugrađenja projekcija s kapacitetom kodiranja proizvodnih pravila za jezik. Iskusi na podacima stvarnog svijeta pokazuju da naš pristup iznosi prethodne metode za predviđanje kineskog hipernima.', 'id': 'Mencari hipernim yang tepat untuk entitas adalah penting untuk belajar taksonomi, kategorisasi entitas yang sempurna, pemahaman pertanyaan, dll. Karena fleksibilitas bahasa Cina, sangat sulit untuk mengidentifikasi hipernim dalam bahasa Cina dengan tepat. Rather than extracting hypernyms from texts, in this paper, we present a transductive learning approach to establish mappings from entities to hypernyms in the embedding space directly.  Ini menggabungkan model proyeksi penerbangan linear dan non-linear, dengan kapasitas pengekodan aturan spesifik bahasa arbitrar. Eksperimen pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita melebihi metode sebelumnya untuk prediksi hipernim Cina.', 'ko': '분류 학습, 세립도 실체 분류, 조회 이해 등 분야에서 실체를 위해 정확한 초어를 찾는 것은 반드시 없어서는 안 된다. 중국어 언어의 유연성 때문에 중국어 중의 초어를 정확하게 식별하는 것은 매우 도전적이다.본고에서 우리는 텍스트에서 초의어를 추출하지 않고 삽입된 공간에서 실체에서 초의어로 비추는 전환 학습 방법을 직접 제시했다.그것은 선형과 비선형 삽입 투영 모델을 결합시켜 임의의 언어의 특정한 규칙을 인코딩하는 능력을 가지고 있다.실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 이전의 중국어 초어 예측 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن هیپرنیم\u200cهای درست برای شرکت\u200cها برای یادگیری تاکسونومی، تقسیم شرکت\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای، درک پرسیدن، و غیر از آن است. به دلیل flexibility of the Chinese language, it is difficult to identify hypernyms in Chinese accurately. به جای استخراج هیپرنیم از متن، در این کاغذ، یک روش یادگیری ترجمه را برای ایجاد نقشه\u200cهای از متن\u200cها به هیپرنیم\u200cها در فضا مستقیما نشان می\u200cدهیم. با توانایی قانون\u200cهای مخصوص زبان\u200cهای مخصوص قانون رمزبندی، مدل\u200cهای پیکربندی خطی و غیرخطی را ترکیب می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما روش\u200cهای قبلی برای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای هیپرنیم چین بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'de': 'Die richtigen Hypernyme f羹r Entit瓣ten zu finden, ist unerl瓣sslich f羹r Taxonomie-Lernen, feingranulare Entit瓣tenkategorisierung, Abfrageverstehen usw. Aufgrund der Flexibilit瓣t der chinesischen Sprache ist es schwierig, Hypernyme im Chinesischen genau zu identifizieren. Anstatt Hypernyme aus Texten zu extrahieren, stellen wir in diesem Beitrag einen transduktiven Lernansatz vor, um Mappings von Entit瓣ten zu Hypernymen direkt im Einbettungsraum zu etablieren. Es kombiniert lineare und nichtlineare Einbettungsmodelle mit der F瓣higkeit, beliebige sprachspezifische Regeln zu kodieren. Experimente an realen Datens瓣tzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz bisherige Methoden f羹r die Vorhersage chinesischer Hypernyme 羹bertrifft.', 'sw': 'Kutafuta vifaa sahihi kwa ajili ya vitu vina umuhimu wa kujifunza kosonoma, kutengeneza vifaa vizuri vizuri, kutafuta uelewa wa lugha ya Kichina, ni changamoto ya kutambua vifaa vya ubora nchini China kwa sahihi. Badala ya kuondoa umeme kutoka kwenye maandishi haya, katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu za kujifunza kwa ajili ya kuanzisha ramani kutoka kwenye vituo vya juu hadi kwenye anga moja kwa moja. Inaunganisha mifano ya miradi yenye msingi na isiyo na msingi, na uwezo wa kuingiza sheria maalum za lugha za kiutaratibu. Majaribio kwenye taarifa za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zinafanya mbinu zilizopita kwa utabiri wa umeme wa China.', 'sq': 'Gjetja e hipernimeve të sakta për njësitë është thelbësore për mësimin e taksonomisë, kategorizimin e njësisë së hollësishme, kuptimin e pyetjeve, etj. Për shkak të fleksibilitetit të gjuhës kineze, është sfiduese për të identifikuar hipernimet në kinez saktësisht. Në vend që të nxjerrim hipernimet nga tekstet, në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë transduktive mësimi për të ngritur harta nga njësitë në hipernimet në hapësirën e përfshirjes drejtpërdrejt. Ajo kombinon modele projektimi linear dhe jo linear të përfshirjes me kapacitetin e kodimit të rregullave arbitrare specifike gjuhës. Eksperimentet në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale tregojnë se qasja jonë është më e lartë se metodat e mëparshme për parashikimin kinez të hipernimeve.', 'af': "Die soek van die korrekte hipernyme vir entiteite is noodsaaklik vir taksonomie leer, fyn-graad entiteitkategorisasie, navraag verstanding, ensfh. Dus die fleksibiliteit van die Sjinese taal, is dit moeilik om hypernyme in Sjinese presies te identifiseer. In plaas van uitpakking van hipernime van tekste, in hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n transduktiewe leer toegang om mappings van entiteite na hipernime te stel in die inbêderspasie direk. Dit kombinieer lineêre en nie- lineêre inbêding projeksie modele met die kapasiteit van kodering arbitrêre taal spesifieke reëls. Eksperimente op werklike wêreld datastelle illustreer dat ons toegang voortgaan vorige metodes vir Sjinese hiperniemvoorskou.", 'hy': 'Հիպերնիմների ճիշտ հիպերնիմների գտնելը կազմակերպությունների համար կարևոր է դասակարգման ուսումնասիրության, նրբագերված կազմակերպությունների կատեգորիզացիայի, հարցերի հասկացության և այլն: Չինաստանի լեզվի ճկունության պատճառով, դժվար է ճշգրիտ ճանա Այս թղթի մեջ հաղորդագրություններից հիպերնիմներ դուրս բերելու փոխարեն մենք ներկայացնում ենք հաղորդագրական ուսուցման մոտեցում, որպեսզի ստեղծենք քարտեզագրություններ միավորներից հիպերնիմներին ուղղակի ներգրավված տարածքում: It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules.  Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է չինական հիպերնիմի կանխատեսման նախորդ մեթոդները:', 'bn': 'বিষয়গুলোর জন্য সঠিক হাইপারেনিম খুঁজে বের করার জন্য ট্যাক্সোনোমি শিক্ষার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, সুন্দর গ্রান্তিক বস্তুর বিভাগ, অনুসন্ধান, ইত্যাদি চীনা ভাষার বি Rather than extracting hypernyms from texts, in this paper, we present a transductive learning approach to establish mappings from entities to hypernyms in the embedding space directly.  এটি লাইনিয়ার এবং লাইনিয়ার বিভিন্ন প্রকল্পের মডেলের সাথে একত্রিত করে, যার ক্ষমতা নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার বিশেষ নিয়ম এনকোড কর বাস্তব বিশ্বের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে চীনা হাইপারেনিম ভবিষ্যতের পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি প', 'az': 'İntiqatlar üçün doğru hipernimləri tapmaq taxonomiya öyrənməsi, yaxşı dənələr kategoriyası, query anlama və ya da. Çin dilinin fleksibiliyyətinə görə, həqiqətən Çin dilində hipernimləri tanıtmaq çətindir. Bu kağızda hipernimləri məktublardan çıxartmaqdan əvvəl, məlumatlardan hipernimlərin məlumatlarını düzgün yerə qovuşdurmaq üçün dəyişiklik öyrənmək approach göstəririk. Bu, çətinlikli və çətinlikli olmayan projeksiyon modelləri birləşdirir, sadəcə olaraq dil müəyyən qaydaları kodlama qabiliyyəti ilə. Gerçek dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin nəticəsi Çin hipernim təcrübəsinin əvvəlki metodlarından üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'tr': 'Birlikler üçin dogry hipernymlary tapmak taksow öwrenmesi üçin wajyp däldir, gelin taýýarlama kategoriýasy, soraglama we bölmek üçin. Çin çe diliniň fleksiýatlygyna sebäbi hipernymlary dogry bir şekilde tanamak kynçylykly. Bu kagyzda hipernimleri tekstden çykarmak ýerine, biz bu kagyzda çykyş öwrenmek üçin bir öwrenmek metodyny çykarýarys. Çizgiler Gerçek dünýäde maglumat setirlerinde örän ukyplarymyz Hytaý hipernim öňünden geçen yönlerimizi çykarýar.', 'am': 'የቻይና ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ምክንያት የቻይና ቋንቋ አካባቢነት በቻይና አፍሪሜዎችን በመግለጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Rather than extracting hypernyms from texts, in this paper, we present a transductive learning approach to establish mappings from entities to hypernyms in the embedding space directly.  በአርስታዊ ቋንቋ-specific ሥርዓቶችን ለማቀናቀል ስልጣኑ የቋንቋ እና የመስመር ፕሮጀክት ሞዴላዎችን በመቀላቀል ይለያያል፡፡ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎችን መፈትነታችን የቻይና አፍሪሜን ለመፍትወት የቀድሞውን የቻይና አፍሪም ልማድ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'ca': "Trobar els hipernims correctes per a les entitats és essencial per l'aprenentatge de taxonomia, la categorització d'entitats fins grains, la comprensió de preguntes, etc. Gràcies a la flexibilitat del llenguatge xinès, és difícil identificar els hipernims en xinès de manera exacta. En comptes d'extrair hipernims dels textos, en aquest paper, presentem un enfocament d'aprenentatge transdutiu per establir mapes d'entitats a hipernims directament a l'espai d'incorporació. Combina models linears i no linears de projecció d'incorporació, amb la capacitat de codificar regles arbitràries específices per la llengua. Els experiments en conjunts de dades del món real ilustren que el nostre enfocament supera els mètodes anteriors per a predir hipernim xinès.", 'bs': 'Pronaći ispravnu hipernimu za entitate je ključno za učenje taksonomije, kategoriju finog zrnca entiteta, ispitivanje razumijevanja itd. Zbog fleksibilnosti kineskog jezika, teško je identificirati hipernimu na kineskom jeziku tačno. Umjesto izvlačenja hipernima iz teksta, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo transduktivni pristup učenja kako bi uspostavili mapiranje od entitata do hipernima direktno u ugrađenom prostoru. Kombinacija linearnih i ne-linearnih modela ugrađenja projekcija s kapacitetom kodiranja arbitrarnih pravila specifičnih jezika. Eksperimenti na podacima realnog svijeta pokazuju da naš pristup iznosi prethodne metode za predviđanje kineskog hipernuma.', 'et': 'Õigete hüpernüümide leidmine üksustele on oluline taksonoomilise õppimise, täpse olemi kategoriseerimise, päringute mõistmise jne. Hiina keele paindlikkuse tõttu on hiina keeles hüpernüümide täpne tuvastamine keeruline. Selle asemel, et ekstraheerida tekstidest hüpernüüme, esitame selles töös transduktiivse õppimise lähenemisviisi, et luua üksustest hüpernüümideni kaardistamine manustamisruumis otse. See ühendab lineaarsed ja mittelineaarsed põimitud projektsioonimudelid võimega kodeerida suvalisi keelespetsiifilisi reegleid. Eksperimentid reaalmaailma andmekogumitega näitavad, et meie lähenemine ületab varasemaid Hiina hüpernüümide ennustamise meetodeid.', 'fi': 'Oikeiden hypernyymien löytäminen entiteeteille on välttämätöntä taksonomian oppimiselle, hienojakoiselle entiteettiluokittelulle, kyselyjen ymmärtämiselle jne. Kiinan kielen joustavuuden vuoksi hypernyymien tunnistaminen kiinaksi on haastavaa. Teksteistä hypernyymien poimimisen sijaan tässä artikkelissa esitellään transduktiivinen oppimismenetelmä, jolla muodostetaan yhdistelmiä entiteeteistä hypernyymiin upotustilassa suoraan. Siinä yhdistyvät lineaariset ja epälineaariset upotusprojisointimallit ja kyky koodata mielivaltaisia kielikohtaisia sääntöjä. Reaalimaailman aineistoilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme ylittää aiemmat kiinalaisten hypernyymien ennustamismenetelmät.', 'cs': 'Nalezení správných hypernymů pro entity je nezbytné pro výuku taxonomie, jemnou kategorizaci entit, porozumění dotazům atd. Vzhledem k flexibilitě čínského jazyka je náročné identifikovat hypernymy v čínštině přesně. Namísto extrahování hypernymů z textů, v tomto článku prezentujeme transduktivní učební přístup k vytvoření mapování z entit k hypernymům přímo v vloženém prostoru. Kombinuje lineární a nelineární vkládací projekční modely s kapacitou kódování libovolných jazykově specifických pravidel. Experimenty na reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš přístup překonává předchozí metody predikce čínských hypernymů.', 'jv': 'Finding the right Tulung tanggal wipe nggambar wipe nggambar, nggambar iki, kita kedhah basa perusahaan langkung politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Gebudhakan langkung barang dataset sing paling-barang nggarap kuwi dianggawe yakuné nggawe perusahaan kanggo ngerayakno ujian.', 'he': 'מציאת היפרנימות הנכונות עבור יחידות היא חיונית ללמוד טקסנומיה, לקטגוריזציה של יחידות מוגזמות, הבנה של שאלות וכו. בגלל הגמישות של השפה הסינית, זה מאתגר לזהות היפרנימות בצורה מדויקת בסינית. Rather than extracting hypernyms from texts, in this paper, we present a transductive learning approach to establish mappings from entities to hypernyms in the embedding space directly.  הוא משלב דוגמני פרוייקציה לינריים ולא לינריים, עם היכולת לקוד חוקים מיוחדים לשפה. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראים שהגישה שלנו מעלית שיטות קודמות לחזוי היפרנימי סיני.', 'ha': "Idan an gane surori masu inganci wa abubuwa, yana da muhimu wa lõkaci na taksonoma, categorizin abun mai kyau, mai tambaya, da hankali, da misalin harshen China, yana ƙaramata a gane surar da surori masu tsari a cikin China. Babu goge surori daga matsayin, cikin wannan takardan, Munã bãyar da wata hanyor wa da aka sanar da shi ta transducti, dõmin ya daidaita karmapogi daga abubuwa zuwa Hyperyms cikin filin da ke fitarwa dira. Yana haɗa misãlai masu cikin shirin ayuka da ke cikin kwanan da bã-line, da awon ya kodi da wasu takardar harshe-ƙayyade. Tajarakin da ke kan data masu cikin duniya gaske, yana bayyana cewa hanyoyinmu ta sami hanyoyin zaman da za'a yi wa hisãbin surori na China.", 'sk': 'Iskanje pravilnih hipernimov za subjekte je bistvenega pomena za učenje taksonomije, natančno kategorizacijo subjektov, razumevanje poizvedb itd. Zaradi fleksibilnosti kitajskega jezika je težko natančno prepoznati hipernime v kitajščini. Namesto ekstrakcije hipernimov iz besedil v prispevku predstavljamo transduktivni učni pristop za vzpostavitev preslikav iz entitet v hipernime neposredno v vdelanem prostoru. Združuje linearne in nelinearne modele projekcije z zmogljivostjo kodiranja poljubnih jezikovnih pravil. Eksperimenti na naborih podatkov v realnem svetu kažejo, da naš pristop presega prejšnje metode za napovedovanje kitajskih hipernimov.', 'bo': 'དངོས་པོ་དག་གི་མཐུན་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད། འདིའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་ལས་དབུས་འཚོལ་བའི་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་མཐུན་སྣུམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། It combines linear and non-linear embedding projection models, with the capacity of encoding arbitrary language-specific rules. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་མཐོང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་།'}
{'en': 'A Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture for Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'بنية عصبية مركزية لفهم القراءة', 'pt': 'Uma Arquitetura Neural Centrada em Constituintes para Compreensão de Leitura', 'es': 'Una arquitectura neuronal centrada en los componentes para la comprensión lectora', 'fr': 'Une architecture neuronale centrée sur les constituants pour la compréhension de la lecture', 'ja': '理解を読むための構成要素中心のニューラルアーキテクチャ', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ के लिए एक घटक-केंद्रित तंत्रिका वास्तुकला', 'zh': '所以读解者,以为中心神经架构', 'ru': 'Составно-центрическая нейронная архитектура для понимания чтения', 'ga': 'Ailtireacht Néaránach Comhpháirteach don Léamhthuiscint', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια συστατική-κεντρική νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική για την κατανόηση της ανάγνωσης', 'hu': 'Alkotmányközpontú neurális architektúra az olvasáshoz', 'it': "Un'architettura neurale costituente-centrica per la comprensione della lettura", 'kk': 'Оқу үшін конститунттік- орталық нейралық архитектура', 'lt': 'Sudedamųjų dalių centrinė neurologinė architektūra, skirta supratimui skaityti', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതുക്കം വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു കൌണ്ടിണെന്റിക് നെയുറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കേ', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Arkitettura Newrali Ċentrika-Kostitwenti għall-Qtar tal-Komprensjoni', 'mn': 'Үйлдлийн төвшин мэдрэлийн архитектур унших', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Konstantentna-centrska neuronska arhitektura za čitanje kompresije', 'pl': 'Konstytucyjno-centryczna architektura neuronowa dla zrozumienia czytania', 'ro': 'O arhitectură neurală constituent-centrică pentru înțelegerea citirii', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Constitution-Centre Neural Architecture for Reading Comprehension', 'sv': 'En konstituerande centrerad neural arkitektur för läsförståelse', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کے لئے سائستونٹ-سنٹریک نائرل آرکٹیکٹر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiến trúc thần kinh Constituent-Centric cho Reading Compention', 'bg': 'Конституционно-центрична неврална архитектура за разбиране на четенето', 'da': 'En konstituent-centreret neural arkitektur til læseforståelse', 'nl': 'Een Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture voor het lezen van begrip', 'de': 'Eine konstituent-zentrische neuronale Architektur für Leseverständnis', 'hr': 'Konstantentna-centrična neuronska arhitektura za čitanje kompresije', 'id': 'A Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture for Reading Comprehension', 'ko': '성분 중심의 읽기와 이해 신경 구조', 'fa': 'یک معماری عصبی مصنوعی مرکزی برای خواندن تأثیرات', 'sw': 'Mshindi wa Kikatuni wa Nera kwa ajili ya Kusoma Uwezeshaji', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Ամբողջության ընթերցման համար կառուցվածքային կենտրոնային նյարդային արխեկտուր', 'tr': 'Durumlu okumak üçin Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture', 'sq': 'Një arkitekturë neurone përbërëse-qendrore për leximin e kuptimit', 'bn': 'কেন্দ্রীয় নিউরাল আর্কিকেক্টার পাঠ করার জন্য', 'ca': 'Una arquitectura neuronètrica composta per llegir la comprensió', 'cs': 'Konstituent-centrická neuronová architektura pro čtení porozumění', 'et': 'Kompositsioonikentriline neuroarhitektuur lugemise mõistmiseks', 'az': 'Konstant-Merkezi Nöral Arhitektura oxumaq üçün', 'fi': 'Perustava-keskeinen neuroarkkitehtuuri lukemisen ymmärtämiseen', 'bs': 'Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture for reading Comprehension', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'A Constituent-Centric Neural Architecture for Reading Comprehension', 'sk': 'Ustavno-centrična nevralna arhitektura za razumevanje branja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀློག་འཇུག་ལ་བརྩོན་པ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Reading comprehension (RC), aiming to understand natural texts and answer questions therein, is a challenging task. In this paper, we study the RC problem on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Observing from the training set that most correct answers are centered around constituents in the parse tree, we design a constituent-centric neural architecture where the generation of candidate answers and their representation learning are both based on constituents and guided by the parse tree. Under this architecture, the search space of candidate answers can be greatly reduced without sacrificing the coverage of correct answers and the syntactic, hierarchical and compositional structure among constituents can be well captured, which contributes to better representation learning of the candidate answers. On SQuAD, our method achieves the state of the art performance and the ablation study corroborates the effectiveness of individual modules.', 'ar': 'يعد الفهم القرائي ، الذي يهدف إلى فهم النصوص الطبيعية والإجابة على الأسئلة الواردة فيها ، مهمة صعبة. في هذه الورقة ، ندرس مشكلة RC في مجموعة بيانات الإجابة على الأسئلة في جامعة ستانفورد (SQuAD). بالملاحظة من مجموعة التدريب أن الإجابات الأكثر صحة تتمحور حول المكونات في شجرة التحليل ، نقوم بتصميم بنية عصبية مركزية حيث يعتمد إنشاء إجابات المرشحين وتعلم التمثيل على المكونات وتوجيهها بواسطة شجرة التحليل. في ظل هذه البنية ، يمكن تقليل مساحة البحث لإجابات المرشحين بشكل كبير دون التضحية بتغطية الإجابات الصحيحة ويمكن التقاط البنية النحوية والتسلسل الهرمي والتركيبي جيدًا بين المكونات ، مما يساهم في تحسين تعلم التمثيل لإجابات المرشح. في SQuAD ، تحقق طريقتنا أحدث أداء وتؤكد دراسة الاجتثاث فعالية الوحدات الفردية.', 'pt': 'A compreensão leitora (CR), com o objetivo de compreender textos naturais e responder a questões neles contidas, é uma tarefa desafiadora. Neste artigo, estudamos o problema RC no Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Observando a partir do conjunto de treinamento que a maioria das respostas corretas são centradas em constituintes na árvore de análise, projetamos uma arquitetura neural centrada em constituintes onde a geração de respostas candidatas e seu aprendizado de representação são baseados em constituintes e guiados pela árvore de análise. Sob essa arquitetura, o espaço de busca de respostas candidatas pode ser bastante reduzido sem sacrificar a cobertura de respostas corretas e a estrutura sintática, hierárquica e composicional entre os constituintes pode ser bem capturada, o que contribui para uma melhor aprendizagem da representação das respostas candidatas. No SQuAD, nosso método atinge o desempenho de última geração e o estudo de ablação corrobora a eficácia dos módulos individuais.', 'fr': "La compréhension écrite (RC), qui vise à comprendre des textes naturels et à répondre à des questions qui s'y trouvent, est une tâche ardue. Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème RC sur le jeu de données de réponse aux questions de Stanford (SQuad). En observant à partir de l'ensemble d'apprentissage que la plupart des réponses correctes sont centrées sur les constituants de l'arbre d'analyse, nous concevons une architecture neuronale centrée sur les constituants dans laquelle la génération de réponses candidates et leur apprentissage de représentation sont à la fois basés sur des constituants et guidés par l'arbre d'analyse. Dans cette architecture, l'espace de recherche des réponses candidates peut être considérablement réduit sans sacrifier la couverture des réponses correctes et la structure syntaxique, hiérarchique et compositionnelle entre les constituants peut être bien capturée, ce qui contribue à un meilleur apprentissage de la représentation du candidat réponses. Sur SQuad, notre méthode atteint des performances de pointe et l'étude d'ablation corrobore l'efficacité des modules individuels.", 'es': 'La comprensión lectora (RC), que tiene como objetivo comprender textos naturales y responder preguntas en ellos, es una tarea desafiante. En este artículo, estudiamos el problema de RC en el conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de Stanford (sQuad). Observando en el conjunto de entrenamiento que la mayoría de las respuestas correctas se centran en los componentes del árbol de análisis, diseñamos una arquitectura neuronal centrada en los componentes en la que la generación de respuestas candidatas y su aprendizaje de representación se basan en los componentes y se guían por el árbol de análisis sintáctico. Bajo esta arquitectura, el espacio de búsqueda de las respuestas de los candidatos puede reducirse considerablemente sin sacrificar la cobertura de las respuestas correctas y la estructura sintáctica, jerárquica y compositiva entre los constituyentes puede capturarse bien, lo que contribuye a un mejor aprendizaje de la representación del candidato. respuestas. En sQuad, nuestro método logra un rendimiento de vanguardia y el estudio de ablación corrobora la eficacia de los módulos individuales.', 'ja': '理解力（ RC ）を読み、自然な文章を理解し、その中で質問に答えることを目指すことは、困難な課題です。本稿では，スタンフォード・クエスチョン・アンサーシング・データセット（ SQuAD ）に関するRC問題を研究する．トレーニングセットから、最も正しい答えは構文解析ツリーの構成要素を中心としていることを観察して、我々は、候補の答えの生成とその表現学習が両方とも構成要素に基づいており、構文解析ツリーによって導かれる構成要素中心のニューラルアーキテクチャを設計する。このアーキテクチャの下では、正解のカバレッジを犠牲にすることなく、候補回答の検索空間を大幅に削減することができ、構成要素間の構文的、階層的、および構成的構造をうまく取り込むことができ、候補回答のより良い表現学習に貢献する。SQuADでは、当社の方法は最先端のパフォーマンスを達成し、アブレーション研究は個々のモジュールの有効性を裏付けています。', 'zh': '观(RC)意于自然而答之,一挑战性也。 本文,臣等考斯坦福问答数据集(SQuAD)上RC。 自训练集观至多正对皆以解析树中分为中心,设一以为中心神经架构,其中候选答案之生成及其示学基于解析树。 是架构也,不杀正覆,可以大缩选索间,而可以善获分间之句法,层次结构合之,所以助学选对也。 SQuAD之道,先进之性,烧蚀验模块之有效性。', 'hi': 'समझ (आरसी) पढ़ना, प्राकृतिक ग्रंथों को समझने और उसमें सवालों के जवाब देने का लक्ष्य, एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। इस पेपर में, हम स्टैनफोर्ड प्रश्न उत्तर डेटासेट (SQuAD) पर आर सी समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। प्रशिक्षण सेट से यह देखते हुए कि अधिकांश सही उत्तर पार्स के पेड़ में घटकों के आसपास केंद्रित हैं, हम एक घटक-केंद्रित तंत्रिका वास्तुकला डिजाइन करते हैं जहां उम्मीदवार के उत्तरों की पीढ़ी और उनके प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने दोनों घटकों पर आधारित होते हैं और पार्स के पेड़ द्वारा निर्देशित होते हैं। इस वास्तुकला के तहत, उम्मीदवार के उत्तरों की खोज की जगह को सही उत्तरों के कवरेज का त्याग किए बिना बहुत कम किया जा सकता है और घटकों के बीच वाक्यात्मक, पदानुक्रमित और रचनात्मक संरचना को अच्छी तरह से कब्जा किया जा सकता है, जो उम्मीदवार उत्तरों के बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने में योगदान देता है। SQuAD पर, हमारी विधि कला प्रदर्शन की स्थिति को प्राप्त करती है और एब्लेशन अध्ययन व्यक्तिगत मॉड्यूल की प्रभावशीलता की पुष्टि करता है।', 'ru': 'Понимание прочитанного (RC), направленное на понимание естественных текстов и ответы на вопросы в них, является сложной задачей. В этой статье мы изучаем проблему RC в наборе данных для ответа на Стэнфордский вопрос (SQuAD). Наблюдая из обучающего набора, что большинство правильных ответов сосредоточены вокруг составляющих в дереве синтаксического анализа, мы проектируем компонентно-центрическую нейронную архитектуру, где генерация ответов-кандидатов и их представление обучения основаны как на составляющих, так и на дереве синтаксического анализа. В рамках этой архитектуры пространство поиска ответов кандидатов может быть значительно сокращено без ущерба для охвата правильных ответов, а синтаксическая, иерархическая и композиционная структура среди составляющих может быть хорошо усвоена, что способствует лучшему представлению и изучению ответов кандидатов. На SQuAD, наш метод достигает современного исполнения и исследование абляции подтверждает эффективность отдельных модулей.', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é an léamhthuiscint (RC), a bhfuil sé mar aidhm léi téacsanna nádúrtha a thuiscint agus ceisteanna iontu a fhreagairt. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb RC ar Thacar Sonraí Freagraí Ceist Stanford (SQuAD). Ag tabhairt faoi deara ón sraith oiliúna go bhfuil an chuid is mó de na freagraí cearta dírithe ar na comhábhair sa chrann parsála, déanaimid ailtireacht néarúil comhábhar-lárnach a dhearadh ina bhfuil giniúint freagraí iarrthóra agus a bhfoghlaim ionadaíochta bunaithe ar chomhábhair agus á dtreorú ag an gcrann parsála. Faoin ailtireacht seo, is féidir spás cuardaigh freagraí iarrthóra a laghdú go mór gan clúdach na bhfreagraí cearta a íobairt agus is féidir an struchtúr comhréire, ordlathach agus cumadóireachta i measc na gcomhábhar a ghabháil go maith, rud a chuireann le hionadaíocht níos fearr a fhoghlaim ar fhreagraí na n-iarrthóirí. Ar SQuAD, baineann ár modh an fheidhmíocht úrscothach amach agus comhthacaíonn an staidéar ablation éifeachtacht na modúl aonair.', 'el': 'Η ανάγνωση κατανόησης, με στόχο την κατανόηση φυσικών κειμένων και την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις σε αυτά, είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε το πρόβλημα RC σχετικά με το σύνολο δεδομένων απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις του Στάνφορντ (SQuAD). Παρατηρώντας από το εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο ότι οι περισσότερες σωστές απαντήσεις επικεντρώνονται γύρω από τα συστατικά του δέντρου σχεδιάζουμε μια συστατική-κεντρική νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική όπου η παραγωγή των υποψηφίων απαντήσεων και η εκμάθηση αναπαράστασής τους βασίζονται τόσο σε συστατικά όσο και καθοδηγούνται από το δέντρο ανάλυσης. Υπό αυτή την αρχιτεκτονική, ο χώρος αναζήτησης των υποψηφίων απαντήσεων μπορεί να μειωθεί σημαντικά χωρίς να θυσιάσει την κάλυψη των σωστών απαντήσεων και η συντακτική, ιεραρχική και σύνθετη δομή μεταξύ των συστατικών μπορεί να συλληφθεί καλά, γεγονός που συμβάλλει στην καλύτερη εκμάθηση των υποψηφίων απαντήσεων. Στο SQuAD, η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει την απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και η μελέτη αφαίρεσης επιβεβαιώνει την αποτελεσματικότητα των επιμέρους μονάδων.', 'hu': 'A természetes szövegek megértésére és a benne rejlő kérdések megválaszolására irányuló olvasásértés (RC) kihívást jelentő feladat. Ebben a tanulmányban tanulmányozzuk a Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD) RC problémáját. Figyelembe véve a képzéskészletből, hogy a leghelyesebb válaszok a feldolgozási fa alkotóelemei köré épülnek, kialakítunk egy alkotóelem-központú neurális architektúrát, ahol a jelölt válaszok generálása és reprezentációs tanulása egyaránt alkotóelemeken alapul és a feldolgozási fa vezérli. Ebben az architektúrában a jelöltek válaszainak keresési terét nagymértékben csökkenthetjük anélkül, hogy feláldoznák a helyes válaszok lefedettségét, és jól megragadhatók a szintaktikus, hierarchikus és kompozíciós struktúra a válaszok között, ami hozzájárul a jelöltek válaszainak jobb reprezentációs tanulásához. Az SQUAD módszerünk a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt éri el, és az ablációs tanulmány alátámasztja az egyes modulok hatékonyságát.', 'kk': 'Тәуелді мәтіндерді түсініп, жауап сұрақтарын түсініп, түсініктерді оқу үшін, бұл әсер ететін тапсырма. Бұл қағазда, Станфорд сұрақ жауап беру деректер бағдарламасының (SQuAD) RC мәселесін зерттейміз. Оқыту бағдарламасынан ең дұрыс жауаптарды талдау ағашындағы конституттардың ортасында ортаға қарап, кандидаттардың жауаптарын жасау мен олардың таңдау оқытуының негізінде және талдау ағашының көмегімен байланыстырылатын конституттарды құрамыз Бұл архитектура арқылы, кандидаттардың жауаптарын іздеу кеңістігі дұрыс жауаптарды, синтактикалық, иерархикалық және композициялық құрылғылар арасындағы құрылғыларды жақсы түсіріп алуға болады. Бұл кандидаттардың жауаптарын жақсы түсінікт SQuAD жүйесінде, біздің әдіміміз әртүрлі әрекеттердің күйін жеткізеді, және қосулы зерттеулердің әрбір модульдердің эффективнігін баптайды.', 'it': "La comprensione della lettura (RC), con l'obiettivo di comprendere i testi naturali e rispondere alle domande in essi, è un compito impegnativo. In questo articolo, studiamo il problema RC sul set di dati di risposta alle domande di Stanford (SQUAD). Osservando dal set di formazione che le risposte più corrette sono centrate sui costituenti nell'albero di parse, progettiamo un'architettura neurale costituente-centrica in cui la generazione delle risposte candidate e il loro apprendimento di rappresentazione sono entrambi basati su costituenti e guidati dall'albero di parse. Sotto questa architettura, lo spazio di ricerca delle risposte dei candidati può essere notevolmente ridotto senza sacrificare la copertura delle risposte corrette e la struttura sintattica, gerarchica e compositiva tra i costituenti può essere ben catturata, il che contribuisce a migliorare l'apprendimento della rappresentazione delle risposte dei candidati. Su SQUAD, il nostro metodo raggiunge le prestazioni all'avanguardia e lo studio di ablazione conferma l'efficacia dei singoli moduli.", 'ka': 'პროგრამის კითხვა (RC), საზოგადომის მისამართებელი ნაირადი ტექსტის და საუპასუხი კითხვების შესახებ, არის შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ სტანფორდის კითხვის გადასწავლობის პრობლემა (SQuAD). აღმოჩნეთ განსწავლების შესახებ, რომ უფრო მსგავსი პასუხის კონსტუტენტური ნეიროლური აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც კონდიდენტური პასუხების და მათი განსწავლების შესახებ ორივე კონსტუტენტებზე დაბაზიან და გა ამ აქტიქტურაციაზე, კანდენტების პასუხების ძალიან დამატებული ადგილი შეიძლება უფრო დამატებით, უფრო დამატებით მარტივი პასუხების დამატებით და სინტაქტიური, hiერაქტიური და კომპოზიციური სტრუქტურაციის შესაძლებელ SQuAD-ში, ჩვენი მეტი წარმოდგენა ხელსაწყოთა მუშაობის სწორეობის სწორეობის სწორეობის სწორეობის სწორეობას და სწორეობის სწორეობის სწორეობის ეფ', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ പദാവലികള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാനും അതില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാനും ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതും വായിക്കുന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d RC പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഏറ്റവും ശരിയായ ഉത്തരം പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ ചുറ്റുമുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് പരിശീലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നോക്കുന്നത് നാം ഒരു കോണ്\u200d ഈ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ കീഴില്\u200d, പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികന്\u200dറെ ഉത്തരങ്ങളുടെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d വളരെ കുറവ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്\u200c. ശരിയായ ഉത്തരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളും സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണതയുടെയും ഘടനയുടെയ എസ്ക്വാഡില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കലാകാര്യം പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ തീവ്രവാദ പഠ', 'ms': 'Membaca pemahaman (RC), bertujuan untuk memahami teks semulajadi dan menjawab soalan di dalamnya, adalah tugas yang mencabar. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah RC pada Set Data Penjawapan soalan Stanford (SQuAD). Observing from the training set that most correct answers are centered around constituents in the parse tree, we design a constituent-centric neural architecture where the generation of candidate answers and their representation learning are both based on constituents and guided by the parse tree.  Di bawah arkitektur ini, ruang gelintar jawapan calon boleh dikurangkan jauh tanpa mengorbankan penutupan jawapan yang betul dan struktur sintaktik, hierarkik dan komposisi diantara konstitusi boleh ditangkap dengan baik, yang berkontribusi kepada pembelajaran yang lebih baik tentang jawapan calon. Pada SQuAD, kaedah kami mencapai prestasi seni dan kajian ablasi mengesahkan kegunaan modul individu.', 'mk': 'Reading comprehension (RC), aiming to understand natural texts and answer questions therein, is a challenging task.  Во овој весник, го проучуваме проблемот со РЦ на Стенфордскиот податок за одговори на прашањата (SQuAD). Observing from the training set that most correct answers are centered around constituents in the parse tree, we design a constituent-centric neural architecture where the generation of candidate answers and their representation learning are both based on constituents and guided by the parse tree.  Според оваа архитектура, просторот за пребарување на кандидатските одговори може да биде значително намален без да се жртвува покривањето на правилните одговори и синтактичката, хиерархичката и композициската структура меѓу конститунтите може да биде добро зафатена, што придонесува за подобро претставување на учењето на кандидатските одговори На СКВАД, нашиот метод ја постигнува најдобрата изведба и студијата за аблација ја потврдува ефикасноста на индивидуалните модули.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-qari (RC), li għandu l-għan li jifhem it-testi naturali u jwieġeb mistoqsijiet fih, huwa kompitu ta’ sfida. F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw il-problema tar-RC dwar is-Sett ta’ Dejta dwar it-Tweġibiet għall-Mistoqsijiet ta’ Stanford (SQuAD). L-osservazzjoni mis-sett tat-taħriġ li l-aktar tweġibiet korretti huma ċentrati madwar il-kostitwenti fis-siġra tal-analiżijiet, a ħna niddisinjaw arkitettura newrali ċentrika-kostitwenti fejn il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ tweġibiet kandidati u t-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza tagħhom huma kemm ibbażati fuq kostitwenti kif ukoll iggwidati mis-siġra tal-analiżijiet. Under this architecture, the search space of candidate answers can be greatly reduced without sacrificing the coverage of correct answers and the syntactic, hierarchical and compositional structure among constituents can be well captured, which contributes to better representation learning of the candidate answers.  Fuq l-SQuAD, il-metodu tagħna jikseb l-aktar prestazzjoni avvanzata u l-istudju tal-ablazzjoni jikkorrobora l-effettività tal-moduli individwali.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн бичгийг ойлгох, хариултын асуултуудыг ойлгох зорилго бол хэцүү ажил. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Стэнфорд асуулт асуудлын хариулт өгөгдлийн санг (SQuAD) дээр РК асуудлыг судалж байна. Ихэнх зөв хариулт нь хуваалцах модын загварын эргэн тойронд байдаг гэдгийг судалгааны сургалтын багтаагаар бид загварын төв-төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн архитектур бүтээж байлаа. Тэдгээр загварын хариулт болон тэдний суралцах сургалтын загварын үндсэн, хуваалца Энэ архитектурын доор, захирагчийн хариултуудын хайлтын орон зай нь зөв хариултуудыг зориулахгүй маш багасгаж болно. Харин захирагчийн хариултуудыг илүү ойлгох боломжтой болно. SQuAD-д бидний арга зам урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны байдлыг хүргэж, хүчирхийллийн судалгаа индивидуал модульын үр дүнг баталдаг.', 'pl': 'Czytanie rozumienia (RC), dążące do zrozumienia naturalnych tekstów i odpowiedzi na pytania w nich, jest trudnym zadaniem. W niniejszym artykule badamy problem RC na Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Obserwując z zestawu treningowego, że większość poprawnych odpowiedzi skupia się wokół składników w drzewie parse, projektujemy ukierunkowaną na składniki architekturę neuronową, w której generowanie odpowiedzi kandydatów i uczenie się ich reprezentacji są zarówno oparte na składnikach, jak i kierowane przez drzewo parse. W ramach tej architektury przestrzeń wyszukiwania odpowiedzi kandydatów można znacznie zmniejszyć bez poświęcania zasięgu poprawnych odpowiedzi, a struktura składni, hierarchiczna i kompozycyjna wśród składników może być dobrze uchwycona, co przyczynia się do lepszej nauki reprezentacyjnej odpowiedzi kandydatów. Na SQuAD nasza metoda osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność, a badanie ablacji potwierdza skuteczność poszczególnych modułów.', 'no': 'Lesing av forståelse (RC), målet for å forstå naturlege tekstar og svar på spørsmål, er eit vanskeleg oppgåve. I denne papiret studerer vi RC- problemet på Stanford- spørsmålet svarar på databasen (SQuAD). For å observera frå øvingssettet at dei mest rette svara er sentrert rundt konstitusjonane i tolkingstemmet, design me ein konstitusjonssentralt neuralarkitektur der generasjonen av kandidatsvar og læring av representasjonen sine er både basert på konstitusjonane og hjelpet av tolkingstemmet. Under denne arkitekturen kan søkjeområdet til kandidatsvar bli mykje redusert utan å oftasta dekkeføringa av rette svar og syntaktiske, hierarkiske og komposisjonsstrukturen mellom konstitusjonane, som bidrar til bedre representasjonslæring av kandidatsvara. På SQuAD er metoden vårt oppnådd tilstanden til kunstendigheten og aktiveringsstudien korbedrar effektiviteten av individuelle modular.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea citirii (RC), cu scopul de a înțelege textele naturale și de a răspunde la întrebări în acestea, este o sarcină provocatoare. În această lucrare, studiem problema RC pe Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Observând din setul de instruire că cele mai corecte răspunsuri sunt centrate în jurul constituenților din arborele de parse, proiectăm o arhitectură neurală constituent-centrică în care generarea răspunsurilor candidate și învățarea reprezentării acestora se bazează atât pe constituenți, cât și pe arborele de parse. În cadrul acestei arhitecturi, spațiul de căutare a răspunsurilor candidatului poate fi redus considerabil fără a sacrifica acoperirea răspunsurilor corecte, iar structura sintactică, ierarhică și compozițională dintre constituenți poate fi bine capturată, ceea ce contribuie la o mai bună învățare a reprezentării răspunsurilor candidatului. Pe SQUAD, metoda noastră atinge performanțele de ultimă oră, iar studiul ablației confirmă eficacitatea modulelor individuale.', 'sr': 'Čitanje razumijevanja (RC), cilj razumevanja prirodnih tekstova i odgovora na pitanja u njemu, je izazovan zadatak. U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem RC na Stanford pitanju odgovarajući podacima (SQuAD). Gledajući iz set a obuke da su najispravniji odgovori usredsređeni oko sastavnika u drvetu za analizu, mi dizajniramo konstitucionalnu neuralnu arhitekturu gde su generacija odgovora kandidata i njihova učenje zasnovana na sastavnicima i vodjena od drveta za analizu. Pod ovim arhitekturom, mesto pretraživanja odgovora kandidata može biti veoma smanjeno bez žrtvovanja pokrivanja ispravnih odgovora i sintaktične, hijerarhičke i kompozicijske strukture među sastavnicima može biti dobro uhvaćene, što doprinosi boljem učenju predstavljanja odgovora kandidata. Na SQuAD-u, naša metoda postiže stanje učinkovitosti umjetnosti i proučavanje ablacije potvrđuje učinkovitost individualnih modula.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය (RC) කියවන්න, ස්වභාවික පාළුවක් තේරුම් ගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න අදහස් කර මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (SQuAD) ගැන RC ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ප්\u200dරධානය සැටියෙන් බලාගෙන ඉන්නේ විශේෂ වර්ගයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්\u200dණාත්මක වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණිත වර්ගයක් වලින මේ සිද්ධාපතිය සඳහා, ප්\u200dරතිශ්න ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණයේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් අඩු වෙන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි, සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ, සිද්ධාපතික, ස SQuAD විදියට, අපේ විදියට විදියට විදියට ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා වි', 'lt': 'Skaitymas supratimu, siekiant suprasti natūralius tekstus ir atsakyti į juose pateiktus klausimus, yra sudėtinga užduotis. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame RC problem ą Stanfordo atsakymų į klausimus duomenų rinkinyje (SQuAD). Atsižvelgdami į mokymo rinkinį, kad tinkamiausi atsakymai yra centruojami apdorojimo medžio sudedamosiose dalyse, mes sukuriame sudedamosios dalies centrinę neurologinę architektūrą, kurioje kandidatų atsakymų generacija ir jų atstovavimo mokymasis yra pagrįsti sudedamosiomis dalimis ir vadovaujami apdorojimo medžiu. Pagal šią architektūrą kandidatų atsakymų paieškos erdvė gali būti gerokai sumažinta nepažeidžiant teisingų atsakymų aprėpties, o sintaksinė, hierarchinė ir sudėtinė sudedamųjų dalių struktūra gali būti gerai apibūdinta, o tai prisideda prie geresnio kandidatų atsakymų mokymosi atstovavimo. SQuAD atveju mūsų metodas pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus, o abliacijos tyrimas patvirtina atskirų modulių veiksmingumą.', 'sv': 'Läsförståelse (RC), som syftar till att förstå naturliga texter och svara på frågor däri, är en utmanande uppgift. I denna uppsats studerar vi RC-problemet på Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Genom att observera från träningsuppsättningen att de mest korrekta svaren är centrerade kring beståndsdelar i parseträdet, utformar vi en komponentcentrerad neural arkitektur där genereringen av kandidatsvar och deras representationslärande både baseras på beståndsdelar och styrs av parseträdet. Under denna arkitektur kan sökutrymmet för kandidatsvar minskas kraftigt utan att offra täckningen av korrekta svar och den syntaktiska, hierarkiska och kompositionella strukturen bland väljarna kan fångas väl, vilket bidrar till bättre representationsinlärning av kandidatsvaren. På SQUAD uppnår vår metod den senaste prestandan och ablationsstudien bekräftar effektiviteten hos enskilda moduler.', 'ta': 'Reading comprehension (RC), aiming to understand natural texts and answer questions therein, is a challenging task.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஸ்டான்போர்ட் கேள்வி தகவல் அமைப்பில் RC பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம். பயிற்சி அமைப்பிலிருந்து பார்க்கும் பெரும்பாலான சரியான பதில்கள் பார்ச் மரத்தில் உள்ள தலைப்புகளை சுற்றி மையமாக இருக்கிறது, நாம் ஒரு நிறுவனமான மையமான புதிய உருவாக்கம இந்த உருவாக்கத்திற்கு கீழே தேடும் விடைகளின் தேடுதல் இடத்தை மிகவும் குறைக்கப்படும் சரியான விடைகள் மற்றும் நிறுவனங்களில் இருந்து சரியான விடைகள் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு, ஹையரியல் மற SQuAD-ல், எங்கள் முறைமை கலை செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையை பெறுகிறது மற்றும் எழுத்தும் படிப்பாடு தனிப்பட்ட கூறுகளின் விளைவை ஒப', 'so': "Waxbarashada aasaasiga ah (RC), oo la jeedo in la fahamo qoraalada asalka ah iyo in lagu jawaabo su'aalaha dhexdiisa, waa shaqa dhibaataysan. Warqadan waxan ka baranaynaa dhibaatada RC ee ku saabsan su'aalaha Stanford (SQuAD). Markaan ka fiirinaynaa qoraalka waxbarashada in jawaabaha saxda ah ay ku kooban yihiin guryaha baarlamaanka, waxaynu qoraynaa dhismaha neurada ee baarlamaanka, taas oo ah qarniga jawaabaha kandidada iyo waxbarashadooda lagu barto waxay ku saleysan yihiin dooriyayaasha oo lagu hagayo geedka baarlamaanka. Waxyaabahan hoostooda waxaa lagu qabsan karaa goobta raadinta jawaabaha candidaha si weyn looga dhigi karo iyadoon bixinayn daboolka jawaabaha saxda ah iyo dhismaha sameynta, hierarchical iyo dhismaha kooxaha ee doorashada dhexdooda ah, taasoo ka qayb qaadan kara barbaarinta suurtagalka. SQuAD waxaa ku qoran qaababkayaga uu gaadhaa xaalada sameynta farshaxanka iyo waxbarashada kordhiska ayaa sameynaya waxyaabaha qalabka gaarka ah.", 'ur': 'عقل پڑھنے کا مطابق (RC) ہے، جو طبیعی پیغام سمجھنے اور اس میں سوال جواب دینے کا مطابق ہے، ایک مشکل کام ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے استنفورد سؤال کے سوال جواب دیٹاتس (SQuAD) پر RC مسئلہ کی پڑھی۔ تدریس سٹ سے دیکھتے ہیں کہ بہت سی جواب پارس درخت کے کنٹیوں کے گرد مرکز ہوتے ہیں، ہم ایک سائنسٹ-مرکز نیورال معماری طراحی کرتے ہیں جہاں کاندینٹ جواب اور ان کی نمایش تعلیم دونوں کائنسٹیوں پر بنیاد ہے اور پارس درخت سے راہ دکھاتے ہیں. اس معماری کے نیچے، کاندینٹ جواب کی تلاش کی جگہ بہت کم کر دی جاتی ہے، بغیر اس کے کہ حق جواب کے پورے پورے کو قربانی نہ کرے، اور سائٹیوں کے درمیان سینٹکتیک، حیراتیک اور سائٹیونٹی ساختار کو اچھی طرح پکڑ سکتی ہے، جو کاندینٹ جواب کے بہترین نمونات کی تعلی SQuAD پر، ہمارا طریقہ هنر کی فعالیت کا موقعیت پہنچاتا ہے اور آبلیٹ کی تحقیق شخصی موڈیولوں کی فعالیت کو ثابت کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu yerda tabiiy matnlarni o'rganish va savollarning javob olishni istaysizmi, bu qiyin vazifa. Bu hujjatda Stanford soʻrovi javob berish (SQuAD) haqida RC muammosini o'rganamiz. Tashqi sohasida ko'pchilik toʻgʻri javoblar parcha daraxtdagi ta'minlovchilarga kattalashtirilgan, biz bu tashkilotning markaziy neyrolik architektini yaratib turamiz. Bu yerda candidagi javoblar generasi va ularning taʼminlovchi o'rganishlari икковларининг сайловчилари ва парламент дарахти томонидан ҳидоят қилинган. Bu arxituvda, qidiruvchi javoblarni qidirish natijalari to ʻgʻri javoblarni olib tashlash mumkin, va taʼminlovchi, hierarchik va kompyuterning mualliflarini ajratish mumkin. Bu mualliflar javoblarni o'rganish imkoniyatini yaxshi ko'payishi mumkin. SQuAD'da, bu usulning San'atning holatini amalga oshirish va ishlash muvaffaqiyatlarini bir xil modulning effektini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Đọc to àn bộ các văn bản tự nhiên và trả lời câu hỏi ở đó là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề RC về câu hỏi của Stanford (SCOAD). Quan sát từ bộ huấn luyện rằng những câu trả lời đúng nhất được tập trung quanh các thành phần của cây phân, chúng tôi thiết kế một kiến trúc thần kinh phân động, nơi sản xuất các câu trả lời ứng cử viên và học đại diện của họ dựa trên các cử tri và dẫn dắt bởi cây phân. Dưới kiến trúc này, không gian tìm kiếm các câu trả lời ứng cử viên có thể bị giảm đáng kể mà không cần phải hy sinh sự bao quát các câu trả lời đúng. Cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc. Về SCOAD, phương pháp của chúng tôi đạt được trình độ nghệ thuật hiện đại và nghiên cứu có phép xác nhận hiệu quả của mô-đun cá nhân.', 'bg': 'Разбирането за четене (РК), целящо се да разбере естествените текстове и да отговори на въпроси в тях, е предизвикателна задача. В настоящата статия изследваме проблема с РК на Станфордския набор от данни за отговор на въпроси (SQuAD). Наблюдавайки от тренировъчния набор, че най-правилните отговори са съсредоточени около съставните елементи в дървото за анализ, ние проектираме съставно-центрична невронна архитектура, където генерирането на отговорите на кандидатите и тяхното обучение за представяне се основават на съставните елементи и се ръководят от дървото за анализ. При тази архитектура пространството за търсене на отговори на кандидатите може да бъде значително намалено, без да се жертва покритието на правилните отговори и синтактичната, йерархична и композиционна структура между съставните елементи може да бъде добре уловена, което допринася за по-добро представяне на отговорите на кандидатите. При метода ни постига най-съвременните резултати, а аблационното изследване потвърждава ефективността на отделните модули.', 'nl': 'Begrijpen lezen (RC), gericht op het begrijpen van natuurlijke teksten en het beantwoorden van vragen daarin, is een uitdagende taak. In dit artikel bestuderen we het RC probleem op de Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Gezien de trainingsset dat de meeste correcte antwoorden zijn gecentreerd rond onderdelen in de parse-boom, ontwerpen we een constitution-centric neurale architectuur waarbij het genereren van kandidaat-antwoorden en hun representatie leren zowel gebaseerd zijn op constitutions als geleid worden door de parse-boom. Onder deze architectuur kan de zoekruimte van kandidaat-antwoorden sterk worden verminderd zonder de dekking van correcte antwoorden op te offeren en kan de syntactische, hiërarchische en compositionele structuur tussen de componenten goed worden vastgelegd, wat bijdraagt aan een betere representatie van de kandidaat-antwoorden. Op SQuAD bereikt onze methode de state of the art prestaties en het ablatieonderzoek bevestigt de effectiviteit van individuele modules.', 'hr': 'Čitanje razumijevanja (RC), cilj razumijevanja prirodnih tekstova i odgovora na pitanja u njemu, je izazovan zadatak. U ovom papiru proučavamo problem RC-a na Stanford pitanju odgovornog podataka (SQuAD). Gledajući iz set a obuke da su najispravniji odgovori usredotočeni oko sastavnika u prazničnom drvetu, dizajniramo konstitucionalnu neuralnu arhitekturu gdje su generacija odgovora kandidata i njihova učenje zasnovana na sastavnicima i vodjena od drveta praznika. Pod ovim arhitekturom, potražnja prostora odgovora kandidata može biti veoma smanjena bez žrtvovanja pokrivanja ispravnih odgovora i sintaktičke, hijerarhičke i kompozicijske strukture između sastavnika može biti dobro uhvaćena, što doprinosi boljem učenju zastupanja odgovora kandidata. Na SQuAD-u, naša metoda postiže stanje učinkovitosti umjetnosti i proučavanje ablacije potvrđuje učinkovitost pojedinačnih modula.', 'da': 'Læseforståelse (RC), der sigter mod at forstå naturlige tekster og besvare spørgsmål deri, er en udfordrende opgave. I denne artikel studerer vi RC-problemet på Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Ved at observere fra træningssættet, at de mest korrekte svar er centreret omkring bestanddele i parsetræet, designer vi en bestanddelecentreret neural arkitektur, hvor genereringen af kandidater svar og deres repræsentationslæring både er baseret på bestanddele og styret af parsetræet. Under denne arkitektur kan søgerummet af kandidatsvar reduceres betydeligt uden at ofre dækningen af korrekte svar, og den syntaktiske, hierarkiske og kompositionelle struktur blandt vælgerne kan fanges godt, hvilket bidrager til bedre repræsentationslæring af kandidatsvarene. På SQUAD opnår vores metode den nyeste ydeevne, og ablationsundersøgelsen bekræfter effektiviteten af de enkelte moduler.', 'de': 'Leseverstehen (RC), das darauf abzielt, natürliche Texte zu verstehen und Fragen darin zu beantworten, ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das RC-Problem auf dem Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Aus dem Trainingsset heraus beobachten wir, dass die meisten korrekten Antworten um Komponenten im Parse-Baum zentriert sind. Wir entwerfen eine konstitutionszentrierte neuronale Architektur, in der die Generierung von Kandidatenantworten und deren Repräsentationslernen sowohl auf Konstituenten basieren als auch vom Parse-Baum geleitet werden. Unter dieser Architektur kann der Suchraum von Kandidaten-Antworten stark reduziert werden, ohne die Abdeckung korrekter Antworten zu opfern, und die syntaktische, hierarchische und kompositorische Struktur unter den Komponenten kann gut erfasst werden, was zu einem besseren Darstellungslernen der Kandidaten-Antworten beiträgt. Auf SQuAD erreicht unsere Methode den Stand der Technik und die Ablationsstudie bestätigt die Wirksamkeit einzelner Module.', 'id': 'Membaca pemahaman (RC), bertujuan untuk memahami teks alami dan menjawab pertanyaan di dalamnya, adalah tugas yang menantang. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah RC di Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Melihat dari set pelatihan bahwa jawaban yang paling tepat ditengah di sekitar konstituen di pohon analisis, kami merancang arsitektur saraf konstituen-sentrik di mana generasi jawaban kandidat dan penemuan mereka berdasarkan konstituen dan dipandu oleh pohon analisis. Di bawah arsitektur ini, ruang pencarian jawaban kandidat dapat sangat dikurangi tanpa mengorbankan penutupan jawaban yang benar dan struktur sintaksi, hierarkis dan komposisi diantara konstituen dapat ditangkap dengan baik, yang berkontribusi untuk penemuan yang lebih baik untuk mempelajari jawaban kandidat. Pada SQuAD, metode kita mencapai prestasi seni dan studi ablasi mengkonfirmasi efektivitas modul individu.', 'fa': 'خواندن درک (RC), هدف درک متن طبیعی و جواب سوالات در آن، یک کار سخت است. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل RC را در مورد سؤال پاسخ داده\u200cهای استنفورد (SQuAD) مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. از مجموعه آموزشی که بیشترین جواب درست در اطراف مجموعه\u200cها در درخت پردازی مرکز هستند، ما یک معماری عصبی مغز و مرکز معماری را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که نسل جواب کاندیده\u200cها و یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهندگان آنها هر دو بر اساس مجموعه\u200cها و توسط درخت پردازی راهنمایی می\u200c زیر این معماری، فضای جستجو جواب کاندیده\u200cها می\u200cتواند بسیار کاهش داده شود بدون قربانی از پوشش جواب درست و ساختار ساختار ساختمانی، ساختار ساختمانی و ساختاری بین نماینده\u200cها می\u200cتواند خوب بگیرند، که به یادگیری بهتر از پاسخ\u200cهای کاندیده\u200cها توفیق می\u200cکند. در SQuAD، روش ما به وضعیت فعالیت هنر رسیده است و تحقیقات فعالیت موجودات فردی را ثابت می کند.', 'sw': 'Kusoma msingi (RC), kwa lengo la kuelewa maandishi ya asili na kujibu maswali hayo, ni kazi yenye changamoto. Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma tatizo la RC juu ya swali la Stanford linalojibu data set (SQuAD). Observing from the training set that most correct answers are centered around constituents in the parse tree, we design a constituent-centric neural architecture where the generation of candidate answers and their representation learning are both based on constituents and guided by the parse tree.  Chini ya ujenzi huu, nafasi ya kutafuta majibu ya wagombea inaweza kupunguzwa sana bila kutoa sadaka ya kutoa taarifa za majibu sahihi na muundo wa ushirikiano, hierarchical na ujenzi miongoni mwa wabunge unaweza kuchukuliwa vizuri, ambalo linachangia kuwakilisha zaidi kujifunza majibu ya wagombea. Kwenye SQuAD, mbinu yetu inafanikiwa hali ya utendaji wa sanaa na utafiti wa ubunifu unaonyesha ufanisi wa module binafsi.', 'ko': '읽기와 이해는 자연 텍스트를 이해하고 그 중의 질문에 대답하는 데 도전적인 임무이다.본고에서 우리는 스탠퍼드 문답 데이터 집합의 RC 문제를 연구했다.훈련에서 집중적으로 관찰한 결과 대부분의 정답은 해석 트리의 성분을 중심으로 하고 우리는 성분 중심의 신경 구조를 설계했다. 그 중에서 후보 답안의 생성과 표현 학습은 모두 성분에 기초를 두고 해석 트리가 지도한다.이런 구조에서 정답의 커버율을 희생하지 않는 상황에서 후보 답안의 검색 공간을 크게 줄일 수 있고 성분 간의 문법, 차원과 성분 구조를 잘 포착할 수 있어 후보 답안에 대한 표징 학습에 도움이 된다.팀에서 우리의 방법은 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀고 소식 연구는 각 모듈의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'tr': "D체힊체nme (RC) okamak, tebigy metinleri d체힊체nmek we soraglary d체힊체nmek amalydyr, onu흫 i챌inde n채hili kyn챌ylyk g철reldir. Bu kagyzda biz Stanford soragy jogap bermegi (SQuAD) barada RC meselesini 철wren첵채rdik. Okuw챌y guruldan i흫 dogry jogablar pars agajyny흫 챌evresinde guruldygyny g철zlemek 체챌in biz kandidy흫 jogabyny흫 we olary흫 temsil 철wrenmesi hem constituent-center arhitektury흫 guruldygyny tasarl첵arys. Bu arhitektura g철r채, kandidaty흫 jogabyny흫 체첵tgewleri dogry jogabyny흫 we synaktik, hijerarhi첵a we sammynal strukturasyny흫 체첵tgewini gowy 챌ekmek 체챌in k철mekle힊ip biler. SQuAD'da, sungat eserini흫 durumyny we etkinlik studi첵asynda birn채챌e modulleri흫 etkinli첵etini tassykla첵ar.", 'sq': 'Leximi i kuptimit (RC), që synon të kuptojë tekstet natyrore dhe të përgjigjet pyetjeve në të, është një detyrë e vështirë. Në këtë gazetë, ne studiojmë problemin RC në bazën e të dhënave për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të Stanfordit (SQuAD). Duke vëzhguar nga grupi i trajnimit se përgjigjet më të sakta janë të përqëndruara rreth përbërësve në pemën e analizimit, ne dizajnojmë një arkitekturë nervore përbërëse-qendrore ku gjenerata e përgjigjeve kandidate dhe përfaqësimi i tyre mësimi janë të dy bazuar në përbërëse dhe udhëzuar nga pema e analizimit. Sipas kësaj arkitekture, hapësira e kërkimit e përgjigjeve të kandidatëve mund të reduktohet shumë pa sakrifikuar mbulimin e përgjigjeve të sakta dhe struktura sintaktike, hierarkike dhe kompozitive midis përbërësve mund të kapet mirë, gjë që kontribuon në përfaqësimin më të mirë të mësimit të përgjigjeve të kandidatëve. Në SQuAD, metoda jonë arrin performancën më të mirë dhe studimi i ablacionit vërteton efektshmërinë e moduleve individual ë.', 'af': "Lees verstanding (RC), die doel om natuurlike teks te verstaan en vrae daarin te antwoord, is 'n pragtige taak. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons die RC probleem op die Stanford Vrag Antwoord Dataset (SQuAD). Opkyk van die onderwerp stel dat die mees korrekte antwoordes is in die sentrum rondom konstituents in die verwerking boom, ons ontwerp 'n konstituent-sentrale neurale arkitektuur waar die generasie van kandidate antwoordes en hulle voorwerp onderwerp is beide gebaseer op konstituents en gids deur die verwerking boom. Onder hierdie arkitektuur kan die soektog ruimte van kandidate antwoordes baie verduur word sonder om die dekking van korrekte antwoordes en die sintaktika, hierarkiese en samenskaplike struktuur onder konstitusies goed gevang word, wat bydra tot beter verspreiding leer van die kandidate antwoordes. Op SQuAD, ons metode bereik die staat van die kuns-prestasie en die ablasie-studie corroboreer die effektiviteit van individuele modules.", 'am': 'የፍጥረት ጽሑፎችን እና ጥያቄዎችን ለማስተዋል (RC) አነብብ አዋጅ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ላይ የስቴንፎርድ ጥያቄ ዳታዎችን መለስ እናስተምራለን፡፡ በፓርላው ዛፍ ውስጥ ያሉት እውነተኞች መልሶች በፓርላማ ዛፍ ዙሪያ የሚቆጠሩ እንደሆነ እናየዋለን፣ የፓርላማ ዛፍ የፓርላማ ትውልድ መልስ እና የፓርላማ ዛፍ በመሠረትና በመምረጣቸው የፓርላማ ዛፍ የተመሳሳይ እና ትምህርት እያስተማሩ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም አርካክስቲክ በታች፣ የመረጃ መልስ መፈለጊያውን በሚያሳፍር እና በመረጃ መካከል የተዋጋውን መልስ እና የመረጃ፣ ተድጋፊ እና ሰብስብስብ አካባቢ መሠረት በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በSQuAD ላይ ሥርዓታችን የዐርድ አካባቢ እና የአካባቢ ትምህርት የብሔራዊ ብልሃቶችን አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক লেখাগুলো বুঝতে এবং এর উত্তর প্রশ্নের উদ্দেশ্যে (আরসি) সম্পূর্ণ পাঠ করা হচ্ছে, এটা একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ In this paper, we study the RC problem on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD).  প্রশিক্ষণের সেট থেকে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পার্স গাছের প্রার্থীর প্রজন্ম এবং তাদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভিত্তিতে প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভিত্তিতে প্রার্জ গাছের এই প্রতিষ্ঠানের নীচে প্রার্থীর উত্তরের অনুসন্ধানের স্থান বেশী কমে যাবে সঠিক উত্তরের কাভারেজ এবং ভিন্নুষদের মধ্যে সংস্কৃতিক, হিয়ারার্কিক্যাল এবং সংগঠনের কাঠামোর কাভ এসকুয়াডে আমাদের পদ্ধতি শিল্প প্রদর্শনের অবস্থা অর্জন করে এবং আগুনের গবেষণা ব্যক্তিগত মডিউলের কার্যক্রম সংশোধন করে।', 'az': "T…ôbi…ôtli metinl…ôri anlamaq v…ô soruŇümaq haqqńĪnda cavab verm…ôk, √ßox √ß…ôtin bir iŇüdir. Bu kańüńĪzda, Stanford soruŇüu cavab verm…ôk m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn (SQuAD) RC problemini √∂yr…ônirik. ∆Źn dońüru cavab veril…ôn t…ôhsil qutusundan baxa bil…ôrsiniz ki, ayńĪrma a ńüacńĪnńĪn komponentl…ôrinin …ôtrafńĪnda m…ôclis olan, biz kandidat cavablarńĪnńĪn v…ô onlarńĪn t…ôhsil √∂yr…ônm…ôsi h…ôr ikisinin komponentl…ôrin v…ô ayńĪrma ańüacńĪnńĪn yolu g√∂st…ôril…ôn komponentl…ôrin …ôtrafńĪna dayanńĪlńĪr. Bu arhitekt√ľr altńĪnda, kandidat cavablarńĪnńĪn arama alanńĪ d√ľzg√ľn cavablarńĪn, sintaktik, hiyerarŇüik v…ô kompozisyonel quruluŇülarńĪn √∂rt√ľs√ľn√ľ dańüńĪtmadan √ßox azaldńĪrńĪla bil…ôr, bu da kandidat cavablarńĪnńĪn daha yaxŇüńĪsńĪnńĪ √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ô k√∂m…ôk ed…ôr. SQuAD'da, bizim metodumuz sanat performansńĪnńĪn v…ôziyy…ôtini q…ôbul edir v…ô ablasiya √ßalńĪŇümasńĪ individu modullarńĪn etkinlińüini q…ôbul edir.", 'hy': 'Հասկանալու կարդալը, որի նպատակն է հասկանալ բնական տեքստերը և պատասխանել դրանց հարցերին, դժվար է: In this paper, we study the RC problem on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD).  Հետևելով ուսումնասիրության համակարգից, որ ճիշտ պատասխանները կենտրոնացված են վերլուծության ծառի ընտրողների շուրջ, մենք ստեղծում ենք ընտրական կենտրոնական նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որտեղ թեկնածու պատասխանների սերունդը և նրանց ներկայացման ուսումնասիրությունը հիմնված են ընտրողների վրա և ուղ Այս ճարտարապետության ընթացքում թեկնածու պատասխանների որոնման տարածքը կարող է մեծ նվազեցնել առանց զոհաբերելու ճիշտ պատասխանների ծածկումը, և ընտրողների միջև սինտակտիկ, հիերարխիկ և բաղադրական կառուցվածքը կարող է լավ պատկերվել, ինչը օգնում է թեկնածու պատասխանների ավելի լավ ներկայ ՍՔԱԴ-ի դեպքում մեր մեթոդը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին, և աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրությունը հաստատում է անհատական մոդուլների արդյունավետությունը:', 'bs': 'Čitanje razumijevanja (RC), cilj razumevanja prirodnih tekstova i odgovora na pitanja u njemu, je izazovan zadatak. U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem RC na Stanford pitanju odgovarajući podacima (SQuAD). Gledajući iz set a obuke da su najispravniji odgovori usredotočeni oko sastavnika u analiziranju drveta, mi dizajniramo konstitucionalnu neuralnu arhitekturu gdje su generacija odgovora kandidata i njihova učenje zasnovana na sastavnicima i vodjena od drveta analiziranja. Pod ovim arhitekturom, prostor pretraživanja odgovora kandidata može biti veoma smanjen bez žrtvovanja pokrivanja ispravnih odgovora i sintaktične, hijerarhičke i kompozicionalne strukture između sastavnika može biti dobro uhvaćen, što doprinosi boljem učenju predstavljanja odgovora kandidata. Na SQuAD-u, naša metoda postiže stanje učinkovitosti umjetnosti i proučavanje ablacije potvrđuje učinkovitost pojedinačnih modula.', 'cs': 'Čtení porozumění (RC), jehož cílem je porozumět přirozeným textům a odpovědět na otázky v nich, je náročný úkol. V tomto článku studujeme RC problém na Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Vzhledem k tomu, že většina správných odpovědí je soustředěna kolem složek ve stromu parse, navrhujeme neuronovou architekturu zaměřenou na složky, kde generování kandidátů a jejich reprezentační učení jsou založeny na složkách a řízeny parse stromem. V rámci této architektury lze vyhledávací prostor kandidátských odpovědí výrazně snížit bez obětování pokrytí správných odpovědí a dobře zachytit syntaktickou, hierarchickou a kompoziční strukturu mezi složkami, což přispívá k lepšímu učení se kandidátských odpovědí. Na SQuAD dosahuje naše metoda nejmodernějšího výkonu a ablační studie potvrzuje účinnost jednotlivých modulů.', 'et': 'Looduslike tekstide mõistmine ja nende küsimustele vastamine on keeruline ülesanne. Käesolevas töös uurime RC probleemi Stanfordi küsimustele vastamise andmekogumil (SQuAD). Koolituskomplektist vaadeldes, et kõige õigemad vastused keskenduvad parsimispuu koostisosade ümber, kujundame koostisosakeskse neuraalarhitektuuri, kus kandidaadivastuste genereerimine ja nende representatsiooniõpe põhinevad koostisosadel ja juhinduvad parsimispuust. Selle arhitektuuri kohaselt saab kandidaadi vastuste otsinguruumi oluliselt vähendada, ohverdamata õigete vastuste katvust ning koostisosade süntaktilist, hierarhilist ja kompositsioonilist struktuuri saab hästi haarata, mis aitab kaasa kandidaadi vastuste paremale esindamisele. SQuAD puhul saavutab meie meetod tehnika taseme ja ablatsiooniuuring kinnitab individuaalsete moodulite efektiivsust.', 'ca': "Llegir la comprensió (RC), mirant a entendre els textos naturals i respondre preguntes en ella, és una tasca difícil. En aquest article estudiem el problema de la RC en el SQuAD. Observant del conjunt d'entrenament que les respostes més correctes estan centrades al voltant dels constituents de l'arbre d'analització, dissenyem una arquitectura neural centrada en constituents on la generació de respostes candidates i el seu aprenentatge de representació estan ambdós basats en constituents i guiats per l'arbre d'analització. Sobre aquesta arquitectura, l'espai de cerca de respostes candidates pot ser molt reduït sense sacrificar la cobertura de respostes correctes i l'estructura sinàctica, jeràrquica i composicional entre els constituents pot ser ben capturada, que contribueix a una millor representació d'aprenentatge de les respostes candidates. En SQuAD, el nostre mètode aconsegueix el rendiment més avançat i l'estudi d'ablació corrobora l'eficacia dels móduls individuals.", 'fi': 'Luonnollisten tekstien ymmärtäminen ja niihin vastaaminen on haastava tehtävä. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme RC-ongelmaa Stanford Question Answering Datasetissä (SQuAD). Harjoittelusarjasta huomatessamme, että useimmat oikeat vastaukset keskittyvät jäsennyspuun osatekijöihin, suunnittelemme jäsennyskeskeisen neuroarkkitehtuurin, jossa ehdokasvastausten luominen ja niiden representaatiooppiminen perustuvat sekä osatekijöihin että jäsennyspuun ohjaamana. Tässä arkkitehtuurissa hakijoiden vastausten hakutilaa voidaan vähentää huomattavasti uhraamatta oikeiden vastausten kattavuutta ja osatekijöiden syntaktinen, hierarkkinen ja koostumusrakenne voidaan hyvin vangita, mikä edistää hakijoiden vastausten parempaa esittämistä. SQuAD-menetelmämme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn ja ablaatiotutkimus vahvistaa yksittäisten moduulien tehokkuuden.', 'sk': 'Bralno razumevanje (RC), katerega cilj je razumevanje naravnih besedil in odgovarjanje na vprašanja v njih, je zahtevna naloga. V prispevku preučujemo problem RC na Stanfordskem naboru podatkov za odgovore na vprašanja (SQuAD). Iz nabora treningov opazujemo, da je večina pravilnih odgovorov osredotočenih okoli sestavin v drevesu razčlenjevanja, zato oblikujemo sestavinsko-centrično nevralno arhitekturo, kjer generiranje kandidatnih odgovorov in njihovo učenje reprezentacije temeljita na sestavinah in jih vodi drevo razčlenjevanja. V okviru te arhitekture je mogoče iskalni prostor kandidatov močno zmanjšati brez žrtvovanja pokritosti pravilnih odgovorov, sintaktična, hierarhična in kompozicijska struktura med sestavnimi deli pa je mogoče dobro zajeti, kar prispeva k boljšemu učenju kandidatov odgovorov. Na SQuAD naša metoda dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti, študija ablacije pa potrjuje učinkovitost posameznih modulov.', 'ha': "QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Ga wannan takardan, Munã karanta matar RC a kan tambayar Stanford da ake karɓa wa data set (SQuAD). Ana tsari daga tsarin da aka tsare masu tsari da kuma masu maye maimakon matsayi masu cikin itãcen parse, Munã ƙayyade matsayin neura na tsakanin, inda kizayen masu maye da masĩfar su na danne a danne daga matsayin da kuma aka shiryar da su na itãcen parse. Under wannan arkin, za'a iya ƙara filin tambayar mai kandida bila ya iya kafar da tsarin majibu masu inganci kuma a kãma shi da tsarin mai haƙƙi, hiirarchical da composition na cikin masu matsayi, wanda yana ƙara wa masu ƙaranci da karanta matsayin kandida. On SQuAD, our method achieves the state of the art performance and the ablation study corroborates the effectiveness of individual modules.", 'he': 'קריאת הבנה (RC), המטרה להבין טקסטים טבעיים ולענות על שאלות שם, היא משימה מאתגרת. בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים את בעיית RC על קבוצת נתונים לענות על שאלות סטנפורד (SQuAD). בהבחינה ממערכת האימונים שהתשובות הנכונות ביותר מרוכזות סביב נבחרים בעץ המחקר, אנחנו מעצבים ארכיטקטורה עצבית מרכזית המרכזית תחת הארכיטקטורה הזאת, מרחב החיפוש של תשובות מועמדות יכול להיפחות באופן גדול בלי להקריב את כיסוי התשובות הנכונות והמבנה הסינטקטי, הייררכי והמורכב בין המבוחרים יכול להיתפס היטב, מה שמתרים למציגה טובה יותר ללמוד את התשובות המועמדות. בשיטת SQuAD, השיטה שלנו משיגה את המצב של ההופעה האמנותית והמחקר האבלציה מאשר את היעילות של מודולים בודדים.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, kita mulai perbudhakan CK sak sabanjuré dadi responsantar CK lan kelas nggawe barang STANford Ngawe architecture Nang', 'bo': 'ལྟ་ཀློག་ནི་རྟོགས་པ(RC)ནི་དམིགས ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཁང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྱོགས་སོང་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Observing from the training set that most correct answers are centered around constituents in the parse tree, we design a constituent-centric neural architecture where the generation of candidate answers and their representation learning are both based on constituents and guided by the parse tree. གཙོ་ཅན་གཙོ་བ་འདི་ལ་བཟོ་བརྩོན་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཕར་ཆེན་འབད་བཏུབ་པས། On SQuAD, our method achieves the state of the art performance and the ablation study corroborates the effectiveness of individual modules.'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Distillation for Text Classification', 'ar': 'تقطير متعدد اللغات لتصنيف النص', 'fr': 'Distillation multilingue pour la classification de texte', 'es': 'Destilación multilingüe para clasificación de textos', 'pt': 'Destilação multilíngue para classificação de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のためのクロスリンガル蒸留', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए क्रॉस-भाषी आसवन', 'ru': 'Межъязычная дистилляция для классификации текста', 'zh': '文本分类语升华', 'ga': 'Driogadh Trastheangach le haghaidh Aicmiú Téacs', 'hu': 'Keresztnyelvű desztilláció a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'el': 'Διγλωσσική απόσταξη για ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'it': 'Distillazione multilingue per la classificazione dei testi', 'lt': 'Teksto klasifikavimo tarpkalbinis distiliavimas', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის ძირითადი განსხვავება', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual Distillation for Text Classification', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясының көбейтілік тілдерді шектеу', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'Текст классификацийн давхар хэл', 'ml': 'പദാവലി ക്ലാസ്സിഷനുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ ഡിസ്റ്റിലേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Distillazzjoni translingwistika għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'sr': 'Krozjezička destilacija za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ro': 'Distilare translingvă pentru clasificarea textelor', 'no': 'Krysspråksforstyring for tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Destylacja wielojęzyczna dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'so': 'Qaybinta luuqadaha iskuulka ah', 'si': 'Text Classication', 'ur': 'Text Classification', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig destillation för textklassificering', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான கிராஸ்- மொழியின் திரைவு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chữ quán phân giải chéo nhau', 'da': 'Tværsproget destillation til tekstklassificering', 'bg': 'Междуезична дестилация за класификация на текста', 'nl': 'Meertalige distillatie voor tekstclassificatie', 'hr': 'Krozjezička destilacija za klasifikaciju teksta', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Destillation für die Textklassifizierung', 'id': 'Distillasi saling bahasa untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'ko': '텍스트 분류에 사용되는 다중 언어 추출', 'sw': 'Tofauti ya lugha yenye rangi kwa ajili ya kutangaza maandishi', 'sq': 'Distillimi ndërgjuhësor për klasifikimin e tekstit', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'fa': 'تغییر زبانی برای کلاس متن', 'tr': 'Metin Sözlemek üçin Çapraz Diller', 'bn': 'টেক্সট পরিস্থিতির জন্য ক্রস- ভাষাভাষী ডিস্টিলেশন', 'az': 'Metin Klasifikasiyası üçün çoxlu dil ayrılış', 'bs': 'Krozjezička destilacija za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Destillació translingüística per a la classificació del text', 'cs': 'Destilace mezi jazyky pro klasifikaci textu', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälinen tislaus tekstiluokittelua varten', 'et': 'Keeleülene destillatsioon teksti klassifitseerimiseks', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Medjezična destilacija za klasifikacijo besedila', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་སྡེར་རིམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་Cross-lingual Distillation for Text Classification'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual text classification(CLTC) is the task of classifying documents written in different languages into the same taxonomy of categories. This paper presents a novel approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression. Using soft probabilistic predictions for the documents in a label-rich language as the (induced) supervisory labels in a parallel corpus of documents, we train classifiers successfully for new languages in which labeled training data are not available. An adversarial feature adaptation technique is also applied during the model training to reduce distribution mismatch. We conducted experiments on two benchmark CLTC datasets, treating English as the source language and German, French, Japan and Chinese as the unlabeled target languages. The proposed approach had the advantageous or comparable performance of the other state-of-art methods.', 'pt': 'A classificação de texto em vários idiomas (CLTC) é a tarefa de classificar documentos escritos em diferentes idiomas na mesma taxonomia de categorias. Este artigo apresenta uma nova abordagem para CLTC que se baseia na destilação de modelos, que adapta e estende uma estrutura originalmente proposta para compressão de modelos. Usando previsões probabilísticas suaves para os documentos em uma linguagem rica em rótulos como os rótulos de supervisão (induzidos) em um corpus paralelo de documentos, treinamos classificadores com sucesso para novas linguagens nas quais dados de treinamento rotulados não estão disponíveis. Uma técnica de adaptação de recursos adversários também é aplicada durante o treinamento do modelo para reduzir a incompatibilidade de distribuição. Realizamos experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados CLTC de referência, tratando o inglês como idioma de origem e alemão, francês, Japão e chinês como idiomas de destino não rotulados. A abordagem proposta teve o desempenho vantajoso ou comparável dos outros métodos do estado da arte.', 'es': 'La clasificación de textos en varios idiomas (CLTC) es la tarea de clasificar los documentos escritos en diferentes idiomas en la misma taxonomía de categorías. Este artículo presenta un enfoque novedoso de CLTC que se basa en la destilación de modelos, que adapta y amplía un marco propuesto originalmente para la compresión del modelo. Utilizando predicciones probabilísticas blandas para los documentos en un lenguaje rico en etiquetas como etiquetas de supervisión (inducidas) en un corpus paralelo de documentos, capacitamos a los clasificadores con éxito para nuevos idiomas en los que los datos de capacitación etiquetados no están disponibles. También se aplica una técnica de adaptación de características contradictorias durante el entrenamiento del modelo para reducir el desajuste de distribución. Realizamos experimentos en dos conjuntos de datos CLTC de referencia, en los que se trataba el inglés como idioma de origen y el alemán, el francés, el Japón y el chino como los idiomas de destino sin etiqueta. El enfoque propuesto tenía el rendimiento ventajoso o comparable de los otros métodos de última generación.', 'ar': 'تصنيف النص عبر اللغات (CLTC) هو مهمة تصنيف المستندات المكتوبة بلغات مختلفة في نفس تصنيف الفئات. تقدم هذه الورقة نهجًا جديدًا لـ CLTC يعتمد على التقطير النموذجي ، والذي يتكيف ويوسع إطارًا مقترحًا في الأصل لضغط النموذج. باستخدام تنبؤات احتمالية ناعمة للمستندات بلغة غنية بالملصقات مثل التسميات الإشرافية (المستحثة) في مجموعة متوازية من المستندات ، نقوم بتدريب المصنفات بنجاح للغات الجديدة التي لا تتوفر بها بيانات التدريب المصنفة. يتم أيضًا تطبيق تقنية تكيف ميزة الخصومة أثناء تدريب النموذج لتقليل عدم تطابق التوزيع. لقد أجرينا تجارب على مجموعتي بيانات CLTC معياريتين ، حيث تعاملنا مع اللغة الإنجليزية كلغة المصدر والألمانية والفرنسية واليابانية والصينية كلغات مستهدفة غير مصنفة. كان للنهج المقترح أداء متميز أو مشابه للطرق الحديثة الأخرى.', 'fr': "La classification de texte multilingue (CLTC) est la tâche de classer les documents écrits dans différentes langues dans la même taxonomie de catégories. Cet article présente une nouvelle approche du CLTC qui s'appuie sur la distillation modèle, qui adapte et étend un cadre initialement proposé pour la compression de modèle. En utilisant des prédictions probabilistes souples pour les documents dans un langage riche en étiquettes comme étiquettes de supervision (induites) dans un corpus parallèle de documents, nous formons les classificateurs avec succès pour les nouvelles langues dans lesquelles les données de formation étiquetées ne sont pas disponibles. Une technique d'adaptation de caractéristiques contradictoires est également appliquée pendant l'entraînement du modèle afin de réduire l'inadéquation de la distribution. Nous avons mené des expériences sur deux ensembles de données de référence CLTC, traitant l'anglais comme langue source et l'allemand, le français, le Japon et le chinois comme langues cibles non étiquetées. L'approche proposée présentait les performances avantageuses ou comparables des autres méthodes de pointe.", 'ja': 'クロスリンガルテキスト分類（ CLTC ）は、異なる言語で書かれた文書を同じカテゴリの分類に分類する作業です。この論文は、モデル圧縮のために最初に提案されたフレームワークを適応させ、拡張するモデル蒸留に基づいたCLTCに対する新規アプローチを提示している。ラベルの豊富な言語での文書のソフトな確率論的予測を、文書の並列コーパスの（誘導された）監督ラベルとして使用して、ラベル付きトレーニングデータが利用できない新しい言語のための分類子を正常にトレーニングします。モデルトレーニングでは、対立機能適応技術も適用され、分布の不一致を減らします。2つのベンチマークCLTCデータセットの実験を行い、英語をソース言語、ドイツ語、フランス語、日本語、中国語をラベル付けされていないターゲット言語として扱った。提案されたアプローチは、他の最先端の方法と同等または有利な性能を有していた。', 'zh': '跨语言文本类者 (CLTC) 将以异言文档同类也。 本文设一种基于模蒸馏CLTC新法,该法改编而广其初压缩之框架。 以丰言之文档概率占为并行档语料库之(诱)监之,成数不可以新言教分类器。 形教之间,宜对抗性特征自适,以省布列不配。 两准CLTC集上实验,视英语为源语,视德语为法语,日语中文为未识。 所议有他最先进之法,或可比性能。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी पाठ वर्गीकरण (सीएलटीसी) विभिन्न भाषाओं में लिखे गए दस्तावेजों को श्रेणियों के समान वर्गीकरण में वर्गीकृत करने का कार्य है। यह पेपर सीएलटीसी के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है जो मॉडल आसवन पर बनाता है, जो मूल रूप से मॉडल संपीड़न के लिए प्रस्तावित एक ढांचे को अनुकूलित और विस्तारित करता है। दस्तावेज़ों के समानांतर कॉर्पस में (प्रेरित) पर्यवेक्षी लेबल के रूप में लेबल-समृद्ध भाषा में दस्तावेज़ों के लिए नरम संभाव्य भविष्यवाणियों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम नई भाषाओं के लिए क्लासिफायर्स को सफलतापूर्वक प्रशिक्षित करते हैं जिसमें लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा उपलब्ध नहीं हैं। वितरण बेमेल को कम करने के लिए मॉडल प्रशिक्षण के दौरान एक प्रतिकूल सुविधा अनुकूलन तकनीक भी लागू की जाती है। हमने दो बेंचमार्क सीएलटीसी डेटासेट पर प्रयोग किए, अंग्रेजी को स्रोत भाषा के रूप में और जर्मन, फ्रेंच, जापान और चीनी को बिना लेबल वाली लक्ष्य भाषाओं के रूप में माना। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण में अन्य अत्याधुनिक तरीकों का लाभप्रद या तुलनीय प्रदर्शन था।', 'ru': 'Межязычная текстовая классификация(CLTC) - это задача классификации документов, написанных на разных языках, в одну и ту же таксономию категорий. В настоящем документе представлен новый подход к CLTC, основанный на дистилляции модели, который адаптирует и расширяет рамки, первоначально предложенные для сжатия модели. Используя мягкие вероятностные прогнозы для документов на языке, богатом этикетками, в качестве (индуцированных) надзорных этикеток в параллельном корпусе документов, мы успешно обучаем классификаторы для новых языков, на которых помеченные обучающие данные недоступны. Метод адаптации сопернических функций также применяется во время обучения модели, чтобы уменьшить несоответствие распределения. Мы провели эксперименты на двух эталонных наборах данных CLTC, рассматривая английский язык в качестве исходного языка, а немецкий, французский, японский и китайский в качестве немеченных целевых языков. Предложенный подход имеет более высокую или сопоставимую эффективность по сравнению с другими современными методами.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le haicmiú téacs tras-teangach (CLTC) doiciméid a scríobhtar i dteangacha éagsúla a rangú sna tacsanomaíocht chéanna de chatagóirí. Cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige nua i láthair maidir le CLTC a thógann ar dhriogadh samhlacha, a chuireann in oiriúint agus a leathnaíonn creat a moladh ar dtús do chomhbhrú samhlacha. Trí úsáid a bhaint as tuar bog dóchúlachta do na doiciméid i dteanga ar mhórán lipéid mar na lipéid mhaoirseachta (spreagtha) i gcorpas comhthreomhar doiciméad, déanaimid oiliúint rathúil ar aicmitheoirí do theangacha nua nach bhfuil sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe ar fáil iontu. Cuirtear teicníocht oiriúnaithe gné sháraíoch i bhfeidhm freisin le linn na hoiliúna múnla chun neamhréir dáileacháin a laghdú. Rinneamar turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc CLTC, ag déileáil leis an mBéarla mar an teanga foinse agus an Ghearmáinis, an Fhraincis, an tSeapáin agus an tSínis mar na sprioctheangacha gan lipéad. Bhí feidhmíocht bhuntáisteach nó inchomparáide ag an gcur chuige molta ag na modhanna eile úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'მრავალური ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია (CLTC) არის განსხვავებული ენაში წერილი დოკუმენტების კლასიფიკაცია ერთი კატეგორიების რაქტონომიში. ეს წიგნი CLTC-ის პრომენტის მიღება, რომელიც მოდელური დისტლიაციის შესაძლებელად დააყენება და გაფართება ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მოდელური კომპრესიის შესაძლებელად მოქმე მარტივი შესაბამისი წარმოდგენების გამოყენება დოკუმენტებისთვის მარტივი ენაში, როგორც დოკუმენტების პარალელური კორპუსში (ინდისტურებული) მარტივი ლაბეტები, ჩვენ სწორად კლასიფიკაცირები ახალი მოდელური განსწავლების განმავლობის განმავლობის განმავლობის განმავლობის შემდეგ განმავლობის განმავლობის განმავლობის ტექნოგია გამოყენება. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტებით გავაკეთეთ CLTC მონაცემების დანაცემებით, ანგლისური სახელი და გერმანეთი, ფრანუსი, იაპონია და ჩინეთი, როგორც არ უ ოპველადანთწრ ოპთლთფაი თმაქვ ოპვეოჲლჲზთრვლნთწ თჱლთფაი თლთ ჟყпоставимый ოპაგთრვლვნრ ნა ეპსდთრვ თჱლთფანთწ მვრჲეთ.', 'el': 'Η διακρατική ταξινόμηση κειμένου (CLTC) είναι το καθήκον της ταξινόμησης εγγράφων γραμμένων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες στην ίδια ταξινομία κατηγοριών. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα προσέγγιση της που βασίζεται στην πρότυπη απόσταξη, η οποία προσαρμόζει και επεκτείνει ένα πλαίσιο που αρχικά προτάθηκε για τη συμπίεση μοντέλου. Χρησιμοποιώντας μαλακές πιθανολογικές προβλέψεις για τα έγγραφα σε μια γλώσσα πλούσια σε ετικέτες ως τις (επαγόμενες) εποπτικές ετικέτες σε ένα παράλληλο σώμα εγγράφων, εκπαιδεύουμε με επιτυχία ταξινομητές για νέες γλώσσες στις οποίες δεν είναι διαθέσιμα δεδομένα κατάρτισης με ετικέτα. Μια τεχνική προσαρμογής αντικρουόμενων χαρακτηριστικών εφαρμόζεται επίσης κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης μοντέλου για τη μείωση της δυσανάλογης κατανομής. Πραγματοποιήσαμε πειράματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, αντιμετωπίζοντας τα αγγλικά ως γλώσσα προέλευσης και τα γερμανικά, τα γαλλικά, την Ιαπωνία και τα κινέζικα ως τις γλώσσες στόχου χωρίς ετικέτα. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση είχε την πλεονεκτική ή συγκρίσιμη απόδοση των άλλων μεθόδων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű szövegosztályozás (CLTC) feladata, hogy a különböző nyelveken írt dokumentumokat ugyanabba a kategóriába sorolják. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a CLTC új megközelítését, amely modelldesztillációra épül, és amely adaptálja és kiterjeszti az eredetileg javasolt modelltömörítési keretet. A címkékben gazdag nyelvű dokumentumokra vonatkozó puha valószínűségi előrejelzéseket használva, mint a párhuzamos dokumentumkorpusz (indukált) felügyeleti címkéit, sikeresen képzünk osztályozókat olyan új nyelvekre, amelyeken a címkézett képzési adatok nem állnak rendelkezésre. A modellképzés során egy ellentétes tulajdonságok adaptációs technikát is alkalmaznak az eloszlási eltérések csökkentése érdekében. Két benchmark CLTC adathalmazon végeztünk kísérleteket, amelyek az angol forrásnyelvet, a németet, a franciát, a japánt és a kínait pedig címke nélküli célnyelvként kezeltük. A javasolt megközelítés a többi korszerű módszer előnyös vagy összehasonlítható teljesítményét biztosította.', 'it': "La classificazione del testo multilingue (CLTC) è il compito di classificare i documenti scritti in lingue diverse nella stessa tassonomia di categorie. Questo articolo presenta un nuovo approccio alla CLTC che si basa sulla distillazione dei modelli, che adatta ed estende un framework originariamente proposto per la compressione dei modelli. Utilizzando previsioni probabilistiche morbide per i documenti in un linguaggio ricco di etichette come etichette di supervisione (indotte) in un corpus parallelo di documenti, formiamo con successo i classificatori per nuove lingue in cui i dati di formazione etichettati non sono disponibili. Una tecnica di adattamento delle caratteristiche avversarie viene applicata anche durante l'allenamento del modello per ridurre il disallineamento della distribuzione. Abbiamo condotto esperimenti su due set di dati CLTC di riferimento, trattando l'inglese come lingua di origine e il tedesco, il francese, il Giappone e il cinese come lingue di destinazione non etichettate. L'approccio proposto ha avuto le prestazioni vantaggiose o comparabili degli altri metodi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Tarpkalbinė teksto klasifikacija (CLTC) yra užduotis klasifikuoti skirtingomis kalbomis rašomus dokumentus į tas pačias kategorijų taksonomijas. This paper presents a novel approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression.  Naudodami lengvas probabilistines dokumentų prognozes etiketėmis turinčia kalba kaip (paskatintas) priežiūros etiketes lygiagrečiame dokumentų rinkinyje, sėkmingai mokome klasifikatorius naujoms kalboms, kuriose nėra pažymėtų mokymo duomenų. Mokymo modeliu metu taip pat taikomas prieštaringų savybių pritaikymo metodas siekiant sumažinti paskirstymo neatitikimą. Atlikome eksperimentus dviejuose CLTC duomenų rinkiniuose, kuriuose anglų kalba yra šaltinis, o vokiečių, prancūzų, Japonijos ir kinų kalbos – nenurodytos tikslinės kalbos. Siūlomas metodas buvo naudingas arba panašus pagal kitus moderniausius metodus.', 'kk': 'Тілді мәтін классификациясы (CLTC) әртүрлі тілдерде жазылған құжаттарды бір санаттардың таксомиясына салу тапсырмасы. Бұл қағаз үлгі дистилациялау үшін құрылған CLTC- ге романдық тәсілді көрсетеді. Бұл құрылғы үлгі компрессиялау үшін негізінде қолданылатын және қосылатын фреймді қосқан. Құжаттардың жарлық тілдегі құжаттар үшін бақылау мүмкіндігін қолданып, құжаттардың параллель корпусындағы (инициализация) басқару жарлықтары ретінде, жаңа тілдер үшін классификацияларын сәтті жеткіземіз, олард Өлестірімсіздігін азайту үшін қарсы мүмкіндіктердің адаптациялау техникасы қолданылады. Біз CLTC деректер қорларының екі бағдарламасында тәжірибелерін жасадық, ағылшын тілі, неміс, француз, Япония және қытайша тілдері белгілі тілдері ретінде тәжірибеле Келтірілген тәсілі басқа әртүрлі әдістердің артықшылық немесе салыстырмалы әдістері болды.', 'mk': 'Кросјазична класификација на текст( CLTC) е задачата за класификација на документи напишани на различни јазици во иста таксономија на категории. Овој документ претставува нов пристап кон КЛТЦ кој се базира на моделна дистилација, која се адаптира и ја проширува рамката првично предложена за моделна компресија. Користејќи меки веројатни предвидувања за документите во јазик богат со етикети како (индуцирани) надзорни етикети во паралелен корпус документи, успешно ги обучуваме класификаторите за нови јазици во кои не се достапни податоци за обука со етикети. Техниката за адаптација на непријателските карактеристики, исто така, се применува за време на моделната обука за намалување на несогласувањето на дистрибуцијата. Ние спроведовме експерименти на две бази на податоци CLTC, третирајќи го англискиот како извор јазик и германскиот, францускиот, јапонскиот и кинескиот јазик како неозначени метни јазици. Предложениот пристап имаше предност или споредлива перформанса на другите најсовремени методи.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi teks saling-bahasa(CLTC) adalah tugas klasifikasi dokumen yang ditulis dalam bahasa berbeza ke dalam taksonomi kategori yang sama. Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan baru kepada CLTC yang membina pada pemampatan model, yang menyesuaikan dan memperluas kerangka yang asalnya diusulkan untuk pemampatan model. Using soft probabilistic predictions for the documents in a label-rich language as the (induced) supervisory labels in a parallel corpus of documents, we train classifiers successfully for new languages in which labeled training data are not available.  Teknik penyesuaian ciri musuh juga dilaksanakan semasa latihan model untuk mengurangi ketidaksepadan distribusi. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data CLTC benchmark, memperlakukan bahasa Inggeris sebagai bahasa sumber dan bahasa Jerman, Perancis, Jepun dan Cina sebagai bahasa sasaran yang tidak ditanda. Pendekatan yang direncanakan mempunyai prestasi yang berguna atau boleh dibandingkan dengan kaedah-kaedah kemajuan lain.', 'ml': '@ info ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്നതിന് മാതൃകയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന സിഎല്\u200dടിസിയിലേക്കുള്ള നോവല്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം കൊടുക്കുന രേഖകളുടെ അളവിലുള്ള രേഖകളില്\u200d മോശമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതിയ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പുതിയ പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലാത്ത പുതിയ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക വിതരണ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കാന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഒരു വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ ഗുണപ്രാ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് സിഎല്\u200dടിസി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തി. ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ, ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ജ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗം മറ്റു രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതികളില്\u200d ഉപകാരമോ തുല്യമായ പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധമോ ഉണ്ടായ', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tat-test translingwi (CLTC) hija l-kompitu li tikklassifika dokumenti miktuba f’lingwi differenti fl-istess tassonomija tal-kategoriji. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta approċċ ġdid għas-CLTC li jibni fuq distillazzjoni tal-mudell, li jadatta u jestendi qafas oriġinarjament propost għall-kompressjoni tal-mudell. Bl-użu ta’ tbassir probabilistiku dgħajjef għad-dokumenti f’lingwa rikka fit-tikketta bħala t-tikketti superviżorji (indutti) f’korp parallel ta’ dokumenti, a ħna nħarrġu l-klassifikaturi b’suċċess għal lingwi ġodda li fihom m’hemmx dejta ta’ taħriġ ittikkettata disponibbli. Matul it-taħriġ mudell tiġi applikata wkoll teknika ta’ adattament ta’ karatteristiċi avversarji biex jitnaqqas id-diskrepanza fid-distribuzzjoni. We conducted experiments on two benchmark CLTC datasets, treating English as the source language and German, French, Japan and Chinese as the unlabeled target languages.  L-approċċ propost kellu prestazzjoni vantaġġuża jew komparabbli tal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati l-oħra.', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн текст хуваалтыг (CLTC) нь өөр хэл дээр бичигдсэн баримтуудыг ижил хэлбэрээр зарцуулах ажил юм. Энэ цаас CLTC-ийн шинэ арга загвар нь загварын сайжруулалт дээр зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ нь загварын сайжруулалт дээр зохион байгуулж, загварын сайжруулалтыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид баримтуудын параллел корпус дахь баримтуудын баян хэлний баримтуудын төлөвлөгөөний таамаглалыг ашиглаж, урсгалын мэдээллийг ашиглаж чадахгүй шинэ хэлний хувьд амжилттай ажилладаг. Дөрвөлжлийн буруу тоглоом бууруулахын тулд загварын дасгал сургалтын үед эсрэг өөрчлөлт дасгал техник ашигладаг. Бид CLTC өгөгдлийн сан дээр хоёр банктайгаар туршилт хийсэн. Англи хэл, Герман, Француз, Япон, Хятад хэлний эх үүсвэртэй хэл гэж үздэг. Өөр урлагийн хувьд хэрэгцээтэй эсвэл харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагаа байсан.', 'no': 'Krysspråk tekstklassifikasjon (CLTC) er oppgåva for å klassifisera dokument skriven i ulike språk i same taksonomie av kategoriar. Denne papiret viser ein novel tilnærming til CLTC som bygger på modelledestilasjon, som tilpassar og utvidar eit rammeverk som først foreslår for komprimering av modellen. Bruk mykt sannsynleg forhåndsvising for dokumenta i eit merkelig språk som det (induserte) supervisorsmerkelappen i eit parallell korpus av dokument, treng vi klassifikatorar suksessfull for nye språk der ikkje er tilgjengelege opplæringsdata. Ein tilpassingsteknikk for adversariske funksjonar vert også brukt under opplæring av modellen for å redusera forskyvingsfeil. Vi har gjennomført eksperimenter på to benchmark CLTC-datasett, som behandler engelsk som kjeldespråk og tysk, fransk, Japon og kinesisk som dei ulike målspråka. Den foreslåde tilnærminga hadde den forbetrige eller sammenlignbare utviklinga av dei andre kunstmetodane.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja tekstu wielojęzycznego (CLTC) polega na klasyfikacji dokumentów pisanych w różnych językach do tej samej taksonomii kategorii. W artykule przedstawiono nowatorskie podejście do CLTC oparte na destylacji modelowej, która adaptuje i rozszerza ramy pierwotnie proponowane do kompresji modelu. Korzystając z miękkich prognoz probabilistycznych dla dokumentów w języku bogatym w etykiety jako (indukowanych) etykiet nadzorczych w równoległym korpusie dokumentów, z powodzeniem szkolimy klasyfikatory dla nowych języków, w których etykietowane dane treningowe nie są dostępne. Podczas treningu modelu stosuje się również technikę adaptacji cech przeciwnych, aby zmniejszyć niedopasowanie dystrybucji. Przeprowadziliśmy eksperymenty na dwóch porównawczych zbiorach danych CLTC, traktując język źródłowy angielski i niemiecki, francuski, japonię i chiński jako nieoznakowane języki docelowe. Proponowane podejście miało korzystne lub porównywalne skuteczności innych najnowocześniejszych metod.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea textelor translingvistice (CLTC) este sarcina de a clasifica documentele scrise în limbi diferite în aceeași taxonomie de categorii. Această lucrare prezintă o abordare nouă a CLTC care se bazează pe distilarea modelului, care adaptează și extinde un cadru propus inițial pentru compresia modelului. Utilizând predicții ușoare probabilistice pentru documente într-o limbă bogată în etichete ca etichete de supraveghere (induse) într-un corpus paralel de documente, instruim clasificatori cu succes pentru noi limbi în care datele de formare etichetate nu sunt disponibile. O tehnică de adaptare a caracteristicilor adversare este, de asemenea, aplicată în timpul instruirii modelului pentru a reduce neconcordanța distribuției. Am efectuat experimente pe două seturi de date CLTC de referință, tratând limba engleză ca limbă sursă și germană, franceză, Japonia și chineză ca limbi țintă fără etichete. Abordarea propusă a avut performanța avantajoasă sau comparabilă a celorlalte metode de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Prejezička klasifikacija teksta (CLTC) je zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta napisanih na različitim jezicima u istu taksonomiju kategorija. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup CLTC-u koji se temelji na destilaciji model a, koji se prilagodi i proširi okvir koji je prvo predložen za kompresiju modela. Koristeći meke verovatnoće predviđanja za dokumente na bogatom jeziku etikete kao (indukovane) etikete nadzora u paralelnom korpusu dokumenta, uspešno treniramo klasifikatore za nove jezike u kojima nisu dostupni podaci o obuci. Takođe se primjenjuje tehnika adaptacije protivnih karakteristika tokom treninga modela za smanjenje nesklade distribucije. Provodili smo eksperimente na dva standardna seta podataka CLTC-a, tretirajući engleski kao izvorni jezik i njemački, francuski, Japanski i kineski kao nepoznate ciljne jezike. Predloženi pristup je imao prednost ili usporednost ostvarenja drugih metoda umjetnosti.', 'so': "Takhasuska qoraalka luuqadaha iskuulka ah(CLTC) waa shaqada ku qoran dukumentiyada oo ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan oo isku mid ah canshuuraha. Qoraalkan wuxuu soo bandhigaa qoraal warqad ku qoran CLTC oo ku dhisaya isbedelka modellka, kaas oo hagaajiya oo sii fidiya firaaqada ugu horeeyay ee loo talo galay hoos dhigista model. Isku isticmaalayaal warqadaha dhakhtarka ah oo macquul ah, sida calaamadaha ilaaliya oo loo baro dukumentiyada oo lambarka ah, waxaan si liibaan ugu tababarinnaa fasaxyada luuqadaha cusub, kuwaas oo aan laga helin macluumaadka waxbarashada la qoray. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu codsadaa teknikada beddelka ee cadaawayaasha ah marka lagu jiro waxbarashada modellka si uu u hoosaysiiyo isbedelka. Waxaan baaritaanka ku sameynay laba koonfureed oo ku qoran CLTC, waxaana afka ingiriisiga looga baahan yahay luqada afka afka Jarmalka, Faraansiis, Japan iyo Shiino sidii luuqadaha aan la aqoon karin. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waxay leeyihiin faa'iido ama isbarbarbaro qaababka kale oo dowladda farshaxanka ah.", 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig textklassificering (CLTC) är uppgiften att klassificera dokument skrivna på olika språk i samma kategoritaxonomi. Denna uppsats presenterar en ny metod för CLTC som bygger på modelldestillation, som anpassar och utökar ett ramverk som ursprungligen föreslagits för modellkomprimering. Med hjälp av mjuka sannolikhetsprognoser för dokumenten på ett etikettrikt språk som (inducerade) tillsynsetiketter i en parallell dokumentsamling utbildar vi klassificerare framgångsrikt för nya språk där märkta utbildningsdata inte finns tillgängliga. Under modellträningen används också en teknik för anpassning av motstridiga egenskaper för att minska spridningsfest. Vi genomförde experiment på två benchmark CLTC datauppsättningar, där vi behandlade engelska som källspråk och tyska, franska, Japan och kinesiska som omärkta målspråk. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet var fördelaktigt eller jämförbart med andra toppmoderna metoder.', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி உரை வகைப்பு (CLTC) என்பது வேறு மொழிகளில் எழுதப்பட்ட ஆவணங்களை வகைப்படுத்தும் வகைப்படுத்தும் வகைப்பட்ட வகைப்புகளின்  @ info மென்னிருப்பு விருப்பப்பட்ட மொழியில் ஆவணங்களுக்கான மென்னிருப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி ஒப்பிட்ட ஆவணங்களின் மேல்கண்காணிப்பு சிட்டிகளை பயிற்சி  விபங்கு பொருத்தத்தை குறைக்கும் போது மாதிரி பயிற்சியில் ஒரு எதிரிய குணங்கள் ஒதுக்கு தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன நாங்கள் இரண்டு பெங்க்மார்க் சிஎல்டிசி தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனைகளை செய்தோம், மூல மொழி மற்றும் ஜெர்மன், பிரெஞ்சு, ஜப்பான், மற்றும் சீ பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் மற்ற நிலையின் கலை முறைகளின் பயனுள்ள அல்லது ஒப்பீடு செயல்பாடு இருந்தது.', 'si': 'වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වලට ලියපු ලිපිනය (CLTC) වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වල ලියපු ලියපු ලිපිනය විශේෂ කර්මය තමයි වර්ගයේ ප මේ පැත්තේ CLTC විදිහට නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරනවා, මොඩේල් විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරනවා, මුලි ලේබුල් විශේෂ භාෂයේ ලේබුල් වල ලේබුල් වල සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පුස් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ලේබුල් විශ්වාසි විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් සැකසුම් තාක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වි අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් CLTC දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් වල පරීක්ෂණා කළා, ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය භාෂා හා ජර්මන්, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්, ජාපාන් හ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තිබුණා අනිත් ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය න', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual text classification(CLTC) is the task of classifying documents written in different languages in the same taxonomy of categories. This paper presents a new approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression. لائبئل ثروت زبان کے لئے نرم احتمال کی پیش بینی کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اس طرح ہم نے لائبئل ثروت کی زبان کے لئے نرم احتمال کی پیش بینی کا استعمال کرتا ہے، جس میں لائبئل کی تربینی ڈیٹا موجود نہیں ہے. ایک مخالف فرصت اضافہ تکنیک بھی موڈل کی تطارین میں بھی لازم کیا جاتا ہے کہ تقسیم غلط مطابق کاٹنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے دو بنچم مارک CLTC ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کی، انگلیسی کو سراسر زبان اور جرمن، فرانسوی، جاپان اور چینی کی نسبت ناپذیر موقع زبان کے طور پر استعمال کیا۔ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا دوسری شرکت کی روش کا فائدہ یا برابر عمل تھا۔', 'uz': 'Name Name @ info: status Name Biz ikkita benchmark CLTC maʼlumotlar tarkibida tizimni bajardik, ingliz tilidagi manba tili va Olmoniyat, Fransuz, Yaponcha va Xitoycha tilida ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan usul boshqa holatning turli usullarning bir foydalanuvchi yoki bir xil foydalanishi mumkin.', 'vi': 'Giao thoa chữ thập ngoại ngữ là nhiệm vụ phân loại tài liệu được viết bằng ngôn ngữ khác nhau vào cùng loại loại. Tờ giấy này cho thấy một cách tiếp cận mới với CLTC, nó dựa trên cách chưng cất mô hình, thích nghi và mở rộng một cơ sở đầu tiên cho mô hình nén. Sử dụng mềm dự đoán xác suất của các tài liệu trong một ngôn ngữ đầy nhãn như nhãn được tạo ra để làm thẻ giám sát trong một tập tài liệu song song, chúng tôi đào tạo người phân loại thành công cho những ngôn ngữ mới mà chưa có tiêu đề. Một kỹ thuật sửa chữa đặc trưng đối thủ cũng được áp dụng trong quá trình đào tạo mô hình để giảm sự trùng khớp phân phối. Chúng tôi đã tiến hành thí nghiệm trên hai tập tin nổi trội của Clyde, đối xử tiếng Anh là ngôn ngữ gốc Đức, Pháp, Nhật và Trung Quốc là ngôn ngữ chưa được bảo mật. Cách tiếp cận đã đề nghị có lợi thế hoặc tương xứng với các phương pháp hiện đại khác.', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual text classification (CLTC) is de taak van het classificeren van documenten geschreven in verschillende talen in dezelfde taxonomie van categorieën. Dit document presenteert een nieuwe benadering van CLTC die voortbouwt op modeldestilletie, die een oorspronkelijk voorgesteld kader voor modelcompressie aanpast en uitbreidt. Met behulp van zachte probabilistische voorspellingen voor de documenten in een label-rijke taal als de (geïnduceerde) supervisory labels in een parallel corpus van documenten, trainen we classificatoren succesvol voor nieuwe talen waarin gelabelde trainingsgegevens niet beschikbaar zijn. Tijdens de modeltraining wordt ook een techniek toegepast om distributiemismatch te verminderen. We hebben experimenten uitgevoerd met twee benchmark CLTC datasets, waarbij Engels als brontaal en Duits, Frans, Japan en Chinees als de niet-gelabelde doeltalen werden behandeld. De voorgestelde aanpak had de gunstige of vergelijkbare prestaties van de andere geavanceerde methoden.', 'da': 'Tværsproget tekstklassifikation (CLTC) er opgaven at klassificere dokumenter skrevet på forskellige sprog i samme kategoritaksonomi. Denne artikel præsenterer en ny tilgang til CLTC, der bygger på modeldestillation, som tilpasser og udvider en ramme oprindeligt foreslået for modelkomprimering. Ved hjælp af bløde sandsynlighedsforudsigelser for dokumenterne på et etiketrigt sprog som de (inducerede) tilsynsmærker i et parallelt korpus af dokumenter, træner vi klassificerere med succes til nye sprog, hvor mærkede træningsdata ikke er tilgængelige. En modstandsdygtig tilpasningsteknik anvendes også under modeltræningen for at reducere fordelingsmismatch. Vi gennemførte forsøg på to benchmark CLTC datasæt, hvor vi behandlede engelsk som kildesprog og tysk, fransk, Japan og kinesisk som ikke-mærkede målsprog. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde havde den fordelagtige eller sammenlignelige ydeevne af de andre avancerede metoder.', 'hr': 'Prejezička klasifikacija teksta (CLTC) je zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta napisanih na različitim jezicima u istu taksonomiju kategorija. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup CLTC-u koji se temelji na destilaciji model a, koji se prilagodi i proširi okvir koji je prvo predložen za kompresiju modela. Koristeći meke verovatnoće predviđanja za dokumente na bogatom jeziku etikete kao (indukovane) etikete nadzora u paralelnom korpusu dokumenta, uspješno treniramo klasifikatore za nove jezike u kojima se nisu dostupni podaci o obuci. Tehnika prilagodbe neprijateljskih karakteristika primjenjuje se i tijekom obrazovanja modela za smanjenje nesklade distribucije. Provodili smo eksperimente na dva standardna seta podataka CLTC-a, tretirajući engleski kao izvorni jezik i njemački, francuski, Japanski i Kineski kao nepoznati ciljni jezici. Predloženi pristup imao je prednost ili usporedbenu učinku drugih metoda umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Междуезичната класификация на текстовете (CLTC) е задачата да класифицира документите, написани на различни езици, в една и съща таксономия от категории. Настоящата статия представя нов подход към CLTC, който се основава на моделна дестилация, която адаптира и разширява първоначално предложената рамка за компресия на модела. Използвайки меки вероятностни прогнози за документите на език, богат на етикети, като (индуцирани) надзорни етикети в паралелен корпус от документи, успешно обучаваме класификатори за нови езици, на които етикетирани данни за обучение не са налични. По време на обучението на модела се прилага и техника за адаптиране на характеристиките на конкуренцията, за да се намали несъответствието на разпределението. Проведохме експерименти върху два еталонни набора от данни, третирайки английския като изходен език и немския, френския, японския и китайския като незабелязаните целеви езици. Предложеният подход има изгодни или сравними резултати от другите съвременни методи.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi teks saling bahasa (CLTC) adalah tugas klasifikasi dokumen yang ditulis dalam bahasa berbeda ke taksonomi kategori yang sama. Kertas ini mempersembahkan pendekatan baru untuk CLTC yang dibangun pada model destilasi, yang menyesuaikan dan memperluas kerangka yang awalnya diusulkan untuk model kompresi. Menggunakan prediksi probabilis lembut untuk dokumen dalam bahasa yang kaya label sebagai label (induksi) pengawas dalam tubuh paralel dokumen, kami melatih klasifikasi dengan sukses untuk bahasa baru di mana data pelatihan yang ditandai tidak tersedia. Sebuah teknik adaptasi fitur musuh juga diaplikasikan selama latihan model untuk mengurangi ketidakcocokan distribusi. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data CLTC benchmark, memperlakukan bahasa Inggris sebagai bahasa sumber dan bahasa Jerman, Perancis, Jepang dan Cina sebagai bahasa sasaran tanpa label. Pendekatan yang diusulkan memiliki prestasi yang berguna atau dibandingkan dari metode-metode terbaik lainnya.', 'de': 'Cross-lingual text classification (CLTC) ist die Aufgabe, Dokumente, die in verschiedenen Sprachen geschrieben wurden, in die gleiche Taxonomie von Kategorien einzuordnen. Dieser Beitrag stellt einen neuartigen Ansatz für CLTC vor, der auf Modelldestillation aufbaut, der ein ursprünglich für die Modellkompression vorgeschlagenes Framework adaptiert und erweitert. Mit weichen probabilistischen Vorhersagen für die Dokumente in einer labelreichen Sprache als die (induzierten) Supervisory Labels in einem parallelen Dokumentenkorpus schulen wir Klassifikatoren erfolgreich für neue Sprachen, in denen beschriftete Trainingsdaten nicht verfügbar sind. Auch während des Modelltrainings wird eine Technik zur Anpassung von kontradiktoriellen Merkmalen angewandt, um Verteilungsabstriche zu reduzieren. Wir führten Experimente an zwei Benchmark-CLTC-Datensätzen durch, wobei Englisch als Ausgangssprache und Deutsch, Französisch, Japan und Chinesisch als nicht gekennzeichnete Zielsprachen behandelt wurden. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz weist die vorteilhafte oder vergleichbare Leistung der anderen hochmodernen Methoden auf.', 'sw': 'Utambazaji wa maandishi ya lugha (CLTC) ni jukumu la kutafsiri nyaraka zilizoandikwa kwa lugha tofauti katika makundi yale yaliyofanana. Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu ya riwaya ya CLTC inayojenga juu ya utofauti wa mifano, ambayo inabadilisha na kueneza mfumo wa msingi unaopendekezwa kwa ajili ya shinikizo la mifano. Kwa kutumia utabiri mwepesi wa utabiri wa nyaraka kwa lugha yenye utajiri kama alama za kufuatilia (zilizotengenezwa) katika viungo vya nyaraka tofauti, tunawafunza wataalamu kwa lugha mpya ambazo taarifa za mafunzo hazipatikani. Teknolojia ya kuboresha upinzani pia inatumika wakati wa mafunzo ya modeli ili kupunguza upinzani wa usambazaji. Tulifanya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za kompyuta za CLTC, kwa kutumia Kiingereza kama lugha ya asili ya Kijerumani, Kifaransa, Japan na Kichina kama lugha zisizoelekezwa. Mchoro huu ulipendekezwa ulikuwa na faida au unaofanana na utendaji wa njia nyingine za sanaa.', 'ko': '다국어 텍스트 분류(CLTC)의 임무는 서로 다른 언어로 작성된 문서를 같은 분류 분류법으로 분류하는 것이다.본고는 모델 증류를 바탕으로 하는 CLTC의 새로운 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 최초로 제기된 모델 압축 프레임워크에 적응하고 확장했다.라벨이 풍부한 언어의 문서에 대해 소프트 확률 예측을 하고 병행 문서 자료 라이브러리의 (유도) 감독 라벨로서 우리는 라벨 트레이닝 데이터가 없는 새로운 언어 트레이닝 분류기를 성공적으로 만들었다.모델 훈련 과정에서 대항적 특징의 자체 적응 기술을 채택하여 분포 불균형을 줄였다.우리는 두 개의 기준 CLTC 데이터 집합에서 영어를 원시 언어로 하고 독일어, 프랑스어, 일본어, 중국어를 표기되지 않은 목표 언어로 하는 실험을 진행했다.제시된 방법은 기타 선진적인 방법의 장점이나 비교 가능한 성능을 가지고 있다.', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i tekstit ndërgjuhësor (CLTC) është detyra e klasifikimit të dokumenteve të shkruara në gjuhë të ndryshme në të njëjtin taksonomi të kategorive. This paper presents a novel approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression.  Duke përdorur parashikime të buta probabiliste për dokumentet në një gjuhë të pasur me etiketa si etiketa mbikqyrëse (të induktuara) në një korpus paralel dokumentesh, ne trajnojmë klasifikuesit me sukses për gjuhë të reja në të cilat nuk janë në dispozicion të dhënat e trajnimit të etiketuar. Një teknikë e përshtatjes së karakteristikave kundërshtare zbatohet gjithashtu gjatë trajnimit të modelit për të reduktuar mospërputhjen e shpërndarjes. Kemi kryer eksperimente në dy baza të dhënash CLTC, duke trajtuar anglishtën si gjuhën e burimit dhe gjuhën gjermane, franceze, japoneze dhe kineze si gjuhën e cila nuk është shënuar. Përqasja e propozuar kishte performancën e dobishme apo të krahasueshme të metodave të tjera të moderne.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ጽሑፍ መግለጫ (CLTC) በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ በአንድ ክፍል ክፍል የተጻፈውን ሰነዱን በመለፍ ማድረግ ነው። This paper presents a novel approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression.  ሰነዱን አቀማመጥ በተለያዩ ሰነድ ኮንፕስቶች ውስጥ (በሀብት) የሳንሱር ምልክቶችን በመስመር (በሀብት ቋንቋ) ለሰነጃዎች የጽሑፍ ትንቢት በመጠቀም፣ ለክፍላፊዎችን በጽሑፍ አዲስ ቋንቋዎች ማስተምር እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ የፊደል ምርጫዎች አቀማመጥ ስህተት በሞዴል ትምህርት ማቀናጃ ውስጥ የተጠቀመ ነው፡፡ በሁለት benchmark CLTC ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን አደረግን፤ እንግሊዘኛ የቋንቋና የጀርመን ቋንቋ፣ ፈረንሳይ፣ ጃፓን እና ቻይኖች ያልታወቀው ቋንቋዎች ናቸው፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት ሌሎቹ የሀገር-አርእስት ሥርዓት ጥቅማዊ ወይም ትክክል ነው፡፡', 'fa': 'کلیسازی متن\u200cهای متن\u200cزبانی (CLTC) وظیفه\u200cای است که در زبان\u200cهای مختلف نوشته شده\u200cاند، کلیسازی کردن سند\u200cهای متن\u200cزبانی به همان تاکسونومی\u200cهای kategoriه است. این کاغذ یک روش نویسی به CLTC نشان می دهد که بر روی متفاوت مدل ساخته می شود، که یک چهارچوب اصلی برای تزریق مدل پیشنهاد می کند و تغییر می دهد. با استفاده از پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای احتمالات نرم برای سند\u200cها در زبان ثروت برچسب به عنوان برچسب\u200cهای کنترل (به عنوان) در یک کورپوس سند\u200cها، ما با موفقیت برچسب\u200cکنندگان را برای زبان\u200cهای جدید آموزش می\u200cکنیم که داده\u200cهای آموزش برچسب در آن دسترسی ندارند. یک تکنیک تغییرات مخالف در طول تمرین مدل برای کاهش تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر توزیع نیز کاربرد می\u200cشود. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای CLTC بررسی کردیم، انگلیسی را به عنوان زبان منبع و آلمان، فرانسوی، ژاپن و چینی درمان می\u200cکردیم، به عنوان زبان هدف نامیده شده. این دستور پیشنهاد، عملکرد مفید یا قابل مقایسه دیگر روش\u200cهای هنری بود.', 'tr': "Çapraz diller metin klasifikasy(CLTC) farklı dillerde ýazylan senedi bir kategoriýada klasifikasy bilen taýýarlamak üçin zady. Bu kagyz modde destilýan nusga üçin CLTC'a taýýarlanan bir nusga görkezýär we nusga örän nusga üçin üýtgeýär. Beýleki dilde senediň üçin ýumusy uly mümkin öngörümlerini (gelişmiş) etiketlerden parallel korpusda, biz klassiflerden täze diller üçin beýleki terjime edip bilmeýäris we bu etiketlerde resim berüvleri bar. Deñişiklikler ýeterliklerini azaltmak üçin nusgala hasaplamak tekniki hem üýtgedilýär. Biz Iňlisçe çeşme dili we Almança, Fransizçe, Ýaponiýa we Hytaý dillerini ýazylmayan maksady dilleri diýip gözleýän iki benchmal setinde турdik. Taýýarlanan ýagdaýyň başga möhüm taýýarlarynyň üstünlikli ýa-da ýakynlaşykly ukyplary bardy.", 'af': "Kruistale teks klasifikasie (CLTC) is die taak van klasifikasie van dokumente geskryf in verskillende tale in dieselfde taksonomie van kategorie. Hierdie papier stel 'n roman toegang aan CLTC wat bou op model destilasie, wat aanpas en uitbrei 'n raamwerk voorgestel voor die model kompresie. Gebruik sagte waarskynlik voorskou vir die dokumente in 'n etiket ryk taal as die (induseerde) supervisory etikette in 'n parallele korpus van dokumente, ons trein klassifiseerders suksesvol vir nuwe tale waarin die etiket opvoer data is nie beskikbaar nie. 'n Teenaardige funksie aanpassing teknike word ook toegewend gedurende die model oefening om verspreiding nie ooreenstemmende te reduseer. Ons het eksperimente gedoen op twee benchmark CLTC datastelle, wat Engels as die bron taal en Duits, Frans, Japans en Sjinees behandel as die ongeabelde doelstaal. Die voorgestelde toegang het die voordeel of vergelykbare effektuur van die ander staat-kunstensmetodes gehad.", 'hy': 'Տեսալեզվի տեքստի դասակարգման (CILT) խնդիրը տարբեր լեզուներով գրված փաստաթղթերի դասակարգման է դասակարգման նույն դասակարգման համար: Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է նոր մոտեցում ԿԼԹԿ-ին, որը հիմնված է մոդելների դիսլիլացիայի վրա, որը հարմարեցնում է և ընդլայնում է մոդելների ճնշումների համար նախկինում առաջարկված շրջանակը: Օգտագործելով փաստաթղթերի համար փափուկ հավանական կանխատեսումներ պիտակներով հարուստ լեզվով, որպես (ինդուկցիոն) վերահսկողական պիտակներ փաստաթղթերի զուգահեռ մարմնի մեջ, մենք հաջողությամբ սովորեցնում ենք դասակարգերին նոր լեզուների համար, որոնց վրա պիտա An adversarial feature adaptation technique is also applied during the model training to reduce distribution mismatch.  Մենք կատարեցինք փորձեր երկու համեմատական համակարգի վրա, որը վերաբերում էր անգլերենը որպես աղբյուր լեզու և գերմանացի, ֆրանսերենի, Ճապոնիայի և չինարենի որպես նպատակային լեզուներ: Առաջարկված մոտեցումը ուներ նախատեսված կամ համեմատական արդյունքներ այլ ամենահետաքրքիր մեթոդների համար:', 'bs': 'Prejezična klasifikacija teksta (CLTC) je zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta napisanih na različitim jezicima u istu taksonomiju kategorija. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup CLTC-u koji se temelji na destilaciji model a, koji se prilagodi i proširi okvir koji je prvo predložen za kompresiju modela. Koristeći meke verovatnoće predviđanja za dokumente na bogatom jeziku etikete kao (indukovane) etikete nadzora u paralelnom korpusu dokumenta, uspješno treniramo klasifikatore za nove jezike u kojima nisu dostupni podaci o obuci. Također se primjenjuje tehnika adaptacije protivnih karakteristika tokom treninga modela za smanjenje nesklade distribucije. Provodili smo eksperimente na dva standardna seta podataka CLTC-a, tretirajući engleski kao izvorni jezik i njemački, francuski, Japanski i kineski kao nepoznate ciljne jezike. Predloženi pristup je imao prednost ili usporednost ostvarenja drugih metoda umjetnosti.', 'ca': "La classificació de textos translingües (CLTC) és la tasca de classificar documents escrits en diferents llengües en la mateixa taxonomia de categories. Aquest paper presenta un nou enfocament al CLTC que es basa en la distillació model, que adapta i estendra un marc proposat inicialment per a la compressió model. Utilitzant prediccions probabilitzats suaus per als documents en una llengua rica en etiquetes com les etiquetes de supervisió (induïdes) en un cos paral·lel de documents, entrenem els classificadors amb èxit per a les noves llengües en les que no estan disponibles dades d'entrenament etiquetades. També s'aplica una tècnica d'adaptació a característiques adversaries durant l'entrenament model per reduir el descomparç de distribució. Hem fet experiments en dos conjunts de dades CLTC, tractant l'anglès com a llengua de font i en alemany, francès, japonès i xinès com a llengua d'objectiu sense marca. L'enfocament proposat tenia l'avantatge o la comparació dels altres mètodes més avantatges.", 'az': 'Çərpdilli metin klasifikasyonu(CLTC) müxtəlif dillərdə yazılmış belələri aynı kategoriya taxonomiyasına dəyişdirməkdir. Bu kağıt modeli destilasyon üzərində inşa edən CLTC üçün yeni bir yol göstərir. Bu, ilk dəfə modeli kompresyon üçün təklif edilən və uzatır. Vəsaların paralel korpus içində (təşkil edilmiş) gözətçi etiketlərinin məlumatlarında məlumatlar üçün yumuşaq mümkün olaraq tədbirləri istifadə edərək, yeni dillər üçün müvəffəqiyyətlə təhsil edirik ki, etiketli təhsil məlumatları faydalanmayacaq. Bölüşünün uyğunlaşmasını azaltmaq üçün modeli təhsil sırasında də istifadə edilir. Biz iki benchmark CLTC veri setlərində imtahana çəkdik, İngilizce dili, Almanca, Fransız, Japon və Çincə dilləri məqsəd dilləri kimi təhsil etdik. Önülləşdirilmiş tərzim digər şəkildə sanat metodlarının faydalı və müqayisədə müvəffəqiyyəti idi.', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষায় লেখা ট্যাক্সোনোমিতে লেখা নথি বিভিন্ন ভাষায় লেখা হয়েছে। এই পত্রিকাটি সিএলটিসির কাছে একটি উপন্যাস উপস্থাপন করেছে যা মডেল বিচ্ছিন্ন করার উপর তৈরি করেছে, যা মডেল প্রস্তাবিত একটি ফ্রেম কাঠামো প্রস Using soft probabilistic predictions for the documents in a label-rich language as the (induced) supervisory labels in a parallel corpus of documents, we train classifiers successfully for new languages in which labeled training data are not available.  মোডেল প্রশিক্ষণের সময় বিরোধী বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রযুক্তি প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে বিতরণ মিল কমানোর জন্য। আমরা দুই বেনকম্যার্ক সিএলটিসি ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করেছি, ইংরেজী সূত্র ভাষা এবং জার্মান, ফরাসি, জাপান এবং চীনা হিসেবে চিকি এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ শিল্প পদ্ধতির সুবিধা অথবা তুলনামূলক প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Klasifikace textů (CLTC) je úkolem klasifikace dokumentů psaných v různých jazycích do stejné taxonomie kategorií. Tento článek představuje nový přístup k CLTC, který staví na modelové destilaci, která adaptuje a rozšiřuje rámec původně navržený pro kompresi modelu. Pomocí měkkých pravděpodobnostních predikcí dokumentů v jazyce bohatém na štítky jako (indukovaných) kontrolních štítků v paralelním korpusu dokumentů úspěšně trénujeme klasifikátory pro nové jazyky, ve kterých nejsou k dispozici označená tréninková data. V průběhu tréninku modelu je také aplikována technika adaptace antiadsoriálních rysů, aby se snížilo rozdělení nesouladu. Provedli jsme experimenty na dvou referenčních datových sadách CLTC, přičemž jako zdrojový jazyk používali angličtinu a němčinu, francouzštinu, Japonsko a čínštinu jako cílové jazyky bez značky. Navrhovaný přístup měl výhodný nebo srovnatelný výkon ostatních nejmodernějších metod.', 'et': 'Keeleülene tekstiklassifikatsioon (CLTC) on eri keeltes kirjutatud dokumentide klassifitseerimine samasse kategooriataksonoomiasse. Käesolevas töös esitatakse CLTC uudne lähenemisviis, mis põhineb mudeli destilleerimisel, mis kohandab ja laiendab algselt mudeli kompressiooni raamistikku. Kasutades pehmeid tõenäosuslikke prognoose dokumentide kohta märgistusrikas keeles (indutseeritud) järelevalvemärgisena paralleelses dokumendikorpuses, koolitame edukalt klassifitseerijaid uute keelte jaoks, milles märgistatud koolitusandmed puuduvad. Mudelikoolituse ajal rakendatakse ka vastastikust funktsiooni kohandamise tehnikat, et vähendada jaotuse ebakõla. Tegime katseid kahe võrdlusaluse CLTC andmekogumiga, käsitledes lähtekeelena inglise keelt ning märgistamata sihtkeelena saksa, prantsuse, Jaapani ja hiina keelt. Kavandatud lähenemisviis oli teiste kaasaegsete meetoditega võrreldav või kasulik.', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälisen tekstiluokituksen (CLTC) tehtävänä on luokitella eri kielillä kirjoitetut asiakirjat samaan luokkien taksonomiaan. Tässä työssä esitellään uusi lähestymistapa CLTC:hen, joka perustuu mallitislaukseen, joka mukauttaa ja laajentaa alun perin ehdotettua mallia puristamiseen. Käyttämällä pehmeitä todennäköisyysennusteita asiakirjoille etikettirikkaalla kielellä (indusoiduina) valvontamerkkeinä rinnakkaisessa asiakirjakorpusessa koulutamme luokittelijoita menestyksekkäästi uusille kielille, joilla etikettiä ei ole saatavilla. Malliharjoittelun aikana käytetään myös vastakkainasettelutekniikkaa jakaantumisen epätasapainon vähentämiseksi. Tutkimme kahta CLTC-vertailuaineistoa, joissa kohdekielinä käytettiin englantia ja saksaa, ranskaa, japania ja kiinaa. Ehdotetulla lähestymistavalla oli muiden viimeisimpien menetelmien edullinen tai vertailukelpoinen suorituskyky.', 'jv': '--strict Gambar iki nambah ngewehi dadi aturan anyar kanggo CLTI sing nggawe Ndeleng dumateng, ingkang nambah lan uga ngewehi andhuk sampek kang sampek iso nggawe model kompresyon. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Global options Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo sampek durung kanggo nggambar barang CLT dataset, iso nggawe Inggris kaya basa sing katêpakan karo Perancis, Perancis, Japon lan Cines kuwi nggo langa sing ora bisa basa. Awak dhéwé nggunakake karo akeh apik dhéwé, ora nggawe ngerasakno karo hal-hal sing diralanggar.', 'sk': 'Medjezična klasifikacija besedila (CLTC) je naloga klasifikacije dokumentov, napisanih v različnih jezikih, v isto taksonomijo kategorij. V prispevku je predstavljen nov pristop k CLTC, ki temelji na modelni destilaciji, ki prilagaja in razširja prvotno predlagani okvir za kompresijo modela. Z uporabo mehkih verjetnostnih napovedi dokumentov v jeziku, bogatem z oznakami, kot (induciranih) nadzornih oznak v vzporednem korpusu dokumentov uspešno usposabljamo klasifikatorje za nove jezike, v katerih označeni podatki o usposabljanju niso na voljo. Med usposabljanjem modela se uporablja tudi tehnika prilagajanja nasprotnih značilnosti za zmanjšanje neskladja porazdelitve. Izvedli smo poskuse na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov CLTC, ki so obravnavali angleščino kot izvorni jezik in nemščino, francoščino, japonsko in kitajščino kot neoznačene ciljne jezike. Predlagani pristop je imel ugodne ali primerljive učinkovitosti drugih najsodobnejših metod.', 'he': 'מסגרת טקסט צלולת שפתיים (CLTC) היא המשימה להקליף מסמכים שנכתבים בשפות שונות לאותה טקסונומיה של הקטגוריות. העבודה הזו מציגה גישה חדשה לקליטס סי.טי.טי.סי שמבונה על הדיסיל מודל, שמסתגל ומאריך מסגרת שהצעה במקור לחיצה מודל. Using soft probabilistic predictions for the documents in a label-rich language as the (induced) supervisory labels in a parallel corpus of documents, we train classifiers successfully for new languages in which labeled training data are not available.  An adversarial feature adaptation technique is also applied during the model training to reduce distribution mismatch.  ביצענו ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים של CLTC, מתייחסים לאנגלית כשפת המקור וגרמנית, צרפתית, יפן וסינית כשפות המטרה ללא סימן. הגישה המוצעת הייתה ביצוע יתרון או שווה של השיטות המאומנות האחרות.', 'ha': "Shirin fasalin matsayin na-linguin (CLTC) aikin mai rarraba takardun da aka rubũta cikin harshen daban-daban zuwa taksonomi na nau'in. Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani matsayi na node zuwa CLTC wanda ke samar da kan rarraba misalin ido, wanda ke daidai da kuma yana shimfiɗa wata firam na farko da aka buƙata wa salon misumarni. Yi amfani da littafan littafi masu yiwun gaba ga takardar takardun cikin wata lugha-tajiri kamar alama masu tsaro (da aka induce) cikin fanel na takardar takardar, za'a ƙididdige fasalin su masu babban rabo wa lingui na daban, wanda ba za'a iya sãmun data na tsarin da aka rubuta. An amfani da kimar adaptori masu motsi na motsi a lokacin da ake amfani da shirin motel dõmin ya ƙara haske ga rabon sharri. Mun sami jarrabãwa biyu a kan data na CLTC, kuma Muka yi abuni da Ingiriya kamar harshen maganar kuma Jarman, Faransiya, Jabaniya da China kamar harshen bango da ba'a yi amfani ba. Tsarin da aka buƙata yana da amfani ko daidai da tsarin wasu shiryoyin-state-art.", 'bo': 'Cross-lingual text classification(CLTC)is the task of classifying documents written in different languages in the same taxonomy of categories. In the same language, you can choose from different languages. This paper presents a novel approach to CLTC that builds on model distillation, which adapts and extends a framework originally proposed for model compression. Using soft probabilistic predictions for the documents in a label-rich language as the (induced) supervisory labels in a parallel corpus of documents, we train classifiers successfully for new languages in which labeled training data are not available. An adversarial feature adaptation technique is also applied during the model training to reduce distribution mismatch. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་རྒྱའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་འཁོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལ་སྔར་སྐྱོང་བ་འདིས་མཐུན་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་གཞན་པས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Understanding and Predicting Empathic Behavior in Counseling Therapy', 'ar': 'فهم وتوقع السلوك التعاطفي في العلاج الإرشادي', 'pt': 'Compreendendo e Prevendo Comportamento Empático na Terapia de Aconselhamento', 'fr': 'Comprendre et prédire le comportement empathique dans le cadre du counseling thérapeutique', 'es': 'Comprensión y predicción del comportamiento empático en la terapia de asesoramiento', 'ja': 'カウンセリング療法における共感行動の理解と予測', 'zh': '解占问治中移情行', 'hi': 'परामर्श चिकित्सा में Empathic व्यवहार को समझना और भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'Понимание и предсказание эмпатического поведения в консультационной терапии', 'ga': 'Iompar Ionbhách i dTeiripe Comhairleoireachta a Thuiscint agus a Thuar', 'ka': 'კონსონსლის ტეპაფიაში გაგრძელება და დაწყვეტილება', 'el': 'Κατανόηση και πρόβλεψη της Συμπαθητικής Συμπεριφοράς στη Συμβουλευτική Θεραπεία', 'hu': 'Empatikus viselkedés megértése és előrejelzése a tanácsadási terápiában', 'it': 'Comprendere e predire il comportamento empatico nella terapia di counseling', 'kk': 'Консультациялау терапиясындағы таңдау және таңдау', 'mk': 'Разбирање и предвидување на емпатско однесување во советувачката терапија', 'ml': 'കൌണ്\u200dസില്\u200d തീറ്റപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവം മനസ്സിലാക്കുകയും പ്രസ്താവിക്കുകയും', 'mt': 'Understanding and Predicting Empathic Behavior in Counseling Therapy', 'mn': 'Зөвлөлтийн эмчилгээ дээр ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг ойлгох, таамаглах', 'no': 'Forstår og forventar empatisk oppførsel i konsollterapija', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie i przewidywanie zachowań empatycznych w terapii doradczej', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea și predicția comportamentului empatic în terapia de consiliere', 'sr': 'Razumevanje i predviđanje empatičkog ponašanja u terapiji savjetovanja', 'lt': 'Empatijos elgesio supratimas ir numatymas konsultacinėje terapijoje', 'si': 'තේරුම් ගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සම්පාතික ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් සංවේදනය විදියට', 'so': 'Waxgarashada iyo u diyaarinta dhaqanka shaqaalaha ee la talinta terabiyada', 'sv': 'Förstå och förutse empatiskt beteende i rådgivning terapi', 'ms': 'Memahami dan Prediksi Perilaku Empatik dalam Terapi Bernasihat', 'ta': 'ஆலோசனை தலைப்பில் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'نصیحت تراپی میں سمجھنے اور پیش بینی کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự hiểu biết và đoán trước hành vi Empathic trong Hướng dẫn tri liệu.', 'nl': 'Empathisch gedrag begrijpen en voorspellen in counselingtherapie', 'bg': 'Разбиране и прогнозиране на емпатичното поведение в консултантската терапия', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje i predviđanje empatičkog ponašanja u terapiji savjetovanja', 'da': 'Forståelse og forudsigelse af empatisk adfærd i rådgivning terapi', 'de': 'Empathisches Verhalten in der Beratungstherapie verstehen und vorhersagen', 'fa': 'درک و پیشنهاد رفتار هماهنگی در درمان مشورت', 'ko': '심리 상담 치료 중 이정 행위의 이해와 예측', 'id': 'Memahami dan memprediksi perilaku empati dalam terapi penasehat', 'sw': 'Kuelewa na Kujiandaa tabia za Kihisia katika Utabiti', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi dhe parashikimi i sjelljes empatike në terapinë këshilluese', 'am': 'ምርመራ ጥናት ውስጥ ማስተውል እና ማዘጋጀት', 'hy': 'Ամպատիկ վարքագիծը խորհրդատվության ոլորտում հասկանալը և կանխատեսելը', 'bn': 'উপদেশ দেয়া থিরাফিকের ব্যাপারে সহায়ক আচরণ বুঝতে এবং প্রস্তুতি প্রদান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje i predviđanje empatičkog ponašanja u terapiji savjetovanja', 'af': 'Verstaan en voorskryf Empatiese Gedrag in Bestuurder Terapie', 'ca': "Entendre i predir el comportament empàtic en terapia d'orientació", 'cs': 'Porozumění a predikce empatického chování v poradenské terapii', 'az': '썄얼쎟溼쥭殙瘠駉琠駉扤物攠浴駉੫', 'fi': 'Empaattisen käyttäytymisen ymmärtäminen ja ennustaminen neuvontaterapiassa', 'et': 'Empaatilise käitumise mõistmine ja prognoosimine nõustamise ravis', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Therapiýasynda düşünmek we Prezenlemek', 'jv': 'Sampeyan karo pawaran Jaringan empati nang pawaran terapii', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'להבין ולצפות התנהגות אמפתית בטיפול ייעוץ', 'sk': 'Razumevanje in napovedovanje empatičnega vedenja v svetovalni terapiji', 'bo': 'བསམ་ཚོད་གླེང་སྡེར་གྱི་སྐོར་རིམ་དང་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནོད་སྤེལ་བྱ་རྒྱུ་དང་'}
{'en': 'Counselor empathy is associated with better outcomes in psychology and behavioral counseling. In this paper, we explore several aspects pertaining to counseling interaction dynamics and their relation to counselor empathy during motivational interviewing encounters. Particularly, we analyze aspects such as participants’ engagement, participants’ verbal and nonverbal accommodation, as well as topics being discussed during the conversation, with the final goal of identifying linguistic and acoustic markers of counselor empathy. We also show how we can use these findings alongside other raw linguistic and acoustic features to build accurate counselor empathy classifiers with accuracies of up to 80 %.', 'ar': 'يرتبط تعاطف المستشار بنتائج أفضل في الاستشارة النفسية والسلوكية. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف العديد من الجوانب المتعلقة بديناميكيات تفاعل الاستشارة وعلاقتها بتعاطف المستشار أثناء لقاءات المقابلات التحفيزية. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بتحليل جوانب مثل مشاركة المشاركين ، والتكيف اللفظي وغير اللفظي للمشاركين ، بالإضافة إلى الموضوعات التي تتم مناقشتها أثناء المحادثة ، مع الهدف النهائي المتمثل في تحديد العلامات اللغوية والصوتية لتعاطف المستشار. نوضح أيضًا كيف يمكننا استخدام هذه النتائج جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات اللغوية والصوتية الأخرى لبناء مصنّفات تعاطف استشارية دقيقة بدقة تصل إلى 80٪.', 'es': 'La empatía del consejero se asocia con mejores resultados en psicología y asesoramiento conductual. En este artículo, exploramos varios aspectos relacionados con la dinámica de interacción del asesoramiento y su relación con la empatía del consejero durante los encuentros de entrevista motivacionales. En particular, analizamos aspectos como la participación de los participantes, la adaptación verbal y no verbal de los participantes, así como los temas que se discuten durante la conversación, con el objetivo final de identificar marcadores lingüísticos y acústicos de la empatía del consejero. También mostramos cómo podemos usar estos hallazgos junto con otras características lingüísticas y acústicas sin procesar para crear clasificadores de empatía de consejeros precisos con una precisión de hasta el 80%.', 'fr': "L'empathie du conseiller est associée à de meilleurs résultats en psychologie et en counseling comportemental. Dans cet article, nous explorons plusieurs aspects relatifs à la dynamique d'interaction du counseling et à leur relation avec l'empathie du conseiller lors des rencontres d'entretien de motivation. En particulier, nous analysons des aspects tels que l'engagement des participants, les accommodements verbaux et non verbaux des participants, ainsi que les sujets abordés au cours de la conversation, dans le but final d'identifier des marqueurs linguistiques et acoustiques de l'empathie du conseiller. Nous montrons également comment nous pouvons utiliser ces résultats avec d'autres caractéristiques linguistiques et acoustiques brutes pour créer des classificateurs d'empathie précis avec une précision allant jusqu'à 80\xa0%.", 'pt': 'A empatia do conselheiro está associada a melhores resultados em psicologia e aconselhamento comportamental. Neste artigo, exploramos vários aspectos relativos à dinâmica de interação de aconselhamento e sua relação com a empatia do conselheiro durante os encontros de entrevista motivacional. Particularmente, analisamos aspectos como engajamento dos participantes, acomodação verbal e não verbal dos participantes, bem como tópicos que estão sendo discutidos durante a conversa, com o objetivo final de identificar marcadores linguísticos e acústicos da empatia do conselheiro. Também mostramos como podemos usar essas descobertas juntamente com outros recursos linguísticos e acústicos brutos para construir classificadores de empatia do conselheiro precisos com precisão de até 80%.', 'ja': 'カウンセラーの共感は、心理学と行動カウンセリングのより良い結果に関連しています。本稿では、カウンセリングの相互作用のダイナミクスと、動機づけ面接の際のカウンセラーの共感との関係に関するいくつかの側面について検討する。特に、参加者のエンゲージメント、参加者の口頭および非口頭の融通、ならびに会話中に議論されているトピックなどの側面を分析し、カウンセラーの共感の言語的および音響的マーカーを特定することを最終目標とします。私たちはまた、これらの知見を他の生の言語学的および音響学的特徴と共に使用して、最大80 ％の精度で正確なカウンセラー共感分類を構築する方法を示します。', 'zh': '咨询师同理心与心理学行相关。 本文之中,讨论咨询互动动态相关者数端,及其动机性面试之际,与咨询师同理心。 论参与者之参与度,参与者口与非言相应,与言语之间论题,最终目标定咨询师同理心之言声学也。 示以所用及原始语言声学特征咨询师移情器,准确率达80%。', 'hi': 'काउंसलर सहानुभूति मनोविज्ञान और व्यवहार परामर्श में बेहतर परिणामों के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है। इस पेपर में, हम परामर्श इंटरैक्शन गतिशीलता और प्रेरक साक्षात्कार मुठभेड़ों के दौरान काउंसलर सहानुभूति के साथ उनके संबंध से संबंधित कई पहलुओं का पता लगाते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम प्रतिभागियों की सगाई, प्रतिभागियों के मौखिक और अशाब्दिक आवास जैसे पहलुओं का विश्लेषण करते हैं, साथ ही साथ बातचीत के दौरान चर्चा किए जाने वाले विषयों का विश्लेषण करते हैं, जिसमें काउंसलर सहानुभूति के भाषाई और ध्वनिक मार्करों की पहचान करने का अंतिम लक्ष्य होता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हम इन निष्कर्षों का उपयोग अन्य कच्चे भाषाई और ध्वनिक विशेषताओं के साथ-साथ 80% तक की सटीकता के साथ सटीक परामर्शदाता सहानुभूति क्लासिफायर बनाने के लिए कैसे कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эмпатия советника связана с лучшими результатами в психологии и поведенческом консультировании. В этой статье мы исследуем несколько аспектов, касающихся динамики взаимодействия консультирования и их связи с эмпатией консультанта во время мотивационных интервью. В частности, мы анализируем такие аспекты, как вовлеченность участников, словесное и невербальное приспособление участников, а также темы, обсуждаемые в ходе беседы, с конечной целью выявления лингвистических и акустических маркеров эмпатии консультанта. Мы также показываем, как мы можем использовать эти результаты наряду с другими необработанными лингвистическими и акустическими особенностями для создания точных классификаторов эмпатии консультантов с точностью до 80%.', 'ga': 'Tá comhbhá idir comhairleoirí bainteach le torthaí níos fearr sa tsíceolaíocht agus sa chomhairleoireacht iompraíochta. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar ghnéithe éagsúla a bhaineann le dinimic idirghníomhaíochta na comhairleoireachta agus an gaol atá acu le comhbhá le comhairleoirí le linn cruinnithe agallaimh inspreagtha. Go háirithe, déanaimid anailís ar ghnéithe mar rannpháirtíocht na rannpháirtithe, lóistín briathartha agus neamhbhriathartha na rannpháirtithe, chomh maith leis na topaicí atá á bplé le linn an chomhrá, agus é mar sprioc deiridh marcóirí teanga agus fuaimiúla comhbhá comhairleora a aithint. Léirímid freisin conas is féidir linn na torthaí seo a úsáid in éineacht le gnéithe amh teanga agus fuaimiúla eile chun aicmitheoirí comhbhá comhairleacha cruinne a thógáil le cruinneas suas le 80%.', 'ka': 'კონსოლური ემპატია კონსოლოგია და ქცევის კონსოლოგიაში უკეთესი შედეგებით დაკავშირებულია. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ რამდენიმე აპექტები, რომელიც კონსტაციის დინამიკის კონსტაცია და მათი კონსტაციის შესახებ კონსტაციისთვის ინტერვისტა განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ასპექტები, როგორც მოთავსდებელების დაკავშირება, მოთავსდებელების გერბალური და ბოგერბალური დაკავშირება, როგორც საუბარისო დროში განსაკუთრებულიან ტემები, როგორც ბოლო მიზეზი იდენ ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ, როგორ შეგვიძლია გამოიყენოთ ეს მონაცემები სხვა ლენგურისტიკური და აკსტიკური ფუნქციების დამატებით, რომ კონსტური კონსტატიკური კლასიფიკაციები', 'hu': 'A tanácsadó empátia jobb eredményekkel jár a pszichológia és a viselkedési tanácsadás terén. Jelen tanulmányban a motivációs interjú találkozások során a tanácsadási interakciós dinamikával és a tanácsadói empátiával való kapcsolatukkal kapcsolatos számos aspektust vizsgálunk. Különösen elemezzük a résztvevők elkötelezettségét, a résztvevők verbális és nonverbális alkalmazkodását, valamint a beszélgetés során megvitatott témákat azzal a céllal, hogy azonosítsuk a tanácsadói empátia nyelvi és akusztikus markereit. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogyan használhatjuk ezeket az eredményeket más nyelvi és akusztikai tulajdonságokkal együtt, hogy pontos tanácsadói empátia osztályozókat építhessünk, akár 80%-os pontossággal.', 'el': 'Η ενσυναίσθηση των συμβούλων συνδέεται με καλύτερα αποτελέσματα στην ψυχολογία και τη συμβουλευτική συμπεριφοράς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε διάφορες πτυχές που σχετίζονται με τη δυναμική της συμβουλευτικής αλληλεπίδρασης και τη σχέση τους με την ενσυναίσθηση του συμβούλου κατά τη διάρκεια συναντήσεων κινήτρων. Ειδικότερα αναλύουμε πτυχές όπως η εμπλοκή των συμμετεχόντων, η λεκτική και μη λεκτική προσαρμογή των συμμετεχόντων, καθώς και θέματα που συζητούνται κατά τη διάρκεια της συζήτησης, με τελικό στόχο τον εντοπισμό γλωσσικών και ακουστικών δεικτών ενσυναίσθησης του συμβούλου. Δείχνουμε επίσης πώς μπορούμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε αυτά τα ευρήματα μαζί με άλλα ακατέργαστα γλωσσικά και ακουστικά χαρακτηριστικά για να χτίσουμε ακριβείς ταξινομητές ενσυναίσθησης συμβούλων με ακρίβεια έως 80%.', 'it': "L'empatia del consulente è associata a risultati migliori in psicologia e consulenza comportamentale. In questo articolo esploriamo diversi aspetti relativi alle dinamiche di interazione del counseling e alla loro relazione con l'empatia del counselor durante incontri motivazionali di intervista. In particolare, analizziamo aspetti come il coinvolgimento dei partecipanti, l'accomodamento verbale e non verbale dei partecipanti, nonché gli argomenti discussi durante la conversazione, con l'obiettivo finale di identificare marcatori linguistici e acustici di empatia da counselor. Mostriamo anche come possiamo utilizzare questi risultati insieme ad altre caratteristiche linguistiche e acustiche grezze per costruire accurati classificatori di empatia dei counselor con accuratezza fino all'80%.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылардың эмпатиясы психология және әрекеттердің консультациясында жақсы нәтижелерімен байланысты. Бұл қағазда, мотивациялық сұхбаттау кезінде бірнеше аспекттерді зерттейміз. Мысалы, біз қатысушылардың қатысушыларының, қатысушылардың вербалды және бевербалды орындалуы секілді аспекттерді анализ етік, және сөйлесу кезінде тақырыпталған мақсаттарды, тілімге және акустикалық маркерлерін анықтау мақсатты. Біз сондай-ақ бұл тапсырмаларды басқа лингвистикалық және акустикалық мүмкіндіктермен қалай пайдалану мүмкіндігін көрсету үшін дұрыс консультордың эмпатиялық классификациясын 80% деп', 'ms': 'Empati peguam berkaitan dengan hasil yang lebih baik dalam psikologi dan nasihat perilaku. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi beberapa aspek yang berkaitan dengan dinamik interaksi penasihat dan hubungan mereka dengan empati penasihat semasa temuduga motivasi. Terutama, kami menganalisis aspek seperti keterlibatan peserta, persediaan kata-kata dan tidak-verbal peserta, serta topik yang dibahas semasa perbualan, dengan tujuan akhir untuk mengenalpasti penanda bahasa dan akustik empati penasihat. Kami juga menunjukkan bagaimana kita boleh menggunakan penemuan ini bersama-sama dengan ciri-ciri bahasa dan akustik mentah lain untuk membina klasifikasi empati penasihat yang tepat dengan ketepatan sehingga 80%.', 'lt': 'Konsultatoriaus empatija siejama su geresniais psichologijos ir elgesio konsultavimo rezultatais. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame keletą aspektų, susijusių su konsultavimo sąveikos dinamika ir jų santykiu su konsultantų empatija motyvacinių pokalbių metu. Ypač analizuojame tokius aspektus kaip dalyvių dalyvavimas, dalyvių žodinis ir nebalstinis apgyvendinimas, taip pat diskusijų metu aptariamas temas, siekiant galutinio tikslo nustatyti kalbinius ir akustinius konsultantų empatijos ženklus. Taip pat parodome, kaip kartu su kitais žaliaviniais kalbiniais ir akustiniais požymiais galime naudoti šias išvadas, kad būtų sukurti tikslūs konsultantų empatijos klasifikatoriai, kurių tikslumas būtų iki 80 %.', 'mk': 'Советничката емпатија е поврзана со подобри резултати во психологијата и однесувачкиот совет. Во овој весник, истражуваме неколку аспекти поврзани со советувањето на интеракционалната динамика и нивната врска со советувачката емпатија за време на мотивационалните интервјуари. Особено, ние анализираме аспекти како што се ангажирањето на учесниците, вербалното и невербалното пристапување на учесниците, како и теми кои се дискутираат за време на разговорот, со конечната цел идентификување на јазичките и акустичките маркери на советничката емпатија. Исто така покажуваме како можеме да ги искористиме овие откритија заедно со други сирови јазички и акустички карактеристики за да изградиме прецизни класификатори на советничка емпатија со прецизност до 80 отсто.', 'ml': 'ആലോചനയുടെ സഹനശാല്ത്ര്യത്തോടൊപ്പം സൈക്കോളജിയിലും പെരുമാറ്റമായ ആലോചനത്തിലും ഉത്തമമായ പരിഗണിക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ചു വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d തമ്മിലുള്ള ഇടപാടുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും അവരുടെ ബന്ധം ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കാളികളുടെ ഉടമസ്ഥാനത്തെയും, പങ്കാളികളുടെ വാക്കുകളെയും അഭിപ്രായമില്ലാത്ത വാസസ്ഥലങ്ങളെയും, സംസാരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിഷയങ്ങളെയും  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഈ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നതെന്നും, മറ്റു ചീത്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും കൂടെയുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കും കൂട', 'mt': "L-empatija tal-konsulent hija assoċjata ma’ riżultati aħjar fil-psikoloġija u l-konsulenza tal-imġiba. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nesploraw diversi aspetti li għandhom x’jaqsmu mad-dinamika tal-interazzjoni ta’ konsulenza u r-relazzjoni tagħhom mal-empatija tal-konsulenti waqt laqgħat ta’ intervista motivazzjonali. B'mod partikolari, nagħmlu analiżi ta' aspetti bħall-involviment tal-parteċipanti, l-akkomodazzjoni verbali u mhux verbali tal-parteċipanti, kif ukoll suġġetti li qed jiġu diskussi matul il-konverżjoni, bl-għan finali li jiġu identifikati l-markaturi lingwistiċi u akustiċi tal-empatija tal-konsulenti. Aħna nuru wkoll kif nistgħu nużaw dawn is-sejbiet flimkien ma’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi u akustiċi oħra mhux ipproċessati biex nibnu klassifikaturi preċiżi tal-empatija tal-konsulenti b’preċiżjoni sa 80 %.", 'mn': 'Зөвлөгч сэтгэл зүйн сэтгэл зүйн, үйл ажиллагааны зөвлөгөөнд илүү сайн үр дүнтэй холбоотой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид урам зориулалттай ярилцлагын үед зөвлөгөөний динамик болон зөвлөгч сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй холбоотой олон асуудлыг судалж байна. Ялангуяа бид оролцогчдын оролцоо, оролцогчдын үг болон хэлэлцээгүй байрлал, ярианы үеийн тухай ярилцах сэдвүүдийг шинжилгээ хийх зорилго нь зөвлөгч сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлний, акустикийн тэмдэглэгчийг тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Мөн бид эдгээр ололтуудыг бусад хэлний, акустикийн хувьд хэрхэн хэрхэн хэрхэн ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж, зөв зөвлөх зөвлөгч сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хувьд 80% хүртэл тодорхойлж чадна.', 'pl': 'Empatia doradców wiąże się z lepszymi wynikami w psychologii i poradnictwie behawioralnym. W niniejszym artykule badamy kilka aspektów związanych z dynamiką interakcji doradczych i ich relacją z empatią doradcy podczas spotkań motywacyjnych. W szczególności analizujemy aspekty takie jak zaangażowanie uczestników, kombinacje werbalne i niewerbalne uczestników, a także tematy omawiane podczas rozmowy, z ostatecznym celem zidentyfikowania językowych i akustycznych markerów empatii doradcy. Pokazujemy również, w jaki sposób możemy wykorzystać te wyniki wraz z innymi surowymi cechami językowymi i akustycznymi do zbudowania dokładnych klasyfikatorów empatii doradców z dokładnością do 80%.', 'ro': 'Empatia consilierului este asociată cu rezultate mai bune în psihologie și consiliere comportamentală. În această lucrare, explorăm mai multe aspecte legate de dinamica interacțiunii consilierului și relația acestora cu empatia consilierului în timpul întâlnirilor motivaționale de interviu. În special, analizăm aspecte precum implicarea participanților, cazarea verbală și nonverbală a participanților, precum și subiectele discutate în timpul conversației, cu scopul final de a identifica markerii lingvistici și acustici ai empatiei consilierului. De asemenea, vă arătăm cum putem folosi aceste constatări împreună cu alte caracteristici lingvistice și acustice brute pentru a construi clasificatori de empatie cu precizie de până la 80%.', 'so': 'Talo-bixiyuhu wuxuu la xiriiraa arimaha wanaagsan ee ka wanaagsan ee la talinta dhimirka iyo dabeecada. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa qaar dhinac badan oo la xiriira talobixinta dabeecada iyo xiriirkooda la xiriira talo-bixiyuhu xilliga wareysiga dhaqdhaqaaqa ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu wax u baaraynaa arrimaha ugu dambeysan sida shirkadda dadka ka qayb qaata, hadalka dadka ka mid ah iyo deganaanshaha aan caadi ahayn, isla markaasna waxaynu baaraynaa macluumaad la sheekaynayo marka ay sameynayso dhamaadka la xiriira markhaatiyada luqada iyo caafimaadka ee talosiinta. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa sidoo kale sidoo kale waxan u isticmaali karnaa arimahan luuqada iyo qalloocan, si aan u dhisno fasaxyada saxda ah ee talo-talinta iyo si saxda ah ugu kordha 80 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Rådgivarempati är förknippad med bättre resultat inom psykologi och beteenderådgivning. I den här uppsatsen undersöker vi flera aspekter som rör interaktionsdynamik och deras relation till terapeutempati under motiverande intervjumöten. I synnerhet analyserar vi aspekter som deltagarnas engagemang, deltagarnas verbala och icke-verbala inkvartering samt ämnen som diskuteras under samtalet, med det slutliga målet att identifiera språkliga och akustiska markörer för terapeutempati. Vi visar också hur vi kan använda dessa resultat tillsammans med andra råa språkliga och akustiska funktioner för att bygga korrekta rådgivare empatiklassificerare med noggrannhet på upp till 80%.', 'ta': 'ஆலோசகர் சக்தியுடன் சிறந்த முடிவுகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மனநோய் மற்றும் நடத்தையான ஆலோசனையில். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சில பாகங்களை தேடுகிறோம் ஆலோசனை இடைவெளிப்படுத்தல் ஊக்கம் கூட்டத்திற்கு மற்றும் அவர்கள் ஆலோசகர் ஊக்காட்சி  குறிப்பாக, நாம் பங்கீடுபவர்களின் ஈடுபாடு, பங்கிடுபவர்களின் வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் ஒழுங்காட்டில்லாத வீடுகள் போன்ற பிரச்சினைகளைப் போன்று விளக்குகிறோம், ஆலோசகர நாம் இவ்வாறு கண்டுபிடிப்புகளை எப்படி பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் குறைவான மொழி மற்றும் குறைவான குணங்களுடன் சரியான ஆ', 'no': 'Konsollerempatien er tilknyttet med betre resultat i psykologi og oppførsel rådgivning. I denne papiret utforskar vi fleire aspektar om rådgivning av interaksjonsdynamikk og deres relasjon til rådgivning under motivasjonsbruk. I særskilt analyserer vi aspektar som deltakaranes engasjering, deltakaranes verbal og ikkje-verbal innbygging, og emne som vert diskutert under samtalen, med det siste målet å identifisera språkstiske og akustiske markerar med rådgiver-empatikk. Vi viser også korleis vi kan bruka disse finningane blant andre rålingviske og akustiske funksjonar for å bygge nøyaktige rådgiverklassifikatorar med nøyaktighet opp til 80%.', 'sr': 'Savjetnièka empatija je povezana sa boljim ishodom u psihologiji i savjetovanju ponašanja. U ovom papiru istražujemo nekoliko aspekta u vezi savjetovanja dinamike interakcije i njihove veze sa empatijom savetnika tokom motivacijskog intervjua. Posebno, analiziramo aspekte poput uključenja učesnika, verbalnog i neverbalnog smještaja učesnika, kao i teme koje se raspravljaju tokom razgovora, sa konačnim ciljem identifikacije jezičkih i akustičkih znakova empatije savetnika. Takođe pokazujemo kako možemo koristiti te nalaze zajedno sa drugim sirovim jezičkim i akustičkim karakteristikama da izgradimo tačne klasifikatore empatije savetnika sa tačnostima do 80%.', 'si': "නියෝජිත සමාවත්වයා හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිදේශයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා මානසික විද මේ පත්තරේ අපි හොයාගත්තා විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා අන්තිම අනතුරු සම්බන්ධකාරීන්ගේ සම්බන්ධය, partipartipartipartipartints' verbal and nonverbal assimmodtion, as well as Subjects be debuted in the chat, with the end Targe of ID of language istic and acoustic Markrs of advior empathy. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද අපිට මේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අනිත් භාෂාවික සහ අකුස්ටික අවස්ථාවක් එක්ක කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජන", 'ur': 'نصیحت کرنے والے مہربانی روانشناسی اور رفتاری مشورت میں بہترین نتائج کے ساتھ مشترک ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی قسمتیں دیکھتے ہیں جنہیں مشورہ دینالیک اور ان کی مشورہ دینالیک کے بارے میں مشورہ دینے کے ساتھ مشورہ دینے والی مشورہ دینے کے بارے میں مشورہ دینے کا ارتباط ہے. مخصوصاً ہم مشرکین کے مشارکت، مشرکین کے کلام اور غیر کلام کی مہمانی کے مطابق مشرکین کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اور مشرکین کی مشارکت کی مشارکت کی مہمانی کی آخری هدف کے ساتھ بحث کی جاتی ہیں. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہم ان پاؤں کو کس طرح دوسری زبان و زبان کے ساتھ استعمال کر سکتے ہیں اور اسے کس طرح استعمال کرسکتے ہیں کہ مستحق مشاور اور مہربانی کا کلیسائر بنا سکتے ہیں جو بالکل 80%.', 'uz': "Tayyorlar imkoniyatli psykologiya va tabiiy talabatlarida yaxshi natijalar bilan bog'liq. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha aspektlarni o'rganamiz, boshqarish dynamika va talab qiluvchi qo'llanmalar haqida, harakat interview qilish vaqtidagi munosabatlarning munosabati haqida. Shunday qilib, biz participlarning tashkilotlarini o'rganish, qismlarining verb va hech narsa bolaligini, va suhbat paytidagi mavzularni aniqlash uchun eng oxirgi maqsad bilan boshqaramiz. Biz shu natijalarni qanday foydalanishimizni ko'rsamiz va boshqa qizil tillar va acoustik xususiyatlaridan foydalanishimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Tasdiqlik talabatlarni 80%-dan foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Liên quan đến cảm thông học với kết quả tốt hơn về tâm lý học và tư vấn hành vi. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi tìm hiểu vài khía cạnh liên quan đến động lực giao tiếp tư vấn và mối quan hệ của họ với cảm thông nhà tư vấn trong cuộc phỏng vấn động lực. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi phân tích các khía cạnh như sự tham gia, sự hòa giải bằng ngôn ngữ và ngôn ngữ, cũng như các chủ đề được thảo luận trong cuộc đối thoại, với mục tiêu cuối cùng là xác định các dấu hiệu ngôn ngữ và âm của cảm thông nhà tư vấn. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy cách sử dụng những phát hiện này cùng với những tính năng ngôn ngữ và âm thanh thô để tạo ra những nhà tư vấn am-hộ chính xác với độ chính xác từ đến 80.', 'bg': 'Адвокатската съпричастност е свързана с по-добри резултати в психологията и поведенческото консултиране. В настоящата статия изследваме няколко аспекта, свързани с динамиката на взаимодействието на консултантите и тяхната връзка с съпричастността на консултантите по време на мотивационни интервюта срещи. В частност анализираме аспекти като ангажираност на участниците, вербално и невербално настаняване на участниците, както и теми, които се обсъждат по време на разговора, с крайна цел идентифициране на лингвистични и акустични маркери на съпричастността на съветника. Също така показваме как можем да използваме тези открития заедно с други сурови лингвистични и акустични характеристики, за да изградим точни класификатори за съпричастност на съветника с точност до 80%.', 'nl': 'Empathie van adviseurs wordt geassocieerd met betere resultaten in psychologie en gedragsbegeleiding. In dit artikel onderzoeken we verschillende aspecten van counseling interactiedynamiek en hun relatie tot counselor empathie tijdens motiverende gesprekken. In het bijzonder analyseren we aspecten zoals betrokkenheid van deelnemers, verbale en nonverbale accommodatie van deelnemers, evenals onderwerpen die tijdens het gesprek worden besproken, met als uiteindelijke doel taalkundige en akoestische markers van counselor empathie te identificeren. We laten ook zien hoe we deze bevindingen kunnen gebruiken naast andere ruwe linguïstische en akoestische kenmerken om nauwkeurige counselor empathie classificatoren te bouwen met nauwkeurigheid tot 80%.', 'da': 'Rådgiver empati er forbundet med bedre resultater i psykologi og adfærdsmæssig rådgivning. I denne artikel undersøger vi flere aspekter vedrørende rådgivning interaktionsdynamik og deres relation til rådgivning empati under motiverende interviewmøder. Især analyserer vi aspekter som deltagernes engagement, deltagernes verbal og nonverbal indkvartering samt emner, der diskuteres under samtalen, med det endelige mål at identificere sproglige og akustiske markører for vejlederempati. Vi viser også, hvordan vi kan bruge disse resultater sammen med andre rå sproglige og akustiske funktioner til at opbygge nøjagtige vejlederempatiklassificere med nøjagtigheder på op til 80%.', 'de': 'Counselor Empathie ist mit besseren Ergebnissen in Psychologie und Verhaltensberatung verbunden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir verschiedene Aspekte der Beratungsinteraktionsdynamik und deren Beziehung zur Beratungsempathie während motivationaler Interviewgespräche. Insbesondere analysieren wir Aspekte wie das Engagement der Teilnehmer, die verbale und nonverbale Anpassung der Teilnehmer sowie Themen, die während des Gesprächs diskutiert werden, mit dem Ziel, sprachliche und akustische Marker für Beratungsempathie zu identifizieren. Wir zeigen auch, wie wir diese Erkenntnisse zusammen mit anderen rohen linguistischen und akustischen Merkmalen nutzen können, um genaue Counselor Empathie Klassifikatoren mit einer Genauigkeit von bis zu 80%.', 'id': 'Empati penasihat terkait dengan hasil yang lebih baik dalam psikologi dan penasihat perilaku. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi beberapa aspek yang berkaitan dengan dinamika interaksi penasehat dan hubungan mereka dengan empati penasehat selama pertemuan wawancara motivasional. Terutama, kami menganalisis aspek seperti keterlibatan peserta, persediaan verbal dan nonverbal peserta, serta topik yang didiskusikan selama percakapan, dengan tujuan akhir untuk mengidentifikasi penanda bahasa dan akustik empati penasehat. Kami juga menunjukkan bagaimana kita dapat menggunakan penemuan ini bersama dengan ciri bahasa dan akustik mentah lainnya untuk membangun klasifikasi empati konselor akurat dengan akurasi sampai 80%.', 'sw': 'Mshauri anahusiana na matokeo bora zaidi katika ushauri wa kisaikolojia na tabia. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza mambo kadhaa yanayohusiana na ushauri wa siasa za kati na mahusiano yao na huruma ya mshauri wakati wa mahojiano ya harakati. Hasa, tunachambua masuala kama ushiriki, makazi yasiyo ya kawaida ya washiriki, pamoja na mada ambazo zinajadiliwa wakati wa mazungumzo, na lengo la mwisho la kutambua alama za lugha na yenye mashaka ya huruma ya mshauri. Pia tunaonyesha jinsi tunavyoweza kutumia matokeo haya pamoja na vipengele vingine vibaya vya lugha na vizuri ili kujenga wataalamu wenye huruma sahihi wenye uhakika wa asilimia 80.', 'ko': '상담사의 동리심은 심리와 행위 상담의 더 좋은 결과와 관련이 있다.본고에서 우리는 상담 상호작용 동력학과 관련된 몇 가지 측면과 동기식 인터뷰에서 상담사와 공통된 관계를 탐구했다.특히 참여자의 참여도, 참여자의 언어와 비언어적 적응력, 대화에서 논의된 주제를 분석한 결과 최종 목표는 상담사의 동조심 언어와 성학 표기를 확정하는 것이다.우리는 이러한 발견과 기타 원시 언어와 성학적 특징을 어떻게 활용하여 정확한 상담사 동리심 분류기를 구축하는지 보여주었는데 정확도가 80%에 달한다.', 'fa': 'همدلی مشاور با نتایج بهتری در روانشناسی و مشاوره رفتاری ارتباط دارد. در این کاغذ، ما چند نقطه را در مورد مشاوره دینامیک ارتباط و ارتباط آنها با مشاوره\u200cای در طول مصاحبه\u200cهای انگیز تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصاً ما عنوان مشارکت مشترک مشترک، کلمه\u200cهای مشترک و بی\u200cکلمه\u200cهای مشترک را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم، و عنوان موضوع در طول گفتگو، با هدف نهایی شناسایی نشانه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و آکوستیک مشترک مشترک مشترک\u200cشناسی. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که چگونه می توانیم از این نتیجه\u200cها با ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و آکوست\u200cهای دیگر استفاده کنیم تا مشاور\u200cکننده\u200cهای همراهی دقیق را با دقیق تا ۸۰ درصد بسازیم.', 'sq': 'Empatia e këshilltarit është lidhur me rezultate më të mira në psikologji dhe këshillë sjelljeje. Në këtë letër, ne eksplorojmë disa aspekte lidhur me dinamikën e këshillimit të ndërveprimit dhe lidhjen e tyre me empatinë e këshilltarit gjatë takimeve të intervistës motivuese. Veçanërisht, ne analizojmë aspekte të tilla si angazhimi i pjesëmarrësve, strehimi verbal dhe jo verbal i pjesëmarrësve si dhe temat që diskutohen gjatë bisedimit, me qëllimin përfundimtar të identifikimit të treguesve gjuhësor dhe akustikë të empatisë këshilltare. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se si mund të përdorim këto gjetje së bashku me karakteristika të tjera të papërpunuara gjuhësore dhe akustike për të ndërtuar klasifikues të saktë të empatisë këshilltare me saktësi deri në 80%.', 'hr': 'Savjetnička empatija povezana je s boljim ishodom u psihologiji i savjetovanju ponašanja. U ovom papiru istražujemo nekoliko aspekta u vezi savjetovanja dinamike interakcije i njihovog odnosa sa empatijom savjetnika tijekom motivacijskih razgovora. Posebno, analiziramo aspekte poput uključenja učesnika, verbalnog i neverbalnog smještaja učesnika, kao i teme koje se raspravljaju tijekom razgovora, s konačnim ciljem identifikacije jezičkih i akustičkih znakova empatije savjetnika. Također pokazujemo kako možemo koristiti te nalaze zajedno s drugim sirovim jezičkim i akustičkim karakteristikama kako bi izgradili to čne klasifikatore empatije savjetnika s točnostima do 80%.', 'tr': 'Dowamçylyk empatiýasy psikologiýada we davranyş maslahat bilen gowy netijeler bilen baglanýar. Bu kagyzda, motivasiýal görüşmeleri döwletleşdirýän dinamiklaryň uzmanylygy we kelläpçilik empatiýasy bilen baglaşyklaryň birnäçe aspektini keşfedýäris. Aýratyn diňe, çykyşlyklaryň golaýlanşygy, goşulyşlyklaryň söhbetçilik we beýleki ýerlerini, soňky maksady bilen söhbetçilik we akustik işaretçilerini tanamak maksady bilen çykýarys. Biz hem bu çözümleri başga çyz dillerin we akustik özellikleriň birlerinde nädip ulanyp biljegimizi görkezip, düzgün dansçy empatiýasynyň 80-ä çenli derejesi bar.', 'af': 'Raadleier-empatie is geassosieer met beter uitkoms in psykologie en gedragspraak raadpleeg. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons verskeie aspekte oor raad van interaksie dynamiek en hul verwanting met raadskapperskappy tydens motivasie ondersoek. Spesiaal, ons analyseer aspekte soos deelnaders se aantekening, deelnaders se verbale en onverbale bywoning, en onderwerpe wat in die gesprek gespreek word, met die eindelike doel van die identifiseer van lingvisiese en akustiese merkers van raadskapper-empatie. Ons wys ook hoe ons hierdie vindings kan gebruik by ander raai lingwisiese en akustiese eienskappe om regte raadskappers empatiese klassifiseerders te bou met saaklikheid tot 80%.', 'am': 'የመከረ ገቢው ምህረት የሞክሮ እና በሥርዓት ምክር ላይ የሚሻል ውጤቶች ጋር ተገናኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተንቀሳቃሚው ግንኙነት እና የመከረ ምክር የስህተት ግንኙነት በተቃውሞ ግንኙነት እና በተቃውሞ ግንኙነት ላይ የሚያሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ እንደተጋሪዎቹ ድርጊት፣ ተጋሪዎቹ ቋንቋ እና ያልተግባር ማደሪያ እና በተጨማሪው ወሬዎች በተነጋገሩ ጊዜ የቋንቋዊ እና የአካባቢ ስህተት ማሳየት የመጨረሻው ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እናም እነዚህ ፍጥረቶችን እንዴት እናጠቀም ዘንድ ከሌሎችም የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች እና አካባቢ ፍትሕርቶችን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Հոգեբանության և վարքագծային խորհրդատվության ավելի լավ արդյունքների հետ կապված է խորհրդատվության խորհրդատվության հետ: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մի քանի ասպեկտներ, որոնք կապված են խորհրդատվության շփման դինամիկայի հետ և նրանց հարաբերությունների հետ խորհրդատվության կարեկցանքի հետ մոտիվացիոն հարցազրույցների ժամանակ: Հատկապես, մենք վերլուծում ենք մասնակիցների ներգրավվածությունը, մասնակիցների խոսքերը և ոչ խոսքերը, ինչպես նաև թեմաները, որոնք քննարկվում են խոսակցության ընթացքում, վերջնական նպատակով խորհրդատու կարեկցանքի լեզվաբանական և ձայնային նշանները հայտնաբերելու համար: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարող ենք օգտագործել այս հայտնաբերությունները միասին այլ ոչ լեզվաբանական և ձայնային հատկությունների հետ, որպեսզի կառուցենք ճշգրիտ խորհրդատու կարեկցանքի դասակարգեր 80 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ:', 'az': 'Advisor empathy psikoloji və davranış danışmalarında daha xeyirli sonuçları ilə bağlantılır. Bu kağızda, motivasyon mühbətlərində danışmaq üçün müzakirə dinamiki və onların məsləhətçi empatiyasıyla bağlantısını keşfetmişik. Özellikle də, iştirakçilərin iştirakçılığı, iştirakçilərin sözlü və sözlü istiqamətlərini, danışmaq sırasında müzakirə edilən məsələlər kimi, danışmaq məqsədilərinin dil və akustik işaretçilərini tanıtmaq məqsədilə analiz edirik. Biz həmçinin bu məlumatları başqa dil və akustik özelliklərin yanında necə istifadə edə biləcəyimizi göstəririk ki, doğru danışmaq məsləhətçilərinə 80%-ə qədər müəyyən edilmiş istifadə edək.', 'bn': 'Counselor empathy is associated with better outcomes in psychology and behavioral counseling.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বিষয় খুঁজে বের করি যে পরামর্শ নিয়ে কাজ করা আনুষ্ঠানিক সাক্ষাৎকারের সময় কাউন্সিলরের সহানুভূতির সাথে সম্ বিশেষ করে আমরা অংশগ্রহণকারীদের অংশগ্রহণ, অংশগ্রহণকারীদের শব্দ এবং অনভাবে বাসস্থানের মত বিষয় বিশ্লেষণ করি, এবং আলোচনার সময় বিষয়গুলোকে আলোচনা করা হয়েছে, যার শেষ লক্ষ্যে পরামর্শক সহ আমরা এছাড়াও দেখাচ্ছি যে আমরা কিভাবে এই খুঁজে পাবো অন্যান্য ভাষা এবং একাস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করতে পারি যাতে সঠিক পরামর্শক কাউন্সিলের সহানুভ', 'bs': 'Savjetnička empatija povezana je sa boljim ishodom u psihologiji i savjetovanju ponašanja. U ovom papiru istražujemo nekoliko aspekta u vezi savjetovanja dinamike interakcije i njihove veze sa empatijom savjetnika tijekom motivacijskih razgovora. Posebno, analiziramo aspekte poput uključenja učesnika, verbalnog i neverbalnog smještaja učesnika, kao i teme koje se raspravljaju tijekom razgovora, sa konačnim ciljem identifikacije jezičkih i akustičkih znakova empatije savetnika. Također pokazujemo kako možemo koristiti te nalaze zajedno sa drugim sirovim jezičkim i akustičkim karakteristikama da izgradimo tačne klasifikatore empatije savjetnika sa tačnostima do 80%.', 'ca': "L'empatia del assessor està associada a millors resultats en psicologia i orientació comportamental. En aquest paper, explorem diversos aspectes relacionats amb la dinàmica de l'interacció d'orientació i la seva relació amb l'empatia dels assessors durant entrevistes motivacionals. En particular, analitzem aspectes com la participació dels participants, l'acomodació verbal i no verbal dels participants, i temes que es discuten durant la conversa, amb l'objectiu final d'identificar els marcadors lingüístics i acústics de l'empatia dels assessors. We also show how we can use these findings alongside other raw linguistic and acoustic features to build accurate counselor empathy classifiers with accuracies of up to 80%.", 'cs': 'Empatie poradce je spojena s lepšími výsledky v psychologii a behaviorálním poradenství. V tomto článku zkoumáme několik aspektů týkajících se dynamiky interakce poradenství a jejich vztahu k empatii poradce během motivačních pohovorů. Především analyzujeme aspekty, jako je angažovanost účastníků, verbální a nonverbální adaptace účastníků, stejně jako témata diskutovaná během konverzace, s cílem identifikovat jazykové a akustické znaky empatie poradce. Ukážeme také, jak můžeme tyto poznatky využít spolu s dalšími syrovými jazykovými a akustickými vlastnostmi k vytvoření přesných klasifikátorů empatie poradců s přesností až 80%.', 'et': 'Nõustaja empaatia on seotud paremate tulemustega psühholoogias ja käitumisnõustamises. Käesolevas töös uurime mitmeid aspekte, mis puudutavad nõustamise interaktsiooni dünaamikat ja nende seost nõustaja empaatiaga motivatsiooniliste intervjuukohtumiste ajal. Eelkõige analüüsime selliseid aspekte nagu osalejate kaasamine, osalejate verbaalne ja mitteverbaalne kohanemine, samuti vestluse käigus arutatavad teemad, mille lõppeesmärgiks on tuvastada nõustaja empaatia keelelised ja akustilised markerid. Samuti näitame, kuidas saame neid leide kasutada koos teiste keeleliste ja akustiliste funktsioonidega, et luua täpsed nõustaja empaatia klassifikaatorid täpsusega kuni 80%.', 'fi': 'Neuvonantajan empatia liittyy parempiin tuloksiin psykologiassa ja käyttäytymisohjauksessa. Tässä työssä selvitämme useita näkökulmia, jotka liittyvät ohjauksen vuorovaikutuksen dynamiikkaan ja niiden suhteeseen ohjaajan empatiaan motivaatiohaastatteluissa. Analysoimme erityisesti osallistujien sitoutumista, osallistujien verbaalista ja ei-verbaalista sopeutumista sekä keskustelun aikana keskusteltavia aiheita, joiden tavoitteena on tunnistaa ohjaajan empatian kielelliset ja akustiset merkit. Osoitamme myös, miten voimme käyttää näitä löydöksiä yhdessä muiden raakojen kielellisten ja akustisten ominaisuuksien kanssa rakentaaksemme tarkkoja neuvojan empatian luokittelijoita jopa 80%:n tarkkuudella.', 'sk': 'Empatija svetovalcev je povezana z boljšimi rezultati psihologije in vedenjskega svetovanja. V prispevku raziskujemo več vidikov, ki se nanašajo na dinamiko svetovanja interakcije in njihov odnos do svetovalne empatije med motivacijskimi intervjuji. Predvsem analiziramo vidike, kot so angažiranost udeležencev, verbalna in neverbalna prilagoditev udeležencev ter teme, o katerih razpravljamo med pogovorom, s končnim ciljem identificiranja jezikovnih in akustičnih označevalcev sočutja svetovalcev. Pokazali smo tudi, kako lahko te ugotovitve uporabimo skupaj z drugimi surovimi jezikovnimi in akustičnimi značilnostmi za izdelavo natančnih klasifikatorjev empatije svetovalcev z natančnostjo do 80%.', 'he': 'אמפתיה יועצת קשורה לתוצאות טובות יותר בפסיכולוגיה וייעוץ התנהגותי. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים כמה היבטים שקשורים לייעוץ דינמיקה אינטראקציה ומערכת היחסים שלהם לאמפתיה יועצת במהלך פגישות ראיון מוטיבציוניות. במיוחד, אנו מנתחים היבטים כמו ההתערבות של השתתפים, ההסדר מילולי ולא מילולי של השתתפים, כמו נושאים ששוחחים במהלך השיחה, עם המטרה הסופית לזהות סימנים שפתיים וקוסטיים של אמפתיה יועץ. אנחנו גם מראים איך אנחנו יכולים להשתמש בממצאים האלה יחד עם תכונות שפתיות ואקוסטיות נוספות כדי לבנות מערכות אמפתיה מדויקות של יועץ עם מדויקות עד 80%.', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, ma'anar emphasi yana da mafiya alhẽri ga matsalari a cikin talo na aikin akilojiya da mataimaki. Daga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba masu yawa da masu husũma na masu yi wa'azi da mutane da ma'abũcin mataimaki a lokacin da ke samun haɗuwa da masu haraka. Kayyai, Munã yi anayya ga masu kama da shirin mãsu haɗuwa, da mazaunin maganar mãsu haɗuwa da kuma mazaunin da ake yi musu magana a lokacin mazaɓa, da ƙarshen goal da za'a gane shaidar masu cikin harshen-harshe da akanta. Tuna nũna yadda zã mu yi amfani da waɗannan fassarar cikin harshen raw da wasu misãlai na sauri, dõmin mu ƙiƙiri fasalattu masu taƙaita na talabi da taƙaitaccen 80%.", 'jv': 'Palooban Nang kuwi iki, awake ranjelajah sing sampeyan karo Dinamarok nggambar tarjamahan karo perusahaan karo empati sing nggawe tarjamahan ngomong Awak dhéwé ngerasakno piye ngerasakno ning kebonan iki ngono alam-alam iki ulih perusahaan langgar sapa kut kudu nggawe kudu nggawe layakno karo awak dhéwé, ngono awak dhéwé, ngono awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno asai awa', 'bo': 'ཁོང་ཚོས་མཁན་དབུགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་ཉེན་དང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་རེད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀློག་སྟངས་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་གྱི་ཞབས་འཆར ང་ཚོས་དེ་དམིགས་གསལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་གནད་དོན་ཚན་ཞིབ་དཔེར་ན། ཞུགས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་གནད་དོན་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་འདྲ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་རྣམ་པ་འདི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ནས་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ར'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Knowledge Bases in LSTMs for Improving Machine Reading', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من قواعد المعرفة في LSTMs لتحسين القراءة الآلية', 'pt': 'Aproveitando as bases de conhecimento em LSTMs para melhorar a leitura da máquina', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de las bases de conocimientos en los LSTM para mejorar la lectura automática', 'fr': 'Exploiter les bases de connaissances dans les LSTM pour améliorer la lecture automatique', 'ja': '機械読取りを改善するためのLSTMの知識ベースの活用', 'hi': 'मशीन रीडिंग में सुधार के लिए LSTMs में नॉलेज बेस का लाभ उठाना', 'zh': '因 LSTM 中知识库改机器读取', 'ru': 'Использование баз знаний в LSTM для улучшения машинного чтения', 'ga': 'Bunúsanna Eolais a Ghiaráil i LSTManna chun Léamh Meaisín a Fheabhsú', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση βάσεων γνώσης σε συστήματα για τη βελτίωση της ανάγνωσης μηχανών', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tudásbázisok kihasználása LSTMs-ekben a gépi olvasás javításához', 'it': 'Sfruttare le basi di conoscenza negli LSTMs per migliorare la lettura delle macchine', 'kk': 'Мәліметтерді оқу үшін LSTMs деген мәліметтер негізі', 'mk': 'Разголемување на базите на знаење во LSTMs за подобрување на читањето на машините', 'ms': 'Mengangkat Pangkalan Pengetahuan dalam LSTM untuk meningkatkan Pembacaan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടം വരുത്തുന്നതിനായി എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിലെ അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനം', 'mn': 'LSTMs-д машины уншлагын сайжруулах боломжтой мэдлэг суурь', 'lt': 'Naudojant LSTM žinių bazes mašin ų skaitymui gerinti', 'no': 'Leveraging kenningsbaser i LSTMs for forbetring av maskinelesing', 'ro': 'Utilizarea bazelor de cunoștințe în LSTMs pentru îmbunătățirea citirii mașinilor', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie baz wiedzy w LSTMs do poprawy odczytu maszynowego', 'sr': 'Uspoređivanje baze znanja u LSTMs za unapređenje čitanja mašina', 'mt': 'L-espansjoni tal-Bażijiet ta’ Għarfien f’LSTMs għat-Titjib tal-Qari tal-Magni', 'si': 'LSTMs වල ලේවරේජ් දැනගන්න අධ්\u200dයය', 'sv': 'Utnyttja kunskapsbaser i LSTMs för att förbättra maskinläsningen', 'so': 'Baritaanka aasaaska aqoonta ee LSTMs-ka horumarinta akhrinta mashiinka', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கு மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான LSTMs யில் உள்ள அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படைகள்', 'ur': 'LSTMs میں ماشین پڑھنے کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے علم بنسس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Използване на бази от знания в ЛТМ за подобряване на машинното четене', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af vidensbaser i LSTMs til forbedring af maskinlæsning', 'nl': 'Kennisbanken in LSTMs benutten voor het verbeteren van machinelezen', 'hr': 'Usporavanje znanstvenih baza u LSTMs-ima za unapređenje čitanja strojeva', 'de': 'Nutzung von Wissensbasen in LSTMs zur Verbesserung des maschinellen Lesens', 'ko': 'LSTM의 지식 라이브러리를 이용하여 기계의 읽기 능력을 향상시키다', 'id': 'Mengangkat Pangkalan Pengetahuan dalam LSTM untuk meningkatkan Pembacaan Mesin', 'fa': 'پایگاه\u200cهای علمی در LSTMs برای بهترین خواندن ماشین', 'sw': 'Msingi wa maarifa ya Uelezi wa LSTMs kwa ajili ya kuboresha Mashine ya Kusoma', 'tr': 'Maşyny okamak üçin Ullanmak üçin LSTMslerde Bilim Baseleri', 'af': 'Verskaffing kennis basies in LSTMs vir verbetering van masjien lees', 'sq': 'Zgjerimi i bazave të njohurive në LSTMs për përmirësimin e leximit të makinave', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': "Makinel톛rin oxumas캼 칲칞칲n LSTMs'l톛rd톛 bilgi bazlar캼", 'hy': 'ԼՍԹՄ-ի գիտելիքի հիմքերի բարելավման համար մեքենաների կարդալու համար', 'bn': 'মেশিন পাঠ করার জন্য LSTMs-এ জ্ঞান বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'Uspoređivanje znanstvenih baza u LSTMs za unapređenje čitanja mašina', 'ca': 'Ampliar les bases de coneixements dels LSTMs per millorar la lectura màquina', 'cs': 'Využití znalostních bází v LSTMs pro zlepšení strojového čtení', 'et': 'Teadmistebaaside kasutamine LSTMs masinlugemise parandamiseks', 'fi': 'LSTMs-tietokantojen hyödyntäminen konelukemisen parantamiseksi', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje baz znanja v LSTMs za izboljšanje strojnega branja', 'he': 'מעלה בסיסי ידע ב LSTMs לשפר קריאת מכונות', 'bo': 'LSTMs ནང་དུ་སྤྲོ་བར་ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་ ལག་འཁྱེར་ཀློག་འཇུག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'This paper focuses on how to take advantage of external knowledge bases (KBs) to improve recurrent neural networks for machine reading. Traditional methods that exploit knowledge from KBs encode knowledge as discrete indicator features. Not only do these features generalize poorly, but they require task-specific feature engineering to achieve good performance. We propose KBLSTM, a novel neural model that leverages continuous representations of KBs to enhance the learning of recurrent neural networks for machine reading. To effectively integrate background knowledge with information from the currently processed text, our model employs an attention mechanism with a sentinel to adaptively decide whether to attend to background knowledge and which information from KBs is useful. Experimental results show that our model achieves accuracies that surpass the previous state-of-the-art results for both entity extraction and event extraction on the widely used ACE2005 dataset.', 'ar': 'تركز هذه الورقة على كيفية الاستفادة من قواعد المعرفة الخارجية (KBs) لتحسين الشبكات العصبية المتكررة لقراءة الآلة. تقوم الطرق التقليدية التي تستغل المعرفة من KBs بتشفير المعرفة كميزات مؤشر منفصلة. لا يقتصر الأمر على عدم تعميم هذه الميزات بشكل سيئ فحسب ، بل إنها تتطلب هندسة ميزات خاصة بالمهمة لتحقيق أداء جيد. نقترح KBLSTM ، وهو نموذج عصبي جديد يستفيد من التمثيلات المستمرة لـ KBs لتعزيز تعلم الشبكات العصبية المتكررة لقراءة الآلة. لدمج المعرفة الخلفية بشكل فعال مع المعلومات من النص المعالج حاليًا ، يستخدم نموذجنا آلية انتباه مع حارس ليقرر بشكل تكيفي ما إذا كان يجب الحضور إلى المعرفة الأساسية وأي المعلومات من KBs مفيدة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يحقق دقة تفوق أحدث النتائج السابقة لكل من استخراج الكيانات واستخراج الأحداث على مجموعة بيانات ACE2005 المستخدمة على نطاق واسع.', 'fr': "Cet article se concentre sur la façon de tirer parti des bases de connaissances externes (KB) pour améliorer les réseaux neuronaux récurrents pour la lecture automatique. Les méthodes traditionnelles qui exploitent les connaissances des KB encodent les connaissances en tant que caractéristiques indicatrices discrètes. Non seulement ces fonctionnalités se généralisent mal, mais elles nécessitent également une ingénierie de fonctionnalités spécifiques aux tâches pour obtenir de bonnes performances. Nous proposons KBLSTM, un nouveau modèle neuronal qui exploite les représentations continues des KB pour améliorer l'apprentissage des réseaux neuronaux récurrents pour la lecture automatique. Pour intégrer efficacement les connaissances de base aux informations provenant du texte actuellement traité, notre modèle utilise un mécanisme d'attention avec une sentinelle pour décider de manière adaptative s'il faut tenir compte des connaissances de base et quelles informations provenant de KB sont utiles. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle atteint des précisions qui surpassent les résultats de pointe précédents pour l'extraction d'entités et l'extraction d'événements sur le jeu de données ACE2005 largement utilisé.", 'es': 'Este artículo se centra en cómo aprovechar las bases de conocimiento (KB) externas para mejorar las redes neuronales recurrentes para la lectura automática. Los métodos tradicionales que explotan el conocimiento de los KB codifican el conocimiento como características indicadoras discretas. Estas funciones no solo se generalizan mal, sino que requieren una ingeniería de funciones específica de la tarea para lograr un buen rendimiento. Proponemos KBLSTM, un modelo neuronal novedoso que aprovecha las representaciones continuas de KB para mejorar el aprendizaje de las redes neuronales recurrentes para la lectura automática. Para integrar eficazmente el conocimiento de fondo con la información del texto procesado actualmente, nuestro modelo emplea un mecanismo de atención con un centinela para decidir de forma adaptativa si prestar atención al conocimiento de fondo y qué información de los KB es útil. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo logra precisiones que superan los resultados anteriores del estado de la técnica tanto para la extracción de entidades como para la extracción de eventos en el conjunto de datos ACE2005 ampliamente utilizado.', 'pt': 'Este artigo se concentra em como aproveitar as bases de conhecimento externas (KBs) para melhorar as redes neurais recorrentes para leitura de máquina. Os métodos tradicionais que exploram o conhecimento de KBs codificam o conhecimento como recursos de indicadores discretos. Esses recursos não apenas generalizam mal, mas exigem engenharia de recursos específicos da tarefa para obter um bom desempenho. Propomos o KBLSTM, um novo modelo neural que aproveita representações contínuas de KBs para aprimorar o aprendizado de redes neurais recorrentes para leitura de máquina. Para integrar efetivamente o conhecimento de fundo com as informações do texto atualmente processado, nosso modelo emprega um mecanismo de atenção com um sentinela para decidir de forma adaptativa se atender ao conhecimento de fundo e quais informações das KBs são úteis. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo alcança precisões que superam os resultados de última geração anteriores para extração de entidade e extração de eventos no conjunto de dados ACE2005 amplamente utilizado.', 'ja': '本稿では，機械読取のための再発ニューラルネットワークを改善するために，外部知識ベース（ KB ）を活用する方法に焦点を当てる． KBからの知識を利用する伝統的な方法は、離散的な指標機能として知識をエンコードします。これらの機能は一般化が悪いだけでなく、優れたパフォーマンスを達成するためにタスク固有の機能エンジニアリングが必要です。KBの連続表現を活用し、機械読み取りのための再帰的ニューラルネットワークの学習を強化する新規ニューラルモデルKBLSTMを提案する。バックグラウンドナレッジを現在処理されているテキストからの情報と効果的に統合するために、当社のモデルはセンチネルを使用して注意を払い、バックグラウンドナレッジに参加するかどうか、およびKBSからのどの情報が役に立つかを適応的に決定するメカニズムを採用しています。実験結果は、当社のモデルが、広く使用されているACE 2005データセットのエンティティ抽出とイベント抽出の両方で、以前の最先端の結果を上回る精度を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文重点介如何用外知识库(KB)以改进机器读之递归神经网络。 因知识库之道编码为离散指标征。 此功非独泛化劣也,而特定于任者,乃能成其善也。 吾建KBLSTM,新颖之神经也,因KB之续以益机器读取递归神经网络之学。 以背景知与当前处理之息合,吾形用带哨点之机适应性以定背景知识及知识库之信有用也。 实验结果表明博用之ACE2005数集上,吾取诸实体,优于曩时之先进也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर मशीन रीडिंग के लिए आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क में सुधार करने के लिए बाहरी ज्ञान आधारों (केबी) का लाभ उठाने के तरीके पर केंद्रित है। पारंपरिक तरीके जो KBs से ज्ञान का शोषण करते हैं, असतत संकेतक सुविधाओं के रूप में ज्ञान को एन्कोड करते हैं। न केवल ये विशेषताएं खराब रूप से सामान्यीकृत होती हैं, बल्कि उन्हें अच्छे प्रदर्शन को प्राप्त करने के लिए कार्य-विशिष्ट सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। हम KBLSTM, एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो मशीन पढ़ने के लिए आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के सीखने को बढ़ाने के लिए केबी के निरंतर प्रतिनिधित्व का लाभ उठाता है। वर्तमान में संसाधित पाठ से जानकारी के साथ पृष्ठभूमि ज्ञान को प्रभावी ढंग से एकीकृत करने के लिए, हमारा मॉडल एक प्रहरी के साथ एक ध्यान तंत्र को नियोजित करता है ताकि यह तय किया जा सके कि पृष्ठभूमि ज्ञान में भाग लेना है या नहीं और केबी से कौन सी जानकारी उपयोगी है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल सटीकता प्राप्त करता है जो व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले ACE2005 डेटासेट पर इकाई निष्कर्षण और घटना निष्कर्षण दोनों के लिए पिछले अत्याधुनिक परिणामों को पार करता है।', 'ru': 'Эта статья посвящена тому, как использовать внешние базы знаний (КБ) для улучшения рекуррентных нейронных сетей для машинного чтения. Традиционные методы, которые используют знания от КБ, кодируют знания как особенности дискретных индикаторов. Эти функции не только плохо обобщаются, но и требуют разработки конкретных функций для достижения хорошей производительности. Мы предлагаем KBLSTM, новую нейронную модель, которая использует непрерывные представления КБ для улучшения обучения рекуррентных нейронных сетей для машинного чтения. Чтобы эффективно интегрировать фоновые знания с информацией из обрабатываемого в настоящее время текста, наша модель использует механизм внимания с дозорным, чтобы адаптивно решить, следует ли присутствовать на фоновых знаниях и какая информация из КБ полезна. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель достигает точности, которая превосходит предыдущие современные результаты как для извлечения сущностей, так и для извлечения событий в широко используемом наборе данных Ace2005.', 'ga': 'Díríonn an páipéar seo ar conas leas a bhaint as boinn eolais sheachtracha (KBanna) chun líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha a fheabhsú le haghaidh léamh meaisín. Ionchódaíonn modhanna traidisiúnta a bhaineann leas as eolas ó KBanna eolas mar ghnéithe scoite táscairí. Ní hamháin go bhfuil drochghinearálú ar na gnéithe seo, ach teastaíonn innealtóireacht ghné-shainiúil orthu chun dea-fheidhmíocht a bhaint amach. Molaimid KBLSTM, samhail néarúil nua a ghiaráil uiríll leanúnacha de KBanna chun foghlaim líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha le haghaidh léamh meaisín a fheabhsú. Chun eolas cúlra a chomhtháthú go héifeachtach le faisnéis ón téacs atá próiseáilte faoi láthair, úsáideann ár múnla meicníocht aire le feighlithe chun cinneadh a dhéanamh go hoiriúnaitheach ar cheart freastal ar eolas cúlra agus cén fhaisnéis ó KBanna atá úsáideach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár múnla amach beachtas a sháraíonn na torthaí úrscothacha roimhe seo maidir le hastarraingt aonáin agus asbhaint imeachtaí ar thacar sonraí ACE2005 a úsáidtear go forleathan.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στον τρόπο αξιοποίησης των εξωτερικών βάσεων γνώσης (ΚΒ) για τη βελτίωση των επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων για την ανάγνωση μηχανών. Οι παραδοσιακές μέθοδοι που εκμεταλλεύονται τη γνώση από τα KBs κωδικοποιούν τη γνώση ως διακριτά χαρακτηριστικά δεικτών. Όχι μόνο αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά γενικεύονται ανεπαρκώς, αλλά απαιτούν ειδική μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών για να επιτύχουν καλή απόδοση. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό μοντέλο που αξιοποιεί συνεχείς αναπαραστάσεις των KBs για να ενισχύσει την εκμάθηση επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων για μηχανική ανάγνωση. Για την αποτελεσματική ενσωμάτωση της γνώσης υποβάθρου με τις πληροφορίες από το κείμενο που επεξεργάζεται σήμερα, το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής με έναν φρουρό για να αποφασίσει προσαρμοστικά αν θα ασχοληθεί με τις γνώσεις υποβάθρου και ποιες πληροφορίες από τα KBs είναι χρήσιμες. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβειες που ξεπερνούν τα προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας τόσο για την εξαγωγή οντοτήτων όσο και για την εξαγωγή συμβάντων στο ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενο σύνολο δεδομένων ACE2005.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány arra összpontosít, hogy miként használható ki a külső tudásbázisok (KBs) a gépi olvasás visszatérő neurális hálózatainak javítása érdekében. A hagyományos módszerek, amelyek kihasználják a KBs-kből származó ismereteket, diszkrét indikátor funkciókként kódolják a tudást. Ezek a funkciók nemcsak rosszul általánosítanak, hanem feladatspecifikus funkciótervezést igényelnek a jó teljesítmény eléréséhez. Javasoljuk a KBLSTM-et, egy új neurális modellt, amely a KBs folyamatos reprezentációját használja a gépi olvasáshoz szükséges visszatérő neurális hálózatok tanulásának javítására. Annak érdekében, hogy a háttér-ismereteket hatékonyan integráljuk a jelenleg feldolgozott szövegből származó információkkal, modellünk figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmust alkalmaz arra, hogy adaptívan eldöntsük, hogy a háttér-ismereteket vegyük-e figyelembe, és hogy mely KBs információk hasznosak-e. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk olyan pontosságokat ér el, amelyek meghaladják a korábbi legkorszerűbb eredményeket mind az entitás extrakciójában, mind az események extrakciójában a széles körben használt ACE2005 adatkészleten.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი განსაკუთრებულია, როგორ გამოიყენება გარეშე ცნობიერების ბაზების (KBs) გამოიყენება მაქსინური კითხვის შესაძლებელად განსაკუთრებული ნეირ Name არა მხოლოდ ეს ფუნქციები ჯერნალურად გავაკეთებენ, მაგრამ ისინი საჭირო რაოდენობის განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციების ინეზინერიცია, რომ საკეთესო KBLSTM, პრომენტური ნეიროლური მოდელი, რომელიც KBs-ის მუშაობის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება, რომ მაქსინური წაკითხვისთვის რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის სწავლების მიმდინარე დავალებული ტექსტიდან ინფორმაციის ინტერგექტირებისთვის, ჩვენი მოდელის მომხმარების მაქსინექტირების მაქსინექტირების შესაძლებელად აეპტიგურად გადაწყვება თუ არა დავალება ფონქ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელის წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც წინა წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენებისთვის ექსტრაქციის და მოვლენები', 'it': "Questo articolo si concentra su come sfruttare le basi di conoscenza esterne (KBs) per migliorare le reti neurali ricorrenti per la lettura automatica. I metodi tradizionali che sfruttano la conoscenza delle KBs codificano la conoscenza come caratteristiche di indicatore discreto. Non solo queste caratteristiche generalizzano male, ma richiedono l'ingegneria specifica delle funzionalità per ottenere buone prestazioni. Proponiamo KBLSTM, un nuovo modello neurale che sfrutta le rappresentazioni continue di KBs per migliorare l'apprendimento delle reti neurali ricorrenti per la lettura automatica. Per integrare efficacemente le conoscenze di base con le informazioni del testo attualmente elaborato, il nostro modello utilizza un meccanismo di attenzione con una sentinella per decidere in modo adattivo se seguire le conoscenze di base e quali informazioni provenienti da KB sono utili. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge accuratezze che superano i precedenti risultati allo stato dell'arte sia per l'estrazione di entità che per l'estrazione di eventi sul set di dati ACE2005 ampiamente utilizzato.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama tai, kaip pasinaudoti išorinėmis žinių bazėmis (KB) siekiant pagerinti nuolatinius nervinius tinklus skaitant mašinas. Tradiciniai metodai, naudojantys KB žinias, koduoja žinias kaip atskiras rodiklių savybes. Šios savybės ne tik prastai paplitusios, bet ir reikalauja specialios užduoties savybių inžinerijos, kad būtų pasiekti geri rezultatai. Mes siūlome KBLSTM, naują neurologinį model į, kuris sutelkia nuolatinį KB atstovavimą, kad būtų geriau mokomi pakartotiniai neurologiniai tinklai mašininiam skaitymui. Siekiant veiksmingai integruoti fonines žinias su šiuo metu apdoroto teksto informacija, mūsų model is naudoja dėmesio mechanizmą su sentineliu, kad prisitaikytinai nuspręstų, ar dalyvauti foninėse žiniose ir kokia KB informacija yra naudinga. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia tikslumus, kurie viršija ankstesnius naujausius rezultatus tiek subjektų gavybai, tiek renginių gavybai plačiai naudojamame ACE2005 duomenų rinkinyje.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија се фокусира на тоа како да се искористат надворешните бази на знаење (КБ) за подобрување на рецидентните нервни мрежи за машинско читање. Традиционалните методи кои го искористуваат знаењето од КБ го кодираат знаењето како дискретни индикаторски карактеристики. Овие карактеристики не само што се генерализираат лошо, туку и бараат инженерство за специфични карактеристики за задачи за да постигнат добра резултат. Предложуваме КБЛСТМ, нов нервен модел кој користи континуирани претставувања на КБ за подобрување на учењето на рецидентните нервни мрежи за машинско читање. За ефикасно интегрирање на подложното знаење со информациите од моментално процесираниот текст, нашиот модел користи механизам на внимание со сентинел за адаптивно да одлучи дали да присуствува на подложното знаење и која информација од КБ е корисна. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува прецизност која ги надминува претходните најдобри резултати за екстракција на ентитетите и екстракција на настаните на широко употребениот ACE2005 податок.', 'ml': 'പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുകളുടെ (കെബികള്\u200d) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന കെബിഎസില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അറിവുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന പാട്ടികമായ രീതികള്\u200d ഈ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d മോശമായി പൊതുവാക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമല്ല, എന്നാല്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക പ്രദര്\u200dശനം പ്രാ നമ്മള്\u200d കെബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d, കെബിസിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. മെഷിന്\u200d വായിക് To effectively integrate background knowledge with information from the currently processed text, our model employs an attention mechanism with a sentinel to adaptively decide whether to attend to background knowledge and which information from KBs is useful.  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത്, മുമ്പുള്ള രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiffoka fuq kif wieħed għandu jieħu vantaġġ mill-bażijiet esterni tal-għarfien (KBs) biex itejjeb in-netwerks newrali rikorrenti għall-qari bil-magna. Metodi tradizzjonali li jisfruttaw l-għarfien mill-KBs jikkodifikaw l-għarfien bħala karatteristiċi ta’ indikatur diskreti. Mhux biss dawn il-karatteristiċi jiġġeneralizzaw ħażin, iżda jeħtieġu inġinerija ta’ karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-kompiti biex jiksbu prestazzjoni tajba. Aħna nipproponu KBLSTM, mudell newrali ġdid li jagħti spinta lir-rappreżentazzjonijiet kontinwi tal-KBs biex itejjeb it-tagħlim tan-netwerks newrali rikorrenti għall-qari bil-magna. Biex jintegra b’mod effettiv l-għarfien ta’ sfond ma’ informazzjoni mit-test ipproċessat bħalissa, il-mudell tagħna juża mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni b’sentinel biex jiddeċiedi b’mod adattat jekk jattendix għall-għarfien ta’ sfond u liema informazzjoni mill-KBs hija utli. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jikseb preċiżjonijiet li jaqbżu r-riżultati preċedenti tal-aktar avvanzati kemm għall-estrazzjoni tal-entità kif ukoll għall-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta ACE2005 użat ħafna.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз машинаны оқу үшін қайталанатын невралды желілерді қайталау үшін сыртқы білім негізінің (Кб) пайдалануын қалай пайдалануға назар береді. КБ- ден білімдерді қолдану әдетті әдістер мәліметтерді дискрет индикаторы ретінде кодтамасыз. Бұл мүмкіндіктерді жалпы жалпы түрлендіру емес, бірақ олар тапсырманың ерекше мүмкіндіктерінің инженериясын жақсы істеу үшін талап етеді. Біз KBLSTM- ді, компьютерді оқу үшін қайталанатын невралды желілерді оқу үшін көтеру үшін КБ- тың жалғастыру үшін, романдық невралдық үлгілерін көтеру үшін қолданып таста Аясының білімдерін қазіргі өзгертілген мәтіннен мәліметті тәжірибелі біріктіру үшін, біздің үлгіміз аясының біліміне қатынау және KB- дан қай мәліметі пайдалы екенін анықтау үші Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің алдыңғы суреттің нәтижелерін түсіруге және оқиғаларды түсіруге және ACE2005 деректер жиынында көп қолданылатын нәтижелерді жеткізеді.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас машин унших мэдлэгийн гадаад мэдлэгийн суурь (КБ) хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг анхаарна. КБ-ээс мэдлэгийг ашигладаг уламжлалтын арга нь мэдлэгийг хувьсгал загвар гэдэг. Зөвхөн эдгээр чадварууд зөвхөн ядуу байдаг биш, гэхдээ ажлын тодорхой инженерчлэл сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргах хэрэгтэй. Бид KBLSTM-г шинэ мэдрэлийн загвар санал болгож, KBs-ийн үргэлжилсэн үзүүлэлтийг ашиглан машин унших мэдрэлийн сүлжээний сургалтыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Харин одоогийн үйлдвэрлэгдсэн текстүүдийн мэдээллийг үндсэн зохион байгуулахын тулд бидний загвар нь анхаарлын механизмийг санхүүгийн төлөвлөгөөтэй зохион байгуулах хэрэгтэй эсэхийг шийдвэрлэх хэрэгтэй. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өмнөх урлагийн үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүнг хоёуланг ашиглан ACE2005 өгөгдлийн санд хэрэглэгдсэн үйлдвэрлэлийн гаргалтын тулд зөв байдлыг олж чадна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na tym, jak wykorzystać zewnętrzne bazy wiedzy (KBs) do poprawy powtarzających się sieci neuronowych do odczytu maszynowego. Tradycyjne metody wykorzystujące wiedzę z KBs kodują wiedzę jako dyskretne cechy wskaźników. Funkcje te nie tylko słabo uogólniają, ale wymagają również specyficznej inżynierii funkcji, aby osiągnąć dobrą wydajność. Proponujemy KBLSTM, nowy model neuronowy, który wykorzystuje ciągłą reprezentację KBs w celu usprawnienia nauki powtarzających się sieci neuronowych do odczytu maszynowego. Aby skutecznie zintegrować wiedzę podstawową z informacjami z aktualnie przetwarzanego tekstu, nasz model wykorzystuje mechanizm uwagi wraz ze strażnikiem, który adaptacyjnie decyduje, czy zająć się wiedzą podstawową i które informacje z KBs są przydatne. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model osiąga dokładności, które przewyższają poprzednie najnowocześniejsze wyniki zarówno w odniesieniu do ekstrakcji jednostek, jak i ekstrakcji zdarzeń na szeroko stosowanym zbiorze danych ACE2005.', 'no': 'Denne papiret fokuserer på korleis eksterne kunnskapsbaser (KBs) skal brukast for å forbetra rekurserande neuralnettverk for maskinelesing. Tradisjonale metodar som brukar kunnskap frå KBs koder kunnskap som diskrete indikatorefunksjonar. Ikkje berre gjer desse funksjonane generellisert slik dårlig, men dei krev oppgåvespesifisert funksjonsengineering for å oppnå godt utvikling. Vi foreslår KBLSTM, eit roman neuralmodell som leverer kontinuerlege representasjonar av KBs for å forbetra læring av gjentaande neuralnettverk for maskinelesing. For å effektivt integrere bakgrunnsinnskap med informasjon frå den gjeldande handsamarte teksten, vert modellen vårt brukt ein oppmerksmekanisme med ein sentinel for å bestemma om du skal delta på bakgrunnsinnskap og kva informasjon frå KBs er nyttig. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt når det gjer nøyaktighet som overstyrer den førre tilstanden av kunsten for både utpakking av einingar og hendingar på den store brukte datasettet ACE2005.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na korištenje spoljnih baza znanja (KB) kako bi poboljšala rekonstruirane neuralne mreže za čitanje mašina. Tradicionalne metode koje koriste znanje iz KBs kodiraju znanje kao diskretne karakteristike indikatora. Ne samo da te karakteristike generalizuju loše, nego zahtevaju inženjerstvo za specifične funkcije za postizanje dobre funkcije. Predlažemo KBLSTM, novi neuralni model koji utiče na stalne predstave KB-a kako bi poboljšali učenje rekonstruiranih neuralnih mreža za čitanje mašina. Da bi efikasno integrirali pozadinsko znanje sa informacijama iz trenutno obrađenog teksta, naš model zapošljava pažnju mehanizam sa sentinelom da bi prilagodilo odlučio da li prisustvovati pozadinskim znanjima i koje informacije iz KB-a koriste. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne tačnosti koje prelaze prethodne rezultate umetnosti za izvlačenje entiteta i izvlačenje događaja na široko korištenoj seriji podataka ACE2005.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare se concentrează asupra modului de a profita de bazele de cunoștințe externe (KBs) pentru a îmbunătăți rețelele neurale recurente pentru citirea mașinilor. Metodele tradiționale care exploatează cunoștințele din KBs codează cunoștințele ca caracteristici discrete de indicator. Nu numai că aceste caracteristici generalizează slab, dar necesită ingineria caracteristicilor specifice sarcinilor pentru a obține performanțe bune. Propunem KBLSTM, un nou model neural care valorifică reprezentările continue ale KBs pentru a îmbunătăți învățarea rețelelor neurale recurente pentru citirea automată. Pentru a integra în mod eficient cunoștințele de fundal cu informațiile din textul procesat în prezent, modelul nostru utilizează un mecanism de atenție cu o santinelă pentru a decide adaptiv dacă să participe la cunoștințele de fundal și care informații de la KBs sunt utile. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru atinge acuratețe care depășesc rezultatele anterioare de ultimă oră atât pentru extragerea entităților, cât și pentru extragerea evenimentelor pe setul de date ACE2005 utilizat pe scară largă.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කියවන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (KBs) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝ Name මේ විශේෂතාවල් සාමාන්\u200dය විතරක් නෙවෙයි, ඒත් ඔවුන්ට හොඳ වැඩක් ලැබීමට වැඩක් විශේෂ විශේෂ වි අපි KBLSTM විශ්වාස කරනවා, න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩල් එකක්, ඒකෙන් KBs ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා ජාතින් කිය පිටිපස්සේ දැන් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියා කරපු පාළුවෙන් තොරතුරු සඳහා පිටිපස්සේ දැනගන්න, අපේ මොඩල් අවධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සඳහා පිටිපස්ස පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් හරියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dර', 'so': "Warqaddan wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa sida loo isticmaalayo aasaaska aqoonta dibadda (KBs) si uu u beddelo shabakada neurada ee lagu akhriyo mashiinka. Qaadooyinka caadiga ah ee ka baaraandegaya aqoonta KBs waxay aqoonta ugu kooban yihiin mid gaar ah indicator. Waxyaabahaas oo keliya ma sameeyo in ay caadiga u sameeyaan, laakiin waxay u baahan yihiin injiilka khaas ah oo shaqo si ay u gaadhaan bandhig wanaagsan. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa KBLSTM, model neural ah oo ku qoran wadajirka ah ee KBs si aan u kordhinno barashada shabakada neurada ee soo socda ee akhriska machine-ka. Si aad u qabsato aqoonta bakhtiga iyo macluumaadka la xiriira taariikhda hore, modellkayagu wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa mechanisyo daryeel ah oo si adag u go'aanta in aad ku jirto aqoonta bakhtiga iyo macluumaadka KBs ay faa’iido u leedahay. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu helo saxda ah oo ka hormariya dhamaadka arimaha farshaxanka ee hore ee la soo bixiyo dhamaanka dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha ee loo isticmaalay ACE2005.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats fokuserar på hur man utnyttjar externa kunskapsbaser (KBs) för att förbättra återkommande neurala nätverk för maskinläsning. Traditionella metoder som utnyttjar kunskap från KBs kodar kunskap som diskreta indikatorfunktioner. Dessa funktioner generaliserar inte bara dåligt, utan de kräver uppgiftsspecifik funktionsteknik för att uppnå bra prestanda. Vi föreslår KBLSTM, en ny neural modell som utnyttjar kontinuerliga representationer av KBs för att förbättra inlärningen av återkommande neurala nätverk för maskinläsning. För att effektivt integrera bakgrundskunskap med information från den aktuella texten använder vår modell en uppmärksamhetsmekanism med en vakt för att adaptivt bestämma om bakgrundskunskap ska tas upp och vilken information från KBs är användbar. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell uppnår noggrannheter som överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art resultat för både entitetsutvinning och händelseutvinning på den allmänt använda ACE2005 datauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் எப்படி வெளி அறிவு அடிப்படைகளை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மீண்டும் இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் புதிய ப Name இந்த பண்புகள் மட்டும் குறைந்ததாக செய்ய வேண்டும் அல்ல, ஆனால் அவர்கள் செய்ய வேண்டிய பணிக்குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட We propose KBLSTM, a novel neural model that leverages continuous representations of KBs to enhance the learning of recurrent neural networks for machine reading.  தற்போது செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட உரையிலிருந்து தகவலுடன் பின்னணி அறிவை சேர்க்க, எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு கவனத்தின் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, பின்னணி அறிவிப்பில முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது நமது மாதிரி சரியான விளைவுகளை பெறுகிறது முந்தைய நிலையில் இருந்து கலை முடிவுகளை மேற்கொள்ளும் பொருள் ப', 'ur': 'This paper focuses on how to use external knowledge bases (KBs) to improve recurrent neural networks for machine reading. سنتی طریقے جو KB سے علم استعمال کرتی ہیں علم کو مختلف نشانی کے طور پر محفوظ کرتی ہیں. یہ ویژگی نہیں صرف برائی کے ساتھ کام کرتے ہیں لیکن ان کو اچھی کام پہنچانے کے لئے کام کے مطابق ویژگی ویژنی انجینری کی ضرورت ہے۔ ہم KBLSTM کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک نور نیورل موڈل جو مشین پڑھنے کے لئے دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی تعلیم کو زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں۔ اس لئے کہ ابتداء معلومات کے ساتھ حاضر ہونے والی متکس سے معلومات کے ساتھ تفریق کریں، ہماری مدل ایک مترس مکانیسم کے مطابق اچھی طرح مطابق فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ شامل معلومات کے ساتھ حاضر ہونا اور کون کیب سے معلومات مفید ہے۔ Experimental results show that our model achieves accuracies that exceed the previous state of the art results for both entity extraction and event extraction on the widely used ACE2005 data set.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini fokus pada bagaimana untuk mengambil keuntungan dari pangkalan pengetahuan luaran (KBs) untuk meningkatkan rangkaian saraf berulang untuk pembacaan mesin. Kaedah tradisional yang mengeksploitasi pengetahuan dari KBs mengekodkan pengetahuan sebagai ciri penunjuk diskret. Bukan sahaja ciri-ciri ini mengawal buruk, tetapi mereka memerlukan teknik ciri-ciri khusus tugas untuk mencapai prestasi yang baik. Kami melamar KBLSTM, model saraf baru yang menggunakan perwakilan terus menerus KB untuk meningkatkan pembelajaran rangkaian saraf berulang untuk pembacaan mesin. Untuk mengintegrasikan pengetahuan latar belakang dengan maklumat dari teks yang sedang diproses, model kami menggunakan mekanisme perhatian dengan sentinel untuk memutuskan secara beradaptasi sama ada untuk menghadiri pengetahuan latar belakang dan maklumat mana dari KBs berguna. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita mencapai ketepatan yang melebihi keputusan state-of-the-art terdahulu untuk ekstraksi entiti dan ekstraksi peristiwa pada set data ACE2005 yang digunakan secara luas.', 'uz': "This paper focuses on how to take advantage of external knowledge bases (KBs) to improve recurrent neural networks for machine reading.  Name Bu xususiyatlarni faqat yomon umumiy qilishi kerak emas, balki ular yaxshi bajarish uchun vazifaning xossa muhandiya kerak. Biz KBLSTM, novel neyrolik modeli, bu KBs davom etishni davom etish uchun davom etishni o'rganish uchun davom etadi. Name Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, bizning modelimiz oldingi holatda saqlash natijalarini bajaradi. Bitta butunlay ishlatilgan ACE2005 maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlash va hodisa chiqarish natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này tập trung vào cách sử dụng cơ sở kiến thức bên ngoài (KBs) để cải thiện các mạng thần kinh liên tục cho việc đọc máy. Phương pháp truyền thống sử dụng kiến thức từ KBs đã mã hóa kiến thức như những chi tiết riêng biệt. Những tính năng này không chỉ phổ biến kém, mà còn đòi hỏi kỹ năng đặc trưng của nhiệm vụ để đạt được hiệu suất tốt. Chúng tôi đề nghị KBLSTM, một mô hình thần kinh mới hỗ trợ sự phát triển liên tục của KB để nâng cao việc học thêm các mạng thần kinh tái dựng cho việc đọc máy. Để tích hợp kiến thức nền với thông tin từ văn bản được xử lý hiện thời, mẫu của chúng tôi sử dụng một cơ chế để quan tâm quyết định có tham dự kiến thức nền hay không và thông tin từ KBs cũng có ích. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta đạt được các điều kiện hoàn hảo vượt qua các kết quả hiện đại trước đây cho cả thực thể khai thác và các sự kiện trên bộ dữ liệu ACChừng được sử dụng rộng rãi.', 'da': 'Denne artikel fokuserer på, hvordan man udnytter eksterne vidensbaser (KBs) til at forbedre tilbagevendende neurale netværk til maskinlæsning. Traditionelle metoder, der udnytter viden fra KBs, koder viden som diskrete indikatorfunktioner. Ikke alene generaliserer disse funktioner dårligt, men de kræver opgavespecifik feature engineering for at opnå god ydeevne. Vi foreslår KBLSTM, en ny neural model, der udnytter kontinuerlige repræsentationer af KBs til at forbedre indlæringen af tilbagevendende neurale netværk til maskinlæsning. For effektivt at integrere baggrundsviden med oplysninger fra den aktuelt behandlede tekst anvender vores model en opmærksomhedsmekanisme med en vagt til at tilpasse sig, om baggrundsviden skal behandles, og hvilke oplysninger fra KBs er nyttige. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model opnår nøjagtigheder, der overgår de tidligere state-of-the-art resultater for både entity ekstraktion og event ekstraktion på det bredt anvendte ACE2005 datasæt.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия се фокусира върху това как да се възползваме от външните бази знания (КБ) за подобряване на повтарящите се невронни мрежи за машинно четене. Традиционните методи, които експлоатират знанията от КБ кодират знанията като дискретни индикаторни функции. Не само тези функции се обобщават лошо, но те изискват специфично за задачата инженерство на характеристиките, за да се постигне добра производителност. Предлагаме нов невронен модел, който използва непрекъснати представи на КБ за подобряване на ученето на повтарящи се невронни мрежи за машинно четене. За ефективно интегриране на фоновите знания с информацията от текущо обработения текст, нашият модел използва механизъм за внимание с пазач, който адаптивно решава дали да се обърне внимание на фоновите знания и коя информация от КБ е полезна. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел постига точности, които надхвърлят предишните най-съвременни резултати както за извличане на обекти, така и за извличане на събития на широко използвания набор от данни.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel richt zich op het gebruik van externe kennisbanken (KBs) om terugkerende neurale netwerken voor machinelezen te verbeteren. Traditionele methoden die kennis van KBs benutten, coderen kennis als discrete indicatorkenmerken. Deze functies generaliseren niet alleen slecht, maar vereisen ook taakspecifieke feature engineering om goede prestaties te bereiken. We stellen KBLSTM voor, een nieuw neuraal model dat gebruik maakt van continue representaties van KBs om het leren van terugkerende neurale netwerken voor machine reading te verbeteren. Om achtergrondkennis effectief te integreren met informatie uit de momenteel verwerkte tekst, maakt ons model gebruik van een aandachtsmechanisme met een wachter om adaptief te beslissen of er aandacht wordt besteed aan achtergrondkennis en welke informatie van KBs nuttig is. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model nauwkeurigheiden bereikt die de vorige state-of-the-art resultaten overtreffen voor zowel entiteitsextractie als gebeurtenisextractie op de veel gebruikte ACE2005 dataset.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag konzentriert sich darauf, wie externe Wissensbasen (KBs) genutzt werden können, um wiederkehrende neuronale Netze für das maschinelle Lesen zu verbessern. Traditionelle Methoden, die Wissen aus KBs nutzen, kodieren Wissen als diskrete Indikatormerkmale. Diese Funktionen verallgemeinern sich nicht nur schlecht, sondern erfordern auch aufgabenspezifisches Feature Engineering, um eine gute Leistung zu erzielen. Wir schlagen KBLSTM vor, ein neuartiges neuronales Modell, das kontinuierliche Repräsentationen von KBs nutzt, um das Lernen wiederkehrender neuronaler Netzwerke für das maschinelle Lesen zu verbessern. Um Hintergrundwissen effektiv mit Informationen aus dem aktuell bearbeiteten Text zu integrieren, nutzt unser Modell einen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus mit einem Sentinel, um adaptiv zu entscheiden, ob Hintergrundwissen und welche Informationen aus KBs nützlich sind. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell sowohl für Entitätenextraktion als auch Ereignisextraktion auf dem weit verbreiteten ACE2005-Datensatz Genauigkeiten erzielt, die die bisherigen State-of-the-Art-Ergebnisse übertreffen.', 'ko': '본고는 주로 외부 지식 라이브러리(KBs)를 이용하여 기계 읽기 중의 귀속 신경 네트워크를 개선하는 방법을 연구한다.지식 라이브러리에서 지식의 전통적인 방법을 이용하여 지식을 분리된 지표 특징으로 인코딩한다.이러한 특성은 통용성이 떨어질 뿐만 아니라 임무에 특정한 특성 공정을 통해 좋은 성능을 실현해야 한다.우리는 KBLSTM을 제기했는데 이것은 새로운 신경 모델로 KBs의 연속적인 표시를 이용하여 기계 읽기 중의 귀속 신경 네트워크의 학습을 강화한다.배경 지식과 현재 처리 텍스트의 정보를 효과적으로 통합시키기 위해 우리의 모델은 보초병을 가진 주의 메커니즘을 채택하여 배경 지식과 지식 라이브러리에서 어떤 정보가 유용한지 적응적으로 결정한다.실험 결과, 널리 사용되는 ACE2005 데이터 세트에서 솔리드 추출 및 이벤트 추출에 대한 우리 모델의 정밀도는 이전의 최신 결과보다 높았습니다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini fokus pada bagaimana mengambil keuntungan dari pangkalan pengetahuan luar (KB) untuk meningkatkan jaringan saraf berkurang untuk pembacaan mesin. Traditional methods that exploit knowledge from KBs encode knowledge as discrete indicator features.  Bukan hanya karakteristik-karakteristik ini mendeneralisasi buruk, tetapi mereka membutuhkan karakteristik-spesifik teknik tugas untuk mencapai prestasi yang baik. Kami mengusulkan KBLSTM, model saraf yang baru yang menggunakan represensi terus menerus KB untuk meningkatkan belajar jaringan saraf yang berulang-ulang untuk pembacaan mesin. Untuk secara efektif mengintegrasikan pengetahuan latar belakang dengan informasi dari teks yang sedang diproses, model kami menggunakan mekanisme perhatian dengan sentinel untuk memutuskan secara adaptif apakah untuk menghadiri pengetahuan latar belakang dan apa informasi dari KBs berguna. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita mencapai akurasi yang melebihi hasil state-of-the-art sebelumnya untuk ekstraksi entitas dan ekstraksi peristiwa pada set data ACE2005 yang sangat digunakan.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روی چگونه استفاده از پایگاه دانش خارجی (KBs) برای بهتر کردن شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cهای تکرار برای خواندن ماشین را تمرکز می\u200cکند. روش\u200cهای سنتی که علم را از کیب\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای مختلف می\u200cدهد. نه تنها این ویژگی\u200cها بد عمومی می\u200cکنند، بلکه آنها نیاز دارند مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای رسیدن عملکرد خوب باشند. ما KBLSTM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل عصبی جدید که نمایش\u200cهای دائمی از کیب\u200cها را برای افزایش یادگیری شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره برای خواندن ماشین تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد. برای تغییر عملی دانش پشتیبانی با اطلاعات از متن پرداخته شده در حال حاضر، مدل ما یک مکانیسم توجه با یک منطقه برای تصمیم گیری که آیا به دانش پشتیبانی حاضر شود و کدام اطلاعات از KB مفید است استفاده می کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما دقیقات را می\u200cرساند که نتیجه\u200cهای اولین موقعیت هنر را برای استخراج و استخراج اتفاقات در مجموعه داده\u200cهای وسیع استفاده شده ACE2005 بیشتر از آن می\u200cگذارد.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inalenga jinsi ya kutumia misingi ya maarifa ya nje (KBs) ili kuboresha mitandao ya neura yanayoendelea kwa ajili ya kusoma mashine. njia za kitamaduni ambazo zinatumia maarifa kutoka KBs zinaonyesha maarifa kama alama za kina tofauti. Sio tu hizi vipengele vinavyofanya vibaya, lakini wanahitaji ubunifu maalum wa kazi ili kufikia ufanisi mzuri. Tunawapendekeza KBLSTM, mtindo wa kisasa unaoendelea kuwakilisha wataalamu wa KBs kuendelea kuongeza kujifunza mitandao ya taratibu kwa ajili ya kusoma mashine. Ili kuunganisha ufahamu wa background kwa taarifa kutoka kwa ujumbe wa maandishi yanayoendeshwa hivi sasa, mwelekeo wetu anatumia mfumo wa ufuatiliaji na kituo kinachotumia vizuri kuamua ikiwa ni kuhudhuria maarifa ya nyuma na taarifa gani kutoka KBs inafaa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanikiwa ukweli ambao unapitisha matokeo ya hali ya sanaa yaliyopita kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa vyombo vya habari na kutengenezwa kwa matukio yanayotumika sana kwenye seti ya takwimu za ACE2005.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz maşynyň okamaky üçin ýene-täsirli näyral şebekeleri ýüzeltmek üçin daşaryk bilgi baseleriniň (KB) nyşanlarynyň ýerini nähili ulanmagy üçin ünsüni berilýär. KB'den bilimi ulanan däpli yöntemler diskret görkezilişi hökmünde bilimi kodlaýar. Diňe bu özellikler ýaman bir şekilde däl däl, ýöne olara gowy ukyp başarmak üçin zadyň belli enjiniýeti gerek. Biz KBLSTM'i, maşynyň okamak üçin tekrarly näral a ýtlary öwrenmesini täsirleýän bir nural nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Arkaplan bilgilerini häzirki işledilen metin bilen maglumatlar bilen üýtgetmek üçin, biziň modelimiz arkaplan bilgilerine gatnaşmagy we kähili maglumatyň faydaly bolmagyny saýlamak üçin düzgün bir mehanizme ulanýar. Durmanyň netijeleri biziň nusgamyzyň hem birnäçe guram taýýarlanmagyň we evet taýýarlanmagyň ACE2005 veri setirinde has ýüzerinde degişliklerimizi ýetip barýandygyny görkezýär.", 'af': "Hierdie papier fokus op hoe om voordeel van eksterne kennis bases (Kb) te neem om herhaalde neuralnetwerke vir masjien lees te verbeter. Tradisjoneel metodes wat kennis uit Kbs uitgebruik kodeer kennis as diskrete indikator funksies. Nie alleen doen hierdie funksies algemeen verkeerd, maar hulle benodig taak-spesifieke funksie inženiering om goeie funksies te bereik nie. Ons stel KBLSTM voorstel, 'n nuwe neural model wat voortdurende voorstellings van KBs verwyder om die leer van herhaalde neuralnetwerke te verbeter vir masjien lees. Om agtergrond kennis effektief te integreer met inligting van die huidiglik verwerking teks, gebruik ons model 'n aandag mekanisme met 'n sentineel om aanpaslik te besluit of om by agtergrond kennis te bied en wat inligting van Kbs gebruik is. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model bereik akkurasies wat die vorige state-of-the-art resultate oorvloedig vir beide uitpakking van entiteite en gebeurtenis uitpakking op die vaste gebruikte ACE2005 datastel.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përqëndrohet në mënyrën se si të përfitojmë nga bazat e jashtme të njohurive (KBs) për të përmirësuar rrjetet neurale të përsëritura për leximin e makinave. Metodat tradicionale që shfrytëzojnë njohuritë nga KBs kodojnë njohuritë si karakteristika diskrete tregues. Jo vetëm që këto karakteristika gjeneralizohen keq, por ato kërkojnë inxhinieri specifik për detyrat për të arritur performancë të mirë. We propose KBLSTM, a novel neural model that leverages continuous representations of KBs to enhance the learning of recurrent neural networks for machine reading.  Për të integruar efektivisht njohuritë e sfondit me informacionin nga teksti aktual i procesuar, modeli ynë përdor një mekanizëm vëmendjeje me një sentinel për të vendosur në mënyrë të përshtatshme nëse duhet të ndjekë njohuritë e sfondit dhe cila informacion nga KBs është e dobishme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë arrin saktësitë që kalojnë rezultatet e mëparshme të state-of-the-art si për nxjerrjen e njësisë ashtu dhe nxjerrjen e ngjarjeve në grupin e të dhënave të përdorura gjerësisht ACE2005.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የውጭው እውቀት መቀመጫዎች (KBs) እንዴት ለመጠቀም ይታያል፡፡ የKBs እውቀትን የሚጠይቁ የባሕላዊ ዘዴዎች እውቀትን እንደ ጥያቄ ማሳየት እውቀት ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህን ምርጫዎች ድህነትን ማድረግ ብቻ አይችሉም፥ ነገር ግን መልካምን ማድረግ ለማግኘት የስራ-ፍጥረት ኢንጂንጂንጂር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ KBLSTM (KBLSTM) የዘላለም የነዌብ አካባቢ የKBs (KBs) መልዕክቶች የሚቆጠሩ የደዌብ መረብ ለመማር እንዲያበዛ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የመደቡን እውቀት ለማቀናቀል በተደረገው ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የመረጃ መረጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል፣ ሞዴሌዎቻችን የስሜት ማሰናከል ማሰናከል እና የትኛውን መረጃ ከKBs የሚጠቅመው እንደሆነ በማስተካከል ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ምሳሌያችን የቀድሞውን የዓላማ ውጤት አካባቢ ውጤት እና በACE2005 ዳታ ማውጣት ላይ በተስፋው ላይ የሚያሳልፍ እርግጠኝነት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na način korištenja spoljnih baza znanja (KBs) kako bi poboljšala rekonstruirane neuralne mreže za čitanje strojeva. Tradicionalne metode koje koriste znanje iz KBs kodiraju znanje kao diskretne karakteristike indikatora. Ne samo da se te funkcije loše općeliraju, nego zahtijevaju inženjerstvo za specifične funkcije zadataka kako bi postigli dobru funkciju. Predlažemo KBLSTM, novi neuralni model koji utječe na stalne predstave KB-a kako bi poboljšali učenje ponovnih neuralnih mreža za čitanje strojeva. Da bi učinkovito integrirali pozadinsko znanje s informacijama iz trenutno obrađenog teksta, naš model zapošljava pažnju mehanizam sa sentinelom da prilagodimo odluči da li prisustvovati pozadinskim znanjima i koje informacije iz KB-a koriste. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne tačnosti koje nadmažu prethodne rezultate umjetnosti kako izvlačenja subjekta, tako i izvlačenja događaja na široko korištenoj seriji podataka ACE2005.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է այն բանի վրա, թե ինչպես օգտագործել արտաքին գիտելիքների հիմքերը (ԿԲ) մեքենաների կարդալու համար կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերը բարելավելու համար: Հավանդական մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են ԿԲ-ի գիտելիքները կոդավորում են գիտելիքը որպես անհնար ցուցանիշներ: Այս առանձնահատկությունները ոչ միայն վատ են ընդհանրացվում, այլ նաև պահանջում են խնդիրների հատուկ առանձնահատկությունների ճարտարագիտություն լավ արդյունք հասնելու համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ԿԲԼՍԹՄ-ը, նոր նյարդային մոդել, որը օգտագործում է ԿԲ-ի անընդհատ ներկայացումները, որպեսզի զարգացնի մեքենային կարդալու համար կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերի ուսումնասիրությունը: Որպեսզի արդյունավետ ինտեգրենք ֆոնդի գիտելիքները ներկայիս վերաբերված տեքստի տեղեկատվության հետ, մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է ուշադրության մեխանիզմ զգայական միջոցով, որպեսզի ադապտիվ որոշենք, թե պետք է մասնակցել ֆոնդի գիտելիքների հետ Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հասնում է ճշգրտություններին, որոնք գերազանցում են նախորդ ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքները, և միավորների վերացման և իրադարձությունների վերացման համար լայնորեն օգտագործված ACE2005 տվյալների համակարգում:', 'az': "Bu kağıt maşın oxumaq üçün tekrarlı nöral ağlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün dış bilgi üssələrindən necə istifadə etməyi tələb edir. KB'lərdən elmi istifadə edən ehtimal metodlar elmi müxtəlif göstəricisi olaraq kodlayır. Bu xüsusiyyətlər yalnız zəif olaraq təmizlənirlər, lakin onlar yaxşı performansı yerinə yetirmək üçün task-specific xüsusiyyətlər mühendisliyini lazım edirlər. Biz KBLSTM'i yeni nöral modeli təbliğ edirik ki, makinelərin oxunması üçün yenidən nöral a ğlarının öyrənməsini daha da artırmaq üçün KBs'in sürəkli təşkil edilməsini təmin edir. Artıq işlədilən məktubların məlumatlarına arxa plan bilgiləri müəyyən edilmək üçün modelimiz, arxa plan bilgilərinə katılmaq və KB-lərdən hansı məlumatların faydalı olduğunu təmin etmək üçün sentinel məlumatları ilə istifadə edir. Eksperiment sonuçları göstərir ki, modellərimiz çox istifadə edilmiş ACE2005 veri qutusu ilə birlikdə hər birinin çıxarılması və olaraq çıxarılması üçün əvvəlki mövcuddur.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি মেশিন পড়ার জন্য পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক উন্নত করার জন্য বাইরে জ্ঞানের বেসের (কেবিএস) ব্যবহার করার ব্যাপারে মনোযো ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদ্ধতি যা কেবিএস থেকে জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত নির্দেশকের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে জ্ শুধুমাত্র এই বৈশিষ্ট্য দুর্বল সাধারণ করে না, কিন্তু তাদের কাজ-বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ইঞ্জিনিয়ার প্রয়োজন যাতে ভ আমরা কেবিএলস্টিএম, একটি নভেল নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা কেবিএসের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বাড়ানোর জন্য পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি  বর্তমানে প্রক্রিয়ার টেক্সট থেকে তথ্য নিয়ে পটভূমির জ্ঞান সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য, আমাদের মডেল একটি মনোযোগ মেকেন্দ্রীয় ব্যবস্থা করেছে যাতে তারা সিদ্ধ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করেছে যা পূর্ববর্তী রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল উভয় বস্তুকে বিদেশী ব্যবহৃত ACE2005 ডাটাস', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zaměřuje na to, jak využít externích znalostních bází (KBs) ke zlepšení rekurentních neuronových sítí pro strojové čtení. Tradiční metody, které využívají znalosti z KBs, kódují znalosti jako diskrétní indikátorové prvky. Nejen, že se tyto funkce špatně zobecňují, ale vyžadují pro dosažení dobrého výkonu specifické funkce pro daný úkol. Navrhujeme KBLSTM, nový neuronový model, který využívá kontinuální reprezentace KBs pro zlepšení učení rekurentních neuronových sítí pro strojové čtení. Pro efektivní integraci pozadí s informacemi z aktuálně zpracovaného textu využívá náš model mechanismus pozornosti se strážcem, který adaptivně rozhodne, zda se bude věnovat pozadí a které informace z KBs jsou užitečné. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model dosahuje přesností, které překonávají předchozí nejmodernější výsledky jak pro extrakci entit, tak pro extrakci událostí na široce používané datové sadě ACE2005.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na korištenje spoljnih baza znanja (KB) kako bi poboljšala rekonstruirane neuralne mreže za čitanje strojeva. Tradicionalne metode koje koriste znanje iz KBs kodiraju znanje kao diskretne karakteristike indikatora. Ne samo da te karakteristike generalizuju loše, već zahtevaju inženjerstvo za specifične funkcije zadataka kako bi postigli dobru funkciju. Predlažemo KBLSTM, novi neuralni model koji utiče na neprestano predstavljanje KB-a kako bi poboljšali učenje ponovnih neuralnih mreža za čitanje strojeva. Da bi učinkovito integrirali pozadinsko znanje sa informacijama iz trenutno obrađenog teksta, naš model zapošljava pažnju mehanizam sa sentinelom da prilagodimo odluči da li prisustvovati pozadinskim znanjima i koje informacije iz KB-a koriste. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne tačnosti koje prelaze prethodne rezultate umjetnosti za izvlačenje entiteta i izvlačenje događaja na široko korištenom setu podataka ACE2005.', 'ca': "Aquest article es centra en com aprofitar les bases externes de coneixement (KB) per millorar les xarxes neurals recurrents per llegir màquines. Métodes tradicionals que expliquen el coneixement de KB codifiquen el coneixement com a característiques discretes d'indicador. No només aquestes característiques s'generalitzen malament, sinó que necessiten enginyeria de característiques específices per aconseguir bons resultats. Proposem KBLSTM, un nou model neural que aprofita representacions contínues de KB per millorar l'aprenentatge de xarxes neurals recurrents per llegir màquines. Per integrar eficaçment el coneixement de fons amb la informació del text actualment processat, el nostre model utilitza un mecanisme d'atenció amb un sentinel per decidir adaptadament si atendre al coneixement de fons i quina informació de KB és útil. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model aconsegueix precisions que superen els resultats més avançats anteriors tant per l'extracció d'entitats com per l'extracció d'events en el conjunt de dades ACE2005 que s'utilitza molt.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö keskendub sellele, kuidas kasutada ära väliseid teadmistebaase, et parandada masinlugemiseks korduvaid neurovõrke. Traditsioonilised meetodid, mis kasutavad ära KB teadmisi, kodeerivad teadmisi diskreetsete indikaatorifunktsioonidena. Need funktsioonid ei üldista mitte ainult halvasti, vaid nõuavad heade jõudluste saavutamiseks ülesandepõhist funktsioonide projekteerimist. Pakume välja KBLSTM, uudse närvimudeli, mis kasutab KB pidevaid esitlusi, et parandada korduvate närvivõrkude õppimist masinlugemiseks. Taustteadmiste tõhusaks integreerimiseks praegu töödeldud teksti teabega kasutab meie mudel tähelepanumehhanismi koos sentinelliga, et kohandada otsustada, kas taustateadmisega tegeleda ja milline teave KB-lt on kasulik. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab täpsuse, mis ületab varasemaid tipptasemel tulemusi nii üksuste ekstraheerimisel kui ka sündmuste ekstraheerimisel laialdaselt kasutatud ACE2005 andmekogumil.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään siihen, miten ulkoisten tietokantojen (KB) hyödyntäminen voidaan parantaa toistuvia neuroverkkoja konelukua varten. Perinteiset menetelmät, jotka hyödyntävät tietoa KB:stä, koodaavat tietoa erillisinä indikaattoreina. Nämä ominaisuudet yleistyvät huonosti, mutta ne vaativat tehtäväkohtaista ominaisuussuunnittelua hyvän suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi. Ehdotamme KBLSTM-mallia, joka hyödyntää jatkuvaa KB-esitystä parantaakseen toistuvien neuroverkkojen oppimista konelukua varten. Jotta taustatieto voidaan integroida tehokkaasti käsiteltävän tekstin tietoihin, mallimme käyttää tarkkaavaismekanismia, jossa on vartija, joka päättää mukautuvasti, pitäisikö taustatietoa ottaa huomioon ja mitkä KB:n tiedot ovat hyödyllisiä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme saavuttaa tarkkuuksia, jotka ylittävät aiemmat huipputekniset tulokset sekä entiteettien että tapahtumapoimintan osalta laajalti käytetyssä ACE2005-aineistossa.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Name Ora iso nggawe Perintah sing paling apik, pero iso nggawe task-special jenis nggunian kanggo ngerasakno akeh lanjur. Awak dhéwé nggunakake kKST, model sing nyebuturan Neral sing bisa nyebuturan gak ngupakan karo kêb bantêr kanggo nglanggar sampeyan Jaringan Neral sing di sistem maneh kanggo basa gambar. iso nggawe informasi sing paling-sistem sing dikarepaké karo informasi sing nggambar teks sing bisa nguasai, model nambah dhéwé modèl kuwi tindakan kanggo nguasakno sistem sing beraksi kapan mulasai sing bisa nguasakno cilihan kanggo ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno karo sak informasi sing beraksi ning kB Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתמקדת על איך לנצל בסיסי ידע חיצוניים (KBs) כדי לשפר רשתות עצביות חוזרות לקריאה מכונות. שיטות מסורתיות שמניצלות ידע מKBs קודם ידע כתכונות מדריכים דיסקרטיים. לא רק שהתכונות האלה מתפשטות באופן גרוע, אלא שהן דורשות הנדסה של תכונות מסויימות למשימה כדי להשיג ביצועים טובים. אנו מציעים KBLSTM, מודל עצבי חדש שמשתמש מייצגים ממשיכים של KBs כדי לשפר את הלימוד של רשתות עצביות מתחזרות לקריאה מכונות. כדי להשתלב באופן יעיל את הידע הרקע עם מידע מהטקסט המעובד כרגע, המודל שלנו משתמש במנגנון תשומת לב עם סנטינל כדי להחליט באופן מתאים אם להשתתף בידע הרקע ואיזה מידע מKBs הוא שימושי. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהדוגמנית שלנו משיגה מדויקות שמעבירות את התוצאות הקודמות של המצב המיוחד לשני חיפוש יחידות וגם חיפוש אירועים על קבוצת מידע ACE2005 השתמשת בצורה רחבה.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ɗin na fokus a kan ka yi amfani da wajen bassi na ilmi na baka (KBs) ga gyara zane-tarakin da aka sake karanta kwamfyuta mai daɗi. KCharselect unicode block name Ba su sami wannan feature kawai ga mai zartar da haske, kuma suna ƙayyade muhimmin muhimmin aikin da za'a sami tsarin mai kyau. Munã buɗar KBLSM, wata salon neural na yanzu wanda ke samarara mabuwãyar watayyar KBs don ya ƙara wa karantar kwamfyutan neural da aka sake karatun kwamfyuta. To, dõmin ya haɗa ilmi na bangon kwamfyuta da information daga matsayin wanda aka aiki da yanzu yanzu, yana amfani da misalinmu, yana da wani alama wa aikin muhimmin aiki da wani sauri dõmin ya yarda yin hukunci idan ana haɗa kan ilmi na bakin bangon kuma wanne maɓalli daga KBs yana da amfani. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu ya sami gaskiyar da za'a sami matsala na zaman halin-sanar da za'a sami duk masu cire abun abun da alama masu amfani da akan tsarin da aka yi amfani da.", 'sk': 'Prispevek se osredotoča na to, kako izkoristiti zunanje baze znanja (KB) za izboljšanje ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij za strojno branje. Tradicionalne metode, ki izkoriščajo znanje iz KB, kodirajo znanje kot diskretne indikatorske funkcije. Ne samo, da se te funkcije slabo posplošijo, ampak zahtevajo specifično opravilo inženiring funkcij za dosego dobre zmogljivosti. Predlagamo KBLSTM, nov nevronski model, ki izkorišča stalne predstavitve KB za izboljšanje učenja ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij za strojno branje. Za učinkovito integriranje osnovnega znanja z informacijami iz trenutno obdelanega besedila naš model uporablja mehanizem pozornosti s stražo, ki prilagodljivo odloča, ali se bo udeležil osnovnega znanja in katere informacije iz KB so koristne. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model dosega natančnosti, ki presegajo prejšnje najsodobnejše rezultate za ekstrakcijo entitet in ekstrakcijo dogodkov na široko uporabljenem naboru podatkov ACE2005.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཕྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཇི་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ལ་དམིགས་གཏོང་འདུག KBs་ལས་སྔོན་སྲོལ་ཆེན་ལག་སྟར་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྟོགས་པ་ལ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། Not only do these features generalize poorly, but they require task-specific feature engineering to achieve good performance. ང་ཚོས་KBLSTM་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་རྩིས་ཐོག་མི་རྣམས་ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ཀློག་རྩིས་འཁོར To effectively integrate background knowledge with information from the currently processed text, our model employs an attention mechanism with a sentinel to adaptively decide whether to attend to background knowledge and which information from KBs is useful. Experimental results show that our model achieves accuracy that surpassed the previous state-of-the-art results for both entity extraction and event extraction on the widely used ACE2005 dataset.'}
{'en': 'Prerequisite Relation Learning for Concepts in MOOCs', 'ar': 'تعلم الارتباط المطلوب للمفاهيم في MOOCs', 'es': 'Aprendizaje relacional de requisitos previos para conceptos en MOOC', 'fr': 'Apprentissage relationnel préalable pour les concepts dans les MOOC', 'pt': 'Pré-requisito de Aprendizagem de Relações para Conceitos em MOOCs', 'ja': 'MOOCのコンセプトのための前提条件の関係学習', 'zh': 'MOOCä¹‹å…ˆä¹Ÿ', 'hi': 'MOOCs में अवधारणाओं के लिए पूर्वापेक्षा संबंध सीखना', 'ru': 'Предварительное обучение отношениям для концепций в MOOC', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Chaidrimh Réamhriachtanas le haghaidh Coincheapa i MOOCanna', 'ka': 'MOOCs', 'el': 'Απαραίτητη Μάθηση Σχέσεων για Έννοιες σε ΜΟΟΚ', 'hu': 'Előfeltétel Kapcsolattanulás a MOOC koncepciókhoz', 'it': 'Prerequisito Relation Learning per i concetti in MOOC', 'lt': 'Išankstinis ryšių mokymasis koncepcijoms MOOC', 'kk': 'MOOC концепцияларының алдындағы қатынас оқытуы', 'ml': 'MOOCs-ലുള്ള കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കായി ആവശ്യമുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Relazzjoni Prerekwiżit għal Kunċetti f’MOOCs', 'mk': 'Преусловно учење на односите за концепти во МООК', 'ms': 'Perhubungan Presyarat Belajar untuk Koncept dalam MOOC', 'mn': 'MOOCs-ын төлөвлөгөөний холбоотой суралцах', 'no': 'Førehandsvis relasjonslæring for konseptar i MOOCs', 'pl': 'Wstępne uczenie się relacji dla koncepcji w MOOCs', 'ro': 'Învățarea relației preliminare pentru concepte în MOOC', 'si': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'sr': 'Prerequiremeno učenje odnosa za koncept u MOOC-u', 'so': 'Waxbarashada xiriirka loo baahan yahay', 'sv': 'Förutsättning Relationslärande för begrepp i MOOC', 'ur': 'MOOCs میں مفصل کے لئے پیش فرصت رابطہ تعلیم', 'ta': 'MOOCகளில் உள்ள முன்னிருப்பு தொடர்பு கற்றுக்கொண்டுள்ளது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cần thiết về học về ý tưởng trong tổ chức.', 'bg': 'Предпоставка за обучение на отношенията за концепции в МООК', 'nl': 'Vereiste Relatielernen voor Concepten in MOOCs', 'da': 'Forudsætning Relation Learning for koncepter i MOOCs', 'id': 'Perhubungan Prerequisite Learning for Concepts in MOOCs', 'hr': 'Prerequiremeno učenje odnosa za koncept u MOOC-u', 'de': 'Voraussetzung für Relation Learning für Konzepte in MOOCs', 'ko': 'MOOCs에서 개념의 전제 관계 학습', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Kuhusiana', 'tr': 'MOOCs', 'af': 'Voorskoude Relasie Leer vir Koncepsies in MOOCs', 'sq': 'Mësimi i parakushtuar i marrëdhënieve për konceptet në MOOC', 'hy': 'ՄոՕԿ-ում գտնվող գաղափարների հարաբերությունների նախապայման սովորելը', 'az': 'MOOCs-l톛rd톛ki konseptl톛r 칲칞칲n 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'bs': 'Prerequiremeno učenje odnosa za koncept u MOOC-u', 'ca': 'Aprendiment de relacions pre-requisit per conceptes en MOOCs', 'bn': 'MOOCs-এ কনসেপ্টের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় সম্পর্ক শিক্ষা', 'fa': 'آموزش رابطه\u200cهای پیش\u200cنیاز برای مفهوم\u200cهای MOOCs', 'fi': 'Edellyttävä Suhteen oppiminen käsitteille MOOC:issa', 'cs': 'Předpokladné vztahové učení pro koncepty v MOOCs', 'et': 'MOOCi kontseptsioonide suhteõpe eeltingimus', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'לימוד מערכת יחסים מראש לקונצרטים ב MOOCs', 'ha': 'Prerequisite Relation Learning for Concepts in MOOCs', 'sk': 'Predpogoj Učenje odnosov za koncepte v MOOC', 'bo': 'MOOCs ནང་གི་ཚོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྗེས་སྦྱོར་བ'}
{'en': 'What prerequisite knowledge should students achieve a level of mastery before moving forward to learn subsequent coursewares? We study the extent to which the prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) can be inferred automatically. In particular, what kinds of information can be leverage to uncover the potential prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts. We first propose a representation learning-based method for learning latent representations of course concepts, and then investigate how different features capture the prerequisite relations between concepts. Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0 % by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.', 'ar': 'ما هي المعرفة الأساسية التي يجب أن يحققها الطلاب مستوى من الإتقان قبل المضي قدمًا في تعلم البرامج التعليمية اللاحقة؟ ندرس إلى أي مدى يمكن استنتاج العلاقة المسبقة بين مفاهيم المعرفة في الدورات الضخمة المفتوحة عبر الإنترنت (MOOCs) تلقائيًا. على وجه الخصوص ، ما هي أنواع المعلومات التي يمكن أن تكون وسيلة فعالة للكشف عن العلاقة المسبقة المحتملة بين مفاهيم المعرفة. نقترح أولاً طريقة قائمة على التعلم للتمثيل لتعلم التمثيلات الكامنة لمفاهيم الدورة التدريبية ، ثم نتحرى كيف تلتقط الميزات المختلفة العلاقات المطلوبة مسبقًا بين المفاهيم. تُظهر تجاربنا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات من Coursera أن الطريقة المقترحة تحقق تحسينات كبيرة (+ 5.9-48.0٪ حسب درجة F1) مقارنة بالطرق الحالية.', 'es': '¿Qué conocimientos previos deben los estudiantes alcanzar un nivel de dominio antes de seguir aprendiendo los cursos posteriores? Estudiamos hasta qué punto se puede inferir automáticamente la relación de requisitos previos entre los conceptos de conocimiento en los Cursos en Línea Masivos y Abiertos (MOOC). En particular, qué tipos de información se pueden aprovechar para descubrir la posible relación de requisitos previos entre los conceptos de conocimiento. Primero proponemos un método basado en el aprendizaje de la representación para aprender representaciones latentes de los conceptos del curso, y luego investigamos cómo las diferentes características capturan las relaciones de requisitos previos entre los conceptos. Nuestros experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos de Coursera muestran que el método propuesto logra mejoras significativas (+5,9-48,0% según la puntuación de F1) en comparación con los métodos existentes.', 'fr': "Quelles connaissances préalables les étudiants doivent-ils atteindre un niveau de maîtrise avant de passer à l'apprentissage des didacticiels suivants\xa0? Nous étudions dans quelle mesure la relation préalable entre les concepts de connaissances dans les cours en ligne ouverts à tous (MOOC) peut être déduite automatiquement. En particulier, quels types d'informations peuvent être exploités pour découvrir la relation préalable potentielle entre les concepts de connaissances. Nous proposons d'abord une méthode basée sur l'apprentissage des représentations pour apprendre les représentations latentes des concepts de cours, puis nous étudions comment différentes fonctionnalités capturent les relations préalables entre les concepts. Nos expériences sur trois ensembles de données de Coursera montrent que la méthode proposée apporte des améliorations significatives (+5,9-48,0\xa0% par score F1) par rapport aux méthodes existantes.", 'pt': 'Que pré-requisitos de conhecimento os alunos devem atingir um nível de domínio antes de avançar para aprender os cursos subsequentes? Estudamos até que ponto a relação de pré-requisitos entre conceitos de conhecimento em Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) pode ser inferida automaticamente. Em particular, que tipos de informação podem ser aproveitados para descobrir a relação de pré-requisito potencial entre os conceitos de conhecimento. Propomos primeiro um método baseado em aprendizagem de representação para aprender representações latentes de conceitos de curso e, em seguida, investigamos como diferentes características capturam as relações de pré-requisito entre os conceitos. Nossos experimentos em três conjuntos de dados do Coursera mostram que o método proposto alcança melhorias significativas (+5,9-48,0% pela pontuação F1) em comparação com os métodos existentes.', 'ja': '後続のコースウェアを学ぶ前に、学習者はどのような前提知識を習得すべきか？私たちは、Massive Open Online Course （ MOOC ）における知識概念間の前提条件関係が自動的に推論できる範囲を研究しています。特に、知識概念間の潜在的な前提条件関係を明らかにするために、どのような情報を活用できるか。まず、コース概念の潜在的な表現を学習するための表現学習ベースの方法を提案し、次に、異なる特徴が概念間の前提関係をどのように取り込むかを調査する。Courseraを形成する3つのデータセットの実験では、提案された方法は、既存の方法と比較して有意な改善（ F 1スコアによる+5.9-48.0 ％ ）を達成することが示されています。', 'hi': 'छात्रों को बाद के कोर्सवेयर सीखने के लिए आगे बढ़ने से पहले महारत का स्तर क्या आवश्यक ज्ञान प्राप्त करना चाहिए? हम उस हद तक अध्ययन करते हैं जिस तक बड़े पैमाने पर ओपन ऑनलाइन पाठ्यक्रमों (MOOCs) में ज्ञान अवधारणाओं के बीच पूर्वशर्त संबंध स्वचालित रूप से अनुमान लगाया जा सकता है। विशेष रूप से, ज्ञान अवधारणाओं के बीच संभावित शर्त संबंध को उजागर करने के लिए किस प्रकार की जानकारी का लाभ उठाया जा सकता है। हम पहले पाठ्यक्रम अवधारणाओं के अव्यक्त प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने-आधारित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और फिर जांच करते हैं कि विभिन्न विशेषताएं अवधारणाओं के बीच पूर्वशर्त संबंधों को कैसे कैप्चर करती हैं। तीन डेटासेट फॉर्म Coursera पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि मौजूदा तरीकों की तुलना में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार (F1-स्कोर द्वारा + 5.9-48.0%) प्राप्त करती है।', 'zh': '继学课件前,弟子何所必备? 论大开在线程(MOOC)其先决可自推如此。 所以然者,以何名之先也? 先立学程,然后究其异端。 臣等于Coursera三数集之实验,比于今法,所陈之法,显进(+5.9-48.0%F1分数)。', 'ru': 'Какие предварительные знания студенты должны приобрести на определенном уровне, прежде чем двигаться вперед, чтобы изучать последующие предметы? Мы изучаем, в какой степени необходимое соотношение между понятиями знаний в массовых открытых онлайн-курсах (MOOC) может быть выведено автоматически. В частности, какие виды информации могут быть использованы для выявления потенциальной связи между концепциями знаний. Сначала мы предлагаем основанный на представлении метод обучения для изучения скрытых представлений концепций курса, а затем исследуем, как различные особенности захватывают необходимые отношения между концепциями. Наши эксперименты по трем наборам данных из Coursera показывают, что предлагаемый метод достигает значительных улучшений (+5,9-48,0% по шкале F1) по сравнению с существующими методами.', 'ga': 'Cén réamhriachtanas eolais ar cheart do mhic léinn leibhéal máistreachta a bhaint amach sula dtéann siad ar aghaidh le hearraí cúrsa a fhoghlaim ina dhiaidh sin? Déanaimid staidéar ar a mhéid is féidir an gaol réamhriachtanas idir coincheapa eolais i gCúrsaí Ollmhóra Oscailte Ar Líne (MOOCanna) a thuiscint go huathoibríoch. Go háirithe, cad iad na cineálacha faisnéise is féidir a ghiaráil chun an gaol réamhriachtanas féideartha idir coincheapa an eolais a nochtadh. Molaimid ar dtús modh bunaithe ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta chun léiriú folaigh ar choincheapa cúrsa a fhoghlaim, agus ansin fiosraimid conas a shealbhaíonn gnéithe éagsúla an caidreamh réamhriachtanas idir coincheapa. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí ó Coursera go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha bainte amach ag an modh molta (+5.9-48.0% de réir scór F1) i gcomparáid leis na modhanna atá ann cheana féin.', 'ka': 'რას უნდა სტუდენტები სტუდენტები გადასწავლათ შემდეგ კუდენტების გასწავლებისთვის წინ სტუდენტების დონე? ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებული კონფექტების შესახებ მასიური გახსნილი ინტერნეტიკური კურსებში (MOOCs) ავტომატურად შეიძლება იყოს. განსაკუთრებულია, რა სახელი ინფორმაცია შეიძლება იყოს, რომ გააკვირთოთ პროცენტური უნდა უნდა იყოს ცნობიერების კონფექტის შესახებ. ჩვენ პირველად განვიწყებთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულებების შესახებ კონფექტის განსხვავებაში, როგორ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულებები კონფექტის შორის შესახებ. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები სამი მონაცემების ფორმა კორსერა გამოჩვენება, რომ მიზედომა მეტი მიიღება მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთესება (+5.9-48.0% F1-score) სხვადასხვა პროც', 'hu': 'Milyen előfeltételes ismereteknek kell a hallgatóknak elérniük a mesterképzés szintjét, mielőtt továbblépnének a későbbi tanfolyamok megtanulásához? Tanulmányozzuk, milyen mértékben lehet automatikusan következtetni a Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC) tudáskoncepciók közötti előfeltételek közötti kapcsolatot. Különösen, milyen típusú információkat lehet felhasználni a tudáskoncepciók közötti potenciális előfeltételek összefüggésének feltárására. Először egy reprezentációs tanuláson alapuló módszert javasolunk a tanfolyamfogalmak látens reprezentációinak tanulására, majd vizsgáljuk meg, hogy a különböző funkciók hogyan ragadják meg a koncepciók közötti előfeltételek kapcsolatokat. A Coursera három adatkészleten végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer jelentős javulást ér el (+5,9-48,0% F1-pontszámmal) a meglévő módszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Ποιες προαπαιτούμενες γνώσεις πρέπει οι μαθητές να επιτύχουν ένα επίπεδο δεξιοτεχνίας πριν προχωρήσουν προς τα εμπρός για να μάθουν επόμενα μαθήματα; Μελετάμε τον βαθμό στον οποίο η απαραίτητη σχέση μεταξύ εννοιών γνώσης στα μαζικά ανοικτά διαδικτυακά μαθήματα μπορεί να συναχθεί αυτόματα. Ειδικότερα, τι είδους πληροφορίες μπορούν να αποτελέσουν μοχλό για να αποκαλύψουν την πιθανή απαραίτητη σχέση μεταξύ των εννοιών γνώσης. Πρώτα προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο αναπαράστασης βασισμένη στη μάθηση για την εκμάθηση λανθάνουσας αναπαραστάσεων εννοιών μαθημάτων, και στη συνέχεια διερευνούμε πώς διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά αποτυπώνουν τις απαραίτητες σχέσεις μεταξύ εννοιών. Τα πειράματά μας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων του δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις (+5.9-48.0% από βαθμολογία F1) σε σύγκριση με τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους.', 'it': "Quali conoscenze preliminari dovrebbero gli studenti raggiungere un livello di padronanza prima di andare avanti per imparare corsi successivi? Studiamo fino a che punto la relazione prerequisito tra concetti di conoscenza in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC) può essere dedotta automaticamente. In particolare, quali tipi di informazioni possono essere sfruttate per scoprire il potenziale rapporto prerequisito tra concetti di conoscenza. Per prima cosa proponiamo un metodo basato sull'apprendimento della rappresentazione per imparare le rappresentazioni latenti dei concetti del corso, e poi analizziamo come diverse caratteristiche catturano le relazioni prerequisiti tra i concetti. I nostri esperimenti su tre set di dati di Coursera mostrano che il metodo proposto raggiunge miglioramenti significativi (+5,9-48,0% di F1-score) rispetto ai metodi esistenti.", 'kk': 'Келесі мектептерді үйрену алдында студенттер қандай білім жеткізу керек? Біз массалық ашық онлайн курстарындағы білім концепцияларының алдындағы қатынасы автоматты түрде аударылады. Әрине, білім тәсілдерінің арасындағы қандай мәліметтерді ашу үшін қандай түрлі мәлімет мүмкін болады. Біз біріншіден келесі тәсілдерді оқыту үшін үйренудің негізінде тәртібін ұсынамыз. Содан кейін, тәсілдер арасындағы тәсілдердің қалай түрлі қасиеттері қалай қалай қалай қатынас Үш деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелеріміз Корсера әдісі бар әдістерімен салыстырылып тұрғанын көрсетеді (+5, 9- 48, 0% деген жұмыс істейтін тәжірибелеріміз).', 'lt': 'Kokios iš anksto būtinos žinios turėtų moksleiviai pasiekti masterizacijos lygį prieš judant į priekį mokytis vėlesnių kursų kanalų? Mes tiriame, kokiu mastu galima automatiškai daryti prielaidą apie žinių sąvokų santykį masiniuose atviruose interneto kursuose. In particular, what kinds of information can be leverage to uncover the potential prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts.  Pirmiausia siūlome reprezentacinį mokymosi metodą mokytis latentinių mokymosi koncepcijų, o vėliau tiriame, kaip skirtingos savybės apima būtinus sąvokų santykius. Mūsų eksperimentai su trimis Coursera duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad siūlomas metodas pasiekia reikšmingų patobulinimų (+5,9–48,0 % pagal F1 balas), palyginti su esamais metodais.', 'mk': 'Какво предусловно знаење треба студентите да постигнат ниво на мајсторство пред да продолжат да научат следни курсни канализации? Го проучуваме степенот во кој предусловната врска помеѓу концептите на знаење во масовните отворени онлајн курси (МООК) може автоматски да се заклучи. Особено, какви информации можат да бидат влијание за откривање на потенцијалната предусловна врска помеѓу концептите на знаење. Прво предложуваме метод заснован на претставување на училиште за учење тајни претставувања на концептите на секако, а потоа истражуваме како различните карактеристики ги заземаат предусловните односи помеѓу концептите. Нашите експерименти на три датотеки формираат Курсера покажуваат дека предложениот метод постигнува значителни подобрувања (+5,9-48,0 отсто по оценката F1) во споредба со постојните методи.', 'mt': 'What prerequisite knowledge should students achieve a level of mastery before moving forward to learn subsequent coursewares?  Aħna nistudjaw sa liema punt ir-relazzjoni prerekwiżit bejn il-kunċetti tal-għarfien f’Korsijiet Massivi Miftuħa Online (MOOCs) tista’ tiġi inferita awtomatikament. B’mod partikolari, x’tip ta’ informazzjoni tista’ tkun ingranaġġ biex tiġi skoperta r-relazzjoni potenzjali prerekwiżit bejn kunċetti ta’ għarfien. L-ewwel nett nipproponu metodu bbażat fuq it-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentanza għat-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet latenti ta’ kunċetti ta’ kors, u mbagħad ninvestigaw kif karatteristiċi differenti jaqbdu r-relazzjonijiet prerekwiżiti bejn kunċetti. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta tal-Coursera juru li l-metodu propost jikseb titjib sinifikanti (+5.9-48.0% skont il-punteġġ F1) meta mqabbel mal-metodi eżistenti.', 'ms': 'Apa pengetahuan awal syarat yang patut pelajar mencapai tahap pemerintahan sebelum bergerak ke hadapan untuk belajar halaman belajar kemudian? Kami mempelajari jangkauan yang mana hubungan prerekwiżit antara konsep pengetahuan dalam Jalan Online terbuka Massive (MOOCs) boleh dikira secara automatik. Secara khususnya, maklumat jenis apa yang boleh menjadi pengaruh untuk mengungkap hubungan prasyarat potensi antara konsep pengetahuan. Kami pertama-tama melamar kaedah pembelajaran berdasarkan pengajaran untuk mempelajari persembahan tertutup konsep, dan kemudian menyelidiki bagaimana ciri-ciri berbeza menangkap hubungan prasyarat antara konsep. Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.', 'mn': 'Оюутнууд дараагийн сургууль суралцахын өмнө юу боломжтой мэдлэг хүртэх вэ? Бид маш олон нээлттэй онлайн сургуулиуд (MOOCs) дээрх мэдлэг ойлголтын хоорондох шаардлагатай холбоотой хэмжээ судалж байна. Ялангуяа, мэдлэг ойлголтын хоорондох аль төрлийн мэдээлэл хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг вэ? Эхлээд бид суралцах суралцах сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын арга замыг ойлголтын тухай суралцах, дараа нь ойлголтын хооронд хэрхэн ялгаатай харилцааны тухай судалж болно. Бидний гурван өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд Coursera-ын хувьд суурилсан арга нь суурилсан арга замыг харьцуулахад илүү чухал сайжруулах боломжтой (+5.9-48.0% нь F1-тооны хувьд) байдаг.', 'ml': 'പിന്നീട് കോര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ് മാറുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് എന്ത് വിവരങ്ങള നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് പഠിക്കുന്നത് മാസ്സിഫ് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d കോര്\u200dസുകളിലെ അറിവുകളുടെ തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധമാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിനുള്ള സാധ്യതകളുടെ ബന്ധം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഏത് തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്ക മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളോട് സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്', 'no': 'Kva første kunnskap bør studenten oppnå eit grad før du flyttar framover til å lære etterfølgjande kurslar? Vi studerer kor mykje forhåndsinnstillingane mellom kunnskapskonseptar i massiv opna nettlesar (MOOCs) kan automatisk gjerast. Spesielt kva slags informasjon kan brukast til å oppdaga den potensielle førekrevste relasjonen mellom kunnskapene. Vi først foreslår eit læringsbasert metode for å lære latente representasjonar av selvfølgje konseptar, og så undersøke korleis ulike funksjonar inneheld forandringane mellom konseptar. Eksperimentane våre på tre datasett er Coursera viser at den foreslåde metoden gjer signifikante forbedringar (+5,9-48,0% med F1-poeng) sammenligning med eksisterande metodar.', 'pl': 'Jaką wiedzę wstępną powinni uczniowie osiągnąć poziom opanowania przed przejściem do przodu, aby nauczyć się kolejnych materiałów kursowych? Badamy, w jakim stopniu można automatycznie wywnioskować wstępny związek pomiędzy koncepcjami wiedzy w Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). W szczególności, jakie rodzaje informacji mogą być dźwignią, aby odkryć potencjalny wstępny związek między koncepcjami wiedzy. Najpierw proponujemy metodę reprezentacji opartą na uczeniu się ukrytych reprezentacji koncepcji kursu, a następnie zbadamy, w jaki sposób różne cechy uwzględniają wstępne relacje między koncepcjami. Nasze eksperymenty na trzech zbiorach danych z Coursera pokazują, że proponowana metoda osiąga znaczące ulepszenia (+5.9-48.0% przez wynik F1) w porównaniu z istniejącymi metodami.', 'sr': 'Kakvo predviđeno znanje bi studenti trebali postići nivo masterije pre nego što nastavimo napred da naučimo sljedeće kursove studije? Istražujemo koliko se predviđena veza između koncepta znanja u masovnim otvorenim online kursima (MOOC) može automatski da se uvodi. Posebno, kakve vrste informacija može biti uticati na otkrivanje potencijalnog preduvjetnog odnosa između koncepta znanja. Prvo predlažemo metodu predstavljanja na osnovu učenja za učenje latentnih predstavljanja naravno koncepta, a onda istražujemo kako različite karakteristike uključuju predviđene odnose između koncepta. Naši eksperimenti na tri podataka forma Coursera pokazuju da predložena metoda postiže značajne poboljšanja (+5,9-48,0% po rezultatu F1) u usporedbi sa postojećim metodama.', 'ro': 'Ce cunoștințe prealabile ar trebui ca elevii să atingă un nivel de stăpânire înainte de a merge mai departe pentru a învăța cursurile ulterioare? Studiem măsura în care relația prealabilă dintre conceptele de cunoaștere din cursurile online deschise masive (MOOC) poate fi dedusă automat. În special, ce tipuri de informații pot fi pârghie pentru a descoperi potențiala relație prealabilă dintre conceptele de cunoaștere. Mai întâi propunem o metodă de învățare bazată pe reprezentare pentru învățarea reprezentărilor latente ale conceptelor de curs, apoi investigăm modul în care diferitele caracteristici captează relațiile preliminare dintre concepte. Experimentele noastre pe trei seturi de date din Coursera arată că metoda propusă obține îmbunătățiri semnificative (+5,9-48,0% prin scorul F1) comparativ cu metodele existente.', 'si': 'මොකක්ද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විද්\u200dයාඥාරියෝ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න කලින් ඉදිරියට පස්සේ ඉග අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ මැසිව් ඇන්ලයින් කෝස්ස් වලින් දන්නවත් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශාලාවක් අ විශේෂයෙන්, මොන වර්ගයක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, දන්න අදහසක් අතර ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා කිය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය දත්ත සේට් තුනක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කෝසෙරා පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට වැඩි විශාලනය (+5.9-48.0% F1-score විදියට) වි', 'so': 'Waa maxay aqoonta hore ee loo baahan yahay in ardaygu ay helaan heer maamul ah intaan horay u guurin in uu barato koorasyada dabadeed? Waxaynu baranaynaa inta ay u baahan tahay xiriirka horay u dhexeeya aqoonta koorasyada shabakadda ee furan (MOOCs). Si gaar ah, macluumaadka nooca ah ee ay u heli karaan in la soo furo xiriirka hore ee loo baahan yahay oo u dhexeeya dhanka aqoonta. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saleysan waxbarashada, si loo barto noocyada ugu dambeeya ee fikrada koorasyada, kadibna waxaynu baaritaannaa siduu u qabsadaa xiriirka hore ee dhanka. Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.', 'sv': 'Vilka f철rkunskaper b철r eleverna uppn책 en niv책 av beh채rskning innan de g책r vidare f철r att l채ra sig efterf철ljande kurser? Vi studerar i vilken utstr채ckning f철ruts채ttningsf철rh책llandet mellan kunskapsbegrepp i Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC) automatiskt kan h채rledas. S채rskilt vilka typer av information som kan utnyttjas f철r att avsl철ja den potentiella f철ruts채ttningsf철rh책llandet mellan kunskapsbegrepp. Vi f철resl책r f철rst en representationsinl채rningsbaserad metod f철r att l채ra oss latenta representationer av kursbegrepp, och unders철ker sedan hur olika funktioner f책ngar f철ruts채ttningsf철rh책llandena mellan begrepp. V책ra experiment p책 tre dataset fr책n Coursera visar att den f철reslagna metoden uppn책r betydande f철rb채ttringar (+5,9-48,0% av F1-po채ng) j채mf철rt med befintliga metoder.', 'ta': 'மாணவர்களுக்கு எது முன்னேற்ற அறிவு கிடைக்க வேண்டும் பின்னர் பயிற்சிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு முன்னால் மாண பெரிய திறந்த இணைய மாற்றுகள் (MOOCs) தானாகவே பாதிக்கப்படும் அறிவு கருத்துக்களுக்கு இடையே முன்னிருப்பு தொடர்பை நாம் படிக்கி குறிப்பிட்டு, அறிவு கருத்துக்களுக்கிடையில் எத்தனை முன்னுரிமையான தொடர்பை தெரிவிக்க முடியும். நாம் முதலில் ஒரு பிரதிநிதியியல் கற்றல் அடிப்படையான கற்றல் முறைமையை முன்நிரூபிக்கிறோம் பின்னர் நிச்சயமாக கருத்துக்களின் சம்பந்தம் எவ் Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.', 'ur': 'کس علم کی ضرورت ہے کہ دانش آموزوں کو اس کے بعد کی تعلیم سکھانے کے لئے آگے آگے بڑھنے سے پہلے ایک مستحکم سطح پہنچ سکیں؟ ہم اس طرح پڑھتے ہیں جس طرح معلومات کے درمیان معلومات کا ارتباط معلوم ہو سکتا ہے اس طرح مساوی اولین کورس (MOOCs) کو اتمام سے دفع کر سکتا ہے۔ مخصوصا، کس طرح کی اطلاعات کا فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے کہ علم کی نظریں کے درمیان موجود اگلوں کی نسبت آگاہ کرے۔ ہم پہلی بار ایک نمایش کی تعلیم کی بنیادی طریقہ کی تعلیم کریں گے، اور پھر تحقیق کریں کہ کس طرح مختلف نمایش کی تعلیمات کی تعلیم حاصل کرتی ہے ہمارے تین ڈاٹ سٹ پر ہماری آزمائش کورسرا دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ موجود طریقے سے مزید اضافہ ہوتی ہے (+5.9-48.0% F1-score سے) جو موجود طریقے سے مقایسہ ہوتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Birinchi darajada o'rganishdan oldin, o'quvchilar qanday darajaga o'rganish kerak? Biz bir darajada o'rganamiz, ko'proq Online Courselari (MOOCs) ta'minlovchi aniqlik o'ylab keladigan darajada. Ko'pchilik, ma'lumot qanday foydalanishi mumkin, ilmiy g'oyalarning orasidagi muhim munosabatlarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz birinchi tashkilotni o'rganish asosiy o'rganish usulini o'rganish uchun boshqa fikrlarni o'rganish uchun o'rganish imkoniyatlarini anglatamiz va keyin o'rganamiz fikrlarning orasidagi qanday darajadagi aloqalarni qanday bog'lash mumkin. Biz uchta maʼlumot sahifasi formatidagi taʼminlovchimizmiz kursorni koʻrsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan usuli mavjud usullar bilan qisqa muvaffaqiyatlarni bajaradi (+5.9-48.0% F1 scori bilan bogʻliq.", 'vi': 'Học sinh có thể đạt được một mức độ tuyệt vời nào trước khi tiếp tục học các lớp học sau đó? Chúng tôi nghiên cứu mức độ mối quan hệ cơ bản giữa các khái niệm kiến thức trong Bạch tuyến Massive (tổ chức mạng mạng) có thể bị ám chỉ tự động. Đặc biệt, những loại thông tin có thể làm nguồn tin để khám phá mối quan hệ thiết lập tiềm năng giữa các khái niệm kiến thức. Trước tiên, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp giáo dục dựa trên đại diện để học các biểu tượng tiềm ẩn, và sau đó nghiên cứu cách các đặc tính khác nhau nắm giữ các mối quan hệ thiết lập. Những thí nghiệm trên ba tập tin mẫu là Coursera cho thấy phương pháp dự thảo đạt được những cải tiến đáng kể (+5.9-48.0=) nhờ F1-số) so sánh với các phương pháp tồn tại.', 'da': 'Hvilken forudsætning viden bør eleverne opnå et niveau af beherskelse, før de går videre til at lære efterfølgende kurser? Vi undersøger i hvilket omfang forudsætningsforholdet mellem vidensbegreber i Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) automatisk kan udledes. Især hvilke slags oplysninger der kan udnyttes til at afdække den potentielle forudsætningsforhold mellem vidensbegreber. Vi foreslår først en repræsentationslæringsbaseret metode til at lære latente repræsentationer af kursusbegreber, og undersøger derefter, hvordan forskellige funktioner fanger forudsætningsrelationerne mellem begreber. Vores eksperimenter på tre datasæt fra Coursera viser, at den foreslåede metode opnår betydelige forbedringer (+5,9-48,0% ved F1-score) sammenlignet med eksisterende metoder.', 'nl': 'Welke vereiste kennis moeten studenten een niveau van beheersing bereiken voordat ze verder gaan om latere cursusmaterialen te leren? We onderzoeken in hoeverre de vereiste relatie tussen kennisconcepten in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) automatisch kan worden afgeleid. Met name wat voor soort informatie kan een hefboom zijn om de mogelijke vereiste relatie tussen kennisconcepten te ontdekken. We stellen eerst een representatie learning-gebaseerde methode voor het leren van latente representaties van cursusconcepten voor, en onderzoeken vervolgens hoe verschillende functies de vereiste relaties tussen concepten vastleggen. Onze experimenten op drie datasets van Coursera tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode significante verbeteringen bereikt (+5.9-48.0% per F1-score) vergeleken met bestaande methoden.', 'id': 'Pengetahuan awal apa yang harus siswa mencapai tingkat pemerintahan sebelum maju ke depan untuk belajar jalanan kursus berikutnya? Kami mempelajari seberapa tinggi hubungan prerekwiżit antara konsep pengetahuan dalam kursus Massive Open Online (MOOCs) dapat diputuskan secara otomatis. Terutama, informasi jenis apa yang dapat menjadi pengaruh untuk menemukan hubungan potensial prerekwiżit antara konsep pengetahuan. Kami pertama-tama mengusulkan metode berdasarkan pengajaran untuk mempelajari representation latent konsep tentu saja, dan kemudian menyelidiki bagaimana karakteristik berbeda menangkap hubungan prerekwiżit antara konsep. Eksperimen kami pada tiga set data bentuk Coursera menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan signifikan (+5,9-48,0% dengan skor F1) dibandingkan dengan metode yang ada.', 'hr': 'Kakvo predviđeno znanje bi studenti trebali postići razinu majstorstva prije nego što nastavimo dalje naučiti sljedeće učenje? Proučavamo mjeru u kojoj se predviđeno odnos između koncepta znanja u masovnim otvorenim online kursima (MOOC) može automatski inficirati. Posebno, kakve vrste informacija mogu utjecati na otkrivanje potencijalnog preduvjetnog odnosa između koncepta znanja. Prvo predlažemo metodu predstavljanja na osnovu učenja za učenje latentnih predstavljanja naravno koncepta, a onda istražujemo kako različite karakteristike uključuju predviđene odnose između koncepta. Naši eksperimenti na tri podataka oblika Coursera pokazuju da predložena metoda postigne značajne poboljšanja (+5,9-48,0% po F1-rezultatu) u usporedbi s postojećim metodama.', 'de': 'Welche Grundkenntnisse sollten die Studierenden erlangen, bevor sie weitermachen, um nachfolgende Kursmaterialien zu lernen? Wir untersuchen, inwieweit die Voraussetzung-Beziehung zwischen Wissenskonzepten in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) automatisch abgeleitet werden kann. Insbesondere, welche Arten von Informationen genutzt werden können, um die potenzielle Voraussetzung-Beziehung zwischen Wissenskonzepten aufzudecken. Zunächst schlagen wir eine repräsentationslernbasierte Methode vor, um latente Repräsentationen von Kurskonzepten zu lernen, und dann untersuchen wir, wie verschiedene Features die notwendigen Beziehungen zwischen Konzepten erfassen. Unsere Experimente an drei Datensätzen von Coursera zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode signifikante Verbesserungen (+5.9-48.0% durch F1-Score) im Vergleich zu bestehenden Methoden erzielt.', 'bg': 'Какви предпоставки знания трябва студентите да постигнат ниво на майсторство, преди да продължат напред, за да научат следващи курсове? Изследваме степента, до която може да се направи автоматично извод на предпоставката за взаимодействие между понятията за знания в масовите отворени онлайн курсове (МООК). По-специално, какъв вид информация може да бъде лост за разкриване на потенциалната предпоставка връзка между понятията за знание. Първо предлагаме метод на представяне, базиран на учене, за изучаване на латентни представи на концепциите на курса, а след това изследваме как различните функции улавят предпоставките за взаимодействие между понятията. Експериментите ни върху три набора от данни от Курсера показват, че предложеният метод постига значителни подобрения (+5.9-48.0% по оценка) в сравнение със съществуващите методи.', 'fa': 'چه دانشی پیش از این باید دانشجویان قبل از اینکه پیش از اینکه به جلوی آموزش دادن طبقه\u200cهای بعد برسند به سطح استواری برسند؟ ما مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که ارتباط پیش\u200cفرض بین مفهوم\u200cهای دانش در درس\u200cهای بسیار باز آنلاین (MOOCs) می\u200cتواند به طور خودکار تحریک شود. مخصوصا، چه نوع اطلاعات می تواند برای کشف ارتباط پیش از احتمال بین مفهوم دانش را اثر دهد. اولین بار یک روش معرفی بر اساس یادگیری برای یادگیری معرفی های latent البته پیشنهاد می کنیم، و بعد تحقیق کنیم که چگونه ویژه های متفاوتی رابطه های پیش\u200cنیاز بین مفهوم ها را درگیر می\u200cکنند. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای شکل کورسرا نشان می\u200cدهد که این روش پیشنهاد بهترین\u200cهای مهم (5.9-48.0 درصد با مقایسه\u200cهای F1) به مقایسه با روش\u200cهای موجود می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'Ni maarifa gani ya muhimu yanapaswa wanafunzi kupata kiwango cha ubunifu kabla ya kuendelea kuendelea kujifunza majaribio yaliyofuata? Tunasoma kiwango ambacho mahusiano muhimu kati ya dhana za maarifa katika Mashozo ya wazi ya Mtandaoni (MOOCs) yanaweza kuathirika kwa wenyewe. hasa, aina gani ya taarifa inaweza kuwa na umuhimu wa kugundua mahusiano muhimu kati ya dhana za maarifa. Kwanza tunapendekeza mbinu ya kuwakilisha msingi wa kujifunza kwa ajili ya kujifunza maoni ya hivi karibuni ya dhana za kitaaluma, na kisha kuchunguza namna tofauti zinavyofanikiwa mahusiano yanayohitajika kati ya dhana. Majaribio yetu kwenye seti tatu za data inaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inafanikiwa maboresho makubwa (+5.9-48.0% kwa vipindi vya F1) ikilinganisha na njia zilizopo.', 'tr': 'Öňki bilim okuwçylar yzyndaky kurslar öwrenmeden öňünden öňünden öňünden haýsy derejede galdyrmaly bolmaly? Biz okaýarys, Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) bilem düşünjeleriniñ arasyndaky ilkinji baglaýyşynyň özüni otomatik bilen çykyp biler. Aýratyn bolsa, bilgi düşünjeleri arasyndaky mümkin ön şartly baglaýyşyny açmak üçin nähili hili hili maglumatlar täsirleşebilir. Biz ilk defa düşüncelerin soňky temsillerini öwrenmek için öğrenme tabanlı bir yöntemi teklif edip, sonra da düşünceler arasında farklı özellikler nähili gerekli ilişkileri alındırıp soruşuyoruz. Coursera üç veri sahypalarymyzda synanyşlarymyz bar diýip kabul edilen yöntemiň möhüm gelişmeleri başarmady (+5.9-48.0% we F1-score bilen) hem bar döwletlere görä.', 'sq': 'Çfarë njohuri parakushtuese duhet të arrijnë studentët një nivel mjeshtërie përpara se të shkojnë përpara për të mësuar kanalet e kursit të mëvonshëm? We study the extent to which the prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) can be inferred automatically.  Në veçanti, çfarë lloj informacioni mund të jetë nxitje për të zbuluar lidhjen e mundshme parakushtuese midis koncepteve të njohurive. Ne së pari propozojmë një metodë përfaqësimi bazuar në mësim për mësimin e përfaqësimeve të fshehta të koncepteve të kursit, dhe pastaj hetojmë se si karakteristikat e ndryshme kapin marrëdhëniet parakushtuese midis koncepteve. Eksperimentet tona në tre grupe të dhënash formojnë Coursera tregojnë se metoda e propozuar arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme (+5.9-48.0% nga rezultati F1) krahasuar me metodat ekzistuese.', 'hy': 'Ի՞նչ նախապայմանավոր գիտելիքներ պետք է ուսանողները հասնեն տիրողության մակարդակի, մինչև առաջ գնալը հետագա դասարաններ սովորելու համար: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով կարող ենք ավտոմատ եզրակացնել գիտելիքի գաղափարների միջև զանգվածային բաց առցանց դասընթացներում: Հատկապես, ինչ տեսակի ինֆորմացիան կարող է օգտագործել գիտելիքի գաղափարների միջև պոտենցիալ նախապայման կապը բացահայտելու համար: We first propose a representation learning-based method for learning latent representations of course concepts, and then investigate how different features capture the prerequisite relations between concepts.  Քուրսերայի երեք տվյալների համակարգերի մեր փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը հասնում է նշանակալի բարելավումների (+5.9-48.0 տոկոս F1-ի արդյունքում) համեմատելով գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների հետ:', 'af': "Watter voorspoedige kennis moet studentes 'n vlak van meestering bereik voordat hulle voortgaan om volgende hoewe te leer? Ons studeer die uitbreiding waarop die voorspoedige verhouding tussen kennis konsepte in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) outomaties kan uitgevoer word. In besonderhede, wat soort inligting kan beteken word om die potensiele voorspoedige verhouding tussen kennis konsepte te ontdek. Ons voorstel eerste 'n voorstelling onderstelling gebaseerde metode vir die leer van latente voorstellings van natuurlik konsepte, en dan ondersoek hoe verskillende funksies die voorstellingsverhouding tussen konsepte vervang. Ons eksperimente op drie datastel vorm Coursera wys dat die voorgestelde metode betaling verbeteringe (+5.9-48.0% deur F1- telling) vergelyk met bestaande metodes.", 'am': 'ተማሪዎቹ በኋለኛይቱ ደረጃዎች ለመማር ሳይወስዱ ምን ተቃዋሚ እውቀት እንዲያገኙ ይገባቸዋል? የአውቀት አካሄድ መካከለኛ ግንኙነት በሙሉ ክፈት የመስመር ኮርቨርስቲ (MOOCs) በራስነት እንዲወስደው የሚችለውን ግንኙነት እናስተምራለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የትኛው ዓይነት መረጃ በእውቀት አካሄኖቹ መካከል የሚችሉትን የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለማግኘት የሚችል ነው፡፡ We first propose a representation learning-based method for learning latent representations of course concepts, and then investigate how different features capture the prerequisite relations between concepts.  በሦስት ዳታተር ፎርማት ላይ ፈተናችን ኮርሲራ የተፈጸመ ሥርዓት፣ የአሁኑን ሥርዓት በመተካከል የሚያሳየው (5.9-48.0 በመቶ F1-score) ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Nə qədər əvvəlki bilgi öyrənməkdən əvvəl öyrənməkdən əvvəl öyrənib öyrənməkdən əvvəl öyrənmək üçün öyrənmək istəyirlər? Biz öyrənirik ki, Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) elm fikirlərinin arasındakı əvvəlki bağlantısı avtomatik olaraq indirilə bilər. Özellikle, elm fikirlərinin arasındakı potensial əvvəlcə müəyyən edilməsi üçün nə tür məlumatlar fayda verə bilər. Biz ilk dəfə öyrənmək tərzini təsdiqləyirik, əlbəttə ki, latent təsdiqlərini öyrənmək üçün, sonra müxtəlif tərzlərin məsələlər arasındakı məsələləri necə qəbul edəcəyini təsdiqləyirik. Üç verilən qurğuda olan təcrübələrimiz Coursera göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodların mövcud düzəltmələrini (+5.9-48.0% F1-score ilə) müəyyən edir.', 'bs': 'Kakvo predviđeno znanje bi studenti trebali postići nivo majstorstva prije nego što nastavimo naprijed da naučimo sljedeće kursore? Proučavamo u kakvoj mjeri može se automatski uvoditi odnos između koncepta znanja na masovnim otvorenim online kursovima (MOOC). Posebno, kakve vrste informacija može biti uticajne na otkrivanje potencijalnog predviđenog odnosa između koncepta znanja. Prvo predlažemo metodu predstavljanja na osnovu učenja za učenje latentnih predstavljanja naravno koncepta, a onda istražujemo kako različite karakteristike uključuju predviđene odnose između koncepta. Naši eksperimenti na tri kompleta podataka pokazuju Coursera da predložena metoda postigne značajne poboljšanja (+5,9-48,0% po F1-rezultatu) u usporedbi s postojećim metodama.', 'ko': '후속 과정을 계속 공부하기 전에 학생들은 반드시 어떤 선결 지식을 습득해야 합니까?우리는 대규모 온라인 개방 과정(MOOC)에서 지식 개념 간의 전제 관계를 어느 정도 자동으로 추정할 수 있는지 연구했다.특히 어떤 정보가 지식 개념 간의 잠재적 선결 조건 관계를 밝힐 수 있는지를 보여준다.우리는 먼저 표징 학습을 바탕으로 과정 개념의 잠재적 표징을 학습한 다음에 서로 다른 특징이 개념 간의 선결 관계를 어떻게 포착하는지 연구한다.Coursera의 세 가지 데이터 세트에서 수행한 실험에 따르면 기존 방식에 비해 이 방법은 현저하게 개선되었다(F1은 5.9-48.0%로 나타났다).', 'ca': "Quin coneixement precondit haurien d'aconseguir un nivell de maîtria abans d'avançar per aprendre corrents de curs posteriors? We study the extent to which the prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) can be inferred automatically.  En particular, quin tipus d'informació pot ser l'avantatge per descobrir la relació prerequisita potencial entre conceptes de coneixement. Primer proposem un mètode basat en l'aprenentatge de representació per aprendre representacions latents, i després investigar com diferents característiques capturen les relacions prerequisites entre conceptes. Els nostres experiments en tres conjunts de dades de Coursera mostren que el mètode proposat aconsegueix millores significatives (+5,9-48,0% per puntuació F1) comparant amb els mètodes existents.", 'et': 'Millised eeltingimused peaksid õpilased saavutama meisterlikkuse taseme enne edasi liikumist järgmiste kursuste õppimiseks? Uurime, millises ulatuses on võimalik automaatselt järeldada teadmiste kontseptsioonide eeltingimuslikku seost massiivsete avatud online-kursuste (MOOC) vahel. Eelkõige, millist liiki teavet saab kasutada teadmistepõhimõtete vahelise potentsiaalse eeltingimuse tuvastamiseks. Esiteks pakume välja õppepõhise representatsioonipõhise meetodi kursuse kontseptsioonide latentsete representatsioonide õppimiseks ja seejärel uurime, kuidas erinevad funktsioonid hõlmavad eeltingimuste suhteid kontseptsioonide vahel. Meie katsed kolme Coursera andmekogumiga näitavad, et kavandatud meetod saavutab olulisi paranemisi (+5,9-48,0% F1-skoori järgi) võrreldes olemasolevate meetoditega.', 'fi': 'Mitä ennakkotietoa opiskelijoiden tulisi saavuttaa mestaruuden taso ennen siirtymistä myöhempiin kursseihin? Tutkimme, missä määrin tietokäsitteiden ennakkosuhdetta Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC) voidaan päätellä automaattisesti. Erityisesti millaista tietoa voidaan hyödyntää tietokäsitteiden mahdollisen ennakkoyhteyden selvittämiseksi. Ensin ehdotamme representaatiooppimiseen perustuvaa menetelmää kurssikonseptien latenttien representaatioiden oppimiseen ja sitten tutkimme, miten eri ominaisuudet kuvaavat konseptien välisiä ennakkosuhteita. Kokeet kolmella Courseran aineistolla osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia (+5,9-48,0% F1-pisteellä) verrattuna olemassa oleviin menetelmiin.', 'bn': 'পরবর্তী কোর্সোরের শিক্ষা শেখার আগে ছাত্রীরা কি প্রয়োজনীয় জ্ঞান পেতে পারে? আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনলাইন কোর্সের (MOOCs) জ্ঞান ধারণার প্রধান সম্পর্কের সম্পর্কে গবেষণা করি। বিশেষ করে, জ্ঞান ধারণার মধ্যে সম্ভাব্য প্রাপ্ত সম্পর্ক আবিষ্কার করার জন্য কোন ধরনের তথ্য প্রদান করতে পারে। আমরা প্রথমে একটি প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যাতে সাম্প্রতিক ধারণার সাথে প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা প্রদান করতে পারি, আর তারপর তদন তিনটি ডাটাসেট ফর্ম কোর্সারা নিয়ে আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বিশাল উন্নতি পায় (+5.9-48.', 'cs': 'Jaké předpokladné znalosti by měli studenti dosáhnout úrovně mistrovství před tím, než se pohnou kupředu učit následné kurzy? Studujeme, do jaké míry lze automaticky odvozovat předpokladný vztah mezi znalostními koncepty v Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Zejména, jaké druhy informací mohou být pákou k odhalení potenciálního předpokladu vztahu mezi znalostními koncepty. Nejprve navrhujeme metodu reprezentace učení založenou na učení latentních reprezentací konceptů kurzů a poté zkoumáme, jak různé funkce zachycují předpokladné vztahy mezi koncepty. Naše experimenty na třech datových sadách Coursery ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda dosahuje významných zlepšení (+5.9-48.0% podle F1-skóre) ve srovnání se stávajícími metodami.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk sing kudu nggawe mesthi awak dh챕w챕, nik awak dh챕w챕 beraksi sakjane mepe nang mulai nglarani cara-cara sing dikarepak챕? Awak dh챕w챕 isih perusahaan segala macem nggawe sawian karo perusahaan kelas nang dipunangconatan kanggo masa Open online Curses (MOOCs) iso dianggawe otomatik. Awak dh챕w챕, piye soko informasi sing iso nggawe nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe ngerasai perusahaan langkung sampeyan ingkang dipepot. Awak dh챕w챕 nggunakak dh챕w챕 챕ntukno sistem sing basa gambar nggawe sapa-sistem sing berarti cara nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindakan, lan uga njaluk nungsakeh piye cara-ciptaaken sing paling dh챕w챕 kuwi tindakan pregunter nggawe Where', 'ha': "Mẽne ne ilmin da ake bukãta ya kamata karen su sami wani daraja mai kamfata a gabãnin su tafi gaba ga barci takardar daban? Tuna karanta iyar da muhimmanci da za'a shagala tsakanin kunnuwa da ke cikin Kuren Mafiɗancin Haƙĩƙa da Kyaure (MOOOCs) kan an shafe farat ɗaya. A cikin ƙayyadadde, wane irin information za'a iya amfani da shi dõmin ya buɗe muhimmada mai muhimmi a tsakanin zato-zance. Kayyar da farkon, Muke buɗe wata hanyor a kan karatun da aka sanar masu ƙarani da aka sani ma'anar mawaƙo na lazimta, sa'an nan kuma Muke jarraba jinsi masu buƙata da danganta masu buƙata a tsakanin zato. Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཤེས་ཚད་གང་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ན་མི་སློབ་གྲྭར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་དགོས་སམ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་གི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དགོས་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་བཅུག་ན། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། རིགས ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྨན་གཞི་རྩོམ་འབྲི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་གནད་དོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བ་དང་། དེ་ནས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྔོན་རྗ Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.', 'sk': 'Kateri predpogoj znanja morajo študenti doseči stopnjo mojstrstva, preden nadaljujejo z učenjem nadaljnjih predmetov? Preučujemo obseg, v katerem je mogoče predpogojno razmerje med koncepti znanja v masovnih odprtih spletnih tečajih (MOOC) samodejno sklepati. Zlasti kakšne vrste informacij so lahko vzvod za odkrivanje morebitnega predpogojnega razmerja med koncepti znanja. Najprej predlagamo metodo reprezentacije, ki temelji na učenju, za učenje latentnih reprezentacij konceptov predmeta, nato pa raziščemo, kako različne funkcije zajemajo predpogojne odnose med koncepti. Naši poskusi na treh naborih podatkov iz Coursera kažejo, da predlagana metoda doseže znatne izboljšave (+5,9-48,0% po F1-rezultatu) v primerjavi z obstoječimi metodami.', 'he': 'איזה ידע מוקדם לתחום תלמידים צריכים להשיג רמה של שליטה לפני להמשיך הלאה ללמוד דרכים אחר כך? We study the extent to which the prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts in Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) can be inferred automatically.  In particular, what kinds of information can be leverage to uncover the potential prerequisite relation between knowledge concepts.  We first propose a representation learning-based method for learning latent representations of course concepts, and then investigate how different features capture the prerequisite relations between concepts.  Our experiments on three datasets form Coursera show that the proposed method achieves significant improvements (+5.9-48.0% by F1-score) comparing with existing methods.'}
{'en': 'Context Sensitive Lemmatization Using Two Successive Bidirectional Gated Recurrent Networks', 'ar': 'لماتة حساسة للسياق باستخدام شبكتين متتاليتين متتاليتين ببوابات متكررة', 'es': 'Lematización sensible al contexto mediante dos redes recurrentes cerradas bidireccionales sucesivas', 'pt': 'Lematização sensível ao contexto usando duas redes recorrentes fechadas bidirecionais sucessivas', 'fr': "Lemmatisation sensible au contexte à l'aide de deux réseaux récurrents déclenchés bidirectionnels successifs", 'ja': '2つの連続した双方向ゲートリカレントネットワークを使用したコンテキストセンシティブなLemmatization', 'zh': '用两连双向门控递归网络者上下文敏词形还原', 'hi': 'संदर्भ संवेदनशील Lemmatization दो क्रमिक द्विदिश गेटेड आवर्तक नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимая лематизация с использованием двух последовательных двунаправленных вентилируемых рекуррентных сетей', 'ga': 'Léimiú Íogaire Comhthéacs Ag Úsáid Dhá Líonra Athfhillteacha Dháthreoracha le Gheata Comhleanúnacha', 'hu': 'Kontextusérzékeny lemmatizálás két egymást követő, kétirányú kapcsolt ismétlődő hálózat segítségével', 'ka': 'კონტექსტის სინტექსტიური ლემატიზაცია ორი წარმოდგენელი ორედირექციონალური განმეორებული ქსელების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Ευαίσθητη λεμματοποίηση με χρήση δύο διαδοχικών αμφίδρομης πύλης επαναλαμβανόμενων δικτύων', 'it': 'Lemmatizzazione sensibile del contesto utilizzando due reti ricorrenti Gated bidirezionali successive', 'kk': 'Контексті сезімді шектеу', 'lt': 'Kontekstui jautri lemmatizacija naudojant du iš eilės einančius dvikrypčius pakartotinius tinklus', 'mk': 'Контекстна чувствителна лематизација со користење на две последни дворечни вратни рекурентни мрежи', 'ms': 'Lematisasi Sensitif Konteks Mengguna Dua Rangkaian Berulang Berdua Arah Berturut', 'ml': '@ info', 'mt': 'Lemmatizzazzjoni Sensittiva għall-Kuntest bl-Użu ta’ Żewġ Netwerks Rikorrenti Bidirezzjonali Sussegwenti', 'mn': 'Контекст мэдрэмжтэй хоёр амжилттай хоёр дахин дахин дахин нийлүүлэгдэх сүлжээг ашиглах', 'no': 'Kontekst- følsomsetjing ved å bruka to vellykkeleg to retningar med gjentaande nettverk', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa Lemmatyzacja wrażliwa przy użyciu dwóch kolejnych dwukierunkowych Gated Recurrent Networks', 'sr': 'Kontekstska osetljiva limatizacija korištenja dva uspešna dvosmjernicalna povratna mreža', 'ro': 'Lemmatizarea sensibilă a contextului folosind două rețele recurente bidirecționale închise succesive', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් සමහර විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ජාලය', 'so': 'Limitization of Context Sensitive using Two Successive Bidirectional Gated Recurrent Network', 'sv': 'Kontextkänslig lemmatisering med hjälp av två på varandra följande dubbelriktade slutna återkommande nätverk', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis', 'ur': 'کنٹکسٹ سنسیٹیو لیمیٹیزی دو موفق دودئیرسیٹیونل جمع ہونے والی نیٹورک استعمال کرتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Độ nhạy để đạt tới sử dụng hai mạng nối tiếp hai hướng.', 'nl': 'Context Gevoelige Lemmatisatie met behulp van twee opeenvolgende Bidirectionele Gated Recurrent Networks', 'da': 'Kontekstfølsom lemmatisering ved hjælp af to på hinanden følgende bidirektionelle Gated tilbagevendende netværk', 'bg': 'Контекст Чувствителна лематизация чрез използване на две последователни двупосочни затворени повтарящи се мрежи', 'hr': 'Kontekstska osjetljiva lematizacija korištenja dva uspješna dvosmjerna povratna mreža', 'de': 'Kontextsensitive Lemmatisierung mit zwei aufeinanderfolgenden bidirektionalen Gated Recurrent Networks', 'fa': 'با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای دوراهی موفق به دوراهی جمع شده دوراهی', 'ko': '두 개의 연속적인 양방향 선택 귀속 네트워크를 이용하여 상하문에 민감한 레몬화를 진행하다', 'id': 'Lematisasi Sensitif Konteks Menggunakan Dua Jaringan Berulang Bergerak Biarah Seterusnya', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Makala Makuu ya Nchini kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Kurekebisha Miongoni', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'sq': 'Lematizimi i ndjeshëm në kontekst duke përdorur dy rrjete të vazhdueshëm dydrejtimi', 'af': 'Konteks Sensitief Lemmatiseering gebruik twee suksesvolle twee rigting versamel Rekursiewerke', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Context Sensitive Lemmatization Using Two Successive Bidirectional Gated Recurrent Networks', 'az': 'İki müvəffəqiyyətli İkinci Dönüş Gedişli Ağları', 'bs': 'Kontekstska osjetljiva limatizacija korištenja dva uspješna dvosmjerna povratna mreža', 'ca': 'Lematització sensible al contest utilitzant dues xarxes recurrents bidireccionals conseqüents', 'cs': 'Kontextově citlivá lemmatizace pomocí dvou následných obousměrných bráněných opakovaných sítí', 'fi': 'Konteksti Herkkä lemmatisointi kahden peräkkäisen kaksisuuntaisen porttiverkon avulla', 'et': 'Kontekst Tundlik lemmatiseerimine kahe järjestikuse kahesuunalise värvitud korduvvõrgu abil', 'he': 'לימטיזציה רגישה לקונקסט באמצעות שתי רשתות מתחזרות בשער שתי כיוונים', 'jv': 'Cumulatextattr', 'sk': 'Kontekst Občutljiva Lemmacija z uporabo dveh zaporednih dvosmernih zaprtih ponavljajočih se omrežij', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྗེས་ཐོའི་ཆེད་ཚུན་ལྕོགས་ཅན་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྗེས་འབྲེལ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུད་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a composite deep neural network architecture for supervised and language independent context sensitive lemmatization. The proposed method considers the task as to identify the correct edit tree representing the transformation between a word-lemma pair. To find the lemma of a surface word, we exploit two successive bidirectional gated recurrent structures-the first one is used to extract the character level dependencies and the next one captures the contextual information of the given word. The key advantages of our model compared to the state-of-the-art lemmatizers such as Lemming and Morfette are-(i) it is independent of human decided features (ii) except the gold lemma, no other expensive morphological attribute is required for joint learning. We evaluate the lemmatizer on nine languages-Bengali, Catalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungarian, Italian, Latin, Romanian and Spanish. It is found that except Bengali, the proposed method outperforms Lemming and Morfette on the other languages. To train the model on Bengali, we develop a gold lemma annotated dataset (having 1,702 sentences with a total of 20,257 word tokens), which is an additional contribution of this work.', 'ar': 'نحن نقدم بنية شبكة عصبية عميقة مركبة من أجل اللماتة الخاضعة للإشراف والمستقلة عن اللغة. تأخذ الطريقة المقترحة في الاعتبار المهمة المتعلقة بتحديد شجرة التحرير الصحيحة التي تمثل التحول بين زوج الكلمات lemma. للعثور على lemma لكلمة سطحية ، نستغل هيكلين متتاليين متعاقبين ثنائي الاتجاه - يتم استخدام الأول لاستخراج تبعيات مستوى الحرف والأخرى التالية تلتقط المعلومات السياقية للكلمة المعينة. المزايا الرئيسية لنموذجنا مقارنةً بأحدث أجهزة lemmatizers مثل Lemming و Morfette هي - (1) مستقلة عن السمات التي يقررها الإنسان (2) باستثناء الذهب ، لا يلزم وجود سمة مورفولوجية باهظة الثمن أخرى التعلم المشترك. نقوم بتقييم lemmatizer على تسع لغات - البنغالية والكتالونية والهولندية والهندية والمجرية والإيطالية واللاتينية والرومانية والإسبانية. وجد أنه باستثناء البنغالية ، فإن الطريقة المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على Lemming و Morfette في اللغات الأخرى. لتدريب النموذج على اللغة البنغالية ، قمنا بتطوير مجموعة بيانات مشروحة باللون الذهبي (بها 1702 جملة بإجمالي 20257 كلمة مميزة) ، وهي مساهمة إضافية لهذا العمل.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une architecture de réseau neuronal profond composite pour une lemmatisation contextuelle supervisée et indépendante de la langue. La méthode proposée considère que la tâche consiste à identifier l'arbre d'édition correct représentant la transformation entre une paire mot-lemme. Pour trouver le lemme d'un mot de surface, nous exploitons deux structures récurrentes déclenchées bidirectionnelles successives\xa0: la première est utilisée pour extraire les dépendances au niveau des caractères et la suivante capture les informations contextuelles du mot donné. Les principaux avantages de notre modèle par rapport aux lemmatiseurs de pointe tels que Lemming et Morfette sont les suivants\xa0: (i) il est indépendant des caractéristiques déterminées par l'homme (ii) à l'exception du lemme doré, aucun autre attribut morphologique coûteux n'est requis pour l'apprentissage conjoint. Nous évaluons le lemmatiseur sur neuf langues\xa0: bengali, catalan, néerlandais, hindi, hongrois, italien, latin, roumain et espagnol. On constate qu'à l'exception du bengali, la méthode proposée surpasse le lemming et le morfette sur les autres langues. Pour entraîner le modèle sur le bengali, nous développons un jeu de données annoté sur les lemmes dorés (comprenant 1 702 phrases avec un total de 20 257 mots), qui constitue une contribution supplémentaire de ce travail.", 'es': 'Presentamos una arquitectura de red neuronal profunda compuesta para la lematización sensible al contexto supervisada e independiente del idioma. El método propuesto considera la tarea de identificar el árbol de edición correcto que representa la transformación entre un par palabra-lema. Para encontrar el lema de una palabra superficial, explotamos dos estructuras recurrentes cerradas bidireccionales sucesivas: la primera se usa para extraer las dependencias del nivel de caracteres y la siguiente captura la información contextual de la palabra dada. Las ventajas clave de nuestro modelo en comparación con los lematizadores de última generación, como Lemming y Morfette, son: (i) es independiente de las características decididas por el hombre; ii) excepto el lema de oro, no se requiere ningún otro atributo morfológico caro para el aprendizaje conjunto. Evaluamos el lematizador en nueve idiomas: bengalí, catalán, holandés, hindi, húngaro, italiano, latín, rumano y español. Se ha descubierto que, excepto el bengalí, el método propuesto supera a Lemming y Morfette en los demás idiomas. Para entrenar el modelo en bengalí, desarrollamos un conjunto de datos anotados de lema dorado (que tiene 1,702 oraciones con un total de 20,257 fichas de palabras), que es una contribución adicional de este trabajo.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma arquitetura de rede neural profunda composta para lematização sensível ao contexto supervisionada e independente de linguagem. O método proposto considera a tarefa de identificar a árvore de edição correta que representa a transformação entre um par palavra-lema. Para encontrar o lema de uma palavra de superfície, exploramos duas estruturas recorrentes bidirecionais sucessivas - a primeira é usada para extrair as dependências de nível de caractere e a próxima captura a informação contextual da palavra dada. As principais vantagens do nosso modelo em comparação com os lematizadores de última geração, como Lemming e Morfette, são - (i) é independente das características decididas pelo homem (ii) exceto o lema do ouro, nenhum outro atributo morfológico caro é necessário para aprendizagem conjunta. Avaliamos o lematizador em nove idiomas - bengali, catalão, holandês, hindi, húngaro, italiano, latim, romeno e espanhol. Verifica-se que, exceto Bengali, o método proposto supera Lemming e Morfette nas outras línguas. Para treinar o modelo em bengali, desenvolvemos um conjunto de dados anotado pelo lema de ouro (com 1.702 sentenças com um total de 20.257 tokens de palavras), que é uma contribuição adicional deste trabalho.', 'ja': '言語に依存しない複合的な深層ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを導入し、文脈依存的なレマティゼーションを監視しています。 提案された方法では、タスクは、単語-レンマのペア間の変換を表す正しい編集ツリーを識別することと見なされます。 表面単語のレンマを見つけるために、私たちは2つの連続した双方向ゲート繰り返し構造を利用します。1つ目は文字レベルの依存関係を抽出するために使用され、次は与えられた単語のコンテキスト情報をキャプチャします。 LemmingやMorfetteなどの最先端のレンマタイザーと比較した当社のモデルの主な利点は、（ i ）人間が決定した特徴とは無関係であること、（ ii ）ゴールドレンマを除いて、共同学習に他の高価な形態学的属性は必要ないことです。 私たちは、ベンガル語、カタルーニャ語、オランダ語、ヒンディー語、ハンガリー語、イタリア語、ラテン語、ルーマニア語、スペイン語の9つの言語でレマタイザーを評価します。 ベンガル語を除いて、提案された方法は他の言語でレミング語やモルフェット語を上回ることが分かっている。 ベンガル語のモデルをトレーニングするために、私たちはゴールドレンマ注釈付きデータセット（ 1,702文、合計20,257ワードトークン）を開発しました。これは、この作業の追加の貢献です。', 'zh': '引入一复合深神经网络架构,以督语独立上下文敏词形还原。 所上之法,以职为识引理转易之正编。 求阳词之引理,因两连双向门控循环结构 - 首以取字符,次以获给定单词之上下文信。 与Lemming、Morfette最先进之词形还原器,吾形之大要 - (i)独立于人(ii)非金引理也,合学不待他贵之形也。 评估九语词形还原器 - 孟加拉语,加泰罗尼亚语,荷兰语,印地语,匈牙利语,意大利语,拉丁语,罗马尼亚语和西班牙语。 究见,除孟加拉语外,所言优于LemmingMorfette。 为孟加拉语训模,发一黄金引理注数集(有1,702一句,凡20,257单词标),此其额外贡献也。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим композитную архитектуру глубокой нейронной сети для контролируемой и независимой от языка контекста лемматизации. Предложенный способ рассматривает задачу как выявление правильного дерева редактирования, представляющего преобразование между парой слово-лема. Чтобы найти лемму поверхностного слова, мы используем две последовательные двунаправленные стробированные рекуррентные структуры - первая используется для извлечения зависимостей на уровне символов, а следующая захватывает контекстную информацию данного слова. Ключевыми преимуществами нашей модели по сравнению с современными лемматизаторами, такими как Lemming и Morfette, являются: (i) она не зависит от определяемых человеком признаков (ii) кроме золотой леммы, для совместного обучения не требуется никакого другого дорогостоящего морфологического атрибута. Мы оцениваем лематизатор на девяти языках - бенгальском, каталонском, голландском, хинди, венгерском, итальянском, латинском, румынском и испанском. Обнаружено, что, за исключением бенгальского, предлагаемый метод превосходит методы Лемминга и Морфетта на других языках. Для обучения модели на бенгальском языке мы разрабатываем аннотированный набор данных золотой леммы (содержащий 1702 предложения с общим количеством 20 257 токенов слов), что является дополнительным вкладом в эту работу.', 'hi': 'हम पर्यवेक्षित और भाषा स्वतंत्र संदर्भ संवेदनशील lemmatization के लिए एक समग्र गहरी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला का परिचय देते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि एक शब्द-लेम्मा जोड़ी के बीच परिवर्तन का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले सही संपादन ट्री की पहचान करने के लिए कार्य पर विचार करती है। एक सतह शब्द के लेमा को खोजने के लिए, हम दो क्रमिक द्विदिश गेटेड आवर्तक संरचनाओं का शोषण करते हैं - पहले का उपयोग चरित्र स्तर निर्भरताओं को निकालने के लिए किया जाता है और अगला एक दिए गए शब्द की प्रासंगिक जानकारी को कैप्चर करता है। लेमिंग और मोर्फेट जैसे अत्याधुनिक लेमाटाइज़र की तुलना में हमारे मॉडल के प्रमुख फायदे हैं - (i) यह मानव तय की गई विशेषताओं से स्वतंत्र है (ii) सोने के लेमा को छोड़कर, संयुक्त सीखने के लिए कोई अन्य महंगी रूपात्मक विशेषता की आवश्यकता नहीं है। हम नौ भाषाओं - बंगाली, कैटलन, डच, हिंदी, हंगेरियन, इतालवी, लैटिन, रोमानियाई और स्पेनिश पर लेमेटाइज़र का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। यह पाया गया है कि बंगाली को छोड़कर, प्रस्तावित विधि अन्य भाषाओं पर लेमिंग और मोरफेट को मात देती है। बंगाली पर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए, हम एक सोने का लेमा एनोटेट डेटासेट विकसित करते हैं (कुल 20,257 शब्द टोकन के साथ 1,702 वाक्य होते हैं), जो इस काम का एक अतिरिक्त योगदान है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach ailtireacht líonra néarach dhomhain ilchodach le haghaidh leamatúchán íogair comhthéacs faoi mhaoirseacht agus teanga. Déanann an modh molta an tasc a mheas mar an crann ceart eagarthóireachta a léiríonn an claochlú idir péire focal-léama a shainaithint. Chun lema an fhocail dromchla a aimsiú, bainimid leas as dhá struchtúr athfhillteacha déthreoracha le geataí as a chéile - úsáidtear an chéad cheann chun spleáchais leibhéal na gcarachtar a bhaint amach agus gabhann an chéad cheann eile faisnéis chomhthéacsúil an fhocail a thugtar. Is iad na príomhbhuntáistí a bhaineann lenár múnla i gcomparáid leis na lemmatizers úrscothacha mar Lemming agus Morfette ná - (i) tá sé neamhspleách ar ghnéithe cinnithe daonna (ii) ach amháin an lema óir, níl aon tréith daor moirfeolaíoch ag teastáil le haghaidh comhfhoghlaim. Déanaimid measúnú ar an lemmatizer ar naoi dteanga - Beangáilis, Catalóinis, Ollainnis, Hiondúis, Ungáiris, Iodáilis, Laidin, Rómáinis agus Spáinnis. Fuarthas amach, seachas an Bheangáilis, go sáraíonn an modh atá molta Lemming agus Morfette ar na teangacha eile. Chun an tsamhail a oiliúint ar Bheangáilis, forbraímid tacar sonraí lema óir anótáilte (a bhfuil 1,702 abairt agus 20,257 comhartha focal san iomlán ann), rud a chuireann leis an obair seo sa bhreis.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια σύνθετη αρχιτεκτονική βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων για εποπτευόμενη και γλωσσική ανεξάρτητη λεμματοποίηση ευαίσθητη στο πλαίσιο. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος θεωρεί την εργασία ως τον προσδιορισμό του σωστού δέντρου επεξεργασίας που αντιπροσωπεύει τη μετατροπή μεταξύ ενός ζεύγους λέξης-λέμμα. Για να βρούμε το λέμμα μιας επιφανειακής λέξης, εκμεταλλευόμαστε δύο διαδοχικές δικατευθυνόμενες επαναλαμβανόμενες δομές από τις οποίες η πρώτη χρησιμοποιείται για την εξαγωγή των εξαρτήσεων επιπέδου χαρακτήρων και η επόμενη συλλαμβάνει τις πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος της δεδομένης λέξης. Τα βασικά πλεονεκτήματα του μοντέλου μας σε σύγκριση με τους υπερσύγχρονους λεμματοποιητές όπως το Λέμμινγκ και η Μορφέτη είναι ότι είναι ανεξάρτητα από τα ανθρώπινα αποφασισμένα χαρακτηριστικά (εκτός από το χρυσό λέμμα, δεν απαιτείται άλλη δαπανηρή μορφολογική ιδιότητα για την κοινή μάθηση. Αξιολογούμε το λεμματοποιητή σε εννέα γλώσσες: Βεγγαλικά, Καταλανικά, Ολλανδικά, Χίντι, Ουγγρικά, Ιταλικά, Λατινικά, Ρουμανικά και Ισπανικά. Διαπιστώνεται ότι εκτός από τα Βεγγαλικά, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά το Lemming και το Morfette στις άλλες γλώσσες. Για να εκπαιδεύσουμε το μοντέλο στα Βεγγαλικά, αναπτύσσουμε ένα χρυσό σύνολο δεδομένων σχολιασμένων με λεμμα (με προτάσεις 1,702 με συνολικά 20,257 λέξεων), το οποίο αποτελεί πρόσθετη συνεισφορά αυτής της εργασίας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ კომპოზიტური ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურაციას ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, რომელიც დანახვედნენ და ენათის უცნობიერი კონტექსტიური პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამა იფიქრობს რაოდენობას, რომელიც შესაძლებელი რედაქტირებული ხე, რომელიც რედაქტირებულია სიტყვების- ლემიმა ზოგის შ სამუშაო სიტყვის ლიმმა, ჩვენ ეკონპლექტირებულია ორი შემდეგ ბედირექციური რეკურენტიური სტრუქტურები - პირველი სიტყვის გამოყენება სიტყვის სამუშაო დონეზე და შემდეგ სიტყვის კო ჩვენი მოდელის გასაკუთრებული გასაკუთრებები, როგორც Lemming და Morfette, არის - i) ის ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილი ფუნქციებისგან განსაკუთრებულია (ii) მაგრამ უშლა ლემოა, არ არის სხვა საკუთრები მოპოროლოგიური ატრიბუტი, როგორც ერთ ჩვენ ლიმმატიზერის ცხრა ენაზე ვუმუშაობთ - ბენდალიი, კარალანი, დონდალიური, ჰინდური, გენდარიური, თრალიანი, ლატინური, პომინური და სპანელი. მოიძებნა, რომ ბენდალის განმავლობაში, პროგრამის მიზეზეზი ლემინდ და მოპეტეტის სხვა ენაზე გავაკეთება. რომ ბენდალის მოდელის გასწავლისთვის, ჩვენ განვითარებთ მონაცემების მონაცემები (ერთი 702 სიტყვები 20 257 სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვები) რომელიც ამ სამუშაოს დამატებული დამატება.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a felügyelt és nyelvfüggetlen kontextusérzékeny lemmatizáció kompozit mélyneurális hálózati architektúráját. A javasolt módszer úgy veszi figyelembe a feladatot, hogy azonosítsa a megfelelő szerkesztési fa, amely egy szó-lemma pár közötti transzformációt jelenti. Egy felületi szó lemmájának megtalálásához két egymást követő kétirányú, visszatérő struktúrát használunk - az elsőt a karakterszint függőségeinek kivonására használjuk, a következő pedig az adott szó kontextuális információit rögzítjük. Modellünk legfontosabb előnyei a legkorszerűbb lemmatizátorokhoz képest, mint például a Lemming és Morfette - (i) független az emberi döntött tulajdonságoktól (ii) az arany lemma kivételével, nincs szükség más drága morfológiai tulajdonságra a közös tanuláshoz. A lemmatizátort kilenc nyelven értékeljük - bengáli, katalán, holland, hindi, magyar, olasz, latin, román és spanyol. Megállapítást nyert, hogy a bengáli kivételével a javasolt módszer más nyelveken is felülmúlja a Lemminget és a Morfettét. A modell bengáli nyelvű képzéséhez egy arany lemma jegyzettel ellátott adatkészletet dolgozunk ki (1702 mondattal, összesen 20 257 szó tokennel), ami további hozzájárulást jelent ennek a munkának.', 'it': "Introducemo un'architettura composita di rete neurale profonda per la lemmatizzazione supervisionata e indipendente dal contesto sensibile. Il metodo proposto considera il compito di identificare l'albero di modifica corretto che rappresenta la trasformazione tra una coppia parola-lemma. Per trovare il lemma di una parola di superficie, sfruttiamo due strutture ricorrenti bidirezionali successive - la prima viene utilizzata per estrarre le dipendenze a livello di carattere e la successiva cattura le informazioni contestuali della parola data. I principali vantaggi del nostro modello rispetto ai lemmatizzatori all'avanguardia come Lemming e Morfette sono - (i) è indipendente dalle caratteristiche decise dall'uomo (ii) tranne il lemma d'oro, nessun altro attributo morfologico costoso è richiesto per l'apprendimento congiunto. Valutiamo il lemmatizzatore in nove lingue - bengalese, catalano, olandese, hindi, ungherese, italiano, latino, rumeno e spagnolo. Si è scoperto che, tranne il bengalese, il metodo proposto supera Lemming e Morfette nelle altre lingue. Per addestrare il modello sul bengalese, sviluppiamo un dataset annotato con lemma dorato (con 1.702 frasi per un totale di 20.257 token di parole), che è un ulteriore contributo di questo lavoro.", 'kk': 'Біз бақылау және тілдердің тәуелсіз контексті сезімді лиммациялау үшін композитивті терең неврал желінің архитектурасын келтіреміз. Келтірілген әдіс тапсырманы сөз- лимма екі арасындағы түрлендіруді дұрыс өңдеу бұтағын анықтау үшін анықтайды. Жергілікті сөздің лиммасын табу үшін біз екі сәтті қайталанатын құрылғыларды қолданамыз - біріншісі таңбаның деңгейінің тәуелдігін тарту үшін қолданылады, келесі сөздің контексті мәліметін алып тастайды. Lemming және Morfette секілді моделіміздің негізгі артықшылықтары - i) ол алтын лиммадан басқа үлкен морфологиялық атрибуттарына қатынау үшін адамдардың шешілген мүмкіндіктерінен тәуелді (ii) емес. Біз 9 тілде лимматизаторын - бенгали, каталан, голландша, хинди, венгарша, итальян, латын, румын және испан тілдеріне бағалаймыз. Бенгалияның басқа тілдерінде Lemming және Morfette әдісін басқа тілдеріне жеткізеді. Бенгалияның үлгісін оқыту үшін алтын лимма белгіленген деректер жиынын құрамыз (1 702 сөз жалпы 20 257 сөз белгілері бар), бұл жұмысының қосымша қатынасы.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame sudėtinę gilaus nervų tinklo architektūrą, skirtą kontroliuojamam ir kalbų nepriklausomam kontekstui jautriam lemmatizavimui. Siūlomame metode nagrinėjama užduotis nustatyti teisingą redakcijos medį, kuris atspindi pokyčius tarp žodžių ir limos poros. Siekiant rasti paviršinio žodžio lemmą, mes naudojame dvi iš eilės dvikrypties vartų pasikartojančias struktūras - pirmoji naudojama ištraukti priklausomybę nuo požymių lygio, o kita apima konkretaus žodžio kontekstinę informaciją. Pagrindiniai mūsų modelio privalumai, palyginti su naujausiais lemmatizatoriais, pavyzdžiui, Lemming ir Morfette, yra: i) jis nepriklauso nuo žmogaus nuspręstų savybių ii) i šskyrus auksinę lemmą, bendram mokymuisi nereikia jokio kito brangio morfologinio požymio. Mes vertiname lemmatizatorą devyniomis kalbomis - bengalų, katalanų, olandų, hindų, vengrų, italų, lotynų, rumunų ir ispanų. Nustatyta, kad siūlomas metodas, išskyrus bengalį, viršija Lemming ir Morfette rezultatus kitomis kalbomis. Norėdami treniruoti Bengalų model į, parengiame auksinę citriną pažymėtą duomenų rinkinį (turintį 1 702 sakinius su iš viso 20 257 žodžių ženklais), kuris yra papildomas šio darbo indėlis.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме композитна архитектура на длабока нервна мрежа за надгледувана и независна од јазикот контекст чувствителна лематизација. Предложениот метод ја смета задачата за идентификување на правилното уредувачко дрво кое ја претставува трансформацијата помеѓу збор-лима пар. За да ја најдеме лимата на површината на зборот, искористуваме две посредни дворечни повторни структури - првата се користи за извлекување на зависностите од нивото на карактери и следната ги зазема контекстните информации на дадениот збор. The key advantages of our model compared to the state-of-the-art lemmatizers such as Lemming and Morfette are - (i) it is independent of human decided features (ii) except the gold lemma, no other expensive morphological attribute is required for joint learning.  Го проценуваме лиматизаторот на девет јазици - бенгали, каталонски, холандски, хинди, унгарски, италијански, латински, романски и шпански. Откриено е дека освен Бенгали, предложениот метод го надминува Леминг и Морфет на другите јазици. За да го обучуваме моделот на Бенгали, развиваме златен национален компјутер на податоци (со 1.702 реченици со вкупно 20.257 зборни знаци), што претставува дополнителен придонес за оваа работа.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur rangkaian saraf dalam komposit untuk lemmatisasi sensitif konteks yang diawasi dan bebas bahasa. Kaedah yang diusulkan mempertimbangkan tugas sebagai mengenalpasti pepohon edit yang betul yang mewakili perubahan antara pasangan kata-lemma. Untuk mencari lemma perkataan permukaan, kita mengeksploitasi dua struktur berulang berturut-turut gerbang bidireksi - yang pertama digunakan untuk mengekstrak dependensi aras aksara dan yang berikutnya menangkap maklumat kontekstual perkataan yang diberi. Keuntungan utama model kita dibandingkan dengan lemmatizer-state-of-the-art seperti Lemming dan Morfette ialah - (i) ia adalah bebas dari ciri-ciri keputusan manusia (ii) kecuali lemma emas, tiada atribut morfologik mahal lain diperlukan untuk belajar bersama. Kami menilai lemmatizer dalam sembilan bahasa - Bengali, Catalan, Belanda, Hindi, Hungari, Itali, Latin, Romani dan Sepanyol. It is found that except Bengali, the proposed method outperforms Lemming and Morfette on the other languages.  Untuk melatih model di Bengali, kami mengembangkan set data anotasi lemma emas (mempunyai 1,702 kalimat dengan total 20,257 token perkataan), yang merupakan kontribusi tambahan kerja ini.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതും ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്രതയുള്ള വെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് സ്വാതന്ത്രമായ ലിമാറ്റേഷനുമായുള്ള ഒരു ആഴത്ത പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക്- ലെമ്മാ ജോടിയുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷ ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ ലെമ്മ കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d വിജയിക്കപ്പെട്ട രണ്ട് വിനിമയകരമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു- ആദ്യം അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയിലെ ആശ്രയിക്കാന്\u200d  ലെമ്മിംങും മോര്\u200dഫെറ്റിനും പോലുള്ള ലെമ്മാറ്റര്\u200d രാജ്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ താക്കോല്\u200d ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d- (i) ഇത് മനുഷ്യന്\u200d തീരുമാനിച്ചതിന്റെ സ്വതന്ത്രമാണ് We evaluate the lemmatizer on nine languages - Bengali, Catalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungarian, Italian, Latin, Romanian and Spanish.  ബാങ്കാലിയല്ലാതെ, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയില്\u200d ലെമിംഗിനെയും മോര്\u200dഫെറ്റിനെയും മറ്റു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പി ബംഗാലിയിലെ മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ ലെമ്മാ പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിച്ച ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു (ഒരു 1,702 വാക്ക് മ', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu arkitettura komposta tan-netwerk newrali profond għal limmatizzazzjoni sensittiva fil-kuntest superviż u indipendenti mil-lingwa. Il-metodu propost jikkunsidra l-kompitu li jidentifika s-siġar tal-edit korrett li jirrappreżenta t-trasformazzjoni bejn par tal-kelma lemma. Biex issib il-limma ta’ kelma tal-wiċċ, nisfruttaw żewġ strutturi rikorrenti b’żewġ direzzjonijiet suċċessivi - l-ewwel waħda tintuża biex jiġu estratti d-dipendenzi fuq il-livell tal-karattri u l-oħra taqbad l-informazzjoni kuntestwali tal-kelma mogħtija. The key advantages of our model compared to the state-of-the-art lemmatizers such as Lemming and Morfette are - (i) it is independent of human decided features (ii) except the gold lemma, no other expensive morphological attribute is required for joint learning.  Nivvalutaw il-limmatizzatur fuq disa' lingwi - Bengali, Katalan, Olandiż, Hindi, Ungeriż, Taljan, Latin, Rumen u Spanjol. Instab li ħlief il-Bengali, il-metodu propost jaqbeż il-Lemming u l-Morfette fil-lingwi l-oħra. Biex inħarrġu l-mudell fuq il-Bengali, niżviluppaw sett ta’ dejta annotat b’lemma tad-deheb (b’1,702 sentenza b’total ta’ 20,257 karta), li huwa kontribut addizzjonali ta’ dan ix-xogħol.", 'mn': 'Бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн, хэлний тусгаар хамааралтай сэтгэл хөдлөлийн гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг танилцуулдаг. Өөрчлөгдсөн арга нь ажлыг зөв загварын модыг тодорхойлох гэж боддог. Газарын үгийг олохын тулд бид хоёр дахин дахин дахин давтагдсан бүтэц ашигладаг. Эхний нь харьцааны түвшинд хамааралтай байдлыг гаргах хэрэгтэй. Дараагийн нь дараагийн үгийг дахин давтагдсан мэдээллийг авдаг. Бидний загварын гол давуу талууд нь Леминг болон Морфетт зэрэг урлагийн улс төрөлхтний хувьд харьцуулахад хамаагүй. Энэ бол алт лиммаас гадна хүний шийдвэрлэгдсэн чадваруудын тухай хамаагүй. Өөр үнэтэй морфологик харьцуулалт нь нийлбэр Бид 9 хэл дээр лимматизаторыг баталж байна: Бенгали, Каталан, Дач, Хинди, Венгрийн, Италийн, Латин, Румын, Испан. Бэнгалийн бусад хэл дээр Леминг болон Морфеттийг дамжуулах арга зам нь бусад хэл дээр байдаг. Бенгалийн загварыг суралцахын тулд бид алтын лимма өгөгдлийн санг хөгжүүлнэ (1.702 өгөгдлийн нийт 20.257 үг илэрхийлэл) гэсэн үг. Энэ нь энэ ажлын нэмэлт үүрэг.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy złożoną architekturę głębokiej sieci neuronowej do nadzorowanej i niezależnej językowej lemmatyzacji kontekstowej. Proponowana metoda uwzględnia zadanie jako identyfikację poprawnego drzewa edycji reprezentującego transformację między parą słowo-lemma. Aby znaleźć lemmę słowa powierzchniowego, wykorzystujemy dwie kolejne dwukierunkowe powtarzające się struktury, z których pierwsza jest używana do wyodrębnienia zależności poziomu znaków, a następna przechwytuje informacje kontekstowe danego słowa. Kluczowymi zaletami naszego modelu w porównaniu z nowoczesnymi lemmatyzatorami, takimi jak Lemming i Morfette, są: i) jest on niezależny od cech zdecydowanych przez człowieka (ii) oprócz lemmy złotej, do wspólnego uczenia się nie wymaga żadnego innego kosztownego atrybutu morfologicznego. Oceniamy lemmatyzator na dziewięciu językach: bengalski, kataloński, holenderski, hindi, węgierski, włoski, łaciński, rumuński i hiszpański. Stwierdzono, że oprócz bengalskiego, proponowana metoda przewyższa Lemminga i Morfette w innych językach. Aby szkolić model na bengalskim, opracowujemy złoty zestaw danych z adnotacją lemmy (posiadający zdania 1,702 z łącznie 20,257 tokenów słowa), który jest dodatkowym wkładem niniejszej pracy.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein komponent dyp neuralnettverkstarkitektur for oversikt og språk uavhengig kontekstsensitiv lemmatisering. Dette første metoden ser på oppgåva som å identifisera den rette redigeringstre som representerer transformasjonen mellom eit ord- lemma- par. For å finna limma av eit overflate ord, bruker vi to etterfølgjande gjentakingsstrukturar. Den første vert brukt til å pakka ut avhengigheten av teiknvoltet og den neste hentar kontekstinformasjonen om det oppgjevne ordet. Nøkkelfordelene av modellen vårt sammenlignet med kunstlemmatiseringa som Lemming og Morfette er i) det er uavhengig av menneskelige bestemte funksjonar (ii) unntatt gullet lemma, er ingen andre dykka morfologiske attributt nødvendig for å lære saman. Vi evaluerer lemmatizeren på ni språk – Bengalisk, katalansk, nederlandsk, hindsk, ungarsk, italsk, latinsk, rumensk og spansk. Det finst at, unntatt Bengali, den foreslåde metoden utfører Lemming og Morfette på dei andre språka. For å trene modellen på Bengali, utviklar vi eit gull lemma-notasjonssett (med 1.702 setningar med totalt 20.257 ordteikn), som er ein ekstra bidrag av dette arbeidet.', 'ro': 'Introducem o arhitectură compusă de rețea neurală profundă pentru lemmatizarea contextului supravegheat și independentă de limbaj. Metoda propusă consideră sarcina de a identifica arborele de editare corect care reprezintă transformarea dintre o pereche de cuvânt-lemma. Pentru a găsi lemma unui cuvânt de suprafață, exploatăm două structuri recurente bidirecționale succesive - prima este folosită pentru a extrage dependențele de nivel de caractere și următoarea captură informațiile contextuale ale cuvântului dat. Avantajele cheie ale modelului nostru în comparație cu lemmatizatorii de ultimă generație precum Lemming și Morfette sunt - (i) este independent de trăsăturile umane decise (ii) cu excepția lemmei de aur, nici un alt atribut morfologic costisitor nu este necesar pentru învățarea comună. Evaluăm lemmatizatorul pe nouă limbi - bengali, catalană, olandeză, hindi, maghiară, italiană, latină, română și spaniolă. Se constată că, cu excepția bengalilor, metoda propusă depășește Lemming și Morfette în celelalte limbi. Pentru a instrui modelul în limba bengaleză, dezvoltăm un set de date adnotat cu lemma aurie (având 1.702 propoziții cu un total de 20.257 de jetoane de cuvinte), ceea ce reprezintă o contribuție suplimentară a acestei lucrări.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo kompoziciju duboke neuralne mreže arhitekture za nadzornu i jezičku nezavisnost osjetljivu limmatizaciju konteksta. Predložena metoda smatra zadatak da identifikuje pravo edicionalno drvo koje predstavlja transformaciju između parova riječi-limme. Da bi pronašli limu površine reči, iskorištavali smo dve poslednje bidirektivne rekonstrukcije - prva se koristi za izvlačenje ovisnosti nivoa karaktera i sledeća uhvati kontekstualne informacije o određenoj reči. Ključne prednosti našeg modela u usporedbi sa državnim limmatizerima kao što su Lemming i Morfette - i) to je nezavisno od ljudskih odlučenih karakteristika (ii) osim zlatne lime, za zajedničko učenje nije potrebna druga skupa morfološka atributa. Procjenjujemo limmatizator na devet jezika - bengali, katalanski, holandski, hindi, mađarski, italijanski, latinski, rumunski i španjolski. Nalazi se da osim Bengalija, predložena metoda iznosi Lemming i Morfette na drugim jezicima. Da bi obučili model na Bengaliju, razvili smo zlatnu limu annotiranu kompletu podataka (imajući 1.702 rečenica sa ukupno 20.257 rečenih znakova), što je dodatni doprinos ovog rada.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය සහ භාෂාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණ ජ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විද්\u200dයාවේ විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන- ලෙම්මා ජෝකයක් අතර වෙනස් විද්\u200dයාපනය කරනවා කියලා කාර්ය පුළුවන් වචනයක් හොයාගන්න, අපි පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පස්සෙන් පුළුවන් පස්සෙන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් වචනයක් පු අපේ මොඩල් එකේ යතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ලෙම්ෆෙට් වලින් ලෙම්ෆෙට් වලින් ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ - (i) ඒක මිනිස්සුන් තීරණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නි අපි ලෙම්මාසියර් විශ්වාස කරනවා භාෂාවක් නවයින් - බෙන්ගාලි, කැතාලාන්, ඩච්ච්, හින්දි, හුන්ගාරියාන්, ඉතා ඒක හොයාගන්නවා බෙන්ගාලි විතරයි, ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ලෙම්මින්ග් සහ මොර්ෆෙට් විතරයි අනිත් භාෂාවට. බෙන්ගාලි වලින් මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි සුන්දු ලෙම්මාව ප්\u200dරධානයක් විස්තර කරනවා (1,702 වචනයක් සම්පූර්ණ 20,257 වචනයක් තියෙ', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en sammansatt djupneuralt nätverksarkitektur för övervakad och språkoberoende kontextkänslig lemmatisering. Den föreslagna metoden överväger uppgiften att identifiera rätt redigeringsträd som representerar omvandlingen mellan ett ord-lemma par. För att hitta lemma i ett ytord utnyttjar vi två på varandra följande tvåriktade återkommande strukturer - den första används för att extrahera teckenivåberoenden och nästa fångar kontextuell information för det givna ordet. De viktigaste fördelarna med vår modell jämfört med state-of-the-art lemmatizers som Lemming och Morfette är - (i) den är oberoende av mänskliga bestämda egenskaper (ii) förutom guldlemma, inget annat dyrt morfologiskt attribut krävs för gemensamt lärande. Vi utvärderar lemmatizern på nio språk - bengali, katalanska, nederländska, hindi, ungerska, italienska, latin, rumänska och spanska. Det konstateras att förutom bengaliska, den föreslagna metoden överträffar Lemming och Morfette på de andra språken. För att träna modellen på bengaliska utvecklar vi en guldlemma kommenterad datauppsättning (med 1 702 meningar med totalt 20 257 ordtokens), vilket är ett ytterligare bidrag till detta arbete.', 'so': "Waxaannu soo bandhignaa dhismaha internetka ee hoos u dheer oo neurada ah oo la ilaaliyo iyo luqada oo xor u ah oo la soo saaro jimicsiga jimicsiga. Midabka la soo jeedo ayaa ka xisaabinaya shaqada si loo aqoonsado geedka saxda ah oo u jeeda beddelka labada labo ah. Si aan u helno xammeeya hadalka surface, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa laba dhismo oo soo socda oo dib u soo socda - kii ugu horeeyay ayaa loo isticmaalaa inuu ka soo bixiyo heerka ku xiran, kii dambena wuxuu qabsadaa macluumaadka joogtada ah ee erayga la siiyey. Furaha muhiimka ah ee modeleena oo la barbaran karo wadamada farshaxanka ah, sida Lemming iyo Morfette waa mid aan xor u lahayn xuquuqda dadka oo go'aanta u gaaray (i i) halka dahabka mooyaane, waxbarashada wadajirka ah looma baahna mid kale oo qaali ah. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa macluumaadka ku qoran sagaal luqadood - Bengali, Katalaan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungariyan, Talyaani, Latin, Romaniyan iyo Isbanish. Waxaa laga helaa in qaabka la soo jeeday oo aan Bengali ahayn uu ku soo bandhigo Lumming iyo Morfette oo ku qoran luqadaha kale. Si a an u tababarino tilmaamaha Bengali, waxaynu u horumarinnaa sawir dahab ah oo la wareejiyo (waxaa lagu siinayaa 1,702 imtixaan oo dhamaan 20,257 eray oo warqad ah), taasina waa qayb dheeraad ah oo ka mid ah shuqulkan.", 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு கூட்டிணைக்கப்பட்ட ஆழமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் மொழியின் சுதந பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் சொல்- லெம்மா ஜோடி இடையே மாற்றத்தை குறிப்பிடும் சரியான தொகுப்பு மரத்தை குறிப ஒரு மேற்கோள் வார்த்தையை கண்டுபிடிக்க, நாம் வெற்றியடைந்த இரண்டு வெற்றிகரமான திரும்ப திரும்ப அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் - முதலில் ஒரு எழுத்து நி லெம்மிங் மற்றும் மார்பெட்ட் போன்ற கலை லெம்பெட்டின் நிலையை ஒப்பிட்டு எங்கள் மாதிரியின் முக்கிய விருப்பங்களின் விருப்பங்கள் - (i) இது மனித த தீர்மானிக்கப்பட் 9 மொழிகளில் பெங்காலி, காட்டல், டுச்சு, ஹின்டி, ஹங்கேரிய, இத்தாலியன், லாட்னின், ருமானியன் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் மூலம் மூலம் இலம்மாட் பெங்காலி தவிர, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் லெம்மிங் மற்றும் மார்பெட்டை மற்ற மொழிகளில் வெளியேறுகி பெங்காலியில் மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு தங்கக் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் (1,702 வாக்குகள் மொத்தமாக 20,257 வார்த', 'ur': 'ہم ایک محبوب عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری پیش آتے ہیں جو نظر کیا جاتا ہے اور زبان کے ساتھ مستقل سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ سینٹ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ یہ کام کو سمجھتا ہے کہ ایک کلمات-لیمیا جوڑ کے درمیان تغییر کی تصدیق کرنے والی صحیح سمجھنے کے درخت کی تصدیق کرے۔ ایک سطح لفظی لفظ کے لفظ کو پانے کے لئے، ہم دو پیچھے پیچھے پیچھے دوبارہ پیدا کیے گئے ساختاروں کو استعمال کرتے ہیں - پہلی شخصت سطح اعتباری اضافہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اور دوسری بات کے متوسط معلومات کو پکڑتا ہے۔ ہمارے مدل کے کلی فائدہ ہیں لیمینگ اور مورفیٹ کے مقابلہ میں، سونے لیمیا کے سوا، اس کا کوئی دوسرا گراں مورپولوژیکی اثبات نہیں ہے جو ملک کی تعلیم کے لئے لازم ہے. ہم نے نو زبانوں پر لیمٹیزر کا ارزش کیا - بنگالی, کاتالان, ڈنچ, ہنگری, ایتالیایی, لاتین, رومانی اور اسپانیایی۔ یہ پایا گیا ہے کہ بنگالی کے سوا، یہ پیشنهادہ طریقہ دوسری زبانوں پر لمینگ اور مورفیٹ کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ بنگلی پر موڈل کی تعلیم کے لئے ہم ایک سونے لیمو کا ڈیٹ سٹ ایجاد کرتے ہیں (ایک 702 جماعت 20,257 لکھ ٹوکنوں کے ساتھ) جو اس کام کا اضافہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz bir kompyuterdagi neyrolik tarmoqni ishlab chiqaramiz, o'zimni boshqarish va qo'lbola'liq muhimlik tarmoqni o'rganamiz. Name Tovush so'zni topish uchun biz muvaffaqiyatli ikkita muvaffaqiyatli qo'yilgan tizimni ishlatimiz - birinchi qoidagi harfni qoidaga ishlatish uchun ishlatiladi, keyingi soʻzning davomida maʼlumotni olib tashlaydi. Bizning modelimizning muhim imkoniyatlarimiz, Lemming va Morfett kabi maqsadimizning holatiga qismlarimiz - (i) odamning o'rganish imkoniyatlarini qo'shish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'lmaydi, balki gull lema faqat o'rganish uchun boshqa qiymati morfologik imkoniyati kerak emas. Biz tarmoqni 9 tillarda qiymatlashimiz: Bengali, Katalan, Dutch, Hindi, HungariyaName Bu yerda Bengalcha faqat boshqa tillarda quyidagi usul Lemming va Morfette ishlab chiqaradi. Bengalning modelini o'rganish uchun biz bir maʼlumot tarkibini o'rganamiz (birinchi 20,257 soʻz signali bilan 1,702 so'zlari yozib keladi) bu ishning qoʻshimcha paydo bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc mạng thần kinh lớn lớn để giám sát và giải phóng các ngữ cảnh nhạy cảm. Phương pháp đề nghị xem nhiệm vụ là xác định đúng cây sửa đổi đại diện cho sự chuyển đổi giữa một cặp Từ lemma. Để tìm ra các lemma của một từ bề mặt, chúng ta khai thác hai cấu trúc hàng tiếp theo theo theo theo hàng hai đệ quy quy định hàng loạt\'cái đầu tiên được dùng để chiết xuất các tính phụ thuộc cấp ký tự\'và cái tiếp theo nắm bắt các thông tin định của từ đã đưa ra. Các ưu đi ểm quan trọng của mô hình so với các mô-tơ nghệ thuật hiện đại như Lemming và Morcitte là "i) nó không phân biệt được tính chất quyết định của con người (ii) ngoại trừ kim bài, không cần thêm các đặc điểm quyết định đắt tiền khác để học chung. Chúng tôi đánh giá giải thích chín ngôn ngữ- Bengali, Catalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungary, Italian, Latin, Rumani, Spanish. Nó được tìm thấy là ngoại trừ Bengali, phương pháp được đề xuất giỏi hơn Lemming và Mornette trên các ngôn ngữ khác. Để đào tạo mô hình của Bengali, chúng ta phát triển một tập tin dữ liệu mạ vàng lemmut (có phần lời 1,702 với tổng thể Okay,257 từ tokens), vai trò thêm phần đóng góp của công trình này.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме композитна архитектура на дълбока невронна мрежа за контролирана и езикова независима контекстна лематизация. Предложеният метод разглежда задачата за идентифициране на правилното редактиране дърво, представляващо трансформацията между двойка дума-лема. За да открием лемата на една повърхностна дума, използваме две последователни двупосочни повтарящи се структури - първата се използва за извличане на зависимостите на нивото на символа, а следващата улавя контекстуалната информация на дадената дума. Основните предимства на нашия модел в сравнение с най-съвременните лематизатори като Леминг и Морфет са: (i) той е независим от решените от човека характеристики (ii) с изключение на златната лема, не се изисква друг скъп морфологичен атрибут за съвместно обучение. Оценяваме лематизатора на девет езика - бенгалски, каталонски, холандски, хинди, унгарски, италиански, латински, румънски и испански. Установено е, че с изключение на бенгалски, предложеният метод превъзхожда Леминг и Морфет на другите езици. За да обучим модела на бенгалски, разработихме анотиран набор от данни със златна лема (съдържащ 1702 изречения с общо 20 257 думи символа), което е допълнителен принос на тази работа.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo kompoznatu duboku arhitekturu neuralne mreže za nadzornu i jezičku nezavisnost osjetljivu limmatizaciju konteksta. Predložena metoda smatra zadatak identificiranjem pravog redaktnog drveta koji predstavlja transformaciju između parova riječi-limme. Da bi pronašli limu površine riječi, iskoristili smo dvije nasljedne bidirektivne rekonstrukcije - prvo se koristi za izvlačenje ovisnosti o razini karaktera, a sljedeći uhvati kontekstualne informacije o određenoj riječi. Ključne prednosti našeg modela u usporedbi s državnim limmatizerima kao što su Lemming i Morfette - i) je nezavisna od ljudskih odlučenih karakteristika (ii) osim zlatne lime, za zajedničko učenje nije potrebna druga skupa morfološka atributa. Procjenjujemo limmatizač na devet jezika - bengalski, katalanski, holandski, hindi, mađarski, italijanski, latinski, rumunski i španjolski. Pronalazi se da osim Bengalija, predložena metoda iznosi Lemming i Morfette na drugim jezicima. Da bi obučili model na Bengaliju, razvili smo zlatnu limu annotiranu kompletu podataka (imajući 1 702 rečenica s ukupno 20 257 riječi znakova), što je dodatni doprinos ovog rada.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en sammensat dyb neural netværksarkitektur til overvåget og sproguafhængig kontekstfølsom lemmatisering. Den foreslåede metode betragter opgaven som at identificere det korrekte redigeringstræ, der repræsenterer transformationen mellem et ord-lemma par. For at finde lemma af et overfladebord udnytter vi to på hinanden følgende bidirektionelle tilbagevendende strukturer - den første bruges til at udtrække afhængighederne af tegneniveau og den næste fanger kontekstuelle oplysninger om det givne ord. De vigtigste fordele ved vores model sammenlignet med de state-of-the-art lemmatizers som Lemming og Morfette er - (i) det er uafhængigt af menneskelige besluttede træk (ii) undtagen guldlemma, ingen anden dyr morfologisk egenskab er påkrævet for fælles læring. Vi evaluerer lemmatizeren på ni sprog - bengali, catalansk, hollandsk, hindi, ungarsk, italiensk, latin, rumænsk og spansk. Det konstateres, at bortset fra bengali, den foreslåede metode overgår Lemming og Morfette på de andre sprog. For at træne modellen på bengalisk udvikler vi et guldlemma kommenteret datasæt (med 1.702 sætninger med i alt 20.257 ord tokens), hvilket er et yderligere bidrag til dette arbejde.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een samengestelde diepe neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor begeleide en taalonafhankelijke contextgevoelige lemmatisatie. De voorgestelde methode beschouwt de taak als het identificeren van de juiste bewerkboom die de transformatie tussen een woord-lemma paar vertegenwoordigt. Om het lemma van een oppervlaktewoord te vinden, gebruiken we twee opeenvolgende bidirectionele gated recidivierende structuren. De eerste wordt gebruikt om de afhankelijkheden op tekenniveau te extraheren en de volgende vangt de contextuele informatie van het gegeven woord op. De belangrijkste voordelen van ons model ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art lemmatizers zoals Lemming en Morfette zijn Ai) het is onafhankelijk van menselijke beslissende kenmerken (ii) behalve het gouden lemma, er is geen andere dure morfologische attribuut vereist voor gezamenlijk leren. We evalueren de lemmatizer op negen talen: Bengaals, Catalaans, Nederlands, Hindi, Hongaars, Italiaans, Latijn, Roemeens en Spaans. Behalve Bengaals is gebleken dat de voorgestelde methode beter presteert dan Lemming en Morfette op de andere talen. Om het model op Bengaals te trainen, ontwikkelen we een gouden lemma geanotateerde dataset (met 1,702 zinnen met in totaal 20,257 woordtokens), wat een extra bijdrage is van dit werk.', 'de': 'Wir führen eine Composite Deep Neuronal Network Architektur für überwachte und sprachunabhängige kontextsensitive Lemmatisierung ein. Die vorgeschlagene Methode betrachtet die Aufgabe darin, den richtigen Bearbeitungsbaum zu identifizieren, der die Transformation zwischen einem Wort-Lemma-Paar darstellt. Um das Lemma eines Flächenwortes zu finden, nutzen wir zwei aufeinanderfolgende bidirektionale Gated Rezidivstrukturen. Die erste wird verwendet, um die Abhängigkeiten auf Zeichenebene zu extrahieren und die nächste erfasst die Kontextinformationen des gegebenen Wortes. Die Hauptvorteile unseres Modells gegenüber den hochmodernen Lemmatizern wie Lemming und Morfette sind: i) es ist unabhängig von den vom Menschen bestimmten Merkmalen (ii) außer dem Goldlemma, keine anderen teuren morphologischen Attribute sind für gemeinsames Lernen erforderlich. Wir bewerten den Lemmatizer auf neun Sprachen: Bengalisch, Katalanisch, Niederländisch, Hindi, Ungarisch, Italienisch, Latein, Rumänisch und Spanisch. Es wird festgestellt, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode außer Bengali Lemming und Morfette gegenüber den anderen Sprachen übertrifft. Um das Modell auf Bengalisch zu trainieren, entwickeln wir einen gold lemma annotierten Datensatz (mit 1,702 Sätzen mit insgesamt 20,257 Wortmarken), der ein zusätzlicher Beitrag dieser Arbeit ist.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur jaringan saraf dalam komposit untuk pengawasan dan konteks terpisah bahasa lemmatisasi sensitif. Metode yang diusulkan mempertimbangkan tugas untuk mengidentifikasi pohon edit yang benar yang mewakili transformasi antara pasangan kata-lemma. Untuk menemukan lemma dari kata permukaan, kita mengeksploitasi dua struktur berkurung bidireksi gerbang - yang pertama digunakan untuk mengekstraksi dependensi tingkat karakter dan yang berikutnya menangkap informasi kontekstual dari kata yang diberikan. Keuntungan kunci dari model kita dibandingkan dengan lemmatizer state-of-the-art seperti Lemming dan Morfette adalah - (i) itu independen dari karakteristik keputusan manusia (ii) kecuali lemma emas, tidak ada atribut morfologi mahal lain diperlukan untuk belajar bersama. Kami mengevaluasi lemmatizer pada sembilan bahasa - Bengali, Catalan, Belanda, Hindi, Hungari, Italia, Latin, Rumania dan Spanyol. Ditemukan bahwa kecuali Bengali, metode yang diusulkan melebihi Lemming dan Morfette pada bahasa lain. Untuk melatih model di Bengali, kami mengembangkan set data anotasi lemma emas (memiliki 1.702 kalimat dengan total 20.257 token kata), yang merupakan kontribusi tambahan dari pekerjaan ini.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری عمیق شبکه عصبی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که برای تحت نظر و تحت نظر زبان محافظت خصوصی لیماتیزی حساس است. روش پیشنهاد این کار را به عنوان شناسایی درخت ویرایش درستی که نمایش تغییر بین جفت کلمه لیما می\u200cدهد می\u200cبیند. برای پیدا کردن لیما یک کلمه سطح، ما دو ساختار دوباره پیدا شده را استفاده می\u200cکنیم - اولین برای استفاده از بستگی سطح شخصیت استفاده می\u200cشود و بعدی اطلاعات متوسط کلمه داده را می\u200cگیرد. سودهای کلیدی از مدل ما در مقایسه با موقعیت لیماتزر هنری مانند لیمینگ و مورفیت هستند: i) این مستقل از ویژه های تصمیم گرفته شده انسان است (ii) بجز لیما طلا، هیچ گونه ویژه های گرون مورفیک دیگری برای یادگیری مشترک لازم نیست. ما لیماتیزر را به نو زبان ارزیابی می کنیم - بنگالی، کاتالانی، هلندی، هندی، هنگری، ایتالیایی، لاتین، رومانی و اسپانیایی. متوجه می شود که به جز بنگالی، این روش پیشنهاد لامینگ و مورفیت را در زبان دیگر انجام می دهد. برای آموزش مدل بنگالی، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای طلایی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم (با جمله ۲۰۰۲ جمله جمله\u200cی ۲۰.257 جمله\u200cای از جمله\u200cی نشانه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای زرد) که یک کمک اضافه\u200cای از این کار است.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha ujenzi wa ndani wa mtandao wa neurali kwa ajili ya ufuatiliaji wa mazingira huru na lugha. Utawala huu unapendekezwa unachukua jukumu la kutambua mti wa uhariri sahihi unaoonesha mabadiliko kati ya wawili wa maneno. Ili kutafuta nyama ya neno la juu, tunatumia miundombi yenye mafanikio yaliyotumika tena - ya kwanza inatumiwa kuondoa kutegemea alama na kinachofuata inachukua taarifa za sasa za neno hilo. Manufanya muhimu wa mifano yetu ukilinganishwa na hali ya viungo vya sanaa kama vile Lemming na Morfette ni -(i) ni huru ya tabia za binadamu zilizoamua (ii) isipokuwa limba ya dhahabu, hakuna sifa nyingine zenye ghali za kimaadilojia zinahitajika kujifunza pamoja. Tunatathmini kwa lugha tisa - Bengali, Catalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungaria, Italia, Latini, Romania na Kihispania. Inapatikana kwamba isipokuwa Bengali, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inaonyesha Lemming na Morfette kwa lugha nyingine. Ili kufundisha muundo wa Bengali, tunatengeneza mfumo wa damu ya dhahabu unaotangazwa na taarifa (na kuwa na hukumu 1,702 yenye alama za maneno 20,257), ambayo ni mchango wa ziada wa kazi hii.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n samelekteerde diep neuralnetwerk-arkitektuur vir ondersoekte en taal afhanklike konteks sensitief lemmatisasie. Die voorgestelde metode beskou die taak as om die korrekte redigeer boom te identifiseer wat die transformasie tussen 'n woord- lemma paar verteenwoordig word. Om die lemma van 'n oorspronklike woord te vind, gebruik ons twee suksesvolle bidireksjonale herhaalde strukture - die eerste een word gebruik om die karaktervlak afhanklikheid uit te trek en die volgende een opneem die konteksual inligting van die gegewe woord. Die sleutel voordeel van ons model vergelyk met die state-of-the-art lemmatizers soos Lemming en Morfette is - (i) dit is onafhanklik van menslike besluit eienskappe (ii) behalwe die goue lemma, geen ander kosbare morfologiese eienskappe is benodig vir joint leer. Ons evalueer die lemmatiseer op nege tale - Bengali, Katalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hongaarske, Italiese, Latynse, Romanië en Spaanse. Dit is gevind dat, behalwe Bengali, die voorgestelde metode uitvoer Lemming en Morfette op die ander tale. Om die model op Bengali te oefen, ontwikkel ons 'n goue lemma-annotateerde datastel (met 1,702 setnings met 'n totaal van 20,257 woordtekens), wat is 'n addisionele bydraag van hierdie werk.", 'tr': 'Biz gözleýän we dillerden howpsyz jemgyýetli bir neýral a ýry arhitekturuny alýarys. Taýýarlanan metin göreni söz-lemma çifti arasynda terjime eden düzgün edit agajyny tanamak üçin pikir edýär. Yüzünün limmasyny tapmak üçin, biz iki soňky bölegiň ardınca gatlanan yapılaryny ulanýarys - birinjisi karakter derejesiniň bağlılıklaryny a çmak üçin ullanýar we birinjisi berilen sözüň contextuali maglumatyny çeker. Lemming we Morfette ýaly sanat lemmatizçileriniň durumumyza görä örän möhüm bahatlarymyz - (i) onuň adamlaryň kararylan özelliklerinden daşary (ii) altyn lemmesinden başga, beýleki wajyp morfoloýulyk hasaplamagyna gerek däl. Biz lemmatizçisini dokuz dilde muňsat edýäris - Bengali ýa, Katalan, Holandiýa, Hindi ýa, maňgarça, italiýa, latin, rumança we espaýnça. Bengali ýadan başga, teklip eden yöntem Lemming we Morfette dillerini başga dillerde etjek bolýar. Bengali ýa nusgasyny öwrenmek üçin altyn limmanyň ýazyklanan veri setirini geliştirdik (1.702 sözlem bolsa 20.257 söz znakdarlar bilen) bu işiň ýene bir täsiridir.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një arkitekturë të thellë të rrjetit nervor për limmatizim të mbikqyrur dhe të pavarur nga konteksti gjuhësor. Metoda e propozuar konsideron detyrën për të identifikuar pemën e ndryshimit të saktë që përfaqëson transformimin midis një çifti fjalë-limë. Për të gjetur limën e një fjale sipërfaqe, ne shfrytëzojmë dy struktura në radhë të dydrejtimit të portave të përsëritura - e para përdoret për të nxjerrë varësitë e nivelit të karakterit dhe e ardhmja kapet informacionin kontekstual të fjalës së dhënë. Vantazhet kryesore të model it tonë krahasuar me limmatizatorët më të lartë të tillë si Lemming dhe Morfette janë - (i) ajo është e pavarur nga karakteristikat e vendimit njerëzor (ii) përveç limës së art ë, asnjë attribut tjetër morfologjik i shtrenjtë nuk është i kërkuar për mësimin e përbashkët. Ne vlerësojmë limmatizimin në nëntë gjuhë - bengali, katalan, hollandez, Hindi, Hungarian, Italian, Latin, Romanian and Spanish. U gjet se me përjashtim të bengalëve, metoda e propozuar është më e lartë se Lemming dhe Morfette në gjuhët e tjera. Për të trajnuar modelin në Bengali, ne zhvillojmë një set të dhënash të anotuar me limë të artë (me 1,702 fjalë me një total prej 20,257 fjalë tokens), që është një kontribut shtesë i këtij pune.', 'am': 'ለቋንቋ ነፃ እና ለቋንቋ ነፃ አስተዳደር ስብሰባዊ ጉዳይ ለመጠበቅ ጥልቅ የናውሬል መረብ መሠረትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት ቃላት-lemma ሁለት መካከል ለውጥ በሚያሳየው የክክፈት ማረፊያ ዛፍ ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ የደረጃ ቃላትን ለማግኘት፣ በሁለቱ ተከታታታይ የደጋፊ ግንኙነቶችን ለመቀጠል እንፈልጋለን - ፊተኛውም የጽሑፍ ደረጃውን መጠቀም ለመውጣት እና ሁለተኛውም የተሰጠውን የግንኙነት መረጃ ለመውጣት ይጠቅማል፡፡ የዓይነታችን የቁልፍ ጥቅማዎች እንደ Lemming እና ሞርፌት እና ከሀገሪቱ አካባቢዎች ጋር ተካክሎ (i) የወርቅ ልማድ ካልሆነ በቀር ከሰው የተወሰነ ምርጫዎች ነጻ (ii) ከወርቅ ቢሆን ሌላ የከበረ የሞሮፎሎጂ ስህተት ለመማር አይፈልግም፡፡ በዘጠኝ ቋንቋ፣ ቢንጋሊ፣ ካትላን፣ ዱክሽ፣ ኪንዲ፣ ሀንጋሪኛ፣ ጣሊያንኛ፣ ላቲን፣ ሮማኒያን እና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ ከቦንጋሊ በቀር፣ የተዘጋጀው ልማሜን እና ሞርፌቴን በሌላ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ያሳያል፡፡ በቢንጋሊ ላይ ምሳሌውን ለማስተምር፣ የዚህ ሥራ አካባቢ አካሄድ የሚታወቀውን የወርቅ የኢሜይል አካል (1,702 ቃላት በሙሉ 20,257 ቃላት ምልክቶች ይኖራል፡፡', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք համադրված խորը նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն վերահսկվող և լեզվի անկախ կոնտեքստի զգայուն լեմմատիզացիայի համար: Առաջարկված մեթոդը հաշվի առնում է խնդիրը, որպեսզի բառ-լիմա զույգ փոխակերպման արտահայտվի ճիշտ խմբագրման ծառը: To find the lemma of a surface word, we exploit two successive bidirectional gated recurrent structures - the first one is used to extract the character level dependencies and the next one captures the contextual information of the given word.  Մեր մոդելի գլխավոր առավելությունները համեմատելով վերջին տեխնոլոգիաների, ինչպիսիք են Լեմինգը և Մորֆետը, i) այն անկախ է մարդկային որոշված հատկանիշներից, II) բացառությամբ ոսկու լիմմայից, ոչ մի այլ թանկ մորֆոլոգիական հատկանիշ չի պահանջում միասին սովոր Մենք գնահատում ենք լեմմատիզմը ինն լեզուներով' բենգալացի, կատալանի, հոլանդացի, հունգարենի, իտալացի, լատիներենի, ռոմանացի և իսպաներենի: Պարզվում է, որ բացառությամբ Բենգալիի, առաջարկված մեթոդը գերազանցում է Լեմինգին և Մորֆետին այլ լեզուներում: Բենգալիի մոդելը վարժեցնելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք ոսկե լիմայով նշումնավորված տվյալների համակարգ (ունենալով 1,702 նախադասություն 20,257 բառի նշումներով), որը այս աշխատանքի ավելին ներդրում է:", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি স্বাধীন প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং ভাষার স্বাধীন প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য। প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি একটি শব্দ-লেমমা জোড়ার মধ্যে পরিবর্তনের প্রতিনিধিত্বে সঠিক সম্পাদক গাছের পরিচিতি চিহ্নিত করার জন্ সার্ভাসের শব্দের লেম্মা খুঁজে বের করার জন্য আমরা দুটি সফল বিদ্যুৎ প্রতিযোগিতার পুনরাবৃত্তিক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করি- প্রথমটি ক্যারেক্টারের স্তরের নির্ আমাদের মডেলের প্রধান সুবিধা যেমন লেমম্যাটিং এবং মর্ফেটের সাথে তুলনা করা লেম্মিং এবং মোর্ফেটের সাথে (i) এটি মানুষের সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্বাধীন (২ We evaluate the lemmatizer on nine languages - Bengali, Catalan, Dutch, Hindi, Hungarian, Italian, Latin, Romanian and Spanish.  এটি পাওয়া গেছে যে বাংলা ছাড়া প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য ভাষায় লেমিং এবং মরেফটেকে প্রকাশ করে। বাংলায় মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি সোনার লেমা তৈরি করি (১,৭২ টি শাস্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে পুরোপুরি ২০,২৫৭ শব্দ প্রতীক), যা এই কাজের আরো অংশগ্রহণ', 'ko': '우리는 언어와 무관한 상하문에 민감한 레몬화를 감독하는 복합적인 심층신경망 구조를 소개했다.이 방법은 임무를 단어의 인용을 나타내는 변환을 식별하는 정확한 편집 트리로 간주합니다.표면어의 인용을 찾기 위해 우리는 두 개의 연속적인 쌍방향 문 순환 구조를 이용했다. 첫 번째는 문자급 의존항을 추출하는 데 사용되고, 두 번째는 주어의 상하문 정보를 포획하는 데 사용된다.다람쥐와 모피트 등 가장 선진적인 다람쥐 동물에 비해 우리 모델의 주요 장점은 (i) 인류가 결정한 특징(ii)에 독립하고 황금 이론을 제외하고 연합 학습은 다른 비싼 형태학적 속성을 필요로 하지 않는다는 것이다.우리는 방글라데시어, 카탈로니아어, 네덜란드어, 인디언, 헝가리어, 이탈리아어, 라틴어, 루마니아어, 스페인어를 9가지 언어로 평가한다.연구에 따르면 방글라데시어를 제외하고 본고가 제시한 방법은 다른 언어에서 다람쥐어와 모페트어보다 우수한 것으로 나타났다.방글라데시에서 훈련 모델을 만들기 위해 우리는 황금 인용 주석 데이터 집합(1702개 문장, 총 20257개 단어 표기)을 개발했는데 이것은 이 작업의 추가 공헌이다.', 'az': "Biz mühafizə edilmiş və dil bağımsız məlumatı hissləşdirmək üçün kompozit nürol a ğ arhitektarını tanıyırıq. Önülləşdirilən yöntem işləri söz-limma çifti arasındakı dəyişiklik a ğacını təsdiqləyən doğru düzəltmə ağacını təsdiqləyən kimi hesab edir. Yüzərin sözünün limmini tapmaq üçün, biz iki nəfərdən sonra ikinci dəyişiklik dəyişiklik quruluşlarını istifadə edirik - ilk dəyişiklik səviyyəsinin bağlılıqlarını çıxarmaq üçün istifadə edilir və sonraki sözün müxtəlif məlumatını alır. Bizim modelimiz Lemming və Morfette kimi möcüzə limmatizerləri ilə qarşılaşdığı anahtar mənfəətləri - i) bu altın limdən başqa insan karar verdiyi tərzlərdən bağımsızdır, başqa mal morfolojik əlaqəsi birlikdə öyrənmək üçün istifadə edilməz. Biz lemmatizeri doqquz dillərdə değerləşdiririk - Bengali, Katalan, Holandi, Hindi, Macarya, İtalyan, Latinci, Rumun və İspanyolca. Bengali istisna olmaqla, təklif edilmiş metod Lemming və Morfette'i başqa dillərdə istifadə edir. Bengalisin modelini təhsil etmək üçün altın limma məlumatı təhsil edirik. Bu işin artıq bir qismidir.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo kompoziciju duboke neuralne mreže arhitekture za nadzornu i jezičku nezavisnost osjetljivu limmatizaciju konteksta. Predloženi metod smatra zadatak da identifikuje pravo edicionalno drvo koje predstavlja transformaciju između parova riječi-limme. Da bi pronašli limu površinske riječi, iskoristili smo dve poslednje bidirektivne rekonstrukcije - prvo se koristi za izvlačenje ovisnosti nivoa karaktera i sljedeći uhvati kontekstualne informacije o određenoj riječi. Ključne prednosti našeg modela u usporedbi sa državnim limmatizerima kao što su Lemming i Morfette - i) je nezavisna od ljudskih odlučenih karakteristika (ii) osim zlatne lime, za zajedničko učenje nije potrebna druga skupa morfološka atributa. Procjenjujemo limmatizač na devet jezika - Bengali, katalanski, holandski, hindi, mađarski, italijanski, latinski, rumunski i španjolski. Pronalazi se da osim Bengalija, predložena metoda iznosi Lemming i Morfette na drugim jezicima. Da bi obučili model na Bengaliju, razvili smo zlatnu limu annotiranu kompletu podataka (imajući 1.702 rečenica sa ukupno 20.257 znakova riječi), što je dodatni doprinos ovog rada.', 'ca': "Introduïm una arquitectura composta de xarxa neuronal profunda per a una limmatització sensible al contexte supervisada i independent del llenguatge. El mètode proposat considera la tasca d'identificar l'arbre d'edició correcte que representa la transformació entre un parell de paraules de limó. Per trobar el llem d'una paraula superficial, explotam dues estructures recurrents bidireccionals sucesives, la primera s'utilitza per extrair les dependencies del nivell de caràcter i la següent captura la informació contextual de la paraula dada. Les avantatges clau del nostre model en comparació amb els lemmatitzadors d'última generació com Lemming i Morfette són (i) independents de les característiques humanes decidides (ii) excepte el lemma d'or, cap altre atributmorfològic cara no és requerit per a l'aprenentatge conjunt. Evaluam el lemmatitzador en nou llengües: bengals, catalans, holandeses, hindès, húngar, italià, llatí, rumun i espanyol. It is found that except Bengali, the proposed method outperforms Lemming and Morfette on the other languages.  Per formar el model en bengalès, desenvolupem un conjunt de dades anotats amb llama d'or (tenint 1.702 frases amb un total de 20.257 fitxes de paraules), que és una contribució adicional d'aquest treball.", 'et': 'Tutvustame komposiitset sügava närvivõrgu arhitektuuri järelevalve- ja keelesõltumatuks kontekstitundlikuks lemmatiseerimiseks. Kavandatud meetod võtab arvesse ülesannet tuvastada õige redigeerimispuu, mis esindab sõna-lemma paari vahelist muundamist. Pinnasõna lemma leidmiseks kasutame kahte järjestikust kahesuunalist suletud korduvat struktuuri - esimest kasutatakse märgitaseme sõltuvuste ekstraheerimiseks ja järgmist tabab antud sõna kontekstiteabe. Meie mudeli peamised eelised võrreldes kaasaegsete lemmatiseerijatega nagu Lemming ja Morfette on - (i) see on sõltumatu inimese otsustatud omadustest (ii) välja arvatud kuldne lemma, ühiseks õppimiseks ei ole vaja muid kalliid morfoloogilisi atribuute. Hindame lemmatisaatorit üheksas keeles - bengali, katalaani, hollandi, hindi, ungari, itaalia, ladina, rumeenia ja hispaania keeles. Leiti, et välja arvatud bengali keel, on kavandatud meetod üle Lemmingi ja Morfette teistes keeltes. Mudeli treenimiseks bengali keeles töötame välja kuldse lemma annoteeritud andmekogumi (milles on 1702 lauset kokku 20 257 sõnamärki), mis on täiendav panus käesolevas töös.', 'cs': 'Představujeme kompozitní architekturu hluboké neuronové sítě pro kontrolovanou a jazykově nezávislou kontextovou lemmatizaci. Navržená metoda považuje za úkol identifikovat správný editační strom reprezentující transformaci mezi párem slova-lemma. Pro nalezení lemmy povrchového slova využíváme dvě po sobě jdoucí obousměrné recidivující struktury, první slouží k extrakci závislostí na úrovni znaků a další zachycuje kontextové informace daného slova. Klíčovými výhodami našeho modelu ve srovnání s moderními lemmatizátory, jako jsou Lemming a Morfette, jsou: i) je nezávislý na lidských rozhodnutých rysech (ii) kromě zlatého lemmu není nutný žádný jiný drahý morfologický atribut pro společné učení. Hodnotíme lemmatizátor na devíti jazycích: bengálština, katalánština, nizozemština, hindština, maďarština, italština, latina, rumunština a španělština. Bylo zjištěno, že kromě bengálské, navrhovaná metoda předčí Lemming a Morfette v ostatních jazycích. Pro trénink modelu na bengálštině vyvineme zlatou lemmovou anotovanou datovou sadu (která obsahuje 1,702 věty s celkem 20,257 slovních tokenů), což je další příspěvek této práce.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme komposiittisen syvﾃ､neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurin valvottuun ja kielestﾃ､ riippumattomaan kontekstitunnistukseen. Ehdotetussa menetelmﾃ､ssﾃ､ on tarkoitus tunnistaa oikea muokkauspuu, joka edustaa sana-lemmaparin vﾃ､listﾃ､ muutosta. Pintasanan lemman lﾃｶytﾃ､miseksi hyﾃｶdynnﾃ､mme kahta perﾃ､kkﾃ､istﾃ､ kaksisuuntaista suljettua toistuvia rakenteita - ensimmﾃ､istﾃ､ kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n erottamaan merkkitason riippuvuudet ja seuraava kerﾃ､ﾃ､ tietyn sanan kontekstuaaliset tiedot. Mallimme tﾃ､rkeimmﾃ､t edut verrattuna viimeisimpiin lemmatisoijiin, kuten Lemmingiin ja Morfetteen, ovat - (i) se on riippumaton ihmisen pﾃ､ﾃ､ttﾃ､mistﾃ､ ominaisuuksista (ii) lukuun ottamatta kultaista lemmaa, muuta kallista morfologista attribuuttia ei tarvita yhteiseen oppimiseen. Arvioimme lemmatizer yhdeksﾃ､llﾃ､ kielellﾃ､ - bengali, katalaani, hollanti, hindi, unkari, italia, latina, romania ja espanja. On todettu, ettﾃ､ bengalia lukuun ottamatta ehdotettu menetelmﾃ､ on parempi kuin Lemming ja Morfette muilla kielillﾃ､. Mallin kouluttamiseksi bengaliksi kehitﾃ､mme kultaisen lemman annotoidun aineiston (jossa on 1 702 lausetta ja yhteensﾃ､ 20 257 sanamerkkiﾃ､), joka on lisﾃ､osa tﾃ､tﾃ､ tyﾃｶtﾃ､.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sestavljeno arhitekturo globokega živčnega omrežja za nadzorovano in jezikovno neodvisno kontekstno občutljivo lemmatizacijo. Predlagana metoda obravnava nalogo identifikacije pravilnega urejevalnega drevesa, ki predstavlja transformacijo med parom besede-lemma. Za iskanje lemme površinske besede izkoristimo dve zaporedni dvosmerni ponavljajoči se strukturi - prva se uporablja za ekstrakcijo odvisnosti na ravni znakov, naslednja pa zajema kontekstualne informacije dane besede. Ključne prednosti našega modela v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi lemmatizatorji, kot sta Lemming in Morfette, so - (i) neodvisna od človeških odločitev o lastnostih, (ii) razen zlate lemme, za skupno učenje ni potreben noben drug drag morfološki atribut. Lemmatizer ocenjujemo na devetih jezikih - bengalščini, katalonščini, nizozemščini, hindijščini, madžarščini, italijanščini, latinščini, romunščini in španščini. Ugotovljeno je, da razen bengalščine predlagana metoda presega Lemming in Morfette v drugih jezikih. Za usposabljanje modela na bengalščini smo razvili nabor podatkov z oznakami zlate lemme (1.702 stavkov s skupno 20.257 besednimi žetoni), kar je dodaten prispevek tega dela.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani matsayin bakin tarakin neural na samura wa tsari na masu tsari da ke cikin harshe, masu da inganci na masu kashewa da muhimmanci. Tsarin da aka faɗa yana kama aikin ka gane cewa a gane cewa wata itãce na editi mai inganci mai nuna canza tsakanin wata nau'in-lima. To, dõmin ka sãmi sitar maganar fuskar, za mu yi amfani da bakin hagu biyu masu da aka bi'anar da bakin-bakin-bakin-bakin - na farkon ana amfani da a nuna masu tsarin rubutu da ke ƙaranci na tsari ga maganar da aka ba shi. Maɓallin amfani da misalinmu samfani da state-of-art-limmati kamar Lemming da Murfote ne - (i) yana da kure ga mutane da aka hukunta (ii) fãce ƙananan zĩnãriya, kuma ba a ƙayyade wasu masu kyauta masu kyauta ga mutafalojiya. Tuna ƙaddara mai zartar da shi a cikin harshen tara - Bangali, Katalan, Dushen, Hind, Hungarian, Italian, Latin, Rumiyaniya da Isbanish. Ana gane cewa, Fãce Bangali, shirin da aka buƙata, yana samar da Lemming da Murfente cikin wasu harshe. To, dõmin ya sanar da shirin ayuka a kan Bangali, za'a sami wata sita na zĩnãriya da aka sanar da shi (yana da cire 1,72 da cikakken maganar ayuka 20,25 7), wannan yana da yana ƙaranci ga wannan aikin.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh sistem sing dibenalke sampeyan alat nang nguasai gambar lan luwih dumateng sampeyan seneng pisan. Perintah sing dipunangguna kuwi nggawe task kang sampeyan akeh ngubah perusahaan kang dipunangguna ujaran kelompok-lemma Mbok ndheke limma sing gambar kelas kuwi, awak dhéwé ngeweh tanggal sampeyan bingi - sampeyan perusahaan kanggo nambah tanggal caratar lan nganggo sampeyan caratar sampeyan tambah ngewehi dhéwé. Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe lemmatizer kanggo limunik basa sing mungkin - Bengal, Catalan, Pak-Olandh, Hong, Dingo, Ithalan, Latin é, Roomani lan Spanyala. Ndheke sampeyan ngono nggambar Bengal, supoyo iso nggawe Lemm karo Angkaten segala macem nang Bengal, awak dhéwé nggawe geratan segala limma sing dadi nggawe (nyimpen tanggal 1.7 sing masara sing katêk dhéwé, géra awak dhéwé awak dhéwé) sing nambah sing ditambah akeh dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית עמוקה מורכבת למטטיזציה רגישה על רשת רשת שמבוטחת ושפה עצמאית. השיטה המוצעת שוקלת את המשימה לזהות את עץ הערכה הנכון המייצג את השינוי בין זוג מילה לימה. כדי למצוא את הלמה של מילה על פני השטח, אנו מנצלים שני מבנים משולבים משולבים בשני כיוונים משולבים - הראשון משתמש כדי להוציא את תלויות רמת האופים וההבא תופס את המידע הקונטקטי של המילה הנתונה. היתרונות המרכזיות של המודל שלנו בהשוואה למתמטיזצים המאוחרים כמו למינג ומורפט הם - (i) הוא עצמאי מהתכונות המחליטות האנושיות (ii) חוץ מהלימה הזהבת, שום תכונות מורפולוגית יקרה אחרת לא נדרשת ללימוד משותף. אנו מעריכים את הלימטיזר בתשע שפות - בנגלי, קטאלנית, הולנדית, הינדית, הונגרית, איטלקית, לטינית, רומנית וספרדית. מוצאים כי חוץ מבנגלית, השיטה המוצעת מתגברת על למינג ומורפט בשפות אחרות. כדי לאמן את המודל על בנגאלי, אנחנו מפתחים קבוצת נתונים מוכתבת לימה זהב (שיש לנו 1,702 משפטים עם בסך הכל 20,257 סימנים מילים), שזה תורום נוסף של העבודה הזאת.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་དང་སྐད་རིགས་སྟོང་པའི་ཁ་ཡུག གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགུལ་འདིས་བདེན་པའི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཟུར་བ་ཅིན་ངོས་འཛིན་ཐུབ་པ། To find the lemma of a surface word, we exploit two successive bidirectional gated recurrent structures - the first one is used to extract the character level dependencies and the next one captures the contextual information of the given word. ང་ཚོའི་མིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་མོ་དག་གི་རྩིས་མོ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་བྱས་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་བཟོས་བྱུང་། བེ་ང་གི་ཊ་ལཱན།(Catalan) ནི་ཧྲིལ་ཡུ།(Hindi), ཧང འཛམ་གླིང་ནི་བྷི་ལ་ལི་མ་དང་། སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་བེན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་འབྲི་དགོས་ན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲས་འདི་ལྟ་སྟངས་བསྡད་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'ar': 'تعلم إنشاء وإعادة استخدام الكلمات في نمذجة اللغة العصبية للمفردات المفتوحة', 'es': 'Aprender a crear y reutilizar palabras en el modelado de lenguaje neuronal de vocabulario abierto', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a criar e reutilizar palavras na modelagem de linguagem neural de vocabulário aberto', 'fr': 'Apprendre à créer et à réutiliser des mots dans la modélisation du langage neuronal à vocabulaire ouvert', 'ja': 'オープンボキャブラリ神経言語モデリングにおける単語の作成と再利用の学習', 'zh': '学开词汇神经言建模中创用单词', 'ru': 'Обучение созданию и повторному использованию слов в моделировании нейронного языка с открытым словарным запасом', 'hi': 'ओपन-शब्दावली तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडलिंग में शब्दों को बनाना और पुन: उपयोग करना सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas Focail a Chruthú agus a Athúsáid i Samhaltú Teanga Néarfhoclach Oscailte', 'el': 'Μάθηση για τη δημιουργία και επαναχρησιμοποίηση λέξεων σε Ανοικτό λεξιλόγιο Νευρική Γλώσσα Μοντελοποίηση', 'it': 'Imparare a creare e riutilizzare le parole nella modellazione linguistica neurale aperta del vocabolario', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შექმნა და გამოყენება გახსნა სიტყვების ნეირალური ენის მოდელირებაში', 'mk': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk Cipta dan Guna Semula Kata dalam Modelan Bahasa Neural-Vocabulary Buka', 'hu': 'Szavak létrehozásának és újrahasznosításának tanulása a nyílt szókincsek idegi nyelvmodellezésében', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d തുറന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാനും വീണ്ടും ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാനും പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim biex jinħolqu u jintużaw mill-ġdid il-kliem fil-Mudellar tal-Lingwa Newrali b’Vokabularju Miftuħ', 'mn': 'Үйлсийг нээлттэй сөрөг хэл загварчлах болон дахин ашиглах', 'no': 'Læring for å laga og bruka ord på nytt i opna språk- modellering', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a crea și reutiliza cuvinte în modelarea limbajului neural cu vocabular deschis', 'kk': 'Open- Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling үшін сөздерді құру және қайта қолдану', 'lt': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'pl': 'Nauka tworzenia i ponownego używania słów w otwartym słowniku Modelowanie języka neuronowego', 'si': 'වචන නිර්මාණය සහ ආපහු භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Barista inaad abuurto iyo dib u isticmaasho erayada afka furan ee Neural Modeling', 'sr': 'Naučenje stvaranja i ponovno iskoristiti reči u modelima otvorenog reči neurološkog jezika', 'ur': 'Open Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling میں کلمات بنانے اور دوبارہ استعمال کرنے کی سیکھ رہی ہے', 'sv': 'Att lära sig att skapa och återanvända ord i öppen ordförråd Neural språkmodellering', 'ta': 'திறந்த சொற்கோவை சார்ந்த மொழி மாதிரியில் உருவாக்க மற்றும் மீண்டும் பயன்படுத்த கற்று', 'vi': 'Học cách tạo và tái sử dụng từ ngữ thần kinh mở/ mạch', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Научете се да създавате и използвате повторно думи в моделиране на неврален език с отворен речник', 'hr': 'Naučenje stvaranja i ponovno iskoristiti riječi u modelu otvorenog riječnika neurološkog jezika', 'de': 'Lernen, Wörter in offenen Vokabeln zu erstellen und wiederzuverwenden', 'nl': 'Leren om woorden te maken en te hergebruiken in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'da': 'Lære at oprette og genbruge ord i åbent ordforråd Neural sprogmodellering', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای ایجاد و دوباره استفاده از کلمات در مدل زبان عصبی Open-Vocabulary', 'ko': '개방 어휘 신경 언어 모델링에서 단어 생성 및 재사용 학습', 'id': 'Belajar untuk menciptakan dan menggunakan ulang kata dalam Modeling Bahasa Neural Vocabulari Buka', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kutengeneza na kutumia maneno katika Modeling of Language Open Neural', 'tr': 'Sözleri Aç-sözli Niral Dilinde Bejer we ýene ulanmak öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer om woorde te skep en hergebruik in Open- Voorwoord Neurale Taal Modelering', 'sq': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'am': 'ሚስጢራዊ ቃላት', 'hy': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'bn': 'খোলা শব্দভাণ্ডারের নিউরাল ভাষা মডেলিং-এ শব্দ তৈরি এবং পুনরায় ব্যবহার করতে শিখা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'A칞캼q s칬zl톛r n칬ral dil modell톛rind톛 S칬zl톛ri yaratmaq v톛 yenid톛n istifad톛 etm톛k 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'Naučenje stvaranja i ponovno iskoristiti riječi u modelu otvorenog rečenika neuronskog jezika', 'cs': 'Naučení se vytvářet a opakovaně používat slova v otevřené slovní zásobě', 'ca': 'Aprendre a crear i reutilitzar paraules en la modelació de llenguatge neuronal de vocabulari obert', 'et': 'Sõnade loomise ja taaskasutamise õppimine avatud sõnavara neurokeele modelleerimises', 'fi': 'Oppiminen luomaan ja käyttämään uudelleen sanoja avoimessa sanastossa Neurokielen mallinnus', 'sk': 'Učenje ustvarjanja in ponovne uporabe besed v odprtem besednjaku Nevralno jezikovno modeliranje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Learning to Create and Reuse Words in Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling', 'jv': 'Yalewat nggawe Ketoke lan Ngubah Gambar Nang Open-Vokabulari Neral Language model', 'bo': 'Open-Vocabulary Neural Language Modeling ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའང་གསར་འཛུགས་དང་བསྐྱར་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Fixed-vocabulary language models fail to account for one of the most characteristic statistical facts of natural language : the frequent creation and reuse of new word types. Although character-level language models offer a partial solution in that they can create word types not attested in the training corpus, they do not capture the bursty distribution of such words. In this paper, we augment a hierarchical LSTM language model that generates sequences of word tokens character by character with a caching mechanism that learns to reuse previously generated words. To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus ; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.', 'ar': 'تفشل نماذج اللغة ذات المفردات الثابتة في حساب واحدة من أكثر الحقائق الإحصائية المميزة للغة الطبيعية: الإنشاء المتكرر لأنواع الكلمات الجديدة وإعادة استخدامها. على الرغم من أن نماذج اللغة على مستوى الأحرف تقدم حلاً جزئيًا حيث يمكنها إنشاء أنواع كلمات غير موثقة في مجموعة التدريب ، إلا أنها لا تلتقط التوزيع "المتقطع" لمثل هذه الكلمات. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بزيادة نموذج لغة LSTM الهرمي الذي يولد تسلسلات من الرموز المميزة لكلمة حرفًا تلو الآخر باستخدام آلية التخزين المؤقت التي تتعلم إعادة استخدام الكلمات التي تم إنشاؤها مسبقًا. للتحقق من صحة نموذجنا ، قمنا ببناء مجموعة جديدة لنمذجة لغة المفردات المفتوحة (مجموعة Wikipedia متعددة اللغات ؛ MWC) من مقالات Wikipedia قابلة للمقارنة في 7 لغات متنوعة نمطياً وإثبات فعالية نموذجنا عبر هذه المجموعة من اللغات.', 'es': 'Los modelos de lenguaje de vocabulario fijo no tienen en cuenta uno de los hechos estadísticos más característicos del lenguaje natural: la frecuente creación y reutilización de nuevos tipos de palabras. Aunque los modelos de lenguaje a nivel de caracteres ofrecen una solución parcial, ya que pueden crear tipos de palabras no atestiguados en el corpus de capacitación, no capturan la distribución «explosiva» de tales palabras. En este artículo, aumentamos un modelo de lenguaje LSTM jerárquico que genera secuencias de fichas de palabras carácter por carácter con un mecanismo de almacenamiento en caché que aprende a reutilizar palabras generadas previamente. Para validar nuestro modelo, construimos un nuevo corpus de modelado de lenguaje de vocabulario abierto (el Corpus de Wikipedia multilingüe; CMM) a partir de artículos de Wikipedia comparables en 7 idiomas tipológicamente diversos y demostramos la eficacia de nuestro modelo en esta gama de idiomas.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de linguagem de vocabulário fixo não dão conta de um dos fatos estatísticos mais característicos da linguagem natural: a frequente criação e reutilização de novos tipos de palavras. Embora os modelos de linguagem em nível de caractere ofereçam uma solução parcial, pois podem criar tipos de palavras não atestados no corpus de treinamento, eles não capturam a distribuição “explosiva” de tais palavras. Neste artigo, aumentamos um modelo de linguagem LSTM hierárquico que gera sequências de tokens de palavras caractere por caractere com um mecanismo de cache que aprende a reutilizar palavras geradas anteriormente. Para validar nosso modelo, construímos um novo corpus de modelagem de linguagem de vocabulário aberto (o Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) a partir de artigos comparáveis da Wikipedia em 7 idiomas tipologicamente diversos e demonstramos a eficácia do nosso modelo em toda essa gama de idiomas.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques à vocabulaire fixe ne tiennent pas compte de l'un des faits statistiques les plus caractéristiques du langage naturel\xa0: la création et la réutilisation fréquentes de nouveaux types de mots. Bien que les modèles de langage au niveau du caractère offrent une solution partielle en ce sens qu'ils peuvent créer des types de mots non attestés dans le corpus de formation, ils ne saisissent pas la distribution «\xa0en rafale\xa0» de tels mots. Dans cet article, nous augmentons un modèle de langage LSTM hiérarchique qui génère des séquences de jetons de mots caractère par caractère avec un mécanisme de mise en cache qui apprend à réutiliser des mots générés précédemment. Pour valider notre modèle, nous construisons un nouveau corpus de modélisation linguistique à vocabulaire ouvert (le Corpus Wikipédia multilingue\xa0; MWC) à partir d'articles Wikipédia comparables dans 7 langues typologiquement différentes et démontrons l'efficacité de notre modèle dans cette gamme de langues.", 'ja': '固定語彙言語モデルは、自然言語の最も特徴的な統計的事実の1つである新しい単語タイプの頻繁な作成と再利用を説明できません。文字レベルの言語モデルは、トレーニングコーパスで証明されていない単語タイプを作成できるという点で部分的な解決策を提供するが、そのような単語の「破裂的な」分布を捕捉しない。本稿では、以前に生成された単語の再利用を学習するキャッシュメカニズムを用いて、文字ごとにワードトークンのシーケンスを生成する階層型LSTM言語モデルを拡張する。私たちのモデルを検証するために、私たちは7つの類型的に多様な言語の同等のウィキペディアの記事から新しいオープンボキャブラリ言語モデリングコーパス（多言語ウィキペディアコーパス; MWC ）を構築し、この範囲の言語にわたる私たちのモデルの有効性を実証します。', 'zh': '定词汇言语模形不可解自然语言最具特征性计事之一:频创新单词及重用。 虽字符言形解决方案,可以创练语料库中未证单词之类,不得此单词之突发也。 本文者,广 LSTM 言模,缓存机逐个字符生单词,缓存机成单词。 试我模样,构一新开词汇语建模语料库(多语维基百科语料库。 MWC),7种学上异言者比维基百科文章,而示我形于此有效性。', 'hi': 'फिक्स्ड-शब्दावली भाषा मॉडल प्राकृतिक भाषा के सबसे विशिष्ट सांख्यिकीय तथ्यों में से एक के लिए खाते में विफल रहते हैं: नए शब्द प्रकारों का लगातार निर्माण और पुन: उपयोग। यद्यपि चरित्र-स्तरीय भाषा मॉडल एक आंशिक समाधान प्रदान करते हैं जिसमें वे प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस में सत्यापित नहीं किए गए शब्द प्रकार बना सकते हैं, वे ऐसे शब्दों के "बर्स्टी" वितरण को कैप्चर नहीं करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक पदानुक्रमित LSTM भाषा मॉडल को बढ़ाते हैं जो एक कैशिंग तंत्र के साथ चरित्र द्वारा शब्द टोकन चरित्र के अनुक्रम उत्पन्न करता है जो पहले से उत्पन्न शब्दों का पुन: उपयोग करना सीखता है। हमारे मॉडल को मान्य करने के लिए हम एक नई खुली शब्दावली भाषा मॉडलिंग कॉर्पस (बहुभाषी विकिपीडिया कॉर्पस) का निर्माण करते हैं; MWC) 7 typologically विविध भाषाओं में तुलनीय विकिपीडिया लेख से और भाषाओं की इस श्रृंखला में हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन.', 'ru': 'Фиксированные вокабулярные языковые модели не учитывают один из наиболее характерных статистических фактов естественного языка: частое создание и повторное использование новых типов слов. Хотя языковые модели на уровне символов предлагают частичное решение в том смысле, что они могут создавать типы слов, не сертифицированные в обучающем корпусе, они не отражают «разрывное» распределение таких слов. В этой статье мы дополняем иерархическую языковую модель LSTM, которая генерирует последовательности символов токенов слов по символам с помощью механизма кэширования, который учится повторно использовать ранее сгенерированные слова. Для валидации нашей модели мы создаем новый корпус моделирования языка с открытым словарным запасом (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) из сопоставимых статей Википедии на 7 типологически разнообразных языках и демонстрируем эффективность нашей модели в этом диапазоне языков.', 'ga': 'Ní thugann samhlacha seasta stór focal cuntas ar cheann de na fíricí staidrimh is sainiúla a bhaineann le teanga nádúrtha: cruthú agus athúsáid cineálacha nua focal go minic. Cé go dtugann samhlacha teanga ar leibhéal carachtar réiteach páirteach sa mhéid is gur féidir leo cineálacha focal a chruthú nach bhfuil fianaithe sa chorpas oiliúna, ní ghlacann siad dáileadh “bursty” na bhfocal sin. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid le múnla ordlathach teanga LSTM a ghineann seichimh de chomharthaí focal de réir carachtair le meicníocht taisce a fhoghlaimíonn focail a gineadh roimhe seo a athúsáid. Chun ár múnla a bhailíochtú déanaimid corpas múinte teanga oscailte-foclóra nua (Corpas Ilteangach Vicipéid; MWC) as ailt inchomparáide Vicipéid i 7 dteanga atá éagsúil ó thaobh na clódóireachta de agus léirímid éifeachtacht ár múnla thar an raon teangacha seo.', 'hu': 'A rögzített szókincsű nyelvi modellek nem tudják elszámolni a természetes nyelv egyik legjellemzőbb statisztikai tényét: az új szótípusok gyakori létrehozását és újrafelhasználását. Bár a karakterszintű nyelvi modellek részleges megoldást kínálnak abban, hogy képesek olyan szótípusokat létrehozni, amelyeket nem tanúsítanak a képzési korpuszban, nem rögzítik az ilyen szavak "robbanós" eloszlását. Ebben a tanulmányban kiegészítünk egy hierarchikus LSTM nyelvi modellt, amely karakterről karakterre generál szótokenek sorozatait egy gyorsítótárazási mechanizmussal, amely megtanulja újrahasználni a korábban generált szavakat. Modellünk validálásához egy új, nyílt szókincsű nyelvmodellező korpuszt (többnyelvű Wikipédia Corpus; MWC) építünk összehasonlítható Wikipédia cikkekből 7 tipológiailag különböző nyelven, és bemutatjuk modellünk hatékonyságát ezen a nyelven.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα γλωσσών σταθερού λεξιλογίου δεν λαμβάνουν υπόψη ένα από τα πιο χαρακτηριστικά στατιστικά στοιχεία της φυσικής γλώσσας: τη συχνή δημιουργία και επαναχρησιμοποίηση νέων τύπων λέξεων. Αν και τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων προσφέρουν μια μερική λύση στο ότι μπορούν να δημιουργήσουν τύπους λέξεων που δεν πιστοποιούνται στο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα, δεν αποτυπώνουν την "έντονη" κατανομή τέτοιων λέξεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διευρύνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό μοντέλο γλώσσας που παράγει ακολουθίες συμβολαίων λέξεων χαρακτήρα προς χαρακτήρα με έναν μηχανισμό προσωρινής αποθήκευσης που μαθαίνει να επαναχρησιμοποιεί προηγούμενες λέξεις. Για να επικυρώσουμε το μοντέλο μας κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο σώμα γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης ανοικτού λεξιλογίου (το Πολυγλωσσικό Σώμα Βικιπαίδειας) από συγκρίσιμα άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας σε 7 τυπολογικά διαφορετικές γλώσσες και καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας σε αυτό το φάσμα γλωσσών.', 'ka': 'სიტყვებლის მოდელები არ შეიძლება ახალი სიტყვების ტიპების შექმნა და გამოყენება ერთი ფაქტიკური სტატისტიკური ფაქტიკების შესახებ. თუმცა სიტყვა-დონეზე ენის მოდელები იყენებენ ფართო პასუხი, რომელიც შეუძლია შექმნა სიტყვა ტიპები, რომლებიც არ შეიძლია შექმნა სტრუქციის კორპუსში, ისინი არ შეი ამ დომენტში ჩვენ იერაქტიკური LSTM ენის მოდელის შექმნა, რომელიც სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შედეგები შექმნის სიტყვებით სიტყვებით სიტყვებით, რომელიც უნდა ჩვენი მოდელის შესაბამისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი გახსნა სიტყვალის მოდელის კორპუს (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) 7 ტიპოლოგიურად განსხვავებული ენები და ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობა ამ ენების განსხვავებაში.', 'lt': 'Fiksuotųjų žodynų kalbų modeliai neatsižvelgia į vieną iš būdingiausių statistinių natūralios kalbos faktų: dažną naujų žodžių tipų kūrimą ir pakartotinį naudojimą. Nors simbolių lygio kalbos modeliai siūlo dalinį sprendimą, nes jie gali sukurti žodžių tipus, nepatvirtintus mokymo korpuse, jie neapsaugo tokių žodžių "bursty" platinimo. In this paper, we augment a hierarchical LSTM language model that generates sequences of word tokens character by character with a caching mechanism that learns to reuse previously generated words.  Kad patvirtintume savo model į, sukuriame naują atviros žodyno kalbos modeliavimo korpusą (daugiakalbį Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) iš panašių Wikipedia straipsnių 7 tipologiškai įvairiomis kalbomis ir parodysime mūsų modelio veiksmingumą visomis šiomis kalbomis.', 'mk': 'Fixed-vocabulary language models fail to account for one of the most characteristic statistical facts of natural language: the frequent creation and reuse of new word types.  Иако јазичките модели на ниво на карактеристика нудат делумно решение во тоа што тие можат да создадат типови на зборови кои не се потврдени во обуката корпус, тие не ја зафатуваат дистрибуцијата на „растурени“ зборови. In this paper, we augment a hierarchical LSTM language model that generates sequences of word tokens character by character with a caching mechanism that learns to reuse previously generated words.  За да го потврдиме нашиот модел конструираме нов корпус за моделирање на отворен јазик (Мултијазичен Википедиски корпус; МВЦ) од споредливи статии на Википедија на 7 типологички различни јазици и ја демонстрираме ефективноста на нашиот модел низ овој опсег јазици.', 'kk': "Табиғи тілдің ең қасиетті статистикалық шындығын есептеп алмады: жаңа сөз түрлерін құру және қайта қолдану. Таңбалар деңгейіндегі тіл үлгілерінің бөлшекті шешімін келтіруге болады, бірақ олар оқыту корпусында тексерілмеген сөздер түрін құруға болады, олар осы сөздердің 'bursty' үлестірімін тү Бұл қағазда, біз алдында құрылған сөздерді қайта қолдану механизмі арқылы таңбаларды таңбалау үшін LSTM тіл үлгісін жасап береміз. Өзіміздің моделімізді тексеру үшін біз жаңа ашық сөздер тілінің моделинген корпус (көптілік Википедия корпус; MWC) 7 типалогиялық түрлі тілдерінен салыстыратын Википедия мақалаларын құрып, моделіміздің ефективнігін осы тілд", 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tal-lingwa vokabulari fissi ma jikkunsidrawx wieħed mill-fatti statistiċi l-aktar karatteristiċi tal-lingwa naturali: il-ħolqien u l-użu mill-ġdid frekwenti ta’ tipi ġodda ta’ kliem. Għalkemm il-mudelli lingwistiċi fil-livell tal-karattru joffru soluzzjoni parzjali billi jistgħu joħolqu tipi ta’ kliem mhux attestati fil-korpus tat-taħriġ, ma jaqbdux id-distribuzzjoni ‘bursty’ ta’ dawn il-kliem. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nżidu mudell ġerarkiku tal-lingwa LSTM li jiġġenera sekwenzi ta’ karattru ta’ tokens bil-kliem bil-karattru b’mekkaniżmu ta’ caching li jitgħallem juża mill-ġdid kliem iġġenerat qabel. Sabiex jiġi vvalidat il-mudell tagħna nibnu korpus ġdid ta’ mudellar tal-lingwa vokabulari miftuħa (il-Wikipedia Corpus Multilingual; MWC) minn artikoli komparabbli tal-Wikipedia f’7 lingwi tipoloġikament differenti u niwrew l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna f’din il-firxa ta’ lingwi.', 'it': 'I modelli linguistici a vocabolario fisso non tengono conto di uno dei fatti statistici più caratteristici del linguaggio naturale: la frequente creazione e riutilizzo di nuovi tipi di parole. Anche se i modelli linguistici a livello di carattere offrono una soluzione parziale in quanto possono creare tipi di parole non attestati nel corpus di formazione, non catturano la distribuzione "bursty" di tali parole. In questo articolo, aumentiamo un modello gerarchico di linguaggio LSTM che genera sequenze di token di parola carattere per carattere con un meccanismo di caching che impara a riutilizzare le parole generate in precedenza. Per convalidare il nostro modello costruiamo un nuovo corpus di modellazione linguistica open-vocabulary (il Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) a partire da articoli di Wikipedia comparabili in 7 lingue tipologicamente diverse e dimostriamo l\'efficacia del nostro modello in questa gamma di lingue.', 'no': 'Fikserte ordspråk- modeller kan ikkje rekna på ein av dei mest karakteristiske statistiske faktora av naturspråk: den ofte opprettinga og gjenoppretting av nye ordtypar. Selv om språk-modeller for teikningsnivå gjev ein delvis løysing i at dei kan laga ordtypar som ikkje er atteste i øvingskorpusen, vil dei ikkje henta «bursty» distribusjonen av slike ord. I denne papiret aukar vi eit hierarkisk LSTM-språk-modell som lagar sekvensar av ordteikn etter teikn med ein mellomlageremekanisme som lærer å gjenoppretta førre genererte ord. For å validera modellen vår, konstruerer vi eit nytt opna ordspråk-modellering corpus (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) frå sammenlignbare Wikipedia-artiklar i 7 typologisk diverse språk og demonstrerer effektiviteten av modellen vår over denne området av språk.', 'pl': 'Modele językowe o stałym słownictwie nie uwzględniają jednego z najbardziej charakterystycznych faktów statystycznych języka naturalnego: częstego tworzenia i ponownego wykorzystywania nowych typów słów. Chociaż modele językowe na poziomie znaków oferują częściowe rozwiązanie, ponieważ mogą tworzyć typy słów niepotwierdzone w korpusie szkoleniowym, nie uwzględniają one "bursty" rozkład takich słów. W niniejszym artykule rozszerzamy hierarchiczny model językowy LSTM generujący sekwencje tokenów słowa charakter po znaku o mechanizm buforowania, który uczy się ponownie wygenerowanych wcześniej słów. Aby zweryfikować nasz model, budujemy nowy korpus modelowania języka otwartego słownictwa (Wielojęzyczny Korpus Wikipedii; MWC) z porównywalnych artykułów Wikipedii w 7 typologicznie zróżnicowanych językach i demonstrujemy skuteczność naszego modelu w tym zakresie języków.', 'ms': "Model bahasa vokbulari tetap gagal menganggap salah satu fakta statistik yang paling karakteristik bahasa alami: penciptaan dan penggunaan semula yang sering bagi jenis perkataan baru. Walaupun model bahasa aras-aksara menawarkan penyelesaian sebahagian dalam bahawa mereka boleh mencipta jenis perkataan yang tidak disahkan dalam korpus latihan, mereka tidak menangkap distribusi 'pecah' perkataan tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kita menambah model bahasa LSTM hierarkik yang menghasilkan jujukan aksara token perkataan mengikut aksara dengan mekanisme penyimpanan yang belajar untuk menggunakan semula perkataan yang dihasilkan sebelumnya. To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.", 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലെ ഏറ്റവും സ്വാഭാവികസ്ത്രീയ പരിസ്ഥിതി കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി സജ്ജീകരിച്ച പദവിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരാജയപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന പഠിപ്പിക്കാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ ടൈപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് പാര്\u200dട്ടിയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ ടൈപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d LSTM ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകളുടെ അക്ഷരരൂപത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ് ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശരിയാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ തുറന്ന പദാവലി ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. വിക്കിപ്പീഡിയയുടെ ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d 7 സ', 'mn': "Байгалийн хэл дээрх хамгийн тодорхой статистикийн үндсэн нэгийг тооцоолж чадахгүй: ихэвчлэн шинэ үг төрлийн бүтээл болон дахин хэрэглэх. Хэдийгээр хүн төрөлхтний хэл загварууд сургалтын корпус дээр баталж чадахгүй үг төрлийн шийдэл гаргаж чадна гэхдээ тэд ийм үгийг 'булчин' хуваалтыг барьж чадахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өмнө нь гаргасан үгсийг дахин ашиглах үйл ажиллагаатай хайх механизмтай үгсийн дарааллыг бий болгодог LSTM хэл загварыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бидний загварыг баталгаарлахын тулд бид шинэ нээлттэй үг үг загварын корпус (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) бүтээгдэхүүнээс 7 хэлбэрээр харьцуулагддаг Wikipedia бүтээгдэхүүнийг бүтээж, бидний загварын үр дүнг энэ хэлбэрээр үзүүлнэ.", 'ro': 'Modelele de limbaj cu vocabular fix nu reușesc să țină cont de unul dintre cele mai caracteristice fapte statistice ale limbajului natural: crearea frecventă și reutilizarea de noi tipuri de cuvinte. Deși modelele lingvistice la nivel de caractere oferă o soluție parțială prin faptul că pot crea tipuri de cuvinte care nu sunt atestate în corpul de instruire, ele nu capturează distribuția "bursty" a acestor cuvinte. În această lucrare, extindem un model de limbaj LSTM ierarhic care generează secvențe de jetoane de cuvinte caracter cu caracter cu un mecanism de caching care învață să reutilizeze cuvintele generate anterior. Pentru a valida modelul nostru, construim un nou corpus de modelare a limbajului cu vocabular deschis (Multilingval Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) din articole Wikipedia comparabile în 7 limbi diverse tipologic și demonstrăm eficacitatea modelului nostru în această gamă de limbi.', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය අසමත් වෙනවා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවික සංකේතික සැකසුම් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් න අක්ෂර- ලේවල් භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ට වචන වර්ගයක් සිද්ධා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dර මේ පැත්තට, අපි අභ්\u200dයාගයක් LSTM භාෂා මොඩේලයක් විශාල කරනවා ඒකෙන් වචන ටොකෙන්ස් අක්ෂර වලින් කැෂින් මැකසිනම් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේ අපේ මොඩල් එක විශ්වාස කරන්න අපි අළුත් විවෘත භාෂාවක් මොඩලින් කර්පුස් එකක් හදන්නේ (Multilanguage Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) විකිපිඩියා වලින් විවෘත භාෂාවක් 7 වලින් සම්ප', 'sr': 'Fiksirane rečničke modele ne računaju za jednu od najkarakterističnijih statističkih činjenica prirodnog jezika: često stvorenje i ponovno upotrebu novih tipova reči. Iako modeli jezika na nivou karaktera nude djelomično rješenje u tome što mogu stvoriti vrste riječi koje nisu potvrđene u trening korpusu, ne uhvate distribuciju "bursty" takvih reči. U ovom papiru, povećavamo hijerarhički jezički model LSTM koji stvara sekvence znakova reči po karakteru sa mehanizam nakupljanja koji nauči da ponovo koristi prethodno proizvedene reči. Da bismo potvrdili naš model, izgradili smo novi korpus modeliranja jezika otvorenog rečenika (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) iz usporedbenih članaka Wikipedia na 7 tipološki različitih jezika i pokazali efikasnost našeg model a širom ovog raspona jezika.', 'so': 'Tusaalada luuqada ee la xiriiray ee luqada waxaa laga baaqan karaa mid ka mid ah waxyaabaha takhasuska ah ee luuqada asalka ah: abuurista iyo isticmaalka noocyada cusub ee hadalka. In kastoo ay samooyin heerka afka ku qoran yihiin waxay bixiyaan xal qeyb ah, taasoo ay u abuuri karaan noocyo hadal ah oo aan lagu xadgudbin kooxda waxbarashada, ma qabsadaan qaybsiga hadalladan oo kale. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku dareynaa model luqada LSTM ee hierarchical ah oo ka soo dhashaa qoraal sawirro ah oo ku qoran xaraf sawirro ah oo ku qoran meymisyo caching ah oo baranaya in lagu isticmaalo hadal horay u soo dhashay. Si aan u xaqiijinno modellka afkayaga cusub oo furan ayaan u sameynaa korpus oo ku qoran luuqadaha afka kala duduwan (Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) oo u eg warqadaha Wikipedia oo u qoran 7 luuqado kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, waxaana muujinaynaa midowga noocyadan oo dhan.', 'ta': 'சரியாக்கப்பட்ட சொல்வள மொழி மாதிரிகள் இயல்பான மொழியின் ஒரு மிக சிறப்பு புள்ளிவிவரமான காரணிகளுக்கு கணக்கிட முடியவில்லை: அதிகபட்ட எழுத்து- நிலை மொழி மாதிரிகள் பாகமான தீர்வை கொடுக்கும் போதும், பயிற்சி குறியீட்டில் முயற்சி செய்யாத வார்த்தை வகைகளை உருவாக்கு இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் முன்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறியீட்டு எழுத்தால் வரிசையை உருவாக்குகிறது. முன்னால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்த எங்கள் மாதிரியை சரிபார்க்க புதிய திறந்த சொல்லாக்க மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறது (பல மொழி விகிபிடியா கார்புஸ்; MWC) 7 விக்கிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளில் இருந்து ஒப்பிட', 'sv': 'Språkmodeller med fast ordförråd tar inte hänsyn till en av de mest karakteristiska statistiska faktorna i naturligt språk: frekvent skapande och återanvändning av nya ordtyper. Även om språkmodeller på teckenivå erbjuder en partiell lösning genom att de kan skapa ordtyper som inte intygas i utbildningskorpusen, fångar de inte upp den "bursty" fördelningen av sådana ord. I denna uppsats utökar vi en hierarkisk LSTM språkmodell som genererar sekvenser av ordtokens tecken för tecken med en cachingmekanism som lär sig återanvända tidigare genererade ord. För att validera vår modell bygger vi en ny språkmodelleringskorpus med öppen vokabulär (Flerspråkiga Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) från jämförbara Wikipedia-artiklar på 7 typologiskt olika språk och visar hur effektiv vår modell är över denna rad språk.', 'ur': "Fixed-vocabulary language models failed to account for one of the most characteristic statistical facts of natural language: the frequent creation and re-use of new words types. Although character-level language models offer a partial solution in which they can create words types not certified in the training corpus, they do not capture the 'bursty' distribution of such words. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ہیرآرشیک LSTM زبان مدل کو اضافہ کرتے ہیں جو پہلے پیدا کئے ہوئے کلمات کو دوبارہ استعمال کرنے کی تعلیم دیتا ہے. ہمارے مدل کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک نوی کھلی زبان کی مدل کی کورپوس (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) کو 7 تایپیپیڈیا کی مختلف زبانوں میں مقایسہ کرنے والی لکھائی سے بنایا ہے اور ہمارے مدل کی عمدگی کو اس طرح کی زبانوں میں دکھاتے ہیں۔", 'uz': "@ info Agar belgilangan harf- darajasi modellari qiymatini olib tashlaydi, ular taʼminlovchi kompyuterdagi soʻzning turlarini yaratish mumkin, balki bu so'zlarni 'bursty' tarkibini qabul qilmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz oldin yaratilgan soʻzlarni qaytadan foydalanishni o'rganish imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin. Biz modelimizni toʻgʻrilash uchun biz 7 ta ta ta'minlovchi Wikipedia maqolalaridan yangi ochiq tilning modelini yaratishmiz va bu turli tillarda modelning effektligini ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Mô hình ngôn ngữ cố định từ không giải thích được một trong những thực tế thống kê đặc trưng nhất của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên: việc sáng tạo và tái sử dụng các loại từ mới thường xuyên. Mặc dù các mô hình ngôn ngữ cấp ký tự cung cấp một giải pháp phần trong việc họ có thể tạo các kiểu chữ chưa được xác nhận trong tập thể huấn, nhưng họ không nắm bắt được sự phân phối "bùng nổ" của những từ này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nâng cao một mô hình ngôn ngữ LSTM cấp mà tạo ra chuỗi các Từ hiệu ký tự theo ký tự với một cơ chế lưu trữ mà học cách sử dụng từ đã tạo ra trước đây. Để xác minh mẫu chúng tôi xây dựng một tập thể hiện ngôn ngữ rộng mở (the multilingal Wikipedia Corpus; M4C) từ một số tác phẩm Wikipedia tương đối trong 7, đã được liệt kê bởi các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, và cho thấy hiệu quả của mẫu này trong các loại ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'nl': "Taalmodellen met vaste woordenschat houden geen rekening met een van de meest karakteristieke statistische feiten van natuurlijke taal: het veelvuldig aanmaken en hergebruiken van nieuwe woordtypen. Hoewel taalmodellen op karakterniveau een gedeeltelijke oplossing bieden doordat ze woordtypen kunnen creëren die niet in het trainingscorpus zijn getoetst, vangen ze de 'bursty' verdeling van dergelijke woorden niet op. In dit artikel breiden we een hiërarchisch LSTM taalmodel uit dat reeksen van woordtokens teken voor teken genereert met een caching mechanisme dat leert om eerder gegenereerde woorden te hergebruiken. Om ons model te valideren bouwen we een nieuw open-vocabulaire taalmodelleringscorpus (het Meertalige Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) op basis van vergelijkbare Wikipedia artikelen in zeven typologisch diverse talen en demonstreren we de effectiviteit van ons model in deze reeks talen.", 'da': 'Sprogmodeller med fast ordforråd tager ikke højde for en af de mest karakteristiske statistiske fakta i naturligt sprog: hyppig oprettelse og genbrug af nye ordtyper. Selv om sprogmodeller på tegneniveau tilbyder en delvis løsning, idet de kan oprette ordtyper, der ikke er attesteret i træningskorpusen, fanger de ikke den "bursty" fordeling af sådanne ord. I denne artikel udvider vi en hierarkisk LSTM sprogmodel, der genererer sekvenser af ordtokens tegn for tegn med en caching mekanisme, der lærer at genbruge tidligere genererede ord. For at validere vores model konstruerer vi et nyt open-ordforråd sprogmodellering korpus (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) fra sammenlignelige Wikipedia artikler på 7 typologisk forskellige sprog og demonstrerer effektiviteten af vores model på tværs af denne vifte af sprog.', 'bg': 'Моделите с фиксиран речник не отчитат един от най-характерните статистически факти на естествения език: честото създаване и повторно използване на нови типове думи. Въпреки че езиковите модели на ниво символи предлагат частично решение, тъй като могат да създават типове думи, които не са удостоверени в учебния корпус, те не улавят "бурното" разпределение на такива думи. В тази статия ние разширихме йерархичен езиков модел, който генерира последователности от словни символи знак по знак с кеширащ механизъм, който се научава да използва повторно генерирани думи. За да валидираме нашия модел, ние изграждаме нов корпус за моделиране на езика с отворен речник (Многоезичен Уикипедия Корпус; МВК) от сравними статии в Уикипедия на 7 типологично различни езика и демонстрираме ефективността на нашия модел в този диапазон от езици.', 'hr': 'Prirodnog jezika ne računaju jedan od najkarakterističnijih statističkih činjenica prirodnog jezika: često stvorenje i ponovno upotrebu novih vrsta riječi. Iako modeli jezika na razini karaktera nude djelomično rješenje u tome što mogu stvoriti vrste riječi koje nisu potvrđene u tržišnom korpusu, oni ne uhvate distribuciju takvih riječi "bursty". U ovom papiru, povećavamo hijerarhički LSTM jezički model koji stvara sekvence znakova riječi po karakteru sa mehanizam nakupljanja koji nauči ponovno koristiti prethodno proizvedene riječi. Da bismo potvrdili naš model, izgradili smo novi model jezika otvorenog rečenika korpus (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) iz usporedbenih članaka Wikipedia na 7 tipološki različitih jezika i pokazali učinkovitost našeg model a u ovom rasponu jezika.', 'ko': "고정된 어휘량 언어 모델은 자연 언어의 가장 특징적인 통계적 사실 중 하나인 신조어의 빈번한 생성과 중용을 설명할 수 없다.문자급 언어 모델은 일부 해결 방안을 제공했다. 왜냐하면 훈련 자료 라이브러리에서 검증되지 않은 단어 유형을 만들 수 있지만, 이러한 단어의 '돌발' 분포를 포착할 수 없기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 층별 LSTM 언어 모델을 확장했다. 이 모델은 캐시 메커니즘을 통해 한 글자씩 단어 표기 서열을 생성하고 이 메커니즘은 이전에 생성된 단어를 다시 사용하는 것을 배운다.우리의 모델을 검증하기 위해 우리는 7가지 서로 다른 유형의 언어의 비교 가능한 위키백과 문장에서 새로운 개방된 어휘 언어 모델링 자료 라이브러리(Multilingual Wikipedia corpus; MWC)를 구축하고 이 일련의 언어에서 우리의 모델의 유효성을 보여 주었다.", 'de': 'Sprachmodelle mit festen Vokabeln berücksichtigen nicht einen der charakteristischsten statistischen Fakten der natürlichen Sprache: die häufige Erstellung und Wiederverwendung neuer Worttypen. Obwohl Sprachmodelle auf Zeichenebene eine Teillösung bieten, indem sie Worttypen erstellen können, die im Trainingskorpus nicht attestiert sind, erfassen sie die "bursty" Verteilung solcher Wörter nicht. In diesem Beitrag erweitern wir ein hierarchisches LSTM-Sprachmodell, das Zeichen für Zeichen Sequenzen von Worttoken generiert, um einen Caching-Mechanismus, der lernt, zuvor generierte Wörter wiederzuverwenden. Zur Validierung unseres Modells konstruieren wir aus vergleichbaren Wikipedia-Artikeln in sieben typologisch unterschiedlichen Sprachen ein neues Modell für offene Vokabeln (das Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) und demonstrieren die Effektivität unseres Modells in diesem Sprachbereich.', 'id': "Model bahasa vocabulari tetap gagal memperhitungkan salah satu fakta statistik yang paling karakteristik bahasa alam: penciptaan dan penggunaan ulang tipe kata baru. Although character-level language models offer a partial solution in that they can create word types not attested in the training corpus, they do not capture the 'bursty' distribution of such words.  Dalam kertas ini, kita menambah model bahasa LSTM yang hierarkis yang menghasilkan urutan kata token karakter per karakter dengan mekanisme penyimpanan yang belajar untuk menggunakan ulang kata yang sebelumnya dihasilkan. Untuk mengkvalifikasi model kami kami membangun sebuah corpus pembukaan bahasa vokbulari baru (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) dari artikel Wikipedia yang dapat dibandingkan dalam 7 bahasa tipologis yang berbeda dan menunjukkan efektivitas model kami di seluruh jangkauan bahasa ini.", 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای استوار و استوار استوار برای یکی از حقیقت\u200cهای استاریسی\u200cترین ویژه\u200cهای زبان طبیعی به حساب نمی\u200cرسد: آفرینش و دوباره استفاده از نوع کلمه\u200cهای جدید. اگرچه مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای سطح شخصیت یک راه حل بخشی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که می\u200cتوانند نوع\u200cهای کلمات را تولید کنند که در کورپوس آموزشی ثابت نشده\u200cاند، آنها تقسیم این کلمات را نمی\u200cگیرند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل زبان LSTM را افزایش می\u200cدهیم که به عنوان شخصیت با یک مکانیسم کاشینگ یاد می\u200cگیرد که کلمات ساخته شده قبل از آن دوباره استفاده کنیم. برای تایید کردن مدل ما یک مدل جدید برای مدل کردن زبان باز و باز زبان را ساختیم (Corpus Multilingual Wikipedia; MWC) از مقاله های ویکیپیدیا قابل مقایسه در ۷ زبان نوع گوناگون است و موثرت مدل ما را در این مجموعه زبان نشان می دهیم.', 'af': "@ info: whatsthis Alhoewel karaktervlak taal modeller 'n deel oplossing aanbied in dat hulle woord tipes wat nie in die oefening korpus bevestig is nie, kan hulle nie die 'bursty' verspreiding van sodanige woorde opneem nie. In hierdie papier, ons vergroot 'n hierarkies LSTM taal model wat genereer sekwensies van woord tokens karakter deur karakter met 'n kasting mekanisme wat leer om voorheen genereerde woorde te hergebruik. Om ons model te geldigheid, konstrukteer ons 'n nuwe open-vocabulary taal modeling corpus (die Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) van vergelykbare Wikipedia artikels in 7 tipologiese verskillende tale en wys die effektiviteit van ons model oor hierdie reek van tale.", 'tr': "Sabyt sözler nusgalary tebigy diliň iň karakteristik statistik faktlarynyň biri üçin hasaplamady: täze söz hillerini bejermek we ýene ulanmakda mümkin däldir. Karakter derejesi modelleri şeklinde tanamaýan kelleme türlerini bejermek üçin bir çözüm teklip etmeýärler. Olar şol sözlerin 'eýtgeli'-ny taýýarlamaýarlar. Bu kagyzda, öňki döredilen sözleri ýene ulanmak üçin öwrenen iýerarhiýa-arşiw LSTM dili modelini baglaýarys. Modelimizi takyklamak üçin 7 tipolojik dürli dillerde ýazylan Wikipediýanyň täze a çyk sözleri modelleýän köpüsi in şa edýäris we bu dürli dillerimiziň täsirini görkez.", 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha za lugha zilizotengenezwa umeshindwa kushindwa kukumbuka kwa moja ya ukweli wa takwimu zaidi wa lugha ya asili: uumbaji wa mara kwa mara na kutumia aina mpya ya maneno. Ingawa mifano ya lugha yenye kiwango cha wahusika hutoa suluhisho la sehemu kwa hiyo ili waweze kutengeneza a in a ya maneno ambayo hayajatumiwa katika makampuni ya mafunzo, hawakamati usambazaji wa maneno haya. Katika gazeti hili, tunaongeza muundo wa lugha ya LSTM unaotengeneza mfululizo wa alama za maneno na mhusika na mfumo wa cache ambao unajifunza kutumia maneno yaliyozaliwa kabla. Kuthibitisha mtindo wetu tunajenga makampuni mpya ya muundo wa lugha huru wa lugha (Vikipedia Corpus ya lugha nyingi; MWC) kutoka makala zinazofanana na Wikipedia katika lugha 7 tofauti za kawaida na kuonyesha ufanisi wa muundo wetu katika lugha hii.', 'sq': "Modelet e gjuhës me fjalë të fiksuara dështojnë të llogarisin për një nga faktet më karakteristike statistike të gjuhës natyrore: krijimin e shpeshtë dhe përdorimin e përsëritur të llojeve të reja të fjalëve. Megjithëse modelet e gjuhës në nivelin e karakterit ofrojnë një zgjidhje të pjesshme në atë që ato mund të krijojnë tipe fjalësh që nuk janë të dëshmuar në korpus trainimit, ato nuk kapin shpërndarjen e 'shpërthyer' të fjalëve të tilla. Në këtë letër, ne shtojmë një model hierarkik gjuhësh LSTM që gjeneron sekuenca të fjalëve tokens karakter pas karakteri me një mekanizëm caching që mëson të përdorë përsëri fjalët e gjeneruara më parë. To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.", 'am': 'Fixed-vocabulary language models fail to account for one of the most characteristic statistical facts of natural language: the frequent creation and reuse of new word types.  ምንም እንኳን የፊደል-ደረጃ ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች በተስተማሪው ኮርፓስ ውስጥ ያልተደገመ ቃላት ዓይነቶችን መፍጠር ቢችሉ፣ እንደዚህ ቃላት “ብሬስቲ” ክፍል አይያዙም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የLSTM ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማድረግ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dilin ən karakteristik statistik faktlarından birini hesab etməyə çalışmır: yeni söz növlərinin yaradılması və yenidən istifadə etməsi. Həqiqətən, karakter-seviyyəti dillərin modelləri bu sözlərin "bursty" dağıtını başa düşməyən kəlmələr yaratmaq üçün parçası çözüm təklif edirlər. Bu kağızda, əvvəlcə yaratdığı sözləri yenidən istifadə etməyi öyrənən hiyerarşik LSTM dil modelini artırırıq. Modelimizi təsdiqləmək üçün yeni a çıq-sözlü dil modelləşdirən korpus (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) 7 tipolojik müxtəlif dillərdəki Wikipedia maddələrindən və modelimizin bu dillərin arasında etkinlik göstərir.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার সবচেয়ে বৈশিষ্ট্যিক পরিসংখ্যান তথ্যের জন্য ফিক্সিড- ভাষার মডেল ব্যর্থ: প্রায়শ সৃষ্টি এবং নতুন শব্দের ধরনে যদিও অক্ষর-স্তরের ভাষার মডেল একটি অংশের সমাধান প্রদান করেছে যেহেতু তারা প্রশিক্ষণের কোর্পাসে কোন ধরনের শব্দ টাইপ তৈরি করতে পারে না, তবে তা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি হিয়েরার্কিল এলস্টিএম ভাষার মডেল যোগ করি যা অক্ষরের মাধ্যমে শব্দের অক্ষর তৈরি করে একটি ক্যাশিং মেকেনিস্টেম যা আগের তৈর To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.', 'bs': 'Fiksirane rečničke modele ne računaju na jedan od najkarakterističnijih statističkih činjenica prirodnog jezika: često stvorenje i ponovno upotrebu novih tipova riječi. Iako modeli jezika na nivou karaktera nude djelomično rješenje u tome što mogu stvoriti vrste riječi koje nisu potvrđene u tržišnom korpusu, ne uhvate distribuciju "bursty" takvih riječi. U ovom papiru, povećavamo hijerarhički LSTM jezički model koji stvara sekvence znakova riječi po karakteru sa mehanizam nakupljanja koji nauči da ponovo koristi prethodno proizvedene riječi. Da bismo potvrdili naš model, izgradili smo novi korpus modeliranja jezika otvorenog rečenika (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) iz usporedbenih članaka Wikipedia na 7 tipološki različitih jezika i pokazali učinkovitost našeg model a u ovom rasponu jezika.', 'cs': 'Jazykov챕 modely s pevnou slovn챠 z찼sobou nezohled흫uj챠 jednu z nejcharakteristick휎j큄챠ch statistick첵ch fakt킁 p힂irozen챕ho jazyka: 훾ast챕 vytv찼힂en챠 a op휎tovn챕 pou탑챠v찼n챠 nov첵ch typ킁 slov. A훾koli znakov챕 jazykov챕 modely nab챠zej챠 훾찼ste훾n챕 힂e큄en챠 v tom, 탑e mohou vytv찼힂et slovn챠 typy, kter챕 nejsou potvrzeny ve v첵cvikov챕m korpusu, nezachycuj챠 "bursty" distribuci t휎chto slov. V tomto 훾l찼nku roz큄챠힂챠me hierarchick첵 jazykov첵 model LSTM, kter첵 generuje sekvence slovn챠ch token킁 znak po znaku o mechanizmus caching, kter첵 se nau훾챠 op휎tovn휎 vygenerovan찼 slova. Pro ov휎힂en챠 na큄eho modelu konstruujeme nov첵 otev힂en첵 jazykov첵 modelovac챠 korpus (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) ze srovnateln첵ch 훾l찼nk킁 Wikipedie v sedmi typologicky r킁zn첵ch jazyc챠ch a demonstrujeme efektivitu na큄eho modelu v t챕to 힂ad휎 jazyk킁.', 'et': 'Fikseeritud sõnavara keelemudelid ei võta arvesse looduskeele ühte iseloomulikumat statistilist fakti: uute sõnatüüpide sagedast loomist ja taaskasutamist. Kuigi märgitasemel keelemudelid pakuvad osalist lahendust, sest nad suudavad luua sõnatüüpe, mida koolituskorpuses ei ole tõestatud, ei kajasta nad selliste sõnade "säravat" jaotust. Käesolevas töös täiendame hierarhilist LSTM keelemudelit, mis genereerib sõnamärkide järjestusi märkide kaupa vahemällumehhanismiga, mis õpib varem genereeritud sõnu taaskasutama. Oma mudeli valideerimiseks ehitame uue avatud sõnavara keele modelleerimise korpuse (mitmekeelne Wikipedia korpus; MWC) võrreldavatest Wikipedia artiklitest seitsmes tüpoloogiliselt erinevas keeles ning näitame oma mudeli efektiivsust selles keeltes.', 'fi': 'Kiinteän sanaston kielimallit eivät ota huomioon yhtä luonnonkielen tyypillisimmistä tilastollisista tosiasioista: uusien sanatyyppien toistuvaa luomista ja uudelleenkäyttöä. Vaikka merkkitason kielimallit tarjoavat osittaisen ratkaisun, sillä ne voivat luoda sanatyyppejä, joita ei ole osoitettu koulutuskorpusessa, ne eivät kuvaa tällaisten sanojen "räikeää" jakautumista. Tässä artikkelissa kehitämme hierarkkista LSTM-kielimallia, joka luo sanamerkkien sekvensseja merkki merkiltä välimuistimekanismilla, joka oppii käyttämään uudelleen aiemmin luotuja sanoja. Mallimme validoimiseksi rakennamme uuden avoimen sanaston kielimallinnuskorpusen (Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) vertailukelpoisista Wikipedia-artikkeleista seitsemällä eri kielellä ja osoitamme mallimme tehokkuuden näillä kielillä.', 'hy': 'Fixed-vocabulary language models fail to account for one of the most characteristic statistical facts of natural language: the frequent creation and reuse of new word types.  Չնայած բնույթի մակարդակի լեզվի մոդելները մի մասամբ լուծում են առաջարկում, որովհետև նրանք կարող են ստեղծել բառի տեսակներ, որոնք չեն հավասարված մարմնի ուսուցման մեջ, նրանք չեն վերցնում նման բառերի "պայթյուն" տարածումը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ավելացնում ենք հիերարխիկ LSMT լեզվի մոդելը, որը ստեղծում է բառերի նշանների հաջորդականություններ, բառերի նշաններ, բառերի նշաններ, բառերի նշաններ, բառերի նշաններ, որոնք օգտագործվում են աղբյուրի մե Մեր մոդելը հաստատելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք նոր բաց-բաց լեզու մոդելավորման կորպուս (Բազլեզու Վիքիփեդիայի Կորպուսը, MwC) Վիքիփեդիայի համեմատական հոդվածներից 7 տիպոլոգիապես բազմազան լեզուներով և ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը այս տարբեր', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge de vocabulari fixes no responen a un dels fets estadístics més característics de la llengua natural: la creació i reutilització freqüents de nous tipus de paraules. Although character-level language models offer a partial solution in that they can create word types not attested in the training corpus, they do not capture the 'bursty' distribution of such words.  En aquest paper augmentem un model jeràrquic de llenguatge LSTM que genera seqüències de paraules fitxes caràcter per caràcter amb un mecanisme de caché que aprenen a reutilitzar paraules generades anteriorment. Per validar el nostre model construim un nou corpus de modelació de llenguatges de vocabulari obert (el Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) a partir d'articles comparables de Wikipedia en 7 llenguatges tipològicament diverses i demostrem l'eficacia del nostre model a través d'aquesta gama de llenguatges.", 'sk': 'Modeli fiksnega besedišča ne upoštevajo enega najbolj značilnih statističnih dejstev naravnega jezika: pogosto ustvarjanje in ponovna uporaba novih tipov besed. Čeprav so jezikovni modeli na ravni znakov delno rešitev, saj lahko ustvarjajo vrste besed, ki niso potrjene v korpusu usposabljanja, ne zajemajo "bursty" porazdelitve takih besed. V tem prispevku smo dopolnili hierarhični jezikovni model LSTM, ki ustvarja zaporedja besednih žetonov znak za znakom z mehanizmom za predpomnjenjem, ki se nauči ponovno uporabljati predhodno ustvarjene besede. Za preverjanje našega modela izdelujemo nov korpus za modeliranje jezikov odprtega besedišča (Multijezični Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) iz primerljivih Wikipedijskih člankov v 7 tipološko različnih jezikih in dokazujemo učinkovitost našega modela v tej vrsti jezikov.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת מילים קבועים לא מסוגלים לחשבון על אחת העובדות הסטטיסטיות הכי אופייניות של שפת טבעית: יצירת ומשתמש מחדש תדירות של סוגי מילים חדשים. למרות שפת דוגמנים ברמה של אופיים מציעים פתרון חלקי שבהם יכולים ליצור סוגי מילים שלא מועדות בקורפוס האימונים, הם לא תופסים את הפיצוץ של מילים כאלה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מגדילים מודל לשפה היררכי LSTM שיוצר רצפים של אופי סימני מילים לאפי אופי עם מנגנון מחסך שלמד להשתמש מחדש במילים שנוצרות קודם. To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.', 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིན་ན་གཅིག་ལ་རྩིས་ཐུབ་མེད། ཡིག In this paper, we augment a hierarchical LSTM language model that generates sequences of word tokens character by character with a caching mechanism that learns to re use previously generated words. To validate our model we construct a new open-vocabulary language modeling corpus (the Multilingual Wikipedia Corpus; MWC) from comparable Wikipedia articles in 7 typologically diverse languages and demonstrate the effectiveness of our model across this range of languages.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Although character-level language models offer a partial solution in that they can create word types not attested in the training corpus, they do not capture the 'bursty' distribution of such words.  Yana cikin wannan takardar, za'a ƙara wata misãlai na LSSM na hiera, wanda ke ƙara sauri masu kallo na rubutu da zane-zane da zane-zane da za'a iya amfani da kalmõmi na gabani. To, in gaskata misalinmu, za'a samun wata sabon da aka buɗe wata masanin lingui na lugha na ɗabi'a (Shirin Kishi na Multuran Wikimedia; MWC) daga masu daidaita makala na Wikimedia cikin wasu harshe 7 masu typical ko kuma za'a nũna fikancin misalinmu a kan wannan zane.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nombo model de langa cara-kudu ngewehi sistem sing wis ana perusahaan dengané sing iso nggawe tipun ditambah kuwi tindong nggawe cara-kudu, dheweke ora iso nggawe \'sepusaha\' sepusaha kanggo kelas word. Nan pepulan iki, kita nambah akeh sistem kayalamat oleh dumaten kanggo ngerasakno (token) Ngawe ngupakan modèl dhéwé nggawe langkung urip sistem sing gawe Open-Vocatrong.'}
{'en': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ar': 'توقع قطاع الطرق المهيكل للتعلم من التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل', 'es': 'Predicción estructurada de Bandit para el aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia neuronal', 'fr': "Prédiction structurée Bandit pour l'apprentissage de séquence neuronale à séquence", 'pt': 'Predição Estruturada Bandida para Aprendizado de Sequência a Sequência Neural', 'ja': '神経シーケンス間学習のための盗賊構造化予測', 'zh': '神经序至强盗结构化占', 'ru': 'Структурированное предсказание Бандита для изучения нейронной последовательности в последовательности', 'hi': 'न्यूरल सीक्वेंस-टू-सीक्वेंस लर्निंग के लिए डाकू संरचित भविष्यवाणी', 'ga': "Tuar Struchtúrtha meirleach d'Fhoghlaim Néar-Sheichimh go Seicheamh", 'ka': 'ბანდიტის სტრუქტურაციული წინაწერება ნეიროლური წინაწერების სწავლებისთვის', 'el': 'Δομημένη πρόβλεψη ληστών για τη μάθηση νευρωνικής αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία', 'hu': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'it': "Predizione strutturata bandita per l'apprendimento sequenziale-sequenziale neurale", 'kk': 'Невралдық реттеу- және реттеу оқыту үшін бандиттің құрылған предсказуы', 'mk': 'Структурирана предвидба на бандитот за учење од нервна секвенција до секвенција', 'ms': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d സെക്കന്റ് മുതല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് പഠനം', 'mt': 'Tbassir Strutturat tal-Bandit għal Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza Newrali għas-Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах гэрэл бүтээгдэхүүн төлөвлөгөө', 'no': 'Strukturert forhåndsvising av bandet for nøyralsekvens- til- sekvens- læring', 'lt': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie struktury bandytów dla uczenia się sekwencji neuronowej', 'ro': 'Predicția structurată a bandiților pentru învățarea secvență-secvență neurală', 'si': 'බැන්ඩිට් සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණ වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Banditstrukturerad förutsägelse för neural sekvens-till-sekvensinlärning', 'sr': 'Strukturalna predviđenja za učenje Neuralne sekvence do sekvence', 'so': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ta': 'பான்டிட் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'بنڈیٹ ساختاری پیش بینی نیورال سکوئنس-سے-سکوئنس سیکھنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiến thức cấu trúc cho sự học hành chuỗi thần kinh', 'bg': 'Бандитно структурирано прогнозиране за изучаване на неврална последователност към последователност', 'nl': 'Gestructureerde voorspelling van bandieten voor neurale sequentie-to-sequentie leren', 'hr': 'Strukturirana predviđanja za učenje neurološke sekvence do sekvence', 'da': 'Banditstruktureret forudsigelse for neural sekvens-til-sekvens læring', 'de': 'Bandit Structured Prediction für neuronales Sequence-to-Sequence Lernen', 'id': 'Prediksi Struktur Bandit untuk Pelajaran Sekuensi-ke-Sekuensi Neural', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد ساخته\u200cشده بندی برای یادگیری از طرح\u200cهای عصبی', 'ko': '신경 서열에서 서열로 학습하는 Bandit 구조 예측', 'tr': 'Näyral sıralan-tä-sıralan öwrenmek üçin Baglançy strukturly Wasp', 'sw': 'Bandit imeundwa Udhibiti wa Kuzungumzia Kufuatilia', 'af': 'Bandit struktureerde voorwerp vir neurale volgorde- na- volgorde- leer', 'sq': 'Prediktimi i strukturuar i banditëve për mësimin nga sekuenca në sekuencë', 'az': 'N칬ral Sequence-to-Sequence 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n Bandit Structured Prediction', 'hy': 'Հանձնակազմի կառուցվածքային կանխատեսումը նյարդային հաջորդականության սովորելու համար', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'নিউরেল সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স শিক্ষার জন্য ব্যান্ডিট ক্রান্তিক পছন্দ', 'ca': 'Predicció estructurada de bandits per aprendre seqüència a seqüència neuronal', 'cs': 'Banditová strukturovaná predikce pro učení neurální sekvence na sekvenci', 'bs': 'Strukturalna predviđanja za učenje neurološke sekvence do sekvence', 'et': 'Bandiidi struktureeritud prognoos neuraalseks järjestuseks õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Bandit Structured Ennuste hermosekvenssi-sekvenssi-oppimiseen', 'jv': 'Bandit structural prediktion for Neral Sekulate-to-Sekulate Learning', 'he': 'צפוי מובנה של שודדים ללימודי רצף לעורף', 'sk': 'Banditna strukturirana napoved za učenje živčnih sekvenc v sekvence', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Bandit Structured Prediction for Neural Sequence-to-Sequence Learning'}
{'en': 'Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback. This feedback is received in the form of a task loss evaluation to a predicted output structure, without having access to gold standard structures. We advance this framework by lifting linear bandit learning to neural sequence-to-sequence learning problems using attention-based recurrent neural networks. Furthermore, we show how to incorporate control variates into our learning algorithms for variance reduction and improved generalization. We present an evaluation on a neural machine translation task that shows improvements of up to 5.89 BLEU points for domain adaptation from simulated bandit feedback.', 'ar': 'يصف التنبؤ المنظم لقطاع الطرق إطار عمل التحسين العشوائي حيث يتم تنفيذ التعلم من ردود الفعل الجزئية. يتم تلقي هذه الملاحظات في شكل تقييم خسارة مهمة لهيكل إخراج متوقع ، دون الوصول إلى الهياكل القياسية الذهبية. نحن نطور هذا الإطار من خلال رفع تعلم الماكينة الخطية إلى مشاكل التعلم من التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل باستخدام الشبكات العصبية المتكررة القائمة على الانتباه. علاوة على ذلك ، نعرض كيفية دمج متغيرات التحكم في خوارزميات التعلم الخاصة بنا لتقليل التباين وتحسين التعميم. نقدم تقييمًا لمهمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية التي تُظهر تحسينات تصل إلى 5.89 نقطة BLEU لتكييف المجال من ردود الفعل المحاكاة لقطاع الطرق.', 'es': 'La predicción estructurada de Bandit describe un marco de optimización estocástico en el que el aprendizaje se lleva a cabo a partir de Esta retroalimentación se recibe en forma de una evaluación de pérdida de tareas para una estructura de salida prevista, sin tener acceso a estructuras de referencia. Avanzamos en este marco elevando el aprendizaje lineal de los bandidos a problemas de aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia mediante el uso de redes neuronales recurrentes basadas en la atención. Además, mostramos cómo incorporar variables de control en nuestros algoritmos de aprendizaje para reducir la varianza y mejorar la generalización. Presentamos una evaluación de una tarea de traducción automática neuronal que muestra mejoras de hasta 5,89 puntos BLEU para la adaptación de dominios a partir de comentarios simulados de bandidos.', 'fr': "La prédiction structurée Bandit décrit un cadre d'optimisation stochastique dans lequel l'apprentissage est effectué à partir d'une rétroaction partielle. Cette rétroaction est reçue sous la forme d'une évaluation de perte de tâches pour une structure de sortie prédite, sans avoir accès à des structures standard de référence. Nous faisons progresser ce cadre en élevant l'apprentissage linéaire des bandits aux problèmes d'apprentissage de séquence neuronale à séquence à l'aide de réseaux neuronaux récurrents basés sur l'attention. De plus, nous montrons comment intégrer des variables de contrôle dans nos algorithmes d'apprentissage pour réduire la variance et améliorer la généralisation. Nous présentons une évaluation d'une tâche de traduction automatique neuronale qui montre des améliorations allant jusqu'à 5,89 points BLEU pour l'adaptation de domaine à partir de la rétroaction simulée de bandit.", 'pt': 'A previsão estruturada de bandidos descreve uma estrutura de otimização estocástica em que o aprendizado é realizado a partir de feedback parcial. Esse feedback é recebido na forma de uma avaliação de perda de tarefa para uma estrutura de saída prevista, sem ter acesso a estruturas padrão-ouro. Avançamos essa estrutura elevando o aprendizado de bandidos lineares para problemas de aprendizado de sequência a sequência neurais usando redes neurais recorrentes baseadas em atenção. Além disso, mostramos como incorporar variáveis de controle em nossos algoritmos de aprendizado para redução de variância e generalização aprimorada. Apresentamos uma avaliação em uma tarefa de tradução automática neural que mostra melhorias de até 5,89 pontos BLEU para adaptação de domínio a partir de feedback de bandido simulado.', 'zh': 'Bandit结构化占叙随机优化框架,其学从反馈中行之。 此反馈以事失其质,而不得黄金之准。 吾以用意者递归神经网络升线性盗于神经序,而进此框架。 何以合制变于学算,以省方差而改泛化。 吾于神经机器翻译事为质,当示之以盗贼反馈,域宜增5.89 BLEU。', 'ja': 'バンディット構造化予測は、部分的なフィードバックから学習が実行される確率的最適化フレームワークを説明します。このフィードバックは、ゴールド標準構造にアクセスすることなく、予測される出力構造に対するタスク損失評価の形式で受信される。注意力に基づく再帰的なニューラルネットワークを使用して、ニューラルシーケンス間の学習問題に線形の盗賊学習を持ち上げることによって、このフレームワークを進めます。さらに、分散低減と改善された一般化のための学習アルゴリズムに制御変数を組み込む方法を示します。私たちは、模擬盗賊のフィードバックからのドメイン適応のための最大5.89 BLEUポイントの改善を示すニューラルマシン翻訳タスクの評価を提示します。', 'hi': 'बैंडिट संरचित भविष्यवाणी एक स्टोकेस्टिक ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन फ्रेमवर्क का वर्णन करती है जहां आंशिक प्रतिक्रिया से सीखने का प्रदर्शन किया जाता है। यह प्रतिक्रिया सोने के मानक संरचनाओं तक पहुंच के बिना, एक अनुमानित आउटपुट संरचना के लिए एक कार्य हानि मूल्यांकन के रूप में प्राप्त की जाती है। हम ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने की समस्याओं के लिए रैखिक डाकू सीखने को उठाकर इस ढांचे को आगे बढ़ाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि विचरण में कमी और बेहतर सामान्यीकरण के लिए हमारे सीखने के एल्गोरिदम में नियंत्रण variates को कैसे शामिल किया जाए। हम एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद कार्य पर एक मूल्यांकन प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो सिम्युलेटेड डाकू प्रतिक्रिया से डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए 5.89 BLEU बिंदुओं तक के सुधार को दर्शाता है।', 'ru': 'Структурированное предсказание Бандита описывает стохастическую структуру оптимизации, в которой обучение осуществляется на основе частичной обратной связи. Эта обратная связь получена в виде оценки потерь задачи на прогнозируемую выходную структуру, без доступа к структурам золотого стандарта. Мы продвигаем эту структуру, поднимая линейное бандитское обучение к задачам обучения нейронной последовательности с использованием рекуррентных нейронных сетей, основанных на внимании. Кроме того, мы показываем, как включить переменные управления в наши алгоритмы обучения для уменьшения дисперсии и улучшенного обобщения. Мы представляем оценку задачи нейронного машинного перевода, которая показывает улучшения до 5,89 баллов BLEU для адаптации домена от смоделированной обратной связи с бандитами.', 'ga': 'Déanann tuar struchtúrtha meirleach cur síos ar chreat optamaithe stochastic ina ndéantar foghlaim ó aiseolas páirteach. Faightear an t-aiseolas seo i bhfoirm meastóireachta ar thasc-chaillteanas ar struchtúr aschuir tuartha, gan rochtain a bheith aige ar struchtúir chaighdeán óir. Cuirimid an creat seo chun cinn trí fhoghlaim meirleach líneach a ardú go fadhbanna foghlama néaracha seicheamh-go-seicheamh ag baint úsáide as líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha aird-bhunaithe. Ina theannta sin, léirímid conas éagsúlachtaí rialaithe a ionchorprú inár n-halgartaim foghlama chun athraithis a laghdú agus ginearálú feabhsaithe. Cuirimid i láthair meastóireacht ar thasc néaraistriúcháin meaisín a thaispeánann feabhsuithe suas le 5.89 pointe BLEU le haghaidh oiriúnú fearainn ó aiseolas meirleach ionsamhlaithe.', 'ka': 'ბანდიტის სტრუქტურული პროგრამების გამოსახულება სტაქტიკური ოპტიმიზაციის ფრამეტრი, სადაც სწავლება ნაწილად გააკეთებულია. ეს გახსნა მიიღება რაოდენობის დასრულება სტრუქტურაციის ფორმაში, რომელიც უნდა იყოს წარმოიდგინეთ გადასრულებული სტრუქტურაციის შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ ფრამეტრის განვითარებით linear bandit გასწავლებით ნეიროლური სწავლების პრობლემების გამოყენებით დაახლოებით განახლოებით ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენებით. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიჩვენებთ როგორ კონტროლური გარიანტები ჩვენი სწავლების ალგორიტებში გარიანტების შემცირებისთვის და უფრო მეტი გენერალიზაციისთვის ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების რაოდენობაზე, რომელიც აჩვენებს 5,89 BLEU წერტილებების შესაძლებლობა დიომინური ადაპტიკაციის შემდეგ სიმულაციული ბანდის გა', 'el': 'Η δομημένη πρόβλεψη των ληστών περιγράφει ένα πλαίσιο στοχαστικής βελτιστοποίησης όπου η μάθηση πραγματοποιείται από μερική ανατροφοδότηση. Αυτή η ανατροφοδότηση λαμβάνεται με τη μορφή αξιολόγησης απώλειας εργασιών σε μια προβλεπόμενη δομή παραγωγής, χωρίς να έχει πρόσβαση σε χρυσές τυποποιημένες δομές. Προχωράμε αυτό το πλαίσιο ανυψώνοντας τη γραμμική μάθηση ληστών σε νευρωνικά προβλήματα μάθησης ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας χρησιμοποιώντας επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα βασισμένα στην προσοχή. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε πώς να ενσωματώσουμε μεταβλητές ελέγχου στους μαθησιακούς αλγόριθμους μας για μείωση διακύμανσης και βελτιωμένη γενίκευση. Παρουσιάζουμε μια αξιολόγηση για μια εργασία νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης που δείχνει βελτιώσεις μέχρι 5.89 σημείων για προσαρμογή τομέα από προσομοιωμένη ανατροφοδότηση ληστών.', 'it': "La previsione strutturata bandita descrive un framework di ottimizzazione stocastica in cui l'apprendimento viene eseguito da feedback parziali. Questo feedback viene ricevuto sotto forma di valutazione della perdita di attività a una struttura di output prevista, senza avere accesso a strutture standard oro. Avanziamo questo framework sollevando l'apprendimento lineare dei banditi a problemi di apprendimento neurale sequenza-sequenza utilizzando reti neurali ricorrenti basate sull'attenzione. Inoltre, mostriamo come incorporare variate di controllo nei nostri algoritmi di apprendimento per ridurre la varianza e migliorare la generalizzazione. Presentiamo una valutazione su un compito di traduzione automatica neurale che mostra miglioramenti fino a 5,89 punti BLEU per l'adattamento del dominio da feedback bandito simulato.", 'hu': 'Bandit strukturált predikció egy sztochasztikus optimalizálási keretrendszert ír le, ahol a tanulás részleges visszajelzésekből történik. Ezt a visszajelzést tevékenységveszteség értékelése formájában kapjuk egy előrejelzett kimeneti struktúrára, anélkül, hogy hozzáférnénk az aranyszabású struktúrákhoz. Ezt a keretet úgy fejlesztjük elő, hogy lineáris bandita tanulást emeljük az idegi szekvencia-szekvencia tanulási problémákra figyelem-alapú visszatérő neurális hálózatok segítségével. Továbbá bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet beépíteni a vezérlő variánsokat tanulási algoritmusainkba a variancia csökkentése és a jobb általánosítás érdekében. Bemutatunk egy értékelést egy idegi gépi fordítási feladatról, amely akár 5,89 BLEU pont fejlesztését mutatja a domain adaptáció szimulált bandita visszajelzésekből.', 'lt': 'Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback.  Ši grįžtamoji informacija gaunama atliekant užduočių praradimo vertinimą numatomai išėjimo struktūrai, neturint galimybės naudotis aukso standartinėmis struktūromis. Šią sistemą skatiname tiesiniu dažnių juostos mokymosi iškėlimu į nervų sekos po sekos mokymosi problemas naudojant dėmesiu pagrįstus nuolatinius nervų tinklus. Be to, parodysime, kaip į mūsų mokymosi algoritmus įtraukti kontrolės variantus skirtumų mažinimui ir geresnei generalizacijai. Pateikiame vertinimą dėl nervinių mašinų vertimo užduoties, kuriame parodoma iki 5,89 BLEU taško patobulinimas pritaikant sritį iš modeliuojamos juostos grįžtamosios informacijos.', 'kk': 'Бандиттің құрылған бағдарламасы, бөлшекті қайталанудан оқыту үшін стохастикалық оптимизациялау бағдарламасын анықтайды. Бұл қайтарау алтын стандартты құрылғыларға қатынау мүмкін емес тапсырманың жоғалуының түрінде алды. Біз бұл фреймді сызық бандитті невралдық реттеу мен реттеу оқыту мәселелерін өзгертіп, қайталанатын невралдық желілерді көмектеседі. Қосымша, біз басқаруды қалай біздің үйрену алгоритмдерімізге түрлендіру және жалпы жасау алгоритмдерімізді көрсетедік. Біз невралдық компьютердің аудару тапсырмасын бағалаймыз. Бұл доменге сәйкестік бандиттің қайталануынан 5,89 BLEU нүктелерін жақсартуға болады.', 'mk': 'Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback.  Оваа враќање се добива во форма на проценка на загубата на задачите на предвидена излезна структура, без да има пристап до златни стандардни структури. Ние ја унапредуваме оваа рамка преку укинување на линијарното учење на бандитите на невропските проблеми со учење секвенца по секвенца користејќи рекурентни невропски мрежи базирани на внимание. Покрај тоа, покажуваме како да ги вклучиме контролните варијанти во нашите алгоритми за учење за намалување на варијантите и подобрена генерализација. Презентираме евалуација на неуралната машинска преведувачка задача која покажува подобрувања од 5,89 БЛЕУ поени за адаптација на домените од симулираната бендитска реакција.', 'ml': 'ബാന്\u200dഡിറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച പ്രവചനം ഒരു സ്റ്റോക്സ്റ്റോസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഓപ്പിമിഷഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന This feedback is received in the form of a task loss evaluation to a predicted output structure, without having access to gold standard structures.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നത് ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മുതല്\u200d വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനാ അതിനുശേഷം, നിയന്ത്രണ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് നമ്മുടെ പഠിക്കുന്നത് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതെന്നും വ്യത്യ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു വിലാസപ്രകാരം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് 5.89 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d മ', 'mt': "It-tbassir strutturat tal-bandit jiddeskrivi qafas ta’ ottimizzazzjoni stokastika fejn it-tagħlim isir minn reazzjonijiet parzjali. Dan ir-rispons jiġi riċevut fil-form a ta’ evalwazzjoni tat-telf tal-kompiti għal struttura ta’ produzzjoni mbassra, mingħajr ma jkollu a ċċess għal strutturi standard tad-deheb. Aħna nimxu 'l quddiem dan il-qafas billi neħħew it-tagħlim lineari tal-bandit għal problemi ta' tagħlim minn sekwenza għal sekwenza newrali bl-użu ta' netwerks newrali rikorrenti bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni. Barra minn hekk, aħna nuru kif inkorporaw varjazzjonijiet ta’ kontroll fl-algoritmi tagħna ta’ tagħlim għat-tnaqqis tal-varjazzjonijiet u għal ġeneralizzazzjoni mtejba. Aħna nippreżentaw evalwazzjoni dwar kompitu tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali li juri titjib sa 5.89 punti BLEU għall-adattament tad-dominju minn feedback tal-bandit simulat.", 'pl': 'Przewidywanie strukturalne Bandytów opisuje strukturalne ramy optymalizacji stochastycznej, w którym uczenie się odbywa się na podstawie częściowych informacji zwrotnych. Informacje zwrotne otrzymywane są w formie oceny strat zadania do przewidywanej struktury wyjściowej, bez dostępu do struktur standardowych złota. Rozwijamy tę strukturę poprzez podnoszenie liniowego uczenia się bandytów do problemów uczenia się sekwencji neuronowej przy użyciu opartych na uwadze powtarzających się sieci neuronowych. Ponadto pokazujemy, jak włączyć zmiany kontrolne do naszych algorytmów uczenia się w celu redukcji wariancji i ulepszenia uogólnienia. Przedstawiamy ocenę zadania neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego, która pokazuje ulepszenia do 5.89 punktów BLEU dla adaptacji domeny z symulowanej sprzężenia zwrotnego bandytów.', 'ms': 'Ramalan struktur bandit menggambarkan kerangka optimasi stokastik di mana belajar dilakukan dari balas balik sebahagian. Balasan ini diterima dalam bentuk penilaian kehilangan tugas kepada struktur output yang dijangka, tanpa mempunyai akses kepada struktur piawai emas. Kami melanjutkan kerangka ini dengan mengangkat pembelajaran bandit linear ke masalah pembelajaran urutan-ke-urutan saraf menggunakan rangkaian saraf berkurang berdasarkan perhatian. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bagaimana untuk memasukkan variasi kawalan ke dalam algoritma pembelajaran kita untuk pengurangan variasi dan peningkatan generalisasi. Kami memperkenalkan penilaian pada tugas terjemahan mesin saraf yang menunjukkan peningkatan hingga 5.89 titik BLEU untuk penyesuaian domain dari balas balik bandit simulasi.', 'ro': 'Predicția structurată Bandit descrie un cadru de optimizare stocastică în care învățarea se realizează din feedback parțial. Acest feedback este primit sub forma unei evaluări a pierderilor de sarcini la o structură de ieșire preconizată, fără a avea acces la structuri gold standard. Avansăm acest cadru prin ridicarea învățării bandiților liniari la probleme neuronale de învățare secvență-la-secvență folosind rețele neurale recurente bazate pe atenție. Mai mult, arătăm cum să încorporăm variațiile de control în algoritmii noștri de învățare pentru reducerea variației și generalizarea îmbunătățită. Vă prezentăm o evaluare a unei sarcini de traducere automată neurală care arată îmbunătățiri de până la 5,89 puncte BLEU pentru adaptarea domeniului din feedback-ul bandiților simulați.', 'sr': 'Strukturalna predviđanja bandita opisuje stokastički optimizacijski okvir gde se učenje izvršava iz djelomične reakcije. Ova reakcija se prima u obliku procjene gubitka zadataka predviđenoj strukturi izveštaja, bez pristupa zlatnim standardnim strukturama. Napredujemo ovaj okvir podizanjem linearnog bandita učenja na neuralne sekvence do sekvence problema učenja koristeći ponovne neuralne mreže na pažnji. Nadalje, pokazujemo kako uključiti kontrolu variraju u naše algoritme učenja za smanjenje varijansa i poboljšanje generalizacije. Predstavljamo procjenu na zadatku za prevod neuralne mašine koja pokazuje poboljšanje do 5,89 BLEU bodova za adaptaciju domena iz simulisanih reakcija bandit a.', 'mn': 'Бандитын бүтээгдэхүүний таамаглал нь суралцах нь хэсэг хэсэг хариултаас үйлдвэрлэгддэг stochastic optimization framework ыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ хариулт нь алт стандарт бүтээгдэхүүнд хүрэхгүйгээр таамагласан бүтээгдэхүүний алдагдлын үнэлгээ болсон. Бид үүнийг шугам бандитуудын суралцаж мэдрэлийн дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах асуудлуудыг анхаарлын үндсэн дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг ашиглаж хөгжүүлж байна. Мөн бид өөрчлөлтийг багасгаж, ерөнхийлөгчийн сайжруулах алгоритмыг хэрхэн удирдах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын ажил дээр үнэлгээ үзүүлдэг бөгөөд 5.89 БЛЕС цэгүүдийн сайжруулалтыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Bandit-strukturerte forhåndsvising beskriver ein stokastisk optimaliseringsrammeverk der læring vert utført frå delvis tilbakemelding. Denne tilbakemeldinga vert motteken i form av eit evaluering av tap av oppgåver til eit forventa utdatastruktur, utan å ha tilgang til gullstiltruktur. Vi forbetrar dette rammeverket ved å læra lineær bandit til læringsproblemar med oppmerksomhetsbaserte rekurserande neuralnettverk. I tillegg viser vi korleis kontroll skal inkludere i læringsalgoritmen våre for variansreduksjon og forbetra generalisering. Vi presenterer eit evaluering på eit neuralmaskinsomsetjingsverkt som viser forbedringar til 5,89 BLEU-punkt for domenetilpassing frå simulerte tilbakemelding av bandet.', 'so': 'Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback.  Ka celintan waxaa loo helaa qaab ka mid ah qiimeynta khasaaraha shaqada, taasoo aan helin dhismaha caadiga ah oo dahab ah. Waxaannu horumarinaa qashinkaas si aan u korno bandhigta linear ah oo aan u barno dhibaatooyinka barashada neurada-dugaagta xilliga ah, si aan u isticmaalno shabakadaha neurada ee soo socda. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaa sida loo koobi karo isbedelayaasha maamulka ee barashada oo loo koobi karo isbedelka iyo horumarinta. Shaqada turjumista maskaxda neurada ah ee muujinta hagaajinta ugu badnaanta 5.89 BLEU goobaha beddelinta ee gudaha laga sameynayo dib u celinta bandit.', 'ta': 'பான்டிட் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட முன்வாக்கி பிரிவிலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தை வரையறுக்கிறது. முன்னோடிய வெளியீட்டு அமைப்புக்கான முறைமையில் செயல் இழப்பு evaluation வடிவத்தில் இந்த பதில் பெறுகிறது, தங்கக் தரமான அமைப்பு நாம் இந்த சட்டத்தை முன்னேற்றுகிறோம் மேலும், மாறுபாடு குறைவு மற்றும் மேம்படுத்தல் பொருள் மாறிகளை எப்படி கட்டுப்பாட்டு மாறிகளை எங்கள் கற்றல் முறைகளில் சே நாம் ஒரு புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் ஒரு மதிப்பீட்டை காட்டுகிறோம். அது 5.89 பிலியு புள்ளிகள் மேம்படுத்தலை காண்பி', 'sv': 'Bandit strukturerad prediktion beskriver ett stokastiskt optimeringsramverk d채r l채rande utf철rs fr책n partiell feedback. Denna 책terkoppling erh책lls i form av en uppgiftsf철rlustsbed철mning till en f철rutsedd resultatstruktur, utan att ha tillg책ng till guldstandardstrukturer. Vi avancerar detta ramverk genom att lyfta linj채rt banditl채rande till neurala sekvens-till-sekvensinl채rningsproblem med hj채lp av uppm채rksamhetsbaserade 책terkommande neurala n채tverk. Vidare visar vi hur man inf철rlivar kontrollvariabler i v책ra inl채rningsalgoritmer f철r variansreduktion och f철rb채ttrad generalisering. Vi presenterar en utv채rdering av en neural maskin철vers채ttningsuppgift som visar f철rb채ttringar av upp till 5,89 BLEU-po채ng f철r dom채nanpassning fr책n simulerad banditfeedback.', 'si': 'බැන්ඩිට් සංස්ථාපනය විශ්වාස කරනවා ස්ටෝචාස්ටික විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතික මෙම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්නේ වැඩක් නැති විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අවශ්\u200dය වි අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ලේනියර් බැන්ඩිට් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද පාලනය කරන්නේ කියලා අපේ ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට වෙනස් විමුණ අඩුවන් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය අපි න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව ක්\u200dරියාවක් ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා වගේම බැන්ඩිට් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් පරිස්ස', 'ur': 'بنڈیٹ کی ساختہ پیش بینی ایک سٹوکسٹیکی اپنا اپنا فرم کرتا ہے جہاں تعلیم حصہ فیڈبک سے عمل کی جاتی ہے. یہ فیڈبک کو ایک ٹاکس گھاٹ کا ارزش کے شکل میں پہنچایا گیا ہے ایک پیش بینی اٹوٹ ساختار کے لئے، بغیر سونے کی استاندارڈ ساختاروں کی دسترسی حاصل نہ ہوگی۔ ہم اس فرم کو آگے بڑھا دیتے ہیں لینار بانڈیٹ کی سیکھنے کے ذریعہ نیورل نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے استعمال سے سیکھنے کے لئے لینار بانڈیٹ سیکھنے کے لئے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کنٹرول کو کس طرح جمع کرنا ہماری تعلیم الگوریتم میں متفاوت کے ذریعہ اور عمومی تعلیم کے لئے متفاوت ہوتا ہے۔ ہم ایک نئورل ماشین ترجمہ تابع کے بارے میں ایک ارزیابی پیش کرتے ہیں جو 5.89 بلیوس پوینٹوں کے لئے سیمولیٹ بانڈیٹ فیڈ پک سے ڈومین ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے بہترین ترجمہ دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name This feedback is received in the form of a task loss evaluation to a predicted output structure, without having access to gold standard structures.  Biz bu freymni o'rganish uchun linear bandittni o'rganish uchun neyrolik tarmoqni tahrirlash uchun o'rganish muammolarini o'rganamiz. Ko'rib, biz varianlarni o'rganish algoritlarimizga qanday boshqarishni ko'rsamiz va o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun o'rganish algoritlarimizni o'rganishni ko'rsamiz. Biz neyural tarjima vazifani tahrirlash mumkin. Bu vazifani tahrirlash uchun domen adapterining 5.89 BLEU nuqtlariga 5.89 BLEU notoʻgʻri beradi.", 'vi': 'Sự dự đoán cấu trúc của băng sẽ mô tả một cơ sở tinh thần học tốc độ, nơi học được thực hiện từ phản hồi. Phản hồi này được nhận dạng một đánh giá mất việc làm đến một cấu trúc xuất dự đoán mà không có quyền sử dụng các cấu trúc tiêu chuẩn vàng. Chúng ta nâng bộ khung này bằng cách nâng tuyến tuyến giáp học đến hệ thần kinh học vấn đề dựa trên mạng thần kinh thường xuyên. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy cách áp dụng các thuật to án điều khiển trong thuật toán học để giảm âm lượng và tổng hợp hơn. Chúng tôi đưa ra một bài đánh giá về một nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển máy thần kinh. Cho thấy sự cải tiến của đến 5.899 cung cấp thiết bị chỉnh sửa miền bằng phản ứng giả mạo của băng cướp.', 'bg': 'Бандитната структурирана прогноза описва стохастична оптимизация рамка, където обучението се извършва от частична обратна връзка. Тази обратна връзка се получава под формата на оценка на загубата на задача към прогнозната изходна структура, без да има достъп до структури със златен стандарт. Ние напредваме в тази рамка чрез повдигане на линейното учене на бандити към проблемите с изучаването на невронни последователности по последователност, използвайки базирани на вниманието повтарящи се невронни мрежи. Освен това, ние показваме как да включим контролни вариати в нашите учебни алгоритми за намаляване на вариацията и подобрено обобщаване. Представяме оценка на задача за невронен машинен превод, която показва подобрения до 5.89 точки за адаптация на домейна от симулирана обратна връзка на бандитите.', 'da': 'Bandit struktureret forudsigelse beskriver en stokastisk optimeringsramme, hvor læring udføres fra delvis feedback. Denne feedback modtages i form af en opgavetab evaluering til en forudsiget outputstruktur, uden at have adgang til gold standard strukturer. Vi fremmer denne ramme ved at løfte lineær banditlæring til neurale sekvens-til-sekvens læringsproblemer ved hjælp af opmærksomhedsbaserede tilbagevendende neurale netværk. Desuden viser vi, hvordan man indarbejder kontrolvariater i vores læringsalgoritmer for variansreduktion og forbedret generalisering. Vi præsenterer en evaluering af en neural maskinoversættelsesopgave, der viser forbedringer af op til 5,89 BLEU-point til domænetilpasning fra simuleret banditfeedback.', 'nl': 'Bandit gestructureerde voorspelling beschrijft een stochastisch optimalisatieframework waarbij leren wordt uitgevoerd op basis van gedeeltelijke feedback. Deze feedback wordt ontvangen in de vorm van een taakverliseevaluatie naar een voorspelde outputstructuur, zonder toegang te hebben tot goudstandaardstructuren. We bevorderen dit raamwerk door lineaire bandieten leren op te heffen naar neurale sequence-to-sequence leerproblemen met behulp van aandacht-gebaseerde terugkerende neurale netwerken. Verder laten we zien hoe we control variates kunnen integreren in onze leeralgoritmes voor variantie reductie en verbeterde generalisatie. We presenteren een evaluatie van een neurale machine translation taak die verbeteringen toont van maximaal 5.89 BLEU punten voor domeinaanpassing van gesimuleerde bandieten feedback.', 'hr': 'Strukturirano predviđenje Bandit opisuje stokastički okvir optimizacije gdje se učenje izvršava iz djelomične reakcije. Ova povratka se prima u obliku procjene gubitka zadataka predviđenoj strukturi izlaza bez pristupa zlatnim standardnim strukturama. Napredujemo ovaj okvir podizanjem linearnog bandita učenja na neuralne sekvence do sekvence učenja s upotrebom recirenih neuralnih mreža na temelju pažnje. Nadalje, pokazujemo kako uključiti kontrolu variraju u naše algoritme učenja za smanjenje varijansa i poboljšanje generalizacije. Predstavljamo procjenu zadatka za prevod neuroloških strojeva koja pokazuje poboljšanje do 5,89 BLEU bodova za prilagodbu domena iz simulirane reakcije bandit a.', 'de': 'Bandit strukturierte Vorhersage beschreibt ein stochastisches Optimierungs-Framework, bei dem das Lernen aus partiellem Feedback durchgeführt wird. Dieses Feedback wird in Form einer Aufgabenverlustbewertung zu einer prognostizierten Output-Struktur empfangen, ohne Zugriff auf Goldstandardstrukturen zu haben. Wir entwickeln dieses Framework weiter, indem wir lineares Banditenlernen auf neuronale Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Lernprobleme mit aufmerksamkeitsbasierten wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken heben. Weiterhin zeigen wir, wie Regelvariaten in unsere Lernalgorithmen zur Varianzreduktion und verbesserten Generalisierung einfließen können. Wir präsentieren eine Evaluation einer neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsaufgabe, die Verbesserungen von bis zu 5.89 BLEU-Punkten für die Domänenanpassung aus simuliertem Banditen-Feedback aufzeigt.', 'id': 'Prediksi struktur bandit menggambarkan rangka optimisasi stokastik dimana belajar dilakukan dari feedback parsial. Balasan ini diterima dalam bentuk evaluasi kehilangan tugas ke struktur output yang diprediksi, tanpa memiliki akses ke struktur standar emas. Kita melanjutkan rangkaian ini dengan mengangkat pembelajaran bandit linear ke masalah pembelajaran rangkaian-ke-rangkaian saraf menggunakan jaringan saraf rekuren berdasarkan perhatian. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bagaimana untuk memasukkan variasi kontrol ke dalam algoritma belajar kita untuk mengurangi variasi dan meningkatkan generalisasi. We present an evaluation on a neural machine translation task that shows improvements of up to 5.89 BLEU points for domain adaptation from simulated bandit feedback.', 'ko': 'Bandit structured prediction은 일부 피드백에서 학습을 수행하는 랜덤 최적화 프레임워크를 설명합니다.이 피드백은 임무 손실 평가의 형식으로 받아들여지고 예측된 출력 구조를 바탕으로 하며 방문금 표준 구조를 필요로 하지 않는다.우리는 선형bandit학습을 신경 서열로 향상시키고 주의를 바탕으로 하는 귀속신경 네트워크를 이용하여 학습 문제를 정렬함으로써 이 구조를 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 제어 변수를 우리의 학습 알고리즘에 포함시켜 방차를 줄이고 범화를 개선하는 방법을 보여 주었다.하나의 신경기계 번역 임무를 평가한 결과 반딧 피드백을 시뮬레이션한 도메인 적응에서 이 임무의 BLEU 포인트가 5.89 높아진 것으로 나타났다.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی ساخته شده\u200cی باندیت یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها این بازگشت به شکل ارزیابی از دست دادن کار به یک ساختار نتیجه پیش\u200cبینی، بدون دسترسی به ساختارهای استاندارد طلا دریافت می\u200cشود. ما این چهارچوب را با استفاده از شبکه های عصبی بازگشت بر روی توجه با یادگیری باندیت خطی به مشکلات یادگیری عصبی به رده\u200cای پیشرفت می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه کنترل را در الگوریتم یادگیری ما برای کاهش تغییرات و توسعه عمومی بهتر کنیم. ما یک ارزیابی روی یک کار ترجمه ماشین عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بهترین نقطه\u200cهای تا ۵.۸۸ BLEU برای تغییر سازی دامنی از بازگشت شبیه\u200cسازی باندیت نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Utabiri wa Bandit umeundwa unaelezea mfumo wa matumaini wa kizuizini ambapo kujifunza unafanyika kwa sehemu ya maoni. Maitikio haya yamepokelewa kwa namna ya tathmini za kupoteza kazi kwa muundo unaotabiriwa, bila kupata huduma za kiwango cha dhahabu. Tunaendelea mfumo huu kwa kuondoa bandia ya mistari kujifunza kwa matatizo ya kujifunza kwa mfululizo wa uraia kwa kutumia mitandao ya kisasa yanayoendelea. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha jinsi ya kuunganisha mabadiliko ya udhibiti katika algorithi zetu za kujifunza kwa kupunguza mabadiliko na kuboresha uzalishaji. Tunaweza kutoa tathmini juu ya kazi ya utafsiri wa mashine ya ubongo unaoonyesha maendeleo ya hadi pointi 5.89 BLEU kwa ajili ya kubadilishana ndani kutoka kwenye mgomo wa bandit unaofanana.', 'af': "Bandit struktureerde voorskou beskrywe 'n stokastieke optimalisasie raamwerk waar leer uitgevoer word van gedeeltelike terugmelding. Hierdie terugmelding is ontvang in die vorm van 'n taak verlies evaluering na' n voorskoude uitset struktuur, sonder toegang tot goud standaard struktuur te hê. Ons verbeter hierdie raamwerk deur lineêre bandit leer te verhef na neural sekwensie-na-sekwensie leer probleme te gebruik met aandag-gebaseerde herhaalde neuralnetwerke. Ons wys ook hoe om beheer te inkorporeer, varieer in ons leer algoritme vir varianse reduksie en verbeterde generalisering. Ons stel 'n evaluasie op 'n neurale masjien vertaling taak wat wys verbeteringe van tot 5.89 BLEU punte vir domein aanpassing van simuleerde bandit terugvoer.", 'sq': 'Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback.  Ky feedback është marrë në form ë të një vlerësimi të humbjes së detyrës për një strukturë të parashikuar të daljes, pa pasur akses në struktura standarde të artë. Ne e përparojmë këtë kuadër duke hequr mësimin linear të bandit ëve në problemet e mësimit nga sekuenca në sekuencë nervore duke përdorur rrjetet neurale të përsëritura të bazuara në vëmendje. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se si të përfshijmë ndryshimet e kontrollit në algoritmet tona të mësimit për reduktimin e variancave dhe gjeneralizimin e përmirësuar. Ne paraqesim një vlerësim mbi një detyrë përkthimi nervor makineri që tregon përmirësime deri në 5.89 pikë BLEU për përshtatje në domeni nga reagimi i simuluar bandit ëve.', 'am': 'የባንቲት ግንኙነት የክፍል መልዕክት ማድረግ የሚተማርበት የስታክስቲ ምርጫዎችን ፍሬም ይናገራል፡፡ ይህ መልዕክት የስራ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ማሳየት በተቀረበ ውጤት አካባቢ ውስጥ የወርቅ መሠረቶች ማግኘት የለውም፡፡ ይህንን ፍሬሜን የቆይር bandit በማሳየት የደዌብ ክፍተቶችን በጥያቄ የደዌብ መረብ በመጠቀም ለመማር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የልዩ ልዩነት አጎራሽነትን እና ማስተማርን ትርጓሜዎችን እንዴት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጉም ስራ የሚያሳየው የውይይት ብሊዩን አካባቢ አካባቢት መልዕክት በሚያሳየው 5.89 ቢሊዩን የዶሜን አካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን የሚያሳየው ማስታወቂያውን እናቀርባለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Baglançy strukturly öňlenme nusgasy tarapyndan öwrenmek üçin stokastik optimizasyň çerçevesini tassyklaýar. Bu netije gollanmış çykyş sistemasyna gollanmış bir täblisaň ýitirmesi şeklinde alındy. Biz bu çerçevesi, lineer bandit öwrenmesini nöral dizi-dizi öwrenmesini tertibleyerek, üns tabanlı tekrarlı nöral ağlara kullanarak öwrenmek üzere geliştiririz. Mundan soňra, kontrol edilen öwrenmek algoritmalarymyza nähili üýtgetmeli we döredilişini gelişmek üçin üýtgetmelidigini görkezýäris. Biz nöral maşynyň terjime täblisasynda deňlenmek üçin 5.89 BLEU noktalaryna çevrilýän bir çözümleme täblisasynda görkeýäris.', 'hy': "Բանդիկի կառուցվածքային կանխատեսումը նկարագրում է ստեոկաստատիկ օպտիմացիոն շրջանակը, որտեղ ուսումնասիրությունը կատարվում է մասամբ արձագանքից: Այս արձագանքը ստանում է խնդիրների կորստի գնահատման ձևով կանխատեսված արձագանքային կառուցվածքի համար, առանց ստանդարտ ոսկու կառուցվածքների հասանելիության: Մենք զարգանում ենք այս շրջանակը' բարձրացնելով գծային բանդիտի ուսումնասիրությունը նյարդային հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության խնդիրների վրա' օգտագործելով ուշադրության վրա հիմնված կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցեր: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես ներառել վերահսկողության տարբերությունները մեր ուսուցման ալգորիթմների մեջ տարբերությունների կրճատման և բարելավման ընդհանուր ընդլայնման համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման խնդրի գնահատումը, որը ցույց է տալիս մինչև 5.89 բլեւ կետի բարելավումը բլոմի ադապտացիայի համար սիմուլյացված բանդիտի արձագանքից:", 'bn': 'ব্যান্ডিটের গঠিত ভবিষ্যৎবাণী একটি স্টোকাস্টিক্যাটিক অপারেশন ফ্রেমের বর্ণনা করেছে যেখানে অংশিক ফিডিব্য এই ফিডিব্যাক পাওয়া যাচ্ছে একটি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী আউটপুট কাঠামোর মূল্যের মাধ্যমে, সোনার স্ট্যান্ডারেল কাঠামোর প্রবেশ আমরা এই ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ দিয়ে পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে নিউরেল ব্যান্ডিট ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থার সমস্ এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে আমাদের শিক্ষার অ্যালগরিদমের মধ্যে কিভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণের বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত বিভিন্ন আমরা একটি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ কাজের উপর একটি মূল্য উপস্থাপন করেছি যা সিমুলেট ব্যান্ডিট ফিডিব্যাক থেকে ডোমেইন আপটপেটের জন্য ৫. ৮৯ বিলিউ', 'bs': 'Strukturirano predviđenje Bandit opisuje stokastički optimizacijski okvir gdje se učenje izvršava iz djelomične reakcije. Ova reakcija se prima u obliku procjene gubitka zadataka predviđenoj strukturi izlaza bez pristupa zlatnim standardnim strukturama. Napredujemo ovaj okvir podizanjem linearnog bandita učenja na neurološke sekvence do sekvence problema učenja koristeći ponovne neuralne mreže na temelju pažnje. Nadalje, pokazujemo kako uključiti kontrolu variraju u naše algoritme učenja za smanjenje varijansa i poboljšanje generalizacije. Predstavljamo procjenu na zadatku za prevod neuroloških strojeva koji pokazuje poboljšanje do 5,89 BLEU bodova za adaptaciju domena iz simulirane reakcije bandit a.', 'az': 'Bandit qurulmuş tədbir, öyrənməsi parçacıq feedback tərzindən istifadə edilən stokastik optimizasyon framework ünü təsdiqləyir. Bu tədbir, altın standart yapılarına erişmədən, təmin edilmiş çıxış strukturlarına görə tədbir kaybının değerlendirməsi kimi alındı. Biz bu framework ünü linear bandit öyrənmək üçün nöral sequence-to-sequence öyrənmək problemlərinə yüksəltdik. Daha sonra, biz kontrolü necə birləşdirəcəyini öyrənmək algoritmalarımızda dəyişiklik azaltmaq və generalizasyonu daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün göstəririk. Biz nürol maşına çevirilən işlər barəsində değerlendiririk ki, modelləşdirilmiş bandit reaksiyonundan 5,89 BLEU noktalarının daha yaxşılıqlarını göstərir.', 'cs': 'Bandit strukturovaná predikce popisuje stochastický optimalizační rámec, kde se učení provádí z částečné zpětné vazby. Tato zpětná vazba je přijata ve formě hodnocení ztráty úloh na předpokládanou výstupní strukturu, aniž by měla přístup ke zlatým standardním strukturám. Tento rámec posouváme tím, že zvedneme učení lineárních banditů k neuronovým problémům sekvence-sekvence pomocí rekurentních neuronových sítí založených na pozornosti. Dále ukazujeme, jak začlenit řídicí variaty do našich učebních algoritmů pro redukci rozptylu a zlepšení zobecnění. Představujeme vyhodnocení úlohy neuronového strojového překladu, které ukazuje zlepšení až 5.89 BLEU bodů pro adaptaci domény ze simulované banditů zpětné vazby.', 'et': 'Bandiit struktureeritud prognoos kirjeldab stohhastilist optimeerimisraamistikku, kus õppimine toimub osalise tagasiside abil. See tagasiside saadakse ülesandekaotuse hindamise vormis prognoositavale väljundstruktuurile, ilma et neil oleks juurdepääsu kullastandardi struktuuridele. Me edendame seda raamistikku, tõstes lineaarse bandiidi õppimise neuraalseks järjestuseks järjestuseks õppimise probleemideks, kasutades tähelepanu-põhiseid korduvaid neuraalvõrke. Lisaks näitame, kuidas lisada kontrollmuutujaid meie õppealgoritmidesse dispersiooni vähendamiseks ja paremaks üldistamiseks. Esitame hinnangu neuromasintõlke ülesandele, mis näitab kuni 5,89 BLEU punkti paranemist domeeni kohandamiseks simuleeritud bandiitide tagasisidest.', 'ca': "Bandit structured prediction describes a stochastic optimization framework where learning is performed from partial feedback.  Aquest feedback es rep en form a d'una evaluació de pèrdua de tasca a una estructura de sortida predida, sense tenir accés a estructures d'or estàndard. Avançem aquest marc alçant l'aprenentatge linear de bandits a problemes d'aprenentatge seqüència a seqüència neural fent servir xarxes neurals recurrents basades en l'atenció. A més, demostram com incorporar el control varia als nostres algoritmes d'aprenentatge per a reduir la variança i millorar la generalització. Presentam una evaluació d'una tasca de traducció neural de màquines que mostra millores de fins a 5,89 punts BLEU per l'adaptació de dominis a partir de feedback simulat de bandits.", 'fi': 'Bandit strukturoitu ennuste kuvaa stokastista optimointikehystä, jossa oppiminen suoritetaan osittaisesta palautteesta. Palaute saadaan tehtävähäviön arvioinnin muodossa ennustetulle tuotosrakenteelle ilman pääsyä kultaisiin rakenteisiin. Edistämme tätä kehystä nostamalla lineaarista bandiittioppia neurosekvenssi-sekvenssiin oppimisongelmiin huomiopohjaisten toistuvien hermoverkkojen avulla. Lisäksi näytämme, miten kontrollivariaatteja voidaan sisällyttää oppimisalgoritmeihin varianssin vähentämiseksi ja yleistämiseksi. Esitämme arvion neurokonekäännöstehtävästä, joka osoittaa jopa 5,89 BLEU-pisteen parannuksia domeenin sopeutumiseen simuloidun bandiittien palautteen avulla.', 'jv': 'Bandit Strikethroughaké uléng sumbarang kelangan winih Ref Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem iki dadi ngéwé basa rangtuk banter kuwi nggawe sekonduran Neral menyang sekondirno kuwi tindakan nggawe ngubah Label Awak dhéwé éntuk karo mulai nggawe sistem penting nggambar apat, ingkang dipunangé luwih dumadhan sampek 5.9, nik ingkang 5.9', 'ha': "Banedit na tsari ya bayyana wani firam na kwamfyutan tebur, inda za'a samar da lõkaci daga baka mai rabo. Ana motsa wannan feedback cikin tsarin haske na wani aikin da aka ƙayyade wani matsayi na fitarwa, kuma bã ya iya samu da tsarin zĩnãriya na daidaita. Munã gabatar da wannan firam da za'a ɗau bandit mai linja da za'a sanar wa masu ƙara-sequence na rubura da amfani da zanayen neural wanda ya dace-a-bincike. Furan haka, Munã nũna yadda za Mu shigar da variants na Control zuwa algorityinmu ga ƙarantar variani da kuma za'a ƙara zaɓani. Tuna gabatar da evaluci kan wani aikin fassarar kwamfyutan neural wanda ke nuna mafiya kyauta zuwa 5.89", 'sk': 'Banditna strukturirana napoved opisuje stohastični okvir optimizacije, kjer se učenje izvaja iz delnih povratnih informacij. Ta povratna informacija se prejme v obliki ocene izgube nalog na predvideno izhodno strukturo, brez dostopa do struktur zlatih standardov. Ta okvir napredujemo z dvigovanjem linearnega učenja banditov na težave z učenjem nevronskih zaporedj v zaporedje z uporabo ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij, ki temeljijo na pozornosti. Poleg tega pokažemo, kako vključiti kontrolne spremenljivke v naše učne algoritme za zmanjšanje variance in izboljšanje generalizacije. Predstavljamo oceno naloge nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, ki prikazuje izboljšave do 5,89 točk BLEU za prilagoditev domene iz simuliranih povratnih informacij banditov.', 'he': 'חיזוי מובנה של Bandit מתאר מסגרת אופטימיזציה סטוקסטית שבו למידה מבצעת ממחזור חלקי. ההחזרה הזאת מקבלת בצורה של הערכה לאיבוד משימה למבנה יציאה צפוי, בלי גישה למבנים סטנדרטיים זהב. אנו מתקדמים את המסגרת הזו על ידי הרימת שודדים לינריים ללמוד לבעיות ללמוד עצבי רצף-רצף באמצעות רשתות עצביות מתקרבות מבוססת תשומת לב. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מראים כיצד להשתלב שווירטים שליטה לאלגוריטמים הלימודים שלנו להפחית שווירטים ושיפור הגנרליזציה. אנחנו מציגים עריכה על משימה התרגום של מכונות עצביות שמראה שיפורים של עד 5.89 נקודות BLEU עבור התאמה לתחום ממחזור בנדיט סימולטי.', 'bo': 'Bandit སྒྲིག་འཆར་གཞུང་གི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གཞུང་ཞིག་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དངོས་འབྲས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་མཐོ་རྩིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ལས་མཐུན་གྱིས་འགྱུར་བའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་གི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འདྲ་རྒྱ་ལྟར་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གྲོས་འཆར་འགྲོ་བཞིན་གྱི་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Prior Knowledge Integration for Neural Machine Translation using Posterior Regularization', 'ar': 'تكامل المعرفة المسبقة للترجمة الآلية العصبية باستخدام التنظيم اللاحق', 'es': 'Integración de conocimientos previos para la traducción automática neuronal mediante la regularización posterior', 'fr': "Intégration des connaissances antérieures pour la traduction automatique neuronale à l'aide de la régularisation postérieure", 'pt': 'Integração de Conhecimento Prévio para Tradução Automática Neural usando Regularização Posterior', 'ja': 'Posterior Regularizationを使用した神経機械翻訳のための既存の知識統合', 'ru': 'Интеграция предварительных знаний для нейронного машинного перевода с использованием апостериорной регуляризации', 'hi': 'पश्चवर्ती नियमितीकरण का उपयोग कर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए पूर्व ज्ञान एकीकरण', 'zh': '用后验正则化之神经机器翻译先验知集', 'ga': "Comhtháthú Réamheolais d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach ag baint úsáide as Rialáil Posterior", 'ka': 'პირველი იცნობის ინტეგრაცია ნეირალური მაქსინის გადატყვებისთვის პოსტერიორის რეგილარიზაციის გამოყენებით', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση προηγούμενων γνώσεων για τη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση με τη χρήση μεταγενέστερης ρύθμισης', 'hu': 'Előzetes tudásintegráció a neurális gépi fordításhoz posterior regularizációval', 'it': 'Integrazione delle conoscenze preliminari per la traduzione automatica neurale con regolarizzazione posteriore', 'kk': 'Posterior Regularization арқылы нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін алдыңғы білім интеграциясы', 'lt': 'Prior Knowledge Integration for Neural Machine Translation using Posterior Regularization', 'mk': 'Претходна интеграција на знаење за превод на неврална машина со употреба на позадина регуларизација', 'ms': 'Integrasi Pengetahuan Sebelumnya untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural menggunakan Pengaturan Belakang', 'ml': 'പോസ്റ്ററിയര്\u200d നിയമപരിധി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മുമ്പ് അറിവ് ഒരുമ', 'mt': 'Integrazzjoni ta’ Għarfien minn Qabel għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali bl-użu tar-Regolarizzazzjoni Posterjuri', 'mn': 'Өмнөх мэдлэг нэгтгэл нь мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хувьд', 'no': 'Førre kjennomsetjing for nøyralmaskinsomsetjing med Posterior Regularizasjon', 'pl': 'Integracja wcześniejszej wiedzy w zakresie neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego z wykorzystaniem regularyzacji posterior', 'ro': 'Integrarea cunoștințelor anterioare pentru traducerea automată neurală utilizând regularizarea posterioară', 'sr': 'Prije integracija znanja za prevod neuroloških mašina koristeći posteriorsku regularizaciju', 'si': 'පොස්ටරියර් නියමිකරණය භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන දැනගැනීම සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'Integrering av tidigare kunskaper för neural maskinöversättning med posterior reglering', 'so': 'La qabsashada aqoonta horay ee tarjumaadka maskinenta naafada ah using Posterior Regularization', 'ta': 'முன்னால் அறிவு ஒருங்கிணைப்பு', 'ur': 'پوسٹرئورر رائگالیزور کے مطابق نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے پہلے علم انٹرنگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ưu tiên tri thức lắp cấu trúc thần kinh qua dịch từ sau', 'bg': 'Интеграция на предишни знания за неврален машинен превод чрез последваща регуляризация', 'da': 'Integration af tidligere viden til neural maskinoversættelse ved hjælp af posterior regulering', 'de': 'Integration von Vorkenntnissen für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mittels posteriorer Regularisierung', 'id': 'Integrasi Pengetahuan Sebelumnya untuk Translasi Mesin Neural menggunakan Regularisasi Posterior', 'nl': 'Integratie van voorkennis voor Neural Machine Translation met behulp van Posterior Regularization', 'fa': 'ترکیب پیشینیان دانش برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی با استفاده از ترکیب قانونی پوستر', 'tr': 'Posterior Regularizasyny ulanan Nural Maşynyň terjimesiniň öňki Bilgi Integrasiýasy', 'af': 'Vorige kennis integrasie vir neurale masjien vertaling gebruik Posterior Regularisasie', 'sw': 'Ujumuishi wa maarifa ya awali kwa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Nguvu kwa kutumia Utawala wa Utawala', 'hr': 'Prije integracija znanja za prevod neuroloških strojeva koristeći posterior regularizaciju', 'am': 'Posterior Regularization', 'az': 'Posterior Regularizasyonu istifad톛 ed톛r톛k n칬ral ma코in 칞evirilm톛si 칲칞칲n 톛vv톛lki Bilim Integrasyonu', 'sq': 'Integrimi i njohurive të mëparshme për përkthimin e makinës nervore duke përdorur rregullimin posterior', 'ko': '후험 정규화에 기초한 신경기계 번역 선험지식 집적', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման նախկին ինտեգրացիան հետագա ռեգուլարիզացիայի օգտագործման միջոցով', 'bn': 'Prior Knowledge Integration for Neural Machine Translation using Posterior Regularization', 'bs': 'Prije integracija znanja za prevod neuroloških strojeva koristeći postavljačku regularizaciju', 'cs': 'Integrace předchozích znalostí pro neuronový strojový překlad pomocí posteriorové regularizace', 'ca': 'Integració anterior del coneixement per a la traducció de màquines neurones fent servir la regularizació posterior', 'et': 'Varasemate teadmiste integreerimine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks, kasutades järgnevat regulariseerimist', 'fi': 'Aiemman tietämyksen integrointi neurokonekääntämiseen jälkimmäisen sääntelyn avulla', 'jv': 'Jejaring Ketok Kampilan kanggo Terjamahan Njaral', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Integracija predhodnega znanja za nevralno strojno prevajanje z uporabo posteriorne regularizacije', 'he': 'שיתוף מידע קודם לתרגום מכונות נוירות באמצעות רפורליזציה מאחורית', 'bo': 'འདྲ་བཤུ་ལ་རྒྱུས་མཁན་དབྱིབས་སྤྱད་ནས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Although neural machine translation has made significant progress recently, how to integrate multiple overlapping, arbitrary prior knowledge sources remains a challenge. In this work, we propose to use posterior regularization to provide a general framework for integrating prior knowledge into neural machine translation. We represent prior knowledge sources as features in a log-linear model, which guides the learning processing of the neural translation model. Experiments on Chinese-English dataset show that our approach leads to significant improvements.', 'pt': 'Embora a tradução automática neural tenha feito progressos significativos recentemente, como integrar várias fontes de conhecimento prévio arbitrário e sobrepostas continua sendo um desafio. Neste trabalho, propomos usar a regularização posterior para fornecer uma estrutura geral para integrar o conhecimento prévio na tradução automática neural. Representamos fontes de conhecimento prévio como recursos em um modelo log-linear, que orienta o processamento de aprendizado do modelo de tradução neural. Experimentos no conjunto de dados chinês-inglês mostram que nossa abordagem leva a melhorias significativas.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن الترجمة الآلية العصبية قد أحرزت تقدمًا كبيرًا مؤخرًا ، إلا أن كيفية دمج مصادر المعرفة السابقة التعسفية المتداخلة المتعددة تظل تحديًا. في هذا العمل ، نقترح استخدام التنظيم اللاحق لتوفير إطار عام لدمج المعرفة السابقة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية. نحن نمثل مصادر المعرفة السابقة كميزات في نموذج السجل الخطي ، والذي يوجه معالجة التعلم لنموذج الترجمة العصبية. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة البيانات الصينية-الإنجليزية أن نهجنا يؤدي إلى تحسينات كبيرة.', 'fr': "Bien que la traduction automatique neuronale ait récemment fait des progrès importants, la façon d'intégrer des sources de connaissances antérieures arbitraires et qui se chevauchent demeure un défi. Dans ce travail, nous proposons d'utiliser la régularisation postérieure pour fournir un cadre général pour intégrer les connaissances antérieures dans la traduction automatique neuronale. Nous représentons les sources de connaissances antérieures en tant que caractéristiques d'un modèle log-linéaire, qui guide le traitement d'apprentissage du modèle de traduction neuronale. Des expériences sur des jeux de données chinois-anglais montrent que notre approche conduit à des améliorations significatives.", 'es': 'Aunque la traducción automática neuronal ha hecho progresos significativos recientemente, la forma de integrar múltiples fuentes de conocimiento previas arbitrarias y superpuestas sigue siendo un desafío. En este trabajo, proponemos utilizar la regularización posterior para proporcionar un marco general para integrar los conocimientos previos en la traducción automática neuronal. Representamos las fuentes de conocimiento anteriores como características en un modelo log-lineal, que guía el procesamiento del aprendizaje del modelo de traducción neuronal. Los experimentos sobre conjuntos de datos chino-inglés muestran que nuestro enfoque conduce a mejoras significativas.', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳は最近大きな進歩を遂げているが、複数の重複した、任意の事前知識源を統合する方法は依然として課題である。この研究では、事後正規化を使用して、既存の知識をニューラル機械翻訳に統合するための一般的な枠組みを提供することを提案します。我々は、神経翻訳モデルの学習処理を導く対数線形モデルの特徴として既存の知識源を表す。中国語-英語データセットの実験では、当社のアプローチが大幅な改善につながることが示されています。', 'zh': '虽神经机器翻译新得重大进展,何整合重先验情。 于是建议用后验正则化来供先验知整合于神经机器翻译之通用框架。 先验其数线性也,神经译其学。 中英数据集实验明,吾法有显改。', 'hi': 'यद्यपि तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद ने हाल ही में महत्वपूर्ण प्रगति की है, लेकिन कई अतिव्यापी, मनमाने ढंग से पूर्व ज्ञान स्रोतों को कैसे एकीकृत किया जाए, यह एक चुनौती बनी हुई है। इस काम में, हम न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में पूर्व ज्ञान को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक सामान्य रूपरेखा प्रदान करने के लिए पीछे के नियमितीकरण का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम लॉग-रैखिक मॉडल में सुविधाओं के रूप में पूर्व ज्ञान स्रोतों का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं, जो तंत्रिका अनुवाद मॉडल के सीखने के प्रसंस्करण का मार्गदर्शन करता है। चीनी-अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण महत्वपूर्ण सुधार की ओर जाता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя нейронный машинный перевод в последнее время добился значительного прогресса, как интегрировать несколько перекрывающихся, произвольных предшествующих источников знаний остается проблемой. В этой работе мы предлагаем использовать апостериорную регуляризацию, чтобы обеспечить общие рамки для интеграции предшествующих знаний в нейронный машинный перевод. Мы представляем предыдущие источники знаний как особенности в логарифмической линейной модели, которая направляет процесс обучения нейронной модели перевода. Эксперименты на китайско-английском наборе данных показывают, что наш подход приводит к значительным улучшениям.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta le déanaí i néaraistriúchán meaisín, is dúshlán fós é conas forluiteacht iolrach a chomhtháthú le foinsí eolais treallach roimh ré. San obair seo, molaimid úsáid a bhaint as rialtacht iardain chun creat ginearálta a sholáthar chun réamheolas a chomhtháthú in aistriúchán meaisín néarach. Léirímid foinsí eolais roimhe seo mar ghnéithe i múnla log-líneach, a threoraíonn próiseáil foghlama mhúnla an aistriúcháin néaraigh. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí Sínis-Béarla go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar ár gcur chuige.', 'ka': 'თუმცა ნეიროლური მაქანის გადაწყვეტილება ახლა მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი გავაკეთეთ, როგორ უნდა გადაწყვეტის მრავალ გადაწყვეტილება, არგარისი წინ უ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით გამოყენება პოსტერიო რეგილარიზაციაში, რომელიც საერთო პარამეტრის ინტერგურაციაში წინასწორი ცნობილების ინტერგურაცია ჩვენ წინ ვიცნობების ფოსტები როგორც ფოსტები ლოგლინიური მოდელში, რომელიც ნეიროლური გადაწყვეტილების მოდელს გასწავლების პროცესის მიმართება. ჩინეთი-ანგლისური მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენება ჩვენი მონაცემების გასაკეთებლად გავაკეთება.', 'el': 'Αν και η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση έχει σημειώσει σημαντική πρόοδο πρόσφατα, ο τρόπος ενσωμάτωσης πολλαπλών επικαλυπτόμενων, αυθαίρετες πηγές προηγούμενης γνώσης παραμένει μια πρόκληση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε τη χρήση της οπίσθιας κανονικοποίησης για να παράσχουμε ένα γενικό πλαίσιο για την ενσωμάτωση προηγούμενων γνώσεων στην νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Αντιπροσωπεύουμε πηγές προηγούμενης γνώσης ως χαρακτηριστικά σε ένα γραμμικό μοντέλο, το οποίο καθοδηγεί την επεξεργασία μάθησης του μοντέλου νευρωνικής μετάφρασης. Τα πειράματα σε κινέζικο-αγγλικό σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας οδηγεί σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις.', 'hu': 'Bár az idegi gépi fordítás jelentős előrelépést ért el az utóbbi időben, továbbra is kihívást jelent a többszörös átfedő, önkényes korábbi tudásforrások integrálásának módja. Ebben a munkában azt javasoljuk, hogy a posterior regularizációt használjuk, hogy általános keretet biztosítsunk az előzetes ismeretek integrálására a neurális gépi fordításba. A korábbi tudásforrásokat egy log-lineáris modell jellemzőjeként képviseljük, amely a neurális fordítási modell tanulási feldolgozását irányítja. A kínai-angol adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk jelentős javulást eredményez.', 'it': "Sebbene la traduzione automatica neurale abbia fatto progressi significativi di recente, come integrare più fonti di conoscenza precedenti arbitrarie e sovrapposte rimane una sfida. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di utilizzare la regolarizzazione posteriore per fornire un quadro generale per integrare le conoscenze precedenti nella traduzione automatica neurale. Rappresentiamo fonti di conoscenza precedenti come caratteristiche in un modello log-lineare, che guida l'elaborazione di apprendimento del modello di traduzione neurale. Esperimenti su set di dati cinese-inglese dimostrano che il nostro approccio porta a miglioramenti significativi.", 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармасы жаңа жағдайда маңызды жағдайды, бірнеше бірнеше білім көзін қалай біріктіру үшін, алдындағы білім көзі мәселе болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, кейінгі үлгілікті қолдану үшін, алдыңғы білімдерді невралдық компьютердің аудармасына біріктіру үшін жалпы бағдарламасын қолдану үшін Біз алдыңғы білім көздерін журнал сызық үлгісінде қасиеттер ретінде көрсетедік. Бұл невралдық аудармалы үлгісінің үйрену өзгерістерін көрсетеді. Қытай-ағылшын деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелер біздің тәжірибеміз үлкен жақсартуларға көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Nors neseniai padaryta didelė pažanga nervinių mašinų vertimui, kaip integruoti daugelį sutampančių žinių šaltinių, savavališki išankstiniai žinių šaltiniai tebėra iššūkis. Šiame darbe siūlome naudoti galinę reguliarizaciją, kad būtų sukurta bendra išankstinių žinių integravimo į nervinių mašinų vertimą sistema. Mes atstovaujame ankstesniems žinių šaltiniams kaip logaritminio linijinio modelio savybėms, kuriose vadovaujamasi neurologinio vertimo modelio mokymosi procesui. Kinijos ir anglų duomenų rinkinio eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris lemia reikšmingus patobulinimus.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што нервниот машински превод неодамна постигна значителен напредок, како да се интегрира многуте прекривања, арбитралните извори на претходно знаење остануваат предизвик. Во оваа работа, предлагаме да се користи задната регуларизација за да се обезбеди генерална рамка за интеграција на претходното знаење во нервниот машински превод. We represent prior knowledge sources as features in a log-linear model, which guides the learning processing of the neural translation model.  Експериментите на кинеско-англискиот податок покажуваат дека нашиот пристап води до значителни подобрувања.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും എങ്ങനെയാണ് പല ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പോസ്റ്റര്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. മുമ്പ് അറിവ്  നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പ് അറിവുകളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d ലോഗ് ലൈനര്\u200d മോഡലിലെ പ്രതിനിധികളായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ന്യൂറല്\u200d പരിഭാഷയുടെ  ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയില', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн хувьд маш чухал хөгжлийг гаргасан ч, хэрхэн олон тохиромжтой байдлаар нэгтгэх вэ гэхдээ өмнө нь мэдлэг эх үүсвэрүүд нь хэцүү хэцүү Энэ ажил дээр бид урьдын мэдлэгийг мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд ерөнхий хэлбэрийг ашиглах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Бид өмнө нь мэдлэг эх үүсвэрүүдийг лог-шугам загварын төлөвлөгөө гэж үзүүлдэг. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн хөгжлийн загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг удирдаж байна. Хятад-Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт бидний арга зам нь чухал сайжруулалттай болж байна.', 'no': 'Selv om nyleg har omsetjinga av neuralmaskinen lagt viktig framgang, korleis du integrerer fleire overlapping, vil vilkårleg før kjeldene for kunnskap bli eit utfordring. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi å bruka etterpørre regularisasjon for å gjera eit generell rammeverk for å integrera førre kunnskap til neuralmaskinsomsetjing. Vi representerer førre kjelde for kunnskap som funksjonar i ein loglineær modell, som styrer læringshandlinga av den neurale omsetjingsmodulen. Eksperimentar på kinesisk-engelsk dataset viser at tilnærminga vår fører til signifikante forbedringar.', 'pl': 'Chociaż neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe poczyniło ostatnio znaczące postępy, to jak zintegrować wiele nakładających się na siebie, arbitralne źródła wiedzy wcześniej pozostaje wyzwaniem. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy wykorzystanie regularyzacji tylnej w celu zapewnienia ogólnych ram integracji wiedzy wcześniejszej w tłumaczeniu maszynowym neuronowym. Przedstawiamy źródła wiedzy wcześniejszej jako cechy w modelu log-liniowym, który kieruje procesem uczenia się modelu translacji neuronowej. Eksperymenty na chińsko-angielskim zbiorze danych pokazują, że nasze podejście prowadzi do znaczących ulepszeń.', 'ro': 'Deși traducerea automată neurală a făcut progrese semnificative în ultima vreme, modul în care se integrează mai multe surse de suprapunere, arbitrare de cunoștințe anterioare rămâne o provocare. În această lucrare, propunem utilizarea regularizării posterioare pentru a oferi un cadru general pentru integrarea cunoștințelor anterioare în traducerea automată neurală. Reprezentăm sursele de cunoștințe anterioare ca caracteristici într-un model log-liniar, care ghidează procesarea învățării modelului de traducere neurală. Experimentele pe setul de date chinezesc-engleză arată că abordarea noastră duce la îmbunătățiri semnificative.', 'sr': 'Iako je neuronski prevod nedavno ostvario značajan napredak, kako da integrišemo višestruko preoklapanje, proizvori prije znanja ostaju izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo da iskoristimo poslednju regularizaciju kako bi omogućili opći okvir za integraciju prethodnih znanja u prevod neuralnih mašina. Predstavljamo ranije izvore znanja kao karakteristike u dnevnom modelu, koji vodi proces učenja model a neuralnog prevoda. Eksperimenti na kineskom-engleskom setu podataka pokazuju da naš pristup vodi do značajnih poboljšanja.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය අලුත් වෙලාවට වැදගත් ප්\u200dරභාවයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, කොහොමද කියලා වැඩිය ප්\u200dරභා මේ වැඩේ අපි පිටිපස්සේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා මුලින් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dර අපි මුලින් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොග් ලිනියර් මොඩල් වලින් විශේෂතාවක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් න චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සංවිධානයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂ වැඩ කරන්න', 'so': "In kastoo turjumista maskinada neural ee ugu dhowaad uu sameeyay horumar aad u weyn, sida loo wada qabsashada iskuullada qaarkood, sababtuna waa dhibaato la'aan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno xeerarka dabaraar si aan u sameyno koob caadi ah si aqoonta horumarinta looga dhigo turjumaadda maskaxda neurada. Waxaynu ka muujinaynaa noocyo qoraal-linear ah, kaas oo hagaya baaritaanka waxbarashada modelka tarjumaadda neurada. Experiments on Chinese-English dataset show that our approach leads to significant improvements.", 'sv': 'Även om neural maskinöversättning har gjort betydande framsteg på senare tid, hur man integrerar flera överlappande, godtyckliga tidigare kunskapskällor är fortfarande en utmaning. I detta arbete föreslår vi att använda posterior regularisering för att ge en allmän ram för att integrera tidigare kunskaper i neural maskinöversättning. Vi representerar tidigare kunskapskällor som funktioner i en log-linjär modell, som styr inlärningsprocessen av den neurala översättningsmodellen. Experiment på kinesisk-engelsk datauppsättning visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt leder till betydande förbättringar.', 'ms': 'Walaupun terjemahan mesin saraf telah membuat kemajuan yang signifikan akhir-akhir ini, bagaimana untuk mengintegrasikan saling bertindih berbilang, sumber pengetahuan terdahulu arbitrari tetap satu cabaran. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan pengaturan belakang untuk menyediakan kerangka umum untuk mengintegrasikan pengetahuan terdahulu ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf. Kami mewakili sumber pengetahuan terdahulu sebagai ciri-ciri dalam model log-linear, yang memimpin pemprosesan pembelajaran model terjemahan saraf. Eksperimen pada set data Cina-Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita membawa kepada peningkatan yang signifikan.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சமீபத்தில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றம் செய்து விட்டாலும், எப்படி பல மேல்பெருக்கல் ஒன்றிணைக் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் போட்ரியர் கட்டுப்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் பொது சட்டத்தை வழங்க முன்னால் அறிவை புதிய இயந்திரத்  நாம் முன்னால் அறிவு மூலத்தை குணங்களாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் ஒரு பதிவு கோட்டு மாதிரியில், அது புதிய மொழிமாற்ற மாதிரிய சீன- ஆங்கிலம் தகவல் அமைப்பில் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது எங்கள் செயல்பாடு முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங', 'mt': 'Għalkemm dan l-a ħħar it-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali għamlet progress sinifikanti, kif jiġu integrati diversi sorsi ta’ għarfien li jikkoinċidu, sorsi arbitrarji ta’ għarfien minn qabel għadhom sfida. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu li nużaw ir-regolarizzazzjoni posterjuri biex jipprovdu qafas ġenerali għall-integrazzjoni tal-għarfien minn qabel fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. We represent prior knowledge sources as features in a log-linear model, which guides the learning processing of the neural translation model.  L-esperimenti fuq sett ta’ dejta Ċiniż-Ingliż juru li l-approċċ tagħna jwassal għal titjib sinifikanti.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ اچھے وقت میں بہت بڑی پیشرفت کی گئی ہے، کیونکر بہت سے اورلپ پیدا کرنا، اگلے معلومات کے سراسر ایک چال رہے ہیں. اس کام میں، ہم نے پوسٹریور قانونی کا استعمال کرنا چاہا ہے کہ اس سے پہلے علم کو نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ میں جمع کرنے کے لئے ایک عمومی فراموش دے۔ ہم پہلے کے علم سوسوں کو لوگ لینیاری موڈل میں شامل بناتے ہیں، جو نیورل ترجمہ موڈل کی تعلیم کی پردازی کی راہ دکھاتا ہے. چین-انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ بہت اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Although neural machine translation has made significant progress recently, how to integrate multiple overlapping, arbitrary prior knowledge sources remains a challenge.  Bu ishda, biz bir necha tarjima tarjima qilish uchun bir umumiy freymni qo'llash uchun bir necha xil mashinaga birlashtirish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz oldingi ilmiy manbalarni log-liner modelidagi xususiyatlar deb hisoblanamiz, bu neyrol tarjima modelining o'rganishni anglatadi. Xitoycha-Ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibini tajriba qilish imtiyozlarimiz juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishga ega.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù bản dịch máy thần kinh đã có tiến triển đáng kể gần đây, nhưng làm thế nào để kết hợp nhiều sự chồng chéo, các nguồn hiểu biết trước ngẫu nhiên vẫn là thách thức. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng hệ thống chính thức sau để cung cấp một cơ sở phổ biến để hiểu biết trước trong phiên dịch máy thần kinh. Chúng tôi đại diện cho các nguồn hiểu biết trước như các tính năng trong mô hình log linear, which guides the leaving treatment of the noron translation model. Thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu Trung Quốc-Anh cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có những cải tiến đáng kể.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че невронният машинен превод е постигнал значителен напредък напоследък, как да интегрираме множество припокриващи се, произволни източници на предишни знания остава предизвикателство. В тази работа предлагаме да се използва последваща регулировка, за да се осигури обща рамка за интегриране на предишни знания в невронния машинен превод. Представяме източниците на предишни знания като характеристики в логлинеен модел, който ръководи учебната обработка на модела на невронен превод. Експериментите с китайско-английски набор от данни показват, че нашият подход води до значителни подобрения.', 'nl': 'Hoewel neurale machinevertaling de laatste tijd aanzienlijke vooruitgang heeft geboekt, blijft het integreren van meerdere overlappende, willekeurige voorkennisbronnen een uitdaging. In dit werk stellen we voor om posteriore regularisatie te gebruiken om een algemeen kader te bieden voor het integreren van voorkennis in neurale machinevertaling. We vertegenwoordigen voorkennisbronnen als kenmerken in een log-lineair model, dat de leerverwerking van het neurale vertaalmodel begeleidt. Experimenten op Chinees-Engels dataset tonen aan dat onze aanpak tot aanzienlijke verbeteringen leidt.', 'da': 'Selvom neural maskinoversættelse har gjort betydelige fremskridt på det seneste, er hvordan man integrerer flere overlappende, vilkårlige tidligere videnkilder stadig en udfordring. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at bruge posterior regularisering til at give en generel ramme for integration af tidligere viden i neural maskinoversættelse. Vi repræsenterer tidligere videnkilder som funktioner i en log-lineær model, der styrer læringsprocessen af den neurale oversættelsesmodel. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-engelsk datasæt viser, at vores tilgang fører til betydelige forbedringer.', 'hr': 'Iako je neuronski prevod nedavno ostvario značajan napredak, kako integrirati višestruke preklapanje, proizvori prije znanja ostaju izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo korištenje kasnije regularizacije kako bi pružili opći okvir za integraciju prethodnih znanja u prevod neuralnih strojeva. Predstavljamo ranije izvore znanja kao karakteristike u dnevnom modelu, koji vodi proces učenja model a neuralnog prevoda. Eksperimenti na kineskom-engleskom setu podataka pokazuju da naš pristup vodi do značajnih poboljšanja.', 'ko': '비록 신경 기계 번역이 최근 몇 년 동안 중대한 진전을 거두었지만, 어떻게 여러 개의 중첩되고 임의의 선험 지식원을 통합시킬 것인가는 여전히 도전이다.이 작업에서, 우리는 선험 지식을 신경기계 번역에 통합시키는 일반적인 구조를 제공하기 위해 후험 정규화를 사용하는 것을 권장한다.우리는 선험지식원을 수선형 모델 중의 특징으로 표시하여 신경번역모델의 학습 과정을 지도할 것이다.한영 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 현저한 개선을 얻었다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'de': 'Obwohl neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung in letzter Zeit erhebliche Fortschritte gemacht hat, bleibt die Integration mehrerer überlappender, willkürlicher Vorkenntnisquellen nach wie vor eine Herausforderung. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, die posteriore Regularisierung zu nutzen, um einen allgemeinen Rahmen für die Integration von Vorkenntnissen in die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung zu schaffen. Wir stellen Vorkenntnisquellen als Merkmale in einem log-linearen Modell dar, das die Lernverarbeitung des neuronalen Translationsmodells leitet. Experimente an chinesisch-englischen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz zu signifikanten Verbesserungen führt.', 'id': 'Meskipun terjemahan mesin saraf telah membuat kemajuan yang signifikan akhir-akhir ini, bagaimana untuk mengintegrasi banyak saling bertindak, sumber pengetahuan sebelumnya secara arbitrar tetap tantangan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan regularisasi posterior untuk menyediakan cadangan umum untuk mengintegrasi pengetahuan sebelumnya ke terjemahan mesin saraf. Kami mewakili sumber pengetahuan sebelumnya sebagai fitur dalam model log-linear, yang memimpin proses belajar dari model terjemahan saraf. Eksperimen pada set data Cina-Inggris menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita membawa kepada peningkatan yang signifikan.', 'fa': 'اگرچه ترجمه ماشین عصبی اخیراً پیشرفت بزرگی پیش گرفته است، چگونه جمع کردن منبع علمی چندین بار پیش از این، یک چالش باقی ماند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم از تغییر قانونی پشت سر استفاده کنیم تا یک چهارچوب عمومی برای تغییر علم قبلی به ترجمه ماشین عصبی ارائه دهیم. ما منبع دانش قبلی را به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای یک مدل لاگ خطی نمایش می\u200cدهیم که مدل ترجمه\u200cهای عصبی را هدایت می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه داده\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما به سوی بهترین شدیدی منجر می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Ingawa tafsiri ya mashine ya neura imefanya maendeleo makubwa hivi karibuni, jinsi ya kuunganisha upande wa juu mbalimbali, vyanzo vya maarifa vya kiholela bado ni changamoto. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia utaratibu wa maboresho ili kutoa mfumo wa jumla kwa ajili ya kuunganisha maarifa kabla ya kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa. Tunawakilisha vyanzo vya maarifa vilivyokuwa vipengele vya msingi, ambavyo vinaongoza upasuaji wa kujifunza kwa modeli ya tafsiri ya kisasa. Majaribio kwenye taarifa za Kiingereza za zinaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inapelekea maboresho makubwa.', 'tr': 'Näyral maşynyň terjimesi ýakynda wajyp ýüze çykyp bilýändir, nädip öňki bilgi çeşmelerinden öňki täze bir kynçylyk däldir. Bu işde, öňki bilgi näyral maşynyň terjimesine üýtgetmek üçin poster düzenlemeli işlemegi teklip edýäris. Öňki bilgi çeşmelerini log-çizgi nusgasynda örän çyzgylaşdyrýarys. Bu nusgasy terjime model in in işlemesini mümkin edýär. Çinçe-Iňlisçe maglumatyň barlag sapaglarynyň biziň ýaryşymyzyň möhüm gelişmelerine ýok edip bilýändigini görkezýär.', 'af': "Alhoewel die neurale masjien vertaling onlangs betekende vordering gemaak het, hoe om veelvuldige oorvloediging te integreer, willekeurige voorheen kennisbronne bly 'n uitdrukking. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons om posterior regularisasie te gebruik om 'n algemene raamwerk te verskaf vir integreer voorheede kennis in neurale masjien vertaling. Ons verteenwoordig voorheen kennis bronne as funksies in 'n log-lineêre model, wat gids die leer verwerking van die neurale vertaling model. Eksperimente op Sjinese-Engels datastel wys dat ons toegang lei na betekende verbeteringe.", 'hy': 'Չնայած նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը վերջերս կարևոր առաջընթաց է արել, ինչպես ինտեգրել բազմաթիվ հակադրություններ, նախկինում կամավոր գիտելիքների աղբյուրները դեռևս մարտահրավեր են: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել հետագա ռեգուլարիզացիա, որպեսզի ստեղծենք ընդհանուր շրջանակ նախկին գիտելիքների ինտեգրման համար նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նախորդ գիտելիքի աղբյուրները որպես հատկություններ մի լոգ-գծային մոդելի մեջ, որը ուղղորդում է նյարդային թարգմանման մոդելի ուսումնասիրությունը: Չինաստանի-անգլերենի տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է նշանակալի բարելավման:', 'sq': 'Megjithëse përkthimi i makinave nervore ka bërë përparim të rëndësishëm kohët e fundit, si të integrohet mbishtypja e shumëfishtë, burimet e njohurive të mëparshme arbitrare mbeten një sfidë. In this work, we propose to use posterior regularization to provide a general framework for integrating prior knowledge into neural machine translation.  Ne përfaqësojmë burimet e njohurive të mëparshme si karakteristika në një model log-linear, i cili udhëzon përpunimin e mësimit të modelit të përkthimit nervor. Eksperimentet në të dhënat kineze-angleze tregojnë se qasja jonë shpie në përmirësime të rëndësishme.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን በጊዜው የሆኑት የሆኑት መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ የበለጠ ግንኙነት ባደረገ እንኳን፣ ብዙዎችን ማቀናቀል እንዴት እንደማከማቻል፣ የአርቢስቲካዊ የዕውቀት ምንጮች አስቀድሞ ጥቃት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የፖስሬር ሥርዓት ለመጠቀም የጠቅላላ እውቀትን ለመቀናቀል የናውሬው መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ ለመጠቀም አቅራቢያ ፍሬም ማቅረብ እናስባለን፡፡ የቀድሞው እውቀት ምንጮችን የነጥብ ትርጓሜ ሞዴል እንደሚያስተምር የኖሮግራር ሞዴል እናቆማለን፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ዳታ ማድረጊያው ፈተናዎች ልማድ ትልቅ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'যদিও নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ সম্প্রতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অগ্রগতি সৃষ্টি করেছে, কিভাবে কিভাবে বেশ কয়েকটি পুনরায় সংযুক্ত করা যায়, কিন্ত এই কাজে আমরা পোস্ট্রিয়ার নিয়ন্ত্রণ ব্যবহার করতে প্রস্তাব করছি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদে পূর্ববর্তী জ্ঞান সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য একটি সাধ আমরা পূর্ববর্তী জ্ঞানের উৎস হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করি একটি লগ-লাইনারের মডেলে বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে, যা নিউরেল অনুবাদ মডেলের শ চীন-ইংরেজী ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিশাল উন্নতির দিকে যাচ্ছে।', 'az': 'Neyral maşın çevirimi son zamanlarda çoxlu çoxlu çoxlu çoxluğu ilə birləşdirmək üçün böyük tədbir etdiyi halda, əvvəlki bilgi mənbələrini tədbir edir. Bu işdə, əvvəlki bilgi nöral maşına çevirməyə integrasiya yaratmaq üçün daha sonra düzgün düzgün tərzdə istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Biz əvvəlki bilgi kaynaqlarını log-linear modelində özelliklər kimi göstəririk ki, bu nöral tercümə model in in öyrənməsini göstərir. Çin-İngilizə verilənlərin təcrübələri bizim tərəfimiz möhkəm düzəltmələrə yol göstərir.', 'bs': 'Iako je neuronski prevod nedavno ostvario značajan napredak, kako integrirati višestruke prepreklapanje, proizvori prije znanja ostaju izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo da upotrebimo kasnije regularizacije kako bi pružili opći okvir za integraciju prethodnih znanja u prevod neuralnih strojeva. Predstavljamo ranije izvore znanja kao karakteristike u dnevnom modelu, koji vodi proces učenja model a neuralnog prevoda. Eksperimenti na kineskom-engleskom setu podataka pokazuju da naš pristup vodi do značajnih poboljšanja.', 'ca': "Malgrat que la traducció neural de màquines ha fet progrés significatius fa poc, la manera d'integrar múltiples sovrapposicions, les fonts arbitràries anteriors de coneixement siguen un repte. En aquesta feina, proposem utilitzar la regularizació posterior per proporcionar un marc general per integrar el coneixement anterior en la traducció neuromàtica. Representem fonts de coneixement anteriors com característiques en un model log-linear, que guia el processament d'aprenentatge del model de traducció neuronal. Els experiments en el conjunt de dades xinès-anglès demostren que el nostre enfocament porta a millores significatives.", 'cs': 'Přestože neuronový strojový překlad v poslední době dosáhl významného pokroku, jak integrovat více překrývajících se, libovolné předchozí znalosti zdroje zůstává výzvou. V této práci navrhujeme použití posteriorní regularizace k poskytnutí obecného rámce pro integraci předchozích znalostí do neuronového strojového překladu. Zdroje předchozích znalostí reprezentujeme jako prvky v log-lineárním modelu, který řídí učební zpracování neuronového překladového modelu. Experimenty na čínsko-anglickém datovém souboru ukazují, že náš přístup vede k výrazným zlepšením.', 'fi': 'Vaikka neurokonekäännös on viime aikoina edistynyt merkittävästi, useiden päällekkäisten, mielivaltaisten aikaisempien tietolähteiden integrointi on edelleen haaste. Tässä työssä ehdotamme myöhemmän regularisoinnin käyttöä yleisen viitekehyksen luomiseksi aikaisemman tiedon integroimiseksi neurokonekäännökseen. Esitämme aikaisempia tietolähteitä ominaisuuksina log-lineaarisessa mallissa, joka ohjaa neurotranslaatiomallin oppimista. Kiinalais-englantilaisella aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme johtaa merkittäviin parannuksiin.', 'et': 'Kuigi neuraalne masintõlk on viimasel ajal märkimisväärselt edenenud, on väljakutseks, kuidas integreerida mitmeid kattuvaid, suvalisi varasemaid teadmiste allikaid. Selles töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada hilisemat regulatsiooni, et luua üldine raamistik eelnevate teadmiste integreerimiseks neuromasintõlkesse. Esitame varasemaid teadmiste allikaid funktsioonidena logaritmilises mudelis, mis juhendab neurotõlkemudeli õppimist. Hiina-inglise andmekogumi eksperimendid näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis toob kaasa märkimisväärseid parandusi.', 'ha': "Although neural machine translation has made significant progress recently, how to integrate multiple overlapping, arbitrary prior knowledge sources remains a challenge.  Daga wannan aikin, Muke bukãtar da mu yi amfani da ruturarin posteriar zuwa a sami firam mai haɗa ilmi gaba ɗaya zuwa fassarar mashine na neural. Tuna ƙayyade manyan ilmi a gabãni kamar misalin-salon, wanda ke shirya shirin da za'a yi amfani da misãlin fassarar neural. Tajararin da aka tsare data na Kiyãki-Ingiriya yana nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana ƙara mafiya kyau.", 'jv': 'Nyong-alam sistem sing dibutuhi nggawe barang dumadhi, piye ngerasakno tining kelas telapit, sampeyan ngerasakno layang sampeyan sampeyan sampek iso dianggawe Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo nggawe sistem puntuan pop-tarjamahan kanggo nggawe sistem General kanggo ingkang supoyo awak dhéwé nang ngerewake sistem netwarel. Awak dhéwé éntuk kelas nang ingkang sampek ning model log-linear, sing bisa ngubah nggawe Perintah pengguna nggawe modèl itolet Neral. Isopo sing ngengambar dadi Inggris barang nggambar kuwi, dadi kanggo ngerasahan kanggo ngono nggawe barang kanggo mbanjurakno.', 'he': 'למרות שהתרגום של מכונות עצביות עשה התקדמות משמעותית לאחרונה, איך להשתלב במספר מתקפלים, מקורות ידע קודמים מוחלטים נשארים אתגר. In this work, we propose to use posterior regularization to provide a general framework for integrating prior knowledge into neural machine translation.  אנחנו מייצגים מקורות ידע קודמים כתכונות במודל לוג-לינרי, שמדריך את עיבוד הלימוד של מודל התרגום העצבי. ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים סיני-אנגלית מראים שהגישה שלנו מובילה לשיפורים משמעותיים.', 'sk': 'Čeprav je nevronsko strojno prevajanje v zadnjem času doseglo precejšen napredek, ostaja izziv, kako integrirati več prekrivajočih se, poljubnih virov predhodnega znanja. V tem delu predlagamo uporabo kasnejše regulacije za zagotovitev splošnega okvira za integracijo predhodnega znanja v nevronsko strojno prevajanje. Predhodne vire znanja predstavljamo kot značilnosti v log-linearnem modelu, ki vodi učno procesiranje modela nevronskega prevajanja. Eksperimenti na kitajsko-angleškem naboru podatkov kažejo, da naš pristop vodi do znatnih izboljšav.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གསར་གཏོང་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡང་ཇི་ལྟར འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྗེས་སུ་གཞུང་གི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲན་འབྱུང་རིམ་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་ཤེས་ཡོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྒྱ་ནག་དང་ཨིན་ཇིའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ན་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚད།'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Word Reordering Knowledge into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'دمج كلمة إعادة ترتيب المعرفة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه', 'pt': 'Incorporando o conhecimento de reordenação de palavras na tradução automática neural baseada na atenção', 'es': 'Incorporación del conocimiento de reordenación de palabras en la traducción automática neuronal basada en la atención', 'fr': "Intégration des connaissances sur la réorganisation des mots dans la traduction automatique neuronale basée sur l'attention", 'ja': 'アテンションベースのニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションに単語の並べ替えに関する知識を取り入れる', 'zh': '将单词重序整合至于注意之神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में ज्ञान को पुन: क्रमबद्ध करने वाले शब्द को शामिल करना', 'ru': 'Включение знаний о переупорядочении слов в основанный на внимании нейронный машинный перевод', 'ga': 'Eolas Athordaithe Focal a Ionchorprú in Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-Bhunaithe Aird-Bhunaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση της γνώσης αναδιατάστασης λέξεων στη βασισμένη στην προσοχή νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'A tudás átrendezése a figyelem alapú idegi fordításba', 'it': "Incorporare la conoscenza di riordino delle parole nella traduzione automatica neurale basata sull'attenzione", 'kk': 'Білімдерді назардағы нейрондық машинаның аудармасына қайта реттеу', 'lt': 'Įtraukti žodžių perskirstymo žinias į dėmesiu pagrįstą neurologinį mašinų vertimą', 'mk': 'Incorporating Word Reordering Knowledge into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation', 'ms': 'Memasukkan Perkataan Mengurus Semula Pengetahuan ke dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural Berasas Perhatian', 'ml': 'Incorporating Word Reordering Knowledge into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-Għarfien dwar l-Ordni mill-ġdid tal-Kliem fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali bbażata fuq l-Attenzjoni', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн сэтгэл хөдлөл дээр мэдлэгийг дахин хуваалцах үг', 'no': 'Omsetjing av ordet som rekorderer kjenning til omsetjing av nøyralmaskinen basert på merksomsetjing', 'pl': 'Włączenie wiedzy o zmianie porządku słów do tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na uwadze', 'ro': 'Incorporarea cunoștințelor de reordonare a cuvintelor în traducerea automată neurală bazată pe atenție', 'sr': 'Ukljuèujuæi reè Rezerviranje znanja na osnovu pažnje neurološkog prevoda mašine', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha macluumaadka Neural ee ku saleysan', 'sv': 'Att införliva Word Omordering Kunskap i uppmärksamhetsbaserad Neural Machine Translation', 'ta': 'கவனிப்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கு வார்த்தை மறுவரிசைப்படுத்தும் அறிவினை ச', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාව නැවතිරික්ෂණය කරනවා දැනගන්න පුළුවන්', 'ur': 'توجه کے ذریعے علم کو دوبارہ ترجمہ کرنے والی کلمات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình từ ngữ phục hồi tri thức thành Dịch Máy Thần kinh Chú ý', 'bg': 'Включване на знанията за пренареждане на думи в базиран на вниманието неврален машинен превод', 'hr': 'Uključujući riječ Preporučivanje znanja u prijevoz neuroloških strojeva na temelju pažnje', 'da': 'Inddragelse af ordomregning viden i opmærksomhedsbaseret neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Opnemen van kennis van woordherschikking in aandacht-gebaseerde neurale machinevertaling', 'de': 'Einbeziehung von Wissen über die Neuordnung von Wörtern in die aufmerksamkeitsbasierte neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Menginkorporasi Perkataan Mengurus Pengetahuan ke Translation Mesin Neural Berdasarkan Perhatian', 'ko': '단어 재배열 지식을 주의에 기초한 신경기계 번역에 융합시키다', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمه\u200cای که تغییر دادن علم به ترجمه ماشین عصبی بر پایه توجه', 'sw': 'Kuongeza Neno Reorder Knowledge katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiasili yenye msimamo mkali', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Woord Herordening kennis in Aansig-gebaseerde Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë fjalët që rregullojnë njohuritë në përkthimin e makinës nervore me bazë në vëmendje', 'tr': 'Bilgi nähili maslahat edip biljek maşynyň terjimesine ýene-täzeden girdirilýär', 'am': 'የቃላትን አቀማመጥ እውቀት ወደ ተጠያቂው የኔural machine ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն', 'az': 'Bilm톛yi Attention-based N칬ral Makina 칂evirm톛sin톛 Yeniden Se칞im Kelimi', 'bn': 'মনোযোগের ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদে শব্দ পুনরায় নির্দেশের জ্ঞান অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "Incorporar el Conèixement Ordinant paraules en la traducció de màquines neuronals basada en l'atenció", 'bs': 'Uključujući riječ Rezerviranje znanja u prijevoz neuroloških strojeva na temelju pažnje', 'et': 'Sõna ümberkorraldamise teadmiste lisamine tähelepanupõhisesse neuromasintõlkesse', 'cs': 'Začlenění znalostí přepracování slov do pozornosti založeného na neurálním strojovém překladu', 'fi': 'Sanan uudelleenjĂ¤rjestelytiedon sisĂ¤llyttĂ¤minen huomiopohjaiseen neurokonekĂ¤Ă¤nnĂ¶kseen', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Vključevanje znanja o preurejanju besed v pozornosti temelječe nevronski strojni prevod', 'he': 'הכילה מילים להזמין מידע מחדש לתרגום מכונת עצבית מבוססת על תשומת לב', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་འབྱོར་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ལ་རྟོགས་པ་དང་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes three distortion models to explicitly incorporate the word reordering knowledge into attention-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) for further improving translation performance. Our proposed models enable attention mechanism to attend to source words regarding both the semantic requirement and the word reordering penalty. Experiments on Chinese-English translation show that the approaches can improve word alignment quality and achieve significant translation improvements over a basic attention-based NMT by large margins. Compared with previous works on identical corpora, our system achieves the state-of-the-art performance on translation quality.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة ثلاثة نماذج تشويه لدمج كلمة إعادة ترتيب المعرفة بشكل صريح في الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه (NMT) لزيادة تحسين أداء الترجمة. تتيح نماذجنا المقترحة آلية الانتباه لحضور كلمات المصدر فيما يتعلق بكل من المتطلبات الدلالية وكلمة إعادة ترتيب العقوبة. تظهر التجارب على الترجمة الصينية-الإنجليزية أن الأساليب يمكن أن تحسن جودة محاذاة الكلمات وتحقق تحسينات كبيرة في الترجمة على NMT الأساسي القائم على الاهتمام بهوامش كبيرة. مقارنة بالأعمال السابقة في مجموعات متطابقة ، يحقق نظامنا أداءً متطورًا في جودة الترجمة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe três modelos de distorção para incorporar explicitamente o conhecimento de reordenação de palavras na tradução automática neural baseada em atenção (NMT) para melhorar ainda mais o desempenho da tradução. Nossos modelos propostos permitem que o mecanismo de atenção atenda às palavras-fonte tanto no que diz respeito ao requisito semântico quanto à penalidade de reordenação de palavras. Experimentos em tradução chinês-inglês mostram que as abordagens podem melhorar a qualidade do alinhamento de palavras e alcançar melhorias significativas de tradução em relação a um NMT básico baseado em atenção por grandes margens. Comparado com trabalhos anteriores em corpora idênticos, nosso sistema alcança o desempenho de última geração em qualidade de tradução.', 'fr': "Cet article propose trois modèles de distorsion pour intégrer explicitement la connaissance de la réorganisation des mots dans la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) basée sur l'attention afin d'améliorer encore les performances de traduction. Nos modèles proposés permettent au mécanisme d'attention de s'occuper des mots sources concernant à la fois l'exigence sémantique et la pénalité de réorganisation des mots. Les expériences de traduction chinois-anglais montrent que les approches peuvent améliorer la qualité de l'alignement des mots et obtenir des améliorations significatives de la traduction par rapport à un NMT de base basé sur l'attention avec de grandes marges. Par rapport aux travaux précédents sur des corpus identiques, notre système atteint des performances de pointe en matière de qualité de traduction.", 'es': 'Este artículo propone tres modelos de distorsión para incorporar explícitamente el conocimiento del reordenamiento de palabras en la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basada en la atención para mejorar aún más el rendimiento de la traducción. Nuestros modelos propuestos permiten que el mecanismo de atención atienda las palabras fuente tanto con respecto al requisito semántico como a la penalización por reordenación de palabras. Los experimentos sobre la traducción chino-inglés muestran que los enfoques pueden mejorar la calidad de la alineación de palabras y lograr mejoras significativas en la traducción en comparación con un NMT básico basado en la atención por grandes márgenes. En comparación con trabajos anteriores en cuerpos idénticos, nuestro sistema logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en la calidad de la traducción.', 'ja': '本論文では、翻訳パフォーマンスをさらに向上させるために、注意に基づくニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）に単語の並べ替え知識を明示的に組み込むための3つの歪みモデルを提案した。私たちの提案されたモデルは、セマンティック要件と単語の並べ替えペナルティの両方に関して、ソースワードに注意を払うメカニズムを可能にします。中国語と英語の翻訳に関する実験では、これらのアプローチがワードアライメントの品質を向上させ、基本的な注意に基づくNMTよりも大きなマージンで大幅な翻訳改善を達成できることが示されています。当社のシステムは、同一コーポラに関する以前の作業と比較して、翻訳品質の最先端のパフォーマンスを実現しています。', 'zh': '本文举三失真模形,将单词重序明整合至于注意神经机器翻译(NMT)中,以进一步提高译性。 臣等规模注意机宜关语义要单词重序罚单词。 中英译实验明,比于注意之本NMT,可以崇单词齐质,成其显者也。 比之同语料库,统于译质。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर तीन विरूपण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करता है ताकि अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में और सुधार के लिए ध्यान-आधारित न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) में ज्ञान को फिर से व्यवस्थित करने वाले शब्द को स्पष्ट रूप से शामिल किया जा सके। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल ध्यान तंत्र को शब्दार्थ आवश्यकता और शब्द पुनर्क्रमण दंड दोनों के बारे में स्रोत शब्दों में भाग लेने में सक्षम बनाते हैं। चीनी-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि दृष्टिकोण शब्द संरेखण गुणवत्ता में सुधार कर सकते हैं और बड़े मार्जिन से बुनियादी ध्यान-आधारित एनएमटी पर महत्वपूर्ण अनुवाद सुधार प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। समान कॉर्पोरेट पर पिछले कार्यों की तुलना में, हमारी प्रणाली अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагаются три модели искажений для явного включения знания о переупорядочении слов в основанный на внимании нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) для дальнейшего улучшения производительности перевода. Наши предлагаемые модели позволяют механизму внимания обращать внимание на исходные слова, касающиеся как семантического требования, так и штрафа за изменение порядка слов. Эксперименты по китайско-английскому переводу показывают, что эти подходы могут улучшить качество выравнивания слов и достичь значительных улучшений перевода по сравнению с базовой НМТ, основанной на внимании, с большими полями. По сравнению с предыдущими работами над идентичными корпусами, наша система достигает самых современных показателей качества перевода.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo trí mhúnla saobhadh chun an t-eolas athordaithe focal a ionchorprú go sainráite in Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-bhunaithe (NMT) chun feidhmíocht aistriúcháin a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Cumasaíonn ár múnlaí molta meicníocht aird chun freastal ar na focail fhoinse maidir leis an riachtanas shéimeantach agus an pionós athordú focal. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar aistriúchán Sínis-Béarla gur féidir leis na cineálacha cur chuige feabhas a chur ar cháilíocht ailíniú focal agus feabhsuithe suntasacha san aistriúchán a bhaint amach thar NMT bunúsach atá bunaithe ar aird le corrlaigh mhóra. I gcomparáid le saothair roimhe seo ar chorpora comhionann, baineann ár gcóras an fheidhmíocht úrscothach amach maidir le cáilíocht aistriúcháin.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány három torzítási modellt javasol, amelyek kifejezetten beépítik a tudás átrendezése szót a figyelem-alapú Neural Machine Translation (NMT) számára a fordítási teljesítmény további javítása érdekében. Javasolt modelleink lehetővé teszik a figyelem mechanizmusát a forrásszavak figyelembevételére mind a szemantikai követelmény, mind a szó átrendezési büntetése tekintetében. A kínai-angol fordítással kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a megközelítések nagy margókkal javíthatják a szóigazítás minőségét és jelentős fordítási javulást érhetnek el egy alapvető figyelem-alapú NMT-vel szemben. Az azonos kormányokon végzett korábbi munkákkal összehasonlítva rendszerünk a fordítási minőség legkorszerűbb teljesítményét éri el.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი სამი მოდელს გახსნა, რომ სიტყვის გახსნა განსხვავება ცნობილებების განსხვავებას ახალგაზრდებული ნეიროლური მაქინის განსხვავებას (NMT) სხვადასხვა განსხვავება. ჩვენი მოდელები მოხმარებული მოდელების შესაძლებელია მოხმარების მექანიზმის შესახებ გამოყენების სიტყვების შესახებ და სიტყვების შესახებ შესახებ. ჩინეთიურ ანგლისური განსაგულისხმების გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ მიღებები შეუძლიათ სიტყვების განსაგულისხმების კანოლიტურება და გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი განსაგულისხმებ შემდგომარებული წინა სამუშაო იდენტიკალური კორპორაზე, ჩვენი სისტემა მიიღება სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει τρία μοντέλα παραμόρφωσης για να ενσωματώσει ρητά τη γνώση αναδιατάστασης λέξεων στη βασισμένη στην προσοχή Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT) για περαιτέρω βελτίωση της μεταφραστικής απόδοσης. Τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα μας επιτρέπουν στον μηχανισμό προσοχής να προσέχει τις λέξεις προέλευσης τόσο όσον αφορά τη σημασιολογική απαίτηση όσο και τη λέξη ποινή αναδιάταξης. Τα πειράματα σχετικά με την κινεζική-αγγλική μετάφραση δείχνουν ότι οι προσεγγίσεις μπορούν να βελτιώσουν την ποιότητα ευθυγράμμισης λέξεων και να επιτύχουν σημαντικές βελτιώσεις μετάφρασης σε σχέση με μια βασική βασισμένη στην προσοχή NMT με μεγάλα περιθώρια. Σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενα έργα σε πανομοιότυπα σώματα, το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση στην ποιότητα της μετάφρασης.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone tre modelli di distorsione per incorporare esplicitamente la parola reorder knowledge nella Neural Machine Translation (NMT) basata sull'attenzione per migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni di traduzione. I nostri modelli proposti consentono un meccanismo di attenzione per prestare attenzione alle parole di origine riguardanti sia il requisito semantico che la sanzione di riordino della parola. Esperimenti sulla traduzione cinese-inglese mostrano che gli approcci possono migliorare la qualità dell'allineamento delle parole e ottenere significativi miglioramenti della traduzione rispetto a un NMT basato sull'attenzione di base con ampi margini. Rispetto ai lavori precedenti su corpi identici, il nostro sistema raggiunge le prestazioni all'avanguardia in termini di qualità della traduzione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomi trys iškraipymo modeliai, kuriais aiškiai įtraukiamas žodis žinių pertvarkymas į dėmesiu pagrįstą neurologinį mašinų vertimą (NMT), siekiant toliau gerinti vertimo rezultatus. Mūsų pasiūlyti modeliai leidžia dėmesio mechanizmui atsižvelgti į pradinius žodžius, susijusius su semantiniu reikalavimu ir žodžiu sankcijos pertvarkymu. Kinijos ir anglų vertimo eksperimentai rodo, kad metodai gali pagerinti žodžių suderinimo kokybę ir pasiekti reikšmingų vertimo patobulinimų, palyginti su pagrindiniu dėmesiu grindžiamu NMT dideliais maržais. Palyginti su ankstesniais darbais, susijusiais su identiška korpora, mūsų sistema pasiekia pažangiausius vertimo kokybės rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Овој документ предложува три модели на distorsion за експлицитно вклучување на зборот реорганизирање на знаењето во внимание-базирана Неурална машинска транслекција (НМТ) за понатамошно подобрување на преведувањето. Нашите предложени модели овозможуваат механизам на внимание да присуствува на изворните зборови во врска со семантичните барања и зборот реорганизирање на казната. Експериментите на кинеско-англискиот превод покажуваат дека пристапите можат да го подобрат квалитетот на појачување на зборовите и да постигнат значителни подобрувања на преводот во однос на основното внимание базирано на НМТ со големи Во споредба со претходните дела за идентична корпора, нашиот систем постигнува најдобра изведба во квалитетот на превод.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз білімді қайта түрлендіру үшін үш бөлшектеу үлгісін таңдайды. Бұл сөзді білімді қайта түрлендіру тізіміне қайта түрлендіру тізіміне (NMT) негіздеген нейралық Біздің келтірілген үлгілеріміз семантикалық қажет пен сөздерді қайта реттеу үшін көзінің сөздеріне қатынау механизмін мүмкіндік береді. Қытай- ағылшын аудармасының тәжірибелері сөздердің түрлендіру сапасын жақсартып, негізгі назардағы NMT негізгі түрлендіру арқылы үлкен шектері арқылы үлкен аудармасын Бір-бір корпора жұмысының алдыңғы жұмысын салыстырып, жүйеміз аудармалардың сапасының күй- жайындағы жұмысын жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'This paper proposes three distortion models to explicitly incorporate the word reordering knowledge into attention-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) for further improving translation performance.  Model kami yang diusulkan memungkinkan mekanisme perhatian untuk menghadiri perkataan sumber mengenai keperluan semantik dan perkataan mengulangi hukuman. Eksperimen pada terjemahan Bahasa Cina-Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan boleh meningkatkan kualiti penyesuaian perkataan dan mencapai peningkatan terjemahan yang signifikan melalui NMT berdasarkan perhatian asas dengan margin besar. Berbanding dengan kerja sebelumnya pada korpra yang sama, sistem kita mencapai prestasi terbaik pada kualiti terjemahan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മൂന്നു ദുര്\u200dമാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരി നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക് ആവശ്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും വാക്ക് വീണ്ടും ശ ചൈനീസ്- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിശോധന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാന്യമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിനുകള മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ഒരേപോലെ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയില്\u200d നിന്നും തുല്യമായിട്ടുണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi tliet mudelli ta’ distorsjoni biex jinkorporaw b’mod espliċitu l-kelma li torganizza mill-ġdid l-għarfien fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT) ibbażata fuq l-attenzjoni biex titjieb aktar il-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni. Il-mudelli proposti tagħna jippermettu li l-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni jattendi l-kliem oriġinali kemm fir-rigward tar-rekwiżit semantiku kif ukoll fil-każ tar-riorganizzazzjoni tal-penali. L-esperimenti dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniż-Ingliż juru li l-approċċi jistgħu jtejbu l-kwalità tal-allinjament tal-kliem u jiksbu titjib sinifikanti fit-traduzzjoni fuq NMT bażiku bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni b’marġini kbar. Meta mqabbel max-xogħlijiet preċedenti dwar korpura identika, is-sistema tagħna tikseb l-aqwa prestazzjoni dwar il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдлэгийг дахин сайжруулахын тулд дахин сайжруулахын тулд 3 давхар загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний санал өгсөн загварууд нь анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм нь семантийн шаардлага болон шаардлагатай үг хоёулаа эх үүсвэртэй үг рүү орох боломжтой. Хятад-Англи хэлний орчуулалтын туршилтын туршилт нь хэлний хэмжээсүүдийг сайжруулж, үндсэн анхаарлын төвөгтэй NMT дээр их хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглаж чадна. Өмнөх үйл ажиллагаатай адилхан корпора дээр харьцуулахад бидний систем орчуулах чадварын тухай урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår tre forstørringsmodular for å eksplisisk inkludere ordet som rekorderer kunnskapen til merksomsetjing basert på nøyralmaskina- omsetjing (NMT) for å forbetra utviklinga av omsetjing. Våre foreslåde modeller kan aktivere oppmerksmekanismen for å delta på kjeldeord med både semantiske krev og ordet som rekorderer straff. Eksperimentane på kinesisk-engelsk omsetjingar viser at tilnærmingane kan forbetra kvalitet for ordjustering og nå signifikante forbedringar av omsetjingar over ein grunnleggjande oppmerksomsetjingsbasert NMT med store marginar. Sammenlignet med førre arbeid på identiske korpora, oppnår systemet vårt tilstand til kunsten på omsetjingskvalitet.', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano trzy modele zniekształceń, aby wyraźnie włączyć wiedzę o zmianie porządku słowa do tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na uwadze (NMT) w celu dalszej poprawy wydajności tłumaczenia. Proponowane przez nas modele umożliwiają mechanizmowi uwagi uwzględnienie słów źródłowych dotyczących zarówno wymogu semantycznego, jak i słowa sankcji reorganizacyjnej. Eksperymenty z tłumaczeniem chińsko-angielskim pokazują, że podejścia te mogą poprawić jakość wyrównywania słów i osiągnąć znaczną poprawę tłumaczenia w stosunku do podstawowego NMT opartego na uwadze o duże marginesy. W porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami na identycznych korporach nasz system osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność w zakresie jakości tłumaczeń.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune trei modele de distorsiune pentru a încorpora explicit cuvântul reordonarea cunoștințelor în traducerea automată neurală bazată pe atenție (NMT) pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare performanța traducerii. Modelele noastre propuse permit mecanismului de atenție pentru a participa la cuvintele sursă atât în ceea ce privește cerința semantică, cât și pedeapsa de reordonare a cuvântului. Experimentele privind traducerea chineză-engleză arată că abordările pot îmbunătăți calitatea alinierii cuvintelor și pot obține îmbunătățiri semnificative de traducere față de un NMT bazat pe atenție, cu margini mari. În comparație cu lucrările anterioare pe corpore identice, sistemul nostru atinge performanțele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește calitatea traducerii.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže tri modela iskrivljenja da se pojasno uključuje reč reorderiranja znanja u neurološki prevod (NMT) na pažnju za daljnje poboljšanje provedbe prevoda. Naši predloženi modeli omogućavaju mehanizam pažnje da prisustvuju izvornim rečima u vezi semantičkog zahteva i reči o reordinaciji kazne. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da pristupi mogu poboljšati kvalitet poravnanja riječi i ostvariti značajne poboljšanje prevoda na osnovnoj pažnji baziranoj na NMT na velikim maržama. U usporedbi sa prethodnim radovima o identičnoj korpori, naš sistem postiže stanje umjetnosti na kvaliteti prevođenja.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්ත තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා විශේෂයෙන් වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් අවධානය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය වචන වචන වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සමහර විද චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් වැඩ කරන්න සහ විශේෂ අ අපේ පද්ධතිය අනුවෙන් කොර්පෝරා ගැන පිරිමි වැඩ සමඟ, අපේ පද්ධතිය අවාර්ථ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවට අවස', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa saddex model oo qalloocan si bayaan ah ugu qora hadalka oo lagu soo dirayo aqoonta oo lagu soo wareejiyo tarjumidda maskinenka neural (NMT) si uu u sii kordhiyo fasaxa turjumaadda. Tusaalooyinkayada la soo jeeday waxay awoodaan in uu soo jeedo meymisyo ku saabsan hadalka asalka ah ee ku saabsan baahida semantiga iyo erayga ciqaabta dib u soo celinta. Experiments on Chinese-English translation show that the approaches can improve word alignment quality and achieve significant translation improvements over a basic attention-based NMT by large margins.  Isbarbardhigtii shaqada hore oo ku saabsan shirkadda isku mid ah, nidaamkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa bandhigyada farshaxanka oo ku saabsan takhasuska turjumista.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår tre distorsionsmodeller för att uttryckligen införliva ordet omordning kunskap i uppmärksamhetsbaserad Neural Machine Translation (NMT) för att ytterligare förbättra översättningens prestanda. Våra föreslagna modeller gör det möjligt för uppmärksamhetsmekanismen att ta hand om källord avseende både det semantiska kravet och ordet omordning straff. Experiment på kinesisk-engelsk översättning visar att tillvägagångssättet kan förbättra ordjusteringskvaliteten och uppnå betydande översättningsförbättringar jämfört med en grundläggande uppmärksamhetsbaserad NMT med stora marginaler. Jämfört med tidigare verk på identiska korpora uppnår vårt system den senaste prestandan när det gäller översättningskvalitet.', 'ur': 'This paper proposes three distortion models to explicitly incorporate the word reordering knowledge into attention-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) for further improvement of translation performance. ہمارے مقرر کردہ موڈلے موجودات کی توجه کے مکانیزم کو روشن کلمات کی حفاظت کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں جن کے معاملہ میں اور ان کلمات کو دوبارہ سزا دینے کے لئے۔ چینی-انگلیسی ترجمہ کے متعلق تجربے دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ تقریباً کلمات ترجمہ کے کیفیت کو بہتر کر سکتے ہیں اور ایک بنیادی توجه کے ذریعہ NMT کے ذریعہ بڑے ترجمہ کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرسکتے ہیں. پہلے کے کاموں کے مقابلہ میں ایک ہی کورپورا ہے، ہماری سیسٹم نے ترجمہ کیفیت کے ذریعے ترجمہ کی حالت کا فعالیت پہنچایا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் மூன்று குழப்பம் மாதிரிகளை வெளிப்படையாக உள்ளிட வார்த்தையை மீண்டும் கவனத்தில் செலுத்தும் பொறியை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ம Our proposed models enable attention mechanism to attend to source words regarding both the semantic requirement and the word reordering penalty.  Name முந்தைய செயல்களை ஒப்பிட்டு ஒப்பிட்டால், எங்கள் கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் மூலம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டின்', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz uchta harakat modellarini yaxshi ko'proq tarjima qilish uchun so'zlarni tahrirlash mumkin. Bizning taʼminlovchi modellarimiz esa semantik talabati va qayta tartib qilish soʻzlari haqida ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatini foydalanadi. Name Oldingi vazifalar bilan birlashtirilgan birinchi vazifalar, bizning tizimmiz tarjima sifatida saqlash holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất ba mô hình sự bóp méo để hiển thị thêm sự sắp xếp kiến thức trong Dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) để tăng hiệu suất dịch. Các mô hình đề nghị của chúng tôi cho phép cơ chế tập trung để nghe những từ ngữ về các yêu cầu ngữ pháp và từ "phạt thay đổi luật". Thí nghiệm dịch tiếng Trung-Anh cho thấy các phương pháp có thể cải thiện chất lượng sắp xếp từ và đạt tới một cải tiến đáng kể hơn một công ty NMT dựa trên tập trung căn bản với một khoảng cách lớn. So với những tác phẩm khác nhau về Hạ sĩ, hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tối tân về chất lượng dịch.', 'nl': 'Deze paper stelt drie vervormingsmodellen voor om het woord reordening kennis expliciet op te nemen in aandachtsgebonden Neural Machine Translation (NMT) om de vertaalprestaties verder te verbeteren. Onze voorgestelde modellen maken het mogelijk om aandacht te besteden aan bronwoorden met betrekking tot zowel de semantische eis als het woord reordering penalty. Experimenten met Chinees-Engels vertaling tonen aan dat de benaderingen de kwaliteit van woorduitlijning kunnen verbeteren en significante vertaalverbeteringen ten opzichte van een basisaandachtsgebonden NMT met grote marges kunnen bereiken. Vergeleken met eerdere werken op identieke corpora, bereikt ons systeem de state-of-the-art prestaties op het gebied van vertaalkwaliteit.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предлага три модела на изкривяване, които изрично включват знанията за пренареждане на думата в базирания на вниманието неврален машинен превод (НМТ) за по-нататъшно подобряване на ефективността на превода. Нашите предложения модели позволяват механизъм на внимание да се обърне внимание на изходните думи както по отношение на семантичното изискване, така и на думата наказание за пренареждане. Експериментите с китайско-английски превод показват, че подходите могат да подобрят качеството на подравняване на думите и да постигнат значителни подобрения в превода в сравнение с основно внимание базирана НМТ с големи граници. В сравнение с предишни работи върху идентични корпуси, нашата система постига най-съвременните резултати в качеството на превода.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår tre forvrængningsmodeller for eksplicit at indarbejde ordet omorrangering viden i opmærksomhedsbaseret Neural Machine Translation (NMT) for yderligere at forbedre oversættelsesevnen. Vores foreslåede modeller gør det muligt for opmærksomhedsmekanisme at tage sig af kildeord vedrørende både det semantiske krav og ordet omorrangering straf. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-engelsk oversættelse viser, at tilgangene kan forbedre ordjusteringskvaliteten og opnå betydelige oversættelsesforbedringer i forhold til en grundlæggende opmærksomhedsbaseret NMT med store marginer. Sammenlignet med tidligere værker på identiske corpora opnår vores system den nyeste ydeevne på oversættelseskvalitet.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže tri modela iskrivljenja da se pojasno uključuje riječ o reorderiranju znanja u prijevoz neuroloških strojeva (NMT) na pažnju za daljnje poboljšanje učinka prevođenja. Naši predloženi modeli omogućavaju mehanizam pažnje da prisustvuju izvornim riječima u vezi semantičkog zahtjeva i riječi o reorderingu kazne. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuju da pristupi mogu poboljšati kvalitet poravnanja riječi i ostvariti značajne poboljšanje prevoda na osnovnoj pažnji baziranoj na NMT-u na velikim marginama. U usporedbi s prethodnim radovima o identičnoj korpori, naš sustav postiže državno-umjetnički učinkoviti o kvaliteti prevoda.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan tiga model distorsi untuk secara eksplicit memasukkan kata reorganisasi pengetahuan ke dalam perhatian-berdasarkan Translation Neural Machine (NMT) untuk meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan lebih lanjut. Model kami yang diusulkan memungkinkan mekanisme perhatian untuk menghadiri kata-kata sumber mengenai both semantic requirement and the word reordering penalty. Eksperimen pada terjemahan bahasa Cina-Inggris menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan dapat meningkatkan kualitas penyesuaian kata dan mencapai peningkatan terjemahan yang signifikan melalui NMT berdasarkan perhatian dasar dengan margin besar. dibandingkan dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya pada korpra yang sama, sistem kita mencapai prestasi terbaik pada kualitas terjemahan.', 'ko': '번역 성능을 한층 높이기 위해 본고는 세 가지 오류 모델을 제시하고 단어 재배열 지식을 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경기계번역(NMT)에 명확하게 포함시켰다.우리가 제시한 모델은 주의 메커니즘으로 하여금 원어의 의미 수요와 단어의 재정렬 징벌에 주목할 수 있게 한다.한영 번역에 대한 실험은 주의를 바탕으로 하는 기본 NMT에 비해 이러한 방법은 단어의 정렬 품질을 크게 향상시키고 현저한 번역 개선을 실현할 수 있음을 나타냈다.이전에 같은 어료 라이브러리에서 일했던 것과 비교하면 우리의 시스템은 번역의 질에 있어서 가장 선진적인 수준에 이르렀다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapendekeza mifano mitatu ya kuchochea kwa uwazi kuingiza neno linaloamrisha upya maarifa katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) kwa ajili ya kuboresha ufanisi wa tafsiri zaidi. Miundo yetu ya pendekezo inawezesha mfumo wa kusikiliza na maneno yanayohusu mahitaji ya kimapenzi na neno la kuamuru adhabu ya upya. Majaribio kuhusu tafsiri ya Kiingereza yanaonyesha kuwa hatua hizi zinaweza kuboresha kiwango cha uangalizi wa maneno na kupata maboresho muhimu ya tafsiri juu ya NMT yenye msingi wa ufuatiliaji na viwanja vikubwa. Kulinganishwa na kazi zilizopita kwenye kampuni hiyo hiyo, mfumo wetu unafanikiwa kufanya kazi ya sanaa kwa kiwango cha tafsiri.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel drie verstrekkingsmodele om die woord herordening van kennis in aandag gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) te inkluit vir verdere verbetering van vertaling. Ons voorgestelde modele aktiveer aandag mekanisme om aan bronkode woorde te bied aangaande beide die semantiese verwagting en die woord herordening van straf. Eksperimente op Sjinese-Engelse vertaling vertoon dat die toegange van woord-belyning kwaliteit kan verbeter en betekende vertaling verbeteringe kan bereik oor 'n basiese aandag-gebaseerde NMT deur groot marge. Vergelyk met vorige werke op identiese korpora, ons stelsel bereik die state-of-the-art prestasie op vertalingskwaliteit.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon tre modele shtrembërimi për të përfshirë shprehësisht fjalën e riorganizimit të njohurive në përkthimin e makinave neuronale të bazuar në vëmendje (NMT) për përmirësim të mëtejshëm të performancës së përkthimit. Our proposed models enable attention mechanism to attend to source words regarding both the semantic requirement and the word reordering penalty.  Eksperimentet në përkthimin kinez-anglez tregojnë se qasjet mund të përmirësojnë cilësinë e përshtatjes së fjalëve dhe të arrijnë përmirësime të rëndësishme të përkthimit lidhur me një NMT bazuar në vëmendje me margine të mëdha. Në krahasim me punët e mëparshme mbi korprën identike, sistemi ynë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në cilësinë e përkthimit.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz üç sany gaýtalandyrma nusgasyny üns beren nusgasyny täze bir şekilde üýtgetmek üçin teklip edýär. Biziň teklip eden nusgalarymyz hem semantik gerekli we sözlerimizi täzeden azat etmek üçin mekanizmany etmäge mümkin edýär. Çinçe-Iňlisçe terjime edilen örän barlaglar söz gabdalyklygyny gowlaşdyryp biler we esasy terjime edilen NMT-a örän üns daşarylygyny uly gabdalyklaryň üstine ýeterleşip biler. Birnäçe korpora bilen öňki işlerimize görä, biziň sistemamyz terjime etmegiň howpsuzlygyna mümkin edip bilýär.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ሦስት የጥላቻ ዓይነቶች ለትርጉም ትርጓሜዎችን ለማሻሻል ቃላትን በማስታወቂያ የኔural machine ትርጉም (NMT) በማስተካከል ግልጽን ለመግለጥ ያሳያል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴላዎቻችን የዓይነት አካባቢ ቃሎችን የsemantic ፈቃድ እና የቃሎችን መሥዋዕት ማቅረብ ማቅረብ እንዲችሉ ያስችላል፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ላይ የተፈተና ፈተናዎች የቃላትን ማቀናቀል እና በመጠቀም ትርጓሜ በመጠቀም የNMT በመጠቀም በኩል ትርጉም ማድረግ እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡ ከቀድሞው ስራ በተደረገ፣ ስርዓታችን በተርጓሚው ጥሩ ላይ የ-የ-የ-art ድጋፍ እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին առաջարկում է երեք շեղումների մոդել, որպեսզի բառը, որը վերադասավորում է գիտելիքը ուշադրության վրա հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) բառը, առավել բարելավելու համար: Մեր առաջարկված մոդելները հնարավորություն են տալիս ուշադրության մեխանիզմի օգնությամբ զբաղվել սեմանտիկ պահանջների և պատիժի վերադասավորման մասին: Չինաստանի-անգլերենի թարգմանման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մոտեցումները կարող են բարելավել բառերի համապատասխանման որակը և հասնել նշանակալի բարելավումներին թարգմանման հիմնական ուշադրության հիմնական NMT-ի միջոցով մե Համեմատելով նախորդ աշխատանքների հետ, մեր համակարգը հասնում է թարգմանության որակի ամենաբարձր ներկայացումներին:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি তিনটি বিভ্রান্ত মডেল প্রস্তাব করেছে যাতে স্পষ্ট ভাবে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের অনুবাদের উন্নতি করার জন্য জ্ঞা আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল মনোযোগ প্রদান করতে পারে সোর্সের শব্দগুলোর সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে এবং পুনরায় নির্দেশ দেয়া শব্দে চীনা-ইংরেজি অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই প্রযুক্তিগুলো শব্দের মান উন্নতি করতে পারে এবং বিশাল মার্গিন দ্বারা মৌলিক মনোযোগের Compared with previous works on identical corpora, our system achieves the state-of-the-art performance on translation quality.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt üç fərqli modeli təklif edir ki, bilgi yenidən dəyişdirmək üçün nöral maşın çevirimi (NMT) ilə daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün nöral maşını təhrif etmək üçün sözü açıq-aydın bir yerə daxil etmək üçün. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz semantik şartları və sözlərimizi yenidən cəzalandırmaq haqqında mənbə sözlərinə istifadə etmək üçün gözləmə mehanizmisini fəallaşdırır. Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi barəsindəki təcrübələr sözlərin düzəltməsi kalitetini daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər və böyük qədərlərlə, temel ünvanlı NMT üstündə möhkəm çevirim düzəltmələrini başa çatdıra bilər. Əvvəlki işlərlə eyni korpora ilə qarşılaşdığımız, sistemimiz tərcüm keyfiyyəti haqqında tərcüm göstərilməsi mümkündür.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže tri modela iskrivljenja da se pojasno uključuje riječ o reorderiranju znanja u prijevoz neuroloških strojeva (NMT) na pažnju za daljnje poboljšanje učinka prevođenja. Naši predloženi modeli omogućavaju mehanizam pažnje da prisustvuju izvornim riječima u vezi semantičkog zahtjeva i riječi o reordinaciji kazne. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuju da pristupi mogu poboljšati kvalitet usklađenja riječi i ostvariti značajne poboljšanje prevoda na osnovnoj pažnji baziranoj na NMT-u na velikim maržama. U usporedbi sa prethodnim radovima o identičnom korporaciji, naš sistem postiže državni izvod umjetnosti na kvaliteti prevođenja.', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon tres models de distorsió per incorporar explícitament la paraula reorganitzant el coneixement en la traducció neuronal de màquines basada en l'atenció (NMT) per millorar més el rendiment de la traducció. Els nostres models proposats permeten al mecanisme d'atenció atendre a les paraules d'origen en relació tant al requisit semàntic com a la paraula de reordenar la pena. Els experiments de traducció xinesa-anglesa mostran que els enfocaments poden millorar la qualitat de l'alliniament de paraules i aconseguir millores significatives de traducció sobre un NMT basat en atenció bàsica en grans marges. Comparat amb treballs anteriors sobre corpores idèntics, el nostre sistema aconsegueix la qualitat de traducció més avançada.", 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje tři modely zkreslení, které explicitně začlení znalostí slova reorganizace do pozornosti založeného na neuronovém strojovém překladu (NMT) pro další zlepšení výkonu překladu. Naše navržené modely umožňují mechanismus pozornosti věnovat se zdrojovým slovům jak sémantickému požadavku, tak slovnímu reřazení penalty. Experimenty s čínsko-anglickým překladem ukazují, že tyto přístupy mohou zlepšit kvalitu zarovnání slov a dosáhnout významných zlepšení překladu oproti základnímu NMT založenému na pozornosti s velkými okraji. Ve srovnání s předchozími pracemi na identických korpusech dosahuje náš systém nejmodernějšího výkonu v oblasti kvality překladu.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan kolmea vääristymämallia, joiden avulla sana uudelleenjärjestely voidaan nimenomaisesti sisällyttää huomiopohjaiseen neurokonekäännökseen (NMT) käännöksen suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Ehdotetut mallit mahdollistavat huomiomekanismin lähtösanojen huomioimiseksi sekä semanttisen vaatimuksen että sanasanktion uudelleenjärjestelyn osalta. Kiinan ja englannin käännöskokeissa tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistavat voivat parantaa sanalinjauksen laatua ja saavuttaa merkittäviä käännöksiä perusasiaan perustuvassa NMT:ssä suurilla marginaaleilla. Verrattuna aikaisempiin identtisten korpusten teoksiin järjestelmämme saavuttaa huipputason käännöslaadun suhteen.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja kolm moonutusmudelit, et sõna ümberkorraldamise teadmisi sõnaselgelt lisada tähelepanupõhisesse neuromasintõlkesse (NMT), et tõlketõhusust veelgi parandada. Meie väljapakutud mudelid võimaldavad tähelepanumehhanismil pöörata tähelepanu lähtesõnadele nii semantilise nõude kui ka sõna ümberkorraldamise karistuse osas. Hiina-inglise keele tõlke eksperimendid näitavad, et lähenemisviisid võivad parandada sõnade joondamise kvaliteeti ja saavutada olulisi tõlkepõhiseid parandusi põhilise tähelepanu alusel põhineva NMT-ga. Võrreldes varasemate töödega identsete korpustega saavutab meie süsteem tõlkekvaliteedi osas tipptasemel jõudluse.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag werden drei Verzerrungsmodelle vorgeschlagen, um das Wort Reordering Knowledge explizit in die aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Neural Machine Translation (NMT) zu integrieren, um die Übersetzungsleistung weiter zu verbessern. Unsere vorgeschlagenen Modelle ermöglichen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen, Quellwörter sowohl hinsichtlich der semantischen Anforderung als auch des Wortes Reordering Penalty zu berücksichtigen. Experimente zur Chinesisch-Englischen Übersetzung zeigen, dass die Ansätze die Qualität der Wortausrichtung verbessern und signifikante Übersetzungsverbesserungen gegenüber einer grundlegenden aufmerksamkeitsbasierten NMT mit großen Margen erzielen können. Im Vergleich zu früheren Arbeiten auf identischen Korpora erreicht unser System die State-of-the-Art-Performance bei der Übersetzungsqualität.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سه مدل تغییرات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند تا کلمه تغییر\u200cاندازی علم را به ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای عصبی (NMT) بر روی توجه بیشتری بهتر ترجمه کند. مدلهای پیشنهاد ما مکانیسم توجه را برای رسیدن به کلمات منبع در مورد نیازهای semantic و کلمات تغییر مجازات توان می دهد. تجربه\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهند که دسترسی\u200cها می\u200cتوانند کیفیت ترجمه\u200cی کلمات را بهتر کنند و بهترین ترجمه\u200cهای مهم بر روی یک NMT بنیادی توجه با مرزهای بزرگ به دست آورد. در مقایسه با کارهای قبلی در شرکت یکسان، سیستم ما به انجام وضعیت هنری در کیفیت ترجمه رسیده است.', 'jv': 'Awak iki supoyo sistem tanggal karo model sing dibutungan kanggo ingkang ngerasai pawaran ingkang mulasai ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang butek nggambar kelas telu maneh (NMT). Awak dhéwé sistem sing beraksi perbudhakan kanggo dianggap pawaran kelas kuwi tindakan semantar lan kelas kuwi wis nguasai winih. Isopo sing berarti kanggo tarjamahan Pinita-Inggris menehi wong kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerapakan kuwi nggawe geraraning bantuan kanggo nyebute nggawe barang sampek kang NMT sing sampek akeh bantuan. Sampeyan karo coro sing dumadhi nganggo coro-dumadhi, sistem kita iso nggawe barang kelas-karo perusahaan kanggo kaliwat itoleh.', 'ha': "This paper proposes three distortion models to explicitly incorporate the word reordering knowledge into attention-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) for further improving translation performance.  TayiyinMu da aka buƙata, za'a iya amfani da alama masu bincike zuwa ga maganar ƙarami masu hususann da buƙata na semanti da cire re-ordana. Tajararin a kan fassarar-Kiyãki-Ingiriya na nuna cewa hanyarsu kan improve tsarin faɗa da kuma su sami masu muhimmi wa fassarar fassarar da aka bincike na NMT da duk margin babba. @ info: status", 'sk': 'V prispevku so predlagani trije modeli popačenja, ki izrecno vključujejo znanje o preurejanju besed v pozornosti temelječe nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT) za nadaljnje izboljšanje učinkovitosti prevajanja. Naši predlagani modeli omogočajo mehanizem pozornosti, da se upošteva izvorne besede tako glede semantične zahteve kot kazni za preurejanje besed. Eksperimenti s kitajsko-angleškim prevajanjem kažejo, da lahko pristopi izboljšajo kakovost usklajevanja besed in dosežejo znatne izboljšave prevajanja v okviru osnovne pozornosti temelječe NMT z velikimi robovi. V primerjavi s prejšnjimi deli na enakih korpusih naš sistem dosega najsodobnejše delovanje na področju kakovosti prevajanja.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה שלושה דוגמנים של עיווי כדי להכניס באופן ברור את המילה שיפוך ידע לתרגום מכונות נוירואליות (NMT) מבוסס על תשומת לב כדי לשפר את ההפעלה של התרגום. הדוגמנים המוצעים שלנו מאפשרים מנגנון תשומת לב להשתתף במילים המקוריות בנוגע גם לדרישות הסמנטיות והמילה לארגן מחדש עונש. ניסויים על התרגום סיני-אנגלי מראים שהגישות יכולות לשפר את איכות התאמת מילים ולהשיג שיפורים משמעותיים בתרגום על NMT בסיסי על ידי שווים גדולים. בהשוואה לעבודות קודמות על גופה זהה, המערכת שלנו משיגה את ההופעה המאודמת באיכות התרגום.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོའི་མིག རྒྱ་ནག་དང་ཨིན་ཇིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་བརྗོད་སྐོར་གྱི་Experience་དུ་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་ན་དང་། approaches་ཚིག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཀྱང་མཐོ་རིམ དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་གཅིག་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་མཉམ་ལས་འགྲེལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Combating Human Trafficking with Multimodal Deep Models', 'fr': 'Lutter contre la traite des êtres humains grâce à des modèles profonds', 'ar': 'مكافحة الاتجار بالبشر باستخدام النماذج العميقة المتعددة الوسائط', 'es': 'Lucha contra la trata de personas con modelos profundos multimodales', 'pt': 'Combate ao tráfico de pessoas com modelos profundos multimodais', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルディープモデルによる人身売買対策', 'zh': '用多模样深模打人贩运', 'hi': 'बहुआयामी गहरे मॉडल के साथ मानव तस्करी का मुकाबला', 'ru': 'Борьба с торговлей людьми с помощью мультимодальных глубоководных моделей', 'ga': 'Gáinneáil ar Dhaonna a Chomhrac le Múnlaí Ilmhódacha doimhne', 'ka': 'ადამიანის ტრაფიკაციის შემდეგ მრავალური დიდი მოდელთან შემდეგ', 'el': 'Καταπολέμηση της εμπορίας ανθρώπων με πολυμodale βαθιά μοντέλα', 'hu': 'Az emberkereskedelem elleni küzdelem multimodális mélymodellekkel', 'it': 'Lotta alla tratta di esseri umani con modelli multimodali profondi', 'lt': 'Kova su prekyba žmonėmis įvairiarūšio giliais modeliais', 'kk': 'КөпModal түпнұсқа үлгілерімен адамдардың трафикациясын құру', 'mk': 'Борба против трговијата со луѓе со мултимодилни длабоки модели', 'ms': 'Berjuang Penghantaran Manusia dengan Model Dalam Multimodal', 'mt': 'Il-ġlieda kontra t-traffikar tal-bnedmin ma’ Mudelli Multimodali Profondi', 'ml': 'Multimodal Deep Models കൊണ്ട് മനുഷ്യന്\u200d ട്രാഫിക്കിങ്ങ് പോരാടുന്നു', 'pl': 'Zwalczanie handlu ludźmi za pomocą multimodalnych modeli głębokich', 'ro': 'Combaterea traficului de persoane cu modele profunde multimodale', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний салбарт олон хэмжээний гүн загвартай тэмцэх', 'no': 'Kombinerer menneske trafikk med fleire modal dyppamodeller', 'sr': 'Borba protiv trgovine ljudima sa multimodalnim dubokim modelima', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් මොඩේල් එක්ක සටන් කරන්න', 'so': 'Combating Human Trafficking with Multimodal Deep Models', 'sv': 'Kampen mot människohandel med multimodala djupmodeller', 'ta': 'Combating Human Trafficking with Multimodal Deep Models', 'ur': 'انسان کی ترافیکس کی جہاد Multimodal Deep Models کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đối phó buôn người với các mô hình đa phương mạng,', 'bg': 'Борба с трафика на хора с мултимодални дълбоки модели', 'da': 'Bekæmpelse af menneskehandel med multimodale dybe modeller', 'nl': 'Bestrijding van mensenhandel met multimodale diepe modellen', 'hr': 'Borba protiv trgovine ljudima s multimodalnim dubokim modelima', 'de': 'Bekämpfung des Menschenhandels mit multimodalen Tiefbaumodellen', 'id': 'Berjuang Trafikasi Manusia dengan Model Dalam Multimodal', 'ko': '다중모드 심도 모형을 이용하여 인신매매에 타격을 주다', 'fa': 'مبارزه تجارت انسان با مدل عمیق چند مدل', 'sw': 'Kupambana na Biashara ya Binadamu na Modeli ya Kikuu', 'tr': 'Birnäçe modal derin nusgalar bilen adamlary tapylýan', 'af': 'Kom teen menslike Trafficking met Multimodale Deep Modelle', 'sq': 'Lufta kundër trafikut njerëzor me modele të thella multimodale', 'am': 'Multimodal Deep Models', 'hy': 'Մարդկային առևտուրը բազմամոդալ խորը մոդելներով պայքարելու համար', 'az': '캻nsan ticar톛ti 칞oxlu modal derin modell톛rl톛 m칲harib톛 edir', 'bn': 'মানব ট্রাফিকিং মাল্টিমোডাল গভীর মডেল দিয়ে যুদ্ধ করা', 'bs': 'Borba protiv trgovine ljudima sa multimodalnim dubokim modelima', 'ca': 'Combatir el trafic humà amb models multimodals profunds', 'cs': 'Boj proti obchodování s lidmi pomocí multimodálních hlubokých modelů', 'et': 'Inimkaubanduse vastu võitlemine mitmeliigiliste põhjalike mudelitega', 'fi': 'Ihmiskaupan torjunta multimodaalisilla syvällisillä malleilla', 'he': 'נלחם בסחר בני אדם עם מודלים עמוקים רבים', 'sk': 'Boj proti trgovini z ljudmi z multimodalnimi globokimi modeli', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngubah Batal-Ngerawat Pangan barang Multimodal deep', 'bo': 'འཐབ་རྩོད་བྲོ་བའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་བ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་འཐབ་བཞིན་པ།'}
{'en': 'Human trafficking is a global epidemic affecting millions of people across the planet. Sex trafficking, the dominant form of human trafficking, has seen a significant rise mostly due to the abundance of escort websites, where human traffickers can openly advertise among at-will escort advertisements. In this paper, we take a major step in the automatic detection of advertisements suspected to pertain to human trafficking. We present a novel dataset called Trafficking-10k, with more than 10,000 advertisements annotated for this task. The dataset contains two sources of information per advertisement : text and images. For the accurate detection of trafficking advertisements, we designed and trained a deep multimodal model called the Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'ar': 'الاتجار بالبشر وباء عالمي يصيب ملايين الأشخاص في جميع أنحاء الكوكب. شهد الاتجار بالجنس ، الشكل السائد للاتجار بالبشر ، ارتفاعًا كبيرًا يرجع في الغالب إلى وفرة مواقع المرافقة ، حيث يمكن للمتاجرين بالبشر الإعلان علنًا بين إعلانات المرافقة. في هذه الورقة ، نتخذ خطوة كبيرة في الكشف التلقائي عن الإعلانات المشتبه في صلتها بالاتجار بالبشر. نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة تسمى Tra Traffic-10k ، مع أكثر من 10000 إعلان مشروح لهذه المهمة. تحتوي مجموعة البيانات على مصدرين للمعلومات لكل إعلان: النص والصور. من أجل الكشف الدقيق عن إعلانات الاتجار ، قمنا بتصميم وتدريب نموذج عميق متعدد الوسائط يسمى الشبكة العميقة للاتجار بالبشر (HTDN).', 'es': 'La trata de personas es una epidemia mundial que afecta a millones de personas en todo el planeta. La trata sexual, la forma dominante de trata de personas, ha experimentado un aumento significativo principalmente debido a la abundancia de sitios web de acompañantes, donde los traficantes de personas pueden publicitar abiertamente entre anuncios de acompañantes a voluntad. En este documento, damos un paso importante en la detección automática de anuncios que se sospecha que pertenecen a la trata de personas. Presentamos un conjunto de datos novedoso llamado Trafficking-10k, con más de 10.000 anuncios anotados para esta tarea. El conjunto de datos contiene dos fuentes de información por anuncio: texto e imágenes. Para la detección precisa de los anuncios de trata, diseñamos y entrenamos un modelo multimodal profundo llamado Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'pt': 'O tráfico de seres humanos é uma epidemia global que afeta milhões de pessoas em todo o planeta. O tráfico sexual, a forma dominante de tráfico de pessoas, teve um aumento significativo principalmente devido à abundância de sites de acompanhantes, onde os traficantes de seres humanos podem anunciar abertamente entre anúncios de acompanhantes à vontade. Neste artigo, damos um passo importante na detecção automática de anúncios suspeitos de pertencer ao tráfico de pessoas. Apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados chamado Trafficking-10k, com mais de 10.000 anúncios anotados para esta tarefa. O conjunto de dados contém duas fontes de informação por anúncio: texto e imagens. Para a detecção precisa de anúncios de tráfico, projetamos e treinamos um modelo multimodal profundo chamado Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'fr': "La traite des êtres humains est une épidémie mondiale qui touche des millions de personnes à travers le monde. Le trafic sexuel, la forme dominante de traite des êtres humains, a connu une augmentation significative, principalement en raison de l'abondance de sites Web d'escorte, où les trafiquants d'êtres humains peuvent faire de la publicité ouvertement parmi les publicités d'escorte à volonté. Dans cet article, nous franchissons une étape importante dans la détection automatique des publicités soupçonnées d'être liées à la traite des êtres humains. Nous présentons un nouveau jeu de données appelé Trafficking-10k, avec plus de 10 000 publicités annotées pour cette tâche. L'ensemble de données contient deux sources d'informations par publicité\xa0: du texte et des images. Pour la détection précise des publicités de trafic, nous avons conçu et formé un modèle multimodal approfondi appelé Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).", 'ja': '人身売買は、地球上の何百万人もの人々に影響を与える世界的な流行です。人身売買の支配的な形態である性売買は、主にエスコートのウェブサイトが豊富であるために大幅に増加しています。ここでは、人身売買者は任意のエスコート広告の中で公然と広告を出すことができます。本稿では、人身売買に関連すると思われる広告の自動検出に大きな一歩を踏み出した。Trafficking -10 kという新しいデータセットを提示し、このタスクのために1万件以上の広告が注釈されています。データセットには、広告ごとにテキストと画像の2つの情報源が含まれています。人身売買広告を正確に検出するために、人身売買深層ネットワーク（ HTDN ）と呼ばれる深層マルチモーダルモデルを設計し、トレーニングしました。', 'zh': '口贩者,全球数百万人全球行病也。 性贩者,人贩之大体也,其要在护送网站丰,人贩子得以随意广告做广告。 本文中,自动检测涉嫌与户口贩运之要。 展Tradepoting-10k新集,有过10者,000广告注之。 据集包含每广告的两个信息源:文本和图像。 为准检人贩运广告,我们设计并训练了一种名为人口贩运深度网络(HTDN)深度多模样。', 'hi': 'मानव तस्करी एक वैश्विक महामारी है जो पूरे ग्रह पर लाखों लोगों को प्रभावित करती है। मानव तस्करी का प्रमुख रूप सेक्स ट्रैफिकिंग, ने ज्यादातर एस्कॉर्ट वेबसाइटों की बहुतायत के कारण एक महत्वपूर्ण वृद्धि देखी है, जहां मानव तस्कर खुले तौर पर एस्कॉर्ट विज्ञापनों के बीच विज्ञापन कर सकते हैं। इस पत्र में, हम मानव तस्करी से संबंधित संदिग्ध विज्ञापनों का स्वत: पता लगाने में एक बड़ा कदम उठाते हैं। हम इस कार्य के लिए 10,000 से अधिक विज्ञापनों के साथ ट्रैफिकिंग -10k नामक एक उपन्यास डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं। डेटासेट में प्रति विज्ञापन जानकारी के दो स्रोत होते हैं: पाठ और छवियां। तस्करी विज्ञापनों का सटीक पता लगाने के लिए, हमने मानव तस्करी डीप नेटवर्क (एचटीडीएन) नामक एक गहरे मल्टीमॉडल मॉडल को डिजाइन और प्रशिक्षित किया।', 'ru': 'Торговля людьми - это глобальная эпидемия, затрагивающая миллионы людей по всей планете. Торговля людьми в целях сексуальной эксплуатации, которая является доминирующей формой торговли людьми, заметно возросла, главным образом, благодаря наличию большого числа веб-сайтов сопровождения, на которых торговцы людьми могут открыто рекламировать рекламу, размещаемую в сопровождении по своей воле. В этом документе мы делаем крупный шаг в автоматическом обнаружении рекламы, предположительно связанной с торговлей людьми. Мы представляем новый набор данных под названием Trafficking-10k с более чем 10 000 рекламных объявлений, аннотированных для этой задачи. Набор данных содержит два источника информации для каждого объявления: текст и изображения. Для точного обнаружения рекламы, связанной с торговлей людьми, мы разработали и подготовили глубокую мультимодальную модель под названием &lt; &lt; Глубокая сеть по борьбе с торговлей людьми &gt; &gt; (ГСИТ).', 'ga': 'Is eipidéim dhomhanda í an gháinneáil ar dhaoine a théann i bhfeidhm ar na milliúin daoine ar fud an domhain. Tá méadú suntasach tagtha ar gháinneáil ghnéis, an cineál is mó de gháinneáil ar dhaoine, go príomha mar gheall ar an iliomad suíomhanna gréasáin tionlacain, áit ar féidir le gáinneálaithe ar dhaoine fógraíocht oscailte a dhéanamh i measc na bhfógraí tionlacain ar-thoil. Sa pháipéar seo, glacaimid céim mhór chun fógraí a bhfuil amhras fúthu a bhaineann le gáinneáil ar dhaoine a bhrath go huathoibríoch. Cuirimid tacar sonraí nua ar a dtugtar Gáinneáil-10k i láthair, agus tá níos mó ná 10,000 fógra anótáilte don tasc seo. Tá dhá fhoinse faisnéise in aghaidh an fhógra sa tacar sonraí: téacs agus íomhánna. Chun fógraí gáinneála a bhrath go beacht, dhearamar agus chuireamar oiliúint ar mhúnla domhain ilmhódúil ar a dtugtar an Líonra Doimhneachta um Gháinneáil ar Dhaoine (HTDN).', 'el': 'Η εμπορία ανθρώπων είναι μια παγκόσμια επιδημία που πλήττει εκατομμύρια ανθρώπους σε όλο τον πλανήτη. Η σεξουαλική διακίνηση, η κυρίαρχη μορφή εμπορίας ανθρώπων, έχει δει σημαντική αύξηση κυρίως λόγω της αφθονίας ιστοσελίδων συνοδών, όπου οι διακινητές ανθρώπων μπορούν να διαφημίσουν ανοιχτά μεταξύ διαφημίσεων συνοδείας κατά βούληση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, κάνουμε ένα σημαντικό βήμα στον αυτόματο εντοπισμό διαφημίσεων που είναι ύποπτες ότι σχετίζονται με εμπορία ανθρώπων. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που ονομάζεται διακίνηση-10k, με περισσότερες από 10.000 διαφημίσεις σχολιασμένες για αυτό το έργο. Το σύνολο δεδομένων περιέχει δύο πηγές πληροφοριών ανά διαφήμιση: κείμενο και εικόνες. Για την ακριβή ανίχνευση διαφημίσεων διακίνησης διακίνησης, σχεδιάσαμε και εκπαιδεύσαμε ένα βαθύ πολυμορφικό μοντέλο που ονομάζεται Deep Network (HTDN).', 'hu': 'Az emberkereskedelem világszerte emberek millióit érintő járvány. A szexuális kereskedelem, az emberkereskedelem domináns formája, jelentős növekedést tapasztalt főként a kísérő weboldalak bősége miatt, ahol az emberkereskedők nyíltan reklámozhatnak a saját akaratának megfelelő kísérő hirdetések között. Ebben a tanulmányban jelentős lépést teszünk az emberkereskedelemre gyanúsított hirdetések automatikus felismerésében. Bemutatjuk a Trafficking-10k nevű újszerű adatkészletet, amelyhez több mint 10 000 hirdetés jegyzett fel erre a feladatra. Az adatkészlet hirdetésenként két információforrást tartalmaz: szöveget és képeket. Az emberkereskedelem hirdetéseinek pontos felismerése érdekében kidolgoztunk és képzettünk egy mély multimodális modellt, amelyet az Emberkereskedelem Mélyhálózatának (HTDN) neveznek.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის სარგებლობა არის გლობალური ეპედემია, რომელიც მილიონის ადამიანებს პლანეტაციაში. სექსიკური სარგებლობა, ადამიანის სარგებლობის დომინტური ფორმა, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი აღმოჩენა სექსორტის საბოლო სექსორტის გარეშე, სადაც ადამიანის სარგებლობელი შეუძლია აღმო ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ დიდი ნაწილის ავტომატურად განახსნა ადამიანის შესახებ. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის მონაცემები სახელი Trafficking-10k, რომელიც უფრო მეტი 10,000 მონაცემები, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის ამოცანა. მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში ორი ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება: ტექსტი და გამოსახულება. მარტივი განვიცნობისთვის სარპაქტიკური reklaმენტების შესახებ, ჩვენ განვიცნობით და განვიცნობით ძალიან მულტიმედიალური მოდელი, რომელიც სახელის სარპაქტიკური ძალიან სისრ', 'it': "La tratta di esseri umani è un'epidemia globale che colpisce milioni di persone in tutto il pianeta. Il traffico sessuale, la forma dominante del traffico di esseri umani, ha visto un aumento significativo soprattutto a causa dell'abbondanza di siti web di escort, dove i trafficanti di esseri umani possono pubblicizzare apertamente tra annunci di escort a volontà. In questo articolo, facciamo un passo importante nel rilevamento automatico di pubblicità sospettate di appartenere alla tratta di esseri umani. Vi presentiamo un nuovo set di dati chiamato Trafficking-10k, con più di 10.000 annunci pubblicitari annotati per questo compito. Il set di dati contiene due fonti di informazione per annuncio: testo e immagini. Per la rilevazione accurata degli annunci di traffico, abbiamo progettato e formato un modello multimodale profondo chiamato Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).", 'kk': 'Адам трафикациясы - планетасында миллиондар адамдарға әсер ететін әлемді эпидемия. Секс трафикациясы, адам трафикациясының көпшілігі, көпшілігі экспорттау вебсайттарының көпшілігі себептерінің көпшілігін көрген, адам трафикацияларының көпшілігін жеткізуге болады. Бұл қағазда, адамдардың тұжырымдамасын автоматты түрде анықтау үшін маңызды қадам алдық. Бұл тапсырма үшін 10 000 артық белгілер бар, траfficking-10k деп аталатын романдық деректер жиынын таңдаймыз. Деректер жиында әрбір ескерту: мәтін мен кескіндер екі мәлімет көзі бар. Трафикациялық рекламаларды дұрыс анықтау үшін, біз адамдардың Трафикациялық қалыпты желі (HTDN) деп аталатын көптеген көптеген модель үлгісін құрылдық.', 'lt': 'Prekyba žmonėmis yra pasaulinė epidemija, kenkianti milijonams žmonių visoje planetoje. Prekyba lytimis, dominuojanti prekybos žmonėmis form a, gerokai išaugo daugiausia dėl daugybės palydovų interneto svetainių, kuriose prekybininkai žmonėmis gali atvirai reklamuoti palydovų reklamose. Šiame dokumente žengiame didelį žingsnį automatiškai nustatant reklamą, įtariamą, susijusią su prekyba žmonėmis. Mes pristatome naują duomenų rinkinį, vadinamą Prekyba 10k, su daugiau kaip 10 000 reklamų, užrašytų už šią užduotį. Duomenų rinkinyje yra du informacijos šaltiniai reklamoje: tekstas ir vaizdai. Siekdami tiksliai nustatyti prekybos reklamą, sukūrėme ir apmokėme gilų daugiarūšio transporto model į, vadinamą giliu prekybos žmonėmis tinklu (HTDN).', 'ms': 'Penjualan manusia adalah epidemi global yang mempengaruhi jutaan orang di seluruh planet. Sex trafficking, the dominant form of human trafficking, has seen a significant rise mostly due to the abundance of escort websites, where human traffickers can openly advertise among at-will escort advertisements.  Dalam kertas ini, kita mengambil langkah besar dalam pengesan automatik iklan yang dicurigai berkaitan dengan perdagangan manusia. Kami memperkenalkan set data novel bernama Trafficking-10k, dengan lebih dari 10,000 iklan yang dicatat untuk tugas ini. Set data mengandungi dua sumber maklumat per iklan: teks dan imej. Untuk pengesan tepat iklan perdagangan, kami merancang dan melatih model multimodal yang dalam yang disebut Rangkaian Dalam Trafficking Manusia (HTDN).', 'ml': 'ലോകത്ത് മുഴുവന്\u200d ലക്ഷത്തിനായിട്ടുള്ള ആളുകളെ ബാധിക്കുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ ട്രാക്ടിക്ക് ലോകത്തിലെ  സെക്സ് ട്രാക്കിങ്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നത്, മനുഷ്യന്\u200d ട്രാക്കിങ്കിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200dനോട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുന്നത്, എസ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് വെബ്സിന്\u200dറ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, മനുഷ്യന്\u200d ട്രാക്കിക്കിങ്ങിനെക്കുറിച്ച് സംശയിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d നമ നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രാഫിക്കിംഗ്-10k എന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിക്ക് വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിന് 10,000 കൂട വിവരമറിയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ രണ്ട് സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലുണ്ട്: പദാവലിയും ചിത്രങ്ങളും. ട്രാക്കിങ്ക് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തിലെ മള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ', 'mk': 'Трговијата со луѓе е глобална епидемија која влијае на милиони луѓе низ целата планета. Sex trafficking, the dominant form of human trafficking, has seen a significant rise mostly due to the abundance of escort websites, where human traffickers can openly advertise among at-will escort advertisements.  Во овој весник направивме голем чекор во автоматското детектирање на реклами кои се сомневаат дека се однесуваат на трговијата со луѓе. Презентираме нов компјутер на податоци наречен Трговија со 10K, со повеќе од 10.000 реклами анотирани за оваа задача. Податоците содржат два извори на информација по реклама: текст и слики. За прецизно детектирање на рекламите за трговија со луѓе, дизајниравме и трениравме длабок мултимодилен модел наречен Длабока мрежа за трговија со луѓе (HTDN).', 'mt': 'It-traffikar tal-bnedmin huwa epidemija globali li taffettwa miljuni ta’ nies madwar il-pjaneta. It-traffikar tas-sess, il-form a dominanti tat-traffikar tal-bnedmin, wera żieda sinifikanti l-aktar minħabba l-abbundanza ta’ siti elettroniċi ta’ eskorti, fejn it-traffikanti tal-bnedmin jistgħu jirreklamaw b’mod miftuħ fost reklami ta’ eskorti. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nieħdu pass kbir fid-detezzjoni awtomatika ta’ reklami suspettati li jappartjenu għat-traffikar tal-bnedmin. Aħna nippreżentaw sett ġdid ta’ dejta msejjaħ Traffikar-10k, b’aktar minn 10,000 reklamar annotat għal dan il-kompitu. Is-sett tad-dejta fih żewġ sorsi ta’ informazzjoni għal kull reklamar: test u immaġni. Għad-detezzjoni preċiża tar-reklami tat-traffikar, iddisinjna u mħarrġin mudell multimodali profond imsejjaħ in-Netwerk Profond tat-Traffikar tal-Bniedem (HTDN).', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний худалдаа нь дэлхийн сая сая хүмүүст нөлөөлдөг эмгэг юм. Хүмүүсийн худалдааны эзэмшигч, хүний худалдааны гол хэлбэр нь ихэнхдээ эзэмшигч вебсайтуудын ихэвчлэн ихэнхдээ нэмэгдэж байгааг харсан. Хүмүүсийн худалдаачид реклам дэлгэцүүлэлтийг ашиглаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүн төрөлхтний худалдааны тухай ойлголтын автоматжуулалтыг автоматжуулахад чухал алхам хийдэг. Бид "Trafficking-10k" нэртэй шинэ өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ ажил дээр 10,000 гаруй рекламнуудыг анзаарсан. Нэг реклам дээр өгөгдлийн санд хоёр мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр байдаг: текст болон зураг. Хүмүүсийн зах зэвсэг дэлгэрүүлэлтийг тодорхойлохын тулд бид хүний зах зэвсэг гүн гүнзгий олон загварын загвар (HTDN) бүтээсэн ба сургалтын загварыг зохион бүтээсэн.', 'pl': 'Handel ludźmi to globalna epidemia dotykająca miliony ludzi na całej planecie. Handel seksualny, dominująca forma handlu ludźmi, odnotował znaczny wzrost głównie ze względu na obfitość stron towarzyskich, gdzie handlarze ludźmi mogą otwarcie reklamować się wśród reklam towarzyskich według woli. W niniejszym artykule podejmujemy istotny krok w automatycznym wykrywaniu reklam podejrzanych o handel ludźmi. Przedstawiamy nowatorski zestaw danych o nazwie Trafficking-10k, z ponad 10.000 reklam podanych do tego zadania. Zestaw danych zawiera dwa źródła informacji na reklamę: tekst i obrazy. W celu dokładnego wykrywania reklam handlu ludźmi zaprojektowaliśmy i przeszkoliliśmy głęboki multimodalny model zwany Deep Network (HTDN).', 'ro': 'Traficul de persoane este o epidemie globală care afectează milioane de oameni de pe întreaga planetă. Traficul sexual, forma dominantă a traficului de persoane, a înregistrat o creștere semnificativă, în principal datorită abundenței site-urilor de escortă, unde traficanții de persoane pot face publicitate deschisă printre reclamele de escortă la voie. În această lucrare, facem un pas major în detectarea automată a reclamelor suspectate a fi legate de traficul de persoane. Vă prezentăm un nou set de date numit Trafficking-10k, cu peste 10.000 de reclame adnotate pentru această sarcină. Setul de date conține două surse de informații pe reclamă: text și imagini. Pentru detectarea corectă a reclamelor de trafic de persoane, am proiectat și instruit un model multimodal profund numit Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'no': 'Menneske tråking er eit globalt epidemisk som påvirkar millioner av menneske over planeten. Sekstrafikking, den dominerende form av mennesketrafficking, har sett ein signifikant økning hovudsakelig på grunn av storleiken av skortenettstader, der mennesketrafikkaren kan åpne reklame blant reklaringar ved høve til å korta reklame. I denne papiret tar vi ein stor steg i den automatiske oppdaginga av reklame som vart mistokt om menneskelig trafficking. Vi presenterer eit romansk dataset kalla Trafficking-10k, med fleire enn 10.000 reklamar merkt for denne oppgåva. Datasettet inneheld to kjelde for informasjon per reklame: tekst og bilete. For det nøyaktige oppdaginga av reklamar for trafficking, designerte vi og trengte ein dyp multimodal modell kalla menneskelig trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'so': 'Human trafficking is a global epidemic affecting millions of people across the planet.  Ka ganacsiga galmada, nooca ugu sareeya ka ganacsiga dadku wuxuu arkay mid aad u kordha bogagga safarka badan, kaas oo ay ka shaqeyn karaan ganacsiga dadku si bayaan ah u caddeyn karo ogeysiiska. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qaadannaa tallaabo weyn oo aan automati u baaqanayno ogeysiiska ka shakisan in la xiriira ganacsiga dadka. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa taariikhda wargelinta ee la yidhaahdo Trafficking-10k, waxaana ka badan 10,000 oo ogeysiis ah oo loo sheegay shaqadaas. Taariikhda waxaad ka heleysaa laba soul oo macluumaad ku saabsan ogeysiiska: text iyo sawirro. Si saxda ah ayaannu u ogaannay ogeysiiska ganacsiga, waxaynu sameynnay oo baranay model aad u dheer oo la yidhaahdo shabakadda hoose u socodka dadka (HTDN).', 'sv': 'Människohandel är en global epidemi som drabbar miljontals människor över hela världen. Sexhandel, den dominerande formen av människohandel, har sett en betydande ökning främst på grund av överflödet av eskortwebbplatser, där människohandlare öppet kan annonsera bland eskortannonser. I denna uppsats tar vi ett stort steg i den automatiska detekteringen av annonser som misstänks ha samband med människohandel. Vi presenterar en ny datauppsättning som heter Trafficking-10k, med mer än 10 000 annonser kommenterade för denna uppgift. Datauppsättningen innehåller två informationskällor per annons: text och bilder. För korrekt upptäckt av människohandelsannonser har vi utformat och utbildat en djup multimodal modell som kallas Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'sr': 'Trgovina ljudima je globalna epidemija koja utječe na milione ljudi širom planete. Seksualni trgovin, dominantni oblik trgovine ljudima, uglavnom je vidio značajan rast zbog dostupnosti pratnje veb sajtova, gde ljudski trgovci mogu otvoreno oglašavati među reklamama koji će pratiti. U ovom papiru, poduzimamo veliki korak u automatskom otkrivanju reklama osumnjičenih za trgovinu ljudima. Predstavljamo novu kompetu podataka zvanu Trafficking-10k, sa više od 10.000 reklama annotiranih za ovaj zadatak. Podaci sadrže dva izvora informacija po reklami: tekst i slike. Za taèno otkrivanje reklama za trgovinu, dizajnirali smo i obuèili duboki multimodalni model nazvan "Ljudska duboka mreža trgovine ljudima" (HTDN).', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් තමයි ලෝකිකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් මිලියන් මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  සෙක්ස් ව්\u200dයාපාරය, මිනිස්සු ව්\u200dයාපාරයේ ප්\u200dරධාන වර්ගය, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැක්කා විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙබ් ස්ථානයක් ගොඩක් නිසා විශේෂ ව මේ පැත්තට, අපි මිනිස්සු වාර්ථාවක් ගැන සැකසුම් කරනවා කියලා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් පැත්ත අපි කියන්නේ නියම දත්ත සූදානයක් ට්\u200dරෆිකින්ග්-10ක් කියලා, මේ වැඩේ විසින් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් 10,000 වඩා වැඩියි. තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් තොරතුරු දෙකක් තියෙනවා: පෙළ සහ පින්තූර. ව්\u200dයාපාර ව්\u200dයාපාර කිරීමක් ගැන සිද්ධ විදියට, අපි සැලසුම් කරලා ගොඩක් මානස් ව්\u200dයාපාර කිරීමක් ජාලය (HTDN) කිරීමේ ගො', 'ta': 'Human trafficking is a global epidemic affecting millions of people across the planet.  பெரும்பாலான பாதுகாப்பு, மனித வண்டிக்கையின் மிக முக்கியமான வியாபாரத்தை பார்த்துள்ளார்கள். மனித பாதுகாப்பாளர்கள் விவரங்களை வெளிப்படையாக ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பெரிய படியை எடுத்து மனித வணிகாரத்தை பற்றி சந்தேகிக்கப்பட்ட விவரங்களை தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிப் நாங்கள் இந்த பணிக்கு அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட 10,000 க்கு மேற்பட்ட ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை கொண்டுள்ளோம். தகவல் அமைப்பு அறிவிப்புக்குரிய தகவல் மூலம் இரண்டு மூலம் உள்ளது: உரை மற்றும் பிம்பங்கள். திட்டமான வணிக அறிவிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு, நாங்கள் ஒரு ஆழமான பல மாதிரி மாதிரியை வடிவமைத்து பயிற்சி செய்தோம் என்று மனித பாதுகாப', 'ur': 'انسان کی تجارت ایک سراسر سراسر مصیبت ہے جو زمین میں لاکھوں لوگوں کو اثر دیتی ہے۔ جنس تجارت، انسان تجارت کی حکومت کی شکل، اکثر اسکورت ویب سائٹوں کی زیادتی کے باعث بڑی اضافہ کی وجہ سے دیکھا ہے، جہاں انسان تجارت کرنے والوں کو آشکار طور پر آگاہ کر سکتے ہیں کہ اضافہ کے ساتھ اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے انسان ترافیکن کے معاملہ میں شک رکھے ہوئے تبلیغات کی آزمائش میں ایک بڑی قدم لے لیا ہے. ہم نے ایک نو ڈیٹ سٹ کو پیش کرایا جس کا نام Trafficking-10k ہے، اس کام کے لئے 10,000 سے زیادہ اخطار کیا گیا ہے۔ ڈاٹا سٹ میں دو سراسر معلومات لگا رہی ہے ہر اعلام: ٹیکسٹ اور تصاویر۔ ہم نے ایک عمیق multimodal model (HTDN) کی طرح طراحی اور تعلیم کی تھی جو انسان کی ترافیکنگ عمیق نیٹ ورک کا نام ہے۔', 'uz': "Inson sotuvchisi dunyo bo'lgan millionlab odamlarga qo'llangan kasallik. Ko'pchilik, inson shipchilikning boshqa shakli bo'lgan o'zgarishni ko'p ko'pchiligini ko'rsatadi. Bu yerda odamlar o'zgarishlar tadbirkorlikni ko'rganadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz inson suhbat soʻzlari haqida o'ylab keladigan amalga oshirishni avtomatik aniqlashni olib kelamiz. Biz bu vazifaning 10 000 dan ortiq taʼminlovchi taʼlumot etishlari bilan yetishmaymiz. @ info: whatsthis Ko'rib chiqishni tasavvur qilish uchun biz Human Trafficking Deep Tarmoqni (HTDN) deb nomlangan, multimodal modelini yaratdik va o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Buôn người là một dịch bệnh toàn cầu ảnh hưởng đến hàng triệu người trên khắp hành tinh. Buôn bán tình dục, dạng chủ yếu của buôn người, đã thấy một sự tăng vọt, chủ yếu là do có rất nhiều trang web hộ tống, nơi người buôn người có thể công khai quảng cáo trên mục đích hộ tống quảng cáo. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một bước quan trọng trong việc phát hiện tự động quảng cáo có liên quan tới buôn người. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới có tên là Traffiking-10k, với hơn cả 10,000 quảng cáo được ghi chú cho nhiệm vụ này. Bộ dữ liệu chứa hai nguồn thông tin cho mỗi quảng cáo: văn bản và ảnh. Chúng tôi thiết kế và huấn luyện một mô hình lớn đa phương tiện gọi là mạng lưới ngầm buôn người (HTDN).', 'bg': 'Трафикът на хора е глобална епидемия, засягаща милиони хора по цялата планета. Сексуалният трафик, доминиращата форма на трафик на хора, отбеляза значително нарастване най-вече поради изобилието от ескорт уебсайтове, където трафикантите на хора могат открито да рекламират сред свободни ескорт реклами. В този доклад предприемаме важна стъпка в автоматичното откриване на реклами, за които се предполага, че са свързани с трафик на хора. Представяме нов набор от данни, наречен Трафик-10к, с повече от 10 000 реклами анотирани за тази задача. Наборът от данни съдържа два източника на информация за всяка реклама: текст и изображения. За точното откриване на реклами за трафик на хора разработихме и обучихме задълбочен мултимодален модел, наречен задълбочена мрежа за трафик на хора.', 'hr': 'Trgovina ljudima je globalna epidemija koja utječe na milijune ljudi širom planete. Provoz seksa, dominantni oblik trgovine ljudima, uglavnom je vidio značajan rast zbog ogromne pratnje internetskih stranica, gdje trgovci ljudima mogu otvoreno oglašavati među reklamama koji će pratiti na početku. U ovom papiru, počinjemo veliki korak u automatskom otkrivanju reklama osumnjičenih za trgovinu ljudima. Predstavljamo novu kompletu podataka zvanu Trafficking-10k, sa više od 10.000 reklama koje su annotirane za ovaj zadatak. Podaci sadrže dva izvora informacija po reklami: tekst i slike. Za precizno otkrivanje reklama o trgovini, dizajnirali smo i obučili duboki multimodalni model nazvan Duboka mreža trgovine ljudima (HTDN).', 'da': 'Menneskehandel er en global epidemi, der rammer millioner af mennesker over hele kloden. Sexhandel, den dominerende form for menneskehandel, har oplevet en betydelig stigning hovedsagelig på grund af overfloden af escortwebsteder, hvor menneskehandlere åbent kan annoncere blandt at-vilje escortreklamer. I denne artikel tager vi et stort skridt i den automatiske afsløring af reklamer, der mistænkes at vedrøre menneskehandel. Vi præsenterer et nyt datasæt kaldet Trafficking-10k, med mere end 10.000 annoncer annoteret til denne opgave. Datasættet indeholder to informationskilder pr. annonce: tekst og billeder. For nøjagtig opdagelse af reklamer for menneskehandel har vi designet og uddannet en dyb multimodal model kaldet Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'nl': 'Mensenhandel is een wereldwijde epidemie die miljoenen mensen over de hele wereld treft. Sekshandel, de dominante vorm van mensenhandel, heeft een aanzienlijke stijging gezien vooral door de overvloed aan escort websites, waar mensenhandelaren openlijk kunnen adverteren onder escort advertenties. In dit artikel zetten we een grote stap in de automatische detectie van advertenties die vermoedelijk verband houden met mensenhandel. We presenteren een nieuwe dataset genaamd Trafficking-10k, met meer dan 10.000 advertenties geannoteerd voor deze taak. De dataset bevat twee informatiebronnen per advertentie: tekst en afbeeldingen. Voor de nauwkeurige detectie van mensenhandel advertenties hebben we een diep multimodaal model ontworpen en getraind, het Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'de': 'Menschenhandel ist eine globale Epidemie, die Millionen von Menschen auf der ganzen Welt betrifft. Der Sexhandel, die dominante Form des Menschenhandels, hat vor allem aufgrund der Fülle von Escort-Websites, auf denen Menschenhändler offen unter Escort-Anzeigen werben können, einen deutlichen Anstieg erlebt. In diesem Beitrag machen wir einen wichtigen Schritt bei der automatischen Erkennung von Werbeanzeigen, die im Zusammenhang mit Menschenhandel stehen. Wir präsentieren einen neuartigen Datensatz namens Trafficking-10k, mit mehr als 10.000 Anzeigen für diese Aufgabe kommentiert. Der Datensatz enthält zwei Informationsquellen pro Anzeige: Text und Bild. Für die genaue Erkennung von Menschenhandel-Werbung haben wir ein tiefes multimodales Modell namens Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN) entwickelt und trainiert.', 'fa': 'تجارت انسان یک اپیدمی جهانی است که تاثیر میلیون ها نفر در سراسر سیاره است. تجارت جنسی، شکل تجارت انسان، بیشتر به سبب بسیاری از وب\u200cسایت\u200cهای اسکورت، افزایش بزرگی را دیده است که تجارت\u200cکنندگان انسان می\u200cتوانند در میان تبلیغات\u200cها آشکار کنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک قدم بزرگی در کشف خودکار تبلیغات مظنون به ترافیک انسان می گیریم. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای نویسی به نام Trafficking-10k را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با بیش از ۱۰۰۰۰ تبلیغات برای این کار نوشته شده است. مجموعه داده\u200cها دو منبع اطلاعات در هر اعلام: متن و تصاویر وجود دارد. برای شناسایی دقیق تبلیغات تجارت، ما یک مدل عمیق بسیار متمدال را طراحی و آموزش کردیم به نام شبکه عمیق تجارت انسان (HTDN).', 'ko': '인신매매는 전 세계 유행병으로 전 세계 수백만 명의 사람들에게 영향을 주고 있다.인신매매의 주요 형식으로서 성매매가 현저하게 상승했다. 주요 원인은 대량의 보호자 사이트가 있기 때문이다. 이런 사이트에서 인신매매자는 임의로 보호자 광고에서 광고를 공개할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 인신매매와 관련된 광고를 자동으로 검출하는 데 중요한 일보를 내디뎠다.우리는 Traffing-10k라는 새로운 데이터 집합을 보여 주었고, 이 임무를 위해 10000여 개의 광고를 주석했다.이 데이터 집합은 모든 광고의 두 가지 정보원을 포함한다. 그것이 바로 텍스트와 그림이다.우리는 판매 광고를 정확하게 검출하기 위해 인구 판매 깊이 네트워크(HTDN)라고 불리는 깊이 다중모드 모델을 설계하고 훈련했다.', 'id': 'Penjualan manusia adalah epidemi global yang mempengaruhi jutaan orang di seluruh planet. Penjualan seks, bentuk dominan perdagangan manusia, telah melihat meningkat yang signifikan kebanyakan karena banyak situs pengawal web, di mana penjual manusia dapat secara terbuka iklan diantara iklan yang akan mengawal. Dalam koran ini, kita mengambil langkah besar dalam deteksi otomatis iklan yang tersangka berkaitan dengan perdagangan manusia. Kami mempersembahkan set data novel bernama Trafficking-10k, dengan lebih dari 10.000 iklan yang dicatat untuk tugas ini. Set data berisi dua sumber informasi per iklan: teks dan gambar. Untuk deteksi akurat iklan perdagangan, kami merancang dan melatih model multimodal dalam yang disebut Jaringan Dalam Trafficking Manusia (HTDN).', 'sw': 'Biashara ya binadamu ni ugonjwa wa kimataifa unaoathiri mamilioni ya watu duniani kote. Biashara ya ngono, aina kubwa ya biashara ya binadamu, imeona kuongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi kwa sababu ya tovuti nyingi za wageni, ambapo wafanyabiashara binadamu wanaweza kutangaza hadharani miongoni mwa matangazo yanayoweza kusafirisha. Katika gazeti hili, tunachukua hatua kubwa katika kutambua tangazo linalohusiana na biashara ya binadamu. Tunaweza kuweka seti ya taarifa za riwaya zinazoitwa Traffic-10k, na zaidi ya matangazo 10,000 yaliyotangazwa kwa kazi hii. Taarifa hiyo ina vyanzo viwili vya taarifa kwa tangazo: maandishi na picha. Kwa kutambua sahihi matangazo ya biashara, tuliunda na kufundisha mtindo wa kina wa vifaa vinavyoitwa Mtandao wa Utafiti wa Binadamu (HTDN).', 'tr': 'Adamlar trafikasy dünýädäki adamlary dünýäde nähili adamlary täsirleýär. Seks alynyşy, adamlary alynyşynyň adalaty şeklinde köp wagt taýýarlaşyk websites bolan ýagdaýynyň köpüsi sebäpli ýokary görüpdi, nähili adamlary alynyşylar tarapyndan reklam edip bilýärler. Bu kagyzda, adamlaryň alynyşynyň bardygyna şübhelenýän reklamlaryň otomatik hasaplamasynda esasy adım çykýarys. Biz "Trafficking-10k" adly roman setirini 10,000-den köp reklam bilen bu işi üçin duýdurdyk. Data setirinde reklam başynda iki rakam maglumaty bar: metin we suratlar. Adamlar ticaret eden reklamlaryň dogry tapylmagy üçin, adamlaryň ticaret edilen derin bir multimodal nusgasyny (HTDN) tasarladyk we eğitirdik.', 'sq': 'Trafiku njerëzor është një epidemi globale që prek miliona njerëz anembanë planetit. Trafikata seksuale, form a mbizotëruese e trafikut njerëzor, ka parë një rritje të rëndësishme kryesisht për shkak të mjaftueshmërisë së uebsajteve shoqëruese ku trafikantët njerëzor mund të reklamojnë haptazi midis reklamave shoqëruese. Në këtë letër, ne bëjmë një hap të madh në zbulimin automatik të reklamave të dyshuara të lidhura me trafikimin njerëzor. Ne paraqesim një set të dhënash të ri të quajtur Trafficking-10k, me më shumë se 10,000 reklamë të shënuara për këtë detyrë. Të dhënat përmbajnë dy burime informacioni për reklamë: tekst dhe imazhe. Për zbulimin e saktë të reklamave të trafikut, kemi projektuar dhe trajnuar një model të thellë multimodal të quajtur Rrjeti i thellë i Trafikut të Njeriut (HTDN).', 'af': "Mense trafikking is 'n globale epidemie wat vloek op miljoene mense oor die planeet. Seks-trafikking, die dominante vorm van menslike trafikking, het 'n betekende verhoeging gesien mees vanweë die oorvloedigheid van verloedigheid van webstede, waar menslike trafikkers openlik rekenaar kan maak onder die aandag van rekenaar. In hierdie papier neem ons 'n groot stap in die outomatiese opdekking van reklame wat veroorsaak is om menslike handeling te verhou. Ons stel 'n romaniese datastel wat genoem word Trafficking-10k, met meer as 10,000 advertensies wat vir hierdie taak aangeteken is. Die datastel bevat twee bronne van inligting per reklame: teks en beelde. Vir die presies opdekking van trafikkende reklame, het ons 'n diep multimodaal model ontwerp en opgelei wat die menslike Trafikkende Deep Netwerk genoem word (HTDN).", 'am': 'የሰው ንግድ በመሊዮን የሚቆጠሩ ሰዎች ላይ የዓለማዊ ድካም ነው፡፡ የሴት ንግድ፣ የሰው ነጋዴዎች በሚያሳድዱበት የአካባቢ ድረ ገበቦች ብዛት ሲያሳድጉ የሰው ነጋዴዎች በሙሉ ማስታወቂያውን እንዲያሳድሩ የሚችሉትን አዋጅ አየ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ከሰው ንግድ ጋር በተጠራጠሩ አዋቂዎችን በአስማትነካዊ መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ላይ 10,000 የበለጠ አዋቂዎች የንግድ-10k የሚባልን የዳታ ማተሚያ ዜና እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን ለሁሉም ማስታወቂያ ሁለት ምንጮች አለ፤ ጽሑፍ እና ምስሎች ለንግድ ማስታወቂያውን ለመፍጠር፣ የሰው የመንግድ ጥልቅ መረብ (HTDN) የሚባለውን ጥልቅ multimodal ሞዴል መፍጠርና አስተማርነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդկային առևտրը համաշխարհային համաճարակ է, որը ազդում է միլիոնավոր մարդկանց աշխարհում: Sex trafficking, the dominant form of human trafficking, has seen a significant rise mostly due to the abundance of escort websites, where human traffickers can openly advertise among at-will escort advertisements.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մեծ քայլ ենք անում մարդկային առևտրի մասին կասկածված գովազդների ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը կոչվում է Թրաֆիք-10k, որտեղ գրված են ավելի քան 10,000 գովազդներ այս խնդրի համար: Տեղեկատվական համակարգը պարունակում է յուրաքանչյուր գովազդի տեղեկատվության երկու աղբյուր՝ տեքստը և պատկերները: Թրաֆիքային գովազդների ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերման համար մենք նախագծեցինք և ուսուցանեցինք մի խորը բազմամոդալ մոդել, որը կոչվում է ՀՏԴՆ:', 'az': 'İnsan ticarəti dünyadakı milyonlarla insana təsir edir. Seks ticarəti, insan ticarətinin hökmranlığı olan formu, çox escort sitlərinin çoxluğuna görə, insanların ticarətçiləri reklamların arasında a çıq-aşkar reklamlar edə bilər. Bu kağızda insan ticarəti barəsində şübhə edilən reklamların avtomatik keşfetməsində böyük bir adım alırıq. Biz Trafficking-10k adlı yeni verilər qutusunu göstərdik, bu işin üçün 10.000-dən fazla reklamları ilə. Verici qurğuları hər reklam üçün iki məlumat mənbəsi içərir: metin və surat. İnsan Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN) adlı çoxlu modal modeli tasarladıq və təhsil etdik.', 'bn': 'মানুষের পাচার হচ্ছে বিশ্বব্যাপী আক্রান্ত মিলিয়ন মানুষের উপর। যৌন পাচার, মানব পাচারের ক্ষমতাশালী ধরনের প্রধান পাচার, বেশীরভাগ বৃদ্ধি দেখেছে যাত্রী ওয়েবসাইটের প্রচুর কারণে, যেখানে মানুষ পাচারকারীরা প্রকা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মানুষের পাচারের সম্পর্কে সন্দেহ করা বিজ্ঞাপনের স্বয়ংক্রিয় পদক্ষেপ নিয়েছি। আমরা ট্রাফিকিং-১০ কি নামের একটি উপন্যাসেট উপস্থাপন করছি, যার মধ্যে এই কাজের জন্য বিজ্ঞাপনের বেশী ১০,০০০ বেশি বিজ্ঞাপন রয় প্রতি বিজ্ঞাপনের প্রতি তথ্যের দুটি উৎস: টেক্সট এবং ছবি। পাচার বিজ্ঞাপনের সঠিকভাবে সনাক্ত করার জন্য আমরা একটি গভীর মাল্টিমোডাল মডেল নির্ধারণ করেছি এবং প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি যার নাম হিউম্যান্ট ট', 'bs': 'Trgovina ljudima je globalna epidemija koja utječe na milione ljudi širom planete. Seksualno trgovine, dominantna form a trgovine ljudima, uglavnom je vidio značajan rast zbog dostupnosti pratnje internetskih sajtova, gdje ljudski trgovci mogu otvoreno oglašavati među izveštajnim reklamama. U ovom papiru, počinjemo veliki korak u automatskom otkrivanju reklama osumnjičenih u vezi trgovine ljudima. Predstavljamo novu kompetu podataka zvanu Trafficking-10k, sa više od 10.000 reklama annotiranih za ovaj zadatak. Podaci sadrže dva izvora informacija po reklami: tekst i slike. Za precizno otkrivanje reklama o trgovini, dizajnirali smo i obučili duboki multimodalni model koji se zove Man Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'ca': "El tràfic humà és una epidèmia global que afecta milions de persones a tot el planeta. El tràfic sexual, la form a dominant del tràfic humà, ha vist un augment significatiu, principalment degut a l'abundància de llocs web d'escolta, on els tràfics humà poden anunciar obertament entre anuncis d'escolta voluntaria. En aquest article, fem un pas important en la detecció automàtica d'anuncis sospitosos de relacionats amb el tràfic humà. Presentam un nou conjunt de dades anomenat Trafficking-10k, amb més de 10.000 anuncis anotats per aquesta tasca. El conjunt de dades conté dues fonts d'informació per anunci: text i imatges. Per detectar exactament els anuncis de tràfic, vam dissenyar i entrenar un model multimodal profund anomenat la Red Profunda de Tràfic Human (HTDN).", 'cs': 'Obchodování s lidmi je globální epidemie postihující miliony lidí po celé planetě. Sexuální obchodování, dominantní forma obchodování s lidmi, zaznamenalo výrazný vzestup především kvůli množství eskortních webů, kde obchodníci s lidmi mohou otevřeně inzerovat mezi doprovodnými reklamami. V tomto článku učiníme významný krok v automatické detekci reklam podezřelých na obchodování s lidmi. Představujeme novou datovou sadu s názvem Trafficking-10k, s více než 10.000 reklamami pro tento úkol anotovanými. Datová sada obsahuje dva zdroje informací pro každou reklamu: text a obrázky. Pro přesnou detekci reklam obchodování s lidmi jsme navrhli a vyškolili hluboký multimodální model nazvaný Hluboká síť obchodování s lidmi (HTDN).', 'et': 'Inimkaubandus on ülemaailmne epideemia, mis mõjutab miljoneid inimesi kogu planeedil. Seksuaalne kaubandus, inimkaubanduse domineeriv vorm, on märkimisväärselt kasvanud peamiselt eskortveebisaitide arvukuse tõttu, kus inimkaubitsejad saavad vabalt reklaamida eskortreklaamide hulgas. Käesolevas dokumendis astume suure sammu inimkaubandusega seotud reklaamide automaatseks tuvastamiseks. Esitame uudse andmekogumi nimega Trafficking-10k, millel on selle ülesande jaoks märgitud rohkem kui 10 000 reklaami. Andmekogum sisaldab reklaami kohta kahte teabeallikat: teksti ja pilte. Inimkaubanduse reklaamide täpseks tuvastamiseks töötasime välja ja koolitasime sügava multimodaalse mudeli, mida nimetatakse inimkaubanduse sügavvõrgustikuks (HTDN).', 'fi': 'Ihmiskauppa on maailmanlaajuinen epidemia, joka koskettaa miljoonia ihmisiä ympäri maailmaa. Seksuaalinen kauppa, ihmiskaupan hallitseva muoto, on kasvanut merkittävästi lähinnä seuralaissivustojen runsauden vuoksi, joilla ihmiskauppiaat voivat avoimesti mainostaa vapaaehtoisten seuralaismainosten joukossa. Tässä asiakirjassa otamme merkittävän askeleen ihmiskauppaan liittyvien mainosten automaattisessa tunnistamisessa. Esittelemme uuden aineiston nimeltä Trafficking-10k, johon on merkitty yli 10 000 mainosta tähän tehtävään. Aineisto sisältää kaksi tietolähdettä mainosta kohden: tekstiä ja kuvia. Ihmiskaupan mainosten tarkkaa havaitsemista varten suunnittelimme ja koulutimme syvän multimodaalisen mallin nimeltä Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé éntuk wong liya sing tukang batasan-wong liyan kanggo wong liyan kanggo awakdhéwé. Seks Tranbol, adalah sing gagané perbudhakan winih, sing uwis seneng pisan anyar tentang kanggo langasai winih sing luwih dumadhi winih sing paling, wong liyané perbudhakan wong liyané sing ngerasai winih sing bakal terus tambah sing berarti. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, nik awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal nggawe barang-barang sing isiné petani uwong. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk dadi nggawe Traffeking-10,000 akeh dolanan sing berarti ujaran kanggo nggawe barang iki. string" in "context_BAR_stringNew Awak dhéwé sing beraksi pernik awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé nggawe lan ijol-ijolan model sing dikarepaké Multimodal sing nganggo nggambar Traffik deep Network (HTDN).', 'ha': 'Miskiyar mutum yana da wata cutarwa duniya ta shagala millionnin mutane a kowanta. Miskiyar 6, shine wani abu mai girma wa miskiyar mutane, ko kuma ko da yawa ya samu da wasu website masu safari, inda miskiyar mutane za su iya bayani da bayani a tsakanin bayani da-will. Ga wannan takardan, za mu sami babban hanyoyi a cikin gareshi farat ɗaya da ake shakka a tsakanin cinikin mutane. Tuna halatar da wani tsarin nan da ake kiran Traffic-10k, tare da 10,000 da aka sanar da su ga wannan aikin. @ info: whatsthis Ga da gaske ganin bayani na fatauci na fatauci, ba mu design kuma ba mu ƙidãya wata misãlai mai yawa wanda aka kallo Shirin Ayuka na Tafiya da Deƙasar Cikakka (HTDN).', 'sk': 'Trgovina z ljudmi je globalna epidemija, ki prizadene milijone ljudi po vsem svetu. Trgovina s spolnim spolom, prevladujoča oblika trgovine z ljudmi, se je znatno povečala predvsem zaradi številnih spletnih strani za spremstvo, kjer lahko trgovci z ljudmi odprto oglašujejo med oglasi za spremstvo. V tem članku naredimo velik korak pri samodejnem zaznavanju oglasov, za katere sumimo, da se nanašajo na trgovino z ljudmi. Predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov z imenom Trafficking-10k, z več kot 10.000 oznakami za to nalogo. Zbirka podatkov vsebuje dva vira informacij na oglas: besedilo in slike. Za natančno odkrivanje oglasov trgovine z ljudmi smo oblikovali in usposobili globok multimodalni model, imenovan globoka mreža trgovine z ljudmi (HTDN).', 'he': 'סחר בני אדם הוא מגיפה גלובלית שמשפיעה על מיליוני אנשים ברחבי הכוכב. סחר מין, צורת השליטה של סחר בני אדם, ראה עלייה משמעותית בעיקר בגלל השפעה של אתרי הלוויה, שבו סחרי בני אדם יכולים לפרסם פתוח בין פרסומות ללוויה ברצון. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לוקחים צעד גדול בלגלות אוטומטית של פרסומות שחשודות שייכות לסחר בני אדם. אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים חדשה שנקראת סחר-10k, עם יותר מ-10,000 פרסומות מוצבעות על המשימה הזאת. קבוצת המידע מכילה שני מקורות מידע לכל פרסום: טקסט ותמונות. בשביל גילוי מדויק של פרסומות סחר, עיצבנו ואימנו מודל רב-מודל עמוק שנקרא רשת עמוקה של סחר בני אדם (HTDN).', 'bo': 'སྐྱེལ་འབྲེལ་འདི་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོངས་ས་ཡ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོངས འཛམ་གླིང་མེད་བཟོས་པའི་མི་འབོར་བརྩོལ་གསོག་གཙང་མེད་པའི་གྲོང་ཁྱེར་མཁན་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་ཉེན་མོ་ཞིག་ལ་ཡང་མཐོང་སྐྱེལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཁོངས་མང་ཆེ་བ་མང་ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་དུས ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྡན་སྐྱེལ་བ་༡༠༠༠་ཙམ་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཚགས་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ། སྙིགས་སྣོད་ལ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡིག་གེ་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་གཉིས་ཡོད་པ For the accurate detection of trafficking advertisements, we designed and trained a deep multimodal model called the Human Trafficking Deep Network (HTDN).'}
{'en': 'MalwareTextDB : A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ar': 'MalwareTextDB: قاعدة بيانات لمقالات البرامج الضارة المشروحة', 'es': 'MalwareTextDB: una base de datos para artículos de malware anotados', 'pt': 'MalwareTextDB: um banco de dados para artigos de malware anotados', 'fr': 'MalwareTextDB\xa0: une base de données pour les articles annotés sur les malwares', 'ja': 'MalwareTextDB ：マルウェアアノテーション記事のデータベース', 'zh': 'MalwareTextDB:注恶意软件文数据库', 'hi': 'MalwareTextDB: एनोटेटेड मैलवेयर लेखों के लिए एक डेटाबेस', 'ru': 'MalwareTextDB: База данных для аннотированных статей о вредоносных программах', 'ga': "MalwareTextDB: Bunachar Sonraí d'Airteagail Malware Anótáilte", 'hu': 'MalwareTextDB: A jegyzett rosszindulatú programcikkek adatbázisa', 'el': 'Μια βάση δεδομένων για σχολιασμένα άρθρα κακόβουλου λογισμικού', 'ka': 'MalwareText', 'it': 'MalwareTextDB: un database per articoli malware annotati', 'kk': 'MalwareTextDB: Анықталған Malware мақалаларының деректер қоры', 'lt': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'mk': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ms': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'mt': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ml': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'mn': 'MalwareTextDB: Аннотацийн Malware баримтуудын өгөгдлийн сан', 'no': 'MalwareTextDB: En database for annotated Malware Articles', 'pl': 'MalwareTextDB: Baza danych artykułów o złośliwym oprogramowaniu', 'ro': 'MalwareTextDB: O bază de date pentru articole malware adnotate', 'sr': 'MalwareTextDB: baza podataka za Annotated Malware Articles', 'si': 'MalwareText', 'sv': 'MalwareTextDB: En databas för kommenterade artiklar om skadlig programvara', 'so': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ta': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ur': 'MalwareTextDB: Annotated Malware Articles for A Database', 'uz': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'vi': 'Tác giả mềm mại', 'da': 'MalwareTextDB: En database for annoncerede malware artikler', 'nl': 'MalwareTextDB: Een database voor geannoteerde malwareartikelen', 'bg': 'База данни за анотирани статии за злонамерен софтуер', 'hr': 'MalwareTextDB: baza podataka za navedene malwareArticles', 'de': 'MalwareTextDB: Eine Datenbank für kommentierte Malware-Artikel', 'id': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'fa': 'Comment', 'ko': 'MalwareTextDB: 맬웨어 기사를 설명하는 데이터베이스', 'tr': 'MalwareTextDB: Annotated Malware Articles for A Database', 'sw': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'af': "MalwareTextDB: ' n Databasis vir aanmerkte Malware Artikels", 'am': 'TextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'MalwareTextDB: Annotated Malware Malware Malümatları üçün bir Database', 'bn': 'মালওয়ারTextDB: Annotated Malware Articles', 'bs': 'MalwareTextDB: baza podataka za Annotated Malware Articles', 'cs': 'MalwareTextDB: Databáze pro anotované články malwaru', 'sq': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'et': 'MalwareTextDB: Annoteeritud pahavara artiklite andmebaas', 'fi': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'ca': 'MalwareTextDB: Una base de dades per articles malware anotats', 'he': 'MalwareTextDB: A Database for Annotated Malware Articles', 'jv': 'DB', 'ha': 'TextDB: A Database for Annoted Malware artics', 'sk': 'MalwareTextDB: Zbirka podatkov za opisane članke zlonamerne programske opreme', 'bo': 'MalwareTextDB: Annotated Malware Articles for A Database'}
{'en': 'Cybersecurity risks and malware threats are becoming increasingly dangerous and common. Despite the severity of the problem, there has been few NLP efforts focused on tackling cybersecurity. In this paper, we discuss the construction of a new database for annotated malware texts. An annotation framework is introduced based on the MAEC vocabulary for defining malware characteristics, along with a database consisting of 39 annotated APT reports with a total of 6,819 sentences. We also use the database to construct models that can potentially help cybersecurity researchers in their data collection and analytics efforts.', 'ar': 'أصبحت مخاطر الأمن السيبراني وتهديدات البرامج الضارة خطيرة وشائعة بشكل متزايد. على الرغم من خطورة المشكلة ، كان هناك القليل من جهود البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي تركز على معالجة الأمن السيبراني. في هذه الورقة ، نناقش إنشاء قاعدة بيانات جديدة لنصوص البرامج الضارة المشروحة. تم تقديم إطار عمل للتعليقات التوضيحية استنادًا إلى مفردات MAEC لتحديد خصائص البرامج الضارة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع قاعدة بيانات تتكون من 39 تقرير APT مشروحًا بإجمالي 6819 جملة. نستخدم أيضًا قاعدة البيانات لبناء نماذج يمكن أن تساعد الباحثين في مجال الأمن السيبراني في جهود جمع البيانات والتحليلات.', 'pt': 'Os riscos de segurança cibernética e as ameaças de malware estão se tornando cada vez mais perigosos e comuns. Apesar da gravidade do problema, houve poucos esforços de PNL focados no combate à segurança cibernética. Neste artigo, discutimos a construção de um novo banco de dados para textos anotados de malware. Uma estrutura de anotação é introduzida com base no vocabulário MAEC para definir as características do malware, juntamente com um banco de dados composto por 39 relatórios APT anotados com um total de 6.819 frases. Também usamos o banco de dados para construir modelos que podem ajudar os pesquisadores de segurança cibernética em seus esforços de coleta e análise de dados.', 'es': 'Los riesgos de ciberseguridad y las amenazas de malware son cada vez más peligrosos y comunes. A pesar de la gravedad del problema, ha habido pocos esfuerzos de la PNL centrados en abordar la ciberseguridad. En este artículo, analizamos la construcción de una nueva base de datos para textos de malware anotados. Se introduce un marco de anotación basado en el vocabulario MAEC para definir las características del malware, junto con una base de datos que consta de 39 informes de APT anotados con un total de 6819 frases. También utilizamos la base de datos para crear modelos que puedan ayudar a los investigadores de ciberseguridad en sus esfuerzos de recopilación y análisis de datos.', 'fr': "Les risques de cybersécurité et les menaces de logiciels malveillants sont de plus en plus dangereux et courants. Malgré la gravité du problème, peu d'efforts de PNL ont été axés sur la lutte contre la cybersécurité. Dans cet article, nous discutons de la construction d'une nouvelle base de données pour les textes annotés de logiciels malveillants. Un cadre d'annotation basé sur le vocabulaire MAEC pour définir les caractéristiques des logiciels malveillants est introduit, ainsi qu'une base de données composée de 39 rapports APT annotés avec un total de 6 819 phrases. Nous utilisons également la base de données pour élaborer des modèles susceptibles d'aider les chercheurs en cybersécurité dans leurs efforts de collecte de données et d'analyse.", 'ja': 'サイバーセキュリティのリスクとマルウェアの脅威はますます危険で一般的になっています。問題の深刻さにもかかわらず、サイバーセキュリティへの取り組みに焦点を当てたNLPの取り組みはほとんどありません。本稿では、注釈付きマルウェアテキストのための新しいデータベースの構築について説明する。アノテーションフレームワークは、マルウェア特性を定義するためのMAECボキャブラリーに基づいて、合計6,819文の39のアノテーションされたAPTレポートからなるデータベースとともに導入されます。また、データベースを使用して、サイバーセキュリティ研究者のデータ収集と分析の取り組みに役立つ可能性のあるモデルを構築します。', 'hi': 'साइबर सुरक्षा जोखिम और मैलवेयर खतरे तेजी से खतरनाक और आम होते जा रहे हैं। समस्या की गंभीरता के बावजूद, साइबर सुरक्षा से निपटने पर केंद्रित कुछ एनएलपी प्रयास किए गए हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एनोटेट किए गए मैलवेयर ग्रंथों के लिए एक नए डेटाबेस के निर्माण पर चर्चा करते हैं। मैलवेयर विशेषताओं को परिभाषित करने के लिए MAEC शब्दावली के आधार पर एक एनोटेशन फ्रेमवर्क पेश किया गया है, साथ ही कुल 6,819 वाक्यों के साथ 39 एनोटेटेड एपीटी रिपोर्टों से मिलकर एक डेटाबेस भी शामिल है। हम डेटाबेस का उपयोग उन मॉडलों का निर्माण करने के लिए भी करते हैं जो संभावित रूप से साइबर सुरक्षा शोधकर्ताओं को उनके डेटा संग्रह और विश्लेषिकी प्रयासों में मदद कर सकते हैं।', 'zh': '网络安全风险恶意软件胁正转危遍。 虽甚,少NLP务专网络安全。 于本文中,将议为带注恶意软件文本构新数据库。 据MAEC词汇表引入一注框架,施于定义恶意软件特征,及一39个带注APT告成之数据库,凡有6,819一句。 又以数据库为模,或助网络安全人,数事剖析。', 'ru': 'Риски кибербезопасности и угрозы вредоносного ПО становятся все более опасными и распространенными. Несмотря на серьезность проблемы, усилия NLP были сосредоточены на решении кибербезопасности. В данной статье мы обсуждаем построение новой базы данных для аннотированных текстов вредоносных программ. На основе словаря MAEC для определения характеристик вредоносных программ внедряется структура аннотаций, а также база данных, состоящая из 39 аннотированных отчетов APT, в которых содержится в общей сложности 6819 предложений. Мы также используем базу данных для создания моделей, которые потенциально могут помочь исследователям кибербезопасности в их усилиях по сбору данных и аналитике.', 'ga': 'Tá rioscaí cibearshlándála agus bagairtí malware ag éirí níos contúirtí agus níos coitianta. In ainneoin déine na faidhbe, is beag iarrachtaí NLP atá dírithe ar dhul i ngleic le cibearshlándáil. Sa pháipéar seo, pléifimid tógáil bunachar sonraí nua le haghaidh téacsanna malware anótáilte. Tugtar isteach creat nótaí bunaithe ar fhoclóir MAEC chun tréithe mailíseacha a shainiú, mar aon le bunachar sonraí ina bhfuil 39 tuairisc APT anótáilte agus iomlán de 6,819 abairt. Bainimid úsáid as an mbunachar sonraí freisin chun samhlacha a chruthú a d’fhéadfadh cabhrú le taighdeoirí cibearshlándála ina gcuid iarrachtaí bailithe sonraí agus anailísíochta.', 'hu': 'A kiberbiztonsági kockázatok és a rosszindulatú programok egyre veszélyesebbé és gyakoribbá válnak. A probléma súlyossága ellenére kevés nemzeti politikai erőfeszítés történt a kiberbiztonság kezelésére összpontosítva. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új adatbázis létrehozását tárgyaljuk a jegyzetelt malware szövegekhez. A MAEC szókincsén alapuló jegyzetelési keretrendszert vezetünk be a rosszindulatú programok jellemzőinek meghatározására, valamint 39 jegyzetelt APT jelentésből álló adatbázis, összesen 6 819 mondattal. Az adatbázist olyan modellek létrehozására is használjuk, amelyek potenciálisan segíthetik a kiberbiztonsági kutatókat az adatgyűjtésben és az elemzésben.', 'el': 'Οι κίνδυνοι ασφάλειας στον κυβερνοχώρο και οι απειλές κακόβουλου λογισμικού γίνονται όλο και πιο επικίνδυνες και συχνές. Παρά τη σοβαρότητα του προβλήματος, υπήρξαν λίγες προσπάθειες για την αντιμετώπιση της ασφάλειας στον κυβερνοχώρο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συζητάμε την κατασκευή μιας νέας βάσης δεδομένων για σχολιασμένα κείμενα κακόβουλου λογισμικού. Ένα πλαίσιο σχολιασμού εισάγεται με βάση το λεξιλόγιο για τον καθορισμό χαρακτηριστικών κακόβουλου λογισμικού, μαζί με μια βάση δεδομένων που αποτελείται από 39 σχολιασμένες αναφορές με συνολικά 6,819 προτάσεις. Χρησιμοποιούμε επίσης τη βάση δεδομένων για την κατασκευή μοντέλων που μπορούν ενδεχομένως να βοηθήσουν τους ερευνητές στον κυβερνοχώρο στη συλλογή δεδομένων και τις προσπάθειες ανάλυσης τους.', 'ka': 'კიბერსუკურობის რისკები და მუშაობელი საზოგადოებები ხდება უფრო საოცხლედ და საერთო. პრობლემის ძალიან ძალიან მარტივია, რამდენიმე NLP-ის ძალადობები იყო, რომლებიც საიბერ-უსაფრთხისთვის გადაწყენება. ჩვენ ახალი ბაზატურის შექმნალის შესახებ შეცდომის ტექსტის შექმნა. MAEC სიტყვებულის ბაზაზე მონიტაციის კონტაქტიების განსაზღვრებისთვის მონიტაციის კონტაქტის გადაყენება, 39 მონიტაციული APT შეტყობინებების განსაზღვრებით დამატებული 6 819 სიტყვები. ჩვენ ასევე გამოყენებთ ბაზატურის მოდენობის შესაძლებლობად მოდელები, რომლებიც შეუძლებელია საიბერსუკური მსწავლობელებს თავის მონაცემების კოლექციაში და', 'it': 'I rischi per la sicurezza informatica e le minacce malware stanno diventando sempre più pericolosi e comuni. Nonostante la gravità del problema, gli sforzi del PNL sono stati limitati per affrontare la cibersicurezza. In questo articolo, discutiamo la costruzione di un nuovo database per i testi malware annotati. Viene introdotto un framework di annotazione basato sul vocabolario MAEC per definire le caratteristiche del malware, insieme a un database composto da 39 report APT annotati per un totale di 6.819 frasi. Utilizziamo il database anche per costruire modelli che possono potenzialmente aiutare i ricercatori della sicurezza informatica nella raccolta dei dati e nelle attività di analisi.', 'kk': 'Кибер қауіпсіздік тәуелдері мен қауіпсіздік тәуелдері көп қауіпсіздік және жалпы болып жатыр. Мәселедің маңыздылығына қарай, сайттың қауіпсіздігін өзгерту үшін NLP көп жұмыс істейді. Бұл қағазда жаңа деректер қорының құрылғысын жаңа мәтіндер үшін талқыладық. Қате жағдайдың қасиеттерін анықтау үшін MAEC сөздігіне негізделген жазбалар қолданылады, 39 жазылған APT хабарламалардың жалпы 6 819 сөздігі бар деректер қорымен. Мұндай-ақ біз деректер қорын қолданып, мәліметтерді жинақтау және аналитикалық әрекеттерінде көмектесетін үлгілерді құру үшін қолданамыз.', 'lt': 'Kibernetinio saugumo rizika ir blogos įrangos grėsmė tampa vis pavojingesnė ir dažnesnė. Nepaisant problemos sunkumo, nedidelė NLP pastangų buvo skirta kovai su kibernetiniu saugumu. Šiame dokumente diskutuojame apie naujos anotuotų blogosios įrangos tekstų duomenų bazės kūrimą. Įdiegta anotacijos sistema, pagrįsta MAEC žodynu, skirtu nustatyti klaidingos įrangos charakteristikas, kartu su duomenų baze, kurią sudaro 39 anotuotos APT ataskaitos, iš viso 6 819 sakiniai. Taip pat naudojame duomenų bazę modeliams, kurie galėtų padėti kibernetinio saugumo mokslininkams rinkti ir analizuoti duomenis.', 'ms': 'Risiko keselamatan siber dan ancaman malware semakin berbahaya dan umum. Walaupun masalah ini serius, terdapat sedikit usaha NLP yang fokus pada menangani keselamatan siber. In this paper, we discuss the construction of a new database for annotated malware texts.  Maklumat anotasi diperkenalkan berdasarkan vokbulari MAEC untuk menentukan ciri-ciri perisian malware, bersama dengan pangkalan data yang mengandungi 39 laporan APT anotasi dengan jumlah 6,819 kalimat. Kami juga menggunakan pangkalan data untuk membina model yang boleh membantu peneliti keselamatan siber dalam usaha koleksi data dan analitik mereka.', 'ml': 'സൈബര്\u200d സുരക്ഷാധികാരികളുടെ അപകടത്തിലും, തെറ്റുവാര്\u200d ഭീഷണങ്ങളും വളരെ അപകടത്തിലായിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ ഗുരുതരമാണെങ്കിലും സൈബെര്\u200d സെക്യൂരിറ്റിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് ശ്രമം കുറച്ച് എംഎല്\u200d ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാബേസ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനെ സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. മാല്\u200dവെയര്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ മാല്\u200dവെയര്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dവചിക്കുന്നതിനായി MAEC പദവിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു അറ്റാന്റേഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മൊത്തം 6,819 ഡേറ്റാബേസില്\u200d നാം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്കേറ്റ് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ', 'mk': 'Ризиките за кибер-безбедност и заканите за злоупотреба стануваат сé поголеми и чесни. И покрај сериозноста на проблемот, има малку напори на НЛП фокусирани на решавањето на кибер-безбедноста. Во овој весник, дискутираме за изградбата на нова база на податоци за анотирани тексти за малопрема. Се воведува рамка за анотација базирана на речникот MAEC за дефинирање на характеристиките на масоварот, заедно со база на податоци која се состои од 39 анотирани извештаи за APT со вкупно 6.819 реченици. Ние, исто така, ја користиме базата на податоци за да изградиме модели кои потенцијално можат да им помогнат на истражувачите за кибербезбедност во нивните напори за собирање податоци и аналитика.', 'mt': 'Ir-riskji taċ-ċibersigurtà u t-theddid tal-malware qed isiru dejjem aktar perikolużi u komuni. Minkejja s-severità tal-problema, kien hemm ftit sforzi tal-NLP iffukati fuq l-indirizzar taċ-ċibersigurtà. In this paper, we discuss the construction of a new database for annotated malware texts.  Qafas ta’ annotazzjoni huwa introdott ibbażat fuq il-vokabulari MAEC għad-definizzjoni tal-karatteristiċi tal-malware, flimkien ma’ database li tikkonsisti minn 39 rapport APT annotat b’total ta’ 6,819 sentenza. Aħna nużaw ukoll id-database biex nibnu mudelli li jistgħu potenzjalment jgħinu lir-riċerkaturi taċ-ċibersigurtà fl-isforzi tagħhom għall-ġbir tad-dejta u l-analiżi.', 'pl': 'Zagrożenia cyberbezpieczeństwa i złośliwego oprogramowania stają się coraz bardziej niebezpieczne i powszechne. Pomimo powagi problemu, niewiele wysiłków NLP skupiło się na rozwiązaniu cyberbezpieczeństwa. W niniejszym artykule omówimy budowę nowej bazy danych dla adnotacji tekstów złośliwego oprogramowania. Wprowadzono framework adnotacji oparty na słownictwie MAEC do definiowania cech złośliwego oprogramowania wraz z bazą danych składającą się z 39 adnotacji raportów APT z łącznie 6,819 zdań. Wykorzystujemy również bazę danych do tworzenia modeli, które mogą potencjalnie pomóc badaczom cyberbezpieczeństwa w gromadzeniu danych i analizie.', 'ro': 'Riscurile de securitate cibernetică și amenințările malware devin din ce în ce mai periculoase și frecvente. În ciuda severității problemei, au existat puține eforturi în cadrul PNL axate pe abordarea securității cibernetice. În această lucrare, discutăm construirea unei noi baze de date pentru textele malware adnotate. Este introdus un cadru de adnotare bazat pe vocabularul MAEC pentru definirea caracteristicilor malware, împreună cu o bază de date formată din 39 de rapoarte APT adnotate cu un total de 6.819 propoziții. De asemenea, utilizăm baza de date pentru a construi modele care pot ajuta cercetătorii de securitate cibernetică în eforturile lor de colectare și analiză a datelor.', 'mn': 'Цибер аюулгүй байдал болон буруу хувьд аюултай болж байна. Энэ асуудлын хүнд хэцүү хэдий ч, цахилгаан аюулгүй байдлыг зогсоохын тулд НЛП-ын тухай хэдэн хичээл төвлөрсөн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зурагт шинэ өгөгдлийн сан барилгыг ярьж байна. MAEC үг дээр зэвхөн зэвхөн хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө өгөгдлийн сан болон 39 анзаарсан APT мэдээллийг нийт 6 819 өгүүлбэртэй байдаг. Бид мөн өгөгдлийн сангийн санг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн цуглуулалт, анализ хичээлд цахилгаан аюулгүй судлаачид туслах загваруудыг бүтээхэд ашигладаг.', 'si': 'සයිබර් සුරක්ෂාත්මක අවධානයක් සහ අපරාධ අවධානයක් වඩා භයානක වෙනවා සහ සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් වැදගත් නමුත්, NLP ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කිහිපයක් තියෙනවා සයිබර් සුරක්ෂිතත්වය සටන් කරන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් දත්තස්ථාවක් නිර්මාණය කතා කරනවා අලුත් දත්තස්ථාවක් විතරයි. මැල්වේර් වර්ගයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න MAEC වාර්තාවක් වලින් අධාරිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඩේටාබේස් එක්ක 39 කිරීම් APT වාර්තාවක් සම්පූ අපි ඒවගේම ඩේටාබේස් එක්ක පාවිච්චි කරනවා මොඩේල් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම සයිබර්ස්කුරීට් පරීක්ෂකයන්ට උදව්', 'so': 'Xaaladaha ammaanka ee Internetka iyo hanjayinka khatar iyo caadi ah ayaa badnaanaya. Inta kastoo ay dhibaatada adag tahay, waxaa jirtay in yar oo ka mid ah shaqaalaha NLP oo ku kalsoonaaday xafiiska ammaanka Internetka. Warqaddan waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa dhismaha aasaaska cusub ee warqadaha qalabka laga isticmaalay. Qoraalka wargelinta waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa hadalka MAEC oo lagu qorayo aqoonta xarumaha malware, waxaana lagu soo bandhigayaa warqadaha APT oo ku qoran dhamaan 6,819 imtixaan. Sidoo kale waxaynu u isticmaalnaa basaaska macluumaadka si aan u dhisno modelal, kaas oo si suurtagal ah u caawinaya baaritaanka nabadgelyada shabakadda ee ururka macluumaadka iyo baaritaanka.', 'sr': 'Rizike za sajber sigurnost i neprijateljske prijetnje postaju sve opasnije i zajedničke. Uprkos teškosti problema, bilo je nekoliko napora NLP-a usredotočenih na rješavanje kiberbezbednosti. U ovom papiru razgovaramo o izgradnji nove baze podataka za annotirane tekstove malvera. Uveden je okvir za annotaciju na osnovu rečnika MAEC za definisanje karakteristika malvera, zajedno sa bazom podataka koja se sastoji od 39 izveštaja APT-a sa ukupnim 6 819 rečenica. Takođe koristimo bazu podataka da izgradimo modele koji mogu potencijalno pomoći istraživačima sajber sigurnosti u njihovim kolekcijama podataka i analitičkim naporima.', 'sv': 'Cybersäkerhetsrisker och hot mot skadlig kod blir allt farligare och vanligare. Trots problemets allvar har det gjorts få insatser inom det nationella handlingsprogrammet för att ta itu med cybersäkerhet. I denna uppsats diskuterar vi byggandet av en ny databas för kommenterade malware-texter. Ett kommenteringsramverk införs baserat på MAEC-ordförrådet för att definiera skadliga egenskaper, tillsammans med en databas bestående av 39 kommenterade APT-rapporter med totalt 6 819 meningar. Vi använder också databasen för att konstruera modeller som potentiellt kan hjälpa cybersäkerhetsforskare i deras datainsamling och analys.', 'ta': 'சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு ஆபத்துகள் மற்றும் தவறான பயமுறுத்தல் அதிகமாக ஆபத்தானதாகவும் பொதுவாகவும் வருகிறது. பிரச்சினையின் கடுமையான முயற்சி இருந்தாலும், சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பதற்கு கவனம் செலுத்தும் சி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தின் உருவாக்கத்தை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் குறிப்பிட்ட தவறான உரைகளு ஒரு அறிவிப்பு சட்டம் MAEC சொல்வளத்தை வரையறுக்கும் பொருளால் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, மொத்தமாக 6,819 வாக்கியங்களுடன் 39 அறிகுறிப்பிடப்பட்ட APT அறிக் நாம் தரவுத்தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது சாத்தியமாக வலைப்பெயர் பாதுகாப்பு ஆராய்ச்சி', 'no': 'Cybersecurity risks and malware threats are becoming increasingly dangerous and common. Til tross viktigheten av problemet har det vært få NLP-forsøk fokusert på å løysa sybersecurity. I denne papiret diskuterer vi om bygging av ein ny database for merkte malvaretekstar. Ein notasjonsrammeverk vert introdusert basert på MAEC- ordboka for å definera malvare- karakteristikk, saman med ein database som inneheld 39 notasjonsrapporter med totalt 6 819 setningar. Vi bruker også databasen for å konstruere modeller som kan potensielt hjelpa til sybersecurity researchers i datasamlinga og analytiske forsøk.', 'ur': 'سایر محفوظت خطرات اور خطرات زیادہ خطرناک اور مشکل ہو رہے ہیں۔ اس مشکل کی سختی کے بغیر، بہت کم NLP کی کوشش تھی جو سایر امنیت کے ساتھ مشکل کرتی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی ڈیٹابیس بنانے کے بارے میں مشورہ کیا ہے کہ مہلواری ٹیکسٹوں کے لئے۔ مالویر کی خصوصیات تعریف کرنے کے لئے MAEC vocabulary پر بنیاد رکھا گیا ہے، ایک ڈیٹابیس کے ساتھ 39 مطلع APT راپورٹوں میں شامل ہوا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ڈیٹائیس کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ موڈل بنا سکتے ہیں جو سیبری امنیت تحقیقات کرنے والوں کی مدد کرسکتے ہیں ان کے ڈیٹائیس کالکتر اور تحلیل کی کوشش میں۔', 'uz': "Name Despite the severity of the problem, there has been few NLP efforts focused on tackling cybersecurity.  Bu qogʻozda, biz yolg'on yozuvlar matnlari uchun yangi maʼlumot bazasini yaratishni talab qilamiz. Name Biz haqida maʼlumotlar bazasini ishlatamiz, imkoniyatlarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Nguy cơ mạng và hiểm họa đang trở nên ngày càng nguy hiểm và phổ biến. Bất chấp sự nghiêm trọng của vấn đề, đã có rất ít nỗ lực của Đảng NLP nhằm nhằm giải quyết an ninh mạng. Trong tờ báo này, chúng ta thảo luận về việc xây dựng một cơ sở dữ liệu mới về mã độc. Một hệ thống ghi chú được nhập vào dựa trên vốn từ MAV để xác định các đặc trưng của virus, cùng với một cơ sở dữ liệu gồm cả 39 các báo cáo APT được ghi chú với mức độ 6,819. Chúng tôi cũng dùng cơ sở dữ liệu để xây dựng các mô hình có thể giúp các nhà nghiên cứu an ninh mạng trong việc thu thập dữ liệu và phân tích.', 'da': 'Cybersikkerhedsrisici og malware trusler bliver stadig mere farlige og almindelige. På trods af problemets alvor har der været få bestræbelser på at tackle cybersikkerhed i NLP. I denne artikel diskuterer vi opbygningen af en ny database til annoterede malware-tekster. Der indføres en annoteringsramme baseret på MAEC ordforråd til definition af malware egenskaber, sammen med en database bestående af 39 annoterede APT-rapporter med i alt 6.819 sætninger. Vi bruger også databasen til at konstruere modeller, der potentielt kan hjælpe cybersikkerhedsforskere i deres dataindsamling og analyseindsats.', 'nl': "Cyberbeveiligingsrisico's en malwarebedreigingen worden steeds gevaarlijker en komen steeds vaker voor. Ondanks de ernst van het probleem zijn er weinig NLP-inspanningen gericht op het aanpakken van cybersecurity. In dit artikel bespreken we de bouw van een nieuwe database voor geannoteerde malwareteksten. Een annotatie framework wordt geïntroduceerd op basis van de MAEC woordenschat voor het definiëren van malware kenmerken, samen met een database bestaande uit 39 annotatie APT rapporten met een totaal van 6,819 zinnen. We gebruiken de database ook om modellen te maken die cybersecurity-onderzoekers kunnen helpen bij het verzamelen en analyseren van gegevens.", 'hr': 'Rizike za sajber sigurnost i opasne prijetnje postaju sve opasnije i češće. Unatoč težini problema, malo napora NLP-a usredotočenih je na rješavanje kibersigurnosti. U ovom papiru razgovaramo o izgradnji nove baze podataka za annotirane tekste malware a. Uveden je okvir oznake na temelju rečnika MAEC-a za definiranje karakteristika malvera, zajedno s bazom podataka koja se sastoji od 39 izvještaja APT-a s ukupnim 6 819 rečenica. Također koristimo bazu podataka da izgradimo modele koji mogu potencijalno pomoći istraživačima za sajber sigurnost u njihovim kolekcijama podataka i analitičkim naporima.', 'bg': 'Рисковете за киберсигурността и заплахите от злонамерен софтуер стават все по-опасни и често срещани. Въпреки сериозността на проблема има малко усилия за НЛП, насочени към справяне с киберсигурността. В тази статия обсъждаме изграждането на нова база данни за анотирани злонамерени текстове. Въведена е рамка за анотация, базирана на речника за определяне на характеристиките на зловредния софтуер, заедно с база данни, състояща се от 39 анотирани доклада с общо 6 819 изречения. Също така използваме базата данни, за да изградим модели, които потенциално могат да помогнат на изследователите в областта на киберсигурността в усилията им за събиране и анализ на данни.', 'de': 'Cybersicherheitsrisiken und Malware-Bedrohungen werden immer gefährlicher und häufiger. Trotz der Schwere des Problems gab es nur wenige NLP-Bemühungen, die sich auf die Bekämpfung der Cybersicherheit konzentrierten. In diesem Beitrag diskutieren wir den Aufbau einer neuen Datenbank für kommentierte Malware-Texte. Ein Annotationsframework, das auf dem MAEC-Vokabular basiert, wird eingeführt, um Malware-Eigenschaften zu definieren, zusammen mit einer Datenbank bestehend aus 39 annotierten APT-Berichten mit insgesamt 6.819 Sätzen. Wir nutzen die Datenbank auch, um Modelle zu erstellen, die Cybersicherheitsforschern bei ihrer Datenerhebung und -analyse helfen können.', 'ko': '네트워크 보안 위험과 악성 소프트웨어 위협이 갈수록 위험해지고 흔해지고 있다.비록 문제가 매우 심각하지만 NLP는 네트워크 안전 문제를 해결하는 데 매우 드물게 노력한다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 데이터베이스 구축에 대한 주석 악성 소프트웨어 텍스트를 토론했다.MAEC 어휘표를 기반으로 한 주석 프레임워크를 소개했는데 악성 소프트웨어의 특징을 정의하고 주석이 달린 APT 보고서 39개로 구성된 데이터베이스로 총 6819마디가 있다.우리는 또한 이 데이터베이스 구축 모델을 사용하는데 이런 모델은 네트워크 안전 연구원들의 데이터 수집과 분석에 도움이 될 수 있다.', 'id': 'Risiko keselamatan cyber dan ancaman malware semakin berbahaya dan umum. Meskipun masalah serius, ada sedikit usaha NLP yang fokus pada menangani keamanan cyber. Dalam koran ini, kita mendiskusikan pembangunan database baru untuk teks malware anotasi. Sebuah struktur anotasi diperkenalkan berdasarkan vokbulari MAEC untuk mendefinisikan karakteristik malware, bersama dengan database yang terdiri dari 39 laporan APT anotasi dengan total 6.819 kalimat. Kami juga menggunakan pangkalan data untuk membangun model yang berpotensi dapat membantu peneliti keselamatan cyber dalam usaha koleksi data dan analitik mereka.', 'fa': 'خطرات امنیت سایبر و تهدیدهای بدی بیشتر خطرناک و مشترک می شوند. با وجود شدت مشکل، چند تا تلاش NLP بر حل امنیت سایبر تمرکز شده است. در این کاغذ، ما در مورد ساختن یک داده\u200cبان جدید برای متن\u200cهای مالواری مشخص صحبت می\u200cکنیم. یک چهارچوب نویسندگی بر اساس کلمه MAEC برای تعریف ویژگی\u200cهای malware، همراه با یک داده\u200cبانی که شامل 39 گزارش\u200cهای APT یادآوری شده با جمعیت 6.819 جمله است، معرفی می\u200cشود. ما همچنین از داده\u200cbase استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مدل\u200cهایی بسازیم که می\u200cتوانند به محققان محافظت سایبر در تلاش داده\u200cها و تحلیل\u200cکنندگان کمک کنند.', 'tr': 'Iber güvenlik riskleri we hassas tehditleri hem howply we orta bolýar. Meseläniň kynçylyklygyna rağmen, syber güýçlerini çözmek üçin NLP çabalary az bolup geçdi. Bu kagyzda, nusgalan malware metinleri üçin täze bir databank inşalygyny gürrüň edýäris Malware hasaplaryny tanyşdyrmak üçin MAEC sözlerine daýanýar. 39 hasaplanýan APT hasaplarynyň toplamy 6,819 sözlerine daýanýar. Biz hem daýasynyň maglumaty bilen we analitik çabalarynda kiýer güýçli barlamalaryna kömek edip biljek modelleri in şa etmek üçin ulanýarys.', 'am': 'የሲበር ደህንነት መከራ እና የስህተት ዛቻዎች እየጨመረ የሚያስፈራራ እና የተቀናቀሉ ናቸው፡፡ የጭንቀት ግንኙነት ምንም እንኳ፣ የኢንተርኔት ደህንነት ለመቀላቀል ጥቂቶች የኤንLP ጥያቄዎች አሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የዳታ ቤትን ለመሥራት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የMAEC ቋንቋ-ቋንቋን ለመግለጥ፣ የ39 የአፍሪካ ሪፖርት በሙሉ 6,819 ክፍል የተጠቃሚ አካባቢ ካለው ከዳታ ቤት ጋር በመጠቀም የሚያስታወቀው የአፍሪካ ድረ ገጽ ነው፡፡ የዳታ መቀመጫውን እና በዳታ ሰብስብ እና አስተያየት ጥያቄዎችን ለመሥራት የሚችሉትን የኔበር ደህንነት አስተማሪዎችን ለመግለጽ እንጠይቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Sibersekuriteit risikoe en ongelukkige verskrifte word verminder gevaarlik en gemeenskap. Terwyl die swaardheid van die probleem is, is daar 'n paar NLP versoekte gefokus op die probleem van sybersekuriteit. In hierdie papier, ons bespreek die konstruksie van 'n nuwe databasis vir annotated malware tekste. 'n Notasie Raamwerk is ingevoer gebaseer op die MAEC woordeboek vir definieer malware karakteristieke, saam met 'n databasis wat bestaan van 39 notateerde APT raporte met 'n totaal van 6,819 setinge. Ons gebruik ook die databasis om modele te konstrukteer wat potensieel sybersekuriteit-resekers in hul data versameling en analitiese versoekte kan help.", 'sq': 'Rrezicet e sigurisë kibernetike dhe kërcënimet e malware po bëhen gjithnjë e më të rrezikshme dhe të zakonshme. Megjithë rëndësinë e problemit, ka pasur pak përpjekje të NLP-së të përqëndruara në trajtimin e sigurisë kibernetike. Në këtë letër, diskutojmë ndërtimin e një baze të dhënash të re për tekstet e anotuara të malware. Një kuadër anotacioni futet bazuar në fjalorin MAEC për përcaktimin e karakteristikave të malware së bashku me një bazë të dhënash që përbëhet nga 39 raporte APT të anotuara me një total prej 6,819 fjalësh. Ne përdorim gjithashtu bazën e dhënave për të ndërtuar modele që mund të ndihmojnë kërkuesit e sigurisë kibernetike në përpjekjet e tyre të mbledhjes së të dhënave dhe analitikës.', 'sw': 'Hatari za usalama wa Mtandao na vitisho vya vifaa vinaendelea kuwa hatari na kwa kawaida. Pamoja na umuhimu wa tatizo hilo, kumekuwa na jitihada chache za NLP zinazolenga kupambana na usalama wa mtandaoni. Katika karatasi hii, tunajadili ujenzi wa database mpya kwa kutumia ujumbe wa vifaa vya vibaya. Mfumo wa matangazo unaanzishwa kwa msingi wa lugha ya MAEC kwa ajili ya kuelezea sifa za zana za vifaa, pamoja na kituo cha data kinachojumuisha taarifa 39 zilizotajwa na APT yenye hukumu ya jumla 6,819. Pia tunatumia database ili kujenga mifano ambayo inaweza kusaidia watafiti wa usalama wa mtandaoni katika juhudi zao za kukusanya data na uchambuzi.', 'hy': 'Կիբեր ապահովության ռիսկերը և սխալ ծրագրերի սպառնալիքները դառնում են ավելի վտանգավոր և ընդհանուր: Չնայած խնդրի ծանրությանը, շատ քիչ ջանքեր են կատարվել, որոնք կենտրոնացել են համացանցային ապահովության լուծման վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք քննարկում ենք նոր բազայի կառուցվածքը annoted սխալ ծրագրերի տեքստերի համար: Նոտացիայի կառուցվածք ներկայացվում է MAE բառարանի հիմնականությամբ սխալ ծրագրի հատկանիշների սահմանման համար, ինչպես նաև համակարգչային տվյալների հիմքում, որը կազմում է 39 annoտացված APT-ի զեկույցներ, որոնց ընդհանուր թիվը Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք բազայերը կառուցելու մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են պոտենցիալ օգնել կիբերանվստահության հետազոտողներին իրենց տվյալների հավաքելու և վերլուծության ջանքերի մեջ:', 'bs': 'Riziki za sajber sigurnost i neprijateljske prijetnje postaju sve opasniji i zajednički. Uprkos teškosti problema, bilo je nekoliko napora NLP-a usredotočenih na rješavanje kiberbezbednosti. U ovom papiru razgovaramo o izgradnji nove baze podataka za annotirane tekste malvera. Uveden je okvir za annotaciju na temelju rečnika MAEC za definiranje karakteristika malvera, zajedno sa bazom podataka koja se sastoji od 39 izvještaja APT-a s ukupnim 6 819 rečenica. Također koristimo bazu podataka da izgradimo modele koji mogu potencijalno pomoći istraživačima sajber sigurnosti u njihovim kolekcijama podataka i analitičkim naporima.', 'az': 'Siberi təhlükəsizlik riskləri və malware təhlükəsizləri daha tehlikeli və ortaq olduqları halda. Bu problemin ağırlığına rağmen, sajber təhlükəsizliyi çəkmək üçün NLP çabaları çox az idi. Bu kağızda, məlumatlar üçün yeni bir database inşallarını mübahisə edirik. Malware xüsusiyyətlərini tanımlamaq üçün MAEC sözlərinə dayandırılır, 39 notalı APT raportları ilə birlikdə 39,819 cümlələrlə birlikdə dağlar vasitəsilə birlikdə istifadə edilir. Biz də verilənlərin koleksiyonlarında və analitik çabalarında səbəb təhlükəsizlərinə kömək edə bilən modelləri in şa etmək üçün databanı istifadə edirik.', 'bn': 'সাইবার নিরাপত্তা বিপদ এবং ভুলওয়্যার হুমকি বেশি বিপদজনক এবং সাধারণ। সমস্যার কঠোর সত্ত্বেও সাইবার নিরাপত্তার বিরুদ্ধে মনোযোগ প্রদান করা কয়েকটি এনএলপি চেষ্টা করেছে। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাবেস নির্মাণ নির্মাণের বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করি। মালওয়্যার বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্ধারণের জন্য MAEC শব্দভাণ্ডারের ভিত্তিতে একটি বিজ্ঞাপনের ফ্রেম চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে ৩৯ টি বিখ্যাত এপিটি রিপ আমরা ডাটাবেস ব্যবহার করি তাদের তথ্য সংগ্রহ এবং বিশ্লেষণের প্রচেষ্টায় সাইবার নিরাপত্তা গবেষকদের সাহায্য করতে পারি।', 'ca': "Els riscs de cibersiguretat i les amenaces de malware s'estan tornant cada cop més perilloses i comunes. Malgrat la gravetat del problema, hi ha hagut pocs esforços del PNL centrats en tractar la cibersiguretat. En aquest article, parlem de la construcció d'una nova base de dades per a textos anotats de malware. Es introdueix un marc d'anotació basat en el vocabulari MAEC per definir les característiques del malware, juntament amb una base de dades composta de 39 informes APT anotats amb un total de 6.819 frases. També utilitzem la base de dades per construir models que poden ajudar potencialment als investigadors de cibersiguretat en els seus esforços de col·lecció de dades i analítica.", 'fi': 'Kyberturvallisuusriskit ja haittaohjelmauhat ovat yhä vaarallisempia ja yleisempiä. Ongelman vakavuudesta huolimatta NLP:ssä on keskitytty vain vähän kyberturvallisuuteen. Tässä artikkelissa keskustelemme uuden tietokannan rakentamisesta huomautuksilla varustettuihin haittaohjelmateksteihin. MAEC-sanastoon pohjautuva huomautuskehys haittaohjelmien ominaisuuksien määrittelyyn sekä tietokanta, joka koostuu 39 merkinnällä varustetusta APT-raportista, joissa on yhteensä 6 819 lausetta. Tietokannan avulla rakennamme myös malleja, jotka voivat mahdollisesti auttaa kyberturvallisuustutkijoita tiedonkeruussa ja analytiikassa.', 'cs': 'Rizika kybernetické bezpečnosti a hrozby malwaru jsou stále nebezpečnější a běžnější. Navzdory závažnosti problému existuje málo snah NLP zaměřených na řešení kybernetické bezpečnosti. V tomto článku se zabýváme výstavbou nové databáze pro anotované malwarové texty. Na základě slovní zásoby MAEC je představen anotace framework pro definování charakteristik malwaru a databáze sestávající z 39 anotovaných APT reportů s celkem 6,819 vět. Databázi využíváme také k vytváření modelů, které mohou potenciálně pomoci výzkumníkům kybernetické bezpečnosti při sběru dat a analýze.', 'et': 'Küberturvalisuse riskid ja pahavara ohud muutuvad üha ohtlikumaks ja levinumaks. Probleemi tõsidusest hoolimata on uue arenguprogrammi jõupingutusi tehtud vähe, mis on keskendunud küberjulgeoleku vastu võitlemisele. Käesolevas artiklis arutame uue andmebaasi loomist märgitud pahavara tekstide jaoks. Tutvustatakse MAEC sõnavara alusel anotatsiooniraamistik pahavara omaduste määratlemiseks ning andmebaas, mis koosneb 39 annoteeritud APT aruandest kokku 6819 lausega. Samuti kasutame andmebaasi mudelite loomiseks, mis võivad aidata küberturvalisuse teadlasi andmete kogumisel ja analüüsimisel.', 'jv': 'Pirak-perusahaan sing peringatan kanggo ngerasahan Winter kuwi peringatan pakan lan pakan-pakan Nanging kabèh severity mengko perbudhakan, durung durung durung durung sembarang NLP kang dipoleh kapan kang angkang sawisirno. Language UnknownMonitor vendor Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem dadi kanggo nggawe model sing bisa nguasai perusahaan kamulayan perusahaan winih kanggo sampek dadi lan susahé panelusuran', 'ha': "Hazarar tsarin Kijeriya da wa'adin misware sun kasance yana ƙara faro da kawaici. Inã rantsuwa da mafi tsananin masĩfa, an sami aikin NLP da muhimmi zuwa ga tacilin tsarin cyberspace. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya ka samun wani bango na zalum wa matsayin misware. An introduce wani firam mai zartar da shi a kan maganar MAEC wa define sifatinin misware, da kuma a sami wani bango na ƙunsa da 39 da aka sanar da shi na rubutun PAT da duk takardar 6,819. Kayya, Muke amfani da database don mu samun misãlai, waɗanda ke iya ƙaranci iya taimakon watan masu tsari na cybera cikin kasaban data da analytiya.", 'sk': 'Tveganja kibernetske varnosti in grožnje z zlonamerno programsko opremo postajajo vedno bolj nevarna in pogosta. Kljub resnosti problema je bilo malo prizadevanj za reševanje kibernetske varnosti osredotočenih na NLP. V tem članku obravnavamo gradnjo nove baze podatkov za besedila z oznakami zlonamerne programske opreme. Uveden je okvir za opombe, ki temelji na besedišču MAEC za opredelitev značilnosti zlonamerne programske opreme, skupaj z bazo podatkov, sestavljeno iz 39 poročil APT z opombe skupaj 6.819 stavkov. Zbirko podatkov uporabljamo tudi za oblikovanje modelov, ki lahko potencialno pomagajo raziskovalcem kibernetske varnosti pri zbiranju in analitiki podatkov.', 'he': 'סיכונים של ביטחון קיbernetic ואיומים של תכונות רעות הופכים מסוכנים ומפורסמים יותר ויותר. למרות הקשה של הבעיה, היו מעט מאמצים של NLP שמוקדים על להתמודד עם ביטחון סייבר. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מדברים על בניית מסד נתונים חדש לטקסטים של תכונות רעות. מסגרת ציונים מוצגת מבוססת על מילון MAEC כדי להגדיר אופיינים של תכונות קשה, יחד עם מסד נתונים שמכיל 39 דיווחים APT מצוינים עם בסך הכל 6,819 משפטים. אנחנו גם משתמשים במאגר הנתונים כדי לבנות דוגמנים שיכולים לעזור לחקרי בטחון קיbernetic באיסוף הנתונים שלהם ומאמצי אנליטיקה.', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་སྲུང་སྐྱོབ་དང་ཐབས་ལམ་གནོད་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། དཀའ་ངལ་དེ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་དུས་ངེས་པར། NLP་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ཉུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐོང་བ་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འོང་ཚོས་ས annotated malware་ཡིག་གི་བཟོ་བརྗོད་གཞི་རྟེན་གསར་བ An annotation framework is introduced based on the MAEC vocabulary for defining malware characteristics, along with a database consisting of 39 annotated APT reports with a total of 6,819 sentences. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩིས་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་མཁན'}
{'en': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'ar': 'مجموعة من التنقيحات المشروحة لدراسة الكتابة الجدلية', 'es': 'Un corpus de revisiones anotadas para estudiar la escritura argumentativa', 'fr': "Un corpus de révisions annotées pour l'étude de l'écriture argumentative", 'pt': 'Um corpus de revisões anotadas para estudar a escrita argumentativa', 'hi': 'तर्कपूर्ण लेखन का अध्ययन करने के लिए एनोटेटेड संशोधनों का एक कॉर्पस', 'ja': '論証的執筆を研究するための注釈付き改訂のコーパス', 'zh': '以研议论文注修语料库', 'ru': 'Корпус аннотированных редакций для изучения аргументативного письма', 'ga': 'Corpas Athbhreithnithe Anótáilte chun Staidéar a Dhéanamh Ar Scríbhneoireacht Argóinteach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα Σώμα σχολιασμένων αναθεωρήσεων για τη μελέτη της επιχειρηματολογικής γραφής', 'hu': 'A jegyzetelt felülvizsgálatok testülete az érvelő írás tanulmányozásához', 'lt': 'Ataskaitinių persvarstymų, skirtų argumentaciniam rašymui studijuoti, korpusas', 'ms': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'it': 'Un corpus di revisioni annotate per lo studio della scrittura argomentativa', 'kk': 'Аргументтік жазуды оқу үшін жарияланған редакциялардың корпус', 'mk': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'mt': 'Korp ta’ Reviżjonijiet Annotati għall-Istudju tal-Kiri Argumentattiv', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Korpus Annotowanych Rewizji do Studiowania Pisania Argumentatywnego', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആർഗമെന്റിവ് എഴുതുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കൊര്\u200dപ്പുസ്', 'ro': 'Un corp de revizii adnotate pentru studiul scrierii argumentative', 'sr': 'Korpus Annotated Revisions za proučavanje argumentativnog pisanja', 'mn': 'Аргментатив бичих судалгаанд анзаарсан шинэчлэлүүдийн корпус', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En korpus av kommenterade revideringar för att studera argumentativt skrivande', 'so': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một Tập Đoàn các bản thảo luận đã chú thích để nghiên cứu văn chương', 'bg': 'Корпус от анотирани ревизии за изучаване на аргументативното писане', 'nl': 'Een korpus van geannoteerde herzieningen voor het bestuderen van argumentatief schrijven', 'da': 'Et korpus af kommenterede revisioner til at studere argumentativt skrift', 'hr': 'Corpus Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'de': 'Ein Korpus von kommentierten Revisionen zum Studium des argumentativen Schreibens', 'id': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'ko': '의논문을 연구하는 데 쓰이는 주석 수정 어료 라이브러리', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Korpus ya Mapinduzi ya Tamko kwa ajili ya Kusoma Makubaliano ya Kuandika', 'sq': 'Një korpus revisionesh të anotuara për studimin e shkrimit argumentues', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for studying Argumentative Writing', 'am': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'az': 'Argumentatl캼 Yaz캼l캼m캼 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Annotated Revisions Corpus', 'hy': 'Արգեմետատիվ գրության ուսումնասիրության նշումների մի կորպուս', 'bn': 'শিক্ষা আর্গুমেন্টেটিভ লেখার জন্য একটি কোর্পাস অফ সংক্রান্ত রিভিশন', 'bs': 'Korpus Annotated Revisions za proučavanje Argumentativnog pisanja', 'cs': 'Korpus anotovaných revizí pro studium argumentativního psaní', 'ca': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'et': 'Argumentatiivse kirjutamise uurimise korpus annoteeritud paranduste korpus', 'fi': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing', 'he': 'קורפוס של שינויים נכתבים ללימוד כתיבה מתווכחת', 'jv': 'A', 'sk': 'Korpus opisanih revizij za študij argumentativnega pisanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Corpus of Annotated Revisions for Studying Argumentative Writing'}
{'en': 'This paper presents ArgRewrite, a corpus of between-draft revisions of argumentative essays. Drafts are manually aligned at the sentence level, and the writer’s purpose for each revision is annotated with categories analogous to those used in argument mining and discourse analysis. The corpus should enable advanced research in writing comparison and revision analysis, as demonstrated via our own studies of student revision behavior and of automatic revision purpose prediction.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة ArgRewrite ، وهي مجموعة من التنقيحات بين مسودات المقالات الجدلية. تتم محاذاة المسودات يدويًا على مستوى الجملة ، ويتم شرح غرض الكاتب من كل مراجعة بفئات مماثلة لتلك المستخدمة في التنقيب عن الجدل وتحليل الخطاب. يجب أن تمكّن المجموعة البحثية المتقدمة في كتابة المقارنة وتحليل المراجعة ، كما هو موضح من خلال دراساتنا الخاصة بسلوك مراجعة الطلاب والتنبؤ التلقائي لغرض المراجعة.', 'fr': "Cet article présente ArgreWrite, un corpus de révisions entre projets d'essais argumentatifs. Les brouillons sont alignés manuellement au niveau de la phrase, et l'objectif du rédacteur pour chaque révision est annoté avec des catégories analogues à celles utilisées dans l'exploration d'arguments et l'analyse du discours. Le corpus devrait permettre des recherches avancées en matière de comparaison d'écriture et d'analyse de révision, comme le démontrent nos propres études sur le comportement des étudiants en révision et la prédiction automatique des objectifs de révision.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta ArgRewrite, um corpus de revisões entre rascunhos de ensaios argumentativos. Os rascunhos são alinhados manualmente no nível da frase, e o propósito do escritor para cada revisão é anotado com categorias análogas às usadas na mineração de argumentos e na análise do discurso. O corpus deve permitir pesquisas avançadas em comparação de escrita e análise de revisão, como demonstrado por meio de nossos próprios estudos do comportamento de revisão do aluno e da previsão de propósito de revisão automática.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta ArgreWrite, un corpus de revisiones entre borradores de ensayos argumentativos. Los borradores se alinean manualmente a nivel de oración, y el propósito del escritor para cada revisión se anota con categorías análogas a las utilizadas en la minería de argumentos y el análisis del discurso. El corpus debe permitir la investigación avanzada en la comparación de la escritura y el análisis de revisión, como lo demuestran nuestros propios estudios sobre el comportamiento de revisión de los estudiantes y la predicción automática del propósito de la revisión.', 'ja': 'この論文は、論証的エッセイの草案間改訂のコーパスであるArgRewriteを紹介している。下書きは文章レベルで手動で整列され、各改訂のためのライターの目的は、引数マイニングおよび話題分析で使用されるカテゴリに類似したカテゴリで注釈されます。コーパスは、学習者の改訂行動と自動改訂目的予測の独自の研究を通じて示されているように、書面による比較と改訂分析の高度な研究を可能にする必要がある。', 'zh': '本文介 ArgRewrite,议论文修订稿之语料库也。 草稿在句手动对齐,每所修订,以类论掘掘语析中用之类注释之。 语料库宜高加研析,如吾徒复习之行,复习之研究所验也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ArgRewrite प्रस्तुत करता है, तर्कसंगत निबंधों के बीच-मसौदा संशोधनों का एक कॉर्पस। ड्राफ्ट को वाक्य स्तर पर मैन्युअल रूप से संरेखित किया जाता है, और प्रत्येक संशोधन के लिए लेखक का उद्देश्य तर्क खनन और प्रवचन विश्लेषण में उपयोग किए जाने वाले लोगों के अनुरूप श्रेणियों के साथ एनोटेट किया जाता है। कॉर्पस को तुलना और संशोधन विश्लेषण लिखने में उन्नत अनुसंधान को सक्षम करना चाहिए, जैसा कि छात्र संशोधन व्यवहार और स्वचालित संशोधन उद्देश्य की भविष्यवाणी के हमारे अपने अध्ययन के माध्यम से प्रदर्शित किया गया है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен ArgRewrite, корпус межчерновых редакций аргументативных эссе. Черновики выравниваются вручную на уровне предложений, и цель автора для каждой ревизии аннотируется с категориями, аналогичными тем, которые используются в анализе аргументов и дискурса. Корпус должен позволять продвинутые исследования в написании сравнения и анализа редакции, как продемонстрировано нашими собственными исследованиями поведения студента редакции и автоматического предсказания цели редакции.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair ArgRewrite, corpas d’athbhreithnithe idir-dhréachta ar aistí argóinteacha. Déantar dréachtaí a ailíniú de láimh ag leibhéal na habairte, agus déantar cuspóir an scríbhneora do gach athbhreithniú a anótáil le catagóirí atá cosúil leo siúd a úsáidtear i mianadóireacht argóintí agus anailís dioscúrsa. Ba chóir go gcumasódh an corpas ardtaighde ar an scríbhneoireacht anailís chomparáide agus athbhreithnithe, mar a léirítear inár gcuid staidéir féin ar iompar athbhreithnithe na mac léinn agus ar réamh-mheastachán uathfheidhmeach athbhreithnithe.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σύνολο αναθεωρήσεων επιχειρηματολογικών δοκίμων μεταξύ των σχεδίων. Τα σχέδια ευθυγραμμίζονται χειροκίνητα στο επίπεδο προτάσεων και ο σκοπός του συγγραφέα για κάθε αναθεώρηση σχολιάζεται με κατηγορίες ανάλογες με αυτές που χρησιμοποιούνται στην εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων και στην ανάλυση λόγου. Το σώμα θα πρέπει να επιτρέπει προηγμένη έρευνα στη γραπτή σύγκριση και ανάλυση αναθεώρησης, όπως αποδεικνύεται μέσω των δικών μας μελετών σχετικά με τη συμπεριφορά των φοιτητών και την αυτόματη πρόβλεψη του σκοπού αναθεώρησης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az ArgRewrite-t, az argumentatív esszék vázlatok közötti revízióinak korpuszát. A vázlatokat manuálisan igazítják a mondatszinten, és az író célját minden egyes változathoz hasonló kategóriákkal jegyzeteljük meg, mint az argumentumbányászatban és diskurzuselemzésben használt kategóriák. A korpusznak lehetővé kell tennie az írásos összehasonlítás és a felülvizsgálat elemzésének fejlett kutatását, amint azt saját tanulmányaink bizonyítják a diákok felülvizsgálati viselkedéséről és az automatikus felülvizsgálati cél előrejelzéséről.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta ArgRewrite, un corpus di revisioni tra bozze di saggi argomentativi. Le bozze sono allineate manualmente a livello di frase, e lo scopo dello scrittore per ogni revisione è annotato con categorie analoghe a quelle utilizzate nel mining degli argomenti e nell'analisi del discorso. Il corpus dovrebbe consentire ricerche avanzate nella scrittura di confronto e analisi di revisione, come dimostrato dai nostri studi sul comportamento di revisione degli studenti e sulla previsione automatica degli scopi di revisione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas ArgRewrite, tarpprojektinių argumentacinių egzaminų peržiūrų korpusas. Projektai rankiniu būdu suderinami sakinio lygiu, o rašytojo tikslas kiekvienam persvarstymui pažymėtas kategorijomis, panašiomis į tas, kurios naudojamos argument ų gavybos ir diskurso analizėje. The corpus should enable advanced research in writing comparison and revision analysis, as demonstrated via our own studies of student revision behavior and of automatic revision purpose prediction.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ახალგაზრდება ArgRewrite, რომელიც ახალგაზრუმენტიური ესეების რედაქტირებას შორის კოპუსს. პარამეტრები მანძილურად წერტილის დონეში დაყენება, და ყოველ რედაქტირების მიზეზი კატეგორია ანალოგიურად გამოყენებული არგუმენტის მინუს და დისკუმენტის ანალოგიში გამოყენებული. კჲპოსჟ რპწბგა ეა ოჲმჲდნვ ოპვეგთევნთვრჲ ნა პაჱსფვნთვრჲ ნა ნაოთჟანთვრჲ თ პვგთჱთჲნჟკთ ანალთჱთი, კარჲ ოპვეგთევნთვრჲ ნა ჟრსევნრთრვ ნა პვგთჱთჲნჟკთწ ოჲეყლზვნთვ თ ჲრ', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan ArgRewrite, korpus revisi diantara-draft essai argumensif. Draf disesuaikan secara manual pada aras kalimat, dan tujuan penulis untuk setiap revisi dicatat dengan kategori yang sama dengan yang digunakan dalam pengeluaran argumen dan analisis diskors. Corpus patut benarkan kajian lanjut dalam menulis perbandingan dan analisis revisi, seperti yang dipaparkan melalui kajian kita sendiri perilaku revisi pelajar dan ramalan tujuan revisi automatik.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ArgRewrite дегенді көрсетеді, аргументалдық редакциялар арасындағы корпус. Драфттар сөздің деңгейіне қолмен түзетіледі, және әрбір редакциясының мақсаты аргументтің бағыттау мен дискурстың анализациясында қолданылған санаттарының аналогиялық санаттарына жазылады. Корпус жазуды салыстыру және редакциялау анализиясында, студенттердің редакциялау тәртібін және автоматты редакциялау мақсатының алдында көрсетілген зерттеулерді қолдану керек.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ആര്\u200dഗ്രെയിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്, വാദിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ  വാക്കിന്റെ നിലയില്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രാപ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും എഴുതുന്ന ഉദ് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ സ്വന്തം പഠനങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സ്വന്തം പഠനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളിലൂടെയും സ്വയം മാറ്റിവെക്കു', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta ArgRewrite, korpus ta’ reviżjonijiet bejn abbozzi ta’ testijiet argumentattivi. L-abbozzi huma allinjati manwalment fil-livell tas-sentenza, u l-iskop tal-kittieb għal kull reviżjoni huwa annotat b’kategoriji analogi għal dawk użati fl-analiżi tal-minjieri tal-argumenti u tad-diskors. Il-korpus għandu jippermetti riċerka avvanzata bil-miktub tqabbil u analiżi tar-reviżjoni, kif muri permezz tal-istudji tagħna stess dwar l-imġiba tar-reviżjoni tal-istudenti u t-tbassir tal-iskop tar-reviżjoni awtomatika.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува ArgRewrite, корпус на меѓупредлог-ревизии на аргументативните есеи. Рачните нацртови се рачно подредени на нивото на реченицата, а целта на писателот за секоја ревизија е анотирана со категории аналошки со оние што се користат за минирање аргументи и дискурсна анализа. Корпусот треба да овозможи напредно истражување во пишување на споредба и анализа на ревизија, како што се покажа преку нашите сопствени студии на однесувањето на студентите на ревизија и на предвидување на автоматска ревизија на целта.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас ArgRewrite гэдэг нь аргумент сэтгэлгээний шинэчлэлийн хоорондын корпус юм. Загварууд нь өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд гараараа холбогдож байгаа бөгөөд зохиолчдын зорилго нь аргументын сүлжээний болон ярианы шинжилгээнд хэрэглэгдсэн хүмүүстэй адилхан хэсэгтэй тэмдэглэгддэг. Корпус өөрсдийн оюутнуудын шинэчлэл, автоматжуулалт шинэчлэлийн төлөвлөгөөний судалгаагаар харуулж, шинэчлэлт шинэчлэлт хийх боломжтой.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ArgRewrite, eit korpus av mellom draft revisjonar av argumentativ essar. Kladd er manuelt retta på setningsnivået, og brennaren skal henta til kvar revisjon med kategoriar som er analoge til dei som brukar i argument mining og diskursanalisering. Korpusen bør slå på avanserte forskning i skrivesammenlikning og revisjonanalisering, som vist gjennom våre eige studier om studentreviseringsoppførsel og automatisk forhåndsvising av revisjonsverdi.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja ArgRewrite, korpus između projekta revizija argumentativnih eseja. Računi su ručno usklađeni na nivou rečenice, a svrha pisaca za svaku reviziju je annotirana kategorijama analogom onima koji se koriste u analiziji rudarstva i diskursa. Korpus bi trebao omogućiti napredne istraživanja u pisanoj usporedbi i analizi revizije, kao što je pokazalo kroz naše sopstvene studije ponašanja revizije studenata i predviđanja svrhe automatske revizije.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ආර්ගර්රෙවිට් එකක් පෙන්වනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, හැම වාර්තාව සඳහා ලේඛකයේ අදහස් සඳහා වාර්තාව සමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dර කොර්පුස් ලියනය සහ පරීක්ෂණය විශ්ලේෂනය සක්රිය කරන්න ඕන, අපේ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigaa ArgRewrite, kaas oo koob u dhexeeya qorshaha warqadaha dooda ah. Qoraalka waxaa si gacan ah loogu qoraa heerka ereyga, oo waxaa loogu talogaley in qofka wax beddelaya uu u baahdo kooxo la mid ah kuwa ku isticmaala baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka hadalka. Qoriga qofku waa in uu fududeeyaa baaritaanka horumarinta ah oo qoraalka is-barbardhigga iyo baaritaanka beddelka, sida loo muujiyey waxbarashadayada iskuullada beddelka ee ardayda iyo wixii horumarinta ah oo la soo jeediyo waxyaabaha iskumar ah.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono ArgRewrite, korpus między projektami rewizji esejów argumentatywnych. Szkice są ręcznie wyrównywane na poziomie zdań, a cel pisarza dla każdej wersji jest adnotacjonowany kategoriami analogicznymi do tych używanych w eksploracji argumentów i analizie dyskursu. Korpus powinien umożliwić zaawansowane badania w zakresie porównywania pisemnego i analizy rewizji, co pokazuje nasze własne badania nad zachowaniem rewizji uczniów i automatycznej predykcji celu rewizji.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ArgRewrite, en korpus av revideringar mellan utkast av argumentativa essäer. Utkast justeras manuellt på meningsnivå, och författarens syfte för varje revision kommenteras med kategorier som liknar dem som används i argumentmining och diskursanalys. Korpusen ska möjliggöra avancerad forskning i skriftlig jämförelse och revisionsanalys, vilket framgår av våra egna studier av elevers revisionsbeteende och av automatisk revision syfte förutsägelse.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă ArgRewrite, un corpus de revizii între proiecte ale eseurilor argumentative. Proiectele sunt aliniate manual la nivelul propoziției, iar scopul scriitorului pentru fiecare revizie este adnotat cu categorii similare celor folosite în mineritul argumentelor și analiza discursului. Corpusul ar trebui să permită cercetări avansate în comparația scrisă și analiza revizuirii, așa cum a demonstrat prin propriile studii ale comportamentului de revizuire a studenților și ale predicției automate a scopului revizuirii.', 'ur': 'This paper presents ArgRewrite, a corpus of two-draft revisions of argumentative essays. ڈرافوٹ مجلس سطح پر ہاتھی سے متصل کئے جاتے ہیں، اور ہر روشنی کے لئے لکھنے والے کا هدف ان لوگوں کے ساتھ مشورہ کئے جاتے ہیں جن کے بارے میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کورپوس باید پیشرفت کی تحقیقات کو نوشتہ مقایسہ اور تغییر تحقیقات کے ذریعے قادر کرے جس طرح ہمارے اپنے تحقیقات کے ذریعے تحقیقات کے ذریعے دکھائی گئی تھی اور اتوماتیک تغییر کا مقصد پیش بینی کے', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் ஆர்க்ரெயில் எழுதுகிறது, வரையறை மாற்றங்களுக்கு இடையே ஒரு குறிப்பை கூட்டுகிறது. வரைவுகள் வாக்கு நிலையில் கைமுறையாக ஒழுங்குபடுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஒவ்வொரு மீள்நோக்கும் எழுத்தாளரின் நிலையில் ஒவ்வொரு மீள்நோக்கு மாணவர்கள் மீள்நோக்கு நடத்தையையும் தானாக மீள்நோக்கி முன்னேற்றத்தையும் முன்னேற்ற ஆராய்ச்சியையும் ஒப்பிடுதலையும் மற்றும்', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz ArgRewrite - draft revisions of argumentative essays орасида corpus. Draftlarni qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻllanmagan va yozuvchi maqsadi har bir tizimni oʻzgartirish uchun bir guruhga mos keladi. Arguments mining va suhbat analyzerlarida ishlatilganlarning turlariga mos keladi. Korpus tahrirlash va tahrirlash taʼminotini yozish va taʼminlovchi o'qituvchisini qo'shish kerak. Aks holda, o'quvchi o'qituvchilar o'zgarishning xususiyatlarimiz va avtomatik o'zgarishlar qanday oldinga o'rganishni o'rganish mumkin", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đưa ra ArgRewrite, một tập hợp những bản thảo mới trong các bài luận. Các đường hầm được canh ngang bằng tay ở mức án, và mục đích tác giả cho mỗi bản s ửa đổi được ghi chú với các loại tương tự với các loại được dùng trong việc khai thác và phân tích thuyết trình. Tập thể sẽ cho phép nghiên cứu tiên tiến bằng cách so sánh và phân tích văn bản, như đã được chứng minh qua các nghiên cứu về hành vi sửa chữa sinh viên và dự đoán mục đích sửa chữa tự động của nó.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя корпус от ревизии между проектите на аргументативни есета. Чертежите се подравняват ръчно на ниво изречение, а целта на писателя за всяка ревизия е анотирана с категории, аналогични на тези, използвани в аргументирането и дискурсния анализ. Корпусът трябва да даде възможност за напреднали изследвания в писмено сравнение и анализ на ревизията, както е показано чрез нашите собствени изследвания на поведението на студентите по ревизията и автоматичното предвиждане на целите на ревизията.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja ArgRewrite, korpus između projekta revizija argumentativnih eseja. Računi su ručno usklađeni na razini rečenice, a svrha pisaca za svaku reviziju je označena kategorijama analogom onima koji se koriste u analiziji rudarstva i diskursa. Corpus bi trebao omogućiti napredne istraživanja u pisanoj usporedbi i analizi revizije, kao što je pokazalo putem naših vlastitih ispitivanja ponašanja revizije učenika i predviđanja svrhe automatske revizije.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert ArgRewrite, een corpus van herzieningen tussen-ontwerp van argumentatieve essays. Concepten worden handmatig uitgelijnd op zinsniveau, en het doel van de schrijver voor elke revisie wordt geannoteerd met categorieën die analoog zijn aan die welke worden gebruikt in argument mining en discoursanalyse. Het corpus moet geavanceerd onderzoek mogelijk maken in schrijfvergelijking en revisieanalyse, zoals blijkt uit onze eigen studies naar revisiegedrag van studenten en van automatische revisiedoelvoorspelling.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer ArgRewrite, et korpus af mellem-udkast revisioner af argumentative essays. Udkast justeres manuelt på sætningsniveau, og forfatterens formål med hver revision er annoteret med kategorier svarende til dem, der anvendes i argumentmining og diskursanalyse. Korpusset bør muliggøre avanceret forskning i skriftlig sammenligning og revisionsanalyse, som påvist via vores egne undersøgelser af elevers revisionsadfærd og af automatisk revision formål forudsigelse.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt ArgRewrite vor, ein Korpus von Revisionen von argumentativen Essays zwischen Entwürfen. Entwürfe werden manuell auf Satzebene ausgerichtet, und der Zweck des Verfassers für jede Revision wird mit Kategorien kommentiert, die denen ähneln, die in Argument Mining und Diskursanalyse verwendet werden. Das Korpus soll eine fortgeschrittene Forschung im Schriftvergleich und in der Revisionsanalyse ermöglichen, wie unsere eigenen Studien zum Revisionsverhalten und zur automatischen Revisionszweckvorhersage zeigen.', 'id': "Kertas ini memperkenalkan ArgRewrite, sebuah korpus dari antara-draft revisi essai argumensif. Drafts are manually aligned at the sentence level, and the writer's purpose for each revision is annotated with categories analogous to those used in argument mining and discourse analysis.  Korpus seharusnya memungkinkan penelitian maju dalam menulis perbandingan dan analisis revisi, seperti yang diajukan melalui penelitian kami sendiri perilaku revisi siswa dan prediksi tujuan revisi otomatis.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ ArgRewrite را نشان می\u200cدهد، یک جسد بین طرح تغییر\u200cسازی\u200cهای مجادله. پرونده\u200cها در سطح جمله دستگیر می\u200cشوند، و هدف نویسنده\u200cها برای هر تغییر\u200cسازی با گونه\u200cهایی مانند کسانی که در تحلیل\u200cسازی\u200cهای ذخیره\u200cکننده و گفتگو استفاده می\u200cشوند، مشخص می\u200cشوند. کورپوس باید تحقیقات پیشرفته را در مقایسه و تحقیقات تغییر نوشتن توان دهد، همانطور که از طریق تحقیقات خود از رفتار تغییر دانش آموزان و پیش بینی هدف تغییر خودکار نشان داده شده است.', 'sw': 'This paper presents ArgRewrite, a corpus of between-draft revisions of argumentative essays.  Drafta zinawekwa kwa mkono katika ngazi ya hukumu, na lengo la mwandishi kwa kila uchunguzi unakasirishwa na makundi yanayofanana na wale wanaotumia katika uchunguzi wa madini na mazungumzo. Kampuni hiyo inapaswa kuwawezesha tafiti za maendeleo katika kuandika kulinganisha na uchambuzi wa mabadiliko, kama ilivyoonyesha kupitia utafiti wetu wenyewe wa tabia za mabadiliko ya wanafunzi na utabiri wa malengo ya kurekebisha haraka.', 'ko': '본고는 의논문 수정 원고 간의 어료 라이브러리인 ArgRewrite를 소개한다.초고는 문장 차원에서 수동으로 정렬되고 작가는 매번 수정하는 목적은 논점 발굴과 언어 분석에 사용된 유형과 유사하게 주석을 한다.어료고는 쓰기 비교와 수정 분석 분야의 고급 연구를 할 수 있어야 한다. 마치 우리가 학생들의 수정 행위와 자동 수정 목적 예측에 대한 연구소에서 증명한 바와 같다.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet ArgRewrite, një korpus midis-projekteve revizionesh të eseve argumentuese. Projektet janë të rregulluara manualisht në nivelin e fjalimit dhe qëllimi i shkrimtarit për çdo revizion është shënuar me kategori analoge me ato që përdoren në analizën e minierave të argumenteve dhe diskurseve. Korpus duhet të mundësojë kërkimin e përparuar në shkrimin e krahasimit dhe analizën e revizionit, siç demonstrohet nëpërmjet studimeve tona të sjelljes së revizionit të student ëve dhe parashikimit automatik të qëllimit të revizionit.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel ArgRewrite, 'n korpus van tussen-draft hersienings van argumentatiewe eseye. Rofwerke is hand aligned by the sentence level, and the writer's purpose for each revision is annotated with categories analogous to those used in argument mining and discourse analysis. Die korpus moet gevorderde ondersoek in skrifvergelyking en hersiening analiseer aktiveer, soos deur ons eie studie van studente hersiening gedrag en van outomatiese hersiening doel voorskou gewys het.", 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ አርግRewrite፣ የሥርዓት ተሳታፊዎችን በመካከለኛው አርጌ አርጌ ድምፅ የሚያቀርብ ነው፡፡ ንድፎች በሥርዓት ደረጃዎች ላይ በመቀላቀል እና የጸሐፊው ጉዳይ ለሁሉም ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም በሚጠይቁት በአካባቢው መጫወቻ እና በንግግር ማሳየት በሚጠይቁት ክፍሎች ይታሰቃቸዋል፡፡ የኮርፓስ ትምህርት እና የራሳቸውን ትምህርት ትምህርት እና የራሳቸውን ትምህርት ማሳየት እና የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያው የራሳቸውን ትምህርት እና የራሳቸው ተሳሳተ ጉዳይ ለመፍጠር ማድረግ እንዲችል ይገባዋል፡፡', 'tr': "Bu kagyz ArgRewrite'i, argentik düzmeklerin arasynda bir korpus çykýar. Sözgütler elimden s özlem derejesinde çyzylýar, we ýazçylaryň maksady her Revisiýa üçin argüm miniň we çykyş analyzasynda ullanylýan kalamlar bilen duşuldy. Korpus okuwçylarymyz tarapyndan, ýazyp karşılaşyk we düzenleme analyzasynda gelişmiş araştyrmalaryny etkinleştirmeli, okuwçylarymyz tarapyndan we awtomatik düzenleme maksadynyň önümlerini görkezilýän ýaly.", 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt ArgRewrite, argumentativ hesablarńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrin korpusu g√∂st…ôrir. V…ôziyy…ôtl…ôr s √∂zl…ôrin s…ôviyy…ôsind…ô √∂z …ôlind…ô t…ôr…ôfl…ôndirilir, v…ô h…ôr d…ôyiŇüiklik √ľ√ß√ľn yazńĪcńĪnńĪn m…ôqs…ôdi, argument minik v…ô diskursu analizi il…ô istifad…ô edil…ônl…ôr…ô b…ônz…ôr kategoriyalar il…ô m…ôlumatlandńĪrńĪlńĪr. K√∂rp√ľs yazmaq v…ô yenil…ônm…ôk analizi il…ô, √∂ńürencil…ôrimizin yenil…ônm…ôk davranńĪŇülarńĪnńĪ v…ô avtomatik yenil…ônm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdil…ôrini t…ôsdiql…ôdiyimiz kimi, yazmaq v…ô yenil…ônm…ôk analizi il…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôli olar.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է ArgRewrite-ը, բանավեճիտատիվ էսսեների միջև գոյություն ունեցող վերափոխությունների կորպուսը: Նախագծերը ձեռքով համապատասխանվում են նախադասության մակարդակի վրա, և գրողի նպատակը յուրաքանչյուր վերլուծության համար գրված է կատեգորիաներով, որոնք նման են բանավեճերի հանքահանման և քննարկումների վերլուծության մեջ օգտագործվող կատեգորի Կորպուսը պետք է հնարավորություն տայ զարգացած հետազոտություններին գրական համեմատության և վերանայման վերլուծության մեջ, ինչպես ցույց է տալիս ուսանողների վերանայման վարքագծի մեր սեփական ուսումնասիրությունների և ավտոմատիկ վերանայման ն', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি আর্গরেলিপিকে উপস্থাপিত করেছে যে মাধ্যমে যুক্তিভাবে যুক্তি প্রদানের মধ্যে সংস্কারের একটি কর্প এই বাক্যের স্তরে ম্যাপটগুলো হাতে সাজানো হয়েছে এবং প্রত্যেক সংস্কারের উদ্দেশ্যে লেখকের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে ব্যবহার করা হয়ে তুলনা এবং পরিবর্তন বিশ্লেষণে এই কোর্পাসের উন্নত গবেষণা সক্রিয় করা উচিত, যেমন ছাত্রের পরিবর্তনের আচরণ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংস্কারের উদ্দেশ্যের', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja ArgRewrite, korpus između projekta revizija argumentativnih eseja. Računi su ručno usklađeni na razini rečenice, a svrha pisaca za svaku reviziju je annotirana kategorijama analogom onima koji se koriste u analiziji rudarstva i diskursa. Korpus bi trebao omogućiti napredne istraživanja u pisanoj usporedbi i analizi revizije, kao što je pokazalo kroz naše sopstvene studije ponašanja revizije studenata i predviđanja svrhe automatske revizije.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään ArgRewrite-korpus argumentatiivisten esseiden luonnoksten välillä. Luonnokset kohdistetaan manuaalisesti lausetasolla, ja kirjoittajan tarkoitus kussakin versiossa on merkitty luokkiin, jotka vastaavat argumenttien louhintaan ja diskurssianalyysiin käytettyjä luokkia. Korpus mahdollistaa kirjallisen vertailun ja revisioanalyysin syventävän tutkimuksen, joka osoitetaan omien opiskelijoiden revisiokäyttäytymisen ja automaattisen revisiotarkoituksen ennustamisen tutkimuksissamme.', 'ca': "This paper presents ArgRewrite, a corpus of between-draft revisions of argumentative essays.  Els projectes estan allinjats manualment a nivell de frases, i el propòsit de l'escriptor per cada revisió està anotat amb categories analògiques a les que s'utilitzen en l'anàlisi de la minera d'arguments i del discurs. El corpus hauria de permetre una investigació avançada en comparació escrita i anàlisi de revisió, com es demostra a través dels nostres propis estudis sobre el comportament de revisió dels estudiants i la predicció automàtica del propòsit de revisió.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje ArgRewrite, korpus mezi návrhy revizí argumentativních esejí. Návrhy jsou ručně zarovnány na úrovni věty a autorův účel pro každou revizi je anotován kategoriemi analogickými s těmi, které se používají při dolování argumentů a diskurzní analýze. Korpus by měl umožnit pokročilý výzkum písemného porovnávání a revizní analýzy, jak je prokázáno vlastními studiemi chování revizí studentů a automatické predikce účelu revize.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse argumentatiivsete esseede vaheliste versioonide korpus ArgRewrite. Mustandid joondatakse käsitsi lausetasemel ja kirjutaja eesmärk iga versiooni jaoks on märgitud kategooriatega, mis on sarnased argumentide kaevandamisel ja diskursusanalüüsil kasutatavatele kategooriatele. Korpus peaks võimaldama täiustatud uuringuid kirjalikus võrdluses ja revisjonianalüüsis, mida näitavad meie enda uuringud üliõpilaste revisjoni käitumise ja automaatse revisjoni eesmärgi prognoosimise kohta.', 'jv': 'Ngerungke iki nambah argument Rewrite structural navigation Gosoko kamu kudu menehi perusahaan kelas telu nggawe gerambut kanggo nyebute karo karo hal-nyebute perusahaan karo hal-nyebute kanggo nyebute perusahaan anyar tentang karo hal-nyebute perusahaan karo hal-nyebute perusahaan anyar ora bis', 'sk': 'Prispevek predstavlja ArgRewrite, korpus medosnutkov revizij argumentativnih esejev. Osnutki so ročno poravnani na ravni stavka, namen pisatelja za vsako revizijo pa je označen s kategorijami, ki so podobne tistim, ki se uporabljajo pri rudarjenju argumentov in analizi diskurza. Korpus naj bi omogočil napredne raziskave v pisni primerjavi in analizi revizij, kar je dokazano z lastnimi študijami vedenja revizij študentov in avtomatičnega napovedovanja namena revizije.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da ArgreWrite, wata nau'i daga tsakanin-sãbuwa na canza shiryoyin fassarar masu husũma. An daidaita wasu durowa da hannayen da aka ƙayyade shi cikin daraja ga maganar, kuma ana zartar da amfani da mai rubutu wa kõwane juzgi, da wasu nau'i masu yin kama da waɗanda ke yi amfani da su cikin kayan aiki da aka yi fasahan mazaɓa. Kiarabu ya kamata ta karatun mafiya ƙaranci cikin littãfin da aka sammentar da kuma an canza fitina, kamar yadda aka nuna bayani a kanzu masu karatun aikin kure na wanan da kuma ya yi bayani ga aikin kure farat ɗaya.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את ArgRewrite, קורפוס של שינויים בין-סגנון של מאמרים טוענים. הציורים מתאימים באופן ידני ברמה המשפטים, והמטרה של הסופר לכל שינוי מועטפת עם קטגוריות אנולוגיות לאלה שמשתמשים במכרות ויתוח ניתוח. The corpus should enable advanced research in writing comparison and revision analysis, as demonstrated via our own studies of student revision behavior and of automatic revision purpose prediction.', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཁོང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཉེས་མཁན་གྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་དང་། Drafts are manually aligned at the sentence level, and the writer's purpose for each revision is annotated with categories analogous to those used in argument mining and discourse analysis. The corpus should enable advanced research in writing comparison and revision analysis, as demonstrated by our own studies of student revision behavior and of automatic revision purpose prediction."}
{'en': 'Watset : Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'ar': 'Watset: الاستقراء التلقائي للمجموعات من رسم بياني للمرادفات', 'pt': 'Wattset: Indução Automática de Synsets a partir de um Gráfico de Sinônimos', 'es': 'Watset: inducción automática de synsets a partir de un gráfico de sinónimos', 'fr': "Watset\xa0: Induction automatique de synsets à partir d'un graphe de synonymes", 'ja': 'ワットセット：同義語のグラフからのシンセットの自動誘導', 'zh': 'Watset:同义词图自归同义词集', 'hi': 'Watset: पर्यायवाची शब्दों के ग्राफ से Synsets के स्वत: प्रेरण', 'ru': 'Watset: Автоматическая Индукция Synsets от Графика Синонимов', 'ga': 'Watset: Ionduchtú Uathoibríoch Sinsets ó Ghraf Comhchiallaigh', 'ka': 'სინონიმების გრაფიდან ავტომატური ინდექცია', 'hu': 'Watset: A szintetikusok automatikus indukciója a szinonimák grafikájából', 'el': 'Αυτόματη επαγωγή συνθέσεων από ένα γράφημα συνονόμων', 'kk': 'Ватосеті: Қадамдастыру графигінен автоматты түрде индукция', 'it': 'Watset: induzione automatica di sintesi da un grafico di sinonimi', 'ml': 'വാട്ട്സെറ്റ്: സിനോണിമിനുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫില്\u200d നിന്നും സിനോസെറ്റുകളുടെ സ്വയം കാണിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Watset: Induzzjoni Awtomatika tas-Sinsetti minn Grafika tas-Sinonimi', 'mn': 'Ватсет: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'lt': 'Watset: Sintetinių sistemų automatinė indukcija iš sinonimų grafiko', 'no': 'Watset: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'mk': 'Ватсет: Автоматска индукција на синсети од график на синоними', 'ms': 'Watset: Induksi Automatik Sinset dari Graf Sinonim', 'pl': 'Watset: Automatyczna indukcja zestawów synonimów z wykresu synonimów', 'ro': 'Watset: Inducția automată a sintezelor dintr-un grafic de sinonime', 'si': 'වොට්සෙට්: සිනෝනිම්ස් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකෙන් සැකසුම් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට', 'so': 'Watset: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'sv': 'Watset: Automatisk induktion av synuppsättningar från en graf av synonymer', 'sr': 'Ватресет: автоматична индукција синомиста из графика синонима', 'ta': 'வாட்செட்: ஒத்திசைவுகளின் வரைப்படத்திலிருந்து தன்னியக்க காட்சி', 'ur': 'واٹسٹ', 'uz': 'Tovush: Automatic Indication of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'vi': 'Bộ khung: Tự động kết hợp từ đồ họa của synonym', 'bg': 'Уотсет: Автоматична индукция на синоними от графика на синонимите', 'da': 'Watset: Automatisk induktion af Synsæt fra en graf af Synonymer', 'nl': 'Watset: Automatische Inductie van Synsets uit een Grafiek van Synoniemen', 'hr': 'Watset: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'ko': 'Watset: 동의어 맵에서 자동으로 구문 세트 요약', 'de': 'Watset: Automatische Induktion von Synsets aus einem Diagramm von Synonymen', 'id': 'Watset: Induksi Otomatis Sinset dari Graf Sinonim', 'fa': 'واتست: اضطراری خودکار از سازمان\u200cسازی از گراف سازمان\u200cسازی', 'sw': 'Watu: Uonyesho wa Sineti wa Automatic From Graph of Synonyms', 'tr': 'Otomatik gaýşartma', 'sq': 'Watset: Induktimi automatik i sintetimeve nga një grafik sinonimesh', 'am': 'Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'hy': 'Սինոնիմների գրաֆիկից', 'az': 'Watset: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'bn': 'ওয়াটসেট: সিনোনিমের একটি গ্রাফ থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সিনেটস নির্দেশনা', 'bs': 'Watset: Automatic Induction of Synsets from a Graph of Synonyms', 'ca': "Watset: Inducció automàtica de sinsets a partir d'un gràfic de sinònims", 'cs': 'Watset: Automatická indukce synsetů z grafu synonymů', 'af': "Watset: Outomatiese Induksie van Sinkronisasies van' n Graf van Sinonime", 'et': 'Võimsus: automaatne induktsioon sünonüümide graafikust', 'fi': 'Watset: Automaattinen Induktio Synnyymien Graafin Synnyymit', 'he': 'ווטסט: הוצאה אוטומטית של סינסטים מגרף של סינונימים', 'sk': 'Watset: Avtomatska indukcija sintezov iz grafika sinonimov', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bo': 'Watset：རང་འགུལ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཚུལ་ཐོག་ལས'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synsets using synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings. First, we build a weighted graph of synonyms extracted from commonly available resources, such as Wiktionary. Second, we apply word sense induction to deal with ambiguous words. Finally, we cluster the disambiguated version of the ambiguous input graph into synsets. Our meta-clustering approach lets us use an efficient hard clustering algorithm to perform a fuzzy clustering of the graph. Despite its simplicity, our approach shows excellent results, outperforming five competitive state-of-the-art methods in terms of F-score on three gold standard datasets for English and Russian derived from large-scale manually constructed lexical resources.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نهجًا جديدًا قائمًا على الرسم البياني يستحث المجموعات المتزامنة باستخدام القواميس المترادفة وحفلات الزفاف. أولاً ، نقوم ببناء رسم بياني مرجح للمرادفات المستخرجة من الموارد المتاحة بشكل شائع ، مثل Wiktionary. ثانيًا ، نطبق الاستقراء بمعنى الكلمة للتعامل مع الكلمات الغامضة. أخيرًا ، نقوم بتجميع النسخة الواضحة من الرسم البياني للإدخال الغامض في مجموعات متزامنة. يتيح لنا نهج التجميع الفوقي الخاص بنا استخدام خوارزمية تجميع صلبة فعالة لإجراء تجميع غير واضح للرسم البياني. على الرغم من بساطته ، يُظهر نهجنا نتائج ممتازة ، حيث تفوق في الأداء على خمس طرق تنافسية حديثة من حيث الدرجة F على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات قياسية ذهبية للغة الإنجليزية والروسية مشتقة من موارد معجمية تم إنشاؤها يدويًا على نطاق واسع.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un nuevo enfoque basado en gráficos que induce a synsets utilizando diccionarios de sinónimos e incrustaciones de palabras. Primero, creamos un gráfico ponderado de sinónimos extraídos de recursos comúnmente disponibles, como Wikcionario. En segundo lugar, aplicamos la inducción al sentido de las palabras para tratar con palabras ambiguas. Finalmente, agrupamos la versión desambiguada del gráfico de entrada ambiguo en synsets. Nuestro enfoque de meta-clustering nos permite utilizar un algoritmo de clustering duro eficiente para realizar un agrupamiento difuso del gráfico. A pesar de su simplicidad, nuestro enfoque muestra excelentes resultados, superando a cinco métodos competitivos de última generación en términos de puntuación F en tres conjuntos de datos estándar de oro para inglés y ruso derivados de recursos léxicos a gran escala construidos manualmente.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma nova abordagem baseada em grafos que induz synsets usando dicionários de sinonímia e incorporação de palavras. Primeiro, construímos um gráfico ponderado de sinônimos extraídos de recursos comumente disponíveis, como o Wikcionário. Em segundo lugar, aplicamos a indução do sentido da palavra para lidar com palavras ambíguas. Finalmente, agrupamos a versão desambiguada do grafo de entrada ambíguo em synsets. Nossa abordagem de meta-agrupamento nos permite usar um algoritmo de agrupamento rígido eficiente para realizar um agrupamento difuso do grafo. Apesar de sua simplicidade, nossa abordagem mostra excelentes resultados, superando cinco métodos competitivos de última geração em termos de F-score em três conjuntos de dados padrão ouro para inglês e russo derivados de recursos lexicais construídos manualmente em larga escala.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une nouvelle approche basée sur des graphes qui induit des synsets à l'aide de dictionnaires de synonymie et d'intégrations de mots. Tout d'abord, nous créons un graphique pondéré des synonymes extraits de ressources couramment disponibles, telles que Wiktionary. Deuxièmement, nous appliquons l'induction du sens des mots pour traiter les mots ambigus. Enfin, nous regroupons la version désambiguïsée du graphe en entrée ambigu dans des synsets. Notre approche de méta-clustering nous permet d'utiliser un algorithme de clustering matériel efficace pour effectuer un clustering flou du graphe. Malgré sa simplicité, notre approche donne d'excellents résultats, surpassant cinq méthodes de pointe concurrentes en termes de score F sur trois ensembles de données de référence pour l'anglais et le russe dérivés de ressources lexicales construites manuellement à grande échelle.", 'ja': 'シノニム辞書や単語埋め込みを用いてシンセットを誘導する新しいグラフベースのアプローチを提示した。まず、Wiktionaryなどの一般的に利用可能なリソースから抽出された同義語の加重グラフを構築します。第二に、曖昧な単語を扱うために、単語センス帰納法を適用する。最後に、あいまいな入力グラフの曖昧さを取り除いたバージョンをシンセットに集約します。私たちのメタクラスタリングアプローチは、効率的なハードクラスタリングアルゴリズムを使用して、グラフの曖昧なクラスタリングを実行することを可能にします。その単純さにもかかわらず、当社のアプローチは優れた結果を示し、大規模な手動で構築された語彙リソースから導出された英語およびロシア語の3つのゴールド標準データセットのFスコアの点で、5つの競合する最先端の方法を上回っています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक नया ग्राफ-आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है जो समानार्थी शब्दकोशों और शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके सिंसेट को प्रेरित करता है। सबसे पहले, हम आमतौर पर उपलब्ध संसाधनों से निकाले गए पर्यायवाची शब्दों का एक भारित ग्राफ बनाते हैं, जैसे कि विक्षनरी। दूसरा, हम अस्पष्ट शब्दों से निपटने के लिए शब्द भावना प्रेरण लागू करते हैं। अंत में, हम synsets में अस्पष्ट इनपुट ग्राफ के disambiguated संस्करण क्लस्टर। हमारा मेटा-क्लस्टरिंग दृष्टिकोण हमें ग्राफ़ के फजी क्लस्टरिंग करने के लिए एक कुशल हार्ड क्लस्टरिंग एल्गोरिथ्म का उपयोग करने देता है। इसकी सादगी के बावजूद, हमारा दृष्टिकोण उत्कृष्ट परिणाम दिखाता है, बड़े पैमाने पर मैन्युअल रूप से निर्मित लेक्सिकल संसाधनों से प्राप्त अंग्रेजी और रूसी के लिए तीन सोने के मानक डेटासेट पर एफ-स्कोर के मामले में पांच प्रतिस्पर्धी अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को पछाड़ता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен новый подход, основанный на графике, который индуцирует синсеты с использованием словарей синонимии и вложений слов. Во-первых, мы строим взвешенный график синонимов, извлеченных из общедоступных ресурсов, таких как Wiktionary. Во-вторых, мы применяем индукцию смысла слов, чтобы иметь дело с двусмысленными словами. Наконец, мы сгруппируем расплывчатую версию двусмысленного входного графа в синсеты. Наш подход к метакластеризации позволяет нам использовать эффективный жесткий алгоритм кластеризации для выполнения нечеткой кластеризации графа. Несмотря на свою простоту, наш подход показывает отличные результаты, превосходя пять конкурентоспособных современных методов по показателю F на трех наборах данных золотого стандарта для английского и русского языков, полученных из крупномасштабных лексических ресурсов, построенных вручную.', 'zh': '本文设新图之法,其法用同义词词典与词嵌以诱合成集。 先构一从常用资源(如维基词典)取同义词之加权图。 其次,我们应用词义归纳来处理模棱两可的词。 最后,我们将模糊输入图的消歧义版本聚类到合成集。 吾元聚类法许用效硬聚类算法以行模糊聚类。 虽简,吾道见出,于大手动构词汇资生三英语、俄语黄金准数集之F得分,优于F-score五竞争性最先进者也。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige nua graf-bhunaithe i láthair a chothaíonn sinsets ag baint úsáide as foclóirí comhchiallacha agus leabaithe focal. Ar dtús, déanaimid graf ualaithe de chomhchiallaigh a bhaintear as acmhainní atá ar fáil go coitianta, mar Vicífhoclóir. Ar an dara dul síos, cuirimid ionduchtú ciall focal i bhfeidhm chun déileáil le focail débhríoch. Ar deireadh, cnuasachaimid an leagan dídhébhríoch den ghraf ionchuir débhríoch i sinsets. Ligeann ár gcur chuige meitea-chnuasaithe dúinn algartam cnuasaithe crua éifeachtach a úsáid chun cnuasach doiléir a dhéanamh den ghraf. In ainneoin a simplíochta, léiríonn ár gcur chuige torthaí sármhaithe, ag déanamh níos fearr ná cúig mhodh iomaíoch den scoth i dtéarmaí scóir F ar thrí thacar sonraí caighdeánacha óir do Bhéarla agus Rúisis díorthaithe ó acmhainní foclóireachta ar scála mór a tógadh de láimh.', 'ka': 'ეს დრაფიკური ახალი პროგრამის გარეშე, რომელიც სინონიმის სიტყვების და სიტყვების გარეშე სინონიკურების გამოყენებას გამოყენებს. პირველად, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სინონიმების სინონიმს, რომლებიც საერთო ხელსაწყოფილი რესურსებიდან გამოყენებული, როგორც Wiktionary. მეორე, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სიტყვის სიტყვის ინექცია, რომ გავაკეთებთ არსებული სიტყვის. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ სინქესტებში განსხვავებული გრაფიკის განსხვავებული ვერსია დავწერეთ. ჩვენი მეტა-კლასტერის პროგრამის გამოყენება ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ეფექტიური ძალიან კლასტერის ალგორიტიმა, რომ გავაკეთოთ გრაფიკის ცუდი კლასტერი. ჩვენი პროგრამის განმავლობას არაფერად, ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოყენება უკეთესი წარმოდგენება, რომლებიც ხუთი კონკონტებური განმავლობაში F-score-ის განმავლობაში სამი ჱლარული სტანდეტური მონაცემების სტანდა', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε γραφήματα που προκαλεί σύνσετ χρησιμοποιώντας συνώνυμα λεξικά και ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Πρώτον, κατασκευάζουμε ένα σταθμισμένο γράφημα συνώνυμων που εξάγονται από κοινώς διαθέσιμους πόρους, όπως το Wiktionary. Δεύτερον, εφαρμόζουμε επαγωγή λέξεων για να αντιμετωπίσουμε αμφίβολες λέξεις. Τέλος, ομαδοποιούμε την αδιαμφισβήτητη εκδοχή του διφορούμενου γραφήματος εισαγωγής σε σύνθετα. Η προσέγγιση μετα-ομαδοποίησης μας επιτρέπει να χρησιμοποιήσουμε έναν αποτελεσματικό αλγόριθμο σκληρής ομαδοποίησης για να εκτελέσουμε μια ασαφή ομαδοποίηση του γραφήματος. Παρά την απλότητά της, η προσέγγισή μας παρουσιάζει εξαιρετικά αποτελέσματα, ξεπερνώντας πέντε ανταγωνιστικές μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας όσον αφορά την βαθμολογία σε τρία χρυσά πρότυπα δεδομένων για αγγλικά και ρωσικά που προέρχονται από χειροκίνητα κατασκευασμένα λεξικά μεγάλης κλίμακας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új grafikon alapú megközelítést mutat be, amely szinonimás szótárak és szóbeágyazások használatával indukálja a szinonimákat. Először is építünk egy súlyozott grafikont a szinonimákról, amelyeket gyakran elérhető erőforrásokból, mint például a Wiktionary. Másodszor, a szóérzék indukcióját alkalmazzuk a kétértelmű szavak kezelésére. Végezetül a kétértelmű bemeneti gráf egyértelmű változatát szinonimákba csoportosítjuk. Meta-klaszterezési megközelítésünk lehetővé teszi, hogy hatékony kemény klaszterezési algoritmust használjunk a gráf homályos klaszterezéséhez. Egyszerűsége ellenére megközelítésünk kiváló eredményeket mutat, amelyek túlléptek öt versenyképes korszerű módszert az F-pontszám tekintetében három aranyszabású angol és orosz nyelvű, nagyszabású, manuálisan kialakított lexikai forrásokból származó adatkészleten.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un nuovo approccio basato sui grafici che induce i sinonimi utilizzando dizionari sinonimi e incorporazioni di parole. In primo luogo, costruiamo un grafico ponderato dei sinonimi estratti da risorse comunemente disponibili, come Wiktionary. In secondo luogo, applichiamo l'induzione del senso delle parole per trattare con parole ambigue. Infine, cluster la versione disambiguata del grafico di input ambiguo in sinonimi. Il nostro approccio di meta-clustering ci consente di utilizzare un efficiente algoritmo di hard clustering per eseguire un clustering confuso del grafico. Nonostante la sua semplicità, il nostro approccio mostra risultati eccellenti, superando cinque metodi competitivi all'avanguardia in termini di F-score su tre set di dati gold standard per inglese e russo derivati da risorse lessicali costruite manualmente su larga scala.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз графикалық негіздеген жаңа әдісін көрсетеді. Бұл синонимиялық сөздерді мен сөздерді ендіру арқылы синонимиялық сөздерді көмектеседі. Біріншіден, Wiktionary секілді көпшілікті ресурстардан таратылған синонимдердің тең графигін құрамыз. Екіншіден, біз сөздердің сезіміздің индукциясын жасаймыз. Соңғы сәтте, біз белгілі енгізу графикасының нұсқасын синхронттауларға сәйкес келтіріп тұрмыз. Мета-кластерлік тәсіліміміз графикасының ефективті қатты кластерлік алгоритмін қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Біздің қарапайым нәтижесімізді көрсетеді. F- score үш алтын стандартты ағылшын және Руссияның үлкен масштабтағы лексикалық ресурстардан құрылған үлкен масштабтағы алтын стандартты деректер баптауларына арналған бес әртүрлі әрт', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија претставува нов пристап базиран на график кој индуцира синсети користејќи синоними речници и вградувања на зборови. Прво, изградуваме тежен граф на синоними извадени од заеднички достапни ресурси, како што е Виксонари. Второ, применуваме индукција на зборовите за да се справиме со двогледни зборови. Конечно, ја групираме раздвојената верзија на двогледниот внесен граф во синсети. Нашиот метакластерирачки пристап ни овозможува да користиме ефикасен тежок алгоритм за кластерирање за да извршиме незгодно кластерирање на графот. И покрај нејзината едноставност, нашиот пристап покажува одлични резултати, надминувајќи пет конкурентни најсовремени методи во поглед на ф-оценката на три златни стандардни податоци за англиски и руски изведени од рачно изградени големи лексикални ресурси.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan pendekatan baru berdasarkan graf yang mengakibatkan sinkset menggunakan kamus sinkonimi dan penyambungan perkataan. Pertama, kita membina graf berlebihan sinonim yang dikekstrak dari sumber yang biasa tersedia, seperti Wiktionary. Second, we apply word sense induction to deal with ambiguous words.  Akhirnya, kita kumpulkan versi tidak ambiguat graf input yang ambiguat ke dalam sinkset. pendekatan meta-kumpulan kita membolehkan kita menggunakan algoritma pemkumpulan kuat yang efisien untuk melakukan pemkumpulan kelabu graf. Walaupun kesederhanaannya, pendekatan kita menunjukkan hasil yang baik, melampaui lima kaedah kompetitif state-of-the-art dalam terma skor F pada tiga set data piawai emas untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Rusia berasal dari sumber leksik yang dibina secara manual pada skala besar.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സിനോണിമി നിഘണ്ടുകളും വാക്കുകളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സിനിസ്റ്റ് ചെ ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഭാരം തൂക്കിയ സിനോണിമുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ രണ്ടാമത്, നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ മനസ്സിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അസാധാരണമായ വാക അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d സിനിസ്റ്റെറ്റുകളിലേക്ക് അസാധാരണപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന സംസ്കാരത്തിലേക്ക് തിരി നമ്മുടെ മെറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ നടപടികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു പ്രശ്നമായ ക്ലാഗോരിത്മ് ഉപയോഗിക Despite its simplicity, our approach shows excellent results, outperforming five competitive state-of-the-art methods in terms of F-score on three gold standard datasets for English and Russian derived from large-scale manually constructed lexical resources.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta approċċ ġdid ibbażat fuq il-grafika li jinduċi sinsetts bl-użu ta’ dikjararji sinonimiċi u inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem. L-ewwel nett, a ħna nibnu graff ippeżat ta’ sinonimi estratti minn riżorsi disponibbli b’mod komuni, bħall-Wiktionary. It-tieni nett, aħna napplikaw induzzjoni tas-sens tal-kelma biex nittrattaw kliem ambigwu. Fl-aħħar nett, inġabru l-verżjoni diżambigwata tal-graff ambigwu ta’ input f’sinsetti. L-approċċ tagħna ta’ meta-raggruppament jippermettilna nużaw algoritmu effiċjenti ta’ raggruppament iebes biex iwettaq raggruppament fżiż tal-graff. Minkejja s-sempliċità tagħha, l-approċċ tagħna juri riżultati eċċellenti, li jisbqu ħames metodi kompetittivi l-aktar avvanzati f’termini ta’ punteġġ F fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta standard tad-deheb għall-Ingliż u r-Russu derivati minn riżorsi lexiċi kostruiti manwalment fuq skala kbira.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас график суурилсан шинэ арга зам гаргадаг. Энэ нь synonymy үгийг болон үгийг нэвтрүүлэх арга юм. Эхлээд бид Wiktionary гэх мэт ихэвчлэн ашиглах боломжтой баялагуудын жингийн график бүтээж байна. Хоёрдугаар, бид үг мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашигладаг. Эцэст нь, бид синセтт руу холбогдсон бичлэгийн хувилбарыг холбогдож байна. Манай мета-кластерийн аргыг графикийн шинжлэх хэцүү кластерингийн алгоритм ашиглаж болно. Үүний энгийн байдал ч гэсэн, бидний арга зам нь гайхалтай үр дүнг харуулж байна. F-score нь Англи болон Орос хэлний гурван алтын стандарт өгөгдлийн санг англи болон өрсөлдөг хэлбэрээс гарсан өрсөлдөг таван өрсөлдөг арга зам дээр гаргаж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit nytt grafikkbasert tilnærming som induserer synkronisering med synonymiske ordbokstavar og ordinnbygging. Først bygger vi eit vektig graf av synonym utpakka frå vanlegvis tilgjengelege ressursar, som Wiktionary. Andre, vi bruker ordfølelsesinduksjon for å handtera med utgåande ord. I slutt, vi klomperer den forskytta versjonen av den ugjennomsiktige inndatagrafen i synkroniseringa. Dette metoden kan bruka ein effektiv hardklasseringsalgoritme for å utføra ein fuzzy klassering av grafen. Til tross sine enkeltet viser tilnærminga våre uttrykk resultat, som utfører fem konkurentære metodar for kunsten i form av F-score på tre gulldatadatasett for engelsk og russisk som utfører frå store skala manuelt konstruerte leksiske ressursar.', 'lt': 'This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synsets using synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings.  Pirma, mes statome svertinį sinonimų grafiką, gautą iš bendrų turimų išteklių, pvz., Wiktionary. Antra, mes taikome žodžio jutimo indukciją spręsti dviprasmiškus žodžius. Finally, we cluster the disambiguated version of the ambiguous input graph into synsets.  Mūsų metaklasterizavimo metodas leidžia mums naudoti veiksmingą kietą klasterizavimo algoritmą, kad atliktume apgaulingą grafiko klasterizavimą. Nepaisant jo paprastumo, mūsų požiūris rodo puikius rezultatus, geriau nei penki konkurencingi pažangiausi metodai, vertinami pagal F tašką trijuose anglų ir rusų aukso standartiniuose duomenų rinkiniuose, gautuose iš didelio masto rankiniu būdu pagamintų leksinių išteklių.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nowe podejście oparte na wykresie, które indukuje zestawy synonimów za pomocą słowników synonimów i osadzeń słów. Po pierwsze, budujemy ważony wykres synonimów uzyskanych z powszechnie dostępnych zasobów, takich jak Wiktionary. Po drugie, stosujemy indukcję zmysłu słowa do radzenia sobie z niejednoznacznymi słowami. Wreszcie grupujemy jednoznaczną wersję niejednoznacznego wykresu wejściowego w zestawy syntetyczne. Nasze podejście metaklastrowania pozwala nam użyć wydajnego algorytmu twardego klastrowania do wykonywania rozmytego klastrowania wykresu. Pomimo swojej prostoty, nasze podejście pokazuje doskonałe wyniki, przewyższając pięć konkurencyjnych najnowocześniejszych metod pod względem wyniku F na trzech standardowych zbiorach danych dla angielskiego i rosyjskiego pochodzących z dużych ręcznie skonstruowanych zasobów leksykalicznych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o nouă abordare bazată pe grafice care induce sinonime folosind dicționare de sinonime și încorporări de cuvinte. În primul rând, construim un grafic ponderat al sinonimelor extrase din resursele disponibile în mod obișnuit, cum ar fi Wiktionary. În al doilea rând, aplicăm inducția simțului cuvântului pentru a face față cuvintelor ambigue. În cele din urmă, grupăm versiunea dezambiguizată a graficului de intrare ambiguă în sineturi. Abordarea noastră de meta-clusterizare ne permite să folosim un algoritm eficient de clusterizare hard pentru a efectua o clusterizare neclară a graficului. În ciuda simplității sale, abordarea noastră arată rezultate excelente, depășind cinci metode competitive de ultimă oră în ceea ce privește scorul F pe trei seturi de date gold standard pentru limba engleză și rusă derivate din resurse lexicale construite manual la scară largă.', 'si': 'Name මුලින්ම, අපි වික්ටියෝරි වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් හද දෙවියනේ, අපි වචන අදහස් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අමාරු වචන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. අන්තිමේදී, අපි සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ඇතුළුම් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකේ අසාම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සංවිධානය කර අපේ මෙටා ක්ලොස්ටර් විදියට අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට අමාරු ක්\u200dලොස්ටර එයාගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට නමුත්, අපේ විදියට විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett nytt grafbaserat tillvägagångssätt som inducerar synuppsättningar med synonymfordböcker och ordinbäddningar. Först bygger vi en viktad graf över synonymer extraherade från allmänt tillgängliga resurser, såsom Wiktionary. För det andra använder vi ordsinnesindikation för att hantera tvetydiga ord. Slutligen klustrar vi den otvetydiga versionen av den tvetydiga inmatningsgrafen i synuppsättningar. Vår metod för metaklustring låter oss använda en effektiv algoritm för hård klustring för att utföra en suddig klustring av grafen. Trots sin enkelhet visar vårt tillvägagångssätt utmärkta resultat, vilket överträffar fem konkurrenskraftiga state-of-the-art metoder när det gäller F-poäng på tre guldstandarddataset för engelska och ryska som härrör från storskaliga manuellt konstruerade lexikala resurser.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய வரைபடத்தின் அடிப்படையான செயல்பாட்டை கொடுக்கிறது அது ஒத்திசைவை செய்கிறது ஒத்திசைவு மற்ற முதலில், நாம் பொதுவான கிடைக்கும் வளங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட ஒத்திசைப்புகளின் வரைபடம் உருவாக்கு இரண்டாவது, இறுதியில், நாம் ஒத்திசைவுகளுக்கு ஒத்திசைவுக்கு புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியாத பதிப்பு எங்கள் மெடா கூட்டும் செயல்பாடுகள் வரைப்படத்தின் குளிர்ச்சியை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும். Despite its simplicity, our approach shows excellent results, outperforming five competitive state-of-the-art methods in terms of F-score on three gold standard datasets for English and Russian derived from large-scale manually constructed lexical resources.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu keenaa qaab cusub oo ku saleysan graf, kaas oo ka soo bandhigaa si lagu isticmaalo dictionary iyo eray ku qoran. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu dhisaynaa sawir miisaan ah oo la soo saaray hantida caadiga ah, tusaale ahaan Wiktionary. Second, waxaynu isticmaalnaa qalabka maanka ah si aan u kala macaamiloono hadal qalloocan. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu leexinnaa warqada la burburiyay sawirada input-tarka. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga wax lagu soo saaro ayaa na isticmaalaya algorithm adag oo si a an u sameynno xarunta fudud. Inta kastoo ay fudud tahay, dhaqdhaqaalahayagu wuxuu muujiyaa midhaha aad u wanaagsan, waxaana ka sameynaya shan qaabab oo iskutallaabta farshaxanta ah ee F-score ku qoran saddex sawirro oo sawirro ah oo dahab ah oo afka Ingiriis iyo Ruushka laga keenay macluumaad aad u weyn oo la dhisay.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings using synonyms. پہلے، ہم ایک وزن گراف بناتے ہیں، جیسے ویکتیورنی کے مطابق معمولا موجود منابع سے نکالے جاتے ہیں. دوسرا، ہم کلمات کا احساس الزام لگاتے ہیں کہ مشکل کلمات کے ساتھ استعمال کریں۔ آخر میں، ہم نے سینسٹ میں دائمی اینٹ گراف کی ناکام کی نسخہ کو تقسیم کیا۔ ہماری مٹا-کلسٹر کی تقریبا ہمیں ایک عمدہ سخت کلسٹر الگوریتم کا استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے اس کے سادگی کے بغیر، ہمارا طریقہ بہترین نتیجے دکھاتا ہے، پانچ مسابقات کی آرتی طریقے پر F-score کے مطابق تین سوندی استاندارڈ ڈیٹ سٹ پر، انگلیسی اور روسی کے لئے بہت سی استاندارڈ ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق مطابق ل', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup baziran na grafiku koji inducira sinkronizacije koristeći sinonimijske rečenice i rečenje. Prvo, izgradimo težinu grafika sinonima izvučenog iz obiènih dostupnih resursa, kao što je Wiktionary. Drugo, primjenjujemo indukciju reèi za duboke reèi. Konačno, uključili smo dezambiguovanu verziju dvosmislenog grafika ulaska u sinkronizaciju. Naš metaklasterirani pristup nam omogućava da koristimo efikasni teški algoritam skupljanja da izvedemo fuzzy skupljanje grafika. Uprkos njenoj jednostavnošću, naš pristup pokazuje odlične rezultate, iznosivajući pet konkurentnih metoda umjetnosti u smislu F-rezultata na tri zlatne standardne sete podataka za engleski i ruski iz velike skale ručno konstruirane leksičke resurse.', 'uz': "Name First, we build a weighted graph of synonyms extracted from commonly available resources, such as Wiktionary.  Ikkinchi so'zda, biz eng g'oyalar so'zlarni boshqarish uchun so'zni ishlatimiz. Endi, biz cheksiz kiritish grafikning qismlarini sinetishga qo'yishimiz mumkin. Bizning meta-tuzilishimiz usuli faqat grafikning kichkina bir qatlamni ishlab chiqarishimizga ishlatadi. Bizning oddiylik natijalarimiz juda yaxshi natijalarini ko'rsatadi. Biz ingliz va Ruscha uchun uchta ta qismi holatda F scorning qismini bajarish usullarini qo'lbola qo'llab qo'llangan leksikal rasmlaridan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này có một phương pháp dựa vào đồ thị mới tạo ra các khớp dùng từ điển và từ điển đồng nghĩa. Đầu tiên, chúng ta xây dựng một đồ thị hoà hợp được chiết xuất từ nguồn tài nguyên có sẵn, như Wiktlồ. Thứ hai, chúng tôi áp dụng cảm nhận từ để xử lý những từ mơ hồ. Cuối cùng, chúng ta phân loại phiên bản bị biến dạng của đồ thị nhập mơ hồ thành các khớp. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta với tụ điểm dị biến cho phép chúng ta sử dụng một thuật to án phức tạp hiệu quả để thực hiện một tụ tập nhòe của đồ thị. Mặc cho nó đơn giản, phương pháp của chúng ta cho thấy kết quả tuyệt vời, vượt qua năm phương pháp hiện đại cạnh tranh về điểm F trên ba bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn vàng cho Anh quốc và Nga chiết xuất từ tài nguyên ngôn ngữ văn học lớn tự xây dựng.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een nieuwe grafiekgebaseerde benadering die synsets induceert met behulp van synoniem woordenboeken en woord embeddings. Eerst bouwen we een gewogen grafiek van synoniemen uit algemeen beschikbare bronnen, zoals Wiktionary. Ten tweede passen we woordzintuiginductie toe om te gaan met dubbelzinnige woorden. Ten slotte clusteren we de verduidelijkte versie van de dubbelzinnige invoergrafiek in synsets. Met onze meta-clustering aanpak kunnen we een efficiënt hard clustering algoritme gebruiken om een fuzzy clustering van de grafiek uit te voeren. Ondanks zijn eenvoud toont onze aanpak uitstekende resultaten, die beter presteert dan vijf concurrerende state-of-the-art methoden in termen van F-score op drie gouden standaard datasets voor Engels en Russisch afgeleid van grootschalige handmatig geconstrueerde lexicale bronnen.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя нов подход, базиран на графики, който индуцира синхронизации, използвайки синонимни речници и вграждания на думи. Първо, изграждаме претеглена графика на синонимите, извлечени от често достъпни ресурси, като например Уикиречник. Второ, ние прилагаме индукция на смисъла на думата, за да се справим с двусмислени думи. Накрая, групираме недвусмислената версия на двусмислената входна графика в синсети. Нашият мета-клъстерен подход ни позволява да използваме ефективен твърд клъстерен алгоритъм за извършване на мъгливо клъстериране на графиката. Въпреки простотата си, нашият подход показва отлични резултати, надминавайки пет конкурентни най-съвременни метода по отношение на F-score върху три златни стандартни бази данни за английски и руски, получени от мащабни ръчно конструирани лексикални ресурси.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en ny grafbaseret tilgang, der inducerer synonymer ved hjælp af synonymfordbøger og ordindlejringer. Først bygger vi en vægtet graf over synonymer udvundet fra almindeligt tilgængelige ressourcer, såsom Wiktionary. For det andet anvender vi ordsans induktion til at beskæftige os med tvetydige ord. Endelig klynger vi den utvetydige version af den tvetydige input graf i synsets. Vores meta-klyngning tilgang lader os bruge en effektiv hard clustering algoritme til at udføre en uklar klyngning af grafen. På trods af sin enkelhed viser vores tilgang fremragende resultater, der overgår fem konkurrencedygtige state-of-the-art metoder i form af F-score på tre guldstandard datasæt for engelsk og russisk afledt af store manuelt konstruerede leksikalske ressourcer.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup na grafiku koji inducira sinkronizacije koristeći sinonimijske riječi i priključenje riječi. Prvo, izgradimo težinu grafika sinonima izvučenog iz obično dostupnih resursa, poput Wiktionary. Drugo, primjenjujemo indukciju smisla riječi da se suočimo sa dvosmislenim riječima. Konačno, uključili smo dezambiguiranu verziju dvosmislenog grafika ulaska u sinkronizaciju. Naš metaklasterirani pristup nam omogućava da koristimo učinkovit težak skustering algoritam kako bi izvršili fuzzy skustering grafika. Unatoč njenoj jednostavnosti, naš pristup pokazuje odlične rezultate, iznosivajući pet konkurentnih metoda stanja umjetnosti u smislu F-rezultata na tri zlatne standardne baze podataka za engleski i ruski iz velike skale ručno konstruiranih leksičkih resursa.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt einen neuen graphenbasierten Ansatz vor, der Synsets mithilfe von Synonymwörterbüchern und Worteinbettungen induziert. Zunächst erstellen wir einen gewichteten Graphen von Synonymen, die aus allgemein verfügbaren Ressourcen wie Wiktionary extrahiert werden. Zweitens wenden wir Wortsinninduktion an, um mit mehrdeutigen Wörtern umzugehen. Schließlich gruppieren wir die unklare Version des mehrdeutigen Eingabegraphen in Synsets. Unser Meta-Clustering Ansatz ermöglicht es uns, einen effizienten Hard Clustering Algorithmus zu verwenden, um eine fuzzy Clustering des Graphen durchzuführen. Trotz seiner Einfachheit zeigt unser Ansatz hervorragende Ergebnisse und übertrifft fünf wettbewerbsfähige State-of-the-Art-Methoden in Bezug auf den F-Score auf drei Goldstandard-Datensätzen für Englisch und Russisch, die aus großen manuell konstruierten lexikalischen Ressourcen abgeleitet wurden.', 'ko': '본고는 그림을 바탕으로 하는 새로운 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 동의어 사전과 단어를 삽입하여 문법집을 귀납한다.우선, 자주 사용하는 자원 (예: Wiktionary) 에서 추출한 동의어 가중도를 구축합니다.그 다음에 우리는 어의 귀납법을 운용하여 잘못된 뜻을 처리한다.마지막으로, 우리는 잘못된 의미 입력도의 잘못된 버전을 문법 집중에 집합할 것이다.우리의 원 집합 방법은 우리가 효과적인 하드 집합 알고리즘을 사용하여 그림에 대해 모호한 집합을 할 수 있게 한다.비록 간단하지만 우리의 방법은 우수한 결과를 나타냈다. 세 개의 금표준 영어와 러시아어 데이터 집합에서 대규모로 수동으로 구축된 어휘 자원 중에서 우리의 방법은 F점수 방면에서 경쟁력 있는 다섯 가지 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다.', 'id': 'This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synsets using synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings.  Pertama, kita membangun grafik berlebihan sinonim yang dikeluarkan dari sumber daya yang biasa tersedia, seperti Wiktionary. Kedua, kita menggunakan induksi kata-kata sensor untuk berurusan dengan kata-kata yang ambigus. Akhirnya, kita mengumpulkan versi yang tidak jelas dari grafik masukan yang ambigu ke dalam sinset. pendekatan meta-clustering kita memungkinkan kita menggunakan algoritma clustering keras yang efisien untuk melakukan clustering kabur grafik. Meskipun kesederhanaannya, pendekatan kita menunjukkan hasil yang luar biasa, melampaui lima metode kompetitif state-of-the-art dalam terma skor F pada tiga set data standar emas untuk bahasa Inggris dan Rusia berasal dari sumber daya lexik yang dibuat manual skala besar.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu mpya ya picha inayotengeneza kuiunga mkono kwa kutumia dictionary and word embedded. Kwanza, tunajenga picha za synonyesha zilizotolewa kutoka rasilimali zinazopatikana kwa kawaida, kama vile Wiktionary. Pili, tunatumia sekta ya maana ya maneno ili kukabiliana na maneno yasiyo na matatizo. Mwisho, tunaunganisha toleo lililotokana na ubaguzi wa picha za kuingia kwenye syneti. Vyombo vyetu vya mafuta vinaturuhusu kutumia algorithi yenye ufanisi wa kutosha ili kutengeneza viungo vibaya vya picha hiyo. Pamoja na urahisi wake, mbinu yetu inaonyesha matokeo mazuri, kutengeneza mbinu tano za ushindani wa aina ya sanaa za aina ya F-score kwenye seti tatu za kiwango cha dhahabu kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na Urusi zilizotoka kwa kiwango kikubwa kinachotengenezwa kwa manufaa.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n nuwe graafgebaseerde toegang wat synonyme woordeboekvorms en woord inbêring induseer. Eerste bou ons 'n gewigte graf van sinonime uitgevoer van gewoonlik beskikbare hulpbronne, soos Wiktionary. Tweede, ons toewend woord sin induksie om met ongelukkige woorde te behandel. Eindelik, ons cluster die ontsammingde weergawe van die ongelukkige invoer graaf in sinkronisasies. Ons meta-clustering toegang laat ons 'n effektief harde clustering algoritme gebruik om 'n skande clustering van die graf te doen. Terwyl sy eenvoudigheid, vertoon ons toegang uitgelykende resultate, uitgevoer vyf gemeenskaplike staat-van-die-kunstensmetodes in terms van F-score op drie goue standaard datastel vir Engels en Russies afgelei van groot-skaal manueel gebruikte leksiehulpbronne.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull paraqet një qasje të re bazuar në grafik që indukton sinteza duke përdorur fjalorët sinonimike dhe përfshirjet e fjalëve. Së pari, ne ndërtojmë një grafik të peshuar sinonimesh të nxjerrë nga burimet e përdorura të zakonshme, të tilla si Wiktionary. Së dyti, ne aplikojmë induksionin e kuptimit të fjalës për të trajtuar me fjalë të qarta. Më në fund, ne grumbullojmë versionin e jashtëzakonshëm të grafikut të hyrjes në sinset. Përqasja jonë e meta-klasifikimit na lejon të përdorim një algoritëm efektiv të vështirë klasifikimi për të kryer një grupim të ngatërruar të grafikut. Despite its simplicity, our approach shows excellent results, outperforming five competitive state-of-the-art methods in terms of F-score on three gold standard datasets for English and Russian derived from large-scale manually constructed lexical resources.', 'am': 'This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synsets using synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings.  በመጀመሪያ፣ እንደWiktionary፣ በተለየ ሀብት የሚወጡትን የሲናኒም ቀለም እንሠራለን፡፡ ሁለተኛ፣ የንግግር ስህተት ጉዳይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም የደረሰውን የውጤት ግንኙነት ወደ ሲንሴሎቹ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ መሀይማችን አካባቢ አካባቢ ቋንቋን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳ ቀላል ቢሆንም፣ የእኛ ደረጃችን ትልቅ ፍሬዎችን ያሳያል፣ አምስት ተቃዋሚዎች የዐርድ-ሀብት ሥርዓት የፍጥረት ሀብት አካባቢ የኢንልዝላዊ እና የሩሽኛ ደረጃዎች ለሦስት የወርቅ የአድራሻ ዳታተሮችን በአፍሪካዊ እና የሌክሲካዊ ሀብት እጃቸው በመሠረቱ ነው', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է նոր գծագրի հիմնված մոտեցում, որը առաջացնում է սինսետներ, օգտագործելով սինոնիմիա բառարաններ և բառերի ներդրումներ: Առաջինը, մենք կառուցում ենք սինոնիմների կենտրոնացված գրաֆիկը, որը ստացվում է ընդհանուր հասանելի ռեսուրսներից, ինչպիսիք են Վիքցիոնարը: Երկրորդ, մենք կիրառում ենք բառի զգացմունքի ինդուկցիան բառերի հետ կապված բառերի հետ: Վերջապես, մենք հավաքում ենք երկիմաստ ներմուծի գրաֆիկի անբացատրված տարբերակը սինսետների մեջ: Մեր մետախմբագրման մոտեցումը թույլ է տալիս մեզ օգտագործել արդյունավետ խմբագրման բարդ ալգորիթմ գծագրի խառն խմբագրման համար: Չնայած նրա պարզությանը, մեր մոտեցումը ցույց է տալիս հրաշալի արդյունքներ, որոնք գերազանցում են հինգ մրցակցության ամենաբարձր մեթոդը F-գնահատման առումով անգլերենի և ռուսերենի երեք ոսկե ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք ստացվում են ձեռքո', 'az': 'Bu kağıt sinonimi sözləri və sözləri istifadə edən yeni grafik tabanlı bir approach göstərir. Əvvəlcə, Wiktionary kimi çox mümkün kaynaqlardan çıxarılan sinonimlərin a ğırlığı grafını inşa edirik. İkincisi, biz sözlərin sağlam təsiri ilə münasibətli sözlərlə çəkmək üçün istifadə edirik. Sonunda, müəyyən giriş grafının müəyyən bir versiyonunu sinkronizə qoyuruq. Meta-clustering approach allows us to use an efficient hard clustering algorithm to perform a fuzzy clustering of the graph. Yaxınlığının basitlığına rağmen, bizim tərzimiz ən yaxşı sonuçlarını göstərir, beş müəllif məlumat metodlarının F-score ilə, İngilizə və Rusya üçün üç altın standart veri setlərinə görə böyük ölçüdə əlli təhsil edilmiş leksik kaynaqlarından qurulmuşdur.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش جدید بر اساس گراف نشان می دهد که با استفاده از لغت\u200cنامه\u200cهای سینونیمی و استفاده از لغت\u200cنامه\u200cهای سینونیمی باعث می\u200cشود. اول، ما یک گراف وزن سنونیم از منابع معمولاً دسترسی شده، مثل ویکتونری بسازیم. دوم، ما به عنوان توجه حس کلمه برای درگیری با کلمات مختلف استفاده می کنیم. بالاخره، ما نسخه\u200cی غیرقابل تغییر قابل تغییر از گراف ورودی غیرقابل تغییر می\u200cگیریم. روش متکلاستر ما اجازه می دهد که از الگوریتم سخت کلاستر مثبت استفاده کنیم تا یک کلاستر کثیف از گراف انجام دهیم. با وجود ساده\u200cاش، دسترسی ما نتیجه\u200cهای عالی را نشان می\u200cدهد، بیشتر از پنج روش\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cی حالت هنر در نظر F-score بر سه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد طلا برای انگلیسی و روسی که از منابع\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی به دست بسته شده است.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz synonymyny sözlerni we sözlerni ulanyp syngollaşdyrýan täze grafik tabanly bir ýazşy görkezýär. Ilkinji gezek, Wiktionary ýaly daşky bolan çeşmelerden çykylýan synonymlaryň çykyş grafisini inşa edýäris. Ikinjisi, söz duýgulary nähili sözler bilen çözmek üçin elimize geçirilýäris. Soňunda, biz çapşyr girdi grafisiniň çapşyrylmadyk wersiýasyny syntaklaýarys. Meta-klasterimiz yaklaşymyz, grafikiň bozgunç bir klasterini etkinlik kyn klasterimiz algoritmini ullanyp biler. Aslyklyka ýöne, biziň ýaryşymyz gowy netijeleri görkez, iňlisçe we Russiýa üç gol standart veri setirine görä el bilen gurulduň beş ýaryşykly durumlary çykarýar.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা একটি নতুন গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছে যা সিনোনিমি অভিভাবক এবং শব্দ ব্যবহার করে সিনিস্টেটগুলো প্ First, we build a weighted graph of synonyms extracted from commonly available resources, such as Wiktionary.  দ্বিতীয়, আমরা শব্দের মানসিক শিল্পের প্রয়োগ করি যাতে বিদ্রুপ শব্দের সাথে মিলে নেয়। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা সিনেটগুলোর মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন সংস্করণের সংস্করণ দিয়েছি। আমাদের মেটা-ক্লাস্টারিং পদক্ষেপ আমাদের কাছে কার্যকর কঠিন ক্লাগরিদম ব্যবহার করে গ্রাফের একটি বিস্ময়কর ক্ষেত্রে কাজ করা এগুলো সহজ সত্ত্বেও, আমাদের পদক্ষেপ দেখাচ্ছে চমৎকার ফলাফল, যারা বিশাল পরিমাণে লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে ইংরেজি ও রাশিয়ার তিনটি সোনার্ডার ড', 'ca': "This paper presents a new graph-based approach that induces synsets using synonymy dictionaries and word embeddings.  Primer, construïm un gràfic pesat de sinònims extraïts de recursos comunament disponibles, com el Wiktionary. Segon, aplicam l'inducció del sentit de paraules per tractar amb paraules ambigues. Finalment, agrupam la versió desambiguada del gràfic d'entrada ambigu en sinsets. El nostre enfocament de meta-agrupació ens permet utilitzar un algoritme eficient de agrupament dur per a fer un agrupament confus del gràfic. Malgrat la seva simplicitat, el nostre enfocament mostra excel·lents resultats, superant cinc mètodes competitius d'última generació en termes de puntuació F en tres conjunts de dades estandards d'or per anglès i rus derivats de recursos lèxics construïts manualment a gran escala.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje nový přístup založený na grafech, který indukuje synsety pomocí synonymických slovníků a vložení slov. Nejprve vytvoříme vážený graf synonymů extrahovaných z běžně dostupných zdrojů, jako je například Wiktionary. Za druhé používáme indukci slova smyslu k řešení nejednoznačných slov. Na závěr shlukujeme jednoznačnou verzi nejednoznačného vstupního grafu do synsetů. Náš meta-clusterový přístup nám umožňuje použít efektivní algoritmus tvrdého clusterování k provedení fuzzy clusterování grafu. Navzdory své jednoduchosti, náš přístup ukazuje vynikající výsledky, překonává pět konkurenčních nejmodernějších metod z hlediska F-skóre na třech zlatých standardních datových sadách pro angličtinu a ruštinu odvozených z velkých ručně konstruovaných lexikálních zdrojů.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi graafinen lähestymistapa, joka indusoi synonyymisanakirjoja ja sanaupotuksia käyttämällä synonyymisanakirjoja. Ensin rakennamme painotetun graafin synonyymeistä, jotka on saatu yleisesti saatavilla olevista resursseista, kuten Wiktionarysta. Toiseksi käytämme sanaaistin induktiota käsitellessämme epäselviä sanoja. Lopuksi klusterimme epäselvän syöttökäyrän yksiselitteisen version synseteiksi. Metaklusterointimme avulla voimme käyttää tehokasta kovaa klusterointialgoritmia graafin sumean klusteroinnin suorittamiseen. Yksinkertaisuudesta huolimatta lähestymistapamme tuottaa erinomaisia tuloksia, sillä se on ylittänyt viisi huippuluokkaa olevaa F-pisteytysmenetelmää kolmessa englannin ja venäjän kultastandardiaineistossa, jotka on johdettu suurista käsin rakennetuista sanakirjoista.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup na grafiku koji inducira sinkronizacije koristeći sinonimijske riječi i ugrađenje riječi. Prvo, izgradimo težinu grafika sinonima izvučenog iz obično dostupnih resursa, poput Wiktionary. Drugo, primjenjujemo indukciju smisla riječi da se suočimo sa dvosmislenim riječima. Konačno, uključujemo dezambiguovanu verziju dvosmislenog grafika ulaska u sinkronizaciju. Naš metaklasterirani pristup nam omogućava da koristimo efikasni teški algoritam skupljanja da izvedemo fuzzy skupljanje grafika. Unatoč njenoj jednostavnosti, naš pristup pokazuje odlične rezultate, iznosivajući pet konkurentnih metoda umjetnosti u smislu F-rezultata na tri zlatne standardne baze podataka za engleski i ruski iz velike skale ručno konstruirane leksičke resurse.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö esitab uut graafikapõhist lähenemisviisi, mis indutseerib sünonüümiasõnaraamatuid ja sõna manustamist kasutades sünonüümiaid. Esiteks ehitame kaalutud graafiku sünonüümidest, mis on ekstraheeritud üldiselt kättesaadavatest ressurssidest, näiteks Wiktionary. Teiseks rakendame sõna tähenduse induktsiooni, et tegeleda ebaselgete sõnadega. Lõpuks klastrime mitmetähendusliku sisendgraafiku selgitatud versiooni sünkroonideks. Meie metaklastrite lähenemine võimaldab meil kasutada tõhusat kõva klastrite algoritmi graafiku uduse klastrite tegemiseks. Vaatamata lihtsusele näitab meie lähenemisviis suurepäraseid tulemusi, ületades viit konkurentsivõimelist tipptasemel meetodit F-skoori osas kolmes inglise ja vene kuldstandardi andmekogumis, mis on saadud suuremahulistest käsitsi ehitatud leksikaalsetest ressurssidest.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing nambah akeh basa nang graf sing dumateng, ingkang sampeyan seneng pisan kelompok karo peranggambar sing sampeyan karo peranggambar aku Awak dhéwé nggawe graf sing dikanggambar luwih dumateng, koyo Wiksi Wis, kened mengko iso nggambar obang-obang kelas kuwi malah command Awak dhéwé meta-clustering diagram sing permet nyinggawe nguasah diutag-clustering Algorithm kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Saiki ono sampeyan seneng perusahaan, dadi nambah sing paling-perusahaan ning limo perusahaan-perusahaan lan sampeyan pancen sing paling-perusahaan', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na ƙunsa da wata hanyoyi na ƙayyade grafi wanda ke ƙara sunan da ke amfani da dictionaries da maganar da aka shigar da shi. Kayyan da, muna gina wani grafi mai nauyi na samofin sunonim wanda aka samu daga ruwan da ke da kawaici, kamar Wictionary. Dukkan, za'a amfani da maganar saniya da za'a yi aiki da maganar baka. Haƙĩƙa, Munã samun version da aka raba da shi ga sigogin da za'a yi sauna zuwa syntsettu. Tsarakanmu ta samu da meta sai mu yi amfani da algoritmu mai kamfata ko ta samun wata matabbata mai sauri na grafi. Despite its simplicity, our approach shows excellent results, outperforming five competitive state-of-the-art methods in terms of F-score on three gold standard datasets for English and Russian derived from large-scale manually constructed lexical resources.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja nov pristop, ki temelji na grafih, ki inducira sinhronizacije z uporabo sinonimskih slovarjev in besednih vdelav. Najprej izdelamo ponderiran graf sinonimov, pridobljenih iz splošno razpoložljivih virov, kot je Wikcionary. Drugič, uporabljamo indukcijo besednega smisla za obravnavanje dvoumnih besed. Na koncu razporedimo različico dvoumnega vhodnega grafa v sinzore. Naš pristop meta-grozdja nam omogoča uporabo učinkovitega algoritma trdega grozdja za izvedbo mehkega grozdja grafikona. Naš pristop kljub preprostosti kaže odlične rezultate, saj je na treh zlatih standardnih podatkovnih nizih za angleščino in ruščino, ki izhajajo iz obsežnih ročno konstruiranih leksikalnih virov, dosegel pet najsodobnejših metod F-rezultatov.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה גישה חדשה מבוססת בגרף שמגרמת סינסטים באמצעות מילונים סינונימיים ומילים. קודם כל, אנו בונים גרף משקל של סינונימים מווצאים משאבים זמינים לרוב, כמו Wiktionary. שנית, אנו משתמשים בהתחשב במילים כדי להתמודד עם מילים סביבות. סוף סוף, אנו מגדלים את הגרסה המבוטחת של הגרף הכניסה המבוטא לתוך סינסטים. הגישה המטה-מקבוצת שלנו מאפשרת לנו להשתמש באלגוריתם הקשה יעיל לקבוצת כדי לבצע מקבוצת מעורפלת של הגרף. למרות הפשוטיות שלה, הגישה שלנו מראה תוצאות מצוינות, ביצוע חמש שיטות מתחרות מצוינות במונחים של נקודת F על שלושה קבוצות מידע סטנדרטיים זהב לאנגלית ורוסית שנוצרות ממשאבים לקסיים בנויים ידנית במידה גדולה.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ནི་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་གསང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚོགས་ དང་པོ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་བྱུང་བའི་རྣམ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་བཀོད་རིས་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་། གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་པ་དེ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་དུས། Finally, we cluster the disambiguated version of the ambiguous input graph into synsets. ང་ཚོའི་ཕྱིར་མཐོང་སྣུམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོམ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་ཕན་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་རིམ ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལས་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'TriviaQA : A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'TriviaQA: مجموعة بيانات تحدي واسعة النطاق يتم الإشراف عليها عن بُعد لفهم القراءة', 'pt': 'TriviaQA: um conjunto de dados de desafio supervisionado à distância em grande escala para compreensão de leitura', 'fr': 'TriviaQA\xa0: Un jeu de données de défi supervisé à distance à grande échelle pour la compréhension en lecture', 'es': 'TriviAQA: un conjunto de datos de desafíos supervisado a distancia a gran escala para la comprensión lectora', 'ja': 'TriviaQA ：読解のための大規模な遠隔監督チャレンジデータセット', 'zh': 'TriviaQA:大远程督数集', 'hi': 'सामान्य ज्ञानQA: पढ़ने की समझ के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर दूर से पर्यवेक्षित चुनौती डेटासेट', 'ru': 'TriviaQA: крупномасштабный набор данных с дистанционным надзором для понимания чтения', 'ga': 'TriviaQA: Tacar Sonraí Dúshláin a Maoirsítear i gCéin ar Scála Mór don Léamhthuiscint', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας που εποπτεύεται εξ αποστάσεως για την κατανόηση της ανάγνωσης', 'ka': 'QA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Data Database for Reading Comprehension', 'hu': 'TriviaQA: Egy nagyméretű, távolról felügyelt kihívási adatkészlet az olvasáshoz', 'kk': 'QA: A Large Scale Distant Supervised Challenge Data Database for Reading Comprehension', 'mk': 'Тривија', 'lt': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'ms': 'QA: A Large Scale Distant Supervised Challenge Dataset untuk Membaca Pemahaman', 'it': 'TriviaQA: un set di dati di sfida su larga scala supervisionato a distanza per la comprensione della lettura', 'ml': 'ട്രിവിയാക്ക്: വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'TriviaQA: Sett ta’ Dejta ta’ Sfidi Superviżati mill-bogħod fuq Skala Kbar għall-Qtar tal-Komprensjoni', 'mn': 'Тривиа', 'pl': 'TriviaQA: Duży zestaw danych wyzwań nadzorowanych na odległość dla zrozumienia odczytu', 'ro': 'TriviaQA: Un set de date cu provocări supravegheate la distanță la scară largă pentru înțelegerea citirii', 'no': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Data for Reading Comprehension', 'sr': 'TriviaQA: Velika skala daleko nadzirana datoteka izazova za čitanje kompresije', 'ta': 'QA: படிப்பதற்கான பெரிய அளவு Distantly Superprotected Challenge Dataset', 'si': 'QA: A Large scaling Distant supervised challenge data baset for Reading Comprention', 'so': 'QA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'sv': 'TriviaQA: En stor skala fjärrövervakad utmaning dataset för läsförståelse', 'ur': 'QA', 'uz': 'QSql', 'vi': 'Từ đáp A: A Large Scale distinguished Challeng dataset for Reading Compention', 'hr': 'TriviaQA: Velika skala podataka izazova za čitanje komprehenzije', 'bg': 'Многомащабен дистанционно наблюдаван набор от данни за предизвикателства за разбиране на четенето', 'de': 'TriviaQA: Ein großer, fernüberwachter Challenge-Datensatz für Leseverständnis', 'id': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Distant Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'da': 'TriviaQA: Et stort datasæt med fjernsyn til udfordringer til læseforståelse', 'nl': 'TriviaQA: Een grootschalige, op afstand begeleide uitdaging dataset voor leesinzicht', 'ko': 'TriviaQA: 읽기와 이해를 위한 대규모 원격 감시 도전 데이터 세트', 'fa': 'ترویویاQA: یک مقیاس بزرگ در طول دور نظارت داده\u200cهای چالج برای خواندن تأکید', 'sw': 'TriviaQA: Kiwango kikubwa cha Kutokana na Mpango wa Taarifa za Challenge kwa ajili ya Kusoma Uwezeshaji', 'af': 'QA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Data Database for Reading Comprehension', 'sq': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Remote Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'tr': 'QA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'hy': 'QA: A Large Scene', 'az': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Distant Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension', 'am': 'QA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Completion', 'bn': 'ট্রিভিয়াQA: পাঠ করার জন্য একটি বড় মাত্রা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সাপার্ভার করা চ্যালেঞ্জ ডাটা', 'ca': 'TriviaQA: Un conjunt de dades de reptes remotament supervisades a gran escala per llegir la comprensió', 'cs': 'TriviaQA: Dataset velkého rozsahu s dálkovým dohledem na výzvu pro porozumění čtení', 'bs': 'TriviaQA: Velika skala daleko nadzirana datoteka izazova za čitanje kompresije', 'et': 'TriviaQA: laiaulatuslik kaugjuhitav väljakutse andmekogum lugemise arusaamiseks', 'fi': 'TriviaQA: Laajamittainen etävalvottu haasteaineisto lukemisen ymmärtämiseen', 'jv': 'TribiaqA: A Wid scale Distantaly super Vised', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'TriviaQA: nabor podatkov o velikem obsegu z daljnim nadzorom izzivov za razumevanje branja', 'bo': 'TriviaQA: A Large Scale Distantly Supervised Challenge Dataset for Reading Comprehension'}
{'en': 'We present TriviaQA, a challenging reading comprehension dataset containing over 650 K question-answer-evidence triples. TriviaQA includes 95 K question-answer pairs authored by trivia enthusiasts and independently gathered evidence documents, six per question on average, that provide high quality distant supervision for answering the questions. We show that, in comparison to other recently introduced large-scale datasets, TriviaQA (1) has relatively complex, compositional questions, (2) has considerable syntactic and lexical variability between questions and corresponding answer-evidence sentences, and (3) requires more cross sentence reasoning to find answers. We also present two baseline algorithms : a feature-based classifier and a state-of-the-art neural network, that performs well on SQuAD reading comprehension. Neither approach comes close to human performance (23 % and 40 % vs. 80 %), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'ar': 'نقدم TriviaQA ، وهي مجموعة بيانات صعبة لفهم القراءة تحتوي على أكثر من 650 ألف سؤال وجواب ودليل ثلاث مرات. يتضمن TriviaQA 95 ألف زوج من الأسئلة والأجوبة من تأليف عشاق التوافه ووثائق الأدلة التي تم جمعها بشكل مستقل ، ستة لكل سؤال في المتوسط ، والتي توفر إشرافًا عن بُعد عالي الجودة للإجابة على الأسئلة. لقد أظهرنا أنه ، بالمقارنة مع مجموعات البيانات الأخرى واسعة النطاق التي تم تقديمها مؤخرًا ، فإن TriviaQA (1) لديها أسئلة تركيبية معقدة نسبيًا ، (2) لديها تنوع نحوي ومعجمي كبير بين الأسئلة وجمل أدلة الإجابة المقابلة ، و (3) تتطلب المزيد عبر التفكير الجملة للعثور على إجابات. نقدم أيضًا خوارزميتين أساسيتين: مصنف قائم على الميزات وشبكة عصبية حديثة ، تعمل بشكل جيد على فهم قراءة SQuAD. لا يقترب أي من النهجين من الأداء البشري (23٪ و 40٪ مقابل 80٪) ، مما يشير إلى أن TriviaQA تمثل اختبارًا صعبًا يستحق دراسة مستقبلية مهمة.', 'es': 'Presentamos TriviaQA, un desafiante conjunto de datos de comprensión lectora que contiene más de 650 000 triples de preguntas, respuestas y pruebas. TriviAQA incluye 95.000 pares de preguntas y respuestas creados por entusiastas de las trivialidades y documentos de evidencia recopilados de forma independiente, seis por pregunta en promedio, que proporcionan una supervisión a distancia de alta calidad para responder a las preguntas. Mostramos que, en comparación con otros conjuntos de datos a gran escala introducidos recientemente, TriviAQA (1) tiene preguntas de composición relativamente complejas, (2) tiene una variabilidad sintáctica y léxica considerable entre las preguntas y las oraciones de respuesta y evidencia correspondientes, y (3) requiere más razonamiento entre frases para encontrar respuestas. También presentamos dos algoritmos de referencia: un clasificador basado en funciones y una red neuronal de última generación, que funciona bien en la comprensión lectora de sQuad. Ninguno de los dos enfoques se acerca al rendimiento humano (23 y 40 vs. 80%), lo que sugiere que TriviAQA es un banco de pruebas desafiante que vale la pena estudiar en el futuro.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o TriviaQA, um conjunto de dados desafiador de compreensão de leitura contendo mais de 650 mil triplos pergunta-resposta-evidência. O TriviaQA inclui 95 mil pares de perguntas e respostas de autoria de entusiastas de curiosidades e documentos de evidências coletados de forma independente, seis por pergunta em média, que fornecem supervisão distante de alta qualidade para responder às perguntas. Mostramos que, em comparação com outros conjuntos de dados de larga escala introduzidos recentemente, o TriviaQA (1) tem questões de composição relativamente complexas, (2) tem considerável variabilidade sintática e lexical entre perguntas e sentenças de resposta-evidência correspondentes, e (3) requer mais raciocínio de frases cruzadas para encontrar respostas. Também apresentamos dois algoritmos de linha de base: um classificador baseado em recursos e uma rede neural de última geração, com bom desempenho na compreensão de leitura SQuAD. Nenhuma das abordagens chega perto do desempenho humano (23% e 40% vs. 80%), sugerindo que o TriviaQA é um teste desafiador que merece um estudo futuro significativo.', 'fr': "Nous présentons TriviaQA, un ensemble de données stimulant de compréhension de la lecture contenant plus de 650 000 triples questions-réponses-preuves. TriviaQA comprend 95 000 paires questions-réponses rédigées par des passionnés de jeux-questionnaires et des documents de preuve recueillis indépendamment, six par question en moyenne, qui fournissent une supervision à distance de haute qualité pour répondre aux questions. Nous montrons que, par rapport à d'autres ensembles de données à grande échelle récemment introduits, TriviaQA (1) comporte des questions de composition relativement complexes, (2) présente une variabilité syntaxique et lexicale considérable entre les questions et les phrases réponse-preuve correspondantes, et (3) nécessite plus de raisonnement croisé pour trouver réponses. Nous présentons également deux algorithmes de base\xa0: un classificateur basé sur des caractéristiques et un réseau de neurones de pointe, qui fonctionne bien sur la compréhension de lecture SQuAD. Aucune de ces approches ne se rapproche de la performance humaine (23\xa0% et 40\xa0% contre 80\xa0%), ce qui suggère que TriviaQA est un banc d'essai difficile qui mérite d'être étudié ultérieurement.", 'ja': '私たちは、650,000以上の質問-回答-エビデンスのトリプルを含む、難しい読み取り理解データセットであるTriviaQAを提示します。TriviaQAには、トリビア愛好家によって作成された95,000の質問回答ペアと、独立して収集された証拠書類が含まれています。これらは、質問に回答するための高品質の遠隔監督を提供します。最近導入された他の大規模なデータセットと比較して、TriviaQAは、（ 1 ）比較的複雑な構成的質問、（ 2 ）質問と対応する回答-証拠文の間にかなりの構文的および語彙的変動があり、（ 3 ）答えを見つけるためにより多くのクロス文推論が必要であることを示しています。また、特徴ベースの分類子と最先端のニューラルネットワークの2つのベースラインアルゴリズムを提示し、SQuADの読み取り理解に優れたパフォーマンスを発揮します。どちらのアプローチも人間のパフォーマンスに近づくことはありません（ 23 ％と40 ％対80 ％ ）。これは、TriviaQAが将来の重要な研究に価値のある挑戦的なテストベッドであることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '余辈言TriviaQA,此一挑战性读解数集,过65万个问证三元组也。 TriviaQA琐事爱好者所撰95K问对独采证据,每事六,以供高质量远程监督。 臣等明与近引大集相比,TriviaQA(1)有对杂之问,(2)于问对证据句间有大句法与词汇异,且(3)须更多者推句以寻之。 又引二基线算法:盖取类先进之神经网络,读解于SQuAD。 此二者皆无以近人(23%与40%对80%),明TriviaQA一挑战性之试台,可未大究也。', 'hi': 'हम ट्रिवियाक्यूए पेश करते हैं, एक चुनौतीपूर्ण पढ़ने की समझ डेटासेट जिसमें 650K से अधिक प्रश्न-उत्तर-साक्ष्य ट्रिपल होते हैं। सामान्य ज्ञान क्यूए में सामान्य ज्ञान के प्रति उत्साही लोगों द्वारा लिखे गए 95K प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े शामिल हैं और स्वतंत्र रूप से सबूत दस्तावेजों को इकट्ठा किया गया है, औसतन प्रति प्रश्न छह, जो प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले दूर के पर्यवेक्षण प्रदान करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि, हाल ही में पेश किए गए अन्य बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट की तुलना में, ट्रिवियाक्यूए (1) में अपेक्षाकृत जटिल, रचनात्मक प्रश्न हैं, (2) प्रश्नों और संबंधित उत्तर-साक्ष्य वाक्यों के बीच काफी वाक्यात्मक और लेक्सिकल परिवर्तनशीलता है, और (3) को उत्तर खोजने के लिए अधिक क्रॉस वाक्य तर्क की आवश्यकता होती है। हम दो बेसलाइन एल्गोरिदम भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं: एक फीचर-आधारित क्लासिफायरऔर एक अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, जो SQuAD पढ़ने की समझ पर अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है। न तो दृष्टिकोण मानव प्रदर्शन (23% और 40% बनाम 80%) के करीब आता है, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि सामान्य ज्ञानक्यूए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण टेस्टबेड है जो महत्वपूर्ण भविष्य के अध्ययन के लायक है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем TriviaQA - сложный набор данных для понимания прочитанного, содержащий более 650 тысяч тройных вопросов-ответов. TriviaQA включает 95 000 пар вопросов и ответов, созданных энтузиастами мелочей и независимо собранных доказательственных документов, по шесть на вопрос в среднем, которые обеспечивают высокое качество дистанционного наблюдения за ответами на вопросы. Мы показываем, что, по сравнению с другими недавно введенными крупномасштабными наборами данных, TriviaQA (1) имеет относительно сложные, композиционные вопросы, (2) имеет значительную синтаксическую и лексическую вариабельность между вопросами и соответствующими предложениями с доказательством ответа, и (3) требует больше перекрестных рассуждений для поиска ответов. Мы также представляем два базовых алгоритма: классификатор на основе признаков и ультрасовременную нейронную сеть, которая хорошо справляется с пониманием чтения SQuAD. Ни один из подходов не подходит близко к эффективности человека (23% и 40% против 80%), предполагая, что TriviaQA является сложным испытательным стендом, который стоит значительного будущего исследования.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid TriviaQA i láthair, tacar sonraí dúshlánach léamhthuisceana ina bhfuil níos mó ná 650K triarach ceist-freagra-fianaise. Cuimsíonn TriviaQA 95K péirí ceist-freagra arna n-údar ag díograiseoirí mioneolais agus doiciméid fhianaise a bhailítear go neamhspleách, sé cinn in aghaidh na ceiste ar an meán, a sholáthraíonn maoirseacht chianchánach ar ardchaighdeán chun na ceisteanna a fhreagairt. Léirímid, i gcomparáid le tacair shonraí eile ar mhórscála a tugadh isteach le déanaí, go bhfuil ceisteanna comhdhéanaimh sách casta ag TriviaQA (1), (2) go bhfuil éagsúlacht chomhréire agus foclóireachta suntasach idir ceisteanna agus abairtí comhfhreagracha fianaise-freagra, agus (3) éilíonn sé níos mó. réasúnú tras-abairt chun freagraí a fháil. Cuirimid dhá algartam bonnlíne i láthair freisin: aicmitheoir gné-bhunaithe agus líonra néareolaíoch den scoth, a fheidhmíonn go maith ar léamhthuiscint SQuAD. Níl ceachtar den dá chur chuige gar d’fheidhmíocht dhaonna (23% agus 40% vs. 80%), rud a thugann le tuiscint gur leaba tástála dúshlánach é TriviaQA ar fiú staidéar suntasach a dhéanamh air amach anseo.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα απαιτητικό σύνολο δεδομένων κατανόησης ανάγνωσης που περιέχει τριπλάσια ερωτήματα-απαντήσεις-αποδεικτικά στοιχεία πάνω από 650Κ. Το περιλαμβάνει ζεύγη ερωτήματος-απάντησης 95Κ που συντάχθηκαν από ενθουσιαστές και ανεξάρτητα συγκεντρωμένα αποδεικτικά έγγραφα, έξι ανά ερώτηση κατά μέσο όρο, τα οποία παρέχουν υψηλής ποιότητας απομακρυσμένη εποπτεία για την απάντηση των ερωτήσεων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι, σε σύγκριση με άλλα πρόσφατα εισαγόμενα μεγάλης κλίμακας σύνολα δεδομένων, το TriviaQA (1) έχει σχετικά σύνθετα, σύνθετα ερωτήματα, (2) έχει σημαντική συντακτική και λεξική μεταβλητότητα μεταξύ ερωτήσεων και αντίστοιχων προτάσεων απάντησης-αποδεικτικών στοιχείων, και (3) απαιτεί περισσότερη διασταυρούμενη συλλογιστική για την εύρεση απαντήσεων. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης δύο βασικούς αλγόριθμους: έναν ταξινομητή με βάση χαρακτηριστικά και ένα σύγχρονο νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το οποίο αποδίδει καλά στην κατανόηση ανάγνωσης SQuAD. Καμία προσέγγιση δεν πλησιάζει την ανθρώπινη απόδοση (23% και 40% έναντι 80%) υποδηλώνοντας ότι το TriviaQA είναι ένα απαιτητικό δοκιμαστικό πεδίο που αξίζει σημαντική μελλοντική μελέτη.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ TriviaQA, საშუალოდ კითხვის შესახებ მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 650K-ზე მეტი კითხვა-პასუხი-საკითხვა-საკითხვა სამჯერ. TriviaQA აქვს 95K კითხვების პასუხი, რომლებიც ტრივია ინტესუზატებით ავტორირებულია და საკუთრებით დაიყენებულია კოკუმენტების დოკუმენტებით, ქვსი ყოველ კითხვით, რომლებიც სა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სხვა ახალი შემდეგ გადატანა დიდი მანქანის მონაცემების შემდეგ, TriviaQA (1) აქვს relatively complex, compositional questions, (2) აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი სინტაქტიული და ლექსიკალური განცემებითი კითხვების და შემდეგ მისამართებელი პასუხი და ჩვენ მხოლოდ ორი ფუნქციური ალგორიტემი ჩვენ აჩვენებთ: ფუნქციური კლასიფიკაცია და წარმოდგენის ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც SQuAD წერის სწორედ მუშაობს. არც ადამიანის გავაკეთებას (23% და 40% vs. 80%) მიღებს, რომ TriviaQA არის გასაკეთებელი ტესტი, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მომავალე კვლევა.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a TriviaQA-t, egy kihívást jelentő olvasásértő adatkészletet, amely több mint 650000 kérdés-válasz-bizonyíték háromszorosát tartalmaz. A TriviaQA 95 000 kérdés-válasz párt tartalmaz, amelyeket trivia rajongók írtak, és függetlenül gyűjtöttek bizonyítékokat, átlagosan hat kérdésenként, amelyek kiváló minőségű távoli felügyeletet biztosítanak a kérdések megválaszolásához. Megmutatjuk, hogy a többi nemrégiben bevezetett nagyszabású adatkészlethez képest a TriviaQA (1) viszonylag összetett, kompozíciós kérdésekkel rendelkezik, (2) jelentős szintaktikai és lexikai változékonysággal rendelkezik a kérdések és a megfelelő válasz-bizonyíték mondatok között, és (3) több keresztmondat-érvelést igényel a válaszok megtalálásához. Két alapvető algoritmust is bemutatunk: egy funkcióalapú osztályozót és egy korszerű neurális hálózatot, amely jól teljesít az SQUAD olvasási megértésében. Egyik megközelítés sem áll közel az emberi teljesítményhez (23% és 40% kontra 80%), ami arra utal, hogy a TriviaQA egy kihívást jelentő vizsgálati ágy, amely a jövőben jelentős vizsgálatot érdemel.', 'kk': 'Біз TriviaQA-ды таңдаймыз. 650K-ден артық сұрақ-жауап-әдістер үш есептері бар оқу деректер жиынын түсініктіру қиын. TriviaQA әрбір сұрақ жауаптарының 95K жауаптарының жауаптары бар, әрбір сұрақтың орташа алты құжаттарын жинақтайды. Бұл сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін қашықтық қашықтық қашықтығын көмектес Біз жаңа келген үлкен масштаб деректер жиындарына салыстырып, TriviaQA (1) салыстырылық, композиционалық сұрақтары, 2) сұрақтар мен жауап- шығару сөздерінің арасындағы синтактикалық мен лексикалық айнымалылығы бар, және (3) жауаптарды табу үші Біз сондай-ақ екі негізгі алгоритмді таңдаймыз: қасиеттерді негіздеген классификация және әртүрлі невралдық желінің күйі, SQuAD оқу түсінісінде жақсы жұмыс істейді. Егер адамдардың істеміне жақын келмейді (23% мен 40% және 80%), TriviaQA - болашақ зерттеулердің маңызды мәселелері дегенді көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Презентираме ТривијаQA, предизвикувачки набор на податоци за читање кои содржат повеќе од 650K прашања-одговори-докази трипати. ТривијаQA вклучува 95K парови одговори на прашања, автори на тривиски ентузијасти и независно собрани документи за докази, шест по прашање во просек, кои обезбедуваат висок квалитет на далечен надзор за одговорите на прашањата. Ние покажуваме дека, во споредба со другите неодамна воведени големи податоци, TriviaQA (1) има релативно комплексни, композициски прашања, (2) има значителна синтактичка и лексикална варијабилност помеѓу прашањата и соодветните реченици на одговор-доказ, и (3) бара повеќе размислување на крсторечениците за да се најд Исто така, претставуваме два основни алгоритми: класификатор базиран на карактеристики и најсовремена нервна мрежа, која функционира добро на сфаќање на читањето на SQuAD. Ниту еден пристап не се приближува до човечката перформанса (23 и 40 отсто во однос на 80 отсто), што укажува на тоа дека ТривијаКА е предизвикувачки тестиран кревет кој вреди значителна идна студија.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രിവിയാക്കിയാവിയായിക്യാവിനെ സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വായിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ് ട്രിവിയാക്യൂവിയയില്\u200d എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ തെളിവുകളുടെ രേഖകളും സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ തെളിവുകളും സൂക്ഷിച്ചു കൂട്ടിയിരിക് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, അടുത്തുതന്നെ വലിയ വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനെതിരില്\u200d, ട്രിവിയാക്യൂ (1) കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുണ്ട്, (2) ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഉത്തര നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളും കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫീഷര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്സിഫ്റ്റര്\u200d സ്റ്റേ Neither approach comes close to human performance (23% and 40% vs. 80%), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan TriviaQA, set data pemahaman membaca yang mencabar mengandungi lebih dari 650K pertanyaan-jawapan-bukti tiga kali. TriviaQA termasuk 95K pasangan soalan-jawapan yang ditulis oleh peminat trivia dan mengumpulkan dokumen bukti secara independen, enam per soalan rata-rata, yang menyediakan pengawasan jauh kualiti tinggi untuk menjawab soalan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa, dibandingkan dengan set data skala besar yang baru-baru ini diperkenalkan, TriviaQA (1) mempunyai pertanyaan yang relatif kompleks, komposisi, (2) mempunyai variabiliti sintaktik dan leksikal yang konsideratif antara pertanyaan dan kalimat jawapan-bukti yang sepadan, dan (3) memerlukan lebih banyak alasan kalimat salib untuk mencari jawapan. Kami juga memperkenalkan dua algoritma asas: pengklasifikasi berdasarkan ciri-ciri dan rangkaian saraf yang terbaik, yang berfungsi dengan baik dalam pemahaman bacaan SQuAD. Neither approach comes close to human performance (23% and 40% vs. 80%), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome TriviaQA, sudėtingą skaitymo supratimo duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra daugiau kaip 650K klausimų atsakymo įrodymų trigubai. TriviaQA apima 95K klausimų ir atsakymų poros, kurias autoriauja triviški entuziastai ir nepriklausomai surinkti įrodymų dokumentai, vidutiniškai šeši už kiekvieną klausimą, kurie suteikia aukštos kokybės nuotolinę priežiūrą atsakant į klausimus. Mes rodome, kad, palyginti su kitais neseniai įvestais didelio masto duomenų rinkiniais, TriviaQA (1) turi palyginti sudėtingų sudėtinių klausimų, 2) turi didelių sintaksinių ir leksinių skirtumų tarp klausimų ir atitinkamų atsakymų įrodymų sakinių ir (3) reikalauja daugiau įvairių sakinių pagrindimo ieškant atsakymų. Mes taip pat pristatome du pagrindinius algoritmus: savybių klasifikatorių ir moderniausio nervų tinklo, kuris gerai veikia SQuAD skaitymo supratimu. Nė vienas metodas nėra artimas žmogaus veiklos rezultatams (23 % ir 40 % palyginti su 80 %), o tai rodo, kad TriviaQA yra sunkus bandomasis pagrindas, kuris vertas reikšmingo būsimo tyrimo.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo TriviaQA, un complesso di dati di comprensione della lettura che contiene oltre 650K domande-risposte-prove triple. TriviaQA include 95K coppie domande-risposte scritte da appassionati di trivia e documenti di prova raccolti in modo indipendente, sei per domanda in media, che forniscono una supervisione a distanza di alta qualità per rispondere alle domande. Mostriamo che, rispetto ad altri set di dati su larga scala recentemente introdotti, TriviaQA (1) ha domande compositive relativamente complesse, (2) ha una notevole variabilità sintattica e lessicale tra domande e frasi risposte-prove corrispondenti, e (3) richiede più ragionamenti incrociati per trovare risposte. Presentiamo anche due algoritmi di base: un classificatore basato su funzionalità e una rete neurale all'avanguardia, che funziona bene sulla comprensione della lettura SQUAD. Nessuno dei due approcci si avvicina alle prestazioni umane (23% e 40% vs. 80%), suggerendo che TriviaQA è un banco di prova impegnativo che vale la pena studiare in futuro.", 'mn': 'Бид TriviaQA-г илүү 650K асуулт-хариулт-баримт гурван дахин ойлгох хэцүү өгөгдлийн санг уншиж байна. TriviaQA нь 95K асуултын хариулт хоёрыг авч, урам зорилгодог, хариулт асуултын хариултыг хариултын тулд үнэхээр сайн сайн хариулт гаргадаг. Бид саяхан олон том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангуудтай харьцуулахад TriviaQA (1) нь харьцангуй төвөгтэй, бүтээлч асуултуудтай харьцуулахад, 2) асуултуудын болон хариултын хариултын өгөгдлийн хоорондох шинжлэх ухаан болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өөрчлөлт байдаг. 3) нь хариултыг олох Мөн бид хоёр суурь шугам алгоритмыг тайлбарлаж байна: хувьсалын үндсэн түвшин болон урлагийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээ, SQuAD унших ойлголт дээр сайн ажилладаг. Хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааны тухай ч ойртохгүй (23% болон 40% vs 80%) гэдэг нь TriviaQA бол ирээдүйн судалгаанд үнэ цэнэтэй шалгалтын шалгалт юм.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw TriviaQA, sett ta’ dejta ta’ komprensjoni tal-qari ta’ sfida li fih aktar minn 650K evidenza ta’ mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet tripli. TriviaQA tinkludi 95K pari ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet awtorizzati minn entużjisti trivjali u dokumenti ta’ evidenza miġbura indipendentement, sitt għal kull mistoqsija bħala medja, li jipprovdu superviżjoni distanti ta’ kwalità għolja għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet. Aħna nuru li, meta mqabbla ma’ settijiet ta’ dejta oħra introdotti reċentement fuq skala kbira, TriviaQA (1) għandha mistoqsijiet relattivament kumplessi u kompożittivi, (2) għandha varjabilità sintetika u lexikali konsiderevoli bejn mistoqsijiet u sentenzi korrispondenti ta’ evidenza ta’ tweġiba, u (3) teħtieġ aktar raġunament għal sentenzi trasversali biex jinstabu tweġibiet. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll żewġ algoritmi bażiċi: klassifikatur ibbażat fuq karatteristiċi u netwerk newrali l-aktar avvanzat, li jwettaq prestazzjoni tajba fuq il-fehim tal-qari SQuAD. L-ebda approċċ ma jmur qrib il-prestazzjoni tal-bniedem (23% u 40% kontra 80%), li jissuġġerixxi li TriviaQA huwa test ta’ sfida li jiswa studju sinifikanti fil-ġejjieni.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy TriviaQA, wymagający zestaw danych dotyczących rozumienia czytania zawierający ponad 650K pytanie-odpowiedź-dowód. TriviaQA obejmuje 95K pary pytań-odpowiedzi autorskie przez entuzjastów triwii i niezależnie zebrane dokumenty dowodowe, średnio sześć na pytanie, które zapewniają wysokiej jakości odległy nadzór nad udzielaniem odpowiedzi na pytania. Pokazujemy, że w porównaniu z innymi ostatnio wprowadzonymi dużymi zbiorami danych, TriviaQA (1) ma stosunkowo złożone pytania kompozycyjne, (2) ma znaczną zmienność składni i leksykaliczną między pytaniami a odpowiednimi zdaniami dowodowo-odpowiedź, a (3) wymaga więcej rozumowania krzyżowego, aby znaleźć odpowiedzi. Przedstawiamy również dwa algorytmy bazowe: klasyfikator oparty na funkcjach i najnowocześniejszą sieć neuronową, która sprawdza się dobrze w rozumieniu odczytu SQuAD. Żadne z podejść nie zbliża się do wydajności człowieka (23% i 40% vs. 80%) sugerując, że TriviaQA jest wymagającym ośrodkiem testowym, który warto znacząco badać w przyszłości.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer TriviaQA, eit vanskeleg lesingsforståking av datasett som inneheld over 650K spørsmål-svar-beviser tre gonger. TriviaQA inneheld 95K spørsmål-svarpar som er autoriserte av trivia enthusiaster og samla dokument uavhengig, seks per spørsmål gjennomsnittlig, som gir høg kvalitetsverdi for å svara på spørsmålene. Vi viser at sammenligninga med andre nyleg innførte store datasett har TriviaQA (1) relativt komplekse, komposisjonelle spørsmål, (2) har stor syntaksisk og leksisk variabel mellom spørsmål og tilsvarande svar-bevisering, og (3) krev meir kryssetningsregular for å finna svar. Vi presenterer også to baseline algoritme: ein funksjonsbasert klassifisering og ein status-of-the-art neural network, som utfører godt på SQuAD-lesingsforståelse. Ingen tilnærming kommer nær menneskelige utviklingar (23 % og 40 % mot 80 %), som tyder på at TriviaQA er ein vanskeleg testbed som verkar signifikant framtidige studie.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm TriviaQA, un set de date dificil de înțelegere a citirii conținând peste 650K de întrebări-răspuns-dovezi triple. TriviaQA include 95K de perechi de întrebări-răspunsuri autorizate de entuziaștii trivia și documente de probă colectate independent, în medie șase per întrebare, care oferă supraveghere la distanță de înaltă calitate pentru răspunsul la întrebări. Aratăm că, în comparație cu alte seturi de date pe scară largă introduse recent, TriviaQA (1) are întrebări relativ complexe, compoziționale, (2) are o variabilitate sintactică și lexicală considerabilă între întrebări și propoziții corespunzătoare de răspuns-probă și (3) necesită mai multe raționamente încrucișate pentru a găsi răspunsuri. De asemenea, prezentăm doi algoritmi de bază: un clasificator bazat pe caracteristici și o rețea neurală de ultimă generație, care funcționează bine în înțelegerea citirii SQUAD. Niciuna dintre abordări nu se apropie de performanţa umană (23% şi 40% faţă de 80%), sugerând că TriviaQA este un grup de testare provocator, care merită studiu semnificativ în viitor.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo TriviaQA, izazovnu kompletu podataka o èitanju koja sadrži preko 650K trostruka odgovora na pitanje. TriviaQA uključuje 95K par odgovora na pitanje autoriziranih trivijskim entuzijastima i nezavisno skupljanih dokumenata, šest po pitanju u prosjeku, koji pružaju visoke kvalitetne udaljene nadzore za odgovore na pitanja. Pokazujemo da, u usporedbi sa drugim nedavno uvedenim velikim podacima, TriviaQA (1) ima relativno kompleksno, kompozicionalno pitanje, 2) ima značajnu sintaktičnu i leksičku variabilnost između pitanja i odgovarajućih rečenica za odgovor i odgovarajućih rečenica za dokaze odgovora, i (3) zahteva više razloga za križanje rečenica. Takoðe predstavljamo dva osnovna algoritma: klasifikatora baziranog na funkcijama i stanju umjetne neuralne mreže, koja dobro izvodi na SQuAD èitanju razumevanja. Ni pristup ne dolazi blizu ljudskog učinka (23% i 40% protiv 80%), sugerirajući da je TriviaQA izazovna testovanja koja vrijedi značajno buduće ispitivanje.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar TriviaQA, en utmanande läsförståelse datauppsättning som innehåller över 650K frågor-svar-bevis trippel. TriviaQA innehåller 95K frågor-svar par som skapats av trivia entusiaster och självständigt samlat bevismaterial, sex per fråga i genomsnitt, som ger högkvalitativ fjärrövervakning för att besvara frågorna. Vi visar att TriviaQA (1) jämfört med andra nyligen introducerade storskaliga datauppsättningar har relativt komplexa kompositionsfrågor, (2) har betydande syntaktisk och lexikal variation mellan frågor och motsvarande svar-evidensmeningar, och (3) kräver mer korsmening för att hitta svar. Vi presenterar också två baslinjealgoritmer: en funktionsbaserad klassificerare och ett toppmodernt neuralt nätverk, som presterar bra på SQUAD läsförståelse. Inget tillvägagångssätt kommer nära mänsklig prestanda (23% och 40% jämfört med 80%), vilket tyder på att TriviaQA är en utmanande testbädd som är värd betydande framtida studier.', 'so': "Waxaannu soo wadaa TriviaQA, taas oo ah kooxda akhriska aasaasiga ah oo ku jirta wax ka badan 650K oo ku saabsan jawaabta marxalad. TriviaQA waxaa ka mid ah labada su’aal oo su’aal ka jawaaba su’aalaha looga hadlo 95K oo ay dhaqdhaqaaqsaday Triwiiyaa islamarkaasna ay si xor ah u soo ururiyeen dukumentiyada caddeyda, taas oo si gaar ah u fidiya ilaaliyo qiimo dheer oo ka jawaabaya su’aalaha. Waxaynu tusnaynaa inay is barbardhig u dhigaan sawirada kale oo waaweyn, TriviaQA (1) waxay leedahay su'aalo adag, iskaashatan, (2) waxay leedahay isbedelka ka dhexeeya su'aalaha iyo sawirada jawaabta oo u eg, iyo (3) waxay u baahan yihiin go'aanka kala baxsan si ay u hesho jawaabaha. Sidoo kale waxaan heysannaa laba algoreem oo ku qoran qoraalka asalka ah: fasax gaar ah iyo shabakadda farshaxanka ah oo si wanaagsan u sameeya qoraalka SQuAD. Dhaqdhaqaaqsina uma soo dhowaado muuqashada dadka (23% iyo 40% vs. 80%), waxaana ka jeedinayaa in TriviaQA uu yahay baaritaanka qiimo leh oo qiimo muhiimsan waxbarashada mustaqbalka ah.", 'si': 'අපි ත්\u200dරිවියාකාව පෙන්වන්නම්, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර සාක්ෂි තුනක් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ති TriviQA සමාව 95K ප්\u200dරශ්න-උත්තර සම්බන්ධ කරලා ත්\u200dරිවියාව ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ සහ සාක්ෂ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අනිත් වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු ස්කේල් දත්ත සේට් එක සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, TriviQA (1) තියෙනවා සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, (2) තියෙනවා ස අපි මූලික ඇල්ගෝරිතම් දෙකක් පෙන්වනවා: විශේෂතාවක් අධාරිත විශේෂකයෙක් සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයෙක්, ඒක SQuAD කි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය (23% සහ 40% vs. 80%) වලට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැතිවෙන්නේ නැහැ, කියලා ත්\u200dරිවියාක්\u200dයාක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාක', 'ur': 'ہم TriviaQA کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک مشکل پڑھنے والی سمجھنے والی ڈیٹسٹ جو 650K سے زیادہ سوال-جواب-ثابت ثابت قدم رکھتا ہے۔ TriviaQA میں 95K سوال جواب جوڑے ہیں جن کو ترویوی انٹوسیستوں کے ذریعہ اجازت دی گئی ہے اور اپنے ساتھ دلیلیں جمع کیے گئے ہیں، ان کے متوسط چھ سوال میں، جو سوال کے جواب کے لئے بہت سی گوارتی دور کی نظارت دیتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اچھے سے بہت سی ڈیٹسٹوں کے مقابلہ میں TriviaQA (1) کے ساتھ مقابلہ میں پیچیدہ، پیچیدہ سوال ہیں، 2) سوال اور جواب دکھانے والی جماعت کے درمیان بہت سی نستاکتیک اور لکسیکی متفاوت ہے، اور (3) جواب کے لئے زیادہ کریٹسٹ جماعت کی ضرورت ہے۔ ہم نے دو بنیس لین الگوریٹم کو بھی پیش کیا ہے: ایک فرصت پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا کلاسپیر اور ایک ایست نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک، جو SQuAD پڑھنے پر اچھا کام کرتا ہے۔ اور نہ انسان کی عملکرد کے قریب آتی ہے (23% اور 40% vs 80%), یہ بات بتاتا ہے کہ TriviaQA ایک مشکل آزمائش کا ارزش ہے جو ضروری مستقبل تحقیق کا ارزش ہے۔', 'ta': 'நாம் ட்ரிவியாக்கியாவை காண்பிக்கிறோம், 650K கேள்வி விடை -தெளிவான முன்னோக்குகள் உள்ள ஒரு சவாலான படிப்பு  ட்ரிவியாக்கியாவில் 95K கேள்விக்கு பதில் ஜோடி உள்ளது திருவியா விருப்பங்கள் மற்றும் சுதந்திரமாக தெளிவான அத்தாட்சி ஆவணங்கள், சராசரிய நாம் சமீபத்தில் பெரிய அளவு தரவுத்தளங்களை ஒப்பிட்டு காண்பிக்கிறோம், ட்ரிவியாகியா (1) சிக்கலான, தொகுதியான கேள்விகள் உள்ளது, (2) கேள்விகளுக்கு மிகவும் ஒத்திசைப்பு மற்றும் ஒப நாம் இரண்டு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டு எண்களைக் கொண்டுள்ளோம்: ஒரு குணங்களை அடிப்படையாக வகுப்பாளர் மற்றும் ஒரு நிலை கலை புதிய வலைப்பின்னல், அது SQu Neither approach comes close to human performance (23% and 40% vs. 80%), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'uz': "We present TriviaQA, a challenging reading comprehension dataset containing over 650K question-answer-evidence triples.  TriviaQA'da Triviya entusiyatlari va o'zim bilan boshqaruvchilar va o'xshash hujjatlarni bir savol uchun 95K savol javob qoʻllanmagan. Bu savollarni javob berish uchun juda katta taʼminlovchi vosita beradi. Biz yaqinda boshqa katta maʼlumotlar tarkibini kamaytirishda TriviaQA (1) juda murakkab, kompyuterda savollar bor, (2) savollar va javoblar imkoniyatlariga bog'liq boʻlgan soʻzlarning orasidagi juda katta syntactikk va leksikal variabiliyati kerak, va (3) javoblarni topish uchun bir necha maxfiy soʻz kerak. Biz ikkita asosiy darajaga ega bo'ladimiz: shaxsiy darajalar va shaxsiy neyron tarmoqning holati, SQuAD o'qish muvaffaqiyatlarida yaxshi bajaradi. Bu tilda hech qachon murakkablik inson bajarishiga (23% va 40% vs. 80%) kelajak o'qituvchi TriviaQA muhim qiymati kerak bo'lganligini anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Trisnhanh. Thu thập các tài liệu bằng chứng được tạo ra bởi người đam mê câu hỏi 95K và thu thập bằng chứng một cách độc lập, sáu trong mỗi câu hỏi trung bình, cung cấp một sự giám sát xa vời cao để trả lời các câu hỏi. Chúng tôi cho thấy, so với các tập tin lớn mới được giới thiệu gần đây, TrimaliQA (1) có các câu hỏi tương đối phức tạp, liên quan, liên kết (2) có độ biến đổi âm mưu và từ vựng đáng kể giữa các câu hỏi và các câu trả lời bằng chứng tương ứng, và (3) cần nhiều lý lẽ thập tự để tìm câu trả lời. Chúng tôi cũng có hai thuật toán cơ bản: một phân loại có tính năng và một mạng thần kinh tối tân, hiệu quả với khả năng đọc SQurAD. Không cách tiếp cận nào gần với khả năng của con người (23=và40=. 80=), và cho thấy rằng TrimaliQA là một thử nghiệm đầy thử thách đáng để nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer TriviaQA, et udfordrende læseforståelsesdatasæt, der indeholder over 650K spørgsmål-svar-beviser tredobler. TriviaQA omfatter 95K spørgsmål-svar par forfattet af trivia entusiaster og uafhængigt indsamlede bevisdokumenter, seks pr. spørgsmål i gennemsnit, der giver fjernsyn af høj kvalitet til at besvare spørgsmålene. Vi viser, at sammenlignet med andre nyligt indførte store datasæt, TriviaQA (1) har relativt komplekse, sammensætningsmæssige spørgsmål, (2) har betydelig syntaktisk og leksiksk variation mellem spørgsmål og tilsvarende svar-evidens sætninger, og (3) kræver mere krydssætninger for at finde svar. Vi præsenterer også to basisalgoritmer: en funktionsbaseret klassificering og et state-of-the-art neuralt netværk, der fungerer godt på SQUAD læseforståelse. Ingen af metoderne kommer tæt på menneskelig ydeevne (23% og 40% mod 80%), hvilket tyder på, at TriviaQA er en udfordrende testbed, der er værd at undersøge i fremtiden.', 'bg': 'Представяме тривиаQA, предизвикателен набор от данни за разбиране на четенето, съдържащ над 650К въпроса-отговор-доказателства тройки. ТривиаКА включва 95 000 двойки въпроси-отговори, автори на любители на тривиите и самостоятелно събрани доказателства, средно по шест на въпрос, които осигуряват висококачествен дистанционен надзор за отговорите на въпросите. Показваме, че в сравнение с други наскоро въведени широкомащабни набори от данни, има относително сложни композиционни въпроси, (2) има значителна синтактична и лексикална вариабилност между въпросите и съответните отговори-доказателства изречения, и (3) изисква повече кръстосани разсъждения за намиране на отговори. Представяме и два базови алгоритма: функционален класификатор и най-съвременна невронна мрежа, която се представя добре при разбирането на четенето. Нито един от подходите не се доближава до човешкото представяне (23% и 40% срещу 80%), което предполага, че е предизвикателство тестово поле, което си струва значително бъдещо проучване.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo TriviaQA, izazovnu kompletu podataka o razumijevanju čitanja koja sadrži preko 650K trostruka odgovora na pitanje. TriviaQA uključuje 95K par odgovora na pitanje autoriziranih trivijskim entuzijastima i nezavisno skupljenih dokaza, šest na pitanje u prosjeku, koji pružaju visoke kvalitetne udaljene nadzore za odgovore na pitanja. Pokazujemo da u usporedbi s drugim nedavno uvođenim velikim podacima TriviaQA (1) ima relativno složena, kompozicionalna pitanja, (2) ima značajnu sintaktičku i leksičku variabilnost između pitanja i odgovarajućih rečenica o dokazima odgovora, i (3) zahtijeva više razuma o križljivom rečenju za pronalaženje odgovora. Također predstavljamo dva početna algoritma: klasifikator na osnovu funkcija i neuralnu mrežu, koja dobro izvodi na SQuAD čitanju razumijevanja. Nijedan pristup ne dolazi blizu ljudskog učinka (23% i 40% protiv 80%), sugerirajući da je TriviaQA izazovna testovanja koja vrijedi značajno buduće ispitivanje.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan TriviaQA, sebuah dataset pemahaman membaca yang menantang berisi lebih dari 650K pertanyaan-jawaban-bukti tiga kali. TriviaQA termasuk 95K pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban yang ditulis oleh entusiasta trivia dan secara independen mengumpulkan dokumen bukti, enam per pertanyaan rata-rata, yang menyediakan pengawasan jauh kualitas tinggi untuk menjawab pertanyaan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa, dibandingkan dengan set data yang baru-baru ini diperkenalkan, TriviaQA (1) memiliki pertanyaan yang relatif kompleks, komposisi, (2) memiliki variabilitas sintaktik dan leksikal yang konsisten antara pertanyaan dan kalimat jawaban-bukti yang sepadan, dan (3) membutuhkan lebih banyak alasan kalimat salib untuk menemukan jawaban. Kami juga mempersembahkan dua algoritma dasar: sebuah klasifikator berbasis fitur dan jaringan saraf terbaik, yang bekerja dengan baik pada pemahaman pembacaan SQuAD. Tidak ada pendekatan yang mendekati prestasi manusia (23% dan 40% vs. 80%), yang menyarankan bahwa TriviaQA adalah tempat ujian yang menantang yang layak untuk penelitian masa depan yang signifikan.', 'nl': 'We presenteren TriviaQA, een uitdagende dataset met meer dan 650K vraag-antwoord-bewijsstukken. TriviaQA omvat 95K vraag-antwoord paren geschreven door trivia liefhebbers en onafhankelijk verzamelde bewijsstukken, gemiddeld zes per vraag, die een hoge kwaliteit toezicht bieden op afstand voor het beantwoorden van de vragen. We tonen aan dat TriviaQA (1) in vergelijking met andere recent geïntroduceerde grootschalige datasets relatief complexe, samenstellende vragen heeft, (2) aanzienlijke syntactische en lexicale variabiliteit heeft tussen vragen en overeenkomstige antwoorden-bewijszinnen, en (3) meer kruiszinnige redenering vereist om antwoorden te vinden. We presenteren ook twee basisalgoritmes: een kenmerkgebaseerde classificator en een state-of-the-art neuraal netwerk, dat goed presteert op SQuAD leesbegrip. Geen van beide benaderingen komt in de buurt van menselijke prestaties (23% en 40% vs. 80%) wat suggereert dat TriviaQA een uitdagend testbed is dat een belangrijke toekomstige studie waard is.', 'fa': 'ما TriviaQA را نشان می دهیم، یک مجموعه اطلاعات درک سختی که بیش از ۶۵۰ کیلومتر شواهد سوال و پاسخ را دارد. TriviaQA شامل جفت سوال 95K که توسط آرزومندان ترویویا اجازه داده شده و مدارک شواهد را به طور مستقل جمع می\u200cکند، شش تا سوال در میانگین، که بر پاسخ\u200cهای سؤال کائنات دور و فاصله\u200cای ارائه می\u200cدهد. ما نشان می دهیم که در مقایسه با بقیه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ معرفی شده اخیرا، TriviaQA (1) سوال\u200cهای نسبتا پیچیده، ترکیب\u200cسازی (2) تغییرات سنتاکتیک و زبان\u200cشناسی بین سوال\u200cها و مجموعه\u200cهای جواب\u200cشناسی را دارد و (3) برای پیدا کردن جواب\u200cها نیاز دارد. ما همچنین دو الگوریتم بنیادی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: یک گروهی بر اساس ویژگی و یک شبکه عصبی هنری که در خواندن مفهوم SQuAD خوب انجام می\u200cدهد. هرگز دسترسی به عملکرد انسان نزدیک نمی شود (۲۳ درصد و ۴۰ درصد vs. ۸۰ درصد) که پیشنهاد می دهد که TriviaQA یک تست سختی است که ارزش مطالعه آینده مهم است.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha TriviaQA, kituo cha changamoto cha kusoma taarifa za kompyuta kinachojumuisha zaidi ya matatizo ya maswali 650K. TriviaQA inajumuisha majibu ya maswali 95K iliyoandikwa na wanahamasisha watafiti na waliokusanya nyaraka za ushahidi huru, sita kwa kila swali kwa wastani, ambayo inatoa ufuatiliaji wa kiwango kikubwa wa kutoa majibu ya maswali. Tunaonyesha kwamba, ukilinganishwa na seti nyingine za takwimu kubwa za hivi karibuni, TriviaQA (1) ina maswali ya tatizo, makusanyiko, (2) ina tofauti kubwa ya ushirikiano na kiukweli kati ya maswali na hukumu zinazojibu majibu, na (3) inahitaji hukumu zaidi ya kupitishwa kwa sababu ya kutafuta majibu. Pia tunaweka takwimu mbili za msingi: mfanyakazi wa aina yake na hali ya mtandao wa neura wa sanaa, inayofanya kazi vizuri katika maelezo ya kusoma SQuAD. Neither approach comes close to human performance (23% and 40% vs. 80%), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'de': 'Wir prﾃ､sentieren TriviaQA, einen herausfordernden Leseverstﾃ､ndnisdatensatz mit ﾃｼber 650K Frage-Antwort-Beweisverdreifachen. TriviaQA umfasst 95K Frage-Antwort-Paare, die von Trivia-Enthusiasten verfasst wurden und unabhﾃ､ngig voneinander gesammelte Beweisdokumente, durchschnittlich sechs pro Frage, die eine qualitativ hochwertige Fernﾃｼberwachung fﾃｼr die Beantwortung der Fragen bieten. Wir zeigen, dass TriviaQA (1) im Vergleich zu anderen kﾃｼrzlich eingefﾃｼhrten groﾃ歹n Datensﾃ､tzen relativ komplexe, kompositorische Fragen aufweist, (2) erhebliche syntaktische und lexikalische Variabilitﾃ､t zwischen Fragen und entsprechenden Antworten-Beweissﾃ､tzen aufweist und (3) mehr satzﾃｼbergreifendes Denken erfordert, um Antworten zu finden. Auﾃ歹rdem stellen wir zwei Baseline-Algorithmen vor: einen Feature-basierten Klassifikator und ein hochmodernes neuronales Netzwerk, das sich gut fﾃｼr das SQuAD-Leseverstﾃ､ndnis eignet. Keiner der Ansﾃ､tze kommt der menschlichen Leistung nahe (23% und 40% vs. 80%) was darauf hindeutet, dass TriviaQA ein herausforderndes Testfeld ist, das eine bedeutende zukﾃｼnftige Studie wert ist.', 'ko': '우리는 650K개가 넘는 문제-답안 증거의 3배가 넘는 도전적인 읽기와 이해 데이터 집합인 TriviaQA를 선보였다.트리비아QA는 사소한 에피소드 애호가들이 작성한 95K 대 문답과 독립적으로 수집한 증거 문건을 포함해 한 문제당 평균 6건으로 이 문건들은 질문에 대한 답변을 위한 고품질의 원격 감독을 제공한다.우리는 최근에 도입된 다른 대규모 데이터 집합에 비해 TriviaQA(1)는 상대적으로 복잡한 조합 문제를 가지고 있고, (2) 문제와 상응하는 답안 증거문 사이에 상당한 문법과 어휘 가변성을 가지고 있으며, (3) 더 많은 크로스 추리를 통해 답을 찾아야 한다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 또한 두 가지 기선 알고리즘을 제시했다. 특징을 바탕으로 하는 분류기와 가장 선진적인 신경 네트워크인데 이 두 가지 알고리즘은 그룹의 읽기와 이해에서 양호하게 나타난다.이 두 가지 방법은 모두 인류의 표현(23%와 40%와 80%)에 가깝지 않다. 이것은 TriviaQA가 도전적인 테스트 플랫폼으로서 미래에 중대한 연구를 진행할 가치가 있음을 나타낸다.', 'af': "Ons stel TriviaQA voor 'n pragtige lees verstandige datastel wat oor 650K vraag-antwoord-getuienis drie. TriviaQA inkluit 95K vraag-antwoord pare wat deur trivia enthusiaste geskrywe is en onafhanklik bevestigingsdokumente versamel het, ses per vraag op gemiddelde, wat hoë kwaliteit afgeleë supervisie verskaf vir antwoord van die vraag. Ons wys dat, in vergelyking met ander onlangs ingevoerde groot-skaal datastelle, TriviaQA (1) het relativief kompleks, samenskaplike vrae, (2) het aanvaardige sintaktika en leksiese veranderlikheid tussen vrae en ooreenstemmende antwoord-bevestigings, en (3) benodig meer kruissoets redening om antwoorde te vind. Ons stel ook twee basisline algoritme voor: â\x80\x99n funksie-gebaseerde klassifiseerder en â\x80\x99n staat-van-die-kunste neuralnetwerk, wat goed uitvoer op SQuAD lees verstanding. Nie toegang kom naby menslike prestasie (23% en 40% teen 80%), wat voorstel dat TriviaQA 'n belangrike testbed is wat waarde betekende toekomstige studie is.", 'tr': "Biz TriviaQA'yı tanıtıyoruz, 650K soru-cevap-kanıtları üç katlı bir şekilde düşünen veri seti. TriviaQA, trivia höwesçiler tarafından sorgulanan 95K sorgular cevap çiplerini dahil eder ve sorulara jogap bermek üçin yüksek kaliteli uzak denetim sistemini sağlayan kanıtlar toplanmış. Biz ýakynda ullanmış başga uly ölçekli veri setirlerine görä TriviaQA Biz hem iki tane basit algoritmi görkeýäris: bir özelliklere tabanly klasifikatçy we sungatçy näral şebekesi. Bu SQuAD okama düşünmesinde gowy işleýär. Adamyň etmänliýeti ýakynlaşykda hem ýakynlaşykda (23% we 40% we 80%), TriviaQA gelejekde möhüm diýjek diýjek çözüm diýip kabul edilýär.", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë TriviaQA, një grup të dhënash të vështirë për lexim që përmban mbi 650K pyetje-përgjigje-prova tre herë. TriviaQA përfshin 95K çifte pyetjeje-përgjigje të autoruar nga entuziastë trivia dhe dokumente të mbledhura në mënyrë të pavarur provash, gjashtë për pyetje mesatarisht, që sigurojnë mbikqyrje të lartë cilësie të largët për përgjigjen e pyetjeve. Ne tregojmë se, në krahasim me grupe të tjera të dhënash në shkallë të madhe të futura kohët e fundit, TriviaQA (1) ka pyetje relativisht komplekse, kompozitive, (2) ka variabilitet të konsiderueshme sintaktike dhe lexike midis pyetjeve dhe fjalimeve korrespondente përgjigje-prova dhe (3) kërkon arsyetimin më të madh të fjalëve për të gjetur përgjigje. Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu dy algoritme bazë: një klasifikues bazuar në funksione dhe një rrjet nervor më të lartë, që funksionon mirë në kuptimin e leximit të SQuAD. Asnjë qasje nuk i afrohet performancës njerëzore (23% dhe 40% krahasuar me 80%), duke sugjeruar se TriviaQA është një vend i vështirë testimi që vlen studim të rëndësishëm të ardhshëm.', 'am': 'በቴርቪያQA፣ ከ650K በላይ የጥያቄ መልስ-ማስረጃ ሦስት የሚጨምረው የድምፅ አቀማሚ ዳታዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ ትሪቪያ ቄ በቴርቪያ ውስጥተኞች እና በተለየ ማስረጃዎችን ሰብስቦታል፣ ለጥያቄ ስድስት ጥያቄ ጥያቄን ከፍተኛ ጥያቄን መጠበቅ የሚያደርጉት የራቀ ጥያቄን መጠበቅ የሚያደርጋቸው 95K የጥያቄ መልስ ዓይነቶች ነው፡፡ በቅርብ ካለፉት ትልቁ ዳታ ማዕከላዎች በተያሳየን፣ ቲቪያQA (1) በተጨማሪና በተቃውሞ ጥያቄዎች አለበት፣ (2) ጥያቄዎች እና መልስ-ምስክር ክፍሎች መካከል እጅግ የሚያስፈልጋቸው ተቃውሞ እና ለሌክሲካዊ ጥያቄ አለበት፡፡ ሁለትን የመጀመሪያ ደረጃዎች አልጎሪትምን እናቀርባለን፡፡ በ SQuAD በማንበብ ላይ ጥሩ የሚያደርገውን የልዩ የኔትራዊ መረብ እና ትክክል እናደርጋለን፡፡ Neither approach comes close to human performance (23% and 40% vs. 80%), suggesting that TriviaQA is a challenging testbed that is worth significant future study.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Թրիվիայի QA-ը, դժվար ընթերցման ընկալումների տվյալների համակարգը, որը պարունակում է 650K հարց-պատասխան-ապացույցներ երեք անգամ: Թրիվիա QA-ը ներառում է 95K հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգեր, որոնք գրված են փոքրիկ հուզմունքներով և անկախ հավաքել ապացույցներ, որոնք միջինում յուրաքանչյուր հարց ընդհանուր վեց են, որոնք տալիս են բարձր որակի հեռավոր հետևանք հարցերի պատ Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ համեմատելով վերջերս ներկայացված այլ մեծ տվյալների համակարգերի հետ, Տրիվիա ՔԱ (1) ունի հարաբերականորեն բարդ, բաղադրական հարցեր, (2) ունի հարցերի և համապատասխանի պատասխանի-ապացույցների միջև նշանակալի սինտակտիկ և լեքսիկական տարբերակություն, և (3) պահանջում Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք երկու հիմնական ալգորիթմ՝ առանձնահատկությունների հիմնված դասակարգիչ և ամենաբարձր նյարդային ցանց, որը լավ է աշխատում SQUADի կարդալու ընկալության վրա: Ոչ մի մոտեցում չի մոտենում մարդկային արտադրողականությանը (23 և 40 տոկոսը համեմատած 80 տոկոսին), ինչը նշանակում է, որ Թրիվիաքա-ն մարտահրավեր է, որը արժանի է նշանակալի ապագա ուսումնասիրություն:', 'bn': 'আমরা ত্রিভিয়াকিয়াকে উপস্থাপন করছি, যার মধ্যে প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রমাণের ত্রিপগুলো পাঠানোর একটি চ্যালেঞ্জালেঞ্জের স ট্রিভিয়ায়িয়াকুয়ার মধ্যে রয়েছে ত্রিভিয়ার উৎসাহী এবং স্বাধীন প্রমাণ নথি সংগ্রহ করেছে, গড়ায় ছয়টি প্রশ্ন, যা প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়ার জন্য দূরবর আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে, সম্প্রতি অন্যান্য বিশাল স্ক্যালের ডাটাসেটের তুলনায় ত্রিভিয়াকুয়ার (১) ত্রিভিয়ায় জটিল, জটিল প্রশ্ন রয়েছে, (২) প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তর প্রমাণের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট বিভ্রা আমরা এছাড়াও দুটি বেস্লাইন অ্যালগরিদম উপস্থাপন করছি: একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য-ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, যা SQuAD পড়ার সম্পর্কে ভালো করে। ত্রিভিয়াকুয়ার একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ বেড যা ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণার মূল্য।', 'az': "Biz TriviaQA'yi, 650K sual-cavab-şahidlik üç dəfə içində çətin bir oxuyan verilənlər dəyişdiririk. TriviaQA, trivia enthusiastlar tarafından yazılmış 95K sual-cavab çift və təmiz olaraq dəlil belələri toplanmış, ortalamaqla hər sual altı ilə, bu suallara cavab vermək üçün yüksək kaliteli uzaq gözətçilik sağlamışdır. Biz göstəririk ki, az öncə başqa böyük ölçü verilən verilənlər ilə qarşılaşdırılmış, TriviaQA (1) sayəsində kompleks, kompleksiyal suallar, 2) suallar arasında sintaktik və leksik dəyişiklik var və cavab-dəyişiklik cümlələr arasında, və 3) daha çox cümlət dəyişiklik istəyir. Biz də iki sinyal algoritmi göstəririk: xüsusiyyətli klasifikatçı və sanat nöral şəklində, SQuAD oxumasında çox yaxşı işlər görür. İnsanların performansına yaxınlaşması da yoxdur (23%, 40% vs. 80%), TriviaQA gələcək təhsil edilməyə layiq olan çətin sınaqdır.", 'ca': "Presentam TriviaQA, un conjunt de dades de comprensió de lectura difícil que conté més de 650.000 triples d'evidències de preguntes-respostes. TriviaQA includes 95K question-answer pairs authored by trivia enthusiasts and independently gathered evidence documents, six per question on average, that provide high quality distant supervision for answering the questions.  Mostrem que, en comparació amb altres conjunts de dades a gran escala recentment introduïts, TriviaQA (1) té preguntes relativament complexes i composicionales, (2) té una variabilitat sinàctica i lècsica considerable entre preguntes i les frases correspondents d'evidència de resposta, i (3) necessita més raonament de frases cruzades per trobar respostes. També presentem dos algoritmes de base: un classificador basat en característiques i una xarxa neural d'última edat, que funciona bé en la comprensió de lectura SQuAD. Ningú d'aquests enfocaments s'apropa del rendiment humà (23% i 40% vs. 80%), suggerent que TriviaQA és un fons de prova difícil que val la pena estudiar significatiu en el futur.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo TriviaQA, izazovnu kompletu podataka o čitanju koja sadrži preko 650K trostruka odgovora na pitanje. TriviaQA uključuje 95K par odgovora na pitanje autoriziranih trivijanskim entuzijastima i nezavisno skupljanih dokumenata, šest po pitanju u prosjeku, koji pružaju visoke kvalitetne udaljene nadzore za odgovore na pitanja. Pokazujemo da, u usporedbi s drugim nedavno uvedenim velikim podacima, TriviaQA (1) ima relativno kompleksnih, kompozicionalnih pitanja, (2) ima značajnu sintaktičnu i leksičku variabilnost između pitanja i odgovarajućih rečenica za dokaze odgovora, i (3) zahtijeva više razloga za križ rečenica za pronalaženje odgovora. Također predstavljamo dva osnovna algoritma: klasifikator na osnovu karakteristike i neuralnu mrežu, koja dobro izvodi na SQuAD čitanju razumijevanja. Nijedan pristup ne dolazi blizu ljudskog učinka (23% i 40% protiv 80%), sugerirajući da je TriviaQA izazovna testovanja koja vrijedi značajno buduće ispitivanje.', 'et': 'Esitleme TriviaQA, keerulist lugemise mõistmise andmekogumit, mis sisaldab üle 650K küsimus-vastus-tõendusmaterjali. TriviaQA sisaldab 95K küsimus-vastus paari, mille autorid on triviaentusiastid ja sõltumatult kogutud tõendidokumendid, keskmiselt kuus küsimuse kohta, mis pakuvad kvaliteetset kaugjärelevalvet küsimustele vastamiseks. Näitame, et võrreldes teiste hiljuti kasutusele võetud suuremahuliste andmekogumitega on TriviaQA-l (1) suhteliselt keerukad kompositsioonilised küsimused, (2) küsimuste ja vastavate vastusetõendite lausete vahel märkimisväärne süntaktiline ja leksikaalne varieeruvus ning (3) vastuste leidmiseks on vaja rohkem lausete ristmõtlemist. Esitleme ka kaks algoritmi: funktsioonipõhine klassifitseerija ja tipptasemel neurovõrk, mis toimib hästi SQuAD lugemise mõistmisel. Kumbki lähenemisviis ei ole lähedal inimese jõudlusele (23% ja 40% vs. 80%), mis viitab sellele, et TriviaQA on keeruline testimisplats, mida tasub tulevikus märkimisväärselt uurida.', 'cs': 'Představujeme TriviaQA, náročný datový soubor porozumění čtení obsahující více než 650K otázky-odpověď-důkazy. TriviaQA zahrnuje 95K otázka-odpověď páry autorské nadšenci trivií a nezávisle shromážděné důkazní dokumenty, v průměru šest na otázku, které poskytují vysoce kvalitní vzdálený dohled při odpovědi na otázky. Ukazujeme, že ve srovnání s ostatními nedávno zavedenými rozsáhlými datovými sadami má TriviaQA (1) relativně složité kompoziční otázky, (2) značnou syntaktickou a lexikální variabilitu mezi otázkami a odpovídajícími větami odpověď-důkaz, a (3) vyžaduje více křížového uvažování k nalezení odpovědí. Dále představujeme dva základní algoritmy: klasifikátor založený na funkcích a nejmodernější neuronovou síť, která dobře funguje při porozumění čtení SQuAD. Žádný přístup se nepřibližuje lidské výkonnosti (23% a 40% vs. 80%) naznačuje, že TriviaQA je náročným testovacím lůžkem, které stojí za významnou budoucí studii.', 'fi': 'Esitämme TriviaQA:n, haastavan lukuymmärryksen aineiston, joka sisältää yli 650K kysymys-vastaus-todistusaineistoa kolminkertaisesti. TriviaQA sisältää 95K kysymys-vastausparia triviaharrastajien kirjoittamia ja itsenäisesti kerättyjä todistusasiakirjoja, keskimäärin kuusi kysymystä kohti, jotka tarjoavat laadukasta etävalvontaa kysymyksiin vastaamisessa. Osoitamme, että verrattuna muihin vastikään käyttöön otettuihin suuriin tietokokonaisuuksiin TriviaQA:lla (1) on suhteellisen monimutkaisia kompositiivisia kysymyksiä, (2) on huomattava syntaktinen ja leksikaalinen vaihtelu kysymysten ja vastaavien vastaustodistuslauseiden välillä ja (3) tarvitaan enemmän ristilauseiden päättelyä vastausten löytämiseksi. Esittelemme myös kaksi perusalgoritmia: ominaisuuspohjainen luokittelija ja huipputekninen neuroverkko, joka toimii hyvin SQuAD-lukuymmärryksessä. Kumpikaan lähestymistapa ei ole lähelläkään ihmisen suorituskykyä (23% ja 40% vs. 80%), mikä viittaa siihen, että TriviaQA on haastava testialusta, jota kannattaa tutkia tulevaisuudessa merkittävästi.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את טריוויה-QA, קבוצת נתונים של הבנה קריאה מאתגרת שמכילה מעל 650 אלף שולחנות-תשובה-ראיות שלוש. TriviaQA כולל זוגות תשובות-שאלות 95K שהוספרו על ידי התלהבות טריביה ואספו באופן עצמאי מסמכי ראיות, שש לכל שאלה בממוצע, שמספקים פיקוח רחוק איכות גבוהה לענות על השאלות. אנו מראים, בהשוואה לאחרונה הוציאו קבוצות מידע גדולות אחרות, TriviaQA (1) יש שאלות מסובכות יחסית ומרכיבות, (2) יש שינוי סינטאקטי ולקסיקלי משמעותי בין שאלות ומשפטי תשובה-ראיות מתאימים, ו (3) דורש סיבון משפטי צלב יותר כדי למצוא תשובות. אנחנו גם מציגים שני אלגוריתמים בסיסיים: קלאסיפור מבוסס על תכונות ורשת עצבית חדשה, שמופקדת היטב על הבנה קריאה SQuAD. שום גישה לא מתקרבת לביצוע אנושי (23% ו-40% vs. 80%), מה שמציע שטריביאקא היא מיטה מבחן מאתגרת ששווה מחקר עתידי משמעותי.', 'jv': 'Anyone TribiaqA karo perusahaan-respon sing ngirim barang Awak dhéwé menehi, karo nggambar karo akeh liyane dadi-kalang nggambar luwih We are again present Two basic Algorithms: a character-supported Mangkin dadi kapan pangan kang sampeyan nganggo cara-sampeyan ingkang sampeyan nêmêng, kawula-sampeyan sing katêpakan karo nganggo cara-sampeyan sing sumelang nêmêr (22% lan 4% sampeyan gambar uwong sampeyan) .', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam TriviaQA, zahteven nabor podatkov o razumevanju branja, ki vsebuje več kot 650K vprašanj-odgovorov-dokazov. TriviaQA vključuje 95K parov vprašanj-odgovorov, ki jih avtorirajo ljubitelji trivij, in neodvisno zbranih dokaznih dokumentov, v povprečju šest na vprašanje, ki zagotavljajo visokokakovosten nadzor na daljavo za odgovore na vprašanja. Pokazali smo, da ima TriviaQA (1) v primerjavi z drugimi nedavno uvedenimi obsežnimi nabori podatkov relativno zapletena, sestavljena vprašanja, (2) precejšnjo sintaktično in leksikalno variabilnost med vprašanji in ustreznimi odgovori-dokazi stavki ter (3) za iskanje odgovorov potrebuje več navzkrižnih stavkov. Predstavljamo tudi dva osnovna algoritma: klasifikator, ki temelji na funkcijah, in vrhunsko nevronsko omrežje, ki dobro deluje na razumevanju branja SQuAD. Noben pristop se ne približuje človeški uspešnosti (23% in 40% v primerjavi z 80%), kar kaže, da je TriviaQA zahtevna testna podlaga, ki je vredna pomembnih prihodnjih raziskav.', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da TrevieQA, wata tsohon karatun karãtunsa da ke ƙunsa da wasu matabbata masu tambayar 650K. KCharselect unicode block name Tuna nũna cewa, da misãlin da wasu masu ƙara da aka shigar da data masu girma a yanzu, TrevieQA (1) yana da masu husũma, masu haɗuwa, (2) yana da varianci mai girma ga syntactic da leksisi tsakanin masu daidai da maganar masĩfa masu basara da bayani, kuma (3) yana tambayar cewa ta ƙẽƙasasshiya don ya sami matsayi. Tuna halatar da algoritori biyu masu basin rubutu: wani mai fassara a kan salon da aka ƙayyade shi na-state-of-the-art neural, wanda ke aikata mai kyau a kan karatun SQuAD. Bã ta zuwa ga mataimaki zuwa ga aikin mutane (23% da 40% vers 80%), yana madawwamata cewa wannan a jarraba ta zama mai ƙaranci a kan karatun ta ƙarami.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་TriviaQA གནད་དོན་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག་ཐབས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཡོད་པས། 650K དེ་གནད་སྲ TriviaQA ནང་དུ་trivia enthusiasts་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྲིད་པའི་མཁན་གྱི་དོན་ཚན་95K་ཡིན་ལན་གསལ་གྱི་ལྟ་བ་ཚུ་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཡིག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཉེ་ཆར་བྱུང་བའི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཆེ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གསལ་བཀོད་བྱས་པ་གཞན་དང་མིན་འདྲ་བྱས་ན། TriviaQA(1)ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་ཏེ། ཆ་འཕྲིན་རིམ་འདྲི་བ་དང་གནད་སྒྲུབ We also present two baseline algorithms: a feature-based classifier and a state-of-the-art neural network, that performs well on SQuAD reading comprehension. ཉེར་སྤྱོད་འདི་མིན་ན་མི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་ཚད། མི་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པས་(23% དང་། 40% vs.80%) ལ་ཉེ་བར།'}
{'en': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge by Learning Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'ar': 'جسر النص والمعرفة من خلال تعلم تضمين كيان متعدد النماذج الأولية', 'es': 'Unir texto y conocimiento mediante el aprendizaje de la inclusión de menciones de entidades multiprototipo', 'pt': 'Faça uma ponte entre texto e conhecimento aprendendo a incorporação de menção de entidade multiprotótipo', 'fr': "Reliez le texte et les connaissances en apprenant l'intégration de mentions d'entités multi-prototypes", 'ja': 'マルチプロトタイプエンティティへの言及の埋め込みによるテキストと知識の橋渡し', 'zh': '以学多原型实体提嵌来桥接文本知识', 'hi': 'ब्रिज पाठ और मल्टी प्रोटोटाइप इकाई उल्लेख एम्बेडिंग सीखने से ज्ञान', 'ru': 'Текст моста и знание путем обучения мульти-прототипа сущности Упоминание Встраивание', 'ga': 'Téacs agus Eolas Droichead trí Fhoghlaim Leabú Aonáin Ilfhréamhshamhail a Leabú', 'hu': 'Szöveg és tudás áthidalása a többprototípusú entitás említésének tanulásával', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Γέφυρα Κειμένου και Γνώσης μαθαίνοντας Ενσωμάτωση Αναφοράς Οντότητας πολλαπλών πρωτοτύπων', 'lt': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge by Learning Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'mk': 'Текст и знаење на мостот со учење на мешање на мулти- прототипи ентитети', 'kk': 'Көптеген протоколдардың білім мәтін мен білім мәзірінің мәзіріне ендіруіName', 'it': 'Bridge Text e Knowledge imparando Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'ml': 'പല- പ്രോട്ടോട്ടൈപ്പിന്റെ എന്റിറ്റി മെനുവിന്റെ പഠനം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പാലത്തിന്റെ പദാ', 'mt': 'It-test u l-għarfien tal-pont permezz tat-Tagħlim ta’ Menzjoni ta’ Entità Multiprototipika', 'mn': 'Бид олон протокол төрлийн Entity Mention нэвтрүүлж', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Połączenie tekstu i wiedzy poprzez uczenie się wieloprototypowego wspomnienia o jednostkach', 'sr': 'Мост текст и знање посредством учења мног прототипа једноства', 'ro': 'Puneți textul și cunoștințele prin învățarea menționării entităților multi-prototip încorporate', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Brygga text och kunskap genom att lära sig Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'so': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge by Learning Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'ta': 'பல- நெறிமுறை உள்ளீட்டு பட்டியல் படிப்பை கற்றுக் கொண்டு பாணி உரையும் அறிவும் உள்ளமைப்பு', 'ms': 'Teks dan Pengetahuan Jembatan Oleh Mempelajari Menentang Entiti Multi-Prototype', 'ur': 'Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Giấy chứng nhận: Nhúng Nhúng ngôn ngữ đa dạng quy trình', 'hr': 'Tekst i znanje mosta učeći razmišljanje o multiprototipu podataka', 'bg': 'Текст на моста и знание чрез изучаване на многопрототипно вписване на обекти', 'nl': 'Brug tekst en kennis door multiprototype entiteitsvermelding te leren insluiten', 'da': 'Bro tekst og viden ved at lære Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'id': 'Jembatan Teks dan Pengetahuan Dengan Belajar Menentang Entitas Multi-Prototype', 'de': 'Überbrücken Sie Text und Wissen, indem Sie Multi-Prototyp Entity Mention Einbetten lernen', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Maandishi na ufahamu kwa kujifunza Mengo la Ujumbe wa Zaidi', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çot-prototip Entity Mensiýany Eýetmek bilen köprüji Metin we Bilim', 'sq': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge by Learning Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'am': 'የመስመር ፋይል', 'hy': 'Bridget Text and Knowledge', 'az': 'K칬pr칲 Metni v톛 Bilim 칞oxlu Prototip Entity Men칲 캻fad톛si', 'bn': 'অনেক প্রোটোটোটাইপ এন্টিটি মেনু শিক্ষা দ্বারা ব্রিজ টেক্সট এবং জ্ঞান', 'bs': 'Tekst i znanje mosta učeći spomenik multiprototipa entiteta', 'ko': '다원형 실체 삽입을 배워서 텍스트와 지식을 연결하다', 'ca': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge imparting Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding', 'cs': 'Propojení textu a znalostí učením se více prototypových entit Vložení zmínek', 'et': 'Sildade tekst ja teadmised mitmeprototüüpi olemi märkimise põimimise õppimise kaudu', 'fi': 'Yhdistä tekstiä ja tietoa oppimalla moniprototyypin entiteettimaininnan upotus', 'jv': 'Bridge Text lan Bilih ngawe Jejaring Multi-Prototype Entit Mention Tatanan', 'sk': 'Premosti besedilo in znanje z učenjem večprototipske omembe entitete', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'טקסט וגשר ומדע על ידי ללמוד זיכרון של יחידות רבות-פרוטוטיפים', 'bo': 'Bridge Text and Knowledge by Learning Multi-Prototype Entity Mention Embedding'}
{'en': 'Integrating text and knowledge into a unified semantic space has attracted significant research interests recently. However, the ambiguity in the common space remains a challenge, namely that the same mention phrase usually refers to various entities. In this paper, to deal with the ambiguity of entity mentions, we propose a novel Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, which learns multiple sense embeddings for each mention by jointly modeling words from textual contexts and entities derived from a knowledge base. In addition, we further design an efficient language model based approach to disambiguate each mention to a specific sense. In experiments, both qualitative and quantitative analysis demonstrate the high quality of the word, entity and multi-prototype mention embeddings. Using entity linking as a study case, we apply our disambiguation method as well as the multi-prototype mention embeddings on the benchmark dataset, and achieve state-of-the-art performance.', 'ar': 'اجتذب دمج النص والمعرفة في فضاء دلالي موحد اهتمامات بحثية مهمة مؤخرًا. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال الغموض في المساحة المشتركة يمثل تحديًا ، أي أن نفس عبارة الإشارة عادة ما تشير إلى كيانات مختلفة. في هذه الورقة ، للتعامل مع الغموض الذي تذكره الكيانات ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا لتضمين ذكر النماذج الأولية المتعددة ، والذي يتعلم تضمين العديد من المعاني لكل ذكر عن طريق النمذجة المشتركة للكلمات من السياقات النصية والكيانات المستمدة من قاعدة المعرفة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نحن نصمم أيضًا نهجًا فعالًا يعتمد على نموذج اللغة لإزالة الغموض عن كل إشارة إلى معنى معين. في التجارب ، أظهر كل من التحليل النوعي والكمي الجودة العالية للكلمة والكيان والنماذج الأولية المتعددة التي تذكر حفلات الزفاف. باستخدام ربط الكيانات كحالة دراسة ، نطبق طريقة إزالة الغموض الخاصة بنا بالإضافة إلى تضمين نماذج أولية متعددة في مجموعة البيانات المعيارية ، ونحقق أداءً متطورًا.', 'fr': "L'intégration de textes et de connaissances dans un espace sémantique unifié a récemment suscité d'importants intérêts de recherche. Cependant, l'ambiguïté dans l'espace commun reste un défi, à savoir que la même phrase de mention fait généralement référence à diverses entités. Dans cet article, pour traiter l'ambiguïté des mentions d'entités, nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'intégration de mention multi-prototype, qui apprend les intégrations de sens multiples pour chaque mention en modélisant conjointement des mots provenant de contextes textuels et d'entités dérivées d'une base de connaissances. En outre, nous concevons une approche efficace basée sur un modèle linguistique afin de lever l'ambiguïté de chaque mention à un sens spécifique. Dans les expériences, les analyses qualitatives et quantitatives démontrent la haute qualité de l'intégration des mentions de mots, d'entités et de multiprototypes. En utilisant la liaison d'entités comme cas d'étude, nous appliquons notre méthode de désambiguïsation ainsi que les intégrations de mentions multi-prototypes sur le jeu de données de référence, et obtenons des performances de pointe.", 'es': 'La integración del texto y el conocimiento en un espacio semántico unificado ha atraído recientemente importantes intereses de investigación. Sin embargo, la ambigüedad en el espacio común sigue siendo un desafío, a saber, que la misma frase de mención suele referirse a varias entidades. En este artículo, para tratar la ambigüedad de las menciones de entidades, proponemos un novedoso modelo de incrustación de menciones de múltiples prototipos, que aprende múltiples incrustaciones de sentidos para cada mención mediante el modelado conjunto de palabras a partir de contextos textuales y entidades derivadas de una base de conocimientos. Además, diseñamos un enfoque basado en un modelo de lenguaje eficiente para eliminar la ambigüedad de cada mención en un sentido específico. En los experimentos, tanto el análisis cualitativo como el cuantitativo demuestran la alta calidad de las incrustaciones de menciones de palabras, entidades y prototipos múltiples. Al utilizar la vinculación de entidades como caso de estudio, aplicamos nuestro método de desambiguación, así como las incorporaciones de menciones de múltiples prototipos en el conjunto de datos de referencia, y logramos un rendimiento de vanguardia.', 'pt': 'Integrar texto e conhecimento em um espaço semântico unificado tem atraído interesses de pesquisa significativos recentemente. No entanto, a ambiguidade no espaço comum continua a ser um desafio, nomeadamente que a mesma frase de menção normalmente se refere a várias entidades. Neste artigo, para lidar com a ambiguidade das menções de entidades, propomos um novo modelo Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding, que aprende vários sentidos de embeddings para cada menção, modelando conjuntamente palavras de contextos textuais e entidades derivadas de uma base de conhecimento. Além disso, projetamos ainda uma abordagem baseada em modelo de linguagem eficiente para desambiguar cada menção em um sentido específico. Em experimentos, tanto a análise qualitativa quanto a quantitativa demonstram a alta qualidade das incorporações de menção de palavra, entidade e multiprotótipo. Usando a vinculação de entidades como um caso de estudo, aplicamos nosso método de desambiguação, bem como as incorporações de menção multiprotótipo no conjunto de dados de referência e alcançamos um desempenho de última geração.', 'ja': 'テキストと知識を統一された意味空間に統合することは、最近大きな研究上の関心を集めている。しかしながら、共通空間における曖昧さは依然として課題であり、すなわち、同じ言及語句は通常、様々な実体を指す。この論文では、エンティティが言及する曖昧さに対処するために、知識ベースから派生したテキストの文脈やエンティティからの単語を共同でモデル化することによって、各言及に対する複数のセンスの埋め込みを学習する、新たなマルチプロトタイプ言及埋め込みモデルを提案している。さらに、効率的な言語モデルに基づくアプローチをさらに設計し、それぞれの言及を特定の意味で曖昧にします。実験では、定性的分析と定量的分析の両方が、単語、実体、およびマルチプロトタイプの言及埋め込みの高品質を示している。エンティティリンクをスタディケースとして、ベンチマークデータセットにマルチプロトタイプのメンションを埋め込むだけでなく、曖昧さを解消する方法を適用し、最先端のパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'ru': 'Интеграция текста и знаний в единое семантическое пространство привлекла в последнее время значительные исследовательские интересы. Однако двусмысленность в общем пространстве остается проблемой, а именно, что одна и та же фраза упоминания обычно относится к различным субъектам. В этой статье, чтобы решить проблему двусмысленности упоминаний сущностей, мы предлагаем новую модель мультипрототипического встраивания упоминания, которая изучает несколько смысловых вложений для каждого упоминания, совместно моделируя слова из текстовых контекстов и сущностей, полученных из базы знаний. Кроме того, мы также разрабатываем эффективный подход, основанный на языковой модели, для устранения двусмысленности в каждом упоминании в конкретном смысле. В экспериментах качественный и количественный анализ демонстрирует высокое качество вложений упоминания слова, сущности и мультипрототипа. Используя связывание сущностей в качестве учебного примера, мы применяем наш метод дезагрегирования, а также мультипрототипические вставки упоминания на наборе сравнительных данных и достигаем самой современной производительности.', 'zh': '将文本与知识整合到一统语义空中近起人兴。 然公共空中模糊性犹一挑战,即同提及短语常指诸实体。 其在本文,为实体提及模糊性,我们发出一种新颖的多原型提及嵌入模形,该模合建模来文本上下文的单词和出自知识库的实体来学习每个提及多种义嵌。 又设言语高效法,以消特定义。 实验之中,定性定量分析皆验单词,实体与多原型提嵌之高质量。 用实体链接为研例,以消歧义法及多原型提嵌应用于基准数集,并成最先进之性。', 'hi': 'एक एकीकृत शब्दार्थ अंतरिक्ष में पाठ और ज्ञान को एकीकृत करने से हाल ही में महत्वपूर्ण शोध हितों को आकर्षित किया गया है। हालांकि, आम स्थान में अस्पष्टता एक चुनौती बनी हुई है, अर्थात् कि एक ही उल्लेख वाक्यांश आमतौर पर विभिन्न संस्थाओं को संदर्भित करता है। इस पेपर में, इकाई के उल्लेख की अस्पष्टता से निपटने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास मल्टी-प्रोटोटाइप मेंशन एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक ज्ञान के आधार से व्युत्पन्न पाठ्य संदर्भों और संस्थाओं से संयुक्त रूप से मॉडलिंग शब्दों द्वारा प्रत्येक उल्लेख के लिए कई अर्थ एम्बेडिंग सीखता है। इसके अलावा, हम आगे एक कुशल भाषा मॉडल आधारित दृष्टिकोण डिजाइन करने के लिए एक विशिष्ट अर्थ के लिए प्रत्येक उल्लेख disambiguate. प्रयोगों में, गुणात्मक और मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण दोनों शब्द, इकाई और बहु-प्रोटोटाइप उल्लेख एम्बेडिंग की उच्च गुणवत्ता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। एक अध्ययन मामले के रूप में जोड़ने वाली इकाई का उपयोग करते हुए, हम अपनी बहुविकल्पी विधि के साथ-साथ बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर मल्टी-प्रोटोटाइप उल्लेख एम्बेडिंग लागू करते हैं, और अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Mheall comhtháthú téacs agus eolas isteach i spás shéimeantach aontaithe suimeanna suntasacha taighde le déanaí. Mar sin féin, tá an débhríocht sa spás coiteann ina dhúshlán, is é sin go dtagraíonn an frása luaite céanna de ghnáth d’eintitis éagsúla. Sa pháipéar seo, chun déileáil le débhríocht na n-eintiteas a luaitear, molaimid samhail nua Leabú Luaite Ilfhréamhshamhail, a fhoghlaimíonn leabaithe ciall iolracha do gach tagairt trí fhocail a chomhshamhaltú ó chomhthéacsanna téacsacha agus ó aonáin a dhíorthaítear ó bhonn eolais. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid cur chuige éifeachtach atá bunaithe ar mhúnla teanga a dhearadh tuilleadh chun gach tagairt a dhíbhrí go dtí ciall ar leith. I dturgnaimh, léiríonn anailís cháilíochtúil agus chainníochtúil ardcháilíocht na leabaithe lua focal, aonáin agus ilfhréamhshamhail. Ag baint úsáide as nascadh eintitis mar chás staidéir, cuirimid ár modh dí-athbhrí i bhfeidhm chomh maith leis na leabaithe lua ilfhréamhshamhail ar an tacar sonraí tagarmhairc, agus bainimid amach an fheidhmíocht is nua-aimseartha.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση κειμένου και γνώσης σε έναν ενοποιημένο σημασιολογικό χώρο έχει προσελκύσει σημαντικά ερευνητικά ενδιαφέροντα πρόσφατα. Ωστόσο, η ασάφεια στον κοινό χώρο παραμένει πρόκληση, δηλαδή ότι η ίδια φράση αναφέρεται συνήθως σε διάφορες οντότητες. Στην παρούσα εργασία, για να αντιμετωπιστεί η ασάφεια των αναφορών οντοτήτων, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης αναφορών πολλαπλών πρωτοτύπων, το οποίο μαθαίνει πολλαπλές ενσάρκωσεις αισθήσεων για κάθε αναφορά μοντελοποιώντας από κοινού λέξεις από κειμενικά πλαίσια και οντότητες που προέρχονται από μια βάση γνώσης. Επιπλέον, σχεδιάζουμε περαιτέρω μια αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε γλωσσικό μοντέλο για να αποσαφηνίσουμε κάθε αναφορά με μια συγκεκριμένη έννοια. Σε πειράματα, τόσο η ποιοτική όσο και η ποσοτική ανάλυση καταδεικνύουν την υψηλή ποιότητα των ενσωμάτωσης λέξης, οντότητας και πολλαπλών πρωτοτύπων αναφορών. Χρησιμοποιώντας τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων ως περίπτωση μελέτης, εφαρμόζουμε τη μέθοδο διασφάλισης μας καθώς και τις ενσωμάτωση πολλών πρωτότυπων αναφορών στο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς και επιτυγχάνουμε επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის და მეცნიერების ინტერგურაცია ერთადერთებული სიმენტიკური სამყაროში აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი თნტერესტის ინტერესტი. მაგრამ საერთო სივრცეში არსებობა დარჩენა გამოცდილობა, როგორც იგივე ამოხსენებული ფრაზა უბრალოდ განსხვავებული ინტერტიკების შესახებ. ამ დოკუნეში, ინტერტის ამბივიდუტის შესახებ, ჩვენ პროგრამეტს მრავალ პროტოტიპის მენციოს მოდულის შესახებ, რომელიც ერთადერთად მოდელურებული სიტყვები და ინტერტიების შესახებ, რომელიც ვისწავლის მრავალ სიტყვების შესახებ დამატებით, ჩვენ უფრო ეფექტიური ენების მოდელის მონაცემები განსხვავებას განსხვავებლად განსხვავებული განსხვავება. ექსპერიმენტებში კალიტატიური და კოლუტატიური ანალიზია სიტყვის, ინტერტიოს და მრავალ პროტოტიოს შესახებ სიტყვის მაღალი კაalitეტის შესახებ. გამოყენებული ინტერტიკი, როგორც სწავლის შესახებ, ჩვენ ჩვენი განამბიდაციის მეტოდის გამოყენებთ, და მრავალ პროტოტიპების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ, და მივიღებთ მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A szöveg és a tudás egységes szemantikai térbe történő integrálása jelentős kutatási érdeklődést vonzott a közelmúltban. Ugyanakkor a közös térben tapasztalható kétértelműség továbbra is kihívást jelent, nevezetesen ugyanaz a kifejezés általában különböző entitásokra utal. Jelen tanulmányban az entitás említések kétértelműségének foglalkozása érdekében egy új Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding modellt javasolunk, amely minden említéshez több érzékbeágyazást tanul meg a szöveges kontextusokból és a tudásbázisból származó entitásokból származó szavak együttes modellezésével. Ezenkívül hatékony nyelvi modell alapú megközelítést is kidolgozunk, hogy minden említést egyértelművé tegyük egy adott értelemben. A kísérletekben mind a kvalitatív, mind a kvantitatív elemzés bizonyítja a szó, entitás és többprototípusú említési beágyazások magas minőségét. Az entitás-összekapcsolás mint tanulmányozási eset alkalmazásával egyértelműsítési módszerünket, valamint a többprototípusú említési beágyazásokat alkalmazzuk a benchmark adatkészleten, és a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt érjük el.', 'it': "L'integrazione di testo e conoscenza in uno spazio semantico unificato ha attirato recentemente significativi interessi di ricerca. Tuttavia, l'ambiguità nello spazio comune rimane una sfida, vale a dire che la stessa frase menziona solitamente varie entità. In questo articolo, per affrontare l'ambiguità delle menzioni di entità, proponiamo un nuovo modello Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding, che apprende incorporazioni di senso multiple per ogni menzione modellando congiuntamente parole provenienti da contesti testuali e entità derivate da una base di conoscenza. Inoltre, progettiamo un approccio basato sul modello linguistico efficiente per disambiguare ogni menzione in un senso specifico. Negli esperimenti, sia l'analisi qualitativa che quantitativa dimostrano l'alta qualità degli embedding delle menzioni di parola, entità e multi-prototipo. Utilizzando il collegamento di entità come caso di studio, applichiamo il nostro metodo di disambiguazione e le incorporazioni di menzioni multi-prototipo sul set di dati di benchmark, e otteniamo prestazioni all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Мәтін мен біріктірілген біріктірілген семантикалық орынға біріктіру соңғы зерттеулердің маңызды қатынасы бар. Бірақ, жалпы орындағы амбикциялық мәселелер әрбір мәселе болып тұрады. Бұл мәселе әдетте бірнеше мәселелерді қалайды. Бұл қағазда бірлікті мәліметтердің мәліметтерінің жалпы мәліметтерді ендіру үшін, әрбір мәліметтердің мәліметтерінің мәліметтерінің жалпы мәліметтерді моделдеу үшін бір мәліметтің мәліметтерінің жалпы түрлі мәліметтер Қосымша, біз әрбір сөйлейтін тіл үлгісін өзгерту үшін ефективті үлгісін құрамыз. Тәжірибелерде квалификациялық және санативтік анализ сөздің, нысандар және көп прототиптердің ендірудің жоғары сапатын көрсетеді. Оқиға сәйкес ретінде сілтемелерді қолдануға болады, біз өзімізді бұғаттау әдісімізді және көптеген прототиптердің бағдарламалардың деректер жиынында ендіру әдісімізді қолдануға болады.', 'lt': 'Neseniai teksto ir žinių integravimas į vieningą semantinę erdvę pritraukė didelius mokslinių tyrimų interesus. Tačiau dviprasmiškumas bendroje erdvėje tebėra iššūkis, būtent tai, kad ta pati minėta frazė paprastai susijusi su įvairiais subjektais. Šiame dokumente, siekiant išspręsti subjektų dviprasmiškumą, siūlome naują daugiapakopį paminėjimo įterpimo model į, kuris mokosi įvairių prasmių įterpimo kiekvienam paminėjimui modeliuojant žodžius iš tekstinių kontekstų ir subjektus, gautus iš žinių bazės. In addition, we further design an efficient language model based approach to disambiguate each mention to a specific sense.  Eksperimentuose tiek kokybinė, tiek kiekybinė analizė rodo aukštą žodžio, subjekto ir daugiapakopio įrangos kokybę. Naudodami subjektą, susiejantį kaip tyrimo atvejį, taikome savo nedviprasmiškumo metodą, taip pat daugelio prototipų mainų įtraukimą į lyginamąjį duomenų rinkinį ir siekiame pažangiausių rezultatų.', 'mt': 'L-integrazzjoni tat-test u l-għarfien fi spazju semantiku unifikat attirat interessi sinifikanti fir-riċerka reċentement. Madankollu, l-ambigwità fl-ispazju komuni tibqa’ sfida, jiġifieri li l-istess frażi ta’ referenza normalment tirreferi għal diversi entitajiet. In this paper, to deal with the ambiguity of entity mentions, we propose a novel Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, which learns multiple sense embeddings for each mention by jointly modeling words from textual contexts and entities derived from a knowledge base.  Barra minn hekk, a ħna niddisinjaw aktar approċċ effiċjenti bbażat fuq mudell lingwistiku biex kull referenza tiġi diżambigwata għal sens speċifiku. Fl-esperimenti, kemm analiżi kwalitattiva kif ukoll kwantitattiva turi l-kwalità għolja tal-kliem, l-entità u l-inkorporazzjonijiet imsemmija f’diversi prototipi. Bl-użu ta’ entità li torbot bħala każ ta’ studju, a ħna napplikaw il-metodu tagħna ta’ diżambiguazzjoni kif ukoll l-inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ referenza multiprototipi fis-sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza, u niksbu prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata.', 'mk': 'Интеграцијата на текстот и знаењето во единствениот семантичен простор неодамна привлече значителни интереси за истражување. Сепак, нејасноста во заедничкиот простор останува предизвик, имено дека истата фраза за споменување обично се однесува на различни ентитети. Во овој весник, за да се справи со нејасноста на спомените на ентитетот, предложуваме нов модел за вклучување на спомени од мулти-прототипи, кој научи многуте вградувања на смисла за секое споменување со заедничко моделирање на зборови од текстуални контексти и ентитети изведени од базата на знаење. Покрај тоа, понатаму дизајнираме ефикасен пристап базиран на јазички модел за да го разјасниме секој спомен на специфична смисла. Во експериментите, квалитетната и квантитивната анализа ја покажува високата квалитетност на зборот, ентитетот и мултипите споменуваат вгради. Користејќи ентитет кој се поврзува како случај на студија, го применуваме нашиот метод на деамбигуација, како и мултипот спомнува вградувања на наборот на податоци за benchmark, и постигнуваме најсовремени резултати.', 'ms': 'Penyempurnaan teks dan pengetahuan ke ruang semantik bersatu telah menarik minat kajian yang penting baru-baru ini. Namun, ambiguiti dalam ruang umum tetap satu cabaran, iaitu bahawa frasa sebutan yang sama biasanya merujuk kepada pelbagai entiti. Dalam kertas ini, untuk menangani ambiguity entity menyebutkan, kami melaporkan model penyembelihan Membentuk Multi-Prototype novel, yang mempelajari penyembelihan berarti berbilang untuk setiap menyebutkan dengan mengubah perkataan bersama-sama dari konteks teks dan entiti yang berasal dari pangkalan pengetahuan. Selain itu, kita merancang lebih lanjut pendekatan berdasarkan model bahasa yang efisien untuk menyatakan tiap-tiap sebutan kepada satu akal tertentu. Dalam eksperimen, analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif menunjukkan kualiti tinggi perkataan, entiti dan pelbagai prototip menyebutkan penyambungan. Dengan menggunakan entiti yang menghubungkan sebagai kes kajian, kami melaksanakan kaedah penyelesaian kami serta penyelesaian multi-prototip disebut pada set data benchmark, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik.', 'ml': 'Integrating text and knowledge into a unified semantic space has attracted significant research interests recently.  എന്നാലും സാധാരണ സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ അഗാധത്വം ഒരു വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലം തന്നെയാണ്, അതേ വാക്ക് സാധാരണയായി വ്യത്യസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സാധാരണ പ്രഖ്യാപങ്ങളുടെ ആഗ്രഹത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നോവല്\u200d മെന്റന്\u200d എംബെഡിങ്ങ് മോഡലിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നോവല്\u200d പ്രോട്ടോട്ടൈപ്പ് മെന്റ് മെന്\u200dഡിങ് മോഡല്\u200d നാം  കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു. ഓരോരുത്തരെയും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചൊരു കാര്യത്തിലേക്ക് വി പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, വാക്ക്, വസ്തുവിന്റെയും പല-പ്രോട്ടോട്ടൈപ്പിന്റെയും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ഗുണവും വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പഠനത്തിന്റെ കേസ് ആയി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിവേചന മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു പല-പ്രോട്ടോപ്റ്', 'pl': 'Integracja tekstu i wiedzy w jednolitą przestrzeń semantyczną przyciągnęła ostatnio istotne zainteresowania badawcze. Jednak niejednoznaczność we wspólnej przestrzeni pozostaje wyzwaniem, a mianowicie, że ta sama fraza wspomnienia zwykle odnosi się do różnych podmiotów. W niniejszym artykule, aby poradzić sobie z dwuznacznością wzmianek o jednostkach, proponujemy nowy model Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding, który uczy się wielu osadzeń zmysłowych dla każdej wzmianki poprzez wspólne modelowanie słów z kontekstów tekstowych i podmiotów pochodzących z bazy wiedzy. Ponadto opracowujemy efektywne podejście oparte na modelu językowym, aby rozproszyć każdą wzmiankę do konkretnego sensu. W eksperymentach zarówno analiza jakościowa, jak i ilościowa pokazuje wysoką jakość osadzeń słowa, podmiotu i wieloprototypowego. Korzystając z linkowania entity jako przypadku badawczego, stosujemy naszą metodę dyskryminacji oraz wieloprototypowe osadzenia wspomnień w zbiorze danych referencyjnym i osiągamy najnowocześniejszą wydajność.', 'mn': 'Текст болон мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх семантийн орон зайд нэгтгэх нь саяхан судалгааны сонирхолтой болсон. Гэхдээ ерөнхий орон-зайд байгаа хэцүү зүйл нь сорилт байдаг. Яг ижил хэлбэртэй хэлбэрүүдийг ихэвчлэн өөр төрөлхтнүүдийг харуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бизнесийн хэлэлцэх хэмжээний тухай зохицуулахын тулд бид олон протокол төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь мэдлэг суурь болон бизнес дээр гарсан хэдэн хэмжээний ойлголтын загварыг суралцдаг. Үүнээс гадна бид хэл загварын үндсэн арга загварыг тодорхой ойлголтын тулд нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Сургуультад чадвартай болон хэмжээний шинжилгээ нь үг, бүтэц болон олон прототипүүдийн дунд хэмжээний өндөр чадварыг харуулдаг. Судалгааны тухай холбоотой нэгж хэрэглэхэд бид өөрсдийгөө багасгах арга замыг, олон прототиптүүд багасгах өгөгдлийн сангийн хэлбэрээр нэмэгдүүлж, урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Integrarea textului și a cunoștințelor într-un spațiu semantic unificat a atras recent interese semnificative de cercetare. Cu toate acestea, ambiguitatea din spațiul comun rămâne o provocare, și anume că aceeași frază menționată se referă de obicei la diferite entități. În această lucrare, pentru a aborda ambiguitatea mențiunilor entităților, propunem un nou model Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding, care învață mai multe încorporări de sens pentru fiecare mențiune prin modelarea împreună a cuvintelor din contexte textuale și entități derivate dintr-o bază de cunoștințe. În plus, proiectăm în continuare o abordare eficientă bazată pe modelul lingvistic pentru a dezambiguiza fiecare mențiune într-un sens specific. În experimente, atât analiza calitativă, cât și cantitativă demonstrează calitatea înaltă a cuvântului, entității și încorporărilor de mențiuni multi-prototip. Folosind legătura entităților ca caz de studiu, aplicăm metoda noastră de dezambiguizare, precum și încorporările de mențiuni multi-prototip pe setul de date de referință și obținem performanțe de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Integrovanje teksta i znanja u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor nedavno je privuklo značajne istraživačke interese. Međutim, nesposobnost u zajedničkom prostoru ostaje izazov, a to je da se ista spominjana fraza obično odnosi na različite entitate. U ovom papiru, da se suočimo sa ambiguitnošću spominjanja entiteta, predlažemo nov model uključujući multiprototipne sjećanja, koji uči više smisla za svako spominjanje zajedno modelirajući reči tekstualnih konteksta i entiteta iz baze znanja. Osim toga, dalje dizajniramo efikasni jezički model bazirani pristup disambiguaciji svakog spominjanja u određenom smislu. U eksperimentima, kvalitativna i kvantitativna analiza pokazuju visoke kvalitete reči, entiteta i multiprototipa spominju integracije. Koristeći entitet koji povezuje kao slučaj istraživanja, primjenjujemo našu metodu disambiguacije, kao i multiprototipu spominjemo integraciju na setu podataka o referenciji, i postižemo izvršnost stanja umjetnosti.', 'no': 'Integrering av tekst og kunnskap til eit einaste semantisk plass har nyleg attrakta signifikante forskningsinteressar. I det vanlege området er imidlertid eit utfordring, dvs. at det same området oftast refererer til ulike einingar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt multiprototype-menyoppføring, som lærer fleire innbyggingar for kvar menyoppføring ved å kopla modellere ord frå tekstkontekstar og einingar som er avhengig frå kunnskapsbasen. I tillegg designerer vi meir eit effektivt språk-modell basert tilnærming til å forskyve kvar meny til ein spesifikk følelse. I eksperimenter viser både kvalitative og kvantitative analyse høg kvalitet på ordet, entitet og multiprototypar med innbygging. I bruk av eininga som lenkjer som studie, bruker vi vårt disambiguasjonsmetode og fleire prototypar med innbygging på datasettet for benchmarket, og oppnår kunstfullstendighet.', 'si': 'පාළ සහ දන්නවත් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කාලයක් තියෙන්නේ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් අතුරුද්ධ වි නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය අවස්ථාවයේ අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවක්, ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවක් සාමාන්\u200dය විවිධ අවස In this papers, to address the non-guiguity of unity references, we preach a new Multi-prototype Mention Embeading Model, that learns Multi senses Embdings for all references by shared Modeling Words from textal Contexts and Units from a Known base. ඒ වගේම, අපි තවත් විශේෂ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විසිද්ධ කරනවා හැමෝම කියන්නේ විශේෂ අදහසක් නිර්මා පරීක්ෂණයේදී, ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත විශ්ලේෂණය දෙන්නම් වචන, වර්ත්\u200dරය සහ බොහොම ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත වර්තනය අධ්\u200dයානයක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අපි අපේ අවස්ථානයක් විදියට අවස්ථානය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සූද්ධානයේ ගොඩක් ප', 'so': 'Isku qabsashada qoraalka iyo aqoonta goobta iskuulka ah ee isku qabsaday ayaa dhaqdhaqaaqiyey xiisaha baaritaanka oo muhiim ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qallafsanaanshaha cirka caadiga ah waa dhibaato, taas oo ah in isku hadal looga jeedo qeybo kala duduwan. Kanu warqaddan, si aan ula macaamiloono dhaqdhaqaaqyada macluumaadka jidhka ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sameynta qoraal-warqad ah oo ku qoran qoraal-qoraal-qaab badan, kaas oo baranaya qalabka maandooriyaha badan oo ku qoran magac kasta, si wadajir ah looga sameynayo hadal ka soo jeeda qoraalka iyo waxyaabaha ka soo baxay aasaasiga aqoonta. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu qoraynaa model afka oo faa’iido leh si a an u kala firdhinno hadal kasta oo lagu sheego waxyaabo gaar ah. Imtixaanka iyo baaritaanka qiyaasta iyo qiyaastiisa ayaa muujiya qiimaha sare ee hadalka, dhamaanka iyo noocyada badan oo ku saabsan. Isku isticmaalayaasha jidhka ku xiran sida xaalad waxbarasho, waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababka kala duwan iyo qaababka noocyada badan oo ku saabsan taariikhda bangiga, waxaana sameynaynaa sameynta bandhigyada farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Att integrera text och kunskap i ett enhetligt semantiskt rum har väckt betydande forskningsintressen på senare tid. Men tvetydigheten i det gemensamma rummet är fortfarande en utmaning, nämligen att samma omnämningsfraser vanligtvis hänvisar till olika entiteter. För att ta itu med tvetydigheten i entitetsomnämnanden föreslår vi en ny Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding modell, som lär sig flera sinnesbäddningar för varje omnämnande genom att gemensamt modellera ord från textsammanhang och entiteter som härrör från en kunskapsbas. Dessutom utformar vi ytterligare ett effektivt språkmodellbaserat tillvägagångssätt för att skilja varje omnämnande till en specifik mening. I experiment visar både kvalitativ och kvantitativ analys den höga kvaliteten på ord, entitet och multi-prototyp omnämnande inbäddningar. Genom att använda entitetslänkning som studiefall tillämpar vi vår disambiguationsmetod samt omnämnande av flera prototyper på referensdatauppsättningen och uppnår toppmodern prestanda.', 'ur': 'پیغام اور علم کو ایک متحدہ سیمانٹی جگہ میں ترکیب کیا گیا ہے اچھے وقت بہت اہم تحقیق کے علائم کو اٹھایا گیا ہے۔ اگرچہ، مشترک فضا میں غلطی ایک چال رہی ہے، یعنی یہ ہے کہ ایک ہی ذکر فرشتہ معمولاً مختلف فرشتوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نو Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے، جو ہر ذکر کے لئے بہت سی حس انڈینگ سکھاتا ہے، جو ایک علم بنسس سے پائی جاتی ہے، ایک متوسط متوسط اور متوسط کی کلمات کے ساتھ ایک جوڑے مڈیل کے ذریعہ سے لکھتے ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، ہم ایک عمدہ زبان موڈل کی طرح طراحی کریں گے جو ہر ذکر کو ایک خاص سمجھ کے ذریعے ناکام کرنا ہے۔ آزمائش میں، کلمات، انٹیٹیٹی اور بہت سی پروٹیٹیپ کے مطابق مطابق کلمات کے بلند کیفیت کو دکھاتے ہیں. ایک تحصیل کیس کے طور پر اتصال ہونے کی استعمال کرتا ہے، ہم اپنے ناممبوئٹ کی طریقہ کے مطابق اور بہت سی پروٹوٹیپ کے مطابق بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق کرتے ہیں، اور آرت کی عملکرد کو پہنچاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'உரையையும் அறிவையும் சேர்த்து ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட பெம்பெண்டிக் இடைவெளி ஆனால், பொது வெளியிலுள்ள விருப்பங்கள் ஒரு சவாலாக இருக்கிறது, அதே சொற்றொடர் வழக்கமாக பல பொருள்களை குறிக்கும். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், பொருள் குறிப்புகளின் குறிப்புகளை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய பல- நெறிமுறை மென்பொருள் மாதிரியும், அது அறிவு அடிப்படையிலிருந்து வரும் பொருள் மேலும், நாம் மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையை வடிவமைத்து ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பொருளுக பரிசோதனைகளில், மதிப்பீடு மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட பரிசோதனையில் உள்ள சொல்லு, பொருள் மற்றும் பல முறைமையின் உயர்தரம் கூறுகிறது. ஒரு ஆய்வு விஷயத்தால் இணைக்கப்படும் பொருளை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் எங்கள் பிரிப்பு முறைமையையும் மற்றும் பல- முறைமையையும் பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில', 'uz': "Yaqinda birlashtirilgan semantik romaniga matn va ilimni birlashtirish uchun juda muhim taʼminlovchi qiziqaruvchiga qaramadi. Lekin umumiy bo'lgan shaxsiyatlarning qiymati juda qiymatdir, shunday qilib, bitta so'zlar odatda har xil mavzularga qaramadi. Bu qogʻozda, ma'lumotning taqdimotini boshqarish uchun biz bir necha protokol boshqaruv modelini tahrirlash imkoniyatlarini o'rganamiz. Bu bir necha ma'lumotni o'rganadi, bu bir necha ma'lumotlar uchun bir necha ma'lumotni o'rganadi. Ko'pchilik, biz har bir necha ma'lum ma'nosini ajratish uchun foydalanuvchi tilning asosiy modelini dizayn qilamiz. Tajribalar davomida, kvlitativ va kvantitativ analyzer soʻzning, entity va ko'plab prototypining eng katta sifatini ko'rsatadi. Taʼminlovchi holati sifatida bogʻ'liqchi narsalarni ishlatish uchun biz qayta qilish usulini va bir necha prototypini benchmark maʼlumotlari sahifadagi narsalarni amalga oshirishingiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác văn bản và kiến thức vào một văn phòng ngữ pháp thống nhất gần đây thu hút các quan điểm nghiên cứu quan trọng. Tuy nhiên, sự mơ hồ trong không gian chung vẫn là một thách thức, đó là câu nói giống nhau thường liên quan đến các thực thể khác nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, để giải quyết sự mơ hồ của thực thể đề cập, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình nền khai vị đa nguyên mẫu, mà học được sự nhúng vào nhiều cảm xúc cho mỗi lần được nhắc đến bằng cách cấu trúc từ ngữ cảnh và thực thể từ một căn cứ kiến thức. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thiết kế một phương pháp ngôn ngữ hiệu quả dựa trên để giải đáp mỗi tên gọi với một ý nghĩa cụ thể. Trong các thí nghiệm, cả phân tích chất lượng lẫn chất lượng đều chứng minh chất lượng cao của từ, thực thể và các loại đa mẫu. Sử dụng thực thể kết nối như một trường hợp nghiên cứu, chúng tôi áp dụng phương pháp phân biến của chúng tôi cũng như tổ hợp đa mẫu đề cập đề cập vào bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, và đạt được hiệu suất hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Интегрирането на текст и знания в единно семантично пространство наскоро привлече значителни изследователски интереси. Все пак двусмислеността в общото пространство остава предизвикателство, а именно, че една и съща фраза за споменаване обикновено се отнася до различни субекти. В настоящата статия, за да се справим с двусмислеността на споменаването на единици, предлагаме нов модел за вграждане на многопрототипни споменания, който научава вграждането на множество значения за всяко споменаване чрез съвместно моделиране на думи от текстови контексти и единици, получени от база знания. Освен това разработваме ефективен подход, базиран на езиков модел, за да разграничим всяко споменаване в конкретен смисъл. В експериментите както качественият, така и количественият анализ демонстрират високото качество на вграждането на думата, същността и многопрототипните споменавания. Използвайки връзката на субектите като пример за проучване, ние прилагаме нашия метод за разграничаване, както и вграждането на множество прототипи в базовия набор от данни и постигаме най-съвременни резултати.', 'da': 'Integrering af tekst og viden i et samlet semantisk rum har for nylig tiltrukket betydelige forskningsinteresser. Men tvetydigheden i det fælles rum er fortsat en udfordring, nemlig at samme nævnelsessætning normalt henviser til forskellige enheder. I denne artikel, for at beskæftige sig med tvetydigheden af entitetsnævnelser, foreslår vi en ny Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, der lærer flere sansebelejringer for hver omtale ved i fællesskab at modellere ord fra tekstsammenhænge og entiteter afledt fra en vidensbase. Derudover designer vi yderligere en effektiv sprogmodel baseret tilgang til at adskille hver omtale til en bestemt betydning. I eksperimenter påviser både kvalitativ og kvantitativ analyse den høje kvalitet af ord, entitet og multi-prototype omtale embeddings. Ved hjælp af entitetslinking som studiecase anvender vi vores forståelsesmetode samt multi-prototype nævnelse embeddings på benchmark datasættet, og opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne.', 'nl': 'Het integreren van tekst en kennis in een uniforme semantische ruimte heeft de laatste tijd belangrijke onderzoeksinteresses aangetrokken. De ambiguïteit in de gemeenschappelijke ruimte blijft echter een uitdaging, namelijk dat dezelfde vermeldingszin meestal verwijst naar verschillende entiteiten. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model voor, dat meerdere zintuiginsluitingen leert voor elke vermelding door gezamenlijk woorden uit tekstuele contexten en entiteiten afgeleid van een kennisbank te modelleren. Daarnaast ontwerpen we verder een efficiënte taalmodel gebaseerde aanpak om elke vermelding te verduidelijken naar een specifieke betekenis. In experimenten demonstreren zowel kwalitatieve als kwantitatieve analyses de hoge kwaliteit van het woord, entiteit en multi-prototype vermeldingen embeddings. Met behulp van entity linking als studiecase passen we onze disambiguation methode en de multi-prototype vermelding embeddings toe op de benchmark dataset, en bereiken we state-of-the-art prestaties.', 'hr': 'Privlačenje teksta i znanja u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor nedavno je privuklo značajne istraživačke interese. Međutim, nesposobnost u zajedničkom prostoru ostaje izazov, a to je da se ista spominjana fraza obično odnosi na različite entitate. U ovom papiru, kako bi se riješili nesposobnošću spominjanja subjekta, predlažemo nov model uključenog razmišljanja multiprototipa, koji uči više smisla za svako spominjanje zajedno modelirajući riječi iz tekstualnih konteksta i subjekta iz baze znanja. Osim toga, dalje dizajniramo učinkovit jezički model bazirani pristup disambiguaciji svakog spominjanja u određenom smislu. U eksperimentima, kvalitativna i kvantitativna analiza pokazuju visoke kvalitete riječi, entiteta i multiprototipa spominju integracije. Koristeći entitet koji povezuje kao slučaj istraživanja, primjenjujemo naš metod disambiguacije, kao i multiprototip spominje integracije na setu podataka o kriteriji i postićemo postignuće postupak stanja umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Integrasi teks dan pengetahuan ke ruang semantis bersatu telah menarik minat penelitian yang signifikan baru-baru ini. However, the ambiguity in the common space remains a challenge, namely that the same mention phrase usually refers to various entities.  Dalam kertas ini, untuk menghadapi ambiguitas yang disebutkan oleh entitas, kami mengusulkan sebuah model baru Multi-Prototype Menentang Menentang, yang mempelajari multiple senses embedding untuk setiap menyebutkan dengan bersama-sama mengubah kata-kata dari konteks teks dan entitas yang berasal dari dasar pengetahuan. Selain itu, kami merancang lebih lanjut pendekatan berbasis model bahasa efisien untuk melepaskan setiap sebutan ke suatu akal tertentu. Dalam eksperimen, analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif menunjukkan kualitas tinggi dari kata, entitas dan multi prototip menyebutkan embedding. Menggunakan entitas yang menghubungkan sebagai kasus penelitian, kami menerapkan metode penyelesaian kami dan banyak prototip menyebutkan embedding pada set data benchmark, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik.', 'ko': '텍스트와 지식을 통일된 의미 공간으로 통합하는 것이 최근 많은 연구 흥미를 끌고 있다.그러나 공공 공간에서의 잘못된 의미는 여전히 도전이다. 즉, 같은 언급은 일반적으로 서로 다른 실체를 가리킨다.본고에서 실체 언급의 모호성을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 다원형 언급 삽입 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 텍스트 상하문에서 온 단어와 지식 라이브러리에서 온 실체를 연합하여 모든 언급을 통해 여러 가지 의미를 삽입한다.그 밖에 우리는 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 효과적인 방법을 설계하여 모든 특정한 의미의 잘못된 뜻을 없앴다.실험에서 정성과 정량 분석은 단어, 실체와 다원형 언급이 삽입된 고품질을 증명했다.실체 링크를 연구 사례로 삼아 우리는 기준 데이터 집합에서 우리의 변조 방법과 다원형 언급 삽입을 응용하여 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.', 'de': 'Die Integration von Text und Wissen in einen einheitlichen semantischen Raum hat in letzter Zeit bedeutende Forschungsinteressen geweckt. Die Mehrdeutigkeit im gemeinsamen Raum bleibt jedoch eine Herausforderung, nämlich dass sich derselbe Erwähnungssatz normalerweise auf verschiedene Entitäten bezieht. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding Modell vor, das mehrere Sinneseinbettungen für jede Erwähnung lernt, indem Wörter aus textuellen Kontexten und Entitäten aus einer Wissensdatenbank gemeinsam modelliert werden. Darüber hinaus entwickeln wir einen effizienten sprachmodellbasierten Ansatz, um jede Erwähnung in einen bestimmten Sinn zu disambiguieren. In Experimenten demonstrieren sowohl qualitative als auch quantitative Analysen die hohe Qualität der Einbettungen von Wort, Entität und Multi-Prototyp Erwähnung. Unter Verwendung von Entity Linking als Studienfall wenden wir unsere Disambiguation Methode sowie die Multi-Prototyp Erwähnung Einbettungen auf den Benchmark Datensatz an und erzielen so eine State-of-the-Art Performance.', 'fa': 'ترکیب متن و دانش به یک فضای طبیعی متحد به اخیراً علاقه های تحقیقات مهم را جذب کرده است. با این حال، غیرقابلیت در فضا مشترک یک چالش باقی مانده است، یعنی که همان عبارت معمولاً به عنوان متفاوت متفاوت refers to various entities. در این کاغذ، برای درگیری با غیر قابل توجه از شرایط متن و شرایط متن از یک پایگاه علم، یک مدل تفسیر چند پروتوتیپ را پیشنهاد می کنیم. در addition, we further design an efficient language model based approach to disambiguate each mention to a specific sense. در آزمایشات، هر دو تحلیل گوناگونی و تعدادی کیفیت بالا کلمه، عنوان و چندین پروتویپ\u200cهای مشترک را نشان می\u200cدهد. با استفاده از شرکت که به عنوان پرونده مطالعه ارتباط می\u200cشود، ما روش ناپدید کردن خود را و همچنین پروتوتیپ چندین\u200cگونه در مجموعه داده\u200cهای صندوق می\u200cگویند، استفاده می\u200cکنیم و به انجام وضعیت هنر رسیدیم.', 'tr': 'Metin we bilgi birleşen semantik seleňe üýtgetmek üçin ýakynda baglanyş gyzyklary çekdi. Ýöne ortak alandaky samsyklylyk kynçylyk bolup geçýär. Şüphesiz bu sözleriň sözü adatça çeşitli guramlara gürleýär. Bu kagyzda, birnäçe çykyşlaryň samsyklygy bilen çykmak üçin, bir Multi-Prototype Mention Taýýarlama nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Bu nusgasynda, her diňe tekst we bilim bazyndan gelen sözleri bilen modelleýän şekilde birnäçe duýumlyk taýýarlamak üçin öwrenýär. Mundan soňra, biz her diýişini belli duýgulara çykarmak üçin etkinlik dil nusgasyny taýýarlapdyk. Deneylerde, hem qualitatiw hem quantitatik analýusiň sözlerin, entitet hem multi-prototipler içerişleriniň ýokary kalitesini görkezýär. Uniwersitet öwrenmegi ýaly çalyşyk taýýarlanýand a, çykyş yöntemimizi we benchmark veri setirinde multi-prototip daşaryşyklary ýazylýar we sungatlaryň durumyny ýerine ýetirýäris.', 'af': "Onlangs het die integrering van teks en kennis in 'n eenvoudige semantiese ruimte betekende ondersoek belangrike aantrek. Maar die onbedienheid in die gemeenskaplike ruimte bly 'n uitdrukking, bedoel dat die selfde uitdrukking gewoonlik na verskillende entiteite verwys. In hierdie papier, om te behandel met die ongelukkigheid van entiteite bepaal, voorstel ons 'n roman Multi-Prototipe Mention Inbetering Model, wat leer veelvuldige sens inbettings vir elke bepaal deur saamstige modeling van woorde van tekstuele konteks en entiteite uit 'n kennis basis afgelei word. In addition, we further design an efficient language model based approach to disambiguate each mention to a specific sense. In eksperimente, beide kvalitatiewe en kvantitatiewe analisie vertoon die hoë kwaliteit van die woord, entiteit en multi- prototipe aanwys inbettings. By die gebruik van entiteit wat as 'n studie geval verbind word, het ons ons ontwikkelingsmetode aangepas en die multiprototipe wat inbettings op die benchmarkdatastel aangebruik word, en bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie.", 'sw': 'Kuunganisha ujumbe na maarifa katika anga la mpira wa kimapenzi umevutia maslahi makubwa ya utafiti hivi karibuni. Hata hivyo, uchochezi katika anga la kawaida unabaki kuwa changamoto, ni kwamba neno hilo linalotajwa mara nyingi linamaanisha vitu kadhaa. Katika karatasi hii, ili kupambana na hamasa ya kutajwa kwa vyombo vya habari, tunapendekeza mtindo wa maandiko ya Kumbukumba Mitandao ya Mitandao ya Mitandao ya Mitandao, ambao unajifunza viungo vingi vya hisia kwa kutajwa kwa kila mmoja kwa kutengeneza maneno ya pamoja kutoka kwenye matatizo ya msingi na vitu vinavyotoka kwenye msingi wa maarifa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaunda mtindo wa lugha yenye ufanisi wa ufanisi wa namna ya kutofautisha kila kinachotajwa kwa maana fulani. Katika majaribio, uchambuzi wa kiwango na kiasi kinaonyesha kiwango kikubwa cha neno, entity na mifano mingi yanayotajwa. Kwa kutumia vyombo vinavyounganisha kama kesi ya utafiti, tunatumia mbinu zetu za kutofautisha pamoja na aina mbalimbali zinazotaja viungo vya taarifa za bendera, na kupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa.', 'sq': 'Integrating text and knowledge into a unified semantic space has attracted significant research interests recently.  Megjithatë, pasiguria në hapësirën e përbashkët mbetet një sfidë, veçanërisht se e njëjta frazë përmendimi zakonisht i referohet njësive të ndryshme. In this paper, to deal with the ambiguity of entity mentions, we propose a novel Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, which learns multiple sense embeddings for each mention by jointly modeling words from textual contexts and entities derived from a knowledge base.  Përveç kësaj, ne dizajnojmë më tej një metodë të efektshme bazuar në modelin gjuhësor për të çambiguar çdo përmendim në një kuptim të caktuar. Në eksperimente, si analiza kualitative ashtu edhe kuantitative tregojnë cilësinë e lartë të fjalës, njësisë dhe shumë-prototipit përmendin përfshirjet. Duke përdorur njësinë që lidhet si një rast studimi, ne aplikojmë metodën tonë të çambiguacionit si dhe shumë-prototipin përmend përfshirjet në bazën e të dhënave të referimit dhe arrijmë performancën më të lartë.', 'am': 'ጽሑፉን እና እውቀትን በመጠቀም በአሁኑ የsemantic ስፋት ብዙ ምርመራ ፈቃድ አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን በተለያዩ ስፋት ውስጥ የፍላጎት ፍላጎት መቀናቀል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን ለመቀበል፣ የብዙ ፕሮጀክት ዓይነት እና የእውቀት መሠረት አካባቢ ሞዴል እናስተማራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ መሠረትን ለጥቅም እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ፣ የቃላት፣ አካባቢ እና የብዙ ፕሮቶግራም ጥያቄዎችን የሚያሳየው፡፡ አካሄዱን እንደ ትምህርት ጉዳይ በመጠቀም፣ የግንኙነታችንን አካባቢ እና የብልቶፕሮግራሙን አካባቢ እና የመረጃ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እና የ-art ድረ ገጽ አግኝተን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Integracija teksta i znanja u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor nedavno je privukla značajne istraživačke interese. Međutim, nesposobnost u zajedničkom prostoru ostaje izazov, a to je da se ista spominjana fraza obično odnosi na različite entitate. U ovom papiru, kako bi se suočili sa nesposobnošću spominjanja entiteta, predlažemo nov model uključenog razmišljanja multiprototipa, koji uči više smisla za svako spominjanje, zajedno modelirajući riječi tekstualnih konteksta i entiteta iz baze znanja. Osim toga, dalje dizajniramo efikasan jezički model bazirani pristup disambiguaciji svakog spominjanja u određenom smislu. U eksperimentima, kvalitativna i kvantitativna analiza pokazuju visoke kvalitete riječi, entiteta i multiprototipa spominju integracije. Koristeći entitet koji povezuje kao slučaj istraživanja, primjenjujemo naš metod disambiguacije, kao i multiprototip spominje integracije na setu podataka o referenciji, i postićemo postignuće postupak stanja umjetnosti.', 'bn': 'একটি একত্রিত সেমেন্টিক স্পেসে লেখা এবং জ্ঞান যুক্ত করা সম্প্রতি বিশেষ গবেষণার আগ্রহের আকর্ষণ করেছে। তবে সাধারণ জায়গায় বাধ্যতা একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে একই কথা উল্লেখ করা হয় সাধারণত বিভিন্ন বস্তুর কথা উল্লেখ করে। এই কাগজটিতে বৈশিষ্ট্যের উল্লেখযোগ্যতার সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করছি মাল্টি প্রোটোটোটাইপ মেনেশন এমবেডিং মডেল, যা জ্ঞানের ভেতর থেকে প্রত্যেকের উল এছাড়াও, আমরা আরো কার্যকর ভাষার মডেলের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি গঠন করি যাতে প্রত্যেক উল্লেখযোগ্য একটি নির্দিষ্ট বিষয়ে  পরীক্ষার মধ্যে বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণ উভয় শব্দ, প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং বহুপ্রোটোটাইপের উচ্চ মান উল্লেখ করে। গবেষণা মামলা হিসেবে যুক্ত বস্তু ব্যবহার করে আমরা আমাদের বিভ্রান্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করি এবং বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে বিভিন্ন প্রক্রিয়ার কথা উল্লেখ করি এবং শ', 'az': 'Mətn və elm birlikdə bir semantik alana birləşdirmək son zamanlarda möhtərəm araşdırma intereslərini çekdi. Lakin, ortaq alandaki səhv bir dövlət həmişə qalar, yani, aynı sözlərin çox müxtəlif məsələlərə məlumat edir. Bu kağızda, məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarını çəkmək üçün yeni Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding modeli təklif edirik, ki, hər kəsin məlumatların məlumatların və məlumatların məlumatlarından bir yerə modelləşdirilməsi üçün çoxlu məlumatları öyrənir. Əvvəlcə, biz hər bir məlumatı müəyyən bir hissəyə dəyişdirmək üçün faydalı dil modeli düzəltdik. Həmçinin təcrübələrdə, həmçinin qiymətli və kvantitatlı analizi sözlərin, məxluqatın və çoxlu prototiplərin yüksək qiymətini göstərir. Öyrənmək məsəli kimi birləşdirilmiş bir entitə istifadə edərək, bizim disambiguasyon metodumuzu və çoxlu prototipi benchmark veri qutusu ilə birləşdirilmək üçün istifadə edirik və sanat performansını başa çatdırırıq.', 'ca': "L'integració del text i del coneixement en un espai semàntic unificat ha atraït interessos significatius recentment. Tot i així, l'ambigüitat en l'espai comú encara és un repte, és a dir que la mateixa frase de menció normalment es refereix a diverses entitats. In this paper, to deal with the ambiguity of entity mentions, we propose a novel Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, which learns multiple sense embeddings for each mention by jointly modeling words from textual contexts and entities derived from a knowledge base.  A més, dissenyem un enfocament basat en un model lingüístic eficient per desambiguar cada menció en un sentit específic. En experiments, tant l'anàlisi qualitativa com quantitativa demostren la alta qualitat de les integracions de la paraula, de l'entitat i de múltiples prototips. Utilitzant l'entitat que vincula com un cas d'estudi, fem servir el nostre mètode de desambiguació, com també els embediments de mencions multiprototips al conjunt de dades de referència, i aconsegueixem un rendiment més avançat.", 'et': 'Teksti ja teadmiste integreerimine ühtsesse semantilisse ruumi on viimasel ajal äratanud märkimisväärseid teadushuvisid. Ühisruumi ebaselgus jääb siiski väljakutseks, nimelt see, et sama nimetusfraas viitab tavaliselt erinevatele üksustele. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse Multi-Prototype Mention Embeding mudeli, mis õpib iga mainimise jaoks mitut tähendust, modelleerides ühiselt tekstikontekstist pärit sõnu ja teadmistebaasist tuletatud olemeid. Lisaks töötame välja tõhusa keelemudelil põhineva lähenemisviisi, et eristada iga nimetus konkreetses tähenduses. Katsetes näitavad nii kvalitatiivsed kui ka kvantitatiivsed analüüsid sõna, olemuse ja mitme prototüüpi mainimise manustamise kõrget kvaliteeti. Kasutades üksuste linkimist uuringujuhtumina, rakendame nii oma selgitusmeetodit kui ka mitme prototüüpi mainimise manustamist võrdlusandmekogumile ning saavutame tipptasemel jõudluse.', 'cs': 'Integrace textu a znalostí do jednotného sémantického prostoru přitahuje v poslední době významné výzkumné zájmy. Nicméně nejednoznačnost ve společném prostoru zůstává výzvou, a to, že stejná zmínka obvykle odkazuje na různé entity. V tomto článku, abychom se zabývali nejednoznačností zmínek entit, navrhujeme nový Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, který se naučí více smyslových vložení pro každou zmínku společným modelováním slov z textových kontextů a entit odvozených ze znalostní báze. Kromě toho dále navrhujeme efektivní jazykový model založený na přístupu k rozjasnění každé zmínky do konkrétního smyslu. V experimentech jak kvalitativní, tak kvantitativní analýza demonstruje vysokou kvalitu vložení slova, entity a multiprototypových zmínek. Používáme entity linking jako studijní případ, aplikujeme naši diambiguační metodu i multi-prototypové vložení zmínek do benchmark datové sady a dosahujeme nejmodernějšího výkonu.', 'fi': 'Tekstin ja tiedon integrointi yhtenäiseen semanttiseen tilaan on viime aikoina herättänyt merkittäviä tutkimuskiinnostuksia. Yhteisen tilan epäselvyys on kuitenkin edelleen haaste, nimittäin se, että sama maininta viittaa yleensä erilaisiin kokonaisuuksiin. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding -mallia, joka oppii usean merkityksen upotuksia jokaiselle maininnalle mallintamalla yhdessä sanoja tekstikontekstista ja tietopohjasta johdetuista entiteeteistä. Lisäksi suunnittelemme tehokkaan kielimallipohjaisen lähestymistavan, jolla jokainen maininta voidaan erottaa tiettyyn merkitykseen. Kokeissa sekä kvalitatiivinen että kvantitatiivinen analyysi osoittavat sanan, kokonaisuuden ja moniprototyyppimaininnan upotusten korkean laadun. Hyödynnämme entiteettilinkitystä tutkimustapauksena ja sovellamme vertailuaineistoon sekä moniprototyyppimaininnan upotuksia ja saavutamme huipputason suorituskyvyn.', 'hy': 'Տեքստի և գիտելիքի ինտեգրումը միավորված սեմանտիկ տարածքում վերջերս մեծ հետազոտություններ է գրավել: Այնուամենայնիվ, ընդհանուր տարածության անորոշակիությունը շարունակում է մարտահրավեր ունենալ, այն է, որ նույն նշանակման արտահայտությունը սովորաբար վերաբերում է տարբեր կազմակերպություններին: Այս թղթի մեջ, որպեսզի վերաբերվենք էության անորոշակիությանը, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր բազմա-պրոտոտիպի մեջբերման մոդել, որը սովորում է բազմաթիվ զգայական ներգրավումներ յուրաքանչյուր մեջբերման համար միասին մոդելավորելով բառերը տեքստալ կոնտեքստներից և էություններից,  Ավելին, մենք նաև ձևավորում ենք արդյունավետ լեզվի մոդել, որպեսզի բացատրենք յուրաքանչյուր նշան որոշակի իմաստով: Փորձարկումների ընթացքում, որակային և քանակական վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս բառի, էության և բազմաթիվ նախատիպերի բարձր որակը նշում են ներդրումները: Օգտագործելով ուսումնասիրության դեպքում կապված առանձնահատկությունը, մենք կիրառում ենք մեր բացատրական մեթոդը, ինչպես նաև բազմատիպի մեթոդները, որոնք նշում են համեմատային տվյալների համակարգի ներդրումները, և հասնում ենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքների:', 'jv': 'text politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertive Nanging kuwi iki, nglanggar sampeyan nesaturan panganan akeh dumadhi kawit menyang, kita enyeste nyulah Multi-Prototype Mention embedding model, awak dhéwé ugat sans embedding dhéwé sampeyan gawe ngupakan langgar sampeyan luwih dumadhi winih dhéwé Nambah, kita lagi nggawe model sing luwih dumadhi kanggo nguasai tindang nggawe ngubah sapa nerimo sing nyimpen mruput. Nang ujaran, gayet kalitas karo akeh lan kantarno sampeyan ngono nggawe kalitas dhuwur kuwi nggambar, atit karo akeh prototipi tambah akeh basa gambar. Using Enty linking as a read Case, we use the dismbiguation method as and the multi-prototype reference embedding on the bench dataset, and success state-of-the-arts output.', 'ha': "Ka haɗa matsayin da ilmi zuwa wani filin na haɗi na semantic, yã attract masĩfi mai girma a yanzu. A lokacin da ke cikin filin da ɗabi'a, yana da wata musamma, kamar misãlan maganar ta misalin dukkan abubuwan. Ga wannan takardan, dõmin a yi bayani ga kalmar masu abun da aka sani, muna buƙata wani misali da aka shigar da mazaɓa masu motsi na littafin-Lokaci, wanda yana sanar da sauri masu buƙata masu ƙaranci da aka buƙata wa kowace, da kuma za'a samu-motsi maganar masu cikin matsayi da abubuwan da aka samu daga bane wani masani. Da wannan, Munã zafi wani misali mai fassara cikin harshen da ke da inganci dõmin ka rarraba kowane yanzu zuwa wani fassara na ƙayyade. Aka cikin jarrabai, ko da lissafi da gwargwadon, sun nuna girmar tsarin maganar, da gaskiyar da misãlai masu ƙari. Yi amfani da abun da ke haɗi da kamar wani kashi na lõkaci, muna amfani da metoden bambanci da misalin multi-sami da misalin masu ambaci da ke shiga kan danne-bangon-bangon, kuma za'a sami halin-halin-kunna.", 'he': 'השתלב של טקסט וידע לחלל סמנטי מאוחד משך עניינים משמעותיים במחקר לאחרונה. בכל אופן, השambiguity בחלל המשותף נשאר אתגר, כלומר שאותו ביטוי הזכרה בדרך כלל מתייחס לאנשים שונים. בעיתון הזה, כדי להתמודד עם השתבשות של היחידות מזכירות, אנו מציעים מודל חדש של זיכרונות רבות-פרוטוטוטיפים, שלמד תוספות חשיבה רבות לכל זיכרון על ידי דוגמנית משותפת מילים ממקשרים טקסטיים ויחידות שנוצאות מבסיס ידע. בנוסף, אנחנו מעצבים עוד גישה יעילה מבוססת על שפת כדי לבטל את כל הזכר לחוש מסוים. בניסויים, ניתוח איכותי וכוונטיבי מראה את איכות גבוהה של המילה, היחידה ומרבה-אבוטיפים מזכירים את התכניות. באמצעות היחידה שקשורה בתיק למחקר, אנו משתמשים בשיטת הפרעת הבטחה שלנו, כמו גם באמצעות הפרוטיפוסים המולטיפים הזכירו קישורים על קבוצת נתונים של רנטרל, ולהשיג ביצועים חדשים.', 'sk': 'Vključevanje besedila in znanja v enoten semantični prostor je v zadnjem času pritegnilo pomembne raziskovalne interese. Vendar pa dvoumnost v skupnem prostoru ostaja izziv, namreč, da se ista omembena fraza običajno nanaša na različne subjekte. V prispevku, da bi obravnavali dvoumnost omenjanja entitet, predlagamo nov model vgradnje večprototipov omenjanja, ki se uči več čutov za vsako omenjanje s skupnim modeliranjem besed iz besedilnih kontekstov in entitet, ki izhajajo iz baze znanja. Poleg tega nadaljujemo z oblikovanjem učinkovitega pristopa, ki temelji na jezikovnem modelu, da bi vsako omenitev razločili v določen pomen. V poskusih kvalitativna in kvantitativna analiza dokazuje visoko kakovost vgradnje besede, entitete in večprototipov omenjanja. Z uporabo entitetnega povezovanja kot študijskega primera uporabljamo metodo razločitve in vgradnje večprototipov omenjanja na referenčni nabor podatkov ter dosegamo najsodobnejšo uspešnost.', 'bo': 'འཕྲིན་དོན་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་སྦྱར་བའི་བར་སྟོང་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ལ་ཁག་ ཡིན་ནའང་དབང་གི་བར་སྟོང་ནང་གི་མི་མཐུན་དགོས་པ་དེ་ལས་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་ན་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ཚོས་གཞི་ In this paper, to deal with the ambiguity of entity mentions, we propose a novel Multi-Prototype Mention Embedding model, which learns multiple sense embeddings for each mention by jointly modeling words from textual contexts and entities derived from a knowledge base. The novel is from a knowledge base. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྨན་པས། In experiments, both qualitative and quantitative analysis demonstrate the high quality of the word, entity and multi-prototype mention embeddings. Using entity linking as a study case, we apply our disambiguation method as well as the multi-prototype mention embeddings on the benchmark dataset, and achieve state-of-the-art performance.'}
{'en': 'Interactive Learning of Grounded Verb Semantics towards Human-Robot Communication', 'ar': 'التعلم التفاعلي لدلالات الأفعال المتأصلة نحو التواصل بين الإنسان والروبوت', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Interativa da Semântica de Verbos Fundamentados para a Comunicação Humano-Robô', 'es': 'Aprendizaje interactivo de semántica de verbos fundamentados hacia la comunicación humano-robot', 'fr': 'Apprentissage interactif de la sémantique verbale ancrée pour la communication homme-robot', 'ja': '人間とロボットのコミュニケーションに向けた接地動詞セマンティクスのインタラクティブな学習', 'hi': 'मानव-रोबोट संचार की ओर ग्राउंडेड क्रिया शब्दार्थ का इंटरैक्टिव सीखना', 'zh': '向人机交流接地动词语义互动学', 'ru': 'Интерактивное обучение основанной на глаголе семантике коммуникации между человеком и роботом', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Idirghníomhach ar Shéimeantaic Briathar Bunáite i dtreo na Cumarsáide Daonna-Róbait', 'ka': 'ინტერპაქტიური სწავლება სამყარო გერბის სმენტიკების შესახებ ადამიანის-პრობოტის კომუნიკაციაზე', 'el': 'Διαδραστική μάθηση της θεμελιωμένης σημειακής ρήματος προς την επικοινωνία ανθρώπου-ρομπότ', 'hu': 'A földi igék szemantikájának interaktív tanulása az ember-robot kommunikáció felé', 'it': 'Apprendimento interattivo della semantica verbale a terra verso la comunicazione uomo-robot', 'mk': 'Интерактивно учење на основаните семантични реченици кон комуникацијата човек-робот', 'lt': 'Interaktinis pagrįstų žodžių Semantijų mokymas žmogaus ir robotų komunikacijai', 'kk': 'Адам-робот коммуникациясына қатынау үшін зерттеулердің семантикалық үйрену', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Interaktif Semantik Verb Tertanah menuju Komunikasi Manusia-Robot', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Interattiv ta’ Semantiċi ta’ Verbi Grounded lejn Komunikazzjoni bejn il-Bniedem u r-Roboti', 'mn': 'Хүн-Роботын холбоотой холбоотой хамтын талаар суралцах', 'no': 'Interaktiv læring av grunnleggjande verbsemantikk mot menneske-robot-kommunikasjon', 'ml': 'ഭൂമിയിലുള്ള വെര്\u200dബ് സെമാന്റിക്സിന്റെ ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റീവ് പഠിപ്പിക്കുക', 'pl': 'Interaktywne uczenie się uziemionej semantyki czasowników w kierunku komunikacji człowiek-robot', 'ro': 'Învățarea interactivă a semanticii verbale împământate către comunicarea om-robot', 'sr': 'Interaktivno učenje semantika zemaljskih verba prema komunikaciji ljudskih robota', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු රොබෝට් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සඳහා ග්\u200dරූන්ඩ් වර්බ් සිමාන්ති', 'so': 'Interactive Learning of Grounded Verb Semantics towards Human-Robot Communication', 'sv': 'Interaktivt lärande av Grounded Verb Semantics mot människa-robot kommunikation', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'انسان-روبوت کی تعلیمات کے لئے گرونڈ ورب سیمانٹیکس کی تعلیم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tương tác học kết cấu hình hài theo giao thức người-robot', 'nl': 'Interactief leren van gegronde werkwoorden semantica naar mens-robot communicatie', 'bg': 'Интерактивно изучаване на земната глаголна семантика към комуникацията човек-робот', 'hr': 'Interaktivno učenje semantika zemaljskih verba prema komunikaciji ljudskih robota', 'da': 'Interaktiv læring af Grounded Verb Semantics mod Human-Robot Communication', 'ko': '인간과 기계의 상호작용을 위한 근식 동사의 의미 상호작용 학습', 'de': 'Interaktives Lernen von Grounded Verb Semantics in Richtung Mensch-Roboter Kommunikation', 'fa': 'یادگیری Interactive of Grounded Verb Semantics towards Human-Robot Communication', 'id': 'Mempelajari Interaktif Semantik Verb Berdasarkan Kepada Komunikasi Manusia-Robot', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya Mawasiliano ya Binadamu', 'af': 'Interaktiewe Leer van Grounded Verb Semantics teenoor Human-Robot Kommunikasie', 'tr': 'İnsan-Robot İletişimi üzerinde Grounded Verb Semantics öğrenme', 'sq': 'Mësimi interaktiv i Semantive të Fjalës së Përfunduar drejt Komunikimit Njeriu-Robot', 'am': 'የተመሳሳይ Verb Semantics ወደ ሰው-Robot Communication', 'az': 'ńįnsan-Robot Kommunikasyonu t…ôr…ôfind…ôn √Ėyr…ônm…ôk', 'hy': 'Մարդ-ռոբոտ հաղորդակցման ուղղությամբ հիմնված բառերի ինտերակտիվ սովորելը', 'bn': 'মানব-রোবট যোগাযোগের দিকে গ্রেট ভার্ব সেমান্টিক শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'Aprendiment interactiu de Semàtics de Verbs Fundamentals cap a la Comunicació Humana-Robota', 'cs': 'Interaktivní učení uzemněné slovesémantiky k komunikaci člověk-robot', 'bs': 'Interaktivno učenje semantika zemaljskih verba prema komunikaciji ljudskih robota', 'et': 'Põhisõnalise semantika interaktiivne õppimine inimese-roboti kommunikatsiooni suunas', 'fi': 'Vuorovaikutteinen oppiminen pohjasanasemantiikasta kohti ihmisen ja robotin kommunikaatiota', 'jv': 'interactive Learning of Gruundd Verb semanti c to Human-Jobot komunication', 'he': 'למידה אינטראקטיבית של סמנטיקת מילים מקורקעות לכיוון תקשורת רובוטים-אנושיים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Interaktivno učenje temeljene glagolne semantike v smeri komunikacije med človekom in robotom', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་བ་དང་ཆེན་པོ་སྤྲེལ་བའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐད་ནས་'}
{'en': 'To enable human-robot communication and collaboration, previous works represent grounded verb semantics as the potential change of state to the physical world caused by these verbs. Grounded verb semantics are acquired mainly based on the parallel data of the use of a verb phrase and its corresponding sequences of primitive actions demonstrated by humans. The rich interaction between teachers and students that is considered important in learning new skills has not yet been explored. To address this limitation, this paper presents a new interactive learning approach that allows robots to proactively engage in interaction with human partners by asking good questions to learn models for grounded verb semantics. The proposed approach uses reinforcement learning to allow the robot to acquire an optimal policy for its question-asking behaviors by maximizing the long-term reward. Our empirical results have shown that the interactive learning approach leads to more reliable models for grounded verb semantics, especially in the noisy environment which is full of uncertainties. Compared to previous work, the models acquired from interactive learning result in a 48 % to 145 % performance gain when applied in new situations.', 'ar': 'لتمكين التواصل والتعاون بين الإنسان الآلي ، تمثل الأعمال السابقة دلالات الأفعال المتأصلة كتغيير محتمل للحالة إلى العالم المادي الناجم عن هذه الأفعال. يتم الحصول على دلالات الفعل المؤرضة بناءً على البيانات المتوازية لاستخدام عبارة فعل وتسلسلها المقابل للأفعال البدائية التي أظهرها البشر. التفاعل الثري بين المعلمين والطلاب والذي يعتبر مهمًا في تعلم مهارات جديدة لم يتم استكشافه بعد. لمعالجة هذا القيد ، تقدم هذه الورقة نهجًا تعليميًا تفاعليًا جديدًا يسمح للروبوتات بالمشاركة بشكل استباقي في التفاعل مع الشركاء البشريين من خلال طرح أسئلة جيدة لتعلم نماذج لدلالات الأفعال المتأصلة. يستخدم النهج المقترح التعلم المعزز للسماح للإنسان الآلي باكتساب السياسة المثلى لسلوكيات طرح الأسئلة من خلال تعظيم المكافأة طويلة الأجل. أظهرت نتائجنا التجريبية أن نهج التعلم التفاعلي يؤدي إلى نماذج أكثر موثوقية لدلالات الأفعال المتأصلة ، خاصة في البيئة الصاخبة المليئة بالشكوك. مقارنة بالعمل السابق ، تؤدي النماذج المكتسبة من التعلم التفاعلي إلى زيادة في الأداء بنسبة 48٪ إلى 145٪ عند تطبيقها في مواقف جديدة.', 'es': 'Para permitir la comunicación y colaboración entre humanos y robots, trabajos anteriores representan la semántica de verbos fundamentados como el cambio potencial de estado del mundo físico causado por estos verbos. La semántica de verbos fundamentados se adquiere principalmente en base a los datos paralelos del uso de una frase verbal y sus secuencias correspondientes de acciones primitivas demostradas por los humanos. Aún no se ha explorado la rica interacción entre profesores y estudiantes que se considera importante para aprender nuevas habilidades. Para abordar esta limitación, este artículo presenta un nuevo enfoque de aprendizaje interactivo que permite a los robots interactuar proactivamente con sus compañeros humanos haciendo buenas preguntas para aprender modelos de semántica verbal fundamentada. El enfoque propuesto utiliza el aprendizaje por refuerzo para permitir que el robot adquiera una política óptima para sus comportamientos de formulación de preguntas al maximizar la recompensa a largo plazo. Nuestros resultados empíricos han demostrado que el enfoque de aprendizaje interactivo conduce a modelos más confiables para una semántica verbal fundamentada, especialmente en el entorno ruidoso que está lleno de incertidumbres. En comparación con trabajos anteriores, los modelos adquiridos del aprendizaje interactivo dan como resultado un aumento del rendimiento del 48 al 145% cuando se aplican en situaciones nuevas.', 'fr': "Pour permettre la communication et la collaboration homme-robot, les travaux précédents représentent la sémantique des verbes ancrée comme le changement potentiel d'état du monde physique causé par ces verbes. La sémantique verbale fondée est acquise principalement sur la base des données parallèles de l'utilisation d'une phrase verbale et de ses séquences correspondantes d'actions primitives démontrées par les humains. La riche interaction entre les enseignants et les élèves, considérée comme importante pour l'apprentissage de nouvelles compétences, n'a pas encore été explorée. Pour remédier à cette limitation, cet article présente une nouvelle approche d'apprentissage interactif qui permet aux robots d'interagir de manière proactive avec des partenaires humains en posant de bonnes questions pour apprendre des modèles de sémantique verbale fondée. L'approche proposée utilise l'apprentissage par renforcement pour permettre au robot d'acquérir une politique optimale pour ses comportements de pose de questions en maximisant la récompense à long terme. Nos résultats empiriques ont montré que l'approche d'apprentissage interactif conduit à des modèles plus fiables pour la sémantique verbale fondée, en particulier dans un environnement bruyant et plein d'incertitudes. Par rapport aux travaux précédents, les modèles acquis grâce à l'apprentissage interactif permettent un gain de performance de 48\xa0% à 145\xa0% lorsqu'ils sont appliqués dans de nouvelles situations.", 'pt': 'Para permitir a comunicação e a colaboração humano-robô, trabalhos anteriores representam a semântica verbal fundamentada como a possível mudança de estado para o mundo físico causada por esses verbos. A semântica verbal fundamentada é adquirida principalmente com base nos dados paralelos do uso de uma frase verbal e suas sequências correspondentes de ações primitivas demonstradas por humanos. A rica interação entre professores e alunos, considerada importante no aprendizado de novas habilidades, ainda não foi explorada. Para resolver essa limitação, este artigo apresenta uma nova abordagem de aprendizado interativo que permite que os robôs se envolvam proativamente na interação com parceiros humanos, fazendo boas perguntas para aprender modelos de semântica verbal fundamentada. A abordagem proposta usa aprendizado por reforço para permitir que o robô adquira uma política ótima para seus comportamentos de perguntas, maximizando a recompensa de longo prazo. Nossos resultados empíricos mostraram que a abordagem de aprendizagem interativa leva a modelos mais confiáveis para a semântica verbal fundamentada, especialmente no ambiente ruidoso que é cheio de incertezas. Em comparação com trabalhos anteriores, os modelos adquiridos a partir do aprendizado interativo resultam em um ganho de desempenho de 48% a 145% quando aplicados em novas situações.', 'ja': '人間とロボットのコミュニケーションとコラボレーションを可能にするために、以前の作品は、これらの動詞によって引き起こされる物理的な世界への状態の潜在的な変化として、接地された動詞の意味を表しています。 基礎動詞の意味論は、主に動詞句の使用の並列データと、それに対応する人間によって実証された原始的なアクションのシーケンスに基づいて取得される。 新しいスキルを学ぶ上で重要であると考えられている教師と生徒の豊かな相互作用は、まだ探求されていない。 この制限に対処するために、本論文では、ロボットが人間のパートナーと積極的に相互作用することを可能にする新しい対話型学習アプローチを提示します。これは、接地動詞の意味論のモデルを学習するために良い質問をすることによってです。 提案されたアプローチは、強化学習を使用して、長期的な報酬を最大化することによって、ロボットが質問行動に最適なポリシーを取得できるようにします。 私たちの経験的結果は、対話型学習アプローチが、特に不確実性に満ちた騒々しい環境で、接地動詞意味論のためのより信頼性の高いモデルにつながることを示しています。 前作と比較して、インタラクティブラーニングから得られたモデルは、新しい状況に適用すると48 ％から145 ％のパフォーマンス向上をもたらします。', 'zh': '为人机之流协,而根动词语义为之变化动词。 接地动词语义要在动词短语用并行数及人类展示原始动作之应。 师徒富赡互动以为新技能重于学,而未得探索。 为此限者,立一新交互式学术,许机器人以善问学动词语义,与人交相交错。 所立法用强化学,使机器人得以最大化长奖致其至策。 吾证结果表明,交互式学为根动词语义更可凭依,特在充不确定性嘈杂中。 比之前事,于交互式学得模形于新,性增48%至145%。', 'hi': 'मानव-रोबोट संचार और सहयोग को सक्षम करने के लिए, पिछले कार्य इन क्रियाओं के कारण भौतिक दुनिया में राज्य के संभावित परिवर्तन के रूप में ग्राउंडेड क्रिया शब्दार्थ का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं। ग्राउंडेड क्रिया शब्दार्थ मुख्य रूप से एक क्रिया वाक्यांश के उपयोग के समानांतर डेटा और मनुष्यों द्वारा प्रदर्शित आदिम कार्यों के इसके संबंधित अनुक्रमों के आधार पर प्राप्त किए जाते हैं। शिक्षकों और छात्रों के बीच समृद्ध बातचीत जो नए कौशल सीखने में महत्वपूर्ण मानी जाती है, अभी तक पता नहीं लगाया गया है। इस सीमा को संबोधित करने के लिए, यह पेपर एक नया इंटरैक्टिव सीखने का दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है जो रोबोटों को ग्राउंडेड क्रिया शब्दार्थ के लिए मॉडल सीखने के लिए अच्छे प्रश्न पूछकर मानव भागीदारों के साथ सक्रिय रूप से बातचीत करने की अनुमति देता है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण सुदृढीकरण सीखने का उपयोग करता है ताकि रोबोट को दीर्घकालिक इनाम को अधिकतम करके अपने प्रश्न-पूछने वाले व्यवहारों के लिए एक इष्टतम नीति प्राप्त करने की अनुमति मिल सके। हमारे अनुभवजन्य परिणामों से पता चला है कि इंटरैक्टिव सीखने का दृष्टिकोण ग्राउंडेड क्रिया शब्दार्थ के लिए अधिक विश्वसनीय मॉडल की ओर जाता है, विशेष रूप से शोर वातावरण में जो अनिश्चितताओं से भरा है। पिछले काम की तुलना में, इंटरैक्टिव सीखने से प्राप्त मॉडल के परिणामस्वरूप नई स्थितियों में लागू होने पर 48% से 145% प्रदर्शन लाभ होता है।', 'ru': 'Чтобы обеспечить связь и сотрудничество между человеком и роботом, предыдущие работы представляют обоснованную семантику глагола как потенциальное изменение состояния физического мира, вызванное этими глаголами. Заземленная семантика глагола приобретается в основном на основе параллельных данных использования глагольной фразы и соответствующих ей последовательностей примитивных действий, продемонстрированных людьми. Богатое взаимодействие между преподавателями и учащимися, которое считается важным для освоения новых навыков, еще не изучено. Чтобы устранить это ограничение, в этой статье представлен новый интерактивный подход к обучению, который позволяет роботам активно взаимодействовать с партнерами-человеками, задавая хорошие вопросы, чтобы узнать модели для обоснованной семантики глаголов. Предлагаемый подход использует обучение подкреплению, чтобы позволить роботу приобрести оптимальную политику для своего поведения, задающего вопросы, путем максимизации долгосрочного вознаграждения. Наши эмпирические результаты показали, что интерактивный подход к обучению приводит к более надежным моделям для обоснованной семантики глаголов, особенно в шумной среде, полной неопределенностей. По сравнению с предыдущей работой, модели, полученные из интерактивного обучения, приводят к повышению производительности на 48-145% при применении в новых ситуациях.', 'ga': 'Chun cumarsáid agus comhoibriú idir an duine agus an duine a chumasú, léiríonn saothair roimhe seo semantics briathar bunaithe mar an t-athrú staide féideartha go dtí an domhan fisiceach de bharr na mbriathra seo. Faightear séimeantaic briathar bunaithe go príomha bunaithe ar shonraí comhthreomhara úsáid frása briathartha agus na seichimh chomhfhreagracha de ghníomhartha primitive a léiríonn daoine. Níl iniúchadh déanta go fóill ar an idirghníomhaíocht shaibhir idir múinteoirí agus scoláirí a mheastar a bheith tábhachtach maidir le scileanna nua a fhoghlaim. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an teorannú seo, cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige foghlama idirghníomhach nua i láthair a ligeann do róbait dul i mbun idirghníomhaíochta go réamhghníomhach le comhpháirtithe daonna trí cheisteanna maithe a chur chun samhlacha a fhoghlaim do shéimeantaic briathar bunaithe. Úsáideann an cur chuige atá beartaithe foghlaim atreisithe chun ligean don róbat beartas optamach a fháil dá iompraíochtaí ceistiúcháin tríd an luach saothair fadtéarmach a uasmhéadú. Tá sé léirithe ag ár dtorthaí eimpíreacha go n-eascraíonn an cur chuige foghlama idirghníomhach múnlaí níos iontaofa do shéimeantaic na mbriathra bunaithe, go háirithe sa timpeallacht fhuaimneach atá lán d’éiginnteachtaí. I gcomparáid le hobair roimhe seo, tá gnóthachan feidhmíochta 48% go 145% nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad i gcásanna nua mar thoradh ar na samhlacha a fhaightear ón bhfoghlaim idirghníomhach.', 'el': 'Για να καταστεί δυνατή η επικοινωνία και συνεργασία ανθρώπου-ρομπότ, προηγούμενα έργα αντιπροσωπεύουν τη θεμελιωμένη σημασιολογία των ρήμων ως την πιθανή αλλαγή της κατάστασης στον φυσικό κόσμο που προκαλείται από αυτά τα ρήματα. Η θεμελιωμένη σημασιολογία των ρήμων αποκτάται κυρίως με βάση τα παράλληλα δεδομένα της χρήσης μιας φράσης ρήματος και τις αντίστοιχες ακολουθίες πρωτόγονων ενεργειών που αποδεικνύονται από τους ανθρώπους. Η πλούσια αλληλεπίδραση μεταξύ εκπαιδευτικών και μαθητών που θεωρείται σημαντική για την εκμάθηση νέων δεξιοτήτων δεν έχει ακόμη διερευνηθεί. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτός ο περιορισμός, η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα διαδραστική προσέγγιση μάθησης που επιτρέπει στα ρομπότ να εμπλέκονται ενεργά σε αλληλεπίδραση με τους ανθρώπινους εταίρους θέτοντας καλές ερωτήσεις για να μάθουν μοντέλα για τη θεμελιωμένη σημασιολογία των ρήμων. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση χρησιμοποιεί τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης για να επιτρέψει στο ρομπότ να αποκτήσει μια βέλτιστη πολιτική για τις ερωτικές συμπεριφορές του μεγιστοποιώντας τη μακροπρόθεσμη ανταμοιβή. Τα εμπειρικά μας αποτελέσματα έχουν δείξει ότι η διαδραστική προσέγγιση μάθησης οδηγεί σε πιο αξιόπιστα μοντέλα για τη θεμελιωμένη σημασιολογία των ρήμων, ειδικά στο θορυβώδες περιβάλλον που είναι γεμάτο αβεβαιότητες. Σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες εργασίες, τα μοντέλα που αποκτήθηκαν από τη διαδραστική μάθηση έχουν ως αποτέλεσμα 48% έως 145% κέρδος απόδοσης όταν εφαρμόζονται σε νέες καταστάσεις.', 'hu': 'Az ember-robot kommunikáció és együttműködés lehetővé tétele érdekében az előző munkák a megalapozott igék szemantikáját képviselik, mint a fizikai világ állapotváltozását, amelyet ezek az igék okoznak. A földi igék szemantikáját elsősorban az igék használatának párhuzamos adatai és annak megfelelő primitív cselekvési sorozatai alapján szerezzük meg. Az új készségek elsajátításában fontosnak tartott tanárok és diákok közötti gazdag interakciót még nem vizsgálták fel. Ennek a korlátozásnak a kezelése érdekében ez a tanulmány egy új interaktív tanulási megközelítést mutat be, amely lehetővé teszi a robotok számára, hogy proaktívan vegyenek részt az emberi partnerekkel való interakcióban azáltal, hogy jó kérdéseket tesznek fel, hogy megtanulják az alapozott igék szemantikájának modelljeit. A javasolt megközelítés a megerősítő tanulást használja, hogy lehetővé tegye a robot számára, hogy optimális politikát szerezzen a kérdésekkel kapcsolatos viselkedéséhez a hosszú távú jutalom maximalizálásával. empirikus eredményeink azt mutatták, hogy az interaktív tanulási megközelítés megbízhatóbb modelleket eredményez a megalapozott igék szemantikájára, különösen a bizonytalanságokkal teli zajos környezetben. A korábbi munkákhoz képest az interaktív tanulásból származó modellek 48-145%-os teljesítménynövekedést eredményeznek új helyzetekben történő alkalmazáskor.', 'ka': 'რომ ადამიანის-პრობოტის კომუნიკაცია და დამუშაობა შესაძლებელად, წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო სემონტიკები იყოს, როგორც პოცენტური ცვლილება სამყარ გერბის სიმენტიკები იქნება, რომლებიც ადამიანების გამოყენების პარალვლური მონაცემების დაბაზედ და მისი კომპორციენტური მონაცემების პრიმიტიური მოქმედების შემდეგ. მასწავლებელი და სტუდენტების შორის ბედნიერი ინტერაქცია, რომელიც ახალი სტუდენტების სწავლებაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ დრომის შესახებ, ეს დოკუმენტი ახალი ინტერაქტიური სწავლების მიღება, რომელიც პრობოტები უნდა პროექტიურად ინტერაქციაციას ადამიანის პონტერნეტებით დაკავშირებული კითხვების შესახე პრობოტის პროლიტის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც პრობოტის უფრო სწავლებელების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც პროლიტის მოძლებელია, რომ მისი კითხვის მოქმედებისთვის ოპტიმალური პროლიტი ჩვენი ემპერიკალური წარმოდგენები გაჩვენეთ, რომ ინტერაქტიური სწავლების მიღწევა უფრო დარწმუნებელი მოდელეებისთვის, სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ წინა სამუშაო მუშაოდ მოდელები, რომლებიც ინტერაქტიური სწავლებისგან მიღებული მოდელები 48%-დან 145%-დან გამოიყენება, როდესაც ახალი სიტაციაში მომხმა', 'it': "Per consentire la comunicazione e la collaborazione uomo-robot, i lavori precedenti rappresentano la semantica verbale fondata come il potenziale cambiamento di stato nel mondo fisico causato da questi verbi. La semantica dei verbi a terra è acquisita principalmente sulla base dei dati paralleli dell'uso di una frase verbale e delle relative sequenze corrispondenti di azioni primitive dimostrate dagli esseri umani. La ricca interazione tra insegnanti e studenti, considerata importante nell'apprendimento di nuove competenze, non è ancora stata esplorata. Per affrontare questa limitazione, questo articolo presenta un nuovo approccio di apprendimento interattivo che consente ai robot di impegnarsi proattivamente nell'interazione con i partner umani ponendo buone domande per imparare modelli di semantica verbale fondata. L'approccio proposto utilizza l'apprendimento di rinforzo per consentire al robot di acquisire una politica ottimale per i suoi comportamenti di domanda massimizzando la ricompensa a lungo termine. I nostri risultati empirici hanno dimostrato che l'approccio di apprendimento interattivo porta a modelli più affidabili per la semantica verbale fondata, soprattutto in un ambiente rumoroso e pieno di incertezze. Rispetto ai lavori precedenti, i modelli acquisiti dall'apprendimento interattivo comportano un guadagno di performance dal 48% al 145% se applicati in nuove situazioni.", 'kk': 'Адам-роботтардың коммуникациясын және біріктірімін рұқсат ету үшін, алдыңғы жұмыстар бұл верботтар үшін физикалық әлемдегі күйін өзгерту мүмкіндігі ретінде негізгі вербатт Төменгі вербалдық семантикалық деректері, негізінде, вербалдық фразаның пайдалануының параллелі деректеріне негізделген және адамдар көрсетілген приниматтық әрекеттерінің қасиеттері. Жаңа жәндіктерді оқыту үшін мұғалім мен студенттер арасындағы баяны әрқашамдық қатынасы табылмады. Бұл шектеулерді шектеу үшін, бұл қағаз жаңа интерактивті оқыту әдісін көрсетеді. Бұл роботтарды адамдардың партнерлерімен қатынас арқылы өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл қағаз негізгі вербалд Келтірілген тәртібі, роботты сұрақ сұрақ тәртібінің оптималдық саясаттарын көтеру үшін қолданады. Біздің империялық нәтижелеріміз интерактивті оқыту тәсілі негізгі вербалдық семантикалық үлгілеріне көмектесетін үлгілерді көрсетуге болады, өзгертілген, қауіпсіздіктердің толығы Алдыңғы жұмыстың салыстырылығында, интерактивті оқыту үлгілері жаңа жағдайда қолданғанда 48% мен 145% жылдамдығын жетілдіреді.', 'mk': 'За да се овозможи комуникација и соработка помеѓу луѓето и роботите, претходните дела претставуваат основана семантика на јазици како потенцијална промена на државата во физичкиот свет предизвикана од овие јазици. Основаната семантика на декларации се добива главно врз основа на паралелните податоци за употребата на декларација на декларации и нејзините соодветни секвенции на примитивни акции демонстрирани од луѓето. Богатата интеракција помеѓу учителите и студентите која се смета за важна за учење нови вештини сé уште не е истражена. За да се реши ова ограничување, овој документ претставува нов интерактивен пристап на учење кој им овозможува на роботите проактивно да се вклучат во интеракција со човечките партнери со поставување добри прашања за учење модели за основана семантика на гласни зборови. The proposed approach uses reinforcement learning to allow the robot to acquire an optimal policy for its question-asking behaviors by maximizing the long-term reward.  Нашите емпирички резултати покажаа дека интерактивниот пристап на учење води до подоверливи модели за основана семантика на гласници, особено во шумната средина која е полна со несигурности. Во споредба со претходната работа, моделите добиени од интерактивното учење резултираат со 48 до 145 отсто зголемување на резултатите кога се применуваат во нови ситуации.', 'lt': 'To enable human-robot communication and collaboration, previous works represent grounded verb semantics as the potential change of state to the physical world caused by these verbs.  Pagrindinė žodžių semantika įgyjama daugiausia remiantis lygiagrečiais duomenimis apie žodžių frazės naudojimą ir atitinkamomis žmogaus primityvių veiksmų sekomis. Didelė mokytojų ir studentų sąveika, kuri laikoma svarbia mokymosi naujais įgūdžiais srityje, dar neištirta. Siekiant išspręsti šį apribojimą, šiame dokumente pateikiamas naujas interaktyvus mokymosi metodas, leidžiantis robotams aktyviai bendrauti su žmogaus partneriais užduodant gerus klausimus, kaip mokytis modelių pagrįstoms žodžių semantikoms. Siūlomu metodu remiamasi stiprinamuoju mokymusi, kad robotas galėtų įgyti optimalią savo klausimų keliančių elgsenų politiką maksimaliai padidindamas ilgalaikį atlyginimą. Mūsų empiriniai rezultatai parodė, kad interaktyvaus mokymosi metodas sukuria patikimesnius pagrindų žodžių semantikos modelius, ypač triukšmingoje aplinkoje, kurioje yra daug neapibrėžtumų. Palyginti su ankstesniu darbu, interaktyvinio mokymosi modeliai, kai jie taikomi naujose situacijose, siekia 48–145 proc. veiklos rezultatų.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യറോബോട്ടിന്റെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്താനും സഹകരിക്കാനും പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കാനും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന വെര്\u200dബ്  ഭൂമിയിലുള്ള വെര്\u200dബ് സെമാന്റിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വാര്\u200dബ് വാക്കിന്റെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പാരാളില്\u200d ഡാ പുതിയ കഴിവുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടീച്ചരും വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളും തമ്മിലുള്ള സമ്പന്നരുടെ ഇടയ ഈ പരിധിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറിന് ഒരു പുതിയ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രായം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് റോബോട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നീണ്ട നേരത്തെ പ്രതിഫലം കൂടുതലാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d റോബോട്ടിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാ നമ്മുടെ ആശ്വാസഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്റ്റീവ് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ നടപടികള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തനായ മോഡല മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും താല്\u200dക്കാലത്ത് പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റീവ് പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല', 'mt': 'Sabiex tkun tista’ ssir komunikazzjoni u kollaborazzjoni bejn il-bniedem u r-robot, xogħlijiet preċedenti jirrappreżentaw semantika tal-verb ibbażata bħala l-bidla potenzjali fl-istat fid-dinja fiżika kkawżata minn dawn il-verbs. Is-semantika tal-verb ibbażata fuq il-bażi bażi prinċipalment tad-dejta parallel a tal-użu ta’ frażi tal-verb u s-sekwenzi korrispondenti tagħha ta’ azzjonijiet primitivi murija mill-bniedem. L-interazzjoni rikka bejn l-għalliema u l-istudenti li hija kkunsidrata importanti fit-tagħlim ta’ ħiliet ġodda għadha ma ġietx esplorata. To address this limitation, this paper presents a new interactive learning approach that allows robots to proactively engage in interaction with human partners by asking good questions to learn models for grounded verb semantics.  L-approċċ propost juża tagħlim rinfurzat biex jippermetti lir-robot jikseb politika ottimali għall-imġibiet tiegħu li jagħmel mistoqsijiet billi jimmassimizza l-premju fit-tul. Ir-riżultati empiriċi tagħna wrew li l-approċċ tat-tagħlim interattiv iwassal għal mudelli aktar affidabbli għas-semantika tal-verbi bbażati, speċjalment fl-ambjent storbjuż li huwa mimli b’in ċertezzi. Meta mqabbel max-xogħol preċedenti, il-mudelli miksuba mit-tagħlim interattiv jirriżultaw f’żieda fil-prestazzjoni ta’ 48 % sa 145 % meta applikati f’sitwazzjonijiet ġodda.', 'ms': 'Untuk memungkinkan komunikasi dan kerjasama manusia-robot, kerja-kerja terdahulu mewakili semantik verb berdasarkan sebagai perubahan potensi keadaan ke dunia fizik disebabkan oleh verb-verb ini. Semantik verb berdasarkan data selari penggunaan frasa verb dan urutan yang sepadan dengan tindakan primitif yang dipaparkan oleh manusia. Interaksi kaya antara guru dan pelajar yang dianggap penting dalam belajar kemahiran baru belum dikenaluri. Untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan belajar interaktif baru yang membolehkan robot proaktif terlibat dalam interaksi dengan rakan-rakan manusia dengan menanyakan soalan yang baik untuk belajar model untuk semantik verb berdasar. pendekatan yang direncanakan menggunakan pembelajaran kuasa untuk membolehkan robot mendapatkan kebijakan optimal untuk perilaku bertanya soalan dengan maksimumkan hadiah jangka panjang. Hasil empirik kami telah menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan belajar interaktif membawa kepada model yang lebih dipercayai untuk semantik verb berdasarkan dasar, terutama dalam persekitaran bunyi yang penuh dengan ketidakpastian. Berbanding dengan kerja sebelumnya, model yang diperoleh dari pembelajaran interaktif mengakibatkan pendapatan prestasi 48% hingga 145% bila dilaksanakan dalam situasi baru.', 'pl': 'Aby umożliwić komunikację i współpracę człowieka-robota, poprzednie prace reprezentują uziemioną semantykę czasownika jako potencjalną zmianę stanu do świata fizycznego spowodowaną przez te czasowniki. Ugruntowana semantyka czasownika nabywana jest głównie na podstawie równoległych danych dotyczących użycia frazy czasownika i odpowiadających mu sekwencji prymitywnych działań demonstrowanych przez ludzi. Nie zbadano jeszcze bogatej interakcji między nauczycielami a uczniami, która jest uważana za ważną dla nauki nowych umiejętności. Aby rozwiązać to ograniczenie, niniejszy artykuł przedstawia nowe interaktywne podejście do uczenia się, które pozwala robotom aktywnie angażować się w interakcję z ludzkimi partnerami poprzez zadawanie dobrych pytań w celu nauki modeli uziemionej semantyki czasowników. Proponowane podejście wykorzystuje uczenie wzmacniające, aby umożliwić robotowi uzyskanie optymalnej polityki dla zachowań zadawania pytań poprzez maksymalizację długoterminowej nagrody. Nasze wyniki empiryczne pokazały, że interaktywne podejście do uczenia się prowadzi do bardziej wiarygodnych modeli uziemionej semantyki czasowników, zwłaszcza w hałaśliwym środowisku pełnym niepewności. W porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami modele nabyte z interaktywnego uczenia się skutkują wzrostem wydajności od 48% do 145% w nowych sytuacjach.', 'ro': 'Pentru a permite comunicarea și colaborarea om-robot, lucrările anterioare reprezintă semantica verbală bazată ca potențială schimbare de stare în lumea fizică cauzată de aceste verbe. Sematica verbelor la sol este dobândită în principal pe baza datelor paralele privind utilizarea unei fraze verbale și a secvențelor sale corespunzătoare de acțiuni primitive demonstrate de oameni. Interacțiunea bogată dintre profesori și elevi, considerată importantă în învățarea noilor competențe, nu a fost încă explorată. Pentru a aborda această limită, această lucrare prezintă o nouă abordare interactivă de învățare care permite roboților să se angajeze proactiv în interacțiunea cu partenerii umani, punând întrebări bune pentru a învăța modele de semantică verbală bazată. Abordarea propusă utilizează învățarea de consolidare pentru a permite robotului să dobândească o politică optimă pentru comportamentele sale de întrebare prin maximizarea recompensei pe termen lung. Rezultatele noastre empirice au arătat că abordarea interactivă de învățare duce la modele mai fiabile pentru semantica verbală bazată, în special în mediul zgomotos, plin de incertitudini. Comparativ cu lucrările anterioare, modelele dobândite în urma învățării interactive au ca rezultat un câștig de performanță de 48% până la 145% atunci când sunt aplicate în situații noi.', 'mn': 'Хүн-роботын харилцаа болон хамтран ажиллах боломжтой болгоход өмнөх үйл ажиллагаа эдгээр үгсийн шалтгааныг бие ертөнцийн хувьд байх боломжтой өөрчлөлт гэж үздэг. Хүмүүсийн харуулсан анхны үйл ажиллагааны дарааллыг харуулж буй үгийн хэлний хэрэглээний параллел өгөгдлийн тухай ихэвчлэн үндэслэгддэг. Багш нар болон оюутнуудын хоорондох баян харилцаа шинэ чадварыг суралцахдаа чухал гэж үздэг. Энэ хязгаарыг олохын тулд, энэ цаас роботууд хүний хамтрагчтай харилцаа холбогдох боломж олгодог шинэ интерактив суралцах арга зам гаргадаг. Зарим санал өгсөн арга нь роботууд асуулт асуух үйл явцуудын тулд эерэг бодлого авах боломжтой болгож, урт хугацааны шагналыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Бидний эзэмшигийн үр дүнд интерактив суралцах арга баримтууд үндсэн үгийн семантикийн тухай илүү итгэлтэй загваруудыг харуулж байна. Ялангуяа тодорхойгүй чимээгүй орчинд дүүрэн байдаг. Өмнөх ажлаас харьцуулахад интерактив суралцах үйл ажиллагаанаас авсан загварууд шинэ нөхцөлд хэрэглэгдсэн үед 48% болон 145% үйл ажиллагаанаас ашиглана.', 'no': 'For å slå på menneskelrobot-kommunikasjon og samarbeid, representerer tidlegare arbeidar grunnleggte verbsemantikk som den potensielle endringa av tilstanden til den fysiske verden som følgjer av desse verbane. Gruunderte verbsemantikk blir henta hovudsakelig basert på parallelle data for bruk av ein verbfrase og tilsvarande rekkjefølgjer av primitiv handlingar som vert demonstrert av mennesker. The rich interaction between teachers and students that is considered important in learning new skills has not yet been explored. For å handtera denne grensesnittet, presenterer denne papiret eit nytt interaktiv læringstilnærming som tillater robotene å proaktivt arbeide i samarbeid med menneskelige partnerar ved å spørja godt spørsmål om å lære modeller for grunnleggte verbsemantikk. Den foreslåde tilnærminga brukar stipringslæring for å tillata roboten å henta ein optimal politikk for oppførsel som spør om spørsmål ved å maksimere den langsiktige læringa. Våre empiriske resultat har vist at interaktive læringstilnærminga fører til meir betre modeller for grunnleggte verbsemantikk, spesielt i støy miljøet som er full av usikkerhet. Sammenlignet med førre arbeid resulterer modelane som er henta frå interaktiv læring i ein 48% til 145% utvikling når det er brukt i nye situasjonar.', 'so': "Si uu u fududeeyo xiriirka iyo wadashada mashiinka dadka, shaqaalaha hore waxay ka muuqanayaan qoraalka la xiriiray sida beddelka dowladda ee caalamka jidhka ee arimahan ka soo jeeday. Sida caadiga ah waxaa laga helaa macluumaadka lambarka ah ee isticmaalka hadalka qoraalka iyo xilliga la mid ah waxqabadka aasaasiga ah ee dadku muujiyey. Waxbarashada aqoonta cusub weli lama baahan. Qoraalkan wuxuu soo saaraa qaab cusub oo wax barashada oo iskuul ka dhexeeya, kaas oo u ogolaa in robotiyadu si dhaqso ah ula xiriira lammaanaha dadka si fiican looga weyddiisto su'aalo wanaagsan in lagu baro tusaalo u qoraalo. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday wuxuu isticmaalaa in uu kordhiso barashada uu robotiga u ogolaado in uu helo siyaasad u bedelan dabeecada su'aalaha lagu weyddiinayo si uu ugu badnaado mushahaarada waqtiga dheer. Our empirical results have shown that the interactive learning approach leads to more reliable models for grounded verb semantics, especially in the noisy environment which is full of uncertainties.  Isbarbardhig u dhigto shaqadii hore, modellada laga helay waxbarashada iskuulka dhexe-dhexe waxay sabab u leedahay 48% ilaa 145% waxyaabaha lagu sameeyo marka lagu codsaday xaaladaha cusub.", 'sv': 'För att möjliggöra kommunikation och samarbete mellan människa och robot representerar tidigare verk jordad verbsemantik som den potentiella tillståndsförändring till den fysiska världen orsakad av dessa verb. Begränsad verbsemantik förvärvas huvudsakligen baserat på parallella data om användningen av en verbfras och dess motsvarande sekvenser av primitiva handlingar demonstrerade av människor. Den rika interaktionen mellan lärare och elever som anses vara viktig för att lära sig nya färdigheter har ännu inte utforskats. För att ta itu med denna begränsning presenterar denna uppsats en ny interaktiv inlärningsmetod som gör det möjligt för robotar att proaktivt engagera sig i interaktion med mänskliga partners genom att ställa bra frågor för att lära sig modeller för grundad verbsemantik. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet använder förstärkt lärande för att låta roboten få en optimal policy för sina frågeställande beteenden genom att maximera den långsiktiga belöningen. Våra empiriska resultat har visat att den interaktiva inlärningsmetoden leder till mer tillförlitliga modeller för jordad verbsemantik, särskilt i bullriga miljöer som är full av osäkerheter. Jämfört med tidigare arbeten resulterar modellerna från interaktivt lärande i 48% till 145% prestationsförbättring vid tillämpning i nya situationer.', 'sr': 'Da bi omogućili komunikaciju i saradnju ljudskih robota, prethodni rad predstavljaju temeljne verbalne semantike kao potencijalnu promenu države na fizički svijet uzrok ovih verba. Semantika uglavnom osnovana je na paralelnim podacima korištenja verbalne fraze i odgovarajućim sekvencijama primitivnih akcija koje su pokazali ljudi. Bogata interakcija između nastavnika i studenata koja se smatra važnom u učenju novih vještina još nije istražena. Za rješavanje ovog ograničenja, ovaj papir predstavlja novi interaktivni pristup učenja koji omogućava robotima proaktivno uključiti interakciju sa ljudskim partnerima postavljajući dobra pitanja da nauče modele za temeljne verbalne semantike. Predloženi pristup koristi pojačanje učenja kako bi omogućio robotu da dobije optimalnu politiku za svoje ponašanje pitanja, maksimalizujući dugoročnu nagradu. Naši empirički rezultati pokazali su da interaktivni pristup učenja vodi do pouzdanijih modela temeljnih verbalnih semantika, posebno u bukovnom okruženju koja je puna nesigurnosti. U usporedbi sa prethodnim radom, modeli koji su dobili od interaktivnog učenja rezultiraju 48% do 145% postupka uspeha kada su se primjenjivali u novim situacijama.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු රොබෝට් සම්බන්ධය සහ සම්බන්ධය සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න, මුලින් වැඩක් මුලින් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරතිදේශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ මුලින්  Groundid verb semantics are collected primary on the parallel data of the use of a verb Phrase and its comparing sequences of primitive action that show by men. අළුත් විද්\u200dයාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න විශ්වාසය සහ විද්\u200dයාඥාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්නේ න මේ සීමාව සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, මේ පැත්තේ අලුත් සම්බන්ධ විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න අලුත් සම්බන්ධ විදියට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට රොබෝට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා රොබෝට්ටුව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අ අපේ ඉම්පිරිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්වාසිත වාර්තාවක් විදිහ අලුත් ස්ථානයේදී ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන්', 'ta': 'மனித-ரோபோட் தொடர்பு மற்றும் இணைப்பை செயல்படுத்த, முந்தைய வேலைகள் நிறுவப்பட்ட வெர்ப் பெம்மென்டிக்கு குறிப்பிடுகிறது, இந வார்ப் சொற்றொடர் பயன்படுத்திய இணைப்பு தகவல் முக்கியமாக பெற்றுள்ளது மற்றும் மனிதர்கள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்ட முதன்மையான செயல்களின் பொருத்தமான ஆசிரியர்களுக்கும் மாணவர்களுக்குமிடையே உள்ள பணக்கூடிய இடைவெளிப்பாடுகள் புதிய திறமைகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ள இந்த வரம்பை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு ஒரு புதிய interactive கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறையை கொடுக்கிறது, அது ரோபோட்டுகள் மனித பங்காரர்களுடன் செயல்படு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறையில் நீண்ட கூலிக்கு அதிகப்படுத்தும் மூலம் ரோபோட்டிற்கு ஒரு விருப்பத்தேர்வு கொள்ள வேண்டிய கொ நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் இடைவெளிப்படையான கல்வி செயல்பாடு முறையில் மேலும் நம்பிக்கையான மாதிரிகளை காண முந்தைய வேலையிலிருந்து ஒப்பிட்டால், செயல்படுத்தும் கல்வியிலிருந்து பெற்ற மாதிரிகள் பெற்றார்கள், புதிய நிலைகள', 'ur': 'انسان-روبوٹ کی تعاملات اور تعاملات کو قادر کرنے کے لئے، پہلے کے کام ان کلمات کے باعث فیزیک دنیا کی امکانات کی تغییر کے مطابق بنیادیں گے۔ گروڈ ورب سیمانٹیکس کی عمدہ میں ایک ورب فریز کے استعمال کی پارالی ڈیٹوں پر بنیاد رکھی جاتی ہے اور اس کے مطابق اولین عمل کی سفارش انسانوں کے ذریعہ دکھائی جاتی ہے. مسلمانوں اور دانش آموزوں کے درمیان ثروتمند تعامل جو نئی طاقتوں کی تعلیم میں اہم سمجھی جاتی ہے اب تک اچھی تعلیم نہیں کی جاتی۔ یہ محدودیت کے لئے، یہ کاغذ ایک نئی پیدائمی پیدائش کی طرح پیش کرتا ہے جو روبوٹوں کو انسان کے شریکوں کے ساتھ اچھی سوال پوچھتے ہیں کہ بنیادی کلام سیمانٹیکوں کے لئے موڈل سکونیں۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ استعمال کرتا ہے کہ روبوت کو اس کے سوال سوال کرنے والوں کے لئے اچھی طریقہ حاصل کرنے کی اجرت کے مطابق مضبوط تعلیم دینے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے امپراتیک نتیجے دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ انٹراکیٹ سیکھنے کی تقریبا زیادہ مطمئن ہونے والی موڈل کی طرف آتا ہے، مخصوصاً آواز کی محیط میں جو غیر یقین سے بھر ہے۔ اگلے کام کے مقابلہ میں، مڈیلڈ جن کی تعلیم مہربانی سے حاصل ہوئی تھی، جب نئی موقعیت میں استعمال کیا جاتا تھا، 48 فیصد تک 145 فیصد فائدہ حاصل کرتی تھی.', 'uz': "Inson robot aloqalarini amalga oshirish uchun oldingi ishlarni o'rganish uchun asboblar semantikasi asboblarga o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Name Yangi xillik o'rganishga muhim bo'lgan o'qituvchilar va o'quvchilar orasidagi o'quvchilar orasidagi o'qituvchilar hamda qidirilmaydi. Bu cheksizlikni boshqarish uchun, bu qogʻoz yangi interaktiv o'rganish usulini koʻrsatiladi. Robotlar odamlar bilan murakkab ishlashga ruxsat beradi. Ularni yaxshi savollar o'rganish modellarini o'rganadi. Koʻrsatilgan usul, robot o'rganishni o'rganishga foydalanadi va uzoq soʻrov soʻrov amalni oshirish mumkin. Bizning muvaffaqiyatli natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, interaktiv o'rganish muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish usulida ko'proq ishlayotgan modellarga ega bo'ladi. Hullas, tashkilotlar haqiqiqatga kam bo'lmaydi. Oldingi ishga kamaytirilgan, interaktiv o'rganishdan olingan modellar yangi holatda qoʻllanganda 48% to 145% bajarish natijasini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Để cho phép giao tiếp và hợp tác con người robot trước đây đại diện cho ngữ nghĩa ngầm như sự thay đổi tình trạng với thế giới vật chất do các động từ này gây ra. Động từ cơ cơ ngữ được tìm kiếm dựa trên các dữ liệu song trong việc sử dụng các cụm từ động từ và các chuỗi tương ứng của các hành động nguyên thủy được chứng minh bởi con người. Sự tương tác dồi dào giữa giáo viên và học sinh mà được cho là quan trọng trong việc học thêm kỹ năng mới chưa được khám phá. Để giải quyết giới hạn này, tờ giấy này có một phương pháp học tương tác mới cho phép robot có thể thao tác trực tiếp với đối tác với người bằng cách hỏi những câu hỏi tốt để học các mô hình về ngữ pháp ngữ pháp. Cách tiếp cận đề nghị dùng việc củng cố học để cho phép robot có một chính sách tối ưu cho hành vi đặt câu hỏi của nó bằng cách tối đa hóa phần thưởng dài hạn. Những kết quả có kinh nghiệm của chúng ta đã cho thấy phương pháp học tập tương đồng dẫn đến một mô hình đáng tin cậy hơn về ngữ pháp chữ thường, đặc biệt là trong môi trường ồn ào đầy những sự bất ngờ. So với công việc trước, các mô hình thu được từ học tương tác dẫn đến lợi nhuận lợi dụng lợi ích lợi dụng lợi nhuận 42-15 khi được áp dụng trong tình huống mới.', 'nl': 'Om mens-robot communicatie en samenwerking mogelijk te maken, vertegenwoordigen eerdere werken geaarde werkwoorden semantiek als de potentiële verandering van toestand naar de fysieke wereld veroorzaakt door deze werkwoorden. De gegronde werkwoordssemantiek wordt voornamelijk verkregen op basis van de parallelle gegevens van het gebruik van een werkwoordszin en de overeenkomstige sequenties van primitieve acties die door mensen worden aangetoond. De rijke interactie tussen docenten en studenten die belangrijk wordt geacht bij het leren van nieuwe vaardigheden is nog niet onderzocht. Om deze beperking aan te pakken, presenteert dit artikel een nieuwe interactieve leerbenadering die robots in staat stelt om proactief interactie met menselijke partners aan te gaan door goede vragen te stellen om modellen voor geaard werkwoorden semantiek te leren. De voorgestelde aanpak maakt gebruik van versterking learning om de robot in staat te stellen een optimaal beleid te verwerven voor zijn vragen stellen gedrag door de langetermijnbeloning te maximaliseren. Onze empirische resultaten hebben aangetoond dat de interactieve leerbenadering leidt tot betrouwbaardere modellen voor geaarde werkwoorden semantiek, vooral in de lawaaierige omgeving die vol onzekerheden is. In vergelijking met vorig werk resulteren de modellen verkregen uit interactief leren in een prestatiewinst van 48% tot 145% bij toepassing in nieuwe situaties.', 'da': 'For at muliggøre kommunikation og samarbejde mellem menneske og robot repræsenterer tidligere værker grundlagt verbsemantik som den potentielle tilstandsændring til den fysiske verden forårsaget af disse verber. Grounded verb semantik erhverves hovedsageligt baseret på parallelle data om brugen af et verb sætning og dens tilsvarende sekvenser af primitive handlinger demonstreret af mennesker. Den rige interaktion mellem lærere og studerende, der anses for vigtig for at lære nye færdigheder, er endnu ikke blevet undersøgt. For at løse denne begrænsning præsenterer denne artikel en ny interaktiv læringstilgang, der gør det muligt for robotter at proaktivt engagere sig i interaktion med menneskelige partnere ved at stille gode spørgsmål for at lære modeller for grundlagt verbsemantik. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde bruger forstærkningslæring til at gøre det muligt for robotten at opnå en optimal politik for sin spørgsmålsstillende adfærd ved at maksimere den langsigtede belønning. Vores empiriske resultater har vist, at den interaktive læringstilgang fører til mere pålidelige modeller for jordbaseret verbsemantik, især i det støjende miljø, der er fuld af usikkerhed. Sammenlignet med tidligere arbejde resulterer modellerne fra interaktiv læring i en 48% til 145% præstationsgevinst, når de anvendes i nye situationer.', 'bg': 'За да се даде възможност за комуникация и сътрудничество между човек и робот, предишни произведения представят обоснована глаголна семантика като потенциална промяна на състоянието на физическия свят, причинена от тези глаголи. Основаната семантика на глагола се придобива главно въз основа на паралелни данни за използването на глаголна фраза и съответните ѝ последователности от примитивни действия, демонстрирани от хората. Богатото взаимодействие между учители и ученици, което се счита за важно за изучаването на нови умения, все още не е проучено. За да се справи с това ограничение, настоящата статия представя нов интерактивен подход за учене, който позволява на роботите да се ангажират активно в взаимодействие с човешки партньори, като задават добри въпроси, за да научат модели за основана глаголна семантика. Предложеният подход използва обучение за подсилване, за да позволи на робота да придобие оптимална политика за поведението си, задаващо въпроси, чрез максимизиране на дългосрочната възнаграждение. Нашите емпирични резултати показват, че интерактивният подход на учене води до по-надеждни модели за базирана глаголна семантика, особено в шумна среда, която е пълна с несигурности. В сравнение с предишната работа моделите, придобити от интерактивното обучение, водят до увеличение на производителността от 48% до 145% при прилагане в нови ситуации.', 'hr': 'Da bi omogućili komunikaciju i saradnju ljudskih robota, prethodni radovi predstavljaju temeljne verbalne semantike kao potencijalnu promjenu države na fizički svijet uzrokovanu ovim verbima. Semantika uglavnom osnovana je na paralelnim podacima korištenja verbalne fraze i odgovarajućim sekvencijama primitivnih akcija koje su pokazali ljudi. Bogata interakcija između nastavnika i studenata koja se smatra važnom u učenju novih vještina još nije istražena. Za rješavanje ovog ograničenja, ovaj papir predstavlja novi interaktivni pristup učenja koji omogućava robotima proaktivno uključiti interakciju s ljudskim partnerima postavljajući dobra pitanja kako bi naučili modele temeljnih verbalnih semantika. Predloženi pristup koristi pojačanje učenja kako bi robot omogućio da dobije optimalnu politiku za svoje ponašanje pitanja, maksimalizirajući dugoročnu nagradu. Naši empirički rezultati pokazali su da interaktivni pristup učenja dovede do pouzdanijih modela temeljnih verbalnih semantika, posebno u bukovnom okruženju koja je puna nesigurnosti. U usporedbi s prethodnim radom, modeli koji su dobili od interaktivnog učenja rezultiraju dobit učinka od 48% do 145% kada su se primjenjivali u novim situacijama.', 'de': 'Um Mensch-Roboter-Kommunikation und Kollaboration zu ermöglichen, repräsentieren frühere Arbeiten die geerdete Verbsemantik als mögliche Veränderung des Zustandes in die physische Welt, die durch diese Verben verursacht wird. Grundierte Verbsemantik wird hauptsächlich auf der Grundlage der parallelen Daten der Verwendung einer Verbphrase und ihrer entsprechenden Sequenzen von primitiven Handlungen erworben, die vom Menschen demonstriert werden. Die reichhaltige Interaktion zwischen Lehrern und Schülern, die für das Erlernen neuer Fähigkeiten wichtig ist, wurde noch nicht erforscht. Um diese Einschränkung anzugehen, stellt dieser Beitrag einen neuen interaktiven Lernansatz vor, der es Robotern ermöglicht, proaktiv mit menschlichen Partnern zu interagieren, indem sie gute Fragen stellen, um Modelle für geerdete Verbsemantik zu lernen. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz nutzt Verstärkungslernen, um dem Roboter zu ermöglichen, eine optimale Politik für sein Fragestellungsverhalten zu erhalten, indem er die langfristige Belohnung maximiert. Unsere empirischen Ergebnisse haben gezeigt, dass der interaktive Lernansatz zu verlässlicheren Modellen für geerdete Verbsemantik führt, insbesondere in der geräuschvollen Umgebung, die voller Unsicherheiten ist. Im Vergleich zu früheren Arbeiten führen die aus interaktivem Lernen gewonnenen Modelle in neuen Situationen zu einem 48% bis 145% Leistungszuwachs.', 'id': 'Untuk memungkinkan komunikasi manusia-robot dan kollaborasi, pekerjaan sebelumnya mewakili semantik verb berdasarkan sebagai perubahan potensial negara ke dunia fisik disebabkan oleh verb-verb ini. Semantik verb berdasarkan dasar data paralel dari penggunaan frasa verb dan urutan yang sesuai dengan tindakan primitif yang didemonstrasikan oleh manusia. Interaksi kaya antara guru dan siswa yang dianggap penting dalam belajar keterampilan baru belum dikeksplorasi. To address this limitation, this paper presents a new interactive learning approach that allows robots to proactively engage in interaction with human partners by asking good questions to learn models for grounded verb semantics.  pendekatan yang diusulkan menggunakan pembelajaran penuh untuk memungkinkan robot untuk mendapatkan kebijakan optimal untuk perilaku bertanya-tanya dengan memaksimalkan hadiah jangka panjang. Hasil empirik kami telah menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan belajar interaktif mengarah ke model yang lebih dipercaya untuk semantik verb berdasarkan dasar, terutama dalam lingkungan yang berisik yang penuh dengan ketidakpastian. Compared to previous work, the models acquired from interactive learning result in a 48% to 145% performance gain when applied in new situations.', 'sw': 'Ili kuwawezesha mawasiliano na ushirikiano wa roboti binadamu, kazi zilizopita zinawakilisha mitindo ya msingi kama mabadiliko ya serikali kwa dunia ya kimwili yaliyosababishwa na maneno haya. Seminani zilizosababishwa zinapatikana hasa kwa kutumia taarifa mbalimbali za matumizi ya neno hilo na mfululizo wa vitendo vya msingi vilivyoonyeshwa na binadamu. Mawasiliano matajiri kati ya walimu na wanafunzi ambao yanachukuliwa kuwa muhimu katika kujifunza ujuzi mpya bado haujagunduliwa. Ili kukabiliana na vizuizi hiki, gazeti hili linaleta mbinu mpya ya kujifunza za kati ambalo linaruhusu roboti kushirikiana na washirika wa binadamu kwa kuuliza maswali mazuri ya kujifunza mifano kwa ajili ya mifumo yenye msimamo mkali. The proposed approach uses reinforcement learning to allow the robot to acquire an optimal policy for its question-asking behaviors by maximizing the long-term reward.  Matokeo yetu ya msisimko umeonyesha kuwa mbinu za kujifunza za kati zinapelekea mifano yenye kuaminika zaidi kwa mifano yenye msingi wa mazingira, hasa katika mazingira ya kelele ambayo yamejaa usio na uhakika. Kulinganishwa na kazi iliyopita, mifano iliyokipata kutokana na elimu ya kati ilisababisha mafanikio yanayopata asilimia 48 hadi asilimia 145 katika hali mpya.', 'ko': '인간과 로봇 간의 교류와 협력을 실현하기 위해 이전의 작업은 동사의 의미를 근식시켜 물리 세계 상태에 대한 잠재적인 변화를 나타냈다.동사의 의미를 근식하는 것은 주로 동사 단어의 사용과 그에 상응하는 원시 동작 서열의 평행 데이터를 바탕으로 한다.교사와 학생 간의 풍부한 상호작용은 새로운 기능을 배우는 중요한 요소로 여겨지지만 이 점은 아직 모색되지 않았다.이러한 한계를 해결하기 위해 본고는 새로운 상호작용 학습 방법을 제시했다. 로봇이 좋은 문제를 제기함으로써 동사의 의미를 바탕으로 하는 모델을 학습하고 인류 파트너와 자발적으로 상호작용을 할 수 있도록 한다.이 방법은 학습 강화를 이용하여 장기 보상을 극대화함으로써 로봇이 질문 행위를 위해 최선의 전략을 얻을 수 있도록 한다.우리의 실증 결과에 의하면 상호작용 학습 방법은 동사의 의미를 뿌리째 심는 데 더욱 믿을 만한 모델을 제공할 수 있으며 특히 불확실성이 가득한 시끄러운 환경에서 더욱 믿을 만하다.이전 작업에 비해 상호작용 학습에서 얻은 모델은 새로운 환경에 응용할 때 성능이 48%에서 145% 향상되었다.', 'tr': 'İnsan-robot iletişimi we işbirliğini etkinleştirmek üçin, öňki eserler bu wersiýalar tarapyndan netijeli fiziksel dünýä durumynyň üýtgedilişi döwletlere meýilleşdirilýär. Toplanmış verb semantikleri genellikle bir verb frazinin kullanımına dayanan paralel verilere ve insanlar tarafından gösterilen ilkel amellerin ardınca alınır. Häzir täze ukyplary öwrenmek üçin möhüm bolan mugallymlaryň we okuwçylaryň arasyndaky baý etkileşimi tapylmady. Bu ýagdaýdan çykmak üçin bu kagyz täze etkileşimli öwrenmek taýýarlaryny görkezýär. Bu käze robotlara seretsel semantik üçin örnekler öwrenmek üçin gowy soraglary sorap robotlara etkileşimli bir öwrenmek üçin täze bir ýagdaýy görkezýär. Mazmunlar öwrenmek üçin robotyň soragy soragy jogaplary üçin optimal politika almana rugsat bermek üçin köpräk öwrenmesini ulanýar. Biziň empirik netijelerimiz etkileşikli öwrenmek nusgasynyň garaşyly semantik sebäpli ynamly nusgalara çevrilýär, ýöne-de gaty gürrüňsiz çevrede. Öňki işe görä, nusgalar täze durumlarda tapawutlandykda 48% we 145% eser gazanýardy.', 'fa': 'برای توانایی ارتباط و همکاری با روبات انسان و انسان، کارهای قبلی به عنوان تغییر قابل تغییر ایالت به دنیای فیزیکی که توسط این کلمات باعث شده است نشان می دهند. سیمانتیک کلمه\u200cهای پایه\u200cای بر اساس داده\u200cهای پارالی از استفاده از کلمه\u200cای و ترکیب\u200cهای مربوط به حرکتهای اولیه\u200cای که توسط انسان نشان داده می\u200cشوند، می\u200cگیرند. ارتباط ثروتمند بین معلمان و دانش آموزان که در یادگیری مهمترین مهمترین مهمترین مهمترین در مهارت جدید هنوز تحقیق نشده است. برای حل این محدودیت، این کاغذ یک روش یادگیری جدید متفاوتی را نشان می دهد که به روبات اجازه می دهد که به طور فعالی در تعامل با شریکان انسان با پرسیدن سوال های خوب برای یادگیری مدل های semantics کلمه بنیادی باشند. این دستور پیشنهاد از یادگیری افزایش استفاده می\u200cکند تا به روبات اجازه دهد که سیاست optimal برای رفتارهای سوال\u200cپرسیدن خود را با افزایش پاداش طولانی فراهم کند. نتیجه امپراتیک ما نشان داده است که دستور یادگیری بین\u200cالمفصل به مدل\u200cهای قابل اطمینان بیشتری برای semantics verbs grounded، مخصوصا در محیط صوتی که پر از یقین است. در مقایسه با کارهای قبلی، مدلها از یادگیری متفاوتی به نتیجه 48 درصد تا 145 درصد فایده\u200cای در موقعیت\u200cهای جدید دریافت شده\u200cاند.', 'af': "Om mens-robot-kommunikasie en samarbeid te aktiveer, verteenwoordige werke voorgestel gegrónde verb semantieke as die potensiele verandering van staat na die fisiese wêreld wat deur hierdie verbe veroorsaak is. Grounded verb semantieke word hoofsaaklik opgeneem gebaseer op die parallele data van die gebruik van 'n verb frase en sy ooreenstemmende volgorde van primitiewe aksies wat deur mense vertoon word. Die ryk interaksie tussen onderwysers en studentes wat belangrik word in die leer van nuwe kunstenaars is nog nie uitgesoek nie. Om hierdie beperking te adres, stel hierdie papier 'n nuwe interaktiewe leer toegang wat toelaat om robots te proaktiewe in interaksie met menslike partnere te doen deur goeie vrae te vra om modele te leer vir gegrónde verb semantieke. Die voorgestelde toegang gebruik versterking leer om die robot te laat toe om 'n optimale beleid te kry vir sy vraag-vraag gedragte deur die langtydige loon te maksimeer. Ons empiriese resultate het vertoon dat die interaktiewe leer toegang lei na meer betroubare modele vir gegrónde verb semantieke, veral in die geluidige omgewing wat vol onbevestigheid is. Vergelyk met vorige werk, die modele wat van interaktiewe leer aangeneem het, resultaat in 'n 48% tot 145% uitvoeringsverskaf wanneer in nuwe situasies aangepas word.", 'sq': 'Për të mundësuar komunikimin dhe bashkëpunimin njerëzor-robot, punët e mëparshme përfaqësojnë semantikën e verbeve të themeluar si ndryshimin e mundshëm të shtetit në botën fizike të shkaktuar nga këto verbe. Semantika e verb ëve të themeluar fitohet kryesisht bazuar në të dhënat paralele të përdorimit të një fraze verbi dhe sekuencat e saj korrespondente të veprimeve primitive të demonstruara nga njerëzit. Ndërveprimi i pasur midis mësuesve dhe studentëve që konsiderohet i rëndësishëm në mësimin e aftësive të reja nuk është eksploruar ende. Për të trajtuar këtë kufizim, kjo letër paraqet një metodë të re interaktive mësimi që lejon robotët të angazhohen proaktivisht në ndërveprim me partnerët njerëzorë duke bërë pyetje të mira për të mësuar modele për semantikën e verbeve të bazuar. Përqasja e propozuar përdor mësimin e forcimit për të lejuar robotin të fitojë një politikë optimale për sjelljet e tij të pyetjeve duke maksimizuar shpërblimin afat-gjatë. Rezultatet tona empirike kanë treguar se qasja interaktive e mësimit çon në modele më të besueshme për semantikën e verbeve të themeluar, veçanërisht në mjedisin zhurmues që është plot me pasiguri. Krahasuar me punën e mëparshme, modelet e fituar nga mësimi interaktiv rezultojnë në një fitim prej 48% deri në 145% performancë kur zbatohen në situata të reja.', 'am': 'የሰው-ሮቦት ግንኙነት እና ድጋፍ ለማስችል፣ የቀድሞው ሥራ የሥርዓዊ አካባቢ ዓለም የግዛት ለውጥ እንዲሆን የመስመር ስምናን ነው፡፡ የተመሳሳይ የፊደል አሜሪካ በአካባቢው የverb ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና በሰው ላይ የሚያሳየው የፊደል ጥያቄ ተግባር በሚያሳየው ጥያቄ መሠረት የተገኘ ነው፡፡ በአዲስ እውቀት በማስተማርና በተማሪዎች መካከል ባለ ሀብታሞች ግንኙነት ገና አልተመረጠም፡፡ ይህንን ግንኙነት ለመቀበል፣ ይህች ገጽ አዲስ ተማሪ ትምህርት ማድረግ አቀረበ፤ ሮቦዎች ከሰው ባልንጀሮቹ ጋር ለመጋጠም ጥሩ ጥያቄዎችን ለመግኘት የሚችል አዲስ ጥያቄን ለመጠየቅ ነው፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የረጅም ዋጋ በመጠየቅ ጥያቄውን ለማግኘት የሮቦት ፖሊሲ ለመማር ይጨምርበታል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤታችን የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል ጥያቄ ለመሠረት የሚታመነ ምሳሌዎች፣ ይልቁንም በማይታወቅ ድምፅ በሚሞላ የድምፅ አካባቢ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ከቀድሞው ስራ በተደረገው ሞዴላዎች በአዲስ ሁኔታ በተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ላይ 48 በመቶ እስከ 145 በመቶ የድምፅ እድል ፈንታ አግኝተዋል፡፡', 'hy': "Մարդ-ռոբոտ հաղորդակցման և համագործակցության հնարավորություն տալու համար նախորդ աշխատանքները ներկայացնում են հիմնված բայերի սեմանտիկա որպես այս բայերի պատճառով առաջացած վիճակի պոտենցիալ փոփոխություն ֆիզիկական աշխարհում: Հիմնականում բայի սեմանտիկան ստացվում է բայի օգտագործման զուգահեռ տվյալների հիմնականում և մարդկանց կողմից ցույց տված պարզունակ գործողությունների համապատասխան հաջորդականությունների վրա: The rich interaction between teachers and students that is considered important in learning new skills has not yet been explored.  Այս սահմանափակումների լուծման համար այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է նոր ինտերակտիվ ուսումնասիրության մոտեցում, որը թույլ է տալիս ռոբոտներին պրոակտիվ ներգրավվել մարդկային գործընկերների հետ' լավ հարցեր տալով հիմնված բայերի սեմանտիկայի մոդելների սովորելու համար: The proposed approach uses reinforcement learning to allow the robot to acquire an optimal policy for its question-asking behaviors by maximizing the long-term reward.  Մեր էմպրիկական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ինտերակտիվ ուսուցման մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է ավելի վստահելի մոդելներին հիմնված բայերի սեմանտիկայի համար, հատկապես աղմկոտ միջավայրում, որը լի է անորոշություններով: Համեմատելով նախորդ աշխատանքի հետ, ինտերակտիվ ուսումնասիրության արդյունքում ստացված մոդելները նոր իրավիճակներում 48-145 տոկոս բարձրացում են:", 'az': 'İnsan-robot iletişimi və işbirliğini qabilleştirmək üçün əvvəlki işlər bu verblərə səbəb olan fizik dünyanın mümkün müxtəlif dəyişiklikləri olaraq temsilli verb semantiklərini göstərirlər. Üstünlü verb semantikaları insanların göstərilən ilk işləri ilə istifadə edilməsinin paralel verilənlərə dayanılır. Yeni yetkinlik öyrənməsində möhüm hesab edilən müəllimlərlə öyrənənənlər arasındakı zəngin miqdarı hələ də keşfedilməmişdir. Bu hədləri çəkmək üçün bu kağıt yeni interaktif öyrənmə tərzini göstərir ki, robotların insan ortaqları ilə yaxşı suallar soruşmaq üçün modellər öyrənməsinə imkan verir. Önüllü tərzim istifadə edir ki, robot üçün sual soruşan davranışları üçün optimal siyasət alması üçün çoxlu öyrənmək öyrənməsi istifadə edir. Bizim impirik sonuçlarımız, interaktif öyrənmə metodlarının temel verb semantik üçün daha güvenilir modellərə yol göstərdiyini göstərmişdir, özlərinə də təhlükəsizliklə dolu səslənmiş ortamda. Əvvəlki işin qarşısında, yeni durumlarda istifadə edildiyi zaman, interaktif öyrənməkdən alınan modellər 48%-dən 145%-ə istifadə edəcək.', 'bn': 'To enable human-robot communication and collaboration, previous works represent grounded verb semantics as the potential change of state to the physical world caused by these verbs.  মূলত ভার্ব বাক্য ব্যবহারের প্যারালেল ডাটা ভিত্তিতে গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে এবং মানুষের দ্বারা প্রকাশিত প্রাথমিক ক কাজের সংশ্লিষ্ট মাত্রা নতুন দক্ষতা শিক্ষক এবং শিক্ষার্থীদের মধ্যে সমৃদ্ধ সম্পর্ক এখনো খুঁজে বের করা হয়নি। এই সীমাবদ্ধতা নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য এই পাতাটি একটি নতুন ইন্টারনেটিভ ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা প্রদান করেছে যা রোবটদের মানব অংশীদারের সাথে স্বয়ংক্রিয় করে য প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করে দীর্ঘমেয়াদের পুরস্কার বৃদ্ধির মাধ্যমে রোবটের কাছে প্রশ্নের আচরণের জন্য একটি অপ্রায় নীতি পে আমাদের প্রাকৃতিক ফলাফল দেখিয়েছে যে ইন্টারেক্টিভ শিক্ষা পদক্ষেপ বেশি বিশ্বস্ত মডেলের কাছে যায়, বিশেষ করে শব্দ পরিবেশে যা নিশ্চ পূর্ববর্তী কাজের তুলনায়, ইন্টার্ভিক্ট শিক্ষা থেকে পাওয়া মডেলের ফলে নতুন পরিস্থিতিতে নতুন পরিস্থিতিতে ৪৮% থেকে ১৪৫', 'ca': "Per permetre la comunicació i la col·laboració entre humans i robots, treballs anteriors representen la semàntica dels verbs fonamentals com el canvi potencial d'estat al món físic causat per aquests verbs. La semàntica dels verbs fonamentals s'adquiri principalment basant en les dades paralleles de l'ús d'una frase de verbs i les seves seqüències correspondents d'accions primitives demostrades pels humans. La rica interacció entre professors i estudiants que es considera important en aprendre noves habilitats encara no s'ha explorat. Per abordar aquesta limitació, aquest paper presenta un nou enfocament interactiu d'aprenentatge que permet als robots interactuar proactivament amb les parelles humanes fent bones preguntes per aprendre models de semàntica de verbs fonamentals. L'enfocament proposat utilitza l'aprenentatge de reforç per permetre al robot adquirir una política óptima per als seus comportaments de pregunta maximitzant la recompensa a llarg termini. Els nostres resultats empírics han demostrat que l'enfocament interactiu d'aprenentatge porta a models més fiables per a la semàntica dels verbs fonamentals, especialment en un entorn ruidosos que està plen d'incertituds. Comparat amb la feina anterior, els models adquirids a partir de l'aprenentatge interactiu resulten en un guany de rendiment del 48% al 145% quan s'aplica en noves situacions.", 'cs': 'Pro umožnění komunikace a spolupráce člověk-robot představují předchozí práce zakotvenou slovesovou sémantiku jako potenciální změnu stavu do fyzického světa způsobenou těmito slovesami. Základní slovesová sémantika je získána zejména na základě paralelních dat o použití slovesové fráze a jejích odpovídajících sekvencí primitivních akcí demonstrovaných lidmi. Bohatá interakce mezi učiteli a studenty, která je považována za důležitá pro učení nových dovedností, nebyla dosud zkoumána. Pro řešení tohoto omezení představuje tento článek nový interaktivní učební přístup, který umožňuje robotům proaktivně zapojit se do interakce s lidskými partnery kladením dobrých otázek k učení se modelů pro zakotvenou slovesovou sémantiku. Navržený přístup využívá posilovací učení, aby robot mohl získat optimální politiku pro jeho chování kladení otázek maximalizací dlouhodobé odměny. Naše empirické výsledky ukázaly, že interaktivní učební přístup vede ke spolehlivějším modelům pro zakotvenou slovesovou sémantiku, zejména v hlučném prostředí plném nejistot. Ve srovnání s předchozí prácí, modely získané z interaktivního učení vedou k 48% až 145% nárůstu výkonnosti při aplikaci v nových situacích.', 'et': 'Inimese-roboti suhtlemise ja koostöö võimaldamiseks esindavad varasemad tööd põhjendatud tegusõna semantikat kui nende tegusõnade poolt põhjustatud võimalikku oleku muutumist füüsilisse maailma. Alustatud tegusõna semantika omandatakse peamiselt tegusõna fraasi kasutamise paralleelsete andmete ja selle vastavate algeliste tegevuste jadade põhjal, mida inimesed demonstreerivad. Õpetajate ja õpilaste rikkalikku suhtlust, mida peetakse uute oskuste õppimisel oluliseks, ei ole veel uuritud. Selle piirangu lahendamiseks tutvustatakse käesolevas töös uut interaktiivset õppimismeetodit, mis võimaldab robotitel ennetavalt suhelda inimpartneritega, esitades häid küsimusi, et õppida põhjendatud verbsemantika mudeleid. Kavandatud lähenemisviis kasutab tugevdamisõpet, et võimaldada robotil omandada optimaalse poliitika oma küsimusi esitava käitumise jaoks, maksimeerides pikaajalist tasu. Meie empiirilised tulemused on näidanud, et interaktiivne õppimine viib usaldusväärsemate mudeliteni põhjendatud verbsemantika jaoks, eriti mürakas keskkonnas, mis on täis ebakindlust. Võrreldes varasemate töödega saavutavad interaktiivse õppe käigus omandatud mudelid uutes olukordades 48–145% jõudluse kasvu.', 'bs': 'Da bi omogućili komunikaciju i saradnju ljudskih robota, prethodni rad predstavljaju temeljne verbalne semantike kao potencijalnu promjenu države na fizički svijet uzrokovanu ovim verbima. Semantika osnovnih verb a dobija se uglavnom na temelju paralelnih podataka korištenja verbalne fraze i odgovarajućih sekvencija primitivnih akcija koje su pokazali ljudi. Bogata interakcija između nastavnika i studenata koja se smatra važnom u učenju novih vještina još nije istražena. Za rješavanje ovog ograničenja, ovaj papir predstavlja novi interaktivni pristup učenja koji omogućava robotima proaktivno uključiti interakciju sa ljudskim partnerima postavljajući dobra pitanja da nauče modele temeljnih verbalnih semantika. Predloženi pristup koristi pojačanje učenja kako bi omogućio robotu da dobije optimalnu politiku za svoje ponašanje pitanja, maksimalizujući dugoročnu nagradu. Naši empirički rezultati pokazali su da interaktivni pristup učenja vodi do pouzdanijih modela za temeljne verbalne semantike, posebno u bučnom okruženju koja je puna nesigurnosti. U usporedbi s prethodnim radom, modeli koji su dobili od interaktivnog učenja rezultiraju dobit učenja od 48% do 145% kada su se primjenjivali u novim situacijama.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen ja robotin välisen kommunikaation ja yhteistyön mahdollistamiseksi aikaisemmat teokset edustavat pohjautuvaa verbisemantiikkaa näiden verbien aiheuttamana tilanmuutoksena fyysiseen maailmaan. Perustettu verbi semantiikka on hankittu pääasiassa vertaamalla verbi lauseen käyttöä ja sitä vastaavia primitiivisten toimien sekvenssejä, jotka ihmiset osoittavat. Opettajien ja opiskelijoiden rikasta vuorovaikutusta, jota pidetään tärkeänä uusien taitojen oppimisessa, ei ole vielä tutkittu. Tämän rajoituksen ratkaisemiseksi tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi interaktiivinen oppimistapa, jonka avulla robotit voivat ennakoivasti osallistua vuorovaikutukseen ihmiskumppaneiden kanssa esittämällä hyviä kysymyksiä oppiakseen malleja pohjautuvaan verbisemantiikkaan. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa hyödyntää vahvistuskoulutusta, jonka avulla robotti voi hankkia optimaalisen politiikan kysymyksiä esittäville käyttäytymisilleen maksimoimalla pitkän aikavälin palkkion. Empiiriset tulokset ovat osoittaneet, että interaktiivinen oppimistapa johtaa luotettavampiin malleihin pohjautuvan verbin semantiikkaan erityisesti meluisassa ympäristössä, joka on täynnä epävarmuuksia. Aiempaan työhön verrattuna vuorovaikutteisesta oppimisesta saadut mallit tuottavat 48–145% suorituskyvyn nousua uusissa tilanteissa.', 'sk': 'Da bi omogočili komunikacijo in sodelovanje med človekom in robotom, predhodna dela predstavljajo osnovno glagolno semantiko kot potencialno spremembo stanja v fizični svet, ki jo povzročajo ti glagoli. Temeljena glagolna semantika se pridobiva predvsem na podlagi vzporednih podatkov o uporabi glagolne fraze in njenih ustreznih zaporedih primitivnih dejanj, ki jih dokazujejo ljudje. Bogata interakcija med učitelji in učenci, ki velja za pomembno pri učenju novih spretnosti, še ni bila raziskana. Za obravnavo te omejitve v prispevku predstavljamo nov interaktivni pristop učenja, ki robotom omogoča proaktivno sodelovanje s človeškimi partnerji z zastavljanjem dobrih vprašanj za učenje modelov temeljne glagolne semantike. Predlagani pristop uporablja učenje okrepitve, ki robotu omogoča, da pridobi optimalno politiko za svoje vedenje spraševanja z maksimiranjem dolgoročne nagrade. Naši empirični rezultati so pokazali, da interaktivni učni pristop vodi do zanesljivejših modelov za temeljito glagolsko semantiko, zlasti v hrupnem okolju, polnem negotovosti. V primerjavi s prejšnjim delom modeli, pridobljeni z interaktivnim učenjem, pridobijo 48% do 145% večjo uspešnost pri uporabi v novih situacijah.', 'ha': "Ina iya amfani da kommuni da shirin mutum-Robot, aikin da suka gabãni yana wakilisha bakin cewa na bakin haske kamar mataimaki mai musanya ga halin zuwa duniya halin da aka sabatar da waɗannan verbs. An sami mutane da aka baka verb, mainli ana sami da data masu parallel wa amfani da maganar verb da kwamfyutan aikin kwance da mutum ke nuna. Tajiri interaction between macallin da wanan da aka yi bincike da muhimu a kan learning zane-yanzu ba a riga ba. Ga a baya wa wannan tsarin, takardan na gaya wata hanyarwa na dabar-dabar da aka sanar da mutane, wanda yana yarda da mashukiya su yi ta haɗa da mutane farat ɗaya, kuma ya tambayi su tambayi maswali mai kyau su karanta misãlai wa semantiki na baka. Tsarin da aka buƙata, yana amfani da ƙaranci da za a iya yarda in karɓi wata na'ura wa masu tambayar ta sami aikin da za'a tambaye shi. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa hanyarwa da za'a iya iya amfani da masu fasahan da za'a iya ƙara motsi da za'a yi aminci wa mutane na bakin sarki, da haske cikin muhalli da za'a cika ba'a da ba'a sani ba. Compared to previous work, the models acquired from interactive learning result in a 48% to 145% performance gain when applied in new situations.", 'jv': 'Digawe-Ngenyarno hukum komunikasi lan tambah-perintasi uwong, karo semanti sing ngatan kelangan kelangan winih dhéwé kuwi kapan kanggo ngubah perusahaan kanggo dunya iki ning kelangan kelangan iki. Grundedeko verb semanti sing ngregani dipun ciptaaken langgar sami dadi perusahaan kelompok Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh guru lan umur-uwong sing isih alam kuwi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi kalem sekang karo awak dhéwé. Ngawe Perintah iki limiting, pepperu iki mudhend akeh tarjamahan sing apik nyebute ngulinakake sistem sing dumadhi kang bot sing bisa nguasakno interaksi karo perbudhakan sampeyan nguasakno Laptop" and "Desktop Rejalaké dhéwé empirhik mengkane mungkane kuwi, dadi yakoleh ingkang interaké manut karo model sing gak adhil kanggo semantar semantar verb sing ngedolö, sumelan karo hal-kara sing paling awak dhéwé sing paling awak dhéwé. Sampeyan karo barêng-barêng sing arep, model sing wis rampungan karo mulasar interactive kuwi padha 48%  sampek kawet kesempatan karo perusahaan nêmên anyari bagian.', 'he': 'כדי לאפשר תקשורת ומשיתוף פעולה אנושי-רובוטים, עבודות קודמות מייצגות סמנטיקה של פעולים מקורקעים כשינוי פוטנציאלי של מדינה לעולם הפיזי שנגרם על ידי פעולים אלה. סמנטיקה של אלברים מבוססת בעיקר על נתונים מקבילים של השימוש של ביטוי אלברים והרצפים המתאימים שלה של פעולות פרימיטיביות שהוכיחו על ידי בני אדם. האינטראקציה העשירה בין המורים לסטודנטים שנחשבה חשובה בללמד כישורים חדשים עדיין לא נחקרה. כדי להתמודד עם הגבלה הזאת, העיתון הזה מציג גישה חדשה למידה אינטראקטיבית שמאפשרת לרובוטים להתערב באופן פרואקטיבי באינטראקציה עם שותפים אנושיים על ידי שאלות טובות ללמוד דוגמנים לסמנטיקה של אלברים מקורקעים. הגישה המוצעת משתמשת ללמוד גיבוי כדי לאפשר לרובוט להשיג מדיניות אופטימית לתנהגותיה לשאול שאלות על ידי מקסימום הפרס לטווח ארוך. התוצאות האמפריות שלנו הראו שגישת הלימודים האינטראקטיבית מובילה לדוגמנים אמינים יותר לסמנטיקה של אלברים מקורקעים, במיוחד בסביבה הרעשית שמלאה בלתי בוודאות. בהשוואה לעבודה הקודמת, הדוגמנים שנרכשו מלמדה אינטראקטיבית גורמים לזכות ביצועים של 48% עד 145% כשהופעו במצבים חדשים.', 'bo': 'འདིས་མིའི་རྩོམ་པ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་ལྕོགས་ཅན་བྱེད་དགོས། རྨས་གཞི་བྱ་ཚིག་semantics་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་འཇུག གཙོ་རིག་དང་མི་རྩོམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུན་ནི་གལ་ཆེན་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡོད་མ་རེད་དུས་ ཚད་འདི་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ན། ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གསར་བ་སྟོན་པའི་གློག་འཕྲིན་དང་མི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བཅུག དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་རྩོལ་ནུས་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན་ན། སྐོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་རྩོལ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉེན་ཁ་ ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་མཐོང་རུང་བའི་དཔེ་གཞི་རྩ་བ་སྤྱོད་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བྱུང་བའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Linguistic analysis of differences in portrayal of movie characters', 'ar': 'التحليل اللغوي للاختلافات في تصوير شخصيات الفيلم', 'fr': 'Analyse linguistique des différences dans la représentation des personnages de films', 'es': 'Análisis lingüístico de las diferencias en la interpretación de los personajes de películas', 'pt': 'Análise linguística das diferenças na representação de personagens de filmes', 'ja': '映画の登場人物の描写の違いの言語学的分析', 'zh': '电影人物刻画异者语言学析', 'ru': 'Лингвистический анализ различий в изображении киноперсонажей', 'hi': 'फिल्म पात्रों के चित्रण में अंतर का भाषाई विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís teanga ar dhifríochtaí i léiriú carachtair scannáin', 'el': 'Γλωσσολογική ανάλυση διαφορών στην απεικόνιση χαρακτήρων ταινιών', 'it': 'Analisi linguistica delle differenze nella rappresentazione dei personaggi cinematografici', 'ka': 'ფილმის სიმბოლოების პორტრეაციის განსხვავებების ლინგისტიკური ანალიზი', 'hu': 'Filmszereplők ábrázolásának különbségeinek nyelvi elemzése', 'ms': 'Analisis bahasa perbezaan dalam gambar aksara filem', 'lt': 'Kino simbolių vaizdo skirtumų kalbinė analizė', 'mk': 'Linguistic analysis of differences in portrayal of movie characters', 'ml': 'സിനിമാ അക്ഷരങ്ങളുടെ പോര്\u200dട്രേയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുടെ ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് അന്വേഷിക', 'mt': 'Analiżi lingwistika tad-differenzi fir-ritrattar tal-karattri tal-films', 'pl': 'Analiza językowa różnic w przedstawieniu postaci filmowych', 'ro': 'Analiza lingvistică a diferențelor în portretizarea personajelor de film', 'sr': 'Lingistička analiza razlika u prikazu filmskih likova', 'mn': 'Киноны дүрсийн өөрчлөлтийн хэлбэрийн шинжилгээ', 'so': 'baaritaanka luuqadda ee kala duwan ee sawirka filimada', 'no': 'Linguistisk analyse av forskjeller i filmteikn', 'sv': 'Språklig analys av skillnader i skildring av filmkaraktärer', 'ta': 'படம் எழுத்துக்களின் காட்சியில் வேறுபாடுகளின் கோட்டியல் ஆய்வு', 'kk': 'Фильм таңбаларының көрсету түрлерінің лингвистикалық анализ', 'ur': 'فیلم شخصیٹوں کی تصویر میں اختلاف کی لینگویسٹی تحلیل', 'si': 'චිත්\u200dරපටි අක්ෂර වර්ගයේ වෙනස් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích ngôn ngữ của sự khác nhau trong diễn tả các nhân vật điện ảnh', 'da': 'Sprog analyse af forskelle i skildring af filmfigurer', 'hr': 'Lingistička analiza razlika u snimanju filmskih karaktera', 'nl': 'Taalkundige analyse van verschillen in de weergave van filmpersonages', 'id': 'Analisi bahasa perbedaan dalam gambar karakter film', 'ko': '영화 인물 묘사 차이의 언어학적 분석', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa lugha wa tofauti katika picha ya wahusika wa filamu', 'bg': 'Лингвистичен анализ на разликите в изобразяването на филмови герои', 'tr': 'Film karakterleriniň portrayalynda çykyşlyklaryň çyzgylyk analyzasy', 'af': 'Linguistiese analiseer van verskille in portrayal van filmkarakters', 'de': 'Sprachliche Analyse von Unterschieden in der Darstellung von Filmcharakteren', 'sq': 'Analiza gjuhësore e dallimeve në paraqitjen e personazheve të filmit', 'fa': 'تحلیل لینگی تفاوت در نمایش شخصیت فیلم', 'hy': 'ֆիլմի կերպարների նկարահանման տարբերությունների լեզվաբանական վերլուծությունը', 'am': 'የፊልዮ አካላት ማሳየት የልዩ ልዩነትን አስተያየት', 'az': 'Film karakterl…ôrinin portrayasƒ±nda f…ôrqli f…ôrqli analizi', 'ca': 'Anàlisi lingüístic de diferències en la retratació de personatges de pel·lícula', 'bn': 'চলচ্চিত্রের চলচ্চিত্রের প্রদর্শনে পার্থক্যের লিঙ্গিস্টিক বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Lingistička analiza razlika u snimanju filmskih likova', 'cs': 'Jazyková analýza rozdílů v zobrazení filmových postav', 'et': 'Filmitegelaste kujutamise erinevuste keeleline analüüs', 'fi': 'Kielellinen analyysi elokuvahahmojen esittämisen eroista', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Jezikovna analiza razlik v upodobitvi filmskih likov', 'he': 'ניתוח שפתי של הבדלים בתמונה של דמויות סרט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'པར་རིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'We examine differences in portrayal of characters in movies using psycholinguistic and graph theoretic measures computed directly from screenplays. Differences are examined with respect to characters’ gender, race, age and other metadata. Psycholinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialogues in movies using a linear regression model built on a set of manually annotated seed words. Interesting patterns are revealed about relationships between genders of production team and the gender ratio of characters. Several correlations are noted between gender, race, age of characters and the linguistic metrics.', 'ar': 'ندرس الاختلافات في تصوير الشخصيات في الأفلام باستخدام المقاييس النظرية اللغوية والنظرية للرسم البياني المحسوبة مباشرة من السيناريوهات. يتم فحص الاختلافات فيما يتعلق بجنس الشخصيات والعرق والعمر والبيانات الوصفية الأخرى. يتم استقراء المقاييس اللغوية النفسية في الحوارات في الأفلام باستخدام نموذج الانحدار الخطي المبني على مجموعة من الكلمات الأولية المشروحة يدويًا. تم الكشف عن أنماط مثيرة للاهتمام حول العلاقات بين جنس فريق الإنتاج ونسبة الشخصيات بين الجنسين. لوحظت العديد من الارتباطات بين الجنس والعرق وعمر الشخصيات والمقاييس اللغوية.', 'fr': "Nous examinons les différences dans la représentation des personnages dans les films à l'aide de mesures psycholinguistiques et théoriques des graphes calculées directement à partir de scénarios. Les différences sont examinées en fonction du sexe, de la race, de l'âge et d'autres métadonnées des personnages. Les mesures psycholinguistiques sont extrapolées aux dialogues dans les films à l'aide d'un modèle de régression linéaire construit sur un ensemble de mot-graines annotés manuellement. Des tendances intéressantes sont révélées sur les relations entre les sexes de l'équipe de production et le ratio hommes-femmes des personnages. Plusieurs corrélations sont observées entre le sexe, la race, l'âge des personnages et les paramètres linguistiques.", 'es': 'Examinamos las diferencias en la representación de los personajes en las películas utilizando medidas psicolingüísticas y teóricas gráficas calculadas directamente a partir de guiones. Se examinan las diferencias con respecto al género, la raza, la edad y otros metadatos de los personajes. Las métricas psicolingüísticas se extrapolan a los diálogos de las películas mediante un modelo de regresión lineal basado en un conjunto de palabras iniciales anotadas manualmente. Se revelan patrones interesantes sobre las relaciones entre los géneros del equipo de producción y la proporción de género de los personajes. Se observan varias correlaciones entre el género, la raza, la edad de los personajes y las métricas lingüísticas.', 'pt': 'Examinamos as diferenças na representação de personagens em filmes usando medidas psicolinguísticas e teóricas dos grafos computadas diretamente de roteiros. As diferenças são examinadas em relação ao gênero, raça, idade e outros metadados dos personagens. Métricas psicolinguísticas são extrapoladas para diálogos em filmes usando um modelo de regressão linear construído em um conjunto de palavras-semente anotadas manualmente. Padrões interessantes são revelados sobre as relações entre os gêneros da equipe de produção e a proporção de gênero dos personagens. Várias correlações são observadas entre gênero, raça, idade dos personagens e as métricas linguísticas.', 'ja': '脚本から直接計算された心理言語学的尺度とグラフ理論的尺度を用いて、映画におけるキャラクターの描写の違いを検討した。キャラクターの性別、人種、年齢、その他のメタデータに関して差異が検討されます。心理言語学的指標は、手動で注釈されたシードワードのセット上に構築された線形回帰モデルを使用して、映画内のダイアログに外挿される。製作陣の性別と登場人物の性別比の関係について、面白いパターンが明らかになっている。性別、人種、キャラクターの年齢と言語的指標との間にはいくつかの相関関係が指摘されている。', 'zh': '用直剧本之心语言学与图形之论,考电影中人物刻画之异。 检角色性别,种族,年及他元数之差。 心语言学指标用基于一朋手动注种词构者线性归模形外推至电影中对语。 夫作团队性别之际,角色之性,揭有趣之式。 性别,种种,角色年语指标间有数相关性。', 'hi': 'हम पटकथाओं से सीधे गणना किए गए साइकोलिंग्विस्टिक और ग्राफ सैद्धांतिक उपायों का उपयोग करके फिल्मों में पात्रों के चित्रण में अंतर की जांच करते हैं। वर्णों के लिंग, जाति, आयु और अन्य मेटाडेटा के संबंध में मतभेदों की जांच की जाती है। साइकोलिंग्विस्टिक मैट्रिक्स को मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट बीज शब्दों के एक सेट पर निर्मित रैखिक प्रतिगमन मॉडल का उपयोग करके फिल्मों में संवादों के लिए एक्सट्रपलेटेड किया जाता है। उत्पादन टीम के लिंग और पात्रों के लिंग अनुपात के बीच संबंधों के बारे में दिलचस्प पैटर्न का पता चला है। लिंग, जाति, पात्रों की आयु और भाषाई मैट्रिक्स के बीच कई सहसंबंधों का उल्लेख किया गया है।', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем различия в изображении персонажей в фильмах, используя психолингвистические и графологические теоретические меры, вычисленные непосредственно из сценариев. Расхождения изучаются в отношении пола, расы, возраста и других метаданных персонажей. Психолингвистические показатели экстраполируются на диалоги в фильмах с использованием линейной регрессионной модели, построенной на наборе аннотированных вручную исходных слов. Раскрыты интересные закономерности взаимоотношений между полами производственного коллектива и соотношения полов персонажей. Отмечается несколько корреляций между полом, расой, возрастом персонажей и лингвистическими показателями.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaímid difríochtaí i léiriú carachtair i scannáin ag baint úsáide as bearta teoiriciúla síceolaíochta agus grafa a ríomhtar go díreach ó scripteanna. Scrúdaítear na difríochtaí maidir le hinscne, cine, aois agus meiteashonraí eile carachtair. Déantar méadracht shíctheangeolaíoch a eachtarshuíomh chuig comhphlé i scannáin ag baint úsáide as samhail líneach aischéimniúcháin atá bunaithe ar thacar de shíolfhocail atá anótáilte de láimh. Nochtar patrúin spéisiúla faoin gcaidreamh idir inscne na foirne léiriúcháin agus cóimheas inscne na gcarachtar. Tugtar faoi deara go leor comhghaolta idir inscne, cine, aois carachtair agus an mhéadracht theangeolaíoch.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ფილმებში სიმბოლოების პორტრეაციის განსხვავებას გამოყენებთ ფსიკოლენგისტიკური და გრაფიკური ტეორეტიკური მოზემილებების გამოყენება, რომლებიც კომპუტერე განსხვავებები განსხვავებულია სიმბოლოების გენექცია, პაცია, ასე და სხვა მეტადატატატატის განსხვავებაზე. Psycholinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialogs in movies using a linear regression model built on a set of manually annotated seed words. ინტერესტიური შაბლონები გამოჩვენებულია პროექტირების გენექციების და სიმბოლოების გენექციების შესახებ. ბევრი კორელეციები ჩვენებულია გენექსი, პასუზის, სიმბოლოების ასე და ლენგურისტიკური მეტრიკის შორის.', 'hu': 'A filmek karaktereinek ábrázolásában mutatkozó különbségeket közvetlenül forgatókönyvekből kiszámított pszicholingvistikus és gráf-elméleti mérésekkel vizsgáljuk. A különbségeket a karakterek neme, faja, életkor és egyéb metaadatok tekintetében vizsgáljuk. A pszicholingvistikus mutatókat a filmek párbeszédeihez extrapoláljuk lineáris regressziós modell segítségével, amely manuálisan jegyzetelt vetőszavakra épül. Érdekes mintákat tárunk fel a produkciós csapat nemei közötti kapcsolatokról és a karakterek nemi arányáról. Számos összefüggést figyelhetünk meg a nem, a faj, a karakterek kora és a nyelvi mutatók között.', 'it': "Esaminiamo le differenze nella rappresentazione dei personaggi nei film utilizzando misure psicolinguistiche e teoriche dei grafici calcolate direttamente dalle sceneggiature. Le differenze sono esaminate per quanto riguarda il sesso, la razza, l'età e altri metadati dei personaggi. Le metriche psicolinguistiche sono estrapolate nei dialoghi nei film utilizzando un modello di regressione lineare costruito su un set di parole iniziali annotate manualmente. Interessanti modelli sono rivelati sulle relazioni tra i generi del team di produzione e il rapporto di genere dei personaggi. Si notano diverse correlazioni tra genere, razza, età dei caratteri e metriche linguistiche.", 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε τις διαφορές στην απεικόνιση χαρακτήρων σε ταινίες χρησιμοποιώντας ψυχογλωσσικά και γραφειοθεωρητικά μέτρα που υπολογίζονται απευθείας από σενάρια. Εξετάζονται διαφορές όσον αφορά το φύλο, τη φυλή, την ηλικία και άλλα μεταδεδομένα των χαρακτήρων. Οι ψυχογλωσσικές μετρήσεις εξάγονται σε διαλόγους σε ταινίες χρησιμοποιώντας ένα γραμμικό μοντέλο παλινδρόμησης βασισμένο σε ένα σύνολο χειροκίνητων σχολιασμένων λέξεων. Ενδιαφέροντα μοτίβα αποκαλύπτονται σχετικά με τις σχέσεις μεταξύ των φύλων της ομάδας παραγωγής και την αναλογία φύλου των χαρακτήρων. Υπάρχουν διάφοροι συσχετισμοί μεταξύ φύλου, φυλής, ηλικίας χαρακτήρων και γλωσσικών μετρήσεων.', 'lt': 'Mes nagrinėjame filmuose esančių simbolių vaizdo skirtumus naudojant psicholinguistines ir grafinių teorinių priemonių, apskaičiuotų tiesiogiai iš vaizdo vaizdo. Tiriami skirtumai, susiję su charakterių lytimi, rase, amžiumi ir kitais metaduomenimis. Psikologiniai rodikliai ekstrapoliuojami į dialogus filmuose naudojant linijinį regresijos model į, pagrįstą rankiniu būdu užrašytų sėklos žodžių rinkiniu. Įdomūs modeliai rodo gamybos grupės lyčių santykius ir lyčių santykį. Pastebėta keletas lyties, rasės, simbolių amžiaus ir kalbinių rodiklių koreliacijų.', 'mk': 'Ги испитуваме разликите во прикажувањето на ликовите во филмовите користејќи психолингвистички и графски теоретички мерки кои се компјутираат директно од сценариото. Различностите се испитуваат во однос на полот, расата, возраста и другите метадатоци на ликовите. Психолингистичките метрики се екстраполирани на дијалози во филмовите користејќи линијарен регресен модел изграден на набор рачно анотирани зборови за семе. Интересни шеми се откриени за односите помеѓу половите на производствениот тим и односот помеѓу половите на ликовите. Неколку корелации се забележани помеѓу полот, расата, возраста на ликовите и јазичните метрики.', 'ms': 'Kami memeriksa perbezaan dalam gambar aksara dalam filem menggunakan tindakan teori psikologi dan graf yang dikira secara langsung dari skrin. Perbezaan diperiksa berkaitan dengan jenis aksara, ras, umur dan metadata lain. Metrik psikologistik dieksterpolerasi ke dialog dalam filem menggunakan model regresi linear dibina pada set kata benih yang ditandai secara manual. Corak menarik diketahui mengenai hubungan antara jenis pasukan produksi dan nisbah jenis aksara. Beberapa korelasi dicatat antara jenis, ras, umur aksara dan metrik bahasa.', 'mt': 'Aħna teżamina d-differenzi fir-ritrattar tal-karattri fil-films bl-użu ta’ miżuri teoretiċi psikoloġiċi u grafiċi kkalkulati direttament mill-iskrinji. Id-differenzi huma eżaminati fir-rigward tas-sess, ir-razza, l-età u metadejta oħra tal-karattri. Il-metriċi psikoloġiċi huma estrapolati għal djalogi fil-films bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ rigressjoni lineari mibni fuq sett ta’ kliem taż-żerriegħa annotati manwalment. Tiżvelaw mudelli interessanti dwar ir-relazzjonijiet bejn is-sessi tat-tim tal-produzzjoni u l-proporzjon bejn is-sessi tal-karattri. Diversi korrelazzjonijiet huma nnutati bejn is-sess, ir-razza, l-età tal-karattri u l-metriċi lingwistiċi.', 'ml': 'സിനിമയിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. സൈക്കോലിന്\u200dഗ്രീനിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ചും നേരിട്ട് സ്ക്ര വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലേഖ, വംശം, വയസ്സ്, മറ്റു മെറ്റാഡാറ്റിനെക്കുറിച്ചും പരിശോധിക്കപ സിക്കോലിന്\u200dഗിസ്റ്റിക മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d സിനിമയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനായി സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കൂട്ടം കൈയ്യില്\u200d കുറ്റം വിത് ആശ്ചര്യപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജന്തുക്കളുടെ തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും പ്രകടനം  സ്വഭാവകാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള കുറച്ചു ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കുറിച്ച് കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Badamy różnice w przedstawieniu postaci w filmach przy użyciu miarów psycholingwistycznych i teoretycznych wykresów obliczonych bezpośrednio ze scenariuszy. Badane są różnice w odniesieniu do płci, rasy, wieku i innych metadanych postaci. Metryki psycholingwistyczne są ekstrapolowane do dialogów w filmach za pomocą modelu regresji liniowej zbudowanego na zestawie ręcznie adnotacyjnych słów nasiennych. Ujawniono ciekawe wzorce relacji pomiędzy płcią zespołu produkcyjnego a stosunkiem płci postaci. Odnotowano kilka korelacji między płcią, rasą, wiekiem postaci a wskaźnikami językowymi.', 'ro': 'Examinăm diferențele în portretizarea personajelor din filme folosind măsuri psihologistice și teoretice grafice calculate direct din scenarii. Diferențele sunt examinate în ceea ce privește sexul, rasa, vârsta și alte metadate ale personajelor. Măsurătorile psihologistice sunt extrapolate în dialoguri în filme folosind un model de regresie liniară construit pe un set de cuvinte semințe adnotate manual. Sunt dezvăluite modele interesante despre relațiile dintre sexele echipei de producție și raportul de gen al personajelor. Se observă mai multe corelații între sex, rasă, vârsta caracterelor și măsurătorile lingvistice.', 'kk': 'Біз психолингвистикалық және графикалық теориялық өлшемдерді фильмдегі таңбалардың порттрауларының айырмашылығын тексереміз. Таңбалардың гені, расы, жас және басқа метадеректеріне қарсы айырмашылықтар тексеріледі. Психолингвистикалық метрикалық фильмдердің диалогтарына сызық регрессиялық үлгісін қолмен белгіленген тізбекті сөздерді қолдану үшін қолданылады. Қызықты үлгілер жасау тобының гендерлік және гендерлік таңбалардың қатынасы туралы көрсетіледі. Бірнеше кореляциялар гендер, рас, таңбалар және лингвистикалық метрикалық арасында байланысты.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker ulike forskjeller i portretning av teikn i filmar med psycholinguistiske og grafiske teoretiske målar rekna ut direkte frå skjermspelar. Forskjeller vert undersøkt med hensyn til seks, rase, alder og andre metadata for teikn. Psycholinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialogues in movies using a linear regression model built on a set of manually annotated seed words. Interesantne mønsterelement vert opna om forholdet mellom seks av produksjonsgruppa og seksforholdet mellom teikn. Fleire korrelasjonar vert notata mellom seks, rase, alder av teikn og språkstiske metrikar.', 'so': 'We examine differences in portrayal of characters in movies using psycholinguistic and graph theoretic measures computed directly from screenplays.  Waxaa lagu baaraandegaa kala duwan jinsiga, jinsiga, race, da’da iyo macluumaadyo kale oo la xiriira karo. Midabka dhimirka ah waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa baalooyinka filimada, waxaana lagu isticmaalaa model korriinka linear ah oo lagu qoray qoraal qof ka mid ah erayo kordhaya. Noocyada xiiseynta waxaa la muujiyaa xiriirka la xiriira ragga dhalinyarada iyo qeybta jinsiga. Xiriir badan waxaa lagu qoraa jinsi, race, da’da da iyo qoraalka luuqada.', 'sr': 'Pregledavamo razlike u prikazu likova u filmovima koristeći psihologističke i grafičke teorijske mjere izračunale direktno od snimka. Razlika se pregledava u pogledu spola, rase, godine i ostalih metapodataka karaktera. Psiholingustičke metrike se ekstrapoliraju na dijaloge u filmovima koristeći linearni regresijski model izgrađen na setu rukopisanih reči semena. Interesantni obrazac se otkriva o odnosima između spola proizvodnje tima i odnosu na spol karaktera. Nekoliko korelacija je zabilježeno između spola, rase, doba karaktera i jezičke metrike.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker skillnader i skildring av karaktärer i filmer med hjälp av psykolingvistiska och grafteoretiska mått beräknade direkt från manus. Skillnader undersöks med avseende på karaktärers kön, ras, ålder och andra metadata. Psykologistiska mätvärden extrapoleras till dialoger i filmer med hjälp av en linjär regressionsmodell byggd på en uppsättning manuellt kommenterade utsädesord. Intressanta mönster avslöjas om relationer mellan könen i produktionsteamet och könsförhållandet mellan karaktärer. Flera korrelationer noteras mellan kön, ras, karaktärsålder och språkliga mått.', 'mn': 'Бид психолингийн, график теоретикийн хэмжээсүүдийг шууд шрийн тоглоомоос тооцоолж байгаа кинонуудын зурагт өөрчлөлтийг судалж байна. Хэрэглэгчдийн генс, рас, нас болон бусад мета-өгөгдлийн тухай өөрчлөлт шалгана. Психолингийн метрик кинонуудын диалог дээр гараар анзаарсан тарианы үг дээр баригдсан шугам регрессийн загвар ашиглаж байдаг. Хамгийн сонирхолтой дүрс нь үйлдвэрлэлтийн гендер баг болон хүн төрөлхтний харьцаа хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой. Хүний бэлгийн, уран, дүрс, хэлний метрик хоорондоо олон холбоотой байдаг.', 'si': 'අපි චිත්\u200dරපටියේ ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියේ ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියේ වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මාසික භාෂාවිකාර සහ ග්\u200dරාෆ් සාධාරණ වෙනස් අකුරුවන්ගේ ජීවිත, රේස්, වයස සහ අනිත් මෙටාඩේටාව ගැන බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා. Psykolinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialog in cinemas. Using a linear regression Model, building on a set of handly annuted semen Words. විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කණ්ඩායම් සමග සම්බන්ධතා ගැන ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා. ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්දේශ කරලා තියෙනවා ජෙන්ඩර්, රේස්, අක්ෂර වර්ෂය සහ භාෂාවික මෙට්\u200dරිකාව', 'ta': 'நாம் படங்களில் உள்ள எழுத்துக்களின் காட்சியில் வேறுபாடுகளை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். நேரடியாக திரைக்காட்சி விளையாட்டுகளில்  எழுத்துக்களின் இனம், race, வயது மற்றும் மற்ற மெடெட்டேடைகள் பற்றிய மாறுபாடுகள் பரிசோதிக்கப்படுகின்றன. சிக்கல் மெட்ரிக்கள் சித்திரங்களில் உரையாடல்களுக்கு கூடுதலாக்கப்படுகிறது ஒரு கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட விதிகளின் மூலம் உரையாடல சுவாரசியமான வடிவங்கள் பொருள் குழுவின் ஆண்களுக்கிடையே தொடர்புகள் பற்றி தெரியும் மற்றும் எழுத்துக்களின்  பெண், இனம், வயது, எழுத்துக்களின் வயது மற்றும் மொழியில் முறைகளுக்கு இடையே பல இணைப்புகள் குறிப்பிடுகின்றன.', 'ur': 'ہم فیلموں میں شخصیٹوں کی تصویر میں تفاوت کی مطابق مطابق روانشناسی اور گراف تئوریٹی مطابق مطابق اسکرینپل سے کامپیوتر کیا گیا ہے۔ اختلاف شخص کے جنس، نژاد، عمر اور دوسری مٹا ڈاٹا کے بارے میں آزمائش کی جاتی ہے. روانی زبان کی متریک فیلموں میں صحیح گفتگو کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے ایک لینار ریگرس موڈل کے مطابق ایک مجموعہ کے ذریعہ مضبوط صحیح لفظوں پر بنایا جاتا ہے. پیدائش ٹیم کے جنس اور جنس نسل نسل نسل نسل کے بارے میں تعلقات کے بارے میں ظاہر کی جاتی ہے. بہت سی تعلقات جنس، نژاد، شخصیٹوں کی عمر اور زبان متریک کے درمیان یاد کیے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz filmlarda o'xshash shakllarning shakllarini o'rganimiz, sinkologik va teoretik amallarini aniqlash uchun o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. @ info: whatsthis Name Ko'rib chiqish usullar taqdimot tashkilotning jamoasi jamiyatlaridagi munosabatlar haqida ko'rsatiladi. Ko'pchilik munosabatlar jinsiya, rasm, harflar yoshi va tillik metriklari орасида aniqlanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phân tích sự khác nhau trong việc vẽ các nhân vật trong phim sử dụng các biện pháp về ngôn ngữ học và đo định lý đồ thị được tính trực tiếp từ kịch bản. Sự khác biệt được kiểm tra về tính chất, chủng tộc, tuổi tác và các siêu dữ liệu khác. Tâm lý âm học được tính ra cho các ca trong phim, sử dụng một mô hình hồi phục tuyến tính được xây dựng trên một bộ từ hạt được ghi chú bằng tay. Các mô hình thú vị được tiết lộ về mối quan hệ giữa giới tính của nhóm sản xuất và tỷ lệ giới tính của các nhân vật. Nhiều mối liên hệ giữa giới tính, chủng tộc, độ tuổi của nhân vật và âm lượng ngôn ngữ.', 'hr': 'Pregledavamo razlike u prikazu likova u filmovima koristeći psihologističke i grafičke teorijske mjere izračunale direktno od snimka. Razlika se ispitiva u pogledu spola, rase, doba i ostalih metapodataka karaktera. Psiholingustičke metrike ekstrapoliraju se na dijaloge u filmovima koristeći linearni regresijski model izgrađen na setu rukopisnih riječi sjemena. Zanimljivi obrasce otkrivaju se o odnosima između spola proizvodnjeg tima i odnosu na spol karaktera. Nekoliko korelacija je zabilježeno između spola, rase, doba karaktera i jezičke metrike.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger forskelle i skildring af figurer i film ved hjælp af psykolingvistiske og grafteoretiske målinger beregnet direkte fra manuskripter. Forskelle undersøges med hensyn til tegnenes køn, race, alder og andre metadata. Psykolingistiske målinger ekstrapoleres til dialoger i film ved hjælp af en lineær regressionsmodel bygget på et sæt manuelt kommenterede frøord. Interessante mønstre afsløres om forholdet mellem køn i produktionsholdet og kønsforholdet mellem figurer. Der noteres adskillige korrelationer mellem køn, race, alder af tegn og de sproglige målinger.', 'nl': "We onderzoeken verschillen in de weergave van personages in films aan de hand van psycholinguïstische en grafiektheoretische metingen die rechtstreeks uit scenario's worden berekend. Verschillen worden onderzocht met betrekking tot geslacht, ras, leeftijd en andere metadata van personages. Psycholinguïstische metrics worden geëxtrapoleerd naar dialogen in films met behulp van een lineair regressiemodel dat is gebouwd op een set handmatig geannoteerde startwoorden. Interessante patronen worden onthuld over relaties tussen geslachten van productieteam en de genderverhouding van karakters. Verschillende correlaties worden opgemerkt tussen geslacht, ras, leeftijd van karakters en de taalkundige metrics.", 'de': 'Wir untersuchen Unterschiede in der Darstellung von Charakteren in Filmen anhand psycholinguistischer und graphentheoretischer Maßnahmen, die direkt aus Drehbüchern berechnet werden. Unterschiede werden hinsichtlich Geschlecht, Rasse, Alter und anderer Metadaten untersucht. Psycholingustische Metriken werden mittels eines linearen Regressionsmodells auf Dialoge in Filmen extrapoliert, das auf einer Reihe von manuell kommentierten Startwörtern basiert. Interessante Muster werden über die Beziehungen zwischen den Geschlechtern des Produktionsteams und das Geschlechterverhältnis der Charaktere aufgedeckt. Es werden mehrere Korrelationen zwischen Geschlecht, Rasse, Alter der Charaktere und den sprachlichen Kennzahlen festgestellt.', 'ko': '우리는 심리언어학과 도론의 방법을 사용하여 극본에서 영화 속 인물 묘사의 차이를 직접 계산해 낸다.캐릭터의 성별, 인종, 연령과 기타 메타데이터에 따라 차이를 검사한다.심리언어학 지표는 인공 주석 종자어를 바탕으로 하는 선형 회귀 모델을 통해 영화의 대화로 확대된다.흥미로운 모델은 생산진의 성별과 역할의 성별 비례 간의 관계를 보여준다.성별, 인종, 역할 연령, 언어 지표 사이에는 약간의 관련성이 있다.', 'id': 'Kami memeriksa perbedaan dalam gambar karakter dalam film menggunakan tindakan teori psikologis dan grafik yang dikomputerkan langsung dari layar. Perbedaan diperiksa dalam hal jenis karakter, ras, usia dan metadata lainnya. Metrik psikologis ekstrapolasi ke dialog dalam film menggunakan model regresi linear dibangun pada set kata benih yang ditandai secara manual. pola yang menarik diketahui tentang hubungan antara jenis tim produksi dan nisbah jenis karakter. Several correlations are noted between gender, race, age of characters and the linguistic metrics.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu tofauti katika picha za wahusika kwenye filamu kwa kutumia mbinu za kisaikolojia na picha za hatua za nadharia zilizokadiriwa moja kwa moja kutoka kwenye michezo ya maonesho. Kutofauti zinachunguzwa kuhusu jinsia, rangi, umri na taarifa nyingine za meta. mbinu za kisaikolojia zinachaguliwa kwa mazungumzo katika filamu kwa kutumia mtindo wa kudhibiti mstari ulioanzishwa kwenye seti ya maneno yanayovutiwa kwa manufaa. Miundo ya kusisimua inaonyesha kuhusu mahusiano kati ya jinsia ya timu ya uzalishaji na kiwango cha ngono cha wahusika. Mahusiano kadhaa yanabainishwa kati ya jinsia, rangi, umri wa wahusika na mitindo ya lugha.', 'tr': 'Biz kinolardaki karakterleriň portrayalynda psikoplingwistiki we grafik teoriýasy çykyşlaryny ekranlardan düzgün hasaplanýarys. Karakterler cinsiýa, ýaş, ýaşy we başga metadata bilen üýtgeşmeler bardyr. Psikolingwistiki metrikalar filmlerde çyzgyly regressiýa nusgasyny eliden nähili sözlerde guruldy. Gynamly nusgalar üretim toparynyň cinsiýasynyň we cinsiýasynyň proporsiýasynyň bardygyny görkezilýär. Jens, ýarym, karakterleriň ýaşy we dil metrikleriniň arasynda birnäçe gollaşdyrylýar.', 'bg': 'Изследваме разликите в изобразяването на герои във филмите, използвайки психолингвистични и графични теоретични мерки, изчислени директно от сценарии. Разгледани са разликите по отношение на пола, расата, възрастта и други метаданни на героите. Психолингвистичните метрики са екстраполирани към диалози във филми, използвайки линеен регресионен модел, изграден върху набор от ръчно анотирани начални думи. Разкриват се интересни модели за взаимоотношенията между половете на производствения екип и съотношението между половете на героите. Отбелязани са няколко корелации между пол, раса, възраст на знаците и лингвистичните показатели.', 'sq': "Ne shqyrtojmë dallimet në paraqitjen e personazheve në filma duke përdorur masat teorike psikologjike dhe grafike të llogaritura drejtpërdrejt nga skenarët. Differences are examined with respect to characters' gender, race, age and other metadata.  Metrikat psikologjike janë ekstrapolizuar në dialoge në filma duke përdorur një model regresioni linear të ndërtuar mbi një sërë fjalësh të shënuara manualisht. Modele interesante zbulohen rreth marrëdhënieve midis gjinorëve të ekipit të prodhimit dhe raportit gjinorë të karakterëve. Several correlations are noted between gender, race, age of characters and the linguistic metrics.", 'am': 'በፊልሞዎች ላይ የፊደል ግንኙነቶችን እና የሲኮልቋንቋዊ እና የቴዎርቲካዊ ስርዓት ከስክሪን ጨዋታ የተቆጠሩትን እናፈትናለን፡፡ በሥርዓት፣ የዘር፣ የሽማግሌ እና ሌሎችም መዳረጃ ላይ ልዩ ልዩነት ይሞክራሉ፡፡ የሲኮልቋንቋ ማተሚያዎች በሲንኳን ላይ በተመሳሳይ የዘር ቃላት በይፋ የተሠራ የመስመር ሞዴል በተጨማሪው ስልክ ለመስመር ይጨመርባቸዋል፡፡ የአመሳሳይ ምሳሌዎች የውጤት ቡድን እና የውጤት ግንኙነት እና የሥርዓት ፍጥረት ግንኙነት የሚታየቁ ናቸው፡፡ የሴት፣ የዘር፣ የዕድሜ እድሜ እና የቋንቋዊ ሚትሪክ መካከል ብዙዎችን ግንኙነት ያስታወቃል።', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ֆիլմերի հերոսների նկարահանման տարբերությունները օգտագործելով հոգեբանական և գրաֆիկական տեսական չափումներ, որոնք հաշվարկվում են ուղղակի էկրանի նկարներից: Տարբերությունները ուսումնասիրում են հերոսների սեռի, ռասի, տարիքի և այլ մետատվյալների հետ կապված: Հոգեբանական մետրիկները արտադրվում են ֆիլմերում գծային ռեգրեսիայի մոդելի միջոցով, որը կառուցվում է ձեռքով գրված սերմի բառերի շարքի վրա: Հետաքրքիր կաղապարներ են բացահայտվում արտադրողական թիմի գենդերային հարաբերությունների և հերոսների գենդերային հարաբերության մասին: Շատ համեմատություններ են նկատվում գենդերային, ռասայի, հիերոգլիֆների տարիքի և լեզվաբանական չափումների միջև:', 'fa': 'ما تفاوت\u200cهایی در نمایش شخصیت\u200cهای فیلم را با استفاده از اندازه\u200cهای نظریه روانی زبان\u200cشناسی و گراف محاسبه می\u200cکنیم که مستقیماً از نمایش\u200cهای صفحه محاسبه شده است. تفاوت\u200cها با نسبت به جنس، نژاد، سن و دیگر متداد\u200cهای شخصیت تحقیق می\u200cشوند. متریک روانشناسی روانشناسی برای گفتگوهای فیلم استفاده از یک مدل بازگشت خطی بر مجموعه کلمات دانه\u200cهای دستی ساخته شده است. الگوهای جالبی در مورد رابطه بین جنسی از تیم تولید و نسبت جنسی از شخصیت ها ظاهر می شوند. تعدادی از ارتباطات بین جنس، نژاد، سن شخصیت و متریک زبان شناخته می شوند.', 'az': 'Biz cinlərdə psixolingvistiki və grafik teoriki ölçülərini istifadə edərək filmlərin portrayasında müxtəlif fərqlərə baxırıq. Karakterlərin cinsi, ırq, yaş və digər metadata haqqında fərqləndirilər. Psikoliğ metrikləri filmlərdə dəyişiklik məlumatlarına, əl-əl nöqtəli dəyişiklik sözlərinin üstündə in şa edilmiş linear regresiya modeli ilə istifadə edilir. İlginç modellər üretim ekibinin cinsi və cins nəticəsi arasındakı bağlantılar haqqında ortaya çıxarılır. Cinlər, ırklar, karakterlərin yaşı və dil metrikləri arasında çoxlu bağlantılar məlumatlandır.', 'bn': 'আমরা সিনেমার চরিত্রের ছবিতে পার্থক্য পরীক্ষা করি মানসিক ভাষা এবং স্ক্রীন প্লেস থেকে সরাসরি হিসেবে গ্রাফ করা হয়েছে। অক্ষরের লিঙ্গ, বর্ণ, বয়স এবং অন্যান্য মেটাডাটা সম্পর্কে পার্থক্য পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে। সাইকোলিঙ্গিস্টিক মেট্রিক চলচ্চিত্রের মধ্যে আলোচনার জন্য এক্সট্রিপলেট করা হয়েছে একটি লাইনিয়ার রিগ্রেশন মডেল ব্যবহার করে একটি সেটের কৌতুহলজনক প্যানেট প্রকাশিত হয়েছে উৎপাদনের দলের লিঙ্গের সম্পর্ক এবং চরিত্রের লিঙ্গের মাঝে সম্পর্ক। লিঙ্গ, বর্ণ, অক্ষর এবং ভাষাগত মেট্রিকের মধ্যে বেশ কয়েকটি সম্পর্ক উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme rozdíly v zobrazování postav ve filmech pomocí psycholingvistických a grafově teoretických měřítek vypočítaných přímo ze scénářů. Rozdíly jsou zkoumány s ohledem na pohlaví, rasu, věk a další metadata postav. Psycholingvistické metriky jsou extrapolovány do dialogů ve filmech pomocí lineárního regresního modelu postaveného na sadě ručně anotovaných semenních slov. Jsou odhaleny zajímavé vzorce o vztazích mezi pohlavími produkčního týmu a genderovém poměru postav. Je zaznamenáno několik korelací mezi pohlavím, rasou, věkem postav a jazykovými metrikami.', 'et': 'Uurime erinevusi tegelaste kujutamises filmides psühholingvistiliste ja graafikuteoreetiliste mõõtmete abil, mis arvutatakse otse stsenaariumidest. Erinevusi uuritakse seoses tegelaste soo, rassi, vanuse ja muude metaandmetega. Psühholingvistilised meetrikud ekstrapoleeritakse dialoogidele filmides, kasutades lineaarset regressioonimudelit, mis põhineb käsitsi annoteeritud seemnesõnadel. Näidatakse huvitavaid mustreid tootmismeeskonna soode ja tegelaste soosuhete kohta. Soo, rassi, tähemärkide vanuse ja keeleliste näitajate vahel on märgitud mitmeid seoseid.', 'bs': 'Pregledavamo razlike u prikazu likova u filmovima koristeći psihologističke i grafičke teorijske mjere izračunale direktno od snimka. Pregledavaju se razlike u odnosu na spol, rasu, dob i ostale metadata likova. Psiholingustičke metrike se ekstrapoliraju na dijaloge u filmovima koristeći linearni regresijski model izgrađen na setu ručno annotiranih sjemenskih riječi. Zanimljivi obrasci su otkriveni o odnosima između spola proizvodnje tima i odnosu na spol karaktera. Nekoliko korelacija je zabilježeno između spola, rase, doba karaktera i jezičke metrike.', 'ca': "Examinem les diferències en la retratació de personatges en les pel·lícules utilitzant mesures teòriques psicol·inguistes i gràfics calculades directament a partir de projectes. Les diferències es examinen en relació al gènere, raça, edat i altres metadades dels caràcters. Psycholinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialogues in movies using a linear regression model built on a set of manually annotated seed words.  Es revelen patrons interessants sobre les relacions entre gèneres de l'equip de producció i la proporció de gènere de caràcters. Es veuen diverses correlacions entre gènere, raça, edat dels caràcters i les mètriques lingüístices.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme elokuvien hahmojen esittämisen eroja psykolingvististen ja suoraan käsikirjoituksista laskettujen graafiteoreettisten mittausten avulla. Eroja tarkastellaan hahmojen sukupuolen, rodun, iän ja muun metatiedon suhteen. Psykolingivistiset mittarit ekstrapoloidaan elokuvien dialogeihin käyttämällä lineaarista regressiomallia, joka perustuu manuaalisesti merkityihin siemensanoihin. Mielenkiintoisia kuvioita paljastuu tuotantoryhmän sukupuolten välisistä suhteista ja hahmojen sukupuolisuhteesta. Sukupuoli, rotu, hahmojen ikä ja kielelliset mittasuhteet ovat erilaisia.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek verskille in portrayal van karakters in filme met die gebruik van psyklinguistiese en graafteorieese maatskappe wat direk van skermspeletjies bereken is. Verskilte word ondersoek met respek na karakters se geneem, rase, ouderdom en ander metadata. Psycholinguistic metrics word ekstrapoliseer na dialoog in filme met gebruik van 'n lineêre regresie model gebou op' n stel van handmatig annotateerde saad woorde. Interesante patrone word openbaar oor verhoudinge tussen genade van produksieteam en die genaamde verhouding van karakters. Verskeie korrelasies word opgemerk tussen geneem, rase, ouderdom van karakters en die lingwisiese metriek.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno kalalah ning sampeyan kanggo Kemerdekaan karo film ning gambar kelangan resmi sing nggawe barang theoretik karo barang seneng pisan-pukung. Dibah-Dibah sing bisa ngubah karo akeh sampeyan karo perusahaan, rase, edah lan metadata sing menehi. Ngucap structural navigation Ana kudhakan langgar sampeyan gélah, rasu, tau karo perusahaan lan angka dipulangan ingkang.', 'he': 'אנחנו בודקים את ההבדלים בתמונה של דמויות בסרטים באמצעות אמצעים פסיכולוגיים וגרפים תיאורטיים מחוברים ישירות מהסרטים. הבדלים נבדקים בנוגע למין, גזע, גיל ומטאדאטות אחרות של הדמויות. מטריות פסיכולינגיסטיות מופרצות לדיולוגים בסרטים באמצעות מודל גילוי לינרי שנבנה על קבוצה של מילים זרעים מוכתבות ידנית. דפוסים מעניינים נחשופים על מערכות יחסים בין מינים של צוות הפקה וליחסי מין של דמויות. יש קשרים רבים בין מין, גזע, גיל הדמויות והמטריקה השפתית.', 'sk': 'Razlike pri upodobitvi likov v filmih preučujemo s psiholingvističnimi in grafsko teoretičnimi merili, izračunanimi neposredno iz scenarijev. Proučujejo se razlike glede na spol, raso, starost in druge metapodatke likov. Psiholingvistične metrike so ekstrapolirane na dialoge v filmih z uporabo linearnega regresijskega modela, zgrajenega na naboru ročno označenih semenskih besed. Razkrivamo zanimive vzorce odnosov med spoloma produkcijske ekipe in razmerjem med spoloma likov. Ugotovljenih je več korelacij med spolom, raso, starostjo znakov in jezikovnimi metrikami.', 'ha': 'Haƙĩƙa, Munã jarraba sãɓãni cikin taskõki cikin filayen da ke yi amfani da kokafoliki da akan teoreti wanda aka lissafa daga filayen fuskar kwamfyuta. Ana jarraba rarrabai game da jinin, rasmi, tsohon da wasu metadata. Ana fiɗe wa zauren akoli cikin zauren akwatin filayen, ana yi amfani da wani misali na canje-regression wa linjeri wanda aka samar da shi kan tsarin tsarin tsarin sarki da hannun aka zartar da shi. Ina ƙidãya da sune a bayan mazaunin mutane da mutane da rabon mutane. Ana nuna wasu masu husũma a tsakanin jini, rasa, tsohon sarki da misalin linguistic.', 'bo': 'We examine differences in portrayal of characters in movies using psycholinguistic and graph theoretic measures computed directly from screenplays. ཁྱད་པར་ནི་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་། སྐྱེས་བ་དང་། བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་གཞན་ཡང་བསྟུན་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ། Psycholinguistic metrics are extrapolated to dialogues in movies using a linear regression model built on a set of manually annotated seed words. དམིགས་བསལ་བའི་གཟུགས་རིས་བྱུང་བ་དེ་དམིགས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་འདི་མང་ཙམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Linguistically Regularized LSTM for Sentiment Classification', 'pt': 'LSTM Linguisticamente Regularizado para Classificação de Sentimentos', 'es': 'LSTM regularizado lingüísticamente para la clasificación de sentimientos', 'ar': 'LSTM المنظم لغويًا لتصنيف المشاعر', 'fr': 'LSTM régularisé linguistiquement pour la classification des sentiments', 'hi': 'भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए भाषाई रूप से नियमित एलएसटीएम', 'ja': 'センチメント分類のための言語学的に正規化されたLSTM', 'zh': '情类之语规范化 LSTM', 'ru': 'Лингвистически упорядоченная LSTM для классификации сентиментов', 'ga': "LSTM a Rialaíodh go Teanga d'Aicmiú Meonchain", 'ka': 'ლინგუტიკურად რეგილურაციული LSTM სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის', 'el': 'Γλωσσολογικά ρυθμιζόμενη LSTM για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'Nyelvtanilag szabályozott LSTM az érzelmi osztályozáshoz', 'it': 'LSTM linguisticamente regolamentato per la classificazione dei sentimenti', 'kk': 'Sentiment классификациясы үшін лингвистикалық түрде регулирілген LSTM', 'lt': 'Sentimento klasifikavimui skirtas lingvistiškai reguliuojamas LSTM', 'mk': 'Лингвистички регулизиран LSTM за класификација на чувства', 'ms': 'LSTM Diregularisasi secara bahasa untuk Klasifikasi Sentiment', 'ml': 'Sentiment Classification', 'mt': 'LSTM Regolarizzat Lingwistikament għall-Klassifikazzjoni tas-Sentiment', 'mn': 'Сэтгэлийн классификацийн хувьд хэлбэрээр дүрслэгдсэн LSTM', 'no': 'Lingstysk regulert LSTM for sentiserte klassifikasjon', 'ro': 'LSTM reglementat lingvistic pentru clasificarea sentimentelor', 'sr': 'Lingistički regulisan LSTM za sentimentnu klasifikaciju', 'pl': 'Regularizowany językowo LSTM dla klasyfikacji sentymentów', 'so': 'Luqada lagu soocay LSTM', 'si': 'Sentiment Classified', 'sv': 'Språkligt reglerad LSTM för sentimentklassificering', 'ta': 'உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு வரிசைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட LSTM', 'ur': 'Sentiment Classification', 'uz': 'Sentiment Classification', 'vi': 'Học ngôn ngữ chỉnh chỉnh LSTM for Senloạn classification', 'bg': 'Лингвистично регуляризиран LSTM за класификация на чувствата', 'nl': 'Taalkundig geregulariseerd LSTM voor de classificatie van gevoelens', 'hr': 'Lingistički regulirani LSTM za klasifikaciju sentimenta', 'da': 'Sprogreguleret LSTM til klassificering af følelser', 'de': 'Sprachlich regulierte LSTM für die Stimmungsklassifizierung', 'id': 'LSTM Regularisasi secara Linguistik untuk Klasifikasi Sentiment', 'fa': 'LSTM برای شناسایی مجموعه\u200cگرایی زبان\u200cگرایز', 'ko': '정서 분류에 사용되는 언어 정규화 LSTM', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wa Sentiment Classification', 'af': 'Linguistically Regularized LSTM vir Sentiment Klassifikasie', 'sq': 'LSTM e rregulluar gjuhësisht për klasifikimin e ndjenjave', 'tr': 'Sentiment Classification', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Sentiment Klasifikasyonu üçün Linguistically Regularized LSTM', 'bn': 'সেন্টিমেন্ট ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য লিঙ্গিস্টিকভাবে নিয়মিত LSTM', 'ca': 'LSTM regularitzat lingüísticament per la classificació dels sentiments', 'bs': 'Lingistički regulirani LSTM za klasifikaciju sentimenta', 'cs': 'Jazykově regulované LSTM pro klasifikaci citů', 'et': 'Keeleliselt reguleeritud LSTM tunnete klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Kielellisesti säännelty LSTM tunteiden luokittelua varten', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Jezikovno urejeni LSTM za klasifikacijo čustev', 'jv': 'text-box-mode', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འདྲེན་རྟགས་ལ་ཚོད་པའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper deals with sentence-level sentiment classification. Though a variety of neural network models have been proposed recently, however, previous models either depend on expensive phrase-level annotation, most of which has remarkably degraded performance when trained with only sentence-level annotation ; or do not fully employ linguistic resources (e.g., sentiment lexicons, negation words, intensity words). In this paper, we propose simple models trained with sentence-level annotation, but also attempt to model the linguistic role of sentiment lexicons, negation words, and intensity words. Results show that our models are able to capture the linguistic role of sentiment words, negation words, and intensity words in sentiment expression.', 'fr': "Cet article traite de la classification des sentiments au niveau de la phrase. Bien qu'une variété de modèles de réseaux neuronaux aient été proposés récemment, les modèles précédents dépendent soit d'une annotation au niveau de la phrase coûteuse, dont la plupart ont remarquablement dégradé les performances lorsqu'ils sont entraînés avec uniquement une annotation au niveau de la phrase\xa0; soit n'utilisent pas pleinement les ressources linguistiques (par exemple, sentiment lexiques, mots de négation, mots d'intensité). Dans cet article, nous proposons des modèles simples formés avec des annotations au niveau de la phrase, mais nous tentons également de modéliser le rôle linguistique des lexiques de sentiment, des mots de négation et des mots d'intensité. Les résultats montrent que nos modèles sont capables de saisir le rôle linguistique des mots de sentiment, des mots de négation et des mots d'intensité dans l'expression d'un sentiment.", 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة تصنيف المشاعر على مستوى الجملة. على الرغم من أنه تم اقتراح مجموعة متنوعة من نماذج الشبكة العصبية مؤخرًا ، إلا أن النماذج السابقة إما تعتمد على التعليقات التوضيحية باهظة الثمن على مستوى العبارة ، والتي أدى معظمها إلى تدهور الأداء بشكل ملحوظ عند التدريب باستخدام التعليق التوضيحي على مستوى الجملة فقط ؛ أو لا تستخدم الموارد اللغوية بالكامل (على سبيل المثال ، معاجم المشاعر ، كلمات النفي ، كلمات الحدة). في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نماذج بسيطة مدربة على شرح توضيحي على مستوى الجملة ، ولكننا نحاول أيضًا أن نصمم الدور اللغوي لقواميس المشاعر ، وكلمات النفي ، وكلمات الحدة. تظهر النتائج أن نماذجنا قادرة على التقاط الدور اللغوي لكلمات المشاعر وكلمات النفي والكلمات الحادة في التعبير عن المشاعر.', 'pt': 'Este artigo trata da classificação de sentimentos em nível de sentença. Embora uma variedade de modelos de rede neural tenham sido propostos recentemente, no entanto, os modelos anteriores dependem de anotações caras em nível de frase, a maioria dos quais tem desempenho notavelmente degradado quando treinado apenas com anotação em nível de frase; ou não empregam totalmente os recursos linguísticos (por exemplo, léxicos de sentimento, palavras de negação, palavras de intensidade). Neste artigo, propomos modelos simples treinados com anotação em nível de sentença, mas também tentamos modelar o papel linguístico de léxicos de sentimento, palavras de negação e palavras de intensidade. Os resultados mostram que nossos modelos são capazes de capturar o papel linguístico das palavras de sentimento, palavras de negação e palavras de intensidade na expressão do sentimento.', 'es': 'Este artículo trata sobre la clasificación de sentimientos a nivel de oración. Sin embargo, aunque recientemente se ha propuesto una variedad de modelos de redes neuronales, los modelos anteriores dependen de anotaciones costosas a nivel de frase, la mayoría de las cuales han degradado notablemente el rendimiento cuando se entrenan solo con anotaciones a nivel de oración; o no emplean completamente recursos lingüísticos (por ejemplo, sentimiento). léxicos, palabras de negación, palabras de intensidad). En este artículo, proponemos modelos simples entrenados con anotación a nivel de oración, pero también intentamos modelar el papel lingüístico de los léxicos de sentimiento, las palabras de negación y las palabras de intensidad. Los resultados muestran que nuestros modelos son capaces de captar el papel lingüístico de las palabras de sentimiento, las palabras de negación y las palabras de intensidad en la expresión de sentimientos.', 'zh': '本文及句情分类。 虽近建诸神经网络,然前依昂贵短语级注,当仅以句级训练,多会话性会显降。 或未尽用语言资源(如情词典、否定词、强度词)。 于本文中,发句注简模,然亦试于情词典,否定词与强词之言建模。 结果表明得情词,否定词强词在语。', 'ja': '本稿では、文章レベルの感情分類を扱う。しかしながら、様々なニューラルネットワークモデルが最近提案されているが、以前のモデルは、高価なフレーズレベルの注釈に依存しており、そのほとんどは、文レベルの注釈のみで訓練されたときにパフォーマンスが著しく低下しているか、または言語リソース（例えば、感情辞書、否定単語、強度単語）を完全に採用していない。この論文では、文レベルの注釈で訓練された単純なモデルを提案しているが、センチメント辞書、否定語、および強度語の言語的役割をモデル化することも試みている。結果は、私たちのモデルがセンチメント表現におけるセンチメントワード、否定ワード、および強度ワードの言語的役割を捉えることができることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर वाक्य-स्तर की भावना वर्गीकरण से संबंधित है। हालांकि हाल ही में विभिन्न प्रकार के तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं, हालांकि, पिछले मॉडल या तो महंगे वाक्यांश-स्तर के एनोटेशन पर निर्भर करते हैं, जिनमें से अधिकांश में केवल वाक्य-स्तर के एनोटेशन के साथ प्रशिक्षित होने पर उल्लेखनीय रूप से खराब प्रदर्शन होता है; या भाषाई संसाधनों को पूरी तरह से नियोजित न करें (उदाहरण के लिए, भावना शब्दकोश, निषेध शब्द, तीव्रता शब्द)। इस पेपर में, हम वाक्य-स्तर के एनोटेशन के साथ प्रशिक्षित सरल मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, लेकिन भावना शब्दकोशों, नकार शब्दों और तीव्रता शब्दों की भाषाई भूमिका को मॉडल करने का भी प्रयास करते हैं। परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल भावना अभिव्यक्ति में भावना शब्दों, नकार शब्दों और तीव्रता शब्दों की भाषाई भूमिका पर कब्जा करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье рассматривается классификация настроений на уровне предложений. Хотя недавно были предложены различные модели нейронных сетей, предыдущие модели либо зависят от дорогостоящей аннотации на уровне фраз, большинство из которых значительно ухудшили производительность при обучении только аннотации на уровне предложений; либо не в полной мере используют лингвистические ресурсы (например, лексиконы настроений, слова отрицания, слова интенсивности). В этой статье мы предлагаем простые модели, обученные аннотации на уровне предложений, но также пытаемся смоделировать лингвистическую роль лексиконов настроений, слов отрицания и слов интенсивности. Результаты показывают, что наши модели способны запечатлеть лингвистическую роль слов чувств, слов отрицания и слов интенсивности в выражении чувств.', 'ga': 'Déileálann an páipéar seo le rangú ar leibhéal na habairte. Cé go bhfuil éagsúlacht de shamhlacha néarlíonra molta le déanaí, áfach, braitheann samhlacha roimhe seo ar anótáil costasach ar leibhéal frása, agus tá an fheidhmíocht díghrádaithe go mór ag an gcuid is mó acu nuair a cuireadh oiliúint orthu gan ach anótáil ag leibhéal na habairte; nó nach n-úsáideann acmhainní teanga go hiomlán (m.sh., foclóirí meon, focail dhiúltacha, focail déine). Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnlaí simplí oilte le anótáil ar leibhéal na habairte, ach déanaimid iarracht freisin ról teangeolaíoch na bhfoclóirí meon, focail shéanta agus focail déine a shamhaltú. Léiríonn torthaí go bhfuil ár gcuid múnlaí in ann ról teangeolaíoch na bhfocal meon, na bhfocal diúltach, agus na bhfocal déine i léiriú meon a ghabháil.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων σε επίπεδο πρότασης. Παρότι πρόσφατα έχουν προταθεί διάφορα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων, τα προηγούμενα μοντέλα είτε εξαρτώνται από ακριβές σχολιασμούς σε επίπεδο φράσεων, τα περισσότερα από τα οποία έχουν υποβαθμίσει σημαντικά την απόδοση όταν εκπαιδεύονται μόνο με σχολιασμούς σε επίπεδο φράσεων. ή δεν χρησιμοποιούν πλήρως γλωσσικούς πόρους (π.χ. λεξικά συναισθημάτων, λέξεις άρνησης, λέξεις έντασης). Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε απλά μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα με σχολιασμό σε επίπεδο πρότασης, αλλά επίσης επιχειρούμε να μοντελοποιήσουμε τον γλωσσικό ρόλο των λεξικών συναισθημάτων, των λέξεων άρνησης και των λέξεων έντασης. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα μας είναι σε θέση να συλλάβουν τον γλωσσικό ρόλο των λέξεων συναισθημάτων, των λέξεων άρνησης και των λέξεων έντασης στην έκφραση συναισθημάτων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a mondatszintű érzelmek osztályozásával foglalkozik. Bár a közelmúltban számos neurális hálózati modellt javasoltak, a korábbi modellek vagy drága kifejezésszintű jegyzeteléstől függnek, amelyek többsége rendkívül csökkenti a teljesítményt, ha csak mondatszintű jegyzeteléssel tanítják; vagy nem használnak teljes mértékben nyelvi erőforrásokat (pl. érzelmi lexikonok, negatív szavak, intenzitás szavak). Ebben a tanulmányban egyszerű, mondatszintű jegyzeteléssel kiképzett modelleket javasolunk, de megpróbáljuk modellezni az érzelmi lexikonok, negatív szavak és intenzitásos szavak nyelvi szerepét is. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modelleink képesek megragadni az érzelmi szavak, negatív szavak és intenzitásos szavak nyelvi szerepét az érzelmi kifejezésben.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლობა კლასიფიკაცია სიტყვების დონეზე. მაგრამ განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები აღმოჩნდა, მაგრამ წინა მოდელები ანუ დააკვირდებიან ძალიან ძალიან განსხვავებული ფრაზების განსხვავებაზე, რომლებიც უფრო მეტი განსხვავებულია, როცა მ ან ყველაფერად ლენგურისტიკური რესურსის გამოყენება (მაგალითად, სენტიმენტიკური ლექსიკონი, ნექციური სიტყვები, ინტენსტიური სიტყვები). ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ მოვეხსენებთ მარტივი მოდელები, რომლებიც წესების წესების ანტორაციით, მაგრამ ასევე მოცდილობთ მოდელისტიკური პოლექციის სიტყვების, ნექციის სიტყვების და ინტენ წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელები შეუძლიათ წარმოიდგინოთ სიტყვების ლენგურისტიკური პროლის, ნეგურაციის სიტყვების და ინტენტიგური სიტყვების სიტყვებში.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente kalbama apie sentiment ų klasifikavimą pagal sakinius. Nors neseniai buvo pasiūlyti įvairūs nervų tinklo modeliai, ankstesni modeliai priklauso nuo brangios frazių lygio anotacijos, iš kurių dauguma labai pablogėjo, kai buvo apmokyti tik frazių lygio anotacija; arba ne visapusiškai naudoja kalbinius išteklius (pvz., jausmų leksikonus, neigiamus žodžius, intensyvumo žodžius). Šiame dokumente siūlome paprastus modelius, parengtus su sakinių lygio anotacija, bet taip pat bandome modeliuoti jautrumo leksikonų, neigiamų žodžių ir intensyvumo žodžių kalbinį vaidmenį. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modeliai gali suvokti jautrumo žodžių, neigiamų žodžių ir intensyvumo žodžių kalbinį vaidmenį jautrumo išraiškoje.', 'it': "Questo articolo tratta della classificazione del sentiment a livello di frase. Sebbene una varietà di modelli di rete neurale siano stati proposti di recente, tuttavia, i modelli precedenti dipendono da costose annotazioni a livello di frase, la maggior parte delle quali ha notevolmente degradato le prestazioni quando addestrati con solo annotazioni a livello di frase; o non utilizzare pienamente risorse linguistiche (ad esempio lessici sentimentali, parole di negazione, parole di intensità). In questo articolo, proponiamo modelli semplici formati con annotazione a livello di frase, ma anche tentare di modellare il ruolo linguistico dei lessici sentimentali, delle parole di negazione e delle parole di intensità. I risultati mostrano che i nostri modelli sono in grado di catturare il ruolo linguistico delle parole sentimentali, delle parole di negazione e delle parole di intensità nell'espressione sentimentale.", 'mk': 'Овој весник се занимава со класификација на чувства на ниво на реченици. Иако неодамна се предложени различни модели на нервната мрежа, сепак, претходните модели или зависат од скапа анотација на ниво на фрази, од кои повеќето се извонредно деградирани резултати кога се тренирани со само анотација на ниво на реченици; или не користат целосно јазички ресурси (на пример, лексикони за чувства, негативни зборови, зборови за интензитет). Во овој весник предлагаме едноставни модели обучени со анатација на ниво на реченици, но исто така се обидуваме да ја моделираме јазичната улога на лексиконите на чувствата, негативните зборови и интензитетните зборови. Results show that our models are able to capture the linguistic role of sentiment words, negation words, and intensity words in sentiment expression.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз сөйлеу деңгейіндегі сезімдерді шектеу керек. Жуырдағы невралдық желінің түрлі үлгілері ұсынылған, бірақ алдыңғы үлгілер немесе үлкен сөз деңгейіндегі жазбаларға тәуелді, олардың көпшілігі тек сөз деңгейіндегі жазбалармен оқылған кезде,  немесе лингвистикалық ресурстарды толық пайдалануға болмайды (мысалы, сезімсіздік лексикондар, сөздерді белгілеу сөздері, тең сөздері). Бұл қағазда сөз деңгейіндегі жазбалармен оқылған қарапайым үлгілерді ұсынамыз, сондай-ақ мәліметтердің лингвистикалық рөлін, сөздердің негативті сөздерді және тең сөздерді үлгілеу үшін қо Нәтижелері біздің үлгілеріміз сезімдік сөздердің лингвистикалық рөлін, сөздердің негизациялық сөздерді және сезімдік сөздердің көпшілігін түсіндіре алады.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാക്ക്-നില വികാരം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനുമായി ഇടപെടുത്തുന്നു. ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d അടുത്ത് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായിരുന്നെങ്കിലും മുമ്പ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d വിലയേറ്റ വാക്ക്-നില വിഷയത്തില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതാണെ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാതിരിക്കുക (ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200dമാര്\u200d, നെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാക്ക് നില വിഷയത്തില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധാരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത്, പക്ഷെ വി ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കുകളുടെ ഭാഷ ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്ന്.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini berurusan dengan klasifikasi perasaan tahap kalimat. Walaupun pelbagai model rangkaian saraf telah diusulkan baru-baru ini, bagaimanapun, model terdahulu sama ada bergantung pada anotasi aras frasa mahal, kebanyakan yang mempunyai prestasi yang amat rendah bila dilatih dengan hanya anotasi aras kalimat; atau tidak menggunakan sumber bahasa sepenuhnya (cth., leksikon perasaan, kata negatif, kata-kata intensiti). Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model sederhana dilatih dengan anotasi tahap kalimat, tetapi juga cuba untuk modelkan peranan bahasa leksikon perasaan, kata negatif, dan kata-kata intensiti. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model kita mampu menangkap peranan bahasa perkataan perasaan, perkataan negatif, dan perkataan intensiti dalam ungkapan perasaan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jittratta l-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fil-livell tas-sentenza. Għalkemm varjetà ta’ mudelli tan-netwerk newrali ġew proposti reċentement, madankollu, mudelli preċedenti jew jiddependu fuq annotazzjoni għalja fil-livell tal-frażi, li l-biċċa l-kbira tagħhom iddegradaw il-prestazzjoni b’mod notevoli meta mħarrġa b’annotazzjoni fil-livell tas-sentenza biss; jew ma jużawx bis-sħiħ riżorsi lingwistiċi (e ż., lexicons tas-sentiment, kliem ta’ negazzjoni, kliem ta’ intensità). F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu mudelli sempliċi mħarrġa b’annotazzjoni fil-livell tas-sentenza, iżda nippruvaw ukoll jimmudellaw ir-rwol lingwistiku tal-lexikoni tas-sentiment, kliem ta’ negazzjoni, u kliem ta’ intensità. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudelli tagħna huma kapaċi jaqbdu r-rwol lingwistiku tal-kliem tas-sentiment, il-kliem tan-negazzjoni, u l-kliem tal-intensità fl-espressjoni tas-sentiment.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь өгүүлбэр-түвшинд мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцах юм. Хэдийгээр саяхан олон төрлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварууд санал болгосон ч, өмнөх загварууд нь үнэтэй хэмжээний загваруудаас хамааралтай, ихэнх нь зөвхөн өгүүлбэрийн хэмжээний загваруудаас суралцаж байхад гайхалтай эсвэл хэлний боловсрол бүрэн ашиглахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгүүлбэр-түвшинд сургалтын энгийн загварыг санал болгож байна. Мөн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн лексиконуудын хэл хэлний үүрэг, эсрэг үг, хүчирхэг үгсийг загварчлахыг хичээдэг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загварууд мэдрэмжтэй үг, эсрэг үг, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлний хэлний дүр зураг авч чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł zajmuje się klasyfikacją sentymentów na poziomie zdania. Chociaż ostatnio zaproponowano wiele modeli sieci neuronowych, poprzednie modele albo zależą od drogiej adnotacji na poziomie fraz, z których większość znacząco pogorszyła wydajność, gdy trenowano tylko adnotację na poziomie zdania; lub nie wykorzystują w pełni zasobów językowych (np. leksykony sentymentów, słowa negacji, słowa intensywności). W artykule proponujemy proste modele trenowane adnotacją na poziomie zdań, ale również próbujemy modelować rolę językową leksykonów sentymentów, słów negacji i słów intensywności. Wyniki pokazują, że nasze modele są w stanie uchwycić językową rolę słów sentymentu, słów negacji i słów intensywności w ekspresji sentymentu.', 'no': 'Denne papiret betrar med setningsnivå sentimentklassifikasjon. Selv om det er nyleg foreslått ein del neuralnettverksmodeller, er det likevel førre modeller anten avhengig av dykka notasjon på frånivå. Dei fleste av dei har avhengig degradert utvikling når det er trent med berre setningsnivåmerking. eller ikkje fullstendig bruk lingviske ressursar (f.eks. sentiment lexicons, negasjonsord, intensitetsord). I denne papiret foreslår vi enkle modeller som trengte med setningsnivå annotasjon, men også prøver å modellere den lingviske rollen av sentiment lexicons, negasjonsord og intensitetsord. Resultater viser at modellen våre kan ta inn språkstiske rolle av sentimentssord, negasjonsord og intensitetsord i sentimentuttrykk.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare se ocupă de clasificarea sentimentelor la nivel de frază. Deși recent au fost propuse o varietate de modele de rețele neurale, modelele anterioare depind fie de adnotări costisitoare la nivel de fraze, dintre care majoritatea au degradat considerabil performanța atunci când sunt instruite doar cu adnotări la nivel de frază; sau nu folosesc pe deplin resurse lingvistice (de exemplu, lexicoane sentimentale, cuvinte de negare, cuvinte de intensitate). În această lucrare, propunem modele simple instruite cu adnotare la nivel de frază, dar, de asemenea, încercăm să modelăm rolul lingvistic al lexicoanelor sentimentale, cuvintelor de negare și cuvintelor de intensitate. Rezultatele arată că modelele noastre sunt capabile să surprindă rolul lingvistic al cuvintelor sentimentale, cuvintelor de negare și cuvintelor de intensitate în exprimarea sentimentelor.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir se bavi klasifikacijom sentimenta na nivou rečenica. Iako su nedavno predloženi različiti modeli neuralne mreže, prethodni modeli ili zavise od skupe annotacije nivoa fraze, većina njih je izuzetno degradena performanca kada je obučena samo sa annotacijom nivoa rečenica; ili ne potpuno koriste jezičke resurse (npr. sentimentalne leksikone, negativne reči, intenzivne reči). U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavne modele obučene annotacijom na nivou rečenica, ali i pokušavamo da modeliramo jezičku ulogu sentimentalnih leksikona, negativnih reči i intenzivnih reči. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli mogu da uhvatimo jezičku ulogu sentimentalnih reči, negativnih reči i intenzivnih reči u izrazu sentimenta.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ka baaraandegaa fasaxa farsamada kaliya. Though a variety of neural network models have been proposed recently, however, previous models either depend on expensive phrase-level annotation, most of which has remarkably degraded performance when trained with only sentence-level annotation;  ama aadan si buuxda ah u shaqeynin hantida luuqadda (tusaale ahaan leksisiyada, hadalka diidiga ah, hadalka koronta). Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaalo fudud oo lagu baray heer kaliya, laakiin waxaynu sidoo kale isku daynaa in aan sameyno qaybaha afka ah ee leksikanka, hadalka diidmada iyo hadalka koronta. Resultiyada waxay muujiyaan in modelalkayagu ay awoodi karaan inay qabsadaan qayb afka ku qoran hadallada xisaabta, hadallada nacashada iyo hadallada ku qoran fikradda.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව වාක්ය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය විශේෂයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා. නමුත්, මුලින් මොඩේල් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, මුලින් මොඩේල් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වග නැත්තම් භාෂාත්මක සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම භාෂාත්මක සම්පූර්ණය කරන්නේ නැත්තම් (උදාහරණයෙන්, දැනුම් ලෙක මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වාර්තාවක් ලෙසිකන්ස් වලගේ භාෂාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන, ස ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක භාෂාවික වචන, අවස්ථාවක වචන, සහ අවස්ථාවක් වචන වචන වගේ භාෂාවික භා', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar sentimentklassificering på meningsnivå. Även om en mängd olika neurala nätverksmodeller har föreslagits nyligen, beror tidigare modeller antingen på dyra frasnivånoteringar, varav de flesta har anmärkningsvärt försämrat prestanda när de tränas med endast frasnivånoteringar; eller inte fullt ut använda språkliga resurser (t.ex. sentimentlexikon, negationsord, intensitetsord). I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi enkla modeller som tränats med kommentering på meningsnivå, men också försöker modellera den språkliga rollen av sentimentlexikon, negationsord och intensitetsord. Resultaten visar att våra modeller kan fånga den språkliga rollen av sentimentord, negationsord och intensitetsord i sentimentuttryck.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் வாக்கு- மட்டத்தில் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுடன் கட்டுப்படுத்துகிறது. பல புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரிகள் சமீபத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டிருந்தாலும், முந்தைய மாதிரிகள் விலையான சொற்றொடர் மட்டத்தில் குறிப்பிடும் பொழ அல்லது மொழியில் மொழிகளை முழுமையாக வேலை செய்யாது (உதாரணமாக உணர்வு லெக்சிக்ஸியன், எதிர்மறை வார்த்தைகள், உயரமான வார இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சுலபமான மாதிரிகளை வாக்கு மட்டத்தில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சியன்களின் மொழியில் பங்கை மா முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கும் என்றால் நம் மாதிரிகள் உணர்வு வார்த்தைகள், எதிர்மறை வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் உணர்வு கூற்றில் உள்ள மொழியி', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ sentence-level sentiment classification کے ساتھ ہے. اگرچہ اچھے سے ایک مختلف نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے، لیکن اگلے موڈل یا گران فریز سطح انٹونٹ پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں، ان میں سے اکثر لوگ صرف فریز سطح انٹونٹ کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں، اور ان میں سے بہت سے اچھا ذلیل عمل ہے یا زبان رسولوں کو کامل استعمال نہ کرنا (جیسے احساس لکسیون، منکر لکھ، مضبوط لکھ) ہم اس کاغذ میں ساده موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو جماعت-سطح کے ذریعے تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں، لیکن اس کے ذریعے بھی احساسات لکسونز کی زبان کی رول، منکر کلمات اور تیز کلمات کی مدل کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں. نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدلکوں احساس کلمات کی زبان کی روش، منفی کلمات اور حسن کی تعریف میں تیز کلمات کو پکڑ سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda bir necha necha neyrol tarmoq modellari talab qilingan bo'lsa, balki oldingi modellar qiymati imkoniyatlarni qo'shish mumkin, ularning ko'pchiligi faqat bir sentence darajasi taʼminlovchi bo'lganda o'rganish mumkin; or do not fully employ linguistic resources (e.g., sentiment lexicons, negation words, intensity words).  Bu qogʻozda, biz gapir darajada o'rganish oddiy modellarni o'rganishni tahlil qilamiz, lekin shunday qilib, hissiyotlar leksikanlar, negativ so'zlar va katta so'zlarni o'zgartirishga harakat qilamiz. Natijalar ko'rsatadi, bizning modellarimiz hissiyot so'zlari, negativ so'zlar, va hissiyotning imkoniyatidagi eng katta so'zlarni o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này phân loại cảm xúc cấp bản án. Mặc dù gần đây đã có một số mô hình mạng thần kinh đã được đề xuất, nhưng các mô hình trước đều phụ thuộc vào chú thích cấp độ cụm từ nhiều cụm từ tốn tốn, hầu hết đều có trình độ suy giảm đáng kể khi được huấn luyện chỉ với chú mức án. hoặc không sử dụng đầy đủ các nguồn lực ngôn ngữ (ví dụ như ngôn ngữ đa cảm, từ chối, từ ngữ âm độ) Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi đề xuất các mô hình đơn giản được đào tạo bằng chú thích mức án, nhưng cũng cố gắng mô tả vai trò ngôn ngữ của ngôn ngữ của ngôn từ đa cảm, từ chối, và ngôn ngữ mạnh. Kết quả cho thấy các mô hình của chúng ta có khả năng nắm bắt vai trò ngôn ngữ của các từ tình cảm, từ chối, và lời nói cường điệu trong biểu hiện tình cảm.', 'bg': 'Тази статия се занимава с класификация на чувствата на ниво изречение. Въпреки че наскоро бяха предложени различни модели на невронни мрежи, предишните модели зависят или от скъпа анотация на ниво фраза, повечето от които имат забележително влошаване на производителността, когато са обучени само с анотация на ниво изречение; или не използват напълно езикови ресурси (напр. сантиментални лексикони, отрицателни думи, интензивни думи). В тази статия предлагаме прости модели, обучени с анотация на ниво изречение, но също така се опитваме да моделираме лингвистичната роля на сантименталните лексикони, отрицателните думи и интензивните думи. Резултатите показват, че нашите модели са в състояние да уловят езиковата роля на сантименталните думи, отрицателните думи и интензивните думи в израза на сантименталните думи.', 'da': 'Denne artikel omhandler klassificering af sentiment på sætningsniveau. Selvom en række neurale netværksmodeller er blevet foreslået for nylig, er tidligere modeller dog enten afhængige af dyre sætningsniveau annotation, hvoraf de fleste har forringet ydeevnen bemærkelsesværdigt, når de trænes med kun sætningsniveau annotation; eller ikke fuldt ud anvende sproglige ressourcer (f.eks. sentimentleksikoner, negationsord, intensitetsord). I denne artikel foreslår vi enkle modeller trænet med sætningsniveau annotation, men forsøger også at modellere den sproglige rolle af sentimentleksikoner, negationsord og intensitetsord. Resultaterne viser, at vores modeller er i stand til at indfange den sproglige rolle af følelsesord, negationsord og intensitetsord i følelsesudtryk.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel gaat over sentiment classificatie op zinsniveau. Hoewel recentelijk een verscheidenheid aan neurale netwerkmodellen is voorgesteld, zijn eerdere modellen afhankelijk van dure annotatie op frase-niveau, waarvan de meeste de prestaties opmerkelijk hebben verminderd wanneer ze worden getraind met alleen annotatie op zinnniveau; of niet volledig gebruik maken van taalkundige middelen (bijvoorbeeld sentimentlexicons, ontkenningswoorden, intensiteitswoorden). In dit artikel stellen we eenvoudige modellen voor die getraind zijn met annotatie op zinsniveau, maar proberen we ook de linguïstische rol van sentimentlexicons, ontkenningswoorden en intensiteitswoorden te modelleren. De resultaten tonen aan dat onze modellen in staat zijn om de linguïstische rol van sentimentwoorden, ontkenningswoorden en intensiteitswoorden in sentimentexpressie vast te leggen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir se odnosi na klasifikaciju osjećanja na razini rečenica. Iako su nedavno predloženi razni modeli neuronske mreže, prethodni modeli ili ovise o skupom annotaciji razine fraze, većina njih je izuzetno smanjena učinkovitost kada je obučena samo s annotacijom razine rečenica; ili ne potpuno koriste jezičke resurse (npr. sentimentalne leksikone, negativne riječi, intenzivne riječi). U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavne modele obučene annotacijom na nivou kazne, ali pokušavamo i modelirati jezičku ulogu osjećajnih leksičara, negativnih riječi i intenzivnih riječi. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli mogu uhvatiti jezičku ulogu osjećajnih riječi, negativnih riječi i intenzivnih riječi u izrazi sentimenta.', 'id': 'Kertas ini berurusan dengan klasifikasi sensasi tingkat kalimat. Meskipun banyak model jaringan saraf telah diusulkan akhir-akhir ini, bagaimanapun, model sebelumnya bergantung pada anotasi tingkat frasa mahal, sebagian besar dari yang telah sangat rendah prestasi ketika dilatih dengan hanya anotasi tingkat kalimat; atau tidak sepenuhnya menggunakan sumber daya bahasa (contohnya, leksikon sentimen, kata negatif, kata intensitas). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model sederhana dilatih dengan anotasi tingkat kalimat, tetapi juga mencoba untuk model peran bahasa dari leksikon sentimen, kata negatif, dan kata intensitas. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa model kita mampu menangkap peran bahasa dari kata-kata sentimen, kata-kata negatif, dan kata-kata intensitas dalam ekspresi sentimen.', 'ko': '본고는 문장 차원의 감정 분류를 연구한다.비록 최근에 각종 신경 네트워크 모델이 제기되었지만 이전의 모델은 비싼 단어급 주석에 의존하거나 그 중에서 대부분이 문장급 주석만 사용하여 훈련을 할 때 성능이 현저히 떨어졌다.또는 언어 자원을 충분히 이용하지 못했다(예를 들어 감정 어휘, 부정어, 강도어).본고에서 우리는 간단한 모델을 제시하고 문장급 주석으로 훈련하지만 감정 어휘, 부정어와 강도어의 언어 작용을 모의하려고 한다.그 결과 우리의 모델은 감정어, 부정어, 강도어가 감정 표현에서의 언어 작용을 포착할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ با کلیسازی احساسات سطح جمله ارتباط دارد. اگرچه مدل های مختلف شبکه عصبی اخیرا پیشنهاد داده شده است، ولی مدل های قبلی یا بر اخطار سطح جمله گران بستگی دارند، بیشتر از آنها هنگامی که فقط با اخطار سطح جمله آموزش داده شده، عملکرد بسیار نابود شده است. یا کاملا از منابع زبانی استفاده نکنید (مثلاً لکسیون احساسات، کلمات منکر، کلمات سختی). در این کاغذ، ما مدل ساده\u200cای را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با توضیح سطح جمله آموزش شده است، ولی همچنین تلاش می\u200cکنیم نقش زبان\u200cشناسی الکسیون\u200cهای احساسات، کلمات منکر و کلمات سختی را مدل کنیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدلهای ما می\u200cتوانند نقش زبان\u200cشناسی کلمات احساسات، کلمات منکر و کلمات سختی را در عبارت احساسات بگیرند.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschäftigt sich mit der Klassifizierung von Stimmungen auf Satzebene. Obwohl in letzter Zeit eine Vielzahl von neuronalen Netzwerkmodellen vorgeschlagen wurde, hängen bisherige Modelle entweder von teuren Anmerkungen auf Phrasenebene ab, von denen die meisten die Leistung bemerkenswert beeinträchtigt haben, wenn sie nur mit Anmerkungen auf Satzebene trainiert wurden; oder nicht vollständig linguistische Ressourcen verwenden (z.B. Sentiment Lexikons, Negationswörter, Intensitätswörter). In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einfache Modelle vor, die mit Annotation auf Satzebene trainiert sind, aber auch versuchen, die linguistische Rolle von Sentiment Lexikonen, Negationswörtern und Intensitätswörtern zu modellieren. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Modelle in der Lage sind, die linguistische Rolle von Sentiment-, Negations- und Intensitätswörtern im Sentiment-Ausdruck zu erfassen.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linahusiana na hisia za kiwango cha hukumu. Ingawa mitindo mbalimbali ya mtandao wa neurali hivi karibuni yamependekezwa, hata hivyo, mifano iliyopita ama yanategemea matatizo ya ghali ya maneno, ambapo mengi yao yamekuwa na utendaji wa kiwango kikubwa wakati wa kufundishwa kwa kiwango pekee cha hukumu; au usitumie rasilimali za lugha (kama vile lexico wenye hisia, maneno mabaya, maneno makubwa). Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mifano rahisi inayofundishwa kwa kiwango cha kuhamasisha hukumu, lakini pia tunajaribu kuonyesha jukumu la lugha la watu wa lexico, maneno mabaya na maneno yenye nguvu. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inaweza kushika nafasi ya lugha ya maneno ya hisia, maneno mabaya na maneno yenye msingi katika hisia.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sözlem derejesi duýgulamak bilen meşgullanýar. Ýagna görä birnäçe näral şebeke nusgalary üýtgedilen bolsa hem öňki nusgalar ýa-da gymmat derejesinde bir şekilde ynanýarlar, iň köpüsi diňe sözlem derejesi duýdurma bilen üýtgedilen ýagdaýynyň känesi ýok bolup geçirilýär; ýa-da lingwistiki çe şmeler doly ulanmaýarlar (meselâ, duýgular, maýyp sözler, g öwnüm sözler). Bu kagyzda, sözlem derejesi bilen bilim alýan basit nusgalary teklip edýäris ýöne duýgular lingwistiki sözlerini, boýunça sözlerini we daýyk sözlerini örenmek üçin synanyşýarys. Netijenler biziň modellerimiz duýgular sözleriniň lingwistiki, negativ sözlerini we duýgular sözleriniň görkezilişinde çykyp biljekdigini görkezip bilýärler.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër merret me klasifikimin e ndjenjave të nivelit të dënimit. Megjithëse kohët e fundit janë propozuar një shumicë modelesh të rrjetit nervor, megjithatë modelet e mëparshëm varen nga anotacioni i shtrenjtë në nivelin e frazës, shumica e të cilave ka shfaqje të degraduara në mënyrë të jashtëzakonshme kur janë stërvitur me vetëm anotacion në nivelin e frazës; ose nuk përdorin plotësisht burime gjuhësore (për shembull leksikone të ndjenjave, fjalë negative, fjalë intensiteti). Në këtë letër, propozojmë modele të thjeshta të stërvitura me anotacion në nivelin e fjalëve, por gjithashtu përpiqemi të modelojmë rolin gjuhësor të lexikonëve të ndjenjave, fjalëve të refuzimit dhe fjalëve të intensitetit. Rezultatet tregojnë se modelet tona janë në gjendje të kapin rolin gjuhësor të fjalëve të ndjenjave, fjalëve të refuzimit dhe fjalëve të intensitetit në shprehjen e ndjenjave.', 'af': "Hierdie papier verwerk met sentence- level sentiment klasifikasie. Alhoewel 'n verskillende neuralnetwerk modele onlangs voorgestel is, maar vorige modele afhang of af van koste frase-vlak annotasie, waarvan die meeste van hulle het betekeurig degradeerde prestasie wanneer onderrig word met slegs setvlak annotasie; of nie volledig lingvisse hulpbronne gebruik nie (bv. sentiment e lexicons, negasie woorde, intensiteit woorde). In hierdie papier, voorstel ons eenvoudige modele wat opgelei is met sentence-level annotasie, maar ook probeer om die lingwisiese rol van sentiment lexicons, negasie woorde en intensiteit woorde te model. Resultate wys dat ons modele kan die lingwisiese rol van sentimente woorde, negasie woorde en intensiteit woorde in sentimente uitdrukking neem.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የሥርዓት ደረጃ ስሜት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ከቅርብ ዘመን የተለየ ብዙዎች የኔዌብ መረብ ሞላት ቢገልጹ እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ዓይነቶች ወይም በዋጋው ቃላት-ደረጃ ማሳሰል ላይ ቢሆን፣ አብዛኞቻቸው በቁጥጥር-ደረጃ ማሳየት በተማሩ ጊዜ ብዙዎቹ የሚያሳፍር የድምፅ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ or do not fully employ linguistic resources (e.g., sentiment lexicons, negation words, intensity words).  በዚህ ገጽ፣ በፍርድ-ደረጃ ላይ የተማሩት ቀላል ሞዴላዎችን እናሳልጋለን፣ ነገር ግን የልኪሶችን ቋንቋ ሚዛን፣ የስህተት ቃላት፣ የጥቅም ቃላት እና የግል ቃላትን በመግለጽ ትሞክራለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ ምሳሌዎቻችን የቋንቋዊ ቃላትን፣ የክፋት ቃላትን እና በአስማሚ ቃላት መያዝ ይችላሉ፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt cümləlik seviyyəti hissləri seçməyə çalışır. Ancaq əvvəlki modellər ya vaxtlı fraz səviyyəsinə bağlı olsa da, çoxunun cümlələr səviyyəsinə təhsil edildiyi vaxt təhsil edildiyi təqdirdə təhsil edilən müxtəlif nöral şəbəkə modellərinin müxtəlif təhsil edilmişdir. və ya dil qaynaqlarını tamamilə istifadə etməyin. Bu kağızda, cümlələr seviyyətində təhsil edilmiş basit modelləri təklif edirik, lakin həmçinin sentiment leksiklərinin dil rolünü, negativ sözlərin və şiddətli sözlərin modellenməyə çalışırıq. Sonuçlarımız modellərimiz duygusal sözlərin, negatif sözlərin və duygusal sözlərin dil rolünü tutabilir.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը վերաբերում է նախադասության մակարդակի զգացմունքների դասակարգմանը: Չնայած վերջերս նախագծված են նյարդային ցանցի տարբեր մոդելներ, նախորդ մոդելները կախված են կամ արժեքավոր արտահայտությունների մակարդակի նոտացիայից, որոնցից շատերը չափազանց կործանված են արտադրողականությունը միայն նախադասությունների մակարդակի նոտա կամ ամբողջովին չեն օգտագործում լեզվաբանական ռեսուրսներ (օրինակ զգացմունքների լեքսիկոններ, մերժման բառեր, ինտենսիվության բառեր): In this paper, we propose simple models trained with sentence-level annotation, but also attempt to model the linguistic role of sentiment lexicons, negation words, and intensity words.  Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելները կարողանում են վերցնել զգացմունքների բառերի լեզվաբանական դերը, բառերի բառերը և զգացմունքների արտահայտության ինտենսիվության բառերը:', 'ca': "Aquest article tracta de la classificació de sentiments a nivell de frases. Though a variety of neural network models have been proposed recently, however, previous models either depend on expensive phrase-level annotation, most of which has remarkably degraded performance when trained with only sentence-level annotation;  o no utilitzen plenament recursos lingüístics (per exemple, lexicons de sentiment, paraules de negatió, paraules d'intensitat). En aquest article proposem models senzills entrenats amb anotació de nivell de frases, però també intentem modelar el paper lingüístic dels lexicons de sentiment, paraules de negatió i paraules de intensitat. Els resultats mostran que els nostres models són capaços de capturar el paper lingüístic de paraules de sentiment, paraules de negatió i paraules d'intensitat en expressió del sentiment.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি শাস্তি স্তরের অনুভূতি বিভাগের মাধ্যমে চুক্তি করে। যদিও সম্প্রতি বিভিন্ন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, তবে পূর্ববর্তী মডেল অথবা দামী বাক্য-স্তরের বিষয়টির উপর নির্ভর করে থাকে, যাদের বেশীরভাগ ক্ষতিকর অথবা ভাষাগত সম্পদ পুরোপুরি কাজ করে না (যেমন অনুভূতিপূর্ণ লেক্সিকোন, নেতিবাচক শব্দ, গুরুত্বপূর্ণ শব্দ) এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সাধারণ মডেল প্রস্তাব করি শাস্তি পর্যায়ে শিক্ষিত, কিন্তু অনুভূতিপূর্ণ লেক্সিকোর ভূমিকা, নেতিবাচক শব্দ এবং গভীর শব্দের ম ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল অনুভূতির ভূমিকা গ্রহণ করতে পারে, অনুভূতিপূর্ণ শব্দ, নেতিবাচক শব্দ এবং অনুভূতিপূর্ণ শব্দের গু', 'et': 'Käesolev töö käsitleb lausetaseme sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni. Kuigi hiljuti on välja pakutud mitmeid närvivõrgu mudeleid, sõltuvad eelmised mudelid kas kallist fraasitasemel annoteerimisest, millest enamik on märkimisväärselt halvendanud toimivust ainult lausetasemel annoteerimisel; või ei kasuta täielikult keelelisi ressursse (nt sentimentaalsed leksikonid, negatsioonisõnad, intensiivsussõnad). Käesolevas töös pakume välja lihtsad mudelid, mis on koolitatud lausetasemel annoteerimisega, kuid püüame modelleerida ka sentimentaalsete leksikonide, negatsioonisõnade ja intensiivsussõnade keelelist rolli. Tulemused näitavad, et meie mudelid suudavad jäädvustada sentimentaalsete sõnade, negatiivsõnade ja intensiivsussõnade keelelist rolli sentimentaalses väljenduses.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir se bavi klasifikacijom sentimenta na nivou kazne. Iako su nedavno predloženi različiti modeli neuronske mreže, prethodni modeli ili ovise o skupom annotaciji na nivou fraze, većina njih je izuzetno smanjena učinkovitost kada je obučena samo s annotacijom na nivou rečenice; ili ne potpuno koriste jezičke resurse (npr. sentimentalne leksikone, negativne riječi, intenzivne riječi). U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavne modele obučene annotacijom na nivou kazne, ali i pokušavamo modelirati jezičku ulogu sentimentalnih leksikona, negativnih riječi i intenzivnih riječi. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli mogu uhvatiti jezičku ulogu sentimentalnih riječi, negativnih riječi i intenzivnih riječi u izrazi sentimenta.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá klasifikací sentimentů na úrovni věty. Ačkoli byla v poslední době navržena řada modelů neuronových sítí, předchozí modely buď závisí na drahé anotaci na úrovni frází, z nichž většina pozoruhodně snížila výkon, když jsou trénovány pouze s anotací na úrovni věty; nebo plně nevyužívat jazykové zdroje (např. sentimentní slovníky, negační slova, intenzivní slova). V tomto článku navrhujeme jednoduché modely trénované anotací na úrovni věty, ale také se snažíme modelovat jazykovou roli sentimentových slovníků, negačních slov a intenzivních slov. Výsledky ukazují, že naše modely jsou schopny zachytit jazykovou roli sentimentních slov, negativních slov a intenzivních slov ve vyjádření sentimentu.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli käsittelee lausetason tunteiden luokittelua. Vaikka viime aikoina on ehdotettu useita neuroverkkomalleja, aiemmat mallit riippuvat joko kalliista lausetason merkinnästä, joista suurin osa on merkittävästi huonontanut suorituskykyä harjoitettaessa vain lausetason merkinnällä; tai eivät käytä täysin kielellisiä resursseja (esim. tunnesanastot, kieltämissanat, intensiteettisanat). Tässä työssä ehdotamme lausetason annotoinnilla koulutettuja yksinkertaisia malleja, mutta yritämme myös mallintaa tunteiden sanaston, kieltämissanan ja intensiteettisanojen kielellistä roolia. Tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme pystyvät vangitsemaan tunteiden, kieltävien sanojen ja intensiivisten sanojen kielellisen roolin tunteiden ilmaisussa.', 'jv': 'structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Utowo ora iso nggunakake perbudhakan langkung (b.e.g. luwih-luwih), gambaran, kelas-winih). Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngerasah model sing beraksi lan dadi nggawe barang kelas, dadi njaluk sapa-sapa kuwi tindakan layang kelas luwih apik, gambarang awak dhéwé lan kelas. Ngomongé wong-wong kuwi model awak dhéwé iso nggambar kelangan langgambar luwih apik, gambaran bakal, lan kelangan kuwi mungkisan kanggo kelangan kelangan langgar.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan aiki na sharuɗe wa kalmar-daraja. Haƙĩƙa da aka buƙata wasu misãlai masu tsarin neural a farko, ko kuma a kan, misãlai na farko, ko yana dõgara ga alama masu nau'i ga maganar-leveli, da mafi yawansu yana da sauri mai girma idan an sanar da shi da alama-leveli kawai; ko kuma kada ka yi amfani da rukunan harshe (misali, misali, kalmõmi masu haske, maganar gaske). Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa misãlai masu sauƙi wanda aka yi wa wa'anar-daraja, kuma amma yana jarraba ka sami karatun linguistic rolin leksikon, maganar haske da kalmõmi masu kashewa. Mataimakin na nuna cewa misalinmu za'a iya iya kãma rolin lingui na maganar hisani, da maganar haske, da kalmõmi masu cikin hisani.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek obravnava klasifikacijo sentimentalnih stavkov. Čeprav so bili pred kratkim predlagani različni modeli nevronskih omrežij, so prejšnji modeli odvisni bodisi od dragih označb na ravni fraze, od katerih je večina izjemno poslabšala zmogljivost, če se usposablja samo z označevanjem na ravni stavka; ali ne uporabljajo v celoti jezikovnih virov (npr. sentimentalni leksikoni, negativne besede, intenzivne besede). V prispevku predlagamo preproste modele, usposobljene z označevanjem stavkov, poskušamo pa tudi modelirati jezikovno vlogo sentimentalnih leksikonov, negativnih besed in intenzivnih besed. Rezultati kažejo, da so naši modeli sposobni zajeti jezikovno vlogo sentimentalnih besed, negativnih besed in intenzivnih besed v sentimentalnem izražanju.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתמודד עם קליפורת רגשות רמת המשפט. למרות שהצעו מגוון של דוגמנים רשת עצבית לאחרונה, למרות זאת, דוגמנים קודמים או תלויים על ציונים יקרים ברמה של ביטויים, רובם יש ביצועים משפילים באופן יוצא דופן כשמאומנים עם ציונים ברמה של משפטים בלבד; או שלא משתמשים במלוא במשאבים שפתיים (למשל לקסיקונים רגשות, מילים שליליות, מילים אינטנסיביות). בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים דוגמנים פשוטים מאומנים עם ציונים ברמה המשפטים, אבל גם מנסים לדוגמן את התפקיד השפתי של לקסיקונים רגשות, מילים שלילות, ומילים אינטנסיביות. התוצאות מראות שהדוגמנים שלנו יכולים לתפוס את התפקיד השפתי של מילים רגשות, מילים שליטה, ומילים אינטנסיביות בבטא רגשות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་དབུལ་དྲ་རྒྱ་མི་སྣ་ཚོགས་འདྲ་བ་དག་གི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུ་བསམ་ཡོད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས ཡང་ན་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡོངས་སྤྱོད་མ་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྐོར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་ན། མ་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཡིག་ཚོར་དང་སྟོང་ཚུགས་དྲན་གཏ'}
{'en': 'Sarcasm SIGN : Interpreting Sarcasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'ar': 'علامة السخرية: تفسير السخرية من خلال الترجمة الآلية أحادية اللغة القائمة على المشاعر', 'pt': 'Sinal de Sarcasmo: Interpretando Sarcasmo com Tradução Automática Monolíngue Baseada em Sentimentos', 'es': 'SIGNO DE SARCASMO: Interpretación del sarcasmo con traducción automática monolingüe basada en sentimientos', 'fr': 'SARCASM SIGN\xa0: Interpréter le sarcasme avec la traduction automatique monolingue basée sur les sentiments', 'ja': '皮肉標識：感情に基づく単語訳による皮肉の解釈', 'ru': 'ЗНАК сарказма: интерпретация сарказма с помощью одноязычного машинного перевода на основе сентиментов', 'zh': '刺符号:以情单语机器翻译解刺', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य साइन इन करें: भावना आधारित मोनोलिंगुअल मशीन अनुवाद के साथ व्यंग्य की व्याख्या', 'ga': 'Comhartha Sarcasm: Sarcasm a Léiriú le hAistriúchán Meaisín Aonteangach Bunaithe ar Mhianú', 'ka': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sarcasm- ის შესაგრძელება Sentiment- ის მონოლინგური მაქსინის შესაგრძელება', 'el': 'Σημάδι σαρκασμού: Διερμηνεία Σαρκασμού με Μονόγλωσση Μηχανική Μετάφραση βασισμένη σε συναισθήματα', 'hu': 'Szarkazmus JEL: Szarkazmus tolmácsolása érzelmi alapú egynyelvű gépi fordítással', 'it': 'Segno del sarcasmo: Interpretare il sarcasmo con traduzione automatica monolingue basata sul sentimento', 'kk': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sentiment- негіздеген бірнеше тілі машинаның аудармасынан Sarcasm- ды аудару', 'lt': 'Sarkazmo SIGN: Sarkazmo aiškinimas su jausmais pagrįstais monokalbiniais mašinų vertimais', 'ms': 'SIGN Sarkasm: Menerjemahkan Sarkasm dengan Terjemahan Mesin Monolingual Berasas Sentiment', 'mk': 'СИГН на сарказмот: Интерпретација на сарказмот со превод на монолинглуална машина базирана на чувства', 'ml': 'സര്\u200dക്കാസം SIGN: സർക്കാസം സെന്റിമെന്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോണോളിഗല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mn': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'no': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Interpreterer Sarkasm med Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'mt': 'SIGN tas-Sarkazmu: Interpretazzjoni tas-Sarkazmu mat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Monolingwali bbażata fuq is-Sentimenti', 'pl': 'Sarkazm SIGN: Tłumaczenie sarkazmu za pomocą jednojęzycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na sentymentach', 'ro': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Interpretarea sarcasmului cu traducere automată monolingvă bazată pe sentimente', 'sr': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Interpreting Sarkasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'si': 'සර්කාස්ම් සිග්න්: සර්කාස්ම් එක්ක සංවේදනය අධාරිත Monolingual machine translation', 'so': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Interpreting Sarcasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'sv': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Tolkning av sarkasm med känslobaserad enspråkig maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sarcasm சென்டிமென்ட் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'uz': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Sarkasm (Sentiment Based Monolingual Mashine tarjima) bilan tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Sarcasm SIGNN: Dịch giải Sarcasm với một bản đa ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Сарказъм ЗАГН: Тълкуване на сарказма с моноезичен машинен превод', 'hr': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Interpreting Sarkasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'da': 'Sarkasme SIGN: Tolkning af sarkasme med følelsesbaseret ensproget maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Sarcasme SIGN: Sarcasme interpreteren met Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'de': 'Sarkasmus SIGN: Dolmetschen von Sarkasmus mit Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'ko': '풍자 기호: 감정에 기초한 단어', 'id': 'SIGN Sarkasme: Menterjemahkan Sarkasme dengan Translation Monolingual Machine Berdasarkan Sentiment', 'fa': 'سارکاسم SIGN: تفسیر سارکاسم با ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای سینولیزبانی', 'sw': 'SIGN: Kutafsiri Sarcasm na Kifaa cha Sentiment based on Monolingual', 'sq': 'Sarkazmi SIGN: Përkthimi i sarkazmit me përkthimin e makinave monolinguale të bazuar në ndjenja', 'af': 'Sarcasm SIGN: Interpreting Sarcasm met Sentiment Based Monolingueel Masjien Vertaling', 'tr': 'Sarcasm SIGN:Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Սարկազմ ՍԻԳ. Սարկազմը թարգմանում է զգացմունքի հիմնված մոնալեզու մեքենայի թարգմանման հետ', 'az': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'SIGN del sarcasme: Interpretar el sarcasme amb traducció de màquines monolingües basades en sentiments', 'cs': 'Sarkasmus SIGN: Tlumočení sarkasmu s jednojjazyčným strojovým překladem založeným na sentimentech', 'bn': 'Sarcasm SIGN: সেন্টাইমেন্ট ভিত্তিক মনোলিভাল মেশিনের অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Sarkasm SIGN: Interpreting Sarkasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation', 'et': 'Sarkasmi SIGN: Sarkasmi tõlgendamine sentimendipõhise ühekeelse masintõlkega', 'fi': 'Sarkasmi SIGN: Sarkasmin tulkkaus sentimenttipohjaisella monikielisellä konekäännöksellä', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Sarkazem ZNAK: Tolmačenje sarkazma z enojezičnim strojnim prevajanjem na osnovi čustev', 'he': 'סימן סרקזם: פרשנת סרקזם עם תרגום של מכונת מונולינגולית מבוססת רגשות', 'jv': 'Sarkasm SEGN:', 'bo': 'Sarcasm SIGN:Interpreting Sarcasm with Sentiment Based Monolingual Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Sarcasm is a form of speech in which speakers say the opposite of what they truly mean in order to convey a strong sentiment. In other words, Sarcasm is the giant chasm between what I say, and the person who does n’t get it.. In this paper we present the novel task of sarcasm interpretation, defined as the generation of a non-sarcastic utterance conveying the same message as the original sarcastic one. We introduce a novel dataset of 3000 sarcastic tweets, each interpreted by five human judges. Addressing the task as monolingual machine translation (MT), we experiment with MT algorithms and evaluation measures. We then present SIGN : an MT based sarcasm interpretation algorithm that targets sentiment words, a defining element of textual sarcasm. We show that while the scores of n-gram based automatic measures are similar for all interpretation models, SIGN’s interpretations are scored higher by humans for adequacy and sentiment polarity. We conclude with a discussion on future research directions for our new task.', 'ar': 'السخرية هي شكل من أشكال الكلام يقول فيه المتحدثون عكس ما يقصدونه حقًا من أجل نقل شعور قوي. بعبارة أخرى ، "السخرية هي الهوة العملاقة بين ما أقوله والشخص الذي لا يفهمها." نقدم في هذا البحث المهمة الجديدة لتفسير السخرية ، والتي تُعرّف على أنها توليد كلام غير ساخر ينقل نفس الرسالة الساخرة الأصلية. نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة من 3000 تغريدة ساخرة ، فسر كل منها خمسة قضاة بشريين. عند تناول المهمة مثل الترجمة الآلية أحادية اللغة (MT) ، نجرب خوارزميات الترجمة الآلية وإجراءات التقييم. ثم نقدم SIGN: خوارزمية لتفسير السخرية تعتمد على MT وتستهدف كلمات المشاعر ، وهي عنصر محدد للسخرية النصية. نظهر أنه في حين أن درجات المقاييس التلقائية المستندة إلى n-gram متشابهة لجميع نماذج التفسير ، فإن تفسيرات SIGN يتم تسجيلها أعلى من قبل البشر من حيث الكفاءة وقطبية المشاعر. نختتم بمناقشة حول اتجاهات البحث المستقبلية لمهمتنا الجديدة.', 'pt': 'O sarcasmo é uma forma de discurso em que os falantes dizem o oposto do que realmente querem dizer para transmitir um sentimento forte. Em outras palavras, “O sarcasmo é o abismo gigante entre o que eu digo e a pessoa que não entende.”. Neste artigo apresentamos a nova tarefa de interpretação do sarcasmo, definida como a geração de um enunciado não sarcástico transmitindo a mesma mensagem que o sarcasmo original. Apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados de 3.000 tweets sarcásticos, cada um interpretado por cinco juízes humanos. Abordando a tarefa como tradução automática monolíngue (MT), experimentamos algoritmos de MT e medidas de avaliação. Em seguida, apresentamos SIGN: um algoritmo de interpretação de sarcasmo baseado em MT que visa palavras de sentimento, um elemento definidor do sarcasmo textual. Mostramos que enquanto as pontuações das medidas automáticas baseadas em n-gram são semelhantes para todos os modelos de interpretação, as interpretações do SIGN são pontuadas mais por humanos para adequação e polaridade de sentimento. Concluímos com uma discussão sobre futuras direções de pesquisa para nossa nova tarefa.', 'es': 'El sarcasmo es una forma de hablar en la que los hablantes dicen lo contrario de lo que realmente quieren decir para transmitir un sentimiento fuerte. En otras palabras, «El sarcasmo es el abismo gigante entre lo que digo y la persona que no lo entiende».. En este artículo presentamos la novedosa tarea de la interpretación del sarcasmo, definida como la generación de un enunciado no sarcástico que transmita el mismo mensaje que el sarcástico original. Presentamos un conjunto de datos novedoso de 3000 tuits sarcásticos, cada uno interpretado por cinco jueces humanos. Abordando la tarea como traducción automática (MT) monolingüe, experimentamos con algoritmos de MT y medidas de evaluación. Luego presentamos SIGN: un algoritmo de interpretación del sarcasmo basado en MT que apunta a las palabras de sentimiento, un elemento definitorio del sarcasmo textual. Mostramos que, si bien las puntuaciones de las medidas automáticas basadas en n-gramas son similares para todos los modelos de interpretación, las interpretaciones de SIGN son puntuadas más altas por los humanos en cuanto a adecuación y polaridad de sentimiento. Concluimos con un debate sobre las futuras direcciones de investigación para nuestra nueva tarea.', 'fr': "Le sarcasme est une forme de discours dans laquelle les orateurs disent le contraire de ce qu'ils veulent vraiment dire afin de transmettre un sentiment fort. En d'autres termes, «\xa0Le sarcasme est le gouffre géant entre ce que je dis et la personne qui ne comprend pas.\xa0». Dans cet article, nous présentons la nouvelle tâche de l'interprétation du sarcasme, définie comme la génération d'un énoncé non sarcastique véhiculant le même message que le sarcastique original. Nous introduisons un nouveau jeu de données de 3000 tweets sarcastiques, chacun interprété par cinq juges humains. En abordant la tâche de traduction automatique monolingue (TA), nous expérimentons des algorithmes de TA et des mesures d'évaluation. Nous présentons ensuite SIGN\xa0: un algorithme d'interprétation du sarcasme basé sur la MT qui cible les mots sentimentaux, un élément déterminant du sarcasme textuel. Nous montrons que même si les scores des mesures automatiques basées sur des n-grammes sont similaires pour tous les modèles d'interprétation, les interprétations de SIGN sont mieux notées par les humains en termes d'adéquation et de polarité des sentiments. Nous terminerons par une discussion sur les futures orientations de recherche pour notre nouvelle tâche.", 'ja': '皮肉は、強い感情を伝えるために、話し手が本当の意味とは逆のことを言うスピーチの一形態です。 つまり、「皮肉は、私が言うことと、それを理解していない人との間の巨大な亀裂です。」 この論文では、皮肉解釈の新規なタスクを提示します。これは、元の皮肉と同じメッセージを伝える非皮肉な発言の生成として定義されます。 私たちは3000の皮肉なツイートの新規データセットを紹介しています。それぞれ5人の人間の審査員が解釈しています。 モノリンガル機械翻訳（ MT ）としての課題に取り組み、MTアルゴリズムと評価尺度を実験しました。 次に、テキスト風刺の決定的な要素である感情の言葉をターゲットにしたMTベースの皮肉解釈アルゴリズムの兆候を提示します。 我々は、n - gramベースの自動測定のスコアがすべての解釈モデルで類似しているが、SIGNの解釈は、ヒトによって十分性と感情の極性についてより高いスコアであることを示している。 最後に、新しいタスクの将来の研究方向についてのディスカッションを行います。', 'zh': '刺者,文也,言者反其真,以达其情。 换句话说曰:"刺者,吾言不明之鸿沟也。 刺解之新,义生非讽刺性语,传与始讽刺性同音。 引入一3000条刺推文所成新数集,每条推文五人法官解释。 吾将以为单语机器翻译 (MT) ,试机器翻译算评。 然后发SIGN:MT刺释算,针对情感词,此文本刺之定义元素也。 虽n-gram之自度,于诸说相似,而人类之于SIGN说,在充分性情极性得分高。 最后,我们将议论新任的未来研究方向。', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य भाषण का एक रूप है जिसमें वक्ता एक मजबूत भावना को व्यक्त करने के लिए वास्तव में उनका क्या मतलब है, इसके विपरीत कहते हैं। दूसरे शब्दों में, "व्यंग्य जो मैं कहता हूं, और उस व्यक्ति के बीच विशाल खाई है जो इसे प्राप्त नहीं करता है। इस पत्र में हम व्यंग्य व्याख्या के उपन्यास कार्य को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसे एक गैर-व्यंग्यात्मक उच्चारण की पीढ़ी के रूप में परिभाषित किया गया है जो मूल व्यंग्यात्मक एक के रूप में एक ही संदेश देता है। हम 3000 व्यंग्यात्मक ट्वीट्स का एक उपन्यास डेटासेट पेश करते हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक की व्याख्या पांच मानव न्यायाधीशों द्वारा की जाती है। मोनोलिंगुअल मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) के रूप में कार्य को संबोधित करते हुए, हम एमटी एल्गोरिदम और मूल्यांकन उपायों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। फिर हम SIGN प्रस्तुत करते हैं: एक एमटी आधारित व्यंग्य व्याख्या एल्गोरिथ्म जो भावना शब्दों को लक्षित करता है, जो पाठ्य व्यंग्य का एक परिभाषित तत्व है। हम दिखाते हैं कि जबकि एन-ग्राम आधारित स्वचालित उपायों के स्कोर सभी व्याख्या मॉडलों के लिए समान हैं, साइन की व्याख्याओं को पर्याप्तता और भावना ध्रुवीयता के लिए मनुष्यों द्वारा अधिक स्कोर किया जाता है। हम अपने नए कार्य के लिए भविष्य के अनुसंधान निर्देशों पर चर्चा के साथ समाप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Сарказм - это форма речи, в которой ораторы говорят противоположное тому, что они действительно означают, чтобы выразить сильные чувства. Другими словами, «Сарказм - это огромная пропасть между тем, что я говорю, и человеком, который этого не понимает». В этой статье мы представляем новую задачу интерпретации сарказма, определяемую как генерация не саркастического высказывания, передающего то же послание, что и оригинальное саркастическое. Мы представляем новый набор данных из 3000 саркастических твитов, каждый из которых интерпретируется пятью человеческими судьями. Решая задачу как моноязычный машинный перевод (МТ), мы экспериментируем с алгоритмами МТ и оценочными мерами. Затем мы представляем ЗНАК: основанный на MT алгоритм интерпретации сарказма, который нацелен на слова настроения, определяющий элемент текстового сарказма. Мы показываем, что, хотя баллы автоматических измерений на основе n-грамм одинаковы для всех моделей интерпретации, интерпретации ЗНАКА оцениваются людьми выше на предмет адекватности и полярности настроений. Мы завершаем обсуждение будущих направлений исследований для нашей новой задачи.', 'ga': 'Is cineál cainte é searbhas ina ndeir cainteoirí a mhalairt de chiall atá leo chun meon láidir a chur in iúl. Is é sin le rá, “Is é an searbhas an chasm ollmhór idir an méid a deirim, agus an duine nach bhfaigheann é.”. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair an tasc nua a bhaineann le léirmhíniú searbhas, a shainmhínítear mar chaint neamhthámharach a ghiniúint a chuireann an teachtaireacht chéanna in iúl agus a bhí sa bhunchalla. Tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí nua de 3000 tvuít sarcastic, gach ceann díobh arna léirmhíniú ag cúigear breithiúna daonna. Agus muid ag tabhairt faoin tasc mar aistriúchán meaisín aonteangach (MT), déanaimid tástáil ar algartaim MT agus ar bhearta meastóireachta. Cuirimid i láthair ansin SIGN: algartam léirmhínithe searbhas atá bunaithe ar MT a dhíríonn ar fhocail sentiment, gné shainitheach den searbhas téacsúil. Léirímid, cé go bhfuil scóir na mbeart uathoibríoch bunaithe ar n-gram cosúil le gach samhail léirmhínithe, go bhfaigheann daoine scóráil níos airde ar léirmhínithe SIGN maidir le leordhóthanacht agus polaraíocht meon. Mar chríoch le plé ar threoracha taighde don tasc nua atá againn amach anseo.', 'ka': 'საპკაზმი არის სიტყვას, რომელიც სიტყვარები ამბობენ, რაც ისინი ნამდვილად უნიშნავს, რომ ძალიან სიტყვარები გაგზავნა. სხვა სიტყვებით, "საპკასმი არის დიდ გარგება, რაც მე ვთქვა, და ადამიანი, რომელიც არ მიიღებს." ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით საპკასმის ინტერპუქციის პრომენტური დავალება, როგორც განსაზღვრებულია როგორც არ-საპკასტიური სიტყვას, რომელიც იგივე შეტყობინება ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ პრომენტის მონაცემების საქაპკატიური რვიტები, რომელიც ყოველ ხუთი ადამიანის წესებით განრგუნება. მონოლენგური მაქსინის გაგრძელების შესახებ (MT) დავკერიმენეთ MT ალგორიტიმებით და განსაზღვრებით. შემდეგ ჩვენ გვეჩვენებთ SIGN: MT-დაბათებული საპკასმის ინტერპუქციის ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც სენტიმენტის სიტყვების მიზეზი, ტექსტულ საპკასმის განსაზღვრული ელემენტი ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ n-გრამის მონაცემები ავტომატური მოზემებები ყველა ინტერპლექციის მოდელებისთვის იგივეა, რომ SIGN-ის ინტერპლექციები ადამიანები უფრო მეტია ადამიანებისთვის ჩვენ გადასრულებთ განსხვავებას მომავალე სწორედ განსხვავებული მიზეზების შესახებ ჩვენი ახალი დავალებისთვის.', 'hu': 'A szarkazmus olyan beszédformája, amelyben a felszólalók az ellenkezőjét mondják annak, amit valójában jelentenek, hogy erős érzést közvetítsenek. Más szavakkal: "A szarkazmus az óriási szakadék, amit mondok és az ember között, aki nem érti meg." Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk a szarkasztikus értelmezés újszerű feladatát, amely egy olyan nem szarkasztikus kifejezés generálását jelenti, amely ugyanazt az üzenetet közvetíti, mint az eredeti szarkasztikus. Bemutatunk egy 3000 szarkasztikus tweetet tartalmazó új adatkészletet, amelyeket öt emberi bíró értelmez. A feladatot egynyelvű gépi fordításként (MT) foglalkozva MT algoritmusokkal és értékelési intézkedésekkel kísérletezünk. Ezután bemutatjuk a SIGN-t: egy MT alapú szarkazmus értelmezési algoritmust, amely az érzelmek szavait célozza meg, a szöveges szarkazmus meghatározó elemét. Megmutatjuk, hogy bár az n-gramm alapú automatikus mérések pontszáma hasonló minden értelmezési modell esetében, a SIGN értelmezéseit az emberek magasabb pontszámot kapnak a megfelelőség és az érzelmi polaritás tekintetében. Az új feladatunk jövőbeli kutatási irányairól szóló vitával zárjuk.', 'el': 'Ο σαρκασμός είναι μια μορφή ομιλίας στην οποία οι ομιλητές λένε το αντίθετο από αυτό που πραγματικά εννοούν προκειμένου να μεταδώσουν ένα ισχυρό συναίσθημα. Με άλλα λόγια, "ο σαρκασμός είναι το τεράστιο χάσμα ανάμεσα σε αυτά που λέω και σε αυτόν που δεν το καταλαβαίνει". Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζεται το νέο έργο της ερμηνείας του σαρκασμού, που ορίζεται ως η δημιουργία μιας μη σαρκαστικής έκφρασης που μεταφέρει το ίδιο μήνυμα με το αρχικό σαρκαστικό. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων από 3000 σαρκαστικά tweets, το καθένα ερμηνεύεται από πέντε ανθρώπους δικαστές. Αντιμετωπίζοντας το έργο ως μονογλωσσική μηχανική μετάφραση (ΜΤ), πειραματιζόμαστε με αλγόριθμους ΜΤ και μέτρα αξιολόγησης. Στη συνέχεια, παρουσιάζουμε έναν αλγόριθμο ερμηνείας σαρκασμού βασισμένο στο ΜΤ που στοχεύει στις λέξεις συναισθημάτων, ένα καθοριστικό στοιχείο του κειμένου σαρκασμού. Δείχνουμε ότι ενώ οι βαθμολογίες των αυτόματων μετρήσεων που βασίζονται σε γραμμάριο είναι παρόμοιες για όλα τα μοντέλα ερμηνείας, οι ερμηνείες του βαθμολογούνται υψηλότερα από τους ανθρώπους για την επάρκεια και την πολικότητα συναισθημάτων. Ολοκληρώνουμε με μια συζήτηση για τις μελλοντικές κατευθύνσεις έρευνας για το νέο μας έργο.', 'it': 'Il sarcasmo è una forma di discorso in cui gli oratori dicono il contrario di ciò che realmente significano per trasmettere un sentimento forte. In altre parole, "il sarcasmo è il divario gigante tra ciò che dico e la persona che non lo capisce". In questo articolo presentiamo il nuovo compito di interpretazione sarcastica, definito come la generazione di un\'espressione non sarcastica che trasmette lo stesso messaggio di quello sarcastico originale. Introducemo un nuovo dataset di 3000 tweet sarcastici, ognuno interpretato da cinque giudici umani. Affrontando il compito come traduzione automatica monolingue (MT), sperimentiamo algoritmi MT e misure di valutazione. Presentiamo quindi SIGN: un algoritmo di interpretazione del sarcasmo basato su MT che mira alle parole sentimentale, elemento determinante del sarcasmo testuale. Mostriamo che mentre i punteggi delle misure automatiche basate su n-gram sono simili per tutti i modelli di interpretazione, le interpretazioni di SIGN sono punteggi più alti dagli esseri umani per adeguatezza e polarità sentimentale. Concludiamo con una discussione sulle future direzioni di ricerca per il nostro nuovo compito.', 'mk': 'Сарказмот е форма на говор во кој говорниците велат спротивно од она што навистина го мислат за да го пренесат силното чувство. Со други зборови, "Сарказмот е огромен јаз помеѓу она што го велам и личноста која не го сфаќа". Во овој весник ја претставуваме новата задача на интерпретацијата на сарказмот, дефинирана како генерација на несаркастичен израз кој ја пренесува истата порака како оригиналната саркастична. Ние претставуваме нови податоци од 3000 саркастични твитови, кои секој ги интерпретира пет човечки судии. Адресирајќи ја задачата како монојазичен машински превод (МТ), експериментираме со МТ алгоритми и мерки за проценка. Потоа го претставуваме СИГН: алгоритм за интерпретација на сарказам базиран на МТ кој се насочува кон зборовите за чувства, дефинирачки елемент на текстуалниот сарказам. Ние покажуваме дека иако оценките на автоматските мерки базирани на n-грам се слични за сите интерпретациски модели, интерпретациите на СИГН се оценувани повисоки од страна на луѓето за соодветност и поларитет на чувствата. Завршиме со дискусија за идните насоки на истражувањето за нашата нова задача.', 'kk': 'Сарказм - сөйлеу түрі. Ол үшін сөйлеушілер күшті сезім беру үшін олардың қарсы деп айтылады. Басқа сөздері: "Саркассм - мен айтып тұрғанымдың арасындағы үлкен және оны түсінбейтін адам" дейді. Бұл қағазда саркассмды түсініктеменің романдық тапсырманы көрсетедік. Саркасстық емес сөйлеменің құрылуы ретінде анықталды. Бұл хабарламаны бастапқы саркасстық сөйлеменің түсінікті. Біз 3000 саркастикалық тейтеттердің романдық деректер жиынын таңдаймыз. Әрбір бес адам тәжірибесін түсіндіреді. Тапсырманы монолингілі машинаның аударуы (MT) ретінде қосу үшін MT алгоритмдермен және оқу мерзімдерінен тәжірибелеміз. Содан кейін SIGN-ді таңдаймыз: MT-негіздеген саркассм түсінімін алгоритм, көңіл сөздері, мәтіндік саркассмын анықтайтын элемент. Біз n- граммды автоматты түрде негіздеген нәтижелер барлық түрлендіру үлгілеріне ұқсас болғанда, SIGN түрлендірімі адамдардың адамдардың оқиға және сезімдік поляриясы үшін артық. Біз жаңа тапсырма үшін келесі зерттеу бағыттары туралы дискуссия жасадық.', 'lt': 'Sarkazmas yra kalbos form a, kurioje kalbėtojai sako priešingai, ką jie iš tikrųjų reiškia, kad galėtų perduoti tvirtą jausmą. Kitaip tariant, "Sarkazmas yra milžiniškas tarpas tarp mano žodžių ir žmogaus, kuris to nesupranta". Šiame dokumente pristatome naują sarkazmo aiškinimo užduotį, apibrėžiamą kaip ne sarkastinio išraiško kartą, kuri perduoda tą pačią žinią kaip ir originalus sarkastinis išraiškas. Mes pristatome naują 3000 sarkastinių tweetų duomenų rinkinį, kiekvieną išaiškintą penkių žmogaus teisėjų. Kalbant apie užduotį kaip vienkalbį mašinų vertimą (MT), eksperimentuojame su MT algoritmais ir vertinimo priemonėmis. Tada pristatome SIGN: MT pagrįstą sarkazmo aiškinimo algoritmą, kuriuo siekiama sentimento žodžių, apibrėžiančio tekstinio sarkazmo elemento. Mes rodome, kad nors n gramais pagrįstų automatinių matavimų rezultatai yra panašūs visiems aiškinimo modeliams, žmonės vertina SIGN aiškinimus aukščiau dėl tinkamumo ir jautrumo poliarumo. Baigiame diskusiją dėl būsimų mokslinių tyrimų krypčių mūsų naujai užduotims atlikti.', 'ms': "Sarcasm is a form of speech in which speakers say the opposite of what they truly mean in order to convey a strong sentiment.  Dengan kata lain, 'Sarkasme adalah kejahatan raksasa antara apa yang saya katakan, dan orang yang tidak faham.'. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan tugas novel interpretasi sarkasme, ditakrif sebagai generasi ucapan bukan sarkastik yang menyampaikan mesej yang sama dengan yang sarkastik asal. Kami memperkenalkan set data novel 3000 tweet sarkastik, masing-masing diterjemahkan oleh lima hakim manusia. Addressing the task as monolingual machine translation (MT), we experiment with MT algorithms and evaluation measures.  Kemudian kita perkenalkan SIGN: algoritma interpretasi sarkasma berdasarkan MT yang sasarkan perkataan sentimen, unsur menentukan sarkasma teks. Kami menunjukkan bahawa walaupun skor langkah automatik berdasarkan n-gram adalah sama untuk semua model interpretasi, interpretasi SIGN ditandai lebih tinggi oleh manusia untuk keperluan dan polaritas sentimen. Kita berakhir dengan perbincangan tentang arah kajian masa depan untuk tugas baru kita.", 'ml': "സര്\u200dക്കാസം ഒരു സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള രീതിയാണ്. അതില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d സത്യത്തിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശം എതിര്\u200dത്ത് പറയുന്നു. ശക് In other words, 'Sarcasm is the giant chasm between what I say, and the person who doesn't get it.'.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സര്\u200dക്കാസം വ്യാഖ്യാനം നടത്തുന്ന നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ തലമുറയായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാ 3,000 സർക്കാസിക് ട്ടീറ്റുകളുടെ നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അഞ്ചു മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള Addressing the task as monolingual machine translation (MT), we experiment with MT algorithms and evaluation measures.  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d SIGN സന്ദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: എംടി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സർക്കാസം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ആല്\u200dഗോരിത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു എല്ലാ വ്യാഖ്യാനം മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള സ്കോര്\u200d ഗ്രാമ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സിഗ്നിന്റെ  നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ ജോലിക്കുള്ള നിരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ നേര്\u200dവഴികളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു ചര്\u200dച്ചയുമായി അവസ", 'no': 'Sarkasm er ein form av tale som snakkarar sier motsatt av det dei virkelig mener for å gjera ein sterk følelse. I andre ord, «Sarkasm er den store chasmen mellom det eg sier, og personen som ikkje får det.». I denne papiret presenterer vi den novelle oppgåva av sarkasma-tolkinga, definert som generasjonen av eit ikkje-sarkastisk uttale som konverterer den same meldinga som den opprinnelige sarkastiske. Vi introduserer eit romansk dataset med 3000 sarkastiske tweeter, kvar som tolkar av fem menneske reglar. Å adressere oppgåva som monospråk maskinsomsetjing (MT), eksperimenterer vi med MT- algoritme og evalueringsmålar. Vi presenterer så SIGN: ein MT-basert sarkasm-interpreteringsalgoritme som målar sentiment-ord, eit definisjon av tekstsarkasm. Vi viser at mens poeng av n-grambaserte automatiske målar er liknande for alle tolkingsmodular, vert SIGN interpretasjonane oppretta høgare av menneske for tilpassende og sentimentpolær. Vi avsluttar med ein diskusjon om framtidige forskningsretningar for vår nye oppgåve.', 'mn': 'Саркассм бол илтгэгчид үнэндээ юу гэсэн үг вэ гэдгийг хэлэхдээ хүчтэй сэтгэл хөдлөл өгөхийн тулд эсрэг хэлж байна. Өөрөөр хэлбэл, "Сарказм бол миний хэлдэг зүйлсийн хоорондох том шалтгаан, мэдэхгүй хүн". Энэ цаасан дээр бид саркассмын түүхийн шинэ даалгаварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Өмнөх саркассмын түүхийг илэрхийлж буй хэлний үеэр тодорхойлдог. Бид 3000 саркаст тууйтын шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг танилцуулж байна. Үүнийг ганц хэлний машин хөрөнгө оруулах (MT) гэж бодоход бид MT алгоритмыг шалгаж, үнэлэх хэмжээсүүдтэй туршиж байна. Тэгээд бид SIGN-г харуулж байна: MT-д суурилсан саркассмын тодорхойлолтын алгоритм нь мэдрэмжтэй үг, текстурын саркассмын тодорхойлж буй элемент юм. N-граммын үндсэн автоматик хэмжээсүүд нь бүх тодорхойлолтын загваруудын төстэй байхдаа SIGN-ын тодорхойлолтуудыг хүн төрөлхтний тулд илүү өндөр тодорхойлж байна. Бид ирээдүйн судалгааны шинэ ажлын тухай ярилцлага хийсэн.', 'pl': 'Sarkazm to forma mowy, w której mówcy mówią odwrotnie od tego, co naprawdę mają na myśli, aby przekazać silne uczucia. Innymi słowy, "Sarkazm jest olbrzymią przepaścią między tym, co mówię, a osobą, która tego nie rozumie". W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorskie zadanie interpretacji sarkazmu, zdefiniowane jako generowanie wypowiedzi niesarkastycznej przekazującej ten sam przekaz co oryginalny sarkastyczny. Wprowadzamy nowatorski zestaw danych 3000-sarkastycznych tweetów, interpretowanych przez pięciu ludzkich sędziów. Podejmując zadanie jako jednojęzyczne tłumaczenie maszynowe (MT), eksperymentujemy z algorytmami MT i środkami oceny. Następnie przedstawiamy SIGN: algorytm interpretacji sarkazmu oparty na MT, który ukierunkowuje na słowa sentymentów, definiujący element sarkazmu tekstowego. Pokazujemy, że podczas gdy wyniki automatycznych miar opartych na n-gramach są podobne dla wszystkich modeli interpretacyjnych, interpretacje SIGN są oceniane wyżej przez ludzi pod względem adekwatności i polaryzacji sentymentów. Zakończymy dyskusją na temat przyszłych kierunków badań nad naszym nowym zadaniem.', 'ro': 'Sarcasmul este o formă de discurs în care vorbitorii spun opusul a ceea ce înseamnă cu adevărat pentru a transmite un sentiment puternic. Cu alte cuvinte, "Sarcasmul este prăpastia uriașă dintre ceea ce spun și persoana care nu înțelege". În această lucrare prezentăm noua sarcină a interpretării sarcasmului, definită ca generarea unei pronunțări non-sarcastice care transmite același mesaj ca și cel sarcastic original. Introducem un nou set de date de 3000 de tweeturi sarcastice, fiecare interpretat de cinci judecători umani. Abordând sarcina ca traducere automată monolingvă (MT), experimentăm algoritmi MT și măsuri de evaluare. Apoi prezentăm SIGN: un algoritm de interpretare a sarcasmului bazat pe MT care vizează cuvintele sentimentale, un element definitor al sarcasmului textual. Arătăm că în timp ce scorurile măsurătorilor automate bazate pe n-gram sunt similare pentru toate modelele de interpretare, interpretările SIGN sunt scorate mai mari de oameni pentru adecvare și polaritate sentimentală. Încheiem cu o discuție privind direcțiile viitoare de cercetare pentru noua noastră sarcină.', 'sr': 'Sarkazam je oblik govora u kojem govornici kažu suprotno od onoga što stvarno misle kako bi predali jaku osjećaj. Drugim reèima, "Sarkazam je ogromna lova izmeðu onoga što kažem, i osobe koja ga ne dobija." U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi zadatak interpretacije sarkasma, definisan kao generacija neosarkastičnog govora koja prenosi istu poruku kao originalni sarkastični. Predstavljamo novu kompletu podataka od 3000 sarkastičnih tweeta, svakog od njih je interpretirano pet ljudskih sudaca. Obraćanje zadatka kao monojezički prevod mašine (MT), eksperimentiramo sa MT algoritmima i mjerama procjene. Onda predstavljamo SIGN: algoritam za interpretaciju sarkazma na MT-u koji cilja reči sentiment a, definirajući element tekstualnog sarkazma. Pokazujemo da, dok su rezultati automatskih mjera baziranih na n-gramu slični svim modelima interpretacije, interpretacije SIGN-a dobijaju veće od strane ljudi za adekvatnost i polarnost sentimenta. Završili smo s diskusijom o budućim istraživačkim uputama za naš novi zadatak.', 'so': 'Sarkasm waa qaab hadal ku hadla oo ay ku hadlaan si ka gees ah waxa ay micneheedu tahay si ay u muujiyaan fikir xoog leh. Hadal kalena waxay yidhaahdaan, Sarcas waa dhoobada waaweyn oo u dhexeeya waxaan leeyahay iyo qofka aan helin. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa shaqada safaarada sarcasm, taas oo loo yaqaan qarniga hadal aan sarcastic ahayn oo u sheegaya warqad isku mid ah oo asalka sarkaariyada ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa koox macluumaad warqad ah oo ah 3000 tweeti sarcastic, mid kastana waxaa lagu turjumay shan xaakinno oo dadku ah. Waxaynu ku baaraandegaynaa qoraalka MT iyo qiyaastii qiimeynta. Markaas waxaynu soo wadaynaa SIGN: Algoritm ku saabsan sarcasm oo MT ku saabsan turjumista sarcasm, kaas oo ku hagaajiya hadalka xisaabta ah, waxyaabaha ku qoran sarcasm. Waxan tusnaynaa in marka lagu qorayo qiyaastii aan-gram-ku-qoray ay ay u eg yihiin tusaalaha turjumidda oo dhan, turjumidda SIGN waxaa lagu sarrayaa dadka si saxda ah iyo fikrada. Waxaynu dhamaystirnay sheekeysi ku saabsan hagitaanka waxbarashada mustaqbalka ah ee shaqadeeda cusub.', 'si': "සර්කාස්ම් තමයි කතාවක් වර්ගයක් කියනවා, ඒ වගේම සිපිකරුවන් කියන්නේ ඔවුන් ඇත්තටම අදහස් කරන දේවල් විරුද්ධ වෙ අනිත් වචනයෙන්, 'සර්කාස්ම් තමයි මම කියන දේවල් අතර ගොඩක් පස්සේ, ඒ වගේම ඒක ගන්නේ නැති මිනිහා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාර්කාස්ම් වාර්තාවේ නියම වැඩක් පෙන්වන්නේ, නොසාර්කාස්ටික් වාර්තාවක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා මුලින් සාර අපි නියම දත්ත සූදානම් 3000ක් සාර්කාසික් ට්විට් වලින්, හැමෝම මිනිස් නියෝජිත් පහක් වලින් අභි මේ වැඩේ එක භාෂාවක් යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තනය (MT) විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අපි MT ඇල්ගෝරිතම් සහ අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට එහෙනම් අපි SIGD එක පෙන්වන්නේ: MT අධාරිත සාර්කාස්ම් අභිවිධානය ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක්, ඒ වගේම සංවේදනය වචනය ලක්කන්  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්-ග්\u200dරාම් අධාරිත ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විසින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විසින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විසින් සමාන්\u200dය විසින් සමාන්\u200dය විසින අපි අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ගැන කතා කරනවා.", 'sv': 'Sarkasm är en form av tal där talare säger motsatsen till vad de verkligen menar för att förmedla en stark känsla. Med andra ord, "Sarkasm är den gigantiska klyftan mellan vad jag säger och den person som inte förstår det." I denna uppsats presenterar vi sarkasmtolkningens nya uppgift, definierad som skapandet av ett icke-sarkastiskt uttryck som förmedlar samma budskap som det ursprungliga sarkastiska. Vi introducerar en ny datauppsättning med 3000 sarkastiska tweets, var och en tolkad av fem mänskliga domare. För att hantera uppgiften som enspråkig maskinöversättning (MT), experimenterar vi med MT algoritmer och utvärderingsåtgärder. Vi presenterar sedan SIGN: en MT baserad sarkasm tolkningsalgoritm som riktar sig mot sentimentord, ett definierande element i textsarkasm. Vi visar att medan poängen för n-grambaserade automatiska mått är likartade för alla tolkningsmodeller, får SIGN:s tolkningar högre poäng av människor för lämplighet och sentimentpolaritet. Vi avslutar med en diskussion om framtida forskningsriktningar för vår nya uppgift.', 'ta': "Sarkasm ஒரு பேச்சு வடிவத்தில் பேசுபவர்கள் உண்மையில் என்ன சொல்கிறார்கள் என்று எதிராக அவர்கள் சொல்கிறார்கள் ஒரு வலிமை உணர் மற்ற வார்த்தைகளில் 'Sarcasm என்று நான் என்ன சொல்கிறேன் பெரிய வேட்டு இடையே இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் அதை கிடைக்காத நபர் In this paper we present the novel task of sarcasm interpretation, defined as the generation of a non-sarcastic utterance conveying the same message as the original sarcastic one.  நாம் 3,000 சார்காஸிக் டுவிட்டுகளில் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒவ்வொரு முறையும் ஐந்த மோனோலிங்கால் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பாக செயல்பாட்டை மொழிபெயர்ப்பாக்குவதால், MT ஆல்கிரிட்டம் மற்றும் மதிப்ப நாம் SIGN காண்பிக்கிறோம்: எம்டி அடிப்படையில் உள்ள sarcasm விளக்கம் ஆல்பரிட்டம். இது உணர்வு வார்த்தைகளை குறிப்பிடும், நிரல்  நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் நாம் நினைக்கிறோம் என்றால் நாம் தானாகவே தானியங்கி அளவுகள் அனைத்து மாதிரிப்பு மாதிரிகளுக்கும் போது, SIGN நாங்கள் எதிர்கால ஆய்வு திசைகள் பற்றி ஒரு விவாதத்தை முடிவு செய்கிறோம். நம்முடைய புதிய பணிக்", 'ur': 'زکرکسم ایک ایسی بات ہے جس میں بولنے والے اس بات سے مخالف کہتے ہیں جس کا یہ منظور ہے تاکہ ایک سخت احساس پہنچائیں اور دوسری باتوں سے کہہ دیں کہ سارکاسم میری بات کے درمیان بڑی سزا ہے اور وہ شخص جو اسے نہیں پاتا۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں Sarcasm تفسیر کی تاویل کا کام پیش کرتے ہیں، جو ایک غیر Sarcastic کلام کی نسل کے طور پر مقرر کیا گیا ہے جو ایک پیغام پہنچانے والی سارکاسٹی کی طرح پہنچاتا ہے۔ ہم نے 3000 سارکاسٹ ٹیوٹ کے ایک نو ڈیٹ سٹ کو معرفی کر دیا ہے، ہر ایک کو پانچ انسان کے قاضوں کی تعبیر کرتا ہے۔ ہم MT الگوریتم اور ارزیابی اندازے کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اس کے بعد SIGN کو پیش کرتے ہیں: ایک MT بنیاد سارکاسم تفسیر الگوریتم جو sentimental words کا موقع رکھتا ہے، ایک تفسیر الگوریتم کا مقرر کرنے والا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب ان گرم کی آٹوٹی اندازے بنیاد رکھتے ہیں سب تعبیر نمونڈلوں کے لئے برابر ہیں، SIGN کی تعبیر انسانوں کے ذریعے اضافہ اور احساساتی کے لئے اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم نے ہمارے نئے کام کے لئے آینده تحقیق طریقے کے بارے میں ایک بحث کے ساتھ فیصلہ کیا ہے.', 'mt': "Sarcasm is a form of speech in which speakers say the opposite of what they truly mean in order to convey a strong sentiment.  Fi kliem ieħor, 'Sarkazmu huwa l-qasma ġganta bejn dak li ngħid, u l-persuna li ma tiksibx.'. F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw il-kompitu ġdid ta’ interpretazzjoni tas-sarkasmu, definit bħala l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ dikjarazzjoni mhux sarkastika li tgħaddi l-istess messaġġ bħal dak sarkastiku oriġinali. Aħna nintroduċu sett ġdid ta’ dejta ta’ 3000 tweet sarkastiku, kull wieħed interpretat minn ħames imħallfin umani. Jindirizzaw il-kompitu bħala traduzzjoni tal-magna monolingwa (MT), aħna qed nagħmlu esperimenti b’algoritmi MT u miżuri ta’ evalwazzjoni. Imbagħad nippreżentaw SIGN: algoritmu tal-interpretazzjoni tas-sarkasmu bbażat fuq MT li jimmira l-kliem tas-sentiment, element definittiv tas-sarkasmu testwali. We show that while the scores of n-gram based automatic measures are similar for all interpretation models, SIGN's interpretations are scored higher by humans for adequacy and sentiment polarity.  Aħna nikkonkludu b'diskussjoni dwar id-direzzjonijiet futuri tar-riċerka għall-kompitu l-ġdid tagħna.", 'uz': 'Sarkasm bir suhbat tili, gapiruvchilar juda katta g\'oya aytish uchun so\'zlarni o\'zgartiradi. Boshqa so\'zlar bilan, "Sarkasm mening aytmoqchi katta taqdim va odamni o\'rganib olmaydi." Bu hujjatda, biz sarkasm tarjimalarining novel vazifasini hozir qilamiz, asl sarkastik kabi bir xabar deb belgilangan sarkastik aslida o\'xshash so\'zlarini yaratish deb belgilangan. Biz 3,000 sarkastik tweetidagi novel maʼlumotlar tarkibini anglatamiz, har biri besh inson xavfsiyatlariga tarjima qilamiz. Bu vazifani monolingual mashina tarjima qilish (MT) sifatida hisoblash uchun biz MT algoritlari va qiymatlar tilini tajribamiz. Keyin SIGN\'ni hozir qilamiz: MT asosida sarkasm tarjima algorithi, hissiyot so\'zlarini ko\'rsatadi, textual sarkasm elementini aniqlaydi. Biz buni ko\'rayapmiz, nagram asosida avtomatik o\'zgarishlar hamma tarjima modellariga o\'xshash mumkin, SIGNning turlari imkoniyatlarini o\'xshash va hissiyot polarida odamlarga ko\'proq. Biz yangi vazifa uchun kelajak qidirish qoidalari haqida gapirishni tugatamiz.', 'vi': 'Sự mỉa mai là một dạng ngôn ngữ mà những người nói ngược lại những gì họ thực sự có ý nghĩa để truyền đạt một cảm xúc mạnh mẽ. Nói cách khác, "Sarcass là vực thẳm khổng lồ giữa những gì t ôi nói, và cái người không hiểu ra." Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi đưa ra một nhiệm vụ giải thích mỉa mai mới, được xác định là sản xuất một lời phát âm không mỉa mai chuyển một thông điệp giống với cái chế nhạo ban đầu. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới với giá trị xỉa xói cổ 30007, đều được giải thích bởi năm trọng tài. Đối phó với nhiệm vụ như một bản dịch cỗ máy độc ngôn (MTV), chúng tôi thử nghiệm với thuật toán MTV và biện pháp đánh giá. Chúng tôi sẽ trình bày SIGNN: một thuật toán giải thích mỉa mai dựa trên MT để nhắm vào các từ ủy mị, một yếu tố định nghĩa của mỉa mai. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng dù tỉ s ố các biện pháp tự động dựa trên n-gram tương đương với tất cả các mô hình diễn giải, thì cách suy đoán của SIGN vẫn được tính toán cao hơn bởi con người về độ đủ và quan điểm tình cảm. Kết thúc bằng một cuộc thảo luận về hướng dẫn nghiên cứu tương lai cho nhiệm vụ mới của chúng ta.', 'bg': 'Сарказмът е форма на реч, при която говорителите казват обратното на това, което наистина означават, за да изразят силни чувства. С други думи, "Сарказмът е огромната пропаст между това, което казвам, и човека, който не го разбира". В настоящата статия представяме новата задача за интерпретация на сарказма, дефинирана като генериране на несаркастично изказване, предаващо същото послание като оригиналното саркастично. Представяме нов набор от данни от 3000 саркастични туитове, всеки интерпретиран от пет човешки съдии. Приемайки задачата като едноезичен машинен превод (МТ), експериментираме с алгоритми и мерки за оценка. След това представяме СИГН: базиран на МТ алгоритъм за интерпретация на сарказма, насочен към сантиментални думи, определящ елемент на текстовия сарказъм. Показваме, че макар оценките на автоматичните измервания, базирани на n-грам, са сходни за всички интерпретационни модели, интерпретациите на СИГН се оценяват по-високо от хората за адекватност и сентиментална полярност. Завършваме с дискусия за бъдещите насоки на изследванията за новата ни задача.', 'da': 'Sarkasme er en form for tale, hvor talere siger det modsatte af, hvad de virkelig mener for at formidle en stærk følelse. Med andre ord, "Sarkasme er den kæmpe kløft mellem det, jeg siger, og den person, der ikke forstår det." I denne artikel præsenterer vi sarkasmens nye opgave, defineret som genereringen af en ikke-sarkastisk udtalelse, der formidler det samme budskab som den oprindelige sarkastiske. Vi introducerer et nyt datasæt med 3000 sarkastiske tweets, hver fortolket af fem menneskelige dommere. Med opgaven som ensproget maskinoversættelse eksperimenterer vi med MT algoritmer og evalueringsforanstaltninger. Vi præsenterer derefter SIGN: en MT baseret sarkasme fortolkning algoritme, der målretter sentimentord, et definerende element af tekstsarkasme. Vi viser, at mens scorerne af n-gram baserede automatiske målinger er ens for alle fortolkningsmodeller, scores SIGN\'s fortolkninger højere af mennesker for tilstrækkelighed og sentimentpolaritet. Vi afslutter med en diskussion om fremtidige forskningsretninger for vores nye opgave.', 'nl': "Sarcasme is een vorm van spraak waarin sprekers het tegenovergestelde zeggen van wat ze werkelijk bedoelen om een sterk sentiment over te brengen. Met andere woorden, 'Sarcasme is de enorme kloof tussen wat ik zeg en degene die het niet begrijpt'. In dit artikel presenteren we de nieuwe taak van sarcasme interpretatie, gedefinieerd als het genereren van een niet-sarcastische uiting die dezelfde boodschap overbrengt als de oorspronkelijke sarcastische. We introduceren een nieuwe dataset van 3000-sarcastische tweets, elk geïnterpreteerd door vijf menselijke rechters. De taak aanpakken als monolingual machine translation (MT), experimenteren we met MT algoritmes en evaluatiemaatregelen. Vervolgens presenteren we SIGN: een op MT gebaseerd sarcasme interpretatie algoritme dat zich richt op sentiment woorden, een bepalend element van tekstueel sarcasme. We laten zien dat hoewel de scores van n-gram gebaseerde automatische metingen voor alle interpretatiemodellen vergelijkbaar zijn, de interpretaties van SIGN hoger worden gescoord door mensen voor adequaatheid en sentimentpolariteit. We sluiten af met een discussie over toekomstige onderzoeksrichtingen voor onze nieuwe taak.", 'hr': 'Sarkazam je oblik govora u kojem govornici kažu suprotno od onoga što stvarno znače kako bi prenijeli jaku osjećaj. Drugim riječima, "Sarkazam je ogromna lova između onoga što kažem, i osobe koja ga ne dobija." U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi zadatak interpretacije sarkazma, definiran kao generacija neosarkastičnog govora koja prenosi istu poruku kao originalna sarkastična. Predstavljamo novu kompletu podataka od 3000 sarkastičnih tweets, svakog tumačenog od pet ljudskih sudaca. Obraćanje zadatka kao prevod jednojezičkih strojeva (MT), eksperimentiramo s MT algoritmima i mjerama procjene. Onda predstavljamo SIGN: algoritam za interpretaciju sarkazma baziran na MT-u koji cilja sentimentalne riječi, određujući element tekstualnog sarkazma. Pokazujemo da, dok su rezultati automatskih mjera baziranih na n-gramu slične za sve modele interpretacije, interpretacije SIGN-a dobijaju veće od strane ljudi zbog adekvatnosti i polarnosti osjećaja. Završili smo s raspravom o budućim uputama istraživanja za naš novi zadatak.', 'de': 'Sarkasmus ist eine Redeform, in der Sprecher das Gegenteil von dem sagen, was sie wirklich meinen, um eine starke Stimmung zu vermitteln. Mit anderen Worten: "Sarkasmus ist die riesige Kluft zwischen dem, was ich sage, und dem, der es nicht versteht." In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die neuartige Aufgabe der Sarkasmus-Interpretation vor, definiert als die Erzeugung einer nicht-sarkastischen Äußerung, die die gleiche Botschaft wie die ursprüngliche sarkastische vermittelt. Wir stellen einen neuartigen Datensatz von 3000-sarkastischen Tweets vor, die jeweils von fünf menschlichen Richtern interpretiert werden. Um die Aufgabe als einsprachige maschinelle Übersetzung (MT) anzugehen, experimentieren wir mit MT-Algorithmen und Evaluationsmaßnahmen. Anschließend präsentieren wir SIGN: einen auf MT basierenden Sarkasmus-Interpretationsalgorithmus, der auf Sentiment-Wörter abzielt, ein definierendes Element des textuellen Sarkasmus. Wir zeigen, dass die Werte von n-Gramm-basierten automatischen Messgrößen für alle Interpretationsmodelle ähnlich sind, die Interpretationen von SIGN jedoch von Menschen hinsichtlich Angemessenheit und Sentiment-Polarität höher bewertet werden. Wir schließen mit einer Diskussion über zukünftige Forschungsrichtungen für unsere neue Aufgabe.', 'id': 'Sarcasm is a form of speech in which speakers say the opposite of what they truly mean in order to convey a strong sentiment.  Dengan kata lain, \'Sarkasme adalah kejahatan raksasa antara apa yang saya katakan, dan orang yang tidak mengerti.\'" Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan tugas baru dari interpretasi sarkasme, didefinisikan sebagai generasi dari ucapan non-sarkastik yang menyampaikan pesan yang sama dengan yang sarkastik asli. Kami memperkenalkan set data novel dari 3000 tweet sarkastik, masing-masing diterjemahkan oleh lima hakim manusia. Menghadapi tugas sebagai terjemahan mesin monobahasa (MT), kami eksperimen dengan algoritma MT dan tindakan evaluasi. Kemudian kita mempersembahkan SIGN: algoritma interpretasi sarkasme berdasarkan MT yang menargetkan kata-kata sentimen, unsur definisi sarkasme tekstual. We show that while the scores of n-gram based automatic measures are similar for all interpretation models, SIGN\'s interpretations are scored higher by humans for adequacy and sentiment polarity.  Kami menyelesaikan dengan diskusi tentang arah penelitian masa depan untuk tugas baru kami.', 'fa': 'سارکاسم یک شکل سخنرانی است که سخنرانی در آن بر خلاف چیزی که واقعاً منظورشان هستند، می گویند تا احساس قوی را پیش دهند. به عبارت دیگر، "سارکاسم" بین چیزی که من می گویم پیوسته بزرگ است، و کسی که نمی فهمه. در این کاغذ ما وظیفه رمانی از تعبیر سارکاسم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که به عنوان نسل سخن غیر سارکاسم تعریف می\u200cشود که همان پیغام را به عنوان سارکاسم اصلی می\u200cرساند. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای رمانی از ۳۰۰۰ توئیت سارکاستیک را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، هر یک توسط پنج قاضی انسان تعبیر می\u200cشود. به عنوان ترجمه ماشین تک زبان (MT) کار را به عنوان یک زبان آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، با الگوریتم\u200cهای MT و اندازه\u200cهای ارزیابی آزمایش می\u200cکنیم. سپس SIGN را نشان می دهیم: الگوریتم تفسیر سارکاسم بنیاد MT که کلمات احساسات را هدف می دهد، عنصر تفسیر سارکاسم متن است. ما نشان می دهیم که در حالی که نمایش\u200cهای مرحله\u200cهای خودکار بنیاد n گرم برای همه مدل تفسیر مشابه دارند، تعبیر\u200cهای SIGN توسط انسان\u200cها برای نقطه\u200cی مناسب و احساسات بالاتر دریافت می\u200cشوند. ما با یک بحث در مورد مسیرهای تحقیقات آینده برای کار جدیدمون انجام می دهیم.', 'ko': '풍자는 강연자가 강렬한 감정을 표현하기 위해 진정한 의미와 상반된 말을 하는 형식의 하나다.다시 말하면 풍자는 내가 한 말과 모르는 사람 사이의 커다란 갭이다.이 글에서 우리는 새로운 임무를 제시했다. 풍자해독은 비풍자적인 말을 만들어 원시 풍자적인 말과 같은 정보를 전달하는 것으로 정의되었다.우리는 3000개의 풍자 추문으로 구성된 새로운 데이터 집합을 소개했는데, 추문마다 다섯 명의 심사위원이 해석했다.이 임무를 단어기계번역(MT)이라고 부르며 우리는 기계번역 알고리즘과 평가 방법을 실험했다.그리고 SIGN: 기계 번역을 바탕으로 하는 풍자 해석 알고리즘을 소개했는데 이 알고리즘은 텍스트 풍자의 정의 요소인 감정어를 대상으로 한다.우리는 모든 해석 모델이 n-gram을 바탕으로 하는 자동 측정 점수가 비슷하지만 인류가 기호에 대한 해석은 충분성과 정서적 극성에 있어 더욱 높은 점수를 받는다는 것을 발견했다.마지막으로 우리는 새로운 임무의 미래 연구 방향을 토론했다.', 'sw': "Serikali ni a in a ya hotuba ambapo wazungumzaji wanasema kinyume na kile kinachomaanisha kweli ili kutoa hisia kali. In other words, 'Sarcasm is the giant chasm between what I say, and the person who doesn't get it.'.  Katika karatasi hii tunaweka kazi ya riwaya ya tafsiri ya kejeli, inayoelezwa kama kizazi cha hotuba isiyo ya kejeli inayoonyesha ujumbe huo kama ule wa msingi wa kejeli. Tunaonyesha taarifa za riwaya za twiti 3000 za kejeli, kila mmoja ikitafsiriwa na majaji watano wa binadamu. Akizungumzia kazi kama tafsiri ya mashine ya kiutamaduni (MT), tunajaribu kwa mijaribu ya MT na hatua za uchunguzi. Kisha tunaionyesha SIGN: Algorithi ya tafsiri ya kejeli yenye msingi wa MT inayolenga maneno ya hisia, kitu kinachoelezea kejeli za msingi. Tunaonyesha kwamba wakati vipimo vya hatua za kujitegemea za gram ni sawa na mifano yote ya tafsiri, tafsiri ya SIGN inazidi kupunguzwa zaidi na binadamu kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa haki na hisia. Tuhitimisha na mjadala kuhusu maelekezo ya utafiti wa baadaye kwa kazi yetu mpya.", 'tr': 'Sarkasm güýçli duýgular üçin düýbünden näme diýjek bolýandygyny a ýtdylar. Başga sözlerimizde, \'Sarkasm meniň aýdanlarymyň arasynda we ony düşünmeýän adam arasynda örän uly döwür.\'" Bu kagyzda sarkasm terjimesiniň nowellygyny görkeýäris. Öňki sarkastäk sözleriniň döwletleri şol mesaj bilen üýtgeden. Biz 3000 sany sarkastýk tweets taýýarlapdyk, her biri beş adam häkim tarapyndan terjime edildi. Bu işi monodil maşynyň terjimesi (MT) hökmünde çykyş edip, MT algoritmalary we deňleme çözümleri bilen synanyşýarys. Sonra da SIGN\'i tanıtıyoruz: MT tabanlı bir sarkasm yorumlama algoritmi duygulama sözlerini hedef eden, tekst sarkasının tanımlayan bir elementi. N-gram tabanlı otomatik ölçülerin sayıları tüm yorumlama modellerine benzer olduğuna göre gösteriyoruz. SIGN\'nin yorumları insan tarafından uyumlu ve duygusallık polarlığına göre daha yüksek sayıları aldı. Täze zadymyz üçin gelejekde araştyrma yöntemleri barada çykyp çykýarys.', 'af': "Sarkasme is 'n vorm van spreek waarin sprekkers die teenwoordigheid van wat hulle regtig bedoel om 'n sterk sentiment te verkondig. In ander woorde: Sarkasm is die groot chasm tussen wat ek sê, en die persoon wat dit nie kry nie. In hierdie papier voorsien ons die roman taak van sarkasme-uitlegging, gedefinieerd as die generasie van 'n nie-sarkasiese uitdrukking wat dieselfde boodskap as die oorspronklike sarkasiese een bevestig. Ons introduseer 'n romaniese datastel van 3000 sarkasiese tweets, elkeen vertaling deur vyf menslike regters. As ons die taak as monolinguele masjien vertaling (MT) adres, eksperimenteer ons met MT algoritme en evalueringsmaat. Ons stel dan sig voor 'n MT-gebaseerde sarkasme-interpretasie algoritme wat sentimente woorde doen, â\x80\x99n definieerde element van tekstuele sarkasm. Ons wys dat terwyl die punte van n-gram gebaseerde outomatiese maat gelykbaar is vir alle uitleggingsmodele, is SIGN se uitleggings geheerder deur mense vir adekuasie en sentimente polariteit. Ons sluit met 'n diskusie oor toekomstige forskingdireksies vir ons nuwe taak.", 'sq': "Sarkazmi është një form ë fjalimi në të cilën folësit thonë të kundërtën e asaj që ata me të vërtetë kanë për qëllim të shprehin një ndjenjë të fortë. Me fjalë t ë tjera, 'Sarkazmi është rrëmuja gjigande midis asaj që unë them dhe person it që nuk e kupton''. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim detyrën e re të interpretimit të sarkazmit, të përcaktuar si gjenerata e një shprehjeje jo-sarkastike që transmeton të njëjtin mesazh me atë origjinal sarkastik. Ne prezantojmë një grup të dhënash të reja prej 3000 tweets sarkastikë, secili i interpretuar nga pesë gjyqtarë njerëzorë. Duke e trajtuar detyrën si përkthimin monogjuhësor të makinave (MT), ne eksperimentojmë me algoritmet MT dhe masat e vlerësimit. Pastaj prezantojmë SIGN: një algoritëm interpretimi i sarkazmit bazuar në MT që synon fjalët e ndjenjave, një element përcaktues i sarkazmit tekstual. Ne tregojmë se ndërsa rezultatet e masave automatike të bazuara n ë n-gram janë të ngjashme për të gjitha modelet e interpretimit, interpretimet e SIGN janë më të larta nga njerëzit për përshtatjen dhe polaritetin e ndjenjave. Ne përfundojmë me një diskutim mbi drejtimet e ardhshme të kërkimit për detyrën tonë të re.", 'am': 'ሰርካሲም የጽኑ አሳብ ለማስታወቅ የሚናገሩ በሚቃወሙበት ነገር ተቃውሞ ይናገራሉ። በሌላም ቃል። ሰርሰም በምናገርሁት መካከል ኃይለኛ ድምፅ ነው፥ በማያገኘውም ሰው ነው። በዚህ ገጽ የመጀመሪያው አርካስቲ አንዱን መልእክት እንደሚያሳየው የሳርካክሲ ንግግር ትውልድ እንደተጻፈ የመረጃ ትውልድ ነው፡፡ የ3000 ሳርካስቲክ ትዊተሮችን የሚጠቅምበትን የዳታ ዘርፍ እናስታውቃለን፤ ሁሉም በአምስት የሰው ፈራጆች ትርጉም ነው፡፡ ስራውን እንደ ሞሎልቋዊ መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ (MT) በመጠቀም እና በMT አልጎርጂም እና መጠቃቀሚያን እናሞክራለን፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም SIGN: MT የተቀመጠውን የስርዓት ትርጓሜ አልgorithም፣ የስሜት ቃላትን፣ የጽሑፍ ተሳርካሲ መግለጫ አካላቢ ነው፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የ-ግራም ቀለበቶች ለሁሉም ትርጓሜ ዓይነቶች የሚተያየው ሲን ትርጓሜ በሚያስፈልጋቸው እና ስሜት ርኵሰት ለሰዎች ከፍተኛ ነው፡፡ በአዲስ ስራታችን ላይ የመፍጠር ትምህርት መንገድ ላይ የሚደረገውን ውይይት እናቆማለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սարկազմը խոսքի տեսակ է, որտեղ խոսնակներն ասում են հակառակը նրանից, թե ինչ են նրանք իսկապես նշանակում ուժեղ զգացմունքներ փոխանցելու համար: Այլ կերպ ասած՝ սարկազմը իմ ասածի և այն մարդու միջեւ հսկայական կատակում է, ով չի հասկանում»: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք սարկազմի մեկնաբանության նոր խնդիրը, որը սահմանվում է որպես ոչ սարկաստական արտահայտության սերունդ, որը հաղորդում է նույն հաղորդագրությունը, ինչ նախնական սարկաստական մեկնաբանությունը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք 3000 սարկաստական թվիթերի նոր տվյալներ, յուրաքանչյուրը մեկնաբանված է հինգ մարդկային դատավորի կողմից: Addressing the task as monolingual machine translation (MT), we experiment with MT algorithms and evaluation measures.  Այնուհետև մենք ներկայացնում ենք SIGN-ը՝ MT-ի հիմնված սարկազմի մեկնաբանական ալգորիթմ, որը նպատակում է զգացմունքային բառերին, գրական սարկազմի որոշող տարրերին: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մինչ n-գրամում հիմնված ավտոմատիկ չափումների գնահատականները նման են բոլոր ինտերպրետացիոն մոդելների համար, SIGN-ի մեկնաբանությունները մարդկանց կողմից ավելի բարձր են գնահատականների և զգացմունքների մոտավորության համար: Մենք ավարտեցինք քննարկությամբ մեր նոր խնդրի ապագա ուսումնասիրության ուղղությունների մասին:', 'az': 'Sarkasm, söhbətçilərin söhbətlərinin doğru söhbətlərinin qarşısında deyirlər ki, güclü duyguları təbliğ etmək üçün. Başqa sözlərə, "Sarkasm dediyim şeyin arasındakı böyük cürbəcüdür, onu anlamayan kişi." Bu kağızda sarkasm yorumlamasının yeni işini göstərdik, ilk sarkastik sözlərin nəsili kimi belə tanınmışdır. Biz 3000 sarkastik tweetlərin yeni məlumatlarını tanıdırıq, hər biri beş insan hökmünün yorumlanmışdır. Bu işi monodilli maşın çeviricisi (MT) kimi addressing, biz MT algoritmi və değerlendirmə ölçüləri ilə imtahana çəkirik. Sonra SIGN\'i göstərdik: MT-ə tabanlı sarkasm yorumlaması algoritmi, sentiment sözlərini hedef edir, textual sarkasm elementi təyin edir. Biz göstəririk ki, n-gram tabanlı avtomatik ölçülərin n öqtələri bütün yorumlayıcı modellərə bənzəyir, SIGN yorumlayıqlarını insanlar adeqliyyat və duyguları polaritə görə daha yüksək dəyişdirirlər. Biz yeni işimiz üçün gələcək araştırma yönlərini barəsində müzakirə edirik.', 'bn': "সার্কাস্ম হচ্ছে একটি বক্তৃতা যেখানে বক্তৃপক্ষ বলেছেন যে তারা সত্যিকারের বিরুদ্ধে কি মানে তাদের শক্তিশালী অন In other words, 'Sarcasm is the giant chasm between what I say, and the person who doesn't get it.'.  এই পত্রিকায় আমরা বিদ্রোহীত ব্যাখ্যার কাজের উপস্থাপন করছি, যা একটি বিদ্রোহী বাক্যাসের প্রজন্ম হিসেবে নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে, যা প্রথম ব আমরা ৩০০০ বিদ্রোহী টুইটের একটি উপন্যাসের তথ্য পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, পাঁচজন মানুষ বিচারকেরা ব্যাখ্যা করেছে। মোনোলিভাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) হিসেবে এই কাজটিকে বলা যায়, আমরা এমটি অ্যালগরিদম এবং মূল্যায়নের মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করছি। তারপর আমরা SIGN উপস্থাপন করি: এমটি ভিত্তিক বিদ্রোহী ব্যাখ্যার অ্যালগরিদম যা আবেগের শব্দের লক্ষ্য করে, যা টেক্সটুয়াল বিদ্রোহ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে যদিও না গ্রাম ভিত্তিক স্কোরের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক পদক্ষেপ সকল ব্যাখ্যাত মডেলের সমতুল্য, সিজিনের ব্যাখ্যা যথায আমরা আমাদের নতুন কাজের জন্য ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণা নির্দেশ সমাপ্তি নিয়ে আলোচনা শেষ করি।", 'ca': 'Sarcasm is a form of speech in which speakers say the opposite of what they truly mean in order to convey a strong sentiment.  En altres paraules, "El sarcasme és el gran espai entre el que dic i la persona que no ho enten". En aquest article presentem la nova tasca d\'interpretació del sarcàstic, definida com la generació d\'una expressió no sarcàstica que transmit el mateix missatge que el sarcàstic original. Introduïm un nou conjunt de dades de 3000 tweets sarcàstics, cada un interpretat per cinc jutges humans. Al tractar la tasca com a traducció de màquines monolingües (MT), experimentem amb algoritmes MT i mesures d\'evaluació. Llavors presentem SIGN: un algoritme d\'interpretació del sarcasme basat en MT que mira paraules de sentiment, un element definidor del sarcasme textual. Ens mostram que mentre que les puntuacions de les mesures automàtiques basades en n-gram s ón similar s per a tots els models d\'interpretació, les interpretacions del SIGN són puntuacions més altes pels humans per adequació i polaritat sentimental. Finarem amb una discussió sobre direccions futures de recerca per a la nostra nova tasca.', 'cs': 'Sarkasmus je forma řeči, ve které řečníci říkají opak toho, co skutečně myslí, aby vyjádřili silný sentiment. Jinými slovy, "sarkasmus je obrovská propast mezi tím, co říkám, a člověkem, který to nechápe." V tomto článku představujeme nový úkol interpretace sarkasmu, definovaný jako generování nesarkastického výroku, který přináší stejné poselství jako původní sarkastické. Představujeme nový datový soubor 3000-sarkastických tweetů, z nichž každý interpretuje pět lidských soudců. Úkol řešíme jako monojazyčný strojový překlad (MT), experimentujeme s algoritmy MT a hodnotícími opatřeními. Dále představujeme SIGN: algoritmus interpretace sarkasmu založený na MT, který se zaměřuje na sentimentní slova, definující prvek textového sarkasmu. Ukazujeme, že zatímco skóre automatických měření založených na n-gramech jsou pro všechny interpretační modely podobné, interpretace SIGN jsou lidmi hodnoceny vyšší z hlediska adekvátnosti a polarity sentimentu. Na závěr diskuse o budoucích směrech výzkumu našeho nového úkolu.', 'et': 'Sarkasm on kõnevorm, kus sõnavõtjad ütlevad vastupidist sellele, mida nad tegelikult tähendavad, et edastada tugevat tundet. Teisisõnu: "Sarkasm on hiiglaslik lõhe selle vahel, mida ma ütlen, ja inimese, kes seda ei saa." Käesolevas töös tutvustame sarkasmi tõlgendamise uudset ülesannet, mis on defineeritud kui sarkastilise väljenduse genereerimist, mis edastab sama sõnumi nagu algne sarkastiline. Tutvustame uudset andmekogumit 3000 sarkastilist säutsu, mida igaüks tõlgendab viis inimkohtunikku. Käsitledes ülesannet ühekeelse masintõlkena (MT), eksperimenteerime MT algoritme ja hindamismeetmeid. Seejärel esitame SIGN: MT-põhine sarkasmi tõlgendamise algoritm, mis sihib sentimentaalseid sõnu, mis on tekstisarkasmi määratlev element. Näitame, et kuigi n-grammipõhiste automaatsete mõõtmete skoorid on kõigi tõlgendusmudelite puhul sarnased, on SIGNi tõlgendused inimestel piisavuse ja sentimentaalse polaarsuse osas kõrgemad. Lõpetame arutelu tulevaste uurimissuundade üle meie uue ülesande jaoks.', 'fi': 'Sarkasmi on puhemuoto, jossa puhujat sanovat päinvastaista kuin mitä he todella tarkoittavat välittääkseen vahvan tunteen. Toisin sanoen, "Sarkasmi on valtava kuilu sanojeni ja sen henkilön välillä, joka ei ymmärrä sitä." Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme sarkasmin tulkinnan uutta tehtävää, joka määritellään ei-sarkastisen lauseen tuottamiseksi, joka välittää saman viestin kuin alkuperäinen sarkastinen lause. Esittelemme uuden aineiston, joka sisältää 3000 sarkastista twiittiä, joista kukin tulkitsee viisi ihmistuomaria. Tehtävää käsitellään monikielisenä konekäännöksenä (MT), ja kokeillaan MT algoritmeja ja arviointitoimenpiteitä. Tämän jälkeen esittelemme SIGN: MT-pohjainen sarkasmin tulkintaalgoritmi, joka kohdistuu tunteisiin, jotka ovat tekstisarkasmin määrittelevä elementti. Osoitamme, että vaikka n-grammapohjaisten automaattisten mittausten pisteet ovat samanlaiset kaikissa tulkkausmalleissa, SIGN:n tulkinnat ovat ihmisten mielestä parempia riittävyyden ja tunteiden polariteetin suhteen. Päätämme puheenvuoron keskusteluun tulevasta tutkimussuunnasta uudelle tehtävällemme.', 'bs': 'Sarkazam je oblik govora u kojem govornici govore suprotno od onoga što stvarno misle kako bi predali jaku osjećaj. Drugim riječima, "Sarkazam je ogromna lova između onoga što kažem, i osobe koja ga ne dobija." U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi zadatak interpretacije sarkazma, definisan kao generacija neosarkastičnog govora koja prenosi istu poruku kao originalna sarkastična. Predstavljamo novu kompletu podataka od 3000 sarkastičnih tweeta, svakog od njih tumači pet ljudskih suca. Kada se obraćamo zadatku kao monojezički prevod mašine (MT), eksperimentiramo sa MT algoritmima i mjerama procjene. Onda predstavljamo SIGN: algoritam za interpretaciju sarkazma na MT-u koji cilja sentimentalne riječi, određujući element tekstualnog sarkazma. Pokazujemo da, dok su rezultati automatskih mjera baziranih na n-gramu slični svim modelima interpretacije, interpretacije SIGN-a dobijaju veće od strane ljudi za adekvatnost i polarnost osjećaja. Završili smo s diskusijom o budućim uputama istraživanja za naš novi zadatak.', 'he': 'סרקזם הוא צורה של נאום שבה מדברים אומרים ההפך ממה שהם באמת מתכוונים כדי להעביר רגש חזק. במילים אחרות, "סרקזם הוא הרדף הענקי בין מה שאני אומר, ואדם שלא מבין את זה." בעיתון הזה אנחנו מציגים את המשימה החדשה של פרשנת הסרקזם, מוגדרת כדור של ביטוי לא סרקסטי שמעביר את אותו הודעה כמו הסרקסטי המקורי. We introduce a novel dataset of 3000 sarcastic tweets, each interpreted by five human judges.  מתייחסים למשימה כתרגום מכונת מונושפתית (MT), אנו מנסים עם אלגוריתמים MT ואמצעי הערכה. We then present SIGN: an MT based sarcasm interpretation algorithm that targets sentiment words, a defining element of textual sarcasm.  אנו מראים שבזמן שהנקודות של אמצעים אוטומטיים מבוססים על n-גרם דומות לכל דוגמני הפרשנות, הפרשנות של SIGN נקודות גבוהות יותר על ידי בני האדם למתאימות ולקוטביות רגשות. אנחנו מסתיימים עם דיון על כיוונים מחקרים עתידים למשימה החדשה שלנו.', 'sk': 'Sarkazem je oblika govora, v kateri govorniki govorijo nasprotno od tega, kar resnično mislijo, da bi izrazili močno čustvo. Z drugimi besedami, "Sarkazem je velika prepad med tem, kar rečem, in osebo, ki tega ne razume." V prispevku predstavljamo novo nalogo interpretacije sarkazma, opredeljeno kot generacijo nesarkastičnega izgovora, ki prenaša isto sporočilo kot prvotni sarkastični. Predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov 3000 sarkastičnih tweetov, vsakega interpretira pet človeških sodnikov. Z obravnavanjem naloge kot enojezični strojni prevod (MT) eksperimentiramo z MT algoritmi in ocenjevalnimi ukrepi. Nato predstavljamo SIGN: MT osnovan algoritem interpretacije sarkazma, ki cilja sentimentalne besede, definirajoč element tekstualnega sarkazma. Pokazali smo, da so rezultati avtomatskih meritev, ki temeljijo na n gramih, podobni za vse interpretacijske modele, SIGN-ove interpretacije pa imajo ljudje višje ocene glede ustreznosti in sentimentalne polarnosti. Zaključimo z razpravo o prihodnjih raziskovalnih smereh za našo novo nalogo.', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, ƙiyayya tã bayyana daga gare su, dõmin su faɗi magana mai tsanani. Da wasu kalmõmi, 'Sarkasm ni'ima mai girma a tsakanin abin da nake faɗa, da wanda ba ya sami shi ba.' ... Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da aikin nan fassarar sarsarcasm, wanda aka bayyana shi kamar hairiyar wata magana na sarcastic da ke gaya da shi da kuma sarcastic na farko. Tuna gaurar da takarda na yanzu na garwaya 3,000 na sarcastic, kõwace an fassarar da mahaifan mutum shan. Akwai tambayar aikin da za'a zama fassarar misalin ayuka na monolilugha (MT), za'a jarraba shi da algoritm na MT da ƙaddara. Tuna halatar da SGN: Algoritm na MT da aka ƙayyade sarkasm, wanda ke ƙayyade maganar hisãbi, wani abu na ƙayyade sarsarcasm na rubutu. Tuna n ũna cewa, a lokacin lissafar na n-gram-da-kayan haske farat ɗaya masu daidaita wa misãlai masu fassarar-fassarar, za'a ƙara fassarar ɗin GN na da mutane ga taƙaitaccen da kuma a yi sauri. Munã ƙarfafa da wata jayayya a kan shiryoyin research masu gabani.", 'jv': 'Sarkasm kuwi grisane kuwi tindani sing ngomong nik kabeh masalah sing nganggep kuwi mau sing nyimpen iki dadi, winih sing apik dhéwé kuwi mabur kuwi. Wurata bener, \'Sarkasm kuwi kesempatan iso nggoleki wae sing aku ngerti, lan uwong sing ora ngerti lah.\' Nang kuwi iki, kita mudhun pernik nganggo urip dadi "sarkasm" sing dadi, dadi nyimpen karo pernik apa-sarkasik sing gak nggawe berkas sistem sing koyok sistem sarkastik adalah. Awak dhéwé énjaraké pernik nganggo dataset sing narekaké 3.000 (sing koyotol) nyenengaké petani uwong sing dirangkarani uwong. Ngubah ono nggambar sistem uninglanggar tarjamahan (MT) Kita nambah SiGN: MT dadi sarkasm tarjamahan Algorithm kuwi nggawe kelompok nggambar kelompok, akhar mulasam Text Awak dhéwé éntukno karo puntuan n-gram sing basa perusahaan automatically dadi karo hal-hal ngono kuwi tindakan itoleksi, ngregani SiGN kuwi wis dipolerané karo perusahaan sing luwih apik karo hal-hal sing luwih dumadhi Awakdhéwé beraksi barêng-barêng nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe ngubah dhéwé.', 'bo': "སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོས་དངོས་ཡོད་ཐུབ་པའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་རེད། གཞན་པ་ཞིག་ནས་ ‘ས་རས་ཆེན་ནི་ང་གི་བཤད་པ་ལ་ཆེན་མཁན་གྱི་རྩ་བའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་གི་ལས་གཏོང་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་དོན་མིན་པའི་མི་རྣམས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་དེ་སྔོན་ས ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པའི་དྲ་བ་གནད་མེད་སྤེལ་བའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་བ་3000རེད། འདི་ལྟ་བུ འོན་ཀྱང་ SIGN་འདི་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ། MT་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྒྲུབ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གནང We show that while the scores of n-gram based automatic measures are similar for all interpretation models, SIGN's interpretations are scored higher by humans for adequacy and sentiment polarity. ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པར་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མ་འོངས།"}
{'en': 'Active Sentiment Domain Adaptation', 'pt': 'Adaptação de Domínio de Sentimento Ativo', 'ar': 'تكييف مجال المشاعر النشط', 'es': 'Adaptación activa del dominio de sentimiento', 'fr': 'Adaptation active au domaine des sentiments', 'ja': 'アクティブ・センチメント・ドメイン・アダプテーション', 'zh': '自适其情', 'hi': 'सक्रिय भावना डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена активных настроений', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Fearainn Mothúchán Gníomhach', 'ka': 'კონფიგურაცია', 'el': 'Ενεργή προσαρμογή του τομέα συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'Az aktív érzéketartomány beállítása', 'kk': 'Белсенді Sentiment домен адаптациясы', 'lt': 'Aktyviojo jutimo domeno pritaikymas', 'it': 'Adattamento del dominio sentimentale attivo', 'mk': 'Active Sentiment Domain Adaptation', 'ml': 'സജീവമായ സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200dറ്', 'ms': 'Active Sentiment Domain Adaptation', 'mt': 'Adattament għall-Dominju tas-Sentiment Attiv', 'mn': 'Актив Sentiment Домен Адаптаци', 'pl': 'Aktywna adaptacja domeny sentymentów', 'no': 'Aktiv sendingsdomenetilpassing', 'sr': 'Aktivna adaptacija domena', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului sentiment activ', 'si': 'а·ѓа¶ља·ЉвЂЌа¶»а·’а¶є Sentiment Domain Adjust', 'so': 'Adaptation xafiiska shaqada', 'sv': 'Aktiv inställning av känslodomän', 'ta': 'செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட அமர்வு தளம் மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'فعال سنٹیمینٹ ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ', 'uz': 'Aktiv seans domen taĘĽminlovchisi', 'vi': 'Đang chỉnh sửa l thất thất', 'hr': 'Aktivna prilagodba domena', 'bg': 'Адаптиране на домейна за активни чувства', 'nl': 'Aanpassing van actieve gevoelens', 'da': 'Aktiv tilpasning af følelsedomæne', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامنۀ مجموعه فعال', 'de': 'Anpassung der aktiven Sentiment-Domäne', 'id': 'Adaptasi Domain Sentimen Aktif', 'ko': '능동적 정서역 적응', 'tr': "%s'i janlaşdyr", 'af': 'Aktiewe Sentiment Domein Aanpassering', 'sq': 'Përpërshtatje aktive e domenit të ndjenjave', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Fayl Sentiment Domain Adlandırması', 'bs': 'Aktivna adaptacija domena', 'bn': 'সক্রিয় সেন্টিমেন্ট ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপ্টেশন', 'ca': 'Adaptació activa al domini de sentiment', 'sw': 'Toleo la Seneti la Aktiva', 'cs': 'Aktivní adaptace domény sentimentů', 'fi': 'Aktiivisen tunteen verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen', 'et': 'Aktiivse tunnete domeeni kohandamine', 'jv': 'Sentiment', 'he': 'Active Sentiment Domain Adaptation', 'ha': 'Active Sentiment Domain Adaptation', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje aktivne domene čustev', 'bo': 'དུས་ཡོད་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་མཚམས་སྒྲིག་འགོད'}
{'en': 'Domain adaptation is an important technology to handle domain dependence problem in sentiment analysis field. Existing methods usually rely on sentiment classifiers trained in source domains. However, their performance may heavily decline if the distributions of sentiment features in source and target domains have significant difference. In this paper, we propose an active sentiment domain adaptation approach to handle this problem. Instead of the source domain sentiment classifiers, our approach adapts the general-purpose sentiment lexicons to target domain with the help of a small number of labeled samples which are selected and annotated in an active learning mode, as well as the domain-specific sentiment similarities among words mined from unlabeled samples of target domain. A unified model is proposed to fuse different types of sentiment information and train sentiment classifier for target domain. Extensive experiments on benchmark datasets show that our approach can train accurate sentiment classifier with less labeled samples.', 'ar': 'يعد تكييف المجال تقنية مهمة للتعامل مع مشكلة الاعتماد على المجال في مجال تحليل المشاعر. تعتمد الأساليب الحالية عادة على مصنفات المشاعر المدربة في مجالات المصدر. ومع ذلك ، قد ينخفض أداءهم بشكل كبير إذا كان توزيع ميزات المشاعر في مجالات المصدر والهدف لها اختلاف كبير. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا نشطًا لتكييف مجال المشاعر للتعامل مع هذه المشكلة. بدلاً من مصنِّفات المشاعر الخاصة بالمجال المصدر ، يكيِّف نهجنا معجم المشاعر العامة للأغراض المستهدفة المجال بمساعدة عدد صغير من العينات المصنفة التي يتم تحديدها والتعليق عليها في وضع التعلم النشط ، فضلاً عن أوجه التشابه في المشاعر الخاصة بالمجال من بين الكلمات المستخرجة من عينات غير مسماة من المجال الهدف. تم اقتراح نموذج موحد لدمج أنواع مختلفة من معلومات المشاعر وتدريب مصنف المشاعر للمجال الهدف. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية أن نهجنا يمكن أن يدرب مصنفًا دقيقًا للمشاعر بعينات أقل تصنيفًا.', 'pt': 'A adaptação de domínio é uma tecnologia importante para lidar com problemas de dependência de domínio no campo de análise de sentimentos. Os métodos existentes geralmente contam com classificadores de sentimento treinados em domínios de origem. No entanto, seu desempenho pode diminuir fortemente se as distribuições de recursos de sentimento nos domínios de origem e destino tiverem diferenças significativas. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem de adaptação de domínio de sentimento ativo para lidar com esse problema. Em vez dos classificadores de sentimento do domínio de origem, nossa abordagem adapta os léxicos de sentimento de uso geral ao domínio de destino com a ajuda de um pequeno número de amostras rotuladas que são selecionadas e anotadas em um modo de aprendizado ativo, bem como as semelhanças de sentimento específicas do domínio entre palavras extraídas de amostras não rotuladas do domínio de destino. Um modelo unificado é proposto para fundir diferentes tipos de informações de sentimento e treinar classificador de sentimento para o domínio alvo. Extensos experimentos em conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que nossa abordagem pode treinar classificador de sentimento preciso com amostras menos rotuladas.', 'fr': "L'adaptation de domaine est une technologie importante pour gérer le problème de dépendance au domaine dans le domaine de l'analyse des sentiments. Les méthodes existantes s'appuient généralement sur des classificateurs de sentiments formés dans les domaines sources. Cependant, leurs performances peuvent fortement diminuer si les distributions des caractéristiques de sentiment dans les domaines source et cible présentent des différences significatives. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche d'adaptation active du domaine des sentiments pour gérer ce problème. Au lieu des classificateurs de sentiment du domaine source, notre approche adapte les lexiques d'opinion à usage général au domaine cible à l'aide d'un petit nombre d'échantillons étiquetés qui sont sélectionnés et annotés dans un mode d'apprentissage actif, ainsi que des similitudes de sentiment spécifiques au domaine entre les mots extraits à partir d'échantillons non étiquetés du domaine cible. Un modèle unifié est proposé pour fusionner différents types d'informations de sentiment et former un classificateur de sentiment pour le domaine cible. Des expériences approfondies sur des ensembles de données de référence montrent que notre approche peut entraîner un classificateur de sentiments précis avec des échantillons moins étiquetés.", 'es': 'La adaptación de dominios es una tecnología importante para manejar el problema de dependencia del dominio en el campo del análisis de sentimientos. Los métodos existentes suelen basarse en clasificadores de opinión capacitados en los dominios de origen. Sin embargo, su rendimiento puede disminuir considerablemente si las distribuciones de las características de opinión en los dominios de origen y destino presentan una diferencia significativa. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque de adaptación activa del dominio de sentimiento para manejar este problema. En lugar de los clasificadores de opinión del dominio de origen, nuestro enfoque adapta los léxicos de opinión de propósito general al dominio de destino con la ayuda de un pequeño número de muestras etiquetadas que se seleccionan y anotan en un modo de aprendizaje activo, así como las similitudes de opinión específicas del dominio entre las palabras extraídas de muestras no marcadas del dominio diana. Se propone un modelo unificado para fusionar diferentes tipos de información de opinión y entrenar el clasificador de opiniones para el dominio de destino. Experimentos exhaustivos en conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que nuestro enfoque puede entrenar un clasificador de opinión preciso con muestras menos etiquetadas.', 'ja': 'ドメイン適応は、センチメント分析分野におけるドメイン依存性問題を処理するための重要な技術である。 既存の方法は、通常、ソースドメインでトレーニングされたセンチメント分類子に依存します。 しかし、ソースドメインとターゲットドメインのセンチメント機能の分布に大きな違いがある場合、それらのパフォーマンスは大きく低下する可能性があります。 本稿では，この問題に対処するための能動的センチメント領域適応アプローチを提案する． ソースドメイン感情分類子の代わりに、私たちのアプローチは、アクティブラーニングモードで選択され注釈付けされた少数の標識サンプル、ならびに標的ドメインの未標識サンプルから採取された単語間のドメイン固有の感情の類似性の助けを借りて、汎用感情辞書を標的ドメインに適合させる。 異なるタイプのセンチメント情報を融合し、ターゲットドメインのセンチメント分類子を訓練するために、統一されたモデルが提案されている。 ベンチマークデータセットに関する広範な実験は、当社のアプローチが標識の少ないサンプルで正確な感情分類器をトレーニングできることを示しています。', 'zh': '域自应者,理情析域依赖性之要术也。 今法常依源域训练之情类器。 然源域域之情,布列著异,则性或大降矣。 本文中,我们发出一种情况来处理这件事。 吾法非源域情类器也,借模样择注少量标记样本,及从域中未识样本掘单词之间特定于域情相似性,将通情词典改编为的域。 立一模,合异类,练目标域情器。 凡数集之广实验,可用少标样本练正情类器。', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена является важной технологией для решения проблемы зависимости от домена в области анализа настроений. Существующие методы обычно опираются на классификаторы настроений, обученные в исходных доменах. Однако их производительность может значительно снизиться, если распределение настроений в исходном и целевом доменах имеет значительные различия. В этой статье мы предлагаем подход к решению этой проблемы, основанный на активной адаптации домена настроений. Вместо классификаторов настроек исходного домена наш подход адаптирует лексиконы настроек общего назначения к целевому домену с помощью небольшого количества помеченных образцов, которые отбираются и аннотируются в активном режиме обучения, а также сходства настроек, специфичных для домена, между словами, добываемыми из немеченных образцов целевого домена. Предложена унифицированная модель для объединения различных типов информации настроений и обучающего классификатора настроений для целевой области. Обширные эксперименты с эталонными наборами данных показывают, что наш подход может обучить точному классификатору настроений с менее маркированными образцами.', 'hi': 'डोमेन अनुकूलन भावना विश्लेषण क्षेत्र में डोमेन निर्भरता समस्या को संभालने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण तकनीक है। मौजूदा तरीके आमतौर पर स्रोत डोमेन में प्रशिक्षित भावना क्लासिफायरपर भरोसा करते हैं। हालांकि, स्रोत और लक्ष्य डोमेन में भावना सुविधाओं के वितरण में महत्वपूर्ण अंतर होने पर उनके प्रदर्शन में भारी गिरावट आ सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम इस समस्या को संभालने के लिए एक सक्रिय भावना डोमेन अनुकूलन दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। स्रोत डोमेन भावना क्लासिफायरके बजाय, हमारा दृष्टिकोण सामान्य-उद्देश्य भावना शब्दकोशों को एक छोटी संख्या में लेबल किए गए नमूनों की मदद से लक्ष्य डोमेन के लिए अनुकूलित करता है जो एक सक्रिय सीखने के मोड में चयनित और एनोटेट किए जाते हैं, साथ ही साथ लक्ष्य डोमेन के लेबल रहित नमूनों से खनन किए गए शब्दों के बीच डोमेन-विशिष्ट भावना समानताएं भी। विभिन्न प्रकार की भावनाओं की जानकारी को फ्यूज करने और लक्ष्य डोमेन के लिए भावना क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक एकीकृत मॉडल प्रस्तावित है। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कम लेबल वाले नमूनों के साथ सटीक भावना क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is teicneolaíocht thábhachtach é oiriúnú fearainn chun fadhb an spleáchais fearainn i réimse anailíse meon a láimhseáil. Is gnách go mbíonn modhanna reatha ag brath ar aicmitheoirí meon atá oilte sna fearainn fhoinseacha. Mar sin féin, d’fhéadfadh laghdú mór a bheith ar a bhfeidhmíocht má bhíonn difríocht shuntasach idir dáileadh na ngnéithe meon i bhfoinsí agus i spriocfhearainn. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige gníomhach maidir le hoiriúnú fearainn meon chun an fhadhb seo a láimhseáil. In ionad na n-aicmitheoirí sentiment fearainn foinse, déanann ár gcur chuige na foclóirí meon ginearálta a oiriúnú don spriocfhearann le cabhair ó líon beag samplaí lipéadaithe a roghnaítear agus a ndéantar anótáil orthu ar mhodh foghlama gníomhaí, chomh maith leis na cosúlachtaí meon a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann. i measc na bhfocal a baineadh as samplaí neamhlipéadaithe den spriocfhearann. Tá múnla aontaithe á bheartú chun cineálacha éagsúla faisnéise meon a chomhleá agus aicmitheora meon a thraenáil don spriocfhearann. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar thacair thacair thagarmharcanna gur féidir lenár gcur chuige aicmitheoir meon cruinn a oiliúint le samplaí níos lú lipéadaithe.', 'hu': 'A domain adaptáció fontos technológia a domain függőségi problémák kezelésére a sentiment elemzés területén. A meglévő módszerek általában a forrástartományokban képzett sentiment osztályozókra támaszkodnak. Teljesítményük azonban erőteljesen csökkenhet, ha a sentiment funkciók forrás- és céltartományokban való eloszlása jelentős különbséget mutat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy aktív sentiment domain adaptációs megközelítést javasolunk a probléma kezelésére. A forrástartomány hangulatosztályozók helyett megközelítésünk az általános célú hangulatlexikonokat a céltartományhoz igazítja, kis számú, aktív tanulási módban kiválasztott és jegyzetelt minta segítségével, valamint a céltartomány címke nélküli mintáiból bányászott szavak közötti tartományspecifikus hangulathasonlóságok segítségével. Egy egységes modellt javasoltak a különböző típusú érzelmi információk összekapcsolására és az érzelmi osztályozók képzésére a céltartományra. A benchmark adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk képes pontos érzelmi osztályozót képezni kevésbé címkézett mintákkal.', 'el': 'Η προσαρμογή τομέων είναι μια σημαντική τεχνολογία για να χειριστεί το πρόβλημα εξάρτησης τομέων στον τομέα ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι βασίζονται συνήθως σε ταξινομητές συναισθημάτων εκπαιδευμένους σε τομείς προέλευσης. Ωστόσο, η απόδοσή τους μπορεί να μειωθεί σημαντικά εάν οι διανομές των χαρακτηριστικών συναισθημάτων στους τομείς προέλευσης και στόχου έχουν σημαντική διαφορά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια ενεργή προσέγγιση προσαρμογής του τομέα των συναισθημάτων για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του προβλήματος. Αντί για τους ταξινομητές συναισθημάτων τομέα προέλευσης, η προσέγγισή μας προσαρμόζει τα λεξικά συναισθημάτων γενικής χρήσης στον τομέα προορισμού με τη βοήθεια ενός μικρού αριθμού δειγμάτων που επιλέγονται και σχολιάζονται σε μια ενεργή λειτουργία μάθησης, καθώς και τις ομοιότητες συναισθημάτων συγκεκριμένων τομέων μεταξύ λέξεων που εξορύσσονται από μη επισημασμένα δείγματα του τομέα προορισμού. Προτείνεται ένα ενοποιημένο μοντέλο για να συγχωνεύσει διαφορετικούς τύπους πληροφοριών συναισθημάτων και να εκπαιδεύσει τον ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων για τον τομέα προορισμού. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να εκπαιδεύσει τον ακριβή ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων με λιγότερα επισημασμένα δείγματα.', 'ka': 'დომინის აკაპორტირება არის მნიშვნელოვანი ტექნოლოგია, რომელიც დემინის დასამხოლობა პრობლემა სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის პანელში. სულ არსებობს მეტირები უბრალოდ იყოს სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაცირებისთვის, რომლებიც გამოსწავლა მსოფლიონებში. მაგრამ, მათი გამოსახულება შეიძლება ძალიან გადასრულება, თუ სენტიმენტის განსახულებების განსახულება მნიშვნელოვანი და მისახულებული დომენეში იქნება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აკრძალური სენტიმენტის დიომენტის ადაპტიფიკაციის მიღება ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვებას. ჩვენი პროგრამა განსაზღვრებული სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მცად, ჩვენი პროგრამა განსაზღვრებული სენტიმენტის ლექსიკონების დამატებით დიომინის დამატებით, რომლებიც არჩეულიან და მონიტორებულიან აქტიური სწავლების რეჟიმიში, და დიომინის განსაზღვრებული ს ერთადერთი მოდელი იყენება განსხვავებული სენტიმენტის ინფორმაციის და სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაცია მიდგენისთვის. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები ბენქმარკის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებელია წარმოადგენების კლასიფიკაცია სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაცი', 'it': "L'adattamento del dominio è una tecnologia importante per gestire il problema della dipendenza del dominio nel campo dell'analisi del sentiment. I metodi esistenti di solito si basano su classificatori sentiment addestrati nei domini di origine. Tuttavia, le loro prestazioni potrebbero fortemente diminuire se le distribuzioni delle funzionalità sentiment nei domini sorgente e target presentano differenze significative. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio attivo di adattamento del sentiment domain per gestire questo problema. Invece dei classificatori del sentiment del dominio sorgente, il nostro approccio adatta i lessici del sentiment di uso generale al dominio target con l'aiuto di un piccolo numero di campioni etichettati che vengono selezionati e annotati in una modalità di apprendimento attivo, così come le somiglianze del sentiment specifico del dominio tra le parole estratte da campioni non etichettati del dominio target. Viene proposto un modello unificato per fondere diversi tipi di informazioni sentiment e formare classificatore sentiment per il dominio target. Esperimenti approfonditi su set di dati di benchmark mostrano che il nostro approccio può formare un classificatore di sentiment accurato con campioni meno etichettati.", 'lt': 'Prisitaikymas prie srities yra svarbi technologija, skirta spręsti srities priklausomybės problem ą jautrumo analizės srityje. Esami metodai paprastai grindžiami jausmų klasifikatoriais, mokomais šaltinio srityse. Tačiau jų veiklos rezultatai gali smarkiai sumažėti, jei jautrumo savybių pasiskirstymas šaltiniuose ir tikslinėse srityse labai skiriasi. Šiame dokumente siūlome aktyviai prisitaikyti prie jausmų srities, kad būtų galima spręsti šią problem ą. Vietoj šaltinio domeno jausmų klasifikatorių, mūsų metodas pritaikomas bendrojo paskirties jausmų leksikonams prie tikslinio domeno, naudojant nedidelį skaičių pažymėtų mėginių, kurie yra atrinkti ir anotuoti aktyviu mokymosi režimu, taip pat konkrečiam domenui būdingų jausmų panašumą tarp žodžių, išgautų iš nenustatytų tikslinio domeno mėginių. Siūlomas vieningas model is, kuriuo siekiama sujungti skirtingų tipų jutimo informaciją ir traukinio jutimo klasifikatorių tiksliniame domene. Išsamūs lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali treniruoti tikslų jausmų klasifikatorių su mažiau pažymėtais mėginiais.', 'mk': 'Адаптацијата на доменот е важна технологија за решавање на проблемот со зависноста на доменот во полето на анализа на чувствата. Постојаните методи обично зависат од класификатори на чувства обучени во изворни домени. Сепак, нивната перформанса може значително да се намали ако дистрибуцијата на чувствителните карактеристики во домените на изворот и метата имаат значителна разлика. Во овој весник предложуваме активен пристап до адаптација на сентименталниот домен за решавање на овој проблем. Наместо класификаторите на чувствата на доменот на изворот, нашиот пристап ги адаптира генералните лексикони на чувствата на цел на доменот со помош на мал број обележани примероци кои се избрани и анотирани во активен режим на учење, како и сличностите на чувствата специфични на доменот меѓу зборовите минувани од необележани примероци на доменот Предложен е обединет модел за спојување на различни типови на информации за чувства и класификатор за чувства на возот за домен на метата. Експериментите на компјутерите на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот пристап може да обучува точен класификатор на чувства со помалку означени примероци.', 'kk': 'Домендің адаптациясы - домендің тәуелдік мәселесін шешу өрісінде маңызды технология. Бар әдістер көзі домендерде оқылған сезімдер классификациясына тәуелді. Бірақ, егер көзі мен мақсатты домендердің сезімдік мүмкіндіктерінің бөлімі маңызды айырмашылығы бар болса, олардың істемі қатты азайта алады. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл мәселеді шешу үшін белсенді сезімдік доменге адаптациялау тәсілін ұсынамыз. Бастапқы домендің сезімдік классификацияларының орнына, біздің тәсіліміз мақсатты сезімдік лексиндерді доменге нақсатталған, белсенді оқыту режімінде таңдалып, белсенді оқыту режімінде белгіленген кішкентай мәліметтердің көмегімен, сондай-ақ, мақса Біріктірілген үлгі бірнеше түрлерді сезім мәліметін және мақсатты домен үшін сезім көлемін классификациялау үшін қолданылады. Бенкмарк деректер жиындарының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері біздің тәжірибеміз дұрыс мәліметтерді дұрыс түрлендіруге болады.', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian domain adalah teknologi penting untuk menangani masalah dependensi domain dalam medan analisis sentimen. Existing methods usually rely on sentiment classifiers trained in source domains.  Namun, prestasi mereka mungkin menurun dengan berat jika distribusi ciri-ciri perasaan dalam domain sumber dan sasaran mempunyai perbezaan yang signifikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan penyesuaian domain perasaan aktif untuk menangani masalah ini. Daripada pengklasifikasi perasaan domain sumber, pendekatan kita menyesuaikan leksikon perasaan tujuan umum ke domain sasaran dengan bantuan sejumlah kecil sampel yang ditabel yang dipilih dan ditandai dalam mod pembelajaran aktif, serta persamaan perasaan spesifik domain diantara perkataan yang dicampur dari sampel domain sasaran yang tidak ditandai. Model bersatu diusulkan untuk menyatukan jenis berbeza maklumat perasaan dan klasifikasi perasaan kereta api untuk domain sasaran. Eksperimen luas pada set data tanda rujukan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita boleh melatih pengklasifikasi perasaan yang tepat dengan sampel yang kurang labeled.', 'no': 'Domeneadaptasjon er ein viktig teknologi for handtering av domeneavhengighetsproblem i sentimentanalysefeltet. Det eksisterande metodane er vanlegvis avhengig på sentimentklassifikatorar som trengte i kjeldedomene. Dersom distribusjonane av sentimentfunksjonar i kjelde og måldområde har signifikant forskjell, kan imidlertid utviklinga sine kraftig nedtrekke. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein aktiv tilpassing av sentimentdomene for å handtera dette problemet. I staden for kjeldedomenefølelsesklassifiseringar, tilpassar tilnærminga vårt den generelle følelseseksjonane til mål domenet med hjelp av ein liten tal merkelige prøver som er valde og merkelige i ein aktiv læringsmodus, og tilnærminga til domenespesifikke følelsestilnærmingar mellom ord som er minert frå ubemerkte prøver av mål domenet. Eit uniformert modell er foreslått for å fyssera ulike typar sentimentsinformasjon og treningssentimentklassifiserer for målgområde. Ekstra eksperimenter på benchmarkdataset viser at tilnærminga vårt kan trenja nøyaktig sentimentklassifisering med mindre merkelige prøver.', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയാണ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനെ കൈ നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തുന്നവരെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും സോര്\u200dസ്സിലെ വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്താലും അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ കുറവ് വരുത്ത In this paper, we propose an active sentiment domain adaptation approach to handle this problem.  സ്രോതസ്സ് ഡൊമെന്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം സാധാരണ-ലക്ഷ്യം ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള ഒരു ചെറിയ മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ സഹായത്താല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനെ ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് സജ് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വെറുതെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കുറ്റം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ലക്ഷ്യ ഡോമെയിനുള്ള അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം കുറച്ച് ചിട്ടപ്പെട', 'mt': 'Domain adaptation is an important technology to handle domain dependence problem in sentiment analysis field.  Il-metodi eżistenti normalment jiddependu fuq klassifikaturi tas-sentimenti mħarrġa f’oqsma tas-sors. Madankollu, il-prestazzjoni tagħhom tista’ tonqos ħafna jekk id-distribuzzjonijiet tal-karatteristiċi tas-sentiment fl-oqsma tas-sors u fil-mira jkollhom differenza sinifikanti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ attiv ta’ adattament għad-dominju tas-sensazzjoni biex tiġi indirizzata din il-problema. Minflok il-klassifikaturi tas-sentimenti tad-dominju tas-sors, l-approċċ tagħna jadatta l-lexikoni tas-sentimenti għall-iskop ġenerali għad-dominju fil-mira bl-għajnuna ta’ numru żgħir ta’ kampjuni ttikkettati li jintgħa żlu u annotati f’modalità ta’ tagħlim attiv, kif ukoll similaritajiet tas-sentimenti speċifiċi għad-dominju fost kliem maħruġa minn kampjuni mhux ittikkettati tad-dominju fil-mira. Huwa propost mudell unifikat biex jingħaqdu tipi differenti ta’ informazzjoni dwar is-sentimenti u klassifikatur tas-sentimenti tal-ferrovija għad-dominju fil-mira. Esperimenti estensivi fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jħarreġ klassifikatur preċiż tas-sentimenti b’kampjuni inqas ittikkettati.', 'mn': 'Доминийн загвар зохицуулалт бол сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ талбарын доминийн хамааралтай асуудлыг удирдах чухал технологи юм. Ингээд орших арга нь эх үүсвэрийн хэсэгт сургалтын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрээр байдаг. Гэхдээ тэдний үйл ажиллагаа нь эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой хэсэгт мэдрэмжүүдийн хуваарилалт нь чухал ялгаатай болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд сэтгэл хөдлөл хангамжийн арга замыг дэмждэг. Мөн эх үүсвэрийн домены мэдрэмжүүдийн хувьд бидний арга нь ерөнхий зорилготой мэдрэмжүүдийн лексиконуудыг зориулан зориулан зориулагдсан жижиг хэмжээний жижиг хэмжээний шалгалтын тусламжтайгаар сонгогдсон, актив суралцах режимээр анзаарсан, мөн зорилготгүй домены хэмжээний мэд Нэгдсэн загвар нь өөр төрлийн мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмж, зорилготой холбоотой мэдрэмжтэй холбоотой болно. Банкмарк өгөгдлийн сан дээрх өргөн туршилтууд бидний ойлголт мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцагчийг бага хэмжээний жишээтэй дасгалжуулж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Adaptacja domeny jest ważną technologią do obsługi problemu zależności domeny w dziedzinie analizy sentymentów. Istniejące metody zazwyczaj opierają się na klasyfikatorach sentymentów przeszkolonych w domenach źródłowych. Jednak ich wydajność może znacznie spaść, jeśli rozkład cech sentymentów w domenie źródłowej i docelowej ma znaczącą różnicę. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy aktywne podejście do adaptacji domen sentymentów w celu rozwiązania tego problemu. Zamiast klasyfikatorów sentymentów domeny źródłowej, nasze podejście dostosowuje leksykony sentymentów ogólnego przeznaczenia do domeny docelowej za pomocą niewielkiej liczby etykietowanych próbek, które są wybierane i adnotacjonowane w aktywnym trybie uczenia się, a także podobieństwa sentymentów specyficznych dla domeny między słowami wydobytymi z nieoznakowanych próbek domeny docelowej. Proponuje się ujednolicony model, aby połączyć różne rodzaje informacji o sentymentach i szkolić klasyfikator sentymentów dla domeny docelowej. Obszerne eksperymenty na zbiorach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że nasze podejście może trenować dokładny klasyfikator sentymentów z mniej oznaczonymi próbkami.', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului este o tehnologie importantă pentru a gestiona problema dependenței domeniului în domeniul analizei sentimentului. Metodele existente se bazează de obicei pe clasificatori de sentimente instruiți în domeniile sursă. Cu toate acestea, performanța lor poate scădea puternic dacă distribuțiile caracteristicilor sentiment în domeniile sursă și țintă au diferențe semnificative. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare activă de adaptare a domeniului sentimentului pentru a rezolva această problemă. În locul clasificărilor sentimentelor domeniului sursă, abordarea noastră adaptează lexicoanele sentimentelor de uz general pentru domeniul țintă cu ajutorul unui număr mic de mostre etichetate care sunt selectate și adnotate într-un mod activ de învățare, precum și similitudinile sentimentelor specifice domeniului între cuvintele extrase din eșantioane fără etichete ale domeniului țintă. Un model unificat este propus pentru a fuziona diferite tipuri de informații sentimentale și pentru a instrui clasificatorul sentimentelor pentru domeniul țintă. Experimente extinse pe seturi de date de referință arată că abordarea noastră poate antrena clasificator de sentimente exacte cu eșantioane mai puțin etichetate.', 'sr': 'Domena adaptacija je važna tehnologija za rješavanje problema zavisnosti domena u polju analize sentimenta. Postoje metode se obično oslanjaju na klasifikatore sentimenta obučene u izvornim domenama. Međutim, njihova učinka može teško smanjiti ako distribucija osjećajnih karakteristika u izvoru i ciljnim domenama imaju značajnu razliku. U ovom papiru predlažemo aktivan pristup adaptacije domena sentimenta da se reši ovaj problem. Umesto klasifikatora osjećanja domena izvora, naš pristup prilagođuje leksije osjećanja generalnog cilja ciljanju domena sa pomoć malih broja označenih uzorka koji su odabrani i annotirani u aktivnom režimu učenja, kao i sličnosti osjećanja domena posebnih domena između riječi koje su minerale iz neoznačenih uzorka ciljnog domena. Jedinim modelom se predlaže da zbuni različite vrste informacija o osjećanjima i povezuje klasifikaciju sentimenta za ciljnu domenu. Eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može trenirati tačnu klasifikaciju sentimenta sa manje označenim uzorcima.', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් සැකසුම් විශ්ලේෂණ ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරයේදී ඩොමේන් විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම තියෙන විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ඩෝමේන් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලි නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනාව ගොඩක් වැඩි වෙන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරභාව සහ ඉලක්කු ඩෝමේන් වලට විශේ මේ පත්තරේ අපි සක්\u200dරිය දේවල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා. Instant of the source domain sensiment classifiers, our approach suits the General-object sensiment lexicons to Targe domain with the help of a short number of label samples that are elected and adverted in an ctive learnt mode, as well as the domain-espezie sensiment SimLarities with Words minated from unaebected samples of Targe domain. එකතු මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් විශේෂ තොරතුරු සහ ඉලක්ක ඩෝමේන් වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරීන්ස්  බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සේට් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය හරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියල', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha internetku waa teknolojiyo muhiim ah oo xafiiska dhibaatada ku xiran deegaanka ee baaritaanka fikrada. Sida caadiga ah qaababka joogtada waxay ku xiran yihiin fasaxyada xisaabta ah oo lagu baranayo goobaha noocyada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sameyntoodu waxay si weyn u yaraan karaan, haddii qaybinta farsamada xisaabta iyo meelaha la hago ay leeyihiin kala duwanaan aad u weyn. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaab ku habboon daryeelka deegaanka si aan u xambaarano dhibaatadan. Taariikhda dareemaha deegaanka, dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu u bedelaa xisaabta guud ee lexicada si ay ugu hagaajiyaan guriga, taasoo lagu caawinayo samooyin yar oo la qoray oo loo doortay oo lagu caddeeyey qaab waxbarasho shaqo leh, sidoo kalena waxaa loo qoray isku mid ah malayaasha deegaanka oo laga tiro samooyinka a an la qorin. Waxaa lagu talogalay in uu fududeeyo macluumaad kala duduwan oo fikrado ah iyo in lagu tababariyo fasax xisaabta, goobta goalka ah. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran taariikhda bangiga waxay muuqan karaan in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu ku tababari karo samooyin saxda ah oo aan la qorin.', 'sv': 'Domänanpassning är en viktig teknik för att hantera domänberoende problem inom sentimental analysområde. Befintliga metoder förlitar sig vanligtvis på sentimentklassificerare utbildade i källdomäner. Deras prestanda kan dock kraftigt minska om fördelningen av sentimentfunktioner i käll- och måldomäner har betydande skillnader. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en aktiv inställning till sentiment domain för att hantera detta problem. Istället för källdomänens sentimentklassificerare anpassar vårt tillvägagångssätt de allmänna sentimentlexikonerna till måldomän med hjälp av ett litet antal märkta prover som väljs ut och kommenteras i ett aktivt inlärningsläge, samt domänspecifika sentimentlikheter bland ord som utvinns från omärkta prover av måldomän. En enhetlig modell föreslås för att sammanföra olika typer av sentimentinformation och träna sentimentklassificerare för måldomän. Omfattande experiment på benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt kan träna korrekta sentimentklassificerare med mindre märkta prover.', 'ta': 'Domain adaptation is an important technology to handle domain dependence problem in sentiment analysis field.  இருக்கும் மூல களங்களில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு வகுப்பாளர்களை பொதுவாக நம்புகிறது. ஆனால் மூலத்தில் உள்ள உணர்வு குணங்களின் பங்கீட்டு மற்றும் இலக்கு களங்களில் முக்கியமான வேறுபாடு இருந்தால், அவை செயல இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க ஒரு செயல்பாட்டின் உணர்வு களம் ஒதுக்கும் வழிமுறை மூலத்தின் களம் உணர்வு வகைப்பாளர்களுக்கு பதிலாக, எங்கள் அணுகல் செயல்பாட்டில் குறைந்த சிறிய குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகளின் உதவி கொண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட உணர்வு பொதுவான உணர்வு லெக்சிக்ஸிக்களை ஒப்பிடுகிறத ஒரு ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வேறு வகையான உணர்வு தகவல் மற்றும் இலக்கு களத்திற்கான உணர்வு வகைப்பாட்டை பயிற்சி செய் பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் விரிவான சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் அணுகல் சரியான உணர்வு வகுப்பாளரை குறைந்தது மாதிர', 'ur': 'ڈومین تعمیر ایک اہم ٹیکنالوجی ہے کہ ڈومین اعتباری مسئلہ کو احساس تحلیل فیلڈ میں تحمل کرنے کے لئے۔ Existing methods usually rely on sentiment classifiers trained in source domains. اگرچہ، ان کی عملکرد بہت سخت کاٹ سکتی ہے اگر سورج اور موقع دامنین میں احساسات فرق کا تقسیم ہوتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک فعال احساسات ڈومین اضافہ کی طرح پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ سورس ڈومین احساسات کلیسٹر کے بدلے، ہماری طریقہ نے عمومی احساسات لکسونز کو ڈومین کی مدد کے ساتھ ترکیب دینے کے لئے ایک چھوٹی نقطہ لکھی ہوئی نمونز کی مدد کے مطابق انتخاب کیے جاتے ہیں اور ایک فعال یادہانی موڈ میں اظہار کیے جاتے ہیں، اور ڈومین کے خاص احساسات مطابق لکھی ہوئی باتوں ایک متحدہ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے کہ مختلف طریقوں کی احساسات معلومات اور ٹرنیٹ ڈومین کے لئے احساسات کا کلیسائر پیدا کرے۔ بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر پھیلانے والی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ دقیق احساسات کلیسٹر کو کم لابلیٹ نمونے کے ساتھ ٹرین کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Domen taʼminlovchi, domen taʼminlovchi muammolarni hisoblash maydonida ishlatuvchi muhim texnologiya. Mavjud usullar, oddiy foydalanuvchi domene'da o'rganilgan hissiyotlarга таваккал қилмоқдалар. Lekin, hissiyotning xususiyatlarini manbasiga tarqatish mumkin va muhim oʻzgarishga ega boʻlsa, ularning bajarishi juda kamaytirish mumkin. In this paper, we propose an active sentiment domain adaptation approach to handle this problem.  Manba domen hissiyotlarining oʻrniga, biz quyimiz odamning umumiy ma'lumot leksikalarini domen yordamida qo'shiladi. Agar belgilangan va aktiv o'rganish usulida taʼminlovchi kichkina misollarni yordam beradi. Name Benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytirish imtiyozlari esa bizning usuli cheksiz misollar bilan foydalanish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phục dịch miền là một công nghệ quan trọng để giải quyết vấn đề nghiện lĩnh trong lĩnh vực phân tích cảm xúc. Phương pháp hiện thời thường dựa vào tỉ mỉ phân loại được đào tạo trong miền gốc. Tuy nhiên, khả năng của họ có thể giảm mạnh nếu phân phát các tính năng tình cảm trong miền nguồn và đích có sự khác biệt lớn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp thích nghi đa cảm trong lĩnh vực để giải quyết vấn đề này. Thay vì những người phân loại cảm xúc miền gốc, phương pháp của chúng ta thích ứng ngôn ngữ đa cảm chung với mục đích xác định mục tiêu với mục đích đích đích đích đích đích, bằng sự trợ giúp của một số lượng nhỏ các mẫu được dán nhãn được chọn và ghi chú trong chế độ học tập hoạt động, cũng như các mô phỏng tình cảm miền đặc biệt giữa các từ được lấy ra từ các mẫu chưa được dán trên miền đích. Một mô hình thống nhất được đề xuất để tổng hợp các loại thông tin tình cảm khác nhau và phân loại cảm xúc cho miền đích. Những thí nghiệm mở rộng trên các dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể đào tạo người phân loại cảm xúc chính xác bằng mẫu ít nhãn.', 'da': 'Domænetilpasning er en vigtig teknologi til at håndtere domæneafhængighedsproblem i sentiment analyse felt. Eksisterende metoder er normalt afhængige af sentiment klassificerere, der er uddannet i kildeområder. Men deres præstation kan falde kraftigt, hvis fordelingen af sentimentfunktioner i kilde- og måldomæner har betydelig forskel. I denne artikel foreslår vi en aktiv tilpasning til sentiment domæne til at håndtere dette problem. I stedet for kildedænenes sentimentklassificeringer tilpasser vores tilgang de generelle sentimentleksikoner til måldomæne ved hjælp af et lille antal mærkede prøver, der udvælges og kommenteres i en aktiv læringstilstand, samt domænespecifikke sentimentligheder blandt ord, der er udvundet fra ikke-mærkede prøver af måldomæne. Der foreslås en samlet model for at sammensætte forskellige typer sentiment information og træne sentiment klassificerer til måldomæne. Omfattende eksperimenter med benchmark datasæt viser, at vores tilgang kan træne nøjagtige sentiment klassificerer med mindre mærkede prøver.', 'hr': 'Domena adaptacija je važna tehnologija za rješavanje problema ovisnosti domena u polju analize osjećaja. Postoje metode obično oslanjaju na klasifikatore osjećaja obučene u izvornim domenima. Međutim, njihov učinkovit može teško smanjiti ako distribucija osjećajnih karakteristika u izvoru i ciljnim domenama imaju značajnu razliku. U ovom papiru predlažemo aktivan pristup adaptacije domena osjećanja kako bi riješili ovaj problem. Umjesto klasifikatora osjećanja domena izvora, naš pristup prilagođuje leksikone osjećanja generalnog cilja ciljanju domena s pomoći malih broja označenih uzorka koji su odabrani i annotirani u aktivnom učenju režimu, kao i sličnosti osjećanja domena specifičnih osjećaja između riječi koje su minerale iz neoznačenih uzorka ciljnog domena. Prijedlog je ujedinjenog modela za spajanje različitih vrsta informacija o osjećajima i klasifikaciju osjećaja vlakova za ciljnu domenu. Prošireni eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može trenirati tačnu klasifikaciju osjećaja s manjim označenim uzorcima.', 'bg': 'Адаптацията на домейн е важна технология за справяне с проблема с зависимостта на домейна в областта на сентименталния анализ. Съществуващите методи обикновено разчитат на класификатори на сентименти, обучени в домейни източник. Въпреки това, ефективността им може значително да намалее, ако разпределенията на сентименталните функции в източника и целевите домейни имат значителна разлика. В настоящата статия предлагаме активен подход за адаптиране на сентименталните домейни за справяне с този проблем. Вместо класификаторите на настроенията на домейна източник, нашият подход адаптира лексиконите на настроенията с общо предназначение към целевия домейн с помощта на малък брой маркирани примери, които са избрани и анотирани в активен режим на обучение, както и специфичните за домейна прилики на настроенията между думите, извлечени от немаркирани примери на целевия домейн. Предлага се унифициран модел за сливане на различни видове сентиментална информация и обучение на сентиментален класификатор за целеви домейни. Обширни експерименти с базови набори от данни показват, че нашият подход може да обучи точен класификатор на сентименти с по-малко етикетирани проби.', 'nl': 'Domeinaanpassing is een belangrijke technologie om domeinafhankelijkheidsprobleem op sentimentanalyse gebied aan te pakken. Bestaande methoden zijn meestal gebaseerd op sentimentclassificatoren die zijn opgeleid in brondomeinen. Hun prestaties kunnen echter sterk afnemen als de verdeling van sentimentkenmerken in bron- en doeldomeinen significant verschillen. In dit artikel stellen we een actieve aanpak voor om dit probleem aan te pakken. In plaats van de sentimentclassificatoren van het brondomein past onze aanpak de algemene sentimentlexicons aan het doeldomein aan met behulp van een klein aantal gelabelde samples die worden geselecteerd en geannoteerd in een actieve leermodus, evenals de domeinspecifieke sentimentovereenkomsten tussen woorden die zijn gewonnen uit niet-gelabelde samples van het doeldomein. Een uniform model wordt voorgesteld om verschillende soorten sentimentinformatie te fuseren en sentimentclassificator te trainen voor het doeldomein. Uitgebreide experimenten met benchmark datasets tonen aan dat onze aanpak nauwkeurige sentiment classificator kan trainen met minder gelabelde samples.', 'de': 'Dom채nenanpassung ist eine wichtige Technologie, um Dom채nenabh채ngigkeitsprobleme im Bereich der Sentimentanalyse zu behandeln. Bestehende Methoden st체tzen sich in der Regel auf Sentiment-Klassifikatoren, die in Quelldom채nen ausgebildet sind. Ihre Performance kann jedoch stark sinken, wenn die Verteilung der Sentiment-Features in Quell- und Zieldom채nen signifikante Unterschiede aufweist. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen aktiven Sentiment Domain Adaptation Ansatz vor, um dieses Problem zu l철sen. Anstelle der Quelldom채nenklassifikatoren passt unser Ansatz die allgemeinen Sentiment-Lexikone mit Hilfe einer kleinen Anzahl beschrifteter Samples an die Zieldom채ne an, die im aktiven Lernmodus ausgew채hlt und kommentiert werden, sowie die dom채nenspezifischen Sentiment-횆hnlichkeiten zwischen W철rtern, die aus nicht beschrifteten Samples der Zieldom채ne gewonnen wurden. Ein einheitliches Modell wird vorgeschlagen, um verschiedene Arten von Stimmungsinformationen zu verschmelzen und Stimmungsklassifikator f체r die Zieldom채ne zu trainieren. Umfangreiche Experimente an Benchmark-Datens채tzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz genaue Sentiment-Klassifikatoren mit weniger markierten Proben trainieren kann.', 'id': 'Adaptasi domain adalah teknologi penting untuk menangani masalah dependensi domain dalam bidang analisis sentimen. Metode yang ada biasanya bergantung pada klasifikasi perasaan yang dilatih dalam domain sumber. Namun, prestasi mereka mungkin menurun dengan berat jika distribusi karakteristik sentimen dalam domain sumber dan target memiliki perbedaan yang signifikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan domain sentimen aktif untuk mengatasi masalah ini. Daripada klasifikasi sensor domain sumber, pendekatan kita menyesuaikan leksikon sensor tujuan umum ke domain target dengan bantuan dari sejumlah kecil sampel yang ditandai yang dipilih dan ditandai dalam mode pembelajaran aktif, serta kesamaan sensor spesifik domain diantara kata-kata yang ditambah dari sampel domain target yang tidak ditandai. Model bersatu diusulkan untuk menggabungkan tipe berbeda informasi sentimen dan klasifikasi sentimen kereta untuk domain target. Eksperimen ekstensif pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita dapat melatih klasifikasi sentimen akurat dengan sampel yang kurang labeled.', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامنه یک تکنولوژی مهم برای کنترل مشکل بستگی دامنه در زمینه تحلیل احساسات است. روش\u200cهایی که وجود دارند معمولاً بر مجموعه\u200cکنندگان احساساتی که در دامنهای منبع آموزش داده می\u200cشوند بستگی دارند. ولی اگر توزیع ویژه\u200cهای احساسات در منبع و دامنه\u200cهای هدف تفاوت significantly دارند، عملکرد آنها می\u200cتواند به شدت کاهش دهد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک طریق تغییر احساسات فعال برای حل این مشکل. به جای مجموعه\u200cهای احساسات منبع دومین، دستور ما لکسینهای احساسات عمومی را به دامین هدف می\u200cدهد با کمک تعدادی نمونه\u200cهای کوچک برچسب\u200cشده که در یک حالت یادگیری فعال انتخاب می\u200cشوند و مشخص می\u200cشوند، و همچنین شبیه احساسات ویژه\u200cای از دامین\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای بین کلمات\u200cهای معدنی از نمونه\u200cهای بد یک مدل متحد پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که نوع اطلاعات احساسات مختلف را جمع کند و محرمانه\u200cکننده احساسات را برای دامنه هدف آموزش دهد. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای برچسب نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما می\u200cتواند با نمونه\u200cهای کمتر برچسب\u200cشده احساسات دقیق را آموزش دهد.', 'ko': '분야 적응은 정서 분석 분야에서 분야에 의존하는 문제를 처리하는 중요한 기술이다.기존의 방법은 통상적으로 원역에서 훈련하는 감정 분류기에 의존한다.그러나 감정 특징이 원역과 목표역의 분포에 현저한 차이가 존재하면 그들의 표현은 심각하게 떨어질 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 주동적인 정서역 자체 적응 방법을 제시하여 이 문제를 처리했다.우리의 방법은 원역 감정 분류기를 사용하지 않고 주동적인 학습 모델에서 소량의 표기 샘플을 선택하고 주석하는 것, 그리고 목표역의 표기되지 않은 샘플에서 발굴된 단어 간의 특정 영역의 감정 유사성을 통해 통용적인 감정 어휘를 목표역에 적응시킨다.통일된 모델을 제시하여 서로 다른 유형의 감정 정보를 융합시키고 목표역의 감정 분류기를 훈련시킨다.기준 데이터 집합에서의 대량의 실험은 우리의 방법은 표기 견본이 비교적 적은 상황에서 정확한 감정 분류기를 훈련할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Upatikanaji wa Domain ni teknolojia muhimu ya kudhibiti tatizo la kutegemea ndani ya uchambuzi wa hisia. mbinu zilizopo mara nyingi hutegemea wataalamu wa hisia waliofundishwa katika maeneo ya vyanzo. Hata hivyo, utendaji wao unaweza kupungua kwa kiasi kikubwa kama usambazaji wa hisia katika chanzo na maeneo mengi yanakuwa na tofauti kubwa. In this paper, we propose an active sentiment domain adaptation approach to handle this problem.  Badala ya washiriki wa hisia za kituo hicho, hatua yetu inabadilisha hisia za jumla za lexico kwa lengo la kulenga eneo hilo kwa msaada wa idadi ndogo ya sampuli zilizochaguliwa na kuchangazwa katika namna ya kujifunza, pamoja na hisia maalum za ndani kati ya maneno yaliyopungua kutokana na sampuli zisizo na lengo la malengo. Mradi wa pamoja unapendekezwa kuchochea aina mbalimbali za taarifa za hisia na kufundisha hisia za kujifunza kwa ajili ya maeneo ya lengo. Majaribio mengi kwenye taarifa za benchmark yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kuwafundisha hisia sahihi na sampuli zisizo sahihi.', 'af': "Domein-aanpassing is 'n belangrike teknologie om domein-afhanklikheid-probleem in sentimentanalisie veld te hanteer. Bestaande metodes is gewoonlik op sentiment klassifiseerders wat in bron domeine opgelei word. Maar hulle prestasie kan swaar verdwyn as die verspreiding van sentiment funksies in bron en doel domeine betekende verskil het. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n aktiewe sentiment domein aanpassing toegang om hierdie probleem te hanteer. In plaas van die bron domein sentiment klassifiseerders, ons toegang pas die algemene-doel sentiment leksies a an die doel domein met die hulp van 'n klein nommer van etiketeerde voorbeelde wat gekies word en aangekies word in 'n aktiewe leer modus, asook die domein-spesifieke sentiment gelykenisse onder woorde gemineer van ongeabelde voorbeelde van doel domein. 'n Eenvoudige model is voorgestel om verskillende tipes sentiment inligting en trein sentiment klassifiseerder vir teikende domein te verbind. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op benchmark datastelle vertoon dat ons toegang kan presies sentiment klassifiseerder trein met minder etiketeerde voorbeelde.", 'tr': 'Saýlaw analizi sahasında domain bağlılık meselesini çözmek için önemli bir teknolojidir. Öň bar yöntemler köplenç çeşme sahypalarda bilinmiş duýgular klasifikatyna ynanýarlar. Ýöne, olaryň tanyşylygy görnüş we maksady alanlarda duýgym özellikleriniň paýlaşmasynyň köp üýtgeşigi ýok bolup biler. Bu kağıt içinde, bu meseleyi çözmek için etkinleşen duygular domeny adaptasyonunu teklif ediyoruz. Kaynak domeny duygulamalarının yerine, bizim approach, hedef domenyun örneklerinden alınan ve işaretlenen küçük numaralı örneklerin yardımıyla, hedef alanmadan alınan, domenyun spesifik duygulamaları ve madde edilen kelimelerin arasında uyarlar. Birleşik bir model farklı duygusal bilgileri birleştirmek ve hedef domeny üçin duygu klasifikatörünü otlamak için teklif edildi. Etiket sanlarynda örän uzakly deneyler biziň ýaryşymyz diňe etilen örnekler bilen duýgym klasifikatyny düz şeklinde trenleyebilir.', 'sq': 'Adaptimi në domeni është një teknologji e rëndësishme për të trajtuar problemet e varësisë në domeni në fushën e analizës së ndjenjave. Metodat ekzistuese zakonisht mbështeten në klasifikuesit e ndjenjave të trajnuar në fushat burimore. Megjithatë, performanca e tyre mund të ulet rëndë nëse shpërndarjet e karakteristikave të ndjenjave në fushat burimore dhe objektive kanë dallim të rëndësishëm. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë aktive të përshtatjes në domenin e ndjenjave për të trajtuar këtë problem. Në vend të klasifikuesve të ndjenjave të domenit burimor, qasja jonë përshtat lexikonat e ndjenjave me qëllim të përgjithshëm në domenin objektiv me ndihmën e një numri të vogël të mostrave të etiketuara që janë zgjedhur dhe shënuar në një modalitet të mësimit aktiv, si dhe ngjashmëritë e ndjenjave specifike për domenin midis fjalëve të miniuara nga mostrat e pa etiketuar të domenit objektiv. Një model i unifikuar propozohet për të bashkuar lloje të ndryshme të informacionit të ndjenjave dhe klasifikuesit të ndjenjave të trenit për domenin objektiv. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në bazat e të dhënave tregojnë se metoda jonë mund të trajnojë klasifikuesin e saktë të ndjenjave me mostra më pak të etiketuara.', 'hy': 'Domain adaptation is an important technology to handle domain dependence problem in sentiment analysis field.  Existing methods usually rely on sentiment classifiers trained in source domains.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանց արտադրողությունը կարող է մեծ նվազեցնել, եթե զգացմունքների տարածումը աղբյուր- և նպատակային բնագավառներում նշանակալի տարբերություն ունեն: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք ակտիվ զգացմունքների ոլորտի ադապտացիոն մոտեցում այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Մեր մոտեցումը հարմարեցնում է ընդհանուր նպատակի զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնները նպատակային տիեզերքի փոխարեն, օգտագործելով մի փոքր թվեր պիտակուցված նմուշներ, որոնք ընտրվում են և գրված են ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության մեջ, ինչպես նաև տիեզերքի նպատակային զգացմունքների նմանությունները բառերի միջև, որոնք հանվում են նպատակային տիեզ Միասնական մոդել է առաջարկում զգացմունքների տարբեր տեսակների տեղեկատվության և զգացմունքների դասակարգման միավորելու համար նպատակային բնագավառի համար: Համեմարկ տվյալների համակարգերի մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարող է վարժեցնել ճշգրիտ զգացմունքների դասակարգչային գործընթացը ավելի քիչ նշաններով:', 'am': 'ዶሜን አቀማመጥ የዶሜን የመደገፊያ መከራ በሚያሳየው የአስማች ትምህርት መቆጣጠር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑን ሥርዓት በመጠቀም በsource domain ውስጥ በሚያስተማሩ በሚያስተማሩ በሚያስተማሩ ላይ ይታመካሉ። ምንም እንኳን፣ የስሜት ግንኙነት ማካካፈል እና የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች ውጤት በሆነው ቢካፈሉ የራሳቸውን አካባቢ ይጎድልበታል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመከላከል የሚኖረውን የአስቆጣዊ ድሜን ማቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በምዕራብ ፋንታ የዶሜን ስሜት ክፍተኞቹን እና አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች በተመረጡትና በተማሩ እውቀት በተመሳሳይ እና በዶሜን በተለየ ቃላት የተለየ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን ለማግኘት እና አካባቢ ስሜት የተመሳሰለውን አካባቢ እና የዶሜን-አዳራዊ እውቀት በተመሳሳይ እና አካላዊ ምሳሌ በተመሳሳይ እና አዳራዊ ስሜት መሰላቸ የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች የስሜት መረጃዎችን ለማስቀመጥ እና ለሚያጋራው ዶሜን አስተዳቢዎችን ለመግለጥ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በbenchmark ዳታዎች ላይ ብዙ ፈተናዎች የደረጃችን ስሜት ማሳየት በሚያሳየው ምሳሌዎች ከታናሹ ምሳሌዎች የሚያስተምር ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Domena adaptasiyası duyguları analizi sahəsində domena bağlılığı problemlərini idarə etmək üçün vacib bir teknolojidir. Existing metodlar genellikle mənbə domenlərində təhsil edilmiş hisslər klasifikatorlarına təvəkkül edir. Lakin, onların performansları, mənbədə və məqsəd domenindəki hisslərin fəaliyyətlərin dağıtılması möhkəm bir fəaliyyəti varsa, ağır gələ bilər. Bu kağızda, bu problemi çəkmək üçün aktif hisslər domeini uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün təklif edirik. Qaynaq domena hissləri klassifiklərinin yerine, bizim tərzimiz genel-məqsədilə hisslər leksiklərini domena təşkil edilən, aktif öyrənmə modunda seçilmiş və bildirilmiş küçük nümunələrin köməyi ilə, həmçin in məqsədilə maddə edilməmiş məqsədilə maddə edilmiş sözlərin arasında olan domena təşkil hisslərin məsəlinə uyğunlaşdırır. Birleşik modellər müxtəlif hiss məlumatlarını birləşdirmək və məqsəd domeini üçün hiss sıralayıcı trenlənmək üçün təklif edilir. Benchmark veri qurularında genişliyi təcrübələr bizim tərəfimiz daha az etiketli nümunələrlə düzgün hisslər klasifikatoru təhsil edə biləcəyini göstərir.', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন অ্যাডপেটশন একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রযুক্তি বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি সাধারণত উৎস ডোমেনে প্রশিক্ষিত অনুভূতি ব্যবহারকারীদের উপর নির্ভর করে। তবে তাদের কর্মসূচী এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুদের বিতরণের ক্ষেত্রে যদি তাদের অনুভূতি বিতরণের বিষয়টি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পার্থক্য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সক্রিয় অনুভূতি ডোমেইন আপেটশনের প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি এই সমস্যা নিয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য। সূত্র ডোমেইনের অনুভূতি বিভক্ত করার পরিবর্তে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের লেক্সিকোনকে লক্ষ্য করার সাহায্যে ডোমেইনের লক্ষ্য করে দেয়, যারা সক্রিয় শিক্ষা মোডে নির্বাচিত হয়েছে এবং তাদের মধ্যে একট একটি একত্রিত মডেলের প্রস্তাব করা হচ্ছে বিভিন্ন ধরনের অনুভূতিপূর্ণ তথ্য এবং লক্ষ্য ডোমেইনের জন্য অনুভূতিপূর্ণ বিভিন্ Extensive experiments on benchmark datasets show that our approach can train accurate sentiment classifier with less labeled samples.', 'ca': "L'adaptació al domini és una tecnologia important per gestionar el problema de la dependència del domini en el camp de l'an àlisi del sentiment. Els mètodes existents normalment confien en classificadors de sentiments entrenats en dominis de fonts. Tot i així, el seu rendiment pot disminuir molt si les distribucions de característiques sentimentals en dominis de font i d'objectiu tenen una diferència significativa. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament actiu d'adaptació al domini del sentiment per gestionar aquest problema. En comptes dels classificadors del sentiment de domini de fonts, el nostre enfocament adapta els lècicons del sentiment de propòsit general al domini destinatari amb l'ajuda d'un petit nombre de mostres etiquetades que es seleccionen i anoten en un món d'aprenentatge actiu, així com les similituds del sentiment específic del domini entre les paraules minerades de mostres no etiquetades del domini destinatari. S'ha proposat un model unificat per fusionar diferents tipus d'informació sentimental i classificador de sentiments trens per al domini alvo. Els extensos experiments en conjunts de dades de referència demostren que el nostre enfocament pot entrenar un classificador de sentiments precis amb mostres menys etiquetades.", 'bs': 'Domena adaptacija je važna tehnologija za rješavanje problema ovisnosti domena u polju analize sentimenta. Postoje metode se obično oslanjaju na klasifikatore osjećanja obučene u izvornim domenama. Međutim, njihov učinkovit može teško smanjiti ako distribucija osjećajnih karakteristika u izvoru i ciljnim domenama imaju značajnu razliku. U ovom papiru predlažemo aktivan pristup adaptacije domena sentimenta da riješimo ovaj problem. Umjesto klasifikatora osjećanja domena izvora, naš pristup prilagođuje leksikone osjećanja generalnog cilja ciljanju domena sa pomoć malih broja označenih uzorka koji su odabrani i annotirani u aktivnom načinu učenja, kao i sličnosti osjećanja domena posebnih domena između riječi koje su minerale iz neoznačenih uzorka ciljnog domena. Jedinim modelom se predlaže da zbuni različite vrste informacija o osjećanjima i povezuje klasifikaciju sentimenta za ciljnu domenu. Eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može trenirati tačnu klasifikaciju sentimenta sa manje označenim uzorcima.', 'cs': 'Adaptace domén je důležitou technologií pro řešení problému závislosti na doméně v oblasti sentimentu analýzy. Stávající metody se obvykle spoléhají na klasifikátory sentimentů trénované ve zdrojových doménách. Jejich výkonnost však může výrazně klesat, pokud se distribuce sentimentních prvků ve zdrojové a cílové doméně výrazně liší. V tomto článku navrhujeme aktivní adaptační přístup k tomuto problému. Namísto klasifikátorů sentimentu zdrojové domény náš přístup přizpůsobuje všeobecné slovníky sentimentu cílové doméně pomocí malého počtu označených vzorků, které jsou vybrány a anotovány v aktivním režimu učení, stejně jako doménově specifické sentimentové podobnosti mezi slovy vytěženými z neoznačených vzorků cílové domény. Je navržen jednotný model, který sloučí různé typy sentimentových informací a trénuje klasifikátor sentimentu pro cílovou doménu. Rozsáhlé experimenty na benchmarkových datových sadách ukazují, že náš přístup dokáže trénovat přesný klasifikátor sentimentu s méně označenými vzorky.', 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamine on oluline tehnoloogia domeenisõltuvuse probleemi käsitlemiseks sentimentaalüüsi valdkonnas. Olemasolevad meetodid tuginevad tavaliselt sentimentide klassifitseerijatele, kes on koolitatud lähtedomeenides. Siiski võib nende jõudlus oluliselt langeda, kui sentimentaalsete funktsioonide jaotusel lähte- ja sihtdomeenides on märkimisväärne erinevus. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja aktiivse sentimentaalse domeeni kohandamise lähenemisviisi selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Algdomeeni sentimentaalsete klassifitseerijate asemel kohandab meie lähenemisviis üldise otstarbega sentimentaalsed leksikonid sihtdomeenile, kasutades väikest arvu märgistatud näidiseid, mis valitakse ja märgitakse aktiivses õpperežiimis, samuti domeenispetsiifilisi sentimentaalseid sarnasusi sihtdomeeni märgistamata näidistest kaevandatud sõnade vahel. Pakutakse välja ühtne mudel, mis ühendab erinevat tüüpi sentimentaalse teabe ja koolitab sentimentaalse klassifitseerija sihtdomeeni jaoks. Põhjalikud eksperimendid võrdlusandmekogumitega näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis suudab koolitada täpset sentimentaalset klassifitseerijat vähem märgistatud näidistega.', 'fi': 'Domain-sopeutuminen on tärkeä teknologia käsitelläkseen domain-riippuvuutta tunteiden analyysin alalla. Nykyiset menetelmät perustuvat yleensä lähdeverkkotunnuksilla koulutettuihin tunteiden luokittelijoihin. Niiden suorituskyky voi kuitenkin heikentyä voimakkaasti, jos lähdeverkkotunnusten ja kohdeverkkotunnusten tunneominaisuuksien jakaumissa on merkittävä ero. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme aktiivista tunteiden sopeutumista ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Lähdeverkkotunnuksen tunteiden luokittelijoiden sijaan lähestymistapamme mukauttaa yleiskäyttöiset tunteiden sanastot kohdeverkkotunnukseen pienellä määrällä merkittyjä näytteitä, jotka valitaan ja merkitään aktiivisessa oppimistilassa, sekä toimialueekohtaisia tunteiden samankaltaisuuksia kohdeverkkotunnuksen merkitsemättömistä näytteistä louhittujen sanojen välillä. Ehdotetaan yhtenäistä mallia erilaisten tunteiden yhdistämiseksi ja tunteiden luokittelijan kouluttamiseksi kohdeverkkotunnukselle. Laajat testit vertailuaineistoista osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme voi kouluttaa tarkkoja tunteiden luokittelijoita vähemmän merkityillä näytteillä.', 'he': 'התאמה לתחום היא טכנולוגיה חשובה להתמודד עם בעיית תלויות בתחום בשדה ניתוח רגשות. שיטות קיימות בדרך כלל תלויות על קלאספי רגשות מאומנים בתחומים מקורים. עם זאת, ההופעה שלהם עלולה לרדת בכבד אם להפיצות של תכונות רגשות בתחומים מקור ומטרה יש הבדל משמעותי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה פעילה להתאים לתחום הרגשה כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת. Instead of the source domain sentiment classifiers, our approach adapts the general-purpose sentiment lexicons to target domain with the help of a small number of labeled samples which are selected and annotated in an active learning mode, as well as the domain-specific sentiment similarities among words mined from unlabeled samples of target domain.  מודל מאוחד מוצע כדי להדליק סוגים שונים של מידע רגשות ומסדר רגשות רכבת לתחום המטרה. ניסויים רחבים על קבוצות נתונים של רמזים מראים שהגישה שלנו יכולה לאמן מערכת רגשות מדויקת עם דגימות פחות מסוימות.', 'jv': 'domain Adjustment is an Important method to handle domain diphensible question in Senment testing box. Learn Mode Nanging, akeh sing dipunangé karo iso nggambar luwih-luwih iso nggawe diutag-uteg penting nggawe tarjamahan karo perbudhakan karo dolanan sing kok. In this paper, we proposal an active Sensitive domain modification method to handle this question. Instinstead of the source domain Senment CLASS, we method Adjusts the General-goal Senment lexceptions to goal domain with the help of a small number of label samples that are selected and anntatid in an active Learning mode, as welas the domain-special Senment Simlarions amongst words mined from Unlabated samples of goal domain. A single model is proposal to combe the types of Sensitive information and station Sensitive AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje domen je pomembna tehnologija za reševanje problemov odvisnosti domen na področju analize sentimenta. Obstoječe metode običajno temeljijo na klasifikatorjih občutkov, usposobljenih za domene vira. Vendar pa se lahko njihova uspešnost močno zmanjša, če imajo porazdelitve funkcij občutkov v izvornih in ciljnih domenah znatne razlike. V prispevku predlagamo pristop aktivnega prilagajanja sentimentalne domene za reševanje tega problema. Namesto klasifikatorjev sentimentalnih območij izvorne domene naš pristop prilagodi splošne sentimentalne leksikone ciljni domeni s pomočjo majhnega števila označenih vzorcev, ki so izbrani in označeni v aktivnem načinu učenja, kot tudi podobnosti sentimentalnih območij, specifičnih za domeno, med besedami, pridobljenimi iz neoznačenih vzorcev ciljne domene. Predlagan je enoten model za združevanje različnih vrst sentimentalnih informacij in usposabljanje sentimentalnega klasifikatorja za ciljno domeno. Obsežni eksperimenti na referenčnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da lahko naš pristop usposobi natančen klasifikator sentimenta z manj označenimi vzorci.', 'ha': "Shiryarwa na Domen yana da kima mai muhimmin technical da za'a yi amfani da matabbatar da danganta a kan danne-danganta a cikin filin anayyar aiki. @ action: button A lokacin da ake yiwuwa ya ƙara saurin su idan rabin siffarka na hisãbi da ke cikin kwanan kwanan da ke da rabo-dabam mai girma. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyar da wata matsayi mai adadin saukarwa da ke fara a cikin hisãbi dõmin su yi amfani da wannan mataimaki. Badanin danne-danganta na Domen, hanyonmu yana adatar da matsayin mai amfani da matsayin leksisi don ya yi amfani da ƙarami ko da taimakon wasu misãlai kaɗan na rubutu waɗand a aka zãɓe su kuma aka sanar da su cikin shirin da ke fara, da kuma misãlai masu ƙayyade na Domen da ke ƙaranci daga misãlai na lokacin da ba'a yi amfani ba. An goyyade wata motsi da aka haɗa shi dõmin ya zartar da nau'i-nau'i daban-nau'i, ma'anar hisia kuma a kõre sifilaɗar fanel wa Domen na goa. Akwai jarrabo masu ƙaranci kan danne-bangon ayuka na nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana iya ƙidãya wa mai tsari da misãlai masu ƙaranci da ba'a rubutu ba.", 'bo': 'Domain adaptation is an important technology to handle domain dependence problem in sentiment analysis field. གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡི In this paper, we propose an active sentiment domain adaptation approach to handle this problem. Instead of the source domain sentiment classifiers, our approach adapts the general-purpose sentiment lexicons to target domain with the help of a small number of labeled samples which are selected and annotated in an active learning mode, as well as the domain-specific sentiment similarities among words mined from unlabeled samples of target domain. A unified model is proposed to fuse different types of sentiment information and train sentiment classifier for target domain. Extensive experiments on benchmark datasets show that our approach can train accurate sentiment classifier with less labeled samples.'}
{'en': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'ar': 'توقع التقلبات باستخدام مشاعر الإفصاح المالي مع نماذج IR القائمة على تضمين Word', 'es': 'Predicción de volatilidad mediante el uso de sentimientos de divulgación financiera con modelos de IR basados en Word Embedding', 'pt': 'Previsão de volatilidade usando sentimentos de divulgações financeiras com modelos de IR baseados em incorporação de palavras', 'fr': "Prédiction de la volatilité à l'aide des sentiments d'information financière avec des modèles IR basés sur Word Embedding", 'ja': 'ワード埋め込み型IRモデルを用いた財務情報開示を用いたボラティリティ予測', 'zh': '用词嵌 IR 财务披露波动性占', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование волатильности с использованием настроек раскрытия финансовой информации с использованием ИК-моделей на основе встраивания слов', 'hi': 'अस्थिरता भविष्यवाणी Word एम्बेडिंग-आधारित IR मॉडल के साथ वित्तीय प्रकटीकरण भावनाओं का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Tuar luaineachta ag baint úsáide as Mothúcháin Nochtadh Airgeadais le Múnlaí IR atá bunaithe ar Leabú Focal', 'el': 'Πρόβλεψη μεταβλητότητας με τη χρήση συναισθημάτων χρηματοοικονομικής δημοσιοποίησης με μοντέλα υπέρυθρων ακτίνων που βασίζονται στην ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დამატებული IR მოდელებისთვის გამოყენებული ფულისხმების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Volatilitási előrejelzés pénzügyi közzétételek érzéseivel Word Embedding alapú IR modellekkel', 'it': 'Predizione della volatilità utilizzando i sentimenti di informativa finanziaria con modelli IR basati su Word Embedding', 'lt': 'Nelankstumo prognozė naudojant finansinės atskleidimo jutimus su žodžių įterpimo IR modeliais', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру негізіндеген IR үлгілері арқылы Қаржылы Ақпараттарды қолдану мөлшерлігі', 'mk': 'Предвидување за волатибилност со користење на чувства за финансиски откритија со IR модели базирани на вградување на зборови', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ IR മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വോള്\u200dട്ടി', 'mn': 'Санхүүгийн нээлттэй санхүүгийн нээлттэй мэдрэмжүүдийг Word Embedding-д суурилсан IR загваруудыг ашиглаж буй сайн ханамж төсөөлөл', 'no': 'Førehandsvising for volatighet ved bruk av Finansielle avslag Sentimentar med tekstinnbåde IR- modeller', 'pl': 'Prognozowanie zmienności przy użyciu opinii finansowych z modelami IR opartymi na wbudowaniu słów', 'ro': 'Predicția volatilității utilizând sentimente de dezvăluiri financiare cu modele IR bazate pe Word Embedding', 'ms': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'so': 'Heeganka iskudarka ee isticmaalka xisaabta dhaqaalaha ee ku qoran qoraalka IR', 'sv': 'Volatilitetsprognos med hjälp av finansiella upplysningar Sentiments med Word Embedding-baserade IR-modeller', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உட்பொதிந்த IR மாதிரிகளுடன் வார்த்தை உட்பொதிந்த IR முறைமைகளுடன் பொருளாதார வெளிப்பாட்ட', 'mt': 'Tbassir tal-Volatilità bl-użu ta’ Żvelar Finanzjarju Sentimenti b’Mudelli IR ibbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem', 'sr': 'Predviđanje za dobrotvornost koristeći financijske otkriće Sentiments sa modelima IR na osnovu uključenih reči', 'si': 'විත්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසි', 'ur': 'ورڈ انڈیڈنگ بنیادی IR موڈلز کے ساتھ فنانسی ڈیلزورز کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'vi': 'Tính năng dự đoán dựa trên công thức tài chính Với các mô hình IR nhúng vào từ', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Volatiliteitsvoorspelling met behulp van Financial Disclosures Sentiments met Word Embedding gebaseerde IR-modellen', 'da': 'Volatilitetsforudsigelse ved hjælp af finansielle oplysninger følelser med Word Embedding-baserede IR-modeller', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на волатилността с използване на сентименти за финансови оповестявания с инфраструктурни модели, базирани на вграждане на думи', 'hr': 'Predviđanje za dobrotvornost koristeći financijske otkriće Sentiments s modelima IR na osnovu uključenih riječi', 'de': 'Volatilitätsvorhersage unter Verwendung von Financial Disclosures Sentiments mit Word Embedding-basierten IR-Modellen', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد جامعه با استفاده از آشکار مالی با مدلهای IR بنیادی بر جمع کردن کلمات', 'id': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Uhuru kwa kutumia Seneti za Uwazi wa Fedha kwa Modala za IR yenye asili ya neno', 'tr': 'Maliýe Gaýşartmaky Sentimentleri Metini Dolamak tabanly IR Modeller ullanýar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'ko': '단어가 삽입된 IR 모델을 바탕으로 하는 재무 공개 정서 변동성 예측', 'bn': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'bs': 'Predviđanje dobrotvornosti koristeći financijske otkriće Sentiments sa modelima IR na osnovu uključenih riječi', 'af': 'Volatiteitsvoorkoms gebruik Finansieële Oplossing Sentiments met Woord Inbetering-gebaseerde IR Modelle', 'az': 'Mali Açırılışlar Sözlük İçində Bütün IR Modelləri ilə Sözlük İçində İçində İçində Sözlük İçində', 'cs': 'Predikce volatility pomocí výsledků finančních zveřejnění s IR modely založenými na Word Embedding', 'fi': 'Volatiliteettiennuste taloudellisten tietojen perusteella Sanan upottamiseen perustuvien IR-mallien avulla', 'et': 'Volatiilsuse prognoosimine finantsteabe avalikustamise tunnete abil Wordi manustamisel põhinevate IR mudelitega', 'sq': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'ca': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models', 'jv': 'Suara Kelangan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Napoved nestanovitnosti z uporabo občutkov finančnih razkritij z IR modeli, ki temeljijo na vgradnji Worda', 'he': 'שימוש בתחום התגליות פיננסיות', 'bo': 'Volatility Prediction using Financial Disclosures Sentiments with Word Embedding-based IR Models'}
{'en': 'Volatility predictionan essential concept in financial marketshas recently been addressed using sentiment analysis methods. We investigate the sentiment of annual disclosures of companies in stock markets to forecast volatility. We specifically explore the use of recent Information Retrieval (IR) term weighting models that are effectively extended by related terms using word embeddings. In parallel to textual information, factual market data have been widely used as the mainstream approach to forecast market risk. We therefore study different fusion methods to combine text and market data resources. Our word embedding-based approach significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods. In addition, we investigate the characteristics of the reports of the companies in different financial sectors.', 'ar': 'التنبؤ بالتقلب - وهو مفهوم أساسي في الأسواق المالية - تمت معالجته مؤخرًا باستخدام طرق تحليل المشاعر. نحن نحقق في اتجاه الإفصاحات السنوية للشركات في أسواق الأسهم للتنبؤ بالتقلبات. نحن نستكشف على وجه التحديد استخدام نماذج ترجيح مصطلح استرداد المعلومات (IR) الحديثة التي يتم توسيعها بشكل فعال من خلال المصطلحات ذات الصلة باستخدام تضمين الكلمة. بالتوازي مع المعلومات النصية ، تم استخدام بيانات السوق الواقعية على نطاق واسع كنهج رئيسي للتنبؤ بمخاطر السوق. لذلك ندرس طرق دمج مختلفة للجمع بين موارد النص وبيانات السوق. يتفوق نهجنا القائم على تضمين الكلمات بشكل كبير في أحدث الأساليب. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نتحرى عن خصائص تقارير الشركات في القطاعات المالية المختلفة.', 'es': 'La predicción de la volatilidad, un concepto esencial en los mercados financieros, se ha abordado recientemente mediante métodos de análisis de sentimiento. Investigamos el sentimiento de las divulgaciones anuales de las empresas en los mercados bursátiles para pronosticar la volatilidad. Exploramos específicamente el uso de modelos recientes de ponderación de términos de recuperación de información (IR) que se amplían eficazmente mediante términos relacionados mediante incrustaciones de palabras. Paralelamente a la información textual, los datos fácticos del mercado se han utilizado ampliamente como el enfoque principal para pronosticar el riesgo de mercado. Por lo tanto, estudiamos diferentes métodos de fusión para combinar recursos de texto y datos de mercado. Nuestro enfoque basado en la incrustación de palabras supera significativamente a los métodos más avanzados. Además, investigamos las características de los informes de las empresas de los diferentes sectores financieros.', 'pt': 'A previsão de volatilidade – um conceito essencial nos mercados financeiros – foi recentemente abordada usando métodos de análise de sentimentos. Investigamos o sentimento das divulgações anuais de empresas nas bolsas de valores para prever a volatilidade. Exploramos especificamente o uso de modelos recentes de ponderação de termos de Recuperação de Informações (RI) que são efetivamente estendidos por termos relacionados usando incorporações de palavras. Paralelamente às informações textuais, os dados factuais de mercado têm sido amplamente utilizados como a principal abordagem para prever o risco de mercado. Por isso, estudamos diferentes métodos de fusão para combinar recursos de texto e dados de mercado. Nossa abordagem baseada em incorporação de palavras supera significativamente os métodos de última geração. Além disso, investigamos as características dos relatórios das empresas de diferentes setores financeiros.', 'fr': "La prédiction de la volatilité, un concept essentiel sur les marchés financiers, a récemment été abordée à l'aide de méthodes d'analyse du sentiment. Nous étudions le sentiment des informations annuelles des entreprises sur les marchés boursiers afin de prévoir la volatilité. Nous explorons spécifiquement l'utilisation de modèles récents de pondération des termes de récupération d'informations (IR) qui sont efficacement étendus par des termes associés à l'aide d'intégrations de mots. Parallèlement aux informations textuelles, les données factuelles du marché ont été largement utilisées comme approche traditionnelle pour prévoir le risque de marché. Nous étudions donc différentes méthodes de fusion pour combiner des ressources de texte et de données de marché. Notre approche basée sur l'intégration de mots surpasse largement les méthodes de pointe. En outre, nous étudions les caractéristiques des rapports des entreprises de différents secteurs financiers.", 'ja': 'ボラティリティ予測は、金融市場で不可欠な概念であり、センチメント分析手法を使用して最近取り組まれています。当社は、株式市場における企業の年次開示の感覚を調査し、ボラティリティを予測しています。私たちは、単語埋め込みを使用して関連する用語によって効果的に拡張される最近の情報検索（ IR ）用語重み付けモデルの使用を特に探求しています。テキスト情報と並行して、市場リスクを予測するための主流のアプローチとして、事実上の市場データが広く使用されてきた。したがって、テキストと市場データリソースを組み合わせるためのさまざまな融合方法を研究しています。当社の単語埋め込みベースのアプローチは、最先端の方法を大幅に上回っています。また、異なる金融セクターの企業のレポートの特徴を調査しています。', 'zh': '波动性占金融市场中一基本概念,近已用情分析方法决之。 按股票市场中公司年度披露之情,以占波动性。 专讨近信息检索(IR)术语加权之用,以销其词术语有效而广之。 与文本信息并行,事实市数已博用为测市风险之法。 是以研其融合之法,以合文市之数。 我们基于词嵌之法显优于最先进之法。 又勘不同金融部门公司所告特征。', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование волатильности - важная концепция на финансовых рынках - было недавно рассмотрено с использованием методов анализа настроений. Мы исследуем настроения ежегодного раскрытия информации компаний на фондовых рынках для прогнозирования волатильности. Мы специально изучаем использование последних моделей взвешивания терминов извлечения информации (IR), которые эффективно расширяются соответствующими терминами с использованием вложений слов. Параллельно с текстовой информацией в качестве основного подхода к прогнозированию рыночных рисков широко используются фактические рыночные данные. Поэтому мы изучаем различные методы слияния для объединения текстовых и рыночных ресурсов данных. Наш подход, основанный на внедрении слов, значительно превосходит современные методы. Кроме того, мы исследуем характеристики отчетов компаний в различных финансовых секторах.', 'hi': 'अस्थिरता की भविष्यवाणी - वित्तीय बाजारों में एक आवश्यक अवधारणा - हाल ही में भावना विश्लेषण विधियों का उपयोग करके संबोधित किया गया है। हम अस्थिरता का पूर्वानुमान लगाने के लिए शेयर बाजारों में कंपनियों के वार्षिक प्रकटीकरण की भावना की जांच करते हैं। हम विशेष रूप से हाल ही में सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (आईआर) शब्द भार मॉडल के उपयोग का पता लगाते हैं जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके संबंधित शब्दों द्वारा प्रभावी ढंग से विस्तारित होते हैं। पाठ्य जानकारी के समानांतर, तथ्यात्मक बाजार डेटा को व्यापक रूप से बाजार जोखिम का पूर्वानुमान लगाने के लिए मुख्यधारा के दृष्टिकोण के रूप में उपयोग किया गया है। इसलिए हम पाठ और बाजार डेटा संसाधनों को संयोजित करने के लिए विभिन्न संलयन विधियों का अध्ययन करते हैं। हमारा शब्द एम्बेडिंग-आधारित दृष्टिकोण अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है। इसके अलावा, हम विभिन्न वित्तीय क्षेत्रों में कंपनियों की रिपोर्ट की विशेषताओं की जांच करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tugadh aghaidh le déanaí ar thuar luaineachta—coincheap bunriachtanach i margaí airgeadais—ag úsáid modhanna anailíse meon. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar dhearcadh nochtadh bliantúil cuideachtaí i stocmhargaí chun luaineacht a thuar. Déanaimid iniúchadh sonrach ar úsáid samhlacha ualaithe téarma Aisghabhála Faisnéise (IR) le déanaí a leathnaítear go héifeachtach le téarmaí gaolmhara agus úsáid á baint as leabaithe focal. I gcomhthreo le faisnéis théacsúil, baineadh úsáid fhorleathan as sonraí fíorasacha an mhargaidh mar chur chuige príomhshrutha chun riosca margaidh a thuar. Mar sin déanaimid staidéar ar mhodhanna comhleá éagsúla chun acmhainní téacs agus sonraí margaidh a chomhcheangal. Is fearr go mór ár gcur chuige atá bunaithe ar leabú focal ná na modhanna úrscothacha. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar shaintréithe thuarascálacha na gcuideachtaí in earnálacha airgeadais éagsúla.', 'hu': 'A volatilitás-előrejelzést – amely a pénzügyi piacok alapvető koncepciója – nemrégiben hangulatelemzési módszerekkel foglalkoztatták. A volatilitás előrejelzése érdekében vizsgáljuk a tőzsdei vállalatok éves közzétételének hangulatát. Kifejezetten vizsgáljuk a legújabb információvisszakeresési (IR) kifejezéssúlyozási modellek használatát, amelyeket a kapcsolódó kifejezésekkel hatékonyan kiterjesztenek szóbeágyazásokkal. A szöveges információkkal párhuzamosan a piaci kockázatok előrejelzésének általános megközelítéseként széles körben használták a tényleges piaci adatokat. Ezért különböző fúziós módszereket tanulmányozunk a szöveges és piaci adatforrások kombinálására. Szóbeágyazáson alapuló megközelítésünk jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket. Ezenkívül vizsgáljuk a különböző pénzügyi ágazatokban működő vállalatok jelentéseinek jellemzőit.', 'it': "La previsione della volatilità, un concetto essenziale nei mercati finanziari, è stata recentemente affrontata utilizzando metodi di analisi del sentiment. Investighiamo il sentiment delle informazioni annuali delle società sui mercati azionari per prevedere la volatilità. Esaminiamo specificamente l'uso dei recenti modelli di ponderazione dei termini IR (Information Retrieval) che sono efficacemente estesi da termini correlati utilizzando incorporazioni di parole. Parallelamente alle informazioni testuali, i dati fattuali di mercato sono stati ampiamente utilizzati come approccio principale per prevedere il rischio di mercato. Studiamo quindi diversi metodi di fusione per combinare testi e dati di mercato. Il nostro approccio basato sulla parola embedding supera significativamente i metodi più avanzati. Inoltre, esaminiamo le caratteristiche dei report delle società in diversi settori finanziari.", 'lt': 'Neseniai buvo atsižvelgta į nestabilumo prognozę – esminę sąvoką finansų rinkose – taikant jautrumo analizės metodus. Mes tiriame įmonių atskleidimo vertybinių popierių rinkose jausmą, kad prognozuojamas kintamumas. We specifically explore the use of recent Information Retrieval (IR) term weighting models that are effectively extended by related terms using word embeddings.  Kartu su tekstine informacija faktiniai rinkos duomenys buvo plačiai naudojami kaip pagrindinis rinkos rizikos prognozavimo metodas. Todėl mes tiriame skirtingus branduolių sintezės metodus, siekiant sujungti teksto ir rinkos duomenų išteklius. Mūsų žodis „įtraukimo“ metodas gerokai viršija pažangiausius metodus. Be to, tiriame įvairių finansų sektorių įmonių ataskaitų ypatumus.', 'kk': 'Қаржылық маркеттерде көлемділік таңдау - негізгі концепция - жаңа-жаңа сезімдік анализ әдістерін қолдану керек. Біз күтпек маркеттерінде компаниялардың жылдық ақпараттарының көңіл түсініктерін зерттеп тұрамыз. Біз соңғы мәліметті алу (IR) терминнің тең үлгілерін зерттеп, сөздерді ендіру арқылы әсер ететін терминнің қолдануын тексереміз. Мәтіндік мәліметіне параллеу үшін, фактикалық рынктың деректері, рынктың рискоттығын таңдау үшін негізгі жағдай ретінде қолданылады. Сондықтан мәтін мен маркет деректер ресурстарын біріктіру үшін бірнеше біріктіру әдістерін зерттейміз. Біздің сөздеріміздің ендіру негізіндегі тәсіліміздің күйінің әдістерін өзгертпейді. Қосымша, біз басқа финансовы сектордағы компаниялар туралы хабарламалардың қасиеттерін зерттеуді.', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη της μεταβλητότητας – μια ουσιαστική έννοια στις χρηματοπιστωτικές αγορές – αντιμετωπίζεται πρόσφατα χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων. Ερευνούμε το συναίσθημα των ετήσιων δημοσιοποιήσεων εταιρειών στις χρηματιστηριακές αγορές για να προβλέψουμε τη μεταβλητότητα. Ερευνούμε συγκεκριμένα τη χρήση πρόσφατων μοντέλων στάθμισης όρων ανάκτησης πληροφοριών (τα οποία επεκτείνονται αποτελεσματικά με σχετικούς όρους χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Παράλληλα με τις πληροφορίες κειμένου, τα πραγματικά δεδομένα της αγοράς έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί ευρέως ως η κύρια προσέγγιση για την πρόβλεψη κινδύνου αγοράς. Ως εκ τούτου μελετούμε διαφορετικές μεθόδους σύντηξης για να συνδυάσουμε πόρους κειμένου και δεδομένων αγοράς. Η προσέγγιση που βασίζεται στη λέξη ενσωμάτωση ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους. Επιπλέον, ερευνούμε τα χαρακτηριστικά των εκθέσεων των εταιρειών σε διάφορους χρηματοπιστωτικούς τομείς.', 'mk': 'Предвидувањето на неспособноста, суштински концепт на финансиските пазари, неодамна беше решено со помош на методите на анализа на чувствата. Ние го истражуваме чувството на годишното откривање на претпријатијата на берзата за да предвидеме нестабилност. Ние специфично ја истражуваме употребата на неодамнешните модели на тежирање на терминот на добивање информации (IR) кои се ефикасно продолжени со поврзани термини користејќи зборови вградени. Паралелно со текстуалните информации, фактичките пазарни податоци се широко употребени како главен пристап за предвидување на пазарниот ризик. Затоа студираме различни методи на фузија за комбинација на текст и пазарни податоци. Нашиот збор на пристап базиран на вградување значително ги надминува најдобрите методи. Покрај тоа, ги истражуваме карактеристиките на извештаите на претпријатијата во различните финансиски сектори.', 'ka': 'ბოლორატიური წარმოდგენება - ფენისტური მარკეტებში მნიშვნელოვანი კონცექტი - მხოლოდ განსახულებულია სენტიმენტის ანალიზის მეტისებით. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ წლის განსხვავება კომპანიაში კომპანიაში, რომლებიც განსხვავებულობას წარმოდგენს. ჩვენ განსაკუთრებით განსხვავებთ ახალი ინფორმაციის მიღება (IR) ტერმინის გამოყენებას, რომელიც ეფექტიურად განსხვავებული სიტყვებით გამოყენებული სიტყვებით გამოყენებული ტექსტუალური ინფორმაციის პარალელად, ფაქტიური ბაზეტის მონაცემები უფრო დიდ გამოყენებულია როგორც მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრამის განსაზღვრება. ამიტომ ჩვენ განსხვავებული ფუზიციის მეტოვები შევსწავლოთ ტექსტი და ბაზეტის მონაცემების რესურსები. ჩვენი სიტყვა, რომელიც გადაყენებულია, მნიშვნელოვანად გავაკეთებს სტატური მეტოვები. დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული ფინანციური sektorში კომპანიაციების პარამეტრები.', 'ml': 'സാമ്പത്തിക മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രവചനം- അടുത്തുതന്നെ വിചാരപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു സ്റ്റോക്ക് മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റിലെ കമ്പനികളുടെ വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വീണ്ടും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉപയോഗം നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി വാക്കുകള ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമായി യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് ഡേറ്റാ വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കു We therefore study different fusion methods to combine text and market data resources.  നമ്മുടെ വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്  കൂടാതെ, വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീയ സാമ്പത്തിക വിഭാഗത്തിലുള്ള കമ്പനികളുടെ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളുടെ വ്യക്തിത്വത്തെപ്', 'mn': 'Санхүүгийн зах зээлийн чухал санхүүгийн тодорхойлолт нь сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний аргыг ашиглан шийдсэн. Бид хөрөнгө зах зээлийн компаниудын илтгэлийн мэдрэмжийг судалж байлаа. Бид саяхан мэдээлэл авах (IR) томъёоны жингийн загварын хэрэглээнийг судалж, харилцааны хэлбэрээр нэмэгдэж буй томъёонуудыг ашиглаж байна. Текст мэдээллийн параллель, үнэндээ зах зээлийн мэдээллийг зах зээлийн эрсдэлийг тодорхойлох гол арга болгон ашиглаж байна. Тиймээс бид текст болон зах зээлийн мэдээллийн нөөц бүрдүүлэх өөр нэгтгэл арга замыг судалдаг. Бидний үгийг суурилуулах арга зам нь урлагийн төвшин арга зам дээр илүү чухал болгодог. Мөн бид өөр санхүүгийн хэсэгт компаниудын мэдээллийг судалж байна.', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av volatighet-ein viktig konsept i finansielle markeder er nyleg adressert ved hjelp av sentimentanalysemetodar. Vi undersøker følelsen til årlige oppslag av selskaper i stokkmarkedet for å foreslå volatilitet. Vi spesifikke utforskar bruken av nyleg informasjonshenting (IR) uttrykk av vektsmodeller som er effektivt utvida av relaterte uttrykk med ordinnbygging. Samtidig med tekstinformasjon har faktiske markedsdata brukt som hovudtilnærming til å foregå markedsrisiko. Vi studierer derfor ulike fusjonsmetoder for å kombinere tekst og markedsdataressursar. Ver ordbasert tilnærming er betydelig enn kunstmetodar. I tillegg undersøker vi eigenskapane til rapportene av selskapene i ulike finansielle sektorar.', 'mt': 'Il-previżjoni tal-volatilità – kunċett essenzjali fis-swieq finanzjarji – reċentement ġiet indirizzata bl-użu ta’ metodi ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti. Aħna ninvestigaw is-sensazzjoni ta’ żvelar annwali ta’ kumpaniji fis-swieq tal-ishma biex nipprovaw il-volatilità. Aħna esploraw b’mod speċifiku l-użu ta’ mudelli reċenti ta’ ponderazzjoni tat-terminu tal-kisba tal-informazzjoni (IR) li huma effettivament estiżi b’termini relatati bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem. B’mod parallel mal-informazzjoni testwali, id-dejta fattwali tas-suq intużat b’mod wiesa’ bħala l-approċċ ewlieni għat-tbassir tar-riskju tas-suq. Għalhekk nistudjaw metodi differenti ta’ fużjoni biex nikkombinaw ir-riżorsi tat-test u tad-dejta tas-suq. L-approċċ ibbażat fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-metodi l-aktar avvanzati. Barra minn hekk, ninvestigaw il-karatteristiċi tar-rapporti tal-kumpaniji f’setturi finanzjarji differenti.', 'ro': 'Prevederea volatilității – un concept esențial pe piețele financiare – a fost abordată recent folosind metode de analiză a sentimentului. Investigăm sentimentul de dezvăluire anuală a companiilor de pe piețele de valori pentru a prognoza volatilitatea. Explorăm în mod specific utilizarea recentelor modele de ponderare a termenilor de recuperare a informațiilor (IR), care sunt extinse efectiv prin termeni conexe folosind încorporări de cuvinte. În paralel cu informațiile textuale, datele de piață factuale au fost utilizate pe scară largă ca abordare generală pentru prognozarea riscului pieței. Prin urmare, studiem diferite metode de fuziune pentru a combina resursele text și date de piață. Abordarea noastră bazată pe încorporarea cuvintelor depășește semnificativ metodele de ultimă generație. În plus, investigăm caracteristicile rapoartelor companiilor din diferite sectoare financiare.', 'pl': 'Prognozowanie zmienności – niezbędna koncepcja na rynkach finansowych – zostało ostatnio uwzględnione za pomocą metod analizy sentymentów. Badamy nastroje rocznych informacji spółek na rynkach giełdowych w celu prognozowania zmienności. W szczególności badamy wykorzystanie najnowszych modeli ważenia terminów pozyskiwania informacji (IR), które są skutecznie rozszerzane o powiązane terminy za pomocą osadzeń słów. Równolegle z informacjami tekstowymi, faktyczne dane rynkowe były powszechnie wykorzystywane jako główne podejście do prognozowania ryzyka rynkowego. W związku z tym badamy różne metody fuzji w celu łączenia zasobów tekstowych i danych rynkowych. Nasze podejście oparte na osadzeniu słowa znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody. Ponadto badamy charakterystykę raportów spółek z różnych sektorów finansowych.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විධානය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විධානය සඳහා අවශ අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ස්ටෝක් බාර්ටේස් වල සංවිධානයේ සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න. අපි විශේෂයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අලුත් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය (IR) පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරවේශනය (සම්බන්ධ) පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේ පාළුවන් තොරතුරු සමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, ඇත්තටම මාර්කට් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200d ඉතින් අපි වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරික්ෂණය සහ විකුණු තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න විදියට පර අපේ වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විදිහට විශේෂයෙන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඒ වගේම, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ වෙනස් විශේෂ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක වාර්තාවක් ගැන සමාගම වාර්තාවක් ගැන.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje dobrotvornosti - ključni koncept na financijskim tržištima nedavno je riješen koristeći metode analize sentimenta. Istražujemo osjećaj godišnjeg otkrivanja kompanija na tržištima dionica kako bi proglasili nestabilnost. Posebno istražujemo korištenje nedavnog termina prikupljanja informacija (IR) težinskih modela koji su efikasno prošireni povezanim terminima koristeći rečenice. U paralelno tekstualnim informacijama, činjenični tržišni podaci su široko korišteni kao glavni pristup predviđanju rizika tržišta. Stoga proučavamo različite metode fuzije za kombinaciju tekstova i tržišnih podataka. Naš pristup ugrađenim rečima značajno iznosi nacionalne metode umjetnosti. Osim toga, istražujemo karakteristike izveštaja kompanija u različitim finansijskim sektorima.', 'so': 'Aqoonshaha iskudarka ee suuqa dhaqaalaha ee muhiimka ah waxaa ugu dhowaad looga baaraandegay qaababka analyeedka. Waxaynu baaraynaa dareenada muuqashada shirkadaha sanad-jirka ah oo suuqa firaaqada ah si aan uga hor tagno waxyaabaha. Si gaar ah ayaannu u baaraynaa isticmaalka dib u soo celinta macluumaadka (IR) qaababka miisaanka ee uu si faa’iido ah u sii wado sharciga la xiriira isticmaalka hadalka. In parallel to textual information, factual market data have been widely used as the mainstream approach to forecast market risk.  Sidaa darteed waxaynu baranaynaa qaabab kala duduwan oo ay isku daryeelaan macluumaadka iyo suuqa. Ereygeenna ku qoran qaababka ku saabsan ayaa si muhiim ah u muuqata hababka farshaxanta. Intaas waxaa dheer oo aan baaraynaa macluumaadka wargelinta shirkadaha ee qeybaha dhaqaalaha kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'தொழில்நுட்பம் முன்வெளிப்பாடு - நிதி சந்தையில் முக்கியமான கருத்து சமீபத்தில் உணர்வு ஆய்வு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி மு We investigate the sentiment of annual disclosures of companies in stock markets to forecast volatility.  நாம் சிறப்பாக அண்மைய தகவல் திருப்ப திரும்ப மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாட்டை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம். அவை வார்த்தை பொருத்தும் வார் முக்கிய விவரங்களுக்கு ஒப்பிட்டால், உண்மையான சந்தை தகவல்கள் விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது சந்தை ஆபத்திற்கு முன்னோ எனவே நாம் உரையையும் சந்தை தகவல் மூலமையையும் ஒன்றிணைக்க வேறு முறையான முறைகளையும் படிக்கிறோம். நம் வார்த்தையில் உள்ளிடப்பட்டுள்ள அடிப்படையில் உள்ள நெறிமுறையை முக்கியமாக செயல்படுத்துகிறது. மேலும், நாம் வேறு நிறுவனங்களின் அறிக்கைகளின் தன்மைகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'فنانسی بازارٹوں میں ایک ضروری منظور کی پیش بینی، اچھے وقت حساس تحلیل طریقے کے مطابق مشورہ کی گئی ہے. ہم اسٹاک مارکیٹوں میں کمپنیوں کی آگاہ کی احساس کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ وہ ناپاکیزگی کی پیش آئیں۔ ہم مخصوص طور پر اگلے معلومات حاصل کرنا (IR) ٹمنڈ وزنگ موڈل کے استعمال کا استعمال کررہے ہیں جو کلمات ابڈینگ کے مطابق اثرات کے ذریعہ تغییر سے پھیلائے جاتے ہیں. ٹیکسٹل کی معلومات کے مطابق، حقیقی مارکیٹ ڈیٹا بہت وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے کہ مارکیٹ ریسک کی پیش آنے کے لئے اصلی طریقہ کے طور پر۔ لہٰذا ہم متفاوت فوجین طریقوں کی تعلیم کریں کہ متن اور مارک ڈیٹ رسورسوں کو جمع کریں۔ ہمارے کلمات بنے ہوئے تقریبا بہت اچھی طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اور ہم مختلف مالی صنعت میں کمپنیوں کی راپوروں کی خصوصی تحقیق کرتے ہیں.', 'ms': 'Ramalan ketidakstabilan-konsep penting dalam pasar kewangan-baru-baru ini telah dihadapkan menggunakan kaedah analisis sentimen. Kami menyelidiki perasaan penjelasan tahunan syarikat di pasar saham untuk meramalkan ketidakstabilan. Kami secara khusus mengeksplorasi penggunaan model penimbangan terma Penerimaan Maklumat (IR) yang baru-baru ini yang secara efektif dilambangkan oleh terma berkaitan menggunakan penyambungan perkataan. Berselari dengan maklumat teks, data pasar fakta telah digunakan secara luas sebagai pendekatan aliran utama untuk meramalkan risiko pasar. We therefore study different fusion methods to combine text and market data resources.  Our word embedding-based approach significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods.  Selain itu, kami menyelidiki ciri-ciri laporan syarikat di sektor keuangan yang berbeza.', 'sv': 'Volatilitetsprognos – ett viktigt begrepp på finansmarknaderna – har nyligen behandlats med hjälp av sentimentalitetsanalysmetoder. Vi undersöker känslan av årliga upplysningar från företag på aktiemarknaden för att förutse volatilitet. Vi undersöker specifikt användningen av de senaste termviktningsmodellerna för informationshämtning (IR) som effektivt utökas med relaterade termer med hjälp av ordinbäddningar. Parallellt med textinformation har faktiska marknadsdata använts i stor utsträckning som det allmänna tillvägagångssättet för att förutse marknadsrisker. Därför studerar vi olika fusionsmetoder för att kombinera text- och marknadsdataresurser. Vårt ordbaserade tillvägagångssätt överträffar avsevärt de senaste metoderna. Dessutom undersöker vi egenskaperna hos rapporterna från företag inom olika finansiella sektorer.', 'uz': "Davlatlik taqdimoti - financiy soketdagi muhim concept - yangi paytda hisoblash usullari yordamida ishlatilgan. Biz har yil kompaniyalarning o'zgarishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz. Bu shaxsiy ko'plamlarining o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Yaqinda yangi maʼlumot tizimini tiklash (IR) tugmasini aniqlash mumkin. Bu so'zlar bilan bogʻ'liq so'zlarni ishlatish mumkin. Name We therefore study different fusion methods to combine text and market data resources.  Bu so'zning asosiy usuli juda qiziqarli narsalarni bajaradi. Ko'pchilik, biz boshqa kompaniyalar haqida xabarlarning xususiyatlarini o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Dự đoán nhanh chóng, một khái niệm thiết yếu trong thị trường tài chính, gần đây đã được giải quyết bằng phương pháp phân tích cảm xúc. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu tình cảm về sự tiết lộ hàng năm của các công ty trên thị trường chứng khoán để dự đoán tính bất ổn. Chúng tôi thăm dò đặc biệt việc sử dụng những mô hình ký ức mới về tìm thông tin (IR) lâu dài được mở rộng bằng các thuật ngữ liên quan sử dụng từ tham nhũng. Kết hợp với thông tin cấu trúc, dữ liệu trên thị trường đã được phổ biến sử dụng để dự đoán rủi ro trên thị trường. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu các phương pháp nhiệt hạch khác nhau để kết hợp văn bản và nguồn dữ liệu thị trường. Cách tiếp cận bằng từ ngữ có khả năng vượt trội. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu các căn bản của các báo cáo của các công ty trong các lĩnh vực tài chính khác nhau.', 'nl': "Volatiliteitsvoorspelling – een essentieel concept op de financiële markten – is onlangs aangepakt met behulp van sentimentanalysemethoden. We onderzoeken het sentiment van jaarlijkse bekendmaking van bedrijven op aandelenmarkten om de volatiliteit te voorspellen. We onderzoeken specifiek het gebruik van recente termwegingsmodellen voor informatieterugwinning (IR) die effectief worden uitgebreid met gerelateerde termen met behulp van woord embeddings. Naast tekstuele informatie zijn feitelijke marktgegevens op grote schaal gebruikt als de mainstream benadering om marktrisico's te voorspellen. Daarom bestuderen we verschillende fusiemethoden om tekst- en marktdata-bronnen te combineren. Onze op embedding gebaseerde aanpak presteert aanzienlijk beter dan state-of-the-art methoden. Daarnaast onderzoeken we de kenmerken van de rapporten van de bedrijven in verschillende financiële sectoren.", 'bg': 'Прогнозирането на волатилността - основна концепция на финансовите пазари - наскоро беше разгледано с помощта на методи за анализ на сентимента. Проучваме настроението на годишните оповестявания на компаниите на фондовите пазари за прогнозиране на волатилността. Ние специално изследваме използването на последните модели за претегляне на термини за извличане на информация (ИР), които ефективно са разширени от сродни термини, използващи вграждания на думи. Успоредно с текстовата информация фактическите пазарни данни са широко използвани като основен подход към прогнозирането на пазарния риск. Затова изучаваме различни методи за синтез за комбиниране на текстови и пазарни данни. Нашият подход, основан на вграждане на думи, значително превъзхожда най-съвременните методи. Освен това изследваме характеристиките на отчетите на компаниите от различни финансови сектори.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje dobrotvornosti-ključni koncept na financijskim tržištima nedavno je riješen koristeći metode analize osjećaja. Istražujemo osjećaj godišnjeg otkrivanja tvrtki na tržištima dionica kako bi proglasili nestabilnost. Posebno istražujemo korištenje nedavnog termina povlačenja informacija (IR) modela težine koje su učinkovito proširene povezanim terminima koristeći uključenje riječi. U paralelno tekstualnim informacijama, činjenični tržišni podaci su široko korišteni kao glavni pristup predviđanju rizika tržišta. Stoga proučavamo različite metode fuzije za kombinaciju tekstova i tržišnih podataka. Naš pristup ugrađenim riječima značajno iznosi način umjetnosti. Osim toga, istražujemo karakteristike izvješća poduzeća u različitim financijskim sektorima.', 'da': 'Volatilitetsforudsigelse - et væsentligt begreb på finansielle markeder - er for nylig blevet behandlet ved hjælp af sentimental analysemetoder. Vi undersøger følelsen af årlige oplysninger om virksomheder på aktiemarkederne for at forudsige volatilitet. Vi undersøger specifikt brugen af de nyeste IR-termvægtningsmodeller, der effektivt udvides af relaterede termer ved hjælp af ordindlejringer. Sideløbende med tekstoplysninger er faktuelle markedsdata blevet udbredt som den almindelige tilgang til prognoser for markedsrisici. Vi undersøger derfor forskellige fusionsmetoder til at kombinere tekst- og markedsdataressourcer. Vores ordindlejringsbaserede tilgang overgår væsentligt de nyeste metoder. Derudover undersøger vi karakteristika ved rapporterne fra virksomhederne i forskellige finansielle sektorer.', 'id': 'Prediksi ketidakstabilan-konsep penting di pasar keuangan-baru-baru ini telah diatasi menggunakan metode analisis sentimen. Kami menyelidiki perasaan penjelasan tahunan perusahaan di pasar saham untuk memprediksi volatilitas. Kami secara spesifik mengeksplorasi penggunaan model penimbangan istilah Informasi (IR) baru-baru ini yang secara efektif diperluaskan oleh istilah terkait menggunakan penyambungan kata. In parallel to textual information, factual market data have been widely used as the mainstream approach to forecast market risk.  Oleh karena itu kami mempelajari metode fusi yang berbeda untuk menggabungkan sumber data teks dan pasar. Perkataan kita mendekati berbasis embedding jauh melebihi metode state-of-the-art. In addition, we investigate the characteristics of the reports of the companies in different financial sectors.', 'de': 'Die Volatilitätsvorhersage – ein wesentliches Konzept an den Finanzmärkten – wurde kürzlich mit Methoden der Stimmungsanalyse angegangen. Wir untersuchen die Stimmung der jährlichen Offenlegungen von Aktiengesellschaften zur Prognose der Volatilität. Wir untersuchen insbesondere die Verwendung aktueller Termgewichtungsmodelle zur Information Retrieval (IR), die effektiv um verwandte Begriffe mittels Worteinbettungen erweitert werden. Parallel zu textuellen Informationen sind faktische Marktdaten weit verbreitet als Mainstream-Ansatz zur Prognose von Marktrisiken verwendet worden. Wir untersuchen daher verschiedene Fusionsmethoden, um Text- und Marktdatenressourcen zu kombinieren. Unser Wort Embedding-basierter Ansatz übertrifft die modernsten Methoden deutlich. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir die Merkmale der Berichte der Unternehmen in verschiedenen Finanzsektoren.', 'ko': '변동률 예측은 금융시장의 기본 개념으로 최근에 정서 분석 방법을 통해 해결되었다.우리는 회사가 주식시장에서 전년도에 발표한 정서를 조사하여 변동성을 예측했다.우리는 특히 최근 정보 검색(IR) 용어 권중 모델의 사용을 연구했는데 이런 모델은 단어에 삽입된 관련 용어를 사용하여 효과적으로 확장되었다.텍스트 정보와 마찬가지로 사실 시장 데이터는 이미 시장 리스크를 예측하는 주류 방법으로 광범위하게 사용되었다.따라서 우리는 서로 다른 융합 방법을 연구하여 텍스트와 시장 데이터 자원을 결합시킨다.우리는 단어를 삽입하는 방법이 가장 선진적인 방법보다 현저히 낫다.이 밖에 우리는 서로 다른 금융 업계의 회사 보고서의 특징도 조사했다.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای فراوانی-یک مفهوم اصلی در بازارهای مالی اخیرا با استفاده از روش تحلیل احساسات درباره\u200cی تحلیل احساسات درباره\u200cی آن مشخص شده است. ما احساسات آشکار سالانه شرکت\u200cها در بازارهای سهام را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا پیش\u200cبینی ناتوانی کنند. ما مخصوصاً استفاده از مدل وزن کردن کلمه اخیر اطلاعات (IR) را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکنند. در مقابل اطلاعات متن، داده های بازار واقعی به طور وسیع به عنوان روش اصلی برای پیش بینی ریسک بازار استفاده شده\u200cاند. بنابراین ما روش\u200cهای ترکیب متفاوتی را برای ترکیب متن و منابع داده\u200cهای بازار مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. کلمه\u200cمون روش\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cای که بسیار زیادی بیشتر از روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنر را انجام می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، ما ویژگی\u200cهای گزارش شرکتها در بخش\u200cهای مالی مختلف تحقیق می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Utabiri wa kujitolea-dhana muhimu katika masoko ya kifedha-hivi karibuni imejadiliwa kwa kutumia njia za uchambuzi wa hisia. Tunachunguza hisia za kuonyesha kila mwaka kwa makampuni katika masoko ya mashabiki ili kutabiri kutokuwepo kwa ukatili. Tunafanya hasa matumizi ya matumizi ya hivi karibuni ya Udhibiti wa Habari (IR) mifano ya uzito ambao kwa ufanisi unaongezeka kwa maneno yanayohusiana kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maneno. Kwa kulinganisha na taarifa za ujumbe, takwimu za kweli za soko zimetumiwa sana kama mbinu kubwa ya kutabiri hatari ya soko. Kwa hiyo tunasoma mbinu mbalimbali za fujo za kuunganisha rasilimali za taarifa na soko. neno letu linalohusiana na mfumo unaofanywa kwa kiasi kikubwa unaonyesha njia za sanaa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachunguza sifa za taarifa za makampuni katika sekta tofauti za kifedha.', 'af': 'Volatiteitsvoorskou-芒聙聶n nuwe konsepte in finansi脙芦le markede-is onlangs gespreek deur sentimentanalisie metodes. Ons ondersoek die sentiment van jaarlike openbarings van maatskappye in stoeke markede om volatiliteit te voorskou. Ons spesifieke uitsoek die gebruik van onlangse Informasie Herhaal (IR) term gewigtende modele wat effektief deur verwante terme gebruik word deur woord inb锚ding te gebruik. In parallelle met tekstuurlike inligting, is faktuurlike markeerdata vaste gebruik as die onderstreem toegang tot voorskou markrisiko. Ons studeer dus verskillende fusie metodes om teks en markdata hulpbronne te kombinerer. Ons woord inb锚er-gebaseerde toegang betekenlik uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes. In addition, we investigate the characteristics of the reports of the companies in different financial sectors.', 'tr': 'Maliýe bazarlarda höwesli öngörüm-döwürlenmek üçin höwes duýgular analizi yöntemleri ullanýar. Biz stok bazarlaryndaky kompaniýalaryň ýolu açylyklarynyň duýgyny aýdyşyny öňündürmek üçin gözlenýäris. Biz iň soňky maglumaty gaýşartma nusgalaryň (IR) ullanyşyny gözleýän ýüzünde sözler girişinden ullanýan termynlaryň ullanyşyny gözleýän. Metin maglumaty bilen parallel bolsa, hakykatdanam bazar maglumaty bazar riski öňden gelen ýagdaýa adatça ulanylýar. Şonuň üçin metin we bazar maglumatlaryň çeşmelerini birleştirmek üçin farklı birleşme yöntemlerini öwrenip otyrys. Biziň sözimiz daşary taýýarlanan ýalaýyşymyz sungatyň durumyny çykarýar. Munuň üçin kompaniýalaryň hasaplarynyň dürli mali sektörlerde hasaplarynyň özelliklerini inceleýäris.', 'az': 'Mali bazarları içində mövcuddur tədbir tədbir-tədbir-tədbir-tədbir-tədbir-tədbir-tədbir-tədbir müəyyən edilmişdir. Biz stock bazarlarındaki şirketlərin günlük açıqlamasının hissini incidirik. Biz yeni Malümat alması (IR) terimi ağırlığı modellərin istifadəsini təsdiqləyirik ki, əlaqəsiz şartları ilə sözləri istifadə edərək çox genişlənir. Mətn məlumatlarına parallel olaraq, əsas bazar məlumatları bazar riskini önləşdirmək üçün böyük tərzdə istifadə edilmişdir. Beləliklə, məktub və pazarlıq məlumatlarını birləşdirmək üçün fərqli fəsasiya metodlarını təhsil edirik. Bizim sözümüz inşa edilən tərzim şəkildə mövcuddur. Biz də müxtəlif mali sektorların şirketlərin xəbərlərinin xəbərlərini incidirik.', 'am': 'የፍላጎት መፍጠር - የሀብት ገበያ ማሰናከል ሀብት ግንኙነት በመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የዓመቱ የኮምፒውተቶችን ገበያዎች የግልፅ ማውጣት እናሳይቃለን፡፡ በተለየንም የቅርብ መረጃ መመለስ (IR) የቃላት አካላት በመጠቀም በተቃላት አካላት በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተጨማሪው አካላት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለመግለጫ መረጃዎች በተለያዩ፣ የእውነቱ ገበያ ዳታ ለገበያ መከራ ለመቀበል የዋነኛው ጉዳይ መጠቀሚያ ሆኗል፡፡ ስለዚህ የጽሑፍ እና የገበያ የዳታ ሀብትን ለመቀላቀል ልዩ ልዩ የፍላጎት ሥርዓት እናስተምራለን፡፡ Our word embedding-based approach significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods.  በተጨማሪም፣ የካምፓርቲዎቹን ወሬ በተለየ የሀብት ክፍሎች ያሉትን አካባቢነት እናመርራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս վերաբերվել է ֆինանսական շուկաների թեթևականության կանխատեսումներին՝ ֆինանսական շուկաների հիմնական գաղափարին, օգտագործելով զգացմունքների վերլուծության մեթոդներ: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք արտադրամային շուկայում ընկերությունների տարեկան բացահայտումների զգացմունքը, որպեսզի կանխատեսենք անկայունությունը: Մենք մասնավորապես ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջին տեղեկատվության ստանալու (ԻՌ) տերմինային կշիռման մոդելների օգտագործումը, որոնք արդյունավետ ընդլայնվում են կապված տերմիններով՝ օգտագործելով բառերի ներդրումներ: Փաստաբանական շուկայի տվյալները համեմատաբար օգտագործվել են որպես շուկայի ռիսկի կանխատեսման հիմնական մոտեցում: Այսպիսով, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր ֆուզիոնային մեթոդներ տեքստի և շուկայի տվյալների ռեսուրսների համադրման համար: Մեր բառը ներգրավման հիմնված մոտեցում նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր մեթոդները: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր ֆինանսական ոլորտների ընկերությունների զեկույցների հատկությունները:', 'bn': 'স্বেচ্ছায়তা ভবিষ্যত-অর্থনৈতিক বাজারে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধারণা সম্প্রতি আবেগ বিশ্লেষণের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। আমরা বার্ষিক বাজারে কোম্পানিগুলোর প্রকাশের অনুভূতি তদন্ত করছি যাতে স্ট্যাক বাজারে অসহায়তা প্রদর্শন করা হয়। We specifically explore the use of recent Information Retrieval (IR) term weighting models that are effectively extended by related terms using word embeddings.  টেক্সচুয়াল তথ্যের তুলনায় বাজারের তথ্য ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বাজারের ঝুঁকির মূল ধারণা হিসেবে। তাই আমরা টেক্সট এবং বাজারের তথ্য সম্পদ সংযুক্ত করার জন্য বিভিন্ন ফ্যাশন পদ্ধতি গবেষণা করি। আমাদের শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার ব্যাপারে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক প্রযুক্তি প্রদান করা  এছাড়াও, আমরা বিভিন্ন অর্থনৈতিক ক্ষেত্রে কোম্পানির রিপোর্টের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী তদন্ত করি।', 'cs': 'Predikce volatility – základní koncept na finančních trzích – byla v poslední době řešena pomocí metod analýzy sentimentu. Zkoumáme sentiment ročních zveřejňování společností na akciových trzích za účelem prognózy volatility. Konkrétně zkoumáme využití aktuálních modelů váhy termínů pro získávání informací (IR), které jsou efektivně rozšířeny o související termíny pomocí vložení slov. Souběžně s textovými informacemi jsou jako hlavní přístup k prognóze tržního rizika široce používány faktické tržní údaje. Proto studujeme různé metody fúze pro kombinaci textových a tržních datových zdrojů. Náš přístup založený na vkládání slov výrazně překonává nejmodernější metody. Kromě toho zkoumáme charakteristiku reportů společností v různých finančních sektorech.', 'et': 'Volatiilsuse prognoosimist, mis on finantsturgude oluline kontseptsioon, on hiljuti käsitletud sentimentaalüüsi meetodite abil. Uurime aktsiaturgudel tegutsevate ettevõtete iga-aastase avalikustamise tundeid volatiilsuse prognoosimiseks. Uurime spetsiaalselt hiljutiste teabehankimise (IR) terminite kaalumise mudelite kasutamist, mida tõhusalt laiendatakse seotud terminitega, kasutades sõna manustamist. Paralleelselt tekstiteabega on tururiski prognoosimise peamiseks lähenemisviisiks laialdaselt kasutatud faktilisi turuandmeid. Seetõttu uurime erinevaid sünteesimeetodeid teksti- ja turuandmete ressursside ühendamiseks. Meie sõna manustamisel põhinev lähenemisviis ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid meetodeid. Lisaks uurime erinevate finantssektorite ettevõtete aruannete omadusi.', 'fi': 'Volatiiliteetin ennustamista, joka on rahoitusmarkkinoiden keskeinen käsite, on hiljattain käsitelty sentimentaalianalyysimenetelmin. Tutkimme osakemarkkinoilla toimivien yritysten vuosittaisten tietojen tuntemusta volatiliteetin ennustamiseksi. Tutkimme erityisesti viimeaikaisten Information Retrieval (IR) -termipainotusmallien käyttöä, joita laajennetaan tehokkaasti vastaavilla termeillä sanaupotuksilla. Tekstitietojen rinnalla markkinatietoja on käytetty laajalti markkinariskien ennakoinnin valtavirtalähteenä. Siksi tutkimme erilaisia fuusiomenetelmiä tekstin ja markkinoiden dataresurssien yhdistämiseksi. Sanan upottamiseen perustuva lähestymistapamme on huomattavasti parempi kuin uusimmat menetelmät. Lisäksi tutkimme eri finanssisektoreiden yritysten raporttien ominaisuuksia.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje dobrotvornosti-ključni koncept na financijskim tržištima nedavno je riješen koristeći metode analize osjećaja. Istražujemo osjećaj godišnjeg otkrivanja kompanija na tržištima dionica kako bi proglasili nestabilnost. Posebno istražujemo korištenje nedavnog termina prikupljanja informacija (IR) modela težine koje su učinkovito proširene povezanim terminima koristeći uključenje riječi. U paralelno tekstualnim informacijama, činjenični tržišni podaci su široko korišteni kao glavni pristup predviđanju rizika tržišta. Stoga proučavamo različite metode fuzije za kombinaciju tekstova i tržišnih podataka. Naš pristup ugrađenim riječima značajno iznosi nacionalne metode umjetnosti. Osim toga, istražujemo karakteristike izvješća kompanija u različitim financijskim sektorima.', 'sq': 'Volatility prediction-an essential concept in financial markets-has recently been addressed using sentiment analysis methods.  We investigate the sentiment of annual disclosures of companies in stock markets to forecast volatility.  Ne eksplorojmë veçanërisht përdorimin e modeleve të fundit të peshimit të termit të marrjes së informacionit (IR) që janë zgjeruar efektivisht nga termat e lidhura duke përdorur përfshirje fjalësh. Në paralel me informacionin tekstual, të dhënat faktike të tregut janë përdorur gjerësisht si qasje kryesore për parashikimin e rrezikut të tregut. We therefore study different fusion methods to combine text and market data resources.  Our word embedding-based approach significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods.  In addition, we investigate the characteristics of the reports of the companies in different financial sectors.', 'ca': "Volatility prediction-an essential concept in financial markets-has recently been addressed using sentiment analysis methods.  We investigate the sentiment of annual disclosures of companies in stock markets to forecast volatility.  We specifically explore the use of recent Information Retrieval (IR) term weighting models that are effectively extended by related terms using word embeddings.  Paralelament a la informació textual, les dades factuals del mercat s'han utilitzat ampliament com l'enfocament principal per a predir el risc del mercat. Per tant estudiem diferents mètodes de fusió per combinar recursos de text i de mercat. El nostre enfocament basat en incorporació supera significativament els mètodes més avançats. A més, investigam les característiques dels informes de les empreses de diversos sectors financers.", 'ha': "Tsarawa-wani zato mai muhimu a cikin soko na kifisci-na'yan nan an karɓi su yi amfani da hanyoyin analymai. Munã tambayar ma'anar firma a shekara shekara a cikin mabuɗan firma. Tuna ƙayyade amfani da misãlai masu nauyi na IR-muhalli na farko da aka yi amfani da maganar da aka faɗa. In parallel to textual information, factual market data have been widely used as the mainstream approach to forecast market risk.  Saboda haka, Munã karanta hanyoyin fushi daban-daban da za'a haɗa ma'anar mutane da ma'auni. KalmarMu wanda ke cikin hanyarMu, yana mai ƙara ga halin-the-art. Ina bayan haka, Munã tambayi karatun masu labar lãbãrin makampuni cikin wasu masu kifisa.", 'jv': 'Pirahane kapan-ingkang dipunanggé-ingkang dipunanggé ning kuwi tindahan anyar karo hal-hal nganggep kuwi nggawe diuwisan winih. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan langgar-wong liyane perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar nggawe barang diolah. Anyone Dino sampeyan karo informasi textual, dadi bazer Actual kang dipunangé diumbang kelas dadi pangrungso kanggo nggunakake triyang pasar. Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan-sistem sing sampeyan kanggo nggambar gambaran teks lan pakan dadi nêmên. Rilah Nambah, awak dhéwé nyukaké cara-cara nggawe barang pirsak neng wong liyane', 'sk': 'Napovedovanje volatilnosti – bistveni koncept na finančnih trgih – je bilo pred kratkim obravnavano z metodami analize sentimenta. Preučujemo občutek letnih razkritij podjetij na borznih trgih za napoved nestanovitnosti. Posebej raziskujemo uporabo nedavnih modelov ponderiranja terminov za pridobivanje informacij (IR), ki se učinkovito razširijo s sorodnimi izrazi z uporabo vgradnje besed. Vzporedno z besedilnimi informacijami so se dejanski tržni podatki široko uporabljali kot glavni pristop k napovedovanju tržnega tveganja. Zato preučujemo različne fuzijske metode za združevanje besedilnih in tržnih podatkovnih virov. Naš pristop, ki temelji na vključevanju besed, znatno presega najsodobnejše metode. Poleg tega raziskujemo značilnosti poročil podjetij v različnih finančnih sektorjih.', 'bo': 'ཆེད་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྔོན་ཚོགས་དངུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་ཉེ་ཆར་འདོགས་པ་དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་sentiment analysis་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ནང་གི་སྡོམ་འབྱོར་གྱི་མ་དངུལ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་ཕར་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་གསལ་བཀལ་ནས་དུས་མཐོང ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བ་བསྡོམས་ནས་ ང་ཚོའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གསར་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཚ་བཙལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'ציפוי הניצחון, מושג חיוני בשוק פיננסי, התייחס לאחרונה באמצעות שיטות ניתוח רגשות. We investigate the sentiment of annual disclosures of companies in stock markets to forecast volatility.  אנו חוקרים במיוחד את השימוש של דוגמני משקל המונחים של קיבלת מידע (IR) לאחרונה שמארכים באופן יעיל על ידי תנאים קשורים באמצעות קישור מילים. In parallel to textual information, factual market data have been widely used as the mainstream approach to forecast market risk.  לכן אנו לומדים שיטות מיזוג שונות כדי לשלב משאבי טקסט ומידע שוק. המילה שלנו הגישה המבוססת על הכניסה יוצאת משמעות יותר משיטות חדשות. בנוסף, אנו חוקרים את האופיינים של הדו"חות של החברות במגזרים פיננסיים שונים.'}
{'en': 'CANE : Context-Aware Network Embedding for Relation Modeling', 'ar': 'CANE: تضمين شبكة واعية للسياق من أجل نمذجة العلاقة', 'es': 'CANE: Incorporación de redes sensible al contexto para el modelado de relaciones', 'pt': 'CANE: Incorporação de rede sensível ao contexto para modelagem de relações', 'fr': 'CANE\xa0: intégration réseau sensible au contexte pour la modélisation des relations', 'ja': 'CANE ：リレーションモデリングのためのコンテキスト意識ネットワーク埋め込み', 'hi': 'CANE: संबंध मॉडलिंग के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग', 'zh': 'CANE:建模上下文知网络嵌', 'ru': 'CANE: Контекстно-ориентированное сетевое встраивание для моделирования отношений', 'ga': 'CÁN: Leabú Líonra Feasach ar Chomhthéacs le haghaidh Samhaltú Caidrimh', 'el': 'CANE: Ενσωμάτωση δικτύου με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος για μοντελοποίηση σχέσεων', 'hu': 'CANE: Környezettudatos hálózati beágyazás a kapcsolatmodellezéshez', 'ka': 'CANE: შესაბამისი მოდელეციისთვის კონტექსტური- გახსნა ქსელი', 'lt': 'CANE: ryšių modeliavimo tinklo įdiegimas atsižvelgiant į kontekstą', 'it': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding per la modellazione delle relazioni', 'kk': 'CANE: Қатынасын үлгілеу үшін Context- Aware желі ендіру', 'mk': 'CANE: Вклучување на контекстна мрежа за моделирање на врските', 'ml': 'CANE: ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'ms': 'CANE: Penjelmaan Rangkaian Awas-Konteks untuk Modelan Hubungan', 'mt': 'CANE: Inkorporazzjoni tan-Netwerk ta’ Kuntest Konxju għall-Immodellar tar-Relazzjonijiet', 'mn': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding for Relation Modeling', 'no': 'CANE: Innebygging av kontekst- vekk nettverk for relasjonsmodellering', 'pl': 'CANE: Kontekstowe osadzanie sieci dla modelowania relacji', 'ro': 'CANE: Încorporarea rețelei conștientă de context pentru modelarea relațiilor', 'sr': 'CANE: Uklapanje mreže za modeliranje odnosa', 'si': 'CANE: සම්බන්ධ මෝඩිල් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ජාලය සම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'CANE: Network Embedding for Relations Modeling', 'sv': 'CANE: Kontextmedveten nätverksinbäddning för relationsmodellering', 'ta': 'CANE: தொடர்பு மாற்றத்திற்கான உள்ளமைப்பு பிணையத்தின் உட்பொதி', 'ur': 'CANE: رابطہ موڈلینگ کے لئے کنٹکسٹ- Aware نیٹ ورک انڈینگ', 'uz': 'CANE: Aloqa moduli uchun tarmoq oʻrnatilmoqda', 'vi': 'Đan Mạch Liên kết Comment', 'bg': 'CANE: Вградяване на мрежата, осъзнаваща контекста, за моделиране на отношенията', 'da': 'CANE: Kontekstbevidst netværksindlejring til relationsmodellering', 'nl': 'CANE: Contextbewuste netwerkinsluiting voor relatiemodellering', 'hr': 'CANE: Uključenje mreže za modeliranje odnosa', 'de': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding für Beziehungsmodellierung', 'id': 'CANE: Persembahan jaringan yang menyadari konteks untuk Modeling Hubungan', 'fa': 'CANE: وارد کردن شبکه آگاهی کنترل برای مدل رابطه', 'ko': 'CANE: 관계 모델링을 위한 컨텍스트 인식 네트워크 포함', 'sw': 'CANE: Mtandao wa Kimataifa unaoandaliwa kwa ajili ya Utoaji wa Kuhusiana', 'tr': 'CANE: İlişkiler Modeli için Kontekst-Aware Ağ Girişi', 'af': 'CANE: Context- Aware Netwerk Inbêer vir Relasie Modeling', 'sq': 'CANE: Përfshirja e rrjetit të njohur në kontekst për modelimin e marrëdhënieve', 'am': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding for Relation Modeling', 'hy': 'ԿԱՆ. Հաբերությունների մոդելավորման համար տեղադրված ցանցի կոնտեքստ-գիտակցություն', 'az': '䍁久㨠쒰汩얟歩泉饲⁍潤敬泉饮淉饳椠쎼쎧쎼渠䍯湴數琭䅷慲攠乥瑷潲欠쒰얟泉饮淉饳椊', 'ca': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding for Relation Modeling', 'cs': 'CANE: Kontextové vložení sítě pro modelování vztahů', 'bn': 'CANE: সংযোগ মোডেলের জন্য বিভিন্ন পরিচিত নেটওয়ার্ক এমবেডিং', 'bs': 'CANE: Uključenje mreže za modeliranje odnosa', 'et': 'CANE: kontekstiteadlik võrgu manustamine seosmodelleerimiseks', 'fi': 'CANE: Kontekstitietoinen verkon upotus suhdemallinnusta varten', 'jv': 'Cane: context-Awake Network embedding for Relative model', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CANE: Vgradnja omrežja, ki se zaveda konteksta, za modeliranje relacij', 'he': 'CANE: התכנית רשת מודעת לקונקסט למדליגת יחסים', 'bo': 'CANE: Context-Aware Network Embedding for Relation Modeling'}
{'en': 'Network embedding (NE) is playing a critical role in network analysis, due to its ability to represent vertices with efficient low-dimensional embedding vectors. However, existing NE models aim to learn a fixed context-free embedding for each vertex and neglect the diverse roles when interacting with other vertices. In this paper, we assume that one vertex usually shows different aspects when interacting with different neighbor vertices, and should own different embeddings respectively. Therefore, we present Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), a novel NE model to address this issue. CANE learns context-aware embeddings for vertices with mutual attention mechanism and is expected to model the semantic relationships between vertices more precisely. In experiments, we compare our model with existing NE models on three real-world datasets. Experimental results show that CANE achieves significant improvement than state-of-the-art methods on link prediction and comparable performance on vertex classification. The source code and datasets can be obtained from.https://github.com/thunlp/CANE.\n    ', 'ar': 'يلعب تضمين الشبكة (NE) دورًا مهمًا في تحليل الشبكة ، نظرًا لقدرته على تمثيل الرؤوس باستخدام متجهات تضمين منخفضة الأبعاد فعالة. ومع ذلك ، تهدف نماذج NE الحالية إلى تعلم تضمين ثابت خالٍ من السياق لكل رأس وإهمال الأدوار المتنوعة عند التفاعل مع الرؤوس الأخرى. في هذه الورقة ، نفترض أن رأسًا ما يظهر عادة جوانب مختلفة عند التفاعل مع رؤوس الجوار المختلفة ، ويجب أن يمتلك زخارف مختلفة على التوالي. لذلك ، نقدم تضمين السياق الواعي للشبكة (CANE) ، وهو نموذج NE جديد لمعالجة هذه المشكلة. يتعلم CANE الزخارف الواعية بالسياق للرؤوس مع آلية الاهتمام المتبادل ومن المتوقع أن يصمم العلاقات الدلالية بين الرؤوس بشكل أكثر دقة. في التجارب ، قارنا نموذجنا بنماذج NE الموجودة في ثلاث مجموعات بيانات في العالم الحقيقي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن CANE تحقق تحسنًا كبيرًا من أحدث الأساليب في التنبؤ بالارتباط والأداء المماثل في تصنيف قمة الرأس. يمكن الحصول على كود المصدر ومجموعات البيانات من <https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>.', 'fr': "L'intégration de réseau (NE) joue un rôle essentiel dans l'analyse de réseau, en raison de sa capacité à représenter des sommets avec des vecteurs d'intégration de faible dimension efficaces. Cependant, les modèles NE existants visent à apprendre une intégration fixe sans contexte pour chaque sommet et à négliger les divers rôles lors de l'interaction avec d'autres sommets. Dans cet article, nous supposons qu'un sommet présente généralement différents aspects lorsqu'il interagit avec différents sommets voisins et qu'il doit posséder des intégrations différentes respectivement. Nous présentons donc CANE (Context-Aware Network Embedding), un nouveau modèle NE pour résoudre ce problème. CANE apprend les intégrations sensibles au contexte pour les sommets avec un mécanisme d'attention mutuelle et est censé modéliser les relations sémantiques entre les sommets de façon plus précise. Dans le cadre d'expériences, nous comparons notre modèle avec des modèles NE existants sur trois ensembles de données du monde réel. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le CANE obtient une amélioration significative par rapport aux méthodes de pointe en matière de prédiction de liens et des performances comparables sur la classification des sommets. Le code source et les ensembles de données peuvent être obtenus auprès de < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.", 'es': 'La incrustación de redes (NE) desempeña un papel fundamental en el análisis de redes, debido a su capacidad para representar vértices con vectores de incrustación de baja dimensión eficientes. Sin embargo, los modelos NE existentes tienen como objetivo aprender una incrustación fija y libre de contexto para cada vértice y descuidar las diversas funciones al interactuar con otros vértices. En este artículo, asumimos que un vértice generalmente muestra aspectos diferentes cuando interactúa con diferentes vértices vecinos, y debe poseer incrustaciones diferentes respectivamente. Por lo tanto, presentamos Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), un novedoso modelo de NE para abordar este problema. CANE aprende incrustaciones sensibles al contexto para vértices con un mecanismo de atención mutua y se espera que modele las relaciones semánticas entre vértices con mayor precisión. En los experimentos, comparamos nuestro modelo con los modelos de NE existentes en tres conjuntos de datos del mundo real. Los resultados experimentales muestran que CANE logra una mejora significativa con respecto a los métodos más avanzados en la predicción de enlaces y un rendimiento comparable en la clasificación de vértices. El código fuente y los conjuntos de datos se pueden obtener de < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'pt': 'A incorporação de rede (NE) está desempenhando um papel crítico na análise de redes, devido à sua capacidade de representar vértices com vetores de incorporação de baixa dimensão eficientes. No entanto, os modelos de NE existentes visam aprender uma incorporação fixa livre de contexto para cada vértice e negligenciar os diversos papéis ao interagir com outros vértices. Neste artigo, assumimos que um vértice geralmente apresenta diferentes aspectos ao interagir com diferentes vértices vizinhos, e deve possuir diferentes embeddings respectivamente. Portanto, apresentamos o Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), um novo modelo de NE para resolver esse problema. O CANE aprende embeddings sensíveis ao contexto para vértices com mecanismo de atenção mútua e espera-se que modele as relações semânticas entre os vértices com mais precisão. Em experimentos, comparamos nosso modelo com modelos NE existentes em três conjuntos de dados do mundo real. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o CANE alcança uma melhoria significativa do que os métodos de última geração na previsão de enlaces e desempenho comparável na classificação de vértices. O código-fonte e os conjuntos de dados podem ser obtidos em <https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>.', 'ja': 'ネットワーク埋め込み（ NE ）は、効率的な低次元埋め込みベクトルで頂点を表現することができるため、ネットワーク分析において重要な役割を果たしています。 しかし、既存のNEモデルは、各頂点の固定されたコンテキストフリー埋め込みを学び、他の頂点と対話するときに多様な役割を無視することを目指しています。 この論文では、1つの頂点は通常、異なる隣接頂点と相互作用するときに異なる側面を示し、それぞれ異なる埋め込みを所有するべきであると仮定する。 したがって、この問題に対処するための新しいNEモデルであるContext - Aware Network Embedding （ CANE ）を提示します。 CANEは、相互注意メカニズムを備えた頂点の文脈認識埋め込みを学習し、頂点間の意味関係をより正確にモデル化することが期待されています。 実験では、私たちのモデルを3つの現実のデータセット上の既存のNEモデルと比較します。 実験結果は、リンク予測における最先端の方法と頂点分類における同等の性能よりも、CANEが大幅な改善を達成することを示しています。 ソースコードとデータセットは、から入手することができる<https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>。', 'zh': '网络嵌 (NE) 于网络析关键作用,以其能用高效之低维嵌向量为极也。 然今NE模要在学上下文无关嵌入,与他顶交互时忽不同角色。 本文中,我们假设一个顶点在与不同的邻交时常常显示不同的方面,并应该各有不同的嵌入。 是以上下文知网络嵌(CANE),此新NE之所以为也。 CANE学有相机之端上下文感知嵌入,望更精拟其语义。 实验之中,以吾模与三真数集上今NE较之。 实验结果表明,CANE于链路占候、端类皆有显善先进之法。 源代码、数集可取于<https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>。', 'hi': 'नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग (एनई) नेटवर्क विश्लेषण में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभा रहा है, कुशल कम-आयामी एम्बेडिंग वैक्टर के साथ शीर्षों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने की क्षमता के कारण। हालांकि, मौजूदा एनई मॉडल का उद्देश्य प्रत्येक शीर्ष के लिए एक निश्चित संदर्भ-मुक्त एम्बेडिंग सीखना और अन्य शीर्षों के साथ बातचीत करते समय विविध भूमिकाओं की उपेक्षा करना है। इस पेपर में, हम मानते हैं कि एक शीर्ष आमतौर पर विभिन्न पड़ोसी शीर्षों के साथ बातचीत करते समय विभिन्न पहलुओं को दिखाता है, और क्रमशः अलग-अलग एम्बेडिंग का मालिक होना चाहिए। इसलिए, हम इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग (CANE), एक उपन्यास NE मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। CANE पारस्परिक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ शीर्षों के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक एम्बेडिंग सीखता है और शीर्षों के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों को अधिक सटीक रूप से मॉडल करने की उम्मीद है। प्रयोगों में, हम तीन वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर मौजूदा एनई मॉडल के साथ अपने मॉडल की तुलना करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि CANE लिंक भविष्यवाणी और शीर्ष वर्गीकरण पर तुलनीय प्रदर्शन पर अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है। स्रोत कोड और डेटासेट <https://github.com/thunlp/CANE> से प्राप्त किए जा सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Сетевое встраивание (NE) играет решающую роль в сетевом анализе, благодаря своей способности представлять вершины с эффективными низкоразмерными векторами встраивания. Тем не менее, существующие модели NE направлены на изучение фиксированного контекстно-свободного встраивания для каждой вершины и пренебрегают различными ролями при взаимодействии с другими вершинами. В этой работе мы предполагаем, что одна вершина обычно показывает разные аспекты при взаимодействии с различными соседскими вершинами, и должны иметь различные вложения соответственно. Поэтому мы представляем Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), новую модель NE для решения этой проблемы. CANE изучает контекстно-зависимые вложения для вершин с механизмом взаимного внимания и, как ожидается, будет точнее моделировать семантические отношения между вершинами. В экспериментах мы сравниваем нашу модель с существующими моделями NE на трех реальных наборах данных. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что ТРОСТНИК достигает значительного улучшения по сравнению с современными методами предсказания связей и сопоставимой производительности по классификации вершин. Исходный код и наборы данных можно получить из<https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag neadú líonra (NE) in anailís líonra, mar gheall ar a chumas chun rinn a léiriú le veicteoirí leabaithe éifeachtúla ísealtoiseacha. Mar sin féin, tá sé mar aidhm ag samhlacha NE atá ann cheana féin leabú seasta saor ó chomhthéacs a fhoghlaim do gach rinn agus faillí a dhéanamh ar na róil éagsúla agus iad ag idirghníomhú le rinn eile. Sa pháipéar seo, glacaimid leis go léiríonn rinn amháin gnéithe éagsúla de ghnáth agus iad ag idirghníomhú le rinn comharsan éagsúla, agus gur cheart go mbeadh leabaithe éagsúla faoi seach i seilbh aige. Dá bhrí sin, cuirimid Neadú Líonra Feasach ar Chomhthéacs (CANE) i láthair, samhail nua NE chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo. Foghlaimíonn CANE leabaithe atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs le haghaidh rinn le meicníocht comhaird agus meastar go ndéanfaidh sé eiseamláiriú níos cruinne ar na caidrimh shéimeantacha idir rinn. I dturgnaimh, déanaimid ár samhail a chur i gcomparáid le samhlacha NE atá ann cheana ar thrí thacar sonraí den fhíorshaol. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil feabhas suntasach bainte amach ag CANE ná na modhanna úrscothacha maidir le tuar naisc agus feidhmíocht inchomparáide ar aicmiú rinn. Is féidir an cód foinse agus na tacair shonraí a fháil ó <https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση δικτύου (ΝΕ) διαδραματίζει κρίσιμο ρόλο στην ανάλυση δικτύων, λόγω της ικανότητάς της να αναπαριστά κορυφές με αποδοτικά διανυσματικά χαμηλής διάστασης ενσωμάτωσης. Ωστόσο, τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα έχουν ως στόχο να μάθουν μια σταθερή ενσωμάτωση χωρίς πλαίσιο για κάθε κορυφή και να παραμελούν τους διαφορετικούς ρόλους όταν αλληλεπιδρούν με άλλες κορυφές. Σε αυτή την εργασία, υποθέτουμε ότι μια κορυφή συνήθως εμφανίζει διαφορετικές πτυχές όταν αλληλεπιδρά με διαφορετικές γείτονες κορυφές, και θα πρέπει να έχει διαφορετικές ενσωματώσεις αντίστοιχα. Ως εκ τούτου, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του ζητήματος. Ο CANE μαθαίνει ενσωματώσεις για κορυφές με αμοιβαίο μηχανισμό προσοχής και αναμένεται να μοντελοποιήσει τις σημασιολογικές σχέσεις μεταξύ κορυφών με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια. Σε πειράματα, συγκρίνουμε το μοντέλο μας με υπάρχοντα μοντέλα ΒΔ σε τρία σύνολα πραγματικών δεδομένων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι ο CANE επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση από τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους όσον αφορά την πρόβλεψη συνδέσεων και συγκρίσιμη απόδοση στην ταξινόμηση κορυφών. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας και τα σύνολα δεδομένων μπορούν να ληφθούν από < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ არსებობს NE მოდელების მიხედვით, რომ ყველა პერტექსისთვის განსაკუთრებული კონტექსტის გადასწავლობა და განსხვავებული პროლისთვის გადასწავლობა, როდესაც სხვა პერტიკები ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ ერთი პერტექსტი საერთოდ განსხვავებული აპექტიკები ჩვენებს, როდესაც განსხვავებული საზოგადოებო პერტიკებით დაკავშირებულია, და უნდა განსხვავებული ინბექ ამიტომ, ჩვენ შევაჩვენეთ Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), პრომენტი NE მოდელი, რომელიც ამ პრობლემას გადაწყენება. CANE სწავლის კონტექსტური ცნობიერების კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური შესახებ, რომელიც ერთმანეთის აღმოჩენების მექანიზმის შესახებ და ექსპერიმენტებში, ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით არსებობს NE მოდელითან სამი რეალური მსოფლიო მონაცემენტებზე. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ CANE მიიღებს მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთესება, ვიდრე სახელსაწარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების და შემდგენელოვანი გაუკეთე გამოსახულების კოდი და მონაცემების შესაძლებელია <დან მიღება https://github.com/thunlp/CANE - ეა.', 'hu': 'A hálózati beágyazás (NE) kritikus szerepet játszik a hálózati elemzésben, mivel képes a csúcsokat hatékony, alacsony dimenziós beágyazási vektorokkal képviselni. A meglévő NE modellek azonban arra törekszenek, hogy minden csúcsra rögzített kontextusmentes beágyazást tanuljanak, és figyelmen kívül hagyják a különböző szerepeket más csúcsokkal való interakció során. Ebben a tanulmányban feltételezzük, hogy az egyik csúcs általában különböző aspektusokat mutat a különböző szomszédos csúcsokkal való interakcióban, és különböző beágyazásokkal kell rendelkeznie. Ezért bemutatjuk a kontextustudatos hálózati beágyazás (CANE), egy új NE modellt, amely ennek a problémának a kezelésére szolgál. A CANE kölcsönös figyelemmel kíséri a csúcsok kontextustudatos beágyazását, és várhatóan pontosabban modellezi a csúcsok közötti szemantikai kapcsolatokat. Kísérletekben három valós adathalmazon hasonlítjuk össze modellünket a meglévő NE modellekkel. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a CANE jelentős javulást ér el a legkorszerűbb módszereknél a kapcsolat előrejelzésében és a csúcsosztályozás összehasonlítható teljesítményében. A forráskód és az adatkészletek beszerezhetők < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'kk': 'Желі ендіру (NE) желі анализиясында критикалық роль орындалады. Бұл желінің ефективті төмен өлшемді ендіру векторларының төменгі шектерін көрсету мүмкіндігі үшін. Бірақ, бар NE үлгілері әрбір вертикалық үшін тұрақты контексті бос ендіру үшін үйреніп, басқа төменгілерімен әртүрлі рольдерді шектеу үшін. Бұл қағазда бір тігінен әдетте айырмашылық бөлшектерді көрсетеді, бірақ айырмашылық бөлшектерді әртүрлі түрлерді көрсетеді. Сондықтан біз Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін NET үлгісін таңдаймыз. CANE біріктіру механизмімен біріктіру механизмі үшін контексті түсініктерді біледі және біріктіру механизмі арасындағы семантикалық қатынастарды түсініктеу үшін күтпейді. Тәжірибелерде, үш әлемді деректер қорларында біз моделімізді NE үлгілерімен салыстырамыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері КАН тік классификациясындағы сілтемелерді бағыттау және салыстырмалы жылдамдықтардың күй- жай әдістерінен артық жақсартылығын көрсетеді Бастапқы код мен деректер жиындары <дегеннен алуға болады https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'it': "Il Network Embedding (NE) svolge un ruolo fondamentale nell'analisi della rete, grazie alla sua capacità di rappresentare vertici con efficienti vettori di embedding a bassa dimensione. Tuttavia, i modelli NE esistenti mirano a imparare un incorporamento fisso senza contesto per ogni vertice e trascurare i diversi ruoli quando interagiscono con altri vertici. In questo articolo, assumiamo che un vertice di solito mostra aspetti diversi quando interagisce con vertici vicini diversi, e dovrebbe possedere incorporazioni diverse rispettivamente. Pertanto, presentiamo Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), un nuovo modello NE per affrontare questo problema. CANE apprende incorporazioni contestuali per vertici con meccanismo di attenzione reciproca e dovrebbe modellare le relazioni semantiche tra vertici in modo più preciso. In esperimenti, confrontiamo il nostro modello con i modelli NE esistenti su tre set di dati reali. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che CANE ottiene un miglioramento significativo rispetto ai metodi all'avanguardia sulla previsione dei collegamenti e prestazioni comparabili sulla classificazione dei vertici. Il codice sorgente e i set di dati possono essere ottenuti da < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.", 'mk': 'Network embedding (NE) is playing a critical role in network analysis, due to its ability to represent vertices with efficient low-dimensional embedding vectors.  Сепак, постоечките НЕ модели имаат за цел да научат фиксно вградување без контекст за секој вертикал и да ги заборават различните улоги кога влијаат на други вертикали. Во овој весник, претпоставуваме дека еден вертикал обично покажува различни аспекти кога интеракционира со различни соседински вертикали, и треба да поседува различни вградувања односно. Затоа, претставуваме контекстно свесно вградување на мрежата (CANE), нов модел на НЕ за решавање на ова прашање. CANE научи контекстно свесни вградувања за врвовите со механизам на взаемно внимание и се очекува да ги моделира семантичните односи помеѓу врвовите попрецизно. Во експериментите, го споредуваме нашиот модел со постојните НЕ модели на три реални податоци. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека КАНЕ постигнува значително подобрување од најсовремените методи за предвидување на врските и споредлива перформанса на класификацијата на врвот. Изворниот код и датотеките може да се добијат од < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'lt': 'Tinklo įtraukimas (NE) atlieka svarbų vaidmenį analizuojant tinklą, nes jis gali atstovauti vertikaliams su veiksmingais mažo matmens įtraukimo vektoriais. Tačiau esamų NE modelių tikslas – sužinoti kiekvieno stuburo fiksuotą integraciją be konteksto ir nepaisyti įvairių vaidmenų sąveikaujant su kitais stuburais. Šiame dokumente darome prielaidą, kad vienas stuburas paprastai rodo skirtingus aspektus, kai sąveikaujama su skirtingais kaimyniniais stuburais, ir turėtų turėti atitinkamai skirtingas sudedamąsias dalis. Todėl mes pristatysime „Context-Aware Network Embedding“ (CANE), naują NE model į šiam klausimui spręsti. CANE learns context-aware embeddings for vertices with mutual attention mechanism and is expected to model the semantic relationships between vertices more precisely.  Eksperimentuose palyginame savo model į su esamais NE modeliais trijuose realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkiniuose. Experimental results show that CANE achieves significant improvement than state-of-the-art methods on link prediction and comparable performance on vertex classification.  Šaltinis kodas ir duomenų rinkiniai gali būti gauti iš < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ml': 'നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന (NE) നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ പങ്കാളി കളിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വെര്\u200dട്ടിസ്സ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള NE മോഡലുകള്\u200d എല്ലാ വെര്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റോക്സിനും ഒരു സ്ഥിരമായ കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഫ്രീഡ് എംബിങ്ങ് പഠി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു വെര്\u200dട്ട്രെക്സ് സാധാരണയായി വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി പരസ്പരം ചെയ്യുമ്പ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാനുള്ള നോവല്\u200d NE മോഡലിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. സെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് അറിയുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഉള്ളിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രവേശങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. തമ്മിലുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ മെന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള NE മോഡലുകളുമായി നാം നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ മൂന്ന് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു വെര്\u200dട്ടെക്സ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷഷനില്\u200d ലിങ്ക് പ്രവചനവും തുല്യമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സാധിക്കുന്നത ഉറവിട കോഡും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും ലഭ്യമല്ല < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ms': 'Penampilan rangkaian (NE) bermain peran kritik dalam analisis rangkaian, kerana kemampuannya untuk mewakili puncak dengan vektor penyampilan dimensi rendah efisien. Namun, model NE yang wujud bermaksud untuk belajar penyambungan bebas konteks tetap untuk setiap puncak dan mengabaikan peranan berbeza bila berinteraksi dengan puncak lain. Dalam kertas ini, kita menganggap bahawa satu puncak biasanya menunjukkan aspek yang berbeza apabila berinteraksi dengan puncak tetangga yang berbeza, dan sepatutnya mempunyai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai. Therefore, we present Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), a novel NE model to address this issue.  CANE belajar penerbangan yang sedar-konteks untuk puncak dengan mekanisme perhatian bersama dan dijangka untuk model hubungan semantik antara puncak dengan lebih tepat. Dalam eksperimen, kita membandingkan model kita dengan model NE yang ada pada tiga set data dunia nyata. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa CANE mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan daripada kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art pada ramalan pautan dan prestasi yang boleh dibandingkan pada klasifikasi punca. Kod sumber dan set data boleh dicapai dari < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tan-netwerk (NE) qed taqdi rwol kritiku fl-analiżi tan-netwerk, minħabba l-kapaċità tagħha li tirrappreżenta vertiċijiet b’vetturi effiċjenti ta’ inkorporazzjoni b’dimensjoni baxxa. Madankollu, il-mudelli NE eżistenti għandhom l-għan li jitgħallmu inkorporazzjoni fissa mingħajr kuntest għal kull vertex u jinjoraw ir-rwoli varji meta jinteraġixxu ma’ vertiċijiet oħra. F’din il-karta, aħna nassumu li vertiċ wieħed normalment juri aspetti differenti meta jinteraġixxi ma’ vertiċijiet differenti tal-ġirien, u għandu jkollu inkorporazzjonijiet differenti rispettivament. Għalhekk, qed nippreżentaw l-Inkorporazzjoni tan-Netwerk ta’ Kuntest Konxju (CANE), mudell ġdid ta’ NE biex tiġi indirizzata din il-kwistjoni. CANE jitgħallem inkorporazzjonijiet konxji mill-kuntest għal vertiċijiet b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni reċiproka u huwa mistenni li jimmudella r-relazzjonijiet semantiċi bejn vertiċijiet b’mod aktar preċiż. Fl-esperimenti, aħna nqabblu l-mudell tagħna ma’ mudelli NE eżistenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali. Experimental results show that CANE achieves significant improvement than state-of-the-art methods on link prediction and comparable performance on vertex classification.  The source code and datasets can be obtained from < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'mn': 'Холбооны сүлжээний шинжилгээнд хамгийн чухал үүрэг тоглож байна. Үүний үр дүнтэй бага хэмжээст орлуулах векторуудыг илэрхийлж чадах боломжтой. Гэхдээ НЭ загварууд нь тодорхой байдлыг суралцаж бусад хэсгүүдтэй харилцах үед олон төрлийн дүр зураг шийдэх зорилго юм. Энэ цаасан дээр нэг хэсэг нь өөр хөрш өнцгүүдтэй харилцах үед өөр өнцгүүдийг харуулдаг гэж бодож байна. Тиймээс бид Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), энэ асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд NET загвар өгдөг. КАНЭ хоорондын анхаарлын механизм дээрх хэмжээний хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын семантик харилцааны загварыг суралцаж байна. Эдгээр туршилтуудын хувьд бид өөрсдийн загварыг НЭ загвартай 3 бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн санд харьцуулдаг. Түүний туршилтын үр дүнд КАНЭ нь хэмжээний хуваалтыг холбох болон хэмжээний хуваалтыг харьцуулахаас илүү чухал сайжруулалт гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. эх үүсвэрийн код болон өгөгдлийн сангууд < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'pl': 'Sieć osadzenia (NE) odgrywa kluczową rolę w analizie sieci, ze względu na swoją zdolność do reprezentowania wierzchołków za pomocą efektywnych niskowymiarowych wektorów osadzenia. Jednak istniejące modele NE mają na celu nauczenie się stałego bezkontekstowego osadzenia dla każdego wierzchołka i zaniedbanie różnych ról podczas interakcji z innymi wierzchołkami. W niniejszym artykule zakładamy, że jeden wierzchołek zazwyczaj pokazuje różne aspekty podczas interakcji z różnymi wierzchołkami sąsiadującymi i powinien posiadać odpowiednio różne osadzenia. W związku z tym prezentujemy Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), nowy model NE, aby rozwiązać ten problem. CANE uczy się kontekstowych osadzeń wierzchołków z mechanizmem wzajemnej uwagi i oczekuje się dokładniejszego modelowania relacji semantycznych między wierzchołkami. W eksperymentach porównujemy nasz model z istniejącymi modelami NE na trzech rzeczywistych zbiorach danych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że CANE osiąga znaczącą poprawę niż najnowocześniejsze metody w zakresie predykcji połączeń i porównywalną wydajność klasyfikacji wierzchołków. Kod źródłowy i zbiory danych można uzyskać z < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'no': 'Innebygging av nettverk (NE) spelar ein kritisk rolle i nettverksanalysen, på grunn av at det kan representera hjørne med effektiv lådimensjonal innbygging av vektorar. Det eksisterande NE-modeller må imidlertid lære ein fast kontekstfri innbygging for kvar hjørne og negre dei ulike rollane når du samarbeider med andre hjørne. I denne papiret antar vi at ein hjørne oftast viser ulike aspektar når det interakserer med ulike nabothjørne, og bør eiga ulike innbygging. Derfor presenterer vi kontekst-Aware Network Integration (CANE), ein novel NE-modell for å handtera dette problemet. Constellation name (optional) I eksperimenter sammenliknar vi modellen vårt med eksisterande NE-modeller på tre verkelege datasett. Eksperimentale resultat viser at CANE gjer signifikante forbedringar enn kunstmetodar for tilstanden til lenkjeforhåndsvising og sammenlignbare utvikling på toppunktklassifikasjon. Kjeldekode og dataset kan hentast frå < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'ro': 'Încorporarea rețelei (NE) joacă un rol esențial în analiza rețelei, datorită capacității sale de a reprezenta vârfuri cu vectori eficienți de încorporare de dimensiuni scăzute. Cu toate acestea, modelele NE existente urmăresc să învețe o încorporare fixă fără context pentru fiecare vârf și să neglijeze rolurile diverse atunci când interacționează cu alte vârfuri. În această lucrare, presupunem că un vârf prezintă, de obicei, aspecte diferite atunci când interacționează cu diferite vârfuri vecine, și ar trebui să dețină diferite încorporări, respectiv. Prin urmare, prezentăm Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), un nou model NE pentru a aborda această problemă. CANE învață încorporări conștiente de context pentru vârfuri cu mecanism de atenție reciprocă și este de așteptat să modeleze relațiile semantice dintre vârfuri mai precis. În experimente, comparăm modelul nostru cu modelele NE existente pe trei seturi de date din lumea reală. Rezultatele experimentale arată că CANE obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de metodele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește predicția legăturilor și performanțele comparabile în ceea ce privește clasificarea vertexului. Codul sursă și seturile de date pot fi obținute de la < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'sr': 'Uključenje mreže (NE) igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi mreže, zbog sposobnosti predstavljanja vertiksa sa efikasnim niskim dimenzionalnim ugrađenim vektorima. Međutim, postojeći NE modeli ciljaju naučiti fizički kontekstski uključenje za svaki vrh i zanemariti različite uloge kada se interakcija sa drugim vrh. U ovom papiru pretpostavljamo da jedan vrh obično pokazuje različite aspekte kada se interakcija sa različitim vrhovima susjeda, i treba da poseduje različite integracije. Stoga predstavljamo integraciju mreže Konteksta-Aware (CANE), nov model NE za rješavanje ovog pitanja. CANE nauči integraciju konteksta svjesnog za vrhove sa međusobnim mehanizam pažnje i očekuje se da će modelirati semantičke veze između vrhova preciznije. U eksperimentima uspoređujemo naš model sa postojećim NE modelima na tri serije podataka na stvarnom svijetu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CANE postiže značajno poboljšanje od metoda stanja umjetnosti o predviđanju povezanja i usporednom provedbi na klasifikaciji verteksa. Izvorni kod i sete podataka mogu dobiti od < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'si': 'Name නමුත්, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් NE මොඩේල් අදහස් කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක්ම නිදහස් සම්බන්ධයක්ම ඉගෙන ගන්න සහ අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිස මේ පැත්තේ අපි හිතන්නේ එක පැත්තක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් වෙනස් පැත්තක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් පැත්තක් පෙන්වන්න, වෙනස් අ ඉතින්, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ විසින් ජාලය සම්බන්ධය (CANE) කිරීම් නිර්මාණ CANE ඉගෙන ඉන්නවා සම්බන්ධතාවක් අවධානය සඳහා පැත්තක් අවධානය සඳහා පැත්තක් අවධානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා  පරීක්ෂණාවල්, අපි අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක තියෙන්නේ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ NE මොඩල් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ CANE විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණ < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'so': 'Shabakadda ku dhex jirta (NE) waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka shabakadda, sababtoo ah awooddiisa uu ku represento hiwaayadaha ay ku leedahay wadooyin faa’iido ah oo hoos-dimensional. Si kastaba ha ahaatee noocyada NE ee joogta waxay ku talo galaan in ay bartaan noocyo cayiman oo xor la’aan ah islamarkaasna ay ka tagtaan qaybaha kala duduwan marka ay la xiriiraan meelaha kale. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka malaynaynaa in mid caadi ah uu muujiyo dhinacyo kala duduwan marka la xiriiro goobaha kale ee deriska ah, waxaana habboon inay si kala duwan u lahaadaan hiwaayado kala duduwan. Sidaa darteed waxaynu keenaynaa xariirka internetka ee aqoonta (CANE), qaab sawir ah NE oo ay arrintan ka sheekeystaan. CANE wuxuu baranayaa qalabka hoose-garashada, waxayna leedahay meymisyo iskuul ah, waxaana la rajaynayaa inuu sameyno xiriirka isbedelka ee isbedelka. Imtixaanka, waxaynu sameynaa modeleena ee ku jira NE-ka sameynaa saddex sawir ee runta ah ee adduunka. Experimental results show that CANE achieves significant improvement than state-of-the-art methods on link prediction and comparable performance on vertex classification.  Lacagta warbixinta iyo sawirada https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ta': 'Network embedding (NE) is playing a critical role in network analysis, due to its ability to represent vertices with efficient low-dimensional embedding vectors.  இருக்கும் NE மாதிரிகள் ஒவ்வொரு முனையத்திற்கும் ஒரு நிலையான சூழல் காலி உள்ளிடுதலை கற்று மற்றும் மற்ற செங்குத்துக்களுடன் இணை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் நினைக்கிறோம் ஒரு செங்குத்து வழக்கமாக வேறு பகுதிகளை காண்பிக்கும் போது வேறு வித்தியாசமான விஷயங் ஆகையால், நாம் சூழல் அறிந்த பிணையத்தின் உட்பொதித்தலை (CANE), இந்த பிரச்சனையை விளக்க ஒரு புதிய NE மாதிரி CANE சூழல் உணர்ந்து கொள்ளும் செங்குத்துக்களுக்கான சூழல் உணர்ந்து கொள்ளும் பொருள் கவனம் முறைமையுடன் கற்றுக் கொள்கிறது மற மூன்று உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் நிகழ்ந்த NE மாதிரிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது CANE முன்னோட்டத்திற்கு மேற்பட்ட முறைமைகளை விட முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றம் பெறுகிறது என்பத மூல குறியீடு மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்புகள் < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'sv': 'Nätverksinbäddning (NE) spelar en avgörande roll i nätverksanalys, på grund av dess förmåga att representera hörn med effektiva lågdimensionella inbäddningsvektorer. Dock syftar befintliga NE-modeller till att lära sig en fast kontextfri inbäddning för varje hörn och försumma de olika rollerna när de interagerar med andra hörn. I den här uppsatsen utgår vi från att ett hörn vanligtvis visar olika aspekter när de interagerar med olika grannhörn, och bör äga olika inbäddningar respektive. Därför presenterar vi Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), en ny NE-modell för att hantera detta problem. CANE lär sig kontextmedvetna inbäddningar för hörn med ömsesidig uppmärksamhet mekanism och förväntas modellera semantiska relationer mellan hörn mer exakt. I experiment jämför vi vår modell med befintliga NE-modeller på tre verkliga datauppsättningar. Experimentella resultat visar att CANE uppnår signifikant förbättring än state-of-the-art metoder på länkprognose och jämförbar prestanda på vertexklassificering. Källkoden och datauppsättningarna kan hämtas från < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ur': 'نیٹ ورک ایمبڈینگ (NE) نیٹ ورک تحلیل میں ایک ضروری رول کھیل رہا ہے، اس کی قابلیت کے سبب کہ ورٹیس کو عملکرد کم-اندازے ایمبڈینگ ویکتروں کے ساتھ دکھائے۔ However, existing NE models aim to learn a fixed context-free embedding for each vertex and neglect the various roles when interacting with other vertices. اس کاغذ میں، ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ ایک ٹیٹکس معمولاً مختلف الگوں کو دکھاتا ہے جب مختلف میدان کے سروں سے تعامل کرتا ہے، اور مختلف انڈینگ کے مالک ہیں۔ سو ہم نے Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE) کو اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں حل کرنے کے لئے ایک نئی مدل پیش کیا۔ CANE ایک دوسرے مشاہدہ مکانیسم کے ساتھ موٹیس کے لئے کنٹیکس جاننے والی ایمبڈینگ سکھاتا ہے اور اس کا انتظار ہے کہ کوٹیس کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ مضبوط کرے۔ آزمائش میں، ہم اپنے مدل کو تین حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر موجود NE مدل سے مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ CANE لینک کی پیش بینی اور سرخ کی کلاسیفوں پر قابل مقابلہ کے لحاظ سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے. سورس کوڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ <سے مل سکتے ہیں https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'uz': "Name Lekin, mavjud NE modellari, har bir vertikalar uchun qoʻllanmalar boʻlmaydi va boshqa vertikalar bilan bir xil oʻrnatishda har xil oʻrnini tugatadi. Bu hujjatda biz o'ylaymiz, bir verteks oddiy narsalarni ko'rsatadi va boshqa murakkablar bilan boshqa boshqa narsalar bilan boshqarishda va har xil bo'lgan boshqa narsalarni o'zgartirish kerak. Shunday qilib, biz bu muammolani boshqarish uchun tarmoq muvaffaqiyatli (CANE), novel NE modeli. Name Imzolar davomida biz modelimizni uchta haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tizimlaridagi NE modellariga kamaytamiz. Name Manba kodi va maʼlumot bazasini <dan olib tashlab boʻladi https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.", 'vi': 'Việc nhúng lưới (N) đang đóng vai trò quan trọng trong phân tích mạng vì khả năng đại diện các đỉnh cùng với các sinh vật có giá trị thấp không gian. Tuy nhiên, các mô- đun đông bắc đã tồn tại nhằm học được sự nhúng gọn cố định tự do ngữ cảnh cho mỗi đỉnh và bỏ qua các vai khác nhau khi giao tiếp với các đỉnh cao khác nhau. Trong bài báo này, chúng ta giả sử rằng một mặt phẳng thường hiển thị các khía cạnh khác nhau khi giao tiếp với các đỉnh của hàng xóm khác nhau, và phải sở hữu sự nhúng chàm. Cho nên, chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu Khung lưới Giải Cứu, một mô hình E mới để giải quyết vấn đề này. CANE học ngữ cảnh sự gắn kết với các đỉnh núi với một cơ chế tập trung lẫn nhau và dự định sẽ mô tả chi tiết các mối quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa. Trong các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi so sánh mô hình của chúng tôi với các mô hình E tồn tại Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng ANNA đạt đến một sự tiến bộ đáng kể hơn phương pháp tiên tiến về dự đoán liên kết và hiệu suất tương đối với mức độ đỉnh. Các bộ mã nguồn và các tập tin có thể lấy từ https://github.com/thunlp/CANE -̀.', 'bg': 'Мрежовото вграждане (НЕ) играе критична роля в мрежовия анализ, поради способността си да представя върхове с ефективни нискоизмерни вграждащи вектори. Съществуващите модели обаче имат за цел да научат фиксирано вграждане без контекст за всеки връх и да пренебрегват различните роли при взаимодействие с други върхове. В тази статия приемаме, че един връх обикновено показва различни аспекти при взаимодействие с различни съседни върхове и трябва да притежава различни вграждания съответно. Ето защо представяме вграждането на мрежата, осъзнаващо контекста (CANE), нов модел за справяне с този проблем. Научава вграждания за върхове с механизъм на взаимно внимание, съобразени с контекста, и се очаква да моделира семантичните взаимоотношения между върховете по-точно. В експериментите сравняваме нашия модел със съществуващите модели на НЕ на три реални набора от данни. Експерименталните резултати показват, че постига значително подобрение в сравнение с най-съвременните методи за прогнозиране на връзките и сравними показатели при класификацията на върховете. Изходният код и наборите от данни могат да бъдат получени от < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'nl': 'Netwerk embedding (NE) speelt een cruciale rol in netwerkanalyse, vanwege het vermogen om hoekpunten met efficiënte laagdimensionale embedding vectoren weer te geven. Bestaande NE-modellen zijn echter gericht op het leren van een vaste contextvrije inbedding voor elke hoekpunt en verwaarlozen de verschillende rollen bij interactie met andere hoekpunten. In dit artikel gaan we ervan uit dat één hoekpunt meestal verschillende aspecten vertoont bij interactie met verschillende hoekpunten van de buurman, en respectievelijk verschillende embeddings moet bezitten. Daarom presenteren we Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), een nieuw NE-model om dit probleem aan te pakken. CANE leert contextbewuste inbeddingen voor hoekpunten met wederzijds aandachtsmechanisme en wordt verwacht de semantische relaties tussen hoekpunten nauwkeuriger te modelleren. In experimenten vergelijken we ons model met bestaande NE modellen op drie real-world datasets. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat CANE significante verbeteringen bereikt dan state-of-the-art methoden op het gebied van linkvoorspelling en vergelijkbare prestaties op het gebied van hoekclassificatie. De broncode en datasets zijn te verkrijgen bij < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'da': 'Netværksindlejring (NE) spiller en afgørende rolle i netværksanalyse på grund af dens evne til at repræsentere højdepunkter med effektive lavdimensionelle indlejringsvektorer. Eksisterende NE modeller har imidlertid til formål at lære en fast kontekstfri indlejring for hver eneste top og forsømme de forskellige roller, når de interagerer med andre top. I dette arbejde antager vi, at et vertex normalt viser forskellige aspekter, når de interagerer med forskellige nabo-verter, og bør eje forskellige indlejringer henholdsvis. Derfor præsenterer vi Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), en ny NE-model til at løse dette problem. CANE lærer kontekstbevidste indlejringer for højdepunkter med gensidig opmærksomhedsmekanisme og forventes at modellere de semantiske relationer mellem højdepunkter mere præcist. I eksperimenter sammenligner vi vores model med eksisterende NE modeller på tre virkelige datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at CANE opnår betydelige forbedringer end state-of-the-art metoder på linkforudsigelse og sammenlignelig ydeevne på toppeklassificering. Kildekoden og datasættet kan hentes fra < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'hr': 'Uključenje mreže (NE) igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi mreže zbog sposobnosti predstavljanja vrhova s učinkovitim niskim dimenzionalnim ugrađenim vektorima. Međutim, postojeći NE modeli ciljaju naučiti određenu kontekstsku integraciju za svaki vrh i zanemariti različite uloge kada se interakcija s drugim vrh. U ovom papiru pretpostavljamo da jedan vrh obično pokazuje različite aspekte kada se interakcija s različitim vrhovima susjeda, i trebalo bi posjedovati različite integracije. Stoga predstavljamo uključenje mreže za kontekst-Aware (CANE), nov model NE za rješavanje ovog pitanja. CANE uči ugrađenje konteksta svjesnog za vrhove s međusobnim mehanizam pažnje i očekuje se da će modelirati semantičke veze između vrhova preciznije. U eksperimentima uspoređujemo naš model sa postojećim NE modelima na tri podataka stvarnog svijeta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CANE postigne značajno poboljšanje od metoda stanja umjetnosti u pogledu predviđanja veza i usporednog učinka na klasifikaciji vrhunca. Izvorni kod i podaci mogu dobiti iz < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'de': 'Network Embedding (NE) spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in der Netzwerkanalyse, da es Eckpunkte mit effizienten niederdimensionalen Einbettungsvektoren darstellen kann. Bestehende NE-Modelle zielen jedoch darauf ab, eine feste kontextfreie Einbettung für jeden Scheitelpunkt zu erlernen und die verschiedenen Rollen bei der Interaktion mit anderen Scheitelpunkten zu vernachlässigen. In dieser Arbeit gehen wir davon aus, dass ein Scheitelpunkt in der Regel unterschiedliche Aspekte bei der Interaktion mit verschiedenen Nachbarspitzen aufweist und jeweils unterschiedliche Einbettungen besitzen sollte. Daher präsentieren wir Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), ein neuartiges NE-Modell, um dieses Problem zu lösen. CANE lernt kontextbewusste Einbettungen für Vertices mit gegenseitigem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus und soll die semantischen Beziehungen zwischen Vertices genauer modellieren. In Experimenten vergleichen wir unser Modell mit bestehenden NE-Modellen auf drei realen Datensätzen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass CANE signifikante Verbesserungen bei der Linkprädiktion und vergleichbaren Leistungen bei der Vertex-Klassifizierung erzielt als moderne Methoden. Der Quellcode und die Datensätze sind abrufbar unter < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'id': 'Penampilan jaringan (NE) bermain peran kritis dalam analisis jaringan, karena kemampuannya untuk mewakili puncak dengan vektor penyampilan rendah dimensi efisien. Namun, model NE yang ada bertujuan untuk belajar penerbangan tanpa konteks tetap untuk setiap puncak dan mengabaikan peran yang berbeda ketika berinteraksi dengan puncak lain. In this paper, we assume that one vertex usually shows different aspects when interacting with different neighbor vertices, and should own different embeddings respectively.  Oleh karena itu, kami mempersembahkan Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), model NE novel untuk mengatasi masalah ini. CANE belajar penerbangan konteks-sadar untuk puncak dengan mekanisme perhatian bersama dan diharapkan untuk model hubungan semantis antara puncak lebih tepat. In experiments, we compare our model with existing NE models on three real-world datasets.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa CANE mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dari metode state-of-the-art pada prediksi hubungan dan prestasi yang dibandingkan pada klasifikasi puncak. Kode sumber dan set data dapat diperoleh dari < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ko': '네트워크 삽입(NE)은 네트워크 분석에서 관건적인 역할을 발휘한다. 왜냐하면 효과적인 저차원 삽입 벡터로 정점을 나타낼 수 있기 때문이다.그러나 기존의 NE모델은 각 정점마다 고정된 상하문 삽입을 배우기 위한 것이고 다른 정점과 상호작용할 때의 서로 다른 역할을 무시했다.본고에서 우리는 하나의 정점이 서로 다른 인접한 정점과 상호작용할 때 일반적으로 서로 다른 측면을 나타내고 서로 다른 삽입을 가져야 한다고 가정한다.따라서 우리는 상하문 감지 네트워크 삽입(CANE), 새로운 NE 모델을 제시하여 이 문제를 해결했다.CANE는 상호 주의 메커니즘을 통해 정점의 상하문 감지를 학습하고 정점 간의 의미 관계를 더욱 정확하게 모델링할 수 있을 것으로 보인다.실험에서 우리는 세 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델을 기존의 NE모델과 비교했다.실험 결과에 따르면 CANE는 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 링크 예측과 정점 분류에 현저한 개선을 보였다.소스 코드와 데이터 세트는 <https://github.com/thunlp/CANE>.', 'sw': 'Mtandao unaoingia (NE) unacheza jukumu muhimu katika uchambuzi wa mtandao, kwa sababu ya uwezo wake wa kuwakilisha vifaa vyenye vectors wenye kiwango cha chini. Hata hivyo, mifano ya NE inayopo sasa inakusudia kujifunza mazingira yenye msingi huru kwa kila mstari na kupuuza jukumu tofauti ambapo hujadiliana na upande mwingine. Katika karatasi hii, tunadhani kuwa upande mmoja mara nyingi unaonyesha mambo tofauti pale unapohusiana na maeneo mbalimbali ya jirani, na inapaswa kuwa na maeneo tofauti. Therefore, we present Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), a novel NE model to address this issue.  CANE inajifunza mazingira yanayofahamika kwa maeneo yanayohusiana na mfumo wa mawasiliano na inatarajiwa kuonyesha mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya maeneo yanayofanana zaidi. Katika majaribio, tunalinganisha mifano yetu na mifano ya NE iliyopo kwenye seti tatu za takwimu halisi za dunia. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba CANE inafanikiwa kuboresha kiwango kikubwa zaidi ya mbinu za hali ya sanaa juu ya utabiri wa kiungo na utendaji uliofanana na usambazaji uliofanana katika darasa la kasi. Kodi na seti za taarifa zinaweza kupatikana kutoka < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'fa': 'وارد کردن شبکه (NE) یک نقش مهمتری در تحلیل شبکه بازی می\u200cکند، به دلیل توانایی آن برای نمایش کوچک\u200cها با ویکتورهای وارد کردن کم بعدی موثر است. با این حال، مدل\u200cهای نو موجود دارند هدف یاد می\u200cگیرند که در حالی که در ارتباط با گوشه\u200cهای دیگر، نقش\u200cهای مختلف را فراموش می\u200cکنند، یک محیط بی\u200cپایه\u200cای ثابت یاد بگیرند. در این کاغذ، ما فرض می کنیم که یک کوچک معمولاً در حال تعامل با کوچک های متفاوتی با همسایه مختلف به عنوان نقطه های متفاوتی نشان می دهد، و باید به عنوان تعامل متفاوتی داشته باشد. بنابراین، ما شبکه آگاهی Context-Aware (CANE) را نشان می دهیم، یک مدل نویس NE برای حل این مسئله. CANE رابطه\u200cهای سیمانی بین گوشه\u200cها را دقیقاً مدل می\u200cکند. در آزمایشات، ما مدل خود را با مدل های نو موجود در سه مجموعه داده های جهانی واقعی مقایسه می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که CANE بهترین زیادی از روش\u200cهای موقعیت هنری در پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط و عملکرد قابل مقایسه در گروهی بالا می\u200cرسد. کد منبع و مجموعه داده\u200cها از < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE .', 'tr': 'Ağ analizinde çukurları etkinleştirmek üçin birçok önemli rol oynuyor. Ýöne, bar NE nusgalary her vertek üçin sabit bir konteks boş integrasyny öwrenmek we beýleki görkezilişi bilen üýtgetmek üçin amaçlaýar. Bu kagyzda, bir depek adatça farklı görnüşler bilen meňzeş eşikler bolup görünýär diýip pikir edip bilýäris we munuň üýtgeşikleri bolmaly diýip pikir edýäris. Şonuň üçin biz Kontekst-Aware Network Buýruky (CANE), bu meseleyi çözmek üçin bir NET nusgasyny görkezip. CANE mutual üns meýdançasynda çöplükler üçin context-aware içeriklerini öwredýär we semantik baglaýyşyny çöplükler arasynda has dogry derejesi üçin örenýär. Deneylerde modelimizi bar üç dünýäde bir nusga bilen karşılaştyrýarys. Durmançylyk netijesi CANE sürekli çarpyşdyrma we çykyş klasifikasynda gurnalan eserlerniň durumyndan has gowulygyny çykarýar. %s senedi alyp biler https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'af': "Name Alhoewel, bestaande ne modele doel om 'n vaste konteksfree inbêding te leer vir elke vertex en verwerp die verskeie roles wanneer interaksie met ander vertiks. In hierdie papier, ons aanvaar dat een vertex gewoonlik verskillende aspekte vertoon wanneer interaksie met verskillende naby vertikale, en moet verskillende inbêdinge respektief eie. Daarom, ons voorsien Context-Aware Netwerk Inbêding (CANE),  'n novel NE model om hierdie probleem te adres. CANE leer konteks-bewus inbêdings vir vertices met gemeenskaplike aandag mekanisme en is verwag om die semantiese verhouding te model tussen vertices meer presies. In eksperimente vergelyk ons ons model met bestaande ne modele op drie regte wêreld datastelle. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat CANE betekende verbetering bereik as staat-van-kuns-metodes op skakel voorskou en vergelykbare prestasie op vertekklasifikasie. Die bronkode en datastelle kan ontvang word van < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >", 'sq': 'Përfshirja e rrjetit (NE) po luan një rol kritik në analizën e rrjetit, për shkak të aftësisë së saj për të përfaqësuar vertiket me vektorë të efektshëm të integrimit me dimensione të ulët. Megjithatë, modelet ekzistuese të NE synojnë të mësojnë një përfshirje fikse pa kontekst për çdo pikë dhe të harrojnë rolin e ndryshëm kur ndërveprojnë me pikë të tjera. Në këtë letër, ne supozojmë se një vrull zakonisht tregon aspekte të ndryshme kur ndërvepron me vrulla të ndryshme fqinjësh dhe duhet të zotërojë përkatësisht përfshirje të ndryshme. Prandaj, ne paraqesim Kontekst-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), një model i ri NE për të trajtuar këtë çështje. CANE mëson përfshirje të ndërgjegjshme në kontekst për majat me mekanizëm të vëmendjes së ndërsjelltë dhe pritet të modelojë marrëdhëniet semantike midis majave më saktësisht. Në eksperimente, ne krahasojmë modelin tonë me modelet ekzistuese të NE në tre grupe të dhënash të botës reale. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se CANE arrin përmirësim të rëndësishëm se metodat më të larta në lidhje me parashikimin e lidhjes dhe performancën e krahasueshme në klasifikimin e verteksit. Kodi burimi dhe grupet e të dhënave mund të merren nga < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'am': "መረብ (NE) በመጠቀም አካባቢ የዝግጅት ነጥብ አዋቂዎችን ማሳየት በመቻል ምክንያት የመስመር አካባቢ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ NE ዓይነቶች ከሌሎች ክፍሎች ጋር በመቀላቀል የተለያዩትን የሥርዓት ክፍል ነጻ ማድረግ ይችላሉ፡፡ In this paper, we assume that one vertex usually shows different aspects when interacting with different neighbor vertices, and should own different embeddings respectively.  ስለዚህ የውይይት መረብ አቀማመጥ (CANE)፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመጠየቅ የመረጃ የNE model እናቀርባለን፡፡ CANE የግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለመማር እና በሁኔታ የጥያቄ አካባቢ እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት መፍጠርን በመፍጠር ይቻላል፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ የኖረውን NE model ማችንን በሦስት እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተር ላይ እናሳያታለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ከሀገር-የ-art ልማድ የበለጠ ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.", 'hy': 'Համացանցի ներգրավումը (ՆԵ) ցանցի վերլուծության մեջ կարևոր դեր է խաղում, քանի որ այն ունի ներգրավման գագաթնակետներ ներգրավելու արդյունավետ ցածր չափերի ներգրավման վեկտորներով: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունի ՆԵ մոդելներ, որոնք նպատակում են սովորել յուրաքանչյուր խորանոցի համար ֆիքսավոր անկոնտեքստ ներգրավումը և անտեսել տարբեր դերերը, երբ շփվում են այլ խորանոցների հետ: In this paper, we assume that one vertex usually shows different aspects when interacting with different neighbor vertices, and should own different embeddings respectively.  Այդ պատճառով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք համատեքստի գիտակցական ցանցի ներգրավումը (CAne), մի նոր ՆԵ մոդել այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: CAne-ը սովորում է կոնտեքստի-գիտակցական կառուցվածքներ գագաթնակետների համար փոխադարձ ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով և ակնկալում է, որ ավելի ճշգրիտ մոդելավորի գագաթնակետների միջև սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները: Փորձերի ընթացքում մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոդելը գոյություն ունեցող ՆԵ մոդելների հետ երեք իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ CAne-ը նշանակալի բարելավում է, քան ամենահետաքրքիր մեթոդները կապերի կանխատեսման և համեմատական արդյունքների վերաբերյալ խորտագույն դասակարգում: Առաջին կոդը և տվյալների համակարգերը կարող են ստանալ https://github.com/thunlp/CANE ]:', 'bn': 'নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহৃত (NE) নেটওয়ার্ক বিশ্লেষণে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা বাজাচ্ছে, কারণ তার ক্ষমতার কারণে কার্যকর নিম্নমেন্ট ভেকটরের স তবে বিদ্যমান NE মডেলের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে প্রত্যেক ভার্ট্রোক্সের জন্য একটি স্থায়ী প্রেক্ষাপট-মুক্ত বিভিন্ন ভূমিকা শিখতে এবং অন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ধারণা করি যে একটি ভার্ট্রেক্স সাধারণত ভিন্ন প্রতিবেশী ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন দিকের সাথে যোগাযোগ করার সময় বিভিন্ন তাই আমরা এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাস নেটওয়ার্ক এমবেডিং (CANE) উপস্থাপন করি। ক্যানেন বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিতরের প্রতি সচেতনতা শিখেছে এবং প্রত্যাশা করা হচ্ছে যে ভিতরের মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক পরীক্ষায় আমরা আমাদের মডেল তুলনা করি বিদ্যমান NE মডেলের সাথে তিন আসল বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটে তুলনা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কেনের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের চেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পেয়েছে এবং ভের্ট্রেক্স বিভাগের প্ উৎস কোড এবং ডাটাসেট <থেকে পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'ca': "L'incorporació a la xarxa (NE) té un paper crític en l'anàlisi de la xarxa, degut a la seva habilitat de representar vertices amb vectors d'incorporació baixa dimensió eficients. No obstant això, els models NE existents tenen l'objectiu d'aprendre una integració fixa sense contest per a cada vèrtex i de ignorar les diverses funcions quan interageixen amb altres vèrtex. En aquest paper, suposem que un vèrtex normalment mostra diferents aspectes quan interacteix amb diferents vèrtex veïns, i hauria de tenir diferents incorporacions respectivament. Per tant, presentem Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), un nou model NE per abordar aquest tema. CANE aprenen integracions conscients del contexte per als vertices amb mecanisme d'atenció mútua i s'espera que modelin les relacions semàntiques entre vertices de manera més precisa. In experiments, we compare our model with existing NE models on three real-world datasets.  Els resultats experimentals mostren que CANE aconsegueix millora significativa que els mètodes més avançats en la predicció dels enllaços i el rendiment comparable en la classificació de vérticles. El codi de fonts i els conjunts de dades es poden obtenir de < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.", 'bs': 'Uključenje mreže (NE) igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi mreže zbog sposobnosti predstavljanja vrhova s efikasnim niskim dimenzionalnim ugrađenim vektorima. Međutim, postojeći NE modeli ciljaju naučiti određenu kontekstsku integraciju za svaki vrh i zanemariti različite uloge kada se interakcija sa drugim vrh. U ovom papiru pretpostavljamo da jedno vrtlo obično pokazuje različite aspekte kada se interakcija sa različitim kraljevima susjeda, i trebalo bi posjedovati različite integracije. Stoga predstavljamo integraciju mreže za kontekst-Aware (CANE), nov model NE za rješavanje ovog pitanja. CANE nauči integraciju konteksta svjesnog za vrpce sa međusobnim mehanizam pažnje i očekuje se da će modelirati semantičke veze između vrpca preciznije. U eksperimentima, uspoređujemo naš model sa postojećim NE modelima na tri realna svijeta podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CANE postigne značajno poboljšanje od metoda stanja umjetnosti o predviđanju veze i usporedbljivom učinku u klasifikaciji verteksa. Izvorni kod i sete podataka mogu dobiti od < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE - Da.', 'cs': 'Síťové vložení (NE) hraje klíčovou roli v síťové analýze, díky své schopnosti reprezentovat vrcholy s efektivními nízkorozměrnými vkládacími vektory. Stávající NE modely se však snaží naučit pevné bezkontextové vložení pro každý vrchol a zanedbávat různé role při interakci s ostatními vrcholy. V tomto článku předpokládáme, že jeden vrchol obvykle ukazuje různé aspekty při interakci s různými sousedními vrcholy a měl by mít různé vložení. Proto představujeme Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), nový model NE pro řešení tohoto problému. CANE se učí kontextově orientované vložení vrcholů s mechanismem vzájemné pozornosti a očekává se, že bude modelovat sémantické vztahy mezi vrcholy přesněji. V experimentech porovnáváme náš model se stávajícími NE modely na třech reálných datových sadách. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že CANE dosahuje významného zlepšení než moderní metody v oblasti predikce vazeb a srovnatelného výkonu na klasifikaci vrcholů. Zdrojový kód a datové sady lze získat z < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'az': 'Ağ içərisində (NE) a ğı analizi içində kritik rol oynadır, çünki onun ən düşük ölçülü in şa vektörləri ilə çöpçüləri göstərməyə qadirdir. Halbuki, mevcut NE modelləri hər vertiklə birlikdə müxtəlif məlumatları öyrənmək və başqa vertiklərlə birlikdə müxtəlif rolləri unutmaq istəyirlər. Bu kağızda, biz düşünürük ki, bir çöpük genellikle müxtəlif qonşu çöpüklərlə birlikdə fərqli aspektləri göstərir və müxtəlif məlumatların sahibi olmalıdır. Beləliklə, biz Context-Aware Network Embedding (CANE), bu meseleyi çəkmək üçün yeni NE modeli göstəririk. CANE bir-birinin ünsiyyət mehānismi ilə mərkəblərin mərkəblərinin mərkəblərini öyrənir və mərkəblərin arasındakı semantik ilişkileri daha düzgün modelləşdirmək gözləyir. Biz modelimizi, həqiqətən, üç dünya veri qurğuları ilə müəyyən edirik. Təşviyyat sonuçları göstərir ki, CANE bağlantı tədbirlərinin və vertex klasifikasyonunda müqayisədə müəyyən edilən tədbirlərin vəziyyətdən daha çox yaxşılıq edər. Kaynak kodu və veri qurğuları <tərəfindən alınabilir https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'et': 'Võrgu manustamine (NE) mängib võrgu analüüsis kriitilist rolli tänu võimele esindada tippu tõhusate madalamõõtmeliste manustamisvektoritega. Olemasolevate NE mudelite eesmärk on aga õppida iga tipu jaoks fikseeritud kontekstivaba manustamist ja jätta teiste tipkudega suhtlemisel tähelepanuta erinevad rollid. Selles raamatus eeldame, et üks tipp tavaliselt näitab erinevaid aspekte suhtlemisel erinevate naaber tipud, ja peaks omama erinevaid manustamisi vastavalt. Seetõttu tutvustame kontekstiteadlikku võrgupõimimist (CANE), uudset NE mudelit selle probleemi lahendamiseks. CANE õpib vastastikuse tähelepanu mehhanismiga tipkude kontekstiteadlikke manustamisi ja eeldatakse, et tipkude semantilisi seoseid modelleerib täpsemalt. Eksperimentides võrdleme oma mudelit olemasolevate NE mudelitega kolmes reaalmaailma andmekogumis. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et CANE saavutab märkimisväärse paranemise kui kaasaegsed meetodid seoste prognoosimisel ja võrreldava jõudluse tipu klassifitseerimisel. Lähtekoodi ja andmekogumi saab hankida aadressilt < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'fi': 'Verkkoupotuksella (NE) on ratkaiseva rooli verkkoanalyysissä, koska se pystyy edustamaan huippuja tehokkailla matalaulotteisilla upotusvektoreilla. Nykyiset NE-mallit pyrkivät kuitenkin oppimaan kullekin vertexille kiinteän kontekstittoman upotuksen ja laiminlyömään erilaiset roolit vuorovaikutuksessa muiden vertikaalien kanssa. Tässä artikkelissa oletamme, että yksi vertex yleensä näyttää eri näkökohtia vuorovaikutuksessa eri naapurin vertices, ja pitäisi omistaa erilaisia upotuksia vastaavasti. Siksi esittelemme kontekstitietoisen verkkosulautuksen (CANE), uuden NE-mallin ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. CANE oppii kontekstitietoisia upotuksia vertikaaleille, joilla on molemminpuolinen huomiomekanismi, ja sen odotetaan mallintavan vertikaalien semanttisia suhteita tarkemmin. Kokeiluissa vertaamme malliamme olemassa oleviin NE-malleihin kolmessa reaalimaailmassa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että CANE saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia kuin uusimmat menetelmät linkkien ennustamisessa ja vertailukelpoisessa suorituskyvyssä kärkiluokituksessa. Lähdekoodi ja aineistot löytyvät osoitteesta < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'jv': 'embedding politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé, nglakoni uwong ngomong nik kabèh wong liyane pernik-wong liyane karo pernik-wong liyane gak nggalakno, lan wis dipun-wong liyane Kaya, awak dhéwé nambah Kontext-Awake Network Bukak (Cane), model ne batir batir batir kanggo nganggo kesempatan iki. CLASE Yo ngerti nggo langgambar aturan-awaraning dipun-awaraning nggo vertical karo mekanim iki dadi ono langgar sampek modèl Daerah sing paling-paling, kita sampek model nang model sing dumadhi iki banget karo model ne dadi sing kator barang. Laptop" and "Desktop Coverage https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >', 'he': 'התכנית רשת (NE) משחקת תפקיד קריטי בניתוח רשת, בגלל היכולת שלה לייצג קומות עם ווקטורי התכנית מימדים נמוכים יעילים. בכל אופן, דוגמנים NE קיימים מכוונים ללמוד קישור קבוע ללא הקשר לכל קוטקסט ולהזהיר את התפקידים המגווונים כאשר מתקשרים עם קוטקסטים אחרים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מניחים שבטבע אחד בדרך כלל מראה היבטים שונים כאשר מתקשרים עם קומות שכנים שונים, והוא צריך להיות בעל תוכניות שונות בהתאם. לכן, אנו מציגים רשת מודעת לקונקסט (CANE), מודל NE רומן כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה. CANE לומד תוכניות מודעות לקונקסט לקומות עם מנגנון תשומת לב משותפת ומצפה לדוגמא את מערכות היחסים הסמנטיות בין הקומות באופן מדויק יותר. בניסויים, אנחנו משוותים את המודל שלנו עם מודלים NE קיימים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי. Experimental results show that CANE achieves significant improvement than state-of-the-art methods on link prediction and comparable performance on vertex classification.  הקוד המקורי והקבוצות נתונים יכולים להשיג מ < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'ha': "Wurin wanda ya shiga (NE) yana gama wani roli mai muhimmi a cikin Analytan tarayya, saboda da awonsa ya nuna masu tsari da shiryoyi masu da masu fassara masu sauya masu ƙasƙanci. Amma, misãlai na NE wanda ke gaba yana nufin ya sanar da wani matsayi mai inganci wa kowace matsayi da kuma ya ƙyale role daban idan sunã yi danganta da wasu na tsayi. Ga wannan takarda, Munã yi zaton, ɗayan kashfa guda ta nuna masu yawa a lokacin da ke yi husũma da gefen dabam-daban, kuma ana kamata ta zama masu haɗuwa da dabam-dabam. Saboda haka, Munã kai yanzu tsarin Cikakken da aka sani (CANE), wata salon na NE da za'a yi amfani da wannan masu zartar da. CANE yana iya amfani da filin da ke fahimta masu cikin matsayi da masu amfani da matsayin labarai, kuma yana ƙayyade a sami danne da dangane na semantiki tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin masu tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin kwance da ke kanana. Aka cikin jarrabai, muna sami misalinmu da misalin na NE da ke cikin tsari uku-duniya. Matarin jarrabawa na nuna cewa CANE ya sami mai girma ko halin-na-the-art-metode kan bashirin da aka yi sami da zaman shawarar a tsaye. Ana iya sami kodi da danne-danne daga < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >", 'sk': 'Vgradnja omrežja (NE) igra ključno vlogo pri analizi omrežja, saj lahko predstavlja točke z učinkovitimi nizkodimenzionalnimi vektorji vgradnje. Vendar pa želijo obstoječi modeli NE učiti fiksno vgradnjo brez konteksta za vsako vozlišče in zanemarjati različne vloge pri interakciji z drugimi vozlišči. V tem prispevku predpostavljamo, da eno oglišče običajno kaže različne vidike pri interakciji z različnimi sosedskimi oglišči in mora imeti različne vdelave oziroma vgradnje. Zato predstavljamo nov model NE za obravnavo te težave, ki je ozaveščen o kontekstu. CANE uči kontekstno ozaveščene vdelave za vozlišča z mehanizmom medsebojne pozornosti in naj bi natančneje modeliral semantične odnose med vozlišči. V poskusih primerjamo naš model z obstoječimi NE modeli na treh resničnih naborih podatkov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da CANE doseže znatno izboljšanje od najsodobnejših metod pri napovedovanju povezav in primerljivi zmogljivosti pri klasifikaciji vozlišč. Izvorno kodo in nabore podatkov je mogoče pridobiti na < https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >.', 'bo': 'Network embedding (NE) is playing a critical role in network analysis, due to its ability to represent vertices with efficient low-dimensional embedding vectors. ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་རྣམ་པ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཁེལ་ཡུག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐའ་འཁོར་གཅིག་ནི་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་སྦུང་ཚན་མ་འདྲ་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་མཐུད་སྣང་མ་འདྲ་བ་ཤར་ཡོད་པ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་མཐོང་སྣང་བ(CANE)རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་དོན་འདི་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིག CANE learns context-aware embeddings for vertices with mutual attention mechanism and is expected to model the semantic relationships between vertices more precisely. སྟོན་ཚོགས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྡན་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན <ལས་ཐོག་མའི་ཁུངས་ཨང་དང་གནད་སྡུད་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/thunlp/CANE >'}
{'en': 'Generic Axiomatization of Families of Noncrossing Graphs in Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'البديهية العامة لعائلات الرسوم البيانية غير المتقاطعة في تحليل التبعية', 'fr': "Axiomatisation générique des familles de graphes non croisés dans l'analyse des dépendances", 'pt': 'Axiomatização Genérica de Famílias de Gráficos Não Cruzados na Análise de Dependência', 'es': 'Axiomatización genérica de familias de gráficos no cruzados en el análisis de dependencias', 'ja': '非交差グラフファミリーの非依存性解析における一般的な軸足化', 'zh': '赖解析中非交图族之公理化', 'hi': 'निर्भरता पार्सिंग में Noncrossing रेखांकन के परिवारों के जेनेरिक स्वयंसिद्धीकरण', 'ru': 'Общая аксиоматизация семейств непересекающихся графиков при анализе зависимостей', 'ga': 'Aicsiomatization Cineálach ar Theaghlaigh de Ghraif Neamhthrasnaithe i bParsáil Spleáchais', 'hu': 'Általános axiomatizáció a nem keresztező grafikonok családjainak függőségi értelmezésében', 'ka': 'საჯარო სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა განსხვავებული გრაფიების განსხვავება', 'el': 'Γενική Αξιοποίηση Οικογένειων Μη διασταυρούμενων Γραφημάτων στην Ανάλυση Εξαρτήσεων', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдау үшін көшейтілмейтін графиктердің үйлерінің жалпы ассиоматизациясы', 'mk': 'Генерална аксиоматизација на семејствата на непреминувачки графики во анализирањето на зависностите', 'it': "Assiomatizzazione generica delle famiglie di grafici non incrociati nell'analisi della dipendenza", 'lt': 'Bendras nepriklausomų grafikų šeimų kompleksizavimas priklausomybės analizėje', 'mt': 'Axiomatizzazzjoni Ġenerika tal-Familji ta’ Grafiki Mhux ta’ Qsim fil-Parsaġġ tad-Dipendenza', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай ажиллах гэр бүлийн бүлэгтэй ассиоматизаци', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d അംഗീകരിക്കാത്ത ഗ്രാഫ്സുകളുടെ കുടുംബങ്ങളുടെ സാധാരണ അക്സിയോമാറ്റി', 'ms': 'Pengesahan Generik Keluarga Graf Tidak Menyeberangi dalam Menghurai Dependensi', 'pl': 'Ogólna aksjomatyzacja rodzin niekrzyżowych wykresów w parowaniu zależności', 'no': 'Generisk aksiomatisering av familiane av ingenkryssingsgrafar i avhengighetstolking', 'ro': 'Axiomatizarea generică a familiilor de grafice necrucisate în analizarea dependenței', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය අක්ෂියෝමේසියාව නොක්\u200dරීස් ග්\u200dරාෆ්ස් ගැන පවුල', 'so': 'Qoysaska qoyska ee qoyska aan wax ku qabanayn Graphs oo ku xiran jardiinada', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த பாசிங்கில் இல்லாத வரைபடங்களின் குடும்பங்களின் பொதுவான அச்சுறுத்தல்', 'sr': 'Generalna aksiomatizacija porodice nepromištenih grafa u razmatranju zavisnosti', 'sv': 'Generisk axiomatisering av familjer av icke korsande diagram i beroendetolkning', 'ur': 'ناکرسٹنگ گراف کے خاندان کی عمومی آکسیوماتیزی', 'vi': 'Trục hợp chung của các gia đình các đồ họa chưa vượt qua', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Генерална аксиоматизация на семейства на нескръстосани графики в анализ на зависимостта', 'hr': 'Generalna aksiomatizacija obitelji neokrsnih grafa u razmatranju zavisnosti', 'da': 'Generisk aksiomatisering af familier af ikke-krydsende grafer i afhængighedsfortolkning', 'nl': 'Generieke axiomatisatie van families van niet-kruisende grafieken in afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'de': 'Generische Axiomatisierung von Familien von nichtkreuzenden Graphen im Dependenzparsing', 'id': 'Axiomatization Generic of Families of Noncrossing Graphs in Dependency Parsing', 'fa': 'آکسیوماتیزی ژنرال خانواده\u200cهای گراف\u200cهای غیرقابل عبور در تحلیل بستگی', 'sw': 'Ujenzi wa Umoja wa Familia Wasichokuwa na Uzungumzo wa Uhuru', 'tr': 'Umumy Gragramleriň Keçirmekde Maşgalaryň Aksyomatiýasy', 'af': 'Algemeen aksiomatiseering van families van ongekruisende grafieke in afhanklikheid verwerking', 'ko': '의존 분석 중 비교차도족의 일반 공리화', 'am': 'የውይይት አቀማመጥ', 'sq': 'Axiomatizimi gjeneral i Familjeve të Grafikeve të Pakryqëzuara në analizimin e Varësive', 'hy': 'Ընդհանուր անհատուկ գրաֆների ընտանիքների աքսիոմատիզացիան կախվածության վերլուծում', 'az': 'Bağımsızlıq Parlamasında qeyri-keçməyən Grafiklərin Ailələrinin Üniyyətli Axiomatizasyonu', 'bs': 'Generična aksiomatizacija porodice nepromištenih grafa u razmatranju zavisnosti', 'bn': 'নির্ভরিত পার্সিং এর পরিবারের সাধারণ এক্সিয়োমেশন', 'ca': "Axiomatització genèrica de les famílies de gràfics no cruçadors en l'analització de dependencies", 'cs': 'Generická axiomatizace rodin nekřížících grafů v analýze závislosti', 'fi': 'Geneerinen aksiomatisaatio perheiden risteymättömien kaavioiden riippuvuuden analysoinnissa', 'et': 'Üldine aksiomatiseerimine perekondade mitteristuvate graafikute sõltuvuse parsimisel', 'jv': 'Generik axijomatizer', 'sk': 'Generična aksiomatizacija družin neskrižnih grafov v razdeljevanju odvisnosti', 'he': 'הסיכוי הגנרני של משפחות של גרפים לא חוצים במחקר תלויות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འབྲེལ་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་བཟའ་ཚང་ཚོའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཟུར་བ་བཟོ་བ།'}
{'en': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages. The families are separated purely on the basis of forbidden patterns in latent encoding, eliminating the need to differentiate the families of non-crossing graphs in inference algorithms : one algorithm works for all when the search space can be controlled in parser input.', 'ar': 'نقدم ترميزًا بسيطًا للرسوم البيانية غير المتقاطعة غير المسماة ونبين كيف يساعدنا نظيره الكامن في تمثيل عدة عائلات من الرسوم البيانية الموجهة وغير الموجهة المستخدمة في التحليل النحوي والدلالي للغة الطبيعية كلغات خالية من السياق. يتم فصل العائلات تمامًا على أساس الأنماط المحظورة في التشفير الكامن ، مما يلغي الحاجة إلى التمييز بين عائلات الرسوم البيانية غير المتقاطعة في خوارزميات الاستدلال: تعمل خوارزمية واحدة للجميع عندما يمكن التحكم في مساحة البحث في إدخال محلل.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma codificação simples para grafos não cruzados não rotulados e mostramos como sua contraparte latente nos ajuda a representar várias famílias de grafos direcionados e não direcionados usados na análise sintática e semântica de linguagem natural como linguagens livres de contexto. As famílias são separadas puramente com base em padrões proibidos na codificação latente, eliminando a necessidade de diferenciar as famílias de grafos não cruzados em algoritmos de inferência: um algoritmo funciona para todos quando o espaço de busca pode ser controlado na entrada do analisador.', 'es': 'Presentamos una codificación simple para gráficos no cruzados no etiquetados y mostramos cómo su contraparte latente nos ayuda a representar varias familias de gráficos dirigidos y no dirigidos utilizados en el análisis sintáctico y semántico del lenguaje natural como lenguajes libres de contexto. Las familias se separan únicamente sobre la base de patrones prohibidos en la codificación latente, lo que elimina la necesidad de diferenciar las familias de gráficos no cruzados en los algoritmos de inferencia: un algoritmo funciona para todos cuando el espacio de búsqueda se puede controlar en la entrada del analizador.', 'ja': '私たちは、ラベル付けされていない非交差グラフのための単純なエンコードを提示し、その潜在的な相手が、自然言語の構文解析および意味解析で使用される有向および無向グラフのいくつかのファミリーをコンテキストフリー言語として表現するのにどのように役立つかを示します。これらのファミリーは、潜在的なエンコーディングにおける禁止されたパターンに基づいて純粋に分離されており、推論アルゴリズムにおける非交差グラフのファミリーを区別する必要はありません。1つのアルゴリズムは、検索空間が構文解析器入力で制御可能な場合にすべてに機能します。', 'fr': "Nous présentons un codage simple pour des graphes non croisés non étiquetés et montrons comment son homologue latent nous aide à représenter plusieurs familles de graphes orientés et non orientés utilisés dans l'analyse syntaxique et sémantique du langage naturel en tant que langages sans contexte. Les familles sont séparées uniquement sur la base de modèles interdits dans le codage latent, ce qui élimine le besoin de différencier les familles de graphes non croisés dans les algorithmes d'inférence\xa0: un algorithme fonctionne pour tous lorsque l'espace de recherche peut être contrôlé dans l'entrée de l'analyseur.", 'zh': '给简编码于未标者,示其潜于应物,助我以自然语言句法语义解析之用,数有向无向图家为上下文语。 此族纯粹,于编码禁式分离,无待推理算法中区别非交图族:当于解析器输中控制搜索空间,一算法宜用诸算法。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем простое кодирование для немеченых непересекающихся графов и показываем, как его латентный аналог помогает нам представлять несколько семейств направленных и ненаправленных графов, используемых в синтаксическом и семантическом синтаксическом разборе естественного языка как бесконтекстных языков. Семейства разделяются исключительно на основе запрещенных шаблонов в скрытом кодировании, что устраняет необходимость дифференцировать семейства непересекающихся графов в алгоритмах вывода: один алгоритм работает для всех, когда пространство поиска может контролироваться во входе парсера.', 'hi': 'हम अनलेबल किए गए नॉनक्रॉसिंग ग्राफ के लिए एक सरल एन्कोडिंग प्रस्तुत करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि कैसे इसका अव्यक्त समकक्ष हमें संदर्भ-मुक्त भाषाओं के रूप में प्राकृतिक भाषा के वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में उपयोग किए जाने वाले निर्देशित और अनिर्देशित रेखांकन के कई परिवारों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने में मदद करता है। परिवारों को अव्यक्त एन्कोडिंग में निषिद्ध पैटर्न के आधार पर विशुद्ध रूप से अलग किया जाता है, अनुमान एल्गोरिदम में गैर-क्रॉसिंग ग्राफ के परिवारों को अलग करने की आवश्यकता को समाप्त कर दिया जाता है: एक एल्गोरिथ्म सभी के लिए काम करता है जब खोज स्थान को पार्सर इनपुट में नियंत्रित किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid ionchódú simplí i láthair do ghraif neamhthrasnaithe neamhlipéadaithe agus léirímid an chaoi a gcuidíonn a mhacasamhail folaigh linn roinnt teaghlach de ghraif dhírithe agus neamhdhírithe a úsáidtear i bparsáil chomhréire agus shéimeantach teanga nádúrtha mar theangacha saor ó chomhthéacs a léiriú. Déantar na teaghlaigh a dheighilt go hiomlán ar bhonn patrúin toirmiscthe in ionchódú folaigh, rud a chuireann deireadh leis an ngá atá le idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar theaghlaigh na ngraif neamhthrasnaithe in halgartaim tátail: oibríonn algartam amháin do chách nuair is féidir an spás cuardaigh a rialú in ionchur parsálaí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გამოყენებთ საუკეთესო კონტექტიკური და სენმანტიკური პარასტირებაში გამოყენებული სინტექტიკური და სენმანტიკური ენერგიის გადაწყენებაში, როგორ მისი ლეტენტიკური კონტექტიკური ენერგიების გამოყენება ჩ ოჯახები უბრალოდ გაყოფილი შეცდომარებული სტრუმენტების ფორმენტების ბაზაზე, როდესაც ძიება საძიებლობაში გაყოფილირება უკვე გაყოფილი გრაფიკის ოჯახების განსხვავება ინფრენციის ალგორიტებში: ერთი ალგორიტიმ მუშაობ', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy egyszerű kódolást címke nélküli grafikonokhoz, és bemutatjuk, hogy a látens megfelelője hogyan segít a természetes nyelv mint kontextusmentes nyelvek szintaktikai és szemantikai elemzésében használt irányított és irányítatlan grafikonok több családjának ábrázolásában. A családokat pusztán látens kódolásban tiltott minták alapján választják el, így nem kell különbséget tenni a nem keresztező grafikonok családjainak következtetési algoritmusokban: egy algoritmus mindenkinek működik, ha a keresési terület elemző bemenetben vezérelhető.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή κωδικοποίηση για μη διαβασμένα γραφήματα χωρίς ετικέτα και δείχνουμε πώς το λανθάνον αντίστοιχο της μας βοηθά να αναπαραστήσουμε διάφορες οικογένειες κατευθυνόμενων και μη κατευθυνόμενων γραφημάτων που χρησιμοποιούνται στη συντακτική και σημασιολογική ανάλυση της φυσικής γλώσσας ως γλώσσες χωρίς πλαίσιο. Οι οικογένειες χωρίζονται καθαρά με βάση απαγορευμένα μοτίβα σε λανθάνουσα κωδικοποίηση, εξαλείφοντας την ανάγκη διαφοροποίησης των οικογενειών των μη διασταυρούμενων γραφημάτων σε αλγόριθμους συμπερασμάτων: ένας αλγόριθμος λειτουργεί για όλες όταν ο χώρος αναζήτησης μπορεί να ελεγχθεί στην εισαγωγή του αναλυτή.', 'it': "Presentiamo una semplice codifica per grafici non contrassegnati e mostriamo come la sua controparte latente ci aiuti a rappresentare diverse famiglie di grafici diretti e non retti utilizzati nell'analisi sintattica e semantica del linguaggio naturale come linguaggi senza contesto. Le famiglie sono separate esclusivamente sulla base di pattern proibiti nella codifica latente, eliminando la necessità di differenziare le famiglie di grafici non incrociati negli algoritmi di inferenza: un algoritmo funziona per tutti quando lo spazio di ricerca può essere controllato in input parser.", 'mk': 'Презентираме едноставно кодирање за необележани графики и покажуваме како неговиот лантен колега ни помага да претставуваме неколку семејства на директирани и недиректирани графики кои се користат во синтактичко и семантично анализирање на природниот јазик како безконтекстни јазици. Семејствата се одделени чисто врз основа на забранетите шеми во тајното кодирање, елиминирајќи ја потребата да се разликуваат семејствата на графиците кои не се преминуваат во алгоритмите на инференција: еден алгоритм работи за сите кога просторот за пребарување може да се контролира во внесувањето на анализаторот.', 'ml': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages.  അടുത്ത കോഡിങ്ങില്\u200d നിഷിദ്ധമായ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d കുടുംബങ്ങളെ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമാണ്. ക്രോസ് ചെയ്യാത്ത ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകളുടെ കുടുംബങ്ങളെ വേ', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan pengekodan sederhana untuk graf tidak menyeberangi tanda dan menunjukkan bagaimana kontrak tersembunyinya membantu kita mewakili beberapa keluarga graf yang direksi dan tidak direksi yang digunakan dalam penghuraian sintaktik dan semantik bahasa alam sebagai bahasa bebas konteks. Keluarga dipisahkan secara pura-pura berdasarkan corak dilarang dalam pengekodan tersembunyi, menghapuskan keperluan untuk membezakan keluarga graf yang tidak menyeberangi dalam algoritma kesimpulan: satu algoritma berfungsi untuk semua apabila ruang gelintar boleh dikawal dalam input hurai.', 'mn': 'Бид энгийн шинжлэх ухаан биш графикийн шинжлэх ухаан өгүүлж, түүний соронзон хамтрагч нь бидэнд хэрхэн туслах тулд байгалийн хэлний синтактик болон semantic хуваалцаанд хэрэглэгддэггүй хэлний гэр бүлийн хэл болон шууд хэлбэргүй графикийг илэрхийлэх боло Гэрвээ гэр бүлийн хоорондоо хоорондоо хоригдож буй загваруудыг хадгалах алгоритмын алгоритмын гэр бүлийг өөрчлөх шаардлагатай. Хайлтын орон зайг хуваалцах боломжтой үед нэг алгоритм нь ажилладаг.', 'kk': 'Көрсетілмеген графиктердің қарапайым кодтамасын көрсету және оның қарапайым партнері бірнеше тілдерді синтактикалық және семантикалық талдау тілдерінде қолданылатын бірнеше тілдерді көрсетуге көмектеседі. Отбаслар келесі кодтамасындағы сақталмаған үлгілердің негізінде бөлікті, келесі кодтамасындағы сақталмаған графиктердің үйлерін бағыттау алгоритмдерінде бөлікті: іздеу орын талдау кезінде бір алгоритм жұмыс істейді.', 'lt': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages.  Šeimos atskiriamos vien dėl uždraustų latentinio kodavimo modelių, pašalinant poreikį atskirti šeimas, kuriose nėra kryžminių grafikų, išvadų algoritmais: vienas algoritmas veikia visiems, kai paieškos erdvė gali būti kontroliuojama analizatoriaus įvedimuose.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw kodifikazzjoni sempliċi għal grafiċi mingħajr tikketta u nuru kif il-kontroparti latenti tagħha tgħin biex nirrappreżentaw diversi familji ta’ grafiċi diretti u mhux diretti użati fl-analiżijiet sintattiċi u semantiċi tal-lingwa naturali bħala lingwi ħielsa mill-kuntest. Il-familji huma separati purament fuq il-bażi ta’ mudelli pprojbiti fl-ikkodifikar moħbi, li jeliminaw il-ħtieġa li jiġu differenzjati l-familji ta’ grafiċi li ma jaqsmux f’algoritmi ta’ inferenza: algoritmu wieħed jaħdem għal kulħadd meta l-ispazju tat-tiftix jista’ jiġi kkontrollat fl-input tal-analizzatur.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o codificare simplă pentru grafice fără etichete și arătăm cum omologul său latent ne ajută să reprezentăm mai multe familii de grafice direcționate și nedrecționate utilizate în analizarea sintactică și semantică a limbajului natural ca limbi fără context. Familiile sunt separate exclusiv pe baza modelelor interzise în codificarea latentă, eliminând necesitatea de a diferenția familiile de grafice non-crossing în algoritmi de inferență: un algoritm funcționează pentru toți atunci când spațiul de căutare poate fi controlat în introducerea parser.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit enkel koding for ugjennomsiktige ikkje-kryssingsgrafikk og viser korleis den latente mottakaren hjelper oss til å representera fleire familier av direkte og ugjennomsiktige grafikk som brukar i syntaktisk og semantisk tolking av naturspråk som kontekstfri språk. Familiane er skilde purt på grunn av forhindra mønsterelement i latente koding, og eliminerer nødvendigheten til å skilde familiane av ikkje- kryssing- grafen i inferens- algoritme: ein algoritme fungerer for alle når søkjemønsteret kan kontrolleres i tolkarskriftinndata.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy proste kodowanie dla nieoznakowanych wykresów niekrzyżujących i pokazujemy, jak jego ukryty odpowiednik pomaga nam reprezentować kilka rodzin ukierunkowanych i niekierowanych wykresów używanych w parsowaniu składni i semantycznym języka naturalnego jako języków wolnych od kontekstu. Rodziny są rozdzielane wyłącznie na podstawie zabronionych wzorców w ukrytym kodowaniu, eliminując konieczność różnicowania rodzin niekrzyżujących się wykresów w algorytmach wnioskowania: jeden algorytm działa dla wszystkich, gdy przestrzeń wyszukiwania można kontrolować w wejściu parsera.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සංකේතනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ ක්\u200dරාස්ටික් වෙන්න බැරි සංකේතනයක් සඳහා පෙන්වන්නේ ඒකේ ලැටෙන්ට් ක්\u200dරාස්ට්පාර්ට් අපිට උදව් කරන්නේ කොහ පවුල සිද්ධ වෙනස් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනස් කරන්න, පරික්ෂණ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලි', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qoraal sahlan oo aan la aqoonin, waxaana tusaynaa siduu saaxiibkiisu nooga caawinayo in uu nooga represento qoys badan oo la hagay oo aan hageyn karo oo lagu isticmaalo baaritaanka luuqada dabiicadda ah sida luuqado aan kala duwan. Qoysaska waxaa gooni ahaan loo kala soocay qaabab la xarrimay oo la xiriiray codsiga ugu dambeeyay, si loo kala sooco baahida qoyska kaararka aan korsashada looga baahneyn karin qoraalka lambarka ah: hal algorityo ayaa u shaqeeyaa dhammaan marka la maamuli karo goobta raadinta.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده اکنوڈینگ کے لئے پیش کریں گے جو غیر قابل کرسٹینگ گراف کے لئے ہے اور دکھائیں گے کہ اس کے لٹینٹ کنٹرنٹ کا ہمیں کس طرح مدد کرتا ہے کہ ہمیں بہت سی مستقیم اور غیر مستقیم گراف کی تعریف کریں جو طبیعی زبان کی نسبت غیر قابل زبانوں کے لئے خاندان لٹینٹ اکڈینڈ میں منع کئے گئے پٹرنے کی پاداش پر صرف جدا ہوتے ہیں، ان کے گھروں کے گھروں کو بغیر کرسینگ الگوریٹم میں فرق کرنے کی ضرورت ہٹاتے ہیں: ایک الگوریٹم سب کے لئے کام کرتا ہے جبکہ جگہ پلٹنے کی جگہ پارٹر اینٹ میں کنٹرول کئے', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavno kodiranje za nepobeležene nepromištene grafike i pokazujemo kako nam njegov latentni kolega pomaže da predstavimo nekoliko porodica upućenih i neprekidnih grafika korištenih u sintaktičkom i semantičkom razmatranju prirodnog jezika kao jezika bez konteksta. Porodice su razdvajane čisto na osnovu zabranjenih obrazaca u latentnom kodiranju, eliminisanja potrebe da diferenciraju porodice nepromištenih grafika u algoritmima inferencije: jedan algoritam radi za sve kada se prostor pretraživanja može kontrolirati u ulazu u analizatoru.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en enkel kodning för icke-märkta grafer och visar hur dess latenta motsvarighet hjälper oss att representera flera familjer av riktade och icke-riktade grafer som används i syntaktisk och semantisk tolkning av naturligt språk som kontextfria språk. Familjerna separeras enbart på grundval av förbjudna mönster i latent kodning, vilket eliminerar behovet av att differentiera familjerna av icke-korsande grafer i inferensalgoritmer: en algoritm fungerar för alla när sökutrymmet kan kontrolleras i parserinmatning.', 'ta': 'அடையாளமில்லாத வரைபடங்களுக்கு ஒரு சுலபமான குறியீட்டை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதன் சமீபத்திய கூட்டாளி எங்களுக்கு எவ்வாறு உதவுகிறது நேர்வழி மற்றும் சரி தற்போதைய குறியீட்டில் விலக்கப்பட்ட வடிவங்களின் அடிப்படையால் குடும்பத்தினர் பிரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன, குறும்படம் இல்லாத வரைபடங்களின் குடும்பத்தினரை வேறுபடுத்த வேண', 'uz': "Biz notoĘ»gĘ»ri raqamlarni kodlash uchun oddiy kodlash imkoniyatlarini koĘ»rsatimiz va ularning eng oxirgi kompyuterning bir necha qo'llangan qo'llarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Biz tashkilotga va semantik tilni o'zgartirish asosiy tillar sifatida qo'llanmalarni qo'llash uchun qo'llanmaga Fayllar eng oxirgi kodlash usuli asosida faqat boĘ»lishi mumkin, cheksiz raqamlarning oillarini ajratish kerakligini olib tashlash kerak: qidirish joy boshqarishi mumkin boĘ»lganda hamma uchun bir algoritm ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một bảng mã đơn giản cho biểu đồ không mặc đồ và cho thấy bản vẽ giả tạo của nó giúp chúng tôi đại diện cho nhiều gia đình các biểu đồ dẫn đường và không trực tiếp được sử dụng trong ngữ pháp và ngữ pháp phân tích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên như những ngôn ngữ không ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ. Các gia đình được phân chia hoàn to àn dựa trên các mô hình cấm trong việc in mã ngầm, loại trừ sự cần phải phân biệt các gia đình các biểu đồ không được qua đường trong thuật toán Hỏa sinh: một thuật thuật hoạt động cho tất cả khi các khoảng trống tìm kiếm có thể được điều khiển bằng cách nhập phân tích.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavno kodiranje za neoznačene nepristojne grafike i pokazujemo kako nam njegov latentni kolega pomaže da predstavimo nekoliko obitelji usmjerenih i neprekidnih grafika korištenih u sintaktičkom i semantičkom razmatranju prirodnog jezika kao jezika bez konteksta. Obitelji se razdvajaju čisto na temelju zabranjenih obrazaca u latentnom kodiranju, eliminirajući potrebu diferenciranja obitelji neokrsnih grafika u algoritmima inferencije: jedan algoritam radi za sve kada se prostor pretraživanja može kontrolirati u ulazu analizatora.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en simpel kodning for ikke-mærkede grafer og viser, hvordan dens latente modpart hjælper os med at repræsentere flere familier af rettede og uoprettede grafer, der anvendes i syntaktisk og semantisk fortolkning af natursprog som kontekstfrie sprog. Familierne adskilles udelukkende på grundlag af forbudte mønstre i latent kodning, hvilket eliminerer behovet for at differentiere familierne af ikke-krydsende grafer i inference algoritmer: én algoritme fungerer for alle, når søgeområdet kan styres i parser input.', 'bg': 'Представяме просто кодиране на немаркирани графики и показваме как латентният му контрагент ни помага да представим няколко фамилии от насочени и ненасочвани графики, използвани в синтактичен и семантичен анализ на естествения език като езици без контекст. Семействата са разделени чисто на базата на забранени модели в латентно кодиране, елиминирайки необходимостта от разграничаване на семействата на нескръстосаните графики в алгоритмите за заключение: един алгоритъм работи за всички, когато пространството за търсене може да бъде контролирано в входа на анализатора.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een eenvoudige codering voor niet-gecodeerde niet-kruisende grafieken en laten zien hoe de latente tegenhanger ons helpt om verschillende families van gerichte en niet-gecodeerde grafieken voor te stellen die worden gebruikt in syntactische en semantische parsing van natuurlijke taal als contextvrije talen. De families worden louter gescheiden op basis van verboden patronen in latente codering, waardoor het elimineren van de noodzaak om de families van niet-kruisende grafieken te differentiëren in inferentiealgoritmes: één algoritme werkt voor iedereen wanneer de zoekruimte kan worden gecontroleerd in parserinvoer.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pengekodan sederhana untuk grafik tidak menyeberang tanpa label dan menunjukkan bagaimana rekan rahasianya membantu kita untuk mewakili beberapa keluarga grafik yang direksi dan tidak direksi yang digunakan dalam penghuraian sintaktik dan semantis bahasa alam sebagai bahasa bebas konteks. Keluarga terpisah secara murni berdasarkan pola terlarang dalam pengekodan latent, menghapuskan kebutuhan untuk membedakan keluarga grafik yang tidak menyeberangi dalam algoritma inferensi: satu algoritma bekerja untuk semua ketika ruang pencarian dapat dikendalikan dalam input parser.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine einfache Codierung für nicht-beschriftete Graphen vor und zeigen, wie ihr latentes Gegenstück uns hilft, mehrere Familien von gerichteten und ungerichteten Graphen darzustellen, die in der syntaktischen und semantischen Parsing natürlicher Sprache als kontextfreie Sprachen verwendet werden. Die Familien werden ausschließlich auf der Grundlage verbotener Muster in latenter Codierung getrennt, wodurch die Unterscheidung der Familien nicht kreuzender Graphen in Inferenz-Algorithmen entfällt: Ein Algorithmus funktioniert für alle, wenn der Suchraum in Parser-Eingabe gesteuert werden kann.', 'fa': 'ما یک رمزبندی ساده برای گرافهای غیر قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل قابل تعریف قرار می دهیم و نشان می دهیم که چگونه همکارش به ما کمک می کند تا چند خانواده از گرافهای مستقیم و غیر قابل قابل تعریف از زبان طبیعی به عنوان زبان خانواده\u200cها تنها بر اساس الگوریتم\u200cهای حرام در رمزبندی latent جدا می\u200cشوند، و نیازی برای جدا کردن خانواده\u200cهای گرافیک\u200cهای غیر عبور در الگوریتم\u200cهای ضعیف است: یک الگوریتم برای همه کار می\u200cکند وقتی فضای جستجو در ورودی جدا می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '우리는 표시되지 않은 비교차도에 간단한 인코딩을 제공하고 자연 언어의 문법과 의미 분석에 사용되는 몇 개의 유방향도와 무방향 도족을 상하문과 무관한 언어로 표시하는 데 잠재적인 대응물을 보여 준다.이러한 족은 순전히 잠재적 인코딩에서의 금지 모델을 바탕으로 분리하여 추리 알고리즘에서 비교차 도족을 구분하는 수요를 없앴다. 검색 공간이 해상도 입력에서 제어할 수 있을 때 하나의 알고리즘은 모든 알고리즘에 적용된다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka kodi rahisi kwa ajili ya picha zisizo na maarufu na kuonyesha jinsi mpinzani wake wa hivi karibuni anavyotusaidia kuwawakilisha familia kadhaa za maelekezo ya picha zisizo sahihi zinazotumiwa katika wimbo wa ushirikiano na kimapenzi wa lugha za asili kama lugha isiyo na mazingira. Familia zinatenganishwa pekee kwa msingi wa mitindo haramu katika kodi la hivi karibuni, kuondoa haja ya kutofautisha familia za ramani zisizo na mabadiliko katika ugonjwa wa maambukizi: utaratibu mmoja unafanya kazi kwa wote pale ambapo nafasi ya kutafuta inaweza kudhibitiwa katika mazingira ya Parser.', 'tr': 'Biz ýazylmaz grafikler üçin basit bir ködleme görkeýäris we nusga çykyşyň bize nähili daşary edilen we düzgün grafikleriň bir näçe maşgalasyny syntaktik we semantik dilinde daşary boş dillerde ullanýandygyny görkez. Maşgalalar soňky ködleme içinde yasaklanmaýan nusgalaryň esasynda adaty bölünýär. Garaşma algoritmalarynda gabdalmaýan grafikleriň maşgalaryny üýtgetmek üçin ýene bir algoritmus işleýär. Arama alany parça girişinde kontrol edilýän zaman hemme üçin bir algoritmus işleýär.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n eenvoudige enkodering vir ongeabelde onkruisende grafieke en wys hoe sy latente konnekteer ons hulp om verskeie geslagte van voorgestel en onregte grafieke gebruik word in sintaktike en semantiese verwerking van natuurlike taal as kontekstvry tale. Die geslagte word net geskei op die basis van verhinde patrone in latente kodering, verwyder die behoefte om die geslagte van nie-kruisende grafieke in inferensie algoritme te verskille: een algoritme werk vir almal wanneer die soektog spasie in ontwerker invoer kan beheer word.", 'sq': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages.  Familjet janë ndarë vetëm në bazë të modeleve të ndaluara në kodimin e fshehtë, duke eleminuar nevojën për të diferencuar familjet e grafikëve jo të kryqëzuar në algoritmet e përfundimit: një algoritëm punon për të gjithë kur hapësira e kërkimit mund të kontrollohet në input të analizuesit.', 'hy': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages.  Ընտանիքները առանձնացվում են միայն թաքնված կոդավորման արգելափակված կաղապարների հիմքով, վերացնելով անհրաժեշտությունը տարբերել ընտանիքները առանց խաչը գծագրերի ալգորիթմներում. մեկ ալգորիթմ աշխատում է բոլորի համար, երբ որոնման տարածքը կարելի է վերահսկել համակարգչի ներմուծման մեջ:', 'am': 'ያልታወቀ ቀላል የፊደል ቀለም እናሳየናለን፣ የቀድሞው ተቃውሞ የክፍለ ቋንቋ-ነጻ ቋንቋዎች የሆኑትን ብዙዎች የመራመ እና ያልተራመሩ ቀለሞች ማሳየት እንዴት ይረዳናል፡፡ ቤተሰቦች በተለየቁ የቅርብ ኮድ ውስጥ የተከለከሉትን ዓይነቶች በተለየ፣ የአካባቢ ክፍል የሌለውን የአልgorithምን ቤተሰቦች በመለየት ያስፈልጋል፤ የመረጃ ቦታ መጠን በመጠበቅ በሚችል ጊዜ ሁሉ ላይ አንድ አሌgoritም ይሠራል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা অলীক ক্রাসিং গ্রাফের জন্য একটি সাধারণ এনকোডিং উপস্থাপন করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে তার সাম্প্রতিক অংশীদার আমাদের সাহায্য করে কিভাবে পরিচালিত এবং অকার্যকর সাম্প্রতিক এনকোডিং এ নিষিদ্ধ প্যাটারের ভিত্তিতে পরিবারগুলোকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হয়েছে, যেখানে সাম্প্রতিক এনকোডিং নিষিদ্ধ প্রতিষ্ঠানের ভিত্তিতে পরিবারের পর', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo jednostavno kodiranje za nepoznate nepromištene grafike i pokazujemo kako nam njegov latentni kolega pomaže da predstavimo nekoliko porodica upućenih i neprekidnih grafika korištenih u sintaktičkom i semantičkom razmatranju prirodnog jezika kao jezika bez konteksta. Porodice se razdvajaju čisto na temelju zabranjenih obrazaca u latentnom kodiranju, eliminirajući potrebu da diferenciraju porodice neokrsnog grafika u algoritmima inferencije: jedan algoritam radi za sve kada se prostor pretraživanja može kontrolirati u ulazu analizatora.', 'ca': "Presentam una codificació senzilla per a gràfics sense marca i mostram com la seva contrapartida latent ens ajuda a representar diverses famílies de gràfics direccionats i no direccionats utilitzats en l'analització sinàctica i semàntica del llenguatge natural com llenguatges sense contest. Les famílies estan separades purament sobre la base de patrons prohibits en codificació latent, eliminant la necessitat de diferenciar les famílies de gràfics no cruçats en algoritmes de inferència: un algoritme funciona per a tots quan l'espai de cerca pot ser controlat en entrada del analizador.", 'cs': 'Představujeme jednoduché kódování nekřižujících grafů bez označení a ukážeme, jak jeho latentní protějšek nám pomáhá reprezentovat několik rodin řízených a nesměrných grafů používaných při syntaktické a sémantické analýze přirozeného jazyka jako jazyků bez kontextu. Rodiny jsou odděleny čistě na základě zakázaných vzorů v latentním kódování, což eliminuje potřebu rozlišovat rodiny nekřížících grafů v inferenčních algoritmech: jeden algoritmus funguje pro všechny, pokud lze vyhledávací prostor řídit ve vstupu parseru.', 'et': 'Esitleme lihtsat märgistamata mitteristuvate graafikute kodeerimist ja näitame, kuidas selle latentne vastand aitab meil esindada mitmeid suunatud ja suunamata graafikute peresid, mida kasutatakse looduskeele süntaktilisel ja semantilisel parsimisel kontekstivaba keelena. Perekonnad eraldatakse puhtalt keelatud mustrite alusel latentses kodeeringus, välistades vajaduse eristada mitteristuvate graafikute perekondi järeldusalgoritmides: üks algoritm töötab kõigi jaoks, kui otsinguruumi saab kontrollida parserisisendis.', 'fi': 'Esitämme yksinkertaisen koodauksen merkitsemättömille ei-ristikkäisille graafille ja näytämme, miten sen piilevä vastine auttaa meitä edustamaan useita suunnattujen ja suuntaamattomien graafien perheitä, joita käytetään luonnollisen kielen syntaktisessa ja semanttisessa jäsentämisessä kontekstivapaana kielenä. Perheet erotetaan puhtaasti kiellettyjen kuvioiden perusteella piilevässä koodauksessa, jolloin ei tarvitse erotella risteämättömien graafien perheitä päättelyalgoritmeissa: yksi algoritmi toimii kaikille, kun hakutilaa voidaan ohjata jäsennyssyötteessä.', 'az': 'Biz yazılmadığımız yazılmamış çizgraflar üçün basit bir kodlama göstəririk və onun latent karşılığı bizə müəyyən edilmiş və müəyyən edilməmiş bir neçə ailələrin sintaktik və semantik dillərin təbiətsiz dil olaraq istifadə edilən sintaktik və semantik dillərini göstəririk. Ailələr latent kodlama içində qadağan örtüklərin tərəfindən ayrılır, inferens algoritminin ailələrini fərqləndirməsi lazımdır: arama alanı ayırmaq üçün hər biri üçün bir algoritm çalışır.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing perusahaan koding kanggo nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan karo nggawe barang dumateng kapan kuwi nggawe ngubah bantuan karo alêran carata sing dirangkat lan ora oleh dumateng liyané sing gagalêt kuwi nggawe winih dhéwé. Senegal terus kesempatik lan sematik pangutmaci perusahaan langkung Awak dhéwé luwih akeh weh-akeh luwih dumateng sapa batar tentang kanggo nggawe koding layang, iso nggihimo kuwi kudu nggawe sakjane duluran gambar nggawe karo Algorithm sing gak Ketokan karo akeh dumateng: un Algorithm kuwi alam sing gak dhéwé, akeh iso nguasai perusahaan dumateng kapan banget', 'he': 'אנו מציגים קוד פשוט לגרפים לא חוצים ללא סימן ולהראות כיצד השותף המוסתר שלה עוזר לנו לייצג כמה משפחות של גרפים ממוקדים ולא ממוקדים שמשתמשים באבחן סינטקטי וסמנטי של שפה טבעית כשפות ללא קשר. The families are separated purely on the basis of forbidden patterns in latent encoding, eliminating the need to differentiate the families of non-crossing graphs in inference algorithms: one algorithm works for all when the search space can be controlled in parser input.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da kodi mai sauƙi wa'ura na rubutun ba'a yi fassara ba na rubutu kuma mu nuna yadda rabon da yake a ƙarami yana taimakon mu ga wakin wasu jama'a masu shiryarwa da ba'a saɓa ba da shiryarwa wanda aka yi amfani da shi a cikin sigarin da na semantic da parse na lugha na asimi kamar lugha wanda ba'a da mazaɓa ba. An rarraba iyãlanci, ana ƙayyade shi kawai a kan salon da tsari waɗanda aka haramta cikin kodi na ƙara yanzu, kuma an goge shi da haja ya yi rarraba jama'ar grafyutan waɗanda bã su yin ƙẽtare na algoritori cikin algoritori masu rauni: algorityoyi guda na aiki kowanne a lokacin da za'a iya iya lissafa filin filinaiki cikin tsarin Parser.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo preprosto kodiranje neoznačenih brezkrižnih grafov in pokažemo, kako nam njegova latentna nasprotnica pomaga predstaviti več družin usmerjenih in neusmerjenih grafov, ki se uporabljajo pri sintaktičnem in semantičnem razčlenitvi naravnega jezika kot jezikov brez konteksta. Družine so ločene zgolj na podlagi prepovedanih vzorcev v latentnem kodiranju, kar odpravlja potrebo po razlikovanju družin nekrižnih grafov v sklepnih algoritmih: en algoritem deluje za vse, ko je iskalni prostor mogoče nadzorovati z vnosom razčlenjevalnika.', 'bo': 'We present a simple encoding for unlabeled noncrossing graphs and show how its latent counterpart helps us to represent several families of directed and undirected graphs used in syntactic and semantic parsing of natural language as context-free languages. བཟའ་ཚང་ཚོ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བྱས་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཀག'}
{'en': 'Semi-supervised sequence tagging with bidirectional language models', 'ar': 'وضع علامات التسلسل شبه الخاضع للإشراف باستخدام نماذج لغة ثنائية الاتجاه', 'pt': 'Marcação de sequência semi-supervisionada com modelos de linguagem bidirecionais', 'fr': 'Marquage de séquence semi-supervisé avec des modèles de langage bidirectionnels', 'es': 'Etiquetado de secuencias semisupervisado con modelos de lenguaje bidireccionales', 'ja': '双方向言語モデルによる半監視シーケンスタグ付け', 'ru': 'Полуконтролируемая маркировка последовательностей двунаправленными языковыми моделями', 'hi': 'अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित अनुक्रम द्विदिश भाषा मॉडल के साथ टैगिंग', 'zh': '用双向言模者半监序标记', 'ga': 'Clibeáil seicheamh leath-mhaoirsithe le samhlacha déthreoracha teanga', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt sorozatcímkézés kétirányú nyelvi modellekkel', 'ka': 'ნახევარჯიშო შენახვა სექციენტის მოდელებით', 'el': 'Ημιεπιτηρημένη σήμανση ακολουθίας με αμφίδρομη γλωσσικά μοντέλα', 'it': 'Etichettatura sequenziale semi-supervisionata con modelli di linguaggio bidirezionale', 'kk': 'Екінші тіл үлгілерімен жарты бақылау реттегі', 'lt': 'Puspriežiūros sekos ženklinimas dvikrypčiais kalbos modeliais', 'mk': 'Половина-надгледувано одбележување на секвенца со дводрекционални јазички модели', 'ms': 'Tag jujukan semi-mengawasi dengan model bahasa bidireksi', 'mt': 'Tagging tas-sekwenza semisorveljata b’mudelli lingwistiċi bidirezzjonali', 'mn': 'Хоёр дахь удирдлагатай дарааллыг хоёр дахь хэл загвартай тэмдэглэх', 'ml': 'സെമി- സൂക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് ബിടിര്\u200dട്ടെര്\u200dഷന്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള', 'no': 'Halvoversikt sekvensmerking med bidirectional language models', 'pl': 'Tagowanie sekwencji pół-nadzorowane za pomocą dwukierunkowych modeli językowych', 'ro': 'Etichetare secvențială semisupravegheată cu modele lingvistice bidirecționale', 'sr': 'Pola nadzorne sekvence označavanje sa dvodirektivnim jezičkim modelima', 'si': 'බිදිරික්ෂණ භාෂා මොඩේල් එක්ක අධිපරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Semi-supervised sequence tagging with bidirectional language models', 'sv': 'Halvövervakad sekvensmärkning med tvåriktade språkmodeller', 'ta': 'பாதி- கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர் ஒட்டுதல் பிடிடிடர் மொழி மாதிரிகளுடன்', 'ur': 'نصف-supervised sequence tagging with bidirectional language models', 'uz': 'dictionary variant', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Полунадзорно маркиране на последователност с двупосочни езикови модели', 'hr': 'Polovično nadzirana sekvencija označavanja s dvodirektivnim jezičkim modelima', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised sequence tagging met bidirectionele taalmodellen', 'da': 'Semiovervåget sekvensmærkning med todejede sprogmodeller', 'de': 'Halbüberwachte Sequenz-Tagging mit bidirektionalen Sprachmodellen', 'id': 'Hali-supervised sequence tagging dengan model bahasa bidireksi', 'ko': '양방향 언어 모델 기반의 반감독 시퀀스 표시', 'fa': 'رده\u200cهای نیمه مراقبت با مدل\u200cهای زبان دوچرخه', 'sw': 'Kiungo cha mfululizo kinachochunguzwa na mifano ya lugha', 'tr': 'Çot gözlemli hatlary 2 görnöş dili modelleri bilen etitlenýän', 'sq': 'Sekuenca gjysmë e mbikqyrur me modele gjuhësh dy-drejtuese', 'af': 'Semi- superviseerde volgorde merking met bidirectional taal models', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Երկու ուղղությամբ լեզվի մոդելներով կիսակառավարվող հաջորդականությունը', 'az': 'Yar캼-g칬zl톛yirli s캼ralar, iki dil modell톛ri il톛 etiketl톛yici', 'bn': 'বিটারেক্টরিয়াল ভাষার মডেল দিয়ে সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং', 'bs': 'Pola nadzorne sekvence označavanje sa dvodirektivnim jezičkim modelima', 'ca': 'Etiquetatge de seqüències semisupervisades amb models de llenguatge bidireccionals', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega järjestuse sildistamine kahesuunaliste keelemudelitega', 'cs': 'Semi-supervised sekvence taging s obousměrnými jazykovými modely', 'fi': 'Puoli valvottu sekvenssimallennus kaksisuuntaisilla kielimalleilla', 'jv': 'section', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovano označevanje zaporedja z dvosmernimi jezikovnimi modeli', 'ha': 'Semi-supervised sequence tagging with bidirectional language models', 'he': 'סימני רצף שמבוטחים בחצי עם דוגמני שפה שתיים כיוונים', 'bo': 'རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་ལྟར་བཀོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained word embeddings learned from unlabeled text have become a standard component of neural network architectures for NLP tasks. However, in most cases, the recurrent network that operates on word-level representations to produce context sensitive representations is trained on relatively little labeled data. In this paper, we demonstrate a general semi-supervised approach for adding pretrained context embeddings from bidirectional language models to NLP systems and apply it to sequence labeling tasks. We evaluate our model on two standard datasets for named entity recognition (NER) and chunking, and in both cases achieve state of the art results, surpassing previous systems that use other forms of transfer or joint learning with additional labeled data and task specific gazetteers.', 'ar': 'أصبحت حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا والمكتسبة من النص غير المصنف مكونًا قياسيًا في بنيات الشبكة العصبية لمهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، في معظم الحالات ، يتم تدريب الشبكة المتكررة التي تعمل على التمثيلات على مستوى الكلمات لإنتاج تمثيلات حساسة للسياق على بيانات قليلة نسبيًا. في هذه الورقة ، نعرض نهجًا عامًا شبه خاضع للإشراف لإضافة زخارف سياق محددة مسبقًا من نماذج اللغة ثنائية الاتجاه إلى أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية وتطبيقها على مهام وضع العلامات على التسلسل. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا على مجموعتي بيانات قياسيتين للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) والتقسيم ، وفي كلتا الحالتين نحقق أحدث النتائج ، متجاوزين الأنظمة السابقة التي تستخدم أشكالًا أخرى من النقل أو التعلم المشترك مع بيانات إضافية معنونة ومعاجم محددة للمهام.', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas aprendidas a partir de texto sin etiqueta se han convertido en un componente estándar de las arquitecturas de redes neuronales para las tareas de PNL. Sin embargo, en la mayoría de los casos, la red recurrente que opera en representaciones a nivel de palabras para producir representaciones sensibles al contexto se entrena con datos relativamente poco etiquetados. En este artículo, demostramos un enfoque general semisupervisado para agregar incorporaciones de contexto preentrenadas de modelos de lenguaje bidireccionales a sistemas de PNL y aplicarlo a tareas de etiquetado de secuencias. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en dos conjuntos de datos estándar para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) y la fragmentación y, en ambos casos, logramos resultados de vanguardia, superando a los sistemas anteriores que utilizaban otras formas de transferencia o aprendizaje conjunto con datos etiquetados adicionales y diccionarios geográficos específicos de tareas.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots préentraînées apprises à partir de texte non étiqueté sont devenues un composant standard des architectures de réseaux neuronaux pour les tâches de PNL. Cependant, dans la plupart des cas, le réseau récurrent qui fonctionne sur des représentations au niveau des mots pour produire des représentations sensibles au contexte est formé sur relativement peu de données étiquetées. Dans cet article, nous démontrons une approche semi-supervisée générale pour ajouter des intégrations de contexte préentraînées à partir de modèles de langage bidirectionnels aux systèmes de PNL et l'appliquer à des tâches d'étiquetage de séquence. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur deux ensembles de données standard pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) et le découpage, et dans les deux cas, nous obtenons des résultats de pointe, surpassant les systèmes précédents qui utilisaient d'autres formes de transfert ou d'apprentissage conjoint avec des données étiquetées supplémentaires et des nomenclatures spécifiques à des tâches.", 'pt': 'As incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas aprendidas com texto não rotulado tornaram-se um componente padrão das arquiteturas de rede neural para tarefas de PNL. No entanto, na maioria dos casos, a rede recorrente que opera em representações em nível de palavra para produzir representações sensíveis ao contexto é treinada em dados relativamente pouco rotulados. Neste artigo, demonstramos uma abordagem geral semi-supervisionada para adicionar embeddings de contexto pré-treinados de modelos de linguagem bidirecionais a sistemas de PNL e aplicá-la a tarefas de rotulagem de sequência. Avaliamos nosso modelo em dois conjuntos de dados padrão para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) e agrupamento e, em ambos os casos, alcançamos resultados de última geração, superando sistemas anteriores que usam outras formas de transferência ou aprendizado conjunto com dados rotulados adicionais e dicionários geográficos de tarefas específicas.', 'ja': 'ラベル付けされていないテキストから学習された事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込みは、NLPタスクのためのニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャの標準的なコンポーネントになっています。しかしながら、ほとんどの場合、文脈に敏感な表現を生成するために単語レベルの表現で動作する反復ネットワークは、比較的少ないラベル付けされたデータで訓練される。本稿では、双方向言語モデルからNLPシステムに事前訓練された文脈埋め込みを追加し、シーケンスラベルタリングタスクに適用するための一般的な半監督アプローチを示す。私たちは、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）とチャンキングのための2つの標準データセットに基づいてモデルを評価し、両方の場合において、追加のラベル付けされたデータとタスク固有の地名辞典を使用して他の形式の転送または共同学習を使用する以前のシステムを上回る最先端の結果を達成します。', 'zh': '未尝标本预训练词嵌已为NLP任神经网络架构格组件。 然大众者,单词上行以成上下文敏网络少标数也。 于本文中演示了一种通用的半监督法,用将自己双向言语模形的预练上下文嵌入添加到NLP系统,并将其应用于序列标记职务。 吾于两率集上估吾形势,以名实识(NER)、分块,而皆得其先进之效,越其移合之统,及额外之标数、任特定之地名词典。', 'hi': 'अनलेबल किए गए पाठ से सीखे गए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का एक मानक घटक बन गए हैं। हालांकि, ज्यादातर मामलों में, आवर्तक नेटवर्क जो संदर्भ संवेदनशील प्रतिनिधित्व का उत्पादन करने के लिए शब्द-स्तर के प्रतिनिधित्व पर संचालित होता है, अपेक्षाकृत कम लेबल किए गए डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित होता है। इस पेपर में, हम एनएलपी सिस्टम में द्विदिश भाषा मॉडल से प्रीट्रेन्डेड संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग को जोड़ने के लिए एक सामान्य अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोण प्रदर्शित करते हैं और इसे अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्यों पर लागू करते हैं। हम नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) और चंकिंग के लिए दो मानक डेटासेट पर अपने मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और दोनों मामलों में कला परिणामों की स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं, पिछले सिस्टम को पार करते हैं जो अतिरिक्त लेबल किए गए डेटा और कार्य विशिष्ट गजेटियर के साथ हस्तांतरण या संयुक्त सीखने के अन्य रूपों का उपयोग करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные вставки слов, извлеченные из немаркированного текста, стали стандартным компонентом архитектур нейронных сетей для задач NLP. Однако в большинстве случаев повторяющаяся сеть, которая работает на уровне слов для создания контекстно-зависимых представлений, обучена относительно небольшому количеству помеченных данных. В этой статье мы демонстрируем общий полунадзорный подход к добавлению предварительно обученных контекстных вложений из двунаправленных языковых моделей в системы NLP и применяем его к задачам маркировки последовательностей. Мы оцениваем нашу модель на двух стандартных наборах данных для распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) и группирования, и в обоих случаях достигаем современных результатов, превосходя предыдущие системы, которые используют другие формы передачи или совместного обучения с дополнительными маркированными данными и справочниками по конкретным задачам.', 'ga': "Tá leabaithe focal réamhoilte a foghlaimíodh ó théacs neamhlipéadaithe tar éis teacht chun bheith ina chomhpháirt chaighdeánach d'ailtireacht líonra néarúil le haghaidh tascanna NLP. I bhformhór na gcásanna, áfach, is beag sonraí lipéadaithe a chuirtear oiliúint ar an ngréasán athfhillteach a fheidhmíonn ar uiríll ar leibhéal na bhfocal chun léiriúcháin íogaire comhthéacs a tháirgeadh. Sa pháipéar seo, léirímid cur chuige ginearálta leath-mhaoirsithe chun leabú comhthéacs réamhoilte ó mhúnlaí teanga déthreocha a chur le córais NLP agus é a chur i bhfeidhm ar thascanna lipéadaithe seichimh. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla ar dhá thacar sonraí caighdeánacha le haghaidh aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe (NER) agus smután, agus sa dá chás seo torthaí den scoth a bhaint amach, ag dul thar córais roimhe seo a úsáideann cineálacha eile aistrithe nó comhfhoghlama le sonraí lipéadaithe breise agus gazetteers tasc-shonracha.", 'el': 'Οι προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που μαθαίνονται από κείμενο χωρίς ετικέτα έχουν γίνει ένα τυποποιημένο συστατικό των αρχιτεκτονικών νευρωνικών δικτύων για εργασίες ΝΛΠ. Ωστόσο, στις περισσότερες περιπτώσεις, το επαναλαμβανόμενο δίκτυο που λειτουργεί σε αναπαραστάσεις σε επίπεδο λέξεων για να παράγει αναπαραστάσεις ευαίσθητες στο πλαίσιο εκπαιδεύεται σε σχετικά λίγα επισημασμένα δεδομένα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε μια γενική προσέγγιση ημι-εποπτευόμενη για την προσθήκη προκαθορισμένων ενσωμάτωσης περιβάλλοντος από αμφίδρομη γλωσσικά μοντέλα σε συστήματα και την εφαρμογή σε εργασίες επισήμανσης ακολουθίας. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας σε δύο τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων για αναγνώριση ονομαστών οντοτήτων (και σε δύο περιπτώσεις επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ξεπερνώντας τα προηγούμενα συστήματα που χρησιμοποιούν άλλες μορφές μεταφοράς ή κοινής μάθησης με πρόσθετα επισημασμένα δεδομένα και ειδικά δελτία εργασίας.', 'hu': 'A címke nélküli szövegből tanult előre képzett szóbeágyazások a neurális hálózati architektúrák szabványos összetevőjévé váltak az NLP feladatok számára. A legtöbb esetben azonban a szószintű reprezentációkon működő visszatérő hálózat, amely kontextusérzékeny reprezentációkat készít, viszonylag kevés címkézett adatokra képezi. Ebben a tanulmányban egy általános, félig felügyelt megközelítést mutatunk be a kétirányú nyelvi modellek előzetes kontextusbeágyazásainak hozzáadására és alkalmazására az NLP rendszerekhez. Modellünket két szabványos adatkészleten értékeljük a nevezett entitás felismerésére (NER) és a chunking számára, és mindkét esetben a legkorszerűbb eredményeket érjük el, felülmúlva a korábbi rendszereket, amelyek más formákat használnak a transzfer vagy közös tanulás további címkézett adatokkal és feladatspecifikus lapokkal.', 'ka': 'წინ შესწავლილი სიტყვების შემოწმება, რომელიც არ შესწავლილი ტექსტიდან მოსწავლილი, NLP დავალებებისთვის ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურების სტანდარტ მაგრამ, უფრო მეტად შემთხვევაში, რეკურენტი ქსელი, რომელიც სიტყვების დონეზე გამოყენებულია, რომ კონტექსტური სიგრძნობითი გამოყენებების გამოყენებას შემდე ჩვენ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ საერთო ნახევარწმუნებული პროგრამის დამატებისთვის პროგრამის კონტექსტის დამატებისთვის საერთო ენის მოდელებიდან NLP სისტემაში და ამას გამოყენებთ მუშაობ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს ორი სტანდარტული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის (NER) და კონფიგურაციისთვის გავამუშავებთ, და ორივე შემთხვევაში იქნება ხელოვნების წინასწორების სტანდარტული სისტემის სხვა ფორმები, რომელიც გამ', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate apprese dal testo non etichettato sono diventate una componente standard delle architetture di rete neurale per le attività NLP. Tuttavia, nella maggior parte dei casi, la rete ricorrente che opera su rappresentazioni a livello di parola per produrre rappresentazioni sensibili al contesto è addestrata su dati etichettati relativamente poco. In questo articolo, mostriamo un approccio generale semi-supervisionato per aggiungere incorporazioni di contesto pre-addestrate dai modelli di linguaggio bidirezionale ai sistemi NLP e applicarlo alle attività di etichettatura di sequenza. Valutiamo il nostro modello su due set di dati standard per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NER) e il chunking, e in entrambi i casi raggiungiamo risultati all'avanguardia, superando i sistemi precedenti che utilizzano altre forme di trasferimento o apprendimento congiunto con dati etichettati aggiuntivi e gazzetter specifici per compiti.", 'kk': 'Мәтіннен үйренілген алдындағы сөздерді ендіру NLP тапсырмаларының стандартты NLP желінің архитектураларының стандартты компоненті болды. Бірақ көпшілігінде сөз деңгейіндегі қайталанатын желі контексті мәліметтерді жасау үшін қайталанатын мәліметтер сәйкес кішкентай жарлық деректеріне оқылған. Бұл қағазда, біз жарты бақылау тәсілдерін NLP жүйелеріне қосу үшін жарты бақылау тәсілдерін көрсету және оны белгілеу тапсырмаларына қосу үшін жарты бақылау тәсілдерін көрсетедік. Біз үлгілерімізді (NER) және бөлшектеу үшін екі стандартты деректер жинақтарында бағалаймыз. Екі жағдайда суреттің нәтижесінің күйін жеткіземіз, басқа аудару немесе біріктірілген оқыту үшін қосымша деректер мен тапсырмалар ті', 'mk': 'Претренираните вградувања на зборови научени од неозначен текст станаа стандарден компонент на архитектурите на нервната мрежа за задачите на NLP. Сепак, во повеќето случаи, рецидентната мрежа која функционира на претставувања на ниво на зборови за производство на контекстни чувствителни претставувања е обучена на релативно мали обележани податоци. In this paper, we demonstrate a general semi-supervised approach for adding pretrained context embeddings from bidirectional language models to NLP systems and apply it to sequence labeling tasks.  Го проценуваме нашиот модел на два стандардни датотеки за препознавање на именуваните ентитети (НЕР) и делови, и во двата случаи постигнуваме најсовремени резултати, надминувајќи ги претходните системи кои користат други форми на трансфер или заедничко учење со дополнителни обележани податоци и', 'lt': 'Išankstinio mokymo žodžių įdėjimai, išmokti iš pažymėto teksto, tapo standartiniu NLP užduočių neuralinių tinklų architektūros komponentu. Tačiau daugeliu atvejų pakartotinis tinklas, kuris veikia žodžių lygmens atstovavimais, kad būtų sukurti konteksto jautrūs atstovavimai, mokomas palyginti mažai paženklintų duomenų. Šiame dokumente parodomi bendras pusiau prižiūrimas požiūris į tai, kad į NLP sistemas įtraukiami iš anksto parengti dvikrypčių kalbų modelių kontekstai ir taikomi juos sekos ženklinimo užduotims. Vertiname savo model į pagal du standartinius duomenų rinkinius, skirtus vardiniam subjektui pripažinti (NER) ir suskirstyti, ir abiem atvejais pasiekti naujausius rezultatus, viršijant ankstesnes sistemas, kurios naudoja kitas perdavimo ar bendro mokymosi formas su papildomais pažymėtais duomenimis ir konkrečių užduočių laikraščiais.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran perkataan terlatih-terlatih yang belajar dari teks tanpa label telah menjadi komponen piawai arkitektur rangkaian saraf untuk tugas NLP. Bagaimanapun, dalam kebanyakan kes, rangkaian berulang yang beroperasi pada perwakilan aras perkataan untuk menghasilkan perwakilan sensitif konteks dilatih pada data bernilai relatif sedikit. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan pendekatan biasa setengah-mengawasi untuk menambah penyampaian konteks yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dari model bahasa bidireksi ke sistem NLP dan melaksanakannya pada tugas pencetakan urutan. Kami menilai model kami pada dua set data piawai untuk pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) dan potongan, dan dalam kedua-dua kes mencapai keputusan state of the art, melebihi sistem terdahulu yang menggunakan bentuk lain pemindahan atau pembelajaran kongsi dengan data ditabel tambahan dan gazet khusus tugas.', 'ml': 'ലേബില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പഠിപ്പില്ലാത്ത പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകള്\u200d NLP ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d  എന്നാലും, ഏറ്റവും കാര്യങ്ങളിലും, വാക്ക്- നില പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന വെര്\u200dഡ് നില പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ശേഖര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൊതുവായി സെമി-നെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ മ സാധാരണ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും ചങ്കിങ്ങിങ്ങിനും പേരുള്ള രണ്ട് സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. രണ്ട് കാര്യങ്ങളിലും കലാകൃത്യങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet bil-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel imgħallma minn test mhux immarkat saru komponent standard ta’ arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali għall-kompiti NLP. Madankollu, fil-biċċa l-kbira tal-każijiet, in-netwerk rikorrenti li jopera fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet fil-livell tal-kliem biex jipproduċi rappreżentazzjonijiet sensittivi fil-kuntest huwa mħarreġ fuq dejta relattivament ftit ittikkettata. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nippruvaw approċċ ġenerali semisuperviż għaż-żieda ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kuntest imħarrġa minn qabel minn mudelli lingwistiċi bidirezzjonali mas-sistemi NLP u napplikawh għal kompiti ta’ sekwenza ta’ tikkettar. We evaluate our model on two standard datasets for named entity recognition (NER) and chunking, and in both cases achieve state of the art results, surpassing previous systems that use other forms of transfer or joint learning with additional labeled data and task specific gazetteers.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын үгнээс суралцагдаггүй текстээс суралцагдсан үгнүүд нь NLP ажлын мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудын стандарт компонент болсон. Гэвч ихэнх тохиолдолд, үгний түвшинд ажилладаг дахин дахин ашигладаг сүлжээ нь харьцангуй жижиг хэлбэртэй өгөгдлийн талаар сургалт хийгддэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр дахь хэл загвараас NLP систем руу шилжүүлж, дарааллын маркингийн даалгавруудыг нэмэхэд төвөгтэй хагас удирдлагатай аргыг харуулж байна. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг хоёр стандарт өгөгдлийн санд (НЕР) нэртэй хүлээн зөвшөөрөх (НЕР) болон хуваалцах, хоёр тохиолдолд урлагийн үр дүнг гаргадаг. Өмнөх систем нь өөр шилжүүлэлт, хамтран суралцах болон нэмэлт нэмэлт өгөгдлийн, аж', 'no': 'Førehandsvis ordinnbygging lært frå ubeabelte tekst har blitt ein standard komponent av neuralnettverksarkitekturar for NLP- oppgåver. I dei fleste tilfellene er det gjentakelige nettverket som fungerer på ordnivårepresentasjonar for å produsera kontekstsensitiv representasjonar trenga på relativt lite merkelige data. I denne papiret viser vi ein generell halvoversikt tilnærming for å leggja til fleire kontekstinnbygging frå bidireksjonale språk- modeller til NLP- systemar og bruka det til sekvensmerking av oppgåver. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt på to standard datasett for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet (NER) og bryting, og i begge tilfelle går tilstand til kunstresultatet, over førre systemar som brukar andre formar av overføring eller felles læring med ekstra merkelige data og oppgåvelinjer.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte pre-instruite învățate din text fără etichete au devenit o componentă standard a arhitecturilor de rețea neurală pentru sarcinile PNL. Cu toate acestea, în majoritatea cazurilor, rețeaua recurentă care operează pe reprezentări la nivel de cuvânt pentru a produce reprezentări sensibile la context este instruită pe date etichetate relativ puțin. În această lucrare, demonstrăm o abordare generală semi-supravegheată pentru adăugarea de încorporări de context pre-instruite de la modele de limbaj bidirecțional la sistemele NLP și aplicarea acesteia la sarcinile de etichetare a secvențelor. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe două seturi de date standard pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) și chunking și, în ambele cazuri, obținem rezultate de ultimă generație, depășind sistemele anterioare care utilizează alte forme de transfer sau învățare comună cu date suplimentare etichetate și publicatoare specifice sarcinilor.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów nauczone z nieoznakowanego tekstu stały się standardowym komponentem architektur sieci neuronowych dla zadań NLP. Jednak w większości przypadków sieć powtarzająca się, która działa na poziomie słów w celu wytwarzania reprezentacji wrażliwych na kontekście, jest szkolona na stosunkowo małej ilości etykietowanych danych. W niniejszym artykule demonstrujemy ogólne podejście pół-nadzorowane do dodawania wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń kontekstu z dwukierunkowych modeli językowych do systemów NLP i zastosowania go do zadań etykietowania sekwencji. Oceniamy nasz model na dwóch standardowych zbiorach danych dla rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek (NER) i chunkingu, a w obu przypadkach osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki, przewyższając poprzednie systemy wykorzystujące inne formy transferu lub wspólnego uczenia się z dodatkowymi oznaczonymi danymi i gazeterami specyficznymi dla zadań.', 'sr': 'Pre obučene reèi ukljuèene su iz nenabeliranog teksta postale standardna komponenta neuralne mreže arhitekture za NLP zadataka. Međutim, u većini slučajeva, rekonstruirana mreža koja radi na predstavljanju razine riječi kako bi proizvela osjetljive predstave konteksta obučena je na relativno malo označenih podataka. U ovom papiru pokazujemo generalan polu-nadzorni pristup za dodavanje kontekstskih integracija iz dvodirektivnih jezičkih modela na NLP sisteme i primjenjivanje je na sekvencijski zadatak označavanja. Procjenjujemo naš model na dva standardna seta podataka za priznanje entiteta (NER) i razmjenu, i u oba slučaja postignemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti, prelazeći prethodne sisteme koji koriste druge forme prebacivanja ili zajedničkog učenja sa dodatnim označenim podacima i posebnim novinarima zadataka.', 'so': 'Hadalka horay loo tababariyey oo laga bartay text aan la labeyn waxay noqdeen qayb caadi ah oo ka mid ah dhismaha internetka neural ee shaqada NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sida badan shabakadda soo socda ee ku shaqeeya heerka hadalka si uu u sameeyo noocyada xilsaarka ah waxaa lagu baraa macluumaad yar oo la qoray. Qoraalkan waxaynu muujinnaa qaab caadi ah oo la ilaaliyey si aan ugu darayno qalabka qofka ka soo baxsan modellada luuqada bideer ah oo aan u dalbanno nidaamka NLP-da, waxaana ku dalbannaa shuqullada labelinta dabadeed. Tusaalkayaga waxaan ku qiimeynayaa labada sawirada ee caadiga ah ee lagu magacaabay aqoonsiga entity (NER) iyo dhaqdhaqaaqinta, labada xaaladood waxay gaadhaan xaalad ka mid ah arimaha farshaxanka, taasoo ku baaraya nidaamka hore oo isticmaalaya qaab kale oo la wareejiyo ama iskuul wadajir ah oo lagu qorayo macluumaad dheeraad ah iyo shaqo gaar ah.', 'sv': 'Förtränade ordinbäddningar som lärts sig från omärkt text har blivit en standardkomponent i neurala nätverksarkitekturer för NLP-uppgifter. I de flesta fall utbildas dock det återkommande nätverket som arbetar på ordnivårepresentationer för att producera kontextkänsliga representationer på relativt lite märkta data. I denna uppsats demonstrerar vi en allmän halvövervakad metod för att lägga till förkränade kontextinbäddningar från tvåriktade språkmodeller till NLP-system och tillämpa det på sekvensmärkningsuppgifter. Vi utvärderar vår modell på två standarddatauppsättningar för namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) och chunking, och i båda fallen uppnår vi toppmoderna resultat, överträffar tidigare system som använder andra former av överföring eller gemensamt lärande med ytterligare märkta data och uppgiftsspecifika tidskrifter.', 'si': 'Name නමුත්, බොහොම අවස්ථාවයේදී, වාර්තාවක් ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නම් සාමාන්\u200dය අධ්\u200dයාපනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණ අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ නම් අයිති අයිතිකරණය (NER) සහ චන්කින්ස් වෙනුවෙන් අපේ මොඩල් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අයිති අයිති පද්ධතියේ ස්ථිතියේ වි', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடாத உரையிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட முன் பயிற்சி வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்கள் NLP பணிகளுக்கு ஒரு நிலையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உர ஆனால், பெரும்பாலான நிலையில், சொல்ல- மட்டத்தின் குறிப்புகளை உருவாக்க செயல்படுத்தும் நிகழ்வு வலைப்பின்னல் இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட செயலை காட்டுகிறோம் மொழி மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து சேர்க்கும் பொதுவான முறைமையை NLP நாங்கள் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER) மற்றும் சுட்டிக்கும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட இரண்டு இயல்பான தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். இரு நிலைகளிலும் கலை முடிவுகள்', 'ur': 'نئورل نیٹ ورک ایکسٹریکٹ کے لئے نئورل نیٹ ورک ایکسٹریکٹ کا استاندارڈ بن گیا ہے۔ However, in most cases, the recurrent network that operates on word-level representations to produce context sensitive representations is trained on relatively little labeled data. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک عمومی نصف نظارت کی طریقہ دکھاتے ہیں جن کے لئے پرٹرینڈ کنٹرینڈ کے مطابق مطابق مطابق زبان مدلکوں سے NLP سیسٹموں تک اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اور اسے لیبلینگ کے مطابق لکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اپنے مدل کو دو استاندارد ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ ایک ٹیٹ کی شناسایی (NER) اور چانچینگ کے لئے مقرر کیا ہے، اور دونوں موقعہ میں آرت نتیجے کا موقع پہنچا جاتا ہے، پہلے سیستموں سے زیادہ گزر جاتا ہے جو دوسرے فرموں کا انتقال یا جوڑ کی تعلیم کے ساتھ اضا', 'uz': "Name Lekin, ko'pchilik holatda, soʻzning darajadagi taʼminlovchi tarmoqni taʼminlovchi qisqa yordam maʼlumotdan foydalanadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz birinchi tilning modellaridan qo'shilgan qismni qo'shish uchun umumiy taʼminlovchi tilni NLP tizimga qo'shish va bu vazifalarni qo'llash uchun qo'llash mumkin. Biz quyidagi tashkilotni tasdiqlash (NER) va kuchlash uchun ikkita standard maʼlumot tarkibini qiymatmiz. Bu ikkita holatda, sanam natijalarini bajaradi, boshqa shakllar bilan uzish yoki bir nechta o'rganish uchun boshqa maʼlumot va vazifa hodisa gazeti bilan foydalanadigan tizimlarni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Những từ ngữ được huấn luyện trước khi học được từ văn bản chưa được lắp ráp đã trở thành thành thành một thành phần cấu trúc mạng thần kinh cho công việc Njala. Tuy nhiên, trong phần lớn trường hợp, mạng lưới thường xuyên hoạt động trên các đài phát ngôn từ để sản xuất các biểu hiện nhạy cảm ngữ cảnh được đào tạo dựa trên ít dữ liệu được đánh dấu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chứng minh một phương pháp bán giám sát chung để thêm những tác nhân ngoại hình từ các mô hình ngôn ngữ sinh lý cho đến hệ thống NLP và áp dụng nó vào các nhiệm vụ phân loại. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi dựa trên hai bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho việc nhận dạng thực thể tên (NER) và khoanh vùng, và cả hai trường hợp đạt được kết quả hiện đại, vượt qua hệ thống trước, sử dụng các dạng khác để chuyển nhượng hay học chung với các tạp chí khác với các công cụ nghiên cứu nhiệm vụ.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените вграждания на думи, научени от незабелязан текст, се превърнаха в стандартен компонент на архитектурите на невронните мрежи за задачи от НЛП. Въпреки това, в повечето случаи повтарящата се мрежа, която работи върху представяне на ниво дума за създаване на чувствителни към контекста изображения, се обучава върху относително малко етикетирани данни. В тази статия демонстрираме общ полунадзорен подход за добавяне на предварително обучени контекстни вграждания от двупосочни езикови модели към системи за НЛП и го прилагаме към задачи за етикетиране на последователността. Ние оценяваме нашия модел на два стандартни набора от данни за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР) и групиране, и в двата случая постигаме най-съвременни резултати, надминавайки предишни системи, които използват други форми на трансфер или съвместно обучение с допълнителни етикетирани данни и специфични за задачата брошури.', 'da': 'Forududdannede ordindlejringer, der læres af ikke-mærket tekst, er blevet en standardkomponent i neurale netværksarkitekturer til NLP-opgaver. Men i de fleste tilfælde er det tilbagevendende netværk, der opererer på ordrepræsentationer for at producere kontekstfølsomme repræsentationer, trænet på relativt få mærkede data. I denne artikel demonstrerer vi en generel semi-overvåget tilgang til at tilføje forudtrænede kontekst indlejringer fra bidirektionelle sprogmodeller til NLP-systemer og anvende den til sekvensmærkningsopgaver. Vi evaluerer vores model på to standarddatasæt for navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER) og chunking og opnår i begge tilfælde topmoderne resultater, der overgår tidligere systemer, der bruger andre former for overførsel eller fælles læring med yderligere mærkede data og opgavespecifikke tidsskrifter.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide woordinsluitingen die geleerd zijn van niet-gelabelde tekst zijn een standaard onderdeel geworden van neurale netwerkarchitecturen voor NLP-taken. In de meeste gevallen wordt het terugkerende netwerk dat werkt op woordniveau representaties om contextgevoelige representaties te produceren, echter getraind op relatief weinig gelabelde gegevens. In dit artikel demonstreren we een algemene semi-supervised aanpak voor het toevoegen van vooraf getrainde context embeddings van bidirectionele taalmodellen aan NLP-systemen en toepassen deze op sequentie labeling taken. We evalueren ons model op twee standaard datasets voor naamloze entiteitsherkenning (NER) en chunking, en in beide gevallen bereiken we state-of-the-art resultaten, die eerdere systemen overtreffen die andere vormen van overdracht of gezamenlijk leren gebruiken met extra gelabelde gegevens en taakspecifieke gazetters.', 'hr': 'Prije obučenih učenja riječi koje su učene iz nenabeliranog teksta postale su standardna komponenta neuralne mreže arhitekture za NLP zadatke. Međutim, u većini slučajeva, povratna mreža koja djeluje na predstavljanju razine riječi kako bi proizvela osjetljive predstave konteksta obučena je na relativno malim označenim podacima. U ovom papiru pokazujemo opći polu-nadzorni pristup dodavanju pretkišnih kontekstskih integracija iz bidirektivnih jezičkih modela na NLP sustave i primjenjujemo ga na sekvencijski zadatak označavanja. Procjenjujemo naš model na dva standardna seta podataka za priznanje imena entiteta (NER) i razmjenu, i u oba slučaja postignemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti, prelazeći prethodne sustave koji koriste druge oblike prijenosa ili zajedničkog učenja s dodatnim označenim podacima i posebnim novinarima zadataka.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Worteinbettungen, die aus nicht beschriftetem Text gelernt werden, sind zu einem Standardbestandteil neuronaler Netzwerkarchitekturen für NLP-Aufgaben geworden. In den meisten Fällen wird jedoch das wiederkehrende Netzwerk, das auf Word-Level-Repräsentationen arbeitet, um kontextsensitive Repräsentationen zu erzeugen, auf relativ wenig beschrifteten Daten trainiert. In diesem Beitrag demonstrieren wir einen allgemeinen semi-überwachten Ansatz, um prätrainierte Kontexteinbettungen aus bidirektionalen Sprachmodellen zu NLP-Systemen hinzuzufügen und auf Sequenz-Labeling-Aufgaben anzuwenden. Wir evaluieren unser Modell auf zwei Standarddatensätzen für Named Entity Recognition (NER) und Chunking und erzielen in beiden Fällen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse, die bisherige Systeme, die andere Formen des Transfers oder gemeinsamen Lernens mit zusätzlichen markierten Daten und aufgabenspezifischen Gazettern verwenden, übertreffen.', 'id': 'Pencampuran kata yang dilatih-dilatih belajar dari teks tanpa label telah menjadi komponen standar dari arsitektur jaringan saraf untuk tugas NLP. Namun, dalam kebanyakan kasus, jaringan berulang yang beroperasi pada representation tingkat kata untuk menghasilkan representation sensitif konteks dilatih pada data yang relatif sedikit ditabel. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan pendekatan umum yang semi-supervised untuk menambahkan konteks yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dari model bahasa bidireksi ke sistem NLP dan menerapkannya untuk urutan tugas label. Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada dua set data standar untuk pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) dan potongan, dan dalam kedua kasus mencapai hasil terbaik, melebihi sistem sebelumnya yang menggunakan bentuk lain transfer atau belajar kongsi dengan data yang ditandai tambahan dan gazet spesifik tugas.', 'ko': '텍스트에 표시되지 않은 미리 훈련된 단어가 NLP 임무 신경 네트워크 아키텍처의 표준 구성 요소가 되었습니다.그러나 대다수 상황에서 단어급 표시를 조작하여 상하문에 민감한 표시를 생성하는 순환 네트워크는 상대적으로 적은 표기 데이터에서 훈련된 것이다.본고에서 우리는 양방향 언어 모델의 예비 훈련 상하문을 NLP 시스템에 삽입하고 이를 서열 표기 작업에 응용하는 통용적인 반감독 방법을 보여 주었다.명명 실체 식별(NER)과 블록을 나누는 두 표준 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델을 평가했는데 이 두 가지 상황에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다. 이전에 다른 형식의 이전이나 연합 학습, 표기 데이터와 특정한 임무에 대한 지명록을 추가한 시스템을 능가했다.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla yaliyojifunza kutokana na ujumbe usioeleweka umekuwa sehemu ya kiwango cha majengo ya mitandao ya kijamii kwa kazi za NLP. Hata hivyo, katika matukio mengi, mtandao unaoendelea unaoendelea kwenye uwakilishi wa ngazi za maneno ili kutengeneza maoni yenye uchunguzi wa muktadha unafundishwa kwa takwimu chache zilizoonyeshwa. Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha mbinu za jumla zilizofuatiliwa kwa ajili ya kuongeza muktadha wa mazingira yanayotangazwa kutoka mifumo ya lugha za kivitambaa hadi mfumo wa NLP na kuitumia kazi za kutangaza maabara. Tutathmini mifano yetu katika seti mbili za taarifa za kiwango cha kawaida kwa jina la kutambua entity (NER) na kufungiwa, na katika hali zote hizo tunafanikiwa hali ya matokeo ya sanaa, kupitia mifumo iliyopita yanayotumia aina nyingine za usafirishaji au kujifunza pamoja na taarifa za ziada zinazoonyeshwa na majarida maalum.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمات پیش آموزش یاد گرفته از متن غیرقابل استاندارد از معماری شبکه عصبی برای کارهای NLP تبدیل شدند. ولی در اکثر موارد، شبکه بازگشتی که روی نمایش\u200cهای سطح کلمه عملکرد برای تولید نمایش\u200cهای حساسی محیط بر داده\u200cهای نسبتا کوچک برچسب آموزش داده می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش نیمه مراقبت عمومی را نشان می دهیم که برای اضافه کردن موقعیت\u200cهای مختلف از مدل\u200cهای زبان دوچرخه به سیستم\u200cهای NLP، اضافه می\u200cکنیم و آن را برای برچسب\u200cهای برچسب استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما مدل خود را در دو مجموعه داده استاندارد برای شناسایی یک entity (NER) و قطعه ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و در هر دو مورد موقعیت نتیجه هنر را می\u200cرسانیم، از سیستم\u200cهای قبلی که از فرم\u200cهای انتقال یا یادگیری\u200cهای متحده با داده\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای و گزارش\u200cکننده\u200cهای مشخص مورد', 'af': "Vorige onderwerp woord inbêdings geleer van ongeabelde teks het 'n standaard komponent van neurale netwerk arkitektuur geword vir NLP opdragte. Maar, in meeste gevalle, is die herhaalde netwerk wat op woord- vlak voorstellings werk om kontekssensitiewe voorstellings te produseer op relativief klein etiketeerde data opgelei. In hierdie papier, wys ons 'n algemene semi-ondersoekte toegang vir byvoeg van voorsoekte konteks inbêding van bidireksjonale taal modelle na NLP stelsels en toewend dit na reeks etiketting opdragte. Ons evalueer ons model op twee standaard datastelle vir genaamde entiteiterkenning (NER) en blokking, en in beide gevalle verkry staat van die kuns resultate, oorvloediging van vorige stelsels wat ander vorms van oordrag of joint leer gebruik met addisionele etiketeerde data en taak spesifieke gazetters.", 'sq': 'Ndërtesat e paratrajnuara të fjalëve të mësuara nga teksti pa etiketë janë bërë një komponent standard i arkitekturave të rrjetit nervor për detyrat NLP. Megjithatë, në shumicën e rasteve, rrjeti i përsëritur që funksionon në përfaqësimet e nivelit të fjalëve për të prodhuar përfaqësime të ndjeshme konteksti është trajnuar në të dhëna relativisht të vogla të etiketuara. Në këtë letër, ne demonstrojmë një qasje të përgjithshme gjysmë-mbikqyrur për shtimin e përfshirjeve të kontekstit të parastërvitur nga modelet e gjuhës dy-drejtuese në sistemet NLP dhe e aplikojmë në detyrat e shënimit të sekuencës. Ne vlerësojmë model in tonë në dy grupe të dhënash standarte për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë (NER) dhe copëzimin, dhe në të dy rastet arrijmë rezultatet më të larta, duke kaluar sistemet e mëparshme që përdorin forma të tjera të transferimit apo mësimit të përbashkët me të dhënat shtesë të etiketuara dhe gazetarët specifikë të detyrave.', 'tr': 'NLP görevleri üçin öňünden okalýan söz integrleri NLP şebekleri üçin standart şebeke arhitektarlaryň bir komponenti boldy. Fakat çoğunda, kelime seviyesinde hassasiyetli ifadeleri oluşturmak için tekrarlanan ağ relativi kiçi etiket edilen verilerde eğitildi. Bu kagyzda, biz döredijilik dil nusgalaryndan NLP sistemalaryna gollaşdyrmak üçin umumy ýarym-gözleýän approach görkezilýäris we ony etiket täbliklerine uygulaýarys. Biziň modelimizi birnäçe (NER) hasaplanjak we taýýarlama üçin iki standart veri setirinde deňleýäris we her iki ýagdaýda sanat netijesinde başga bir şekilde üstünlik edýän öňki sistemlerden geçirip, üstüne etilen ýagdaý hasaplanýan data we täbli hasaplanýan gazetçiler bilen başga bir şekilde öwrenm', 'am': 'ያልታወቀ ጽሑፍ የተማረ የፊተኛውን ቃላት አቀማመጥ የናውሬል መረብ መሠረት ክፍተት የNLP ስርዓቶች መሠረት ክፍል ሆነዋል። ነገር ግን በብዙ ጉዳዮች፣ የቃላት-ደረጃ መልዕክቶች ላይ የሚሠራው የደጋሚ መረብ በጽሑፍ የተሳሳተ መረጃዎች ላይ በተለየ ጥቂት የጽሑፍ ዳታ ላይ ያስተምራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተለየ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ወደ NLP ስርዓቶች ለመጨመር የተዘጋጀውን የsemi-ተጠባባቂ ሥርዓት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ አካል ማስታወቂያውን (NER) እና ግንኙነትን እና በሁለቱም ጉዳዮች ላይ የዐርድ ፍሬዎችን አግኝተናል፣ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች በሌላ መልዕክት የተዘጋጀውን ወይም ተማር የተጠቀሙትን እና በተጨማሪው የዳታ እና የስራ ግንኙነት ጋዜጠኞቹን የሚጠይቁ ሲስተማርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետության ստանդարտ բառերի ներգրավումները, որոնք սովորել են աննշան տեքստից, դարձել են ՆՆՊ-ի առաջադրանքների համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ դեպքերում կրկնվող ցանցը, որը գործում է բառերի մակարդակի ներկայացումների վրա, որպեսզի ստեղծի կոնտեքստի զգայուն ներկայացումներ, սովորեցվում է համեմատաբար քիչ պիտակուցված տվյալների Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ընդհանուր կիսավերահսկված մոտեցում, որպեսզի ավելացնենք երկու ուղղությամբ լեզվի մոդելներից երկու կոնտեքստի ներդրումներ ՆԼՊ համակարգերին և կիրառենք այն հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու խնդիրն Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը երկու ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք օգտագործում են կոչված անհատների ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) և բաժանման համար, և երկու դեպքում հասնում են ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ, գերազանցում են նախորդ համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են փոխանցման այլ ձևեր կամ միա', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş söz içərisində öyrənilmiş mətnlərdən öyrənmiş nLP işləri üçün nöral a ğ arhitektarının standart komponenti oldu. Lakin çox olaraq, sözlərin səviyyəsində işlədən yenidən fəaliyyət şəbəkəsi məlumatlarını ürəkləmək üçün məlumatlar hiss edir. Bu kağızda, biz NLP sistemlərinə öyrəndiyimiz dil modellerindən təkrarlanmış məlumatları toplamaq üçün genel yarı-gözləmə tərzini göstərdik və onu etiketləmə işarələrinə uydururuq. Bizim modelimizi, adı ilə dəyişdirmək və dəyişdirmək üçün iki standart veri seti ilə değerləşdiririk. İkisində də sanat sonuçlarının durumunu başa çatdırır, əvvəlki sistemlərin başqa formlarını istifadə edir və yaxud əlavə etiket edilmiş verilər və işlər məqsədilə birlikdə öyrənmək üçün istifadə edirlər.', 'bs': 'Preobučene riječi koje su učene iz nenabeliranog teksta postale su standardna komponenta neuralne mreže arhitekture za NLP zadatke. Međutim, u većini slučajeva, povratna mreža koja funkcioniše na predstavljanjima na razini riječi kako bi proizvela osjetljive predstave konteksta obučena je na relativno malim označenim podacima. U ovom papiru pokazujemo opći polu-nadzorni pristup za dodavanje kontekstskih integracija iz bidirektivnih jezičkih modela u NLP-ove sisteme i primjenjivanje je na sekvencijski zadatak označavanja. Procjenjujemo naš model na dva standardna seta podataka za priznanje imena entiteta (NER) i odjeljenje, i u oba slučaja postignemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti, prelazeći prethodne sisteme koji koriste druge oblike transfera ili zajedničkog učenja sa dodatnim označenim podacima i posebnim novinarima zadataka.', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules pré-entrenades aprenguts de text no etiquetat s'han convertit en un component normal de les arquitectures de xarxa neural per a les tasques del NLP. No obstant això, en la majoria de casos, la xarxa recurrent que funciona en representacions de nivell de paraules per a produir representacions sensibles al contexte està capacitada en dades relativament poc etiquetades. En aquest paper, demostram un enfocament general semisupervisat per afegir integracions de context pré-entrenats de models de llenguatge bidireccionals als sistemes NLP i aplicar-lo a tasques d'etiquetar seqüències. Evaluam el nostre model en dos conjunts de dades estàndard per al reconeixement i fragment d'entitats anomenades (NER), i en ambdós casos aconsegueixem resultats més avançats, superant els sistemes anteriors que utilitzen altres formes de transfer ència o aprenentatge conjunt amb dades etiquetades adicionals i periodistes específics de tasques.", 'bn': 'এনএলপি কাজের জন্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর একটি স্বাভাবিক অংশ পরিণত হয়েছে। তবে বেশীরভাগ ক্ষেত্রে বার্তা স্তরের প্রতিনিধিত্বে কার্যকর নেটওয়ার্ক যা প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সাধারণ সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদর্শন করেছি যাতে প্রেমিক ভাষা মডেল থেকে এনএলপি সিস্টেম থেকে বাইডারেন্টার থেকে বিভ আমরা দুই স্থান্ডার্ডার ডাটাসেটে আমাদের মডেল মূল্য চালিয়ে দিচ্ছি যার নাম নামের বস্তু স্বীকৃতি এবং চুকিং এর জন্য, এবং এই দুটি ক্ষেত্রে শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করে, যা পূর্ববর্তী', 'cs': 'Předškolené vkládání slov naučené z neznačeného textu se stalo standardní součástí architektur neuronových sítí pro úlohy NLP. Nicméně ve většině případů je opakovaná síť, která pracuje na reprezentacích na úrovni slov k produkci reprezentací citlivých na kontext, trénována na relativně málo označených dat. V tomto článku demonstrujeme obecný semi-supervisovaný přístup pro přidávání předem trénovaných kontextových vkládání z obousměrných jazykových modelů do NLP systémů a aplikaci na úlohy sekvenčního značení. Vyhodnocujeme náš model na dvou standardních datových sadách pro rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) a chunking a v obou případech dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků, které překonávají předchozí systémy využívající jiné formy přenosu nebo společného učení s dalšími označenými daty a gazetery specifickými úkoly.', 'et': 'Märgistamata tekstist õppitud eelõpetatud sõnade manustamine on muutunud NLP ülesannete närvivõrgu arhitektuuri standardkomponendiks. Enamikul juhtudel koolitatakse aga korduvat võrgustikku, mis töötab sõnatasemel esitustel kontekstitundlike esituste loomiseks suhteliselt väheste märgistatud andmete põhjal. Käesolevas töös demonstreerime üldist pooljuhitavat lähenemisviisi eeltreenitud konteksti manustamiseks kahesuunalistest keelemudelitest NLP süsteemidesse ja rakendame seda järjestuse märgistamise ülesannetele. Hindame oma mudelit kahe standardse andmekogumi põhjal nimetatud üksuste tuvastamiseks (NER) ja tükkimiseks ning saavutame mõlemal juhul tipptasemel tulemusi, ületades varasemad süsteemid, mis kasutavad teisi ülekande või ühisõppe vorme täiendavate märgistatud andmete ja ülesandespetsiifiliste väljaannetega.', 'fi': 'Merkittämättömästä tekstistä opitut esikoulutetut sanaupotukset ovat tulleet standardiksi neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurissa NLP-tehtävissä. Useimmissa tapauksissa toistuva verkosto, joka toimii sanatason esitysten tuottamiseksi kontekstitunnisten esitysten tuottamiseksi, on kuitenkin koulutettu suhteellisen vähän merkittyä dataa varten. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään yleinen puolivalvottu lähestymistapa esikoulutettujen kontekstipodonttien lisäämiseen kaksisuuntaisista kielimalleista NLP-järjestelmiin ja sovellaan sitä sekvenssimerkintätehtäviin. Arvioimme malliamme kahdella standardidatalla nimeltä entity recognition (NER) ja chunking-aineistolla, ja molemmissa tapauksissa saavutamme huipputason tulokset ylittäen aiemmat järjestelmät, jotka käyttävät muunlaista siirtoa tai yhteistä oppimista lisätietojen ja tehtäväkohtaisten lehtien kanssa.', 'jv': 'text-box-mode politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita maneh akeh sistem sembaran-sistem sing titimpen kanggo nambah banjur-sistem sing sampeyan karo ingkang sampeyan uncut Awak dhéwé éntuk model dhéwé ning awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing berarti dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang dhéwé (NeR) lan ngawe barang dhéwé kuwi kesempatan sampeyan sing berarti dhéwé, kuwi wis nguasai sistem sing gawe nyimpen winih berarti dadi winih lan alam sing berarti dhéwé', 'sk': 'Vnaprej usposobljene besedne vdelave, naučene iz neoznačenega besedila, so postale standardna komponenta arhitekture nevronskih omrežij za naloge NLP. Vendar se v večini primerov ponavljajoča se mreža, ki deluje na besednih predstavitvah za ustvarjanje kontekstnih predstavitev, usposablja na relativno malo označenih podatkov. V prispevku predstavljamo splošni polnadzorovani pristop za dodajanje predtreniranih kontekstnih vdelav iz dvosmernih jezikovnih modelov v sisteme NLP in ga uporabljamo pri nalogah označevanja zaporedja. Naš model ocenjujemo na dveh standardnih naborih podatkov za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER) in združevanje, v obeh primerih pa dosegamo najsodobnejše rezultate, ki presegajo prejšnje sisteme, ki uporabljajo druge oblike prenosa ali skupnega učenja z dodatnimi označenimi podatki in listi za posamezne naloge.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da ake amfani da shi a cikin mafi yawan hãli, ana yi wa wa'urar da ke aiki a kan maganar-leveli dõmin ya fitar masu tsari ga masu hushi na mazaɓa, kuma an sanar da shi a kan data masu ƙaranci da aka rubũta. Ga wannan takardan, za mu nuna wata matsayi mai tsaro na semi don ka ƙara muhimmanci da aka ƙayyade sigogi daga misalin harshe na dabar-daban zuwa na NLP's system, kuma Muke amfani da shi zuwa aikin mai sauri. We evaluate our model on two standard datasets for named entity recognition (NER) and chunking, and in both cases achieve state of the art results, surpassing previous systems that use other forms of transfer or joint learning with additional labeled data and task specific gazetteers.", 'he': 'המילים המואמנות מראש שנלמדו מהטקסט ללא סימנים הפכו למרכיב סטנדרטי של ארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית למשימות NLP. בכל אופן, ברוב המקרים, הרשת המחוזרת שמפעילה על מיצוגים ברמה מילים כדי לייצר מיצוגים רגישים בקשר מאומנים על נתונים מסומנים יחסית מעט. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים גישה כללית חצי-מפקחת להוסיף תקשורת קונטקסט מוקדמת ממודלים לשפה שתיים כיוונים למערכות NLP ולהפעיל אותה למשימות תיקון רצף. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמא שלנו על שני קבוצות נתונים סטנדרטיות לזהות ישויות בשם (NER) ולחתיכות, ובשני המקרים להשיג תוצאות מוקדמות, לעבור מערכות קודמות אשר משתמשות בצורות אחרות של העברה או למידה משותפת עם נתונים נוספים עם תווים ותיקים מסוימים למ', 'bo': 'Pre-trained word embeddings learned from unlabeled text have become a standard component of neural network architectures for NLP tasks. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཕལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ནང་དུ་recurrent network that operates on word-level representations to produce context sensitive representations is trained on relatively little labeled data. In this paper, we demonstrate a general semi-supervised approach for adding pretrained context embeddings from bidirectional language models to NLP systems and apply it to sequence labeling tasks. We evaluate our model on two standard datasets for named entity recognition (NER) and chunking, and in both cases achieve state of the art results, surpassing previous systems that use other forms of transfer or joint learning with additional labeled data and task specific gazetteers.'}
{'en': 'Learning Symmetric Collaborative Dialogue Agents with Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embeddings', 'ar': 'وكلاء الحوار التعاوني المتماثل التعلم مع تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي الديناميكي', 'pt': 'Aprendendo Agentes de Diálogo Colaborativo Simétrico com Incorporações de Gráfico de Conhecimento Dinâmico', 'fr': "Apprentissage d'agents de dialogue collaboratifs symétriques avec intégration de graphes de connaissances dynamiques", 'es': 'Aprendizaje de agentes de diálogo colaborativo simétrico con incrustaciones dinámicas de gráficos de conocimiento', 'ja': 'ダイナミックナレッジグラフ埋め込みによる対称的なコラボレーションダイアログエージェントの学習', 'zh': '学有动知图谱嵌对称协摄', 'hi': 'गतिशील ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग के साथ सममित सहयोगी संवाद एजेंट सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение агентов симметричного совместного диалога с встраиваемыми динамическими графиками знаний', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Gníomhairí Comhphlé Comhoibritheacha Siméadracha le Leabaithe Grafa Faisnéise Dinimiciúla', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μάθηση συμμετρικών συνεργατικών παραγόντων διαλόγου με δυναμικές ενσωματώσεις γραφικών γνώσεων', 'hu': 'Szimmetrikus együttműködési párbeszédügynökök tanulása dinamikus tudásgraf beágyazásokkal', 'it': 'Apprendimento di agenti di dialogo collaborativi simmetrici con incorporazioni Dynamic Knowledge Graph', 'lt': 'Learning Symmetric Collaborative Dialogue Agents with Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embeddings', 'kk': 'Симметрикалық білім графикалық ендірілген диалог агенттерін үйрену', 'mk': 'Научи симетрички агенти за дијалог за соработка со вградувања на динамичко знаење', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Agen Dialog Kolaboratif Simmetrik dengan Penjelmaan Graf Pengetahuan Dinamik', 'ml': 'ഡ്യാനിമിക്ക് അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് എംബെഡിങുകളുമായി സിമ്രിക്ക് കൊള്ളേറ്റീവ് ഡയലോഗ് ഏജന്റുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്', 'mn': 'Симметрик хамтрагч диалог агентуудын суралцах нь Динамик Мэдлэг Графийн нэвтрүүлэлт', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Aġenti ta’ Djalogu Kolaborattiv Simmetriku b’Inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ Grafika ta’ Għarfien Dinamiku', 'no': 'Læring av simetriske samarbeidsgraf- agent for dialogvindauget med innbygging av dynamiske kjennomsnittgrafikk', 'pl': 'Uczenie się symetrycznych agentów dialogowych współpracujących z dynamicznymi osadzeniami wykresów wiedzy', 'ro': 'Învățarea agenților de dialog colaborativ simetric cu încorporarea graficului dinamic al cunoștințelor', 'sr': 'Naučenje simetričkog saradničkog dijaloga sa integracijama dinamičkog znanja grafika', 'so': 'Barista Ismmetric Collaborative Dialog Agents with Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embedding', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Lärande av symmetriska samarbetsdialogagenter med inbäddade dynamiska kunskapsdiagram', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیمیٹریک کالبرابریٹ ڈیالوگ اگنٹوں کو سیکھنا دینامیک علم گراف ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Учене на симетрични сътруднически диалогови агенти с вграждания на динамична графика на знанието', 'hr': 'Naučenje simetričnog suradnog dijaloga s integracijama dinamičkih znanja grafika', 'nl': 'Symmetrische collaboratieve dialoogagenten leren met dynamische kennisgrafiekinsluitingen', 'da': 'Læring Symmetriske Samarbejdsdialogagenter med Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embeddings', 'id': 'Mempelajari Agen Dialog Kolaboratif Simmetris dengan Embedding Graf Pengetahuan Dinamik', 'ko': '동적 지식 그래프를 바탕으로 삽입된 대칭 협동 대화 에이전트 학습', 'de': 'Lernen symmetrischer Collaborative Dialogagenten mit dynamischen Knowledge Graph Embeddings', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن ماموران محاورۀ محاورۀ مشترک سیم\u200cتریک با انجمن گراف شناسایی دینامیک', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Mashirika ya Mjadala wa Kushirikiana na Ujuzi wa Kidynamic', 'sq': 'Mësimi i agjentëve të dialogut simmetrik të bashkëpunimit me përfshirje grafike dinamike të njohurive', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Simetrik birleşme диалог Ajanları Dynamik Bilgi Grafik İçeriden öğrenmek', 'am': 'የሲምቲክ ኮሌማቲ Dialogue Agents with Dynamic Known Graph Embedding', 'az': 'Dinamik Bil…ôn Grafik ńįfad…ôl…ôri il…ô simetrik Collaborative Dialog Ajentil…ôri √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'hy': 'Learning Symmetric Collaborative Dialogue Agents with Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embeddings', 'bn': 'ডায়ানামিক জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ এমবেডিং দিয়ে সিমিট্রিক সহযোগিতা ডায়ালগ এজেন্ট শিখানো', 'ca': 'Aprendre agents simètrics de diàleg de col·laboració amb integració dinàmica de gràfics de coneixement', 'cs': 'Učení se symetrických agentů pro spolupráci s dynamickými vědomostními grafy', 'bs': 'Naučenje simetričkog saradničkog dijaloga s integracijama dinamičkog znanja grafika', 'et': 'Dünaamiliste teadmisgraafikute manustamisega sümmeetriliste koostöödialoogi agentide õppimine', 'fi': 'Oppiminen Symmetriset yhteistyödialogin toimijat dynaamisilla tietokaavioiden upotuksilla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'לומד סוכנים שיחה שיתוף פעולה סימטרית עם תוכניות גרף ידע דינמי', 'sk': 'Učenje simetričnih sodelovalnih agentov za dialog z dinamičnimi vdelavami grafikona znanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Learning Symmetric Collaborative Dialog Agents with Dynamic Knowledge Graph Embeddings'}
{'en': 'We study a symmetric collaborative dialogue setting in which two agents, each with private knowledge, must strategically communicate to achieve a common goal. The open-ended dialogue state in this setting poses new challenges for existing dialogue systems. We collected a dataset of 11 K human-human dialogues, which exhibits interesting lexical, semantic, and strategic elements. To model both structured knowledge and unstructured language, we propose a neural model with dynamic knowledge graph embeddings that evolve as the dialogue progresses. Automatic and human evaluations show that our model is both more effective at achieving the goal and more human-like than baseline neural and rule-based models.symmetric collaborative dialogue setting in which two agents,\n      each with private knowledge, must strategically communicate to achieve a\n      common goal. The open-ended dialogue state in this setting poses new\n      challenges for existing dialogue systems. We collected a dataset of 11K\n      human-human dialogues, which exhibits interesting lexical, semantic, and\n      strategic elements. To model both structured knowledge and unstructured\n      language, we propose a neural model with dynamic knowledge graph\n      embeddings that evolve as the dialogue progresses. Automatic and human\n      evaluations show that our model is both more effective at achieving the\n      goal and more human-like than baseline neural and rule-based models.\n    ', 'ar': 'ندرس إطار حوار تعاوني متماثل يجب أن يتواصل فيه عاملين ، كل منهما لديه معرفة خاصة ، بشكل استراتيجي لتحقيق هدف مشترك. تطرح حالة الحوار المفتوح في هذا الإطار تحديات جديدة لأنظمة الحوار القائمة. قمنا بجمع مجموعة بيانات من 11 ألف حوارات بشرية-بشرية ، والتي تعرض عناصر معجمية ودلالية واستراتيجية مثيرة للاهتمام. لنمذجة كل من المعرفة المهيكلة واللغة غير المهيكلة ، نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا مع تضمين رسومات بيانية معرفية ديناميكية تتطور مع تقدم الحوار. تُظهر التقييمات التلقائية والبشرية أن نموذجنا أكثر فاعلية في تحقيق الهدف وأكثر شبهاً بالإنسان من النماذج الأساسية العصبية والقائمة على القواعد.', 'pt': 'Estudamos um cenário de diálogo colaborativo simétrico em que dois agentes, cada um com conhecimento privado, devem se comunicar estrategicamente para alcançar um objetivo comum. O estado de diálogo aberto neste cenário apresenta novos desafios para os sistemas de diálogo existentes. Coletamos um conjunto de dados de 11 mil diálogos humano-humano, que exibem elementos lexicais, semânticos e estratégicos interessantes. Para modelar tanto o conhecimento estruturado quanto a linguagem não estruturada, propomos um modelo neural com embeddings dinâmicos de grafos de conhecimento que evoluem à medida que o diálogo progride. Avaliações automáticas e humanas mostram que nosso modelo é mais eficaz em atingir a meta e mais humano do que os modelos neurais e baseados em regras de linha de base.', 'es': 'Estudiamos un entorno de diálogo colaborativo simétrico en el que dos agentes, cada uno con conocimiento privado, deben comunicarse estratégicamente para lograr un objetivo común. El estado de diálogo abierto en este contexto plantea nuevos desafíos para los sistemas de diálogo existentes. Recopilamos un conjunto de datos de 11 mil diálogos humano-humano, que exhibe elementos léxicos, semánticos y estratégicos interesantes. Para modelar tanto el conocimiento estructurado como el lenguaje no estructurado, proponemos un modelo neuronal con incrustaciones dinámicas de gráficos de conocimiento que evolucionan a medida que avanza el diálogo. Las evaluaciones automáticas y humanas muestran que nuestro modelo es más eficaz para lograr el objetivo y más similar a los humanos que los modelos neuronales y basados en reglas de referencia.', 'fr': "Nous étudions un cadre de dialogue collaboratif symétrique dans lequel deux agents, chacun possédant des connaissances privées, doivent communiquer de manière stratégique pour atteindre un objectif commun. L'état de dialogue ouvert dans ce contexte pose de nouveaux défis aux systèmes de dialogue existants. Nous avons rassemblé un ensemble de données de 11 000 dialogues homme-homme, qui présentent des éléments lexicaux, sémantiques et stratégiques intéressants. Pour modéliser à la fois les connaissances structurées et le langage non structuré, nous proposons un modèle neuronal intégrant des graphes de connaissances dynamiques qui évoluent au fur et à mesure que le dialogue progresse. Les évaluations automatiques et humaines montrent que notre modèle est à la fois plus efficace pour atteindre l'objectif et plus proche de l'humain que les modèles neuronaux et basés sur des règles de base.", 'ja': '私たちは、共通の目標を達成するために、それぞれ個人的な知識を持つ2人のエージェントが戦略的にコミュニケーションを取らなければならない対称的な共同対話環境を研究しています。この場面での自由な対話状態は、既存の対話システムに新しい課題をもたらします。私たちは、11,000の人間と人間の対話のデータセットを収集しました。これは、興味深い語彙的、意味的、戦略的要素を示しています。構造化された知識と非構造化された言語の両方をモデル化するために、ダイアログが進むにつれて進化する動的な知識グラフ埋め込みを備えたニューラルモデルを提案する。自動評価とヒューマン評価は、ベースラインのニューラルモデルとルールベースのモデルよりも、私たちのモデルが目標を達成するのにより効果的であり、よりヒューマンのようなものであることを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम एक सममित सहयोगी संवाद सेटिंग का अध्ययन करते हैं जिसमें दो एजेंटों, प्रत्येक निजी ज्ञान के साथ, एक सामान्य लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए रणनीतिक रूप से संवाद करना चाहिए। इस सेटिंग में ओपन-एंडेड संवाद स्थिति मौजूदा संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए नई चुनौतियां पैदा करती है। हमने 11K मानव-मानव संवादों का एक डेटासेट एकत्र किया, जो दिलचस्प लेक्सिकल, शब्दार्थ और रणनीतिक तत्वों को प्रदर्शित करता है। संरचित ज्ञान और असंरचित भाषा दोनों को मॉडल करने के लिए, हम गतिशील ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग के साथ एक तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संवाद की प्रगति के रूप में विकसित होता है। स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने में अधिक प्रभावी है और बेसलाइन तंत्रिका और नियम-आधारित मॉडल की तुलना में अधिक मानव-जैसे है।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем симметричную среду для диалога на основе сотрудничества, в которой два агента, каждый из которых обладает частными знаниями, должны стратегически взаимодействовать для достижения общей цели. Состояние открытого диалога в этой обстановке ставит новые задачи перед существующими системами диалога. Мы собрали набор данных из 11 тысяч диалогов человек-человек, в котором проявляются интересные лексические, семантические и стратегические элементы. Чтобы смоделировать как структурированное знание, так и неструктурированный язык, мы предлагаем нейронную модель с динамическими вложениями в граф знаний, которые развиваются по мере развития диалога. Автоматические и человеческие оценки показывают, что наша модель более эффективна в достижении цели и более человекоподобна, чем базовые нейронные и основанные на правилах модели.', 'zh': '论一对称,两有私知代理人必通谋以达其志。 于是,开放式对现在对话系统出了新挑战。 收拾11000人对数集,其中展有趣词汇、语义略元素。 结构化非结构化言建模,发一动图谱嵌神经,随其所进。 自与人工论明,吾模型在实现目标比基线神经与法则,亦犹人类也。', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar shuíomh comhphlé comhoibríoch siméadrach ina gcaithfidh dhá ghníomhaire, gach ceann acu a bhfuil eolas príobháideach acu, cumarsáid straitéiseach a dhéanamh chun comhsprioc a bhaint amach. Cruthaíonn staid an chomhphlé oscailte sa suíomh seo dúshláin nua do na córais idirphlé atá ann cheana féin. Bhailíomar tacar sonraí de 11K idirphlé idir an duine agus an duine, a thaispeánann gnéithe suimiúla foclóireachta, shéimeantacha agus straitéiseacha. Chun eolas struchtúrtha agus teanga neamhstruchtúrtha araon a shamhaltú, molaimid samhail néarúil le leabaithe dinimiciúla graf eolais a fhorbraíonn de réir mar a théann an t-idirphlé ar aghaidh. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna go bhfuil ár múnla níos éifeachtaí chun an sprioc a bhaint amach agus go bhfuil sé níos cosúla le daoine ná samhlacha bunlíne néaracha agus bunaithe ar rialacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვისწავლოთ სიმტერტიკური კოლობორაციური დიალოგის შესახებ, რომელიც ორი ადვნენტი, ყოველთვის პირადი მეცნიერებით, უნდა სტრატიკურად კომუნიკაცია, რომ საერთ ამ პარამეტრებში გახსნა დიალოგის სტატი ახალი გამოცდილებები აქვს დიალოგის სისტემისთვის. ჩვენ 11K ადამიანის-ადამიანის დიალოგების მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც ინტერესური ლექსიკალური, ჟენმანტიკური და სტრატიკური ელემენტების გამოყენება. სტრუქტურული მეცნიერები და არსტრუქტურული ენაში ჩვენ მინდა ნეიროლური მოდელს, რომელიც დიალოგის პროგრესის გადავიწყება დინამიკური მეცნიერების გრაფიკის შემდეგ. ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებები ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ეფექტიურია მიზემის და უფრო ადამიანის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ვიდრე მიზემის ნეიროლური და მიზემის მო', 'hu': 'Egy szimmetrikus együttműködési párbeszéd környezetet tanulmányozunk, amelyben két magántudással rendelkező ügynöknek stratégiailag kommunikálniuk kell egy közös cél elérése érdekében. A nyílt végű párbeszéd ebben a környezetben új kihívásokat jelent a meglévő párbeszédrendszerek számára. 11 ezer ember-ember párbeszédből álló adatkészletet gyűjtöttünk össze, amelyek érdekes lexikai, szemantikai és stratégiai elemeket mutatnak be. A strukturált tudás és a strukturálatlan nyelv modellezése érdekében egy olyan neurális modellt javasolunk, amely dinamikus tudásgrafokkal rendelkezik, amely a párbeszéd előrehaladásával fejlődik. Az automatikus és emberi értékelések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk hatékonyabb a cél elérésében, és emberszerűbb, mint az alapvető neurális és szabályalapú modellek.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε ένα συμμετρικό πλαίσιο συνεργατικού διαλόγου στο οποίο δύο παράγοντες, ο καθένας με ιδιωτική γνώση, πρέπει να επικοινωνούν στρατηγικά για να επιτύχουν έναν κοινό στόχο. Η κατάσταση του ανοιχτού διαλόγου σε αυτό το πλαίσιο θέτει νέες προκλήσεις για τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα διαλόγου. Συγκεντρώσαμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων από 11Κ διάλογους ανθρώπου-ανθρώπου, το οποίο παρουσιάζει ενδιαφέροντα λεξικά, σημασιολογικά και στρατηγικά στοιχεία. Για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τόσο τη δομημένη γνώση όσο και την άτυπη γλώσσα, προτείνουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο με δυναμικές ενσωματώσεις γραφήματος γνώσης που εξελίσσονται καθώς ο διάλογος προχωρά. Οι αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι τόσο πιο αποτελεσματικό στην επίτευξη του στόχου όσο και πιο ανθρώπινο από ό,τι τα βασικά νευρωνικά και βασισμένα σε κανόνες μοντέλα.', 'it': "Studiamo un ambiente di dialogo collaborativo simmetrico in cui due agenti, ciascuno con conoscenze private, devono comunicare strategicamente per raggiungere un obiettivo comune. Lo stato di dialogo aperto in questo contesto pone nuove sfide ai sistemi di dialogo esistenti. Abbiamo raccolto un dataset di 11K dialoghi uomo-uomo, che mostra interessanti elementi lessicali, semantici e strategici. Per modellare sia la conoscenza strutturata che il linguaggio non strutturato, proponiamo un modello neurale con incorporazioni dinamiche del grafico della conoscenza che evolvono man mano che il dialogo progredisce. Le valutazioni automatiche e umane mostrano che il nostro modello è sia più efficace nel raggiungere l'obiettivo che più umano rispetto ai modelli neurali e basati sulle regole di base.", 'kk': 'Біз симметриялық білім деген диалогты зерттейміз. Екі агент, әрбір жеке білім болса, бағытты мақсатты жеткізу үшін стратегиялық қатынау керек. Бұл параметрдегі ашылған диалог күйі бар диалог жүйелерінде жаңа шақырулар болады. Біз 11K адамдар-адамдар диалогтарының деректер жинағын жинақтадық. Бұл қызықты лексикалық, семантикалық және стратегикалық элементтерді көрсетеді. Бұл құрылған білім мен құрылмаған тілді үлгілеу үшін диалог жасағанда өзгертілген динамикалық білім графикалық ендіру үшін невралдық моделін таңдаймыз. Автоматты және адамдардың оқиғалары біздің моделіміз мақсатты және адамдардың негізгі невралды және ережелердің негізгі моделдерінен артық болатынын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame simetrinį bendradarbiavimo dialogą, kuriame du subjektai, kiekvienas turintys privačių žinių, turi strategiškai bendrauti siekiant bendro tikslo. Šioje aplinkybėje atviras dialogas kelia naujų iššūkių esamoms dialogo sistemoms. Mes surinkėme 11K žmogaus ir žmogaus dialogų duomenų rinkinį, kuriame pateikiami įdomūs leksiniai, semantiniai ir strateginiai elementai. To model both structured knowledge and unstructured language, we propose a neural model with dynamic knowledge graph embeddings that evolve as the dialogue progresses.  Automatiniai ir žmogaus vertinimai rodo, kad mūsų model is yra veiksmingesnis siekiant tikslo ir labiau panašus į žmogų nei pradiniai neurologiniai ir taisyklėmis pagrįsti modeliai.', 'mk': 'Истражуваме симетрички дијалог во кој двајца агенти, секој со приватно знаење, мора стратешки да комуницираат за да постигнат заедничка цел. Оваа состојба на отворен дијалог предизвикува нови предизвици за постојните дијалошки системи. Земавме податоци од 11K човечки-човечки дијалози, кои покажуваат интересни лексикални, семантични и стратешки елементи. За да го моделираме структурираното знаење и неструктурираниот јазик, предложуваме неурален модел со динамични графики на знаење кои еволуираат додека дијалогот напредува. Автоматските и човечките проценки покажуваат дека нашиот модел е поефикасен во постигнувањето на целта и почовечки од основните неурални и владејачки модели.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിമ്പിട്രിക്ക് സഹകരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d രണ്ട് ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d, സ്വകാര്യ അറിവുള്ളവര്\u200d, ഒരു സാധാ ഈ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d തുറക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് അവസ്ഥ നിലവിലുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമുള്ള പുതിയ ച്യാല്\u200dവെല്ലു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 11K മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സംഘടിപ്പിച്ചു. അത് രസകരമായ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d, സെമാന്റിക്ക്, സാങ്കേതി To model both structured knowledge and unstructured language, we propose a neural model with dynamic knowledge graph embeddings that evolve as the dialogue progresses.  സ്വയം മനുഷ്യരുടെയും വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രാപിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തു', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw kuntest ta’ djalogu kollaborattiv simetriku li fih żewġ a ġenti, kull wieħed b’għarfien privat, iridu jikkomunikaw strateġikament biex jinkiseb għan komuni. L-istat ta’ djalogu miftuħ f’dan l-ambjent joħloq sfidi ġodda għas-sistemi ta’ djalogu eżistenti. Inġabru sett ta’ dejta ta’ 11K djalogu bejn il-bniedem u l-bniedem, li juri elementi lexiċi, semantiċi u strateġiċi interessanti. Biex nimmudellaw kemm l-għarfien strutturat kif ukoll il-lingwa mhux strutturata, nipproponu mudell newrali b’integrazzjonijiet dinamiċi tal-grafika tal-għarfien li jevolvu hekk kif id-djalogu jimxi ’l quddiem. Automatic and human evaluations show that our model is both more effective at achieving the goal and more human-like than baseline neural and rule-based models.', 'mn': 'Бид хоёр агент, хувийн мэдлэгтэй, стратегически холбоотой хамтын ажиллах диалогын талаар судалж байна. Энэ тохиолдолд нээлттэй дууссан диалог байр суурилсан диалог системийн шинэ сорилт үүсгэдэг. Бид 11K хүн-хүн диалогын өгөгдлийн санг цуглуулсан. Энэ нь сонирхолтой лексик, semantic, стратегик элементүүдийг харуулдаг. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг болон бүтээгдэхүүний хэл хоёулаа загварын тулд диалог хөгжүүлэхэд хөгжүүлдэг динамикийн мэдлэг графикийн хөгжлийн мэдлэг загварыг санал болгож байна. Автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд нь бидний загвар нь зорилго, хүн төрөлхтний суурь шугам болон дүрэм суурь загвараас илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Badamy symetryczne otoczenie dialogu współpracy, w którym dwóch agentów, każdy z prywatną wiedzą, musi się strategicznie komunikować, aby osiągnąć wspólny cel. Stan dialogu otwartego w tym otoczeniu stanowi nowe wyzwania dla istniejących systemów dialogu. Zebraliśmy zestaw danych 11K dialogów człowiek-człowiek, który zawiera ciekawe elementy leksykalne, semantyczne i strategiczne. Aby modelować zarówno wiedzę strukturalną, jak i język nieustrukturyzowany, proponujemy model neuronowy z dynamicznymi osadzeniami grafów wiedzy, które ewoluują w miarę postępu dialogu. Automatyczne i ludzkie oceny pokazują, że nasz model jest zarówno bardziej skuteczny w osiąganiu celu, jak i bardziej podobny do człowieka niż podstawowe modele neuronowe i oparte na regułach.', 'no': 'Vi studerer eit symmetrisk samarbeidsdialog som to agentar, kvar med privat kunnskap, må strategisk kommunisera til å oppnå eit felles mål. Dialogtilstanden med opna slutt i denne innstillinga viser nye utfordringar for eksisterande dialogsystemar. Vi samla eit dataset med 11K menneske-menneske dialogar, som viser interessante leksiske, semantiske og strategiske elementar. For å modellere både strukturerte kunnskap og ikkje strukturerte språk, foreslår vi ein neural model med dynamiske kunnskap-grafen som utviklar når dialogen framgår. Automatiske og menneske evalueringar viser at modellen vårt er både mer effektiv for å oppnå målet og meir menneskelig enn baseline neurale og regelbaserte modeller.', 'ro': 'Studiem un cadru simetric de dialog colaborativ în care doi agenți, fiecare cu cunoștințe private, trebuie să comunice strategic pentru a atinge un obiectiv comun. Starea dialogului deschis în acest context reprezintă noi provocări pentru sistemele de dialog existente. Am colectat un set de date de 11.000 de dialoguri om-om, care prezintă elemente lexicale, semantice și strategice interesante. Pentru a modela atât cunoștințele structurate, cât și limbajul nestructurat, propunem un model neural cu încorporări dinamice ale graficului cunoașterii care evoluează pe măsură ce dialogul progresează. Evaluările automate și umane arată că modelul nostru este atât mai eficient în atingerea obiectivului, cât și mai uman decât modelele neurale și bazate pe reguli.', 'ms': 'We study a symmetric collaborative dialogue setting in which two agents, each with private knowledge, must strategically communicate to achieve a common goal.  Keadaan dialog berakhir terbuka dalam tetapan ini menghasilkan cabaran baru bagi sistem dialog yang wujud. Kami mengumpulkan set data 11K dialog manusia-manusia, yang menunjukkan elemen leksikal, semantik, dan strategik yang menarik. Untuk model pengetahuan struktur dan bahasa yang tidak struktur, kami cadangkan model saraf dengan grafik pengetahuan dinamik yang berkembang semasa dialog berkembang. Evaluasi automatik dan manusia menunjukkan bahawa model kita berdua lebih berkesan dalam mencapai tujuan dan lebih seperti manusia daripada model saraf asas dan berdasarkan peraturan.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සහාය සංවාදක සංවාදයක් අධ්\u200dයාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම නියෝජිත දෙන්නෙක්, හැමෝම පෞද්ගලික දන්නවත් ති මේ සැකසුමේ විවෘත සංවාදය අවස්ථාවයේ අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා තියෙන සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සඳහා අල අපි 11K මිනිස්-මිනිස් සංවාදයේ දත්ත සෙට් එකතු කරනවා, ඒකෙන් සුදුසුම් ලෙක්සිකාල්, සෙමාන්ටික්, සහ සාධාරණ නිර්මාණය සහ නිර්මාණය කරපු භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි සංවාදය ප්\u200dරවෘති වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය මදුල් සමග ජානත් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් දෙන්නම ඉලක්කය සහ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ වගේ මුද්\u200dරව්\u200dය', 'so': 'Waxaynu baranaynaa qoraal iskaashiis ah oo ku qoran labada agent, mid kasta oo aqoonta gaarka loo leeyahay, waa in si strategis loogu xiriiraa si uu u gaadho goal caadiga ah. Xaalada dialogka ee furan oo furan, markan lagu diyaariyo, wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa dhibaatooyin cusub ee nidaamka dialogka ee joogta ah. Waxaannu soo urursannay diyaariyo 11K oo dadka, taasoo muuqata waxyaabaha xiiso leh oo la xiiseynayo leksikal, semantic iyo strategic. Si aan u sameyno aqoonta dhisan iyo luqada aan la dhisay, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model neurada ah oo ku qoran sawir aqoonta dynamic ah oo u bedela sida horumarinta dialogue. Qiimeynta dhaqdhaqaaqa ah iyo dadka waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu ay ka faa’iido badan tahay in uu gaadho goalka iyo in uu ka badan yahay noocyada neurada iyo qaabka xuquuqda.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar en symmetrisk samarbetsdialog där två aktörer, var och en med privat kunskap, måste kommunicera strategiskt för att uppnå ett gemensamt mål. Den öppna dialogen innebär nya utmaningar för befintliga dialogsystem. Vi samlade in en datauppsättning av 11K människa-människa dialoger, som uppvisar intressanta lexikala, semantiska och strategiska element. För att modellera både strukturerad kunskap och ostrukturerat språk föreslår vi en neural modell med dynamiska kunskapsgrafer inbäddningar som utvecklas allteftersom dialogen fortskrider. Automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar visar att vår modell både är effektivare för att uppnå målet och mer mänsklig än baslinjen neurala och regelbaserade modeller.', 'sr': 'Mi proučavamo simetrični saradnji dijalog u kojem dva agenta, svaka sa privatnim znanjem, mora strategički komunicirati kako bi postigla zajednički cilj. Država otvorenog dijaloga u ovom nastavku predstavlja nove izazove za postojeće dijalogske sisteme. Skupljali smo podatke o 11K ljudskih-ljudskih dijaloga, koji pokazuje zanimljive leksičke, semantičke i strateške elemente. Za model strukturiranog znanja i nepristrukovanog jezika, predlažemo neuralni model sa dinamičnim grafikom znanja koji se razvijaju dok se dijalog napreduje. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da je naš model efikasniji u postizanju cilja i više ljudskih sličnih od početnih neuralnih i pravilnih modela.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سیمیٹریک مشارکت دیالوگ کی تعلیم کریں جس میں دو اگنٹ، ہر شخصی علم کے ساتھ، ایک مشترک مقصد تک پہنچانے کے لئے استراتٹریک طور پر ارتباط کرنا چاہتے ہیں. اس تنظیمات میں کھولا ہوا دیالوگ سٹیٹ نے موجود دیالوگ سیسٹم کے لئے نئی چالوں کا موجود ہے. ہم نے 11K انسان اور انسان کے دائلوگوں کے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کو جمع کیا ہے، جو دلچسپ لکسیکل، سیمانٹیک اور استراتژیک الگوں کو دکھاتا ہے۔ ساختہ علم اور غیر ساختہ زبان کی مدل کے لئے ہم ایک نئورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جن کے ساتھ سیدھی علم گراف انڈینگ کے ساتھ تغییر کی جاتی ہے جس طرح диалог تکامل ہوتی ہے۔ آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا موڈل ہدایت پہنچانے کے لئے بہت اثر ہے اور انسان کی طرح بنیادی لین نیورل اور قانون کی بنیادی موڈل سے بہت اثر ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு குறியீட்டு இணையான உரையாடல் அமைப்பை படிக்க வேண்டும். அதில் இரண்டு மேலாளர்கள், ஒவ்வொரு தனியார் அறிவு இருந்தால், ஒரு பொது  இந்த அமைப்பில் திறக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் நிலை நாங்கள் 11K மனித உரையாடல்களின் தகவல் அமைப்பை சேகரித்தோம், அது சுவாரஸ்யமான லெக்சிக்சியல், அரை மற்றும் strategic elements காட்டுகிறது. உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அறிவு மற்றும் அடிப்படையில்லாத மொழியை மாதிரிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் புதிய அறிவு வரைபடத தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பீடுகள் காட்டுகின்றன நம் மாதிரி இலக்கை அடையும் மற்றும் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டிற்கு மேலும் மனித போன்ற முதல', 'uz': "Biz bir symmetrik qo'llanmalar muloqat oynasini o'rganamiz. Bu yerda, ikkita agent, shaxsiy илм bilan, bir biri bir necha maqsadni o'rganish uchun strategik talab qilishi kerak. @ info: whatsthis Biz 11K inson dialoglarining maʼlumotlarini olib keldik. Bu juda qiziqarli leksikal, semantik va strategik elementlarini ko'rsatadi. Bu ta'lim va tuzililgan tilni modellashga, biz muloqat taʼminlovchi darajasi davomida o'zgarishni tahlil qilamiz. Automatic and human evaluations show that our model is both more effective at achieving the goal and more human-like than baseline neural and rule-based models.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu một chế độ đối xứng hợp trong đó hai đặc vụ, mỗi người có kiến thức riêng, phải giao tiếp theo một mục tiêu chung. Cuộc đối thoại cởi mở trong trường hợp này đặt ra những thử thách mới cho hệ thống đối thoại hiện tại. Chúng tôi thu thập dữ liệu của câu lạc bộ 11K, chứa các nguyên tố ngôn ngữ văn học, ngữ pháp và chiến lược thú vị. Để mô tả kiến thức cấu trúc và ngôn ngữ không xây dựng, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình thần kinh với sự nhúng vào đồ thị kiến thức động tiến hóa khi cuộc đối thoại tiến triển. Đánh giá tự động và con người cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta vừa hiệu quả hơn trong việc đạt được mục tiêu và giống con người hơn những mô hình thần kinh và quy định cơ bản.', 'bg': 'Изследваме симетрична среда на диалог за сътрудничество, в която двама агенти, всеки с лични знания, трябва стратегически да комуникират, за да постигнат обща цел. В тази обстановка състоянието на диалога с отворен край поставя нови предизвикателства пред съществуващите системи за диалог. Събрахме набор от данни от 11К диалози човек-човек, които показват интересни лексикални, семантични и стратегически елементи. За да моделираме както структурираното знание, така и неструктурирания език, предлагаме невронен модел с вградени динамични графики на знанието, които се развиват с напредъка на диалога. Автоматичните и човешките оценки показват, че нашият модел е едновременно по-ефективен за постигане на целта и по-човешки от базовите невронни и базирани на правила модели.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen een symmetrische samenwerkingsverband waarin twee agenten, elk met privékennis, strategisch moeten communiceren om een gemeenschappelijk doel te bereiken. De open dialoogstaat in deze context brengt nieuwe uitdagingen voor bestaande dialoogsystemen met zich mee. We verzamelden een dataset van 11K mens-dialogen, die interessante lexicale, semantische en strategische elementen vertoont. Om zowel gestructureerde kennis als ongestructureerde taal te modelleren, stellen we een neuraal model voor met dynamische kennisgrafiekinsluitingen die evolueren naarmate de dialoog vordert. Automatische en menselijke evaluaties tonen aan dat ons model zowel effectiever is in het bereiken van het doel als menselijker is dan baseline neurale en op regels gebaseerde modellen.', 'da': 'Vi studerer en symmetrisk samarbejdsdialog, hvor to agenter, hver med privat viden, skal kommunikere strategisk for at nå et fælles mål. Den åbne dialog stiller nye udfordringer for eksisterende dialogsystemer i denne sammenhæng. Vi indsamlede et datasæt af 11K menneske-menneske dialoger, som udstiller interessante leksikske, semantiske og strategiske elementer. For at modellere både struktureret viden og ustruktureret sprog foreslår vi en neural model med dynamiske vidensgrafer indlejringer, der udvikler sig efterhånden som dialogen skrider frem. Automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer viser, at vores model både er mere effektiv til at nå målet og mere menneskelig-lignende end baseline neurale og regelbaserede modeller.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari sebuah dialog kollaboratif simetrik di mana dua agen, masing-masing dengan pengetahuan pribadi, harus berkomunikasi secara strategis untuk mencapai tujuan yang sama. Kondisi dialog terbuka dalam pengaturan ini menghasilkan tantangan baru untuk sistem dialog yang ada. Kami mengumpulkan dataset dari 11K dialog manusia-manusia, yang menunjukkan elemen seksik, semantis, dan strategis yang menarik. Untuk model pengetahuan struktur dan bahasa yang tidak struktur, kami mengusulkan model saraf dengan grafik pengetahuan dinamik yang berevolusi saat dialog berkembang. Evaluasi otomatis dan manusia menunjukkan bahwa model kita berdua lebih efektif dalam mencapai tujuan dan lebih seperti manusia daripada model saraf dasar dan berdasarkan aturan.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen einen symmetrischen kollaborativen Dialog, in dem zwei Agenten, jeder mit privatem Wissen, strategisch kommunizieren müssen, um ein gemeinsames Ziel zu erreichen. Der offene Dialogzustand stellt bestehende Dialogsysteme vor neue Herausforderungen. Wir haben einen Datensatz von 11K Mensch-Dialog gesammelt, der interessante lexikalische, semantische und strategische Elemente aufweist. Um sowohl strukturiertes Wissen als auch unstrukturierte Sprache zu modellieren, schlagen wir ein neuronales Modell mit dynamischen Wissensgrafiken vor, die sich im Laufe des Dialogs weiterentwickeln. Automatische und menschliche Auswertungen zeigen, dass unser Modell sowohl beim Erreichen des Ziels effektiver als auch menschlicher ist als neuronale und regelbasierte Basismodelle.', 'ko': '우리는 대칭적인 협동 대화 환경을 연구했다. 이 환경에서 두 대리인은 모두 자신의 지식을 가지고 전략적인 소통을 해서 하나의 공통된 목표를 실현해야 한다.이런 상황에서 구성원 정원에 제한이 없는 대화 상태는 기존 대화 시스템에 새로운 도전장을 던졌다.우리는 11K 인류 대화의 데이터 집합을 수집했는데, 그 중에서 재미있는 어휘, 의미, 전략 요소를 보여 주었다.구조화된 지식과 비구조화된 언어를 동시에 모델링하기 위해 우리는 동적 지식도를 가진 신경 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 대화가 진행됨에 따라 발전한다.자동과 인공 평가에 따르면 우리의 모델은 목표를 실현하는 데 더욱 효과적이고 기선신경과 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 모델보다 인성화되었다.', 'sw': 'Tunafoma mazungumzo ya ushirikiano katika mfumo ambapo watumishi wawili, kila mmoja wenye maarifa binafsi, lazima wasiliane kwa kimkakati ili kufikia lengo la kawaida. Hali ya mazungumzo yanayofunguliwa wazi katika hali hii inaleta changamoto mpya kwa mfumo wa mazungumzo. We collected a dataset of 11K human-human dialogues, which exhibits interesting lexical, semantic, and strategic elements.  Ili kuweka mfano wa ufahamu na lugha isiyo na ujenzi, tunapendekeza modeli ya ubongo yenye picha za maarifa za kisasa zinazoendelea kama maendeleo ya mazungumzo. Tathmini za kujitegemea na binadamu zinaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu ni yenye ufanisi zaidi katika kufikia lengo na zaidi ya binadamu kuliko mifano ya neura na inayohusiana na utawala.', 'fa': 'ما یک مجموعه مشترک مشترک را مطالعه می کنیم که در آن دو مامور، هر یک با دانش خصوصی، باید استراتژیک برای رسیدن یک هدف مشترک ارتباط داشته باشد. وضعیت محاورۀ محاورۀ باز در این تنظیمات چالش جدید برای سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ محاورۀ موجود قرار می\u200cدهد. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات از ۱۱ کیلومتر صحبت\u200cهای انسان و انسان را جمع کردیم، که عناصر زبان\u200cشناسی، semantic و استراتژیک را نشان می\u200cدهد. برای مدل دانش ساخته و زبان ساخته نشده، ما یک مدل عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که گراف دانش\u200cهای دینامیک در حال تکامل می\u200cیابد که در حال تکامل گفتگو پیشرفت می\u200cشود. ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسان نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما در رسیدن هدف و مانند انسان\u200cتر از مدل\u200cهای عصبی و قانونی\u200cهای بنیادی بیشتری است.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo simetrički kooperativni dijalog u kojem dva agenta, svaka s privatnim znanjem, mora strategički komunicirati kako bi postigla zajednički cilj. Država otvorenog dijaloga u ovom nastavku predstavlja nove izazove za postojeće dijalogske sustave. Skupljali smo skup podataka o 11K ljudskih-ljudskih dijalogova, koji pokazuje zanimljive leksičke, semantičke i strateške elemente. Za model strukturiranog znanja i nepristrukovanog jezika, predlažemo neuralni model sa dinamičnim grafikom znanja koji se razvijaju dok dijalog napreduje. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da je naš model efikasniji u postizanju cilja i ljudskih sličnih od početnih neuralnih i pravilnih modela.', 'sq': 'We study a symmetric collaborative dialogue setting in which two agents, each with private knowledge, must strategically communicate to achieve a common goal.  Gjendja e dialogut me fund të hapur në këtë vendosje paraqet sfida të reja për sistemet ekzistuese të dialogut. Ne mbledhëm një grup të dhënash prej 11K dialogesh njerëzor-njerëzor, që ekspozojnë elemente interesante lexike, semantike dhe strategjike. Për të modeluar njohurinë strukturuar dhe gjuhën jo strukturuar, ne propozojmë një model neuronal me përfshirje grafike dinamike të njohurive që zhvillohen ndërsa dialogu përparon. Vlerësimet automatike dhe njerëzore tregojnë se modeli ynë është si më efektiv në arritjen e qëllimit dhe më njerëzore se modelet bazë neuronale dhe të rregullave.', 'am': 'የሴሜትራዊ ጥያቄ ማኅበረሰብ ማኅበረሰብ እናምናለን፤ በዚህም ውስጥ ሁለት ተሟጋቾች የግል ጉዳይ ለማግኘት በተስማማሚ ግንኙነት ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የ11K የሰው አካባቢዎች ማኅበረሰብ ዳታ ሰብሰብን፣ የሚያስደነግጠው ሌክሲካዊ፣ የሴሜንቲካዊ እና የstrategic አካላት ያሳያል፡፡ እውቀትን እና ቋንቋን ለማስተካከል እና ለማስተካከል፣ አዲስ የውቀት ግልጾችን የሚነካውን የነጥብ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አውቶማቲካዊ እና የሰው ውጤቶች የሞዴል መሆኑን እና የሰው ምሳሌ ከመደገፍ የደዌብ እና የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ዓይነቶች የበለጠ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք սիմետրիկ համագործակցության միջոցը, որտեղ երկու գործիչներ, յուրաքանչյուրը մասնավոր գիտելիքներով, պետք է ռազմավարական հաղորդակցվեն ընդհանուր նպատակի հասնելու համար: Այս միջավայրում բաց խոսակցության վիճակը նոր մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում գոյություն ունեցող խոսակցության համակարգերի համար: Մենք հավաքեցինք 11K մարդկային-մարդկային երկխոսությունների տվյալներ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս հետաքրքիր լեքսիկական, սեմանտիկ և ռազմավարական տարրեր: Որպեսզի մոդելավորենք նաև կառուցվածված գիտելիքները, նաև ոչ կառուցվածված լեզուները, մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային մոդել, որն ունի դինամիկ գիտելիքների գծագրաֆիկներ, որոնք զարգանում են, մինչ խոսքը առաջ Ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը ավելի արդյունավետ է նպատակի հասնելու համար և ավելի մարդկային նման մոդելներ, քան հիմնական նյարդային և կանոններով հիմնված մոդելները:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি সিম্পিট্রিক সহযোগিতা আলোচনা ব্যবস্থা গবেষণা করছি যেখানে দুই এজেন্ট, যারা ব্যক্তিগত জ্ঞানের সাথে প্রত্যেকেই একটি সাধ এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে উন্মুক্ত ডায়ালগের অবস্থান বিদ্যমান ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য নতুন চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রত আমরা ১১ হাজার মানবাধিকার আলোচনার একটি ডাটাসেট সংগ্রহ করেছি, যেখানে কৌতুহলজনক লেক্সিক, সেম্যান্টিক এবং কৌশলের উপাদান দে স্থাপন করা জ্ঞান এবং অকার্যকর ভাষার জন্য আমরা একটি নিউরুল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা ডায়ালগের উন্নয়ন হিসেবে উন্নয়ন করে। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেলের লক্ষ্য আর মানুষের মতো বেসারালাইন নিউরেল এবং নিয়ম ভিত্তিক মড', 'tr': 'Biz simetrik bir işbirlikçilik dialogyny öwrenýärdik. Bu iki ajaýyn, her biri hyzykly bilgi bilen, orta maksady ýetmek üçin stratejik bilen habarlaşmaly. Bu düzümlerde açyk/söndüren dialogy durum meýdançan dýaloglar üçin täze kynçylyklar bar. Biz 11K insan-ynsan dialoglarynyň veri setirini ýygnadyk. Ol gyzykly leksiýaly, semantik we stratejik elementlere görkeýär. Ýeri strukturlyk bilen we strukturlyk dilini nusgala etmek üçin, dialogyň gelip gelip ýörän dinamik bilim grafikleri bilen näral nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Otomatik we adamlaryň deňleşmeleri biziň nusgymyzyň hem maksadymyz we adamlaryň basit we düzgün nusgalardan has gowydygyny görkezýär.', 'bs': 'Mi proučavamo simetrični kooperativni dijalog u kojem dva agenta, svaka sa privatnim znanjem, mora strategički komunicirati kako bi postigla zajednički cilj. Država dialoga otvorenog kraja u ovom nastavku predstavlja nove izazove za postojeće dijalogske sisteme. Skupljali smo skup podataka o 11K ljudskih-ljudskih dijalogova, koji pokazuje zanimljive leksičke, semantičke i strateške elemente. Za model strukturiranog znanja i nepristrukovanog jezika, predlažemo neuralni model sa dinamičnim grafikom znanja koji se razvijaju dok dijalog napreduje. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da je naš model efikasniji u postizanju cilja i više ljudskih sličnih od početnih neuralnih i pravilnih modela.', 'ca': "Estudem un entorn simètric de diàleg col·laboratiu en el qual dos agents, cada un amb coneixements privats, han de comunicar estratègicament per aconseguir un objectiu comú. L'estat de diàleg obert en aquest entorn pose nous reptes als sistemes de diàleg existents. Vam recollir un conjunt de dades d'11K diàleg humà-humà, que mostra interessants elements lèxics, semàntics i estratègics. Per modelar tant el coneixement estructurat com el llenguatge no estructurat, proposem un model neural amb integracions de gràfics de coneixement dinàmics que evolucionen mentre el diàleg progressa. Les evaluacions automàtiques i humanes mostren que el nostre model és tant més eficaç en l'aconseguiment de l'objectiu com més humà que el basal de models neuronals i basats en regles.", 'cs': 'Studujeme symetrické prostředí spolupráce dialogu, ve kterém musí dva agenti, každý se soukromými znalostmi, strategicky komunikovat, aby dosáhli společného cíle. Stav otevřeného dialogu v tomto prostředí představuje nové výzvy pro stávající systémy dialogu. Shromáždili jsme datovou sadu 11K dialogů člověk-člověk, která vykazuje zajímavé lexikální, sémantické a strategické prvky. Pro modelování strukturovaných znalostí i nestrukturovaného jazyka navrhujeme neuronový model s dynamickými vědomostními grafy, které se vyvíjejí s postupem dialogu. Automatická a lidská hodnocení ukazují, že náš model je efektivnější při dosažení cíle a připomíná člověku než základní neuronové a pravidelné modely.', 'et': 'Me uurime sümmeetrilist koostöödialoogi, kus kaks isiklikke teadmisi omavat agenti peavad ühise eesmärgi saavutamiseks strateegiliselt suhtlema. Avatud dialoogi olukord tekitab praegustele dialoogisüsteemidele uusi väljakutseid. Kogusime 11K inim-inimese dialoogi andmekogumi, mis sisaldab huvitavaid leksikaalseid, semantilisi ja strateegilisi elemente. Nii struktureeritud teadmiste kui ka struktureerimata keele modelleerimiseks pakume välja närvimudeli dünaamiliste teadmisgraafikutega, mis arenevad dialoogi edenedes. Automaatsed ja inimlikud hindamised näitavad, et meie mudel on nii efektiivsem eesmärgi saavutamisel kui ka inimlikum kui algne närvi- ja reeglipõhine mudel.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme symmetristä yhteistyödialogia, jossa kahden toimijan, joilla on yksityinen tieto, on kommunikoitava strategisesti yhteisen tavoitteen saavuttamiseksi. Avoin vuoropuhelutila tässä tilanteessa asettaa uusia haasteita nykyisille vuoropuhelujärjestelmille. Keräsimme aineiston 11K ihmisen ja ihmisen dialogista, joka sisältää mielenkiintoisia sanastollisia, semanttisia ja strategisia elementtejä. Sekä strukturoidun tiedon että strukturoimattoman kielen mallintamiseksi ehdotamme neuromallia, jossa on dynaamisia tietokaavioita, jotka kehittyvät dialogin edetessä. Automaattiset ja inhimilliset arvioinnit osoittavat, että mallimme on sekä tehokkaampi tavoitteen saavuttamisessa että inhimillisempi kuin perusneuro- ja sääntöpohjaiset mallit.', 'az': 'Biz simetrik bir işbirlikçi dialogu təhsil edirik ki, hər ikisi özlü bilgi ilə birlikdə bir məqsəd yetişmək üçün stratejik olaraq iletişim edə bilər. Bu qurğudaki açıq-sonlu dialog durumu mevcut dijalog sistemləri üçün yeni çətinliklər yaradır. Biz 11K insan-insan dialogların verilənləri topladıq. Bu olaraq ilginç leksik, semantik və stratejik elementləri göstərir. İki strukturlu elm və strukturlu dil modeli üçün, dinamik elm grafı ilə nürol modeli təklif edirik ki, dialogın ileri gəldiyi zaman dəyişər. Avtomatik və insan değerlendirmələri göstərir ki, modellərimiz həmçinin məqsədilə və insan şəkilindən daha çox neyral və hökmdarlı modellərdən daha etkilidir.', 'af': "Ons studeer 'n simetriese samarbeidende dialoog instelling waarin twee agente, elkeen met privaat kennis, moet strategiese kommunikasie word om 'n gemeenskaplike doel te bereik. Die oop- einde dialoog toestand in hierdie opstelling stel nuwe uitdagings vir bestaande dialoog stelsels. Ons het 'n datastel van 11K menslike-menslike dialoog versamel wat interessante leksiese, semantiese en strategiese elemente vertoon. Om struktureerde kennis en onstruktureerde taal te model, voorstel ons 'n neurale model met dinamiese kennis graaf inbêdings wat uitwikkel as die dialoog vooruil. Outomatiese en menslike evaluasies wys dat ons model beide effektief is om die doel en meer menslike as basisline neurale en reël-gebaseerde modele te bereik.", 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים דיאלוג שיתוף פעולה סימטרי שבה שני סוכנים, כל אחד עם ידע פרטי, חייבים לתקשר באופן אסטרטגי כדי להשיג מטרה משותפת. מצב הדיולוגים הפתוח במסגרת זו יוצר אתגרים חדשים למערכות הדיולוגים הקיומות. אספנו קבוצת נתונים של 11K דיאלוגים אנושיים-אנושיים, שמוצגים אלמנטים לקסיים, סמנטיים וסטרטגיים מעניינים. כדי לדוגמא גם ידע מבוסס וגם שפה לא מבוססת, אנו מציעים דוגמא עצבית עם תוכניות גרף ידע דינמי שמתפתחות בזמן שהדיאלוג מתקדם. הערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות מראות שדוגמאתנו יעילה יותר להשיג את המטרה ומדוגמאות אנושיות יותר ממרכז העצבים ומבוססים על חוקים.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo simetrični dialog, v katerem morata dva agenta, vsak z zasebnim znanjem, strateško komunicirati za dosego skupnega cilja. Stanje odprtega dialoga v tem okviru predstavlja nove izzive za obstoječe sisteme dialoga. Zbrali smo podatkovni nabor 11K človeško-človeških dialogov, ki prikazuje zanimive leksikalne, semantične in strateške elemente. Za modeliranje strukturiranega znanja in nestrukturiranega jezika predlagamo nevronski model z vdelavami dinamičnih grafov znanja, ki se razvijajo z napredovanjem dialoga. Avtomatske in človeške ocene kažejo, da je naš model učinkovitejši pri doseganju cilja in bolj človeški kot osnovni nevronski in pravilni modeli.', 'ha': "Tuna karatun wani zauren akwatin bayani da ke samaki na samuraci, a cikinsa, ma'anar duk mataimaki biyu, wanda yana da ilmi baka, ya kamata a yi wasiyya da shi da kimataci dõmin ya isa wani goan da ke gaba. Halin zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani na buɗe cikin wannan daidaita yana da zane-zane wa tsarin zauren akwatin bayani masu buɗe. Suna samun takardar zajeyen mutane na 11K, wanda ke nuna bakin mazaɓa mai fasahan littafi da sakan mutane. To, don ka motsa laban ilmi da harshen wanda ba'a samar da shi ba, sai mu buƙata wani motsi na neura wanda yana da zane-zane na ci-buƙata cikin zauren akwatin bayani. Ana ƙaddara farat ɗaya da mutum yana nũna cewa misalinmu yana da mafiya amfani ko kuma yana da mafiya amfani ga gaskiyar goani da misalin mutane da misãlin misalin neural da keɓallin rubutu.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi karo dialog sing beraksi iki, ning awak dhéwé karo kesempatan pribadi, kudu beraksi padha kejahatan kanggo ngerasakno iki. dialogs-action Awak dhéwé ngébuté dataset sing nyenengaké 11K karo dialog-uwong sing nyenengaké luwih, semanti karo perbudhakan sing apik. Ngawe model sistem structural karo akeh luwih dumadhi sak gagal gak nggawe, kita supoyo model Neral karo ingkang alam sing dumadhi ingkang diangregan sing bisa dumadhi iki bakal terus lanjut dumadhi iki bakal terus marito. Awakdhéwé éntukane karo uwong sing ngomong nik akeh model sing luwih apik, nik awak dhéwé iso nggawe goal lan tambah kuwi model sing apik dhéwé, ngono model sing susahé katêpakan karo model sing bisa basa.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དོ་དམ་ཟབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་གནས་ལུགས ང་ཚོས་མིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཅིག་གི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་བྱས། To model both structured knowledge and unstructured language, we propose a neural model with dynamic knowledge graph embeddings that evolve as the dialog progresses. རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་མིན་པའི་རྩལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྟངས་ལས་མིན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Belief Tracker : Data-Driven Dialogue State Tracking', 'fr': "Neural Belief Tracker\xa0: suivi de l'état du dialogue basé", 'ar': 'متتبع المعتقدات العصبية: تتبع حالة الحوار المستند إلى البيانات', 'pt': 'Rastreador de crenças neurais: rastreamento de estado de diálogo orientado por dados', 'es': 'Rastreador de creencias neuronales: seguimiento del estado del diálogo basado', 'ru': 'Neural Belief Tracker: отслеживание состояний диалога на основе данных', 'zh': '神经念跟踪器:数驱之', 'ja': 'ニューラル・ベリフ・トラッカー：データ駆動型ダイアログ・ステート・トラッキング', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका विश्वास ट्रैकर: डेटा संचालित संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग', 'ga': 'Rianaire Creidimh Néaraigh: Rianú Stáit Idirphlé Sonraí-tiomáinte', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Data-Driven Dialogue State Tracking', 'el': 'Ανιχνευτής Νευρικής Πίστευσης: Παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου με βάση δεδομένα', 'kk': 'Нейрондық қарау қадамдастырғышы: Деректер- драйвер диалогы күйін қадамдастыру', 'it': 'Neural Belief Tracker: monitoraggio dello stato del dialogo basato sui dati', 'lt': 'Neuralinio tikėjimo sekėjas: duomenų dialogo būklės sekimas', 'mk': 'Наследувач на неврални верувања: Наследување на состојбата на дијалогот со податоци', 'ms': 'Pengejar Kepercayaan Neural: Pengejaran Keadaan Dialog Pemacu Data', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്ന വിശ്വാസം: ഡാറ്റാ- ഡ്രൈവിന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിങ്ക്', 'mt': 'Traċċatur tal-Ħsib Newrali: Traċċar mill-Istat tad-Djalogu mmexxi mid-Dejta', 'mn': 'Дээд-Драйвчлан Диалог Улсын Холбоо', 'no': 'Neuralvisingssporar: Data- Driver- dialog status Tracking', 'pl': 'Neuronal Belief Tracker: monitorowanie stanu dialogu opartego na danych', 'ro': 'Urmărirea credinței neurale: Urmărirea stării dialogului bazat pe date', 'sr': 'Neuralno poverenje: praćenje državnog dijaloga za vožnju podataka', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරල් විශ්වාස පරීක්ෂකය: Data- Driven සංවාද ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂකය', 'so': 'Ganacsiga gaadiidka: Baaridaha labaad-Driven dowladda', 'sv': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Datadriven dialog State Tracking', 'ta': 'நெருக்கமான நம்பிக்கை பின்பற்றி', 'ur': 'نیورال یقین تریکر: Data- Driven Dialog State Tracking', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống cảm nhận thần kinh:', 'bg': 'Проследяване на невронните вярвания: проследяване на състоянието на диалога, управляван от данни', 'da': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Datadrevet Dialog State Tracking', 'hr': 'Praćenik neuralnog vjerovanja: praćenje državnog dijaloga vožnje podataka', 'nl': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Gegevensgestuurde dialoogstatus volgen', 'de': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Datengesteuerte Dialogzustandserfassung', 'id': 'Pelacak Kepercayaan Neural: Pelacakan Negara Dialog Data-Driven', 'fa': 'ردیاب اعتماد عصبی: ردیابی وضعیت محاورۀ محاورۀ داده\u200cها', 'ko': '신경 신념 추적기: 데이터 구동 대화 상태 추적', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Neural: Ufuatiliaji wa Taifa ya Utafiti wa Taifa', 'tr': 'Nätral Görnöşi: Data-Driven Dialog State Tracking', 'sq': 'Gjurmuesi i besimit neuronal: Gjurmimi i gjendjes së dialogut me të dhëna', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հավատքի հետևողը. տվյալների շարժման դասախոսության վիճակ հետևելը', 'az': 'N칬ral 캻nan캼m 캻zl톛칞isi: Data-Driven Dialoog 캻zl톛ri', 'bn': 'নিউরেল বিশ্বাস ট্র্যাকার: ডাটা ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্র ট্র্যাকিং', 'bs': 'Tragač Neuralnog Vjerovanja: Praćenje državnog dijaloga vozača podataka', 'cs': 'Sledování stavu neurální víry: datově řízené monitorování stavu dialogů', 'ca': "Seguir la creença neuronal: Seguir l'estat del diàleg de conducció de dades", 'et': 'Neural Belief Tracker: andmepõhine dialoog State Tracking', 'fi': 'Neural Belief Tracker: Data-Driven Dialogue State Tracking', 'jv': 'FilenameResolutionDuration', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Nevral Belief Tracker: podatkovno usmerjeno dialogsko sledenje stanja', 'he': 'מעקב האמונה העצבית', 'bo': 'ནུས་མཐུན་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱེད་མཁན། སྒུལ་ཆས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གནས་སྟངས་རྗེས'}
{'en': 'One of the core components of modern spoken dialogue systems is the belief tracker, which estimates the user’s goal at every step of the dialogue. However, most current approaches have difficulty scaling to larger, more complex dialogue domains. This is due to their dependency on either : a) Spoken Language Understanding models that require large amounts of annotated training data ; or b) hand-crafted lexicons for capturing some of the linguistic variation in users’ language. We propose a novel Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) framework which overcomes these problems by building on recent advances in representation learning. NBT models reason over pre-trained word vectors, learning to compose them into distributed representations of user utterances and dialogue context. Our evaluation on two datasets shows that this approach surpasses past limitations, matching the performance of state-of-the-art models which rely on hand-crafted semantic lexicons and outperforming them when such lexicons are not provided.', 'ar': 'أحد المكونات الأساسية لأنظمة الحوار المنطوق الحديثة هو أداة تعقب المعتقدات ، والتي تقدر هدف المستخدم في كل خطوة من خطوات الحوار. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم الأساليب الحالية تواجه صعوبة في التوسع إلى مجالات حوار أكبر وأكثر تعقيدًا. ويرجع ذلك إلى اعتمادهم على إما: أ) نماذج فهم اللغة المنطوقة التي تتطلب كميات كبيرة من بيانات التدريب المشروحة ؛ أو ب) معاجم مصنوعة يدويًا لالتقاط بعض الاختلافات اللغوية في لغة المستخدمين. نقترح إطارًا جديدًا لتتبع المعتقدات العصبية (NBT) يتغلب على هذه المشكلات من خلال البناء على التطورات الحديثة في التعلم التمثيلي. تتسبب نماذج NBT في متجهات الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا ، وتتعلم تكوينها في تمثيلات موزعة لأقوال المستخدم وسياق الحوار. يُظهر تقييمنا لمجموعتي بيانات أن هذا النهج يتجاوز القيود السابقة ، ويطابق أداء أحدث النماذج التي تعتمد على المعاجم الدلالية المصنوعة يدويًا وتتفوق عليها في حالة عدم توفير مثل هذه المعاجم.', 'fr': "L'un des composants essentiels des systèmes de dialogue vocal modernes est le tracker de croyances, qui estime l'objectif de l'utilisateur à chaque étape du dialogue. Cependant, la plupart des approches actuelles ont du mal à s'adapter à des domaines de dialogue plus vastes et plus complexes. Cela est dû au fait qu'ils dépendent soit\xa0: a) des modèles de compréhension de la langue parlée qui nécessitent de grandes quantités de données de formation annotées\xa0; soit b) des lexiques conçus à la main pour saisir certaines variations linguistiques dans la langue des utilisateurs. Nous proposons un nouveau cadre de suivi des croyances neuronales (NBT) qui permet de surmonter ces problèmes en s'appuyant sur les récentes avancées dans l'apprentissage des représentations. Les modèles NBT raisonnent sur des vecteurs de mots pré-entraînés, apprenant à les composer en représentations distribuées des énoncés de l'utilisateur et du contexte de dialogue. Notre évaluation de deux ensembles de données montre que cette approche dépasse les limites du passé, en égalant les performances des modèles de pointe qui s'appuient sur des lexiques sémantiques fabriqués à la main et en les surpassant lorsque de tels lexiques ne sont pas fournis.", 'es': 'Uno de los componentes principales de los sistemas modernos de diálogo oral es el rastreador de creencias, que estima el objetivo del usuario en cada paso del diálogo. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los enfoques actuales tienen dificultades para escalar a dominios de diálogo más grandes y complejos. Esto se debe a su dependencia de: a) modelos de comprensión del lenguaje oral que requieren grandes cantidades de datos de entrenamiento anotados; o b) léxicos hechos a mano para captar parte de la variación lingüística en el idioma de los usuarios. Proponemos un nuevo marco de seguimiento de creencias neuronales (NBT) que supera estos problemas basándose en los avances recientes en el aprendizaje de la representación. Los modelos NBT razonan sobre los vectores de palabras previamente entrenados y aprenden a componerlos en representaciones distribuidas de las declaraciones de los usuarios y el contexto del diálogo. Nuestra evaluación de dos conjuntos de datos muestra que este enfoque supera las limitaciones del pasado, igualando el rendimiento de los modelos más modernos que se basan en léxicos semánticos elaborados a mano y los supera cuando no se proporcionan dichos léxicos.', 'pt': 'Um dos componentes centrais dos sistemas modernos de diálogo falado é o rastreador de crenças, que estima o objetivo do usuário em cada etapa do diálogo. No entanto, a maioria das abordagens atuais tem dificuldade em escalar para domínios de diálogo maiores e mais complexos. Isso se deve à sua dependência de: a) Modelos de compreensão da linguagem falada que requerem grandes quantidades de dados de treinamento anotados; ou b) léxicos feitos à mão para capturar algumas das variações linguísticas na linguagem dos usuários. Propomos uma nova estrutura de rastreamento de crenças neurais (NBT) que supera esses problemas com base em avanços recentes na aprendizagem de representação. Os modelos NBT raciocinam sobre vetores de palavras pré-treinados, aprendendo a compô-los em representações distribuídas de enunciados de usuários e contexto de diálogo. Nossa avaliação em dois conjuntos de dados mostra que essa abordagem supera as limitações do passado, igualando o desempenho de modelos de última geração que dependem de léxicos semânticos artesanais e superando-os quando esses léxicos não são fornecidos.', 'hi': 'आधुनिक बोले जाने वाले संवाद प्रणालियों के मुख्य घटकों में से एक विश्वास ट्रैकर है, जो संवाद के हर कदम पर उपयोगकर्ता के लक्ष्य का अनुमान लगाता है। हालांकि, अधिकांश वर्तमान दृष्टिकोणों को बड़े, अधिक जटिल संवाद डोमेन में स्केलिंग करने में कठिनाई होती है। यह या तो पर उनकी निर्भरता के कारण है: ए) बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझ मॉडल जिन्हें बड़ी मात्रा में एनोटेट प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है; या बी) उपयोगकर्ताओं की भाषा में भाषाई भिन्नता में से कुछ पर कब्जा करने के लिए हाथ से तैयार किए गए शब्दकोश। हम एक उपन्यास न्यूरल विश्वास ट्रैकिंग (एनबीटी) ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने में हाल ही में प्रगति पर निर्माण करके इन समस्याओं को दूर करता है। NBT मॉडल पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द वैक्टर पर कारण, उन्हें उपयोगकर्ता कथन और संवाद संदर्भ के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व में लिखने के लिए सीखना। दो डेटासेट पर हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि यह दृष्टिकोण पिछली सीमाओं को पार करता है, जो अत्याधुनिक मॉडल के प्रदर्शन से मेल खाता है जो हाथ से तैयार किए गए शब्दार्थ शब्दकोशों पर भरोसा करते हैं और जब ऐसे शब्दकोश प्रदान नहीं किए जाते हैं तो उन्हें पछाड़ते हैं।', 'zh': '今世口语系统之核组成部分其一信念跟踪器,可以一步度用户。 然大抵世法多难扩及更大、更杂之对。 赖以下任一:a)须大注训数之语。 或b)手工之词典,以获用户语之变。 新神经信踵(NBT)框架,框架结表征最新进展以克之。 NBT 推理于先训之词向量,学而组合成用户之上下文分布式。 吾于两集之评,越于旧局限性,配于工语义词典之先进模形之性,而优于不供之词典。', 'ja': '現代の口頭対話システムの中核的な構成要素の1つは、信念トラッカーであり、対話のすべてのステップでユーザーの目標を推定します。 しかし、現在のアプローチのほとんどは、より大きな、より複雑なダイアログドメインにスケーリングすることが困難である。 これは、a ）大量の注釈付きトレーニングデータを必要とする口語理解モデル、またはb ）ユーザーの言語における言語変動の一部を取り込むために手作りされた辞書のいずれかに依存しているためです。 私たちは、表現学習の最近の進歩に基づいて、これらの問題を克服する新しい神経信念追跡（ NBT ）フレームワークを提案します。 NBTモデルは、事前に訓練された単語ベクトルを推論し、ユーザーの発話と対話文脈の分散表現にそれらを構成することを学ぶ。 2つのデータセットに対する私たちの評価は、このアプローチが過去の制限を超えており、手作りの意味論的辞書に依存する最先端のモデルのパフォーマンスと一致し、そのような辞書が提供されていない場合にそれらを上回ることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Одним из ключевых компонентов современных систем разговорного диалога является трекер убеждений, который оценивает цель пользователя на каждом этапе диалога. Вместе с тем большинство современных подходов сопряжены с трудностями при переходе к более крупным и сложным областям диалога. Это связано с их зависимостью от: а) моделей понимания разговорного языка, требующих больших объемов аннотированных обучающих данных; или b) составленных вручную лексиконов для фиксации некоторых лингвистических вариаций в языке пользователей. Мы предлагаем новую структуру отслеживания нейронных убеждений (NBT), которая преодолевает эти проблемы, опираясь на последние достижения в обучении репрезентации. NBT модели рассуждают о предварительно обученных векторах слов, учась складывать их в распределенные представления высказываний пользователей и контекста диалога. Наша оценка двух наборов данных показывает, что этот подход превосходит прошлые ограничения, сопоставляя производительность современных моделей, которые опираются на семантические лексиконы ручной работы и превосходят их, когда такие лексиконы не предоставляются.', 'ga': 'Ceann de chroí-chomhpháirteanna na gcóras comhphlé labhartha nua-aimseartha is ea an rianaitheoir creidimh, a dhéanann meastachán ar sprioc an úsáideora ag gach céim den idirphlé. Mar sin féin, bíonn deacracht ag an gcuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann faoi láthair a scálú go réimsí comhphlé níos mó agus níos casta. Is é is cúis leis seo ná go mbraitheann siad ar cheachtar díobh seo a leanas: a) Múnlaí Tuiscint Teanga Labhartha a éilíonn méid mór sonraí oiliúna anótáilte; nó b) foclóirí lámhdhéanta chun cuid den éagsúlacht teanga i dteanga úsáideoirí a ghabháil. Molaimid creat nua Rianú Creideamh Néarach (NBT) a sháraíonn na fadhbanna seo trí thógáil ar an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí i bhfoghlaim ionadaíochta. Réitíonn samhlacha NBT le veicteoirí focal réamhoilte, ag foghlaim conas iad a chumadh i léiriú dáilte ar chainteanna úsáideoirí agus ar chomhthéacs an chomhphlé. Léiríonn ár measúnú ar dhá thacar sonraí go sáraíonn an cur chuige seo teorainneacha a bhí ann roimhe seo, ag teacht le feidhmíocht na samhlacha úrscothacha a bhíonn ag brath ar fhoclóirí shéimeantacha lámhdhéanta agus a sháraíonn iad nuair nach soláthraítear na foclóirí sin.', 'el': 'Ένα από τα βασικά συστατικά των σύγχρονων συστημάτων προφορικού διαλόγου είναι ο ανιχνευτής πεποιθήσεων, ο οποίος εκτιμά τον στόχο του χρήστη σε κάθε βήμα του διαλόγου. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις δυσκολεύονται να επεκταθούν σε μεγαλύτερους και πιο σύνθετους τομείς διαλόγου. Αυτό οφείλεται στην εξάρτησή τους είτε από: α) μοντέλα κατανόησης ομιλούμενης γλώσσας που απαιτούν μεγάλες ποσότητες σχολιασμένων δεδομένων κατάρτισης· ή β) χειροποίητα λεξικά για την καταγραφή ορισμένων γλωσσικών παραλλαγών στη γλώσσα των χρηστών. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο παρακολούθησης νευρωνικών πεποιθήσεων (NBT), το οποίο ξεπερνά αυτά τα προβλήματα, βασιζόμενος στις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στη μάθηση αναπαράστασης. Το NBT μοντέλα λογικής πάνω από προ-εκπαιδευμένα διανύσματα λέξεων, μαθαίνοντας να τα συνθέτουν σε κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις των προφορών χρηστών και του πλαισίου διαλόγου. Η αξιολόγησή μας σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνει ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τους περιορισμούς του παρελθόντος, αντιστοιχώντας στην απόδοση μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας τα οποία βασίζονται σε χειροποίητα σημασιολογικά λεξικά και τα ξεπερνούν όταν δεν παρέχονται τέτοια λεξικά.', 'hu': 'A modern beszélt párbeszédrendszerek egyik legfontosabb eleme a hit tracker, amely a párbeszéd minden lépésében becsüli a felhasználó célját. A legtöbb jelenlegi megközelítés azonban nehéz nagyobb, bonyolultabb párbeszédterületekre kiterjeszteni. Ez annak köszönhető, hogy függnek a következőktől: a) beszélt nyelvi megértési modellektől, amelyek nagy mennyiségű jegyzetelt képzési adatot igényelnek; vagy b) kézzel készített lexikonok a felhasználók nyelvi változásainak egy részének rögzítésére. Egy új Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) keretrendszert javasolunk, amely ezeket a problémákat a reprezentációs tanulás közelmúltbeli fejlődésére építve oldja meg. Az NBT modellek az előre képzett szóvektorok fölött érvelnek, megtanulják azokat a felhasználói kijelentések elosztott reprezentációjába és a párbeszéd kontextusába komponálni. Két adatkészleten végzett értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy ez a megközelítés felülmúlja a múltbeli korlátokat, illeszkedik a kézzel készített szemantikai lexikonokra támaszkodó korszerű modellek teljesítményéhez, és felülmúlja azokat, amikor ilyen lexikonok nincsenek megadva.', 'ka': 'მოდიალოგის დიალოგის სისტემის ერთი კომპონენტები იყო წარმოდგენება, რომელიც მომხმარებლის მიზეზი ყველა დიალოგის კონონენტებში იქნება. მაგრამ, უფრო მეტი მიმდინარეობის მიღება უფრო დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის შესაძლებლობა. (a) წარმოდგენილი ენის განსხვავების მოდელები, რომლებიც უნდა დიდი რაოდენობა მონაცემების განსხვავება; ან b) გამოიყენებელი ენის რამდენიმე ლექსიკონის განცვლების შესახებ. ჩვენ პრომენტის ნეიროლური მეგობრების შენახვა (NBT) ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ამ პრობლემებს გადავიწყებს, რომელიც ახალი პროგრამების განმავლობაში გადავიწყებთ. Name ჩვენი განსაზღვრება ორი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში მოჩვენება, რომ ეს პროგრამა უფრო მეტი განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია მსოფლიოს მოდელეების პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც პროგრამის სემენ', 'it': "Una delle componenti principali dei moderni sistemi di dialogo parlato è il tracker di credenze, che stima l'obiettivo dell'utente in ogni fase del dialogo. Tuttavia, la maggior parte degli approcci attuali ha difficoltà a scalare domini di dialogo più ampi e complessi. Ciò è dovuto alla loro dipendenza da: a) modelli di comprensione linguistica parlata che richiedono grandi quantità di dati di formazione annotati; o b) lessici artigianali per catturare alcune delle variazioni linguistiche nella lingua degli utenti. Proponiamo un nuovo framework di Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) che risolve questi problemi basandosi sui recenti progressi nell'apprendimento della rappresentazione. I modelli NBT ragionano su vettori di parole pre-addestrati, imparando a comporrli in rappresentazioni distribuite delle espressioni degli utenti e del contesto di dialogo. La nostra valutazione su due set di dati mostra che questo approccio supera i limiti del passato, abbinando le prestazioni di modelli all'avanguardia che si basano su lessici semantici artigianali e superandoli quando tali lessici non sono forniti.", 'lt': 'Vienas iš pagrindinių šiuolaikinių kalbėtojo dialogo sistemų komponentų yra tikėjimo sekėjas, kuris vertina naudotojo tikslą kiekviename dialogo etape. Tačiau dauguma dabartinių metodų sunku plėtoti į didesnes ir sudėtingesnes dialogo sritis. Tai atsiranda dėl jų priklausomybės nuo: a) kalbos supratimo modelių, kuriems reikalingas didelis užrašytų mokymo duomenų kiekis; arba b) rankinius leksikonus, skirtus užfiksuoti tam tikrą kalbų skirtumą naudotojų kalboje. Siūlome naują neurologinio pasitikėjimo sekimo sistemą, kuri išspręstų šias problemas remdamasi neseniai padaryta pažanga atstovavimo mokymosi srityje. NBT models reason over pre-trained word vectors, learning to compose them into distributed representations of user utterances and dialogue context.  Mūsų atliktas dviejų duomenų rinkinių vertinimas rodo, kad šis metodas viršija ankstesnius apribojimus, atitinkančius pažangiausių modelių, kurie remiasi rankiniu semantiniu leksikonu, rezultatus ir juos viršija, kai tokių leksikonų nėra.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі сөйлейтін диалог жүйелерінің негізгі компоненттерінің бірі - сенім қадағалаушы, бұл диалогтың әрбір қадамында пайдаланушының мақсатын бағалайды. Бірақ қазіргі жағдайдың көпшілігі үлкен диалог домендеріне масштабтау қиын болады. Бұл бір-бірінің тәуелсіздігінің себебі: a) Тілдерді түсіндіру үлгілерін түсіндіру үлгілері, олардың үлкен мәліметтері керек. немесе b) пайдаланушылардың тілдегі лингвистикалық айнымалылығын түсіру үшін қолмен құрылған лексикондар. Біз бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін жаңа бағдарламаларды бағыттау үшін жаңа жағдайларды көтеріп, нейралық сенімді қарау (NBT) қоршауын ұсынамыз. NBT үлгілерін алдын- ала оқылған сөздердің векторларының себебі, оларды пайдаланушылардың сөздері мен диалог контекстінің таратылған түрінде жасау үшін үйрену. Біздің екі деректер қорларының оқиғаларымыз бұл тәсілді өткен шектерді өзгертеді, қолмен құрылған семантикалық лексикондарға тәуелді, оларды келтірілмеген кезде оның шектеріне сәйкес келеді.', 'ms': 'Salah satu komponen utama sistem dialog bercakap modern adalah pengesan kepercayaan, yang menghargai tujuan pengguna pada setiap langkah dialog. Namun, kebanyakan pendekatan semasa mempunyai kesulitan memasukkan ke domain dialog yang lebih besar dan lebih kompleks. Ini disebabkan dependensi mereka pada: a) Model Pemahaman Bahasa Bercakap yang memerlukan jumlah besar data latihan yang dicatat; atau b) leksikon buatan tangan untuk menangkap sebahagian variasi bahasa dalam bahasa pengguna. Kami mengusulkan kerangka pengesan kepercayaan saraf (NBT) yang baru yang mengatasi masalah ini dengan membina kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembelajaran perwakilan. Alasan model NBT melalui vektor perkataan yang dilatih-terlatih, belajar untuk mengkomposisinya ke dalam perwakilan yang disebarkan bagi ungkapan pengguna dan konteks dialog. Evaluasi kami pada dua set data menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan ini melebihi keterangan masa lalu, yang sepadan dengan prestasi model-state-of-the-art yang bergantung pada leksikon semantik buatan tangan dan melebihi mereka apabila leksikon tersebut tidak diberikan.', 'ml': 'ആധുനിക സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഘടകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ് വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ട്രാക്ടര്\u200d, അത് ഡയലോഗ എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ നടപടികളില്\u200d മിക്കവും വലുതായ, കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഡയലോഗ് ഡൊമെയിനുകള്\u200dക്ക് കഠി ഇത് അവരുടെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിനാലും കാരണം: ഭാഷയിലെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കായി സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രശ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d ചില ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്ത ലെക്സിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d. പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന നോവല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d വിശ് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും NBT മോഡല്\u200d കാരണം, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വാക്കുകളും ഡയലോഗ് കോണ്\u200dസെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ സമ്പാദം കഴിഞ്ഞ പരിധികളിലൂടെ കടന്നുപോകുന്നു. ഇതില്\u200d നിന്നും കൈക്കൊള്ളുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് ല', 'mk': 'Еден од главните компоненти на модерните дијалошки системи е следачот на верувањата, кој ја проценува целта на корисникот во секој чекор од дијалогот. Сепак, повеќето сегашни пристапи имаат тешкотии да се променат во поголеми, покомплексни дијалошки домени. Ова се должи на нивната зависност од: a) моделите за разбирање на зборуваниот јазик кои бараат големи количини на анотирани податоци за обука; или b) рачно направени лексикони за снимање на некои од јазичните варијации на јазикот на корисниците. Ние предложуваме нова рамка за следење на невралните верувања (НБТ), која ги надминува овие проблеми со изградба на неодамнешните напредоци во учењето на претставништвото. НБТ модели размислуваат за предобучени вектори на зборови, учејќи се да ги состават во дистрибуирани претставувања на изразите на корисникот и контекст на дијалогот. Нашата оценка на двата датотеки покажува дека овој пристап ги надминува минатите ограничувања, одговарајќи се со изведувањето на најсовремените модели кои се потпираат на рачно направени семантични лексикони и ги надминуваат кога ваквите лексикони не се обезбедени.', 'mt': 'Waħda mill-komponenti ewlenin tas-sistemi moderni tad-djalogu mitkellem hija t-traċċatur tat-twemmin, li jistma l-għan tal-utent f’kull pass tad-djalogu. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi attwali għandhom diffikultà biex jikbru lejn oqsma ta’ djalogu akbar u aktar kumplessi. Dan huwa dovut għad-dipendenza tagħhom fuq: a) mudelli ta’ fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma li jeħtieġu ammonti kbar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ annotata; jew b) lexicons maħduma bl-idejn biex jinqabdu xi wħud mill-varjazzjoni lingwistika fil-lingwa tal-utenti. Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid għat-Traċċar tal-Ħsib Newrali (NBT) li jegħleb dawn il-problemi billi nibnu fuq avvanzi riċenti fit-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza. Il-mudelli NBT jirrakkomandaw fuq vetturi tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel, jitgħallmu jikkomponuhom f’rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet tal-utent u kuntest ta’ djalogu. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna dwar żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta turi li dan l-approċċ jaqbeż il-limitazzjonijiet tal-passat, li jaqbel mal-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli l-aktar avvanzati li jiddependu fuq lexicons semantiċi maħduma bl-idejn u li jaqbżuhom meta dawn il-lexicons ma jkunux ipprovduti.', 'no': 'Ein av dei kjernekomponentane i moderne tale dialogsystemet er trosstrekkeren, som vurderer brukaren målet på kvar steg i dialogen. Dei fleste gjeldande tilnærmingane har likevel vanskeleg skalering til større, meir komplekse dialogdomene. Dette er på grunn av deres avhengighet på anten: a) Spoken Language Understanding Modeller som krev stor mengdar av oppmerkingsdata; eller b) hand-crafted lexicons for å henta nokre av dei lingviske variasjonane i brukarspråket. Vi foreslår eit nytt nettverkssporing (NBT) rammeverk som overfører desse problemene ved å bygge på nyleg avansert i læring av representasjon. NBT-modeller grunn over føretrainerte ord-vektorar, læring å lage dei i distribuert representasjonar av brukarstaler og dialogkontekst. Vårt evaluering på to datasett viser at denne tilnærminga overstyrer forrige grenser, som passar med utviklinga av kunstmodeller som rely på håndkrafta semantiske leksikon og utfører dei når slike leksikon ikkje er tilgjengeleg.', 'pl': 'Jednym z podstawowych elementów nowoczesnych systemów dialogu mówionego jest śledzenie wierzeń, które szacuje cel użytkownika na każdym etapie dialogu. Jednakże większość obecnych podejść ma trudności ze skalowaniem do większych, bardziej złożonych obszarów dialogu. Wynika to z ich zależności od: a) modeli rozumienia języka spoken, które wymagają dużej ilości adnotacji danych treningowych; b) ręcznie tworzone leksykony służące uchwyceniu niektórych zmian językowych w języku użytkowników. Proponujemy nowe ramy śledzenia wiary neuronowej (NBT), które pokonują te problemy poprzez oparcie o ostatnie postępy w nauce reprezentacji. NBT modeluje rozum nad wstępnie przeszkolonymi wektorami słów, ucząc się ich składać w rozproszone reprezentacje wypowiedzi użytkowników i kontekstu dialogu. Nasza ocena na dwóch zbiorach danych pokazuje, że podejście to przekracza wcześniejsze ograniczenia, dopasowując wydajność najnowocześniejszych modeli, które opierają się na ręcznie tworzonych leksykonach semantycznych i przewyższają je, gdy takie leksykony nie są dostarczane.', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн ярилцлагын диалог системийн нэг хэсэг нь итгэлтэй дагуулагч юм. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчийн зорилго диалогын алхам бүрт тооцогдог. Гэвч ихэнх орчин үеийн ойлголт нь том, илүү нарийн диалог хэсэгт хэцүү байдаг. Энэ нь тэдний хоорондоо хамааралтай байдал болохоор: a) хэл ойлгох загварууд нь маш их хэмжээний сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн өгөгдлийг шаарддаг. (b) хэрэглэгчийн хэл дээр хэдэн хэлний өөрчлөлтийг барьж авсан лексиконууд. Бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг саяхан үзүүлэх сургалтын хөгжлийн талаар шинэ нээлттэй мэдрэлийн итгэл үнэмшил (NBT) дүрслэлийг дэмжиж байна. NBT загварын шалтгаан нь өмнө суралцагдсан үгний векторуудын хуваарилагдсан хэлбэрүүдийн илтгэл болон диалогын тухай хуваарилагдсан хэлбэрүүдийг суралцаж байна. Хоёр өгөгдлийн сангийн үнэлгээ нь энэ арга нь өнгөрсөн хязгаарлалтыг илүү өнгөрсөн, урлагийн загваруудын үйл ажиллагааг харуулж, гар бүтээгдэхүүний семантик лексиконууд дээр хадгалагдаж, ийм лексиконууд хангахгүй байхад илүү өнгөрсөн.', 'ro': 'Una dintre componentele de bază ale sistemelor moderne de dialog vorbit este trackerul credințelor, care estimează obiectivul utilizatorului la fiecare pas al dialogului. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea abordărilor actuale întâmpină dificultăți în a ajunge la domenii de dialog mai mari și mai complexe. Acest lucru se datorează dependenței lor de: a) modele de înțelegere a limbilor vorbite care necesită cantități mari de date de formare adnotate; sau b) lexicoane realizate manual pentru a surprinde o parte din variațiile lingvistice ale limbii utilizatorilor. Propunem un nou cadru de urmărire a credinței neurale (NBT) care depășește aceste probleme, bazându-se pe progresele recente în învățarea reprezentării. Modelele NBT raționează asupra vectorilor de cuvinte pre-instruiți, învățând să le compună în reprezentări distribuite ale expresiilor utilizatorilor și contextului de dialog. Evaluarea noastră pe două seturi de date arată că această abordare depășește limitările din trecut, potrivit performanțelor modelelor de ultimă generație care se bazează pe lexicoane semantice realizate manual și le depășește atunci când astfel de lexicoane nu sunt furnizate.', 'sr': 'Jedan od osnovnih komponenata modernog govornog dijaloga je praćenik verovanja, koji procjenjuje cilj korisnika na svakom koraku dijaloga. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa imaju teške skale do većih, kompleksnih dijalogskih domena. To je zbog njihove ovisnosti od bilo koga: a) modeli razumevanja jezika koji zahtevaju velike količine annotiranih podataka o obuci; ili b) rukopisane leksikone za uhvatanje nekih jezika jezika korisnika. Predlažemo novi okvir Neuralnog praćenja vjerovanja (NBT), koji prevlada te probleme izgradnjem nedavnih napredova u učenju predstavljanja. NBT modeli razlog preko predobučenih vektora riječi, učeći ih sastaviti u raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima govora korisnika i konteksta dijaloga. Naša procjena na dva podataka pokazuje da ovaj pristup prelazi preko prošlih ograničenja, odgovarajući provedbi modela države umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na semantičke leksione koje su napravljene rukama i nadmašuju ih kada takvi leksioni nisu pruženi.', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah kooxaha hoose ee nidaamka dialogka ee modern waa kooxaha aaminka, kaas oo qiimeeya goalka uu isticmaalayo tallaabo kasta oo diyaarinta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dhaqdhaqaaqyada hada ee badankoodu waxay ku adag yihiin in ay ka sii qallafsadaan meelaha dialogka oo adag. This is due to their dependency on either: a) Spoken Language Understanding models that require large amounts of annotated training data;  ama (b) leksisiyada gacanta lagu isticmaalay si aad u qabsato qaar ka duwan luuqadaha afka isticmaalayaasha. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qoraal cilmi ah oo ku saabsan dhibaatooyinkaas, kaas oo ku guulaysanaya dhismaha horumarinta barbaarinta. Tusaalada NBT waxey sabab u leedahay wadooyinka hadalka horay loo tababaray, waxayna bartaan inay u samaystaan noocyo kala duduwan oo ku qoran hadallada isticmaalayaasha iyo qoraalka. Qiimeynta labada macluumaad ee ku qoran waxaa tusaya in qaabkanu dhaafaa xadiiqooyinkii hore, iyadoo la mid ah sameynta sameynta tusaalooyinka farshaxanka ee ay ku tiirsan yihiin lexicada gacanta lagu qaban karo iyo ka sameynaya marka aan la siinayn lexicada caynkaas ah.', 'sv': 'En av kärnkomponenterna i moderna talade dialogsystem är trosspåraren, som uppskattar användarens mål i varje steg i dialogen. De flesta nuvarande tillvägagångssätt har dock svårt att skala till större, mer komplexa dialogområden. Detta beror på deras beroende av antingen: a) Tal Language Understanding modeller som kräver stora mängder kommenterade träningsdata; eller b) handgjorda lexikon för att fånga upp en del av den språkliga variationen i användarnas språk. Vi föreslår ett nytt ramverk för Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) som löser dessa problem genom att bygga på de senaste framstegen inom representationslärandet. NBT-modeller resonerar över förutbildade ordvektorer och lär sig att komponera dem i distribuerade representationer av användaryttringar och dialogsammanhang. Vår utvärdering av två datauppsättningar visar att detta tillvägagångssätt överträffar tidigare begränsningar, matchar prestanda hos state-of-the-art modeller som förlitar sig på handgjorda semantiska lexikon och överträffar dem när sådana lexikon inte tillhandahålls.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய உரையாடல் முறைமைகளின் மூல பொருள் ஆனால் தற்போதைய முன்னேற்றங்களில் பெரிய அளவிடுதல் பெரிய, அதிக சிக்கலான உரையாடல் தளங்கள் உள்ளது. இது அவர்களுடைய சார்பு இருக்கும் காரணமாகும்: a) பேச்சு மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகள் பெரிய குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற அல்லது (b) பயனர்களின் மொழியில் சில மொழிமாற்றங்களை எடுக்க கையால் கையாள்விகள். We propose a novel Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) framework which overcomes these problems by building on recent advances in representation learning.  முன் பயிற்சி சொல் வெக்டார்களுக்கு மேல் NBT மாதிரிகள் காரணம், அவற்றை பங்கீட்டு வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் உரையாடல் சூழல் மூலம இரண்டு தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் மதிப்பு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது இந்த அணுக்கம் முந்தைய வரம்புகளை கடந்து செல்கிறது என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறது, இது கையில் சார்ந்து கொள', 'si': 'අද්\u200dයුතික කතා කරපු සංවාද පද්ධතියේ මුළු කොටස් එකක් තමයි විශ්වාස පද්ධතිය පරික්ෂකය, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ  නමුත්, බොහොම දැන් ප්\u200dරවේශ විදිහට අමාරුයි වැඩි සංවාදය සංවාදය සංවාදය විදිහට වැඩියි. මේක ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාවක් නිසා: a) ස්පූක් භාෂාවක් තේරුම් මොඩේල් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ (b) භාෂකයන්ගේ භාෂාවට භාෂාවික වෙනස් වලින් අල්ලගන්න සඳහා අත් කළු ලෙක්සිකන්ස්. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් විශ්වාස (NBT) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා අලුත්  NBT මොඩේල් හේතුව ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත වචන වෙක්ටර් වලට, ඔවුන්ව ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ වචන සහ සංවාදය සම්බන්ධයෙන් විතරයි  අපේ දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විශ්වාස අතින් සීමාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා කියලා, ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අතින් ස', 'ur': 'موجود بات کی ڈالیٹ سیسٹم کی ایک اصلی رقم ہے کہ ایمان تراکر ہے، جو ہر سطح کے درمیان کارساز کا مقصد کا اندازہ رکھتا ہے. لیکن اکثر موجود طریقے کے لئے بڑے، زیادہ پیچیدہ ڈومین تک ترکیب مشکل ہے. یہ ان کے اعتباری کی وجہ سے ہے: a) زبان سمجھنے کی مدل جو بہت سی اندازے کی تعلیم دادہ کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں۔ یا (b) کارساز کی زبان میں کچھ زبان اختلاف پکڑنے کے لئے ہاتھ پیدا کئے گئے لکسیون۔ ہم ایک نور نیورل یقین ترکیکینگ (NBT) فرم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ان مشکلوں پر اچھی پیشرفت کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ سے زیادتی کرتا ہے۔ NBT موڈلوں کی دلیل پہلے تدریس کی لغات ویکتروں پر ہے، اسے سمجھتے ہیں کہ اسے کارساز کلمات اور диалог کنٹنس کی تقسیم کی تصویر میں ترکیب کریں۔ دو ڈاٹ سٹ پر ہمارا ارزیابی دکھاتا ہے کہ یہ طریقہ پہلے کی حدود سے گزر جاتا ہے، اس طریقہ کے مطابق جو ہاتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے سیمانٹی لکسونز پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں اور ان سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں جب ایسی لکسونز نہیں کی جاتی۔', 'uz': "Name Lekin ko'pchilik murakkab muloqat domenelariga qisqarish qiyin edi. Bu ularning ikkinchisiga ishlatadigan sababi: a) Tilni o'rganish modellari uchun katta taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak; yoki foydalanuvchilar tilida bir necha tillar o'zgarishni olish uchun qo'llab qo'llangan leksikalar. We propose a novel Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) framework which overcomes these problems by building on recent advances in representation learning.  Name Ikki maʼlumotlar saytida qiymatmiz esa, bu usul past chegaralarni o'zgartiradi. Bu holatning holatiga qo'llab qo'llangan semantik leksikalariga ishlatadigan modellarning bajarayonligiga mos keladi.", 'vi': 'Một trong những thành phần cốt lõi của hệ thống đối thoại nói tiếng hiện đại là bộ theo dấu niềm tin, ước tính mục tiêu của người dùng ở mỗi bước của cuộc đối thoại. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp hiện thời gặp khó khăn khi áp dụng tới các lĩnh vực đối thoại lớn hơn. Việc này là do họ phụ thuộc vào: a) các mô hình ngôn ngữ khai ngữ yêu cầu một lượng lớn dữ liệu đào tạo ghi chú; hoặc b) từ viết tay để thu thập một số biến dạng ngôn ngữ trong ngôn ngữ của người dùng. Chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ phận theo dõi thần kinh (NBC) mới giải quyết được vấn đề này bằng cách dựa trên tiến bộ gần đây trong việc học đại diện. Mẫu đài NBC chi tiết về các cỗ máy phát ngôn từ được đào tạo trước, học cách chế tạo chúng thành các biểu tượng phổ biến của người dùng và ngữ cảnh thoại. Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi trên hai bộ dữ liệu cho thấy rằng phương pháp này vượt qua giới hạn trước, trùng khớp với các mô hình nền văn học hiện đại, dựa trên ngôn ngữ văn học nhân tạo và xử lí chúng khi không cung cấp các ngôn ngữ đó.', 'bg': 'Един от основните компоненти на съвременните системи за говорен диалог е проследяващият вярвания, който оценява целта на потребителя на всяка стъпка от диалога. Въпреки това, повечето съвременни подходи трудно се мащабират към по-големи, по-сложни диалогови области. Това се дължи на зависимостта им от: а) модели за разбиране на говоримия език, които изискват големи количества анотирани данни за обучение; или б) ръчно изработени лексикони за улавяне на част от езиковите вариации в езика на потребителите. Предлагаме нова рамка за проследяване на невронните вярвания (НБТ), която преодолява тези проблеми, като се основава на скорошния напредък в обучението за представителство. НБТ моделира разсъждения над предварително обучените текстови вектори, научавайки се да ги композира в разпределени представи на потребителските изказвания и диалоговия контекст. Нашата оценка на два набора от данни показва, че този подход надминава предишните ограничения, като съвпада с производителността на съвременните модели, които разчитат на ръчно изработени семантични лексикони и ги превъзхожда, когато такива лексикони не са предоставени.', 'da': 'En af kernekomponenterne i moderne taledialogsystemer er trossporeren, som vurderer brugerens mål i hvert trin i dialogen. De fleste nuværende tilgange har imidlertid svært ved at skalere til større, mere komplekse dialogområder. Dette skyldes deres afhængighed af enten: a) Talken Language Understandsmodeller, der kræver store mængder noterede træningsdata; eller b) håndlavede leksikoner til at indfange nogle af de sproglige variationer i brugernes sprog. Vi foreslår en ny ramme for Neural Belief Tracking (NBT), som løser disse problemer ved at bygge på de seneste fremskridt inden for repræsentationslæring. NBT modeller resonerer over forududdannede ordvektorer og lærer at sammensætte dem i distribuerede repræsentationer af brugernes udtalelser og dialogkontekst. Vores evaluering af to datasæt viser, at denne tilgang overgår tidligere begrænsninger og matcher ydeevnen af state-of-the-art modeller, der er afhængige af håndlavede semantiske leksikoner, og overgår dem, når sådanne leksikoner ikke leveres.', 'nl': 'Een van de kerncomponenten van moderne gesproken dialoogsystemen is de geloofstracker, die bij elke stap van de dialoog het doel van de gebruiker inschat. De meeste huidige benaderingen hebben echter moeite om te schalen naar grotere, complexere dialoogdomeinen. Dit is te wijten aan hun afhankelijkheid van: a) Spoken Language Understanding modellen die grote hoeveelheden geannoteerde trainingsgegevens vereisen; of b) handgemaakte lexicons voor het vastleggen van een deel van de taalvariatie in de taal van gebruikers. We stellen een nieuw kader voor Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) voor dat deze problemen overwint door voort te bouwen op recente vooruitgang in representatie learning. NBT modelleert redenering over vooraf getrainde woordvectoren en leert ze samen te stellen in gedistribueerde representaties van gebruikersuitingen en dialoogcontext. Onze evaluatie op twee datasets toont aan dat deze benadering beperkingen uit het verleden overtreft en overeenkomt met de prestaties van state-of-the-art modellen die gebaseerd zijn op handgemaakte semantische lexicons en deze overtreft wanneer dergelijke lexicons niet worden verstrekt.', 'hr': 'Jedan od osnovnih komponenta modernih govornih dijalogskih sustava je praćenik vjerovanja, koji procjenjuje cilj korisnika na svakom koraku dijaloga. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa imaju teškoća skaliranja na veće, složenije dijalogske domene. To je zbog njihove ovisnosti od bilo kojeg: a) modeli razumijevanja jezika koji zahtijevaju velike količine annotiranih podataka o obuci; ili b) rukopisane leksikone za uhvaćenje nekih jezika jezika korisnika. Predlažemo novi okvir za praćenje neurološkog vjerovanja (NBT), koji prevlada te probleme izgradnjem nedavnih napredova u učenju predstavljanja. NBT modeli razlog preko predobučenih vektora riječi, učeći ih sastaviti u raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima izraza korisnika i konteksta dijaloga. Naša procjena na dva podataka pokazuje da ovaj pristup prelazi preko prošlih ograničenja, odgovarajući učinkovitosti modela države umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na semantičke lekcije koje su napravljene rukama i nadmašuju ih kad se takvi leksioni ne pružaju.', 'de': 'Eine der Kernkomponenten moderner Sprachdialogsysteme ist der Glaubenstracker, der das Ziel des Benutzers in jedem Schritt des Dialogs schätzt. Die meisten aktuellen Ansätze haben jedoch Schwierigkeiten, sich auf größere, komplexere Dialogbereiche zu skalieren. Dies liegt an ihrer Abhängigkeit von: a) Modellen zur Verständigung der gesprochenen Sprache, die große Mengen annotierter Trainingsdaten erfordern; oder b) handgefertigte Lexikone zur Erfassung einiger sprachlicher Variationen in der Sprache der Benutzer. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) Framework vor, das diese Probleme überwindet, indem es auf jüngsten Fortschritten im Repräsentationslernen aufbaut. NBT modelliert Vernunft über vortrainierte Wortvektoren und lernt, sie in verteilte Darstellungen von Benutzeräußerungen und Dialogkontext zu komponieren. Unsere Auswertung an zwei Datensätzen zeigt, dass dieser Ansatz vergangene Grenzen übertrifft und die Leistung moderner Modelle, die auf handgefertigten semantischen Lexikonen basieren, übertrifft und übertrifft, wenn solche Lexikone nicht bereitgestellt werden.', 'ko': '현대 구어 대화 시스템의 핵심 구성 요소 중 하나는 신념 추적기인데 대화의 한 걸음 한 걸음 사용자의 목표를 예측할 수 있다.그러나 현재 대부분의 방법은 더 크고 복잡한 대화 영역으로 확장되기 어렵다.이것은 다음과 같은 두 가지 모델 중 하나에 의존하기 때문이다. a) 주석이 달린 훈련 데이터의 구어 이해 모델이 대량으로 필요하기 때문이다.또는 b) 사용자 언어의 일부 언어 변형을 포착하기 위해 수동으로 만든 어휘.우리는 표징 학습의 최신 진전을 바탕으로 이러한 문제점을 극복한 새로운 신경 신념 추적(NBT) 구조를 제시했다.NBT모델은 미리 훈련된 단어의 벡터를 추리하고 이를 사용자 언어와 대화 상하문의 분포식 표시로 조합하는 것을 배운다.두 데이터 집합에 대한 평가에 따르면 이런 방법은 과거의 한계를 넘어 수공으로 제작된 의미 사전의 가장 선진적인 모델의 성능과 일치하고 이런 사전을 제공하지 않은 상황에서 그것들보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Salah satu komponen utama dari sistem dialog berbicara modern adalah pelacak keyakinan, yang memperkirakan tujuan pengguna pada setiap langkah dari dialog. Namun, kebanyakan pendekatan saat ini memiliki kesulitan memperbesar ke domain dialog yang lebih kompleks. Ini karena mereka tergantung pada: a) Model Pemahaman Bahasa Berbicara yang memerlukan jumlah besar data pelatihan annotasi; atau b) leksikon buatan tangan untuk menangkap beberapa variasi bahasa dalam bahasa pengguna. Kami mengusulkan cadangan penelitian kepercayaan saraf (NBT) yang baru yang mengatasi masalah ini dengan membangun kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembelajaran representation. NBT models reason over pre-trained word vectors, learning to compose them into distributed representations of user utterances and dialogue context.  Evaluasi kami pada dua set data menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan ini melebihi batasan masa lalu, yang cocok dengan prestasi model state-of-the-art yang bergantung pada leksikon semantis buatan tangan dan melebihi mereka ketika leksikon seperti itu tidak diberikan.', 'fa': 'یکی از بخش\u200cهای اصلی سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی مدرن، ردیابی باوری است که هدف کاربر را در هر مرحله\u200cای از گفتگو تقریبا می\u200cکند. با این حال، بیشتر دسترسی فعلی به اندازه اندازه\u200cگیری مشکلی به دامنه\u200cهای گفتگوی بزرگتر و پیچیده\u200cتر دارد. (a) مدل\u200cهای درک زبان\u200cهای زبان\u200cگویی که به اندازه\u200cهای زیادی از داده\u200cهای آموزش\u200cهای مشخص\u200cشده نیاز دارند. یا (b) زبان\u200cهای دستی برای گرفتن برخی از تغییرات زبان\u200cشناسی در زبان کاربر. ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها دلیل مدل NBT بر روی ویکتورهای کلمه پیش آموزش داده شده، یاد می گیرند که آنها را در نمایش\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cشده\u200cای از کلمه\u200cهای کاربر و محیط محیط گفتگو و گفتگو سازید. ارزیابی ما در دو مجموعه اطلاعات نشان می دهد که این روش محدودیت گذشته را فراتر می کند، با انجام مدل های موجود هنری که بر زبان های semantic ساخته شده به دست اعتماد دارند و در زمانی که چنین لکسیون تهیه نمی شود، بر آن تهیه می کند.', 'sw': 'Moja ya sehemu muhimu ya mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kisasa unaoongea ni ufuatiliaji wa imani, ambao unakadiria lengo la mtumiaji katika kila hatua ya mazungumzo. Hata hivyo, hatua nyingi za sasa zimekuwa vigumu kuongezeka kwa maeneo makubwa zaidi, mazungumzo magumu zaidi. Hii ni kwa sababu ya kutegemea kwao pia: a) mifano ya kuelewa kwa lugha inayohitaji takwimu kubwa ya mafunzo; au lexico wenye mikono kwa ajili ya kuchukua baadhi ya mabadiliko ya lugha katika lugha ya watumiaji. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa habari ya Ufuatiliaji wa Neural (NBT) ambao unashinda matatizo haya kwa kujenga maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika kujifunza uwakilizaji. Mradi wa NBT unasababishwa kwa sababu ya vectors za maneno ya awali zilizofunzwa, wanajifunza kuunganisha katika uwakilishi wa mazungumzo ya watumiaji na mazungumzo ya mazungumzo. Tathmini zetu kwenye seti mbili za takwimu zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii inapitia vizuizi vya nyuma, ukilinganisha na utendaji wa mifano ya sanaa ambayo hutegemea lexico zenye mikononi na kutengeneza vibaya wakati ambavyo lexico hawapatikani.', 'af': "Een van die korrekomponente van moderne gespreek dialoog stelsels is die geloof agtervolger, wat die gebruiker se doel vurdering by elke stap van die dialoog. Maar, die meeste huidige toegang het moeilikheid om te skaleer na groter, meer komplekse dialoog domeine. Hierdie is vanweë hul afhanklikheid van óf: a) Spoken Taal Verstaan Modelle wat groot hoeveelheid aanmerkte onderwerking data nodig; en of b) hand-crafted lexicons om sommige van die lingwisiese veranderinge in gebruikers se taal te vang. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe neurale bevestigheid volg (NBT) raamwerk wat hierdie probleem oorwin deur die bou van onlangse vorderings in voorstelling leer te bou. NBT-modelle rede oor vooraf-opgelei woord vektore, leer om hulle te stel in verspreidige voorstellings van gebruiker uitspraak en dialoog konteks. Ons evaluering op twee datastelle wys dat hierdie toegang verbygaan verlede beperkinge, ooreenstemmende met die prestasie van die staat-van-die-kuns-modele wat op hand-gebruikte semantiese leksies vertrou en hulle uitvoer wanneer sodanige leksies nie verskaf word nie.", 'tr': 'Modern gürleýän dijalog sistemleriniň esasy bölekleriniň biri ynamly gözetleyicisidir. Bu ýöne ullançylaryň maksadyny her adımda ynanýar. Ýöne şu wagtyň köpüsi ýakynlaşylary uly we çylşyryş dialogyň ýerlerine görkezmek kynçylykly. Bu hem olaryň bağlygyna sebäbi: a) sözli dil düşünme nusgalarynyň uly sany täsir edilen eğitim maglumatlaryna gerek; Ýä(b) Ullançylaryň dilinde lingwistiki üýtgeşmelerini ýazmak üçin elimden gelen leksikler. Biz Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) täze bir nusga teklip edip, bu meseleleri öwrenmek üçin iň soňky ösümliklerine täzeden üstünlik edýäris. NBT modelleri ön eğitimli kelime vektörleri üzerinden oluşturmak için bu şekilde kullanıcı sözlerin ve dijalog kontekstlerinin dağıtılmış ifadeleri oluşturmak için öğrenmek. Biziň deňlenşimiz 2 sanat setirinde bu ýagdaýyň öňki çykyşlaryň geçmişi çykyşlaryna uň aşýandygyny görkezýär. Bu ýagdaý çykyşlaryň elimde döredilen semantik leňiklerine we olaryň ýagdaýynda täzeden çykyşlaryň üstüne geçmesini görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Një nga komponentet thelbësore të sistemeve moderne të dialogut të folur është gjurmuesi i besimit, i cili vlerëson qëllimin e përdoruesit në çdo hap të dialogut. Megjithatë, shumica e qasjeve aktuale kanë vështirësi të zgjerohen në fusha më të mëdha dhe më komplekse të dialogut. Kjo është për shkak të varësisë së tyre nga: a) modelet e kuptimit të gjuhës së folur që kërkojnë sasi të mëdha të dhënash të trajnimit të anotuar; ose b) leksikone të ndërtuara me dorë për të kapur disa nga variacionet gjuhësore në gjuhën e përdoruesve. Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri për ndjekjen e besimit neuronal (NBT) që i kapërcen këto probleme duke ndërtuar mbi përparimet e fundit në mësimin e përfaqësimit. Modelet NBT arsyetojnë mbi vektorët e paratrajnuar të fjalëve, duke mësuar të përbëjnë ato në përfaqësime të shpërndara të shprehjeve të përdoruesve dhe kontekstit të dialogut. Our evaluation on two datasets shows that this approach surpasses past limitations, matching the performance of state-of-the-art models which rely on hand-crafted semantic lexicons and outperforming them when such lexicons are not provided.', 'am': "አዲስ የተናገሩት ጥያቄ ሲስተም ሲስተካከሉ አንዱ የእምነቱ ፈቃድ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ከመጠንቀቅ የበለጠ፣ በተጨማሪም የሚቆጠሩ የጦማሪያዎች አካባቢዎች ላይ ችግር አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህ በመደገፋቸው ምክንያት ነው፤ a) የቋንቋ ማስታወቂያውን ሞዴላዎች በቁጥጥር የሚያስፈልጉት ትልቅ የድምፅ መረጃዎች ናቸው፤ or b) hand-crafted lexicons for capturing some of the linguistic variation in users' language.  የአሁኑን ትምህርት ትምህርት በማስተማርን በመግለጥ የነዌር እምነትን (NBT) ፍሬማር እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የNBT models cause pre-trained vocabulary vectors, learn to compose them into distributed expressions and dialogs context. በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ ማስታወቂያውን ይህ ሥርዓት ያለፈውን ግንኙነት እንዲሻል፣ በእጃቸው በተመሳሳይ ሰሜንቲካዊ ልስክሲ እና እንደዚህ ባለው ሌክሲኮች ሳይሰጥ የሚታመኑ የሀገር-የ-አርጤት ሞዴላዎችን እንዲተካክሉ ነው፡፡", 'az': 'Şimdiki danışmış dialoq sistemlərin ilk komponentlərindən biri inanma izleyicisidir ki, bu da istifadəçinin məqsədini hər adımda təmin edir. Ancaq çox ağıllı tərəflər daha böyük, daha kompleks dialoq domenalara çətinliklərdir. Bu onların hər ikisinə bağımlılığı üzündür: a) böyük nöqtələri bilən təhsil məlumatlarına ehtiyacı olan dil anlama modellərinə görədir; və ya (b) istifadəçilərin dilində dil dəyişikliklərinin b əzisini tutmaq üçün əl-qurulmuş leksiklər. Biz yeni öyrənmək öyrənməsinə görə bu problemlərin üstünü alan yeni nöral inanç izləməsi (NBT) çerçevesini təklif edirik. NBT modellərinin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş söz vektörlərinin üzərində səbəbi, onları istifadəçilərin sözlərinin və dialogların məlumatlarının dağıtılmış göstərişlərinə bənzəyir. İki verilən qurduğumuz değerlendirmək göstərir ki, bu metod keçmiş sınırları aşırır, əl-yaratdığı semantik leksiklərinə təvəkkül edən və bu leksiklərin təmin edilmədiyi zaman, əl-yaratdığı simantik leksiklərinə təvəkkül edir.', 'bn': 'আধুনিক কথোপকথন ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের মূল অংশ হল বিশ্বাস ট্র্যাকার, যা ডায়ালগের প্রতি পদক্ষেপে ব্যবহারকারীর লক্ষ্য হিসেবে হি তবে বর্তমান প্রতিক্রিয়া বেশীরভাগ বৃহৎ, আরো জটিল ডায়ালগ ডোমেনে পরিবর্তন করা কঠিন। এটা তাদের উভয়ের উপর নির্ভর করার কারণ: a) ভাষা বুঝতে পারে ভাষা বুঝতে পারে মডেল যা বিশাল পরিমাণ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রয়োজন; ব্যবহারকারীদের ভাষায় কিছু ভাষার ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গ্রহণের জন্য হাতে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত লেক্সি আমরা সাম্প্রতিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার কারণে প্রতিনিধিত্বের উন্নয়নের মাধ্যমে নিউরাল বিশ্বাস (এনবিটি) ফ্রেমের প্রস্তা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ভেক্টরের উপর এনবিটি মডেলের কারণ, তারা ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য এবং ডায়ালগের প্রতিনিধিত্বে বিতরণ করার শ আমাদের দুটি ডাটাসেটের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই প্রতিযোগিতা অতীতের সীমাবদ্ধতা অতিক্রম করে যাচ্ছে, যা রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প মডেলের প্রতিষ্ঠানের সাথে মি', 'ca': "Un dels components fonamentals dels sistemes modern s de diàleg parlat és el seguidor de creences, que estima l'objectiu de l'usuari en cada pas del diàleg. Però la majoria dels enfocaments actuals tenen dificultats d'escalar-se a dominis de diàleg més grans i complexes. Això és degut a la seva dependència de: a) models d'enteniment del llenguatge parlat que requereixen grans quantitats de dades d'entrenament anotats; o b) lexicones artificials per capturar alguna de la variació lingüística en el llenguatge dels usuaris. Proposem un nou marc de seguiment de la creença neuronal (NBT) que supera aquests problemes basant-nos en avanços recents en l'aprenentatge de representació. Els models NBT es basan en vectors de paraules pré-entrenats, aprenent a composir-los en representacions distribuïdes de les expressions d'usuari i el context de diàleg. Our evaluation on two datasets shows that this approach surpasses past limitations, matching the performance of state-of-the-art models which rely on hand-crafted semantic lexicons and outperforming them when such lexicons are not provided.", 'bs': 'Jedan od osnovnih komponenta modernog govornog dijaloga je praćenik vjerovanja, koji procjenjuje cilj korisnika na svakom koraku dijaloga. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa imaju teške skale do većih, kompleksnih dijalogskih domena. To je zbog njihove ovisnosti od bilo kojeg: a) modela razumijevanja jezika koji zahtijevaju velike količine noteiranih podataka o obuci; ili b) rukopisane leksikone za uhvaćenje nekih jezika jezika korisnika. Predlažemo novi okvir neurološkog praćenja vjerovanja (NBT), koji prevlada te probleme izgradnjem nedavnih napredova u učenju predstavljanja. NBT modeli razlog preko predobučenih vektora riječi, učeći ih sastaviti u raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima govora korisnika i konteksta dijaloga. Naša procjena na dva podataka pokazuje da ovaj pristup prelazi preko prošlih ograničenja, odgovarajući učinkovitosti modela države umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na semantičke lekcije koje su napravljene rukama i nadmašuju ih kada se takvi leksioni ne pružaju.', 'cs': 'Jednou ze základních součástí moderních systémů mluveného dialogu je tracker víry, který odhaduje cíl uživatele na každém kroku dialogu. Většina současných přístupů však má potíže se škálovat na větší a složitější dialogové oblasti. Je to způsobeno jejich závislostí na: a) modelech porozumění mluvenému jazyku, které vyžadují velké množství anotovaných tréninkových dat; nebo b) ručně vytvořené slovníky pro zachycení některých jazykových variací v jazyce uživatelů. Navrhujeme nový rámec pro sledování neurální víry (NBT), který tyto problémy překonává stavěním na nedávných pokrocích ve vzdělávání reprezentace. NBT modeluje rozum nad předškolenými slovními vektory a učí se je složit do distribuovaných reprezentací uživatelských výroků a dialogového kontextu. Naše vyhodnocení na dvou datových sadách ukazuje, že tento přístup překonává minulé omezení, odpovídá výkonu nejmodernějších modelů, které spoléhají na ručně vytvořené sémantické lexikony a překonávají je, pokud takové lexikony nejsou poskytovány.', 'et': 'Kaasaegse kõneleva dialoogi süsteemi üks põhikomponente on uskumuste jälgija, mis hindab kasutaja eesmärki dialoogi igas etapis. Enamikul praegustel lähenemisviisidel on siiski raskusi ulatuda suurematesse ja keerukamatesse dialoogivaldkondadesse. See on tingitud nende sõltuvusest kas: a) rääkiva keele mõistmise mudelitest, mis nõuavad suurt hulka märgitud koolitusandmeid; või b) käsitsi valmistatud leksikonid kasutaja keele keelelise varieerumise jäädvustamiseks. Pakume välja uue neurousu jälgimise raamistiku, mis lahendab need probleemid, tuginedes hiljutistele edusammudele esindusõppes. NBT mudelid mõtlevad eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõnavaktorite üle, õppides neid komponeerima kasutajate väljendite hajutatud esitusteks ja dialoogi kontekstiks. Meie kahe andmekogumi hindamine näitab, et see lähenemisviis ületab varasemad piirangud, sobitades käsitsi valmistatud semantilistel leksikonidel põhinevate kaasaegsete mudelite jõudlusega ja ületades neid, kui selliseid leksikone ei pakuta.', 'fi': 'Yksi nykyaikaisten puhuttujen dialogijärjestelmien ydinkomponenteista on uskomusten seuranta, joka arvioi käyttäjän tavoitteen dialogin jokaisessa vaiheessa. Useimmilla nykyisillä lähestymistavoilla on kuitenkin vaikeuksia skaalata laajempia ja monimutkaisempia dialogialueita. Tämä johtuu siitä, että ne ovat riippuvaisia seuraavista: a) Puhutun kielen ymmärtämisen malleista, jotka edellyttävät suuria määriä merkintöjä sisältävää koulutustietoa; tai b) käsintehtyjä sanastoja käyttäjän kielen kielellisen vaihtelun kuvaamiseen. Ehdotamme uutta Neural Belief Tracking (NBT) -kehystä, joka ratkaisee nämä ongelmat hyödyntämällä viimeaikaista edistystä edustuksen oppimisessa. NBT mallintaa järkeilyä esikoulutettuihin sanavektoreihin ja oppii säveltämään ne hajautetuiksi representaatioiksi käyttäjien lausumista ja dialogin kontekstista. Arviointi kahdesta aineistosta osoittaa, että tämä lähestymistapa ylittää aiemmat rajoitukset ja vastaa käsityönä tehtyihin semanttisiin sanastoihin perustuvien nykyaikaisten mallien suorituskykyä ja ylittää ne silloin, kun tällaisia sanastoja ei ole saatavilla.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա խոսվող երկխոսային համակարգերի հիմնական բաղադրիչներից մեկը հավատերի հետևողն է, որը գնահատում է օգտագործողի նպատակը երկխոսակցության յուրաքանչյուր քայլում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս մոտեցումների մեծամասնությունը դժվարությամբ է ընդլայնվում ավելի մեծ, ավելի բարդ հատվածների համար: Սա կախված է նրանից, որ նրանք կախված են: a) Խոսվող լեզվի հասկանալու մոդելներից, որոնք պահանջում են մեծ քանակությամբ նշումնավորված ուսուցման տվյալներ: կամ b) ձեռքով ստեղծված լեքսիկոններ օգտագործողների լեզվի լեզվաբանական տարբերությունների նկարահանելու համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նյարդային հավատքի հետևման (NBT) շրջանակ, որը հաղթահարում է այս խնդիրները, հիմնվելով ներկայացուցիչ ուսումնասիրության վերջին առաջընթացների վրա: ՆԲԹ-ի մոդելները մտածում են նախապատրաստված բառերի վեկտորների մասին, սովորում են դրանք կազմել օգտագործողների արտահայտությունների բաշխված ներկայացումների և խոսակցության կոնտեքստի մեջ: Մեր երկու տվյալների վերաբերյալ գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ այս մոտեցումը գերազանցում է անցյալ սահմանափակումները, համապատասխանում է ամենաբարձր մոդելների, որոնք կախված են ձեռքով ստեղծված սեմանտիկ լեքսիկոնների և գերազանցում են դրանք, երբ այդպիսի լեքսիկո', 'jv': 'Bilih sing kompon sing nduwé karo sistem dialog yang digunakno kuwi tracker ngresmi, sing tatara bukane nggawe barang sampek kanggo sampek dialog. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Punika dipunangé awakdhéwé kuwi: a) Daerah-awakdhéwé Pangan kuwi kesempatan anyar kuwi nggawe barang akeh bantuan; kuwi, nik awakdhéwé nggawe sistem sing berarti podho nggawe tarjamahan. (b) Ngawe Peringatan langkung rawut kanggo nggambar cara-pakan ning langkung Awak dhéwé nggunakake un barêng nggawe Nyural Bijeléf tracing (NBT) kuwi nggawe perbudhakan kuwi nggawe nggawe gerakan kelas ntaweh dumadhi iki. NBT Awakdhéwé éntuk kuwi éwé dataset sing ngomong nik dianggap banjuré perusahaan langgar, iso nggawe barang sistem sing ditambah kejahatan sistem sing gawe nguasai sistem semanti sing manut lan ijol-ijolan sing ora bisa dianggap.', 'sk': 'Ena od ključnih komponent sodobnih govornih dialogskih sistemov je sledilnik prepričanj, ki ocenjuje cilj uporabnika na vsakem koraku dialoga. Vendar pa ima večina sedanjih pristopov težave z razširitvijo na večja in bolj zapletena področja dialoga. To je posledica njihove odvisnosti od: a) modelov razumevanja govorjenega jezika, ki zahtevajo velike količine podatkov o usposabljanju z oznakami; ali b) ročno izdelani leksikoni za zajemanje nekaterih jezikovnih razlik v jeziku uporabnikov. Predlagamo nov okvir za sledenje nevralnim prepričanjem (NBT), ki premaga te težave z gradnjo na nedavnem napredku pri učenju reprezentacije. NBT modeli razmišljajo o predhodno usposobljenih besednih vektorjih, učijo se jih sestavljati v porazdeljene predstavitve uporabniških izgovorov in dialogov kontekst. Naša ocena na dveh naborih podatkov kaže, da ta pristop presega pretekle omejitve, saj se ujema z zmogljivostjo najsodobnejših modelov, ki se zanašajo na ročno izdelane semantične leksikone, in jih presega, kadar takšni leksikoni niso zagotovljeni.', 'ha': "Babu wani abu na ƙaranci daga tsarin zauren akwatin bayani na yanzu-zauren akwatin bayani na yanzu, yana ƙaddara shirin ĩmãni, wanda yana ƙidãya goan mai amfani da shi a kõwane wurãre daga zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Kayya, da kuma mafi yawansu masu motsi da ake kai yanzu sun yi nauyi zuwa sauri masu ƙaranci, da sauri masu haɗi cikin zauren akwatin bayani. Wannan yana da ƙayyade tsarin su ko duk: a) misãlai da ake fahimta Fasahan Lugha da za'a buƙata ƙidãya masu ƙidãya; ko (b) leksisin da hannayen da aka yi wa kãma wasu variant na harshen cikin harshen mai amfani da shi. Tuna ƙayyade wani firam na Neural Belgif Training (NBT) wanda ke rinjãya masu zartar da waɗannan, da za'a samar da samun taƙaita masu ƙaranci a cikin karantar sharĩ. @ info: whatsthis Ana ƙaddara kan dataset biyu na nuna cewa wannan hanyoyi ta gudu a bayan hanyoyi, kuma yana daidaita game da cikakken misãlai-na-sanar, wanda ke dõgara na miski-na-hannuwansa kuma ya sami su idan ba za a ba shi ba.", 'he': 'אחד המרכיבים העיקריים של מערכות הדיולוג המודרניות מדברות הוא מעקב האמונות, שמעריך את המטרה של המשתמש בכל צעד של הדיולוג. בכל אופן, לרוב הגישויים הנוכחים יש קשה להשיג מידה לתחומים דיאלוגים גדולים יותר מורכבים. זה בגלל ההתלויה שלהם על: a) מודלים להבין שפה מדברת שדורשים כמויות גדולות של נתוני אימון מוכתבים; או b) מלקסיקונים שעושים ידיים כדי לתפוס חלק מהשונות השפתיים בשפה של המשתמשים. אנו מציעים מסגרת נוירואלית לאתר האמונה (NBT) חדשה שמגברת על הבעיות האלה על ידי בניין על התקדמות האחרונות בלמדת מייצג. דוגמנים NBT מדברים על ווקטורי מילים מאומנים מראש, ללמוד לרכיב אותם לתוך מייצגים מרוחקים של מילים משתמשים וקונקסט דיאלוג. הערכה שלנו על שני קבוצות נתונים מראה שהגישה הזאת מעלית את הגבלות שעברות, מתאימה לביצוע של מודלים חדשים שהתלויים בלקסיקונים סמנטיים שנעשו בידיים ומעברים אותם כאשר לקסיקונים כאלה לא מספקים.', 'bo': 'moderག་གཏོང་བའི་ཌའི་ལོག་གི་ངོ་མའི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་ནི་ཡིད་ཆ་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཀློག ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་དཀའ་ངལ་བཅས་ཀྱིས་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན། འདི་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་དང་གཅིག་པུ་ཞིག་ལས་བརྟེན་ནས་བྱུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྷན་སྟངས་ཀྱི་མིག་རྣམས་ལ། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་ལ་བཞག་ནིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་འགྱུར་བ་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་ལྟ་བུ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་མཐུན་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་བའི་ཚོགས་ཁག་ཅིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། NBT models reason over pre-trained word vectors, learning to compose them into distributed representations of user utterances and dialog context. ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་མཐའ'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Argument Information to Improve Event Detection via Supervised Attention Mechanisms', 'ar': 'استغلال معلومات الحجة لتحسين اكتشاف الأحداث من خلال آليات الانتباه الخاضعة للإشراف', 'pt': 'Explorando informações de argumentos para melhorar a detecção de eventos por meio de mecanismos de atenção supervisionada', 'fr': "Exploiter les informations des arguments pour améliorer la détection des événements via des mécanismes d'attention supervisés", 'es': 'Explotación de la información de argumentos para mejorar la detección de eventos mediante mecanismos de atención supervisada', 'ja': '監視されたアテンションメカニズムを介してイベント検出を改善するための引数情報の悪用', 'zh': '因参数信息因监督机制改事检测', 'hi': 'पर्यवेक्षित ध्यान तंत्र के माध्यम से घटना का पता लगाने में सुधार करने के लिए तर्क जानकारी का शोषण', 'ru': 'Использование информации об аргументах для улучшения обнаружения событий с помощью механизмов контролируемого внимания', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Faisnéis Argóint chun Brath Imeachtaí a Fheabhsú trí Mheicníochtaí Airithe Maoirsithe', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტის ინფორმაციის გამოყენება მოვლენების განსაზღვრებისთვის მომხმარების განსაზღვრებისთვის შემდეგ მონაცემები მაქანიზმის გარეშე', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση πληροφοριών επιχειρημάτων για τη βελτίωση της ανίχνευσης συμβάντων μέσω εποπτευόμενων μηχανισμών προσοχής', 'hu': 'Az érvelési információk kihasználása az események észlelésének javítására felügyelt figyelem mechanizmusok segítségével', 'it': 'Sfruttare le informazioni sugli argomenti per migliorare il rilevamento degli eventi tramite meccanismi di attenzione supervisionati', 'lt': 'Argument ų informacijos naudojimas siekiant pagerinti įvykių nustatymą taikant prižiūrėtus dėmesio mechanizmus', 'mk': 'Користење информации за аргумент за подобрување на детективноста на настаните преку механизмите за надгледувано внимание', 'kk': 'Оқиғаны байқау үшін аргументтің мәліметін бақылау механизмтері арқылы бақылау', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Maklumat Argumen untuk meningkatkan Pengesanan Peristiwa melalui Mekanisme Perhatian Diperhatikan', 'ml': 'സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വദര്\u200dശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ശ്രദ്ധ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാനുള്ള അവസ്ഥ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാന്\u200d അര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വ', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн анхаарлын механизм аргументын мэдээллийг сайжруулахын тулд', 'mt': 'L-isfruttar tal-informazzjoni dwar l-Argument għat-Titjib fid-Detezzjoni tal-Avvenimenti permezz ta’ Mekkaniżmi ta’ Attenzjoni Superviża', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući informacije o argumentima za poboljšanje otkrivanja događaja putem nadzornih mehanizma pažnje', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie informacji o argumentach do poprawy wykrywania zdarzeń za pomocą nadzorowanych mechanizmów uwagi', 'ro': 'Exploatarea informațiilor referitoare la argumente pentru a îmbunătăți detectarea evenimentelor prin intermediul mecanismelor de atenție supravegheate', 'si': 'අවස්ථාව හොයාගන්න සුදුසුම් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරය තොරතුරු', 'sv': 'Utnyttja argumentinformation för att förbättra händelsedetektering via övervakningsmekanismer', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad ku saabsan furitaanka ee la xiriira dhaqdhaqaaqa dhacdooyinka via Superwatched Attention mechanisms', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பை முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான குறிப்பு தகவல் வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'سوپریزٹ ڈانٹ مکانیسم کے ذریعے ایڈینٹ شناسیٹ کے لئے آرگنم معلومات کا انتشار کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': '@ info', 'vi': 'Khai thác thông tin về biện hộ để phát hiện sự kiện qua cơ chế chú ý giám sát', 'bg': 'Използване на аргументна информация за подобряване на откриването на събития чрез надзорни механизми за внимание', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući informacije o argumentima za poboljšanje otkrivanja događaja putem nadzornih mehanizma pažnje', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af argumentoplysninger til at forbedre registrering af hændelser via overvågede opmærksomhedsmekanismer', 'de': 'Ausnutzung von Argumentinformationen zur Verbesserung der Ereigniserkennung durch überwachte Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen', 'ko': '논거 정보를 이용하여 감독 주의 메커니즘을 통해 사건 검측을 개선하다', 'nl': 'Gebruik van argumentinformatie om gebeurtenisdetectie te verbeteren via begeleide aandachtsmechanismen', 'id': 'Menggunakan Informasi Argumen untuk meningkatkan Deteksi Kejadian melalui Mekanisme Perhatian Diperhatikan', 'fa': 'استفاده از اطلاعات آرژانس برای تحقیق بازرسی اتفاق با طریق مکانیسم مواظب نظارت', 'sw': 'Kutumia taarifa za Maudhui ili Kuboresha Utafiti wa Tukio kupitia Mifumo ya Kuchunguzwa', 'tr': 'Oýun tapylmak üçin önlenmek üçin Argument Maglumaty Taýdalanýar', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i informacionit të argumentit për të përmirësuar zbulimin e ngjarjeve nëpërmjet mekanizmave të vëmendjes së mbikqyrur', 'hy': 'Exploiting Argument Information to Improve Event Detection via Supervised Attention Mechanisms', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'af': 'Name', 'bn': 'সাপারভিস্ট করা মেকানিজমেন্টের মাধ্যমে ইভেন্ট ডিটিকেশন উন্নত করার জন্য আর্গামেন্ট তথ্য প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "Utilitzar informació d'arguments per millorar la detecció d'events mitjançant mecanismes d'atenció supervisada", 'cs': 'Využití argumentních informací ke zlepšení detekce událostí prostřednictvím kontrolovaných mechanismů pozornosti', 'et': 'Argumentiteabe kasutamine sündmuste tuvastamise parandamiseks järelevalvemehhanismide abil', 'fi': 'Argumenttitietojen hyödyntäminen tapahtumien havaitsemisen parantamiseksi valvottujen huomiomekanismien avulla', 'az': 'Gözləşdirilmiş Attention Mehanizmi vasitəsilə olaraq keçmək üçün Argument Malümatını Exploiting', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući informacije o argumentima za poboljšanje otkrivanja događaja putem nadzornih mehanizma pažnje', 'jv': 'Gambar Informasi Arkumen kanggo Gambar Kemerdekaan eventar', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'he': 'ניצל מידע טיעון כדי לשפר את זיהוי האירועים באמצעות מכונות תשומת לב משומרת', 'bo': 'Exploiting Argument Information to Improve Event Detection via Supervised Attention Mechanisms', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje informacij o argumentih za izboljšanje zaznavanja dogodkov prek nadzorovanih mehanizmov pozornosti'}
{'en': 'This paper tackles the task of event detection (ED), which involves identifying and categorizing events. We argue that arguments provide significant clues to this task, but they are either completely ignored or exploited in an indirect manner in existing detection approaches. In this work, we propose to exploit argument information explicitly for ED via supervised attention mechanisms. In specific, we systematically investigate the proposed model under the supervision of different attention strategies. Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-arts and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة مهمة الكشف عن الأحداث (ED) ، والتي تتضمن تحديد وتصنيف الأحداث. نجادل بأن الحجج توفر أدلة مهمة لهذه المهمة ، ولكن يتم تجاهلها تمامًا أو استغلالها بطريقة غير مباشرة في أساليب الكشف الحالية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح استغلال معلومات الحجة بشكل صريح للضعف الجنسي عبر آليات الانتباه الخاضعة للإشراف. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بالتحقيق بشكل منهجي في النموذج المقترح تحت إشراف استراتيجيات الاهتمام المختلفة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يعمل على تطوير أحدث التقنيات ويحقق أفضل درجة F1 في مجموعة بيانات ACE 2005.', 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda a tarefa de detecção de eventos (DE), que envolve a identificação e categorização de eventos. Argumentamos que os argumentos fornecem pistas importantes para essa tarefa, mas são completamente ignorados ou explorados de maneira indireta nas abordagens de detecção existentes. Neste trabalho, propomos explorar informações de argumentos explicitamente para ED por meio de mecanismos de atenção supervisionada. Em específico, investigamos sistematicamente o modelo proposto sob a supervisão de diferentes estratégias de atenção. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem avança no estado da arte e alcança a melhor pontuação F1 no conjunto de dados ACE 2005.', 'es': 'Este artículo aborda la tarea de la detección de eventos (DE), que implica la identificación y categorización de eventos. Sostenemos que los argumentos proporcionan pistas significativas para esta tarea, pero se ignoran por completo o se aprovechan de manera indirecta en los enfoques de detección existentes. En este trabajo, proponemos explotar la información de los argumentos explícitamente para el ED a través de mecanismos de atención supervisada. En concreto, investigamos sistemáticamente el modelo propuesto bajo la supervisión de diferentes estrategias de atención. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque avanza en el estado de la técnica y logra la mejor puntuación de F1 en el conjunto de datos ACE 2005.', 'fr': "Cet article aborde la tâche de détection d'événements (ED), qui consiste à identifier et à catégoriser les événements. Nous soutenons que les arguments fournissent des indices significatifs pour cette tâche, mais qu'ils sont soit complètement ignorés, soit exploités de manière indirecte dans les approches de détection existantes. Dans ce travail, nous proposons d'exploiter les informations d'argument explicitement pour la dysfonction érectile via des mécanismes d'attention supervisée. Plus précisément, nous étudions systématiquement le modèle proposé sous la supervision de différentes stratégies d'attention. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche fait progresser la pointe de la technologie et obtient le meilleur score F1 sur le jeu de données ACE 2005.", 'ja': '本稿では、イベントの識別と分類に関わるイベント検出（ ED ）のタスクについて取り上げる。議論はこのタスクに重要な手がかりを提供すると主張していますが、既存の検出アプローチでは完全に無視されるか、間接的に利用されます。本作業では，監視下の注意メカニズムを介して， EDのために引数情報を明示的に利用することを提案する．具体的には、異なる注意戦略の監督下で提案されたモデルを体系的に調査する。実験結果は、当社のアプローチが最先端を進み、ACE 2005データセットで最高のF 1スコアを達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文涉事检 (ED) ,事涉识类。 臣愚以为此务之要,或全忽于一切,或全忽于今之检间接。 于是建议监督显式因ED之参数信息。 监督不同系统地究其形势。 实验结果表明,吾法于ACE 2005数集上得其先进之术,而得其至F1之数。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ईवेंट डिटेक्शन (ईडी) के कार्य से निपटता है, जिसमें घटनाओं की पहचान और वर्गीकरण शामिल है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि तर्क इस कार्य के लिए महत्वपूर्ण सुराग प्रदान करते हैं, लेकिन उन्हें मौजूदा पहचान दृष्टिकोणों में अप्रत्यक्ष तरीके से या तो पूरी तरह से अनदेखा या शोषण किया जाता है। इस काम में, हम पर्यवेक्षित ध्यान तंत्र के माध्यम से ईडी के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से तर्क जानकारी का शोषण करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशिष्ट रूप से, हम व्यवस्थित रूप से विभिन्न ध्यान रणनीतियों की देखरेख में प्रस्तावित मॉडल की जांच करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट्स को आगे बढ़ाता है और एसीई 2005 डेटासेट पर सबसे अच्छा एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе рассматривается задача обнаружения событий (ДС), которая включает в себя выявление и классификацию событий. Мы утверждаем, что аргументы дают существенные подсказки к этой задаче, но они либо полностью игнорируются, либо используются косвенным образом в существующих подходах к обнаружению. В этой работе мы предлагаем использовать информацию аргументов явно для ЭД через механизмы контролируемого внимания. В частности, мы систематически исследуем предлагаемую модель под наблюдением различных стратегий внимания. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход продвигается вперед по последнему слову техники и достигает лучшего показателя F1 в наборе данных Ace 2005.', 'ga': 'Téann an páipéar seo i ngleic leis an tasc a bhaineann le brath teagmhais (ED), a bhaineann le teagmhais a aithint agus a chatagóiriú. Áitímid go dtugann argóintí leideanna suntasacha don tasc seo, ach go ndéantar neamhaird iomlán díobh nó go mbaintear leas astu ar bhealach indíreach i gcur chuige braite atá ann cheana féin. San obair seo, tá sé beartaithe againn leas a bhaint as faisnéis argóinte go sainráite don RÉ trí mheicníochtaí aire maoirsithe. Go sonrach, déanaimid imscrúdú córasach ar an tsamhail atá beartaithe faoi mhaoirseacht straitéisí aird éagsúla. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go gcuireann ár gcur chuige den scoth chun cinn agus go mbaineann sé amach an scór F1 is fearr ar thacar sonraí ACE 2005.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლობა მოვლენების განვიცნობის (ED) რაოდენობის მომხმარებას, რომელიც განვიცნობა და კატეგორიზაცია მოვლენებების მომხმარებას შესახებ. ჩვენ არგუმენტებით, რომ არგუმენტები ამ დავალებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი კოლუმენტები გავამუშავებთ, მაგრამ ისინი უბრალოდ ინგორიურებულიან ან გამოვიყენებულიან მსგავ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით აპროგრამის ინფორმაციას ექსპლექტიურად EDN-სთვის, რომელიც დანახვედნენ დაახლოების მექანესებით განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად შევხედავთ მოდელს განსხვავებული გონის სტრატიგიების დანარჩევაში. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა სინამდვილეების განმავლობა და მიიღება ყველაზე საუკეთესი F1 წარმოდგენა ACE 2005 მონაცემებ', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az eseményfelismerés (ED) feladatával foglalkozik, amely magában foglalja az események azonosítását és kategorizálását. Azt állítjuk, hogy az argumentumok jelentős nyomokat adnak ehhez a feladathoz, de ezeket vagy teljesen figyelmen kívül hagyják, vagy közvetett módon használják ki a meglévő detektálási megközelítésekben. Ebben a munkában azt javasoljuk, hogy felügyelt figyelemfelügyeleti mechanizmusok segítségével kifejezetten kiaknázzuk az érvelési információkat az ED számára. Konkrétan a javasolt modellt szisztematikusan vizsgáljuk különböző figyelemfelügyeleti stratégiák felügyelete mellett. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk a legkorszerűbb fejlesztést és eléri a legjobb F1 pontszámot az ACE 2005 adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με το έργο της ανίχνευσης συμβάντων (ΕΔ), η οποία περιλαμβάνει τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση συμβάντων. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι τα επιχειρήματα παρέχουν σημαντικές ενδείξεις για αυτό το έργο, αλλά είτε αγνοούνται εντελώς ή αξιοποιούνται έμμεσα στις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις ανίχνευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να αξιοποιηθούν ρητά οι πληροφορίες επιχειρημάτων για την ΕΔ μέσω εποπτευόμενων μηχανισμών προσοχής. Συγκεκριμένα, ερευνούμε συστηματικά το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο υπό την επίβλεψη διαφορετικών στρατηγικών προσοχής. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας προχωρά στην κατάσταση των τεχνών και επιτυγχάνει την καλύτερη βαθμολογία F1 στο σύνολο δεδομένων ACE 2005.', 'it': "Questo articolo affronta il compito del rilevamento degli eventi (ED), che comporta l'identificazione e la categorizzazione degli eventi. Sosteniamo che gli argomenti forniscono indizi significativi a questo compito, ma sono completamente ignorati o sfruttati in modo indiretto negli approcci di rilevamento esistenti. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di sfruttare le informazioni sugli argomenti esplicitamente per ED tramite meccanismi di attenzione supervisionati. Nello specifico, esaminiamo sistematicamente il modello proposto sotto la supervisione di diverse strategie di attenzione. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro approccio avanza lo stato delle arti e raggiunge il miglior punteggio F1 sul set di dati ACE 2005.", 'mk': 'Овој документ се занимава со задачата за детекција на настани (ED), која вклучува идентификување и категоризирање на настаните. We argue that arguments provide significant clues to this task, but they are either completely ignored or exploited in an indirect manner in existing detection approaches.  Во оваа работа предлагаме експлицитно да се искористат информациите за аргументите за ЕД преку надгледувани механизми на внимание. In specific, we systematically investigate the proposed model under the supervision of different attention strategies.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап го унапредува најдоброто напредок и постигнува најдобриот резултат на Ф1 на ACE 2005 датотеката.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama renginių aptikimo užduotis (ED), apimanti renginių identifikavimą ir klasifikavimą. Mes teigiame, kad argumentai suteikia reikšmingų šios užduoties požymių, tačiau jie visiškai ignoruojami arba netiesiogiai naudojami esamuose aptikimo metoduose. In this work, we propose to exploit argument information explicitly for ED via supervised attention mechanisms.  In specific, we systematically investigate the proposed model under the supervision of different attention strategies.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris gerina pažangą pažangoje ir pasiekia geriausią F1 rezultatą ACE 2005 duomenų rinkinyje.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengatasi tugas pengesan peristiwa (ED), yang melibatkan pengenalpasti dan kategorisasi peristiwa. Kami menyangka bahawa argumen memberikan petunjuk yang signifikan untuk tugas ini, tetapi mereka sama ada diabaikan sepenuhnya atau dieksploitasi secara tidak langsung dalam pendekatan pengesan yang wujud. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar untuk mengeksploitasi maklumat argumen secara eksplicit untuk ED melalui mekanisme perhatian yang diawasi. Secara spesifik, kita secara sistematik menyelidiki model yang diusulkan di bawah pengawasan strategi perhatian yang berbeza. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita melanjutkan state-of-the-art dan mencapai skor F1 terbaik pada set data ACE 2005.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз оқиғаларды анықтау және санаттарды анықтау тапсырмасын (ED) шектеп береді. Аргументтер осы тапсырманың маңызды тапсырмаларын көрсетеді деп айтып тұрмыз, бірақ олар барлық тапсырмалардың жағдайда тәуелсіз немесе дұрыс түрде тәуелсіз. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз ED үшін аргументтің мәліметін бақылау механизмтері арқылы қолдануға ұсынамыз. Біз жүйелік түрлі назардағы стратегияларды қарау арқылы ұсынған үлгісін жүйелік түрде зерттейміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің тәсіліміздің күй- жайын жасап, ACE 2005 деректер жиынындағы ең жақсы F1 нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സംഭവം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (ED) ജോലിയെ എതിര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്\u200dറെ സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ച നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഈ ജോലിക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന്, പക്ഷെ നിലവിലുള്ള കണ്ടെത്തു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എഡിക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യക്തമായി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രയോഗത്തിന്\u200dറെ നിരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നാം സ് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയിലേക്ക് മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തുന്നത് എക്സി 2005 ഡാറ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-kompitu tad-detezzjoni tal-avvenimenti (ED), li jinvolvi l-identifikazzjoni u l-kategorizzazzjoni tal-avvenimenti. Aħna jargumentaw li l-argumenti jipprovdu indikazzjonijiet sinifikanti għal dan il-kompitu, iżda jew huma kompletament injorati jew sfruttati b’mod indirett f’approċċi eżistenti ta’ individwazzjoni. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu li l-informazzjoni dwar l-argumenti tiġi sfruttata espliċitament għall-ED permezz ta’ mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni sorveljati. B’mod speċifiku, investigaw sistematikament il-mudell propost taħt is-superviżjoni ta’ strateġiji differenti ta’ attenzjoni. Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-arts and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł porusza zadanie wykrywania zdarzeń (ED), które polega na identyfikowaniu i kategoryzowaniu zdarzeń. Argumentujemy, że argumenty dostarczają istotnych wskazówek do tego zadania, ale są one całkowicie ignorowane lub wykorzystywane w sposób pośredni w istniejących metodach wykrywania. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy wykorzystanie informacji o argumentach wyraźnie dla ED poprzez nadzorowane mechanizmy uwagi. W szczególności systematycznie badamy proponowany model pod nadzorem różnych strategii uwagi. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście rozwija najnowocześniejszy stan sztuki i osiąga najlepszy wynik F1 na zbiorze danych ACE 2005.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează sarcina detectării evenimentelor (ED), care implică identificarea și clasificarea evenimentelor. Susținem că argumentele oferă indicii semnificative pentru această sarcină, dar sunt fie complet ignorate sau exploatate indirect în abordările existente de detectare. În această lucrare, propunem exploatarea explicită a informațiilor referitoare la argumente pentru ED prin intermediul mecanismelor de atenție supravegheate. În special, investigăm sistematic modelul propus sub supravegherea diferitelor strategii de atenție. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră avansează cel mai modern punctaj F1 pe setul de date ACE 2005.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас үйл явдлыг тодорхойлох, хуваарилах үйл явдлыг тодорхойлох (ED) болон хуваарилах үйл явдлыг тайлбарладаг. Бид аргументууд энэ ажил дээр маш чухал тодорхойлолт өгдөг гэдгийг хэлж байна. Гэхдээ тэд эсвэл буруу хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ ажил дээр бид дэлгэрүүлсэн анхаарлын механизм аргументын мэдээллийг тодорхой ашиглах гэсэн санал байна. Тодорхой хэлбэрээр бид өөр анхаарлын стратегийг удирдлагын доор санал өгсөн загварыг систематик судалж байна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээний хувьд урлагийн хувьд хөгжүүлж, 2005 оны ACE өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн F1 оноо гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret løyser oppgåva for oppdaging av hendingar (ED), som involverer identifisering og kategorisering av hendingar. Vi argumenterer at argumenter gjev signifikante klokkar til denne oppgåva, men dei er anten fullstendig ignorert eller eksplodert på ein indirekt måte i tilnærmingar med eksisterande oppdaging. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi å eksplodere argumentinformasjon ekspliskt for ED via oversikte oppmerksmekanisme. I spesifikk undersøker vi systematisk modellen under overvåking av ulike oppmerksstrategier. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt er avansert i tilstanden av kunstene og oppnår den beste F1- poeng på datasettet ACE 2005.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir rješava zadatak otkrivanja događaja (ED), koji uključuje identifikaciju i kategoriju događaja. Tvrdimo da argumenti pružaju značajne tragove ovom zadatku, ali su ili potpuno ignorirani ili iskoristeni na neprekidni način u postojećim pristupima otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo da eksplodiramo informacije o argumentima za ED kroz nadzorne pažnje. Posebno, sistematski istražujemo predloženi model pod nadzorom različitih pažnje strategija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup napreduje stanje umjetnosti i postiže najbolji rezultat F1 na setu podataka ACE 2005.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අවස්ථාව පරීක්ෂණය (ED) ගැන වැඩසටහන් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අවස්ථාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ වෙනස් කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ වැඩේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා නමුත් ඔවුන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදිහට ප්\u200dර මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාර්තාවක් තොරතුරු පරික්ෂා කරලා ED වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පද්ධතියෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා වෙනස් අවධානය ප්\u200dරධානයේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට පටන් ගන්නවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu qabsan karaa shaqo la soo ogaanayo dhacdooyinka (ED), kaas oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada iyo kala qeybinaya dhacdooyinka. Waxaannu ka fekeraynaa in argumentadu ay arrimahan u fidiyaan sabab muhiim ah, laakiin waa in loo jeedaa ama lagu isticmaalaa si toos ah oo loo soo baaraanayo. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan macluumaad bayaan ah ED ugu isticmaalno macluumaad la xiriira si bayaan ah u isticmaalka mechanisyo ilaalinaya. Si gaar ah, waxaan si qaab ah u baaraynaa qaababka la soo jeeday oo lagu ilaaliyo qalabka caafimaadka kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayaga horumarinta xaaladda farshaxanka iyo in uu dhamaado kooxda ugu wanaagsan ee F1 ee ACE 2005.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar uppgiften att upptäcka händelser (ED), vilket innebär att identifiera och kategorisera händelser. Vi hävdar att argument ger betydande ledtrådar till denna uppgift, men de ignoreras helt eller utnyttjas indirekt i befintliga detektionsmetoder. I detta arbete föreslår vi att argumentinformation uttryckligen utnyttjas för ED via övervakade uppmärksamhetsmekanismer. I synnerhet undersöker vi systematiskt den föreslagna modellen under övervakning av olika uppmärksamhetsstrategier. Experimentella resultat visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt avancerar state-of-the-art och uppnår bästa F1 poäng på ACE 2005 dataset.', 'ta': '@ info நாம் வாக்குறுதிகள் இந்த செயலுக்கு முக்கியமான குறிப்புகளை கொடுக்கும் என்று தர்க்கம் செய்கிறோம், ஆனால் அவை முழுமையாக ப இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் ED க்கு வெளிப்படையாக தகவலை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் பார்க்கப்பட்ட கவனத்தின குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை கண்காணிக்க முடியும் வேறு கவனத்தின் முறை முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம்முடைய அணுகல் நிலையை முன்னேற்றும் மற்றும் ACE 2005 தரவு அமைப்பில் சிறந்த F1 மதி', 'ur': 'This paper tackles the task of event detection (ED), which includes identifying and categorizing events. ہم argue that arguments provide significant clues to this task, but they are either completely ignored or exploited in an incorrect way in existing detection approaches. ہم اس کام میں پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مدارک معلومات کو صریح طور پر ادب کے لئے استعمال کریں۔ ہم سیستماتیک طور پر مختلف توجه استراتژی کے تحقیق کے ذریعے پیشنهاد کی مدل کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں. Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-art and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz aytganimiz, argumentlar bu vazifani juda muhim imkoniyatlar beradi, lekin ular hech qanday qilib, hech qanday mavjud aniqlash usulida ishlatiladi. Bu ishda, biz ED haqida tajriba maʼlumotni o'rganishni tahlil qilamiz va taʼminlovchi tizimlar orqali taʼminlovchi. Ko'rsatilgan, biz tasavvur qiladigan modelni boshqa murakkab paytlarni ko'rib chiqarishmiz. Tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning murojaat sohalar holatimizni o'zgartirish va ACE 2005 maʼlumotlar sohasida eng yaxshi F1 scorini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến nhiệm vụ khám phá sự kiện, gồm việc xác định và phân loại các sự kiện. Chúng tôi cho rằng lý luận cung cấp manh mối quan trọng cho nhiệm vụ này, nhưng chúng hoặc bị phớt lờ hoặc bị lợi dụng trực tiếp trong các phương pháp phát hiện hiện hiện hiện. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị khai thác các thông tin về mặt lý luận của ED qua các cơ chế tập trung được giám sát. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi luôn nghiên cứu mẫu được đề xuất dưới sự giám sát của các chiến lược chú ý khác nhau. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta tiến bộ tinh thần nghệ thuật và đạt được điểm F1 tốt nhất trong tập tin ACE rồ.', 'bg': 'Тази статия разглежда задачата за откриване на събития (ЕД), която включва идентифициране и категоризиране на събития. Ние твърдим, че аргументите предоставят значителни улики за тази задача, но те или са напълно игнорирани или експлоатирани по индиректен начин в съществуващите подходи за откриване. В тази работа предлагаме експлоатиране на аргументалната информация за ЕД чрез механизми за наблюдение на вниманието. По-конкретно, систематично изследваме предложения модел под наблюдението на различни стратегии за внимание. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход напредва в най-съвременните технологии и постига най-добрия резултат във Формула 1 в набора от данни на АСЕ 2005.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel behandelt de taak van gebeurtenisdetectie (ED), waarbij gebeurtenissen worden geïdentificeerd en gecategoriseerd. We argumenteren dat argumenten belangrijke aanwijzingen geven voor deze taak, maar ze worden ofwel volledig genegeerd of op indirecte wijze geëxploiteerd in bestaande detectiebenaderingen. In dit werk stellen we voor om argumentinformatie expliciet te exploiteren voor ED via begeleide aandachtsmechanismen. In het bijzonder onderzoeken we systematisch het voorgestelde model onder toezicht van verschillende aandachtsstrategieën. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak state-of-the-art vooruitgang boekt en de beste F1 score behaalt op ACE 2005 dataset.', 'da': 'Dette dokument omhandler opgaven med hændelsesdetektering (ED), som indebærer identificering og kategorisering af hændelser. Vi hævder, at argumenter giver væsentlige spor til denne opgave, men de ignoreres enten fuldstændigt eller udnyttes indirekte i eksisterende detektionsmetoder. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at udnytte argumentinformation eksplicit for ED via overvågede opmærksomhedsmekanismer. Specielt undersøger vi systematisk den foreslåede model under tilsyn med forskellige opmærksomhedsstrategier. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang fremmer state-of-the-art og opnår den bedste F1 score på ACE 2005 datasæt.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit befasst sich mit der Aufgabe der Ereigniserkennung (ED), bei der es um die Identifizierung und Kategorisierung von Ereignissen geht. Wir argumentieren, dass Argumente wichtige Hinweise auf diese Aufgabe liefern, aber sie werden entweder vollständig ignoriert oder indirekt in bestehenden Erkennungsansätzen ausgenutzt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, Argumentinformationen explizit für ED über überwachte Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen zu nutzen. Konkret untersuchen wir das vorgeschlagene Modell systematisch unter der Aufsicht verschiedener Aufmerksamkeitsstrategien. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik ist und die beste F1-Punktzahl auf ACE 2005-Datensätzen erzielt.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengatasi tugas deteksi peristiwa (ED), yang melibatkan identifikasi dan kategorisasi peristiwa. Kami argumentasi bahwa argumen memberikan petunjuk yang signifikan untuk tugas ini, tetapi mereka sama sekali diabaikan atau dieksploitasi secara indirekt dalam pendekatan deteksi yang ada. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk mengeksploitasi informasi argumen secara eksplicit untuk ED melalui mekanisme perhatian yang diawasi. Secara spesifik, kita secara sistematis menyelidiki model yang diusulkan di bawah pengawasan strategi perhatian yang berbeda. Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-arts and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'ko': '본고는 이벤트 검출(ED)의 임무를 논의했는데 이는 이벤트를 식별하고 분류하는 데 관련된다.우리는 논점이 이 임무에 중요한 단서를 제공했다고 생각하지만, 기존의 검측 방법에서 논점은 완전히 무시되거나 간접적으로 이용된다.이 작업에서 우리는 감독 주의 메커니즘을 통해 ED의 논점 정보를 명확하게 활용할 것을 건의합니다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 서로 다른 주의 전략의 감독 아래 이 모델을 체계적으로 연구했다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 기술 수준을 향상시켰고 ACE 2005 데이터 집합에서 가장 좋은 F1 성적을 거두었다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linakabiliana na jukumu la kutambua tukio (ED), ambalo linahusisha kutambua na kutengeneza matukio. Tunahoji kuwa hoja zinatoa sababu muhimu kwa kazi hii, lakini hata hivyo hupuuzwa kabisa au kutumiwa kwa njia ya moja kwa moja katika njia za kutambua zilizopo. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia taarifa za wazi kwa ajili ya ED kupitia mfumo wa ufuatiliaji. Kwa ujumla, tunachunguza kwa mfumo utafiti huu unapendekezwa chini ya kufuatilia mbinu mbalimbali za ufuatiliaji. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inaboresha hali ya sanaa na kupata score bora ya F1 kwenye seti ya takwimu za ACE 2005.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir rješava zadatak otkrivanja događaja (ED), koji uključuje identifikaciju i kategoriju događaja. Tvrdimo da argumenti pružaju značajne tragove ovog zadatka, ali ili su potpuno ignorirani ili iskoristeni na neprekidno način u postojećim pristupima otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo da iskoristimo informacije o argumentima za ED-a jasno putem nadziranih mehanizma pažnje. Posebno, sistematski istražujemo predloženi model pod nadzorom različitih strategija pažnje. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup napreduje stanje umjetnosti i postigne najbolji rezultat F1 na setu podataka ACE 2005.', 'af': "Hierdie papier bepaal die taak van gebeurtenis beskrywing (ED), wat insluit identifiseering en kategoriseering gebeurtenis. Ons argumenteer dat argumente betekende kloue aan hierdie taak verskaf, maar hulle is of heeltemal geïgnoreer of uitgebruik in 'n ongeregte manier in bestaande opspoor toegang. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons om argumentinligting uitsondelik vir ED deur ondersoekte aandag mekanisme te uitbrei. In spesifieke, ons sistematies die voorgestelde model onder die supervisie van verskillende aandag strategies ondersoek. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons toegang vergroot staat van die kunste en bereik die beste F1-punt op ACE 2005 datastel.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار شناسایی رویداد (ED) را حل می\u200cکند که شامل شناسایی و برگزیدن رویداد\u200cها است. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که arguments provide significant clues to this task, but they are either completely ignored or exploited in an indirect way in existing detection approaches. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات بحث را به طور واضح برای ED از طریق مکانیسم توجه نظارت استفاده کنیم. به طور خاص، ما سیستم\u200cپذیری از مدل پیشنهاد را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم زیر نظارت استراتژی\u200cهای متفاوت توجه. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما به حالت هنر پیشرفت می\u200cکند و بهترین امتیاز F1 در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ACE 2005 می\u200cرسد.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የጉዳዩ አቀማመጥ (ED) ስራዎችን የሚያሳውቅና በመለያየት የሚችል ነው፡፡ አጋራጆች ለዚህ ስራ የተለየ ጥያቄ እንዲያሳየቁ እንከራከራለን፤ ነገር ግን በተገኘው ግንኙነት በተቃራኒ ግንኙነት ወይም በተጠቃሚ ግንኙነት እንዲደረጉ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የኢዲዮ ማስታወቂያ ግልፅ በተለይ ለመፍጠር እናዘጋጀዋለን፡፡ በተለያዩ የልዩ ልዩ ትኩረት strategies በተመለከተ ላይ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በሥርዓት ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-arts and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument trajton detyrën e zbulimit të ngjarjeve (ED), që përfshin identifikimin dhe kategorizimin e ngjarjeve. Ne argumentojmë se argumentet ofrojnë udhëzime të rëndësishme për këtë detyrë, por ato ose janë plotësisht injoruar ose shfrytëzuar në mënyrë indirekte në metodat ekzistuese të zbulimit. Në këtë punë, propozojmë të shfrytëzojmë informacionin e argumenteve eksplicitisht për ED nëpërmjet mekanizmave të vëmendjes së mbikqyrur. Në mënyrë specifike, ne sistematikisht hetojmë modelin e propozuar nën mbikqyrjen e strategjive të ndryshme të vëmendjes. Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-arts and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը վերաբերում է իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերման (ED) խնդրին, որը ներառում է իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման: Մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ բանավեճերը նշանակալի հնարավորություններ են տալիս այս խնդիրը, բայց դրանք կամ ամբողջովին անտեսվում են կամ անուղղակիորեն օգտագործվում են գոյություն ունեցող հայտնաբերման մոտեցումներում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել բանավեճի տեղեկատվությունը բացահայտորեն ԷԴ-ի համար վերահսկված ուշադրության մեխանիզմների միջոցով: Մասնավորապես, մենք համակարգչաբար ուսումնասիրում ենք առաջարկված մոդելը տարբեր ուշադրության ռազմավարությունների վերահսկման տակ: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը զարգանում է բարձրագույն տեխնոլոգիաները և հասնում է ACE 2005 տվյալների համակարգի լավագույն F1 գնահատականը:', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt olaraq tanńĪma v…ô kategoriya olaraq daxil olan olaraq tanńĪma v…ô se√ßm…ô iŇüini √ß…ôkir. Biz argumentl…ôrin bu iŇüin m√∂ht…ôr…ôm ipl…ôrini t…ôsdiql…ôdiyini iddia edirik, amma onlar h…ômin iŇüin yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪnda ya tamamil…ô d…ôyiŇüm…ôdil…ôr, ya da d…ôyiŇüm…ôdil…ôr. Biz bu iŇüd…ô, ED √ľ√ß√ľn d…ôlili m…ôlumatlarńĪ t…ôsdiql…ônmiŇü m…ôlumatlar vasit…ôsil…ô istifad…ô etm…ôyi t…ôklif edirik. Biz sistematik olaraq t…ôklif etdiyimiz modeli m√ľxt…ôlif g√∂zl…ôm…ô stratejil…ôrinin n…ôzar…ôtind…ô t…ôklif edirik. Experimental sonu√ßlarńĪ g√∂st…ôrir ki, bizim t…ôrzimiz artlarńĪn durumunu ilerl…ôŇüdirir v…ô ACE 2005 veri qutusunda …ôn yaxŇüńĪ F1 n√∂qt…ôsini n…ôsib edir.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি ইভেন্ট আবিষ্কারের কাজের মুখোমুখি হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে অনুষ্ঠান চিহ্নিত এবং বিভাগের সাথে যুক্ত। আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে যুক্তি এই কাজের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধারণা দিয়েছে, কিন্তু বিদ্যমান পরীক্ষার কারণে তারা সম্পূর্ণ উপেক্ এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে ইডির জন্য স্পষ্টভাবে তথ্য ব্যবহার করার জন্য সুস্পষ্ট তথ্য ব্যবহার করার জন্য। বিশেষ করে আমরা বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ কৌশলের পর্যবেক্ষণের অধীনে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল তদন্ত করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া অফ-শিল্পের উন্নতি এবং ACE ২০০৫ ডাটাসেটে সবচেয়ে ভালো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করে।', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz çykyş tapylmakyň (ED) zadyny çözýär we olaryň tanamagyny barlaýar. Biz argumlaryň bu zadyň wajyp işi täsir edýändigini aýtdyrýarys, ýöne olar bolan tanyş ýagdaýynyň ýagdaýynda edil ýok bir şekilde döwletlenmediler. Biz bu işde, ED üçin argüm maglumatyny gözleýän üns meýdançalary bilen ulanmagy maslahat berýäris. Biz sistematik görä görä teklip eden nusgyny farklı üns stratejiýasynyň üstünde gözlemäge çykýarys. Aramanyň netijeleri biziň metodamyz 2005-nji ýyldaky sanat düzümlerini gelip bolýar we ACE 2005-nji ýyldaky sanat düzümlerini ýetip bilýär.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir rješava zadatak otkrivanja događaja (ED), koji uključuje identifikaciju i kategoriju događaja. Tvrdimo da argumenti pružaju značajne tragove ovog zadatka, ali oni su ili potpuno ignorirani ili iskorištavani na indirektan način u postojećim pristupima otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo iskoristiti informacije o argumentima za ED kroz nadzorne pažnje. Posebno, sistematski istražujemo predloženi model pod nadzorom različitih strategija pažnje. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup napreduje stanje umjetnosti i postigne najbolji rezultat F1 na setu podataka ACE 2005.', 'ca': "Aquest article aborda la tasca de detecció d'esdeveniments (ED), que implica identificar i categoritzar els esdeveniments. Argumentem que els arguments proporcionen indicis significatius a aquesta tasca, però són completament ignorats o explotats d'una manera indirecta en els enfocaments de detecció existents. En aquesta feina, proposem explotar la informació d'arguments explícitament per a ED mitjançant mecanismes d'atenció supervisads. En concret, investigam sistemàticament el model proposat sota la supervisió de diferents estratègies d'atenció. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament avança en l'actualitat i aconsegueix la millor puntuació F1 en el conjunt de dades ACE 2005.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse sündmuste tuvastamise ülesannet, mis hõlmab sündmuste tuvastamist ja kategooriate liigitamist. Väidame, et argumendid annavad sellele ülesandele märkimisväärseid vihjeid, kuid neid ignoreeritakse täielikult või kasutatakse kaudselt olemasolevates avastamismeetodites. Selles töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada argumentide infot sõnaselgelt ED-i jaoks järelevalvemehhanismide kaudu. Konkreetselt uurime kavandatud mudelit süstemaatiliselt erinevate tähelepanustrateegiate järelevalve all. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis arendab kaasaegset tehnikat ja saavutab parima F1 skoori ACE 2005 andmekogumis.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 artikkelissa k채sitell채채n tapahtumantunnistuksen teht채v채채 (ED), joka sis채lt채채 tapahtumien tunnistamisen ja luokittelun. V채it채mme, ett채 argumentit antavat merkitt채vi채 vihjeit채 t채h채n teht채v채채n, mutta niit채 joko j채tet채채n kokonaan huomiotta tai hy철dynnet채채n ep채suorasti olemassa olevissa havaitsemismenetelmiss채. T채ss채 ty철ss채 ehdotamme, ett채 argumenttitietoa hy철dynnet채채n nimenomaan ED:lle valvotun huomiomekanismin kautta. Erityisesti tutkimme ehdotettua mallia systemaattisesti erilaisten huomiostrategioiden valvonnassa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, ett채 l채hestymistapamme edist채채 viimeisint채 tekniikkaa ja saavuttaa parhaan F1 pisteen ACE 2005 -aineistossa.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá úlohou detekce událostí (ED), která zahrnuje identifikaci a kategorizaci událostí. Tvrdíme, že argumenty poskytují významné stopy k tomuto úkolu, ale jsou buď zcela ignorovány nebo nepřímým způsobem využívány v existujících detekčních přístupech. V této práci navrhujeme explicitně využít argumentní informace pro ED prostřednictvím kontrolovaných mechanismů pozornosti. Konkrétně navržený model systematicky zkoumáme pod dohledem různých strategií pozornosti. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup pokračuje v moderním stavu a dosahuje nejlepšího skóre F1 v datovém souboru ACE 2005.', 'jv': 'Workspace Names Monday Nang barêng-barêng iné, kéné supoyo nggawe informasi apa-apa kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe aturan tapi manipulan kanggo nggawe Rasané, awak dhéwé sistematik éntuk dadi model sing supoyo nggawe ngulinggo perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno dadi. Perintah sing paling nggambar kuwi diangkamus akses tarjamahan kanggo ngerasah tarjamahan sing dumadhi F1 sing paling nggawe dataset, sing apik oleh nggawe', 'he': 'This paper tackles the task of event detection (ED), which involves identifying and categorizing events.  אנחנו טוענים שהטיעונים מספקים רמזים משמעותיים למשימה הזאת, אבל הם או מתעלמים לחלוטין או ניצלים באופן אינדרי באמצעות גישות גילוי קיימות. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים לנצל מידע טיעון באופן ברור עבור ד"ד באמצעות מכונות תשומת לב מבוקשים. במיוחד, אנו חוקרים באופן שיטתי את המודל המוצע תחת השגחה של אסטרטגיות תשומת לב שונות. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהגישה שלנו מתקדמת במצב האמנויות ולהשיג את נקודת F1 הטובה ביותר בסט נתונים ACE 2005.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ta yi motsi ga aikin ganin nan da aka gane shi (ED), wanda ke ƙunsa da gane da mai categori. Munã jãyayya da cẽwa jãyayya masu gauraya ga wannan aikin, amma ko sai an bijire su ko kuma aka yi amfani da su a cikin hanyar da ke samu'a. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa mu sami bayan bayani ga shirin bayani na ED, a bayan an zama masu bincike. A cikin ƙayyadadde, za mu yi ƙidãya a kan misalin wanda aka yi niyyar da shi, a ƙarƙashin ka ga tsarin masu zance-zance. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa hanyoyinmu ta ƙari halin-sanar kuma ya sami mafi kyaun F1 koyi a danne na ACE 2005.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek obravnava nalogo zaznavanja dogodkov (ED), ki vključuje identifikacijo in kategorizacijo dogodkov. Trdimo, da argumenti zagotavljajo pomembne sledi za to nalogo, vendar so bodisi popolnoma ignorirani ali posredno izkoriščeni v obstoječih pristopih odkrivanja. V tem delu predlagamo izkoriščanje argumentov informacij eksplicitno za ED prek mehanizmov nadzorovane pozornosti. Natančneje sistematično raziskujemo predlagani model pod nadzorom različnih strategij pozornosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop napreduje najsodobnejši in dosega najboljši rezultat F1 na podatkovnem naboru ACE 2005.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བྱ་འགུལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དང་དབྱེ་སེལ་བྱེད་སྤྱད་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བཞིན་ཡོད་ནའང་། ཁོ་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ In this work, we propose to exploit argument information explicitly for ED via supervised attention mechanisms. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གིས་གནད་སྡུད་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་དེ་ལ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་ཆས་གཞི་རྩལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན Experimental results show that our approach advances state-of-the-art and achieves the best F1 score on ACE 2005 dataset.'}
{'en': 'Topical Coherence in LDA-based Models through Induced Segmentation', 'ar': 'التماسك الموضعي في النماذج المستندة إلى LDA من خلال التجزئة المستحثة', 'es': 'Coherencia tópica en modelos basados en LDA a través de la segmentación inducida', 'pt': 'Coerência tópica em modelos baseados em LDA por meio de segmentação induzida', 'fr': 'Cohérence topique dans les modèles basés sur LDA par segmentation induite', 'ja': '誘導セグメンテーションによるLDAベースモデルの局所的コヒーレンス', 'zh': '诱分于LDA,有局一致性', 'hi': 'प्रेरित विभाजन के माध्यम से एलडीए-आधारित मॉडल में सामयिक सुसंगतता', 'ru': 'Местная когерентность в моделях на основе LDA посредством индуцированной сегментации', 'ga': 'Comhleanúnachas Tráthúil i Múnlaí LDA-bhunaithe trí Dheighilt Ionduchtaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Τοπική συνοχή σε μοντέλα βασισμένα σε LDA μέσω επαγωγής τμηματοποίησης', 'hu': 'Az LDA-alapú modellek aktuális koherenciája indukált szegmentációval', 'kk': 'LDA негіздеген үлгілердің нақышты согластыру', 'it': 'Coerenza topica nei modelli basati su LDA attraverso la segmentazione indotta', 'mk': 'Тематична кохеренција во моделите базирани на ЛДА преку индуцирана сегментација', 'lt': 'Teminė nuoseklumas MTP grindžiamuose modeliuose per sukeltą segmentaciją', 'ml': 'LDA- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകളിലെ സംയോജക ക കോഹെറെന്\u200dസ് ഇന്\u200dഡ്യൂട്ട് സെഗ്മെന്റേഷനിലൂടെ', 'mn': 'LDA-д суурилсан загваруудын гол хамаарал', 'mt': 'Koerenza Topika fil-Mudelli bbażati fuq l-LDA permezz tas-Segmentazzjoni Indotta', 'ms': 'Kesesuaian Topik dalam Model berdasarkan LDA melalui Segmentasi Diinduksi', 'no': 'Topptekst samanlikning i LDA-baserte modeller gjennom induserte segmentasjon', 'pl': 'Spójność topiczna w modelach opartych na LDA poprzez segmentację indukowaną', 'ro': 'Coerenţa tematică în modelele bazate pe LDA prin segmentarea indusă', 'sr': 'Topična koherencija u modelima baziranim na LDA putem Inducene segmentacije', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Topical Coherence in LDA-based Models through Induced Segmentation', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட பிரிவு வழியாக LDA- அடிப்படையிலுள்ள பொருள் கூட்டுதல்', 'sv': 'Aktuell samstämmighet i LDA-baserade modeller genom inducerad segmentering', 'ur': 'LDA بنیادی موڈل میں سراسر تعلق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thuyết hợp quan trọng trong mô- đun LDAP qua đoạn phim gây mê', 'bg': 'Топична съгласуваност в базираните на ЛД модели чрез индуцирана сегментация', 'hr': 'Topična pristojnost u modelima na temelju LDA-a putem Inducene segmentacije', 'nl': 'Topische coherentie in LDA-gebaseerde modellen door geïnduceerde segmentatie', 'da': 'Topisk sammenhæng i LDA-baserede modeller gennem induceret segmentering', 'de': 'Topische Kohärenz in LDA-basierten Modellen durch induzierte Segmentierung', 'id': 'Koerensi Topik dalam Model berdasarkan LDA melalui Segmentasi Diinduksi', 'ko': '유도 분할을 통해 LDA 기반 모델의 주제 일치성 실현', 'fa': 'هماهنگی عنوان در مدل\u200cهای LDA به طریق جدایل\u200cهای ضعیف', 'sw': 'Ushirikiano wa mada katika Model yenye msingi wa LDA kupitia Segment Induced', 'tr': 'LDA tabanly nusgalar', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Koerenca tematike në modelet me bazë në LDA nëpërmjet segmentimit të induktuar', 'hy': 'ԼԴԱ-ի հիմնված մոդելների թեմատիկական համախմբականությունը ներդրված սեգմենտացիայի միջոցով', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'LDA tabanlńĪ modell…ôrd…ô T…ôsdiq Segmentasyon vasit…ôsil…ô Topic Coherence', 'bn': 'লেডিএ ভিত্তিক মোডেলের বিষয়বস্তুতে প্রতিষ্ঠিত বিষয়বস্তু', 'bs': 'Topična koherencija u modelima na LDA-u putem Inducene segmentacije', 'ca': 'Coherència tòpica en els models basats en LDA a través de la segmentació induïda', 'cs': 'Topická koherence v modelech založených na LDA prostřednictvím indukované segmentace', 'et': 'Topikaalne sidusus LDA-põhistes mudelites indutseeritud segmenteerimise kaudu', 'fi': 'Paikallinen johdonmukaisuus LDA-pohjaisissa malleissa indusoidun segmentoinnin avulla', 'jv': 'EMAIL', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Topična skladnost modelov, ki temeljijo na LDA, prek indukcijske segmentacije', 'he': 'תואם נושאי במודלים מבוססים על LDA דרך Segmentation Induced', 'bo': 'LDA-གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་དུ་གནད་དོན་མཉམ་འདྲེན་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper presents an LDA-based model that generates topically coherent segments within documents by jointly segmenting documents and assigning topics to their words. The coherence between topics is ensured through a copula, binding the topics associated to the words of a segment. In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distributions so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments. We show that the proposed model naturally encompasses other state-of-the-art LDA-based models designed for similar tasks. Furthermore, our experiments, conducted on six different publicly available datasets, show the effectiveness of our model in terms of perplexity, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, which captures the coherence between the generated topics, and the Micro F1 measure for text classification.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا قائمًا على LDA يقوم بإنشاء مقاطع متماسكة موضعياً داخل المستندات عن طريق تقسيم المستندات بشكل مشترك وتعيين الموضوعات لكلماتها. يتم ضمان التماسك بين الموضوعات من خلال الكوبولا ، ربط الموضوعات المرتبطة بكلمات الجزء. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يعتمد هذا النموذج على كل من توزيعات الموضوعات الخاصة بالمستند والقطاع وذلك لالتقاط الاختلافات الدقيقة في تعيينات الموضوعات. نوضح أن النموذج المقترح يشمل بشكل طبيعي النماذج الأخرى المستندة إلى LDA الحديثة والمصممة لمهام مماثلة. علاوة على ذلك ، تُظهر تجاربنا ، التي أُجريت على ست مجموعات بيانات مختلفة متاحة للجمهور ، فعالية نموذجنا من حيث الارتباك والمعلومات المتبادلة المعيارية Pointwise ، والتي تلتقط التماسك بين الموضوعات التي تم إنشاؤها ، ومقياس Micro F1 لتصنيف النص.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um modelo baseado em LDA que gera segmentos topicamente coerentes dentro de documentos segmentando documentos em conjunto e atribuindo tópicos às suas palavras. A coerência entre os tópicos é assegurada através de uma cópula, ligando os tópicos associados às palavras de um segmento. Além disso, esse modelo conta com distribuições de tópicos específicos de documentos e segmentos para capturar diferenças refinadas nas atribuições de tópicos. Mostramos que o modelo proposto naturalmente engloba outros modelos baseados em LDA de última geração projetados para tarefas semelhantes. Além disso, nossos experimentos, conduzidos em seis diferentes conjuntos de dados disponíveis publicamente, mostram a eficácia do nosso modelo em termos de perplexidade, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, que captura a coerência entre os tópicos gerados, e a medida Micro F1 para classificação de texto.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un modelo basado en LDA que genera segmentos coherentes tópicamente dentro de los documentos mediante la segmentación conjunta de documentos y la asignación de temas a sus palabras. La coherencia entre los temas se asegura a través de una cópula, vinculando los temas asociados a las palabras de un segmento. Además, este modelo se basa en distribuciones de temas específicos tanto de documentos como de segmentos para captar las diferencias detalladas en las asignaciones de temas. Demostramos que el modelo propuesto abarca naturalmente otros modelos de última generación basados en LDA diseñados para tareas similares. Además, nuestros experimentos, realizados en seis conjuntos de datos diferentes disponibles al público, muestran la eficacia de nuestro modelo en términos de perplejidad, la información mutua puntual normalizada, que captura la coherencia entre los temas generados, y la medida Micro F1 para la clasificación de textos.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un modèle basé sur LDA qui génère des segments cohérents sur le plan topique dans les documents en segmentant conjointement les documents et en attribuant des sujets à leurs mots. La cohérence entre les sujets est assurée par une copule, liant les sujets associés aux mots d'un segment. En outre, ce modèle repose à la fois sur des distributions de sujets spécifiques aux documents et aux segments afin de saisir les différences précises dans les affectations de sujets. Nous montrons que le modèle proposé englobe naturellement d'autres modèles de pointe basés sur LDA conçus pour des tâches similaires. De plus, nos expériences, menées sur six ensembles de données différents accessibles au public, montrent l'efficacité de notre modèle en termes de perplexité, d'informations mutuelles ponctuelles normalisées, qui saisissent la cohérence entre les sujets générés, et de la mesure Micro F1 pour la classification de texte.", 'zh': '立LDA之法,合文档分段而分之单词以成文档内之连贯。 题之间一致性因copula以保,系句段之单词绑定。 此外依文档细分特定题布,以获其细粒度差。 吾言自然包为类者,其他先进者,LDA之先也。 六集上之实验见其困惑之有效性,归一化逐点互信息其获生成主题之一致性,及文本之类Micro F1度。', 'ja': '本稿では、文書を共同でセグメント化し、トピックを言葉に割り当てることにより、文書内で局所的に一貫したセグメントを生成するLDAベースのモデルを提示する。トピック間の一貫性は、コピュラを通じて確保され、セグメントの単語に関連付けられたトピックを結合します。さらに、このモデルは、トピック割り当ての細かい粒度の違いをキャプチャするために、ドキュメントとセグメント固有のトピックの分布の両方に依存しています。提案されたモデルは、同様のタスクのために設計された他の最先端のLDAベースのモデルを自然に包含することを示しています。さらに、６つの異なる一般に入手可能なデータセットで実施された我々の実験は、複雑さ、生成されたトピック間の一貫性を取り込む正規化されたポイントワイズ相互情報、およびテキスト分類のためのマイクロＦ１メジャーの観点からの我々のモデルの有効性を示している。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक एलडीए-आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है जो संयुक्त रूप से दस्तावेजों को विभाजित करके और उनके शब्दों को विषयों को असाइन करके दस्तावेजों के भीतर शीर्ष रूप से सुसंगत खंड उत्पन्न करता है। विषयों के बीच सामंजस्य एक कोपुला के माध्यम से सुनिश्चित किया जाता है, जो एक खंड के शब्दों से जुड़े विषयों को बाध्य करता है। इसके अलावा, यह मॉडल दस्तावेज़ और खंड विशिष्ट विषय वितरण दोनों पर निर्भर करता है ताकि विषय असाइनमेंट में ठीक अंतर को कैप्चर किया जा सके। हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल स्वाभाविक रूप से इसी तरह के कार्यों के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए अन्य अत्याधुनिक एलडीए-आधारित मॉडल को शामिल करता है। इसके अलावा, हमारे प्रयोग, छह अलग-अलग सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट पर आयोजित किए गए, हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को उलझन के संदर्भ में दिखाते हैं, सामान्यीकृत पॉइंटवाइज पारस्परिक जानकारी, जो उत्पन्न विषयों के बीच सामंजस्य को कैप्चर करती है, और पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए माइक्रो एफ 1 उपाय।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе представлена модель, основанная на LDA, которая генерирует тематически последовательные сегменты в документах путем совместной сегментации документов и назначения тем для их слов. Согласованность между темами обеспечивается с помощью копулы, связывающей темы, связанные со словами сегмента. Кроме того, эта модель основывается как на распределении документов, так и на распределении конкретных тем по сегментам, с тем чтобы фиксировать мелкие различия в распределении тем. Показано, что предлагаемая модель, естественно, охватывает другие современные модели на основе LDA, предназначенные для аналогичных задач. Кроме того, наши эксперименты, проведенные на шести различных общедоступных наборах данных, показывают эффективность нашей модели с точки зрения недоумения, нормализованной точечной взаимной информации, которая отражает согласованность между сгенерированными темами, и меры Micro F1 для классификации текста.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo múnla atá bunaithe ar LDA i láthair a ghineann teascáin atá comhleanúnach ó thaobh topaic de laistigh de dhoiciméid trí dhoiciméid a roinnt i gcomhpháirt agus topaicí a shannadh dá gcuid focal. Cinntítear comhleanúnachas idir topaicí trí chopail a cheanglaíonn na topaicí a bhaineann le focail mhíre. Ina theannta sin, bíonn an tsamhail seo ag brath ar dháileadh topaicí ar leith ar dhoiciméid agus ar mhíreanna araon chun éagsúlachtaí míne i dtascanna topaicí a ghabháil. Léirímid go gcuimsíonn an tsamhail mholta go nádúrtha samhlacha úrscothacha eile atá bunaithe ar LDA atá deartha le haghaidh tascanna comhchosúla. Ina theannta sin, léiríonn ár dturgnaimh, a rinneadh ar shé thacar sonraí éagsúla atá ar fáil go poiblí, éifeachtacht ár múnla i dtéarmaí seach-phléacsachta, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, a thaispeánann an comhleanúnachas idir na topaicí ginte, agus an beart Micrimhilseogra F1 maidir le haicmiú téacs.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy LDA-alapú modellt mutat be, amely aktuálisan koherens szegmenseket generál a dokumentumokon belül a dokumentumok közös szegmentálásával és a szavak témáinak hozzárendelésével. A témák közötti koherenciát egy kopula biztosítja, amely egy szegmens szavaihoz kapcsolódó témákat köti. Ezen túlmenően ez a modell mind a dokumentum-, mind a szegmensspecifikus témaosztásokra támaszkodik, hogy a témaosztások finom szemcsés különbségeit rögzítse. Megmutatjuk, hogy a javasolt modell természetesen magában foglal más, hasonló feladatokra tervezett, LDA alapú modelleket is. Továbbá hat különböző nyilvánosan elérhető adatkészleten végzett kísérleteink megmutatják modellünk hatékonyságát a zavaróság szempontjából, a normalizált pontos kölcsönös információ, amely rögzíti a generált témák koherenciáját, valamint a szövegosztályozás Micro F1 mérését.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στην LDA που παράγει τοπικά συνεκτικά τμήματα μέσα στα έγγραφα, διαιρώντας από κοινού έγγραφα και αντιστοιχώντας θέματα στις λέξεις τους. Η συνοχή μεταξύ των θεμάτων εξασφαλίζεται μέσω μιας κοπέλας, η οποία δεσμεύει τα θέματα που σχετίζονται με τις λέξεις ενός τμήματος. Επιπλέον, αυτό το μοντέλο βασίζεται τόσο σε διανομές ειδικών θεμάτων εγγράφων όσο και τμημάτων, έτσι ώστε να αποτυπώνονται λεπτομερείς διαφορές στις αναθέσεις θεμάτων. Δείχνουμε ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο περιλαμβάνει φυσικά και άλλα σύγχρονα μοντέλα βασισμένα σε LDA σχεδιασμένα για παρόμοιες εργασίες. Επιπλέον, τα πειράματά μας, που διεξήχθησαν σε έξι διαφορετικά δημόσια διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων, δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας από την άποψη της σύγχυσης, της κανονικοποιημένης οπτικής αλληλογραφίας, που αποτυπώνει τη συνοχή μεταξύ των παραγόμενων θεμάτων, και του μέτρου για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი LDA-დაბათებული მოდელს, რომელიც დოკუმენტებში ტექმიკურად კონდენტებურად კონდენტებურად კონდენტებურად წარმოიქმნს, რომელიც ერთადერთად სექმენტის შორის შესაძლებელობა, რომელიც კოპულას გამოყენებული, სექმენტის სიტყვებით დაკავშირებული ტემენტის შესაძლებელობა. დამატებით, ეს მოდელი იყოს ორივე დოკუმენტის და სექმენტის განსაზღვრებული ტემენტის განსაზღვრებაზე, რადგან ტემენტის განსაზღვრებულების განსაზღვრებულების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელის მოდელის ნახვა მოდელის შეფარდება LDA-ს დაბათებული მოდელები, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული მუშაობებისთვის. დამატებით, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც 6 განსხვავებული ადამიანის მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობას ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ პროპლექტის შესახებ, ნორმალიზებული საერთო ინფორმაციის შესახებ, რომელიც შე', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un modello basato su LDA che genera segmenti topicamente coerenti all'interno dei documenti segmentando congiuntamente i documenti e assegnando argomenti alle loro parole. La coerenza tra gli argomenti è garantita attraverso una copula, legando gli argomenti associati alle parole di un segmento. Inoltre, questo modello si basa su distribuzioni di argomenti specifici sia per documenti che per segmenti in modo da catturare le differenze granulate nelle assegnazioni di argomenti. Dimostriamo che il modello proposto comprende naturalmente altri modelli LDA all'avanguardia progettati per compiti simili. Inoltre, i nostri esperimenti, condotti su sei diversi set di dati disponibili pubblicamente, mostrano l'efficacia del nostro modello in termini di perplessità, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, che cattura la coerenza tra gli argomenti generati, e la misura Micro F1 per la classificazione del testo.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas MTP grindžiamas modelis, kuriame dokumentuose pateikiami aktualiai nuoseklūs segmentai, kartu suskirstant dokumentus ir skirstant temas jų žodžiams. Temų nuoseklumą užtikrina kopulė, jungianti temas, susijusias su segmento žodžiais. Be to, šis modelis grindžiamas tiek dokumentų, tiek segment ų konkrečiomis temomis, siekiant nustatyti smulkius grūdų skirtumus temų paskirstymo srityje. Mes rodome, kad siūlomas modelis, žinoma, apima kitus pažangiausius modelius, pagrįstus mažiausiai išsivysčiusiomis technologijomis, sukurtus panašioms užduotims. Be to, mūsų eksperimentai, atlikti su šešiais skirtingais visuomenei prieinamais duomenų rinkiniais, rodo mūsų modelio veiksmingumą, kiek tai susiję su perplexumu, Normalizuotu tašku pagrįsta abipuse informacija, kuri apima sukauptų temų nuoseklumą, ir mikro F1 priemonės teksto klasifikavimui.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз LDA негіздеген үлгі бар құжаттарды біріктіру мен сөздеріне нақышты сәйкесті сегменттерді құрады. Тақырыптар арасындағы тегіс копула арқылы, сегменттің сөздеріне сәйкес келген тақырыптарды тіркейді. Қосымша, бұл үлгі құжат мен сегменттің ерекше нақыштарды тарату үшін нақыштардың айырмашылығын түсіндіру үшін сенімді. Біз ұсынылған үлгі ұсынылған LDA-негіздегі басқа істер үлгілерін ұсынады. Сонымен қатар, біздің тәжірибеміз алты әртүрлі деректер қорларында әсер етілген тәжірибелеріміз, үлгіміздің ең әсер етілігін мәтін классификациясының арасындағы тәжірибелігін, кәдімгі бағытталған мәліметтер мен Micro', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува модел базиран на ЛДА кој генерира точки кохерентни сегменти во рамките на документите со заедничко сегментирање на документите и додавање на теми на нивните зборови. Конеренцијата помеѓу темите е осигурана преку копула, врзувајќи ги темите поврзани со зборовите на еден сегмент. Покрај тоа, овој модел се потпира и на специфичните дистрибуции на документи и сегменти за тема, со цел да се прифатат фини разлики во задачите на темата. Ние покажуваме дека предложениот модел природно вклучува други најсовремени модели базирани на ЛДА дизајнирани за слични задачи. Покрај тоа, нашите експерименти, спроведени на шест различни јавно достапни податоци, ја покажуваат ефективноста на нашиот модел во поглед на збунетоста, Нормализираната Взаемна Информација, која ја зазема кохеренцијата помеѓу генерираните теми и мерката Микро Ф1 за класификација на текст.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan model berdasarkan LDA yang menghasilkan segmen secara topik yang konsisten dalam dokumen dengan menyegmen dokumen bersama-sama dan menyerahkan topik kepada kata-kata mereka. Kesatuan antara topik dijamin melalui kopula, mengikat topik yang berkaitan dengan kata-kata segmen. In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distributions so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments.  We show that the proposed model naturally encompasses other state-of-the-art LDA-based models designed for similar tasks.  Selain itu, eksperimen kami, dilakukan pada enam set data yang tersedia secara awam yang berbeza, menunjukkan keefektivitas model kami dalam terma kekeliruan, Maklumat Bersama-sama Pointwise Normalised, yang menangkap kesesuaian antara topik yang dijana, dan ukuran Micro F1 untuk kelasukan teks.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell ibbażat fuq l-LDA li jiġġenera segmenti topikament koerenti fi ħdan id-dokumenti billi jaqsam id-dokumenti b’mod konġunt u jassenja suġġetti għall-kliem tagħhom. Il-koerenza bejn is-suġġetti hija żgurata permezz ta’ kopula, li torbot is-suġġetti assoċjati mal-kliem ta’ segment. Barra minn hekk, dan il-mudell jiddependi kemm fuq distribuzzjonijiet ta’ suġġetti speċifiċi għad-dokumenti kif ukoll għas-segmenti sabiex jinqabdu differenzi fini fil-konċessjonijiet ta’ suġġetti. Aħna nuru li l-mudell propost naturalment jinkludi mudelli l-aktar avvanzati bbażati fuq l-LDA mfassla għal kompiti simili. Barra minn hekk, l-esperimenti tagħna, imwettqa fuq sitt settijiet differenti ta’ dejta disponibbli pubblikament, juru l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna f’termini ta’ perplessità, Informazzjoni Reċiproka Normalizzata Puntwali, li taqbad il-koerenza bejn is-suġġetti ġġenerati, u l-miżura Mikro F1 għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു LDA-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംഘങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. രേഖകളില്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് രേഖകള്\u200d  പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ഒരു കോപുലയിലൂടെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നു. In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distributions so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായി മറ്റുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ആറു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തികമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас LDA-ын суурь загвар нь баримтуудын дотор сэтгэл зүйрлэлтэй загваруудыг бүтээж, баримтуудыг хамтдаа загвар бүтээж, сэтгэл зүйрлүүдийг тэдний үгүүдэд тайлбарлаж байна. Сүүлийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хооронд Үүнээс гадна энэ загвар нь баримт болон загварын тодорхой сэдэв хуваарилалтын тулд сэдэв загварын тухай сайхан ялгааг авах боломжтой. Бид санал өгсөн загварын загвар нь адилхан ажлын төлөвлөгөөнд зориулагдсан өөр улс төрлийн LDA-ын суурь загваруудыг хамтдаа дүүргэдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бидний туршилтууд 6 өөр олон нийтэд ашиглаж байгаа өгөгдлийн сан дээр хийсэн. Бидний загварын үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit LDA-basert modell som lagar tematilsvarande segmentar i dokument ved å dele dokument saman og tilordna emne til ordene sine. Koherens mellom emne er sikker gjennom ein kopula, og binder emna som er assosiert med ord i eit segment. I tillegg er dette modellet avhengig på både dokument og segmentspesifikke emneformasjonar slik at du kan henta finne korne forskjeller i emneformasjonar. Vi viser at den foreslåde modellen naturleg omfattar andre LDA-baserte modeller for liknande oppgåver. Eksperimentane våre, som er gjennomført på seks ulike offentlig tilgjengelege datasett, viser effektiviteten av modellen vårt i uttrykk av kompleksitet, Normalisert målsettingsinformasjon, som får samsvar mellom dei genererte emnene, og mikro F1-målet for tekstklassifikasjon.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono model oparty na LDA, który generuje tematycznie spójne segmenty w dokumentach poprzez wspólne segmentowanie dokumentów i przypisywanie tematów do ich słów. Spójność między tematami zapewnia kopula, wiążąca tematy związane ze słowami segmentu. Ponadto model ten opiera się zarówno na dystrybucjach tematów określonych dla dokumentów, jak i segmentów, aby uchwycić drobne różnice w przypisaniach tematów. Pokazujemy, że proponowany model naturalnie obejmuje inne najnowocześniejsze modele oparte na LDA przeznaczone do podobnych zadań. Ponadto nasze eksperymenty, przeprowadzone na sześciu różnych publicznie dostępnych zbiorach danych, pokazują skuteczność naszego modelu pod względem zdezorientowania, normalizowanej punktowej wzajemnej informacji, która uwzględnia spójność pomiędzy generowanymi tematami, a miary Micro F1 do klasyfikacji tekstu.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un model bazat pe LDA care generează segmente coerente actual în cadrul documentelor prin segmentarea comună a documentelor și atribuirea subiectelor cuvintelor lor. Coerența dintre subiecte este asigurată printr-o copulă, care leagă subiectele asociate cuvintelor unui segment. În plus, acest model se bazează atât pe distribuțiile subiectelor specifice documentelor, cât și segmentelor, astfel încât să capteze diferențele cu granulație fină în atribuirile subiectelor. Noi arătăm că modelul propus cuprinde în mod natural alte modele LDA de ultimă oră concepute pentru sarcini similare. Mai mult decât atât, experimentele noastre, efectuate pe șase seturi de date diferite disponibile publicului, arată eficiența modelului nostru în termeni de perplexitate, Informația mutuală Normalizată Pointwise, care surprinde coerența dintre subiectele generate, și măsura Micro F1 pentru clasificarea textului.', 'si': 'Name ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර සම්බන්ධ විදිහට කොපුලා වලින් සුරක්ෂා කරනවා, කොපුලා වලින් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන් ඒ වගේම, මේ මොඩල් විශේෂ විශේෂ විතරය සහ විශේෂ විතරයෙන් විශේෂ විතරයෙන් විශේෂ විතරයෙන් විශේෂ ව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස්වභාවිතයෙන් අනිත් ස්ථානය LDA-අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපනය ඉතින්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය, වෙනස් සාමාජික විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් තොරතුරු සැකසුම් 6ක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපේ මොඩේලගේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතිකාරය, සාමාන්\u200dය වි', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa Tusaale ku saleysan LDA, kaas oo sameeya kooxo ku habboon dukumentiyada gudihiisa, si wadajir ah u kala qeybinaya dukumentiyada islamarkaasna u qeybinaya macluumaadkooda. Isku xiriirka mada waxaa lagu xaqiijiyaa koobalka, wuxuuna ku xidhaa mada la xiriira erayada qeybta. Sidoo kale modellkan wuxuu ku xiran yahay qaybaha ku saabsan dukumentiyada iyo qeybaha gaarka ah, si uu u qabsado kala duwanaanshaha saxda ah oo ku saabsan qaybaha mada. Waxan tusnaynaa in qaababka la soo jeeday dabiicadeed waxaa ku qoran qaabab kale oo lagu qoray qoraal kale oo ku saabsan qoraalka LDA-da. Furthermore, imtixaankayada oo lagu sameeyay lix koox oo kala duduwan oo lagu qoray macluumaadka qarsoodiga ah, wuxuu tusaa saameynta modellkayaga oo ku saabsan dhibaatada, macluumaadka qoyska ee qofka la simiyay, kaasoo qabsada wadajirka u dhexeeya maadooyinka la soo daayay iyo MikroF1 qiyaastiisa loo qorayo kalluumeysiga qoraalka.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model na temelju LDA-a koji stvara temeljno koherentne segmente unutar dokumenta zajedno segmentirajući dokumente i dodajeći teme njihovim rečima. Sastavnost između tema osigurava se kroz kopulu, povezujući teme povezane sa rečima segment a. Osim toga, ovaj model se oslanja na raspodjele posebnih tema i dokumenta i segmenta kako bi se uhvatila odlične razlike u temskim zadatkima. Pokazujemo da predloženi model prirodno obuhvaća druge modele na državi umjetnosti LDA-a koji su dizajnirani za slične zadatke. Osim toga, naši eksperimenti, koji su proveli na šest različitih javno dostupnih podataka, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u smislu kompleksnosti, Normalizirane zajedničke informacije o točkama, koja uključuje saskaņost između generiranih tema, i mjere mikro F1 za klasifikaciju teksta.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en LDA-baserad modell som genererar aktuella sammanhängande segment inom dokument genom att gemensamt segmentera dokument och tilldela ämnen till deras ord. Samstämmigheten mellan ämnena säkerställs genom en copula som binder ämnena förknippade med orden i ett segment. Dessutom bygger denna modell på både dokument- och segmentspecifika ämnesfördelningar för att fånga upp finkorniga skillnader i ämnestilldelningar. Vi visar att den föreslagna modellen naturligtvis omfattar andra toppmoderna LDA-baserade modeller utformade för liknande uppgifter. Dessutom visar våra experiment, utförda på sex olika offentligt tillgängliga datauppsättningar, hur effektiv vår modell är när det gäller förvirring, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, som fångar samstämmigheten mellan de genererade ämnena, och Micro F1-måttet för textklassificering.', 'ur': 'This paper presents an LDA-based model that generates topically coherent segments in documents jointly segmenting documents and assigning topics to their words. موضوع کے درمیان تعلق ایک کاپول کے ذریعہ مضبوط ہے، ایک قسمت کے کلمات سے متعلق ہوئے موضوع کو بند کر رہے ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، یہ موڈل دکھائی اور قسمت مخصوص موضوع تقسیم پر اعتماد کرتا ہے تاکہ موضوع تعلقات میں بہترین دانے اختلاف حاصل کریں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد مدل طبیعی طور پر دوسرے ایٹی الڈا بنیادی موڈل کے ساتھ ایک جیسے کام کے لئے طراحی کیا گیا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہماری آزمائش، چھ مختلف ظاہر کے موجود ڈاٹ سٹ پر چلتی تھی، ہمارے مدل کی مثبت کو مختلف طریقے سے دکھاتی تھی، نرمیلیز پوینٹ وائیز متحدہ معلومات کے مطابق، جسے پیدا کیا گیا موضوع کے درمیان اتصال کا پکڑتا ہے، اور میکروفو F1 متحدہ کو', 'ta': 'Name தலைப்புகளுக்கிடையே இடையேயுள்ள ஒரு நபுலாவின் மூலம் பாதுகாக்கப்படுகிறது, பிரிவின் வார்த்தைகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்ட கூடுதலாக, இந்த மாதிரி தொகுதி மற்றும் துண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்பு பங்கீட்டை இருவரும் மேலும் சார்ந்திருக்கும் ப நாம் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி இயற்கையாக மற்ற நிலையில்-கலை LDA-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மாதிரிகளை சூழ்ந்து கொள்க அதற்கும், எங்கள் சோதனைகள், ஆறு வேறு வித்தியாசமான பொது கிடைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது, சிக்கலாக்கத்தில் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது, சாதாரண புள', 'uz': "Bu hujjat hujjatlarni birlashtirish va mavzularni so'zlariga qoʻshish mumkin. Name In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distributions so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments.  Biz buni ko'rayapmiz, tadbirlik modeli o'xshash vazifalar uchun yaratilgan boshqa holatning asosida LDA asosiy modellarini yaratadi. Ko'rsatganda, bizning tajribalarimiz 6 turli barcha maʼlumotlar tarkibida ishga tushirilgan, murakkablik bilan modelmizning effektligini ko'rsatadi, oddiy narsalar bilan yaratilgan mavzular orasidagi birlashtirishni va matn darajalashtirish uchun Micro F1 metrlarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đưa ra một mô hình dựa trên LDAP, để tạo ra các phân khúc về nhiệt độ trong tài liệu bằng cách chia tài liệu và xếp các chủ đề vào từ của họ. Sự liên kết giữa các chủ đề được đảm bảo qua một bản trực thăng, liên kết các chủ đề liên quan tới các từ của một đoạn. Thêm vào đó, mẫu này phụ thuộc vào cả phân chia về chủ đề tài liệu và phần đặc trưng của đoạn để thu thập các khác biệt sắc màu về chủ đề. Chúng tôi cho thấy kiểu mẫu đề xuất bao gồm tất nhiên các mô hình kiểu kiểu kiểu LDAP được thiết kế cho các nhiệm vụ tương tự. Hơn nữa, các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi, được tiến hành trên sáu bộ dữ liệu công cộng khác nhau, cho thấy hiệu quả của mô hình của chúng tôi về tính chất phức tạp, Thông tin hai chiều nay được hoá hoá, nắm bắt sự gắn kết giữa các chủ đề đã tạo ra, và quy trình vi F1 cho phân loại văn bản.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een LDA-gebaseerd model dat actueel samenhangende segmenten binnen documenten genereert door documenten gezamenlijk te segmenteren en onderwerpen toe te wijzen aan hun woorden. De samenhang tussen onderwerpen wordt gewaarborgd door een copula, die de onderwerpen bindt die verbonden zijn aan de woorden van een segment. Bovendien is dit model afhankelijk van zowel document- als segmentspecifieke topic distributies om fijnkorrelige verschillen in topic toewijzingen vast te leggen. We laten zien dat het voorgestelde model natuurlijk ook andere state-of-the-art LDA-gebaseerde modellen omvat die zijn ontworpen voor soortgelijke taken. Bovendien tonen onze experimenten, uitgevoerd op zes verschillende publiek beschikbare datasets, de effectiviteit van ons model in termen van verwarring, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, dat de samenhang tussen de gegenereerde onderwerpen vastlegt, en de Micro F1 maat voor tekstclassificatie.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model na temelju LDA-a koji stvara temeljno saskaņote segmente unutar dokumenta zajedno segmentirajući dokumente i dodajeći teme svojim riječima. Sastavnost između tema osigurava se kroz kopula, povezujući teme povezane s riječima segment a. Osim toga, ovaj model se oslanja na raspodjele posebnih tema i dokumenta i segmenta kako bi se uhvatila odlične razlike u temskim zadatkima. Pokazujemo da predloženi model prirodno obuhvaća druge modele na zemlji umjetnosti LDA-a koji su dizajnirani za slične zadatke. Nadalje, naši eksperimenti, koji su proveli na šest različitih javno dostupnih podataka, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u smislu kompleksnosti, Normalizirane zajedničke informacije, koja uključuje usklađenost između proizvedenih tema i mjere mikro F1 za klasifikaciju teksta.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt ein LDA-basiertes Modell vor, das thematisch kohärente Segmente innerhalb von Dokumenten generiert, indem Dokumente gemeinsam segmentiert und Themen ihren Wörtern zugeordnet werden. Die Kohärenz zwischen den Themen wird durch eine Kopula sichergestellt, die die Themen bindet, die mit den Wörtern eines Segments verbunden sind. Darüber hinaus stützt sich dieses Modell sowohl auf dokument- als auch segmentspezifische Themenverteilungen, um feinkörnige Unterschiede in den Themenzuweisungen zu erfassen. Wir zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell natürlich auch andere hochmoderne LDA-basierte Modelle umfasst, die für ähnliche Aufgaben entwickelt wurden. Darüber hinaus zeigen unsere Experimente, die an sechs verschiedenen öffentlich zugänglichen Datensätzen durchgeführt wurden, die Wirksamkeit unseres Modells in Bezug auf Verwirrung, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, das die Kohärenz zwischen den generierten Themen erfasst, und das Micro F1 Maß für die Textklassifizierung.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model berdasarkan LDA yang menghasilkan segmen secara topik yang konsisten di dalam dokumen dengan menggabungkan segmen dokumen dan mengarahkan topik kepada kata-kata mereka. Koerensi antara topik dipastikan melalui kopula, mengikat topik yang terkait dengan kata-kata segmen. Selain itu, model ini bergantung pada kedua dokumen dan segmen distribusi topik spesifik sehingga untuk menangkap perbedaan yang baik dalam tugas topik. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan secara alami meliputi model terbaik lainnya berdasarkan LDA yang direncanakan untuk tugas yang sama. Selain itu, eksperimen kami, dilakukan pada enam set data yang tersedia publik yang berbeda, menunjukkan efektif model kami dalam terma kekacauan, Informasi Bersama-sama Normalisasi Pointwise, yang menangkap koherensi antara topik yang dihasilkan, dan ukuran Micro F1 untuk klasifikasi teks.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en LDA-baseret model, der genererer aktuelt sammenhængende segmenter inden for dokumenter ved i fællesskab at segmentere dokumenter og tildele emner til deres ord. Sammenhængen mellem emner sikres gennem en copula, der binder emnerne knyttet til ordene i et segment. Desuden er denne model afhængig af både dokument- og segmentspecifikke emnefordelinger for at fange finkornede forskelle i emneopdelinger. Vi viser, at den foreslåede model naturligvis omfatter andre state-of-the-art LDA-baserede modeller designet til lignende opgaver. Desuden viser vores eksperimenter, der er udført på seks forskellige offentligt tilgængelige datasæt, effektiviteten af vores model med hensyn til forvirring, Normaliseret Pointwise Mutual Information, som fanger sammenhængen mellem de genererede emner, og Micro F1 målingen for tekstklassifikation.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя модел, базиран на ДЛД, който генерира локално съгласувани сегменти в документите чрез съвместно сегментиране на документите и приписване на теми към думите им. Съгласуваността между темите се осигурява чрез копула, свързваща темите, свързани с думите на даден сегмент. В допълнение, този модел разчита както на специфично за документите, така и на сегментите разпределения на темата, за да улови фините разлики в заданията на темата. Показваме, че предложеният модел естествено обхваща и други съвременни модели, базирани на ЛД, предназначени за подобни задачи. Освен това нашите експерименти, проведени върху шест различни публично достъпни набора от данни, показват ефективността на нашия модел по отношение на объркването, Нормализираната взаимна информация по точката, която улавя съгласуваността между генерираните теми, и мярката за класификация на текста.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta muundo wa LDA ambao unatengeneza vipengele vya ushirikiano katika nyaraka kwa kutengeneza nyaraka pamoja na kuweka mada kwa maneno yao. Ushirikiano kati ya mada unahakikishwa kupitia makala, ukifungua mada zinazohusiana na maneno ya sehemu. Zaidi ya hayo, muundo huu unategemea katika nyaraka pamoja na sehemu maalum za mada ili kupata tofauti zilizotengenezwa vizuri katika kazi za mada. We show that the proposed model naturally encompasses other state-of-the-art LDA-based models designed for similar tasks.  Zaidi ya hayo, majaribio yetu, yaliyofanywa katika seti sita tofauti za taarifa zinazopatikana hadharani, zinaonyesha ufanisi wa muundo wetu kwa namna ya utata, taarifa za Usalama za Ujadala, ambazo zinachukua ushirikiano kati ya mada zilizotengenezwa, na hatua ya Micro F1 kwa ajili ya kutangaza maandishi.', 'ko': '본고는 LDA 기반의 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 문서를 연합하여 분할하고 주제를 그들의 단어에 분배함으로써 문서에 부분적으로 연결된 부분을 생성한다.주제 간의 일관성은 하나의 연결어를 통해 보장되는 것으로 연결어는 주제를 한 단락의 단어와 연결시킨다.또한 이 모델은 문서와 특정한 단락의 주제 분포에 의존하여 주제 분배 중의 세립도 차이를 포착할 수 있다.제시된 모델에는 유사한 임무를 위해 설계된 LDA 기반의 최첨단 모델이 포함되어 있음을 알 수 있습니다.그 밖에 우리가 6개의 서로 다른 공개 데이터 집합에서 실시한 실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 곤혹도, 표준화된 점차적인 상호 정보(포착 생성 주제 간의 일치성)와 텍스트 분류의 미시적 F1 도량에 효과적이다.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n LDA-gebaseerde model wat onderwerp koerende segmente binne-in dokumente genereer deur joint segmentering van dokumente en onderwerpe aan hul woorde toewys. Die koherens tussen onderwerpe is verseker deur 'n kopula, verbinding die onderwerpe wat geassosieer word aan die woorde van 'n segment. In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distribution so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments. Ons wys dat die voorgestelde model natuurlik ander staat-van-die-kuns-gebaseerde LDA-modele wat vir gelyke taak ontwerp het. Ons eksperimente, wat op ses verskillende openlik beskikbaar datastelle gedoen het, vertoon die effektiviteit van ons model in terms of perpleksie, Normaliseerde Pointwise Mutual Informasie, wat die koherensie tussen die genereerde onderwerpe kap en die Micro F1 maat vir teks klassifikasie.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل بنیاد LDA را نشان می\u200cدهد که بخش\u200cهای موضوع با هماهنگی در سند تولید می\u200cکند با بخش\u200cهای سند\u200cها و وضعیت\u200cهای موضوع به کلمات\u200cهایشان را به عنوان تهیه می\u200cکند. هماهنگی بین موضوع از طریق یک کاپول، موضوع\u200cهای مرتبط به کلمات یک قسمت تضمین می\u200cشود. در addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topics so that to capture fine grain differences in topics. ما نشان می دهیم که مدل پیشنهاد طبیعی بقیه مدل\u200cهای استفاده از هنر LDA را محیط می\u200cکند که برای کارهای مشابه طراحی شده است. علاوه بر این، آزمایشات ما، روی شش مجموعه داده های عمومی که در دسترسی دارند، موثرت مدل ما را به عنوان اطلاعات متفاوتی، معمولاً معمولاً معمولاً متفاوتی، که هماهنگی بین موضوع تولید شده، و اندازهٔ میکروF1 برای گروه متن، نشان می دهد.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një model bazuar në LDA që gjeneron segmente aktualisht koherente brenda dokumenteve duke segmentuar së bashku dokumentet dhe duke i caktuar temat fjalëve të tyre. Koerenca midis temave sigurohet nëpërmjet një kopule, duke i lidhur temat e lidhura me fjalët e një segmenti. Përveç kësaj, ky model mbështetet në shpërndarjet specifike të dokumenteve dhe të segmenteve në mënyrë që të kapë dallime të holla në caktimin e temave. Ne tregojmë se modeli i propozuar përfshin natyralisht modele të tjera me bazë në LDA më të lartë të dizajnuar për detyra të ngjashme. Përveç kësaj, eksperimentet tona, të kryera në gjashtë grupe të dhënash të ndryshme të disponueshme publikisht, tregojnë efektivitetin e modelit tonë në lidhje me perplexitetin, Informacionin Normalizuar me pikë të ndërsjelltë, i cili përfshin koherencën midis temave të gjeneruara dhe masa Micro F1 për klasifikimin e tekstit.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz LDA tabanly nusgasyny senediň içine meňzeşli segmentleri bejerip, sözlerine meňzeşleýän bir nusgasyny getirýär. Temalar arasyndaky ýerleşme kopulasy bilen guruldy, segmentiň sözleri bilen baglanýar. Bu nusga hem desktap we segment beýleki meýdançalaryň üýtgeşmelerini gözlemek üçin bu nusga hem mesele paýlamagyna güýçli. Biz teklip eden nusganyň nusganyň, dogruda LDA-da ýakyn görevler üçin düzenlenen başga nusgalary daşarylýar. Munuň üçin, biziň deneylerimiz, alty dürli publika meňzeş veri setirlerinde proverilýär, nusgamyzyň çykyşlygyna görýän çykyşlygyna görýänligini, Iňlemeli Puntual we Mutal Maglumatyň arasynda hereket edendigini görkez.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ሰነዱን በመጠቀም እና ለቃሎቻቸው አካባቢ እና አካባቢዎችን በመጠቀም የሚሠራ የLDA መሠረት ሞዴል ያቀርባል፡፡ The coherence between topics is ensured through a copula, binding the topics associated to the words of a segment.  በተጨማሪም፣ ይህ ሞዴል በሁለቱም ሰነድ እና በጉዳዩ የተለየ ጉዳይ ክፍተቶችን በመያዝ ይታያል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በተለየ አካባቢነት ለሥርዓት የተደረገውን ሌሎችን የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ. በተጨማሪም፣ በተለየ ስድስት መልዕክት በተለየ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ላይ የተደረገውን ፈተናዎች፣ የሞዴላያችንን ጥያቄ በተጨማሪነት፣ የኖርማዊ ነጥብ የውይይት መረጃዎችን እና የጽሑፍ ክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን ሚክሮ F1 መስኮት ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մի ԼԴԱ-ի հիմնված մոդել, որը ստեղծում է փաստաթղթերի մեջ թեմատիկապես համապատասխան սեգմերներ՝ միասին սեգմերնելով փաստաթղթերը և նյութերը բառերի վրա վերագրելով: Տարբերակների միջև կապվածությունը վստահվում է կոպուլայի միջոցով, կապելով թեմաները, որոնք կապված են սեգմետի բառերի հետ: In addition, this model relies on both document and segment specific topic distributions so as to capture fine grained differences in topic assignments.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նախագծված մոդելը բնականաբար ներառում է այլ ամենահետաքրքիր ԼԴԱ-ի հիմնված մոդելներ, որոնք նախագծված են նման խնդիրների համար: Ավելին, մեր փորձարկումները, կատարված վեց տարբեր հանրային հասանելի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը խառնաշփոթի տեսանկյունից, Նորմալիզացված Միացյալ Միացյալ Տեղեկատվության տեսանկյունից, որը ներառում է ստեղծված թեմաների և տեքստի', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model na temelju LDA-a koji stvara temeljno saskašne segmente unutar dokumenta zajedno segmentirajući dokumente i dodajeći teme svojim riječima. Sastavnost između tema osigurava se kroz kopulu, povezujući teme povezane s riječima segment a. Osim toga, ovaj model se oslanja na raspodjele posebnih tema i dokumenta i segmenta kako bi se uhvatila odlične razlike u temskim zadatkima. Pokazujemo da predloženi model prirodno obuhvaća druge modele na zemlji umjetnosti LDA-a dizajnirane za slične zadatke. Nadalje, naši eksperimenti, koji su proveli na šest različitih javno dostupnih podataka, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u smislu kompleksnosti, Normalizirane zajedničke informacije o točkama, koja uključuje saskaņost između proizvođenih tema i mjere mikro F1 za klasifikaciju teksta.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt LDA tabanlı modeli göstərir ki, belələrin içində məsələləri birlikdə segment edib, sözlərinə məsələlər təyin edir. Mevzuların arasındakı müzakirə bir copula vasitəsilə təmin edilir, segment sözlərinə bağlı məsələləri bağlayır. Bu modellər də məsələlər təyin etdikləri məsələlərdə gözəl dənələr fərqlənməsi üçün məsələlər və segmentlər müəyyən məsələlər dağılmasına təvəkkül edir. Biz göstəririk ki, təbliğ edilmiş modellərin bənzər işlər üçün müəyyən edilmiş başqa LDA-ya dayanan modelləri təbii edir. Daha sonra, bizim təcrübələrimiz altı müxtəlif halda faydalanır verilən verilən qurbanlarda işlədilər, modelimizin müxtəlif, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information vasitəsilə, yaratdığı məsələlər arasındakı müəyyənləşdirilməsini və Micro F1 məsələsinin metin klasifikasiyasının ölçüsünü göstərirlər.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje model založený na LDA, který generuje aktuálně koherentní segmenty v dokumentech společným segmentováním dokumentů a přiřazováním témat k jejich slovům. Soudržnost mezi tématy je zajištěna prostřednictvím kopuly, která váže témata spojená se slovy segmentu. Kromě toho se tento model spoléhá na distribuce specifických témat dokumentů i segmentů, aby zachytil jemně zrnité rozdíly v přiřazení témat. Ukazujeme, že navržený model přirozeně zahrnuje další nejmodernější modely založené na LDA určené pro podobné úkoly. Dále naše experimenty, provedené na šesti veřejně dostupných datových sadách, ukazují efektivitu našeho modelu z hlediska zmatenosti, normalizovaných bodových vzájemných informací, které zachycují soudržnost mezi generovanými tématy, a měřítka Micro F1 pro klasifikaci textů.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি একটি এলডিএ ভিত্তিক মডেল উপস্থাপন করে যা ডকুমেন্ট বিভক্ত করে তৈরি করে এবং তাদের কথায় বিষয়বস্তু তৈরি করে। বিষয়গুলোর মধ্যে যুক্তি নিশ্চিত করা হচ্ছে কপুলার মাধ্যমে এবং একটি বিভাগের শব্দের সাথে যুক্ত বিষয়গুলোকে বাধ্য এছাড়াও, এই মডেলের উপর নির্ভর করে নথি এবং বিশেষ বিষয়বস্তু বিতরণের উপর, যাতে বিষয়বস্তুর দায়িত্বে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল স্বাভাবিকভাবে অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-আর্ট-আর্ট এলডিএ-ভিত্তিক মডেলের মধ্যে রয়ে এছাড়াও, আমাদের পরীক্ষা ছয়টি ভিন্ন প্রকাশ্য প্রকাশিত তথ্যের উপর প্রকাশিত হয়েছে, আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম দেখানো হয়েছে বিভ্রান্তিতে, স্বাভাবিক পয়েন্টওয়াই মিউটুয়াল তথ', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse LDA-põhine mudel, mis genereerib dokumentides aktuaalselt sidusaid segmente, segmenteerides dokumente ühiselt ja määrates teemad nende sõnadele. Teemade sidusus tagatakse kopula kaudu, sidudes teemad segmendi sõnadega. Lisaks tugineb see mudel nii dokumendi- kui ka segmendipõhistele teemajaotustele, et jäädvustada teemajaotuste peened erinevused. Näitame, et kavandatud mudel hõlmab loomulikult teisi kaasaegseid LDA-põhiseid mudeleid, mis on loodud sarnaste ülesannete jaoks. Lisaks näitavad meie kuuel erineval avalikult kättesaadaval andmekogumil läbi viidud eksperimendid meie mudeli tõhusust seoses segadusega, normaliseeritud punktviisi vastastikuse informatsiooniga, mis kajastab genereeritud teemade sidusust, ja mikro F1 meedet teksti klassifitseerimiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään LDA-pohjainen malli, joka luo dokumentteihin ajankohtaisesti johdonmukaisia segmenttejä segmentoimalla dokumentteja yhdessä ja kohdistamalla aiheita niiden sanoihin. Aiheiden välinen johdonmukaisuus varmistetaan kopulan avulla, joka sitoo segmentin sanoihin liittyvät aiheet. Lisäksi tämä malli perustuu sekä dokumentti- että segmenttikohtaisiin aihejakaumiin, jotta aihemääritysten hienojakoiset erot saadaan talteen. Osoitamme, että ehdotettu malli sisältää luonnollisesti muita huippuluokan LDA-pohjaisia malleja, jotka on suunniteltu samankaltaisiin tehtäviin. Lisäksi kuudella eri julkisesti saatavilla olevalla aineistolla toteutetut kokeemme osoittavat mallimme tehokkuuden hämmennyksen, Normalized Pointwise Mutual Information, joka vangitsee luotujen aiheiden välisen johdonmukaisuuden, ja Micro F1 -menetelmän tekstiluokittelussa.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta un model basat en LDA que genera segments tòpicament coherents dins els documents segmentant conjuntament els documents i asignant temes a les seves paraules. La coherencia entre els temes s'assegura a través d'una còpula, vinculant els temes associats a les paraules d'un segment. A més, aquest model es basa tant en distribucions documentals com en segments específics de tema per capturar les diferències fines en les asignacions temàtiques. Mostrem que el model proposat inclou naturalment altres models més moderns basats en LDA dissenyats per tasques similars. A més, els nostres experiments, fets en sis conjunts de dades públicament disponibles, mostren l'eficacia del nostre model en termes de perplexitat, Informació Mutual Normalitzada Puntual, que captura la coherencia entre els temes generats i la mesura Micro F1 per la classificació de textos.", 'jv': 'Perintah sing nambah akeh modèl sing basa LPA dumateng kuwi nggawe gerakan karo Dokumen sing dumateng lan nganggep perintah sing nganggep nggawe balêr. Mampak politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh model sing nggawe aturan biasane sak duluran-sistem lan dianggawe barang-sistem sing dibenakno kanggo didasakno Label', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen model, ki temelji na LDA-ju, ki ustvarja tematsko skladne segmente znotraj dokumentov s skupnim segmentacijo dokumentov in dodeljevanjem teme njihovim besedam. Skladnost med temi je zagotovljena s kopulo, ki povezuje teme, povezane z besedami segmenta. Poleg tega se ta model opira na distribucije teme, specifične za dokument in segment, da zajame drobnozrnate razlike v dodelitvah teme. Pokazali smo, da predlagani model seveda zajema druge najsodobnejše modele, ki temeljijo na LDA, zasnovane za podobne naloge. Poleg tega naši eksperimenti, izvedeni na šestih različnih javno dostopnih naborih podatkov, kažejo učinkovitost našega modela v smislu zmedenosti, normaliziranih točkovnih medsebojnih informacij, ki zajema skladnost med ustvarjenimi temami, in ukrepa Micro F1 za klasifikacijo besedila.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na bãyar da wata salon LDA wanda ke samar da rabon sunayen da suka yi amfani da shi cikin takardun dukka kuma ya raba wasu takardar da kuma ya raba masu zuwa maganar su. An tabbatar da kopiya tsakanin maɓalli a yi amfani da wani kofi, yana ɗau maɓallin da aka haɗa da maganar wani rabo. Da wannan misalin ya dõgara a kan duk takardar da rabõ masu ƙayyadadde madaidaici, dõmin ya kãma rarrabai masu farin ciki masu cikin aikin madaidaici. Tuna nũna cewa misalin da aka buƙata ana ƙunsa da wasu misãlai na-halin-mai-sanar LDA wanda aka designe wa misalin aiki kamar haka. Furan haka, jarrabõyinmu, wanda aka yi tafiyar a kan sitan takardar da aka ƙayyade bayani na bayani, za ka nuna aikin motel masu cikin masu husũma, masu motsi na Nazara Ponthaifi Mutum, wanda ke riƙon haɗi tsakanin maɓallin da aka ƙãga, kuma Micro F1 kafin wa classified matsayi.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה מודל מבוסס על LDA שיוצר חלקים עוקבים באופן נושאי בתוך מסמכים על ידי מחלק משותף מסמכים ומסור נושאים למיליהם. The coherence between topics is ensured through a copula, binding the topics associated to the words of a segment.  בנוסף, המודל הזה סומך על פיצוי נושאים מסויימים גם על מסמכים וגזרים כדי לתפוס הבדלים עצומים במשימות נושאים. אנו מראים שהמודל המוצע מכיל באופן טבעי מודלים אחרים המבוססים על LDA מוקדמים. בנוסף, הניסויים שלנו, שעשויים על שש קבוצות נתונים שונות שזמינות לציבור, מראים את היעילות של המודל שלנו במונחים של התבלבות, מידע משותף נורמלי הנקודה, שמתפס את הקיונציה בין הנושאים המיוצרים, למידד מיקרו F1 לטקסט מסווג.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེ གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཚོ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། ད་དུས་ཀྱང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གྲངས་ཁྱད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་བརྗོད་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་ལ་ནི་རང་བཞིན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཞན་ཡང་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པར་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཚན་གཉིས་ལས་བྲིས་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Search-based Neural Structured Learning for Sequential Question Answering', 'ar': 'التعلم الهيكلي العصبي القائم على البحث للإجابة المتسلسلة للأسئلة', 'fr': 'Apprentissage structuré neuronal basé sur la recherche pour la réponse séquentielle aux questions', 'es': 'Aprendizaje estructurado neuronal basado en búsquedas para respuestas secuenciales a preguntas', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Estruturado Neural Baseado em Pesquisa para Resposta Sequencial a Perguntas', 'ja': '連続質問回答のための検索ベースの神経構造学習', 'zh': '基于搜索之神经结构化学,施于次第问答', 'ru': 'Нейронное структурированное обучение на основе поиска для ответа на последовательные вопросы', 'hi': 'अनुक्रमिक प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए खोज-आधारित तंत्रिका संरचित सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Struchtúrtha Néar-Bhunaithe le haghaidh Freagairt Cheisteanna Seicheamhacha', 'el': 'Νευρική Δομημένη Μάθηση με βάση την Αναζήτηση για διαδοχική Απάντηση Ερωτήσεων', 'ka': 'შემდეგ კითხვების გასაგებისთვის ნეიროლური სტრუქტურაცია', 'hu': 'Keresőalapú neurális strukturált tanulás szekvenciális kérdések megválaszolásához', 'it': 'Apprendimento strutturato neurale basato sulla ricerca per la risposta alle domande sequenziali', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру үшін іздеу негіздеген нейралық құрылған оқыту', 'mk': 'Неурално структурирано учење за одговори на секвенцијалните прашања базирано на пребарување', 'lt': 'Paieškoje pagrįstas neurologinis struktūrinis mokymasis atsakant į eilinius klausimus', 'ms': 'Pempelajaran Struktur Neural berdasarkan Carian untuk Jawapan soalan Sekuensional', 'ml': 'സെക്കനിയൽ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള തെരച്ചിലുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d സ്ട്രാക്ടിക്കുള്', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Strutturat Newrali bbażat fuq it-Tfittxija għal Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Sekwenzjali', 'mn': 'Дараагийн асуултуудын хариултын тулд хайж суралцах мэдрэлийн бүтэц суралцах', 'no': 'Søk-basert neuralstrukturert læring for sekvensisk spørsmål', 'pl': 'Nauka neuronowa oparta na wyszukiwaniu dla sekwencyjnego odpowiadania na pytania', 'ro': 'Învățare structurată neurală bazată pe căutare pentru răspunsul la întrebări secvențiale', 'sr': 'Naučenje Neuralne strukture na potrazi za odgovorom na sekvencijalno pitanje', 'si': 'පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සඳහා හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය සංස්ථාපනය', 'so': 'Search-based Neural Structured Learning for Sequential Question Answering', 'ta': 'பின்வரும் கேள்வி பதில்', 'ur': 'سفارشی سؤال جواب کے لئے جہاد کی بنیادی نیورال ساختاری تعلیم', 'sv': 'Sökbaserat neuralt strukturerat lärande för sekventiella frågeställningar', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm về Trả lời câu hỏi lặp đi lặp lại', 'bg': 'Базирано на търсене невронно структурирано обучение за последователно отговаряне на въпроси', 'hr': 'Neuralno strukturno učenje na temelju pretraživanja za odgovor na sljedeće pitanje', 'da': 'Søgebaseret neural struktureret læring til sekventielle spørgsmål besvarelse', 'nl': 'Zoekgebaseerd neurologisch gestructureerd leren voor het beantwoorden van opeenvolgende vragen', 'id': 'Pempelajaran Struktur Neural Berdasarkan Pencarian untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Sekuensional', 'de': 'Suchbasiertes neuronales strukturiertes Lernen für die sequentielle Beantwortung von Fragen', 'ko': '검색 순서에 기초한 문답 신경 구조 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری ساخته\u200cشده\u200cی عصبی بر اساس جستجو برای پاسخ سوال\u200cهای بعدی', 'tr': 'Arama yzyndaky soragy jogap üçin nural strukturly öwrenmek', 'af': 'Soek- gebaseerde neurale struktureerde leer vir volgende vraag antwoord', 'sq': 'Mësimi i strukturuar neuronal i bazuar në kërkim për përgjigjet e pyetjeve sekuencore', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sw': 'Ufundisho wa Msingi wa Taifa kwa ajili ya Swali la Baadae', 'hy': 'Հետազոտության հիմնված նյարդային կառուցվածքային ուսումնասիրությունը հաջորդական հարցերի պատասխանների համար', 'bn': 'সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য অনুসন্ধানে ভিত্তিক নিউরেল কাঠামো শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Naučenje na osnovu pretraživanja Neuralne strukture za odgovor na sekvencijalno pitanje', 'ca': 'Aprendiment neuroestructurat basat en la recerca per respondre a preguntes secuencials', 'az': 'Sənbəci sual cavab vermək üçün nöral Qurğulu Öyrənmək', 'fi': 'Hakupohjainen hermorakenteinen oppiminen peräkkäisiin kysymyksiin vastaamiseen', 'cs': 'Vyhledávání založené na neuronovém strukturovaném učení pro sekvenční zodpovězení otázek', 'et': 'Otsingupõhine neurostruktureeritud õpe järjestikuste küsimustele vastamiseks', 'jv': 'Ndukuri gambar-sistem Neral Sampeyan kanggo ngerasar seneng pisan', 'he': 'למידה נוירולית מבוססת על חיפוש לענות על שאלות רציניות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Živčno strukturirano učenje na podlagi iskanja za zaporedno odgovarjanje na vprašanja', 'bo': 'རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་ལ་འཚོལ'}
{'en': 'Recent work in semantic parsing for question answering has focused on long and complicated questions, many of which would seem unnatural if asked in a normal conversation between two humans. In an effort to explore a conversational QA setting, we present a more realistic task : answering sequences of simple but inter-related questions. We collect a dataset of 6,066 question sequences that inquire about semi-structured tables from Wikipedia, with 17,553 question-answer pairs in total. To solve this sequential question answering task, we propose a novel dynamic neural semantic parsing framework trained using a weakly supervised reward-guided search. Our model effectively leverages the sequential context to outperform state-of-the-art QA systems that are designed to answer highly complex questions.', 'ar': 'ركز العمل الأخير في التحليل الدلالي للإجابة على الأسئلة على أسئلة طويلة ومعقدة ، قد يبدو الكثير منها غير طبيعي إذا طُرح في محادثة عادية بين شخصين. في محاولة لاستكشاف إعدادات ضمان الجودة للمحادثة ، نقدم مهمة أكثر واقعية: الإجابة على تسلسل أسئلة بسيطة ولكنها مترابطة. نقوم بتجميع مجموعة بيانات مكونة من 6066 سلسلة من الأسئلة التي تستفسر عن الجداول شبه المنظمة من ويكيبيديا ، بإجمالي 17553 زوجًا من الأسئلة والأجوبة. لحل مهمة الإجابة على السؤال المتسلسل ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا للتحليل الدلالي العصبي الديناميكي تم تدريبه باستخدام بحث ضعيف يخضع لإشراف موجه بالمكافأة. يستفيد نموذجنا بشكل فعال من السياق المتسلسل ليتفوق على أحدث أنظمة ضمان الجودة المصممة للإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة للغاية.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes em análise semântica para resposta a perguntas se concentraram em perguntas longas e complicadas, muitas das quais pareceriam não naturais se fossem feitas em uma conversa normal entre dois humanos. Em um esforço para explorar uma configuração de QA conversacional, apresentamos uma tarefa mais realista: responder a sequências de perguntas simples, mas inter-relacionadas. Coletamos um conjunto de dados de 6.066 sequências de perguntas que indagam sobre tabelas semiestruturadas da Wikipedia, com 17.553 pares de perguntas e respostas no total. Para resolver essa tarefa de resposta a perguntas sequenciais, propomos uma nova estrutura de análise semântica neural dinâmica treinada usando uma pesquisa guiada por recompensas fracamente supervisionada. Nosso modelo aproveita efetivamente o contexto sequencial para superar os sistemas de controle de qualidade de última geração projetados para responder a perguntas altamente complexas.', 'es': 'El trabajo reciente en el análisis semántico para la respuesta a preguntas se ha centrado en preguntas largas y complicadas, muchas de las cuales parecerían antinaturales si se formularan en una conversación normal entre dos humanos. En un esfuerzo por explorar un entorno de control de calidad conversacional, presentamos una tarea más realista: responder secuencias de preguntas simples pero interrelacionadas. Recopilamos un conjunto de datos de 6.066 secuencias de preguntas que consultan sobre tablas semiestructuradas de Wikipedia, con 17.553 pares de preguntas y respuestas en total. Para resolver esta tarea de respuesta secuencial a preguntas, proponemos un nuevo marco de análisis semántico neuronal dinámico entrenado mediante una búsqueda guiada por recompensas débilmente supervisada. Nuestro modelo aprovecha eficazmente el contexto secuencial para superar a los sistemas de control de calidad de última generación que están diseñados para responder a preguntas muy complejas.', 'fr': "Des travaux récents sur l'analyse sémantique pour répondre aux questions se sont concentrés sur des questions longues et compliquées, dont beaucoup ne sembleraient pas naturelles si elles étaient posées dans le cadre d'une conversation normale entre deux humains. Dans le but d'explorer un environnement d'assurance qualité conversationnel, nous présentons une tâche plus réaliste\xa0: répondre à des séquences de questions simples mais interdépendantes. Nous collectons un ensemble de données de 6 066 séquences de questions qui se renseignent sur les tableaux semi-structurés de Wikipédia, avec 17 553 paires question-réponse au total. Pour résoudre cette tâche de réponse séquentielle aux questions, nous proposons un nouveau cadre d'analyse sémantique neuronale dynamique formé à l'aide d'une recherche guidée par récompense faiblement supervisée. Notre modèle exploite efficacement le contexte séquentiel pour surpasser les systèmes d'assurance qualité de pointe conçus pour répondre à des questions très complexes.", 'ja': '質問に答えるためのセマンティック構文解析の最近の研究は、長く複雑な質問に焦点を当てており、その多くは、2人の人間の間の通常の会話で尋ねられた場合に不自然に見える。会話的なQA設定を探求するために、私たちはより現実的なタスクを提示します。簡単だが相互に関連する一連の質問に答えます。私たちは、ウィキペディアから半構造化テーブルについて問い合わせる6,066の質問シーケンスのデータセットを収集し、合計で17,553の質問回答ペアを持っています。この逐次的な質問に答えるタスクを解決するために、弱く監視された報酬誘導型検索を使用してトレーニングされた新規の動的神経意味解析フレームワークを提案します。当社のモデルは、シーケンシャルコンテキストを効果的に活用して、非常に複雑な質問に答えるように設計された最先端のQAシステムを凌駕します。', 'zh': '近问答语义解析之事,集于冗长之间,若两人之间,正对之间,多似不自然。 求对话式 QA 置,举更事:对以简而相关。 臣等集6,066数集,询自维基百科半结构化表格,凡有17,553问对。 为此次第问答,发一用弱督奖导搜索新型动神经语义解析框架。 吾模有效于序上下文,以越旨答高复之最先进者QA统。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में हाल के काम ने लंबे और जटिल प्रश्नों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है, जिनमें से कई दो मनुष्यों के बीच सामान्य बातचीत में पूछे जाने पर अप्राकृतिक प्रतीत होंगे। एक संवादी क्यूए सेटिंग का पता लगाने के प्रयास में, हम एक अधिक यथार्थवादी कार्य प्रस्तुत करते हैं: सरल लेकिन अंतर-संबंधित प्रश्नों के अनुक्रमों का उत्तर देना। हम 6,066 प्रश्न अनुक्रमों का एक डेटासेट एकत्र करते हैं जो विकिपीडिया से अर्ध-संरचित तालिकाओं के बारे में पूछताछ करते हैं, जिसमें कुल 17,553 प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े होते हैं। इस अनुक्रमिक प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले कार्य को हल करने के लिए, हम एक कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित इनाम-निर्देशित खोज का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित एक उपन्यास गतिशील तंत्रिका शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल प्रभावी रूप से अनुक्रमिक संदर्भ का लाभ उठाने के लिए अत्याधुनिक क्यूए सिस्टम को मात देने के लिए उठाता है जो अत्यधिक जटिल सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавняя работа в семантическом разборе ответов на вопросы была сосредоточена на длинных и сложных вопросах, многие из которых казались бы неестественными, если бы их задавали в обычном разговоре между двумя людьми. Стремясь исследовать разговорную обстановку QA, мы представляем более реалистичную задачу: ответить на последовательности простых, но взаимосвязанных вопросов. Мы собираем набор данных из 6066 последовательностей вопросов, которые запрашивают полуструктурированные таблицы из Википедии, в общей сложности 17 553 пары вопросов-ответов. Чтобы решить эту последовательную задачу ответа на вопрос, мы предлагаем новую структуру динамического нейронного семантического анализа, обученную с использованием слабо контролируемого поиска с вознаграждением. Наша модель эффективно использует последовательный контекст, чтобы превзойти современные системы обеспечения качества, которые предназначены для ответов на очень сложные вопросы.', 'ga': 'Dhírigh obair le déanaí sa pharsáil shéimeantach le haghaidh freagraí ceisteanna ar cheisteanna fada casta, agus bheadh cuma mhínádúrtha ar go leor acu dá gcuirfí iad i ngnáthchomhrá idir beirt. Mar iarracht ar shuíomh QA comhrá a iniúchadh, cuirimid tasc níos réadúla i láthair: seichimh de cheisteanna simplí ach idirghaolmhara a fhreagairt. Bailímid tacar sonraí de 6,066 seicheamh ceisteanna a fhiosraíonn táblaí leath-struchtúrtha ó Vicipéid, le 17,553 péirí ceist-freagra san iomlán. Chun an tasc freagartha ceisteanna seicheamhach seo a réiteach, molaimid creat nua parsála shéimeantach néar-dhinimiciúil núíosach oilte ag baint úsáide as cuardach treoraithe luach saothair lag-mhaoirsithe. Déanann ár múnla giaráil éifeachtach ar an gcomhthéacs seicheamhach chun feidhmiú níos fearr ná córais QA den scoth atá deartha chun ceisteanna an-chasta a fhreagairt.', 'hu': 'A kérdések megválaszolásához szükséges szemantikai elemzéssel kapcsolatos közelmúltbeli munkák hosszú és bonyolult kérdésekre összpontosítottak, amelyek közül sok természetellenesnek tűnhet, ha két ember közötti normál beszélgetésben kérdezik. A beszélgetési minőségbiztosítási beállítás feltárására irányuló erőfeszítések során egy reálisabb feladatot mutatunk be: egyszerű, de összefüggő kérdések sorozatainak megválaszolása. 6 066 kérdéssorozatból álló adatkészletet gyűjtünk, amelyek félstrukturált táblákról érdeklődnek a Wikipédiából, összesen 17 553 kérdés-válasz párból. Ennek a szekvenciális kérdésválasztási feladatnak a megoldásához egy új dinamikus neurális szemantikai elemzési keretrendszert javasolunk, amelyet gyengén felügyelt jutalom-vezérelt kereséssel készítettünk. Modellünk hatékonyan kihasználja a szekvenciális kontextust, hogy felülmúljon a legkorszerűbb minőségbiztosítási rendszereken, amelyeket rendkívül összetett kérdések megválaszolására terveztek.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες στη σημασιολογική ανάλυση για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε μακροχρόνιες και περίπλοκες ερωτήσεις, πολλές από τις οποίες θα φαίνονται αφύσικες αν ρωτηθούν σε μια κανονική συζήτηση μεταξύ δύο ανθρώπων. Σε μια προσπάθεια να εξερευνήσουμε ένα περιβάλλον συζήτησης, παρουσιάζουμε ένα πιο ρεαλιστικό έργο: την απάντηση σε ακολουθίες απλών αλλά αλληλοσχετιζόμενων ερωτήσεων. Συλλέγουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων από ακολουθίες ερωτήσεων 6,066 που ερευνούν για ημιδομημένους πίνακες από τη Βικιπαίδεια, με 17,553 ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων συνολικά. Για την επίλυση αυτού του διαδοχικού ερωτήματος, προτείνουμε ένα νέο δυναμικό νευρωνικό σημασιολογικό πλαίσιο ανάλυσης εκπαιδευμένο χρησιμοποιώντας μια ανεπαρκώς εποπτευόμενη αναζήτηση επιβράβευσης. Το μοντέλο μας αξιοποιεί αποτελεσματικά το διαδοχικό πλαίσιο για να ξεπεράσει τα σύγχρονα συστήματα QS που έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να απαντούν σε εξαιρετικά σύνθετες ερωτήσεις.', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ სემონტიკური პარაზიციაში კითხვების პასუხისთვის კონუქტირებული კითხვებისთვის კონუქტირებულია, რამდენიმე მათგანი იქნება არატური, თუ ორი ადამიანების შორ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კონტაქციო QA კონტაქციის შესახებ, უფრო რეალური დავალება: უფრო მხოლოდ მაგრამ შესახებ კითხვების შესახებ. 6.066 კითხვის შეცდომების მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც ვიკიპედიადან ნახევასტრუქტურებული ტაბლოების შესახებ, 17.553 კითხვის გასაგების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურ ამ შემდეგ კითხვების გასაღებისთვის, ჩვენ პრომენტიკური დინამიკური ნეიროლური სმენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტი ჩვენი მოდელი ეფექტიურად გამოიყენება სკენტექტის კონტექსტის გავაკეთება QA სისტემაში, რომლებიც განაზღვრებულიან ძალიან კომპლექტიური კითხვების გასაგებ', 'it': "Il recente lavoro di analisi semantica per rispondere alle domande si è concentrato su domande lunghe e complicate, molte delle quali sembrerebbero innaturali se poste in una normale conversazione tra due esseri umani. Nel tentativo di esplorare un ambiente di QA conversazionale, presentiamo un compito più realistico: rispondere a sequenze di domande semplici ma interconnesse. Raccogliamo un dataset di 6.066 sequenze di domande che chiedono informazioni su tabelle semi-strutturate da Wikipedia, con 17.553 coppie domande-risposta in totale. Per risolvere questo compito sequenziale di risposta alle domande, proponiamo un nuovo framework di analisi semantica neurale dinamico addestrato utilizzando una ricerca guidata dai premi debolmente supervisionata. Il nostro modello sfrutta efficacemente il contesto sequenziale per superare i sistemi QA all'avanguardia progettati per rispondere a domande altamente complesse.", 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktas semantinis tyrimas atsakyti į klausimus daugiausia dėmesio skyrė ilgiems ir sudėtingiems klausimams, daugeliui jų atrodytų neįprastai, jei jie būtų pakviesti įprastai kalbant tarp dviejų žmonių. Siekdami išnagrinėti pokalbio QA nustatymą, mes pristatome realistiškesnę užduotį: atsakyti į paprastų, bet tarpusavyje susijusių klausimų sekas. Mes renkame 6 066 klausimų sekų duomenų rinkinį, kuris klausia apie pusstruktūrines stalas iš Vikipedijos, iš viso 17 553 klausimų atsakymų poros. Siekdami išspręsti šią eilinę užduotį atsakant į klausimus, siūlome naują dinaminę semantinę neurologinį analizavimo sistemą, parengtą naudojant silpnai prižiūrimą atlyginimų orientuotą paiešką. Mūsų modelis veiksmingai sutelkia nuoseklią padėtį, kad būtų galima geriau įgyvendinti naujausias QA sistemas, skirtas atsakyti į labai sudėtingus klausimus.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната работа во семантичното анализирање на одговорите на прашања се фокусираше на долги и комплицирани прашања, од кои многумина би изгледале неприродни ако се поставуваат во нормален разговор помеѓу двајца луѓе. Во обид да истражуваме конвертационално поставување на QA, претставуваме пореална задача: одговори на секвенции на едноставни, но меѓусебно поврзани прашања. Собираме податоци од 6.066 секвенции на прашања кои прашуваат за поластруктурирани маси од Википедија, со вкупно 17.553 парови одговори на прашања. За да ја решиме оваа секвенцијална задача за одговор на прашања, предложуваме нова динамична семантична рамка за анализирање на нервите, обучена со слабо надгледувано пребарување врз награда. Нашиот модел ефикасно го искористува секвенцијалниот контекст за да ги надмине најсовремените системи на QA кои се дизајнирани за одговор на многу комплексни прашања.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы сұрақ жауап беру үшін семантикалық талдау жұмысының көпшілігі ұзын және кәдімгі сұрақтарына назар ауыстырылады. Егер екі адамдар арасында кәдімгі сұрақта QA параметрлерін зерттеу үшін кәсіпке көмектесетін тапсырманы таңдаймыз: қарапайым, бірақ қарапайым сұрақтар ретінде жауап береміз. Біз Википедиядан жарты құрылған кестелер туралы сұрақтайтын 6 066 сұрақ ретіндегі деректер жиынын жинақтаймыз. Бұл жалпы 17 553 сұрақ жауап жиындары бар. Бұл кейінгі сұрақ жауап беру тапсырманы шешу үшін, біз романдық динамикалық невралдық семантикалық талдау фрейміні бақылап, бақылап тұрған сұрақтар бағытталған іздеу қолданылады. Біздің моделіміз көп комплекс сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін құрылған QA жүйелерінің күйінің күйіне шығару үшін кейінгі контексті әсер етеді.', 'ms': 'Kerja baru-baru ini dalam penghuraian semantik untuk menjawab soalan telah fokus pada soalan panjang dan rumit, kebanyakan yang akan kelihatan tidak alami jika ditanya dalam perbualan normal antara dua manusia. Dalam usaha untuk mengeksplorasi tetapan QA perbualan, kami memperkenalkan tugas yang lebih realistik: menjawab urutan soalan sederhana tetapi berhubungan antara satu sama lain. Kami mengumpulkan set data 6,066 jujukan soalan yang bertanya tentang jadual setengah struktur dari Wikipedia, dengan 17,553 pasangan jawapan soalan. Untuk menyelesaikan tugas jawapan soalan berturut-turut ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian penghuraian semantik saraf dinamik yang baru dilatih menggunakan pencarian yang dipandu hadiah yang lemah. Model kita secara efektif menggunakan konteks sekuensi untuk melampaui sistem QA yang paling teratas yang direka untuk menjawab soalan yang sangat kompleks.', 'mt': 'Xogħol reċenti fl-analiżi semantika għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet iffoka fuq mistoqsijiet twal u kumplikati, li ħafna minnhom jidhru mhux naturali jekk jitolbu f’konverżjoni normali bejn żewġ bnedmin. Fi sforz biex jiġi esplorat ambjent ta’ QA konverżjonali, qed nippreżentaw kompitu aktar realistiku: it-tweġiba għal sekwenzi ta’ mistoqsijiet sempliċi iżda relatati ma’ xulxin. Niġbru sett ta’ dejta ta’ 6,066 sekwenza ta’ mistoqsijiet li jistħarrġu dwar tabelli semistrutturati mill-Wikipedia, b’total ta’ 17,553 par ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet. Biex jissolvew dan il-kompitu sekwenzjali ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, nipproponu qafas ġdid dinamiku ta’ analiżi semantika newrali mħarreġ bl-użu ta’ tiftix iggwidat bil-premju b’superviżjoni dgħajfa. Il-mudell tagħna effettivament iħeġġeġ il-kuntest sekwenzjali biex jitwettqu sistemi ta’ QA avvanzati li huma mfassla biex iwieġbu għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi ħafna.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ജോലി നീണ്ടും പ്രശ്നമുള്ള ച സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ക്യൂഎ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചാല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ജോലിയെ കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു.  വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്ന് സെമ്മി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടേബിളുകളെപ്പറ്റി ചോദിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് 6,066 ചോദ്യം സ പിന്നീട് ഈ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക്ക് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ക് ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് പര നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാ', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед асуулт хариултын тухай судалгааны ажил нь урт, төвөгтэй асуултуудад төвлөрсөн. Ихэнх нь хоёр хүн хоорондын энгийн ярилцлаганд асуувал байгаль байгаль биш мэт санагддаг. QA-ын ярианы хэмжээг судлах хичээл дээр бид илүү бодит даалгавар гаргадаг: энгийн, харилцааны асуултын дарааллыг хариулах. Бид Википедиадаас хагас бүтээгдэхүүний талаар асуудаг 6 066 асуулт дарааллын өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг цуглуулж байна. Үүний дараагийн асуултын хариултын үйлдлийг шийдэхийн тулд бид шинэ динамик сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрээр сургалтын сургалтын шагналыг удирдах шагналыг ашиглаж сургалтын шинэ шинжлэ Бидний загвар нь маш нарийн асуултуудад хариулт өгөх зорилготой QA-ын төвшин тогтолцооны нөхцөлд нөлөөлдөг нөхцөлд нөлөөлдөг.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace nad parsowaniem semantycznym dla odpowiedzi na pytania skupiają się na długich i skomplikowanych pytaniach, z których wiele wydaje się nienaturalne, gdyby było zadane w normalnej rozmowie między dwoma ludźmi. W celu zbadania warunków jakości konwersacyjnej przedstawiamy bardziej realistyczne zadanie: odpowiedzi na sekwencje prostych, ale powiązanych ze sobą pytań. Gromadzimy zestaw danych sekwencji pytań 6,066, które pytają o półstrukturalne tabele z Wikipedii, z 17,553 pary pytania-odpowiedzi w sumie. Aby rozwiązać to sekwencyjne zadanie odpowiedzi na pytania, proponujemy nowy dynamiczny neuronowy framework parsowania semantycznego przeszkolony przy użyciu słabo nadzorowanego wyszukiwania nagrody. Nasz model skutecznie wykorzystuje kontekst sekwencyjny, aby przewyższyć najnowocześniejsze systemy QA, które są zaprojektowane do odpowiedzi na bardzo złożone pytania.', 'ro': 'Lucrările recente în analizarea semantică pentru răspunsul la întrebări s-au concentrat pe întrebări lungi și complicate, dintre care multe ar părea nenaturale dacă ar fi puse într-o conversație normală între doi oameni. Într-un efort de a explora un cadru conversațional QA, prezentăm o sarcină mai realistă: răspunsul la secvențe de întrebări simple, dar interconectate. Colectăm un set de date de 6.066 secvențe de întrebări care întreabă despre tabele semi-structurate de pe Wikipedia, cu 17.553 perechi de întrebări-răspunsuri în total. Pentru a rezolva această sarcină secvențială de răspuns la întrebări, propunem un nou cadru de analizare semantică neurală dinamică instruit folosind o căutare ghidată de recompensă slab supravegheată. Modelul nostru utilizează în mod eficient contextul secvențial pentru a depăși performanțele sistemelor de calitate de ultimă generație, concepute pentru a răspunde la întrebări extrem de complexe.', 'sr': 'Nedavno rad u semantičkom razmatranju odgovora na pitanja fokusirao se na duga i komplikovana pitanja, mnogi od njih bi izgledali neprirodno ako bi se postavili u normalnom razgovoru između dva ljudi. U pokušaju da istražimo razgovorni QA postavljanje, predstavljamo realniji zadatak: odgovor na sekvence jednostavnih, ali međusobnih pitanja. Skupljamo seriju podataka od 6.066 pitanja koja istražuju o polu-strukturovanim stolovima iz Wikipedije, sa ukupno 17.553 parova odgovora na pitanje. Da bi riješili ovaj odgovorni zadatak, predlažemo novi dinamični neuralni semantički okvir za analizu obučen sa slabom nadzornom pretraživanjem nagrade. Naš model efektivno utiče na sekvencijski kontekst na izvršavanje stanja umjetnih QA sistema koji su dizajnirani da odgovore na veoma kompleksno pitanje.', 'so': "Shaqo la soo dhowaaday baarlamaanka semantika ah oo jawaabta su'aalaha uu ku jawaabayo wuxuu ku focus yahay su'aalo dheer oo adag, qaarkood oo ka mid ahna waxay u muuqanayaan wax aan caqli aheyn, haddii lagu weyddiisto hadal caadi ah labada nin dhexdooda. In an effort to explore a conversational QA setting, we present a more realistic task: answering sequences of simple but inter-related questions.  Waxaynu soo ururiynaa koob la xiriira su'aalaha 6,066 oo wax ka weydiinaya miisaska semi-dhisan ee Wikipedia, waxayna leeyihiin 17,553 nooc oo su'aalo ka jawaaba. Si aan u xallino arrintan jawaabta ka dambeeya, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal saxda ah oo ku qoran qoraalka bedashada neural semantic ah oo lagu baray isticmaalka raadinta la hagayo mushaarka. Tusaalkayaga waxyaabaha leh ayaa si caqli leh u sameynaya hababka soo socda si uu u sameeyo nidaamka QA-da-farshaxanka ah oo loo qoray in ay uga jawaabo su'aalo aad u adag.", 'no': 'Nyleg arbeid i semantisk tolking for spørsmål har fokusert på lange og kompliserte spørsmål, mange av dei ville virka ugjennomsiktige viss det er spurd i eit normal samtale mellom to menneske. I eit forsøk på å utforske eit samtale QA-innstilling, presenterer vi ei meir realistisk oppgåve: svarar på rekkjefølgjer av enkle, men mellomrelaterte spørsmål. Vi samler eit datasett med 6.066 spørsmålssekvens som spørrer om halvstrukturerte tabeller frå Wikipedia, med 17.553 spørsmålsekvenser i alt. For å løse denne sekvensiske spørsmålet som svarar på oppgåva, foreslår vi eit romanisk dinamisk neuralsemantisk tolking- rammeverket trent ved å bruka ein viktig oversikt rekkeført søk. Vårt modell leverer effektivt den sekvensiske konteksten til å utføra QA-systemet som er utforma for å svara på svært komplekse spørsmål.', 'sv': 'Det senaste arbetet med semantisk tolkning för frågesvar har fokuserat på långa och komplicerade frågor, varav många skulle verka onaturliga om de ställdes i ett normalt samtal mellan två människor. I ett försök att utforska en konversationell QA inställning presenterar vi en mer realistisk uppgift: besvara sekvenser av enkla men inbördes relaterade frågor. Vi samlar in en dataset med 6 066 frågesekvenser som frågar om semistrukturerade tabeller från Wikipedia, med totalt 17 553 frågor-svar par. För att lösa denna sekventiella frågesvarsuppgift föreslår vi ett nytt dynamiskt neuralt semantiskt parsningsram tränat med hjälp av en svagt övervakad belöningsstyrd sökning. Vår modell utnyttjar effektivt det sekventiella sammanhanget för att överträffa toppmoderna kvalitetssäkringssystem som är utformade för att svara på mycket komplexa frågor.', 'ta': 'கேள்விக்கு பதில் அண்மையான பாடலில் சமீபத்திய வேலை நீண்ட மற்றும் சிக்கலான கேள்விகளின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதில் அந ஒரு பேசும் QA அமைப்பை தேட முயற்சியில், நாம் ஒரு மிகவும் உண்மையான செயலை கொண்டுள்ளோம்: சுலபமான ஆனால் இணைய கேள்விகளுக்கு வ 6,066 கேள்வி துண்டுகளை நாம் ஒரு தகவல் அமைப்பு சேகரிக்கிறோம். இது விகிபிடியாவில் இருந்து semi-structured tables பற்றி கேட்கிறது, 17,553 கேள்வி க பின்வரும் இந்த கேள்வி பதில் செய்யும் பணியை தீர்வு செய்ய, நாம் ஒரு புதிய நடத்தும் புதிய நெருக்கல் semantic பாசிங் சட்டத்தை மிகவும்  எங்கள் மாதிரி மிகவும் சிக்கலான கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பின்வரும் சூழல் சூழ', 'ur': 'سوال جواب کے لئے اچھی سیمنٹی پارسینٹ میں اپنا کام دور اور پیچیدہ سوال پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، ان میں سے بہت سے لوگ ناطبیعی بن سکتے ہیں اگر دو انسانوں کے درمیان ایک عام گفتگو میں پوچھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک بات کی QA تنظیم کے لئے ایک کوشش میں زیادہ حقیقت کا کام پیش کرتے ہیں: سادہ لیکن بین رابطہ کے سوال کی سفارش کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے 6,066 سوال سفارش سفارش سفارش کے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کو جمع کرلیا ہے جو ویکیپیڈیا سے نصف ساختہ ٹیبل کے بارے میں سوال کرتی ہیں، سب سے 17,553 سوال جوڑوں کے ساتھ۔ اس سفارشی سوال کو جواب دینے کے لئے، ہم ایک نئی سیمانیک نیورال سیمانیٹیک پارسینگ فرمیک کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کمزور تحقیق کی جگہ کے مطابق تعلیم کی جاتی ہے. ہمارا موڈل اثبات کے ساتھ سفارشی کنٹنسیٹ کو اثبات کرتا ہے جو بہت پیچیدہ سوالوں کی جواب کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے۔', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සඳහා අලුත් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු හා සංකුලිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන බලන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වාර්තාවක් QA සැකසුම් එකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා, අපි තවත් වැඩි වැඩිය වැඩක් පෙන්වනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් සම්බන් අපි 6,066 ප්\u200dරශ්න පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන දත්ත සෙට් එකතු කරනවා විකිපිඩියාවෙන් සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 17,553 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  මේ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව විසඳන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්නේ නියම විස්තර විස්තාරයක් නිර්මාණය ව අපේ මොඩේල් අවස්ථාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik QA moslamalarini aniqlashga harakat qilamiz, biz bir haqiqiqiy vazifani hosil qilamiz: oddiy va inter-related savollariga javob beramiz. Biz Wikipediya uchun semi-quyidagi jadvallarni so'rayotgan 6,066 savol chegaralarini olib tashlamiz va butunlay 17,553 savol javoblar qoʻllari bilan soʻng. Keyingi savol javob berish uchun, biz cheksiz taʼminlov qilingan paytdan qoʻllanilgan xabar yordamchi neyrolik semantik parsing frameiyasi Bizning modelimiz juda murakkablik savollar javob beradigan QA tizimlarini bajarishga tayyorlaydi.", 'vi': 'Công việc gần đây của việc phân tích các câu hỏi theo ngữ nghĩa đã tập trung vào những câu hỏi dài và phức tạp, nhiều câu hỏi có vẻ bất thường nếu được hỏi trong một cuộc đối thoại bình thường giữa hai con người. Trong nỗ lực khám phá môi trường đối thoại QA, chúng tôi đưa ra một nhiệm vụ thực tế hơn: câu trả lời các chuỗi các câu hỏi đơn giản nhưng liên quan. Chúng tôi thu thập một tập dữ liệu gồm dãy câu hỏi 6,062 mà câu hỏi dò hỏi về các bàn Sắp được cấu trúc từ Wikipedia, với đối tượng khó giải câu hỏi trong tổng thể. Để giải quyết các câu hỏi tiếp theo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ quan phân tích tích tích động động mới được huấn luyện bằng cách tìm kiếm dựa trên yếu ớt. Cơ chế của chúng tôi thực sự điều khiển bối cảnh kế tiếp để vượt trội các hệ thống QA hiện đại, được thiết kế để trả lời các câu hỏi phức tạp.', 'hr': 'Nedavno rad u semantičkom razmatranju odgovora na pitanja usredotočen je na duga i komplikovana pitanja, mnogi od njih bi izgledali neprirodno ako bi se postavili u normalnom razgovoru između dva čovjeka. U pokušaju istraživanja razgovornog postavka QA-a, predstavljamo realniji zadatak: odgovor na sekvence jednostavnih ali međusobnih pitanja. Skupljamo skup podataka od 6.066 sekvencija pitanja koja istražuje o polu-strukturiranim stolovima iz Wikipedije, s ukupno 17.553 parova odgovora na pitanje. Da bi riješili ovaj odgovorni zadatak, predlažemo novi dinamični neuralni semantički okvir za analizu obučen s slabom nadziranom pretragom vodjenom nagrade. Naš model učinkovito utiče na sekvencijski kontekst na izvršavanje stanja umjetnih QA sustava koji su dizajnirani da odgovore na veoma složena pitanja.', 'da': 'Det seneste arbejde med semantisk fortolkning til spørgsmålsbesvarelse har fokuseret på lange og komplicerede spørgsmål, hvoraf mange ville virke unaturlige, hvis de blev spurgt i en normal samtale mellem to mennesker. I et forsøg på at udforske en konversationsmæssig QA-indstilling præsenterer vi en mere realistisk opgave: at besvare sekvenser af enkle, men indbyrdes relaterede spørgsmål. Vi indsamler et datasæt med 6.066 spørgsmål sekvenser, der spørger om semistrukturerede tabeller fra Wikipedia, med 17.553 spørgsmål-svar par i alt. For at løse denne sekventielle spørgsmål besvarelse opgave, foreslår vi en ny dynamisk neural semantisk parsing ramme trænet ved hjælp af en svagt overvåget belønning-guidet søgning. Vores model udnytter effektivt den sekventielle kontekst til at overperforme state-of-the-art QA-systemer, der er designet til at besvare meget komplekse spørgsmål.', 'nl': 'Recent werk in semantische parsing voor het beantwoorden van vragen heeft zich gericht op lange en ingewikkelde vragen, waarvan veel onnatuurlijk lijken als ze worden gesteld in een normaal gesprek tussen twee mensen. In een poging om een conversationele QA setting te verkennen, presenteren we een meer realistische taak: het beantwoorden van opeenvolgingen van eenvoudige maar onderling gerelateerde vragen. We verzamelen een dataset van 6,066 vragenreeksen die vragen over semi-gestructureerde tabellen uit Wikipedia, met 17,553 vraag-antwoord paren in totaal. Om deze sequentiële vragenbeantwoordingstaak op te lossen, stellen we een nieuw dynamisch neuronaal semantisch parsing framework voor dat is getraind met behulp van een zwak begeleide beloningsgegeleide zoektocht. Ons model maakt effectief gebruik van de sequentiële context om state-of-the-art QA-systemen te overtreffen die ontworpen zijn om zeer complexe vragen te beantwoorden.', 'bg': 'Последната работа в семантичното анализиране за отговор на въпроси се фокусира върху дълги и сложни въпроси, много от които биха изглеждали неестествени, ако бъдат зададени в нормален разговор между двама човека. В опит да проучим разговорна настройка за качество на качеството, ние представяме по-реалистична задача: отговаряне на последователности от прости, но взаимосвързани въпроси. Събираме набор от данни от 6 066 последователности от въпроси, които питат за полуструктурирани таблици от Уикипедия, с общо 17 553 двойки въпроси-отговори. За решаване на тази последователна задача за отговор на въпроси, ние предлагаме нова динамична невронна семантична рамка за анализ, обучена с помощта на слабо контролирано търсене, ръководено от награди. Нашият модел ефективно използва последователния контекст, за да надмине най-съвременните системи за контрол на качеството, предназначени да отговарят на много сложни въпроси.', 'de': 'Jüngste Arbeiten im semantischen Parsing zur Beantwortung von Fragen konzentrierten sich auf lange und komplizierte Fragen, von denen viele unnatürlich erscheinen, wenn sie in einem normalen Gespräch zwischen zwei Menschen gestellt würden. Um eine kommunikative QA-Umgebung zu erkunden, stellen wir eine realistischere Aufgabe vor: Sequenzen einfacher, aber miteinander zusammenhängender Fragen zu beantworten. Wir sammeln einen Datensatz von 6,066 Fragesequenzen, die nach halbstrukturierten Tabellen aus Wikipedia fragen, mit 17,553 Frage-Antwort Paaren insgesamt. Um diese sequentielle Fragebeantwortung zu lösen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges dynamisches neuronales semantisches Parsing-Framework vor, das mithilfe einer schwach überwachten belohnungsgeleiteten Suche trainiert wird. Unser Modell nutzt den sequenziellen Kontext effektiv, um hochmoderne QS-Systeme zu übertreffen, die für die Beantwortung hochkomplexer Fragen konzipiert sind.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan baru-baru ini dalam pemeriksaan semantis untuk menjawab pertanyaan telah fokus pada pertanyaan panjang dan rumit, yang banyak akan tampak tidak alami jika ditanya dalam percakapan normal antara dua manusia. Dalam usaha untuk mengeksplorasi seting QA percakapan, kami mempersembahkan tugas yang lebih realistis: menjawab urutan pertanyaan sederhana tetapi berhubungan antara satu sama lain. Kami mengumpulkan dataset 6.066 urutan pertanyaan yang bertanya tentang meja semi-struktur dari Wikipedia, dengan 17.553 pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban total. Untuk memecahkan tugas menjawab pertanyaan sekwensional ini, kami melaporkan cadangan penghuraian semantis saraf dinamik yang baru dilatih menggunakan pencarian yang diawasi dengan penghargaan yang lemah. Model kita secara efektif menggunakan konteks sekuensi untuk melebihi sistem QA terbaik yang dirancang untuk menjawab pertanyaan yang sangat kompleks.', 'fa': 'کارهای اخیرا در تجزیه\u200cهای semantic برای جواب سوال روی سوال طولانی و پیچیده تمرکز شده است، بسیاری از آنها به نظر غیرطبیعی می\u200cرسد اگر در یک مکالمه طبیعی بین دو انسان پرسیده شود. در تلاش برای تحقیق یک تنظیم QA مکالمه، ما یک کار واقعی بیشتری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: پاسخ دادن رده\u200cهای سؤال ساده ولی متفاوتی. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات از سؤال ۶۶۶ را جمع می\u200cکنیم که در مورد میز\u200cهای نصف ساخته شده از ویکیپدیا بپرسند، با جفت\u200cهای جواب سوال ۱۷۵۳ جمع می\u200cکنیم. برای حل این سؤال پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی دنیایی، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مدل ما به طور موثرتی موضوع بعدی را برای اجرای سیستم\u200cهای QA هنری که طراحی شده\u200cاند برای جواب سوالات بسیار پیچیده می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '최근 문답의 의미 분석에 있어서 주로 길고 복잡한 문제에 집중되고 있는데 만약 두 사람 간의 정상적인 대화에서 질문을 받게 된다면 그 중 많은 문제가 부자연스러운 것 같다.대화식 퀴즈 환경을 탐색하기 위해 우리는 일련의 간단하지만 서로 관련된 문제에 대답하는 더욱 현실적인 임무를 제시했다.우리는 위키백과에서 6066개의 문제 서열의 데이터 집합을 수집했는데 이 문제 서열은 반구조화 표를 조회했는데 모두 17553개의 문제 - 답이 맞았다.이 순서의 퀴즈 임무를 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 동적 신경 의미 분석 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 약한 감독 장려를 사용하여 검색을 유도하여 훈련을 한다.우리의 모델은 순서 상하문을 효과적으로 활용하여 고도의 복잡한 문제에 대답하는 가장 선진적인 QA시스템을 설계하는 것보다 우수하다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya hivi karibuni katika parge ya seksua kwa ajili ya kujibu swali imejikita kwenye maswali mengi na matatizo makubwa, ambazo mengi yanaonekana kama haina uhalali kama iliulizwa katika mazungumzo ya kawaida kati ya binadamu wawili. Katika jitihada za kutafuta mjadala wa mazungumzo ya QA, tunaweka kazi zaidi ya halisi: kujibu mfululizo wa maswali rahisi lakini yanayohusiana na mambo yanayohusiana. Tunakusanya seti ya takwimu ya vipengele 6,066 vya maswali ambavyo vinaomba juu ya meza zilizojengwa na sekondari kutoka Wikipedia, na wawili 17,553 waliojibu maswali kwa ujumla. Ili kutatua swali hili la baada ya kujibu jukumu hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa wimbi wa uchimbaji wa kimapenzi wa kisasa wa neura uliojifundishwa kwa kutumia utafutaji unaothibitiwa kwa mujibu wa malipo. Mfano wetu unatengeneza mazingira ya baadae ili kutengeneza mfumo wa hali ya sanaa wa QA ambao unalengwa kujibu maswali magumu sana.', 'af': "Onlangse werk in semantiese verwerking vir vraag antwoord het op lank en kompliseerde vrae gefokus, baie van hulle sal lyk onnatuurlik as in 'n normale gesprek tussen twee mense gevra het. In 'n versoek om 'n gesprekslyklike QA-instelling te oersoek, laat ons 'n meer realistiese taak voorsien: antwoord volgorde van eenvoudige maar inter-verwante vrae. Ons versamel 'n datastel van 6,066 vraag sekwensies wat ondersoek oor semistruktureerde tabelle van Wikipedia, met 17,553 vraag-antwoord paar totaal. Om hierdie volgende vraag te los, antwoord die taak, voorstel ons 'n romaniese dinamiese neurale semantiese verwerking raamwerk wat opgelei word deur 'n swak ondersoekte vergelde vergelde soektog. Ons model het effektief die sekwensiele konteks uitgevoer om state-of-the-art QA stelsels wat ontwerp word om baie komplekse vraag te antwoord.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda semantik çözümleme üçin soraglary üçin öňki we karmaşık soraglara üns berildi, eger iki adam arasynda adalat bir görüşmede soralan bolsa köpüsi ýagdaý görünebilir. QA gürrüň düzümlerini keşfedmek üçin çabalarda, biz esasy bir zady tanyşdyrýarys: basit ýöne temaslaryň düzümlerini jogap bermek üçin çabalarda. Biz 6,066 sorag dizirleriniň yarı-strukturlyk tabletleri hakynda sorap biljek veri setirini Wikipediýadan toplamda 17,553 sorag-jogabat çipleri bilen toplaýarlar. Bu seňki soraglaryň jogap täblisini çözmek üçin, biz novel dinamik neural semantik çarpma çerçevesini iň az gözleýän üýtgeli gözlemeli gözlemegi üçin bilinmeli bir çarpma teklip etdik. Biziň modelimiz gaty karmaşık soraglary jogap bermek üçin taýýarlanan konteksti çykarýar.', 'am': 'የመጠያቂያውን መልስ ለመቀበል የቀድሞው የsemantic ፓርቲ ሥራ ረጅም እና አካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን አስጠንቆአል፤ ብዙዎቹ በሁለቱ ሰዎች መካከል ጥያቄ በተጠያየቁ ጥያቄ አይገኙም፡፡ የአካባቢ የQA ግንኙነት ለመፈለግ ለመፈለግ፣ አብዛኛውን የእውነት ስራ እናቀርባለን፡፡ ቀላል ነገር ግን የግንኙነት ጥያቄዎችን መለስ፡፡ 6,066 የጥያቄ ግንኙነቶችን በWikipedia የsemi-የተሠረተውን ገበታዎች እናሰብስባቸዋለን፡፡ ይህንን የሚከተለውን ጥያቄ ለመመልስ ስራ ለመፍታት፣ በዋጋ ተመራሳይ የተጠቃሚ የነዌራዊ የsemantic የፓርቲካ ፍሬም በተጠቃሚ የዋጋ ምርጫዎችን ለመፈለግ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በጥያቄ ጥያቄን ለመመልስ የተደረገውን የጥያቄውን የQA ሥርዓት ሥርዓት ለመፍጠር ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին աշխատանքը սեմանտիկ վերլուծում հարցերի պատասխանելու համար կենտրոնացավ երկար և բարդ հարցերի վրա, որոնցից շատերը անբնական կթվային, եթե հարցված լինեին երկու մարդկանց միջև սովորական խոսակցության ժամանակ: Փորձելով ուսումնասիրել խոսակցության QA-ն, մենք ներկայացնում ենք ավելի իրական խնդիր՝ պարզ, բայց միմյանց հետ կապված հարցերի հաջորդականություններ պատասխանելը: Մենք հավաքում ենք 6,066 հարցերի հաջորդականությունների տվյալներ, որոնք հետաքրքրում են Վիքիփեդիայի կես-կառուցվածքային սեղանների մասին, որոնց ընդհանուր թիվը 17,553 հարցերի պատասխաններ ունի: Այս հաջորդական հարցերին պատասխանելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր դինամիկ նյարդային սեմանտիկ վերլուծության շրջանակ, որը վարժեցվել է թույլ վերահսկվող հաշվարկների ուղղությամբ: Մեր մոդելը արդյունավետ օգտագործում է հաջորդական կոնտեքստը, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք ամենաբարձր համակարգերը, որոնք նախագծված են շատ բարդ հարցերին պատասխանելու համար:', 'sq': "Recent work in semantic parsing for question answering has focused on long and complicated questions, many of which would seem unnatural if asked in a normal conversation between two humans.  Në një përpjekje për të eksploruar një konfigurim QA bisedimor, ne paraqesim një detyrë më realiste: përgjigjen e sekuencave të pyetjeve të thjeshta por të ndërlidhura. Ne mbledhim një sërë të dhënash prej 6,066 sekuencash pyetjesh që pyesin rreth tavolinave gjysmë-strukturuara nga Wikipedia, me 17,553 çifte pyetjesh-përgjigje në total. Për të zgjidhur këtë detyrë sekuenciale që përgjigjet pyetjeve, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri dinamik të analizimit semantik nervor të stërvitur duke përdorur një kërkim të mbikqyrur dobësisht nga shpërblimi. Modeli ynë efektivisht nxjerr dorë nga konteksti sekuencial për të kaluar sistemet QA më të moderne që janë dizajnuar për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve shumë komplekse.", 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর দীর্ঘ এবং জটিল প্রশ্নের প্রতি সেম্পেন্টিক পার্জিং এ কাজ করা হয়েছে। অনেকে দুই মানুষের মধ্যে স্বাভাবিক আলোচনায় প্রশ যুক্তিগত কিউএ বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসন্ধানের প্রচেষ্টায় আমরা আরো বাস্তবতার কাজ উপস্থাপন করি: সাধারণ কিন্তু পরস্পরের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দ আমরা ৬,০৬৬ প্রশ্নের সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংগ্রহ করেছি যা উইকিপিডিয়া থেকে সেমি কাঠামো টেবিল সম্পর্কে জিজ্ঞেস করেছে, যার সাথে ১৭,৫ পরবর্তীতে এই প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্ন সমাধান করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করছি যে নিউরেল সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং ফ্রেম্যাক্টরের প্রশিক আমাদের মডেল কার্যকরভাবে কার্যকর করে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়ার জন্য কিউএ সিস্টেমের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি প্রকাশ করার জন্', 'bs': 'Nedavno rad u semantičkom razmatranju odgovora na pitanja usredotočen je na duga i komplikovana pitanja, mnogi od njih bi izgledali neprirodno ako bi se postavili u normalnom razgovoru između dva čovjeka. U pokušaju istraživanja razgovornog postavka QA-a predstavljamo realniji zadatak: odgovor na sekvence jednostavnih ali međusobnih pitanja. Skupljamo seriju podataka od 6.066 pitanja koja istražuju o polu-strukturiranim stolovima iz Wikipedije, sa ukupno 17.553 parova odgovora na pitanje. Da bi riješili ovaj odgovorni zadatak, predlažemo novi dinamični neuralni semantički okvir za analizu obučen sa slabom nadzornom pretraživanjem nagrade. Naš model efektivno utiče na sekvencijski kontekst na izvršavanje stanja umjetnih QA sustava koji su dizajnirani da odgovore na veoma kompleksno pitanje.', 'az': 'Söylə cavab vermək üçün son zamanlarda semantik analizi işləri uzun və karmaşık suallara odaqlandı. Əgər iki insan arasında normal danışmaq istəsəydi, onlardan bir çoxu təbiətsiz görünür. QA müzakirə qurğularını keşfetmək üçün daha reallı bir işi göstərdik: basit, müxtəlif sualların sıralarına cavab verəcəyik. Biz Wikipediyadan yarı-strukturlı masalar haqqında soruşan 6.066 sual sekvensi verilənlər toplayırıq. Toplam 17.553 sual-cavab çiftləri ilə. Bu sonraki sual cavab verən işi çəkmək üçün, biz yeni dinamik nöral semantik ayırma framework ünü zəif gözləyirik mükafat yolu ilə təhsil edirik. Bizim modelimiz çox kompleks suallara cavab vermək üçün müəyyən edilmiş QA sistemlərinin sonucu müxtəlif məlumatlarını istifadə edir.', 'ca': "La feina recent en l'analització semàntica per respondre a preguntes s'ha centrat en llargues i complicades preguntes, moltes de les quals semblarien anormals si es preguntessin en una conversa normal entre dos humans. En un esforç per explorar un entorn de QA conversacional, presentem una tasca més realista: respondre a seqüències de preguntes simples però interconnectades. Recollim un conjunt de dades de 6.066 seqüències de preguntes que pregunten sobre taules semiestructurades de Wikipedia, amb 17.553 parells de respostes a preguntes en total. Per resoldre aquesta tasca seqüencial de resposta a preguntes, proposem un nou marc d'analització semàntica neural dinàmica entrenat fent servir una recerca debidament supervisada orientada a la recompensa. Our model effectively leverages the sequential context to outperform state-of-the-art QA systems that are designed to answer highly complex questions.", 'cs': 'Nedávná práce v oblasti sémantického parsování pro odpověď na otázky se zaměřuje na dlouhé a složité otázky, z nichž mnoho by se zdálo nepřirozené, pokud by bylo kladeno v normální konverzaci mezi dvěma lidmi. Ve snaze prozkoumat konverzační QA nastavení představujeme realističtější úkol: zodpovědět sekvence jednoduchých, ale vzájemně souvisejících otázek. Shromažďujeme datovou sadu sekvencí otázek 6,066, které se dotýkají polostrukturovaných tabulek z Wikipedie, s 17,553 páry otázek-odpověď celkem. Pro vyřešení tohoto sekvenčního odpovědi na otázky navrhujeme nový dynamický neuronový sémantický parsing framework trénovaný pomocí slabě dohlíženého hledání řízeného odměnou. Náš model efektivně využívá sekvenční kontext k překonání nejmodernějších systémů QA, které jsou navrženy tak, aby zodpověděly vysoce složité otázky.', 'et': 'Hiljutine töö semantilises parsimises küsimustele vastamiseks on keskendunud pikkadele ja keerulistele küsimustele, millest paljud tunduvad ebaloomulikud, kui neid küsitakse tavalises vestluses kahe inimese vahel. Püüdes uurida vestluslikku kvaliteedi tagamise seadet, esitame realistlikuma ülesande: vastata lihtsatele, kuid omavahel seotud küsimustele. Kogume 6 066 küsimustejadast koosnevat andmekogumit, mis pärivad poolstruktureeritud tabelite kohta Wikipediast, kokku 17 553 küsimuste ja vastuste paari. Selle järjestikuse küsimustele vastamise ülesande lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse dünaamilise neuraalsemantilise parsimisraamistiku, mis on koolitatud nõrgalt järelevalve all toimuva tasujuhise otsingu abil. Meie mudel kasutab tõhusalt järjestikust konteksti, et ületada tipptasemel kvaliteedi tagamise süsteeme, mis on mõeldud väga keerukatele küsimustele vastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikainen työ semanttisen jäsentämisen kysymyksiin on keskittynyt pitkiin ja monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin, joista monet vaikuttavat luonnottomilta, jos niitä kysytään normaalissa keskustelussa kahden ihmisen välillä. Pyrimme tutkimaan keskustelevaa laadunvarmistusasetusta esittelemme realistisemman tehtävän: vastata yksinkertaisiin mutta toisiinsa liittyviin kysymyksiin. Keräämme aineiston 6 066 kysymyssekvenssistä, jotka kyselevät puolistrukturoiduista taulukoista Wikipediasta, yhteensä 17 553 kysymys-vastausparia. Tämän sekvensaalisen kysymysvastaustehtävän ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta dynaamista neurosemanttista jäsennyskehystä, joka on koulutettu heikosti valvotulla palkkio-ohjatulla haulla. Mallimme hyödyntää tehokkaasti peräkkäistä kontekstia ylittääkseen huipputason laadunvarmistusjärjestelmät, jotka on suunniteltu vastaamaan erittäin monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin.', 'jv': 'logic Nanging masalah kanggo nambah urip nggawe barang-urip nggawe Awak dhéwé ngregani dataset 6.06 seneng pangrungu dadi sing isih sabanjuré barang langgambar luwih-ngregani layang sa winipedeka, lan padha 5.583 saiki reparno sak ujaran Ngawe ngubah sewendigo perusahaan nggambar apakno, kita kebah dhéwé urip sistem Dinamèni, semanti nggambar nggawe barang nggawe sistem tutorialan winih-nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe model sing ngendalikne iso nggambar kontèks sing dikarepaké kanggo nggawe sistem state-of-the-arts', 'ha': "Yin aiki na ƙara cikin parse na semantic wa mai karɓa wa tambayi ya fokus wa masu sauri da kuma masu haɗuwa, masu yawa daga cikinsu sune kama bã da amfani ba idan an tambaye a cikin mazaɓa mai normal tsakanin mutum biyu. Ga jarraba domin ka sami wani mataimaki na QA, sai mu zo wani aiki na gaskiyar: masu karɓa matsakan masu sauƙi kuma masu haɗi da masu husũma. Munã samun kodi na danganta na 6,066 masu tambayar da ke tambaya masu sakan da aka samar da sakan-sakaiwa daga Wikiledia, da nau'in sunan tambayar 17,553 sami. To, mu buɗa wannan tambayi masu karɓar aikin da ke ƙara, muna goyya da wani matsayin wanda ya yi dangantar da shi na rubutun semantic na neural wanda aka sanar da shi da an rauni na tsare search wanda aka shirya wa sakamako. Tuduniyarmu yana da amfani da mazaɓa masu ƙaranci zuwa ga fara-halin-na-sanar QA, wanda ake yi wa zabu su tambayi masu murakku mai girma.", 'he': 'העבודה האחרונה בניתוח סמנטי לענות על שאלות התמקדה בשאלות ארוכות ומסובכות, רבות מהן נראות לא טבעיות אם נשאל בשיחה נורמלית בין שני בני אדם. במאמץ לחקור סדרת QA שיחה, אנחנו מציגים משימה יותר מציאותית: לענות על רצפים של שאלות פשוטות אבל קשורות ביניהן. We collect a dataset of 6,066 question sequences that inquire about semi-structured tables from Wikipedia, with 17,553 question-answer pairs in total.  To solve this sequential question answering task, we propose a novel dynamic neural semantic parsing framework trained using a weakly supervised reward-guided search.  המודל שלנו משתמש באופן יעיל בקשר רצופי כדי להעביר מערכות QA מצוינות ביותר שמתכננות לענות על שאלות מורכבות מאוד.', 'sk': 'Nedavno delo s semantičnim razčlenjevanjem za odgovarjanje na vprašanja se je osredotočilo na dolga in zapletena vprašanja, od katerih se mnogi zdijo nenaravni, če bi jih postavili v normalnem pogovoru med dvema človekoma. V prizadevanju za raziskovanje pogovorne nastavitve za zagotavljanje kakovosti predstavljamo bolj realistično nalogo: odgovarjanje na zaporedje preprostih, a medsebojno povezanih vprašanj. Zbiramo podatkovni nabor 6.066 zaporedij vprašanj, ki sprašujejo o polstrukturiranih tabelah iz Wikipedije, s skupno 17.553 parov vprašanj-odgovorov. Za rešitev te zaporedne naloge odgovarjanja na vprašanja predlagamo nov dinamični nevralni semantični razčlenjevalni okvir, usposobljen z uporabo slabo nadzorovanega iskanja, vodenega z nagrado. Naš model učinkovito izkorišča zaporedni kontekst, da preseže najsodobnejše sisteme za zagotavljanje kakovosti, ki so zasnovani za odgovore na zelo zapletena vprašanja.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་བློ་གཏོང་གི་དོན་དག་གནད་དོན་རིང་དང་ལས་ཀར་ཆེ་བ་དག་སྲི་ཚིག་ལ་མཐོང་ གཏམ་གླེང་གི་QA སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཞིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འབད་ནི་དཔའ་བཅས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཕྱེད་༦༦༠་གི་དབུས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ཡོད། ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་ཚིག་གིས་ལན་གསལ་བ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན'}
{'en': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension', 'ar': 'القراء المبوبة الانتباه لفهم النص', 'fr': 'Lecteurs attentifs pour la compréhension de texte', 'pt': 'Leitores de atenção fechada para compreensão de texto', 'es': 'Lectores de atención cerrada para la comprensión de textos', 'ja': 'テキスト理解のためのゲート付きアテンションリーダー', 'zh': '文本解者门控式注意阅读器', 'ru': 'Считыватели с синхронизированным вниманием для понимания текста', 'hi': 'पाठ समझ के लिए गेटेड-ध्यान पाठकों', 'ga': 'Léitheoirí Airde Gated le haghaidh Tuisceana Téacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αναγνώστες συγκεντρωμένης προσοχής για κατανόηση κειμένου', 'kk': 'Мәтін қиықтығының біріктірілген қуаттау оқушылары', 'it': 'Lettori Gated-Attention per la comprensione del testo', 'lt': 'Teksto supratimo vartų dėmesio skaitytojai', 'hu': 'Összehúzott figyelem olvasók a szövegértéshez', 'mk': 'Прочитувачи на привлечено внимание за разбирање на текстот', 'ms': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension', 'ml': 'പദാവലി പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഗെറ്റ് ശ്രദ്ധ വായിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Aqraturi b’Attenzjoni Miġbura għall-Komprensjoni tat-Test', 'mn': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension', 'sr': 'Èitaèi prièuvanja za kompresiju teksta', 'pl': 'Czytniki zgromadzonej uwagi dla zrozumienia tekstu', 'ro': 'Cititori atenționați pentru înțelegerea textului', 'no': 'Gated- Attention- lesarar for tekstkomprimering', 'ta': 'உரை முடிப்புக்கு Gated- Attention Readers', 'sv': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension', 'so': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Completion', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Máy đọc Chú ý tập tin', 'da': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Tekstforståelse', 'hr': 'Čitači pripravne pažnje za kompresiju teksta', 'bg': 'Читатели с отворено внимание за разбиране на текста', 'nl': 'Gated-Attention Readers voor het begrijpen van tekst', 'id': 'Pembaca Perhatian-Gated untuk Kompresi Teks', 'de': 'Lesegeräte für das Verständnis von Texten', 'fa': 'خواننده\u200cهای توجه جمع شده برای تفسیر متن', 'ko': '텍스트 이해의 폐쇄적 주의력 독자', 'sq': 'Lexuesit me vëmendje të portës për kompresimin e tekstit', 'tr': 'Metin Derjesi üçin Gated-Attention Okuwçylar', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Wasomaji wa Mpango wa Matambo', 'bs': 'Čitaoci pripravne pažnje za kompresiju teksta', 'af': 'Gated- Attention Lesers vir Teks Kompresie', 'ca': "Llegidors d'atenció portada per a la comprensió del text", 'cs': 'Čtenáře získané pozornosti pro porozumění textu', 'az': 'Mətn Körpüşü üçün Gated-Attention Readers', 'bn': 'টেক্সট সমাপূর্ণ করার জন্য গেট- আটকানো পাঠকদের', 'fi': 'Lukijat tekstin ymmärtämistä varten', 'et': 'Tähelepanu lugejad teksti mõistmiseks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Bralniki z zaprto pozornostjo za razumevanje besedila', 'he': 'קוראים תשומת לב לשער עבור ביטוי טקסט', 'jv': 'gated-Attention reads for Text Compréncion', 'bo': 'Gated-Attention Readers for Text Comprehension'}
{'en': 'In this paper we study the problem of answering cloze-style questions over documents. Our model, the Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrates a multi-hop architecture with a novel attention mechanism, which is based on multiplicative interactions between the query embedding and the intermediate states of a recurrent neural network document reader. This enables the reader to build query-specific representations of tokens in the document for accurate answer selection. The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this taskthe CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset. The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس مشكلة الإجابة على أسئلة أسلوب إخفاء الملفات على المستندات. يدمج نموذجنا ، قارئ Gated-Attention (GA) ، بنية متعددة القفزات مع آلية انتباه جديدة ، والتي تعتمد على التفاعلات المضاعفة بين تضمين الاستعلام والحالات الوسيطة لقارئ مستندات الشبكة العصبية المتكرر. يتيح ذلك للقارئ إنشاء تمثيلات خاصة بالاستعلام للرموز المميزة في المستند لتحديد الإجابة بدقة. يحصل قارئ GA على أحدث النتائج على ثلاثة معايير لهذه المهمة - القصص الإخبارية CNN & Daily Mail ومجموعة بيانات Who Did What. يتم إثبات فعالية التفاعل التكاثر من خلال دراسة الاجتثاث ، ومن خلال المقارنة مع العوامل التركيبية البديلة لتنفيذ الانتباه عن طريق بوابة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos o problema de responder perguntas do tipo cloze sobre documentos. Nosso modelo, o Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integra uma arquitetura multi-hop com um novo mecanismo de atenção, que é baseado em interações multiplicativas entre a incorporação de consultas e os estados intermediários de um leitor de documentos de rede neural recorrente. Isso permite que o leitor construa representações específicas de consulta de tokens no documento para uma seleção de resposta precisa. O GA Reader obtém resultados de última geração em três referências para esta tarefa – as notícias da CNN & Daily Mail e o conjunto de dados Who Did What. A eficácia da interação multiplicativa é demonstrada por um estudo de ablação e pela comparação com operadores composicionais alternativos para a implementação da atenção fechada.', 'es': 'En este artículo estudiamos el problema de responder preguntas de estilo cloze sobre documentos. Nuestro modelo, el lector Gated-Attention (GA), integra una arquitectura de múltiples saltos con un mecanismo de atención novedoso, que se basa en interacciones multiplicativas entre la incrustación de consultas y los estados intermedios de un lector de documentos de red neuronal recurrente. Esto permite al lector crear representaciones específicas de las consultas de los tokens en el documento para una selección precisa de las respuestas. El Lector de GA obtiene resultados de vanguardia en tres puntos de referencia para esta tarea: las noticias de CNN y Daily Mail y el conjunto de datos Quién hizo qué. La eficacia de la interacción multiplicativa se demuestra mediante un estudio de ablación y mediante la comparación con operadores composicionales alternativos para implementar la atención dirigida.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème de la réponse à des questions rapprochées sur des documents. Notre modèle, le lecteur Gated-Attention (GA), intègre une architecture multi-sauts avec un nouveau mécanisme d'attention, qui est basé sur des interactions multiplicatives entre l'intégration de requêtes et les états intermédiaires d'un lecteur de documents de réseau neuronal récurrent. Cela permet au lecteur de créer des représentations spécifiques à la requête des jetons dans le document pour une sélection précise des réponses. Le GA Reader obtient des résultats de pointe sur trois critères de référence pour cette tâche\xa0: les articles de CNN et Daily Mail et le jeu de données Who Did What. L'efficacité de l'interaction multiplicative est démontrée par une étude d'ablation et par comparaison avec d'autres opérateurs de composition pour la mise en œuvre de l'attention attirée.", 'ja': 'この論文では、文書よりもクローズスタイルの質問に答える問題を研究している。当社のモデルであるGated - Attention （ GA ）リーダーは、クエリ埋め込みと再帰ニューラルネットワークドキュメントリーダーの中間状態との間の乗算的相互作用に基づく、新規の注意メカニズムを備えたマルチホップアーキテクチャを統合しています。これにより、読者は正確な回答の選択のためにドキュメント内のトークンのクエリ固有の表現を構築できます。GA Readerは、このタスクのための3つのベンチマーク（ CNN &amp; Daily MailニュースストーリーとWho Did Whatデータセット）に関する最先端の結果を取得します。乗算相互作用の有効性は、アブレーション研究によって、およびゲートアテンションを実装するための代替の構成演算子と比較することによって実証される。', 'zh': '于本文中,究文档对闭锁式。 臣等模样,门控注意力(GA)阅读器,将多跳架构与一种新颖的注意机集成,该机制基于查嵌与递归神经网络文档阅读器中间状态的乘法交互。 此使读者得构于文档特定询之令牌,以正其对。 GA Reader于此三准最先进 - CNN与日邮报新闻报道孰为集? 乘法相用者有效性以消融为验门控以代合为验。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम दस्तावेजों पर क्लोज़-शैली के सवालों के जवाब देने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल, गेटेड-अटेंशन (जीए) रीडर, एक उपन्यास ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक बहु-हॉप आर्किटेक्चर को एकीकृत करता है, जो क्वेरी एम्बेडिंग और आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क दस्तावेज़ रीडर के मध्यवर्ती राज्यों के बीच गुणात्मक बातचीत पर आधारित है। यह पाठक को सटीक उत्तर चयन के लिए दस्तावेज़ में टोकन के क्वेरी-विशिष्ट अभ्यावेदन बनाने में सक्षम बनाता है। जीए रीडर इस कार्य के लिए तीन बेंचमार्क पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है- सीएनएन और डेली मेल समाचार कहानियां और किसने क्या डेटासेट किया। गुणात्मक बातचीत की प्रभावशीलता को एक एब्लेशन अध्ययन द्वारा प्रदर्शित किया जाता है, और गेटेड-ध्यान को लागू करने के लिए वैकल्पिक रचनात्मक ऑपरेटरों की तुलना करके।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы изучаем проблему ответов на вопросы закрытого типа над документами. Наша модель, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, интегрирует мультихоповую архитектуру с новым механизмом внимания, который основан на мультипликативных взаимодействиях между встраиванием запроса и промежуточными состояниями рекуррентного нейронного сетевого считывателя документов. Это позволяет читателю создавать специфические для запроса представления маркеров в документе для точного выбора ответа. GA Reader получает самые современные результаты по трем критериям для этой задачи - новости CNN и Daily Mail и набор данных Who Did What. Эффективность мультипликативного взаимодействия демонстрируется исследованием абляции и сравнением с альтернативными композиционными операторами для реализации синхронного внимания.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le ceisteanna a fhreagairt ar nós na ndoiciméad. Comhtháthaíonn ár múnla, an Gated-Attention Reader (GA) ailtireacht il-hop le meicníocht aire nua, atá bunaithe ar idirghníomhaíochtaí iolracha idir neadú fiosrúcháin agus stáit idirmheánacha léitheoir doiciméad líonra néar athfhillteach. Cuireann sé seo ar chumas an léitheora léirithe ceist-shonracha de chomharthaí a thógáil sa doiciméad chun freagraí beachta a roghnú. Faigheann an GA Reader torthaí den scoth ar thrí thagarmharc don tasc seo – scéalta nuachta CNN & Daily Mail agus an tacar sonraí Who Did What. Léirítear éifeachtúlacht an idirghníomhaíochta iolraigh trí staidéar a dhéanamh ar ablation, agus trí chomparáid a dhéanamh le hoibreoirí comhdhéanaimh eile chun an aird le geata a chur i bhfeidhm.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt a problémát tanulmányozzuk, hogy milyen kérdésekre válaszolunk a dokumentumok felett. Modellünk, a Gated-Attention (GA) olvasó egy multi-hop architektúrát integrál egy új figyelemmechanizmussal, amely a lekérdezés beágyazása és a visszatérő neurális hálózati dokumentum olvasó köztes állapotai közötti multiplikatív interakciókon alapul. Ez lehetővé teszi az olvasó számára, hogy lekérdezésspecifikus tokeneket készítsen a dokumentumban a pontos válaszok kiválasztása érdekében. A GA Reader három referenciaértéken szerez korszerű eredményeket ehhez a feladathoz: a CNN & Daily Mail hírek és a Who Did What adatkészleten. A multiplikatív interakció hatékonyságát egy ablációs vizsgálat, valamint alternatív kompozíciós operátorokkal való összehasonlítás bizonyítja a gated-figyelem megvalósításához.', 'it': "In questo articolo studiamo il problema di rispondere alle domande cloze-style sui documenti. Il nostro modello, il Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integra un'architettura multi-hop con un nuovo meccanismo di attenzione, che si basa sulle interazioni moltiplicative tra l'embedding della query e gli stati intermedi di un lettore di documenti di rete neurale ricorrente. Ciò consente al lettore di creare rappresentazioni specifiche per query dei token nel documento per una selezione accurata delle risposte. Il GA Reader ottiene risultati all'avanguardia su tre parametri di riferimento per questo compito: le notizie CNN & Daily Mail e il set di dati Who Did What. L'efficacia dell'interazione moltiplicativa è dimostrata da uno studio di ablazione, e confrontando con operatori compositivi alternativi per implementare l'attenzione gated.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις τύπου κλόζ πάνω από έγγραφα. Το μοντέλο μας, ο αναγνώστης Gated-Attention (GA), ενσωματώνει μια αρχιτεκτονική πολλαπλών χορού με έναν νέο μηχανισμό προσοχής, ο οποίος βασίζεται σε πολλαπλές αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ της ενσωμάτωσης ερωτήματος και των ενδιάμεσων καταστάσεων ενός επαναλαμβανόμενου αναγνώστη εγγράφων νευρωνικών δικτύων. Αυτό επιτρέπει στον αναγνώστη να κατασκευάσει συγκεκριμένες αναπαραστάσεις των σημάτων στο έγγραφο για ακριβή επιλογή απαντήσεων. Ο αναγνώστης GA λαμβάνει τα τελευταία αποτελέσματα σε τρία σημεία αναφοράς για την εργασία αυτή – τις ειδήσεις CNN και το σύνολο δεδομένων Ποιος Έκανε Τι. Η αποτελεσματικότητα της πολλαπλασιαστικής αλληλεπίδρασης καταδεικνύεται από μια μελέτη αφαίρεσης και συγκρίνοντας με εναλλακτικούς συντελεστές σύνθεσης για την εφαρμογή της Gated-προσοχής.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ კვლავთ პრობლემა, რომელიც კლოზის სტილის კითხვების შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელი, Gated-Attention (GA) კითხველი, მრავალ-ჰოპის აქტიქტიქტურის ინტერგურაციას პრომენტიური დაახლოების მექანსისთვის, რომელიც მრავალური ინტერგურაციას დაბათებულია კითხვის ინტერგურაციას და განახლო ეს მოკითხველი შესაძლებელია კითხვის სპექტიფიკური გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება დოკუმენტში წარმოადგენისთვის. GA კითხველი მიიღება სამი ბენქმარკის შედეგი შემდეგი მონაცემები CNN & Daily Mail ისტორიები და ვინ მონაცემების შედეგი მონაცემები. გამრავლებული ინტერფექციის ეფექტიურობა აჩვენებულია აჩვენებული სწავლებით და ალტენტრუმენტური კომპოზიციალური ოპერატებით შემდგომარებული ინტერფექცია.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз құжаттардың клос стилінің сұрақтарына жауап беру мәселесін зерттейміз. Біздің үлгіміз, Gated-Attention (GA) оқушысы, көп- хоп архитектурасын романдық назарды механизммен біріктіреді. Бұл сұраныс ендіру мен қайталанатын неврал желі құжат оқушысының арасындағы көптеген интерфейстеріне негізделген. Бұл оқушы құжаттың дұрыс жауапты таңдау үшін сұраныстың ерекше белгілерін құру мүмкіндігін береді. GA оқушысы, CNN және Daily Mail жаңалық оқиғалары және "Who did What Data Set" деген үш тапсырманың күй- жағдайын жеткізеді. Көптеген интерфейстердің эффектілігін қолдану зерттеулері арқылы көрсетіледі, және альтернативті композиционалық операторлерге сәйкес келеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame problem ą, susijusią su atsakymu į klausimus, susijusius su klozo stiliu, o ne į dokumentus. Mūsų model is, Gated-Attention (GA) skaitytojas, integruoja daugialypę architektūrą su nauju dėmesio mechanizmu, kuris grindžiamas daugialype užklausos įterpimo ir tarpinių būklių tarpine pakartotinio nervinio tinklo dokumentų skaitytojo sąveika. Tai suteikia skaitytojui galimybę dokumente kurti konkrečius užklausos požymius, kad būtų galima tiksliai atrinkti atsakymus. The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset.  Daugiakartinės sąveikos veiksmingumas įrodomas abliacijos tyrimu ir palyginant su alternatyviais sudėties operatoriais, kad būtų galima teikti priešpriešinį dėmesį.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ക്ലോസ് സൈല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d, ഗേട്ട്-ശ്രദ്ധ വായിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d, ഒരു മുറിച്ച് ഹോപ്പ് സ്ഥാനം കൂട്ടുന്നു. നോവല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൈക്കൊണ്ട്, അത് ചോദ്യം ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിന്നും വീണ്ടും വര്\u200dദ് രേഖയിലെ ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി വായിക്കുന്നവനെ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്ക ജിഎ വായിക്കാരന്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയുടെയും ഡെയിലി മെയില്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെയും വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെയും മൂന്നു ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അവസ്ഥ നിലവി The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.', 'ms': 'In this paper we study the problem of answering cloze-style questions over documents.  Our model, the Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrates a multi-hop architecture with a novel attention mechanism, which is based on multiplicative interactions between the query embedding and the intermediate states of a recurrent neural network document reader.  This enables the reader to build query-specific representations of tokens in the document for accurate answer selection.  Pembaca GA mendapat keputusan-state-of-the-art pada tiga tanda referensi untuk tugas ini-cerita berita CNN & Daily Mail dan set data Who Did What. The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nistudjaw il-problema tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet bl-istil tal-għeluq fuq id-dokumenti. Il-mudell tagħna, il-Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, jintegra arkitettura multi-hop b’mekkaniżmu ġdid ta’ attenzjoni, li huwa bbażat fuq interazzjonijiet multiplikattivi bejn l-inkorporazzjoni tal-mistoqsija u l-istati intermedji ta’ qarrej rikorrenti ta’ dokumenti tan-netwerk newrali. This enables the reader to build query-specific representations of tokens in the document for accurate answer selection.  Il-qarrej tal-GA jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq tliet punti ta’ riferiment għal dan il-kompitu – l-istoriji tal-aħbarijiet tas-CNN & Daily Mail u s-sett tad-dejta Min għamel X’għamel. L-effikaċja ta’ interazzjoni multiplikattiva tintwera minn studju ta’ ablazzjoni, u billi titqabbel ma’ operaturi kompożittivi alternattivi għall-implimentazzjoni tal-attenzjoni miftuħa.', 'mk': 'In this paper we study the problem of answering cloze-style questions over documents.  Нашиот модел, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, интегрира мултихоп архитектура со нов механизам на внимание, кој се базира на мултикулативни интеракции меѓу вградувањето на прашањата и меѓувремените состојби на рецидентниот читач на нервни мрежи документи. Ова му овозможува на читателот да изгради специфични претставувања на симболи во документот за прецизен избор на одговори. ГА Читачот добива најдобри резултати на три резултати за оваа задача - новинските приказни на CNN & Daily Mail и „Кој направи што податоци“. Ефикасноста на множителната интеракција се покажува со студија на аблација и со споредба со алтернативните композициски оператори за спроведување на пристапното внимание.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy problem odpowiedzi na pytania w stylu cloze nad dokumentami. Nasz model, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integruje architekturę multi-hop z nowym mechanizmem uwagi, który opiera się na mnożytnych interakcjach między osadzeniem zapytania a stanami pośrednimi powtarzającego się czytnika dokumentów sieci neuronowej. Umożliwia to czytelnikowi budowanie specyficznych dla zapytania reprezentacji tokenów w dokumencie w celu dokładnego wyboru odpowiedzi. GA Reader uzyskuje najnowocześniejsze wyniki dotyczące trzech wskaźników odniesienia do tego zadania – opowieści CNN i Daily Mail oraz zestawu danych Kto zrobił co. Skuteczność interakcji multiplikatywnej wykazana jest poprzez badanie ablacji oraz porównanie z alternatywnymi operatorami kompozycyjnymi dla wdrożenia gated-attence.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare studiem problema răspunsului la întrebări în stil cloze peste documente. Modelul nostru, Cititorul Gated-Attention (GA), integrează o arhitectură multi-hop cu un nou mecanism de atenție, care se bazează pe interacțiuni multiplicative între încorporarea interogării și stările intermediare ale unui cititor de documente recurent de rețea neurală. Acest lucru permite cititorului să construiască reprezentări specifice interogării de token-uri în document pentru selectarea corectă a răspunsurilor. Cititorul GA obține rezultate de ultimă oră pe trei criterii de referință pentru această sarcină - știrile CNN & Daily Mail și setul de date Who Did What. Eficacitatea interacțiunii multiplicative este demonstrată printr-un studiu de ablație și prin compararea cu operatorii compoziționali alternativi pentru implementarea atenției gated.', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi problemet med å svara på klosestilspørsmål over dokument. Modellen vårt, Gated-Attention (GA) lesaren, integrerer eit multihopp-arkitektur med eit nytt oppmerksmekanisme, som er basert på multiplikativ interaksjon mellom spørjingsbrukinga og middelstaden til ein gjentaande neuralnettverkslesar. Dette gjer lesaren til å bygge spesifikke representasjonar av teikn i dokumentet for nøyaktig svarutval. GA-lesaren får status-of-the-art resultat på tre benchmarker for denne oppgåva-CNN og Daily Mail-nyhetsaren og Kva gjorde kva dataset. Effektiviteten av multiplikativ interaksjon vert demonstrert av ein aktiveringsstudie, og ved sammenligning med alternativ komposisjonsoperatorar for å implementera oppmerksomheten.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem odgovora na pitanja iz stila kloza na dokumente. Naš model, pročitač Gated-Attention (GA), integriše multihopsku arhitekturu sa novim pažnjom mehanizam, koji je zasnovan na multiplikativnim interakcijama između uključenog zahteva i prosječnih država rekonstruiranog čitača neuralne mreže dokumenta. To omogućava čitaču da izgradi specifične predstave znakova u dokumentu za tačni izbor odgovora. Pročitač GA dobiva rezultate o stanju umjetnosti na tri kritike za ovaj zadatak - priče o CNN i Daily Mail-u i ko je napravio kakve podatke. Efikasnost multiplikativne interakcije pokazuje se ispitivanjem aktivacije i usporedbom sa alternativnim kompozicionalnim operatorima za provedbu prikupljene pažnje.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид баримтуудын хувьд хэлбэртэй асуултыг хариулах асуудлыг судалж байна. Бидний загвар, Gated-Attention (GA) уншигч, олон-хоп архитектурыг шинэ анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмтэй нэгтгэдэг. Энэ нь квадрат нэвтрүүлэх болон сэтгэл сүлжээний уншигчийн дундаж орчин хоорондоо үржүүлэх харилцааны үндсэн. Энэ нь уншигчид баримт тодорхой хариулт сонголтын төлөвлөгөө бичиж чадна. GA Reader нь энэ ажил дээрх 3 дахь багшийн үр дүнг авдаг. CNN & Daily Mail мэдээллийн түүх болон Who Did What Set-г авсан. Хүржүүлэх харилцааны үр дүнтэй үр дүнтэй байдал нь хүчирхийллийн судалгаагаар харагдаж, цуглуулсан анхаарлыг дамжуулахын тулд альтернатив бүтээгдэхүүнтэй харьцуулж байна.', 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu ka baranaynaa dhibaatada jawaabta su'aalaha jiilaalka ee dukumentiyada. Our model, the Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrates a multi-hop architecture with a novel attention mechanism, which is based on multiplicative interactions between the query embedding and the intermediate states of a recurrent neural network document reader.  Taas waxaa sameyn kara qofka akhriska ah in uu dhiso muuqashada warqada gaarka ah oo ku qoran calaamada dukumentiga si uu u doorto jawaabta saxda ah. The GA Reader receives the state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who did What Dataset. Shahaadada isku xiriirka kala duduwan waxaa lagu muujiyaa waxbarashada dalbashada iskuullada, waxayna isbarbardhigtaa qoidaha qalabka kala duduwan si ay u soo bandhigto hagitaanka.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi problemet med att besvara cloze-stil frågor över dokument. Vår modell, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrerar en multi-hop arkitektur med en ny uppmärksamhetsmekanism, som bygger på multiplikativa interaktioner mellan frågeinbäddningen och mellantillstånden hos en återkommande neuralt nätverk dokumentläsare. Detta gör det möjligt för läsaren att skapa frågespecifika representationer av tokens i dokumentet för korrekt svarsval. GA Reader erhåller toppmoderna resultat på tre riktmärken för denna uppgift – CNN & Daily Mail nyhetsberättelser och Vem gjorde vad datauppsättningen. Effekten av multiplikativ interaktion påvisas genom en ablationsstudie och genom att jämföra med alternativa kompositionsoperatorer för implementering av gated-attention.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் குளோஸ் பாணி கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் சிக்கலை படிக்கிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரி, கேட்டு உள்ளடக்கத்திற்கும் இடையில் உள்ள நடுநிலையில் உள்ள புதிய பிணையத்தை படிப்பாளருக்கும் இடையில் உள்ள நடுநிலையில் உள்ள புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் ஆவணத்தை படிப்பவருடன இது படிப்பவரை சரியான விடை தேர்வுக்கு ஆவணத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குற GA வாசிப்பாளர் இந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கான மூன்று பகுதிகளின் நிலையின் முடிவுகளை கிடைக்கும் - CNN மற்றும் Daily அஞ்சல் செய்திகள் மற்றும்  பெருக்கல் இணைப்புகளின் விளைவு ஒரு உறுதிப்படுத்தல் படிப்பாட்டால் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் மாற்று தொகுப்பு செயலாளர்களை', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں مسئلہ کی تلاش کریں گے کہ دکھانے پر کلاس استیل سوال جواب دیں۔ ہماری مدل، Gated-Attention (GA) ریڈر، ایک نئورل نیٹورل ڈکومکینٹ ریڈر کے درمیان کئی دھوپ کے متوسط مکانیزی کے ساتھ ایک ملتی-هوپ معماری مکانیزی کے ساتھ تخلیق کرتا ہے۔ یہ پڑھنے والے کو دقیق جواب کے انتخاب کے لئے دکھائی کے لئے توکنوں کے سوال کے مطابق معلومات بنانے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے. GA راڈر اس کام کے لئے تین بنچم مارک کے نتائج حاصل کرتا ہے، CNN & Daily Mail News کہانیاں اور Who did What Data set. گھبراہٹ کی تعامل کا اثبات ایک آبلیٹ کی تحقیق سے دکھائی جاتی ہے، اور گھبراہٹ کی توجه کے مطابق مختلف پیدا کرنے والے کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرتی ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ලොක්ස් ස්ටිල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ අපේ මොඩේල්, Gated-Attance (GA) රිඩර්, මාලිහෝප් ස්ථාපනයක් සමග සංවිධානයක් සමග සංවිධානය කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවිධානයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවිධානයේ  මේක කියවන්න කියවන්න පුළුවන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් GA ක්\u200dරීඩාර්ටර් මේ වැඩේ තුනක් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් තුනක් විදියට ස්ථිතිය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙන්වන්නයි සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණයක් වලින්, ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz hujjatlarga mos-uslub savollariga javob berish muammosini o'rganamiz. Bizning modelimiz, Gated Attention (GA) Reader, bir necha-hop arxituvchini yangi taqdimot va soʻrov ichidagi ko'plab interfektlar va davom tarmoq hujjatni o'qituvchi tarmoq hujjatni o'qituvchi orasidagi bir nechta xil interfektlar asosida yaratadi. Name @ info: status Koʻproq interfektning effekti yozib qo'yish orqali ko'rsatadi, va boshqa kompyuterni ishga tushirish uchun boshqa qismi operatorlardan ham qisqarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề trả lời các câu hỏi kiểu Cloze hơn tài liệu. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi, bộ nạp Chú ý (GA) Reader, được hoà nhập một kiến trúc đa hop với một cơ chế tập trung mới, dựa trên sự tương tác sinh động giữa việc nhúng câu hỏi và trạng thái trung ương của một máy đọc tài liệu mạng thần kinh đệ đệ quy. Điều này cho phép người đọc xây dựng các biểu tượng đặc trưng của các thẻ theo yêu cầu trong tài liệu để chọn các câu trả lời chính xác. The GA Reader có kết quả hiện đại về ba điểm tiêu chuẩn cho nhiệm vụ này: the CNN dựa trên tin tức Daily Mail và the Whoh did What dữ liệu. Sự hiệu quả của giao tiếp nhân tạo được thể hiện bởi một nghiên cứu cắt bỏ, và bằng cách so sánh với các chuyên gia hợp tác khác để thực hiện việc đóng kín.', 'bg': 'В тази статия изследваме проблема с отговора на въпроси в клозов стил върху документи. Нашият модел, четецът "Gated-Attention" (GA), интегрира мулти-хоп архитектура с нов механизъм за внимание, който се основава на мултипликативни взаимодействия между вграждането на заявката и междинните състояния на повтарящ се четец на документи от невронна мрежа. Това позволява на читателя да създава специфични за заявка представяния на токени в документа за точен избор на отговор. Генералният четец получава най-съвременни резултати по три показатели за тази задача – новинарските истории и набора от данни "Кой е направил какво". Ефективността на мултипликативното взаимодействие се демонстрира чрез аблационно изследване и сравняване с алтернативни композиционни оператори за прилагане на затвореното внимание.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem odgovora na pitanja iz stila kloza na dokumente. Naš model, pročitač Gated-Attention (GA), integrira multihopsku arhitekturu s novim mehanizam pažnje, koji je temeljen na multiplikativnim interakcijama između uključenog zahtjeva i prosječnih stanja rekonstruiranog čitača neuralne mreže dokumenta. To omogućava čitaču izgraditi specifične zastupanje znakova u dokumentu za tačni izbor odgovora. Čitač GA-a dobiva rezultate stanja umjetnosti na tri kritike za ovaj zadatak - priče o CNN & Daily Mail-u i tko je napravio ono što je postavio podatke. Efikasnost multiplikativne interakcije pokazuje se ispitivanjem ablacije i usporedbom s alternativnim kompozicionalnim operatorima za provedbu prikupljene pažnje.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bestuderen we het probleem van het beantwoorden van cloze-style vragen over documenten. Ons model, de Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integreert een multi-hop architectuur met een nieuw aandachtsmechanisme, dat is gebaseerd op multiplicatieve interacties tussen de query embedding en de tussentoestanden van een terugkerend neuraal netwerk documentlezer. Dit stelt de lezer in staat query-specifieke representaties van tokens in het document te bouwen voor nauwkeurige antwoordselectie. De GA Reader verkrijgt state-of-the-art resultaten op drie benchmarks voor deze taak: de CNN, Daily Mail nieuwsberichten en de Who did What dataset. De effectiviteit van multiplicatieve interactie wordt aangetoond door een ablatieonderzoek, en door vergelijking met alternatieve compositionele operatoren voor het implementeren van de gated-attention.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi problemet med at besvare cloze-stil spørgsmål over dokumenter. Vores model, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrerer en multi-hop arkitektur med en ny opmærksomhedsmekanisme, som er baseret på multiplikative interaktioner mellem forespørgselsindlejringen og de mellemliggende tilstande af en tilbagevendende neuralt netværk dokumentlæser. Dette gør det muligt for læseren at opbygge forespørgselsspecifikke repræsentationer af tokens i dokumentet for nøjagtig svarvalg. GA Reader opnår state-of-the-art resultater på tre benchmarks for denne opgave - CNN & Daily Mail nyhedshistorierne og Hvem gjorde hvad datasættet. Effektiviteten af multiplikativ interaktion påvises ved en ablationsundersøgelse og ved at sammenligne med alternative kompositionsoperatører til implementering af gated-attention.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mempelajari masalah menjawab pertanyaan gaya cloze melalui dokumen. Model kami, Pembaca Perhatian-Gated (GA), mengintegrasikan arsitektur multi-hop dengan mekanisme perhatian baru, yang berdasarkan interaksi multiplikatif antara penyembedding pertanyaan dan keadaan intermedium dari pembaca dokumen jaringan saraf berkurang. Ini memungkinkan pembaca untuk membangun representation spesifik pertanyaan token dalam dokumen untuk seleksi jawaban akurat. Pembaca GA mendapatkan hasil terbaik pada tiga benchmark untuk tugas ini - cerita berita CNN & Daily Mail dan set data Who Did What. Efektivitas interaksi multiplikatif diperkenalkan oleh sebuah studi ablasi, dan dengan membandingkan dengan operator komposisi alternatif untuk memaksa perhatian gerbang.', 'ko': '본고는 문서에서 완형 빈칸 채우기 문제에 대한 문제를 연구하였다.우리의 모델, 문 제어 주의(GA) 리더는 다중 점프 구조와 새로운 주의 메커니즘을 통합시켰다. 이 메커니즘은 조회 삽입과 귀속 신경 네트워크 문서 리더의 중간 상태 간의 곱셈 상호작용을 바탕으로 한다.이것은 독자들이 정확하게 답을 선택할 수 있도록 문서에 특정한 검색의 영패 표시를 구축할 수 있게 한다.GA Reader는 이 임무의 세 가지 기준에서 최신 결과를 얻었다. 그것이 바로 CNN과 데일리메일 뉴스 이야기, 그리고 Who Do What 데이터 집합이다.융해 연구는 곱셈 상호작용의 유효성을 증명하고 문 제어의 주의를 실현하는 대체합성산자와 비교했다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das Problem der Beantwortung von Fragen im Cloze-Stil über Dokumente. Unser Modell, der Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integriert eine Multi-Hop-Architektur mit einem neuartigen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der auf multiplikativen Interaktionen zwischen der Abfrageeinbettung und den Zwischenzuständen eines rezidivierenden Dokumentenlesers für neuronale Netze basiert. Dies ermöglicht dem Leser, abfragespezifische Darstellungen von Token im Dokument für eine genaue Antwortauswahl zu erstellen. Der GA Reader erhält aktuelle Ergebnisse zu drei Benchmarks für diese Aufgabe – den CNN- und Daily Mail-Nachrichten und dem Who did What-Datensatz. Die Effektivität multiplikativer Interaktion wird durch eine Ablationsstudie und durch Vergleich mit alternativen kompositorischen Operatoren zur Implementierung der Gated-Attention demonstriert.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مشکل جواب کردن سوالات طرح کلوز را بر روی مدارک مطالعه می کنیم. مدل ما، خواننده Gated-Attention (GA) یک معماری چندین هوپ را با یک مکانیسم توجه نویسی جمع می\u200cکند که بر روی تعاملات چندین\u200cگونه بین پیوند سوال و وضعیت بین یک خواننده سند شبکه عصبی بازگشت است. این به خواننده اجازه می\u200cدهد که نمایش\u200cهای معجزه\u200cهای مخصوص سوال را در سند برای انتخاب جواب دقیق بسازد. خواننده\u200cی GA، نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را بر سه نقشه\u200cای برای این کار می\u200cگیرد: داستان\u200cهای خبر CNN & Daily Mail و کسانی که کارهای داده\u200cاند. موثرت تعامل multiplicative توسط یک مطالعه فعالیت نمایش می\u200cشود، و با مقایسه کردن با عملکرد ترکیب\u200cکننده\u200cهای جایگزینی برای اجرای توجه جمع شده.', 'tr': "Biz bu kagyzda kloz stili soraglaryň jogaplarynyň üstünde okaýarys. Biziň modelimiz, Gated-Attention Bu okuwçysy hakyky jogaby saýlamak üçin senede spesalik nezirleri bejermek üçin okaýar. GA Okuwçy bu işiň üç sanat sanatynyň durumyny CNN & Daily Mail haberleri we 'Who Did What Data set' hakynda tapylýar. Çarpmadyklyk etkinlik etkinliýeti bir ablasyň tarapyndan görkezilýär we gata üns çekmek üçin başga kompozisyonal operatörlerle karşılaştyryp görkezilýär.", 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunasoma tatizo la kujibu maswali ya aina ya mapumziko kuhusu nyaraka. Mfano wetu, Msomaji wa Gated-Attention (GA), unaunganisha muundo wa ujenzi wa jumba nyingi na mfumo wa kisasa, unaoanzishwa na mahusiano mengi kati ya utafiti huo na majimbo ya kati ya wasomaji wa nyaraka za mtandao wa neurali unaoendelea. Hii inawezesha kusoma kujenga maonyesho maalum ya mahojiano ya ishara katika nyaraka kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa jibu sahihi. The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset.  Ukufanisi wa mahusiano mengi yanaonyeshwa na utafiti wa mabomu, na kwa kulinganisha na wateja mbadala wa viungo kwa kutekeleza vizuri.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ክፍተቶችን የቆይ-ዓይነት ጥያቄዎችን በመመልስ ላይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የጋት-ትዕዛዝ አነባቢያችን፣ በጠያቂው ውይይት እና በመካከለኛው ሀገሮች መካከል የሚቆጠሩ የኔትዎር መረብ ሰነድ አናባቢው በሚያያየው የብዛት ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የጦማር አካባቢ እና የመካከለኛ ሀብት አካባቢ አካባቢ የተገኘውን የብዙ አካውንት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና አካሄድ አካ ሰነድ የGA አነባቢው የ-የ-አርእስት ውጤቶች በሦስት benchmark-the CNN & Daily Mail ዜናዎች እና ማን ያቆየው ዳታ-set. በብዛት ግንኙነት አካባቢ በጥያቄ ትምህርት እና በተለየ ተማሪዎችን ለመፈለግ በተለየ ጥያቄ ተሟጋቾችን በማስተካከል ይታያል፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier studeer ons die probleem van antwoord van klose-styl vrae oor dokumente. Ons model, die Gated-Attention (GA) Leser, integreer 'n multi-hop arkitektuur met 'n novele aandag mekanisme, wat is gebaseer op veelvuldige interaksies tussen die navraag inbêring en die middelste staatste van' n herhaalde neuralnetwerk dokumentleser. Hierdie aktiveer die leser om navraag spesifieke voorstellings van tekens in die dokument te bou vir presies antwoord keuse. Die GA Leser kry status- of- the- art resultate op drie benchmarke vir hierdie taak- die CNN & Daily Mail nuushistories en die Who Did Wat dataset. Die effektiviteit van veelvuldige interaksie is deur 'n ablasie studie te wys, en deur te vergelyk met alternatiewe komposisielle operatore vir die implementering van die gated-aandag.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ক্লোজ-শৈল্পিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করার সমস্যা পড়ি। আমাদের মডেল গেট-Attention (জিএ) পাঠক একটি বহুহাপ প্রতিষ্ঠানের সাথে একটি নবনের মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে একত্রিত করেছেন, যা অনুসন্ধানে প্রবেশ করা এবং পুনরাবর্তন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক নথির পাঠকের মধ এটি সঠিক উত্তর নির্বাচনের জন্য ডকুমেন্টে পাঠককে প্রশ্ন- নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব বানাতে সক্রিয় করে। জিএ পাঠক এই কাজের জন্য তিনটি বেনমার্কের ফলাফল পায়- সিএনএন এবং ডেইলি মেইলের সংবাদ এবং কে ডাটাসেট করেছে। The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda belələr üzərində kloz stili suallarına cavab vermək problemini öyrənirik. Bizim modelimiz, Gated-Attention (GA) Okuyucu, çoxlu-Hop arhitektarını yeni gözləmə mehanizmi ilə birləşdirir. Bu, query içərisində çoxlu müxtəlif ifadələrə dayanılır və bir neyral a ğ döküm oxuyucusunun orta durumlarına dayanılır. Bu, oxuyucunun doğru cevap seçməsi üçün belədəki möcüzələrin məlumatlarını qurmasını qabilleştirir. The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who did What Data set. Çiftli interaksiyanın etkinliğini bir ablasiya çalışması ilə göstərilir, və dəstəklənmək üçün alternatif komposiyonal operatörlərlə qarşılaşdırılır.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem odgovora na pitanja iz stila kloza preko dokumenta. Naš model, čitač Gated-Attention (GA), integrira multihopsku arhitekturu sa novim mehanizam pažnje, koji se temelji na multiplikativnim interakcijama između uključenog zahteva i prosječnih stanja rekonstruiranog čitača neuralne mreže dokumenta. To omogućava čitaču da izgradi specifične predstave znakova u dokumentu za tačni izbor odgovora. Čitač GA-a dobiva rezultate state-of-the-art na tri kritike za ovaj zadatak-CNN & Daily Mail vijesti i koji su napravili kakve podatke. Efikasnost multiplikativne interakcije pokazuje se ispitivanjem ablacije i usporedbom s alternativnim kompozicionalnim operatorima za provedbu prikupljene pažnje.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք փաստաթղթերի հետ կապված հարցերի պատասխանի խնդիրը: Մեր մոդելը, Gated-Ուշադրություն (ԳԱ) կարդացողը ինտեգրում է բազմահոսային ճարտարապետություն նոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ, որը հիմնված է հարցերի ներդրման և կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի փաստաթղթերի կարդացողի միջին վիճակների բազմապատկած փոխազդեցության վրա: Սա թույլ է տալիս կարդացողին կառուցել փաստաթղթի նշանների հարցերի հատուկ ներկայացումներ ճշգրիտ պատասխանների ընտրելու համար: ԳԱ-ի ընթերցողը ստանում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ այս խնդրի երեք համեմատային նպատակներով\' CNN և Daily Post նորությունների պատմություններով և "Ով է անում ինչ տվյալներ": The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime probleemi vastata kloze stiilis küsimustele üle dokumentide. Meie mudel, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integreerib multi-hop arhitektuuri uudse tähelepanumehhanismiga, mis põhineb päringu manustamise ja korduva neurovõrgu dokumendilugeja vahelistel multiplikatiivsetel interaktsioonidel. See võimaldab lugejal luua dokumendis märkide päringupõhiseid esitusi täpse vastuse valimiseks. GA Reader saab selle ülesande kolme võrdluskriteeriumi – CNN & Daily Maili uudiste lugude ja andmekogumi Kes Mida tegi. Multiplikatiivse koostoime efektiivsust tõendab ablatsiooniuuring ja alternatiivsete kompositsioonioperaatorite võrdlus suletud tähelepanu rakendamisel.', 'ca': "En aquest paper estudiem el problema de respondre preguntes d'estil cloze sobre els documents. El nostre model, el llector Gated-Attention (GA), integra una arquitectura multi-hop amb un nou mecanisme d'atenció, basat en interaccions multiplicatives entre l'incorporació de la pregunta i els estats intermedis d'un llector recurrent de documentos de xarxa neural. Això permet que el lector construeixi representacions específices de les fitxes al document per a seleccionar la resposta exacta. The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset.  The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme ongelmaa vastata cloze-tyylisiin kysymyksiin asiakirjojen yli. Mallimme Gated-Attention (GA) -lukija integroi monisäikeisen arkkitehtuurin uudenlaiseen huomiomekanismiin, joka perustuu kyselyn upottamisen ja toistuvan neuroverkon dokumenttielukijan välitilojen multiplikaatiiviseen vuorovaikutukseen. Näin lukija voi luoda kyselykohtaisia esityksiä tunnisteista asiakirjaan tarkan vastauksen valintaa varten. GA Reader saa uusimmat tulokset kolmesta vertailuarvosta: CNN & Daily Mail -uutiset ja Who Did What -aineisto. Multiplikatiivisen vuorovaikutuksen tehokkuus osoitetaan ablaatiotutkimuksella ja vertaamalla vaihtoehtoisiin kompositiivisiin toimijoihin gated-attentionin toteutuksessa.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou odpovědi na otázky cloze-stylu nad dokumenty. Náš model Gated-Attention (GA) Reader integruje multi-hop architekturu s novým mechanismem pozornosti, který je založen na multiplikativních interakcích mezi vložením dotazu a mezistavy recidivující neuronové sítě čtečky dokumentů. To umožňuje čtenáři vytvořit specifické dotazové reprezentace tokenů v dokumentu pro přesný výběr odpovědi. GA Reader získává nejmodernější výsledky tří referenčních měřítek pro tento úkol – příběhů CNN a Daily Mail a datové sady Kdo udělal co. Účinnost multiplikativní interakce je demonstrována ablační studie a porovnáním s alternativními kompozičními operátory pro implementaci gated-pozornosti.', 'sq': 'In this paper we study the problem of answering cloze-style questions over documents.  Our model, the Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrates a multi-hop architecture with a novel attention mechanism, which is based on multiplicative interactions between the query embedding and the intermediate states of a recurrent neural network document reader.  This enables the reader to build query-specific representations of tokens in the document for accurate answer selection.  The GA Reader obtains state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset.  Efektiviteti i ndërveprimit shumëfishues demonstrohet nga një studim ablacioni dhe duke krahasuar me operatorët përbërës alternativë për zbatimin e vëmendjes së portës.', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo problem odgovarjanja na vprašanja v slogu kloze preko dokumentov. Naš model, Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, združuje multi-hop arhitekturo z novim mehanizmom pozornosti, ki temelji na multiplikativnih interakcijah med vgradnjo poizvedbe in vmesnimi stanji ponavljajočega se bralnika dokumentov nevronskega omrežja. To omogoča bralcu, da v dokumentu ustvari prikaze žetonov, specifične za poizvedbo, za natančno izbiro odgovorov. GA Reader pridobi najsodobnejše rezultate na treh referenčnih merilih za to nalogo – novice CNN & Daily Mail in nabor podatkov Kdo je naredil kaj. Učinkovitost multiplikativne interakcije je dokazana s študijo ablacije in primerjavo z alternativnimi kompozicijskimi operaterji za izvajanje zaprte pozornosti.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke karanta matsalar da za'a karɓa wa masu tambayi-tsarin ƙarze kan takardar. Misalinmu, Mai Gangawa (GA), na haɗa wani matsayi na multi-jum mai haɗa matsayin muhalli na yanzu, wanda ke da asanin haɗi masu yawa tsakanin haɗi tsakanin matsayin an ƙunsa da karatun wata takardar jerin na'urar da aka sake koma. Wannan na yarda da mai karatun karatun ya adana wasu shiryoyin ayuka na tambayi-masu ƙayyade cikin takardan da za'a yi amfani da zaɓen karɓan da inganci. @ info: status The effectiveness of multiplicative interaction is demonstrated by an ablation study, and by comparing to alternative compositional operators for implementing the gated-attention.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה אנו לומדים את הבעיה של לענות על שאלות בסגנון כיסוי מעל מסמכים. המודל שלנו, הקורא של תשומת לב (GA), משתלב ארכיטקטורה multi-hop עם מנגנון תשומת לב חדש, שמבוסס על אינטראקציות כפולות בין התכנית של חקירה למדינות הביניים של קריאת מסמכים רשת עצבית חוזרת. זה מאפשר לקרוא לבנות ייצוגים ספציפיים לשאול של סימנים במסמך לבחירת תשובה מדויקת. הקורא הג'י-איי מקבל תוצאות מוקדמות בשלושה נקודות רמז עבור המשימה הזאת - סיפורי חדשות CNN & Daily Mail והמי עשה איזה קבוצת נתונים. יעילות האינטראקציה המרבית מוצגת על ידי מחקר אובלציה, ועל ידי השוואה למפעילים המרכיבים האלטרנטיביים לשימוש תשומת לב השער.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང Our model, the Gated-Attention (GA) Reader, integrates a multi-hop architecture with a novel attention mechanism, which is based on multiplicative interactions between the query embedding and the intermediate states of a recurrent neural network document reader. འདིས་ཡིག་གེ་ལྟ་ཀློག་པ་ལ་སྟངས་བདེན་པར་དབུས་མཐུན་པར་ཡིག་ཆའི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་ཅན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནུས་ཡོད། The GA Reader gets state-of-the-art results on three benchmarks for this task-the CNN & Daily Mail news stories and the Who Did What dataset. འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་འབྱུང་བ་ནི་གནོད་སྡུད་ནི་ལྕོགས་རིམ་གྱི་བརྡ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ཚོར་བ་', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki kita mulai perbudhakan kanggo nambah layang-layang kanggo tukang dokumen model dhéwé, gated-Attance (gam) reader, akeh atawa multi-hol karo nganggo sistem sing dadi sing titik, sing wis basa karo akeh interaksi sing sampek karo ngono intermediate sampek karo sekolahan sing dirampakan akeh online. Digawe The GI reader entuk perusahaan state-of-the-arts dadi telu bench kanggo task-the MT lan dienas mail dadi kanggo nganggo barang dhéwé The WhoDidThe dataset. Efek-efek karjane interaksi sing nggawe nguasar tentang karo aturan kapan kanggo nguasar karo perusahaan sing alih operasi sing gagasar nggo nguasar aturan sing gagasar'}
{'en': 'Determining Gains Acquired from Word Embedding Quantitatively Using Discrete Distribution Clustering', 'ar': 'تحديد المكاسب المكتسبة من التضمين الكمي للكلمة باستخدام تجميع التوزيع المنفصل', 'es': 'Determinación cuantitativa de las ganancias adquiridas de la incrustación de palabras mediante clústeres de distribución discreta', 'fr': "Détermination quantitative des gains acquis grâce à l'intégration de mots à l'aide du clustering de distribution discrète", 'pt': 'Determinando os ganhos adquiridos da incorporação de palavras quantitativamente usando o agrupamento de distribuição discreta', 'ja': '離散ディストリビューションクラスタリングを使用した定量的な単語埋め込みから取得されたゲインの決定', 'zh': '用离分布聚类量定从词嵌入之益', 'hi': 'असतत वितरण क्लस्टरिंग का उपयोग करके मात्रात्मक रूप से Word एम्बेडिंग से प्राप्त लाभ का निर्धारण करना', 'ru': 'Количественное определение коэффициентов усиления, полученных при встраивании слов с использованием кластеризации дискретного распределения', 'ga': 'Gnóthachain Faighte ó Leabú Focal a Leabú go Cainníochtúil Trí Chnuasú Dáilte Scoite a Chinneadh', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრება სიტყვებით დაყენებული სიტყვებით კვანტიტურად გამოყენებული დისკრეტული გაყოფილების კლასტერის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A Word beágyazásából származó nyereségek mennyiségi meghatározása diszkrét elosztási klaszterek használatával', 'el': 'Προσδιορισμός κερδών που αποκτώνται από την ποσοτική ενσωμάτωση λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας τη διακριτική ομαδοποίηση διανομής', 'it': "Determinazione quantitativa dei guadagni acquisiti dall'embedding di Word utilizzando cluster di distribuzione discreta", 'mk': 'Одредување на добивките добиени од вклучувањето на зборови квантитивно користејќи дискретно распределување', 'lt': 'Nustatyti pelną, gautą iš žodžių įterpimo kiekybiškai naudojant diskretą paskirstymo klasifikavimą', 'kk': 'Дискретті үлестіру кластерін қолданатын сөздерді ендіру', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും എംബെഡിങ്ങ് ക്വാന്റിറ്റേറ്റാറ്റിവില്\u200d നിന്നും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഗേനുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറ', 'ms': 'Menentukan Gain Didapatkan Dari Pendekatan Perkataan Menggunakan Pengkumpulan Distribusi Cakera', 'mt': 'Id-determinazzjoni tal-qligħ miksub mill-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem bl-użu kwantitattiv ta’ raggruppament ta’ distribuzzjoni diskreta', 'mn': 'Дискретийн хуваарлалт Клустерийг ашиглах үгнээс авсан газрыг тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Bestemmer forskjellingar motteken frå ord innebygd kvantitett ved bruk av diskrete distribusjonsklassering', 'pl': 'Określanie zysków uzyskanych z osadzania Word ilościowo za pomocą klastra dystrybucji dystrybucji', 'ro': 'Determinarea cantitativă a câștigurilor obținute din încorporarea Word folosind gruparea discretă de distribuție', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje dobitnih dobitnika iz reči uključenih kvantitetno korištenje diskretnog raspodjela', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්', 'so': 'Qiimeynta Gains Acquired from Word Embedding Quantitatively using Discrete Distribution Clustering', 'sv': 'Bestämning av vinster som förvärvats genom Word Embedding kvantitativt med hjälp av diskret distributionskluster', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ویدھی مضبوط ہونے سے پکڑے ہوئے غلبہ مقدار کے مطابق دیسکریت تقسیم کلاسترینگ کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thu thập khuếch đại bắt nguồn từ tĩnh mạch Dùng phân chia riêng', 'bg': 'Определяне на печалбите, придобити от вграждане на думи количествено чрез дискретно разпределение на клъстери', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje dobitnih dobitnika od riječi uključujući kvantitetno korištenje diskretnog raspodjela', 'da': 'Fastsættelse af gevinster opnået ved hjælp af Word Embedding kvantitativt ved hjælp af Diskret Distribution Clustering', 'nl': 'Bepalen van winsten verkregen uit kwantitatieve Word Embedden met behulp van discrete distributie Clustering', 'de': 'Quantitative Ermittlung von Gewinnen aus Word Embedded mithilfe von Diskreten Distribution Clustering', 'id': 'Determining Gains Acquired from Word Embedding Quantitatively Using Discrete Distribution Clustering', 'ko': '이산 분포 집합 법정량으로 단어 삽입의 수익을 확정하다', 'fa': 'تعیین پیروزی که از کلمه وارد شدن کلمه گرفته شده با استفاده از مجموعه توزیع جدید', 'sw': 'Kutambua Mashindano yaliyotokana na neno linalozingatia kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa kutumia Makundi ya Kutenga', 'tr': 'Diskrete Daýratma Clusterinden alan sözden alan Gaýtalary takyklaýar', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i fitimeve të fituara nga përfshirja e fjalëve me përdorim kuantitativ të klasifikimit të shpërndarjes së diskrete', 'af': 'Bepaal Verskaffinge wat van Woord Inbêer Kwantiteit Gebruik Diskrete Verspreiding Clustering', 'am': 'Name', 'bn': 'বিতরণ ক্লাস্টারিং ব্যবহার করে শব্দের এমবেডিং কোয়ান্টিটেভিয়েটিভিয়াল থেকে প্রাপ্ত গ্যান গ্যান নির্ধ', 'az': 'Diskrete Distribution Clustering', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներգրավման արդյունքում ստացված շահույթների որոշումն ըստ որոշումների համեմատական օգտագործման', 'et': 'Sõna manustamisest saadud kasu määramine kvantitatiivselt diskreetse jaotusklastri abil', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje dobitnih dobitnika od riječi uključenih kvantitetno korištenje diskretnog raspodjela', 'ca': "Determinar els guanys aconseguits a l'incorporació de paraules quantitativament utilitzant agrupament de distribució discreta", 'fi': 'Wordin upotuksesta saatujen voittojen määrittäminen määrällisesti diskreettisen jakeluklusteroinnin avulla', 'cs': 'Stanovení zisků získaných z kvantitativního vložení Word pomocí diskrétního clusteru distribuce', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קבענו את הרווחים שנרכשו מהגילוי מילים באמצעות שימוש בכמות באמצעות גילוי פיצוח דיסקרטי', 'sk': 'Določanje dobičkov, pridobljenih s kvantitativnim vdelavo besed z diskretnim distribucijskim grozdom', 'bo': 'གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་བའི་བར་སྟོང་དང་ངེས་པར་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་བར་སྟོང་ཚད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings have become widely-used in document analysis. While a large number of models for mapping words to vector spaces have been developed, it remains undetermined how much net gain can be achieved over traditional approaches based on bag-of-words. In this paper, we propose a new document clustering approach by combining any word embedding with a state-of-the-art algorithm for clustering empirical distributions. By using the Wasserstein distance between distributions, the word-to-word semantic relationship is taken into account in a principled way. The new clustering method is easy to use and consistently outperforms other methods on a variety of data sets. More importantly, the method provides an effective framework for determining when and how much word embeddings contribute to document analysis. Experimental results with multiple embedding models are reported.', 'ar': 'لقد أصبحت حفلات الزفاف كلمة مستخدمة على نطاق واسع في تحليل المستندات. في حين تم تطوير عدد كبير من النماذج لتعيين الكلمات لمساحات المتجهات ، إلا أنه لا يزال غير محدد مقدار الربح الصافي الذي يمكن تحقيقه على الأساليب التقليدية القائمة على مجموعة الكلمات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لتجميع المستندات من خلال دمج أي كلمة مضمنة مع أحدث خوارزمية لتجميع التوزيعات التجريبية. باستخدام مسافة Wasserstein بين التوزيعات ، يتم أخذ العلاقة الدلالية من كلمة إلى كلمة في الاعتبار بطريقة مبدئية. طريقة التجميع الجديدة سهلة الاستخدام وتتفوق باستمرار على الأساليب الأخرى في مجموعة متنوعة من مجموعات البيانات. والأهم من ذلك ، توفر الطريقة إطارًا فعالًا لتحديد متى وكم تساهم عمليات دمج الكلمات في تحليل المستند. تم الإبلاغ عن النتائج التجريبية مع العديد من نماذج التضمين.', 'pt': 'Embeddings de palavras tornaram-se amplamente utilizados na análise de documentos. Embora um grande número de modelos para mapear palavras para espaços vetoriais tenha sido desenvolvido, permanece indeterminado quanto ganho líquido pode ser alcançado em abordagens tradicionais baseadas em bag-of-words. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova abordagem de agrupamento de documentos combinando qualquer incorporação de palavras com um algoritmo de última geração para agrupar distribuições empíricas. Ao usar a distância de Wasserstein entre distribuições, a relação semântica palavra-palavra é levada em consideração de maneira principiológica. O novo método de agrupamento é fácil de usar e supera consistentemente outros métodos em uma variedade de conjuntos de dados. Mais importante, o método fornece uma estrutura eficaz para determinar quando e quanto as incorporações de palavras contribuem para a análise de documentos. Resultados experimentais com vários modelos de incorporação são relatados.', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras se han utilizado ampliamente en el análisis de documentos. Si bien se ha desarrollado un gran número de modelos para mapear palabras a espacios vectoriales, sigue sin determinarse cuánta ganancia neta se puede lograr con respecto a los enfoques tradicionales basados en bolsas de palabras. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo enfoque de agrupación de documentos mediante la combinación de cualquier palabra incrustada con un algoritmo de última generación para agrupar distribuciones empíricas. Al utilizar la distancia de Wasserstein entre distribuciones, la relación semántica palabra a palabra se tiene en cuenta de manera basada en principios. El nuevo método de agrupación en clústeres es fácil de usar y supera sistemáticamente a otros métodos en una variedad de conjuntos de datos. Y lo que es más importante, el método proporciona un marco eficaz para determinar cuándo y en qué medida las incrustaciones de palabras contribuyen al análisis de documentos. Se informan los resultados experimentales con múltiples modelos de incrustación.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots sont de plus en plus utilisées dans l'analyse de documents. Bien qu'un grand nombre de modèles de mappage de mots à des espaces vectoriels aient été développés, on ne sait toujours pas quel gain net peut être réalisé par rapport aux approches traditionnelles basées sur le sac de mots. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle approche de regroupement de documents en combinant n'importe quel inclusion de mots avec un algorithme de pointe pour regrouper des distributions empiriques. En utilisant la distance de Wasserstein entre les distributions, la relation sémantique mot-à-mot est prise en compte d'une manière raisonnée. La nouvelle méthode de clustering est facile à utiliser et surpasse constamment les autres méthodes sur une variété d'ensembles de données. Plus important encore, la méthode fournit un cadre efficace pour déterminer quand et dans quelle mesure les intégrations de mots contribuent à l'analyse de documents. Des résultats expérimentaux avec de multiples modèles d'intégration sont présentés.", 'ja': 'ワード埋め込みは、ドキュメント分析で広く使用されるようになりました。単語をベクトル空間にマッピングするための多数のモデルが開発されているが、単語バッグに基づく従来のアプローチよりもどれだけ純利得を達成できるかは未定である。この論文では、経験的分布をクラスタリングするための最先端のアルゴリズムと任意の単語埋め込みを組み合わせることによって、新しい文書クラスタリングアプローチを提案します。分布間のワッサースタイン距離を用いることで、語間の意味関係を原理的に考慮する。新しいクラスタリング方法は使いやすく、さまざまなデータセットで他の方法よりも一貫して優れています。さらに重要なことに、この方法は、単語埋め込みがいつ、どの程度文書分析に貢献するかを決定するための効果的なフレームワークを提供する。複数の埋め込みモデルの実験結果を報告した。', 'zh': '词嵌已于文档析得广泛应用。 虽已发大将单词映向量空间模样,比之单词囊旧法,可以成多少净益未定。 本文中,新文档聚类一法,嵌入最先进算法,经验分布行聚类。 以布列之Wasserstein相去,以原则性思之单词至单词之语义。 新聚类分析方法易用,而于诸数集上终优于他术。 更要供一效之框架,以定何时及多少词嵌助文档析。 多嵌模实验。', 'hi': 'Word embeddings दस्तावेज़ विश्लेषण में व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किया जाने लगा है. जबकि वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान के लिए शब्दों के मानचित्रण के लिए बड़ी संख्या में मॉडल विकसित किए गए हैं, यह अनिर्धारित रहता है कि बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स के आधार पर पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोणों पर कितना शुद्ध लाभ प्राप्त किया जा सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम अनुभवजन्य वितरण को क्लस्टर करने के लिए एक अत्याधुनिक एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ एम्बेडिंग करने वाले किसी भी शब्द के संयोजन से एक नया दस्तावेज़ क्लस्टरिंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित करते हैं। वितरण के बीच वासेरस्टीन दूरी का उपयोग करके, शब्द-से-शब्द शब्दार्थ संबंध को सैद्धांतिक तरीके से ध्यान में रखा जाता है। नई क्लस्टरिंग विधि का उपयोग करना आसान है और लगातार विभिन्न प्रकार के डेटा सेट पर अन्य विधियों को मात देता है। इससे भी महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि विधि यह निर्धारित करने के लिए एक प्रभावी रूपरेखा प्रदान करती है कि कब और कितने शब्द एम्बेडिंग दस्तावेज़ विश्लेषण में योगदान करते हैं। एकाधिक एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के साथ प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम रिपोर्ट किए जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Вложения слов стали широко использоваться в анализе документов. Хотя было разработано большое число моделей для сопоставления слов с векторными пространствами, остается неопределенным, какой чистый выигрыш может быть достигнут по сравнению с традиционными подходами, основанными на "мешке слов". В этой статье мы предлагаем новый подход к кластеризации документов, объединив вложение любого слова с современным алгоритмом кластеризации эмпирических распределений. Используя расстояние Вассерштейна между дистрибутивами, семантическая связь слово в слово учитывается принципиально. Новый метод кластеризации прост в использовании и неизменно превосходит другие методы на различных наборах данных. Что более важно, этот метод обеспечивает эффективную основу для определения того, когда и в какой степени вложения слов способствуют анализу документов. Представлены экспериментальные результаты с несколькими моделями встраивания.', 'ga': 'Úsáidtear leabaithe focal go forleathan in anailís doiciméad. Cé gur forbraíodh líon mór samhlacha chun focail a mhapáil chuig spásanna veicteora, níl aon chinneadh fós cé mhéad glanghnóthachan is féidir a bhaint amach thar chur chuige traidisiúnta bunaithe ar mhála focal. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige cnuasaithe doiciméad nua trí aon fhocal a leabú a chomhcheangal le algartam úrscothach chun dáiltí eimpíreacha a bhraisliú. Trí úsáid a bhaint as an achar Wasserstein idir dáileacháin, cuirtear an gaol séimeantach focal-go-focal san áireamh ar bhealach prionsabal. Tá an modh cnuasaithe nua éasca le húsáid agus go seasta is fearr leis na modhanna eile ar thacair sonraí éagsúla. Níos tábhachtaí fós, cuireann an modh creat éifeachtach ar fáil chun a chinneadh cathain agus cé mhéad a chuireann leabú focal le hanailís doiciméad. Tuairiscítear torthaí turgnamhacha le samhlacha leabaithe iolracha.', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások széles körben elterjedtek a dokumentum elemzésében. Bár számos modellt fejlesztettek ki a szavak vektortérbe történő leképezésére, még mindig nem határozott, hogy mennyi nettó nyereség érhető el a hagyományos szavak zsákján alapuló megközelítéseknél. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új dokumentumklaszterezési megközelítést javasolunk, amely bármilyen szóbeágyazást kombinál egy korszerű algoritmussal az empirikus eloszlások klaszterezésére. A Wasserstein eloszlások közötti távolság használatával elvi módon figyelembe vesszük a szó-szó szemantikai kapcsolatot. Az új fürtözési módszer könnyen használható, és következetesen felülmúlja a többi módszert különböző adatkészleten. Ami még fontosabb, a módszer hatékony keretet biztosít annak meghatározására, hogy a szóbeágyazások mikor és mennyire járulnak hozzá a dokumentum elemzéséhez. Több beágyazási modellel kapcsolatos kísérleti eredményeket jelentenek.', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων έχουν γίνει ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενες στην ανάλυση εγγράφων. Ενώ έχει αναπτυχθεί μεγάλος αριθμός μοντέλων για τη χαρτογράφηση λέξεων σε διανυσματικούς χώρους, παραμένει άγνωστο πόσο καθαρό κέρδος μπορεί να επιτευχθεί έναντι των παραδοσιακών προσεγγίσεων που βασίζονται σε σάκο λέξεων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση ομαδοποίησης εγγράφων συνδυάζοντας οποιαδήποτε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων με έναν σύγχρονο αλγόριθμο ομαδοποίησης εμπειρικών κατανεμήσεων. Με τη χρήση της απόστασης μεταξύ των διανομών, η σημασιολογική σχέση λέξης-λέξης λαμβάνεται υπόψη με έναν θεμελιώδη τρόπο. Η νέα μέθοδος ομαδοποίησης είναι εύκολη στη χρήση και ξεπερνά σταθερά άλλες μεθόδους σε μια ποικιλία συνόλων δεδομένων. Πιο σημαντικό, η μέθοδος παρέχει ένα αποτελεσματικό πλαίσιο για τον προσδιορισμό του πότε και πόσο συνεισφέρουν οι ενσωμάτωση λέξεων στην ανάλυση εγγράφων. Αναφέρονται πειραματικά αποτελέσματα με πολλαπλά μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის ანალიზაციაში სიტყვების შებრუნებები უფრო გამოყენებულია. მაგრამ განვითარებულია ბევრი მოდელები, რომლებიც გვქტორის სიტყვების მარტიკაციის სიტყვების მარტიკაციისთვის, მან უკვე განვითარებულია თუ რამდენიმე სიტყვების მარტიკაციისთვის მიღ ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ ახალი დოკუმენტის კლასტერის მიღება, რომელიც ყველა სიტყვების შებრუნებით, რომელიც კლასტერიური განყოფილებებისთვის შემდეგ ახალი ალგორიტიმს შებრუნებით. გამოყენებით გასერსტინის განმავლობაში განმავლობაში, სიტყვებით სიმმანტიკური განმავლობა პრინციპულად აღმოჩენა. ახალი კლასტერის მეტი გამოყენება ადვილია და მუშაობელია სხვა მეტისებები განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ. უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, როდესაც და რამდენიმე სიტყვები დამატებულია დოკუმენტის ანალიზაციაში. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები, რამდენიმე მოდელების შემდეგ შემდეგებულია.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole sono diventate ampiamente utilizzate nell'analisi dei documenti. Mentre è stato sviluppato un gran numero di modelli per la mappatura delle parole agli spazi vettoriali, rimane indefinito quanto guadagno netto può essere ottenuto rispetto agli approcci tradizionali basati su bag-of-words. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo approccio di cluster di documenti combinando qualsiasi embedding di parole con un algoritmo all'avanguardia per cluster di distribuzioni empiriche. Utilizzando la distanza Wasserstein tra le distribuzioni, la relazione semantica parola-parola è presa in considerazione in modo principiale. Il nuovo metodo di clustering è facile da usare e supera costantemente altri metodi su una varietà di set di dati. Ancora più importante, il metodo fornisce un quadro efficace per determinare quando e quanto le incorporazioni di parole contribuiscono all'analisi dei documenti. Vengono riportati risultati sperimentali con più modelli di incorporazione.", 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру құжат анализасында көп қолданылады. Бірақ вектор бос орындарына сәйкестіру үлгілерінің көп үлгілері жасалған, ол сөздерге негізделген әдімгі сәйкестіктер арқылы қанша желімді желімдеу үшін шектелмейді. Бұл қағазда, біз империялық дистрибуттарды кластерлеу үшін кез келген сөзді біріктіріп, жаңа құжат кластерлеу тәсілігін қолданамыз. Уасерстейн үлестірімінің арасындағы қашықтығын қолдану арқылы, сөздермен сөздерге семантикалық қатынас негізгі түрде есептеледі. Жаңа кластерлеу әдісі бірнеше деректер жинақтарында қолдану оңай және бірнеше әдістерді шектеп береді. Ең маңызды, әдісі құжат анализасына қанша және қанша сөздерді ендіру үшін анықтау үшін эффективті қоршауын береді. Бірнеше ендіру үлгілерінде эксперименталдық нәтижелер туралы хабарлады.', 'lt': 'Dokumentų analizėje plačiai naudojami žodžių įterpimai. Nors buvo sukurta daug modelių, skirtų žodžių žemėlapiui į vektorių erdves, vis dar neapibrėžta, kiek grynojo pelno galima pasiekti taikant tradicinius metodus, pagrįstus žodžių maišeliu. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują dokumentų klasifikavimo metodą derinant bet kokį žodį su naujausiais empirinių paskirstymų klasifikavimo algoritmais. Naudojant Wassersteino atstumą tarp paskirstymų, iš esmės atsižvelgiama į semantinius santykius žodžiu į žodį. Naujas klasifikavimo metodas lengvas naudoti ir nuosekliai viršija kitus metodus įvairiuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Svarbiausia, metodas suteikia veiksmingą pagrindą nustatyti, kada ir kiek žodžių įtraukimas prisideda prie dokumentų analizės. Pranešama apie eksperimentinius rezultatus, gautus naudojant daugelį įterpimo modelių.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањата на зборови станаа широко употребени во анализата на документите. И покрај тоа што се развиени голем број модели за мапирање на зборовите во векторните простори, останува неодредено колку net to добивка може да се постигне преку традиционалните пристапи базирани на вреќа-зборови. In this paper, we propose a new document clustering approach by combining any word embedding with a state-of-the-art algorithm for clustering empirical distributions.  Со употребата на растојанието од Вашерстејн помеѓу дистрибуциите, семантичната врска збор за збор се зема во предвид на принципичен начин. Новиот метод за групирање е лесен да се користи и постојано ги надминува другите методи на различни податоци. Поважно е, методот обезбедува ефикасна рамка за одредување кога и колку зборовите внесуваат придонес за анализата на документите. Се известуваат експериментални резултати со повеќе модели за вградување.', 'ms': 'Word embeddings have become widely-used in document analysis.  Walaupun sejumlah besar model untuk memetakan perkataan ke ruang vektor telah dikembangkan, ia masih belum ditentukan berapa banyak keuntungan net to boleh dicapai melalui pendekatan tradisional berdasarkan beg-of-words. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan kumpulan dokumen baru dengan menggabungkan mana-mana perkataan yang dipenuhi dengan algoritma state-of-the-art untuk kumpulan distribusi empirik. Dengan menggunakan jarak Wasserstein antara distribusi, hubungan semantik perkataan-perkataan dianggap secara prinsip. The new clustering method is easy to use and consistently outperforms other methods on a variety of data sets.  Yang lebih penting, kaedah ini menyediakan kerangka yang berkesan untuk menentukan bila dan berapa banyak penyambungan perkataan menyumbang kepada analisis dokumen. Keputusan percubaan dengan banyak model penyembedding dilaporkan.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem saret użata ħafna fl-analiżi tad-dokumenti. Filwaqt li ġew żviluppati għadd kbir ta’ mudelli għall-immappjar tal-kliem fl-ispazji tal-vetturi, għadu mhux determinat kemm jista’ jinkiseb qligħ nett fuq approċċi tradizzjonali bbażati fuq borża ta’ kliem. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid ta’ raggruppament ta’ dokumenti billi nikkombinaw kwalunkwe kelma inkorporata ma’ algoritmu avvanzat għall-raggruppament ta’ distribuzzjonijiet empiriċi. Billi tintuża d-distanza ta’ Wasserstein bejn id-distribuzzjonijiet, ir-relazzjoni semantika kelma għal kelma titqies b’mod prinċipjat. Il-metodu l-ġdid ta’ raggruppament huwa faċli biex jintuża u b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż metodi oħra fuq varjetà ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta. Aktar importanti minn hekk, il-metodu jipprovdi qafas effettiv biex jiġi ddeterminat meta u kemm l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem jikkontribwixxu għall-analiżi tad-dokumenti. Experimental results with multiple embedding models are reported.', 'ml': 'Word embeddings have become widely-used in document analysis.  വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിനുകളിലേക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരുപാട് മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ രേഖയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്ന രേഖയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിയിടു വിതരണ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വാസ്സെര്\u200dസ്റ്റീന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാക്ക് മുതല്\u200d വാക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മുന്\u200d വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d മറ്റു രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാനും പുതിയ ക്ലസ്റ്റര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങ് രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രവര കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, രീതിയില്\u200d എപ്പോഴും എപ്പോഴാണ് അകത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതെന്നും തീരുമാന പല ഇങ്ങോട്ടിങ് മോഡലുകളുമായി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'no': 'Tekstinnbygging har blitt vast brukt i dokumentanalisering. Mens ein stor tal modeller for mapping av ord til vektormellomrom er utvikla, er det ikkje avslutta kor mykje nettverkspøking kan oppnå over tradisjonelle tilnærmingar basert på sak av ord. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny dokumentklasteringstilnærming ved å kombinere alle ord som innebygger med ein kunstalgoritme for å klassera empiriske distribusjonar. Ved å bruka Wasserstein-avstanden mellom distribusjonar, vert det semantiske forhold til ordet til ordet henta til konto på ein prinsippet måte. Den nye klasseringsmetoden er lett å bruka og konsistentvis utfører andre metodar på ulike datasett. Dette metoden gjev eit effektivt rammeverk for å bestemme når og kor mykje ord innebygging bidrar til dokumentanalisering. Eksperimentale resultat med fleire innbyggingsmodeller vert rapportert.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн шинжилгээнд үг нэвтрүүлэлт ашиглаж байна. Хэдийгээр вектор орон зайд хэд хэдэн үгийг зураг зураг хийх загварууд хөгжигдсэн ч энэ нь яг хэд хэмжээний уламжлалтын арга загваруудын тулд хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эмэгтэйчүүдийн хуваарилалтын төвшин алгоритмыг нэгтгэхэд шинэ баримт бүрдүүлэх арга замыг санал болгодог. Уасерстейн хуваарилалтын хоорондын зай ашигласнаар тэр үг-үг хэлэхэд семантик харилцаа нь үндсэн арга юм. Шинэ кластерингийн арга нь олон төрлийн өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр ашиглах амархан болон үргэлж өөр арга замыг дамжуулдаг. Хамгийн чухал нь энэ арга нь баримт шинжилгээнд хэр болон хэдэн үгийг нэмэгдүүлэхийг тодорхойлох эффективний системийг хангадаг. Ихэнх төвлөрүүлэх загваруудын туршилтын үр дүнг мэддэг.', 'pl': 'Osadzania słów słowa stały się szeroko stosowane w analizie dokumentów. Chociaż opracowano dużą liczbę modeli mapowania słów do przestrzeni wektorowej, pozostaje nieokreślone, ile zysku netto można osiągnąć w stosunku do tradycyjnych podejść opartych na worku-of-words. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowe podejście do klastrowania dokumentów poprzez łączenie dowolnego osadzenia słów z najnowocześniejszym algorytmem klastrowania dystrybucji empirycznych. Wykorzystując odległość Wasserstteina między rozkładami, w sposób zasadniczy uwzględnia się relację semantyczną słowo-słowo. Nowa metoda klastrowania jest łatwa w użyciu i konsekwentnie przewyższa inne metody na różnych zbiorach danych. Co ważniejsze, metoda ta stanowi skuteczne ramy do określenia, kiedy i ile osadzenia słów przyczyniają się do analizy dokumentów. Raportowane są wyniki eksperymentalne z wieloma modelami osadzania.', 'ro': 'Încorporările Word au devenit utilizate pe scară largă în analiza documentelor. Deși au fost dezvoltate un număr mare de modele pentru cartografierea cuvintelor în spații vectoriale, rămâne nedeterminat cât de mult câștig net poate fi obținut în raport cu abordările tradiționale bazate pe sac-of-words. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă abordare a clusterizării documentelor prin combinarea oricărui cuvânt încorporat cu un algoritm de ultimă generație pentru clusterizarea distribuțiilor empirice. Prin utilizarea distanței Wasserstein dintre distribuții, relația semantică cuvânt-la-cuvânt este luată în considerare într-un mod principial. Noua metodă de clusterizare este ușor de utilizat și depășește în mod constant alte metode pe o varietate de seturi de date. Mai important, metoda oferă un cadru eficient pentru a determina când și cât de mult încorporările de cuvinte contribuie la analiza documentelor. Sunt raportate rezultate experimentale cu mai multe modele de încorporare.', 'sr': 'Uključenje reèi se široko koristilo u analizi dokumenta. Iako je razvijen veliki broj modela za mapiranje reèi na vektorske prostore, ostaje neodređen koliko može dobiti mrežu zbog tradicionalnih pristupa na temelju torbe reèi. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup skupljanjem dokumenta kombiniranjem svake reči uključujući se sa državnim algoritmom umetnosti za skupljanje empiričkih distribucija. Koristeći Wasserstein udaljenost između distribucija, semantička odnosa riječi do riječi se uzima u obzir na način način a. Novi metod skupljanja je lako iskoristiti i konsekventno iznosi druge metode na raznim setima podataka. Najvažnije, metod pruža efikasni okvir za određivanje kada i koliko riječi uključuju u analizu dokumenta. Prijavljeni su eksperimentalni rezultati sa višestrukim modelima uključenih.', 'so': "Heshiiska hadalka waxaa lagu isticmaalay baaritaanka dokumenta. Inta lagu jiro tusaalooyin badan oo ku qoran sawirro-sawiraad oo ay ku qoran sawiraan meelaha wadiiqooyinka, waxay sii socon kartaa mid aan la caddeyn karo inta ka badan faa'iidada shabakadda ee qaababka caadiga ah oo ku saleysan hadalka. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedinnaa warqad cusub oo ku qoran qaab cusub oo lagu soo bandhigi karo hadal kasta oo ku qoran qoraalka qoraalka farshaxanka ah oo ku qoran qayb-qaybinta. Sida lagu isticmaalo Wasserstein goobta kala qaybsan, xiriirka hadalka ee semantika ah waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa sida ugu horeeya. Midabka cusub oo la soo saari karo waa fudud in la isticmaalo oo la sii wado qaabooyin kale oo lagu soo bandhigi karo sawirada macluumaadka kala duduwan. Inta ugu muhiimsan ah, qaabku wuxuu bixiyaa koob faa’iido leh oo ku qoran goorma iyo intee ka mid ah hadal ku soo wareegsanu ku faa’iido baaritaanka qoraalka. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu soo sheegaa samooyin kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar har blivit allmänt förekommande i dokumentanalys. Även om ett stort antal modeller för att kartlägga ord till vektorrum har utvecklats, är det fortfarande obestämt hur mycket nettovinst som kan uppnås jämfört med traditionella metoder baserade på säck-of-words. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny metod för klustring av dokument genom att kombinera alla ord inbäddning med en state-of-the-art algoritm för klustring av empiriska distributioner. Genom att använda Wassersteins avstånd mellan distributioner beaktas det ord-till-ord semantiska förhållandet på ett principiellt sätt. Den nya klustringsmetoden är enkel att använda och överträffar konsekvent andra metoder på en mängd olika datauppsättningar. Ännu viktigare är att metoden ger ett effektivt ramverk för att avgöra när och hur mycket ordinbäddningar bidrar till dokumentanalys. Experimentella resultat med flera inbäddningsmodeller rapporteras.', 'ta': 'ஆவணத்தை ஆராய்வில் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்கள் அகலமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. வெக்டார் இடைவெளிகளுக்கான வரைப்படத்தின் வார்த்தைகளுக்கு பெரிய மாதிரிகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது In this paper, we propose a new document clustering approach by combining any word embedding with a state-of-the-art algorithm for clustering empirical distributions.  விபங்கீடுகளுக்கிடையில் வாச்செர்ஸ்டீன் தூரத்தை பயன்படுத்தி, வார்த்தையில் இருந்து பெம்மென்டிக் தொடர்பு மு புதிய உறுப்பும் முறைமை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு எளிதாகும் மற்றும் முறையாக மற்ற முறைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது பல தரவு அமை முக்கியமாக, இந்த முறைமை எப்போது மற்றும் எவ்வளவு வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கும் பொருட்கள் ஆவணத்தை ஆய்வு செய்யும் பொருட்களை  பல்வேறு உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகளுடன் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் அறிவிக்கப்படுகின்றன.', 'si': 'වචන සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් විස්තරයෙන් විස්තර කරලා තියෙනවා. වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානයේ වචන සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානයේ වචන සැකසුම් සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dරම මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් ලිපිණියක් සංවිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචනයක් සංවිධානය කරන්න. වැස්සෙර්ස්ටින් විතරයෙන් අතර විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, වචනයෙන් වචනය විතරයෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරධ අළුත් ක්ලොස්ටර් විධානය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් දත්ත සැට් වලට අනිත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරවර වඩා වැදගත් විදියට, විදියට විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයට කොයි වචනයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා තීර්ණාකරණ ගොඩක් ඇම්බෙන්ඩ් මොඩල් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා.', 'ur': 'Word embedding has been widely used in document analysis. حالانکہ ویکتور جگہ کے لئے کلمات مکاپیٹ کرنے کے لئے بہت سی موڈل تکامل کی گئی ہے، اس کا مطلب نہیں معلوم ہوتا کہ کلمات کے بغل پر بنیاد رکھنے والی سنتی طریقے پر کتنی نٹ فائدہ پہنچ سکتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی دفتر کلسٹر کی طرح پیشنهاد کریں گے کہ ہر کلام کو کلسٹر کی تقسیم کے لئے آلگریٹم کے ساتھ جمع کریں۔ ویس رسٹین کے فاصلہ کے مطابق تقسیم کے درمیان فاصلہ کے ذریعہ، کلمات سے کلمات سیمانتی رابطہ ایک اصل طریقہ سے حساب لیا جاتا ہے۔ نوی کلسٹرینگ طریقہ استعمال کرنے کے لئے آسان ہے اور ایک طریقہ طریقے سے دوسرے طریقے سے کام نہیں لیتے۔ زیادہ اہم بات ہے، یہ طریقہ ایک قابل فیصلہ چوکاٹ دیتا ہے کہ کس وقت اور کس طرح کلمات ابڈینگ ڈوکینٹ تحلیل میں اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ بہت سی انڈینگ موڈل کے ساتھ تجربے کے نتائج گزارے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Comment Name Bu qogʻozda, biz bir yangi qogʻoz qoʻllanmalarni tasdiqlashni tasdiqlash uchun bir so'zni o'zgartirish jarayonligini birlashtirish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis The new clustering method is easy to use and consistently outperforms other methods on a variety of data sets.  Muhimlik darajada, bu usul qoʻllanmalarni qancha soʻz va qancha soʻzni ajratishga qoʻllaniladi. Name", 'vi': 'Từ ngữ được sử dụng rộng rãi trong phân tích tài liệu. Tuy đã được phát triển một số mô hình về việc vẽ bản đồ từ lên các khoảng vector, nhưng vẫn chưa xác định được bao nhiêu lợi nhuận lưới có thể đạt được qua các phương pháp truyền thống dựa trên túi chữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tụ tập tài liệu mới bằng cách kết hợp mọi từ tham gia cùng thuật toán hiện đại cho các phân phát triển. Sử dụng khoảng cách Wassersstein giữa phân phát, nghĩa-đối-từ ngữ ngữ ngữ phải được cân nhắc theo một cách có nguyên tắc. Cách gắn kết mới rất dễ sử dụng và hoàn thiện các phương pháp khác nhau trên nhiều nhóm dữ liệu. Quan trọng hơn, phương pháp cung cấp một cơ sở hiệu quả để xác định khi nào và bao nhiêu sự nhúng vào từ đóng góp để phân tích tài liệu. Kết quả thử nghiệm với các mô hình gồm nhiều lần.', 'bg': 'Вградените думи са широко използвани в анализа на документи. Въпреки че са разработени голям брой модели за картографиране на думи към векторни пространства, остава неопределено колко нетна печалба може да бъде постигната при традиционните подходи, базирани на торба с думи. В тази статия ние предлагаме нов подход за клъстериране на документи чрез комбиниране на всяка дума вграждане с най-модерен алгоритъм за клъстериране на емпирични разпределения. Чрез използване на разстоянието между разпределенията, семантичната връзка дума-дума се взема предвид по принципен начин. Новият метод на клъстериране е лесен за използване и последователно превъзхожда други методи в различни набори от данни. По-важното е, че методът осигурява ефективна рамка за определяне кога и колко вграждането на думи допринася за анализа на документи. Докладвани са експериментални резултати с множество вградени модели.', 'nl': 'Woordinsluitingen worden veel gebruikt in documentanalyse. Hoewel een groot aantal modellen voor het in kaart brengen van woorden naar vectorruimten is ontwikkeld, blijft onbepaald hoeveel nettowinst kan worden bereikt ten opzichte van traditionele benaderingen gebaseerd op zak-of-woorden. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe documentclustering benadering voor door elke woord embedding te combineren met een state-of-the-art algoritme voor clustering empirische distributies. Door gebruik te maken van de Wasserstein afstand tussen distributies, wordt op principiële wijze rekening gehouden met de woord-tot-woord semantische relatie. De nieuwe clusteringsmethode is eenvoudig te gebruiken en presteert consistent beter dan andere methoden op verschillende gegevenssets. Belangrijker nog is dat de methode een effectief kader biedt om te bepalen wanneer en hoeveel woord embeddings bijdragen aan documentanalyse. Experimentele resultaten met meerdere embedding modellen worden gerapporteerd.', 'hr': 'Uključenje riječi postalo je široko korišteno u analizi dokumenta. Iako je razvijen veliki broj modela za mapiranje riječi na vektorske prostore, ostaje neodređen koliko može dobiti mrežu zbog tradicionalnih pristupa na temelju torbe riječi. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup skupljanjem dokumenta kombiniranjem svih riječi uključujući se s državnim algoritmom umjetnosti za skupljanje empiričkih distribucija. Koristeći udaljenost Wasserstein između distribucija, semantička odnosa riječi do riječi uzima se u obzir na način način a. Novi metod skupljanja je lako koristiti i konsekventno iznosi druge metode na raznim setima podataka. Što je važnije, metoda pruža učinkoviti okvir za određivanje kada i koliko riječi uključuju u analizu dokumenta. Prijavljeni su eksperimentalni rezultati sa višestrukim modelima uključenih.', 'da': 'Word-indlejringer er blevet meget udbredt i dokumentanalyse. Mens der er udviklet et stort antal modeller til kortlægning af ord til vektorrum, er det stadig ubestemt, hvor meget nettogevinst der kan opnås i forhold til traditionelle tilgange baseret på sæk af ord. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny dokumentklynge tilgang ved at kombinere ethvert ord indlejring med en state-of-the-art algoritme til klynge empiriske distributioner. Ved at bruge Wasserstein-afstanden mellem fordelingerne tages det ord-til-ord semantiske forhold i betragtning på en principiel måde. Den nye klyngemetode er nem at bruge og overgår konsekvent andre metoder på en række datasæt. Endnu vigtigere er, at metoden giver en effektiv ramme til at bestemme, hvornår og hvor meget ordindlejringer bidrager til dokumentanalyse. Eksperimentelle resultater med flere integreringsmodeller rapporteres.', 'de': 'Word-Einbettungen sind in der Dokumentenanalyse weit verbreitet. Obwohl eine große Anzahl von Modellen zur Zuordnung von Wörtern zu Vektorräumen entwickelt wurde, bleibt unbestimmt, wie viel Nettogewinn gegenüber herkömmlichen Ansätzen auf Basis von Wortbeuteln erzielt werden kann. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuen Dokumentenclustering-Ansatz vor, indem wir jede Worteinbettung mit einem hochmodernen Algorithmus zur Clusterung empirischer Verteilungen kombinieren. Durch die Verwendung der Wasserstein-Distanz zwischen Verteilungen wird die Wort-zu-Wort-semantische Beziehung prinzipiell berücksichtigt. Die neue Clustering-Methode ist einfach zu bedienen und übertrifft konsequent andere Methoden auf einer Vielzahl von Datensätzen. Noch wichtiger ist, dass die Methode einen effektiven Rahmen bietet, um festzustellen, wann und wie viel Worteinbettungen zur Dokumentenanalyse beitragen. Es werden experimentelle Ergebnisse mit mehreren Einbettungsmodellen berichtet.', 'id': 'Penampilan kata telah menjadi luas-digunakan dalam analisis dokumen. Sementara banyak model untuk memetakan kata-kata ke ruang vektor telah dikembangkan, masih belum ditentukan berapa banyak keuntungan neto dapat dicapai melalui pendekatan tradisional berdasarkan tas-kata. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan berkumpulan dokumen baru dengan menggabungkan kata-kata yang terbenam dengan algoritma terbaik untuk berkumpulan distribusi empiris. Dengan menggunakan jarak Wasserstein antara distribusi, hubungan semantis kata-kata dianggap dianggap secara prinsip. Metode clustering baru mudah digunakan dan secara konsisten melampaui metode lain pada berbagai set data. Yang lebih penting, metode ini menyediakan rangkaian yang efektif untuk menentukan kapan dan berapa banyak penerbangan kata berkontribusi untuk analisis dokumen. Hasil eksperimen dengan banyak model embedding dilaporkan.', 'ko': '단어가 문서 분석에 삽입되어 광범위하게 응용되었다.단어를 벡터 공간에 비추는 모델을 대량으로 개발했지만 패키지 기반의 전통적인 방법에 비해 얼마나 많은 순수익을 얻을 수 있을지 불확실하다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 문서 분류 방법을 제시하여 임의의 단어를 삽입하여 가장 선진적인 경험 분포 분류 알고리즘과 결합시켰다.분포 사이의 Wasserstein 거리를 사용하여 단어와 단어 간의 의미 관계를 원칙적으로 고려했다.새로운 분류 방법은 사용하기 쉬워서 각종 데이터 집합에서 다른 방법보다 우수하다.더 중요한 것은 워드가 어느 정도에 문서 분석에 도움이 되는지, 워드가 어느 정도에 문서 분석에 도움이 되는지 확인하는 것이다.여러 개의 모형에 박힌 실험 결과를 보도했다.', 'fa': 'استفاده کردن کلمات در تحلیل سند گسترده شده است. در حالی که تعداد زیادی از مدل برای نقشه کردن کلمات به فضای ویکتور توسعه داده شده است، آن باقی مانده است که چقدر کمک شبکه می تواند بر روی دسترسی های سنتی بر اساس کیف کلمات رسیده شود. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دستور جدید جمع کردن سند با جمع کردن هر کلمه که با یک الگوریتم موقعیت هنر برای تقسیم امپریکی است. با استفاده از فاصله Wasserstein بین تقسیم، رابطه\u200cهای semantic به کلمه به عنوان یک روش اصلی به حساب گرفته می\u200cشود. روش کلاستر جدید برای استفاده از آن آسان است و همیشه روش\u200cهای دیگر را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف انجام می\u200cدهد. مهمتر است که این روش یک چهارچوب موثری برای تعیین کردن زمانی و چقدر کلمه وارد شدن به تحلیل سند حاصل می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه با مدل\u200cهای متعدد وارد شدن گزارش می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maneno yametumiwa sana katika uchambuzi wa nyaraka. Wakati idadi kubwa ya mifano kwa ajili ya ramani ya maneno kwa ajili ya maeneo ya vector imeendelea, bado haina ufahamu wa kiasi gani cha upatikanaji wa mtandao unaweza kupatikana kwa zaidi ya mbinu za kitamaduni zinazohusiana na mfumo wa maneno. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza nyaraka mpya yenye msimamo mkali kwa kuunganisha neno lolote linalojumuisha na utaratibu wa hali ya sanaa kwa kushinikiza usambazaji wa msimamo mkali. Kwa kutumia Wasserstein umbali kati ya usambazaji, uhusiano wa maneno na maneno unachukuliwa katika njia ya msingi. Utawala mpya wa kuunganisha ni rahisi kutumia na kuendelea kutengeneza njia nyingine katika seti mbalimbali za data. Kimuhimu zaidi, mbinu hiyo inatoa mfumo wa ufanisi wa kuamua lini na namna gani maneno yanavyotumia uchambuzi wa nyaraka. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaripotiwa na mifano mingi yanayotumiwa.', 'sq': 'Fjalët janë përdorur gjerësisht në analizën e dokumentit. Ndërsa është zhvilluar një numër i madh modelesh për hartimin e fjalëve në hapësirat vektore, mbetet e pacaktuar sa fitim neto mund të arrihet mbi qasjet tradicionale bazuar në çantë fjalësh. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re të grupimit të dokumentit duke kombinuar çdo fjalë të përfshirë me një algoritëm më të lartë për grupimin e shpërndarjeve empirike. Duke përdorur distancën Wasserstein midis shpërndarjeve, marrëdhënia semantike fjalë-fjalë merret në konsideratë në një mënyrë të parim. Metoda e re e grupimit është e lehtë për të përdorur dhe ekziston në mënyrë të vazhdueshme më shumë se metodat e tjera në një shumëllojshmëri të grupeve të dhënash. Më e rëndësishme, metoda ofron një kuadër efektiv për të përcaktuar kur dhe sa fjalë përfshirje kontribuojnë në analizën e dokumentit. Janë raportuar rezultate eksperimentale me modele të shumta përfshirjesh.', 'tr': 'Sened analizinde ullanylşylar Bir sürü modeller vektör uzayla mapping kelimeleri geliştirildiğinde, on çası kelimelere dayanan geleneksel yaklaşımlar üzerinde näçe kazanabileceğini kesin edilmedi. Bu kagyzda, empirik daýlamak üçin bir sanat algoritmi bilen birleşerek täze bir sened çarpma ýazşyny teklip edýäris. Wasserstein daýratynyň arasyndaky uzakdygyny ulanyp, semantik sözleri prinsipli ýolça çykarylýar. Täze klasterlemek hili ulanmak a ňsat we munuň üstünde birnäçe maglumat setirlerinde başga yönlerden çykar. Dahili möhüm bolsa, metin sened analýusine näçe we näçe söz ekleýändigini takyklamak üçin etkinlik bir çerçewçiliki temin edýär. Birden köp daşary nusgalar bilen netijeleri rapor edilýär.', 'af': "Woord inbettings word vaste gebruik in dokumentanaliseer. Terwyl 'n groot aantal modele vir mapering woorde na vektor spasies is ontwikkeld, bly dit onbepaalde hoeveel net verkry kan bereik word oor tradisionele toepassings gebaseer op sak van woorde. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe dokument klastering toegang deur enige woord met 'n staat-van-die-kuns algoritme te kombinieer om empiriese verspreidings te clustereer. Deur die Wasserstein afstand tussen verspreidings te gebruik, word die woord-na-woord semantiese verhouding in rekening aangeneem op 'n vorderde manier. Die nuwe klastering metode is maklik om te gebruik en konsistentlik ander metodes te uitvoer op 'n verskillende data stel. Die metode verskaf 'n effektief raamwerk vir bepaal wanneer en hoeveel woord inbêding bydra tot dokumentanalisie. Eksperimentale resultate met veelvuldige inbetering modele word raporteer.", 'am': 'የሰነድ አቀማመጥ ምንም እንኳን ለዋና-ቃላት ለመስመር ቃላት መዘርጋት የሚደረጉት ብዙዎች ምሳሌዎች በተለየ ጊዜ፣ በዋጋው-ቃላት በመጠቀም የባሕላዊ ቃላት መጠቀሚያ እንዴት ትልቅ መረብ እንዲደርስ አያውቅም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት አዲስ ሰነድ አካባቢ እናስቸጋራለን፡፡ የአሳርስቴን ግንኙነት በመጠቀም ቃላትን ለቃላት የsemantic ግንኙነት በመጀመሪያ መንገድ ይቆጠራል፡፡ አዲስ መስኮት ማሰናከል በተለያዩ የዳታ መስመር ላይ ሌሎችን ሥርዓቶች ለመጠቀም ቀላል ነው፡፡ More importantly, the method provides an effective framework for determining when and how much word embeddings contribute to document analysis.  የሞከሩ ውጤቶች በብዙ አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች ላይ ተደርጓል፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներառումները տարածաբար օգտագործվել են փաստաթղթերի վերլուծության մեջ: While a large number of models for mapping words to vector spaces have been developed, it remains undetermined how much net gain can be achieved over traditional approaches based on bag-of-words.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր փաստաթղթի խմբավորման մոտեցում, համադրելով ցանկացած բառ ամենաբարձր ալգորիթմի հետ էմպրիկական տարածումների խմբավորման համար: Օգտագործելով Վասերշտեյնի տարածումների միջև եղած հեռավորությունը, բառի առ բառի սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները հաշվի առվում են հիմնական ձևով: Նոր խմբավորումների մեթոդը հեշտ է օգտագործել և համեմատաբար արտադրում է այլ մեթոդներ տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Ամենակարևոր է, որ մեթոդը ապահովում է արդյունավետ հիմք, որպեսզի որոշենք, թե երբ և ինչքանով են բառերը ներդրվում փաստաթղթերի վերլուծության մեջ: Հետևում են բազմաթիվ ներգրավված մոդելների փորձարկման արդյունքներին:', 'az': 'Sözlük in şalları dökümət analizində geniş işlədilər. Vektör uzaqlarına maplama sözlərinin çox modellərin təhsil edildiyi halda, bu sözlərin torpağına dayanan neçə qədər a ğ əlaqəsi nəticə edilə bilər? Bu kağızda, empirik dağıtımların müəyyən edilməsi üçün bütün sözləri birləşdirərək yeni bir döküm clustering approach təklif edirik. Vasserstein ayrılıqların arasındakı uzaqlaşmasını istifadə edərək, sözlərə semantik ilişkisi ilk dəfə hesablanır. Yeni clustering metodu istifadə etmək asandır və müxtəlif məlumat setlərində başqa metodları daha çox istifadə edir. Daha çox önemlidir, metod döküm analizinə nə vaxt və nə qədər söz içərisində kömək edir. Müxtəlif inşa modelləri ilə təcrübə sonuçları rapor edilir.', 'bn': 'Word embeddings have become widely-used in document analysis.  যেখানে ভেক্টর স্পেসের মানচিত্রের জন্য বিশাল কয়েকটি মডেল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে, তবে ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক প্রথাগত উপায়ের উপরে এট এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন নথিপত্রের প্রস্তাব করছি যেকোন শব্দের সাথে যোগাযোগ করা হয়েছে সামর্থ্য বিতরণের ক্ষেত্রে প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য। বিতরণের মধ্যে ব্যবহার করে ওয়াসের্স্টেইনের দূরত্ব ব্যবহার করে, শব্দ থেকে শব্দের সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্কের প্রধান ভাবে বিবেচন নতুন ক্লাস্টারিং পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা সহজ এবং সাধারণত বিভিন্ন ধরনের ডাটা সেটে অন্যান্য পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করা সহজ। আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, এই পদ্ধতি নথির বিশ্লেষণের জন্য কার্যকর কার্যকর কার্যক্রম প্রদান করে। বেশ কয়েকটি এমডেডিং মডেল দিয়ে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Vložení slov se stalo široce používané v analýze dokumentů. Zatímco bylo vyvinuto velké množství modelů pro mapování slov do vektorových prostorů, zůstává neurčeno, kolik čistého zisku lze dosáhnout oproti tradičním přístupům založeným na sáčku slov. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový přístup k clusterování dokumentů kombinující libovolné vložení slov s nejmodernějším algoritmem pro clusterování empirických distribucí. Použitím Wassersteinovy vzdálenosti mezi distribucemi je zásadním způsobem zohledněn sémantický vztah slova-slova. Nová metoda clusterování je snadno použitelná a konzistentně překonává ostatní metody v různých datových sadách. Co je důležitější, metoda poskytuje efektivní rámec pro určení, kdy a kolik slov vložení přispívá k analýze dokumentů. Jsou uvedeny experimentální výsledky s více modely vkládání.', 'et': 'Wordi manustamine on muutunud dokumendianalüüsis laialdaselt kasutatavaks. Kuigi on välja töötatud suur hulk mudeleid sõnade vektoriruumidesse kaardistamiseks, ei ole veel kindlaks määratud, kui palju on võimalik saavutada traditsiooniliste sõnakotidel põhinevate lähenemisviiside puhul. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue dokumendiklastrite lähenemisviisi, kombineerides mis tahes sõna manustamist tipptasemel algoritmiga empiiriliste jaotuste klastrite jaotamiseks. Kasutades Wassersteini kaugust jaotuste vahel, võetakse sõna-sõna semantilist seost arvesse põhimõtteliselt. Uus klastrimeetod on lihtne kasutada ja see on järjepidevalt suurem kui muud meetodid erinevates andmekogumites. Veelgi olulisem on see, et meetod pakub tõhusat raamistikku, et määrata kindlaks, millal ja kui palju sõnade manustamine dokumendianalüüsile kaasa aitab. Esitatakse mitme manustamismudeli katsetulemused.', 'fi': 'Wordin upotukset ovat tulleet laajalti käyttöön asiakirjojen analysoinnissa. Vaikka useita malleja sanojen yhdistämiseksi vektoriavaruuksiin on kehitetty, on edelleen epäselvää, kuinka paljon nettovoittoa voidaan saavuttaa perinteisillä sanoihin perustuvilla lähestymistavoilla. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta asiakirjaklusterointitapaa yhdistämällä minkä tahansa sanan upottamisen nykyaikaiseen algoritmiin empiiristen jakaumien klusterointiin. Jakelujen välistä Wassersteinin etäisyyttä käyttämällä huomioidaan sana sanaan semanttinen suhde periaatteellisesti. Uusi klusterimenetelmä on helppokäyttöinen ja toimii johdonmukaisesti muita menetelmiä paremmin erilaisissa tietosarjoissa. Mikä tärkeintä, menetelmä tarjoaa tehokkaan kehyksen määrittämään, milloin ja kuinka paljon sanaupotukset edistävät asiakirjojen analysointia. Kokeelliset tulokset useilla upotusmalleilla raportoidaan.', 'ca': "L'incorporació de paraules s'ha utilitzat ampliament en l'anàlisi dels documentos. While a large number of models for mapping words to vector spaces have been developed, it remains undetermined how much net gain can be achieved over traditional approaches based on bag-of-words.  En aquest paper, proposem un nou enfocament agrupant documentos combinant qualsevol paraula incorporada amb un algoritme d'última generació per agrupar distribucions empíriques. Utilitzant la distància Wasserstein entre distribucions, la relació semàntica de paraula a paraula es tenia en compte d'una manera de principi. El nou mètode d'agrupament és fàcil d'utilitzar i contínuament supera altres mètodes en una varietat de conjunts de dades. El més important és que el mètode proporciona un marc eficaç per determinar quan i quanta integració de paraules contribueix a l'an àlisi de documents. S'informen de resultats experimentals amb múltiples models d'integració.", 'bs': 'Uključenje riječi postalo je široko korišteno u analizi dokumenta. Iako je razvijen veliki broj modela za mapiranje riječi do vektorskih prostora, ostaje neodređen koliko može dobiti mrežu zbog tradicionalnih pristupa na temelju torbe riječi. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup skupljanjem dokumenta kombiniranjem svake riječi uključujući se sa državnim algoritmom umjetnosti za skupljanje empiričkih distribucija. Koristeći udaljenost Wasserstein između distribucije, semantička veza riječi do riječi uzima u obzir na način način a. Novi metod skupljanja je lako iskoristiti i konsekventno iznosi druge metode na raznim setima podataka. Najvažnije, metoda pruža efikasni okvir za određivanje kada i koliko riječi ugrađenja doprinose analizi dokumenta. Prijavljeni su eksperimentalni rezultati sa višestrukim modelima uključenih.', 'sk': 'Vgradnje besed so postale pogosto uporabljene v analizi dokumentov. Medtem ko je bilo razvitih veliko število modelov za mapiranje besed v vektorske prostore, ostaja nedoločeno, koliko neto dobička je mogoče doseči s tradicionalnimi pristopi, ki temeljijo na vrečki besed. V prispevku predlagamo nov pristop grozdenja dokumentov s kombinacijo vsake vdelave besed z najsodobnejšim algoritmom za grozdenje empiričnih distribucij. Z uporabo Wassersteinove razdalje med porazdelitvami se načelno upošteva semantično razmerje med besedo in besedo. Nova metoda grozdja je enostavna za uporabo in dosledno presega druge metode na različnih naborih podatkov. Najpomembnejše je, da metoda zagotavlja učinkovit okvir za določanje, kdaj in koliko vdelave besed prispevajo k analizi dokumentov. Poročajo se o poskusnih rezultatih z več modeli vdelave.', 'he': 'התערבות מילים הפכו לשימוש רחב בניתוח מסמכים. למרות שפיתחו מספר גדול של דוגמנים למפית מילים לחלל ווקטורים, זה נשאר בלתי קבוע כמה הרווח הרשתי יכול להשיג על גישות מסורתיות בהתבסס על שק מילים. In this paper, we propose a new document clustering approach by combining any word embedding with a state-of-the-art algorithm for clustering empirical distributions.  על ידי השימוש במרחק ווסקרסטיין בין התפיצות, מערכת היחסים סמנטית מילה למילה נחשבת בדרך עקרונית. שיטת הקבוצה החדשה קלה להשתמש ובקבוע יותר משיטות אחרות על מגוון של קבוצות נתונים. חשוב יותר, השיטה מספקת סגרת יעילה כדי לקבוע מתי וכמה תוספות מילים לניתוח מסמכים. דווחים על תוצאות ניסויים עם דוגמנים מעורבים רבים.', 'ha': "An samu amfani da filin da aka yi amfani da ɗabi'a cikin Analyza takardar. Kuma a lokacin da yawa masu motsi wa zane-zane wa zane-zane-zane wa filayenaiki zuwa masu shiryuwa, ba ta riga ba da an ƙayyade yadda za'a iya kai amfani da zane-zane ta kanana kan hanyoyin kawaici a kan-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata takardar ta ƙara hanyarwa da kuma mu haɗa wani magana wanda ke ƙunsa da wani algoritm na-state-of-the-art wa ƙaranci rabon empirical. Ina iya amfani da Wassarstin tsakanin rabo-daban, za'a lissafa maganar-zuwa-magana a cikin kima. @ info: whatsthis Kima muhimu, metoden yana samar da firam mai amfani wa a ƙayyade a yaushe da yawa maganar da ke ƙara zuwa anaƙatan takardar. Ana gaya matsala masu jarraba da misãlai masu yawa cikin shirin ayuka.", 'jv': 'embed" is a verb (command description). Text editor Nang pepulan iki, kita enyester biasa sistem anyar tentang gawe ngubah perusahaan kelas lahir Ngawe nguwe Perintah Wass-èrstein kuwi tanggal mruput, dadi-tanggal semanti kuwi wis dipun Global bending Laptop" and "Desktop Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནང་སྐད་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་ཡུལ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ While a large number of models for mapping words to vector spaces have been developed, it remains undetermined how much net gain can be achieved over traditional approaches based on bag-of-words. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་གོ་སྤྱད་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྒྲིག བགོ་སྤྲོད་དབར་གྱི་བར་ཐག་ནས་Wasserstein་ལས་ཐག་རིང་ལ་སྐད་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཚིག་དང་གཅིག བཤེར་བརྙན་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ནི་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་མེད་པར་ལས་ཡོངས་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་ཡང་མི་མཐུན་པས། གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ། ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ལ་གཏོང་ན་ဘယ་དུས་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་འཇུག་པའི་གྲངས་གཏོང་ག སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་བརྟག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Towards a Seamless Integration of Word Senses into Downstream NLP Applications', 'pt': 'Rumo a uma integração perfeita de Word Senses em aplicativos de PNL downstream', 'es': 'Hacia una integración perfecta de los sentidos de las palabras en las aplicaciones de PNL descendentes', 'ar': 'نحو تكامل سلس لحواس Word في تطبيقات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية', 'fr': 'Vers une intégration transparente des sens des mots dans les applications de TAL en aval', 'zh': '迈向集词义无缝于下流NLP应用程序中', 'ja': '下流のNLPアプリケーションへのワードセンサーのシームレスな統合に向けて', 'ru': 'На пути к бесшовной интеграции словесных чувств в последующие приложения NLP', 'hi': 'डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों में वर्ड सेंसेस के निर्बाध एकीकरण की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Comhtháthú Gan uaim de Cheisteanna Focal le Feidhmchláir NLP iartheachtacha', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სიტყვების ბეჭდვილი ინტერგრაციის მიხედვით NLP პროგრამებში', 'el': 'Προς μια απρόσκοπτη ενσωμάτωση των αισθήσεων λέξεων σε μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές', 'hu': 'A Word Senses zökkenőmentes integrációja a Downstream NLP alkalmazásokba', 'it': 'Verso una perfetta integrazione di Word Senses nelle applicazioni NLP a valle', 'kk': 'Төменгі NLP қолданбаларына сөздердің сезімдерін біріктіру жолына', 'lt': 'Towards a Seamless Integration of Word Senses into Downstream NLP Applications', 'mk': 'КАД БЕЗНАТА Интеграција на зборовите чувства во долните NLP апликации', 'ms': 'Ke arah Integrasi Sensor Perkataan tanpa Ringkasan ke Aplikasi NLP Turun', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Lejn Integrazzjoni bla xkiel tas-Sensiti tal-kliem fl-Applikazzjonijiet NLP Downstream', 'mn': 'НЛП програмын доорх хэмжээсүүдэд хэмжээсгүй хэмжээсүүдийн нэгтгэл рүү', 'no': 'Gå til eit synleg integrasjon av ordsendar i nedstrekke NLP-program', 'pl': 'W kierunku płynnej integracji zmysłów słowa z dalszymi aplikacjami NLP', 'ro': 'Către o integrare fără probleme a simțurilor Word în aplicațiile NLP în aval', 'sr': 'Prema bezgrešnoj integraciji reèi oseæa se u NLP aplikacije', 'si': 'සීමල්ස් සම්බන්ධයෙන් වචන සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය NLP වැඩසටහන් වලට', 'so': 'Towards a Seamless Integration of Word Senses into Applications Downstream NLP', 'sv': 'Mot en sömlös integrering av Word Senses i nedströms NLP-program', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ڈونسٹریم NLP کاربریوں میں لغات کا سیمالیس انٹرنیج کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới một sự hợp nhất của cảm xúc từ ngữ trong chương trình Downey NLP.', 'da': 'På vej mod en problemfri integration af Word Senses i Downstream NLP-applikationer', 'bg': 'Към безпроблемна интеграция на сетивата на думи в приложения за НЛО надолу по веригата', 'nl': 'Naar een naadloze integratie van Word Senses in downstream NLP-toepassingen', 'hr': 'Prema bezbrojnoj integraciji riječi osjeti se u NLP aplikacije', 'fa': 'به سمت یک ترکیب بی سیاه از کلمات به کاربردهای NLP پایین ترکیب می\u200cشود', 'id': 'Menuju Integrasi Tanpa Ringkas Perhatian Kata ke Aplikasi NLP Downstream', 'ko': '다운스트림 NLP 애플리케이션과 단어의 원활한 통합', 'tr': "NLP'iň içine Senedleri iňsiz bir söz integrasyna ýüz git", 'sw': 'Upande wa Integration of Word Senses into Downstream NLP Applications', 'af': "Na 'n Seamless Integrasie van Woord Senses in Onderstroom NLP Toepassinge", 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einer nahtlosen Integration von Word Senses in nachgelagerte NLP-Anwendungen', 'sq': 'Për një integrim të paqëndrueshëm të ndjenjave të fjalëve në aplikacionet NLP Downstream', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Բառերի զգացմունքների անհեթեթ ինտեգրացիայի ուղղությամբ ՆԼՊ ծրագրերի մեջ', 'az': 'Aşa ğı NLP Proqramlarına Sözlərinin İmzalamasız Integrasyonuna tərəf', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'K bezproblémové integraci slovních smyslů do následných aplikací NLP', 'bs': 'Prema bezgraničnoj integraciji riječi oseća se u NLP aplikacije', 'et': 'Sõnatunnistuste sujuva integreerimise suunas uue tööprogrammi järelrakendustesse', 'ca': 'Vers una integració senzilla dels sentits de paraules en aplicacions NLP descendents', 'fi': 'Kohti sanaaistien saumatonta integrointia jatkojalostuksen sovelluksiin', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Za nemoteno integracijo besednih senzorjev v nadaljnje aplikacije NLP', 'he': 'לכיוון שילוב חסר קלות של חושים מילים לתוכניות NLP למטה', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'འོག་མའི་NLP ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་ལེན་མེད་པའི་ཆ་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Lexical ambiguity can impede NLP systems from accurate understanding of semantics. Despite its potential benefits, the integration of sense-level information into NLP systems has remained understudied. By incorporating a novel disambiguation algorithm into a state-of-the-art classification model, we create a pipeline to integrate sense-level information into downstream NLP applications. We show that a simple disambiguation of the input text can lead to consistent performance improvement on multiple topic categorization and polarity detection datasets, particularly when the fine granularity of the underlying sense inventory is reduced and the document is sufficiently large. Our results also point to the need for sense representation research to focus more on in vivo evaluations which target the performance in downstream NLP applications rather than artificial benchmarks.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يؤدي الغموض المعجمي إلى إعاقة أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية من الفهم الدقيق للدلالات. على الرغم من الفوائد المحتملة ، فقد ظل دمج المعلومات على مستوى الإحساس في أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية غير مدروس. من خلال دمج خوارزمية جديدة لإزالة الغموض في نموذج تصنيف حديث ، نقوم بإنشاء خط أنابيب لدمج المعلومات على مستوى المعنى في تطبيقات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية. نوضح أن إزالة الغموض البسيط عن نص الإدخال يمكن أن يؤدي إلى تحسين أداء متسق في مجموعات بيانات متعددة لتصنيف الموضوعات واكتشاف القطبية ، لا سيما عندما يتم تقليل الدقة الدقيقة لمخزون المعنى الأساسي ويكون المستند كبيرًا بدرجة كافية. تشير نتائجنا أيضًا إلى الحاجة إلى بحث تمثيل المعنى للتركيز أكثر على التقييمات في الجسم الحي التي تستهدف الأداء في تطبيقات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية بدلاً من المعايير الاصطناعية.', 'fr': "L'ambiguïté lexicale peut empêcher les systèmes de PNL de comprendre exactement la sémantique. Malgré ses avantages potentiels, l'intégration de l'information sensorielle dans les systèmes de PNL est restée sous-étudiée. En incorporant un nouvel algorithme de désambiguïsation dans un modèle de classification de pointe, nous créons un pipeline pour intégrer des informations de niveau de sens dans des applications NLP en aval. Nous montrons qu'une simple désambiguïsation du texte d'entrée peut conduire à une amélioration cohérente des performances sur de multiples catégories de sujets et des ensembles de données de détection de polarité, en particulier lorsque la granularité fine de l'inventaire des sens sous-jacent est réduite et que le document est suffisamment volumineux. Nos résultats soulignent également la nécessité pour la recherche sur la représentation des sens de se concentrer davantage sur les évaluations in vivo qui ciblent les performances dans les applications de PNL en aval plutôt que sur des points de référence artificiels.", 'es': 'La ambigüedad léxica puede impedir que los sistemas de PNL comprendan con precisión la semántica. A pesar de sus beneficios potenciales, la integración de la información sensorial en los sistemas de PNL no se ha estudiado mucho. Al incorporar un novedoso algoritmo de desambiguación en un modelo de clasificación de última generación, creamos un canal para integrar información a nivel sensorial en aplicaciones de PNL posteriores. Demostramos que una simple desambiguación del texto de entrada puede conducir a una mejora constante del rendimiento en múltiples conjuntos de datos de categorización de temas y detección de polaridad, particularmente cuando se reduce la granularidad fina del inventario de sentidos subyacente y el documento es lo suficientemente grande. Nuestros resultados también apuntan a la necesidad de que la investigación de la representación sensorial se centre más en las evaluaciones in vivo que se centran en el rendimiento en aplicaciones posteriores de PNL en lugar de en puntos de referencia artificiales.', 'pt': 'A ambiguidade lexical pode impedir que os sistemas de PNL compreendam com precisão a semântica. Apesar de seus benefícios potenciais, a integração de informações de nível sensorial em sistemas de PNL permaneceu pouco estudada. Ao incorporar um novo algoritmo de desambiguação em um modelo de classificação de última geração, criamos um pipeline para integrar informações de nível de sentido em aplicativos de PNL downstream. Mostramos que uma simples desambiguação do texto de entrada pode levar a uma melhoria consistente de desempenho em vários conjuntos de dados de categorização de tópicos e detecção de polaridade, particularmente quando a granularidade fina do inventário de sentido subjacente é reduzida e o documento é suficientemente grande. Nossos resultados também apontam para a necessidade de pesquisa de representação de sentido para se concentrar mais em avaliações in vivo que visam o desempenho em aplicações de PNL downstream, em vez de benchmarks artificiais.', 'ja': '語彙の曖昧さは、意味論の正確な理解をNLPシステムに妨げる可能性がある。潜在的な利点にもかかわらず、NLPシステムへのセンスレベルの情報の統合は研究不足のままである。最新の分類モデルに新規の曖昧さ解消アルゴリズムを組み込むことで、センスレベルの情報を下流のNLPアプリケーションに統合するパイプラインを作成します。入力テキストの単純な曖昧さ解消は、複数のトピック分類および極性検出データセットの一貫したパフォーマンス向上につながる可能性があり、特に、基礎となるセンスインベントリの細かい粒度が低減され、文書が十分に大きい場合には、それが可能であることを示しています。私たちの結果はまた、人工ベンチマークではなく、下流のNLPアプリケーションのパフォーマンスをターゲットとしたインビボ評価に重点を置くセンス表現研究の必要性を指摘しています。', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल अस्पष्टता एनएलपी प्रणालियों को शब्दार्थ की सटीक समझ से बाधित कर सकती है। इसके संभावित लाभों के बावजूद, एनएलपी प्रणालियों में भावना-स्तर की जानकारी का एकीकरण कम अध्ययन किया गया है। एक अत्याधुनिक वर्गीकरण मॉडल में एक उपन्यास बहुविकल्पीय एल्गोरिथ्म को शामिल करके, हम डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों में भावना-स्तर की जानकारी को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक पाइपलाइन बनाते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि इनपुट टेक्स्ट का एक सरल disambiguation कई विषय वर्गीकरण और polarity का पता लगाने डेटासेट पर लगातार प्रदर्शन सुधार के लिए नेतृत्व कर सकते हैं, खासकर जब अंतर्निहित भावना सूची की ठीक granularity कम हो जाती है और दस्तावेज़ पर्याप्त रूप से बड़ा है। हमारे परिणाम विवो मूल्यांकन में अधिक ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए भावना प्रतिनिधित्व अनुसंधान की आवश्यकता को भी इंगित करते हैं जो कृत्रिम बेंचमार्क के बजाय डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों में प्रदर्शन को लक्षित करते हैं।', 'zh': '词汇歧义会格NLP统正解语义。 虽有潜善,集官息于NLP统中犹不足。 因将新颖消歧义算法整合到最先进的分类模样中,我们创建了一个管道,将感知级信息集成到下流NLP应用程序中。 臣等明文本简消歧义可致数主题分类与极性检数集性能改进,尤当基感官清单之精细粒度降而文档足大时。 臣等考实,须加感官表徵,以更多注体内评估,下流NLP用之性,非人为准。', 'ru': 'Лексическая двусмысленность может помешать точному пониманию семантики системами NLP. Несмотря на его потенциальные преимущества, интеграция смысловой информации в системы NLP по-прежнему недостаточно изучена. Внедряя новый алгоритм дезагрегирования в современную классификационную модель, мы создаем конвейер для интеграции информации уровня смысла в последующие приложения NLP. Мы показываем, что простая расплывчатость входного текста может привести к постоянному улучшению производительности на множестве наборов данных категоризации тем и обнаружения полярности, особенно когда уменьшается мелкая детализация базовой инвентаризации смысла и документ достаточно велик. Наши результаты также указывают на необходимость исследования представления смысла, чтобы сосредоточиться больше на оценках in vivo, которые нацелены на производительность в последующих приложениях NLP, а не на искусственных контрольных показателях.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le débhríocht fhoclóra córais NLP a chosc ó thuiscint chruinn ar shéimeantaic. In ainneoin na mbuntáistí a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann, níor tugadh dóthain staidéir ar chomhtháthú faisnéise ar leibhéal na céadfaí i gcórais NLP. Trí algartam dídhébhrí nua a ionchorprú i múnla aicmithe úrscothach, cruthaímid píblíne chun faisnéis ar leibhéal na céadfaí a chomhtháthú le feidhmchláir NLP iartheachtacha. Léirímid go bhféadfadh feabhas comhsheasmhach feidhmíochta a bheith mar thoradh ar dhí-athbhrí simplí ar an téacs ionchuir ar chatagóirí iolracha agus tacair sonraí braite polaraíochta, go háirithe nuair a laghdaítear gráinneacht mhín fhardail na céadchiall agus go bhfuil an doiciméad sách mór. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios freisin go bhfuil gá le taighde ar léiriú braite chun díriú níos mó ar mheastóireachtaí in vivo a dhíríonn ar fheidhmíocht i bhfeidhmchláir NLP iartheachtacha seachas ar thagarmharcanna saorga.', 'ka': 'ლექსიკალური ამბიდუტია შეუძლია NLP სისტემების წარმოდგენისთვის წარმოდგენისთვის. მისი პოცენტალური გამოსახულებებისთვის მაგრამ, NLP სისტემებში ინტერგურაციის ინტერგურაცია დარჩენა. პრომენტის განამბიგუაციის ალგორიტიმას კლასიფიკაციის მოდელში ჩვენ შევქმნეთ ფუნქციის დონე ინფორმაციას NLP პროგრამებში. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩართულია ტექსტის უკეთესი განსხვავება შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ მრავალ ტექსტის კატეგორიზაციაში და პოლარიტის განსხვავებაში მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა, სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა განს ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ასევე აღმოჩნენ უნდა გავაკეთოთ სიგრძნობის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება, რომ უფრო ფუნქციური გამოსახულებას იყოს in vivo evaluations, რომელიც განსახულება NLP', 'hu': 'A lexikai kétértelműség akadályozhatja az NLP rendszereket abban, hogy pontos megértsék a szemantikát. A potenciális előnyök ellenére az érzékszintű információk integrálása az NLP-rendszerekbe továbbra sem vizsgált. Egy új egyértelműsítő algoritmus beépítésével egy korszerű osztályozási modellbe, létrehozunk egy csővezetéket, amely az érzékszintű információkat integrálja a downstream NLP alkalmazásokba. Megmutatjuk, hogy a bemeneti szöveg egyszerű egyértelműsítése következetes teljesítményjavulást eredményezhet a többféle témaköri kategorizálási és polaritásérzékelési adatkészletek esetében, különösen akkor, ha az alapul szolgáló érzékelési leltár finom szemcséssége csökken, és a dokumentum kellően nagy. Eredményeink rámutatnak arra is, hogy az érzékelésre irányuló kutatások inkább a mesterséges referenciaértékek helyett inkább az in vivo értékelésekre összpontosítanak.', 'el': 'Η λεξική ασάφεια μπορεί να εμποδίσει τα συστήματα από την ακριβή κατανόηση της σημασιολογίας. Παρά τα πιθανά οφέλη της, η ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών σε επίπεδο αισθήσεων στα συστήματα δεν έχει μελετηθεί. Με την ενσωμάτωση ενός νέου αλγόριθμου αποσαφήνισης σε ένα σύγχρονο μοντέλο ταξινόμησης, δημιουργούμε έναν αγωγό για να ενσωματώσουμε πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο αισθήσεων σε μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές. Δείχνουμε ότι μια απλή αποσαφήνιση του κειμένου εισαγωγής μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε συνεπή βελτίωση της απόδοσης σε πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων κατηγοριοποίησης θεμάτων και ανίχνευσης πολικότητας, ιδιαίτερα όταν μειώνεται η λεπτή κοκκώτητα του υποκείμενου καταλόγου αισθήσεων και το έγγραφο είναι αρκετά μεγάλο. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν επίσης την ανάγκη για έρευνα αναπαράστασης αισθήσεων να επικεντρωθεί περισσότερο σε αξιολογήσεις που στοχεύουν στην απόδοση σε μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές και όχι σε τεχνητά κριτήρια αναφοράς.', 'kk': 'Лексикалық амбикциялық NLP жүйелерінің симантикалық түсініктерін дұрыс түсініктеріне сақтауға болады. Бұл мүмкіндік пайдалануларына қарамастан, NLP жүйелеріне сезім деңгейінің мәліметін біріктіру қажет болды. Роман дезамбигуациялық алгоритмін өзгерту үлгісіне ендіріп, NLP қолданбаларына төменгі мәліметті ендіру үшін оның сызығын құрамыз. Біз кіріс мәтінінің қарапайым бағдарламасы бірнеше нақыштардың санаттарын баптау мен поляриялық анықтау деректер баптауларында тәуелсізді жақсартуға болады дегенді көрсетедік, әсіресе, негізгі сезімдік инвентариясының дұрыс гра Біздің нәтижелеріміз сондай-ақ өзгертілген зерттеулердің көбірек көбірек болуын көрсетеді. Бұл NLP қолданбаларының бағдарламасының көбірек бағдарламаларының көбірек жасауы', 'lt': 'Leksinis dviprasmiškumas gali trukdyti NLP sistemoms tiksliai suprasti semantiką. Nepaisant galimos naudos, proto lygio informacijos integracija į NLP sistemas išliko nepakankamai įvertinta. Įtraukdami naują nedviprasmiškumo algoritmą į naujausią klasifikavimo model į, sukuriame vamzdyną, kuris integruotų jutimo lygio informaciją į tolesnes NLP programas. Mes parodome, kad paprastas įvesties teksto nedviprasmiškumas gali paskatinti nuoseklų rezultatų gerinimą įvairių temų kategorijų ir poliarumo nustatymo duomenų rinkiniuose, ypač kai sumažėja smulkus pagrindinio jutimo aprašo granuliarumas ir dokumentas yra pakankamai didelis. Mūsų rezultatai taip pat rodo, kad reikia pagrįsto atstovavimo mokslinių tyrimų, kad daugiau dėmesio būtų skiriama in vivo vertinimams, kuriais siekiama rezultatų tolesnėse NLP taikymo srityse, o ne dirbtiniams lyginamiesiems rodikliams.', 'it': "L'ambiguità lessicale può impedire ai sistemi NLP di comprendere accuratamente la semantica. Nonostante i suoi potenziali benefici, l'integrazione delle informazioni a livello sensoriale nei sistemi PNL è rimasta sottostimata. Incorporando un nuovo algoritmo di disambiguazione in un modello di classificazione all'avanguardia, creiamo una pipeline per integrare le informazioni a livello di senso nelle applicazioni NLP a valle. Mostriamo che una semplice disambiguazione del testo di input può portare a un miglioramento costante delle prestazioni su set di dati di categorizzazione di più argomenti e rilevamento della polarità, in particolare quando la granularità fine dell'inventario dei sensi sottostante è ridotta e il documento è sufficientemente grande. I nostri risultati indicano anche la necessità che la ricerca sulla rappresentazione dei sensi si concentri maggiormente sulle valutazioni in vivo che mirano alle prestazioni nelle applicazioni a valle della PNL piuttosto che sui benchmark artificiali.", 'mk': 'Лексикалната нејасност може да ги попречи системите на НЛП од точно разбирање на семантиката. И покрај нејзините потенцијални бенефиции, интеграцијата на информациите на смислено ниво во системите на НЛП остана недостигана. Со вклучување на нов алгоритм за раздвојување во најнов модел на класификација, создаваме гасовод за интеграција на информации на смислено ниво во понатамошните апликации на НЛП. Ние покажуваме дека едноставна дејамбигуација на внатрешниот текст може да доведе до константно подобрување на резултатите на категоризацијата на повеќе теми и наборот на податоци за детекција на поларитетот, особено кога фината грануларност на основното сочувство е намалена и документот е доволно голем. Нашите резултати, исто така, укажуваат на потребата од истражување за сетилна претстава за да се фокусираат повеќе на in vivo евалуации кои се насочуваат на резултатите во понатамошните апликации на НЛП наместо на вештачки референтни значки.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ആഗ്രഹം NLP സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്സിനെ കൃത്യമായി മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d തടസ്സമാകും. അതിന്റെ സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഉപകാരമുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, NLP സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് ശ ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ക്ലാസിഫിക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡലിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒര നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ടെക്സ്റ്റിന്റെ എളുപ്പമുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുപാട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. പല വിഭാഗവും  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വിവോവിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നതിനായി മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ പ്ര', 'ms': 'Ketambilan Lexik boleh halang sistem NLP dari pemahaman yang tepat semantik. Walaupun keuntungan potensialnya, penyelesaian maklumat aras-sens ke dalam sistem NLP masih belum diketahui. Dengan memasukkan algoritma penyelesaian baru ke dalam model klasifikasi state-of-the-art, kami mencipta saluran paip untuk mengintegrasikan maklumat aras-sens ke dalam aplikasi NLP turun. Kami menunjukkan bahawa penyelesaian sederhana teks input boleh membawa kepada peningkatan prestasi konsisten pada kategorisasi topik berbilang dan set data pengesan polaritas, terutama apabila granularitas halus inventori sens yang didasarkan dikurangkan dan dokumen cukup besar. Hasil kami juga menunjukkan keperluan penelitian perwakilan akal untuk fokus lebih pada penilaian in vivo yang sasarkan prestasi dalam aplikasi NLP turun daripada benchmarks buatan.', 'mt': 'L-ambigwità lexika tista’ tfixkel lis-sistemi NLP minn fehim preċiż tas-semantika. Minkejja l-benefiċċji potenzjali tagħha, l-integrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni fil-livell tas-sens fis-sistemi NLP baqgħet nieqsa minn fehma. Permezz tal-inkorporazzjoni ta’ algoritmu ġdid ta’ diżambigwazzjoni f’mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni l-aktar avvanzat, a ħna nħolqu pipeline biex nintegraw l-informazzjoni fil-livell tas-sens fl-applikazzjonijiet downstream tal-NLP. Aħna nuru li żambigwazzjoni sempliċi tat-test tal-input tista’ twassal għal titjib konsistenti fil-prestazzjoni fuq settijiet ta’ dejta dwar il-kategorizzazzjoni multipla tas-suġġetti u l-individwazzjoni tal-polarità, partikolarment meta l-granularità fina tal-inventarju tas-sens sottostanti titnaqqas u d-dokument ikun kbir biżżejjed. Ir-riżultati tagħna jindikaw ukoll il-ħtieġa għal riċerka dwar ir-rappreżentanza tas-sens biex tiffoka aktar fuq evalwazzjonijiet in vivo li jimmiraw lejn il-prestazzjoni fl-applikazzjonijiet downstream NLP aktar milli fuq parametri referenzjarji artifiċjali.', 'mn': 'Лексик хэмжээсгүй байдал нь NLP системүүдийг зөв хэмжээсүүдийг ойлгохын тулд зогсоож чадна. NLP системд мэдрэмжийн түвшинд мэдээллийн мэдээллийн нэгтгэлийг бага зэрэг судалсан. Шинэ хэмжээсгүй алгоритмыг урлагийн хэлбэрийн загвар руу нэгтгэхэд бид мэдрэмжийн түвшинд мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллийг NLP програмын доор нэгтгэх хоолойн шугам бий болгодог. Бид энгийн бичлэгийн бичлэгийг багасгаж байгааг харуулж байна. Бид олон сэдвийн хуваарилалт болон зайлсхийн мэдээллийн багасгаж, ялангуяа үндсэн мэдээллийн бүтээгдэхүүний сайн гранулал багасгаж, баримт хангалттай том байх үед үр дүнтэй ажиллагааг сайжруул Бидний үр дүнд мөн уран бүтээгдэхүүний оронд НLP хэрэглээний үйл ажиллагааг илүү төвлөрүүлэх боломжтой судалгааны шаардлагатай байдалд илүү төвлөрүүлэх шаардлагатай.', 'pl': 'Leksykalna niejednoznaczność może utrudnić systemom NLP dokładne zrozumienie semantyki. Pomimo potencjalnych korzyści integracja informacji na poziomie zmysłów z systemami NLP pozostaje niezbyt zbadana. Poprzez włączenie nowego algorytmu rozjednoczenia do najnowocześniejszego modelu klasyfikacji, tworzymy rurociąg do integracji informacji na poziomie zmysłów w dalszych aplikacjach NLP. Pokazujemy, że proste rozproszenie tekstu wejściowego może prowadzić do konsekwentnej poprawy wydajności wielu zestawów danych kategoryzacji tematów i wykrywania polaryzacji, zwłaszcza gdy drobna granularność bazowego zapasu zmysłów jest zmniejszona, a dokument jest wystarczająco duży. Nasze wyniki wskazują również na potrzebę badań nad reprezentacją zmysłów, aby skupić się bardziej na ocenach in vivo, które ukierunkowane są na wydajność w dalszych aplikacjach NLP, a nie na sztuczne wskaźniki referencyjne.', 'ro': 'ambiguitatea lexică poate împiedica sistemele PNL să înțeleagă cu exactitate semantica. În ciuda beneficiilor sale potențiale, integrarea informațiilor la nivel de simț în sistemele PNL a rămas dublată. Prin încorporarea unui nou algoritm de dezambiguizare într-un model de clasificare de ultimă generație, creăm o conductă pentru a integra informații la nivel de simț în aplicațiile din aval NLP. Arătăm că o simplă dezambiguizare a textului de intrare poate duce la îmbunătățirea consistentă a performanței în seturile de date de categorizare a mai multor subiecte și detectare a polarității, în special atunci când granularitatea fină a inventarului de simțuri subiacent este redusă și documentul este suficient de mare. Rezultatele noastre indică, de asemenea, necesitatea ca cercetarea reprezentării simțurilor să se concentreze mai mult pe evaluările in vivo care vizează performanța în aplicațiile PNL din aval, mai degrabă decât pe criteriile de referință artificiale.', 'no': 'Leksiske ambiguitet kan hindra NLP-systemet frå nøyaktig forståking av semantikk. I tillegg til det potensielle fordelene, har integrasjonen av følsnivåinformasjon i NLP-systemet blitt understudiert. Ved å inkludere ein roman disambiguasjonsalgoritme i ein klassifikasjonsmodul for kunsten, oppretter vi ein rørslinje for å integrere sentralnivåinformasjon i nedstrekksprogrammer for NLP. Vi viser at ein enkel disambiguasjon av inndatateksten kan føre til konsistent forbedring av utviklingar på fleire temakategorisasjonar og datasett for oppdaging av polaritet, særlig når det finte granulariteten av innhaldet i undersentrum er redusert, og dokumentet er nok stor. Resultatet våre viser også nødvendighet for følelsesforskning for å fokusera meir på i vivo-evalueringar som mål på utviklinga i nedstrekke NLP-program i staden for kunstiske benchmarker.', 'si': 'ලෙක්සික්සිකාල් අවශ්\u200dයතාවට NLP පද්ධතිය සෙමාන්ටික් ගැන සිද්ධිය තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්. එයාගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තිබුනා නමුත්, NLP පද්ධතියෙන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් තියෙනවා. නොවැඩක් අවස්ථාවක් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් සම්බන්ධ කරලා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණ මද්\u200dයාලයට, අපි පායිප්ලායින් හදන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් තොරත අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඇතුළු පාළුවේ සාමාන්\u200dය අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය පරීක්ෂණය දත්ත සේට් වලට සාම අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දේවල් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ජීවිතේ විශේෂණය', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaqa leksikarka ayaa ka hor mari kara nidaamka NLP si saxda ah u garashada semantika. Inkastoo ay faa'iidadeedii suurtagalka ah, la-qabsashada macluumaadka sinnaanta ee nidaamka NLP ayaa la sii baray. By incorporating a novel disambiguation algorithm into a state-of-the-art classification model, we create a pipeline to integrate sense-level information into downstream NLP applications.  Waxaynu tusnaynaa in qalabka sahlan ee qoraalka hoose laga dhigo uu horumarin karo horumarinta farsamada oo ku saabsan kooxaha jaamacadaha kala duduwan iyo xisaabta baaritaanka, khusuusan marka qoraalka waxyaabaha wanaagsan la hoos maro hoos u dhigo iyo in dukumentigu uu ku filan yahay. Abaalkayada waxaa sidoo kale ku qoran baahida baaritaanka koontaroolka waxyaabaha loo baahdo si aad ugu kalsoonaato qiimeynta in vivo, kaas oo ku hagaajiya codsiga hoose ee NLP, taasoo aan ka bedelayn kaararka farsamada.", 'sv': 'Lexisk tvetydighet kan hindra NLP-system från korrekt förståelse av semantik. Trots dess potentiella fördelar har integrationen av förnuftsinformation i NLP-system fortsatt att vara underförstådd. Genom att införliva en ny disambiguation algoritm i en state-of-the-art klassificeringsmodell skapar vi en pipeline för att integrera sinnesnivå information i nedströms NLP applikationer. Vi visar att en enkel disambiguation av inmatningstexten kan leda till konsekvent prestandaförbättring på flera ämneskategoriserings- och polaritetsdetekteringsdatauppsättningar, särskilt när den fina granulariteten i den underliggande sinnesförteckningen minskar och dokumentet är tillräckligt stort. Våra resultat pekar också på behovet av sinnesrepresentationsforskning för att fokusera mer på in vivo utvärderingar som inriktar sig på prestanda i nedströms NLP applikationer snarare än artificiella riktmärken.', 'sr': 'Leksička ambiguitet može sprijeèiti NLP sisteme od taènog razumevanja semantika. Uprkos njegovim potencijalnim prednostima, integracija informacija o nivou osjećaja u NLP sisteme je ostala pod proučavanjem. Uključujući nov algoritam disambiguacije u model klasifikacije umetnosti, stvorili smo cijev za integraciju informacija o nivou osjećaja u zemlje NLP aplikacije. Pokazujemo da jednostavna disambiguacija teksta za ulazak može dovesti do konsekventnog poboljšanja učinkovitosti u mnogim kategorijama tema i podacima za otkrivanje polariteta, posebno kada se smanjuje fina granularnost inventara ispod osnovnog osjećaja i dokument je dovoljno velik. Naši rezultati takođe ukazuju na potrebu za istraživanjem predstavljanja smisla da se fokusiraju više na procjene u vivu koje ciljaju na učinkovitost u potpunim aplikacijama NLP umjesto umjetnih kriterija.', 'ta': 'லெக்சிக்ஸியான உச்சரிப்பு NLP அமைப்புகளை சரியான புரிந்து தடுக்க முடியும். அதன் சாத்தியமான பயன்பாடுகள் இருந்தாலும், NLP அமைப்புகளில் உள்ள உணர்வு நிலை தகவல் ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை அறி ஒரு புதிய வகுப்பு முறைமையை ஒரு நிலை- கலை வகுப்பு மாதிரியாக சேர்த்து, நாம் ஒரு புள்ளியை உருவாக்கி தெரியும் மட்டத்தில் தகவலை கீழ் நிலையில் N We show that a simple disambiguation of the input text can lead to consistent performance improvement on multiple topic categorization and polarity detection datasets, particularly when the fine granularity of the underlying sense inventory is reduced and the document is sufficiently large.  எங்கள் முடிவுகளுக்கும் குறிப்பிடுகிறது விவோவின் மதிப்பீட்டில் மேலும் கவனம் செலுத்த வேண்டும் என்று கூறுகிறது சிறந்த பெரிய குறிப', 'ur': 'سکسیسی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر قابل ہے. اس کے امکانات فائدے کے بغیر، NLP سیستموں میں احساس سطح معلومات کی تفریق کم تحقیق کی گئی ہے. ایک نوم نامبوغ الگوریٹم کو ایک ایست-آرت-کلیسی موڈل میں شامل کرنے کے ذریعہ، ہم ایک پائپ لین بناتے ہیں کہ حس-سطح معلومات کو نیچے سیارے NLP کاربریوں میں شامل کریں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک سادھا انپیٹ ٹیکسٹ کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ ہمارے نتیجے بھی منظور کی تحقیقات کی ضرورت ہے کہ زندگیو تحقیقات پر زیادہ مشکل کریں جو NLP کاربریوں کے ذریعہ نیچے نطفہ کی کاربریوں میں فعالیت کی تاکید کریں بغیر ارتفاع کی بنچمارک کے.', 'uz': "Leksikal ambikiyotlik NLP tizimlari semantika haqida o'rganishdan foydalanadi. @ info Name Biz kiritish matnning oddiy ajratishni ko'p mavzu kattalashtirish va shaxsiy aniqlash maʼlumotlar tarkibida bir necha darajada bajarish muvaffaqiyatlarini bajarishi mumkin. Hullas, asl asosiy bog'liq muvaffaqiyatlarining chegaraligi kamaytirish va hujjat juda katta. Bizning natijalarimiz esa faqat aniqlashni o'rganish kerak va vivo qiymatlariga qo'shish kerakligini anglatadi. Bu narsalarning soʻzda NLP dasturlarini qo'llanmalarni qo'llashga qarshi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự tối nghĩa từ điển có thể cản trở hệ thống không hiểu được ngữ pháp chính xác. Mặc dù nó có lợi ích tiềm năng, việc tổng hợp thông tin về nhạy cảm trong hệ thống NLP vẫn chưa đủ. Bằng cách nhập một thuật to án giải đáp mới vào một mô hình phân hạng hiện đại, chúng tôi tạo ra một đường ống dẫn để nhập thông tin cấp cảm vào các ứng dụng NLP xuôi dòng. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng phân dạng đơn giản của văn bản nhập có thể dẫn đến một cải thiện hiệu suất liên tục trong các tập tin dữ liệu phân loại đa chủ đề và phát hiện cực, đặc biệt khi lượng nhỏ của tồn kho cảm giác cơ bản bị giảm và tài liệu này đủ lớn. Kết quả của chúng ta cũng đưa ra sự cần thiết cho việc nghiên cứu đại diện cảm xúc tập trung nhiều hơn vào những đánh giá sống dựa trên khả năng ứng dụng kiểu xuôi dòng nhẫn NLP hơn là những tiêu chuẩn nhân tạo.', 'bg': 'Лексикалната неяснота може да попречи на системите за НЛП да разберат точно семантиката. Въпреки потенциалните си ползи, интегрирането на информация на ниво сетива в системите за НЛП остава недостатъчно проучено. Чрез включването на нов алгоритъм за разграничаване в най-съвременния модел за класификация, ние създаваме тръбопровод за интегриране на информация от ниво сетива в приложения за НЛП надолу по веригата. Показваме, че простото разграничаване на въведения текст може да доведе до последователно подобряване на ефективността на множество теми за категоризация и откриване на поляритет набори от данни, особено когато фината гранулираност на основния опис на сетивата е намалена и документът е достатъчно голям. Резултатите ни сочат и необходимостта от изследвания за представяне на сетивата да се съсредоточат повече върху оценки, насочени към ефективността в приложения за НЛП надолу по веригата, отколкото върху изкуствени показатели.', 'nl': 'Lexische ambiguïteit kan NLP-systemen belemmeren om nauwkeurig begrip van semantiek. Ondanks de mogelijke voordelen is de integratie van zintuiglijke informatie in NLP-systemen onvoldoende bestudeerd. Door een nieuw onderscheidingsalgoritme op te nemen in een state-of-the-art classificatiemodel, creëren we een pijplijn om zintuiglijke informatie te integreren in downstream NLP toepassingen. We laten zien dat een eenvoudige verduidelijking van de invoertekst kan leiden tot consistente prestatieverbetering op meerdere onderwerpen categorisatie en polariteitsdetectie datasets, vooral wanneer de fijne granulariteit van de onderliggende zintuiginventaris wordt verminderd en het document voldoende groot is. Onze resultaten wijzen ook op de noodzaak van zintuigrepresentatieonderzoek om zich meer te richten op in vivo evaluaties die gericht zijn op de prestaties in downstream NLP toepassingen in plaats van kunstmatige benchmarks.', 'da': 'Lexisk tvetydighed kan forhindre NLP-systemer i nøjagtig forståelse af semantik. På trods af de potentielle fordele er integrationen af oplysninger på sanseniveau i NLP-systemer fortsat undervurderet. Ved at indarbejde en ny adskillelsesalgoritme i en state-of-the-art klassifikationsmodel, skaber vi en pipeline til at integrere sanseniveau information i downstream NLP applikationer. Vi viser, at en simpel forståelse af input teksten kan føre til konsekvent ydeevne forbedring på flere emner kategorisering og polaritetsdetektion datasæt, især når den fine granularitet af den underliggende sanse opgørelse reduceres, og dokumentet er tilstrækkeligt stort. Vores resultater peger også på behovet for sanserepræsentation forskning for at fokusere mere på in vivo evalueringer, der målretter ydeevnen i downstream NLP applikationer frem for kunstige benchmarks.', 'de': 'Lexikale Ambiguit채t kann NLP-Systeme daran hindern, Semantik genau zu verstehen. Trotz ihrer potenziellen Vorteile ist die Integration von Informationen auf Sinnesebene in NLP-Systeme nach wie vor unzureichend erforscht. Durch die Integration eines neuartigen Begriffskl채rungsalgorithmus in ein hochmodernes Klassifizierungsmodell schaffen wir eine Pipeline, um Informationen auf Sinnesebene in nachgelagerte NLP-Anwendungen zu integrieren. Wir zeigen, dass eine einfache Begriffskl채rung des Eingabetextes zu einer konsistenten Leistungsverbesserung bei mehreren Themenkategorisierungs- und Polarit채tsdetektionsdatens채tzen f체hren kann, insbesondere wenn die Feingranularit채t des zugrunde liegenden Sinninventars reduziert wird und das Dokument ausreichend gro횩 ist. Unsere Ergebnisse weisen auch darauf hin, dass die Sinnesrepr채sentationsforschung sich st채rker auf In-vivo-Evaluationen konzentrieren muss, die die Leistung in nachgelagerten NLP-Anwendungen anstelle k체nstlicher Benchmarks abzielen.', 'id': 'Ketambiguhan Lexik dapat menghalangi sistem NLP dari pemahaman akurat semantik. Meskipun keuntungan potensialnya, integrasi informasi tingkat akal ke dalam sistem NLP masih belum dipahami. By incorporating a novel disambiguation algorithm into a state-of-the-art classification model, we create a pipeline to integrate sense-level information into downstream NLP applications.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa ketidakambiguasi sederhana dari teks masukan dapat menyebabkan peningkatan prestasi konsisten pada kategorisasi topik berbilang dan dataset deteksi polaritas, terutama ketika granularitas halus inventaris sensor yang didasarkan dikurangi dan dokumen cukup besar. Hasil kami juga menunjukkan kebutuhan untuk penelitian representation masuk akal untuk fokus lebih pada evaluasi in vivo yang menargetkan prestasi dalam aplikasi NLP turun daripada benchmarks buatan.', 'ko': '어휘의 잘못된 의미는 NLP 시스템이 의미에 대한 정확한 이해를 방해할 수 있다.비록 잠재적인 장점이 있지만 감각적인 차원의 정보를 NLP 시스템에 통합시키는 연구는 여전히 부족하다.새로운 디버그 알고리즘을 가장 선진적인 분류 모델에 통합함으로써 우리는 감지 단계의 정보를 하위 NLP 응용 프로그램에 통합하는 파이프라인을 만들었다.우리는 입력 텍스트에 대한 간단한 변조는 다중 테마 분류와 극성 검사 데이터 집합에서 일치된 성능 개선을 가져올 수 있음을 나타낸다. 특히 밑바닥 감지 목록의 세밀도가 낮아지고 문서가 충분할 때.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 감각적 표징 연구는 인공 기준이 아니라 하류 NLP 응용의 성능에 더 많은 관심을 기울여야 한다.', 'hr': 'Leksička dvosmislenost može spriječiti NLP sustave od tačnog razumijevanja semantika. Unatoč potencijalnim koristima, integracija informacija o razini osjećaja u sustave NLP-a ostala je pod ispitivanjem. Uključujući nov algoritam disambiguacije u model klasifikacije umjetnosti, stvaramo cijev za integraciju informacija o nivou osjećaja u prijave NLP. Pokazujemo da jednostavna disambiguacija teksta za ulazak može dovesti do konsekventnog poboljšanja učinka na podaci o kategorizaciji više tema i otkrivanju polarnosti, posebno kada se smanji fina granularnost inventara temeljnog osjećaja i dokument je dovoljno velik. Naši rezultati također ukazuju na potrebu istraživanja predstavljanja smisla da se usredotoči na procjene in vivo koji ciljaju učinkovitost u potpunim primjenama NLP umjesto umjetnih kriterija.', 'tr': 'Leksik göwnünç NLP sistemalary semantikleriň dogry düşünmesinden çykyp biler. NLP sistemalaryna duýgun dereje maglumatyň integrasy öwrenmegi ýok. Bir täze göçürmek algoritmi sanat taýýarlama nusgasyna girdirmek üçin duýgym derejesi doly NLP uygulamalaryna syýahat çykaryp barýarys. Biz girdi metiniň basit üýtgemegini birnäçe tema kategoriýasy we polaritet tanyşlama databaselerinde sürekli gowurap biler diýip görkezip bilýäris, iň bellenen duýgunyň ajaýyp bolmagy düşürilýände we bu sened ýeterlik ýerde uly bolar. Biziň netijelerimiz hem sanly çykyşymyz (representasion) araştyrmalarymyň in vivo çykyşymyza köp üns bermek üçin, nusgala edilen NLP Uygulamalarynyň aşak düşürmeklerinde umyda çykyşymyzyň yerine, ýüz bellenilýär', 'sw': 'Uhambuzi wa Lexico unaweza kuzuia mifumo ya NLP kutokana na uelewa sahihi wa miambo. Pamoja na faida zake za uwezekano, ushirikiano wa taarifa za kiwango cha akili katika mfumo wa NLP bado umebaki kufahamu. Kwa kuingiza utaratibu wa usambazaji wa riwaya katika hali ya aina ya usambazaji wa sanaa, tunatengeneza pipeline ili kuunganisha taarifa za kisasa katika matumizi ya NLP ya chini ya mto. Tunaonyesha kuwa ubaguzi rahisi wa maandishi ya input unaweza kusababisha maboresho ya utendaji katika vipengele kadhaa vya mada na taarifa za uchunguzi wa uchafuzi, hasa pale ambapo uzalendo mzuri wa orodha ya maana ya msingi unapunguzwa na nyaraka inatosha. Matokeo yetu pia yanaonyesha hitaji la utafiti wa uwakilishi wa maana ili kuonyesha zaidi kwenye tafiti za vivo ambazo zinalenga utendaji katika matumizi ya NLP ya chini badala ya bendera za kimapenzi.', 'fa': 'غير قابل تحقيقات سکسي ميتونه سيستم هاي NLP رو از درک دقيقا درک سيمانتي جلوگيري کنه با وجود منافع پتانسیلش، جمع اطلاعات سطح حس به سیستم NLP تحقیق نشده است. با توجه به یک الگوریتم تغییر تغییر نویسی در یک مدل تغییر قانونی هنر، یک لوله ایجاد می کنیم تا اطلاعات سطح حس را به کاربردهای NLP پایین\u200cترین تغییر دهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که یک تغییر ساده از متن ورودی می تواند به پیشرفت عملکرد موجود در مجموعه\u200cهای تقسیم و شناسایی داده\u200cهای قطعیت، مخصوصاً وقتی بزرگی نیکویی از اختراع حس زیر کاهش می\u200cشود و سند به اندازه کافی بزرگ است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نیاز به تحقیقات نمایش حسی برای تمرکز بیشتری بر ارزیابی\u200cهای vivo که هدف عملکرد در کاربردهای NLP پایین\u200cترین نسبت به نقشه\u200cهای هنری است.', 'af': "Leksiese ongelukkigheid kan NLP stelsels voorwerp van presies verstanding van semantieke. Onthou sy potensiele voordele, het die integrasie van sens-vlak inligting in NLP stelsels ondersteun. Deur 'n roman-disambiguasie-algoritme in 'n staat-van-die-kuns-klasifikasie model te inkorporeer, skep ons 'n pyplin om sin-vlak inligting in onderstreem NLP-toepassings te integreer. Ons wys dat 'n eenvoudige ontsamming van die invoer teks kan lei na konsistente prestasie verbetering op veelvuldige onderwerp kategorisasie en polariteit-opskrifte datastel, veral wanneer die fyn granulariteit van die onderwerp sens-inventorie verduur word en die dokument genoeg groot is. Ons resultate wys ook na die behoefte vir sens voorstelling reseksie om meer op in vivo evaluasies te fokus wat die prestasie in onderstreem NLP-toepassings doen in plaas van kunstensiese benchmarke.", 'am': 'የሜክሲካዊ ፍላጎት የNLP ስርዓቶች ከስህተት ማስተዋል እንዲከለክሉ ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የችሎታዊ ጥቅም ቢሆንም፣ የዓይነት ደረጃ መረጃን ወደ NLP ስርዓቶች ውስጥ ማጠቃቀሚያ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን መለያየት አሌጎርቲምን በሀገር-የart ክፍል ሞዴል በመጠቀም እና የስህተት ደረጃ መረጃዎችን ወደ ታችኛው ወንዝ NLP ፕሮግራሞች ለመጠቀም እናስጀምር፡፡ የጥያቄ ጽሑፍ ቀላል ውጤት በብዛት ጉዳዩ ክፍተት እና የርኩስ መረጃዎችን ማሳየት እንዲችል እናሳየናለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ደግሞ በአስቸጋሪው ውጤቶች ይልቅ የNLP ፕሮግራሞች ውጤቶች በሚያሳየው የቪvo ማስታወቂያውን ለማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'sq': 'Dëshmirësia lexike mund të pengojë sistemet NLP nga kuptimi i saktë i semantikës. Pavarësisht nga përfitimet e saj të mundshme, integrimi i informacionit të nivelit të kuptimit në sistemet NLP ka mbetur i pakënaqur. Duke përfshirë një algoritëm të ri të çambiguacionit në një model klasifikimi më të lartë, ne krijojmë një tubacion për të integruar informacionin e nivelit të ndjeshëm në aplikimet e NLP-së. Ne tregojmë se një çambiguacion i thjeshtë i tekstit të hyrjes mund të çojë në përmirësim konsistent të performancës në kategorizimin e shumëfishtë të temave dhe zbulimin e polaritetit të të dhënave, veçanërisht kur granulariteti i bukur i inventarit të ndjenjave bazë është reduktuar dhe dokumenti është mjaft i madh. Rezultatet tona tregojnë gjithashtu nevojën për kërkime përfaqësimi të ndjeshëm për të përqëndruar më shumë në vlerësimet in vivo që synojnë performancën në aplikimet e NLP në vazhdim sesa në pikë të pikave artificiale.', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական անորոշակիությունը կարող է արգելել ՆԼՊ համակարգերին սեմանտիկայի ճշգրիտ հասկանալու համար: Չնայած դրա պոտենցիալ առավելություններին, զգայական մակարդակի տեղեկատվության ինտեգրացիան ՆԼՊ համակարգերի մեջ դեռևս թերագնահատված է: Նոր բացատրության ալգորիթմ ներառելով ամենաբարձր դասակարգման մոդելի մեջ, մենք ստեղծում ենք խողովակաշար, որպեսզի ինտեգրենք զգայական մակարդակի տեղեկատվությունը ՆԼՊ-ի հետագա ծրագրերի մեջ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մուտքագրման տեքստի պարզ անբացատրությունը կարող է հանգեցնել նշանակալի բարելավմանը բազմաթիվ թեմայի կատեգորիզացիայի և հյուսիսականության հայտնաբերման տվյալների համակարգերի վերաբերյալ, հատկապես երբ հիմնական զգացմունքի գոյությունը նվազեց Our results also point to the need for sense representation research to focus more on in vivo evaluations which target the performance in downstream NLP applications rather than artificial benchmarks.', 'bs': 'Leksička ambiguita može spriječiti NLP sisteme od tačnog razumijevanja semantika. Uprkos svojim potencijalnim prednostima, integracija informacija o nivou osjećaja u NLP-ove sustave ostala je pod ispitivanjem. Uključujući nov algoritam disambiguacije u model klasifikacije umjetnosti, stvaramo cijev za integraciju informacija o nivou osjećaja u prijave NLP. Pokazujemo da jednostavna disambiguacija teksta za ulazak može dovesti do konsekventnog poboljšanja učinkovitosti u mnogim kategorijama i podacima za otkrivanje polarnosti, posebno kada se smanjuje fina granularnost inventara temeljnog osjećaja i dokument je dovoljno velik. Naši rezultati također ukazuju na potrebu istraživanja predstavljanja smisla da se usredotoči na procjene in vivo koji ciljaju učinkovitost u potpunim aplikacijama NLP umjesto umjetnih kriterija.', 'az': 'NLP sisteml…ôrini semantik haqqńĪndan dońüru anlamaqdan d…ôf ed…ô bil…ôr. NLP sisteml…ôrin…ô hiss-seviyy…ôti m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn integrasiyasńĪ d…ôyiŇüm…ôdi. Bir yeni disambiguasyon algoritmi bir sanat klasifikasiya modeli il…ô birl…ôŇüdirib, sense-level m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ a ŇüańüńĪ NLP proqramlarńĪna birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir pipeline yaradńĪrńĪq. Biz g√∂st…ôririk ki, giriŇü m…ôtnl…ôrin basit bir inambiguasyonu √ßoxlu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr kategoriyasiyasńĪ v…ô polarit…ôt tanńĪdńĪrma veri qurularńĪnda m√ľ…ôyy…ôn bir performanslńĪq d√ľz…ôltm…ôy…ô yol a √ßar, √∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô d…ôyiŇüdirilmiŇü hiss quruluŇüunun g√∂z…ôl granularitńĪ azaldńĪńüńĪ v…ô bel…ô m…ôs…ôl…ôn kifay…ôt q…ôd…ôr b√∂y√ľkd√ľr. Bizim sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz h…ôm√ßin in anlayńĪŇü araŇütńĪrmalarńĪna daha √ßox in vivo deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôrin…ô t…ôr…ôf g√∂st…ôrir ki, NLP uygulamalarńĪnńĪn sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ, sanatlńĪ benchmarkl…ôrin yerin…ô, aŇüańüńĪ t…ôr…ôfl…ôrind…ô n…ôtic…ô edir.', 'ca': "L'ambigüitat lèxica pot impedir que els sistemes NLP entenguin exactament la semàntica. Malgrat els seus beneficis potencials, l'integració de la informació de nivell sensorial en els sistemes NLP ha sigut insuficient. Incorporant un nou algoritme de desambiguació en un model de classificació d'última generació, creem un pipeline per integrar informació de nivell sensorial en aplicacions de NLP avall. Mostrem que una simple desambiguació del text d'entrada pot portar a una millora consistent del rendiment en múltiples grups de dades de categorització de temes i detecció de polaritat, sobretot quan la granularitat del inventari del sentit subjacent és reduïda i el document és prou gran. Els nostres resultats també apunten a la necessitat de recerca de representació sensorial per centrar-se més en evaluacions in vivo que miren al rendiment en aplicacions de NLP en avall en comptes de punts de referència artificials.", 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিয়াল ক্ষেত্রে এনএলপি সিস্টেম সঠিক বুঝতে পারে। তার সম্ভাব্য সুবিধা সত্ত্বেও এনএলপি সিস্টেমের মধ্যে বুদ্ধিমান তথ্য সম্পূর্ণ তথ্য সংগঠিত হয়ে গেছে। একটি উপন্যাস বিচ্ছিন্ন অ্যালগোরিদমকে একটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প-শ্রেণীবিভাগ মডেলে যুক্ত করার মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি পাইপেলাইন তৈরি করি যাতে স্বয়ংক্রিয় ত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ইনপুটের টেক্সটের একটি সহজ বিভ্রান্তিতে বিভিন্ন বিষয় বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভাগ এবং দূরীতির ডে আমাদের ফলাফলের প্রতিনিধিত্বের গবেষণার প্রয়োজনীয় ভিভো মূল্যের উপর আরো মনোযোগ প্রদান করার প্রয়োজন যা এনএলপি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের কাজের লক্ষ্য দিয়ে', 'et': 'Lexikaalne ebaselgus võib takistada NLP süsteemide semantika täpset mõistmist. Hoolimata võimalikust kasust on meelitasandi teabe integreerimine uue tööprogrammi süsteemidesse jäänud vähe uuritud. Uudse selgitamisalgoritmi kaasamisega kaasaegsesse klassifikatsioonimudelisse loome torujuhtme, et integreerida mõttetasandi teavet järgmistesse NLP rakendustesse. Näitame, et sisendteksti lihtne selgitamine võib viia järjepideva tulemuslikkuse paranemiseni mitme teema kategooriate ja polaarsuse tuvastamise andmekogumite puhul, eriti siis, kui aluseks oleva sensorivaru peen granulaarsus väheneb ja dokument on piisavalt suur. Meie tulemused osutavad ka vajadusele keskenduda meeleolu esindamise uuringutele rohkem in vivo hindamistele, mis on suunatud uue tööprogrammi järgnevate rakenduste tulemuslikkusele, mitte kunstlikele võrdlusnäitajatele.', 'cs': 'Lexická nejasnost může bránit NLP systémům v přesném porozumění sémantice. Navzdory svým potenciálním přínosům je integrace informací na úrovni smyslu do systémů NLP nadále nedostatečně zkoumána. Začleněním nového disambiguačního algoritmu do nejmodernějšího klasifikačního modelu vytvoříme potrubí pro integraci informací na úrovni smyslu do následných aplikací NLP. Ukazujeme, že jednoduché rozlišení vstupního textu může vést ke konzistentnímu zlepšení výkonu u mnoha tématických kategorizačních a detekčních datových sad polarity, zejména když je snížena jemná granularita základního inventáře smyslů a dokument je dostatečně velký. Naše výsledky také ukazují na potřebu výzkumu reprezentace smyslu, aby se více zaměřil na hodnocení in vivo, které se zaměřují na výkon v následných aplikacích NLP spíše než na umělé benchmarky.', 'fi': 'Lexinen epäselvyys voi estää NLP-järjestelmiä ymmärtämästä semantiikkaa tarkasti. Mahdollisista hyödyistä huolimatta aistitason tiedon integrointi NLP-järjestelmiin on jäänyt tutkimatta. Yhdistämällä uuden erottelualgoritmin huipputekniseen luokittelumalliin luomme putken aistitason tiedon integroimiseksi jatkojalostuksen NLP-sovelluksiin. Osoitamme, että syöttötekstin yksinkertainen erottelu voi johtaa johdonmukaiseen suorituskyvyn parantamiseen usean aihealueen kategorisoinnissa ja polariteetin tunnistustiedoissa, varsinkin kun taustalla olevan aistiluettelon hienojakoisuus pienenee ja dokumentti on riittävän suuri. Tuloksemme osoittavat myös, että aistiedustuksen tutkimuksessa on keskityttävä enemmän in vivo -arviointeihin, jotka kohdistavat suorituskykyä jatkojalostuksen NLP-sovelluksissa keinotekoisten vertailuarvojen sijaan.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Leksika iso ngubah sistem NLP kuwi kesempatan semanti kuwi. Nanging kabèh bener kapan ingkang dipunangé, akeh informasi sistem NLP kang isih mlaku. Mungkin nggawe Algorithm dismbiguation batir sistem ning model state-of-the-arts klaasasi sistem, kita gawe sistem kebuturan kanggo entegaturan informasi sistem sans kanggo aplikasi downtream NLP Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing paling-sistem sing bisa dumadhi akeh basa sing bisa nguasai perusahaan langgar bantuan karo kategorisi sing bakal dhéwé nggawe dataset sing apik dhéwé, ngomong kuwi mau sing paling dhéwé kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan winih sing beraksi lan dokumen kuwi nggawe barang dumadhi. Rejalaké awakdhéwé mengko nggawe aturan awakdhéwé ngerasakno karo perusahaan winih sing luwih nyoto nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno aplikasi NLP sembarang maneh, iso nggawe rata-rata sing artikseal.', 'he': 'Lexical ambiguity can impede NLP systems from accurate understanding of semantics.  למרות היתרונות הפוטנציאליים שלה, האינטגרציה של מידע ברמה הגיונית למערכות NLP נשארה לא מובנה. על ידי שילוב אלגוריתם חדש של ניתוח הבריאות למודל מסווג מצוין, אנו יוצרים צינור כדי להשתלב מידע רמה תחושה לתוכניות NLP. אנו מראים שפגיעה פשוטה של טקסט הכניסה יכולה להוביל לשיפור ביצועים קבוע על הקטגוריזציה מרובה נושאים וגילוי מידע קוטביות, במיוחד כאשר הגרנוליות הטובה של המרשים של תחושה בסיסית מופחדת והמסמך גדול מספיק. התוצאות שלנו מצביעות גם על הצורך למחקר מייצג הגיוני כדי להתמקד יותר בהערכות in vivo שמטרות את ההופעה בתוכניות NLP למטה במקום נקודות רמז מלאכותיות.', 'ha': "Zaidi na Leksiya ya kange na'urar NLP's system daga fahimta mai daidaita na semantiki. Bayan da amfãni masu yiwuwa, an ƙara ƙara integraten information na zane-zane zuwa tsarin NLP. Ina shigar da algoritm na raba cikin nowaya zuwa wata shirin-state-the-art-art, za'a ƙiƙira wani pipe don ya haɗa information ga-levels cikin shiryoyin ayuka na NLP. Tuna nũna cewa rabo mai sauƙi na matsayin inputin, yana iya kusa ya ƙara mafarin aiki a kan mai daidaita game da categorization masu yawa na madaidaici, kuma, hasa'a, idan an ƙara cikakken takardar da ke ƙara, kuma dukkan takardar ta isa girma. MatamayinMu na pointe wa muhimmin muhimmada a lissafa mazaɓa, dõmin ya yi muhimmi a cikin muhimmada in vo, wanda yana kasancẽwa ga umarni da ke cikin shirin NLP a ƙarƙashe, kuma don da musamman karo.", 'sk': 'Lexična dvoumnost lahko sistemov NLP prepreči natančno razumevanje semantike. Kljub morebitnim prednostim je vključevanje informacij na čutni ravni v sisteme NLP še vedno premalo raziskano. Z vključitvijo novega razločitvenega algoritma v najsodobnejši model klasifikacije ustvarimo cevovod za vključitev informacij na čutni ravni v nadaljnje aplikacije NLP. Pokazali smo, da lahko preprosta razločitev vhodnega besedila privede do doslednega izboljšanja uspešnosti pri več tematskih kategorizacijah in naborih podatkov za zaznavanje polarnosti, zlasti kadar se zmanjša drobna granulacija osnovnega inventarja senzorjev in je dokument dovolj velik. Naši rezultati kažejo tudi na potrebo po raziskavah predstavljanja čutov, da se bolj osredotočijo na ocene in vivo, ki so usmerjene na učinkovitost v nadaljnjih aplikacijah NLP namesto na umetne referenčne vrednosti.', 'bo': 'Lexical ambiguity can impede NLP systems from accurate understanding of semantics. NLP མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་ཐང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཉམ་དུ་བསླབས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། By incorporating a novel disambiguation algorithm into a state-of-the-art classification model, we create a pipeline to integrate sense-level information into downstream NLP applications. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་པར་ནང་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆེད་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞན་དང་གནས་ཚུལ ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་ཚོར་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འབད་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Reading Wikipedia to Answer Open-Domain Questions', 'ar': 'قراءة ويكيبيديا للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح', 'fr': 'Lire Wikipédia pour répondre aux questions du domaine ouvert', 'es': 'Leer Wikipedia para responder a preguntas de dominio abierto', 'pt': 'Lendo a Wikipedia para responder a perguntas de domínio aberto', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए विकिपीडिया पढ़ना', 'ru': 'Чтение Википедии для ответов на вопросы открытого домена', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの質問に答えるためのウィキペディアを読む', 'zh': '读维基百科以对开放域', 'ga': 'Vicipéid a léamh chun Ceisteanna Fearainn Oscailte a Fhreagairt', 'ka': 'ვიკიპედია გახსნა დიომინის კითხვებისთვის გარეშე', 'hu': 'Wikipédia olvasása nyílt domain kérdések megválaszolásához', 'el': 'Διαβάζοντας τη Βικιπαίδεια για να απαντήσετε σε ερωτήσεις ανοιχτού τομέα', 'it': 'Leggere Wikipedia per rispondere alle domande a dominio aperto', 'kk': 'Википедия ашылған домен сұрақтарына жауап беру', 'mk': 'Читање на Википедија за одговор на прашањата на отворен домен', 'lt': 'Comment', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിനുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുവാന്\u200d വിക്കിപിഡിയ വായിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': "Waqt li taqra l-Wikipedia biex twieġeb mistoqsijiet ta' dominju miftuħ", 'ms': 'Membaca Wikipedia untuk menjawab soalan Domain Buka', 'mn': 'Википедийг нээлттэй холбооны асуултуудын хариултыг уншиж байна.', 'pl': 'Czytanie Wikipedii, aby odpowiedzieć na pytania o otwarte domeny', 'ro': 'Citirea Wikipedia pentru a răspunde la întrebări deschise', 'no': 'Lesar Wikipedia til svar på opna domenespørsmål', 'sr': 'Čitam Wikipedia na odgovore na pitanja otvorene domene', 'si': 'විකිපිඩියාව ප්\u200dරශ්න පිළිබඳට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට කියනවා', 'ta': 'திறந்த டொமைன் கேள்விகளுக்கு விகிபிடியாவை படிக்கிறது', 'sv': 'Läsa Wikipedia för att svara på frågor med öppen domän', 'so': "Wikipedia in uu ka jawaabo su'aalaha furan Domain", 'ur': 'اوپن ڈومین سؤال کے جواب کے لئے ویکیپیڈیا پڑھا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đọc Wikipedia cho câu trả lời câu hỏi mở miền', 'bg': 'Четене на Уикипедия за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн', 'hr': 'Čitam Wikipedia na odgovore na pitanja otvorenih domena', 'da': 'Læsning af Wikipedia for at besvare spørgsmål om åbent domæne', 'nl': 'Wikipedia lezen om open-domein vragen te beantwoorden', 'ko': '위키백과를 읽고 개방 분야의 질문에 대답하다', 'id': 'Reading Wikipedia to Answer Open-Domain Questions', 'de': 'Wikipedia lesen, um Open-Domain Fragen zu beantworten', 'fa': 'خواندن ویکیپیدیا برای پاسخ سوال دامنه باز', 'sw': 'Kusoma Wikipedia kulijibu maswali ya Uhuru', 'tr': 'Aç-alan soraglary jogaplamak üçin Wikipediýa okalýar', 'af': 'Lees Wikipedia na Antwoord Open- Domein Vragate', 'sq': 'Reading Wikipedia to Answer Open-Domain Questions', 'am': 'Wikipedia ለመስጠት ክፈት-ዶሜን ጥያቄዎችን አነበብ', 'hy': 'Վիքիփեդիայի կարդալը բաց վայրի հարցերին պատասխանելու համար', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়া পড়ছে খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার জন্য', 'az': 'Açıq Domena suallarına cavab vermək üçün Wikipedia oxuyar', 'bs': 'Čitam Wikipedia na odgovore na pitanja otvorenih domena', 'ca': 'Llegir Wikipedia per respondre preguntes de domini obert', 'cs': 'Čtení Wikipedie pro odpověď na otázky otevřené domény', 'et': 'Vikipeedia lugemine avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Wikipedian lukeminen avoimeen verkkotunnukseen liittyviin kysymyksiin', 'he': 'קריאת ויקיפדיה כדי לענות על שאלות בתחום פתוח', 'jv': 'Ngawe', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲན་ཚན་འདྲི་ཚུལ་ལ་Wikipedia་ཀློག་བཞིན་པ', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'sk': 'Branje Wikipedije za odgovore na vprašanja z odprto domeno'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes to tackle open-domain question answering using Wikipedia as the unique knowledge source : the answer to any factoid question is a text span in a Wikipedia article. This task of machine reading at scale combines the challenges of document retrieval (finding the relevant articles) with that of machine comprehension of text (identifying the answer spans from those articles). Our approach combines a search component based on bigram hashing and TF-IDF matching with a multi-layer recurrent neural network model trained to detect answers in Wikipedia paragraphs. Our experiments on multiple existing QA datasets indicate that (1) both modules are highly competitive with respect to existing counterparts and (2) multitask learning using distant supervision on their combination is an effective complete system on this challenging task.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة معالجة الإجابة على سؤال المجال المفتوح باستخدام ويكيبيديا كمصدر فريد للمعرفة: الجواب على أي سؤال واقعي هو امتداد نص في مقالة ويكيبيديا. تجمع مهمة القراءة الآلية هذه على نطاق واسع تحديات استرجاع المستندات (العثور على المقالات ذات الصلة) مع مهمة الفهم الآلي للنص (تحديد تمتد الإجابة من تلك المقالات). يجمع نهجنا بين مكون بحث يعتمد على تجزئة Bigram ومطابقة TF-IDF مع نموذج شبكة عصبية متكررة متعددة الطبقات تم تدريبها على اكتشاف الإجابات في فقرات ويكيبيديا. تشير تجاربنا على مجموعات بيانات ضمان الجودة المتعددة الحالية إلى أن (1) كلتا الوحدتين تتمتعان بقدرة تنافسية عالية فيما يتعلق بالنظراء الحاليين و (2) يعد التعلم متعدد المهام باستخدام الإشراف عن بُعد على مجموعتهما نظامًا كاملاً فعالاً في هذه المهمة الصعبة.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone abordar la respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto utilizando Wikipedia como fuente de conocimiento única: la respuesta a cualquier pregunta factoide es un texto en un artículo de Wikipedia. Esta tarea de lectura automática a escala combina los desafíos de la recuperación de documentos (encontrar los artículos relevantes) con los de la comprensión automática del texto (identificar los intervalos de respuesta de esos artículos). Nuestro enfoque combina un componente de búsqueda basado en hash de bigramas y coincidencia TF-IDF con un modelo de red neuronal recurrente de múltiples capas entrenado para detectar respuestas en los párrafos de Wikipedia. Nuestros experimentos en múltiples conjuntos de datos de control de calidad existentes indican que (1) ambos módulos son altamente competitivos con respecto a sus homólogos existentes y (2) el aprendizaje multitarea mediante la supervisión a distancia en su combinación es un sistema completo eficaz en esta tarea desafiante.', 'fr': "Cet article propose d'aborder la question de la réponse aux questions ouvertes en utilisant Wikipédia comme source unique de connaissances\xa0: la réponse à toute question factuelle est une étendue de texte dans un article Wikipédia. Cette tâche de lecture automatique à grande échelle combine les défis de la récupération de documents (trouver les articles pertinents) avec ceux de la compréhension automatique du texte (identifier les plages de réponses à partir de ces articles). Notre approche combine un composant de recherche basé sur le hachage de bigrammes et la correspondance TF-IDF avec un modèle de réseau neuronal récurrent multicouche formé pour détecter les réponses dans les paragraphes Wikipédia. Nos expériences sur plusieurs ensembles de données d'assurance qualité existants indiquent que (1) les deux modules sont très compétitifs par rapport à leurs homologues existants et (2) l'apprentissage multitâche utilisant la supervision à distance sur leur combinaison est un système complet efficace pour cette tâche difficile.", 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe responder a perguntas de domínio aberto usando a Wikipédia como fonte única de conhecimento: a resposta para qualquer pergunta factóide é uma extensão de texto em um artigo da Wikipédia. Essa tarefa de leitura automática em escala combina os desafios da recuperação de documentos (encontrar os artigos relevantes) com os da compreensão automática do texto (identificar os intervalos de resposta desses artigos). Nossa abordagem combina um componente de pesquisa baseado em hashing bigrama e correspondência TF-IDF com um modelo de rede neural recorrente de várias camadas treinado para detectar respostas em parágrafos da Wikipedia. Nossos experimentos em vários conjuntos de dados de QA existentes indicam que (1) ambos os módulos são altamente competitivos em relação às contrapartes existentes e (2) o aprendizado multitarefa usando supervisão à distância em sua combinação é um sistema completo eficaz nessa tarefa desafiadora.', 'ja': 'この論文は、ウィキペディアを固有の知識源として使用して、オープンドメインの質問に答えることに取り組むことを提案している。任意の事実に基づく質問に対する答えは、ウィキペディアの記事のテキストスパンである。大規模な機械読み取りのこのタスクは、文書検索（関連する記事を見つける）の課題と、テキストの機械理解（それらの記事から答えを特定する）の課題を組み合わせています。私たちのアプローチは、bigramハッシュおよびTF - IDFマッチングに基づく検索コンポーネントと、Wikipediaパラグラフで回答を検出するようにトレーニングされた多層再帰ニューラルネットワークモデルを組み合わせています。複数の既存のQAデータセットに関する当社の実験は、(1)両方のモジュールが既存の対応するモジュールに対して競争力が高いこと、および(2)それらの組み合わせに対する遠隔監督を使用したマルチタスク学習が、この困難なタスクに対する効果的な完全なシステムであることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文议用维基百科为独知开放域决之:一切事皆维基百科文本跨度。 此大机器读事合文档检索(求相关文)挑战与机器解文本挑战(以此识)。 吾法将基双面散列与TF-IDF匹之搜索组件与重递归神经网络相合,当训练以检维基百科段落中之对。 吾等于数QA集之实验,(1)比于见模块,二模块皆有强竞争力,(2)用远程督之多任务学此挑战性之效也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अद्वितीय ज्ञान स्रोत के रूप में विकिपीडिया का उपयोग करके ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्न का उत्तर देने से निपटने का प्रस्ताव करता है: किसी भी तथ्यात्मक प्रश्न का उत्तर विकिपीडिया लेख में एक पाठ अवधि है। पैमाने पर मशीन पढ़ने का यह कार्य दस्तावेज़ पुनर्प्राप्ति की चुनौतियों को जोड़ता है (प्रासंगिक लेखों को ढूंढना) पाठ की मशीन समझ के साथ (उन लेखों से उत्तर की पहचान करना)। हमारा दृष्टिकोण विकिपीडिया पैराग्राफ में उत्तरों का पता लगाने के लिए प्रशिक्षित बहु-परत आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल के साथ बिगराम हैशिंग और टीएफ-आईडीएफ मिलान के आधार पर एक खोज घटक को जोड़ता है। कई मौजूदा क्यूए डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रयोगों से संकेत मिलता है कि (1) दोनों मॉड्यूल मौजूदा समकक्षों के संबंध में अत्यधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी हैं और (2) उनके संयोजन पर दूर के पर्यवेक्षण का उपयोग करके मल्टीटास्क सीखना इस चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य पर एक प्रभावी पूर्ण प्रणाली है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается рассмотреть вопрос с открытым доменом, отвечая на него с использованием Википедии как уникального источника знаний: ответ на любой фактический вопрос - это текстовый промежуток в статье Википедии. Эта задача машинного чтения в масштабе сочетает в себе задачи поиска документов (поиск соответствующих статей) с задачей машинного понимания текста (определение диапазона ответов из этих статей). Наш подход сочетает в себе компонент поиска, основанный на хешировании bigram и сопоставлении TF-IDF с многослойной рекуррентной моделью нейронной сети, обученной обнаружению ответов в пунктах Википедии. Наши эксперименты с несколькими существующими наборами данных QA показывают, что (1) оба модуля являются высококонкурентными по отношению к существующим аналогам и (2) многозадачное обучение с использованием дистанционного наблюдения за их комбинацией является эффективной полной системой для этой сложной задачи.', 'ga': 'Tá sé beartaithe ag an bpáipéar seo dul i ngleic le freagra na gceisteanna oscailte trí úsáid a bhaint as Vicipéid mar fhoinse eolais uathúil: is réimse téacs in alt Vicipéid an freagra ar aon cheist fhíorasach. Comhcheanglaíonn an tasc meaisínléitheoireachta seo ar scála na dúshláin a bhaineann le haisghabháil doiciméad (na hailt ábhartha a fháil) agus na dúshláin a bhaineann le meaisínthuiscint ar théacs (réise freagraí ó na hailt sin a shainaithint). Comhcheanglaíonn ár gcur chuige comhpháirt cuardaigh atá bunaithe ar hashing bigram agus meaitseáil TF-IDF le samhail líonra néarach athfhillteach ilchiseal atá oilte chun freagraí a bhrath i míreanna Vicipéide. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar thacair sonraí QA iolracha atá ann cheana (1) go bhfuil an dá mhodúl an-iomaíoch maidir le comhghleacaithe atá ann cheana agus (2) gur córas iomlán éifeachtach í foghlaim ilthasc ag baint úsáide as maoirsiú i bhfad i gcéin ar a gcomhcheangal don tasc dúshlánach seo.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει να αντιμετωπιστεί η απάντηση σε ερωτήματα ανοικτού τομέα χρησιμοποιώντας τη Βικιπαίδεια ως μοναδική πηγή γνώσης: η απάντηση σε οποιαδήποτε πραγματική ερώτηση είναι ένα εύρος κειμένου σε ένα λήμμα της Βικιπαίδειας. Αυτό το καθήκον της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης σε κλίμακα συνδυάζει τις προκλήσεις της ανάκτησης εγγράφων (εύρεση των σχετικών άρθρων) με αυτή της μηχανικής κατανόησης του κειμένου (προσδιορισμός του εύρους απαντήσεων από αυτά τα άρθρα). Η προσέγγισή μας συνδυάζει ένα στοιχείο αναζήτησης βασισμένο σε κατακερματισμό διγραμμάτων και αντιστοίχιση TF-IDF με ένα πολυεπίπεδο επαναλαμβανόμενο μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου εκπαιδευμένο να ανιχνεύει απαντήσεις σε παραγράφους της Βικιπαίδειας. Τα πειράματά μας σε πολλαπλά υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων QA δείχνουν ότι (1) και οι δύο ενότητες είναι ιδιαίτερα ανταγωνιστικές σε σχέση με τους υπάρχοντες ομολόγους και (2) η εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών χρησιμοποιώντας μακρινή εποπτεία στον συνδυασμό τους αποτελεί ένα αποτελεσματικό ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα σε αυτό το δύσκολο έργο.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány azt javasolja, hogy a Wikipédia mint egyedülálló tudásforrás segítségével kezeljük a nyílt domain kérdések megválaszolását: a válasz minden tényleges kérdésre egy Wikipédia cikk szövegtartománya. A méretű gépi olvasás feladata ötvözi a dokumentumok visszakeresésének (a vonatkozó cikkek megtalálása) kihívásait a szöveg gépi megértésének kihívásaival (a választartományok azonosítása ezekből a cikkekből). Megközelítésünk kombinálja a bigram hashing és TF-IDF egyeztetésen alapuló keresési komponenst egy többrétegű visszatérő neurális hálózati modellel, amelyet a Wikipédia bekezdésekben található válaszok felismerésére készítettünk. Több meglévő minőségbiztosítási adatkészleten végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy (1) mindkét modul rendkívül versenyképes a meglévő partnerekkel szemben, és (2) a kombinációjuk távoli felügyeletével végzett multitasking tanulás hatékony teljes rendszer ebben a kihívást jelentő feladatban.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone di affrontare la risposta a domande open-domain utilizzando Wikipedia come unica fonte di conoscenza: la risposta a qualsiasi domanda fattuale è un intervallo di testo in un articolo di Wikipedia. Questo compito di lettura automatica su larga scala combina le sfide del recupero dei documenti (trovare gli articoli pertinenti) con quella della comprensione automatica del testo (identificare la gamma di risposte da tali articoli). Il nostro approccio combina una componente di ricerca basata su hashing di bigramma e matching TF-IDF con un modello di rete neurale ricorrente multistrato addestrato per rilevare le risposte nei paragrafi di Wikipedia. I nostri esperimenti su più set di dati QA esistenti indicano che (1) entrambi i moduli sono altamente competitivi rispetto alle controparti esistenti e (2) l'apprendimento multitask utilizzando la supervisione a distanza sulla loro combinazione è un sistema completo efficace per questo compito impegnativo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Википедияға бірнеше білім көзі ретінде ашық доменге сұрақ сұрақтарын шешуді ұсынады: кез келген фактоид сұрақтарына жауап - Википедия мақаласында мәтін кезегі. Масштабтағы оқу компьютерінің тапсырмасы құжатты алу (мақалаларды табу) мәтіннің түсініктемесімен біріктіреді (бұл мақалалардан жауап сәйкестігін анықтау). Біздің тәсіліміз, Википедия параграфияларында жауаптарды табу үшін бірнеше қабатты қайталанатын неврал желі моделімен сәйкес келетін биграм хашинг мен TF- IDF негізінде іздеу компонентін біріктіреді. Біздің бірнеше QA деректер қорларындағы эксперименттеріміз (1) екі модульдер бар партнерлер мен (2) бірнеше тапсырманың біріктіру арқылы, олардың біріктіру арқылы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы', 'lt': 'This paper proposes to tackle open-domain question answering using Wikipedia as the unique knowledge source: the answer to any factoid question is a text span in a Wikipedia article.  Ši mašininio skaitymo skalėje užduotis derina dokumentų gavimo (atitinkamų straipsnių suradimo) ir teksto supratimo mašininiu būdu uždavinius (tų straipsnių atsakymų intervalų nustatymas). Mūsų metodas derina paieškos komponentą, pagrįstą bigramo hashing ir TF-IDF derinimu su daugiasluoksniu pakartotiniu nervinio tinklo modeliu, parengtu nustatyti atsakymus Wikipedia punktuose. Mūsų eksperimentai su keliais esamais QA duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad (1) abu moduliai yra labai konkurencingi esamų partnerių atžvilgiu, o (2) daugiafunkcinis mokymasis naudojant nuotolinę jų derinio priežiūrą yra veiksminga visapusiška šios sudėtingos užduoties sistema.', 'mk': 'Овој весник предлага да се реши одговорот на отворени прашања со користење на Википедија како уникатен извор на знаење: одговорот на било кое фактоидно прашање е текст во статија на Википедија. Оваа задача на машинско читање на скала ги комбинира предизвиците на преземањето на документите (пронаоѓање на релевантните статии) со оние на машинско разбирање на текстот (идентификување на растојанието на одговорите од тие статии). Нашиот пристап комбинира пребарувачки компонент базиран на биграм хашинг и TF-IDF совпаѓање со мултислоевен рецидент модел на нервна мрежа обучен за детектирање одговори во параграфиите на Википедија. Нашите експерименти на повеќе постоечки податоци за QA покажуваат дека (1) двата модули се високо конкурентни во однос на постоечките колеги и (2) мултизадачно учење користејќи далечен надзор на нивната комбинација е ефикасен целосен систем на оваа предизвикувачка задача', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan untuk menangani jawapan soalan domain terbuka menggunakan Wikipedia sebagai sumber pengetahuan unik: jawapan kepada mana-mana soalan faktoid adalah jangkauan teks dalam artikel Wikipedia. Tugas pembacaan mesin pada skala menggabungkan cabaran pemulihan dokumen (mencari artikel berkaitan) dengan tugas pemahaman mesin teks (mengenalpasti jangkauan jawapan dari artikel tersebut). pendekatan kami menggabungkan komponen gelintar berdasarkan hashing bigram dan TF-IDF yang sepadan dengan model rangkaian saraf berkurang berbilang lapisan dilatih untuk mengesan jawapan dalam paragraf Wikipedia. Eksperimen kami pada set data QA yang wujud berbilang menunjukkan bahawa (1) kedua-dua modul sangat bersaing terhadap rakan-rakan yang wujud dan (2) pembelajaran tugas berbilang menggunakan pengawasan jauh pada kombinasi mereka adalah sistem lengkap yang efektif pada tugas mencabar ini.', 'ml': 'വിക്കിപിഡിയയെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഉത്തരം തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം എതിര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറിന് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ്: വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d ഒരു വി സ്കേലില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ ഈ ജോലി രേഖയുടെ വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു (പ്രധാനപ്പെ ബിഗ്രാമിന്റെ ഹാഷിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി തെരച്ചിലുള്ള ഒരു ഭാഗവും വിക്കിപിഡിയയിലെ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു multi നിലവിലുള്ള ക്യൂ എ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നു (1) നിലവിലുള്ള കൂട്ടുകാരുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള കൂട്ടുകാരുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi li jiġi indirizzat it-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’dominju miftuħ bl-użu tal-Wikipedia bħala s-sors uniku ta’ għarfien: it-tweġiba għal kwalunkwe mistoqsija fattojde hija firxa ta’ test f’artikolu tal-Wikipedia. This task of machine reading at scale combines the challenges of document retrieval (finding the relevant articles) with that of machine comprehension of text (identifying the answer spans from those articles).  L-approċċ tagħna jikkombina komponent ta’ tiftix ibbażat fuq hashing bigram u TF-IDF li jaqbel ma’ mudell ta’ netwerk newrali rikorrenti f’diversi saffi mħarreġ biex jinstabu tweġibiet fil-paragrafi tal-Wikipedia. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq settijiet ta’ dejta QA multipli eżistenti jindikaw li (1) iż-żewġ moduli huma kompetittivi ħafna fir-rigward tal-kontropartijiet eżistenti u (2) tagħlim multikompiti bl-użu ta’ superviżjoni distanti fuq il-kombinazzjoni tagħhom hija sistema kompluta effettiva f’dan il-kompitu ta’ sfida.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår å få opp spørsmålet med opna domenet som svarar med Wikipedia som den unike kjelden for kunnskap: svaret på kvar fakoidspørsmål er eit tekstavtrykk i eit Wikipedia- artikkel. Denne oppgåva for lesing av maskinen i skala kombinerer utfordringane til å henta dokument (finna dei relevante artikkelane) med maskineundersøkinga av tekst (identifisering av svar frå dei artikkelane). Tilnærminga vårt kombinerer eit søkjemodus basert på bigram hashing og TF-IDF som passar med eit rekurserende fleire lag, rekurserende neuralnettverksmodell som treng til å finna svar i Wikipedia-avsnittstavar. Eksperimentane våre på fleire eksisterande QA-datasett tyder på at (1) begge modular er svært konkurrente med hensyn til eksisterande trekantar og (2) multioppgåver med distant oversikt på kombinasjonen sine er eit effektivt fullstendig system på denne vanskeleg oppgåva.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje rozwiązanie otwartej domeny odpowiedzi na pytania z wykorzystaniem Wikipedii jako unikalnego źródła wiedzy: odpowiedź na każde faktyczne pytanie jest zakresem tekstu w artykule Wikipedii. To zadanie odczytu maszynowego na skalę łączy wyzwania związane z odzyskiwaniem dokumentów (znalezieniem odpowiednich artykułów) z maszynowym zrozumieniem tekstu (identyfikacją rozszerzeń odpowiedzi z tych artykułów). Nasze podejście łączy komponent wyszukiwania oparty na haszowaniu bigramów i dopasowaniu TF-IDF z wielowarstwowym modelem powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej przeszkolonym do wykrywania odpowiedzi w akapitach Wikipedii. Nasze eksperymenty na wielu istniejących zbiorach danych QA wskazują, że (1) oba moduły są bardzo konkurencyjne w stosunku do istniejących odpowiedników, a (2) wielozadaniowe uczenie się przy użyciu odległego nadzoru nad ich połączeniem jest skutecznym kompletnym systemem w tym trudnym zadaniu.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტის შესაძლებელია გახსნა დიომინის კითხვის გასაღებისთვის ვიკიპედიის გამოყენება როგორც უნიკალური მეცნიერების მხოლოდ: ყველა ფექტიოდის კითხვის გასაღები არის ვიკიპ მაქსინის კითხვის რაოდენობა დოკუმენტის მიღება (შესაბამისი წესების მოძებნა) ტექსტის მაქსინის გაგრძელება (ამ წესებიდან გაგრძელება განსხვავება). ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა კომპონენტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ბიგრამის hashing და TF-IDF-ის დაბათებულია, რომელიც მრავალური რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს, რომელსაც სკ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები რამდენიმე აქვს QA მონაცემების კომპერიმენტებით აჩვენებს, რომ (1) ორივე მოდულები ძალიან კომპერიმენტიურია, რომელიც აქვს კომპერიმენტებით და (2) მულტი დავასწავ', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune abordarea răspunsurilor la întrebări open-domain folosind Wikipedia ca sursă unică de cunoaștere: răspunsul la orice întrebare factoid este un interval de text într-un articol Wikipedia. Această sarcină de citire automată la scară combină provocările de recuperare a documentelor (găsirea articolelor relevante) cu cea de înțelegere automată a textului (identificarea intervalelor de răspuns din aceste articole). Abordarea noastră combină o componentă de căutare bazată pe hashing bigrame și potrivirea TF-IDF cu un model de rețea neurală recurentă pe mai multe straturi instruit pentru a detecta răspunsurile în paragrafele Wikipedia. Experimentele noastre pe mai multe seturi de date QA existente indică faptul că (1) ambele module sunt extrem de competitive în raport cu omologii existenți și (2) învățarea multitask utilizând supravegherea la distanță a combinației lor este un sistem complet eficient pentru această sarcină provocatoare.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže da se rješava pitanje otvorenog domena koji odgovara na korištenje Wikipedije kao jedinstveni izvor znanja: odgovor na bilo koje faktoidno pitanje je tekst u članku Wikipedije. Ovaj zadatak pročitanja mašine na skali kombinira izazove prikupljanja dokumenta (pronalaženje relevantnih članaka) sa tim mašinskim razumijevanjem teksta (identifikacijom odgovora iz tih članaka). Naš pristup kombinira pretraživačku komponentu baziranu na velikom hashing i TF-IDF koji odgovara sa višeslojnim rekonstruiranim neuralnim mrežnim modelom obučenim za otkrivanje odgovora u paragrafima Wikipedije. Naši eksperimenti na višestrukim postojećim podacima QA ukazuju na to da su (1) obje module veoma konkurentni u pogledu postojećih kolega i (2) multitask učenja koristeći daleko nadzor na njihovoj kombinaciji efikasan kompletni sistem na ovom izazovnom zadatku.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විකිපිඩියාව භාවිත කරන්න විකිපිඩියාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ පරික්ෂණයේ කියවන්නේ පරික්ෂණයෙන් පරික්ෂණයෙන් ලිපිණි ගන්න (සම්බන්ධ පැත්ත හොයාගන්න) පරික්ෂණයේ පරික්ෂණය සමඟ පරික් අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විකිපිඩියාව ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විකිපිඩියාවේ ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් තියෙන QA දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට (1) දෙන්නම් මොඩියුල් තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිකාරියා', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu ka soo jeedaa in uu ka tacliiyo su'aalaha furan ee ku jawaabo warqada Wikipedia sida asal aqoonta u gaar ah: jawaabta su'aalaha oo dhan waa qoraal ku qoran warqada Wikipedia. Shaqadan machine-ka akhriska qiyaasta waxaa lagu soo ururiyaa dhibaatooyinka heshiiska dukumentiyada (raadinta qoraalka la xiriira) kaas oo lagu qorayo qoraalka qoraalka (caddeynta jawaabaha warqadahan). Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu ku kooban yahay qeyb raadinta oo ku saleysan bigram hash iyo TF-IDF oo la xiriira qaab shabakadda neurada ee badan oo lagu baray in la ogaado jawaabaha ku qoran qeybaha Wikipedia. Imtixaanadayada QA-ka ah oo ku qoran kooxo kala duduwan waxay muujinayaan in labadooda moduleed (1) aad u iskutaal u leeyihiin kuwa ku jira saaxiibada joogta iyo (2) barashada iskuullada kala duduwan ee la isticmaalayo ilaalinta fog ee la xidhiidha waa nidaam kamid ah oo ku saabsan arrimahan dhibaatada.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår att man tar itu med open-domain frågesvar med hjälp av Wikipedia som unik kunskapskälla: svaret på en faktisk fråga är ett textspann i en Wikipedia-artikel. Denna uppgift med maskinläsning i stor skala kombinerar utmaningarna med dokumenthämtning (att hitta relevanta artiklar) med maskinförståelse av text (att identifiera svaret spänner från dessa artiklar). Vårt tillvägagångssätt kombinerar en sökkomponent baserad på bigram hashing och TF-IDF matchning med en flerlagersmodell för återkommande neurala nätverk utbildad för att upptäcka svar i Wikipedia-avsnitt. Våra experiment på flera befintliga QA-datauppsättningar indikerar att (1) båda modulerna är mycket konkurrenskraftiga jämfört med befintliga motsvarigheter och (2) multitask lärande med fjärrövervakning av deras kombination är ett effektivt komplett system för denna utmanande uppgift.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் விக்கிபிடியாவை பயன்படுத்தி திறந்த கேள்விக்கு பதில் திறக்கப்படும் விசிபிடியாவை தனிப்பட்ட அறிவு மூலமாக நிர்ணயிக்கும் இந்த இயந்திர வாசிக்கை அளவில் படிக்கும் செயல் ஆவண மீட்டெடுப்பதின் சவால்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது (தொடர்பு கட்டுரைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க) உரையின் ச எங்கள் வழிமுறையில் ஒரு தேடுப் பிகிராம் ஹாஷ் அடிப்படையில் ஒரு தேடுப் பொருளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது மற்றும் TF- IDF பொருத்தும் பல அடுக்கு மீண்டும் நி பல இருக்கும் QA தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது. (1) இரு பகுதிகளும் இருக்கும் கூறுகளும் மிகவும் பொருத்தமானவர்கள் மற்றும் (2) தூரத்தில் கண்காணிப்', 'ur': 'This paper proposes to tackle open-domain question using Wikipedia as the unique knowledge source: the answer to any factoid question is a text span in a Wikipedia article. یہ ماشین پڑھنے کا کام مسائل کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے سے لکھنے کی چالوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے (موجود لکھنے کے) ماشین کے متوجہ ہونے کے ساتھ (ان لکھوں سے جواب کھڑے ہوئے) لکھنے کی چالوں سے ملتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ایک گھبرام حاشینگ اور TF-IDF کی بنیاد پر ایک تلاش رقم جمع کرتا ہے جو multi layer recurrent neural network model کے ساتھ ملتا ہے جو ویکیپیڈیا پراگراف میں جواب پہچان سکتا ہے. ہمارے بہت سے موجود QA ڈاٹ سٹ کے آزمائش نشان دیتے ہیں کہ (1) دونوں موجودات موجود موجود کنٹرپارت اور (2) multitask کی تعلیم کے مطابق دور کی نظارت کے مطابق ان کی ترکیب پر فائدہ پوری سیستم ہے اس مشکل کام پر۔', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Wikipedia-г өөр нэг мэдлэгийн эх үүсвэр болгон хариултыг нээлттэй холбоотой асуултыг шийдвэрлэхийг санал болгодог: ямар ч фактоид асуултын хариулт нь Википедийн хэвлэлийн текст хэмжээнд байна. Энэ машины унших үйл ажил нь баримтыг авах (хамааралтай баримтуудыг олох) асуудлыг машины текст ойлгох (хариултын хэмжээсүүдийг тэдгээр баримтуудын тодорхойлж чаддаг). Бидний арга хэмжээний хайлтын компонентийг Википедийн параграфуудын хариултыг олох боломжтой олон давхар тархины сүлжээний загвартай холбогдож байна. Бидний олон QA өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтууд нь (1) хоёр модуль хоёр нь сургуулийн эсрэг болон (2) олон ажлын сургалтын тухай өрсөлдөөнтэй байдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ шаардлагатай ажлын тухай хол даяарлын харилцааны тухай олон ажлын', 'uz': 'Ushbu qogʻoz Wikipedia yordamida oddiy maʼlumot manbasi sifatida javob berish uchun ochiq domen savol bilan javob beradi: bu savol Wikipedia maqoladagi matn span. Name Bigram haqida qidirish qidirish komponentini bir necha darajada qidirish komponentini birlashtiradi va Wikipedia parametrlarida javoblarni aniqlash uchun bir qatlam tarmoq modeli bilan bir necha qatlam tarmoq modeli bilan birlashtiradi. Our experiments on multiple existing QA datasets indicate that (1) both modules are highly competitive with respect to existing counterparts and (2) multitask learning using distant supervision on their combination is an effective complete system on this challenging task.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề nghị giải quyết câu hỏi mở miền, sử dụng Wikipedia như là nguồn hiểu biết độc đáo. Câu trả lời cho các câu hỏi về châ là cả một dòng chữ trong một bài báo Wikipedia. Nhiệm vụ đọc máy trên quy mô này kết hợp các thử thách của việc lấy tài liệu (tìm thấy các bài báo liên quan) với việc hiểu rõ các văn bản trên máy (xác định các câu trả lời nằm trong các bài báo đó). Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi kết hợp một thành phần tìm kiếm dựa trên việc làm việc này và TF-IDF khớp với một mô hình mạng thần kinh tái tạo nhiều lớp được huấn luyện để tìm câu trả lời trong đoạn Wikipedia. Những thí nghiệm trên nhiều tập tin cá nhân đã tồn tại cho thấy cả hai mô- đun đều rất cạnh tranh với các đối tượng còn lại. 2) Việc học tập đa nhiệm vụ dựa trên sự giám sát xa xôi về tổ hợp của chúng là một hệ thống hoàn thiện trong nhiệm vụ khó khăn này.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår at tackle open-domain spørgsmål besvarelse ved hjælp af Wikipedia som den unikke videnkilde: Svaret på ethvert faktisk spørgsmål er en tekstspænde i en Wikipedia artikel. Denne opgave med maskinlæsning i skala kombinerer udfordringerne ved dokumenthentning (at finde de relevante artikler) med udfordringerne ved maskinforståelse af tekst (at identificere svaret spænder fra disse artikler). Vores tilgang kombinerer en søgekomponent baseret på bigram hashing og TF-IDF matching med en multi-lags tilbagevendende neural netværksmodel uddannet til at opdage svar i Wikipedia afsnit. Vores eksperimenter med flere eksisterende QA datasæt indikerer, at (1) begge moduler er meget konkurrencedygtige i forhold til eksisterende modparter og (2) multitask learning ved hjælp af fjernovervågning af deres kombination er et effektivt komplet system på denne udfordrende opgave.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel stelt voor om open-domein vragen te beantwoorden met behulp van Wikipedia als unieke kennisbron: het antwoord op elke feitelijke vraag is een tekstbereik in een Wikipedia artikel. Deze taak van machinaal lezen op schaal combineert de uitdagingen van het terugvinden van documenten (het vinden van relevante artikelen) met die van het maschineel begrijpen van tekst (het identificeren van de antwoorden op die artikelen). Onze aanpak combineert een zoekcomponent gebaseerd op bigram hashing en TF-IDF matching met een meerlaags terugkerend neuraal netwerkmodel dat getraind is om antwoorden in Wikipedia paragrafen te detecteren. Onze experimenten met meerdere bestaande QA datasets geven aan dat (1) beide modules zeer concurrerend zijn ten opzichte van bestaande tegenhangers en (2) multitask leren met behulp van toezicht op afstand op hun combinatie een effectief compleet systeem is voor deze uitdagende taak.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предлага да се справи с отговора на въпроси с отворен домейн, използвайки Уикипедия като уникален източник на знания: отговорът на всеки фактически въпрос е текстов диапазон в статия в Уикипедия. Тази задача за машинно четене в мащаб съчетава предизвикателствата на извличането на документи (намирането на съответните статии) с това на машинното разбиране на текста (идентифицирането на отговора обхваща тези статии). Нашият подход комбинира компонент за търсене, базиран на биграмово хеширане и съвпадение с многослоен модел на повтаряща се невронна мрежа, обучен да открива отговори в параграфи на Уикипедия. Нашите експерименти с множество съществуващи набори от данни за контрол на качеството показват, че (1) двата модула са силно конкурентни по отношение на съществуващите колеги и (2) многозадачното обучение чрез дистанционен надзор върху комбинацията им е ефективна цялостна система за тази предизвикателна задача.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže rješavanje otvorenog domena pitanja odgovora na Wikipedia kao jedinstveni izvor znanja: odgovor na bilo koje faktoidno pitanje je tekst razdoblje u članku Wikipedia. Ovaj zadatak pročitanja strojeva na skali kombinira izazove prikupljanja dokumenta (pronalaženje relevantnih članaka) s obzirom na razumijevanje teksta strojeva (identificiranje odgovora iz tih članaka). Naš pristup kombinira pretraživačku komponentu baziranu na velikom hashing i TF-IDF odgovarajući s višeslojnim rekonstruiranim modelom neuralne mreže obučenim za otkrivanje odgovora u paragrafima Wikipedije. Naši eksperimenti na višestrukim postojećim QA podacima ukazuju na to da su (1) obje module vrlo konkurentni u pogledu postojećih kolega i (2) multitask učenja koristeći daleko nadzor na njihovoj kombinaciji učinkoviti potpuni sustav na ovom izazovnom zadatku.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier schlägt vor, offene Fragen zu beantworten, indem Wikipedia als einzigartige Wissensquelle verwendet wird: Die Antwort auf jede faktische Frage ist eine Textspanne in einem Wikipedia-Artikel. Diese Aufgabe des maschinellen Lesens in großem Maßstab verbindet die Herausforderungen des Dokumentenreservierens (Finden der relevanten Artikel) mit der des maschinellen Verständnisses von Text (Identifizierung der Antwortspannen aus diesen Artikeln). Unser Ansatz kombiniert eine Suchkomponente basierend auf Bigram Hashing und TF-IDF Matching mit einem mehrschichtigen, wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerkmodell, das darauf trainiert ist, Antworten in Wikipedia-Absätzen zu erkennen. Unsere Experimente an mehreren bestehenden QA-Datensätzen zeigen, dass (1) beide Module im Vergleich zu bestehenden Pendants sehr wettbewerbsfähig sind und (2) Multitask-Lernen unter Fernüberwachung ihrer Kombination ein effektives Gesamtsystem für diese herausfordernde Aufgabe ist.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan untuk mengatasi jawaban pertanyaan domain terbuka menggunakan Wikipedia sebagai sumber pengetahuan unik: jawaban kepada pertanyaan faktoid apapun adalah jangkauan teks dalam artikel Wikipedia. Tugas pembacaan mesin ini pada skala menggabungkan tantangan dari penulisan dokumen (menemukan artikel yang relevan) dengan tugas pemahaman mesin teks (mengidentifikasi jangkauan jawaban dari artikel tersebut). Our approach combines a search component based on bigram hashing and TF-IDF matching with a multi-layer recurrent neural network model trained to detect answers in Wikipedia paragraphs.  Eksperimen kami pada beberapa set data QA yang ada menunjukkan bahwa (1) kedua modul sangat kompetitif terhadap rekan-rekan yang ada dan (2) belajar multitask menggunakan pengawasan jauh pada kombinasi mereka adalah sistem lengkap efektif pada tugas yang menantang ini.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که با استفاده از ویکیپدیا به عنوان منبع علم متحده جواب سوال دامنه باز را حل کند: پاسخ به هر سوال فکتوئید یک منبع متن در مقاله ویکیپدیا است. این وظیفه خواندن ماشین در مقیاس چالش\u200cهای بازیابی سند (پیدا کردن مقاله\u200cهای مربوطه) را با توجه ماشین متوجه کردن متن (شناسایی پاسخ از آن مقاله\u200cها) ترکیب می\u200cکند. دستور ما یک بخش جستجو را بر اساس hashing bigram و TF-IDF متصل می\u200cکند که با یک مدل شبکه عصبی چند لایه تکرار می\u200cکند که برای شناسایی جواب\u200cها در بخش\u200cهای ویکیپدیا آموزش داده شده است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای QA موجود نشان می\u200cدهند که (۱) هر دو مدول با ارتباط با همکاران موجود و (۲) تعلیم چندین کار با استفاده از بررسی دور روی ترکیب آنها یک سیستم کامل موثر در این کار مشکل است.', 'ko': '본고는 위키백과를 유일한 지식원으로 삼아 개방 분야의 질문에 대한 대답을 해결하고자 한다. 모든factoid 문제의 답은 위키백과 문장의 텍스트 경계이다.이 대규모 기계 읽기 임무는 문헌 검색(관련 문장 찾기)과 기계 이해 텍스트(이 문장의 답안 범위를 확정)의 도전을 결합시켰다.우리의 방법은 이원 해시와 TF-IDF가 일치하는 검색 구성 요소와 훈련을 거친 다층 귀속 신경 네트워크 모델을 결합시켜 위키백과 단락의 답안을 검출하는 것이다.우리가 여러 개의 기존 품질 보증 데이터 집합에서의 실험을 통해 (1) 이 두 모듈은 기존 모듈에 비해 강한 경쟁력을 가진다. (2) 그들의 조합을 원격 감시하는 다중 임무 학습은 도전적인 임무를 완성하는 효과적인 완전한 시스템이다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapendekeza kukabiliana na maswali ya wazi ya ndani ya kujibu kwa kutumia Wikipedia kama chanzo cha ujuzi wa kipekee: jibu la swali lolote la ukweli ni jumbe la maandishi katika makala ya Wikipedia. Kazi hii ya kusoma mashine kwa kiwango hiki inaunganisha changamoto za kupatikana kwa waraka (kutafuta makala muhimu) na ile ya kompyuta ya simu (kutambua majibu kutoka kwenye makala hizo). Hatua yetu inaunganisha vifaa vya kutafuta kinachotumiwa na vifaa vinavyotumika na TF-IDF ikilinganisha na mtindo wa mtandao wa neura unaoendelea kupata majibu katika vipengele vya Wikipedia. Majaribio yetu kwenye seti za takwimu za QA zinaonyesha kuwa (1) vifaa vyote vina ushindani mkubwa kwa kuhusiana na wapinzani waliopo na (2) masomo mengi ya kujifunza kwa kutumia ufuatiliaji wa mbali katika muunganiko wao ni mfumo mzuri wa kamili kwenye kazi hii ya changamoto.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Wikipediýany ň ýeke bilim çeşmesi hökmünde a çyk domena soragyny çözmegi teklip edip otyrýar: her faktoid soragynyň jogaby Wikipediýa makalasynda metin döredikdir. Bu mekdepde maşynyň okamakynyň zady senedi almak kynçylygyny birleşýär (maşynyň esasy makalary tapmak) metin düşünmesi bilen (jogabynyň gapysyny tanap edip biler). Biziň ýaryşymyz bigram hashing we TF-IDF-a daýanýar, Wikipediýa paragraflarda jogablary tanamak üçin bilinmeli näral şebeke nusgala modelini birleşýär. Biziň birnäçe bar QA veri setirlerinde deneylerimiz (1) hem modüller bolan counterpartlaryň we (2) multi-täbli öwrenmek bilen uzak supervisiýasyny ulanyp bu kynçylyk işinde etkinji komplett sistemdir.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel om open-domein vraag te bepaal met die antwoord van Wikipedia as die unieke kennisbron: die antwoord na enige faktoide vraag is 'n teks span in' n Wikipedia artikel. Hierdie taak van masjien lees op skaal kombinieer die uitdagings van dokument ontvang (vind die relevante artikels) met die masjien verstaan van teks (identifiseer die antwoord spans van dié artikels). Ons toegang kombinieer 'n soektog komponent gebaseer op bigram hashing en TF-IDF wat ooreenstem met' n multilaag herhaalde neuralnetwerk model wat opgelei is om antwoordes in Wikipedia paragraaf te ontdek. Ons eksperimente op veelvuldige bestaande QA datastelle wys dat (1) beide modules baie gemeenskap is met betrekking na bestaande kunstenaars en (2) veelvuldige taak leer gebruik van afstand supervisie op hul kombinasie is 'n effektief volledige stelsel op hierdie vanskerpende taak.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon të trajtojë përgjigjen e pyetjeve në domeni të hapur duke përdorur Wikipedian si burimin unik të njohurive: përgjigja për çdo pyetje faktike është një zgjerim teksti në një artikull të Wikipedias. Kjo detyrë e leximit automatik në shkallë kombinon sfidat e marrjes së dokumentit (gjetja e artikujve të duhura) me at ë e kuptimit automatik të tekstit (identifikimi i zgjatjeve të përgjigjeve nga këto artikuj). Përqasja jonë kombinon një komponent kërkimi bazuar në hashing bigram dhe TF-IDF përputhje me një model rrjeti neural të përsëritur me shumë nivele të trajnuar për të zbuluar përgjigjet në paragramat e Wikipedias. Eksperimentet tona në grupet e të dhënave QA të shumta ekzistuese tregojnë se (1) të dy modulet janë shumë konkurrues në lidhje me homologët ekzistues dhe (2) mësimi i shumë detyrave duke përdorur mbikqyrjen e largët në kombinimin e tyre është një sistem i plotë efektiv në këtë detyrë sfiduese.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ Wikipedia የተለየ የእውቀት ዕውቀት ምንጭ በመጠቀም የክፈት ዶሜን ጥያቄን ለመቀበል ይገልጻል፡፡ የውጤት ጥያቄ ማንኛውም ጥያቄ በWikipedia ጽሑፍ መዝገብ ነው፡፡ ይህ የመሳዊ አካሄድ በመስመር ላይ የሚነበብ ስራ የሰነድ ማቀናቀል ጥላቶችን (የአካባቢው ጽሑፎችን ማግኘት) ከጽሑፍ ማቀላቀል ጋር ያቆማል (መልስ ከዚህች ጽሑፎች የሚታወቅ) በቢግራም ሐሽክት እና TF-IDF በሚያስተካክሉ ብዙ ደረጃዎች በጥያቄ የነጥብ መረብ ሞዴል በሚያሳየው በWikipedia ጽሑፎች ውስጥ መልስ ለማግኘት ያስተማራሉ፡፡ በQA ዳታተሮች ላይ በብዙ ፈተናዎች ላይ ያሉትን ፈተናዎች (1) ሁለቱ ሞኮላዎች በአሁኑ ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ እጅግ ተቃዋሚዎች ናቸው እና (2) የሩቅ ጉዳይ በመጠቀም በሚያስተማሩ የብዙባቢ ትምህርት የዚህ አካባቢ ስራ ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሙሉ ስርዓት ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Wikipedia vasitəsilə müxtəlif bilgi mənbəsi olaraq cavab vermək üçün a çıq-domani sualına təklif edir: hər faktoid sualının cavabı Wikipedia maddəsində bir mətn səviyyəsidir. Bu maşın oxuyacağı işləri məktub anlaması makinelərin (məktubların cavabını təsdiqləyən məktubların təsdiqlənməsi üçün) məktub alınmasının çətinliklərini birləşdirir. Bizim yolumuz Wikipedia paragraflarında cavabları keçmək üçün təhsil edilən çoxlu-katlı nöral a ğ modeli ilə birləşdirilmiş böyük hashing və TF-IDF komponenti birləşdirir. Bizim çoxlu QA verilən qurğuları üzərində eksperimentlərimiz göstərir ki (1) hər iki modul mövcuddur kompartitlərə və (2) çoxlu işlər öyrənməsi ilə birləşdirilməsi üçün uzaq bir gözləmə sistemi bu çətin işlərdə etkili bir sistemdir.', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়া ব্যবহার করে উইকিপিডিয়া প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করে উইকিপিডিয়া ব্যবহার করে: যে কোন ফ্যাক্টোড প্রশ্ন মেশিনের পাঠের এই কাজটি নথি পুনরুদ্ধারের চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে মিশিনের লেখার সাথে মিশিনের সংক্রান্ত প্রবন্ধ খুঁজে (এই প্রবন্ধের উত্তর বিগ্রাম হ্যাশিং এবং TF-IDF এর ভিত্তিতে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা একটি অনুসন্ধানের উপাদান সংযুক্ত করে উইকিপিডিয়া প্যারাফেক্সে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি বহু স্তরে বিভিন্ন কিউএ ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের পরীক্ষা নির্দেশ করছে যে (১) উভয় মডিউল বিদ্যমান অংশগ্রহণকারীদের সম্পর্কে প্রতিযোগিতা করছে এবং (২) দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের ব্যবহা', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին առաջարկում է վերաբերվել բաց տիեզերքի հարցերին, որոնք պատասխանում են Վիքիփեդիային որպես առանձնահատուկ գիտելիքների աղբյուր. ցանկացած փակտոիդ հարցի պատասխանը Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածի տեքստի տարածքն է: Այս մեքենային կարդալու խնդիրը միավորում է փաստաթղթի վերադարձման մարտահրավերները (գտնելով հարկավոր հոդվածներ) և տեքստի մեքենային հասկանալու մարտահրավերները (նշելով այդ հոդվածների պատասխանների ընթացքը): Մեր մոտեցումը համադրում է փնտրական բաղադրիչ, որը հիմնված է բիգրամ հաշիռի և ԹՖ-IDF-ի վրա, որոնք համապատասխանում են բազմաշերտ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի մոդելի հետ, որը պատրաստված է Վիքիփեդիայի պարագաներում պատ Մեր բազմաթիվ գոյություն ունեցող QA տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ (1) երկու մոդուլները բարձր մրցակցություն ունեն գոյություն ունեցող համագործակալների նկատմամբ, և (2) բազմաթիվ աշխատանքների ուսումնասիրությունը, օգտագործելով հեռավոր վերահ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže rješavanje otvorenog domena pitanja odgovarajući na korištenje Wikipedia kao jedinstveni izvor znanja: odgovor na bilo koje faktoidno pitanje je tekst u članku Wikipedia. Ovaj zadatak pročitanja strojeva na skali kombinira izazove prikupljanja dokumenta (pronalaženje relevantnih članaka) sa tim mašinom koja razumije tekst (identificiranje odgovora iz tih članaka). Naš pristup kombinira pretraživačku komponentu baziranu na bigramskom hashing i TF-IDF koji odgovara sa višeslojnim rekonstruiranim neuralnim mrežnim modelom obučenim za otkrivanje odgovora u paragrafima Wikipedije. Naši eksperimenti na višestrukim postojećim podacima QA ukazuju na to da je (1) obje module veoma konkurentni u odnosu na postojeće kolege i (2) multitask učenje koristeći daleko nadzor na njihovu kombinaciju efikasan potpuni sustav na ovom izazovnom zadatku.', 'ca': "Aquest article propon abordar la resposta a preguntes de domini obert utilitzant Wikipedia com la font única de coneixement: la resposta a qualsevol pregunta factoide és una extensió de text en un article de Wikipedia. This task of machine reading at scale combines the challenges of document retrieval (finding the relevant articles) with that of machine comprehension of text (identifying the answer spans from those articles).  El nostre enfocament combina un component de cerca basat en el bigram hashing i el TF-IDF que coincideixen amb un model de xarxa neural recurrent de múltiples capes entrenat per detectar respostes en paràgrafs de Wikipedia. Els nostres experiments en múltiples conjunts de dades QA existents indican que (1) ambdós móduls són altament competitius en relació a les contrapartides existents i (2) l'aprenentatge multitasca fent servir supervisió remota sobre la seva combinació és un sistema complet efectiu en aquesta tasca desafiadora.", 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje řešit otázky otevřené domény s využitím Wikipedie jako jedinečného zdroje znalostí: odpověď na jakoukoli faktickou otázku je textové rozpětí v článku Wikipedie. Tento úkol strojového čtení v měřítku kombinuje výzvy vyhledávání dokumentů (nalezení relevantních článků) s výzvou strojového porozumění textu (identifikace rozpětí odpovědí z těchto článků). Náš přístup kombinuje vyhledávací komponentu založenou na bigramovém hashování a TF-IDF porovnávání s vícevrstvým rekurentním modelem neuronové sítě vycvičeným k detekci odpovědí v odstavcích Wikipedie. Naše experimenty na několika existujících datasetech QA ukazují, že (1) oba moduly jsou vysoce konkurenční ve vztahu k existujícím protějškům a (2) multitasking learning s využitím vzdáleného dohledu na jejich kombinaci je efektivním kompletním systémem pro tento náročný úkol.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tehakse ettepanek käsitleda avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamist, kasutades Vikipeediat kui ainulaadset teadmiste allikat: vastus igale faktilisele küsimusele on teksti ulatus Wikipedia artiklis. See masinlugemise ülesanne ühendab dokumendi hankimise (asjakohaste artiklite leidmise) väljakutsed masinlugemisega tekstist (vastuse tuvastamine ulatub nendest artiklitest). Meie lähenemisviis ühendab otsingukomponenti, mis põhineb bigrammi räshimisel ja TF-IDF sobitamisel, mitmekihilise korduva närvivõrgu mudeliga, mis on koolitatud avastama vastuseid Wikipedia lõigetes. Meie eksperimendid mitme olemasoleva kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumiga näitavad, et (1) mõlemad moodulid on olemasolevate vastaspooltega võrreldes väga konkurentsivõimelised ja (2) mitmeülesandeline õppimine, kasutades kaugjärelevalvet nende kombinatsioonil, on tõhus terviklik süsteem selles keerulises ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymyksiin vastaamista käyttämällä Wikipediaa ainutlaatuisena tietolähteenä: vastaus kaikkiin faktoisiin kysymyksiin on Wikipedian artikkelin tekstialue. Tässä mittakaavassa koneellisen lukemisen tehtävässä yhdistyvät asiakirjojen hakuun liittyvät haasteet (asiaankuuluvien artikkeleiden löytäminen) ja tekstin koneelliseen ymmärtämiseen (vastausten tunnistaminen ulottuu näistä artikkeleista). Lähestymistapamme yhdistää bigrammin hajautukseen ja TF-IDF-yhteensopivuuteen perustuvan hakukomponentin monikerroksiseen toistuvaan neuroverkkomalliin, joka on koulutettu havaitsemaan vastauksia Wikipedian kappaleissa. Kokeemme useista olemassa olevista laadunvarmistustiedoista osoittavat, että (1) molemmat moduulit ovat erittäin kilpailukykyisiä olemassa oleviin vastaaviin verrattuna ja (2) monitehtäväoppiminen etäohjauksella niiden yhdistelmässä on tehokas kokonaisjärjestelmä tässä haastavassa tehtävässä.', 'jv': 'This paper proposal to open-domain question task Name Awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan ing batar-batar', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga obravnavanje odprtega domena odgovarjanja na vprašanja z uporabo Wikipedije kot edinstvenega vira znanja: odgovor na vsako dejansko vprašanje je besedilni obseg v Wikipedijinem članku. Ta naloga strojnega branja v obsegu združuje izzive pridobivanja dokumentov (iskanje ustreznih člankov) z izzivom strojnega razumevanja besedila (identifikacija odgovorov sega iz teh člankov). Naš pristop združuje iskalno komponento, ki temelji na bigramskem haširanju in ujemanju TF-IDF z večplastnim ponavljajočim se nevronskim omrežjem, usposobljenim za odkrivanje odgovorov v Wikipedijinih odstavkih. Naši eksperimenti na več obstoječih naborih podatkov o kakovosti kažejo, da sta (1) oba modula zelo konkurenčna v primerjavi z obstoječimi partnerji in (2) večopravilno učenje z daljnim nadzorom na njihovi kombinaciji je učinkovit celoten sistem pri tej zahtevni nalogi.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה להתמודד עם עניין על שאלות בתחום פתוח בשימוש בויקיפדיה כמקור ידע היחיד: התשובה לכל שאלה פקטואידית היא שטח טקסט במאמר בויקיפדיה. משימה זו של קריאת מכונות בסולם משלבת את האתגרים של השיגת מסמכים (למצוא את המאמרים הרלוונטיים) עם משימה של הבנה מכונת של טקסט (לזהות את מגוון התשובות מהמאמרים הללו). Our approach combines a search component based on bigram hashing and TF-IDF matching with a multi-layer recurrent neural network model trained to detect answers in Wikipedia paragraphs.  הניסויים שלנו על קבוצות מידע QA קיימות מרובות מצביעים כי (1) שני המודולים הם תחרותיים במיוחד בנוגע לשותפים קיימים (2) ללמוד משימות רבות באמצעות פיקוח רחוק על שילוב שלהם הוא מערכת מושלמת יעילה על המשימה המתגררת הזו.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་སྒྲུབ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ནང་གི་གཞན་པ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་སྐབས་བསམ་བློ་གཏ འདི་ནི་མ་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྷན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་གེ་ལེན་པའི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཆ་མཉམ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our approach combines a search component based on bigram hashing and TF-IDF matching with a multi layer recurrent neural network model trained to detect answers in Wikipedia paragraphs. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་QA གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱིས་Modules་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཞབས', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ɗin yana bukãtar ta haɗi wa tambayar kwamfyuta wanda aka buɗe su da amfani da Wikimedia kamar kilowa na ɗabi'a: jibar wa kowansa tambayar faktoid shine wani matsayi na cikin wani makala na Wikimedia. Wannan aikin da ake karanta kwamfyutan a cikakken takarda yana koma da zane-zane masu motsi da motsi na tsarin dokuman (mai sami da amfani da makala masu husika) da shi na ƙarfafa ɗin matsayi (Yanã gane cewa masu baka daga waɗannan makala). Tsarakanmu na koma da wani muhalli na search based on haske na bigram da TF-IDF mai daidaita da wani motel na jerin tarakin tara mai multi-daraja wanda aka sanar da shi dõmin ya gane majina cikin fassaran Wikiledia. Kayan jarrabõnmu masu da wasu QA datasetti masu jira sun nuna cewa (1) duk moduli sun yi ƙidãya ga masu motsi da ke kai yanzu, kuma (2) ƙarami masu amfani da yin amfani da tsari mai nĩsa a kan haɗuwarsu, shi ne tsarin mafiya amfani da cikakken aikin wannan mai walakar."}
{'en': 'Learning to Skim Text', 'ar': 'تعلم قراءة النص', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a ler o texto', 'fr': 'Apprendre à survoler du texte', 'es': 'Aprender a hojear texto', 'ru': 'Учимся убирать текст', 'zh': '稍涉文本', 'hi': 'पाठ को स्किम करने के लिए सीखना', 'ja': 'テキストをスキムする方法を学ぶ', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas téacs a scimeáil', 'ka': 'სკიმის ტექსტის შესწავლება', 'hu': 'A szöveg átkutatásának megtanulása', 'el': 'Μάθηση αποκομιδής κειμένου', 'kk': 'Өткізу мәтініне үйрену', 'lt': 'Mokymasis perkelti tekstą', 'it': 'Imparare a sfogliare il testo', 'ms': 'Learning to Skim Text', 'mk': 'Научи да пропушти текст', 'mt': 'It-Tagħlim għat-Test Xkumat', 'ml': 'Learning to Skim Text', 'no': 'Læring til tematekst', 'ro': 'Învățăm să glisezi textul', 'pl': 'Nauka przesuwania tekstu', 'mn': 'Судалгаан Текст сурах', 'sr': 'Naučenje na skim tekstu', 'sv': 'Lär dig att skimma text', 'si': 'ස්කිම් පාළුවට ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada qoraalka Skim', 'ta': 'Skim உரைக்கு கற்றுக்கொள்கிறது', 'ur': 'اسکیم متن کی سیکھ رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Skim matnini oĘ»rganish', 'vi': 'Học Văn bản trượt', 'bg': 'Научаване на текста', 'hr': 'Naučenje na skim tekstu', 'nl': 'Tekst leren skim', 'da': 'Lær at skimme tekst', 'de': 'Lernen, Text zu skimen', 'ko': '본문을 약독하다.', 'id': 'Belajar untuk Melewati Teks', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa Makala ya Skim', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن به متن اسکیم', 'tr': 'Skim Metini Öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të lëshuar tekstin', 'am': 'text-tool-action', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k', 'af': 'Leer na Skim Teks', 'ca': 'Learning to Skim Text', 'bn': 'Skim টেক্সটে শিখা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Teksti sirvimise õppimine', 'cs': 'Naučit se skim text', 'hy': 'Learning to Skim Text', 'bs': 'Naučenje skim teksta', 'fi': 'Tekstin selaaminen', 'sk': 'Učenje prečrtanja besedila', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Skim་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་སློབ་བཞིན་པ', 'he': 'ללמוד להעביר טקסט'}
{'en': 'Recurrent Neural Networks are showing much promise in many sub-areas of natural language processing, ranging from document classification to machine translation to automatic question answering. Despite their promise, many recurrent models have to read the whole text word by word, making it slow to handle long documents. For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it. In this paper, we present an approach of reading text while skipping irrelevant information if needed. The underlying model is a recurrent network that learns how far to jump after reading a few words of the input text. We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions. In our benchmarks on four different tasks, including number prediction, sentiment analysis, news article classification and automatic Q&A, our proposed model, a modified LSTM with jumping, is up to 6 times faster than the standard sequential LSTM, while maintaining the same or even better accuracy.', 'ar': 'تُظهر الشبكات العصبية المتكررة الكثير من الأمل في العديد من المجالات الفرعية لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، بدءًا من تصنيف المستندات إلى الترجمة الآلية إلى الإجابة التلقائية على الأسئلة. على الرغم من وعدهم ، يتعين على العديد من النماذج المتكررة قراءة النص بالكامل كلمة بكلمة ، مما يجعل التعامل مع المستندات الطويلة بطيئًا. على سبيل المثال ، من الصعب استخدام شبكة متكررة لقراءة كتاب والإجابة على الأسئلة المتعلقة به. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا لقراءة النص مع تخطي المعلومات غير ذات الصلة إذا لزم الأمر. النموذج الأساسي هو شبكة متكررة تتعلم إلى أي مدى يجب القفز بعد قراءة بضع كلمات من نص الإدخال. نحن نستخدم طريقة التدرج القياسي للسياسة لتدريب النموذج على اتخاذ قرارات القفز المنفصلة. في معاييرنا لأربع مهام مختلفة ، بما في ذلك التنبؤ بالأرقام ، وتحليل المشاعر ، وتصنيف المقالات الإخبارية ، والأسئلة والأجوبة التلقائية ، فإن نموذجنا المقترح ، LSTM المعدل مع القفز ، أسرع بما يصل إلى 6 مرات من LSTM القياسي المتسلسل ، مع الحفاظ على نفسه أو حتى دقة أفضل.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales recurrentes son muy prometedoras en muchas subáreas del procesamiento del lenguaje natural, que van desde la clasificación de documentos hasta la traducción automática y la respuesta automática a preguntas. A pesar de su promesa, muchos modelos recurrentes tienen que leer todo el texto palabra por palabra, lo que hace que sea lento manejar documentos largos. Por ejemplo, es difícil utilizar una red recurrente para leer un libro y responder preguntas sobre él. En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque de lectura de texto y saltamos información irrelevante si es necesario. El modelo subyacente es una red recurrente que aprende hasta dónde saltar después de leer unas pocas palabras del texto de entrada. Empleamos un método estándar de gradiente de políticas para entrenar al modelo para que tome decisiones discretas. En nuestros puntos de referencia sobre cuatro tareas diferentes, incluida la predicción de números, el análisis de opiniones, la clasificación de artículos de noticias y las preguntas y respuestas automáticas, nuestro modelo propuesto, un LSTM modificado con saltos, es hasta 6 veces más rápido que el LSTM secuencial estándar, manteniendo la misma precisión o incluso mejor.', 'pt': 'Redes neurais recorrentes estão se mostrando muito promissoras em muitas subáreas de processamento de linguagem natural, desde classificação de documentos até tradução automática e resposta automática a perguntas. Apesar de sua promessa, muitos modelos recorrentes precisam ler todo o texto palavra por palavra, tornando lento o manuseio de documentos longos. Por exemplo, é difícil usar uma rede recorrente para ler um livro e responder perguntas sobre ele. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem de leitura de texto pulando informações irrelevantes, se necessário. O modelo subjacente é uma rede recorrente que aprende até onde pular depois de ler algumas palavras do texto de entrada. Empregamos um método de gradiente de política padrão para treinar o modelo para tomar decisões de saltos discretos. Em nossos benchmarks em quatro tarefas diferentes, incluindo previsão de números, análise de sentimentos, classificação de artigos de notícias e perguntas e respostas automáticas, nosso modelo proposto, um LSTM modificado com salto, é até 6 vezes mais rápido que o LSTM sequencial padrão, mantendo o mesmo ou até melhor precisão.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones récurrents sont très prometteurs dans de nombreux sous-domaines du traitement du langage naturel, allant de la classification des documents à la traduction automatique en passant par la réponse automatique aux questions. Malgré leur promesse, de nombreux modèles récurrents doivent lire le texte entier mot par mot, ce qui ralentit le traitement de documents longs. Par exemple, il est difficile d'utiliser un réseau récurrent pour lire un livre et répondre à des questions à son sujet. Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche de lecture de texte en sautant des informations non pertinentes si nécessaire. Le modèle sous-jacent est un réseau récurrent qui apprend la distance à parcourir après avoir lu quelques mots du texte saisi. Nous utilisons une méthode standard de gradient de politique pour entraîner le modèle à prendre des décisions de saut discrètes. Dans nos benchmarks sur quatre tâches différentes, y compris la prédiction des nombres, l'analyse des sentiments, la classification des articles de presse et les questions et réponses automatiques, notre modèle proposé, un LSTM modifié avec saut, est jusqu'à 6 fois plus rapide que le LSTM séquentiel standard, tout en conservant la même précision, voire une meilleure précision.", 'ja': '再発性ニューラルネットワークは、文書分類から機械翻訳、自動質問回答まで、自然言語処理の多くのサブエリアで多くの有望性を示している。 約束にもかかわらず、多くの定期的なモデルは単語ごとにテキスト全体を読み取らなければならないため、長い文書を処理するのが遅くなります。 たとえば、定期的なネットワークを使用して本を読み、それに関する質問に答えることは困難です。 本稿では、必要に応じて無関係な情報をスキップしながらテキストを読み取るアプローチを提示する。 基礎となるモデルは、入力テキストのいくつかの単語を読み取った後に、どこまでジャンプするかを学習する繰り返しネットワークです。 離散的なジャンプの決定を行うために、モデルをトレーニングするために標準的なポリシー勾配法を採用しています。 数値予測、センチメント分析、ニュース記事の分類、自動Q&amp;Aなど、4つの異なるタスクのベンチマークでは、ジャンプ機能を備えた改良型LSTMの提案されたモデルは、標準的なシーケンシャルLSTMよりも最大6倍速く、同等またはさらに優れた精度を維持します。', 'hi': 'आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के कई उप-क्षेत्रों में बहुत वादा दिखा रहे हैं, दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण से लेकर मशीन अनुवाद तक स्वचालित प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए। अपने वादे के बावजूद, कई आवर्तक मॉडलों को शब्द से पूरे पाठ शब्द को पढ़ना पड़ता है, जिससे लंबे दस्तावेजों को संभालना धीमा हो जाता है। उदाहरण के लिए, किसी पुस्तक को पढ़ने और उसके बारे में सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए एक आवर्तक नेटवर्क का उपयोग करना मुश्किल है। इस पेपर में, हम यदि आवश्यक हो तो अप्रासंगिक जानकारी को छोड़ते हुए पाठ पढ़ने का एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। अंतर्निहित मॉडल एक आवर्तक नेटवर्क है जो सीखता है कि इनपुट टेक्स्ट के कुछ शब्दों को पढ़ने के बाद कितनी दूर कूदना है। हम असतत कूद निर्णय लेने के लिए मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक मानक नीति ढाल विधि को नियोजित करते हैं। संख्या भविष्यवाणी, भावना विश्लेषण, समाचार लेख वर्गीकरण और स्वचालित क्यू एंड ए सहित चार अलग-अलग कार्यों पर हमारे बेंचमार्क में, हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल, कूदने के साथ एक संशोधित एलएसटीएम, मानक अनुक्रमिक एलएसटीएम की तुलना में 6 गुना तेज है, जबकि समान या बेहतर सटीकता को बनाए रखता है।', 'zh': '递归神经网络于自然语言处诸子领域皆见大前景,自文档类至机器翻译至自问答。 虽然,重模必逐字逐句读全本,此长文档之速也。 如难用循环网络读一书而答之。 本文中,我们发出一种读文本的方法,同时在须时跳过不相关的信息。 底层模样是循环网络,学在读输文本的几个单词后要跳多远。 我用格策梯度以训模形,以成离散之跃。 于四职之准,包数测数,情析新闻文,类自问答,模范之形,跳跃之LSTM,倍于准序LSTM6,同时而准确性。', 'ru': 'Повторяющиеся нейронные сети показывают многообещающие результаты во многих подобластях обработки естественного языка, начиная от классификации документов и заканчивая машинным переводом и автоматическим ответом на вопросы. Несмотря на их обещание, многие повторяющиеся модели должны читать весь текст слово в слово, что замедляет обработку длинных документов. Например, трудно использовать периодическую сеть, чтобы читать книгу и отвечать на вопросы о ней. В этой статье мы представляем подход чтения текста, пропуская при необходимости нерелевантную информацию. Базовая модель - это повторяющаяся сеть, которая учится, как далеко прыгать после прочтения нескольких слов входного текста. Мы используем стандартный метод градиента политики, чтобы обучить модель принимать дискретные прыжковые решения. В наших контрольных показателях по четырем различным задачам, включая предсказание чисел, анализ настроений, классификацию новостей и автоматический вопрос-ответ, наша предлагаемая модель, модифицированная LSTM с прыжками, до 6 раз быстрее, чем стандартная последовательная LSTM, сохраняя при этом ту же или даже лучшую точность.', 'ga': 'Tá an-gealltanas ag Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha i go leor fo-réimsí de phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha, ó rangú doiciméad go haistriúchán meaisín go freagraí uathoibríocha ceisteanna. In ainneoin a ngealltanas, caithfidh go leor samhlacha athfhillteacha an téacs iomlán a léamh focal ar fhocal, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé mall ag láimhseáil doiciméid fhada. Mar shampla, tá sé deacair líonra athfhillteach a úsáid chun leabhar a léamh agus ceisteanna a fhreagairt faoi. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair cur chuige maidir le léamh téacs agus gan faisnéis nach mbaineann le hábhar a sheachaint más gá. Is líonra athfhillteach é an tsamhail bhunúsach a fhoghlaimíonn cé chomh fada le léim tar éis cúpla focal den téacs ionchuir a léamh. Bainimid úsáid as modh caighdeánach grádán beartais chun an tsamhail a oiliúint chun cinntí scoite léime a dhéanamh. Inár dtagarmharcanna ar cheithre thasc dhifriúla, lena n-áirítear tuar uimhreacha, anailís sentiment, aicmiú airteagal nuachta agus ceisteanna agus freagraí uathoibríocha, tá ár múnla molta, LSTM modhnaithe le léim, suas le 6 huaire níos tapúla ná an LSTM seicheamhach caighdeánach, agus an rud céanna á choinneáil nó fiú. cruinneas níos fearr.', 'el': 'Τα επαναλαμβανόμενα Νευρικά Δίκτυα δείχνουν πολλά υποσχόμενα σε πολλούς υποτομείς επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, που κυμαίνονται από την ταξινόμηση εγγράφων έως τη μηχανική μετάφραση έως την αυτόματη απάντηση ερωτήσεων. Παρά την υπόσχεσή τους, πολλά επαναλαμβανόμενα μοντέλα πρέπει να διαβάζουν ολόκληρο το κείμενο λέξη προς λέξη, καθιστώντας αργή τη διαχείριση μεγάλων εγγράφων. Για παράδειγμα, είναι δύσκολο να χρησιμοποιήσετε ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο δίκτυο για να διαβάσετε ένα βιβλίο και να απαντήσετε σε ερωτήσεις σχετικά με αυτό. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση ανάγνωσης κειμένου ενώ παραλείπουμε άσχετες πληροφορίες αν χρειαστεί. Το υποκείμενο μοντέλο είναι ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο δίκτυο που μαθαίνει πόσο μακριά να πηδήξει αφού διαβάσει μερικές λέξεις του κειμένου εισόδου. Χρησιμοποιούμε μια τυποποιημένη μέθοδο διαβάθμισης πολιτικής για να εκπαιδεύσουμε το μοντέλο να λαμβάνει διακριτικές αποφάσεις άλματος. Στα κριτήρια αναφοράς μας για τέσσερις διαφορετικές εργασίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της πρόβλεψης αριθμών, της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων, της ταξινόμησης άρθρων ειδήσεων και των αυτόματων ερωτήσεων και απαντήσεων, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο, ένα τροποποιημένο με άλμα, είναι έως και 6 φορές γρηγορότερο από το τυποποιημένο διαδοχικό, διατηρώντας την ίδια ή ακόμα καλύτερη ακρίβεια.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებული ნეიროლური ქსელები ბევრი საბოლოო ენერგიის პროცესის სამუშაო ფართებში მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციადან მაქსინური გაგრ მათი გვერდის მაგრამ, ბევრი რეკურენტური მოდელები უნდა სიტყვებით უფრო ტექსტის სიტყვებით წაკითხვა, რომელიც ძალიან დიდი დოკუმენტების გა მაგალითად, რეკურენტური ქსელის გამოყენება ძალიან რთულია წიგნის შესახებ და მისი კითხვების შესახებ. ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ ტექსტის წაკითხვის პროგრამის გადავიწყებთ, როდესაც უნდა იყოს უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია. მინუს მოდელი არის რეკურენტი ქსელი, რომელიც ვისწავლის თუ რამდენი სიტყვების კითხვის შემდეგ გადატანა. ჩვენ სტანდარტური პოლიტიკური გრადიენტის მეტი გამოყენებთ, რომ მოდელის გასწავლათ დისკრეტური გასწავლა. ჩვენი ფერი განსხვავებული დავალების ბენქმარკებში, შესახებ რიცხვების წინასწორება, სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია, ახალგაზომის კლასიფიკაცია და ავტომატური Q&A, ჩვენი მოდელში, შეცვლელი LSTM-ს გადაწყვეტილება, 6-ჯერ უფრო ბეჭირდება, ვი', 'hu': 'Az ismétlődő neurális hálózatok a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás számos alterületén nagyon ígéretesek, a dokumentumok osztályozásától a gépi fordításon át az automatikus kérdések megválaszolásáig. Ígéretük ellenére sok visszatérő modellnek szóról szóra kell olvasnia az egész szöveget, így lassan kezeli a hosszú dokumentumokat. Például nehéz egy ismétlődő hálózatot használni egy könyv elolvasására és kérdések megválaszolására. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a szöveg olvasásának megközelítését, miközben szükség esetén kihagyjuk a lényegtelen információkat. A mögöttes modell egy visszatérő hálózat, amely megtanulja, milyen messzire ugorjon, miután elolvasta néhány szót a beviteli szövegből. Egy szabványos szabályozási gradiens módszert alkalmazunk a modellt diszkrét ugrási döntések meghozatalára. A négy különböző feladatra vonatkozó referenciaértékeinkben, beleértve a számok előrejelzését, az érzelmek elemzését, a hírek osztályozását és az automatikus kérdések-választást, javasolt modellünk, a módosított LSTM ugrással akár 6-szor gyorsabb, mint a standard szekvenciális LSTM, ugyanakár jobb pontosság fenntartása mellett.', 'kk': 'Қайталанған нейралық желілер табиғи тілдерді өзгерту көпшілігінде, құжаттардың классификациясынан компьютердің аудармасынан автоматты сұрақтар жауап беру үшін көп ұсынысын көрсе Олардың ұсынысына қайталану үлгілеріне қайталану үлгілері сөз бойынша толық мәтін сөзді оқу керек, ұзын құжаттарды басқаруды баяу керек. Мысалы, қайталанатын желі оқу және оның жауаптарын жауап беру қиын. Бұл қағазда, керек болса, мәтінді оқу әдісін көрсетеді. Төменгі үлгі - келтірілген мәтіннің бірнеше сөздерді оқу кейін қайталанатын желі. Біз үлгісін дискретті шешімдерді өзгерту үшін стандартты саясатты градиенттің әдісін қолданамыз. Біздің төрт әртүрлі тапсырмаларымызды бақылау белгілерімізде, сандарды бақылау, сезімдік анализ, жаңалық мақалалардың классификациясы және автоматты Q&A, қолданылатын моделімізде, өзгертілген LSTM бақылау үшін, стандартты келесі LSTM-дан 6 рет', 'lt': 'Kartotiniai nerviniai tinklai daugelyje gamtos kalbų apdorojimo pogrupių yra daug žadančių dalykų: nuo dokumentų klasifikavimo iki automatinio vertimo raštu iki automatinio klausimų atsakymo. Nepaisant jų pažadų, daugelis pasikartojančių modelių turi skaityti visą tekstą žodžiu po žodžiu, todėl lėtai tvarkomi ilgi dokumentai. Pavyzdžiui, sunku pasikartojantį tinklą perskaityti knygą ir atsakyti į klausimus apie ją. Šiame dokumente pristatome teksto skaitymo metodą ir prireikus praleidžiame nereikšmingą informaciją. Pagrindinis model is yra pasikartojantis tinklas, kuris išmoko, kiek toli praleisti skaitydamas kelis įėjimo teksto žodžius. We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions.  Mūsų standartuose dėl keturių skirtingų užduočių, įskaitant skaičiaus prognozavimą, jausmų analizę, naujienų straipsnių klasifikaciją ir automatinį Q&A klausimą, mūsų siūlomas model is, modifikuotas LSTM su šokimu, yra iki 6 kartų greitesnis nei standartinis sekacinis LSTM, tuo pačiu metu išlaikant tą patį ar net geresnį tikslumą.', 'mk': 'Рекурентните неврални мрежи покажуваат многу ветувања во многу подобласти на природното обработување јазик, од класификација на документите до машински превод до автоматски одговор на прашања. И покрај нивното ветување, многу повторни модели мора да го прочитаат целиот текст збор по збор, што го прави бавно да се справува со долги документи. For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it.  Во овој документ, претставуваме пристап на читање текст додека пропуштаме нерелевантни информации ако е потребно. Основниот модел е рецидентна мрежа која научи колку далеку да скокне по читањето на неколку зборови од внатрешниот текст. Употребуваме стандарден метод на политика за обука на моделот за да донесеме дискретни одлуки за скокање. Во нашите референтни оценки за четири различни задачи, вклучително и предвидување на бројот, анализа на чувствата, класификација на новинските статии и автоматска прашања и прашања, нашиот предложен модел, модификуван ЛСТМ со скок, е до 6 пати побрз од стандардната секвенцијална ЛСТМ, при што ја', 'it': "Le reti neurali ricorrenti stanno mostrando molte promesse in molte sottoaree dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, che vanno dalla classificazione dei documenti alla traduzione automatica alla risposta automatica alle domande. Nonostante la loro promessa, molti modelli ricorrenti devono leggere l'intero testo parola per parola, rendendo lento la gestione di documenti lunghi. Ad esempio, è difficile utilizzare una rete ricorrente per leggere un libro e rispondere a domande su di esso. In questo articolo, presentiamo un approccio di lettura del testo saltando informazioni irrilevanti se necessario. Il modello sottostante è una rete ricorrente che impara quanto lontano saltare dopo aver letto alcune parole del testo di input. Impieghiamo un metodo standard di gradiente delle politiche per addestrare il modello a prendere decisioni discrete di salto. Nei nostri benchmark su quattro diversi compiti, tra cui la previsione dei numeri, l'analisi del sentiment, la classificazione degli articoli di notizie e le domande e risposte automatiche, il nostro modello proposto, un LSTM modificato con salto, è fino a 6 volte più veloce del LSTM sequenziale standard, pur mantenendo la stessa o addirittura migliore precisione.", 'mt': 'In-Netwerks Newrali rikorrenti qed juru ħafna wegħda f’ħafna sottożoni tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali, li jvarjaw mill-klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti sat-traduzzjoni bil-magna sat-tweġiba awtomatika għall-mistoqsijiet. Minkejja l-wegħda tagħhom, ħafna mudelli rikorrenti jridu jaqraw it-test kollu kelma b’kelma, u b’hekk jagħmluha bil-mod biex jiġu ttrattati dokumenti twal. Pereżempju, huwa diffiċli li jintuża netwerk rikorrenti biex jaqra ktieb u jwieġeb mistoqsijiet dwaru. In this paper, we present an approach of reading text while skipping irrelevant information if needed.  Il-mudell sottostanti huwa netwerk rikorrenti li jitgħallem kemm jista’ jaqbeż wara li jaqra ftit kliem tat-test ta’ input. Aħna nużaw metodu standard ta’ gradjent tal-politika biex inħarrġu l-mudell biex nagħmlu deċiżjonijiet diskreti dwar il-qabża. Fil-punti ta’ riferiment tagħna dwar erba’ kompiti differenti, inklużi t-tbassir tan-numri, l-analiżi tas-sentimenti, il-klassifikazzjoni tal-artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet u l-Q&A awtomatika, il-mudell propost tagħna, LSTM modifikat bil-qabża, huwa sa 6 darbiet aktar mgħaġġel mill-LSTM sekwenzjali standard, filwaqt li tinżamm l-istess preċiżjoni jew saħansitra aħjar.', 'mn': 'Дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээлүүд байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх олон доор талаар амлалтыг харуулж байна. Документын хуваалцааны хэлбэрээс машины хөрөнгө оруулалт автоматик асуулт руу автоматик Тэдний амлалтаа ч гэсэн, олон дахин олон загварууд бүх текст үгийг үгүйгээр унших хэрэгтэй, урт баримтуудыг удирдах удаан хурдан унших хэрэгтэй. Жишээлбэл, үүний тухай ном уншиж, хариултын асуултуудыг дахин ашиглах нь хэцүү. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэрэгтэй бол хамаагүй мэдээллийг алдаж унших арга зам өгсөн. Хамгийн доорх загвар бол хэдэн үгийг уншихаас дараа хэд хэдэн удаа үсрэх загвар юм. Бид загварыг сургахын тулд стандарт бодлогын градиентын аргыг ашигладаг. Бидний 4 өөр даалгаварын багц дээр тооны таамаглалт, мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээ, мэдээллийн хэвлэл, автоматик Q&A, бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар дээр суугаад өөрчлөгдсөн LSTM нь стандарт дараагийн LSTM-аас 6 дахин хурдан байдаг.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ധാരാളം സബ്വഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക അവരുടെ വാക്ക് തന്നെയാണെങ്കിലും അധികമായി വീണ്ടും മോഡലുകള്\u200d വാക്കില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്ക് വായിക്കേണ്ടി വരും, നീണ്ട രേ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, ഒരു പുസ്തകം വായിക്കുകയും അതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഒരു രീതിയിലാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത്. ആവശ്യമുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d വായിച്ചതിനു ശേഷം എത്ര ദൂരെ ചാടുമെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ പോലീസ് ഗ്രേഡെന്\u200dറ് രീതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാ നമ്മുടെ നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d, നമ്പര്\u200d പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d, വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200d, വാര്\u200dത്ത കല്ലാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്യൂ എസ്റ്റി', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Neural Ulang-ulang menunjukkan banyak janji dalam banyak sub-kawasan pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi, berlainan dari klasifikasi dokumen hingga terjemahan mesin hingga jawapan soalan automatik. Despite their promise, many recurrent models have to read the whole text word by word, making it slow to handle long documents.  Contohnya, sukar menggunakan rangkaian berulang untuk membaca buku dan menjawab soalan mengenainya. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan pendekatan membaca teks sementara melangkau maklumat tidak relevan jika perlu. Model asas ialah rangkaian berulang yang belajar seberapa jauh untuk melompat selepas membaca beberapa perkataan teks input. Kami menggunakan kaedah gradien polisi piawai untuk melatih model untuk membuat keputusan melompat secara diskret. Dalam tanda referensi kami pada empat tugas yang berbeza, termasuk ramalan nombor, analisis perasaan, klasifikasi artikel berita dan Q&A automatik, model kami, LSTM yang diubahsuai dengan melompat, adalah sehingga 6 kali lebih cepat daripada LSTM sekuensi piawai, sementara menjaga kepekatan yang sama atau bahkan lebih baik.', 'pl': 'Powtarzające się sieci neuronowe wykazują wiele obiecujących w wielu podobszarach przetwarzania języka naturalnego, począwszy od klasyfikacji dokumentów po tłumaczenie maszynowe po automatyczne odpowiedzi na pytania. Pomimo obietnicy wiele powtarzających się modeli musi czytać cały tekst słowo po słowie, co powoduje, że obsługa długich dokumentów jest wolna. Na przykład trudno jest wykorzystać powtarzającą się sieć do czytania książki i odpowiedzi na pytania dotyczące niej. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy podejście do czytania tekstu przy jednoczesnym pomijaniu nieistotnych informacji w razie potrzeby. Podstawowym modelem jest powtarzająca się sieć, która uczy się, jak daleko skoczyć po przeczytaniu kilku słów tekstu wejściowego. Stosujemy standardową metodę gradientu polityki, aby szkolić model do podejmowania dyskretnych decyzji o skokach. W naszych wskaźnikach porównawczych dotyczących czterech różnych zadań, w tym przewidywania liczb, analizy sentymentów, klasyfikacji artykułów wiadomościowych i automatycznych pytań i odpowiedzi, nasz proponowany model, zmodyfikowany LSTM z skokami, jest nawet 6-krotnie szybszy niż standardowy sekwencyjny LSTM, przy zachowaniu tej samej lub nawet lepszej dokładności.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale recurente arată foarte promițătoare în multe subdomenii ale procesării limbajului natural, variind de la clasificarea documentelor la traducerea automată până la răspunsul automat la întrebări. În ciuda promisiunii lor, multe modele recurente trebuie să citească întregul text cu cuvânt, făcând-l lent pentru a gestiona documentele lungi. De exemplu, este dificil să utilizați o rețea recurentă pentru a citi o carte și a răspunde la întrebări despre ea. În această lucrare, vă prezentăm o abordare de citire a textului în timp ce săriți peste informații irelevante, dacă este necesar. Modelul de bază este o rețea recurentă care învață cât de departe să sari după citirea câteva cuvinte din textul de intrare. Utilizăm o metodă standard de gradient de politici pentru a instrui modelul pentru a lua decizii discrete de salt. În cadrul criteriilor noastre de referință pentru patru sarcini diferite, inclusiv predicția numerelor, analiza sentimentului, clasificarea articolelor de știri și întrebări și răspunsuri automate, modelul nostru propus, un LSTM modificat cu salturi, este de până la 6 ori mai rapid decât LSTM secvențial standard, menținând în același timp aceeași precizie sau chiar mai bună.', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktige neiralnettverk viser mykje lov i mange underområde av naturspråkshandtering, frå dokumentklassifikasjon til maskinsomsetjing til automatisk svar på spørsmål. Til tross av loven, må mange gjentakelige modeller lesa heile tekstordet etter ord, og gjera det langsomt å handtera lange dokument. For eksempel er det vanskeleg å bruka eit gjentakelig nettverk for å lesa ei bok og svara på spørsmål om det. I denne papiret viser vi ein tilnærming til lesing av tekst medan du hoppar over ulike informasjon dersom det trengs. Underliggende modellen er eit gjentakelig nettverk som lærer kor langt du skal hoppa etter å lesa nokre ord av inndatateksten. Vi bruker ein standardverdiansmetode for å trenja modellen for å gjera diskrete hopp-avgjøringar. I våre benchmarke på fire forskjellige oppgåver, inkludert antalleforhåndsvising, sentimentanalyse, nyhetsglassifikasjon og automatisk Q&A, vårt foreslått modell, eit endra LSTM med hopping, er opp til 6 ganger raskare enn standardvalget LSTM, mens det er samme eller til og med betre nøyaktighet.', 'si': 'ආයෙත් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වාභික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනයේ බොහොම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන ඔවුන්ගේ පොරොන්දු වෙනුවෙන් හිටියොත්, වචනයෙන් සියළු පාළ වචනය කියවන්න ඕන, ලොකු ලොකු ලිපින්තුවන්  උදාහරණයෙන්, පොත කියවන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න අමාරුයි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පත්තර කියවන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් අවශ්\u200dය වුනොත් අවශ්\u200dය තොරතුරු පැනලා දාලා තියෙනවා. පිටිපස්සේ මොඩේල් එක තමයි ආයුත්මක ජාලයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා ඇතුළු පාළුවේ වචන කිහිපයක් කියලා කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් භාවිතා කරනවා මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථා අපේ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වෙනස් වැඩක් හතරයි, අංක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය, වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය Q&A, අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, LSTM වෙ', 'sr': 'Ponovne neuronske mreže pokazuju mnogo obećanja u mnogim podoblastima prirodnog obrade jezika, od klasifikacije dokumenta do prevoda mašine do automatskog odgovora na pitanje. Uprkos obećanju, mnogi rekonstruirani modeli moraju da čitaju celu tekstnu reč po reèi, tako da usporavaju rukovanje dugim dokumentima. Na primer, teško je iskoristiti povratnu mrežu da čitate knjigu i odgovorite na pitanja o tome. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup čitanja teksta dok preskačemo nevažne informacije ako je potrebno. Podležni model je ponovna mreža koja nauèi koliko daleko skoèiti nakon èitanja nekoliko reèi teksta. Mi zapošljavamo standardnu političku metodu da treniramo model da donesemo diskretne odluke o skakanju. U našim kriterijama o četiri različite zadatke, uključujući predviđanje brojeva, analizu osjećaja, klasifikaciju novinskih članaka i automatsku Q&A, naš predloženi model, modificirani LSTM sa skakanjem, je do 6 puta brže od standardnog sekvencijskog LSTM-a, dok održavamo istu ili čak bolje tačnost.', 'so': "Shabakadaha Neural ee ugu soo dhowaaday waxay tustaa ballan badan oo ka mid ah meelo hoose-hoose ah oo lagu baaraandegay luqada dabiicadda ah, waxayna ka soo wareegsanaayeen fasalinta dukumentiga iyo turjumista machine-ka si ay ugu jawaabto su'aalaha bilowga ah. Inta kastoo uu ballanqaaday, tusaalooyin badan oo soo socda waa in ay erayga oo dhan ku akhriyaan hadal, si ay u raagto in loo qabto dukumentiyada dhaadheer. Tusaale ahaan waa adag tahay in lagu isticmaalo shabakadda soo socda oo la akhriyo buug islamarkaasna uu ka jawaabo su'aalo ku saabsan. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaabilaad akhriska qoraalka, haddii loo baahdo ayaannu isticmaalaynaa macluumaad aan suurtagal ahayn. Tusaale hoose waa shabakad soo socda oo baranaya sida aad u soo boodbixi karto kadib markii aad akhriyo dhawr erayo oo qoraal ah. Waxaannu u shaqeynaa qaab heer siyaasadeed oo caadi ah si aan u tababarinno sameynta go'aanka si gaar ah. Afar shaqooyin oo kala duduwan waxaa ku qoran qiimeyntayada, kuwaas oo ah nambarka wax sii sheegidda, xisaabta maandooriyaha, fasaxa warqadda warqadda u qoran iyo Q&A, modelkayagii la soo jeeday oo la beddelay LSTM oo boodbeynaya, waxay gaadhaa ilaa 6 jeer u dhaqso inta ugu dambeysa LSTM.", 'ta': 'தற்போது நியூரால் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலின் பல துணை பகுதிகளில் அதிகமான வாக்குறுதியை காட்டுகிறது, ஆவண வகைப்பாட அவர்களுடைய வாக்குறுதியை பின்னரும் நிறைவேற்றும் மாதிரிகள் முழு உரையின் வார்த்தையையும் படிக்க வேண்டும், ந உதாரணத்திற்கு, நிகழ்வு வலைப்பின்னலை பயன்படுத்துவது கடினமாக ஒரு புத்தகத்தை படித்து அதைப் பற்றி பதில் கேள் இந்த காகிதத்தில், தேவைப்பட்டால் நாம் உரையை படிக்க ஒரு முறையை கொண்டுள்ளோம். உள்ளீட்டு உரையின் சில வார்த்தைகளை படிக்குப் பிறகு எவ்வளவு தூரத்திற்கு மட்டும் குதிக்கும் பின்னர் தொடரும் வலை நாம் ஒரு நிலையான கொள்கை சார்ந்த முறைமையை பயிற்சி செய்ய முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் வேறு வித்தியாசம நான்கு வேறு வேறு வேலைகளில், எண் எதிர்பார்ப்பு, உணர்வு ஆய்வு, செய்தி கட்டுரை வகைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் தானாகவே Q&A, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி, குதிக்கும் மாற்றப்பட்ட LSTM மாதிர', 'ur': 'دوبارہ نیورال نیٹورک بہت سے وعدہ کررہے ہیں جسے مختلف زبان پردازش کی زیادہ زیادہ منطقه میں دکھاتے ہیں، دکھانے کے کلاسیفوں سے ماشین ترجمہ تک اتماٹی سوال کی جواب دینے کے لئے۔ ان کے وعدہ کے بغیر، بہت سے دوبارہ ریٹرنڈ موڈل لکھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ کلمہ کے ذریعہ تمام لکھ کا کلمہ پڑھنا چاہے، اور یہ لہروں کے لئے ہلکا کرنا چاہے۔ مثال، ایک دوبارہ نیٹ ورک کا استعمال کرنا مشکل ہے کتاب پڑھنے اور اس کے بارے میں سوال جواب دینے کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک متن پڑھنے کا طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں اگر ضرورت ہو تو بے اثر معلومات کو چھوڑتے ہیں۔ نیچے موڈل ایک دوبارہ نیٹ ورک ہے جو اسے سکھاتا ہے کہ اس کے چند لکھوں کو پڑھنے کے بعد کتنی دور پرت کرے۔ ہم ایک استاندارڈ پالیس گریڈینٹ طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ موڈل کو ٹرینگ کے فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کریں. ہمارے چار مختلف کاموں پر بنچم مارک میں، شمارہ پیش بینی، احساسات تحلیل، خبریں لکھی کلاسیفوں اور اپنا پیش بینی کیو و ا، ہمارے پیش بینی موڈل، اسپینگ کے ساتھ تغییر کیا گیا LSTM، استاندارڈ سکنڈیل LSTM سے 6 بار زیادہ سریع ہے، حالانکہ ایک اور یا بہتر دقیق حفاظت کرتے ہیں', 'sv': 'Återkommande neurala nätverk visar mycket lovande inom många delområden av naturlig språkbehandling, allt från dokumentklassificering till maskinöversättning till automatisk frågehantering. Trots sitt löfte måste många återkommande modeller läsa hela texten ord för ord, vilket gör det långsamt att hantera långa dokument. Det är till exempel svårt att använda ett återkommande nätverk för att läsa en bok och svara på frågor om den. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt att läsa text samtidigt som vi hoppar över irrelevant information om det behövs. Den underliggande modellen är ett återkommande nätverk som lär sig hur långt man hoppar efter att ha läst några ord i inmatningstexten. Vi använder en standard policy gradient metod för att träna modellen för att fatta diskreta hoppbeslut. Vår föreslagna modell, en modifierad LSTM med hoppning, är upp till 6 gånger snabbare än den vanliga sekventiella LSTM, samtidigt som den bibehåller samma eller ännu bättre noggrannhet.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Koʻp takrorlanadigan modellar soʻzni so'z orqali o'qish kerak va uzun hujjatlarni qoʻllash uchun ham tez qilishi mumkin. Masalan, davom etilgan tarmoqni ishlatish qiyin va bu haqida kitobni oʻqish va javob berish qiyin. Bu hujjatda, biz kerak boʻlsa, matnni o'qish usulini ko'rib turamiz. Name Biz o'zgarishni ajratish uchun modelni o'rganish uchun standard qoidagi gradient usulini ishlaymiz. Bizning 4 boshqa vazifalarda, raqam prediction, sentiment analyzeri, yangi maqola darajalashtirish va avtomatik Q&A modelimiz, jumping bilan o'zgartirilgan LSTM modelimizda 6 marta tez ko'proq keladigan LSTM'dan yaxshi ko'proq tashkilotga qaraydi, va bir xil yoki yaxshi tashkilotni davom etishda.", 'vi': 'Các mạng thần kinh liên tục đang hiển thị nhiều hứa hẹn trong nhiều khu vực phụ của việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, từ việc phân loại tài liệu cho đến việc dịch chuyển máy tới việc trả lời tự động. Mặc dù hứa hẹn của họ, nhiều mô hình thường xuyên phải đọc to àn bộ văn bản từng từ một, làm cho nó chậm để xử lý các tài liệu dài. Ví dụ, khó sử dụng một mạng lưới thường xuyên để đọc một cuốn sách và trả lời các câu hỏi về nó. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp đọc chữ trong khi bỏ qua những thông tin không liên quan nếu cần thiết. Cơ chế cơ bản là một mạng thường xuyên được biết nhảy bao xa sau khi đọc vài từ trong đoạn nhập. Chúng tôi dùng một phương pháp hoà nhã tiêu chuẩn để huấn luyện mô hình để đưa ra những quyết định sơ suất. Trong những tiêu chuẩn về bốn nhiệm vụ khác nhau, bao gồm dự đoán số, phân tích đa cảm, phân loại bài báo và hệ thống Q., kiểu cách của chúng ta, một tập hợp hợp hợp hợp LSD với nhảy, đã nhanh hơn cả hàm chuẩn của tập hợp, nhưng vẫn giữ được độ chính xác tương tự hoặc thậm chí tốt hơn.', 'hr': 'Ponovne neuronske mreže pokazuju mnogo obećanja u mnogim podpodpodručjima prirodnog jezika, od klasifikacije dokumenta do prevoda strojeva do automatskog odgovora na pitanje. Uprkos obećanju, mnogi rekonstruirani modeli moraju čitati cijelu tekstsku riječ po riječi, čineći sporim rješavanjem dugih dokumenta. Na primjer, teško je iskoristiti povratnu mrežu čitati knjigu i odgovoriti na pitanja o tome. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup čitanja teksta dok preskačemo nevažne informacije ako je potrebno. Isključeni model je ponovna mreža koja uči koliko daleko skočiti nakon čitanja nekoliko riječi teksta. Mi zapošljavamo standardnu metodu preglede politika kako bi obučili model kako bi donijeli diskretne odluke skakanja. U našim kriterijama o četiri različite zadatke, uključujući predviđanje brojeva, analizu osjećaja, klasifikaciju vijesti članaka i automatsku Q&A, naš predloženi model, modificirani LSTM s skokom, je do 6 puta brže od standardnog sekvencijskog LSTM-a, dok održavaju istu ili čak bolje tačnost.', 'bg': 'Повтарящите се неврални мрежи показват много обещания в много подобласти на обработката на естествения език, вариращи от класификация на документи до машинен превод до автоматично отговаряне на въпроси. Въпреки обещанието си, много повтарящи се модели трябва да прочетат целия текст дума по дума, което го прави бавен за работа с дълги документи. Например, трудно е да използвате повтаряща се мрежа, за да прочетете книга и да отговорите на въпроси за нея. В тази статия представяме подход за четене на текст, като при необходимост пропускаме неподходяща информация. Базовият модел е повтаряща се мрежа, която научава колко далеч да скочи след четене на няколко думи от входния текст. Използваме стандартен метод за градиент на политиката, за да обучим модела да взема дискретни решения за скокове. В нашите показатели за четири различни задачи, включително прогнозиране на числа, анализ на сентимента, класификация на новините и автоматични въпроси и отговори, нашият предложен модел, модифициран ЛСТМ със скокове, е до 6 пъти по-бърз от стандартния последователен ЛСТМ, като същевременно поддържа същата или дори по-добра точност.', 'da': 'Tilbagevendende neurale netværk viser meget lovende inden for mange underområder af naturlig sprogbehandling, lige fra dokumentklassificering til maskinoversættelse til automatisk spørgsmålsbesvarelse. På trods af deres løfte, mange tilbagevendende modeller er nødt til at læse hele teksten ord for ord, hvilket gør det langsomt at håndtere lange dokumenter. For eksempel er det svært at bruge et tilbagevendende netværk til at læse en bog og besvare spørgsmål om den. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en tilgang til at læse tekst, mens vi springer irrelevante oplysninger over, hvis det er nødvendigt. Den underliggende model er et tilbagevendende netværk, der lærer, hvor langt man skal hoppe efter at have læst et par ord i input teksten. Vi anvender en standard policy gradient metode til at træne modellen til at træffe diskrete springbeslutninger. I vores benchmarks på fire forskellige opgaver, herunder tal forudsigelse, sentiment analyse, nyhedsartiklklassificering og automatisk Q&A, er vores foreslåede model, en modificeret LSTM med spring, op til 6 gange hurtigere end standard sekventiel LSTM, samtidig med at den bevarer den samme eller endnu bedre nøjagtighed.', 'nl': 'Recurrent Neural Networks zijn veelbelovend in veel deelgebieden van natuurlijke taalverwerking, variërend van documentclassificatie tot machinevertaling tot automatisch antwoord op vragen. Ondanks hun belofte moeten veel terugkerende modellen de hele tekst woord voor woord lezen, waardoor het traag is om lange documenten te verwerken. Het is bijvoorbeeld moeilijk om een terugkerend netwerk te gebruiken om een boek te lezen en vragen erover te beantwoorden. In dit artikel presenteren we een benadering van het lezen van tekst en het overslaan van irrelevante informatie indien nodig. Het onderliggende model is een terugkerend netwerk dat leert hoe ver te springen na het lezen van een paar woorden van de invoertekst. We gebruiken een standaard beleidsgradiënt methode om het model te trainen om discrete springbeslissingen te nemen. In onze benchmarks voor vier verschillende taken, waaronder getalvoorspelling, sentimentanalyse, classificatie van nieuwsberichten en automatische Q&A, is ons voorgestelde model, een aangepaste LSTM met springen, tot zes keer sneller dan de standaard sequentiële LSTM, met behoud van dezelfde of zelfs betere nauwkeurigheid.', 'id': 'Rangkaian Neural Sekali-kali menunjukkan banyak janji dalam banyak sub-area proses bahasa alami, dari klasifikasi dokumen hingga terjemahan mesin hingga menjawab pertanyaan otomatis. Meskipun janji mereka, banyak model berulang-ulang harus membaca seluruh teks kata demi kata, membuatnya lambat untuk menangani dokumen panjang. Contohnya, sulit menggunakan jaringan berkurang untuk membaca buku dan menjawab pertanyaan mengenainya. In this paper, we present an approach of reading text while skipping irrelevant information if needed.  The underlying model is a recurrent network that learns how far to jump after reading a few words of the input text.  Kami menggunakan metode gradien kebijakan standar untuk melatih model untuk membuat keputusan melompat diskret. Dalam benchmark kami pada empat tugas yang berbeda, termasuk prediksi nomor, analisis sentimen, klasifikasi artikel berita dan Q&A otomatis, model kami yang diusulkan, LSTM modifikasi dengan lompatan, adalah hingga 6 kali lebih cepat dari LSTM sekuensial standar, sementara mempertahankan akurasi yang sama atau bahkan lebih baik.', 'ko': '귀속신경 네트워크는 자연 언어 처리의 많은 하위 영역에서 문서 분류부터 기계 번역, 자동 문답까지 모두 커다란 잠재력을 나타냈다.비록 이러한 약속이 있지만, 많은 중복된 모델들이 전체 텍스트를 한 글자씩 읽어야 하기 때문에, 긴 문서를 처리하는 속도가 느려진다.예를 들어 자주 인터넷을 이용해서 책 한 권을 읽고 그것에 대한 질문에 대답하기 어렵다.본고에서 우리는 텍스트를 읽는 방법을 제시했는데 필요하면 상관없는 정보를 건너뛸 수 있다.기본 모델은 입력한 텍스트의 몇 개의 단어를 읽은 후 이동하는 거리를 배우는 순환 네트워크이다.우리는 표준적인 전략적 사다리 방법을 채택하여 모델을 훈련시켜 이산적인 도약 결정을 내리게 한다.네 가지 서로 다른 임무(디지털 예측, 정서 분석, 뉴스 문장 분류와 자동 문답 포함)에 대한 기준 테스트에서 우리가 제시한 모델(점프를 가진 개선 LSTM)은 표준 순서인 LSTM보다 6배 빠르고 동일하거나 더 좋은 정확성을 유지한다.', 'tr': 'Täzelikde näral şebekeler tebigy diller işleýän alt sahypalarda gaty söz berýär. Sened klasifikasyndan maşynyň terjimesine otomatik soragyna jogap berilýär. Laýlarynyň sözüne rağmen, birnäçe tekrarly nusgalar sözleri bilen ähli tekst sözüni okamaly bolar we uzak senedleri ýöretmek üçin ýuwaş bolar. mysal, kitap okamak we soraglary barada ýene-täzelikde ulanmak kyn. Bu kagyzda, gerekli bolsa nähili möhüm maglumatlary almak üçin metin okamakyň ýaryşyny görkezdik. Asty nusgasy Biz modelini diskretli atlama kararyny çözmek üçin standart politika gradiýasyny ulanýarys. Dört farklı işimizde, sanlaryň önümlemesi, duýgular analizi, täzelikler makalarymyz klasifikasy we awtomatik Q&A, biziň teklip eden nusgadymyzda, atlamak bilen üýtgeden LSTM, standart täzelikleri LSTM-den 6 gezek çalt däldir we eyni ýa-da has dogrylygyny saglanýarlar.', 'de': 'Die wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerke sind vielversprechend in vielen Teilbereichen der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, von der Dokumentenklassifizierung über maschinelle Übersetzung bis hin zur automatischen Beantwortung von Fragen. Trotz ihres Versprechens müssen viele wiederkehrende Modelle den gesamten Text Wort für Wort lesen, was es langsam macht, lange Dokumente zu verarbeiten. Beispielsweise ist es schwierig, ein wiederkehrendes Netzwerk zu nutzen, um ein Buch zu lesen und Fragen darüber zu beantworten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Ansatz vor, Text zu lesen und bei Bedarf irrelevante Informationen zu überspringen. Das zugrunde liegende Modell ist ein wiederkehrendes Netzwerk, das lernt, wie weit man springen muss, nachdem man ein paar Wörter des eingegebenen Textes gelesen hat. Wir verwenden eine Standard-Gradientenmethode, um das Modell zu trainieren, diskrete Sprungentscheidungen zu treffen. In unseren Benchmarks für vier verschiedene Aufgaben, einschließlich Zahlenprädiktion, Stimmungsanalyse, Klassifizierung von Nachrichtenartikeln und automatischer Q&A, ist unser vorgeschlagenes Modell, ein modifiziertes LSTM mit Sprung, bis zu 6-mal schneller als das Standard sequenzielle LSTM, bei gleichzeitiger Beibehaltung der gleichen oder sogar besseren Genauigkeit.', 'af': "Herhaalde Neurale Netwerke vertoon baie belofte in baie sub areas van natuurlike taal verwerking, vanaf dokumentklassifikasie na masjien vertaling tot outomatiese vraag antwoord. Onthou hulle belofte, baie herhaalde modele moet die hele teks woord deur woord lees, maak dit stadig om lange dokumente te hanteer. Byvoorbeeld, is dit moeilik om 'n herhaalde netwerk te gebruik om 'n boek te lees en antwoord vrae oor dit te antwoord. In hierdie papier vertoon ons 'n toegang van lees teks terwyl ons onbelangrik inligting vertrek as benodig. Die onderstelling model is 'n herhaalde netwerk wat leer hoe ver om te spring na lees 'n paar woorde van die invoer teks. Ons gebruik 'n standaard beleidsredigheidsmetode om die model te tref om diskrete springbesluite te maak. In ons benchmarke op vier verskillende opdragte, insluitend getalle voorskou, sentimentanalisie, nuusartikel klasifikasie en outomatiese Q&A, ons voorgestelde model, 'n veranderde LSTM met jumping, is tot 6 maal vinniger as die standaard sekwensiele LSTM, terwyl die selfde of selfs beter presisie onderhou.", 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره در زیر منطقه\u200cهای فرایند زبان طبیعی قول\u200cهای زیادی را نشان می\u200cدهند، از طریق گروه\u200cبندی سند تا ترجمه\u200cبندی ماشین به پاسخ سوال خودکار. با وجود قول آنها، بسیاری از مدلهای تکرار باید کل کلمه متن را با کلمه بخوانند، و این مدلهای طولانی را آروم کند. برای مثال، برای خواندن کتاب و جواب سوالات در موردش از شبکه دوباره استفاده کردن سخت است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش خواندن متن را در زمانی که اطلاعات بی اهمیت را از دست دادیم، نشان می دهیم. مدل پایین یک شبکه تکرار است که بعد از خواندن چند کلمه از متن ورودی یاد می\u200cگیرد چقدر دور پرید. ما روش سیاست استاندارد را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مدل را آموزش دهیم تا تصمیم\u200cهای مختلف بپریم. در نقشه\u200cهای ما در چهار کار مختلف، شامل پیش\u200cبینی شماره، تحلیل احساسات، بررسی مجموعه\u200cهای اخبار و بررسی\u200cهای اتوماتیک Q&A، مدل پیشنهاد ما، LSTM تغییر داده شده با پریدن، تا ۶ برابر سریعتر از LSTM استاندارد است، در حالی که دقیق یا حتی بهتر نگه می\u200cدارد.', 'sw': 'Recurrent Neural Networks are showing much promise in many sub-areas of natural language processing, ranging from document classification to machine translation to automatic question answering.  Despite their promise, many recurrent models have to read the whole text word by word, making it slow to handle long documents.  Kwa mfano, ni vigumu kutumia mtandao unaoendelea kusoma kitabu na kujibu maswali kuhusu hilo. Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka mbinu ya kusoma maandishi wakati tunatoa taarifa zisizo na maana yanayohitajika. Mradi wa chini ni Mtandao unaoendelea unaojifunza kiasi gani kuingia baada ya kusoma maneno machache ya maandishi ya input. Tunatumia njia yenye msingi wa sera za kawaida ya kufundisha muundo ili kufanya maamuzi tofauti ya kusambaa. Katika misingi yetu kuhusu kazi nne tofauti, ikiwa ni pamoja na utabiri wa namba, uchambuzi wa hisia, usambazaji wa makala ya habari na maarufu ya Q&A, modeli yetu iliyopendekezwa, yenye mabadiliko ya LSTM kwa kuruka, inafikia mara 6 haraka zaidi ya LSTM inayofuata, wakati akiendelea na usahihi huo au bora zaidi.', 'sq': 'Recurrent Neural Networks are showing much promise in many sub-areas of natural language processing, ranging from document classification to machine translation to automatic question answering.  Megjithë premtimin e tyre, shumë modele të përsëritura duhet të lexojnë të gjithë tekstin fjalë pas fjale, duke e bërë të ngadaltë trajtimin e dokumenteve të gjata. For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it.  In this paper, we present an approach of reading text while skipping irrelevant information if needed.  Modeli themelor është një rrjet i përsëritur që mëson sa larg të hidhet pas leximit të disa fjalëve të tekstit të hyrjes. We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions.  In our benchmarks on four different tasks, including number prediction, sentiment analysis, news article classification and automatic Q&A, our proposed model, a modified LSTM with jumping, is up to 6 times faster than the standard sequential LSTM, while maintaining the same or even better accuracy.', 'hy': 'Կարգավոր նյարդային ցանցերը շատ խոստումներ են ցույց տալիս բնական լեզվի վերամշակման բազմաթիվ ենթաշրջաններում, սկսած փաստաթղթերի դասակարգումից մինչև մեքենային թարգմանություն մինչև ավտոմատիկ հարցերի պատասխան Despite their promise, many recurrent models have to read the whole text word by word, making it slow to handle long documents.  For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք տեքստի կարդալու մոտեցում, չնայած անկարևոր տեղեկատվությունը, եթե անհրաժեշտ է: The underlying model is a recurrent network that learns how far to jump after reading a few words of the input text.  We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions.  Մեր համեմատական նշաններում չորս տարբեր առաջադրանքների վրա, ներառյալ թվերի կանխատեսումը, զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը, լրատվական հոդվածների դասակարգումը և ավտոմատիկ Q+A-ը, մեր առաջարկած մոդելը, փոփոխված LSMT-ը ցատկելով, մինչև վեց անգամ ավելի արագ է, քան ստանդարտ հաջո', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার অনেক সাবট-এলাকায় প্রতিশ্রুতি দেখাচ্ছে বর্তমান নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক, যা ডকুমেন্ট বিভাগ থেকে মেশিন অন তাদের প্রতিশ্রুতি সত্ত্বেও, অনেক পুনরাবর্তন মডেল শব্দের মাধ্যমে পুরো টেক্সট শব্দ পড়তে হবে, যাতে দীর্ঘ নথিপত্রে উদাহরণস্বরূপ, পুনরাবারের নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা কঠিন একটি বই পড়া এবং এর ব্যাপারে প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করা। এই পত্রিকায়, যদি প্রয়োজন থাকে তাহলে আমরা লেখা পড়ার একটি উপায় উপস্থাপন করি। ভিতরের মডেল হচ্ছে একটি পুনরাবর্তন নেটওয়ার্ক যা জানতে পারে ইনপুটের কিছু শব্দ পড়ার পর কতটা দূরে লাফ দেওয়া হবে। আমরা একটি স্থান্ডার্ডার নীতি গ্রেডেন্ড পদ্ধতি চালিয়ে যাচ্ছি যাতে মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করার জন্য। চারটি ভিন্ন কাজের উপর আমাদের বেনমার্ক, যার মধ্যে নাম্বার ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী, অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণ, সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ বিশ্লেষণ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কিউ&A, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল, লাফিং এর পরি', 'am': 'የአሁኑን የኔural መረብ መረብ በአካባቢው ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል በብዙ አቅራቢያ ክፍሎች ውስጥ ብዙ ተስፋ ያሳያል፤ ከሰነድ ክፍል ወደ መሳሪያ ትርጉም ወደ ማሻሻዊ ትርጉም ለመራእባዊ ጥያቄ መልስ እንዲያሳያል ነው፡፡ የተስፋ ቃል ምንም እንኳ ብዙዎች የሚደገፉ ሞዴላዎች የጽሑፉን ቃል በቃላት ያነብቡ ዘንድ ያስፈልጋሉ፤ ረጅም ሰነዱን ለመቀበል ያዝጋሉ። ለምሳሌ፣ የመደጋገሚያ መረብ በመጠቀም ላይ መጽሐፍን ማነብ የመጠየቁም ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የጽሑፉን አካሄድ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የውይይት ዓይነት የድምፅ ቃላትን ከማንበብ ጥቂት ቃላት ከተነበቡ በኋላ እንዴት መደገፍ እንደሚያስተምር የሚቀጥለው መረብ ነው፡፡ የምናስተዳርገው ፖሊሲ ቀዳሚ ሥርዓት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ በአራቱ መልዕክቶች ላይ የተለየ ስራዎችን፣ ቁጥር ትንቢት፣ ስሜት ማስታወቂያ፣ የዜና አርእስት ክፍል እና የፕሮግራሙት የQ&A ሞዴላታችን፣ የተለወጠው LSTM፣ በተለወጠው ግንኙነት ላይ ከግንኙነት LSTM ይልቅ 6 እጥፍ ፈጥኖ ይኖራል፡፡', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işləməsinin çoxluğu altı bölələrində, məktəbə klasifikasiyasından maşına çevirilən məktəbələrə otomatik suala cavab verməklə çox vəd verir. Onların vədinə baxmayaraq, çox tekrarlı modellər bütün mətn sözünü sözlərlə oxumaq lazımdır, uzun belələri idarə etmək üçün yavaş olaraq. Məsələn, kitabı oxumaq və onun haqqında soruşmaq üçün yenidən bir şəbəkə istifadə etmək çətin. Bu kağızda, əgər lazımsa, məktub oxumaq üçün münasibətsiz məlumatları atlayaraq məlumatların tərzini göstəririk. Yaxınlıq modeli bir neçə sözlərin oxunduğundan sonra necə uzaq atlandığını öyrənən yenidən bir a ğdır. Biz modeli müxtəlif atlama kararlarını təhsil etmək üçün standart siyasi gradient metodu istifadə edirik. Dörd fərqli işlər barəsində, sayı tədbir, duyguları analizi, haqq məktubumuz klasifikasiyası və avtomatik Q&A, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modelimiz, salmaq üçün dəyişdirilmiş LSTM, standart sequential LSTM-dən 6 dəfə daha hızlı, eyni və ya daha yaxşı doğruluğu qoruyarkən.', 'cs': 'Recidivní neuronové sítě jsou velmi slibné v mnoha podoblastech zpracování přirozeného jazyka, od klasifikace dokumentů přes strojový překlad až po automatické odpovědi na otázky. Navzdory svému slibu musí mnoho opakujících se modelů číst celý text slovo po slovu, což znamená, že zpracovávání dlouhých dokumentů pomalu. Například je obtížné použít opakovanou síť k čtení knihy a odpovědi na otázky týkající se ní. V tomto článku představujeme přístup čtení textu při přeskočení irelevantních informací v případě potřeby. Základním modelem je opakující se síť, která se naučí, jak daleko skočit po přečtení několika slov vstupního textu. Používáme standardní metodu gradientů politiky k trénování modelu tak, aby činil diskrétní rozhodnutí o skoku. V našich referenčních hodnotách pro čtyři různé úkoly, včetně predikce čísel, analýzy sentimentu, klasifikace zpravodajských článků a automatických otázek a odpovědí, je náš navržený model, modifikovaný LSTM se skoky, až šestikrát rychlejší než standardní sekvenční LSTM, při zachování stejné nebo dokonce lepší přesnosti.', 'ca': "Recurrent Neural Networks are showing much promise in many sub-areas of natural language processing, ranging from document classification to machine translation to automatic question answering.  Malgrat la seva promesa, molts models recurrents han de llegir tot el text paraula per paraula, fent que es faci lent gestionar documents llargs. For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it.  In this paper, we present an approach of reading text while skipping irrelevant information if needed.  The underlying model is a recurrent network that learns how far to jump after reading a few words of the input text.  We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions.  En els nostres punts de referència de quatre tasques diferents, incloent la predicció de nombres, l'anàlisi de sentiments, la classificació d'articles de notícies i les qüestions automàtiques, el nostre model proposat, un LSTM modificat amb salt, és fins a sis vegades més ràpid que el LSTM seqüencial estàndard, mantenint la mateixa o fins i tot millor precisió.", 'fi': 'Toistuvat hermoverkot ovat lupaavia monilla luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn osa-alueilla asiakirjojen luokittelusta konekääntämiseen ja automaattiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen. Lupauksesta huolimatta monet toistuvat mallit joutuvat lukemaan koko tekstin sanalta, jolloin pitkien asiakirjojen käsittely on hidasta. Esimerkiksi toistuvan verkon avulla on vaikea lukea kirjaa ja vastata siihen liittyviin kysymyksiin. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme lähestymistavan tekstin lukemiseen samalla kun sivuutamme tarpeettomia tietoja tarvittaessa. Perusmalli on toistuva verkko, joka oppii hyppäämään muutaman sanan lukemisen jälkeen. Käytämme standardimenetelmää, jolla malli koulutetaan tekemään erillisiä hyppypäätöksiä. Neljän eri tehtävän vertailuarvoissa, mukaan lukien lukuennustus, tunteiden analysointi, uutisartikkelien luokittelu ja automaattinen Q&A, ehdotettu malli, muunneltu LSTM hyppyillä, on jopa 6 kertaa nopeampi kuin standardi sekvenssiaalinen LSTM säilyttäen samalla saman tai jopa paremman tarkkuuden.', 'et': 'Korduvad neurovõrgud näitavad palju lubadusi paljudes looduskeele töötlemise alavaldkondades, alates dokumentide klassifitseerimisest masintõlkeni ja automaatsele küsimustele vastamiseni. Vaatamata lubadusele peavad paljud korduvad mudelid kogu teksti sõna-sõnalt lugema, mistõttu pikkade dokumentide käsitlemine on aeglane. Näiteks on raske kasutada korduvat võrgustikku raamatu lugemiseks ja selle kohta küsimustele vastamiseks. Käesolevas töös tutvustame teksti lugemise lähenemisviisi, jättes vajadusel tähtsusetu teabe vahele. Alusmudel on korduv võrk, mis õpib, kui kaugele hüpata pärast sisendteksti mõne sõna lugemist. Me kasutame standardset poliitilist gradienti meetodit, et treenida mudelit diskreetsete hüppeotsuste tegemiseks. Meie nelja erineva ülesande, sealhulgas arvude prognoosimise, sentimentaalüüsi, uudisteartiklite klassifitseerimise ja automaatsete küsimuste ja vastuste võrdlusnäitajates on meie pakutud mudel, modifitseeritud LSTM hüppega, kuni 6 korda kiirem kui standardne järjestikune LSTM, säilitades samas sama või veelgi parema täpsuse.', 'bs': 'Ponovne neuronske mreže pokazuju mnogo obećanja u mnogim podoblastima obrade prirodnog jezika, od klasifikacije dokumenta do prevoda mašine do automatskog odgovora na pitanje. Uprkos obećanju, mnogi recitentni modeli moraju čitati cijelu tekstsku riječ po riječi, čineći to sporim rješavanjem dugih dokumenta. Na primjer, teško je iskoristiti povratnu mrežu čitati knjigu i odgovoriti na pitanja o tome. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup čitanja teksta dok preskačemo nevažne informacije ako je potrebno. Podležni model je ponovna mreža koja nauči koliko daleko skočiti nakon čitanja nekoliko riječi teksta. Mi zapošljavamo standardnu metodu političkog gradient a da obučimo model da donesemo diskretne odluke o skakanju. U našim kriterijama o četiri različite zadatke, uključujući predviđanje brojeva, analizu osjećaja, klasifikaciju novinskih članaka i automatsku Q&A, naš predloženi model, modificirani LSTM sa skakanjem, je do 6 puta brže od standardnog sekvencijskog LSTM-a, dok održava istu ili čak bolje tačnost.', 'jv': 'MyUserName on freenode Slackword Sampeyan, iso nggambar maneh pengguna tambah sing ngejaraké buku lan mbubatuhke sualan sak cara-sualan kuwi. Nang pemilih iki, awak dhéwé nggawe tarjamahan kelas teks kuwi mau ngetakake informasi sing isingan barang ketahan. Display routing Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo nyelehake kuwi model sing beraksi Kita pernik-bendhèké karo akeh sanga sampeyan kanggo langgar sampeyan nganggo pernik, nambah tanggal number, sawetar versi (Sensitif), kelompok urik dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sing dipatensi lan automatik', 'he': 'רשתות נוירוליות חוזרות מראות הבטחה רבה בתי-אזורים רבים של עיבוד שפת טבעית, מגיעים מגוון מסמכים לתרגום מכונת לענות על שאלות אוטומטית. למרות ההבטחה שלהם, דוגמנים רבים חוזרים צריכים לקרוא את כל המילה הטקסטית במילה, מה שעושה את זה לאט להתמודד עם מסמכים ארוכים. For example, it is difficult to use a recurrent network to read a book and answer questions about it.  בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים גישה של קריאה טקסט בזמן שהדלגנו מידע לא רלוונטי אם צריך. The underlying model is a recurrent network that learns how far to jump after reading a few words of the input text.  We employ a standard policy gradient method to train the model to make discrete jumping decisions.  In our benchmarks on four different tasks, including number prediction, sentiment analysis, news article classification and automatic Q&A, our proposed model, a modified LSTM with jumping, is up to 6 times faster than the standard sequential LSTM, while maintaining the same or even better accuracy.', 'sk': 'Ponavljajoča se živčna omrežja kažejo veliko obetov na številnih področjih obdelave naravnega jezika, od klasifikacije dokumentov do strojnega prevajanja do avtomatskega odgovarjanja na vprašanja. Kljub obljubam morajo mnogi ponavljajoči se modeli prebrati celotno besedilo besede za besedo, zaradi česar je počasno ravnati z dolgimi dokumenti. Na primer, težko je uporabiti ponavljajoče se omrežje za branje knjige in odgovarjanje na vprašanja o njej. V prispevku predstavljamo pristop branja besedila in po potrebi preskočimo nepomembne informacije. Osnovni model je ponavljajoče se omrežje, ki se nauči, kako daleč skočiti po branju nekaj besed vhodnega besedila. Za usposabljanje modela za sprejemanje diskretnih odločitev o skokih uporabljamo standardno metodo gradienta politike. V naših referenčnih vrednostih za štiri različne naloge, vključno z napovedovanjem števila, analizo sentimenta, klasifikacijo novic in avtomatskimi vprašanji in odgovori, je naš predlagani model, modificiran LSTM s skoki, do 6-krat hitrejši od standardnega zaporednega LSTM, hkrati pa ohranja enako ali še boljšo natančnost.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ཀྱིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་ཁབ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། Despite their promise, many recurrent models have to read the whole text word by word, making it slow to handle long documents. དཔེར་ན། རྗེས་མའི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྱད་ནས་དེབ་ཁྲི་ཞིག་ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པར་སླ་མོལ་པ ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡི་གེ་ཀློག་འཇུག འོག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེ་ཅིག་ཀློག་ཟིན་པའི་སྐབས་འགྲམ་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མཁན་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In our benchmarks on four different tasks, including number prediction, sentiment analysis, news article classification and automatic Q&A, our proposed model, a modified LSTM with jumping, is up to 6 times faster than the standard sequential LSTM, while maintaining the same or even better accuracy.', 'ha': "@ action: button Babu da alkawarin su, misãlai mãsu yawa da aka sake koma, sai ya kamata su karanta magana duk matsayi da maganar, kuma ya sanya shi mai sauri dõmin ya yi amfani da takardun takardun nan daidai. Misali, yã yi ƙunci a yi amfani da wagon wani shiri mai daura da za'a karɓi wani littãfi da ya sami maswali game da shi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wata matsayi na karanta matsayi a lokacin da Muke skip takardar da takarda. @ info: whatsthis Tuna yin amfani da wata hanyoyi na daban-rayi na'urar da za'a sanar da shirin ayuka dõmin ka sami masu yin sauri da gaɓa. Daga misalin mu, a kan aikin huɗu dabam-daban, ko misalin namani, akan basĩri, mai fassarar makala na lãbãri da karatun Q"}
{'en': 'An Algebra for Feature Extraction', 'ar': 'الجبر لاستخراج الميزات', 'es': 'Un álgebra para la extracción de características', 'fr': "Algèbre pour l'extraction de caractéristiques", 'pt': 'Uma álgebra para extração de recursos', 'ja': '特徴抽出のための代数', 'hi': 'सुविधा निष्कर्षण के लिए एक बीजगणित', 'ru': 'Алгебра для извлечения признаков', 'zh': '特征提取代数', 'ga': 'Ailgéabar le haghaidh Eastóscadh Gné', 'hu': 'Algebra a funkció kivonásához', 'it': "Un'algebra per l'estrazione delle caratteristiche", 'lt': 'An Algebra for Feature Extraction', 'mk': 'An Algebra for Feature Extraction', 'el': 'Μια άλγεβρα για την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών', 'kk': 'Name', 'ml': 'പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിനുള്ള ആല്\u200dജെബ്രാ', 'ms': 'Algebra untuk Ekstraksi Feature', 'mt': 'Alġebra għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Karatteristiċi', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'O algebră pentru extragerea caracteristicilor', 'pl': 'Algebra do ekstrakcji cech', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчдийн хайлтын алгебр', 'sr': 'Algebra za ekstrakciju karaktera', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Algebra', 'sv': 'En algebra för extraktion av funktioner', 'ta': 'தன்மை பிரித்தலுக்கான அல்ஜெப்ரா', 'ka': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đại số cho Ngoại khí', 'hr': 'Algebra za ekstrakciju karaktera', 'bg': 'Алгебра за извличане на характеристика', 'da': 'En algebra til udtrækning af funktioner', 'nl': 'Een algebra voor kenmerkextractie', 'de': 'Eine Algebra zur Merkmalsextraktion', 'id': 'Algebra untuk Ekstraksi Feature', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '특징 추출의 대수', 'sw': 'Algebra kwa ajili ya Kutoa Tamko', 'tr': 'Feature Extraction For An Algebra', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Algebrë për nxjerrjen e funksioneve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Feature Extraction 칲칞칲n C톛bra', 'bn': 'বৈশিষ্ট্য এক্সট্র্যাকশনের জন্য অ্যালজেব্রাName', 'bs': 'Algebra za ekstrakciju karaktera', 'ca': "Una àlgebra d'extracció de característiques", 'cs': 'Algebra pro extrakci prvků', 'et': 'Algebra funktsioonide ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Algebra ominaisuuden purkamista varten', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Algebra za ekstrakcijo funkcij', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': "אלג' ברה להוציא תכונות", 'bo': 'ཆེ་ཆོས་དབྱིབས་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ས Algebra'}
{'en': 'Though feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step. Yet, it can dominate computation time, both during training, and especially at deployment. In this paper, we formalize feature extraction from an algebraic perspective. Our formalization allows us to define a message passing algorithm that can restructure feature templates to be more computationally efficient. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.', 'fr': "Bien que l'extraction de caractéristiques soit une première étape nécessaire dans la PNL statistique, elle est souvent considérée comme une simple étape de prétraitement. Pourtant, il peut dominer le temps de calcul, tant pendant l'entraînement que lors du déploiement. Dans cet article, nous formalisons l'extraction de caractéristiques d'un point de vue algébrique. Notre formalisation nous permet de définir un algorithme de transmission de messages capable de restructurer les modèles d'entités afin de les rendre plus efficaces sur le plan informatique. Nous montrons par le biais d'expériences sur le découpage de texte et l'extraction de relations que cette restructuration accélère effectivement l'extraction de caractéristiques dans la pratique en réduisant les calculs redondants.", 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن استخراج الميزات هو خطوة أولى ضرورية في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الإحصائية ، إلا أنه غالبًا ما يُنظر إليه على أنه مجرد خطوة معالجة مسبقة. ومع ذلك ، يمكن أن تهيمن على وقت الحساب ، سواء أثناء التدريب ، وخاصة عند النشر. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بإضفاء الطابع الرسمي على استخراج الميزات من منظور جبري. يسمح لنا إضفاء الطابع الرسمي بتحديد خوارزمية تمرير الرسائل التي يمكنها إعادة هيكلة قوالب الميزات لتكون أكثر كفاءة من الناحية الحسابية. نوضح من خلال التجارب على تقطيع النص واستخراج العلاقة أن إعادة الهيكلة هذه تسرع بالفعل استخراج الميزات في الممارسة العملية عن طريق تقليل الحسابات الزائدة عن الحاجة.', 'pt': 'Embora a extração de características seja um primeiro passo necessário na PNL estatística, muitas vezes é vista como uma mera etapa de pré-processamento. No entanto, pode dominar o tempo de computação, tanto durante o treinamento, quanto especialmente na implantação. Neste artigo, formalizamos a extração de características de uma perspectiva algébrica. Nossa formalização nos permite definir um algoritmo de passagem de mensagens que pode reestruturar modelos de recursos para serem mais eficientes computacionalmente. Mostramos por meio de experimentos em fragmentação de texto e extração de relações que essa reestruturação realmente acelera a extração de recursos na prática, reduzindo a computação redundante.', 'es': 'Aunque la extracción de características es un primer paso necesario en la PNL estadística, a menudo se ve como un simple paso de preprocesamiento. Sin embargo, puede dominar el tiempo de cómputos, tanto durante el entrenamiento como, especialmente, durante la implementación. En este artículo, formalizamos la extracción de características desde una perspectiva algebraica. Nuestra formalización nos permite definir un algoritmo de paso de mensajes que puede reestructurar las plantillas de entidades para que sean más eficientes desde el punto de vista computacional. Demostramos mediante experimentos sobre fragmentación de texto y extracción de relaciones que esta reestructuración efectivamente acelera la extracción de características en la práctica al reducir la computación redundante.', 'ja': '特徴抽出は統計的ＮＬＰにおける必要な最初のステップであるが、単なる前処理ステップと見なされることが多い。それでも、訓練中、特に展開時の両方で、計算時間を支配することができます。本稿では代数学の観点から特徴抽出を形式化する。私たちの形式化は、計算効率を高めるために機能テンプレートを再構成できるメッセージパッシングアルゴリズムを定義することを可能にします。テキストチャンキングとリレーション抽出の実験を通じて、この再構築は冗長な計算を減らすことで実際に機能抽出を高速化することを示しています。', 'zh': '虽特征提取为计NLP之首,然常视为预处理步。 然可主计日月,无论训练之间,与在部署时。 本文中,从代数角正式化特征提取。 吾形式化许我定义一消息传算法,当算法可重构特徵模板以增算效率。 文本分块取实验,此重组实损冗余计在实践中速取之速也。', 'hi': 'हालांकि सुविधा निष्कर्षण सांख्यिकीय एनएलपी में एक आवश्यक पहला कदम है, इसे अक्सर केवल प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरण के रूप में देखा जाता है। फिर भी, यह गणना समय पर हावी हो सकता है, दोनों प्रशिक्षण के दौरान, और विशेष रूप से तैनाती पर। इस पेपर में, हम एक बीजीय परिप्रेक्ष्य से सुविधा निष्कर्षण को औपचारिक रूप देते हैं। हमारा औपचारिककरण हमें एक संदेश पासिंग एल्गोरिथ्म को परिभाषित करने की अनुमति देता है जो सुविधा टेम्पलेट्स को अधिक कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से कुशल होने के लिए पुनर्गठित कर सकता है। हम पाठ chunking और संबंध निष्कर्षण पर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से दिखाते हैं कि यह पुनर्गठन वास्तव में अनावश्यक गणना को कम करके व्यवहार में सुविधा निष्कर्षण को गति देता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя извлечение признаков является необходимым первым шагом в статистической NLP, он часто рассматривается как простой этап предварительной обработки. Тем не менее, он может доминировать во времени вычислений, как во время обучения, так и особенно при развертывании. В этой статье мы формализуем извлечение признаков с алгебраической точки зрения. Наша формализация позволяет нам определить алгоритм передачи сообщений, который может реструктурировать шаблоны признаков, чтобы быть более вычислительно эффективным. Мы показываем с помощью экспериментов по фрагментации текста и извлечению отношений, что эта реструктуризация действительно ускоряет извлечение признаков на практике, уменьшая избыточные вычисления.', 'ga': 'Cé gur chéad chéim riachtanach é eastóscadh gné i NLP staidrimh, is minic a fheictear é mar chéim réamhphróiseála amháin. Mar sin féin, is féidir leis a bheith i gceannas ar am ríomhaireacht, le linn na hoiliúna, agus go háirithe le linn imscaradh. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid eastóscadh gné foirmiúil ó pheirspictíocht ailgéabrach. Ligeann ár bhfoirmiú dúinn algartam seolta teachtaireachta a shainiú ar féidir leis teimpléid gné a athstruchtúrú le bheith níos éifeachtaí ó thaobh ríomhaireacht de. Léirímid trí thurgnaimh ar smután téacs agus eastóscadh gaol go tapaíonn an t-athstruchtúrú seo eastóscadh gné go praiticiúil trí ríomh iomarcach a laghdú.', 'el': 'Αν και η εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών είναι ένα απαραίτητο πρώτο βήμα στη στατιστική, συχνά θεωρείται ως ένα απλό βήμα προεπεξεργασίας. Ωστόσο, μπορεί να κυριαρχήσει στο χρόνο υπολογισμού, τόσο κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, όσο και ειδικά κατά την ανάπτυξη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επισημοποιούμε την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών από μια αλγεβρική προοπτική. Η τυπικοποίηση μας μας επιτρέπει να ορίσουμε έναν αλγόριθμο διαβίβασης μηνυμάτων που μπορεί να αναδιαρθρώσει πρότυπα χαρακτηριστικών ώστε να είναι πιο υπολογιστικά αποδοτικά. Δείχνουμε μέσα από πειράματα σχετικά με την απόσπαση κειμένου και την εξαγωγή σχέσεων ότι αυτή η αναδιάρθρωση πράγματι επιταχύνει την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών στην πράξη μειώνοντας τον περιττό υπολογισμό.', 'hu': 'Bár a funkciók kitermelése szükséges első lépés a statisztikai NLP-ben, gyakran pusztán előfeldolgozási lépésként tekintik. Mégis uralhatja a számítási időt, mind a képzés során, mind pedig különösen a telepítés során. Ebben a tanulmányban formalizáljuk a funkciók kivonását algebrai perspektívából. Formalizálásunk lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy definiáljunk egy üzenetátadó algoritmust, amely a szolgáltatási sablonok számítástechnikailag hatékonyabbak legyenek. A szövegdarabolással és a kapcsolatkivonással kapcsolatos kísérletekkel megmutatjuk, hogy ez a szerkezetátalakítás valóban felgyorsítja a funkciókivonást a gyakorlatban azáltal, hogy csökkenti a redundáns számításokat.', 'it': "Sebbene l'estrazione delle funzionalità sia un primo passo necessario nel PNL statistico, è spesso visto come un semplice passo di pre-elaborazione. Tuttavia, può dominare il tempo di calcolo, sia durante l'addestramento, e soprattutto durante la distribuzione. In questo articolo formalizziamo l'estrazione di funzionalità da una prospettiva algebrica. La nostra formalizzazione ci permette di definire un algoritmo di passaggio dei messaggi che può ristrutturare i modelli di funzionalità per essere più efficienti dal punto di vista computazionale. Mostriamo attraverso esperimenti sul chunking del testo e sull'estrazione delle relazioni che questa ristrutturazione accelera effettivamente l'estrazione delle funzionalità nella pratica riducendo il calcolo ridondante.", 'lt': 'Though feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step.  Yet, it can dominate computation time, both during training, and especially at deployment.  Šiame dokumente formalizuojame požymių ekstrahavimą iš algebrinės perspektyvos. Mūsų formalizavimas leidžia mums apibrėžti pranešimą, perduodantį algoritmą, kuris gali restruktūrizuoti savybių šablonus, kad būtų veiksmingesni skaičiavimais. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.', 'kk': 'Бірақ қасиеттерді тарқату - статистикалық NLP- де бірінші қадам керек болса да, ол көбінесе тек алдын- ала өткізу қадамы ретінде көрінеді. Бірақ бұл компьютердің уақытын, оқыту кезінде да, әсіресе жұмыс істеу кезінде да бастауға болады. Бұл қағазда, алгебрикалық қарап шығару мүмкіндігін официалдық. Біздің официализациямыз хабарлама алгоритмін анықтауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл үлгілер үлгілерін өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді. Біз мәтін бөлігін және қатынасын тарқату туралы тәжірибелер арқылы көрсетедік, бұл құрастырудың өзгерістерін тәжірибелерді өзгерту үшін тәжірибелерді көші', 'ka': 'თუმცა ფუნქციების ექსტრექცია უნდა იყოს პირველი მონაწილი სტატისტიკური NLP-ში, ის ხშირად ხედავს როგორც მხოლოდ პირველი პროცესი. მაგრამ ეს შეიძლება მოდიმინოთ კომპიუტერციის დრო, რომელიც განსწავლად და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ ფორმალურად ვაკეთებთ ალგბერიული პერვიკუნტიდან გამოყენება. ჩვენი ფორმალიზაცია გვაქვს, რომ შეგვიძლია განსაზღვრება ალგორტიმს, რომელიც შესაძლებელია განსაზღვრება ფუნქტურების შაბლონები, რომელიც უფრო კომპუტურა ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენებაში ტექსტის კონტაქციის და შესახებ ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენებაში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს რექსტრუქტურაცია ნამდვილად სწ', 'ml': 'പ്രത്യേക പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതെങ്കിലും സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d NLP-ല്\u200d ആദ്യമായ ആദ്യ പടിയാണെങ്കിലും അത് ഒരു മുന്നി എന്നിട്ടും പരിശീലനത്തിലും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും വിതരണ സമയത്തും അത് കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആല്\u200dജിബ്രായിക് കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേക പുറത്തിറങ്ങുന്നത് ഫോര്\u200dമ നമ്മുടെ ഫോര്\u200dമാനിഷന്\u200d നമുക്ക് ഒരു സന്ദേശം പുറപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. അത് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ക ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും ബന്ധപ്രകടനത്തിന്\u200dറെയും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Though feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step.  Yet, it can dominate computation time, both during training, and especially at deployment.  Dalam kertas ini, kita formalkan ekstraksi ciri-ciri dari perspektif algebraik. Formalisasi kami membolehkan kita menentukan mesej melalui algoritma yang boleh mengkonstruksikan semula templat ciri-ciri supaya lebih efisien secara kira-kira. Kami menunjukkan melalui eksperimen tentang pemotongan teks dan ekstraksi hubungan bahawa pertukaran ini benar-benar mempercepat ekstraksi ciri-ciri dalam praktek dengan mengurangi perhitungan yang berlebihan.', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр тодорхойлолт нь статистикийн NLP-ийн анхны алхам юм гэхдээ ихэвчлэн үүнийг зөвхөн өмнө ажиллах алхам гэж үздэг. Гэвч энэ нь тооцооллын цаг, сургалтын үед, ялангуяа хөдөлгөөнд давамгайлах боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид алгебрийн харьцааны өргөн гаргалтыг загварчлах болно. Бидний официалчлалд бидэнд тооцооллын үр дүнтэй байх боломжтой алгоритмыг тайлбарлах боломжтой. Бид текст хуваалцах болон хамааралтай хамааралтай туршилтуудын аргаар харуулж байгаа юм. Энэ бүтээмжлэх нь үнэхээр дасгал тооцоололтыг багасгаж хөгжүүлэх чадварыг дасгал хөгжүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Selv om utpakking av funksjonar er ein nødvendig første steg i statistiske NLP, vert det ofte sett som eit enkelt forhandteringssteg. Men det kan dominasere datamaskina, både under øving, og spesielt ved utvikling. I denne papiren formaliserer vi utpakking av funksjonar frå ein algebraisk perspektiv. Formaliseringen vårt lèt oss definere ein melding som passar algoritme som kan restrukturisera funksjonsmalar for å vera meir kompatibelt effektiv. Vi viser gjennom eksperimenter om tekstbryting og relasjonsekstraksjon at denne restrukturingen faktisk speler ut funksjonsekstraksjonen i praksis ved å redusera redundant datamaskin.', 'pl': 'Chociaż ekstrakcja cech jest niezbędnym pierwszym krokiem w statystycznym NLP, często jest postrzegana jako krok wstępny. Jednak może dominować czas obliczeń, zarówno podczas treningu, jak i szczególnie podczas wdrożenia. W niniejszym artykule formalizujemy ekstrakcję cech z perspektywy algebraicznej. Nasza formalizacja pozwala nam zdefiniować algorytm przekazywania wiadomości, który może restrukturyzować szablony funkcji, aby były bardziej wydajne obliczeniowo. Poprzez eksperymenty na temat fragmowania tekstu i ekstrakcji relacji pokazujemy, że restrukturyzacja rzeczywiście przyspiesza ekstrakcję cech w praktyce poprzez zmniejszenie zbędnych obliczeń.', 'ro': 'Deși extragerea caracteristicilor este un prim pas necesar în PNL statistic, este adesea văzută ca un simplu pas de pre-procesare. Cu toate acestea, poate domina timpul de calcul, atât în timpul antrenamentului, cât și mai ales la desfășurare. În această lucrare, formalizăm extragerea caracteristicilor dintr-o perspectivă algebrică. Formalizarea noastră ne permite să definim un algoritm de transmitere a mesajelor care poate restructura șabloanele de caracteristici pentru a fi mai eficient din punct de vedere computațional. Noi arătăm prin experimente pe text chunking și extracția relațiilor că această restructurare accelerează într-adevăr extragerea caracteristicilor în practică prin reducerea calculelor redundante.', 'sr': 'Iako je izvlačenje funkcija neophodno prvi korak u statističkom NLP-u, često se smatra samo korak predobrađivanja. Ipak, to može dominirati računalno vrijeme, i tokom treninga, i posebno u razvoju. U ovom papiru formaliziramo izvlačenje karakteristika iz algebre perspektive. Naša formalizacija nam omogućava da definišemo poruku koji prolazi algoritam koji može da restrukturira šablone funkcije da budu računalno efikasniji. Mi pokazujemo putem eksperimenata o razmjerenju teksta i izvlačenju odnosa da ova restrukturizacija stvarno ubrzava izvlačenje funkcija u praksi smanjujući smanjeno računalo.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය පළමු පැත්තක් තියෙනවා නමුත් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක NLP වලට, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ ඒත්, ඒක පුළුවන් පරිගණනය වෙලාව, පුහුණුවන් වෙලාවට, විශේෂයෙන්ම විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ක මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් අල්ජෙබ්\u200dරියාවික ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ඉඳන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය අපිට පණිවිඩයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් අල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සංස්ථා', 'so': 'In kastoo la soo bixiyo qalabka firaaqada ah waa koob ugu baahan marka la soo galo takhasuska NLP, waxaa inta badan looga arkaa sida tallaabo ka baaraandegista oo kaliya. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waqtiga xisaabinta waxaa lagu xubin karaa xilliga waxbarashada, khusuusan waqtiga shaqada. Qoraalkan waxaynu horumarinnaa wax ka soo saarta aragtida algebraic. Isticmaaliddayada ayaa na fasaxaynaa in aan soo caddeyno warqad soo gudbaya, kaas oo dhisi kara qoraalada rasmiga ah si xisaab badan u faa’iido. Waxaannu ku tusnaa imtixaamo ku saabsan qoraalka jabsashada iyo soo saaridda xiriirka, in dhaqdhaqaalahan uu dhaqdhaqaaqaaqo xiliga xisaabinta.', 'sv': 'Även om extraktion av funktioner är ett nödvändigt första steg i statistisk NLP, ses det ofta som ett förbehandlingssteg. Ändå kan den dominera beräkningstiden, både under träning och särskilt vid utplacering. I denna uppsats formaliserar vi egenskapsextraktion ur ett algebraiskt perspektiv. Vår formalisering gör det möjligt för oss att definiera en meddelandeöverföringsalgoritm som kan omstrukturera funktionsmallar för att bli mer beräkningseffektiva. Vi visar genom experiment på textchunking och relationsextraktion att denna omstrukturering faktiskt påskyndar funktionsextraktion i praktiken genom att minska redundanta beräkningar.', 'mk': 'Иако извлекувањето на карактеристики претставува неопходен прв чекор во статистичката НЛП, честопати се смета за едноставен предпроцесивен чекор. Yet, it can dominate computation time, both during training, and especially at deployment.  Во овој документ, ја формализираме екстракцијата од алгебриска перспектива. Нашата формализација ни овозможува да дефинираме алгоритм за пренесување на пораки кој може да ги реструктурира шаблоните на карактеристики за да бидат повеќе компјутационално ефикасни. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm l-estrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi hija l-ewwel pass meħtieġ fil-NLP statistika, spiss titqies bħala pass sempliċement ta’ qabel il-proċess. Madankollu, tista’ tiddomina l-ħin tal-komputazzjoni, kemm waqt it-taħriġ, kif ukoll speċjalment waqt l-iskjerament. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nifformalizzaw l-estrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi minn perspettiva alġebraika. Il-formalizzazzjoni tagħna tippermettilna niddefinixxu algoritmu li jgħaddi minn messaġġ li jista’ jirristruttura mudelli ta’ karatteristiċi biex ikunu aktar effiċjenti fil-komputazzjoni. Permezz ta’ esperimenti dwar it-tqassim tat-testi u l-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet juru li dan ir-ristrutturar tabilħaqq iħaffef l-estrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi fil-prattika billi jnaqqas il-komputazzjoni żejda.', 'ta': 'குணங்கள் வெளியீடு என்றாலும் புள்ளிவிவரம் NLP-ல் ஒரு தேவையான முதல் படியாக இருந்தாலும், அது பெரும்பாலும் ஒர ஆனாலும், அது கணிக்கும் நேரம், பயிற்சியிலும், குறிப்பாக விருப்பங்களிலும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஆல்ஜிப்ராயிக் காட்சியிலிருந்து வெளியீட்டை வடிவமைக்கிறோம். எங்கள் வடிவமைப்பு ஒரு செய்தி அனுமதிக்கிறது, அது குணங்களின் வார்ப்புருக்களை மேலும் கணிப்பாக பயன்படுத்த முடியும். நாம் உரை சுட்டி மற்றும் தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் மூலம் சோதனைகள் மூலம் காட்டுகிறோம் இந்த அமைப்புகள் நிச்சயமாக குறைவான கணக்கை குறைவாக்க', 'ur': 'Though feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step. لیکن یہ کمپیوٹر کے وقت کی مدد کرسکتا ہے، تعلیم کے وقت، اور مخصوصا تعلیم کے وقت پر۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک الجبرائیکی نظر سے فرض کریں گے۔ ہماری فرمولیزی ہمیں ایک پیغام پہنچانے والی الگوریتم کی تعریف کرنے کی اجازت دیتی ہے جو فکرت ٹیپلٹوں کو زیادہ کمپیوٹر کے طور پر فعال کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم تفسیر چانچ اور رابطہ اٹھانے کے معاملہ میں آزمائش کے ذریعہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ تفسیر کی تعلیم واقعی آزمائش میں فائدہ اٹھانے کی سرعت دیتا ہے اور کم کم کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Agar imkoniyatlarni ajratish statistikasi NLP'da birinchi qadam kerak bo'lsa, odatda buni faqat preprocessing bir qadam sifatida koʻrinadi. Lekin, bu ta'lim sohasida, bajarish vaqtida va hususiyat ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz algebrak ko'rinishidan foydalanishni formatlash. Bizning formatlash imkoniyatini bir xabar algoritni aniqlash imkoniyatini beradi. Bu xossalarni hisoblash muvaffaqiyatli bo'lishi mumkin. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù việc trích xuất đặc trưng là bước đầu tiên cần thiết trong mô hình thống kê ngọt ngào, nhưng thường được xem như chỉ là bước tiến xử lý trước. Tuy nhiên, nó có thể thống trị thời gian tính, cả trong thời gian huấn luyện, và đặc biệt trong triển khai. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chính thức hóa các chức năng từ một quan điểm đại số. Phần chính thức của chúng tôi cho phép chúng tôi xác định một thuật to án chuyển tin nhắn có thể cấu trúc lại các mẫu tính năng để hiệu quả hơn. Chúng tôi cho thấy qua các thí nghiệm về phác thảo và cách khai thác liên quan rằng sự cấu trúc này thực tế sẽ đẩy nhanh tính năng khai thác bằng cách giảm tính toán dư thừa.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че извличането на характеристиките е необходима първа стъпка в статистическия НЛП, често се разглежда като просто предварителна стъпка. Въпреки това, тя може да доминира времето за изчисляване, както по време на обучение, така и особено при разгръщане. В тази статия ние формализираме екстракцията на характеристиките от алгебрична перспектива. Нашата формализация ни позволява да дефинираме алгоритъм за предаване на съобщения, който може да преструктурира функционалните шаблони, за да бъде по-изчислителен. Ние показваме чрез експерименти върху разделяне на текста и извличане на релации, че това преструктуриране наистина ускорява извличането на характеристики на практика чрез намаляване на излишното изчисление.', 'nl': 'Hoewel kenmerkextractie een noodzakelijke eerste stap is in statistische NLP, wordt het vaak gezien als een louter preprocessing stap. Toch kan het de rekentijd domineren, zowel tijdens de training als vooral tijdens de implementatie. In dit artikel formaliseren we kenmerkextractie vanuit een algebraïsch perspectief. Onze formalisering stelt ons in staat om een message pass algoritme te definiëren dat feature templates kan herstructureren om rekenkundig efficiënter te zijn. We laten aan de hand van experimenten met tekst chunking en relatienextractie zien dat deze herstructurering in de praktijk inderdaad featureextractie versnelt door redundante berekeningen te verminderen.', 'da': 'Selvom feature ekstraktion er et nødvendigt første skridt i statistisk NLP, ses det ofte som et simpelt forbearbejdningstrin. Alligevel kan det dominere beregningstiden, både under træning og især ved implementering. I denne artikel formaliserer vi feature ekstraktion fra et algebraisk perspektiv. Vores formalisering giver os mulighed for at definere en meddelelsesoverførselsalgoritme, der kan omstrukturere funktionsskabeloner for at være mere beregningsmæssigt effektive. Vi viser via eksperimenter med tekstchunking og relationsudtrækning, at denne omstrukturering faktisk fremskynder funktionsudtrækning i praksis ved at reducere overflødige beregninger.', 'hr': 'Iako je izvlačenje funkcija neophodno prvi korak u statističkom NLP-u, često se smatra samo korak predobrazovanja. Ipak, može dominirati računalno vrijeme, i tijekom treninga, i posebno na rasporedu. U ovom papiru formaliziramo izvlačenje karakteristika iz algebre perspektive. Naša formalizacija nam omogućava da definišemo poruku koji prolazi algoritam koji može restrukturirati šablone funkcije da bude računalno učinkovitiji. Mi pokazujemo kroz eksperimente o razmjeri teksta i izvlačenju odnosa da ova restrukturiranja stvarno ubrzava izvlačenje funkcija u praksi smanjujući smanjeno računalo.', 'id': 'Meskipun ekstraksi fitur adalah langkah pertama yang diperlukan dalam NLP statistik, sering dianggap sebagai langkah yang hanya memproses. Namun, itu dapat mendominasi waktu komputasi, baik selama latihan, dan khususnya pada penggunaan. Dalam kertas ini, kami formalisasi ekstraksi fitur dari perspektif algebraik. Formalisasi kami memungkinkan kita untuk mendefinisikan pesan melalui algoritma yang dapat mengkonstruksikan templat fitur untuk lebih efisien secara komputasi. Kami menunjukkan melalui eksperimen tentang potongan teks dan ekstraksi hubungan bahwa restrukturan ini benar-benar mempercepat ekstraksi fitur dalam praktek dengan mengurangi perhitungan yang berlebihan.', 'de': 'Obwohl Merkmalsextraktion ein notwendiger erster Schritt in der statistischen NLP ist, wird sie oft als bloßer Vorverarbeitungsschritt angesehen. Dennoch kann es die Rechenzeit dominieren, sowohl während des Trainings als auch vor allem beim Einsatz. In diesem Beitrag formalisieren wir Merkmalsextraktion aus algebraischer Perspektive. Unsere Formalisierung ermöglicht es uns, einen Message-Pass-Algorithmus zu definieren, der Feature-Vorlagen neu strukturieren kann, um recheneffizienter zu sein. Wir zeigen anhand von Experimenten zum Textchunking und zur Beziehungsextraktion, dass diese Umstrukturierung tatsächlich die Feature-Extraktion in der Praxis beschleunigt, indem redundante Berechnungen reduziert werden.', 'fa': 'اگرچه اخراج ویژگی اولین قدم نیاز در NLP آمار است، اغلب به عنوان قدم پیش پردازش می\u200cشود. با این حال، آن می تواند زمان محاسبات را تسلیم کند، هر زمان تمرین، و مخصوصا در تسلیم. در این کاغذ، ما اخراج ویژه\u200cهای ویژه را از یک نگاه الجبری فرمودیم. رسمی\u200cسازی ما به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد که یک الگوریتم پیغام گذاری را تعریف کنیم که می\u200cتواند کلمات ویژه\u200cهای تغییر\u200cسازی را به صورت کامپیوتری بیشتر انجام دهد. ما از طریق آزمایشات روی قطع کردن متن و استخراج ارتباط نشان می دهیم که این بازسازی واقعاً استخراج ویژه های ویژه را در تمرین با کاهش محاسبات زیادی سرعت می دهد.', 'tr': 'Eger 철zellikler a 챌mak NLP Statistiklerinde gerekli ilkinji ad캇m bolsa-da, ol k철plen챌 di흫e 철흫-i힊lemek ad캇m di첵ip g철r체n첵채r. 횦철ne bu wagt hem hesaplama wagtyny, hem bilim wagtynda hem dominati첵a edip biler. Bu kagyzda algebra perspektivden 챌yky힊yny formaliz첵arys. Bizi흫 formalasymyz ge챌en bir mesaj 체챌in sistemasyzlyk edip biljek bir algoritm채ni bejermek 체챌in m체mkin ed첵채r. Biz tekst ta첵첵arlama we ha첵syzlyk 첵체ze 챌ykarma deneyleri bilen bu restrukturalizasy흫 praktika 첵체ze 챌ykmak 체챌in 철zellikleri흫 ta첵첵arlanmagyny 첵itir첵채n derejesini azalt첵arys.', 'sw': 'Ingawa uteuzi wa kitendo hicho ni hatua ya kwanza inayohitajika katika takwimu ya NLP, mara nyingi inaonekana kama hatua ya kuendeleza. Hata hivyo, inaweza kushinda muda wa hisabati, wote wakati wa mafunzo, hasa kwa ajili ya kuajirishwa. Katika gazeti hili, tunatengeneza utoaji wa kituo kinachotokana na mtazamo wa algebraic. Utengenezaji wetu unaruhusu kufafanua ujumbe unaopita na utambulisho unaweza kujenga mabadiliko ili kuwa na ufanisi zaidi kwa hisabu. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.', 'af': "Alhoewel die funksie uittrek is 'n nodige eerste stap in statistiese NLP, word dit dikwels gesien as 'n net voorbereiding stap. Maar dit kan rekenaar tyd dominateer, beide tydens onderwerp, en veral by uitvoering. In hierdie papier, ons formaliseer funksie uittrekking van 'n algebraiese perspektief. Ons formalisasie laat ons toe om 'n boodskap wat verbygende algoritme te definieer wat kan restruktuur funksie templates om meer rekenaar effektief te wees. Ons wys deur eksperimente op teksblokking en verhouding van uittrekking dat hierdie restrukturing eintlik vinnig opspring funksie uittrekking in praksie deur die redundant rekenaar te verduur.", 'sq': 'Ndonse nxjerrja e karakteristikave është një hap i parë i nevojshëm në NLP statistike, ajo shpesh shihet si një hap i thjeshtë paraprocesues. Megjithatë, mund të mbizotërojë kohën e llogaritjeve, si gjatë trajnimit, ashtu dhe veçanërisht në vendosjen. In this paper, we formalize feature extraction from an algebraic perspective.  Formalizimi ynë na lejon të përcaktojmë një mesazh që kalon algoritmin që mund të ristrukturojë modelet e karakteristikave për të qenë më të efektshëm në llogari. Ne tregojmë nëpërmjet eksperimenteve mbi copëzimin e tekstit dhe nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve se ky ristrukturim me të vërtetë përshpejton nxjerrjen e karakteristikave në praktikë duke reduktuar llogaritjen e tepruar.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን የፊደል ግንኙነት በቁጥጥር የNLP አስፈላጊ መጀመሪያ እርምጃዎች ቢሆን፣ ብዙ ጊዜም የፕሮግራም ደረጃ እንደሚሆን ይታያል፡፡ ነገር ግን፣ በተማሪዎች ወቅት፣ በተለየ መቆጣጠር የሚችል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ከአልጋባራዊ ዓይነት የውጤት ምርጫን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ መልዕክታችን የተለየ አሌጎሪትምን ለማፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ውጤት እና የግንኙነት ውጤት ማሳየትን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ይህ ማሳሰቢያ ውጤት ማሳሳየትን በሚያሳስስ ፈጥኖ ይቻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Չնայած հատկանիշների վերացումը պետք է առաջին քայլն է վիճակագրական ՆԼՊ-ում, այն հաճախ ընդունվում է որպես պարզապես նախագործող քայլ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն կարող է գերակշռություն ունենալ հաշվարկների ժամանակի վրա, ինչպես ուսուցման ժամանակ, և հատկապես օգտագործման ժամանակ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կազմակերպում ենք հատկանիշների վերացումը հանրային տեսանկյունից: Մեր կազմակերպությունը թույլ է տալիս մեզ սահմանել ալգորիթմ անցնող հաղորդագրությունը, որը կարող է վերամշակել հատկանիշների մոդելները ավելի արդյունավետ համակարգչային տեսքով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս տեքստի կտորների և հարաբերությունների վերացման փորձարկումների միջոցով, որ այս վերականգնումը իսկապես արագացնում է առանձնահատկությունների վերացումը գործնական ընթացքում՝ նվազեցնելով չափազանց շատ հաշ', 'az': 'Xüsusiyyət çıxartması Statistik NLP üçün ilk adım lazım olsa da, bu çox çox yalnız ön işləmə adım kimi görünər. Halbuki, bu da hesaplama zamanı, həmçinin təhsil zamanı, həmçinin istifadə edilməsində hökmranlıq edər. Bu kağızda, algebra perspektivindən fərqli əlamətlər çıxarılmasını formalizə edirik. Bizim formalizacımız bizim bilgisayarla daha faydalı olaraq məlumatları daxil edə bilən algoritmi təsdiqləməyə imkan verir. Biz mətn parçası və əlaqəsi çıxartması barəsində təcrübələr vasitəsilə göstəririk ki, bu restrukturalizasyon həqiqətən də təcrübə içində fəaliyyətlərin çıxartmasını azaldırır.', 'bn': 'Though feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step.  তারপরেও, এটা গণনা সময়কে শেষ করতে পারে, প্রশিক্ষণের সময় এবং বিশেষ করে নিয়ন্ত্রণের সময়। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা আলজেব্রায়িক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে বিশেষ বিষয়বস্তুর বিনিময়ে বিনিময় করি। আমাদের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকরণ আমাদের একটি বার্তা পাশাপাশি অ্যালগরিদম নির্ধারণ করতে পারে যা বৈশিষ্ট্যের মন্দির পুনর্গঠন করতে পারে  টেক্সট চাঙ্কিং এবং সম্পর্ক বের করার পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই পরিস্থিতি নিশ্চিতভাবে কমানোর মাধ্যমে এই পুনর্গঠনের বৈশি', 'ko': '피쳐 추출은 통계 NLP에서 빠질 수 없는 첫 번째 단계이지만 일반적으로 사전 처리 단계로 간주됩니다.그러나 훈련 기간이든 배치할 때든 계산 시간을 조절할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 대수의 측면에서 형식화된 특징을 추출한다.우리의 형식화는 우리가 메시지 전달 알고리즘을 정의할 수 있도록 허용하는데 이 알고리즘은 특징 템플릿을 재구성하여 계산 효율을 높일 수 있다.우리는 텍스트 블록과 관계 추출에 대한 실험을 통해 이러한 재구성은 확실히 불필요한 계산을 줄여 특징 추출의 속도를 가속화시켰다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'ca': "Encara que l'extracció de característiques és un primer pas necessari en l'estadística NLP, sovint es veu com un pas merament preparatori. Però pot dominar el temps de computació, tant durant l'entrenament, com especialment en el desplaçament. En aquest paper, formalitzem l'extracció de característiques d'una perspectiva àlgebrica. La nostra formalització ens permet definir un algoritme de missatge que pot reestructurar els patrons de característiques per ser més eficients computacionalment. We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.", 'cs': 'Přestože extrakce funkcí je nezbytným prvním krokem statistické NLP, je často považována za pouhý krok předzpracování. Přesto může ovládat výpočetní dobu, a to jak během tréninku, tak především při nasazení. V tomto článku formalizujeme extrakci prvků z algebraického pohledu. Naše formalizace nám umožňuje definovat algoritmus předávání zpráv, který může restrukturalizovat šablony funkcí tak, aby byly výpočetně efektivnější. Prostřednictvím experimentů na kusování textu a extrakci relací ukazujeme, že tato restrukturalizace skutečně urychluje extrakci funkcí v praxi omezením redundantního výpočtu.', 'bs': 'Iako je izvlačenje funkcija neophodno prvi korak u statističkom NLP-u, često se smatra samo korak predobrazovanja. Ipak, to može dominirati računalno vrijeme, i tijekom treninga, i posebno na rasporedu. U ovom papiru formaliziramo izvlačenje karakteristika iz algebre perspektive. Naša formalizacija nam omogućava da definišemo poruku koji prolazi algoritam, koji može da restrukturira šablone funkcije da bude računalno efikasniji. Mi pokazujemo putem eksperimenta o razmjeri teksta i izvlačenju odnosa da ova restrukturiranja stvarno ubrzava izvlačenje funkcija u praksi smanjujući smanjeno računalo.', 'et': 'Kuigi funktsioonide ekstraheerimine on statistilise uue tööprogrammi vajalik esimene samm, peetakse seda sageli lihtsalt eeltöötluse etapina. Siiski võib see domineerida arvutusaega nii koolituse ajal kui ka eriti kasutuselevõtu ajal. Käesolevas töös formaliseerime funktsiooni ekstraheerimine algebralisest perspektiivist. Meie formaliseerimine võimaldab meil määratleda sõnumi edastamise algoritmi, mis suudab ümber struktureerida funktsioonimallid arvutuslikumaks tõhusamaks. Me näitame teksti tükkimise ja seoste ekstraheerimise eksperimentide kaudu, et see restruktureerimine tõepoolest kiirendab funktsioonide ekstraheerimist praktikas, vähendades liigset arvutust.', 'fi': 'Vaikka ominaisuuksien erottaminen on välttämätön ensimmäinen askel tilastollisessa NLP:ssä, sitä pidetään usein pelkänä esikäsittelyvaiheena. Se voi kuitenkin hallita laskentaaikaa sekä koulutuksen aikana että erityisesti käyttöönoton yhteydessä. Tässä artikkelissa formalisoimme ominaisuuden uuttamisen algebrallisesta näkökulmasta. Muodollisuutemme avulla voimme määritellä viestinsiirtoalgoritmin, joka voi järjestellä ominaisuusmallit uudelleen laskennallisesti tehokkaammiksi. Osoitamme tekstinpalkkausta ja suhdeuuttamista koskevien kokeilujen avulla, että tämä uudelleenjärjestely todella nopeuttaa ominaisuusuuttaa käytännössä vähentämällä tarpeetonta laskentaa.', 'he': "למרות שחיפוש תכונות הוא צעד ראשון הכרחי בסטטיסטי NLP, זה לעתים קרובות נחשב כצעד מראשי. Yet, it can dominate computation time, both during training, and especially at deployment.  בעיתון הזה, אנו פורמלים חיתוך תכונות מנקודת מבט אלג'ברית. הפורמליזציה שלנו מאפשרת לנו להגדיר הודעה שמעברת אלגוריתם שיכולה לשנות את מודלים תכונות כדי להיות יותר יעילים מחשב. אנו מראים באמצעות ניסויים על חתיכת טקסט וחילוץ מערכת יחסים שהמחדשה הזאת באמת מאיץ את החילוץ של תכונות בעבודה על ידי להפחית חישובים מיותרים.", 'ha': "Babu zama na amfani da shiryarwa na ƙayyade gaba ɗaya cikin NLP, ko da yawa ana gane shi kamar wata ƙyama mai gabatar da aiki. Kayya, yana iya domin lokacin lissafi, a lokacin da za'a lissafa, kuma hasa'a, a cikin aikin. Ina cikin wannan takardan, za mu faransa zaɓen wata na'urar algebraic. Tsarinsa na yarda mu bayyana wani message mai gudãna algoritm wanda zai iya canza tsari masu amfani da shi kafin lissafi. Tuna nũna kafarin a kan matsayin kungiya da masu husũma, cewa wannan restructurin za'a yi kashi da amfani da idan an ƙara lissafin.", 'jv': 'Display boxes Mungkin, iso nguasai penggunaké rawut, njuk, ngono njuk nggawe ngupakan tarjamahan. Na bukir iki, kita diwumi "extract" alajebra alajebra perspective. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno nggunggo urip lan ijol-ijol sing nggambar barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe layang manut kanggo ngwalikno dadi kaluwargane.', 'sk': 'Čeprav je ekstrakcija značilnosti potreben prvi korak v statističnem NLP, se pogosto obravnava kot zgolj korak predobdelave. Vendar pa lahko prevladuje v času izračuna, tako med usposabljanjem kot zlasti pri uvajanju. V tem članku smo formalizirali ekstrakcijo funkcij iz algebraične perspektive. Naša formalizacija nam omogoča, da določimo algoritem za prenos sporočil, ki lahko prestrukturira predloge funkcij, da so računalniško učinkovitejše. S poskusi sestavljanja besedila in ekstrakcije relacij pokažemo, da to prestrukturiranje dejansko pospeši ekstrakcijo funkcij v praksi z zmanjšanjem odvečnega izračuna.', 'bo': 'Although feature extraction is a necessary first step in statistical NLP, it is often seen as a mere preprocessing step. དེ་ནའང་དེ་དག་གི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་དུས་ལྟར་སྟོན་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཆེད་པོ་ཡིན་ནའང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཆོག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད་པའི་འཕྲིན་རིས་སྤྲོད་པའི་ས Algorithm We show via experiments on text chunking and relation extraction that this restructuring does indeed speed up feature extraction in practice by reducing redundant computation.'}
{'en': 'Chunk-based Decoder for Neural Machine Translation', 'fr': 'Décodeur basé sur des blocs pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'ar': 'مفكك الشفرة القائم على الكتلة للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'es': 'Decodificador basado en fragmentos para traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Decodificador baseado em pedaços para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のためのチャンクベースデコーダ', 'zh': '神经机器翻译者,块之解码器也', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए चंक-आधारित डिकोडर', 'ru': 'Чанковый декодер для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': "Díchódóir smután-bhunaithe d'Aistriúchán Néar-Mhuineacháin", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αποκωδικοποιητής με βάση το Chunk για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Vastag alapú dekódoló idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Decoder basato su chunk per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасының жинақталған декодері', 'lt': 'Chunk-based Decoder for Neural Machine Translation', 'mt': 'Dekodifikatur ibbażat fuq biċċiet għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө дамжуулагч', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ചങ്ങ്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d', 'pl': 'Dekoder oparty na Chunk do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'no': 'Comment', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Decodor bazat pe bucăți pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'sr': 'Декодер базиран на парке за превод неуралне машине', 'sv': 'Chunkbaserad avkodare för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Turjumidda maskinka neurada', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish vositasiName', 'vi': 'Bộ giải mã về máy thần kinh', 'bg': 'Декодер за неврален машинен превод', 'hr': 'Dekoder baziran na komadu za neuronski prevod stroja', 'da': 'Chunk-baseret dekoder til neural maskinoversættelse', 'id': 'Dekoder berdasarkan bagian untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'nl': 'Chunk-gebaseerde decoder voor neurale machinevertaling', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'de': 'Chunk-basierter Decoder für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': '블록 기반 신경 번역 디코더', 'am': 'Chunk-based Decoder for Neural Machine Translation', 'tr': 'Taýdan tabanly tenzim et', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման հատվածի վրա հիմնված դեկոդերը', 'az': 'NĂ¶ral Makin Ă‡eviri ĂĽĂ§ĂĽn Ă§É™kilmiĹź Dekoder', 'sq': 'Dekoduesi me bazë në pjesë për përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য চাঙ্ক ভিত্তিক ডেকোডার', 'cs': 'Dekodédér na bázi Chunk pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'ca': 'Decodidor per traducció de màquines neuronals basat en trossos', 'et': 'Tükkidel põhinev dekooder neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Palapohjainen dekooderi hermojen konekäännökseen', 'bs': 'Dekoder baziran na komadu za neuronski prevod mašine', 'jv': 'Cuck-Ngawe Dekoder kanggo Terjamahan Njaral', 'sk': 'Dekodir na osnovi koščkov za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מתקן מבוסס על חלקים לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'Chunk-based་འོད་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་འོད་སྡུད་མིག་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'Chunks (or phrases) once played a pivotal role in machine translation. By using a chunk rather than a word as the basic translation unit, local (intra-chunk) and global (inter-chunk) word orders and dependencies can be easily modeled. The chunk structure, despite its importance, has not been considered in the decoders used for neural machine translation (NMT). In this paper, we propose chunk-based decoders for (NMT), each of which consists of a chunk-level decoder and a word-level decoder. The chunk-level decoder models global dependencies while the word-level decoder decides the local word order in a chunk. To output a target sentence, the chunk-level decoder generates a chunk representation containing global information, which the word-level decoder then uses as a basis to predict the words inside the chunk. Experimental results show that our proposed decoders can significantly improve translation performance in a WAT ‘16 English-to-Japanese translation task.', 'ar': 'لعبت القطع (أو العبارات) دورًا محوريًا في الترجمة الآلية. باستخدام مقطع بدلاً من كلمة كوحدة ترجمة أساسية ، يمكن بسهولة نمذجة أوامر الكلمات المحلية (داخل القطعة) والعالمية (بين الأجزاء) والتبعيات. لم يتم النظر في بنية القطعة ، على الرغم من أهميتها ، في أجهزة فك التشفير المستخدمة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT). في هذه الورقة ، نقترح مفككات التشفير القائمة على القطع لـ (NMT) ، ويتكون كل منها من وحدة فك ترميز على مستوى الكتلة ووحدة فك ترميز على مستوى الكلمة. يصمم مفكك الشفرة على مستوى القطع التبعيات العالمية بينما يقرر مفكك التشفير على مستوى الكلمة ترتيب الكلمات المحلي في قطعة. لإخراج جملة مستهدفة ، يُنشئ مفكك الشفرة على مستوى القطعة تمثيلًا مقطعيًا يحتوي على معلومات عالمية ، والتي يستخدمها مفكك التشفير على مستوى الكلمة كأساس للتنبؤ بالكلمات داخل القطعة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن وحدات فك التشفير المقترحة لدينا يمكنها تحسين أداء الترجمة بشكل ملحوظ في مهمة ترجمة WAT 16 من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية.', 'fr': "Les segments (ou phrases) jouaient autrefois un rôle central dans la traduction automatique. En utilisant un morceau plutôt qu'un mot comme unité de traduction de base, les ordres et les dépendances des mots locaux (intra-segments) et globaux (inter-blocs) peuvent être facilement modélisés. La structure des blocs, malgré son importance, n'a pas été prise en compte dans les décodeurs utilisés pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT). Dans cet article, nous proposons des décodeurs basés sur des blocs pour (NMT), chacun d'entre eux étant constitué d'un décodeur de niveau bloc et d'un décodeur de niveau mot. Le décodeur au niveau du segment modélise les dépendances globales tandis que le décodeur au niveau mot décide de l'ordre local des mots dans un fragment. Pour produire une phrase cible, le décodeur au niveau du segment génère une représentation de segment contenant des informations globales, que le décodeur de niveau mot utilise ensuite comme base pour prédire les mots à l'intérieur du segment. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que les décodeurs que nous proposons peuvent améliorer considérablement les performances de traduction dans une tâche de traduction de l'anglais vers le japonais WAT `16.", 'pt': 'Pedaços (ou frases) já desempenharam um papel fundamental na tradução automática. Usando um pedaço em vez de uma palavra como unidade básica de tradução, ordens e dependências de palavras locais (intra-chunk) e globais (inter-chunk) podem ser facilmente modeladas. A estrutura do pedaço, apesar de sua importância, não foi considerada nos decodificadores usados para tradução automática neural (NMT). Neste artigo, propomos decodificadores baseados em blocos para (NMT), cada um dos quais consiste em um decodificador em nível de bloco e um decodificador em nível de palavra. O decodificador em nível de bloco modela as dependências globais enquanto o decodificador em nível de palavra decide a ordem local das palavras em um bloco. Para produzir uma sentença alvo, o decodificador em nível de bloco gera uma representação de bloco contendo informações globais, que o decodificador em nível de palavra usa como base para prever as palavras dentro do bloco. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossos decodificadores propostos podem melhorar significativamente o desempenho da tradução em uma tarefa de tradução de inglês para japonês do WAT `16.', 'es': 'Los fragmentos (o frases) alguna vez desempeñaron un papel fundamental en la traducción automática. Al usar un fragmento en lugar de una palabra como unidad de traducción básica, se pueden modelar fácilmente las dependencias y los órdenes de palabras locales (intrafragmentos) y globales (entre fragmentos). La estructura de fragmentos, a pesar de su importancia, no se ha tenido en cuenta en los decodificadores utilizados para la traducción automática neuronal (NMT). En este artículo, proponemos decodificadores basados en fragmentos para (NMT), cada uno de los cuales consiste en un decodificador a nivel de fragmento y un decodificador a nivel de palabra. El decodificador a nivel de fragmento modela dependencias globales mientras que el decodificador a nivel de palabra decide el orden local de palabras en un fragmento. Para generar una oración objetivo, el decodificador a nivel de fragmento genera una representación de fragmento que contiene información global, que el decodificador a nivel de palabra utiliza entonces como base para predecir las palabras dentro del fragmento. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestros decodificadores propuestos pueden mejorar significativamente el rendimiento de la traducción en una tarea de traducción del inglés al japonés WAT `16.', 'ja': 'チャンク（またはフレーズ）は、かつて機械翻訳において極めて重要な役割を果たした。基本的な翻訳ユニットとして単語ではなくチャンクを使用することで、ローカル（チャンク内）およびグローバル（チャンク間）の単語の順序と依存関係を簡単にモデル化できます。チャンク構造は、その重要性にもかかわらず、神経機械翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）に使用されるデコーダでは考慮されていない。本稿では、それぞれがチャンクレベルデコーダとワードレベルデコーダから構成される、NMT （ ）のためのチャンクベースデコーダを提案する。チャンクレベルデコーダは、ワードレベルデコーダがチャンク内のローカルワード順序を決定する間、グローバル依存関係をモデル化する。ターゲット文を出力するために、チャンクレベルデコーダは、グローバル情報を含むチャンク表現を生成し、その後、ワードレベルデコーダは、それをベースとして、チャンク内のワードを予測する。実験結果は、WAT `16英語から日本語への翻訳タスクで、当社が提案するデコーダーが翻訳パフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることができることを示しています。', 'hi': "चंक्स (या वाक्यांशों) ने एक बार मशीन अनुवाद में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाई थी। मूल अनुवाद इकाई के रूप में एक शब्द के बजाय एक खंड का उपयोग करके, स्थानीय (इंट्रा-चंक) और वैश्विक (अंतर-चंक) शब्द आदेश और निर्भरताओं को आसानी से मॉडलिंग किया जा सकता है। इसके महत्व के बावजूद, चंक संरचना को तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले डिकोडर में नहीं माना गया है। इस पेपर में, हम (एनएमटी) के लिए चंक-आधारित डिकोडर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक में एक चंक-स्तर के डिकोडर और एक शब्द-स्तरीय डिकोडर शामिल हैं। चंक-स्तर विकोडक वैश्विक निर्भरताओं को मॉडल करता है जबकि शब्द-स्तर विकोडक एक भाग में स्थानीय शब्द क्रम तय करता है। एक लक्ष्य वाक्य को आउटपुट करने के लिए, चंक-स्तर विकोडक वैश्विक जानकारी युक्त एक चंक प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करता है, जिसे शब्द-स्तर विकोडक तब चंक के अंदर शब्दों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक आधार के रूप में उपयोग करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित डिकोडर एक WAT '16 अंग्रेजी-से-जापानी अनुवाद कार्य में अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं।", 'zh': "块(短语)曾发机器翻译中关键作用。 用块非单词为本译单元,可以轻(块内)全局(块间)词序赖建模。 虽结构甚重,而神经机器翻译(NMT)解码器未之思也。 本文,立块解码器(NMT),解码器皆块级解码器字级解码器。 块级解码器以全局为建模,而字级解码器则定块中本地词序。 为输的句子,块级解码器生成一个包含全局信息的块,然后单词级解码器将他用作占块内单词的基基。 实验结果表明,吾言解码器可以显WAT '16英语日语翻译译者也。", 'ru': 'Куски (или фразы) когда-то играли ключевую роль в машинном переводе. Используя кусок, а не слово в качестве базовой единицы перевода, можно легко смоделировать локальные (внутри куска) и глобальные (между кусками) порядки и зависимости слов. Структура куска, несмотря на ее важность, не рассматривалась в декодерах, используемых для нейронного машинного перевода (НМП). В этой статье мы предлагаем кусковые декодеры для (NMT), каждый из которых состоит из кускового декодера и декодера на уровне слова. Декодер на уровне фрагментов моделирует глобальные зависимости, в то время как декодер на уровне слов решает локальный порядок слов в фрагменте. Для вывода целевого предложения декодер уровня фрагмента генерирует представление фрагмента, содержащее глобальную информацию, которую декодер уровня слова затем использует в качестве основы для предсказания слов внутри фрагмента. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемые нами декодеры могут значительно повысить производительность перевода в задаче перевода с английского на японский язык WAT `16.', 'ga': 'Bhí ról lárnach ag smuillí (nó frásaí) san aistriúchán meaisín tráth. Trí smután seachas focal a úsáid mar bhunaonad aistriúcháin, is féidir orduithe agus spleáchais focal logánta (isteach) agus domhanda (idir-shlua) a mhúnlú go héasca. In ainneoin a thábhachtaí, níor cuireadh an struchtúr smután san áireamh sna díchódóirí a úsáidtear le haghaidh aistriúchán meaisín néaraíoch (NMT). Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid díchódóirí smután-bhunaithe do (NMT), a bhfuil gach ceann acu comhdhéanta de dhíchódóir ar leibhéal smután agus díchódóir leibhéal focal. Múnlaíonn an díchódóir leibhéal smután spleáchais dhomhanda agus socraíonn an díchódóir leibhéal focal ord áitiúil na bhfocal i smután. Chun sprioc-abairt a aschur, gineann an díchódóir leibhéal smután léiriú smután ina bhfuil faisnéis dhomhanda, a úsáideann an díchódóir leibhéal focal ansin mar bhunús chun na focail taobh istigh den smután a thuar. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir lenár ndíchódóirí molta feabhas suntasach a chur ar fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin i dtasc aistriúcháin Béarla-go-Seapáinis WAT `16.', 'el': 'Τα κομμάτια (ή φράσεις) κάποτε έπαιξαν καθοριστικό ρόλο στη μηχανική μετάφραση. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα κομμάτι αντί μιας λέξης ως βασική μονάδα μετάφρασης, οι τοπικές (ενδο-κομμάτι) και παγκόσμιες (μεταξύ-κομμάτι) διαταγές λέξεων και εξαρτήσεις μπορούν εύκολα να μοντελοποιηθούν. Η δομή του κομματιού, παρά τη σημασία της, δεν έχει ληφθεί υπόψη στους αποκωδικοποιητές που χρησιμοποιούνται για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT). Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε αποκωδικοποιητές με βάση κομμάτια για (NMT), καθένα από τα οποία αποτελείται από έναν αποκωδικοποιητή επιπέδου κομματιού και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή επιπέδου λέξεων. Ο αποκωδικοποιητής επιπέδου μοντελοποιεί παγκόσμιες εξαρτήσεις, ενώ ο αποκωδικοποιητής επιπέδου λέξεων αποφασίζει την τοπική σειρά λέξεων σε ένα κομμάτι. Για την εξαγωγή μιας πρότασης στόχου, ο αποκωδικοποιητής επιπέδου κομματιού παράγει μια αναπαράσταση κομματιού που περιέχει γενικές πληροφορίες, τις οποίες ο αποκωδικοποιητής επιπέδου λέξεων χρησιμοποιεί στη συνέχεια ως βάση για να προβλέψει τις λέξεις μέσα στο κομμάτι. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενοι αποκωδικοποιητές μπορούν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά την απόδοση μετάφρασης σε μια εργασία αγγλικής-ιαπωνικής μετάφρασης.', 'hu': 'A darabok (vagy kifejezések) egykor kulcsszerepet játszottak a gépi fordításban. Ha alapvető fordítási egységként egy darabot használunk, a helyi (darabon belüli) és globális (darabon belüli) szavak és függőségek könnyen modellezhetők. A darabszerkezet fontossága ellenére nem vették figyelembe a neurális gépi fordításhoz (NMT) használt dekóderekben. Ebben a tanulmányban darab alapú dekódolókat javasolunk (NMT), amelyek mindegyike egy darab szintű dekódolóból és egy szó szintű dekódolóból áll. A darabszintű dekódoló globális függőségeket modellez, míg a szószintű dekódoló egy darabban határozza meg a helyi szósorrendet. A célmondat kiadásához a darabszintű dekódoló globális információkat tartalmazó darabszintű ábrázolást generál, amelyet a szószintű dekódoló ezután használ alapul a darabszinten belüli szavak előrejelzéséhez. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt dekódolóink jelentősen javíthatják a fordítási teljesítményt egy WAT `16 angol-japán fordítási feladat során.', 'ka': 'პარამეტრები (ან ფრაზები) ერთხელ მაქსინური გაგრძელებაში დიდი პროლია იყო. სიტყვის გამოყენებით, ვიდრე სიტყვის, როგორც საუკეთესო გადაწყენება, ლოკალური (შორის) და გლობალური (შორის) სიტყვის მოწყობილობები და დასარგებელობები შეუძლიათ ადვილად სტრუქტურაცია, მისი მნიშვნელოვანობისთვის მაგრამ, არ იყო აღმოჩნევა ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგულისთვის გამოყენებული დეკოდერებში (NMT). ამ დომენტში ჩვენ დავწყვებთ ფანქტიკური დეკოდერები (NMT), რომლებიც ყოველ მათგანი არის ფანქტიკური დონის დეკოდერების და სიტყვის დონის დეკოდერებისგან. სიტყვების დეკოდერების მოდელები გლობალური დადარჩენება, როცა სიტყვების დეკოდერების დეკოდერების მხოლოდ მონიშნდება. მარტივი სიტყვების გამოყენებაში, კონტაქტის დონტაქტის გამოყენება, რომელიც გლობალური ინფორმაცია აქვს, რომელიც სიტყვების დონტაქტის გამოყენება როგორც ბაზა გამოყენება, რომ წ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოადგენული ევკოდერები შეუძლიათ ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტადებ', 'it': "I pezzi (o frasi) una volta hanno giocato un ruolo fondamentale nella traduzione automatica. Utilizzando un blocco piuttosto che una parola come unità di traduzione di base, gli ordini e le dipendenze locali (intra-chunk) e globali (inter-chunk) possono essere facilmente modellati. La struttura del chunk, nonostante la sua importanza, non è stata considerata nei decoder utilizzati per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT). In questo articolo, proponiamo decoder basati su chunk per (NMT), ognuno dei quali consiste in un decoder a livello chunk e un decoder a livello word. Il decoder a livello di blocco modella le dipendenze globali mentre il decoder a livello di parola decide l'ordine locale delle parole in un blocco. Per produrre una frase di destinazione, il decoder a livello di chunk genera una rappresentazione di chunk contenente informazioni globali, che il decoder a livello di parola usa come base per prevedere le parole all'interno del chunk. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che i nostri decoder proposti possono migliorare significativamente le prestazioni di traduzione in un compito di traduzione inglese-giapponese WAT `16.", 'lt': 'Dalys (arba frazės) kartą atliko svarbų vaidmenį vertimo mašin a srityje. Naudojant gabalėlį, o ne žodį kaip pagrindinį vertimo vienetą, galima lengvai modeliuoti vietinius (gabalėlyje) ir visuotinius (gabalėlyje) žodžių nurodymus ir priklausomybę. Nepaisant jo svarbos, gabalėlių struktūra nebuvo atsižvelgta į dekoderius, naudojamus nervinės mašinos vertimui (NMT). Šiame dokumente siūlome atskirus (NMT) dekoderius, kurių kiekvieną sudaro atskiro lygio dekoderis ir žodžio lygio dekoderis. Dekodavimo lygio gabalėlių lygis modeliuoja pasaulines priklausomybes, o žodžių lygio dekoderis nusprendžia vietinę žodžių tvarką gabalėliais. Siekiant išrašyti tikslinį sakinį, gabalėlio lygio dekoderis sukuria gabalėlio atvaizdą, kuriame pateikiama visuotinė informacija, kurią žodžio lygio dekoderis taiko kaip pagrindą, kad būtų galima prognozuoti žodžius gabalėlio viduje. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi dekoderiai gali gerokai pagerinti vertimo rezultatus atliekant WAT 16 anglų–japonų vertimo užduotį.', 'mk': 'Делови (или фрази) некогаш играа клучна улога во машинскиот превод. By using a chunk rather than a word as the basic translation unit, local (intra-chunk) and global (inter-chunk) word orders and dependencies can be easily modeled.  Структурата на парчињата, и покрај нејзината важност, не е разгледувана во декодерите кои се користат за превод на невралните машини (НМТ). Во оваа хартија, предложуваме декодери на база на парчиња за (НМТ), од кои секој се состои од декодер на ниво на парчиња и декодер на ниво на зборови. The chunk-level decoder models global dependencies while the word-level decoder decides the local word order in a chunk.  За да се извади реченицата на целта, декодерот на нивото на парчиња генерира претставување на парчиња што содржи глобални информации, кои декодерот на нивото на зборови потоа ги користи како основа за предвидување на зборовите во парчињата. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашите предложени декодери можат значително да ја подобрат перформансата на преводот во задачата на WAT 16 англиско-јапонски превод.', 'ms': 'Bahagian (atau frasa) pernah bermain peran penting dalam terjemahan mesin. Dengan menggunakan potongan daripada perkataan sebagai unit terjemahan as as, perintah perkataan setempat (intra-potongan) dan global (inter-potongan) boleh mudah dipodelkan. Struktur potongan, walaupun pentingnya, tidak dianggap dalam dekoder yang digunakan untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT). Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan dekoder berasaskan potongan untuk (NMT), masing-masing terdiri dari dekoder aras potongan dan dekoder aras perkataan. Dependensi global model penyahkod aras-potongan sementara penyahkod aras-perkataan menentukan tertib perkataan setempat dalam potongan. Untuk output kalimat sasaran, penyahpepijat aras-potongan menghasilkan persembahan potongan yang mengandungi maklumat global, yang penyahpepijat aras-perkataan kemudian menggunakan sebagai as as untuk meramalkan perkataan di dalam potongan. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa dekoder kami diusulkan boleh meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan secara signifikan dalam tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggeris ke Jepun WAT `16.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудармасында бөліктері (не сөздер) бірден бір рет орындалды. Сөзді негізгі аудару бірлігі ретінде, жергілікті (интера- бөлік) және жалпы (интернбөлік) сөздің реттері мен тәуелдіктері оңай модел алады. Бір бөлшек құрылымы өзінің маңыздығына қарамастан, невралдық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) үшін қолданылған декодерлерде қаралмады. Бұл қағазда бөлек негіздеген декодерлерді (NMT) дегенге ұсынамыз. Әрбірінің бөлек деңгейінің декодері мен сөз деңгейінің декодері болады. Жергілікті деңгейіндегі деңгейіндегі үлгілер сөз деңгейіндегі деңгейіндегі деңгейіндегі жергілікті сөздердің ретін бір бөлікте шешіп береді. Мақсатты сөзді шығару үшін бөлшек деңгейінің деңгейі жалпы мәліметті бар бөлшектерді құрады. Содан кейін сөздің деңгейінің деңгейінің деңгейіндегі сөздерді бөлшектеу үшін негізгі Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің қолданған декодеріміз "16 ағылшын және япон тілінен аудару тапсырмасында аудару мүмкіндігін өзгерте алады" дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d ഒരിക്കല്\u200d പിവോട്ടാല്\u200d പങ്കുകള്\u200d (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d) കളിച്ചിരുന്നു. Name ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം ലോക്കല്\u200d (ഇന്\u200dറര്\u200dച്ചങ്ക്) വാക്ക് കല്\u200dപനകളും ആശ് അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതിന് ശേഷം, ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയ്ക്കായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഡെകോഡേറുകളില്\u200d ചാങ്ക്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ചാങ്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും ഒരു ചാങ്ക് നില നില ഡെ വാക്ക്- നില ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു To output a target sentence, the chunk-level decoder generates a chunk representation containing global information, which the word-level decoder then uses as a basis to predict the words inside the chunk.  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡെകോഡേര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യാട്ടില്\u200d `16 ഇംഗ', 'mt': 'Il-biċċiet (jew il-frażijiet) darba kellhom rwol kruċjali fit-traduzzjoni bil-magna. Billi tintuża biċċa minflok kelma bħala l-unit à bażika tat-traduzzjoni, ordnijiet u dipendenzi tal-kliem lokali (intra-biċċa) u globali (inter-biċċa) jistgħu jiġu mmudellati faċilment. L-istruttura tal-biċċiet, minkejja l-importanza tagħha, ma ġietx ikkunsidrata fid-dekodifikaturi użati għat-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali (NMT). In this paper, we propose chunk-based decoders for (NMT), each of which consists of a chunk-level decoder and a word-level decoder.  Id-dekoder fil-livell ta’ biċċiet jimmudella d-dipendenzi globali filwaqt li d-dekoder fil-livell ta’ kliem jiddeċiedi l-ordni lokali tal-kliem f’biċċiet. Biex to ħroġ sentenza fil-mira, id-dekoder tal-livell tal-biċċa tiġġenera rappreżentanza tal-biċċa li fiha informazzjoni globali, li d-dekoder tal-livell tal-kliem imbagħad juża bħala bażi biex jipprevedi l-kliem ġewwa l-biċċa. Riżultati esperimentali juru li d-dekodifikaturi proposti tagħna jistgħu jtejbu b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni f’kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ WAT `16 Ingliż-Ġappuniż.', 'mn': 'Нэгэн үед хэлбэрүүд (эсвэл хэлбэрүүд) машины орчуулалт чухал дүр зураг тоглож байсан. Нэг хэсэг нь үндсэн орчуулах нэгжээс илүү, орон нутгийн (интро-хэсэг) болон дэлхийн (интернэ-хэсэг) үгийн дарааллыг, хамааралтай байдлыг амархан загварчлах боломжтой. Үүний чухал ач холбогдолтой ч хэсэг бүтэц нь мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулахад хэрэглэгддэг (NMT) шилжүүлэгчид байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэсэг дээр суурилсан загваруудыг (NMT) шийдвэрлэж байна. Энэ бүх нь хэсэг хэмжээний шийдвэрлэл болон үг хэмжээний шийдвэрлэл юм. Гэхдээ хэмжээний загвар нь дэлхийн хамааралтай байдлыг шийдвэрлэхэд хэмжээний хэмжээнд орон нутгийн үгийн дарааллыг шийддэг. Холбооны өгүүлбэр гаргахын тулд, хэсэг түвшинд шилжүүлэгч нь дэлхийн мэдээллийг агуулдаг хэсэг хэсэг бий болгодог. Энэ үг түвшинд шилжүүлэгч нь хэсэг доторх үгийг таамаглах суурь гэж ашигладаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлэгчдийн хөгжүүлэгчид WAT `16 Англи-Японы хөгжүүлэгчдийн ажил дээр илүү сайжруулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Bucățile (sau frazele) au jucat odată un rol esențial în traducerea automată. Folosind o bucată mai degrabă decât un cuvânt ca unitate de traducere de bază, ordinele și dependențele locale (intra-bucată) și globale (inter-bucată) de cuvinte pot fi ușor modelate. Structura bucăților, în ciuda importanței sale, nu a fost luată în considerare în decodoarele utilizate pentru traducerea automată neurală (NMT). În această lucrare, propunem decodoare bazate pe bucăți pentru (NMT), fiecare dintre ele constă dintr-un decoder la nivel de bucăți și un decoder la nivel de cuvânt. Decodorul la nivel de bucată modelează dependențele globale în timp ce decodorul la nivel de cuvânt decide ordinea locală de cuvânt într-o bucată. Pentru a ieși o propoziție țintă, decodorul la nivel de bucăți generează o reprezentare de bucăți conținând informații globale, pe care decodorul la nivel de cuvânt o utilizează apoi ca bază pentru a prezice cuvintele din interiorul bucății. Rezultatele experimentale arată că decodoarele noastre propuse pot îmbunătăți semnificativ performanța traducerii într-o sarcină de traducere WAT `16 din engleză în japoneză.', 'sr': 'Šanke (ili rečenice) jednom su igrale glavnu ulogu u prevodu mašine. Koristeći komad umjesto reči kao osnovnu jedinicu prevoda, lokalne (unutrašnjost) i globalne (međukomad) naređenja riječi i zavisnosti mogu lako modelirati. Struktura komada, uprkos njenoj važnosti, nije razmotrena u dekoderima koji se koriste za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT). U ovom papiru predlažemo dekodere bazirane na komadu za (NMT), od kojih se sastoji od dekodera na nivou komada i dekodera na nivou riječi. Modeli dekodera na nivou komada su globalne zavisnosti dok dekoder na nivou riječi odlučuje lokalni red riječi u komadu. Da bi izašla ciljna rečenica, dekoder nivoa komada stvara reprezentaciju koji sadrži globalne informacije, koju dekoder nivoa riječi onda koristi kao osnovu da predvidi reči unutar komada. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi dekoderi mogu značajno poboljšati provedbu prevođenja u zadatku WAT `16 prevođenja engleskog na japanski.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka machine-tarjumaadda ayaa mar ka ciyaaray shuqul aad ku qoran karto. Markaas waxaa si fudud looga sameyn karaa qeybta turjumaadda ee aasaasiga ah, deegaanka (intra-chunk) iyo amar caalamiga ah (inter-chunk). Isticmaalka guud, in kastoo ay muhiim tahay, laguma xisaabin koordirada lagu isticmaalay tarjumaadda maskaxda neural (NMT). In this paper, we propose chunk-based decoders for (NMT), each of which consists of a chunk-level decoder and a word-level decoder.  Tusaaladaha deynta darajada ee caalamiga ah waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku filan, marka uu qorsheynta ereyga ku qoran yahay mid ku habboon. Si uu u soo bixiyo ereyga goalka, qodolku wuxuu soo saaraa mid ku qoran macluumaad caalami ah, kaas oo ku qoran qoraalka heerka, kadibna wuxuu u isticmaalaa sida aasaasi ah in uu ka hor dhigo erayada ku jira jaranjarka. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qodeyntayada la soo jeeday ay ay si weyn u hagaajin karaan tababarka turjumaadda ee WAT `16 Ingiriis-ilaa-Japanese-ka.', 'no': 'Punkter (eller frasar) spelt ein gong ein viktig rolle i maskinsomsetjinga. Ved å bruka ein brøk i staden for eit ord som grunnleggjande omsetjingseiningar, kan lokale (intra- brøk) og globale (inter- brøk) ordordordordføringar og avhengighet enkelt modelerast. Strukturen for blokken, selv om viktigheten, er ikkje betre i dekoderane som brukar for omsetjing av neuralmaskina (NMT). I denne papiret foreslår vi blokkebaserte dekoder for (NMT), kvar av dei inneheld ein blokkenivådekoder og eit ordnivådekoder. Dette modulene for dekodering av brøknivå bestemmer globale avhengighet mens ordnivådekoderen bestemmer lokale ordrekkefølgje i eit brøk. For å utføra eit målsetting, dekoderen av brøknivå genererer ein brøkreprezentasjon som inneheld globale informasjon, som ordnivådekoderen derfor brukar som grunnlag for å forhåndsvisa ord i brøket. Eksperimentale resultat viser at våre foreslått dekoder kan betydelig forbedra omsetjingsprogrammet i eit WAT `16 omsetjingsprogrammet på engelsk til japansk.', 'pl': 'Kawałki (lub zwroty) kiedyś odgrywały kluczową rolę w tłumaczeniu maszynowym. Używając fragmentu zamiast słowa jako podstawowej jednostki tłumaczenia, można łatwo modelować lokalne (wewnątrz fragmentu) i globalne (między fragmentem) kolejności i zależności wyrazów. Struktura fragmentów, pomimo jej znaczenia, nie została uwzględniona w dekoderach stosowanych do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT). W niniejszym artykule proponujemy dekodery oparte na fragmentach (NMT), z których każdy składa się z dekodera na poziomie fragmenta i dekodera na poziomie słowa. Dekoder na poziomie chunk modeluje globalne zależności, podczas gdy dekoder na poziomie słowa decyduje o lokalnej kolejności wyrazów w chunk. Aby wyświetlić zdanie docelowe, dekoder na poziomie kawałków generuje reprezentację kawałków zawierającą informacje globalne, którą dekoder na poziomie słów używa następnie jako podstawę do przewidywania słów wewnątrz kawałka. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane przez nas dekodery mogą znacznie poprawić wydajność tłumaczenia w zadaniu tłumaczeniowym WAT `16 z angielskiego na japoński.', 'ta': 'Chunks (or phrases) once played a pivotal role in machine translation.  அடிப்படை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அலகு, உள்ளூர் (intra- chunk) மற்றும் உலக (இட- chunk) வார்த்தை கட்டளைகள் மற்றும் சார்ந்த சார்புகளை மாற்றலாம். புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறியீடுகளில் பாதுகாப்பிடப்படவில்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் (NMT) சார்ந்து அடிப்படையான குறியீடுகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ஒவ்வொரு நிலை குறியீட்டு மற்றும் ஒரு வார் வார்த்தை- மட்டத்தின் குறியீட்டு மாதிரி பொதுவான சார்ந்த சார்புகளை முறைமையாக்கும் போது உள்ளூர் வார்த்தை வர இலக்கு வாக்கியத்தை வெளியீட்டுவதற்கு, பொது வார்த்தையின் நிலையில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகளை முன்வெளியீடு சொல்லும் நிலை குறியீட்டாளர் பொது பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம்முடைய பரிந்துரைய குறியீட்டாளர்கள் WAT `16 ஆங்கிலம்- மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பா', 'ur': 'چنک (یا فریز) ایک بار ماشین ترجمہ میں ایک پئیوٹل رول لگایا۔ ایک کلمه کو بنیادی ترجمہ یونیٹ کے بدلے ایک قطعہ کا استعمال کرنا، محلی (داخل قطعہ) اور گلوبی (داخل قطعہ) کلمه اورڈنسیٹ آسان طریقہ بنا سکتا ہے۔ اس کی اہم بات کے بغیر، چانک ساختار، نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے، دکوڈر میں نظر نہیں کیا گیا۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے (NMT) کے لئے چانک بنیادی ڈیکڈر پیشنهاد کریں، ان میں سے ہر ایک ایک چانک سطح ڈیکڈر اور ایک لفظ سطح ڈیکڈر ہے۔ چانک-سطح ڈیکوڈر موڈل گلوبل اعتبارت کی حالت میں جب کلمات-سطح ڈیکوڈر ایک چانک میں محلی کلمات کے دستور کا فیصلہ کرتا ہے. ایک موجود فیصلہ کے لئے چانک لئویل ڈیکوڈر ایک چانک نمایش پیدا کرتا ہے جو جہالت معلومات میں شامل ہوتی ہے، جسے کلمات لئویل ڈیکوڈر بنا کر استعمال کرتا ہے کہ چانک کے اندر کلمات کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔ Experimental results show that our proposed decoders can significantly improve translation performance in a WAT `16 English-to-Japanese translation task.', 'si': 'මැෂින් වාර්තාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (හෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වුනා. මූලික භාවිත යුනිකයෙන් වචනයක් භාවිත කරන්න, ස්ථානික (intra-Chunk) සහ ලෝකික (inter-Chunk) වචනයක් වචනයක් සහ විශේෂතාවක් ලේසියෙන චැන්ක් ස්ථාපනය, ඒකේ වැදගත් වුනත්, නියුරාල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) වලට භාවිත වෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කර මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා (NMT) වෙනුවෙන් චැන්ක් අධාරිත ඩිකොඩර්, ඒ වගේම හැමෝම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව Name ඉලක්ක වාක්ය ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න, චැන්ක් ලේවල් ඩිකොඩර් ජාතික තොරතුරු තියෙන චැන්ක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, පස්සේ වචන පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත සංකේතකයන්ට WAT `16 ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල ජාපානියා', 'sv': 'Chunks (eller fraser) spelade en gång en avgörande roll i maskinöversättning. Genom att använda en bit snarare än ett ord som grundläggande översättningsenhet kan lokala (intra-chunk) och globala (inter-chunk) ordordningar och beroenden enkelt modelleras. Chunkstrukturen, trots dess betydelse, har inte beaktats i dekodrar som används för neural maskinöversättning (NMT). I denna uppsats föreslår vi chunkbaserade avkodare för (NMT), som var och en består av en chunknivå avkodare och en ordnivå avkodare. Klumpnivåavkodaren modellerar globala beroenden medan ordnivåavkodaren bestämmer den lokala ordordningen i en klump. För att skriva ut en målmening genererar avkodaren på chunknivå en chunkrepresentation som innehåller global information, som avkodaren på ordnivå sedan använder som grund för att förutsäga orden inuti chunken. Experimentella resultat visar att våra föreslagna avkodare avsevärt kan förbättra översättningens prestanda i en WAT `16 engelsk-japansk översättningsuppgift.', 'uz': "Name Name Name Bu qogʻozda biz (NMT) uchun kichkina-asosiy kodlash imkoniyatini talab qilamiz. Bu yerda har bir qancha darajadagi kodlash va so'zning darajasi kodlash usuli bor. The chunk-level decoder models global dependencies while the word-level decoder decides the local word order in a chunk.  Matnni chizish Tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, yaxshi ko'paytuvchilarimiz WAT `16 Ingliz- Yaponchaga tarjima qilish vazifasida tarjima qilishga juda muhimi yaxshi ko'ra oladi.", 'vi': 'Dù đã từng đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong dịch thuật cỗ máy. Bằng cách dùng một dòng thay vì một từ làm đơn vị dịch chuyển cơ bản, bạn có thể thiết lập các lệnh từ nội bộ (nội bộ) và lệnh liên kết (nội bộ) toàn cầu (đoạn tam đoạn) và phụ thuộc. Bộ cấu trúc khối u, dù quan trọng của nó, vẫn chưa được xem xét trong các bộ giải mã dùng cho dịch chuyển máy thần kinh (NMB). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất các bộ giải mã theo khối lượng cho (NMB), mỗi bộ gồm một bộ giải mã cỡ hạt và một bộ giải mã từ. Phần mềm giải mã của khối lượng cho cấu trúc phụ thuộc toàn cầu trong khi phần mã từ cấp quyết định thứ tự trong một mảng. Để xuất một câu lệnh, bộ giải mã khối lượng lớn tạo ra một đại diện khối lượng chứa thông tin to àn cầu, thứ mà mật mã tầng từ dùng sau đó là cơ sở dự đoán từ bên trong khối lập. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng những bộ giải đã được đề nghị có thể cải thiện khả năng dịch chuyển trong một tác phẩm WAT "\'16 tiếng Anh-Nhật.', 'nl': 'Chunks (of zinnen) speelden ooit een cruciale rol in machinevertaling. Door een chunk in plaats van een woord als basisvertaaleenheid te gebruiken, kunnen lokale (intra-chunk) en globale (inter-chunk) woordorders en afhankelijkheden eenvoudig gemodelleerd worden. De chunkstructuur is, ondanks zijn belang, niet in aanmerking genomen in de decoders die worden gebruikt voor neuronale machinevertaling (NMT). In dit artikel stellen we chunk-based decoders voor (NMT), die elk bestaan uit een chunk-level decoder en een woord-level decoder. De decoder op chunk-niveau modelleert globale afhankelijkheden, terwijl de decoder op woordniveau de lokale woordvolgorde in een chunk bepaalt. Om een doelzin uit te voeren, genereert de decoder op chunk-niveau een chunk-representatie met globale informatie, die de decoder op woordniveau vervolgens gebruikt als basis om de woorden in de chunk te voorspellen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde decoders de vertaalprestaties aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren in een WAT `16 Engels-naar-Japans vertaaltaak.', 'da': 'Chunks (eller sætninger) spillede engang en afgørende rolle i maskinoversættelse. Ved at bruge en chunk snarere end et ord som den grundlæggende oversættelsesenhed, kan lokale (intra-chunk) og globale (inter-chunk) ordordrer og afhængigheder nemt modelleres. Chunkstrukturen, trods dens betydning, er ikke blevet taget i betragtning i de dekodere, der anvendes til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT). I denne artikel foreslår vi chunkbaserede dekodere til (NMT), som hver især består af en chunkniveau dekoder og en ordniveau dekoder. Afkoderen på chunkniveau modellerer globale afhængigheder, mens afkoderen på ordniveau bestemmer den lokale ordrækkefølge i en chunk. For at udskrive en målsætning genererer dekoderen på chunkniveau en chunkrepræsentation indeholdende global information, som dekoderen på ordniveau derefter bruger som grundlag for at forudsige ordene inde i chunken. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores foreslåede dekodere kan forbedre oversættelsesevnen betydeligt i en WAT `16 engelsk-japansk oversættelsesopgave.', 'hr': 'Dječci (ili rečenice) jednom su igrali glavnu ulogu u prevodu stroja. Koristivši komad umjesto riječi kao osnovnu prijevoznu jedinicu, lokalne (unutar komada) i globalne (međukomada) riječi i zavisnosti mogu lako modelirati. Struktura komada, uprkos njenoj važnosti, nije razmotrena u dekoderima koji se koriste za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT). U ovom papiru predlažemo na komadu osnovane dekodere za (NMT), svaki od kojih se sastoji od dekodera na razini komada i dekodera na razini riječi. Modeli dekodera na razini komada su globalne ovisnosti dok dekoder na razini riječi odlučuje lokalni red riječi u komadu. Za izvedenje ciljne rečenice, dekoder razine dijela stvara reprezentaciju dijela koja sadrži globalne informacije, koja se dekoder razine riječi onda koristi kao temelj za predviđanje riječi unutar dijela. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi dekoderi mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost prevođenja u zadatku WAT `16 prevođenja engleskog i japanskog jezika.', 'id': 'Bagian (atau frasa) pernah bermain peran penting dalam terjemahan mesin. Dengan menggunakan sepotong daripada kata sebagai unit terjemahan dasar, perintah dan dependensi kata lokal (intra-sepotong) dan global (inter-sepotong) dapat mudah dipodelkan. Struktur potongan, meskipun pentingnya, belum dipertimbangkan dalam dekoder yang digunakan untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan dekoder berbasis potongan untuk (NMT), masing-masing yang terdiri dari dekoder tingkat potongan dan dekoder tingkat kata. Model dekoder tingkat potongan dependensi global sementara dekoder tingkat kata memutuskan urutan kata lokal dalam potongan. To output a target sentence, the chunk-level decoder generates a chunk representation containing global information, which the word-level decoder then uses as a basis to predict the words inside the chunk.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa dekoder kami yang diusulkan dapat meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan secara signifikan dalam tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggris ke Jepang WAT 16.', 'ko': "어구(또는 단어)는 일찍이 기계 번역에서 중요한 역할을 했다.단어가 아닌 블록을 기본 번역 단원으로 사용함으로써 부분(블록 내)과 전역(블록 간) 어순과 관련성을 쉽게 모델링할 수 있다.블록 구조가 중요하지만 신경기계번역(NMT)에 사용되는 디코더에서는 고려하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 블록을 바탕으로 하는 NMT 디코더를 제시했는데 모든 디코더는 블록급 디코더와 워드급 디코더로 구성되었다.블록 디코더는 전역 의존 관계를 시뮬레이션하고, 문자 디코더는 블록의 로컬 글자 순서를 결정합니다.목표 문장을 출력하기 위해 블록 디코더는 전역 정보를 포함하는 블록 표시를 생성한 다음에 단어 디코더는 블록 안의 단어를 예측하는 기초로 사용한다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 디코더는 WAT'16영일 번역 임무의 번역 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다.", 'bg': 'Части (или фрази) някога играят ключова роля в машинния превод. Чрез използването на парче вместо дума като основна единица за превод, локални (вътре-парче) и глобални (междупарче) реда на думи и зависимости могат лесно да бъдат моделирани. Структурата на парчета, въпреки важността си, не е била взета предвид в декодерите, използвани за невронен машинен превод (НМТ). В тази статия предлагаме декодери на базата на парчета (НМТ), всеки от които се състои от декодер на ниво парче и декодер на ниво дума. Декодерът на ниво парче моделира глобалните зависимости, докато декодерът на ниво дума решава локалния ред на думите в парче. За да извлече целево изречение, декодерът на ниво парче генерира представяне на парче, съдържащо глобална информация, която декодерът на ниво дума след това използва като основа за предсказване на думите вътре в парчето. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложените ни декодери могат значително да подобрят ефективността на превода в задача за превод от английски на японски език.', 'de': 'Chunks (oder Phrasen) spielten einst eine zentrale Rolle in der maschinellen Übersetzung. Durch die Verwendung eines Chunks anstatt eines Wortes als grundlegende Übersetzungseinheit können lokale (intra-Chunk) und globale (inter-Chunk) Wortreihen und Abhängigkeiten leicht modelliert werden. Die Chunk-Struktur wurde trotz ihrer Bedeutung in den Decodern für die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) nicht berücksichtigt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir chunk-basierte Decoder für (NMT) vor, die jeweils aus einem chunk-level Decoder und einem word-level Decoder bestehen. Der Decoder auf Chunk-Ebene modelliert globale Abhängigkeiten, während der Decoder auf Wortebene die lokale Wortreihenfolge in einem Chunk bestimmt. Um einen Zielsatz auszugeben, generiert der Decoder auf Chunk-Ebene eine Chunk-Darstellung mit globalen Informationen, die der Decoder auf Wortebene dann als Grundlage verwendet, um die Wörter im Chunk vorherzusagen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen Decoder die Übersetzungsleistung in einer WAT `16 Englisch-Japanisch Übersetzungsaufgabe signifikant verbessern können.', 'af': "Blokke (of frase) het een keer 'n pivotaal rol in masjien vertaling gespeel. Deur 'n blok te gebruik eerder as 'n woord as die basiese vertalingseenheid, plaaslike (intra- blok) en globale (inter- blok) woord ordorde en afhanklikhede kan maklik modelleer word. Die stuk struktuur, veral sy belangrikheid, is nie aangesien in die dekodere wat gebruik word vir neurale masjien vertaling (NMT). In hierdie papier, voorstel ons die blok-gebaseerde dekoders vir (NMT), elkeen van wat bestaan van 'n blok-vlak dekoder en 'n woord-vlak dekoder. Die blok- vlak dekodermodele globale afhanklikhede terwyl die woord- vlak dekoder besluit die plaaslike woord volgorde in 'n blok. Om 'n doel seting uit te voer, genereer die blok- vlak dekoder 'n blok voorstelling wat globaal inligting bevat, wat die woord- vlak dekoder dan gebruik as 'n basis om die woorde binne die blok te voorskou. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde dekodere kan betekeurig verbeter vertaling in 'n WAT `16 Engels-na-Japaanse vertaling taak.", 'sw': 'Mitizo (au maneno) mara moja ilicheza nafasi ya sauti katika tafsiri ya mashine. Kwa kutumia mtazamo badala ya neno kama kitengo cha msingi cha kutafsiri, maeneo ya ndani (ndani ya chunk) na duniani (ndani ya chunk) amri na kutegemea matumaini yanaweza kutengenezwa kirahisi. Mfumo huo, licha ya umuhimu wake, haujachukuliwa katika maeneo yanayotumiwa kwa kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa (NMT). Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mabodi yenye msingi wa chunk kwa (NMT), kila mmoja kati yake ina kodi ya kiwango cha chunk na kupunguza kiwango cha maneno. The chunk-level decoder models global dependencies while the word-level decoder decides the local word order in a chunk.  Ili kutoa hukumu ya lengo, kupunguza kiwango cha ngazi kinatengeneza uwakilishi mkubwa wa taarifa za kimataifa, ambazo kinapungua kiwango cha maneno, kisha inatumia kama msingi wa kutabiri maneno ndani ya chumba. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa decodi zetu zilizopendekezwa wanaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa tafsiri katika kazi ya utafsiri wa WAT `16 ya Kiingereza hadi Japani.', 'sq': 'Pjesat (ose frazat) dikur luajtën një rol kryesor në përkthimin e makinave. Duke përdorur një copë në vend të një fjale si njësi thelbësore përkthimi, urdhërat dhe varësitë e fjalëve lokale (intra-copë) dhe globale (inter-copë) mund të modelohen lehtë. Struktura e copave, pavarësisht rëndësisë së saj, nuk është konsideruar në dekoderët e përdorur për përkthimin e makinës nervore (NMT). Në këtë letër, propozojmë dekoderët me bazë të copave për (NMT), secila prej të cilave përbëhet nga një dekoder me nivel copash dhe një dekoder me nivel fjalësh. Dekoduesi i nivelit të copave modelon varësitë globale ndërsa dekoder i nivelit të fjalëve vendos rendin lokal të fjalëve në copë. To output a target sentence, the chunk-level decoder generates a chunk representation containing global information, which the word-level decoder then uses as a basis to predict the words inside the chunk.  Experimental results show that our proposed decoders can significantly improve translation performance in a WAT `16 English-to-Japanese translation task.', 'tr': 'Balak (ýa sözler) maşynyň terjimesinde bir gezek wajyp roli çapdy. Bir sözüň ýerine bölegi ullanarak, ýerli (intra-bölegi) we dünýädäki söz syýahatlary we bağlyklary a ňsatly modelleşdirilip biler. Balak struktury nähili möhüm bolsada, näral maşynyň terjimesi üçin ullanýan dekoderlerde düşünülmedi. Bu kagyzda, biz bölek tabanly kodçylary (NMT) üçin teklip edýäris. Her biri bölek derejesinde kodçylar we söz derejesinde kodçylar bar. Pak-derejesi dekoderlemek modleri dünýädäki dependencielerden çykarýar Bir maksady sözläni çizdirmek üçin, bu deplek dekoderi dünýäpli maglumat içinde bir parça hasaplanýar, we ol sözlerin içindeki sözleri önlemek üçin bir tabak olarak ullanýar. Aramanyň netijesi biziň teklip eden dekoderlerimiz WAT `16 Iňlis-we Japonça terjime täbliginde has gowurap biljekdigini görkezýär.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ቃላት እና በዓለም (inter-chunk) ትርጉም እና ትርጉም እንዲመስል ቀላል ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ግንኙነት ቢሆን የቆንጆው መሠረት በናውሬል መሣሪያው ትርጓሜ በሚጠቀምበት (NMT) ድምፅ አልተመለሰም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለNMT የተመሳሳይ የኮድዶችን ቀድሞ እና ለቃላት ደረጃ አካባቢ መሆኑን እናሳልቃለን፡፡ አቀማመጥ ቦታ ፈተናው ውጤቶች የደብዳቤዎቻችን የጦማሪክ ግንኙነት በ WAT-16 እንግሊዘኛ-ወደ ጃፓን ትርጉም አድራሻ እንዲያበዛ ያሳያል፡፡', 'fa': 'قطعه\u200cها (یا جمله\u200cها) یک بار نقش بزرگی در ترجمه ماشین بازی کردند. با استفاده از یک قطعه به جای یک کلمه به عنوان واحد اصلی ترجمه، دستورات کلمه محلی (داخل قطعه) و جهانی (بین قطعه) و بستگی\u200cهای جهانی می\u200cتوانند به آسانی راحت ترجمه شوند. ساختار قطعه، با وجود اهمیت آن، در دکوردر\u200cها که برای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی (NMT) استفاده می\u200cشود، به نظر نمی\u200cرسد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که دکور\u200cهای پایه\u200cای برای (NMT) باشد، هر کدام از آن از یک دکور سطح پایه\u200cای و یک دکور سطح کلمه است. مدل\u200cهای دکوردر سطح قطعه\u200cای بستگی جهانی را در حالی که دکوردر سطح کلمات در یک قطعه تصمیم می\u200cگیرد. برای خروج یک جمله هدف، دکور سطح قطعه یک نمایش قطعه را با اطلاعات جهانی تولید می\u200cکند، که دکور سطح کلمات سطح آن\u200cگاه به عنوان بنیادی برای پیش\u200cبینی کلمات داخل قطعه استفاده می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که دکور\u200cکننده\u200cهای پیشنهاد ما می\u200cتوانند عملکرد ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی عملکرد ۱۶ تا ژاپنی در کار ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی WAT.', 'hy': 'Մի անգամ մասերը (կամ արտահայտությունները) մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ կարևոր դեր էին խաղում: Օգտագործելով մի մաս բառի փոխարեն որպես հիմնական թարգմանման միավոր, տեղական (ինտեր-մաս) և գլոբալ (ինտեր-մաս) բառի կարգավորումները և կախվածությունները կարող են հեշտությամբ մոդելավորվել: Չնայած դրա կարևորությանը, կտորի կառուցվածքը չի հաշվի առվել նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) դեկոդերներում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մասերի հիմնված դեկոդերը (NMT), որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը կազմում է մասերի հիմնված դեկոդեր և բառերի հիմնված դեկոդեր: Փոքր մակարդակի դեկոդերը մոդելներ է գլոբալ կախվածություններին, մինչդեռ բառի մակարդակի դեկոդերը որոշում է տեղական բառերի կարգը մի փոքր: Նպատակային նախադասություն արտադրելու համար մասի մակարդակի դեկոդերը ստեղծում է մասի ներկայացում, որը պարունակում է գլոբալ տեղեկատվություն, որը բառի մակարդակի դեկոդերը հետո օգտագործում է որպես հիմք մասի ներսում բառերի կանխատեսելու համար: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած դեկոդերները կարող են նշանակալի բարելավել թարգմանման արդյունքը 16-ի անգլերեն-ճապոներեն թարգմանման գործում:', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে একটি পিভোটাল ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছিল। মৌলিক অনুবাদ ইউনিট হিসেবে একটি শব্দ ব্যবহার করে, স্থানীয় (ইন্টার-চাঙ্ক) এবং বিশ্বব্যাপী শব্দের নির্দেশ ও নির্ভর করা সহজে মডেল করা যাবে। The chunk structure, despite its importance, has not been considered in the decoders used for neural machine translation (NMT).  এই পত্রিকায় আমরা চাঙ্ক ভিত্তিক ডেকোডার (এনএমটি) প্রস্তাব করি, যার মধ্যে প্রত্যেকেই একটি চাঙ্ক-স্তরের ডেকোডার এবং একটি শব্দ-স্তরের শব্দ- স্তরের ডেকোডারের সময় স্থানীয় শব্দের ক্ষেত্রে সিদ্ধান্ত নেয়া হয়েছে। টার্গেটের বাক্য আউটপুট করার জন্য, চাঙ্ক-স্তরের ডিকোডার বিশ্ব তথ্যের মধ্যে একটি চাঙ্কের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করে, যার মধ্যে শব্দ- স্তরের কোড পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ডেকোডারেরা বিশেষ ভাবে অনুবাদের প্রদর্শন করতে পারে ‘১৬ ইংরেজী থেকে জাপানী', 'ca': "Els trossos (o frases) jugaven un cop un paper central en la traducció de màquines. Utilitzant un tros en comptes d'una paraula com a unitat de traducció bàsica, les ordres i dependencies de paraules locals (intra-tros) i globals (inter-tros) poden ser fàcilment modelades. L'estructura de trossos, malgrat la seva importància, no s'ha considerat en els decoders utilitzats per a la traducció neural de màquines (NMT). En aquest paper, proposem decoders basats en trossos per (NMT), cada un dels quals consisteix en un decoder de nivell de trossos i un decoder de nivell de paraules. The chunk-level decoder models global dependencies while the word-level decoder decides the local word order in a chunk.  Per sortir una frase d'objectiu, el decodificador de nivell de trossos genera una representació de trossos que conté informació global, que el decodificador de nivell de paraules utilitza llavors com base per predir les paraules dins del trossos. Els resultats experimentals mostren que els nostres decoders proposats poden millorar significativament el rendiment de la traducció en una tasca de traducció anglès-japonès WAT 16.", 'az': 'Əvvəllər maşın tercüməsində böyük rol oynadılar. Yerli (intra-chunk) və qlobal (inter-chunk) söz əmri və bağlılıqları asanlıqla modelləşdirə bilər. NMT üçün istifadə edilən nöral maşına çevirmək üçün istifadə edilən dekoderlərdə baxmadı. Bu kağızda, NMT üçün parça tabanlı dekoderlər təklif edirik, hər birinin parça seviyyəti dekoderi və söz seviyyəti dekoderidir. Sözlük seviyyəti dekoder modelləri küresel bağlılıqları, sözlər seviyyəti dekoder yerli sözlər düzenini bir parça içində qərar edir. Bir məqsəd cümləsini çıxartmaq üçün, parça səviyyəsi dekoder küresel məlumatları içərisində olan bir parça göstəricisi yaradır. Bu söz səviyyəsi dekoderi daxilində sözləri öndərmək üçün əsas olaraq istifadə edir. Experimental sonuçlarımız təbliğ etdiyimiz dekoderlərimiz WAT `16 İngilizə-Japonca çeviri işində təkrarlama performansını çox yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'cs': 'Úlomky (nebo fráze) kdysi hrály klíčovou roli v strojovém překladu. Použitím kusu spíše než slova jako základní překladové jednotky lze snadno modelovat lokální (intra-kus) a globální (inter-kus) slovní pořadí a závislosti. Struktura chunku, navzdory svému významu, nebyla zohledněna v dekodérech používaných pro neuronový strojový překlad (NMT). V tomto článku navrhujeme dekodéry na bázi kusů (NMT), z nichž každý se skládá z dekodéru úrovně kusů a dekodéru na úrovni slov. Dekodér na úrovni kusů modeluje globální závislosti, zatímco dekodér na úrovni slova rozhoduje o lokálním pořadí slov v kusu. Pro výstup cílové věty vygeneruje dekodér úrovně kusů reprezentaci kusů obsahující globální informace, které dekodér úrovně slova poté použije jako základ pro předpověď slov uvnitř kusu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše navržené dekodéry mohou výrazně zlepšit výkon překladu při WAT `16 anglicko-japonském překladu.', 'bs': 'Dječci (ili fraze) jednom su igrali glavnu ulogu u prevodu mašine. Koristeći komad umjesto riječi kao osnovnu jedinicu prevoda, lokalne (unutrašnjost) i globalne (međukomad) naređenja riječi i zavisnosti mogu lako modelirati. Struktura komada, uprkos njenoj važnosti, nije razmotrena u dekoderima koji se koriste za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT). U ovom papiru predlažemo na komadu osnovane dekodere za (NMT), svaki od kojih se sastoji od dekodera na nivou komada i dekodera na nivou riječi. Modeli dekodera na nivou komada su globalne zavisnosti dok dekoder na nivou riječi odluči lokalni red riječi u komadu. Da bi izašla ciljna rečenica, dekoder nivoa komada stvara reprezentaciju koji sadrži globalne informacije, koju dekoder nivoa riječi onda koristi kao osnovu za predviđanje riječi unutar komada. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi dekoderi mogu značajno poboljšati provedbu prevođenja u zadatku WAT `16 prevođenja engleskog i japanskog jezika.', 'fi': 'Palat (tai lauseet) olivat kerran avainasemassa konekäännöksessä. Käyttämällä käännösyksikkönä sanaa, paikalliset (lohkon sisäiset) ja globaalit (lohkon väliset) sanajärjestykset ja riippuvuudet voidaan helposti mallintaa. Kappalerakennetta ei ole huomioitu neurokonekäännöksessä (NMT) käytetyissä dekoodereissa, vaikka se onkin tärkeä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme lohkopohjaisia dekoodereita (NMT), joista jokainen koostuu lohkopohjaisesta dekooderista ja sanatason dekooderista. Palatason dekooderi mallintaa globaaleja riippuvuuksia, kun taas sanatason dekooderi päättää paikallisen sanajärjestyksen lohkossa. Kohdelauseen tulostamiseksi lohkotason dekooderi luo lohkotason esityksen, joka sisältää maailmanlaajuista tietoa, jota sanatason dekooderi sitten käyttää perustana lohkon sisällä olevien sanojen ennustamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut dekooderimme voivat merkittävästi parantaa käännösten suorituskykyä WAT `16 englannin-japanin käännöstyössä.', 'et': 'Tükid (või fraasid) mängisid kunagi masintõlkes keskset rolli. Kasutades tõlkeüksusena pigem tükki kui sõna, saab lihtsalt modelleerida kohalikke (tükkisiseseid) ja globaalseid (tükkidevahelisi) sõnade järjestusi ja sõltuvusi. Tükkide struktuuri ei ole vaatamata selle tähtsusele arvesse võetud neuromasintõlkes (NMT) kasutatavates dekoodrites. Käesolevas töös pakume välja tükkidel põhinevad dekoodrid (NMT), millest igaüks koosneb tükkide tasemel dekoodrist ja sõnatasemel dekoodrist. Tükitasandi dekooder modelleerib globaalseid sõltuvusi, samas kui sõnatasandi dekooder määrab tüki kohaliku sõnade järjestuse. Sihtlause väljundamiseks loob tükitasandi dekooder tükkide esituse, mis sisaldab globaalset teavet, mida sõnatasandi dekooder seejärel kasutab tüki sees olevate sõnade prognoosimiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud dekoodrid võivad märkimisväärselt parandada tõlketõhusust WAT `16 inglise-jaapani tõlketöös.', 'jv': 'structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness structural navigation Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyata decoder nggawe barang nggawe nggawe (NMT), saben cokoter mulasai decoder nggawe barang kelas kotang lan decoder nggawe barang kelas kuwi. Name Sample rate Rejelongno sing paling nggambar kelas telu nggawe dekorar-paling iso nggambar tarjamahan karo WAT`16 Terjamahan kanggo japon.', 'ha': "Chunks (or phrases) once played a pivotal role in machine translation.  Ina iya amfani da wani zane ko wata kalma kamar shirin fassarar masu bincike, na lokal (intra-Chunkn) da sunayen da ɗabi'a (inter-kick) kan an motsa masu sauƙi. @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa kode-kode-danne ga (NMT), dukansu na ƙunsa da kodi-daraja na yi dubu da wata kalma-daraja. @ action: button Ji fito wani cewa na goa, koda-daraja na danna, ya ƙãga wani mai shirin aiki mai ƙunsa da maɓallin duniya, da kuma ya yi amfani da shi kamar bango ga ya yi gafaka cikin agogon. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa kodi masu buƙata, za su iya kyautata fassarar fassarar da mai girma a cikin aikin WAT `16ki-zuwa-japane.", 'sk': 'Koščki (ali fraze) so nekoč igrali ključno vlogo pri strojnem prevajanju. Z uporabo kosa namesto besede kot osnovne enote prevajanja je mogoče enostavno modelirati lokalne (znotraj kosa) in globalne (med kosi) besedne vrste in odvisnosti. Struktura kosov kljub svojemu pomenu ni bila upoštevana v dekodirjih, ki se uporabljajo za nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT). V tem prispevku predlagamo sprejemnike na osnovi koščkov za (NMT), od katerih je vsak sestavljen iz dekoderja na ravni koščkov in dekoderja na ravni besede. Dekodir na ravni kosov modelira globalne odvisnosti, medtem ko dekodir na ravni besed določa lokalni vrstni red besed v kosu. Če želite izdati ciljni stavek, dekoder na ravni dela ustvari predstavitev dela, ki vsebuje globalne informacije, ki jih dekoder na ravni besede nato uporabi kot osnovo za napoved besed znotraj dela. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naši predlagani dekodirji bistveno izboljšajo učinkovitost prevajanja pri prevajanju WAT `16 angleško-japonsko.', 'he': 'חלקים (או ביטויים) פעם שיחקו תפקיד מפתח בתרגום מכונות. על ידי השימוש בחתיכה במקום מילה כיחידת התרגום הבסיסית, פקודות ומתמודדות מילים מקומיות (בתוך החתיכה) וגלובליות (בין החתיכה) יכולות להיות מודלים בקלות. המבנה של החלקים, למרות חשיבותו, לא נחשב בתיקונים שמשתמשים לתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT). בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים קישוטים מבוססים על חתיכות עבור (NMT), שכל אחד מהם מורכב קישוטים ברמה של חתיכות ומקישוטים ברמה של מילים. הדוגמנים של מפענח רמה חלקית תלויות גלובליות בזמן שהמפענח רמה מילים מחליט את סדר המילים המקומי בחתיכה. כדי להוציא משפט מטרה, מפענח רמה של חתיכות יוצר מייצג חתיכה שמכיל מידע גלובלי, אשר מפענח רמת המילים משתמש אז כבסיס לחזות את המילים בתוך חתיכה. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהמפענחים המוצעים שלנו יכולים לשפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה של התרגום במשימת התרגום של WAT 16 אנגלית ליפנית.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཚན་གཅིག་ནས་མིག་རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་སྤྲོད་ནང་གི་ཚིག་ཆས་གཞན་ཞིག་རྩེ། སྐད་ཆ་འདི་མ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ལས་རྨང་གཞིའི་ཚིག་འདུག འདིའི་གལ་ཆེན་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ཆུང་བའི་དབུས་ཆས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ནང་དུ་འོད་ཀྱང་ཉེན་ཅིག་ཡོད་མེད་པས། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དུས་གཏུང་ཕུད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག ཆུང་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ཐ་སྙད་རིས་ཌོ་ཀྱིས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་གོ་རིམ To output a target sentence, the chunk-level decoder generates a chunk representation containing global information, which the word-level decoder then uses as a basis to predict the words inside the chunk. Experimental results show that our proposed decoders can significantly improve translation performance in a WAT `16 English-to-Japanese translation task.'}
{'en': 'Doubly-Attentive Decoder for Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation', 'es': 'Decodificador doblemente atento para traducción automática neuronal multimodal', 'fr': 'Décodeur à double attention pour la traduction automatique neuronale multimodale', 'ar': 'وحدة فك الترميز المزدوجة للترجمة الآلية العصبية متعددة الوسائط', 'pt': 'Decodificador de dupla atenção para tradução automática neural multimodal', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルニューラルマシン翻訳のためのダブルアテンティブデコーダ', 'zh': '用多模态神经机器翻译重编码器', 'ru': 'Двойной притягательный декодер для мультимодального нейронного машинного перевода', 'hi': 'बहु-मोडल तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए डबली-चौकस विकोडक', 'ga': 'Díchódóir Dúbailte Aireach le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach Ilmhódúil', 'ka': 'Multi modal Neural Machine Translation', 'el': 'Διπλής προσοχής αποκωδικοποιητής για πολυμορφική νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Dupla figyelmes dekódoló multimodális neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'kk': 'Көп модельді неврал машинаның аудармасының екі қатынасыз декодері', 'it': 'Decodificatore doppio attento per traduzione automatica neurale multimodale', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Dvigubai aktyvus daugiarūšio nervinių mašinų vertimo dekoderis', 'ms': 'Pengekod Double-Attentive untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Multi modal', 'ml': 'Multi- modal നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഇരട്ടി ആറ്റെന്റിവ് ഡികോഡെര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Doubly-Attentive Decoder for Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation', 'mn': 'Бид олон моделийн мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах хоёр дахин сонирхолтой шинэчлэгч', 'no': 'Dobbelt attentiv dekoder for fleire modal neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'pl': 'Podwójnie uważny dekoder dla multimodalnego neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Decodor dublu atent pentru traducerea automată neurală multimodală', 'sr': 'Dvostruko pažljiv dekoder za multimodalnu neuronsku prevodu mašine', 'so': 'Double-Attentive Decoder for Multi-modal Neural machine', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මොඩාල් න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය වෙනුවෙන් දෙකක් අවස්ථාවක් සංකේතකය', 'sv': 'Dubbelt uppmärksam avkodare för multimodal neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Multi- modal பாதுகாப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான இரட்டை- Attentive Decoder', 'ur': 'Multi modal Neural Machine Translation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Gấp đôi bộ giải mã cho dịch ngữ thần kinh đa phương', 'bg': 'Двойно внимателен декодер за мултимодален неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Dubbel attente decoder voor multimodale neurale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Dobbelt opmærksom dekoder til multimodal neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Dvostruko pažljiv dekoder za multimodalnu neuronsku prevodu stroja', 'de': 'Doppelt aufmerksamer Decoder für multimodale neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Dekoder Double-Attentive untuk Translation Mesin Neural Multi modal', 'fa': 'Comment', 'ko': '다중모드 신경 기계 번역의 이중 주의 디코더', 'af': 'Double- Attentive Dekoder vir Multimodale Neural Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Dekoduesi i Dyfishtë-Aktiv për Translacionin e Makinës Neurale Multimodale', 'tr': 'Çoklu modal Neural Mazmunlar terjimesi üçin iki görnüş Ködleme', 'sw': 'Doubly-Attentive Decoder for Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation', 'bn': 'বহুমোডাল নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য দ্বিগুণ- আটেন্টিভ ডিকোডার', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Çoxlu modal nöral maşın tercüməsi üçün iki-dikkatli Dekoder', 'bs': 'Dvostruko pažljiv dekoder za multimodalnu neuronsku prevodu mašine', 'ca': 'Double-Attentive Decoder for Multi modal Neural Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Dvojitě pozorný dekodér pro multimodální neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Kahekordselt tähelepanuväärne dekooder mitmeliigilise neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Kaksinkertainen dekooderi multimodaaliseen neurokääntämiseen', 'hy': 'Մոտ-մոդալ նեյրոնային մեքենայի թարգմանման երկու ակտիվ համակարգիչը', 'jv': 'Dublek-Attentive Dekoder kanggo Multi modal Neral Manual Terjamasi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Dvojno pozornost dekoder za večmodalni živčni strojni prevod', 'he': 'מפענח כפול-משיכה לתרגום מכונות נוירות רבות-מודליות', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྡུས་ཐབས་རྩིས་བ་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation model in which a doubly-attentive decoder naturally incorporates spatial visual features obtained using pre-trained convolutional neural networks, bridging the gap between image description and translation. Our decoder learns to attend to source-language words and parts of an image independently by means of two separate attention mechanisms as it generates words in the target language. We find that our model can efficiently exploit not just back-translated in-domain multi-modal data but also large general-domain text-only MT corpora. We also report state-of-the-art results on the Multi30k data set.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا متعدد الوسائط للترجمة الآلية العصبية حيث يشتمل مفكك الشفرة مزدوج الانتباه بشكل طبيعي على الميزات المرئية المكانية التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية المدربة مسبقًا ، مما يسد الفجوة بين وصف الصورة والترجمة. يتعلم مفكك التشفير الخاص بنا الاهتمام بكلمات لغة المصدر وأجزاء من الصورة بشكل مستقل عن طريق آليتين منفصلتين للانتباه حيث أنه يولد الكلمات في اللغة الهدف. وجدنا أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يستغل بكفاءة ليس فقط البيانات متعددة الوسائط داخل النطاق المترجمة رجعيًا ولكن أيضًا مجموعة الترجمة الآلية الكبيرة الحجم للنطاق العام فقط. نقوم أيضًا بالإبلاغ عن أحدث النتائج على مجموعة بيانات Multi30k.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale multimodale dans lequel un décodeur à double attention incorpore naturellement des caractéristiques visuelles spatiales obtenues à l'aide de réseaux neuronaux convolutifs pré-entraînés, comblant ainsi le fossé entre la description d'image et la traduction. Notre décodeur apprend à s'occuper des mots de la langue source et des parties d'une image indépendamment au moyen de deux mécanismes d'attention distincts lorsqu'il génère des mots dans la langue cible. Nous constatons que notre modèle peut exploiter efficacement non seulement des données multimodales dans le domaine traduites en arrière, mais également de grands corpus MT textuels du domaine général uniquement. Nous présentons également des résultats de pointe sur l'ensemble de données Multi30K.", 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo de traducción automática neuronal multimodal en el que un decodificador doblemente atento incorpora de forma natural características visuales espaciales obtenidas mediante redes neuronales convolucionales previamente entrenadas, acortando la brecha entre la descripción de la imagen y la traducción. Nuestro decodificador aprende a atender las palabras del idioma fuente y partes de una imagen de forma independiente por medio de dos mecanismos de atención distintos a medida que genera palabras en el idioma de destino. Descubrimos que nuestro modelo puede explotar de manera eficiente no solo los datos multimodales en el dominio retrotraducidos, sino también los grandes cuerpos de MT de dominio general solo de texto. También informamos de resultados de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos Multi30k.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo de tradução automática neural multimodal no qual um decodificador duplamente atento incorpora naturalmente recursos visuais espaciais obtidos usando redes neurais convolucionais pré-treinadas, preenchendo a lacuna entre a descrição e a tradução da imagem. Nosso decodificador aprende a atender as palavras do idioma de origem e partes de uma imagem de forma independente por meio de dois mecanismos de atenção separados, pois gera palavras no idioma de destino. Descobrimos que nosso modelo pode explorar eficientemente não apenas dados multimodais no domínio traduzidos de volta, mas também grandes corpora MT somente texto de domínio geral. Também relatamos resultados de última geração no conjunto de dados Multi30k.', 'ja': '事前に訓練された畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用して得られた空間的な視覚的特徴をダブルアテンティブデコーダが自然に取り入れ、画像記述と翻訳のギャップを埋めるマルチモーダルニューラルマシン翻訳モデルを紹介します。デコーダは、ターゲット言語で単語を生成するため、2つの別々の注意メカニズムを使用して、ソース言語の単語と画像の一部に独立して対応することを学習します。当社のモデルは、バック翻訳されたドメイン内のマルチモーダルデータだけでなく、大規模な一般ドメインのテキストのみのMTコーラも効率的に利用できることがわかりました。また、最先端の結果をMulti 30 kデータセットで報告します。', 'zh': '引入多模态神经机器翻译,倍注解码器自合卷积神经网络得空视,弥合象译之差。 吾解码器以两机独立处言单词与图像者,以其在言成单词也。 吾观之,非徒可以用反译之域多式数也,又可以用大通用域纯文本MT语料库。 又报有 Multi30k 数集之最新。', 'hi': 'हम एक मल्टी-मोडल न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन मॉडल पेश करते हैं जिसमें एक दोगुना-चौकस डिकोडर स्वाभाविक रूप से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके प्राप्त स्थानिक दृश्य विशेषताओं को शामिल करता है, जो छवि विवरण और अनुवाद के बीच के अंतर को पाटता है। हमारा डिकोडर दो अलग-अलग ध्यान तंत्र के माध्यम से स्वतंत्र रूप से स्रोत-भाषा के शब्दों और एक छवि के कुछ हिस्सों में भाग लेना सीखता है क्योंकि यह लक्ष्य भाषा में शब्द उत्पन्न करता है। हम पाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल कुशलतापूर्वक न केवल बैक-अनूदित इन-डोमेन मल्टी-मोडल डेटा का शोषण कर सकता है, बल्कि बड़े सामान्य-डोमेन टेक्स्ट-केवल एमटी कार्पोरा का भी शोषण कर सकता है। हम Multi30k डेटा सेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणामों की भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं.', 'ru': 'Мы представляем модель мультимодального нейронного машинного перевода, в которой двойственно внимательный декодер естественным образом включает пространственные визуальные признаки, полученные с помощью предварительно обученных сверточных нейронных сетей, устраняя разрыв между описанием изображения и трансляцией. Наш декодер учится самостоятельно обращать внимание на слова и части изображения на исходном языке с помощью двух отдельных механизмов внимания, так как он генерирует слова на целевом языке. Мы обнаружили, что наша модель может эффективно использовать не только переведенные обратно мультимодальные данные в домене, но и крупные текстовые корпуса MT, доступные только для общего домена. Мы также сообщаем о самых современных результатах в наборе данных Multi30k.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach múnla Ilmhódúil Néar-Aistrithe Meaisín ina n-ionchorpraítear go nádúrtha le díchódóir dé-aireach gnéithe spásúla amhairc a fhaightear trí úsáid a bhaint as líonraí néaracha conbhlóideacha réamhoilte, ag líonadh na bearna idir cur síos ar íomhá agus aistriúchán. Foghlaimíonn ár ndíchódóir conas aire a thabhairt do fhocail bhunteanga agus do chodanna d’íomhá go neamhspleách trí dhá mheicníocht aird ar leith de réir mar a ghineann sé focail sa sprioctheanga. Feictear dúinn gur féidir lenár múnla leas a bhaint go héifeachtach, ní hamháin as sonraí ilmhódacha in-fhearainn cúl-aistrithe ach freisin mórchorparáidí MT téacs-fearainn amháin. Tuairiscímid freisin torthaí úrscothacha ar thacar sonraí Multi30k.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალური ნეიროლური მაქსინის განაცვლის მოდელს ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომელიც ორჯერ ატვირთვიური განაცვლელი განაცვლელი მაქსინის მოდელს, რომელიც ნეიროლური განაცვლელი განაცვლელების გამოყენებაში გადაიყ ჩვენი დეკოდირები ისწავლია, რომ სახელის სიტყვების და სურათის ნაწილების მუშაობით განსხვავებული მექანიზმის გამოყენება, როგორც სახელის ენაში სიტყვების შექმნა. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ეფექტიურად შეუძლია გამოყენება არა მხოლოდ მოდელური მონაცემები, მაგრამ მხოლოდ დიდი გენერალური ტექსტი მხოლოდ MT კორპ ჩვენ ასევე შეგვიყვანეთ მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο πολλαπλών τρόπων Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης στο οποίο ένας αποκωδικοποιητής διπλής προσοχής ενσωματώνει φυσικά χωρικά οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά που λαμβάνονται χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένα νευρωνικά δίκτυα, γεφυρώνοντας το χάσμα μεταξύ περιγραφής εικόνας και μετάφρασης. Ο αποκωδικοποιητής μας μαθαίνει να παρακολουθεί τις λέξεις της πηγής και τα μέρη μιας εικόνας ανεξάρτητα μέσω δύο ξεχωριστών μηχανισμών προσοχής καθώς παράγει λέξεις στη γλώσσα-στόχο. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να εκμεταλλευτεί όχι μόνο τα πίσω μεταφρασμένα πολυμορφικά δεδομένα εντός του τομέα, αλλά και τα μεγάλα σώματα ΜΤ γενικού τομέα μόνο για κείμενο. Επίσης, αναφέρουμε τα τελευταία αποτελέσματα για το σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy multimodális neurális fordítási modellt, amelyben egy kétszeresen figyelmes dekóder természetesen magába foglalja az előzetesen képzett convolucionális neurális hálózatok segítségével kapott térbeli vizuális jellemzőket, áthidalva a kép leírása és fordítás közötti szakadékot. Dekódolónk két különálló figyelemmechanizmus segítségével megtanulja önállóan kezelni a forrásnyelvű szavakat és a kép részeit, mivel szavakat generál a célnyelven. Úgy találjuk, hogy modellünk nem csak a visszafordított multimodális adatokat tudja hatékonyan kihasználni, hanem a nagy, általános tartományú szöveges MT corporákat is. A Multi30k adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb eredményeket is jelentjük.', 'it': "Introducemo un modello Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation in cui un decoder doppiamente attento incorpora naturalmente caratteristiche visive spaziali ottenute utilizzando reti neurali convoluzionali pre-addestrate, colmando il divario tra descrizione dell'immagine e traduzione. Il nostro decoder impara a occuparsi autonomamente delle parole della lingua sorgente e di parti di un'immagine attraverso due meccanismi di attenzione separati, generando parole nella lingua di destinazione. Troviamo che il nostro modello può sfruttare in modo efficiente non solo i dati multimodali retrotradotti nel dominio, ma anche i grandi corpora MT solo testuali nel dominio generale. Riportiamo anche risultati all'avanguardia sul set di dati Multi30k.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame daugiarūšį neutralių mašin ų vertimo model į, kuriame dvigubai atsargus dekoderis natūraliai apima erdvinius vaizdinius požymius, gautus naudojant iš anksto parengtus konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus, mažinant nuokrypį tarp vaizdo aprašymo ir vertimo. Our decoder learns to attend to source-language words and parts of an image independently by means of two separate attention mechanisms as it generates words in the target language.  Mes manome, kad mūsų modelis gali veiksmingai panaudoti ne tik atgal vertamus daugiarūšius domeno duomenis, bet ir dideles MT korporas, turinčias tik bendrąjį tekstą. Taip pat pranešame apie naujausius Multi30k duomenų rinkinio rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Біз көп модельді невралды аудару үлгісін келтіреміз. Кескіннің сипаттамасы мен аудармасының арасындағы аралығын бірнеше түрлі невралды желіктерді қолдану үлгісін қолданады. Біздің декодеріміз кескіндің көзі тілдерінің сөздеріне және бөлшектеріне қатынауға үйренеді. Бұл сөздерді мақсатты тілде жасайтын екі бөлшекті механизм арқылы. Біз моделіміздің көп модалдық деректерімізді тек доменде қайта аударылған емес, сондай-ақ үлкен жалпы домендің мәтіні тек MT корпорасы қолдануға болады. Біз сондай-ақ Multi30k деректер жиынының күй- жай нәтижелерін хабарлаймыз.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model Penerjemahan Mesin Neural Multi modal dimana dekoder yang berpengaruh dua kali secara alami memasukkan ciri-ciri visual ruang yang diperoleh menggunakan rangkaian neural konvolusi yang dilatih dahulu, menyambung ruang antara deskripsi imej dan terjemahan. Dekoder kami belajar untuk menghadiri perkataan bahasa-sumber dan bahagian imej secara bebas melalui dua mekanisme perhatian terpisah kerana ia menghasilkan perkataan dalam bahasa sasaran. Kami mendapati bahawa model kami boleh mengeksploitasi secara efisien bukan hanya data multi-modal diterjemahkan kembali dalam domain tetapi juga korpora MT teks-domain umum besar sahaja. Kami juga melaporkan hasil terbaik pada set data Multi30k.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме мултимодален модел за преведување на неврални машини во кој двојно внимателен декодер природно вклучува просторски визуелни карактеристики добиени со користење предобучени конволуционални неврални мрежи, преминувајќи ја празнината помеѓу описот на сликата и преведувањето. Нашиот декодер научи да присуствува на зборовите на изворот-јазик и делови од сликата независно преку два одделни механизми на внимание додека генерира зборови на метниот јазик. We find that our model can efficiently exploit not just back-translated in-domain multi-modal data but also large general-domain text-only MT corpora.  Ние, исто така, известуваме за најновите резултати на мнозинските податоци.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല-മോഡോള്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതില്\u200d രണ്ട് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഡെകോഡിറ്റര്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായി സ്പെയില്\u200d കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു.  നമ്മുടെ ഡെക്കോഡേര്\u200d അറിയുന്നത് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ ഒരു ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകളും ഭാഗങ്ങളും സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി ചേരാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്ന്- ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല-മോഡല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല മിട്ടിട്ട്രിക്ക് ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റില്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട', 'no': 'Vi introduserer eit multimodal neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul der ein dobbelt attentiv dekoder naturleg inkluderer mellomromlige visuelle funksjonar som er fått ved hjelp av føretrainerte konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk og brytar mellomrommet mellom biletsbeskriving og omsetjing. Dekoderen vårt lærer å delta på kjeldespråksord og deler av eit bilete uavhengig ved hjelp av to separate oppmerksmekanisme, slik at det lagar ord i målspråket. Vi finn at vårt modell kan effektivt bruka ikkje berre tilbakeomseta i domene multi modal data, men også stor general-domain text-only MT corpora. Vi rapporterer også tilstanden av kunsten på datasettet Multi30k.', 'mn': 'Бид олон моделийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх загварыг тайлбарлаж, зураг тайлбарлалт болон хөгжүүлэх хоорондын зай хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын зай боловсруулдаг. Бидний зохиолч нь сургалтын эх хэлний үг болон зурагтын хэсгүүдэд хоёр өөр анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм ашиглаж суралцдаг. Бидний загвар нь зөвхөн олон моделийн мэдээллийг эргээд орчуулан ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг бид олж мэднэ. Бид мөн Multi30k өгөгдлийн хэмжээ дээр урлагийн үзүүлэлтийн үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy model multimodalnego neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego, w którym podwójnie uważny dekoder naturalnie zawiera przestrzenne cechy wizualne uzyskane przy użyciu wstępnie wytrenowanych konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych, wypełniając lukę między opisem obrazu a tłumaczeniem. Nasz dekoder uczy się niezależnie obsługiwać słowa języka źródłowego i części obrazu za pomocą dwóch oddzielnych mechanizmów uwagi, ponieważ generuje słowa w języku docelowym. Stwierdzamy, że nasz model może skutecznie wykorzystać nie tylko przetłumaczone wstecznie dane multimodalne w domenie, ale także duże korpusy MT wyłącznie z tekstem ogólnej domeny. Raportujemy również najnowsze wyniki zbioru danych Multi30k.', 'ro': 'Introducem un model Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation, în care un decoder dublu atent încorporează în mod natural caracteristici vizuale spațiale obținute prin intermediul rețelelor neuronale convoluționale pre-instruite, reducând decalajul dintre descrierea imaginii și traducerea. Decodorul nostru învață să participe independent la cuvintele din limba sursă și părți ale unei imagini prin intermediul a două mecanisme separate de atenție, deoarece generează cuvinte în limba țintă. Considerăm că modelul nostru poate exploata în mod eficient nu doar datele multimodale traduse înapoi în domeniu, ci și corporele MT de mari dimensiuni, numai text în domeniu general. De asemenea, raportăm rezultate de ultimă oră pe setul de date Multi30k.', 'so': 'Tusaale tarjumaadda ee maskin badan oo nooc ah, kaas oo labanlaab ka mid ah decoder ayaa dabiicadda ugu qoran kara qaababka muuqashada ah oo lagu isticmaalay shabakado kooxaha ah oo horumarinta ah ee neurada ah, oo kala duduwanaya sawirka sawirka iyo turjumaadda. Qoraalkayaga ayaa baranaya in uu ka qeyb galo hadalka afka afka iyo qeybaha sawirka si xor ah, sababtoo ah uu ku sameeyo hadalka afka goalka ah. Waxaynu ognahay in modellkayagu uu si fiican u isticmaali karo ma aha warqada dib looga turjumay ee gudaha oo kaliya macluumaad kala duduwan, laakiin sidoo kale shirkadda MT oo kaliya. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku ogeysiinaynaa arimaha farshaxanka ee arimaha farshaxanka ah ee kooxda macluumaadka badan.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model multimodalnog neuronskog prevoda mašine u kojem prirodno dvostruko pažljiv dekoder uključuje prostorne vizualne funkcije dobijene koristeći predobučene konvolucione neuralne mreže, prebacujući prazninu između opisa slika i prevoda. Naš dekoder uči da prisustvuje riječima izvornog jezika i dijelovima slike nezavisno putem dva odvojena pažnje mehanizma jer stvara reči na ciljnom jeziku. Našli smo da naš model može efikasno iskoristiti ne samo multimodalne podatke u domenu, nego i velike opšte domene tekstualne MT korpore. Takoðe prijavljujemo rezultate umetnosti o setu podataka Multi30k.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් මෝඩල් න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාපනය මදුල්යෙක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විස්තරයෙන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විස්තරණය සහ වාර්ථාපනය සඳහා  අපේ ඩිකොඩර් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා මුළු භාෂා වචන සහ පින්තූරේ කොටස් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් පින්තූරයෙන් පින්තූරයෙන් ප අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් අපේ මොඩල් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි පසුපසුපසුපසුපසුපසුපසුපසුපසුපස අපි තමයි Multi30k දත්ත සැට වාර්තා කරනවා.', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu mudell ta’ Traduzzjoni Multimodali ta’ Magni Newrali li fih dekoder doppju attenttiv jinkorpora b’mod naturali karatteristiċi viżivi ġeografiċi miksuba bl-użu ta’ netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali mħarrġa minn qabel, li jgħaqqad id-distakk bejn id-deskrizzjoni tal-immaġni u t-traduzzjoni. Id-dekoder tagħna jitgħallem jattendi għal kliem tal-lingwa tas-sors u partijiet ta’ immaġni indipendentement permezz ta’ żewġ mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni separati peress li jiġġenera kliem fil-lingwa fil-mira. Aħna nsibu li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jisfrutta b’mod effiċjenti mhux biss dejta multimodali tradotta lura fid-dominju iżda wkoll korpora MT b’dominju ġenerali kbir biss. Aħna nirrappurtaw ukoll ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar is-sett ta' dejta Multi30k.", 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation modell där en dubbelt uppmärksam avkodare naturligt införlivar rumsliga visuella funktioner som erhållits med hjälp av förutbildade konvulutionella neurala nätverk, vilket överbryggar klyftan mellan bildbeskrivning och översättning. Vår avkodare lär sig att hantera källspråksord och delar av en bild självständigt med hjälp av två separata uppmärksamhetsmekanismer eftersom den genererar ord på målspråket. Vi finner att vår modell effektivt kan utnyttja inte bara bakåtöversatta multimodala data utan även stora textbaserade MT-corpora. Vi rapporterar också toppmoderna resultat på Multi30k datauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட புதிய புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி இருமுறை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரியை உள்ளிடும். இலக்கு மொழியில் வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்கும் மூலம் மொழிகள் மற்றும் பிம்பத்தின் பகுதிகளுக்கும் சேர்க்க கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்க எங்கள் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் - டோமைன் பல- மாதிரி தகவல்களை மீண்டும் மொழிபெயர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளத We also report state-of-the-art results on the Multi30k data set.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک متعدد موڈال نیورال ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جہاں ایک دوگنا اچھا ڈیکوڈر طبیعی طور پر فضائی ویزیولیز ویزیولیز ویزیولیز ویزیولیز ویزیولیز نیورال نیٹورک کے مطابق حاصل کیا گیا ہے، اور تصویر کی توصیف اور ترجمہ کے درمیان فاصل ہمارا ڈاکوڈر سکھاتا ہے کہ ایک تصویر کی سورس زبان کے کلمات اور حصہ کے ذریعہ دو مختلف متوجہ مکانیزوں کے ذریعہ سفارش کرتا ہے جب کہ وہ ہدایت زبان میں کلمات پیدا کرتا ہے۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ہمارا موڈل صرف ڈومین میں پیچھے ترجمہ نہیں کر سکتا مگر بہت بڑی عمومی ڈومین ٹیکسٹ صرف MT کوپرا۔ ہم نے ملٹی 30ک ڈیٹ سٹ پر موقعیت کا نتیجہ بھی گزاری۔', 'uz': "Biz bir necha modal neyural tarjima modelini ishlatamiz, bu modelda ikki marta murakkab ko'paytirish imkoniyatlarini aniqlaydi, bir marta o'rgangan kompyuterning tarmoq tarjimalari yordamida, rasm tahrirlash va tarjima tarjimasining orasidagi gap murojaat qiladi. Bizning ko'paytuvchilarimiz, rasmning qismlariga o'xshash o'rganadi, ikkita alohida foydalanuvchi mechanislarga o'rganadi, chunki u qanday tilda so'zlarni yaratish mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, modelmiz faqat mulomodal maʼlumotga tarjima qilish mumkin, balki butun umumiy-domen matn- faqat MT kompaniyasi juda katta. Biz Multi30k maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi holatning natijasi haqida xabar beramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình lắp máy thần kinh đa phương, trong đó có một bộ giải mã cẩn thận, hiển thị không gian được xác định bằng các mạng thần kinh vận tải được huấn luyện trước, kết nối giữa mô tả ảnh và dịch chuyển. Phần giải mã của chúng tôi học cách sử dụng ngôn ngữ từ cung cấp và phần của ảnh độc lập bằng hai cơ chế tập trung riêng lẻ khi nó tạo ra chữ trong ngôn ngữ đích. Chúng tôi thấy mẫu của chúng tôi có thể khai thác không chỉ dịch lại các dữ liệu đa chiều trong miền, mà còn mạng cơ thể nhanh gọn trên toàn miền. Chúng tôi cũng báo cáo kết quả hiện đại trên bộ dữ liệu đa 30k.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме мултимодален модел на неврален машинен превод, в който двойно внимателен декодер естествено включва пространствени визуални характеристики, получени чрез предварително обучени конволюционни невронни мрежи, преодолявайки разликата между описанието на изображението и превода. Нашият декодер се научава да се грижи за думите на изходния език и части от изображението независимо чрез два отделни механизма за внимание, тъй като генерира думи на целевия език. Откриваме, че нашият модел може ефективно да експлоатира не само обратно преведени в домейн мултимодални данни, но и големи текстови корпуси само в общ домейн. Също така докладваме най-съвременните резултати за набора от данни.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation model, hvor en dobbelt-opmærksom dekoder naturligt inkorporerer rumlige visuelle funktioner opnået ved hjælp af præ-trænede konvulutionelle neurale netværk, der bygger bro mellem billedbeskrivelse og oversættelse. Vores dekoder lærer at behandle kildesprogets ord og dele af et billede uafhængigt ved hjælp af to separate opmærksomhedsmekanismer, da den genererer ord på målsproget. Vi finder ud af, at vores model effektivt kan udnytte ikke blot back-translated in-domæne multimodal data, men også store generelt domæne tekstkun MT corpora. Vi rapporterer også state-of-the-art resultater på Multi30k datasættet.', 'nl': "We introduceren een multimodaal neural machine translation model waarin een dubbel-attente decoder op natuurlijke wijze ruimtelijke visuele kenmerken bevat verkregen met behulp van vooraf getrainde convolutionele neurale netwerken, waardoor de kloof tussen beeldbeschrijving en vertaling wordt overbrugd. Onze decoder leert zelfstandig omgaan met brontaal woorden en delen van een beeld door middel van twee aparte aandachtsmechanismen wanneer het woorden in de doeltaal genereert. We merken dat ons model niet alleen back-vertaalde multimodale data binnen het domein efficiënt kan benutten, maar ook grote MT-corpora's met tekst in het algemeen. Ook rapporteren we state-of-the-art resultaten op de Multi30k dataset.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model multimodalnog neuronskog prevoda strojeva u kojem se prirodno uključuje dvostruko pažljiv dekoder svemirske vizualne funkcije dobijene koristeći predobučene konvolucione neuralne mreže, prebacujući prazninu između opisa i prevoda slika. Naš dekoder uči prisustvovati riječima izvornog jezika i dijelovima slike neovisno putem dva odvojenih mehanizma pažnje jer stvara riječi na ciljnom jeziku. Nalazimo da naš model može učinkovito iskoristiti ne samo multimodalne podatke u domenu, već i velike općeg domena tekstualne MT korpore. Također prijavljujemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti o skupini podataka Multi30.k.', 'de': 'Wir stellen ein multimodales neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell vor, bei dem ein doppelt aufmerksamer Decoder auf natürliche Weise räumliche visuelle Merkmale enthält, die mithilfe von vortrainierten neuronalen Netzen gewonnen werden und die Lücke zwischen Bildbeschreibung und Übersetzung schließt. Unser Decoder lernt mittels zweier getrennter Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen, quellsprachige Wörter und Bildteile unabhängig voneinander zu betrachten, da er Wörter in der Zielsprache generiert. Wir stellen fest, dass unser Modell nicht nur rückübersetzte multimodale Daten in der Domäne effizient nutzen kann, sondern auch große MT-Korpora in der allgemeinen Domäne. Außerdem berichten wir über aktuelle Ergebnisse zum Multi30k Datensatz.', 'ko': '우리는 다중모드적 신경기계 번역 모델을 소개했는데 그 중에서 이중적인 관심을 가진 디코더는 사전에 훈련된 권적신경 네트워크를 사용하여 얻은 공간 시각적 특징을 자연스럽게 결합시켜 이미지 묘사와 번역 간의 차이를 메웠다.우리의 디코더는 목표 언어의 단어를 생성할 때 두 가지 서로 다른 주의 메커니즘을 통해 원시 언어의 단어와 이미지의 일부분을 독립적으로 주목하는 것을 배운다.우리는 우리의 모델이 역내 다중모드 데이터의 반역을 효과적으로 이용할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 대형 통용역 순수 텍스트 기계 번역 어료 라이브러리도 효과적으로 이용할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.또한 Multi30k 데이터 세트의 최신 결과를 보고했습니다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی چندین مدل را معرفی می کنیم که در آن یک دکوردر دو برابر مواظب طبیعی ویژه\u200cهای دیده\u200cای فضایی را با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشود، با تغییر بین توصیف تصویر و ترجمه\u200cها شامل می\u200cشود. دکوردر ما یاد می\u200cگیرد که به کلمات زبان منبع و بخشی از یک تصویر به تنهایی با دو مکانیسم توجه جدا باشد، در حالی که کلمات را در زبان هدف تولید می\u200cکند. ما متوجه می\u200cشویم که مدل ما می\u200cتواند به طور موثر به طور موثر استفاده کند نه تنها داده\u200cهای متعدد مدال در دومین، بلکه همچنین مدل\u200cهای متن ژنرال ژنرال و تنها متن MT را استفاده کند. ما همچنین نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای Multi30k گزارش می\u200cدهیم.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan model Translasi Mesin Neural Multi modal dimana dekoder dua kali perhatian secara alami mengangkut fitur visual ruang yang diperoleh menggunakan jaringan neural konvolusi yang dilatih-dilatih, memecahkan ruang antara deskripsi gambar dan terjemahan. Our decoder learns to attend to source-language words and parts of an image independently by means of two separate attention mechanisms as it generates words in the target language.  Kami menemukan bahwa model kami dapat secara efisien mengeksploitasi tidak hanya data multi modal di domain terjemahan kembali tetapi juga korpora MT besar-domain umum-teks-hanya. Kami juga melaporkan hasil terbaik pada set data Multi30k.', 'sw': 'We introduce a Multi-modal Neural Machine Translation model in which a doubly-attentive decoder naturally incorporates spatial visual features obtained using pre-trained convolutional neural networks, bridging the gap between image description and translation.  Mchoro wetu unajifunza kuhudhuria maneno ya lugha na sehemu ya picha yenyewe huru kwa njia ya mbili tofauti za hisia kama inavyotengeneza maneno katika lugha ya lengo. Tunapata kwamba mifano yetu inaweza kutumia ufanisi sio tu kutafsiriwa kwa kutumia taarifa mbalimbali za ndani lakini pia ni kampuni kubwa ya makampuni ya MT yenye ujumla. Pia tunaripoti matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye seti ya takwimu za takwimu zaidi ya 30.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një model Multi modal Neural Machine Translation në të cilin një dekoder dyfisht i vëmendshëm përfshin natyralisht karakteristika hapësirore vizuale të fituara duke përdorur rrjete konvolutive nervore të paratrajnuara, duke mbuluar dallimin midis përshkrimit të imazhit dhe përkthimit. Dekoduesi ynë mëson të ndjekë fjalët e gjuhës-burim dhe pjesët e një imazhi në mënyrë të pavarur me dy mekanizma të veçanta vëmendjeje ndërsa gjeneron fjalë në gjuhën objektiv. Ne zbulojmë se modeli ynë mund të shfrytëzojë me efektshmëri jo vetëm të dhënat multimodale të përkthyera prapa në domeni, por gjithashtu edhe të mëdha MT korpra e përgjithshme në domeni teksti vetëm. Ne raportojmë gjithashtu rezultatet më të mëdha në grupin e të dhënave Multi30k.', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe modal näral maşynyň terjime modelini tanyşdyrýarys. Bu ýerde çift-attentiw dekoder, görnüş önünde terjime edilen, surat waspy we terjime arasyndaky gaplary bilen birleştirilýär. Biziň dekoderimiz suratyň kelimelerini we böleklerini özbaşdak bir şekilde gatnaşmagyny öwrenýär, sebäbi ol oglan hedef dilinde sözleri döretýän sebäbi iki aýratyn üns meýdançasynda. Bizim modelimiz sadece multi-modal verilerde tercüme edilen şekilde etkileşimli şekilde kullanabilir, ancak büyük umumiy-domen metini de MT korpora etkileyebiliriz. Biz hem Multi30k veri düzeninde hasaplanýarys.', 'am': 'ብዙ-modal ኔural machine ትርጉም ሞዴል እናስጠጋለን፤ በጣቢያ መግለጫ እና ትርጓሜ መካከል የተለየውን የስፓዊ ራእይ ምርጫዎችን በተቀረበ ጥያቄ እና ትርጓሜዎችን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም የሚቃወሙትን ትርጓሜ እና ትርጓሜ እና ትርጓሜ የሚያስፈልገውን የስፍራዊ ዓይነቶች እና ትርጉም የሚያስጨምረው ነው የፊደል ቀዳሚ ቃላት እና ምስል ክፍሎች በተለየ ሁለት የልዩ ትኩረት ምናኮች በተለየ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላትን በመፍጠር ይማራል፡፡ ሞዴላዎቻችን በጥቅም ለመጠቀም እንደሚችል እናገኘዋለን፤ የዶሜን ብዙዎችን-ሞዴል ዳታዎች ብቻ ሳይተረጉም፣ ግን ትልቅ የዶሜን ጽሑፍ ብቻ MT ኮርፖርት ነው፡፡ በMulti30k ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ላይ የሀብት ፍሬዎችን እናስታውሳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի բազմամոդային նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդել, որտեղ երկու անգամ ուշադիր դեկոդերը բնական կերպով ներառում է տարածական տեսողական առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք ստացվում են նախապատրաստված կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցերի օգնությամբ, որոն Մեր դեկոդերը սովորում է անկախ դիտարկել աղբյուր-լեզու բառերը և պատկերի մասերը երկու առանձին ուշադրության մեխանիզմների միջոցով, քանի որ այն ստեղծում է բառեր նպատակային լեզում: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է արդյունավետ օգտագործել ոչ միայն վերադարձ թարգմանված բազմամոդալ տվյալներ, այլ նաև մեծ ընդհանուր բնագավառի միայն տեքստի MT կոպորան: Մենք նաև տեղեկացնում ենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքները Մոլիտրիկյան տվյալների համակարգի մասին:', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu modal nöral maşına çevirmə modelini tanıdırırıq ki, orada iki dəfə dikkatli bir dekoder təbiətli olaraq uzay görüntü fərqli fərqli olaraq, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş konvolucional nöral a ğları vasitəsilə, görüntü tanımlaması və tercümə arasındakı boşluqları birləşd Bizim dekoderimiz məqsəd dilində sözləri və şəkillərin parçalarını təkrar-təkrarla iki ayrı ünsiyyət mehānismi vasitəsilə istifadə edir. Bizim modellərimiz sadəcə çoxlu modal verilər deyil, ancaq böyük nümunə-domeni metinləri ancaq MT korporası istifadə edə bilər. Biz də Multi30k veri qutusu ilə müxtəlif məlumat sonuçlarını bildiririk.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি মাল্টিমোডাল নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল চিহ্নিত করেছি যেখানে দ্বিগুণ-প্রশিক্ষিত ডিকোডার স্বাভাবিকভাবে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে স্পে আমাদের ডেকোডার শিখেছেন সোর্স ভাষার শব্দ এবং একটি ছবির অংশ স্বাধীন অংশে অংশগ্রহণ করার কারণে এটি লক্ষ্য ভাষায় শব্দ তৈরি করে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল কার্যকর ভাবে ব্যবহার করতে পারে কেবল ডোমেইনের মাল্টিমোডাল তথ্যে অনুবাদ করা নয়, কিন্তু সাধারণ-ডোমেইনে আমরা মাল্টি৩০ক ডাটা সেটে রাষ্ট্রের পরিসংবাদ প্রদান করি।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model multimodalnog neuronskog prevoda strojeva u kojem se prirodno uključuje dvostruko pažljiv dekoder svemirskih vizualnih karakteristika koji su dobili koristeći predobučene konvolucione neuralne mreže, prebacujući prazninu između opisa slika i prevoda. Naš dekoder uči da prisustvuje riječima izvornog jezika i dijelovima slike neovisno putem dva odvojenih mehanizma pažnje jer stvara riječi na ciljnom jeziku. Naš model može učinkovito iskoristiti ne samo multimodalne podatke u domenu, već i velike obične domene, samo MT korporacije. Također prijavljujemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti o setu podataka Multi30k.', 'ca': "Introduïm un model de traducció multimodal de màquines neurals en el qual un descodificador doblement atent incorpora naturalment característiques visuals espacials obtenides fent servir xarxes neurals convolucionaris pré-entrenats, ajuntant l'espai entre la descripció de la imatge i la traducció. El nostre decodificador aprene a atendre a paraules de llenguatge de fonts i parts d'una imatge independentment mitjançant dos mecanismes d'atenció separats mentre genera paraules en el llenguatge d'objectiu. Trobem que el nostre model pot explotar eficientment no només dades multimodals retrotraduïdes en domini, sinó també grans corpores MT de domini general només amb text. We also report state-of-the-art results on the Multi30k data set.", 'cs': 'Představujeme multimodální model neuronového strojového překladu, v němž dekodér s dvojitou pozorností přirozeně zahrnuje prostorové vizuální prvky získané pomocí předem trénovaných konvolučních neuronových sítí a překlenuje propast mezi popisem obrazu a překladem. Náš dekodér se naučí věnovat slovům a částem obrazu nezávisle pomocí dvou samostatných mechanismů pozornosti, protože generuje slova v cílovém jazyce. Zjišťujeme, že náš model může efektivně využít nejen zpětně přeložená multimodální data v doméně, ale také velké MT korpusy pouze v obecné doméně. Dále uvádíme nejnovější výsledky datové sady Multi30k.', 'et': 'Tutvustame multimodaalset neuromasintõlke mudelit, kus kahekordselt tähelepanelik dekooder sisaldab loomulikult ruumilisi visuaalseid omadusi, mis on saadud eelnevalt koolitatud konvolutsioonivõrkude abil, ületades lõhe pildi kirjelduse ja tõlkimise vahel. Meie dekooder õpib tegelema lähtekeelsete sõnade ja pildi osadega iseseisvalt kahe eraldi tähelepanumehhanismi abil, sest see genereerib sõnu sihtkeeles. Leiame, et meie mudel suudab tõhusalt ära kasutada mitte ainult tagasitõlgitud domeenisiseseid multimodaalseid andmeid, vaid ka suuri ülddermeeniliseid ainult MT korpuseid. Samuti esitame andmekogumi Multi30k kaasaegsed tulemused.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme multimodaalisen neurokonekäännösmallin, jossa kaksinkertaisen tarkkaavainen dekooderi luonnollisesti sisältää ennalta koulutetuilla konvolutionaalisilla neuroverkoilla saatuja visuaalisia ominaisuuksia, jotka kurottavat umpeen kuvan kuvauksen ja käännöksen välisen kuilun. Dekooderimme oppii käsittelemään lähdekielen sanoja ja kuvan osia itsenäisesti kahden erillisen huomiomekanismin avulla, kun se tuottaa sanoja kohdekielellä. Havaitsemme, että mallimme pystyy tehokkaasti hyödyntämään paitsi takaisinkäännettyä in-domain multimodaalidataa myös suuria yleisteksti-vain MT-korpusia. Raportoimme myös uusimmat tulokset Multi30k-datasarjasta.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n Multimodaal Neurale Masjien Vertaling model waarin 'n dubbelbeeld- aandaglike dekoder natuurlik spasiele visuele funksies ingesluit wat deur voor- opgelei konvolusiele neurale netwerke gebruik word, wat die gap tussen beeldbeskrywing en vertaling gebruik word. Ons dekoder leer om by bron-taal woorde en dele van 'n beeld onafhanklik te gaan deur middel van twee aparte aandag mekanisme, sodat dit woorde in die doel taal genereer word. Ons vind dat ons model effektief kan uitbrei nie net terug-oorselde in-domein multimodale data nie, maar ook groot algemene-domein teks-slegs MT corpora. Ons rapporteer ook status-of-the-art resultate op die Multi30k data stel.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nyenggunaké model Multi modal Neral Manual translation model sing dibenalke-Attentive (decoder) Debian We find that we model can effectly expanit not only back-translation in-domain multi-modal data and again big General-domain text-only MT corora. Awak dhéwé nganggo perusahaan-perusahaan langkung dadi Multi30.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani misãlin tarjiwa na multi-modal na Neural, a cikinsa akwai wata masanin fassarar kwamfyuta ta sau biyu, yana shigar da fassarar masu gani na fassarar da suka motsi da tsarin bakwai masu yin amfani da tunnel na zaman-wa'urar da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma yana samar da gake tsakanin description da fassarar zane. Ana yarda da kwamfyutan ka haɗa maganar-harshe da rabo na zane masu buɗaɗe da ɗayan zane, ko kuma, ya yi amfani da matsayin sauri biyu masu nau'i ko da yake ƙara maganar cikin harshen wanda aka yi amfani da. Tuna gane cewa misalinmu yana iya amfani da shi mai fasahan aiki, ba za'a fassara-multi-modal da aka baka-Domen kawai ba, kuma amma makampuni na MT kawai. Za sami tuna yin bayani ga halin-sanar da ake samun mutane na multi-30.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo multimodalni model nevralnega strojnega prevajanja, v katerem dvojno pozoren dekoder naravno vključuje prostorske vizualne značilnosti, pridobljene z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih konvolucijskih nevralnih omrežij, s čimer premostimo vrzel med opisom slike in prevajanjem. Naš dekoder se nauči samostojno skrbeti za besede v izvornem jeziku in dele slike s pomočjo dveh ločenih mehanizmov pozornosti, saj ustvarja besede v ciljnem jeziku. Ugotavljamo, da lahko naš model učinkovito izkoristi ne le nazaj prevedene multimodalne podatke v domeni, temveč tudi velike splošne besedilne korpuse MT. Poročamo tudi najsodobnejše rezultate podatkovnega nabora Multi30k.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל תרגום של מכונות נוירויות רבות-מודאליות שבה מתקן כפול-תשומת לב מכיל באופן טבעי תכונות ויזואליות שטחיות שנקבלו באמצעות רשתות נוירויות מעורבות מאומנות מראש, לשבור את הפער בין תיאור התמונה לתרגום. הקודר שלנו לומד להשתתף במילים בשפה המקורית וחלקים של תמונה באופן עצמאי באמצעות שתי מכונות תשומת לב נפרדים כאשר הוא יוצר מילים בשפה המטרה. We find that our model can efficiently exploit not just back-translated in-domain multi-modal data but also large general-domain text-only MT corpora.  אנחנו גם מדווחים על התוצאות המיוחדות ביותר על קבוצת הנתונים Multi30k.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་བྱུང་བའི་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་མ་ལག་གླིང་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བཤད་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་མཛུབ་སྤྱོད་ཆས་པ་དེ་ནང་གི་ཐོག་མའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག We find that our model can efficiently exploit not just back-translated in-domain multi-modal data but also large general-domain text-only MT corpora. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་མང་བོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱིས་སྙན་ཞུ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'A Teacher-Student Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'إطار عمل المعلم والطالب للترجمة الآلية العصبية بدون موارد', 'pt': 'Uma estrutura professor-aluno para tradução automática neural de recurso zero', 'fr': 'Un cadre enseignant-étudiant pour la traduction automatique neuronale sans ressource', 'es': 'Un marco de maestro-alumno para la traducción automática neuronal sin recursos', 'ja': 'ゼロリソース神経機械翻訳のための教師と学生のフレームワーク', 'ru': 'Фреймворк для нулевых ресурсов нейронного машинного перевода между преподавателями и учащимися', 'zh': '零资源神经机器翻译师生框架', 'hi': 'शून्य-संसाधन तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक शिक्षक-छात्र फ्रेमवर्क', 'ga': "Creat Múinteoir-Mac Léinn d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-Acmhainne Nialais", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα πλαίσιο δασκάλου-μαθητή για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση μηδενικού πόρου', 'it': 'Un quadro insegnante-studente per la traduzione automatica neurale a risorse zero', 'hu': 'Egy tanár-diák keretrendszer a zéró erőforrás-neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'kk': 'Нөл- ресурс невралды машинаны аудару үшін мұғалім- студенттердің фрейміName', 'lt': 'Mokytojų ir studentų neuralinių mašinų vertimo sistema', 'mk': 'Учителска-студентска рамка за превод на неврални машини со нула ресурси', 'ms': 'A Teacher-Student Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'mt': 'Qafas għalliema-Studenti għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Riżorsi Żero', 'mn': 'Багш нар-оюутнуудын багш нар нь Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation Framework', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണവിഭവങ്ങളുടെ നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ടീച്ചര്\u200d- വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിയ', 'ro': 'Un cadru profesor-student pentru traducerea automată neurală zero-resurse', 'sr': 'Učiteljski i studentski okvir za prevod neuroloških mašina', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Nauczyciel-student ramy dla zerowego neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'sv': 'Ett ramverk för lärare-student för nollresursneural maskinöversättning', 'so': 'A Teacher-Student Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'صفر-رسسوس نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے ایک استاد-استاد فارمورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ phận hỗ trợ học vấn cho máy thần kinh vô tài nguyên', 'da': 'En lærer-studerende ramme for nul-ressource neural maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'Рамка учител-студент за нулев ресурс неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Een leraar-student kader voor zero-resource neurale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Učiteljski i studentski okvir za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'id': 'Sebuah Framework Guru-Murid untuk Perjemahan Mesin Neural Ressource Zero', 'sw': 'Mchoro wa Mlimu-Mwanafunzi wa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiasili', 'tr': 'Zero-Ressurat Nural Makina Çevirmek üçin Mugallym-Okuwçy Framework', 'de': 'Ein Lehrer-Schüler-Framework für ressourcenlose neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': '제로 자원 신경 기계 번역의 사제 프레임워크', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'መምህር-ተማሪ Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine ትርጉም', 'sq': 'Një kuadër mësues-studentësh për përkthimin e makinës nervore zero-burimesh', 'az': 'Qısqa-Ressours Nöral Makina Çeviri üçün Muhəmməd-Öğrenci Framework', 'fa': 'Name', 'bs': 'Učiteljski i studentski okvir za prevod neuroloških mašina nula-resursa', 'hy': 'Ուսուցչի-ուսանողի շրջանակը զրոռեսուրսների նեյրոնային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար', 'ca': 'A Teacher-Student Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Učitelsko-studentský rámec pro nulový neuronový strojový překlad', 'fi': 'Opettaja-oppilas viitekehys nollaresurssin neurokääntämiseen', 'bn': 'জিরো-সম্পদ নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য শিক্ষক- ছাত্র-ছাত্র ফ্রেমার্ক', 'et': 'Õpetaja-õpilase raamistik nullressursiga neuroalse masintõlke jaoks', 'jv': 'Ombudhakan Kamerar-Kamerar kanggo Terjamahan nulo-Resolusi Neral', 'sk': 'Okvir učitelja-študenta za nevronsko strojno prevajanje z ničelnimi viri', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'A Teacher-Student Framework for Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'bo': 'རྨན་གཞུང་གི་མེ་རྩལ་བ་དང་ཤེས་པ་སྨན་པའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གི་ནང་དུ་Zero-Resource Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'While end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress recently, it still suffers from the data scarcity problem for low-resource language pairs and domains. In this paper, we propose a method for zero-resource NMT by assuming that parallel sentences have close probabilities of generating a sentence in a third language. Based on the assumption, our method is able to train a source-to-target NMT model (student) without parallel corpora available guided by an existing pivot-to-target NMT model (teacher) on a source-pivot parallel corpus. Experimental results show that the proposed method significantly improves over a baseline pivot-based model by +3.0 BLEU points across various language pairs.', 'ar': 'بينما حققت الترجمة الآلية العصبية الشاملة (NMT) تقدمًا ملحوظًا مؤخرًا ، إلا أنها لا تزال تعاني من مشكلة ندرة البيانات للأزواج والمجالات اللغوية منخفضة الموارد. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة لـ NMT ذات الموارد الصفرية بافتراض أن الجمل المتوازية لها احتمالات قريبة لتوليد جملة بلغة ثالثة. استنادًا إلى الافتراض ، فإن طريقتنا قادرة على تدريب نموذج NMT من المصدر إلى الهدف ("الطالب") دون توفر مجموعة موازية مسترشدة بنموذج NMT الحالي ("المعلم") على المصدر المحوري الموازي جسم. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة تتحسن بشكل كبير على النموذج الأساسي القائم على المحور المحوري بمقدار +3.0 نقطة BLEU عبر أزواج لغوية مختلفة.', 'es': 'Si bien la traducción automática neuronal de extremo a extremo (NMT) ha hecho progresos notables recientemente, todavía sufre el problema de la escasez de datos para los pares de idiomas y dominios de bajos recursos. En este artículo, proponemos un método para la NMT de cero recursos asumiendo que las oraciones paralelas tienen probabilidades cercanas de generar una oración en un tercer idioma. Basado en la suposición, nuestro método es capaz de entrenar un modelo NMT de origen a destino («estudiante») sin cuerpos paralelos disponibles guiados por un modelo NMT de pivote a objetivo («profesor») existente en un corpus paralelo fuente-pivote. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto mejora significativamente con respecto a un modelo de referencia basado en pivote en +3,0 puntos BLEU en varios pares de idiomas.', 'pt': 'Embora a tradução automática neural de ponta a ponta (NMT) tenha feito progressos notáveis recentemente, ela ainda sofre com o problema de escassez de dados para pares e domínios de idiomas com poucos recursos. Neste artigo, propomos um método para NMT de recursos zero assumindo que sentenças paralelas têm probabilidades próximas de gerar uma sentença em um terceiro idioma. Com base na suposição, nosso método é capaz de treinar um modelo NMT de origem para destino (“estudante”) sem corpora paralelos disponíveis guiado por um modelo NMT de pivô para destino existente (“professor”) em um paralelo de origem-pivot corpus. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto melhora significativamente em relação a um modelo baseado em pivô de linha de base em +3,0 pontos BLEU em vários pares de idiomas.', 'fr': "Alors que la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) de bout en bout a récemment fait des progrès remarquables, elle souffre toujours du problème de pénurie de données pour les paires de langues et les domaines à faibles ressources. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode pour la NMT sans ressource en supposant que les phrases parallèles ont de fortes probabilités de générer une phrase dans une troisième langue. Sur la base de cette hypothèse, notre méthode est capable d'entraîner un modèle NMT source-cible («\xa0étudiant\xa0») sans corpus parallèles disponibles guidés par un modèle NMT pivot à cible existant («\xa0enseignant\xa0») sur un corpus parallèle source-pivot. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée s'améliore de manière significative par rapport à un modèle basé sur pivot de base de +3,0 points BLEU dans différentes paires de langues.", 'ja': 'エンドツーエンドのニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）は最近顕著な進歩を遂げているが、それでも低リソース言語ペアおよびドメインのデータ希少性の問題に苦しんでいる。本稿では、並行文が第三言語で文章を生成する確率が近いと仮定して、ゼロリソースNMTの方法を提案する。この仮定に基づいて、私たちの方法は、ソースピボット並列コーパス上の既存のピボットターゲットNMTモデル（「教師」）に導かれて利用可能な並列コーパスなしで、ソースターゲットNMTモデル（「学習者」）を訓練することができます。実験結果は、提案された方法が、様々な言語ペアにわたって+3.0のBLEUポイントによってベースラインピボットベースモデルよりも大幅に改善されることを示している。', 'zh': '虽端到端神经机器翻译(NMT)近得显进,然犹困于低资源言对和域数稀缺。 本文有零资NMT法,假令并行句有三语生句概率近。 此之设也,吾道得并行于源枢轴之语料库上以练其源到者 NMT(弟子"),而无以见枢轴至 NMT (师)并行语料库。 实验结果表明者,比于基线透视之模形,著于言语之+3.0 BLEU也。', 'hi': 'जबकि एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) ने हाल ही में उल्लेखनीय प्रगति की है, यह अभी भी कम संसाधन भाषा जोड़े और डोमेन के लिए डेटा की कमी की समस्या से ग्रस्त है। इस पेपर में, हम यह मानते हुए शून्य-संसाधन एनएमटी के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं कि समानांतर वाक्यों में तीसरी भाषा में एक वाक्य उत्पन्न करने की करीबी संभावनाएं हैं। धारणा के आधार पर, हमारी विधि एक स्रोत-से-लक्ष्य एनएमटी मॉडल ("छात्र") को प्रशिक्षित करने में सक्षम है, बिना समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट के जो एक स्रोत-पिवट-पिवट समानांतर कॉर्पस पर मौजूदा पिवट-टू-टारगेट एनएमटी मॉडल ("शिक्षक") द्वारा निर्देशित उपलब्ध है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि विभिन्न भाषा जोड़े में +3.0 BLEU बिंदुओं द्वारा एक बेसलाइन पिवट-आधारित मॉडल पर काफी सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'Хотя в последнее время был достигнут значительный прогресс в области сквозного нейронного машинного перевода (NMT), он по-прежнему страдает от проблемы нехватки данных для языковых пар и доменов с низким уровнем ресурсов. В этой статье мы предлагаем метод для нулевого ресурса NMT, предполагая, что параллельные предложения имеют близкую вероятность генерации предложения на третьем языке. Основываясь на предположении, наш метод способен обучать НМТ-модель «источник-цель» («студент») без параллельных тел, доступных под руководством существующей модели НМТ «шарнир-цель» («учитель») на параллельном корпусе «источник- шарнир». Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод значительно улучшается по сравнению с базовой опорной моделью на +3,0 балла БЛЮ для различных языковых пар.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta le déanaí le haistriúchán meaisín néarúil ceann go ceann (NMT), tá sé fós ag fulaingt leis an bhfadhb ganntanas sonraí do phéirí agus d’fhearainn teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh le haghaidh NMT acmhainn nialasach trí ghlacadh leis go bhfuil dóchúlachtaí gara ag abairtí comhthreomhara maidir le habairt a ghiniúint i dtríú teanga. Bunaithe ar an toimhde, tá ár modh in ann múnla NMT foinse-go-sprioc (“mac léinn”) a oiliúint gan corpora comhthreomhar a bheith ar fáil faoi threoir samhail NMT maighdeog-go-sprioc (“múinteoir”) atá ann cheana féin ar chomhthreomhar foinse-pivot. corpas. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go dtagann feabhas suntasach ar an modh atá beartaithe thar mhúnla bonnlíne bunaithe ar mhaighdeog faoi +3.0 pointe BLEU thar péirí teangacha éagsúla.', 'el': 'Ενώ η πλήρης νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση έχει σημειώσει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο πρόσφατα, εξακολουθεί να πάσχει από το πρόβλημα έλλειψης δεδομένων για γλωσσικά ζεύγη και τομείς χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για μηδενικού πόρου υποθέτοντας ότι οι παράλληλες προτάσεις έχουν στενές πιθανότητες δημιουργίας μιας πρότασης σε τρίτη γλώσσα. Με βάση την υπόθεση, η μέθοδος μας είναι σε θέση να εκπαιδεύσει ένα μοντέλο πηγής-στόχου χωρίς παράλληλα σώματα διαθέσιμα με οδηγό ένα υπάρχον μοντέλο στροφής-στόχου σε παράλληλο σώμα πηγής-στροφής. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνεται σημαντικά σε σχέση με ένα μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε στροφή βάσης κατά +3.0 σημεία σε διάφορα γλωσσικά ζεύγη.', 'ka': "ბოლოდან დასრულებული ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) მხოლოდ უკეთესი პროგრესი გავაკეთეთ, მან ისინი უკეთესი მონაცემების პრობლემების მუშაობის პრობლემებ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ჩვენ მინდა ნულ-რესურსის NMT მეტი, რომელიც დავფიქრობთ, რომ პარალელი სიტყვებების შესაძლებლობა წარმოიდგინოთ სიტყვების შექმნა სარმე ენაში. ჩვენი მეთოდი შეუძლებელია გავაგრძნოთ NMT მოდელის გამოყენება ('სტუდენტი') პარალელი კოპორაზე, რომელიც არსებობს პირველ კოპორაზე, რომელიც არსებობს პირველ მისაღებული NMT მოდელის გამოყენება ('სტუდენტი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ მინდომარებული მეთოდი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეთოდი", 'it': 'Mentre la traduzione automatica neurale end-to-end (NMT) ha fatto notevoli progressi recentemente, soffre ancora del problema della scarsità di dati per coppie linguistiche e domini a basso contenuto di risorse. In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo per NMT a risorse zero supponendo che le frasi parallele abbiano probabilità ravvicinate di generare una frase in una terza lingua. Sulla base dell\'ipotesi, il nostro metodo è in grado di formare un modello NMT sorgente-target ("studente") senza corpi paralleli disponibili guidati da un modello NMT pivot-to-target esistente ("insegnante") su un corpus parallelo sorgente-pivot. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto migliora significativamente rispetto a un modello basato su pivot di base di +3,0 punti BLEU in varie coppie linguistiche.', 'hu': 'Míg a végpontok közötti idegi gépi fordítás (NMT) jelentős előrelépést ért el az utóbbi időben, még mindig szenved az alacsony erőforrású nyelvpárok és tartományok adathűségének problémájától. Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk a nulla erőforrású NMT módszerét azzal a feltételezéssel, hogy a párhuzamos mondatoknak nagy valószínűsége van arra, hogy harmadik nyelven hozzanak létre mondatot. A feltételezés alapján módszerünk képes egy forrás-cél NMT modellt ("diákot") képezni olyan párhuzamos korpusz nélkül, amelyet egy meglévő pivot-cél NMT modell ("tanár") vezet egy forrás-pivot párhuzamos korpuszon. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer jelentősen javul egy pivot alapú modellhez képest +3,0 BLEU ponttal a különböző nyelvpárokban.', 'lt': 'Nors pastaruoju metu neurologinis vertimas (NMT) pasiekė nemažai pažangos, jis vis dar susiduria su duomenų trūkumo problema mažai išteklių turinčioms kalbų poroms ir domenams. Šiame dokumente siūlome nulinio išteklio NMT metodą, darant prielaidą, kad lygiagretūs sakiniai turi didelę tikimybę sukelti sakinį trečiąja kalba. Remiantis prielaida, mūsų metodas gali treniruoti NMT model į nuo šaltinio iki tikslo („studentas“) be lygiagrečios korpūros, pagrįstos esamu NMT modeliu nuo krypties iki tikslo („mokytojas“) lygiagrečiu korpusu nuo šaltinio iki krypties. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas, palyginti su pradiniu pagrindiniu modeliu, gerokai pagerėja +3,0 BLEU taško įvairiose kalbų porose.', 'ms': "Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf akhir-akhir (NMT) telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa belakangan ini, ia masih menderita dari masalah kekurangan data untuk pasangan bahasa dan domain sumber rendah. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah untuk NMT sumber sifar dengan menganggap bahawa kalimat selari mempunyai kemungkinan dekat untuk menghasilkan kalimat dalam bahasa ketiga. Based on the assumption, our method is able to train a source-to-target NMT model ('student') without parallel corpora available guided by an existing pivot-to-target NMT model ('teacher') on a source-pivot parallel corpus.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan meningkat secara signifikan atas model asas berasaskan pivot dengan +3.0 titik BLEU di sepanjang pasangan bahasa berbeza.", 'kk': "Невралдық компьютерді аудару (NMT) соңғы уақытта белгілі жұмыс істегенде, оның деректерінің қажеттілігін төмен ресурстар тілдер мен домендердің қажеттік мәселесі болып тұр. Бұл қағазда, NMT- нөл ресурстар үшінші тілде сөзді құру мүмкіндігі бар деп ойлаймыз. Бұл тапсырманың негізінде, NMT үлгісін бағдарламасы бар pivot-to-target NMT үлгісі ('мұғалім') параллель корпорасыз ('студент') бағытталған NMT үлгісі ('мұғалім') көзінің pivot параллелі корпорасына бағытталған Эксперименталдық нәтижелері келтірілген тәсілінің негізгі pivot- негізгі үлгісінен +3", 'mk': 'While end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress recently, it still suffers from the data scarcity problem for low-resource language pairs and domains.  Во овој весник предложуваме метод за НМТ со нула ресурси со претпоставување дека паралелните реченици имаат блиски веројатности да генерираат реченица на трет јазик. Според претпоставката, нашиот метод е во можност да обучува модел од извор до цел НМТ („студент“) без паралелна корпора достапна водена од постоечкиот модел од движење до цел НМТ („учител“) на паралелен корпус од извор до движење. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод значително се подобрува во однос на основниот модел базиран на кругови за +3,0 БЛЕУ поени во различни јазички парови.', 'mt': "Filwaqt li t-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali minn tarf sa tarf (NMT) għamlet progress notevoli dan l-aħħar, xorta ssofri mill-problema tal-iskarsezza tad-dejta għal pari u dominji lingwistiċi b’riżorsi baxxi. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu metodu għal NMT b’riżorsa żero billi nassumu li sentenzi paralleli għandhom probabbiltà mill-qrib li jiġġeneraw sentenza f’lingwa terza. Abbażi tas-suppożizzjoni, il-metodu tagħna huwa kapaċi jħarreġ mudell NMT minn sors għall-mira ('student') mingħajr korpura parallel a disponibbli ggwidata minn mudell NMT minn punt għall-mira eżistenti ('għalliem') fuq korpus parallel minn punt għas-sors. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu propost itejjeb b’mod sinifikanti fuq mudell bażi bbażat fuq il-pivot bi +3.0 punti BLEU f’diversi pari lingwistiċi.", 'ml': "അവസാനം മുതല്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്തുതന്നെ വിശിഷ്ടമായ പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പൂജ്യ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായസ്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മൂന്നാമത്തെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതി ആശയം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള പിവോട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന NMT മോഡല്\u200d ('വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥി') ലഭ്യമല്ലാതെ ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള പി Experimental results show that the proposed method significantly improves over a baseline pivot-based model by +3.0 BLEU points across various language pairs.", 'pl': 'Chociaż kompleksowe tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronowe (NMT) poczyniło ostatnio znaczące postępy, nadal cierpi na problem niedoboru danych dla par językowych i domen o niskich zasobach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę zerowego NMT, zakładając, że zdania równoległe mają bliskie prawdopodobieństwo generowania zdania w trzecim języku. W oparciu o założenie nasza metoda jest w stanie wytrenować model NMT źródło-docelowy ("student") bez dostępnych równoległych korpusów kierowany istniejącym modelem NMT ("nauczyciel") na korpusie równoległym źródło-pivot. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda znacznie poprawia się w porównaniu z modelem bazowym opartym na pivotach o +3.0 punkty BLEU w różnych parach językowych.', 'ro': 'În timp ce traducerea automată neurală end-to-end (NMT) a făcut progrese remarcabile recent, ea suferă încă de problema deficitului de date pentru perechile lingvistice și domeniile cu resurse reduse. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă pentru NMT cu resurse zero, presupunând că propozițiile paralele au probabilități apropiate de a genera o propoziție într-o a treia limbă. Pe baza ipotezei, metoda noastră este capabilă să instruiască un model NMT sursă-țintă ("student") fără corpore paralele disponibile ghidat de un model NMT pivot-țintă existent ("profesor") pe un corpus paralel sursă-pivot. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă se îmbunătățește semnificativ față de un model bazat pe pivot de bază cu +3,0 puncte BLEU în diferite perechi de limbi.', 'sr': 'Iako je neuralni prevod (NMT) nedavno ostvario izvanredan napredak, još uvijek pati od problema sa nedostatkom podataka za parove i domene sa niskim resursima. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu za NMT od nule resurse, pretpostavljajući da paralelne rečenice imaju bliske verovatnosti stvaranja rečenice na trećem jeziku. Na osnovu pretpostavke, naš metod je u mogućnosti trenirati model NMT-a do cilja izvora bez paralelnog korporacije koji je dostupan vodeći postojeći model NMT-a do cilja (nastavnik) na paralelnom korporaciju izvora-pivota. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se predložena metoda značajno poboljšava preko početnog model a na osnovu pivota +3,0 BLEU bodova na raznim jezičkim parovima.', 'mn': "Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) гайхалтай хөгжүүлэлт гарч ирсэн ч энэ нь бага боловсролын хэл болон сүлжээнд мэдээллийн асуудлын бага асуудалтай байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NMT-ийн 0-нөөц боловсруулах арга зааж өгүүлбэр нь гурав хэл дээр өгүүлбэр үүсгэх магадлал ойрхон байх боломжтой гэж бодож байна. Үнэндээ бидний арга нь эх үүсвэрээр зориулсан NMT загварыг ('оюутан') зориулсан параллель корпора боловсруулагдсан NMT загвар ('багш') багш нь эх үүсвэрээр зориулсан параллель корпус дээр хөгжүүлж чадна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь суурь шугам дээр суурь загвар дээр +3.0 BLEU цэгүүдийн олон хэл хоёр цэгүүдийг нэмэгдүүлдэг.", 'no': 'NMT har nyleg lagt merkelige framgang, men det fortsatt har problemet med nedgang i data for låg ressursspråk- par og domene. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein metode for null-ressurs NMT ved å anta at parallelle setningar har nær sannsynligheter for å laga eit setning i ein tredje språk. Basert på assumpsjonen kan vårt metode trene eit NMT-modell for kjelde til mål (student) utan parallell korpora tilgjengeleg ved hjelp av ein eksisterande NMT-modell (lærar) på ein kjeldepivot-parallell korporus. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde metoden betydelig forbedrar over ein baseline pivotbasert modell med +3,0 BLEU-punkt på ulike språkport.', 'sv': 'Även om end-to-end neural maskinöversättning (NMT) har gjort anmärkningsvärda framsteg nyligen, lider den fortfarande av problemet med databrist för språkpar och domäner med låga resurser. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en metod för nollresurs NMT genom att anta att parallella meningar har nära sannolikhet att generera en mening på ett tredje språk. Baserat på antagandet kan vår metod träna en källa-till-mål NMT-modell ("elev") utan parallella korpora tillgängliga vägledda av en befintlig pivot-till-mål NMT-modell ("lärare") på en källa-pivot parallell korpus. Experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna metoden avsevärt förbättras jämfört med en pivot-baserad baslinje med +3,0 BLEU-poäng över olika språkpar.', 'so': "Inta ugu dhowaad ah tarjumaadda maskinenta neurada (NMT) wuxuu sameeyay horumar aad u fiican, haddana waxay dhibaatada dhibaatada dhibaatada dhibaatada qarsoon ee luqada hoose-resource labo iyo domain. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo jeedaynaa qaab aan nooc-resource NMT ku imaanayno, sida aan u malaynayno in erayada isbarbarka ah ay leeyihiin suurtagal ah in uu ku soo dejiyo hadal afka saddexaad. Sida aad u malaynayso, qaabkanagu waa awoodi karaa in uu ku tababariyo nooc-horaadka NMT ('arday') iyadoon shirkad parallel ah la'a an ku hageyn karo model ka mid ah pivot-to-target NMT ('macallin') oo ku qoran koroor-pivot parallel. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaabka lagu soo jeeday uu si weyn ugu beddelo tusaale ahaan ku saleysan pivot-baseline oo lagu qoray +3.0 BLEU goobaha labo kala duduwan oo luuqadaha kala duduwan.", 'ta': "முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவில் புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி (NMT) சமீபத்தில் பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் செய்துள்ளது, அது இன்னும் குறைந்த மூலத்தின இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பூஜ்ஜியமான மூலத்திற்கான NMT முறைமையை நினைவூட்டுகிறோம். இணைய வாக்குகள் மூன்றாம் மொழியில் ஒரு வாக்கியத எண்ணிக்கையை அடிப்படையில், எங்கள் முறைமையாக மூலத்திற்கு NMT மாதிரி ('மாணவர்') பயிற்சி செய்ய முடியும் ('மாணவர்' என்பது மூலம்- பிவாட் இணைப்பு கூட்டத்தில் இருக்கும் பிவாட பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் தெரியும் முறைமையில் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை மேம்படுத்துகிறது என்பது + 3. 0 பிலியு புள்ளிகள் பல மொழி ஜோ", 'si': 'අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් න්\u200dයූරල් යන්ත්\u200dරය භාෂාව (NMT) අනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඒක තාමත් දත්ත අවසානයක් ති මේ පැත්තට, අපි සුන්ධ-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් NMT වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා හිතන්නේ සමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය තුන්වෙනි භ අපේ විධානය පරිස්සම් විදිහට, අපේ විධානය සමහර විදිහට පරිස්සම් සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරාවක් නැති පරිස්සම් විදිහට තියෙන්න පුළුවන් පරිස්සම් විදිහට පිරිස පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නයි ප්\u200dරතිචාර විධානය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dර', 'ur': 'حالانکہ اچھے وقت میں نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) بہت اچھی طرح اضافہ کیا گیا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ ذلیل رسورس زبان جوڑے اور ڈومین کے لئے ڈاٹ کے کمی مشکل سے ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے صفر-منبع NMT کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے، اس کے مطابق یہ سمجھ رہے ہیں کہ parallel sentences have close probabilities of generating a sentence in a third language. فرض پر، ہمارا طریقہ ایسا ہے کہ NMT موڈل (استاد) کو متوجہ کر سکے بغیر parallel corpora کے جو ایک موجود پیوٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ موڈل (استاد) کے ذریعے موجود ہے (استاد) کے ذریعے ایک سروست-پیوٹ parallel corpus پر موجود ہے۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ مختلف زبان جوڑوں میں +3.0 BLEU کے ذریعہ ایک بنسس لین کی بنسس لین کی مدل پر اضافہ ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Keyingi yaqinda yaxshi darajaga tarjima qilingan paytda, bu juda qiziqarli muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rib chiqish mumkin, ammo o o'qindilar uchun juda qisqarli muammolar. Bu qogʻozda, biz null resource NMT usulini rivojlanib, parallel so'zlar uchinchi tillarda bir so'zni yaratish mumkin deb hisoblash mumkin. Hech qanday tasavvur qilish asosida, bizning usuli manba-to-target NMT modeli ('student') bilan parallel kompaniya yordamida mavjud NMT modeli ('tahrirchi') yordamida imkoniyatli boʻlmaydi. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, talab qilingan usul +3. 0 BLEU bilan boshqa tillar qoʻllari bilan asosiy pivot asosidagi modeldan muhimiy yaxshi ko'ra oshadi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù gần đây dịch chuyển thiết bị thần kinh (NMB) đã tiến bộ đáng chú ý, nhưng nó vẫn gặp phải vấn đề về sự khan hiếm dữ liệu cho các cặp ngôn ngữ và miền nhỏ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị phương pháp phát nhạc NMT không tài nguyên bằng cách giả sử rằng câu song song có khả năng gây ra một câu ở ngôn ngữ thứ ba. Dựa trên giả thiết đó, phương pháp của chúng ta có thể huấn luyện một mô hình NMT từ nguồn tới mục tiêu mà không có vật thể song song song song được hướng dẫn bởi một mô hình NMT đã tồn tại tại tại tại tại tại tại trên cơ thể thiên văn học. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp đã được đề nghị cải thiện đáng kể trên mô hình xoay cơ bản theo Chỉ điểm của +3.0 Nhờ có các cặp ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Макар че от край до край невронният машинен превод (НМТ) отбеляза забележителен напредък напоследък, той все още страда от проблема с недостига на данни за езикови двойки и домейни с нисък ресурс. В тази статия предлагаме метод за нулев ресурс НМТ, като приемаме, че паралелните изречения имат близки вероятности за генериране на изречение на трети език. Въз основа на предположението, нашият метод е в състояние да обучи модел източник към цел ("студент") без налични паралелни корпуси, ръководен от съществуващ модел пивот към цел ("учител") върху паралелен корпус източник-пивот. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният метод значително се подобрява спрямо базовия модел, базиран на пивот, с +3.0 точки в различните езикови двойки.', 'da': 'Mens end-to-end neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) har gjort bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt for nylig, lider det stadig af dataknaphed problemet for lav ressource sprogpar og domæner. I denne artikel foreslår vi en metode til nulressource NMT ved at antage, at parallelle sætninger har tæt sandsynlighed for at generere en sætning på et tredje sprog. Baseret på antagelsen er vores metode i stand til at træne en kilde-til-mål NMT model ("elev") uden parallelle korpora tilgængelige styret af en eksisterende pivot-til-mål NMT model ("lærer") på en kilde-pivot parallel korpus. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede metode forbedres betydeligt i forhold til en baseline pivot-baseret model med +3,0 BLEU point på tværs af forskellige sprogpar.', 'de': "Während Ende-zu-Ende-neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) in letzter Zeit bemerkenswerte Fortschritte gemacht hat, leidet sie immer noch unter dem Problem der Datenknappheit für ressourcenarme Sprachpaare und -domänen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Methode für Null-Ressource NMT vor, indem wir annehmen, dass parallele Sätze eine enge Wahrscheinlichkeit haben, einen Satz in einer dritten Sprache zu erzeugen. Basierend auf dieser Annahme ist unsere Methode in der Lage, ein Source-to-Target NMT Modell ('Student') ohne parallele Korpora zu trainieren, die von einem bestehenden Pivot-to-Target NMT Modell ('Teacher') auf einem Source-Pivot Parallelkorpus geleitet werden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass sich die vorgeschlagene Methode gegenüber einem Baseline Pivot-basierten Modell um +3.0 BLEU-Punkte in verschiedenen Sprachpaaren signifikant verbessert.", 'id': "Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf akhir-akhir (NMT) telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa akhir-akhir ini, ia masih menderita dari masalah kekurangan data untuk pasangan dan domain bahasa sumber daya rendah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode untuk NMT sumber daya nol dengan mengasumsikan bahwa kalimat paralel memiliki kemungkinan dekat untuk menghasilkan kalimat dalam bahasa ketiga. Berdasarkan asumsi, metode kami mampu melatih model NMT dari sumber ke sasaran ('siswa') tanpa corpora paralel yang tersedia dipandu oleh model NMT dari pivot ke sasaran yang ada ('guru') pada korpus paralel dari sumber-pivot. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan meningkat secara signifikan atas model basal berdasarkan pivot dengan +3,0 poin BLEU melalui berbagai pasangan bahasa.", 'nl': "Hoewel end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) de laatste tijd opmerkelijke vooruitgang heeft geboekt, lijdt het nog steeds aan het probleem van dataschaarste voor low-resource taalparen en domeinen. In dit artikel stellen we een methode voor zero-resource NMT voor door te veronderstellen dat parallelle zinnen een nauwe kans hebben om een zin in een derde taal te genereren. Op basis van deze veronderstelling is onze methode in staat om een source-to-target NMT model ('student') te trainen zonder parallelle corpora beschikbaar geleid door een bestaand pivot-to-target NMT model ('docent') op een source-pivot parallel corpus. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode significant verbetert ten opzichte van een baseline pivot-gebaseerd model met +3.0 BLEU punten over verschillende taalparen.", 'hr': 'Iako je neuralni prevod (NMT) nedavno ostvario izvanredan napredak, još uvijek pati od problema s nedostatkom podataka za parove i domene s niskim resursima. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu za NMT-a od nule resurse, pretpostavljajući da paralelne rečenice imaju bliske vjerojatnosti stvaranja rečenice na trećem jeziku. Na temelju pretpostavke, naša metoda je u stanju trenirati model NMT-a do cilja izvora bez paralelnog korporacije koje je dostupno vodio postojeći model NMT-a do cilja (učitelj) na paralelnom korporaciju izvora-pivota. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se predložena metoda značajno poboljšava preko početnog model a na temelju pivota +3,0 BLEU bodova u raznim jezičkim parovima.', 'ko': "비록 단말기부터 단말기신경기계번역(NMT)은 최근 몇 년 동안 현저한 진전을 거두었지만, 그것은 여전히 저자원 언어의 대화 분야의 데이터 희소 문제에 직면하고 있다.본고에서 우리는 제로 자원 NMT 방법을 제시했는데 평행문이 제3 언어에서 문장을 생성할 확률이 매우 적다고 가정했다.이러한 가설을 바탕으로 우리의 방법은 평행 자료 라이브러리가 없는 상황에서 원-목표 NMT 모델('학생')을 훈련할 수 있고 원-축 평행 자료 라이브러리에 기존의 축-목표 NMT 모델('교사')의 지도 아래실험 결과 이 방법은 데이텀 축 기반 모델에 비해 서로 다른 언어 쌍에서 3.0개의 BLEU 포인트를 현저하게 높인 것으로 나타났다.", 'af': "Terwyl die einde- na- einde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) onlangs betekende vordering gemaak het, lyf dit nog van die data skandelikheid probleem vir lae- hulpbron taal pare en domeine. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n metode vir nul-hulpbron NMT deur te aanvaar dat parallele setnings naby waarskynlikheid het om 'n seting in 'n derde taal te genereer. Ons metode is in staat om 'n bron na- doel NMT model ('student') te trein sonder parallele korpora beskikbaar wat deur 'n bestaande pivot- to- target NMT model ('teacher') op' n bron- pivot parallele korpora bevestig word. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode betekeurig verbeter oor 'n basisline pivot-gebaseerde model deur +3.0 BLEU-punte oor verskillende taal pare.", 'fa': 'در حالی که ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی (NMT) اخیراً پیشرفت فوق العاده انجام داده است، هنوز از مشکل کمی داده\u200cها برای جفت\u200cهای زبان و دامنه\u200cهای کم منبع رنج می\u200cبرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش برای NMT منبع صفر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با فرض کردن که جمله\u200cهای parallel احتمال نزدیک برای تولید یک جمله در زبان سوم است. بر اساس فرض، روش ما قادر است یک مدل NMT منبع به هدف آموزش دهد بدون شرکت پارالی که در دسترس موجود است، که توسط مدل NMT (معلم) موجود است، در یک شرکت پارالی منبع پیوت است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که روش پیشنهاد بر روی یک مدل بنیادی با +3.0 نقطه\u200cهای بلوپ در جفت زبان مختلف بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "NMT-iň soňunda näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) ýakynda möhüm ýetişiklik ýüze çykaryp barýar, we ol ýene-de daýlaryň azalyk dili çiftleri we sahypalaryň üçin hasaplanjak kynçylygyndan çykarýar. Bu kagyzda, parallel sözleriň üçin bir sözlem üçin ýakyn bir dilde döretmäge mümkinçilik bar diýip NMT üçin bir yöntemi teklip edýäris. Taýýarlyga görä, biziň metodamyz NMT nusgasyna göz öňünde bolan parallel korpus bilen meňzeş pivot-we-hedef NMT nusgasyna ('mugallym') gollanan çeşme nusgasyna çykyp bilýär. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri görkezýär, teklip eden yöntemiň üýtgeden pivot düzümlerniň üstünde +3.0 BLEU dil çiftleri bilen köp görkezilýändigini görkezýär.", 'sq': "Ndërsa përkthimi i makinave nervore nga fundi në fund (NMT) ka bërë përparim të shquar kohët e fundit, ai ende vuan nga problemi i mungesës së të dhënave për çiftet dhe domenat e gjuhës me burime të ulta. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë për NMT me burime zero duke supozuar se fjalët paralele kanë probabilitete të ngushta për të gjeneruar një fjalë në një gjuhë të tretë. Bazuar në supozimin, metoda jonë është në gjendje të trajnojë një model NMT nga burimi në objektiv ('studenti') pa një korpor paralel të disponueshëm udhëhequr nga një model NMT nga pika në objektiv ('mësues') në një korpus paralel burimi-pika. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar përmirësohet ndjeshëm në lidhje me një model bazuar në pikë me +3.0 pikë BLEU nëpër çifte të ndryshme gjuhësh.", 'sw': "Wakati kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa ya mwisho (NMT) imefanya maendeleo ya ajabu hivi karibuni, bado inakabiliwa na tatizo la kutisha data kwa ajili ya wanandoa na maeneo ya asili ya rasilimali. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia ya NMT yenye rasilimali sifuri kwa kudhani kuwa hukumu zilizofanana in a uwezekano wa kutengeneza hukumu kwa lugha ya tatu. Kutokana na dhana hiyo, mbinu yetu inaweza kufundisha muundo wa NMT kwa lengo la NMT ('wanafunzi') bila makampuni yanayoongozwa na muundo wa pivot-kwa-lengo la NMT ('mwalimu') kwenye makampuni yanayofanana na chanzo cha pivot. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu hiyo ilipendekezwa kwa kiasi kikubwa inaboresha zaidi ya muundo wa pivot anayeishi kwenye msingi wa msingi wa msingi na +3.0 BLEU inaonyesha viungo vingi vingi vya lugha tofauti.", 'bn': "যদিও শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সম্প্রতি চমৎকার অগ্রগতি তৈরি করেছে, তবে এটি এখনো কম সম্পদের জোড়া এবং ডোমেইনের জন্য তথ্যের বিপদজনক সমস এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শূন্য-সম্পদ NMT এর জন্য একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি ধারণা করি যে তৃতীয় ভাষায় একটি শাস্তি তৈরি করার সম্ভাবনা ঘনিষ্ঠ। ধারণার ভিত্তিতে আমাদের পদ্ধতি একটি উৎস-থেকে লক্ষ্য করা NMT মডেল ('ছাত্র') প্যারালেল কর্পোরা বিদ্যমান পিভোট থেকে লক্ষ্য করা NMT মডেল ('শিক্ষক') একটি উৎস-পিভোট প্যারালেল কর্ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক পিভোট-ভিত্তিক মডেলের মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প্রদান করা হয়", 'az': "Neyral maşına çevirilməsi (NMT) son zamanlarda çox gözəl tədbir etdiyi halda, hələ də zəif ressurs dillərin və domenaların məlumatların zəif problemlərindən çəkilir. Bu kağızda, Sıfır-ressurs NMT üçün bir metod təklif edirik ki, paralel cümlələr üçüncü dildə cümlənin yaratması üçün yaxın olaraq yaxın olaraq. Tahmin etməyə baxmayaraq, bizim metodumuz mənbə-hədəf NMT modeli ('öyrənən') paralel korpora vasitəsilə mövcud olan pivot-hədəf NMT modeli ('öyrənən') paralel korpora vasitəsilə təhsil edə bilər. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş metodların baz çizgi pivot modeli ilə +3.0 BLEU nöqtələrində müxtəlif dil çiftləri ilə dəyişdirir.", 'am': "While end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress recently, it still suffers from the data scarcity problem for low-resource language pairs and domains.  በዚህ ካላት፣ ለ0-resource NMT ሥርዓት በሦስተኛ ቋንቋ የፍርድ ግንኙነት መፍጠር እንዲችል እናስባለን፡፡ በተመሳሳይ፣ የኢንተርኔት (ተማሪ) ሞዴል (ተማሪ)፣ በተገኘው የpivot-to-target NMT ሞዴል ('አስተማሪ') በተለየ አካላዊ ኮርፖር ላይ ማስተምር ይችላል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች በ+3.0 BLEU በቋንቋዎች ሁለት ዓይነቶች ላይ የተዘጋጀው የጥያቄ ፖትኖት በሚያሳድገው ጥያቄ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡", 'hy': "Մինչդեռ վերջ-վերջ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) վերջերս արել է նշանակալի առաջընթաց, այն դեռևս տառապում է տվյալների բացակայության խնդիրից ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզվի զույգերի և տիեզերների համար: In this paper, we propose a method for zero-resource NMT by assuming that parallel sentences have close probabilities of generating a sentence in a third language.  Հիմնված ենթադրության վրա, մեր մեթոդը կարողանում է վարժեցնել NMT մոդել ('աշակերտ') առանց զուգահեռ կառուցվածքի, որը կառավարվում է գոյություն ունեցող NMT մոդելի ('ուսուցիչ') կողմից զուգահեռ կառուցվածքի վրա: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավում է տարբեր լեզվի զույգերի +3.0 միավորով հիմնական կետին հիմնված մոդելի ընթացքում:", 'ca': "While end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress recently, it still suffers from the data scarcity problem for low-resource language pairs and domains.  In this paper, we propose a method for zero-resource NMT by assuming that parallel sentences have close probabilities of generating a sentence in a third language.  Based on the assumption, our method is able to train a source-to-target NMT model ('student') without parallel corpora available guided by an existing pivot-to-target NMT model ('teacher') on a source-pivot parallel corpus.  Experimental results show that the proposed method significantly improves over a baseline pivot-based model by +3.0 BLEU points across various language pairs.", 'bs': 'Iako je neuralni prevod (NMT) nedavno ostvario izvanredan napredak, još uvijek pati od problema sa nedostatkom podataka za parove i domene s niskim resursima. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu za NMT-a bez resursa, pretpostavljajući da paralelne rečenice imaju bliske verovatnosti stvaranja rečenice na trećem jeziku. Na temelju pretpostavke, naša metoda je u stanju trenirati model NMT-a do cilja izvora bez paralelnog korporacije koji je dostupan vodeći postojeći model NMT-a do cilja (nastavnik) na paralelnom korporaciju izvora-pivota. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se predložena metoda značajno poboljšava preko početnog model a na osnovu pivota +3,0 BLEU bodova na raznim jezičkim parovima.', 'fi': 'Vaikka end-to-end neuron konekäännös (NMT) on edistynyt merkittävästi viime aikoina, se kärsii edelleen tiedon niukkuudesta vähäresurssisten kieliparien ja toimialueiden osalta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme menetelmää nollaresurssin NMT: lle olettamalla, että rinnakkaisilla lauseilla on läheiset todennäköisyydet luoda lause kolmannella kielellä. Oletuksen perusteella menetelmämme pystyy kouluttamaan lähteestä kohteeseen -NMT-mallin ("opiskelija") ilman rinnakkaisia korpusia, joita ohjaa olemassa oleva pivot-to-target NMT-malli ("opettaja") lähde-pivot-rinnakkaiskorpusella. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä paranee merkittävästi perusaikataulun pivot-pohjaiseen malliin verrattuna +3,0 BLEU-pisteellä eri kielipareissa.', 'et': 'Kuigi lõpust otsa-otsa neuraalne masintõlk (NMT) on viimasel ajal saavutanud märkimisväärseid edusamme, kannatab see endiselt vähese ressursiga keelepaaride ja domeenide andmepuuduse probleemi all. Selles töös pakume välja meetodi nullressursiga NMT, eeldades, et paralleelsed laused on lähedased tõenäosused tekitada lause kolmandas keeles. Eelduse põhjal on meie meetod võimeline koolitama allikast sihtmärgini NMT mudelit ("õpilane") ilma olemasolevate paralleelsete korpusteta, juhindudes olemasolevast pivot-sihtmärgini NMT mudelist ("õpetaja") allikast pivot paralleelsel korpusel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod paraneb oluliselt võrreldes algse pivot-põhise mudeliga +3,0 BLEU punkti võrra erinevate keelepaaride puhul.', 'cs': "Zatímco end-to-end neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) v poslední době dosáhl pozoruhodného pokroku, stále trpí problémem nedostatku dat u jazykových párů a domén s nízkými zdroji. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu pro nulový zdroj NMT za předpokladu, že paralelní věty mají velkou pravděpodobnost generování věty ve třetím jazyce. Na základě předpokladu je naše metoda schopna trénovat zdroj-cíl NMT model ('student') bez paralelních korpusů řízených existujícím pivot-to-cíl NMT modelem ('učitel') na paralelním korpusu zdroj-pivot. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda se výrazně zlepšuje oproti základnímu pivotovému modelu o +3,0 BLEU body napříč různými jazykovými páry.", 'sk': 'Čeprav je bil v zadnjem času nevronski strojni prevod od konca do konca izjemen napredek, še vedno trpi zaradi pomanjkanja podatkov za jezikovne pare in domene z nizkimi viri. V tem prispevku predlagamo metodo za NMT z ničelnimi viri, tako da predpostavljamo, da imajo vzporedni stavki zelo verjetno ustvarjanje stavka v tretjem jeziku. Na podlagi predpostavke lahko naša metoda usposablja model NMT od vira do cilja ("učenec") brez razpoložljivih vzporednih korpusov, ki ga vodi obstoječi model NMT od pivot do cilja ("učitelj") na vzporednem korpusu vira-pivot. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da se predlagana metoda znatno izboljša v primerjavi z osnovnim modelom, ki temelji na pivotu, za +3,0 točke BLEU v različnih jezikovnih parih.', 'jv': 'Ora berlak tanggal-tanggal sistem netwarel Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo sistem kanggo NMT rabi-perusahaan bakal terus supoyo supoyo supoyo kapan kuwi kapan sanal kanggo ngilanggar siji-perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan telu. Ngawe Refirment', 'ha': "Waka da fassarar masu ƙari-zuwa-ƙari na aikin neural (NMT) ya sami gari mai girma a farko, sai yana da cũtar ta daga matsalar data masu zartar da nau'i wa nau'in lugha da sauran-resource. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi wa-resource na null-NMT da za'a yi zaton cewa ɗin da ke daidaita, za'a iya ƙara sauri cikin lugha na uku. Basan da zato, metoden mu na iya iya kõre wani misali na-zuwa-goan NMT ('ardayar') bã da shirin parallel wanda ya iya shirya da wani misalin pivot-zuwa-goan NMT ('macalli') a kan wata nau'in-pivot-parallel. Matarin da aka jarraba ya nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata yana mai girma a kan wata misãla-basalin pivot da+3.0 BLEU points kowace duk nau'in harshe biyu.", 'bo': "དང་དུས་མཐུན་མཐའ་མ་ཡུལ་གྱི་མིའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་ཉེ་ཆར འོག Based on the assumption, our method is able to train a source-to-target NMT model ('student') without parallel corpora available guided by an existing pivot-to-target NMT model ('teacher') on a source-pivot parallel corpus. Experimental results show that the proposed method has significantly improved over a baseline pivot-based model by +3.0 BLEU points across language pairs.", 'he': "While end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) has made remarkable progress recently, it still suffers from the data scarcity problem for low-resource language pairs and domains.  In this paper, we propose a method for zero-resource NMT by assuming that parallel sentences have close probabilities of generating a sentence in a third language.  בהתבסס על ההנחה, השיטה שלנו מסוגלת לאמן מודל NMT מקור-למטרה ('סטודנט') ללא גופורה מקבילה זמינה מונח NMT קיום-למטרה ('מורה') על גופוס מקביל-מקור-פנה. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת משתפרת באופן משמעותי במהלך מודל מבוסס על פיבוט בסיסי על ידי +3.0 נקודות BLEU ברחבי זוגות שפות שונים."}
{'en': 'Improved Neural Machine Translation with a Syntax-Aware Encoder and Decoder', 'ar': 'ترجمة آلية عصبية مُحسَّنة باستخدام برنامج تشفير وفك ترميز بناء الجملة', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal mejorada con un codificador y un decodificador con reconocimiento de sintaxis', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural aprimorada com um codificador e decodificador sensível à sintaxe', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale améliorée avec un codeur et un décodeur sensibles à la syntaxe', 'ja': '構文認識エンコーダとデコーダを使用したニューラル機械翻訳の改善', 'hi': 'एक वाक्यविन्यास-जागरूक एन्कोडर और डिकोडर के साथ बेहतर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'zh': '用语法感知编码器和解码器改进神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Улучшенный нейронный машинный перевод с помощью синтаксического кодировщика и декодера', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar Feabhsaithe le Ionchódóir agus Díchódóir Feasach ar Chomhréir', 'ka': 'სინტაქსის გახსნა კოდირებით და დეკოდერებით გაუმუშავებული ნეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელება', 'el': 'Βελτιωμένη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση με έναν κωδικοποιητή και αποκωδικοποιητή που γνωρίζει τη σύνταξη', 'hu': 'Javított idegi gépi fordítás szintaxistudatos kódolóval és dekódolóval', 'it': 'Migliorata la traduzione automatica neurale con un codificatore e decodificatore consapevoli della sintassi', 'lt': 'Geresnis neurologinis mašinų vertimas su sintaksų supratimo kodu ir dekoderiu', 'ms': 'Penerjemahan Mesin Neural Terbaik dengan Pengekod dan Pengekod Awas Sintaks', 'kk': 'Синтаксис- аудару кодтамасы және декодерлерді жақсы түрлендіру', 'mk': 'Подобро преведување на неврални машини со синтаксичен кодер и декодер', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ് അറിയുന്ന എന്\u200dകോഡെരും ഡികോഡെരും കൊണ്ട് മെച്ചന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni mtejba tal-Makkinarju Newrali b’Kodifikatur u Dekodifikatur ta’ Sensibilizzazzjoni bis-Sintax', 'no': 'Forbetra neuromaskinsomsetjing med eit syntaks- vekk- kodar og dekoder', 'pl': 'Ulepszone neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe dzięki koderowi i dekoderowi opartemu na syntaxie', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală îmbunătățită cu un codificator și decodor conștient de sintaxă', 'mn': 'Синтаксис-Aware Encoder болон Үйлдүүлэгч', 'si': 'සින්ටැක්ස් අවස්ථාවක් සහ ඩිකොඩර් සමඟ ප්\u200dරවෘති න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය', 'sr': 'Poboljšan neurološki prevod sa koderom i dekoderom.', 'so': 'Turjumista afgembiga Neural machine with a Syntax-Known Encoder and Decoder', 'sv': 'Förbättrad neural maskinöversättning med en syntaxmedveten kodare och avkodare', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سینٹکس-Aware اکڈر اور ڈیکوڈر کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ اچھی طرح کی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch sang hình thần kinh cải tạo bằng bộ mã hóa phát âm.', 'bg': 'Подобрен неврален машинен превод с кодер и декодер, осъзнаващ синтаксиса', 'nl': 'Verbeterde neuronale machinevertaling met een syntax-bewuste encoder en decoder', 'hr': 'Poboljšan neuronski prevod s koderom i dekoderom', 'da': 'Forbedret Neural Machine Translation med en Syntax-Aware Encoder og dekoder', 'de': 'Verbesserte neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit einem syntaxbasierten Encoder und Decoder', 'id': 'Perbaikan Translation Mesin Neural dengan Koder dan Dekoder Sintaks-Aware', 'ko': '문법 감지 인코더와 디코더를 사용하여 신경 번역 개선', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی با یک رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی آگاهی سینتکس و dekoder بهتر شده', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kijerumani imeboreshwa na Mtandao wa Kikundi', 'af': "Geverbeterde Neurale Masjien Vertaling met 'n Sintaks- Aware Enkoder en Dekoder", 'tr': 'Gelişmiş Nural Maşynyň Sintaks-Taýýarlama Ködlemeleri we Dekodeýji bilen terjime', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i përmirësuar i Makinës Neurale me koduesin dhe dekoderin e Sintaksës', 'az': 'Sintaks-Aware Kodlay캼c캼 v톛 Dekodlay캼c캼 il톛 N칬ral Makinel톛rin Terc칲m톛si', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի բարելավված թարգմանությունը սինտաքսի գիտակցությամբ կոդերով և կոդերով', 'ca': 'millorar la traducció de màquines neuronals amb un codificador i descodificador de consciència de sintaxis', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাক্স- পরিচিত এনকোডার এবং ডিকোডারের সাথে উন্নত নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Poboljšan neurološki prevod sa koderom i dekoderom.', 'cs': 'Vylepšený neuronový strojový překlad pomocí syntaxově orientovaného kódéru a dekodéru', 'et': 'Täiustatud neuroaalne masintõlge süntaksiteadliku kodeeri ja dekooderiga', 'fi': 'Parannettu neurokonekäännös synteettistä koodausta ja dekooderia käyttäen', 'jv': 'Ngubah Batir Manculin Nyural Terjamahan karo akeh Senaksi-Awar lan Dekoder', 'he': 'שיפור התרגום של מכונת עצבית עם קודד ודוקוד מודע לסינטקס', 'sk': 'Izboljšan nevralni strojni prevod s kodirnikom in dekodirnikom', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Improved Neural Machine Translation with a Syntax-Aware Encoder and Decoder'}
{'en': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information. In this paper, we improve this model by explicitly incorporating source-side syntactic trees. More specifically, we propose (1) a bidirectional tree encoder which learns both sequential and tree structured representations ; (2) a tree-coverage model that lets the attention depend on the source-side syntax. Experiments on Chinese-English translation demonstrate that our proposed models outperform the sequential attentional model as well as a stronger baseline with a bottom-up tree encoder and word coverage.', 'ar': 'تعتمد معظم نماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) على إطار عمل وحدة فك التشفير المتسلسل ، والذي لا يستخدم المعلومات النحوية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتحسين هذا النموذج من خلال دمج الأشجار النحوية من جانب المصدر بشكل صريح. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نقترح (1) مشفر شجرة ثنائي الاتجاه يتعلم التمثيلات المتسلسلة والمنظمة على شكل شجرة ؛ (2) نموذج تغطية شجرة يسمح للانتباه بالاعتماد على بناء جملة جانب المصدر. توضح التجارب على الترجمة الصينية-الإنجليزية أن نماذجنا المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على نموذج الانتباه المتسلسل بالإضافة إلى خط أساس أقوى مع تشفير الشجرة من أسفل إلى أعلى وتغطية الكلمات.', 'fr': "La plupart des modèles de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) sont basés sur le cadre encodeur-décodeur séquentiel, qui n'utilise aucune information syntaxique. Dans cet article, nous améliorons ce modèle en incorporant explicitement des arbres syntaxiques côté source. Plus spécifiquement, nous proposons (1) un encodeur d'arbre bidirectionnel qui apprend à la fois les représentations séquentielles et structurées en arborescence\xa0; (2) un modèle de couverture d'arbre qui laisse l'attention dépendre de la syntaxe côté source. Les expériences de traduction chinois-anglais démontrent que les modèles que nous proposons surpassent le modèle attentionnel séquentiel ainsi qu'une base de référence plus solide avec un encodeur d'arbre ascendant et une couverture de mots.", 'es': 'La mayoría de los modelos de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) se basan en el marco de codificador-decodificador secuencial, que no utiliza información sintáctica. En este artículo, mejoramos este modelo mediante la incorporación explícita de árboles sintácticos del lado de la fuente. Más específicamente, proponemos (1) un codificador de árbol bidireccional que aprende representaciones secuenciales y estructuradas en árbol; (2) un modelo de cobertura de árbol que permite que la atención dependa de la sintaxis del lado de la fuente. Los experimentos de traducción chino-inglés demuestran que nuestros modelos propuestos superan al modelo de atención secuencial, así como una línea de base más sólida con un codificador de árbol ascendente y cobertura de palabras.', 'pt': 'A maioria dos modelos de tradução automática neural (NMT) é baseada na estrutura codificador-decodificador sequencial, que não faz uso de informações sintáticas. Neste artigo, aprimoramos esse modelo incorporando explicitamente árvores sintáticas do lado da fonte. Mais especificamente, propomos (1) um codificador de árvore bidirecional que aprende representações sequenciais e estruturadas em árvore; (2) um modelo de cobertura de árvore que deixa a atenção depender da sintaxe do lado da fonte. Experimentos na tradução chinês-inglês demonstram que nossos modelos propostos superam o modelo de atenção sequencial, bem como uma linha de base mais forte com um codificador de árvore de baixo para cima e cobertura de palavras.', 'ja': 'ほとんどのニューラル機械翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）モデルは、構文情報を使用しない逐次的エンコーダデコーダフレームワークに基づいている。本稿では、ソース側の構文木を明示的に取り入れることで、このモデルを改善する。より具体的には、(1)シーケンシャル表現とツリー構造表現の両方を学習する双方向ツリーエンコーダ、(2)ソース側の構文に注意を向けさせるツリーカバレッジモデルを提案します。中国語と英語の翻訳に関する実験は、ボトムアップツリーエンコーダと単語カバレッジを備えたより強力なベースラインだけでなく、シーケンシャルアテンダントモデルよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'hi': 'अधिकांश तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मॉडल अनुक्रमिक एनकोडर-डिकोडर ढांचे पर आधारित होते हैं, जो वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का कोई उपयोग नहीं करता है। इस पेपर में, हम स्पष्ट रूप से स्रोत-साइड वाक्यात्मक पेड़ों को शामिल करके इस मॉडल में सुधार करते हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम (1) एक द्विदिश पेड़ एन्कोडर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अनुक्रमिक और पेड़ संरचित प्रतिनिधित्व दोनों को सीखता है; (2) एक ट्री-कवरेज मॉडल जो ध्यान को स्रोत-साइड सिंटैक्स पर निर्भर करने देता है। चीनी-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल अनुक्रमिक चौकस मॉडल के साथ-साथ नीचे-ऊपर पेड़ एन्कोडर और शब्द कवरेज के साथ एक मजबूत आधार रेखा से आगे निकलते हैं।', 'zh': '大抵神经机器翻译(NMT)模皆次编码器 - 解码器框架,当框架不用句法信。 本文,因显式并源端语法树来改入此模。 更具体地说,(1)双向树编码器,可以学次第结构。 (2) 树覆模,令注意依源端语法。 中英译实验明,优于次第,而有自下而上之树编码器单词覆盖率之基线。', 'ru': 'Большинство моделей нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) основаны на последовательном фреймворке кодировщик-декодер, который не использует синтаксическую информацию. В этой статье мы улучшаем эту модель, явно включая синтаксические деревья на стороне источника. Более конкретно, мы предлагаем (1) двунаправленный древовидный кодер, который изучает как последовательные, так и древовидные структурированные представления; (2) модель охвата деревьев, которая позволяет вниманию зависеть от синтаксиса на стороне источника. Эксперименты с китайско-английским переводом показывают, что наши предлагаемые модели превосходят последовательную модель внимания, а также более сильную базовую линию с восходящим кодером дерева и охватом слов.', 'ga': 'Tá an chuid is mó de na samhlacha néar-aistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) bunaithe ar an gcreat ionchódóra-díchódóra seicheamhach, nach mbaineann aon úsáid as faisnéis chomhréire. Sa pháipéar seo, feabhsaítear an tsamhail seo trí chrainn chomhréire ar thaobh an fhoinse a ionchorprú go sainráite. Go sonrach, molaimid (1) ionchódóir crann déthreoch a fhoghlaimíonn uiríll struchtúrtha seicheamhach agus crann; (2) múnla clúdach crann a ligeann an aird ag brath ar an chomhréir foinse-taobh. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar aistriúchán Sínis-Béarla go sáraíonn ár múnlaí molta an tsamhail aird sheicheamhach chomh maith le bonnlíne níos láidre le hionchódóir crann ón mbun aníos agus clúdach focal.', 'hu': 'A legtöbb neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) modell a szekvenciális kódoló-dekóder keretrendszeren alapul, amely nem használ szintaktikus információkat. Ebben a tanulmányban javítjuk ezt a modellt a forrás oldali szintaktikus fák kifejezetten beépítésével. Pontosabban javasoljuk (1) egy kétirányú fa kódolót, amely megtanulja mind a szekvenciális, mind a fa strukturált ábrázolásokat; (2) egy fa-fedettségi modell, amely lehetővé teszi, hogy a figyelem a forrás oldali szintaxistól függjen. A kínai-angol fordítással kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modelleink felülmúlják a szekvenciális figyelem modelljét, valamint egy erősebb alapvonalat alulról felfelé irányuló fa kódolóval és szólefedettséggel.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი ნეიროლური მაქსინის გარგუმარება (NMT) მოდელები სკენტიური კოდენტიკური კოდენტიკური ფრამეტზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც სინტაქტიკური ინფორმაციის გამო ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ამ მოდელს გავაკეთებთ გამოსახულებელად სინტაქტიკური ხელებით. უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ (1) დავიწყებთ ბედირექციონალური ხე კოდირები, რომელიც სწავლის სკენექციონალური და ხე სტრუქტურული გამოსახულებები; Name ჩინეთი-ანგლისური თარგუმენობის გამოცდილებების გამოცდილება გამოცდილობს, რომ ჩვენი მოდელები გავაკეთებენ სკენტიური მოდელს და უფრო ძალიან ფესტიური ფესტიური ფესტიური ფესტი,', 'el': 'Τα περισσότερα μοντέλα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) βασίζονται στο πλαίσιο διαδοχικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή, το οποίο δεν χρησιμοποιεί συντακτικές πληροφορίες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, βελτιώνουμε αυτό το μοντέλο ενσωματώνοντας ρητά συντακτικά δέντρα στην πλευρά της πηγής. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε (1) έναν αμφίδρομο κωδικοποιητή δέντρου που μαθαίνει τόσο διαδοχικές όσο και δομημένες αναπαραστάσεις δέντρου. (2) ένα μοντέλο κάλυψης δέντρου που επιτρέπει την προσοχή να εξαρτάται από τη σύνταξη της πλευράς προέλευσης. Τα πειράματα στην κινεζική-αγγλική μετάφραση δείχνουν ότι τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα μας ξεπερνούν το διαδοχικό μοντέλο προσοχής καθώς και μια ισχυρότερη βάση με έναν κωδικοποιητή δέντρου από κάτω προς τα πάνω και κάλυψη λέξεων.', 'it': "La maggior parte dei modelli di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) si basa sul framework sequenziale encoder-decoder, che non fa uso di informazioni sintattiche. In questo articolo, miglioriamo questo modello incorporando esplicitamente alberi sintattici lato sorgente. Nello specifico, proponiamo (1) un codificatore ad albero bidirezionale che apprende sia rappresentazioni sequenziali che strutturate ad albero; (2) un modello di copertura ad albero che permette all'attenzione di dipendere dalla sintassi lato sorgente. Esperimenti sulla traduzione cinese-inglese dimostrano che i nostri modelli proposti superano il modello di attenzione sequenziale e una linea di base più forte con un codificatore ad albero bottom-up e copertura delle parole.", 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің көпшілігі (NMT) үлгілері синтактикалық мәліметті қолданбайтын кодер- декодер қоршауына негізделген. Бұл қағазда, бұл моделі көзінің синтактикалық ағаштарды таңдау арқылы жақсартық. Ең дұрыс, біз (1) дегенді бұтақ кодерін ұсынамыз. Бұл келесі және ағаш құрылған түрінде екеуін оқып береді. (2) Бұтақ мұқабатының үлгісі көзінің синтаксисіне тәуелді. Қытай-ағылшын аудармасының тәжірибелері көрсетілген үлгілеріміздің келесі тәжірибе үлгілерін және төмендегі ағаш кодері мен сөздердің аудармасының күшті негізгі сызығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Dauguma nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) modelių grindžiami sekaciniu kodavimo ir dekoderio pagrindu, kuriame nenaudojama sintaktinės informacijos. In this paper, we improve this model by explicitly incorporating source-side syntactic trees.  Konkrečiau siūlome (1) dvikryptį medžio kodatorių, kuris mokytų tiek sekacinius, tiek struktūrinius medžio atvaizdus; (2) medienos aprėpties modelis, leidžiantis atkreipti dėmesį, priklauso nuo šaltinio sintakso. Kinijos ir anglų vertimo eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi modeliai yra didesni už sekacinį dėmesio model į, taip pat stipresnę bazę su iš apačios į viršų esančiu medžio kodatoriumi ir žodžių aprėptimi.', 'mk': 'Повеќето модели за нервен машински превод (NMT) се базирани на секвенцијалната рамка за кодер- декодер, која не користи синтактички информации. Во оваа хартија, го подобруваме овој модел со експлицитно вклучување на синтактичките дрвја од страната на изворот. More specifically, we propose (1) a bidirectional tree encoder which learns both sequential and tree structured representations;  (2) модел за покривање на дрвјата кој дозволува вниманието да зависи од синтаксијата на изворот. Експериментите на кинеско-англискиот превод покажуваат дека нашите предложени модели го надминуваат секвенцијалниот модел на внимание, како и посилна основа со кодер од дното до горе и покривање на зборови.', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d (NMT) മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ കോഡോര്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാണു്, അത് സിനിട്ടാക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വ്യക്തമായി സോര്\u200dസിഡ് സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക് വൃക കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d (1) ഒരു വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200dഡര്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് പിന്നീട് സാധാരണ (2) സോര്\u200dസ്- side സിന്\u200dടാക്സിനെ ആശ്രയിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മരത്തിന്റെ കറച്ച് മോഡല്\u200d. ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷണങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d പിന്നീട് ശ്', 'mt': "Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) huma bbażati fuq il-qafas sekwenzjali tad-dekoder tal-kodiċi, li ma jagħmilx użu minn informazzjoni sintattika. F’dan id-dokument, aħna ntejbu dan il-mudell billi inkorporaw b’mod espliċitu siġar sintetiċi tal-ġenb tas-sors. B’mod aktar speċifiku, qed nipproponu (1) kodifikatur bidirezzjonali tas-siġar li jitgħallem rappreżentazzjonijiet sekwenzjali kif ukoll strutturati tas-siġar; (2) a tree-coverage model that lets the attention depend on the source-side syntax.  L-esperimenti dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniża-Ingliża juru li l-mudelli proposti tagħna jaqbżu l-mudell sekwenzjali ta' attenzjoni kif ukoll linja bażi aktar b'saħħitha b'kodiċi tas-siġar minn isfel għal fuq u kopertura tal-kliem.", 'mn': 'Ихэнх мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) загварууд нь дараагийн кодер-декодер хэлбэрээр суурилсан. Энэ нь синтактик мэдээллийг ашиглахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ загварыг эх үүсвэрийн синтактик модыг тодорхой нэгтгэхэд сайжруулдаг. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид (1) хоёр дахь дахь модны коддогч болон модны бүтээгдэхүүнийг суралцдаг. (2) Модны хэвлэлийн загвар нь анхаарлыг эх үүсвэрийн синтаксис дээр хамаарна. Хятад-Англи хэлний хөгжлийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загварууд дараагийн ухааны загвараас илүү хүчтэй, доорх модны коддогч болон үгний мэдээллээс илүү хүчтэй суурь шугам юм.', 'pl': 'Większość modeli neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) opiera się na sekwencyjnym frameworku kodera-dekodera, który nie wykorzystuje informacji składniczych. W niniejszym artykule ulepszamy ten model poprzez wyraźne włączenie drzew składni po stronie źródła. W szczególności proponujemy (1) dwukierunkowy koder drzewa, który uczy się zarówno sekwencyjnych, jak i strukturalnych reprezentacji drzewa; (2) model pokrycia drzewa, który pozwala uwagę uzależnić od składni po stronie źródła. Eksperymenty z tłumaczeniem chińsko-angielskim pokazują, że proponowane przez nas modele przewyższają sekwencyjny model uwagi, a także silniejszą bazę bazową z koderem drzewa oddolnego i pokryciem słów.', 'no': 'Dei fleste neuralmaskineoversettelsesmodelane (NMT) er basert på rammeverket med sekvensisk koder- dekoder, som ikkje gjer bruk av syntaktiske informasjon. I denne papiret forbedrar vi denne modellen ved å inkludere kjeldeside syntaktiske tre. Dette er meir spesifikt at vi foreslår (1) ein bidireksjonal trekoder som lærer både sekvensielle og trestrukturerte representasjonar. (2) eit tredekkemodell som lèt oppmerkinga avhengig av kjeldesidesyntaksen. Eksperimentar på kinesisk-engelsk oversettelse viser at våre foreslått modeller utfører det sekvensiske attentingsmodellet, og ein sterke baseline med ein botnkoder og ord-omslag.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea modelelor de traducere automată neurală (NMT) se bazează pe cadrul codificator secvențial-decodor, care nu utilizează informații sintactice. În această lucrare, îmbunătățim acest model prin încorporarea explicită a copacilor sintactici din partea sursei. Mai exact, propunem (1) un codificator bidirecțional arbore care învață atât reprezentări secvențiale, cât și structurate arbore; (2) un model de acoperire arborească care permite atenției să depindă de sintaxa sursei. Experimentele privind traducerea chineză-engleză demonstrează că modelele noastre propuse depășesc modelul de atenție secvențială, precum și o bază de referință mai puternică cu un codificator copac de jos în sus și acoperire de cuvinte.', 'sr': 'Većina modela neuronskog prevoda (NMT) se temelji na sekvencijalnom okviru kodera-dekodera, što ne koristi sintaktične informacije. U ovom papiru, poboljšavamo ovaj model sa objašnjenjem sintaktičkih drveća na izvoru. Posebnije, predlažemo (1) dvodirektivni koder drveta koji nauči i sekvencijalne i strukturirane predstave drveta; (2) model za pokrivanje drveta koji omogućava pažnju zavisi od sintakse izvora strane. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da naši predloženi modeli izvršavaju sekvencijski model pažnje, kao i jača početna linija sa koderom drveta na dnu i prikrivanjem riječi.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) මොඩේල් අධාරිත වෙනවා පස්සේ කෝඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් සංකේතකයේ සංකේතකයේ සංක මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් සංවේදනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් මුළු පැත්තේ සංවේදනය කළ වඩා විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න (1) විශේෂයෙන් විශ්වාස කකුරුවක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ගස Name චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා අපේ පරීක්ෂණ', 'so': 'Tusaalada tarjumaadda maskaxda xilliga ah (NMT) waxay ku saleysan yihiin frame koocoder-decoder, taasoo aan isticmaaleyn macluumaadka syntactic. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku hagaajinnaa tusaalahan si cad oo aan ugu qorno geedaha syntactic dhinaca sourceed. More specifically, we propose (1) a bidirectional tree encoder which learns both sequential and tree structured representations;  (2) Tusaale ku qoran geed dabool ah oo ku saabsan cashuurta dhinaca aad ku jirto. Imtixaanka turjumista Shiino-Ingiriis waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyaan modelka dareemada xilliga iyo sidoo kale mid ka xoogaysan qoriga hoose-hoose iyo qoriga qarsoodiga.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan model terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) berdasarkan kerangka pengekod-dekoder urutan, yang tidak menggunakan maklumat sintaktik. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperbaiki model ini dengan memasukkan secara eksplicit pokok sintaktik sisi sumber. Lebih spesifik, kami melamar (1) pengekod pokok bidireksi yang mempelajari kedua-dua persekutuan dan persekutuan struktur pokok; (2) model perlindungan pokok yang membolehkan perhatian bergantung pada sintaks sisi sumber. Experiments on Chinese-English translation demonstrate that our proposed models outperform the sequential attentional model as well as a stronger baseline with a bottom-up tree encoder and word coverage.', 'sv': 'De flesta neurala maskin철vers채ttningsmodeller (NMT) 채r baserade p책 sekventiell encoder-dekoder ramverk, som inte anv채nder syntaktisk information. I denna uppsats f철rb채ttrar vi denna modell genom att uttryckligen inf철rliva k채llsyntaktiska tr채d. Mer specifikt f철resl책r vi (1) en tv책riktad tr채dkodare som l채r sig b책de sekventiella och tr채dstrukturerade representationer; (2) en tr채dt채ckningsmodell som l책ter uppm채rksamheten bero p책 k채llsyntaxen. Experiment p책 kinesisk-engelsk 철vers채ttning visar att v책ra f철reslagna modeller 철vertr채ffar den sekventiella uppm채rksamhetsmodellen samt en starkare baslinje med en tr채dkodare nedifr책n och upp och ordt채ckning.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மாதிரிகள் பின்வரும் குறியீட்டான- குறியீட்டாளர் சட்டத்தில் அடிப்படை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த மாதிரியை வெளிப்படையாக மேம்படுத்துகிறோம் மூல-பக்கம் ஒத்திசைவு மரங்களை உள்ள மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் (1) ஒரு பிடித்திருக்கும் மரக்குறியீட்டின் குறியீடு கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பின்னர் மற (2) மூல- பக்க ஒத்திசைவை சார்ந்து கொள்ளும் மர- cover மாதிரி. சீன- ஆங்கிலம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது என்று எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் பின்வரும் கவனம் மாதிரி ம', 'ur': 'اکثر نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل سکوئنسیل اکڈر- ڈیکوڈر فرم پر بنیاد ہیں، جو سینٹکتیک معلومات کا کوئی استعمال نہیں کرتا۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم اس مدل کو صاف طور پر سینٹکتیک درختوں کے ساتھ ترجیح دیتے ہیں۔ اور اس سے زیادہ مشخص ہے کہ ہم (1) ایک دوسری طرح کے درخت کا کوڈر پیش کریں جو دوسری طرح اور درخت کی ساختہ نمونات سکھاتا ہے۔ (2) ایک درخت کاورج موڈل جو توجه کرتا ہے سورس-سائڈ سینٹکس پر اعتماد کرتا ہے۔ چینی-انگلیسی ترجمہ کے متعلق تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدلکوں نے سفارشی اچھی موڈل کو اور ایک نیچے کے درخت کا کوڈر اور کلمات کی پورش کے ساتھ زیادہ قوی بنیس لین کو انجام دیتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Hầu hết các mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB) dựa trên cơ chế mã hóa chuỗi, mà không hề dùng thông tin cú pháp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta cải tiến mô hình này bằng cách hiển thị kết hợp các cây cú pháp. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi đề xuất (1) một bộ mã hóa cây hai trực tiếp học được các biểu tượng cấu trúc theo chuỗi và cây. (2) một mô hình bìa cây cho phép sự chú ý phụ thuộc vào cú pháp từ bên nguồn. Thí nghiệm dịch tiếng Trung Quốc và Anh cho thấy những mô hình đề xuất của chúng ta vượt qua kiểu chú ý kế tiếp cũng như một cơ sở cơ bản mạnh hơn với mã hóa gốc cây và lời bảo vệ.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz bu modelni shaxsiy manba-side syntactik daraxtlarini birlashtiramiz. Ko'pchilik, biz (1) davomida daraxt kodlash imkoniyatlarini o'rganish va daraxt tashkilotlarini o'rganadi; Name Name", 'bg': 'Повечето модели на невронен машинен превод (НМТ) са базирани на последователната рамка на кодер-декодер, която не използва синтактична информация. В тази статия подобряваме този модел чрез изрично включване на синтактични дървета от страната на източника. По-конкретно предлагаме (1) двупосочен дървесен кодер, който изучава както последователни, така и дървесни структурирани изображения; (2) модел на покритие на дърветата, който позволява вниманието да зависи от синтаксиса на източника. Експериментите с китайско-английски превод показват, че предложените модели превъзхождат последователния модел на вниманието, както и по-силна базова линия с кодер отдолу нагоре и покритие на думи.', 'da': 'De fleste neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller (NMT) er baseret på sekventiel encoder-dekoder framework, som ikke gør brug af syntaktisk information. I denne artikel forbedrer vi denne model ved eksplicit at indarbejde kildeside syntaktiske træer. Mere specifikt foreslår vi (1) en tovejet trækoder, der lærer både sekventielle og træstrukturerede repræsentationer; (2) en trædækningsmodel, der lader opmærksomheden afhænge af kildesidens syntaks. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-engelsk oversættelse viser, at vores foreslåede modeller overgår den sekventielle opmærksomhedsmodel samt en stærkere baseline med en bottom-up træ encoder og orddækning.', 'nl': 'De meeste neurale machine translation (NMT) modellen zijn gebaseerd op het sequentiële encoder-decoder framework, dat geen gebruik maakt van syntactische informatie. In dit artikel verbeteren we dit model door expliciet syntactische bomen aan de bronzijde op te nemen. Meer specifiek stellen we (1) een bidirectionele boomencoder voor die zowel sequentiële als boomgestructureerde representaties leert; (2) een boomdekkingsmodel dat de aandacht laat afhangen van de bronsyntaxis. Experimenten met Chinees-Engels vertaling tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde modellen beter presteren dan het sequentiële attentiemodel, evenals een sterkere baseline met een bottom-up boomencoder en woorddekking.', 'hr': 'Većina modela prevoda neuronskih strojeva (NMT) temelje se na sekvencijskom okviru kodera-dekodera, što ne koristi sintaktičke informacije. U ovom papiru, poboljšavamo ovaj model, pojasno uključujući sintaktičke drveće na izvoru. Posebno predlažemo (1) dvodirektivni koder drveta koji uči i sekvencijalne i drvetske strukturirane predstave; (2) model za pokrivanje drveta koji omogućava pažnju ovisi o sintaksi izvora strane. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da naši predloženi modeli iznose sekvencijski model pažnje, kao i jača početna linija s koderom drveta u donjem vrhu i prekrivanjem riječi.', 'de': 'Die meisten NMT-Modelle basieren auf dem sequentiellen Encoder-Decoder-Framework, das keine syntaktischen Informationen verwendet. In diesem Beitrag verbessern wir dieses Modell durch explizite Einbeziehung quellenseitiger syntaktischer Bäume. Genauer gesagt schlagen wir (1) einen bidirektionalen Baumencoder vor, der sowohl sequentielle als auch baumstrukturierte Darstellungen lernt; (2) ein Baumdeckungsmodell, das die Aufmerksamkeit von der quellenseitigen Syntax abhängen lässt. Experimente zur Chinesisch-Englischen Übersetzung zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen Modelle sowohl das sequentielle Aufmerksamkeitsmodell als auch eine stärkere Baseline mit einem bottom-up Baumencoder und Wortabdeckung übertreffen.', 'id': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperbaiki model ini dengan secara eksplicit memasukkan pohon sintaksi sisi sumber. Lebih spesifik, kami mengusulkan (1) pengekoder pohon bidireksi yang mempelajari kedua persekutuan dan persekutuan pohon strukturasi; (2) model menutupi pohon yang memungkinkan perhatian bergantung pada sintaks sisi sumber. Eksperimen di terjemahan bahasa Cina-Inggris menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan melampaui model perhatian sekwensial serta garis dasar yang lebih kuat dengan pengekode pohon bawah-atas dan penutupan kata.', 'fa': 'بیشترین مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بر روی چهارچوب\u200cهای رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی سفارشی بر اساس است که هیچ استفاده از اطلاعات سنتاکتیک نمی\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما این مدل را با توجه به طور واضح درختان سنتاکتیک از طرف منبع تولید می کنیم. ویژه\u200cتر، ما (۱) یک قانون درخت کودره\u200cای را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به عنوان نمایش\u200cهای پیوسته و ساخته شده درخت یاد می\u200cگیرد. (۲) یک مدل پوشش درخت که اجازه می دهد توجه به سینتکس منبع بستگی دارد. تجربه\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهند که مدلهای پیشنهاد ما از مدل توجه\u200cی اثبات و پایین\u200cخط قوی\u200cتر با یک رمز\u200cدهنده درخت پایین\u200cبالا و پوشش کلمه\u200cها را انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'ko': '대부분의 신경기계번역(NMT) 모델은 문법 정보를 사용하지 않고 순서 코딩 프레임워크를 기반으로 한다.본고에서 우리는 현식 합병 원단 문법 트리를 통해 이 모델을 개선한다.더욱 구체적으로 말하면 우리는 (1) 쌍방향 트리 인코더를 제기하는데 이것은 학습 서열과 트리 구조 표시이다.(2) 하나의 트리 덮어쓰기 모델로 원단 문법에 주의를 기울인다.한영 번역에 대한 실험에 따르면 우리가 제시한 모델은 순서 주의 모델보다 우수하고 밑에서 위로 올라가는 트리 인코더와 단어 커버율이 있어 더욱 강한 기선을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri nyingi za mashine za kijinsia (NMT) zinategemea mfumo wa kodi-decodir unaofanywa, ambao hauna matumizi ya taarifa za ushirikiano. Katika gazeti hili, tunaboresha mtindo huu kwa uwazi wa kuingiza miti ya muungano wa asili. Zaidi hasa, tunapendekeza (1) kodi la mti unaohusika ambalo linajifunza wawakilishi wa miti na miti zilizoundwa; (2) Mfano wa habari za miti unaosaidia kuchukua hatua hiyo inategemea kodi ya vyanzo vya habari. Majaribio kwenye tafsiri ya Kiingereza yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu ilipendekezwa kufanya mtindo wa ufuatiliaji wa baadae pamoja na mstari wa nguvu zaidi wa miti ya chini na habari za maneno.', 'tr': 'I흫 k철p n채ral ma힊yny흫 terjimesini (NMT) nusgalary yzgalan koder-dekoder 챌er챌evesine dayal첵ar. Bu syntaktik maglumaty 첵ok. Bu kagyzda, bu nusgany 챌e힊me tarapyny syntaktik aga챌lary 첵azmak bilen gowyla힊dyr첵arys. A첵ratyn g철r채, biz (1) indiri힊ik aga챌 kod챌ysyny 철wren첵채r we a 휓a챌 d체z체mlenmelerini 철wren첵채r; (2) aga챌 첵azgy힊yny흫 nusgasyna seretsek 체챌in aga챌 첵azgy힊yny흫 챌e힊me sentaxsynda ba휓lanmas캇na m체mkin ed첵채r. I흫lis챌e-횉in챌e terjimelerinde 철r채n ukyplary흫 bizi흫 teklip eden nusgalarymyzy흫 yzyna da첵an nusgasyny, a 힊aky aga챌 kode첵ji we s철z howplygy bilen has g체첵챌li 챌ykarmagyny g철rke첵채r.', 'af': "Die meeste neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) modele word gebaseer op die sekwensiele enkoder- dekoder raamwerk wat geen gebruik van sintaksiese inligting maak nie. In hierdie papier, ons verbeter hierdie model deur uitduidelik inkorporeer bron-kant sintaktieke bome. More specifically, we propose (1) a bidirectional tree encoder which lears both sequential and tree structured representations; and (2) â\x80\x99n boom-dekking model wat laat die aandag afhang van die bron-kantsintaks. Eksperimente op Sjinese-Engelse vertaling bevestig dat ons voorgestelde modele die volgende aandag model en 'n sterker basislien met 'n onderkant boom enkoderer en woorddekking uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information.  Në këtë letër, ne përmirësojmë këtë model duke përfshirë eksplicitisht pemët sintaktike nga ana e burimit. Më specifikisht, ne propozojmë (1) një kodues bimësh dy-drejtues që mëson si përfaqësime sekuenciale ashtu dhe të strukturuara pemësh; (2) një model mbulese pemësh që lejon vëmendjen të varet nga sintaksi e anës burimi. Eksperimentet në përkthimin kinez-anglez demonstrojnë se modelet tona të propozuara mbizotërojnë modelin sekuencial të vëmendjes si dhe një bazë më të fortë me një kodues druri poshtë lart dhe mbulim fjalësh.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդելների մեծ մասը հիմնված է սեքսենցիալ կոդեր-կոդեր կառուցվածքի վրա, որը չի օգտագործում սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվություն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք բարելավում ենք այս մոդելը բացահայտորեն ներառելով աղբյուրի սինտակտիկ ծառեր: Ավելի հատկապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք (1) երկուղղային ծառի կոդեր, որը սովորում է սեքսենցիալ և ծառի կառուցվածքներ: (2) ծառի ծածկության մոդել, որը թույլ է տալիս ուշադրությունը կախված լինել աղբյուրի սինտաքսից: Չինաստանի-անգլերենի թարգմանման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելները գերազանցում են հաջորդական ուշադրության մոդելը, ինչպես նաև ավելի ուժեղ հիմք ծառի կոդերով և բառերի ծածկությամբ:', 'am': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ይህንን ምሳሌ በኩል-side Syntactic ዛፎች እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም (1) የዛፍ አካባቢ የሥርዓት እና የዛፍ መልዕክቶችን የሚያስተምር የዛፍ ኮድዶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ (2) የዛፍ ክፍል ሞዴል በኩል-side Syntax ላይ የሚጠቀም ነው፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ላይ ፈተናዎች የተዘጋጀ ሞዴሎቻችን የሚከተሉትን የግንኙነት ሞዴል እና የዛፍ ክፍል እና የቃላት ክፍተት የበረታች መደገፊያ የሚያደርጉ ናቸው፡፡', 'az': 'Ən çox nöral maşın çevirimi (NMT) modelləri sequential kodlayıcı-dekoder framework ə dayanılır ki, sintaktik məlumatları istifadə etməz. Bu kağızda, bu modelini açıq-aydın sintaktik ağacları ilə yaxşılaşdırırıq. Daha müəyyən olunca, biz (1) təklif edirik ki, hər ikisini və a ğac qurulmuş nümunələrini öyrənir; (2) a ğac örtüsü modeli, bu təsiri mənbənin sintaxsına bağlı olar. Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi barəsindəki təcrübələrimiz təklif etdiyimiz modellərin ardınca dikkati modelini və a şağı yüksək ağac kodlayıcısı və sözlərin örtüsü ilə daha qüvvətli təcrübəsini göstərir.', 'bn': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই মডেল সুস্পষ্ট ভাবে উৎস-পাশের সিন্ট্যাক্টিক গাছের মধ্যে যুক্ত করে উন্নত করি। বিশেষ করে আমরা (১) একটি বিদ্যমান গাছের কোডারের প্রস্তাব করছি যা পরবর্তী এবং গাছের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখেছে; (2) একটি গাছের কাভারেজ মডেল যা উৎস-পাশের সিন্যাক্সের উপর মনোযোগ নির্ভর করে। চীনা-ইংরেজি অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল পরবর্তীতে আকর্ষণীয় মডেলের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করে এবং তার সাথে একটি নীচের-আপ গাছ', 'ca': "La majoria dels models de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) es basan en el marc seqüencial del codificador-decoder, que no utilitza informació sinàctica. En aquest paper, millorem aquest model incorporant explícitament arbres sinàctics de costat fontal. Més concretament, proposem (1) un codificador bidireccional d'arbre que aprenga representacions seqüencials i estructurats d'arbres; (2) un model de cobertura d'arbres que permet que l'atenció depèn de la síntaxi de la font. Els experiments de traducció xinesa-anglesa demostren que els nostres models proposats superen el model d'atenció seqüencial i un punt de referència més fort amb codificador d'arbre de baix a dalt i cobertura de paraules.", 'bs': 'Većina modela neuronskog prevoda (NMT) se temelji na sekvencijalnom okviru kodera-dekodera, što ne koristi sintaktične informacije. U ovom papiru, poboljšavamo ovaj model sa objašnjenjem sintaktičkih drveća na izvoru. Posebnije, predlažemo (1) dvodirektivni koder drveta koji uči i sekvencijalne i strukturirane predstave drveta; (2) model za pokrivanje drveta koji omogućava pažnju ovisi o sintaksi izvora. Eksperimenti o prevodu kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da naši predloženi modeli iznose sekvencijski model pažnje, kao i jača početna linija sa koderom drveta na dnu i prekrivanjem riječi.', 'cs': 'Většina modelů neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) je založena na sekvenčním kodéru-dekodéru frameworku, který nevyužívá syntaktických informací. V tomto článku tento model vylepšujeme explicitním začleněním syntaktických stromů na straně zdroje. Konkrétněji navrhujeme (1) obousměrný strom kodér, který se učí jak sekvenční, tak stromově strukturované reprezentace; (2) model stromového pokrytí, který umožňuje pozornost záviset na syntaxi zdrojové strany. Experimenty s čínsko-anglickým překladem ukazují, že naše navrhované modely překonávají sekvenční pozornost model, stejně jako silnější základní základní linie s kodérem stromů zdola nahoru a pokrytím slov.', 'et': 'Enamik neuro masintõlke mudeleid põhineb järjestikusel kodeerija-dekoodri raamistikul, mis ei kasuta süntaktilist informatsiooni. Käesolevas töös parandame seda mudelit, lisades sõnaselgelt allikaküljelised süntaktilised puud. Täpsemalt pakume välja (1) kahesuunalise puukodeerija, mis õpib nii järjestikuseid kui ka puustruktureeritud esitusi; (2) puude katvuse mudel, mis võimaldab tähelepanu sõltuda allikapoolsest süntaksist. Hiina-inglise tõlke eksperimendid näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudelid on paremad kui järjestikuse tähelepanu mudel ning tugevam lähtealus alt-üles puukodeerija ja sõnakattega.', 'fi': 'Useimmat neurokonekäännösmallit (NMT) perustuvat sekvenssiaalikooderi-dekooderikehykseen, joka ei hyödynnä syntaktista tietoa. Tässä artikkelissa parannamme tätä mallia sisällyttämällä lähdepuolen syntaktisia puita. Tarkemmin sanottuna ehdotamme (1) kaksisuuntaista puun koodausta, joka oppii sekä peräkkäisiä että puurakenteisia esityksiä; (2) puunpeittomalli, jonka avulla huomio riippuu lähdepuolen syntaksista. Kiinan ja englannin käännöskokeissa tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetut mallit suoriutuvat sekvenssiaalisesta huomiomallista sekä vahvemmasta lähtötasosta alhaalta ylöspäin suuntautuvalla puun koodaajalla ja sanapeitteellä.', 'jv': 'Tulung sistem anyar (NMT) sing dibutuhi ning karbot koder-decoder sing dikenalke seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe informasi sing wis ana. Nanging mapang iki, kita luwih-luwih akeh model iki dadi sing isih perusahaan seneng langkung sampeyan cara-sangan. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink (2) model -Coverage Gebudhakan langkung tarjamahan Pines-Inggris kuwi bisa ngomong nik awak dhéwé model sing nyimpen anyar tentang kuwi nggawe modèl sing beraksi maneh dumadhi, lan padha sing nyimpen karo koder nggawe beh-up lan ujaran sing kuwi nggawe ujaran.', 'he': 'רוב הדוגמנים של מכונות עצביות (NMT) מבוססים על המסגרת של קודד-קודד רצופי, אשר לא משתמש במידע סינטקטי. In this paper, we improve this model by explicitly incorporating source-side syntactic trees.  במיוחד יותר, אנו מציעים (1) קודד עץ שתי כיוונים שילמד גם מייצגים רצופיים וגם מייצגים מבוססים עץ; (2) מודל כיסוי עץ שמאפשר לתשומת לב תלוי בסינטקס הצד המקורי. ניסויים על התרגום סיני-אנגלי מראים שהדוגמנים המוצעים שלנו יוצאים מעל מודל תשומת לב רציני כמו גם בסיס חזק יותר עם קודם עץ מתחת למעלה וכיסוי מילים.', 'sk': 'Večina modelov nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) temelji na zaporednem kodirniškem okvirju, ki ne uporablja sintaktičnih informacij. V tem članku smo izboljšali ta model z eksplicitnim vključevanjem sintaktičnih dreves na strani vira. Natančneje predlagamo (1) dvosmerni drevesni kodirnik, ki se uči tako zaporednih kot drevesnih strukturiranih predstavitev; (2) model pokritosti dreves, ki omogoča, da je pozornost odvisna od sintakse na strani vira. Eksperimenti na kitajsko-angleškem prevodu kažejo, da so naši predlagani modeli boljši od zaporednega modela pozornosti, kot tudi močnejše osnovne točke s kodirnikom drevesa od spodaj navzgor in pokritostjo besed.', 'ha': "@ info Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wannan misalin da za'a haɗa miti na-side syntactic. Kayya da hakki, tuna goyyar (1) kode-na'urar itãcen kode mai ƙaranci, wanda yana sanar da masu bakwai da miti masu bakwai; @ info Tajararin zaman tafarin China-Ingiriya na nuna cewa misãlai da aka buƙata musamman masu ƙaranci su samar da motel na masu saurãre daban, da kuma a ƙaranci salon da wani kode na itãce-ƙasa-ƙaranci da maganar rufe.", 'bo': 'Most neural machine translation (NMT) models are based on the sequential encoder-decoder framework, which makes no use of syntactic information. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདི་གསལ་བཤད་ནས་མའི་ཕྱོགས་སུ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་ཤོག་རིང་དང་། ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལས་(1)རྩ་བ་ཆེ་བའི་དབྱིབས་དང་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། (2) སྡོང་བ་ཁང་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག Experiments on Chinese-English translation demonstrate that our proposed models outperform the sequential attentional model as well as a stronger baseline with a bottom-up tree encoder and word coverage.'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Name Tagging and Linking for 282 Languages', 'ar': 'وضع علامات على الأسماء عبر اللغات وربطها لـ 282 لغة', 'pt': 'Marcação e vinculação de nomes em vários idiomas para 282 idiomas', 'es': 'Etiquetado y enlace de nombres en varios idiomas para 282 idiomas', 'fr': 'Balisage de noms et liens multilingues pour 282 langues', 'ja': '282言語のクロスリンガル名タグ付けとリンク', 'ru': 'Межъязычное присвоение имен и привязка для 282 языков', 'zh': '282 语言名链接', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी नाम टैगिंग और 282 भाषाओं के लिए लिंक करना', 'ga': 'Clibeáil agus Nascadh Trastheangach Ainmneacha do 282 Teanga', 'ka': '282 ენებისთვის სიმბოლო სახელი', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű névcímkézés és összekapcsolás 282 nyelvhez', 'el': 'Διάγλωσση σήμανση ονομάτων και σύνδεση για 282 γλώσσες', 'it': 'Etichettatura e collegamento multilingue dei nomi per 282 lingue', 'kk': '282 тілдер үшін бірнеше тіл атауын тегтеру және сілтеме', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbis pavadinimo ženklinimas ir ryšys 282 kalboms', 'mk': 'Многу јазички означување на името и поврзување за 282 јазици', 'ml': '282 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷയുടെ പേരു് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങും ലിങ്ങിങ്ങും', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual Name Tagging and Linking for 282 Languages', 'mn': '282 хэл дээр олон хэл нэр тэмдэглэх болон холбоотой', 'mt': 'L-Ittikkjar u r-Rabta bejn l-Ismijiet u l-Lingwi għal 282 Lingwi', 'no': 'Krysspråk namn merking og lenking for 282 språk', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne oznaczanie imion i linkowanie dla 282 Języków', 'ro': 'Etichetarea și legătura între limbi pentru 282 de limbi', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig namnmärkning och länkning för 282 språk', 'sr': 'Prejezično ime označavanje i povezanje za 282 jezika', 'si': '282 භාෂාව සඳහා විශාල භාෂාවක් නාම ටැග් කරන්න හා ලින්ක් කරන්න', 'so': 'Magaca luuqadaha iskuulka ah Tagging and Linking for 282 luqadood', 'ta': '282 மொழிகளுக்கான கிராஸ்- மொழி பெயர் ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் இணைப்பு', 'ur': '282 زبانوں کے لئے کرس زبان کا نام ٹاگ اور لینک', 'vi': 'Tên ngôn ngữ khác nhau Đánh dấu và Liên kết cho 22 Ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Prejezično ime označavanje i povezanje za 282 jezika', 'de': 'Cross-lingual Name Tagging und Linking für 282 Sprachen', 'nl': 'Meertalige naamlabels en koppelingen voor 282 talen', 'bg': 'Междуезично етикетиране на имената и свързване за 282 езика', 'da': 'Tværsproget navn Tagging og linking til 282 sprog', 'fa': 'Name Cross-lingual Tagging and Linking for 282 Languages', 'id': 'Tagging Nama Selata-Bahasa dan Linking untuk 282 Bahasa', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': '282개 언어에 대한 다국어 이름 태그 및 링크', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': '282 լեզուների փոխլեզվով անունների նշաններ և կապեր', 'sw': 'Jina la lugha ya Cross Tagging and Linging for lugha 282', 'bn': '২৮২ ভাষার জন্য ক্রস- ভাষার নাম ট্যাগিং এবং লিংকিং', 'sq': 'Emri ndërgjuhës Tagging dhe lidhje për 282 gjuhë', 'ca': 'Cross-lingual Name Tagging and Linking for 282 Languages', 'cs': 'Značkování a odkazování názvů mezi jazyky 282', 'et': 'Keeleülene nimede sildistamine ja linkimine 282 keele jaoks', 'tr': '282 Diller üçin geçiş diller', 'fi': 'Monikielinen nimien tagging ja linkitys 282 kielelle', 'az': '282 Dillər üçün çox dil adı etiketləmə və bağlama', 'bs': 'Prejezično ime označavanje i povezanje za 282 jezika', 'he': 'תג ושורה לשפתיים לצלב 282 שפות', 'sk': 'Medjezično označevanje imen in povezovanje za 282 jezikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': '282 སྐད་རིགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་མིང་ཚོགས', 'jv': 'structural navigation'}
{'en': 'The ambitious goal of this work is to develop a cross-lingual name tagging and linking framework for 282 languages that exist in Wikipedia. Given a document in any of these languages, our framework is able to identify name mentions, assign a coarse-grained or fine-grained type to each mention, and link it to an English Knowledge Base (KB) if it is linkable. We achieve this goal by performing a series of new KB mining methods : generating silver-standard annotations by transferring annotations from English to other languages through cross-lingual links and KB properties, refining annotations through self-training and topic selection, deriving language-specific morphology features from anchor links, and mining word translation pairs from cross-lingual links. Both name tagging and linking results for 282 languages are promising on Wikipedia data and on-Wikipedia data.', 'ar': 'الهدف الطموح من هذا العمل هو تطوير إطار عمل لربط وترميز الأسماء بلغات متعددة لـ 282 لغة موجودة في ويكيبيديا. بالنظر إلى مستند بأي من هذه اللغات ، فإن إطار العمل الخاص بنا قادر على تحديد الأسماء التي تم ذكرها ، وتعيين نوع خشن أو دقيق الحبيبات لكل ذكر ، وربطه بقاعدة المعرفة الإنجليزية (KB) إذا كان قابلاً للربط. نحقق هذا الهدف من خلال تنفيذ سلسلة من أساليب التعدين الجديدة في قاعدة المعارف: إنشاء تعليقات توضيحية "ذات معايير فضية" عن طريق نقل التعليقات التوضيحية من اللغة الإنجليزية إلى اللغات الأخرى من خلال الروابط متعددة اللغات وخصائص قاعدة المعارف ، وتحسين التعليقات التوضيحية من خلال التدريب الذاتي واختيار الموضوع ، واشتقاق اللغة -ميزات مورفولوجيا محددة من روابط الربط ، والتنقيب عن أزواج ترجمة الكلمات من الروابط عبر اللغات. تعد كل من علامات الأسماء وربط النتائج لـ 282 لغة واعدة على بيانات ويكيبيديا وبيانات ويكيبيديا.', 'fr': "L'objectif ambitieux de ce travail est de développer un cadre de balisage et de liaison de noms multilingues pour 282 langues présentes sur Wikipédia. À partir d'un document dans l'une de ces langues, notre framework est capable d'identifier les mentions de nom, d'attribuer un type grossier ou fin à chaque mention et de le lier à une base de connaissances en anglais (KB) s'il est possible de créer un lien. Nous atteignons cet objectif en exécutant une série de nouvelles méthodes d'exploration de la base de connaissances\xa0: générer des annotations «\xa0standard\xa0» en transférant des annotations de l'anglais vers d'autres langues via des liens multilingues et des propriétés de la base de connaissances, affinement des annotations par auto-apprentissage et sélection de sujets, dérivation spécifique à une langue les caractéristiques morphologiques à partir de liens d'ancrage et l'exploration de paires de traduction de mots à partir de liens interlinguistiques. Le balisage des noms et les résultats de liens pour 282 langues sont prometteurs pour les données Wikipédia et les données sur Wikipédia.", 'es': 'El ambicioso objetivo de este trabajo es desarrollar un marco multilingüe de etiquetado de nombres y enlaces para 282 idiomas que existen en Wikipedia. Dado un documento en cualquiera de estos idiomas, nuestro marco es capaz de identificar menciones de nombres, asignar un tipo grueso o detallado a cada mención y vincularlo a una Base de conocimientos (KB) en inglés si se puede vincular. Logramos este objetivo mediante la realización de una serie de nuevos métodos de minería de KB: generar anotaciones «estándar de plata» mediante la transferencia de anotaciones del inglés a otros idiomas a través de enlaces multilingües y propiedades de la KB, refinar las anotaciones mediante el autoaprendizaje y la selección de temas, derivar datos específicos del idioma características de morfología de enlaces de anclaje y minería de pares de traducción de palabras de enlaces interlingües. Tanto el etiquetado de nombres como los resultados de los enlaces para 282 idiomas son prometedores en los datos de Wikipedia y en los datos de Wikipedia.', 'pt': 'O objetivo ambicioso deste trabalho é desenvolver uma estrutura de marcação de nomes e vinculação multilíngue para 282 idiomas que existem na Wikipédia. Dado um documento em qualquer um desses idiomas, nossa estrutura é capaz de identificar menções de nome, atribuir um tipo de granulação grossa ou granular a cada menção e vinculá-la a uma Base de Conhecimento (KB) em inglês, se for vinculável. Alcançamos esse objetivo executando uma série de novos métodos de mineração de KB: gerando anotações “padrão prata” transferindo anotações do inglês para outros idiomas por meio de links multilíngues e propriedades de KB, refinando anotações por meio de autotreinamento e seleção de tópicos, derivando o idioma - recursos de morfologia específicos de links de âncora e pares de tradução de palavras de mineração de links de vários idiomas. Tanto a marcação de nomes quanto os resultados de links para 282 idiomas são promissores nos dados da Wikipédia e nos dados da Wikipédia.', 'ja': 'この研究の野心的な目標は、ウィキペディアに存在する282の言語のためのクロスリンガルの名前タグ付けとリンクのフレームワークを開発することです。これらの言語の文書を使用すると、フレームワークは名前のメンションを識別し、各メンションに粗い粒度または細かい粒度のタイプを割り当て、リンク可能であれば英語のナレッジベース（ KB ）にリンクすることができます。私たちは、一連の新しいKBマイニング方法を実行することによって、この目標を達成します。つまり、クロスリンガルリンクとKBプロパティを介して英語から他の言語にアノテーションを転送することによって「シルバースタンダード」アノテーションを生成し、セルフトレーニングとトピック選択を介してアノテーションを洗練し、アンカーリンクから言語固有の形態学的特徴を導き出し、クロスリンガルリンクから単語翻訳ペアをマイニングします。282の言語の名前タグ付けとリンクの結果は、ウィキペディアデータとオンウィキペディアデータの両方で有望です。', 'ru': 'Амбициозной целью этой работы является разработка межязычной системы тегов имен и ссылок для 282 языков, которые существуют в Википедии. Учитывая документ на любом из этих языков, наша структура способна идентифицировать упоминания имен, назначать грубозернистый или мелкозернистый тип каждому упоминанию и связывать его с английской базой знаний (КБ), если она может быть связана. Мы достигаем этой цели, выполняя ряд новых методов майнинга KB: создание аннотаций «серебряного стандарта» путем переноса аннотаций с английского языка на другие языки с помощью кросс-лингвистических ссылок и свойств KB, уточнение аннотаций с помощью самообучения и выбора тем, извлечение специфических для языка морфологических признаков из якорных ссылок и майнинг пар перевода слов из кросс-лингвистических ссылок. Результаты пометки имен и привязки для 282 языков являются многообещающими как для данных Википедии, так и для данных Википедии.', 'hi': 'इस कार्य का महत्वाकांक्षी लक्ष्य विकिपीडिया में मौजूद 282 भाषाओं के लिए एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नाम टैगिंग और लिंकिंग फ्रेमवर्क विकसित करना है। इन भाषाओं में से किसी में एक दस्तावेज़ को देखते हुए, हमारा ढांचा नाम के उल्लेखों की पहचान करने में सक्षम है, प्रत्येक उल्लेख के लिए एक मोटे-दाने वाले या ठीक-दाने वाले प्रकार को असाइन करें, और इसे अंग्रेजी नॉलेज बेस (KB) से लिंक करें यदि यह लिंक करने योग्य है। हम नए KB खनन विधियों की एक श्रृंखला का प्रदर्शन करके इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करते हैं: क्रॉस-लिंगुअल लिंक और केबी गुणों के माध्यम से अंग्रेजी से अन्य भाषाओं में एनोटेशन स्थानांतरित करके "सिल्वर-स्टैंडर्ड" एनोटेशन उत्पन्न करना, आत्म-प्रशिक्षण और विषय चयन के माध्यम से एनोटेशन को परिष्कृत करना, एंकर लिंक से भाषा-विशिष्ट आकृति विज्ञान सुविधाओं को प्राप्त करना, और क्रॉस-भाषी लिंक से शब्द अनुवाद जोड़े खनन करना। दोनों नाम टैगिंग और 282 भाषाओं के लिए लिंकिंग परिणाम विकिपीडिया डेटा और विकिपीडिया पर डेटा पर आशाजनक हैं।', 'zh': '其雄心勃勃为维基百科中存者282言发一跨语言名链接框架。 给定此一言之文档,吾框架能别其名,为其分粗粒度与细粒度,链接之于英语知识库(KB)(,可链接之)也。 行一系新知识库掘法以成之:跨语言链接与知识库属性将注从英语移于他语以成"银标",自练主题择优化注,从锚链接遣生特定于语言之形,并于跨语言链接中掘单词译是也。 282言语之名链接在维基百科数维基百科之数。', 'ga': 'Is é sprioc uaillmhianach na hoibre seo ná creat clibeála agus nascála tras-teangacha a fhorbairt do 282 teanga atá ar fáil sa Vicipéid. I bhfianaise doiciméad in aon cheann de na teangacha seo, is féidir lenár gcreat tagairtí ainmneacha a aithint, cineál garbh-ghráinneach nó mín-ghráinneach a shannadh do gach tagairt, agus é a nascadh le Bonn Eolais Béarla (KB) más féidir é a nascadh. Bainimid an sprioc seo amach trí shraith modhanna nua mianadóireachta KB a fheidhmiú: nótaí “caighdeánach airgid” a ghiniúint trí nótaí a aistriú ón mBéarla go teangacha eile trí naisc thrasteangacha agus airíonna KB, ag scagadh nótaí trí fhéinoiliúint agus trí roghnú topaicí, ag fáil teanga. - gnéithe moirfeolaíochta ar leith ó naisc ancaire, agus péirí aistriúcháin focal mianadóireachta ó naisc thrastheangacha. Tá an dá chlibeáil ainmneacha agus torthaí nascála do 282 teanga geallta ar shonraí Vicipéid agus ar shonraí ar Vicipéid.', 'el': 'Ο φιλόδοξος στόχος αυτής της εργασίας είναι η ανάπτυξη ενός πλαισίου διασύνδεσης ονομάτων και σήμανσης 282 γλωσσών που υπάρχουν στη Βικιπαίδεια. Δεδομένου ενός εγγράφου σε οποιαδήποτε από αυτές τις γλώσσες, το πλαίσιο μας είναι σε θέση να εντοπίσει αναφορές ονομάτων, να εκχωρήσει έναν χονδροειδές ή λεπτόκοκκο τύπο σε κάθε αναφορά και να το συνδέσει με μια Αγγλική Γνωσιακή Βάση (ΚΒ) εάν είναι συνδεδεμένο. Επιτυγχάνουμε αυτό το στόχο εφαρμόζοντας μια σειρά νέων μεθόδων εξόρυξης ΚΒ: δημιουργία σχολίων "ασημένιου προτύπου" μεταφέροντας σχολιασμούς από τα αγγλικά σε άλλες γλώσσες μέσω διαγώνιων συνδέσεων και ιδιοτήτων ΚΒ, τελειοποίηση σχολίων μέσω αυτοκατάρτισης και επιλογής θεμάτων, εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών μορφολογίας γλώσσας από συνδέσμους αγκύρων, και εξόρυξη ζευγαριών μετάφρασης λέξεων από διαγώνιους συνδέσμους. Τόσο η σήμανση ονομάτων όσο και τα αποτελέσματα σύνδεσης για τις γλώσσες 282 είναι πολλά υποσχόμενα στα δεδομένα της Βικιπαίδειας και στα δεδομένα της Βικιπαίδειας.', 'ka': "ამ სამუშაოს ამბიციო მიზეზი არის გავაკეთოთ მრავალენგური სახელის მაგრამ და დაკავშირება 282 ენების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ვიკიპედიაში არსებობს. დოკუმენტი ამ ენების ყველაზე, ჩვენი ფრამენტი შეუძლია განსაზღვრება სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის განსაზღვრება, განსაზღვრება სახელის ან სახელის ტიპი ყოველ განსაზღვრებაზე და დაკავშირება ანგლისური მეცნიერები ჩვენ მივიღეთ ეს მიზეზი, ახალი KB-ის მინიღების სერვერი გავაკეთებთ: მინიღების შექმნა 'silver-standard' ანტორაციების შექმნა, ანტორაციების ინგლისოდან სხვა ენათების გადატანაციების გადატანაციას და KB-ის განსაზღვრებით, ანტორაციების გადატანაციას, თა და მინი სიტყვების გაგრძელება მრავალური სიტყვებისგან. 282 ენისთვის მონაცემებით ვიკიპედიაზე და ვიკიპედიაზე მონაცემებით გვეუბნება.", 'hu': 'Ennek a munkának az ambiciózus célja, hogy kidolgozzon egy többnyelvű névcímkézési és összekapcsolási keretrendszert a Wikipédiában létező 282 nyelvhez. Amennyiben egy dokumentum bármelyik nyelven megtalálható, keretrendszerünk képes azonosítani a névemlítéseket, hozzárendelni egy durva vagy finomszemcsés típust minden említéshez, és összekapcsolni egy angol Tudásbázishoz (KB), ha összekapcsolható. Ezt a célt egy sor új KB bányászati módszer végrehajtásával érjük el: ezüst szabványú jegyzetek létrehozása angolról más nyelvekre történő átvitelével, többnyelvű linkek és KB tulajdonságok segítségével, a jegyzetek finomítása önképzéssel és témakörök kiválasztásával, nyelvspecifikus morfológiai jellemzők származtatása horgonyzólinkekből, és szófordítási párokat bányásznak keresztnyelvű linkekből. 282 nyelv névcímkézési és hivatkozási eredményei ígéretesek a Wikipédia adataiban és a Wikipédia adataiban.', 'it': 'L\'ambizioso obiettivo di questo lavoro è quello di sviluppare un framework di etichettatura e collegamento multilingue per 282 lingue esistenti in Wikipedia. Dato un documento in una di queste lingue, il nostro framework è in grado di identificare le menzioni dei nomi, assegnare un tipo a grana grossa o fine a ogni menzione e collegarlo a una Knowledge Base inglese (KB) se è collegabile. Raggiungiamo questo obiettivo eseguendo una serie di nuovi metodi di mining KB: generando annotazioni "silver-standard" trasferendo annotazioni dall\'inglese ad altre lingue attraverso link cross-lingual e proprietà KB, affinando le annotazioni attraverso auto-training e selezione degli argomenti, ricavando caratteristiche morfologiche linguistiche specifiche dai link di ancoraggio, e estrazione di coppie di traduzioni di parole da collegamenti cross-lingual. Sia i risultati dei tag dei nomi che dei collegamenti per 282 lingue sono promettenti sui dati Wikipedia e su Wikipedia.', 'kk': "Бұл жұмысының амбициялық мақсаты - Википедияда 282 тілдер үшін бірнеше тілдерді таңдау мен сілтемелеу. Бұл тілдерде бір құжатты көрсету үшін, біздің фрейміміз атауларды анықтай алады, әрбір айтылуға арналған немесе таңдау түрін таңдап, ағылшын білім негізіне (КБ) сілтемеледі. Біз бұл мақсатты жаңа КБ балау әдістерін орындап, ағылшын тілден басқа тілдер мен КБ қасиеттері арқылы ағылшын тілдерге аударып, 'күш- стандартты' белгілерді жасап, өз оқыту мен нақыштарды таңдау арқылы белгілерді жасап, тілдерге арнаулы Тілді тілді сілтемелерден сөздерді аудару екеуі. 282 тілдер үшін атау тегтері мен нәтижелерді сілтемелеу екеуі Википедия деректері мен Википедия деректері бойынша жауап береді.", 'lt': 'The ambitious goal of this work is to develop a cross-lingual name tagging and linking framework for 282 languages that exist in Wikipedia.  Atsižvelgiant į dokumentą bet kuria iš šių kalbų, mūsų sistema gali identifikuoti pavadinimus, kiekvienam minėtam dokumentui priskirti stambių arba smulkių grūdų tipą ir susieti jį su anglų žinių baze (KB), jei jis yra susietas. Šis tikslas pasiektas atlikdami keletą naujų KB kasybos metodų: sukuriant "sidabro standartų" anotacijas perkeliant anotacijas iš anglų į kitas kalbas per tarpkalbines sąsajas ir KB savybes, patobulinant anotacijas per savarankišką mokymą ir temų atranką, gaunant kalbos specifines morfologines savybes iš tvirtinimo sąsajų,  and mining word translation pairs from cross-lingual links.  Tiek pavadinimų žymėjimas, tiek rezultatų sujungimas 282 kalboms yra žadantys Wikipedia ir Wikipedia duomenys.', 'mk': 'Амбициозната цел на оваа работа е да се развие меѓујазично означување на името и поврзување на рамките за 282 јазици кои постојат во Википедија. Со оглед на документот на било кој од овие јазици, нашата рамка може да ги идентификува спомените на името, да додели грубо-жирен или фино-жирен тип на секој спомен, и да го поврзе со Англиска база на знаење (KB), ако е поврзана. Ние ја остваруваме оваа цел со спроведување на серија нови методи на минирање на КБ: генерирање на „сребрени стандарди“ анотации преку пренесување на анотации од англиски на други јазици преку прекујазични линкови и сопствености на КБ, рафинирање на анотациите преку самообука и избор на теми, извлекување на јазични специ И минирање парови на превод на зборови од меѓујазични линкови. И означувањето на името и поврзувањето на резултатите за 282 јазици ветуваат на податоците на Википедија и на Википедија.', 'ms': "The ambitious goal of this work is to develop a cross-lingual name tagging and linking framework for 282 languages that exist in Wikipedia.  Mengingat dokumen dalam mana-mana bahasa ini, kerangka kami boleh mengenalpasti sebutan nama, menyerahkan jenis berwarna lebar atau berwarna lebar kepada setiap sebutan, dan paut ke Pangkalan Pengetahuan Inggeris (KB) jika ia boleh dihubungkan. Kami mencapai tujuan ini dengan melakukan siri kaedah perlombaan KB baru: menghasilkan anotasi 'piawai-perak' dengan memindahkan anotasi dari bahasa Inggeris ke bahasa lain melalui pautan saling-bahasa dan ciri-ciri KB, menaiki anotasi melalui latihan diri dan pemilihan topik, menghasilkan ciri-ciri morfologi khusus bahasa dari pautan penyancar, - dan perlombongan pasangan terjemahan perkataan dari pautan saling bahasa. Kedua-dua penanda nama dan menyambung keputusan untuk 282 bahasa berjanji pada data Wikipedia dan data on-Wikipedia.", 'ml': "ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആഗ്രഹപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ലക്ഷ്യം വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന 282 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലി ഈ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഏതെങ്കിലും ഒരു രേഖയും കൊടുത്തിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് പേരുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ഓരോ പേരിലും കോര്\u200dസ് ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് ചെയ പുതിയ കെബി മിനിങ്ങ് രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം എത്തുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റു ഭാഷകളിലേക്കും വ്യക്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d 'വെള്ളി- സ്ഥാനമായി' പ് @ info: whatsthis 282 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പേര് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങും ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഫലങ്ങളും വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ വിവരങ്ങളിലും വിക്കിപിഡിയയ", 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын гол зорилго нь Википедияд 282 хэл дээр оршиж байгаа олон хэл нэрлэх, холбоотой хэлбэрийг хөгжүүлэх юм. Эдгээр хэл дээр баримт бичсэн учраас, бидний хэлбэр нь нэр дээр нэрлэгддэг гэдгийг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Хэрвээ тэр нь холбогдолтой бол англи хэлний мэдлэгийн суурь (КБ) руу холбогдох боломжтой. Бид энэ зорилго КБ-ын сүлжээний олон шинэ арга замыг хийж, англи хэл болон КБ-ын өөрчлөлт, өөрийгөө сургалтын болон сэдвийн сонголт, хэл-тодорхой морфологи холбоотой байрлалуудыг англи хэлээс бусад хэл руу шилжүүлж, хэл хэлний холбоонуудын хөрөнгө оруулах холбоотой. 282 хэл дээр нэрлэх, хоёр нэрлэх үр дүнг холбогдох нь Wikipedia өгөгдлийн болон Wikipedia дээр амлалтай.', 'no': 'Målet for denne arbeiden er å utvikla eit krysspråk namn og lenke rammeverket for 282 språk som finst i Wikipedia. Gjennomsiktig eit dokument i alle desse språka, kan vårt rammeverk identifisera namn, tilgje ein kryss- korn eller fin- korn- type til kvar oppgjevning, og lenke det til ein engelsk kjennebasen (KB) dersom det er lenkbar. Vi oppnår dette målet ved å utføra ei rekkje nye KB-miningsmetodar: å laga «Silver-standard» merknader ved å overføra merknader frå engelsk til andre språk gjennom cross-language lenkjer og KB-eigenskapar, refinera merknader gjennom selvtrening og emneformasjon, avhenga språkkspesifikke morfologiske funksjonar frå ankoralenkjer, og mining av ordomsetjingspråk frå krysspråk lenkjer. Begge namn merking og lenking av resultat for 282 språk blir foreslått på Wikipedia data og på Wikipediadata.', 'mt': "L-għan ambizzjuż ta’ dan ix-xogħol huwa li jiġi żviluppat tikkettar ta’ ismijiet translingwi u qafas ta’ rabta għal 282 lingwa li jeżistu fil-Wikipedia. Minħabba dokument fi kwalunkwe waħda minn dawn il-lingwi, il-qafas tagħna huwa kapaċi jidentifika l-ismijiet, jassenja tip ta’ ħbub groż jew ħbub fin għal kull referenza, u jorboth ma’ Bażi ta’ Għarfien Ingliż (KB) jekk ikun marbut. Aħna nilħqu dan l-għan billi nagħmlu sensiela ta' metodi ġodda ta' tħaffir fil-minjieri KB: niġġeneraw annotazzjonijiet 'standard tal-fidda' billi nittrasferixxu annotazzjonijiet mill-Ingliż għal lingwi oħra permezz ta' rabtiet translingwi u proprjetajiet KB, nirraffinaw l-annotazzjonijiet permezz ta' taħriġ awto-tekniku u għa żla ta' suġġetti, nipproduċu karatteristiċi morfoloġiċi speċifiċi għall-lingwa minn ) u l-minjieri ta’ pari ta’ traduzzjoni tal-kliem minn rabtiet translingwi. Kemm it-tikkettar tal-ismijiet kif ukoll ir-riżultati li jorbtu għal 282 lingwa huma promettenti fuq id-dejta tal-Wikipedia u fuq id-dejta tal-Wikipedia.", 'pl': 'Ambitnym celem niniejszej pracy jest opracowanie wielojęzycznego frameworku tagowania i linkowania nazw dla języków 282 istniejących w Wikipedii. Mając na uwadze dokument w dowolnym z tych języków, nasz framework jest w stanie zidentyfikować wzmianki nazw, przypisać gruboziarnisty lub drobnoziarnisty typ do każdej wzmianki i powiązać ją z Angielską Bazą Wiedzy (KB), jeśli można ją łączyć. Cel ten osiągamy poprzez wykonanie serii nowych metod eksploatacji KB: generowanie adnotacji "srebrnego standardu" poprzez przenoszenie adnotacji z angielskiego do innych języków poprzez linki między językami i właściwościami KB, udoskonalanie adnotacji poprzez samokszkolenie i wybór tematów, pobieranie cech morfologicznych specyficznych dla języka z linków kotwicących, i wydobywanie par tłumaczeń słów z linków wielojęzycznych. Zarówno oznaczanie nazw, jak i wyniki linkowania dla języków 282 są obiecujące na danych Wikipedii i danych Wikipedii.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අවශ්\u200dයය අරමුණ තමයි විකිපිඩියාවේ තියෙන්නේ 282 භාෂාවක් සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාකාරණයක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරන්න. මේ භාෂාවයේ කිසිම දේවල් වලින් ලිපිණියක් දෙන්න, අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය නම් කියන්න පුළුවන්, කෝර්ස්-ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් නැත්නම් හැම කියන්න පුළුවන්ට ප්\u200dරමාණයක අපි මේ අරමුණ විදිහට අලුත් KB මනින් විදිහයක් කරන්නේ අලුත් KB මනින් විදිහට: සිල්ලි-ස්ටැන්ඩ්යාන්ඩ්යාන්ඩ්යාන්ඩ්යාන්ඩ්යාන්ඩ් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් අනිත් භාෂා විශාල භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් වාර්තාවක් පරිවර්තනය කරන්න. 282 භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්නා නම ටැග් කරන්න සහ අයිකිපිඩියා දත්ත සහ විකිපිඩියාවට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා.', 'sr': "ambiciozan cilj ovog rada je razviti prejezično ime označavanje i povezanje okvira 282 jezika koje postoje u Vikipediji. S obzirom na dokument na bilo kojem od tih jezika, naš okvir je u stanju da identifikuje spomenute imena, da odredi vrstu zrnca ili finog zrnca svakom spominjanju i poveže ga na englesku bazu znanja (KB) ako je povezano. Postigli smo taj cilj izvršavajući niz novih metoda rudarstva KB-a: stvaranje 'srebrnog standarda' annotacija, prenošenjem annotacija sa engleskog na druge jezike kroz cross-lingual links i svojstva KB-a, refinansiranjem annotacija kroz samohrabrenje i izbor teme, izvlačenjem specifičnih morfologija jezika iz veza anchora, I rudarski parovi prevođenja reèi iz meðujezičkih veza. Oboje oznake imena i povezivanje rezultata za 282 jezika obećavaju na podacima Wikipedije i na Wikipediji.", 'so': "Ujeedada shaqadaas waa in la horumariyo magaca afka kala duwan oo lagu qoro iyo isku xiri karo qoraal 282 luqadood oo ku jira Wikipedia. Sida uu dukumenti ku qoray luuqadahaas oo dhan, noocyadayada ayaa aqoonsan kara magaca, wuxuu u sameyn karaa nooca koorasyada lagu qoray ama si fiican loo qoray, wuxuuna ku xiri karaa aasaaska aqoonta Ingiriiska (KB) haddii ay isku xiran tahay. Waxaynu ku gaadhnaa goalkan si aan u sameyno qaabab cusub oo KB ah: soo saarno alaabta 'lacagta-standard' oo afka Ingiriiska uga wareejinaya luqadaha kale si aad ugu wareejiso xiriirka luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo xirfadaha KB, oo ku sawiranno iskuul-tababarida iyo doorashada mada, oo ka soo bandhigta xariirka kaarka iyo qorsheynta labada turjumidda hadalka oo ka soo qoran xiriiraha luuqadaha kala duwan. Both name tagging and linking results for 282 languages are promising on Wikipedia data and on-Wikipedia data.", 'ro': 'Obiectivul ambițios al acestei lucrări este de a dezvolta un cadru de etichetare și legare a numelor între limbi pentru 282 de limbi care există în Wikipedia. Având în vedere un document în oricare dintre aceste limbi, cadrul nostru este capabil să identifice mențiunile de nume, să atribuie un tip cu granule grosiere sau fine fiecărei mențiuni și să-l conecteze la o bază de cunoștințe în limba engleză (KB), dacă este conectabilă. Realizăm acest obiectiv prin efectuarea unei serii de noi metode de mining KB: generarea adnotărilor "standard argintiu" prin transferul adnotărilor din limba engleză în alte limbi prin intermediul linkurilor cross-lingve și proprietăților KB, rafinarea adnotărilor prin auto-instruire și selectarea subiectelor, derivarea caracteristicilor morfologice specifice limbii din linkurile de ancoră, și extragerea perechilor de traduceri de cuvinte din legături încrucișate. Atât etichetarea numelor, cât și rezultatele legate de legături pentru 282 de limbi sunt promițătoare pe datele Wikipedia și pe datele Wikipedia.', 'sv': "Det ambitiösa målet med detta arbete är att utveckla ett flerspråkigt namnmärknings- och länkningsramverk för 282 språk som finns i Wikipedia. Med ett dokument på något av dessa språk kan vårt ramverk identifiera namnomnämningar, tilldela en grovkornig eller finkornig typ till varje omnämning och länka den till en engelsk kunskapsbas (KB) om den är länkad. Vi uppnår detta mål genom att utföra en serie nya KB-mining metoder: generera 'silver-standard' anteckningar genom att överföra anteckningar från engelska till andra språk genom korspråkiga länkar och KB-egenskaper, förfina anteckningar genom självträning och ämnesval, härleda språkspecifika morfologifunktioner från ankarlänkar, och utvinna ordöversättningspar från korspråkiga länkar. Både namnmärkning och länkningsresultat för 282 språk är lovande på Wikipedia data och på Wikipedia data.", 'ta': "விக்கிபிடியாவில் இருக்கும் 282 மொழிகளுக்கு ஒரு கிரும்மொழியின் பெயர் குறிக்கும் மற்றும் இணைப்பு சட்டத்தை உருவாக்கு இந்த மொழிகளில் எந்த ஆவணத்திலும் கொடுக்கப்பட்டால், எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் பெயர் குறிப்புகளை அடையாளமுடியும், ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்புக்கும் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப் நாம் புதிய கேபி குழப்பத்தின் முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்தி இந்த இலக்கை அடைய வேண்டும்: ஆங்கிலத்திலிருந்து மற்ற மொழிகளிலிருந்து அறிவிப்புகளை மாற்றி கொண்டு 'வெள்ளி- நிலையான' விளக்கங்களை உருவ மொழி இணைப்புகளில் இருந்து வார்த்தை மொழிமாற்றி ஜோடிகளை குறைக்கவும். Both name tagging and linking results for 282 languages are promising on Wikipedia data and on-Wikipedia data.", 'ur': 'اس کام کی مہربانی کا موقع یہ ہے کہ 282 زبانوں کے لئے ایک مختلف زبان کا نام ٹاگ اور متصل کرنا ہے جو ویکیپیڈیا میں موجود ہیں۔ یہ زبانوں میں سے کسی دفتر کے ذریعہ سے ہمارا فرمود نام کی تعریف کرسکتا ہے، ہر ذریعہ کے لئے کورس دانے یا پاکیزہ دانے کا طریقہ مقرر کرسکتا ہے، اور اسے ایک انگلیسی علم Base (KB) سے متصل کرسکتا ہے اگر یہ متصل ہو سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے اس موقع کو پہنچا دیا ہے کہ نو ک ب کی مینگ طریقوں کے ساتھ ایک سری طریقے پر عمل کریں: انگلیسی سے نوٹیزوں کو دوسری زبانوں کے ذریعہ متصل کریں اور کب کی ویاپیٹوں کے ذریعہ، اپنی تدریس اور ٹوپ انتخاب کے ذریعہ نوٹیزوں کو اپنا تدریس اور ٹوپ انتخاب کے ذریعہ، انچر لینکوں اور مختلف زبان لینکوں سے کلمات کی ترجمہ جوڑے مٹاتے ہیں۔ 282 زبانوں کے نتائج ٹاگ کرنے اور اتصال کرنے کے لئے ویکیپیڈیا ڈیٹا اور ویکیپیڈیا ڈیٹا پر وعدہ دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Ushbu ishning eng qiziqarli maqsadi Wikipedia mavjud boʻlgan 282 tillar uchun bir necha tillar nomini yozish va bogʻlash freymini yaratish. Bu tildagi bir nechta hujjat boʻlgan boʻlsa, freymmiz nomining nomini aniqlashga, har bir necha qoʻllangan yoki qoʻllangan turni qoʻshish mumkin, va buni bogʻlash mumkin boʻlsa, ingliz илм asosiga bogʻlash mumkin. Biz bu maqolani yangi KB mining usullarini bajarish orqali bajaramiz: ingliz tildan boshqa tillardan taʼminotlarni bir necha tillar bilan boshqa tillarda ajratish uchun 'silver- standard' taʼminotlar yaratish, bir necha tillar bogʻlamalari va KB xossalari orqali o'zgartirish, o'zimni o'zgartirish va mavzu tizimni tanlash orfologiy xususiyatlarini o'zgartirish mumkin,  and mining word translation pairs from cross-lingual links.  @ info: status", 'vi': 'Mục tiêu đầy tham vọng của công việc này là phát triển danh sách ngôn ngữ khác nhau và kết nối hệ thống ngôn ngữ 22 đang tồn tại trên Wikipedia. Dựa vào một tài liệu trong một số các ngôn ngữ này, cơ sở của chúng tôi có thể xác định tên chỉ định, chỉ định một kiểu có sắc màu thô hoặc sắc màu cho mỗi lần nhắc, và kết nối nó với một nền hiểu biết tiếng Anh (KB) nếu nó có thể liên kết. Chúng ta đạt được mục tiêu này bằng cách thực hiện một loạt các phương pháp khai thác khai thác mới của KB: tạo ra các ghi chú "mẫu mực" bằng cách chuyển ghi chú từ tiếng Anh sang ngôn ngữ khác, thông qua các mối liên kết ngôn ngữ khác nhau và tính chất của KB, thu thập các chú thích bằng tự đào tạo và chọn chuyên môn, lấy từ các đặc điểm cụ thể. và cách dịch từ khai thác từ ngữ khác nhau. Cả đánh dấu tên và kết nối kết quả của 22 đều được hứa hẹn trên Wikipedia và cả các dữ liệu trên Wikipedia.', 'hr': "ambiciozan cilj ovog rada je razviti preko jezika označavanje i povezanje okvira 282 jezika koje postoje u Wikipediji. S obzirom na dokument u bilo kojem od tih jezika, naš okvir je u mogućnosti identificirati spomenute imena, dodati vrstu zrnca ili finog zrnca svakom spominjanju i povezati ga na englesku bazu znanja (KB) ako je povezano. Postigli smo taj cilj izvršavajući niz novih metoda rudarstva KB-a: proizvedenje 'srebrnog standarda' annotacija prebacivanjem annotacija sa engleskog na druge jezike kroz cross-lingual links i svojstva KB-a, refinansiranjem annotacija kroz samouvježbu i izbor teme, izvlačenje specifičnih morfologija jezika iz veza anchora, I rudarski parovi prevođenja riječi iz preko jezika. Oboje oznake imena i povezivanje rezultata za 282 jezika obećavaju podatke o Wikipediji i podacima na Wikipediji.", 'da': "Det ambitiøse mål med dette arbejde er at udvikle en tværsproget navnetegning og linking ramme for 282 sprog, der findes i Wikipedia. Med et dokument på et af disse sprog er vores rammer i stand til at identificere navnenavn, tildele en grovkornet eller finkornet type til hver omtale og linke det til en engelsk vidensbase (KB), hvis det er linkbar. Vi opnår dette mål ved at udføre en række nye KB mining metoder: generere 'sølvstandard' annotationer ved at overføre annotationer fra engelsk til andre sprog gennem tværsprogede links og KB egenskaber, raffinere annotationer gennem selvtræning og emnevalg, udlede sprogspecifikke morfologiske funktioner fra ankerlinks, og mining ord oversættelse par fra tværsprogede links. Både navnmærkning og linkning resultater for 282 sprog er lovende på Wikipedia data og on-Wikipedia data.", 'de': "Das ehrgeizige Ziel dieser Arbeit ist die Entwicklung eines sprachübergreifenden Frameworks für das Tagging und Verlinken von Namen für 282 Sprachen, die in Wikipedia existieren. Wenn ein Dokument in einer dieser Sprachen vorliegt, ist unser Framework in der Lage, Namensmerkungen zu identifizieren, jeder Erwähnung einen grobkörnigen oder feinkörnigen Typ zuzuweisen und es mit einer englischen Knowledge Base (KB) zu verknüpfen, wenn es verlinkt werden kann. Wir erreichen dieses Ziel durch die Durchführung einer Reihe neuer KB-Mining-Methoden: Generieren von 'Silber-Standard'-Annotationen durch Übertragung von Annotationen aus dem Englischen in andere Sprachen durch sprachübergreifende Links und KB-Eigenschaften, Verfeinern von Annotationen durch Selbsttraining und Themenauswahl, Ableiten sprachspezifischer Morphologiemerkmale aus Ankerlinks, und Mining von Wortübersetzungspaaren aus crosslingualen Links. Sowohl Name Tagging als auch Verlinkungsergebnisse für 282 Sprachen sind vielversprechend auf Wikipedia Daten und auf Wikipedia Daten.", 'nl': "Het ambitieuze doel van dit werk is om een cross-lingual name tagging en linking framework te ontwikkelen voor 282 talen die bestaan in Wikipedia. Met een document in een van deze talen kan ons framework naamvermeldingen identificeren, een grof- of fijnkorrelig type toewijzen aan elke vermelding en het koppelen aan een Engelse Knowledge Base (KB) als het koppelbaar is. We bereiken dit doel door een reeks nieuwe KB mining methoden uit te voeren: het genereren van 'zilveren standaard' annotaties door annotaties van het Engels naar andere talen door middel van cross-lingual links en KB eigenschappen, het verfijnen van annotaties door zelftraining en topic selectie, het afleiden van taalspecifieke morfologische kenmerken van ankerlinks, en mijnen van woordvertaalparen van cross-lingual links. Zowel naamlabeling als linking resultaten voor 282 talen zijn veelbelovend op Wikipedia data en op Wikipedia data.", 'fa': 'هدف جالب این کار این است که یک نام متوسط زبان را توسعه کنیم و چهارچوب مرتبط برای 282 زبان که در ویکیپدیا وجود دارد. با توجه به یک سند در هر کدام از این زبانها، چهارچوب ما می تواند نام ذکر را شناسایی کند، یک نوع دانه\u200cهای نازک یا دانه\u200cهای نازک به هر یادآوری واگذار کند، و آن را به یک پایگاه دانش انگلیسی (KB) ارتباط دهد اگر قابل ارتباط باشد. ما این هدف را با انجام مجموعه\u200cای از روش\u200cهای ذخیره\u200cکننده\u200cی KB جدید می\u200cرسانیم: تولید کردن نوشته\u200cهای «استاندارد نقره» با انتقال نوشته\u200cها از انگلیسی به زبان\u200cهای دیگر از طریق ارتباطات متوسط زبان\u200cها و ویژگی\u200cهای KB، تولید کردن نوشته\u200cها از طریق تمرین خود و انتخاب موضوع، تولی و جفت ترجمه کردن کلمه\u200cها از ارتباطات متفاوت زبان. در اطلاعات ويکيپديا و اطلاعات ويکيپديا، نتيجه\u200cهاي ارتباط براي 282 زبان قول ميدن.', 'sw': "Lengo kubwa la kazi hii ni kutengeneza jina la lugha mbalimbali na kuunganisha mfumo wa lugha 282 zinazopo Wikipedia. Kwa kutumia nyaraka katika lugha zote hizi, mfumo wetu una uwezo wa kutambua majina yake, kuweka a in a ya kodi inayozungumzwa au yenye vizuri kwa kila tajwa, na kuiunganisha kwenye msingi wa ufahamu wa Kiingereza (KB) kama inawezekana. Tunaweza kufikia lengo hili kwa kutekeleza mfululizo wa mbinu mpya za madini za KB: Kutengeneza matangazo ya 'fedha-standard' kwa kuhamisha matangazo kutoka Kiingereza hadi lugha nyingine kupitia viungo vya lugha mbalimbali na vifaa vya KB, kutambulisha matangazo kupitia mafunzo ya kujifunza na mada ya kujichagua, na kutoa vipengele maalum vya kifolojia kutoka kwenye viungo vya kiungo, na kuchimba tafsiri za maneno kutoka viungo vya lugha mbalimbali. Jina zote zinaonyesha na matokeo yanayounganisha kwa lugha 282 yanaahidi taarifa za Wikipedia na taarifa za Wikipedia.", 'bg': 'Амбициозната цел на тази работа е да се разработи междуезична рамка за етикетиране на имената и свързване на 282 езика, които съществуват в Уикипедия. Предвид документ на който и да е от тези езици, нашата рамка е в състояние да идентифицира споменаванията на имената, да присвоява грубозърнест или финозърнест тип на всяко споменаване и да го свързва с английска база знания (КБ), ако може да бъде свързана. Постигаме тази цел чрез извършване на поредица от нови методи за добив на КБ: генериране на анотации "сребърен стандарт" чрез прехвърляне на анотации от английски на други езици чрез междуезични връзки и свойства на КБ, усъвършенстване на анотациите чрез самообучение и подбор на теми, извличане на специфични за езика морфологични характеристики от анкерни връзки, и извличане на двойки превод на думи от междуезични връзки. Както етикетирането на имената, така и резултатите от свързването на 282 езика са обещаващи за данните в Уикипедия и в Уикипедия.', 'tr': "Bu işiň hyzmat maksady Wikipediýada 282 diller üçin çarpaz dil taýýarlama we baglaşma. Bu dillerde bir sened görä, biziň çerämiz adlary çykaryp bilýär, iňlis dilinde goýup bilen iňlis bilim tabasyna baglaýyp biler. Biz bu maksady birnäçe täze KB taýýarlama yöntemlerini ýetirerek: 'gümüş-standart' döwürmeklerden iňlisçe dillerden beýleki dillere terjime edip, öz-okuw we tema saýlamak bilen täzelikleri taýýarlap, anchor baglaýyşlardan hasaplanýan morfologiýasyny çykaryp, Çaltylyk baglaýyşlardan söz terjime çiftleri azalýar 282 dilleriň netijesini tapmak we baglaşdyrmak üçin Wikipedia maglumatynda söz berýär.", 'af': "Die ambisiese doel van hierdie werk is om 'n kruistale naam te ontwikkel en te koppel raamwerk vir 282 tale wat in Wikipedia bestaan. As 'n dokument in enige van hierdie tale gegee word, is ons raamwerk in staat om naam te identifiseer, toewys 'n kors-koring of fyn-koring tipe a an elke bepaal, en skakel dit na 'n Engelske kennisbasis (Kb) as dit kan verbind word. Ons het hierdie doel bereik deur 'n reeks van nuwe Kb mining metodes te doen: genereer 'silwer-standaard' annotasies deur annotasies van Engels na ander tale deur kruistale skakels en Kb eienskappe te oordra, opwerf annotasies deur self-onderwerp en onderwerp keuse, afgelei taal-spesifieke morfologiese funksies van anker skakels, en mining woord vertaling paar van kruistale skakels. Beide naam merking en linking resultate vir 282 tale word beloof op Wikipedia data en op-Wikipedia data.", 'am': "የዚህ ሥራ ጉዳዩ በWikipedia ውስጥ ለ282 ቋንቋዎች የሚኖረውን የቋንቋ ስም ማተሚያ እና የግንኙነት ፍሬማር መፍጠር ነው፡፡ ከዚህም ቋንቋዎች ሁሉ የተሰኘ ሰነድ፣ ፍሬማችን የስሜን ስም ማሳየት ይችላል፣ ለሁሉም ትእዛዝ የተመሳሳይ ወይም የተመሳሰለ የኮርፖር ዓይነት ያቆማል፣ እናም ይታያል ብልሃተኛ እውቀት መቀመጫ (KB) ቢሆንም ያግኘዋል፡፡ We achieve this goal by performing a series of new KB mining methods: generating 'silver-standard' annotations by transferring annotations from English to other languages through cross-lingual links and KB properties, refining annotations through self-training and topic selection, deriving language-specific morphology features from anchor links, የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነቶችን እና የቃላት ትርጉም ዓይነቶችን ማጭበር. የ282 ቋንቋዎች የስማቸው ማተሚያ እና ማጠቃለያ ፍሬዎችን በWikipedia ዳታ እና Wikipedia ዳታ ላይ የሚቀጠሩት ናቸው፡፡", 'sq': "Qëllimi ambicioz i kësaj pune është të zhvillohet një etiketë emri ndërgjuhës dhe lidhje kuadri për 282 gjuhë që ekzistojnë në Wikipedia. Duke pasur parasysh një dokument në ndonjë nga këto gjuhë, kuadri ynë është në gjendje të identifikojë përmendimet e emrave, të caktojë një lloj gruri apo gruri të hollë për çdo përmendim dhe ta lidhë me një bazë njohurie angleze (KB) nëse është e lidhur. We achieve this goal by performing a series of new KB mining methods: generating 'silver-standard' annotations by transferring annotations from English to other languages through cross-lingual links and KB properties, refining annotations through self-training and topic selection, deriving language-specific morphology features from anchor links, - dhe mining word translation pairs from cross-lingual links. Të dy etiketat e emrave dhe lidhjet e rezultateve për 282 gjuhë janë premtuese në të dhënat e Wikipedias dhe të dhënat e Wikipedias.", 'ko': "이 사업의 웅대한 목표는 위키백과에 존재하는 282개 언어를 위해 크로스 언어 이름 표시와 링크 프레임워크를 개발하는 것이다.이러한 언어 중 어느 언어든지 문서를 지정하면 프레임워크는 이름 언급을 식별하고 각 언급에 굵기 또는 세분도 유형을 지정하며 링크가 가능한 영어 지식 라이브러리(KB)에 연결할 수 있습니다.우리는 일련의 새로운 지식 라이브러리 발굴 방법을 집행함으로써 이 목표를 실현한다. 크로스 언어 링크와 지식 라이브러리 속성을 통해 주석을 영어에서 다른 언어로 옮겨'은표준'주석을 생성하고 자기 훈련과 주제 선택을 통해 주석을 세분화하며 닻 링크에서 언어에 특정한 형태학적 특징을 도출한다.그리고 크로스 언어 링크에서 단어를 발굴하여 번역합니다.위키백과 데이터와 위키백과 데이터에서 282개 언어의 명칭 표기와 링크 결과가 모두 희망적이다.", 'id': "Tujuan ambisius dari pekerjaan ini adalah untuk mengembangkan tagging nama saling bahasa dan menghubungkan kerangka untuk 282 bahasa yang ada di Wikipedia. Dengan memberikan dokumen dalam salah satu bahasa ini, kerangka kami mampu mengidentifikasi nama menyebutkan, memberikan tipe berwarna rumit atau berwarna rumit untuk setiap menyebutkan, dan menghubungkannya dengan Pangkalan Pengetahuan Inggris (KB) jika dapat dihubungkan. Kami mencapai tujuan ini dengan melakukan serangkaian metode penambangan KB baru: menghasilkan anotasi 'standar perak' dengan memindahkan anotasi dari bahasa Inggris ke bahasa lain melalui hubungan saling bahasa dan properti KB, merafinkan anotasi melalui latihan diri dan seleksi topik, menghasilkan karakteristik morfologi spesifik bahasa dari hubungan jangkar, Dan memeriksa pasangan terjemahan kata dari hubungan saling bahasa. Kedua tagging nama dan menghubungkan hasil untuk 282 bahasa berjanji pada data Wikipedia dan data on-Wikipedia.", 'az': "Bu işin məqsədili Wikipediada mövcud olan 282 dillər üçün çox dil etiketləmək və fərqli olmaq. Bu dillərdən hər hansı bir dökümə görə, bizim çerömümümüzün adlarını tanıyıb, hər bir yadına çör-çör və yaxın-çör türü təyin edə bilər və onu bir İngilizə Bilən Base (KB) ilə bağla bilər. Biz bu məqsədi yeni KB madenci metodlarını təqdim edirik: İngilizdən 'gümüş-standart' notlarını başqa dillərə göndərərərək, çox dil bağlantıları və KB özellikləri ilə, özünü təhsil etmək və məsələlər seçmək vasitəsilə notlarını təmizləyirik, dil-məsələn morfolojik şəkillərini anchor bağlantılarından təmizləyirik, Və dillərin çoxlu bağlantılarından kəlmə cütlərini dağıtmaq. 282 dillərin sonuçlarına etiketləməsi və bağlaması Wikipedia verilənlərdə və Wikipedia verilənlərdə vəd edirlər.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի բարձրահաճելի նպատակն է զարգացնել երկլեզվային անունների նշաններ և կապել համակարգը Վիքիփեդիայում գոյություն ունեցող 282 լեզուների համար: Այս լեզուներից յուրաքանչյուր փաստաթուղթ առնելով, մեր շրջանակը կարողանում է հայտնաբերել անունների նշանները, յուրաքանչյուր նշանների համար դաժան կամ նուրբ նշաններ տալ և կապել այն անգլերենի գիտելիքի հիմքի (ԿԲ) հետ, եթե այն կապված է: Մենք հասնում ենք այս նպատակին՝ կատարելով մի շարք նոր ԿԲ-ի հանքային մեթոդներ. ստեղծելով "արծաթ-ստանդարտ" նոտացիաներ՝ փոխանցելով նոտացիաները անգլերենից մյուս լեզուների միջոցով փոխլեզվով կապերի և ԿԲ-ի հատկությունների միջոցով, բարելավելով նոտացիաները ինքնավարժման և թեմայի ընտրության միջոց և բառերի թարգմանման զույգեր հանելու միջլեզվային կապերից: Երկու անունների նշանները և 282 լեզուների արդյունքները միավորվում են Վիքիփեդիայի և Վիքիփեդիայի տվյալների վրա:', 'ca': "L'ambiciós objectiu d'aquesta feina és desenvolupar una etiqueta de noms translingües i un marc de vinculació per a 282 llengües que existeixen a Wikipedia. Dant un document en qualsevol d'aquestes llengües, el nostre marc és capaç d'identificar les mencions de nom, d'assenyar un tipus gros o fins a cada menció, i d'enllaçar-lo a una Base de Conèixements anglesa (KB) si es pot enllaçar. Obtenim aquest objectiu fent una sèrie de nous mètodes de mineria de KB: generant anotacions de 'estándar de plata' transferint anotacions d'anglès a altres llengües a través de enllaços translingües i propietats de KB, refinant anotacions a través de l'autoentrenament i la selecció de tema, derivant característiques de morfologia específices per llengües dels enllaços d'ancora, i minerar parells de traducció de paraules a partir de enllaços translingües. Tant l'etiqueta dels noms com l'enllaç dels resultats de 282 llengües són prometedores a les dades de Wikipedia i a Wikipedia.", 'bn': 'এই কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে উইকিপিডিয়ায় বিদ্যমান ২৮২ ভাষার জন্য একটি ক্রস-ভাষার নাম ট্যাগিং এবং লিঙ্কিং কার্যক্রম তৈরি করা। এই সমস্ত ভাষায় কোন নথি দিয়ে আমাদের ফ্রেম কার্যক্রমের নামের কথা চিহ্নিত করতে পারে, প্রত্যেকটি উল্লেখের জন্য একটি কোর্স গ্রেফতার অথবা সুন্দর গ্রেফতার ধরন দিতে পা আমরা এই লক্ষ্য পৌঁছাই নতুন কেবি মিনিটিং পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে: ইংরেজি থেকে অন্য ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিষয়বস্তুর মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিষয়বস্তুর মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিষয়গুলো পরিবর্তন করে ইংরেজি   and mining word translation pairs from cross-lingual links.  ২৮২ ভাষার জন্য নাম ট্যাগিং এবং লিঙ্কিং ফলাফল উইকিপিডিয়া তথ্য এবং উইকিপিডিয়া তথ্যে প্রতিশ্রুতি দিচ্ছে।', 'cs': 'Ambiciózním cílem této práce je vyvinout cross-jazyčný framework pro tagování a linkování názvů pro 282 jazyky, které existují ve Wikipedii. Vzhledem k dokumentu v některém z těchto jazyků je náš framework schopen identifikovat zmínky názvů, přiřadit hrubozrnný nebo jemnozrnný typ každé zmínky a propojit ji s anglickou znalostní bází (KB), pokud je propojitelná. Tohoto cíle dosahujeme prováděním řady nových metod těžby KB: generování anotací "stříbrného standardu" přenosem anotací z angličtiny do jiných jazyků prostřednictvím vícejazyčných odkazů a vlastností KB, zdokonalování anotací prostřednictvím samotného školení a výběru témat, odvození jazykově specifických morfologických prvků z kotevních odkazů, a dolování slovních párů překladů z cross-jazyčných odkazů. Výsledky označování jmen a propojení pro 282 jazyky jsou slibné na Wikipedii a Wikipedii.', 'fi': 'Tämän työn kunnianhimoinen tavoite on kehittää monikielinen nimitagging- ja linkityskehys 282 kielelle, jotka ovat olemassa Wikipediassa. Kun asiakirja on jollakin näistä kielistä, viitekehyksemme pystyy tunnistamaan nimimaininnat, määrittämään karkean tai hienojakoisen tyypin kuhunkin mainintaan ja linkittämään sen englanninkieliseen Knowledge Base (KB), jos se on linkitettävissä. Tavoitteeseen pääsemme suorittamalla sarjan uusia KB-louhintamenetelmiä: luoda hopeastandardeja annotointeja siirtämällä annotointeja englannista muille kielille monikielisten linkkien ja KB-ominaisuuksien avulla, tarkentaa annotointeja itsekoulutuksen ja aihevalinnan avulla, johtaa kielikohtaisia morfologisia ominaisuuksia ankkurilinkeistä, ja kaivaa sanakäännöspareja monikielisistä linkeistä. Sekä nimimerkinnät että linkitystulokset 282 kielelle ovat lupaavia Wikipedian ja Wikipedian tiedoissa.', 'et': 'Selle töö ambitsioonikaks eesmärgiks on arendada välja keeleülene nimemärgistus- ja linkimisraamistik 282 keelele, mis eksisteerivad Wikipedias. Kuna dokument on mõnes neist keeltest, on meie raamistik võimeline tuvastama nimemärke, määrama igale mainimisele jämeda- või peeneteteralise tüübi ja siduma selle inglise teabebaasiga (KB), kui see on linkitav. Selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks teostame mitmeid uusi KB kaevandamismeetodeid: hõbedase standardiga annotatsioonide genereerimine inglise keelest teistesse keeltesse läbi keeleüleste linkide ja KB omaduste, annotatsioonide täiustamine eneseõppe ja teemavaliku kaudu, keelespetsiifiliste morfoloogiliste omaduste tuletamine ankurlinkidest, ja kaevandamine sõnade tõlkepaarid keeleüleste linkide kaudu. Nii nimede sildistamise kui ka linkimise tulemused 282 keeles on paljulubavad Wikipedia andmetes ja Wikipedia andmetes.', 'bs': "ambiciozan cilj ovog rada je razviti prejezično ime označavanje i povezanje okvira 282 jezika koje postoje na Wikipediji. S obzirom na dokument na bilo kojem od tih jezika, naš okvir je u stanju identificirati spomenute imena, odrediti vrstu zrnca ili finog zrnca svakom spominjanju i povezati ga na englesku bazu znanja (KB) ako je povezano. Postigli smo taj cilj izvršavajući niz novih metoda rudarstva KB-a: proizvedenje 'srebrnog standarda' annotacija prebacivanjem annotacija sa engleskog na druge jezike kroz cross-lingual links i svojstva KB-a, refinansiranjem annotacija kroz samouvježbu i izbor teme, proizvedenje specifičnih morfologija jezika iz veza anchora, I rudarski parovi prevođenja riječi iz preko jezika. Oboje oznake imena i povezivanje rezultata za 282 jezika obećavaju na podacima Wikipedije i na Wikipediji.", 'ha': "Ganin wannan aikin na kiyaye shi ne ta utoar wata sunan-harsunan ta tsoronto da ke haɗa firam na 282 lugha wanda ke cikin Wikimedia. Gida wata takardar cikin kõwa daga harshen waɗannan, firam ɗin mu na iya iya gane sunan, ka ƙayyade wata nau'in kowace-grammani ko kuma ka sami shi zuwa Basin Sann Ingiriya (KB) idan yana da amfani da shi. Tuna cika wannan goa da za'a sami wasu hanyoyin kungiya na KB: @ info: whatsthis @ info", 'sk': 'Ambiciozen cilj tega dela je razviti medjezični okvir za označevanje imen in povezovanje 282 jezikov, ki obstajajo v Wikipediji. Glede na dokument v katerem koli od teh jezikov lahko naš okvir prepozna omembe imen, dodeli grobo ali drobnozrnato vrsto vsake omembe in jo poveže z angleško zbirko znanja (KB), če je mogoče povezati. Ta cilj dosežemo z izvajanjem vrste novih metod rudarjenja KB: ustvarjanjem "srebrnih standardov" opomb s prenosom opomb iz angleščine v druge jezike prek medjezičnih povezav in lastnosti KB, izboljšanjem opomb s samousposabljanjem in izbiro teme, izpeljanjem morfoloških značilnosti za jezik iz sidrnih povezav, in kopanje parov prevajanja besed iz medjezičnih povezav. Rezultati označevanja imen in povezovanja za 282 jezikov so obetavni na podatkih Wikipedije in na Wikipediji.', 'jv': "goal Nyong ngomong dokumen ning langgambar iki, akeh iso nggawe jeneng jeneng nggawe jeneng nggo nambah, nggawe sewelas kotak dhuwur, nambah dhuwur kesempatan kanggo nambah. Una ngono kongka-kongka dhuwur kuwi nggo ngerasah Seneng Daftar Language Awak dhéwé nggawe bukané karo nggawe sistem sing bagian kb tapi nggawe sistem batar mên: génering 'salak-Standard' jakyatané sing nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ingkang dilané karo sistem sing wis luwih dumateng na karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan karo kB-jaggekan, gawe nguasal terus-cara nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan dumateng kuwi nggawe sistem pasar word Nomo kang ditambah lan nganggo perusahaan sampeyan kanggo langa-loro luwih dumaten ning data Wiipedya karo data Wiipedya.", 'he': "המטרה השאיפתית של העבודה הזו היא לפתח תג בשם צלול שפתיים ומקשר מסגרת 282 שפות שקיים בוויקיפדיה. בהתחשב במסמך בשפות אלו, המסגרת שלנו מסוגלת לזהות את הזכרות בשמות, להוסיף סוג גסים או גסים גסים לכל הזכרה, ולקשר אותו לבסיס ידע אנגלי (KB) אם הוא מקושר. אנו משיגים את המטרה הזו על ידי ביצוע סדרה של שיטות מכירה חדשות של KB: לייצר ציונים 'סטנדרטי כסף' על ידי העברה של ציונים מאנגלית לשפות אחרות דרך קשרים דרך שפות וחזקים KB, מעדיף ציונים דרך אימון עצמי ובחירת נושאים, תוצר תכונות מורפולוגיות ספציפיות לשפות מקושר, ומכרות זוגות תרגום מילים מהקשרים שפותיים. שני תגים בשמות וקשרים תוצאות עבור 282 שפות מבטיחות על נתוני ויקיפדיה ובנתוני ויקיפדיה.", 'bo': "The ambitious goal of this work is to develop a cross-lingual name tagging and linking framework for 282 languages that exist in Wikipedia. Given a document in any of these languages, our framework is able to identify name mentions, assign a coarse-grained or fine-grained type to each mention, and link it to an English Knowledge Base (KB) if it is linkable. We achieve this goal by performing a series of new KB mining methods: generating 'silver-standard' annotations by transferring annotations from English to other languages through cross-lingual links and KB properties, refining annotations through self-training and topic selection, deriving language-specific morphology features from anchor links, སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ཐུང་ཚིག་འདྲ་བར་གཏོང་བྱེད། 282 སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་མིང་བཀོད་རུང་དང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནུས་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་Wikipedia་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་Wikipedia་ཡིག་ཆ"}
{'en': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'fr': "Formation contradictoire pour l'initiation au lexique bilingue non supervisé", 'ar': 'التدريب على الخصومة لتحريض المعجم ثنائي اللغة غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'es': 'Entrenamiento contradictorio para la inducción de léxico bilingüe no supervisado', 'pt': 'Treinamento Adversarial para Indução de Léxico Bilíngue Não Supervisionado', 'ja': '教師なしバイリンガル辞書紹介のための対抗トレーニング', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण', 'zh': '无监督双语词典归之抗练', 'ru': 'Состязательная тренировка для неконтролируемой двуязычной лексиконической индукции', 'ga': "Oiliúint Sáraíochta d'Ionduchtú Foclóir Dátheangach Gan Maoirseacht", 'ka': 'კონსპერსალიური სასწავლობა არაფერიზებული ორგანიზებული ლექსიკონის ინდექციაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli kétnyelvű lexikon indukció mellékhatásos képzése', 'el': 'Κατάρτιση αντιπάλου για την μη εποπτευόμενη δίγλωσση επαγωγή λεξικού', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas mokymas nekontroliuojamai dvikalbei leksikono indukcijai', 'kk': 'Сәйкестірілмеген екі лексикалық индукциясының белсендік оқытуы', 'mk': 'Неуспешна обука за ненадгледувана индукција на двогласни лексикони', 'it': "Formazione avversaria per l'induzione bilingue non controllata del lessico", 'ms': 'Latihan Perlawanan untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual Tidak Dikawal', 'mt': 'Taħriġ Adversarju għall-Induzzjoni Bilinguali tal-Lexicon Mhux Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Хамгаалахгүй хоёр дахь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тусламж', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ബിലിങ്കുള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തിനുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന പരിശീലി', 'no': 'Rekursarialt trening for ugjennomsiktig utvikling', 'ro': 'Instruire adversă pentru inducţia lexiconică bilingvă nesupravegheată', 'pl': 'Szkolenie przeciwników dla niekontrolowanej dwujęzycznej indukcji leksykonu', 'sr': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'si': 'බිලින්ගුල් ලෙක්සිකෝන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'sv': 'Adversarial utbildning för icke övervakad tvåspråkig Lexikoninduktion', 'so': 'Waxbarashada horumarinta ah ee laga ilaaliyo luqada bilowga', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத பில்லிங்கல் லெக்சிகோன் காட்சிக்கான முன்னேற்பட்ட பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'بغیر محفوظ دوئینگ لکسیسون کی تعلیم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền giáo ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Обучение за неконтролирана двуезична лексиконна индукция', 'da': 'Adversarial træning i ukontrolleret tosproget Lexikoninduktion', 'hr': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupported Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'nl': 'Adversaire training voor niet-begeleide tweetalige lexicon inductie', 'de': 'Adversarial Training für die unbeaufsichtigte zweisprachige Lexikon Induktion', 'id': 'Pelatihan Adversarial untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual Tidak Disupervisi', 'ko': '비감독 이중 언어 어휘 귀납의 대항적 훈련', 'sw': 'Mafunzo ya kitaifa kwa ajili ya muundo wa Lexico isiyofuatiliwa kwa lugha za Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Gaýtalanmadyk ikinji sany leksiýan gaýtalanmagy üçin döwletli eğitim', 'af': 'Adversariale Oefening vir Ononderwerpende Bilinguele Leksiese Induksie', 'sq': 'Trenimin kundërshtar për induksionin e leksikonit të paaftë', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկոնի անվերահսկվող երկլեզու ինդուկցիայի հակառակ վարժում', 'az': '䷃뱶즙晦즙焠敤楬淉饭槅鼠쒰歩湣椠䱥歳楹潮⁉湤畫獹潮甊', 'bs': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'am': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'bn': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'ca': 'Adversarial Training for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoolitus järelevalveta kahekeelse leksikoni induktsiooni jaoks', 'fa': 'آموزش تحصیل برای تأثیر درمانی دوگانه\u200cای غیرقابل تحصیل', 'fi': 'Haittavaikutuskoulutus valvomattomaan kaksikieliseen leksikonin induktioon', 'cs': 'Nepříznivý trénink pro indukci dvojjazyčného Lexikonu bez kontroly', 'jv': 'Advertary Learning for Bilingual Lextation', 'he': 'אימון נוגדי לייצור לקסיקון משולש ללא השגחה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Neželeno usposabljanje za nenadzorovano dvojezično indukcijo leksikonov', 'bo': 'སྲུང་སྐྱོབ་མེད་པའི་ཟུར་བ་གྱི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསླགས་སྐབས་གཏོང།'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings are well known to capture linguistic regularities of the language on which they are trained. Researchers also observe that these regularities can transfer across languages. However, previous endeavors to connect separate monolingual word embeddings typically require cross-lingual signals as supervision, either in the form of parallel corpus or seed lexicon. In this work, we show that such cross-lingual connection can actually be established without any form of supervision. We achieve this end by formulating the problem as a natural adversarial game, and investigating techniques that are crucial to successful training. We carry out evaluation on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task. Even though this task appears intrinsically cross-lingual, we are able to demonstrate encouraging performance without any cross-lingual clues.', 'ar': 'من المعروف جيدًا أن حفلات الزفاف بالكلمات تلتقط الانتظام اللغوي للغة التي يتم تدريبهم عليها. لاحظ الباحثون أيضًا أن هذه الانتظامات يمكن أن تنتقل عبر اللغات. ومع ذلك ، فإن المساعي السابقة لربط عمليات ضم الكلمات أحادية اللغة المنفصلة تتطلب عادةً إشارات عبر اللغات كإشراف ، إما في شكل مجموعة متوازية أو معجم أولي. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أنه يمكن في الواقع إنشاء مثل هذا الاتصال عبر اللغات دون أي شكل من أشكال الإشراف. نحقق هذه الغاية من خلال صياغة المشكلة على أنها لعبة خصم طبيعية ، والتحقيق في التقنيات التي تعتبر ضرورية للتدريب الناجح. نجري تقييمًا لمهمة الاستقراء غير الخاضعة للرقابة للمعجم ثنائي اللغة. على الرغم من أن هذه المهمة تبدو متعددة اللغات بشكل جوهري ، إلا أننا قادرون على إظهار أداء مشجع دون أي أدلة عبر اللغات.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots sont bien connues pour saisir les régularités linguistiques de la langue dans laquelle ils sont formés. Les chercheurs ont également observé que ces régularités peuvent se transférer d'une langue à l'autre. Cependant, les tentatives précédentes pour connecter des intégrations de mots monolingues distinctes nécessitent généralement des signaux interlinguistiques comme supervision, soit sous la forme d'un corpus parallèle, soit d'un lexique de base. Dans ce travail, nous montrons qu'une telle connexion interlinguistique peut effectivement être établie sans aucune forme de supervision. Nous y parvenons en formulant le problème comme un jeu d'adversaire naturel et en étudiant les techniques qui sont essentielles à la réussite de l'entraînement. Nous effectuons une évaluation de la tâche d'introduction au lexique bilingue non supervisé. Même si cette tâche semble intrinsèquement multilingue, nous sommes en mesure de démontrer des performances encourageantes sans aucun indice interlinguistique.", 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras son bien conocidas por capturar las regularidades lingüísticas del idioma en el que están entrenados. Los investigadores también observan que estas regularidades pueden transferirse de un idioma a otro. Sin embargo, los esfuerzos anteriores para conectar inserciones de palabras monolingües por lo general requieren señales multilingües como supervisión, ya sea en forma de corpus paralelo o léxico semilla. En este trabajo, mostramos que tal conexión interlingüística se puede establecer sin ningún tipo de supervisión. Logramos este fin formulando el problema como un juego de confrontación natural e investigando técnicas que son cruciales para un entrenamiento exitoso. Llevamos a cabo la evaluación de la tarea de inducción al léxico bilingüe sin supervisión. A pesar de que esta tarea parece intrínsecamente multilingüe, podemos demostrar un rendimiento alentador sin ninguna pista multilingüe.', 'pt': 'As incorporações de palavras são bem conhecidas por capturar as regularidades linguísticas da língua na qual são treinadas. Os pesquisadores também observam que essas regularidades podem ser transferidas entre os idiomas. No entanto, os esforços anteriores para conectar embeddings de palavras monolíngues separadas normalmente exigem sinais multilíngues como supervisão, seja na forma de corpus paralelo ou léxico semente. Neste trabalho, mostramos que tal conexão multilíngue pode realmente ser estabelecida sem qualquer forma de supervisão. Alcançamos esse objetivo formulando o problema como um jogo adversário natural e investigando técnicas que são cruciais para o treinamento bem-sucedido. Realizamos avaliação na tarefa de indução de léxico bilíngue não supervisionada. Mesmo que essa tarefa pareça intrinsecamente multilíngue, somos capazes de demonstrar um desempenho encorajador sem nenhuma pista multilíngue.', 'ja': '単語埋め込みは、訓練された言語の言語的規則性を取り込むことでよく知られています。研究者はまた、これらの規則性が言語間で転移する可能性があることを観察している。しかし、個別の単一言語の単語埋め込みを接続する以前の努力は、典型的には、平行コーパスまたはシード辞書のいずれかの形式で、監視としてクロスリンガルシグナルを必要とする。本作では、このようなクロスリンガルなつながりが、実際には何らかの監督なしで確立できることを示している。私たちは、問題を自然な対立ゲームとして定式化し、トレーニングを成功させるために重要なテクニックを調査することによって、この目的を達成します。私たちは、無監督のバイリンガル辞書誘導タスクについて評価を行います。このタスクは本質的にクロスリンガルに見えるにもかかわらず、クロスリンガルの手がかりなしに奨励されるパフォーマンスを示すことができます。', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग उस भाषा की भाषाई नियमितताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए अच्छी तरह से जाना जाता है जिस पर उन्हें प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। शोधकर्ताओं ने यह भी देखा कि ये नियमितताएं भाषाओं में स्थानांतरित हो सकती हैं। हालांकि, अलग-अलग मोनोलिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग को जोड़ने के पिछले प्रयासों को आमतौर पर पर्यवेक्षण के रूप में क्रॉस-भाषी संकेतों की आवश्यकता होती है, या तो समानांतर कॉर्पस या बीज शब्दकोश के रूप में। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के क्रॉस-लिंगुअल कनेक्शन को वास्तव में पर्यवेक्षण के किसी भी रूप के बिना स्थापित किया जा सकता है। हम समस्या को एक प्राकृतिक प्रतिकूल खेल के रूप में तैयार करके, और उन तकनीकों की जांच करके इस अंत को प्राप्त करते हैं जो सफल प्रशिक्षण के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हैं। हम असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण कार्य पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं। भले ही यह कार्य आंतरिक रूप से क्रॉस-लिंगुअल दिखाई देता है, हम किसी भी क्रॉस-भाषी सुराग के बिना उत्साहजनक प्रदर्शन प्रदर्शित करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'zh': '众所周知,词可取其所习语。 论者犹见之,规律性可跨语移。 然前接单语词嵌之力,常须跨语信号为监督,无论以并行语料库种词典之文。 此其事,吾明之,其言实可立于无文者也。 吾将为自然之戏,而究成功之要术以成之。 无监双语词典归。 虽然,吾能示令人鼓舞于无跨语也。', 'ru': 'Хорошо известно, что вложения слов отражают языковые закономерности языка, на котором они обучаются. Исследователи также отмечают, что эти закономерности могут передаваться между языками. Однако предыдущие попытки соединить отдельные одноязычные вложения слов обычно требуют кросс-лингвистических сигналов в качестве надзора, либо в форме параллельного корпуса, либо семенного лексикона. В этой работе мы показываем, что такая кросс-лингвистическая связь действительно может быть установлена без какой-либо формы надзора. Мы достигаем этой цели, формулируя проблему как естественную соперническую игру и исследуя методы, которые имеют решающее значение для успешной тренировки. Мы проводим оценку по неконтролируемой двуязычной лексиконической индукционной задаче. Несмотря на то, что эта задача по своей сути кажется межъязыковой, мы можем продемонстрировать обнадеживающую эффективность без каких-либо межъязыковых подсказок.', 'ga': "Is eol go maith go n-áiríonn leabaithe focal rialtacht teanga na teanga ar a gcuirtear oiliúint orthu. Tugann taighdeoirí faoi deara freisin gur féidir na rialtachtaí seo a aistriú trasna teangacha. Mar sin féin, is iondúil go dteastaíonn comharthaí trasteangacha mar mhaoirseacht ar iarrachtaí roimhe seo le neaduithe focal aonteangacha ar leith a nascadh, i bhfoirm corpais chomhthreomhair nó foclóir síl. San obair seo, léirímid gur féidir nasc tras-teanga dá leithéid a bhunú gan aon mhaoirseacht. Bainimid an cuspóir seo amach tríd an bhfadhb a fhoirmiú mar chluiche sáraíochta nádúrtha, agus trí theicnící atá ríthábhachtach d'oiliúint rathúil a fhiosrú. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar an tasc ionduchtaithe foclóireachta dátheangach gan mhaoirseacht. Cé go bhfeictear go bhfuil an tasc seo tras-teangach go bunúsach, is féidir linn feidhmíocht spreagúil a léiriú gan leideanna tras-teangacha ar bith.", 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások jól ismertek, hogy rögzítik a nyelv nyelvi szabályosságait, amelyre képezték őket. A kutatók azt is megállapítják, hogy ezek a rendszerességek nyelvek között is átvihetők. A külön egynyelvű szóbeágyazások összekapcsolására irányuló korábbi törekvések azonban általában többnyelvű jeleket igényelnek felügyeletként, akár párhuzamos korpusz, akár maglexikon formájában. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy az ilyen nyelveken átnyúló kapcsolat ténylegesen felügyelet nélkül létrehozható. Ezt a célt úgy érjük el, hogy a problémát természetes ellenféljátékként fogalmazzuk meg, és olyan technikákat vizsgálunk, amelyek kulcsfontosságúak a sikeres edzéshez. A felügyelet nélküli kétnyelvű lexikon indukciós feladat értékelését végezzük. Annak ellenére, hogy ez a feladat lényegében többnyelvűnek tűnik, képesek vagyunk arra, hogy bátorító teljesítményt bizonyítsunk anélkül, hogy bármilyen nyelvű nyom lenne.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων είναι γνωστή για την καταγραφή γλωσσικών κανονικοτήτων της γλώσσας στην οποία εκπαιδεύονται. Οι ερευνητές παρατηρούν επίσης ότι αυτές οι κανονικότητες μπορούν να μεταφερθούν σε διάφορες γλώσσες. Ωστόσο, οι προηγούμενες προσπάθειες σύνδεσης ξεχωριστών μονογλωσσών λέξεων συνήθως απαιτούν διαγώνια σήματα ως επίβλεψη, είτε με τη μορφή παράλληλου σώματος είτε λεξικού σπόρων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι μια τέτοια διασυνοριακή σύνδεση μπορεί πραγματικά να δημιουργηθεί χωρίς οποιαδήποτε μορφή εποπτείας. Αυτό το στόχο επιτυγχάνουμε διατυπώνοντας το πρόβλημα ως φυσικό αντίπαλο παιχνίδι και διερευνώντας τεχνικές που είναι κρίσιμες για την επιτυχή εκπαίδευση. Πραγματοποιούμε αξιολόγηση για την εργασία επαγωγής χωρίς επίβλεψη δίγλωσσου λεξικού. Παρά το γεγονός ότι αυτή η εργασία φαίνεται εγγενώς διγλωσσική, είμαστε σε θέση να επιδείξουμε ενθαρρυντικές επιδόσεις χωρίς καμία διγλωσσική ένδειξη.', 'lt': 'Gerai žinoma, kad žodžių įtraukimas apima kalbų, kuria jie mokomi, reguliarumą. Mokslininkai taip pat pastebi, kad šie reguliarumo reikalavimai gali būti perduodami įvairiomis kalbomis. Tačiau ankstesnės pastangos sujungti atskirus vienakalbius žodžių įdėjimus paprastai reikalauja tarpkalbinių signalų kaip priežiūros, pavyzdžiui, lygiagrečio korpuso arba sėklos leksikono pavidalu. Šiame darbe parodomi, kad toks tarpkalbinis ryšys gali būti sukurtas be jokios priežiūros. Šis tikslas pasiektas formuojant šią problem ą kaip natūralų priešininkų žaidimą ir tiriant metodus, kurie yra labai svarbūs sėkmingam mokymui. We carry out evaluation on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  Nors ši užduotis atrodo iš esmės tarpkalbiška, mes galime parodyti skatinančius rezultatus be jokių tarpkalbinių požymių.', 'it': 'Le incorporazioni di parole sono ben note per catturare le regolarità linguistiche della lingua su cui sono formati. I ricercatori osservano anche che queste regolarità possono essere trasferite tra le lingue. Tuttavia, gli sforzi precedenti per collegare le incorporazioni di parole monolingue separate richiedono tipicamente segnali cross-lingual come supervisione, sotto forma di corpus parallelo o lessico semi. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che tale connessione multilingue può effettivamente essere stabilita senza alcuna forma di supervisione. Raggiungiamo questo obiettivo formulando il problema come un gioco avversario naturale, e indagando tecniche che sono cruciali per un allenamento di successo. Realizziamo valutazioni sul compito non supervisionato di induzione lessicale bilingue. Anche se questo compito appare intrinsecamente cross-lingual, siamo in grado di dimostrare prestazioni incoraggianti senza alcun indizio cross-lingual.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру үшін олар оқылған тілдің лингвистикалық үлгіліктерін түсіндіру үшін жақсы біледі. Исследоварлары осы тәуліктер тілдерге аударуға болады. Бірақ, бөлек бір тілдік сөзді ендіру үшін алдыңғы әрекеттер көптеген тілдік сигналдарды қарау үшін, немесе параллель корпус немесе тарату лексикалық түрінде қажет етеді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз бұл тілдік қосылым шындықтан бір қарау түрі болмай құрылады. Біз бұл соңғы мәселеді табиғи негізгі оқиға ретінде формулап және сәтті оқиға үшін маңызды техникаларды зерттеу үшін жеткіземіз. Біз екі тілі лексикандық индукциялық тапсырмасының бағалауын орындаймыз. Бұл тапсырма тілдердің ішкі тілдеріне көпшілікті көрінген болса да, біз тілдердің бірнеше тілдердің бірінші тапсырмаларын көрсетуге боладық.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањата на зборовите се познати како заземаат јазични регуларности на јазикот на кој се обучени. Истражувачите, исто така, набљудуваат дека овие регуларности можат да се префрлат преку јазици. Сепак, претходните напори за поврзување на одделни монојазични зборови обично бараат прекујазични сигнали како надзор, или во форма на паралелен корпус или лексикон за семето. Во оваа работа покажуваме дека ваквата меѓујазична врска всушност може да се воспостави без никаков вид на надзор. Го постигнуваме овој цел со формулирање на проблемот како природна противничка игра, и истражување техники кои се клучни за успешна обука. We carry out evaluation on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  Иако оваа задача изгледа всушност прекујазична, можеме да демонстрираме охрабрувачки резултати без никакви прекујазични траги.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran perkataan diketahui dengan baik untuk menangkap regularitas bahasa bahasa yang mereka dilatih. Penyelidik juga menyaksikan bahawa regularitas ini boleh dipindahkan melalui bahasa. Namun, usaha terdahulu untuk menyambung penyambungan perkataan monobahasa yang terpisah biasanya memerlukan isyarat saling bahasa sebagai pengawasan, sama ada dalam bentuk corpus paralel atau leksikon benih. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa sambungan saling bahasa ini sebenarnya boleh ditetapkan tanpa sebarang bentuk pengawasan. Kami mencapai tujuan ini dengan membentuk masalah sebagai permainan musuh alam, dan penyelidikan teknik yang penting untuk latihan yang berjaya. Kami melakukan penilaian pada tugas induksi leksikon bilingual yang tidak diawasi. Walaupun tugas ini kelihatan secara intrinsik saling bahasa, kita mampu menunjukkan prestasi yang menyeronokkan tanpa sebarang petunjuk saling bahasa.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഭാഷ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതിന് നന്നായി അറിയാം. ഈ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷകളിലൂടെ മാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു എന്നും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നവരും കാണുന്നു. എങ്കിലും പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി ബന്ധിക്കാന്\u200d മുമ്പ് ശ്രമിച്ച ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. പാരാണല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വിത്ര ലെക്സിക് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഇത്തരം ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കുള്ള ബന്ധം ശരിക്കും സ്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു  പ്രശ്നം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഒരു വിരോധവാദിയായ കളിയായി രൂപപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, വിജയിക്കുന്നതിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്ന സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d വ്യവസാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്രക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക് അകത്തുള്ള ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രകടനം കാണിച്ചാലും നമുക്ക് ക്രിസ്റ്റല്\u200d ഭാഷയില്ലാതെ പ്രകടനം പ്രകട', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem huma magħrufa sew li jaqbdu r-regolaritajiet lingwistiċi tal-lingwa li biha huma mħarrġa. Ir-riċerkaturi josservaw ukoll li dawn ir-regolaritajiet jistgħu jittrasferixxu bejn il-lingwi. Madankollu, l-isforzi preċedenti biex jiġu konnessi inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem monolingwi separati tipikament jeħtieġu sinjali translingwi bħala superviżjoni, jew fil-forma ta’ korpus parallel jew lexicon taż-żerriegħa. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu evidenza li tali konnessjoni translingwistika tista’ fil-fatt tiġi stabbilita mingħajr ebda forma ta’ superviżjoni. Aħna nilħqu dan l-għan billi nifformulaw il-problem a bħala logħob avversarju naturali, u ninvestigaw tekniki li huma kruċjali għat-taħriġ ta’ suċċess. Għandna nagħmlu evalwazzjoni dwar il-kompitu ta’ induzzjoni tal-lexicon bilingwi mhux sorveljat. Even though this task appears intrinsically cross-lingual, we are able to demonstrate encouraging performance without any cross-lingual clues.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хэл дээр сургалтын хэлний зөвхөн дүрэм байдлыг барьж авдаг. Судлаачид мөн эдгээр тогтмол нь хэл дээр шилжүүлж чадна. Гэвч өмнө нь нэг хэл хэлний нэвтрүүлэлтийг холбох хичээл нь ихэвчлэн хэл хэлний сигналуудыг удирдлага болгох хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид ийм олон хэл холбоотой байдлыг харуулж чадна. Бид энэ төгсгөлийг байгалийн эсрэг тоглоом гэж тодорхойлж, амжилттай сургалтын тулд чухал технологийг судалж чадна. Бид хоёр хэл хэлний даалгаврын үйлдвэрлэлийн талаар үнэлгээ хийдэг. Энэ даалгавар нь хэл хэл хэлбэртэйгээр илэрхийлж байгаа ч, бид хэл хэл хэлбэртэйгээр ямар ч хамаагүй үйл ажиллагааг дэмжиж чадна.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შესაბამისი სიტყვები ძალიან უცნობილია, რომ სიტყვების სიტყვების რეგულაციას, რომელიც ისინი განსწავლია. პასწავლებელი ასევე აღმოჩნდება, რომ ეს რედაქტირება შეუძლია ენაში გადატანდეს. მაგრამ, წინა მონოლენგური სიტყვების დაკავშირება, რომელიც საკუთარი ენგური სიტყვები უნდა იყენოთ როგორც დანახვა, ან პარალელი კორპუსს ან სიტყვების ლექსიკონის ფორ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი მრავალენგური დაკავშირება შეუძლებელია, რომელიც არაფერი დანახმარების ფორმა არაფერი. ჩვენ მივიღეთ ეს საკუთარი პრობლემა როგორც ჩემი ნახვადასხვა ანგარიალური თამაში, და განსხვავება ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც წარმოდგენელად მნიშვნელოვანია ს ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული ორიენგური ლექსიკონის ინდექციის საქმე. თუმცა ეს საქმე იქნება ინტერნექციურად კრესიენგურად, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გამოჩვენოთ სწორად მუშაობელი პროცემენტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც არაფერი კრე', 'pl': 'Osadzania słów są dobrze znane z uwzględniania prawidłowości językowych języka, w którym są szkoleni. Naukowcy zauważają również, że te regularności mogą przenosić się między językami. Jednak wcześniejsze próby łączenia oddzielnych osadzeń jednojęzycznych słów zazwyczaj wymagają sygnałów wielojęzycznych jako nadzoru, albo w postaci równoległego korpusu lub leksykonu seed. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że takie połączenie między językami można faktycznie nawiązać bez jakiejkolwiek formy nadzoru. Osiągamy ten cel formułując problem jako naturalną grę przeciwną oraz badając techniki kluczowe dla udanego treningu. Przeprowadzamy ocenę bez nadzoru zadania indukcyjnego dwujęzycznego leksykonu. Mimo że zadanie to wydaje się nieodłącznie między językami, jesteśmy w stanie wykazać zachęcające osiągnięcia bez żadnych wskazówek między językami.', 'no': 'Ordinnbygging er godt kjent for å henta linguistiske regulæritet på språket dei trenga på. Forskere observerer også at desse reguleringane kan overføra på språk. Men førre forsøk på å kopla sammen separerte ordinnbygging av monospråk krev vanlegvis krysspråk signaler som oversikt, anten i form av parallelle korpus eller frøleksikon. I denne arbeiden viser vi at slik krysspråkstilkopling kan faktisk bli oppretta utan nokon form av oversikt. Vi oppnår denne slutten ved å formere problemet som eit naturleg adversarisk spel, og undersøke teknikk som er viktig for vellukka opplæring. Vi utfører evalueringa på den ugjennomsiktige funksjonen for å induksjona på biletmenyen. Sjølv om denne oppgåva synes intrinsisk krysspråk, kan vi demonstrere utviklingar utan nokon krysspråksklusser.', 'sr': 'Poznato je da se uključuju jezički redovitost na kojem su obučeni. Istraživači takođe posmatraju da ove regularnosti mogu prebaciti na jezike. Međutim, prethodni pokušaji za povezivanje odvojenih monojezičkih reči obično zahtevaju preko jezičkih signala kao nadzor, ili u obliku paralelnog korpusa ili leksikona semena. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se takva kroz jezička veza može uspostaviti bez bilo kojeg oblika nadzora. Postigli smo taj cilj formirajući problem kao prirodnu neprijateljsku igru i istražujući tehnike koje su ključne za uspešnu obuku. Provodimo procjenu o neodređenom zadatku za dvojezičnu indukciju leksiona. Iako ovaj zadatak izgleda unutrašnjost kroz jezik, mi smo u stanju da pokažemo ohrabrujuće nastave bez bilo kakvih međujezičkih tragova.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte sunt bine cunoscute pentru a surprinde regularitatea lingvistică a limbii în care sunt instruite. Cercetătorii observă, de asemenea, că aceste regularități se pot transfera între limbi. Cu toate acestea, eforturile anterioare de a conecta încorporarea separată a cuvintelor monolingve necesită, de obicei, semnale încrucișate ca supraveghere, fie sub forma corpului paralel sau a lexiconului semințelor. În această lucrare, arătăm că o astfel de conexiune translingvă poate fi stabilită de fapt fără nici o formă de supraveghere. Realizăm acest scop formulând problema ca un joc adversar natural și investigând tehnici esențiale pentru pregătirea de succes. Efectuăm evaluarea sarcinii nesupravegheate de inducție a lexiconului bilingv. Chiar dacă această sarcină pare intrinsec translingvă, suntem capabili să demonstrăm performanțe încurajatoare fără indicii translingve.', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධයක් හොඳටම දන්නවා භාෂාවයේ භාෂාව සාමාන්\u200dයතාව අල්ලගන්න. පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරික්ෂා කරනවා මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේ නමුත්, මුලින් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් උත්සාහ කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේම ක්\u200dර මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ විශාල භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධයක් ඇත්තටම ස්ථාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා  අපි මේ අවසානයට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විරෝධ සෙල්ලම් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, සමහර විරෝධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ් අපි අවශ්\u200dයාවක් කරන්නේ නැති දෙවල් භාෂාවක් ලෙක්සිකෝන් නිර්මාණය වැඩක් ගැන. මේ කාර්ය පෙන්නවත් බොහොම භාෂාවක් විශේෂයෙන් පෙන්නවත්, අපිට පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා කිසිම භාෂ', 'ta': 'மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழிக் கட்டுப்பாடுகளை பிடிக்க நன்றாக அறியப்படுகிறது. ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களும் இந்த விதிமானம் மொழிகளுக்கு மாற்ற முடியும் என்பதை கவனித்துக் கொள்கி ஆனால், முந்தைய முயற்சிகள் தனிப்பட்ட மொழியில் உள்ள சொல்லை இணைப்பதற்கான முயற்சிகள் வழக்கமாக குறிக்கும் மொழிக்குறிகளை கண்காணிப்பாக அல்லது இண இந்த வேலையில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இத்தகைய மொழி இணைப்பு உண்மையில் கண்காணிப்பு இல்லாமல் நிறுவப்படும பிரச்சனையை இயற்கையான எதிரியான விளையாட்டாக வடிவமைத்து, மற்றும் வெற்றிகரமான பயிற்சிக்கு முக்கியமான தொழில்ந நாம் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத இரண்டு மொழி லெக்சியன் தொகுப்பு பணியில் ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். இந்த செயல் உள்ளிருக்கும் மொழி தெரியும் போதும், நாம் எந்த குறுக்குக் குறிப்புகள் இல்லாமல் செயல்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar är välkända för att fånga språkliga regelbundenhet i det språk som de är utbildade på. Forskare konstaterar också att dessa regelbundenhet kan överföras över språk. Tidigare försök att koppla samman separata enspråkiga ordinbäddningar kräver dock vanligtvis korspråkiga signaler som övervakning, antingen i form av parallell corpus eller seed lexikon. I detta arbete visar vi att en sådan tvärspråklig koppling faktiskt kan etableras utan någon form av övervakning. Vi uppnår detta mål genom att formulera problemet som ett naturligt motståndaresspel och undersöka tekniker som är avgörande för framgångsrik träning. Vi genomför utvärdering av den obevakade tvåspråkiga lexikoninduktionsuppgiften. Även om denna uppgift i sig verkar tvärspråklig, kan vi visa uppmuntrande prestanda utan några tvärspråkliga ledtrådar.', 'ur': 'زبان کی زبان کی تعلیم کو پکڑنے کے لئے بہتر معلوم ہے۔ تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے بھی دیکھا ہے کہ یہ قانون زبانوں میں انتقال کر سکتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ، پہلے کی کوشش ایک زبان تک پہنچانے کے لئے ایک زبان تک پہنچانے کی جگہ معمولاً مختلف زبان کے سیگنالوں کو نظارت کے طور پر ضرورت کرتی ہے، یا parallel corpus یا seed lexicon کی شکل میں. ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایسی مختلف زبان کی ارتباط حقیقت میں کسی طرح کی نظر کے بغیر قائم ہو سکتی ہے۔ ہم اس پایان کو پہنچاتے ہیں کہ مسئلہ کو طبیعی مخالف کھیل کے طور پر فرمول کریں، اور فناوری تحقیق کریں جو موفق تطارین کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ ہم غیر قابل تحقیق کی دو زبان لکسیون کے اندازے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ یہ کام دراصل مختلف زبان کی طرح ظاہر ہوتی ہے، ہم کسی طرح کی مختلف زبان کے نشانیوں کے بغیر کسی طرح کی سفارش کرنے کے قابل ہیں.', 'so': 'Waxaa si fiican loo yaqaan in ay qabsadaan qaynuunnada luuqada oo lagu baranayo. Baaritaanku waxay sidoo kale fiiriyaan in sharciyadaas ay ku wareegi karaan luuqado kala duwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay u baahan yihiin calaamado luuqadaha kala duwan oo ay ku xiriiraan hadalka kala duwan ee muuqashada afka ah si caadi ah ugu baahan yihiin ilaaliya, ama qaabka korpus ama farcanka leksisinka. Markaas waxaynu muujinnaa in xiriirka luqada oo kala duwan lagu sameyn karo mid aan la ilaalin karin. Waxaynu dhamaadka ku gaadhnaa si aan dhibaatada u sameynno ciyaar dabiicadda ah iyo baaritaanka qaabilsan ee u muhiimsan waxbarashada liibaanta. We carry out evaluation on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  Inkastoo shaqadaas uu soo muuqanayo luqada gudaha ah, waxaynu muujin karnaa dhiirrigelinta farsamada iyadoon lahayn cilmi luqad kala duwan.', 'uz': "Keyingi so'z ichida o'rganilgan tillarning tillar qoidalarini qabul qilish mumkin. Taʼminlovchilar esa bu qoidalar tillarda o'zgartira oladi. Lekin oldingi bir necha so'zlarni o'zgartirish orqali oddiy so'zlarni boshqarish imkoniyatlariga, balki parallel corpus yoki uzun leksisining shaklida ko'p tillar signallarini boshqarish kerak. Bu vazifanda biz buni ko'rsatganimiz, bu juda ko'p tillar bogʻlanishi haqida qo'llanmagan qo'llanmagan foydalanish mumkin. Biz bu oxirga muammolarni tabiiy raqamli o'yincha o'ylab, va muvaffaqiyatlarni o'rganish uchun muhim teknologiya qilamiz. Biz qo'llanmagan ikki tillar lekson ishlab chiqarishni bajaramiz. Even though this task appears intrinsically cross-lingual, we are able to demonstrate encouraging performance without any cross-lingual clues.", 'vi': 'Từ ngữ được biết đến là nắm bắt các quy tắc ngôn ngữ mà họ được đào tạo. Các nhà nghiên cứu cũng quan sát rằng những quy tắc này có thể chuyển qua các ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, những nỗ lực trước đây để kết nối các từ ngôn ngữ riêng biệt thường đòi hỏi tín hiệu ngôn ngữ khác nhau như sự giám sát, bằng cơ thể song song hoặc từ độc hạt giống. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cho thấy một mối liên hệ ngôn ngữ khác nhau có thể được thiết lập mà không có bất kỳ hình thức giám sát. Chúng ta đạt được mục đích này bằng cách phát triển vấn đề như một trò chơi đối thủ tự nhiên, và điều tra kỹ thuật rất quan trọng để huấn luyện thành công. Chúng tôi thực hiện đánh giá về ngôn ngữ mà không được giám sát. Mặc dù nhiệm vụ này có vẻ phức tạp xuyên ngôn ngữ, nhưng chúng tôi có thể chứng minh khả năng khích lệ mà không có manh mối ngôn ngữ khác.', 'bg': 'Вградените думи са добре известни с това, че улавят езиковите редовности на езика, на който са обучени. Изследователите също така отбелязват, че тези редовности могат да се прехвърлят на различни езици. Въпреки това, предишните усилия за свързване на отделни едноезични словни вграждания обикновено изискват междуезични сигнали като надзор, или под формата на паралелен корпус или семеен лексикон. В тази работа показваме, че такава междуезична връзка може да се установи без никаква форма на надзор. Постигаме тази цел, като формулираме проблема като естествена противоречива игра и изследваме техники, които са от решаващо значение за успешното обучение. Извършваме оценка на задачата за индукция на двуезичен лексикон без надзор. Въпреки че тази задача изглежда вътрешно междуезична, ние сме в състояние да демонстрираме окуражаващо представяне без никакви междуезични улики.', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer er velkendt for at fange sproglige regelmæssigheder i det sprog, de er uddannet i. Forskere bemærker også, at disse regelmæssigheder kan overføres på tværs af sprog. Tidligere bestræbelser på at forbinde separate ensprogede ordindlejringer kræver dog typisk tværsprogede signaler som overvågning, enten i form af parallel corpus eller seed leksikon. I dette arbejde viser vi, at en sådan tværsproget forbindelse faktisk kan etableres uden nogen form for tilsyn. Vi opnår dette mål ved at formulere problemet som et naturligt modstandsspil og undersøge teknikker, der er afgørende for en vellykket træning. Vi foretager evaluering af den uopvågede tosprogede lexikoninduktionsopgave. Selvom denne opgave i sig selv forekommer tværsproget, er vi i stand til at demonstrere opmuntrende resultater uden nogen tværsprogede spor.', 'nl': 'Woordinbeddingen staan erom bekend dat ze taalkundige regelmatigheden vastleggen van de taal waarin ze zijn getraind. Onderzoekers constateren ook dat deze regelmatigheden over talen kunnen worden overgedragen. Echter, eerdere pogingen om afzonderlijke eentalige woord embeddings te verbinden vereisen meestal cross-lingual signalen als supervisie, hetzij in de vorm van parallelle corpus of zaadlexicon. In dit werk laten we zien dat een dergelijke meertalige verbinding daadwerkelijk tot stand kan worden gebracht zonder enige vorm van toezicht. Dit bereiken we door het probleem te formuleren als een natuurlijk tegenstrijdig spel, en technieken te onderzoeken die cruciaal zijn voor een succesvolle training. We voeren evaluatie uit van de niet-begeleide tweetalige lexicon inductie taak. Hoewel deze taak intrinsiek meertalig lijkt, kunnen we bemoedigende prestaties aantonen zonder enige meertalige aanwijzingen.', 'id': 'Pencampuran kata dikenal untuk menangkap regularitas bahasa bahasa yang mereka dilatih. Peneliti juga mengamati bahwa regularitas ini dapat dipindahkan melalui bahasa. Namun, usaha sebelumnya untuk menghubungkan pembangunan kata monobahasa yang terpisah biasanya memerlukan sinyal saling bahasa sebagai pengawasan, baik dalam bentuk corpus paralel atau leksikon benih. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa koneksi saling bahasa tersebut benar-benar dapat didirikan tanpa bentuk pengawasan apapun. We achieve this end by formulating the problem as a natural adversarial game, and investigating techniques that are crucial to successful training.  Kami melakukan evaluasi tugas induksi lexikon bilingual yang tidak diawasi. Meskipun tugas ini tampak secara intrinsik saling bahasa, kita dapat menunjukkan prestasi yang mendorong tanpa petunjuk saling bahasa.', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen sind dafür bekannt, sprachliche Regelmäßigkeiten der Sprache zu erfassen, in der sie trainiert werden. Forscher beobachten auch, dass diese Regelmäßigkeiten sprachübergreifend übertragen werden können. Bisherige Versuche, getrennte einsprachige Worteinbettungen zu verbinden, erfordern jedoch typischerweise mehrsprachige Signale als Supervision, entweder in Form von parallelen Korpus- oder Samenlexikon. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass eine solche sprachübergreifende Verbindung tatsächlich ohne jegliche Aufsicht hergestellt werden kann. Wir erreichen dieses Ziel, indem wir das Problem als natürliches Gegenspielerspiel formulieren und Techniken untersuchen, die für ein erfolgreiches Training entscheidend sind. Wir führen eine Evaluation der unbeaufsichtigten zweisprachigen Lexikon-Induktionsaufgabe durch. Auch wenn diese Aufgabe intrinsisch sprachübergreifend erscheint, sind wir in der Lage, ermutigende Leistungen ohne sprachübergreifende Hinweise zu zeigen.', 'hr': 'Zaključenje riječi dobro poznato je da uhvate jezičke regularnosti jezika na kojem su obučeni. Istraživači također primjećuju da te redovitosti mogu prenijeti na jezike. Međutim, prethodni pokušaji povezivanja odvojenih monojezičkih riječi obično zahtijevaju preko jezičkih signala kao nadzor, ili u obliku paralelnog korpusa ili leksikona semena. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se takva kroz jezička veza može uspostaviti bez bilo kojeg oblika nadzora. Postigli smo taj cilj formirajući problem kao prirodnu neprijateljsku igru i istražujući tehnike koje su ključne za uspješnu obuku. Provodimo procjenu o zadatku indukcije dvojezika. Iako ovaj zadatak izgleda unutrašnjost kroz jezik, možemo pokazati ohrabrujuće učinke bez bilo kakvih međujezičkih tragova.', 'sw': 'Matambo ya maneno yanafahamika vizuri kupata kanuni za lugha za lugha ambazo hufundishwa. Watafiti pia wanaona kuwa kanuni hizi zinaweza kuhamisha lugha mbalimbali. Hata hivyo, juhudi za zamani za kuunganisha neno tofauti la lugha za kimonoliki kwa kawaida zinahitaji ishara za kupitia lugha kama ufuatiliaji, au kwa namna ya viungo vinavyofanana au lexico vya kizazi. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa uhusiano wa lugha hiyo unaweza kuanzishwa bila namna yoyote ya kufuatiliwa. Tunaweza kufikia mwisho huu kwa kutengeneza tatizo kama mchezo wa asili, na kuchunguza mbinu ambazo ni muhimu kwa mafunzo ya mafanikio. Tunaendelea uchunguzi wa kazi ya viwanda vya lexico vya lugha mbili zisizo na uhakika. Hata kama kazi hii inaonekana kwa lugha ya ndani, tunaweza kuonyesha hatua ya kuhamasisha utendaji bila ushahidi wa lugha nyingine.', 'ko': '모두가 알다시피 단어 삽입은 훈련된 언어의 언어 규칙을 포착할 수 있다.연구진은 또 이런 규칙이 언어를 뛰어넘어 전달될 수 있다는 것을 관찰했다.그러나 이전에 독립된 단어의 삽입을 연결하려는 노력은 보통 크로스 언어 신호를 감독해야 했다. 평행 언어 자료 라이브러리의 형식이든 피드 어휘의 형식이든.이 작업에서 우리는 이러한 크로스 언어 연결은 사실상 어떠한 형식의 감독도 없이 구축될 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 문제를 자연스러운 대항 게임으로 묘사하고 성공적인 훈련에 중요한 기술을 연구함으로써 이 목표를 실현한다.우리는 감독이 없는 이중 언어 어휘 귀납 임무에 대해 평가를 진행하였다.비록 이 임무는 본질적으로 크로스 언어이지만, 우리는 크로스 언어의 단서가 없는 상황에서 고무적인 표현을 보여줄 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Diliň lingwistiki düzgünliklerini ýazmak üçin söz baglanmasy gowy bilýär. Araştyranlar hem bu düzgünleriň dilleriň arasynda geçirip biljekdigini gözleýärler. Ýöne öňki monolingüň içindeki sözleri baglaşdyrmak üçin meýdança çarpyş dili signalleri superviziýa görkezmäge gerek. Bu işde biz bu çarpaky dil baglaşyklary hiç hili garaşsyz bolup biler diýip görkeýäris. Biz bu soňuny, meseläni tebigy teňkil oýun hökmünde we üstünlikli eğitim üçin örän möhüm tekniklerden çykyp ýetirdik. Biz daňalanmaýan iki dil dilinde laňkasa täsirinde deňlemegi çykýarys. Bu işi daşky dillerden daşky bir şekilde görünýän bolsa-da, biz çyz dillerde hiç hili ipleri ýok edip bilmedik.', 'af': "Woord inbêding is goed bekend om lingwisiese regulariteite van die taal op te vang waarop hulle onderwerp word. Resekenaars het ook aanhou dat hierdie regulariteite oor tale kan oordra. Maar vorige versoekte versoekte om aparte monolinglike woord inbêding te konnekteer tipies kruistale signale as supervisie te benodig, of in die vorm van parallele korpus of saad leksikoon. In hierdie werk wys ons dat so kruistale verbinding eintlik kan wees gestel sonder enige vorm van supervisie. Ons het hierdie einde bereik deur die probleem as 'n natuurlike teëstanderspel te formeer en teknike te ondersoek wat onheilig is vir suksesvolle onderwerp. Ons uitvoer evaluasie op die onondersteunde bilinguele leksikoon induksie taak. Selfs alhoewel hierdie taak intrinsiese kruistale verskyn, kan ons verskyn encouraging prestasie sonder enige kruistale klusse.", 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمات به خوبی شناخته می\u200cشود که تعلیم دهنده\u200cهای زبانی را گرفته می\u200cشود. تحقیقات\u200cکنندگان همچنین مشاهده می\u200cکنند که این معمولی\u200cها می\u200cتوانند به زبانها انتقال دهند. ولی تلاش قبلی برای اتصال کردن کلمه\u200cهای یک زبان جدا می\u200cشوند که معمولاً سیگنال\u200cهای متوسط زبان را به عنوان نظارت نیاز دارند، یا در شکل کورپوس متوسط یا لکسیون seed. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که این ارتباط متفاوت زبانی در واقع بدون هیچ شکل نظارت قائل شود. ما این پایان را با فرمول مشکل به عنوان بازی دشمنی طبیعی می رسانیم، و تکنیک\u200cهای تحقیق که برای آموزش موفقیت مهم است. ما ارزیابی روی کار زبان دوزبانی غیرقابل تحقیق می کنیم. با وجود اینکه این وظیفه به نظر می رسد که از طریق زبان متفاوتی است، ما می توانیم عملکرد تشویق کننده را بدون هیچ نقشه\u200cای از زبان متفاوتی نشان دهیم.', 'sq': 'Përmbajtja e fjalëve është e njohur mirë për të kapur rregullalitetet gjuhësore të gjuhës në të cilën janë trajnuar. Kërkuesit vëzhgojnë gjithashtu se këto rregullalitete mund të transferohen nëpër gjuhë. Megjithatë, përpjekjet e mëparshme për të lidhur përfshirjet e fjalëve të veçanta monogjuhësore zakonisht kërkojnë sinjale ndërgjuhësore si mbikqyrje, ose në form ën e korpusit paralel ose lexikonit të farës. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se një lidhje e tillë ndërgjuhësore mund të krijohet në fakt pa ndonjë form ë mbikqyrjeje. Ne arrijmë këtë qëllim duke formuluar problemin si një lojë natyrore kundërshtare dhe duke hetuar teknika që janë vendimtare për trajnimin e suksesshëm. Ne kryejmë vlerësimin e detyrës së induksionit të lexikonëve dygjuhës të pa mbikqyrur. Edhe pse kjo detyrë duket në mënyrë intrinsike ndërgjuhësore, ne jemi në gjendje të demonstrojmë shfaqje inkurajuese pa ndonjë udhëzim ndërgjuhësor.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን ሥርዓት ለመያዝ የሚታወቁ ቃላት ነው፡፡ አስተማሪዎች ደግሞ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች በልሳኖች እንዲለወጡ ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው የሞሎንቋዊ ቃላት አካባቢ እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሲክሎችን በመጠበቅ ወይም በፓርላማ ኮርፓስ ወይም ዘር ሊክሲኮን ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት ምንም መልክ ሳይኖር መሠረትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ይህንን ፍጻሜ አግኝተናል፡፡ የሁለት ቋንቋ ልዩ ሊክሲን ሥራ ላይ ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ይህ ስራ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሲገለጥ፣ ማንኛውም የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሳይኖር የድምፅ ፍለጋውን ማሳየት እንችላለን፡፡', 'hy': "Բառերի ներգրավումը լավ հայտնի է, որն արձագանքում է լեզվական օրինակությունները այն լեզվի համար, որի վրա նրանք վարժեցվում են: Հետազոտողները նաև նկատում են, որ այս օրինակությունները կարող են փոխանցվել լեզուների միջով: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ փորձերը միացնելու առանձին միալեզվային բառերի ներդրումները սովորաբար պահանջում են երկլեզվային ազդանշաններ, որպես վերահսկողություն, կամ զուգահեռ կորպուսի կամ սերմի լեքսիկոնի տեսքով: In this work, we show that such cross-lingual connection can actually be established without any form of supervision.  Մենք հասնում ենք այս նպատակին' ձևավորելով խնդիրը որպես բնական հակառակորդական խաղ և ուսումնասիրելով տեխնիկաներ, որոնք կարևոր են հաջողակ ուսումնասիրության համար: Մենք գնահատում ենք անվերահսկված երկլեզու լեքսիկոնի ինդուկցիոն խնդիրը: Չնայած, որ այս խնդիրը ներքին առումով փոխլեզվով է թվում, մենք կարող ենք ցույց տալ խրախուսափող արտադրողությունները առանց որևէ փոխլեզվով խորհրդանշումների:", 'az': 'Sözlər içərisində təhsil edildikləri dillərin dillərin dillərini tutmaq üçün daha yaxşı tanıdırlar. Araştırmacılar həmçinin bu düzgünlüklər dillərə daşınabilir. Lakin, əvvəlki təkrar dilli sözləri birləşdirmək üçün təkrar dilli sinyalləri gözətçi olaraq, ya da paralel korpus, ya da süd leksikonu olaraq lazımdır. Bu işdə, biz bu çoxlu dil bağlantısının əslində heç bir nəzarətsiz qurulmasını göstəririk. Biz bu sonu, problemi təbiətli düşmənçi oyun olaraq formülə edərək, başarılı təhsil üçün çox mövcuddur teknikləri incidirik. Biz müəyyən edilməmiş iki dil leksikon induksyonu işində değerlendiririk. Bu işin içərisində çox dilli görünür olsa da, biz hər bir çox dil ipləri olmadan təşkil edən performansını göstərə bilərik.', 'bn': 'ভাষার ভাষার নিয়ম গ্রেফতার করার জন্য শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তি প্রদান করা সম্পর্কে পরিচিত। গবেষণাবেক্ষকদেরও দেখেছেন যে এই নিয়মিত শাসনগুলো ভাষায় পরিবর্তন করতে পারে। তবে পূর্ববর্তী প্রচেষ্টার সাধারণত ভাষার ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার শব্দের সংযোগ স্থাপনের প্রচেষ্টা সাধারণ ভাষায় ক্রস-ভাষায় সিগনাল পর্যবেক এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ধরনের সংযোগ আসলে কোন ধরনের পর্যবেক্ষণ ছাড়া প্রতিষ্ঠিত হতে পারে। আমরা এই সমস্যাকে প্রাকৃতিক বিরোধী খেলা হিসেবে তৈরি করি এবং সফল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কৌশলের তদন্ত করি। We carry out evaluation on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  যদিও এই কাজটি ভাষাভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় প্রকাশিত হয়, তবুও আমরা কোন ক্রিশ্রুভাষার কোন কোন কাজ ছাড়াই প্রদর্শন করতে পারি।', 'bs': 'Zaključavanje riječi dobro poznato je da uhvate jezičke regularnosti jezika na kojem su obučeni. Istraživači također primjećuju da te regularnosti mogu prenijeti na jezike. Međutim, prethodni pokušaji povezivanja odvojenih jednojezičkih riječi, obično zahtijevaju preko jezičkih signala kao nadzor, ili u obliku paralelnog korpusa ili leksikona semena. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se takva kroz jezička veza zapravo može uspostaviti bez bilo kojeg oblika nadzora. Postigli smo taj cilj formirajući problem kao prirodnu neprijateljsku igru i istražujući tehnike koje su ključne za uspješnu obuku. Provodimo procjenu o neodređenom zadatku za dvojezičku indukciju leksiona. Iako ovaj zadatak izgleda unutrašnjost kroz jezik, mi možemo pokazati ohrabrujuće nastave bez bilo kakvih međujezičkih tragova.', 'ca': "Word embeddings are well known to capture linguistic regularities of the language on which they are trained.  Els investigadors observen també que aquestes regularitats poden transferir a través de llengües. Tanmateix, els esforços anteriors per connectar integracions monolingües diferents requereixen senyals translingües com supervisió, tant en forma de corpus paral·lel com de lexicó de semilles. En aquesta feina, demostram que aquesta connexió translingüística pot ser estabelecida sense cap forma de supervisió. Obtenim aquest objectiu formulant el problem a com un joc adversari natural, i investigant tècniques que són crucials per a treinar amb èxit. Fem una evaluació sobre la tasca d'inducció bilingüe sense supervisió. Tot i que aquesta tasca sembla intrínsecament translingüística, som capaços de demostrar desempenys encorajadors sense cap indici translingüístic.", 'cs': 'Vložení slov je dobře známo tím, že zachycuje jazykové pravidelnosti jazyka, na kterém jsou trénováni. Výzkumníci také pozorují, že tyto pravidelnosti se mohou přenášet napříč jazyky. Nicméně předchozí snahy o propojení samostatných jednojjazyčných slovních vložení obvykle vyžadují cross-jazyčné signály jako dohled, buď ve formě paralelního korpusu nebo seed lexikonu. V této práci ukazujeme, že takové napříč jazyky lze skutečně navázat bez jakékoliv formy dohledu. Tohoto cíle dosáhneme formulováním problému jako přirozené nepřátelské hry a zkoumáním technik, které jsou klíčové pro úspěšný trénink. Provádíme hodnocení bez dozoru dvojjazyčné indukční úlohy lexikonu. I když se tento úkol jeví vnitřně napříč jazyky, jsme schopni prokázat povzbuzující výkon bez jakýchkoliv napříč jazyky stopy.', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamine on hästi teada, et see hõlmab keele keelelisi korrapärasusi, milles neid koolitatakse. Teadlased märgivad ka, et need korrapärasused võivad üle kanda keelte. Kuid varasemad püüdlused eraldi ühekeelsete sõnade manustamise ühendamiseks nõuavad tavaliselt keeleüleseid signaale, kas paralleelse korpuse või seemne leksikoni kujul. Selles töös näitame, et sellist keeleülest seost saab tegelikult luua ilma igasuguse järelevalveta. Me saavutame selle eesmärgi, sõnastades probleemi loomuliku vastasmänguna ja uurides tehnikaid, mis on olulised eduka treeningu jaoks. Hindame järelevalveta kakskeelset leksikoni induktsiooni ülesannet. Kuigi see ülesanne tundub olemuslikult keeleülene, suudame näidata julgustavat tulemust ilma keeleüleste vihjeta.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten tiedetään kuvaavan sen kielen kielellisiä säännöllisyyksiä, jolla ne on koulutettu. Tutkijat havaitsivat myös, että nämä säännönmukaisuudet voivat siirtyä eri kielillä. Aiemmat pyrkimykset yhdistää erillisiä yksikielisiä sanaupotuksia vaativat kuitenkin yleensä monikielisiä signaaleja ohjauksena joko rinnakkaiskorpusen tai siemensanaston muodossa. Tässä työssä osoitamme, että tällainen monikielinen yhteys voidaan itse asiassa luoda ilman minkäänlaista valvontaa. Saavutamme tämän tavoitteen muotoilemalla ongelman luonnollisena vastustajapelinä ja tutkimalla tekniikoita, jotka ovat ratkaisevia onnistuneen koulutuksen kannalta. Arvioimme valvomattoman kaksikielisen sanaston induktiotehtävän. Vaikka tämä tehtävä vaikuttaa luontaisesti monikieliseltä, pystymme osoittamaan rohkaisevaa suorituskykyä ilman monikielisiä johtolankoja.', 'jv': 'embedding Jejaring politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ngerasakno lan tambah-barêng langgar kuwi bisa nguasakno nang sampeyan siji maneh. Awak dhéwé ngerasah iki ngono nggawe perusahaan langgar aturan pakan, lan didhaké aturan sing dikarepaké nggawe aturan sing dikarepaké. Awak dhéwé éntuk cara-cara nggawe barang nggawe lewat urip gak dhéwé. Ingat kabèh lan saiki nggambar obah-obahan luwih-luwih sabanjuré, kita iso ngubah nggambar obah-obahan seneng pisan-ingkang.', 'sk': 'Vgradnje besed je dobro znano po tem, da zajemajo jezikovne pravilnosti jezika, na katerem so usposobljeni. Raziskovalci ugotavljajo tudi, da se te pravilnosti lahko prenašajo med jeziki. Vendar pa predhodna prizadevanja za povezovanje ločenih enojezičnih besednih vdelav običajno zahtevajo medjezične signale kot nadzor, bodisi v obliki vzporednega korpusa ali semenskega leksikona. V tem delu pokažemo, da je takšno medjezično povezavo mogoče dejansko vzpostaviti brez kakršnega koli nadzora. Ta cilj dosežemo tako, da problem oblikujemo kot naravno tekmovalno igro in raziskujemo tehnike, ki so ključne za uspešno usposabljanje. Izvajamo vrednotenje nenadzorovane naloge indukcije dvojezičnega leksikona. Čeprav se ta naloga zdi bistveno medjezična, lahko dokažemo spodbudno delovanje brez medjezičnih namigov.', 'he': 'הכנסת מילים ידועה היטב לתפוס חוקיות שפתיים של השפה בה הם מאומנים. מחקרים גם מתבוננים שהחוקים האלה יכולים להעביר דרך שפות. בכל אופן, המאמצים הקודמים לחבר מילים מונושפתיות נפרדות דורשות בדרך כלל אותים דרך שפתיים בתור פיקוח, או בצורה של קורפוס מקביל או לקסיקון זרע. בעבודה הזאת, אנו מראים שקשור שלפני שפת כזה יכול למעשה להיקים ללא שום צורה של פיקוח. אנו משיגים את הסוף הזה על ידי ליצור את הבעיה כמשחק יריבי טבעי, ולחקר טכניקות החשובות לאימונים מצליחים. אנו מבצעים עריכה על משימת ההתחלה ללקסיקון השולשי. למרות שהמשימה הזאת נראית בצורה טבעית בין שפות, אנחנו מסוגלים להוכיח ביצועים מעודדים ללא רמזים בין שפות.', 'ha': "An san da akwatin maganar da aka shigar da su cikin harshen da aka sanar da su. Wata kebiyi suna ganin cewa waɗannan kanuni za'a shige wasu harshe. A lokacin da, aikin da ya gabãta ya yi amfani da haɗi da maganar da ke cikin ɗayan ayuka da aka shigar da shi, yana da amfani da alama masu ƙaranci ta zama sura, ko kuma, cikin tsarin korus ko kuma fassaran leksisin. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna cewa, za'a iya samar da wannan shirin lugha mai fassara, ba da wani irin tsari ba. Mu sami wannan kafin da za'a bayyana matabbata kamar game da ke kangara, kuma masu tambayi technical da ke da muhimu zuwa mafara. Munã samar rabon aikin da ba'a tsare shi ba na lugha biyu. Haƙĩƙa, kuma kõ da wannan aikin ya bayyana a cikin harshen, sai za mu iya iya nuna aikin da za'a yi amfani da shi ba ko da wata fassara na fassarar-harshen.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཁོངས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩིས་གཞི་འདི་དག་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་པའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱེད་ཀྱང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་དཔའ་བཅས་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་པའི་ནང་དུ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མིང་རྣམས་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་དགོས་པ་ཡ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་གང་ཡང་མེད་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདི་དངོས ང་ཚོས་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩེད་མོལ་ཞིག་གི་དཀའ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་གཏོང་བྱས་ནས། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ལས་ཀྱང་ཉེས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་ནའང་།'}
{'en': 'Estimating Code-Switching on Twitter with a Novel Generalized Word-Level Language Detection Technique', 'ar': 'تقدير تبديل الشفرة على تويتر باستخدام تقنية جديدة معممة لاكتشاف اللغة على مستوى الكلمات', 'pt': 'Estimando a troca de código no Twitter com uma nova técnica de detecção de linguagem generalizada em nível de palavra', 'fr': "Estimation du changement de code sur Twitter à l'aide d'une nouvelle technique de détection de langage généralisée au niveau des mots", 'es': 'Estimación del cambio de código en Twitter con una novedosa técnica generalizada de detección del lenguaje a nivel de palabras', 'ja': '新規の一般化された単語レベルの言語検出テクニックを使用したTwitterでのコードスイッチングの推定', 'zh': '用广义字级语检测Twitter代码切换', 'ru': 'Оценка обмена кодами в Twitter с помощью новой обобщенной технологии определения языка на уровне слова', 'hi': 'एक उपन्यास सामान्यीकृत वर्ड-स्तर की भाषा का पता लगाने की तकनीक के साथ चहचहाना पर कोड-स्विचिंग का अनुमान लगाना', 'ga': 'Ag Meastú Cóid-Athrú ar Twitter le Teicníc Braite Teanga Úrscéalta ar Leibhéal Focal', 'hu': 'Kódváltás becslése Twitteren egy új, általános szószintű nyelvfelismerési technikával', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εκτίμηση της αλλαγής κώδικα στο Twitter με μια νέα γενικευμένη τεχνική ανίχνευσης γλώσσας σε επίπεδο λέξεων', 'it': 'Stima il cambio di codice su Twitter con una nuova tecnica di rilevamento del linguaggio generalizzato a livello di parole', 'lt': 'Apskaičiuojamas kodų keitimas Twitter naudojant naują generalizuotą žodžių lygio kalbų aptikimo techniką', 'mk': 'Проценка на промена на код на Твитер со нова генерализирана техника за детекција на јазик на зборови', 'kk': 'Твиттердегі код- ауыстыруды Novel Жалпы сөз деңгейі тілді анықтау техникасы', 'ms': 'Menghargai Pertukaran-Kod pada Twitter dengan Teknik Pengesanan Bahasa Tahap-Kata Baru Yang Umum', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d കോഡ്- മാറ്റുന്ന നോവല്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്ക്- നില ഭാഷയുടെ ഡിറ്റെറ്റിങ് ടെക്നിക്ക്', 'mt': 'Stima tal-Iskambju tal-Kodiċi fuq Twitter b’Teknika Ġeneralizzata Ġdida għad-Detezzjoni tal-Lingwa fil-Livell tal-Kliem', 'mn': 'Твиттерт Код-Связгаарлах нь Новол Ерөнхийлөгдсөн үг-түвшин Холбоо Тайлбарлах Техник', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Ocena przełączania kodu na Twitterze za pomocą nowej ogólnej techniki wykrywania języka na poziomie słowa', 'ro': 'Estimarea comutării codului pe Twitter cu o nouă tehnică generalizată de detectare a limbajului la nivel de cuvinte', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje šifra prebacivanja na Twitter sa tehnikom otkrivanja jezika na Novelom generalizovanom nivou reči', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isku imaanshaha Code-Switching Twitterka with a Novel Generalized Word-Level Detection Technique', 'sv': 'Uppskatta kodväxling på Twitter med en ny, generaliserad språkdetekteringsteknik på ordnivå', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đang dự đoán mã-chuyển lên Twitter với một công nghệ trinh sát ngôn ngữ văn học phổ biến tiểu thuyết.', 'da': 'Skøn kodeskift på Twitter med en ny, generelt ordniveau sprogdetekteringsteknik', 'bg': 'Оценка на кодово превключване в Туитър с нова обща технология за откриване на език на ниво дума', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje šifra prebacivanja na Twitter sa tehnikom otkrivanja jezika na Novelom generaliziranom nivou riječi', 'nl': 'Schatting van code-switching op Twitter met een nieuwe algemene taaldetectietechniek op woordniveau', 'id': 'Perkiraan Pertukaran Kode di Twitter dengan Teknik Deteksi Bahasa Tingkat Kata-Kata yang Umum Baru', 'de': 'Schätzung von Code-Switching auf Twitter mit einer neuartigen generalisierten Spracherkennungstechnik auf Wortebene', 'ko': '새로운 광의어급 언어 검사 기술로 트위터의 코드 전환을 추정하다', 'fa': 'تقریباً تغییر دادن کد در توئیتر با تکنیک شناسایی زبان\u200cهای ژنرال نول', 'sw': 'Kuanza Kubadilisha Sheria kupitia mtandao wa Twita na Sayansi inayojumuisha Utafiti Technique', 'tr': 'Täzelençe Däpli Sözler Taýşartma Tehnikleri bilen Taýýarlamak', 'af': "Estimateer Kode-Wissel op Twitter met 'n Novel Generaliseerde Woord-Vlak Taal-Deteksie Tehniks", 'sq': 'Duke vlerësuar shkëmbimin e kodeve në Twitter me një teknikë të gjeneralizuar për zbulimin e gjuhëve në nivelin e fjalëve', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Ագնահատում է Թվիթերի կոդի փոխակերպումը նոր ընդհանուր բառերի մակարդակի լեզվի հայտնաբերման տեխնիկայի միջոցով', 'az': 'Tövründə Kod-İstifadəçisi Novel Generalized Word-Level Dili Keşfetme Tehnikləri ilə', 'bn': 'টুইটারে কোড- পরিবর্তন হিসেবে গণনা করা হচ্ছে একটি নোভেল সাধারণ শব্দ-স্তরের ভাষা সনাক্তি প্রযুক্তি', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje šifra prebacivanja na Twitter sa tehnikom otkrivanja jezika na Novelom generaliziranom nivou riječi', 'ca': 'Estima el canvi de codi a Twitter amb una nova tècnica generalitzada de detecció de llenguatges', 'cs': 'Odhad přepínání kódu na Twitteru pomocí nové generalizované techniky detekce jazyka na úrovni slova', 'et': 'Koodi vahetamise hindamine Twitteris uue üldise sõnataseme keele tuvastamise tehnika abil', 'fi': 'Koodinvaihdon arviointi Twitterissä uudella yleisellä sanatason kielen tunnistustekniikalla', 'jv': 'Common', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הערכת החלפת קודים בטוויטר עם טכניקה חדשה לגלות שפת ברמה מילים', 'sk': 'Ocenjevanje preklapljanja kod v Twitterju z novo splošno tehniko zaznavanja jezika na ravni besed', 'bo': 'Novel Generalized Word-Level Language Detection Technique (Novel)'}
{'en': 'Word-level language detection is necessary for analyzing code-switched text, where multiple languages could be mixed within a sentence. Existing models are restricted to code-switching between two specific languages and fail in real-world scenarios as text input rarely has a priori information on the languages used. We present a novel unsupervised word-level language detection technique for code-switched text for an arbitrarily large number of languages, which does not require any manually annotated training data. Our experiments with tweets in seven languages show a 74 % relative error reduction in word-level labeling with respect to competitive baselines. We then use this system to conduct a large-scale quantitative analysis of code-switching patterns on Twitter, both global as well as region-specific, with 58 M tweets.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف اللغة على مستوى الكلمات أمرًا ضروريًا لتحليل النص المُبدّل بالشفرة ، حيث يمكن خلط لغات متعددة في جملة. تقتصر النماذج الحالية على التبديل بين لغتين محددتين وتفشل في سيناريوهات العالم الحقيقي حيث نادرًا ما يحتوي إدخال النص على معلومات مسبقة عن اللغات المستخدمة. نقدم تقنية جديدة للكشف عن اللغة على مستوى الكلمات غير خاضعة للإشراف للنص المحول بالشفرة لعدد كبير من اللغات بشكل تعسفي ، والتي لا تتطلب أي بيانات تدريب مشروحة يدويًا. تُظهر تجاربنا مع التغريدات في سبع لغات انخفاضًا في الخطأ النسبي بنسبة 74٪ في وضع العلامات على مستوى الكلمات فيما يتعلق بخطوط الأساس التنافسية. ثم نستخدم هذا النظام لإجراء تحليل كمي واسع النطاق لأنماط تبديل الشفرة على Twitter ، سواء على المستوى العالمي أو الخاص بالمنطقة ، مع 58 مليون تغريدة.', 'es': 'La detección del idioma a nivel de palabras es necesaria para analizar texto con cambio de código, donde se pueden mezclar varios idiomas dentro de una oración. Los modelos existentes están restringidos al cambio de código entre dos idiomas específicos y fallan en situaciones del mundo real, ya que la entrada de texto rara vez tiene información a priori sobre los idiomas utilizados. Presentamos una novedosa técnica de detección de idioma no supervisada a nivel de palabras para texto con cambio de código para un número arbitrariamente grande de idiomas, que no requiere ningún dato de entrenamiento anotado manualmente. Nuestros experimentos con tuits en siete idiomas muestran una reducción relativa del 74% de errores en el etiquetado a nivel de palabras con respecto a las líneas de base competitivas. Luego, utilizamos este sistema para realizar un análisis cuantitativo a gran escala de los patrones de cambio de código en Twitter, tanto globales como específicos de la región, con 58 millones de tuits.', 'pt': 'A detecção de idioma em nível de palavra é necessária para analisar texto comutado por código, onde vários idiomas podem ser misturados em uma frase. Os modelos existentes são restritos à alternância de código entre dois idiomas específicos e falham em cenários do mundo real, pois a entrada de texto raramente possui informações a priori sobre os idiomas usados. Apresentamos uma nova técnica de detecção de linguagem em nível de palavra não supervisionada para texto comutado por código para um número arbitrariamente grande de idiomas, que não requer nenhum dado de treinamento anotado manualmente. Nossos experimentos com tweets em sete idiomas mostram uma redução de erro relativo de 74% na rotulagem em nível de palavra em relação às linhas de base competitivas. Em seguida, usamos esse sistema para realizar uma análise quantitativa em larga escala dos padrões de troca de código no Twitter, tanto globais quanto específicos da região, com 58 milhões de tweets.', 'fr': "La détection de la langue au niveau du mot est nécessaire pour analyser le texte à commutation de code, dans lequel plusieurs langues peuvent être mélangées dans une phrase. Les modèles existants sont limités à la commutation de code entre deux langues spécifiques et échouent dans des scénarios réels, car la saisie de texte contient rarement des informations a priori sur les langues utilisées. Nous présentons une nouvelle technique non supervisée de détection de langage au niveau du mot pour du texte commuté par code pour un nombre arbitrairement élevé de langues, qui ne nécessite aucune donnée d'apprentissage annotée manuellement. Nos expériences avec des tweets en sept langues montrent une réduction de 74\xa0% des erreurs relatives dans l'étiquetage au niveau des mots par rapport aux références concurrentielles. Nous utilisons ensuite ce système pour effectuer une analyse quantitative à grande échelle des modèles de changement de code sur Twitter, tant au niveau mondial que régional, avec 58 millions de tweets.", 'ja': '単語レベルの言語検出は、複数の言語が文章内で混在する可能性のあるコード切り替えテキストを分析するために必要です。既存のモデルは、2つの特定の言語間のコードスイッチングに限定されており、テキスト入力が使用される言語に関する事前情報を持つことはほとんどないため、現実のシナリオでは失敗します。私たちは、手動でアノテーションされたトレーニングデータを必要としない、恣意的に多数の言語のコードスイッチングされたテキストのための新規の無監督ワードレベル言語検出技術を提示します。7つの言語でのツイートの実験では、競合ベースラインと比較して、単語レベルのラベリングの相対的なエラーが74%減少しています。その後、このシステムを使用して、グローバルおよび地域固有のツイート数5800万件のTwitter上のコードスイッチングパターンの大規模な定量分析を行います。', 'hi': 'कोड-स्विच्ड पाठ का विश्लेषण करने के लिए वर्ड-लेवल लैंग्वेज डिटेक्शन आवश्यक है, जहां एक वाक्य के भीतर कई भाषाओं को मिलाया जा सकता है। मौजूदा मॉडल दो विशिष्ट भाषाओं के बीच कोड-स्विचिंग तक सीमित हैं और वास्तविक दुनिया के परिदृश्यों में विफल होते हैं क्योंकि पाठ इनपुट में शायद ही कभी उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषाओं पर एक प्राथमिकता जानकारी होती है। हम मनमाने ढंग से बड़ी संख्या में भाषाओं के लिए कोड-स्विच किए गए पाठ के लिए एक उपन्यास अप्रकाशित शब्द-स्तरीय भाषा का पता लगाने की तकनीक प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसके लिए किसी भी मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। सात भाषाओं में ट्वीट्स के साथ हमारे प्रयोगों से प्रतिस्पर्धी बेसलाइन के संबंध में शब्द-स्तर लेबलिंग में 74% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी दिखाई देती है। फिर हम इस प्रणाली का उपयोग ट्विटर पर कोड-स्विचिंग पैटर्न के बड़े पैमाने पर मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण करने के लिए करते हैं, दोनों वैश्विक और साथ ही क्षेत्र-विशिष्ट, 58 एम ट्वीट्स के साथ।', 'zh': 'Word级言检代码切换文本须,其中多种语言可混一句。 今模形止于两特定语言之间代码切换之,且败于实场,盖文本输少有所先验信也。 新无监督字级语言检测,施于代码切换本,不须手动注。 七言之推文实验见,相对竞基线,单词差减74%。 然后用此系统对Twitter代码切换式大定量分析,包全球域,5800万推文。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение языка на уровне слова необходимо для анализа текста с переключением кода, где несколько языков могут быть смешаны в пределах предложения. Существующие модели ограничены переключением кода между двумя конкретными языками и терпят неудачу в реальных сценариях, поскольку ввод текста редко содержит априорную информацию об используемых языках. Мы представляем новую неконтролируемую методику определения языка на уровне слов для текста с переключением кода для произвольно большого количества языков, которая не требует каких-либо вручную аннотированных обучающих данных. Наши эксперименты с твитами на семи языках показывают относительное снижение погрешности маркировки на уровне слов на 74% по сравнению с конкурентными базовыми линиями. Затем мы используем эту систему для проведения крупномасштабного количественного анализа шаблонов переключения кода в Twitter, как глобального, так и регионального, с 58 миллионами твитов.', 'ga': 'Tá braite teanga ag leibhéal na bhfocal riachtanach chun anailís a dhéanamh ar théacs códmhalartaithe, áit a bhféadfaí teangacha iolracha a mheascadh laistigh d’abairt. Tá samhlacha atá ann faoi láthair teoranta do chómhalartú cód idir dhá theanga ar leith agus teipeann orthu i gcásanna sa saol fíor mar is annamh a bhíonn faisnéis priori ag ionchur téacs ar na teangacha a úsáidtear. Cuirimid i láthair teicníocht nua braite teanga leibhéal focal gan mhaoirseacht do théacs códmhalartaithe do líon mór teangacha treallach, nach dteastaíonn aon sonraí oiliúna anótáilte de láimh. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh le tvuíteanna i seacht dteanga laghdú coibhneasta 74% ar earráidí i lipéadú leibhéal focal maidir le bunlínte iomaíocha. Bainimid úsáid as an gcóras seo ansin chun anailís chainníochtúil mhórscála a dhéanamh ar phatrúin aistrithe cód ar Twitter, idir dhomhanda agus réigiún-shonrach, le 58M tweets.', 'hu': 'A kódkapcsolt szöveg elemzéséhez szószintű nyelvfelismerésre van szükség, ahol több nyelv is keverhető egy mondatban. A meglévő modellek két nyelv közötti kódváltásra korlátozódnak, és valós forgatókönyvekben nem sikerülnek, mivel a szövegbevitel ritkán rendelkezik priori információkkal a használt nyelvekről. Egy új, felügyelet nélküli szószintű nyelvfelismerési technikát mutatunk be önkényesen nagy számú nyelvre vonatkozóan kódkapcsolt szöveghez, amely nem igényel manuálisan jegyzetelt képzési adatokat. A hét nyelven végzett tweetekkel végzett kísérleteink 74%-os relatív hibacsökkenést mutatnak a versenyképes alapvonalakhoz képest. Ezt követően ezt a rendszert használjuk arra, hogy a Twitteren nagyszabású mennyiségi elemzést végezzünk a kódváltási mintákról, mind globális, mind régióspecifikus, 58M tweettel.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση γλωσσών σε επίπεδο λέξης είναι απαραίτητη για την ανάλυση κειμένου με εναλλαγή κώδικα, όπου πολλές γλώσσες θα μπορούσαν να αναμειχθούν μέσα σε μια πρόταση. Τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα περιορίζονται στην εναλλαγή κώδικα μεταξύ δύο συγκεκριμένων γλωσσών και αποτυγχάνουν σε σενάρια πραγματικού κόσμου, καθώς η εισαγωγή κειμένου σπάνια περιέχει εκ των προτέρων πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις γλώσσες που χρησιμοποιούνται. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα τεχνική ανίχνευσης γλώσσας σε επίπεδο λέξεων χωρίς επίβλεψη για κείμενο με εναλλαγή κώδικα για έναν αυθαίρετα μεγάλο αριθμό γλωσσών, η οποία δεν απαιτεί χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Τα πειράματά μας με tweets σε επτά γλώσσες δείχνουν μια 74% σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων στη σήμανση σε επίπεδο λέξεων σε σχέση με ανταγωνιστικές γραμμές βάσης. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε αυτό το σύστημα για να πραγματοποιήσουμε μια μεγάλης κλίμακας ποσοτική ανάλυση των προτύπων αλλαγής κώδικα στο Twitter, τόσο παγκόσμιων όσο και συγκεκριμένων περιοχών, με tweets 58M.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დონე ენის განახსნა უნდა იყოს კოდის გადაცვლა ტექსტის ანალიზაციისთვის, სადაც მრავალი ენები შეიძლება გადაცვლა სიტყვებში. მსოფლიო მოდელები ორი განსაკუთრებული ენების შეცვლისთვის დადგენა და არ შედგა რეალური მსოფლიო სინარიოში, როგორც ტექსტის შეცვლისთვის წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა პრიორი ინფ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის უცნობილი სიტყვების სიტყვების განვიცნობის ტექნოგია, რომელიც კოდის შეცვლა ტექნონისთვის, რომელიც არაფერად დიდი ენათებისთვის, რომელიც არაფერად მო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც შვიდი ენაში ცხოვრებულია, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს 74% შეცდომის შეცდომის შემცირებას სიტყვების დონეზე შემდეგ ჩვენ ამ სისტემის გამოყენება, რომ გავაკეთოთ დიდი კოლუტიტური ანალიზაციის კოლუტიტური კოლუტიტური ანალიზაცია Twitter-ში, რომელიც გლობალური და რეგიონტიკური კ', 'it': "Il rilevamento della lingua a livello di parola è necessario per analizzare il testo a commutazione di codice, dove più lingue possono essere mescolate all'interno di una frase. I modelli esistenti sono limitati alla commutazione di codice tra due lingue specifiche e falliscono negli scenari reali poiché l'immissione di testo raramente ha informazioni a priori sulle lingue utilizzate. Presentiamo una nuova tecnica di rilevamento del linguaggio a livello di parola non supervisionata per il testo a commutazione di codice per un numero arbitrariamente elevato di lingue, che non richiede alcun dato di formazione annotato manualmente. I nostri esperimenti con tweet in sette lingue mostrano una riduzione relativa degli errori del 74% nell'etichettatura a livello di parola rispetto alle linee di base competitive. Usiamo quindi questo sistema per condurre un'analisi quantitativa su larga scala dei modelli di scambio di codice su Twitter, sia globali che regionali, con 58M tweet.", 'lt': 'Word-level language detection is necessary for analyzing code-switched text, where multiple languages could be mixed within a sentence.  Esami modeliai apsiriboja kodų keitimu tarp dviejų konkrečių kalbų, o realiojo pasaulio scenarijų nepavyksta, nes teksto įvestis retai turi a priori informacijos apie vartojamas kalbas. Mes pristatome naują neprižiūrėtą kalbų nustatymo metodą, skirtą kodais pakeistam tekstui savavališkai dideliam kalbų skaičiui, kuriam nereikia jokių rankiniu būdu anotuotų mokymo duomenų. Mūsų eksperimentai su tweetais septyniomis kalbomis rodo 74 proc. santykinę klaidų mažinimą žodžių lygio etiketėse, palyginti su konkurencinėmis bazinėmis linijomis. Tuomet naudojame šią sistemą, kad atliktume plataus masto kiekybinę kodų keitimo modelių analizę Twitter, tiek pasauliniu, tiek regioniniu mastu, su 58M tweetais.', 'mk': 'Детектирање на јазик на ниво на зборови е неопходно за анализирање на текстот со промена на код, каде што повеќе јазици може да се мешаат во реченица. Постојаните модели се ограничени на промена на кодови помеѓу двата специфични јазици и не успеваат во реалните сценарија бидејќи текстовите внесувања ретко имаат a priori информации за употребените јазици. Презентираме нова ненадгледувана техника за детекција на јазик на ниво на зборови за текст заменет со код за арбитрално голем број јазици, што не бара никакви рачно анотирани податоци за обука. Our experiments with tweets in seven languages show a 74% relative error reduction in word-level labeling with respect to competitive baselines.  Потоа го користиме овој систем за да спроведеме голема квантитивна анализа на моделите на промена на кодови на Твитер, и глобални, и регионални, со 58M твитови.', 'kk': 'Код ауыстырылған мәтін талдау үшін сөз деңгейіндегі тілді анықтау керек. Бірнеше тілді сөз ішінде аралас алады. Бар үлгілер екі ерекше тілдер арасында код ауыстыруға шектелген және шын әлемдік сценарияларда болмайды. Мәтін келтірілгені тілдер туралы priori мәліметі көбірек болмайды. Біз код ауыстырылған тілдер үлкен тілдерге ауыстырылмаған сөз деңгейінің анықтау техникасын таңдаймыз. Бұл қолмен ауыстырылмаған оқыту деректері қажет етпейді. Жеті тілде tweets туралы тәжірибелеріміз сөздер деңгейінің жарлығына қатынау үшін 74% қатесін азайтады. Содан кейін Бұл жүйені Твиттерде код ауыстыру үлгілерінің көп өлшемі анализ үшін қолданамыз, жалпы және бөлігінің бөлігін 58M tweets арқылы.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan bahasa aras perkataan diperlukan untuk menganalisis teks yang ditukar-kod, di mana bahasa berbilang boleh dicampur dalam satu kalimat. Model yang sedia ada diharamkan untuk menukar kod diantara dua bahasa spesifik dan gagal dalam skenario dunia nyata kerana input teks jarang mempunyai maklumat priori tentang bahasa yang digunakan. Kami perkenalkan teknik pengesan bahasa aras perkataan yang tidak diawasi untuk teks yang ditukar-kod untuk bilangan bahasa yang besar secara arbitrari, yang tidak memerlukan mana-mana data latihan yang dicatat secara manual. Eksperimen kami dengan tweet dalam tujuh bahasa menunjukkan pengurangan ralat relatif 74% dalam label aras perkataan berkaitan dengan garis dasar kompetitif. Kemudian kita gunakan sistem ini untuk melakukan analisis kuantitatif skala besar corak penyukaran kod di Twitter, baik global dan khusus kawasan, dengan 58M tweet.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-lingwi fil-livell tal-kliem hija meħtieġa għall-analiżi tat-test mibdul bil-kodiċi, fejn diversi lingwi jistgħu jitħalltu fi ħdan sentenza. Il-mudelli eżistenti huma ristretti għall-bdil tal-kodiċi bejn żewġ lingwi speċifiċi u jfallu fix-xenarji tad-dinja reali peress li l-input tat-test rarament ikollu informazzjoni a priori dwar il-lingwi użati. Aħna nippreżentaw teknika ġdida għall-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwi fil-livell tal-kliem mhux sorveljata għal test imbiddel bil-kodiċi għal numru arbitrarjament kbir ta’ lingwi, li ma teħtieġ l-ebda dejta ta’ taħriġ annotata manwalment. L-esperimenti tagħna b’tweets f’seba’ lingwi juru tnaqqis relattiv ta’ 74 % fl-ittikkettar fil-livell tal-kliem fir-rigward tal-linji bażi kompetittivi. Imbagħad nużaw din is-sistema biex nagħmlu analiżi kwantitattiva fuq skala kbira ta’ mudelli ta’ skambju ta’ kodiċijiet fuq Twitter, kemm globali kif ukoll speċifiċi għar-reġjun, b’58M tweets.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്കിനുള്ളില്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളും കലര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വാക്ക്- നില ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d കോഡ്- മാറ്റുന്നതിനു് നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക സ കോഡ്- മാറ്റുന്ന പദാവലിയ്ക്കുള്ള വാക്ക് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന സാധ്യതയ ഏഴു ഭാഷയില്\u200d ടൂട്ടികളുമായി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d 74% വാക്ക് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നത് പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നി പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കോഡ് മാറ്റുന്ന രീതികളുടെ ഒരു വലിയ വിശദീകരണവും പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ്. ഗ്ലോക്കല്\u200d', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie języka na poziomie słowa jest niezbędne do analizy tekstu przełączanego kodem, gdzie wiele języków może być mieszane w jednym zdaniu. Istniejące modele ograniczają się do przełączania kodu między dwoma konkretnymi językami i nie powodują, że wprowadzanie tekstu rzadko zawiera informacje a priori na temat używanych języków. Przedstawiamy nową, bez nadzoru technikę wykrywania języka na poziomie słów dla tekstu przełączanego kodem dla dowolnie dużej liczby języków, która nie wymaga ręcznie adnotacji danych treningowych. Nasze eksperymenty z tweetami w siedmiu językach pokazują 74% względne zmniejszenie błędów w etykietowaniu na poziomie słów w odniesieniu do konkurencyjnych linii bazowych. Następnie używamy tego systemu do przeprowadzenia dużej skali analizy ilościowej wzorców przełączania kodu na Twitterze, zarówno globalnych, jak i regionalnych, z tweetami 58M.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av ordnivåspråk er nødvendig for å analysera tekst som er bytt med kode, der fleire språk kan blanda i eit setning. Dette eksisterande modeller er avgrensa til å byta kode mellom to spesifikke språk og mislukka i verkelege scenarioar, sidan tekstinndata ofte har ei priori informasjon om språka som vert brukt. Vi presenterer ein novel uavhengig ordnivåoppdagingsteknikk for kodbytt tekst for eit vilkårleg stor tal språk, som ikkje krev nokon manuelt opplæringsdata. Eksperimentane våre med tweets i sju språk viser ei relativt feilreduksjon i ordnivåetiketting med hensyn til konkurentære baselinjer. Vi bruker denne systemet så for å gjera ein stor kvantitativ analyse av kodbyttemønsteret på Twitter, både globalt og regionalspesifikert, med 58M-tweet.', 'ro': 'Detectarea limbajului la nivel de cuvinte este necesară pentru analizarea textului schimbat de cod, unde mai multe limbi pot fi amestecate într-o propoziție. Modelele existente sunt limitate la schimbarea codurilor între două limbi specifice și nu reușesc în scenariile din lumea reală, deoarece introducerea textului rareori are informații a priori privind limbile utilizate. Vă prezentăm o nouă tehnică de detectare a limbajului la nivel de cuvinte nesupravegheată pentru text schimbat de cod pentru un număr arbitrar de limbi, care nu necesită date de instruire adnotate manual. Experimentele noastre cu tweet-uri în șapte limbi arată o reducere relativă a erorilor de 74% în etichetarea la nivel de cuvinte în raport cu liniile de referință competitive. Apoi folosim acest sistem pentru a efectua o analiză cantitativă la scară largă a modelelor de schimbare a codului pe Twitter, atât la nivel global, cât și specific regiunii, cu 58M de tweet-uri.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje jezika na nivou reči je potrebno za analiziranje teksta zamijenjenog kod, gde bi se moglo miješati više jezika u rečenici. Postojeći modeli su ograničeni na prebacivanje koda između dva određena jezika i neuspjeh u scenarijima stvarnog svijeta, jer tekstski ulaz rijetko ima priori informacije o korištenim jezicima. Predstavljamo novu tehniku otkrivanja jezika na nivou rijeèi koji se predstavljaju kod za proizvoljno veliki broj jezika, koji ne zahteva nikakve podatke o ruènom obrazovanju. Naši eksperimenti sa tweetom na sedam jezika pokazuju relativno smanjenje greške na 74% u etiketi na nivou riječi u odnosu na konkurentne osnovne linije. Onda koristimo ovaj sistem da bi proveli veliku kvantitativnu analizu obrazaca zamjene koda na Twitter, globalno i regionalno specifično, sa 58M tweets.', 'si': 'වචන භාෂාව හොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරපු පාළුව විශ්ලේෂනය සඳහා, වචනයක් ඇතුල් භාෂාවක්  විශේෂ භාෂාවක් දෙකක් අතර විශේෂ භාෂාවක් අතර විශේෂ විදියට කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරන්න අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ ඇත්ත ලෝක අපි කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරපු භාෂාවක් ගොඩක් ලොකු භාෂාවක් සඳහා කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරපු භාෂාව හොයාගන්න බැරි වචන භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවන්නේ භාෂාව 7යි ට්විට් වලින් තියෙන්නේ 74% සම්බන්ධ වැරැද්දක් පෙන්වන්නේ වචන-ලේබල් වල පස්සේ අපි මේ පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විටර් එක්ක කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න, ජාතික ව', 'so': 'Waxaa muhiim ah in la ogaado luuqada heerka ah si aad u baahan karto baaritaanka qoraalka codsiga, kaas oo lagu isku xiri karo luuqado kala duduwan. Tilmaamaha joogtada waxaa laga xadgudaa beddelinta isbedelka labada luqadood oo gaar ah islamarkaasna lagu baaraandegay xaaladaha caalamiga ah, sababtoo ah marka laga soo qoro qoraalka, macluumaad hore oo ku saabsan luuqadaha lagu isticmaalayo. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa warqad a an la ilaalinayn aqoonta luqada aqoonta ee aqoonta qoraalka lagu beddelayo si aad u kala duwan luuqado badan, taas oo aan u baahnayn macluumaad waxbarasho oo gacanta lagu tababaray. Imtixaankayada ku qoran Twitteetka oo ku qoran toddoba luqadood waxay muuqataa 74% khalad saameyn ah oo ku qoran heerka hadalka oo ku saabsan hoose-tartanka. Markaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa nidaamkan si aan u sameyno baaritaan qiyaastii aad u weyn oo ah qaababka isbedelashada noocyada Twitterka, labada caalamiga ah iyo sidoo kale agagaarka gaar ah, waxaana ku qornaa 58M.', 'sv': 'Språkdetektering på ordnivå är nödvändig för att analysera kodväxlad text, där flera språk kan blandas i en mening. Befintliga modeller är begränsade till kodväxling mellan två specifika språk och misslyckas i verkliga scenarier eftersom textinmatning sällan har a priori information om de språk som används. Vi presenterar en ny obevakad språkdetekteringsteknik på ordnivå för kodväxlad text för ett godtyckligt stort antal språk, som inte kräver några manuellt kommenterade träningsdata. Våra experiment med tweets på sju språk visar en 74% relativ felminskning i ordnivåmärkning jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga baslinjer. Vi använder sedan detta system för att genomföra en storskalig kvantitativ analys av kodbytesmönster på Twitter, både globala och regionspecifika, med 58M tweets.', 'mn': 'Код-өөрчлөгдсөн текст шинжилгээнд олон хэл холбогдож болно. Existing models are restricted to code-switching between two specific languages and fail in real-world scenarios as text input rarely has a priori information about the languages. Бид код-өөрчлөгдсөн олон хэл дээр зохиолгүй хэлний хэлний шинжлэх ухааны техник бий болгож байна. Энэ нь барилаар анзаарсан боловсрол өгөгдлийн хэрэггүй. 7 хэл дээр tweets хийсэн туршилтууд нь илтгэлийн түвшинд харьцангуй алдааны бууруулалтыг 74% харьцангуй багасгаж байна. Тэгээд бид энэ системийг Твиттерд кодын шилжүүлэх загварын том хэмжээний шинжилгээг ашиглаж, дэлхий болон бүс нутгийн тодорхойлолтой 58M tweets-тай холбоотой.', 'ta': 'குறிமுறைமாற்றப்பட்ட உரையை ஆய்வு செய்வதற்கு வார்த்தை நிலையில் கண்டுபிடிப்பது தேவை இருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிகளுக்கு இடையே குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரியாது மற்றும் உண்மையான- உலக க காட்சியில் தோல் நாம் ஒரு புதிய காப்பாற்றப்படாத சொல்- நிலை கண்டுபிடிப்பு தொழில்நுட்பம் குறியீட்டு மாற்றப்பட்ட உரைக்கான புத்தகத்தை கொண்டுள்ளோ ஏழு மொழிகளில் இருந்து கொண்டு எங்கள் சோதனைகள் 74% சார்ந்த பிழை குறைக்கும் வார்த்தை மட்டத்தில் போராட்டும் அடிப்படை பிறகு நாம் இந்த அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி குறியீட்டு மாற்றும் முறைமைகளின் அளவிற்கு அளவிற்கு ஆய்வு செய்ய பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், உலகத்திலும் மற்', 'ur': 'کلمات-سطح زبان شناسایی کی ضرورت ہے کہ کوڈ-سٹیٹ متن کی شناسایی کریں، جہاں بہت سی زبانیں ایک کلمات کے اندر مختلف ہو سکیں۔ Existing models are limited to code-switching between two specific languages and fail in real-world scenarios as text input rarely has a priori information on the languages used. ہم نے ایک نوم ناپابندی لکھی زبان کی تلاش ٹیکنیک کو کوڈ سے بدل دیا گیا ہے ایک بہت سی زبانوں کے لئے، جو کسی طرح کے ذریعہ سے اظہار نہیں کی جاتی ہے. سات زبانوں میں ٹیوٹ کے ساتھ ہماری آزمائش میں 74% نسبتا خطا کم کرتی ہے کلمات سطح لابلینگ کے معاملہ میں۔ اس کے بعد ہم اس سیسٹم کو توئیٹر پر کوڈ-سوچینگ پٹرنوں کی بڑی مقداری تحلیل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں، دونوں گروئیل اور منطقه خاص، 58M ٹویٹوں کے ساتھ۔', 'uz': "Matnni aniqlash uchun so'z- darajada aniqlash kerak. Bu yerda bir necha tillar bir so'zlarni birlashtirish mumkin. Name Biz qoʻlbola taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak emas. Yetti tillar bilan ishlatilgan tajribamizmiz 74% so'zlar qo'shilgan xato darajada o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Keyin biz bu tizimdan foydalanamiz Twitterda kod- oʻzgartirish shakllarini aniqlash uchun, dunyo va regional xususiyatlarni 58M tweetidan foydalanamiz.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện ngôn ngữ cấp Từ là cần thiết để phân tích đoạn mã đã tráo, nơi có thể trộn nhiều ngôn ngữ trong một câu. Sự tồn tại của các mô- đun chỉ dành cho việc chuyển đổi mã giữa hai ngôn ngữ cụ thể và thất bại trong các viễn cảnh thực tế, vì văn bản nhập vào hiếm khi có thông tin chính thức về ngôn ngữ đã dùng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kỹ thuật phát hiện ngôn ngữ không giám sát mới cho văn bản bị mã hóa thay đổi một số ngôn ngữ ngẫu nhiên lớn, mà không cần dữ liệu huấn luyện bằng tay. Những thí nghiệm với tweet trong bảy ngôn ngữ hiện nay là số 74. Sự giảm lỗi tương đối trong các hiệu ứng với các chữ trên so sánh. Chúng tôi sử dụng hệ thống này để thực hiện một cuộc phân tích hàng loạt các mô hình chuyển đổi mã trên Twitter, cả trên to àn cầu cũng như trên các vùng, với tweet trong 58M.', 'nl': "Taaldetectie op woordniveau is noodzakelijk voor het analyseren van code-switched tekst, waarbij meerdere talen kunnen worden gemengd binnen een zin. Bestaande modellen zijn beperkt tot code-switching tussen twee specifieke talen en falen in reële scenario's omdat tekstinvoer zelden a priori informatie bevat over de gebruikte talen. We presenteren een nieuwe, onbeheerde taaldetectietechniek op woordniveau voor code-switched tekst voor een willekeurig groot aantal talen, waarvoor geen handmatig geannoteerde trainingsgegevens nodig zijn. Onze experimenten met tweets in zeven talen tonen een 74% relatieve foutreductie in woordniveau labeling ten opzichte van concurrerende baselines. Met dit systeem voeren we vervolgens een grootschalige kwantitatieve analyse uit van code-switching patronen op Twitter, zowel wereldwijd als regiospecifiek, met 58M tweets.", 'hr': 'Otkrivanje jezika na razini riječi je potrebno za analiziranje teksta zamijenjenog kod, gdje bi se više jezika moglo miješati unutar rečenice. Postojeći modeli su ograničeni na prebacivanje koda između dva određena jezika i neuspjeh u scenarijima realnog svijeta, jer tekstualni ulaz rijetko ima priori informacije o korištenim jezicima. Predstavljamo novu tehniku otkrivanja jezika na razini riječi za proizvoljno veliki broj jezika, koja ne zahtijeva nikakve podatke o ručno označavanju obuke. Naši eksperimenti sa tweetom na sedam jezika pokazuju relativno smanjenje greške na 74% u pogledu označavanja riječi na razini konkurentnih osnovnih linija. Onda koristimo ovaj sustav kako bi provodili veliku kvantitativnu analizu obrazaca zamjene kodova na Twitter-u, globalne i regijske, s 58M tweets.', 'bg': 'Установяването на език на ниво дума е необходимо за анализ на кодово-превключен текст, където няколко езика могат да бъдат смесени в едно изречение. Съществуващите модели са ограничени до превключване на кодове между два конкретни езика и се провалят в реални сценарии, тъй като въвеждането на текст рядко има а priori информация за използваните езици. Представяме нова техника за откриване на език на ниво дума без надзор за текст с кодово превключване за произволно голям брой езици, която не изисква ръчно анотирани данни за обучение. Нашите експерименти с туитове на седем езика показват 74% относително намаляване на грешките в етикетирането на ниво думи по отношение на конкурентните базови линии. След това използваме тази система, за да извършим мащабен количествен анализ на моделите за превключване на кодове в Туитър, както глобални, така и специфични за региона, с 58 млн. туитове.', 'da': 'Sprogregistrering på ordniveau er nødvendig for at analysere kodekoblinget tekst, hvor flere sprog kan blandes i en sætning. Eksisterende modeller er begrænset til kodeskift mellem to specifikke sprog og mislykkes i virkelighedsscenarier, da tekstindtryk sjældent har a priori oplysninger om de anvendte sprog. Vi præsenterer en ny, ubevåget sprogdetekteringsteknik på ordniveau til kodeskiftet tekst til et vilkårligt stort antal sprog, som ikke kræver manuelt noterede træningsdata. Vores eksperimenter med tweets på syv sprog viser en relativ fejlreduktion på 74% i ordniveau mærkning i forhold til konkurrencedygtige basislinjer. Vi bruger derefter dette system til at gennemføre en omfattende kvantitativ analyse af kodeskift mønstre på Twitter, både globale og regionsspecifikke, med 58M tweets.', 'de': 'Die Spracherkennung auf Wortebene ist für die Analyse von kodegeschaltetem Text erforderlich, bei dem mehrere Sprachen innerhalb eines Satzes gemischt werden können. Bestehende Modelle beschränken sich auf Codewechsel zwischen zwei spezifischen Sprachen und scheitern in realen Szenarien, da die Texteingabe selten a priori Informationen über die verwendeten Sprachen enthält. Wir präsentieren eine neuartige, unbeaufsichtigte Spracherkennungstechnik auf Wortebene für kodegeschalteten Text für eine beliebig große Anzahl von Sprachen, die keine manuell kommentierten Trainingsdaten benötigt. Unsere Experimente mit Tweets in sieben Sprachen zeigen eine 74% relative Fehlerreduktion bei der Beschriftung auf Wortebene im Vergleich zu konkurrierenden Baselines. Mit diesem System führen wir dann eine groß angelegte quantitative Analyse von Code-Switching-Mustern auf Twitter durch, sowohl global als auch regionsspezifisch, mit 58M-Tweets.', 'fa': 'کشف زبان سطح کلمه برای تحلیل متن تغییر کد لازم است، جایی که زبان\u200cهای متعدد در یک جمله می\u200cتوانند مخلوط شوند. مدل\u200cهای موجود به تغییر کد بین دو زبان خاص محدود می\u200cشوند و در سیناریو\u200cهای دنیای واقعی شکست می\u200cگیرند، به عنوان ورودی متن کمی اطلاعات پیشری در مورد زبانها استفاده می\u200cشود. ما روزنامه\u200cای را برای شناسایی کلمات سطح سخن\u200cهای غیرقانونی برای متن\u200cهای تغییر کد برای تعداد زیادی از زبانها پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که هیچ داده\u200cهای آموزش را به دست نیاز ندارد. آزمایش\u200cهای ما با توئیت\u200cها در هفت زبان نشان می\u200cدهند که کاهش خطای نسبت به 74 درصد در نقاشی طبقه\u200cی کلمات با ارتباط به خطوط پایین\u200cهای مسابقه است. سپس از این سیستم استفاده می کنیم تا یک تحلیل مقداری بزرگ از الگوهای تغییر کد در توئیتر انجام دهیم، هر دو جهانی و منطقه خاص، با 58M tweets.', 'id': 'Deteksi bahasa tingkat kata diperlukan untuk menganalisis teks yang ditukar kode, di mana berbagai bahasa dapat dicampur dalam kalimat. Model yang ada dibatasi untuk menukar kode antara dua bahasa spesifik dan gagal dalam skenario dunia nyata karena input teks jarang memiliki informasi priori tentang bahasa yang digunakan. Kami mempersembahkan teknik deteksi bahasa tingkat kata yang tidak diawasi untuk teks yang ditukar kode untuk sejumlah bahasa yang secara arbitrar besar, yang tidak membutuhkan data pelatihan yang dicatat secara manual. Eksperimen kami dengan tweet dalam tujuh bahasa menunjukkan 74% pengurangan kesalahan relatif dalam label tingkat kata berkaitan dengan garis dasar kompetitif. Kemudian kita menggunakan sistem ini untuk melakukan analisis kuantitatif skala besar pola penggantian kode di Twitter, baik global maupun spesifik daerah, dengan 58M tweet.', 'ko': '단어급 언어 검출은 코드를 분석하여 텍스트를 전환하는 데 필요한 것이다. 왜냐하면 한 문장에 여러 언어를 혼합할 수 있기 때문이다.기존의 모델은 두 가지 특정 언어 사이에서만 코드 전환을 할 수 있기 때문에 현실 세계에서 실패했다. 왜냐하면 텍스트 입력은 사용하는 언어에 대한 선험 정보가 매우 적기 때문이다.우리는 임의의 대량의 언어의 코드로 텍스트를 전환하는 데 사용되는 새로운 무감독 어급 언어 검측 기술을 제시했다. 이것은 인공적으로 표시된 훈련 데이터를 필요로 하지 않는다.우리가 일곱 가지 언어의 추문에 대한 실험을 실시한 결과 경쟁 기선에 비해 단어급 표기의 상대적인 오류가 74% 감소했다.그리고 우리는 이 시스템을 이용하여 트위터의 코드 전환 모델에 대해 대규모 정량 분석을 실시했는데 전 세계와 특정 지역을 포함하여 모두 5800만 개의 트윗이 있다.', 'sw': 'Word-level language detection is necessary for analyzing code-switched text, where multiple languages could be mixed within a sentence.  Mradi uliopo unazuiwa kubadilishana kwa lugha mbili maalumu na kushindwa katika hali halisi ya dunia kwa kuwa input wa maandishi mara chache ni taarifa za awali kuhusu lugha zinazotumiwa. Tunaweza kuweka riwaya ya kutambua teknolojia ya lugha isiyo na usahihi wa maneno kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa kubadilishwa kwa kutumia lugha nyingi ambazo hazihitaji taarifa za mafunzo. Majaribio yetu yenye twita kwa lugha saba yanaonyesha kupungua kwa asilimia 74 ya makosa yanayohusiana na kiwango cha maneno kinachoonyesha kuhusiana na misingi ya ushindani. Kisha tunatumia mfumo huu kufanya uchambuzi wa kiasi kikubwa wa miundo ya kubadilisha kodi kwenye mtandao wa Twita, wote duniani pamoja na maeneo maalum, na twita 58M.', 'tr': "Bir s철z dili 챌aplamak 체챌in s철zleri흫 arasynda 챌al힊yrylmagy 체챌in s철zleri흫 ehlini g철zlemek 체챌in gerek. 횜흫 bar nusgalar iki belli diller arasynda k철d almak 체챌in m체mkin ed첵채r we d체n첵채de hat giri힊inde hat giri힊inde k철plen챌 diller barada 철흫ki bilgi bar. Biz k철d 체첵tgeden diller 체챌in janla힊ma첵an s철z derejesi a 흫lama teknikini g철rke첵채ris. Bu k채bir sany elimden bo첵un챌a durum maglumaty 체챌in gerek d채l. Bizi흫 t채zelerimiz 첵edi dilde t채zelikler bilen synany힊ymyz, s철zleri흫 derejesi 첵akynla힊yk 챌yky힊lyklara g철r채 74% hasaplany힊yny 첵itir첵채r. Sonra biz bu sistemi Twitter'da k철dleme 체첵tgetmek 체챌in uly 철l챌ekli hasaplamak 체챌in ullan첵arys. 58M tweets bilen hem d체n첵채d채 hem b철lge h채zirki hasaplamak 체챌in.", 'hy': 'Բառերի մակարդակի հայտնաբերումը անհրաժեշտ է կոդով փոխված տեքստի վերլուծության համար, որտեղ բազմաթիվ լեզուներ կարող են խառնվել նախադասության մեջ: Գոյություն ունեցող մոդելները սահմանափակվում են երկու հատուկ լեզուների միջև կոդի փոխարեն և ձախողվում են իրական աշխարհի սցենարներում, քանի որ տեքստի ներմուծը հազվադեպ ունի նախօրինակ տեղեկատվություն օգտագործված լեզուների մասին: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր անվերահսկված լեզվի բառերի մակարդակի հայտնաբերման տեխնիկան կոդի փոխարկվող տեքստի համար կամավոր շատ լեզուների համար, ինչը չի պահանջում ձեռքով նշումնավորված ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ: Մեր փորձարկումները թվիթերով յոթ լեզուներում ցույց են տալիս 74 տոկոսով համեմատական սխալների կրճատմանը բառի մակարդակի պիտակում համեմատական հիմնական գծերի նկատմամբ: Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք այս համակարգը, որպեսզի կատարենք խոշոր քանակական վերլուծություն կոդի փոխանակելու կաղապարների մասին Թվիթերում, համաշխարհային, ինչպես նաև հատվածային, 58M թվիթերի միջոցով:', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-ቋንቋን ለማስተካከል የኮድ-ማተላለፊያ ጽሑፍ ያስፈልጋል፣ በርካታ ቋንቋዎች በክፍል ውስጥ ለመቀላቀል ያስፈልጋል። የአሁኑ ዓይነቶች በሁለቱ የተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል የኮድ-ማቀላቀል ግድ ነው እናም በመጀመሪያው ዓለም ስዕይት ውስጥ ድምፅ ሲደረጉ የጽሑፍ ጥያቄ በቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚጠቀሙት የፊተኛ መረጃዎች በጣም ጥቂት ነው፡፡ የቃላት-ደረጃ ቋንቋን ለማግኘት የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል ስህተት ለቋንቋዎች በተለየ ብዛት ቁጥር እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በሰባት ቋንቋዎች ያሉት ትዊተሮች የሞከረን ስህተታችን ለጥቃት መሠረት የሚያሳውቅ 74 በመቶ ስህተት ነው፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የኮድ-ለውጥ ምሳሌዎችን በትዊተር እና በዓለምአዊ እና የአካባቢ ትዊተር እና የሀገር ትዊተር እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Woord- vlak taal beskrywing is nodig vir analiseer van kode- wisselde teks, waar veelvuldige tale kan binne 'n seting gemeng word. Bestaande modelle word beperk na kode- wisseling tussen twee spesifieke tale en misluk in reël- wêreld scenarios as teks invoer het eers 'n priori inligting oor die gebruikte tale. Ons stel 'n roman onverondersteunde woord- vlak taal besluit tekniks vir kode- geskuif teks vir' n willekeurig groot aantal tale, wat nie benodig enige manuelt aangesteunde onderwerp data nie. Ons eksperimente met tweets in sewe tale wys 'n 74% relatiewe fout reduksie in woord vlak etiketting met respek na mededingslyne. Ons gebruik dan hierdie stelsel om 'n groot-skaal kvantitatiewe analisie van kode-wissel patrone op Twitter te doen, albei globale en regionale spesifieke, met 58M tweets.", 'sq': 'Zbulimi i gjuhës në nivel fjalësh është i nevojshëm për analizimin e tekstit të ndërruar me kod, ku gjuhët e shumta mund të përziehen brenda një fjalimi. Modelet ekzistuese janë të kufizuara në ndërrimin e kodeve midis dy gjuhëve specifike dhe dështojnë në skenarët e botës reale pasi hyrja e tekstit rrallë ka informacion a priori mbi gjuhët e përdorura. Ne paraqesim një teknikë të re të zbulimit të gjuhës në nivelin e fjalëve pa mbikqyrje për tekstin e ndërruar me kod për një numër arbitrarisht të madh gjuhësh, që nuk kërkon asnjë të dhënë ushtrimi të anotuar manualisht. Eksperimentet tona me tweetet në shtatë gjuhë tregojnë një reduktim të gabimeve relativë 74% në etiketën e nivelit të fjalëve lidhur me linjat bazë konkurruese. Pastaj e përdorim këtë sistem për të kryer një analizë të madhe kuantitative të modeleve të ndërrimit të kodeve në Twitter, si globale ashtu edhe specifike për rajonin, me 58M tweets.', 'az': "Kod dəyişdirilmiş metinləri analizə etmək üçün söz-seviyyəti təşkil edilməsi lazımdır. Bu cümlədə çoxlu dillər karışılabilir. Əvvəlki modellər iki müəyyən dil arasındakı kodu dəyişdirməyə qadağan edilir və həqiqət dünya senaryosunda başarısız olar. Mətn girişi çox az da istifadə edilən dillər barəsindəki priori məlumatları vardır. Biz kodu dəyişdirilmiş çox dillər üçün yenilənmiş söz-seviyyəti keşif teknikəsini göstəririk, ki bu elə bir dəyişdirilmiş təhsil məlumatlarına ehtiyacı yoxdur. Yedi dildə tweet olan təcrübələrimiz söz səviyyəsi ilə müqayisədə baz səhifələri haqqında 74%-lik xəta düşürməsini göstərir. Sonra biz bu sistemi Twitter'da böyük ölçülü kodu-değiştirme modellərin analizi ilə, hər ikisi də küresel, həmçinin bölgesi müəyyən edilmiş 58M twetlərlə istifadə edirik.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje jezika na nivou riječi je potrebno za analiziranje teksta zamijenjenog kod, gdje bi se moglo miješati više jezika u rečenici. Postojeći modeli su ograničeni na prebacivanje koda između dva određena jezika i neuspjeh u scenarijima stvarnog svijeta, jer tekstski ulaz rijetko ima priori informacije o korištenim jezicima. Predstavljamo romansku tehniku otkrivanja jezika na nivou riječi za tekst zamijenjen kod za proizvoljno veliki broj jezika, koji ne zahtijeva nikakve podatke o ručnom obrazovanju. Naši eksperimenti sa tweetom na sedam jezika pokazuju relativno smanjenje greške na 74% u odnosu na etiketiranje riječi u odnosu na konkurentne osnovne linije. Onda koristimo ovaj sistem da bi proveli veliku kvantitativnu analizu obrazaca zamjene koda na Twitter, globalno i regionalno specifično, sa 58M tweets.', 'ca': "La detecció de llenguatges a nivell de paraules és necessària per analitzar text canviat de codi, on es poden barrejar múltiples llenguatges dins una frase. Existing models are restricted to code-switching between two specific languages and fail in real-world scenarios as text input rarely has a priori information on the languages used.  Presentam una nova tècnica de detecció de llenguatges de nivell de paraules no supervisada per un text canviat de codi per un nombre arbitrariament gran de llenguatges, que no requereix dades d'entrenament anotats manualment. Els nostres experiments amb tweets en set llengües mostren una reducció relativa d'errors del 74% en l'etiquetage de nivell de paraules en relació a les línies de base competitives. We then use this system to conduct a large-scale quantitative analysis of code-switching patterns on Twitter, both global as well as region-specific, with 58M tweets.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání jazyka na úrovni slova je nezbytné pro analýzu textu přepínaného kódem, kde může být ve větě smíšeno více jazyků. Stávající modely jsou omezeny na přepínání kódu mezi dvěma specifickými jazyky a selžou v reálných scénářích, protože textový vstup má zřídka a priori informace o používaných jazycích. Představujeme novou bez dozoru techniku detekce jazyků na úrovni slov pro text přepínaný kódem pro libovolně velký počet jazyků, která nevyžaduje ručně anotovaná tréninková data. Naše experimenty s tweety v sedmi jazycích ukazují 74% relativní snížení chyb v označování na úrovni slova s ohledem na konkurenční základní linie. Tento systém pak používáme k provedení rozsáhlé kvantitativní analýzy vzorů přepínání kódu na Twitteru, jak globální, tak regionální, s 58M tweety.', 'bn': 'কোড- switching টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য শব্দ-স্তরের ভাষা সনাক্তির প্রয়োজন, যেখানে বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষা একটি বাক্যের মধ্যে  বিদ্যমান মডেল দুই নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার মধ্যে কোড- পরিবর্তনের জন্য সীমাবদ্ধ এবং বাস্তবতা ব্যর্থ হয়েছে যেহেতু টেক্সট ইনপুট ব্যবহার কর আমরা কোড- পরিবর্তনের টেক্সটের জন্য একটি অরক্ষিত শব্দ-স্তরের ভাষা সনাক্ত প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করি যা কোন বিশাল সংখ্যার জন্য কোড-পরিবর্তনের প্র সাত ভাষায় টুইট দিয়ে আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রতিযোগিতা বেসেলাইনের ব্যাপারে শব্দের স্তরের ৭৪% আত তারপর আমরা এই সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করি টুইটারে বিশ্বব্যাপী কোড পরিবর্তনের প্যাটারেন্টের বিশ্লেষণের জন্য, যার মধ্যে ৫৮মি টুইট করে।', 'et': 'Sõnatasemel keeletuvastus on vajalik koodiga vahetatud teksti analüüsimiseks, kus lauses saab segada mitut keelt. Olemasolevad mudelid piirduvad koodi vahetamisega kahe konkreetse keele vahel ja need ebaõnnestuvad reaalmaailma stsenaariumides, sest teksti sisestamisel on harva a priori teavet kasutatavate keelte kohta. Tutvustame uudset järelevalveta sõnatasemel keele tuvastamise tehnikat koodiga vahetatud teksti jaoks meelevaldselt suure hulga keelte jaoks, mis ei nõua käsitsi märgitud koolitusandmeid. Meie katsed säutsudega seitsmes keeles näitavad 74% suhtelist vea vähenemist sõnataseme märgistuses konkurentsivõimeliste lähtejoonte suhtes. Seejärel kasutame seda süsteemi 58 miljoni säutsu abil Twitteris koodi vahetamise mustrite ulatuslikuks kvantitatiivseks analüüsiks, nii ülemaailmselt kui ka piirkonnaspetsiifiliselt.', 'fi': 'Sanatason kielen tunnistus on tarpeen koodinvaihtoisen tekstin analysoimiseksi, jossa lauseeseen voidaan sekoittaa useita kieliä. Nykyiset mallit rajoittuvat koodinvaihtoon kahden tietyn kielen välillä, ja ne epäonnistuvat tosielämän skenaarioissa, koska tekstinsyöttöllä on harvoin a priori tietoa käytetyistä kielistä. Esittelemme uuden, valvomattoman sanatason kielen tunnistustekniikan koodinvaihtotekstille mielivaltaisesti suurelle määrälle kieliä, joka ei vaadi manuaalisesti merkittyjä koulutustietoja. Seitsemällä kielellä toteutetut tweetit-kokeilumme osoittavat, että sanatason merkintöjen suhteellinen virhe vähenee 74% verrattuna kilpailullisiin perusviivoihin. Tämän jälkeen käytämme tätä järjestelmää tehdäksemme laajamittaisen kvantitatiivisen analyysin koodinvaihtomalleista Twitterissä, sekä globaalisti että aluekohtaisesti, 58M twiittillä.', 'ha': "An buƙata ganin harshen-daraja dõmin a yi anaƙayyade matsayin-mai musanya na kode, inda za'a haɗa wasu harshe guda cikin wata salon. Ana ƙunsa da motsalan da ke gaba zuwa musanya kodi da tsakanin lugha biyu masu ƙayyade kuma an kasa cikin fasarin-duniya masu halin kamar da aka shigar da matsayin da ɗan daɗi yana da wani maɓalli na gaba kan harshen wanda aka yi amfani da. Tuna halatar da wani waran da ba'a tsare wa zane-zane-zane wa zane-zane-zane wa matsayin-mai canza-kode wa yawan harshen baka-arbitarin, wanda ba ta ƙayyade wani danne na tsari da hannayen ba. TajaryinMu da Twitter cikin bakwai harshe na nuna kashin ɓata da danganta a cikin daraja-word da aka lissafa game da basasan tarayya. Sa'an nan kuma munã amfani da wannan na'ura dõmin Mu yi anadi mai girma ga kodi masu buɗe misãlai na kodi a Twitter, dukkan duniya da wanda aka ƙayyade region, da wato 58M.", 'sk': 'Zaznavanje besednega jezika je potrebno za analizo besedila s preklopom kode, kjer je v stavku mogoče mešati več jezikov. Obstoječi modeli so omejeni na preklapljanje kod med dvema določenima jezikoma in v realnih scenarijih ne uspejo, saj je vnos besedila redko informacij o uporabljenih jezikih. Predstavljamo novo nenadzorovano tehniko zaznavanja besednega jezika na ravni besed za besedilo s preklopom kode za poljubno veliko število jezikov, ki ne zahteva ročno označenih podatkov o usposabljanju. Naši poskusi s tweeti v sedmih jezikih kažejo 74% relativno zmanjšanje napak pri označevanju na ravni besed glede na konkurenčne osnovne črte. Ta sistem nato uporabljamo za obsežno kvantitativno analizo vzorcev preklapljanja kod na Twitterju, tako globalno kot regionalno specifično, s 58M tweeti.', 'he': 'זיהוי שפת ברמה מילים נחוץ לניתוח טקסט משתנה קוד, שם שיפות רבות יכולות להיות מעורבות בתוך משפט. דוגמנים קיימים מוגבלים לחליף קודים בין שתי שפות ספציפיות ולכשל בתרחישים בעולם האמיתי, כיוון שלתוכנית טקסט לעיתים נדירות יש מידע priori על השפות השתמשות. אנו מציגים טכניקת גילוי שפת ברמה מילים חדשה ללא השגחה לטקסט המחליף קוד עבור מספר גדול באופן arbitrary של שפות, אשר לא דורש שום נתונים אימונים מצוינים ידנית. הניסויים שלנו עם טוויטים בשבע שפות מראים שינוי של שגיאות יחסית של 74% בתיקוי רמת מילים בנוגע לקווי בסיס תחרותיים. We then use this system to conduct a large-scale quantitative analysis of code-switching patterns on Twitter, both global as well as region-specific, with 58M tweets.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk un barêng nggawe barang-langa kuwi ora bisa nguasai permaneh kanggo teko nggawe layar kanggo sampeyan akeh banter. Awak dhéwé éntuk gambar tuat karo pitit ing tindang maneh, 75% kuwi wis dipulangan kelas kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi mau Nyong ngomong pengguna sistem iki dadi nggawe sistem sistem dadi akeh populatif kanggo ngilangno sistem anyari nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sistem Tutuk, kalih dumadhil ngono region sing dipileksi, karo 58M Tutuk.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ(_S) Existing models are restricted to code-switching between two specific languages and fail in real-world scenarios as text input rarely has a priori information on the languages used. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་འདི་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཡིག་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་Tweets(Tweets)དཔག་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གཞི་རྩལ་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་74% འུ་ཅག་གིས་མ་ལག་འདིས་ཌིས་ཌིར་བརྗོད་པའི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེ་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འཛམ་གླིང་དང་གནས་ཁོངས་'}
{'en': 'One-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer for Paradigm Completion', 'ar': 'النقل العصبي عبر اللغات بلقطة واحدة لإكمال النموذج', 'pt': 'Transferência Neural Cross-Lingual One-Shot para Conclusão de Paradigma', 'es': 'Transferencia neuronal multilingüe de una sola vez para completar el paradigma', 'fr': "Transfert neuronal cross-lingual en une seule fois pour l'achèvement du paradigme", 'ja': 'パラダイム完了のためのワンショットニューラルクロスリンガル転送', 'zh': '一次性神经跨语移,以成式', 'hi': 'प्रतिमान पूरा होने के लिए एक शॉट तंत्रिका क्रॉस-लिंगुअल स्थानांतरण', 'ru': 'Однократная нейронная кросс-лингвистическая передача для завершения парадигмы', 'ga': 'Aistriú Néarthach Trastheangach Aon-urchar chun Paraidím a Chríochnú', 'ka': 'პარადიგმის დასრულებისთვის ერთ- სოფლიო ნეიროლური კრესი- ლინგუალური გადატანა', 'el': 'Νευρική διαγλωσσική μεταφορά μίας βολής για την ολοκλήρωση του παραδείγματος', 'hu': 'Egy lövéses neurális nyelvű transzfer a Paradigm befejezéséhez', 'it': 'Trasferimento interlinguistico neurale one-shot per il completamento di Paradigm', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Vienkartinis neurologinis tarpkalbinis perdavimas paradigmui užbaigti', 'kk': 'Парадигм толтыру үшін бір- түрлі нейралық көшесілікті транспорт', 'ml': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Salib Bahasa Neural Satu-Tembakan untuk Penyempurnaan Paradigm', 'mt': 'One-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer for Paradigm Completion', 'mn': 'Нэг шалтгаан мэдрэлийн давхар-хэлбэрээр Парадигм дуусахын тулд', 'pl': 'Jednorazowy neuronowy transfer między językami dla uzupełnienia paradygmatu', 'ro': 'Transfer interlingvistic neural într-o singură lovitură pentru finalizarea Paradigmului', 'sr': 'Jedna snimljena neurološka prekršena linija za završenje paradigma', 'no': 'Ein skytt neuralt krysslingsoverføring for paradigm- fullføring', 'si': 'පැරැඩිග්ම් සම්පූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් එක- වෙඩි න්\u200dයූරල් ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුල් ස්ථානය', 'so': 'Gaadiidka baaritaanka ee baaritaanka', 'sv': 'One-Shot Neural tvärspråklig överföring för Paradigm komplettering', 'ta': 'அளபுரு முடிவுக்கான ஒரு சுட்டு புதிய குறுக்கு- கோடு மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'ایک-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer for Paradigm Completion', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết tâm thần học một phát cho sự hoàn chỉnh Paradigm', 'hr': 'Jedna snimljena Neuralna prekršna linija za završenje paradigma', 'nl': 'One-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer voor Paradigma Voltooiing', 'bg': 'Еднократен неврален междулингвен трансфер за завършване на парадигмата', 'da': 'One-Shot Neural tværsproglig overførsel til Paradigm fuldførelse', 'id': 'Transfer Salib Lingua Neural Satu-Shot untuk Penyempurnaan Paradigm', 'de': 'One-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer für Paradigmen Vollendung', 'fa': 'انتقال عصبی یک شلیک برای کامل پارادیگ', 'sw': 'Uhamiaji wa Msalama wa Neural wa Kilingi', 'af': 'One- Shot Neural Cross- Lingual Oordrag vir Paradigm Voltooiïng', 'sq': 'Transferimi neuronal me një gjuhë për kompletimin e paradigmit', 'tr': 'Bir Taýça näraral Hat Haýraty paradigm Tamamlamak üçin', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Պարադիգմ ավարտելու համար միասնական նյարդային խաչլեզվի փոխանցում', 'az': 'Paradigm tamamlaması üçün bir-Shot Nöral Çərz-Lingual Transfer', 'ko': '일회성 신경 크로스 언어 이동은 모범 완성에 사용', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Jedna snimljena neuronska prekršna linija za završenje paradigma', 'ca': 'Transfer ència neuronal translíngua per a completar el paradigma', 'cs': 'Jednorázový neuronový crosslinguální transfer pro dokončení paradigmatu', 'et': 'Ühekordne neuraalne keeleülene ülekanne paradigmi lõpuleviimiseks', 'fi': 'Yhden laukauksen neuroaalinen monikielinen siirto paradigmin loppuun saattamiseksi', 'sk': 'Enotni nevralni medjezikovni prenos za dokončanje paradigme', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'העברה חד-יורית עצבית צלב-שפתית לסיום הפרדיגמה', 'jv': 'One-shot Njuaral', 'bo': 'One-Shot Neural Cross-Lingual Transfer for Paradigm Completion'}
{'en': 'We present a novel cross-lingual transfer method for paradigm completion, the task of mapping a lemma to its inflected forms, using a neural encoder-decoder model, the state of the art for the monolingual task. We use labeled data from a high-resource language to increase performance on a low-resource language. In experiments on 21 language pairs from four different language families, we obtain up to 58 % higher accuracy than without transfer and show that even zero-shot and one-shot learning are possible. We further find that the degree of language relatedness strongly influences the ability to transfer morphological knowledge.', 'es': 'Presentamos un novedoso método de transferencia multilingüe para completar paradigmas, la tarea de mapear un lema a sus formas flexionadas, utilizando un modelo de codificador-decodificador neuronal, el estado del arte para la tarea monolingüe. Utilizamos datos etiquetados de un lenguaje con muchos recursos para aumentar el rendimiento en un idioma con pocos recursos. En experimentos con 21 pares de idiomas de cuatro familias de idiomas diferentes, obtenemos una precisión hasta un 58% mayor que sin transferencia y demostramos que incluso el aprendizaje de una sola vez y cero es posible. Además, encontramos que el grado de relación con el idioma influye fuertemente en la capacidad de transferir conocimientos morfológicos.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة نقل جديدة عبر اللغات لإكمال النموذج ، وهي مهمة تعيين lemma لأشكالها المنعكسة ، باستخدام نموذج التشفير وفك التشفير العصبي ، وهو حالة فنية للمهمة أحادية اللغة. نحن نستخدم البيانات المصنفة من لغة عالية الموارد لزيادة الأداء على لغة منخفضة الموارد. في التجارب التي أجريت على 21 زوجًا من اللغات من أربع عائلات لغوية مختلفة ، حصلنا على دقة أعلى بنسبة تصل إلى 58٪ مقارنة بغير نقل ، وأظهرنا أنه حتى التعلم بدون طلقة ولقطة واحدة ممكنان. نجد كذلك أن درجة ارتباط اللغة تؤثر بشدة على القدرة على نقل المعرفة الصرفية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une nouvelle méthode de transfert interlinguistique pour la complétion de paradigme, la tâche de mapper un lemme à ses formes fléchies, à l'aide d'un modèle codeur-décodeur neuronal, l'état de la technique pour la tâche monolingue. Nous utilisons des données étiquetées provenant d'une langue à ressources élevées afin d'améliorer les performances dans une langue à faibles ressources. Dans le cadre d'expériences sur 21 paires de langues appartenant à quatre familles de langues différentes, nous obtenons une précision jusqu'à 58\xa0% supérieure à celle obtenue sans transfert et nous montrons que même un apprentissage «\xa0zéro\xa0» ou «\xa0one-shot\xa0» est possible. Nous découvrons également que le degré de parenté linguistique influence fortement la capacité à transférer des connaissances morphologiques.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo método de transferência multilíngue para completar paradigmas, a tarefa de mapear um lema para suas formas flexionadas, usando um modelo de codificador-decodificador neural, o estado da arte para a tarefa monolíngue. Usamos dados rotulados de uma linguagem com muitos recursos para aumentar o desempenho em uma linguagem com poucos recursos. Em experimentos com 21 pares de idiomas de quatro famílias de idiomas diferentes, obtivemos uma precisão até 58% maior do que sem transferência e mostramos que mesmo o aprendizado de tiro zero e de tiro único é possível. Descobrimos ainda que o grau de relacionamento linguístico influencia fortemente a capacidade de transferir conhecimento morfológico.', 'zh': '新语移法,用神经编码器 - 解码器映引理屈折,此单语务最新术也。 吾用高资言语之数以重低资源言之性。 四语之家21言语之实验,所得准确率高于无移准确率之58%,虽零次一次性之学可也。 吾益见之,语相关性强于移形态学之能。', 'ja': 'パラダイム完了のための新規のクロスリンガル転送方法、ニューラルエンコーダデコーダモデルを使用してレンマをその屈折した形態にマッピングするタスク、単一言語タスクのための最先端のタスクを提示します。当社は、低リソース言語のパフォーマンスを向上させるために、高リソース言語からのラベル付きデータを使用しています。4つの異なる言語ファミリーからの21の言語ペアの実験では、転送なしよりも最大58 ％高い精度を得て、ゼロショットおよび単発学習でも可能であることが示されています。さらに、言語の関連性の程度は、形態学的知識を転送する能力に強く影響することがわかります。', 'hi': 'हम प्रतिमान पूरा करने के लिए एक उपन्यास क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल का उपयोग करके, एक लेमा को अपने इनफ्लेक्टेड रूपों में मैप करने का कार्य, मोनोलिंगुअल कार्य के लिए कला की स्थिति। हम कम-संसाधन भाषा पर प्रदर्शन बढ़ाने के लिए उच्च-संसाधन भाषा से लेबल किए गए डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं. चार अलग-अलग भाषा परिवारों से 21 भाषा जोड़े पर प्रयोगों में, हम हस्तांतरण के बिना 58% तक उच्च सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि शून्य-शॉट और एक-शॉट सीखने भी संभव है। हम आगे पाते हैं कि भाषा संबंधितता की डिग्री रूपात्मक ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करने की क्षमता को दृढ़ता से प्रभावित करती है।', 'ru': 'Предложен новый метод кросс-лингвистического переноса для завершения парадигмы, задача отображения леммы в ее перевернутых формах, с использованием модели нейронный кодер-декодер, современное состояние для монолингвистической задачи. Мы используем помеченные данные из языка с высоким ресурсом для повышения производительности на языке с низким ресурсом. В экспериментах на 21 языковой паре из четырех разных языковых семейств, мы получаем до 58% выше точность, чем без передачи и показывают, что даже нулевой и одноразовый обучение возможно. Мы также обнаруживаем, что степень родства языков сильно влияет на способность передавать морфологические знания.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair modh aistrithe trasteangacha úrnua chun paraidím a chomhlánú, an tasc lema a mhapáil go dtí a foirmeacha infhillte, ag baint úsáide as samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra néaraigh, an úrscothacht don tasc aonteangach. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí lipéadaithe ó theanga ard-acmhainne chun feidhmíocht ar theanga íseal-acmhainne a mhéadú. I dturgnaimh ar 21 phéire teanga ó cheithre theaghlach teangacha éagsúla, faighimid cruinneas suas le 58% níos airde ná mar a dhéantar gan aistriú agus taispeánann muid gur féidir fiú foghlaim náid agus seat amháin a fhoghlaim. Faighimid freisin go mbíonn tionchar láidir ag leibhéal na gaolmhaireachta teanga ar an gcumas eolas moirfeolaíoch a aistriú.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a paradigma kiegészítéséhez szükséges új, többnyelvű transzfer módszert, amelynek feladata, hogy a lemmát feltérképezzük az inflektált formáihoz, neurális kódoló-dekóder modell segítségével, az egynyelvű feladat korszerűségét. Nagy erőforrásokat igénylő nyelvből származó címkézett adatokat használunk, hogy növeljük a teljesítményt egy alacsony erőforrásokat igénylő nyelven. Négy különböző nyelvcsaládból származó 21 nyelvpáron végzett kísérletek során akár 58%-kal nagyobb pontosságot érünk el, mint átvitel nélkül, és azt mutatjuk, hogy még a nullás és egyszeres tanulás is lehetséges. Megállapítjuk továbbá, hogy a nyelvi kapcsolat foka erősen befolyásolja a morfológiai ismeretek átadásának képességét.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς για την ολοκλήρωση παραδείγματος, το έργο της χαρτογράφησης ενός λέμματος στις καμπυλωμένες μορφές του, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή, την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για τη μονογλωσσική εργασία. Χρησιμοποιούμε δεδομένα με ετικέτα από μια γλώσσα υψηλής περιεκτικότητας για να αυξήσουμε την απόδοση σε μια γλώσσα χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Σε πειράματα σε 21-γλωσσικά ζεύγη από τέσσερις διαφορετικές γλωσσικές οικογένειες, επιτυγχάνουμε έως 58% μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια από ό,τι χωρίς μεταφορά και αποδεικνύουμε ότι ακόμη και η μηδενική και μονοφωνική μάθηση είναι δυνατή. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι ο βαθμός γλωσσικής συγγένειας επηρεάζει έντονα την ικανότητα μεταφοράς μορφολογικών γνώσεων.', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo metodo di trasferimento cross-lingual per il completamento del paradigma, il compito di mappare un lemma alle sue forme flesse, utilizzando un modello di encoder-decoder neurale, lo stato dell'arte per il compito monolingue. Utilizziamo dati etichettati provenienti da un linguaggio ad alta risorsa per aumentare le prestazioni su un linguaggio a bassa risorsa. In esperimenti su 21 coppie linguistiche di quattro diverse famiglie linguistiche, otteniamo fino al 58% di precisione superiore rispetto a senza trasferimento e dimostriamo che anche l'apprendimento zero-shot e one-shot sono possibili. Troviamo inoltre che il grado di relazione linguistica influenza fortemente la capacità di trasferire conoscenze morfologiche.", 'kk': 'Біз парадигмді толтыру үшін романдық көптеген тілді аудару әдісін, лимманы түрлендіру тапсырмасын түрлендіріп, невралдық кодер- декодер үлгісін қолданып, монолингілік тапсырманың суретінің күйі. Біз көп ресурстар тілінен жарлық деректерді қолданып, көп ресурстар тілінде істеу үшін. 21 тіл екі тәжірибесінде төрт тіл үйлерінен тәжірибесінде біз тасымалдау арқылы 58% деген дұрыс көмектесімізге жеткіздік және бір шарт оқыту мүмкін екенін көрсетеді. Енді біз тілдердің қатынасы морфологиялық білімдерді ауыстыру мүмкіндігін көбірек көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome naują tarpkalbinį perdavimo metodą, skirtą užbaigti paradigm ą, lemmos paveikslėlio paveikslėlių nustatymui, naudojant neurologinio kodavimo model į, naujausią monokalbinės užduoties pažangą. Naudojame pažymėtus duomenis iš didelio išteklio kalbos, kad padidintume mažo išteklio kalbos rezultatus. Eksperimentuose su 21 kalbų poromis iš keturių skirtingų kalbų šeimų mes gauname iki 58 proc. didesnį tikslumą nei be perdavimo ir rodome, kad net nulinio ir vienkartinio mokymosi įmanoma. Be to, manome, kad kalbų ryšio laipsnis labai veikia gebėjimą perduoti morfologines žinias.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов крстојазичен метод на трансфер за комплетирање на парадигмата, задача на мапирање на лима на нејзините форми, користејќи неурален кодер-декодер модел, најсовремена технологија за монојазичната задача. We use labeled data from a high-resource language to increase performance on a low-resource language.  Во експериментите на 21 јазички парови од четири различни јазички семејства, добиваме до 58 отсто повисока точност отколку без трансфер и покажуваме дека дури и нула-стрелка и еднострелка учење се можни. Понатаму откриваме дека степенот на врска со јазикот силно влијае на способноста да се пренесе морфолошко знаење.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kaedah pemindahan salib bahasa yang baru untuk menyelesaikan paradigm a, tugas untuk memetakan lemma kepada bentuk-bentuknya, menggunakan model pengekod-dekoder saraf, keadaan seni untuk tugas monobahasa. Kami menggunakan data yang ditabel dari bahasa sumber tinggi untuk meningkatkan prestasi pada bahasa sumber rendah. In experiments on 21 language pairs from four different language families, we obtain up to 58% higher accuracy than without transfer and show that even zero-shot and one-shot learning are possible.  Kami juga mendapati bahawa darjah hubungan bahasa mempengaruhi kuasa untuk memindahkan pengetahuan morfologik.', 'mn': 'Бид парадигм дуусахын тулд хэлний олон хэлний шилжүүлэх арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Лемма нь түүний нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрүүдэд газрын зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг хийж байна. Бид өндөр боловсролын хэлээс нэмэгдсэн мэдээллийг ашиглаж бага боловсролын хэл дээр ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэхэд ашигладаг. Дөрвөн хэл гэр бүлийн 21 хэл хоёр туршилтын туршилтад бид шилжүүлэгүйгээс 58% дээр илүү тодорхой байдаг бөгөөд тэгш шат болон нэг шат суралцах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Дараа нь бид хэлний харилцааны хэмжээ нь морфологийн мэдлэгийг шилжүүлэх чадварыг хүчтэй нөлөөлдөг.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის კრესი ენგუფიკაციის გადასრულება პარადიგმის დასრულებაზე, ლემის გადასრულებაზე მისი გადასრულებული ფორმებზე, გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ენგუდერის მოდელი, მონოლენგუფიკაციის მოდე ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მარტივი რესურსის ენაზე, რომელიც უფრო მარტივი რესურსის ენაზე გამოყენებული მონაცემები. 21 ენის ზოგების ექსპერიმენტებში 4 განსხვავებული ენის ოჯახიდან, ჩვენ 58% უფრო მეტი წარმოიდგინდებით, ვიდრე გადატანსტრიქციის გარეშე და ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ კიდევ ნულ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ენის შესაბამისი დონე ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებს მოპოროლოგიური ცნობილების შესაბამისი შესაძლებლობა.', 'ml': 'പാരാഡിമം പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് മാറ്റുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d, അതിന്റെ സംഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ലിംമ മായി മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രകടനം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലേബേ നാലു ഭാഷ കുടുംബങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും 21 ഭാഷ ജോട്ടുകാരില്\u200d നാല് ഭാഷ കുടുംബങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റമില്ലാത്തതിനേക്കാള്\u200d 58% കൂടുതല്\u200d ക We further find that the degree of language relatedness strongly influences the ability to transfer morphological knowledge.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw metodu ġdid ta’ trasferiment translingwistiku għat-tlestija tal-paradigm a, il-kompitu li nimmappjaw limma għall-forom influwenti tagħha, bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ kodifikatur newrali, l-aktar avvanzat għall-kompitu monolingwistiku. Aħna nużaw dejta ttikkettata minn lingwa b’riżorsi għoljin biex inżidu l-prestazzjoni fuq lingwa b’riżorsi baxxi. F’esperimenti fuq 21 par lingwistiku minn erba’ familji differenti ta’ lingwi, inkisbu sa 58% aktar preċiżjoni milli mingħajr trasferiment u juru li anke tagħlim b’żero shot u b’darba huwa possibbli. Issibu wkoll li l-grad ta’ rabta mal-lingwa jinfluwenza b’mod qawwi l-kapaċità li jittrasferixxi l-għarfien morfoloġiku.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nową metodę transferu między językami dla uzupełniania paradygmatu, zadanie odwzorowania lemmy do jego przekształconych form, wykorzystując neuronowy koder-dekoder model, stan techniki dla zadania jednojęzycznego. Używamy etykietowanych danych z języka o wysokim zasobie, aby zwiększyć wydajność w języku o niskim zasobie. W eksperymentach na 21-parach językowych z czterech różnych rodzin językowych uzyskujemy do 58% większą dokładność niż bez transferu i pokazujemy, że możliwe jest nawet zero-shot i one-shot uczenie się. Ponadto stwierdzamy, że stopień powiązania językowego silnie wpływa na zdolność do transferu wiedzy morfologicznej.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit roman krysspråk-overføringsmetode for paradigmsfullføring, oppgåva for å kartera ein limma til sine influserte formar, med ein neuralkoderingsmodell, statusen til kunsten for den monospråk oppgåva. Vi bruker merkelige data frå eit høg ressursspråk for å auka utviklinga på ein låg ressursspråk. I eksperimenter på 21 språk par frå fire forskjellige språksfamilier får vi opp til 58% høgare nøyaktighet enn utan overføring, og viser at sjølv nullsatt og ein fotolæring er mulig. Vi finn meir at språk-relatedheiten sterkt påvirkar kapasiteten til å overføra morfologiske kunnskap.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab ku wareejinta luuqadaha kala duwan oo ku saabsan dhamaanka lammaanka, shaqada ku sawira sawirada lammaanka oo ku saabsan foomka, tusaale ahaan koox-codcoder, xaalada farshaxanka ee shaqada nooca ah. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaad la magacaabay oo luuqad sare oo ku qoran, si aan u kordhino muuqashada luqada hoose-resource. Imtixaanka qoysaska afarta luuqadood oo kala duduwan, waxaynu heli karnaa 58% oo ka sareeya si aan la wareejin, waxaana muujinaynaa in xittaa barashada hal jiid iyo hal jiid ah ay suurtowdo. We further find that the degree of language relatedness strongly influences the ability to transfer morphological knowledge.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o nouă metodă de transfer translingvistic pentru finalizarea paradigmei, sarcina de a cartografia o lemmă la formele sale inflectate, folosind un model de encoder-decoder neural, starea de ultimă oră pentru sarcina monolingvă. Folosim date etichetate dintr-un limbaj cu resurse ridicate pentru a crește performanța într-un limbaj cu resurse reduse. În experimentele efectuate pe 21 de perechi de limbi din patru familii de limbi diferite, obținem o precizie cu până la 58% mai mare decât fără transfer și arătăm că chiar și învățarea zero-shot și one-shot sunt posibile. De asemenea, constatăm că gradul de relație lingvistică influențează puternic capacitatea de a transfera cunoștințe morfologice.', 'si': 'අපි පාර්ඩිග්ම් සම්පූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරීස් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවර්තන විධානයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ලිම්මාවක් ප්\u200dරවර්තන විධානය කරනවා, න්\u200dයුරාල්  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂයෙන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත භාෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න. වෙනස් භාෂාව පවුල හතරක් වලින් භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් 21 වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැතුව 58% වඩා වැඩි ස අපි තවත් හොයාගන්නවා කියලා භාෂාව සම්බන්ධතාවක් බලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විද', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja paradigm a, zadatak mapiranja lime na njegove uticajne forme, koristeći model neuralnog kodera-dekodera, stanje umjetnosti za monojezički zadatak. Koristimo označene podatke iz jezika visokog resursa kako bi povećali učinkovitost na jeziku niskog resursa. U eksperimentima o 21 jezičkim parovima iz četiri različite jezičke porodice, dobijemo do 58% veće tačnosti nego bez prebacivanja i pokazujemo da je moguće čak ni nula pucnjava i jednosničko učenje. Nadalje smo otkrili da stepenica odnosa jezika snažno utječe na sposobnost prenošenja morfološkog znanja.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نور کرس-زبان ترافیس طریقہ کو پارادیگ مکمل کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک لیمو کو اس کے مصاحب فرموں پر نئورل کوڈر-ڈکوڈر مدل کے مطابق، ایک زبان کے کام کے لئے هنر کی حالت ہے. ہم ایک بلند سروسیس زبان سے لابلی ڈیٹا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کم سروسیس زبان میں فعالیت اضافہ کریں۔ 21 زبان کے جوڑوں میں چار مختلف زبان کے خاندان سے آزمائش میں ہم پر 58% سے زیادہ دقیق حاصل کریں گے اور دکھائیں کہ صفر شٹ اور ایک شٹ کی تعلیم بھی ممکن ہے۔ اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ زبان کے درجے معاملہ کی تعلق مضبوط طور پر قابل تغییر کرتی ہے', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny tvärspråklig överföringsmetod för paradigmkomplettering, uppgiften att kartlägga en lemma till dess böjda former, med hjälp av en neural encoder-dekoder modell, det senaste inom den enspråkiga uppgiften. Vi använder märkta data från ett språk med hög resurs för att öka prestandan på ett språk med låg resurs. I experiment på 21 språkpar från fyra olika språkfamiljer får vi upp till 58% högre noggrannhet än utan överföring och visar att även noll- och engångsinlärning är möjligt. Vidare konstaterar vi att graden av språkanknytning starkt påverkar förmågan att överföra morfologisk kunskap.', 'ta': 'அளபுரு முடிவுக்கான புதிய மொழி மாற்றும் முறைமையை நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம், ஒரு லிம்மா வரைப்படத்தின் செயல்பாடு, ஒரு புதிய குறியீட்டு மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி, ஒர அதிக மூலத்தின் மொழியிலிருந்து நாம் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக்க குறைந்த தகவல் நான்கு வேறு மொழி குடும்பங்களில் இருந்து 21 மொழி ஜோடி சோதனைகளில், மாற்றுவதற்கு இல்லாமல் 58% அதிக சரியானத்தை கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் ச மொழியின் உறவு தொடர்புகளை மாற்ற முடியும் என்பதை நாம் மேலும் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம்.', 'uz': "Biz paradigm to ʻldirish uchun noaniq kodlash usulini hozir qilamiz, qatlamni tashkilgan shakllarga chizish, neyrol kodkod modeli yordamida, monolingual vazifaning holati. Biz yuqori manbaning tilidan yozilgan maʼlumotdan foydalanamiz, kichkina manbaning tilida bajarish natijasini oshirish uchun. Biz boshqa tillar qo'llaridan 21 tillar qo'llarini o'rganib, transplantirishdan 58% ko'pchiligimiz va ko'pchilikdan hech narsa o'rganish imkoniyatini ko'rsatdik. Biz yana ko'proq o'ylaymiz, tilning darajasi murakkablarini o'zgartirish qobiliyatiga qiziqaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp truyền dịch vượt ngôn ngữ mới cho việc hoàn thành mô hình, nhiệm vụ vẽ sơ đồ một lemma lên các dạng chảy chảy chảy của nó, sử dụng mô hình mã hóa thần kinh, chế độ mới nhất của công việc ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi dùng dữ liệu dán nhãn từ một ngôn ngữ có nguồn cao để tăng hiệu suất trong ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Trong các thí nghiệm trên 21-cặp ngôn ngữ của bốn gia đình khác nhau, chúng tôi nhận được đến sô-58+ độ chính xác cao hơn so với không thuyên chuyển, và cho thấy khả năng học bắn bằng không và bắn một phát là có thể. Chúng tôi thấy rằng độ liên quan ngôn ngữ ảnh hưởng mạnh mẽ đến khả năng chuyển đổi kiến thức lịch sử.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny tværsproget overførselsmetode til paradigmefuldførelse, opgaven med at kortlægge en lemma til dens bøjede former, ved hjælp af en neural encoder-dekoder model, den nyeste teknologi for den ensprogede opgave. Vi bruger mærkede data fra et sprog med høj ressource til at øge ydeevnen på et sprog med lav ressource. I eksperimenter med 21 sprogpar fra fire forskellige sprogfamilier opnår vi op til 58% højere nøjagtighed end uden overførsel og viser, at selv nul-shot og one-shot læring er mulig. Vi finder endvidere, at graden af sprogrelateret påvirker evnen til at overføre morfologisk viden stærkt.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов междуезичен трансферен метод за завършване на парадигмата, задачата за картографиране на лема към нейните наклонени форми, използвайки невронен кодер-декодер модел, състоянието на изкуството за едноезичната задача. Използваме етикетирани данни от език с висок ресурс, за да увеличим производителността на език с нисък ресурс. При експерименти с 21 езикови двойки от четири различни езикови семейства получаваме до 58% по-висока точност, отколкото без трансфер и показваме, че дори нулево и еднократно обучение е възможно. Освен това откриваме, че степента на езикова свързаност силно влияе върху способността за прехвърляне на морфологични знания.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuwe cross-lingual transfer methode voor paradigmacompletie, de taak van het in kaart brengen van een lemma naar zijn geïnfecteerde vormen, met behulp van een neuraal encoder-decoder model, de stand van de techniek voor de eentalige taak. We gebruiken gelabelde gegevens uit een taal met veel resources om de prestaties op een taal met weinig resources te verbeteren. In experimenten met 21-taalparen uit vier verschillende taalfamilies krijgen we tot 58% hogere nauwkeurigheid dan zonder overdracht en laten we zien dat zelfs zero-shot en one-shot leren mogelijk zijn. Verder vinden we dat de mate van taalverwantschap sterk invloed heeft op het vermogen om morfologische kennis over te dragen.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja paradigme, zadatak mapiranja limme na njegove utjecajne oblike, koristeći model neuralnog kodera-dekodera, stanje umjetnosti za monojezički zadatak. Koristimo označene podatke iz jezika visokog resursa kako bi povećali učinkovitost na jeziku niskog resursa. U eksperimentima o 21 jezičkim parovima iz četiri različite jezičke obitelji, dobili smo do 58% višu tačnost nego bez prebacivanja i pokazali da su moguće čak ni nula snimanja i jednosničko učenje. Nadalje se nalazimo da stepenica odnosa jezika snažno utječe na sposobnost prenošenja morfoloških znanja.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan metode trans-bahasa transfer novel untuk menyelesaikan paradigm a, tugas untuk memetakan lemma ke bentuk-bentuknya, menggunakan model encoder-decoder saraf, state of the art untuk tugas monobahasa. Kami menggunakan data labeled dari bahasa sumber daya tinggi untuk meningkatkan prestasi pada bahasa sumber daya rendah. Dalam eksperimen pada 21 pasangan bahasa dari empat keluarga bahasa yang berbeda, kita mendapatkan akurasi 58% lebih tinggi daripada tanpa transfer dan menunjukkan bahkan pembelajaran 0-shot dan 1-shot mungkin. Kami juga menemukan bahwa tingkat hubungan bahasa mempengaruhi kuat kemampuan untuk memindahkan pengetahuan morfologi.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine neuartige translinguale Methode zur Paradigmavervollstﾃ､ndigung vor, die Aufgabe, ein Lemma auf seine gebeugten Formen unter Verwendung eines neuronalen Encoder-Decoder-Modells abzubilden, den Stand der Technik fﾃｼr die monolinguale Aufgabe. Wir verwenden beschriftete Daten aus einer ressourcenintensiven Sprache, um die Leistung einer ressourcenarmen Sprache zu steigern. In Experimenten an 21-Sprachpaaren aus vier verschiedenen Sprachfamilien erhalten wir bis zu 58% hﾃｶhere Genauigkeit als ohne Transfer und zeigen, dass auch Zero-Shot- und One-Shot-Lernen mﾃｶglich sind. Weiterhin zeigt sich, dass der Grad der sprachlichen Verwandtschaft die Fﾃ､higkeit zur ﾃ彙ertragung morphologischen Wissens stark beeinflusst.', 'sw': 'We present a novel cross-lingual transfer method for paradigm completion, the task of mapping a lemma to its inflected forms, using a neural encoder-decoder model, the state of the art for the monolingual task.  Tunatumia taarifa zilizotajwa kutoka lugha yenye rasilimali kubwa ili kuongeza ufanisi wa lugha yenye rasilimali duni. Katika majaribio ya wanaume wa lugha 21 kutoka familia nne tofauti za lugha, tunapata hadi asilimia 58 yenye uhakika zaidi kuliko bila kuhamisha na kuonyesha kwamba hata kujifunza kwa risasi zisizo na risasi moja inawezekana. Tunapata zaidi kuwa kiwango cha uhusiano wa lugha unaathiri sana uwezo wa kuhamisha maarifa ya kifolojia.', 'tr': 'Biz paradigm tamamlanmasy üçin cross-lingual transfers yöntemi, lemma suratynyň täsirli formalaryny kartlamak üçin, neiral koder-dekoder modelini ullanýarys, sungatyň durumyny monolingual zady üçin. Biz ýokary ressurs dilinden etitlenýän maglumatlary iň az ressurs dilinde üýtgetmek üçin ullanýarys. 21 dil çeşitli maşgalanyň deneylerinde 4 dürli dil maşgalasyndan, biz 58% derejesinden ýokaryk bar we hatda 0 atdan we bir atdan öwrenmek mümkin däldigini görkez. Biz indi çykyş derejesi morfolojik bilgi üýtgetmegiň ukyplaryna ýok etýäris.', 'ko': '우리는 신경 인코딩-디코딩 모델을 사용하여 굴절 형식의 임무와 단어 임무의 최신 기술을 도입하는 새로운 크로스 언어 모델 전환 방법을 제시했다.우리는 고자원 언어에서 나온 표기 데이터를 사용하여 저자원 언어의 성능을 향상시킨다.실험에 따르면 언어 이동을 하지 않는 상황에서 한 가정에서 다른 가정으로 이동하는 정확도는 심지어 언어 이동을 하지 않는 가정보다 58퍼센트 높았다.우리는 언어의 관련성 정도가 형태학 지식의 이동 능력에 강렬하게 영향을 미친다는 것을 한층 더 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش انتقال متوسط زبان برای کامل پارادیگ را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، وظیفه نقشه\u200cای از نقشه\u200cای از لیما به فرم\u200cهای تاثیر\u200cگیری آن، با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی عصبی، وضعیت هنر برای وظیفه\u200cی تک زبان\u200cگیری. ما از یک زبان منابع بالا استفاده می کنیم تا عملکرد روی زبان منابع کم افزایش دهیم. در آزمایشات ۲۱ جفت زبانی از چهار خانواده زبانی متفاوت، دقیقات بالاتر از ۵۸ درصد بیشتر از بدون انتقال و نشان دهیم که حتی صفر شلیک و یادگیری یک شلیک ممکن است. ما بیشتر فهمیدیم که درجه ارتباط با زبان به شدت توانایی تغییر دانش مورفیک را تأثیر می دهد.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë të re të transferimit ndërgjuhësor për kompletimin e paradigm ës, detyrën e hartimit të një limë në format e saj të ardhura, duke përdorur një model të koduesit-dekodimit nervor, gjendjen e fundit për detyrën monogjuhësore. Ne përdorim të dhëna të etiketuara nga një gjuhë me burime të larta për të rritur performancën në një gjuhë me burime të ulëta. Në eksperimente në 21 çifte gjuhësh nga katër familje gjuhësh të ndryshme, ne arrijmë deri në 58% më të saktësisë se pa transferim dhe tregojmë se edhe mësimi zero-shot dhe një-shot është i mundur. Gjetëm më tej se niveli i lidhjes me gjuhën ndikon fort në aftësinë për të transferuar njohuritë morfologjike.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መተላለፊያ ማድረግ እናስቀራለን፤ የኢሜይል መልዕክት ለፍላጎት ማቀናጃ፣ የናውሮው የኮድድ-decoder model፣ የዐርድ አርእስት ሥርዓት ለመሥራት ነው፡፡ We use labeled data from a high-resource language to increase performance on a low-resource language.  ከአራት ልዩ ቋንቋ ወገኖች ያሉትን 21 ቋንቋዎች ሁለት ሁለት ተፈተናዎች፣ ከመለወጥ ይልቅ 58 በመቶ ከፍተኛ እርግጠኛ አግኝተናል እና በዝሙት የተነሳ እና አንድ shot ተማሪ ይቻላል ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የቋንቋው ግንኙነት የሞሮፎሎጂ እውቀትን ለመለወጥ ኃይል በጠነከረ ነገር እናገኛለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք պարադիգմային ավարտելու նոր փոխլեզվով փոխանցման մեթոդը, լեմմայի քարտեզագրման խնդիրը դրա առաջացած ձևերի վրա, օգտագործելով նյարդային կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելը, միալեզվով խնդիրների ամենաբարձր տեխնոլոգիան: Մենք օգտագործում ենք բարձր ռեսուրսների լեզվից պիտակուցված տվյալներ, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզվի արդյունավետությունը: Տարբեր չորս լեզվի ընտանիքներից 21 լեզվի զույգի փորձարկումներում մենք ստանում ենք մինչև 58 տոկոսով ավելի ճշգրիտ, քան առանց փոխանցման և ցույց են տալիս, որ նույնիսկ զրոյի և միակրակի ուսումնասիրությունը հնարավոր է: Մենք նաև հայտնաբերում ենք, որ լեզվի կապվածության մակարդակը ուժեղ ազդում է մորֆոլոգիական գիտելիքների փոխանցման ունակության վրա:', 'af': "Ons stel 'n roman kruistale oordragmetode voor paradigme voltooiing, die taak van 'n lemma aan sy inflekke vorms, gebruik 'n neurale enkoder-dekodermodel, die staat van die kuns vir die monolinglike taak. Ons gebruik gemerkte data van 'n hoë- hulpbron taal om uitvoerings op 'n lae- hulpbron taal te vermeerder. In eksperimente op 21 taal paar van vier verskillende taal geslagte, ons kry tot 58% hoëre presisie as sonder oordrag en wys dat selfs nul-skoot en een-skoot leer moontlik is. Ons vind verder dat die grade van taal verwantigheid sterk die moontlik om morfologiese kennis te oordra.", 'bn': 'প্যারাডিম সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস ক্রস-ভাষার পরিবর্তনের পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি, একটি লেমা মানচিত্রের কাজ, একটি নিউরেল এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল ব্যবহার করে, একটি ন আমরা উচ্চ সম্পদের ভাষা থেকে লেবেলেড ডাটা ব্যবহার করি কম সম্পদের ভাষায় প্রদর্শন করার জন্য। বিভিন্ন ভাষা পরিবারের ২১ ভাষার জোড়া পরীক্ষায়, আমরা পরিবর্তন না করার চেয়ে ৫৮% বেশি সঠিক পরীক্ষা পেয়েছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এমনকি শুট আমরা আরো দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ভাষার সংশ্লিষ্ট পরিমাণ মৃত্যুবিজ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের ক্ষমতার প্রভাব ফেলেছে।', 'ca': "Presentam un nou mètode de transfer ència translingüística per a completar el paradigma, la tasca de mapejar un llema a les seves formes influïdes, utilitzant un model de codificador neural, l'última tasca monolingüe. Utilitzem dades etiquetades d'un llenguatge d'alt recurso per augmentar el rendiment d'un llenguatge de baix recursos. En experiments de 21 parells de llengües de quatre famílies diferents, obtenim fins al 58% més precisió que sense transfer ència i demostrem que fins i tot aprenentatge amb zero i un cop és possible. També descobrim que el grau de relació lingüística influeix fortament en la capacitat de transferir coneixements morfològics.", 'cs': 'Představujeme novou metodu přenosu mezi jazyky pro dokončení paradigmatu, úlohu mapování lemma do jeho křivěných forem pomocí neuronového kodéru-dekodéru modelu, stav techniky pro monojazyčné úlohy. Pro zvýšení výkonu jazyka s nízkými zdroji používáme označená data z jazyka s vysokými zdroji. V experimentech na 21-jazykových párech ze čtyř různých jazykových rodin získáváme až 58% vyšší přesnost než bez přenosu a ukazujeme, že i nulové a jednorázové učení je možné. Dále zjišťujeme, že stupeň jazykové souvislosti silně ovlivňuje schopnost přenášet morfologické znalosti.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja paradigme, zadatak mapiranja limme na njegove utjecajne forme, koristeći model neuralnog kodera-dekodera, stanje umjetnosti za monojezički zadatak. Koristimo označene podatke iz jezika visokog resursa kako bi povećali učinkovitost na jeziku niskog resursa. U eksperimentima o 21 jezičkim parovima iz četiri različite jezičke porodice, dobijemo do 58% veće tačnosti nego bez prebacivanja i pokazujemo da je moguće čak ni nula pucnjava i jednosničko učenje. Nalazimo dalje da stepenica odnosa jezika snažno utječe na sposobnost prenošenja morfoloških znanja.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudse keeleülese ülekande meetodi paradigma lõpuleviimiseks, ülesandeks kaardistada lemma selle painduvatele vormidele, kasutades neurokodeer-dekooder mudelit, tehnika taset ühekeelse ülesande jaoks. Kasutame märgistatud andmeid suure ressursiga keelest, et suurendada jõudlust vähese ressursiga keeles. Eksperimentides 21 keelepaariga neljast erinevast keeleperest saavutame kuni 58% suurema täpsuse kui ilma ülekandeta ning näitame, et isegi null- ja ühekordse õppimise on võimalik. Lisaks leiame, et keelelisuse aste mõjutab tugevalt morfoloogiliste teadmiste edastamise võimet.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden monikielisen siirtomenetelmän paradigman täydentämiseen, tehtävän kartoittaa lemma sen taivutettuihin muotoihin käyttäen neurokooderi-dekooderimallia, nykytekniikan monokieliseen tehtävään. Käytämme korkean resurssin kielen merkittyjä tietoja parantaaksemme suorituskykyä alhaisen resurssin kielellä. Kokeissa 21 kieliparilla neljästä eri kieliperheestä saavutimme jopa 58% paremman tarkkuuden kuin ilman siirtoa ja osoitimme, että jopa nolla- ja kertaoppiminen on mahdollista. Lisäksi toteamme, että kieliriippuvuus vaikuttaa vahvasti morfologisen tiedon siirtokykyyn.', 'az': 'Biz paradigm tamamlanması üçün yeni çox dilli transfer metodlarını göstəririk, limmanın müxtəlif formlarına kartlaması, nöral kodlayıcı modeli, monodil işinin sanatının durumu istifadə edirik. Biz yüksək ressurs dilindən etiketli məlumatları istifadə edirik ki, düşük ressurs dilində performans artırsın. Dörd dil ailəsindən 21 dil çift təcrübələrində, transfer olmadan 58%-dən daha yüksək təcrübələrə nail olduq və bir fərqli öyrənmək mümkün olduğunu göstərdik. Daha sonra dillərin bağlantısının dərəcəsi morfolojik bilgini dəyişdirmək bacarılığını güclü etmişdir.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים שיטת העברה דרך שפת חדשה לשימוש הפרדיגמה, המשימה של המפה של לימה לצורות השופעות שלה, בשימוש מודל קודד-קידור עצבי, המצב של האומנות למשימה מונולינגית. אנו משתמשים במידע המתוויד משפה משאבים גבוהים כדי לגדל את ההופעה בשפה משאבים נמוכים. In experiments on 21 language pairs from four different language families, we obtain up to 58% higher accuracy than without transfer and show that even zero-shot and one-shot learning are possible.  אנו מוצאים נוסף שמדרגות הקשר לשפה משפיעה בכוחות על היכולת להעביר ידע מורפולוגי.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov medjezični prenos metode za dokončanje paradigme, nalogo kartiranja lemme v njene upognjene oblike z uporabo modela nevronskih kodirnikov-dekodirnikov, stanje tehnike za enojezično nalogo. Za povečanje učinkovitosti jezika z nizkimi viri uporabljamo označene podatke iz jezika z visokimi viri. V eksperimentih na 21 jezikovnih parov iz štirih različnih jezikovnih družin dosežemo do 58% večjo natančnost kot brez prenosa in pokažemo, da je mogoče tudi učenje z ničelnim in enkratnim poskusom. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da stopnja povezanosti z jezikom močno vpliva na sposobnost prenosa morfološkega znanja.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata hanyor shishi na kure-lugha wa cikakken paradigm, aikin wanda za'a karya wata lima zuwa surori masu hushi da shi, don ka yi amfani da wani misali na kodkoder-neural, halin sanannin wa aikin wanda aka yi wa aikin na mantali. Munã amfani da data wanda aka rubuta daga harshen mai tsawo zuwa ya ƙara performance kan wata harshen-resource. In experiments on 21 language pairs from four different language families, we obtain up to 58% higher accuracy than without transfer and show that even zero-shot and one-shot learning are possible.  Ko da yawa Muke sãmu, cewa shawarar da ke cikin harshen, yana mai amfani da awon a shige ilimin morfologi.", 'jv': "Awak dhéwé éntuk nyumbang kelompok-dilangan nggawe mulai pertama karo panenggambar, nggawe nggambar aturan limma kanggo nggawe sistem sing apik, gambar model Njuk'er-Dekoder (Njuk'er-Dekoder) Awak dhéwé nggunakake data sing paling nggo langgambar luwih operasi kanggo nggawe barang langgambar. Nang sing perbudhakan kanggo masalah sabanjuré ing panjuré, awak dhéwé butuhak 58%  sing wis nggawé kuwi nggawe tarjamahan lan ngono kuwi wis nulat gawe ngubah perusahaan sak ujaran. Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih kanggo kelas kuwi nggawé gerakan kanggo mbatalé kesempatan kanggo ngerasah bantuan ingkang modorologi.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བརྒྱུད་ལམ་ལུགས་པའི་ཚིག་འདྲ་ཞིག་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱ་རིམ་ཅིག་བྲིས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་དང་འཕགས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་ལས་ཆ་འདུག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་དང་ནུས་པ་ཡིན་པས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཐབས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Morphological Inflection Generation with Hard Monotonic Attention', 'ar': 'توليد الانعكاس الصرفي مع الانتباه الشديد الرتيب', 'pt': 'Geração de Inflexão Morfológica com Atenção Monotônica Difícil', 'es': 'Generación de inflexión morfológica con atención monótona dura', 'fr': "Génération d'inflexions morphologiques avec une attention monotone dure", 'ja': '硬い単調な注目を伴う形態学的屈折の生成', 'zh': '有硬单调意力之形拐点生', 'hi': 'हार्ड मोनोटोनिक ध्यान के साथ रूपात्मक मोड़ पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Генерация морфологических перегибов с жестким монотонным вниманием', 'ga': 'Giniúint Inflection moirfeolaíoch le haird chrua mhonatónach', 'ka': 'მორფოლოგიური ინფლექციის განვითარება ძალიან მონოტონიური დაახლოებით', 'hu': 'Morfológiai inflexió generáció kemény monoton figyelemmel', 'it': 'Generazione di Inflessione Morfologica con Difficile Attenzione Monotonica', 'kk': 'Морфологикалық инфлекциялық қиын монотониялық назарды құру', 'mk': 'Генерација на морфолошка инфлекција со тешко монотонско внимание', 'ms': 'Penjanaan Infleksi Morfologik dengan Perhatian Monotonik Keras', 'el': 'Μορφολογική παραγωγή εκτροπής με σκληρή μονοτονική προσοχή', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Inflessjoni Morfoloġika b’Attenzjoni Monotonika iebsa', 'mn': 'Марфологик давхар тархалтын төрөл', 'lt': 'Morfologinės Infekcijos generacija su sunkiu monotoniniu dėmesiu', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'കഠിനമായ മോണോട്ടോണിക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിക്കല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dഫ്ലെക്ഷന്\u200d സംവിധാനം', 'pl': 'Generowanie odchylenia morfologicznego z twardą uwagą monotoniczną', 'si': 'මොර්ෆෝලෝජික ප්\u200dරවේශනය සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා හරිම මොනොටෝනික් අවධානය සමග', 'ro': 'Generarea inflexiei morfologice cu atentie monotonica puternica', 'sr': 'Generacija morfološke infekcije sa teškom monotonskom pažnjom', 'so': 'Horumar Monotonic Attention', 'sv': 'Morfologisk Inflektion Generation med Hård Monotonisk Uppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سخت موتونیک اظہارت کے ساتھ مارفولوژیک اینفلکس نسل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình dạng viêm phổi, tập trung chú ý.', 'bg': 'Генериране на морфологично влияние с твърдо монотонно внимание', 'nl': 'Morfologische Inflectie Generatie met Harde Monotone Aandacht', 'da': 'Morfologisk Inflektion Generation med hård monotonisk opmærksomhed', 'hr': 'Generacija morfološke infekcije sa tvrdom monotonskom pažnjom', 'id': 'Generasi Infleksi Morfologis Dengan Perhatian Monotonik Keras', 'de': 'Morphologische Beugungsbildung mit harter monotonischer Aufmerksamkeit', 'fa': 'نسل تغییرات مورفولوژیکی با توجه به موتونیک سخت', 'ko': '경단조로운 주의를 가진 형태 변화 생성', 'tr': 'Güç Monotonik Dikkati bilen Marfolojik Infleksiýa Döredişi', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa Kimorphological Infusion With Hard Monotonic Attention', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i Infleksionit Morfologjik me vëmendje Monotonike të ashpër', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական ինֆլեկցիայի ստեղծումը բարդ մոնոտոնիկ ուշադրությամբ', 'az': 'Zor Monotonik Dikkati il…Щ Morfolojik Infleksiyon n…Щz…Щriyy…Щti', 'bn': 'কঠিন মনোটোনিক মনোযোগের সাথে মরোফোলিক্যাল ইনফ্লেকেশন প্রজন্ম', 'bs': 'Generacija morfološke Inflekcije sa tvrdom monotonskom pažnjom', 'ca': "La generació d'inflexió morfològica amb atenció monotònica difícil", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'fi': 'Morfologisen vaikutuksen luominen kovalla monotonisella huomiolla', 'cs': 'Generování morfologické inflace s tvrdou monotonickou pozorností', 'et': 'Morfoloogilise mõju genereerimine raske monotoonilise tähelepanuga', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'Morphological Inflection Generation with Hard Monotonic Attention', 'he': 'שפעת מורפולוגית עם תשומת לב מונטונית קשה', 'sk': 'Generacija morfoloških vplivov s trdo monotonično pozornostjo', 'bo': 'མཐོ་རྩིས་བ་དང་མཐོ་ཆེ་མཐོ་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་འགྱུར་བ་སྐོར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེས་བ།'}
{'en': 'We present a neural model for morphological inflection generation which employs a hard attention mechanism, inspired by the nearly-monotonic alignment commonly found between the characters in a word and the characters in its inflection. We evaluate the model on three previously studied morphological inflection generation datasets and show that it provides state of the art results in various setups compared to previous neural and non-neural approaches. Finally we present an analysis of the continuous representations learned by both the hard and soft (Bahdanau, 2014) attention models for the task, shedding some light on the features such models extract.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا لتوليد الانعكاس الصرفي الذي يستخدم آلية انتباه شديدة ، مستوحاة من المحاذاة شبه الرتيبة الموجودة عادة بين الأحرف في الكلمة والشخصيات في انعطافها. قمنا بتقييم النموذج على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات لتوليد الانعكاس المورفولوجي التي تمت دراستها سابقًا ونوضح أنه يوفر أحدث النتائج في الإعدادات المختلفة مقارنة بالنُهج العصبية وغير العصبية السابقة. أخيرًا نقدم تحليلًا للتمثيلات المستمرة التي تعلمتها كل من نماذج الانتباه الصلبة والناعمة (Bahdanau، 2014) للمهمة ، مع إلقاء بعض الضوء على الميزات التي تستخلصها هذه النماذج.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle neuronal pour la génération d'inflexions morphologiques qui utilise un mécanisme d'attention rigide, inspiré de l'alignement presque monotone que l'on trouve couramment entre les caractères d'un mot et les caractères de son inflexion. Nous évaluons le modèle sur trois ensembles de données de génération d'inflexion morphologique précédemment étudiés et montrons qu'il fournit des résultats de pointe dans diverses configurations par rapport aux approches neuronales et non neuronales précédentes. Enfin, nous présentons une analyse des représentations continues apprises par les modèles d'attention dure et douce (Bahdanau, 2014) pour la tâche, en éclairant les caractéristiques que ces modèles extraient.", 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo neuronal para la generación de inflexiones morfológicas que emplea un mecanismo de atención duro, inspirado en la alineación casi monótona que se encuentra comúnmente entre los caracteres de una palabra y los caracteres de su inflexión. Evaluamos el modelo en tres conjuntos de datos de generación de inflexión morfológica previamente estudiados y mostramos que proporciona resultados de última generación en varias configuraciones en comparación con los enfoques neuronales y no neuronales anteriores. Finalmente, presentamos un análisis de las representaciones continuas aprendidas por los modelos de atención dura y suave (Bahdanau, 2014) para la tarea, arrojando algo de luz sobre las características que extraen dichos modelos.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo neural para geração de flexão morfológica que emprega um mecanismo de atenção dura, inspirado no alinhamento quase monotônico comumente encontrado entre os caracteres de uma palavra e os caracteres em sua flexão. Avaliamos o modelo em três conjuntos de dados de geração de inflexão morfológica previamente estudados e mostramos que ele fornece resultados de última geração em várias configurações em comparação com abordagens neurais e não neurais anteriores. Por fim, apresentamos uma análise das representações contínuas aprendidas pelos modelos de atenção hard e soft (Bahdanau, 2014) para a tarefa, lançando alguma luz sobre as características que esses modelos extraem.', 'ja': '我々は、単語内の文字とその歪み内の文字との間に一般的に見られるほぼ単調なアライメントに触発されて、ハード注意メカニズムを採用した形態学的歪み生成のためのニューラルモデルを提示する。我々は、以前に研究された３つの形態学的屈折生成データセットに基づいてモデルを評価し、それが、以前の神経および非神経アプローチと比較して、様々な設定における最先端の結果を提供することを示す。最後に、タスクのハードとソフトの両方の注意モデル（ Bahdanau、2014 ）によって学習された連続表現の分析を提示し、そのようなモデル抽出の特徴をいくつか明らかにします。', 'hi': 'हम रूपात्मक मोड़ पीढ़ी के लिए एक तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एक कठिन ध्यान तंत्र को नियोजित करता है, जो आमतौर पर एक शब्द में पात्रों और इसके प्रतिबिंब में पात्रों के बीच पाए जाने वाले लगभग-मोनोटोनिक संरेखण से प्रेरित होता है। हम पहले से अध्ययन किए गए तीन रूपात्मक मोड़ पीढ़ी डेटासेट पर मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह पिछले तंत्रिका और गैर-तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में विभिन्न सेटअपों में कला परिणाम प्रदान करता है। अंत में हम कार्य के लिए कठिन और नरम (Bahdanau, 2014) दोनों ध्यान मॉडल द्वारा सीखे गए निरंतर अभ्यावेदन का विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, इस तरह के मॉडल निकालने की विशेषताओं पर कुछ प्रकाश डालते हैं।', 'zh': '设一形之神经,宜用意机,其感自单词符与其词形变化之间,常见近齐。 三前之形拐点形生数集上质,明比前神经非神经法,供最先进之效。 最后论硬软(Bahdanau,2014)为学连,以明其征。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем нейронную модель для генерации морфологических перегибов, которая использует жесткий механизм внимания, вдохновленный почти монотонным выравниванием, обычно встречающимся между символами в слове и символами в его перегибе. Мы оцениваем модель на трех ранее изученных наборах данных генерации морфологических перегибов и показываем, что она обеспечивает современные результаты в различных установках по сравнению с предыдущими нейронными и ненейронными подходами. Наконец, мы представляем анализ непрерывных представлений, изученных как в жесткой, так и в мягкой (Bahdanau, 2014) моделях внимания для задачи, проливая некоторый свет на особенности, которые такие модели извлекают.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair samhail néarúil do ghiniúint infhilleadh moirfeolaíoch a úsáideann meicníocht dian-aire, spreagtha ag an ailíniú beagnach monotonach a fhaightear go coitianta idir na carachtair i bhfocal agus na carachtair ina infhilleadh. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar an tsamhail ar thrí thacar sonraí giniúna moirfeolaíocha a ndearnadh staidéar orthu roimhe seo agus léirímid go soláthraíonn sé torthaí den scoth i socruithe éagsúla i gcomparáid le cuir chuige néaracha agus neamhnéaracha roimhe seo. Ar deireadh cuirimid i láthair anailís ar na huiríll leanúnacha a d’fhoghlaim na samhlacha airde crua agus bog (Bahdanau, 2014) don tasc, rud a thugann léargas ar na gnéithe a bhaineann le sliocht samhlacha den sórt sin.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία μορφολογικής κάμψης που χρησιμοποιεί έναν σκληρό μηχανισμό προσοχής, εμπνευσμένο από την σχεδόν μονοτονική ευθυγράμμιση που συναντάται συνήθως μεταξύ των χαρακτήρων μιας λέξης και των χαρακτήρων της κάμψης της. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο σε τρία προηγουμένως μελετημένα σύνολα δεδομένων μορφολογικής παραγωγής καμπής και αποδεικνύουμε ότι παρέχει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε διάφορες ρυθμίσεις σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες νευρωνικές και μη νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις. Τέλος, παρουσιάζουμε μια ανάλυση των συνεχών αναπαραστάσεων που έμαθαν τόσο από τα σκληρά όσο και από τα μαλακά μοντέλα προσοχής για το έργο, ρίχνοντας φως στα χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγουν τέτοια μοντέλα.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy olyan neurális modellt a morfológiai inflexió generációjára, amely kemény figyelemmechanizmust alkalmaz, amelyet a szó karakterei és az inflexiójában lévő karakterek közötti szinte monoton igazítás ihletett. A modellt három korábban tanulmányozott morfológiai inflexiós generációs adatkészleten értékeljük, és kimutatjuk, hogy a korábbi neurális és nem neurális megközelítésekhez képest a legmodernebb eredményeket nyújtja. Végezetül bemutatjuk a kemény és lágy (Bahdanau, 2014) figyelemmodellek által tanult folyamatos reprezentációk elemzését a feladathoz, fényt vetve azokra a jellemzőkre, amelyeket az ilyen modellek kivonnak.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მოვაჩვენეთ ნეიროლური მოდელი მოპოროლოგიური ინტელექციის განვითარებისთვის, რომელიც აყენებს ძალიან დაახლოების მექსინექციის მექსინექცია, რომელიც დაახლოებით მონოტონიური განვითარებით ჩვენ მოდელს სამი წინ მოპოროლოგიური ინფლექციის განვითარების მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ გავამუშაოთ და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ის მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებულ შესახებ წინ ნ საბოლოოდ ჩვენ გავაჩვენეთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულ გამოსახულებების ანალიზაციას, რომელიც ძალიან მარტივი და მარტივი (ბაჰანას, 2014) მოდელების მონაცემის მოდელები, რომელიც რაღაც მოდელ', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome morfologinės inflekcijos kartos nervinį model į, kuriame naudojamas griežtas dėmesio mechanizmas, įkvėptas beveik monotoniniu suderinimu, paprastai rastu tarp ženklų žodžiu ir ženklų inflekcijoje. We evaluate the model on three previously studied morphological inflection generation datasets and show that it provides state of the art results in various setups compared to previous neural and non-neural approaches.  Galiausiai pristatome nuolatinių atstovavimų, išmokytų ir kietų, ir minkštų (Bahdanau, 2014 m.) dėmesio modelių, analizę užduoties atžvilgiu, skleidžiant tam tikrą šviesą tokių modelių ekstrakto savybėms.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello neurale per la generazione di inflessioni morfologiche che impiega un meccanismo di attenzione duro, ispirato all'allineamento quasi monotonico comunemente trovato tra i caratteri di una parola e i caratteri nella sua inflessione. Valutiamo il modello su tre dataset di generazione di flessioni morfologiche precedentemente studiati e mostriamo che fornisce risultati all'avanguardia in vari setup rispetto ai precedenti approcci neurali e non neurali. Infine presentiamo un'analisi delle rappresentazioni continue apprese dai modelli di attenzione hard e soft (Bahdanau, 2014) per il compito, facendo luce sulle caratteristiche che tali modelli estraggono.", 'kk': 'Біз морфологиялық инфлекцияларды құру үшін невралдық модель таңдаймыз. Бұл қиын қызықты қарау механизмін қолданады. Бұл сөз мен оның инфлекциясындағы таңбалар арасындағы жалпы монотоннық түрлен Біз үш өткен морфологиялық инфлекциялық деректер жасау бағдарламаларының үшін үлгісін оқу және оның өткен невралдық және невралдық емес жағдайларына салыстырылып, әртүрлі баптауларының Соңында біз тапсырманың қатты және бағдарламалы (Бахдану, 2014) түсіндірілген тұрақты тапсырмалардың анализациясын таңдаймыз. Бұл үлгілерді түсіндіру үшін бірнеше жарықты түсіндіреді.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model saraf untuk generasi penyebaran morfologik yang menggunakan mekanisme perhatian keras, diinspirasi oleh penyesuaian hampir monotonik yang biasanya ditemui antara aksara dalam satu perkataan dan aksara dalam penyebaran. Kami menilai model pada tiga set data generasi penyebaran morfologi yang telah dipelajari sebelumnya dan menunjukkan bahawa ia menyediakan keputusan kemajuan dalam berbagai tetapan dibandingkan dengan pendekatan saraf dan bukan saraf sebelumnya. Akhirnya kami memperkenalkan analisis perwakilan terus menerus yang dipelajari oleh model perhatian keras dan lembut (Bahdanau, 2014) untuk tugas ini, melemparkan beberapa cahaya pada ciri-ciri model seperti ekstrakt.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell newrali għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ inflezzjoni morfoloġika li juża mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni iebsa, ispirat mill-allinjament kważi monotoniku li jinstab b’mod komuni bejn il-karattri f’kelma u l-karattri fl-inflezzjoni tagħha. We evaluate the model on three previously studied morphological inflection generation datasets and show that it provides state of the art results in various setups compared to previous neural and non-neural approaches.  Finally we present an analysis of the continuous representations learned by both the hard and soft (Bahdanau, 2014) attention models for the task, shedding some light on the features such models extract.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഒരു കഠിനമായ ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കിലും അതിന്റെ സംവിധാനത്തിലുമുള്ള അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഇട മുമ്പ് പഠിക്കപ്പെട്ട മൂന്ന് മാതൃകയിലെ മാതൃകയിലുള്ള മോഡലിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മുന്\u200dപ് നെയുറല്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ത അവസാനം നമ്മുടെ ജോലിക്കുള്ള കഠിനവും മാന്യവും പഠിപ്പിച്ച പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ അന്വേഷണം കൊണ്ടുവന്നു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇതുപോലുള്ള മോഡലു', 'mk': 'Презентираме нервен модел за генерација на морфолошки инфекции, кој користи строг механизам на внимание, инспириран од речиси монотонското израмнување кое е често се наоѓа меѓу ликовите во збор и ликовите во нејзината инфекција. Го проценуваме моделот на три претходно проучени групи на податоци за генерација на морфолошки инфекции и покажуваме дека тој обезбедува најдобри резултати во различни поставувања во споредба со претходните неурални и неурални пристапи. Конечно претставуваме анализа на континуираните претставувања научени од цврстите и меките (Бахданау, 2014) модели на внимание за задачата, фрлајќи малку светлина на карактеристиките кои ваквите модели ги извадуваат.', 'mn': 'Бид морфологийн нөлөөлөлийн үеийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хатуу анхаарлын механизмийг ашигладаг. Энэ нь ойролцоогоор монотон зэрэгцүүлэх загвар юм. Бид өмнө нь 3-р судалсан морфологик нөлөөлөлийн үеийн өгөгдлийн сан дээр загварыг үнэлгээд урлагийн нөлөөлөлтийг өмнө нь мэдрэлийн болон мэдрэлийн бус ойлголтын харьцуулахад өөр өөр төрлийн байгууллагуудын үр дүнг Эцэст нь бид ажлын анхаарлын загварын тухай суралцсан үргэлжлүүлэх загварын талаар шинжилгээ үзүүлнэ. Ийм загварын гаргах загварын тухай зарим гэрлийг тодорхойлж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit neuralmodell for formasjon av morfologiske infleksjon som brukar ein vanskelig oppmerksmekanisme, inspirert av den nesten monotoniske justeringa som ofte finst mellom teikna i eit ord og teikna i infleksjonen. Vi evaluerer modellen på tre førre studierte morfologiske infleksjonsgenereringsdatasett og viser at det tilbyr tilstanden til kunsten i ulike oppsett sammenlignet med førre neurale og ikkje-neurale tilnærmingar. I slutt presenterer vi ein analyse av dei kontinuerlige representasjonane lærte av både dei vanskelige og måke (Bahdanau, 2014) oppmerksmodelane for oppgåva, og så deler litt lys på funksjonane slike modeller ut.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un model neural pentru generarea inflexiunii morfologice care utilizează un mecanism de atenție puternic, inspirat de alinierea aproape monotonă frecvent găsită între personajele dintr-un cuvânt și personajele din inflexiunea sa. Evaluăm modelul pe trei seturi de date de generare a inflexiunii morfologice studiate anterior și demonstrăm că oferă rezultate de ultimă oră în diferite setup-uri comparativ cu abordările neurale și non-neurale anterioare. În cele din urmă prezentăm o analiză a reprezentărilor continue învățate atât de modelele de atenție hard, cât și soft (Bahdanau, 2014) pentru această sarcină, punând o lumină asupra caracteristicilor extrase de aceste modele.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo neuralni model za generaciju morfološke inflekcije koji koristi težak mehanizam pažnje, inspirisan skoro monotonskim poravnanjem često pronađenim između likova u reči i likova njegove inflekcije. Procjenjujemo model na tri prethodno proučavane podatke o generaciji morfološke inflekcije i pokazujemo da pruža stanje umjetnosti rezultate u različitim setovima u usporedbi sa prethodnim neuralnim i neuralnim pristupima. Konačno predstavljamo analizu stalnih predstavljanja naučenih od teških i mekih modela pažnje (Bahdanau, 2014.) za zadatak, izbacivši malo svjetla na karakteristike takvih modela.', 'si': 'අපි මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුව අපි මොඩේල් තුනක් කලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මොර්ෆිලෝගික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න අන්තිමේදී අපි පරිශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ සිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා අමාරුයි (බාධානූ, 2014) අවධානයේ අවධානයේ අවධාන', 'so': 'We present a neural model for morphological inflection generation which employs a hard attention mechanism, inspired by the nearly-monotonic alignment commonly found between the characters in a word and the characters in its inflection.  Tusaalada waxaan ku qiimeynayaa saddex qof oo horay loo baray dhaqaalaha qoyska, waxaana tusinayaa inay xaaladda farshaxanku ka timaadaa dhibaatooyin kala duduwan oo la barbarbaro hababka hore ee neurada iyo neurada. Ugu dambaysta waxaynu keennaa baaritaanka muuqashada qaababka aad u adag iyo dhaqdhaqaaqyada (Bahdanau, 2014) ee shaqada, waxaana tusinayaa iftiimo ku saabsan qaababka noocyada ka soo baxa.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய மாதிரி கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். அது கடுமையான கவனம் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, கிட்டத்தட்ட மானோடோனிக் ஒழுங்கு பொதுவாக ஒரு வார்த்தைய முன்பு படிக்கப்பட்ட மூன்று மாதிரியில் மாதிரியை மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம் முன்னால் புதிய புதிய முறைமையில் மற்றும் புதிய முறையில்லாத த இறுதியில் கடினமான மற்றும் மென்மையான (Bahdanau, 2014) பணிக்கான கவனத்தின் மாதிரிகளை கற்றுக் கொண்ட தொடர்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் பாதுகாப்புகளை ஒரு', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en neural modell för morfologisk böjning generation som använder en hård uppmärksamhetsmekanism, inspirerad av den nästan monotona justering som vanligtvis finns mellan tecknen i ett ord och tecknen i dess böjning. Vi utvärderar modellen på tre tidigare studerade dataset för morfologisk böjning och visar att den ger toppmoderna resultat i olika uppställningar jämfört med tidigare neurala och icke-neurala tillvägagångssätt. Slutligen presenterar vi en analys av de kontinuerliga representationer som lärts av både hårda och mjuka (Bahdanau, 2014) uppmärksamhetsmodeller för uppgiften, vilket belyser de egenskaper som sådana modeller extraherar.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل موڈل کو موفورلوژیکی اثرات کی نسل کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک سخت اثرات مکانیسم کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے، جو تقریباً ایک موٹونی تضابطہ کے ذریعہ ایک کلم اور اس کے اثرات کے درمیان معلوم ہوتا ہے۔ ہم نے اس مدل کو تین سے پہلے درخواست کی مورفولوژیک ایلکس نسل ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطالعہ کرلیا ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ یہ آرتی کا نتیجہ مختلف سٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ آخر میں ہم نے مشکل اور نرم (Bahdanau) کے ذریعہ سے سیکھے ہوئے ہمیشہ نمائندوں کی ایک تحلیل پیش کیا ہے، اور اس طرح کے نمائندوں کے اٹھانے پر کچھ نور ڈال دیتے ہیں۔', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model neuronowy generowania zmian morfologicznych, który wykorzystuje twardy mechanizm uwagi, inspirowany prawie monotonicznym wyrównaniem powszechnie występującym między znakami w słowie a znakami w jego zmianie. Oceniamy model na trzech badanych wcześniej zbiorach danych morfologicznych generowania inflekcji i pokazujemy, że zapewnia on najnowocześniejsze wyniki w różnych konfiguracjach w porównaniu z poprzednimi podejściami neuronowymi i nieneuronowymi. Na koniec przedstawiamy analizę ciągłych reprezentacji nauczonych zarówno przez twarde, jak i miękkie modele uwagi (Bahdanau, 2014), rzucając trochę światła na cechy ekstraktujące takie modele.', 'uz': "Biz oddiy so'zlar va suhbatdagi harflarning orasidagi bir neyrologik modeli hozir qilamiz. Biz avval o'rganilgan 3 o'rganilgan morfologik inflektoriya maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatimiz va u oldingi neyrologik va neural usullar bilan bir xil tartiblarning holatini ko'rsatamiz. Endi biz vazifa uchun qiyin va oq (Bahdanau, 2014) o'rganilgan davomida taʼminlovchilarni aniqlab kelamiz. Bu modellarni chiqarish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình thần kinh cho sản phẩm tự biến hình của các triệu chứng có tác dụng một cơ chế chăm chú, lấy cảm hứng từ việc thẳng tiến gần đơn tuyến thường tìm thấy giữa các ký tự trong một từ và các ký tự trong cơ thể. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu dựa trên ba bộ truyền dữ liệu di động được nghiên cứu trước đây và cho thấy nó cung cấp các kết quả nghệ thuật trong nhiều cài đặt khác nhau so với các tiếp cận thần kinh và không-thần kinh trước. Sau cùng, chúng tôi đưa ra một bản phân tích những biểu tượng liên tục được học bởi cả những mẫu chăm chú (Bahdanau, thậm chí thậm chí thậm chí là phía bây giờ) tập trung cho nhiệm vụ, để làm sáng tỏ các đặc điểm như vậy.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en neural model for morfologisk bøjning generation, der anvender en hård opmærksomhedsmekanisme, inspireret af den næsten monotone justering, der almindeligvis findes mellem tegnene i et ord og tegnene i dens bøjning. Vi evaluerer modellen på tre tidligere undersøgte morfologiske bøjlegenerationsdatasæt og viser, at den giver state of te art resultater i forskellige opsætninger sammenlignet med tidligere neurale og ikke-neurale tilgange. Endelig præsenterer vi en analyse af de kontinuerlige repræsentationer, som både de hårde og bløde (Bahdanau, 2014) opmærksomhedsmodeller har lært for opgaven, og kaster lys over de funktioner, som sådanne modeller udtrækker.', 'bg': 'Представяме невронен модел за генериране на морфологична флексия, който използва механизъм на силно внимание, вдъхновен от почти монотонното подравняване, често срещано между символите в дадена дума и символите в нейната флекция. Оценяваме модела върху три предварително проучени набора данни за генериране на морфологични инфлекции и показваме, че той осигурява най-съвременни резултати в различни настройки в сравнение с предишните невронни и неневронни подходи. На последно място представяме анализ на непрекъснатите изображения, научени от твърдите и меките модели на внимание за задачата (Бахданау, 2014), хвърляйки светлина върху характеристиките, които тези модели извличат.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo neuralni model za generaciju morfološke utjecaje koji koristi mehanizam teškog pažnje, inspiriran skoro monotonskim poravnanjem često pronađenim između likova u riječi i likova njegove utjecaje. Procjenjujemo model na tri prethodno ispitivane datoteke generacije morfološke inflekcije i pokazujemo da pruža stanje umjetnosti rezultate u različitim setovima u usporedbi s prethodnim neuralnim i ne-neuralnim pristupima. Konačno predstavljamo analizu stalnih predstavljanja koje su naučili i teški i meki (Bahdanau, 2014) modeli pažnje za zadatak, izbacivanje malo svjetla na karakteristike takvih izvlačenja modela.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een neuraal model voor morfologische inflectie generatie dat een hard aandachtsmechanisme gebruikt, geïnspireerd door de bijna monotone uitlijning die gewoonlijk wordt gevonden tussen de tekens in een woord en de tekens in zijn inflectie. We evalueren het model op drie eerder bestudeerde morfologische inflectie generatie datasets en tonen aan dat het state-of-the-art resultaten levert in verschillende opstellingen vergeleken met eerdere neurale en niet-neurale benaderingen. Tot slot presenteren we een analyse van de continue representaties geleerd door zowel de harde als zachte (Bahdanau, 2014) aandachtsmodellen voor de taak, wat licht werpt op de kenmerken die dergelijke modellen extraheren.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuronales Modell zur morphologischen Flexionsgenerierung, das einen harten Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus verwendet, inspiriert von der fast monotonen Ausrichtung, die üblicherweise zwischen den Zeichen in einem Wort und den Zeichen in seiner Flexion gefunden wird. Wir evaluieren das Modell auf drei zuvor untersuchten morphologischen Flexionsgenerationsdatensätzen und zeigen, dass es im Vergleich zu früheren neuronalen und nicht-neuronalen Ansätzen in verschiedenen Setups aktuelle Ergebnisse liefert. Abschließend präsentieren wir eine Analyse der kontinuierlichen Repräsentationen, die sowohl von den harten als auch weichen Aufmerksamkeitsmodellen (Bahdanau, 2014) für diese Aufgabe gelernt wurden, und werfen ein wenig Licht auf die Merkmale, die solche Modelle extrahieren.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model saraf untuk generasi infleksi morfologi yang menggunakan mekanisme perhatian keras, terinspirasi oleh penyesuaian hampir monotonik yang biasanya ditemukan antara karakter dalam satu kata dan karakter dalam infleksinya. Kami mengevaluasi model pada tiga set data generasi infleksi morfologi yang sebelumnya dipelajari dan menunjukkan bahwa itu menyediakan hasil terbaik dalam berbagai setup dibandingkan dengan pendekatan saraf dan bukan saraf sebelumnya. Akhirnya kami mempersembahkan analisis dari representation terus-menerus yang dipelajari oleh model perhatian keras dan lembut (Bahdanau, 2014) untuk tugas, melemparkan beberapa cahaya pada karakteristik model seperti ekstrakt.', 'ko': '우리는 형태 변화 생성에 사용되는 신경 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 하드 주의 메커니즘을 사용했는데 그 영감은 한 단어의 문자와 그 변화 중의 문자 사이에 통상적으로 존재하는 단조로운 정렬에서 나온다.우리가 이전에 연구한 세 가지 형태의 전환점 생성 데이터 집합에서 이 모델을 평가한 결과 이전의 신경과 비신경 방법에 비해 각종 설정에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 제공했다.마지막으로 우리는 하드 주의 모델과 소프트 주의 모델(Bahdanau, 2014)이 임무에서 배운 연속 표징을 분석하여 이 모델 추출의 특징에 단서를 제공했다.', 'tr': 'Biz morfolojik täsirler üçin näral nusgasyny görkeýäris. Bu nusgasy kyn üns meýdançasyny ulanýar. Bu nusgasy diňe monotoniýa täsirleriň arasynda alýan karakterleriň we karakterleriň a ňsatynda alýar. Biz öňki öňki öňki öňki öňki morpholojik etjegi veri setirlerinde nusgasyny çykýarys we munyň öňki neiral we neural ýakynlaşyk bilen öňki nusgasyna görä sungatyň netijesini düzenleyýändigini görkez. Soňunda biz diýen we ýokary düzümlerniň (Bahdanau, 2014) işiň ünsli nusgalarynyň, şol nusgalaryň çykmasynyň birnäçe ýagtylygyny çykaryp bilen öwrenmeli täsirlerden ybaratdyk.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل عصبی برای نسل تأثیرات مورفولوژیک را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک مکانیسم توجه سخت استفاده می\u200cکند، که توسط تأثیر تقریباً monotonic که معمولاً بین شخصیت\u200cها در یک کلمه و شخصیت\u200cها در تأثیرش الهام می\u200cگیرد. ما مدل را بر سه تنظیم پیش تحقیق کرده\u200cایم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن نتیجه\u200cهای هنری را در مقایسه با نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی و غیر عصبی پیشین به عنوان موضوع مختلف تحقیق می\u200cکند. بالاخره ما یک تحلیل از نمایش\u200cهای دائمی که توسط مدل توجه سخت و نرم (Bahdanau, 2014) برای این کار یاد گرفته\u200cایم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با برخی نور روی ویژه\u200cهای چنین مدل\u200cهای اخراج می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa ubongo wa kizazi cha ushawishi wa kimaadilojia ambacho kinatumia mfumo mkali wa ufuatiliaji, unahamasishwa na ujenzi wa karibu wa kimonotoni mara nyingi unapatikana kati ya wahusika katika neno na wahusika katika ushawishi wake. Tunatathmini mtindo wa mitatu wa kutengeneza taarifa za ubunifu wa kifolojia zilizosomwa kabla na kuonyesha kwamba utaratibu wa matokeo ya sanaa yanatokana na matatizo mbalimbali yanayolinganishwa na mbinu zilizopita za neura na zisizo za kiserikali. Mwisho tunaweka uchambuzi wa maoni yanayoendelea kujifunza na mifano yenye vigumu na nyepesi (Bahdanau, 2014) kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo, kwa kuonyesha nuru juu ya mifano kama hizo zinazotoa.', 'am': 'በቃላት እና በጽሑፎቹ እና በጽሑፎቹ መካከል በተገኘው በአካላት እና በጽሑፎችዋ መካከል በሚገኘው አካላት የሚታወቀውን አካባቢ አካላትን የሚያስፈልጋቸውን የዲሮፖሎጂ ትውልድ ምሳሌ አቆይተናል፡፡ የቀድሞው የሞሮፎሎጂ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ትውልድ መፍጠር ላይ የሦስቱን ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በብርቱ እና ቀላል (ባhdanau, 2014) የሚያስተምሩትን የሥርዓት ዓይነቶች እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons stel 'n neurale model vir morfologiese inflekking generasie wat 'n moeilike aandag mekanisme gebruik, inspireer deur die byna-monotoniese oplyn gewoonlik gevind tussen die karakters in 'n woord en die karakters in sy infleksie. Ons evalueer die model op drie voorheen studieerde morfologiese infleksie generasie datastel en wys dat dit verskaf staat van die kuns resultate in verskillende opstelling in vergelyking met vorige neurale en non- neurale toegang. Eindelik stel ons 'n analiseer van die voortdurende voorstellings wat geleer word deur beide die moeilike en sagte (Bahdanau, 2014) aandagmodele vir die taak, met 'n paar lig op die funksies sodanige modelle uitpak.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model nervor për gjeneratën morfologjike të përdorur një mekanizëm vëmendjeje të fortë, frymëzuar nga renditja pothuajse monotonike e gjetur zakonisht midis karaktereve në një fjalë dhe karaktereve në përdorimin e saj. Ne e vlerësojmë model in në tre grupe të dhënash të gjeneratës së ardhurave morfologjike të studiuara më parë dhe tregojmë se ai ofron rezultate më të larta në struktura të ndryshme krahasuar me qasjet e mëparshme neuronale dhe jo-neuronale. Më në fund ne paraqesim një analizë të përfaqësimeve të vazhdueshme të mësuara si nga modelet e vëmendjes së fortë ashtu edhe të butë (Bahdanau, 2014) për detyrën, duke hedhur disa drita mbi karakteristikat që modelet e tilla nxjerrin.', 'az': 'Biz morfolojik infleksiyon nəsillərinin nöral modelini göstəririk ki, çox çətin təsiri mehanizmasını istifadə edir. Bu, yaxın-monotonik təsiri ilə çox çox olaraq yazılmış karakterlərin arasında bir sözdə və onun təsirlərindəki karakterlərin arasında ilham alır. Biz əvvəl üç dəfə əvvəl çalışmış morfolojik infleksyon nəslindəki veri qurularında modelini değerləşdiririk və bu, əvvəlki nöral və nöral olmayan yaxınlıqların qarşısında, sanat sonuçlarının müxtəlif quruluşlarına müvəffəq etdiyini göstəririk. Sonunda biz bu işin çətin və yumuşaq (Bahdanau, 2014) modellərinin öyrəndiyi sürəkli göstəricilərin analizi göstəririk, bu modellərin çəkilməsi üçün bir neçə işıq çəkiririk.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մորֆոլոգիական ազդեցության սերունդի նյարդային մոդել, որը օգտագործում է ուշադրության բարդ մեխանիզմ, ոգեշնչված գրեթե մոնոտոնիկ ուղղությամբ, որը սովորաբար գտնվում է բառի հերոսների և ազդեցության հերոսների միջև: Մենք գնահատում ենք մոդելը երեք նախկինում ուսումնասիրել մորֆոլոգիական ազդեցության սերունդների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն առաջին արդյունքներ է տալիս տարբեր կառուցվածքների մեջ, համեմատած նախկին նյարդային և ոչ նյարդ Վերջապես մենք ներկայացնում ենք անընդհատ ներկայացումների վերլուծությունը, որը սովորել են այս խնդրի ուշադրության ծանր և փափուկ մոդելների կողմից (Բահդանայու, 2014 թ․-ը), որոշ լույս տալով նման մոդելների հանելու հատկությունների վրա:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিউরুল মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি মার্ফোলজিক প্রভাবের জন্য যা কঠিন মনোযোগ মেকানিজেকে ব্যবস্থা করে, যা প্রায় মনোটোনিক সাধারণত একটি শব্দ এবং তার প্রভাবের চরি আমরা পূর্ববর্তী তিনটি নিউরেল এবং নিউরেল প্রযুক্তির তুলনায় গবেষণা করা মোডেলের মূল্য মূল্যায়ন করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এটি বিভিন্ন শিল্পের ফলাফলের সাথ শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা এই কাজের জন্য মনোযোগ মডেল প্রদান করেছি কঠিন এবং নম্র প্রতিনিধিদের বিশ্লেষণের ব্যাখ্যা করছি, যা কিছু মডেল উৎপাদনের ব্যাপারে শিক', 'ca': "Presentam un model neural per a la generació de inflexió morfològica que utilitza un mecanisme de forta atenció, inspirat per l'alliniament gairebé monotònic que es troba comument entre els caràcters d'una paraula i els caràcters de la seva inflexió. Evaluam el model en tres conjunts de dades de generació de inflexió morfològica estudiats anteriorment i demostrem que proporciona resultats més avançats en diversos configuracions comparats amb abordaments neurològics i no neurològics anteriors. Finalment presentem una an àlisi de les representacions contínues aprengutes tant pels models d'atenció dur com blanc (Bahdanau, 2014) per a la tasca, tirant alguna llum sobre les característiques que aquests models extraeixen.", 'cs': 'Představujeme neuronový model pro generování morfologických inflekcí, který využívá tvrdý mechanismus pozornosti, inspirovaný téměř monotonickým zarovnáním běžně nacházejícím se mezi znaky slova a znaky v jeho inflekci. Model hodnotíme na třech dříve studovaných datových sadách generace morfologických inflekcí a ukazujeme, že poskytuje nejmodernější výsledky v různých nastaveních ve srovnání s předchozími neuronovými a neurálními přístupy. V závěru představujeme analýzu kontinuálních reprezentací, které se naučily jak tvrdé, tak měkké (Bahdanau, 2014) modely pozornosti pro tento úkol, a vrháme světlo na vlastnosti, které tyto modely extrahují.', 'et': 'Esitleme morfoloogilise painde genereerimise neuromudelit, mis kasutab tugevat tähelepanumehhanismi, inspireeritud peaaegu monotoonilisest joondumisest, mida tavaliselt leidub sõna tähemärkide ja selle painde tähemärkide vahel. Me hindame mudelit kolme eelnevalt uuritud morfoloogilise inflektsiooni genereerimise andmekogumi põhjal ja näitame, et see annab kaasaegseid tulemusi erinevates seadistustes võrreldes varasemate neuraalsete ja mittenneuraalsete lähenemisviisidega. Lõpuks esitame analüüsi nii kõva kui pehme tähelepanu mudelite (Bahdanau, 2014) pidevatest representatsioonidest ülesandele, heidates mõningat valgust selliste mudelite omadustele.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo neuralni model za generaciju morfološke inflekcije koji koristi težak mehanizam pažnje, inspirisan skoro monotonskim poravnanjem često pronađenim između likova u riječi i likova njegove inflekcije. Procjenjujemo model na tri prethodno ispitivane datoteke generacije morfološke inflekcije i pokazujemo da pruža stanje umjetnosti rezultate u različitim setovima u usporedbi sa prethodnim neurološkim i neiralnim pristupima. Konačno predstavljamo analizu stalnih predstavljanja naučenih od teških i mekih modela pažnje (Bahdanau, 2014.) za zadatak, uključujući malo svjetla na karakteristike takvih izvlačenja modela.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään morfologisen taipumuksen generoinnin neuromalli, jossa käytetään kovaa huomiomekanismia, joka on innoitettu lähes monotonisesta linjauksesta sanan merkkien ja sen taipumuksen merkkien välillä. Arvioimme mallia kolmella aiemmin tutkitulla morfologisen inflektion generointitietoaineistolla ja osoitamme, että se tuottaa viimeisimpiä tuloksia erilaisissa kokoonpanoissa verrattuna aikaisempiin neuro- ja ei-neuraalisiin lähestymistapoihin. Lopuksi esitämme analyysin sekä hard- että soft-huomiomallien (Bahdanau, 2014) kokemista jatkuvista representaatioista tehtävään ja valotamme näiden mallien ominaisuuksia.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem nêrung kanggo nggawe luwih-luwih anyar tentang karo ingkang ampungan kuwi nggawe manipulan sing dirangkat butaké, ndheke awak dhéwé basa sing katêpakan karo perangkat luwih dumaten Awak dhéwé éntuk model karo telu bagian sing bagian luhur, dadi kapan maning maneh karo ngono kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindakan karo perusahaan sampek karo hal sampek karo hal-sampek karo hal sampek karo hal sampek karo hal-sampek karo hal dadi Lêngé awak dhéwé beraksi barêng-barêng nggawé gerapakan sampeyan karo sistêm lan pakan (bahdan u, 2013) model sing beraksi barêng-barêng kanggo nggawe lanjut cara, dadi jenis-jenis neng sampeyan éwé model sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים מודל עצבי לדור ההשפעה המורפולוגית שמשתמש במנגנון תשומת לב קשה, שמושרר על ידי ההישואה כמעט מונטונית שנמצאה בדרך כלל בין הדמויות במילה והדמויות בהשפעה שלה. אנו מעריכים את המודל על שלושה קבוצות נתונים של דור השפעה מורפולוגית שנלמדו קודם לכן, ומראים שהוא מספק תוצאות המאומנות במערכות שונות בהשוואה לגישויים עצביים ולא עצביים קודמים. סוף סוף אנחנו מציגים ניתוח של היציגות המתמשכות שלמדו על ידי דוגמני תשומת לב הקשה והרכה (Bahdanau, 2014) למשימה, משליך קצת אור על המאפיינים של דוגמנים כאלה חולץ.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nevronski model za generiranje morfoloških infleksij, ki uporablja mehanizem trde pozornosti, ki ga navdihuje skoraj monotonična poravnava med znaki v besedi in znaki v njeni infleksiji. Model smo ocenili na treh predhodno preučevanih podatkovnih naborih generiranja morfoloških infleksij in pokazali, da zagotavlja najsodobnejše rezultate v različnih nastavitvah v primerjavi s prejšnjimi nevralnimi in nevralnimi pristopi. Na koncu predstavljamo analizo kontinuiranih reprezentacij, ki so jih pridobili tako trdi kot mehki modeli pozornosti (Bahdanau, 2014), pri čemer smo osvetlili značilnosti, ki jih ti modeli izvlečejo.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani misali na'urar wa kizafi na mutfologi wanda ke amfani da matsayin muhimmanci mai nau'i, wanda aka yi farin wa juyi-surori na kusa-monotoni ko da yawa a gane a tsakanin misalin maganar da mazaɓa masu cikin fanikinsa. Ana ƙaddara misalin a kan danne-danne da aka karatun mutafalojiki uku a gabãni na karatun a matsayin agofologi na sami kuma za'a nuna cewa ita ga muhimmada na sanar ta ƙara cikin masu tsari dabam-dabam sami da surori na gabanin neural da na-neural. Ga ƙarshe, munã zo da anayyar masu ƙaranci da aka sanar da su masu nau'i da masu nau'i (Bahadanau, 2014) wa aikin, kuma tuna wani haske a kan misãlai masu samun wannan.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་ནི་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད་པ་ཅིག་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཐ ང་ཚོས་འདིའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྔོན་གྱི་བརྗོད་བྱས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་བསྒྲགས་དང་འཆར་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་ཚོགས་ལ་མཐུན་རྣམ་གནས མཐའ་མ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་མྱུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ལས་མཐུན་ནུས་མེད་པའི་མིང'}
{'en': 'From Characters to Words to in Between : Do We Capture Morphology?', 'es': 'De los personajes a las palabras y entre medias: ¿capturamos la morfología?', 'ar': 'من الشخصيات إلى الكلمات إلى ما بينهما: هل نلتقط علم التشكل؟', 'pt': 'Dos caracteres às palavras e ao meio: capturamos a morfologia?', 'fr': 'Des personnages aux mots et entre les deux\xa0: saisissons-nous la morphologie\xa0?', 'zh': '自符至单词,介于二者之间,可得形态学否?', 'ru': 'От символов к словам и между ними: захватываем ли мы морфологию?', 'ja': 'キャラクターから言葉まで、その中間にあるもの：私たちは形態学を捉えていますか？', 'hi': 'वर्णों से शब्दों के बीच में: क्या हम आकृति विज्ञान पर कब्जा करते हैं?', 'ga': 'Ó Charachtair go Focail go dtí Idir eatarthu: An Gabhaimid Moirfeolaíocht?', 'el': 'Από τους χαρακτήρες στις λέξεις στο ενδιάμεσο: Συλλαμβάνουμε τη Μορφολογία;', 'ka': 'სიმბოლოებიდან სიმბოლოებიდან შორის: ჩვენ მოტარებთ მოპოლოგია?', 'hu': 'A karakterektől a szavakig a közötti időkig: Megragadjuk a morfológiát?', 'it': 'Dai personaggi alle parole fino al mezzo: Catturiamo la morfologia?', 'kk': 'Таңбалардан сөздер арасында: Морфологияны түсіріп береміз бе?', 'lt': 'From Characters to Words to in Between: Do We Capture Morphology?', 'mk': 'From Characters to Words to in Between: Do We Capture Morphology?', 'ms': 'Dari Aksara ke Perkataan ke Antara: Adakah kita menangkap Morfologi?', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളജിയെ പിടികൂടുമോ?', 'mt': 'From Characters to Words to in Between: Do We Capture Morphology?', 'no': 'Fra teikn til ord til mellom: Mottar vi morfologi?', 'pl': 'Od postaci do słów do pomiędzy: Czy uchwycimy morfologię?', 'mn': 'Үлгэрээс үг хүртэл хоорондоо: Бид морфологийг авах уу?', 'ro': 'De la personaje la cuvinte la între ele: Capturăm morfologia?', 'sr': 'Od karaktera do reči između:', 'si': 'අක්ෂර වචනයෙන් වචනයෙන් අතර: අපි මොර්ෆෝලෝජියාව අල්ලගන්නවද?', 'so': 'Kana yimaada xaraf ilaa hadal dhexe: Miyaannu qabsanaynaa Morphology?', 'ta': 'எழுத்துக்களிலிருந்து வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையேயுள்ள சொல்லுக்கு வரை: நாம் மாற்றுதலை பிடி', 'sv': 'Från tecken till ord till emellan: Fånga vi morfologi?', 'ur': 'اثر سے کلمات کے درمیان تک: کیا ہم Morphology کو پکڑتے ہیں؟', 'uz': 'Biz Morfologni qabul qilamizmi?', 'vi': 'Từ ký tự đến từ Giữa: Bắt Morphology phải không?', 'bg': 'От герои до думи и между тях: Улавяме ли морфологията?', 'hr': 'Od znakova do riječi između:', 'nl': 'Van personages tot woorden tot tussendoor: vangen we morfologie vast?', 'ko': '문자에서 단어에 이르기까지 중간에 이르기까지: 우리는 형태학을 포착할 수 있습니까?', 'fa': 'از karakters to words in between: Do we capture Morphology?', 'da': 'Fra tegn til ord til mellem: Får vi Morfologi?', 'de': 'Von Charakteren über Worte bis hin zu dazwischen: Erfassen wir Morphologie?', 'id': 'Dari karakter ke kata-kata ke antara: Apakah kita menangkap morfologi?', 'tr': 'Karakterlerden sözler aralygyna çevrilýär: Morfologiýany yakalarmy?', 'sq': 'Nga karakteret në fjalët në mes: A kapim morfologjinë?', 'af': 'Van Karakters na Woorde tot tussen: Het ons Morfologie aanvang?', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք մենք բռնում ենք մորֆոլոգիան:', 'az': 'Karakterl톛rd톛n v톛 S칬zl톛rd톛n aralar캼nda: Morfolojiyi yaxalay캼q?', 'sw': 'Kutoka Character mpaka Word Katika: Je, tunakamata Morphology?', 'bn': 'অক্ষর থেকে শব্দ পর্যন্ত: আমরা কি মরোফোলজিকে গ্রেফতার করব?', 'ca': 'Des de Caracters a Paroles fins a Entre: Captem la morfologia?', 'am': 'ከ ፊደል ወደ ቃላት እስከ መካከለኛው ቃላት ድረስ። መርፎሎጂን እንያዝናለን?', 'cs': 'Od postav přes slova do mezi: Zachytíme morfologii?', 'fi': 'Hahmoista sanoihin ja niiden väliin: kaappaammeko morfologiaa?', 'bs': 'Od znakova do riječi između:', 'et': 'Märkidest sõnadeni vahepeal: Kas me jäädvustame morfoloogia?', 'ha': 'From Character to word between: Shin zã Mu kãma Mafology?', 'he': 'מהאותים למילים עד בין: האם אנחנו לוקחים מורפולוגיה?', 'jv': 'Karakter-Karakter yo nganggo Kemerdekaan Anyar: Opo Kemerdekaan Marphologi ?', 'sk': 'Od znakov do besed in vmes: Ali ujamemo morfologijo?', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་ལས་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའང་ལ་བར་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་མཚོན་རྟགས་པར་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་སམ'}
{'en': 'Words can be represented by composing the representations of subword units such as word segments, characters, and/or character n-grams. While such representations are effective and may capture the morphological regularities of words, they have not been systematically compared, and it is not understood how they interact with different morphological typologies. On a language modeling task, we present experiments that systematically vary (1) the basic unit of representation, (2) the composition of these representations, and (3) the morphological typology of the language modeled. Our results extend previous findings that character representations are effective across typologies, and we find that a previously unstudied combination of character trigram representations composed with bi-LSTMs outperforms most others. But we also find room for improvement : none of the character-level models match the predictive accuracy of a model with access to true morphological analyses, even when learned from an order of magnitude more data.', 'ar': 'يمكن تمثيل الكلمات من خلال تكوين تمثيلات وحدات الكلمات الفرعية مثل مقاطع الكلمات والأحرف و / أو الأحرف n-grams. في حين أن مثل هذه التمثيلات فعالة وقد تلتقط الانتظام المورفولوجي للكلمات ، إلا أنه لم تتم مقارنتها بشكل منهجي ، ولا يُفهم كيف تتفاعل مع الأنماط المورفولوجية المختلفة. في مهمة نمذجة اللغة ، نقدم تجارب تختلف بشكل منهجي (1) وحدة التمثيل الأساسية ، (2) تكوين هذه التمثيلات ، و (3) التصنيف الصرفي للغة النموذجية. توسع نتائجنا النتائج السابقة التي تفيد بأن تمثيلات الشخصيات فعالة عبر الأنماط ، ووجدنا أن مجموعة غير مدروسة سابقًا من تمثيلات الأحرف ثلاثية الأبعاد المكونة من LSTMs تتفوق على معظم الآخرين. لكننا نجد أيضًا مجالًا للتحسين: لا يتطابق أي من النماذج على مستوى الشخصية مع الدقة التنبؤية لنموذج ما مع إمكانية الوصول إلى التحليلات المورفولوجية الحقيقية ، حتى عندما يتم تعلم المزيد من البيانات بترتيب من حيث الحجم.', 'fr': "Les mots peuvent être représentés en composant les représentations d'unités de sous-mots telles que des segments de mots, des caractères et/ou des n-grammes de caractères. Bien que de telles représentations soient efficaces et puissent saisir les régularités morphologiques des mots, elles n'ont pas été systématiquement comparées et on ne comprend pas comment elles interagissent avec les différentes typologies morphologiques. Dans une tâche de modélisation du langage, nous présentons des expériences qui font varier systématiquement (1) l'unité de représentation de base, (2) la composition de ces représentations et (3) la typologie morphologique du langage modélisé. Nos résultats élargissent les conclusions précédentes selon lesquelles les représentations de caractères sont efficaces dans toutes les typologies, et nous trouvons qu'une combinaison non étudiée auparavant de représentations de trigrammes de caractères composées de Bi-LSTM surpasse la plupart des autres. Mais nous trouvons également des possibilités d'amélioration\xa0: aucun des modèles au niveau des caractères ne correspond à la précision prédictive d'un modèle ayant accès à de véritables analyses morphologiques, même lorsqu'il est appris à partir de données d'un ordre de grandeur supérieur.", 'pt': 'As palavras podem ser representadas compondo as representações de unidades de subpalavras, como segmentos de palavras, caracteres e/ou n-gramas de caracteres. Embora tais representações sejam eficazes e possam capturar as regularidades morfológicas das palavras, elas não foram sistematicamente comparadas, e não se entende como elas interagem com diferentes tipologias morfológicas. Em uma tarefa de modelagem de linguagem, apresentamos experimentos que variam sistematicamente (1) a unidade básica de representação, (2) a composição dessas representações e (3) a tipologia morfológica da linguagem modelada. Nossos resultados estendem descobertas anteriores de que as representações de caracteres são eficazes em todas as tipologias, e descobrimos que uma combinação anteriormente não estudada de representações de trigramas de caracteres compostas com bi-LSTMs supera a maioria das outras. Mas também encontramos espaço para melhorias: nenhum dos modelos de nível de caractere corresponde à precisão preditiva de um modelo com acesso a análises morfológicas verdadeiras, mesmo quando aprendidas com uma ordem de magnitude maior de dados.', 'es': 'Las palabras se pueden representar mediante la composición de las representaciones de unidades de subpalabras, tales como segmentos de palabras, caracteres y/o n-gramas de caracteres. Si bien estas representaciones son eficaces y pueden captar las regularidades morfológicas de las palabras, no se han comparado sistemáticamente y no se entiende cómo interactúan con diferentes tipologías morfológicas. En una tarea de modelado del lenguaje, presentamos experimentos que varían sistemáticamente (1) la unidad básica de representación, (2) la composición de estas representaciones y (3) la tipología morfológica del lenguaje modelado. Nuestros resultados amplían los hallazgos anteriores de que las representaciones de caracteres son efectivas en todas las tipologías, y encontramos que una combinación no estudiada previamente de representaciones de trigramas de caracteres compuestas con BI-LSTM supera a la mayoría de las demás. Pero también encontramos margen de mejora: ninguno de los modelos a nivel de caracteres coincide con la precisión predictiva de un modelo con acceso a análisis morfológicos verdaderos, incluso cuando se aprenden de un orden de magnitud más datos.', 'ja': '単語は、単語セグメント、文字、及び／または文字ｎグラム等のサブワード単位の表現を構成することによって表現することができる。 そのような表現は効果的であり、単語の形態的規則性を捉え得るが、それらは体系的に比較されておらず、それらが異なる形態学的類型とどのように相互作用するかは理解されていない。 言語モデリングタスクでは、(1)表現の基本的な単位、(2)これらの表現の構成、(3)モデル化された言語の形態学的類型論を体系的に変化させる実験を提示する。 私たちの結果は、文字表現がタイプにわたって効果的であるという以前の知見を拡張し、バイ- LSTMで構成された文字トリグラム表現の以前に研究されていない組み合わせが、ほとんどの他のものよりも優れていることを発見しました。 しかし、私たちは改善の余地も見出しています。文字レベルのモデルのいずれも、実際の形態分析にアクセスできるモデルの予測精度と一致するものではありません。たとえ、より多くのデータの桁数から学習したとしてもです。', 'hi': 'शब्दों को शब्द खंडों, वर्णों और / या चरित्र n-ग्राम जैसे उप-शब्द इकाइयों के प्रतिनिधित्व की रचना करके दर्शाया जा सकता है। जबकि इस तरह के अभ्यावेदन प्रभावी हैं और शब्दों की रूपात्मक नियमितताओं को कैप्चर कर सकते हैं, उनकी व्यवस्थित रूप से तुलना नहीं की गई है, और यह समझ में नहीं आता है कि वे विभिन्न रूपात्मक टाइपोलॉजी के साथ कैसे बातचीत करते हैं। एक भाषा मॉडलिंग कार्य पर, हम उन प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो व्यवस्थित रूप से भिन्न होते हैं (1) प्रतिनिधित्व की मूल इकाई, (2) इन अभ्यावेदनों की संरचना, और (3) मॉडलिंग की गई भाषा की रूपात्मक टाइपोलॉजी। हमारे परिणाम पिछले निष्कर्षों का विस्तार करते हैं कि चरित्र प्रतिनिधित्व टाइपोलॉजी में प्रभावी होते हैं, और हम पाते हैं कि द्वि-एलएसटीएम के साथ बने चरित्र ट्राइग्राम अभ्यावेदन का पहले से अध्ययन न किया गया संयोजन अधिकांश अन्य लोगों को मात देता है। लेकिन हम सुधार के लिए भी जगह पाते हैं: चरित्र-स्तर के मॉडल में से कोई भी सच्चे रूपात्मक विश्लेषण तक पहुंच के साथ एक मॉडल की भविष्यवाणी सटीकता से मेल नहीं खाता है, भले ही परिमाण अधिक डेटा के आदेश से सीखा हो।', 'zh': '单词可以成子单词位(如词段、字符、/符 n-gram)也。 虽然,可得单词之道,未得其系统地,不知其所以异形也。 言建模事,举系统地变(1)之大端,(2)成形,与(3)建模言之实验。 前验之,则字符效于类型学,且见前所未究者,双LSTM三元组,优于多也。 然吾亦见其间:无一准确性之比,虽从数量级以上之学亦然。', 'ru': 'Слова могут быть представлены составлением представлений подсловов, таких как сегменты слов, символы и/или n-граммы символов. Хотя такие представления являются эффективными и могут отражать морфологические закономерности слов, они не сравнивались систематически, и не понятно, как они взаимодействуют с различными морфологическими типологиями. На задаче языкового моделирования мы представляем эксперименты, которые систематически изменяют (1) основную единицу представления, (2) состав этих представлений и (3) морфологическую типологию моделируемого языка. Наши результаты дополняют предыдущие выводы о том, что представления символов эффективны во всех типологиях, и мы обнаружили, что ранее не изученная комбинация представлений триграмм символов, состоящая из би-LSTM, превосходит большинство других. Но мы также находим возможности для улучшения: ни одна из моделей на уровне персонажей не соответствует прогностической точности модели с доступом к истинным морфологическим анализам, даже если они извлечены из на порядок больше данных.', 'ga': 'Is féidir focail a léiriú trí léiriú na n-aonad fofhocail a chumadh mar mhíreanna focal, carachtair, agus/nó carachtar n-gram. Cé go bhfuil léirithe den sórt sin éifeachtach agus go bhféadfadh siad rialtacht moirfeolaíoch na bhfocal a ghabháil, níor cuireadh i gcomparáid go córasach iad, agus ní thuigtear conas a idirghníomhaíonn siad le tíopeolaíochtaí moirfeolaíocha éagsúla. Ar thasc samhaltaithe teanga, cuirimid turgnaimh i láthair a athraíonn go córasach (1) bunaonad na hionadaíochta, (2) comhdhéanamh na léiriú sin, agus (3) tíopeolaíocht mhoirfeolaíoch na teanga arna múnlú. Síneann ár dtorthaí ar thorthaí roimhe seo go bhfuil éifeacht ag léiriúcháin charachtair ar fud na tíopeolaíochtaí, agus feicimid go sáraíonn teaglaim de léirithe trigram carachtar comhdhéanta le dé-LSTManna nach ndearnadh staidéar orthu roimhe seo an chuid is mó de na cinn eile. Ach feicimid go bhfuil deis ann feabhsú freisin: ní mheaitseálann aon cheann de na samhlacha ar leibhéal na gcarachtar cruinneas réamh-mheasta na samhla le rochtain ar fhíor-anailísí moirfeolaíocha, fiú nuair a fhoghlaimítear ó ord méide níos mó sonraí.', 'hu': 'A szavakat az alszóegységek, például szószegmensek, karakterek és/vagy karakterek n-grammok ábrázolásával lehet képviselni. Bár az ilyen reprezentációk hatékonyak és megragadhatják a szavak morfológiai rendszerességét, azokat nem hasonlították össze szisztematikusan, és nem érthető, hogyan kölcsönhatásba lépnek a különböző morfológiai tipológiákkal. Egy nyelvmodellezési feladat során olyan kísérleteket mutatunk be, amelyek szisztematikusan változtatják (1) a reprezentáció alapvető egységét, (2) ezen reprezentációk összetételét és (3) a modellezett nyelv morfológiai tipológiáját. Eredményeink kiterjesztik a korábbi megállapításokat, miszerint a karakterek reprezentációi minden tipológiában hatékonyak, és azt találjuk, hogy a bi-LSTMs-ekkel összeállított karakter trigram reprezentációk korábban nem tanulmányozott kombinációja felülmúlja a legtöbb mást. De van hely a fejlődésre is: egyik karakterszintű modell sem felel meg a valódi morfológiai elemzésekhez való hozzáféréssel rendelkező modell prediktív pontosságának, még akkor sem, ha egy nagyságrendből több adatot tanultunk.', 'ka': 'სიტყვები შეიძლება გამოყენება, როგორც სიტყვები, სიტყვები და/ან სიტყვები n-გრამის გამოყენებების გამოყენებით. თუმცა ასეთი გამოსახულებები ეფექტიურია და შეიძლება მოპოროლოგიური სიტყვების რეგულაციას გააკეთოთ, ისინი სისტემატიკურად არ შემდგომარებულია, და არ უცნობს თუ როგორ ის ენის მოდელური რაოდენობაზე, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც სისტემატიკურად განსხვავებულია (1) განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ერთეულება, (2) ამ გამოსახულებების კომპოზეცია, და ჩვენი წინა შედეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შესაძლებლობა, რომ სიმბოლოგიები ტიპოლოგიებში ეფექტიურია, და ჩვენ ვიღებთ, რომ წინა არასწორებული სიმბოლოგიების კომბუნიაცია სიმბოლოგიების რ მაგრამ ჩვენ შეიძლება უფრო მეტირებისთვის ადგილი დავიყენებთ: არაფერი სიმბოლოგიური მოდელის მოდელის წარმოდგენებელი მართლაც მოდელის წარმოდგენებელი მართლა მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზების', 'el': 'Οι λέξεις μπορούν να αναπαριστούν με τη σύνθεση των αναπαραστάσεων των μονάδων υπολέξεων, όπως τμήματα λέξεων, χαρακτήρες ή/και γραμμάτια χαρακτήρων. Ενώ τέτοιες αναπαραστάσεις είναι αποτελεσματικές και μπορεί να αποτυπώσουν τις μορφολογικές κανονικότητες των λέξεων, δεν έχουν συγκριθεί συστηματικά και δεν είναι κατανοητό πώς αλληλεπιδρούν με διαφορετικές μορφολογικές τυπολογίες. Σε μια εργασία γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης, παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα που διαφοροποιούν συστηματικά (1) τη βασική μονάδα αναπαράστασης, (2) τη σύνθεση αυτών των αναπαραστάσεων και (3) τη μορφολογική τυπολογία της μοντελοποιημένης γλώσσας. Τα αποτελέσματά μας επεκτείνουν τα προηγούμενα ευρήματα ότι οι αναπαραστάσεις χαρακτήρων είναι αποτελεσματικές σε όλες τις τυπολογίες, και διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένας προηγουμένως μη μελετημένος συνδυασμός αναπαραστάσεων τριγραμμάτων χαρακτήρων που αποτελούνται από δι-LSTMs ξεπερνά τις περισσότερες άλλες. Αλλά επίσης βρίσκουμε περιθώρια βελτίωσης: κανένα από τα μοντέλα σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων δεν ταιριάζει με την προγνωστική ακρίβεια ενός μοντέλου με πρόσβαση σε πραγματικές μορφολογικές αναλύσεις, ακόμα και όταν μαθαίνονται από μια σειρά μεγέθους περισσότερα δεδομένα.', 'it': "Le parole possono essere rappresentate componendo le rappresentazioni di unità sottoparole come segmenti di parole, caratteri e/o caratteri n-grammi. Sebbene tali rappresentazioni siano efficaci e possano catturare le regolarità morfologiche delle parole, non sono state sistematicamente confrontate e non si capisce come interagiscono con diverse tipologie morfologiche. In un compito di modellazione linguistica, presentiamo esperimenti che variano sistematicamente (1) l'unità di rappresentazione di base, (2) la composizione di queste rappresentazioni e (3) la tipologia morfologica del linguaggio modellato. I nostri risultati estendono le precedenti scoperte che le rappresentazioni dei caratteri sono efficaci in tutte le tipologie, e troviamo che una combinazione precedentemente non studiata di rappresentazioni dei trigrammi dei caratteri composta da bi-LSTMs supera la maggior parte degli altri. Ma c'è anche spazio per migliorare: nessuno dei modelli a livello di carattere corrisponde alla precisione predittiva di un modello con accesso a vere analisi morfologiche, anche se appreso da un ordine di grandezza più dati.", 'lt': 'žodžiai gali būti atstovaujami komponuojant paražodžių vienetų, pavyzdžiui, žodžių segmentų, simbolių ir (arba) n-gramų simbolių, pavyzdžius. Nors tokios nuorodos yra veiksmingos ir gali atspindėti žodžių morfologinį reguliarumą, jos nebuvo sistemingai lyginamos ir nėra suprantama, kaip jos sąveikauja su skirtingomis morfologinėmis tipologijomis. On a language modeling task, we present experiments that systematically vary (1) the basic unit of representation, (2) the composition of these representations, and (3) the morphological typology of the language modeled.  Mūsų rezultatai apima ankstesnes išvadas, kad charakterių atspaudimai yra veiksmingi įvairiose tipologijose, ir mes matome, kad anksčiau neištirtas trigram ų atspaudų derinys, sudarytas iš dviejų LSTM charakterių atspaudų, yra didesnis už daugumą kitų. Tačiau mes taip pat randame galimybę tobulinti: nė vienas iš simbolio lygio modelių neatitinka modelio nuspėjamojo tikslumo ir prieigos prie tikrų morfologinių analizių, net jei iš dydžio eilės mokomi daugiau duomenų.', 'mk': 'Зборовите можат да бидат претставени со составување на претставувањата на подзборни единици како што се зборни сегменти, знаци и/или знаци n-грами. Иако ваквите претставувања се ефикасни и можат да ги фатат морфолошките регуларности на зборовите, тие не се систематски споредени, и не се разбира како тие влијаат со различни морфолошки типологии. Во врска со задачата за моделирање на јазикот, претставуваме експерименти кои систематски се разликуваат (1) основната единица на претставување, (2) композицијата на овие претставувања, и (3) морфолошката типологија на моделираниот јазик. Нашите резултати ги прошируваат претходните откритија дека претставувањата на карактерите се ефикасни во текот на типологиите, и откриваме дека претходно неиспитаната комбинација на претставувањата на триграми на карактери составена од биЛСТМ е поголема од другите Но, исто така, најдовме место за подобрување: ниеден од моделите на ниво на карактер не се совпаѓа со предвидувачката точност на моделот со пристап до вистински морфолошки анализи, дури и кога се научи од редот на големина повеќе податоци.', 'ms': 'Kata boleh diwakili dengan mengkomposisi perwakilan unit subkata seperti segmen perkataan, aksara, dan/atau aksara n-gram. Walaupun perwakilan seperti ini berkesan dan mungkin menangkap regularitas morfologi perkataan, ia tidak secara sistematik dibandingkan, dan ia tidak memahami bagaimana mereka berinteraksi dengan tipologi morfologi yang berbeza. Dalam tugas pemodelan bahasa, kami mempersembahkan eksperimen yang secara sistematik berbeza (1) unit asas perwakilan, (2) komposisi perwakilan ini, dan (3) tipologi morfologi bahasa yang dipodelkan. Hasil kami memperluas penemuan terdahulu bahawa perwakilan aksara berkesan melalui tipologi, dan kami mendapati bahawa kombinasi trigram aksara yang belum diuji sebelumnya berkomposisi dengan bi-LSTMs melampaui kebanyakan yang lain. Tetapi kita juga mencari ruang untuk peningkatan: tiada model aras-aksara yang sepadan dengan ketepatan prediksi model dengan akses kepada analisis morfologi sebenar, walaupun bila belajar dari tertib besar data lebih.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді n- граммдар секілді сөздер, таңбалар және/немесе таңбалар бірліктерін құруға болады. Бұл кеңейтулер еффективті және сөздердің морфологиялық үлгіліктерін түсіндіре алады, олар жүйелік түрде салыстырылмаған, және олар әртүрлі морфологиялық тифологиялармен қалай қатынас Тілдерді моделдеу тапсырмасында, жүйелік түрлендіруді (1) түрлендірудің негізгі бірлігін (2) түрлендіруді (3) жүйелік түрлендіруді (3) көрсетеді. Біздің нәтижелеріміздің алдыңғы таңбалардың таңбаларының тифологияларында әсер ететін таңбаларын кеңейтуге болады. Біз алдыңғы таңбалардың триграммасының біріктірілмеген таңбалардың біріктірім Бірақ біз сондай-ақ жақсарту үшін орын табыламыз: таңбаның деңгейіндегі үлгілерінің бір деңгейіндегі үлгісінің дұрыстығын шын морфологиялық анализацияларына қатынау үшін, сондай-а', 'mt': 'Il-kliem jistgħu jiġu rrappreżentati billi jiġu komposti r-rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ unitajiet ta’ sottokliem bħal segmenti ta’ kliem, karattri, u/jew karattru n-grammi. Filwaqt li rappreżentazzjonijiet bħal dawn huma effettivi u jistgħu jaqbdu r-regolaritajiet morfoloġiċi tal-kliem, ma tqabblux b’mod sistematiku, u mhuwiex mifhum kif dawn jinteraġixxu ma’ tipi morfoloġiċi differenti. Dwar kompitu ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi, qed nippreżentaw esperimenti li jvarjaw sistematikament (1) l-unit à bażika tar-rappreżentanza, (2) il-kompożizzjoni ta’ dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet, u (3) it-tipoloġija morfoloġika tal-lingwa mudellata. Ir-riżultati tagħna jestendu s-sejbiet preċedenti li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-karattri huma effettivi fit-tipoloġiji kollha, u nstabu li kombinazzjoni preċedentement mhux studjata ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-trigrammi tal-karattri magħmula minn bi-LSTMs tirriżulta fil-bi ċċa l-kbira l-oħra. Iżda nsibu wkoll lok għal titjib: l-ebda wieħed mill-mudelli fil-livell tal-karattru ma jaqbel mal-preċiżjoni prevedibbli ta’ mudell b’a ċċess għal analiżi morfoloġika vera, anke meta jitgħallmu minn ordni ta’ daqs aktar dejta.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d, അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d n- ഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d സബ്വോര്\u200dഡ് യൂണിറ്റുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധി ഇത്തരം പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമായിരിക്കുമ്പോഴും വാക്കുകളുടെ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാന്\u200d സാധ്യമായിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവര്\u200d സ്വാ ഭാഷയുടെ മാതൃകയുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d നാം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. (1) സ്ഥിരമായി പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ യൂണിറ്റിനെ വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്ക നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന കണ്ടുപിടികങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു ടൈപ്പോളജികളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മുമ് എന്നാലും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടത്തിനുള്ള മുറിവുകളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക പരിശോധനത്തോടും ഒരു മാതൃകയിലും പ', 'pl': 'Słowa mogą być reprezentowane przez składanie reprezentacji jednostek podsłów, takich jak segmenty słów, znaki i/lub n-gramy znaków. Chociaż takie reprezentacje są skuteczne i mogą uchwycić prawidłowość morfologiczną słów, nie zostały one systematycznie porównywane i nie jest zrozumiane, w jaki sposób wchodzą one w interakcje z różnymi typologiami morfologicznymi. Na zadaniu modelowania językowego przedstawiamy eksperymenty, które systematycznie różnią (1) podstawową jednostkę reprezentacji, (2) skład tych reprezentacji oraz (3) typologię morfologiczną modelowanego języka. Nasze wyniki rozszerzają wcześniejsze ustalenia, że reprezentacje znaków są skuteczne w różnych typologiach i okazują się, że niezbadana wcześniej kombinacja reprezentacji trygramów znaków skomponowana z bi-LSTMs przewyższa większość innych. Ale znajdujemy również miejsce do poprawy: żaden z modeli na poziomie charakteru nie odpowiada dokładności predykcyjnej modelu z dostępem do prawdziwych analiz morfologicznych, nawet jeśli nauczymy się z rzędu wielkości więcej danych.', 'mn': 'Үг нь n-грамм үг, дүрсийг бий болгоход илэрхийлж болно. Ийм төрлийн үзүүлэлт нь үр дүнтэй боловч үгний морфологик байдлыг ойлгох боломжтой ч тэд систематикийн харьцуулагдаагүй. Тэд өөр өөр морфологик типтологиудтай хэрхэн харилцаж байгааг ойлгохгүй. Холын загварын даалгаврын тулд бид систематикийн хувьд өөрчлөгдсөн туршилтуудыг (1) харуулах үндсэн нэгж, (2) эдгээр загварын бүтэц болон (3) хэл загварчлагдсан морфологик типтологийг харуулдаг. Бидний үр дүнд харьцаа дүрслэлүүд нь бичил судлаачид үр дүнтэй гэдгийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид өмнө нь бичил судлаачид бичил хэмжээний триграмм дүрслэлүүд нь ихэнх нь илүү үр дүнтэй. Гэхдээ бид бас сайжруулах зай олж байна: харин дүрслэлийн загварын хэмжээний загварын тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Гэхдээ хэдий ч их тодорхойлолтой мэдээллээс сурсан ч гэсэн.', 'no': 'Ord kan representerast ved å skriva inn representasjonane av underordeiningar som ordsegment, teikn og/eller teikn n-gram. Selv om slike representasjonar er effektiv og kan henta morfologiske regularisitet av ord, har dei ikkje blitt systematisk samanlikna, og det er ikkje forstått korleis dei samanliknar med ulike morfologiske typologiar. På eit språk-modelleringsoppgåve presenterer vi eksperimenter som systematisk varierer (1) den grunnleggjande representasjonseininga, (2) samlinga av desse representasjonane, og (3) den morfologiske typologien av språket modelert. Resultatet våre utvidar førre oppdagingar som teikn er effektiv over typologiar, og vi finn at eit førre ikkje-utvald kombinasjon av teikn-trigramrepresentasjonar som er saman med bi-LSTMs utfører dei fleste andre. Men vi finn også rom for forbedringar: ingen av teiknvolvmodelane passar med den foregåande nøyaktigheten av eit modell med tilgang til sanne morfologiske analyser, selv når det lærte frå ein rekkefølge av størrelsesdata.', 'ro': 'Cuvintele pot fi reprezentate prin compunerea reprezentărilor unităților subcuvintelor, cum ar fi segmente de cuvinte, caractere și/sau caractere n-grame. Deși astfel de reprezentări sunt eficiente și pot capta regularitățile morfologice ale cuvintelor, ele nu au fost comparate sistematic și nu se înțelege cum interacționează cu diferite tipologii morfologice. În cadrul unei sarcini de modelare a limbii, prezentăm experimente care variază sistematic (1) unitatea de bază a reprezentării, (2) compoziția acestor reprezentări și (3) tipologia morfologică a limbii modelate. Rezultatele noastre extind constatările anterioare că reprezentările caracterelor sunt eficiente în toate tipologiile și constatăm că o combinație nestudiată anterior de reprezentări trigrame compuse cu bi-LSTMs depășește majoritatea celorlalte. Dar găsim și loc de îmbunătățire: niciunul dintre modelele de nivel de caracter nu corespunde acurateții predictive a unui model cu acces la analize morfologice adevărate, chiar și atunci când se învață dintr-un ordin de mărime mai multe date.', 'sr': 'Rijeèi se mogu predstavljati sastavljajuæi predstave podrijeènih jedinica kao što su reèi segmenti, karakteri i/ili karakteri n-grami. Iako su takve predstave efikasne i mogu uhvatiti morfološku regularnost rijeèi, nisu bile sistematski uspoređene, i ne shvata kako se mijenjaju sa različitim morfološkim tipologijama. Na zadatku modeliranja jezika, predstavljamo eksperimente koje sistematski razlikuju (1) osnovnu jedinicu predstavljanja, 2) sastavu ovih predstavljanja, i (3) morfološku tipologiju jezika modeliranog. Naši rezultati proširuju prethodne nalaze da su predstave karaktera efikasne u širom tipologija, a mi smatramo da prethodno neopredviđena kombinacija predstavljanja trigrama karaktera sastavljenih sa bi-LSTMs iznosi većinu drugih. Ali takođe pronalazimo mesta za poboljšanje: nijedan od model a na nivou karaktera ne odgovara predviđenoj tačnosti modela sa pristupom pravim morfološkim analizama, čak i kad je naučio iz reda velikosti više podataka.', 'si': 'වචන් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් සබ්වර්ඩ් යුනිකයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය සඳහා වචනය, අක්ෂර, සහ/නැත්තර n-ග්\u200dරෑම ඒ වගේම මෙහෙම ප්\u200dරතිරූපණය ප්\u200dරභාවිත වෙන්නේ සහ වචන වර්තනයේ මොර්ෆෝලෝජික සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන්, ඔවුන භාෂාව මඩෝලින් වැඩක් වලින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් (1) පද්ධතියෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් යුනිටික්, (2) මේ ප්\u200dරතිනි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂ විදිහට පරිස්සම් කරනවා කියලා, අපි හොයාගන්නවා මුලින්ම ප්\u200dර නමුත් අපි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසය සඳහා කාමරය හොයාගන්නේ නෑ: කිසිම අක්ෂර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් මොඩේල් එක්ක අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන්න පුළ', 'sv': 'Ord kan representeras genom att komponera representationer av underordsenheter såsom ordsegment, tecken och/eller tecken n-gram. Även om sådana representationer är effektiva och kan fånga ordens morfologiska regelbundenhet har de inte jämförts systematiskt, och det är inte förstått hur de interagerar med olika morfologiska typologier. På en språkmodelleringsuppgift presenterar vi experiment som systematiskt varierar (1) den grundläggande representationsenheten, (2) sammansättningen av dessa representationer och (3) den morfologiska typologin av det modellerade språket. Våra resultat utökar tidigare fynd att karaktärsrepresentationer är effektiva över olika typologier, och vi finner att en tidigare icke studerad kombination av karaktärstrigramrepresentationer sammansatt med bi-LSTMs överträffar de flesta andra. Men vi finner också utrymme för förbättringar: ingen av modellerna på karaktärsnivå matchar en modells prediktiva noggrannhet med tillgång till riktiga morfologiska analyser, även om de lärs från en storleksordning mer data.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை துணை பகுதிகள், எழுத்துக்கள், மற்றும்/அல்லது எழுத்து n- கிராம்கள் போன்ற துணை சொல்லு அலகுகளின் குறிப்பிடுகளை உர இவ்வாறு குறிப்புகள் செயல்படுகின்றன மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளின் மொத்த விதிமுறைகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்ளலாம், அவர்கள் கணினியில் ஒப்பிடுக்கப்படவி மொழி வடிவமைப்பு பணியில் நாம் முறைமையாக மாறியுள்ள பரிசோதனைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் ( 1) குறிப்பிட்ட அடிப்படை அலகு (2) இந்த குறிப்பிடுகளின் அமைப்பு, ம முந்தைய கண்டுபிடிப்புகளின் முடிவுகள் அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, எழுத்துக்குறிப்புகள் வகைகளில் முழுவதும் செயல்படுகிறது, முந்தைய முடியாத எழுத் ஆனால் முன்னேற்றத்திற்கான இடத்தை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும்: எந்த எழுத்து மட்டத்தின் மாதிரிகளும் ஒரு மாதிரியின் முன்னோட்டத்திற்கு ஒத்', 'ur': 'Words can be represented by composing the representations of subword units such as word segments, characters, and/or character n-grams. اگرچہ ایسے نمونات اثر ہیں اور کلمات کے موجود قانون کو پکڑ سکتے ہیں، ان کو سیستماتیک طور پر مقایسہ نہیں کیا گیا ہے، اور یہ سمجھ نہیں سکتے کہ وہ مختلف موجود ٹیپولوژی کے ساتھ کس طرح تعامل کرتے ہیں. ایک زبان موڈلینگ کام پر ہم تجربے پیش کرتے ہیں جو سیستماتیک طور پر تغییر کرتے ہیں (1) نمایش کی بنیادی یونیٹ (2) ان نمایش کی پیدائش اور (3) نمایش کی زبان کی مورپولوژیکی تایپولوژی۔ ہمارے نتیجے پہلے سے اگلوں کو پھیلاتے ہیں کہ علائم کی نمایش ٹائپولوژ کے درمیان اثر ہے، اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک پہلے ناپذیر علائم تریکرام نمایش کی ترکیبرام کی ترکیبرام نمایش جو دو-LSTMs کے ساتھ جوڑی ہوئی ہے بہت سے دوسرے سے لیکن ہم نے بھی بہترین طریقے کے لئے جگہ پیدا کیا ہے: کسی شخص-سطح مدل میں سے ایک مدل کی پیش بینی دقیق کے مطابق مطابق نہیں ہوتا کہ حقیقی مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کے لئے دسترسی حاصل کرے، اگرچہ جب بھی زیادہ مطابق دی جاتی ہے۔', 'so': "Ereyga waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa qeybaha qoraalka hoose, tusaale ahaan qeybaha word, xaraf, iyo/ama xaraf n-gram. Inta ay noocyadaas shaqeynayaan oo ay qabsan karaan qaynuunnada morphologiga ah ee hadallada, lama dhigin si koox ah isbarbardhig, lamana garanayo sida ay ula xiriiraan noocyo kala duduwan. Shaqo qaabilsan oo afka ku qoran, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa imtixaanka si rasmi ah u kala duwan (1) qeybta aasaasiga ah ee wakiilka, (2) koobnaha noocyada, iyo (3) qaababka morphologiga ee luuqada lagu qoray. Fashihiisu waxay sii fidiyaan dhamaantoodii hore, in qofka xubnaa ay tayo u leeyihiin dhaqanka kala duduwan, waxaynu aragnaa inay horay u dhaqdhaqaaqeen isku xir ka mid ah xarumaha trigram ee lagu qoray bi-LSTMs waxay ka muuqataa kuwa badan. Laakin waxaynu sidoo kale helaynaa meel loo beddelo: noocyada saxda ah midkoodna la mid aheyn saxda hore ee muusikada, kaas oo la heli karo baaritaanka rasmiga ah, xataa marka lagu barto takhasuska faa'iidada badan.", 'uz': "Name Bu tashkilotlar ishlaydigan va so'zlarning morfologik qoidalarini qabul qilishi mumkin, ular tizim bilan birlashtirilmaydi, va ular boshqa morfologik typologlari bilan qanday bog'lanishni tushunmaydi. Tilni modellash vazifasida, biz tizimda tasavvur qilamiz (1) tashkilotning asosiy birikligini o'zgartiradi, (2) bu tashkilotlarning qismlarini yaratish va (3) tilning modelidagi morfologik turologi. Bizning natijalarimiz oldingi natijalarimizni ko'paytirish mumkin, xususiyatlarning xususiyatlari turlari davomida ishlaydi. Biz o'ylaymiz, biz bir-LSTMs bilan bir necha bo'lmagan harf trigram representlarini ko'proq boshqalarini bajaradi. Lekin biz quyidagi o'zgarishni topamiz: hech qachon shakl modellari haqiqiqiy morfologik analyzerga murakkab o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ngôn từ có thể được đại diện bằng cách soạn các biểu tượng của các đơn vị dưới chữ như đoạn từ, ký tự, và/ hay ký tự n-grams. Mặc dù các biểu hiện đó có hiệu quả và có thể nắm bắt các thói quen lịch sử của từ, nhưng chúng chưa được so sánh một cách thường xuyên, và không hiểu làm thế nào mà chúng tác động với các loại hình mẫu khác nhau. Trên một nhiệm vụ tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi giới thiệu các thí nghiệm có hệ thống phân biệt hệ thống cơ bản (1) các đơn vị đại diện cơ bản, 2) cấu trúc của các biểu tượng này, và (3) các kiểu mẫu của ngôn ngữ. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cung cấp những phát hiện trước rằng các bi ểu tượng nhân vật có hiệu quả trong các loại, và chúng tôi thấy rằng một kết hợp chưa được kiểm tra trước của các biểu tượng tritram được cấu tạo với hai-LSTM hoàn thiện hầu hết các khác. Nhưng chúng tôi cũng tìm thấy chỗ để cải thiện: không có mô- đun nào so với độ chính xác dự đoán của mô hình có thể tiếp cận các phân tích lịch sử thực sự, ngay cả khi học được từ một thứ tự có độ lớn hơn dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Думите могат да бъдат представени чрез съставяне на изображения на подсловни единици като словни сегменти, знаци и/или знакови грамове. Въпреки че тези изображения са ефективни и могат да уловят морфологичните редовности на думите, те не са систематично сравнявани и не се разбира как взаимодействат с различните морфологични типологии. На задача за езиково моделиране представяме експерименти, които систематично варират (1) основната единица на представяне, (2) състава на тези представяния и (3) морфологичната типология на моделирания език. Нашите резултати разширяват предишните констатации, че символните представяния са ефективни в типологиите и откриваме, че непоучаваната преди това комбинация от символни триграмни представяния, съставени с би-ЛСТМ, превъзхожда повечето други. Но също така намираме място за подобрение: нито един от моделите на ниво символ не съвпада с прогнозната точност на модел с достъп до истински морфологични анализи, дори когато се научи от порядък на величината повече данни.', 'da': 'Ord kan repræsenteres ved at sammensætte repræsentationer af underordsenheder såsom ordsegmenter, tegn og/eller tegn n-gram. Selvom sådanne repræsentationer er effektive og kan fange de morfologiske regelmæssigheder af ord, er de ikke blevet systematisk sammenlignet, og det er ikke forstået, hvordan de interagerer med forskellige morfologiske typologier. På en sprogmodelleringsopgave præsenterer vi eksperimenter, der systematisk varierer (1) den grundlæggende repræsentationsenhed, (2) sammensætningen af disse repræsentationer, og (3) den morfologiske typologi af det modellerede sprog. Vores resultater udvider tidligere resultater af, at tegn repræsentationer er effektive på tværs af typologier, og vi finder, at en tidligere uundersøgt kombination af tegn trigramrepræsentationer sammensat med bi-LSTMs overgår de fleste andre. Men vi finder også plads til forbedringer: Ingen af modellerne på karakterniveau matcher en models prædiktive nøjagtighed med adgang til ægte morfologiske analyser, selv når de læres ud fra en størrelsesorden flere data.', 'nl': 'Woorden kunnen worden weergegeven door de voorstellingen van subwoordeenheden zoals woordsegmenten, tekens en/of teken n-grammen samen te stellen. Hoewel dergelijke representaties effectief zijn en de morfologische regelmaat van woorden kunnen vangen, zijn ze niet systematisch vergeleken en is niet begrepen hoe ze omgaan met verschillende morfologische typologieën. Op een taalmodelleringstaak presenteren we experimenten die systematisch (1) de basiseenheid van representatie, (2) de samenstelling van deze representaties en (3) de morfologische typologie van de gemodelleerde taal variëren. Onze resultaten breiden eerdere bevindingen uit dat karakterrepresentaties effectief zijn over typologieën, en we vinden dat een eerder niet bestudeerde combinatie van karaktertrigram representaties samengesteld met bi-LSTMs de meeste andere overtreft. Maar we vinden ook ruimte voor verbetering: geen van de karakterniveaumodellen komt overeen met de voorspellende nauwkeurigheid van een model met toegang tot echte morfologische analyses, zelfs als geleerd uit een orde van grootte meer gegevens.', 'hr': 'Riječi se mogu predstavljati sastavljajući predstave podriječnih jedinica poput riječnih segmenta, znakova i/ili znakova n-grama. Iako su takve predstave učinkovite i mogu uhvatiti morfološku regularnost riječi, nisu bile sistematski uspoređene, a ne shvaćaju kako interakciju s različitim morfološkim tipologijama. Na zadatku modeliranja jezika predstavljamo eksperimente koje sistematski razlikuju (1) osnovnu jedinicu predstavljanja, 2) sastavu tih predstavljanja i (3) morfološku tipologiju jezika modeliranog. Naši rezultati proširuju prethodne nalaze da su predstave karaktera učinkovite u širom tipologija, a mi smatramo da prethodno neatudirana kombinacija predstavljanja trigrama karaktera sastavljenih s bi-LSTMsima iznosi većinu drugih. Ali također pronalazimo mjesto za poboljšanje: nijedan od model a na razini karaktera ne odgovara predviđenoj to čnosti modela s pristupom pravim morfološkim analizama, čak i kad je naučio iz reda velikosti više podataka.', 'id': 'Kata-kata dapat dirampaikan dengan menggambarkan representation dari unit subkata seperti segmen kata, karakter, dan/atau karakter n-gram. Meskipun representation seperti itu efektif dan mungkin menangkap regularitas morfologi kata-kata, mereka belum secara sistematis dibandingkan, dan tidak mengerti bagaimana mereka berinteraksi dengan tipologi morfologi yang berbeda. On a language modeling task, we present experiments that systematically vary (1) the basic unit of representation, (2) the composition of these representations, and (3) the morphological typology of the language modeled.  Hasil kami memperluas penemuan sebelumnya bahwa representation karakter efektif melalui tipologi, dan kami menemukan bahwa kombinasi karakter trigram yang belum pernah dipelajari terdiri dengan bi-LSTM lebih berharga dari kebanyakan lainnya. Namun kita juga menemukan ruang untuk peningkatan: tidak satupun dari model tahap karakter yang cocok dengan akurasi prediksi model dengan akses ke analisis morfologi sejati, bahkan ketika belajar dari urutan besar data lebih banyak.', 'de': 'Wörter können dargestellt werden, indem die Darstellungen von Unterworteinheiten wie Wortsegmenten, Zeichen und/oder Zeichen n-Gramm zusammengesetzt werden. Obwohl solche Darstellungen effektiv sind und die morphologischen Regelmäßigkeiten von Wörtern erfassen können, wurden sie nicht systematisch verglichen und es ist nicht verstanden, wie sie mit verschiedenen morphologischen Typologien interagieren. Auf einer Sprachmodellierungsaufgabe stellen wir Experimente vor, die systematisch (1) die Grundeinheit der Repräsentation, (2) die Zusammensetzung dieser Repräsentationen und (3) die morphologische Typologie der modellierten Sprache variieren. Unsere Ergebnisse erweitern frühere Erkenntnisse, dass Zeichenrepräsentationen über Typologien hinweg effektiv sind, und wir finden, dass eine bisher nicht untersuchte Kombination von Zeichentrigrammrepräsentationen, die mit bi-LSTMs komponiert wurden, die meisten anderen übertrifft. Aber wir finden auch Raum für Verbesserungen: Keines der Charaktermodelle entspricht der prädiktiven Genauigkeit eines Modells mit Zugang zu echten morphologischen Analysen, selbst wenn aus einer Größenordnung mehr Daten gelernt werden.', 'fa': 'کلمات می\u200cتوانند با تولید نمایش واحدهای زیر کلمات مانند بخش\u200cهای کلمات، شخصیت\u200cها و/یا شخصیت\u200cهای n گرم نمایش داده شوند. در حالی که این نمایش\u200cها موثر هستند و ممکن است قانونی\u200cهای مرفولژیک کلمات را بگیرند، آنها به صورت سیستماتیک مقایسه نشده\u200cاند، و نمی\u200cفهمند چگونه با نوع\u200cهای متفاوت مورفولژیک تعامل می\u200cکنند. در یک کار مدل زبانی، ما آزمایشات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سیستم\u200cپذیری (۱) واحد بنیادی نمایش، ۲) ساختن این نمایش\u200cها، و (۳) نوع مدل\u200cپذیری زبان را تغییر می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهایمان پیدا کردن قبلی را گسترش می\u200cدهد که نمایش\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cها در طول تایپولوژی\u200cها موثر هستند، و ما می\u200cیابیم که یک ترکیب قبلاً نامیده نشده از نمایش\u200cهای تریکرام\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cهایی که با دو-LSTMs ساخته شده بیشتر دیگر اما ما همچنین جایی برای بهترین پیدا می کنیم: هیچ یک از مدل های سطح شخصیت با دقیق پیش بینی یک مدل با دسترسی به تحلیل های مورفیک واقعی، حتی وقتی از یک دستور داده های بزرگی بیشتری یاد گرفته باشد.', 'sw': 'Maneno yanaweza kuonyeshwa kwa kuunganisha maonyesho ya viungo vya upande wa maneno kama vile vipengele vya maneno, wahusika, na/au wahusika n-gram. Wakati maoni haya yanakuwa na ufanisi na yanaweza kushambulia kanuni za kisiasa za maneno, bado hawajafananishwa na kimfumo, na haielewi jinsi wanavyohusiana na aina mbalimbali za kisemolojia. Katika juhudi la kufanya mtindo wa lugha, tunaonyesha majaribio yanayotofauti kwa mfumo (1) kitengo cha msingi cha uwakilishaji, (2) utengenezaji wa uwakilishaji huu, na (3) aina ya kifolojia ya lugha inayotengenezwa. Matokeo yetu yanaongezeka matokeo yaliyopita kwamba uwakilishi wa wahusika ni wenye ufanisi katika aina mbalimbali, na tunagundua kuwa muunganiko wa wataalamu wa tabia zilizotengenezwa na bina-LSTMs unaofanywa zaidi. Lakini pia tunapata nafasi ya kuboresha: hakuna hata mifano ya kiwango cha tabia inafanana na uhakika wa utabiri wa modeli wenye upatikanaji wa uchambuzi wa kweli wa kimaadilojia, hata kama ilipojifunza kutoka kwa mfumo wa takwimu zaidi.', 'ko': '단어는 조합된 하위 단어 단원의 표시를 통해 나타낼 수 있는데, 예를 들어 단어 단락, 문자와/또는 문자 n-gram이다.이러한 표현은 효과가 있고 단어의 형태 규칙을 포착할 수 있지만 체계적으로 비교되지 않고 서로 다른 형태 유형과 어떻게 상호작용하는지 이해하지 못한다.언어 모델링 임무에서 우리는 체계적인 실험을 실시했다. 이런 실험은 (1) 표징의 기본 단위, (2) 표징의 구성, 그리고 (3) 모델링된 언어의 형태 유형을 포함한다.우리의 결과는 이전의 발견, 즉 문자가 서로 다른 유형에서 효과가 있다는 것을 확장시켰고, 이전에 연구되지 않았던biLSTM으로 구성된 문자의 3원 표시 조합이 대부분의 다른 조합보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 우리도 개선된 공간을 발견했다. 모델의 예측 정밀도와 일치하는 문자급 모델은 하나도 없고 수량급 이상의 데이터에서 배워도 진정한 형태학 분석을 얻을 수 있다.', 'af': "Woorde kan verteenwoord word deur die voorstellings van subwoord eenhede soos woord segmente, karakters en/of karakter n-grame te stel. Terwyl sodanige voorstellings effektief is en dalk die morfologiese regulariteite van woorde kan opneem, is hulle nie sistematiese vergelyking nie, en dit is nie verstaan hoe hulle interaksie met verskillende morfologiese tipologies. Op 'n taal modellering taak, voorsien ons eksperimente wat sistematiese verander (1) die basiese eenheid van voorstelling, (2) die opstelling van hierdie voorstellings, en (3) die morfologiese tipologie van die taal modelleer. Ons resultate uitbrei vorige gevindings dat karakter voorstellings effektief is oor tipologies, en ons vind dat 'n voorheen ongeondersteunde kombinasie van karakter trigram voorstellings wat met bi-LSTMs gestel is, meeste ander uitvoer. Maar ons vind ook kamer vir verbetering: geen van die karaktervlak-modelle ooreenstem die voorskoude presisie van 'n model met toegang tot waar morfologiese analisies, selfs wanneer leer van 'n volgorde van groot meer data.", 'tr': 'Sözler, söz segmentler, karakterler we/ýa n-gramler gibi subsöz birimleriniň represiyonlary ýazylýar. Böyle ifadeler etkileyici ve kelimelerin morfolojik düzenlemelerini yakalayabilir. Bunlar sistematik olarak karşılaştırılmamışlar ve farklı morfolojik tipologilerle nasıl etkileşişlerini anlamıyor. Diller modelleýän zadyň üstünde sistematik üýtgediklerinde (1) surat taýýarlanmasyň esasy birimi, (2) bu suratlaryň sastamyny we (3) modelleýän diliň morfologiýasyny görkezip çykýarys. Sonuçlarımız, önceki çözümlerimiz karakter ifadelerinin tipologilerde etkisiz olduğunu genişletir ve öňeki bilinmeyen bir karakter trigram ifadelerinin bir kombinatsiyası daha fazlasını a ştır. Emma gelişmeler üçin ýene bir yer tapdyk: karakter seviyesinden hiçbiri modelinin tahmin edilen dogrylygyna eşleşmez. Hatta büyüklük düzeden daha çok veri öwrenende hem.', 'sq': 'Fjalët mund të përfaqësohen duke kompozuar përfaqësimet e njësive të n ënfjalëve të tilla si segmentet e fjalëve, karakteret dhe/ose karakteri n-gram. While such representations are effective and may capture the morphological regularities of words, they have not been systematically compared, and it is not understood how they interact with different morphological typologies.  Në një detyrë modelimi gjuhësh, ne paraqesim eksperimente që ndryshojnë sistematikisht (1) njësinë bazë të përfaqësimit, (2) përbërjen e këtyre përfaqësimeve dhe (3) tipologjinë morfologjike të gjuhës modeluar. Our results extend previous findings that character representations are effective across typologies, and we find that a previously unstudied combination of character trigram representations composed with bi-LSTMs outperforms most others.  Por gjejmë gjithashtu vend për përmirësim: asnjë nga modelet e nivelit të karakterit nuk përputhet me saktësinë parashikuese të një modeli me akses në analizat e vërteta morfologjike, edhe kur mësohet nga një rend me madhësi më shumë të dhëna.', 'am': 'ቃል እንደዚህ ያሉት መልዕክቶች በጥያቄ እና የሞፎሎጂ ቃላት ሥርዓት ማግኘት ቢችሉ፣ በሥርዓት አይተካከሉም፣ በተለያዩ የሞፎሎጂ ዓይነት እንዴት እንደተቃራረቡ አያስተውልም፡፡ በቋንቋ ምሳሌ አድራሻ ላይ፣ በሥርዓት (1) የተለየ (2) የእነዚህን መልዕክቶች መሠረት እና (3) የቋንቋው ሞፎሎጂ ትክክል የተደረገውን ፈተናዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን የቀድሞው ፍጥረቶች በቶሎጂዎች ውስጥ የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን ለማሻለል ስፍራ እናገኛለን፤ የፊደል-ደረጃ ምሳሌዎች ማንም እውነተኛ ሞሮፎሎጂ analyzerን ለመቀበል የሚችል አይደሉም፤ ከዳራዎች ክፍል በተማሩ ጊዜ እንኳ አይገኙም፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերը կարելի է ներկայացնել բառերի ենթաբառերի միավորների ներկայացումներով, ինչպիսիք են բառերի սեգմերները, իմաստները և (կամ) n-գրամը: Մինչդեռ այսպիսի ներկայացումները արդյունավետ են և կարող են վերցնել բառերի մորֆոլոգիական ճշգրիտությունները, դրանք չեն համապատասխանվել սիստեմատիկ կերպով, և չհասկանում է, թե ինչպես են դրանք փոխազդում տարբեր մորֆոլոգիական տիպոլոգիաների հետ: Լեզու մոդելավորման խնդրի վրա մենք ներկայացնում ենք փորձարկումներ, որոնք համակարգչաբար տարբերվում են (1) ներկայացման հիմնական միավորը, (2) ներկայացումների բաղադրությունը և (3) լեզու մոդելավորված մորֆոլոգիան: Our results extend previous findings that character representations are effective across typologies, and we find that a previously unstudied combination of character trigram representations composed with bi-LSTMs outperforms most others.  Բայց մենք նաև տարածք ենք գտնում բարելավելու համար. բնավորության մակարդակի մոդելներից ոչ մեկը չի համապատասխանում մոդելի կանխատեսողական ճշգրիտությանը իրական մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունների հնարավորության հետ, նույնիսկ երբ ավելի շատ տվյալներ են սովորում:', 'az': 'Sözlər n-gramlar kimi söz segmentlərin, karakterlərin və/yaxud karakterlərin n-qramların göstərilmələrini yazıb göstərilir. Bütün göstəricilər etkilidir və sözlərin morfolojik düzgünlüyünü yakalaya bilərlər ki, onlar sistematik hörmətləşdirilmiş deyillər, və onlar müxtəlif morfolojik tipoloqlarla necə əlaqə edirlər anlamırlar. Dil modelləşdirməsi təqdirdə sistematik olaraq təcrübələrin əsas təhrif edilməsi (1) ilə dəyişən təcrübələrini göstəririk, (2) bu təhrif etdiklərinin kompozisyonu və (3) modelləşdirilmiş dilin morfolojik tipologiyasını göstəririk. Bizim sonuçlarımız əvvəlki tapındıqlarımızı artırar ki, karakter göstəriciləri typoloğu arasında etkilidir, və biz əvvəlcə bilinmədiyimiz karakter trigram göstəricilərinin birləşdirilməsi daha çoxunun üstünə gəlir. Lakin biz də təmizləmək üçün yer tapırıq: heç bir karakter səviyyəsindən daha böyük məlumatlardan öyrəndiyimiz halda, modelinin tədbirli doğruluğuna uyğun deyil.', 'bs': 'Riječi se mogu predstavljati sastavljajući predstave podriječnih jedinica kao što su segmenti riječi, znakovi i/ili znakovi n-grama. Iako su takve predstave učinkovite i mogu uhvatiti morfološku regularnost riječi, nisu bile sistematski uspoređene, a ne shvata kako se mijenjaju sa različitim morfološkim tipologijama. Na zadatku modeliranja jezika predstavljamo eksperimente koje sistematski razlikuju (1) osnovnu jedinicu predstavljanja, (2) sastavu ovih predstavljanja i (3) morfološku tipologiju jezika modeliranog. Naši rezultati proširuju prethodne nalaze da su predstave karaktera efikasne u širom tipologija, a mi smatramo da prethodno neatudirana kombinacija predstavljanja trigrama karaktera sastavljenih sa bi-LSTMs iznosi većinu drugih. Ali također pronalazimo mjesta za poboljšanje: nijedan od model a na nivou karaktera ne odgovara predviđenoj preciznosti modela sa pristupom pravim morfološkim analizima, čak i kad je naučio iz reda velikosti više podataka.', 'bn': 'সাবওয়ার্ড ইউনিটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করতে পারে, যেমন শব্দ বিভাগ, অক্ষর, এবং/অথবা অক্ষর n-gram। যদিও এই ধরনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব কার্যকর এবং শব্দের মরোফোলজিক নিয়ম গ্রহণ করতে পারে, তারা সিস্টেমিকভাবে তুলনা করেনি এবং বুঝতে পারে না কিভাবে তারা বিভ ভাষার মডেলিং কাজে আমরা পরীক্ষা উপস্থাপন করছি যে স্বাভাবিকভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্বের মৌলিক ইউনিট ভিন্ন (১), (২) এই প্রতিনিধিদের তৈরি করা এবং (৩) ভাষার ম আমাদের ফলাফল পূর্বের ফলাফল বিস্তৃত হয়েছে যে চরিত্রের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের কার্যকর এবং আমরা পাই যে বি এলএসএসএমএস বিভিন্ন অন্যা কিন্তু আমরা উন্নয়নের জন্য রুম খুঁজে পাই: কোন চরিত্র-স্তরের মডেলের ভবিষ্যৎ পরিসূচকের সাথে মিলে নেই, যার মাধ্যমে সত্যিকার মাত্রার বিশ্ল', 'ca': "Les paraules es poden representar composant les representacions d'unitats de subparaules com segments de paraules, caràcters i/o n-grams de caràcter. Mentre aquestes representacions són efectives i poden capturar les regularitats morfològiques de les paraules, no s'han comparat sistemàticament, i no s'entend com interacten amb diferents tipologies morfològiques. En una tasca de modelació de llenguatges, presentem experiments que varian sistemàticament (1) l'unitat bàsica de representació, (2) la composició d'aquestes representacions, i (3) la tipologia morfològica del llenguatge modelat. Els nostres resultats estenen els descobriments anteriors de que les representacions de caràcters són efectives en tipologies, i descobrim que una combinació anteriorment no estudiada de representacions de trigrames de caràcters composta de bi LSTMs supera la majoria dels altres. Però també trobem espai per millorar: cap dels models de nivell de caràcter coincideix amb la precisió preditiva d'un model amb l'accés a an àlisis morfològics veritables, fins i tot quan s'aprenen d'un ordre de magnitud més dades.", 'fi': 'Sanat voidaan esittää kirjoittamalla alasanayksiköiden, kuten sanasegmenttien, merkkien ja/tai merkkien n-grammojen, esitykset. Vaikka tällaiset esitykset ovat tehokkaita ja voivat ottaa huomioon sanojen morfologiset säännöllisyydet, niitä ei ole systemaattisesti vertailtu, eikä ole ymmärretty, miten ne ovat vuorovaikutuksessa erilaisten morfologisten typologioiden kanssa. Esitämme kielimallinnustehtävässä kokeita, jotka vaihtelevat systemaattisesti (1) edustuksen perusyksikköä, (2) näiden representaatioiden koostumusta ja (3) mallinnetun kielen morfologista typologiaa. Tuloksemme laajentavat aikaisempia havaintoja siitä, että merkkien esittäminen on tehokasta kaikissa typologioissa, ja havaitsemme, että aiemmin tutkimaton yhdistelmä merkkitrigrammeja, jotka koostuvat bi-LSTMs:istä, on parempi kuin useimmat muut. Mutta löydämme myös parantamisen varaa: yksikään merkki-tason malleista ei vastaa mallin ennustustarkkuutta, jolla on pääsy todellisiin morfologisiin analyyseihin, vaikka ne olisivat oppineet suuruusluokkaa suuremmasta datasta.', 'cs': 'Slova mohou být reprezentována složením reprezentací podslovních jednotek, jako jsou slovní segmenty, znaky a/nebo n-gramy znaků. Zatímco tyto reprezentace jsou efektivní a mohou zachycovat morfologickou pravidelnost slov, nebyly systematicky srovnávány a není pochopeno, jak interagují s různými morfologickými typologiemi. Na úkolu jazykového modelování prezentujeme experimenty, které systematicky mění (1) základní jednotku reprezentace, (2) složení těchto reprezentací a (3) morfologickou typologii modelovaného jazyka. Naše výsledky rozšiřují předchozí zjištění, že reprezentace znaků jsou efektivní napříč typologiemi, a zjišťujeme, že dříve nestudiovaná kombinace reprezentací znakových trigramů složených s bi-LSTMs předčí většinu ostatních. Ale také najdeme prostor pro zlepšení: žádný z modelů na úrovni znaků neodpovídá prediktivní přesnosti modelu s přístupem k skutečným morfologickým analýzám, i když se naučíme z řádu velikosti více dat.', 'et': 'Sõnu saab esitada alamsõnaühikute, näiteks sõnasegmentide, märkide ja/või märgi n-grammide kujutiste koostamisega. Kuigi sellised esitused on tõhusad ja võivad hõlmata sõnade morfoloogilisi korrektsusi, ei ole neid süstemaatiliselt võrreldatud ning ei ole mõistetud, kuidas need mõjutavad erinevaid morfoloogilisi tüpoloogiaid. Keele modelleerimise ülesandel esitame eksperimente, mis süstemaatiliselt varieerivad (1) esinduse põhiüksust, (2) nende esinduste koosseisu ja (3) modelleeritud keele morfoloogilist tüpoloogiat. Meie tulemused laiendavad varasemaid järeldusi, et märkide esitused on tüpoloogiates efektiivsed, ning leiame, et eelnevalt uurimata kombinatsioon märkide trigrammide esitustest, mis on koostatud bi-LSTMdega, ületab enamiku teisi. Kuid leiame ruumi ka täiustamiseks: ükski märgitaseme mudel ei vasta mudeli prognoositavale täpsusele, millel on juurdepääs tõelistele morfoloogilistele analüüsidele, isegi kui on saadud suurusjärgus rohkem andmeid.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sing sampeyan Jaringan kang efek dan iso nggambar kelas kuwi mau, sedhaya iso nggawe sistematik tau karo nggawe, lan ora ngerasakno piye cara-piye basa sak cara-piye cara-piye cara-piye cara-piye yo banget. Nang barêng-barêng langêr modeleling task, kita gawean perintasi ngêrbêr suaraning (1) ngêrbêr suaraning (2) ngêrbêr suaraning, lan (3) ngêrbêr suaraning Rejilan nambah buking ing kebutaan karo akeh caratar tentang manut politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'מילים יכולות להיות מייצגות על ידי רישום היציגות של יחידות תחת מילים כמו חלקי מילים, דמויות, ו/או דמויות n-גרם. בעוד מייצגים כאלה יעילים ויכולים לתפוס את חוקיות המורפולוגיות של מילים, הם לא שוואים באופן שיטתי, ולא מובן איך הם מתקשרים עם טיפולוגיות מורפולוגיות שונות. על משימה של דגמה לשפה, אנחנו מציגים ניסויים שמשונים באופן שיטתי (1) יחידת היציגה הבסיסית, (2) המרכיב של היציגות הללו, ו (3) הטיפולוגיה המורפולוגית של השפה המודגמת. התוצאות שלנו ממשיכות את הממצאות הקודמות כי מייצגות אופיינים יעילות בין טיפולוגיות, ואנחנו מוצאים ששילוב בלתי מתחקר קודם אבל אנחנו גם מוצאים מקום לשיפור: אף אחד מהדוגמנים ברמת האופי לא מתאים לדיוקת צפויה של דוגמן עם גישה לניתוחים מורפולוגיים אמיתיים, אפילו כשלמדו מסדר גודל יותר נתונים.', 'ha': "Ana iya nuna kalmar da za'a sami tsarin sunayen sunaye masu ƙarƙashe kamar tsohon sunaye, taki, da/ko farat n-gram. Wakati da waɗannan masu shiryuwa sun kasance masu amfani da kuma sunã iya kãma rukuwan morfologi na maganar, ba a sami su da daidaita, kuma ba a fahimta jinsi da suke haɗa da wasu nau'i na morfologi. Daga wani aikin misalin harshe, muna halatar da jarrabai waɗand a ke sãɓã (1) wajen ƙidãya cikin shirin rubutu, (2) composition of these wakilishi, da (3) typogi na morfologi na cikin harshen wanda aka motsar. MataimakinMu na shimfiɗa fassaran zaman gannai da karankarman wakin su ne mai amfani a kowace typogi, kuma munã gane a koma ta zaman wanda ba'a tufi ba da koma na tabar-gram masu tsari da bi-LSM na samar da mafi yawansu. Amma kuma munã sami wani wuri wa gyarata: bãbu wani misalin-daraja mai daidai da tsarin mai basĩra na motel da za'a iya sami fassarar mutane da gaskiyar mutfologi, kuma kõ dã an sanar daga tsarin da aka girma wasu data.", 'sk': 'Besede je mogoče predstaviti s sestavljanjem predstavitev podbesednih enot, kot so besedni segmenti, znaki in/ali znaki n-grami. Čeprav so takšne reprezentacije učinkovite in lahko zajemajo morfološke pravilnosti besed, jih niso sistematično primerjali in ni razumljeno, kako interagirajo z različnimi morfološkimi tipologijami. Na nalogi jezikovnega modeliranja predstavljamo poskuse, ki sistematično spreminjajo (1) osnovno enoto reprezentacije, (2) sestavo teh reprezentacij in (3) morfološko tipologijo modeliranega jezika. Naši rezultati razširijo prejšnje ugotovitve, da so reprezentacije znakov učinkovite v vseh tipologijah, in ugotovimo, da predhodno neraziskana kombinacija reprezentacij znakov trigramov, sestavljenih z bi-LSTMi, presega večino drugih. Vendar pa najdemo tudi prostor za izboljšave: noben od modelov na ravni znakov se ne ujema z napovedno natančnostjo modela z dostopom do resničnih morfoloških analiz, tudi če se iz velikostnega reda naučimo več podatkov.', 'bo': 'Words can be represented by composing the representations of subword units such as word segments, characters, and/or character n-grams. While such representations are effective and may capture the morphological regularities of words, they have not been systematically compared, and it is not understood how they interact with different morphological typologies. སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱེ་བ་ཅིག་གིས་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ཏུ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལག་ཆ་གིས་གཞན་དང་(1)རྩ་སྒྲིག་དང་(2) རྩ་སྒྲིག་འདི་དག་མཛུབ་སྟོན་དང་(3) ཆགས་ཤིག Our results extend previous findings that character representations are effective across typologies, and we find that a previously unstudied combination of character trigram representations composed with bi-LSTMs outperforms most others. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཁང་གཅིག་ཡང་མིན་འདུག། རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བདེན་ཚད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Deep Multitask Learning for Semantic Dependency Parsing', 'pt': 'Aprendizado multitarefa profundo para análise de dependência semântica', 'ar': 'التعلم العميق متعدد المهام لتحليل التبعية الدلالية', 'es': 'Deep Multitask Learning para el análisis de dependencias semánticas', 'fr': "Apprentissage multitâche approfondi pour l'analyse des dépendances sémantiques", 'ja': 'セマンティック依存関係解析のための深いマルチタスク学習', 'ru': 'Глубокое многозадачное обучение для анализа семантических зависимостей', 'zh': '以语义恃解析之深多任务学', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए डीप मल्टीटास्क लर्निंग', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Dhomhain Ilthasc le haghaidh Parsáil Spleáchais Shéimeantach', 'ka': 'ძალიან მრავალური მომხმარების სწავლება Semantic Dependency Parsing', 'it': "Deep Multitask Learning per l'analisi semantica della dipendenza", 'hu': 'Mély többfeladatú tanulás a szemantikus függőség értelmezéséhez', 'el': 'Βαθιά εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για την ανάλυση σημασιολογικής εξάρτησης', 'kk': 'Semantic тәуелдік талдау үшін көптеген тапсырмаларды үйрену', 'lt': 'Išsamus daugiafunkcinis mokymasis Semantinės priklausomybės analizei', 'mk': 'Длабоко мултизадачно учење за анализирање семантична зависност', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Banyak Tugas dalam untuk Menghurai Dependensi Semantik', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ആഴത്തില്\u200d പലിപ്പണിയും പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Гүн бүрийн олон ажлын суралцах нь Semantic Dependency Parsing-д', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Multikompiti Profond għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Semantika', 'pl': 'Głębokie uczenie się wielozadaniowe dla parowania zależności semantycznej', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂය සඳහා ගොඩක් ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'no': 'Deep multioppgåve- læring for semiantisk avhengighetstolking', 'ro': 'Învățare multiactivă profundă pentru analizarea dependenței semantice', 'sr': 'Duboko učenje Multitask za analizu semantičke zavisnosti', 'sv': 'Deep Multitask Learning för semantisk beroendetolkning', 'so': 'Waxbarashada shaqo badan ee jardiinada mas’uuliyadda', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் சார்ந்த பாசிங்குக்கான ஆழமான பல்வேலை படிப்பு', 'ur': 'سیمانٹیک اعتباری پارچینگ کے لئے عمیق Multitask Learning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học kỹ thuật đa nhiệm sâu cho phép phân tích tinh thần', 'bg': 'Дълбоко многозадачно обучение за анализ на семантична зависимост', 'da': 'Dyb multitasking læring til semantisk afhængighedsanalyse', 'nl': 'Deep Multitask Learning voor semantische afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'de': 'Deep Multitask Learning für Semantic Dependency Parsing', 'ko': '의미 의존 분석의 심도 있는 다중 임무 학습', 'hr': 'Duboko učenje višezadataka za razmatranje semantičke zavisnosti', 'id': 'Belajar Multitask dalam untuk Analisasi Dependensi Semantik', 'tr': 'Semantik bağlılık analyzasy üçin derin köp täzim öwrenmesi', 'af': 'Deep veelvuldige taak leer vir semantiese afhanklikheidverwerking', 'sq': 'Mësimi i thellë i shumëdetyrave për analizimin e varësisë Semantike', 'fa': 'یادگیری زیادی عمیق برای تحلیل بستگی سیمانتیک', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Semantik bağımlılıq analizi üçün çoxlu işlər öyrənməsi', 'sw': 'Kusoma kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Kuchapisha Uhuru wa Kisemantiki', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ կախվածության վերլուծության համար խորը բազմախնդիրներ սովորելը', 'bs': 'Duboko učenje multitaska za analizu semantičke zavisnosti', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্ডিক নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং এর জন্য গভীর মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা', 'et': 'Sügav mitmetülesandeline õpe semantilise sõltuvuse parsimiseks', 'cs': 'Hluboké víceúlohové učení pro analýzu sémantické závislosti', 'fi': 'Deep Multitask Learning for Semantic Dependency Parsing', 'ca': "Aprendència multitasca profunda per l'analització de dependencies semàntiques", 'jv': 'deep Multitask Learning for semanti-Dehensik Learning', 'sk': 'Globoko večopravilno učenje za analiziranje semantične odvisnosti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Semantic Dependency Parsing for Deep Multitask Learning', 'he': 'למדת משימות רבות עמוקות עבור בדיקת תלויות סמנטיות'}
{'en': 'We present a deep neural architecture that parses sentences into three semantic dependency graph formalisms. By using efficient, nearly arc-factored inference and a bidirectional-LSTM composed with a multi-layer perceptron, our base system is able to significantly improve the state of the art for semantic dependency parsing, without using hand-engineered features or syntax. We then explore two multitask learning approachesone that shares parameters across formalisms, and one that uses higher-order structures to predict the graphs jointly. We find that both approaches improve performance across formalisms on average, achieving a new state of the art. Our code is open-source and available at.https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser.\n    ', 'ar': 'نقدم بنية عصبية عميقة تقسم الجمل إلى ثلاث شكليات رسم بياني تبعية دلالية. من خلال استخدام الاستدلال الفعال ذي العوامل القوسية تقريبًا و LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه المكون من مدرك متعدد الطبقات ، فإن نظامنا الأساسي قادر على تحسين حالة الفن لتحليل التبعية الدلالية بشكل كبير ، دون استخدام ميزات هندسية أو بناء جملة. ثم نستكشف نهجين للتعلم متعدد المهام - أحدهما يشارك المعلمات عبر الأشكال الشكلية ، والآخر يستخدم هياكل ذات ترتيب أعلى للتنبؤ بالرسوم البيانية معًا. نجد أن كلا النهجين يحسن الأداء عبر الشكليات في المتوسط ، مما يحقق حالة جديدة من الفن. الكود الخاص بنا مفتوح المصدر ومتوفر على <https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une architecture neuronale profonde qui analyse les phrases en trois formalismes de graphe de dépendance sémantique. En utilisant une inférence efficace, presque factoriée par arc et un LSTM bidirectionnel composé d'un perceptron multicouche, notre système de base est capable d'améliorer de manière significative l'état de l'art pour l'analyse de dépendance sémantique, sans utiliser de fonctionnalités ou de syntaxe conçues à la main. Nous explorons ensuite deux approches d'apprentissage multitâches\xa0: l'une qui partage des paramètres entre les formalismes et l'autre qui utilise des structures d'ordre supérieur pour prédire les graphiques conjointement. Nous constatons que les deux approches améliorent la performance des formalismes en moyenne, ce qui permet d'atteindre un nouvel état de l'art. Notre code est open source et disponible à l'adresse < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma arquitetura neural profunda que analisa sentenças em três formalismos de grafo de dependência semântica. Usando inferência eficiente, quase fatorada em arco e um LSTM bidirecional composto com um perceptron multicamada, nosso sistema básico é capaz de melhorar significativamente o estado da arte para análise de dependência semântica, sem usar recursos ou sintaxe projetados à mão. Em seguida, exploramos duas abordagens de aprendizado multitarefa – uma que compartilha parâmetros entre formalismos e outra que usa estruturas de ordem superior para prever os gráficos em conjunto. Descobrimos que ambas as abordagens melhoram o desempenho nos formalismos em média, alcançando um novo estado da arte. Nosso código é de código aberto e está disponível em <https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>.', 'es': 'Presentamos una arquitectura neuronal profunda que analiza las oraciones en tres formalismos de gráficos de dependencia semántica. Mediante el uso de una inferencia eficiente, casi factorizada por arco y un LSTM bidireccional compuesto por un perceptrón multicapa, nuestro sistema base es capaz de mejorar significativamente el estado del arte para el análisis de dependencias semánticas, sin utilizar funciones o sintaxis diseñadas a mano. Luego exploramos dos enfoques de aprendizaje multitarea: uno que comparte parámetros entre los formalismos y otro que utiliza estructuras de orden superior para predecir los gráficos de forma conjunta. Encontramos que ambos enfoques mejoran el rendimiento en todos los formalismos en promedio, logrando un nuevo estado de la técnica. Nuestro código es de código abierto y está disponible en < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'ja': '文を3つの意味依存グラフ形式主義に解析する深層ニューラルアーキテクチャを提示します。効率的でほぼアーク因子推論と多層パーセプトロンで構成された双方向LSTMを使用することで、当社のベースシステムは、手動で設計された機能や構文を使用することなく、セマンティック依存構文解析のための最先端を大幅に改善することができます。次に、フォーマリズム間でパラメータを共有するマルチタスク学習アプローチと、グラフを共同で予測するために高次構造を使用するマルチタスク学習アプローチの2つを探索します。私たちは、両方のアプローチがフォーマリズム全体のパフォーマンスを平均的に向上させ、新しい最先端を達成していることを発見します。当社のコードはオープンソースで、で入手可能です<https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>。', 'zh': '一深神经架构,解析句为三语义依图形式主义。 用高效近乎电弧因子推理,重感知器之双向 LSTM,吾基统之所以昭崇语义依赖性解析最新,而无庸巧之语法也。 然后探二多任务学术-一则跨形式主义共参数,一则用高阶结构共占图形。 吾见二者,均而言形式主义,成其新技术水平。 吾代码开源,可<https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>。', 'hi': 'हम एक गहरी तंत्रिका वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वाक्यों को तीन शब्दार्थ निर्भरता ग्राफ औपचारिकताओं में पार्स करता है। कुशल, लगभग आर्क-फैक्टरेड अनुमान और एक द्विदिश-एलएसटीएम का उपयोग करके एक बहु-परत परसेप्ट्रॉन के साथ बना, हमारी आधार प्रणाली हाथ से इंजीनियर सुविधाओं या वाक्यविन्यास का उपयोग किए बिना, शब्दार्थ निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए कला की स्थिति में काफी सुधार करने में सक्षम है। फिर हम दो मल्टीटास्क सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का पता लगाते हैं- एक जो औपचारिकताओं में पैरामीटर साझा करता है, और एक जो संयुक्त रूप से ग्राफ़ की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए उच्च-क्रम संरचनाओं का उपयोग करता है। हम पाते हैं कि दोनों दृष्टिकोण औसतन औपचारिकताओं में प्रदर्शन में सुधार करते हैं, कला की एक नई स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं। हमारा कोड खुला स्रोत है और <https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser> पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем глубокую нейронную архитектуру, которая анализирует предложения в трех формализмах графов семантической зависимости. Используя эффективный, почти дугообразный вывод и двунаправленный LSTM, состоящий из многослойного персептрона, наша базовая система способна значительно улучшить современное состояние для семантического синтаксического анализа зависимостей, без использования ручных функций или синтаксиса. Затем мы исследуем два многозадачных подхода к обучению - один, который делится параметрами между формализмами, и другой, который использует структуры более высокого порядка для совместного предсказания графиков. Мы обнаружили, что оба подхода улучшают производительность в среднем по формализмам, достигая нового уровня техники. Наш код открыт и доступен по адресу<https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair ailtireacht néarach dhomhain a pharsálann abairtí i dtrí fhoirmiúlacht ghraif spleáchais shéimeantach. Trí úsáid a bhaint as tátal éifeachtúil, beagnach stua-fhachtóirithe agus LSTM déthreoch comhdhéanta le perceptron ilchiseal, tá ár mbunchóras in ann an úrscothacht maidir le parsáil spleáchais shéimeantach a fheabhsú go suntasach, gan úsáid a bhaint as gnéithe nó comhréir lámh-innealtaithe. Déanaimid iniúchadh ansin ar dhá chur chuige foghlama ilthasc - ceann a roinneann paraiméadair trasna foirmiúlachtaí, agus ceann a úsáideann struchtúir ardoird chun na graif a thuar le chéile. Faighimid amach go bhfeabhsaíonn an dá chur chuige feidhmíocht trasna foirmiúlachtaí ar an meán, ag baint amach úrscothacht. Tá ár gcód foinse oscailte agus tá sé ar fáil ag <https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ძალიან ნეიროლური აქტიქტიკური, რომელიც სამი სემონტიკური დადარჩენების გრაფიკაციაში განაწყება. გამოყენებით ეფექციენტი, დაბრუნებული არქტაქტიური ინფექცია და ბიდერექციონალ-LSTM, რომელიც მრავალური ინფექტრონით შექმნა, ჩვენი ბაზი სისტემი შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანელოვანი სინტექსის შესაძლებლობად სმენტიკური და შემდეგ ჩვენ შევხედავთ ორი მრავალრამეტრის სწავლების მიღება-ერთი, რომელიც პრამეტრებს ფორმალიზმის გარეშე, და ერთი, რომელიც გამოყენებს უფრო მეტი სტრუქტურები, რომე ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ორივე მიღება უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ჩვენი კოდი გახსნა მხოლოდ და გახსნა < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser - ეა.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια βαθιά νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική που αναλύει προτάσεις σε τρεις σημασιολογικούς φορμαλισμούς γραφής εξάρτησης. Με τη χρήση αποτελεσματικών συμπερασμάτων σχεδόν με τόξο-παράγοντα και ενός αμφίδρομου-συστατικού με πολυστρωματικό perceptron, το βασικό μας σύστημα είναι σε θέση να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για την ανάλυση σημασιολογικής εξάρτησης, χωρίς να χρησιμοποιεί χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά ή σύνταξη. Στη συνέχεια, εξερευνούμε δύο προσεγγίσεις μάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών – μία που μοιράζεται παραμέτρους σε όλους τους φορμαλισμούς και μία που χρησιμοποιεί δομές ανώτερης τάξης για να προβλέψει τα γραφήματα από κοινού. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι και οι δύο προσεγγίσεις βελτιώνουν κατά μέσο όρο την απόδοση μεταξύ των φορμαλισμών, επιτυγχάνοντας μια νέα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Ο κώδικας μας είναι ανοιχτός και διαθέσιμος στο < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'hu': 'Egy mély neurális architektúrát mutatunk be, amely a mondatokat három szemantikus függőségráf formalizmusba elemezi. Hatékony, majdnem ívfaktoros következtetéssel és egy többrétegű perceptronnal összeállított kétirányú LSTM segítségével alaprendszerünk jelentősen javítani tudja a szemantikai függőség elemzésének legkorszerűbb állapotát, kézzel tervezett funkciók vagy szintaxis használata nélkül. Ezután két többfeladatú tanulási megközelítést vizsgálunk fel: az egyik, amely megosztja a paramétereket a formalizmusok között, a másik pedig magasabb rendű struktúrákat használ a grafikonok közös előrejelzésére. Úgy találjuk, hogy mindkét megközelítés átlagosan javítja a teljesítményt a formalizmusok között, és új korszerűséget ér el. A kódunk nyílt forráskódú és elérhető < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'it': "Presentiamo una profonda architettura neurale che analizza le frasi in tre formalismi semantici del grafico di dipendenza. Utilizzando un'inferenza efficiente, quasi ad arco e un LSTM bidirezionale composto da un percettro multistrato, il nostro sistema base è in grado di migliorare significativamente lo stato dell'arte per l'analisi semantica delle dipendenze, senza utilizzare funzionalità ingegnerizzate a mano o sintassi. Esploriamo quindi due approcci di apprendimento multitask, uno che condivide i parametri attraverso i formalismi, e uno che utilizza strutture di ordine superiore per prevedere i grafici congiuntamente. Troviamo che entrambi gli approcci migliorano le prestazioni attraverso i formalismi in media, raggiungendo un nuovo stato dell'arte. Il nostro codice è open source e disponibile su < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome gilią neurologinę architektūrą, kuri išanalizuoja sakinius į tris semantinius priklausomybės grafikos formalumus. Naudodami veiksmingą, beveik lanko faktorių išvadą ir dvikrypčią LSTM, sudarytą iš daugiasluoksnio perceptrono, mūsų bazinė sistema gali gerokai pagerinti semantinio priklausomybės analizavimo pažangą, nenaudodama rankiniu būdu sukurtų savybių ar sintakso. Tada išnagrinėsime du daugiafunkcinius mokymosi metodus: vieną, kuris dalijasi parametrais įvairiuose formalumais, ir vieną, kuris bendrai prognozuoja grafikus naudoja aukštesnės tvarkos struktūras. We find that both approaches improve performance across formalisms on average, achieving a new state of the art.  Mūsų kodas atviras ir prieinamas < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'mk': 'Презентираме длабока нервна архитектура која ги анализира речениците во три семантични графички формализами. Со употреба на ефикасна, речиси арк-факторна инференција и двојно-ЛСТМ составена со повеќекратен перцептрон, нашиот базичен систем може значително да ја подобри техничката состојба за анализирање семантична зависност, без употреба на рачно инженерирани карактеристики или синтакси. Потоа истражуваме два пристапи за мултизадачно учење, еден кој ги споделува параметрите преку формализмите, и еден кој користи структури со повисок ред за заеднички да ги предвидува графиците. Најдовме дека двата пристапи ја подобруваат резултатот помеѓу формализмите во просек, постигнувајќи нова техничка состојба. Нашиот код е отворен код и достапен на < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'kk': 'Біз сөздерді үш семантикалық тәуелдік графикалық графикалық түсінікті невралдық архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Біздің негізгі жүйеміз семантикалық тәуелсіздік талдау үшін, қолмен инженериялық қасиеттер не синтаксисі қолданбай, бұл көп қабаттық түсініктермен жасалған арк факториялық инфекциялық инфекциялық- LSTM және көп қабаттық түсі Содан кейін екі көптеген тапсырманың оқытуын зерттейміз, біріншісі, параметрлерді оқыту үшін оқыту үшін оқыту үшін оқыту үшін, біріншісі, графиктерді біріктіру үшін жо Біз екі жағдайда офилизмдердің орташа офилизмдерінің жаңа күйін жеткіземіз. Біздің кодымыз ашық көзі және < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തെ നെയൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് മൂന്ന് സെമാന്റിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ്  അത്യാവശ്യമുള്ള, ആർക്ക് ഫാക്ട്രെയേഷന്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥിതിയും കൈഎഞ്ചിനേറ്റര്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനെയും ഉപയോഗിക്കാതെ ഒരു ബിഡിറ്റര്\u200dക്ഷന്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎംഎസ്റ്റോണിനെയും  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു മുള്\u200dട്ടിട്ടുചോദ്യം പഠിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഫോര്\u200dമാലിസ്മികളിലൂടെ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കു നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് രണ്ടുപേരും ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dമിലിസ്മുകളിലൂടെ പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണെന്നും, ഒരു പ ഞങ്ങളുടെ കോഡ് തുറക്കുന്ന സ്രോതസ്സും ലഭ്യമല്ല < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw arkitettura newrali profonda li tanalizza s-sentenzi fi tliet formaliżmi semantiċi tal-grafika tad-dipendenza. Billi tuża inferenza effiċjenti, kważi fatturata b’ark u LSTM bidirezzjonali magħmul minn perċettur b’diversi saffi, is-sistema bażi tagħna hija kapaċi ttejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-aktar avvanzata għall-analizzazzjoni semantika tad-dipendenza, mingħajr ma tuża karatteristiċi inġinerizzati bl-idejn jew sintaks. Imbagħad nesploraw żewġ approċċi ta’ tagħlim multikompiti – wieħed li jaqsam il-parametri bejn il-formaliżmi, u wieħed li juża strutturi ta’ ordni ogħla biex jipprevedi l-grafiċi b’mod konġunt. Aħna nsibu li ż-żewġ approċċi jtejbu l-prestazzjoni fost il-formaliżmi bħala medja, u jiksbu avvanz ġdid. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa open-source u disponibbli fuq < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur saraf yang mendalam yang menghurai kalimat menjadi tiga formalisme graf dependensi semantik. Dengan menggunakan kesimpulan efisien, hampir-faktor-lengkung dan LSTM bidireksi yang dikomponen dengan perseptron berbilang-lapisan, sistem asas kita mampu meningkatkan keadaan seni secara signifikan untuk penghuraian dependensi semantik, tanpa menggunakan ciri-ciri teknik tangan atau sintaks. Kemudian kami mengeksplorasi dua pendekatan pembelajaran multitugas-satu yang berkongsi parameter melalui formalisme, dan satu yang menggunakan struktur tertib tinggi untuk meramalkan graf bersama-sama. Kami mendapati bahawa kedua-dua pendekatan meningkatkan prestasi melalui formalisme rata-rata, mencapai keadaan baru. Kod kami adalah sumber terbuka dan tersedia di < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein dyp neuralarkitektur som tolkar setningar inn i tre semantiske avhengighetsgrafikkformalisme. Ved å bruka effektivt, nesten arkfaktorert infeksjon og ein bidireksjonal-LSTM som er komprimert med ein fleire lag-perceptron, kan grunnsystemet vårt i stand til å forbetra kunsten for å tolka semantisk avhengighet utan å bruka handingeniverte funksjonar eller syntaks. Vi så utforskar to multioppgåver læring tilnærmingar som deler parametrar gjennom formalisme, og ein som brukar høgare rekkefølgje strukturer for å forventa grafen saman. Vi finn at begge tilnærmingar gjennomsnittlig forbedrar utviklinga over formalisme, og når det gjennomsnittlig oppnår det nye tilstand til kunsten. Koden vårt er open-source og tilgjengeleg på < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o arhitectură neuronală profundă care analizează propozițiile în trei formalisme semantice ale graficului de dependență. Prin utilizarea unei inferențe eficiente, aproape cu factori de arc și a unui LSTM bidirecțional compus cu un perceptron multistrat, sistemul nostru de bază este capabil să îmbunătățească semnificativ starea de vară pentru analizarea dependențelor semantice, fără a utiliza caracteristici sau sintaxă manuală. Apoi explorăm două abordări de învățare multitask-una care împărtășește parametrii în cadrul formalismelor și una care utilizează structuri de ordine superioară pentru a prezice graficele împreună. Considerăm că ambele abordări îmbunătățesc performanța în cadrul formalismelor în medie, atingând o nouă stare de tehnologie. Codul nostru este open-source și disponibil la < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'mn': 'Бид өгүүлбэрийг гурван семантийн хамааралтай график хэлбэрт хуваалцах гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн архитектурыг харуулж байна. Эффектив, бараг арк-факторын халдвар, олон давхар ойлголтын холбоотой холбоотой LSTM-г ашигласнаар бидний суурь систем semantic dependency parsing-ын урлагийн байдлыг сайжруулж чадна. Гараа инженерчлэл болон синтаксис ашиглахгүй. Дараа нь бид олон ажлын суралцах ойлголтыг судалж, нэг нь официализмд параметр хуваалцаж, нэг нь дээд дараагийн бүтэц ашиглаж графикийг хамтдаа таамаглах. Бид хоёр арга барилга нь официализм дээр дундаж үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж, урлагийн шинэ нөхцөлд хүрэх боломжтой. Бидний код нээлттэй эх үүсвэр болон https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy głęboką architekturę neuronową, która analizuje zdania na trzy formalizmy semantycznego wykresu zależności. Dzięki wydajnej, niemal łukowej wnioskowaniu oraz dwukierunkowej LSTM skomponowanej z wielowarstwowym perceptronem, nasz system bazowy jest w stanie znacznie poprawić stan techniki w zakresie analizy zależności semantycznej, bez używania ręcznie inżynierowanych funkcji lub składni. Następnie badamy dwa wielozadaniowe podejścia do uczenia się – jeden, który dzieli parametry w różnych formalizmach i jeden, który wykorzystuje struktury wyższego rzędu do wspólnego przewidywania wykresów. Stwierdzamy, że oba podejścia poprawiają średnio wydajność w formalizmach, osiągając nowy stan techniki. Nasz kod jest open-source i dostępny pod adresem < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ස්ථාපනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම වචන තුනක් සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන්, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අත් ඉංජිනේරිත් විශේෂයෙන් නොප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැත ඊට පස්සේ අපි ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, එක්කෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200d අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා, විද්\u200dයාත් අපේ කෝඩ් තියෙන්නේ විවෘත ස්රෝත් සහ පුළුවන් https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismo aad u dheer oo naxaad ah oo lagu soo bandhigi karo qoraalka kalsoonaanta ah saddex. Sida aad ugu isticmaaleyso faa’iido, xanuuno yar oo ku dhow arc-factor iyo qashin-LSTM oo ku qoran qoraal faro badan, nidaamka aasaasiga ah ayaa si weyn u hagaajin kara xaaladda farshaxanka ku saabsan baarlamaanka semantika, iyadoon isticmaalin tayooyin la qoray ama kaalmeynta. Markaas waxaynu baaraynaa laba qaabab waxbarasho oo kala duduwan oo ah mid qayb ka dhiga parameters oo ku qoran rasmiga kala duduwan, mid isticmaalaya dhismaha sare si uu ugu hor tago sawirada. Waxaynu ognahay in labadoodu ay u soo dhowaadaan inay horumariyaan tababarka rasmiga oo dhan, oo ay gaadhaan xaalad cusub ee farshaxanka. Our code is open-source and available at < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo duboku neuralnu arhitekturu koja analizira rečenice u tri semantičke formalizacije grafika ovisnosti. Koristeći efikasnu, skoro koefikasnu infekciju i bidirektivnu LSTM sastavljenu sa višeslojnim perceptorom, naš bazni sistem može značajno poboljšati stanje umjetnosti za analizu semantičke zavisnosti, bez upotrebe funkcija ili sintakse s rukama. Onda istražujemo dva pristupa učenju multizadataka, jedan koji deli parametre preko formalizma, i jedan koji koristi više redovne strukture da zajedno predviđaju grafike. Nalazimo da obe pristupe poboljšavaju izvedbu preko formalizma u prosjeku, postižeći novo stanje umjetnosti. Naš kod je otvoren izvor i dostupan na < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en djup neural arkitektur som tolkar meningar i tre semantiska beroendegrafformalismer. Genom att använda effektiv, nästan bågfaktorerad inferens och en dubbelriktad LSTM bestående av en flerlagers perceptron kan vårt bassystem avsevärt förbättra det senaste inom semantisk beroendetolkning, utan att använda handkonstruerade funktioner eller syntax. Vi utforskar sedan två metoder för multitasking lärande – en som delar parametrar över formalismer, och en som använder högre ordningsstrukturer för att förutsäga graferna gemensamt. Vi finner att båda tillvägagångssätten förbättrar prestationen över formalismer i genomsnitt och uppnår en ny toppnivå. Vår kod är öppen källkod och finns tillgänglig på < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک عمیق نورول معماری پیش کرتے ہیں جو کلمات کو تین سیمانٹی اعتماد گراف فرمولیسم میں پارس کرتا ہے۔ فعالیت کے ذریعہ، تقریباً arc-factored inference اور ایک دودیر ریچционال-LSTM کے ذریعہ ایک multi layer perceptron کے ساتھ پیدا ہوا ہے، ہماری بنسټ سیستم سیمنٹی کی موقعیت سیمنٹی اعتماد پارسینگ کے لئے بہترین کر سکتا ہے، ہاتھ-انجینر کی فکرت یا سینٹکس کے بغیر. اس کے بعد ہم دو ملتی ٹاکس کی تعلیم کی تقریبا تحقیق کریں گے، ایک جو فرمولیسم میں پارامیٹر شریک کرتا ہے، اور ایک جو گراف کے ساتھ پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے اچھی طرح کی ساختاری استعمال کرتا ہے. ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ دونوں تقریباً فرمولیسم کے متوسط عملکرد کو بہتر کر رہے ہیں، ایک نئی حالت کو پہنچا رہے ہیں۔ ہمارا کوڈ کھلی سورج ہے اور موجود ہے https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு ஆழமான புதிய பாதுகாப்பு உருவாக்கத்தை மூன்று அரை சார்ந்த சார்ந்த வரைபடத்தை வடிவமைப்புகளாக பிரித கிட்டத்தட்ட ஆர்க்காக்கப்பட்ட நோய் மற்றும் பல அடுக்கு கண்டுபிடிப்புடன் ஒன்று சேர்க்கப்பட்ட ஒரு பிடிப்பான- LSTM பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, எங்கள் அடிப்படை அமைப்பு அரைப்புரிமை சார்பு ப நாம் இரண்டு பல் கேட்கிறோம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அளபுருக்களை ஒன்றை தேடுகிறோம். அது வடிவமைப்புகளுக்கு முழுவதும் பகிர்ந்து கொள்கிறத நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் இரண்டு அணுகுகளும் சராசரியான வடிவமைப்புகளில் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, கலை புத எங்கள் குறியீடு திறந்த மூலத்தில் உள்ளது < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'uz': "Biz uchta semantik ishlatuvchi grafik formatlarini ajratish uchun juda yaxshi neyrolik arxituvchini hozir qilamiz. Ko'p qatlam perceptron bilan bir qatlam qo'llangan, arc-faktored infeksiyatli va bir qanchalik LSTM qo'llanmalar bilan qo'llangan xossalari yoki sintaktika yordamida, bizning asosiy tizimimiz semantik ishlatuvchi soniyalarning holatini oshirish mumkin. Keyin biz ikkita ta'lim o'rganishni o'rganish usullarini ko'rib chiqaramiz, bu parametrlarni formatlarda qaytadi va birinchi grafiklarni birlashtirish uchun yuqori tartiblarni ishlatiladi. Biz o'ylaymiz, ikkita ta'siri rasmlarni o'rtacha o'zgartirishni o'zgartiradi, yangi sanani bajarish. Kodlash usuli ochilgan va <da mavjud https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiến trúc thần kinh sâu sắc phân tích câu chữ vào ba phần chính thức của đồ phụ thuộc. Sử dụng hệ thống đa cấp bậc hiệu quả, gần như nhằm tiến hoá hoá hoá quang khối và một hàm phân biệt hai được tạo ra có chất đa cấp, hệ thống cơ bản của chúng ta có thể cải tiến đáng kể trạng thái nghệ thuật phân tích độ phụ thuộc theo ngữ nghĩa, mà không cần sử dụng các tính năng nhân tạo bằng tay hay cú pháp. Sau đó ta nghiên cứu hai phương pháp học tập đa nhiệm chia sẻ các thông số chính thức, và một tiến trình dùng các cấu trúc cao cấp để dự đoán biểu đồ. Chúng tôi thấy cả hai phương pháp đều cải thiện hiệu suất qua các chính thức trên trung bình, đạt được một trạng thái mới. Mật mã của chúng tôi là nguồn mở và có thể dùng https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser -̀.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo duboku neuralnu arhitekturu koja analizira rečenice u tri semantičke formalizme grafika ovisnosti. Koristeći učinkovitu, skoro koeficiranu infekciju i bidirektivnu-LSTM sastavljenu sa višeslojnim perceptorom, naš bazni sustav može značajno poboljšati stanje umjetnosti za analizu semantičke zavisnosti, bez upotrebe funkcija ili sintakse s rukama. Onda istražujemo dva pristupa učenju multizadataka, jedan koji dijeli parametre preko formalizma, i jedan koji koristi višeredne strukture kako bi zajedno predvidjeli grafike. Obojica pristupa poboljšavaju učinkovitost preko formalizma u prosjeku, postići novo stanje umjetnosti. Naš kod je otvoren izvor i dostupan na < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'nl': 'We presenteren een diepe neurale architectuur die zinnen analyseert in drie semantische afhankelijkheidsgrafiekformalismen. Door gebruik te maken van efficiënte, bijna boogfactoreerde inferentie en een bidirectionele LSTM samengesteld uit een meerlaags perceptron, is ons basissysteem in staat om de stand van de techniek voor semantische afhankelijkheidsparsing aanzienlijk te verbeteren, zonder gebruik te maken van hand-engineered functies of syntaxis. Vervolgens verkennen we twee multitask leerbenaderingen: één die parameters deelt over formalismen, en één die structuren van hogere orde gebruikt om de grafieken gezamenlijk te voorspellen. We merken dat beide benaderingen gemiddeld de prestaties van formalismen verbeteren, waardoor een nieuwe stand van de techniek bereikt wordt. Onze code is open source en beschikbaar op < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan arsitektur saraf yang mendalam yang menguji kalimat menjadi tiga formalisme grafik ketergantungan semantis. Dengan menggunakan kesimpulan efisien, hampir faktor-lengkung dan LSTM bidireksi yang terdiri dengan persepton multi-lapisan, sistem dasar kita mampu meningkatkan keadaan seni secara signifikan untuk penghuraian dependensi semantis, tanpa menggunakan ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan atau sintaks. Kemudian kami mengeksplorasi dua pendekatan belajar multitask-satu yang berbagi parameter melalui formalisme, dan satu yang menggunakan struktur tertib tinggi untuk memprediksi grafik bersama-sama. Kami menemukan bahwa kedua pendekatan meningkatkan prestasi melalui formalisme rata-rata, mencapai keadaan baru. Kode kami adalah open-source dan tersedia di < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'ko': '우리는 문장을 세 가지 의미 의존도 형식으로 해석하는 심층적인 신경 구조를 제시했다.효율적인 근사 원호인자 추리와 다중 감지기로 구성된 쌍방향 LSTM을 사용함으로써 우리의 기초 시스템은 의미 의존 해석의 기술 수준을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있으며 수동으로 디자인한 기능이나 문법을 사용하지 않아도 된다.그 다음에 우리는 두 가지 다중 임무 학습 방법을 탐색했다. 하나는 형식적으로 파라미터를 공유하는 것이고, 다른 하나는 고급 구조를 이용하여 연합 예측도를 사용하는 것이다.우리는 이 두 가지 방법이 평균적으로 형식주의의 성능을 높여 새로운 수준에 이르렀다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 코드는 원본입니다. <https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser>.', 'de': 'Wir prรคsentieren eine tiefe neuronale Architektur, die Sรคtze in drei semantische Abhรคngigkeitsdiagrammformalismen parst. Durch die Verwendung effizienter, nahezu bogenfaktorierter Inferenz und eines bidirektionalen LSTM, das aus einem mehrschichtigen Perzeptron besteht, ist unser Basissystem in der Lage, den Stand der Technik fรผr das semantische Dependency Parsing signifikant zu verbessern, ohne handgefertigte Features oder Syntax zu verwenden. Anschlieร\x9fend untersuchen wir zwei Multitask-Lernansรคtze โ\x80\x93 einen, der Parameter รผber Formalismen hinweg teilt, und einen, der Strukturen hรถherer Ordnung verwendet, um die Graphen gemeinsam vorherzusagen. Wir stellen fest, dass beide Ansรคtze die Leistung รผber Formalismen hinweg im Durchschnitt verbessern und einen neuen Stand der Technik erreichen. Unser Code ist Open Source und verfรผgbar unter < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری عصبی عمیق را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cها را به سه گراف رسمی بستگی semantic parsing into three semantic dependency formalism. با استفاده از آلودگی بسیار موثر، تقریباً آلودگی بسیار بسیار بسیار بسیار بسیار موثر و آلودگی-LSTM که با یک تصور بسیار زیادی از لایه\u200cها ساخته شده است، سیستم بنیادی ما قادر است که وضعیت هنری برای تجزیه بسیار بسیار بسیار بسیار زیادی را بدون استفاده از ویژگی\u200cهای دستی سپس دو دستور یادگیری چندین فعالیت را تحقیق می کنیم که پارامترها را در طبق فرمولیسم تقسیم می کند، و یکی که از ساختارهای سفارشی بالاتر برای پیش بینی گرافها با هم استفاده می کند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که هر دوی نزدیک\u200cها عملکرد را در میانگین در میانگین بهبود می\u200cدهند، و به رسیدن یک وضعیت جدید هنر. کد ما منبع باز و موجود است در < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser .', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en dyb neural arkitektur, der fortolker sætninger i tre semantiske afhængighedsgrafformalismer. Ved at bruge effektiv, næsten buefaktoreret inference og en bidirektionel LSTM sammensat med en multi-lags perceptron, vores basissystem er i stand til betydeligt at forbedre den aktuelle tilstand for semantisk afhængighed parsing, uden at bruge håndkonstruerede funktioner eller syntaks. Vi undersøger derefter to multitask læringsmetoder – en, der deler parametre på tværs af formalismer, og en, der bruger højere ordensstrukturer til at forudsige graferne i fællesskab. Vi finder ud af, at begge tilgange i gennemsnit forbedrer ydeevnen på tværs af formalismer og opnår en ny state of te art. Vores kode er open source og tilgængelig på < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'tr': 'Biz sözleri üç semantik baglanşyk grafiklerine çykýan nural arhitektura görkezip otyrys. Iýetersiz, netije arc-faktörlü hasaplamak we köp katlama hasaplamak bilen ýazylan 2-katlama-LSTM, biziň esasy sistemimiz semantik baglanylyk analysiýasy üçin sungatyň durumyny örän gowurap bilýär, elle inženjerilmiş hasaplamak we sintaksy ýok edip bilýär. Sonra bir multitask öwrenmesini formalizm bilen paýaramlary paýlaýan iki golaý öwrenmesini keşfedýäris we bir grafikiň derejesini bir arada öwrenmek üçin ýokaryk düzümlerni ullanýarys. Ikimiz hem ýakynlaşyk formalizmlerde ukyplary ýüzeltýär we sungatyň täze durumyny ýetirmekde. Biziň kodymyz açyk-çeşme we ýerleşýän https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'bg': 'Представяме дълбока невронна архитектура, която анализира изреченията в три формализма на семантична зависимост графика. Чрез използването на ефективно, почти дъгово-факторно заключение и двупосочно-ЛСТМ, съставено с многослоен възприетон възприетон, нашата основна система е в състояние значително да подобри състоянието на техниката за анализиране на семантична зависимост, без да използва ръчно проектирани функции или синтаксис. След това изследваме два подхода за обучение с многозадачи - единият, който споделя параметри между формализмите, и другият, който използва структури от по-висок ред, за да предскаже графиките съвместно. Откриваме, че и двата подхода подобряват средно представянето на формализмите, като постигат ново състояние на изкуството. Нашият код е с отворен код и е достъпен на < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n diep neurale arkitektuur wat die setings in drie semantiese afhanklikheidsgraf formalisme verwerk. Deur te gebruik effektief, amper boek-faktoreerde inferensie en 'n bidirectional-LSTM wat met 'n multi-laag-perceptron gemaak is, is ons basis stelsel in staat om betekenlik die staat van die kuns te verbeter vir semantiese afhanklikheidverwerking sonder te gebruik hand-ingenieërde funksies of sintaks. Ons ondersoek dan twee multitaak leer naby-een wat parameters deel oor formalisme, en een wat hoër volgorde strukture gebruik om die grafieke saamstig te voorskou. Ons vind dat beide naby die prestasie verbeter deur die gemiddelde formalisme, met 'n nuwe staat van die kuns te bereik. Ons kode is open-bron en beskikbaar by < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >", 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha ujenzi wa kina wa neura unaoadhibiti hukumu hizo kwa ufanisi wa picha tatu za kisasa zinazotegemea. Kwa kutumia maambukizi yenye ufanisi, karibu na maambukizi yanayosababishwa na kiasi cha LSTM kilichotengenezwa na mtazamo wa ngazi nyingi, mfumo wetu wa msingi unaweza kuboresha hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kuchimba uchimbaji wa kimapenzi, bila kutumia vifaa vinavyotengenezwa mkono au kodi. Kisha tunachunguza mbili za kujifunza mbili za viwili-moja ambazo huweka parameters across rasmi, na moja inayotumia miundombinu ya juu ya kutabiri picha hizo kwa pamoja. Tunafikiri kwamba mbili hizo mbili zinaweza kuboresha utendaji katika hali ya wastani, kutekeleza hali mpya ya sanaa. Our code is open-source and available at < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'am': 'የጥልቅ የናውሬት መሠረት አካባቢ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በብዙ ደረጃዎች አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በብዙ ደረጃዎች አካባቢ-LSTM በተመሳሳይ፣ የመቀመጫችን ስርዓት የsemantic dependency ማዘጋጀት፣ እጁ-engineered features ወይም ሲንካስር ሳይሆን የዐርቱን ግንኙነት በሙሉ ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ በኋላም ሁለትን ብልሃዊ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሁለታቸው የፍርማት ውጤት በማድረግ፣ አዲስ የዐርብ ሁኔታ እንዲደርስ እናገኛለን፡፡ ኮድ ክፈት https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një arkitekturë të thellë nervore që analizon fjalët në tre formalizma grafike të varësisë semantike. Duke përdorur inferencë efikase, pothuajse me faktor arki dhe një LSTM-dy-drejtues të përbërë me një perceptron shumë-shtresa, sistemi ynë bazë është në gjendje të përmirësojë ndjeshëm gjendjen e artit për analizimin e varësisë semantike, pa përdorur karakteristika të inxhinieruara manuale apo sintaksë. Pastaj eksplorojmë dy metoda mësimi shumëdetyrore-një që ndan parametrat nëpër formalizmet, dhe një që përdor struktura me rend të lartë për të parashikuar grafikët së bashku. We find that both approaches improve performance across formalisms on average, achieving a new state of the art.  Kodi ynë është i hapur dhe i disponueshëm në < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խորը նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որը վերլուծում է նախադասությունները երեք սեմանտիկ կախվածության գրաֆիկական ֆորմալիզմների: Օգտագործելով արդյունավետ, գրեթե արկյան գործոններով եզրակացություն և երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT-ը, որը կազմված է բազմաշերտ ընկալման միջոցով, մեր հիմնական համակարգը կարողանում է նշանակալի բարելավել սեմանտիկ կախվածության վերլուծության տեխնոլոգիան առանց օգտագործելու ձեռքի ճա Այնուհետև մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու բազմախնդիր սովորելու մոտեցում՝ մեկը, որը կիսում է ֆորմալիզմների պարամետրերը, և մեկը, որը օգտագործում է բարձր կարգչային կառուցվածքներ գծագրերը միասին կանխատեսելու համար: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ երկու մոտեցումները բարելավում են ֆորմալիզմների միջին արտադրողականությունը, հասնելով նոր տեխնոլոգիա: Մեր կոդը բաց աղբյուր է և հասանելի է https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser ]:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গভীর নিউরেল কাঠামোর উপস্থাপন করছি যা তিনটি সেম্পেন্টিক নির্ভরিত গ্রাফ ফরমালিস্মে পার্স করে। কার্যকর ব্যবহার করে, প্রায় আর্ক-ফাক্টরের সংক্রান্ত আক্রান্ত এবং একটি বিদ্যুৎ-এলএসএমএস, যা বহু স্তরের প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে, আমাদের বেস সিস্টেম সেমেন্টিক নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং এর অবস্থা  তারপর আমরা দুটি মাল্টিউটিশিক্ষা শিক্ষা শিক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে খুঁজে বের করি- একটি যা ফরমালিজমের পার্মিটার ভাগাভাগি করে, আর একটি যা উচ্চ ক আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে দুজনের কাছে সাধারণত ফর্মিলিস্মের বিভিন্ন কাজের উন্নতি পাওয়া যায়, আর এই শিল্পের নতুন পরিস আমাদের কোড খোলা উৎস এবং পাওয়া যাচ্ছে < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo duboku neuralnu arhitekturu koja analizira rečenice u tri semantičke formalizacije grafika ovisnosti. Koristeći efikasnu, skoro koefikasnu infekciju i bidirektivnu LSTM sastavljenu sa višeslojnim perceptorom, naš bazni sistem može značajno poboljšati stanje umjetnosti za analizu semantičke zavisnosti, bez upotrebe funkcija ili sintakse s rukama. Onda istražujemo dva pristupa učenju multizadataka, jedan koji dijeli parametre preko formalizma, i jedan koji koristi više redovne strukture kako bi zajedno predvidjeli grafike. Nalazimo da obe pristupe poboljšavaju učinkovitost preko formalizma u prosjeku, ostvarivajući novo stanje umjetnosti. Naš kod je otvoren izvor i dostupan na < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser - Da.', 'cs': 'Představujeme hlubokou neuronovou architekturu, která analyzuje věty do tří formalismů sémantických grafů závislosti. Použitím efektivního, téměř obloukového faktoru inference a obousměrného LSTM složeného s vícevrstvým perceptronem je náš základní systém schopen výrazně zlepšit stav techniky pro analýzu sémantické závislosti bez použití ručně vytvořených funkcí nebo syntaxe. Poté zkoumáme dva multiúlohové učební přístupy – jeden, který sdílí parametry napříč formalismy a jeden, který používá struktury vyššího řádu k předpovědi grafů společně. Zjišťujeme, že oba přístupy v průměru zlepšují výkonnost napříč formalismy a dosahují nového stavu techniky. Náš kód je open-source a dostupný na adrese < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'et': 'Esitleme sügavat neuroarhitektuuri, mis parsib laused kolmeks semantiliseks sõltuvusgraafiks. Kasutades tõhusat, peaaegu kaarfaktoriga järeldust ja kahesuunalist LSTM-i, mis koosneb mitmekihilisest perceptronist, suudab meie baassüsteem oluliselt parandada semantilise sõltuvuse parsimise tehnikat, kasutamata käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioone või süntaksit. Seejärel uurime kahte mitme ülesandega õppimise lähenemisviisi - üks, mis jagab parameetreid formaalsuste vahel ja teine, mis kasutab kõrgema järjekorra struktuure graafikute ühiseks prognoosimiseks. Leiame, et mõlemad lähenemisviisid parandavad tulemuslikkust läbi formaalsuse keskmiselt, saavutades uue tehnika taseme. Meie kood on avatud lähtekoodiga ja saadaval aadressil < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme syvän neuroarkkitehtuurin, joka jäsentää lauseet kolmeen semanttiseen riippuvuusgrafin formalismiin. Käyttämällä tehokasta, lähes kaarikertoitua päättelyä ja monikerroksisella perceptronilla varustettua kaksisuuntaista LSTM-menetelmää perusjärjestelmämme pystyy merkittävästi parantamaan semanttisen riippuvuuden jäsentämisen nykytilaa käyttämättä käsin suunniteltuja ominaisuuksia tai syntaksia. Tämän jälkeen tutkimme kahta monitehtäväoppimista, joista toinen jakaa parametrit formalismien kesken ja toinen käyttää korkeampia rakenteita kuvaajien yhteiseen ennustamiseen. Molemmat lähestymistavat parantavat suoritusta muodollisuuksien välillä keskimäärin ja saavuttavat uuden tekniikan tason. Koodimme on avoimen lähdekoodin ja saatavilla osoitteessa < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'az': 'Biz cümlələri üç semantik bağımlılıq grafından ayıran nürol arhitektarını göstəririk. Etkinlik, az qala arc-faktörlü infeksiyon və çoxlu-katlı görünümlü bir LSTM istifadə edərək, bizim baz sistemimiz semantik bağımlılıq analizi üçün sanatın durumunu çox yaxşılaşdıra bilər, əl-inženjerli özellikləri və sintaksi istifadə etmədən. Sonra iki çoxlu işin öyrənməsini araşdırırıq, birini formalizm arasında parametrləri paylaşır, birini də grafikləri birlikdə öyrənmək üçün daha yüksək səviyyə qurular istifadə edir. Hər ikimiz də formalizm arasındakı işləri ortalamaqla yaxşılaşdırır, sanatın yeni durumunu başa düşər. Bizim kodumuz açıq-kaynaq və faydalanır < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'ca': "Presentam una arquitectura neuronal profunda que analitza frases en tres formalismes de gràfic de dependencia semàntica. Utilitzant inferència eficient i gairebé arc-factored i una LSTM bidireccional composta amb un perceptor de múltiples capes, el nostre sistema de base pot millorar significativament l'estat d'art per l'analització semàntica de la dependencia, sense utilitzar característiques o sintaxis de mà. Després explorem dos enfocaments d'aprenentatge multitasca: un que comparteix paràmetres a través dels formalismes, i un que utilitza estructures d'ordre superior per predir els gràfics conjuntament. We find that both approaches improve performance across formalisms on average, achieving a new state of the art.  Our code is open-source and available at < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.", 'ha': "Tuna halatar da bakin littãfin neura wanda ke parse azãba cikin fassarar grafi uku na semantic. Ina yi amfani da shi kafi mai amfani da shi, nesti ana kasar-arc-factored da wani LSSM wanda aka haɗa da wani daraja mai yawa, ma'anar basalinmu yana iya ƙaranci halin sanar wa parse na semantic, ko kuma bã ya yi amfani da wasu mistakardar-wanda aka yi samarwa da hannun-na-ƙaranci ko na syntacin. Sa'an nan kuma muna jarraba biyu masu multi'in da za'a karanta hanyoyin ta-one wanda ke raba parameters a kowace formalism, kuma guda na yi amfani da tsarin masu sarrafa dõmin ya yi bayani ga grafyutan da ake haɗa. Muna gane cewa dukansu sunã ƙari mafarinta a kan fassarar formalism da kawaici, zuwa wani halin sanar. Kowanmu yana da buɗe-source kuma yana da < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה עצבית עמוקה שמעבירת משפטים לשלושה רשמיות גרף תלויות סמנטיות. באמצעות השימוש בהנחה יעילה, כמעט מוגדרת בצינוק, ו-LSTM בידריקציונית מורכבת עם פרספקטרון רב-שכבות, מערכת הבסיס שלנו מסוגלת לשפר באופן משמעותי את מצב האומנות עבור בדיקת תלויות סמנטית, מבלי להשתמש בכישורים או סינטקס המהנדסים יד. ואז אנו חוקרים שני גישות לימוד רבות משימות אחד שמחלקים פרמטרים ברחבי הפורמליזמים, ואחד שמשתמש במבנים סדר גבוה יותר כדי לחזות את הגרפים ביחד. אנחנו מוצאים ששני גישות משתפרות ביצועים בין רשמיות בממוצע, להשיג מצב חדש של האמנות. הקוד שלנו הוא מקור פתוח זמין ב < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Taning Awak dhéwé éntuk nglebokake sistem sing sampeyan banter Awak dhéwé ngerasah karo hal-hal sing luwih nggawe gerakan kanggo tukang mrogram kuwi mesthi, lan ijol-ijolan winih sing berarti. Kita kotas menyang open-source lan didasar < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་རྐང་འདི་semantic རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་སྒོ་རྩིས་ཤིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ནུས་པ་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དུ་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ nearly arc-factored inference་དང་bidirectional-LSTM་ཞིག་གིས་ས multi-layer perceptron་དང་ཅིག་ཁར་བྱུང་བའི་རྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་semantic རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ལ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་འཁོད་སྐྱོང་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུད་ཚད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྩལ་གཞུང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་རག་རྒྱུ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྩིས་ཁ་ཕྱེས་དང་ཐོག་མའི་ཁུངས་དང་འདུག < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo globoko nevronsko arhitekturo, ki razdeli stavke v tri semantične grafske formalizme odvisnosti. Z uporabo učinkovitega, skoraj obločnega faktorja sklepanja in dvosmernega LSTM, sestavljenega z večplastnim perceptorjem, lahko naš osnovni sistem bistveno izboljša najsodobnejše razčlenitve semantične odvisnosti brez uporabe ročno izdelanih funkcij ali sintakse. Nato raziščemo dva pristopa učenja z večopravili – enega, ki deli parametre med formalizmi, in drugega, ki uporablja strukture višjega reda za skupno napovedovanje grafov. Ugotavljamo, da oba pristopa v povprečju izboljšujeta uspešnost preko formalizmov in dosegata novo stanje tehnike. Naša koda je odprtokodna in je na voljo na < https://github.com/Noahs-ARK/NeurboParser >.'}
{'en': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de representação de palavras aprimorado com sememas', 'ar': 'تحسين تعلم تمثيل الكلمات مع Sememes', 'fr': 'Apprentissage amélioré de la représentation des mots avec Sememes', 'es': 'Aprendizaje mejorado de representación de palabras con Sememes', 'ja': 'セム語による単語表現学習の向上', 'zh': '用Sememes改单词示学', 'ru': 'Улучшенное обучение представлению слов с помощью Sememes', 'hi': 'Sememes के साथ बेहतर Word प्रतिनिधित्व सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Feabhsaithe ar Léiriú Focal le Sememes', 'ka': 'სემებით უფრო მეტადებული სიტყვების გამოსწავლება', 'el': 'Βελτιωμένη εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης λέξεων με Sememe', 'hu': 'Javított szóreprezentációs tanulás a Sememes segítségével', 'lt': 'Geresnis žodžių atstovavimas Mokymasis su semimais', 'it': "Migliorato l'apprendimento della rappresentazione delle parole con Sememes", 'mk': 'Подобрена претстава на зборови', 'ms': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'ml': 'സെമെമ്മുകളുമായി പഠിക്കുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'kk': 'Сөздерді таңдау көмегімен үйрену', 'pl': 'Ulepszone uczenie się reprezentacji słowa za pomocą Sememów', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea învățării reprezentării cuvintelor cu Sememes', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлний төлөөлөл суралцах', 'no': 'Utbedra ordreprezentasjon med semier', 'sr': 'Poboljšan predstavnik reèi učenje sa Sememima', 'si': 'සේමීස් එක්ක සුදුසුම් වචන පිළිගන්නය', 'so': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'sv': 'Förbättrat Word Representation Learning med Sememes', 'ta': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'ur': 'Sememes کے ساتھ استعمال کی کلمات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học thuyết thuyết phục đối với Sememe', 'nl': 'Verbeterd leren van woordvertegenwoordiging met Sememes', 'hr': 'Poboljšan predstavnik riječi učenje s semima', 'bg': 'Подобрено обучение за представяне на думи със семем', 'da': 'Forbedret Word Representation Learning med Sememes', 'de': 'Verbessertes Lernen der Wortdarstellung mit Sememe', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya Tamko ya Kujifunza kwa Mitandao', 'ko': '의소를 이용하여 단어 표징 학습을 개선하다', 'fa': 'نمایش کلمات بهتر یادگیری با سیم\u200cها', 'tr': 'Ewir ködlemeler bilen gelişmiş söz temsilcisi öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Improved Word Representation Learning with Sememes', 'af': 'Verbeter Woordvoorstelling Leer met Sememes', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Սեմերի միջոցով սովորելը բառերի ներկայացման բարելավված', 'az': 'Semeyl톛rl톛 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'Poboljšan predstavnik riječi učenje sa semima', 'id': 'Pertimbangan Perkataan Terbaik Belajar dengan Sememes', 'cs': 'Vylepšené učení reprezentace slova pomocí sémémů', 'et': 'Täiustatud sõna esindamise õppimine Sememes', 'ca': 'millor representació de paraules aprenent amb Sememes', 'fi': 'Parannettu sanaedustuksen oppiminen Sememesin avulla', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করা শব্দের প্রতিনিধি', 'he': 'מייצג מילים משפר ללמוד עם סמימס', 'jv': 'word representation', 'sk': 'Izboljšano učenje predstavljanja besed s Sememes', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡར་རྒྱས་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཁང་གི་སྔོན་ཅན་གྱི་ཤེས་འཇོག་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ།'}
{'en': 'Sememes are minimum semantic units of word meanings, and the meaning of each word sense is typically composed by several sememes. Since sememes are not explicit for each word, people manually annotate word sememes and form linguistic common-sense knowledge bases. In this paper, we present that, word sememe information can improve word representation learning (WRL), which maps words into a low-dimensional semantic space and serves as a fundamental step for many NLP tasks. The key idea is to utilize word sememes to capture exact meanings of a word within specific contexts accurately. More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts. We conduct experiments on two tasks including word similarity and word analogy, and our models significantly outperform baselines. The results indicate that WRL can benefit from sememes via the attention scheme, and also confirm our models being capable of correctly modeling sememe information.', 'ar': 'إن sememes هي وحدات دلالية دنيا لمعاني الكلمات ، وعادة ما يتكون معنى كل كلمة من عدة أنصاف. نظرًا لأن sememes ليست واضحة لكل كلمة ، يقوم الأشخاص بالتعليق يدويًا على sememes وتشكيل قواعد المعرفة اللغوية المنطقية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم أن معلومات الكلمة sememe يمكن أن تحسن تعلم تمثيل الكلمات (WRL) ، الذي يرسم الكلمات في مساحة دلالية منخفضة الأبعاد ويعمل كخطوة أساسية للعديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. الفكرة الأساسية هي استخدام أنصاف الكلمات لالتقاط المعاني الدقيقة للكلمة ضمن سياقات محددة بدقة. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نتبع إطار عمل Skip-gram ونقدم ثلاثة نماذج شبه مشفرة لتعلم تمثيلات sememes والحواس والكلمات ، حيث نطبق مخطط الانتباه لاكتشاف حواس الكلمات في سياقات مختلفة. نجري تجارب على مهمتين بما في ذلك تشابه الكلمات وقياس الكلمات ، وتتفوق نماذجنا بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس. تشير النتائج إلى أن WRL يمكن أن تستفيد من sememes عبر مخطط الانتباه ، وتؤكد أيضًا أن نماذجنا قادرة على نمذجة معلومات sememe بشكل صحيح.', 'pt': 'Sememas são unidades semânticas mínimas de significados de palavras, e o significado de cada sentido de palavra é tipicamente composto por vários sememas. Como os sememas não são explícitos para cada palavra, as pessoas anotam manualmente os sememas das palavras e formam bases de conhecimento linguísticas de senso comum. Neste artigo, apresentamos que a informação de sememas de palavras pode melhorar o aprendizado de representação de palavras (WRL), que mapeia palavras em um espaço semântico de baixa dimensão e serve como uma etapa fundamental para muitas tarefas de PNL. A ideia-chave é utilizar sememas de palavras para capturar os significados exatos de uma palavra dentro de contextos específicos com precisão. Mais especificamente, seguimos o framework de Skip-gram e apresentamos três modelos codificados por sememas para aprender representações de sememas, sentidos e palavras, onde aplicamos o esquema de atenção para detectar sentidos de palavras em vários contextos. Conduzimos experimentos em duas tarefas, incluindo semelhança de palavras e analogia de palavras, e nossos modelos superam significativamente as linhas de base. Os resultados indicam que WRL pode se beneficiar de sememas por meio do esquema de atenção, e também confirmam que nossos modelos são capazes de modelar corretamente informações de sememas.', 'es': 'Los sememes son unidades semánticas mínimas de los significados de las palabras, y el significado de cada sentido de la palabra generalmente está compuesto por varios sememes. Como los sememes no son explícitos para cada palabra, las personas anotan manualmente los sememes de palabras y forman bases de conocimientos lingüísticos de sentido común. En este artículo, presentamos que la información de sememe de palabras puede mejorar el aprendizaje de representación de palabras (WRL), que mapea las palabras en un espacio semántico de baja dimensión y sirve como un paso fundamental para muchas tareas de PNL. La idea clave es utilizar sememes de palabras para capturar con precisión los significados exactos de una palabra dentro de contextos específicos. Más específicamente, seguimos el marco de Skip-gram y presentamos tres modelos codificados por sememes para aprender representaciones de sememes, sentidos y palabras, donde aplicamos el esquema de atención para detectar los sentidos de las palabras en varios contextos. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en dos tareas, incluidas la similitud de palabras y la analogía de palabras, y nuestros modelos superan significativamente las líneas de base. Los resultados indican que WRL puede beneficiarse de los sememes a través del esquema de atención, y también confirman que nuestros modelos son capaces de modelar correctamente la información del sememe.', 'fr': "Les sémèmes sont des unités sémantiques minimales de la signification des mots, et le sens de chaque mot est généralement composé de plusieurs sémèmes. Comme les sèmes ne sont pas explicites pour chaque mot, les personnes annotent manuellement les sèmes de mots et forment des bases de connaissances linguistiques de bon sens. Dans cet article, nous présentons que les informations sémantiques de mots peuvent améliorer l'apprentissage de la représentation des mots (WRL), qui mappe les mots dans un espace sémantique de faible dimension et constitue une étape fondamentale pour de nombreuses tâches de PNL. L'idée clé est d'utiliser des sémèmes de mots pour saisir avec précision la signification exacte d'un mot dans des contextes spécifiques. Plus précisément, nous suivons le cadre de Skip-gram et présentons trois modèles codés par des sémèmes pour apprendre des représentations de sémèmes, de sens et de mots, où nous appliquons le schéma d'attention pour détecter les sens des mots dans divers contextes. Nous menons des expériences sur deux tâches, notamment la similitude des mots et l'analogie des mots, et nos modèles surpassent largement les niveaux de référence. Les résultats indiquent que WRL peut bénéficier des sémèmes via le schéma d'attention, et confirment également que nos modèles sont capables de modéliser correctement les informations des sémèmes.", 'ja': 'セムは、単語の意味の最小の意味単位であり、各単語の意味は通常、いくつかのセムで構成されています。 セムは単語ごとに明示的ではないため、人々は手動で単語セムに注釈を付け、言語共通感覚知識ベースを形成する。 本稿では、単語セメム情報は、単語を低次元の意味空間にマッピングし、多くのNLPタスクの基本的なステップとして機能する、単語表現学習（ WRL ）を改善することができることを提示する。 鍵となるアイデアは、特定の文脈内の単語の正確な意味を正確に把握するために単語セミメを利用することです。 より具体的には、私たちはスキップグラムの枠組みに従い、セメム、感覚、および単語の表現を学習するための3つのセメム符号化モデルを提示します。ここでは、注意スキームを適用して、さまざまな文脈で単語の感覚を検出します。 私たちは、単語の類似性と単語の類似性を含む2つのタスクの実験を行い、私たちのモデルはベースラインを大幅に上回っています。 結果は、WRLが注意スキームを介してセムから利益を得ることができることを示し、また、私たちのモデルがセム情報を正しくモデリングすることができることを確認します。', 'hi': 'Sememes शब्द अर्थ की न्यूनतम शब्दार्थ इकाइयां हैं, और प्रत्येक शब्द अर्थ का अर्थ आमतौर पर कई sememes द्वारा बनाया जाता है। चूंकि sememes प्रत्येक शब्द के लिए स्पष्ट नहीं हैं, इसलिए लोग मैन्युअल रूप से शब्द sememes को एनोटेट करते हैं और भाषाई सामान्य ज्ञान ज्ञान के आधार बनाते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम प्रस्तुत करते हैं कि, शब्द सेमेम जानकारी शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने (डब्ल्यूआरएल) में सुधार कर सकती है, जो शब्दों को कम आयामी शब्दार्थ स्थान में मैप करती है और कई एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए एक मौलिक कदम के रूप में कार्य करती है। मुख्य विचार विशिष्ट संदर्भों के भीतर एक शब्द के सटीक अर्थों को सटीक रूप से कैप्चर करने के लिए शब्द सेमेम्स का उपयोग करना है। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम स्किप-ग्राम के ढांचे का पालन करते हैं और सेमेम, इंद्रियों और शब्दों के प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने के लिए तीन सेमेम-एन्कोडेड मॉडल पेश करते हैं, जहां हम विभिन्न संदर्भों में शब्द इंद्रियों का पता लगाने के लिए ध्यान योजना लागू करते हैं। हम शब्द समानता और शब्द सादृश्य सहित दो कार्यों पर प्रयोग करते हैं, और हमारे मॉडल बेसलाइन को काफी बेहतर बनाते हैं। परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि WRL ध्यान योजना के माध्यम से sememes से लाभ उठा सकता है, और यह भी पुष्टि करता है कि हमारे मॉडल सही ढंग से मॉडलिंग sememe जानकारी में सक्षम होने की पुष्टि करते हैं।', 'zh': 'Sememes者,单词义之至小语义,每单词之义,常以数sememes成之。 sememes非单词所明,故手动注单词sememes成言知识库。 单词语义信可改单词示学(WRL),映单词低维语义间,以为NLP务。 意者,用单词sememes特定上下文之正单词也。 更具体地说,循Skip-gram之框架,立三sememe编码以学sememe,senses单词之表,宜留意方案以检上下文单词。 实验于两任,单词相似性比于单词,形胜于基线。 结果表明,WRL可以意方益sememes,而证吾所以正建模sememe信。', 'ru': 'Семемы - это минимальные семантические единицы значений слов, и значение каждого смысла слов обычно состоит из нескольких семем. Поскольку семемы не являются явными для каждого слова, люди вручную аннотируют семемы слов и формируют лингвистические базы знаний общего смысла. В этой работе мы представляем, что семенная информация слова может улучшить обучение представлению слов (WRL), которое отображает слова в низкоразмерное семантическое пространство и служит фундаментальным шагом для многих задач NLP. Ключевая идея заключается в том, чтобы использовать семантику слов для точного определения точного значения слова в определенных контекстах. Более конкретно, мы следуем рамкам Skip-gram и представляем три семенокодированные модели для изучения представлений о семенах, чувствах и словах, где мы применяем схему внимания для обнаружения чувств слова в различных контекстах. Мы проводим эксперименты по двум задачам, включая сходство слов и аналогию слов, и наши модели значительно превосходят базовые. Результаты показывают, что WRL может извлекать выгоду из семен через схему внимания, а также подтверждают, что наши модели способны правильно моделировать семенную информацию.', 'ga': 'Is aonaid shéimeantacha íosta de bhrí na bhfocal iad seames, agus is iondúil go mbíonn roinnt seimeanna comhdhéanta de chiall gach focal. Ós rud é nach bhfuil seiméimí sainráite do gach focal, déanann daoine nótaí focal de láimh agus cruthaíonn siad boinn eolais teangeolaíochta de chiall choiteann. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair gur féidir le faisnéis sememe focal feabhas a chur ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta focal (WRL), a mapálann focail isteach i spás shéimeantach íseal-tríthoiseach agus feidhmíonn sé mar chéim bhunúsach do go leor tascanna NLP. Is é an príomhsmaoineamh ná úsáid a bhaint as seimemes focal chun bríonna beachta focal a ghabháil go cruinn laistigh de chomhthéacsanna ar leith. Go sonrach, leanaimid creat Skip-gram agus cuirimid trí mhúnla leath-ionchódaithe i láthair chun léiriúcháin de sheimimeanna, de chéadfaí agus de fhocail a fhoghlaim, áit a gcuirimid an scéim aird i bhfeidhm chun céadfaí focal a bhrath i gcomhthéacsanna éagsúla. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar dhá thasc lena n-áirítear cosúlacht focal agus analaí focal, agus sáraíonn ár múnlaí na bunlínte go suntasach. Tugann na torthaí le fios gur féidir le WRL leas a bhaint as seimemes tríd an scéim aird, agus deimhníonn siad freisin go bhfuil ár múnlaí in ann faisnéis sheimeme a shamhaltú i gceart.', 'ka': 'Sememes არის სიტყვის სიმბოლოების მინიმანტიური სიმბოლოების ერთეულები, და ყოველ სიტყვის სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბო ვიდრე სემები არ განსხვავებულია ყოველ სიტყვის, ადამიანები მანძილურად ამბობენ სიტყვის სემები და ფორმები სიტყვის საერთო სიტყვის მეცნიერების ბაზი. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სიმბოლობის სიმბოლობის ინფორმაცია შეუძლია გაუკეთოთ სიმბოლობის განსწავლებას (WRL), რომელიც სიმბოლობის შესახებ ცომენტიკური სიმბოლობში დაკაპოთ მნიშვნელოვანი იდეა, რომ სიტყვის სემების გამოყენება, რომელიც სიტყვის მნიშვნელოვანია განსაკუთრებული კონტექსტის შორის მნიშვნელოვანია. უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ Skip-gram-ის ფრამეტრის და ჩვენ სამი სემემე-კოდირებული მოდელების გამოყენება, რომ სემების, სიგრძნების და სიტყვების გამოყენება ვისწავლოთ, სადაც ჩვენ აყენებ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტებზე გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც სიტყვების სხვადასხვა და სიტყვების ანალოგია, და ჩვენი მოდელები ძ წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ WRL შეუძლია სემების გამოიყენება აღმოჩენების სქემით, და ასევე ჩვენი მოდელების შესაძლებლობა სემემის ინფორმაციის მართლად მოდელურება.', 'hu': 'A szemémék a szó jelentésének minimális szemantikai egységei, és minden szó jelentése jellemzően több szemémből áll. Mivel a szemek nem kifejezettek minden szóra, az emberek manuálisan jegyzetelnek szemeket, és nyelvi józan ész tudásbázisokat alakítanak ki. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogy a szó sememe információja javíthatja a szó reprezentációs tanulását (WRL), amely a szavakat alacsony dimenziós szemantikai térbe térképezi, és alapvető lépésként szolgál számos NLP feladat számára. A kulcsfontosságú ötlet az, hogy a szószemeket használjuk arra, hogy pontosan rögzítsük egy szó pontos jelentését konkrét kontextusokban. Pontosabban a Skip-gram keretrendszerét követjük, és bemutatjuk három szemes-kódolt modellt, hogy megtanuljuk a szemek, érzékek és szavak ábrázolását, ahol a figyelmet alkalmazzuk a szó érzékeinek érzékelésére különböző kontextusokban. Két feladaton végzünk kísérleteket, beleértve a szóhasonlóságot és a szóanalógiát is, és modelleink jelentősen felülmúlják az alapvető teljesítményeket. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a WRL a figyelem sémán keresztül hasznos lehet a szemekből, és megerősítik, hogy modelleink képesek a szemekből származó információk megfelelő modellezésére.', 'el': 'Τα σπερματοζωάρια είναι ελάχιστες σημασιολογικές μονάδες εννοιών λέξεων, και η έννοια κάθε λέξης έννοιας συνήθως αποτελείται από διάφορα σιμώματα. Δεδομένου ότι τα semems δεν είναι ρητά για κάθε λέξη, οι άνθρωποι σχολιάζουν χειροκίνητα τα semems λέξεων και σχηματίζουν γλωσσικές βάσεις γνώσης κοινής λογικής. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ότι, οι πληροφορίες των λέξεων μπορούν να βελτιώσουν τη μάθηση αναπαράστασης λέξεων (η οποία χαρτογραφεί τις λέξεις σε έναν σημασιολογικό χώρο χαμηλής διάστασης και χρησιμεύει ως θεμελιώδες βήμα για πολλές εργασίες. Η βασική ιδέα είναι η χρήση λέξεων για να συλλάβει ακριβείς έννοιες μιας λέξης μέσα σε συγκεκριμένα πλαίσια με ακρίβεια. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, ακολουθούμε το πλαίσιο του και παρουσιάζουμε τρία κωδικοποιημένα σεμμέ μοντέλα για να μάθουμε αναπαραστάσεις των σειμμάτων, των αισθήσεων και των λέξεων, όπου εφαρμόζουμε το σχήμα προσοχής για την ανίχνευση των αισθήσεων λέξεων σε διάφορα πλαίσια. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε δύο εργασίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ομοιότητας λέξεων και της αναλογίας λέξεων, και τα μοντέλα μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις γραμμές βάσης. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η WRL μπορεί να επωφεληθεί από τα σιμώματα μέσω του σχήματος προσοχής, και επίσης επιβεβαιώνουν ότι τα μοντέλα μας είναι σε θέση να μοντελοποιήσουν σωστά τις πληροφορίες των σιμάτων.', 'lt': 'Semenos yra minimalūs semantiniai žodžio reikšmės vienetai, o kiekvieno žodžio reikšmės reikšmė paprastai susideda iš kelių spermų. Since sememes are not explicit for each word, people manually annotate word sememes and form linguistic common-sense knowledge bases.  In this paper, we present that, word sememe information can improve word representation learning (WRL), which maps words into a low-dimensional semantic space and serves as a fundamental step for many NLP tasks.  Pagrindinė idėja yra tiksliai panaudoti žodžių spermą, kad būtų galima tiksliai surinkti tikslią žodžio reikšmę konkrečiose aplinkybėse. Konkrečiau, mes sekame Skip-gram sistemą ir pateikiame tris spermos koduotus modelius, kad išmoktume atspindėti spermą, jausmus ir žodžius, kur taikome dėmesio schemą, kad aptiktume žodžių jausmus įvairiomis aplinkybėmis. Eksperimentuojame dviem užduotimis, įskaitant žodžių panašumą ir žodžių analogiją, ir mūsų modeliai gerokai viršija bazines linijas. Rezultatai rodo, kad VRL gali pasinaudoti sperma pagal dėmesio schemą ir taip pat patvirtina, kad mūsų modeliai gali tinkamai modeliuoti spermos informaciją.', 'kk': 'Sememes - сөздердің сөздердің мазмұның төменгі семантикалық бірлігі, әрбір сөздердің мазмұның мазмұнын әдетте бірнеше семемлерден құрылады. Семмелер әрбір сөз үшін түсінікті емес семмелерді қолмен жазып, лингвистикалық түсінікті білім негізін түсіндіреді. Бұл қағазда, сәемінің мәліметі сөздерді көрсетуге болады. Бұл сөздерді сөздерді өзгерту оқытуға (WRL) жақсартуға болады. Бұл сөздерді өте өлшемі семантикалық орынға картап, NLP тапсырмаларыны Негізгі идея - сөздің семейлерін тәуелді мәліметтерінің дұрыс мәліметін түсіру үшін қолдану. Көбірек, біз Skip-gram бағдарламасына қарап, семемлер, сезімдер және сөздердің түсініктемелерін үйрену үшін үш семемдегі кодталған моделдерді келтіріп, сөздердің түсініктемелерін үйренеміз. Біз сөздердің сезімд Біз екі тапсырма туралы тәжірибелер және сөздердің аналогиясы және үлгілеріміздің негізгі сызықтардан артық болады. Нәтижелер жасалған болса, WRL семемдердің сұлбасы арқылы, сондай-ақ біздің үлгілеріміздің семемдердің мәліметін дұрыс үлгілеу мүмкіндігін тексеруге болады.', 'it': "I sememi sono unità semantiche minime dei significati delle parole, e il significato di ogni senso di parola è tipicamente composto da diversi sememi. Poiché i sememi non sono espliciti per ogni parola, le persone annotano manualmente i sememi di parole e formano basi linguistiche di buon senso. In questo articolo, presentiamo che, le informazioni di parola sememe possono migliorare l'apprendimento della rappresentazione delle parole (WRL), che mappa le parole in uno spazio semantico a bassa dimensione e serve come passo fondamentale per molte attività NLP. L'idea chiave è quella di utilizzare parole sememes per catturare con precisione i significati esatti di una parola all'interno di contesti specifici. Più specificamente, seguiamo il framework di Skip-gram e presentiamo tre modelli codificati sememe per imparare le rappresentazioni di sememe, sensi e parole, dove applichiamo lo schema di attenzione per rilevare i sensi delle parole in vari contesti. Conduciamo esperimenti su due compiti tra cui la somiglianza delle parole e l'analogia delle parole, e i nostri modelli superano significativamente le linee di base. I risultati indicano che WRL può beneficiare di sememe attraverso lo schema di attenzione, e confermano anche che i nostri modelli sono in grado di modellare correttamente le informazioni sememe.", 'mk': 'Семемите се минимални семантични единици на значење на зборовите, а значењето на секој збор е обично составено од неколку семеми. Since sememes are not explicit for each word, people manually annotate word sememes and form linguistic common-sense knowledge bases.  Во овој весник, го претставуваме тоа, информациите за зборовите семејства можат да го подобрат учењето за репрезентација на зборовите (WRL), кое ги мапира зборовите во нискодимензионален семантичен простор и служи како фундаментален чекор за многу NLP задачи. Клучната идеја е да се искористат зборовите семејства за прецизно да се фатат точните значења на зборот во специфични контексти. Поконкретно, ја следиме рамката на Skip-gram и претставуваме три модели кодирани со семето за да научиме претставувања на семето, сетила и зборови, каде што ја применуваме шемата на внимание за детектирање на зборни сетила во различни контексти. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на две задачи вклучувајќи сличност на зборовите и аналогија на зборовите, и нашите модели значително ги надминуваат основните линии. Резултатите покажуваат дека ВРЛ може да има корист од семето преку шемата на внимание, и исто така потврдуваат дека нашите модели се способни да правилно моделираат информации за семето.', 'mn': 'Sememes are minimum semantic units of word meanings, and each word sense is typically composed by several sememes. Хүмүүс үг бүрт тарианы тухай тодорхойлж чадахгүй учраас хүмүүс зэрэг зэрэг хэлбэрийн мэдлэг үндсэн хэлбэрүүдийн тухай анзаарч байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлбэрээр хэмжээсүүдийн мэдээлэл нь үг илэрхийлэл суралцах боломжтой. Энэ нь үгсийг бага хэмжээсүүд хэмжээсүүд орон зайд газрын зураг зурж, NLP ажиллагааны үндсэн алхам болгож байна. Үнэндээ гол санаа нь тодорхой нөхцөл байдлын дотор үгийн зөв утгыг барьж авахын тулд зөв хэлбэрүүдийг хэрэглэх юм. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид Skip-gram-ын хэлбэрийг дагаж, хэлбэрээр хэлбэрийн мэдрэмжүүдийг олохын тулд 3 семемийн кодлогдсон загварыг суралцах хэрэгтэй. Бид хоёр даалгаварын туршилтыг хийдэг. Үнэндээ адилхан, үг аналогийг хийдэг. Үр дүнд WRL нь анхаарлын төлөвлөгөөс үрээс ашиг авч чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бидний загваруудыг зөв хэмжээний мэдээллийг зөв загварчлах боломжтой гэдгийг тодорхойлж чадна.', 'ml': 'വാക്കിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും കുറഞ്ഞത് സെമാന്റിക് യൂണിറ്റുകളാണ്. ഓരോ വാക്കിന്റെയും അര്\u200dത്ഥം സാധാരണ പല സെമെമ്മു എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ആളുകള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ സെമീമിനെ കൈകാര്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ സാധാരണ അറിവുകളുടെ അട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിളിക്കുന്നു, വാക്ക് സെമേമ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള പഠനത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d  പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം കൃത്യമായി പിടികൂടാന്\u200d വാക്ക് സെമീമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ് പ More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts.  രണ്ട് ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളുടെ അന്യായോജിയും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡ അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d WRL സെമീമില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകാരം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന പദ', 'ms': 'Semem adalah unit semantik minimum makna perkataan, dan makna setiap makna perkataan biasanya dikomponen oleh beberapa semen. Oleh kerana semen tidak jelas untuk setiap perkataan, orang secara manual anotasi semen perkataan dan membentuk pangkalan pengetahuan bahasa yang masuk akal. In this paper, we present that, word sememe information can improve word representation learning (WRL), which maps words into a low-dimensional semantic space and serves as a fundamental step for many NLP tasks.  The key idea is to utilize word sememes to capture exact meanings of a word within specific contexts accurately.  Lebih khususnya, kita mengikuti kerangka Skip-gram dan mempersembahkan tiga model yang terkod-semen untuk belajar perwakilan semen, perasaan dan kata-kata, di mana kita melaksanakan skema perhatian untuk mengesan perasaan perkataan dalam berbagai konteks. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua tugas termasuk persamaan perkataan dan analogi perkataan, dan model kami jauh lebih daripada garis dasar. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa WRL boleh mengambil manfaat dari semen melalui skema perhatian, dan juga mengesahkan model kita mampu untuk memmodelkan maklumat semen dengan betul.', 'mt': 'Is-sememi huma unitajiet semantiċi minimi ta’ tifsira tal-kelma, u t-tifsira ta’ kull sens tal-kelma hija tipikament komposta minn diversi sememi. Peress li s-semen mhumiex espliċiti għal kull kelma, in-nies jinnutaw manwalment is-semen tal-kelma u jiffurmaw bażi lingwistika ta’ għarfien ta’ sens komuni. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw li l-informazzjoni dwar is-semem tal-kelma tista’ ttejjeb it-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza tal-kelma (WRL), li timmappa l-kliem fi spazju semantiku b’dimensjoni baxxa u sservi bħala pass fundamentali għal ħafna kompiti tal-NLP. The key idea is to utilize word sememes to capture exact meanings of a word within specific contexts accurately.  B’mod aktar speċifiku, issegwi l-qafas ta’ Skip-gram u nippreżentaw tliet mudelli kkodifikati bis-semen biex nitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-semen, is-sensi u l-kliem, fejn napplikaw l-iskema ta’ attenzjoni biex jinstabu s-sensi tal-kliem f’diversi kuntesti. We conduct experiments on two tasks including word similarity and word analogy, and our models significantly outperform baselines.  Ir-riżultati jindikaw li d-WRL tista’ tibbenefika mis-semen permezz tal-iskema ta’ attenzjoni, u jikkonfermaw ukoll li l-mudelli tagħna huma kapaċi jimmudellaw b’mod korrett l-informazzjoni dwar is-semen.', 'no': 'Sememer er minste semantiske einingar med ordbetingelsar, og betingelsen av kvar ordfølelse er normalt lagt av fleire sememer. Sidan semene ikkje er eksplisitt for kvar ord, vil folk manuelt merke på ordsemene og form linguistiske felles kunnskapsbaser. I denne papiret viser vi at ordsememinformasjonen kan forbetra ordrepresentasjonen (WRL), som karterer ord til eit lavdimensjonalt semantisk plass og tjener som ein grunnleggjande steg for mange NLP-oppgåver. Nøkkelideen er å bruka ordsemeter for å henta nøyaktig betydning av eit ord i spesifikke kontekstar. Meir spesifikke, følgjer vi rammeverket for Hopp-gram og presenterer tre semenkoderte modeller for å lære representasjonar av semeter, senter og ord, der vi bruker oppmerksområdet for å finna ordsensar i ulike kontekstar. Vi gjer eksperimenter på to oppgåver, inkludert ordsimilaritet og ordanalogi, og våre modeller utfører betydelig grunnlinjer. Resultatet tyder på at WRL kan nytte frå semene via oppmerksområdet, og også bekrefter at modelane våre kan rett modellere sememinformasjonen.', 'pl': 'Sememy są minimalnymi semantycznymi jednostkami znaczenia słowa, a znaczenie każdego zmysłu słowa składa się zazwyczaj z kilku sememów. Ponieważ semmy nie są wyraźne dla każdego słowa, ludzie ręcznie adnotatują semmy słowa i tworzą językowe bazy wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy, że informacje sememe słowa mogą usprawnić uczenie się reprezentacji słów (WRL), które mapuje słowa w niskowymiarową przestrzeń semantyczną i służy jako podstawowy krok dla wielu zadań NLP. Kluczową ideą jest wykorzystanie słowa semems do dokładnego uchwycenia znaczenia słowa w określonych kontekstach. W szczególności podążamy za ramami Skip-gram i prezentujemy trzy modele zakodowane semem, aby uczyć się reprezentacji sememów, zmysłów i słów, w których stosujemy schemat uwagi do wykrywania zmysłów słowa w różnych kontekstach. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty nad dwoma zadaniami, w tym podobieństwem słów i analogią słów, a nasze modele znacznie przewyższają linie bazowe. Wyniki wskazują, że WRL może korzystać z sememów poprzez schemat uwagi, a także potwierdzają zdolność naszych modeli do poprawnego modelowania informacji sememów.', 'ro': 'Sememele sunt unități semantice minime de semnificații de cuvânt, iar semnificația fiecărui sens de cuvânt este compusă de obicei din mai multe sememe. Deoarece sememele nu sunt explicite pentru fiecare cuvânt, oamenii adnotează manual sememele de cuvânt și formează baze lingvistice de cunoștințe de bun simț. În această lucrare, prezentăm că, informațiile sememe cuvinte pot îmbunătăți învățarea reprezentării cuvintelor (WRL), care cartografiază cuvintele într-un spațiu semantic cu dimensiuni reduse și servește ca un pas fundamental pentru multe sarcini PNL. Ideea cheie este de a utiliza sememe de cuvânt pentru a capta cu exactitate sensurile exacte ale unui cuvânt în contexte specifice. Mai precis, urmărim cadrul Skip-gram și prezentăm trei modele codificate sememe pentru a învăța reprezentări sememe, simțuri și cuvinte, unde aplicăm schema de atenție pentru a detecta simțurile cuvântului în diferite contexte. Realizăm experimente pe două sarcini, inclusiv similaritatea cuvintelor și analogia cuvintelor, iar modelele noastre depășesc semnificativ liniile de bază. Rezultatele indică faptul că WRL poate beneficia de sememe prin intermediul schemei de atenție și, de asemenea, confirmă modelele noastre fiind capabile să modeleze corect informațiile sememe.', 'sr': 'Seme su minimalne semantičke jedinice značenja riječi, a značenje svakog osjećaja riječi obično sastavlja nekoliko seme. Pošto seme nisu objašnjenje za svaku reè, ljudi ruèno annotiraju rijeèi seme i formiraju jezičke baze znanja zajedničkog smisla. U ovom papiru predstavljamo da riječi seme mogu poboljšati učenje predstavljanja reči (WRL), koja mapira reči u nisko dimenzionalno semantički prostor i služi kao osnovni korak za mnoge NLP zadatke. Ključna ideja je da upotrebimo seme reèi da bi precizno uhvatili taèno znaèenje reèi u odreðenim kontekstima. Posebnije, pratimo okvir Skip-grama i predstavljamo tri sememo-kodirane modele kako bi naučili predstavljanje seme, oseæanja i reèi, gde primjenjujemo pažnju za otkrivanje čula reèi u različitim kontekstima. Mi vodimo eksperimente na dva zadatka uključujući sličnost riječi i analogiju riječi, i naše modele značajno iznose osnovne linije. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WRL može iskoristiti seme putem pažnje, a takođe potvrđuje da naši modeli mogu ispravno modelirati seme informacije.', 'si': 'සෙමීම්ස් වචන අදහස් වගේ අනුමුණ සෙමැන්ටික් යුනිටික්, හැම වචන අදහස් වගේ අදහස් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සෙම්මීම් වල සීමියෝ හැම වචනයක්ම විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ, මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසික වචනය සහ භාෂාවික සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න අධාර්\u200dය මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ, වචන සෙමේම් තොරතුරු වචන සිදුවීම් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් වචන සිදුවීමක් විශේෂය කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒකෙන් වචන් පහ යතුරු අදහසය තමයි විශේෂ සංවේදනයේ වචන විශේෂ අදහසක් වචනය අල්ලගන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ස්කිප්-ග්\u200dරාම් ග්\u200dරාම් වලගේ පරීක්ෂණය පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් සිමේම් කොඩ් තුන් මොඩල් තියෙන්නේ සිමේම්, සංවේදන, වච අපි පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වචනය සහ වචනය විශේෂතාවය සමග, අපේ මොඩේල් විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන් පරී ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ විදිහට විදිහට විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අවධානය සැකසුම් වලින් විදිහට, ස', 'so': 'Xilliyadu waa noocyada ugu yaraan ee macnaheedu waa noocyo semantic ah, micnaheeduna waa sida caadiga ah waxay ku kooban yihiin sememes. Sida darteed sawirada aan loo caddeyn hadal kastaba, dadku waxay si rasmi ah u dhibaateeyaan hadalka, waxayna sameeyaan aasaaska aqoonta afka oo dhan. Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa, macluumaadka sememe ee hadalka waxaa lagu hagaajin karaa barashada hadalka la dhiganayo (WRL), kaas oo ku sawira hadalka oo u bedela goob hoos u dhexeeya oo u adeega tallaabo aasaasi ah shaqooyin badan oo NLP ah. Fikirada muhiimka ah waa in lagu isticmaalo sawirro hadal ah si sax ah ugu qabsado micneheeda ereyga ee ku jirta qoraal gaar ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu raacaynaa sawirada Skip-gram, waxaana keenaynaa saddex noocyo oo sawir ah si aynu u barno noocyada sawirada, xisaabta iyo hadallada, meesha aan ku dalbanno qorshaha jimicsiga si aan u ogaano sanooyin kala duduwan. Waxaynu sameynaa jirrabo labada shaqo, kuwaas oo ah hadal isku mid ah iyo hadal wax u eg, tusaalayaashaadana si weyn ayaannu u sameynaa saldhigyada hoose. Abaalka waxaa loola jeedaa in WRL looga faa’iido karo sawir ah qorshaha daryeelka, wuxuuna sidoo kale ku xaqiijin karaa qaababkayaga si saxda ah u sameyn karo macluumaadka sememe.', 'sv': 'Sememes är minimala semantiska enheter av ordbetydelser, och innebörden av varje ordmening består vanligtvis av flera sememes. Eftersom sememen inte är explicita för varje ord, kommenterar människor ord sememen manuellt och bildar språkliga sunt förnuft kunskapsbaser. I denna uppsats presenterar vi att word sememe information kan förbättra word representation learning (WRL), vilket kartlägger ord i ett lågdimensionellt semantiskt utrymme och fungerar som ett grundläggande steg för många NLP-uppgifter. Nyckelidén är att använda ord sememes för att fånga exakta betydelser av ett ord inom specifika sammanhang korrekt. Mer specifikt följer vi ramen för Skip-gram och presenterar tre sememekodade modeller för att lära oss representationer av sememer, sinnen och ord, där vi tillämpar uppmärksamhetsschemat för att upptäcka ordsinnen i olika sammanhang. Vi utför experiment på två uppgifter inklusive ordlikhet och ordanalogi, och våra modeller presterar betydligt bättre än baslinjerna. Resultaten indikerar att WRL kan dra nytta av sememes via uppmärksamhetsschemat, och bekräftar också att våra modeller kan modellera sememeinformation korrekt.', 'ta': 'பெயர் ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தைக்கும் அமைப்புகள் வெளிப்படையாக இல்லையென்றால், மக்கள் கைமுறையாக வார்த்தைகளை வெளிப்படுத்தி மொழி இந்த காகிதத்தில், வார்த்தை பேமீம் தகவல் வார்த்தை பிரதிநிதிய படிப்பு (WRL) மேம்படுத்த முடியும். அது சொற்களை குறைந்த பரிமாற்று இடைவெளியில் வரைபடம The key idea is to utilize word sememes to capture exact meanings of a word within specific contexts accurately.  மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஸ்கிப்- கிராமின் சட்டத்தைப் பின்பற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் மூன்று பெம்குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகளை காண்பிக்க முடியும் மற்று வார்த்தையும் வார்த்தையும் ஆராய்ச்சியையும் சேர்த்து இரு செயல்களில் சோதனைகளைச் செய்கிறோம், மற்றும் எங்கள்  முடிவு', 'ur': 'سومیز کلمات معنی کی کم سیمنٹی یونیٹ ہیں، اور ہر کلمات معنی کی معنی بہت سی سیمیوں سے پیدا ہوتی ہے. اس وجہ سے کہ سیم ہر کلم کے لئے واضح نہیں ہیں، لوگوں نے کلم سیم کو اپنا ذهن دکھا لیا ہے اور زبان سمجھ سمجھ کے علم کی بنیاد بنا لیا ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کلمات سیم کی معلومات کلمات کی تعلیم (WRL) کو بہتر کر سکتی ہے جو کلمات کو کم اندازے کی سیمانٹی جگہ میں نقشه بناتا ہے اور بہت سی NLP کے کاموں کے لئے بنیادی قدم بناتا ہے۔ کلید ایڈیون یہ ہے کہ کلمات سیمیوں کا استعمال کرنا ہے کہ ایک کلمات کا دقیق معنی مضبوط طور پر پکڑے۔ اور زیادہ مخصوص، ہم اسکیپ-گرم کے فرمیک کے پیچھے چلتے ہیں اور تین سیم-کڈ موڈل کے پیچھے چلتے ہیں کہ سیم، سنسوں اور کلمات کی تعلیمات سکونت کریں، جہاں ہم کلمات سنسوں کو مختلف کنٹکسٹوں میں پہچان سکتے ہیں۔ ہم دو کاموں پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کی برابری اور کلمات کی برابری میں شامل ہوتے ہیں اور ہمارے نمونے بنیادی لینوں سے بہت اضافہ کرتے ہیں۔ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ WRL سومیوں سے توجه طریقے سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے، اور ہمارے نمڈلوں کو بھی تصدیق کرتا ہے کہ سیمیمو معلومات کو درست نمودار کرنے کے قابل ہیں.', 'vi': 'Tinh dịch là những đơn vị nhỏ nhất của ý nghĩa từ, và ý nghĩa của mỗi từ là ý nghĩa thường được tạo ra bởi nhiều thành viên. Vì các triệu tập không ghi rõ từng từ, người ta sẽ tự ghi chú các từ ngữ để tạo ra các căn cứ kiến thức ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra rằng, từ sememe thông tin có thể cải thiện học về ngôn ngữ phân biệt từ (WRL), nó vẽ bản đồ từ vào một mặt ngữ văn học nhỏ chiều không gian, và phục vụ như một bước cơ bản cho nhiều công việc dĩa âm. Chủ đề chính xác là sử dụng các từ để thu thập ý nghĩa chính xác của một từ trong các ngữ cảnh cụ thể. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi theo bộ dạng của Skip-p và giới thiệu ba mẫu đã mã hóa thành đơn để học các biểu tượng các triệu tập, các giác quan và các từ, nơi chúng tôi áp dụng chương trình chú ý để phát hiện các từ ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm trên hai nhiệm vụ bao gồm từ giống nhau và từ so sánh, và các mẫu của chúng tôi hoàn toàn vượt trội. Kết quả cho thấy WRL có thể hưởng lợi từ các thành viên thông qua bộ chăm chú, và cũng xác nhận các mẫu của chúng tôi có khả năng mô phỏng thông tin thành dạng đúng.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Chunki semizlar har bir so'z uchun faqat emas, odamlar qo'lbola so'zlarning sememlarini tahlil qiladi va tillarda umumiy ma'lumot asosini yaratadi. Bu hujjatda biz shunday qilamiz, so'zning semem maʼlumotini o'rganish (WRL) ta'limni oshirish mumkin. Bu so'zlarni kichkina semantik romaniga qaraydi va bir necha NLP vazifalar uchun asosiy qadam qiladi. Keyingi g'oya bu so'zlar sememetlaridan foydalanish mumkin, bu so'zning ma'nosini aniqlash mumkin. Ko'pchilik, Skip-gram freymini qo'shishimiz va uchta semem kodlash modellarini hozir qilamiz va semem, sans va so'zlarning xususiyatlarini o'rganish uchun uchta modellarni ko'rsamiz. Bu yerda biz har xil tartiblarda so'zlarni aniqlash uchun foydalanish qolipini foydalanamiz. Biz ikkita vazifalar bilan bir tajribani bajaramiz, so'z o'xshash va so'zning analog kabi, va modellarimiz asosiy sonlarini bajaradi. @ info", 'hr': 'Seme su minimalne semantičke jedinice značenja riječi, a značenje svakog osjećaja riječi obično sastoji nekoliko seme. Budući da seme nisu objašnjenje za svaku riječ, ljudi ručno annotiraju riječi seme i formiraju jezičke baze znanja zajedničkog smisla. U ovom papiru predstavljamo da riječi sememe informacije mogu poboljšati učenje predstavljanja riječi (WRL), koja mapira riječi u niskodimenzionalni semantički prostor i služi kao osnovni korak za mnoge NLP zadatke. Ključna ideja je iskoristiti riječi seme kako bi precizno uhvatili to čne značenje riječi u određenim kontekstima. Posebno slijedimo okvir Skip-grama i predstavljamo tri semeokodirana modela kako bi naučili zastupanje seme, čula i riječi, gdje primjenjujemo pažnju za otkrivanje čula riječi u različitim kontekstima. Provodimo eksperimente na dva zadatka uključujući sličnost riječi i analogiju riječi, i naše modele značajno iznosi početne linije. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WRL može iskoristiti seme putem pažnje, te potvrđuje i naše modele koji su sposobni ispravno modelirati seme informacije.', 'bg': 'Семемите са минимални семантични единици на значението на думата, а значението на всеки смисъл на думата обикновено се състои от няколко семеми. Тъй като семемите не са изрични за всяка дума, хората ръчно анотират думите семеми и формират езикови бази знания за здрав разум. В настоящата статия представяме, че информацията може да подобри обучението за представяне на думи (което картографира думите в нискоизмерно семантично пространство и служи като фундаментална стъпка за много задачи по НЛП. Ключовата идея е да се използват думични семеми, за да се улови точните значения на дадена дума в конкретни контексти точно. По-конкретно, следваме рамката на Скип-грам и представяме три семем-кодирани модела за изучаване на представи на семеми, сетива и думи, където прилагаме схемата на внимание за откриване на словни сетива в различни контексти. Провеждаме експерименти по две задачи, включително сходство с думи и аналогия с думи, и нашите модели значително надминават базовите линии. Резултатите показват, че могат да се възползват от семем чрез схемата за внимание, а също така потвърждават, че нашите модели са способни да моделират правилно семем информация.', 'da': 'Sememes er mindste semantiske enheder af ordbetydninger, og betydningen af hver ordbetydning er typisk sammensat af flere sememes. Da sememes ikke er eksplicit for hvert ord, noterer folk manuelt ord sememes og danner sproglige vidensbaser for sund fornuft. I denne artikel præsenterer vi, at ord sememe information kan forbedre ordrepræsentation læring (WRL), som kortlægger ord ind i et lavdimensionelt semantisk rum og tjener som et grundlæggende skridt for mange NLP-opgaver. Nøgleideen er at bruge ord sememes til at fange nøjagtige betydninger af et ord inden for specifikke sammenhænge præcist. Mere specifikt følger vi rammerne af Skip-gram og præsenterer tre sememe-kodede modeller for at lære repræsentationer af sememe, sanser og ord, hvor vi anvender opmærksomhedsskemaet til at detektere ordsanser i forskellige sammenhænge. Vi udfører eksperimenter på to opgaver, herunder ordlighed og ordanalogi, og vores modeller overgår væsentligt baselines. Resultaterne indikerer, at WRL kan drage fordel af sememes via opmærksomhedsskemaet, og også bekræfter, at vores modeller er i stand til korrekt modellering af sememes information.', 'nl': 'Sememen zijn minimale semantische eenheden van woordbetekenissen, en de betekenis van elke woordzin is meestal samengesteld uit verschillende sememen. Omdat sememen niet expliciet zijn voor elk woord, maken mensen handmatig aantekeningen van woord sememen en vormen ze taalkundige kennisbases met gezond verstand. In dit artikel stellen we voor dat woordsememe-informatie het leren van woordrepresentatie (WRL) kan verbeteren, dat woorden in een laagdimensionale semantische ruimte in kaart brengt en dient als een fundamentele stap voor veel NLP-taken. Het belangrijkste idee is om woord semmes te gebruiken om exacte betekenissen van een woord binnen specifieke contexten nauwkeurig vast te leggen. Meer specifiek volgen we het kader van Skip-gram en presenteren drie sememe-gecodeerde modellen om representaties van sememen, zintuigen en woorden te leren, waarbij we het aandachtsschema toepassen om woordzintuigen in verschillende contexten te detecteren. We voeren experimenten uit op twee taken, waaronder woordgelijkenis en woordanalogie, en onze modellen presteren aanzienlijk beter dan basislijnen. De resultaten geven aan dat WRL kan profiteren van sememen via het aandachtsschema, en bevestigen ook dat onze modellen in staat zijn om sememe informatie correct te modelleren.', 'de': 'Sememe sind minimale semantische Einheiten von Wortbedeutungen, und die Bedeutung jedes Wortsinns wird typischerweise aus mehreren Sememen zusammengesetzt. Da Sememe nicht explizit für jedes Wort sind, kommentieren Menschen Wortsememe manuell und bilden linguistische Wissensgrundlagen für gesunden Menschenverstand. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir vor, dass Wortsememe-Information das Lernen von Wortrepräsentationen (WRL) verbessern kann, das Wörter in einen niederdimensionalen semantischen Raum abbildet und als grundlegender Schritt für viele NLP-Aufgaben dient. Die Schlüsselidee besteht darin, Wortsememe zu verwenden, um genaue Bedeutungen eines Wortes innerhalb bestimmter Kontexte genau zu erfassen. Genauer gesagt folgen wir dem Rahmen von Skip-gram und präsentieren drei semem-codierte Modelle, um Repräsentationen von Semmen, Sinnen und Wörtern zu lernen, wobei wir das Aufmerksamkeitsschema anwenden, um Wortsinne in verschiedenen Kontexten zu erkennen. Wir führen Experimente an zwei Aufgaben durch, darunter Wortähnlichkeit und Wortanalogie, und unsere Modelle übertreffen die Grundlinien deutlich. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass WRL von Sememe über das Aufmerksamkeitsschema profitieren kann und bestätigen auch, dass unsere Modelle in der Lage sind, Sememe-Informationen korrekt zu modellieren.', 'id': 'Sememes are minimum semantic units of word meanings, and the meaning of each word sense is typically composed by several sememes.  Karena semen tidak jelas untuk setiap kata, orang secara manual anotasi semen kata dan membentuk dasar pengetahuan bahasa yang masuk akal. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan bahwa, informasi kata semem dapat meningkatkan penemuan kata representation learning (WRL), yang memetakan kata-kata ke ruang semantis dimensi rendah dan melayani sebagai langkah dasar untuk banyak tugas NLP. Ide kunci adalah menggunakan semen kata untuk menangkap makna tepat dari kata dalam konteks spesifik dengan akurat. Lebih spesifik, kami mengikuti rangkaian Skip-gram dan mempersembahkan tiga model yang terkode semen untuk belajar persembahan semen, sens dan kata, di mana kami menerapkan skema perhatian untuk mendeteksi sens kata dalam berbagai konteks. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua tugas termasuk persamaan kata dan analogi kata, dan model kami jauh lebih dari garis dasar. The results indicate that WRL can benefit from sememes via the attention scheme, and also confirm our models being capable of correctly modeling sememe information.', 'ko': '의소는 어의의 가장 작은 의미 단위로 모든 어의의 의미는 보통 몇 개의 의소로 구성된다.모든 단어의 의소가 명확하지 않기 때문에 사람들은 수동으로 단어의 의소를 표시하여 언어 상식 지식 라이브러리를 형성한다.본고에서 우리는 단어 의소 정보가 단어 표징 학습(WRL)을 개선하고 단어를 저차원 의미 공간에 비추며 많은 NLP 임무의 기본 절차로 삼을 수 있다고 주장했다.그 핵심 사상은 어휘의 의소를 이용하여 특정 언어 환경에서 단어의 정확한 의미를 정확하게 포착하는 것이다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 Skipgram의 구조에 따라 세 가지 의소 인코딩 모델을 제시하여 의소, 감각과 단어의 표시를 학습했다. 그 중에서 우리는 주의 모델을 응용하여 각종 언어 환경에서의 의미를 측정했다.우리는 두 가지 임무에서 단어의 유사성과 단어의 유비를 포함하여 실험을 진행했는데 우리의 모델은 기선보다 현저히 우수하다.그 결과 WRL은 주의 메커니즘을 통해 의소에서 이익을 얻을 수 있고 우리의 모델이 의소 정보를 정확하게 모델링할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'سیم\u200cها حداقل واحدهای سیمانتیک معنی\u200cهای کلمه هستند، و معنی هر احساس کلمه معمولاً توسط چند سیم\u200cها ساخته می\u200cشود. به خاطر اینکه سیم\u200cها برای هر کلمه واضح نیستند، مردم به دستی سیم\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها را اظهار می\u200cکنند و پایگاه دانش\u200cهای معمولی زبان\u200cشناسی می\u200cسازند. در این کاغذ، ما نشان می دهیم که، اطلاعات سیمیم کلمه می تواند یادگیری نمایش کلمه (WRL) را بهتر کند، که کلمه ها را به یک فضای سیمانتیک کم بعدی نقشه می دهد و به عنوان قدم بنیادی برای بسیاری از کارهای NLP خدمت می کند. ایده کلیدی این است که استفاده از سیم\u200cهای کلمه برای گرفتن معنی دقیق یک کلمه در موقعیت خاص دقیق است. دقیقاً ما چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را روی دو کار انجام می\u200cدهیم که شامل شباهت کلمه\u200cها و شباهت کلمه\u200cها و مدل\u200cهای ما خیلی بیشتر از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهند. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که WRL می\u200cتواند با طریق برنامه توجه به سود برساند و همچنین مدل\u200cهای ما را تایید کند که قادر به درستی مدل کردن اطلاعات سیم\u200cها هستند.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ni vitengo vya ngono vya chini vya maana ya maneno, na maana ya kila maneno yanajumuisha kwa kawaida na sememe kadhaa. Kwa kuwa semeo hazina wazi kwa kila neno, watu wanaudhi maneno ya maneno na kutengeneza msingi wa maarifa ya lugha inayofahamika. Katika gazeti hili, tunaeleza kwamba, taarifa za maneno inaweza kuboresha ujumbe wa kujifunza maneno (WRL), ambayo inaramani maneno katika nafasi ya sekta ya chini na inatumika kama hatua ya msingi kwa kazi nyingi za NLP. Wazo muhimu ni kutumia semeo za maneno ili kukutana maana sahihi ya neno ndani ya migogoro maalumu. Zaidi zaidi, tunafuatilia mfumo wa picha za Skip na tunaweka mitindo mitatu ya sememe iliyoandikwa ili kujifunza uwakilishi wa sememe, hisia na maneno, ambapo tunatumia mpango wa ufuatiliaji wa kutambua hisia za maneno katika mikakati mbalimbali. Tunafanya majaribio katika kazi mbili ikiwa ni pamoja na maneno yanayofanana na uchambuzi wa maneno, na mifano yetu inatoa msingi. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa WRL inaweza kufaidika na mipango ya ufuatiliaji, na pia inathibitisha mifano yetu ya kuwa na uwezo wa kutengeneza taarifa sahihi za sememe.', 'tr': "Semantik sanlaryň iň az semantik sanlary söz anlamlyklarynyň bir näçesi, we her söz duýgunyň bir näçe seme tarapynda ýazylýar. Semeler her söz üçin açık däldigini bilýän adamlar elimden semeleri duýýarlar we dil duýguny bilgi tabanlaryny şekillendirler. Bu kagyzda semem maglumaty kelime öwrenmegi (WRL) sözlerini a şak ölçüli semantik boýunça görkezip biler we NLP işleri üçin esasy adım bolar. Açyk ideýa spesifikalarda dakyk bir sözüň närazyny tapmak üçin sözlerni ullanmakdır. Diňe belli bolsa, biz Skip-gram'yň çerçevesini diňleýäris we görnüş semeler, duýgular we sözlerin temsillerini öwrenmek üçin üç seme-kodlemeli modellerini tapdyrys. Biz sözlerin duýgularyny aňlamak üçin üns taslamasyna uyýarys. Biz iki görev üzerinde kelime benzetimi ve kelime analojisi dahil sınamalar yapıyoruz ve modellerimiz basit hatlarıyla daha önemli çözüyoruz. netijeler bolup WRL semeleriň üns taslamasyndan fayda berip biljekdigini görkezýär we hem modellerimiziň seme informasiýasyny dogry modelleşdirmegi mümkin edip biljekdigini takyklaýarlar.", 'sq': 'Sememet janë njësi minimale semantike të kuptimeve të fjalës, dhe kuptimi i çdo kuptimi të fjalës është tipikisht përbërë nga disa sememe. Meqë spermat nuk janë të qarta për çdo fjalë, njerëzit anotojnë me dorë fjalën sperma dhe formojnë baza gjuhësore të njohurive të kuptimit të përbashkët. In this paper, we present that, word sememe information can improve word representation learning (WRL), which maps words into a low-dimensional semantic space and serves as a fundamental step for many NLP tasks.  Ideja kyçe është të përdorësh spermën e fjalës për të kapur me saktësi kuptimet e një fjale brenda konteksteve të caktuara. More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts.  Ne kryejmë eksperimente në dy detyra duke përfshirë ngjashmërinë e fjalëve dhe analogjinë e fjalëve, dhe modelet tona tejkalojnë ndjeshëm linjat bazë. Rezultatet tregojnë se WRL mund të përfitojë nga sperma nëpërmjet skemës së vëmendjes dhe gjithashtu konfirmojnë se modelet tona janë në gjendje të modelojnë saktësisht informacionin e spermës.', 'am': 'የቃላት አካላዊ የቋንቋ አካላዊ ተቃውሞ የሚታመሙ ናቸው፣ የሁሉም ቃላት አስተዋይ በተለየ ብዙዎች የተሰናዳ ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እውቀት መቀመጫዎችን በመፍጠር የሚችሉ ሲሆኑ ለሁሉም ቃላት አይገልጹም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የንግግር የሴሜን መረጃ ትምህርት ትምህርት ማድረግ (WRL) ይሻላል፡፡ ይህም ቃላትን ወደ ታናሽ የsemantic ስፋት ያሳርጋል እናም ለብዙዎች የNLP ስራቶች የዋና ደረጃን እንዲያገለግል ነው፡፡ የኩነቱ አሳብ ቃላት ሰሜሞን በመጠቀም በተለያዩ ሁኔታዎች ውስጥ ያሉትን ቃላትን በአስቸጋሪነት ለመያዝ ነው፡፡ More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts.  ቃሎችን እና ቃሎችን ትክክል እና ምናልዮችን እና ምሳሌዎቻችንን በሥርዓት ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቱም WRL ከሴሜል የሚጠቅመው ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "Sememes is minimale semantiese eenhede van woord betekening, en die betekening van elke woord sins is tipies geskep deur verskeie sememes. Omdat sememes nie uitduidelik is vir elke woord nie, moet mense manueel woorde sememes en die vorm van lingwisiese gemeenskaplike-sens kennis bases annoteer. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel dat, woord sememe inligting kan verbeter woord verteenwoording leer (WRL), wat kaart woorde in 'n lae-dimensie semantiese spasie en dien as 'n fundamentele stap vir baie NLP-taak. Die sleutel idee is om woord sememes te gebruik om presies betekening van 'n woord binne spesifieke kontekste presies te vang. More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts. Ons doen eksperimente op twee taak insluitend woord gelykenis en woord analogie en ons modele betekeurig uitvoer basisline. Die resultate wys dat WRL kan voordeel van sememes deur die aanmerking skema, en ook bevestig ons modele wat moontlik is om korrek sememie inligting te modelleer.", 'hy': 'Սեմեմերը բառի իմաստության միմինիմալ սեմանտիկ միավորներ են, և յուրաքանչյուր բառի իմաստության իմաստը սովորաբար կազմում է մի քանի սեմեմեր: Քանի որ սերմերը յուրաքանչյուր բառի համար բացահայտ չեն, մարդիկ ձեռքով գրում են սերմերը և ձևավորում են լեզվաբանական գիտելիքների հիմքեր: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք, որ բառի սեմերի ինֆորմացիան կարող է բարելավել բառի ներկայացման ուսումնասիրությունը, որը քարտեզագրում է բառերը ցածր չափերի սեմանտիկ տարածքում և ծառայում է որպես հիմնական քայլ շատ ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների համար: Հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ օգտագործենք բառերի սերմերը, որպեսզի ճշգրիտ ընկալենք բառի ճշգրիտ իմաստը որոշակի կոնտեքստներում: More specifically, we follow the framework of Skip-gram and present three sememe-encoded models to learn representations of sememes, senses and words, where we apply the attention scheme to detect word senses in various contexts.  Մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ երկու խնդիրների վրա, ներառյալ բառի նմանությունը և բառի նմանությունը, և մեր մոդելները նշանակաբար գերազանցում են հիմնական գծերը: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ՀԱԿ-ը կարող է շահույթ ունենալ սերմերից ուշադրության ծրագրի միջոցով, ինչպես նաև հաստատում է, որ մեր մոդելները կարող են ճիշտ մոդելավորել սերմերի տեղեկատվությունը:', 'az': 'Semələr söz anlamının minimal semantik birikləridir, hər söz anlamının anlamı genellikle bir neçə semə ilə oluşur. Səmlər hər söz üçün açıq deyildiklərinə görə, insanlar elə sözlər semlərini məhv edir və dillərin orta fikirli bilgi bazları yaradırlar. Bu kağızda, sözlərin seme informasiyası sözlərin öyrənməsini yaxşılaşdırır (WRL), sözləri a şağı ölçülük semantik kosmosa yerləşdirir və NLP işlərinin çoxluğu üçün fundamental adım olar. Anahtar fikri məqsədilə məqsədilə bir sözün tam anlamını almaq üçün sözlərin semlərini istifadə etməkdir. Daha çox xüsusiyyətli, Skip-gram framework ünün ardınca gedirik və müxtəlif məsələlərdə söz duygularını keşfetmek üçün üç semə kodlanmış modelleri öyrənirik. Biz iki işdə imtahan edirik, sözlərin bənzərini və sözlərin analogisini də, modellərimiz əsas səhifələri də çox üstün edir. Sonuçları göstərir ki, WRL semlərdən gözləmə taslağı vasitəsilə fayda verə bilər, həmçinin modellərimizi də doğru modelləşdirə bilər.', 'ca': "Els semimes són unitats semàntiques mínimes de significat de paraula, i el significat de cada sentit de paraula està típicament compost per diversos semimes. Com que els semes no són explícits per cada paraula, la gent anota manualment les paraules semes i formen bases lingüístices de coneixement de sentit comú. En aquest paper, presentem que la informació del seme de paraules pot millorar l'aprenentatge de representació de paraules (WRL), que mapeix les paraules en un espai semàntic de baixa dimensió i serveix com un pas fonamental per a moltes tasques del NLP. La idea clau és utilitzar els semes de paraules per capturar exactament els significats d'una paraula en contextes específics. Més concretament, seguim el marc de Skip-gram i presentem tres models codificats per a aprendre representacions de semes, sentits i paraules, on aplicam l'esquema d'atenció per detectar sentits de paraules en diversos contextos. Fem experiments en dues tasques, com la similitud de paraules i la analogia de paraules, i els nostres models superen significativament les línies de base. Els resultats indican que la LPD pot beneficiar dels sèmens mitjançant l'esquema d'atenció, i també confirman que els nostres models són capaços de modelar correctament la informació sobre sèmens.", 'bn': 'শব্দের মানে নিম্ন সেম্পেন্টিক ইউনিট এবং প্রত্যেক শব্দের মানে সাধারণত কয়েকটি সেমেমের দ্বারা তৈরি হয়। যেহেতু প্রত্যেক শব্দের জন্য সেমেমো বিস্তারিত নয়, মানুষ নিজেরা শব্দের সেমেমেমে বিরক্ত করে এবং ভাষাগত সাধারণ জ্ঞানের এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উপস্থাপন করছি যে, শব্দ সেমেম তথ্য শিক্ষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বৃদ্ধি করতে পারে (WRL) যা শব্দগুলোকে কম- প্রধান ধারণা হচ্ছে শব্দের সেমেম ব্যবহার করার জন্য নির্দিষ্ট প্রকল্পের মধ্যে একটি শব্দের সঠিক অর্থ গ্রহণ করার জন্য। আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা স্কিপ-গ্রামের ফ্রেম অনুসরণ করি এবং তিনটি সেমেমের এনকোডিং মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যাতে সেমেম, সেন্স এবং শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারি, যেখানে আমর আমরা দুই কাজের উপর পরীক্ষা করি যার মধ্যে শব্দের সমতা এবং শব্দ বিশ্লেষণ এবং আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক ভাবে প্রদর ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে উইআরএল সেমেম থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করতে পারে এবং আমাদের মডেল সঠিকভাবে সেমেম তথ্য তৈরি করতে সক্ষম।', 'cs': 'Sememy jsou minimální sémantické jednotky slovních významů a význam každého slovního smyslu se obvykle skládá z několika sememů. Vzhledem k tomu, že semémy nejsou explicitní pro každé slovo, lidé ručně anotují slovní semémy a tvoří lingvistické znalostní báze zdravého rozumu. V tomto článku představujeme, že informace slovního sememe mohou zlepšit učení reprezentace slov (WRL), které mapuje slova do nízkorozměrného sémantického prostoru a slouží jako základní krok pro mnoho úloh NLP. Klíčovou myšlenkou je využít slovní sememe k přesnému zachycení přesného významu slova v konkrétních kontextech. Konkrétněji sledujeme rámec Skip-gramu a prezentujeme tři semémově kódované modely, abychom se naučili reprezentace sememů, smyslů a slov, kde aplikujeme schéma pozornosti k detekci slovních smyslů v různých kontextech. Provádíme experimenty na dvou úkolech, včetně slovní podobnosti a slovní analogie, a naše modely výrazně překonávají základní linie. Výsledky ukazují, že WRL může mít prospěch ze sememů prostřednictvím schématu pozornosti, a také potvrzují, že naše modely jsou schopny správně modelovat semémové informace.', 'bs': 'Seme su minimalne semantičke jedinice značenja riječi, a značenje svakog osjećaja riječi obično sastoji nekoliko seme. Budući da seme nisu objašnjenje za svaku riječ, ljudi ručno annotiraju riječi seme i formiraju jezičke baze znanja zajedničkog smisla. U ovom papiru predstavljamo da riječi sememe informacije mogu poboljšati učenje predstavljanja riječi (WRL), koja mapira riječi u niskodimenzionalni semantički prostor i služi kao osnovni korak za mnoge NLP zadatke. Ključna ideja je iskoristiti riječi seme kako bi precizno uhvatili tačno značenje riječi u određenim kontekstima. Posebnije, pratimo okvir Skip-grama i predstavljamo tri seme-kodirana modela kako bi naučili predstavljanje seme, čula i riječi, gdje primjenjujemo pažnju za otkrivanje čula riječi u različitim kontekstima. Mi vodimo eksperimente na dva zadatka uključujući sličnost riječi i analogiju riječi, i naše modele značajno iznose osnovne linije. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WRL može iskoristiti seme putem shme pažnje, a također potvrđuje da naši modeli mogu ispravno modelirati seme informacije.', 'et': 'Semeemid on minimaalsed semantilised ühikud sõna tähenduses ja iga sõna tähendus koosneb tavaliselt mitmest semeemist. Kuna semeemid ei ole iga sõna puhul selgesõnalised, märgivad inimesed käsitsi sõna sememe ja moodustavad keelelise terve mõistuse teadmistebaasi. Käesolevas töös esitame, et sõna sememe informatsioon võib parandada sõna representatsiooni õppimist (WRL), mis kaardistab sõnad madalamõõtmelisse semantilisse ruumi ja on oluline samm paljudes NLP ülesannetes. Põhieesmärk on kasutada sõna sememes, et jäädvustada sõna täpsed tähendused konkreetsetes kontekstides täpselt. Täpsemalt järgime Skip-grami raamistikku ja esitame kolme sememe-kodeeritud mudelit, et õppida semeeme, meelte ja sõnade representatsioone, kus rakendame tähelepanu skeemi sõnade tuvastamiseks erinevates kontekstides. Me teeme katseid kahel ülesandel, sealhulgas sõna sarnasus ja sõna analoogia, ning meie mudelid ületavad oluliselt lähtejooni. Tulemused näitavad, et WRL saab kasu sememest läbi tähelepanu skeemi ning kinnitavad ka, et meie mudelid on võimelised modelleerima sememe informatsiooni õigesti.', 'fi': 'Semeemit ovat sanan merkitysten vähimmäissemanttisia yksiköitä, ja kunkin sanan merkityksen muodostavat tyypillisesti useat semeemit. Koska sememit eivät ole yksiselitteisiä jokaiselle sanalle, ihmiset merkitsevät sanan sememit manuaalisesti ja muodostavat kielellisen tervejärkisen tietopohjan. Tässä työssä esitämme, että sana sememe -informaatio voi parantaa sanarepresentaation oppimista (WRL), joka kartuttaa sanat matalaulotteiseen semanttiseen tilaan ja toimii keskeisenä askeleena monissa NLP-tehtävissä. Keskeinen idea on käyttää sanaa sememes kuvaamaan sanan tarkkoja merkityksiä tietyissä yhteyksissä tarkasti. Tarkemmin sanottuna seuraamme Skip-gramin viitekehystä ja esittelemme kolme semeemekoodattua mallia, joilla opimme simemeen, aisteihin ja sanoihin liittyviä esityksiä, joissa sovellamme huomiojärjestelmää sanan aistien havaitsemiseen eri konteksteissa. Teemme kokeita kahdesta tehtävästä, kuten sanasamankaltaisuudesta ja sanaanalogiasta, ja mallimme suoriutuvat merkittävästi perusviivoista. Tulokset osoittavat, että WRL voi hyötyä sememestä huomiojärjestelmän kautta, ja vahvistavat myös, että mallimme pystyvät mallintamaan sememestä tietoa oikein.', 'jv': 'semensi Sumalah semana ora pawang kapunggad kanggo saben kelas, wong-wong kuwi manut kanggo ngerasah pawang semana lan nganggep kuwi tindakan-sanes layanan ingkang. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo kuwi, semeng informasi semeng kuwi nggawe basa gambar kelas telu nggambar, kuwi nggambar kelas kuwi semantar semantar kudu dimansi, lan wis ana basa basa kanggo akeh operasi NLP. Layout Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk karo saiki iki dadi, dadi sampeyan karo pergambar kelas, lan modelan nganggep kuwi tindakan wis ngerasahan kelas barang. Rejalingan langkung ngomong barang kelas \'RRL\' iso nggambar semeste, lan ngakngakses model kita iso nggawe barang kelas informasi semeste.', 'sk': 'Sememi so minimalne semantične enote besednih pomenov, pomen vsakega besednega pomena pa je običajno sestavljen iz več sememov. Ker sememi niso eksplicitni za vsako besedo, ljudje ročno označujejo besedno sememe in oblikujejo jezikovne zdrave pametne baze znanja. V prispevku predstavljamo, da lahko besedne sememe informacije izboljšajo učenje predstavitve besed (WRL), ki kartira besede v nizkodimenzionalni semantični prostor in služi kot temeljni korak pri številnih nalogah NLP. Ključna ideja je, da uporabimo besedno sememe, da natančno zajamemo natančne pomene besede v določenih kontekstih. Natančneje sledimo okviru Skip-grama in predstavljamo tri simemsko kodirane modele za učenje reprezentacij sememov, čutov in besed, kjer uporabljamo shemo pozornosti za zaznavanje besednih čutov v različnih kontekstih. Izvajamo poskuse na dveh nalogah, vključno s podobnostjo besed in analogijo besed, naši modeli pa bistveno presegajo osnovne črte. Rezultati kažejo, da lahko WRL koristi od sememov preko sheme pozornosti, prav tako pa potrjujejo, da so naši modeli sposobni pravilno modelirati sememe informacije.', 'ha': "Sunayen sunayen suna da kiman na semantic sunaye na fassarar magana, kuma fassaran kõwane magana yana da amfani da kuma ana samar da shi a ƙidãya da wasu semem. Dõmin ba za'a bayyana seminari ba ga kõwace magana, mutane suna zartar da sunem da hannun nan, kuma suna danna salon sanin da ke cikin harshen. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da cema, information na sememe za'a iya ƙara maganar mai gayarwa (WRL), wanda ke karna magana zuwa wani filin mai sauri na ƙas ƙanci kuma yana mai amfani da aikin NLP masu yawa. Maɓallin zai yi amfani da semamen cikin magana dõmin ka kãma ma'anar magana da gaske cikin muhalli da aka ƙayyade. Ko da ƙayyade, muna biyar firam na skiip-gram kuma munã halatar da misãlai uku wanda aka kodi na semi-watau dõmin su iya fahimtar masu shiryarwa na semi, zafi da maganar, a inda Muke amfani da shirin aikin muhimmanci dõmin ka gane zafi masu sanyin magana a cikin mistakardan daban-daban. Tuna samun jarrabi biyu a cikin aikin da ke sami maganar da kalma mai daidaita, kuma misalinmu na sami ƙarami. The results indicate that WRL can benefit from sememes via the attention scheme, and also confirm our models being capable of correctly modeling sememe information.", 'he': 'סמימות הן יחידות מינימליות סמנטיות של משמעות מילים, והמשמעות של כל תחושת מילה היא בדרך כלל מורכבת על ידי מספר זרעים. Since sememes are not explicit for each word, people manually annotate word sememes and form linguistic common-sense knowledge bases.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את זה, מידע על זרע מילים יכול לשפר את לימוד מייצג מילים (WRL), שממפה מילים לחלל סמנטי במימד נמוך ומשרה כצעד יסודי עבור משימות רבות של NLP. הרעיון המפתח הוא להשתמש בזרע מילים כדי לתפוס משמעות מדויקות של מילה בתוך קשרים מסויימים בדיוק. במיוחד יותר, אנו עוקבים אחרי המסגרת של סקיפ-גרם ומציגים שלושה דוגמנים מקודדים לזרע ללמוד מייצגים של זרע, חושים ומילים אנו מבצעים ניסויים על שתי משימות כולל דומות מילים ואנלוגיה מילים, והדוגמנים שלנו יוצאים משמעות מעל קווי הבסיס. The results indicate that WRL can benefit from sememes via the attention scheme, and also confirm our models being capable of correctly modeling sememe information.', 'bo': 'Sememes are the minimum semantic units of word meanings, and the meaning of each word sense is typically composed by several sememes. སྐད་ཆ་གྲངས་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཆ་གཅིག་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་མེད་ལས། མི་མང་གིས་ལག་ནས་སྐད་ཆ་སྙན་གཏོང་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ར འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་དག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ། གཙོ་བོ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་དེ་ཚིག་སྐད་རྟགས་ལ་སྤྱོད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་དོན་དག་གི་ཚིག་རྟགས་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་Skip-gram་གི་མདུན་ཆས་དང་། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པའི་མིག་ཆས་གསུམ་སྟོན་པའི་ཚོར་བ། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་མིང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་WRL ཡིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Learning Character-level Compositionality with Visual Features', 'ar': 'تعلم التكوين على مستوى الشخصية مع الميزات المرئية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de la composicionalidad a nivel de personaje con características visuales', 'fr': 'Apprentissage de la compositionalité au niveau du personnage avec des caractéristiques visuelles', 'pt': 'Aprendendo composicionalidade no nível do personagem com recursos visuais', 'ja': '視覚的特徴を備えたキャラクターレベルの構成力を学ぶ', 'zh': '学有视觉特徵字符级构图性', 'hi': 'दृश्य सुविधाओं के साथ वर्ण-स्तर की संरचना सीखना', 'ru': 'Композиционность на уровне обучающего персонажа с визуальными особенностями', 'ga': 'Comhdhéanamh Leibhéal Carachtair Foghlama le Gnéithe Amhairc', 'hu': 'Karakterszintű kompozicionalitás tanulása vizuális funkciókkal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μάθηση της συνθηματικότητας σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων με οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά', 'it': 'Compositionalità a livello di carattere con funzionalità visive', 'kk': 'Көрінетін мүмкіндіктермен таңбалар деңгейінің құрылғысын үйрену', 'lt': 'Mokymosi simbolių lygio sudėtingumas su vizualinėmis savybėmis', 'mk': 'Научи композицијалност на ниво на знаци со визуелни објекти', 'ml': 'കാഴ്ചയുള്ള വിശേഷതകളുമായി പഠിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയത്തിന്റെ നില കോമ്പോണിഷനിറ്റില്\u200d', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Kompositi Aras Aksara dengan Ciri-ciri Visual', 'mt': 'Kompożizzjonalità fil-livell tal-Karatteri tat-Tagħlim b’Karatteristiċi Viżwali', 'mn': 'Хараагийн түвшинд харагдах боломжуудыг сурах', 'no': 'Læring av samlingsnivå for teikn med visuelle funksjonar', 'ro': 'Compoziționalitatea la nivel de caracter cu caracteristici vizuale', 'pl': 'Uczenie się kompozycjonalności na poziomie postaci z funkcjami wizualnymi', 'sr': 'Naučenje kompozicionalnosti nivoa karaktera sa vizualnim karakterima', 'si': 'අක්ෂර- තත්වය සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවය සමග ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'Lära sig Karaktärsnivå Kompositionalitet med visuella funktioner', 'ta': 'காட்சி பண்புகளுடன் எழுத்து- மட்டத்தின் கூட்டுரிமை', 'so': 'Waxbarashada heer-heerka iskuulaadka la xiriira xuquuqda muuqashada', 'ur': 'Character-level Compositionality with Visual Features Learning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học Ký tự Hình Sự', 'hr': 'Naučenje kompozicionalnosti nivoa znakova s vizuelnim karakterima', 'da': 'Læring Karakterniveau Kompositionalitet med visuelle funktioner', 'bg': 'Учене на композиционалност на ниво символ с визуални функции', 'nl': 'Compositionaliteit op karakterniveau leren met visuele kenmerken', 'de': 'Lernen von Compositionalität auf Charakterebene mit visuellen Features', 'ko': '시각적 특징을 이용하여 문자급 합성을 학습하다', 'id': 'Mempelajari Kompositivitas Tingkat Aksara dengan Karakter Visual', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن ترکیب سطح شخصیت با ویژه\u200cهای دیده', 'tr': 'Görsel hasaplar bilen Karakter derejesi Ýygymlygy öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer Karaktervlak Komposisionaliteit met Visuele Funksies', 'sw': 'Unaweza kujifunza Hifadhi ya Kitaba-ngazi kwa Tamko za Visual', 'sq': 'Mësimi i kompozitivitetit të nivelit të karakterëve me funksione vizuale', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Learning Character-level Compositionality with Visual Features', 'az': 'G칬r칲n칲l 칐z칲ml톛ri il톛 Karakter s톛viyy톛sini 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'দৃশ্যমান বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে অক্ষর- স্তরের কোম্পোটিশনিটি শিখা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Učení se kompozicionality na úrovni znaků s vizuálními funkcemi', 'et': 'Õppimine iseloomustaseme kompositsioonilisus visuaalsete funktsioonidega', 'fi': 'Hahmotason kompositionaalisuuden oppiminen visuaalisilla ominaisuuksilla', 'ca': 'Aprendre la composicionalitat a nivell de caràcters amb característiques visuals', 'bs': 'Naučenje kompozicionalnosti nivoa znakova sa vizuelnim karakterima', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד שילוב ברמה של אותים עם תכונות חזותיות', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'Visual Features', 'sk': 'Učenje kompozicionalnosti na ravni znakov z vizualnimi funkcijami'}
{'en': 'Previous work has modeled the compositionality of words by creating character-level models of meaning, reducing problems of sparsity for rare words. However, in many writing systems compositionality has an effect even on the character-level : the meaning of a character is derived by the sum of its parts. In this paper, we model this effect by creating embeddings for characters based on their visual characteristics, creating an image for the character and running it through a convolutional neural network to produce a visual character embedding. Experiments on a text classification task demonstrate that such model allows for better processing of instances with rare characters in languages such as Chinese, Japanese, and Korean. Additionally, qualitative analyses demonstrate that our proposed model learns to focus on the parts of characters that carry topical content which resulting in embeddings that are coherent in visual space.', 'ar': 'قام العمل السابق بنمذجة تكوين الكلمات من خلال إنشاء نماذج من المعنى على مستوى الشخصية ، مما يقلل من مشاكل تبعثر الكلمات النادرة. ومع ذلك ، في العديد من أنظمة الكتابة يكون للتكوين تأثير حتى على مستوى الحرف: معنى الحرف مشتق من مجموع أجزائه. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بنمذجة هذا التأثير من خلال إنشاء زخارف لشخصيات بناءً على خصائصها المرئية ، وإنشاء صورة للشخصية وتشغيلها عبر شبكة عصبية تلافيفية لإنتاج تضمين شخصية بصرية. توضح التجارب على مهمة تصنيف النص أن هذا النموذج يسمح بمعالجة أفضل للمثيلات ذات الأحرف النادرة في لغات مثل الصينية واليابانية والكورية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تُظهر التحليلات النوعية أن نموذجنا المقترح يتعلم التركيز على أجزاء الشخصيات التي تحمل محتوى موضعيًا مما ينتج عنه حفلات زفاف متماسكة في الفضاء المرئي.', 'es': 'Trabajos anteriores han modelado la composicionalidad de las palabras mediante la creación de modelos de significado a nivel de carácter, reduciendo los problemas de escasez de palabras raras. Sin embargo, en muchos sistemas de escritura la composicionalidad tiene un efecto incluso a nivel de personaje: el significado de un personaje se deriva de la suma de sus partes. En este artículo, modelamos este efecto creando incrustaciones para los personajes en función de sus características visuales, creando una imagen para el personaje y pasándola a través de una red neuronal convolucional para producir una incrustación visual de caracteres. Los experimentos realizados en una tarea de clasificación de textos demuestran que este modelo permite procesar mejor las instancias con caracteres poco comunes en idiomas como el chino, el japonés y el coreano. Además, los análisis cualitativos demuestran que nuestro modelo propuesto aprende a centrarse en las partes de los personajes que llevan contenido de actualidad, lo que resulta en incrustaciones coherentes en el espacio visual.', 'fr': "Des travaux antérieurs ont modélisé la composition des mots en créant des modèles de signification au niveau des caractères, réduisant ainsi les problèmes de parcimonie pour les mots rares. Cependant, dans de nombreux systèmes d'écriture, la composition a un effet même au niveau du caractère\xa0: la signification d'un caractère est dérivée de la somme de ses parties. Dans cet article, nous modélisons cet effet en créant des incrustations pour les personnages en fonction de leurs caractéristiques visuelles, en créant une image pour le personnage et en la faisant passer dans un réseau neuronal convolutif afin de produire une intégration visuelle du personnage. Les expériences sur une tâche de classification de texte montrent qu'un tel modèle permet un meilleur traitement des instances comportant des caractères rares dans des langues telles que le chinois, le japonais et le coréen. De plus, les analyses qualitatives démontrent que le modèle que nous proposons apprend à se concentrer sur les parties des personnages qui ont un contenu thématique, ce qui donne lieu à des intégrations cohérentes dans l'espace visuel.", 'pt': 'Trabalhos anteriores modelaram a composicionalidade de palavras criando modelos de significado em nível de caractere, reduzindo problemas de esparsidade para palavras raras. No entanto, em muitos sistemas de escrita, a composicionalidade tem um efeito até mesmo no nível do personagem: o significado de um caractere é derivado da soma de suas partes. Neste artigo, modelamos esse efeito criando incorporações para personagens com base em suas características visuais, criando uma imagem para o personagem e executando-a por meio de uma rede neural convolucional para produzir uma incorporação visual de caracteres. Experimentos em uma tarefa de classificação de texto demonstram que tal modelo permite um melhor processamento de instâncias com caracteres raros em idiomas como chinês, japonês e coreano. Além disso, análises qualitativas demonstram que nosso modelo proposto aprende a focar nas partes dos personagens que carregam conteúdo tópico, resultando em embeddings coerentes no espaço visual.', 'ja': 'これまでの研究では、文字レベルの意味のモデルを作成し、希少な単語の希少性の問題を軽減することによって、単語の構成をモデル化してきました。しかしながら、多くの執筆システムでは、構成性は文字レベルにさえ影響を及ぼします。文字の意味は、その部分の合計によって導き出されます。本稿では、キャラクターの視覚的特徴に基づいてキャラクターの埋め込みを作成し、キャラクターの画像を作成し、それを畳み込みニューラルネットワークを介して実行して視覚的なキャラクターの埋め込みを生成することで、この効果をモデル化する。テキスト分類タスクの実験は、そのようなモデルが、中国語、日本語、および韓国語などの言語における希少な文字を持つインスタンスのより良い処理を可能にすることを実証している。さらに、定性的な分析は、提案されたモデルが、トピカルコンテンツを持つキャラクターの部分に焦点を当て、視覚空間に一貫性のある埋め込みをもたらすことを学んでいることを示しています。', 'zh': '前事拟单词成性,以省罕见单词之疏。 然诸书统中,构图性至字符亦有影响,其义总推导也。 于本文中,以角色之视觉特徵为角色创嵌以拟之,为角色创图而以卷积神经网络行之,以生视觉角色嵌之。 其实验文本分类者,许以善处中文、日文、韩文等语为希有字符之实。 此外,定性分析表明,则关角赍题,而嵌于视空。', 'hi': 'पिछले काम ने अर्थ के चरित्र-स्तर के मॉडल बनाकर शब्दों की रचनात्मकता को मॉडल किया है, दुर्लभ शब्दों के लिए स्पार्सिटी की समस्याओं को कम किया है। हालांकि, कई लेखन प्रणालियों में रचनात्मकता का चरित्र-स्तर पर भी प्रभाव पड़ता है: एक चरित्र का अर्थ इसके भागों के योग से प्राप्त होता है। इस पेपर में, हम इस प्रभाव को उनकी दृश्य विशेषताओं के आधार पर वर्णों के लिए एम्बेडिंग बनाकर, चरित्र के लिए एक छवि बनाते हैं और इसे एक दृश्य चरित्र एम्बेडिंग का उत्पादन करने के लिए एक कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के माध्यम से चलाते हैं। एक पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्य पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि इस तरह के मॉडल चीनी, जापानी और कोरियाई जैसी भाषाओं में दुर्लभ वर्णों के साथ उदाहरणों के बेहतर प्रसंस्करण की अनुमति देता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, गुणात्मक विश्लेषण ों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल उन पात्रों के हिस्सों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना सीखता है जो सामयिक सामग्री ले जाते हैं जिसके परिणामस्वरूप एम्बेडिंग होती है जो दृश्य स्थान में सुसंगत होती हैं।', 'ru': 'Предыдущая работа моделировала композиционность слов, создавая модели смысла на уровне символов, уменьшая проблемы редкости для редких слов. Однако во многих системах письма композиционность оказывает влияние даже на уровне символов: значение символа определяется суммой его частей. В данной работе мы моделируем этот эффект, создавая вложения для персонажей на основе их визуальных характеристик, создавая образ для персонажа и пропуская его через сверточную нейронную сеть для получения вложения визуального персонажа. Эксперименты над задачей классификации текста показывают, что такая модель позволяет лучше обрабатывать экземпляры с редкими символами на таких языках, как китайский, японский и корейский. Кроме того, качественный анализ показывает, что наша предлагаемая модель учится фокусироваться на частях персонажей, которые несут тематический контент, что приводит к вложениям, которые когерентны в визуальном пространстве.', 'ga': 'Múnlaíodh comhdhéanamh na bhfocal i saothar a rinneadh roimhe seo trí mhúnlaí brí a chruthú ar leibhéal na gcarachtar, ag laghdú fadhbanna tearcachta d’fhocail neamhchoitianta. Mar sin féin, i go leor córais scríbhneoireachta bíonn éifeacht ag comhdhéanamh fiú ar leibhéal an charachtair: díorthaítear brí carachtar trí shuim a chodanna. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid an éifeacht seo a shamhaltú trí leabaithe a chruthú do charachtair bunaithe ar a dtréithe amhairc, íomhá a chruthú don charachtar agus é a rith trí líonra conbhlóideach néarúil chun leabú carachtar amhairc a tháirgeadh. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thasc aicmithe téacs go gceadaíonn samhail dá leithéid próiseáil níos fearr a dhéanamh ar chásanna le carachtair neamhchoitianta i dteangacha mar an tSínis, an tSeapáinis agus an Chóiréis. Ina theannta sin, léiríonn anailísí cáilíochtúla go bhfoghlaimíonn ár múnla molta conas díriú ar na codanna de charachtair a iompraíonn ábhar tráthúla a mbíonn leabaithe comhleanúnach sa spás amhairc orthu dá bharr.', 'hu': 'Az előző munka a szavak kompozícióját modellezte karakterszintű jelentésmodellek létrehozásával, csökkentve a ritka szavak ritkaságának problémáit. Sok írási rendszerben azonban a kompozíciónak még a karakter szintjére is hatása van: egy karakter jelentését a részek összege származtatja. Ebben a tanulmányban úgy modellezzük ezt a hatást, hogy a karakterek vizuális jellemzői alapján beágyazásokat készítünk, képet hozunk létre a karakternek, és egy konvolúciós neurális hálózaton keresztül futtatjuk, hogy vizuális karakterek beágyazását hozzuk létre. A szövegosztályozási feladatokkal kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az ilyen modell lehetővé teszi a ritka karakterekkel rendelkező példányok jobb feldolgozását olyan nyelveken, mint a kínai, japán és koreai. Emellett minőségi elemzések bizonyítják, hogy javasolt modellünk megtanulja a karakterek aktuális tartalmat hordozó részeire összpontosítani, amelyek a vizuális térben koherens beágyazásokat eredményeznek.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενη εργασία έχει μοντελοποιήσει τη σύνθεση των λέξεων δημιουργώντας μοντέλα νοήματος σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, μειώνοντας τα προβλήματα της σπανιότητας για σπάνιες λέξεις. Ωστόσο, σε πολλά συστήματα γραφής η σύνθεση έχει επίδραση ακόμη και στο επίπεδο χαρακτήρων: η έννοια ενός χαρακτήρα προέρχεται από το άθροισμα των τμημάτων του. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μοντελοποιούμε αυτό το αποτέλεσμα δημιουργώντας ενσωματώσεις για χαρακτήρες με βάση τα οπτικά τους χαρακτηριστικά, δημιουργώντας μια εικόνα για τον χαρακτήρα και τρέχοντας την μέσω ενός σύνθετου νευρικού δικτύου για να παραγάγουμε μια οπτική ενσωμάτωση χαρακτήρων. Τα πειράματα σε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης κειμένου δείχνουν ότι ένα τέτοιο μοντέλο επιτρέπει την καλύτερη επεξεργασία περιπτώσεων με σπάνιους χαρακτήρες σε γλώσσες όπως τα κινεζικά, τα ιαπωνικά και τα κορεάτικα. Επιπλέον, ποιοτικές αναλύσεις καταδεικνύουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μαθαίνει να εστιάζει στα μέρη των χαρακτήρων που φέρουν επίκαιρο περιεχόμενο με αποτέλεσμα ενσωμάτωση που είναι συνεκτικά στον οπτικό χώρο.', 'it': "Il lavoro precedente ha modellato la compositività delle parole creando modelli di significato a livello di carattere, riducendo i problemi di scarsità delle parole rare. Tuttavia, in molti sistemi di scrittura la compositività ha un effetto anche sul livello di carattere: il significato di un carattere è derivato dalla somma delle sue parti. In questo articolo, modelliamo questo effetto creando embedding per i personaggi in base alle loro caratteristiche visive, creando un'immagine per il personaggio e facendola passare attraverso una rete neurale convoluzionale per produrre un embedding visivo dei personaggi. Esperimenti su un'attività di classificazione del testo dimostrano che tale modello consente una migliore elaborazione di istanze con caratteri rari in lingue come cinese, giapponese e coreano. Inoltre, le analisi qualitative dimostrano che il nostro modello proposto impara a concentrarsi sulle parti di personaggi che portano contenuti di attualità che si traducono in incorporazioni coerenti nello spazio visivo.", 'kk': 'Алдыңғы жұмыс сөздердің құрылғысын үлгілеп, таңбалардың деңгейінің үлгілерін құру үшін, кейбір сөздер үшін кеңістік мәселелерін азайту үшін модельді жа Бірақ көптеген жазу жүйелерінде әріптердің деңгейіне да әсер етеді: таңбаның мағынасы бөліктерінің жинағынан таратылады. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл эффектті көрініс қасиеттеріне негізделген таңбалар үшін ендіру үшін, таңбаны құрып, оны қарай көрініс таңбаларды ендіру үшін қосымша невралдық желі арқылы орындап,  Мәтін шектеу тапсырмасының тәжірибелері бұл үлгі қытас, жапон және корей тілдерінің тілдерінде тәуелді таңбаларды жақсы өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді. Сонымен қатар, квалитативтік анализ үлгілеріміздің көрсетілген үлгілеріміздің нақышты мазмұнын алып тастайтын таңбалардың бөлшектеріне көздегенін көрсетеді. Көрініс орында қатынасыз келеді.', 'lt': 'Ankstesnis darbas modeliavo žodžių sudėtingumą sukuriant reikšmės simbolių modelius, mažinant retų žodžių nedažnumo problemas. Tačiau daugelyje rašymo sistemų sudėtingumas daro poveikį net simbolio lygiui: simbolio reikšmė gaunama iš jo dalių sumos. Šiame popieriuje modeliuojame šį efektą sukuriant simbolių įdėjimus, pagrįstus jų vizualiomis savybėmis, sukuriant simbolio atvaizdą ir juos veikiant per konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą, kad būtų sukurtas vizualinis simbolis įdėjimas. Tekstų klasifikavimo užduoties eksperimentai rodo, kad toks modelis leidžia geriau apdoroti atvejus su retais simboliais tokiomis kalbomis kaip kinų, japonų ir koreanų. Be to, kokybinės analizės rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis išmoko sutelkti dėmesį į vietinį turinį turinčių simbolių dalis, dėl kurių vizualinėje erdvėje yra nuoseklūs įterpimai.', 'mk': 'Претходната работа ја моделира композицијата на зборовите создавајќи модели на значење на ниво на карактер, намалувајќи ги проблемите со реткоста на ретките зборови. Сепак, во многу пишувачки системи композицијата има ефект дури и на нивото на карактеристика: значењето на карактерот е изведено од сумата на неговите делови. Во оваа хартија, го моделираме овој ефект создавајќи вложувања за ликови базирани на нивните визуелни карактеристики, создавајќи слика за ликот и ја врзувајќи преку конволуционална нервна мрежа за да создадеме вложување на визуелни карактеристики. Експериментите на задачата за класификација на текст покажуваат дека ваков модел овозможува подобро обработување на случаи со ретки ликови на јазици како што се кинески, јапонски и корејски. Покрај тоа, квалитетните анализи покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел научи да се фокусира на деловите на карактерите кои носат точка содржина, што резултира со вградувања кои се кохерентни во визуелниот простор.', 'ka': 'წინა სამუშაო მუშაობა სიტყვების კომპოზიციალობის მოდელის შექმნა, რომელიც ცოტა სიტყვებისთვის პრობლემების შემცირებით გამოკლება. მაგრამ, ბევრი სისტემებში კომპოციციოციალობა აქვს აფექტის სისტემების მნიშვნელობა: სისტემის მნიშვნელობა იქნება მისი ნაწილების ზომიდან. ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ ამ ეფექტის მოდელეცია შექმნით სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოებისთვის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც სიმბოლოებისთვის გამოსაზღვრებით, სიმბოლოებისთვის გამოსაზღვრებით და გავაკეთებ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალების ექსპერიმენტები გამოცდილობას რომ ეს მოდელი უფრო უკეთესი გამოცდილობა ინსტაციების გამოცდილობა, როგორც ჩინეთი, იაპონეთი და დამატებით, კვალიტატიური ანალიზები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის მოდელის სწავლის, რომ ფონსკურება სიმბოლოების ნაწილაზე, რომლებიც თემეტური ინტერუქტური შემდგომაში გადატანა', 'ms': 'Kerja terdahulu telah memmodelkan komposisi perkataan dengan mencipta model aras aksara makna, mengurangkan masalah kecepatan untuk perkataan langka. Namun, dalam ramai sistem menulis komposisi mempunyai kesan walaupun pada aras aksara: makna aksara dihimpunkan oleh jumlah bahagiannya. Dalam kertas ini, kami memmodelkan kesan ini dengan mencipta penyampaian untuk aksara berdasarkan ciri-ciri visual mereka, mencipta imej untuk aksara dan menjalankannya melalui rangkaian saraf konvolusi untuk menghasilkan penyampaian aksara visual. Eksperimen pada tugas klasifikasi teks menunjukkan bahawa model tersebut membolehkan proses lebih baik kes dengan aksara langka dalam bahasa seperti Cina, Jepun dan Korea. Lagipun, analisis kualitatif menunjukkan bahawa model kami yang direncanakan belajar untuk fokus pada bahagian aksara yang membawa kandungan topik yang mengakibatkan penyambungan yang konsisten dalam ruang visual.', 'mt': 'Ix-xogħol preċedenti mudell il-kompożizzjoni tal-kliem billi ħoloq mudelli ta’ tifsira fuq livell ta’ karattru, u naqqas il-problemi ta’ sparsità għall-kliem rari. However, in many writing systems compositionality has an effect even on the character-level: the meaning of a character is derived by the sum of its parts.  F’din il-karta, a ħna nimmudellaw dan l-effett billi noħolqu inkorporazzjonijiet għall-karattri bbażati fuq il-karatteristiċi viżivi tagħhom, noħolqu immaġni għall-karattru u niħaddmuh permezz ta’ netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali biex nipproduċu inkorporazzjoni viżiva tal-karattru. L-esperimenti fuq kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test juru li mudell bħal dan jippermetti pproċessar a ħjar ta’ każijiet b’karattri rari f’lingwi bħaċ-Ċiniż, il-Ġappuniż u l-Korean. Barra minn hekk, analiżi kwalitattiva turi li l-mudell propost tagħna jitgħallem jiffoka fuq il-partijiet tal-karattri li jġorru kontenut topiku li jirriżulta f’inkorporazzjonijiet li huma koerenti fl-ispazju viżiv.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി വാക്കുകളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണത്തെ മാതൃകയാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് സ്പാസ എന്നാലും പലതും എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം കൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നില പ്രഭാവം പോലും ഉണ്ട്: അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന് ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രഭാവം മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ കാഴ്ചപ്രകൃതികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ചിത്രം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അക്ഷരത്തിന് ഒരു ചിത്രം ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും അതി ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിയിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡല്\u200d ചൈനീസ്, ജപ്പാനീസ്, കൊറിയയും പോലുള് കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതിന', 'mn': 'Өмнөх ажил нь үгсийн төвшин загварыг бүтээж, ховор үгсийн асуудлыг багасгаж өгсөн. Гэвч олон бичил системийн бүтээлч нь харьцааны түвшинд ч нөлөөтэй: харьцааны утгыг хэсэгт нь нийлүүлдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ нөлөөг загварчлан харагдаж, харагдах дүрс бүтээж, харагдах дүрс бүтээж, харагдах дүрс бүтээж, сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр ажиллаж байдаг. Текст хэлбэрийн даалгаврын туршилтын туршилт нь Хятад, Япон, Солонгос зэрэг хэлний ховор дүрсийг ашиглах боломжтой байдаг. Мөн чадвартай шинжилгээ нь бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь харааны орон зайд холбоотой зүйлсийг дамжуулдаг загварын хэсэг дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Lucrările anterioare au modelat compoziționalitatea cuvintelor prin crearea de modele de înțeles la nivel de caracter, reducând problemele de scară limitată pentru cuvintele rare. Cu toate acestea, în multe sisteme de scriere compoziționalitatea are un efect chiar și asupra nivelului de caracter: sensul unui caracter este derivat de suma părților sale. În această lucrare, modelăm acest efect prin crearea de încorporări pentru personaje bazate pe caracteristicile lor vizuale, crearea unei imagini pentru personaj și rularea acesteia printr-o rețea neuronală convoluțională pentru a produce o încorporare vizuală a personajelor. Experimentele pe o sarcină de clasificare a textului demonstrează că un astfel de model permite o mai bună procesare a instanțelor cu caractere rare în limbi precum chineză, japoneză și coreeană. În plus, analizele calitative demonstrează că modelul nostru propus învață să se concentreze asupra părților personajelor care au conținut actual, ceea ce duce la încorporări coerente în spațiul vizual.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie prace modelowały kompozycyjność słów poprzez tworzenie modeli znaczenia na poziomie znaków, ograniczając problemy rzadkich słów. Jednak w wielu systemach pisania kompozycyjność ma wpływ nawet na poziom znaku: znaczenie znaku jest wywodzone przez sumę jego części. W niniejszym artykule modelujemy ten efekt poprzez tworzenie osadzeń dla postaci na podstawie ich cech wizualnych, tworzenie obrazu dla postaci i przebieganie go przez zwolnioną sieć neuronową w celu wytworzenia osadzenia postaci wizualnej. Eksperymenty na zadaniu klasyfikacji tekstu pokazują, że taki model pozwala na lepsze przetwarzanie instancji z rzadkimi znakami w językach takich jak chiński, japoński i koreański. Dodatkowo analizy jakościowe pokazują, że proponowany model uczy się skupiać na częściach postaci, które noszą treść aktualną, co skutkuje osadzeniami spójnymi w przestrzeni wizualnej.', 'so': 'Shaqo hore wuxuu sameynay isbedelka hadallada, wuxuuna sameyn qaababka heerka saxda ah, wuxuuna hoos u dhigi jiray dhibaatooyinka dhaqdhaqaalaha ee hadalka gaaban. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa saameyn ku leh nidaam faro badan oo qoraal ah, xitaa heerka aqoonta: micneheeda xarafka waxaa laga helaa qeybtiisa tirada. Qoraalkan ayaannu ku sameynaa saameydan si a an u sameyno sawir ku saleysan tababarida aragtida, aan sawir u sameyno sawir sawir sawir u eg oo aan ku socono shabakadda neurada ah si aan u sameyno sawir muuqata. Imtixaanka ku saabsan shaqada qoraalka waxaa muujiya in tusaale ahaan uu u ogolaado in lagu baaraandejiyo tusaale ahaan xaraf qaali ah oo ku qoran luuqadaha sida Shiino, Jabanees iyo Korean. Waxaa kaloo jira baaritaanka suurtagalka ah waxay muujiyaan in modelkeeni la soo jeeday ay ay ku kalsoonaadaan qeybaha ka mid ah waxyaabaha ku jira waxyaabaha ku saabsan, taas oo sababtaa qalabka ay ku jiraan meelaha la arko.', 'sr': 'Prethodni rad je modelirao kompozicionalnost reèi stvarajući modele znaèaja na nivou karaktera, smanjujujuæi probleme rezerviteta rijetkih reèi. Međutim, u mnogim pisaćim sistemima kompozicionalnost ima efekat čak i na nivo karaktera: smisao karaktera je proizvedeno od sume njegovih delova. U ovom papiru modeliramo ovaj efekat stvaranjem integracija za karaktere na osnovu njihovih vizualnih karakteristika, stvaranjem slike za karakter i provođenjem kroz konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu da proizvedemo vizuelnu integraciju karaktera. Eksperimenti na zadatku klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da takav model omogućava bolje obraditi instance sa retkim likovima na jezicima poput kineskih, japanskih i korejskih jezika. Osim toga, kvalitativne analize pokazuju da se naš predloženi model nauči da se fokusira na dijelove karaktera koji nose temeljni sadržaj koji rezultuju integracijama koja su usklađena u vizualnom prostoru.', 'si': 'මුලින් වැඩේ වචනයේ සංවිධානය සිද්ධා කරලා තේරුමේ අදහස් ස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  නමුත්, ලියුම් පද්ධතියේ සංවිධානය තියෙන්නේ අක්ෂර- පද්ධතියේ තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: අක්ෂරේ අක්ෂරේ අ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරභාව හොයාගන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ දර්ශණ විශේෂතාවට ආධාරණය සඳහා අක්ෂර වලින් අක්ෂර වලින් අක්ෂර වලින් සංවිධාන පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට මේ මොඩල් එක්ක හොඳ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ච තවත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dර', 'no': 'Førre arbeid har modelert ordsammensattigheten ved å laga teiknsnivåmodeller med mening, og reduserer problemar med sparsitet for rare ord. I mange skriftsystemet har imidlertid eit effekt til sjølv på teiknsnivået: betydninga av eit teikn er avhengig av summen av dei delene. I denne papiret modeller vi denne effekten ved å laga innbyggingar for teikn basert på sine visuelle karakteristikk, laga eit bilete for teiknet og køyra det gjennom eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk for å laga eit visuell teikn. Eksperimentar på eit tekstklassifikasjon- oppgåve viser at slike modellen kan forbetra handsaming av instansar med rare teikn i språk som kinesisk, japansk og koreansk. I tillegg, kvalitative analyser viser at vår foreslått modell lærer å fokusera på delene av teikn som inneheld temainnhaldet som resulterer i innbygging som er samanlig i visuelle plass.', 'sv': 'Tidigare arbete har modellerat ordens kompositionalitet genom att skapa karaktärsmodeller av mening, vilket minskar problem med sparsamhet för sällsynta ord. Men i många skrivsystem har kompositionaliteten en effekt även på teckenivå: innebörden av ett tecken härleds av summan av dess delar. I denna uppsats modellerar vi denna effekt genom att skapa inbäddningar för tecken baserat på deras visuella egenskaper, skapa en bild för karaktären och köra den genom ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk för att producera en visuell karaktär inbäddning. Experiment på en textklassificeringsuppgift visar att en sådan modell möjliggör bättre bearbetning av instanser med sällsynta tecken på språk som kinesiska, japanska och koreanska. Dessutom visar kvalitativa analyser att vår föreslagna modell lär sig fokusera på de delar av karaktärer som bär aktuellt innehåll vilket resulterar i inbäddningar som är sammanhängande i visuellt rum.', 'ur': 'اگلے کام نے کلمات کی پیدائش کی مثال کے مطابق شخص-سطح موڈل بنانے کے ذریعہ مطابق بنایا ہے، اور بہت کم کلمات کے مطابق پیدائش کی مشکلات کم کر دی ہے. However, in many writing systems compositionality has an effect even on the character-level: the meaning of a character is derived by the sum of its parts. اس کاغذ میں، ہم اس اثر کو مدل کر رہے ہیں کہ ان کے نظر آیتیں پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، شخصیت کے لئے ایک تصویر پیدا کریں اور اس کو کنویروشن نیورال نیٹ ورک کے ذریعہ چلتے ہیں کہ ایک نظر آیتیں انڈینگ پیدا کریں۔ ایک ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے کام پر آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ یہ موڈل بہتر طریقے کے لئے بہتر طریقے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جیسے چینی, جاپانی اور کوریا زبانوں میں بہترین شخصیتوں کے ساتھ۔ اور اضافہ، کیلوٹیٹی تحقیقات دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل سیکھاتی ہے کہ روشنی جگہ میں موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں جو دکھانے کی جگہ میں مشترک موجود ہیں۔', 'ta': 'முந்தைய வேலை குறைந்த வார்த்தைகளுக்கு சிறிய வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்கி எழுத்து- நிலை மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கி முன்னோட்ட However, in many writing systems composition has an effect on even the character- level: the meaning of a character is derived by the sum of its parts. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த விளைவை மாற்றுகிறோம் பார்வையான எழுத்துக்களை உருவாக்கி, எழுத்துக்கான பிம்பத்தை உருவாக்கி, ஒரு முழுமையான புதிய பிணையத ஒரு உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் பணியில் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது இது போன்ற மாதிரி சீனா, ஜப்பானிய மற்றும் கொரிய மொழிகள் போன்ற சிறிய எழுத கூடுதலாக, குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கங்கள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மாதிரி பார்வையில் உள்ள உள்ளடக்கங்களை கவனம் செ', 'uz': "Oldingi ishlar so'zlarning kompyuterligini yaratish va qisqa so'zlar uchun kichkina maslahatlarni kamaytirish mumkin. Ammo, ko'pchilik yozuvchi tizimlarda qoʻllaniladigan belgi darajaga ham ishlatiladi: belgining ma'nosi bir qismning qismidan foydalanadi. Bu hujjatda, biz bu effektni ko'rinish xususiyatlariga qo'llanmalarni yaratish va shaklni yaratish uchun rasm yaratish va uni bir doim tarmoq orqali ishga tushirish mumkin. Name Ko'proq, kvlitativ analytik modelimizning o'rganishi mumkin, bu obʼekt tarkibini yuboradigan belgining qismlariga foydalanadi va bu ko'rinish joy bilan birlashtirilgan belgining qismlariga foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Trước đây công việc đã mô hình hóa độ hợp tác của các từ bằng cách tạo ra các mô hình mực chữ, giảm các vấn đề của chữ cái hiếm. Tuy nhiên, trong nhiều hệ thống viết, độ phối hợp có tác dụng ngay cả với mức độ chữ ký: ý nghĩa của chữ ký được tính bắt nguồn từ tổng bộ phận của nó. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô hình hiệu ứng này bằng cách tạo sự nhúng vào các ký tự dựa trên tính cách của chúng, tạo ra một hình ảnh cho nhân vật và chạy nó qua một mạng thần kinh kết nối để tạo ra sự nhúng vào hình ảnh. Thí nghiệm về một nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản cho thấy mô hình này cho phép xử lý tốt hơn các trường hợp chữ hiếm có trong ngôn ngữ như Trung Quốc, Nhật và Hàn Quốc. Hơn nữa, các phân tích chất lượng cho thấy mẫu đề nghị của chúng ta tập trung vào các phần của các ký tự mang theo nội dung hiện thời, dẫn đến sự gắn kết trong một không gian nhìn.', 'bg': 'Предишна работа е моделирала композиционната способност на думите чрез създаване на символни модели на значение, намалявайки проблемите с рядкостта на редките думи. Въпреки това, в много системи за писане композицията има ефект дори върху нивото на характера: значението на характера се извлича от сумата на неговите части. В тази статия моделираме този ефект, като създаваме вграждания за герои въз основа на техните визуални характеристики, създаваме изображение за героя и го пускаме през конволюционна невронна мрежа, за да създадем вграждане на визуален характер. Експериментите по задача за класификация на текст показват, че този модел позволява по-добра обработка на случаи с редки знаци на езици като китайски, японски и корейски. Освен това качествените анализи показват, че предлаганият модел се научава да се фокусира върху частите на героите, които носят актуално съдържание, което води до вграждания, които са съгласувани във визуалното пространство.', 'da': 'Tidligere arbejde har modelleret ordets kompositionalitet ved at skabe tegn-niveau modeller af betydning, reduceret problemer med sparsomhed for sjældne ord. Men i mange skrivesystemer har kompositionalitet en effekt selv på tegneniveau: Betydningen af et tegn afledes af summen af dets dele. I denne artikel modellerer vi denne effekt ved at skabe indlejringer til tegn baseret på deres visuelle egenskaber, skabe et billede til karakteren og køre det gennem et konvulutivt neuralt netværk for at producere en visuel indlejring af tegn. Eksperimenter med en tekstklassifikationsopgave viser, at en sådan model giver mulighed for bedre behandling af tilfælde med sjældne tegn på sprog som kinesisk, japansk og koreansk. Desuden viser kvalitative analyser, at vores foreslåede model lærer at fokusere på de dele af tegn, der bærer aktuelt indhold, hvilket resulterer i indlejringer, der er sammenhængende i visuelt rum.', 'nl': 'Eerder werk heeft de compositionaliteit van woorden gemodelleerd door het creëren van betekenismodellen op karakterniveau, waardoor problemen van schaarste voor zeldzame woorden worden verminderd. In veel schrijfsystemen heeft compositionaliteit echter zelfs effect op het tekenniveau: de betekenis van een teken wordt afgeleid door de som van zijn delen. In dit artikel modelleren we dit effect door insluitingen voor karakters te maken op basis van hun visuele kenmerken, een afbeelding voor het personage te creëren en het door een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk te laten lopen om een visuele insluiting van karakters te produceren. Experimenten met een tekstclassificatietaak tonen aan dat een dergelijk model een betere verwerking mogelijk maakt van exemplaren met zeldzame tekens in talen zoals Chinees, Japans en Koreaans. Daarnaast tonen kwalitatieve analyses aan dat ons voorgestelde model leert zich te concentreren op de delen van karakters die actuele inhoud bevatten, wat resulteert in embeddings die coherent zijn in de visuele ruimte.', 'hr': 'Prethodni rad je modelirao sastojnost riječi stvarajući modele značenja na razini karaktera, smanjujući probleme rezerviteta rijetkim riječima. Međutim, u mnogim pisaćim sustavima kompozicija ima učinak čak i na razinu karaktera: značenje karaktera proizvodi od sume njegovih dijelova. U ovom papiru, modeliramo ovaj učinak stvaranjem integracija za znakove na temelju njihovih vizualnih karakteristika, stvaranjem slike za karakter i provođenjem kroz konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu kako bi proizveli vizualnu integraciju karaktera. Eksperimenti na zadatku klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da takav model omogućava bolju obradu slučajeva s rijetkim znakovima na jezicima poput kineskih, japanskih i korejskih jezika. Osim toga, kvalitativne analize pokazuju da se naš predloženi model uči fokusirati na dijelove znakova koji nose temeljni sadržaj koji rezultira ugrađenjima koji su saskaņovani u vizualnom prostoru.', 'de': 'Frühere Arbeiten haben die Kompositionalität von Wörtern modelliert, indem sie Bedeutungsmodelle auf Zeichenebene erstellen, wodurch Probleme der Sparsität seltener Wörter reduziert werden. In vielen Schreibsystemen wirkt sich Kompositionalität jedoch auch auf die Zeichenebene aus: Die Bedeutung eines Zeichens wird aus der Summe seiner Teile abgeleitet. In dieser Arbeit modellieren wir diesen Effekt, indem wir Einbettungen für Charaktere basierend auf ihren visuellen Eigenschaften erstellen, ein Bild für den Charakter erstellen und es durch ein falsches neuronales Netzwerk laufen lassen, um eine visuelle Einbettung von Charakteren zu erzeugen. Experimente an einer Textklassifizierungsaufgabe zeigen, dass ein solches Modell eine bessere Verarbeitung von Instanzen mit seltenen Zeichen in Sprachen wie Chinesisch, Japanisch und Koreanisch ermöglicht. Darüber hinaus zeigen qualitative Analysen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell lernt, sich auf die Teile von Charakteren zu konzentrieren, die aktuelle Inhalte tragen, was zu Einbettungen führt, die im visuellen Raum kohärent sind.', 'ko': '이전의 작업은 문자 단계의 의미 모델을 만들어 단어의 구성을 모의함으로써 보기 드문 단어의 희소성 문제를 줄였다.그러나 많은 쓰기 시스템에서 구성성은 심지어 문자의 등급에도 영향을 미친다. 문자의 의미는 그 부분의 총체에서 나온 것이다.본고에서 우리는 캐릭터의 시각적 특징을 바탕으로 캐릭터에 삽입을 만들고 캐릭터에 이미지를 만들고 권적신경 네트워크를 통해 이미지를 운행하여 시각적 캐릭터 삽입을 생성함으로써 이러한 효과를 모의한다.텍스트 분류 작업에 대한 실험에 따르면 이런 모델은 중국어, 일본어, 한국어 등 언어에서 보기 드문 문자의 실례를 더욱 잘 처리할 수 있다.그 밖에 정성 분석에 의하면 우리가 제시한 모델은 캐릭터에 주제 내용을 가진 부분에 중점을 두고 시각 공간에서 일관된 삽입을 형성할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan sebelumnya telah mengubah komposisionalitas kata-kata dengan menciptakan model karakter-level arti, mengurangi masalah kecepatan untuk kata-kata langka. Namun, dalam banyak sistem menulis komposisionalitas memiliki efek bahkan pada tingkat karakter: arti karakter didirikan oleh jumlah bagiannya. In this paper, we model this effect by creating embeddings for characters based on their visual characteristics, creating an image for the character and running it through a convolutional neural network to produce a visual character embedding.  Eksperimen dalam tugas klasifikasi teks menunjukkan bahwa model tersebut memungkinkan proses yang lebih baik dari kejadian dengan karakter langka dalam bahasa seperti Cina, Jepang, dan Korea. Lagipula, analisis kualitatif menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan belajar untuk fokus pada bagian karakter yang membawa konten topik yang berasal dari penerbangan yang konsisten dalam ruang visual.', 'sw': 'Kazi iliyopita imeunda muunganiko wa maneno kwa kutengeneza mifano ya kiwango cha tabia yenye maana, kupunguza matatizo ya uchunguzi kwa maneno nadra. Hata hivyo, katika mfumo mwingi wa kuandika unaathiri hata kwenye kiwango cha tabia: maana ya mhusika yanatokana na idadi ya sehemu zake. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha athari hii kwa kutengeneza mabadiliko kwa wahusika kwa kutumia tabia zao za kuona, kutengeneza picha kwa tabia hiyo na kuiendesha kupitia mtandao wa neura wa kimataifa ili kutengeneza mhusika wa kuonekana. Majaribio kwenye kazi ya usambazaji wa maandishi yanaonyesha kuwa mfano huo unaruhusu kuendelewa zaidi kwa matukio yenye wahusika nadra kwa lugha kama vile China, Japani na Korea. Zaidi ya hayo, uchambuzi wa sifa unaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu iliypendekezwa inajifunza kuchukua makini kwenye sehemu za wahusika ambazo hubeba maudhui ya mada ambayo yanasababisha mabadiliko yanayounganika katika anga la kuona.', 'sq': 'Puna e mëparshme ka modeluar kompozitivitetin e fjalëve duke krijuar modele kuptimi në nivelin e karakterit, duke reduktuar problemet e paktësisë për fjalë të rralla. Megjithatë, në shumë sisteme shkrimi kompozitiviteti ka një efekt edhe në nivelin e karakterit: kuptimi i një karakteri derivohet nga shuma e pjesëve të tij. Në këtë letër, ne modelojmë këtë efekt duke krijuar përfshirje për karaktere bazuar në karakteristikat e tyre vizuale, duke krijuar një imazh për karakterin dhe duke e drejtuar atë nëpërmjet një rrjeti nervor konvolutiv për të prodhuar një përfshirje karakteri vizual. Experiments on a text classification task demonstrate that such model allows for better processing of instances with rare characters in languages such as Chinese, Japanese, and Korean.  Përveç kësaj, analizat kualitative demonstrojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar mëson të përqëndrohet në pjesët e karaktereve që mbajnë përmbajtjen aktuale që rezultojnë në përfshirje që janë koherente në hapësirën vizuale.', 'fa': 'کارهای قبلی با ایجاد مدل\u200cهای سطح شخصیت معنی ساخته شده\u200cاند، مشکلات کوچکتری برای کلمات نادر را کاهش می\u200cدهد. با این حال، در بسیاری از سیستم\u200cهای نوشتن تأثیر حتی بر سطح شخصیت دارد: معنی یک شخصیت توسط جمع بخش\u200cهایش است. در این کاغذ، ما این تاثیر را با ایجاد پیوند برای شخصیت\u200cها بر اساس ویژگی\u200cهای دیده\u200cشان مدل می\u200cکنیم، تصویر برای شخصیت\u200cها ایجاد می\u200cکنیم و آن را از طریق شبکه عصبی\u200cهای ترکیب\u200cکننده برای تولید یک شخصیت دیده\u200cای. تجربه\u200cهایی روی یک کار شناسایی متن نشان می\u200cدهد که این مدل اجازه می\u200cدهد برای پرداخت بهتر از موارد با شخصیت\u200cهای نادر در زبانها مثل چینی، ژاپنی و کره. اضافه\u200cای از آن، تحلیل\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما یاد می\u200cگیرد که روی بخش\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cها تمرکز کنیم که محتوای موضوع را حمل می\u200cکنند که به نتیجه\u200cی گیری\u200cهایی که در فضای بینایی هماهنگ هستند.', 'tr': 'Öňki işe, karakterleriň derejesi möhüm nusgalaryny bejerip, nadir sözlere kynçylyklygyny azaltýar. Ýöne, birnäçe ýazma sistemalarda hatda karakterleriň derejesinde hatda täsirli bar: karakterleriň a ňlaması öz parçalarynyň summyna görä döredildi. Bu kagyzda, biz bu etkini karakterleriň görsel karakterlerine daýan edip, karakterleriň içine bir surat bejermek we muny görsel karakterleriň içine alyp geçirmek üçin eserlendiris. Metin klasifikasyýa täblisasynda örän nusgalar şol nusga Çin çe, Japonça we Koreýa ýaly çalt karakterler bilen gowy bir şekilde işlemege rugsat berýär. Beýleki kwalitet analyzlaryň biziň teklip eden nusgamyzyň görsel seleňde kohereket eden karakterleriň böleklerine üns bermek üçin öwrenip otyrýandygyny görkez.', 'hy': 'Անցյալ աշխատանքը մոդելավորել է բառերի բաղադրությունը՝ ստեղծելով իմաստի բնավորության մակարդակի մոդելներ, նվազեցնելով հազվադեպ բառերի հազվադեպ խնդիրները: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ գրական համակարգերի կառուցվածքը ազդում է նույնիսկ բնավորության մակարդակի վրա. բնավորության իմաստը ստացվում է իր մասերի գումարից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մոդելավորում ենք այս էֆեկտը՝ ստեղծելով ներդրումներ իրենց տեսողական հատկությունների վրա հիմնված կերպարների համար, ստեղծելով կերպարի պատկերը և աշխատելով այն համընդհանուր նյարդային ցանցի միջով, որպեսզի ստեղծենք տեսողական հատկություն Տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ նման մոդելը հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի լավ վերլուծել հազվադեպ հիերոգլիֆների դեպքերը այնպիսի լեզուներում, ինչպիսիք են չինական, ճապոնական և կորեացի: Ավելին, որակային վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մոդելը սովորում է կենտրոնանալ հերոսների մասերի վրա, որոնք տեղադրում են թեմային պարունակություն, ինչը հանգեցնում է տեսողական տարածքում համապատասխան ներդրումների:', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী কাজের মানে চরিত্র-স্তরের মডেল তৈরি করে শব্দের সংগঠনের মডেল তৈরি করেছে, যার মানে কমপক্ষে কমপি শব্দের স্প তবে অনেক লেখা সিস্টেমের প্রতিনিধিত্বেও অক্ষর-স্তরের উপর প্রভাব ফেলেছে: অক্ষরের মানে তার অংশের সংখ্যা দ্বারা প্রযোজ্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই প্রভাব মডেল করি তাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি চরিত্রের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে চরিত্র তৈরি করে, চরিত্রের জন্য একটি ছবি তৈরি করে এটি চালানোর জন্য এক সুনির একটি টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশন কাজের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করছে যে এই মডেলে চীনা, জাপানি এবং কোরিয়ার মতো দুর্লম্ব ভাষায় ক্যারেক্টারের সুযোগ দেয় তাছাড়াও, পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল শিখে যাচ্ছে যে চরিত্রের অংশের দিকে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে যারা বিষয়বস্তু বহন করে যা', 'az': 'Əvvəlki işin sözlərin kompozisyonluğunu məsələlər yaratmaq üçün modelləşdirdi, bəzək sözlərin problemlərini azaltır. Ancaq çoxlu yazıb sistemlərində birləşdirilməsi karakter seviyesinə də bir etkisi var: bir karakterin anlamı parçalarının toplamı ilə təşkil edilir. Bu kağızda, biz bu təsiri şəkillərinin könüllü xüsusiyyətlərinə dayanan, şəkillərin şəkillərini yaratmaq və gönüllü şəkilləri yaratmaq üçün konvolucional nöral a ğ vasitəsilə təşkil edirik. Mətn klasifikasiyasının təcrübələrinin bəzi modeli Çin, Japon və Koreyalı dillərdə nadir karakterlərlə daha yaxşı işləməyə imkan verir. Üstəlik, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin məlumatı daşıyan məlumatı daşıyan məlumatın parçalarına odaqlanmasını göstərir ki, bu məlumatı görünür kosmosunda tamamlayır.', 'bs': 'Prethodni rad je modelirao kompoziciju riječi stvarajući modele značenja na nivou karaktera, smanjujući probleme rezerviteta rijetkih riječi. Međutim, u mnogim pisaćim sistemima kompozicionalnost ima utjecaj čak i na nivo karaktera: smisao karaktera je proizvedeno od sume njegovih dijelova. U ovom papiru, modeliramo ovaj efekat stvaranjem ugrađenja za karaktere na temelju njihovih vizualnih karakteristika, stvaranjem slike za karakter i provođenjem kroz konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu da proizvedemo vizuelni ugrađeni karakter. Eksperimenti na zadatku klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da takav model omogućava bolje obraditi slučajeve sa rijetkim likovima na jezicima poput kineskih, japanskih i korejskih jezika. Osim toga, kvalitativni analizi pokazuju da se naš predloženi model uči fokusirati na dijelove karaktera koji nose temeljni sadržaj koji rezultuju integracijama koji su usklađeni u vizualnom prostoru.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው ሥራ የቃላትን አካባቢነት በጽሑፍ-ደረጃ ምሳሌ በመፍጠር፣ በጥቂት ቃላት የተሳሳተ ጉዳይ የሚያጎድል ነው፡፡ However, in many writing systems compositionality has an effect even on the character-level: the meaning of a character is derived by the sum of its parts.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ይህንን የፊደል አካባቢ በአየር ፊደላቸውን በመፍጠር እናሳውቃለን፣ ለባሕራዊ አካላት እና ምስሉን ለመፍጠር እናደርጋታለን እና በጥያቄ የናውሬል መረብ ለመፍጠር እናደርጋታለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ትርጉም ስራ ላይ ፈተናዎች እንደዚህ ሞዴል በቻይና፣ ጃፓን እና ቆሬኛ እንደሆኑ ትንሽ አካላት ቋንቋዎች በሚያሳየው ምሳሌዎችን ለመሻል ይፈቅዳል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የባሕላዊ ጽሑፎችን ማምረዋል፣ በዓይነት ስፍራም የሚቆጠሩ የሥልጣናት ክፍሎች ላይ ማምረዋል፡፡', 'ca': "La feina anterior ha modelat la composicionalitat de les paraules creant models de significat a nivell de caràcter, reduint els problemes d'escassetat de paraules rares. Però en molts sistemes d'escriptura la composicionalitat té un efecte fins i tot en el nivell de caràcter: el significat d'un caràcter es deriva de la sum a de les seves parts. In this paper, we model this effect by creating embeddings for characters based on their visual characteristics, creating an image for the character and running it through a convolutional neural network to produce a visual character embedding.  Experiments on a text classification task demonstrate that such model allows for better processing of instances with rare characters in languages such as Chinese, Japanese, and Korean.  A més, les anàlisis qualitatives demostren que el nostre model proposat aprene a centrar-se en les parts de caràcters que porten contingut tòpic que resulten en incorporacions que són coherents a l'espai visual.", 'et': 'Eelmine töö on modelleerinud sõnade kompositsioonilisust, luues märgitasemel tähendusmudeleid, vähendades haruldaste sõnade hõreduse probleeme. Kuid paljudes kirjutamissüsteemides mõjutab kompositsioonilisus isegi märgi tasandil: märgi tähendus tuleneb selle osade summast. Selles töös modelleerime seda efekti, luues märkidele nende visuaalsete omaduste põhjal põhinevaid manustamisi, luues tegelasele pildi ja käivitades selle läbi konvolutsioonilise närvivõrgu visuaalse iseloomu manustamiseks. Teksti klassifitseerimise ülesande katsed näitavad, et selline mudel võimaldab haruldaste tähtedega juhtumeid paremini töödelda sellistes keeltes nagu hiina, jaapani ja korea keel. Lisaks näitavad kvalitatiivsed analüüsid, et meie kavandatud mudel õpib keskenduma tegelaste osadele, mis kannavad aktuaalset sisu, mille tulemuseks on visuaalses ruumis sidusad manustamised.', 'af': "Vorige werk het die komposiasionaliteit van woorde modelleer deur karaktervlak-modelles van betekenis te skep, met die verduur van probleme van sparsiteit vir rare woorde. Maar in baie skrifstelsels het 'n effek selfs op die karaktervlak: die betekening van 'n karakter word deur die sum van sy dele afgelei. In hierdie papier, ons model hierdie effek deur die skep van inbettings vir karakters gebaseer op hul visuele karakters, skep 'n beeld vir die karakter en loop dit deur 'n konvolusieele neuralnetwerk om 'n visuele karakterinbetering te produseer. Eksperimente op 'n teks klassifikasie taak vertoon dat sodanige model toelaat vir beter verwerking van voorbeelde met selfde karakters in tale soos Sjinees, Japanse en Koreaanse. In addition, qualitative analyses demonstrate that our proposed model lears to focus on the parts of characters that carry topical content which results in embedding that are coherent in visual space.", 'fi': 'Aiempi työ on mallintanut sanojen sommittelukykyä luomalla merkkitason merkitysmalleja, vähentäen harvinaisten sanojen niukkuusongelmia. Monissa kirjoitusjärjestelmissä sävellyksellä on kuitenkin vaikutusta jopa merkkitasoon: merkin merkitys johdetaan sen osien summasta. Tässä työssä mallinnamme tätä efektiä luomalla hahmoille upotuksia niiden visuaalisten ominaisuuksien perusteella, luomalla hahmolle kuvan ja ajamalla sen konvolutionaalisen neuroverkon läpi visuaalisen hahmoupotuksen aikaansaamiseksi. Tekstiluokitustehtävällä tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että tällainen malli mahdollistaa harvinaisten merkkien paremman käsittelyn esimerkiksi kiinan, japanin ja korean kielillä. Lisäksi laadulliset analyysit osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli oppii keskittymään hahmojen osiin, jotka kantavat ajankohtaista sisältöä, mikä johtaa visuaaliseen tilaan johdonmukaisiin upotuksiin.', 'cs': 'Předchozí práce modelovala kompozicionalitu slov vytvořením znakových modelů významu, což snižuje problémy řídkosti u vzácných slov. Nicméně v mnoha psacích systémech má kompozicionalita vliv i na znakovou úroveň: význam znaku je odvozen součtem jeho částí. V tomto článku modelujeme tento efekt vytvořením vložení pro postavy na základě jejich vizuálních charakteristik, vytvořením obrazu pro postavu a spuštěním přes konvoluční neuronovou síť k vytvoření vizuálního vložení znaků. Experimenty s úlohou klasifikace textu ukazují, že tento model umožňuje lepší zpracování instancí se vzácnými znaky v jazycích, jako je čínština, japonština a korejština. Kromě toho kvalitativní analýzy ukazují, že náš navržený model se naučí zaměřovat na části postav, které nesou aktuální obsah, což vede k vkládání, které jsou koherentní ve vizuálním prostoru.', 'sk': 'Predhodno delo je modeliralo kompozicionalnost besed z ustvarjanjem modelov pomena na ravni znakov in zmanjšalo probleme redkosti za redke besede. V mnogih pisalnih sistemih pa kompozicija vpliva tudi na raven znakov: pomen znaka izhaja iz vsote njegovih delov. V prispevku modeliramo ta učinek z ustvarjanjem vdelav za like, ki temeljijo na njihovih vizualnih značilnostih, ustvarjanjem slike za lik in njegovim izvajanjem skozi konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje, da ustvarimo vdelavo vizualnih znakov. Poskusi na opravilu klasifikacije besedila kažejo, da tak model omogoča boljšo obdelavo primerov z redkimi znaki v jezikih, kot so kitajščina, japonščina in korejščina. Poleg tega kvalitativne analize dokazujejo, da se naš predlagani model nauči osredotočiti na dele likov, ki nosijo aktualno vsebino, kar vodi do vgradnje, ki so koherentne v vizualnem prostoru.', 'ha': "Yin aikin da ya gabãni ya motsa composition of words by Creating the character-levels of ma'anin, Reducing the problems of kicsity for rare words. Amma, cikin wasu masu daidaita na'urar rubutu, yana da wani mai amfani kan babban-daraja: An ƙara fassarar wani rubutu da ƙarami. Daga wannan takardan, muna motsa wannan Effekt da za'a ƙiƙiro fili masu baka kan karatun masu gane, suna samun zane wa tabar da ke tafiyar da shi a wani jerin neural na tsammani don ya sami wani karatun mai gani wanda za'a fito. Tajararin a kan wani aikin mai fasa matsayi ya nuna cewa, misalin wannan yana yarda da amfani da masu amfani da shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka da wasu misãlai masu sauri cikin harshen, kamar China, Japane da Koriya. Furan, Anaƙatan da ake yi na nuna cewa misalinmu wanda aka buƙata yana karanta fokus a kan rabo masu karatun da ke ɗaukar maɓallin topical da ke ƙara cikin fili mai gani.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, akeh pisan sistem sing ditambangkuyung, dadi nêmên pating amane nang sampeyan cara-seneng: kabèh nêmên pating nggo sampeyan pating dadi. Nang pebuk iki, kita model efek iki dadi nggawe embedding kanggo Kebebasan caratar sing bisalalan ning caratar sualan, nggawe Gambar kanggo Kebebasan Jabun Miscellaneous Mungkin maneh, kaliterasi dipunanggé lan wigatining akeh model sing nyimpen nggambar cara-cara sing nyimpen nggawe ngubah akeh cara-cara sing dadi sing ngwalih cara-cara sing dadi sekang winih sing berarti ning terakhir liyane', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ནི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བཅས་ཀྱི་མ་དབུགས་རིས་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཕར་ཆེན ཡིན་ནའང་། འབྲི་ནུས་མ་ལག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཚད་གང་ཡང་ལྟར་ཡོད་པ་མཚོན་ན། In this paper, we model this effect by creating embeddings for characters based on their visual characteristics, creating an image for the character and running it through a convolutional neural network to produce a visual character embedding. ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལ་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་མིང་འདི་དག་གི་མིང་རྣམས་ལ་སྔོན་པ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་ མ་ཟད། བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྲོལ་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་བར་སྟོང་ནང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོའི་ནང', 'he': 'Previous work has modeled the compositionality of words by creating character-level models of meaning, reducing problems of sparsity for rare words.  בכל אופן, במערכות הכתיבה רבות יש השפעה אפילו על רמת האופי: המשמעות של אופי מושלמת על ידי סכום החלקים שלה. בנייר הזה, אנו דוגמנים את ההשפעה הזו על ידי יצירת תוספות לדמויות המבוססות על אופיינים ויזואליים שלהם, יצירת תמונה לדמות והפעלה דרך רשת עצבית משתנה כדי לייצר תוספת אופיינים ויזואליים. Experiments on a text classification task demonstrate that such model allows for better processing of instances with rare characters in languages such as Chinese, Japanese, and Korean.  בנוסף, ניתוחים איכותיים מראים שהמודל המוצע שלנו לומד להתמקד בחלקים של דמויות שנושאים תוכן נושאי שהוביל בתכניות שקשורות בחלל ויזואלי.'}
{'en': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'ar': 'نهج التعلم التدريجي لـ Chinese SRL باستخدام بيانات غير متجانسة', 'fr': "Approche d'apprentissage progressif du SRL chinois à l'aide de données hétérogènes", 'pt': 'Uma abordagem de aprendizado progressivo para SRL chinês usando dados heterogêneos', 'es': 'Un enfoque de aprendizaje progresivo para SRL chino mediante datos heterogéneos', 'ja': '異種データを使用した中国SRLへのプログレッシブ学習アプローチ', 'ru': 'Прогрессивный подход к обучению китайскому СРЛ с использованием гетерогенных данных', 'hi': 'विषम डेटा का उपयोग कर चीनी SRL के लिए एक प्रगतिशील सीखने का दृष्टिकोण', 'zh': '汉语异构数SRL渐进式学法', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Foghlama Forásach maidir le SRL na Síne ag Úsáid Sonraí Ilchineálacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια προοδευτική μαθησιακή προσέγγιση στην κινεζική χρήση ετερογενών δεδομένων', 'hu': 'A Chinese SRL progresszív tanulási megközelítése heterogén adatok felhasználásával', 'it': 'Un approccio di apprendimento progressivo alla Chinese SRL utilizzando dati eterogeni', 'kk': 'Қытайша SRL бағдарламалы оқыту жағдайыName', 'lt': 'Progresuojantis mokymosi metodas Kinijos SRL naudojant heterogeninius duomenis', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'ms': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'mn': 'Хятад СРЛ-ын хөгжлийн суралцах ойлголт Хятад Хятад Хятад СРЛ-ийн хувьд Хитерогийн өгөгдлийг ашиглаж', 'mt': 'Approċċ ta’ Tagħlim Progressiv għal SRL Ċiniża bl-użu ta’ Dejta Eteroġenea', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Postępowe podejście do nauki chińskiej SRL z wykorzystaniem heterogennych danych', 'sr': 'Progressivni pristup učenju kineskim SRL Koristenjem Heterogenijih podataka', 'ro': 'O abordare progresivă de învățare a companiei chineze SRL folosind date heterogene', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL using Heterogeneous Data', 'sv': 'En progressiv inlärningsmetod för kinesiska SRL med hjälp av heterogena data', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Progressive Learning tiếp cận tới China SR Nhờ Dữ liệu sạch sẽ', 'bg': 'Прогресивен подход за учене на китайски език с помощта на хетерогенни данни', 'nl': 'Een progressieve leerbenadering voor Chinese SRL met behulp van heterogene gegevens', 'hr': 'Progressivni pristup učenju kineskim SRL-om korištenjem Heterogenijih podataka', 'da': 'En progressiv læringstilgang til kinesisk SRL ved hjælp af heterogene data', 'de': 'Ein progressiver Lernansatz für chinesische SRL unter Verwendung heterogener Daten', 'id': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '이기종 데이터 기반의 중국어 SRL 점진적 학습 방법', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Maendeleo yanakaribia SRL kwa kutumia taarifa za Heterogeneous data', 'sq': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'am': 'Name', 'tr': "Heterogen Maglumaty ullanýan Çinçe SRL'a öwrenmek golaýy", 'az': "Çin SRL'in tədbirli öyrənmə yaxınlığı", 'bn': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'bs': 'Progresivan pristup učenju kineskoj SRL Korištenjem Heterogenijih podataka', 'et': 'Progressiivse õppimise lähenemisviis Hiina SRL-le, kasutades heterogeenseid andmeid', 'cs': 'Progresivní učení přístup k čínské SRL s využitím heterogenních dat', 'hy': 'Հետրոգենային տվյալներ օգտագործելով', 'ca': "Un enfocament d'aprenentatge progresiu a l'SRL xinesa utilitzant dades heterogènes", 'fi': 'Edistyvä oppimistapa kiinalaiseen SRL:ään heterogeenisen datan avulla', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'sk': 'Napredni pristop k učenju kitajskega SRL z uporabo heterogenih podatkov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'A Progressive Learning Approach to Chinese SRL Using Heterogeneous Data', 'bo': 'འཕེལ་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་SRL ལ་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནས་བློ་གཏོང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'Previous studies on Chinese semantic role labeling (SRL) have concentrated on a single semantically annotated corpus. But the training data of single corpus is often limited. Whereas the other existing semantically annotated corpora for Chinese SRL are scattered across different annotation frameworks. But still, Data sparsity remains a bottleneck. This situation calls for larger training datasets, or effective approaches which can take advantage of highly heterogeneous data. In this paper, we focus mainly on the latter, that is, to improve Chinese SRL by using heterogeneous corpora together. We propose a novel progressive learning model which augments the Progressive Neural Network with Gated Recurrent Adapters. The model can accommodate heterogeneous inputs and effectively transfer knowledge between them. We also release a new corpus, Chinese SemBank, for Chinese SRL. Experiments on CPB 1.0 show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'ركزت الدراسات السابقة حول تصنيف الدور الدلالي الصيني (SRL) على مجموعة واحدة مشروحة لغويًا. لكن بيانات التدريب للمجموعة الفردية غالبًا ما تكون محدودة. في حين أن الشركات الأخرى الموجودة ذات التعليقات التوضيحية المعنوية لـ Chinese SRL مبعثرة عبر أطر عمل توضيحية مختلفة. لكن مع ذلك ، لا يزال تباين البيانات يمثل عنق الزجاجة. يتطلب هذا الموقف مجموعات بيانات تدريب أكبر ، أو مناهج فعالة يمكن أن تستفيد من البيانات غير المتجانسة للغاية. في هذه الورقة ، نركز بشكل أساسي على الأخير ، أي تحسين SRL الصينية باستخدام مجموعات غير متجانسة معًا. نقترح نموذجًا تعليميًا تقدميًا جديدًا يعزز الشبكة العصبية التقدمية باستخدام المحولات المتكررة ذات البوابات. يمكن للنموذج استيعاب المدخلات غير المتجانسة ونقل المعرفة بشكل فعال فيما بينها. قمنا أيضًا بإصدار مجموعة جديدة ، SemBank الصيني ، لشركة Chinese SRL. تظهر التجارب على CPB 1.0 أن نموذجنا يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب.', 'fr': "Des études antérieures sur l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL) chinois se sont concentrées sur un seul corpus annoté sémantiquement. Mais les données de formation d'un seul corpus sont souvent limitées. Alors que les autres corpus annotés sémantiquement existants pour la SRL chinoise sont dispersés dans différents cadres d'annotation. Néanmoins, la rareté des données reste un goulot d'étranglement. Cette situation nécessite des ensembles de données de formation plus importants ou des approches efficaces qui peuvent tirer parti de données très hétérogènes. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons principalement sur ce dernier point, c'est-à-dire l'amélioration de la SRL chinoise en utilisant ensemble des corpus hétérogènes. Nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'apprentissage progressif qui augmente le réseau de neurones progressifs avec des adaptateurs récurrents déclenchés. Le modèle peut prendre en compte des entrées hétérogènes et transférer efficacement des connaissances entre elles. Nous publions également un nouveau corpus, Chinese Sembank, pour Chinese SRL. Les expériences sur CPB 1.0 montrent que notre modèle surpasse les méthodes de pointe.", 'pt': 'Estudos anteriores sobre rotulagem de papel semântico chinês (SRL) concentraram-se em um único corpus anotado semanticamente. Mas os dados de treinamento de um único corpus são frequentemente limitados. Enquanto os outros corpora anotados semanticamente existentes para o SRL chinês estão espalhados por diferentes estruturas de anotação. Mas ainda assim, a escassez de dados continua sendo um gargalo. Essa situação exige conjuntos de dados de treinamento maiores ou abordagens eficazes que podem tirar proveito de dados altamente heterogêneos. Neste artigo, focamos principalmente neste último, ou seja, melhorar o SRL chinês usando corpora heterogêneos juntos. Propomos um novo modelo de aprendizado progressivo que aumenta a Rede Neural Progressiva com Adaptadores Recorrentes Gated. O modelo pode acomodar entradas heterogêneas e efetivamente transferir conhecimento entre elas. Também lançamos um novo corpus, chinês SemBank, para chinês SRL. Experimentos no CPB 1.0 mostram que nosso modelo supera os métodos de última geração.', 'es': 'Los estudios anteriores sobre el etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) chino se han concentrado en un solo corpus anotado semánticamente. Sin embargo, los datos de entrenamiento de un solo corpus suelen ser limitados. Mientras que los otros corpus anotados semánticamente existentes para la SRL china están dispersos en diferentes marcos de anotación. Sin embargo, la escasez de datos sigue siendo un cuello de botella. Esta situación exige conjuntos de datos de capacitación más amplios o enfoques eficaces que puedan aprovechar los datos altamente heterogéneos. En este artículo, nos centramos principalmente en lo último, es decir, en mejorar la SRL china mediante el uso conjunto de cuerpos heterogéneos. Proponemos un modelo novedoso de aprendizaje progresivo que aumenta la red neuronal progresiva con adaptadores recurrentes cerrados. El modelo puede acomodar insumos heterogéneos y transferir eficazmente el conocimiento entre ellos. También publicamos un nuevo corpus, Chinese SemBank, para Chinese SRL. Los experimentos en CPB 1.0 muestran que nuestro modelo supera a los métodos más avanzados.', 'ja': '中国語の意味論的役割ラベリング（ SRL ）に関する以前の研究は、単一の意味論的注釈付きコーパスに集中しています。しかし、単一コーパスのトレーニングデータはしばしば限定的である。一方、中国語SRLのための他の既存のセマンティック注釈付きコーパは、異なる注釈フレームワークに分散されています。しかし、データの希少性は依然としてボトルネックです。この状況では、より大きなトレーニングデータセット、または非常に多様なデータを活用できる効果的なアプローチが必要です。本稿では、主に後者、すなわち異質なコーパを併用することで中国のSRLを向上させることに焦点を当てる。私たちは、ゲーテッドリカレントアダプターでプログレッシブニューラルネットワークを拡張する、新しいプログレッシブラーニングモデルを提案します。このモデルは、不均一な入力に対応し、それらの間で効果的に知識を転送することができます。また、中国SRLのための新しいコーパス、中国SemBankもリリースしています。CPB 1.0の実験では、当社のモデルは最先端の方法よりも優れていることが示されています。', 'zh': '旧语语义角色标签(SRL)研集单语义注语料库上。 然单语料库训练,率常有限。 而中文SRL他见语义注语料库散在框架中。 然数疏犹一瓶颈也。 此须大练数集,或可用高异构数之效也。 其在本文,主注后者,并用异构语料库来改中文SRL。 立渐进式学模,因门控递归适配器以渐进式神经网络。 其形可以应异构,而移之于其间。 发一新语料库,中国SemBank,施于中国SRL。 CPB 1.0之实验,先之之道也。', 'ru': 'Предыдущие исследования китайской семантической ролевой маркировки (SRL) были сосредоточены на одном семантически аннотированном корпусе. Однако данные о профессиональной подготовке в рамках единого корпуса зачастую ограничены. В то время как другие существующие семантически аннотированные корпуса для Chinese SRL разбросаны по разным аннотационным каркасам. Но тем не менее, скудность данных остается узким местом. Эта ситуация требует больших наборов учебных данных или эффективных подходов, которые могут использовать преимущества высоко разнородных данных. В этой статье мы сосредоточимся в основном на последнем, то есть на улучшении китайской СРЛ путем совместного использования гетерогенных тел. Мы предлагаем новую прогрессивную модель обучения, которая дополняет прогрессивную нейронную сеть синхронными рекуррентными адаптерами. Модель может учитывать неоднородные входные данные и эффективно передавать знания между ними. Мы также выпускаем новый корпус, китайский SemBank, для китайской SRL. Эксперименты на CPB 1.0 показывают, что наша модель превосходит современные методы.', 'hi': 'चीनी शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) पर पिछले अध्ययनों ने एक एकल शब्दार्थ रूप से एनोटेट कॉर्पस पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। लेकिन एकल कॉर्पस का प्रशिक्षण डेटा अक्सर सीमित होता है। जबकि चीनी एसआरएल के लिए अन्य मौजूदा शब्दार्थ रूप से एनोटेटेड कॉर्पोरेट विभिन्न एनोटेशन फ्रेमवर्क में बिखरे हुए हैं। लेकिन फिर भी, डेटा sparsity एक बाधा बनी हुई है। यह स्थिति बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट, या प्रभावी दृष्टिकोणों के लिए कहती है जो अत्यधिक विषम डेटा का लाभ उठा सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम मुख्य रूप से उत्तरार्द्ध पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, अर्थात, विषम निगम का एक साथ उपयोग करके चीनी एसआरएल को बेहतर बनाने के लिए। हम एक उपन्यास प्रगतिशील सीखने के मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो गेटेड आवर्तक एडाप्टर के साथ प्रगतिशील तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को बढ़ाता है। मॉडल विषम इनपुट को समायोजित कर सकता है और उनके बीच ज्ञान को प्रभावी ढंग से स्थानांतरित कर सकता है। हम चीनी एसआरएल के लिए एक नया कॉर्पस, चीनी सेमबैंक भी जारी करते हैं। CPB 1.0 पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Dhírigh staidéir roimhe seo ar róil-lipéadú shéimeantach na Síne (SRL) ar chorpas aonair anótáilte go séimeantach. Ach is minic a bhíonn teorainn le sonraí oiliúna an chorpais aonair. Cé go bhfuil na corparáidí eile atá anótáilte go séimeantach do SRL na Síne scaipthe thar chreataí nótaí éagsúla. Ach fós féin, is bac fós é tearcúlacht Sonraí. Éilíonn an cás seo go mbeidh tacair shonraí oiliúna níos mó, nó cineálacha cur chuige éifeachtacha ann a fhéadfaidh leas a bhaint as sonraí an-ilchineálacha. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid go príomha ar an dara ceann, is é sin, feabhas a chur ar SRL na Síne trí úsáid a bhaint as corpora ilchineálach le chéile. Molaimid múnla foghlama forásach nua a chuireann leis an Líonra Néarrach Forásach le Cuibheoirí Athfhillteacha Gated. Is féidir leis an tsamhail freastal ar ionchuir ilchineálacha agus eolas a aistriú go héifeachtach eatarthu. Eisímid corpas nua freisin, SemBank na Síne, le haghaidh SRL na Síne. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar CPB 1.0 go sáraíonn ár samhail na modhanna nua-aimseartha.', 'ka': 'წინა ჩინეთი სიმენტიკური პროლის მართლაზე (SRL) კონტენსტირებულია ერთი სიმენტიკურად ანოტირებული კორპუსზე. მაგრამ ერთი კორპუსის მონაცემები ზოგრად უფრო დაფარდება. მაგრამ მეორე სემონტიკურად ჩინეთი SRL-ის კოპორაცია განსხვავებული ნიოტაციის ფრამებში გადატანა. მაგრამ მაგრამ, მონაცემების სიცოცხლე დარჩენა ბრძელი. ეს სიტაციაცია უფრო დიდი განათლების მონაცემების შესახებ, ან ეფექტიური შესახებ, რომელიც შეუძლიათ გამოიყენოთ ძალიან ჰეტერეგენი მონაცე ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ უფრო კონუქტირებით შემდეგ, ეს არის, რომ ჩინეთი SRL-ს უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ ჩვენ პროგრესიური სწავლის მოდელს მინდა, რომელიც პროგრესიური ნეიროლური ქსელის გაზრდება, რომელიც გაზრდება დაკავშირებული მოდიაპტებით. მოდელის შესაძლებელია ჰეტეროგენური მონაცემები და ეფექტიურად იცნობის გადატვირთვა. ჩვენ ასევე ახალი კორპუს, ჩინეთი SemBank, ჩინეთი SRL-ს გახსნა. CPB 1.0-ის ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობად გავაკეთება ხელსაწყისი მეტივები.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενες μελέτες σχετικά με την κινεζική σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (SRL) έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε ένα μόνο σημασιολογικά σχολιασμένο σώμα. Αλλά τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης του ενιαίου σώματος είναι συχνά περιορισμένα. Ενώ τα άλλα υπάρχοντα σημασιολογικά σχολιασμένα σώματα για την κινεζική είναι διάσπαρτα σε διαφορετικά πλαίσια σχολιασμού. Αλλά και πάλι, η έλλειψη δεδομένων παραμένει ένα εμπόδιο. Η κατάσταση αυτή απαιτεί μεγαλύτερα σύνολα δεδομένων κατάρτισης ή αποτελεσματικές προσεγγίσεις που μπορούν να επωφεληθούν από ιδιαίτερα ετερογενή δεδομένα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εστιάζουμε κυρίως στο τελευταίο, δηλαδή στη βελτίωση της κινεζικής εταιρείας χρησιμοποιώντας ετερογενή σώματα μαζί. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο προοδευτικής μάθησης που ενισχύει το Προοδευτικό Νευρικό Δίκτυο με Gated Recurrent Adapters. Το μοντέλο μπορεί να φιλοξενήσει ετερογενείς εισροές και να μεταφέρει αποτελεσματικά τη γνώση μεταξύ τους. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης ένα νέο σώμα, την Chinese SemBank, για την Chinese SRL. Τα πειράματα στο CPB 1.0 δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'it': "Studi precedenti sull'etichettatura semantica cinese dei ruoli (SRL) si sono concentrati su un unico corpus semanticamente annotato. Ma i dati di allenamento del singolo corpo sono spesso limitati. Mentre gli altri corpora semanticamente annotati per Chinese SRL sono sparsi in diversi framework di annotazione. Tuttavia, la scarsità di dati rimane un collo di bottiglia. Questa situazione richiede insiemi di dati formativi più ampi o approcci efficaci che possano trarre vantaggio da dati altamente eterogenei. In questo articolo ci concentriamo principalmente su quest'ultimo, ovvero migliorare Chinese SRL utilizzando corpora eterogenea insieme. Proponiamo un nuovo modello di apprendimento progressivo che aumenta la rete neurale progressiva con adattatori ricorrenti Gated. Il modello può accogliere input eterogenei e trasferire efficacemente le conoscenze tra di loro. Pubblichiamo anche un nuovo corpus, Chinese SemBank, per Chinese SRL. Gli esperimenti su CPB 1.0 mostrano che il nostro modello supera i metodi più moderni.", 'kk': 'Қытай semantic role labeling (SRL) деген алдыңғы зерттеулері бір semantically annotated corpus- ға аударылды. Бірақ бір корпус оқыту деректері көбінесе шектелген. Қытай SRL үшін басқа семантикалық белгіленген корпора әртүрлі белгілер фреймдеріне таратылады. Бірақ бірақ Деректердің бөлігі қалды. Бұл мәлімет үлкен оқыту деректер жиындарын, немесе әсер етерген деректерді пайдалануға болады. Бұл қағазда, негізінде соңғыларға көңіл береміз, мысалы, Қытай SRL-ді бірге гетероген корпора қолдану үшін жақсарту үшін. Біз романдық прогрессивні оқыту үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бірақ қайталанған адаптерлерден қайталанған прогрессивні нейрондық желі көбейтеді. Бұл үлгі гетероген енгізулерді және олардың арасындағы білімдерді әсер етеді. Қытайша SRL үшін жаңа корпус, Қытайша шембанк, шығарып тастадық. CPB 1.0 туралы тәжірибелеріміздің моделіміздің күй- жай әдістерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Ankstesniuose Kinijos semantinio vaidmens ženklinimo tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama vienam semantiniu būdu anotuotam korpusui. Tačiau vieno korpuso mokymo duomenys dažnai yra riboti. kadangi kiti esami semantiškai anotuoti Kinijos SRL korporai skirstomi į skirtingas anotacijų sistemas. Vis dėlto duomenų mažumas išlieka kliūtimi. Tokia padėtis reikalauja didesnių mokymo duomenų rinkinių arba veiksmingų metodų, kurie galėtų pasinaudoti labai skirtingais duomenimis. In this paper, we focus mainly on the latter, that is, to improve Chinese SRL by using heterogeneous corpora together.  We propose a novel progressive learning model which augments the Progressive Neural Network with Gated Recurrent Adapters.  Modelis gali pritaikyti įvairiapusius įvedimus ir veiksmingai perduoti žinias vienas kitam. Mes taip pat išleidžiame naują korpusą, Kinijos SemBank, Kinijos SRL. Eksperimentai su CPB 1.0 rodo, kad mūsų modelis atitinka pažangiausius metodus.', 'mk': 'Претходните студии за означување на кинеска семантична улога (СРЛ) се концентрираа на еден семантично анотиран корпус. Но податоците за обука на еден корпус честопати се ограничени. Додека другите семантично анотирани корпора за Кинескиот СРЛ се раширени низ различни рамки за анотирање. Но сепак, реткоста на податоците останува ќор-сокак. Оваа ситуација бара поголеми податоци за обука или ефикасни пристапи кои можат да ги искористат високо хетерогенските податоци. Во овој весник, се фокусираме главно на последниот, тоа е, за подобрување на кинескиот СРЛ со користење на heterogeneous corpora заедно. We propose a novel progressive learning model which augments the Progressive Neural Network with Gated Recurrent Adapters.  The model can accommodate heterogeneous inputs and effectively transfer knowledge between them.  Исто така ослободивме нов корпус, Кинеска Сембанка, за Кинеска СРЛ. Експериментите на CPB 1.0 покажуваат дека нашиот модел ги надминува најдобрите методи.', 'ms': 'kajian sebelumnya mengenai label peranan semantik Cina (SRL) telah berkoncentrasi pada satu korpus yang ditandai secara semantik. Tapi data latihan dari satu korpus sering terbatas. Sementara korpra yang ada secara semantik untuk SRL Cina tersebar melalui bingkai annotasi yang berbeza. Tetapi masih, kecerahan data tetap satu pengendalian botol. Situasi ini memerlukan set data latihan yang lebih besar, atau pendekatan yang efektif yang boleh mengambil keuntungan dari data yang sangat heterogene. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus terutamanya pada yang terakhir, iaitu, untuk meningkatkan SRL Cina dengan menggunakan corpora heterogene bersama-sama. Kami cadangkan model pembelajaran progresif yang menambah Rangkaian Neural Progresif dengan Penyesuai Berulang Gated. Model ini boleh mengakomodasi masukan heterogene dan secara efektif memindahkan pengetahuan antara mereka. Kami juga melepaskan korpus baru, SemBank Cina, untuk SRL Cina. Eksperimen pada CPB 1.0 menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art.', 'hu': 'Korábbi tanulmányok a kínai szemantikai szerepkörcímkézésről (SRL) egyetlen szemantikusan megjegyzett korpuszra koncentráltak. De az egyetlen korpusz edzési adatai gyakran korlátozottak. Míg a többi meglévő, szemantikusan megjegyzett korpora a Chinese SRL számára különböző megjegyzési keretrendszerekben van szétszórva. De mégis, az adatok ritkasága továbbra is szűk keresztmetszet. Ez a helyzet nagyobb képzési adatkészleteket vagy hatékony megközelítéseket igényel, amelyek kihasználhatják a rendkívül heterogén adatokat. Ebben a tanulmányban elsősorban az utóbbira összpontosítunk, azaz a kínai SRL fejlesztésére heterogén corporák együttes használatával. Egy új progresszív tanulási modellt javasolunk, amely a Progresszív Neurális Hálózatot kapott ismétlődő adapterekkel bővíti. A modell képes a heterogén inputokat alkalmazni és hatékonyan átadni a tudást közöttük. Egy új korpuszt, a Chinese SemBank-ot is kiadunk a Chinese SRL számára. A CPB 1.0-val végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket.', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d കെന പക്ഷെ ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. Whereas the other existing semantically annotated corpora for Chinese SRL are scattered across different annotation frameworks.  പക്ഷെ ഇപ്പോഴും ഡേറ്റാ സ്പെയിസിറ്റി ഒരു ബോട്ട്ലെങ്കില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഈ സാഹചര്യം കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വിളിക്കുന്നു, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അത്യുത്തമമായ വിവരങ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട അവസാനത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ചൈനീസ് എസ്ആര്\u200dഎലിനെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഒരുമ ഗേട്ട് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ആഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200dമാരുമായി പ്രോഗ്രാജിവ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് കൂട്ടുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രാ ഈ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന വെളിച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെ കൂട്ടാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അവയ്ക്കിടയില ചൈനീസ് സെമ്ബാങ്ക്, ചൈനീസ് എസ്ആര്\u200dഎലിനു വേണ്ടി ഒരു പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് വിടുന്നു. സിപിബി 1. 0-ലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാര്\u200dട്ട് രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്', 'mt': 'Studji preċedenti dwar it-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku Ċiniż (SRL) ikkonċentraw fuq korpus wieħed b’annotazzjoni semantika. Iżda d-dejta dwar it-taħriġ ta’ korpus wieħed ħafna drabi hija limitata. Filwaqt li l-korpra l-oħra eżistenti b’annotazzjoni semantika għall-SRL Ċiniża tinfirex f’oqfsa differenti ta’ annotazzjoni. Iżda xorta waħda, l-iskarsezza tad-dejta tibqa’ ostaklu. Din is-sitwazzjoni titlob settijiet ta’ dejta akbar ta’ taħriġ, jew approċċi effettivi li jistgħu jieħdu vantaġġ minn dejta eteroġena ħafna. F’dan id-dokument, aħna niffokaw l-aktar fuq dan tal-aħħar, jiġifieri, li ttejjeb l-SRL Ċiniża billi tuża korpura eteroġenea flimkien. We propose a novel progressive learning model which augments the Progressive Neural Network with Gated Recurrent Adapters.  Il-mudell jista’ jakkomoda inputs eteroġeni u effettivament jittrasferixxi l-għarfien bejniethom. Aħna nirrilaxxaw ukoll korpus ġdid, Chinese SemBank, għal Chinese SRL. L-esperimenti fuq CPB 1.0 juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa aktar avvanzat mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Хятадын semantic role labeling (SRL) талаар өмнөх судалгаанууд нэг semantic annotated corpus дээр төвлөрсөн. Гэхдээ ганц корпусын сургалтын мэдээллийг ихэвчлэн хязгаарлагддаг. Хятад СРЛ-ын өөр нэг сургуулийн үеийн анзаарсан корпора өөр өөр анзаарлын хэлбэрээр тархсан байна. Гэхдээ хэдий ч, өгөгдлийн бөөмбөлөг нь салбар байдаг. Энэ нөхцөл нь их сургалтын өгөгдлийн сангууд, эсвэл эффективны арга баримтуудыг ашиглаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ихэнхдээ хамтдаа Хятадын СРЛ-г сайжруулахад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид шинэ хөгжлийн суралцах загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хамтдаа дахин дахин адаптеруудын хөгжлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Тийм загвар нь тэдний хоорондох мэдлэгийг эерэг үр дүнтэй шилжүүлж чадна. Мөн Хятадын СРЛ-д шинэ корпус, Хятадын SemBank-г ашиглаж байна. CPB 1.0-ийн туршилтууд бидний загвар нь урлагийн төвшин арга замыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Førre studiar om kinesisk semantisk rolletiketting (SRL) er konsentrert på ein enkel semantisk merkt korpus. Men treningsdata for enkelt korpus er ofte begrenset. Mens den andre eksisterande semantisk markerte korpora for kinesiske SRL er sprett over ulike notasjonsrammeverk. Men likevel blir datasparsitet ein botnekk. Denne situasjonen påkallar for større opplæringsdataset eller effektiv tilnærmingar som kan bruka nyttighet av stor heterogeneske data. I denne papiret fokuserer vi hovudsakelig på den siste, som er å forbetra kinesisk SRL ved å bruka heterogeneske korpora sammen. Vi foreslår ein novel progressiv læringsmodell som aukar den progresiv neuralnettverket med samla gjentaande adapterer. Modellen kan tilpassa heterogenene inndata og overføra kunnskap mellom dei. Vi gjev også ein ny korpus, kinesisk semibank, for kinesisk SRL. Eksperimentar på CPB 1.0 viser at modellen vårt utfører mellom kunstmetodar.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie badania dotyczące chińskiego semantycznego oznaczania roli (SRL) koncentrowały się na jednym semantycznie adnotacyjnym korpusie. Jednak dane treningowe pojedynczego korpusu są często ograniczone. Natomiast inne istniejące semantycznie adnotacje korpusów dla chińskiej SRL są rozproszone w różnych frameworkach adnotacji. Ale i tak, Data Sparsity pozostaje wąskim gardłem. Sytuacja ta wymaga większych zbiorów danych szkoleniowych lub skutecznych podejść, które mogą wykorzystać wysoce heterogeniczne dane. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się głównie na tym ostatnim, czyli poprawie chińskiej SRL poprzez wspólne wykorzystanie heterogenicznych korpusów. Proponujemy nowy model progresywnego uczenia się, który rozszerza Progressive Neuroral Network o Gated Recurrent Adapters. Model może uwzględniać różnorodne wejścia i skutecznie przekazywać między nimi wiedzę. Wydajemy również nowy korpus, Chinese SemBank, dla Chinese SRL. Eksperymenty na CPB 1.0 pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody.', 'ro': 'Studiile anterioare privind etichetarea rolurilor semantice chineze (SRL) s-au concentrat pe un singur corpus adnotat semantic. Dar datele de antrenament ale corpului unic sunt adesea limitate. În timp ce celelalte corpore adnotate semantic existente pentru Chinese SRL sunt împrăștiate pe diferite cadre de adnotare. Dar totuşi, sparsitatea datelor rămâne un blocaj. Această situație necesită seturi mai mari de date de formare sau abordări eficiente care să poată profita de date foarte eterogene. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm în principal pe aceasta din urmă, adică îmbunătățirea Chinese SRL prin utilizarea împreună a corporelor eterogene. Propunem un nou model de învățare progresivă care sporește rețeaua Neurală Progresivă cu adaptoare recurente Gated. Modelul poate găzdui intrări eterogene și poate transfera eficient cunoștințe între ele. De asemenea, lansăm un nou corpus, Chinese SemBank, pentru Chinese SRL. Experimentele pe CPB 1.0 arată că modelul nostru depășește metodele de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Prethodna ispitivanja o etiketi kineske semantičke uloge (SRL) koncentrisana su na jednog semantički annotiranog korpusa. Ali podaci o obuci jednog korpusa često su ograničeni. Međutim, druga postojeća semantički annotirana korpora za kineski SRL se raspršila u različitim okvirama annotacije. Ali ipak, poštetnost podataka ostaje bočica. Ova situacija poziva na veće podatke o obuci ili efikasne pristupe koje mogu iskoristiti veoma heterogenezne podatke. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se uglavnom na poslednju, to je, da poboljšamo kinesku SRL koristeći heterogeneznu korporu zajedno. Predlažemo novi progresivni model učenja koji povećava naprednu neuronsku mrežu sa prikupljenim ponovnim adapterima. Model može ubrzati heterogenene ulaze i efektivno prenositi znanje između njih. Takoðe oslobodimo novi korpus, Kineski SemBank, za kineski SRL. Eksperimenti na CPB 1.0 pokazuju da naš model izvršava metode umetnosti.', 'si': 'මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය චීනි සෙමැන්ටික් ලේබිල් එක (SRL) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා. ඒත් එකම කෝර්පුස් ගේ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සීමාවිත වෙනවා. ඒ වගේම අනිත් විශ්වාසයෙන් සිමාන්තික විදිහට චීනි SRL සඳහා කොර්පෝරා විශේෂ විදිහට පිටවෙනවා. ඒත් තාමත් දත්ත ස්පාර්සිටි බෝට්ලන්ගෙන් ඉන්නවා. මේ ස්ථානය වැඩි ප්\u200dරේෂණික දත්ත සේට් වලට කියන්න, නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි අන්තිම ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂයෙන්, ඉතින්, චීනී SRL විශේෂ කරන්න, හෙටිරෝජින් කොර්පෝරා එකට භ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරධානයක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණ ජාලයේ ගැට්ටුවේ ප මොඩේල් එක පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් නිර්මාණයෙන් පිළිගන්න සහ හැකියෙන් ඒවා අතර දැනගන්න. අපි අළුත් කෝර්පුස් එකක්, චීනි සෙම්බෑන්ක්, චීනි SRL වලින්. CPB 1.0 විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩල් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada hore oo ku saabsan qayb kale ee Shiino (SRL) waxay ku kalsoonaadaan hal qof oo hal ka mid ah oo la dhibaataysay. Laakiin waxbarashada hal qof oo kaliya inta badan waa xad. Inta darteed shirkadaha kale ee ay ku jiraan si qeyb ah shirkad ay ku dhibaatayso Shiino SRL waxay ku kala firidhsan yihiin shirkado kala duduwan. Laakin weli, dhamaanka macluumaadku waxay ku jirtaa baal. Xaaladanku wuxuu u yeedhaa koorasyo waxbarasho oo waaweyn ama qaabab faa’iido ah oo isticmaali kara macluumaad kala duduwan. Warqadan waxaynu ugu dirnaa qofka ugu dambeeya, taas oo ah horumarinta SRL ee Shiinaha ku isticmaalka shirkad xiddig ah. Waxaan horumarinaynaa model waxbarasho horumarinta ah oo kordhiya shabakadda Progressive Neural Network with Gated Recurrent Adapters. Tusaale ahaan wuxuu heli karaa midhaha kala duwan iyo aqoonta si faa’iido leh u beddeli karaa dhexdooda. Sidoo kale waxaynu u furaynaa Shiinaha SemBank, Shiino SRL. Imtixaanka ku qoran CPB 1.0 waxay muuqataa in modelkeenu uu sameeyo hababka farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய படிப்புகள் சீனா அரைப்பு பங்குத் தலைப்பு (எஸ்ஆர்எல்) ஒரு ஒற்றைப் பாதிக்கப்பட்ட கோர்ப்ஸ் மீது கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட ஆனால் ஒரு கோர்ப்புஸ் பயிற்சி தரவு பெரும்பாலும் வரம்பு உள்ளது. ஆனால் மற்ற இருக்கும் இருக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட நிறுவனத்தை சீன செய்ய எஸ்ஆர்எல்களுக்காக வேறு வித்தியாசமான அறிவ ஆனாலும் இன்னும், தரவு வெளிச்சம் ஒரு பாட்டிலேக் இருக்கிறது. இந்த நிலையில் பெரிய பயிற்சி தகவல் அமைப்புகளை அழைக்கிறது, அல்லது செயல்படுத்தும் முன்னேற்றங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் அத இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முக்கியமாக பிற்காலத்தில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம், அது சீன செயல் எஸ்ஆர்எல் மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, வெட நாம் ஒரு புதிய முன்னேற்றம் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றும் அடா இந்த மாதிரி வெப்பநிலையான உள்ளீடுகளை உட்கொள்ள முடியும் மற்றும் அவைகளுக்கு இடையே வெளிப்படையாக அறி நாம் ஒரு புதிய கோர்பாஸ், சீனீஸ் செம்பாங்க், சீனீஸ் எஸ்ஆர்எல். CPB 1. 0 மீது சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது நமது மாதிரி கலை முறைமைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Tidigare studier om kinesisk semantisk rollmärkning (SRL) har koncentrerats på en enda semantiskt kommenterad korpus. Men träningsdata för enstaka korpus är ofta begränsade. Medan de andra existerande semantiskt kommenterade korpora för Chinese SRL är utspridda över olika annotationsramar. Men datasparsamhet är fortfarande en flaskhals. Denna situation kräver större utbildningsdata eller effektiva metoder som kan dra nytta av mycket heterogena data. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi främst på det senare, det vill säga att förbättra Chinese SRL genom att använda heterogena corpora tillsammans. Vi föreslår en ny progressiv inlärningsmodell som utökar det progressiva neurala nätverket med Gated Recurrent Adapters. Modellen kan tillgodose heterogena input och effektivt överföra kunskap mellan dem. Vi släpper också en ny korpus, Chinese SemBank, för Chinese SRL. Experiment på CPB 1.0 visar att vår modell överträffar de senaste metoderna.', 'ur': 'چینی سیمنٹی رول لیبلینگ (SRL) کے بارے میں پہلے مطالعہ ایک سیمنٹی طور پر مشورہ کیا گیا ہے۔ لیکن ایک کورپوس کی تعلیم دادہ اکثر محدود ہے۔ حالانکہ دوسری موجود سیمنٹی کے ذریعے چینی SRL کے لئے اظہار کیا گیا ہے وہ مختلف اظہار کے فرمور میں پھیلائے جاتے ہیں۔ لیکن ابھی بھی، ڈاٹا سپارتی ایک بٹولگرد رہتی ہے۔ یہ موقعیت بہت بڑی ترینس ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے بلاتی ہے، یا اثرات طریقے کے لئے جو بہت غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر اثرات سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم سب سے اگلوں پر تمرکز کریں گے، یعنی چینی SRL کو اچھی طرح استعمال کریں۔ ہم ایک نئی پرمختلف سیکھنے کی مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو گٹ دھیر اڈپٹر کے ساتھ پرمختلف نئورل نیٹورک کو بڑھاتا ہے۔ مدل ان کے درمیان غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم نے بھی ایک نوی کورپوس، چینی سمبنک، چینی SRL کے لئے آزاد کیا۔ CPB 1.0 کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل آرتی طریقے سے کام نہیں کرتا۔', 'uz': "Oldingi Xitoycha semantik role lab chiqarish (SRL) ta'minlovchi o'qituvchilari bir semantik taʼminlov qo'shilgan qo'shga bir necha bo'lgan. Lekin bitta qo'shli taʼminlovchi maʼlumot ko'p chegara. Chunki Xitoycha SRL uchun boshqa qanday qiziqarli bo'lgan kompaniyalar boshqa tadbirlik qoidalariga ajratilgan. Lekin bu yerda maʼlumot qismlari bir kichkina bo'ladi. Bu holat taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini yoki katta taʼminlovchi soʻzlarini ko'proq holatda foydalanishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda biz asosiy keyingi xitoycha SRL bilan birlashtirish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz taʼminlovchi darajada o'rganish modelini talab qilamiz. Qaytarish davom etilgan Adapters bilan Progressive Neural Tarmoqni ishga tushirish mumkin. Name Biz Xitoycha SRL (Xitoycha SemBank) uchun yangi korpusni chiqaramiz. Name", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu trước về nghệ thuật ngữ pháp Trung Hoa (SLOL) đã tập trung vào một tập thể được chú thích theo ngữ nghĩa đơn. Nhưng dữ liệu huấn luyện của một tập đoàn thường rất hạn chế. Trong khi đó thì các tập đoàn có niên đại đã được ghi chú về Trung Quốc SSR khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, rò rỉ dữ liệu vẫn là nguyên tắc. Tình huống này đòi hỏi các tập tin lớn hơn, hoặc các phương pháp hiệu quả có thể tận dụng các dữ liệu khác nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta tập trung chủ yếu vào thứ hai, tức là cải thiện SSR Trung Quốc bằng cách cùng nhau sử dụng cơ thể dị dạng. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp học tiến bộ mới, nâng cấp mạng thần kinh Progressive với Gated Recurrenent adapters. Mô hình này có thể chứa các nội dung khác nhau và trao đổi các kiến thức. Chúng tôi cũng phát hành một tập đoàn mới, Trung Quốc SemBank, cho China SR. Các thí nghiệm trên CPB 1.0 cho thấy rằng mẫu của chúng ta đạt trình độ cao nhất.', 'bg': 'Предишни проучвания за китайското семантично етикетиране на роли (СРЛ) са концентрирани върху един семантично анотиран корпус. Но данните за обучение на единичен корпус често са ограничени. Докато другите съществуващи семантично анотирани корпуси за китайски са разпръснати в различни рамки за анотация. Но все пак, оскъдността на данните остава пречка. Тази ситуация изисква по-големи набори от данни за обучение или ефективни подходи, които могат да се възползват от силно хетерогенни данни. В тази статия се фокусираме основно върху последното, т.е. подобряването на китайския СРЛ чрез използване на хетерогенни корпуси заедно. Предлагаме нов модел на прогресивно обучение, който увеличава прогресивната неврална мрежа с Gated повтарящи се адаптери. Моделът може да приеме хетерогенни входове и ефективно да прехвърля знания между тях. Ние също така публикуваме нов корпус, китайска SemBank, за китайската SRL. Експериментите с ЦРБ 1.0 показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда най-съвременните методи.', 'nl': "Eerdere studies over Chinese semantische rollabeling (SRL) hebben zich geconcentreerd op een enkel semantisch geannoteerd corpus. Maar de trainingsgegevens van één corpus zijn vaak beperkt. Terwijl de andere bestaande semantisch geannoteerde corpora's voor Chinese SRL verspreid zijn over verschillende annotatie frameworks. Maar toch blijft Data sparsity een knelpunt. Deze situatie vraagt om grotere trainingsdatasets of effectieve benaderingen die gebruik kunnen maken van zeer heterogene gegevens. In dit artikel richten we ons vooral op het laatste, dat wil zeggen het verbeteren van Chinese SRL door samen heterogene corpora's te gebruiken. We stellen een nieuw progressief leermodel voor dat het Progressieve Neural Netwerk met Gated Recurrent Adapters uitbreidt. Het model kan heterogene inputs opvangen en effectief kennis tussen hen overbrengen. We brengen ook een nieuw corpus uit, Chinese SemBank, voor Chinese SRL. Experimenten op CPB 1.0 tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan state-of-the-art methoden.", 'da': 'Tidligere undersøgelser af kinesisk semantisk rollemærkning (SRL) har koncentreret sig om et enkelt semantisk kommenteret korpus. Men træningsdataene for enkeltkorpus er ofte begrænsede. Mens de andre eksisterende semantisk annoterede korpora for Chinese SRL er spredt på tværs af forskellige annoteringsrammer. Men stadig er Data sparsomhed en flaskehals. Denne situation kræver større uddannelsesdata eller effektive metoder, der kan drage fordel af meget heterogene data. I denne artikel fokuserer vi primært på sidstnævnte, dvs. at forbedre Chinese SRL ved at bruge heterogene corpora sammen. Vi foreslår en ny progressiv læringsmodel, der udvider det progressive neurale netværk med Gated Recurrent Adaptere. Modellen kan rumme heterogene input og effektivt overføre viden mellem dem. Vi udgiver også et nyt korpus, Chinese SemBank, til Chinese SRL. Eksperimenter med CPB 1.0 viser, at vores model overgår state-of-the-art metoder.', 'de': 'Bisherige Studien zur semantischen Rollenmarkierung (SRL) konzentrierten sich auf einen einzigen semantisch annotierten Korpus. Aber die Trainingsdaten einzelner Korpus sind oft begrenzt. Während die anderen existierenden semantisch annotierten Korpora für Chinese SRL über verschiedene Annotationsframeworks verstreut sind. Trotzdem bleibt die Datenschwierigkeit ein Engpass. Diese Situation erfordert größere Trainingsdatensätze oder wirksame Ansätze, die von sehr heterogenen Daten profitieren können. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns hauptsächlich auf Letzteres, das heißt, die chinesische SRL durch den Einsatz heterogener Korpora zusammen zu verbessern. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges progressives Lernmodell vor, das das Progressive Neuronale Netzwerk um Gated Recurrent Adapters erweitert. Das Modell kann heterogene Inputs aufnehmen und Wissen effektiv zwischen ihnen übertragen. Wir veröffentlichen auch ein neues Korpus, die chinesische SemBank, für Chinese SRL. Experimente an CPB 1.0 zeigen, dass unser Modell modernste Methoden übertrifft.', 'id': 'Studi sebelumnya mengenai label peran semantis Cina (SRL) telah berkonsentrasi pada satu corpus yang secara semantis annotasi. Tapi data latihan dari satu corpus sering terbatas. Sementara corpora yang ada secara semantis untuk SRL Cina tersebar melalui bingkai annotasi yang berbeda. Tapi tetap saja, kecepatan data tetap terjebak. Situasi ini memerlukan set data pelatihan yang lebih besar, atau pendekatan efektif yang dapat mengambil keuntungan dari data yang sangat heterogene. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus terutama pada yang terakhir, yaitu, untuk meningkatkan SRL Cina dengan menggunakan corpora heterogene bersama-sama. Kami mengusulkan model pembelajaran progresif yang menambah Jaringan Neural Progresif dengan Gated Recurrent Adapters. Model ini dapat mengakomodasi masukan heterogene dan secara efektif memindahkan pengetahuan antara mereka. Kami juga melepaskan korpus baru, SemBank Cina, untuk SRL Cina. Eksperimen pada CPB 1.0 menunjukkan bahwa model kita melampaui cara terbaik.', 'sw': 'Tafiti zilizopita juu ya jukumu la sekondari la China (SRL) zimekuwa zikijazama kwenye chombo kimoja kinachochochochea kimapenzi. Lakini taarifa za mafunzo ya viungo vya moja mara nyingi zinazuiwa. Wakati makampuni mengine yanayoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa yanakera kwa ajili ya SRL ya China imetawanyika katika mitandao mbalimbali ya matatizo. Lakini bado, upepo wa data bado unabaki kwenye chupa. Hali hii inaita seti kubwa za mafunzo, au njia za ufanisi ambazo zinaweza kutumia taarifa za kijinsia. Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga hasa kwa ajili ya mwisho, hilo ni kuboresha SRL ya China kwa kutumia kampuni ya kijeshi pamoja. Tunazipendekeza modeli ya kujifunza kwa riwaya inayoongeza Mtandao wa Neurali wa Maendeleo na Adapters wa Kurudia Marekani. Mfano huu unaweza kuingia vifaa vinavyotokana na kingine na kusambaza maarifa kwa ufanisi kati yao. Pia tunaachia makampuni mpya, SemBank ya China, kwa ajili ya SRL ya China. Experiments on CPB 1.0 show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات قبلی در مورد برچسب نقش semantic چینی (SRL) روی یک جسد semantically annotated corpus تمرکز شده است. اما اطلاعات آموزش تنها کورپوس اغلب محدود است. در حالی که دیگر شرکت\u200cهای سنتی\u200cشناسی که برای SRL چینی\u200cها به عنوان فرم\u200cهای نویسندگی\u200cهای مختلف پراکنده می\u200cشوند. ولی هنوز، حفاظت اطلاعات یک گردن بطری باقی مانده است. این وضعیت برای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آموزشی بزرگتر یا دسترسی موثری که می\u200cتوانند از داده\u200cهای بسیار متفاوت استفاده کنند، می\u200cخواهد. در این کاغذ، ما در اصل روی آخرین تمرکز می کنیم، یعنی برای بهتر کردن SRL چینی با استفاده از شرکت متفاوتی با هم. ما یک مدل یادگیری روانی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که شبکه عصبی پیشرفتی را با آداپتر\u200cهای دوباره جمع می\u200cکند افزایش می\u200cدهد. این مدل می\u200cتواند ورودهای متفاوتی را تغییر دهد و دانش\u200cهای موثرتی را بین آنها انتقال دهد. ما همچنین یک کورپوس جدید، سمبانک چینی، برای SRL چینی آزاد می کنیم. تجربه\u200cهای CPB 1.0 نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما روش\u200cهای هنری\u200cهای وضعیت استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'hr': 'Prethodna ispitivanja o označavanju kineske semantičke uloge (SRL) koncentrirana su na jednog semantički annotiranog korpusa. Ali podaci obuke jednog korpusa često su ograničeni. Međutim, druga postojeća semantički annotirana tijela za kineski SRL raspršila se u različitim okvirama annotacije. Ali ipak, data sparsity ostaje bočica. Ova situacija zahtijeva većim podacima obuke ili učinkovitim pristupima koji mogu iskoristiti vrlo heterogenetne podatke. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se uglavnom na posljednju, to je, da poboljšamo kinesku SRL koristeći heterogeneznu korporu zajedno. Predlažemo nov progresivni model učenja koji povećava progresivnu neuronsku mrežu s prikupljenim ponovnim adapterima. Model može primijeniti heterogenene ulaze i učinkovito prenijeti znanje između njih. Također ćemo osloboditi novi korpus, Kineski SemBank, za kineski SRL. Eksperimenti na CPB 1.0 pokazuju da naš model nadmašuje metode umjetnosti.', 'af': "Vorige studie op Sjinese semantiese roletiketting (SRL) het gefokuseer op 'n enkele semantiese aanmerking van korpus. Maar die oefening data van enkele korpus is dikwels beperk. Maar die ander bestaande semantiese annoteerde korpora vir Sjinese SRL word verstrooi deur verskillende annotasie raamwerke. Maar nog steeds, data sparsity bly 'n botnek. Hierdie situasie roep vir groter onderwerp datastelle, of effektiewe toegang wat voordeel kan neem van hoë heterogeneese data. In hierdie papier, ons fokus heeltemal op die laaste, dit is, om Sjinese SRL te verbeter deur heterogeneese korpora saam te gebruik. Ons voorstel 'n roman progresiewe leer model wat die progresiewe neurale netwerk met versamel herhaalde adapters vergroot. Die model kan heterogenee inputs en effektief kennis tussen hulle oordra. Ons verlos ook 'n nuwe korpus, Sjinese SemBank, vir Sjinese SRL. Eksperimente op CPB 1.0 vertoon dat ons model uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes.", 'ko': '이전에 중국어의 의미 역할 표시에 대한 연구는 주로 하나의 의미 표시 어료 라이브러리에 집중되었다.그러나 단일 어료 라이브러리의 훈련 데이터는 종종 제한되어 있다.다른 기존의 중국어 의미 표기 어료 라이브러리는 서로 다른 표기 구조에 분산되어 있다.그러나 데이터의 희소성은 여전히 병목이다.이런 경우 더 큰 훈련 데이터 집합이 필요하거나 고도의 이구 데이터를 활용할 수 있는 효과적인 방법이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 주로 후자, 즉 이구 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 중국어 SRL을 개선하는 것에 주목한다.우리는 새로운 점진적 학습 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 귀속 어댑터를 선택하여 점진적 신경 네트워크를 강화한다.이 모델은 이구적 입력에 적응하고 그들 사이에서 지식을 효과적으로 전달할 수 있다.우리는 또한 중국어 SRL에 사용되는 새로운 어료 라이브러리, 중국어 어구 라이브러리를 발표했다.CPB1.0에서의 실험은 우리의 모델이 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የቻይና የsemantic role (SRL) መጻሕፍት በተለየ አንዲት ተማርኮች በሴሜንቲካዊ ክሮፓስ ላይ አክስሎታል፡፡ ነገር ግን የብቻውን ኮርፓስ ዳታዎችን ብዙ ጊዜ ተቃራኒ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ሌሎቹ ያሉት የቻይና SRL ኮርፖርት በተለያዩ አካባቢ ክፍል ተለይተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ዳታ ብዛት አንድ አቁማዳ ነው፡፡ ይህ ግንኙነት ትልቅ የድምህርት ዳታዎችን ወይም የበለጠ የሥልጣን መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል ጥያቄዎችን ይጠራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አብዛኛውን የቻይና SRL በመጠቀም የኮርፖርት በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የዘላለም ትምህርት መግለጫ ምሳሌ እናስጀጋለን፤ የፕሮግራፊው የኔural መረብ ከጋት መደጋገሚያ አዳapters ጋር ያበረታል፡፡ ሞዴላው በተለየ የውይይት ጥያቄዎችን ማግኘት ይችላል እና በመካከላቸው እውቀትን በጥያቄ ሊለውጥ ይችላል፡፡ አዲስ ኮርፓስ፣ ቻይና ሴምባንክ ለቻይና SRL እናወጣለን፡፡ የCPB 1.0 ፈተና ሞዴሌዎቻችን የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Անցյալ ուսումնասիրությունները Չինաստանի սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակավորման (ՍՌL) վրա կենտրոնացել են մեկ սեմանտիկ նկարագրված կորպուսի վրա: Բայց միակ մարմնի ուսուցման տվյալները հաճախ սահմանափակ են: Մինչդեռ մյուս գոյություն ունեցող սեմանտիկապես նշումնավորված կոպորան Չինաստանի ՍՌԼ-ի համար տարբեր նշումնավորման շրջանակներում է տարածվում: Բայց չնայած դրան, տվյալների հազվադեպությունը դեռևս շրջաններ է: This situation calls for larger training datasets, or effective approaches which can take advantage of highly heterogeneous data.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք հիմնականում վերջիններին, այսինքն՝ բարելավելու Չինաստանի ՍՌԼ-ը՝ միասին օգտագործելով հեթերոգեն մարմնի: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր առաջընթացիկ ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որը բարձրացնում է առաջընթացիկ նյարդային ցանցը Gated կրկնվող ադապտերներով: Մոդելը կարող է համապատասխանել տարբեր ներմուծներին և արդյունավետ փոխանցել գիտելիքները դրանց միջև: Մենք նաև հրապարակում ենք նոր կորպուս, Չինաստանի Սեմբանկ, Չինաստանի ՍՌԼ-ի համար: CPB 1.0-ի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր մեթոդները:', 'tr': "Öňki Çinçe semantik näme etiketlemesi (SRL) barada öňki öňki öňki öwrenmeler semantik bilen duýýan korpusa üns çekdiler. Ýöne ýeke korpusyň bilim maglumaty köplenç diýip çarpdy. Diňe bir semantik hasaplanýan häzirki Çinçe SRL üçin hasaplanýan korpora farklı duýgaç çerçewlerine daşypdyr. Ama hala, Veri rezilliği şişe boşluk içindedir. Bu ýagdaý uly okuwçy maglumatlary taýýarlamak üçin gerek, ýa-da etkinlik hereketleriň ýokary heterogenen maglumatyň üstüne ýetirebilir. Bu kagyzda esasy soňky ýagdaýda üns berýäris, diýi ýagdaýda Çinçe SRL-y heterogenen korpora bilelikde ulanyp geliştirmek üçin. Biz bir täze öwrenmek nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris ki, Gatlanmış Täzelikler bilen ösümli nusgasyny artýar. Bu nusga çykyş bolup, hatlaryň arasyndaky bilimi täsirli göçürip biler. Biz hem Täze bir korpus, Çinçe Sembanky, Çinçe SRL üçin seredip berýäris CPB 1.0'deki örneklerimiz nusgymyzyň taryhyny çykarýandygyny görkez.", 'bs': 'Prethodna ispitivanja o etiketi kineske semantičke uloge (SRL) koncentrisana su na jednog semantički annotiranog korpusa. Ali podaci o obuci jednog korpusa često su ograničeni. Međutim, druga postojeća semantički annotirana korpora za kineski SRL se raspršila u različitim okvirama annotacije. Ali ipak, rezervitet podataka ostaje bočica. Ova situacija poziva na veće podatke o obuci ili učinkovite pristupe koje mogu iskoristiti vrlo heterogenetne podatke. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se uglavnom na posljednju, to je, da poboljšamo kinesku SRL koristeći heterogeneznu korporu zajedno. Predlažemo nov progresivni model učenja koji povećava progresivnu neuronu mrežu sa okupljenim ponovnim adapterima. Model može ubrzati heterogenene ulaze i efektivno prenijeti znanje između njih. Također ćemo osloboditi novi korpus, Kineski SemBank, za kineski SRL. Eksperimenti na CPB 1.0 pokazuju da naš model iznosi metode umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Els estudis anteriors sobre l'etiqueta del paper semàntic xinès (SRL) s'han concentrat en un únic cos anotat semànticament. Però les dades d'entrenament del cos únic sovint són limitades. Whereas the other existing semantically annotated corpora for Chinese SRL are scattered across different annotation frameworks.  Però tot i així, la escassetat de dades encara és un bloc d'ampolla. Aquesta situació necessita conjunts de dades de formació més grans, o enfocaments efectius que poden aprofitar dades altament heterogenes. En aquest paper, ens centrem principalment en aquesta última, és a dir, millorar l'SRL xinesa fent servir corpora heterogenea junts. Proposem un nou model d'aprenentatge progresiu que augmenta la xarxa neuronal progresiva amb adaptadors recurrents portats. El model pot acomodar entrades heterogenes i transferir coneixements efectivament entre elles. També alliberam un nou corpus, Chinese SemBank, per a Chinese SRL. Els experiments del CPB 1.0 mostren que el nostre model supera els mètodes més avançats.", 'az': "√áin semantik rol etiketi (SRL) bar…ôsind…ôki …ôvv…ôlki √∂yr…ônm…ôl…ôr bir semantik iŇüar…ô edil…ôn korpus √ľst√ľnd…ô t…ôsirl…ônmiŇüdir. Lakin t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪ √ßox sńĪxńĪntńĪlńĪ olur. H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d…ô, C…ônn…ôt SRL √ľ√ß√ľn h…ômin semantik m…ôlumatlńĪ korpora m√ľxt…ôlif annotation frameworklarńĪna dańüńĪlńĪr. Amma h…ôl…ô d…ô Data sparsity bir boŇü boynundur. Bu durum daha b√∂y√ľk t…ôhsil veril…ôn qurńüularńĪ v…ô ya √ßox heterogenel veril…ônl…ôrin faydalanmasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edir. Bu kańüńĪtda, biz …ôn √ßox axńĪrńĪncńĪlara odaklanńĪrńĪq, yani, √áinli SRL'i birlikd…ô heterogenel korpora vasit…ôsil…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq. Biz yeni progresiv √∂yr…ônm…ô modelini t…ôblińü edirik ki, birlikd…ô yenid…ôn adapterl…ôr il…ô Progresiv N√∂ral AńüńĪnńĪ artńĪrar. Model bunlarńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ elmd…ôn istifad…ô ed…ô bil…ôr. Biz h…ôm√ßinin √áinc…ô SRL √ľ√ß√ľn yeni bir korpus, √áinc…ô SemBank yayńĪndńĪrńĪrńĪq. CPB 1.0 t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrinin modell…ôrimizin sanat metodlarńĪndan daha √ľst√ľn olduńüunu g√∂st…ôrir.", 'cs': 'Předchozí studie o čínském sémantickém označování rolí (SRL) se soustředily na jeden sémanticky anotovaný korpus. Výcviková data jednotlivých korpusů jsou však často omezená. Zatímco ostatní existující sémanticky anotované korpusy pro Chinese SRL jsou rozptýleny napříč různými anotačními frameworky. Ale i tak, Data řídkost zůstává úzkým hrdlem. Tato situace vyžaduje větší soubory vzdělávacích dat nebo efektivní přístupy, které mohou využít vysoce heterogenních dat. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme především na druhé, tedy na zlepšení čínské SRL pomocí společného využití heterogenních korpusů. Navrhujeme nový model progresivního učení, který rozšiřuje Progresivní neuronovou síť o Gated Recurrent Adapters. Model dokáže přizpůsobit heterogenní vstupy a efektivně přenášet znalosti mezi nimi. Vydáváme také nový korpus Čínská SemBank pro Čínu SRL. Experimenty na CPB 1.0 ukazují, že náš model překonává nejmodernější metody.', 'et': 'Varasemad Hiina semantilise rolli märgistamise uuringud on keskendunud ühele semantiliselt annoteeritud korpusele. Kuid ühe korpuse koolitusandmed on sageli piiratud. Samal ajal kui teised olemasolevad semantiliselt annoteeritud korpused Hiina SRL jaoks on hajutatud erinevate annoteerimisraamistike vahel. Kuid siiski jääb andmete vähesus kitsaskohaks. Selline olukord nõuab suuremaid koolitusandmeid või tõhusaid lähenemisviise, mis võivad kasutada väga heterogeenseid andmeid. Käesolevas töös keskendume peamiselt viimasele, st Hiina SRL parandamisele heterogeensete korpuste kasutamise abil. Pakume välja uudse progressiivse õppemudeli, mis täiendab progressiivset neurovõrku värvitud korduvate adapteritega. Mudel võib mahutada heterogeenseid sisendeid ja tõhusalt edastada teadmisi nende vahel. Samuti avaldame Hiina SRL-ile uue korpuse, Hiina SemBank. CPB 1.0 katsed näitavad, et meie mudel ületab kaasaegseid meetodeid.', 'fi': 'Aiemmat tutkimukset kiinalaisesta semanttisesta roolimerkinnästä (SRL) ovat keskittyneet yhteen semanttisesti merkittyyn korpuseen. Yksittäisen korpusen koulutustiedot ovat kuitenkin usein rajallisia. Muut kiinalaisen SRL:n semanttisesti merkityt korpuset ovat hajallaan eri merkintäkehyksiin. Datan niukkuus on kuitenkin edelleen pullonkaula. Tämä edellyttää suurempia koulutustietoja tai tehokkaita lähestymistapoja, joissa voidaan hyödyntää hyvin heterogeenisiä tietoja. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme pääasiassa jälkimmäiseen eli Kiinan SRL:n parantamiseen käyttämällä heterogeenisiä korpusia yhdessä. Ehdotamme uutta progressiivista oppimismallia, joka täydentää progressiivista hermoverkkoa Gated Toistuva Adaptereilla. Mallissa voidaan ottaa huomioon heterogeeniset syötteet ja tehokkaasti siirtää tietoa niiden välillä. Julkaisemme myös uuden korpusen, Kiinan SemBank, Kiinan SRL:lle. CPB 1.0:n kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu huippuluokan menetelmistä.', 'sq': 'Studimet e mëparshme mbi etiketën kineze të rolit semantik (SRL) janë përqëndruar në një korpus të vetëm të anotuar semantikisht. Por të dhënat e trajnimit të një trupi të vetëm janë shpesh të kufizuara. Ndërsa korpra tjetër ekzistuese e anotuar semantikisht për SRL kineze janë shpërndarë nëpër korniza të ndryshme anotacioni. Por ende, pakësia e të dhënave mbetet një pengesë. Kjo gjendje kërkon grupe të dhënash më të mëdha trajnimi apo qasje efektive që mund të përfitojnë nga të dhënat shumë heterogjene. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi kryesisht në të fundit, që është, për të përmirësuar SRL kineze duke përdorur korpra heterogjene së bashku. Ne propozojmë një model të ri të mësimit progresiv i cili rrit rrjetin neuronal progresiv me adaptuesit e përsëritur të portave. Modeli mund të përshtatet në hyrje heterogjene dhe efektivisht të transferojë njohuritë midis tyre. We also release a new corpus, Chinese SemBank, for Chinese SRL.  Eksperimentet në CPB 1.0 tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron metodat më të larta.', 'bn': 'চীনের সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেল (এসআরএল) সম্পর্কে পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা একটি সেমান্টিক্যালীন কোর্পাসের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। কিন্তু একক কর্পুসের প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রায়শই সীমিত। যদিও অন্যান্য বিদ্যমান সেমান্টিকালে চীনা এসআরএলের জন্য কোর্পোরা বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ কিন্তু এখনো ডাটা স্প্যারিসিটি একটা বোতলেনেক আছে। This situation calls for larger training datasets, or effective approaches which can take advantage of highly heterogeneous data.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রধান পরবর্তীতে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি, যা চীনা এসআরএলের মাধ্যমে এক সাথে জীবিকা কোর্পোরা ব্যবহার করে। আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের অগ্রগতি শিক্ষা মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা গেট পুনরায় প্রোগ্রেসিভ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে গেট পুনরায় অ্ মডেলটি উজ্জ্বল ইনপুটের সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে এবং তাদের মধ্যে কার্যকর জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করতে পারে। চীনা সেমব্যাংক, চীনা এসআরএলের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন কোর্পাস ছেড়ে দেই। সিপিবি ১. ০ এর পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল স্টেট-অফ-শিল্পের পদ্ধতিতে প্রযোজ্য।', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk cara semanti cara-cara sing gawe seneng semanti cara nggawe cara-cara sing gawe wajih. Bilih perusahaan, dadi nggawe uwong-uwong saiki wis rampungan. Sing bener semana sing dumadhi uwong cara-cara nggawe barang Chinese Nyong ngomong, data sithik paling dong bobrok Sitasi iki dipoleh kanggo sampeyan data sing luwih apik, uga bener kang diolah sing isa nguasai data sing apik nek ketahan. Nanging mapun iki, kita punika ingkang dipun-ingkang awak dhéwé, lan ngono nggawe barang cara-cara sing itérané Chinese Awakdhéwé nggawe barang pengaturan macem kuwi wis rampun model sing bisa ngubah Progressve Neral Network karo gated recurent Model iso nggawe informasi sing dibutuhke Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo perusahaan anyar, Chinese semBank, kanggo rusak Chinese srL. 0', 'sk': 'Prejšnje študije kitajskega semantičnega označevanja vlog (SRL) so se osredotočile na en sam semantično označen korpus. Toda podatki o usposabljanju posameznega korpusa so pogosto omejeni. Medtem ko so drugi obstoječi semantično označeni korpusi za kitajsko SRL razpršeni po različnih okvirih označevanja. Še vedno pa redkost podatkov ostaja ozka grla. Ta položaj zahteva večje nabore podatkov o usposabljanju ali učinkovite pristope, ki lahko izkoristijo zelo heterogene podatke. V tem članku se osredotočamo predvsem na slednje, to je izboljšanje kitajske SRL z uporabo heterogenih korpusov skupaj. Predlagamo nov model progresivnega učenja, ki dopolnjuje progresivno živčno mrežo z zaprtimi ponavljajočimi se adapterji. Model lahko sprejme heterogene vložke in učinkovito prenaša znanje med njimi. Izdali smo tudi nov korpus kitajske SemBank za kitajsko SRL. Poskusi na CPB 1.0 kažejo, da naš model presega najsodobnejše metode.', 'ha': "Tayyar da zaman karatun na semantic role na China (SRL) sun yi tashi a kan kowaci guda na semantically ana zartar da. But the training data of single corpus is often limited.  A lokacin da sauran da ke da shi na ƙaranci da aka buga wa SRL na China, za'a wãtsa a cikin firam masu haske. Kayya, bada, bada zaɓata data yana da wani lambu. Wannan halin yana kiran tsari masu ƙaranci na tsari, ko wasu hanyoyin aiki da ke iya amfani da amfani da data masu tsawo. Daga wannan takardan, tuna fokus mainli zuwa ga ta ƙara, shi ne mafiya canza SRL ta yi amfani da koruni na sauri. Tune goyyar da wata motel na tafiyar da zamani da aka sani wanda zai ƙarfafa Netware na Progressive Neural with Gaded Recent Adappters. @ info: whatsthis Kayya, Munã sakar da wani takardar aiki na China, SemBank, zuwa SRL na China. Tajarakin kan CPB 1.0 na nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da halin-of-the-art.", 'he': 'מחקרים קודמים על תיקון תפקיד סמנטי סיני (SRL) התרכזו בקורפוס סמנטי אחד. אבל מידע האימונים של קופוס יחיד לעתים קרובות מוגבל. בעוד הקופורה הנוכחית השנייה של SRL הסינית מתפשטת במסגרות הערות שונות. אבל עדיין, נדירות נתונים נשארת חסום בקבוק. המצב הזה דורש קבוצות מידע אימונים גדולות יותר, או גישות יעילות שיכולות לנצל מידע היטרוגני מאוד. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים בעיקר על האחרון, כלומר, לשפר SRL סיני על ידי השימוש של גופורה heterogeneous ביחד. אנו מציעים מודל לימוד מתקדם חדש שמגביר את רשת הנוירולית התקדמת עם מתאמנים מחדשים משולבים. הדוגמא יכולה להשתלב לתכניות heterogeneous ולהעביר הידע ביניהם באופן יעיל. אנחנו גם משחררים קורפוס חדש, סמבנק סיני, עבור SRL סיני. ניסויים על CPB 1.0 מראים שהמודל שלנו מוביל שיטות חדשות.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་semantic role labeling (SRL)ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྒོ་གཙོ་བ་ནང་ལ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒུལ་འཛུགས་གྱི་གཙོ་སློང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མེད་ཀྱང་། དེ་འབདཝ་ད། རྒྱ་ནག་དབུལ་སྔོན་དུས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབང་ཆ་གྱི་ཚོགས་སྡོམ་མིའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ནམ་མེད་པར། ཆེ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་བགོ་བུའི་ལྟག་ཏུ་ཉར་ཞིང་། གནས་སྟངས་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཆེ་བའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐའ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་སྡོམ་ཁག་ལ་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོ་རྩོམ་འབྱུང་བའི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་གིས་གཞན་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེན་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་ཉེན་སྒྲིག མ་དབུགས་འདིས་དེ་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་ནུས་ཡོད་པ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་སྐྱེས་འདྲེན་བ་བཅུག་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྡོམ་ཆེན་དང་སྡོམ་ཆེན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ཡང་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། CPB 1.0 ཐོག་གི་བརྟག་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཕགས་རིས་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Revisiting Recurrent Networks for Paraphrastic Sentence Embeddings', 'fr': "Revisiter les réseaux récurrents pour l'intégration de phrases paraphrastiques", 'es': 'Revisitando las redes recurrentes para la incorporación de oraciones parafrásticas', 'ar': 'إعادة النظر في الشبكات المتكررة لتطريز الجمل المشابه', 'pt': 'Revisitando Redes Recorrentes para Incorporações de Frases Parafrásticas', 'ja': 'パラフラシック文章埋め込みのための再発ネットワークの再検討', 'zh': '重审递归网络以行释义句', 'ru': 'Повторное посещение повторяющихся сетей для вложений парафразных предложений', 'hi': 'Paraphrastic वाक्य एम्बेडिंग के लिए आवर्तक नेटवर्क revisiting', 'ga': 'Athchuairt ar Líonraí Athfhillteacha le haghaidh Leabú Pianbhreithe Paraphrastic', 'ka': 'პარაფრასტიული სიტყვების გამოყენებებისთვის განახლება', 'hu': 'Az ismétlődő hálózatok felülvizsgálata parafrasztikus mondatbeágyazásokhoz', 'el': 'Επανεξέταση επαναλαμβανόμενων δικτύων για ενσωμάτωση παραφραστικών προτάσεων', 'it': 'Revisione delle reti ricorrenti per incorporare frasi parafrastiche', 'kk': 'Парафратистік сөз ендіру үшін қайталанатын желілерді қайталау', 'lt': 'Parafrastinių sakinių įrašymo pakartotinių tinklų peržiūra', 'mk': 'Ревизирање на повторните мрежи за вклопување парафрастични реченици', 'ms': 'Mengubah semula Rangkaian Ulang-ulang untuk Penjelmaan Sentensi Parafrastik', 'ml': 'പാരാഫ്രാസ്റ്റിക്കുള്ള ശിക്ഷയുടെ വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുന്ന ശേഷം', 'mt': 'Reviżjoni tan-Netwerks Rikorrenti għall-Inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ Sentenza Parafrastika', 'no': 'Gjenoppretting av gjentaande nettverk for parafrastiske setningar', 'mn': 'Paraphrastic өгүүлбэр нэвтрүүлэх дахин дахин шилжүүлэх', 'pl': 'Przegląd sieci powtarzających się dla osadzeń parafrastycznych zdań', 'ro': 'Revizuirea rețelelor recurente pentru încorporarea sentințelor parafrastice', 'sr': 'Ревизиране повторене мреже за парафратистски изред', 'si': 'පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වාක්ය සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ආපහු වෙනස් ජාලය', 'sv': 'Revidering av återkommande nätverk för inbäddade parafrastiska meningar', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista Internetka Heeganka', 'ta': 'அளப்ராஸ்டிக் வாக்குறுதிகளுக்கான நிகழ்ந்த வலைப்பின்னல்களை மீட்டமைக்கிறது', 'ur': 'Paraphrastic Sentence EmbeddingComment', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chỉnh lại các mạng xoay chuyển cho tham vọng cảm xúc.', 'hr': 'Revizija ponovnih mreža za parafrastičke uvođenje kazne', 'bg': 'Преразглеждане на повтарящи се мрежи за вграждания на парафрастични изречения', 'da': 'Revidering af tilbagevendende netværk til indlejringer af parafrastiske sætninger', 'nl': 'Herhaling van terugkerende netwerken voor het insluiten van parafrastische zinnen', 'de': 'Wiederkehrende Netzwerke für paraphrastische Sätze werden überarbeitet', 'id': 'Menyesuaikan Rangkaian Ulang untuk Penciptaan Sentensi Parafrastik', 'ko': '복술문에 삽입된 순환 네트워크를 다시 복습하다', 'fa': 'بازگرداندن شبکه\u200cهای دوباره برای وارد کردن عبارت پارافراستیک', 'af': 'Hersiening Herhaalde Netwerke vir Paraphrastiese Sense Inbêdings', 'sw': 'Kupitia upya Mtandao wa Matukio ya Kifungu', 'tr': 'Parafratistik sözler üçin ýene enmek', 'sq': 'Duke rishikuar rrjetet e përsëritura për përfshirjet e fjalëve parafrastike', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Փարաֆրատիկ նախադասությունների ներգրավման կրկնվող ցանցերի վերանայելը', 'az': 'Parafrastik S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛ri 칲칞칲n yenil톛nir', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক শাস্তি বিদ্যমানের জন্য পুনরাবৃত্তি নেটওয়ার্ক পুনরায় পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Revizija ponovnih mreža za parafrastičke uvođenje kazne', 'ca': 'Revisió de les xarxes recurrents per incorporar sentences parafràstiques', 'cs': 'Revize opakovaných sítí pro vložení parafrastických vět', 'et': 'Korduvate võrkude läbivaatamine parafrastiliste lausete põimimiseks', 'fi': 'Toistuvien verkkojen tarkistaminen parafrastisille lauseupotuksille', 'jv': 'Ngubah Iso Kelangan Aku Bubungan kanggo Kemerdekaan ParaFrastik', 'he': 'שינוי רשתות חוזרות לתכניות גזרות פרפרסטיות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Pregled ponavljajočih se omrežij za vdelave parafrastičnih stavkov', 'bo': 'བསྐྱར་དུ་འབྱུང་བའི་དྲ་བ་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྟངས་ཚོར་མཚུངས་པ'}
{'en': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings, revisiting the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b). While they found LSTM recurrent networks to underperform word averaging, we present several developments that together produce the opposite conclusion. These include training on sentence pairs rather than phrase pairs, averaging states to represent sequences, and regularizing aggressively. These improve LSTMs in both transfer learning and supervised settings. We also introduce a new recurrent architecture, the Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, that is inspired by averaging and LSTMs while outperforming them both. We analyze our learned models, finding evidence of preferences for particular parts of speech and dependency relations.', 'es': 'Consideramos el problema de aprender a insertar oraciones parafrásticas de propósito general, revisando el escenario de Wieting et al. (2016b). Si bien encontraron que las redes recurrentes de LSTM tenían un rendimiento inferior al promedio de palabras, presentamos varios desarrollos que en conjunto producen la conclusión opuesta. Estos incluyen entrenamiento en pares de oraciones en lugar de pares de frases, promediar estados para representar secuencias y regularizar agresivamente. Estos mejoran los LSTM tanto en el aprendizaje por transferencia como en los entornos supervisados. También presentamos una nueva arquitectura recurrente, la red de promedio recurrente cerrada, que se inspira en los promedios y los LSTM, a la vez que supera a ambos. Analizamos nuestros modelos aprendidos, encontrando evidencia de preferencias por partes particulares del discurso y relaciones de dependencia.', 'ar': 'نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار مشكلة تعلم حفلات الزفاف ذات الأغراض العامة والمشارقة ، وإعادة النظر في إعداد Wieting et al. (2016 ب). بينما وجدوا أن شبكات LSTM المتكررة لا تحقق متوسط الكلمات ، فإننا نقدم العديد من التطورات التي تنتج معًا النتيجة المعاكسة. يتضمن ذلك التدريب على أزواج الجمل بدلاً من أزواج العبارات ، وحالات المتوسط لتمثيل التسلسلات ، والتنظيم بقوة. تعمل هذه على تحسين LSTMs في كل من نقل التعلم والإعدادات الخاضعة للإشراف. نقدم أيضًا بنية متكررة جديدة ، شبكة المتوسطات المتكررة ذات البوابات ، المستوحاة من المتوسطات و LSTMs بينما تتفوق عليها في الأداء. نقوم بتحليل نماذجنا المكتسبة ، وإيجاد دليل على التفضيلات لأجزاء معينة من الكلام وعلاقات التبعية.', 'pt': 'Consideramos o problema de aprender a incorporação de sentenças parafrásticas de propósito geral, revisitando o cenário de Wieting et al. (2016b). Embora eles tenham encontrado redes recorrentes LSTM com desempenho inferior à média de palavras, apresentamos vários desenvolvimentos que juntos produzem a conclusão oposta. Isso inclui treinamento em pares de frases em vez de pares de frases, média de estados para representar sequências e regularização agressiva. Isso melhora os LSTMs tanto no aprendizado de transferência quanto nas configurações supervisionadas. Também apresentamos uma nova arquitetura recorrente, a Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, que é inspirada em média e LSTMs, superando ambos. Analisamos nossos modelos aprendidos, encontrando evidências de preferências por partes específicas do discurso e relações de dependência.', 'fr': "Nous examinons le problème de l'apprentissage des intégrations de phrases paraphrastiques à usage général, en revisitant le cadre de Wieting et al. (2016b). Bien qu'ils aient constaté que les réseaux récurrents LSTM sous-performent la moyenne des mots, nous présentons plusieurs développements qui, ensemble, mènent à la conclusion contraire. Il s'agit notamment de l'entraînement sur des paires de phrases plutôt que sur des paires de phrases, de la moyenne des états pour représenter des séquences et de la régularisation agressive. Ils améliorent les LSTM à la fois dans les environnements d'apprentissage par transfert et supervisés. Nous introduisons également une nouvelle architecture récurrente, le réseau de moyenne récurrente fermée, qui s'inspire du moyennage et des LSTM tout en les surpassant tous les deux. Nous analysons les modèles que nous avons appris, trouvant des preuves de préférences pour certaines parties du discours et des relations de dépendance.", 'ja': '私たちは、Wieting et al. (2016 b)の設定を再検討しながら、汎用的でパラフラシックな文章埋め込みを学習する問題を検討しています。彼らは、LSTMリカレントネットワークが単語の平均化を下回っていることを発見したが、私たちはいくつかの開発を提示し、共に反対の結論を生み出している。これらには、フレーズペアではなく文章ペアに関するトレーニング、シーケンスを表すための状態の平均化、および積極的に規則化が含まれます。これらは、転送学習と監督された設定の両方でLSTMを改善します。また、平均化とLSTMの両方のパフォーマンスを上回る一方で、平均化とLSTMからインスピレーションを受けた新しいリカレントアーキテクチャ、Gated Recurrent Averageaging Networkも導入しています。私たちは学習したモデルを分析し、音声の特定の部分と依存関係の嗜好の証拠を見つけます。', 'zh': '臣等思学通用,释义句嵌,重审Wieting等(2016b)设。 虽见LSTM循环网络不如词均,而同生反论。 此句非短语对之教,示序之均,极地正则化也。 更进迁学及监置中 LSTM。 引入一新架构,即门控循环均网络,其感自均LSTM,兼优之。 论吾学形,见特定词性赖之偏证也。', 'hi': 'हम सामान्य उद्देश्य, पैराफ्रैस्टिक वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं, जो Wieting et al. (2016b) की सेटिंग को फिर से देखते हैं। जबकि उन्होंने पाया कि एलएसटीएम आवर्तक नेटवर्क शब्द औसत को कम करने के लिए, हम कई विकास प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एक साथ विपरीत निष्कर्ष का उत्पादन करते हैं। इनमें वाक्यांश जोड़े के बजाय वाक्य जोड़े पर प्रशिक्षण, अनुक्रमों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए औसत राज्यों और आक्रामक रूप से नियमित करना शामिल है। ये स्थानांतरण सीखने और पर्यवेक्षित सेटिंग्स दोनों में एलएसटीएम में सुधार करते हैं। हम एक नई आवर्तक वास्तुकला, गेटेड आवर्तक औसत नेटवर्क भी पेश करते हैं, जो उन दोनों को पछाड़ते हुए औसत और एलएसटीएम से प्रेरित है। हम अपने सीखे हुए मॉडल का विश्लेषण करते हैं, भाषण और निर्भरता संबंधों के विशेष हिस्सों के लिए वरीयताओं के सबूत ढूंढते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы рассматриваем проблему изучения вложений общих, парафразированных предложений, пересматривая установку Wieting et al. (2016b). Хотя они обнаружили, что рекуррентные сети LSTM недостаточно эффективны для усреднения слов, мы представляем несколько разработок, которые вместе приводят к противоположному выводу. К ним относятся обучение по парам предложений, а не по парам фраз, усреднение состояний для представления последовательностей и агрессивная регуляризация. Они улучшают LSTM как в обучении передачи, так и в контролируемых настройках. Мы также вводим новую периодическую архитектуру, Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, которая вдохновлена усреднением и LSTM, одновременно превосходя их обе. Мы анализируем наши изученные модели, находим доказательства предпочтений для определенных частей речи и отношений зависимости.', 'ga': 'Breathnaímid ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le leabú abairtí ginearálta, paraphraphrastic a fhoghlaim, agus athchuairt a thabhairt ar shuíomh Wieting et al. (2016b). Cé gur bhraith siad go raibh líonraí athfhillteacha LSTM tearcfheidhmithe le meánú focal, cuirimid i láthair roinnt forbairtí a thugann a chonclúid eile le chéile. Ina measc seo tá oiliúint ar phéirí abairtí seachas ar phéirí frása, meánú stáit chun seichimh a léiriú, agus rialtacht ionsaitheach a dhéanamh. Feabhsaíonn siad seo LSTManna i suíomhanna foghlama aistrithe agus maoirsithe araon. Tugaimid isteach freisin ailtireacht athfhillteach nua, an Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, atá spreagtha ag meánú agus LSTManna agus iad ag feidhmiú níos fearr ná iad araon. Déanaimid anailís ar ár múnlaí foghlamtha, ag fáil fianaise ar roghanna do chodanna áirithe cainte agus caidrimh spleáchais.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პრობლემა საერთო მიზეზი სწავლების, პარატრასტიული სიტყვების შემოწყვების, Wieting et al-ის შემოწყვების რედაქტირებას. როცა ისინი LSTM რეკურენტი ქსელების შესახებ სიტყვების განმავლობაში გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ რამდენიმე განვითარება, რომელიც ერთად გავაკეთებს განმავლობაში ისინი იყენებს სტრიქციის კოსტრიქციების განმავლობა, არა ფრაზის კოსტრიქციების განმავლობაში, სტრიქციის განმავლობაში სტრიქციების განმავლობაში და რეგილარიზებაში ეს LSTMs უფრო მეტადება ტრანსტრენსის სწავლებაში და დანახვა პარამეტრებში. ჩვენ ასევე შევცვალოთ ახალი რეკურენტური აქტიქტიქტიკური, დავიწყებული რეკურენტური ახალგაზრული ქსელი, რომელიც იქნება საშუალოდ და LSTMs, რომელიც ორივეს გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ჩვენი სწავლილი მოდელები, საუკეთესო საუკეთესო ნაწილეების წარმოდგენება და დადარდამდგენების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης γενικής χρήσης, παραφραστικής ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων, επανεξέτασης του σκηνικού του κ.α. (2016β). Ενώ διαπίστωσαν ότι τα επαναλαμβανόμενα δίκτυα LSTM δεν ανταποκρίνονται στον μέσο όρο λέξεων, παρουσιάζουμε αρκετές εξελίξεις που μαζί παράγουν το αντίθετο συμπέρασμα. Αυτά περιλαμβάνουν την εκπαίδευση σε ζεύγη προτάσεων αντί για ζεύγη φράσεων, τον μέσο όρο των καταστάσεων για να αντιπροσωπεύουν ακολουθίες, και την τακτική επιθετική. Αυτά βελτιώνουν τόσο τη μάθηση μεταφοράς όσο και τις εποπτευόμενες ρυθμίσεις. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης μια νέα επαναλαμβανόμενη αρχιτεκτονική, το Gated Recurrent Average Network, το οποίο εμπνέεται από τον μέσο όρο και τα LSTMs ενώ τα ξεπερνά και τα δύο. Αναλύουμε τα μαθημένα μοντέλα μας, βρίσκοντας ενδείξεις προτιμήσεων για συγκεκριμένα μέρη της ομιλίας και σχέσεις εξάρτησης.', 'hu': 'Figyelembe vesszük az általános célú, parafrasztikus mondatbeágyazások tanulásának problémáját, a Wieting et al. (2016b). Bár úgy találták, hogy az LSTM visszatérő hálózatai alulteljesítik a szóátlagot, számos olyan fejlesztést mutatunk be, amelyek együttesen az ellenkező következtetést eredményeznek. Ezek közé tartozik a mondatpárok helyett történő kiképzés, a szekvenciák átlagos állapotának ábrázolása és agresszív szabályozás. Ezek javítják az LSTMs-eket mind a transzfer tanulásban, mind a felügyelt beállításokban. Bemutatunk egy új, visszatérő architektúrát, a Gated Recurrent Averaging Network-et is, amelyet az átlag és az LSTMs inspirál, miközben mindkettőt felülmúlja. Elemezzük tanult modelleinket, bizonyítékokat találunk a beszéd bizonyos részeire és a függőségi kapcsolatokra vonatkozó preferenciákra.', 'it': "Consideriamo il problema dell'apprendimento dell'embedding di frasi parafrastiche, della rivisitazione dell'ambientazione di Wieting et al. (2016b). Mentre hanno trovato che le reti ricorrenti LSTM sottoperformano la media delle parole, presentiamo diversi sviluppi che insieme producono la conclusione opposta. Questi includono l'addestramento sulle coppie di frasi piuttosto che sulle coppie di frasi, la media degli stati per rappresentare le sequenze e la regolarizzazione aggressiva. Questi migliorano gli LSTMs sia nell'apprendimento di trasferimento che nelle impostazioni supervisionate. Introducemo anche una nuova architettura ricorrente, il Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, che si ispira alla media e agli LSTMs mentre li supera entrambi. Analizziamo i nostri modelli appresi, trovando prove di preferenze per particolari parti del discorso e relazioni di dipendenza.", 'kk': 'Біз жалпы мақсатты оқыту мәселесін, парафратистік сөздерді ендіру мәселесін ойлаймыз, Wieting et al. баптауын қайталау мәселесін (2016b). Олар LSTM қайталанатын желілерді сөздерді орташа орташа жасау үшін тапты, біз бірге қарсы соңын жасайтын бірнеше өзгерістерді таңдаймыз. Бұл сөздер екеуіне, сөздер екеуіне орташа, реттерді көрсету үшін орташа күйлері және агрессиялық түрлендіру үшін тәжірибелері бар. Бұл LSTMs оқыту және бақылау баптауларында жақсы көтереді. Сонымен қатар, біз жаңа қайталану архитектурасын, қайталану қайталану желі, ол екеуінің ішінде қайталану және LSTMs- лерін көмектеседі. Біз үйренген үлгілерімізді анализ, сөйлеу және тәуелдік қатынасының ерекше бөлшектерінің параметрлерін табуыз.', 'ml': 'ജെനറല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. വൈറ്റിങ്ങ് എറ്റ് അലിന്\u200dറെ സെറ്റ വാക്കിന്റെ ശരീരത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d LSTM വീണ്ടും വരുന്ന നെറ്ററുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല വികസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ജോടികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വാക്ക് ജോടികള്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലനം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും, സെക്കന്\u200dസി എല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിന്റെ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളിലും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നു. ഗേട്ട് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പഠിച്ച മോഡലുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, പ്രസംഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': "Aħna nqisu l-problema tat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjoni ta’ sentenzi parafrastiċi b’għan ġenerali, li tirrevedi l-istabbiliment ta’ Wieting et al. (2016b). Filwaqt li sabu netwerks rikorrenti tal-LSTM li ma jwettqux biżżejjed medja tal-kliem, aħna nippreżentaw diversi żviluppi li flimkien jipproduċu l-konklużjoni opposta. Dawn jinkludu taħriġ fuq pari ta’ sentenzi minflok pari ta’ frażi, stat medju li jirrappreżenta sekwenzi, u regolarizzazzjoni aggressiva. Dawn itejbu l-LSTMs kemm fit-tagħlim tat-trasferiment kif ukoll f’ambjenti sorveljati. Aħna nintroduċu wkoll arkitettura rikorrenti ġdida, in-Netwerk Medju Rikorrenti Miġbur, li huwa ispirat mill-medja u l-LSTMs waqt li jkunu qed iwettquhom it-tnejn. Aħna tanalizzaw il-mudelli tagħna li ttieħdu, u nsibu evidenza ta' preferenzi għal partijiet partikolari tar-relazzjonijiet ta' diskors u dipendenza.", 'mn': 'Бид ерөнхий зорилго суралцах, парафрастикийн өгүүлбэрүүдийн тухай асуудлыг бодож үзэж, Wieting et al-ийн тухай дахин шинэчлэхэд (2016b). Тэд LSTM-г дахин дахин дундаж үгийг багасгаж чадахын тулд олон хөгжлийн хувьд бид хоорондоо эсрэг шийдвэр гаргадаг олон хөгжлийг харуулж байна. Эдгээр нь өгүүлбэр хоёрын оронд суралцах, дарааллыг харуулахын оронд дундаж орнууд, агрессийн үргэлжлүүлэхийн оронд байдаг. Эдгээр нь LSTMs-г шилжүүлэх сургалт болон удирдлагатай байгууллагуудыг сайжруулдаг. Мөн бид дахин дахин шинэ архитектур, Gated Recurrent Averaging Network-г танилцуулж байна. Энэ нь хоёуланг дахин дундаж, LSTMs-ээс урам зориулсан. Бид сурсан загваруудыг шинжилгээ, илтгэл болон хамааралтай харилцааны тодорхой хэсэгт сонирхолтой зүйлсийг олж мэднэ.', 'lt': 'Mes svarstome bendro tikslo mokymosi, parafrastinių sakinių įtraukimo problem ą, persvarstant Wieting ir kt. (2016b). Nors jie nustatė, kad LSTM nuolatiniai tinklai nepakankamai vertina žodžių vidurkius, mes pristatome keletą pokyčių, kurie kartu daro priešingą išvadą. Tai apima mokymą dėl sakinių poros, o ne frazių poros, vidutinio dydžio būsenos, kad būtų galima atspindėti sekas, ir agresyvią reguliavimą. Tai pagerina LSTM tiek perkėlimo mokymosi, tiek prižiūrimose aplinkose. Taip pat įdiegime naują kartotinę architektūrą, Gated Recurrent Average Network, kuri yra įkvėpta vidurkiu ir LSTM, tuo pat metu viršijant juos abu. Analizuojame savo pasimokytus modelius, ieškome tam tikrų kalbos ir priklausomybės santykių pirmenybės įrodymų.', 'mk': 'Го разгледуваме проблемот со учењето на општи цели, парафрастични реченици, ревидирање на поставувањето на Витинг итн. (2016б). Иако тие најдоа рецидентни мрежи на ЛСТМ за недостигање на просекувањето на зборовите, ние претставуваме неколку настани кои заедно го создаваат спротивниот заклучок. Овие вклучуваат обука за парови на реченици наместо парови на фрази, просечни држави за претставување на секвенции, и регулирање агресивно. These improve LSTMs in both transfer learning and supervised settings.  Ние, исто така, воведуваме нова рецидентна архитектура, вратната рецидентна просечна мрежа, која е инспирирана од просечното и LSTM додека ги надминува двете. Ние ги анализираме нашите научени модели, најдовме докази за преференции за одредени делови од односите на говорот и зависноста.', 'ms': 'Kami mempertimbangkan masalah pembelajaran tujuan umum, pembelajaran kalimat parafrastik, mengulang tetapan Wieting et al. (2016b). While they found LSTM recurrent networks to underperform word averaging, we present several developments that together produce the opposite conclusion.  Ini termasuk latihan pasangan kalimat selain dari pasangan frasa, keadaan rata-rata untuk mewakili urutan, dan mengatur secara agresif. Ini memperbaiki LSTM dalam kedua-dua pemindahan belajar dan tetapan yang dijaga. Kami juga memperkenalkan arkitektur berulang baru, Rangkaian Average Recurrent Gated, yang diinspirasi oleh averaging dan LSTM semasa melebihi keduanya. Kami menganalisis model belajar kami, mencari bukti keutamaan bagi bahagian tertentu hubungan ucapan dan dependensi.', 'pl': 'Rozważamy problem uczenia się ogólnodostępnych, parafrastycznych osadzeń zdań, powtórzenia ustawień Wieting et al. (2016b). Podczas gdy stwierdzili, że sieci powtarzające się LSTM są źle wynikające z uśrednienia słów, przedstawiamy kilka zmian, które razem dają odwrotny wniosek. Obejmują one trening na parach zdań zamiast par fraz, uśrednianie stanów reprezentujących sekwencje i agresywne regularyzowanie. Poprawiają one LSTMy zarówno w ustawieniach transferowych, jak i nadzorowanych. Wprowadzamy również nową architekturę powtarzającą się, Gated Recurrent Average Network, która jest inspirowana uśrednianiem i LSTMs, przy jednoczesnym przewyższaniu ich obu. Analizujemy nasze nauczone modele, znajdując dowody na preferencje dla poszczególnych części mowy i relacji zależności.', 'ro': 'Luăm în considerare problema învățării încorporării frazelor parafrastice de scop general, revizitării setării Wieting et al. (2016b). În timp ce au constatat că rețelele recurente LSTM nu corespund mediilor cuvintelor, prezentăm mai multe evoluții care împreună produc concluzia opusă. Acestea includ instruirea pe perechile de fraze mai degrabă decât perechile de fraze, media stărilor pentru a reprezenta secvențe și regularizarea agresivă. Acestea îmbunătățesc LSTMs atât în setările de învățare transferată, cât și în setările supravegheate. Introducem, de asemenea, o nouă arhitectură recurentă, Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, inspirată de media și LSTMs, depășind în același timp ambele. Analizăm modelele noastre învățate, găsind dovezi ale preferințelor pentru anumite părți ale vorbirii și relațiile de dependență.', 'no': 'Vi ser på problem et med å lære generell mål, parafrastiske setningar, gjennomsetjinga av Wieting et al. (2016b). Mens dei funne LSTM-rekurserande nettverk for å underføra ordgjennomsnittet, presenterer vi fleire utviklingar som saman produserer den motsatte konklusjonen. Dette inkluderer trening på setningspar i staden for frasar, gjennomsnittsstatur for å representera sekvens og reguleringa aggressivt. Desse forbedrar LSTMs i både innstillingar for overføring og oversikt. Vi introduserer også ein ny gjentakelig arkitektur, den Gated gjentakelige gjentakelige nettverket, som er inspirert av gjentakelige og LSTMs under utføring av dei begge. Vi analyserer våre lærte modeller, og finn beviser om innstillingar for spesielle deler av tale og avhengighetsrelasjonar.', 'sr': 'Razmišljamo o problemu učenja generalne svrhe, parafrastičke rečenice, revidiranju postavke Wieting et al. (2016b). Dok su pronašli rekonstruntne mreže LSTM kako bi podnijeli srednju reč, predstavljamo nekoliko razvoja koje zajedno proizvode suprotni zaključak. Oni uključuju obuku na par rečenica, a ne par fraza, prosječne države da predstavljaju sekvence i regularizuju agresivno. Oni poboljšavaju LSTMs i u učenju prijenosa i nadzornim nastavama. Takoðe predstavljamo novu ponovnu arhitekturu, Vrata ponovne Average mreže, koja je inspirisana prosječnim i LSTMsima dok ih oboje iznosi. Analiziramo naše naučene modele, nalazimo dokaze preferencija za određene dijelove govora i odnosa zavisnosti.', 'so': 'Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa dhibaatada barashada waxyaabaha caadiga ah, qeybta arimaha ku qoran, si aan u beddelinayno qorsheynta Wieting et al (2016b). Intii ay heleen shabakado soo socda ee LSTM si ay u samaystaan hadal average ah, waxaynu keenaynaa horumar badan oo wada keena dhamaadka ka geesta ah. Kuwaas waxaa ka mid ah waxbarasho ku saabsan labada labo oo aan ka dhigin labada labood, sida wadamada ugu dhexeeya inay u jeedaan noocyada iyo si qalloocan ah. Waxyaabahaas waa horumarin karaan LSTMs marka lagu soo wareejiyo waxbarashada iyo ilaalinta. Waxaynu kaloo soo bandhignaa dhismo cusub oo soo socda, shabakadda ku soo degtay ee Gated, taas oo lagu waxyoodo si caadi ah iyo LSTMs marka labadooda lagu sameynayo. Tusaalooyinkayada la bartay waxaynu baaraynaa, waxaynu helnaa caddeynta doorashooyinka la doortay qeybaha hadalka iyo xiriirka ku xiriira.', 'sv': 'Vi överväger problemet med att lära sig generella, parafrastiska meningar inbäddade, återbesöka inställningen av Wieting et al. (2016b). Medan de fann att LSTM återkommande nätverk underpresterar ordmedelvärde, presenterar vi flera utvecklingar som tillsammans ger motsatt slutsats. Dessa inkluderar träning på meningspar snarare än fraspar, genomsnittligt tillstånd för att representera sekvenser och regularisering aggressivt. Dessa förbättrar LSTMs i både överföringsinlärning och övervakade inställningar. Vi introducerar också en ny återkommande arkitektur, Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, som inspireras av medelvärden och LSTMs samtidigt som de presterar bättre än båda. Vi analyserar våra lärda modeller och hittar bevis på preferenser för vissa delar av tal och beroenderelationer.', 'si': 'අපි හිතන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය-අදහසක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, පාර්ෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වාක්ෂාව ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග්, වීටින් ට ඔවුන් LSTM ආයුත්මක ජාලය හොයාගත්තොත්, වචන අන්තර්ජනය කරන්න, අපි සම්බන්ධයෙන් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින්  මෙයාලා වාක්ෂි දෙන්නා වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වාක්ෂි දෙන්න වලින්, ක්\u200dරමයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සා මේ LSTMs විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ඉගෙනගන්න හා බලන්න සැකසුම් දෙන්නම්. අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, Gated ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාලය, ඒක අනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්ම අපි අපේ ඉගෙන ගත්ත මෝඩල් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, කතාව සහ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන සාක්ෂි හොයාගන්නව', 'ta': 'நாம் பொது இலக்கு கற்றுக் கொள்ள பிரச்சனை அவர்கள் LSTM மீண்டும் திரும்ப வலைப்பின்னல்களை கண்டுபிடித்த போது, வார்த்தை சராசரியாக செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு, நாம் பல மு சொற்றொடர் ஜோடி அல்லாமல் வாக்கிய ஜோடி பயிற்சி சேர்க்கப்படுகிறது, சராசரி நாடுகளை வரிசையில் குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு மற்று இந்த எல்எஸ்டிமிஸ் மேம்படுத்தும் கற்றல் மற்றும் பராமரிக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகள். நாம் ஒரு புதிய திரும்பப் புதிய அடைவு, கேட்டின் மீண்டும் சராசரி வலைப்பின்னல், மற்றும் LSTMs இருவரையும் வெளியேற்றும் போது அது தெர பேச்சு மற்றும் சார்ந்த தொடர்புகளின் குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதிகளுக்கு முன்னுரிமைகள் கண்டுபிடிக்க, எங்கள் கற்', 'ur': 'ہم نے عمومی هدف کی تعلیم کی مسئلہ کی نظر رکھی ہے، پارافرٹیسٹی جماعت کے مطابق، ویٹینگ اٹل کے تنظیم کی تدبیر کی۔ جبکہ انہوں نے LSTM دوبارہ نیٹ ورک پایا ہے کہ کلمات دوسری باتوں کو دھوپ کرنے کے لئے کم کریں، ہم بہت سی توسعہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک دوسرے سے مخالف نتیجہ پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ یہ جماعت جوڑوں کی تعلیم ہے بغیر فرض جوڑوں کی جڑوں کی جڑوں کی جڑوں کی جڑوں کی جڑوں کی جڑ، دوسری حالت کی تعلیم کے لئے متوسط ہوتی ہے، اور زیادتی سے متوسط ہوتی ہے. یہ LSTMs دونوں تعلیم یادگاری اور نظارت کی تنظیمات میں بہتر ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی ایک نوی دوبارہ تکرار معماری پیش آئی ہے، Gated Recurrent Averaging Network، جو ان دونوں کو دوبارہ تکرار کرنے کے بعد اور LSTMs کے ذریعہ الهام کی جاتی ہے. ہم نے اپنی سیکھی مدلکوں کی تحلیل کی، کلام اور اعتمادی رابطہ کے خاص حصوں کے لئے ترجیح کی تصدیق پائی۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề học những mục đích chung, liệt kê câu nói, thăm lại môi trường hoạt động của Wiener et al. Trong khi họ tìm thấy các mạng LSD tái phát để giảm giá lời khuyên, chúng tôi giới thiệu một số tiến triển cùng nhau đưa ra kết luận ngược lại. Chúng bao gồm huấn luyện các cặp câu chứ không phải các cặp câu, trạng thái trung bình đại diện cho các chuỗi, và chỉnh sửa tích cực. Những thứ này cải thiện LSD trong cả việc học chuyển nhượng và giám sát thiết lập. Chúng tôi cũng giới thiệu một kiến trúc thường nhật mới, mạng Averaging thùng, cảm hứng từ việc trung bình và LSD trong khi thua cả hai. Chúng tôi phân tích các mẫu học hỏi, tìm chứng cứ về sở thích của những bộ phận nói và quan hệ phụ thuộc.', 'uz': "Biz umumiy qanday o'rganish, paraphrastik so'zlarini o'rganish muammolarini o'ylaymiz, Wieting et al'ni o'zgarishni qaytadan o'ylaymiz. (2016b). LSTM davom etilgan tarmoqni o'zgartirish uchun o'zgarishni topganda, biz bir necha taʼminlov narsalarni ko'rsatdik, bir necha taʼminlovchi narsalarni birlashtiramiz. These include training on sentence pairs rather than phrase pairs, averaging states to represent sequences, and regularizing aggressively.  Ular o'rganish va taʼminlovchi moslamalarda LSTMs'larni bajaradi. Biz yana yana qaytadan qaytadan harakat qiladigan arxivkorlikni ko'rib chiqaramiz. Bu ikkita xabarlarni bajarayotganda o'xshash va LSTMs orqali o'zaro qiladi. Biz o'rganilgan modelimizni analyzeriz, gapiruvchi va ishlatuvchi munosabatlarining xossa qismlari uchun parametrlarni topamiz.", 'da': 'Vi overvejer problemet med at lære generelle formål, parafrastiske sætninger indlejringer, gennemgå indstillingen af Wieting et al. (2016b). Mens de fandt, at LSTM tilbagevendende netværk underpræsterede ordgennemsnit, præsenterer vi flere udviklinger, der tilsammen giver den modsatte konklusion. Disse omfatter træning på sætningspar snarere end sætningspar, gennemsnitstilstande til at repræsentere sekvenser og regulering aggressivt. Disse forbedrer LSTMs i både overførsel af læring og overvågede indstillinger. Vi introducerer også en ny tilbagevendende arkitektur, Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, der er inspireret af gennemsnit og LSTMs, mens de overgår dem begge. Vi analyserer vores lærte modeller og finder tegn på præferencer for bestemte dele af tale og afhængighedsrelationer.', 'bg': 'Разглеждаме проблема с изучаването с общо предназначение, парафрастични изречения, преразглеждане на настройката на Виетинг и др. (2016б). Въпреки че те откриха, че повтарящите се мрежи на ЛСТМ не изпълняват средното представяне на думи, ние представяме няколко разработки, които заедно водят до обратното заключение. Те включват обучение по двойки изречения, а не по двойки фрази, усредняване на състояния, за да представят последователности, и регулировка агресивно. Те подобряват ЛТМ както в трансферното обучение, така и в контролираните настройки. Също така въвеждаме нова повтаряща се архитектура, мрежата за повтарящи се средни стойности, която е вдъхновена от средните стойности и ЛТМ, като същевременно надминава и двете. Анализираме нашите научени модели, намирайки доказателства за предпочитания за определени части от речта и зависимостта отношения.', 'nl': 'We beschouwen het probleem van het leren van algemene, parafrastische zinsinbeddingen, het opnieuw bekijken van de setting van Wieting et al. (2016b). Hoewel zij vonden dat LSTM-recidiverende netwerken onderpresteerden bij het gemiddeld van woorden, presenteren we verschillende ontwikkelingen die samen tot de tegenovergestelde conclusie leiden. Deze omvatten training op zinsparen in plaats van zinsparen, gemiddelde staten om sequenties weer te geven, en agressief regulariseren. Deze verbeteren LSTMs in zowel transfer learning als begeleide instellingen. We introduceren ook een nieuwe terugkerende architectuur, het Gated Recurrent Average Network, dat is geïnspireerd op gemiddelden en LSTMs, terwijl ze beide beter presteren. We analyseren onze geleerde modellen en vinden bewijs van voorkeuren voor bepaalde delen van spraak en afhankelijkheidsrelaties.', 'hr': 'Razmišljamo o problemu učenja općeg cilja, parafrastičkog ugrađenja rečenica, revidiranju nastave Wieting et al. (2016b). Iako su pronašli rekonstruirane mreže LSTM-a kako bi podnijeli prosječne riječi, predstavljamo nekoliko razvoja koje zajedno proizvode suprotni zaključak. Oni uključuju obuku za par rečenica umjesto par fraza, prosječne države za predstavljanje sekvencija i regularisanje agresivno. Oni poboljšavaju LSTMs u učenju prijenosa i nadzornim nastavama. Također predstavljamo novu ponovnu arhitekturu, vraćenu ponovnu Averencijsku mrežu, koja je inspirisana prosječnim i LSTMsima dok ih oboje iznosi. Analiziramo naše naučene modele, nalazimo dokaze preferencija određenih dijelova govora i odnosa ovisnosti.', 'id': 'Kami mempertimbangkan masalah belajar tujuan umum, kalimat parafrastik embedding, mengubah pengaturan Wieting et al. (2016b). Sementara mereka menemukan jaringan LSTM berulang-ulang untuk melaksanakan rendah rata-rata kata, kami memperlihatkan beberapa perkembangan yang bersama-sama menghasilkan kesimpulan yang berlawanan. Ini termasuk latihan pada pasangan kalimat daripada pasangan kalimat, negara-negara rata-rata untuk mewakili urutan, dan mengatur secara agresif. Ini memperbaiki LSTM dalam kedua pengaturan transfer belajar dan diawasi. Kami juga memperkenalkan arsitektur baru yang berulang-ulang, Jaringan Average Recurrent Gated, yang diinspirasi oleh rata-rata dan LSTM sementara melampaui keduanya. Kami menganalisis model belajar kita, menemukan bukti keutamaan bagi bagian tertentu dari hubungan pidato dan dependensi.', 'ko': '우리는 통용되고 해석된 문장을 배우는 문제를 고려하여 위팅 등(2016b)의 배경을 재검토했다.그들은 LSTM 순환 네트워크의 표현이 단어의 평균보다 못하다는 것을 발견했지만 우리는 몇 가지 발전 추세를 제시했고 그들은 공통적으로 상반된 결론을 내렸다.단어가 아닌 문장 쌍을 훈련하고 평균 상태로 서열을 표시하며 적극적으로 규범화하는 것을 포함한다.이렇게 하면 마이그레이션 학습 및 감독 환경에서 LSTM이 향상됩니다.우리는 또한 평균과 LSTM에서 영감을 얻었고 둘보다 우수하다는 새로운 귀속 구조를 소개했다.우리는 우리가 배운 모델을 분석하고 특정 어류의 선호와 의존 관계에 대한 증거를 찾는다.', 'de': 'Wir betrachten das Problem des Erlernens allgemeiner, paraphrastischer Satzbedingungen, des Umgangs von Wieting et al. (2016b). Während sie festgestellt haben, dass LSTM-wiederkehrende Netzwerke eine schlechtere Wortmittlung aufweisen, stellen wir einige Entwicklungen vor, die zusammen die gegenteilige Schlussfolgerung ergeben. Dazu gehören das Training auf Satzpaaren anstelle von Phrasenpaaren, das Durchschnitten von Zuständen zur Darstellung von Sequenzen und das aggressive Regularisieren. Diese verbessern LSTMs sowohl im Transfer-Learning als auch in überwachten Einstellungen. Wir führen auch eine neue, wiederkehrende Architektur ein, das Gated Recurrent Averaging Network, das von Durchschnittswerten und LSTMs inspiriert ist und beide übertrifft. Wir analysieren unsere erlernten Modelle und finden Hinweise auf Präferenzen für bestimmte Teile der Sprache und Abhängigkeitsverhältnisse.', 'tr': "Biz umumy maksady öwrenmeniň, paraphrastik sözleriň düzümlenmesiniň meselesini pikir edýäris, Wieting et al döwletiniň düzümlenmesini täzeden geçirip ýöredik. (2016b). Olar LSTM'iň tekrarly şebekeleri sözleri üýtgetmek üçin tapylýardylar, bir topar çykyşyň tersine çykyşyny düzenleýäris. Bular sözleýän çiftlerde, sözleýän çiftlerden ýerine, döwletleri düzenlemek üçin terjime etmek we agresif derejesini düzenlemek üçin birleşýärler. Bular LSTMsini hem transfers öwrenmesini hem gözleýän düzümlerinde gowylaşdyrýarlar. Biz hem täze bir arhitektura, Gataky Gaýtalança Halkara Aýry bilen üýtgedýäris. Ol ikisiniň üstüne çykarýan we LSTMsleriň üýtgedýäninden ruhlandyrylýar. Biz öwrenmeli nusglarymyzy analyzýarys, gepleşiň we baglygyň häsiýetleriniň seçenekleri tapyp bardyk.", 'sw': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings, revisiting the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b).  Wakati waligundua mitandao ya LSTM yanayoendelea kufanya maneno yenye wastani, tunaweka maendeleo kadhaa ambayo yanaleta hitimisho lingine. Hizi ni pamoja na mafunzo ya wanaume wa hukumu badala ya maneno, kwa wastani nchi zinazowakilisha mifano, na kudhibiti kwa nguvu. Hizi inaboresha mafanikio ya LSTMs katika mazingira ya kuhamisha kujifunza na kudhibitiwa. Pia tunaonyesha ujenzi mpya unaoendelea, Mtandao wa Kuharibiwa kwa mara nyingine wa Gated, ambao unahamasishwa na kuongezeka kwa wastani na LSTMs wakati wa kufanya kazi hizo mbili. Tunafahamu mifano yetu ya kujifunza, kutafuta ushahidi wa vipaumbele kwa sehemu maalum za kujieleza na uhusiano wa kutegemea.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل یادگیری از هدف عمومی، جمله\u200cهای پارافراست را در نظر می\u200cگیریم، تغییر تغییر کردن تنظیم ویتینگ و ال. (2016b). در حالی که شبکه های دوباره LSTM را پیدا کردند تا متوسط کلمات را انجام دهند، ما چندین پیشرفت را پیشنهاد می کنیم که با هم نتیجه مخالف را تولید می کنند. این\u200cها شامل آموزش بر جفت\u200cهای جمله به جای جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cها است، آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموز این تغییرات LSTMs در مورد یادگیری و تنظیمات تحت نظر است. ما همچنین یک معماری جدید بازگشت را معرفی می کنیم، شبکه بازگشت بازگشت، که توسط متفاوت و LSTMs در حالی که از آن دو برخورد می کنند الهام می دهد. ما مدل یاد گرفته\u200cایم را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم، و مدرک\u200cهای ترجیح برای بخش\u200cهای مشخص صحبت و ارتباط بستگی پیدا می\u200cکنیم.', 'af': "Ons beskou die probleem van die leer van algemene-doel, paraphrastiese setinge inbettings, hersiening van die instelling van Wieting et al. (2016b). Terwyl hulle LSTM herhaalde netwerke gevind het om die woord middelste ondersteun te maak, voorsien ons verskeie ontwikkelinge wat saam die teenwoordige conclusie produseer. Hierdie insluit onderwerp op sin paar eerder as frase paar, gemiddelde staatste om sekwensies te verteenwoordig en aggressief te regulaliseer. Hierdie LSTMs verbeter in beide oordrag leer en ondersoek instellings. Ons introduiseer ook 'n nuwe herhaalde arkitektuur, die Gated Herhaalde Gemiddelde Netwerk, wat inspireer word deur middelste en LSTMs terwyl hulle beide uitvoer. Ons analiseer ons geleerde modele en vind getuienisse van voorkeure vir spesifieke dele van spraak en afhanklikheidverhouding.", 'am': 'የጠቅላላ አቃውሞ ማወቅ ጉዳይ፣ የፓራፊስቲ ፍርድ አቀማመጥ፣ የWieting et al በማስተካከል እናስባለን፡፡ While they found LSTM recurrent networks to underperform word averaging, we present several developments that together produce the opposite conclusion.  እነዚህ በንግግር ግንኙነት እና በቁጥጥር የሚቆጠሩ ሀገሮች እና በቁጥጥር የሚያስተካክሉ እና በቁጥጥር የሚያስተካክሉ ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህም LSTMs በመለወጥ ትምህርት እና በመጠበቅ ምርጫዎች ይሻላል፡፡ አዲስ መደጋገሚያ የመዝገብ መሠረት ማድረጊያውን እና በሁለቱም ላይ በመጠቀም እና LSTMs ን በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተማረኩትን ምሳሌዎቻችንን እናስተምር የንግግር እና የመታመኛ ግንኙነት ማስረጃዎችን ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք դիտարկում ենք ընդհանուր նպատակի սովորելու, պարաֆրասիկ նախադասությունների ներդրման խնդիրը, վերանայելով Վիթինգ և այլը (2016b). While they found LSTM recurrent networks to underperform word averaging, we present several developments that together produce the opposite conclusion.  Սրանք ներառում են նախադասությունների զույգերի ուսումնասիրությունը, ոչ թե արտահայտությունների զույգերի, միջին նահանգների, որոնք ներկայացնում են հաջորդականությունները, և ագրեսիվ վերահսկում են: These improve LSTMs in both transfer learning and supervised settings.  Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք նոր կրկնօրինակ ճարտարապետություն, Gated կրկնօրինակ միջինակ ցանցը, որը ոգեշնչվում է միջինակով և LSMT-ներով, մինչ երկուսն էլ արտադրվում են: Մենք վերլուծում ենք մեր սովոր մոդելները, գտնում ենք խոսքի և կախվածության հարաբերությունների որոշակի մասերի նախընտրությունների ապացույցներ:', 'sq': 'Ne konsiderojmë problemin e mësimit të përfshirjeve të fjalëve me qëllim të përgjithshëm, parafrastike, duke rishikuar vendosjen e Wieting et al. (2016b). Ndërsa ata gjetën rrjete të përsëritura LSTM për të munguar mesataren e fjalëve, ne paraqesim disa zhvillime që së bashku prodhojnë përfundimin e kundërt. Këto përfshijnë stërvitjen në çiftet e fjalëve në vend të çifteve të frazave, përmirësimin e shteteve për të përfaqësuar sekuencat dhe rregullimin agresiv. Këto përmirësojnë LSTMs si në transferimin e mësimit ashtu edhe në rregullimet e mbikqyrura. Ne gjithashtu paraqesim një arkitekturë të re të përsëritur, Rrjeti i Mesatarisë së Përhershme Gated, i cili frymëzohet nga mesatarja dhe LSTM ndërsa i kalon të dyja. Ne analizojmë modelet tona të mësuar, duke gjetur prova të preferimeve për pjesë të veçanta të marrëdhënieve të fjalimit dhe varësisë.', 'az': 'Biz general-purpose öyrənmək, parafrastik cümlələr inşallarının problemlərini düşünürük, Wieting et al. Onlar LSTM yenidən fərqli ağlarını gördükləri halda, sözləri dəyişdirmək üçün, birlikdə bir neçə dəyişiklik göstərdik ki, bir-birinə qarşı sonuç gətirir. Bu cümlələr cüt cütlərinin təhsil edilməsini, cüt cütlərinin yerinə təhsil edilməsini, sıralar göstərməsini və agresif təhsil etməsini təhsil edirlər. Bu LSTMs öyrənməsi və gözləyirlən quruluşlarda da yaxşılaşdırır. Biz də yeni bir arhitektir, Gated Recurrent Average Network ilə təşkil edirik. Bu, onların ikisinin üstünə gələn vəziyyətdə təşkil edilir. Biz öyrəndiyimiz modelləri analiz edirik, sözlərin və bağımlılıq əlaqələrinin məsələlərinin seçimlərinin dəlillərini tapırıq.', 'bn': 'আমরা জেনারেল উদ্দেশ্য শিখার সমস্যা বিবেচনা করি, প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক বাক্যের বিষয়টি বিভিন্ন বিবেচনা করি, উইটিং এন্ট আলের সেটি যখন তারা এলস্টিএম পুনরায় নেটওয়ার্ক পেয়েছিল যেখানে শব্দ গড়ে যাওয়ার জন্য, আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি উন্নয়ন উপস্থাপন করছি যা একসাথে বি এই সমস্ত প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে রয়েছে বাক্যের জোড়ার পরিবর্তে জোড়ার প্রশিক্ষণ, গড় রাষ্ট্রের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ এলএসএসএমএস ব্যবহারকারী শিক্ষা এবং পর্যবেক্ষণের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মধ্যে উভয়ই উন্নত হয়েছে। আমরা একটি নতুন পুনরাবার প্রতিষ্ঠান, গেটের পুনরায় প্রত্যাবর্তনের নেটওয়ার্ক, যা গড়ে এবং এলস্টিএমএস উভয়কে উৎসাহিত করার সময় অনুপ্রাণিত করে। আমরা আমাদের শিক্ষিত মডেল বিশ্লেষণ করি, বিশেষ ভাষণ এবং নির্ভরশীল সম্পর্কের জন্য পছন্দের প্রমাণ খুঁজে বের করি।', 'bs': 'Razmišljamo o problemu učenja općeg cilja, parafrastičkog ugrađenja rečenica, revidiranja postavke Wieting et al. (2016b). Dok su pronašli rekonstruirane mreže LSTM kako bi podnijeli prosječne riječi, predstavljamo nekoliko razvoja koje zajedno proizvode suprotni zaključak. Oni uključuju obuku na par rečenica umjesto parova fraze, prosječne države da predstave sekvence i regularizuju agresivno. Oni poboljšavaju LSTMs u učenju prijenosa i nadzornim nastavama. Također predstavljamo novu ponovnu arhitekturu, vraćenu ponovnu Averencijsku mrežu, koja je inspirisana prosječnim i LSTMsima dok ih oboje iznosi. Analiziramo naše naučene modele, nalazimo dokaze preferencija određenih dijelova govora i odnosa zavisnosti.', 'ca': "Considerem el problema d'aprendre incorporacions de frases de propòsit general, parafràstics, revisant l'entorn de Wieting et al. (2016b). Mentre van trobar xarxes recurrents de LSTM per desfer la mitjana de paraules, presentem diversos desenvolupaments que junts produeixen la contraria conclusió. Aquestes inclouen entrenament en parelles de frases en comptes de parelles de frases, mitjançant estats per representar seqüències, i regularitzant-se agressivament. Això millora els LSTMs tant en l'aprenentatge de transfer ència com en les condicions supervisades. També introduïm una nova arquitectura recurrent, la Red Average Recurrent Gated, inspirada per mitjana i LSTMs mentre les supera ambdues. Analitzem els nostres models aprenguts, trobem proves de preferències per parts específices de les relacions de parla i dependencia.", 'cs': 'Zabýváme se problematikou učení se obecně účelovými, parafrastickými větami, revitalizací nastavení Wieting et al. (2016b). Zatímco zjistili, že LSTM recidivující sítě nedosahují průměru slov, prezentujeme několik vývojů, které společně vytvářejí opačný závěr. Mezi ně patří trénink na větových párech spíše než frázových párech, průměrování stavů reprezentujících sekvence a agresivní regulace. Ty zlepšují LSTMs jak v přenosovém vzdělávání, tak v nastavení pod dohledem. Představujeme také novou opakovanou architekturu, Gated Recurrent Average Network, která je inspirována průměrováním a LSTMs a přitom je překonává oba. Analyzujeme naše naučené modely, hledáme důkazy o preferencích pro jednotlivé části řeči a vztahy závislosti.', 'et': 'Me kaalume üldeesmärkide, parafrastiliste lausete manustamise õppimise probleemi, Wieting jt. (2016b) seadistuse uuesti läbivaatamise probleemi. Kuigi nad leidsid, et LSTM-i korduvad võrgustikud ei suuda sõna keskmist saavutada, esitame mitmeid arenguid, mis koos annavad vastupidise järelduse. Nende hulka kuuluvad lausepaaride mitte fraasipaaride treenimine, järjestuste esindamiseks keskmiste olekute arvutamine ja agressiivse regulatsiooni seadistamine. Need parandavad LSTMsid nii siirdeõppe kui ka järelevalve seadetes. Lisaks tutvustame uut korduvat arhitektuuri, Gated Korduva Keskmise Võrgustikku, mis on inspireeritud keskmistest ja LSTMdest, samas kui ületab neid mõlemaid. Analüüsime oma õppinud mudeleid, leides tõendeid eelistuste kohta konkreetsetele kõne- ja sõltuvussuhete osadele.', 'fi': 'Käsittelemme ongelmaa yleistarkoituksen, parafrastisen lauseen upottamisen oppimisesta, Wieting et al. (2016b) asetuksen uudelleentarkastelusta. Vaikka LSTM:n toistuvat verkot osoittautuivat huonommiksi sanojen keskiarvoiksi, esittelemme useita kehityskulkuja, jotka yhdessä tuottavat päinvastaisen päätelmän. Näitä ovat lauseparien harjoittelu fraasiparien sijaan, sekvenssien keskiarvojen laskeminen ja aggressiivinen säännöstely. Nämä parantavat LSTMs-ohjelmia sekä siirtooppimisessa että valvotuissa asetuksissa. Esittelemme myös uuden toistuvan arkkitehtuurin, Gated Recorrent Averaging Network -verkoston, joka on saanut inspiraationsa keskiarvoista ja LSTMistä, mutta joka päihittää molemmat. Analysoimme opittuja malleja ja etsimme todisteita mieltymyksistä tiettyihin puheen ja riippuvuussuhteiden osiin.', 'sk': 'Obravnavamo problem učenja splošnega namena, parafrastičnih stavkov, ponovnega pregleda nastavitve Wieting et al. (2016b). Medtem ko so ugotovili, da ponavljajoča se mreža LSTM slabo izpolnjujejo povprečje besed, predstavljamo več razvojev, ki skupaj prinašajo nasprotno sklepanje. Ti vključujejo trening na parih stavkov namesto fraz, povprečje stanj za predstavljanje zaporedij in agresivno urejanje. Ti izboljšujejo LSTMs v prenosnem učenju in nadzorovanih okoljih. Predstavljamo tudi novo ponavljajočo se arhitekturo, Gated Recorrent Averaging Network, ki je navdihnjena z izračunavanjem povprečij in LSTMs, hkrati pa je boljša od obeh. Analiziramo naše učene modele in najdemo dokaze o preferencah za določene dele govora in odvisnosti.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙayyade matsalar da za'a iya fahimtar maganar jumla da aka shigar da salon sarrafiki, ana canza tsarin Wieting et al. (2016b). While they found LSTM recurrent networks to underperform word averaging, we present several developments that together produce the opposite conclusion.  Wannan yana da yin wa'azi ga nau'i biyu ko kuma ba da matsayin mutane ba, ma'anar mutane da ke wakilisha mataimaki, kuma yana yin taƙaita. @ info: whatsthis Tuna fara wani na'urar arziki da aka sake koma, The Gaded Recurrent Disastation Networks, which is an yi wahayi da tsakanin da LTRM idan na samar da su biyu. Ana yi anayya ga misalinmu da aka sanar, kuma munã sami bayan zafi ga masu husũma da masu baka-faɗi.", 'he': 'אנחנו שוקלים את הבעיה של לימוד משפטים למטרה כללית, משפטים פראפרסטיים, לשחזר את התקנה של ויטינג וס. (2016b). בזמן שהם מצאו רשתות חוזרות של LSTM כדי לבצע את הממוצע של מילים, אנחנו מציגים כמה התפתחות שיוצרו יחד את המסקנה ההפך. אלה כוללים אימון על זוגות משפטים במקום זוגות ביטויים, מדינות ממוצאות כדי לייצג רצפים, ולקבוע באופן אגרסיבי. אלה משתפרים את LSTM בין לימוד העברה וגם בתקנות מבוקשות. אנחנו גם מציגים ארכיטקטורה חדשה חוזרת, רשת המשיכה המשיכה המשיכה המשיכה המשיכה המשיכה, אשר מעוררת השראה על ידי הממוצע ו LSTMs בזמן שהוציא את שניהם. אנו מנתחים את הדוגמנים המלמדים שלנו, למצוא ראיות של העדיפות לחלקים מסויימים של יחסי הנאום והתלויות.', 'jv': 'Anyone Sing hal kedahke nggawe sistem kaluwargane soko hal-hal dadi sing beraksi perusahaan Awak dhéwé éntukno kelompok nggawe winih, dadi perintah seneng pisan; ditawak dhéwé kuwi nggawe layang seneng pisan lan tambah kuwi nggawe gerarané. Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé nganggo perusahaan architecture sing gak perusahaan, Network sing gak perusahaan Average Multi-Multi, sing isinaké awak dhéwé nggawe tarjamahan karo KST mrêvemangé, mengko iso nggawe sawoleh dumadhi iki de. Awak dhéwé ngerasai model sing kelas, njaluk nggawe aturan karo perkaraan kanggo kelas barang nggawe barang karo perkaraan kelas', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་ཁག་ལ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་ཞིབ་ཡོད། དེ་དག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོས་LSTM རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་མཁན་གྱི་མཇུག་སྡོམ་ལ་མང་ འདི་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྐད་འགའ་སྨོན་འདུག སྐུལ་སློང་དང་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཉིས་ལས་LSTMs ས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དང་། སྐད་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རང་མ'}
{'en': 'Ontology-Aware Token Embeddings for Prepositional Phrase Attachment', 'ar': 'علم الوجود المدرك للتضمينات الرمزية لمرفق عبارة الجر', 'es': 'Incrustaciones de tokens con reconocimiento de ontología para el adjunto de frases preposicionales', 'pt': 'Incorporações de token com reconhecimento de ontologia para anexo de frase preposicional', 'fr': "Embeddings de jetons sensibles à l'ontologie pour l'attachement de phrases prépositionnelles", 'ja': 'オントロジー-前置詞フレーズ添付のためのトークン埋め込み', 'zh': '介词短语附件本体感知标嵌', 'ru': 'Встраивание маркеров онтологии для вложения препозитивной фразы', 'hi': 'Prepositional वाक्यांश अनुलग्नक के लिए Ontology-जागरूक टोकन एम्बेडिंग', 'ga': 'Leabú Comhartha Ontology-Aware le haghaidh Ceangaltán Frása Réamhfhocal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενσωματώσεις σημαδιών με γνώση της οντολογίας για προσάρτημα προεγκατάστασης', 'hu': 'Ontológia-tudatos tokenbeágyazások az előpozíciós kifejezések csatolásához', 'kk': 'Name', 'it': "Embeddings di token Ontology-Aware per l'attaccamento di frase Prepositionale", 'mk': 'Вклучувања на токени на онтологија за препозиционална фраза', 'lt': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Comment', 'ml': 'പ്രിപ്റ്റീഷന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d അറിയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഓണ്\u200dടോളജി ടോക്കെന്\u200d എംബഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Embeddings tat-Token ta’ Kunxjenza dwar l-Ontoloġija għal Attachment ta’ Frażi Prepożizzjonali', 'mn': 'Онтологий-Aware Токен хэлбэрийн тусламжтайгаар', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Ontologicznie świadome osadzenia tokenów dla załącznika fraz prepozycyjnych', 'ro': 'Încorporări de jetoane conștiente de ontologie pentru atașarea frazelor prepoziționale', 'sr': 'Ontologija-Aware Token integracije za pridruživanje predpozicionalne fraze', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Heeganka Ontology-aware Token for Prepositive Phrase Attachment', 'sv': 'Ontologi-Aware Token Inbäddningar för Prepositional Frase Attachment', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு சொற்றொடர் இணைப்புக்கான இணைப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lớp thể thao Token Nhúng vào hình vị trí treo ảnh', 'nl': 'Ontologie-bewuste token embeddings voor prepositionele frase bijlage', 'da': 'Ontologi-bevidste tokenindlejringer til forpositionsvedhæftelse af sætninger', 'bg': 'Онтологично осъзнати вграждания за прикачване на предпозиционни фрази', 'hr': 'Ontologija-Aware Token integracije za prijenos predpozicionalne fraze', 'de': 'Ontologie-bewusste Token-Einbettungen für präpositionale Phrase Attachment', 'id': 'Embeddings Token Aware Ontology for Prepositional Phrase Attachment', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Tamko wa Mtolojy-Mtangazaji', 'ko': '본체에 기반한 개사 단어 연결 태그 삽입', 'tr': 'Ön ýerleşdirim Fraz Namaýyşlygy üçin ontologiýa-Aware Token Ululyklary', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Ontology-Aware Token Embeddings for Prepositional Phrase Attachment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': '칐n-pozisyonal Fraz 쿮lav톛si 칲칞칲n Ontology-Aware Token 캻fad톛l톛ri', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'প্রেসিটিভাল বাক্যার সংযুক্তি', 'bs': 'Ontologija-Aware Token integracije za prijenos predpozicionalne fraze', 'cs': 'Ontologicky orientované vložení tokenů pro přílohu prepoziční fráze', 'ca': "Embediments de fitxes conscients de l'Ontologia per a l'Anexo de Frases Preposicionals", 'et': 'Ontoloogiateadlikud märkide põimimised eelpositsioonilise fraasi manustamiseks', 'fi': 'Ontologiatietoiset polettien upotukset esipositionaalisen lauseen liittämistä varten', 'jv': 'Tatanan Ontologgi-Awake Token nggo Ketoken Priponal Frase Attaching', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תוכניות סימנים מודעות לאונטולוגיה לתאריך פרזיה מראש', 'sk': 'Ontologijsko ozaveščene vdelave žetonov za prilogo predpozicijskih fraz', 'bo': 'རྣམ་གྲངས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཚིག་འཆར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་མཚོན་པའི་ཊོ་ཀེན་ཨ་རྟགས་བཀལ་སྤྱོད།'}
{'en': 'Type-level word embeddings use the same set of parameters to represent all instances of a word regardless of its context, ignoring the inherent lexical ambiguity in language. Instead, we embed semantic concepts (or synsets) as defined in WordNet and represent a word token in a particular context by estimating a distribution over relevant semantic concepts. We use the new, context-sensitive embeddings in a model for predicting prepositional phrase (PP) attachments and jointly learn the concept embeddings and model parameters. We show that using context-sensitive embeddings improves the accuracy of the PP attachment model by 5.4 % absolute points, which amounts to a 34.4 % relative reduction in errors.', 'ar': 'تستخدم عمليات تضمين الكلمات على مستوى النوع نفس مجموعة المعلمات لتمثيل جميع مثيلات الكلمة بغض النظر عن سياقها ، متجاهلة الغموض المعجمي المتأصل في اللغة. بدلاً من ذلك ، نقوم بتضمين المفاهيم الدلالية (أو مجموعات المزامنة) كما هو محدد في WordNet ونمثل رمزًا للكلمة في سياق معين عن طريق تقدير التوزيع على المفاهيم الدلالية ذات الصلة. نحن نستخدم الزخارف الجديدة الحساسة للسياق في نموذج للتنبؤ بمرفقات عبارة الجر (PP) ونتعلم بشكل مشترك مفهوم الزخارف ومعلمات النموذج. لقد أظهرنا أن استخدام الزخارف الحساسة للسياق يحسن دقة نموذج مرفق PP بنسبة 5.4٪ من النقاط المطلقة ، وهو ما يمثل انخفاضًا نسبيًا في الأخطاء بنسبة 34.4٪.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots au niveau du type utilisent le même ensemble de paramètres pour représenter toutes les instances d'un mot quel que soit son contexte, sans tenir compte de l'ambiguïté lexicale inhérente au langage. Au lieu de cela, nous intégrons des concepts sémantiques (ou synsets) tels que définis dans WordNet et représentons un jeton de mot dans un contexte particulier en estimant une distribution sur des concepts sémantiques pertinents. Nous utilisons les nouvelles intégrations contextuelles dans un modèle pour prédire les attachements de phrases prépositionnelles (PP) et apprenons conjointement les intégrations de concept et les paramètres du modèle. Nous montrons que l'utilisation d'intégrations contextuelles améliore la précision du modèle de fixation PP de 5,4\xa0% points absolus, ce qui équivaut à une réduction relative de 34,4\xa0% des erreurs.", 'pt': 'As incorporações de palavras em nível de tipo usam o mesmo conjunto de parâmetros para representar todas as instâncias de uma palavra, independentemente de seu contexto, ignorando a ambiguidade lexical inerente ao idioma. Em vez disso, incorporamos conceitos semânticos (ou synsets) conforme definidos no WordNet e representamos um token de palavra em um contexto específico, estimando uma distribuição sobre conceitos semânticos relevantes. Usamos os novos embeddings sensíveis ao contexto em um modelo para prever anexos de frases preposicionais (PP) e aprendemos em conjunto os embeddings de conceito e os parâmetros do modelo. Mostramos que o uso de embeddings sensíveis ao contexto melhora a precisão do modelo de anexo PP em 5,4% pontos absolutos, o que equivale a uma redução relativa de 34,4% nos erros.', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras a nivel de tipo utilizan el mismo conjunto de parámetros para representar todas las instancias de una palabra, independientemente de su contexto, ignorando la ambigüedad léxica inherente al lenguaje. En cambio, incorporamos conceptos semánticos (o synsets) tal como se definen en WordNet y representamos un símbolo de palabra en un contexto particular mediante la estimación de una distribución sobre conceptos semánticos relevantes. Utilizamos las nuevas incorporaciones sensibles al contexto en un modelo para predecir adjuntos de frases preposicionales (PP) y aprendemos conjuntamente las incrustaciones de conceptos y los parámetros del modelo. Demostramos que el uso de incrustaciones sensibles al contexto mejora la precisión del modelo de apego PP en un 5,4% de puntos absolutos, lo que equivale a una reducción relativa de errores del 34,4%.', 'hi': 'टाइप-लेवल शब्द एम्बेडिंग किसी शब्द के संदर्भ की परवाह किए बिना किसी शब्द के सभी उदाहरणों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए पैरामीटर के एक ही सेट का उपयोग करते हैं, भाषा में अंतर्निहित लेक्सिकल अस्पष्टता को अनदेखा करते हैं। इसके बजाय, हम वर्डनेट में परिभाषित शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं (या synsets) को एम्बेड करते हैं और प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं पर वितरण का अनुमान लगाकर किसी विशेष संदर्भ में एक शब्द टोकन का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं। हम प्रीपोजिशनल वाक्यांश (पीपी) अनुलग्नकों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक मॉडल में नए, संदर्भ-संवेदनशील एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं और संयुक्त रूप से अवधारणा एम्बेडिंग और मॉडल पैरामीटर सीखते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि संदर्भ-संवेदनशील एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करने से पीपी अनुलग्नक मॉडल की सटीकता में 5.4% निरपेक्ष अंकों से सुधार होता है, जो त्रुटियों में 34.4% सापेक्ष कमी के बराबर है।', 'ja': 'タイプレベルの単語埋め込みは、同じパラメータセットを使用して、言語の固有の語彙の曖昧さを無視して、その文脈に関係なく単語のすべてのインスタンスを表します。代わりに、WordNetで定義されている意味概念（またはシンセット）を埋め込み、関連する意味概念の上の分布を推定することによって、特定のコンテキストでワードトークンを表します。私たちは、前置詞句（ PP ）の添付ファイルを予測するために、新しい文脈に応じた埋め込みをモデルに使用し、コンセプト埋め込みとモデルパラメータを共同で学習します。文脈依存の埋め込みを使用すると、PP添付モデルの精度が5.4%向上し、誤差が34.4%相対的に減少することが示されています。', 'zh': '凡嵌同参数以表单词例,而不论其上下文,忽于语言固词汇歧义。 反此者,WordNet之语义名(与同义词集),计其关语义之分以表特定上下文单词也。 新上下文相关,以占介词短语(PP)附件,共学其概嵌参数。 明以上下文嵌PP附模准确性增5.4%之绝对点,此减34.4%也。', 'ru': 'Вложения слов на уровне типа используют один и тот же набор параметров для представления всех экземпляров слова независимо от его контекста, игнорируя присущую лексическую двусмысленность в языке. Вместо этого мы внедряем семантические концепции (или синсеты), определенные в WordNet, и представляем маркер слова в определенном контексте, оценивая распределение по соответствующим семантическим концепциям. Мы используем новые, контекстно-зависимые вложения в модели для прогнозирования вложений предлог-фразы (ПП) и совместно изучаем концептуальные вложения и параметры модели. Показано, что использование контекстно-зависимых вложений повышает точность модели присоединения ПП на 5,4% абсолютных пунктов, что составляет относительное снижение погрешностей на 34,4%.', 'ga': 'Úsáideann leabaí cineál-leibhéal focal an tacar céanna paraiméadair chun gach cás d’fhocal a léiriú beag beann ar a chomhthéacs, gan aird ar an débhríocht fhoclóra atá sa teanga. Ina áit sin, leabaíonn muid coincheapa (nó synsets) shéimeantach mar atá sainmhínithe i WordNet agus seasaimid comhartha focal i gcomhthéacs áirithe trí dháileadh a mheas thar choincheapa shéimeantacha ábhartha. Bainimid úsáid as na leabaithe nua, comhthéacs-íogair i múnla chun ceangaltáin frása réamhfhocal (PP) a thuar agus comhfhoghlaimímid na leabaithe coincheapa agus paraiméadair na samhla. Léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe comhthéacs-íogair cruinneas an mhúnla ceangail PP 5.4% pointí iomlána, arb ionann é agus laghdú coibhneasta 34.4% ar earráidí.', 'ka': 'ტიპის დონეზე სიტყვების ინტებიზიციები იგივე პარამეტრების ჯგუფის გამოყენება, რომ ყველა სიტყვების ინტებიზიციები იყოს სიტყვების კონტექსტის განმავლობაში, რომელიც ენა მაშინ, ჩვენ სიმენტიკური კონცექტები (ან სინქესტები) დავყენებთ, როგორც WordNet-ში განსაზღვრებულია და გამოყენებთ სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვები განსაზღვრებული კონტექსტ ჩვენ ახალი, კონტექსტიური სინტექსტიური მოდელში გამოყენებთ პრესუციენალური ფრაზა (PP) დაკავშირებების მოდგენისთვის და ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ კონტექსტის დაკავშირება და ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ კონტექსტიური შეგრძნობის გამოყენება PP დაკავშირების მოდელის წარმოდგენებას 5,4% აბსოლუტური წერტილებით, რომელსაც 34,4% დაკავშირებული შეცდომის შეცდ', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων σε επίπεδο τύπου χρησιμοποιούν το ίδιο σύνολο παραμέτρων για να αντιπροσωπεύουν όλες τις περιπτώσεις μιας λέξης ανεξάρτητα από το περιβάλλον της, αγνοώντας την εγγενή λεξική ασάφεια στη γλώσσα. Αντίθετα, ενσωματώνουμε σημασιολογικές έννοιες (ή σύνσύνολα) όπως ορίζονται στο και αντιπροσωπεύουμε ένα σύμβολο λέξης σε ένα συγκεκριμένο πλαίσιο εκτιμώντας μια κατανομή πάνω από σχετικές σημασιολογικές έννοιες. Χρησιμοποιούμε τις νέες, ευαίσθητες στο πλαίσιο ενσωμάτωσης σε ένα μοντέλο για την πρόβλεψη συνημμένων προσθετικών φράσεων (και μαθαίνουμε από κοινού τις έννοιες ενσωμάτωσης και παραμέτρους μοντέλου. Δείχνουμε ότι η χρήση ευαίσθητων στο πλαίσιο ενσωματώσεων βελτιώνει την ακρίβεια του μοντέλου προσάρτησης κατά 5,4% απόλυτων σημείων, γεγονός που ισοδυναμεί με 34,4% σχετική μείωση των σφαλμάτων.', 'hu': 'A típusszintű szóbeágyazások ugyanazokat a paramétereket használják egy szó összes példányát, függetlenül annak kontextusától, figyelmen kívül hagyva a nyelvben rejlő lexikai kétértelműséget. Ehelyett a WordNet-ben meghatározott szemantikai fogalmakat (vagy szinkronkészleteket) ágyazunk be, és egy adott kontextusban egy szótokent képviselünk azáltal, hogy becsüljük a releváns szemantikai fogalmak eloszlását. Az új, kontextusérzékeny beágyazásokat egy modellben használjuk az előpozíciós kifejezések (PP) mellékleteinek előrejelzésére, és közösen megismerjük a koncepcióbeágyazásokat és a modellparamétereket. Megmutatjuk, hogy a környezetérzékeny beágyazások alkalmazása 5,4%-os abszolút ponttal javítja a PP rögzítési modell pontosságát, ami 34,4%-os relatív hibacsökkenést jelent.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole a livello di tipo utilizzano lo stesso insieme di parametri per rappresentare tutte le istanze di una parola indipendentemente dal suo contesto, ignorando l'ambiguità lessicale intrinseca nel linguaggio. Invece, incorporamo concetti semantici (o insiemi) come definiti in WordNet e rappresentiamo un token di parola in un particolare contesto stimando una distribuzione su concetti semantici pertinenti. Usiamo i nuovi incorporamenti sensibili al contesto in un modello per predire allegati di frase prepositionale (PP) e impariamo congiuntamente i concetti incorporamenti e parametri del modello. Mostriamo che l'utilizzo di incorporazioni sensibili al contesto migliora l'accuratezza del modello di attacco PP del 5,4% punti assoluti, che equivale a una riduzione relativa degli errori del 34,4%.", 'lt': 'Tipo lygio žodžių įdėjimai naudoja tą patį parametrų rinkinį, kad atspindėtų visus žodžio atvejus, neatsižvelgiant į jo kontekstą, ignoruojant būdingą tekstinį dviprasmiškumą kalboje. Vietoj to įterpiame semantines sąvokas (arba sintezes), kaip apibrėžta WordNet, ir tam tikru kontekstu sudarome žodžio ženklą, vertindami paskirstymą atitinkamoms semantinėms sąvokoms. Naujame naujus kontekstui jautrius įterpimus modelyje, kad būtų galima prognozuoti išankstinę frazę (PP) ir kartu mokytis koncepcijos įterpimo ir modelio parametrų. Mes rodome, kad naudojant kontekstui jautrius įterpimus PP tvirtinimo modelio tikslumas padidėja 5,4 % absoliučiais taškais, o tai reiškia 34,4 % santykinį klaidų mažinimą.', 'kk': 'Түрі деңгейіндегі сөздерді ендіру бір параметрлер жиынын қолданып, оның контекстігіне қарамастыру үшін сөздің барлық инстанцияларын көрсету үшін, тілдегі лексикалық амбикциялығын елемейді. Осының орнына, біз WordNet- де анықталған семантикалық концепцияларды (немесе қадамдастыру) ендіреміз және сөздің белгілі контекстіне белгілі белгілі белгілері үлестірімізді сәйкес семантикалық Біз препозициялық фрейз (PP) тіркемелерін таңдау үшін үлгілерде жаңа, контексті сезімді ендіру үшін қолданып, концепция ендіру мен үлгілер параметрлерін біріктіріп үйренеміз. Біз контексті сезімді ендіру үшін PP тіркемелеу үлгісінің дұрыстығын 5,4% абсолюттік нүктелерімен жасайды, бұл қателерді 34,4% салыстыру үшін.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran perkataan aras-jenis menggunakan set parameter yang sama untuk mewakili semua kejadian perkataan tidak kira-kira konteks, mengabaikan ambiguiti leksikal yang ada dalam bahasa. Sebaliknya, kami memasukkan konsep semantik (atau sinset) seperti ditakrif dalam WordNet dan mewakili token perkataan dalam konteks tertentu dengan menghargai distribusi atas konsep semantik yang relevan. Kami menggunakan penyambungan baru, sensitif-konteks dalam model untuk meramalkan lampiran frasa awal (PP) dan belajar bersama-sama penyambungan konsep dan parameter model. Kami menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan penyambungan sensitif-konteks meningkatkan ketepatan model lampiran PP dengan 5.4% titik mutlak, yang mengandungi pengurangan relatif 34.4% dalam ralat.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањата на зборови на ниво на тип го користат истиот сет параметри за да ги претставуваат сите инстанции на збор без оглед на неговиот контекст, игнорирајќи ја природната лексикална двигурност на јазикот. Наместо тоа, вградивме семантични концепти (или синсети) како што се дефинирани во WordNet и претставуваме зборен знак во одреден контекст со проценка на дистрибуцијата над релевантните семантични концепти. Ние ги користиме новите, контекстно-чувствителни вложувања во модел за предвидување на препозиционалните фрази (ПП) прилози и заедно ги научиме концептовите вложувања и моделните параметри. Ние покажуваме дека употребата на контекстно чувствителни вградувања ја подобрува точноста на моделот на приклучување на ПП за 5,4 отсто апсолутни точки, што изнесува релативно намалување на грешките од 34,4 отсто.', 'ml': 'വാക്കിന്റെ എല്ലാ അവസ്ഥ പ്രതിനിധികളെയും പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി ടൈപ്പ് നില വാക്കുകളുടെ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കൂട് പകരം, വാര്\u200dഡ്നെറ്റില്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ച ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തി (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സിനിസ്റ്ററ്റുകള്\u200d) പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഒരു വാക്ക് പ്രത്യേ പുതിയ, context-sensitive embeddings are used in a model to predict prepositive phrase (PP) attachments and jointly learn the concept embedding and model parameters. നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് പിപി അറ്റാച്മെന്റ് മോഡലിന്റെ കൃത്യം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. 5.4% പിശക് പിശക് തെറ്റുകളില്\u200d 34.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma fil-livell tat-tip jużaw l-istess sett ta’ parametri biex jirrappreżentaw l-istanzi kollha ta’ kelma irrispettivament mill-kuntest tagħha, filwaqt li jinjoraw l-ambigwità lexikali inerenti fil-lingwa. Minflok, a ħna inkorporajna kunċetti semantiċi (jew sinsetts) kif definiti f’WordNet u jirrappreżentaw sinjal tal-kelma f’kuntest partikolari billi nistmaw distribuzzjoni fuq kunċetti semantiċi rilevanti. Aħna nużaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet ġodda u sensittivi għall-kuntest f’mudell għat-tbassir tal-annessi tal-frażi prepożizzjonali (PP) u flimkien nitgħallmu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kunċett u l-parametri tal-mudell. Aħna nuru li l-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet sensittivi għall-kuntest itejjeb il-preċiżjoni tal-mudell tat-twaħħil tal-PP b’5.4% punti assoluti, li jammonta għal tnaqqis relattiv ta’ 34.4% fl-iżbalji.', 'mn': 'Түрийн түвшин үгний нэмж нь хэл дээр бүх үгний тохиолдлыг харуулахын тулд адилхан параметрлүүдийг ашигладаг. Үүний оронд бид WordNet-д тодорхойлогдсон semantic ойлголтыг (эсвэл синсетүүд) оруулж, тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой үг тодорхойлолтой байдаг. Бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөх хэлбэрийг (PP) таамаглах үед шинэ, контекст мэдрэмжтэй холбогдолтыг ашиглаж, ойлголтын холбогдол болон загварын параметрлүүдийг нийлбэрээр сурах үед загвар ашиг Бид контекст мэдрэмжтэй холбогдолтыг ашиглах нь PP холбогдолтын загварын тодорхойлолтыг 5.4% абсолют цэгээр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Энэ нь алдааны харьцангуй 34.4% багасгалттай байна.', 'no': 'Type-nivåinnbygging brukar samme sett av parametrar for å representera alle instansar av eit ord uavhengig av konteksten, utan å ignorera den innhaldne leksiske ambiguitet i språk. I staden innebyr vi semantiske konseptar (eller synsettar) som definert i WordNet og representerer eit ordteikn i eit bestemt kontekst ved å estimere ein distribusjon over relevante semantiske konseptar. Vi brukar dei nye, kontekstsensitivle innbygginga i eit modell for å foregå vedlegga til prepositional frase (PP) og lære samanlikna konseptinnbygginga og modeller. Vi viser at med kontekstsensitiv innbygging forbedrar nøyaktigheten av PP-vedleggmodellen med 5,4 % absolutt punkt, som er relativt reduksjon av feil i 34,4 %.', 'pl': 'Osadzania słów na poziomie typu używają tego samego zestawu parametrów, aby reprezentować wszystkie wystąpienia słowa niezależnie od jego kontekstu, ignorując nieodłączną dwuznaczność leksykaliczną w języku. Zamiast tego osadzamy koncepcje semantyczne (lub zestawy syntetyczne) zdefiniowane w WordNet i reprezentujemy token słowa w określonym kontekście, szacując rozkład nad odpowiednimi koncepcjami semantycznymi. Wykorzystujemy nowe, kontekstowo wrażliwe osadzenia w modelu do przewidywania załączników fraz przyimkowych (PP) i wspólnie uczymy się osadzeń koncepcyjnych i parametrów modelu. Pokazujemy, że zastosowanie kontekstowych osadzeń poprawia dokładność modelu załączeń PP o 5,4% punktów absolutnych, co oznacza 34,4% względną redukcję błędów.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte la nivel de tip utilizează același set de parametri pentru a reprezenta toate instanțele unui cuvânt indiferent de contextul său, ignorând ambiguitatea lexicală inerentă în limbaj. În schimb, încorporăm concepte semantice (sau sinoteuri) așa cum sunt definite în WordNet și reprezentăm un token de cuvânt într-un anumit context prin estimarea unei distribuții asupra conceptelor semantice relevante. Utilizăm noile încorporări sensibile la context într-un model pentru predicția atașamentelor de frază prepozițională (PP) și învățăm împreună încorporările conceptului și parametrii modelului. Aratăm că utilizarea încorporărilor sensibile la context îmbunătățește acuratețea modelului de atașare PP cu 5,4% puncte absolute, ceea ce reprezintă o reducere relativă de 34,4% a erorilor.', 'si': 'Type- level word Embdings use the Same set of Parametrics to reposite all cases of a word irreparable of its Contexts, neglecting the inhibited lexicality in language. වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි WordNet වල සෙමැන්ටික් සංවේදනය (නැත්තම් සංවේදනය) සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචන ටොකෙන් විශේෂ සංවේදනයෙන් විතරය Name අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්', 'so': 'Isku isticmaala heer-heer isku mid ah si ay u representaan dhammaan instances oo hadal, haba kastoo ay ku jirto mukhtadiisa, iskaga tagto dhaqdhaqaalaha leksikarka ee gudaha ah oo luuqada ku qoran. Waxan badalkeeda ku qornay fikrada semantika (ama synetiyada) oo ku qoran WordNet, waxaynu representnay calaamad ka mid ah qoraal gaar ah, waxaana qiimeynay qayb ka gaar ah fikrada semantika. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa noocyada cusub oo ku qoran qaababka, si aan u sii sheegno isku xiriirka hore (PP) oo aan si wadajir ah u barno qalabka midibka iyo midibka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in isticmaalka qalabka xilsaarka ah uu kordhiyo saxda sameynta sameynta PP oo ku qoran 5.4 boqolkiiba oo kamid ah, kaas oo ah 34.4 boqolkiiba hoos u dhigashada qaladka.', 'sr': 'Uveštavanje reèi na nivou tipa koriste isti set parametara kako bi predstavljali sve instancije reèi bez obzira na njegov kontekst, ignorirajuæi inherentu leksièku ambiguitet na jeziku. Umjesto toga, uključujemo semantičke koncepte (ili sinteze) kao što je definisano u WordNetu i predstavljamo znak riječi u određenom kontekstu procjenjivanjem distribucije nad relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Koristimo nove, kontekstske osetljive integracije u modelu za predviđanje prepositionalne fraze (PP) attachments i zajedno naučimo koncept integracije i modelne parametre. Pokazujemo da korištenje kontekstskih osetljivih integracija poboljšava tačnost model a pridruživanja PP-a za 5,4% apsolutnih tačka, što je iznosilo relativno smanjenje grešaka 34,4%.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar på typnivå använder samma uppsättning parametrar för att representera alla instanser av ett ord oavsett dess sammanhang, bortsett från den inneboende lexikala tvetydigheten i språket. Istället bäddar vi in semantiska begrepp (eller synuppsättningar) som definieras i WordNet och representerar en ordtoken i ett visst sammanhang genom att uppskatta en fördelning över relevanta semantiska begrepp. Vi använder de nya kontextkänsliga inbäddningarna i en modell för att förutsäga prepositionsfrasbilagor (PP) och lär oss gemensamt konceptinbäddningar och modellparametrar. Vi visar att användningen av kontextkänsliga inbäddningar förbättrar noggrannheten hos PP-fästesmodellen med 5,4% absoluta punkter, vilket motsvarar en relativ minskning av felen med 34,4%.', 'ta': 'வகை- மட்டத்தின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் ஒரே அளபுருக்களை பயன்படுத்தி வார்த்தையின் அனைத்து நிகழ்வுகளையும் குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு, மொழியில் உள்ளமைப்பு லெ பதிலாக, நாங்கள் வார்ட்நெட்டில் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு சொல் குறியீட்டை குறிப்பிட்ட சூழ்நிலையில் குறிப்பிட்ட ஒரு சொல்லை குறியீட்டை க நாம் புதிய, சூழல் உணர்வுடைய உள்ளீடுகளை மாதிரியில் பயன்படுத்தி முன்னேற்ற சொற்றொடர்( PP) இணைப்புகளை முன்விருப்பத்திற்கு பயன்படுத்தி பு 5.4% முழுமையான புள்ளிகளால் PP இணைப்பு மாதிரியின் சரியை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, அதாவது 34.4% பிழைகளின் சார்ந்த குறைவு.', 'ur': 'Type-level word embedding uses the same set of parameters to represent all instances of a word regardless of its context, ignoring the inherent lexical ambiguity in language. اس عوض، ہم سیمانٹیکی نظریں (یا سینسٹ) کو جسے WordNet میں مقرر کیا گیا ہے (یا سینسٹ) جمع کرتے ہیں اور ایک مخصوص کنٹنسٹ میں ایک کلمات ٹوکنے کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں، ایک تقسیم کے ذریعہ مطابق سیمانٹیکی نظریں پر تقسیم کرتی ہیں ہم نے ایک موڈل میں نئی، کنٹنسیٹ-سنسیٹی ایمبڈینگ (PP) اٹیٹمنٹ کی پیش آنے کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے اور مشترک طریقے میں مہینڈینگ اور موڈل پارامیٹر کی تعلیم لیتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ پی پی پی اٹیٹمنٹ موڈل کی دقیقیت کو 5.4% مطلق پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ مزید ترجیح دیتا ہے جو 34.4% کی نسبتی خطا کے ذریعہ ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz WordNetda aniqlangan semantik g'oyalarni (yoki synetiyalarni) qo'yib keldik va ma'lum bir so'zning signalini hisoblash mumkin va bog'liq semantik g'oyalarini tasavvur qilish mumkin. Biz yangi, context-sensitive birikmalarni birinchi prepositive lugʻatni oldingan so'zlardan foydalanamiz va birlashtirish uchun foydalanish imkoniyatini koʻpaytirish va model parametrlarini o'rganamiz. Биз кўрсатамиз, контектор sensitive мосламаларидан фойдаланиб, 5.4% муносибат нуқтаи билан PP замимот модели аниқ мосламаларини яхшироқда кўрсатади, у 34.4% хатоларига нисбатан камайтиришдир.", 'vi': "Những từ ngữ nhúng trong kiểu dùng cùng một nhóm các tham số để đại diện mọi trường hợp của một từ bất kể ngữ cảnh nó xảy ra, lờ mờ ngôn ngữ của nó. Thay vào đó, chúng ta cấy các khái niệm theo ngữ nghĩa (hay các cấu trúc) như được xác định trong WordNet và tạo ra một biểu tượng từ trong một trường hợp cụ thể bằng cách ước giá phân phối các khái niệm ngữ pháp liên quan. Chúng tôi sử dụng sự nhúng vào trường nhạy cảm mới trong một mô hình để dự đoán các tập tin về cụm từ'PP', và cùng nhau học sự gắn bó khái niệm và các thông số mô hình. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sử dụng sự nhúng vào nhạy cảm trong ngữ cảnh cải thiện độ chính xác của mô hình đính PP với 5.4. Các điểm tuyệt đối, có nghĩa là 34.4. Sự giảm lỗi tương đối.", 'bg': 'Вградените думи на ниво тип използват един и същ набор от параметри, за да представят всички случаи на дадена дума, независимо от контекста й, игнорирайки присъщата лексикална двусмисленост в езика. Вместо това вграждаме семантични понятия (или синсети), както са дефинирани в WordNet и представляваме словен символ в конкретен контекст чрез оценка на разпределение върху съответните семантични понятия. Използваме новите, чувствителни към контекста вграждания в модел за прогнозиране на прикачени фрази (ПП) и съвместно научаваме вгражданията на концепцията и параметрите на модела. Показваме, че използването на чувствителни към контекста вграждания подобрява точността на модела на закрепване с 5,4% абсолютни точки, което представлява 34,4% относително намаляване на грешките.', 'nl': 'Woordinsluitingen op typeniveau gebruiken dezelfde set parameters om alle exemplaren van een woord weer te geven, ongeacht de context ervan, waarbij de inherente lexicale ambiguïteit in de taal wordt genegeerd. In plaats daarvan insluiten we semantische concepten (of synsets) zoals gedefinieerd in WordNet en vertegenwoordigen we een woordtoken in een bepaalde context door een verdeling over relevante semantische concepten te schatten. We gebruiken de nieuwe, contextgevoelige inbeddings in een model voor het voorspellen van bijlagen met voorzetsels (PP) en leren gezamenlijk de conceptinbeddings en modelparameters. We laten zien dat het gebruik van contextgevoelige embeddings de nauwkeurigheid van het PP attachment model verbetert met 5,4% absolute punten, wat neerkomt op een 34,4% relatieve vermindering van fouten.', 'hr': 'Učvršćenja riječi na nivou tipa koriste isti niz parametara kako bi predstavljali sve slučajeve riječi bez obzira na njegov kontekst, ignorirajući inherentu leksičku nesposobnost na jeziku. Umjesto toga, ugrađujemo semantičke koncepte (ili sinteze) kako je definirano u WordNetu i predstavljamo znak riječi u određenom kontekstu procjenjivanjem distribucije nad relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Koristimo nove, osjetljive kontekstske integracije u modelu za predviđanje priključenih prepositionalnih fraza (PP) i zajedno naučimo koncept integracija i modelne parametre. Pokazujemo da koristeći kontekstski osjetljive integracije poboljšava preciznost model a priključenja PP-a za 5,4% apsolutne to čke, što je odnosno smanjenje grešaka iznosilo 34,4%.', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer på typeniveau bruger det samme sæt parametre til at repræsentere alle forekomster af et ord uanset dets kontekst, og ignorerer den iboende leksikske tvetydighed i sproget. I stedet integrerer vi semantiske begreber (eller synsets) som defineret i WordNet og repræsenterer et ordtoken i en bestemt kontekst ved at estimere en fordeling over relevante semantiske begreber. Vi bruger de nye, kontekstfølsomme indlejringer i en model til at forudsige præpositionssætninger (PP) vedhæftede filer og lærer i fællesskab konceptindlejringer og modelparametre. Vi viser, at anvendelse af kontekstfølsomme indlejringer forbedrer nøjagtigheden af PP fastgørelsesmodellen med 5,4% absolutte punkter, hvilket svarer til en relativ reduktion på 34,4% i fejl.', 'ko': '유형급 단어는 같은 매개 변수 집합을 사용하여 단어의 모든 실례를 표시하지만, 상하문이 어떻든지 간에 언어의 고유한 어휘의 잘못된 뜻을 무시한다.반대로 WordNet에서 정의한 의미 개념(또는 문법집)을 삽입하고 관련 의미 개념의 분포를 추정하여 특정 상하문에 있는 단어 표기를 나타낸다.우리는 예측 개사단어(PP) 부속품의 모델에 새로운 상하문 민감한 삽입을 사용하고 개념 삽입과 모델 파라미터를 공동으로 학습한다.우리는 상하문 민감한 삽입을 사용하여 PP애착 모델의 정확도를 5.4%의 절대치로 높인 것을 발견했다. 이것은 상대적으로 34.4%의 오류를 감소한 것과 같다.', 'id': 'Penampilan kata tingkat-tipe menggunakan set parameter yang sama untuk mewakili semua instansi dari kata tidak peduli konteks, mengabaikan ambiguitas lexik yang ada dalam bahasa. Sebaliknya, kami memasukkan konsep semantis (atau sinset) seperti yang didefinisikan dalam WordNet dan mewakili kata token dalam konteks tertentu dengan memperkirakan distribusi atas konsep semantis relevan. Kami menggunakan penerbangan baru, sensitif-konteks dalam model untuk memprediksi lampiran frasa preposisional (PP) dan bersama-sama belajar konsep penerbangan dan parameter model. Kami menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan penerbangan yang sensitif konteks meningkatkan akurasi model lampiran PP dengan 5,4% titik mutlak, yang berarti 34,4% relative reduksi kesalahan.', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen auf Typebene verwenden denselben Satz von Parametern, um alle Instanzen eines Wortes unabhängig von seinem Kontext darzustellen, wobei die inhärente lexikalische Mehrdeutigkeit in der Sprache ignoriert wird. Stattdessen betten wir semantische Konzepte (oder Synsets) wie in WordNet definiert ein und repräsentieren ein Worttoken in einem bestimmten Kontext, indem wir eine Verteilung über relevante semantische Konzepte schätzen. Wir nutzen die neuen, kontextsensitiven Einbettungen in ein Modell zur Vorhersage von Präpositional Phrase (PP)-Anhängen und lernen gemeinsam die Konzepteinbettungen und Modellparameter kennen. Wir zeigen, dass die Verwendung kontextsensitiver Einbettungen die Genauigkeit des PP-Befestigungsmodells um 5,4% Absolutpunkte verbessert, was auf eine 34,4% relative Fehlerreduktion hinausläuft.', 'sw': 'Vilezo vinavyoingia viwango vinatumia seti moja ya parameters kuwakilisha matukio yote ya neno bila kujali muktadha wake, na kusahaulisha ubaguzi wa kiwango kinachoendelea kwa lugha. Badala yake, tuliweka mawazo ya kimapenzi (au syneti) kama ilivyoelezwa kwenye mtandao wa WordNet na kuwakilisha alama ya neno katika muktadha maalum kwa kudhani usambazaji wa dhana za kimapenzi. Tunatumia vifaa vipya vya muktadha wenye hisia katika mtindo wa kutabiri vipengele vizuri (PP) na kwa pamoja kujifunza vipengele vya dhana na vipimo vya mifano. Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia vifaa vya mazingira vinavyojisitia vizuri vinaweza kuongeza uhakika wa muundo wa uangalizi wa PP kwa asilimia 5.4 yenye pointi muhimu, ambayo in a asilimia 34.4 yenye uchunguzi wa makosa.', 'fa': 'ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای سطح نوع از یک مجموعه پارامتر استفاده می\u200cکنند تا همه نمایش\u200cدهندگان یک کلمه بی\u200cنظیر از محیط آن را نشان دهند، نادیده\u200cای از غیرقابل زبان زبان است. به جای این، ما مفهوم\u200cهای semantic (یا synsets) را به عنوان توصیف در WordNet وارد می\u200cکنیم و یک نشان کلمه را در یک محیط خاصی با ارزیابی یک توزیع بر روی مفهوم\u200cهای semantic مربوط به تعریف می\u200cکنیم. ما از ابتدایی جدید، احساسات محیط در یک مدل استفاده می کنیم برای پیش بینی از ابتدایی\u200cهای عبارت شناسایی (PP) و با همدیگر یاد بگیریم ابتدایی\u200cها و پارامترهای مدل. ما نشان می دهیم که با استفاده از پیوند\u200cهای حساس محیط دقیق مدل پیوند PP با نقطه\u200cهای کامل 5.4 درصد بهتر می\u200cشود، که کاهش نسبت به 34.4 درصد اشتباه است.', 'af': "Tipe- vlak woord inbêding gebruik dieselfde stel van parameters om alle voorbeelde van 'n woord ongeag van sy konteks te verteenwoord, wat die inherende leksiese onbedienheid in taal ignoreer. In plaas, ons inbêer semantiese konsepte (of sinstellings) soos gedefinieerd in WordNet en voorstel 'n woord token in 'n bepaalde konteks deur 'n verspreiding oor relevante semantiese konsepte te vurdering. Ons gebruik die nuwe, konteks- sensitiewe inbêdings in 'n model vir voorskou preposeesionele frase (Ppp) aanhangsels en bymekaar leer die konsepte inbêdings en model parameters. Ons wys dat gebruik van konteks-sensitiewe inbêdings verbeter die presies van die Ppp aanhegsel model deur 5.4% absolutiese punte, wat betaal tot 'n 34.4% relatiewe reduksie in foute.", 'sq': 'Ndërtesat e fjalëve të nivelit të llojit përdorin të njëjtin set parametrash për të përfaqësuar të gjitha rastet e një fjale pavarësisht nga konteksti i saj, duke injoruar ambigurinë lexike në gjuhë. Në vend të kësaj, ne përfshijmë koncepte semantike (apo sinset) siç janë përcaktuar në WordNet dhe përfaqësojmë një fjalë token në një kontekst të veçantë duke vlerësuar një shpërndarje mbi konceptet semantike të rëndësishme. Ne përdorim përfshirjet e reja, të ndjeshme nga konteksti në një model për parashikimin e lidhjeve të frazës parapozitive (PP) dhe mësojmë së bashku përfshirjet e konceptit dhe parametrat e modelit. Ne tregojmë se përdorimi i përfshirjeve të ndjeshme nga konteksti përmirëson saktësinë e modelit të lidhjes me PP me 5.4% pikë absolute, gjë që shkon në një reduktim relativ 34.4% të gabimeve.', 'am': 'የቃላት ምርጫዎች ምንም እንኳ አይደሉም፡፡ በፋንታ፣ በWordNet የተዘጋጀውን (ወይም Synsets) የsemantic ሐሳብ (ወይም Synsets) እና በተለየ የቃላት ምልክት በተለየ ክፍል እና በተለየ የsemantic አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ መክፈቻን በመቆጠር ነው፡፡ አዲስ፣ የሥርዓት አስተያየት አካባቢ አካባቢዎች እና ምርጫዎችን ለመቀበል እና የዓይነት አካባቢ እና ማርናለን፡፡ የPP ምርጫዎች አካሄዱን በመጠቀም የሚያሳየው 5.4 በመቶ ተሳሳተ ስህተት የሚያሳድገውን የPP ምርጫዎች አካሄዱን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'tr': "Sahypa düzümleri sözleriň içinde bir sözleriň ähli ýagdaýyny a ňlamak üçin ullanýar, sözleriň içinde ahyry faýllary ýok etmek üçin ullanýar. Yýene ol ýere semantik düşünjüleri WordNet'e tanyşdyrylýar we möhüm semantik düşünjülerine paýlaşmak üçin bir söz tokeni takyklaýar. Biz täze, kontekst hassasiyetli baglaýyşlary (PP) baglaýyşlary önlemek üçin bir nusga içine ullanýarys we concept integrlerini we modellerini öwrenýäris. Biz Kontekst hasaplanyşy içinde PP dalaşma nusgynyň dogrylygyny 5.4% Absolut nokatlaryna eňleýändigini görkeýäris. Bu 34.4% ýalňyşlygyň düşürmegine deňleýändigini görkeýäris.", 'az': "Səviyyə sözləri istifadə edir ki, hər bir sözlərin məlumatlarını təsdiqləmək üçün eyni parametrlərin quruluğunu istifadə edərlər, dildə təsdiqlənmək üçün hər bir sözün məlumatlarını təsdiqləyirlər. Bunun yerinə, WordNet'də tanımlanmış semantik fikirləri (ya da sinsets) yerləşdiririk və mövcud semantik fikirlərin üstündə dağıtılışını hesablayaraq bir söz tokeni göstəririk. Biz yeni, context-sensitive inbingləri bir modellərdə prepositional phrase (PP) bağlantılarını təmin etmək üçün istifadə edirik və birlikdə koncepcija inbinglərini və modellərini öyrənirik. Biz göstəririk ki, context-sensitive inbingləri istifadə edərək PP bağlama model in in doğruluğunu 5.4% absolut nöqtələrindən daha yaxşılaşdırır, bu da xətaların 34.4% sayısına bağlı düşürməsidir.", 'bs': 'Učvršćenja riječi na nivou tipa koriste isti niz parametara kako bi predstavljali sve slučajeve riječi bez obzira na njegov kontekst, ignorirajući inherentu leksičku nesposobnost na jeziku. Umjesto toga, ugrađujemo semantičke koncepte (ili sinteze) kao što je definisano u WordNetu i predstavljamo znak riječi u određenom kontekstu procjenjivanjem distribucije nad relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Koristimo nove, osjetljive integracije konteksta u modelu za predviđanje dodatka prepositionalne fraze (PP) i zajedno naučimo koncept integracije i modelne parametre. Pokazujemo da korištenje kontekstskih osjetljivih ugrađenja poboljšava preciznost model a priključenja PP-a za 5,4% apsolutnih to čka, što je iznosilo relativno smanjenje grešaka 34,4%.', 'bn': 'টাইপ- স্তরের শব্দ ব্যবহার করে একটি শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য একই সেট ব্যবহার করে তার প্রতিনিধিত্বের সকল ইনসেন্টেম প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, ভাষা তার পরিবর্তে আমরা ওয়ার্ডনেটে নির্ধারিত সেমেন্টিক ধারণা (বা সিনেট) ব্যবহার করেছি এবং বিশেষ প্রেক্ষিতে একটি শব্দ চিহ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছি য আমরা নতুন, কন্টেক্সটেন্ট-সেন্সিটিভ ভ ভাবে ব্যবহার করি একটি মডেলে প্রিপটিভাল বাক্যারের (পিপি) সংযুক্তি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য এবং সাথে যু আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পিপি সংযুক্ত মডেলের সঠিকভাবে ব্যবহার করে ৫.', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules de nivell tipus utilitzen el mateix conjunt de paràmetres per representar totes les instances d'una paraula independentment del seu context, ignorant l'ambigüitat lexical inherent en el llenguatge. En comptes d'això, incorporem conceptes semàntics (o sinsets) definits a WordNet i representem una paraula fitxa en un context particular estimant una distribució sobre conceptes semàntics pertinents. Utilitzem les noves incorporacions sensibles al context en un model per predir els anexos de frases prepositives (PP) i aprenem conjuntament els conceptes incorporacions i paràmetres del model. Mostrem que utilitzar incorporacions sensibles al contexte millora la precisió del model d'adhesió PP en un 5,4% de punts absoluts, que representa una reducció relativa del 34,4% dels errors.", 'cs': 'Vložení slov na úrovni typu používají stejnou sadu parametrů pro reprezentaci všech instancí slova bez ohledu na jeho kontext a ignorují inherentní lexikální nejednoznačnost v jazyce. Namísto toho vkládáme sémantické koncepty (nebo synsety) definované ve WordNet a reprezentujeme slovní token v konkrétním kontextu odhadem distribuce nad relevantními sémantickými koncepty. Využíváme nové kontextově citlivé vložení do modelu pro predikci příloh předložené fráze (PP) a společně se učíme koncept vložení a parametry modelu. Ukazujeme, že použití kontextově citlivých vložení zlepšuje přesnost modelu PP přílohy o 5,4% absolutních bodů, což znamená 34,4% relativní snížení chyb.', 'fi': 'Tyyppitason sanaupotukset käyttävät samoja parametreja esittääkseen sanan kaikkia esiintymiä kontekstista riippumatta, jättäen huomiotta kielen luontaisen sanamuodon epäselvyyden. Sen sijaan upotamme WordNetissä määritellyt semanttiset käsitteet (tai synsetit) ja edustamme sanamerkkiä tietyssä kontekstissa arvioimalla jakauman relevantteihin semanttisiin käsitteisiin. Käytämme uusia kontekstitiivisiä upotuksia prepositiivisten lauseiden (PP) liitteiden ennustamiseen ja opimme yhdessä konseptin upotuksia ja malliparametreja. Osoitamme, että kontekstitiivisten upotusten käyttö parantaa PP-kiinnitysmallin tarkkuutta 5,4% absoluuttisella pisteellä, mikä merkitsee 34,4% suhteellista virhevähennystä.', 'et': 'Tüübi tasemel sõna manustamisel kasutatakse sama parameetrite kogumit, et esindada sõna kõiki eksemplare sõltumata selle kontekstist, ignoreerides keelele omast leksikaalset ebaselgust. Selle asemel lisame WordNetis määratletud semantilised kontseptsioonid (või sünkroonid) ja esindame sõnamärki konkreetses kontekstis, hinnates jaotust asjakohaste semantiliste kontseptsioonide üle. Kasutame uusi kontekstitundlikke manuseid mudelis prepositsioonifraasi (PP) manuste ennustamiseks ning õpime ühiselt kontseptsiooni manuseid ja mudeli parameetreid. Näitame, et kontekstitundlike manustamiste kasutamine parandab PP kinnitusmudeli täpsust 5,4% absoluutpunkti võrra, mis tähendab vigade suhtelist vähenemist 34,4%.', 'hy': 'Տիպի մակարդակի բառերի ներգրավումները օգտագործում են նույն պարամետրերի համակարգը բառի բոլոր օրինակների ներկայացնելու համար անկախ դրա կոնտեքստից, անտեսելով լեզվի բնորոշ լեքսիկական անհավասարությունը: Փոխարենը, մենք ներառում ենք WordNet-ում սահմանափակված սեմանտիկ գաղափարներ (կամ սինսետներ) և ներկայացնում ենք մի բառի նշան որոշակի կոնտեքստում, գնահատելով բաշխման հարաբեր սեմանտիկ գաղափարների վրա: Մենք օգտագործում ենք նոր, կոնտեքստի զգայուն ներդրումները մոդելի մեջ, որպեսզի կանխատեսենք նախադիր արտահայտությունների (PP) կապերը և միասին սովորենք գաղափարը ներդրումներ և մոդելի պարամետրեր: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ օգտագործելով կոնտեքստի զգայուն ներդրումները բարելավում է PP կապվածության մոդելի ճշմարտությունը 5.4 տոկոսով բացարձակ կետերով, ինչը նշանակում է սխալների համեմատական կրճատում 34.4 տոկոսով:', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness lah Awak dhéwé nggambar aturan anyar, contextual-jutir embedding in un model kanggo urêhadung nggawe barang pregunte (PP) seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang kelompok embedding lan model parameters. Awak dhéwé menehi wong-wong iki ngono akeh sampeyan kontext-Sensitif luwih nêmêr kesempatan kanggo nambah sing nambah gerarané PP iki ning 5.4% dipun absolute, sing nambah 34.4% nambah akeh langgar uwong.', 'sk': 'Vgradnje besed na ravni tipa uporabljajo isti nabor parametrov za predstavitev vseh primerov besede ne glede na njen kontekst, pri čemer ne upoštevajo neločljive leksikalne dvoumnosti v jeziku. Namesto tega vključimo semantične koncepte (ali sindike), kot so opredeljeni v WordNetu, in predstavljamo besedni žeton v določenem kontekstu z oceno porazdelitve nad relevantnimi semantičnimi koncepti. Uporabljamo nove, kontekstno občutljive vdelave v model za napovedovanje prilog za predpozicijske fraze (PP) in skupaj učimo vdelave koncepta in parametre modela. Pokazali smo, da uporaba kontekstno občutljivih vdelav izboljša natančnost modela pritrditve PP za 5,4% absolutnih točk, kar pomeni 34,4% relativno zmanjšanje napak.', 'he': 'תוכניות מילים ברמה מסוג משתמשות באותו קבוצה של פרמטרים כדי לייצג את כל מקרים של מילה ללא קשר, מתעלמות מהסביבות הלקסית הנכונה בשפה. במקום זה, אנו מכניסים מושגים סמנטיים (או סינסטים) כפי שהגדרים ב WordNet ומייצגים מילה סימן בקשר מסוים על ידי הערכה של פיצוץ על מושגים סמנטיים רלוונטיים. אנחנו משתמשים בתכניות חדשות, רגישות לקונקסט במודל לחזות ביטוי מוקדם (PP) קשרים וללמד ביחד את התכניות הקונקסט ופרמטרים מודל. אנו מראים שהשימוש בתכניות רגישות לקונקסט משפר את מדויקתו של מודל הקשור PP על 5.4% נקודות מוחלטות, מה שמשווה להפחית יחסית של 34.4% בטעויות.', 'ha': '@ label: listbox Ga bayansa, mun sami zato na semantic (ko syntsettu) kamar an bayyana a cikin WDNet kuma muka ƙayyade wata alama na magana a cikin muhimmada da aka ƙaddara rabon zafi masu hushi. Tuna amfani da masu haɗi da ke cikin wani misali dõmin ka yi bashiri ga fanatin halaiki na farko (PP) kuma mu sami karanta zaɓen da aka shigar da shi cikin zauren da tsohon misalin ayuka. Tuna nũna cewa, idan ana amfani da shirin kayan aiki mai aikin haɗi da shi, zai ƙara tsari na shirin PP da 5.4% na cikakken pointi, da kuma yana kasancewa a ƙara cikin ɓata na 34.4%.', 'bo': 'Type-level word embeddings use the same set of parameters to represent all instances of a word regardless of its context, ignoring the inherent lexical ambiguity in language. Instead, we embed semantic concepts (or synsets) as defined in WordNet and represent a word token in a particular context by estimating a distribution over relevant semantic concepts. We use the new, context-sensitive embeddings in a model for predicting prepositional phrase (PP) attachments and jointly learn the concept embeddings and model parameters. ང་ཚོས་ཁོར་ཡུག'}
{'en': 'Identifying 1950s American Jazz Musicians : Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'ar': 'تحديد موسيقيي الجاز الأمريكيين في الخمسينيات من القرن الماضي: استخراج IsA ذو الحبيبات الدقيقة عبر تكوين معدل', 'pt': 'Identificando músicos de jazz americanos da década de 1950: extração de IsA refinada via composição modificadora', 'fr': 'Identification des musiciens de jazz américains des années 1950\xa0: extraction iSA fine via une composition modificatrice', 'es': 'Identificación de los músicos de jazz estadounidenses de la década de 1950: extracción de ISA de grano fino mediante composición modificadora', 'ja': '1950年代のアメリカン・ジャズ・ミュージシャンのアイデンティティ：モディファイア作曲によるファイングレインISA抽出', 'zh': '识 20 世纪 50 年代之美国爵士音乐家:饰中细粒度者 IsA 取', 'hi': '1950 के दशक के अमेरिकी जैज संगीतकारों की पहचान: संशोधक रचना के माध्यम से ठीक दानेदार ISA निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Идентификация американских джазовых музыкантов 1950-х годов: тонкозернистая экстракция Isa через композицию модификатора', 'ga': 'Ceoltóirí Snagcheoil Mheiriceá ó na 1950idí a Aithint: Eastóscadh IsA Mínghlanta trí Chomhdhéanamh Mionathraithe', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση Αμερικανών μουσικών τζαζ του 50ου αιώνα: Εκχύλισμα λεπτόκοκκου μέσω Σύνθεσης Τροποποιητή', 'hu': 'Az 1950-es amerikai jazz zen챕szek azonos챠t찼sa: finom szem킥 IsA kivon찼s m처dos챠t처 kompoz챠ci처val', 'ka': '1950 წლის ამერიკანეთის ჯაზი მუსიციელების განსაზღვრება: კონფიგურაციის გამოყენება IsA', 'lt': '50-ojo dešimtmečio amerikiečių džazo muzikantų identifikavimas: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'it': "Identificare musicisti jazz americani degli anni '50: estrazione di IsA a grana fine tramite composizione modificatrice", 'mk': 'Идентификување на американските џез музичари од 1950-тите: фино-зелена излез од ISA преку модификатор композиција', 'ms': 'Identifying 1950s American Jazz Musicians: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'mt': 'Identifying 1950s American Jazz Musicians: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'mn': '1950-аад оны Америкийн жаз хөгжмийн хөгжмийн тодорхойлолт: Салбарчлагчдын төлөө зохион IsA-г нэмэгдүүлэх', 'kk': '1950 жылдардың американдық жаз музыкаларын анықтау: Жақсы түрлі IsA тарқатуы өзгертуші композициясы арқылы', 'ml': '1950s അമേരിക്കന്\u200d ജാസ്സ് സംഗീതകികളെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു: മോഡിഫയര്\u200d കമ്പോണ്\u200dട്രേഷന്\u200d മുഖേന നല്ല ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ', 'ro': 'Identificarea muzicienilor americani de jazz din anii 1950: extracție fină a IsA prin compoziție modificatoare', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja amerykańskich muzyków jazzowych 50-tych: drobnoziarnista ekstrakcja Isa poprzez kompozycję modyfikującą', 'sr': 'Identifikovanje 1950-ih američkih jazz muzičara: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'so': 'IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'si': '1950 දී ඇමරිකානු ජාස් සංගීතකයෝ අඳුන්නන්: Fine-Graine IsA Extraction by Modifier compososition', 'ur': '1950 کی آمریکایی جاز موسیقی کرنے والوں کو پہچان رہا ہے: اچھا گرینڈ اسا اخراج', 'no': 'Identifiserer amerikanske Jazz-musikarar i 1950: Fine-grensert IsA-utpakking via Modifier-komponent', 'sv': 'Identifiera 1950-talets amerikanska jazzmusiker: Finkornig IsA extraktion via Modifier Composition', 'ta': '1950s அமெரிக்க ஜாஸ் இசையல்களை அடையாளம் கொண்டுள்ளது: மாற்றியமைப்பு மூலம் நன்றாக பிரித்த இஸ்ஏ வெளியேற்றம்', 'vi': 'Xác định các họa sĩ nhạc jazz người Mỹ 1950s:', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на американски джаз музиканти от 50-те години на миналия век: извличане на фино зърнеста АСА чрез модификаторна композиция', 'hr': 'Identificiranje 1950-ih američkih jazz muzičara: izvlačenje lijepog građenog IsA putem kompozicije modifikatora', 'da': "Identificering 1950'ernes amerikanske jazzmusikere: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition", 'nl': 'Amerikaanse jazzmuzikanten uit de jaren vijftig: fijnkorrelige Isa-extractie via modifier compositie', 'de': 'Amerikanische Jazzmusiker der 1950er Jahre identifizieren: Feinkörnige Isa-Extraktion über Modifier Composition', 'ko': '1950년대 미국 재즈 뮤지션 식별: 수식 성분을 통해 세립도 추출 IsA', 'sw': 'Kutambua wanamuziki wa Kimarekani wa Jazz 1950: Utoa wa IsA kwa vizuri kupitia Composition ya Mabadiliko', 'id': 'Identifikasi Musisi Jazz Amerika tahun 1950-an: Ekstraksi IsA-Grained Fine melalui Komposisi Modifier', 'tr': '1950-nji ýyllarda Amerikanyň Jazz Müzisyenlerini tanyşdyrylýar: Taýýarlanýan IsA Çikgi', 'fa': 'شناسایی موسیقی\u200cهای جاز آمریکایی ۱۹۵۰: اخراج IsA از طریق ترکیب تغییردهنده', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i muzikantëve amerikanë të xhazit të viteve 1950: Ekstraktimi i IsA-së së Granit të Mirë nëpërmjet Kompozimit Modifikues', 'am': '1950s አሜሪካውያን ያዚ ሙዚቃውያንን ለማግኘት: በሞዲፊር አካውንት የተቀረጸ የይሳ አውጣ', 'hy': '1950-ականներին Ամերիկյան ջազի երաժիշտների հայտնաբերումը. Fine-Grated ISA extraction', 'af': 'Identifikasie van 1950-te Amerikaanse Jazz Musiekers: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'ca': 'Identificar els músics americans de jazz de la dècada de 1950: Fine-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'bn': '১৯৫০ সালের আমেরিকান জ্যাজ সঙ্গীতের পরিচয় চিহ্নিত করা হচ্ছে: মডিফার কম্পোজিশনের মাধ্যমে ভালো গ্রেন্ড আইসা এক্সট্', 'cs': 'Identifikace amerických jazzových hudebníků padesátých let: jemnozrnná extrakce Isa pomocí modifikátoru kompozice', 'fi': '1950-luvun amerikkalaisten jazzmuusikoiden tunnistaminen: hienojyväinen Isa-poisto modifier-sävellyksen avulla', 'et': '1950. aastate Ameerika jazzmuusikute tuvastamine: peeneteraline Isa ekstraheerimine modifikaatori kompositsiooni kaudu', 'bs': 'Identifikacija američkih jazz muzičara iz 1950. godine: izvlačenje IsA iz finog građevina putem kompozicije modifikatora', 'az': '1950-ci Amerikal캼 Jazz M칲zisyenl톛ri t톛sdiql톛yici: 캻yi-Grained IsA Extraction via Modifier Composition', 'ha': "Kunna gane 1950's amerikan Jazz Music: Fine-Grared IsA Extration through Modifier Composition", 'sk': 'Identifikacija ameriških jazz glasbenikov iz 1950-ih let: finozrnata izločitev Isa prek modifikatorske kompozicije', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Panjenengan 1-warni kanggo nyebatasan Musik 1-warni: Fine-Graining IsA', 'he': "מזהה מוזיקאים של ג'אז אמריקאים בשנות ה-1950: יציאה של אייז-אייז מוצקת", 'bo': '1950་ཡིན་མཁན་གྱི་ཨ་རིའི་ཇེ་ཛོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ། མཐའ་རྡེབ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་འདི་བཟོ་'}
{'en': 'We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., 1950s American jazz musicians) with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus). While state-of-the-art methods tend to treat class labels as single lexical units, the proposed method considers each of the individual modifiers in the class label relative to the head. An evaluation on the task of reconstructing Wikipedia category pages demonstrates a 10 point increase in AUC, over a strong baseline relying on widely-used Hearst patterns.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة لملء الفصول الدراسية الدقيقة (على سبيل المثال ، "موسيقيو الجاز الأمريكيون في الخمسينيات من القرن الماضي") مع أمثلة (على سبيل المثال ، تشارلز مينجوس). بينما تميل الطرق الحديثة إلى التعامل مع تسميات الفئات كوحدات معجمية مفردة ، فإن الطريقة المقترحة تأخذ في الاعتبار كل من المعدلات الفردية في تصنيف الفئة بالنسبة إلى الرأس. يوضح تقييم لمهمة إعادة بناء صفحات فئة ويكيبيديا زيادة قدرها 10 نقاط في الجامعة الأمريكية بالقاهرة ، على أساس قوي يعتمد على أنماط هيرست المستخدمة على نطاق واسع.', 'es': 'Presentamos un método para poblar clases minuciosas (por ejemplo, «músicos de jazz estadounidenses de los años 50») con instancias (por ejemplo, Charles Mingus). Mientras que los métodos más avanzados tienden a tratar las etiquetas de clase como unidades léxicas únicas, el método propuesto considera cada uno de los modificadores individuales en la etiqueta de clase en relación con la cabeza. Una evaluación sobre la tarea de reconstruir las páginas de categorías de Wikipedia demuestra un aumento de 10 puntos en el AUC, por encima de una base sólida que se basa en los patrones de Hearst ampliamente utilizados.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une méthode pour remplir des classes fines (par exemple, «\xa0musiciens de jazz américains des années 1950\xa0») avec des instances (par exemple, Charles Mingus). Alors que les méthodes de pointe ont tendance à traiter les étiquettes de classe comme des unités lexicales uniques, la méthode proposée considère chacun des modificateurs individuels dans l'étiquette de classe par rapport à la tête. Une évaluation de la tâche de reconstruction des pages de catégories Wikipédia montre une augmentation de 10 points de l'ASC, par rapport à une base de référence solide reposant sur des modèles Hearst largement utilisés.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um método para preencher classes refinadas (por exemplo, “músicos de jazz americanos da década de 1950”) com instâncias (por exemplo, Charles Mingus ). Enquanto os métodos de última geração tendem a tratar rótulos de classe como unidades lexicais únicas, o método proposto considera cada um dos modificadores individuais no rótulo de classe em relação ao núcleo. Uma avaliação sobre a tarefa de reconstruir as páginas de categorias da Wikipédia demonstra um aumento de 10 pontos na AUC, sobre uma linha de base forte baseada em padrões Hearst amplamente utilizados.', 'ja': '私たちは、細かいクラス（例えば、「1950年代のアメリカのジャズ・ミュージシャン」）にインスタンス（例えば、チャールズ・ミンガス）を追加するための方法を提示します。最先端の方法は、クラスラベルを単一の語彙単位として扱う傾向があるが、提案された方法は、頭部に対してクラスラベル内の個々の修飾子のそれぞれを考慮する。ウィキペディアカテゴリページの再構築タスクの評価は、広く使用されているハーストパターンに依存した強力なベースラインを超えて、AUCが10ポイント増加したことを示しています。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем метод заполнения мелкозернистых классов (например, «американские джазовые музыканты 1950-х годов») экземплярами (например, Чарльз Мингус ). В то время как современные методы, как правило, рассматривают метки класса как отдельные лексические единицы, предлагаемый метод рассматривает каждый из отдельных модификаторов в метке класса относительно головы. Оценка задачи реконструирования страниц категорий Википедии демонстрирует 10-балльное увеличение AUC по сравнению с сильной базовой линией, основанной на широко используемых шаблонах Херста.', 'zh': '臣等立实例(如Charles Mingus)填细粒度类(如"1950年美国爵士音乐家")之法。 虽最先进者向以类标签为单词法单元,然所建者虑类标签之对头者,各饰符也。 重建维基百科类页面务之质明,AUC增10百分点,非恃博用之赫斯特式之强基线。', 'hi': 'हम उदाहरणों (जैसे, चार्ल्स मिंगस) के साथ ठीक-ठाक वर्गों (उदाहरण के लिए, "1 9 50 के दशक के अमेरिकी जैज संगीतकारों") को पॉप्युलेट करने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। जबकि अत्याधुनिक तरीके वर्ग लेबल को एकल लेक्सिकल इकाइयों के रूप में मानते हैं, प्रस्तावित विधि सिर के सापेक्ष वर्ग लेबल में व्यक्तिगत संशोधकों में से प्रत्येक पर विचार करती है। विकिपीडिया श्रेणी के पृष्ठों के पुनर्निर्माण के कार्य पर एक मूल्यांकन एयूसी में 10 अंक की वृद्धि को दर्शाता है, जो व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले हर्स्ट पैटर्न पर निर्भर एक मजबूत आधार रेखा पर निर्भर करता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid modh i láthair chun ranganna mínghlana (m.sh., “ceoltóirí snagcheoil Mheiriceá sna 1950idí”) a líonadh le cásanna (m.sh., Charles Mingus ). Cé gur gnách go ndéileálann modhanna úrscothacha le lipéid ranga mar aonaid léacsacha aonair, déantar breithniú sa mhodh atá beartaithe ar gach modhnóir aonair sa lipéad ranga i gcoibhneas leis an gceann. Léiríonn meastóireacht ar an tasc chun leathanaigh chatagóir Vicipéid a athchruthú méadú 10 bpointe ar AUC, thar bhunlíne láidir ag brath ar phatrúin Hearst a úsáidtear go forleathan.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy módszert a finom szemű osztályok (pl. "1950-es amerikai jazz zenészek") népszerűsítésére például (pl. Charles Mingus ). Míg a korszerű módszerek általában az osztálycímkéket egyedi lexikális egységként kezelik, a javasolt módszer az osztálycímkén lévő egyes módosítókat a fejhez viszonyítva veszi figyelembe. A Wikipédia kategóriaoldalak rekonstruálásának feladatával kapcsolatos értékelés 10 pontos AUC-emelkedést mutat, a széles körben használt Hearst-mintákon alapuló erős kiindulási értékhez képest.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο για την πλήρωση λεπτόκοκκων τάξεων (π.χ. "Αμερικανοί μουσικοί τζαζ του 50ου αιώνα") με παραδείγματα (π.χ. Τσαρλς Μίνγκους). Ενώ οι σύγχρονες μέθοδοι τείνουν να αντιμετωπίζουν τις ετικέτες κλάσης ως μεμονωμένες λεξικές μονάδες, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος εξετάζει κάθε έναν από τους μεμονωμένους τροποποιητές της ετικέτας κλάσης σε σχέση με το κεφάλι. Μια αξιολόγηση σχετικά με το έργο της ανασυγκρότησης σελίδων κατηγοριών της Βικιπαίδειας δείχνει μια 10-πόντια αύξηση της AUC, πάνω από μια ισχυρή γραμμή βάσης που βασίζεται σε ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενα πρότυπα Χερστ.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ წარმოადგენებული კლასების შესახებ (მაგალითად, 1950 წლის ამერიკური jazz მუსიკურები) მაგალითად (მაგალითად, Charles Mingus). თუმცა კლასის ლექსიკალური ერთეულების განმავლობაში კლასის ლექსიკალური ერთეულების განმავლობაში, პროგრამის განმავლობაში ყველა ინდიველური შეცვლელი კლასის ლექსიკალური ერთეულების განმა ვიკიპედიის კატეგორია გვერდის გარეშექმნა დავალების შესახებ აღმოჩენა AUC-ში 10 წუთი მეტი, ძალიან ფესტური ხაზი, რომელიც ძალიან გამოყენებული Hearst სტრუქტურების შაბლოები', 'it': "Presentiamo un metodo per popolare classi a grana fine (ad esempio, 'musicisti jazz americani degli anni '50') con istanze (ad esempio, Charles Mingus ). Mentre i metodi all'avanguardia tendono a trattare le etichette delle classi come singole unità lessicali, il metodo proposto considera ciascuno dei singoli modificatori nell'etichetta della classe rispetto alla testa. Una valutazione sul compito di ricostruire le pagine delle categorie Wikipedia dimostra un aumento di 10 punti dell'AUC, su una base di base forte basata su modelli Hearst ampiamente utilizzati.", 'mk': 'Презентираме метод за популација на фини класи (на пример, „Американски џез музичари од 1950-тите”) со примери (на пример, Чарлс Мингус ). Иако најновите методи имаат тенденција да ги третираат класните етикети како единствени лексикални единици, предложениот метод ги смета секој од индивидуалните модификатори во класниот етикет во однос на главата. An evaluation on the task of reconstructing Wikipedia category pages demonstrates a 10 point increase in AUC, over a strong baseline relying on widely-used Hearst patterns.', 'kk': "Мысалы, таңдау классияларды (мысалы, '1950 жылдары американдық джаз музыкалары') деген әдісті (мысалы, Charles Mingus). Суреттің күйі әдістері класс жарлықтарын бір лексикалық бірліктері ретінде қалайтын болғанда, келтірілген әдістер класс жарлығындағы әрбір түрлендірушілерді басымен сәйкес қалады. Википедия санаттарын қайта құру тапсырмасының бағалауы AUC дегенде 10 нүкте көтерілген, көп қолданылған Hearst үлгілеріне сенімді негізгі сызық.", 'ms': "We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., '1950s American jazz musicians') with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus ).  Sementara kaedah state-of-the-art cenderung untuk memperlakukan label kelas sebagai unit leksikal tunggal, kaedah yang diusulkan mempertimbangkan setiap pengubahsuai individu dalam label kelas relatif kepada kepala. Evaluasi tugas membangun semula halaman kategori Wikipedia menunjukkan peningkatan AUC 10 titik, atas dasar asas yang kuat bergantung pada corak Hearst yang digunakan secara luas.", 'mn': 'Бид сайхан тарианы хичээлийг (жишээ нь 1950 онд Америкийн джаз хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийн хөгжмийг) жишээ болгож үзүүлсэн. Хэдийгээр урлагийн төвшин арга зам нь ангийны загваруудыг нэг лексикийн нэгж гэж үздэг ч, санал өгсөн арга нь ангийны загварын загваруудыг толгойд харьцуулдаг. Википедийн хэлбэрийн хуудсыг дахин бүтээх ажил дээрх үнэлгээ нь АС-ын 10 цэгийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг харуулж байна. Харин хамгийн их хэрэглэгддэг Hearst хэлбэрээс хамаарч байгаа хүчтэй суурь шугам юм.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein metode for å populeringa fine-grained klasser (f.eks. «1950. amerikanske jazz-musikarar») med instansar (f.eks. Charles Mingus). Mens kunstmetodane har tendens til å behandla klassemerkelappen som enkelte leksiske einingar, vil den foreslåde metoden gjera kvar av dei individuelle modifikatorane i klassemerkelappen relatert til hodet. Eit evaluering på oppgåva for å gjenoppretta Wikipedia-kategorisider viser at det er 10 punkt økt i AUC, over ein sterk baseline som vert på breidde brukte Hearst-mønster.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw metodu g ħall-popolazzjoni ta' klassijiet ta' ħbub fin (pereżempju, 'mużiċisti Amerikani tal-jazz tas-snin 50') b'e żempji (pereżempju Charles Mingus ). Filwaqt li l-metodi l-aktar avvanzati għandhom it-tendenza li jittrattaw it-tikketti tal-klassi bħala unitajiet lexiċi singoli, il-metodu propost jikkunsidra kull wieħed mill-modifikaturi individwali fit-tikketta tal-klassi relattivament mar-ras. Evalwazzjoni dwar il-kompitu ta’ rikostruzzjoni tal-paġni tal-kategorija tal-Wikipedia turi żieda ta’ 10 punti fl-AUC, fuq linja bażi qawwija li tiddependi fuq mudelli tal-qalb użati ħafna.", 'ml': "നമ്മള്\u200d നല്ല ക്ലാസ്സുകള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമാക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, '1950s അമേരിക്കന്\u200d ജാസ്സ് സംഗീതക്കാര്\u200d')  ക്ലാസ് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d യൂണിറ്റുകളായി ക്ലാസിന്റെ രീതികളുടെ ക്ലാസ്സിലെ ലേബ്ലേറ്റുകളെ സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയി വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പേജുകള്\u200d പുനരുമാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു വിലാസപ്രകാരം AUC-ല്\u200d 10 പോയിന്റ് വളര്\u200dച്ച കാണിക്കുന്നു. വിശാലമ", 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy metodę zapełniania drobnoziarnistych klas (np. "amerykańscy muzycy jazzowi z lat 50-tych") instancjami (np. Charles Mingus). Podczas gdy najnowocześniejsze metody traktują etykiety klas jako pojedyncze jednostki leksykalne, proponowana metoda uwzględnia każdy z poszczególnych modyfikatorów etykiety klasy względem głowy. Ocena zadania rekonstrukcji stron kategorii Wikipedii wykazuje 10-punktowy wzrost AUC, ponad silną linią bazową opierającą się na powszechnie stosowanych wzorcach Hearsta.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o metodă de populare a claselor cu granule fine (de exemplu, "muzicieni americani de jazz din anii 1950") cu instanțe (de exemplu, Charles Mingus ). Deși metodele de ultimă generație tind să trateze etichetele clasei ca unități lexicale unice, metoda propusă ia în considerare fiecare dintre modificatorii individuali din eticheta clasei în raport cu capul. O evaluare a sarcinii de reconstruire a paginilor categoriilor Wikipedia demonstrează o creștere de 10 puncte a ASC, peste o bază puternică bazată pe modele Hearst utilizate pe scară largă.', 'sr': "Predstavljamo metodu za populaciju kvaliteta finog zrnca (npr. '1950-ih američkih jazz muzičara') sa instancijama (npr. Charles Mingus). Iako metode države umjetnosti tendiraju da se etikete klase tretiraju kao jedine leksičke jedinice, predložena metoda smatra svakom od pojedinačnih modifikatora u etiketi klase u odnosu na glavu. Procjena o zadatku rekonstrukcije stranica kategorije Wikipedije pokazuje povećanje AUC od 10 tačka, na jaku početnu liniju koja se oslanja na široko korištene Hearst obrasce.", 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ay u baahan yihiin fasalka quruxda badan (tusaale ahaan '1950's American jazz') tusaale ahaan (tusaale ahaan Charles Mingus). While state-of-the-art methods tend to treat class labels as single lexical units, the proposed method considers each of the individual modifiers in the class label relative to the head.  Qiimeynta shaqada ku saabsan dhisidda kooxo ee Wikipedia wuxuu muujiyaa 10 point korodhsan AUC, kaas oo ku xiran qoraal xoog leh oo ku xiran qaabka aad u isticmaalan qalabka Heart.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en metod för att befolka finkorniga klasser (t.ex. "1950-talets amerikanska jazzmusiker") med exempel (t.ex. Charles Mingus ). Medan toppmoderna metoder tenderar att behandla klassetiketter som enskilda lexikala enheter, beaktar den föreslagna metoden var och en av de enskilda modifierarna i klassetiketten i förhållande till huvudet. En utvärdering av uppgiften att rekonstruera Wikipedia kategori sidor visar en 10 procents ökning av AUC, jämfört med en stark baslinje baserad på allmänt använda Hearst-mönster.', 'lt': "We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., '1950s American jazz musicians') with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus ).  Nors naujausiais metodais klasės etiketės paprastai laikomos vienu leksiniu vienetu, siūlomame metode kiekvienas atskiras klasės etiketėje esantis modifikatorius laikomas galvos atžvilgiu. An evaluation on the task of reconstructing Wikipedia category pages demonstrates a 10 point increase in AUC, over a strong baseline relying on widely-used Hearst patterns.", 'ta': "நாங்கள் நிகழ்வுகளுடன் சார்லஸ் மிங்குஸ் பொதுவான வகுப்புகளுக்கு ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் (உ. ம், '1950s அமெரிக்காவின் ஜாஸ் இசை' நிலை- கலை முறைமைகள் மட்டும் லெக்சிக்சியான அலகுகளாக குறிக்கும் வகுப்பு சிட்டைகளை பாதிக்கும் போது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறையில் ஒவ்வ விக்கிபிடியா வகைப்பட்ட பக்கங்களை மீண்டும் உருவாக்கும் செயலில் ஒரு விளக்கம் AUC ஒரு 10 புள்ளியின் அதிகரிப்பு, விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட இதய வட", 'ur': 'ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ پاکیزہ دانے کلاس (جیسے 1950 کی آمریکایی جاز موسیقی کرنے والوں) کو جمع کریں (جیسے چارلز مینگس) حالانکہ کلاس لیبل کو ایک لکسیکل یونیٹ کے طور پر دکھانے کی جگہ ہے، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ہر ایک کلاس لیبل میں متغیر کرنے والے کو سر کے مقابلہ میں سمجھتا ہے. ویکیپیڈیا کاٹیوسٹ صفحے دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے کام میں ایک ارزیابی ہے جو AUC میں 10 پوینٹ اضافہ کرتی ہے، ایک مضبوط بنسٹ لین پر جو وسیع طور پر استعمال ہونے والی Hearst نمونوں پر بھروسہ کرتی ہے.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් (උදාහරණයෙන්, 1950 දී ඇමරිකානු ජැස් සංගීතකයන්) සිද්ධ විදියට (උදාහරණයෙන්, චා ස්ථානය- of- the- art විධානයේ ලෙබෙල් එකක් ලෙක්සිකල් යුනිටිය විදියට බලාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ප්\u200dරතිචාර විධානය ප්\u200dරතිකා විකිපිඩියා වර්ගය පැත්තුවක් ආපහු නිර්මාණය කරන වැඩේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් AUC වල 10 පැත්තුවක් වැඩි වෙනවා, ප්\u200d', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu phương pháp phát triển các lớp nhạc jazz theo sắc độ (v.d., 1950s American jazz). Trong khi phương pháp hiện đại có xu hướng xem các nhãn lớp là đơn vị từ vựng, phương pháp đã đề nghị xem mỗi phím sửa đổi trong nhãn hạng so với đầu. Một đánh giá về nhiệm vụ tái tạo các trang hạng Wikipedia đã cho thấy sự tăng vọt ở AUC, hơn cả một nền tảng vững chắc dựa vào những mô hình Hearst phổ biến.', 'uz': "Biz bir misol bilan yaxshi ko'plab o'xshash sinflar (m.g., 1950 yillarda Jazz musiqalari) uchun usulni hozir qilamiz (m.g. Charles Mingus). Sana usullari bir necha leksikal birikmalar sifatida sinf tugmasining tugmalarini boshqarish mumkin, ilova qilingan usuli boshqa tugma yozuvchidagi har bir oʻzgarishlarni anglatadi. Wikipedia category sahifalarni qaytadan oʻrnatish vazifasidagi qiymati AUC'da 10 point uzoqligini koʻrsatiladi, butunlay ishlatilgan Heart tugmalariga ishlatilgan katta asosiy tarkibi.", 'bg': 'Представяме метод за попълване на фини класове (напр. "американски джаз музиканти от 50-те години") с инстанции (напр. Чарлз Мингъс). Докато съвременните методи са склонни да третират етикетите на класа като единични лексикални единици, предложеният метод разглежда всеки един от отделните модификатори в етикета на класа спрямо главата. Оценка на задачата за реконструкция на категориите страници на Уикипедия показва 10-пунктово увеличение на AUC спрямо силна базова база, разчитаща на широко използваните модели на Хърст.', 'nl': "We presenteren een methode voor het bevolken van fijnkorrelige klassen (bijv. '1950s American jazzmuzikanten') met voorbeelden (bijv. Charles Mingus). Terwijl state-of-the-art methoden de neiging hebben om klasselabels te behandelen als enkele lexicale eenheden, wordt bij de voorgestelde methode elk van de individuele modificatoren in het klasselabel ten opzichte van het hoofd beschouwd. Een evaluatie van de taak van het reconstrueren van Wikipedia categoriepagina's toont een 10-puntige toename van AUC aan, boven een sterke baseline gebaseerd op veel gebruikte Hearst patronen.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en metode til at befolke finkornede klasser (f.eks. "1950\'erne amerikanske jazzmusikere") med eksempler (f.eks. Charles Mingus ). Mens state-of-the-art metoder har tendens til at behandle klassemærker som enkelte lexikale enheder, den foreslåede metode tager hver af de enkelte modifikatorer i klassemærket i forhold til hovedet. En evaluering af opgaven med at rekonstruere Wikipedia kategori sider viser en 10-punkts stigning i AUC over en stærk baseline baseret på almindeligt anvendte Hearst-mønstre.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo metodu za populaciju finog zrnca (npr. američkih jazz muzičara 1950-ih) s primjercima (npr. Charles Mingus). Iako metode države umjetnosti tendiraju liječiti etikete klase kao jedine leksičke jedinice, predložena metoda smatra svakom od pojedinačnih modifikatora u etiketi klase u odnosu na glavu. Procjenjivanje zadatka rekonstrukcije stranica kategorije Wikipedia pokazuje povećanje AUC od 10 bodova na snažnoj početnoj liniji koja se oslanja na široko korištenim Hearst obrascima.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine Methode vor, um feinkörnige Klassen (z.B. amerikanische Jazzmusiker der 1950er Jahre) mit Instanzen (z.B. Charles Mingus) zu füllen. Während moderne Methoden dazu neigen, Klassenbeschriftungen als einzelne lexikalische Einheiten zu behandeln, berücksichtigt die vorgeschlagene Methode jeden einzelnen Modifikator in der Klassenbeschriftung relativ zum Kopf. Eine Auswertung der Rekonstruktion von Wikipedia-Kategorieseiten zeigt eine 10-Punkte-Erhöhung der AUC gegenüber einer starken Baseline, die auf weit verbreiteten Hearst-Mustern basiert.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش برای جمع کردن کلاس\u200cهای خوشمزه\u200cای (مثلاً موسیقی\u200cهای جاز آمریکایی ۱۹۵۰) را با مثال (مثلاً چارلز مینگس) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. در حالی که روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری به عنوان واحدهای زبان کلاس رفتار می\u200cکنند، روش پیشنهاد هر یک از تغییردهنده\u200cهای فردی در نقاشی کلاس نسبت به سر می\u200cگیرد. ارزیابی در کار بازسازی صفحه\u200cهای kategoriی ویکیپدیا در AUC ۱۰ نقطه افزایش را نشان می\u200cدهد، بر روی یک خط بنیادی قوی که بر الگوهای Hearst استفاده شده است.', 'tr': "Biz gowy titreme synplary jemgy첵etlendirmek 체챌in (mysal. '1950-nji 첵yldaky Amerikan jazz m체zisyenler') 철r채n g 철rn체힊d체r첵채ris. 횦agtym ta첵첵arlary klas etiketleri 첵ekeje tekiz tekiz tekiz h철km체ne g철zat첵ar. Wikipedi첵a kategori첵a sahypalaryny흫 t채zeden in 힊a etmegi me첵dan챌asynda AUC'y흫 10 punkt artygyny g철rkez첵채r. Ullanylan Hearst 힊artlarynda g체첵챌li bir tabanlyk 체st체nde durul첵ar.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n metode voor die populasie van fine-grained klasse (bv. '1950s Amerikaanse jazz musiekleiers') met voorbeelde (bv. Charles Mingus). Terwyl die staat- of- die- kunstenmetodes tendeer na behandel klas etikette as enkele leksiese eenhede, word die voorgestelde metode elke van die individuele veranderers in die klas etikette relatief na die kop besluit. 'n Evaluering op die taak van herkonstruksie van Wikipedia kategorie bladsye wys 'n 10 punt verhoog in AUC, oor 'n sterk basisline wat op heeltemal gebruik Hearst patrone vertrou.", 'sq': "We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., '1950s American jazz musicians') with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus ).  Ndërsa metodat më të larta tenderojnë të trajtojnë etiketat e klasës si njësi të vetme lexike, metoda e propozuar konsideron secilin nga modifikuesit individual ë në etiketën e klasës në raport me kokën. Një vlerësim mbi detyrën e rindërtimit të faqeve të kategorisë së Wikipedias tregon një rritje prej 10 pikësh në AUC, mbi një bazë të fortë mbështetur në modelet e Hearst të përdorura gjerësisht.", 'sw': "We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., '1950s American jazz musicians') with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus ).  Wakati mbinu za hali ya sanaa huwa zinakabiliwa na alama za darasa kama viungo pekee vya lexico, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inachukulia kila mmoja wa mabadiliko katika alama ya darasani inayohusiana na kichwa. Utafiti wa jukumu la kujenga upya kurasa za Wikipedia unaonyesha kuongezeka kwa pointi 10 kwenye AUC, juu ya msingi mkali unaotumika kutegemea mitindo ya moyo unaotumika sana.", 'ko': '우리는 세립도류(예를 들어 1950년대 미국 재즈 뮤지션)를 실례(예를 들어 Charles Mingus)로 채우는 방법을 제시했다.가장 선진적인 방법은 클래스 라벨을 하나의 어휘 단원으로 보는 경향이 있지만 제시된 방법은 클래스 라벨에서 머리에 대한 모든 수식어를 고려했다.위키백과 분류 페이지 재구성 임무에 대한 평가에 따르면 AUC는 널리 사용되는 허스트 모델의 강력한 베이스라인보다 10%포인트 증가했다.', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք գեղեցիկ ցորենի դասերի բնակչության մեթոդ (օրինակ, '1950-ականների ամերիկյան ջազ երաժիշտները') օրինակներով (օրինակ Չարլզ Մինգուսը): While state-of-the-art methods tend to treat class labels as single lexical units, the proposed method considers each of the individual modifiers in the class label relative to the head.  An evaluation on the task of reconstructing Wikipedia category pages demonstrates a 10 point increase in AUC, over a strong baseline relying on widely-used Hearst patterns.", 'az': "Biz sünbül dənələr (1950-ci Amerikan jazz müzisyenləri) misalları ilə nümunələrlə birləşdiririk. Sənət metodları tək leksik birinci kimi dəstək etiketlərini təklif edirlər, təklif edilən metod hər birini dəstək etiketində başı ilə əlaqə edirlər. Wikipedia kategoriya səhifələrini yenidən in şa etmək məqsədilə müəyyən edilən tərzdə AUC'nin 10 nöqtə artığını göstərir, genişliyi ilə istifadə edilən Hearst örtüklərinə təvəkkül edilən qüvvətli səhifələrin üstündə.", 'bs': "Predstavljamo metodu za populaciju kvaliteta finog zrnca (npr. '1950-ih američkih jazz muzičara') s primjercima (npr. Charles Mingus). Iako metode države umjetnosti tendiraju da se etikete klase tretiraju kao jedine leksičke jedinice, predložena metoda smatra svakom od pojedinačnih modifikatora u etiketi klase u odnosu na glavu. Procjena o zadatku rekonstrukcije stranica kategorije Wikipedia pokazuje povećanje AUC od 10 tačka, na jaku početnu liniju koja se oslanja na široko korištene Hearst obrasce.", 'id': "Kami mempersembahkan metode untuk mempopulasikan kelas-kelas gandum (contohnya, 'musisi jazz Amerika 1950-an') dengan contohnya (contohnya, Charles Mingus ). While state-of-the-art methods tend to treat class labels as single lexical units, the proposed method considers each of the individual modifiers in the class label relative to the head.  Evaluasi tugas untuk rekonstruksi halaman kategori Wikipedia menunjukkan peningkatan AUC 10 poin, atas dasar dasar yang kuat bergantung pada pola Hearst yang sangat digunakan.", 'ca': "We present a method for populating fine-grained classes (e.g., '1950s American jazz musicians') with instances (e.g., Charles Mingus ).  Mentre que els mètodes més moderns tendeixen a tractar les etiquetes de classe com unitats lècsiques únices, el mètode proposat considera cada un dels modificadors individuals de l'etiqueta de classe en relació amb el cap. Una evaluació sobre la tasca de reconstruir pàgines de la categoria de Wikipedia demostra un augment de 10 punts en l'AUC, sobre un fort punt de referència basal basat en patrons del cor generalment utilitzats.", 'cs': 'Představujeme metodu zaplnění jemnozrnných tříd (např. amerických jazzových hudebníků padesátých let) instancí (např. Charles Mingus). Zatímco moderní metody mají tendenci zacházet s popisky tříd jako s jednotlivými lexikálními jednotkami, navrhovaná metoda bere v úvahu každý z jednotlivých modifikátorů v popisku třídy relativně k hlavě. Vyhodnocení úkolu rekonstrukce stránek kategorií Wikipedie ukazuje desetibodové zvýšení AUC nad silnou základní linií založenou na široce používaných Hearstových vzorcích.', 'am': 'መልካም ደረጃዎችን ለመቆጣጠር (ምሳሌ, "1950s አሜሪካውያን ጃዚ ሙዚቃን)) እናስቀራለን (ምሳሌ Charles Mingus) የ-የ-አርእስት ልማድ ግን የክፍለ ደረጃ ምልክቶችን እንደ አንዲት ሌክሲካዊ ክፍል ለመቀበል የሚቆጠሩ ልማድ፣ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የክፍለ ደረጃ ምልክት ለሁሉም ለራሱ የሚያስተካክል ነው፡፡ Wikipedia category pages በመሠረት ላይ ማስታወቂያ የሚያሳየው የአዩሲ አሥር ነጥብ ያድጋል፡፡', 'bn': "আমরা সুন্দর ক্লাসের জনপ্রিয় একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করছি (যেমন '১৯৫০ সালের আমেরিকান জ্যাজ সঙ্গীতের') যেমন (যেমন চার্লস মিঙ্গুস)। যদিও শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের পদ্ধতি একক লেক্সিক্যাল ইউনিট হিসেবে শ্রেণীর লেবেলের ব্যবহার করে, তবে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি মাথার সাথে যোগাযোগী ক্ল উইকিপিডিয়া বিভাগের পাতা পুনঃনির্মাণ করার কাজে একটি মূল্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে AUC এর ১০ বিন্দু বৃদ্ধি প্রদর্শন করে, যা ব্যাপক ব্যবহৃত হার্স্ট প", 'et': "Esitleme meetodit peeneteraliste klasside populatsiooniks (nt, '1950. aastate Ameerika jazzmuusikud') juhtumitega (nt Charles Mingus ). Kuigi kaasaegsed meetodid kipuvad klassimärgiseid käsitlema üksikute leksikaalühikutena, võetakse kavandatud meetodis arvesse klassimärgise iga üksiku modifikaatori pea suhtes. Vikipeedia kategoorialehtede rekonstrueerimise ülesande hindamine näitab, et AUC suurenes 10 punkti võrreldes tugeva lähtetasemega, tuginedes laialdaselt kasutatavatele Hearsti mustritele.", 'fi': 'Esitämme menetelmän, jolla täytetään hienorakeisia luokkia (esim. "1950-luvun amerikkalaiset jazzmuusikot") esiintymillä (esim. Charles Mingus ). Vaikka uusimmat menetelmät yleensä käsittelevät luokkamerkintöjä yksittäisinä leksikaalisina yksikköinä, ehdotettu menetelmä pitää luokkamerkinnän jokaista yksittäistä modifiointia suhteessa otsaan. Wikipedian luokkasivujen rekonstruointitehtävän arviointi osoittaa AUC:n 10 pisteen nousun vahvaan lähtötasoon perustuen laajalti käytettyihin Hearst-kuvioihin.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggawe kelas sing diburèh (bah, pitik \'pitik jaz-pitik saiki\' lan soko perasaane soko perasaane soko perasaane soko soko perasaane soko soko, bisa carol Ming) politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Wang deweke nggunian kuwi nggawe pagjine soko Ngubah ning acara kategori yang dipunangé na online, mesthi 10 punti to panjenengan liyane sing wis dipunangé kapan Carest.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata hanyoyi wa mutane na danganta mai kyau (misali, '1950's musamman jazz') da misali (misali, charles Mingus). Kuma a lokacin da halin-sanar za'a yi amfani da alama mai fasa kamar sunaye guda na leksisi, shirin da aka buƙata yana ƙidãya ga kowace mai gyare cikin layin daraja wanda ya yi danna da kice. An a ƙaddara kan aikin da aka canza tsarin category-Wikimedia, yana nuna wata ƙãra wa AUC 10 point, a kan wani tabbatacce mai ƙarfi, yana dõgara kan tsarin Hjertsun da aka yi amfani da shi mai yawa.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים שיטה לאופולציה של שיעורי צמח (למשל, "מוזיקאים ג\'אז אמריקאים בשנות ה-50") עם מקרים (למשל צ\'ארלס מינגוס). בעוד שיטות מוקדמות נוטות לטפל בתוויות כיתה כיחידות לקסיקות בודדות, השיטה המוצעת שוקלת כל אחד מהמודיקטורים היחידים בתווית כיתה יחסית לראש. An evaluation on the task of reconstructing Wikipedia category pages demonstrates a 10 point increase in AUC, over a strong baseline relying on widely-used Hearst patterns.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo metodo za naseljevanje finozrnatih razredov (npr. "Ameriški jazz glasbeniki iz 1950-ih let") z primeri (npr. Charles Mingus ). Medtem ko najsodobnejše metode običajno obravnavajo oznake razredov kot posamezne leksikalne enote, predlagana metoda obravnava vsak posamezni spreminjevalnik oznake razreda glede na glavo. Ocena naloge rekonstrukcije strani kategorij Wikipedije kaže povečanje AUC za 10 točk v primerjavi z močno osnovno vrednostjo, ki temelji na široko uporabljenih Hearstovih vzorcih.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་ཆེ་བའི་གྲལ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་དང་། དཔེར་ན། '1950་ཡིན་མཁན་གྱི་jazz རོལ་དབྱངས་པ་'(དཔེར་ན། Charles Mingus)དཔེར་ན། While state-of-the-art methods tend to treat class labels as single lexical units, the proposed method considers each of the individual modifiers in the class label relative to the head. Wikipedia དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག"}
{'en': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'ar': 'الإعراب إلى 1-Endpoint-Crossing و Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'pt': 'Analisando para 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Gráficos', 'es': 'Análisis de gráficos de cruce de 1 punto final, número de página 2', 'fr': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint Crossing, PageNumber-2 Graphes', 'ja': '1 - Endpoint - Crossing, Pagenumber -2 Graphsへの解析', 'zh': '解析为 1 端点交,页码为 2 图', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ графиков пересечения с 1 конечной точкой, Pagenumber-2', 'hi': '1-समापन बिंदु-क्रॉसिंग, Pagenumber-2 रेखांकन करने के लिए पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'Parsáil go dtí 1-Críochphointe-Trasnú, Ghraf Uimhir Leathanach-2', 'ka': '1- ბოლო წერტილის გადაწყება, გვერდის ნომბერი- 2 გრაფიების გადაწყება', 'hu': 'Feldolgozás 1-végpontos keresztezésre, oldalszám-2 grafikonokra', 'el': 'Ανάλυση σε διασταύρωση 1-τελικού σημείου, γραφήματα αρίθμησης-2 σελίδων', 'it': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenummer-2 Graphs', 'kk': '1- аяқтау нүктесіне ауысу, беттер- 2 графиктеріне талдау', 'lt': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'ml': '1- Endpoint- Crossing, Pagenumber- 2 Graphs', 'mt': 'Analiżi għall-Punt ta’ Tqassim 1, Grafiki tal-Paġna Numru 2', 'mn': '1-төгсгөл-цэг-дагуулах, хуудас-2 график', 'no': 'Tolkar til 1- endepunktkryssing, sidenummer- 2- graf', 'pl': 'Parsowanie do przekroczenia punktów końcowych, wykresy numeru stron-2', 'mk': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'sr': 'Analiziranje na 1-krajnji prelaz, broj 2 grafika', 'ro': 'Parsing to 1- Endpoint- Crossing, Pagenumber- 2 Graphs', 'ms': 'Menghurai ke 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Nombor Halaman-2 Graf', 'si': '1- අන්තිම පින්තූර- ක්\u200dරාසින්ග්, පින්තූර- 2 ග්\u200dරාෆ්ස්', 'so': 'Parsing to 1-End-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graf', 'ta': '1- முடிவுப் புள்ளியின் குறுக்குதலுக்கு பாசிடுகிறது, வண்ணம்பர்- 2 வரைப்படங்கள்', 'sv': 'Tolka till 1- slutpunktsöversning, sidnummer- 2 diagram', 'ur': '1-Endpoint-Crossing، Pagenumber-2 Graphs تک پارس کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Pastki kolontitul', 'vi': 'Tính năng:', 'hr': 'Očitanje na 1-krajnji prelaz, broj 2 grafika', 'bg': 'Анализиране до кръстосване на 1- крайна точка, Графика номер- 2', 'nl': 'Parsen naar 1-eindpunt-kruising, paginanumber-2 grafieken', 'de': 'Parsing zu 1-Endpunkt-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphen', 'id': 'Menganalisis ke 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Halaman-2 Graf', 'ko': '끝점 교차, Pagenumber-2 그래픽으로 해결', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha kwa Point 1-Endpoint, Graphs-2', 'tr': '1-Ahyrpunt-Çaşmak, Saife-2 Graflere', 'fa': 'تولید کردن به عنوان یک نقطه پایان- عبور ، شماره صفحه- ۲ گراف', 'af': 'Verwerking na 1- einde- punt- kruissing, Bladsy- nommer- 2 Grafies', 'da': 'Fortolkning til 1- endepunkt- krydsning, sidenummer- 2 grafer', 'sq': 'Duke analizuar në 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Հաշվի առնելով 1-ի վերջնական կետի խաչը, էջերում-2 գրաֆիկներ', 'bn': '1- Endpoint-Cross, Pagenumber-2 গ্রাফ', 'ca': "Analitzant els gràfics de cruzament d'un punt final, número de pàgina 2", 'az': '1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs', 'cs': 'Parsování na 1-koncový křížení, grafy čísla stránek-2', 'et': 'Parsimine 1- lõpppunkti ristamiseks, leheküljenumber- 2 graafikuteks', 'fi': 'Lajittelu 1-päätepisteen risteykseen, sivunumero-2 kaavioihin', 'bs': 'Očitanje na 1-krajnji prelaz, broj 2 grafa', 'jv': 'text-editor-action', 'he': 'ניתוח לחצות 1 נקודת סוף, מספר עמוד 2 גרפים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev na križanje 1-končne točke, grafikoni številke strani-2', 'bo': 'Parsing to 1-Endpoint-Crossing, Pagenumber-2 Graphs'}
{'en': 'We study the Maximum Subgraph problem in deep dependency parsing. We consider two restrictions to deep dependency graphs : (a) 1-endpoint-crossing and (b) pagenumber-2. Our main contribution is an exact algorithm that obtains maximum subgraphs satisfying both restrictions simultaneously in time O(n5). Moreover, ignoring one linguistically-rare structure descreases the complexity to O(n4). We also extend our quartic-time algorithm into a practical parser with a discriminative disambiguation model and evaluate its performance on four linguistic data sets used in semantic dependency parsing.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de Maximum Subgraph en el análisis profundo de dependencias. Consideramos dos restricciones a los gráficos de dependencia profunda: (a) cruce de 1 punto final y (b) número de página 2. Nuestra principal contribución es un algoritmo exacto que obtiene subgrafos máximos que satisfacen ambas restricciones simultáneamente en el tiempo O (n5). Además, ignorar una estructura lingüísticamente rara reduce la complejidad a O (n4). También ampliamos nuestro algoritmo de tiempo cuártico a un analizador práctico con un modelo de desambiguación discriminativo y evaluamos su rendimiento en cuatro conjuntos de datos lingüísticos utilizados en el análisis de dependencias semánticas.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème du sous-graphe maximal dans l'analyse des dépendances profondes. Nous considérons deux restrictions aux graphes de dépendance profonde\xa0: (a) un croisement de point d'extrémité et (b) pagenumber-2. Notre principale contribution est un algorithme exact qui obtient le maximum de sous-graphes satisfaisant les deux restrictions simultanément dans le temps O (n5). De plus, ignorer une structure rare sur le plan linguistique réduit la complexité à O (n4). Nous étendons également notre algorithme de temps quartique en un analyseur pratique avec un modèle de désambiguïsation discriminant et évaluons ses performances sur quatre ensembles de données linguistiques utilisés dans l'analyse sémantique des dépendances.", 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة الرسم البياني الأقصى في التحليل العميق للتبعية. نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار قيدين على الرسوم البيانية للتبعية العميقة: (أ) نقطة نهاية واحدة و (ب) رقم الصفحة 2. مساهمتنا الرئيسية هي خوارزمية دقيقة تحصل على الحد الأقصى من الرسوم البيانية الفرعية التي تفي بالقيدين في وقت واحد في الوقت O (n5). علاوة على ذلك ، يؤدي تجاهل بنية نادرة لغويًا إلى تقليل التعقيد إلى O (n4). نقوم أيضًا بتوسيع خوارزمية الوقت الرباعي الخاصة بنا إلى محلل عملي مع نموذج توضيح تمييزي وتقييم أدائه على أربع مجموعات بيانات لغوية مستخدمة في تحليل التبعية الدلالية.', 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema do Subgrafo Máximo na análise de dependência profunda. Consideramos duas restrições para gráficos de dependência profunda: (a) cruzamento de 1 ponto final e (b) número de página-2. Nossa principal contribuição é um algoritmo exato que obtém subgrafos máximos satisfazendo ambas as restrições simultaneamente no tempo O(n5). Além disso, ignorar uma estrutura linguisticamente rara diminui a complexidade para O(n4). Também estendemos nosso algoritmo de tempo quártico em um analisador prático com um modelo de desambiguação discriminativo e avaliamos seu desempenho em quatro conjuntos de dados linguísticos usados na análise de dependência semântica.', 'hi': 'हम गहरी निर्भरता पार्सिंग में अधिकतम सबग्राफ समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम गहरी निर्भरता रेखांकन के लिए दो प्रतिबंधों पर विचार करते हैं: (ए) 1-समापन बिंदु-क्रॉसिंग और (बी) पेज नंबर -2। हमारा मुख्य योगदान एक सटीक एल्गोरिथ्म है जो समय ओ (एन 5) में एक साथ दोनों प्रतिबंधों को संतुष्ट करने वाले अधिकतम सबग्राफ प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, एक भाषाई रूप से दुर्लभ संरचना को अनदेखा करने से जटिलता को ओ (एन 4) तक बढ़ा दिया जाता है। हम अपने क्वार्टिक-टाइम एल्गोरिथ्म को एक भेदभावपूर्ण बहुविकल्पीय मॉडल के साथ एक व्यावहारिक पार्सर में भी बढ़ाते हैं और शब्दार्थ निर्भरता पार्सिंग में उपयोग किए जाने वाले चार भाषाई डेटा सेटों पर इसके प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं।', 'ja': '深層依存性解析における最大サブグラフ問題を研究しています。深層依存性グラフには、(a) 1 - endpoint - crossingと(b) pagenumber -2の2つの制限があります。我々の主な貢献は、時間O (n 5)で両方の制限を同時に満たす最大サブグラフを取得する正確なアルゴリズムである。さらに、１つの言語学的に希少な構造を無視すると、複雑性がＯ （ ｎ ４ ）に低下する。また、識別的な曖昧さ解消モデルを備えた実用的な構文解析器にクォーティックタイムアルゴリズムを拡張し、セマンティック依存性解析で使用される4つの言語データセットのパフォーマンスを評価します。', 'zh': '臣等深恃解析之大子图。 臣等虑深恃二限:(a)1-端点交(b)页码-2。 吾主献一精之算,其得于时O(n5)兼足二限之大子图。 此外忽一言罕见者,降O(n4)之复杂性。 四分之时,算法至有判别消歧义模形之实用解析器中,语义赖解析中所用四语数集上评其性能。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем задачу Максимального Подграфа в глубоком разборе зависимостей. Мы рассматриваем два ограничения для графиков глубокой зависимости: (a) 1-пересечение конечной точки и (b) pagenumber-2. Нашим основным вкладом является точный алгоритм, который получает максимальные подграфы, удовлетворяющие обоим ограничениям одновременно во времени O(n5). Кроме того, игнорирование одной лингвистически редкой структуры снижает сложность до O(n4). Мы также расширяем наш алгоритм quartic-time в практический парсер с дискриминирующей моделью дезагрегирования и оцениваем его производительность на четырех лингвистических наборах данных, используемых в семантическом парсинге зависимостей.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar fhadhb an Fhoghraif Uasta i bparsáil spleáchais dhomhain. Breithnímid dhá shrian ar ghraif spleáchais dhomhain: (a) trasnú críochphointe 1 agus (b) uimhir leathanaigh-2. Is é an príomhranníocaíocht atá againn ná algartam cruinn a fhaigheann uasfhograif a shásaíonn an dá shrian ag an am céanna in am O(n5). Ina theannta sin, má dhéantar neamhaird de struchtúr amháin atá tearc ó thaobh na teanga de, laghdaítear an chastacht do O(n4). Déanaimid ár n-algartam ceathair-ama a leathnú freisin go parsálaí praiticiúil le múnla dí-athbhrí idirdhealaitheach agus luachálaimid a fheidhmíocht ar cheithre thacar sonraí teangeolaíochta a úsáidtear i bparsáil spleáchais shéimeantach.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα του Μέγιστου Υπογραφήματος στην ανάλυση βαθιάς εξάρτησης. Εξετάζουμε δύο περιορισμούς στα γραφήματα βαθιάς εξάρτησης: (α) διασταύρωση ενός τελικού σημείου και (β) αρίθμηση σελίδων-2. Η κύρια συνεισφορά μας είναι ένας ακριβής αλγόριθμος που επιτυγχάνει τα μέγιστα υπογραφήματα που ικανοποιούν και τους δύο περιορισμούς ταυτόχρονα στο χρόνο Ο(n5). Επιπλέον, αγνοώντας μια γλωσσικά σπάνια δομή μειώνει την πολυπλοκότητα στο Ο(n4). Επίσης επεκτείνουμε τον αλγόριθμό μας σε έναν πρακτικό αναλυτή με ένα διακριτικό μοντέλο αποσαφήνισης και αξιολογούμε την απόδοσή του σε τέσσερα γλωσσικά σύνολα δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται στην ανάλυση σημασιολογικής εξάρτησης.', 'hu': 'A Maximum Subgraph problémát a mély függőség elemzésében tanulmányozzuk. A mély függőségi grafikonok két korlátozását tekintjük meg: (a) 1-végpont-keresztezés és (b) oldalszám-2. Fő hozzájárulásunk egy pontos algoritmus, amely maximális részgráfiákat ér el egyidejűleg mindkét korlátozásnak megfelelő O(n5) időben. Továbbá egy nyelvi szempontból ritka struktúra figyelmen kívül csökkenti a bonyolultságot O(n4). Emellett a kvartikus idő algoritmusunkat egy diszkriminatív egyértelműsítési modellel rendelkező gyakorlati elemzővé bővítjük, és értékeljük teljesítményét négy nyelvi adatkészleten, amelyeket a szemantikai függőség elemzésében használnak.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მაქსიმალური სპეგრაფის პრობლემა გავსწავლობთ ძალიან დაახლოების პანსლიზაციაში. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ორი განსაზღვრებულება დრატების ძალიან დასამხრებულობაში: a) 1-დასრულებული წერტილი და b) წერტილი-2. ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება არის წარმოადგილი ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც მიიღებს მაქსიმალური სპეგრაფიები, რომლებიც ორივე დამატებას ერთადერთად დროში O(n5). დამატებით, ერთი ენგურისტიკური-რეტურიკური სტრუქტურაციას უფრო კომპლექტურებს O(n4). ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი კვარტიკური დროის ალგორიტიმს პრაქტიკური პანსერაციაში დისკრიმინატიური განამბიგუაციის მოდელზე გავაკეთებთ და მისი გამოყენება 4 ენგურისტიკური მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია', 'kk': 'Біз тәуелдік талдау үшін максималдық субграфик мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз терең тәуелсіздік графиктерінің екі шектеулерін: a) 1- аяқтау нүктесі және b) бет нүктесі-2 деп ойлаймыз. Біздің негізгі қатынасыз - O( n5) уақытта екі шектеулерді бір-біріне келтіретін шектеулердің максималдық алгоритм. Сонымен қатар, бір лингвистикалық қызықты құрылғыны елемеу, O( n4) дегенге тәуелсіздігін анықтайды. Сонымен қатар, квартикалық уақыт алгоритмізді дискриминациялық дисамбигуациялық моделі арқылы практикалық талдаушыларға қолданып, семантикалық тәуелдік талдау үшін қолданылатын төрт лингвистикалық деректер жиынына', 'it': "Studiamo il problema del sottografo massimo nell'analisi delle dipendenze profonde. Consideriamo due restrizioni ai grafici di dipendenza profondi: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing e (b) pagenumber-2. Il nostro contributo principale è un algoritmo esatto che ottiene sottografie massime soddisfacendo entrambe le restrizioni contemporaneamente nel tempo O(n5). Inoltre, ignorare una struttura linguisticamente rara riduce la complessità a O(n4). Estendiamo anche il nostro algoritmo quartic-time in un parser pratico con un modello di disambiguazione discriminatorio e ne valutiamo le prestazioni su quattro set di dati linguistici utilizzati nell'analisi semantica delle dipendenze.", 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സുബ്രാഫ് പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള രണ്ട് പരിധികള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു: (a) 1-endepoint-crossing and (b) pagenumber-2. നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പദാര്\u200dത്ഥമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഒരു ഭാഷക്ക് വിട്ടുകളയുന്നത് വിലപിക്കുന്നത് O( N4) ന്റെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണത്തെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ക്വാര്\u200dട്ടിക്ക് സമയത്തെ അല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഒരു പ്രാക്രിക്കല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിലേക്ക് വികസിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസപ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിലേക്ക് വികസിക്ക', 'mt': "Aħna nistudjaw il-problema tas-Subgrafu Massimu fl-analiżi profonda tad-dipendenza. Aħna nqisu żewġ restrizzjonijiet għal grafiċi ta’ dipendenza profonda: (a) qsim ta’ punt ta’ tmiem wieħed u (b) paġna numru-2. Il-kontribuzzjoni ewlenija tagħna hija algoritmu eżatt li jikseb subgrafi massimi li jissodisfaw iż-żewġ restrizzjonijiet simultanjament fiż-żmien O(n5). Barra minn hekk, l-injorazzjoni ta’ struttura waħda lingwistikament rari tnaqqas il-kumplessità għal O(n4). Aħna jestendu wkoll l-algoritmu kwartiku-ħin tagħna f'analizzatur prattiku b'mudell diskriminatorju ta' diżambiguazzjoni u jivvalutaw il-prestazzjoni tiegħu fuq erba' settijiet ta' dejta lingwistika użati fl-analizzazzjoni semantika tad-dipendenza.", 'mn': 'Бид гүн гүнзгий хамааралтай хуваалцааны хамгийн их субграфик асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид гүн гүнзгий хамааралтай график дээр хоёр хязгаарлалт үздэг: a) 1-төгсгөл цэг, b) хуудас-2. Бидний гол түлхүүр нь O(n5) үед хоёр хязгаарлалтыг хангалттай хамгийн их хэмжээний алгоритм юм. Мөн хэл хэлний ховор бүтцийг тодорхойлж байхдаа O(n4) нь цогцыг багасгаж байна. Бид мөн квартик цаг алгоритмыг хуваалцах загвартай практикийн хуваалцагч болгон хуваалцах хэрэгтэй бөгөөд тэдний үйл ажиллагааг semantic dependency parsing дээр хэрэглэгдсэн дөрвөн хэлний өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр үнэлэх хэрэгтэй.', 'no': 'Vi studerer høgste undergrafproblem i dyppa avhengighetstolking. Vi ser på to avgrensingar til dyppa avhengighetsgrafikk: a) 1-endepunktkryssinga og b) sidenummer-2. Vårt hovudbidrag er eit nøyaktig algoritme som får maksimale undergraf som tilfredsstiller begge avgrensingar samtidig i tid O( n5). I tillegg kan du ignorera ein lingvisk-rare struktur skildra kompleksiteten til O(n4). Vi utvidar også kvartisk-tid-algoritme vårt til ein praktisk tolkar med ein diskriminasjonsk disambiguasjonsmodell og evaluerer utviklinga på fire lingviske datasett som brukar i semantisk tolking av avhengighet.', 'ms': 'We study the Maximum Subgraph problem in deep dependency parsing.  Kami mempertimbangkan dua keterangan untuk graf dependensi dalam: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing dan (b) halaman nombor-2. kontribusi utama kita adalah algoritma yang tepat yang memperoleh subgraf maksimum yang memenuhi kedua-dua keterangan secara bersamaan dalam masa O( n5). Selain itu, mengabaikan satu struktur langka-jarang menurunkan kompleksiti ke O( n4). Kami juga memperluas algoritma cuartik-masa kami ke dalam penghurai praktik dengan model tidak ambiguasi diskriminatif dan menilai prestasinya pada empat set data bahasa yang digunakan dalam penghurai dependensi semantik.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem maksymalnego podpisu w analizie głębokiej zależności. Rozważamy dwa ograniczenia dla wykresów głębokich zależności: (a) przekroczenie punktów końcowych i (b) number-2 strony. Naszym głównym wkładem jest dokładny algorytm, który uzyskuje maksymalne podgrafy spełniające oba ograniczenia jednocześnie w czasie O(n5). Ponadto ignorowanie jednej językowo rzadkiej struktury zmniejsza złożoność do O(n4). Rozszerzamy również nasz algorytm czasu kwartycznego na praktyczny parser z dyskryminacyjnym modelem dyskryminacyjnym i oceniamy jego wydajność na czterech zbiorach danych językowych używanych w parsowaniu zależności semantycznej.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema Subgrafului Maxim în analizarea dependenței profunde. Considerăm două restricții pentru graficele de dependență profundă: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing și (b) pagenumber-2. Contribuția noastră principală este un algoritm exact care obține subgrafii maxime care satisfac simultan ambele restricții în timpul O(n5). Mai mult, ignorarea unei structuri rare din punct de vedere lingvistic reduce complexitatea la O(n4). De asemenea, extindem algoritmul nostru quartic-time într-un parser practic cu un model de dezambiguizare discriminatorie și evaluăm performanța acestuia pe patru seturi de date lingvistice utilizate în analizarea dependenței semantice.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem maksimalnog podgrafa u analizu duboke zavisnosti. Smatramo dva ograničenja na grafike duboke zavisnosti: a) prelazak 1-krajnja tačka i b) broj 2. Naš glavni doprinos je tačan algoritam koji dobija maksimalne podgrafe koji istovremeno zadovoljavaju obe ograničenja u vremenu O(n5). Osim toga, ignorisanje jedne lingvistički retke strukture opisuje kompleksnost na O(n4). Također proširimo i naš kvartički vremenski algoritam u praktični analizač sa diskriminacijskim modelom disambiguacije i procjenjujemo njegov učinkovitost na četiri lingvistička seta podataka korištenih u analizanju semantičke zavisnosti.', 'si': 'අපි අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්නේ ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි හිතන්නේ ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලට අවශ්\u200dය දෙකක්: a) 1-අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් සහ b) පැජින්ම අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන සම්බන්ධයක් හරියටම අල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් වෙලාවේ O(n5) දෙන්නම් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරධාන සබෝග්\u200dරාෆ ඒවගේම, භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් අවධානය කරන එකක් නැති විදිහට O(n4) වෙනුවෙන් සංකෘතිය වැඩ කරනවා. අපි අපේ ක්වාර්ටික් වෙලාවේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме проблемот со Максималниот субграф во анализирањето на длабоката зависност. Размислуваме за две ограничувања на графиките за длабока зависност: (a) премин на 1 крајна точка и (b) страница број 2. Нашиот главен придонес е точен алгоритм кој добива максимални субграфи кои ги задоволуваат двете ограничувања истовремено во времето O( n5). Покрај тоа, игнорирањето на една јазички-ретка структура ја намалува комплексноста на O( n4). Ние, исто така, го прошируваме нашиот квартик-временски алгоритм во практичен анализатор со дискриминативен модел на раздвојување и ја проценуваме неговата резултат на четири лингвистички податоци кои се користат за анализирање семантична зависност.', 'so': 'Waxaannu ku baranaynaa dhibaatada ugu badnaanta ee baaritaanka badnaanta ku xiran. We consider two restrictions to deep dependency graphs: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing and (b) pagenumber-2.  Kharashadanada ugu horeeya waa qoraal sax ah oo hela meelaha ugu sareeya oo ku dherga labada xadhig xilliga O(n5). Sidoo kale iska tagista hal dhismo luuqad ah oo aad u sahlan ayaa sameynaya dhibaatada O(n4). Sidoo kale waxaan kaloo ku fidinaynaa algoritheena xiliga quarantiga ah si aan u kala duwan sameyno tusaale baaritaanka kala duwan, waxaana qiimeynaynaa sameyntiisa afarta kooxda macluumaadka ee lagu isticmaalo baaritaanka ku xiran ee semantika.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet Maximum Subgraph i djup beroendetolkning. Vi överväger två begränsningar för djupa beroendegrafer: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing och (b) sidnummer-2. Vårt huvudsakliga bidrag är en exakt algoritm som erhåller maximala subgrafer som uppfyller båda begränsningarna samtidigt i tid O(n5). Om man bortser från en språkligt sällsynt struktur minskar komplexiteten till O(n4). Vi utökar även vår kvartstidsalgoritm till en praktisk parser med en diskriminerande åtskillnadsmodell och utvärderar dess prestanda på fyra språkliga datauppsättningar som används vid semantisk beroendetolkning.', 'lt': 'We study the Maximum Subgraph problem in deep dependency parsing.  Svarstome du gilios priklausomybės grafikų apribojimus: a) 1-galutinis perėjimas ir b) puslapio numeris-2. Mūsų pagrindinis įnašas yra tikslus algoritmas, kuriame gaunami didžiausi paragramai, atitinkantys abu apribojimus tuo pačiu metu O(n5). Be to, ignoruojant vieną kalbos ir retą struktūrą sumažėja kompleksiškumas iki O(n4). Mes taip pat išplečiame savo ketvirčio laiko algoritmą į praktinį analizatorių su diskriminaciniu nedviprasmiškumo modeliu ir vertiname jo rezultatus keturiems kalbiniams duomenų rinkiniams, naudojamiems semantiniam priklausomybės analizavimui.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஆழமான சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாடலில் அதிகபட்ச உப வரைகல் பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம். நாம் ஆழமான சார்பு வரைபடங்களுக்கு இரண்டு கட்டுப்பாடு O( n5) நேரத்தில் இருவரும் எல்லைகளையும் தீர்த்து தீர்வு செய்ய முடியும் அதிகபட்ச உப வரைபடங்களை கிடைக்கும் ஒரு சரியான ஒழ மேலும், ஒரு மொழியில் புறக்கணித்து விடுதல் முக்கியமான கட்டமைப்பை O( n4) க்கு சிக்கலானதை உருவாக்குகிறது. நாம் எங்கள் கார்டிக் நேரத்தை ஒரு செயல்பாட்டில் பிரித்துவிடும் பிரிவினைப்பு மாதிரியில் மற்றும் அதன் செயல்பாட்டை நான்கு மொழிய தரவு அமைப்ப', 'ur': 'ہم عمیق اعتمادی پارسینگ میں سب سے زیادہ زیادہ سپگراف مسئلہ کی تلاش کرتے ہیں. ہم نے دوسری محدودیت کو عمیق اعتمادی گراف کے لئے سمجھ لیا ہے: (a) 1-انڈینٹ-عبور اور (b) پیگنامبر-2. ہمارا اصلی حصہ ایک دقیق الگوریتم ہے جس کے لئے سب سے زیادہ زیر گراف حاصل ہوتے ہیں جو زمانہ O(n5) میں دونوں محدودیتوں کو پورا کرتی ہیں۔ اور ایک زبان سے نادر ساختار کی غفلت کی وجہ سے O(n4) کی پیچیدگی کو دکھاتی ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے چورٹی تایمہ الگوریتم کو ایک قابل پارچر میں پھیلایا ہے جس کے ساتھ تقسیم ناپذیری موڈل کے ساتھ اور اس کی عملکرد چار زبانی ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطابق کرتا ہے جو سیمانٹی اعتمادی پارچر میں استعمال کی جاتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz eng maksimal subgrafik muammolarini o'rganamiz. Biz juda katta qo'llangan grafiklarga ikkita chegaralarni o'ylaymiz: (a) 1- nuqt chegarasi va (b) pagenumber-2. Bizning asosiy qandaydir O( n5) vaqtda ikkita chegaralarni bir xil tartib beradi. Ko'pchilikdan bir tilni o'zgartirish qisqa tuzilishini O( n4) uchun murakkablikni yaratadi. Ko'pchilik vaqt algoritimizni o'zgartirib chiqish modeli bilan o'zgartirib chiqaramiz va semantik tashkilotga ishlatilgan to'rtta lingvistik maʼlumot tarkibini qiymatmiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề cấp độ cao trong phân tích độ phụ thuộc sâu. Chúng tôi xem xét hai giới hạn của biểu đồ lệ thuộc sâu: a) Giao điểm 1 và b) địa điểm 2. Phần đóng góp chính xác của chúng tôi là thuật toán đạt được tối đa chi tiết đáp ứng cả hai giới hạn cùng lúc với thời gian O.n. Hơn nữa, lờ đi một cấu trúc ngôn ngữ học hiếm sẽ làm tăng sự phức tạp của O(N) Chúng ta cũng mở rộng thuật toán giờ tứ của chúng ta thành một phân tích thực tế với mô hình biến đổi lệch lạc và đánh giá khả năng của nó trên bốn bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ được sử dụng trong phân tích độ quan.', 'bg': 'Ние изучаваме проблема с Максималната субграфа в дълбоко анализиране на зависимост. Разглеждаме две ограничения към графиките за дълбока зависимост: (а) кръстосване на 1 крайна точка и б) брой страници-2. Нашият основен принос е точен алгоритъм, който получава максимални подграфи, отговарящи на двете ограничения едновременно във времето О(n5). Освен това игнорирането на една лингвистично рядка структура намалява сложността до О(n4). Също така разширяваме нашия алгоритъм за квартично време в практичен анализатор с дискриминативен модел за разграничаване и оценяваме ефективността му върху четири езикови набора от данни, използвани в анализа на семантична зависимост.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen het Maximum Subgraph probleem in deep dependence parsing. We beschouwen twee beperkingen voor diepe afhankelijkheidsgrafieken: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing en (b) paginanumber-2. Onze belangrijkste bijdrage is een exact algoritme dat maximale subgrafieken verkrijgt die voldoen aan beide beperkingen tegelijkertijd in tijd O(n5). Bovendien vermindert het negeren van één taalkundig zeldzame structuur de complexiteit tot O(n4). We breiden ons kwartic-time algoritme ook uit tot een praktische parser met een discriminatief disambiguatiemodel en evalueren de prestaties ervan op vier linguïstische datasets die worden gebruikt in semantische afhankelijkheidsparsing.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem maksimalnog podgrafa u analiziranju duboke zavisnosti. Smatramo dva ograničenja na grafike duboke zavisnosti: a) prelazak 1-krajnja to čka i b) broj broja 2. Naš glavni doprinos je tačan algoritam koji dobija maksimalne podgrafe koji istovremeno zadovoljavaju oba ograničenja u vrijeme O(n5). Osim toga, ignoriranje jedne lingvistički retke strukture opisuje kompleksnost na O(n4). Također proširimo i naš kvartički vremenski algoritam u praktični analizač s diskriminacijskim modelom disambiguacije i procjenjujemo svoj učinkovitost na četiri lingvistička seta podataka korištenih u analizanju semantičke zavisnosti.', 'da': 'Vi studerer problemet Maximum Subgraph i dyb afhængighed parsing. Vi overvejer to begrænsninger til dybe afhængighedsgrafer: (a) 1-endpoint-krydsning og (b) sidenummer-2. Vores vigtigste bidrag er en nøjagtig algoritme, der opnår maksimale subgrafer, der opfylder begge begrænsninger samtidigt i tid O(n5). Hvis man ignorerer en sprogligt sjælden struktur, reduceres kompleksiteten til O(n4). Vi udvider også vores kvart-tid algoritme til en praktisk fortolker med en diskriminerende adskillelsesmodel og evaluerer dens ydeevne på fire sproglige datasæt, der anvendes i semantisk afhængighedsanalyse.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Maximum Subgraph Problem in Deep Dependency Parsing. Wir betrachten zwei Einschränkungen für tiefe Abhängigkeitsdiagramme: (a) 1-Endpunkt-Crossing und (b) pagenumber-2. Unser Hauptbeitrag ist ein exakter Algorithmus, der maximale Subgraphen erhält, die beide Einschränkungen gleichzeitig in der Zeit O(n5) erfüllen. Darüber hinaus reduziert das Ignorieren einer linguistisch seltenen Struktur die Komplexität auf O(n4). Darüber hinaus erweitern wir unseren Quartic-Time Algorithmus zu einem praktischen Parser mit einem diskriminierenden Disambiguationsmodell und bewerten seine Leistung auf vier linguistischen Datensätzen, die in der semantischen Abhängigkeitsparsing verwendet werden.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah Subgraf Maksimum dalam penghuraian dependensi dalam. Kami mempertimbangkan dua batasan untuk grafik dependensi dalam: (a) 1-endpoint-crossing dan (b) pagenumber-2. Kontribusi utama kami adalah algoritma yang tepat yang mendapatkan subgraf maksimum yang memenuhi kedua batasan secara bersamaan dalam waktu O(n5). Selain itu, mengabaikan satu struktur langka-langka mengurangi kompleksitas ke O(n4). Kami juga memperluas algoritma waktu-kuartik kami ke dalam parser praktis dengan model diskriminatif desambiguasi dan mengevaluasi prestasinya pada empat set data bahasa yang digunakan dalam parsing dependensi semantis.', 'ko': '우리는 깊이 의존 분석 중의 가장 큰 자도 문제를 연구했다.우리는 깊이 의존도에 대한 두 가지 제한을 고려합니다: (a)1-단점 교차와 (b)pagenumber-2.우리의 주요 공헌은 시간 O(n5)에서 이 두 가지 제한을 만족시키는 최대 서브맵의 정확한 알고리즘을 동시에 얻는 것이다.그 밖에 언어상에서 보기 드문 구조를 소홀히 하면 복잡성을 O(n4)로 낮출 수 있다.우리는 또한 우리의 네 차례 시간 알고리즘을 판별 소차 모델을 가진 실용 해석기로 확장하고 의미 의존 해석에 사용되는 네 가지 언어 데이터 집합에서 그 성능을 평가했다.', 'af': "Ons studeer die Maksimum Subgraafprobleem in diep afhanklikheid verwerking. Ons besluit twee beperking na diep afhanklikheidsgrafieke: (a) 1-eindpunt-kruissing en (b) bladsy-nommer-2. Ons hoofbydrang is 'n presies algoritme wat maksimale subgraaf kry wat beide beperking samekoms in tyd O(n5) verskaf. Ook, die ignorering van een lingwisiese-selfde struktuur verkry die kompleksiteit tot O(n4). Ons uitbrei ook ons quartik-tyd algoritme in 'n praktiese ontwerker met 'n diskriminasieële ontsamming model en evalueer sy prestasie op vier lingvisiese data stelle wat gebruik word in semantiese afhanklikheidverwerking.", 'tr': 'Biz çulyk baglançylyk ayırmasynda iň kop grafik meselesini öwrenýärdik. Biz derin baglanylyk grafiklerine iki çykyş pikir edýäris: (a) 1-eýguny geçirmek we (b) sany-2 Biziň esasy goşulygymyz, O(n5) wagtynda hemme diňe maksimal grafikleri bolan algoritmdyr. Daha-da, lingwistiki nadir strukturyň ýok bolmagynyň O(n4) bilen gaty kynçylyklygyny azaltýar. Biz de kvartik wagtlarymyzyň algoritmini diskrimin çykarma modeli bilen praktik bir çözümlere uzatıp, semantik bağlılık parslamada kullanılan dört dil veri setlerini deňleýäris', 'sw': 'Tunafoma tatizo la Kuu la Ujumbe katika kuimba kituo kinachotegemea sana. Tunaona vizuizi viwili vya kutegemea picha za deep dependency: (a) kupita hatua ya mwisho 1 na (b) pagenumber-2. Mchango wetu mkuu ni utambulisho sahihi ambao unapata vifaa vya juu vinavyoridhisha vizuizi vyote kwa wakati wa O(n5). Zaidi ya hayo, kuacha muundo mmoja wa lugha nadra unaunda utata wa O(n4). Pia tunaongeza utaratibu wetu wa muda wa nne katika mchambuzi wa mazoea na modeli ya ubaguzi wa rangi na kutathmini ufanisi wake katika seti za takwimu nne za lugha zinazotumiwa katika parge ya kutegemea kwa ajili ya kimapenzi.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք Մաքսիմալ ենթագրաֆի խնդիրը խորը կախվածության վերլուծում: Մենք դիտարկում ենք երկու սահմանափակում խորը կախվածության գրաֆիկներին. a) 1-վերջնական կետի խաչը և b) էջի թվային 2: Մեր հիմնական ներդրումը ճշգրիտ ալգորիթմն է, որը ստանում է մեծագույն ենթագրաֆիկներ, որոնք բավարարում են երկու սահմանափակումները միաժամանակ ժամանակում O(n 5). Ավելին, մի լեզվաբանական-հազվադեպ կառուցվածք անտեսելը նվազեցնում է բարդությունը O(n 4). Մենք նաև ընդլայնում ենք մեր չորրորդ ժամանակային ալգորիթմը դեպի գործնական վերլուծողներ, որոնք ունեն խտրականորեն բացատրող մոդել և գնահատում են դրա արտադրողությունը չորս լեզվաբանական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք օգտագործվում են սեմանտիկ կա', 'sq': 'We study the Maximum Subgraph problem in deep dependency parsing.  Ne konsiderojmë dy kufizime ndaj grafikëve të varësisë së thellë: (a) kalimi i pikës së fundit dhe (b) faqe numër-2. Kontributi ynë kryesor është një algoritëm i saktë që merr subgrafi maksimale që përmbushin të dy kufizimet njëkohësisht në kohë O(n5). Përveç kësaj, injorimi i një strukture gjuhësore-të rrallë zvogëlon kompleksitetin në O(n4). Ne gjithashtu zgjerojmë algoritmin tonë të kohës katërore në një analizues praktik me një model diskriminues të çambiguacionit dhe vlerësojmë performancën e tij në katër grupe të dhënash gjuhësore të përdorura në analizimin semantik të varësisë.', 'am': 'We study the Maximum Subgraph problem in deep dependency parsing.  የሁለት ጥልቅ ጥልቅ የአደባባይ ቀለሞች መቆጣጠርን እንቆጥራለን:(a) 1-Endpoint-cross (b) pagenumber-2. የዋነታችን አቀማመጥ በO(n5) ጊዜ በሁለቱ ግንኙነቶችን በመጠቀም የሚጠቅምበት መዝገብ ማድረግ አቅራቢ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አንድን ቋንቋ-አካላዊ ግንኙነት ወደ O(n4) ጥቅሙን ይፈጥራል፡፡ እና የክፍለ ዘመን ዓልgoritማችንን በተለያዩ አካባቢ ሞዴል እናሰፋታለን እና በአራቱ ቋንቋዊ ዳታዎችን በsemantic የታመነ ፓርቲ ውስጥ በተጠቃሚ የዳታ ማዕከል ላይ እናስተውላለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা গভীর নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং এ সর্বোচ্চ সাবগ্রাফ সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি। আমরা গভীর নির্ভরশীল গ্রাফের জন্য দুটি নিষেধাজ্ঞা বিবেচনা করি (a) ১-শেষ বিন্দু পাশ করা এবং (b) প্যাগনম্বার-২ আমাদের প্রধান অবদান হচ্ছে যথেষ্ট অ্যালগরিদম যা সর্বোচ্চ সাবগ্রাফ পেয়েছে এবং একই সাথে O(n5) সময়ে দুটো সীমাবদ্ধতাকে পূ এছাড়াও, ভাষাভাষায় একটি বিদায়-রূপান্তরিক কাঠামোর উপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে ও(এন৪) এর জটিলতা তৈরি করে। এছাড়াও আমরা আমাদের কোয়ার্টিক-টাইম অ্যালগরিদমকে একটি প্রাক্তনিক বিভিন্ন বৈষম্যের মডেলে বাড়িয়ে দেই এবং সেমেন্টিক নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং এ ব্যবহার কর', 'fa': 'ما مشکل بزرگترین زیر گراف را در تقسیم بستگی عمیق مطالعه می کنیم. ما دو محدودیت برای گرافهای بستگی عمیق را در نظر می گیریم: (a) عبور کردن یک نقطه پایان و (b) عدد پایان-2. دسترسی اصلی ما الگوریتم دقیق است که بالاترین زیر گراف\u200cها را می\u200cگیرد که در زمان O(n5) هر دو محدودیت را همزمان می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، نادیده گرفتن یک ساختار زبانی نادر پیچیدگی به O(n4) کاهش می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین الگوریتم چهارچهار زمان را به یک بازیگر کاری با یک مدل تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر دهنده و عملکرد آن را بر چهار مجموعه داده\u200cهای زبان استفاده می\u200cکنیم در بازیگر بستگی semantic.', 'ca': "Estudem el problema del Subgràfic Màxim en l'analització profunda de dependencies. Considerem dues restriccions a gràfics de profunda dependència: a) cruzament de 1 punt final i b) pàgina número 2. La nostra contribució principal és un algoritme exacte que obté subgràfics màxims que satisfen ambdues restriccions simultàneament al temps O(n5). A més, ignorar una estructura lingüísticament rara redueix la complexitat a O(n4). També estendem el nostre algoritme de temps càrtic en un analitzador pràctic amb un model discriminatiu de desambiguació i evaluem el seu rendiment en quatre conjunts de dades lingüístices utilitzats en l'analització semàntica de dependencies.", 'cs': 'Studujeme problém Maximum Subgraph v hluboké analýze závislosti. Zvažujeme dvě omezení hluboké závislosti grafů: (a) překročení jednoho koncového bodu a (b) číslo stránek-2. Naším hlavním přínosem je přesný algoritmus, který získává maximální podgrafy splňující oba omezení současně v čase O(n5). Navíc ignorování jedné lingvisticky vzácné struktury snižuje složitost na O(n4). Rozšiřujeme náš kvarticko-časový algoritmus do praktického parseru s diskriminačním disambiguačním modelem a hodnotíme jeho výkon na čtyřech jazykových datových sadách používaných při analýze sémantické závislosti.', 'et': 'Me uurime maksimaalse alamgraafi probleemi sügava sõltuvuse parsimisel. Me kaalume kahte piirangut sõltuvusgraafikutele: (a) 1-lõpp-ristamine ja (b) leheküljenumber-2. Meie peamine panus on täpne algoritm, mis saavutab maksimaalsed alamgraafid, mis vastavad mõlemale piirangule samaaegselt ajas O(n5). Lisaks vähendab keeleliselt haruldase struktuuri eiramine keerukust O(n4). Lisaks laiendame kvartilise aja algoritmi praktiliseks parseriks diskrimineeriva eristusmudeliga ja hindame selle jõudlust neljal semantilise sõltuvuse parsimisel kasutataval keelelisel andmekogumil.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme Maximum Subgraph -ongelmaa syväriippuvuuden jäsentämisessä. Tarkastelemme kahta syvän riippuvuuden graafien rajoitusta: (a) 1-päätepisteen risteys ja (b) sivunumero-2. Pääasiallinen panoksemme on tarkka algoritmi, joka saa aikaan maksimaaliset aligraafit, jotka täyttävät molemmat rajoitukset samanaikaisesti ajassa O(n5). Lisäksi yhden kielitieteellisesti harvinaisen rakenteen huomiotta jättäminen vähentää monimutkaisuutta muotoon O(n4). Laajennamme kvartiaikaalgoritmimme käytännölliseksi jäsentäjäksi diskriminatiivisella erottelumallilla ja arvioimme sen suorituskykyä neljällä semanttisen riippuvuuden jäsentämisessä käytetyllä kielellisellä datajoukolla.', 'az': 'Biz böyük bağımlılıq ayırmasında Maximum Subgraph problemini öyrənirik. Biz derin b a ğımlılıq grafiklərinə iki dəstək düşünürük: a) 1-qiymət noktası keçməsi və b) sayı-2. Bizim başqa qismətimiz O(n5) vaxtında hər ikisini müəyyən edən maksimum apagrafları almaq üçün tam bir algoritmdir. Daha sonra, bir dil-nadir yapısını görmək O(n4) ilə kompleksitini azaldır. Biz həmçin in kvartik-zamanlı algoritmümüzü həmçinin həmçinin diskriminasiyyətli disambiguasyon modeli ilə praktik analizacıya uzadırıq və semantik bağımlılıq analizacında kullanılan dörd dil veri qurğularını değerləşdiririk.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem maksimalnog podgrafa u analizu duboke zavisnosti. Smatramo dva ograničenja na grafike duboke zavisnosti: a) prelazak 1-krajnja tačka i b) broj 2. Naš glavni doprinos je tačan algoritam koji dobija maksimalne podgrafe koji istovremeno zadovoljavaju oba ograničenja u vrijeme O(n5). Osim toga, ignoriranje jedne lingvistički retke strukture opisuje kompleksnost na O(n4). Također proširimo i naš kvartički vremenski algoritam u praktični analizač sa diskriminacijskim modelom disambiguacije i procjenjujemo njegov učinkovitost na četiri lingvistička seta podataka korištenih u analizanju semantičke zavisnosti.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 ngerasai pertualisi kapan aparan nggawe 2 Ndoleh sing penyu kelas kuwi Algorithm sing gak bener iki, iso nggawe duluran segala saiki nguasai perusahaan sampeyan O(n5). Laptop" and "Desktop We tambah jewis kelompok tanggal karcismo -time Algorithm nganggo kelompok urik dh챕w챕, nik nggawe barang sistem pakan dh챕w챕 urik dh챕w챕. Dawisan ngendalikno dh챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 berartik nggawe barang sematik dipunang챕 cara-urik dh챕w챕.', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של התחתית המקסימלית בעבודת התלויות עמוקה. אנחנו שוקלים שני מגבלות לגרפים של תלויות עמוקות: a) חצית נקודת סוף 1 ו (b) עמוד מספר 2. התרומה העיקרית שלנו היא אלגוריתם מדויק שמקבל תת-גרפים מקסימליים שמסכימים את שני ההגבלות באותו הזמן O( n5). חוץ מזה, להתעלם ממבנה אחד נדיר-שפתי משפיל את המורכבות ל O( n4). אנחנו גם ממשיכים את אלגוריתם הזמן הקוורטי שלנו למחקר מעשי עם מודל ניתוח ביטחון מיוחד ולעריך את ההופעה שלה על ארבעה קבוצות נתונים שפותיים שמשתמשים במחקר התלויות סמנטית.', 'ha': "Munã karãtun matabbatar Subgraph da ke cikin pargarin da ke da inganci. Mu ƙaddara hanyõyi biyu zuwa grafyutan da ke cikin baka: (a) mai ƙaranci-1 da (b) pagennamer-2. Bayanmu na ƙari yana da algoritri mai kamid da za'a sami biyu a lokacin O(n5). Kayya, kuma idan an kiyaye wata cikin harshen-na'ura, yana ƙididdige adadin zuwa O(n4). Kayya, muna shimfiɗa algorityinmu kan wani mai fassari na fasalin da wata misãlai mai rarraba, kuma munã ƙidãya fassararsa a kan dangiyar turanci huɗu da aka yi amfani da cikin parse na semantic.", 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem Maksimalnega podgrafa pri razčlenitvi globoke odvisnosti. Upoštevamo dve omejitvi za grafe globoke odvisnosti: (a) križanje 1 končne točke in (b) število strani-2. Naš glavni prispevek je natančen algoritem, ki pridobi največje podgrafe, ki hkrati izpolnjujeta obe omejitvi v času O(n5). Poleg tega ignoriranje ene jezikovno redke strukture zmanjšuje kompleksnost v O(n4). Naš kvartni časovni algoritem razširimo tudi v praktičen razčlenjevalnik z diskriminativnim razločevalnim modelom in ocenimo njegovo učinkovitost na štirih jezikovnih naborih podatkov, ki se uporabljajo pri razčlenjevanju semantične odvisnosti.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཆེས་ཤོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་མ་ཟད། ང་ཚོས་ཟིན་བྲིས་པའི་རྩིས་ཐོའི་ནང་དུ་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གཉིས་ལ་བསམ་བཞིན། ང་ཚོའི་རྩ་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་དེ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིག་རྩེད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག ད་དུང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཀྱང་དབང་ཆ་གཅིག་ལ་སྣང་མེད་པ་དེ་གིས་O(n4)དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བ་བསྐྱེད་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཕུད་དུས་ཚོད་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་འཇུག་པ་ལས་སྡོད་རུང་བའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ཅིག་ལ་ཁྱད་ནས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཞིན'}
{'en': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'ar': 'التعلم متعدد المهام شبه الخاضع للإشراف لتمييز التسلسل', 'es': 'Aprendizaje multitarea semisupervisado para el etiquetado de secuencias', 'fr': "Apprentissage multitâche semi-supervisé pour l'étiquetage des séquences", 'pt': 'Aprendizado multitarefa semi-supervisionado para rotulagem de sequência', 'ja': 'シーケンスラベリングのための半監督型マルチタスク学習', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के लिए अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित मल्टीटास्क लर्निंग', 'zh': '以序标者半督多任务学', 'ru': 'Полунадзорное многозадачное обучение для маркировки последовательностей', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Iltascanna leathmhaoirsithe le haghaidh Lipéadú Seicheamh', 'ka': 'ნახევარჯერი მონახვა მრავალური დასწავლობა', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt többfeladatú tanulás a sorozatcímkézéshez', 'el': 'Ημι-εποπτευόμενη εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για τη σήμανση ακολουθίας', 'it': "Multitask Learning semi-supervisionato per l'etichettatura di sequenza", 'kk': 'Көптеген көптеген тапсырманың жарлығын жарты бақылау', 'lt': 'Pusiaus prižiūrimas daugiafunkcinis mokymasis sekos ženklinimui', 'mk': 'Половина надгледувано Multitask Learning for Sequence Labelling', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Tugas Berlipat Semi-Dijaga untuk Label Kelajuan', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലാബിലിംഗിനുള്ള മണ്ണി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട Multitask Learning', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Multikompiti Semissorveljat għat-Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Дараагийн лабораторийн талаар ажилласан олон ажил суралцах', 'no': 'Halvoversikt multioppgåver- læring for sekvensetiketting', 'pl': 'Pół-nadzorowane wielozadaniowe uczenie się w zakresie etykietowania sekwencji', 'ro': 'Învățare multifuncțională semi-supervizată pentru etichetarea secvențelor', 'sr': 'Polovično nadgledano učenje multitask za označavanje sekvence', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරමය ලේබිලින් වෙනුවෙන් බාධාරණ වැඩි වැඩි කාර්ය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'sv': 'Halvövervakad flerfunktionsinlärning för sekvensmärkning', 'ta': 'தொடர் லாபிலிங்குக்கான பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட பல்வேலை படிப்பு', 'ur': 'سکوئنس لابلینگ کے لئے نصف نظارت کی Multitask Learning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết đa năng giám sát', 'hr': 'Polovično nadgledano učenje multitask za označavanje sekvence', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Leren voor Sequence Labeling', 'da': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'bg': 'Полунадзорно многозадачично обучение за етикетиране на последователности', 'de': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Learning für Sequence Labeling', 'id': 'Hali-supervised Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'ko': '시퀀스 표시의 반감독 멀티퀘스트 학습', 'sw': 'Kusoma kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Kufuatiliwa', 'sq': 'Mësimi i shumëdetyrave me mbikqyrje gjysmë për etiketën e sekuencës', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության պիտակ սովորելը', 'tr': 'Orta gözlemli Çoklu Taýça Öwrenmek', 'az': 'Yar캼-g칬zl톛yirli Multitask 칐yr톛nm톛si Sequence Labelini', 'af': 'Half-superviseer Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'bs': 'Polovično nadgledano učenje multitask za označavanje sekvence', 'ca': 'Semi-supervised Multitask Learning for Sequence Labeling', 'et': 'Pooljuhendatud mitmeülesandeõpe järjestuse märgistamiseks', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স লাবেলিং এর জন্য মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা', 'fa': 'یادگیری زیادی از نیمه مراقبت برای برچسب برچسب', 'fi': 'Semi-ohjattu monitehtävä oppiminen sekvenssimerkintöjä varten', 'cs': 'Víceúlohové učení s polovičním dohledem pro sekvenční označování', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'למידת משימות רבות שמבוטחת בחצי', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovano večopravilno učenje za označevanje zaporedja', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་ལྟ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་པའི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལས་རྗེས་སྟངས་བསྟར་ན།'}
{'en': 'We propose a sequence labeling framework with a secondary training objective, learning to predict surrounding words for every word in the dataset. This language modeling objective incentivises the system to learn general-purpose patterns of semantic and syntactic composition, which are also useful for improving accuracy on different sequence labeling tasks. The architecture was evaluated on a range of datasets, covering the tasks of error detection in learner texts, named entity recognition, chunking and POS-tagging. The novel language modeling objective provided consistent performance improvements on every benchmark, without requiring any additional annotated or unannotated data.', 'ar': 'نقترح إطار عمل لوضع العلامات على التسلسل بهدف تدريب ثانوي ، حيث نتعلم التنبؤ بالكلمات المحيطة لكل كلمة في مجموعة البيانات. يحفز هدف نمذجة اللغة النظام على تعلم أنماط الأغراض العامة للتكوين الدلالي والنحوي ، والتي تعد مفيدة أيضًا لتحسين الدقة في مهام تصنيف التسلسل المختلفة. تم تقييم البنية على مجموعة من مجموعات البيانات ، تغطي مهام اكتشاف الأخطاء في نصوص المتعلم ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة ، والتقسيم ، وعلامات نقاط البيع. قدم هدف نمذجة اللغة الجديدة تحسينات متسقة في الأداء على كل معيار ، دون الحاجة إلى أي بيانات إضافية مشروحة أو غير مشروحة.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un cadre d'étiquetage de séquence avec un objectif de formation secondaire, apprendre à prédire les mots environnants pour chaque mot de l'ensemble de données. Cet objectif de modélisation du langage incite le système à apprendre des modèles généraux de composition sémantique et syntaxique, qui sont également utiles pour améliorer la précision des différentes tâches d'étiquetage de séquences. L'architecture a été évaluée sur une série de jeux de données, couvrant les tâches de détection d'erreurs dans les textes des apprenants, de reconnaissance d'entités nommées, de segmentation et de marquage POS. Le nouvel objectif de modélisation du langage a permis d'améliorer les performances de manière cohérente sur chaque référence, sans nécessiter de données annotées ou non annotées supplémentaires.", 'es': 'Proponemos un marco de etiquetado de secuencias con un objetivo de entrenamiento secundario, aprender a predecir las palabras circundantes para cada palabra del conjunto de datos. Este objetivo de modelado del lenguaje incentiva al sistema a aprender patrones de composición semántica y sintáctica de propósito general, que también son útiles para mejorar la precisión en diferentes tareas de etiquetado de secuencias. La arquitectura se evaluó en una serie de conjuntos de datos, que abarcaban las tareas de detección de errores en los textos de los alumnos, reconocimiento de entidades denominadas, fragmentación y etiquetado POS. El novedoso objetivo de modelado del lenguaje proporcionó mejoras consistentes en el rendimiento de cada punto de referencia, sin necesidad de ningún dato adicional anotado o no anotado.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma estrutura de rotulagem de sequência com um objetivo de treinamento secundário, aprendendo a prever palavras circundantes para cada palavra no conjunto de dados. Esse objetivo de modelagem de linguagem incentiva o sistema a aprender padrões de propósito geral de composição semântica e sintática, que também são úteis para melhorar a precisão em diferentes tarefas de rotulagem de sequência. A arquitetura foi avaliada em uma variedade de conjuntos de dados, abrangendo as tarefas de detecção de erros em textos de alunos, reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas, agrupamento e marcação de POS. O novo objetivo de modelagem de linguagem forneceu melhorias consistentes de desempenho em todos os benchmarks, sem exigir dados adicionais anotados ou não anotados.', 'ja': '私たちは、データセット内のすべての単語の周囲の単語を予測することを学び、二次的なトレーニング目標を持つシーケンスラベリングフレームワークを提案します。この言語モデリングの目的は、異なるシーケンスラベリングタスクの精度を向上させるのにも役立つ、意味的および構文的構成の汎用パターンを学習するシステムを奨励する。アーキテクチャは、学習者テキストのエラー検出、名前付きエンティティ認識、チャンキング、POSタグ付けのタスクをカバーする、さまざまなデータセット上で評価されました。新規の言語モデリング目標は、追加の注釈付きまたは注釈なしのデータを必要とせずに、すべてのベンチマークで一貫したパフォーマンス向上を提供しました。', 'zh': '序序标框架,学占集单词单词。 其言建模激厉统学语义与句法合式,于高第之准确性亦有用也。 当架构列数集上评估,涵盖学者文本之谬检,命以实体识之,分块与POS标记等事。 新语建模准试一体,无所注数。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем структуру маркировки последовательностей со вторичной целью обучения, обучение прогнозированию окружающих слов для каждого слова в наборе данных. Эта цель языкового моделирования стимулирует систему к изучению шаблонов общего назначения семантического и синтаксического состава, которые также полезны для повышения точности при различных задачах маркировки последовательностей. Архитектура оценивалась на ряде наборов данных, охватывающих задачи обнаружения ошибок в обучаемых текстах, распознавания именованных сущностей, группировки и POS-тегов. Цель моделирования нового языка обеспечивала последовательное улучшение производительности по каждому эталону, не требуя каких-либо дополнительных аннотированных или неаннотированных данных.', 'hi': 'हम एक माध्यमिक प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य के साथ एक अनुक्रम लेबलिंग ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, डेटासेट में हर शब्द के लिए आसपास के शब्दों की भविष्यवाणी करना सीखते हैं। यह भाषा मॉडलिंग उद्देश्य सिस्टम को शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक संरचना के सामान्य उद्देश्य पैटर्न सीखने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करता है, जो विभिन्न अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्यों पर सटीकता में सुधार के लिए भी उपयोगी हैं। आर्किटेक्चर का मूल्यांकन डेटासेट की एक श्रृंखला पर किया गया था, जिसमें शिक्षार्थी ग्रंथों में त्रुटि का पता लगाने के कार्यों को शामिल किया गया था, जिसे एंटिटी मान्यता, चंकिंग और पीओएस-टैगिंग नाम दिया गया था। उपन्यास भाषा मॉडलिंग उद्देश्य ने किसी भी अतिरिक्त एनोटेट या अननोटेटेड डेटा की आवश्यकता के बिना, प्रत्येक बेंचमार्क पर लगातार प्रदर्शन सुधार प्रदान किए।', 'ga': 'Molaimid seicheamh creat lipéadaithe le cuspóir oiliúna tánaisteach, ag foghlaim conas na focail máguaird a thuar le haghaidh gach focal sa tacar sonraí. Spreagann an cuspóir samhaltaithe teanga seo an córas chun patrúin ilfhóinteach a fhoghlaim maidir le comhdhéanamh séimeantach agus comhréire, atá úsáideach freisin chun cruinneas tascanna lipéadaithe seichimh éagsúla a fheabhsú. Rinneadh an ailtireacht a mheas ar raon tacar sonraí, a chlúdaigh na tascanna a bhaineann le hearráid a bhrath i dtéacsanna foghlaimeora, aithint aonáin ainmnithe, smután agus clibeáil POS. Chuir an cuspóir samhaltaithe teanga núíosach feabhsuithe feidhmíochta comhsheasmhacha ar fáil ar gach tagarmharc, gan aon sonraí breise anótáilte nó neamhótáilte a cheangal.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გვეძლევა სკენესური მარტივის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია, მეორე მარტივის მიზეზი, სწავლობა, რომ ყველა სიტყვის საკუთარი ეს ენის მოდელირების მიზეზი სისტემის საერთო მიზეზი სიმანტიკური და სინტაქტიკური კომპოზიციის სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად არქტიქტიკატი მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით აღმოჩენა, მასწავლებელი ტექსტში შეცდომა განსაზღვრებით, სახელი ინტერტიკატის განსაცემებით, გადაწყალებით პრომენტური ენის მოდელირების მიზეზი ყველა მნიშვნელობის კონსტენტური კონფიგურაციას დაახლოებით, არც უნდა დაახლოებით ანოტირებული ან არახლოებით მონაცემებ', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy másodlagos képzési céllal rendelkező szekvencia-címkézési keretrendszert, amely megtanulja előrejelezni a környező szavakat az adatkészletben található minden szó esetében. Ez a nyelvmodellezési célkitűzés ösztönzi a rendszert arra, hogy megtanulják a szemantikai és szintaktikus kompozíció általános célú mintáit, amelyek szintén hasznosak a különböző szekvencia címkézési feladatok pontosságának javításához. Az architektúrát számos adatkészleten értékelték, amelyek magukban foglalták a tanulói szövegek hibaészlelésének feladatait, a nevezett entitás felismerését, a darabolást és a POS-címkézést. Az új nyelvmodellezési célkitűzés minden referenciaértéken következetes teljesítményfejlesztést biztosított, anélkül, hogy további jegyzetelt vagy jelöletlen adatokat igényelne.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο σήμανσης ακολουθίας με δευτεροβάθμιο εκπαιδευτικό στόχο, μαθαίνοντας να προβλέπουν τις γύρω λέξεις για κάθε λέξη στο σύνολο δεδομένων. Αυτός ο στόχος γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης ενθαρρύνει το σύστημα να μάθει γενικά πρότυπα σημασιολογικής και συντακτικής σύνθεσης, τα οποία είναι επίσης χρήσιμα για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας σε διάφορες εργασίες μαρκαρίσματος ακολουθίας. Η αρχιτεκτονική αξιολογήθηκε σε μια σειρά από σύνολα δεδομένων, καλύπτοντας τις εργασίες ανίχνευσης σφαλμάτων στα κείμενα των μαθητών, αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων, τμηματοποίησης και σήμανσης. Ο νέος στόχος μοντελοποίησης γλωσσών παρείχε συνεπείς βελτιώσεις απόδοσης σε κάθε σημείο αναφοράς, χωρίς να απαιτεί πρόσθετα σχολιασμένα ή μη σημειωμένα δεδομένα.', 'it': "Proponiamo un framework di etichettatura sequenziale con un obiettivo di formazione secondario, imparando a prevedere le parole circostanti per ogni parola nel dataset. Questo obiettivo di modellazione del linguaggio incentiva il sistema ad apprendere modelli generali di composizione semantica e sintattica, utili anche per migliorare l'accuratezza su diverse attività di etichettatura delle sequenze. L'architettura è stata valutata su una serie di set di dati, che coprono le attività di rilevamento degli errori nei testi degli studenti, riconoscimento delle entità denominate, chunking e POS-tagging. Il nuovo obiettivo di modellazione del linguaggio ha fornito miglioramenti costanti delle prestazioni su ogni benchmark, senza richiedere ulteriori dati annotati o non notati.", 'kk': 'Біз екінші оқыту мақсатымен реттеу жарлықты жарлықтың фреймін ұсынамыз, деректер қорындағы әрбір сөздерді таңдау үшін үйренеміз. Бұл тілді моделдеу мақсатты жүйеңізге семантикалық және синтактикалық құрылғының жалпы мақсатты үлгілерін үйрену үшін көмектеседі. Бұл жүйеңізге әртүрлі реттеу тапсырмаларын жасау ү Архитектура бірнеше деректер қорларында бағалады, оқытушы мәтіндерінде қате тапсырмаларды, аталған нысандарды анықтау, бөлімі және POS- тегтерінде тапсырмаларды табу. Роман тілдерді моделдеу мақсатында барлық белгілерде тұрақты жақсартуларды жақсарту керек, ешбір қосымша белгіленген не белгілмеген деректерді талап етпейді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome eilės ženklinimo sistemą su vidurinio mokymo tikslu, mokytis prognozuoti aplinkinius žodžius kiekvienam duomenų rinkinio žodžiui. Šis kalbų modeliavimo tikslas skatina sistemą mokytis semantinės ir sintaktinės sudėties bendrųjų tikslų modelių, kurie taip pat yra naudingi siekiant pagerinti tikslumą įvairiose sekos ženklinimo užduotyse. Arhitektūra buvo vertinama įvairiais duomenų rinkiniais, apimančiais klaidų nustatymo mokymosi tekstuose užduotis, pavadinimą subjekto pripažinimu, dalijimu ir POS ženklinimu. The novel language modeling objective provided consistent performance improvements on every benchmark, without requiring any additional annotated or unannotated data.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме рамка за означување на секвенца со средна обука, учење да предвидува околни зборови за секој збор во податоците. Оваа објектива за моделирање на јазикот го охрабрува системот да научи шаблони со генерална цел на семантична и синтактичка композиција, кои исто така се корисни за подобрување на прецизноста на различните задачи за означување на секвенца. Архитектурата беше проценета на голем број податоци, кои ги покриваат задачите за детекција на грешки во текстовите на учениците, препознавањето на ентитетите, парчиња и POS- означување. Објективата за моделирање на новиот јазик обезбеди константни подобрувања на перформансата на секоја референтна оценка, без да бара дополнителни анотирани или незабележани податоци.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan rangkaian label dengan objektif latihan sekunder, belajar untuk meramalkan perkataan sekeliling untuk setiap perkataan dalam set data. Objektif pemodelan bahasa ini mendorong sistem untuk belajar corak-tujuan umum komposisi semantik dan sintaktik, yang juga berguna untuk meningkatkan ketepatan pada tugas label urutan berbeza. Arkitektur diteliti pada julat set data, meliputi tugas pengesan ralat dalam teks pelajar, pengenalan entiti bernama, potongan dan tag POS. The novel language modeling objective provided consistent performance improvements on every benchmark, without requiring any additional annotated or unannotated data.', 'ml': 'ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ചുറ്റുമുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സെക്കന്റര്\u200d ലേബ സെമാന്റിക്കും സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്കും സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ടിക്കുമായുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ മാതൃകങ്ങളെ ഈ ഭാഷ മോഡല പഠിക്കുന്ന ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു എല്ലാ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കിലും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d ഭാഷ മാതൃകയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം കൂടു', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu qafas ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza b’għan ta’ taħriġ sekondarju, li jitgħallem jipprevedi l-kliem madwar għal kull kelma fis-sett tad-dejta. Dan l-objettiv ta’ mudell tal-lingwi jinċentiva s-sistema biex titgħallem xejriet ta’ skopijiet ġenerali ta’ kompożizzjoni semantika u sintattika, li huma utli wkoll għat-titjib tal-preċiżjoni fuq kompiti differenti ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenzi. The architecture was evaluated on a range of datasets, covering the tasks of error detection in learner texts, named entity recognition, chunking and POS-tagging.  L-għan tal-mudell tal-lingwi l-ġdid ipprovda titjib konsistenti fil-prestazzjoni fuq kull punt ta’ riferiment, mingħajr ma kien jeħtieġ dejta addizzjonali annotata jew mhux innotata.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit rekkefølgjande rammeverk med eit sekundært opplæringsmål, læring å foreslå omvendte ord for kvar ord i datasettet. Dette målet for språk-modellering stimulerer systemet til å lære generelle mønsterelement for semantisk og syntaktisk samansetting, som også er nyttig for å forbetra nøyaktighet på ulike sekvensmerking av oppgåver. Arkitekturen vart evaluert på eit rekkje av datasett, og dekker oppgåva for feiloppdaging i læringstekstar, gjenkjenning av einingar med namn, blokking og POS-merking. Målet for å modelera nytt språk gjev konsekvente utviklingar på kvar benchmarkt, utan å kreve nokon ekstra merknader eller ukjente data.', 'mn': 'Бид хоёр дахь сургалтын зорилго дээр дараагийн дарааллын маркингийн хэлбэрийг суралцаж өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн үгийг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Энэ хэл загварын загварын зорилго нь системийг семантик болон синтактик бүтээгдэхүүний ерөнхий зорилго загварыг сурах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ нь бас өөр дарааллын загварын маркингийн үйл ажиллагаанд зөв байдлыг сайжруулах Архитектур нь олон өгөгдлийн сангууд дээр үнэлгээд, сурагчийн текстүүдийн алдаа гаргах үйл ажиллагааг, нэрлэгдсэн entity recognition, chunking, POS-tagging гэдэг. Шинэ хэл загварчлалын зорилго нь багц бүрт үр дүнтэй ажиллагааны сайжруулалт гаргасан, нэмэлт анзаарсан эсвэл анзааргүй мэдээллийг шаардахгүй.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy ramy etykietowania sekwencji z drugorzędnym celem szkoleniowym, ucząc się przewidywać otaczające słowa dla każdego słowa w zbiorze danych. Ten cel modelowania językowego zachęca system do nauki ogólnego przeznaczenia wzorców kompozycji semantycznej i składni, które są również przydatne do poprawy dokładności w różnych zadaniach etykietowania sekwencji. Architektura została oceniona na szeregu zbiorów danych, obejmujących zadania wykrywania błędów w tekstach uczących się, rozpoznawania nazw, chunkingu i tagowania POS. Nowy cel modelowania językowego zapewnił spójną poprawę wydajności każdego odniesienia, bez konieczności dodatkowych adnotacji lub nienotacji danych.', 'ro': 'Propunem un cadru de etichetare a secvențelor cu un obiectiv secundar de formare, învățând să prezică cuvintele din jur pentru fiecare cuvânt din setul de date. Acest obiectiv de modelare lingvistică stimulează sistemul să învețe modele generale de compoziție semantică și sintactică, care sunt, de asemenea, utile pentru îmbunătățirea acurateții în diferite sarcini de etichetare a secvențelor. Arhitectura a fost evaluată pe o serie de seturi de date, acoperind sarcinile de detectare a erorilor în textele cursanților, recunoașterea entităților denumite, chunking și POS-tagging. Obiectivul nou de modelare a limbajului a oferit îmbunătățiri consecvente ale performanței pentru fiecare referință, fără a necesita date adnotate sau neanotate suplimentare.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo okvir označavanja sekvence sa sekundarnim ciljem obuke, učenjem predviđanja okruženih reči za svaku reč u setu podataka. Ovaj objektiv za modeliranje jezika poticava sistem da nauči opšte svrhe obrazaca semantičkog i sintaktičkog sastojaka, koji su takođe korisni za poboljšanje tačnosti na različitim zadacima označavanja sekvence. Arhitektura je procjenjena na nizu podataka, pokrivajući zadatke otkrivanja grešaka u tekstima učenika, priznanje entiteta, odrezanje i označavanje POS-a. Novi cilj modeliranja jezika pružio je konsekventne poboljšanje provedbe na svakoj kriteriji, bez zahteva dodatnih annotiranih ili neoznačenih podataka.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, දත්ත සෙට් වල හැම වචනයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ මේ භාෂාව මොඩේලින් අක්ෂිත විදියට පද්ධතියට සෙමැන්ටික් සහ සංකේතික සංවිධානයේ සාමාන්\u200dය-අක්ෂිත විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dර ස්ථාපනය විශේෂය දත්ත සෙට් වලින් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා, ඉගැනීම් පාළුවන් විශේෂයේ වැරදි හොයාගන්න වැරදි කාර්ය, නම් ඇත නොවැඩක් භාෂාව මොඩල් අක්ෂේප ප්\u200dරමාණය හැම බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩි වැඩි වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, අ', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal ku qoran, kaas oo leh goal waxbarasho dugsi ah, waxaynu baranaynaa inaad wax ka sii sheegto hadal ku wareegsan hadal kasta oo macluumaadka ku qoran. Muuqashada luuqadan waxaa habboon in uu nidaamka u barto noocyada caadiga ah oo ay ka mid yihiin noocyada semantika iyo isbitaalka, taasoo sidoo kale faa’iido u leh in horumariyo saxda shaqaalaha labka kala duwan. Baabuur waxaa lagu qiimeeyay sawirro badan oo macluumaad ah, oo ku qoran shaqooyin lagu garto cadaynta qaladka ee qoraalka waxbarashada, magaca aqoonsashada entity, chunking iyo POS-tagging. Muuqashada qoraalka luuqada ee saxda ah waxaa lagu hagaajiyaa horumarinta sameynta oo dhan, iyadoon u baahnayn macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la caddeeyey ama aan la aqoonsan.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett ramverk för sekvensmärkning med ett sekundärt utbildningsmål, där vi lär oss att förutsäga omgivande ord för varje ord i datauppsättningen. Detta språkmodelleringsmål uppmuntrar systemet att lära sig generella mönster av semantisk och syntaktisk sammansättning, som också är användbara för att förbättra noggrannheten på olika sekvensmärkningsuppgifter. Arkitekturen utvärderades på en rad datauppsättningar, som omfattade uppgifter om felupptäckt i elevtexter, namngiven entitetsigenkänning, chunking och POS-taggning. Det nya språkmodelleringsmålet gav konsekventa prestandaförbättringar för varje riktmärke, utan att kräva ytterligare kommenterade eller oanmälda data.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு வரிசையின் அடிக்குறியீட்டை சிறிய பயிற்சி செயல்படுத்தும் தலைப்புகளுடன், தரவு அமைப்பில் உள்ள ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தை இந்த மொழி வடிவமைப்பு பொருள் காட்சி அமைப்பின் பொதுவான முறைமையை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பொதுவான முறைமை மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்புக்கு ஆர்வத பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளத்தின் பெயர் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பிழை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான செயல்களை மூடிய தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் பிழை கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட The novel language modeling objective provided consistent performance improvements on every benchmark, without requiring any additional annotated or unannotated data.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سطح لابلینگ فرم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک دوسری تعلیم موضوع کے ساتھ، ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہر کلم کے لئے اطراف کے کلمات کی پیشنهاد کرنے کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں. یہ زبان موڈلینگ موضوع نے سیسٹم کو سیمنٹی اور سینٹکتیک پیمانٹ کی عمومی مطابق سکھانے کے لئے تحقیق کرنے کے لئے بھی مفید ہے، جو مختلف سطح لیبلینگ کے کاموں پر دقیق ترقیق کرنے کے لئے بھی مفید ہیں. یہ معماری ڈاٹ سٹ کے ایک حصہ پر مطابق کیا گیا تھا، سیکھنے والے پیغام میں خطا شناسایی کے کاموں کو پورا کرتا تھا، نامہ دار انٹیٹ شناسایی، چانکینگ اور POS-ٹاگ. نئی زبان نمادلینگ موضوع نے ہر بنچم مارک پر موجود عمل کی تدبیر کی، بغیر کسی اضافہ نموداری یا غیر معلوم دکھائی کی ضرورت.', 'uz': "Biz birinchi darajada o'rganadigan soʻzni o'rganishni tasavvur qilamiz, maʼlumotlar soʻzlarining har bir so'zlarni tahrirlashni o'rganamiz. Bu til modeli obʼekt tizimini semantik va syntactik tuzuvlarini o'rganish uchun umumiy tuzilishini ishlatish mumkin. Bu bir xil vazifalarni boshqa xizmatga tayyorlash uchun foydalanadi. Name Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống phân loại với một mục tiêu đào tạo thứ hai, học cách dự đoán các từ xung quanh cho từng từ trong bộ dữ liệu. Mục tiêu tạo mô hình ngôn ngữ này thúc đẩy hệ thống học các mô hình liên quan về độ cấu tạo theo ngữ pháp và cấu tạo cú pháp, cũng có ích để tăng độ chính xác trong các công việc phân loại khác nhau. Kiến trúc được đánh giá trên một loạt các tập tin, bao gồm các nhiệm vụ phát hiện lỗi trong các văn bản học giả, nhận diện thực thể tên, khoanh vùng và gài trường. Mục tiêu tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ mới đã cung cấp hiệu ứng tốt nhất trên mỗi tiêu chuẩn, mà không cần thêm dữ liệu ghi chú hay không ghi chú.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo okvir označavanja sekvence s objektivom sekundarne obuke, učenjem predviđanja okruženih riječi za svaku riječ u kompetu podataka. Ovaj cilj modeliranja jezika poticava sistem za učenje opće svrhe semantičkog i sintaktičkog sastojaka, koji su također korisni za poboljšanje preciznosti na različitim zadacima označavanja sekvence. Arhitektura je procijenjena na nizu podataka, pokrivajući zadatke otkrivanja grešaka u tekstima učitelja, priznanje entiteta, odrezanje i označavanje POS-a. Novi cilj modeliranja jezika pružio je konsekventne poboljšanje učinka na svakoj kriteriji, bez zahtjeva dodatnih annotiranih ili neobičnih podataka.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме рамка за етикетиране на последователност с цел средно обучение, като се научим да предсказваме околните думи за всяка дума в набора от данни. Тази цел за езиково моделиране стимулира системата да научи модели с общо предназначение на семантична и синтактична композиция, които също са полезни за подобряване на точността на различни задачи за етикетиране на последователността. Архитектурата е оценена върху редица набори от данни, обхващащи задачите за откриване на грешки в текстовете на обучаващите се, разпознаване на имена на обекти, групиране и маркиране на ПОС. Новата цел за езиково моделиране осигурява последователни подобрения на производителността на всеки показател, без да се изискват допълнителни анотирани или неописани данни.', 'nl': 'We stellen een sequentie labeling framework voor met een secundaire trainingsdoelstelling, waarbij we leren omringende woorden voor elk woord in de dataset te voorspellen. Deze doelstelling van taalmodellering stimuleert het systeem om algemene patronen van semantische en syntactische samenstelling te leren, die ook nuttig zijn voor het verbeteren van de nauwkeurigheid van verschillende sequentie labeling taken. De architectuur werd geëvalueerd op een reeks datasets, met betrekking tot de taken van foutdetectie in lerende teksten, naamherkenning, chunking en POS-tagging. De nieuwe doelstelling voor taalmodellering leverde consistente prestatieverbeteringen op elke benchmark, zonder dat extra geannoteerde of ongenoteerde gegevens nodig waren.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en sekvensmærkning ramme med et sekundært træningsmål, der lærer at forudsige omgivende ord for hvert ord i datasættet. Dette sprogmodelleringsmål ansporer systemet til at lære generelle mønstre af semantisk og syntaktisk sammensætning, som også er nyttige til at forbedre nøjagtigheden på forskellige sekvensmærkningsopgaver. Arkitekturen blev evalueret på en række datasæt, der dækker opgaverne med fejldetektering i elevtekster, navngivet entitetsgenkendelse, chunking og POS-tagging. Det nye sprogmodelleringsmål gav konsekvente forbedringer af ydeevnen på alle benchmarks uden at kræve yderligere annoterede eller uannoterede data.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan rangkaian label dengan tujuan pelatihan sekunder, belajar untuk memprediksi kata-kata sekitar untuk setiap kata di dataset. Objektif model bahasa ini mendorong sistem untuk belajar pola tujuan umum dari komposisi semantis dan sintaksi, yang juga berguna untuk meningkatkan akurasi pada tugas label urutan yang berbeda. Arkitektur telah dievaluasi pada jangkauan set data, meliputi tugas deteksi kesalahan dalam teks pelajar, pengenalan entitas bernama, potongan dan POS-tagging. Objektif model bahasa baru menyediakan peningkatan prestasi konsisten pada setiap benchmark, tanpa membutuhkan data tambahan yang dicatat atau tidak dicatat.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein Sequenz Labeling Framework mit einem sekundären Trainingsziel vor, das lernt, umgebende Wörter für jedes Wort im Datensatz vorherzusagen. Dieses Ziel der Sprachmodellierung motiviert das System, allgemeine Muster der semantischen und syntaktischen Zusammensetzung zu lernen, die auch für die Verbesserung der Genauigkeit bei verschiedenen Sequenzmarkierungsaufgaben nützlich sind. Die Architektur wurde auf einer Reihe von Datensätzen ausgewertet, die die Aufgaben der Fehlererkennung in Lerntexten, der Namenserkennung, des Chunkings und des POS-Tagging abdeckten. Das neue Ziel der Sprachmodellierung lieferte konsistente Leistungsverbesserungen für jeden Benchmark, ohne dass zusätzliche kommentierte oder nicht notierte Daten erforderlich waren.', 'ko': '우리는 2급 훈련을 목표로 하고 데이터가 집중된 모든 단어가 주위의 단어를 예측하는 서열 표기 프레임워크를 제시했다.이 언어 모델링 목표는 체계적으로 의미와 문법으로 구성된 통용 모델을 학습하도록 장려하고 서로 다른 서열 표기 임무의 정확성을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다.이 시스템 구조는 학습자 텍스트의 오류 검출, 명명 실체 식별, 블록과 단어 표기 등 일련의 데이터 집합에서 평가를 실시했다.새로운 언어 모델링 목표는 추가 주석이나 주석이 없는 데이터가 필요 없이 모든 기준에서 일치된 성능 개선을 제공합니다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم چهارچوب نقاشی با هدف آموزش دوم، یاد بگیریم که کلمات محیط را برای هر کلمات در مجموعه داده پیش بینی کنیم. این موضوع مدل\u200cسازی زبان سیستم را برای یاد گرفتن الگوهای عمومی از ترکیب سنتاتیک و سنتاتیک تحریک می\u200cکند، که همچنین برای improving accuracy on different sequence labelling tasks استفاده می\u200cکنند. این معماری در مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها ارزیابی شده است، که وظیفه\u200cهای کشف خطای در متن\u200cهای یادگیر، شناسایی عنوان، شکافی و نقاشی POS را پوشش می\u200cدهد. هدف نمونه\u200cسازی زبان\u200cهای نویسی در هر نقطه\u200cی نقطه\u200cی نقطه\u200cای، بدون نیازی به اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای یا غیر شناخته می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa mifumo inayoonyesha kwa lengo la mafunzo ya sekondari, kujifunza kutabiri maneno yanayozunguka kwa kila neno katika seti ya taarifa. This language modeling objective incentivises the system to learn general-purpose patterns of semantic and syntactic composition, which are also useful for improving accuracy on different sequence labeling tasks.  Ujengo huo ulipitishwa katika seti mbalimbali za taarifa, ikizindua kazi za kutambuliwa kwa makosa katika maandishi ya kujifunza, yaliyoitwa kutambuliwa kwa entity, kufungua vifaa vya POS. Lengo la utoaji wa lugha ya kitaifa lilitoa maendeleo ya utendaji wa kawaida kwenye kila bendera, bila kuhitaji taarifa za ziada zinazoelezwa au zisizoelewa.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n sekonder etiket raamwerk met 'n sekonder oefening doel, leer om omgewing woorde te voorskou vir elke woord in die datastel. Hierdie taal modellering objekte stimuleer die stelsel om algemene-doel patrone van semantiese en sintaktika opstelling te leer, wat is ook nuttig vir die verbetering van presisiteit op verskillende volgorde etiket opdragte. Die arkitektuur is geevalueer op 'n reek van datastelle, omdekking van die opdragte van fout opmekaar in leerneerde teks, genaamde entiteiterkenning, blokking en POS- etiket. Die nuwe taal modellering doel verskaf konsistente prestasie verbeteringe op elke benchmark, sonder om enige addisionele annoteerde of onbekende data te nodig.", 'tr': 'Biz ikinji okuw maksady bilen sequencer etiketleme frameworkyny teklip edip, dataset içindeki her sözleri üçin döwürmek üçin öwrenmek üçin. Bu dil modelleýän maksady sistemiň semantik we sintaktik düzümlerniň umumy namaýyş nusgalaryny öwrenmesini täsirleýär. Bu sistemiň düzümlerniň dogrylygyny bejermek üçin ullanyr. Arhitektura bir süri veri setirlerinde deňlendirildi, öwreniň metinlerinde hata tanyşynyň zadyny kaplaýardy. Täze dil modelleýän maksady her benchmarkda işlemçilik gelişmeleri berdi, hiç hili täze näbelli ýa tanyş bolmadyk maglumaty gereksiz.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një kuadër shënimimi të sekuencës me një objektiv trajnimi të dytë, mësim të parashikojmë fjalët rrethuese për çdo fjalë në grupin e të dhënave. Ky objektiv i modelimit të gjuhës inkurajon sistemin për të mësuar modele me qëllim të përgjithshëm të përbërjes semantike dhe sintaktike, të cilat janë gjithashtu të dobishme për përmirësimin e saktësisë në detyra të ndryshme të etiketave të sekuencës. Arkitektura u vlerësua në një gamë të grupeve të dhënash, duke mbuluar detyrat e zbulimit të gabimeve në tekstet e mësuesve, njohjen e emëruar të njësisë, copëtimin dhe etiketën POS. The novel language modeling objective provided consistent performance improvements on every benchmark, without requiring any additional annotated or unannotated data.', 'az': 'Biz ikinci təhsil məqsədi ilə sequence labeling framework ünü təklif edirik, verilənlər qutusundakı hər kəlmə üçün ətraflı sözləri təmin etməyi öyrənirik. Bu dil modellərinin məqsədili sistemi semantik və sintaktik kompozisyonun genel məqsədil modellərini öyrənmək üçün təsirləndirir. Bu da müxtəlif seçmə etiketləmə məqsədilərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün faydalanır. Arhitektura bir çox verilən qurğularda değerlendirildi, öyrənən mətnlərdə xəta tapılması, adı verilən entitə tanıması, dəyişiklik və POS etiketlərində xəta tapılması. Yeni dil modelləşdirməsi məqsədi hər benchmark üzərində müəyyən müvafiq performans uzlaşdırmalarını təmin etdi, heç bir əlavə edilməmiş və ya bilinmədən məlumatlarını tələb etmədən.', 'am': 'የሁለተኛ ትምህርት ተማሪ አቃውሞ ለመጠየቅ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህ ቋንቋ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሲስተማርን የጠቅላዊ አካባቢ እና የስናታዊ ምርጫዎችን ማምረጥ ያሳስፋል፡፡ የመዝገብ ቤት መሠረት አካባቢ ማውቀት፣ ስህተት ማውቀት፣ ስህተት እና POS-tagging በሚሉት የስህተት ማግኘት ስራዎችን በተለየ ድርጊቶች ላይ በተለየ ድርጊት ላይ ተረጋገጠ። የአሁኑን ቋንቋ ምሳሌ አካባቢ በሁሉም benchmark ላይ ትክክለኛውን አካባቢ ማድረግ ማድረግ ሰጥቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি সেকেন্ডারিয়ারি প্রশিক্ষণের লক্ষ্যের সাথে লেবেলিং কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি, ডাটাসেটের প্রতি শব্দের প্রতি বাক্যে এই ভাষার উদ্দেশ্যের উদ্দেশ্যের উদ্দেশ্যে সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য সিস্টেমের উৎসাহ প্রদান করে যাতে সেমেন্টিক এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্ The architecture was evaluated on a range of datasets, covering the tasks of error detection in learner texts, named entity recognition, chunking and POS-tagging.  প্রতিটি বেনম্যার্কে স্থায়ীভাষার মডেলিং উদ্দেশ্য প্রদান করা হয়েছে, কোনো অতিরিক্ত তথ্যের প্রয়োজন না হয়।', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու շրջանակ, որը ունի միջնակարգ ուսուցման նպատակ, սովորելով կանխատեսել շրջապատող բառերը տվյալների համակարգում գտնվող յուրաքանչյուր բառի համար: Այս լեզվի մոդելավորման օբյեկտիվ խրախուսում է համակարգը սովորելու սեմանտիկ և սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքի ընդհանուր նպատակի կաղապարներ, որոնք նաև օգտակար են տարբեր հաջորդականության նշանների ճշգրտության բարելավման համար: Ճապետական կառուցվածքը գնահատվել էր տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք ներառում էին սխալների հայտնաբերման խնդիրները ուսանողների տեքստներում, անվանելով անհատների ճանաչելը, կտորները և POS-նշանները: Նոր լեզվի մոդելավորման նպատակը յուրաքանչյուր համեմատական նպատակի արդյունավետության կատարյալ բարելավումն էր ապահովում, առանց որևէ հավելյալ նոտացված կամ աննոտացված տվյալներ պահանջելու:', 'ca': "Proposem un marc d'etiqueta de seqüències amb un objectiu d'entrenament secundari, aprenent a predir paraules al voltant de cada paraula del conjunt de dades. Aquest objectiu de modelació de llenguatges incentiva el sistema a aprendre patrons de propòsit general de composició semàntica i sinàctica, que també són útils per millorar la precisió en diferents tasques d'etiquetage de seqüències. L'arquitectura va ser avaluada en una gama de conjunts de dades, que cobreixen les tasques de detecció d'errors en els textos d'aprenentatge, anomenats reconeixement d'entitats, fragments i etiquetes POS. L'objectiu de la nova modelació de llengües va proporcionar millores consistents en el rendiment de cada punt de referència, sense requerir dades adicionals anotates o no anotates.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme rámec pro značení sekvence s sekundárním cílem školení, který se naučí předvídat okolní slova pro každé slovo v datové sadě. Tento cíl jazykového modelování motivuje systém k naučení se obecně účelových vzorců sémantického a syntaktického složení, které jsou také užitečné pro zlepšení přesnosti u různých úloh značení sekvencí. Architektura byla hodnocena na řadě datových sad, pokrývajících úkoly detekce chyb v textech studentů, rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit, chunking a POS-tagging. Nový cíl jazykového modelování poskytl konzistentní zlepšení výkonu u každého benchmarku, aniž by vyžadoval další anotovaná nebo nezapsaná data.', 'et': 'Pakume välja järjekordade märgistamise raamistiku keskhariduse eesmärgiga, õppides ennustama ümbritsevaid sõnu iga andmekogumi sõna kohta. See keele modelleerimise eesmärk stimuleerib süsteemi õppima semantilise ja süntaktilise kompositsiooni üldeesmäraseid mustreid, mis on kasulikud ka erinevate jadade märgistamise ülesannete täpsuse parandamiseks. Arhitektuuri hinnati mitmesuguste andmekogumite põhjal, hõlmates õppijate tekstide vigade tuvastamise ülesandeid, nimetatud olemi tuvastamist, tükkimist ja POS-sildistamist. Uuenduslik keele modelleerimise eesmärk parandas iga võrdlusaluse jõudlust järjepidevalt, ilma et oleks vaja lisandmeid märgitud või märkimata.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo okvir označavanja sekvence sa objektivom sekundarne obuke, učenjem predvidjeti okružene riječi za svaku riječ u kompetu podataka. Ovaj objektiv za modeliranje jezika poticava sistem da nauči opće svrhe obrazaca semantičkog i sintaktičkog sastojaka, koji su također korisni za poboljšanje preciznosti na različitim zadacima označavanja sekvence. Arhitektura je procjenjena na nizu podataka, pokrivajući zadatke otkrivanja grešaka u tekstima učitelja, priznanje entiteta, odrezanje i označavanje POS-a. Novi cilj modeliranja jezika pružio je konsekventne poboljšanje učinkovitosti na svakoj kriteriji, bez zahtjeva dodatnih annotiranih ili neoznačenih podataka.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme sekvenssimerkinnän viitekehystä, jonka tavoitteena on toisen asteen koulutus, jossa opitaan ennustamaan ympäröiviä sanoja jokaiselle aineiston sanalle. Tämä kielimallinnuksen tavoite kannustaa järjestelmää oppimaan semanttisen ja syntaktisen sommittelun yleiskäyttöisiä malleja, joista on hyötyä myös erilaisten sekvenssimerkinnätehtävien tarkkuuden parantamisessa. Arkkitehtuuria arvioitiin erilaisilla tietokokonaisuuksilla, jotka kattavat oppijatekstien virheiden havaitsemisen, nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisen, lohkotuksen ja POS-taggingin tehtävät. Uusi kielimallinnustavoite tarjosi johdonmukaisia suorituskykyparannuksia jokaiseen vertailuarvoon ilman lisähuomautuksia tai merkitsemättömiä tietoja.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé ngerti sistem sing beraksi mrogram, ingkang sampek tanggal nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasai gambaran kanggo saben kelas nang dataset. Language modering goal architecture Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מסגרת תווית רצף עם מטרה של אימון תיכוני, ללמוד לחזות מילים סביבות לכל מילה במערכת הנתונים. אובייקטיבי הדוגמנית השפה הזאת מעודדים את המערכת ללמוד דפוסי מטרה כללית של ריכוב סמנטי וסינטקטי, אשר גם שימושיים לשיפור מדויקה על משימות תווית רצף שונות. הארכיטקטורה הוערכה על טווח של קבוצות נתונים, מכסה את המשימות של זיהוי שגיאות בטקסטים של לומדים, בשם זיהוי יחידות, חתיכות ותגיות POS. אובייקטיב הדוגמניות של שפת חדשה סיפק שיפור ביצועים קבוע בכל נקודת רמז, מבלי לדרוש שום נתונים נוספים שנעטפו או לא שנעטפו.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo okvir za označevanje zaporedja s ciljem sekundarnega usposabljanja, ki se uči napovedati okoliške besede za vsako besedo v naboru podatkov. Ta cilj jezikovnega modeliranja spodbuja sistem k učenju splošnih vzorcev semantične in sintaktične kompozicije, ki so uporabni tudi za izboljšanje natančnosti pri različnih nalogah označevanja zaporedja. Arhitektura je bila ocenjena na različnih naborih podatkov, ki zajemajo naloge odkrivanja napak v besedilih učencev, prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet, sestavljanja in označevanja POS. Novi cilj jezikovnega modeliranja je zagotovil dosledne izboljšave učinkovitosti vsake referenčne vrednosti, ne da bi zahtevali dodatnih podatkov z oznakami ali brez oznak.', 'ha': "Kana goyyar da wata firam mai lissafa na firam da wani abu na aikin da aka ƙara, kuma za mu iya yi bayani ga masu gabatar da maganar da ke cikin tsarin da aka sani. Wannan durowa cikin harshen na'ura yana wahamar da shirin ayuka na tsari na'urar da ya sanar da tsarin-jumla na-aikin masu haɗi na semantic da syntactic, da kuma yana da amfani ga gyãra tsari a kan aikin mai lissafa daban-daban. An ƙayyade tsarin da aka ƙayyade cikin wasu tsaro masu tsari, sunã rufe aikin da za'a gane aikin ɓata cikin littattafai masu kara da sunan sunan ganin shaidar abun, mai kiyaye da tagning na PoS. Masanin motsi na cikin harshen yanzu na ba da amfani da tsarin aiki na daidai a kan duk bangon, kuma bã ya buƙata wani ƙari da aka faɗaɗa ko wanda ba'a sãɓa ba.", 'bo': 'We propose a sequence labeling framework with a secondary training objective, learning to predict surrounding words for every word in the dataset. This language modeling objective incentivises the system to learn general-purpose patterns of semantic and syntactic composition, which are also useful for improving accuracy on different sequence labeling tasks. The architecture was evaluated on a range of datasets, covering the tasks of error detection in learner texts, named entity recognition, chunking and POS-tagging. གསར་གཏོད་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱེ་བ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་བཀོད་རྟགས་སུ་མཐུན་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྷན་སྐྱོང་བ་ཡིན་པས'}
{'en': 'Semantic Parsing of Pre-university Math Problems', 'ar': 'الاعراب الدلالي لمشكلات الرياضيات قبل الجامعة', 'es': 'Análisis semántico de problemas matemáticos preuniversitarios', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique de problèmes mathématiques pré-universitaires', 'pt': 'Análise semântica de problemas matemáticos pré-universitários', 'ja': '大学入学前の数学問題の意味論的解析', 'zh': '大学预科数学之语义解析', 'hi': 'पूर्व-विश्वविद्यालय गणित समस्याओं के शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Семантический анализ довузовских математических задач', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach ar Fhadhbanna Matamaitice Réamh-Ollscoile', 'ka': 'პრე- სუნივერტის მათემატიკური პრობლემების სემანტიკური პარამეტრება', 'hu': 'Az egyetem előtti matematikai problémák szemantikus értelmezése', 'el': 'Σημματική ανάλυση προ-πανεπιστημιακών μαθηματικών προβλημάτων', 'it': 'Analisi semantica dei problemi matematici pre-universitari', 'kk': 'Университеттің алдындағы математикалық мәселелердің семантикалық талдау', 'lt': 'Semantinis ikiuniversitetinių matematikos problemų analizavimas', 'mk': 'Семантично анализирање на преуниверзитетските математички проблеми', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Semantik Masalah Matematik Preuniversiti', 'ml': 'യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയിലെ ഗണിത പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Analiżi Semantika tal-Problemi tal-Matematika Preuniversitarji', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургуулийн математикийн асуудлуудын Semantic Parsing of Pre-University Math Problems', 'no': 'Semantisk tolking av føreuniversitetsmatematikk', 'ro': 'Interpretarea semantică a problemelor matematice preuniversitare', 'sr': 'Semantičko razmatranje pre univerziteta matematičkih problema', 'pl': 'Parsowanie semantyczne przeduniwersyteckich problemów matematycznych', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස්ත්\u200dය ගාණිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sv': 'Semantisk tolkning av matematikproblem före universitetet', 'so': 'Jaamacadda horumarinta', 'ta': 'கல்லூரியியல் முன் கணிப்பு பிரச்சனைகளின் செமான்டிக் பாடல்', 'ur': 'پہلی унوریسٹی ریاضی مشکلات کی سیمنٹی پارسینگ', 'uz': 'Birinchi universitetdan oldin matn muammolari', 'vi': 'Phân tích khái niệm về toán học tiền đại học', 'bg': 'Семантично анализиране на предуниверситетски математически проблеми', 'da': 'Semantisk fortolkning af matematikproblemer før universitetet', 'nl': 'Semantische Parsing van Pre-universitaire wiskundige problemen', 'hr': 'Semantičko razmatranje preuniverzitetskih matematičkih problema', 'de': 'Semantisches Parsing von mathematischen Problemen vor der Universität', 'id': 'Analisasi Semantik Masalah Matematika Preuniversitas', 'ko': '대학 예과 수학 문제의 의미 분석', 'fa': 'مشکلات ریاضی پیش دانشگاه', 'tr': 'Uniwersitetiň öňki matematik meseleleriniň semantik analyzasy', 'sw': 'Uimbaji wa Semantic wa Matatizo ya Umoja wa Chuo Kikuu', 'af': 'Semantiese verwerking van voor-universiteit-matematiese probleme', 'sq': 'Analizimi Semantik i Problemeve Matematike Parauniversitare', 'hy': 'Համալսարանից առաջ կատարվող մաթեմատիկայի խնդիրների սեմանտիկ վերլուծումը', 'am': 'የዩኒቨርስቲ ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের পূর্ববর্তী গণিত সমস্যার সেম্যান্ডিক পার্সিং', 'az': '∆èvv…ôlki Universitetin Matematik Probleml…ôrinin Semantik Analyzing', 'bs': 'Semantičko razmatranje preuniverzitetskih matematičkih problema', 'ca': 'Analització Semàtica de Problemes de Matemàtiques Preuniversitaris', 'cs': 'Sémantická analýza předuniverzitních matematických problémů', 'et': 'Ülikoolieelsete matemaatiliste probleemide semantiline analüüs', 'fi': 'Esiyliopistojen matemaattisten ongelmien semanttinen tarkastelu', 'sk': 'Semantna analiza preduniverzitetnih matematičnih problemov', 'he': 'בדיקת סמנטית של בעיות מתמטיקה לפני האוניברסיטה', 'jv': 'semanti Ngucap Pansing Peremplo Pri-Universite', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་གྱི་གྲངས་རིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆ་ཚོད་ལྟར་བསམ།'}
{'en': 'We have been developing an end-to-end math problem solving system that accepts natural language input. The current paper focuses on how we analyze the problem sentences to produce logical forms. We chose a hybrid approach combining a shallow syntactic analyzer and a manually-developed lexicalized grammar. A feature of the grammar is that it is extensively typed on the basis of a formal ontology for pre-university math. These types are helpful in semantic disambiguation inside and across sentences. Experimental results show that the hybrid system produces a well-formed logical form with 88 % precision and 56 % recall.', 'es': 'Hemos estado desarrollando un sistema de resolución de problemas matemáticos de principio a fin que acepta la entrada del lenguaje natural. El artículo actual se centra en cómo analizamos las oraciones problemáticas para producir formas lógicas. Elegimos un enfoque híbrido que combinaba un analizador sintáctico superficial y una gramática lexicalizada desarrollada manualmente. Una característica de la gramática es que se mecanografía extensamente sobre la base de una ontología formal para las matemáticas preuniversitarias. Estos tipos son útiles en la desambiguación semántica dentro y entre oraciones. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el sistema híbrido produce una forma lógica bien formada con un 88% de precisión y un 56% de recuperación.', 'fr': "Nous avons développé un système de résolution de problèmes mathématiques de bout en bout qui accepte les entrées en langage naturel. Le présent article se concentre sur la façon dont nous analysons les phrases problématiques pour produire des formes logiques. Nous avons choisi une approche hybride combinant un analyseur syntaxique superficiel et une grammaire lexicalisée développée manuellement. Une caractéristique de la grammaire est qu'elle est largement typée sur la base d'une ontologie formelle pour les mathématiques pré-universitaires. Ces types sont utiles pour la désambiguïsation sémantique à l'intérieur et entre les phrases. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le système hybride produit une forme logique bien formée avec une précision de 88\xa0% et un rappel de 56\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Estamos desenvolvendo um sistema de resolução de problemas matemáticos de ponta a ponta que aceita entrada de linguagem natural. O presente artigo se concentra em como analisamos as sentenças-problema para produzir formas lógicas. Escolhemos uma abordagem híbrida combinando um analisador sintático superficial e uma gramática lexicalizada desenvolvida manualmente. Uma característica da gramática é que ela é extensivamente tipada com base em uma ontologia formal para matemática pré-universitária. Esses tipos são úteis na desambiguação semântica dentro e entre frases. Resultados experimentais mostram que o sistema híbrido produz uma forma lógica bem formada com 88% de precisão e 56% de revocação.', 'ja': '自然言語入力を受け入れるエンドツーエンドの数学問題解決システムを開発してきました。現在の論文では、問題文を分析して論理的な形を生み出す方法に焦点を当てている。私たちは、浅い構文解析器と手動で開発された語彙化された文法を組み合わせたハイブリッドアプローチを選択しました。文法の特徴は、大学入学前の数学のための形式的なオントロジーに基づいて広範囲にタイプされていることです。これらのタイプは、文の内側と文全体の意味論的な曖昧さ解消に役立ちます。実験結果は、ハイブリッドシステムが88%の精度と56%のリコールを有する整った論理形式を生成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम एक एंड-टू-एंड गणित समस्या को सुलझाने की प्रणाली विकसित कर रहे हैं जो प्राकृतिक भाषा इनपुट को स्वीकार करता है। वर्तमान पेपर इस बात पर केंद्रित है कि हम तार्किक रूपों का उत्पादन करने के लिए समस्या वाक्यों का विश्लेषण कैसे करते हैं। हमने एक उथले वाक्यात्मक विश्लेषक और मैन्युअल रूप से विकसित लेक्सिकलाइज्ड व्याकरण के संयोजन के लिए एक हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण चुना। व्याकरण की एक विशेषता यह है कि इसे पूर्व-विश्वविद्यालय गणित के लिए एक औपचारिक आंटोलॉजी के आधार पर बड़े पैमाने पर टाइप किया जाता है। ये प्रकार वाक्यों के अंदर और पार शब्दार्थ बहुविकल्पी में सहायक होते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हाइब्रिड सिस्टम 88% परिशुद्धता और 56% याद के साथ एक अच्छी तरह से गठित तार्किक रूप का उत्पादन करता है।', 'zh': '开一受自然语言端至端数学。 本文重点是我们剖析句子以生逻辑。 择混合之法,合浅句法分析器手动之词汇化语法。 语法之一性,大学预科数学之体论也。 此有助于句内消息语义歧义。 实验结果表明,当混合系统生一构,精为88%,召还率为56%。', 'ru': 'Мы разрабатываем комплексную систему решения математических задач, которая принимает ввод на естественном языке. В настоящем документе основное внимание уделяется тому, как мы анализируем проблемные предложения для получения логических форм. Мы выбрали гибридный подход, сочетающий неглубокий синтаксический анализатор и разработанную вручную лексикализованную грамматику. Особенностью грамматики является то, что она широко набирается на основе формальной онтологии для доуниверситетской математики. Эти типы полезны в семантической размытости внутри и между предложениями. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что гибридная система производит хорошо сформированную логическую форму с точностью 88% и отзывом 56%.', 'ar': 'لقد طورنا نظامًا لحل مشكلات الرياضيات من البداية إلى النهاية يقبل مدخلات اللغة الطبيعية. تركز الورقة الحالية على كيفية تحليل جمل المشكلة لإنتاج نماذج منطقية. اخترنا نهجًا هجينًا يجمع بين محلل نحوي ضحل وقواعد نحوية تم تطويرها يدويًا. من سمات القواعد أنه يتم كتابتها على نطاق واسع على أساس الأنطولوجيا الرسمية لرياضيات ما قبل الجامعة. هذه الأنواع مفيدة في توضيح الغموض الدلالي داخل الجمل وعبرها. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن النظام الهجين ينتج شكلاً منطقيًا جيد التكوين بدقة 88٪ واسترجاع 56٪.', 'ga': 'Tá córas réitithe fadhbanna matamaitice ceann go ceann á fhorbairt againn a ghlacann le hionchur teanga nádúrtha. Díríonn an páipéar reatha ar an gcaoi a ndéanaimid anailís ar na habairtí faidhbe chun foirmeacha loighciúla a tháirgeadh. Roghnaigh muid cur chuige hibrideach a chuimsigh anailíseoir comhréire éadomhain agus gramadach foclóirithe de láimh. Gné den ghramadach is ea go ndéantar í a chlóscríobh go forleathan ar bhonn ontology foirmeálta don mhatamaitic réamh-ollscoile. Tá na cineálacha seo ina gcuidiú le hathdhébhríocht shéimeantach laistigh agus trasna abairtí. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go dtáirgeann an córas hibrideach foirm loighciúil dea-chruthaithe le cruinneas 88% agus aisghairm 56%.', 'el': 'Αναπτύσσουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα επίλυσης μαθηματικών προβλημάτων που δέχεται εισαγωγή φυσικής γλώσσας. Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στο πώς αναλύουμε τις προβληματικές προτάσεις για να παράγουμε λογικές μορφές. Επιλέξαμε μια υβριδική προσέγγιση που συνδυάζει έναν ρηχό συντακτικό αναλυτή και μια χειροκίνητη λεξικαλοποιημένη γραμματική. Χαρακτηριστικό της γραμματικής είναι ότι πληκτρολογείται εκτενώς με βάση μια τυπική οντολογία για τα προ-πανεπιστημιακά μαθηματικά. Αυτοί οι τύποι είναι χρήσιμοι στην σημασιολογική αποσαφήνιση μέσα και πέρα από τις προτάσεις. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το υβριδικό σύστημα παράγει μια καλά διαμορφωμένη λογική μορφή με ακρίβεια 88% και 56% ανάκληση.', 'hu': 'Egy teljes körű matematikai problémamegoldó rendszert fejlesztettünk ki, amely elfogadja a természetes nyelvi bevitelt. A jelen tanulmány arra összpontosít, hogyan elemezzük a probléma mondatokat logikai formák létrehozásához. Hibrid megközelítést választottunk, amely egy sekély szintaktikus analizátort és egy manuálisan fejlesztett lexikalizált nyelvtant kombinál. A nyelvtan egyik jellemzője, hogy az egyetem előtti matematika formális ontológiáján alapul. Ezek a típusok hasznosak a szemantikai egyértelműsítésben a mondatok belsejében és között. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a hibrid rendszer 88%-os pontossággal és 56%-os visszahívással jól kialakított logikai formát hoz létre.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მათემატიკური პრობლემას გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც მივიღებთ თავისუფალური ენის შენახვა. მიმდინარე დოკუმენტი ახალგაზრდება როგორ ვაანალიზრდებით პრობლემენტის სიტყვები ლოგიკური ფორმები. ჩვენ მონიშნეთ ჰიბრიდის მიღება, რომელიც სინტაქტიკური ანალიზატორი და ხელხილად განვითარებული ლექსიკალიზაციული გრამია. გრამმარიის განსაზღვრება არის, რომ ის უფრო დიდი დაწერა ფორმალური ონტოლოგიის მათემატიკაზე. ეს ტიპები გამოსახულებელია სემონტიკური განამბიგუაციაში და სემონტიკური სიტყვებში. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრამთ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ჳთბპთენარა ჟთჟრვმა ოპჲეყლზაგა ეჲბპვ ტჲპმალჲდთფნა ტჲპმა, კჲწრჲ თმა 88% ოპთფთრთ', 'it': "Abbiamo sviluppato un sistema end-to-end di risoluzione dei problemi matematici che accetta l'input del linguaggio naturale. Il presente articolo si concentra su come analizziamo le frasi problematiche per produrre forme logiche. Abbiamo scelto un approccio ibrido che combina un analizzatore sintattico superficiale e una grammatica lessicalizzata sviluppata manualmente. Una caratteristica della grammatica è che è ampiamente dattilografata sulla base di un ontologia formale per la matematica pre-universitaria. Questi tipi sono utili nella disambiguazione semantica all'interno e tra frasi. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il sistema ibrido produce una forma logica ben formata con 88% di precisione e 56% di richiamo.", 'lt': 'We have been developing an end-to-end math problem solving system that accepts natural language input.  Dabartiniame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama tai, kaip analizuojame probleminius sakinius siekiant sukurti logiškas formas. We chose a hybrid approach combining a shallow syntactic analyzer and a manually-developed lexicalized grammar.  Gramatikos ypatybė ta, kad ji plačiai rašoma remiantis formalia ontologija ikiuniversitetinei matematikai. Šie tipai padeda semantiniam nedviprasmiškumui tarp sakinių ir jų. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad hibridinė sistema sukuria gerai suformuotą logišką form ą, kurios tikslumas 88 proc. ir atšaukimas 56 proc.', 'mk': 'We have been developing an end-to-end math problem solving system that accepts natural language input.  Сегашната вест се фокусира на тоа како ги анализираме проблемските реченици за да произведеме логични форми. Избравме хибриден пристап кој комбинира плошки синтактички анализатор и рачно развиена лексикализирана граматика. Форматиката на граматиката е дека е екстремно напишана врз основа на формална онтологија за преуниверзитетска математика. Овие типови се корисни во семантичното разјаснување внатре и преку речениците. Experimental results show that the hybrid system produces a well-formed logical form with 88% precision and 56% recall.', 'kk': 'Біз математиканың соңындағы мәселесін жасап тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрмыз. Назардағы қағаз логикалық пішімдерді жасау үшін мәселелерді қалай анализ етіп тұрады. Біз гибрид тәртібін қолмен жасалған лексикализациялық грамматиканы біріктіріп жатқан синтактикалық анализаторды және қолмен жасалған лексикализациялық грамматиканы таңдадық Грамматиканың мүмкіндігі - ол университеттің математикасының официальны онтологиясын негізінде жазылады. Бұл түрлер семантикалық дембандигуациялардың ішінде және сөйлемелердің көмегімен жасайды. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері гибрид жүйесі 88% дұрыс және 56% еске салу үшін жақсы логикалық түрін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Kami telah mengembangkan sistem penyelesaian masalah matematik akhir-akhir yang menerima input bahasa semulajadi. Kertas semasa fokus pada bagaimana kita menganalisis kalimat masalah untuk menghasilkan bentuk logik. Kami memilih pendekatan hibrid yang menggabungkan penganalisis sintaktik rendah dan grammar lexikal yang dikembangkan secara manual. Ciri-ciri grammar ialah ia ditaip secara luas berdasarkan ontologi rasmi untuk matematika sebelum universiti. Jenis ini membantu dalam penyelesaian semantik dalam dan melintasi kalimat. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa sistem hibrid menghasilkan bentuk logik yang bentuk dengan tepatnya 88% dan 56% pengingatan.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് സ്വീകരിക്കുന്ന കണക്കിന്റെ പരിഹരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d അവസാനി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രശ്നം വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡിന്റെ വഴിയില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തു. ഒരു കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് അന്യായം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ക A feature of the grammar is that it is extensively typed on the basis of a formal ontology for pre-university math.  ഈ തരത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളിലും അകത്തും വാക്കുകളിലും സഹായിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഒരു നല്ല രോഗിക ഫോമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത്, 88% പ്രിസിഷനും 56%', 'mt': "Qegħdin niżviluppaw sistema ta' soluzzjoni tal-problemi tal-matematika minn tarf sa tarf li taċċetta l-input tal-lingwa naturali. Id-dokument attwali jiffoka fuq kif nagħmlu analiżi tas-sentenzi tal-problema biex jipproduċu forom loġiċi. Aħżelna approċċ ibridu li jikkombina analizzatur sintattiku baxx u gramma lexikalizzata żviluppata manwalment. Karatteristika tal-gramma hija li hija ttippjata b’mod estensiv abbażi ta’ ontoloġija formali għall-matematika ta’ qabel l-università. Dawn it-tipi huma ta’ għajnuna f’diżambigwazzjoni semantika ġewwa u bejn is-sentenzi. Experimental results show that the hybrid system produces a well-formed logical form with 88% precision and 56% recall.", 'pl': 'Opracowaliśmy kompleksowy system rozwiązywania problemów matematycznych, który akceptuje wejście języka naturalnego. Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na analizie zdań problemowych w celu wytworzenia form logicznych. Wybraliśmy podejście hybrydowe łączące płytki analizator składni i ręcznie opracowaną leksykalizowaną gramatykę. Cechą gramatyki jest to, że jest ona szeroko typowana na podstawie formalnej ontologii matematyki przeduniwersyteckiej. Te typy są pomocne w semantycznym rozdzielaniu wewnątrz i między zdaniami. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że system hybrydowy wytwarza dobrze uformowaną formę logiczną z precyzją 88% i 56% odzyskiwania.', 'ro': 'Am dezvoltat un sistem end-to-end de rezolvare a problemelor matematice care acceptă introducerea limbajului natural. Lucrarea actuală se concentrează pe modul în care analizăm propozițiile problematice pentru a produce forme logice. Am ales o abordare hibridă care combină un analizor sintactic superficial și o gramatică lexicalizată dezvoltată manual. O caracteristică a gramaticii este că este scrisă pe scară largă pe baza unei ontologii formale pentru matematica pre-universitară. Aceste tipuri sunt utile în dezambiguizarea semantică în interiorul și între propoziții. Rezultatele experimentale arată că sistemul hibrid produce o formă logică bine formată cu 88% precizie și 56% rechemare.', 'sr': 'Razvijali smo sistem za rješavanje matematike koji prihvaća prirodni jezik. Trenutni papir se fokusira na analizu problemskih rečenica za proizvodnju logičkih oblika. Izabrali smo hibridni pristup kombiniranjem plitkog sintaktičkog analizatora i ručno razvijenog leksikaliziranog gramatike. Običnost gramatike je da se široko napiše na osnovu formalne ontologije za matematiku pre univerziteta. Ovi tipovi su korisni u semantičkoj disambiguaciji unutra i preko rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da hibridni sistem proizvodi dobro formirani logički oblik sa preciznošću 88% i sećanje 56%.', 'so': 'Waxaannu horumarinnay dhibaatada xisaabta ee dhammaadka ugu dambaysa, taasoo aqbala input afka asalka ah. Warqadda joogtada ah wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa sida aynu u u baarayno xukunka dhibaatada si aan u soo saarno noocyo caqli ah. Waxaannu doorannay qalabka hybrid oo isku darsameynaya analyzer shallo ah iyo qoraal la horumariyey qof lexicalized. Qoraammada waxaa lagu qoraa si dheer ah, taas oo lagu qorayo shahaado rasmi ah oo lagu qorayo xisaabta jaamacadda ka horeysa. Noocyadan waxey caawinayaan kala duwanaanshaha galmada gudaha iyo dhamaadka. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in nidaamka hybridku uu soo saaraa foom aad u fiican oo jimicsi ah oo saxda 88% iyo 56% xusuusta.', 'si': 'අපි අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි ගණිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ඇතුළත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dර ප්\u200dරස්තූත පැත්තේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න වචනය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කියලා. අපි හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විශේෂකයෙක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විද්\u200dයාපකයෙක් සහ අයිතික විකාශකයෙක් සහ විශ්වාසික ගණිත විශේෂයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපය මේ වර්තන වර්තන වර්තන වර්තන වර්තන වලට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් පද්ධතිය 88% විශේෂතාවක් සහ 56% මතකයි.', 'sv': 'Vi har utvecklat ett heltäckande matematiskt problemlösningssystem som accepterar naturligt språk input. Den aktuella uppsatsen fokuserar på hur vi analyserar problemmeningarna för att producera logiska former. Vi valde en hybrid metod som kombinerar en ytlig syntaktisk analysator och en manuellt utvecklad lexikaliserad grammatik. Ett drag i grammatiken är att den skrivs i stor utsträckning utifrån en formell ontologi för pre-university matte. Dessa typer är användbara i semantisk åtskillnad inuti och över meningar. Experimentella resultat visar att hybridsystemet producerar en välformad logisk form med 88% precision och 56% återkallelse.', 'ta': 'We have been developing an end-to-end math problem solving system that accepts natural language input.  தற்போதைய தாள் எப்படி நாம் பிரச்சனையின் வாக்கியங்களை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் என்பதை கவனம் செலுத்து நாங்கள் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் செயல்பாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுத்துள்ளோம் ஒரு கைமுறையான ஒத்திசைவியல் ஆராய்ச்சி மற்றும் ஒரு கைம வரைப்படத்தின் குணங்கள் என்னவென்றால் அது முன் பல்கலைகலை கணிதத்திற்கு ஒரு வடிவமைப்பு தொழில்நுட்பத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளிடப் இந்த வகைகள் உள்ளே மற்றும் வாக்கியங்களுக்கு முழுமையான பிரிவுகளில் உதவுகிறது. முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது ஹைப்ரிட் அமைப்பு ஒரு நன்றாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பம் வடிவமைக்கிறது 88% துல்ல', 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл оролцоог хүлээн зөвшөөрөх математикийн асуудлыг шийдэх системийг хөгжүүлж байна. Одоогийн цаас бидний логикийн хэлбэрүүдийг хэрхэн шинжилгээ хийх вэ гэдгийг анхаарна. Бид гибрид арга барилгыг шинжилгээч, гараар хөгжүүлсэн лексикализацийн грамматыг нэгтгэдэг. Грамматикийн хувь нь сургуулийн өмнөх математикийн официально онтологийн сургалтын математикийн сургалтын үндсэнд маш их бичигдсэн. Эдгээр төрлүүд дотор болон өгүүлбэрээс тусламжтай байдаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд гибрид систем 88% тодорхой, 56% дурсамжтай логик хэлбэрийг бүтээж байна.', 'no': 'Vi har utvikla eit matematikkproblem med slutt til slutt og løysing av systemet som aksepterer naturspråk inndata. Denne papiret fokuserer på korleis vi analyserer problemsetningane for å produsera logiske skjemar. Vi har valt ein hybrid tilnærming som kombinerer ein liten syntaktisk analyser og ein manuelt utvikla lexikalisert grammar. Eit funksjon på grammatikken er at det er utvida skriven på grunn av ein formelt ontologi for føreuniversitetsmatematikk. Desse typane er nyttig i semantisk disambiguasjon inni og over setningar. Eksperimentale resultat viser at hybridsystemet produserer ein godt formert logisk form med 88% presisjon og 56% rekommering.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک پایان سے پایان کی ریاضی مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کی سیسٹم کو پکڑ رہے ہیں جو طبیعی زبان انپیٹ قبول کرتا ہے۔ موجود کاغذ کا مطابق ہے کہ ہم کس طرح مسئلہ جماعتوں کو منطقی فرمول بنانے کے لئے تحقیق کریں۔ ہم نے ایک ہیبریڈ طریقہ کو انتخاب کیا تھا جو ایک گھیرے سینٹکتیک تحلیل کرنے والا اور ایک ہاتھ سے پھیلائی لکسیکلیز گراماری کے ساتھ ملتا ہے. گراماری کا ایک فرصت یہ ہے کہ اس کو پہلے یونیورسٹی ریاضیات کے لئے ایک فرصت اوٹلوژیک کی بنیاد پر پھیلایا جاتا ہے. یہ طریقے سیمنٹی غیرقابل تعلقات کے اندر اور کلمات کے اندر مفید ہیں. آزمائش کے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہیبریڈ سیسٹم 88% دقیق اور 56% ذکر کے ساتھ بہترین منطقی فرم پیدا کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "We have been developing an end-to-end math problem solving system that accepts natural language input.  Joriy hujjatning muammolarni qanday nazarlashimiz mumkin. Biz yomon syntactik analyzeri va qo'lbola qo'llab-qo'llangan grammatik bilan birlashtirilgan hybrid tilini tandik. Grammatiking imkoniyati, bu universitetdan oldin matematika formal ontologiya asosida kengaytiriladi. Bu turlar semantik ajratishga yordam beradi, ichida va bir so'zlar ichida. Tekshirish natijalari hybrid tizimi 88% аниқ va 56% такрорланган манзилга мосланиб чиқади.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã phát triển một hệ thống giải quyết vấn đề to án học kết thúc, chấp nhận nhập ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tập trung vào cách chúng ta phân tích các câu vấn đề để tạo ra các hình thức logic. Chúng tôi chọn phương pháp lai hợp một bộ phân tích cú pháp nông cạn và một bộ ngôn ngữ văn học tự phát triển. Một phần đặc trưng của ngữ pháp là nó được đánh rộng trên nền tảng khảo cổ học về toán tiền đại học. Những loại này có ích trong việc biến đổi ngữ pháp bên trong và xuyên các câu. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy hệ thống hỗn hợp tạo ra một dạng logic có độ chính xác cao với độ chính xác 62.', 'bg': 'Разработваме система за решаване на задачи от край до край, която приема въвеждане на естествен език. Настоящата статия се фокусира върху това как анализираме проблемните изречения за създаване на логически форми. Избрахме хибриден подход, съчетаващ плитък синтактичен анализатор и ръчно разработена лексикализирана граматика. Характеристика на граматиката е, че тя е широко написана въз основа на формална онтология за предуниверситетска математика. Тези типове са полезни в семантичното разграничаване вътре и между изреченията. Експерименталните резултати показват, че хибридната система произвежда добре оформена логическа форма с 88% точност и 56% връщане.', 'da': 'Vi har udviklet et end-to-end matematik problemløsningssystem, der accepterer naturligt sprog input. Den aktuelle artikel fokuserer på, hvordan vi analyserer problemsætningerne for at producere logiske former. Vi valgte en hybrid tilgang, der kombinerer en overfladisk syntaktisk analysator og en manuelt udviklet leksikaliseret grammatik. Et træk ved grammatiken er, at den i vid udstrækning er skrevet på grundlag af en formel ontologi for før-universitets matematik. Disse typer er nyttige i semantisk forståelse inden for og på tværs af sætninger. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at hybridsystemet producerer en velformet logisk form med 88% præcision og 56% tilbagekaldelse.', 'hr': 'Razvijali smo sistem za rješavanje matematike koji prihvaća prirodni jezik. Trenutni papir se fokusira na način analiziranja problemskih rečenica za proizvodnju logičkih oblika. Izabrali smo hibridni pristup kombiniranjem plitkog sintaktičkog analizatora i ručno razvijenog leksikaliziranog gramatike. Običnost gramatike je da se široko napiše na osnovu formalne ontologije za preuniverzitetsku matematiku. Ovi tipovi su korisni u semantičkoj disambiguaciji unutar i preko rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da hibridni sustav proizvodi dobro formirani logički oblik sa preciznošću 88% i sjećanje 56%.', 'nl': 'We hebben een end-to-end wiskundig probleemoplossend systeem ontwikkeld dat natuurlijke taalinvoer accepteert. De huidige paper richt zich op hoe we de probleemzinnen analyseren om logische vormen te produceren. We kozen voor een hybride aanpak die een ondiepe syntactische analyzer combineert met een handmatig ontwikkelde lexicaliseerde grammatica. Een kenmerk van de grammatica is dat het uitgebreid wordt getypt op basis van een formele ontologie voor pre-universitaire wiskunde. Deze types zijn nuttig bij semantische verduidelijking binnen en tussen zinnen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het hybride systeem een goed gevormde logische vorm produceert met 88% precisie en 56% recall.', 'de': 'Wir haben ein durchgängiges mathematisches Problemlösungssystem entwickelt, das natürliche Spracheingaben akzeptiert. Die vorliegende Arbeit konzentriert sich darauf, wie wir die Problemsätze analysieren, um logische Formen zu erzeugen. Wir wählten einen hybriden Ansatz, der einen flachen syntaktischen Analysator und eine manuell entwickelte lexikalisierte Grammatik kombiniert. Ein Merkmal der Grammatik ist, dass sie auf der Grundlage einer formalen Ontologie für voruniversitäre Mathematik ausgiebig typisiert wird. Diese Typen sind hilfreich bei der semantischen Begriffsklärung innerhalb und über Sätze hinweg. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das Hybridsystem eine gut geformte logische Form mit 88% Präzision und 56% Rückruf erzeugt.', 'id': 'Kami telah mengembangkan sistem penyelesaian masalah matematika akhir-akhir yang menerima input bahasa alami. Kertas saat ini fokus pada bagaimana kita menganalisa kalimat masalah untuk menghasilkan bentuk logis. Kami memilih pendekatan hibrid yang menggabungkan analisir sintaksi rendah dan gramatika yang dikembangkan secara manual. Sebuah fitur dari gramatika adalah bahwa ia diteip secara ekstensif berdasarkan ontologi formal untuk matematika pre-universitas. Jenis ini membantu dalam penyelesaian semantis dalam dan melalui kalimat. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa sistem hibrid menghasilkan bentuk logis yang bentuk dengan presisi 88% dan ingatan 56%.', 'fa': 'ما در حال توسعه یک مشکل ریاضی پایان و پایان راه حل سیستم که وارد زبان طبیعی را قبول می\u200cکند. کاغذ جاری روی چگونه جمله\u200cهای مشکلی را برای تولید فرم\u200cهای منطقی تحلیل می\u200cکنیم تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما یک روش hybrid را انتخاب کردیم که با یک تحلیل سنتاکتیک کوچک و یک گرامه\u200cی لکزیکالی به دستی توسعه می\u200cکند. ویژه\u200cای از گراماتر این است که آن به وسیله\u200cی یک اونتولوژی رسمی برای ریاضیات پیش دانشگاه نوشته شده است. این نوع\u200cها در اختلاف سنتی در داخل و طی جمله\u200cها کمک می\u200cکنند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که سیستم هیبرید یک فرم منطقی بسیار قابل تولید می\u200cکند با دقیق 88 درصد و 56 درصد یادآوری می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Tumekuwa tukiendeleza tatizo la hisabati la mwisho la mwisho la kusitisha mfumo unaokubali input wa lugha asili. Gazeti la sasa linalenga maana ya jinsi tunavyochambua hukumu za tatizo ili kutengeneza mfumo wa kisiasa. Tulichukua mbinu za mahindi inayounganisha mchambuzi mdogo wa kiteknolojia na grafu iliyotengenezwa kwa mikononi. Tamko la grammani ni kwamba imeandikwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa kutumia utaalamu rasmi wa hisabati za awali za chuo kikuu. aina hizi zinasaidia katika unyanyasaji wa kimapenzi ndani na katika hukumu mbalimbali. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa hebrid unaotengeneza mfumo wa mantiki uliotengenezwa vizuri wenye asilimia 88 na asilimia 56 ikikumbuka.', 'tr': 'Biz iň soňunda matematika meselesini çözerek tebigat dil girişini kabul edip otyrdyk. Häzirki kagyz sözlerimizi logik biçimlerini üretmek üçin nähili çözümlendirmegimizi üns berýär. Biz iň gowy bir sintaktik analyzatçylary we elimizden gelişmiş bir leksikilatyny birleştirýän hybrid ýalaýyşyny saýladyk. gramatiýanyň özelligi uniwersitet öňünden matematika üçin formal ontologiýa ýazylýar. Bu hiller semantik çalyşmak içinde we sözleriň arasynda kömek edip otyr. Durmançylyk netijeleri hybrid sisteminiň 88% dadylyk we 56% ýagdaýynda gowy şekillendirilýändigini görkezýär.', 'ko': '우리는 자연 언어의 입력을 받아들이는 수학 문제 해결 시스템을 개발해 왔다.본고는 주로 문제문을 어떻게 분석하여 논리적인 형식을 형성하는지를 연구한다.우리는 얕은 문법 분석기와 수동으로 개발한 어휘화 문법을 결합한 혼합 방법을 선택했다.이 문법의 특징은 대학 전 수학의 형식 본체를 바탕으로 광범위하게 입력된 것이다.이런 유형은 문장 내부와 문장 사이의 의미의 잘못된 뜻을 없애는 데 도움이 된다.실험 결과에 따르면 이 혼합 시스템은 형식이 좋은 논리 형식을 생성했고 88%의 정확도와 56%의 리콜율을 가지고 있다.', 'sq': 'Ne kemi zhvilluar një sistem të zgjidhjes së problemeve matematike që pranon hyrjen natyrore të gjuhës. Gazeta aktuale përqëndrohet në mënyrën se si ne analizojmë frazat e problemeve për të prodhuar forma logjike. Ne zgjodhëm një qasje hibride që kombinon një analizues sintaktik të sipërfaqe dhe një gramatikë lexikale të zhvilluar manualisht. Një karakteristikë e gramatikës është se ajo është shkruar në mënyrë të gjerë në bazë të një ontologjie zyrtare për matematikën parauniversitare. These types are helpful in semantic disambiguation inside and across sentences.  Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se sistemi hibridë prodhon një form ë logjike të formuar mirë me 88% saktësi dhe 56% tërheqje.', 'hy': 'Մենք զարգանում ենք մի վերջ-վերջ մաթեմատիկայի խնդիրների լուծման համակարգ, որը ընդունում է բնական լեզվի ներմուծը: Այսօրվա աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է այն բանի վրա, թե ինչպես ենք մենք վերլուծում խնդրի նախադասությունները, որպեսզի ստեղծենք տրամաբանական ձևեր: Մենք ընտրեցինք հիբրիդ մոտեցում, որը համադրեց մակերեսային սինտակտիկ վերլուծում և ձեռքով զարգացած լեքսիկական գրամագրություն: Գրամատիկայի առանձնահատկությունն այն է, որ այն էքսպանցիոնալ կերպով գրված է նախահամալսարանային մաթեմատիկայի ֆորմալ օնտալոգիայի հիմքում: Այս տեսակները օգտակար են սեմանտիկ բացատրության մեջ նախադասություններում և տարբեր նախադասություններում: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ հիբրիդ համակարգը ստեղծում է լավ ձևավորված տրամաբանական ձև 88 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ և 56 տոկոսի հիշողությամբ:', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውስጥ የሚቀበልን የሥርዓት መጨረሻ መቆጣጠር ስርዓት መፍታት ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ገጾች የችግሩን ፍርድ እንዴት እንደምናስተምር ነው፡፡ የኬብሪድ አካባቢ ስናታፊን እና በእጃቸው የተመሳሳይ የሊስክሲ ግራማር እና በተያያያየን መግለጫ መረጥነው፡፡ የፊደል ዩንቨርስቲ ምርጫዎች ላይ የፊደል ስህተት የተደረገ የግራማር ምርጫው ነው፡፡ እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የsemantic ውጤት ውስጥና በክፍሎች ውስጥ ይረዳሉ፡፡ Experimental results show that the hybrid system produces a well-formed logical form with 88% precision and 56% recall.', 'bs': 'Razvijali smo sistem za rješavanje matematike koji prihvaća prirodni jezik. Trenutni papir se fokusira na način analiziranja problemskih rečenica za proizvodnju logičkih oblika. Izabrali smo hibridni pristup kombinacijom plitkog sintaktičkog analizatora i ručno razvijenog leksikaliziranog gramatike. Običnost gramatike je da se široko napiše na osnovu formalne ontologije za preuniverzitetsku matematiku. Ovi tipovi su korisni u semantičkoj disambiguaciji unutar i preko rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da hibridni sistem proizvodi dobro formirani logički oblik sa 88% preciznošću i 56% sjećanja.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত গণতান্ত্রিক সমস্যা সমাধান করতে যাচ্ছি যা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইনপুট গ্রহণ করে। বর্তমান কাগজের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে যে আমরা কিভাবে সমস্যার বাক্য বিশ্লেষণ করি যে বৈশিষ্ট্যাল ফর্ম তৈরি কর আমরা একটি হাইব্রিডের প্রতিক্রিয়া বেছে নিয়েছি একটি শালী সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বিশ্লেষক এবং হাতে উন্নয়ন করা লেক্সিক্সিকাল গ্ গ্রামারের একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য হলো বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের গণিতের জন্য এটি ব্যাপক ভিত্তিতে টাইপ করা হয়েছে। এই ধরনের সেমেন্টিক বিভ্রান্তিক বিভ্রান্তিতে সাহায্য করছে ভিতরে এবং পার্শ্বের মধ্যে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে হাইব্রিড সিস্টেম একটি ভালোভাবে গঠন করা লোগিকাল ফর্ম তৈরি করে যার ফলে ৮৮% পরিসূচিত এব', 'az': 'Biz təbiətli dil girişini qəbul edən sistemi çəkmək məqsədilə son-son matematika problemini təhsil edirik. Şimdiki kağıt logik formları ürəklənmək üçün problemlərini necə analizə edirik. Biz çətin sintaktik analizatçı və əlindən təmizlənmiş leksikalizatlı grammatik ilə birləşdirilmiş hibrid tərzini seçdik. Grammatikanın özelliğinin çox böyük yazılması univerzitet matematiğinin formal ontologiyasına görədir. Bu cümlələr içərisində və cümlələrdə semantik dəyişiklikdə faydalanır. Eksperiment sonuçları hibrid sisteminin 88% dəqiqliyi və 56% yadına salmaq üçün yaxşı bir logik formu yaratdığını göstərir.', 'cs': 'Vyvíjeli jsme komplexní systém řešení matematických problémů, který přijímá vstupy přirozeného jazyka. Současný článek se zaměřuje na to, jak analyzujeme problémové věty a vytváříme logické formy. Zvolili jsme hybridní přístup kombinující mělký syntaktický analyzátor a ručně vyvinutou lexikalizovanou gramatiku. Rysem gramatiky je, že je rozsáhlě typována na základě formální ontologie pro předuniverzitní matematiku. Tyto typy jsou užitečné při sémantickém rozjasňování uvnitř vět i napříč nimi. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že hybridní systém vytváří dobře tvarovanou logickou formu s 88% přesností a 56% odvoláním.', 'ca': "Hem estat desenvolupant un sistema de solució de problemes matemàtiques de final a final que accepta les entrades de llenguatge natural. El paper actual es centra en com analitzem les frases problem àtiques per produir formes lògiques. Vam escollir un enfocament híbrid combinant un analitzador sinàctic baix i una gramàtica lexicalitzada desenvolupada manualment. Una característica de la gramàtica és que es escriu extensament sobre la base d'una ontologia formal de matemàtiques pre-universitàries. Aquests tipus són útils en la desambiguació semàntica dins i entre frases. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el sistema híbrid produeix una form a lògica ben formada amb precisió del 88% i recuperació del 56%.", 'et': 'Oleme välja töötanud täieliku matemaatika probleemide lahendamise süsteemi, mis aktsepteerib looduskeele sisendeid. Käesolev töö keskendub sellele, kuidas analüüsime probleemseid lauseid loogiliste vormide tootmiseks. Valisime hübriidse lähenemisviisi, mis ühendab madala süntaktilise analüüsi ja käsitsi väljatöötatud leksikaliseeritud grammatika. Grammatika omadus on see, et see on laialdaselt trükitud formaalse ontoloogia alusel ülikoolieelse matemaatika. Need tüübid on kasulikud semantilisel selgitamisel lausetes ja lausete vahel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et hübriidsüsteem toodab hästi vormitud loogilise vormi 88% täpsusega ja 56% tagasikutsumisega.', 'af': "Ons het 'n einde-tot-einde matematiese probleem ontwikkeling van stelsel wat die natuurlike taal invoer aanvaar. Die huidige papier fokus op hoe ons die probleem setings analyseer om logiese vorms te produseer. Ons het 'n hybrid toegang gekies wat 'n slagte sintaktisies analiseerder en 'n hand-ontwikkelde lexikaliseerde grammatiek kombinieer. 'n Funksie van die grammatiek is dat dit uitbreidig ingetik is op die basis van 'n formele ontologie vir voor-universiteit-matematiek. Hierdie tipes is hulp in semantiese ontwikkeling binne-in en oorspronklike. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die hibridstelsel 'n goed formeerde logiese vorm met 88% presisie en 56% herhaal.", 'fi': 'Olemme kehittﾃ､neet kokonaisvaltaista matemaattista ongelmanratkaisujﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､, joka hyvﾃ､ksyy luonnollisen kielen syﾃｶtteen. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ keskitytﾃ､ﾃ､n siihen, miten analysoimme ongelmalauseita loogisten muotojen tuottamiseksi. Valitsimme hybridiajattelun, jossa yhdistyvﾃ､t matala syntaktinen analysaattori ja manuaalisesti kehitetty leksikalisoitu kielioppi. Kieliopin piirre on se, ettﾃ､ sitﾃ､ kirjoitetaan laajasti muodollisen ontologian pohjalta esikoulumatematiikkaa varten. Nﾃ､mﾃ､ tyypit ovat hyﾃｶdyllisiﾃ､ semanttisessa erottelussa lauseiden sisﾃ､llﾃ､ ja niiden vﾃ､lillﾃ､. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, ettﾃ､ hybridijﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ tuottaa hyvin muodostetun loogisen muodon 88% tarkkuudella ja 56% palautumisella.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé wis nggawe sistem sistem sing nggawe barang pengguna-tekang batar matamatat. Pawit sing dipun ngomong piye ngerasakno kanggo awak dhéwé ngerasakno juara sing boten kanggo nggawe tarjamahan logik. Awak dhéwé milih kanggo ngerasakno karo akeh simbol sing nggawe akeh basan seneng pisan karo Manual sing dibutuhke basan seneng pisan. Punika dipunanggé punika dipunanggé kuwi punika dipunanggé lan basa ontroloje kuwi padha universite kuwi maur. Awak dhéwé iki luwih tenan kanggo mbelangno sematik lan kabèh banget. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, mun buɗe wata mataimaki ta ƙara ga matsayin da ke karɓi tsarin da ke karɓi cikin harshen farko. Gansa da ake kai yanzu ana ƙayyade yadda Muke analyza sonar masu cikin zartar da za'a zartar da fomat na logiki. Mun zãɓe wani hanyor Hybrid da ke haɗa wani mai ƙidãya mai sauri da kuma an sami grammar da aka samar da hannuwansa. Wata takardar grammar shine a ƙayyade shi mai yawa a bincike wa matsayin mai rasmi. Wannan types yana da amfani da yin rabo na semanti guda da kowace gafukan. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa, na'urar hibir na zaɓe wani tsari mai da aka samar da shi, da tsarin 88% da kuma a lokacin 65%.", 'sk': 'Razvijamo celovit sistem za reševanje matematičnih problemov, ki sprejema vnos naravnega jezika. V prispevku se osredotočamo na analizo problematičnih stavkov za izdelavo logičnih oblik. Izbrali smo hibridni pristop, ki združuje plitko sintaktično analizator in ročno razvito leksikalizirano slovnico. Značilnost slovnice je, da je obsežno tipkana na podlagi formalne ontologije za preduniverzitetno matematiko. Te vrste so v pomoč pri semantični razločitvi znotraj stavkov in med njimi. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da hibridni sistem proizvaja dobro oblikovano logično obliko z 88% natančnostjo in 56% odpoklicem.', 'he': 'פיתחנו מערכת פתרון בעיות מתמטיקה מסוף לסוף שמקבלת כניסה טבעית לשפה. העבודה הנוכחית מתמקדת בכך שאנחנו מנתחים את משפטי הבעיה כדי לייצר צורות הגיוניות. בחרנו גישה היברידית שמשולבת מנתח סינטאקטי שטחי וגרמטיקה משותפת ידנית. תכונה של התרמיקה היא שהיא מודפסת באופן רחב על בסיס אונטולוגיה רשמית למתמטיקה לפני האוניברסיטה. These types are helpful in semantic disambiguation inside and across sentences.  תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמערכת היברידית מייצרת צורה הגיונית שנוצרה היטב עם מדויקה 88% ו-56% זיכרון.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་རིག་ལ་མཐའ་མཇུག་ཏུ་གྲངས་རིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་ཡོད། མིག་སྔའི་ཤོག་བུ་དེ་གིས་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱིབས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གདམ་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་སྤྱོད་ཐོག་གི་ལག་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་པའི་ཤོག་རིམ A feature of the grammar is that it is extensively typed on the basis of a formal ontology for pre-university mathematics. དབྱེ་རིགས་འདི་ཚོ་སྣང་ཚུལ་རྐྱང་མེད་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་ཚོར་ཕན་ཆེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་ཕྲན་དག་དེ་ནི་hybrid་རིམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་88% གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དང་ 56%  དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Classifying Temporal Relations by Bidirectional LSTM over Dependency Paths', 'ar': 'تصنيف العلاقات الزمنية عن طريق LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه عبر مسارات التبعية', 'es': 'Clasificación de relaciones temporales por LSTM bidireccional sobre rutas de dependencia', 'fr': 'Classification des relations temporelles par LSTM bidirectionnel sur des chemins de dépendance', 'pt': 'Classificando Relações Temporais por LSTM Bidirecional sobre Caminhos de Dependência', 'ja': '依存経路に対する双方向LSTMによる時間関係の分類', 'zh': '因径之双向 LSTM 而分类之', 'hi': 'निर्भरता पथ पर द्विदिश LSTM द्वारा अस्थायी संबंधों को वर्गीकृत करना', 'ru': 'Классификация временных отношений по двунаправленным LSTM по путям зависимости', 'ga': 'Caidreamh Sealadach a Aicmiú de réir LSTM Déthreo thar Chosáin Spleáchais', 'hu': 'Az időszaki kapcsolatok osztályozása kétirányú LSTM alapján a függőségi útvonalak felett', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση των προσωρινών σχέσεων με αμφίδρομη LSTM πάνω από μονοπάτια εξάρτησης', 'it': 'Classificazione delle relazioni temporali per LSTM bidirezionale su percorsi di dipendenza', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік жолдары бойынша LSTM арқылы температуралық қатынастарды классификациялау', 'lt': 'Laikinųjų santykių klasifikavimas pagal dvikrypčius LSTM priklausomybės keliais', 'ms': 'Mengklasifikasikan Hubungan Temporal mengikut LSTM dua arah atas Laluan Dependensi', 'ka': 'ტემპორალური შესახებების კლასიფიკაცია ორედირექციონალური LSTM შესახებ განსახებულება', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Temporali skont LSTM Bidirezzjonali fuq Rotot ta’ Dipendenza', 'mn': 'Температурын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой', 'pl': 'Klasyfikowanie relacji czasowych przez dwukierunkowe LSTM nad ścieżkami zależności', 'ro': 'Clasificarea relațiilor temporale după LSTM bidirecțional peste căi de dependență', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള രണ്ടിഡയല്\u200d LSTM മുഖാന്തരം ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'sr': 'Klasificiranje Temporalnih odnosa dvosmjerno LSTM na putevima zavisnosti', 'no': 'Klassifiserer mellombelse relasjonar etter to retning LSTM over avhengighetsbaner', 'mk': 'Класификување на привремени односи по дворечни LSTM над патиштата за зависност', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த பாதைகளில் இருதிசை LSTM மூலம் தற்காலிக தொடர்புகளை வகைப்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'دفانسیٹی مسیروں پر دو دقیق LSTM کے ذریعہ تیموں رابطہ کا کلاسیٹ کیا جاتا ہے', 'si': 'විශේෂතාව සම්බන්ධතාව දෙපාර්ශික LSTM වලින් විශේෂ කරනවා විශේෂතාව සම්බන්ධතාව', 'so': 'Xisaabta ku saabsan xiriirka ku meelgaarka ah ee ku qoran wadamada ku xiran', 'sv': 'Klassificering av tillfälliga relationer genom dubbelriktad LSTM över beroendebanor', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Класификация на времевите отношения по двупосочни ЛТМ над пътища на зависимост', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke relaties classificeren door middel van bidirectionele LSTM over afhankelijkheidspaden', 'da': 'Klassificering af tidsmæssige relationer ved to retninger LSTM over afhængighedsveje', 'hr': 'Klasificiranje Temporalnih odnosa dvosmjerno LSTM na putevima zavisnosti', 'de': 'Klassifizierung temporaler Beziehungen durch bidirektionale LSTM über Abhängigkeitspfade', 'id': 'Classifying Temporal Relations by Bidirectional LSTM over Dependency Paths', 'ko': '경로상의 양방향 LSTM 의존 시간 관계 분류', 'sw': 'Kusisitiza uhusiano wa muda mfupi na LSTM kwa njia za kujitegemea', 'tr': 'Täze Görniş Opşenler', 'af': 'Klassifiseer Temporale Relasies deur Bidireksionale LSTM oor Afhanklikheid Pad', 'fa': 'تعریف رابطه\u200cهای Temporary با LSTM دو مسیر بر مسیرهای بستگی', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Ժամանակական հարաբերությունները դասակարգելը երկիուղղությամբ LSMT-ով կախվածության ճանապարհների վրա', 'az': "İki yönəlik LSTM'nin bağımlılıq yollarına görə Temporal Relations klasifikasyonu", 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i marrëdhënieve të përkohshme nga LSTM në dy drejtime mbi rrugët e varësisë', 'bn': 'নির্ভরিত পাথের উপর বাইডেডিয়াল এলএসএম-এর দ্বারা স্থায়ীয় সম্পর্ক শ্রেণীকরণ', 'bs': 'Klasificiranje Temporalnih odnosa dvosmjerno LSTM na putevima zavisnosti', 'ca': 'Classificar Relacions Temporals per LSTM bidireccional sobre Camis de Dependencia', 'cs': 'Klasifikace časových vztahů obousměrným LSTM nad cestami závislosti', 'et': 'Ajaliste suhete klassifitseerimine kahesuunalise LSTM-i järgi sõltuvusteede üle', 'fi': 'Aikasuhteiden luokittelu kaksisuuntaisen LSTM:n mukaan riippuvuusreittien yli', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razvrščanje časovnih odnosov po dvosmernih LSTM prek poti odvisnosti', 'he': 'מסווג יחסים זמניים על ידי LSTM שתי כיוונים על מסלולים תלויות', 'bo': 'Classifying Temporal Relations by Bidirectional LSTM over Dependency Paths'}
{'en': 'Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field. Lots of methods have been proposed, while most of them focus on extracting features from external resources. Less attention has been paid to a significant advance in a closely related task : relation extraction. In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP). We make a common root assumption to extend DP representations of cross-sentence links. In the final comparison to two state-of-the-art systems on TimeBank-Dense, our model achieves comparable performance, without using external knowledge, as well as manually annotated attributes of entities (class, tense, polarity, etc.', 'ar': 'أصبح تصنيف العلاقة الزمنية مجال بحث نشط. تم اقتراح الكثير من الأساليب ، بينما يركز معظمها على استخراج الميزات من الموارد الخارجية. تم إيلاء اهتمام أقل لتقدم كبير في مهمة وثيقة الصلة: استخراج العلاقة. في هذا العمل ، نستعير طريقة حديثة فيما يتعلق باستخراج العلاقة من خلال اعتماد ذاكرة ثنائية الاتجاه طويلة المدى (Bi-LSTM) على طول مسارات التبعية (DP). نحن نقوم بافتراض "جذر مشترك" لتوسيع تمثيلات DP لروابط الجملة المتقاطعة. في المقارنة النهائية مع نظامين من أحدث الأنظمة على TimeBank-Dense ، يحقق نموذجنا أداءً مشابهًا ، دون استخدام المعرفة الخارجية ، بالإضافة إلى السمات المشروحة يدويًا للكيانات (الفئة ، والتوتر ، والقطبية ، وما إلى ذلك).', 'es': 'La clasificación de relaciones temporales se está convirtiendo en un campo de investigación activo. Se han propuesto muchos métodos, mientras que la mayoría de ellos se centran en extraer características de recursos externos. Se ha prestado menos atención a un avance significativo en una tarea estrechamente relacionada: la extracción de relaciones. En este trabajo, tomamos prestado un método de última generación en la extracción de relaciones mediante la adopción de la memoria bidireccional a largo plazo (Bi-LSTM) a lo largo de las rutas de dependencia (DP). Hacemos una suposición de «raíz común» para extender las representaciones DP de los enlaces entre frases. En la comparación final con dos sistemas de última generación en TimeBank-dense, nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento comparable, sin utilizar conocimientos externos, así como atributos anotados manualmente de las entidades (clase, tiempo, polaridad, etc.).', 'pt': 'A classificação de relações temporais está se tornando um campo de pesquisa ativo. Muitos métodos foram propostos, enquanto a maioria deles se concentra na extração de recursos de recursos externos. Menos atenção tem sido dada a um avanço significativo em uma tarefa intimamente relacionada: extração de relações. Neste trabalho, tomamos emprestado um método de última geração em extração de relações adotando memória bidirecional de longo prazo (Bi-LSTM) ao longo de caminhos de dependência (DP). Fazemos uma suposição de “raiz comum” para estender as representações DP de links de frases cruzadas. Na comparação final com dois sistemas de última geração no TimeBank-Dense, nosso modelo alcança desempenho comparável, sem usar conhecimento externo, bem como atributos de entidades anotados manualmente (classe, tempo, polaridade, etc.).', 'fr': "La classification des relations temporelles devient un domaine de recherche actif. De nombreuses méthodes ont été proposées, tandis que la plupart d'entre elles se concentrent sur l'extraction de fonctionnalités à partir de ressources externes. On a accordé moins d'attention à une avancée significative dans une tâche étroitement liée\xa0: l'extraction de relations. Dans ce travail, nous empruntons une méthode de pointe en matière d'extraction de relations en adoptant une mémoire longue et courte durée bidirectionnelle (Bi-LSTM) le long des chemins de dépendance (DP). Nous faisons une hypothèse de «\xa0racine commune\xa0» pour étendre les représentations DP des liens entre phrases. Dans la comparaison finale avec deux systèmes de pointe sur TimeBank-dense, notre modèle atteint des performances comparables, sans utiliser de connaissances externes, ainsi que des attributs annotés manuellement des entités (classe, temps, polarité, etc.).", 'ja': '時間関係の分類が活発な研究分野になりつつある。多くの方法が提案されていますが、そのほとんどは外部リソースからの機能の抽出に焦点を当てています。密接に関連するタスク：関係抽出の重要な進歩にはあまり注意が払われていない。本作業では、依存経路（ DP ）に沿った双方向長期記憶（ Bi - LSTM ）を採用することにより、関係抽出における最先端の手法を借用する。私たちは、クロス文章リンクのDP表現を拡張するための「共通ルート」の仮定を立てます。TimeBank - Dense上の2つの最先端システムとの最終的な比較では、当社のモデルは、外部知識を使用することなく、エンティティの属性（クラス、緊張、極性など）を手動でアノテーションすることなく、同等のパフォーマンスを達成します。', 'zh': '时态关系类方成活跃。 既有多方,而其中多集外资。 一者,人之所重大进展也。 于此之事,借先进之法,因循径(DP)之双向长短期以记(Bi-LSTM)。 作公共根,以广交句链接之DP。 与TimeBank-Dense上二最先进之统相较,吾形于不用外知及手动注实体(类,时态,极性等)可得而校也。', 'hi': 'अस्थायी संबंध वर्गीकरण एक सक्रिय अनुसंधान क्षेत्र बनता जा रहा है। बहुत सारे तरीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है, जबकि उनमें से अधिकांश बाहरी संसाधनों से सुविधाओं को निकालने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। एक निकट से संबंधित कार्य में एक महत्वपूर्ण अग्रिम पर कम ध्यान दिया गया है: संबंध निष्कर्षण। इस काम में, हम निर्भरता पथ (डीपी) के साथ द्विदिश लंबी अल्पकालिक स्मृति (द्वि-एलएसटीएम) को अपनाकर संबंध निष्कर्षण में एक अत्याधुनिक विधि उधार लेते हैं। हम क्रॉस-वाक्य लिंक के डीपी प्रतिनिधित्व का विस्तार करने के लिए एक "सामान्य रूट" धारणा बनाते हैं। TimeBank-Dense पर दो अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों की अंतिम तुलना में, हमारा मॉडल बाहरी ज्ञान का उपयोग किए बिना तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, साथ ही साथ संस्थाओं (वर्ग, काल, ध्रुवीयता, आदि) की मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट विशेषताओं को भी प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Классификация временных связей становится активной областью исследований. Было предложено много методов, в то время как большинство из них сосредоточены на извлечении особенностей из внешних ресурсов. Меньшее внимание уделяется значительному прогрессу в решении тесно связанной задачи: извлечение отношений. В этой работе мы заимствуем современный метод в отношении извлечения, принимая двунаправленную длинную кратковременную память (Bi-LSTM) вдоль путей зависимости (DP). Мы делаем предположение «общего корня» для расширения представлений DP перекрестных ссылок. В конечном сравнении с двумя современными системами на TimeBank-Dense наша модель достигает сопоставимой производительности, не используя внешние знания, а также вручную аннотированные атрибуты сущностей (класс, время, полярность и т.д.).', 'ga': 'Is réimse gníomhach taighde é rangú caidrimh ama. Tá go leor modhanna molta, agus díríonn an chuid is mó acu ar ghnéithe a bhaint as acmhainní seachtracha. Is lú aird a tugadh ar dhul chun cinn suntasach i dtasc a bhfuil dlúthbhaint aige leis: eastóscadh caidrimh. Sa obair seo, tugaimid ar iasacht modh úrscothach maidir le heastóscadh trí chuimhne ghearrthéarmach dhéthreorach (Bi-LSTM) a ghlacadh feadh cosáin spleáchais (DP). Déanaimid toimhde “fréimhe coitianta” chun léiriúcháin MF ar naisc thras-abairtí a leathnú. Sa chomparáid deiridh le dhá chóras úrscothach ar TimeBank-Dense, sroicheann ár múnla feidhmíocht inchomparáide, gan úsáid a bhaint as eolas seachtrach, chomh maith le tréithe anótáilte aonáin (aicme, aimsir, polaraíocht, etc.).', 'hu': 'A temporális kapcsolatok osztályozása aktív kutatási területté válik. Számos módszert javasoltak, míg a legtöbbjük a funkciók külső erőforrásokból történő kinyerésére összpontosít. Kevesebb figyelmet fordítottunk egy szorosan kapcsolódó feladat jelentős előrelépésére: a kapcsolatkivonás. Ebben a munkában egy korszerű módszert kölcsönzünk a kapcsolat extrakciójára, amelynek segítségével kétirányú hosszú távú memóriát (Bi-LSTM) alkalmazunk függőségi útvonalakon (DP). Egy "közös gyöker" feltételezést teszünk a keresztmondatok DP-reprezentációinak kiterjesztésére. A TimeBank-Dense két korszerű rendszerrel való végső összehasonlításban modellünk hasonló teljesítményt ér el külső ismeretek használata nélkül, valamint az entitások manuálisan jegyzett attribútumait (osztály, feszült, polaritás stb.).', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση των χρονικών σχέσεων γίνεται ενεργό ερευνητικό πεδίο. Έχουν προταθεί πολλές μέθοδοι, ενώ οι περισσότερες από αυτές επικεντρώνονται στην εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών από εξωτερικούς πόρους. Λιγότερη προσοχή έχει δοθεί σε μια σημαντική πρόοδο σε ένα στενά συνδεδεμένο έργο: την εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, δανειζόμαστε μια σύγχρονη μέθοδο εξαγωγής σχέσεων υιοθετώντας αμφίδρομη μακροπρόθεσμη βραχυπρόθεσμη μνήμη (κατά μήκος μονοπατιών εξάρτησης). Κάνουμε μια "κοινή ρίζα" υπόθεση για να επεκτείνουμε τις αναπαραστάσεις DP των διασταυρούμενων προτάσεων συνδέσεων. Στην τελική σύγκριση με δύο συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει συγκρίσιμη απόδοση, χωρίς χρήση εξωτερικών γνώσεων, καθώς και χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένων χαρακτηριστικών οντοτήτων (κλάση, ένταση, πολικότητα κ.λπ.).', 'ka': 'ტემპორალური შესახებ კლასიფიკაცია იქნება აქტიური სწავლა. ბევრი მეცოდი მოწყვეტილია, მაგრამ უფრო მეცოდი მათგანი გარეშე რესურსებიდან გამოყენება. უფრო ცოტა აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი პროგენსის შესახებ მხოლოდ დაკავშირებული რაოდენობაში: დაკავშირებული ექსტრაქცია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავწყენეთ განსხვავებულობის გარეშე განსხვავებაში სამუშაო მხოლოდ სიმართლე მეხსიერება (Bi-LSTM) დავწყენება (DP). ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ "საერთო ფესტი" წარმოდგენა, რომელიც პროგრამის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულებას გადაფართოთ. საბოლოო შემდგომარებაში ორი სახელსაწყისი სისტემის TimeBank-Dense-ში, ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებელი გამოყენება, გარეშე ცნობილების გამოყენება და ხელსაწყისი ატრიბუტების ატრიბუტები (კლასი, ნაწილი,', 'it': 'La classificazione delle relazioni temporali sta diventando un campo di ricerca attivo. Molti metodi sono stati proposti, mentre la maggior parte di essi si concentra sull\'estrazione di funzionalità da risorse esterne. Meno attenzione è stata prestata ad un progresso significativo in un compito strettamente correlato: l\'estrazione delle relazioni. In questo lavoro, prendiamo in prestito un metodo all\'avanguardia nell\'estrazione delle relazioni adottando la memoria bidirezionale a breve termine (Bi-LSTM) lungo percorsi di dipendenza (DP). Facciamo un\'ipotesi "radice comune" per estendere le rappresentazioni DP dei collegamenti tra frasi incrociate. Nel confronto finale con due sistemi all\'avanguardia su TimeBank-Dense, il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni comparabili, senza utilizzare conoscenze esterne, nonché attributi annotati manualmente delle entità (classe, tensione, polarità, ecc.).', 'lt': 'Laikinųjų santykių klasifikavimas tampa aktyvia mokslinių tyrimų sritimi. Buvo pasiūlyta daug metodų, o dauguma jų daugiausia dėmesio skiria išorinių išteklių savybėms gauti. Mažiau dėmesio skiriama didelei pažangai glaudžiai susijusioje užduotyje: santykių išgavimui. Šiame darbe pasiskoliname pažangiausią metodą, susijusį su ekstrahavimu, priimdami dvikryptį ilgalaikę atmintį (Bi-LSTM) išilgai priklausomybės kelių (DP). Mes darome "bendrą pagrindą" prielaidą išplėsti DP atstovavimą įvairių sakinių ryšiams. Galutiniame palyginime su dviem moderniausiomis TimeBank-Dense sistemomis, mūsų modelis pasiekia panašių rezultatų, nenaudodamas išorinių žinių, taip pat rankiniu būdu anotuotų subjektų požymių (klasė, tempis, poliarumas ir t. t.).', 'kk': "Температуралық қатынас классификациясы белсенді зерттеу өрісі болады. Бірнеше әдістер ұсынылды, бірақ олардың көпшілігі сыртқы ресурстардан мүмкіндіктерді тарқатуға көмектеседі. Жақын қатынау тапсырмасындағы маңызды бағдарламаға артық болды: қатынасы тарқату. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз тәуелдік жолдары (ДП) бойынша қысқа уақыт жады (Bi- LSTM) арқылы, қатынасыз күйінің күйіне қатынасыз тәртібін алдық. Біз ДП дегенді көпшілікті сілтемелердің қосымшаларын кеңейту үшін 'жалпы түбір' дегенді таңдаймыз. TimeBank-Dense жүйесінің екі күйінің соңғы салыстырылығында, біздің үлгіміз сыртқы білім қолданбаған, қолмен жазылған нысандардың атрибуттарын (класс, тұрақтық, полярдық, т. б.), салыстыруға болады.", 'ml': "കാലാവധി ബന്ധം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫീള്\u200dഡായിരിക്കുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുനിന്നും പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ധാര അടുത്ത ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ജോലിയില്\u200d കുറച്ച് മുന്നോട്ട് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തേക്കുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d കടം വാങ്ങുന്നു. നീണ്ട നീണ്ട നീണ്ട മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d (ബി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു 'സാധാരണ വേര്\u200d' ഊഹിക്കുന്നുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് ക്രിസ്റ്റര്\u200d ലിങ്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഡിപിപി  ടൈമിബാങ്ക്-ഡെന്\u200dസിലെ രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനങ്ങളോട് അവസാനിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവ് ഉപയ", 'mt': "Il-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet temporanji qed issir qasam attiv tar-riċerka. Ġew proposti ħafna metodi, filwaqt li ħafna minnhom jiffokaw fuq l-estrazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi minn riżorsi esterni. Ingħatat inqas attenzjoni għal avvanz sinifikanti f’kompitu relatat mill-qrib: estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP).  Aħna nagħmlu suppożizzjoni 'root komuni' li jestendu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tad-DP ta' rabtiet bejn sentenzi. Fit-tqabbil finali ma’ żewġ sistemi l-aktar avvanzati dwar TimeBank-Dense, il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni komparabbli, mingħajr ma juża għarfien estern, kif ukoll attributi annotati manwalment ta’ entitajiet (klassi, tensjoni, polarità, eċċ.).", 'ms': "Klasifikasi hubungan sementara menjadi medan kajian aktif. Banyak kaedah telah diusulkan, sementara kebanyakan mereka fokus pada mengekstrak ciri-ciri dari sumber luar. Kurang perhatian telah diberikan kepada kemajuan yang signifikan dalam tugas berkaitan dekat: ekstraksi hubungan. In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP).  Kami membuat asumsi 'root biasa' untuk memperluas perwakilan DP pautan-kalimat salib. Dalam perbandingan terakhir dengan dua sistem state-of-the-art pada TimeBank-Dense, model kami mencapai prestasi yang sama, tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan luaran, serta atribut yang dicatat secara manual entiti (kelas, tegang, polariti, dll.).", 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja relacji czasowych staje się aktywną dziedziną badawczą. Zaproponowano wiele metod, natomiast większość z nich skupia się na wydobyciu cech z zasobów zewnętrznych. Mniej uwagi zwrócono na znaczący postęp w ściśle związanym z nim zadaniu: ekstrakcji relacji. W niniejszej pracy pożyczymy najnowocześniejszą metodę ekstrakcji relacji poprzez zastosowanie dwukierunkowej pamięci długoterminowej (Bi-LSTM) wzdłuż ścieżek zależności (DP). Wykonujemy założenie "wspólnego korzenia", aby rozszerzyć reprezentacje DP linków krzyżowych. W końcowym porównaniu z dwoma najnowocześniejszymi systemami TimeBank-Dense, nasz model osiąga porównywalną wydajność, bez użycia wiedzy zewnętrznej, a także ręcznie adnotacji atrybutów jednostek (klasa, czas, polaryzacja itp.).', 'mn': 'Температурын харилцааны хуваалцаа нь актив судалгааны талбар болж байна. Ихэнх нь гадаад нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнээс илүү олон арга зам гаргасан. Хамгийн ойролцоогоор хамааралтай ажил дээр маш бага анхаарлаа төвлөрсөн: хамааралтай гаргах. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хамааралтай зам (ДП) дээр холбогдолтой богино хугацааны санамж (Bi-LSTM) болон хамааралтай урлагийн хувьд хамааралтай урлагийн арга замыг худалдан авсан. Бид ДП-г олон өгүүлбэрийн холбоонуудын илтгэлийг нэмэгдүүлэх "ерөнхий язгуур" гэж бодож байна. TimeBank-Dense-ын хоёр урлагийн системтэй хамгийн сүүлийн харьцуулахад бидний загвар нь гадаад мэдлэгийг ашиглахгүй харьцуулах үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea relațiilor temporale devine un domeniu activ de cercetare. Au fost propuse multe metode, în timp ce cele mai multe dintre ele se concentrează pe extragerea caracteristicilor din resurse externe. S-a acordat mai puțină atenție unui avans semnificativ într-o sarcină strâns conexă: extragerea relațiilor. În această lucrare, împrumutăm o metodă de ultimă oră în extracția relațiilor prin adoptarea memoriei bidirecționale pe termen scurt (Bi-LSTM) de-a lungul căilor de dependență (DP). Facem o presupunere "rădăcină comună" pentru a extinde reprezentările DP ale legăturilor încrucișate. În comparația finală cu două sisteme de ultimă generație pe TimeBank-Dense, modelul nostru obține performanțe comparabile, fără a utiliza cunoștințe externe, precum și atribute adnotate manual ale entităților (clasă, tensiune, polaritate etc.).', 'mk': 'Класификацијата на привремените односи станува активно истражувачко поле. Многу методи се предложени, додека повеќето од нив се фокусираат на извлекувањето карактеристики од надворешни ресурси. Помалку внимание се обраќа на значителен напредок во тесно поврзаната задача: извлекување на односите. In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP).  Ние правиме „заедничка корена“ претпоставка за проширување на DP претставувања на крсторечени врски. Во конечната споредба со двата најсовремени системи на TimeBank-Dense, нашиот модел постигнува споредлива перформанса, без користење на надворешно знаење, како и рачно анотирани атрибути на ентитетите (класа, тензија, поларитет итн.).', 'sr': "Temporalna klasifikacija veza postaje aktivno istraživanje polje. Mnoge metode su predložene, a većina njih se fokusira na izvlačenje karakteristika iz vanjskih resursa. Manje pažnje je obraćeno značajnom napretku u bliskom povezanom zadatku: izvlačenje odnosa. U ovom poslu, posudili smo metodu umetnosti u odnosu na ekstrakciju usvajajući dvodirektivnu dugoročnu memoriju (Bi-LSTM) duž puteva zavisnosti (DP). Napravili smo pretpostavku 'zajedničkog korijena' da proširimo predstave DP-a veza prekrštenih rečenica. U konačnom usporedbi sa dva stanja umjetnosti na TimeBank-Densu, naš model postiže usporedno izvršenje, bez upotrebe vanjskih znanja, kao i rukopisnih atributa entiteta (klasa, napetost, polaritet itd.).", 'si': "සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dෂේත්රයක් වෙනවා. ගොඩක් විදේශ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පිටත්  ගොඩක් අවධානයක් ගොඩක් අවධානයක් ලැබිලා තියෙනවා ලඟ සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් වලට: සම්බන්ධ විකාශයක්. මේ වැඩේදී, අපි සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් අරගෙන ඉන්න බිදිරික්ෂිත කාලකාල මතකය (Bi-LSTM) සමඟ අවශ අපි 'සාමාන්\u200dය මූල' විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් වැඩ කරන්න. TimeBank-Dense වල අන්තිම ප්\u200dරදේශය දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන්, අපේ මෝඩල් ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළ", 'so': "Takhasuska xiriirka ku meelgaarka ah wuxuu noqdaa beer waxbarasho oo shaqeeya. Waxaa la soo jeeday qaabab badan, inta badan oo ka mid ah waxay ku kalsoonaan yihiin in laga soo bixiyo qalabka dibadda. Shaqada aad u dhow la xiriira waxaa la sii jeedaa in laga yaraado horumar weyn: soo bixinta xiriirka. In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP).  Waxaynu ka dhigaynaa qiyaastii ''xidida caadiga ah' si aan u sii wadno qofka dhaqaalaha dhaqdhaqaaqa. Ugu dambaysta is barbardhigga labada nidaam ee farshaxanka ee TimeBank-Dense waxaa sameynaya sameynta u eg, iyadoo aan isticmaalin aqoonta dibadda iyo tusaale ahaan waxyaabaha ay si rasmi ah u leeyihiin (fasalka, tense, polarity, etc.)", 'no': 'Temporale relasjonsklassifikasjon blir ein aktiv forskningsfelt. Mange metodar er foreslått, mens dei fleste fokuserer på å pakka ut funksjonar frå eksterne ressursar. Mindre oppmerksomhet har blitt betalt til ein betydelig avansert i eit nærare relatert oppgåve: relasjonsekstrahering. I denne arbeida låner vi ein tilstandsmetode for kunsten i relasjon med utpakking ved å ta inn bidireksjonal langsiktig minne (Bi-LSTM) langs avhengighetsstigar (DP). Vi gjer eit «vanleg rot» assumpsjon for å utvida DP- representasjonar av kryssetningslinger. I det siste sammenligninga med to kunstsystemet på TimeBank-Dense, er modellen vårt sammenlignbar utvikling, utan å bruka eksterne kunnskap, og manuelt oppmerkt attributt av einingar (klasse, tier, polaritet osv.).', 'ta': "தற்காலிக தொடர்பு வகுப்பு செயலில் உள்ள ஆராய்ச்சி புலமாகிவிடுகிறது. பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் வெளி மூலங்களிலிருந்து குணங்களை பெறுவதற்கு கவனம் செலுத்துகின்றனர். ஒரு அருகில் தொடர்புடைய பணியில் ஒரு முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு குறைந்தது கவனத்தை கவனிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: தொடர்பு பெ இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சார்ந்த பாதைகளுடன் (DP) சார்ந்த பாதைகளுடன் தொடர்பு பெறுவதற்கான ஒரு நிலையில் கலை முறைமையை கடன் செய்கிறோம். We make a 'common root' assumption to extend DP representations of cross-sentence links.  கடைசியாக ஒப்பிடுவதில் TimeBank-Dense-ல் இரு கலை அமைப்புகளின் நிலையில், எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒப்பிட்ட செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது, வெளி அறிவு இல்லாமல், மற்றும் பொருள்களின் கைமுறையா", 'sv': 'Tidsrelationsklassificering håller på att bli ett aktivt forskningsområde. Många metoder har föreslagits, medan de flesta av dem fokuserar på att extrahera funktioner från externa resurser. Mindre uppmärksamhet har ägnats åt ett betydande framsteg i en nära besläktad uppgift: relationsextraktion. I detta arbete lånar vi en state-of-the-art metod för relationsextraktion genom att använda dubbelriktad långtidsminne (Bi-LSTM) längs beroendevägar (DP). Vi gör ett "gemensamt root" antagande för att utöka DP representationer av korsmeningslänkar. I den slutliga jämförelsen med två toppmoderna system på TimeBank-Dense uppnår vår modell jämförbar prestanda, utan att använda extern kunskap, samt manuellt kommenterade attribut för entiteter (klass, spänning, polaritet, etc.).', 'ur': "Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field. بہت سی طریقے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں، حالانکہ ان میں سے اکثر بیرون سروسیلوں سے فائدے اٹھانے پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے. بہت کم توجه کی گئی ہے ایک نزدیک تعلق کے کام میں ایک بڑے اضافہ پر: نسبت اضافہ. ہم اس کام میں ایک ایست-آرت طریقہ قرض لیتے ہیں کہ ہم اٹھانے کے ساتھ دوسری کم مدت کی مہمانی (Bi-LSTM) کو اٹھانے کے راستے (DP) کے ساتھ لے لیتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک 'common root' assumption بناتے ہیں کہ کرس-sentence لینکوں کے DP نمایش پھیلائیں۔ تایمبنک-ڈنس کے دوسرے ایٹیٹ سیستموں کے مطابق مقایسہ میں ہماری مدل بغیر علم کے مطابق مطابق قابل عمل حاصل کرتی ہے، اور اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ (کلاس، تنگی، روشن", 'uz': 'Name Ko\'pchilik usullar talab qilindi, ammo ularning ko\'pchiligi tashqi rasmlaridan foydalanish uchun foydalanadi. Ulangan vazifaning eng muhim oldini ko\'rib turadi: алоқа чиқариш. Bu vazida, biz murakkab narsalarning holatini tashqarish usulini davom etamiz. Bi-LSTM qo\'shilgan yoʻllarga (DP) bilan bir qattiq xotira yozib boramiz. Biz oddiy "umumiy root" deb tasavvur qilamiz. DDP bogʻlamalarini ko\'paytirish uchun. Keyingi o\'sha paytda TimeBank-Dense bilan ikki holatda o\'xshash holatda, modelimiz tashqi ilmiy ishlatmaydigan amalni bajaradi va qoʻlbola qo\'lbola qo\'llab qo\'llangan obʼektlarning xususiyatlarini bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Phân loại mối quan hệ thời gian đang trở thành lĩnh vực nghiên cứu tích cực. Rất nhiều phương pháp đã được đề xuất, trong khi hầu hết họ tập trung vào việc khai thác các yếu tố từ nguồn tài nguyên ngoài. Ít được chú ý hơn đến một bước tiến quan trọng trong một nhiệm vụ có liên quan đến mối quan hệ. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi mượn một phương pháp tiên tiến trong việc tách ra tương đương bằng cách sử dụng trí nhớ ngắn hạn cùng nhau (Bi-LSTM) theo các đường phụ thuộc (DP). Chúng tôi đưa ra giả định "gốc rễ chung" để mở rộng DP các biểu tượng liên kết chữ thập. Trong cuộc so sánh cuối cùng với hai hệ thống hiện đại trên TimeBank-Dense, mẫu của chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất tương đương, không cần sử dụng kiến thức ngoài trời, cũng như thuộc tính từng thực thể được ghi chú bằng tay (đẳng cấp, căng thẳng, cực độ, v.v).', 'nl': "Tijdelijke relatieklassificatie wordt een actief onderzoeksveld. Er zijn veel methoden voorgesteld, terwijl de meeste ervan zich richten op het extraheren van functies uit externe bronnen. Minder aandacht is besteed aan een significante vooruitgang in een nauw verwante taak: relatieontwikkeling. In dit werk lenen we een state-of-the-art methode in relatie extractie door gebruik te maken van bidirectioneel lang kortetermijngeheugen (Bi-LSTM) langs afhankelijkheidspaden (DP). We maken een 'common root'-veronderstelling om DP-representaties van kruiszinnige links uit te breiden. In de laatste vergelijking met twee state-of-the-art systemen op TimeBank-Dense bereikt ons model vergelijkbare prestaties, zonder gebruik te maken van externe kennis, evenals handmatig geannoteerde attributen van entiteiten (klasse, tense, polariteit, enz.).", 'hr': 'Temporalna klasifikacija veza postaje aktivno istraživanje polje. Mnoge metode su predložene, dok se većina njih fokusira na izvlačenje karakteristika iz vanjskih resursa. Manje je pažnje obraćeno značajnom napretku u bliskom povezanom zadatku: izvlačenje odnosa. U ovom poslu posudili smo metodu stanja umjetnosti u odnosu na ekstrakciju usvajajući bidirektivnu dugoročnu pamćenje (Bi-LSTM) duž putova ovisnosti (DP). Napravili smo pretpostavku "zajedničkog korijena" da proširimo predstave DP-a veza prekrštenih rečenica. U konačnom usporedbi s dva stanja umjetnosti na TimeBank-Densu, naš model postiže usporedno izvršenje, bez upotrebe vanjskih znanja, kao i rukopisnih atributa entitata (klasa, napetost, polarnost itd.).', 'da': "Klassificering af tidsmæssige relationer er ved at blive et aktivt forskningsområde. Masser af metoder er blevet foreslået, mens de fleste af dem fokuserer på at udtrække funktioner fra eksterne ressourcer. Der er blevet lagt mindre vægt på et betydeligt fremskridt i en nært beslægtet opgave: relationsudvinding. I dette arbejde låner vi en state-of-the-art metode i relation ekstraktion ved at anvende bidirektionel lang korttidshukommelse (Bi-LSTM) langs afhængighedsstier (DP). Vi gør en 'fælles rod' antagelse for at udvide DP repræsentationer af tværsætninger links. I den endelige sammenligning med to state-of-the-art systemer på TimeBank-Dense opnår vores model sammenlignelig ydeevne, uden at bruge ekstern viden, samt manuelt noterede attributter af enheder (klasse, spænding, polaritet osv.).", 'de': "Zeitliche Beziehungsklassifikation wird zu einem aktiven Forschungsfeld. Viele Methoden wurden vorgeschlagen, während sich die meisten auf das Extrahieren von Features aus externen Ressourcen konzentrieren. Weniger Aufmerksamkeit wurde einem signifikanten Fortschritt in einer eng verwandten Aufgabe gewidmet: der Beziehungsextraktion. In dieser Arbeit nutzen wir eine State-of-the-Art Methode zur Beziehungsextraktion, indem wir bidirektionales langes Kurzzeitgedächtnis (Bi-LSTM) entlang von Abhängigkeitspfaden (DP) verwenden. Wir machen eine 'Common Root'-Annahme, um DP-Darstellungen von satzübergreifenden Links zu erweitern. Im abschließenden Vergleich mit zwei State-of-the-Art-Systemen auf TimeBank-Dense erreicht unser Modell vergleichbare Leistungen, ohne externe Kenntnisse zu verwenden, sowie manuell annotierte Attribute von Entitäten (Klasse, Tense, Polarität, etc.).", 'bg': 'Класификацията на времевите взаимоотношения се превръща в активна изследователска област. Много методи са предложени, докато повечето от тях се фокусират върху извличането на функции от външни ресурси. По-малко внимание е отделено на значителен напредък в тясно свързана задача: извличане на връзки. В тази работа заемаме най-съвременен метод за извличане на релации чрез приемане на двупосочна дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (Би-ЛСТМ) по пътища на зависимост (ДП). Ние правим "общ корен" предположение, за да разширим DP представянето на кръстосани изречения връзки. В окончателното сравнение с две най-съвременни системи на нашия модел постига сравними резултати, без да използва външни познания, както и ръчно анотирани атрибути на единици (клас, време, полярност и др.).', 'ko': "시간 관계의 분류는 활발한 연구 분야가 되고 있다.사람들은 많은 방법을 제시했지만 대부분의 방법은 외부 자원에서 특징을 추출하는 데 중심을 두었다.밀접한 관계를 가진 임무: 관계 추출에 있어서 사람들은 이 중대한 진전에 대한 관심이 비교적 적다.이 작업에서 우리는 가장 선진적인 관계 추출 방법을 빌려 의존 경로(DP)를 따라 양방향 장단기 기억(Bi-LSTM)을 채택했다.우리는 크로스 링크의 DP 표현을 확장하기 위해 '공통 루트' 가설을 제시했다.TimeBank Dense의 두 최첨단 시스템과 최종 비교에서 우리 모델은 외부 지식과 수동으로 실체 속성(클래스, 시제, 극성 등)을 주석하지 않은 상황에서 비교할 수 있는 성능을 실현했다.", 'sw': 'Utafiti wa muda mfupi wa mahusiano unakuwa mtafiti wa haraka. Tamko nyingi zimependekezwa, wakati wengi wao wakijikita kwenye kutengeneza vipengele kutoka rasilimali za nje. Watu wachache wamepewa hatua kubwa katika kazi inayohusiana na karibu: utekelezaji wa mahusiano. Katika kazi hii, tunaboresha njia ya sanaa inayohusiana na uteuzi kwa kutumia kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu (Bi-LSTM) pamoja na njia za kutegemea (DP). Tunafanya dhana ya ‘asili ya kawaida’ kuongeza uwakilishi wa DP wa viungo vinavyopitia hukumu. Katika kulinganisha mwisho na mifumo miwili ya sanaa kwenye benki ya TimeBank-Dense, mwelekeo wetu unafanikiwa na utendaji uliofanana, bila kutumia maarifa ya nje, pamoja na vifaa vinavyovutiwa kwa mikononi (darasa, tabia, udanganyifu, etc.).', 'id': "Klasifikasi hubungan sementara menjadi bidang penelitian aktif. Banyak metode telah diusulkan, sementara kebanyakan dari mereka fokus pada ekstraksi fitur dari sumber daya luar. Less attention has been paid to a significant advance in a closely related task: relation extraction.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami meminjam metode state-of-the-art dalam hubungan ekstraksi dengan mengadopsi memori bidireksi jangka pendek (Bi-LSTM) sepanjang jalur dependensi (DP). Kami membuat asumsi 'root umum' untuk memperluas representation DP dari hubungan kalimat salib. Dalam perbandingan terakhir dengan dua sistem terbaik di TimeBank-Dense, model kami mencapai prestasi yang komparabbil, tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan luar, serta atribut yang ditandai secara manual dari entitas (kelas, tegang, polaritas, dll.).", 'fa': 'رابطه\u200cهای معمولی به یک منطقه تحقیقات فعال تبدیل می\u200cشود. بسیاری از روش پیشنهاد داده شده\u200cاند، در حالی که بیشتر آنها روی اخراج ویژه\u200cهای از منابع خارجی تمرکز می\u200cکنند. توجه کمتر به پیشرفت بزرگی در یک کار نزدیک، ارتباط اخراج شده است. در این کار، ما یک روش وضعیت هنری را در ارتباط استخراج با پذیرش حافظه طولانی طولانی (Bi-LSTM) با مسیرهای بستگی (DP) قرض می\u200cدهیم. ما یک فرض «ریشه\u200cهای معمولی» را برای افزایش نمایش\u200cهای DP از ارتباطات متصل جمله می\u200cسازیم. در آخرین مقایسه با دو سیستم\u200cهای هنری در زمان بانک-دنس، مدل ما عملکرد قابل مقایسه می\u200cشود، بدون استفاده از دانش خارجی، و ویژگی\u200cهای متعلق به دست (کلاس، tense, polarity, etc.).', 'af': "Tydelike verhouding klassifikasie word 'n aktiewe verwysing veld geword. Baie metode is voorgestel, terwyl meeste van hulle fokus op die uitpakking van funksies van eksterne hulpbronne. Minder aandag is betaal tot 'n betekende vordering in 'n naby verwante taak: verwanting uitpakking. In hierdie werk het ons 'n staat-van-die-kunstenmetode in verwanting uitpakking uitgelei deur bidireksjoneel lang-term geheue (Bi-LSTM) aanneem langs afhanklikheidspasiepad (DP). Ons maak 'n 'gemeenskaplike root' aanvaar om Dpi voorstellings van kruisseting skakels te uitbrei. In die eindelike vergelyking met twee state-of-the-art stelsels op TimeBank-Dense, ons model bereik vergelykbaar prestasie, sonder om eksterne kennis te gebruik, en selfs handaanmerk eienskappe van entiteite (klas, tensie, polariteit, etc.).", 'tr': "Wagtlaýyn baglaýyşy gabdalyk aktiw ylmy alany bolup geçýär. Birnäçe yöntem teklip edildi, olaryň köpüsi daşary çeşmelerden özellikleri açmakda üns berýär. Nähili gabat täblisinde esasy ösümäne biraz üns berilýär: sowgat alyş. Bu işde, ikinji gezek kiçi-zamanly yada (Bi-LSTM) baglanyşyk ýoldaşlary bilen seredeniňde bir sanat täbi (DP) alýarys. Biz Dpi'nin çarpak sözlerin temsillerini uzatmak için 'ortak kök' tahmini yapıyoruz. Son günlerde TimeBank-Dens-de 2 sanat sistemasyna karşılaşykda, biziň modelimiz daşarydaky bilim ýüzünde ýakynlaşykly ukyplaryň (klas, sowgat, polaritet we bölegi) ýagdaýynda çykyp bilýär.", 'hy': "Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field.  Շատ մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել, մինչդեռ նրանցից շատերը կենտրոնանում են արտաքին ռեսուրսներից հատկանիշների վերացման վրա: Less attention has been paid to a significant advance in a closely related task: relation extraction.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք փոխառում ենք ամենահետաքրքիր մեթոդ վերացման հարաբերության մեջ' ընդունելով երկու ուղղությամբ երկարաժամկետ հիշողություն (Երբ-ԼՍԹՄ) կախվածության ճանապարհների երկայնքով: Մենք ընդհանուր արմատադրության ենթադրություն ենք ստեղծում, որպեսզի ընդլայնենք խտրի նախադասությունների արտահայտությունները: Վերջին համեմատության ժամանակ-բանկի-դենսի երկու ամենահետաքրքիր համակարգի հետ մեր մոդելը հասնում է համեմատական արդյունք, առանց օգտագործելու արտաքին գիտելիքներ, ինչպես նաև ձեռքով նշումնավորված առանձնահատկություններ (դասարան, ժամանակը, բնակչությունը և այլն):", 'bn': "সাময়িক সম্পর্ক ক্লাস্ফিকেশন একটি সক্রিয় গবেষণা ক্ষেত্রে পরিণত হচ্ছে। অনেক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যদিও তাদের বেশীরভাগ বাইরের সম্পদ থেকে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য নিয়ে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। Less attention has been paid to a significant advance in a closely related task: relation extraction.  এই কাজে আমরা বিদীর্ঘ দীর্ঘ সময়ের মেমরি (বিএলসিএম) নির্ভরশীল পথ (ডিপিপি) নিয়ে নিয়ে একটি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের সম্পর্কের বের করার মাধ্যমে একটি রাষ্ট্ আমরা 'সাধারণ মূল' ধারণা তৈরি করি যে ডিপির প্রতিনিধিত্ব বাড়িয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে ক্রিস্টের লিঙ্কের জন্য। টাইমব্যাংক-ডেন্সের দুটি শিল্প ব্যবস্থার সাথে শেষ তুলনায়, আমাদের মডেল তুলনার প্রভাব অর্জন করে, বাইরের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া আর নিজেদের বিষয়বস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার কর", 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት መግለጫ የአሮጌ ትምህርት መሬት ሆነዋል፡፡ ብዙ ሥርዓቶች ተዘጋጅተዋል፣ አብዛኞቻቸውም ውጭ ሀብትን ለመውጣት ነው፡፡ በአቅራቢያ ግንኙነት በተደረገው ስራ ላይ ትንሽ ትኩረት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት ውጤት፡፡ In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long short-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP).  የDP የሥርዓት ግንኙነቶችን ለመዘረጋ “የተለየ ሥር” ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው ከቴምባንክ-ዳንስ የሁለተኛው የ-የ-የ-ዐርብ ስርዓት ጋር በተስተያየ፣ ሞዴላታችን ውጭ እውቀት ሳይሆን እና በሥርዓት የተጠቃሚ አካባቢዎች (ክፍል፣ ስሜት፣ polarity 等) የተደረገውን አካል ይደርጋል፡፡', 'ca': 'Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field.  S\'han proposat molts mètodes, mentre la majoria es centren en extrair característiques dels recursos externs. S\'ha prestat menys atenció a un avanç significatiu en una tasca estretament relacionada: extracció de relacions. En aquesta feina, prenem en préstec un mètode d\'última generació en relació amb l\'extracció adoptant la memòria bidireccional a curt termini (Bi-LSTM) al llarg dels camis de dependencia (DP). Fem una suposició "raíz comú" per estendre les representacions del DP dels enllaços transversals. En la comparació final amb dos sistemes més avançats en TimeBank-Dense, el nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment comparable sense utilitzar coneixements externs, com també atributs anotats manualment d\'entitats (classe, tensió, polaritat, etc.).', 'cs': 'Klasifikace časových vztahů se stává aktivním výzkumným oborem. Bylo navrženo mnoho metod, zatímco většina z nich se zaměřuje na extrahování funkcí z externích zdrojů. Méně pozornosti byla věnována významnému pokroku v úzce souvisejícím úkolu: extrakci vztahů. V této práci si půjčujeme nejmodernější metodu extrakce vztahů pomocí obousměrné dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti (Bi-LSTM) podél závislostních cest (DP). Děláme "společný kořen" předpoklad pro rozšíření DP reprezentací křížových vět odkazů. V závěrečném srovnání se dvěma nejmodernějšími systémy na TimeBank-Dense dosahuje náš model srovnatelného výkonu bez použití externích znalostí, stejně jako ručně anotovaných atributů entit (třída, čas, polarita atd.).', 'et': 'Ajaliste suhete klassifikatsioon on muutumas aktiivseks uurimisvaldkonnaks. On välja pakutud palju meetodeid, samas kui enamik neist keskendub funktsioonide ekstraheerimisele välisressurssidest. Vähem tähelepanu on pööratud märkimisväärsele edasiminekule tihedalt seotud ülesandes: suhete kaevandamisele. Käesolevas töös laename kaasaegset meetodit seoste ekstraheerimiseks, kasutades kahesuunalist pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu (Bi-LSTM) sõltuvusteedel (DP). Me teeme "ühise juure" eelduse laiendada DP esitusi ristlausete linke. Lõplikus võrdluses kahe tipptasemel TimeBank-Dense süsteemiga saavutab meie mudel võrreldava jõudluse ilma väliseid teadmisi kasutamata, samuti käsitsi märgitud olemite atribuute (klass, aeg, polaarsus jne).', 'fi': 'Aikasuhteiden luokittelusta on tulossa aktiivinen tutkimusala. Monia menetelmiä on ehdotettu, ja useimmat niistä keskittyvät ominaisuuksien poimimiseen ulkoisista resursseista. Vähemmän huomiota on kiinnitetty merkittävään edistymiseen läheisesti liittyvässä tehtävässä: suhteiden purkamisessa. Tässä työssä lainaamme viimeisintä suhdeuuttamismenetelmää ottamalla käyttöön kaksisuuntainen pitkän aikavälin muisti (Bi-LSTM) riippuvuusreittien varrella (DP). Teemme "yhteisen juuren" olettamuksen laajentaaksemme DP-esityksiä ristilauseiden linkeistä. Lopullisessa vertailussa kahteen nykyaikaiseen TimeBank-Densen järjestelmään mallimme saavuttaa vertailukelpoisen suorituskyvyn ilman ulkoista tietämystä sekä manuaalisesti merkityt entiteettien attribuutit (luokka, aikaväli, napaisuus jne.).', 'sq': "Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field.  Lots of methods have been proposed, while most of them focus on extracting features from external resources.  Less attention has been paid to a significant advance in a closely related task: relation extraction.  Në këtë punë, ne marrim hua një metodë më të lartë në lidhje me nxjerrjen e lidhjes duke miratuar kujtesën bidireksionale afat-shkurtër (Bi-LSTM) përgjatë rrugëve të varësisë (DP). Ne bëjmë një supozim 'rrënjë të përbashkët' për të zgjeruar përfaqësimet e DP të lidhjeve ndër-fjalë. Në krahasimin përfundimtar me dy sisteme më të avancuar në TimeBank-Dense, modeli ynë arrin performancë të krahasueshme, pa përdorur njohuri të jashtme si dhe atribute të anotuara manualisht të njësive (klasë, tension, polaritet, etj.).", 'bs': "Temporalna klasifikacija veza postaje aktivno istraživanje polje. Mnoge metode su predložene, dok se većina njih fokusira na izvlačenje karakteristika iz vanjskih resursa. Manje pažnje je obraćeno značajnom napretku u bliskom povezanom zadatku: izvlačenje odnosa. U ovom poslu posudili smo metodu stanja umjetnosti u odnosu na ekstrakciju usvajajući dvodirektivnu dugoročnu pamćenje (Bi-LSTM) duž putova ovisnosti (DP). Napravimo pretpostavku 'zajedničkog korijena' da proširimo predstave DP-a veza prekrštenih rečenica. U konačnom usporedbi sa dva stanja umjetnosti na TimeBank-Densu, naš model postiže usporedno izvršenje, bez upotrebe vanjskih znanja, kao i manualno annotirane atribute entiteta (klasa, napetost, polaritet itd.).", 'az': "Temporal relation classification is becoming an active research field. Bir√ßox metodlar t…ôblińü edilmiŇüdir, lakin onlarńĪn …ôks…ôriyy…ôti dńĪŇü resurslardan f…ôaliyy…ôtl…ôri √ßńĪxartmańüa odaqlanńĪr. YaxńĪnlńĪq …ôlaq…ôsind…ô olan iŇül…ôrd…ô √ßox √ß…ôtin bir avans √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ô daha az dikkat edildi: …ôlaq…ôsi √ßńĪxarmaq. Bu iŇüd…ô, m√ľv…ôff…ôqiyy…ôt yollarńĪna (DP) yollarńĪ il…ô birlikd…ô ikidiktiraqlńĪ uzun-m√ľdd…ôt hafńĪza (Bi-LSTM) q…ôbul ed…ôr…ôk, sanat yolu …ôlaq…ôsind…ô istifad…ô ed…ôc…ôk bir Ňü…ôkil alńĪrńĪq. Biz C…ôbrail bańülantńĪlarńĪnńĪn DP g√∂st…ôriŇül…ôrini geniŇül…ôm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn 'ortaq k√∂k' t…ôs…ôvv√ľr edirik. TimeBank-Dense-deki iki sanat sistemi il…ô son x…ôrcl…ôndiril…ônd…ô modell…ôrimiz daŇüńĪnabilir performansńĪmńĪzńĪ, dńĪŇü bilgi istifad…ô etm…ôd…ôn, …ôlli t…ôhsil edilmiŇü entitl…ôrin (sńĪnńĪf, sńĪxńĪntńĪ, polarlńĪq, etc.).", 'he': 'מסווג יחסים זמניים הופך למחקר פעיל. הרבה שיטות הוצעו, בעוד רובם מתמקדים בהוציאה של תכונות משאבים חיצוניים. פחות תשומת לב קיבלה התקדמות משמעותית במשימה קשורה קרובה: חוטפת יחסים. בעבודה הזו, אנו משאילים שיטה חדשה במערכת היחסים באמצעות אימוץ זיכרון ארוך-טווח (Bi-LSTM) בין שני כיוונים לאורך דרכים תלויות (DP). אנחנו משתמשים בהנחה "שורש משותף" כדי להאריך מייצגים DP של קשרים משפטיים. בהשוואה האחרונה לשני מערכות מוקדמות על TimeBank-Dense, המודל שלנו משיג ביצועים שווים, בלי להשתמש בידע חיצוני, כמו גם תכונות של יחידות (כיתה, מתוח, קוטביות, וכו.).', 'ha': "Ana zama wani field mai amfani da shirin haɗi na mutane. An buƙata wasu metode masu yawa, kuma masu yawansu sun yi makini ga su sami masu fitarwa na rasilitan baka. Kaɗan an bincike wa kafin mai girma a gabatar da wani aikin wanda ya yi makusanci: Extractin mazaɓa. Daga wannan aikin, muna ɗaukar wata halin-sanar da ke samu'a da kuma tuna kwamfyutan lokacin daidai (Bi-LSM) da hanyõyi masu inganci (daidai). Munã samar da zaɓen 'ruwan ɗabi'a' da za'a shimfiɗa danganiya na danganiya na danganta. Ga ƙarshen da aka sami tsarin-biyu na-tsari na-sanar kan TimeBank-Dense, misalinmu yana sãmun mafarin aiki daidai, kuma bã da amfani da ilmi bakwai, da kuma misãlai masu zartar da hannayen abubuwa (daraja, kwance, Polarity, etc).", 'sk': 'Klasifikacija časovnih relacij postaja aktivno raziskovalno področje. Predlagane so bile številne metode, večina pa se osredotoča na pridobivanje funkcij iz zunanjih virov. Manj pozornosti je bilo namenjeno znatnemu napredku pri tesno povezani nalogi: ekstrakciji odnosov. V tem delu si izposodimo najsodobnejšo metodo ekstrakcije relacij z uporabo dvosmernega dolgoročnega pomnilnika (Bi-LSTM) po poti odvisnosti (DP). Predpostavljamo "skupni koren" za razširitev DP predstavitev navzkrižnih stavkov. V končni primerjavi z dvema najsodobnejšima sistemoma na TimeBank-Dense naš model doseže primerljivo zmogljivost brez uporabe zunanjega znanja ter ročno označene atribute entitet (razred, čas, polarnost itd.).', 'jv': "AllProgressBar Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh sistem sing bisa supoyata, akeh akeh dhéwé ngulinakake supoyatan kanggo nggolaké supoyatan Tool Options, Layersdock Nang lan gunggo iki, kita nglanggar kelas-of-the-arts method nang rabi tanggal manut (bi-LTT M) ngenggo uripjenengan paths (PP). Awakdhéwé nggawe 'Common root' kuwi nggawe Ngubah Perusahaan-Perusahaan langgambar barang nggawe tarjamahan Anyone", 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དུས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་འཛུལ་བ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བྱས་ཡོད། ཕྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཙམ་ནས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེ གནད་དོན་ཡོད་མིན་ན་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པར་གནང་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། In this work, we borrow a state-of-the-art method in relation extraction by adopting bidirectional long-term memory (Bi-LSTM) along dependency paths (DP). ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་DP་ཡི་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Finally comparison to two state-of-the-art systems on TimeBank-Dense, our model achieves comparable performance, without using external knowledge, as well as manually annotated attributes of entities (class, tense, polarity, etc.).'}
{'en': 'AMR-to-text Generation with Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar', 'ar': 'إنشاء AMR إلى نص باستخدام قواعد استبدال العقدة المتزامنة', 'es': 'Generación de AMR a texto con gramática de reemplazo de nodos sinc', 'fr': 'Génération AMR en texte avec grammaire de remplacement de nœud synchrone', 'pt': 'Geração de AMR para texto com gramática de substituição de nó síncrona', 'ja': '鍚屾湡銉庛兗銉夌疆鎻涙枃娉曘倰浣跨敤銇椼仧AMR - to - text鐢熸垚', 'zh': '以同步节点易语法生 AMR 至文本', 'ru': 'Генерация AMR-текста с грамматикой замены синхронных узлов', 'hi': 'तुल्यकालिक नोड प्रतिस्थापन व्याकरण के साथ AMR-से-पाठ जनरेशन', 'ga': 'Giniúint AMR-go-téacs le Gramadach Athsholáthair Nód Sioncrónach', 'el': 'Δημιουργία AMR-σε-κείμενο με τη γραμματική αντικατάστασης συγχρονισμένων κόμβων', 'hu': 'AMR-szöveg generálása szinkron csomópontcserével Nyelvtan', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': 'Generazione AMR-to-text con grammatica di sostituzione del nodo sincrono', 'kk': 'AMR- ден мәтінді қадамдастыру тобын алмастыру бағанымен құру', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Генерација од AMR во текст со синхроничен грамар за замена на јазол', 'ms': 'Penjanaan AMR-ke-teks dengan Grama Ganti Nod Sinkron', 'ml': 'സിന്\u200dക്രോണിസ് നോഡ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ഗ്രാമാറ്റര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് AMR-ലേക്ക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ജനാധിപതി', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni minn AMR għal test b’Grammar Sinkronju ta’ Sostituzzjoni tan-Nodu', 'mn': 'AMR-ээс текст бүтээмж', 'no': 'Generasjon av AMR- til- tekst med synkroniske nodeutbyttingsgramma', 'pl': 'Generowanie AMR-to-text z gramatyką synchronicznego wymiany węzłów', 'sr': 'AMR- na- tekst Generacija sa sinhroniziranim Grammarom zamjene node', 'so': 'AMR-to-text Generation with Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar', 'si': 'AMR- ට- පාළුවට පරීක්ෂණය සමග සම්බන්ධ නෝඩ් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ග්\u200dරාම්මර්', 'sv': 'AMR-till-text-generering med synkroniserad nodersättning grammatik', 'ta': 'ஒற்றைப்படுத்தும் நூல் மாற்றும் வரை AMR- to- text உரை உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'AMR- to- text generation with Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar', 'ro': 'Generare AMR-text cu gramatică de înlocuire sincronă a nodurilor', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng AMR', 'hr': 'Generacija AMR- na- tekst sa sinhroniziranim zamjenom node Grammarom', 'nl': 'Generatie van AMR-naar-tekst met synchroon knooppunt vervanging grammatica', 'bg': 'Създаване на AMR към текст с граматика за замяна на синхронен възел', 'da': 'AMR- til- tekst- generering med synkroniseret node udskiftning grammatik', 'id': 'Generasi AMR-ke-teks dengan Grammar Ganti Nod Sinkron', 'de': 'AMR-to-text Generierung mit Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar', 'ko': '동기화 노드 대체 구문을 사용하여 AMR에서 텍스트로 생성', 'fa': 'تولید AMR- به- متن با گرم جایگزینۀ نوع همگانی', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Uzalishi wa maandishi ya AMR-hadi-kwa-ujumbe na Grammar ya Mahadilisho ya Node yenye Synchronous Node', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi AMR-në-tekst me Gram Zëvendësimi Sinkron i Nodit', 'bn': 'Synchronous Node Replace Grammar সহ AMR-to-text প্রজন্ম', 'az': 'AMR-d…ôn-m…ôtn M…ôxluqatńĪ Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar', 'tr': 'AMR-den Metin Döndürmek Senkron Taz Adlandırma Grammar ı ile', 'cs': 'Generování AMR na text s gramatikou synchronního uzlu', 'et': 'AMR- tekstiks genereerimine sünkroonse sõlme asendamise grammatikaga', 'bs': 'Generacija AMR- na- tekst sa sinkronosnim zamjenom Node Grammarom', 'ca': 'Generació AMR-a-text amb gramàtic de substitució sincronista del nod', 'fi': 'AMR-tekstiksi generointi synkronisella solmukorvauksen kieliopilla', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'he': 'גרמה AMR- לטקסט עם גרמה מחליפת אצבע סינכרונית', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje AMR v besedilo s sinhrono slovnico zamenjave vozlišč', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'AMR-to-text Generation with Synchronous Node Replacement Grammar'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the task of AMR-to-text generation by leveraging synchronous node replacement grammar. During training, graph-to-string rules are learned using a heuristic extraction algorithm. At test time, a graph transducer is applied to collapse input AMRs and generate output sentences. Evaluated on a standard benchmark, our method gives the state-of-the-art result.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة مهمة إنشاء AMR-to-text من خلال الاستفادة من قواعد استبدال العقدة المتزامنة. أثناء التدريب ، يتم تعلم قواعد الرسم البياني إلى السلسلة باستخدام خوارزمية الاستخراج التجريبية. في وقت الاختبار ، يتم تطبيق محول طاقة الرسم البياني لطي مدخلات AMR وإنشاء جمل الإخراج. تم تقييمها وفقًا لمعيار قياسي ، وتعطي طريقتنا أحدث النتائج.', 'es': 'Este documento aborda la tarea de generación de AMR a texto mediante el aprovechamiento de la gramática de reemplazo de nodos sincrónicos. Durante el entrenamiento, las reglas de gráfico a cadena se aprenden mediante un algoritmo de extracción heurística. En el momento de la prueba, se aplica un transductor gráfico para colapsar los AMR de entrada y generar sentencias de salida. Evaluado en un punto de referencia estándar, nuestro método proporciona un resultado de vanguardia.', 'fr': "Cet article traite de la tâche de génération AMR en texte en utilisant la grammaire de remplacement synchrone des nœuds. Pendant l'entraînement, les règles de graph-to-string sont apprises à l'aide d'un algorithme d'extraction heuristique. Au moment du test, un transducteur graphique est appliqué pour réduire les RAM d'entrée et générer des phrases de sortie. Évaluée sur un benchmark standard, notre méthode donne des résultats de pointe.", 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda a tarefa de geração de AMR para texto, aproveitando a gramática de substituição de nó síncrona. Durante o treinamento, as regras de gráfico para string são aprendidas usando um algoritmo de extração heurística. No momento do teste, um transdutor gráfico é aplicado para recolher AMRs de entrada e gerar sentenças de saída. Avaliado em um benchmark padrão, nosso método fornece o resultado de última geração.', 'ja': '本稿では、同期ノード置換文法を活用したAMR - to - text生成の課題について述べる。トレーニング中、グラフから文字列へのルールは、ヒューリスティック抽出アルゴリズムを使用して学習されます。試験時には、グラフトランスデューサを適用して入力AMRを折りたたみ、出力文を生成します。標準的なベンチマークで評価され、当社のメソッドは最先端の結果を提供します。', 'zh': '本文因同步节点易语法解 AMR 至文本成务。 练之间,用启发式提取算法学图形至字符串法。 试以图形传感器叠输AMR生输句。 于准准上评之,吾法最先进。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर तुल्यकालिक नोड प्रतिस्थापन व्याकरण का लाभ उठाकर AMR-to-text generation के कार्य को संबोधित करता है। प्रशिक्षण के दौरान, ग्राफ-टू-स्ट्रिंग नियमों को एक हेरिस्टिक निष्कर्षण एल्गोरिथ्म का उपयोग करके सीखा जाता है। परीक्षण के समय, इनपुट एएमआर को ध्वस्त करने और आउटपुट वाक्य उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक ग्राफ ट्रांसड्यूसर लागू किया जाता है। एक मानक बेंचमार्क पर मूल्यांकन किया जाता है, हमारी विधि अत्याधुनिक परिणाम देती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье рассматривается задача генерации AMR в текст с использованием грамматики замены синхронных узлов. Во время обучения правила от графа к строке изучаются с помощью алгоритма эвристического извлечения. Во время тестирования, датчик графа применяется для свертывания входных AMR и генерирования выходных предложений. Оцениваемый по стандартному бенчмарку, наш метод дает самый современный результат.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar thasc AMR-go-téacs a ghiniúint trí ghramadach athsholáthair nóid shioncrónach a ghiaráil. Le linn na hoiliúna, foghlaimítear rialacha graf-go-teaghrán ag baint úsáide as algartam eastósctha heorastúil. Ag am tástála, cuirtear trasduchtóir graf i bhfeidhm chun AMBanna ionchuir a laghdú agus abairtí aschuir a ghiniúint. Arna mheasúnú ar thagarmharc caighdeánach, tugann ár modh an toradh úrscothach.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία ασχολείται με το έργο της δημιουργίας σε κείμενο χρησιμοποιώντας τη γραμματική αντικατάστασης συγχρόνων κόμβων. Κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, οι κανόνες γραφής-συμβολοσειράς μαθαίνονται χρησιμοποιώντας έναν αλγόριθμο heuristικής εξαγωγής. Κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής, ένας μετατροπέας γραφήματος εφαρμόζεται για να καταρρεύσει τις εισαγωγές και να παραγάγει τις προτάσεις εξόδου. Αξιολογούμενη βάσει ενός τυποποιημένου κριτηρίου αναφοράς, η μέθοδος μας δίνει το αποτέλεσμα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი AMR- დან ტექსტის შექმნის დავალების მისამართება სინქრონის კუმენტის შეცვლის გრამიმაში. საკუთარი განათლების განმავლობაში, საკუთარი განმავლობაში საკუთარი წესები იყავებენ, რომელიც ჰერისტიკური ექსპერქციის ალგორიტიმს გამოყენ ტესტის დროში, გრაფიკური ტრანსუქტორი გამოყენებულია AMR- ს გადატანა და გამოყენებული სიტყვების შექმნა. ჲუვნწგანა ნა ჟრანეაპრნარა ბვნქმაპკა, ნაქთწრ მვრჲე ეაგა პვჱსლრარა ნა თჱკლძფვნთვრჲ.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az AMR-to-text generálás feladatával foglalkozik a szinkron csomópont helyettesítő nyelvtan használatával. A képzés során a graf-to-string szabályokat heurisztikus extrakciós algoritmus segítségével tanulják meg. A tesztidőben grafikonátalakítót alkalmaznak a bemeneti AMR-ek összeomlására és kimeneti mondatok generálására. A standard benchmark alapján értékelt módszerünk a legkorszerűbb eredményt biztosítja.', 'it': "Questo articolo affronta il compito della generazione AMR-to-text sfruttando la grammatica di sostituzione dei nodi sincroni. Durante la formazione, le regole da grafo a stringa vengono apprese utilizzando un algoritmo di estrazione euristica. Al momento della prova, un trasduttore grafico viene applicato per comprimere AMR in ingresso e generare frasi in uscita. Valutato su un benchmark standard, il nostro metodo fornisce risultati all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз AMR- мен мәтіннің құру тапсырмасын қадамдастырып, қадамдастыру тұлбаны алмастыру грамматтарын көмектеседі. Оқыту кезінде, график және жол ережелері геуристік тарқату алгоритмін қолданып үйреніледі. Сынау уақытында, AMR кірісін құрып шығыс сөздерді құру үшін график аударғышы қолданылады. Стандартты белгілерді бағалап, әдіміздің күй- жай нәтижесін береді.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија ја обраќа задачата на генерацијата AMR- во- текст со користење на граматиката за замена на синхронични јазли. За време на обуката, правилата од граф до стринг се научија користејќи хеористички алгоритм за екстракција. Во времето на тестот, се применува графски трансдукер за да се колапсираат внесените AMR и да се генерираат излезни реченици. Оценети на стандарден резултат, нашиот метод го дава најсовремениот резултат.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini alamat tugas generasi AMR-ke-teks dengan menggunakan grammar penggantian nod sinkronik. Semasa latihan, peraturan graf-ke-rentetan belajar menggunakan algoritma ekstraksi heuristik. Pada masa ujian, pengubah graf dilaksanakan untuk runtuh input AMR dan menghasilkan kalimat output. Dihargai pada benchmark piawai, kaedah kita memberikan hasil terbaik.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-AMR għat-test permezz tal-ingranaġġ tal-grammar tas-sostituzzjoni tan-nodi sinkroniċi. During training, graph-to-string rules are learned using a heuristic extraction algorithm.  Fil-ħin tat-test, jiġi applikat trasdutur tal-graff għall-AMRs ta’ input kollass u jiġġenera sentenzi ta’ output. Evalwat fuq punt ta’ riferiment standard, il-metodu tagħna jagħti r-riżultat l-aktar avvanzat.', 'lt': 'Šis dokumentas skirtas AMR kūrimo tekstui uždaviniui, naudojant sinchroninių mazgų pakeitimo gramatiką. Mokymo metu grafikos taisyklės mokomos naudojant heuristinio ekstrahavimo algoritmą. Bandymo metu naudojamas grafiko transdutorius, skirtas sugadinti įėjimo AMR ir generuoti išėjimo sakinius. Įvertintas pagal standartinį lyginamąjį rodiklį, mūsų metodas duoda naujausius rezultatus.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь AMR-ээс-текст бүтээлтийн ажлыг шинжилгээ товчуудын орлуулах грамматаар дамжуулдаг. Сургуулалт хийх үед график-с-стринг дүрмийг хюрист хадгалах алгоритм ашиглаж суралцдаг. Тест хугацаанд график орлуулагч AMR-г буцааж гаргаж өгүүлбэрүүдийг бий болгодог. Стандарттай багц дээр үнэлгээд бидний арга нь урлагийн төвшин үр дүнг өгдөг.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d AMR-ലേക്ക്- ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള ജോലിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു പരിശീലന സമയത്ത്, ഹെയ്രിസ്റ്റിക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ്-ലേക്ക് സ് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സമയത്ത്, AMRs പുറത്ത് പോകുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്സറ്റര്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പുറത്ത് വ ഒരു സാധാരണ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതി', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł porusza zadanie generowania AMR-to-text poprzez wykorzystanie gramatyki synchronicznej zastępowania węzłów. Podczas treningu reguły graf-to-string są uczone przy użyciu heurystycznego algorytmu ekstrakcji. W czasie testu przetwornik wykresu jest stosowany do zamknięcia wejściowych AMR i generowania zdań wyjściowych. Oceniona na podstawie standardowego standardu referencyjnego, nasza metoda daje najnowocześniejszy wynik.', 'no': 'Denne papiret adresserer oppgåva til AMR- til- tekst ved å levera synkroniske nodebytting- grammar. Med opplæring lærer grafen til streng med ein heuristisk ekstraksjonsalgoritme. På testtid vert det brukt eit grafikkoverføringar for å kopla inn AMR- ar og laga utdata- setningar. Evaluert på ein standard benchmark, måten vårt gir resultatet av kunsten.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează sarcina generării AMR-la-text prin utilizarea gramaticii sincrone de înlocuire a nodurilor. În timpul antrenamentului, regulile graf-to-string sunt învățate folosind un algoritm de extracție euristică. La momentul testului, un traductor grafic este aplicat pentru a colapsa AMR-urile de intrare și pentru a genera propoziții de ieșire. Evaluată pe baza unui benchmark standard, metoda noastră oferă rezultate de ultimă oră.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir obrađuje zadatak generacije AMR-na-tekst uključujući gramatiku zamjene sinhronskog čvora. Tokom treninga, pravila grafa do string se nauče koristeći heuristički algoritam ekstrakcije. U testnom vremenu se primjenjuje transduktor grafika za kolapsanje unutarnjih AMR-a i proizvedenje rečenica za izlaz. Procjenjujući standardnu kritiku, naš metod daje rezultat umetnosti.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqada AMR-to-text generation by levering synchronous node replacement grammar. Inta lagu jiro waxbarashada waxaa lagu bartaa sharciyada sawir-sawir-sawir. Wakhtiga la imtixaamo waxaa lagu codsadaa xaraf wax ku wareejiya si uu u burburo AMRs kadibna uu u sameeyo fursad soo baxa. Sida lagu qiimeeyo qorsheynta caadiga ah, qaabkanagu wuxuu siinayaa xaaladda farshaxanka.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව AMR- ට- පාළිස්තුව නිර්මාණයේ වැඩක් ලිපිනය කරනවා සමාන්\u200dය නෝඩ් වෙනුවෙන් ග්\u200dරාමාර්කාරය සඳහා ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලාවේ, ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක ස්ට්\u200dරින්ට් නීතියක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා හෙයුරිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  පරීක්ෂණ කාලයේදී, ග්\u200dරාෆ් වාර්ථාපකයක් ඇතුළත් AMRs සිදුවීමට භාවිත කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප ස්ථානික බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එකක් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා, අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දෙ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar uppgiften för AMR-till-text generering genom att utnyttja synkron nodersättning grammatik. Under utbildningen lär man sig graf-till-sträng regler med hjälp av en heuristisk extraktionsalgoritm. Vid testtiden appliceras en grafomvandlare för att komprimera input AMR och generera utmatningsmeningar. Utvärderad på ett standardriktmärke ger vår metod det senaste resultatet.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் AMR- to- text உரை உருவாக்கத்தின் பணியை முகவரிக்கிறது ஒத்திசைவு நோட் மாற்று வரைப்படம் மூலம். பயிற்சிக்கும் போது, வரைபடத்திலிருந்து சரம் சோதனைக்கான நேரத்தில், AMRs உள்ளீடுகளை விழும்பு வரைபடம் மாற்றுபவர் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் மற்றும் வெளியீட்டு வாக்க Evaluated on a standard benchmark, our method gives the state-of-the-art result.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ AMR-to-text نسل کے کام کو سمجھاتا ہے، سینکرون نوڈ بدلنے کے گراماری کے ذریعے۔ تعلیم کے موقع، گراف سے استرینگ قوانین کو ہوریستیک اخراج الگوریتم کے استعمال سے سیکھا جاتا ہے. امتحان کے وقت، ایک گراف ٹرانسڈوکر کو AMRs کے اندھیرے کے لئے لازم کیا جاتا ہے اور اپوٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ ایجار کرتا ہے ایک استاندارڈ بنچم مارک پر مطابق کیا گیا ہے، ہماری طریقہ آرتی کا نتیجہ دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Tashqi paytida, grafik- to- string qoidalari heuristik ajratish algorithi yordamida o'rganadi. Name Andoza benchmark davomida tasdiqlangan usulning holatini saqlaydi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến nhiệm vụ sản xuất dạng chữ AMR bằng cách dùng ngữ pháp thay thế nút đồng bộ. Trong đợt huấn luyện, các quy tắc đồ thị với dây được học sử dụng thuật to án trích xuất thần kinh. Vào thời điểm thử nghiệm, một máy biến đồ thị được áp dụng để sụp đổ các AMR nhập và tạo ra các câu xuất. Đánh giá theo tiêu chuẩn, phương pháp của chúng tôi cung cấp kết quả hiện đại.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir obraća se zadatku generacije AMR-a-teksta primjenom gramatike zamjene sinhronskog čvora. Tijekom treninga, pravila grafa do string se uče koristeći heuristički algoritam ekstrakcije. U vrijeme testiranja, prevoditelj grafika se primjenjuje za kolapsanje unutarnjih AMR-a i proizvedenje izlaznih rečenica. Procjenjujući standardnu kritiku, naš metod daje rezultat umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Тази статия разглежда задачата за генериране на текст чрез използване на синхронната граматика за замяна на възел. По време на обучението правилата от графика до низа се научават с помощта на алгоритъм за евристично извличане. По време на изпитването се прилага графичен датчик за колапсиране на входните АМР и генериране на изходни изречения. Оценен по стандартен показател, нашият метод дава най-съвременния резултат.', 'da': "Dette dokument omhandler opgaven med AMR-til-tekst generering ved at udnytte synkron node erstatning grammatik. Under træning læres graf-til-streng regler ved hjælp af en heuristisk ekstraktionsalgoritme. På testtidspunktet anvendes en graftransducer til at kollapse input AMR'er og generere output sætninger. Vores metode er vurderet ud fra et standardbenchmark og giver det nyeste resultat.", 'id': 'Kertas ini mengarahkan tugas dari generasi AMR-ke-teks dengan menggunakan grammar penggantian nod sinkronis. Selama latihan, aturan grafik ke string belajar menggunakan algoritma ekstraksi heuristik. Pada waktu tes, transducer grafik diterapkan untuk runtuh input AMR dan menghasilkan kalimat output. Dihargai pada benchmark standar, metode kami memberikan hasil terbaik.', 'nl': "Dit artikel behandelt de taak van AMR-naar-tekst generatie door gebruik te maken van synchrone node replacement grammatica. Tijdens de training worden grafiek-to-string regels geleerd met behulp van een heuristisch extractie algoritme. Op testtijd wordt een grafiektransducer toegepast om input AMR's in te klappen en uitvoerzinnen te genereren. Geavalueerd op een standaard benchmark, geeft onze methode het state-of-the-art resultaat.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار نسل AMR- به متن را با استفاده کردن گرم جایگزینی گرم\u200cهای گرم\u200cهای هماهنگ به نشان می\u200cدهد. در طول تمرین، قانون\u200cهای گراف به string با استفاده از الگوریتم استخراج هوریستیک یاد می\u200cگیرند. در زمان آزمایش، یک ترجمه گرافی برای خراب آمریکا در آمریکا کاربرد می\u200cشود و جمله\u200cهای خروجی را ایجاد می\u200cکند. روي يه مقدار استاندارد ارزيابي شده، روش ما نتيجه هنري رو ميده.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inahusisha jukumu la kizazi cha AMR-hadi-ujumbe kwa kutumia programu ya mabadiliko ya node yenye ushirikiano. Wakati wa mafunzo, sheria za picha-hadi-mfululizo zinajifunza kwa kutumia algorithi ya utekelezaji wa umeme. Wakati wa jaribio, mpiga picha inatumika kuanguka kwa AMRs na kutengeneza hukumu za output. Tathmini katika bendera ya msingi, mbinu yetu inatoa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz synkron düğüm almak gramatisini süýtgeden AMR-den metin döredilmesini adrese edir. Okuwçy wagtynda, grafik bilen string kurallary heuristik gaýşartma algoritmy ulanyp öwrenip bilýär. Synaglançy wagtynda, girdi AMR'i çykarmak üçin bir grafik terjimeçisi uygulanýar we çizgi sözleri oluşturar Çaltylyk derejesinde deňlenýär. Biziň yöntemimiz sungatyň netijesini verir.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit befasst sich mit der Aufgabe der AMR-zu-Text-Generierung durch Nutzung der synchronen Node Replacement Grammatik. Während des Trainings werden Graph-to-String Regeln mit einem heuristischen Extraktionsalgorithmus erlernt. Zur Testzeit wird ein Graphenaufnehmer angewendet, um Eingangs-AMRs zu kollabieren und Ausgangssätze zu generieren. Ausgewertet auf einem Standard-Benchmark liefert unsere Methode das Ergebnis auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik.', 'ko': '본고는 동기화 노드 교체 문법을 이용하여 AMR에서 텍스트로 생성되는 임무를 해결하고자 한다.훈련 과정에서 계발식 추출 알고리즘을 사용하여 도형에서 문자열까지의 규칙을 학습한다.테스트 중에 그래픽 센서를 사용하여 AMR을 축소하여 입력하고 출력 문을 생성합니다.표준 기준에서 평가를 진행하는 우리의 방법은 가장 선진적인 결과를 제시했다.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የAMR-to-text ትውልድ ስራዎችን በሲንክሮን ኖድ ተካታ گراማር በመስጠት አድራሻ ነው። በተማርክ ጊዜ የgraph-to-string ሥርዓቶች በኤርትሪክ ውጤት አልgorithም ይማራሉ። በተፈተና ጊዜ የgraph transmitter ፕሮግራሙን ለመውሰድ እና የውጤት ፍርድ መፍጠር ይደረጋል። በዓላማዊ ወረቀት ላይ የተረጋገጠ የግንኙነታችን የ-የ-አርእስት ውጤት ይሰጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը դիտարկում է AMR-ի տեքստի ստեղծման խնդիրը, օգտագործելով սինկրոնական հանգույցների փոխարինման գրամագրությունը: Արշավի ընթացքում գծագրի առ լարերի կանոնները սովորվում են հորիստիկ արտահանման ալգորիթմ օգտագործելով: Փորձարկումների ժամանակ գծագրի հաղորդիչը կիրառվում է անջատելու մուտքագրման ԱՄՌ-ների և արտադրման նախադասությունների համար: Արժեցված ստանդարտ հարաբերականի վրա, մեր մեթոդը տալիս է ամենաբարձր արդյունք:', 'af': "Hierdie papier adres die taak van AMR- to- text generasie deur sinkroon node vervang grammatiek te verwyder. In die oefening word graf-na-string reëls geleer deur 'n heuristiese uittrekking algoritme te gebruik. Na toets tyd, word 'n graaf oordragter toegewend na oordrag invoer AMR en genereer uitset setinge. Geevalueer op 'n standaard benchmark, ons metode gee die staat van die kuns resultaat.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument adreson detyrën e gjenerimit AMR-në-tekst duke përdorur gramatikën e zëvendësimit të nodëve sinkronike. Gjatë stërvitjes, rregullat nga grafi në rreshtë mësohen duke përdorur një algoritëm heoristik ekstrahimi. Në kohën e testit, një transducer grafik është aplikuar për të rrëzuar input AMRs dhe të gjenerojë fjalët e daljes. E vlerësuar në një referencë standard, metoda jonë jep rezultatin më të lartë.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir obraća se zadatku generacije AMR-to-teksta uz primjenu gramatike zamjene sinhronskog čvora. Tokom treninga, pravila grafa do string se uče koristeći heuristički algoritam ekstrakcije. U testnom vremenu se primjenjuje prevoditelj grafika za kolapsanje unutarnjih AMR-a i proizvedenje izlaznih rečenica. Procjenjujući standardnu kritiku, naš metod daje rezultat umjetnosti.', 'az': "Bu kağıt, sinkron düyün əvəzini gramatika ilə AMR-to-text nəzəriyyətinə tərəf verir. Eğitim sırasında, graf-to-string kuralları heuristik çıxarma algoritmi vasitəsilə öyrənirlər. Sınama vaxtında, giriş AMR'lərini yığmaq və çıxış cümlələrini yaratmaq üçün grafik tərcümcisi istifadə edilir. Standart benchmarkta değerlendirilmiş, metodumuz sanat sonuçlarını verir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি এমআর-থেকে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজের বিনিময়ে সিঙ্ক্রোনোড প্রতিস্থাপন গ্রাম প্রদান করে। প্রশিক্ষণের সময় একটি হিউরিস্টিক বের করার অ্যালগরিদম ব্যবহার করে গ্রাফ-থেকে স্ট্রিং নিয়ম শিখা যাচ্ছে। পরীক্ষার সময় একটি গ্রাফ ট্রান্সডার প্রয়োগ করা হচ্ছে ইনপুট এমআরস ভেঙ্গে পড়া এবং আউটপুটের শাস্তি তৈরি করার জন্য। স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বেনম্যার্কে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল দেয়।', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá úkolem generování AMR-to-text pomocí gramatiky synchronní náhrady uzlů. Během tréninku se pravidla grafu na řetězec naučí pomocí heuristického extrakčního algoritmu. V testovací době se grafový převodník používá k sestavení vstupních AMR a generování výstupních vět. Naše metoda je hodnocena na standardním měřítku a poskytuje nejmodernější výsledek.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse AMR-i tekstiks genereerimise ülesannet, kasutades sünkroonset sõlmede asendamise grammatikat. Koolituse käigus õpitakse graafiku stringi reegleid heuristilise ekstraheerimise algoritmi abil. Katse ajal rakendatakse graafikandurit sisendite AMR-ide kokkukukkumiseks ja väljundlausete genereerimiseks. Standardse võrdlusaluse alusel hinnatud meetod annab kaasaegse tulemuse.', 'ca': "Aquest article aborda la tasca de generació AMR-text utilitzant gramàtica de substitució de nodos sincronitzats. Durant l'entrenament, es aprenen regles gràfics a cadenes usant un algoritme d'extracció heurística. En el temps de la prova, es aplica un transdutor de gràfics per col·lapsar les entrades AMR i generar frases de sortida. Evaluat amb un punt de referència estàndard, el nostre mètode dóna el resultat més avançat.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään AMR-tekstin luomista hyödyntämällä synkronisen solmukorvauksen kielioppia. Harjoittelun aikana graafista merkkijonoon -sääntöjä opetellaan heuristisella uuttamisalgoritmilla. Testiajankohtana käytetään graafianturia, joka kutistaa sisääntulon AMR:t ja tuottaa ulostulolauseita. Standardivertailun perusteella arvioitu menetelmämme antaa huipputason tuloksen.', 'jv': 'Sample rate Learn Mode = Validity', 'he': 'This paper addresses the task of AMR-to-text generation by leveraging synchronous node replacement grammar.  במהלך האימונים, חוקי גרף-לרשת נלמדים באמצעות אלגוריתם הוריסטי. בזמן הבדיקה, מעברת גראפ מתפקדת לקרוס הכניסה AMR ויוצרה משפטים יציאה. הערכנו על נקודת רמז סטנדרטית, השיטה שלנו נותנת את התוצאה המאודמת.', 'sk': 'Ta članek obravnava nalogo ustvarjanja AMR v besedilo z izkoriščanjem sinhrone slovnice zamenjave vozlišč. Med usposabljanjem se pravila graf-to-niz naučijo z uporabo heurističnega algoritma ekstrakcije. V času preskusa se uporabi grafski pretvornik za sesutje vhodnih AMR in ustvarjanje izhodnih stavkov. Naša metoda, ocenjena po standardni referenčni vrednosti, daje najsodobnejši rezultat.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Dura yin amfani da algoritum na cire-zuwa-string, za'a sanar da Rubuwan graph-to-string. At test time, a graph transducer is applied to collapse input AMRs and generate output sentences.  Ana ƙayyade kan bangon tsari, hanyoyinmu yana bãyar da matsalar-halin-sanar.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་AMR-ལས་ཡི་གེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རྡོད་ཚབ་སྟངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྐབས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་བརྗོད་ལས་ཐོག་པའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དག་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་ཡོད། At test time, a graph transducer is applied to collapse input AMRs and generate output sentences. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པ་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་འགོད་ཐུབ་པ།'}
{'en': 'Lexical Features in Coreference Resolution : To be Used With Caution', 'ar': 'الميزات المعجمية في دقة Coreference: يجب استخدامها بحذر', 'fr': 'Caractéristiques lexicales dans la résolution de coréférence\xa0: à utiliser avec prudence', 'es': 'Características léxicas en la resolución de correferencia: debe usarse con precaución', 'pt': 'Recursos léxicos na resolução de correferência: devem ser usados com cuidado', 'ja': 'コア参照解像度の語彙機能：慎重に使用する', 'ru': 'Лексические признаки в разрешении ядра: следует использовать с осторожностью', 'hi': 'Coreference संकल्प में लेक्सिकल विशेषताएं: सावधानी के साथ उपयोग किया जा करने के लिए', 'zh': '共推理解析中词法功能谨用之', 'ga': 'Gnéithe Foclaíochta i Taifeach na Croíthagartha: Le hÚsáid Go Aireach', 'hu': 'Lexikai funkciók a Coreference felbontásban: Óvatosan használandó', 'el': 'Λεξικό χαρακτηριστικά στο ψήφισμα Για να χρησιμοποιηθεί με προσοχή', 'ka': 'Lexical Features in Coreference Resolution: To be used with caution', 'it': 'Caratteristiche lessicali nella risoluzione di Coreference: da usare con cautela', 'lt': 'Koreferencijos rezoliucijoje esantys leksiniai požymiai: naudoti atsargiai', 'kk': 'Қосымша Айырымдылығындағы лексикалық қасиеттер: Ескертумен қолданылатын', 'mk': 'Лексикални карактеристики во резолуцијата на кореференцијата: да се користи со внимание', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri Leksik dalam Resolusi Koreferensi: Untuk digunakan dengan Hati-hati', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസറിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200d: സൂക്ഷ്മതയോടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ടതാണ്', 'mt': 'Karatteristiċi Lessiċi fir-Riżoluzzjoni ta’ Koreferenza: Għandhom jintużaw b’kawtela', 'mn': 'Хэрэгцээний шийдвэрлэлд сэтгэл хөдлөл: Хамгаалалтай хэрэглэх', 'no': 'Leksiske funksjonar i oppløysing av koreferansen: Du skal brukast med varsling', 'pl': 'Funkcje leksyczne w rozdzielczości Coreference: należy używać ostrożnie', 'sr': 'Leksičke karakteristike u rezoluciji korisnosti: Koristiti se s oprezom', 'ro': 'Caracteristici lexicale în Coreference Rezoluție: Pentru a fi utilizate cu precauție', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණ විශේෂණයෙන් ලෙක්සිකිකිය විශේෂතාවක්: සාවත්වයෙන් භාවිත වෙන්න', 'so': 'Isku isticmaalka Digtoonka', 'sv': 'Lexiska funktioner i Coreference Upplösning: Används med försiktighet', 'ur': 'پسندیدہ روشنی میں لکسیکس ویژگی: ڈرانے کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جائے گا', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு திரைத்திறனில் லெக்சிக்சியல் பண்புகள்: எச்சரிக்கையுடன் பயன்படுத்தப்பட வேண்டும்', 'uz': 'Tashkilot', 'vi': 'Đặc trưng ngôn ngữ trong nghị quyết Coreference: Được dùng cẩn thận.', 'hr': 'Leksičke karakteristike u rezoluciji korisnosti: Koristiti se s oprezom', 'nl': 'Lexische kenmerken in Coreference Resolutie: Met voorzichtigheid te gebruiken', 'da': 'Lexical Features in Coreference Resolution: Skal bruges med forsigtighed', 'bg': 'Лексикални характеристики в разделителната способност: да се използват внимателно', 'de': 'Lexische Funktionen in Coreference Auflösung: Mit Vorsicht zu verwenden', 'id': 'Lexical Features in Coreference Resolution: To be Used With Caution', 'ko': '공지 소해 중의 어휘 특징: 조심스럽게 사용', 'fa': 'ЩҲЫҢЪҳЪҜЫҢвҖҢЩҮШ§ЫҢ ШҜШұЩ…Ш§ЩҶЫҢ ШҜШұ ШӯЩ„вҖҢШіШ§ШІЫҢ ЩҫЫҢШҙЩҶЩҮШ§ШҜ: ШЁШұШ§ЫҢ Ш§ШіШӘЩҒШ§ШҜЩҮ ШЁШ§ ШӯЩҒШ§ШёШӘ', 'sw': 'Tamko za Kilexico katika Hudumu ya Mazingira: Kutumiwa kwa Tahadhari', 'af': 'Leksiese eienskappe in Voorkeure Resolusie: Na gebruik word met Waarskuwing', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կորեֆերնսի լուծումների լեքսիկական հատկությունները. պետք է օգտագործվի զգույշ', 'sq': 'Features Lexical in Coreference Resolution: To be used with caution', 'az': '雃썤犼썬殼쌠쎇窶볃썮犼썬禼볃摮駉䌠駉湮駉汴駉䌠駉湮駉汴駉鿅楤楲浬駉੫', 'bs': 'Leksičke karakteristike u rezoluciji korisnosti: Koristiti se s oprezom', 'bn': 'সাবধানে ব্যবহার করার জন্য লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'ca': 'Característiques lècsiques en la resolució de coreferència: Utilitzar amb cautela', 'cs': 'Lexické funkce v rozlišení Coreference: Používejte s opatrností', 'fi': 'Coreference Resoluution Lexical Features: Käytetään varoen', 'tr': 'Preferensiýa Çaşyrylmagynda Leksik Hassalar: Dyggat bilen Ullanmak', 'et': 'Lexikaalsed omadused Coreference resolutsioonis: kasutada ettevaatlikult', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Lexične funkcije v ločljivosti Coreference: uporabljajte previdno', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'אופיינים לקסיים בפתרון קורפירנס: שימוש בזהירות', 'bo': 'གཙོ་རིམ་གདམ་ཁ་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབང་ཆ། སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Lexical features are a major source of information in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers. Lexical features implicitly model some of the linguistic phenomena at a fine granularity level. They are especially useful for representing the context of mentions. In this paper we investigate a drawback of using many lexical features in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers. We show that if coreference resolvers mainly rely on lexical features, they can hardly generalize to unseen domains. Furthermore, we show that the current coreference resolution evaluation is clearly flawed by only evaluating on a specific split of a specific dataset in which there is a notable overlap between the training, development and test sets.', 'ar': 'الميزات المعجمية هي مصدر رئيسي للمعلومات في أحدث محللات المرجع المرجعي. تقدم السمات المعجمية نموذجًا ضمنيًا لبعض الظواهر اللغوية بمستوى دقيق. وهي مفيدة بشكل خاص لتمثيل سياق الإشارات. في هذا البحث قمنا بالتحقيق في عيب استخدام العديد من الميزات المعجمية في أحدث محللات المرجع. نظهر أنه إذا كانت أدوات حل المرجع المصدق تعتمد بشكل أساسي على الميزات المعجمية ، فإنها بالكاد تستطيع التعميم على المجالات غير المرئية. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن تقييم القرار المرجعي الحالي معيب بشكل واضح من خلال التقييم فقط على تقسيم معين لمجموعة بيانات محددة يوجد فيها تداخل ملحوظ بين مجموعات التدريب والتطوير والاختبار.', 'fr': "Les caractéristiques lexicales constituent une source d'informations majeure dans les résolveurs de coréférence de pointe. Les caractéristiques lexicales modélisent implicitement certains phénomènes linguistiques à un niveau de granularité fin. Ils sont particulièrement utiles pour représenter le contexte des mentions. Dans cet article, nous étudions un inconvénient de l'utilisation de nombreuses fonctionnalités lexicales dans les résolveurs de coréférence de pointe. Nous montrons que si les résolveurs de coréférence s'appuient principalement sur des caractéristiques lexicales, ils peuvent difficilement généraliser à des domaines non vus. En outre, nous montrons que l'évaluation actuelle de la résolution de coréférence est clairement erronée en n'évaluant que sur une division spécifique d'un ensemble de données spécifique dans lequel il existe un chevauchement notable entre les ensembles de formation, de développement et de test.", 'pt': 'Os recursos lexicais são uma importante fonte de informações em resolvedores de correferência de última geração. As características lexicais modelam implicitamente alguns dos fenômenos linguísticos em um nível de granularidade fino. Eles são especialmente úteis para representar o contexto das menções. Neste artigo, investigamos uma desvantagem de usar muitos recursos lexicais em resolvedores de correferência de última geração. Mostramos que, se os resolvedores de correferência dependem principalmente de recursos lexicais, dificilmente podem generalizar para domínios não vistos. Além disso, mostramos que a avaliação de resolução de correferência atual é claramente falha ao avaliar apenas uma divisão específica de um conjunto de dados específico em que há uma sobreposição notável entre os conjuntos de treinamento, desenvolvimento e teste.', 'es': 'Las funciones léxicas son una fuente importante de información en los solucionadores de correferencias de última generación. Las características léxicas modelan implícitamente algunos de los fenómenos lingüísticos a un nivel de granularidad fina. Son especialmente útiles para representar el contexto de las menciones. En este artículo investigamos el inconveniente de usar muchas características léxicas en los solucionadores de correferencias de última generación. Mostramos que si los solucionadores de correferencias se basan principalmente en características léxicas, difícilmente pueden generalizarse a dominios invisibles. Además, mostramos que la evaluación actual de la resolución de correferencia es claramente defectuosa al evaluar solo en una división específica de un conjunto de datos específico en el que hay una superposición notable entre los conjuntos de entrenamiento, desarrollo y prueba.', 'ja': '語彙機能は、最先端のコアリファレンスリゾルバの主要な情報源です。語彙的特徴は、言語現象のいくつかを微細な粒度レベルで暗黙的にモデル化する。これらは、言及の文脈を表すのに特に有用である。本稿では、最先端のコアレファレンスリゾルバに多くの語彙特徴を使用することの欠点について検討する。我々は、コアレファレンスリゾルバが主に語彙的特徴に依存している場合、見えないドメインにほとんど一般化できないことを示しています。さらに、現在のコアリファレンス分解能評価は、トレーニング、開発、およびテストセットの間に顕著な重複がある特定のデータセットの特定の分割のみを評価することによって明らかに欠陥があることを示しています。', 'zh': '词法者,先进之共推理解析器也。 词汇在精微粒度隐式言语建模。 其于言上下文特有用。 本文,我们研究了最先进的共引解析器中用多词法特征的病。 臣等明共推理解析器主于词法,几不可及于不见之域。 此外共指寻准解析估显然有缺陷者,以其仅估特定数集之特定拆分,训练其中,开试之间有重叠也。', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल विशेषताएं अत्याधुनिक कोरफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्वरों में जानकारी का एक प्रमुख स्रोत हैं। लेक्सिकल विशेषताएं स्पष्ट रूप से एक ठीक ग्रैन्युलैरिटी स्तर पर भाषाई घटनाओं में से कुछ को मॉडल करती हैं। वे विशेष रूप से उल्लेख के संदर्भ का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए उपयोगी हैं। इस पेपर में हम अत्याधुनिक कोरफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्वर में कई लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं का उपयोग करने की एक खामी की जांच करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यदि कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्वर मुख्य रूप से लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं पर भरोसा करते हैं, तो वे शायद ही अनदेखी डोमेन को सामान्यीकृत कर सकते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि वर्तमान कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन मूल्यांकन केवल एक विशिष्ट डेटासेट के एक विशिष्ट विभाजन पर मूल्यांकन करके स्पष्ट रूप से दोषपूर्ण है जिसमें प्रशिक्षण, विकास और परीक्षण सेट के बीच एक उल्लेखनीय ओवरलैप है।', 'ru': 'Лексические признаки являются основным источником информации в современных алгоритмах распознавания ядра. Лексические особенности неявно моделируют некоторые лингвистические явления на уровне мелкой детализации. Они особенно полезны для представления контекста упоминаний. В этой статье мы исследуем недостаток использования многих лексических признаков в современных резольверах ядра. Мы показываем, что если решатели ядра в основном полагаются на лексические признаки, они вряд ли могут обобщиться на невидимые домены. Кроме того, мы показываем, что текущая оценка основного разрешения явно несовершенна, поскольку она основывается только на конкретном разделении конкретного набора данных, в котором наблюдается заметное дублирование между наборами обучения, разработки и тестирования.', 'ga': 'Is mórfhoinse faisnéise iad gnéithe foclóireachta i réitigh chroílárnacha den scoth. Múnlaíonn gnéithe foclóireachta go hintuigthe cuid de na feiniméin teangeolaíochta ag leibhéal mín gráinneachta. Tá siad thar a bheith úsáideach chun comhthéacs na luaíochtaí a léiriú. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid imscrúdú ar mhíbhuntáiste a bhaineann le go leor gnéithe foclóireachta a úsáid i réititheoirí croí-roghnúcháin den scoth. Léirímid má bhíonn réititheoirí croí-chomhdhála ag brath go príomha ar ghnéithe foclóireachta, is ar éigean gur féidir leo ginearálú go fearainn nach bhfeictear. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go bhfuil an mheastóireacht réitigh croíchomhdhála atá ann faoi láthair lochtach go soiléir trí mheastóireacht a dhéanamh ar dheighilt shonrach de thacar sonraí ar leith ina bhfuil forluí suntasach idir na tacair oiliúna, forbartha agus tástála.', 'hu': 'A lexikai funkciók a legkorszerűbb coreferencia-feloldókban jelentős információforrások. A lexikai jellemzők implicit módon modelleznek néhány nyelvi jelenséget finom granularitási szinten. Különösen hasznosak az említések kontextusának megjelenítésére. Ebben a tanulmányban azt a hátrányt vizsgáljuk, hogy számos lexikai tulajdonságot használunk a korszerű coreferencia resolverekben. Megmutatjuk, hogy ha a coreferencia resolverek elsősorban lexikai jellemzőkre támaszkodnak, aligha általánosíthatók a láthatatlan tartományokra. Továbbá azt mutatjuk, hogy a jelenlegi coreferencia felbontás értékelése egyértelműen hibás, ha csak egy adott adatkészlet konkrét felosztásán értékeljük, amelyben jelentős átfedés van a képzés, fejlesztés és tesztkészletek között.', 'el': 'Τα Lexical χαρακτηριστικά αποτελούν σημαντική πηγή πληροφοριών σε υπερσύγχρονους επεξεργαστές συναρτήσεων. Τα λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά μοντελοποιούν σιωπηρά ορισμένα από τα γλωσσικά φαινόμενα σε ένα λεπτό επίπεδο κοκκοποίησης. Είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμες για την αναπαράσταση του πλαισίου των αναφορών. Σε αυτή την εργασία διερευνούμε ένα μειονέκτημα της χρήσης πολλών λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών σε υπερσύγχρονους επιλυτές συναφειρέσεων. Δείχνουμε ότι αν οι επιλυτές αλληλοδιαφοράς βασίζονται κυρίως σε λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά, δύσκολα μπορούν να γενικεύσουν σε αόρατους τομείς. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η τρέχουσα αξιολόγηση της επίλυσης της συνάφειας είναι σαφώς ελαττωματική αξιολογώντας μόνο ένα συγκεκριμένο διαχωρισμό ενός συγκεκριμένου συνόλου δεδομένων στο οποίο υπάρχει αξιοσημείωτη επικάλυψη μεταξύ των συνόλων κατάρτισης, ανάπτυξης και δοκιμών.', 'ka': 'ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებები არის მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციის მისამართი გამოსახულებელი სახელსაწყისებში. Lexical features implicitly model some of the linguistic phenomena at a fine granularity level. ისინი განსაკუთრებით გამოსახულებელია ამოხსენების კონტექსტის გამოსახულებლად. ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ რამდენიმე ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებების გამოყენებაზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ თუ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ კომპერენციები ძირითად ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებისთვის, ისინი ვერ შეუძლიათ წარმოიდგინოთ დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მიმდინარე მსგავსი განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებით მხოლოდ განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც განსაზღვრებით, განვი', 'it': "Le funzionalità lessicali sono una fonte importante di informazioni nei resolver di coreferenza all'avanguardia. Le caratteristiche lessicali modellano implicitamente alcuni fenomeni linguistici a un livello di granularità fine. Sono particolarmente utili per rappresentare il contesto delle menzioni. In questo articolo esaminiamo uno svantaggio dell'utilizzo di molte funzionalità lessicali nei resolver di coreferenza all'avanguardia. Mostriamo che se i resolver di coreferenza si basano principalmente su caratteristiche lessicali, difficilmente possono generalizzarsi a domini invisibili. Inoltre, mostriamo che l'attuale valutazione della risoluzione di coreferenza è chiaramente difettosa solo valutando su una specifica divisione di un set di dati specifico in cui vi è una notevole sovrapposizione tra i set di formazione, sviluppo e test.", 'kk': 'Лексикалық мүмкіндіктері - әртүрлі мәліметтердің негізгі көзі. Лексикалық мүмкіндіктері лингвистикалық пайдаланулардың кейбір түрлі грануляриялық деңгейінде үлгіледі. Олар әсіресе жазбалардың контексті көрсету үшін пайдалы. Бұл қағазда біз көптеген лексикалық қасиеттерді қолдануға тырыстық. Біз сәйкестіктерді шешушілер лексикалық мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді деп көрсетедік. Олар доменлерді көрсетпегенге жалпы болмайды. Сонымен қатар, біз қазіргі мәселелердің айырмашылығының түсініктемесін көрсеткіземіз, олардың оқыту, жасау және сынақтар жиындарының арасындағы өзгертілген деректер жиынының бірнеше бөлігін тек оқыту', 'lt': 'Leksinės savybės yra pagrindinis naujausių koreferencinių įrenginių informacijos šaltinis. Leksinės savybės netiesiogiai modeliuoja tam tikrus kalbinius reiškinius smulkiu granuliarumo lygiu. Jie ypač naudingi apibūdinant minčių kontekstą. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame trūkumą naudojant daugelį leksinių savybių moderniausiuose koreferencijos išsprendikliuose. Mes rodome, kad jei koreferencijos išsprendėjai daugiausia pasikliauja leksiniais požymiais, jie beveik negali apskritai paplitti į nematomus domenus. Be to, mes rodome, kad dabartinis koreferencijos rezoliucijos vertinimas akivaizdžiai trūksta vertinant tik konkrečią konkrečių duomenų rinkinio dalijimą, kuriame mokymo, plėtros ir bandymų rinkiniai labai sutampa.', 'ms': 'Lexical features are a major source of information in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers.  Ciri-ciri leksik secara implicit model beberapa fenomena bahasa pada tahap granulariti yang baik. Mereka sangat berguna untuk mewakili konteks sebutan. Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki kelemahan menggunakan banyak ciri-ciri leksik dalam penyelesaian persamaan state-of-the-art. Kami menunjukkan bahawa jika penyelesaian persamaan bergantung pada ciri-ciri leksikal, mereka hampir tidak boleh menyebarkan ke domain yang tidak terlihat. Lagipun, kami menunjukkan bahawa penilaian resolusi persamaan semasa jelas salah dengan hanya menilai bahagian spesifik set data spesifik di mana terdapat penyelamatan yang tertentu antara set latihan, pembangunan dan ujian.', 'mk': 'Лексикалните карактеристики се главен извор на информации во најсовремените решители на современост. Лексикалните карактеристики имплицитно моделираат некои од јазичните феномени на фино ниво на грануларност. Тие се особено корисни за претставување на контекстот на спомените. Во овој весник истражуваме недостаток од користењето на многу лексикални карактеристики во најсовремените решители на современост. Ние покажуваме дека ако решителите за современост се потпираат главно на лексички карактеристики, тие едвај можат да се генерализираат на невидени домени. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека сегашната оценка на резолуцијата на соодветноста е јасно недостасува само со оценката на специфичниот дел од специфичниот податок во кој постои значителна прекривање помеѓу обуката, развојот и тестовите.', 'no': 'Leksiske funksjonar er ein stor kjelde for informasjon i tilstanden til kunstkoreferansen. Leksiske funksjonar er implisitt modeller nokre av språkstiske fenomenane på ein fint granularitetsnivå. Dei er spesielt nyttig for å representera området til minningar. I denne papiret undersøker vi ei tilbakekalling av å bruka mange leksiske funksjonar i tilstanden av kunstkoreferansen. Vi viser at dersom koreferanse oppløysar hovudsakelig rely på leksiske funksjonar, kan dei vanskelegvis generalisere til ukjende domene. I tillegg viser vi at evalueringa av gjeldande koreferens oppløysing er klart mislukka ved å berre evalueringa på ei spesifikke delt av eit spesifikke datasett der det finst ein merkelig overlapp mellom øvinga, utvikling og testsett.', 'mt': 'Il-karatteristiċi lexiċi huma sors ewlieni ta’ informazzjoni f’riżoluturi ta’ korreferenza l-aktar avvanzati. Lexical features implicitly model some of the linguistic phenomena at a fine granularity level.  Huma partikolarment utli biex jirrappreżentaw il-kuntest tas-semmiet. F’dan id-dokument ninvestigaw żvantaġġ fl-użu ta’ ħafna karatteristiċi lexiċi f’riżolturi tal-koreferenza l-aktar avvanzati. Aħna nuru li jekk ir-riżoluturi tal-koreferenza jiddependu l-aktar fuq karatteristiċi lexiċi, huma bilkemm jistgħu jiġġeneralizzaw għal dominji mhux osservati. Barra minn hekk, naraw li l-evalwazzjoni attwali tar-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza hija żbaljata b’mod ċar billi tivvaluta biss fuq qsim speċifiku ta’ sett ta’ dejta speċifiku li fih hemm sovrappożizzjoni notevoli bejn is-settijiet ta’ taħriġ, żvilupp u ttestjar.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാന സ്രോതസ്സാണ്. ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്ക് നല്ല ഗ്രാന്റിയുടെ നിലപാടില്\u200d ചില ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മാതൃകയാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിന് അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗമുണ്ട്. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വരയ്ക്ക് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫറന്\u200dസ് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകങ്ങളില Furthermore, we show that the current coreference resolution evaluation is clearly flawed by only evaluating on a specific split of a specific dataset in which there is a notable overlap between the training, development and test sets.', 'mn': 'Лексик чанар бол урлагийн зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэгчдийн үндсэн мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр юм. Лексиксикийн хувьд хэлний үзэгдлийн зарим үзэгдлийн төвшинд загвар өгдөг. Тэд илэрхийлэгдэхэд ялангуяа хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хэлбэрийг ашиглаж байгааг судалж байна. Бид хэрвээ зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэгчдийн гол нь лексикийн чадвартай байвал тэд харагдахгүй орон нутгийг ихэвчлэн ерөнхийлөгчилж чадахгүй. Үүнээс гадна бид одоогийн зөвхөн зөвхөн тодорхой өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн тодорхой хэсэг дээр тодорхой тодорхой хэлбэрээр шийдвэрлэх шаардлагатай гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Caracteristicile Lexical reprezintă o sursă majoră de informații în rezolutoarele de coreferență de ultimă generație. Caracteristicile lexicale modelează implicit unele dintre fenomenele lingvistice la un nivel fin de granularitate. Ele sunt deosebit de utile pentru a reprezenta contextul mențiunilor. În această lucrare investigăm un dezavantaj al utilizării multor caracteristici lexicale în rezolvătoare de coreferență de ultimă generație. Arătăm că dacă rezolvătorii de coreferență se bazează în principal pe caracteristici lexicale, cu greu se pot generaliza la domenii nevăzute. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm că evaluarea actuală a rezoluției corefenței este în mod evident eronată prin evaluarea doar pe o diviziune specifică a unui set de date specific în care există o suprapunere notabilă între seturile de instruire, dezvoltare și testare.', 'pl': 'Funkcje leksykalne są głównym źródłem informacji w najnowocześniejszych rozwiązaniach współpracy. Funkcje leksykalne modelują niektóre zjawiska językowe na poziomie drobnej granularności. Są one szczególnie przydatne do reprezentowania kontekstu wzmianek. W niniejszym artykule badamy wady stosowania wielu funkcji leksykalnych w najnowocześniejszych rozwiązaczach koreferencji. Pokazujemy, że jeśli rozwiązania koreferencji opierają się głównie na cechach leksykalnych, trudno uogólnić je na niewidoczne domeny. Ponadto pokazujemy, że obecna ocena rozdzielczości współreferencyjnej jest wyraźnie wadliwa poprzez ocenę tylko na konkretnym podziale konkretnego zbioru danych, w którym istnieje zauważalne nakładanie się zestawów szkoleniowych, rozwojowych i testowych.', 'sr': 'Leksičke karakteristike su veliki izvor informacija u rešiteljima države umjetnosti. Leksičke karakteristike implicitno modele nekih jezičkih fenomena na finom granularnom nivou. Oni su posebno korisni za predstavljanje konteksta spomena. U ovom papiru istražujemo povlačenje korištenja mnogih leksičkih karakteristika u rezolucijama države umjetnosti. Pokazujemo da ako rešitelji milostinje uglavnom oslanjaju na leksičke karakteristike, jedva da mogu generalizirati na nevidljive domene. Nadalje, pokazujemo da je trenutna procjena rezolucije dobrodošlosti jasno nedostajala samo procjenom određenog podjela određenog seta podataka u kojem postoji poznati preklapanje između obuke, razvoja i testova.', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකික්සිකල් අවස්ථාවක් තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරධානයක්. ලෙක්සිකික්සිකල් අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය වලින් භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සමහර විශේෂයෙන් හොඳ විශේෂ ස්ත ඔවුන් විශේෂයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ලෙක්සිකාලික අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතා කරන්න ගොඩක් ලෙක්සිකාලික අවශ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200d අපි පෙන්වන්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා නම් ලෙක්සිකාලික විශේෂ වලට විශ්වාස කරනවා නම්, ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ් තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ පුළුවන් කෝරෙෆෙර්මන් විශ්වාස විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශේෂ දත්ත සැ', 'sv': 'Lexiska funktioner är en viktig informationskälla i toppmoderna coreference resolvers. Lexiska funktioner modellerar implicit några av de språkliga fenomenen på en fin granularitetsnivå. De är särskilt användbara för att representera sammanhanget för omnämnanden. I denna uppsats undersöker vi nackdelen med att använda många lexikala funktioner i state-of-the-art coreference resolvers. Vi visar att om coreferensresolvers huvudsakligen förlitar sig på lexikala funktioner, kan de knappast generalisera till osynliga domäner. Vidare visar vi att den nuvarande utvärderingen av coreferencelopplösningen är uppenbart felaktig genom att endast utvärdera på en specifik uppdelning av en specifik datauppsättning där det finns en märkbar överlappning mellan utbildning, utveckling och testuppsättningar.', 'so': "Xiriikhda Leksikalka waa macluumaad muhiim ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka farshaxanka. Tusaale ahaan la xiriiro waxyaabaha luqada ah qaarkood ayaa ku qoran heerka barwaaqo. Waxey si gaar ah u faa’iido u leeyihiin in ay wakiishaan kooxda maandooriyaha. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa dib u soo celinta isticmaalka waxyaabo badan oo caqli ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka farshaxanka. Waxan tusnaynaa in haddii ay qabsadaan xafiisyada caadiga ah ay ku xiran karaan tayada caqabadaha, waxay si adag ugu dhaqan karaan meelaha qarsoon. Waxaa kale oo aan tusnaynaa in qiimeynta qiimeynta koonfurta ah ay caddaan tahay in lagu qiimeeyo qeyb gaar ah oo la koobo taarifka gaar ah, taasoo ay ku jirto isku xir faa'iido ah oo u dhexeeya waxbarashada, horumarinta iyo imtixaanka.", 'ta': 'லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்கள் நிலையில்- கலை குறிப்பு முடிவுகளில் தகவல் முக்கிய மூலம். Lexical features implicitly model some of the linguistic phenomena at a fine granularity level.  குறிப்பிட்ட சூழலை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு அவர்களுக்கு மிக பயனுள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பல லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் வரைபடத்தை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம். நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் காட்டுகிறோம் முக்கியமாக முதலில் லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களை நம்பிக்கை கொண்டால், அவர் மேலும், நாம் தற்போதைய குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பின் மதிப்பு தெளிவாக குறிப்பிட்ட பிரிப்பின் மதிப்பு மட்டும் தெளிவாக உள்ளது என', 'ur': 'لکسکسیکل فرصت ایک بڑے معلومات کے سورج ہیں جو حیات کے مطابق مطابق مطابق حل کرنے والوں میں ہے. لکسیسی ویسٹیوں میں سے بعض زبان پڑھنے والی روشنی سطح پر مثالی طرح موڈل کر رہے ہیں. وہ مخصوصاً مفید ہیں ان کے ذکر کے متعلق معلوم کرنے کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے بہت سی لکسیکل ویٹیوں کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے ایک پھرنے کی تحقیق کی۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اگر مہربانی حل کرنے والوں کو اکثر لکھی ویٹیوں پر بھروسہ کرتا ہے تو وہ غیب کے دامنوں میں کم ہی عام کر سکتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ موجود مہربانی رضامندی رضامندی ارزیابی صرف ایک خاص ڈیٹ سٹ کے تقسیم کے ذریعہ ایک مہربانی تقسیم کے ذریعہ مہربانی ہے جہاں تطالب، توسعہ اور تطالب سٹ کے درمیان ایک مشخص اورلپ ہے.', 'uz': "Name Leksikal xususiyatlari juda yaxshi granulatlik darajada bir necha lingvistik holatlarini modellashadi. Ular xususiyatlarni tahrirlash uchun foydalanadi. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha leksikal xususiyatlarni ishlatishni o'rganamiz. Biz buni ko'rsatganimiz, agar sertifikatlar asosiy leksikal xususiyatlariga ishlatsa, ular noaniq domenelarga yetarli olamaydi. Koʻrsatganimiz, Joriy kompyuterning qiymati faqat taʼminlovchi, taʼminlovchi, taʼminlovchi va sinov moslamalar orasidagi notoʻgʻri maʼlumot belgini qiymatga ega boʻlishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tài liệu nhà khoa học là nguồn cung cấp thông tin quan trọng nhất trong các biện pháp bảo vệ hiện đại. Tính chất logic ẩn chứa mô hình một số hiện tượng ngôn ngữ ở mức độ hạt tốt. Chúng đặc biệt hữu dụng để đại diện cho ngữ cảnh đề cập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tìm hiểu một trở ngại khi sử dụng nhiều tính năng ngôn ngữ trong các tài liệu hiện đại. Chúng tôi cho thấy nếu khả năng giải quyết chủ yếu dựa trên tính năng ngôn ngữ, họ hầu như không thể tổng hợp thành miền không nhìn thấy. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy bản đánh giá khả năng giải quyết hiện tại hoàn toàn sai khi chỉ đánh giá về một bộ dữ liệu cụ thể mà có sự gấp bội đáng chú ý giữa các nhóm huấn luyện, phát triển và thử nghiệm.', 'nl': 'Lexische functies zijn een belangrijke bron van informatie in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers. Lexische kenmerken modelleren impliciet sommige linguïstische fenomenen op een fijn granulariteitsniveau. Ze zijn vooral nuttig voor het weergeven van de context van vermeldingen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we een nadeel van het gebruik van vele lexicale functies in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers. We laten zien dat als coreference resolvers voornamelijk afhankelijk zijn van lexicale kenmerken, ze nauwelijks kunnen generaliseren naar onzichtbare domeinen. Verder laten we zien dat de huidige evaluatie van de coreferentie resolutie duidelijk gebrekkig is door alleen te evalueren op een specifieke split van een specifieke dataset waarin sprake is van een opmerkelijke overlap tussen de training, ontwikkeling en test sets.', 'bg': 'Лексикалните функции са основен източник на информация в най-съвременните решения за съвместна референция. Лексикалните характеристики имплицитно моделират някои от лингвистичните явления на ниво фина гранулираност. Те са особено полезни за представяне на контекста на споменаванията. В тази статия ние изследваме недостатъка на използването на много лексикални функции в най-съвременните решатори за кореференция. Показваме, че ако решателите на кореференцията разчитат главно на лексикални характеристики, те трудно могат да се обобщят към невидими домейни. Освен това показваме, че текущата оценка на разделителната способност на съвместната референция очевидно е погрешна, като се оценява само върху конкретно разделяне на конкретен набор от данни, в който има значително припокриване между наборите от обучение, разработка и тестове.', 'da': 'Lexical funktioner er en vigtig kilde til information i state-of-the-art coreference resolvere. Lexiske træk modellerer implicit nogle af de sproglige fænomener på et fint granularitetsniveau. De er især nyttige til at repræsentere sammenhængen af nævnelser. I denne artikel undersøger vi ulempen ved at bruge mange lexikale funktioner i state-of-the-art coreference resolvere. Vi viser, at hvis coreference resolvere hovedsageligt er afhængige af leksikske funktioner, kan de næppe generalisere til usete domæner. Desuden viser vi, at den nuværende evaluering af coreferenceopløsning tydeligvis er fejlbehæftet ved kun at evaluere på en specifik opdeling af et specifikt datasæt, hvor der er en bemærkelsesværdig overlapning mellem trænings-, udviklings- og testsæt.', 'de': 'Lexikale Funktionen sind eine wichtige Informationsquelle in modernen Coreferenz Resolvern. Lexikale Merkmale modellieren implizit einige sprachliche Phänomene auf feiner Granularität. Sie sind besonders nützlich, um den Kontext von Erwähnungen darzustellen. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir einen Nachteil der Verwendung vieler lexikalischer Merkmale in modernen Coreferenzresolvern. Wir zeigen, dass Coreferenz-Resolver, wenn sie hauptsächlich auf lexikalische Merkmale basieren, kaum auf unsichtbare Domänen verallgemeinern können. Weiterhin zeigen wir, dass die aktuelle Auswertung der Coreferenzauflösung eindeutig fehlerhaft ist, indem wir nur auf eine bestimmte Aufteilung eines bestimmten Datensatzes evaluieren, in der es eine deutliche Überschneidung zwischen Training, Entwicklung und Testsets gibt.', 'hr': 'Leksičke karakteristike su glavni izvor informacija u razrješavateljima stanja umjetnosti. Leksičke karakteristike implicitno modeliraju neke od jezičkih fenomena na finoj granularnoj razini. Oni su posebno korisni za predstavljanje konteksta spomena. U ovom papiru istražujemo povlačenje korištenja mnogih leksičkih karakteristika u rezolucijama stanja umjetnosti. Pokazujemo da ako se rješavači dobrote uglavnom oslanjaju na leksičke funkcije, jedva mogu generalizirati na nevidljive domene. Nadalje, pokazujemo da je trenutna procjena rezolucije liječnosti jasno nedostajala samo procjenom određenog podjela određenih podataka u kojem postoji poznati preklapanje između obuke, razvoja i testova.', 'id': 'Lexical features are a major source of information in state-of-the-art coreference resolvers.  Karakteristik Lexik secara implicit model beberapa fenomena bahasa pada tingkat granularitas yang baik. Mereka sangat berguna untuk mewakili konteks sebutan. Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki kelemahan dari menggunakan banyak ciri-ciri leksik dalam penyelesaian koreferensi state-of-the-art. Kami menunjukkan bahwa jika penyelesaian koreferensi terutama bergantung pada ciri-ciri leksik, mereka hampir tidak dapat menyebarkan ke domain yang tidak terlihat. Furthermore, we show that the current coreference resolution evaluation is clearly flawed by only evaluating on a specific split of a specific dataset in which there is a notable overlap between the training, development and test sets.', 'sw': 'Tamko la Lexico ni chanzo kikubwa cha taarifa katika hali ya msingi wa sanaa. Tamko za Lexico zinaonyesha baadhi ya hali ya lugha kwa kiwango kikubwa cha uzalendo. Ni muhimu kwa kuwakilisha muktadha wa tajwa. Katika karatasi hii tunachunguza mchoro wa kutumia vipengele vingi vya lexico katika hali ya mambo ya sanaa. Tunaonyesha kwamba kama utatuzi wa kikosi hutegemea vipengele vya lexico, hawawezi kuzuia kwa maeneo yasiyofahamika. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba utafiti wa suluhisho la msingi wa sasa unaeleweka wazi kwa kutathmini tu katika kipande maalum cha taarifa ambapo kuna vipande muhimu kati ya mafunzo, maendeleo na seti za jaribio.', 'ko': '어휘 특징은 가장 선진적인 공지 해석기의 주요 정보 원천이다.어휘 특징이 세립도 수준에서 일부 언어 현상을 은밀하게 모의하였다.그것들은 언급된 상하문을 나타내는 데 특히 유용하다.본고에서 우리는 가장 선진적인 공지 해석기에서 많은 어휘 특징을 사용하는 단점을 연구했다.공지소해기가 주로 어휘 특징에 의존한다면 보이지 않는 분야로 널리 보급되기 어렵다는 것을 알 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 현재의 공지 해상도 평가에 분명히 결함이 존재한다. 왜냐하면 특정한 데이터 집합의 특정한 부분만 평가하기 때문에 그 중에서 훈련 집합, 개발 집합과 테스트 집합 사이에 현저한 중첩이 존재하기 때문이다.', 'tr': 'Leksik karakterleriň durumynda sanat çekişmeleriniň esasy çeşmesi. Leksik möhümleriň adalat derejesinde lingwistiki parçalaryň käbir nusgasyny görkez. Olar agzalaryň kontekstini temizlemek üçin has gowy ulanýarlar. Bu kagyzda biz sanat çekişmeleriniň durumynda köp lektik özelliklerini ulanmaklygyny barlaýarys. Eger-de şeýle çözgütleri çözgütlendirmek üçin mekdeplerde, bu sahypalaryň görnüş sahypalara döwürülmesine mümkin däldir. Mundan soňra, biz häzirki çekişmeler çözümleşini ýüze çykaryp bilmeýäris. Diňe takyk sanlaryň bir böleginde, okuwçy, gelişme we test düzümleri arasynda möhüm bir daňlap çykaryp barýarys.', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای لکسیکی یک منبع بزرگ اطلاعات در مقابلۀ حفاظت\u200cکنندگان ایالت هنر است. ویژه\u200cهای لکسیکی به طور اخلاقی برخی از پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی در یک سطح بزرگی خوب مدل می\u200cکند. آنها مخصوصا برای نمایش محیط اشاره\u200cها مفید هستند. در این کاغذ ما از استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بسیاری در حالت\u200cهای حکومت\u200cهای هنر تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که اگر رضایت کننده\u200cهای رضایت بر ویژه\u200cهای زبانی اعتماد دارند، آنها به سختی نمی\u200cتوانند به دامنهای غیب\u200cآشکار کنند. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که ارزیابی مقدمات کنترل فعلی با ارزیابی تنها بر یک تقسیم خاص از مجموعه داده\u200cهای خاصی که بین تمرین، توسعه و آزمایش مجموعه\u200cهای مشخص وجود دارد تغییر مشخص شده است.', 'sq': 'Karakteristikat leksikale janë burim i madh i informacionit në zgjidhjet më të larta të koreferencës. Karakteristikat leksike implicitisht modelojnë disa nga fenomenet gjuhësore në një nivel të mirë granulariteti. Ato janë veçanërisht të dobishme për përfaqësimin e kontekstit të përmendimeve. Në këtë letër ne hetojmë një pengesë të përdorimit të shumë karakteristikave leksikale në zgjidhësit e bashkëdrejtimit më të lartë. Ne tregojmë se në qoftë se zgjidhësit e koreferencës mbështeten kryesisht në karakteristikat lexike, ata mezi mund të gjeneralizohen në domeni të padukshëm. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se vlerësimi aktual i rezolutës së korreferencës është qartë i gabuar vetëm duke vlerësuar një ndarje specifike të një grupi të dhënash specifike në të cilin ekziston një kapërcim i rëndësishëm midis grupeve të trainimit, zhvillimit dhe testimeve.', 'am': 'የሜክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች የ-አርእስት ክፍል ማቀናጃ ሀብት ነው፡፡ የሜክሲካ ምርጫዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢዎች በጥሩ ውጤት ማሳየት አይችሉም፡፡ በተለይ ማስታወቂያውን ለማሳየት ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ላይ በብዙ የልኮክሲካዊ ምርጫዎችን ለመቀበል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እንደዚህ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የአሁኑ የኮሬሽነቱ ማስታወቂያ ግልፅ በተለየ ዳታዎችን በተለየ ክፍል ብቻ እንዲያስተምርበት ነው፤ በዚህም ውስጥ ትምህርት፣ ትምህርት እና ፈተና ማዘናጋት መካከለኛ የታወቀ መዝገብ አለበት፡፡', 'af': "Name Leksiese funksies inplisite model sommige van die lingwisiese fenomene op 'n fyn granulariteit vlak. Hulle is besonderlik nuttig vir die voorstel van die konteks van mentionasies. In hierdie papier ondersoek ons 'n terugkeer van gebruik van baie leksiese funksies in staat-van-die-kunsten koreferensieoplosserers. Ons wys dat as goederheidsoplosserers hoofsaaklik op leksiese funksies vertrou, kan hulle skaars generaliseer na ongesien domeine. Ons wys ook dat die huidige koreferensieresolusie evaluasie is duidelik verdwyn deur slegs te evalueer op 'n spesifieke deel van' n spesifieke datastel waarin daar 'n notabele oorvloei tussen die onderwerp, ontwikkeling en toets stel is.", 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական առանձնահատկությունները տեղեկատվության հիմնական աղբյուրն են ամենաբարձր կորեֆերանսի լուծողների մեջ: Լեքսիկական առանձնահատկությունները միանգամայն ձևավորում են լեզվաբանական երևույթները գեղեցիկ գրանուլարության մակարդակում: Դրանք հատկապես օգտակար են հիշողությունների կոնտեքստի ներկայացման համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմաթիվ լեքսիկական առանձնահատկություններ օգտագործելու վերջին տեխնոլոգիական կորեֆերանսի լուծողներում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ եթե կորեֆերանսի լուծողները հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնված են լեքսիկական հատկությունների վրա, նրանք հազիվ կարող են ընդհանուր հասնել անտեսանելի բնագավառների: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներկայիս համեմատության լուծումների գնահատումը պարզ է, որ սխալ է միայն գնահատելով որոշակի տվյալների մի մասը, որտեղ ուսուցման, զարգացման և փորձարկումների համակարգերի միջև նշանակալի համեմատություն կա:', 'az': 'Leksik xüsusiyyətlər məlumatın ən böyük mənbəsidir. Leksika özellikləri elmi fenomenlərinin bəzisini gözəl granularlıq seviyesində modelləşdirir. Onlar həqiqətən də yada salmaq üçün faydalanırlar. Bu kağızda biz bir çox leksi özellikləri istifadə etmək üçün təkrar araşdırırıq. Biz göstəririk ki, əgər mərhəmət çəkənlər əslində leksik özelliklərinə təvəkkül etsələr, onlar görmədikləri domenalara çox generalizə bilməzlər. Daha sonra, biz göstəririk ki, günümüzdeki mərhəmətli çözünürlük çözünürlük müəyyən edilməsi, təhsil, təhsil və test setlərinin arasındakı müəyyən bir dəyişiklik parçası ilə müəyyən edilməsi a çıq-aydın dəyişiklikdir.', 'bs': 'Leksičke karakteristike su glavni izvor informacija u rezolucijama države umjetnosti. Leksičke karakteristike implicitno modele nekih jezičkih fenomena na finom granularnom nivou. Oni su posebno korisni za predstavljanje konteksta spomena. U ovom papiru istražujemo povlačenje korištenja mnogih leksičkih karakteristika u rezolucijama države umjetnosti. Pokazujemo da ako se rješavači milostinje uglavnom oslanjaju na leksičke karakteristike, jedva da mogu generalizirati na nevidljive domene. Osim toga, pokazujemo da je trenutna procjena rezolucije liječnosti jasno nedostajala procjenom samo na određenom dijelu određenog seta podataka u kojem postoji poznato preklapanje između obuke, razvoja i testova.', 'ca': "Les característiques lècsiques són una fontd'informació important en els arregladors de coreferència més moderns. Les característiques lècsiques modelen implícitament alguns dels fenomens lingüístics a un nivell de granularitat. Són especialment útils per representar el context de les mencions. En aquest article investigam un inconvenient d'utilitzar moltes característiques lècsiques en resoldors de coreferència moderns. Mostrem que si els resoldors de coreferència confien principalment en característiques lècsiques, gairebé no es poden generalitzar en dominis invisibles. A més, demostram que l'evaluació actual de la resolució de coreferença està clarament defectuosa només en avaluar una divisió específica d'un conjunt de dades específic en què hi ha una notable sobreposició entre els conjunts d'entrenamient, desenvolupament i prova.", 'cs': 'Lexické funkce jsou hlavním zdrojem informací v nejmodernějších koreferenčních řešičích. Lexické prvky implicitně modelují některé jazykové jevy na úrovni jemné granularity. Jsou užitečné zejména pro reprezentaci kontextu zmínek. V tomto článku zkoumáme nevýhody použití mnoha lexikálních funkcí v moderních koreferenčních resolverech. Ukazujeme, že pokud se koreferenční řešitelé spoléhají hlavně na lexikální vlastnosti, stěží se mohou zobecňovat na neviděné domény. Dále ukazujeme, že současné hodnocení koreferenčního rozlišení je jasně chybné tím, že hodnotíme pouze na konkrétním rozdělení konkrétní sady dat, ve kterém dochází k výraznému překrývání mezi tréninkovými, vývojovými a testovacími sadami.', 'fi': 'Lexikaaliset ominaisuudet ovat tärkeä tietolähde uusimmissa koreferenssiratkaisuissa. Lexikaaliset piirteet mallintavat implisiittisesti joitakin kielellisiä ilmiöitä hienojakoisella tasolla. Ne ovat erityisen hyödyllisiä mainintojen yhteydessä. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme haittapuolia monien sanastollisten ominaisuuksien käyttämisestä huippuluokan koreferenssiratkaisuissa. Osoitamme, että jos koreferenssin ratkaisijat luottavat pääasiassa sanastoon, ne tuskin voivat yleistyä näkymättömille toimialueille. Lisäksi osoitamme, että nykyinen yhteisferenssiresoluution arviointi on selvästi virheellinen, koska arviointi tehdään vain tietyn aineiston tietystä osasta, jossa koulutus-, kehitys- ja testiaineistojen välillä on huomattavaa päällekkäisyyttä.', 'et': 'Lexikaalsed funktsioonid on tipptasemel kaasaegsete koreferensi lahendajate peamine teabeallikas. Lexikaalsed omadused modelleerivad kaudselt mõningaid keelelisi nähtusi peene granulaarsuse tasemel. Need on eriti kasulikud nimetuste konteksti esindamiseks. Käesolevas töös uurime mitmete leksikaalsete funktsioonide kasutamise puudusi state-of-the-art koreference lahendajates. Näitame, et kui koreferentsuse lahendajad tuginevad peamiselt leksikaalsetele omadustele, ei saa nad vaevalt üldistada nähtamatutele domeenidele. Lisaks näitame, et praegune kaasreferentsi lahenduse hindamine on ilmselgelt vigane, sest hindame ainult konkreetse andmekogumi konkreetset osast, kus koolitus-, arendus- ja katsekogumid kattuvad märkimisväärselt.', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রতিষ্ঠানের মূল তথ্যের প্রধান উৎস। লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য ভাষায় ভাষার কিছু ব্যাপারে মডেল দেয়া হয়েছে ভাষার স্তরের ভাষায়। তারা বিশেষ করে মন্তব্যের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য উপকারী। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনেক লেক্সিক্যাল ব্যবহার করে অনুসন্ধান করি-শিল্পের কোরিফেন্স সিদ্ধান্ত ব্যবহার করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে যদি কোরেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত প্রধান লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে, তাহলে তারা অদৃশ্য ডোমেইন Furthermore, we show that the current coreference resolution evaluation is clearly flawed by only evaluating on a specific split of a specific dataset in which there is a notable overlap between the training, development and test sets.', 'jv': 'structural navigation structural navigation Dheweke kabeh luwih tenan kanggo gambar kang nggawe kontèks mengkar Nang pepulan iki kita yatakan akeh indekso perusahaan langgar aturan luwih dumaten Awak dhéwé ngomong nik karo coreferning dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke luwih cara-cara sing bisa ngono ngregani dipunangke dipunangke Nyong ngomong, awak dhéwé ngerasakno dadi kerusahaan nggawe gerasaan karo hal dadi sing nyimpen nganggep kuwi tindakan kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno dhéwé kesempatan', 'he': 'תכונות לקסיות הן מקור עיקרי של מידע במפתחי התאמה החדשים ביותר. אופיינים לקסיים מודלים באופן מילוי חלק מהתופעות הלשונית ברמה של גרנוליות מעולה. They are especially useful for representing the context of mentions.  בעיתון הזה אנו חוקרים חסר תועלת של השימוש במיוחד של תכונות לקסיות רבות במפתחי התאמה הממוקדמים ביותר. אנחנו מראים שאם פותרי התאמה תלויים בעיקר על תכונות לקסיות, הם בקושי יכולים להתפשט לתחומים בלתי נראים. חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שהעריכה הנוכחית של פתרון התאמה היא בהחלט פגומה על ידי רק עריכה על חלק ספציפי של קבוצת נתונים ספציפית שבה יש התקפות משמעותית בין קבוצות האימון, התפתחות ומבחנים.', 'sk': 'Lexikalne funkcije so glavni vir informacij v najsodobnejših reševalnikih koreference. Lexikalne značilnosti implicitno modelirajo nekatere jezikovne pojave na drobni ravni granularnosti. Še posebej so koristne za predstavljanje konteksta omenjanja. V prispevku raziskujemo pomanjkljivost uporabe številnih leksikalnih značilnosti v najsodobnejših reševalcih koreference. Pokazali smo, da če se koreferenčni reševalci večinoma zanašajo na leksikalne značilnosti, se težko posplošijo na nevidne domene. Poleg tega pokažemo, da je trenutno ocenjevanje ločljivosti koreference očitno napačno, saj ocenjujemo le na določenem delu določenega nabora podatkov, v katerem obstaja opazno prekrivanje med nabori usposabljanja, razvoja in testiranja.', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name KCharselect unicode block name Ina amfani da su ga wakilisha muhimman kayan ambaci. Ga wannan takardan da Muke karatun wata durowa ta yi amfani da wasu fasihi na leksisi cikin-state-of-the-art-solvers. Tuna nũna cewa, lalle ne idan masu fassarar mafiya ƙayyade, sai bã zã su iya ƙara komfyuta ba. Furan haka, Munã nũna cewa, evaluation na rayuwar mafarinta yanzu bayani kawai ana ƙidãya kan rabin wani yanki na ƙayyadadde danne da aka ƙayyade a cikinsa akwai wani abu mai girma tsakanin mafarin, na ƙarami da tsarin jarrabãwa.', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་ཐལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་ཚོ་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་ཅན་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་རེད། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཆེན་མཁན་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད། ཁོང་ཚོས་དོན་དག་གི་སྐབས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གདོང་འཛིན་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་གདོང་ཐང་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་རྟེན་ཏུ་མཐོང་ན། དེ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉེན་དག འོ་ན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གྲངས་སུ་གཏོང་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁྱད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་མངོན་གསལ་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'ar': 'وظائف الهدف البديلة للتدريب على مقاييس تقييم مسرح ماجنت', 'pt': 'Funções objetivas alternativas para o treinamento de métricas de avaliação de MT', 'es': 'Funciones objetivas alternativas para entrenar métricas de evaluación de MT', 'fr': "Fonctions d'objectif alternatives pour les mesures d'évaluation MT de formation", 'ja': 'トレーニングMT評価指標の代替目標機能', 'hi': 'प्रशिक्षण एमटी मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स के लिए वैकल्पिक उद्देश्य कार्य', 'zh': '以训练机器翻译评估指标之代函数', 'ru': 'Альтернативные целевые функции для обучения метрикам оценки MT', 'ga': "Feidhmeanna Cuspóra Malartacha d'Oiliúint Méadracht Measúnaithe MT", 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Alternatív célkitűzési funkciók a képzéshez MT értékelési mércék', 'el': 'Εναλλακτικές λειτουργίες στόχου για την κατάρτιση μετρήσεων αξιολόγησης ΜΤ', 'it': 'Funzioni oggettive alternative per la formazione Metriche di valutazione MT', 'lt': 'Alternatyvios MT vertinimo metrinių mokymo objektyvios funkcijos', 'kk': 'MT оқыту үшін альтернативті нысан функциялары', 'mk': 'Алтернативни објективни функции за обука на метрики за проценка на MT', 'ms': 'Fungsi Objektif Alternatif untuk Latihan Metrik Evaluasi MT', 'mn': 'MT оюутнуудын дасгал хөдөлгөөн метрикийн альтернатив объектив функц', 'ml': 'MT പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള മെറ്റിക്സുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫങ്ഷനുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'Alternativ objektiv funksjonar for MT- evalueringsmetrikn', 'mt': 'Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'pl': 'Alternatywne funkcje celowe dla szkolenia Metryki oceny MT', 'ro': 'Funcții obiective alternative pentru instruirea Metricilor de evaluare MT', 'sr': 'Alternativne ciljne funkcije za obuku metrika za procjenu MT-a', 'si': 'MT විශේෂණ විශේෂණ මීටරික්ස් වෙනුවෙන් විකල්ප ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වැඩසටහන්', 'so': 'Functions Alternative Objective for Training MT Metrics', 'sv': 'Alternativa målfunktioner för utbildning MT utvärderingsmetoder', 'ta': 'MT மதிப்பீட்டு மெட்ரிக்களுக்கான மாற்று பொருள் செயல்பாடுகள்', 'ur': 'ٹرینینگ مٹی Evaluation متریک کے لئے alternate Objective Functions', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Alternatieve Objectieve Functies voor Training MT Evaluatie Metrics', 'bg': 'Алтернативни цели функции за обучение на метрици за оценка на МТ', 'hr': 'Alternativne ciljne funkcije za procjenu MT-a', 'de': 'Alternative Zielfunktionen für Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'da': 'Alternative målsætningsfunktioner for uddannelse MT evalueringsmålinger', 'ko': '훈련 기계 번역 평가 지표의 대체 목표 함수', 'sw': 'Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'tr': 'MT Taýýarlama Metrici üçin Alternativ Goş Etkinlikleri', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Funksionet Objektive Alternative për Trenimin e Metrikës së Vlerësimit MT', 'id': 'Fungsi Objektif Alternatif untuk Latihan Metrik Evaluasi MT', 'hy': 'Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'az': 'MT Evaluasyonu Metrici t톛hsil etm톛k 칲칞칲n alternativ Objektiv Funksiyonlar캼', 'bn': 'Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics', 'fa': 'عملکرد موضوع متفاوتی برای آموزش متریک ارزیابی MT', 'bs': 'Alternativne ciljne funkcije za procjenu MT-a', 'ca': "Funcions objectives alternatives per a formar els mètrics d'evaluació MT", 'cs': 'Alternativní cílové funkce pro školení MT hodnotící metriky', 'et': 'Alternatiivsed eesmärgifunktsioonid koolitusel MT hindamismeetrid', 'fi': 'Vaihtoehtoiset tavoitteet koulutuksen MT-arviointimittarit', 'jv': 'Alternate', 'sk': 'Alternativne ciljne funkcije za usposabljanje MT evalvation metrics', 'he': 'תפקידים אובייקטיביים אלטרנטיביים לאימון מטריקת עריכה MT', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Training MT Evaluation Metrics ་ལ་Alternative Objective Functions for Training MT Evaluation Metrics'}
{'en': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level. Trained metrics ignore corpus-level judgments and are trained for high sentence-level correlation only. We show that training only for one objective (sentence or corpus level), can not only harm the performance on the other objective, but it can also be suboptimal for the objective being optimized. To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment. Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable thanand on average outperformsboth models on both objectives.', 'ar': 'يتم اختبار مقاييس تقييم الترجمة الآلية من أجل الارتباط مع الأحكام البشرية سواء على مستوى الجملة أو على مستوى الجسم. تتجاهل المقاييس المدربة الأحكام على مستوى الجسم ويتم تدريبها على الارتباط العالي على مستوى الجملة فقط. نظهر أن التدريب لهدف واحد فقط (مستوى الجملة أو المجموعة) ، لا يمكن أن يضر بالأداء على الهدف الآخر فحسب ، بل يمكن أن يكون أيضًا دون المستوى الأمثل للهدف الذي يتم تحسينه. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقدم مقياسًا تم تدريبه على مستوى الجسم ونعرض مقارنة تجريبية مقابل مقياس تم تدريبه على مستوى الجملة يوضح كيف قد يختلف أدائهم حسب الزوج اللغوي ونوع ومستوى الحكم. بعد ذلك ، نقترح نموذجًا تم تدريبه لتحسين كلا الهدفين في وقت واحد وإظهار أنه أكثر استقرارًا بكثير من - وفي المتوسط يتفوق - كلا النموذجين على كلا الهدفين.', 'fr': "Les mesures d'évaluation MT sont testées pour vérifier leur corrélation avec les jugements humains au niveau de la phrase ou du corpus. Les métriques entraînées ignorent les jugements au niveau du corpus et sont entraînées uniquement pour une corrélation élevée au niveau de la phrase. Nous montrons que l'entraînement uniquement pour un objectif (niveau phrase ou corpus) peut non seulement nuire à la performance sur l'autre objectif, mais qu'il peut également être sous-optimal pour l'objectif optimisé. À cette fin, nous présentons une métrique formée au niveau du corpus et montrons une comparaison empirique avec une métrique formée au niveau de la phrase, illustrant comment leurs performances peuvent varier selon la paire de langues, le type et le niveau de jugement. Par la suite, nous proposons un modèle formé pour optimiser les deux objectifs simultanément et montrer qu'il est bien plus stable que les deux modèles, et qu'il surpasse en moyenne, les deux modèles sur les deux objectifs.", 'es': 'Las métricas de evaluación de MT se prueban para determinar su correlación con los juicios humanos, ya sea a nivel de oración o de cuerpo. Las métricas entrenadas ignoran los juicios a nivel de corpus y están entrenadas solo para una correlación de alto nivel de oración. Demostramos que el entrenamiento solo para un objetivo (nivel de oración o corpus) no solo puede perjudicar el rendimiento en el otro objetivo, sino que también puede ser subóptimo para el objetivo que se está optimizando. Con este fin, presentamos una métrica entrenada para el nivel del cuerpo y mostramos una comparación empírica con una métrica entrenada para el nivel de oración que ejemplifica cómo su rendimiento puede variar según el par de idiomas, el tipo y el nivel de juicio. Posteriormente, proponemos un modelo capacitado para optimizar ambos objetivos simultáneamente y demostrar que es mucho más estable que, en promedio, supera a ambos modelos en ambos objetivos.', 'pt': 'As métricas de avaliação de MT são testadas quanto à correlação com julgamentos humanos no nível da sentença ou do corpus. Métricas treinadas ignoram julgamentos em nível de corpus e são treinadas apenas para correlação de alto nível de sentença. Mostramos que treinar apenas para um objetivo (nível de sentença ou corpus), pode não apenas prejudicar o desempenho do outro objetivo, mas também pode ser subótimo para o objetivo que está sendo otimizado. Para tanto, apresentamos uma métrica treinada para nível de corpus e comparamos empíricas com uma métrica treinada para nível de sentença, exemplificando como seu desempenho pode variar por par de idiomas, tipo e nível de julgamento. Posteriormente, propomos um modelo treinado para otimizar os dois objetivos simultaneamente e mostramos que é muito mais estável do que – e em média supera – os dois modelos em ambos os objetivos.', 'ja': 'MT評価指標は、文章レベルまたはコーパスレベルのいずれかで人間の判断との相関性についてテストされます。訓練された指標は、コーパスレベルの判断を無視し、高文レベルの相関のみの訓練を受けます。私たちは、1つの目的（文章またはコーパスレベル）のためのトレーニングのみが、他の目的のパフォーマンスを損なうだけでなく、最適化されている目的にとっても最適ではない可能性があることを示しています。この目的のために、コーパスレベルのためにトレーニングされた指標を提示し、文レベルのためにトレーニングされた指標との実証的な比較を示し、それらのパフォーマンスが言語ペア、タイプ、および判断レベルごとにどのように変化するかを例示します。その後、両方の目標を同時に最適化し、両方の目標のモデルよりもはるかに安定し、平均的にパフォーマンスを上回ることを示すようにトレーニングされたモデルを提案します。', 'zh': 'MT评估指标于句语料库级上试与人决相关性。 教指标忽语料库级,而针高句相关性。 吾以一(句、语料库)教之,不惟损其一,而于正优化者,亦或非至善也。 是以发语料库之指标,示之以句指标,指标言其性而异其辞。 然后立一教之形,可以兼优化二者,明其两定于二,均优于二也。', 'ru': 'Метрики оценки MT проверяются на корреляцию с человеческими суждениями либо на уровне предложения, либо на уровне корпуса. Обученные метрики игнорируют суждения на уровне корпуса и обучаются только для корреляции на высоком уровне предложения. Показано, что обучение только для одной цели (уровня предложения или корпуса), может не только навредить производительности по другой цели, но и может быть неоптимальным для оптимизируемой цели. С этой целью мы представляем метрику, обученную для уровня корпуса, и показываем эмпирическое сравнение с метрикой, обученной для уровня предложения, показывая, как их производительность может варьироваться в зависимости от языковой пары, типа и уровня суждения. Впоследствии мы предлагаем модель, обученную для одновременной оптимизации обеих целей и показывающую, что она намного более стабильна, чем и в среднем превосходит обе модели по обеим целям.', 'hi': 'एमटी मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स को मानव निर्णयों के साथ सहसंबंध के लिए या तो वाक्य- या कॉर्पस-स्तर पर परीक्षण किया जाता है। प्रशिक्षित मीट्रिक कॉर्पस-स्तर के निर्णयों को अनदेखा करते हैं और केवल उच्च वाक्य-स्तर के सहसंबंध के लिए प्रशिक्षित होते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि केवल एक उद्देश्य (वाक्य या कॉर्पस स्तर) के लिए प्रशिक्षण, न केवल दूसरे उद्देश्य पर प्रदर्शन को नुकसान पहुंचा सकता है, बल्कि यह अनुकूलित किए जा रहे उद्देश्य के लिए सबऑप्टिमल भी हो सकता है। इस अंत तक हम कॉर्पस-स्तर के लिए प्रशिक्षित एक मीट्रिक प्रस्तुत करते हैं और वाक्य-स्तर के लिए प्रशिक्षित मीट्रिक के खिलाफ अनुभवजन्य तुलना दिखाते हैं, उदाहरण देते हैं कि उनका प्रदर्शन प्रति भाषा जोड़ी, प्रकार और निर्णय के स्तर पर कैसे भिन्न हो सकता है। इसके बाद हम दोनों उद्देश्यों को एक साथ अनुकूलित करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह दोनों उद्देश्यों पर दोनों मॉडलों की तुलना में कहीं अधिक स्थिर है- और औसत पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Déantar méadracht mheastóireachta MT a thástáil le haghaidh comhghaolmhaireachta le breithiúnais daonna ag leibhéal na pianbhreithe nó ag leibhéal an chorpais. Déanann méadracht oilte neamhaird ar bhreithiúnais ar leibhéal an chorpais agus ní dhéantar iad a oiliúint ach le haghaidh comhghaol ardleibhéil pianbhreithe. Léirímid nach féidir le hoiliúint ach le haghaidh cuspóir amháin (leibhéal abairte nó corpais) dochar a dhéanamh don fheidhmíocht ar an gcuspóir eile, ach go bhféadfadh sé a bheith fo-optamach freisin don chuspóir atá á bharrfheabhsú. Chuige sin cuirimid i láthair méadrach oilte don leibhéal corpais agus léirímid comparáid eimpíreach i gcoinne méadrach oilte do leibhéal pianbhreithe a thugann eiseamláiriú ar an gcaoi a bhféadfadh a bhfeidhmíocht a bheith éagsúil de réir péire teanga, cineál agus leibhéal breithiúnais. Ina dhiaidh sin molaimid múnla oilte chun an dá chuspóir a bharrfheabhsú go comhuaineach agus a thaispeáint go bhfuil sé i bhfad níos cobhsaí ná–agus go sáraíonn sé ar an meán–an dá mhúnla ar an dá chuspóir.', 'ka': 'MT განსაზღვრება მეტრიკები იყენებენ ადამიანის განსაზღვრებისთვის კორელელაციისთვის, ან სიტყვებისთვის ან კორპუსის დონეზე. მეტრიკები უნდა იცნოდოთ კორპოსური განსაზღვრებები და მხოლოდ უფრო მეტრიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მხოლოდ ერთი მიზეზი (სიტყვა ან კორპუსის დონეზე) შეუძლია არა მხოლოდ სხვა მიზეზი განმავლობას შეუძლია შეუძლია შეუძლია იყოს სპოპტიმალური მიზ ეს მიზეზით ჩვენ კორპუსის დონეზე მეტრიკური შესწავლობით და ჩვენ ჩვენებთ ემპერიკური შესწავლობას მეტრიკური შესწავლობისთვის, როგორც მათი მუშაობის შესაძლებლობა განსხვავებულია ენის ზო შემდეგ ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მოდელს, რომელიც განსწავლია ორივე ობიექტიკების ოპტიმიზაციას და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ძალიან უფრო სტაბულია, ვიდრე, და საშუალოდ უფრო სტაბულია, ორ', 'hu': 'Az MT értékelési mutatókat tesztelik az emberi ítéletekkel való korreláció szempontjából akár mondat-, akár corpus-szinten. A képzett mutatók figyelmen kívül hagyják a korpusz szintű ítéleteket, és csak a magas mondatszintű korrelációra képezik. Megmutatjuk, hogy az edzés csak egy célra (mondat vagy corpus szint), nem csak a másik cél teljesítményét károsíthatja, hanem az optimalizált célhoz szuboptimális is lehet. Ebből a célból bemutatunk egy korpusz szintű metriát, és empirikus összehasonlítást mutatunk be egy mondatszintre képzett metriával, amely példázza, hogy a teljesítményük hogyan változhat nyelvpáronként, típusonként és ítélőképességük szintjén. Ezt követően egy olyan modellt javasolunk, amely mindkét célkitűzés egyidejű optimalizálására készült, és megmutatja, hogy mindkét célkitűzés tekintetében sokkal stabilabb, mint – és átlagosan felülmúlja – mindkét modellt.', 'el': 'Οι μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης ΜΤ ελέγχονται για συσχέτιση με ανθρώπινες κρίσεις είτε σε επίπεδο ποινής είτε σε επίπεδο σώματος. Οι εκπαιδευμένες μετρήσεις αγνοούν τις κρίσεις σε επίπεδο σώματος και εκπαιδεύονται μόνο για συσχέτιση υψηλού επιπέδου ποινών. Δείχνουμε ότι η εκπαίδευση μόνο για έναν στόχο (πρόταση ή σώμα), όχι μόνο μπορεί να βλάψει την απόδοση στον άλλο στόχο, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να είναι υποβέλτιστη για τον στόχο που βελτιστοποιείται. Για το σκοπό αυτό παρουσιάζουμε μια μετρική εκπαιδευμένη για το επίπεδο του σώματος και παρουσιάζουμε εμπειρική σύγκριση με μια μετρική εκπαιδευμένη για το επίπεδο της πρότασης παραδειγματικά πώς η απόδοσή τους μπορεί να ποικίλει ανά γλωσσικό ζεύγος, τύπο και επίπεδο κρίσης. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδευμένο για να βελτιστοποιήσει ταυτόχρονα και τους δύο στόχους και να δείξει ότι είναι πολύ πιο σταθερό -και κατά μέσο όρο ξεπερνά- και τα δύο μοντέλα και στους δύο στόχους.', 'kk': 'MT бағалау метрикалары адамдардың тұжырымдарына немесе корпус деңгейінде қатынау үшін тексеріледі. Оқылған метрикалар корпус деңгейінің шешімдерін елемейді және тек жоғары сөйлем деңгейінің корреляциясы үшін оқылған. Біз тек бір мақсатты (сөйлем немесе корпус деңгейінде) оқытуды көрсету мүмкін емес, бірақ бұл мақсатты оптимизациялау үшін қаншалық болуы мүмкін. Бұл үшін біз корпус деңгейіндегі метрикалық оқытуды көрсеткіздік. Емпериялық салыстыру үшін мәтін деңгейіндегі метрикалық салыстыруын көрсеткіздік. Бұл үшін олардың оқытулары тіл екі, түрі мен Содан кейін біз мақсаттарды екеуінде оптимизациялау үшін оқыту үлгісін және ол екеуі мақсаттардың орташа оқыту үлгісінен артық, орташа оқыту үлгілерін көрсетуге болады.', 'mk': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level.  Тренираните метрики ги игнорираат пресудите на ниво на корпус и се тренирани само за корелација на високо ниво на казна. Ние покажуваме дека обуката само за една цел (реченица или корпус ниво), не само што може да ја оштети перформансата на другата цел, туку и може да биде суоптимална за оптимизацијата на целта. To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment.  Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than-and on average outperforms-both models on both objectives.', 'it': "Le metriche di valutazione MT sono testate per la correlazione con i giudizi umani sia a livello di frase che di corpo. Le metriche addestrate ignorano i giudizi a livello di corpus e sono addestrate solo per la correlazione ad alto livello di frase. Dimostriamo che l'allenamento per un solo obiettivo (livello di frase o corpus), non solo può danneggiare le prestazioni sull'altro obiettivo, ma può anche essere subottimale per l'obiettivo da ottimizzare. A tal fine presentiamo una metrica addestrata per il livello di corpus e mostriamo un confronto empirico con una metrica addestrata per il livello di frase esemplificando come le loro prestazioni possano variare per coppia di lingue, tipo e livello di giudizio. Successivamente proponiamo un modello addestrato per ottimizzare entrambi gli obiettivi contemporaneamente e dimostrare che è molto più stabile di - e in media supera - entrambi i modelli su entrambi gli obiettivi.", 'lt': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level.  Mokyti metriniai rodikliai ignoruoja teismo sprendimus korpuso lygiu ir mokomi tik aukšto sakinio lygio koreliacijai. Mes rodome, kad mokymas tik vienam tikslui (sakinio ar korpuso lygiui) gali pakenkti ne tik kito tikslo rezultatams, bet ir nepakankamai optimalus tikslui optimizuoti. Šiuo tikslu pristatome corpus lygiui apmokytą metriją ir parodome empirinį palyginimą su metrija, apmokyta sakinių lygiui, pavyzdžiui, kaip jų rezultatai gali skirtis pagal kalbos poros, tipo ir teismo lygį. Vėliau siūlome model į, parengtą tuo pačiu metu optimizuoti abu tikslus ir parodyti, kad abiejų tikslų rezultatai yra daug stabilesni nei vidutiniškai.', 'ms': 'Metrik penilaian MT diuji untuk korelasi dengan penilaian manusia sama ada di tahap kalimat atau corpus. Metrik dilatih mengabaikan penghakiman aras-corpus dan dilatih untuk korelasi aras-kalimat tinggi sahaja. Kami menunjukkan bahawa latihan hanya untuk satu objektif (kalimat atau tahap corpus), tidak hanya boleh merugikan prestasi pada objektif lain, tetapi ia juga boleh menjadi suboptimal untuk objektif yang optimum. Untuk tujuan ini kami memperkenalkan metrik dilatih untuk aras-corpus dan menunjukkan perbandingan empirik terhadap metrik dilatih untuk aras-kalimat menunjukkan bagaimana prestasi mereka boleh berbeza mengikut pasangan bahasa, jenis dan aras penghakiman. Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than-and on average outperforms-both models on both objectives.', 'mn': 'MT үнэлгээний метрик нь хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжүүдтэй холбогдохын тулд шалгалт хийгдсэн. Сургуулсан хэмжээсүүд корпус-түвшинд шүүмжлээ эсэргүүцэж, зөвхөн өргөн хэмжээсүүд холбогдох боломжтой. Бид зөвхөн нэг зорилго (өгүүлбэр эсвэл корпус түвшинд) суралцах нь зөвхөн нөгөө зорилго дээрх үйл ажиллагааг нөлөөлж чадахгүй, гэхдээ зорилго нь сайжруулж чадна. Үүний тулд бид корпус-түвшинд сургалтын метрик харьцуулж, хэл хоёр, төрлийн, шүүмжлэх түвшинд хэрхэн өөрчлөгдөж байгааг харуулж өгүүлэлт-түвшинд сургалтын метрик харьцуулж байна. Дараагийн дараа бид хоёр зорилго хоёуланг хамтдаа сайжруулахын тулд сургалтын загварыг санал болгож, хоёр зорилго дээр дундаж үйл ажиллагааны давхар загвар нь илүү тогтвортой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിധികളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നതിനായി എംടി വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു പരിശീലന മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് നില വിധികള്\u200d അവഗണിക്കുകയും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വാക്ക് നില ബന്ധത്തിന് മാത്രം പരിശീല ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനായി മാത്രം പരിശീലനം കാണിക്കുന്നു അതിനുവേണ്ടിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നില പരിശീലനം കൊടുക്കുന്നത്, ശിക്ഷയുടെ നില പരിശീലനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി ഒരു മെട്രിക്ക് താല്\u200dപര്യം കാണിക്കുന്നത്. അവരു Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than-and on average outperforms-both models on both objectives.', 'mt': 'Il-metriċi tal-evalwazzjoni MT jiġu ttestjati għal korrelazzjoni mas-sentenzi umani jew fil-livell tas-sentenza jew tal-korpus. Trained metrics ignore corpus-level judgments and are trained for high sentence-level correlation only.  Aħna nuru li t-taħriġ għal objettiv wieħed biss (sentenza jew livell korpus), jista’ mhux biss jagħmel ħsara lill-prestazzjoni fuq l-objettiv l-ieħor, iżda jista’ wkoll ikun subottimali għall-objettiv li jkun ottimizzat. Għal dan il-għan nippreżentaw metrika mħarrġa għal-livell tal-korpus u nuru paragun empiriku ma’ metrika mħarrġa għal-livell tas-sentenza li tagħti eżempju ta’ kif il-prestazzjoni tagħhom tista’ tvarja skont il-pari lingwistiċi, it-tip u l-livell ta’ ġudizzju. Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than-and on average outperforms-both models on both objectives.', 'pl': 'Wskaźniki oceny MT są testowane pod kątem korelacji z osądami ludzkimi na poziomie zdania lub korpusu. Przeszkolone wskaźniki ignorują oceny na poziomie korpusu i są przeszkolone tylko do korelacji na wysokim poziomie zdań. Pokazujemy, że trening tylko dla jednego celu (poziomu zdania lub korpusu) może nie tylko zaszkodzić wydajności w drugim celu, ale również być nieoptymalny dla zoptymalizowanego celu. W tym celu przedstawiamy metrykę przeszkoloną dla poziomu korpusu i pokazujemy porównanie empiryczne z metryką przeszkoloną dla poziomu zdań na przykład, jak ich wydajność może się różnić w zależności od pary językowej, rodzaju i poziomu oceny. Następnie proponujemy model przeszkolony, aby optymalizować oba cele jednocześnie i pokazać, że jest on o wiele bardziej stabilny niż – i średnio przewyższa – oba modele na obu celach.', 'ro': 'Măsurătorile de evaluare MT sunt testate pentru corelarea cu judecățile umane fie la nivel de propoziție, fie la nivel de corp. Metricile instruite ignoră judecățile la nivel de corp și sunt instruite doar pentru corelarea la nivel înalt de frază. Demonstrăm că antrenamentul doar pentru un singur obiectiv (nivel de propoziție sau corpus), nu numai că poate afecta performanța pe celălalt obiectiv, dar poate fi suboptim și pentru optimizarea obiectivului. În acest scop prezentăm o metrică pregătită pentru nivelul corpului și prezentăm comparații empirice cu o metrică pregătită pentru nivelul propozițiilor, exemplificând modul în care performanța lor poate varia în funcție de perechea de limbi, tipul și nivelul de judecată. Ulterior propunem un model instruit pentru optimizarea simultană a ambelor obiective și pentru a arăta că este mult mai stabil decât – și în medie depășește – ambele modele pe ambele obiective.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta MT waxaa lagu imtixaamaa si loo xiriiro xukunka dadka ama heerka qoyska. Shaqoyinka la tababariyey waxay ka jeedaan xukummada heerka korpuska iyo kuwa la baro isku xiriirka heerka sare oo kaliya. Waxaynu muujinnaa in waxbarashada lagu baranayo hal goal oo kaliya (dhameystirka ama korpuska), waxyaabaha kale oo kaliya ma dhibi karo, laakiin waxaa kaloo suurtagal ah in la tixgeliyo. Taas darteed waxaan soo bandhignaa metrici lagu tababariyey heerka korpus, waxaana tusaynaa is-barbarta metric oo lagu baray heer xabsi ah, tusaale ahaan tababarka ay u bedelan karto labada labood, nooc iyo heer caddaalad. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale lagu baray si aan labada goal ugu beddelno islamarkaasna aan tusno in ay u adag tahay mid ka sii caadi badan oo ugu dhexaysa sameynta labada noocyo ee labada goal.', 'si': 'MT විශ්වාස මීටරික්ස් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සු විශ්වාස සමඟ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමඟ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වාක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් කොර්පුස් ලේවල් විධානය අවධානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධානය විතරයි වි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ එක අරමුණ විතරයි (වාක්ෂාව නැත්තම් කොර්පුස් ස්ථානයි), අනිත් අරමුණ විතරයි, ඒත් ඒක අරමුණ විතරයි අරමුණ මේ අවසානයෙන් අපි කොර්පුස් ස්ථානයෙන් පුහුණු මෙට්\u200dරික් ප්\u200dරධානයක් පෙන්වන්න සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විදිහට වි ඊට පස්සේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මොඩේල් එක්කෙන් අරමුණ දෙන්නම් අරමුණ දෙන්නම් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ පෙන්වන්න ඒක තරම් ස්ථිර වෙන්න', 'sv': 'MT utvärdering mätvärden testas för korrelation med mänskliga bedömningar antingen på menings- eller korpusnivå. Utbildade mätvärden ignorerar bedömningar på korpusnivå och tränas endast för korrelation på hög meningsnivå. Vi visar att träning endast för ett mål (mening eller korpusnivå), inte bara kan skada prestationen på det andra målet, utan det kan också vara suboptimalt för att målet optimeras. För detta ändamål presenterar vi ett mått tränat för korpusnivå och visar empirisk jämförelse mot ett mått tränat för meningsnivå som exemplifierar hur deras prestanda kan variera beroende på språkpar, typ och bedömningsnivå. Därefter föreslår vi en modell utbildad för att optimera båda målen samtidigt och visar att den är betydligt stabilare än – och i genomsnitt överträffar – båda modellerna på båda målen.', 'ta': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level.  பயிற்சி மெட்ரிக்கள் கோர்பாஸ்- மட்டத்திற்கு தீர்ப்புகளை தவிர்க்கவும் மற்றும் உயர் வாக்கு மட்டும் தொடர்ப நாம் ஒரு பொருளுக்கு மட்டுமே பயிற்சியை காட்டுகிறோம் (வாக்கியம் அல்லது குறுக்குநிலை), மற்ற பொருளில் மட்டும் செயல்படுத்த முடியாத இந்த முடிவிற்கு நாம் ஒரு மெட்ரிக் பயிற்சி நிலைக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் வாக்கு- மட்டத்திற்கு எதிராக ஒரு மெட்ரிக் ஒப்பீடு காட்டு அதற்குப் பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு மாதிரி பயிற்சி இரண்டு பொருள்களையும் ஒன்றாக மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அது இரண்டு பொருள்களிலும', 'ur': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either in the sentence- or the corpus-level. تعلیم کی متریک کرپوس سطح کے فیصلے غفلت کرتی ہے اور صرف اچھی مجلس سطح کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ تعلیم صرف ایک موضوع کے لئے (sentence or corpus level) نہیں صرف دوسرے موضوع پر نقصان پہنچا سکتی ہے بلکہ موضوع کے لئے بھی زیادہ اچھا ہے۔ اس لئے ہم ایک متریک کی تعلیم کررہے ہیں جن کی کورپوس سطح کے لئے ہے اور ایک متریک سطح کے لئے آموزش کی جاتی ہے جس کی مثال بیان کرتی ہے کہ ان کی عملکرد کس طرح زبان جوڑے، نوع اور سطح کے بارے میں متفاوت ہو سکتی ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک مدل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک دوسرے موجودات کے ساتھ استعمال کی جاتی ہے اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ دونوں موجودات پر زیادہ ثابت قدم ہے', 'no': 'MT-evalueringsmetrikar vert testa for korrelasjon med menneske sprøytebrukar anten på setninga eller korpusnivået. Treng metrikar ignorerer korpusnivåsprøytebrukar og vert berre trent for korrelasjon med høg setningsnivå. Vi viser at opplæring berre for ein mål (setning eller korpusnivå), kan ikkje bare skade oppløysinga på den andre målet, men det kan også vera underoptimalt for det målet som blir optimalisert. I denne slutten viser vi ein metrisk trent for korpusnivå og viser empirisk sammenlikning med ein metrisk trent for setningsnivå som eksempler korleis utviklinga sine kan variera på kvar språk par, type og nivå for sprøytebruk. I tillegg foreslår vi eit modell trent for å optimalisera både mål samtidig og vise at det er mykje stabil enn - og gjennomsnittlig utgåver både modeller på begge mål.', 'sr': 'Metrike procjene MT-a su testirane za korelaciju sa ljudskim osuđivanjima ili na rečenici ili na nivou korpusa. Trenirane metrike ignoriraju osude na nivou korpusa i obučene su samo za korelaciju visoke rečenice. Pokazujemo da obuka samo za jedan cilj (rečenica ili nivo korpusa), ne može samo štetiti postupak na drugom cilju, već može biti i podoptimalna za optimizaciju objekta. Za taj cilj predstavljamo metričku obuku za nivo korpusa i pokazujemo empiričku usporedbu sa metričkom obučenom za nivo kazne, primjerujući kako se njihova izvedba može promijeniti po jezičkom parovu, tipu i nivou presude. Nakon toga predlažemo model koji je obučen da optimizuje obje ciljeve istovremeno i pokažemo da je mnogo stabilniji od i prosječnih nadmaših model a na obje ciljeve.', 'vi': 'Xét nghiệm lượng tử khoa MTV được thử nghiệm để xác định mối tương quan với các phán quyết con người, cả ở phần án- hay tập thể. Học hành âm lượng phớt lờ phán quyết trên tập thể và được đào tạo chỉ để quan sát mức án cao. Chúng tôi cho thấy huấn luyện chỉ cho một mục tiêu (câu án hay tập thể) không chỉ có thể ảnh hưởng đến hiệu quả trên mục tiêu khác, mà còn có thể tối ưu cho mục tiêu được nâng cao. Để đạt được mục đích này, chúng tôi trình bày một chương trình đo lường về dạng cơ thể và hiển thị một sự so sánh thực tế với một thước đo được đào tạo để mô tả cách hiệu ứng của chúng có thể thay đổi theo cặp ngôn ngữ, kiểu và mức phán đoán. Sau đó chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình được huấn luyện để tối ưu hai mục tiêu cùng nhau và cho thấy nó ổn định hơn và trên trung bình đạt được hai mô hình về hai mục tiêu.', 'uz': "MT qiymati metriklari bir so'zlar yoki corpus darajada odamlar bilan bog'liq bo'lishi uchun imkoniyatlarni tekshiriladi. Taʼminlovchi metriklar corpus darajasi xususiyatlarini eʼtibor beradi va faqat maxfiy soʻzning eng darajaga bogʻlash uchun o'rganiladi. Biz faqat bir obʼekt uchun o'rganishni ko'rsatdikiz, faqat boshqa obʼekt amalni faqat bajarishi mumkin, lekin bu obʼektni moslash uchun suboptimal bo'lishi mumkin. Va shunday qilib, biz corpus darajada o'rganish metric o'rganish va gapir darajada o'rganish metrik tajribasini ko'rsatdik. Bu natijada ularning amalni qanday bir tillar qo'l, tur va tizimning darajasida o'zgarishga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Keyin biz ikkita obʼektlarni bir marta ko'paytirish uchun o'rganilgan modelni tahlil qilamiz va bu ikkita obʼektlarning o'rtasida ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Метериците за оценка на МТ се тестват за корелация с човешките преценки на ниво изречение или корпус. Обучените показатели игнорират преценките на ниво корпус и са обучени само за корелация на високо ниво изречение. Показваме, че обучението само за една цел (ниво изречение или корпус), може не само да навреди на изпълнението на другата цел, но и да бъде подоптимално за целта, която се оптимизира. За тази цел представяме метрика, обучена за ниво корпус, и показваме емпирично сравнение с метрика, обучена за ниво изречение, като пример показва как изпълнението им може да варира според езиковата двойка, вида и нивото на преценка. Впоследствие предлагаме модел, обучен да оптимизира едновременно двете цели и да покаже, че той е далеч по-стабилен и средно по-добър от двата модела при двете цели.', 'hr': 'MT procjene se testiraju za korelaciju sa ljudskim osuđivanjima ili na rečenici ili na razini korpusa. Trenirane metrike ignoriraju osude na nivou korpusa i obučene su samo za korelaciju visoke kazne. Pokazujemo da obuka samo za jedan cilj (rečenica ili razina korpusa) ne može samo štetiti učinkovitost na drugom cilju, već može biti i podoptimalna za optimizaciju cilja. Za taj cilj predstavljamo metričku obuku za razinu korpusa i pokazujemo empiričku usporedbu s metričkom obučenom za razinu kazne, primjerujući kako njihova učinka može promijeniti po jezičkom parovu, tipu i razinu presude. Nakon toga predlažemo model obučen za optimizaciju obje ciljeve istovremeno i pokažemo da je mnogo stabilniji od prosječnih model a i obje ciljeve iznad izlaza.', 'da': 'MT evalueringsmålinger testes for korrelation med menneskelige vurderinger enten på sætning- eller korpusniveau. Uddannede målinger ignorerer domme på korpusniveau og er kun trænet til korrelation på højt sætningsniveau. Vi viser, at træning kun til ét mål (sætning eller corpus niveau), ikke kun kan skade præstationen på det andet mål, men det kan også være suboptimalt for at målet bliver optimeret. Til dette formål præsenterer vi en metric trænet til korpusniveau og viser empirisk sammenligning med en metric trænet til sætningsniveau, der eksemplificerer, hvordan deres præstation kan variere efter sprogpar, type og bedømmelsesniveau. Efterfølgende foreslår vi en model uddannet til at optimere begge mål samtidigt og vise, at den er langt mere stabil end – og i gennemsnit overperformer – begge modeller på begge mål.', 'nl': 'MT evaluatiestatistieken worden getest op correlatie met menselijke oordelen op zin- of corpusniveau. Getrainde metrics negeren oordelen op corpusniveau en zijn alleen getraind voor correlatie op hoog zinsniveau. We laten zien dat training slechts voor één doel (zin- of corpusniveau) niet alleen de prestaties op het andere doel kan schaden, maar ook suboptimaal kan zijn voor het te optimaliseren doel. Hiertoe presenteren we een metriek getraind voor corpusniveau en laten we empirische vergelijking zien met een metriek getraind voor zinneniveau, die aantoont hoe hun prestaties kunnen variëren per taalpaar, type en beoordelingsniveau. Vervolgens stellen we een model voor dat getraind is om beide doelstellingen tegelijkertijd te optimaliseren en aan te tonen dat het veel stabieler is dan – en gemiddeld beter presteert – beide modellen op beide doelstellingen.', 'de': 'MT-Bewertungsmetriken werden auf Korrelation mit menschlichen Urteilen entweder auf Satz- oder Korpusebene getestet. Trainierte Metriken ignorieren Urteile auf Korpusebene und sind nur für Korrelationen auf hoher Satzebene trainiert. Wir zeigen, dass Training nur für ein Ziel (Satz- oder Korpusebene) nicht nur die Leistung des anderen Ziels beeinträchtigen kann, sondern auch suboptimal für das zu optimierende Ziel sein kann. Zu diesem Zweck stellen wir eine für Korpusebene trainierte Metrik vor und zeigen einen empirischen Vergleich mit einer Metrik, die für Satzlebene trainiert wurde, und zeigen exemplarisch, wie ihre Leistung je Sprachpaar, Art und Urteilsstufe variieren kann. Anschließend schlagen wir ein Modell vor, das darauf trainiert wird, beide Ziele gleichzeitig zu optimieren und zu zeigen, dass es bei beiden Zielen weitaus stabiler ist – und im Durchschnitt übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Tathmini wa MT unajaribiwa kwa ajili ya kuunganisha na maamuzi ya binadamu au kwa kiwango cha kifungu. Utafiti wa mafunzo hupuuza maamuzi ya kiwango cha makampuni na wanafunzwa kwa uhusiano mkubwa wa hukumu. We show that training only for one objective (sentence or corpus level), can not only harm the performance on the other objective, but it can also be suboptimal for the objective being optimized.  To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment.  Baada ya hayo tunapendekeza mtindo wa mafunzo ili kuwezesha malengo yote kwa wakati mmoja na kuonyesha kuwa ni imara zaidi ya-na kwa wastani zaidi ya mifano yote kwenye malengo yote.', 'id': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level.  Metrik terlatih mengabaikan penilaian tingkat corpus dan terlatih untuk korelasi tingkat kalimat tinggi saja. Kami menunjukkan bahwa latihan hanya untuk satu tujuan (kalimat atau tingkat corpus), tidak hanya dapat merugikan prestasi pada tujuan lain, tetapi juga dapat menjadi suboptimal untuk tujuan yang optimizasi. To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment.  Kemudian kami mengusulkan model yang dilatih untuk optimisasi kedua tujuan secara bersamaan dan menunjukkan bahwa itu jauh lebih stabil dari-dan rata-rata prestasi-kedua model pada kedua tujuan.', 'fa': 'متریک ارزیابی MT برای ارزیابی با قانون انسان یا در مجازات یا سطح جسد آزمایش می\u200cشود. متریک آموزش داده شدن قضاوت سطح جسد را نادیده بگیرند و فقط برای ارتباط سطح مجازات بالا آموزش داده می شوند. ما نشان می دهیم که آموزش فقط برای یک هدف (مجازات یا سطح کورپوس) نمی تواند تنها به عملکرد دیگر آسیب دهد، بلکه می تواند برای عملکرد نیکوتر باشد. برای این قسمت ما یک متریک آموزش آموزش برای سطح کورپوس را نشان می دهیم و مقایسه امپراتیک را با یک متریک آموزش آموزش داده شده برای سطح مجازات را نشان می دهیم که چگونه عملکرد آنها به هر جفت زبان، نوع و سطح حکم تغییر می دهد. بعدش ما یک مدل آموزش یافته برای optimization both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than- and on average outperformances- both models on both objectives.', 'ko': '기계 번역 평가 지표는 문장이나 어료 라이브러리 차원에서 인류 판단과 관련성을 측정한다.훈련을 거친 지표는 어료 라이브러리 등급의 판단을 무시하고 높은 문장 등급의 관련성에 대해서만 훈련했다.우리는 한 목표(문장이나 어료 라이브러리 단계)만을 대상으로 훈련하는 것은 다른 목표의 표현에 해를 끼칠 뿐만 아니라 최적화되고 있는 목표에 있어서도 최우선일 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.이를 위해 우리는 어료 라이브러리 수준을 위해 훈련하는 지표를 제시했고 문장 수준을 위해 훈련하는 지표와 실증 비교를 실시했다. 예를 들어 그들의 표현은 언어 대조, 유형과 판단 수준에 따라 다를 수 있음을 설명했다.그 다음에 우리는 이 두 목표를 동시에 최적화하는 모델을 제시했고 두 모델보다 안정적이고 두 목표에서 모두 이 두 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'MT deňlenme metrikleri adamlaryň häsiýetlerini ýa-da korpus derejesi bilen meňzeşdirmek üçin barlanýar. Eğitmeli metriler korpus derejesi hökmünü görmezden çykar we diňe ýokary sözlem derejesi bilen bilinmediler. Biz diňe bir maksadyň (sözlem ýa-da korpus derejesi) okuw etmegi diňe başga maksadyň üstüne bir zarar bermeýändigini görkeýäris, emma bu hem maksadyň optimizasy üçin döredip biler. Şu üçin korpus derejesi üçin metrik okuwçylygy görkezip we sözleşme derejesi üçin empirik karşılaştyrylygy görkezip, olaryň etkinlişleri dil çift, hili we düzeden çözümleşmegi ýaly üýtgeşirilýär. Sonra da her iki amacı da en iyi şekilde uygulanmak için eğitimli bir model teklif edip, her iki amaçlarda da ortalama sonuçlarda ve ortalama sonuçlardan daha stabil olduğunu gösteririz.', 'am': 'የMT ማስታወቂያ ማተሚያዎች ከፍርድ ወይም ከቆርፓስ ደረጃ ጋር ግንኙነት ለመፈተኑ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ የተጠቃሚ ሚትሮች የቆርፓስ-level ፍርድ ይተዉታል፡፡ ይህንን ትምህርት ለአንድ አካባቢ ብቻ ማሳየትን እናሳየዋለን (የቁጥጥር ወይም የኮፕስ ደረጃ) በሌላው አካባቢ ላይ ብቻ አይጎዳም ነገር ግን ለጉዳዩ መሻለል ይችላል፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት ለቆርፓስ ደረጃዎች የተማራውን ማተሚያ እናሳየዋለን፣ የሥርዓት ደረጃ ላይ የተማረከውን ትክክል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ ሁለቱን አቃውንቶች በአንድ ሰዓት ለማሻሻል የተማረ ሞዴል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በሁለቱም አቃውንቶች ላይ የጥቅም እና በጥያቄ የሁለትን አካባቢዎች እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "MT-evalueringsmetries word toets vir korrelasie met menslike oordelings of by die seting of die korpusvlak. Geoefende metries ignoreer korpusvlak verordeninge en word slegs opgelei vir hoë setningvlak korrelasie. Ons wys dat onderwerp slegs vir een objekte (seting of korpusvlak), kan nie net die prestasie op die ander doel skade nie, maar dit kan ook suboptimal wees vir die doel wat optimaliseer word. Op hierdie einde vertoon ons 'n metriese opgelei vir korpusvlak en wys empiriese vergelyking teen 'n metriese opgelei vir sentence-vlak voorbeeld hoe hulle prestasie kan verander per taal paar, tipe en vlak van oordeel. Ons voorstel daarna 'n model wat opgelei is om beide objekte simultaan te optimaliseer en te wys dat dit veel meer stabile as-en op gemiddelde uitvoerde modele is op beide objekte.", 'bn': 'মানুষের বিচারের সাথে সম্পর্কের জন্য এমটি মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক পরীক্ষা করা হয়- অথবা কোর্পাস-স্তরে। প্রশিক্ষিত মেট্রিক কোর্পাস-স্তরের বিচার উপেক্ষা করে এবং শুধুমাত্র উচ্চ স্তরের সম্পর্কের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শুধুমাত্র একটি উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ দেখাচ্ছি (বাক্য অথবা কোর্পাস স্তরে), শুধুমাত্র অন্যান্য উদ্দেশ্যের প্রদর্শনে এর জন্য আমরা কোর্পাস স্তরের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের একটি মেট্রিক প্রশিক্ষণ উপস্থাপন করি এবং শাস্তি পর্যায়ে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি মেট্রিক স্তরের বিরুদ্ধে তুলনা দেখিয়ে দে এর পরে আমরা একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রস্তাব করি একই সাথে দুটি উদ্দেশ্য অপারেশন করার জন্য এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এটা দুটো উদ্দেশ্যের মধ্যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আরো বে', 'az': 'MT değerlendirməsi metrikləri insan hökmünü ya cümlədə, ya da korpus səviyyəsində ilişkilər üçün imtahana çəkilir. Eğitimli metriklər korpus səviyyəsi hökmlərini görməz və ancaq yüksək cümlələr səviyyəsi ilə birlikdə təhsil edilir. Biz ancaq bir məqsəd üçün təhsil edirik (cümlət ya da korpus səviyyəsi), digər məqsəd təhsil etməyə zərər verə bilməz, lakin bu məqsəd optimizlənməsi üçün də dəyişmə olar. Buna görə biz korpus səviyyəsinə təhsil edilən metrik göstəririk və cümlələr səviyyəsinə təhsil edilən metrik ilə müəyyən edilən məsələlərinin dil çift, tip və səviyyəsinə necə dəyişiklik olduğunu göstəririk. Sonra hər iki məqsədilə optimizlənmək üçün təhsil edilmiş modeli təklif edirik və hər iki məqsədilə həmin modeli daha stabil olduğunu göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Metrike procjene MT-a se testiraju za korelaciju sa ljudskim osuđivanjima ili na kazni ili na nivou korpusa. Trenirane metrike ignoriraju osude na nivou korpusa i obučene su samo za korelaciju visoke rečenice. Pokazujemo da obuka samo za jedan cilj (rečenica ili razina korpusa), ne može samo štetiti učinkovitost na drugom cilju, već može biti i podoptimalna za optimizaciju objekta. Za taj cilj predstavljamo metričku obuku za nivo korpusa i pokazujemo empiričku usporedbu s metričkom obučenom za nivo kazne, primjerujući kako njihova učinka može promijeniti po jezičkom parovu, tipu i nivou presude. Nakon toga predlažemo model obučen kako bi optimalizirao obje ciljeve istovremeno i pokazao da je mnogo stabilniji od i prosječnih model a iznad izlaza i obje ciljeve.', 'hy': 'MT-ի գնահատման չափումները ստուգում են մարդկային դատողությունների հետ կապվածության համար կամ նախադասության, կամ մարմնի մակարդակի վրա: Պատրաստված մետրիկները անտեսում են մարմնի մակարդակի դատողությունները և պատրաստվում են միայն բարձր նախադասության մակարդակի հաղորդակցման համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կրթությունը միայն մեկ օբյեկտիվ (նախադասություն կամ կորպոս մակարդակի) համար կարող է ոչ միայն վնասել այլ օբյեկտիվ նպատակի արտադրողությունը, այլ նաև կարող է լինել ենթաօպտիմալ օբյեկտիվա Այս նպատակով մենք ներկայացնում ենք մարմնի մակարդակի մետրիկ և ցույց ենք տալիս էմպրիկական համեմատությունը նախադասության մակարդակի մետրիկի հետ, որը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես են նրանց արտադրողությունները տարբերվում յուրաքանչյուր լեզվի զույգ, տեսակ և մակարդակի համար: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որը միաժամանակ օպտիմացնում է երկու նպատակները և ցույց է տալիս, որ այն շատ ավելի կայուն է, քան և միջին արդյունքում երկու մոդելները երկու նպատակների վրա:', 'sq': 'Metrikat e vlerësimit MT janë testuar për korrelacion me gjykimet njerëzore ose në nivelin e dënimit ose të korpusit. Trained metrics ignore corpus-level judgments and are trained for high sentence-level correlation only.  We show that training only for one objective (sentence or corpus level), can not only harm the performance on the other objective, but it can also be suboptimal for the objective being optimized.  To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment.  Subsequently we propose a model trained to optimize both objectives simultaneously and show that it is far more stable than-and on average outperforms-both models on both objectives.', 'cs': 'Metriky hodnocení MT jsou testovány na korelaci s lidskými úsudky buď na úrovni věty nebo korpusu. Trénované metriky ignorují úsudky na úrovni korpusu a jsou trénovány pouze pro korelaci na vysoké úrovni věty. Ukazujeme, že trénink pouze pro jeden cíl (úroveň věty nebo korpusu) může nejen poškodit výkon na druhém cíli, ale může být také suboptimální pro optimalizovaný cíl. Za tímto účelem prezentujeme metriku trénovanou pro korpusovou úroveň a ukazujeme empirické srovnání s metrikou trénovanou pro úroveň věty, která ukazuje, jak se jejich výkon může lišit podle jazykového páru, typu a úrovně úsudku. Následně navrhujeme model trénovaný tak, aby optimalizoval oba cíle současně a ukázal, že je mnohem stabilnější než – a v průměru překonává oba modely na obou cílech.', 'et': 'MT hindamismeetodeid testitakse seoses inimotsustega kas lause- või korpuse tasandil. Treenitud mõõdikud eiravad korpuse tasandi otsuseid ja neid koolitatakse ainult kõrge lausetaseme korrelatsiooni jaoks. Näitame, et ainult ühe eesmärgi (lause või korpuse tase) koolitus ei saa mitte ainult kahjustada teise eesmärgi tulemuslikkust, vaid see võib olla ka optimeeritud eesmärgi jaoks ebaoptimaalne. Selleks tutvustame korpuse tasemele koolitatud meetodit ja näitame empiirilist võrdlust lausetasemele koolitatud meetodiga, näidates, kuidas nende jõudlus võib erineda vastavalt keelepaarile, tüübile ja otsustasemele. Seejärel pakume välja mudeli, mis on koolitatud mõlema eesmärgi samaaegseks optimeerimiseks ja näitab, et see on mõlema eesmärgi puhul palju stabiilsem ja keskmiselt ületab mõlemad mudelid.', 'fi': 'MT-arviointimittarit testataan korrelaatioksi ihmisen arviointiin joko lause- tai korpustasolla. Koulutetut mittarit sivuuttavat korpustason arvioinnit ja ne on koulutettu vain korkeaan lausetason korrelaatioon. Osoitamme, että harjoittelu vain yhdelle tavoitteelle (lause- tai korpustaso) voi haitata suoritusta toisessa tavoitteessa, mutta se voi myös olla epäoptimaalista optimoitavalle tavoitteelle. Tässä tarkoituksessa esitämme korpustasoon koulutetun mittarin ja empiirisen vertailun lausetasoon koulutettuun mittariin, joka havainnollistaa, miten niiden suorituskyky voi vaihdella kieliparin, arvostelun tyypin ja tason mukaan. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme mallia, joka on koulutettu optimoimaan molemmat tavoitteet samanaikaisesti ja osoittamaan, että se on huomattavasti vakaampi ja keskimäärin parempi kuin molemmat mallit molemmissa tavoitteissa.', 'ca': "Les mètriques d'evaluació MT es testen per correlació amb els judicis humans a nivell de frases o de corpus. Les mètriques entrenades ignoren els judicis a nivell corporal i són entrenades només per correlació de nivell elevat de frases. Mostrem que l'entrenament només per un objectiu (frase o nivell de corpus), no només pot perjudicar el rendiment en l'altre objectiu, sinó també pot ser subotimal per optimitzar l'objectiu. A aquest efecte presentem una mètrica entrenada per a nivell de corpus i mostram una comparació empírica amb una mètrica entrenada per a nivell de frases exemplificant com el seu rendiment pot variar per parell de llenguatges, tipus i nivell de judici. Després proposem un model format per optimitzar ambdós objectius simultàniament i demostrar que és molt més estable que i mitjana, els dos models amb resultats superiors en ambdós objectius.", 'jv': 'MT dadi nyong dipunangé kateter dipunangé kanggo kelas karo hukum uwong, dadi kapan-kapan cara-kapan Attribute Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan kanggo kejahatan kanggo ngerasakno (suwitan alé kabèh dumadhi), ora iso nggawe ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno iki, kepasakno iki dadi wis dipileksi kanggo kelompok nggo diantesik . Saiki iki, kita diweh menehi kelas telu nggawe layanan karo perusahaan banget karo perusahaan kelas telu nggawe barang kelas telu nggawe barang pancen Awak dhéwé ngerasah model sing ditambah akeh luwih dumadhi iki dadi ngono nggawe gerakan sing apik dhéwé stabil karo ngono akeh sabên-susahé model sing ditambah iki dadi bisa diagonal.', 'ha': "Ana jarraba metric muhalli na MT dõmin a yi daidai da umarnin mutane ko da cire-daraja. Metric waɗanda aka tsare, suna ƙyãmar gareta-daraja kuma an sanar da su kawai da danganci na sarrafa. Muna nũna wa shirin yin amfani da shi kawai ga abu guda (salon ko rubutu), bã zai iya zartar da aikin aiki na daban, kuma amma yana iya da amfani da wanda za'a yi amfani da shi. Daga wannan, Munã halatar da wani metric wanda aka yi wa aikin wa-nau'in-nau'i kuma Muke nuna misalin misalin wani metric wanda aka yi wa wa-daraja wa cewa, kamar misalin jinin karatunsu ya canje ko duk harshe, nau'i da daraja na yi hukunci. Aka bayan haka, sai Mu buɗa wani misali wanda aka yi wa shirin da shi dõmin a buɗa masu amfani da abubuwa biyu sami biyu, kuma Mu nuna cewa, shi ne mafi tabbatacce ko-kuma, a kan tsakanin sami-sami biyu masu motsi da duk abubuwa.", 'sk': 'Meritve ocenjevanja MT se testirajo glede korelacije s človeškimi presojami bodisi na ravni stavka bodisi korpusa. Usposabljene meritve ignorirajo presoje na ravni korpusa in so usposobljene samo za korelacijo na visoki ravni stavka. Pokazali smo, da usposabljanje samo za en cilj (stavek ali korpus nivo) ne more le škoditi uspešnosti na drugem cilju, temveč je lahko tudi suboptimalno za optimiziran cilj. V ta namen predstavljamo metriko, usposobljeno za raven korpusa, in prikažemo empirično primerjavo z metriko, usposobljeno za raven stavka, ki ponazarja, kako se lahko njihova zmogljivost razlikuje glede na jezikovni par, vrsto in stopnjo presoje. V nadaljevanju predlagamo model, usposobljen za optimizacijo obeh ciljev hkrati in pokažemo, da je veliko stabilnejši od obeh modelov pri obeh ciljih.', 'bo': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level. Trained metrics ignore corpus-level judgments and are trained for high sentence-level correlation only. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་སྤྱད་ནས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཅིག་ལས་ཁོ་ན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མིན་ན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཞན་ལས་ཕར་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད་པར། ཡིན་ན་དམ To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level and show empirical comparison against a metric trained for sentence-level exemplifying how their performance may vary per language pair, type and level of judgment. To this end we present a metric trained for corpus-level. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འབད་ཡོད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཕར་རྟགས་བཀལ་རྒྱུ་བྱས་ན། མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག', 'he': 'MT evaluation metrics are tested for correlation with human judgments either at the sentence- or the corpus-level.  מטריקה מאומנת מתעלמת משפטים ברמה של קורפוס ומתאמנת רק לקשר ברמה גבוהה של משפטים. We show that training only for one objective (sentence or corpus level), can not only harm the performance on the other objective, but it can also be suboptimal for the objective being optimized.  למטרה זו אנחנו מציגים מטריקה מאומנת לרמה של קורפוס ולהראות שיוואי אמפירי נגד מטריקה מאומנת לרמה של משפט לאחר מכן אנו מציעים מודל מאומן לאופטיזם את שני המטרות באותו הזמן ולהראות שהוא הרבה יותר יציב משני המטרות.'}
{'en': 'Vector space models for evaluating semantic fluency in autism', 'ar': 'نماذج فضاء متجه لتقييم الطلاقة الدلالية في التوحد', 'fr': "Modèles spatiaux vectoriels pour évaluer la fluidité sémantique dans l'autisme", 'es': 'Modelos de espacio vectorial para evaluar la fluidez semántica en el autismo', 'pt': 'Modelos de espaço vetorial para avaliar a fluência semântica no autismo', 'ja': '自閉症における意味論的流暢性を評価するためのベクトル空間モデル', 'hi': 'आत्मकेंद्रित में शब्दार्थ प्रवाह का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए वेक्टर अंतरिक्ष मॉडल', 'zh': '评估自闭症语义流畅性向量空间模样', 'ru': 'Векторные модели пространства для оценки семантической беглости при аутизме', 'ga': 'Samhlacha veicteora spáis chun líofacht shéimeantach san uathachas a mheas', 'el': 'Διανυσματικά διαστημικά μοντέλα για την αξιολόγηση της σημασιολογικής ρευστότητας στον αυτισμό', 'hu': 'Vektortérmodellek az autizmus szemantikai folyékonyságának értékelésére', 'it': "Modelli spaziali vettoriali per valutare la fluidità semantica nell'autismo", 'lt': 'Vector space models for evaluating semantic fluency in autism', 'mk': 'Векторните вселенски модели за проценка на семантичната течност во аутизмот', 'ka': 'ვიქტორის სისტემის მოდელები სენმანტიკური სისტემის განსაზღვრებისთვის', 'ml': 'വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudelli spazjali tal-vetturi għall-evalwazzjoni tal-fluwenza semantika fl-awtiżmu', 'kk': 'Семантикалық жылдамдылығын аутизмдегі вектордың бос орын үлгілері', 'no': 'Vektorommodeller for å evaluera semantisk fluktens i autismen', 'ro': 'Modele spațiale vectoriale pentru evaluarea fluenței semantice în autism', 'pl': 'Wektorowe modele przestrzeni do oceny płynności semantycznej w autyzmie', 'ms': 'Model ruang vektor untuk menilai kelemahan semantik dalam autisme', 'sr': 'Vektorski svemirski modeli za procjenu semantičke tečnosti autizma', 'so': 'Vector space models for evaluating semantic fluency in autism', 'sv': 'Vektorrymdmodeller för utvärdering av semantisk flytning i autism', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'اوٹیسم میں سیمنٹی فلونٹی کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے ویکتور فضا موڈل', 'mn': 'Өвтризм дахь семантик шингэнийг үнэлэх векторын орон зайн загварууд', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô- đun biểu tượng về không gian cho đánh giá khái niệm ngôn ngữ về tự kỷ', 'bg': 'Векторни пространствени модели за оценка на семантичното гладкост при аутизма', 'hr': 'Vektorski svemirski modeli za procjenu semantičke tekućine autizma', 'nl': 'Vector ruimtemodellen voor het evalueren van semantische vloeibaarheid in autisme', 'da': 'Vektor rummodeller til evaluering af semantisk flydende autisme', 'id': 'Model ruang angkasa vektor untuk mengevaluasi fluency semantis dalam autisme', 'de': 'Vektorraummodelle zur Bewertung der semantischen Fluenz im Autismus', 'ko': '자폐증 환자의 의미 유창성을 평가하는 벡터 공간 모델', 'tr': 'Semantik aklylyklary autizmde deňlenmek üçin vektör seleňsiz modelleri', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modelet e hapësirës vectore për vlerësimin e fluencës semantike në autizëm', 'fa': 'مدل فضای ویکتور برای ارزیابی مایع سیمانتیک در اوتیسم', 'sw': 'Mradi wa anga za vector kwa ajili ya kutathmini ufanisi wa kimapenzi katika autism', 'am': 'የሜክሮር ስፋት ምሳሌዎች በautism ውስጥ የsemantic fluency በማሻሻል', 'hy': 'Vector space models for evaluating semantic fluency in autism', 'az': 'Otizimdə semantik fəaliyyəti değerləşdirmək üçün vektor uzay modelləri', 'bn': 'ভেক্টর স্পেস মডেল অক্টিমের মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক ফ্লাইসি মানানোর জন্য', 'ca': "Models espacials vectorials per avaluar la fluència semàntica en l'autisme", 'bs': 'Vektorski svemirski modeli za procjenu semantičke tečnosti autizma', 'et': 'Vektoriruumi mudelid autismi semantilise sujuvuse hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Vektoriavaruusmallit autismin semanttisen sujuvuuden arvioimiseksi', 'cs': 'Vektorové modely prostoru pro hodnocení sémantické plynulosti v autismu', 'sk': 'Modeli vektorskega prostora za ocenjevanje semantične tekočine avtizma', 'he': 'דוגמני חלל קטורים להערכה נוזלות סמנטית באוטיזם', 'ha': 'Motolin space na shiryarwa wa ya ƙaddara mai fassarar mutane cikin difyici', 'jv': 'Language', 'bo': 'ཁེར་རྐྱང་གི་ལུས་པོའི་བར་སྟོང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་རྟོགས།'}
{'en': 'A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions. Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD). Methods for analyzing semantic fluency responses at the level of detail necessary to uncover these differences have typically relied on subjective manual annotation. In this paper, we explore automated approaches for scoring semantic fluency responses that leverage ontological resources and distributional semantic models to characterize the semantic fluency responses produced by young children with and without ASD. Using these methods, we find significant differences in the semantic fluency responses of children with ASD, demonstrating the utility of using objective methods for clinical language analysis.', 'ar': 'الاختبار الشائع الذي يتم إجراؤه أثناء الفحص العصبي هو اختبار الطلاقة الدلالية ، حيث يجب على المريض سرد أكبر عدد ممكن من الأمثلة لفئة دلالية معينة في ظل ظروف زمنية محددة. يرتبط الأداء الضعيف بالحالات العصبية التي تتميز بضعف في الوظيفة التنفيذية ، مثل الخرف والفصام واضطراب طيف التوحد (ASD). تعتمد طرق تحليل استجابات الطلاقة الدلالية على مستوى التفاصيل اللازمة للكشف عن هذه الاختلافات عادةً على التعليقات التوضيحية اليدوية الذاتية. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف الأساليب الآلية لتسجيل استجابات الطلاقة الدلالية التي تستفيد من الموارد الوجودية والنماذج الدلالية التوزيعية لتوصيف استجابات الطلاقة الدلالية التي ينتجها الأطفال الصغار الذين يعانون من اضطراب طيف التوحد وبدونه. باستخدام هذه الأساليب ، وجدنا فروقًا ذات دلالة إحصائية في استجابات الطلاقة الدلالية للأطفال المصابين بالتوحد ، مما يدل على فائدة استخدام الأساليب الموضوعية لتحليل اللغة السريرية.', 'es': 'Una prueba común que se administra durante el examen neurológico es la prueba de fluidez semántica, en la que el paciente debe enumerar tantos ejemplos de una categoría semántica dada como sea posible en condiciones cronometradas. El rendimiento deficiente se asocia con afecciones neurológicas caracterizadas por alteraciones en la función ejecutiva, como demencia, esquizofrenia y trastorno del espectro autista (TEA). Los métodos para analizar las respuestas de fluidez semántica al nivel de detalle necesario para descubrir estas diferencias se han basado normalmente en la anotación manual subjetiva. En este artículo, exploramos enfoques automatizados para calificar las respuestas de fluidez semántica que aprovechan los recursos ontológicos y los modelos semánticos distributivos para caracterizar las respuestas de fluidez semántica producidas por niños pequeños con y sin TEA. Usando estos métodos, encontramos diferencias significativas en las respuestas de fluidez semántica de los niños con TEA, lo que demuestra la utilidad de usar métodos objetivos para el análisis clínico del lenguaje.', 'fr': "Un test courant administré lors d'un examen neurologique est le test de fluidité sémantique, dans lequel le patient doit énumérer autant d'exemples d'une catégorie sémantique donnée que possible dans des conditions chronométrées. Les mauvais résultats sont associés à des troubles neurologiques caractérisés par des troubles de la fonction exécutive, tels que la démence, la schizophrénie et les troubles du spectre autistique (TSA). Les méthodes d'analyse des réponses de fluidité sémantique au niveau de détail nécessaire pour découvrir ces différences reposent généralement sur une annotation manuelle subjective. Dans cet article, nous explorons des approches automatisées pour évaluer les réponses de fluidité sémantique qui tirent parti des ressources ontologiques et des modèles sémantiques distributionnels pour caractériser les réponses de fluidité sémantique produites par de jeunes enfants atteints ou non de TSA. À l'aide de ces méthodes, nous trouvons des différences significatives dans les réponses de fluidité sémantique des enfants atteints de TSA, démontrant ainsi l'utilité d'utiliser des méthodes objectives pour l'analyse linguistique clinique.", 'pt': 'Um teste comum administrado durante o exame neurológico é o teste de fluência semântica, no qual o paciente deve listar o maior número possível de exemplos de uma determinada categoria semântica sob condições cronometradas. O mau desempenho está associado a condições neurológicas caracterizadas por deficiências na função executiva, como demência, esquizofrenia e transtorno do espectro do autismo (TEA). Os métodos para analisar as respostas de fluência semântica no nível de detalhe necessário para descobrir essas diferenças geralmente se baseiam em anotações manuais subjetivas. Neste artigo, exploramos abordagens automatizadas para pontuar respostas de fluência semântica que alavancam recursos ontológicos e modelos semânticos de distribuição para caracterizar as respostas de fluência semântica produzidas por crianças pequenas com e sem TEA. Usando esses métodos, encontramos diferenças significativas nas respostas de fluência semântica de crianças com TEA, demonstrando a utilidade do uso de métodos objetivos para análise clínica da linguagem.', 'ja': '神経学的検査中に投与される一般的なテストは、セマンティック流暢度テストであり、患者は、タイムリーな条件下で可能な限り多くの所与のセマンティックカテゴリの例を列挙しなければならない。パフォーマンスの悪さは、認知症、統合失調症、及び自閉症スペクトラム障害（ ＡＳＤ ）などの執行機能の障害を特徴とする神経学的状態に関連する。これらの違いを明らかにするために必要な詳細レベルで意味的流暢性応答を分析するための方法は、典型的には主観的な手動注釈に依存していた。本稿では， ASDの有無にかかわらず，幼児が生み出す意味論的流暢性応答を特徴付けるために，オントロジーリソースと分布的意味論モデルを活用した意味論的流暢性応答のスコア付けのための自動化されたアプローチを探求する．これらの手法を用いると、ASDの子供の意味論的流暢性応答に有意差が見られ、臨床言語解析に客観的手法を用いることの有用性が示されている。', 'ru': 'Распространенным тестом, применяемым при неврологическом обследовании, является тест семантической беглости, в котором пациент должен перечислить как можно больше примеров данной семантической категории при заданных условиях. Плохая работоспособность связана с неврологическими состояниями, характеризующимися нарушениями исполнительной функции, такими как деменция, шизофрения и расстройство аутистического спектра (ASD). Методы анализа семантической беглости ответов на уровне детализации, необходимой для выявления этих различий, обычно опираются на субъективную ручную аннотацию. В этой статье мы исследуем автоматизированные подходы к оценке семантических ответов беглости, которые используют онтологические ресурсы и семантические модели распределения для характеристики семантических ответов беглости, производимых маленькими детьми с и без ASD. Используя эти методы, мы обнаруживаем существенные различия в семантической беглости ответов детей с ASD, демонстрируя полезность использования объективных методов для клинического языкового анализа.', 'zh': '神经学之间,常见试语义流畅性,其患者必于时下列出尽可多者给定语义类示例。 不佳与行损为神经系统病,痴呆、精神分裂症、自闭症谱系障碍 (ASD)。 见其详析语义流畅性响应之法,常赖于手动注。 本文之中,探语义流畅性应评分之自动化法,当用本体论资源分布语义以表征有无ASD之幼子语义流畅性应之。 用此者,见ASD患儿之语义流畅性,反应显异,明临床语言析之实用性也。', 'hi': 'न्यूरोलॉजिकल परीक्षा के दौरान प्रशासित एक सामान्य परीक्षण शब्दार्थ प्रवाह परीक्षण है, जिसमें रोगी को समय पर परिस्थितियों में यथासंभव किसी दिए गए शब्दार्थ श्रेणी के कई उदाहरणों को सूचीबद्ध करना चाहिए। खराब प्रदर्शन न्यूरोलॉजिकल स्थितियों से जुड़ा हुआ है जो कार्यकारी कार्य में हानि की विशेषता है, जैसे कि मनोभ्रंश, सिज़ोफ्रेनिया, और आत्मकेंद्रित स्पेक्ट्रम विकार (एएसडी)। इन मतभेदों को उजागर करने के लिए आवश्यक विस्तार के स्तर पर शब्दार्थ प्रवाह प्रतिक्रियाओं का विश्लेषण करने के तरीकों ने आमतौर पर व्यक्तिपरक मैनुअल एनोटेशन पर भरोसा किया है। इस पेपर में, हम शब्दार्थ प्रवाह प्रतिक्रियाओं को स्कोर करने के लिए स्वचालित दृष्टिकोण का पता लगाते हैं जो एएसडी के साथ और बिना छोटे बच्चों द्वारा उत्पादित शब्दार्थ प्रवाह प्रतिक्रियाओं को चिह्नित करने के लिए ontological संसाधनों और वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल का लाभ उठाते हैं। इन तरीकों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम एएसडी वाले बच्चों की शब्दार्थ प्रवाह प्रतिक्रियाओं में महत्वपूर्ण अंतर पाते हैं, नैदानिक भाषा विश्लेषण के लिए उद्देश्य विधियों का उपयोग करने की उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Triail choiteann a riartar le linn scrúdaithe néareolaíoch is ea an tástáil líofachta shéimeantach, ina gcaithfidh an t-othar an oiread samplaí agus is féidir de chatagóir shéimeantach ar leith a liostú faoi choinníollacha ama. Tá baint ag drochfheidhmíocht le coinníollacha néareolaíocha arb iad is sainairíonna iad laigí sa fheidhm feidhmiúcháin, mar néaltrú, scitsifréine, agus neamhord speictrim uathachais (ASD). Go hiondúil bhí modhanna chun anailís a dhéanamh ar fhreagraí líofachta séimeantacha ag an leibhéal sonraí a bhí riachtanach chun na difríochtaí sin a nochtadh ag brath ar nótaí suibiachtúla láimhe. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar chur chuige uathoibrithe chun freagraí líofachta séimeantacha a scóráil a ghiaráil acmhainní onteolaíocha agus samhlacha séimeantacha dáileacháin chun na freagraí líofachta séimeantacha a tháirgeann leanaí óga ar a bhfuil ASD agus nach bhfuil ASD a shainiú. Agus na modhanna seo á n-úsáid againn, aimsímid difríochtaí suntasacha i bhfreagraí líofachta séimeantacha leanaí ar a bhfuil ASD, rud a thaispeánann a fhóntas atá sé modhanna oibiachtúla a úsáid le haghaidh anailís chliniciúil teanga.', 'hu': 'A neurológiai vizsgálat során alkalmazott gyakori teszt a szemantikai folyékonysági teszt, amelyben a betegnek időzített körülmények között minél több példát kell felsorolnia egy adott szemantikai kategóriára. A gyenge teljesítmény olyan neurológiai állapotokkal jár, amelyeket a végrehajtási funkció károsodása jellemez, mint a demencia, skizofrénia és az autizmus spektrum rendellenessége (ASD). A szemantikai folyékonysági válaszok elemzésének módszerei a különbségek feltárásához szükséges részletességi szinten jellemzően szubjektív kézi jegyzetelésre támaszkodtak. Ebben a tanulmányban olyan automatizált megközelítéseket vizsgálunk, amelyek ontológiai erőforrásokat és disztribúciós szemantikai modelleket használnak fel, hogy jellemezzék az ASD-vel és anélkül létrehozott kisgyermekek szemantikai folyékonysági válaszait. Ezen módszerek alkalmazásával jelentős különbségeket találunk ASD-ben szenvedő gyermekek szemantikai folyékonysági válaszaiban, ami bizonyítja, milyen hasznos a klinikai nyelvelemzés objektív módszereinek alkalmazása.', 'el': 'Ένα κοινό τεστ που γίνεται κατά τη διάρκεια της νευρολογικής εξέτασης είναι το τεστ σημασιολογικής ρευστότητας, στο οποίο ο ασθενής πρέπει να απαριθμήσει όσο το δυνατόν περισσότερα παραδείγματα μιας δεδομένης σημασιολογικής κατηγορίας υπό χρονικές συνθήκες. Η κακή απόδοση συνδέεται με νευρολογικές παθήσεις που χαρακτηρίζονται από διαταραχές στην εκτελεστική λειτουργία, όπως άνοια, σχιζοφρένεια και διαταραχή του φάσματος αυτισμού (ΑΣΔ). Οι μέθοδοι ανάλυσης των σημασιολογικών απαντήσεων ρευστότητας στο επίπεδο λεπτομέρειας που είναι απαραίτητες για την αποκάλυψη αυτών των διαφορών βασίζονται συνήθως σε υποκειμενικές χειροκίνητες σχολιασμούς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε αυτοματοποιημένες προσεγγίσεις για την αξιολόγηση σημασιολογικών απαντήσεων ρευστότητας που χρησιμοποιούν οντολογικούς πόρους και σημασιολογικά μοντέλα διανομής για να χαρακτηρίσουν τις σημασιολογικές απαντήσεις που παράγονται από μικρά παιδιά με και χωρίς ΑΣΔ. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτές τις μεθόδους, διαπιστώνουμε σημαντικές διαφορές στις σημασιολογικές απαντήσεις των παιδιών με ΑΣΔ, καταδεικνύοντας τη χρησιμότητα της χρήσης αντικειμενικών μεθόδων για την κλινική γλωσσική ανάλυση.', 'it': "Un test comune somministrato durante l'esame neurologico è il test di fluidità semantica, in cui il paziente deve elencare il maggior numero possibile di esempi di una determinata categoria semantica in condizioni temporali. Le scarse prestazioni sono associate a condizioni neurologiche caratterizzate da alterazioni della funzione esecutiva, come demenza, schizofrenia e disturbo dello spettro autistico (ASD). I metodi per analizzare le risposte di fluidità semantica al livello di dettaglio necessario per scoprire queste differenze si basano tipicamente su annotazioni manuali soggettive. In questo articolo, esploriamo approcci automatizzati per il punteggio di risposte di fluenza semantica che sfruttano risorse ontologiche e modelli semantici distributivi per caratterizzare le risposte di fluenza semantica prodotte da bambini piccoli con e senza ASD. Utilizzando questi metodi, troviamo differenze significative nelle risposte di fluenza semantica dei bambini con ASD, dimostrando l'utilità di utilizzare metodi oggettivi per l'analisi clinica del linguaggio.", 'mk': 'Обичен тест даден за време на невролошките испитувања е семантичкиот тест за течност, во кој пациентот мора да ги листира најмногу примери од одредена семантичка категорија што е можно под временски услови. Лошите резултати се поврзани со невролошките услови кои се карактеризирани со оштетувања во извршната функција, како што се деменција, шизофренија и аутистичкиот спектрум (АСД). Методите за анализирање на семантичните одговори на течност на нивото на детали потребни за откривање на овие разлики обично се потпираат на субјективна рачна анотација. Во овој весник, ги истражуваме автоматизираните пристапи за оценка на семантичните одговори на течност кои ги користат онтологичките ресурси и дистрибутивните семантични модели за да ги карактеризираме семантичните одговори на течност произведени од мали деца со и без АСД. Користејќи ги овие методи, најдовме значителни разлики во семантичките одговори на децата со АСД, што ја покажува корисноста на користењето објективни методи за клиничка анализа на јазикот.', 'kk': 'Неврологиялық тексеру кезінде қолданылатын жалпы сынақтар - семантикалық жылдамдылық сынақтары. Пациенттің уақытты шарттарда келтірілген семантикалық санаттардың мысалдарын тізімдеу керек. Жұмыс істеу неврологиялық шарттар, деменция, шизофрения және аутизм спектрум белгісі (ASD) сипаттамасыз функциясындағы белгілерімен сипаттамасыз болады. Бұл айырмашылықтарды анықтау үшін керек егжей- тегжейлер деңгейіндегі семантикалық жылдамдығының жауаптарын анализиялау әдістері әдетте қолмен жазбаларға әсер етеді. Бұл қағазда, біз семантикалық жылдамдықтың жауаптарын қарау үшін автоматты түрде іздейміз. Бұл онтологиялық ресурстарды және тарату семантикалық моделдерді ASD- мен жастар балалар жасаған семантикалық жылдамдықтың жауаптарын таңдау үші Бұл әдістерді қолдану үшін, біз ASD балаларының семантикалық жылдамдықтығының жауаптарында, клиникалық тілдерді анализ үшін мақсатты әдістерді қолдану утилитасын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Ujian biasa yang diberikan semasa pemeriksaan neurologi adalah ujian kelembapan semantik, di mana pesakit mesti senarai sebanyak mungkin contoh kategori semantik yang diberikan dalam keadaan masa. Performasi yang teruk berkaitan dengan keadaan neurologi yang dikatakan oleh gangguan fungsi eksekutif, seperti demensi, schizofrenia, dan gangguan spektrum autisme (ASD). Kaedah untuk menganalisis balasan kelemahan semantik pada aras perincian yang diperlukan untuk mengesan perbezaan ini biasanya bergantung pada anotasi manual subjektif. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi pendekatan automatik untuk mencetak balasan fluency semantik yang menggunakan sumber ontologi dan model semantik distribusi untuk mengukur balasan fluency semantik yang dihasilkan oleh kanak-kanak muda dengan dan tanpa ASD. Dengan menggunakan kaedah-kaedah ini, kami mendapati perbezaan yang signifikan dalam tindak balas semantik fluency kanak-kanak dengan ASD, menunjukkan utiliti menggunakan kaedah objektif untuk analisis bahasa klinik.', 'mt': 'A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions.  Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  Il-metodi għall-analiżi tar-risponsi semantiċi ta’ fluwenza fil-livell ta’ dettall meħtieġ biex jiġu skoperti dawn id-differenzi tipikament ibbażaw fuq annotazzjoni manwali soġġettiva. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nesploraw approċċi awtomatizzati għall-punteġġ ta’ risponsi semantiċi ta’ fluwenza li jiġġeneraw riżorsi ontoloġiċi u mudelli semantiċi distributtivi biex jikkaratterizzaw ir-risponsi semantiċi ta’ fluwenza prodotti minn tfal żgħar b’ASD jew mingħajru. Using these methods, we find significant differences in the semantic fluency responses of children with ASD, demonstrating the utility of using objective methods for clinical language analysis.', 'ml': 'A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions.  Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  ഈ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്ലൈന്\u200dസി ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്ലൈന്\u200dസിയുടെ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് ആസ്ഡി ഇല്ലാതെ കുട്ടികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്ലൈന്\u200dസിയുടെ ഉത്തരങ്ങള ഈ രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കുട്ടികളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്ലൈന്\u200dസിയുടെ ഉത്തരങ്ങളില്\u200d നമുക്ക് വലിയ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താം, ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷ അന്', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл судалгааны үед хэрэглэгддэг нийтлэг шалгалт гэдэг бол өвчтөн цаг хугацааны нөхцөлд өгсөн хэмжээний жишээний олон жишээг хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй. Харамсалтай үйл ажиллагаа нь ажиллах функцийн эмгэгийг харуулж буй мэдрэлийн нөхцөлтэй холбогдож байна. Жишээ нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, шизофрени, аутизм спектр эмгэг (АСД). Эдгээр ялгааг олох шаардлагатай хэмжээнд семантик шингэний хариултыг шинжилгээ хийх арга нь ихэвчлэн сурвалжлагатай гар даалгавраас хамаарна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүүхдүүдийн амьдралын шингэний хариултыг олох автоматжуулсан арга замыг судалж байна. АСД-гүй хүүхдүүдийн үр дүнг харуулахын тулд онологичдын нөөц болон тархалтын semantic загварыг ашигладаг. Эдгээр аргыг ашиглан бид АСД-тэй хүүхдүүдийн semantic fluency хариултын чухал ялгааг олж, клиникийн хэл шинжилгээний зорилготой аргыг ашиглах хэрэгтэй болгож байна.', 'no': 'Ein vanleg test som vert administrert under neurologisk eksamen er det semantiske fluktetesten, der pasienten må visast så mange eksemplar av ein gitt semantisk kategori som mulig under tidsaverktåande vilkår. Feil utvikling er forbunda med neurologiske vilkåra karakterisert av forstyrrelsar i køyringsfunksjon, slik som dementia, schizophrenia og autismspektrumforstyrrelsar (ASD). Metodar for å analysera semantiske fluensresponser på detaljnivået nødvendig for å opna desse forskjellingane har vanlegvis relieve på subjektiv manuell notasjon. I denne papiret utforskar vi automatiske tilnærmingar for å skapa semantiske fluensresponser som leverer ontologiske ressursar og distribusjonssemantiske modeller for å karakterisera semantiske fluensresponser som produserer av unge barn med og utan ASD. Bruk desse metodane finn vi signifikante forskjeller i semantiske fluensresponser av barna med ASD, som viser verktøyet for å bruka objektive metodar for kliniske språk-analyser.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლოგიური განსხვავებაში იყენებული საერთო ტესტი არის სიმენტიური ფუნტიური ტესტი, რომელიც პერიციენტი უნდა შესაძლებელია განსხვავებული სმენტიური კატეგორიის მაგალითების შესაძლებელად ნეიროლოგიური შესახებ, რომელიც ემპენტია, ქიზოფრენია და ავტორიზმის სპექტრემის განსხვავება (ASD) დაკავშირებულია. სემონტიკური ფუნქციის განსხვავებების ანალიზაციის მეტოვები, რომელიც განსაზღვრებელია ამ განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, სემონტიკური ხელსაწყოთან ანალიზაციას. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ავტომატიური გახსნა სემონტიკური გახსნა, რომელიც კონტულოგიური რესურსები და განსაზღვრებული სემონტიკური მოდელები გავაკეთებთ სემონტიკური გახსნა გახსნა, რომელიც ახალგაზრდა ბავშვების გახ ამ მეტოვების გამოყენებაში, ჩვენ ძალიან განსხვავებულია სენმანტიკური ფუნქციის განსხვავებაში, რომლებიც ASD-ს ბავშვების განსხვავებაში, რომლებიც გამოყენება კლინიკური ენის ანალ', 'lt': 'A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions.  Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  Siekiant nustatyti šiuos skirtumus, semantinio skysčio atsako analizės metodai paprastai grindžiami subjektyviomis rankinėmis anotacijomis. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame automatizuotus metodus, kaip įvertinti semantinio skyrumo atsakus, kurie sutelkia ontologinius išteklius ir paskirstymo semantinius modelius, kad apibūdintų semantinio skyrumo atsakus, kuriuos gamina maži vaikai su ASD ir be jo. Taikant šiuos metodus nustatome reikšmingus skirtumus, susijusius su ASD sergančių vaikų semantiniu skystumu, ir tai rodo, kad naudinga naudoti objektyvius metodus klinikinei kalbų analizei.', 'sr': 'Često ispitivanje koje se primjenjuje tijekom neurološkog ispitivanja je semantički test tečnosti, u kojem pacijent mora popisati najviše primjera određene semantičke kategorije, što je moguće pod vremenskim uvjetima. Jadna funkcija povezana je sa neurološkim uvjetima koje karakteriziraju oštećenja funkcije, poput demencije, šizofrenija i poremećaja spektra autizma (ASD). Metode za analizu reakcija semantičke tekućine na nivou detalja potrebnih za otkrivanje tih razlika obično se oslanjaju na subjektivnu manualnu annotaciju. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatske pristupe za otkrivanje reakcija semantičke tekućine koje utiču na ontološke resurse i distribucijske semantičke modele kako bi karakterizirale odgovore semantičke tekućine koje proizvode mlada djeca sa i bez ASD-a. Koristeći te metode, nalazimo značajne razlike u odgovorima na semantičku tekućinu djece sa ASD-om, pokazujući korisnost koristi objektivnih metoda za analizu kliničkog jezika.', 'ro': 'Un test comun administrat în timpul examinării neurologice este testul de fluență semantică, în care pacientul trebuie să enumeră cât mai multe exemple de categorie semantică dată posibil în condiții de timp. Performanța slabă este asociată cu afecțiuni neurologice caracterizate prin deficiențe ale funcției executive, cum ar fi demența, schizofrenia și tulburarea spectrului autist (ASD). Metodele de analiză a răspunsurilor de fluență semantică la nivelul de detaliu necesar pentru a descoperi aceste diferențe s-au bazat de obicei pe adnotare manuală subiectivă. În această lucrare, explorăm abordări automatizate pentru scorarea răspunsurilor de fluență semantică care valorifică resursele ontologice și modelele semantice distribuționale pentru a caracteriza răspunsurile de fluență semantică produse de copiii mici cu și fără ASD. Folosind aceste metode, găsim diferențe semnificative în răspunsurile fluenței semantice ale copiilor cu ASD, demonstrând utilitatea utilizării metodelor obiective pentru analiza clinică a limbajului.', 'so': "A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions.  Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  Midabka ku sawiraya jawaabaha caqliga ah ee loo baahan yahay si aad u muuqato kala duwanaanshahan sida caadiga ah waxay ku xiran yihiin dhibaatooyin ku saabsan gacanta. Qoraalkan, waxaynu ka baaraynaa qaababka iskuulka ah oo ay kooban karto jawaabaha kaleemeyska, taas oo ay ku fidiyaan hantida ontologican iyo qaababka qaybinta semantika si ay u sawiraan jawaabaha kaleemeyska ee carruurta dhallinyarada leh oo aan ASD lahayn. Isku isticmaalka qaababkan waxaan ka helaynaa kala duwan faro badan oo ku saabsan jawaabaha afka caafimaadka ee cunugga leh ee ASD, waxaana tusinayaa isticmaalka qaababka waxyaabaha la'aanta ah oo lagu sameynayo baaritaanka afka klinikada.", 'sv': 'Ett vanligt test som administreras vid neurologisk undersökning är det semantiska fluenstestet, där patienten måste lista så många exempel på en given semantisk kategori som möjligt under tidsbestämda förhållanden. Dålig prestation förknippas med neurologiska tillstånd som kännetecknas av nedsatt verkställande funktion, såsom demens, schizofreni och autismspektrumstörning (ASD). Metoder för att analysera semantiska flytande svar på den detaljnivå som krävs för att upptäcka dessa skillnader har vanligtvis förlitat sig på subjektiv manuell notering. I den här uppsatsen undersöker vi automatiserade metoder för att poängtera semantiska fluenssvar som utnyttjar ontologiska resurser och distributionsmässiga semantiska modeller för att karakterisera semantiska fluenssvar producerade av små barn med och utan ASD. Med hjälp av dessa metoder finner vi signifikanta skillnader i semantiska flytande svar hos barn med ASD, vilket visar nyttan av att använda objektiva metoder för klinisk språkanalys.', 'ur': 'نیرولوژیکی امتحان کے موقع ادارہ کیا گیا ایک عام امتحان ہے سیمنٹی فلونس امتحان ہے جہاں بیمار کو ایک سیمنٹی کاٹی کی بہت سی مثالیں لیست کرنا چاہیے جیسے ممکن ہے تایمٹی شرایط میں. کمزور عملکرد نیرولوژیکی شرایط کے ساتھ تعلق ہے جو عملکرد فعالیت کے مطابق مشکلات کے ذریعہ مشکل کر رہے ہیں، جیسے ڈمنٹی، سیزوفرنیا، اور اوٹیسم اسپترم بیماری (ASD) کے مطابق۔ ان اختلاف کو آشکار کرنے کے لئے ضرورت کی تفصیل کے سطح پر سیمنٹی فلونس کی جواب کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے طریقے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے سیمنٹی فلونس کی جواب کے ذریعے آزمائش کی طریقے کی تحقیق کی کہ اس کے ذریعے ان منطقی منابع اور تقسیم سیمنٹی موڈلیاں اضافہ کرتی ہیں جن کے ساتھ اور بغیر ASD کے جوان بچوں کے پیدا ہوئے سیمنٹی فلونس کی جواب دیتے ہیں۔ یہ طریقے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم نے ASD کے بچوں کی سیمنٹی فلونس کی جواب میں اہم تفاوت پائی ہے، کلینیکی زبان تحلیل کے لئے موجود طریقے کا استعمال کرنے کا استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'pl': 'Częstym badaniem podczas badania neurologicznego jest test płynności semantycznej, w którym pacjent musi wymienić jak najwięcej przykładów danej kategorii semantycznej w warunkach czasowych. Słaba sprawność jest związana z schorzeniami neurologicznymi charakteryzującymi się zaburzeniami funkcji wykonawczych, takimi jak otępienie, schizofrenia i zaburzenia widma autyzmu (ASD). Metody analizy płynności semantycznej na poziomie szczegółowości niezbędnym do odkrycia tych różnic zazwyczaj opierały się na subiektywnej adnotacji manualnej. W niniejszym artykule badamy zautomatyzowane podejścia do oceny odpowiedzi semantycznej płynności, które wykorzystują zasoby ontologiczne i dystrybucyjne modele semantyczne do charakteryzowania odpowiedzi semantycznej płynności produkowanych przez małe dzieci z i bez ASD. Wykorzystując te metody, odkrywamy istotne różnice w odpowiedziach płynności semantycznej dzieci z ASD, co pokazuje użyteczność stosowania obiektywnych metod do klinicznej analizy językowej.', 'ta': 'நரம்புயல் சோதனைக்கு போது நிர்வகிக்கப்பட்ட பொது சோதனையாகும் அது பாதிப்பு விளைவு சோதனையாகும், அதில் நோயாளி கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பெமான்டி ஏழை செயல்பாடு நிரல்யல் நிலைமைகளுடன் தொடர்புடையது, நிர்வாக செயல்பாட்டில் குறைப்பிடப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டில் குறைப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, போன் Methods for analyzing semantic fluency responses at the level of detail necessary to uncover these differences have typically relied on subjective manual annotation.  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், குழந்தைகள் கொண்டு மற்றும் ASD இல்லாமல் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பெம்மான்டிக் விளைவு விளைவுகளை வரையறுக்கும் பொருட்களை குறிப்பிடும் பொரு இந்த முறைகளைப் பயன்படுத்தி, ASD கொண்ட குழந்தைகளின் பாதிப்பு விளைவுகளின் விளைவுகளில் முக்கியமான வேறுபாடுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், சி', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණයක් නිර්මාණික පරීක්ෂණය වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු පරීක්ෂණයක් තමයි සිමාන්තික පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය, ඒ වග නරක ප්\u200dරාර්ථාවය සමග න්\u200dයුරෝලිකාත්මක ස්ථානය සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරාර්ථික ව්\u200dයාපෘතියෙන් ප්\u200dරාර්ථාවක් සඳහා අව සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේෂණය කරන විදිහාවක් විස්තර කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය විස්තර විස්තර ප්\u200dරතිච In this newspapers, we Explore automed approach for scoring semantic flutivity reprisals that level terage ontology ressources and partibution semantic Models to characharacharacharacharacharacharacharact the semantic flutivity reprisals that grew by Young Kids with and Without ASD. මේ විධානය පාවිච්චි කරන්න, අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්ගේ සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්න', 'uz': "Name Poqiqat bajarish boshqaruv funksiyasida demens, schizofreniya va autism spektrum tartibi (ASD) kabi ishlab chiqaruvchilarga qo'llangan neyrologik holatlari bilan bog'liq. Ushbu varianlarni aniqlash kerak boʻlgan darajada semantik suv javoblarini analyzerish usullari oddiy qoʻlbola taʼminlovchiga ishlatadi. Bu qogʻozda biz yosh bolalar bilan ASD bilan yaratilgan semantik suv javoblarni qidirish uchun avtomatik qo'llanmalarni o'rganamiz. Bu usuldan foydalanish, biz ASD yordamida bolalarning semantik fluktsiya javoblarida juda qiyin tofautini topamiz, klinikal tilni analyzer uchun foydalanish usullarini koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một xét nghiệm phổ biến được xét nghiệm trong suốt các kiểm tra thần kinh là một thử nghiệm đặc biệt, trong đó bệnh nhân phải liệt kê càng nhiều ví dụ về một loại ngữ pháp rõ ràng nhất có thể trong thời gian. Năng suất kém gắn với các điều kiện thần kinh bị hạn chế trong chức năng điều hành, như chứng mất trí, tâm thần phân liệt, và rối loạn thần kinh (ASD). Những phương pháp phân tích phản ứng chuyển động theo ngữ pháp theo mức độ chi tiết cần để tìm ra những khác biệt này thường dựa vào sử dụng sử dụng sách hướng dẫn chủ động. In this paper, we explore Automateted approaches for scorching semantics flunky Management that đời điều khiển các nguồn tài nguyên và phân phát theo ngữ pháp phân chia theo mô phỏng the semantics Sử dụng các phương pháp này, chúng ta tìm thấy sự khác biệt quan trọng trong các phản ứng chuyển động theo ngữ pháp của trẻ em với ASD, nhằm mục đích dùng phương pháp tiêu chuẩn cho phân tích ngôn ngữ lâm sàng.', 'bg': 'Често използван тест по време на неврологичен преглед е семантичен тест за плавност, в който пациентът трябва да изброи възможно най-много примери за дадена семантична категория при определени условия. Лошото представяне е свързано с неврологични състояния, характеризиращи се с увреждания на изпълнителната функция, като деменция, шизофрения и разстройство на аутистичния спектър (АУТ). Методите за анализ на семантични отговори на ниво детайлност, необходимо за разкриване на тези разлики, обикновено разчитат на субективна ръчна анотация. В настоящата статия изследваме автоматизирани подходи за оценяване на семантични плавности, които използват онтологични ресурси и дистрибуционни семантични модели за характеризиране на семантичните плавности, получени от малки деца с и без АСБ. Използвайки тези методи, откриваме значителни разлики в семантичната плавност на отговорите на децата с АСБ, демонстрирайки ползата от използването на обективни методи за клиничен езиков анализ.', 'hr': 'Često ispitivanje koje se primjenjuje tijekom neurološkog ispitivanja je test za semantičku tekućinu u kojem bolesnik mora popisati najviše primjera određene semantičke kategorije u vremenskim uvjetima. Jadna učinka povezana je s neurološkim uvjetima koje su karakterizirale oštećenja djelovanja, poput demencije, šizofrenija i poremećaja spektra autizma (ASD). Metode za analiziranje reakcija semantičke tekućine na razini detalja potrebnih za otkrivanje tih razlika obično se oslanjaju na subjektivnu manualnu annotaciju. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatske pristupe za otkrivanje odgovora na semantičku tekućinu koji utječu na ontološke resurse i distribucijske semantičke modele kako bi karakterizirali odgovore na semantičku tekućinu proizvedene od mlade djece s i bez ASD-a. Koristeći te metode, nalazimo značajne razlike u odgovorima na semantičku tekućinu djece s ASD-om, pokazujući korisnost upotrebe objektivnih metoda za analizu kliničkog jezika.', 'nl': 'Een veelvoorkomende test die wordt uitgevoerd tijdens neurologisch onderzoek is de semantische vloeibaarheidstest, waarbij de patiënt zoveel mogelijk voorbeelden van een bepaalde semantische categorie moet vermelden onder getimede omstandigheden. Slechte prestaties worden geassocieerd met neurologische aandoeningen die worden gekenmerkt door beperkingen in uitvoerende functies, zoals dementie, schizofrenie en autismespectrumstoornis (ASD). Methoden voor het analyseren van semantische vloeiende reacties op het detailniveau dat nodig is om deze verschillen te ontdekken, zijn meestal gebaseerd op subjectieve handmatige annotatie. In dit artikel onderzoeken we geautomatiseerde benaderingen voor het scoren van semantische fluency responses die ontologische bronnen en distributionele semantische modellen gebruiken om de semantische fluency responses te karakteriseren die worden geproduceerd door jonge kinderen met en zonder ASD. Met behulp van deze methoden vinden we significante verschillen in de semantische vloeiende reacties van kinderen met ASD, wat het nut aantoont van het gebruik van objectieve methoden voor klinische taalanalyse.', 'da': 'En almindelig test, der administreres under neurologisk undersøgelse, er den semantiske flydenhedstest, hvor patienten skal angive så mange eksempler på en given semantisk kategori som muligt under tidsbestemte forhold. Dårlig præstation er forbundet med neurologiske tilstande karakteriseret ved nedsat udøvende funktion, såsom demens, skizofreni og autismespektrum lidelse (ASD). Metoder til analyse af semantisk flydende respons på det detaljeringsniveau, der er nødvendigt for at afdække disse forskelle, har typisk baseret sig på subjektiv manuel annotation. I denne artikel undersøger vi automatiserede tilgange til scoring af semantiske flydende svar, der udnytter ontologiske ressourcer og distributionsmæssige semantiske modeller til at karakterisere de semantiske flydende svar produceret af små børn med og uden ASD. Ved hjælp af disse metoder finder vi betydelige forskelle i semantisk flydende respons hos børn med ASD, hvilket viser nytten af at bruge objektive metoder til klinisk sproganalyse.', 'de': 'Ein häufiger Test, der während der neurologischen Untersuchung durchgeführt wird, ist der semantische Fluenztest, bei dem der Patient möglichst viele Beispiele einer bestimmten semantischen Kategorie unter Zeitbedingungen auflisten muss. Schlechte Leistung ist mit neurologischen Erkrankungen verbunden, die durch Beeinträchtigungen der exekutiven Funktion gekennzeichnet sind, wie Demenz, Schizophrenie und Autismus Spektrum Disorder (ASD). Methoden zur Analyse semantischer Fluenzantworten auf der Detaillierungsebene, die notwendig ist, um diese Unterschiede aufzudecken, beruhen typischerweise auf subjektiver manueller Annotation. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir automatisierte Ansätze für die Bewertung semantischer Fluenzantworten, die ontologische Ressourcen und distributionale semantische Modelle nutzen, um die semantischen Fluenzantworten von Kleinkindern mit und ohne ASD zu charakterisieren. Mit diesen Methoden finden wir signifikante Unterschiede in den semantischen Fluenzantworten von Kindern mit ASD, was den Nutzen der Verwendung objektiver Methoden für die klinische Sprachanalyse demonstriert.', 'id': 'Sebuah tes umum yang diberikan selama pemeriksaan neurologi adalah tes fluency semantis, di mana pasien harus daftar sebanyak mungkin contoh dari kategori semantis yang diberikan dalam kondisi waktu. Performasi buruk terkait dengan kondisi neurologi yang dikaraterisasikan oleh cacat dalam fungsi eksekutif, seperti demensi, skizofrenia, dan gangguan spektrum autisme (ASD). Metode untuk menganalisis respon fluency semantis pada tingkat detail yang diperlukan untuk menemukan perbedaan ini biasanya bergantung pada anotasi subjektif manual. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi pendekatan otomatis untuk mencetak tanggapan fluency semantis yang mengakibatkan sumber daya ontologi dan model distribusi semantis untuk mengkaraterisasi tanggapan fluency semantis yang diproduksi oleh anak-anak muda dengan dan tanpa ASD. Using these methods, we find significant differences in the semantic fluency responses of children with ASD, demonstrating the utility of using objective methods for clinical language analysis.', 'ko': '신경계 검사 기간에 실시하는 흔히 볼 수 있는 테스트는 의미 유창성 테스트이다. 이 테스트에서 환자는 반드시 규정된 시간 조건에서 주어진 의미 유형에 대한 예시를 최대한 많이 열거해야 한다.부진은 치매, 정신분열증, 자폐계보장애(ASD) 등 수행기능 손상을 특징으로 하는 신경계 질환과 관련이 있다.이러한 차이를 밝히는 데 필요한 세부적인 차원에서 의미의 유창성 반응을 분석하는 방법은 일반적으로 주관적인 수동 주석에 의존한다.본고에서 우리는 의미의 유창성 반응을 자동으로 평가하는 방법을 모색했다. 이런 방법은 본체론 자원과 분포 의미 모델을 이용하여 자폐증을 앓고 있지 않은 유아가 발생하는 의미의 유창성 반응을 묘사했다.이런 방법을 사용하면 우리는 자폐증 어린이의 의미 유창성 반응에 현저한 차이가 존재하는 것을 발견하고 객관적인 방법을 사용하여 임상 언어 분석을 하는 실용성을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'Närolojik synaglamada işlenýän orta synagy semantik akyllyk synagy bolýar. Bu durumda pacientiň wagtyň şertleri altında berilen semantik kategoriýasynyň köp eserlerini maslahat etmeli. Najyp zadat närologik şertlerle döredilýän işlemçilik funksiýasynda, dementia, schizofreniýa we awtism spektrumyň boşluklary (ASD) tarapyndan karakterlerlenýär. Semantik akyllyk jogaplaryny görkezmek üçin düýbünde gerekli detaylar çözümlerini çözümlemek üçin yöntemler, adatça bu çarpyşyklary görkezmek üçin subjekt el duýgulamasına güýçlendir. Bu kagyzda, semantik aklançylyk jogaplary almak üçin awtomatik taýýarlaryny keşfedýäris. Bu sisteme ontolojik çeşmeleri we daýlamak semantik modelleri ýaş çagalar tarapyndan gelen semantik aklançylyk jogaplaryny ASD bilen we beýleki şeklinde täsirleýär. Bu yönlerden ullanýarys, ASD bilen çagalaryň semantik aklylyklaryň jogaplarynyň üýtgeşmelerini tapdyk, kliniki diller analýusiýasy üçin objektif yönlerden ullanýandygyny görkez.', 'fa': 'آزمایش معمولی که در زمان تحقیقات عصبی اداره می\u200cشود، آزمایش مایع سیمانتی است که در آن بیمار باید به اندازه\u200cای از مثالهای یک مجموعه سیمانتی که در شرایط زمان می\u200cباشد بررسی کند. عملکرد بدبخت با شرایط عصبی که توسط تأثیرات عملکرد مشخص شده است، مربوط به شرایط عصبی است، مانند دیمانسی، شیزوفرنیا و بیماری спектر آتیسم (ASD). روش\u200cهایی برای تحلیل پاسخ\u200cهای آلودگی سیمانتیک در سطح جزئیات نیاز برای کشف این تفاوتها معمولاً بر اخطار دستی\u200cهای مسئولیت اعتماد دارند. در این کاغذ، ما روش\u200cهای اتوماتیک برای تحقیق پاسخ\u200cهای مایع سیمانتیک را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که منابع\u200cهای کنترولوژیک و مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک تقسیم می\u200cکنند تا پاسخ\u200cهای مایع سیمانتیک که توسط کودکان جوان با و بدون ASD تولید می\u200cکنند و تولید می\u200cکنند. با استفاده از این روش، ما تفاوت های معنی در پاسخ های مایع سیمانتیک کودکان با ASD پیدا می کنیم، نشان می دهیم که استفاده از روش های هدف برای تحلیل زبان کلینیکی برای استفاده از روش های کلینیکی است.', 'af': "'n Gewone toets wat gebruik word tydens neirologiese ondersoek is die semantiese vloeienheid toets, waarin die pasiënt moet lys soos baie voorbeelde van 'n gegewe semantiese kategorie as moontlik onder tydtied voorwaardes. Poor prestasie is geassosieer met neirologiese voorwaardes wat karakteriseer deur verminderings in uitvoerde funksie, soos dementia, schizophrenia en autisme spektrum disorder (ASD). Metodes vir die analiseer van semantiese fluiditeitsreaksies op die vlak van gedetale wat nodig is om hierdie verskille te ontdek het tipies op subjektiewe manuele annotasie gelê. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons outomatiese toegange vir die skering van semantiese fluitingsreaksies wat ontologiese hulpbronne en verspreidingse semantiese modele verkry om die semantiese fluitingsreaksies wat deur jong kinders met en sonder ASD produseer is om te karakteriseer. Deur hierdie metodes te gebruik, vind ons betekeurige verskille in die semantiese fluidigheidsverswerking van kinders met ASD, wat die nuttigheid van die gebruik van objektiewe metodes vir kliniske taal analisie vertoon.", 'sw': 'Jaribio la kawaida linaloendeshwa wakati wa uchunguzi wa neurological ni jaribio la uwezekano wa ufanisi wa kimapenzi, ambapo mgonjwa huyo lazima ataorodhesha mifano mingi ya makundi yanayotolewa kwa kipindi kinachowezekana chini ya mazingira ya muda. Utendaji masikini unahusiana na mazingira ya neurologia yanayohusishwa na waharibifu katika kazi za utekelezaji, kama vile dementia, schizofrenia, na ugonjwa wa autism (ASD). Njia za kuchambua miitikio ya uwezekano wa kimapenzi katika kiwango cha kina kinachohitajika kugundua tofauti hizi kwa kawaida zimetegemea matatizo ya manufaa. Katika gazeti hili, tunatafuta mbinu za kujitegemea kwa kuchora miitikio ya umeme wa kimapenzi ambazo zinatumia rasilimali za kisolojia na mitindo ya mitindo ya usambazaji ili kuweka sifa za miitikio ya kimapenzi zilizotengenezwa na watoto wadogo na bila ASD. Kwa kutumia njia hizi, tunagundua tofauti kubwa katika miitikio ya umeme wa sekunde ya watoto wenye ASD, wakionyesha matumizi ya kutumia njia za malengo kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa lugha za Kikliniki.', 'sq': 'Një test i përbashkët i administruar gjatë ekzaminimit neurologjik është testi i fluencës semantike, në të cilin pacienti duhet të listojë sa më shumë shembuj të një kategori semantike të caktuar sa më shumë të jetë e mundur në kushte të caktuara. Ekzekutimi i keq është i lidhur me kushtet neurologjike të karakterizuara nga dëmtimet në funksionin ekzekutiv, të tilla si demenca, skizofrenia dhe sëmundja e spektrit të autizmit (ASD). Metodat për analizimin e përgjigjeve të fluencës semantike në nivelin e detajit të nevojshëm për të zbuluar këto dallime janë mbështetur tipikisht në anotacionin subjektiv manual. Në këtë letër, ne eksplorojmë metodat e automatizuara për të shënuar përgjigjet e fluencës semantike që nxisin burimet ontologjike dhe modelet e shpërndarës semantike për të karakterizuar përgjigjet e fluencës semantike prodhuara nga fëmijët e vegjël me dhe pa ASD. Duke përdorur këto metoda, gjejmë dallime të rëndësishme në përgjigjet semantike të fluencës së fëmijëve me ASD, duke demonstruar utilitetin e përdorimit të metodave objektive për analizën klinike të gjuhës.', 'az': 'Nörolojik təminatı sınamasında işlədilən ortaq sınama semantik sınaqdır. Bu sınaqda hastanın müəyyən vaxtlı şərtlərdə mümkün olduğu qədər semantik kategoriyanın çox nümunələrini yazılması lazımdır. Zavallı performansı, demenci, şizofreni və autizm spektrumu xəstəliyi (ASD) kimi müxtəlif fəaliyyətlərdən təsirlənən nörolojik şəkillərlə bağlı. Bu dəyişiklikləri açıq etmək üçün ehtiyacı olan detayların seviyyətində semantik təsirlik cavablarını analiz etmək üçün metodlar genellikle subjektiv əlli təsirlərə təvəkkül edir. Bu kağıtda, semantik flux cavablarını gözləmək üçün avtomatik tərzlərini keşif edirik ki, ontolojik kaynaqları və dağıtıcı semantik modellərin ASD ilə və uşaqların təşkil etdikləri semantik flux cavablarını təmizləmək üçün təşkil edir. Bu metodların istifadəsində, ASD ilə olan çocukların semantik fərqli cavablarında möhkəm fərqli görürük, klinik dil analizi üçün objektif metodların istifadəsini göstərir.', 'hy': 'Նեյրոլոգիական ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում ընդհանուր թեստը սեմանտիկ հեղության թեստն է, որտեղ հիվանդը պետք է ցուցադրի որքան հնարավոր է նշված սեմանտիկ կատեգորիայի օրինակներ ժամանակավոր պայմաններում: Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  Սեմանտիկ հեղության արձագանքների վերլուծության մեթոդները մանրամասնության մակարդակում, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են այս տարբերությունների բացահայտելու համար, սովորաբար հիմնված են սուբյեկտիվ ձեռքի նոտացիաների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ավտոմատիկ մոտեցումներ, որոնք օգտագործում են սեմանտիկ հեղության արձագանքները, որոնք օգտագործում են օնտոլոգիական ռեսուրսներ և տարածական սեմանտիկ մոդելներ, որպեսզի բնորոշվեն սեմանտիկ հեղության արձագանքները, որոնք ար Օգտագործելով այս մեթոդները, մենք գտնում ենք նշանակալի տարբերություններ ASD-ով ունեցող երեխաների սեմանտիկ հեղության արձագանքի մեջ, ցույց տալով օբյեկտիվ մեթոդների օգտագործման օգտակարությունը կլինիկական լեզվի վերլուծության համար', 'bn': 'নিউরোলজিক পরীক্ষার সময় প্রশাসন করা একটি সাধারণ পরীক্ষা হচ্ছে সেম্পেন্টিক ফ্লাইসি পরীক্ষা, যেখানে রোগীরা নির্দিষ্ট সময়ের পরিস্থিতিতে প্ দারিদ্র প্রভাবের সাথে নিউরোলজিক অবস্থার সাথে যুক্ত, যেমন ডিমেন্টি, স্কিজিওফ্রেনিয়া, এবং অটিজমের স্পেক্ট্র্যাম বিপর্যয় (আস্ডি)। এই পার্থক্য আবিষ্কার করার প্রয়োজনীয় পর্যায়ে সেম্যান্টিক ফ্লাইসির প্রতিক্রিয়া বিশ্লেষণের উপায় সাধারণত বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস্ এই পত্রিকায় আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রতিক্রিয়া সংক্রান্ত করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় উপায় খুঁজে বের করি যেখানে বাচ্চাদের দ্বারা সেম্যান্টিক ফ্লাইসি প্রতি এই পদ্ধতিগুলো ব্যবহার করে আমরা এসডি দিয়ে শিশুদের সেম্পেন্টিক ফ্লাইসি প্রতিক্রিয়ায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিন্ন পার্থক্য পাই, যা ক্লিনিক ভ', 'am': 'በኔሮሎጂ ፈተና ውስጥ በሚገኘው የተጠቃሚ ፈተና የsemantic የውጤት ፈተና ነው፣ በዚህም ውስጥ ደካማው በጊዜው ክፍል በሚቻለው የsemantic category ምሳሌ ያሳያል፡፡ Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).  እነዚህን መለያየት ለማግኘት በሚያስፈልገው ደረጃ ላይ የsemantic fluency መልዕክቶችን ለማስተምር የደረጃዎች መጠቀሚያ በመስመር ላይ በተቃውሞ በሥልጣኑ እጃቸውን ማሳየት ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሕፃናትን እና ያለ ASD የደረገውን የsemantic የውጤት መልዕክቶችን ለመቀላቀል እና የኢንተሎጂ ሀብትን እና የተለየ የsemantic ዓይነቶች ለመቀነስ የራሳዊ ደረጃዎችን እና ምናልባት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህን ዘዴዎች በመጠቀም፣ በASD ያሉት ልጆችን የፀሐይ ውጤት መለያቶች ላይ ብዙ ልዩነት እናገኛለን፡፡', 'ca': "Una prova comú administrada durant l'examen neurològic és la prova de fluència semàntica, en la qual el pacient ha de llistar tants exemples d'una determinada categoria semàntica com és possible en condicions temporals. La mala performance està associada a condicions neurològiques caracteritzades per deficiències en la funció executiva, com la demència, la esquizofrenia i el trastorn de l'espectre d'autisme (ASD). Els mètodes per analitzar les respostes de fluència semàntica al nivell de detall necessari per descobrir aquestes diferències s'han basat típicament en una anotació manual subjectiva. En aquest paper, explorem abords automatitzats per puntuar respostes de fluència semàntica que aprofiten recursos ontològics i models de distribució semàntics per caracteritzar les respostes de fluència semàntica produïdes per nens petits amb i sense ASD. Utilitzant aquests mètodes, trobem diferències significatives en les respostes de fluència semàntica dels nens amb ASD, demostrant l'utilitat d'utilitzar mètodes objectius per a l'anàlisi clínica del llenguatge.", 'cs': 'Běžným testem prováděným při neurologickém vyšetření je test sémantické plynulosti, ve kterém musí pacient uvést co nejvíce příkladů dané sémantické kategorie za časovaných podmínek. Špatný výkon je spojen s neurologickými stavy charakterizovanými poruchami výkonné funkce, jako je demence, schizofrenie a porucha autistického spektra (ASD). Metody analýzy sémantické plynulosti odpovědí na úrovni detailů potřebné k odhalení těchto rozdílů se obvykle opírají o subjektivní manuální anotaci. V tomto článku zkoumáme automatizované přístupy pro skórování sémantické plynulosti odpovědí, které využívají ontologické zdroje a distribuční sémantické modely k charakterizaci sémantické plynulosti reakcí malých dětí s a bez ASD. Pomocí těchto metod nalezneme významné rozdíly ve sémantické plynulosti reakcí dětí s ASD, což ukazuje užitečnost použití objektivních metod pro klinickou jazykovou analýzu.', 'bs': 'Često ispitivanje koje se primjenjuje tijekom neurološkog ispitivanja je test za semantičku tekućinu u kojem pacijent mora popisati najviše primjera određene semantičke kategorije u vremenskim uvjetima. Jadna djelovanja povezana je sa neurološkim uvjetima koje karakteriziraju oštećenja djelovanja, poput demencije, šizofrenija i poremećaja spektra autizma (ASD). Metode za analizu reakcija semantičke tekućine na nivou detalja potrebnih za otkrivanje tih razlika obično se oslanjaju na subjektivnu manualnu annotaciju. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatske pristupe za otkrivanje reakcija semantičke tekućine koje utječu na ontološke resurse i distribucionalne semantičke modele kako bi karakterizirale odgovore semantičke tekućine koje proizvode mlada djeca sa i bez ASD-a. Koristeći te metode, pronašli smo značajne razlike u odgovorima na semantičku tekućinu djece s ASD-om, pokazujući korisnost upotrebe objektivnih metoda za analizu kliničkog jezika.', 'et': 'Neuroloogilise uuringu käigus kasutatav tavaline test on semantilise voolavuse test, milles patsient peab ajalises olukorras loetlema võimalikult palju näiteid antud semantilisest kategooriast. Halb jõudlus on seotud neuroloogiliste seisunditega, mida iseloomustavad täitevfunktsiooni kahjustused, nagu dementsus, skisofreenia ja autismi spektri häire (ASD). Meetodid semantiliste sujuvate vastuste analüüsimiseks nende erinevuste avastamiseks vajalikul detailsustasemel on tavaliselt tuginenud subjektiivsele manuaalsele annoteerimisele. Käesolevas töös uurime automatiseeritud lähenemisviise semantilise sujuva vastuse hindamiseks, mis kasutavad ontoloogilisi ressursse ja jaotussemantilisi mudeleid, et iseloomustada semantilise sujuva vastuse teket väikeste laste poolt, kellel on ASD ja ilma. Nende meetodite abil leiame olulisi erinevusi ASD-ga laste semantilises fluentsuses, näidates objektiivsete meetodite kasutamise kasulikkust kliiniliseks keeleanalüüsiks.', 'fi': 'Yhteinen neurologisessa tutkimuksessa tehtävä testi on semanttinen sujuvuustesti, jossa potilaan on luettava mahdollisimman monta esimerkkiä tietystä semanttisesta kategoriasta ajoitetuissa olosuhteissa. Huono suorituskyky liittyy neurologisiin sairauksiin, joille on ominaista toimeenpanon toimintahäiriöitä, kuten dementia, skitsofrenia ja autismin spektrin häiriö (ASD). Menetelmät semanttisten sujuvien vastausten analysoimiseksi näiden erojen paljastamiseksi tarvittavalla tarkkuustasolla ovat tyypillisesti nojautuneet subjektiiviseen manuaaliseen merkintään. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme automaattisia lähestymistapoja semanttisten sujuvuusvasteiden pisteyttämiseen, jotka hyödyntävät ontologisia resursseja ja jakelusemanttisia malleja kuvaamaan pienten lasten tuottamia semanttisia sujuvuusvasteita, joilla on ASD ja ilman sitä. Näiden menetelmien avulla havaittiin merkittäviä eroja ASD-lasten semanttisessa sujuvuusvasteissa, mikä osoittaa objektiivisten menetelmien hyödyllisyyden kliinisessä kielianalyysissä.', 'jv': 'Una pernik-pernik sing dipunangé esno, nik pawangan seneng pisan seneng dipunangé semanti, kawulé sakjane kudu ngewehku akèh seneng dipunangé sematik kawulé sematik dhéwé. Nalika hukum sing wis digawe karo pawaran ne alam-alam sing karo pawaran karo ngangge ujaran cara-anam sing nggunakake maneh, kaya ngono terus dipeneksi, disenyongi, lan pawaran langgar-alam sing (ASD). Metdadi kanggo kelelah semanti kang dipunangé apakno ning kegambar apakno Nang pepulan iki, kita isih perusahaan pawaran sistem sing otomatik kanggo ngilanggar langgar semanti kapan karo alam kuwi banjur kuwi nggawe ontroloje sak sistem semanti sing perusahaan karo alêter semanti kuwi mengko responsén semanti kuwi alam dhéwé lan kelangan kelangan lan ASD kuwi mau. Ngawe ngubah gambar perkara kuwi, kita sampeyan luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar semanti kapan langgar nganggep ASD, nggambar alat kuwi nggawe ngubah perusahaan sistem object kanggo anara dipileksi langkung dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Med nevrološkim pregledom je pogost test semantične tekočine, v katerem mora pacient navesti čim več primerov določene semantične kategorije v časovnih pogojih. Slaba zmogljivost je povezana z nevrološkimi stanji, za katere so značilne okvare izvršilne funkcije, kot so demenca, shizofrenija in motnja avtizmskega spektra (ASD). Metode za analizo semantičnih tekočih odzivov na ravni podrobnosti, potrebne za odkrivanje teh razlik, so se običajno opirale na subjektivno ročno označevanje. V prispevku raziskujemo avtomatizirane pristope za ocenjevanje semantičnih tekočih odzivov, ki uporabljajo ontološke vire in distribucijske semantične modele za karakterizacijo semantičnih tekočih odzivov, ki jih proizvajajo majhni otroci z in brez ASD. Z uporabo teh metod smo ugotovili pomembne razlike v semantičnih tekočih odzivih otrok z ASD, kar dokazuje koristnost uporabe objektivnih metod za klinično jezikovno analizo.', 'ha': "A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions.  Hazarin aikin matalauci yana da wani sharrin neurologi wanda aka ƙayyade shi a cikin aikin mai gabatar da shi, kamar dawati, sakofreni, da gongon gaura na hanyoyi (ATD). Metoden ya yi analyi ga mai amfani da shi na semantic a cikin daraja na buƙata wa daki-buƙata don a buƙata wannan gaura, sun yi dõgara a kan alama na manun da ba'a ƙunsa ba. Ina cikin wannan takardan, za mu nẽmi hanyoyin farat ɗaya ko da za'a iya lissafa mai fassarar mutane da ake samu da mataimaki da kuma misãlai na tarakin tarakiki da za'a gaura musamman da ake samu da kuma ba na yi AsD ba. Yin amfani da waɗannan hanyõyin, za'a gane diffaniki mai girma a cikin majibu na ƙarami na haihuwa da haske, kuma za'a nuna amfani da amfani da hanyoyin abubuwa wa wa'anar harshen ta ƙayyade.", 'he': 'מבחן משותף שנותן במהלך הבדיקה הנוירולוגית הוא מבחן הנוזלות הסמנטית, שבה החולה צריך לרשום כמה דוגמאות של קטגוריה סמנטית מסוימת ככל האפשר בתנאים זמנים. ביצועים רעים קשורים לתנאים נוירולוגיים שמאופיעים על ידי פגיעות בתפקיד ביצועי, כמו דמנציה, שיזופרניה ופרעת ספקטרום אוטיזם (ASD). שיטות לנתח תגובות נוזלות סמנטית ברמה של פרטים הנדרשות כדי לגלות את ההבדלים האלה בדרך כלל הסמכו על הערות ידית סוביקטיבית. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים גישות אוטומטיות כדי לנקוט תגובות שליליות סמנטיות שממשכות משאבים אונטולוגיים ודוגמנים סמנטיים פיצועים בשימוש בשיטות אלה, אנו מוצאים הבדלים משמעותיים בתגובות הנוזלות הסמנטית של ילדים עם ASD, שמוכיחים את היעילות של השימוש בשיטות אובייקטיביות לניתוח שפה קליני.', 'bo': 'A common test administered during neurological examination is the semantic fluency test, in which the patient must list as many examples of a given semantic category as possible under timed conditions. Poor performance is associated with neurological conditions characterized by impairments in executive function, such as dementia, schizophrenia, and autism spectrum disorder (ASD). ཐབས་ལམ་གནད་དོན་ཟུར་བ་དང་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྟངས་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ཚད འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འགྱུར་བའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལན་གསལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། རྣམ་པ་ལུགས་སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོར་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མཉམ་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་རྒྱུ་ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་སྤྱོད་པ་དེ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Uncertainty into Deep Learning for Spoken Language Assessment', 'ar': 'دمج عدم اليقين في التعلم العميق لتقييم اللغة المنطوقة', 'es': 'Incorporación de la incertidumbre al aprendizaje profundo para la evaluación del lenguaje oral', 'pt': 'Incorporando a Incerteza ao Aprendizado Profundo para Avaliação da Língua Falada', 'fr': "Intégrer l'incertitude dans l'apprentissage profond pour l'évaluation du langage parlé", 'ja': '口語評価のためのディープラーニングに不確実性を取り入れる', 'zh': '纳不确定性深度学以质口语', 'hi': 'बोली जाने वाली भाषा मूल्यांकन के लिए गहरी शिक्षा में अनिश्चितता को शामिल करना', 'ru': 'Включение неопределенности в глубокое обучение для оценки разговорного языка', 'ga': 'Éiginnteacht a Ionchorprú i nDomhainfhoghlaim do Mheasúnú Teanga Labhartha', 'hu': 'A bizonytalanság beépítése a mélytanulásba a beszélt nyelvi értékeléshez', 'it': "Incorporare l'incertezza nel Deep Learning per la valutazione della lingua parlata", 'ka': 'სწორედ სიტყვის განსაზღვრებისთვის მუშაობა', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση της αβεβαιότητας στη βαθιά μάθηση για την αξιολόγηση της ομιλούμενης γλώσσας', 'kk': 'Орындау тілді оқиғаларының қалыпты оқу үшін сенімділігін ендіру', 'lt': 'Neapibrėžties įtraukimas į gilų kalbos vertinimo mokymąsi', 'mk': 'Вклучување на несигурноста во длабоко учење за проценка на зборуваниот јазик', 'ms': 'Incorporating Uncertainty into Deep Learning for Spoken Language Assessment', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തിനുള്ള ആഴത്തിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നതിലേക്കു് ഉറപ്പില്ലാ', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni ta’ l-inċertezza fit-Tagħlim Profond għall-Valutazzjoni tal-Lingwa Kkellma', 'no': 'Innkopling av usikkerhet i dyppa læring for språk- assensering', 'pl': 'Włączanie niepewności do głębokiego uczenia się dla oceny języka mówionego', 'ro': 'Integrarea incertitudinii în învățarea profundă pentru evaluarea limbilor vorbite', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ хэлний оюутнуудын гүнзгий суралцах үнэн тодорхойгүй байдлыг', 'si': 'ස්පෝක් භාෂාව අවශ්\u200dයය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න අවිශ්වාස කරනවා', 'sr': 'Uključujući nejasnost u duboko učenje za procjenu govornog jezika', 'so': 'Waxbarashada deegaanka ee kaartaynta luqada', 'sv': 'Att införliva osäkerhet i djupinlärning för språkbedömning', 'ta': 'பேசும் மொழி Assessment', 'ur': 'اسپاک زبان آزمائش کے لئے عمیق تعلیم میں غیر یقین کے ساتھ داخل کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Incorporating Uncertainty into Deep Learning for Spoken Language Assessment', 'vi': 'Sự gắn bó bí mật về học sâu về đánh giá ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Включване на несигурността в задълбоченото обучение за оценка на говоримия език', 'de': 'Einbeziehung von Unsicherheit in Deep Learning zur Sprachbewertung', 'da': 'Inddragelse af usikkerhed i dyb læring til vurdering af tale sprog', 'nl': 'Onzekerheid opnemen in Deep Learning voor Spoken Language Assessment', 'hr': 'Uključujući nejasnost u duboko učenje za procjenu govornog jezika', 'id': 'Menginkorporasikan ketidakpastian ke dalam Belajar Dalam Penilaian Bahasa Berbicara', 'ko': '불확실성을 구어 평가의 심도 있는 학습에 포함시키다', 'sw': 'Kuingiza uhakika katika Ufunzi wa Kideep kwa Utafiti wa Lugha', 'tr': 'Gynansakdan çykyş dillerini barlamak üçin gadyrymlygy girdirilýär', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë pasigurinë në mësimin e thellë për vlerësimin e gjuhës së folur', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Onsekerheid in Deep Leer vir Spoken Taal Assensie', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Խոսվող լեզվի գնահատման համար խորը սովորելու մեջ ներառելով անվստահությունը', 'bn': 'Name', 'fa': 'شامل مطمئن شدن به یادگیری عمیق برای ارزیابی زبان حرف زدن', 'ca': "Incorporar la incertitud en l'aprenentatge profund de l'Evaluació del llenguatge parlat", 'cs': 'Začlenění nejistoty do hlubokého učení pro hodnocení mluveného jazyka', 'fi': 'Epävarmuuden sisällyttäminen syvälliseen oppimiseen puhuttujen kielten arviointia varten', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k dill톛rini t톛sdiql톛m톛k 칲칞칲n d톛rin 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'Uključujući nejasnost u duboko učenje za procjenu govornog jezika', 'et': 'Ebakindluse lisamine sügavõppesse rääkiva keele hindamiseks', 'sk': 'Vključevanje negotovosti v globoko učenje za ocenjevanje govorjenega jezika', 'jv': 'Sokake ungerti kesempatan nganggo langgambar kanggo ngerasasi Language', 'he': 'להכניס אי-ודאות ללימודים עמוקים להערכה של שפה מדברת', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལ་སྤྲོ་བའི་ནད་དོན་ངེས་པར་གཏོང་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་པ'}
{'en': 'There is a growing demand for automatic assessment of spoken English proficiency. These systems need to handle large variations in input data owing to the wide range of candidate skill levels and L1s, and errors from ASR. Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade. For high stakes tests it is essential for such systems not only to grade well, but also to provide a measure of their uncertainty in their predictions, enabling rejection to human graders. Previous work examined Gaussian Process (GP) graders which, though successful, do not scale well with large data sets. Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). This paper proposes a novel method to yield uncertainty and compares it to GPs and DNNs with MCD. The proposed approach explicitly teaches a DNN to have low uncertainty on training data and high uncertainty on generated artificial data. On experiments conducted on data from the Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), the proposed approach is found to outperform GPs and DNNs with MCD in uncertainty-based rejection whilst achieving comparable grading performance.', 'ar': 'هناك طلب متزايد على التقييم التلقائي لكفاءة اللغة الإنجليزية المنطوقة. تحتاج هذه الأنظمة إلى التعامل مع الاختلافات الكبيرة في بيانات الإدخال بسبب النطاق الواسع لمستويات المهارة المرشحة و L1s ، والأخطاء من ASR. قد يكون تطابق بعض المرشحين ضعيفًا مع مجموعة بيانات التدريب ، مما يقوض صحة الدرجة المتوقعة. بالنسبة للاختبارات عالية المخاطر ، من الضروري لمثل هذه الأنظمة ألا تقوم فقط بالتدرج الجيد ، ولكن أيضًا لتوفير مقياس لعدم اليقين في تنبؤاتها ، مما يتيح الرفض للمتدرجين من البشر. قام العمل السابق بفحص مُصنفات عملية Gaussian (GP) والتي ، على الرغم من نجاحها ، إلا أنها لا تتسع بشكل جيد مع مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة. يمكن أيضًا استخدام الشبكة العصبية العميقة (DNN) لتوفير عدم اليقين باستخدام Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). تقترح هذه الورقة طريقة جديدة لإنتاج عدم اليقين وتقارنها بالأطباء الممارسين و DNNs مع MCD. يُعلِّم النهج المقترح صراحةً DNN أن يكون لديه قدر منخفض من عدم اليقين بشأن بيانات التدريب وعدم اليقين الكبير بشأن البيانات الاصطناعية المتولدة. في التجارب التي أجريت على البيانات من خدمة اختبار لغة الأعمال (BULATS) ، وجد أن النهج المقترح يتفوق على الممارسين العامين و DNNs مع MCD في الرفض القائم على عدم اليقين مع تحقيق أداء تصنيف قابل للمقارنة.', 'es': 'Existe una creciente demanda de evaluación automática del dominio del inglés oral. Estos sistemas necesitan manejar grandes variaciones en los datos de entrada debido a la amplia gama de niveles de habilidad y L1 candidatos, y a los errores de ASR. Algunos candidatos no coincidirán bien con el conjunto de datos de capacitación, lo que socavará la validez de la calificación prevista. Para las pruebas de alto riesgo, es esencial que dichos sistemas no solo califiquen bien, sino que también proporcionen una medida de su incertidumbre en sus predicciones, lo que permite el rechazo de los evaluadores humanos. En trabajos anteriores se examinaron los calificadores del Proceso Gaussiano (GP) que, aunque tienen éxito, no escalan bien con grandes conjuntos de datos. La Red Neural Profunda (DNN) también se puede utilizar para generar incertidumbre con Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Este artículo propone un método novedoso para generar incertidumbre y lo compara con los médicos de cabecera y las DNN con MCD. El enfoque propuesto enseña explícitamente a una DNN que tiene poca incertidumbre sobre los datos de entrenamiento y alta incertidumbre sobre los datos artificiales generados. En los experimentos realizados con datos del Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), se encontró que el enfoque propuesto supera a los médicos de cabecera y DNN con MCD en el rechazo basado en la incertidumbre, al tiempo que logra un rendimiento de calificación comparable.', 'fr': "Il existe une demande croissante d'évaluation automatique de la maîtrise de l'anglais parlé. Ces systèmes doivent gérer de grandes variations dans les données d'entrée en raison du large éventail de niveaux de compétence des candidats et de N1, ainsi que des erreurs provenant de l'ASR. Certains candidats ne correspondent pas bien à l'ensemble de données de formation, ce qui compromet la validité de la note prévue. Pour les tests à enjeux élevés, il est essentiel que ces systèmes soient non seulement bien notés, mais aussi qu'ils fournissent une mesure de leur incertitude dans leurs prévisions, ce qui permet aux évaluateurs humains de les rejeter. Des travaux antérieurs ont porté sur des évaluateurs de processus gaussiens (GP) qui, bien que réussis, ne s'adaptent pas bien à de grands ensembles de données. Le réseau neuronal profond (DNN) peut également être utilisé pour fournir de l'incertitude à l'aide du décrochage de Monte-Carlo (MCD). Cet article propose une nouvelle méthode pour générer de l'incertitude et la compare aux généralistes et aux DNN avec MCD. L'approche proposée enseigne explicitement à un DNN qu'il doit avoir une faible incertitude sur les données d'entraînement et une incertitude élevée sur les données artificielles générées. D'après les expériences menées sur les données du Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), l'approche proposée surpasse les médecins généralistes et les DNN avec MCD en cas de rejet basé sur l'incertitude tout en obtenant des performances de notation comparables.", 'pt': 'Há uma demanda crescente por avaliação automática da proficiência em inglês falado. Esses sistemas precisam lidar com grandes variações nos dados de entrada devido à ampla gama de níveis de habilidade do candidato e L1s e erros de ASR. Alguns candidatos terão uma correspondência ruim com o conjunto de dados de treinamento, prejudicando a validade da nota prevista. Para testes de alto risco, é essencial que tais sistemas não apenas classifiquem bem, mas também forneçam uma medida de sua incerteza em suas previsões, permitindo a rejeição de avaliadores humanos. Trabalhos anteriores examinaram classificadores de Processo Gaussiano (GP) que, embora bem-sucedidos, não se adaptam bem com grandes conjuntos de dados. A Deep Neural Network (DNN) também pode ser usada para fornecer incerteza usando o Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Este artigo propõe um novo método para gerar incerteza e o compara com GPs e DNNs com MCD. A abordagem proposta ensina explicitamente uma DNN a ter baixa incerteza nos dados de treinamento e alta incerteza nos dados artificiais gerados. Em experimentos conduzidos em dados do Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), a abordagem proposta supera GPs e DNNs com MCD em rejeição baseada em incerteza, enquanto alcança desempenho de classificação comparável.', 'ja': '口語英語能力の自動評価に対する需要が高まっています。 これらのシステムは、候補者のスキルレベルとL 1 sの幅広さ、およびASRからのエラーにより、入力データの大きな変動を処理する必要があります。 一部の候補者は、トレーニングデータセットとの整合性が悪く、予測される成績の妥当性を損ないます。 高いステークステストでは、このようなシステムが適切にグレーディングするだけでなく、予測における不確実性の尺度を提供することが不可欠であり、人間のグレーダーへの拒否を可能にします。 以前の研究では、成功したものの、大きなデータセットではうまくスケーリングできないガウスプロセス（ GP ）グレーダーを検討しました。 Deep Neural Network （ DNN ）は、Monte - Carlo Dropout （ MCD ）を使用して不確実性を提供するために使用することもできます。 不確実性を得るための新規手法を提案し、GPやDNNとMCDを比較した。 提案されたアプローチは、DNNがトレーニングデータの不確実性が低く、生成された人工データの不確実性が高いことを明示的に教える。 ビジネス言語テストサービス（ BULATS ）からのデータで実施された実験では、提案されたアプローチは、不確実性ベースの拒絶においてMCDでGPおよびDNNを上回り、同等のグレーディングパフォーマンスを達成することが見出されました。', 'zh': '英语口语水平自料者相继而长。 以选技平L1广及ASR之误,其统须输数巨大变化。 诸生将训练数集不侔,以坏占绩之有效性。 高风险之试也,非徒善评分也,又资其不确定性量,以拒人评分者。 前事检斯事(GP)分级机,虽成功,不能广大集。 深度神经网络(DNN)亦可施于用蒙特卡洛辍学(MCD)给不确定性。 立生不确定性之法,比之MCDGPDNN。 所立法明教DNN教数有不确定性,人工有高不确定性。 商业语言试事(BULATS)之数实验,见其所言,优于不确定性之拒,优于有MCD之GPDNN,同时而评分性也。', 'hi': 'बोली जाने वाली अंग्रेजी प्रवीणता के स्वचालित मूल्यांकन की मांग बढ़ रही है। इन प्रणालियों को उम्मीदवार कौशल स्तरों और एल 1 एस की विस्तृत श्रृंखला और एएसआर से त्रुटियों के कारण इनपुट डेटा में बड़ी विविधताओं को संभालने की आवश्यकता है। कुछ उम्मीदवार प्रशिक्षण डेटा सेट के लिए एक खराब मैच होंगे, जो अनुमानित ग्रेड की वैधता को कम कर देंगे। उच्च दांव परीक्षणों के लिए इस तरह की प्रणालियों के लिए न केवल अच्छी तरह से ग्रेड करना आवश्यक है, बल्कि उनकी भविष्यवाणियों में उनकी अनिश्चितता का एक उपाय प्रदान करना भी आवश्यक है, जिससे मानव ग्रेडर को अस्वीकृति सक्षम हो सकती है। पिछले काम ने गाऊसी प्रक्रिया (जीपी) ग्रेडर की जांच की, जो सफल होने के बावजूद, बड़े डेटा सेट के साथ अच्छी तरह से स्केल नहीं करते हैं। डीप न्यूरल नेटवर्क (डीएनएन) का उपयोग मोंटे-कार्लो ड्रॉपआउट (एमसीडी) का उपयोग करके अनिश्चितता प्रदान करने के लिए भी किया जा सकता है। यह पेपर अनिश्चितता उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है और इसकी तुलना एमसीडी के साथ जीपी और डीएनएन से करता है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण स्पष्ट रूप से एक डीएनएन को प्रशिक्षण डेटा पर कम अनिश्चितता और उत्पन्न कृत्रिम डेटा पर उच्च अनिश्चितता के लिए सिखाता है। बिजनेस लैंग्वेज टेस्टिंग सर्विस (BULATS) के डेटा पर किए गए प्रयोगों पर, प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण को तुलनात्मक ग्रेडिंग प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते समय अनिश्चितता-आधारित अस्वीकृति में एमसीडी के साथ GPs और DNNs को पछाड़ने के लिए पाया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Растет спрос на автоматическую оценку уровня владения разговорным английским языком. Эти системы должны обрабатывать значительные вариации входных данных из-за широкого диапазона уровней квалификации кандидатов и L1, а также ошибок от ASR. Некоторые кандидаты будут плохо соответствовать набору данных об обучении, что подорвет достоверность прогнозируемой оценки. Для испытаний на большие ставки важно, чтобы такие системы не только хорошо классифицировали, но и обеспечивали измерение их неопределенности в своих прогнозах, позволяя отвергнуть человеческие сортировщики. В предыдущих работах изучались грейдеры гауссового процесса (GP), которые, хотя и были успешными, не имеют хорошего масштаба с большими наборами данных. Глубокая нейронная сеть (DNN) также может быть использована для обеспечения неопределенности с использованием выпадения Монте-Карло (MCD). Эта работа предлагает романный метод для того чтобы произвести неопределенность и сравнивает его к GPs и DNNs с MCD. Предлагаемый подход прямо учит DNN иметь низкую неопределенность в обучающих данных и высокую неопределенность в сгенерированных искусственных данных. В экспериментах, проведенных на основе данных Службы тестирования делового языка (BULATS), было установлено, что предлагаемый подход превосходит GP и DNN с MCD в отклонении на основе неопределенности при достижении сопоставимых показателей оценки.', 'ga': "Tá éileamh méadaitheach ar mheasúnú uathoibríoch ar inniúlacht sa Bhéarla labhartha. Ní mór do na córais seo éagsúlachtaí móra i sonraí ionchuir a láimhseáil mar gheall ar an raon leathan de leibhéil scileanna agus T1anna iarrthóra, agus earráidí ó RTB. Beidh meaitseáil lag ag roinnt iarrthóirí leis an tacar sonraí oiliúna, rud a bhainfidh an bonn de bhailíocht an ghráid thuartha. Le haghaidh tástálacha ar ard-geallta tá sé riachtanach ní amháin do chórais den sórt sin grádú maith a dhéanamh, ach freisin go soláthrófaí éiginnteacht a gcuid réamh-mheastacháin d'fhonn diúltú do ghrádóirí daonna. Scrúdaigh obair roimhe seo grádóirí Próiseas Gaussach (GP) nach n-éiríonn go maith leo, cé go n-éiríonn leo de réir scálaí móra sonraí. Féadfar Líonra Neural Deep (DNN) a úsáid freisin chun neamhchinnteacht a sholáthar trí leas a bhaint as Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Molann an páipéar seo modh nua chun éiginnteacht a chruthú agus déantar é a chur i gcomparáid le GPanna agus DNNanna le MCD. Múineann an cur chuige atá beartaithe go sonrach do DNN neamhchinnteacht íseal a bheith aige maidir le sonraí oiliúna agus neamhchinnteacht ard ar shonraí saorga ginte. Ar thurgnaimh a rinneadh ar shonraí ón tSeirbhís Tástála Teanga Gnó (BULATS), faightear amach go sáraíonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe GPanna agus DNNanna le MCD maidir le diúltú atá bunaithe ar éiginnteacht agus ag an am céanna ag baint amach feidhmíocht grádaithe inchomparáide.", 'ka': 'არსებობს ავტომატური განსაზღვრება ინგლისური პროფიციენტის განსაზღვრება. ამ სისტემებს უნდა გავაკეთოთ დიდი განრავლებები შეტყობინებულ მონაცემების შესახებ კანდიდენტის უფრო დიდი განრავლება და L1s და ASR-ის შეცდომა. ზოგიერთი კანდიდენტები იქნება ცოტა მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ კონფიგურაციის მნიშვნელობას დასრულება. უფრო დიდი სისტემებისთვის შესაძლებელია ამ სისტემებისთვის არა მხოლოდ უფრო დიდი სისტემებისთვის, მაგრამ უფრო დიდი სისტემებისთვის, მაგრამ უფრო დიდი სისტემების განსაც პირველი სამუშაო დაუსიანური პროცესი (GP) სწორესების შემოწმება, რომლებიც წარმატებით, დიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციით არ წარმატებით მნიშვნელოვანი ნეიროლური ქსელი (DNN) შეიძლება გამოიყენება მონტ- კაპლო Dropout (MCD) გამოყენებათ დაუცნობა. ეს დოკუმენტი პრომენტის შესაძლებელია, რომ დაიწყება უცნობიერებელობა და შემდგომარება GPS და DNN-თან MCD-თან. პროგრამის მიზეზი განსხვავებულია DNN-ს გასწავლის, რომ საკუთარი განსხვავება მონაცემებზე და საკუთარი განსხვავება შექმნილი კულტური მონაცემებზე. სამუშაო ენის ტესტის სერვისტიდან მონაცემებით ექსპერიმენტებში (BULATS) მოწყობინებული პროგრამა იქნება, რომ MCD-ს GPS და DNN-ს გავაკეთოთ, რომელიც შემდგომარებელი წარმოდგენა.', 'el': 'Υπάρχει μια αυξανόμενη ζήτηση για αυτόματη αξιολόγηση της προφορικής αγγλικής επάρκειας. Τα συστήματα αυτά πρέπει να διαχειρίζονται μεγάλες διακυμάνσεις στα δεδομένα εισόδου λόγω του μεγάλου φάσματος των επιπέδων δεξιοτήτων υποψηφίων και L1, καθώς και σφάλματα από την ASR. Ορισμένοι υποψήφιοι δεν ταιριάζουν με το σύνολο δεδομένων κατάρτισης, υπονομεύοντας την εγκυρότητα του προβλεπόμενου βαθμού. Για τις δοκιμές υψηλών κινδύνων, είναι απαραίτητο τα συστήματα αυτά όχι μόνο να βαθμολογούν καλά, αλλά και να παρέχουν ένα μέτρο της αβεβαιότητας τους στις προβλέψεις τους, επιτρέποντας την απόρριψη σε ανθρώπους βαθμολογητές. Προηγούμενες εργασίες εξέτασαν βαθμολογητές Gaussian Process (GP) οι οποίοι, αν και επιτυχημένοι, δεν κλιμακώνονται καλά με μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων. Το βαθύ Νευρικό Δίκτυο (DNN) μπορεί επίσης να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την παροχή αβεβαιότητας χρησιμοποιώντας το Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα μέθοδο για την απόδοση αβεβαιότητας και τη συγκρίνει με τους γιατρούς και τους DNN με MCD. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση διδάσκει ρητά ένα DNN να έχει χαμηλή αβεβαιότητα σχετικά με τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης και υψηλή αβεβαιότητα σχετικά με τα παραγόμενα τεχνητά δεδομένα. Σε πειράματα που διεξήχθησαν με δεδομένα από την Υπηρεσία Ελέγχου Γλωσσών Επιχειρήσεων (BULATS), η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση διαπιστώνεται ότι ξεπερνά τους GPs και DNN με MCD σε απόρριψη βάσει αβεβαιότητας επιτυγχάνοντας συγκρίσιμες επιδόσεις βαθμολόγησης.', 'hu': 'Egyre nagyobb az igény a beszélt angol nyelvtudás automatikus értékelésére. Ezeknek a rendszereknek nagy változásokat kell kezelniük a bemeneti adatokban a jelöltek készségszintjének és L1s szintjeinek széles skálája, valamint az ASR hibáinak köszönhetően. Néhány jelölt rosszul illeszkedik az edzési adatkészlethez, ami aláássa a várt osztály érvényességét. A magas tétes tesztek esetében elengedhetetlen, hogy ezek a rendszerek ne csak jó minősítést kapjanak, hanem bizonytalanságukat is mérjék előrejelzéseikben, lehetővé téve az emberi osztályozók elutasítását. Az előző munka a Gauss Process (GP) osztályozókat vizsgálta, amelyek, bár sikeresek, nem skáláznak jól nagy adathalmazokkal. A Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) használatával bizonytalanság biztosítására is használható a Deep Neural Network (DNN). Ez a tanulmány egy új módszert javasol a bizonytalanság kialakítására, és összehasonlítja a háziorvosokkal és a DNN-ekkel MCD-vel. A javasolt megközelítés kifejezetten arra tanítja a DNN-t, hogy alacsony bizonytalansággal rendelkezzen a képzési adatokkal kapcsolatban, és nagy bizonytalansággal rendelkezzen a generált mesterséges adatokkal kapcsolatban. A Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) adatai alapján végzett kísérletek során a javasolt megközelítés kimutatták, hogy bizonytalanságon alapuló elutasításban felülmúlja a háziorvosi és DNN-eket MCD-vel, miközben hasonló osztályozási teljesítményt ér el.', 'it': "C'è una crescente domanda di valutazione automatica della conoscenza della lingua inglese parlata. Questi sistemi devono gestire grandi variazioni nei dati di input a causa dell'ampia gamma di livelli di abilità dei candidati e L1, e degli errori derivanti dall'ASR. Alcuni candidati non corrisponderanno al set di dati di allenamento, compromettendo la validità del voto previsto. Per i test high stake è essenziale che tali sistemi non solo valutino bene, ma anche forniscano una misura della loro incertezza nelle loro previsioni, consentendo il rifiuto ai graduatori umani. Il lavoro precedente ha esaminato i graduatori Gaussian Process (GP) che, pur avendo successo, non si adattano bene con grandi set di dati. Deep Neural Network (DNN) può anche essere utilizzato per fornire incertezza utilizzando Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Questo articolo propone un nuovo metodo per generare incertezza e lo confronta con GP e DNN con MCD. L'approccio proposto insegna esplicitamente a una DNN di avere una bassa incertezza sui dati di formazione e un'elevata incertezza sui dati artificiali generati. Su esperimenti condotti su dati provenienti dal Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), l'approccio proposto è risultato superiore a GP e DNN con MCD nel rifiuto basato sull'incertezza, pur ottenendo prestazioni di classificazione comparabili.", 'lt': 'Vis labiau reikalaujama automatinio anglų kalbos įgūdžių vertinimo. Šioms sistemoms reikia spręsti didelius duomenų įvedimo skirtumus dėl įvairių kandidatų įgūdžių lygių ir L1s bei ASR klaidų. Kai kurie kandidatai bus prastai suderinti su mokymo duomenų rinkiniu, o tai pakenktų numatomos klasės galiojimui. Atliekant didelės svarbos bandymus, tokioms sistemoms būtina ne tik gerai įvertinti, bet ir nustatyti jų prognozių neapibrėžtumą, kad būtų galima atmesti žmonių klasifikatorius. Ankstesniame darbe buvo nagrinėjami Gausijos proceso (GP) klasifikatoriai, kurie, nors ir sėkmingi, nepakankamai apima didelius duomenų rinkinius. Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD).  Šiame dokumente siūlomas naujas metodas neapibrėžti ir palyginti jį su GP ir DNN ir MCD. Siūlomas metodas aiškiai moko DNN turėti mažą mokymo duomenų neapibrėžtumą ir didelį sukauptų dirbtinių duomenų neapibrėžtumą. On experiments conducted on data from the Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), the proposed approach is found to outperform GPs and DNNs with MCD in uncertainty-based rejection whilst achieving comparable grading performance.', 'mk': 'Постои растечка побарувачка за автоматска проценка на говорната англиска способност. Овие системи мора да се справат со големи варијации во внатрешните податоци поради широкиот опсег на нивоа на кандидатски вештини и L1s, како и грешки од ASR. Некои кандидати ќе бидат лоши во согласност со наборот на податоци за обука, поткопувајќи ја валидноста на предвиденото одделение. За тестовите со високи загрози е суштинско ваквите системи да не само добро оценуваат, туку и да обезбедат мерка на нивната несигурност во нивните предвидувања, овозможувајќи отфрлање на човековите оценувачи. Претходната работа ги испита градерите на Гаусскиот процес (GP), кои, иако успешни, не се размеруваат добро со големи податоци. Длабока неурална мрежа (ДНН) може да се користи и за обезбедување несигурност со користење на Монте-Карло Dropout (МЦД). Овој документ предлага нов метод за да се предизвика несигурност и да се спореди со GPs и DNN со MCD. Предложениот пристап експлицитно учи ДНН да има ниска несигурност во врска со податоците за обука и висока несигурност во врска со генерираните вештачки податоци. Во врска со експериментите спроведени на податоците од Службата за тестирање на бизнис јазик (БУЛАТС), се пронајде дека предложениот пристап ги надминува ГПС и ДНН со МЦД во одбивање базирано на несигурност, при што се постигнува споредлива резултат', 'ms': 'There is a growing demand for automatic assessment of spoken English proficiency.  These systems need to handle large variations in input data owing to the wide range of candidate skill levels and L1s, and errors from ASR.  Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  Untuk ujian pertaruhan tinggi, ia adalah penting bagi sistem-sistem tersebut tidak hanya untuk grad dengan baik, tetapi juga untuk memberikan ukuran ketidakpastian mereka dalam ramalan-ramalan mereka, membolehkan penolakan kepada grader manusia. Kerja terdahulu memeriksa grader Proses Gaussian (GP) yang, walaupun berjaya, tidak skala dengan baik dengan set data besar. Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD).  This paper proposes a novel method to yield uncertainty and compares it to GPs and DNNs with MCD.  pendekatan yang diusulkan secara eksplicit mengajar DNN untuk mempunyai ketidakpastian rendah pada data latihan dan ketidakpastian tinggi pada data buatan yang dijana. Pada eksperimen yang dilakukan pada data dari Perkhidmatan Ujian Bahasa Perusahaan (BULATS), pendekatan yang diusulkan ditemui untuk melampaui GPs dan DNN dengan MCD dalam penolakan berdasarkan ketidakpastian sementara mencapai prestasi gradasi yang sama.', 'kk': 'Ағылшын профессионалығын автоматты түрде бағалау керек. Бұл жүйелер келтірілген деректер үлкен айырмашылықтарын басқару керек. Бұл кандидаттардың көпшілікті және L1s деңгейінде және ASR қателерінің көпшілігін басқару Кейбір кандидаттар оқыту деректер жиынына сәйкес келеді, таңдалған сыныптың дұрыстығын бақылады. Жоғары тескерлер үшін бұл жүйелер үшін тек жақсы бағалау үшін қажетті емес, сондай-ақ олардың бағалау үшін мәселелерін таңдау үшін, адамдардың оқушыларына қарамастыру мүмкіндігін Алдыңғы жұмыс үлкен деректер жинақтарымен өзгертілмеген Gaussian Process (GP) градустарды тексерді. Мұндай-ақ Monte- Carlo Dropout (MCD) арқылы қауіпсіздігін қолдану үшін түйінгі нейралық желі (DNN) қолданылады. Бұл қағаз қауіпсіздігін таңдау әдісін жасап, GPS және DNN- мен MCD- мен салыстыру үшін жаңа әдісін ұсынады. Келтірілген тәртібі DNN деректерінің оқыту мәліметі мен құрылған өзгертілген деректерінің тәуелсіздігін өте тәуелсіздігін ұстайды. Бизнес тілдерді тексеру қызметінің (BULATS) деректер туралы тәжірибелерінде, келтірілген тәжірибе MCD- мен GPS және DNN- ді қауіпсіздіктерінің кәсіпсіздігіне негізделген қауіпсіздіктеріне көмектесу үшін та', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പ്രാധാന്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സ്വയമായി പരിഗണിക്കാനുള്ള ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വിദ്വീകരണത്തിന്റെയും L1കളുടെയും വ്യത്യാസവും ASR-ല്\u200d നിന്നും പിശകുകളുടെയും കാരണം ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d വലി ചില പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റിന്റെ പാര്\u200dട്ടിയോട് പാവപ്പെടുന്നതായിരിക്കും. പ്രതിഫലി For high stakes tests it is essential for such systems not only to grade well, but also to provide a measure of their uncertainty in their predictions, enabling rejection to human graders.  Previous work examined Gaussian Process (GP) graders which, though successful, do not scale well with large data sets.  ആഴത്തെ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് (DNN) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് മോണ്ട്- കാര്\u200dളോ ഡ്രോപ്പൌട്ട് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി തിരി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാത്ത നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിനെ ജിപികളോടും DNNs എംസിഡിയോടും ത പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രായോഗ്യം വ്യക്തമായി ഒരു DNN പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളും കൃത്രിമ വിവരങ്ങള ബിസിനസ് ഭാഷ പരീക്ഷണസേവനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രേഡിങ്ങിങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d GPs,', 'mt': 'There is a growing demand for automatic assessment of spoken English proficiency.  Dawn is-sistemi jeħtieġu li jimmaniġġjaw varjazzjonijiet kbar fid-dejta tal-input minħabba l-firxa wiesgħa ta’ livelli ta’ ħiliet kandidati u L1s, u żbalji mill-ASR. Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  For high stakes tests it is essential for such systems not only to grade well, but also to provide a measure of their uncertainty in their predictions, enabling rejection to human graders.  Ix-xogħol preċedenti eżamina l-gradaturi tal-Proċess Gaussjan (GP) li, għalkemm ta’ suċċess, ma jiksbux skala tajba b’settijiet kbar ta’ dejta. Netwerk Newrali Profond (DNN) jista’ jintuża wkoll biex jipprovdi inċertezza bl-użu ta’ Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Dan id-dokument jipproponi metodu ġdid biex jagħti inċertezza u jqabblu mal-GPs u d-DNNs mal-MCD. L-approċċ propost jitgħallem espliċitament DNN biex ikollha inċertezza baxxa dwar id-dejta tat-taħriġ u inċertezza għolja dwar id-dejta artifiċjali ġġenerata. On experiments conducted on data from the Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), the proposed approach is found to outperform GPs and DNNs with MCD in uncertainty-based rejection whilst achieving comparable grading performance.', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний мэргэжлийн автоматаар үнэлэх шаардлагатай байна. Эдгээр системүүд орхих өгөгдлийн том өөрчлөлтийг удирдах шаардлагатай. АСР-ын олон чадварын түвшинд, L1с болон алдаа гаргах шаардлагатай. Зарим захирагчид дасгал өгөгдлийн сургуульд бага зэрэг тоглогдох болно. Таамаглалтын дүнг багасгаж байна. Хамгийн өндөр шалгалтын тулд ийм системүүд зөвхөн сайн дүнг багасгах нь чухал, мөн тэдний таамаглалтанд тодорхойгүй байдлыг хэмжээгээр хандуулах нь хүн төрөлхтний ангид хүргэх боломжтой. Өмнөх ажлыг Гауссийн Процесс (GP) ангид шалгаж байсан. Гэхдээ амжилттай ч том өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр сайн тооцоолж чадахгүй. Мөн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (DNN) Монте-Карло Дропут (MCD) ашиглан тодорхойгүй байдлаар ашиглаж болно. Энэ цаас нь тодорхойгүй байдлыг гаргаж, GPS болон DNN-тэй MCD-тэй харьцуулах шинэ арга зам санал болгож байна. Хэрэглэгдсэн арга хэмжээний арга хэмжээний өгөгдлийн талаар бага тодорхойлолт болон бий болгосон уран бүтээлч өгөгдлийн талаар өндөр тодорхойлолт байхын тулд DNN-г тодорхойлж байна. Бизнес хэл тестингийн үйлчилгээний (BULATS) өгөгдлийн талаар хийсэн туршилтууд дээр санал өгсөн арга нь MCD-тэй GPS болон DNN-г харьцуулахын тулд харьцуулагдмал хэмжээний үйлдлийг хүртэл тодорхойлж байдаг.', 'no': 'Det er ein økende etterspørsel for automatisk vurdering av talet engelsk proficienc. Desse systema må handtera stor variasjonar i inndata ved grunn av breidde område av kandidatkvalitetsnivå og L1s og feil frå ASR. Noen kandidatar vil vera ein dårlig treff med opplæringsdatasettet, som understrekar gyldigheten på den foregåande graden. For høg stakketestar er det nødvendig for slike systemer ikkje bare å gradera godt, men også å gje eit mål av usikkerheten sine i forhåndsvisingane sine, som kan slå av avvisning til menneskelige graderar. Førre arbeid er undersøkt i Gaussianske prosessegradarane (GP), som, selv om suksessfull, skalerer ikkje godt med store datasett. Djupne neuralnettverk (DNN) kan også brukast for å gjera usikkerhet med Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Denne papiret foreslår eit nytt metode for å gje usikkerhet og samanlikna det med GPS og DNN med MCD. Den foreslåde tilnærminga lærer ein DNN for å ha låg usikkerhet på opplæringsdata og høg usikkerhet på genererte kunstiske data. På eksperimenter gjennomført på data frå Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) finn den foreslåde tilnærminga til å utføra GPS og DNN med MCD i utvikling med usikkerhetsbasert avvisning mens det gjer sammenlignbare graderingsfunksjon.', 'pl': 'Istnieje rosnące zapotrzebowanie na automatyczną ocenę znajomości języka angielskiego mówionego. Systemy te muszą obsługiwać duże różnice danych wejściowych ze względu na szeroki zakres poziomów umiejętności kandydatów i L1 oraz błędy z ASR. Niektórzy kandydaci będą słabo dopasowani do zbioru danych szkoleniowych, podważając ważność przewidywanej oceny. W przypadku testów o dużych stawkach niezbędne jest, aby takie systemy nie tylko dobrze oceniały, ale także dostarczyły miernika ich niepewności w ich prognozach, umożliwiając odrzucenie ludziom oceniającym. Poprzednie prace badały oceniacze procesu Gaussa (GP), które mimo sukcesów, nie są dobrze skalowane przy dużych zbiorach danych. Głęboka sieć neuronowa (DNN) może być również wykorzystywana do zapewnienia niepewności przy użyciu Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nową metodę uzyskania niepewności i porównuje ją z lekarzami GPS i DNN z MCD. Proponowane podejście wyraźnie uczy DNN, aby mieć niską niepewność co do danych treningowych i dużą niepewność co do generowanych sztucznych danych. Na podstawie eksperymentów przeprowadzonych na danych z Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) stwierdzono, że proponowane podejście przewyższa GPs i DNN z MCD w odrzuceniu opartego na niepewności, przy jednoczesnym osiągnięciu porównywalnej wydajności oceny.', 'sr': 'Postoji rastući zahtev za automatsku procjenu govornog engleskog profila. Ovi sistemi moraju voditi velike varijacije u podacima o ulazu zbog širokog opsega nivoa kandidatskih vještina i L1-a i grešaka iz ASR-a. Neki kandidati će biti siromašan poklapanje sa setom podataka za obuku, potaknuti validnost predviđenog razreda. Za testove visokih uloga je važno za takve sisteme ne samo da dobro ocenjuju, nego i da obezbedi mjeru njihove nesigurnosti u njihovim predviđanjima, omogućavajući odbijanje ljudskim ocjenama. Prethodni rad je pregledao ocjene Gausijskog procesa (GP), koji, iako uspešno, ne skalaju dobro sa velikim setima podataka. Duboka neuronska mreža (DNN) može se takođe koristiti za pružanje nesigurnosti koristeći Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Ovaj papir predlaže novu metodu da donese nesigurnost i usporedi ga sa GPS-om i DNN-om sa MCD-om. Predloženi pristup pojasno uči DNN da ima nisku nesigurnost na podacima obuke i visoke nesigurnosti na proizvedenim umjetničkim podacima. Na eksperimentima provedenim na podacima iz službe za testiranje poslovnih jezika (BULATS), predloženi pristup se nalazi kako bi se nadmašio GPS i DNS sa MCD-om u odbacivanju na temelju nesigurnosti dok se ostvarilo usporedno postizanje klasifikacije.', 'ro': 'Există o cerere tot mai mare pentru evaluarea automată a competențelor vorbite în limba engleză. Aceste sisteme trebuie să gestioneze variații mari ale datelor de intrare datorită gamei largi de niveluri de competență și L1 ale candidaților, precum și erorilor generate de ASR. Unii candidați se vor potrivi slab cu setul de date de antrenament, subminând validitatea notei anticipate. Pentru testele cu mize mari este esențial ca astfel de sisteme să nu numai să evalueze bine, ci și să ofere o măsură a incertitudinii lor în previziunile lor, permițând respingerea clasamentului uman. Lucrările anterioare au examinat gradoarele Gaussian Process (GP) care, deși au succes, nu se scalează bine cu seturi de date mari. Rețeaua Neurală profundă (DNN) poate fi, de asemenea, utilizată pentru a furniza incertitudine utilizând Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Această lucrare propune o metodă nouă de generare a incertitudinii și o compară cu GP și DNN cu MCD. Abordarea propusă învață în mod explicit un DNN să aibă o incertitudine scăzută cu privire la datele de formare și o incertitudine ridicată cu privire la datele artificiale generate. Pe experimentele efectuate pe baza datelor furnizate de Serviciul de testare a limbilor de afaceri (BULATS), abordarea propusă a depășit performanțele GP și DNN cu MCD în respingerea bazată pe incertitudine, obținând în același timp performanțe comparabile de clasificare.', 'so': "There is a growing demand for automatic assessment of spoken English proficiency.  Sida darteed nidaamkan waxaa loo baahan yahay inay xambaaraan kala duwanaansho faro badan oo macluumaadka soo saara sababtoo ah heerarka aqoonta kala duduwan ee kandidada iyo L1ka iyo qaladyada ASR. Shaqoyinka qaarkood waxay noqon doonaan mid u baahan oo u eg qorshaha waxbarashada, waxayna hoos u dhigi doonaan xaqiiqnimada fasalka hore. Imtixaanka heerka sare waxaa muhiim u ah in nidaam caynkaas oo keliya si fiican loo fasaxo, laakiin sidoo kale in loo sameeyo qiyaas ka mid ah baaritaantooda, taas oo lagu diidi karo fasalka dadka. Shaqo hore ayaa lagu baaraandegay fasalka guussian (GP) oo, in kastoo ay ku liibaantay, aysan si wanaagsan ugu baarayn kooban macluumaad badan. Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD).  Kanu warqaddan wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab warqad ah oo uu soo bixiyo aqoon la'aan oo uu u dhigo GPs iyo DNNs iyo MCD. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday bayaan ayuu u baraa DNN in uu haysto aqoon yar oo ku saabsan macluumaadka waxbarashada iyo aqoonta dheer oo ku saabsan macluumaadka farsamada. Imtixaanka lagu sameeyo macluumaadka baaritaanka luuqada ganacsiga (BULATS), waxaa laga helaa in lagu sameeyo qaababka la soo jeedo in lagu sameeyo GPs iyo DNNs iyo MCD diido aan la garanayn, marka la gaadho sameynta sameynta sameynta heerka isbarbarka ah.", 'sv': 'Det finns en växande efterfrågan på automatisk bedömning av talad engelska kunskaper. Dessa system måste hantera stora variationer i inmatningsdata på grund av det stora utbudet av kandidatkompetensnivåer och L1s, och fel från ASR. Vissa kandidater kommer inte att matcha träningsdatauppsättningen, vilket undergräver giltigheten av det förväntade betyget. För high stakes-tester är det viktigt att sådana system inte bara betygsätter bra, utan också ger ett mått på deras osäkerhet i sina förutsägelser, vilket gör det möjligt att avvisa människor. Tidigare arbete undersökte Gaussian Process (GP) graderare som, även om framgångsrika, inte skalar bra med stora datamängder. Deep Neural Network (DNN) kan också användas för att skapa osäkerhet med hjälp av Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Denna uppsats föreslår en ny metod för att skapa osäkerhet och jämför den med GP och DNN med MCD. Den föreslagna metoden lär uttryckligen ett DNN att ha låg osäkerhet om träningsdata och hög osäkerhet om genererade artificiella data. På experiment utförda på data från Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), har den föreslagna metoden visat sig överträffa GP och DNN med MCD i osäkerhetsbaserad avvisande samtidigt som den uppnår jämförbar betygsprestanda.', 'ta': 'பேசும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் தன்னியக்கமாக மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு ஒரு வேண்டும். These systems need to handle large variations in input data owing to the wide range of candidate skill levels and L1s, and errors from ASR.  சில தேர்வாளர்கள் பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்புடன் பொருந்துவது ஏழாக இருக்கும், முன்னோட்டிருந்த தரவின் செல்லுபடியாக உயர்நிலைகளின் சோதனைகளுக்கு இது நல்ல தரவு மட்டும் மட்டும் அல்ல, மேலும் அவர்களுடைய எதிர்பாராத அளவை வழங்குவதற்கு, மனித தரங்களை மறுக்க முடியும். முந்தைய வேலை பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட காய்சியன் செயல்பாடு (GP) வகுப்புகளை பெரிய தரவு அமைப்புகளுடன் சரியாக அளவிடாது. ஆழமான நெயுரால் பிணையத்தின் (DNN) மோண்ட்- கார்லோ வெளியீட்டை பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக பயன்படுத்தலாம். @ info பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு தெளிவாக ஒரு DNN பயிற்சி தரவுகள் மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கலைஞர் தரவுகளில் குறைந்த உறுதிப்படு தொழில் மொழி சோதனை சேவையகத்திலிருந்து தரவு செய்யப்பட்ட சோதனைகளில், ஒப்பீடு தரம் செய்யும் பொழுது GPs மற்றும் DNNs சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ள திட்டத்தை முடியும் ப', 'ur': 'بات انگلیسی پروفسونسیٹ کی آٹوٹی ارزیابی کے لئے اضافہ ہونے کی ضرورت ہے۔ یہ سیستموں کو اینٹ ڈیٹا میں بڑے فرق کرنے کی ضرورت ہے کیونڈیٹ کی طاقت سطح اور L1s اور ASR کی خطاؤں کے باعث۔ بعض کائندئٹوں کو تدریس ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق غریب مسابقه ہوگا، جو پیش بینی کلاس کی مطابق کمزور کر رہے ہیں. بلند مرتبہ کی آزمائش کے لئے یہ بات صرف اچھی طرح کے لئے ضرورت ہے نہ صرف اچھی طرح کے ساتھ، بلکہ یہ بھی ان کی آزمائش میں ایک اندازہ کا اندازہ دے سکتا ہے جو انسان کے درجے کا انکار کرتا ہے۔ پہلے کام گاوسی پرسس (GP) گروڈر کی آزمائش کی گئی تھی جو، اگرچہ موفقیت کے ساتھ، بڑے ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ اچھی طرح استعمال نہیں کرتے۔ مٹی-کارلو ڈروپوٹ (MCD) کے مطابق مضبوطی کے لئے عمیق نیورال نیورال نیٹ ورک (DNN) بھی استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ This paper proposes a new method to produce uncertainty and compare it to GPS and DNN with MCD. پیشنهاد کی طریقہ صریح طور پر DNN کی تعلیم دیٹوں پر کم غیر یقین رکھنے کی سفارش دیتی ہے اور عمدہ غیر یقین رکھنے کی وجہ سے۔ تجارت زبان امتحان سائنس (BULATS) کے ذریعے ڈیٹے پر عمل کیے گئے آزمائش پر، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ MCD کے ساتھ GPS اور DNN کو مضبوطی کے بغیر معلوم انکار کے ساتھ کامل کرنا پائی جاتی ہے جب تک مقایسہ طریقہ کی فعالیت پہنچ جاتی ہے۔', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්වාසයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් වැඩ මේ පද්ධතියේ ඇතුළත් දත්තේ ලොකු වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ඕනේ ඇතුළත් පද්ධතිය සහ L1s සහ ASR වලින් වැරදියට. සමහර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරත ඉහළ ස්ටේක්ස් පරීක්ෂණාවට ඒක අවශ්\u200dයයි වගේ පද්ධතියට හොඳ විදියට විතරක් නෙවෙයි, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක මුලින් වැඩේ ගෝසියාන් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව (GP) ක්\u200dරීඩාර්ස් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මුලින් දත්ත සැට් එක්ක හ මොන්ට්- කාර්ලෝ ඩ්\u200dරොපූට (MCD) භාවිතා කරන්න බැරි නිර්දේශ ජාලය (DNN) වගේම භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පැත්තේ නිර්දේශ විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒක MCD එක්ක GPs සහ DNN එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් DNN එක ඉගෙන ගන්නවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දත්ත සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ න ව්\u200dයාපාර භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණ සේවාව (BULATS) නිසා දත්ත පරීක්ෂණාවට පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ GPs සහ DNN', 'uz': "Ingliz tilidagi imkoniyatlarni avtomatik tasavvur qilish talab qilinadi. @ info: whatsthis Baʼzi kandalar taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar to ʻgʻri bo'ladi, kutilgan darajadagi haqiqiqiyligini kamaytirish. Buyuk tajribalar uchun bu tizimlar faqat yaxshi darajaga o'xshash kerak, balki ularning kutilgan hozirga haqiqatgina narsalarni qo'shish mumkin. @ info Comment Ushbu qogʻoz haqiqatgina ishga tushirish uchun novel usulini tahrirlash va u GPs va DNNS bilan MCD bilan moslash mumkin. The proposed approach explicitly teaches a DNN to have low uncertainty on training data and high uncertainty on generated artificial data.  Name", 'vi': 'Nhu cầu được đánh giá tự động khả năng sử dụng tiếng Anh. Những hệ thống này cần phải xử lý những biến đổi lớn trong dữ liệu nhập do có rất nhiều khả năng ứng cử viên và địa chỉ thông tin, và lỗi từ ASR. Một số ứng viên sẽ không phù hợp với dữ liệu về huấn luyện, và sẽ làm mất giá trị của cấp bậc dự đoán. Đối với những thử thách lớn, đó là điều cần thiết cho các hệ thống không chỉ đánh giá tốt, mà còn cung cấp cho họ một thước đo sự mơ hồ trong dự đoán của họ, cho phép lọc con người bị từ chối. Những nghiên cứu trước đã được kiểm tra các phân loại kiểu Gauss (GP) mà, mặc dù thành công, không được áp dụng cẩn với các bộ dữ liệu lớn. Mạng thần kinh sâu (DNS) có thể được dùng để cung cấp sự mơ hồ nhờ Monte-Carlo Giảm (MCD). Tờ giấy này đề xuất một phương pháp mới để tạo sự mơ hồ và so sánh nó với GPs và DNS với MCD. Cách tiếp cận đã đề nghị rõ ràng dạy một nhóm DNS về những dữ liệu về huấn luyện và sự hoài nghi về dữ liệu nhân tạo. Đối với các thí nghiệm trên dữ liệu từ dịch vụ kiểm tra ngôn ngữ kinh doanh (BULatin) được tìm ra phương pháp đề xuất để vượt qua GPs và DNS với MCD trong việc từ chối dựa vào sự rủi ro, đồng thời đạt được trình độ phân loại tương xứng.', 'da': "Der er en stigende efterspørgsel efter automatisk vurdering af talt engelsk færdigheder. Disse systemer skal håndtere store variationer i input data på grund af den brede vifte af kandidatfærdighedsniveauer og L1'er og fejl fra ASR. Nogle kandidater vil være et dårligt match til træningsdatasættet, hvilket underminerer gyldigheden af den forventede karakter. Ved tests med høj indsats er det afgørende, at sådanne systemer ikke blot bedømmer godt, men også giver et mål for deres usikkerhed i deres forudsigelser, så menneskelige grader kan afvises. Tidligere arbejde undersøgte Gaussian Process (GP) grader, som, selvom succesfulde, ikke skalerer godt med store datasæt. Deep Neural Network (DNN) kan også bruges til at skabe usikkerhed ved hjælp af Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Denne artikel foreslår en ny metode til at skabe usikkerhed og sammenligner den med læger og DNN'er med MCD. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde lærer udtrykkeligt et DNN at have lav usikkerhed om træningsdata og høj usikkerhed om genererede kunstige data. På eksperimenter udført på data fra Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), vises det, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde overgår praktiserende læger og DNN'er med MCD i usikkerhedsbaseret afvisning, samtidig med at den opnår sammenlignelige karakteristika.", 'nl': "Er is een groeiende vraag naar automatische beoordeling van gesproken Engels vaardigheid. Deze systemen moeten grote variaties in invoergegevens verwerken als gevolg van de brede waaier van kandidaat vaardigheidsniveaus en L1's, en fouten van ASR. Sommige kandidaten komen slecht overeen met de trainingsdataset, wat de geldigheid van het voorspelde cijfer ondermijnt. Voor high stakes tests is het van essentieel belang dat dergelijke systemen niet alleen goed beoordelen, maar ook een meting geven van hun onzekerheid in hun voorspellingen, waardoor verwerping mogelijk wordt voor menselijke beoordelaars. Eerder werden Gaussian Process (GP) graders onderzocht die weliswaar succesvol zijn, maar niet goed opschalen met grote datasets. Deep Neural Network (DNN) kan ook worden gebruikt om onzekerheid te bieden met behulp van Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Dit document stelt een nieuwe methode voor om onzekerheid te genereren en vergelijkt deze met huisartsen en DNN's met MCD. De voorgestelde aanpak leert een DNN expliciet een lage onzekerheid over trainingsdata en een hoge onzekerheid over gegenereerde kunstmatige data te hebben. Op experimenten uitgevoerd op gegevens van de Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), blijkt dat de voorgestelde aanpak beter presteert dan huisartsen en DNN's met MCD in onzekerheidsgebaseerde afwijzing terwijl vergelijkbare grading prestaties behaalt.", 'hr': 'Postoji rastući zahtjev za automatsku procjenu govornog engleskog profila. Ovi sustavi moraju riješiti velike varijacije ulaznih podataka zbog širokog raspona razina kandidatskih vještina i L1s te greške iz ASR-a. Neki kandidati će biti siromašni odgovarajući kompletu podataka o obuci, potaknuti vrijednost predviđenog razreda. Za testove visokog uloga je ključno za takve sustave ne samo da dobro ocjene, nego i da pruže mjeru njihove nesigurnosti u njihovim predviđanjima, omogućavajući odbijanje ljudskim ocjenama. Prethodni rad je pregledao ocjene Gausijskog procesa (GP), koji, iako uspješno, ne skalaju dobro sa velikim podacima. Duboka neuronska mreža (DNN) može se također koristiti kako bi se osigurala nesigurnost koristeći Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Ovaj novinar predlaže novu metodu za pružanje nesigurnosti i uspoređuje ga s GPS-om i DNN-om s MCD-om. Predloženi pristup pojasno uči DNN da imaju nisku nesigurnost na podacima obuke i visoke nesigurnosti na proizvedenim umjetničkim podacima. U eksperimentima provedenim na podacima iz službe za ispitivanje poslovnih jezika (BULATS), predloženi pristup se nalazi kako bi se nadmašio GPS i DNN s MCD-om u odbacivanju na temelju nesigurnosti dok se ostvarilo usporedno postignuće učinkovitosti klasifikacije.', 'bg': 'Налице е нарастващо търсене на автоматична оценка на владеенето на говорен английски език. Тези системи трябва да се справят с големи вариации в входните данни поради широкия диапазон от нива на умения на кандидатите и L1s, както и грешки от ASR. Някои кандидати ще бъдат лошо съвпадение с набора от данни за обучение, което ще подкопае валидността на прогнозираната оценка. За тестовете с висок залог е от съществено значение тези системи не само да се оценяват добре, но и да се осигури мярка за тяхната несигурност в техните прогнози, което позволява отхвърляне на оценките на хората. Предишна работа разгледа оценители на Гаусия процес (ГП), които макар и успешни, не се мащабират добре с големи набори от данни. Дълбока неврална мрежа (DNN) може да се използва и за осигуряване на несигурност, като се използва Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). В настоящата статия се предлага нов метод за извличане на неопределеност и се сравнява с ГУ и ДНН с МКД. Предложеният подход изрично учи ДНН да има ниска несигурност по отношение на данните за обучение и висока несигурност по отношение на генерираните изкуствени данни. При експерименти, проведени с данни от Службата за изпитване на бизнес езици (BULATS), се установява, че предложеният подход превъзхожда GPs и DNN с MCD при отхвърляне въз основа на неопределеност, като същевременно постига сравними резултати по оценяване.', 'de': 'Es gibt eine wachsende Nachfrage nach automatischer Beurteilung der gesprochenen Englischkenntnisse. Diese Systeme müssen große Schwankungen in den Eingabedaten aufgrund der breiten Palette von Kandidatenleveln und L1 sowie Fehler aus ASR bewältigen. Einige Kandidaten passen schlecht zum Trainingsdatensatz, was die Gültigkeit der prognostizierten Note untergräbt. Für Tests mit hohem Einsatz ist es unerlässlich, dass solche Systeme nicht nur gut bewerten, sondern auch ihre Unsicherheit in ihren Vorhersagen messen, um eine Ablehnung für menschliche Grader zu ermöglichen. Frühere Arbeiten untersuchten Gaußan Process (GP)-Grader, die zwar erfolgreich sind, aber mit großen Datensätzen nicht gut skalieren. Deep Neural Network (DNN) kann auch verwendet werden, um Unsicherheit mit Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) zu erzeugen. Diese Arbeit schlägt eine neuartige Methode vor, um Unsicherheit zu erzeugen und vergleicht sie mit GPs und DNNs mit MCD. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz lehrt explizit eine geringe Unsicherheit über Trainingsdaten und eine hohe Unsicherheit über generierte künstliche Daten. Anhand von Experimenten, die mit Daten des Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) durchgeführt wurden, wurde festgestellt, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz GPs und DNNs mit MCD in unsicherheitsbasierter Abstoßung übertrifft und eine vergleichbare Benotungsleistung erzielt.', 'id': 'Ada permintaan yang meningkat untuk penilaian otomatis dari keterampilan bahasa Inggris berbicara. Sistem-sistem ini perlu menangani variasi besar dalam data input karena jangkauan lebar dari tingkat keterampilan kandidat dan L1s, dan kesalahan dari ASR. Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  Untuk tes taruhan tinggi adalah penting untuk sistem seperti itu tidak hanya untuk mengendalikan dengan baik, tetapi juga untuk memberikan ukuran ketidakpastian mereka dalam prediksi mereka, memungkinkan penolakan kepada para kelas manusia. Pekerjaan sebelumnya memeriksa grader Gaussian Process (GP) yang, meskipun berhasil, tidak skala dengan baik dengan set data besar. Jaringan Neural Dalam (DNN) juga dapat digunakan untuk menyediakan ketidakpastian menggunakan Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Kertas ini mengusulkan metode baru untuk memberikan ketidakpastian dan membandingkannya dengan GP dan DNN dengan MCD. pendekatan yang diusulkan secara eksplicit mengajarkan DNN untuk memiliki ketidakpastian rendah pada data pelatihan dan ketidakpastian tinggi pada data buatan yang dihasilkan. Pada eksperimen yang dilakukan pada data dari Servis Pengujian Bahasa Bisnis (BULATS), pendekatan yang diusulkan ditemukan untuk melampaui GP dan DNN dengan MCD dalam penolakan berdasarkan ketidakpastian sementara mencapai prestasi penilaian yang dapat dibandingkan.', 'ko': '영어 구어 수준을 자동으로 평가하는 수요가 갈수록 커지고 있다.이들 시스템은 후보자의 기능 수준과 L1 범위가 넓고 ASR에서 온 오류 때문에 입력 데이터의 거대한 변화를 처리해야 한다.일부 후보들은 훈련 데이터 집합과 일치하지 않아 예측 점수의 유효성을 떨어뜨릴 수도 있다.높은 리스크의 테스트에 있어 이런 시스템은 좋은 평가를 필요로 할 뿐만 아니라 예측에 불확실성의 도량을 제공하여 인류 평가원이 거절하도록 허용해야 한다.이전 작업에서는 고스 프로세스(GP) 채점기를 고찰했는데 성공했지만 빅데이터 집합에 잘 적응하지 못했다.심층신경망(DNN)은 몬테카로중퇴(MCD)를 사용해 불확실성을 제공하는 데도 사용될 수 있다.본고는 불확실성이 발생하는 새로운 방법을 제시하고 이를 MCD가 있는 GPS와 DNNs와 비교했다.제시된 방법은 DNN이 훈련 데이터에 대해 낮은 불확실성을 가지고 생성된 인공 데이터에 대해 높은 불확실성을 가진다는 것을 명확하게 가르친다.상업언어테스트서비스(BULATS)의 데이터에 대한 실험에서 제시된 방법은 불확실성 기반의 거부 측면에서 MCD 기반의 GPS와 DNN보다 우수하고 비교 가능한 평점 성능을 실현한 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'درخواست افزایش برای ارزیابی خودکار از دانش انگلیسی صحبت می\u200cکند. این سیستم\u200cها باید تغییرات بزرگی در داده\u200cهای ورودی به علت حفاظت وسیع سطح مهارت کاندیداتی و L1s و اشتباهی از ASR را کنترل کنند. بعضی کاندیدا با مجموعه اطلاعات آموزش ناتوانی می\u200cشوند، و به پایداری درجه پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cرسند. برای آزمایش بسیار بالا، برای این سیستم ها نه تنها درجه بسیار خوب است، بلکه نیز برای اندازه اندازه\u200cای از غیرقابلیت آنها در پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهایشان، که به درجه\u200cهای انسان انکار می\u200cکند، اجازه می\u200cدهد. کارهای قبلی درجه\u200cهای پردازش گاوسی (GP) را تحقیق کردند که با موفقیت با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ به خوبی مقیاس نمی\u200cکنند. شبکه عصبی عمیق (DNN) ممکن است از آن استفاده شود تا با استفاده از Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) مضطرب غیر مضطرب باشد. این کاغذ یک روش نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که مطمئن باشد و آن را با GPS و DNN با MCD مقایسه می\u200cکند. این دستور پیشنهاد دقیقاً DNN را آموزش می دهد که در اطلاعات آموزش و مطمئنی بالا در داده های مصنوعی تولید کند. در مورد آزمایش\u200cهایی که بر روی داده\u200cها از خدمت آزمایش زبان تجاری (BULATS) انجام می\u200cشود، این روش پیشنهاد برای انجام GPS و DNN با MCD در حال رسیدن عملکرد تدریج قابل مقایسه پیدا می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Kuna madai ya kuongezeka kwa kutathmini utafiti wa ufanisi wa Kiingereza. Mfumo huu unahitaji kukabiliana na tofauti kubwa katika takwimu za input kutokana na kiwango kikubwa cha ujuzi wa wagombea na viwango vya L1 na makosa kutoka ASR. Baadhi ya wagombea watakuwa ni mchezo mdogo wa takwimu za mafunzo, kwa kupunguza ukweli wa darasa la kutabiriwa. Kwa majaribio ya juu ni muhimu kwa mifumo kama hizi si tu ili kuhalalisha vyema vizuri, bali pia kutoa hatua ya kutokuwa na uhakika katika utabiri wao, na kusababisha kukataa vyeo vya wanadamu. Kazi zilizopita ilijaribu darasa la mchakato wa Gaussia (GP) ambalo, ingawa imefanikiwa, hawajapanga vizuri kwa seti kubwa za data. Mtandao wa ndani wa Neural (DNN) unaweza pia kutumika kutoa usio na uhakika kwa kutumia MCD ya Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Gazeti hili linapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutoa uhakika na kulinganisha GPs na DNN na MCD. Hatua hiyo ya pendekezo inafundisha wazi kuwa DNN ina usio na uhakika wa taarifa za mafunzo na usio na uhakika mkubwa kuhusu taarifa za kimapenzi. Katika majaribio yaliyofanywa na taarifa kutoka Huduma ya Ujaribu wa Lugha za Biashara (BULATS), mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinapatikana kufanya kazi za GPs na DNN na MCD kwa kukataa kwa usio na uhakika wakati wakifikia utendaji wa kiwango kinachofanana.', 'tr': "Iňlisçe gürleýän ukyplaryň awtomatik barlamasynyň gerekli bar. Bu sistemler girdi maglumatynda adatça ukyplaryň we L1leriň geniş derejesi we ASR'den hatalaryň üçin uly üýtgeşmeleri gerek. Käbir kandidýalar, bilim maglumatlaryň düzümlerini iň ýadaw eşleşer. Yüksek pikirler testileri üçin bu sistemalar üçin diňe gowy ýokamak däl, ýöne adam synpçylaryny boýunça alyp bilmek üçin bir ölçüsi hökmünde. Öňki faýllar Gaussian Process (GP) derejesi barlanypdyr. Bu faýllar uly maglumat düzümleri bilen bejerilmedi. Garym Näraral Aýry (DNN) Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) bilen ynamlyklygyny saýlamak üçin ullanyla biler. Bu kagyz ynamlygy täze etmek we GPS we DNN bilen MCD bilen karşılaştyrmak üçin bir täze yöntemi teklip edýär. Önerilen ýagdaý şol DNN-a üretilen ýaramaly maglumatlar üçin ýokary kesgitlik bolmagy we ýokary kesgitlik bolmagy mümkin edýär. Business Language Testing Servisi (BULATS) tarapyndan berilen suratlar üzerinde (data testing Servisi) görünýän deneylerde, bilimsiz derejesi üçin MCD bilen GPS we DNS-i kesinlikde ýüklemek üçin tassyklanýar.", 'sq': 'Ka një kërkesë në rritje për vlerësim automatik të aftësisë angleze të folur. Këto sisteme duhet të trajtojnë variacione të mëdha në të dhënat e hyrjes për shkak të nivelit të gjerë të aftësive kandidate dhe L1s dhe gabimeve nga ASR. Disa kandidatë do të jenë një përputhje të keqe me grupin e të dhënave të trainimit, duke dëmtuar vlerësinë e klasës së parashikuar. Për testet e rrezikut të lartë është thelbësore që sistemet e tilla jo vetëm të gradohen mirë, por gjithashtu të sigurojnë një masë të pasigurisë së tyre në parashikimet e tyre, duke i lejuar kundërshtimin klasifikuesve të njerëzve. Puna e mëparshme shqyrtoi graduesit e Procesit Gausian (GP) të cilët, megjithëse të suksesshëm, nuk shkallojnë mirë me grupe të dhënash të mëdha. Rrjeti Neural i thellë (DNN) mund të përdoret gjithashtu për të siguruar përdorimin e Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Ky dokument propozon një metodë të re për të sjellë pasiguri dhe e krahason me GPs dhe DNN me MCD. Përqasja e propozuar mëson shprehësisht një DNN të ketë pasiguri të ulët mbi të dhënat e trainimit dhe pasiguri të lartë mbi të dhënat e gjeneruara artificiale. Në eksperimentet e kryera mbi të dhënat nga Shërbimi i Testimit të Gjuhave të Biznesit (BULATS), metoda e propozuar gjendet të kalojë GP dhe DNN me MCD në kundërshtim të bazuar në pasiguri duke arritur performancë të krahasueshme të vlerësimit.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի աճող պահանջը խոսվող անգլերենի հմտության ավտոմատիկ գնահատման համար: Այս համակարգերը պետք է վերահսկեն մեծ տարբերությունները ներմուծման տվյալների մեջ, քանի որ թեկնածուների հմտությունների մակարդակները, L1s-ները և ASR-ի սխալները տարբերվում են: Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  Բավականին վտանգված փորձարկումների համար կարևոր է ոչ միայն լավ գնահատել այս համակարգերը, այլ նաև չափել նրանց անորոշությունը իրենց կանխատեսումների մեջ, ինչը թույլ է տալիս մերժել մարդկային գնահատողներին: Անցյալ աշխատանքը ուսումնասիրեց Գաուսիական պրոցեսի (GP) դասակարգերը, որոնք, չնայած հաջողությամբ, լավ չափեր չեն ունենում մեծ տվյալների համակարգերի հետ: Մոնտե-Կարլո Դրոպուտը (MCD) օգտագործելով կարող է նաև օգտագործվել խորը նյարդային ցանց (ԴՆՆ) անորոշակիության համար: Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է նոր մեթոդ անորոշության առաջացնելու և համեմատելու համար այն GP-ների և ԴՆԹ-ների հետ MCD-ի հետ: Առաջարկված մոտեցումը բացահայտորեն սովորեցնում է ԴՆԹ-ին ցածր անորոշություն ունենալ արտադրված տվյալների ուսումնասիրության և մեծ անորոշություն ստեղծված արհեստական տվյալների մասին: Բիզնես լեզվի թեստավորման ծառայության (Բուլաթս) տվյալների վրա կատարված փորձարկումների արդյունքում գտնվում է, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը գերազանցում է GP-ները և ԴՆԹ-ները MCD-ի հետ անորոշ հիմնված մերժման դեպքում, մինչդեռ համեմա', 'am': 'በንግግሊዝኛ አግባር ላይ የተናገረውን በአምባቢነት ማስታወቂያ የሚያስፈልገው ፈቃድ አለ፡፡ የአካባቢው እውቀት እና የL1 ስህተት እና ስህተት በመጠቀም ምክንያት እነዚህ ስርዓቶች በጥያቄ data ውስጥ ትልቅ ልውውጤቶችን ለመቀበል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  ለረጅም ግንኙነት ፈተናዎች ለዚህ ስርዓቶች ለመደገፍ ብቻ አይደለም፥ ነገር ግን ለመፍጠር የሚታወቁትን ስፍር እንዲያሰናክሉ ለሰው ደረጃዎች ለመጥለቅ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ የጋውስሲ ፕሮጀክት (GP) ተርጓሚዎች ላይ የተመረጠው ነው፡፡ የጥልቅ ኔural መረብ ይህ የሕትመት ግንኙነት አካባቢ ከGPs እና DNNs ጋር MCD እንዲያሳየው የኖላ ሥርዓት ያሳልፋል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የDNN ጥቅምነት የፍጥረት ዳታዎችን እና የፍጥረት መረጃዎችን በመፍጠር ላይ የሚያስፈልገው ነገር ግልጽን ያስተምራል፡፡ የንግድ ቋንቋ መፈተኛ አገልግሎት (BULATS) ከዳታ ላይ በሚደረገው ፈተናዎች ላይ የተዘጋጀው የGPs እና DNNs ከMCD ጋር በማስተካከል ግንኙነትን በመስጠት ግንኙነቱን በመስጠት ይታያል፡፡', 'af': "Daar is 'n groei versoek vir outomatiese vurdering van gespreek Engelske profiesiteit. Hierdie stelsels moet groot veranderinge in invoer data hanteer deur die wyde reek van kandidate kunstigheid vlakke en L1s en foute van ASR. Sommige kandidate sal 'n arme ooreenstem wees met die onderwerp data stel, onderwerp die geldigheid van die voorskoude grade. Vir hoë stappe toets is dit nodig vir sodanige stelsels nie alleen om goed te gradeer nie, maar ook om 'n maat van hul onbevestigheid in hul voorskoude te verskaf, wat die verwerking aan menslike graders kan doen. Vorige werk oorsoek Gaussian Proses (GP) graders wat, alhoewel suksesvol, nie goed skaal met groot data stelle nie. Deep Neuralnetwerk (DNN) mag ook gebruik word om onbevestigheid te verskaf deur Monte- Carlo Dropout (MCD). Hierdie papier voorstel 'n nuwe metode om onbevestigheid te gee en dit vergelyk met GPs en DNN met MCD. Die voorgestelde toegang leer uitsondelik 'n DNN om lae onbevestigheid te hê op onderwerking data en hoë onbevestigheid op genereerde kunstensielike data. Op eksperimente wat op data gedoen is van die Besigheidspraak Toetsdiens (BULATS), word die voorgestelde toegang gevind om GPs en DNS te uitvoer met MCD in onversekerheid-gebaseerde verwerking terwyl vergelykbaar graderingsprestasie bereik word.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কথা বলা ইংরেজির দক্ষতা সম্পর্কে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানানোর দাবি বাড়ছে। These systems need to handle large variations in input data owing to the wide range of candidate skill levels and L1s, and errors from ASR.  কিছু প্রার্থীরা প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সেটের সাথে খেলার খারাপ হবে এবং প্রত্যাশিত গ্রেডের বৈধতা কমিয়ে দেবে। উচ্চ পরীক্ষার জন্য এটি এই ধরনের সিস্টেমের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ নয় শুধুমাত্র ভালো শ্রেণীর জন্য, বরং তাদের ভবিষ্যতে তাদের নিশ্চিত পরিমাণ প্রদ পূর্ববর্তী কাজ গ্যাউসিয়ান প্রক্রিয়া (জিপি) গ্রেডার পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে, যারা যদিও সফল হয়েছে, তবে বিশাল তথ্য সেট দিয় গভীর নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (DNN) মোন্ট-কার্লো ড্রোপআউট (এমসিডি) ব্যবহার করার জন্য অনিশ্চিত ব্যবহার করা যাবে। এই পত্রিকাটি নিশ্চিতভাবে উৎপাদন করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাস পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করে এমসিডির সাথে GPs এবং DNNs এর তুলনা করে। প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ পরিষ্কারভাবে একটি ডিএনএন-কে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য এবং তৈরি করা শৈল্পিক তথ্য সম্পর্কে বেশী নিশ্চিত তথ্য নি ব্যবসা ভাষা পরীক্ষা সার্ভিস (বুলাটস) থেকে তথ্য নিয়ে পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষায় প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ প পাওয়া যাচ্ছে যে সমতুল্য গ্রেডিং কর্মসূচি পাওয়ার সময় জিপি এবং ড', 'az': 'İngilizə dilində danışan tərzlərinin avtomatik təcrübəsini artırmaq istəyir. Bu sistemlərin çox səviyyətlərin və L1lərin çox səviyyəsinə görə girdi məlumatlarında böyük dəyişiklikləri idarə etməsi lazımdır. Bazı kandidátlar təhsil verilənlərin quruluğuna zəif uyğunlaşacaqlar, təhsil edilmiş dərəcələrin dəyərliliğini a şağılaşacaqlar. Yüksek dəyişik sınaqları üçün bu sistemlərə yalnız yaxşı dəyişiklik vermək, ancaq onların tədbirlərində müəyyən edilməsi və insanların dəyişikliklərinə inkar etməyi mümkün olaraq məqsədildir. Önceki işin Gaussian Procesi (GP) səviyyələrini incidi ki, başarılı olaraq, böyük məlumat qurğuları ilə yaxşı dəyişdirmir. Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) vasitəsilə təhlükəsizlik etmək üçün daha böyük nöral Ağ (DNN) də istifadə edilə bilər. Bu kağıt inkar etmək və GPS və DNN ilə MCD ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edir. Təsdiq edilən tərzim təhsil təhsil məlumatları və ürəklənmiş sanatçı məlumatları barəsində yüksək təhlükəsizlik etməyi DNN təhsil edir. Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) verilən təcrübələrdə təcrübə edilmiş təcrübə üzərində MCD ilə GPS və DNN-ləri inkar edilməsi ilə müəyyən edilmə müddəti dəyişiklik təcrübəsini başa çatdırmaq üçün görünər.', 'ca': "Hi ha una demand a creixent de valoració automàtica de la habilitat anglesa parlada. Aquests sistemes han de gestionar grans variacions en les dades d'entrada degut a l'ampli gamma de nivells d'habilitats candidats i L1s, i errors d'ASR. Alguns candidats estaran malament compatibles amb el conjunt de dades d'entrenament, comprometent la validez del grau previst. For high stakes tests it is essential for such systems not only to grade well, but also to provide a measure of their uncertainty in their predictions, enabling rejection to human graders.  La feina anterior va examinar els classificadors del Proces Gaussí (GP) que, malgrat que tinguin èxit, no s'escalen bé amb grans conjunts de dades. La Deep Neural Network (DNN) també pot ser utilitzada per proporcionar incertituds fent servir Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Aquest article proposa un mètode nou per a produir incertituds i comparar-lo amb GPs i DNN amb MCD. L'enfocament proposat ensenya explícitament a un DNN a tenir baixa incertesa en les dades d'entrenament i alta incertesa en les dades artificials generades. En experiments fets amb dades del Servici de Tests de Llingua de Negocis (BULATS), es troba que l'enfocament proposat supera GP i DNN amb MCD en rebutge basat en incertituds, alhora que aconsegueix un rendiment de classificació comparable.", 'bs': 'Postoji rastući zahtjev za automatsku procjenu govornog engleskog profila. Ovi sistemi moraju podnijeti velike varijacije u podacima o ulazu zbog širokog raspona nivoa kandidatskih vještina i L1-a i grešaka iz ASR-a. Neki kandidati će biti siromašni odgovarajući sa setom podataka o obuci, potkopajući vrijednost predviđenog razreda. Za testove visokih uloga je ključno za takve sisteme ne samo da dobro ocenjuju, već i da obezbedi mjeru njihove nesigurnosti u njihovim predviđanjima, omogućavajući odbijanje ljudskim ocjenama. Prethodni rad je pregledao ocjene Gausijskog procesa (GP), koji, iako uspješno, ne skalaju dobro sa velikim setima podataka. Duboka neuronska mreža (DNN) može se također koristiti za pružanje nesigurnosti koristeći Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Ovaj papir predlaže novu metodu da donese nesigurnost i usporedi ga sa GPS-om i DNN-om sa MCD-om. Predloženi pristup pojasno uči DNN da ima nisku nesigurnost na podacima obuke i visoke nesigurnosti na proizvedenim umjetničkim podacima. U eksperimentima provedenim na podacima iz službe za testiranje poslovnog jezika (BULATS), predloženi pristup se nalazi kako bi se nadmašio GPS i DNN s MCD-om u odbacivanju na temelju nesigurnosti dok se ostvarilo usporedno postignuće učinkovitosti klasifikacije.', 'cs': 'Roste poptávka po automatickém posouzení mluvené angličtiny. Tyto systémy musí zvládnout velké rozdíly vstupních dat kvůli široké škále úrovní dovedností kandidátů a L1 a chybám z ASR. Někteří kandidáti budou špatně odpovídat souboru dat tréninku, což podkopá platnost předpokládané známky. U testů s vysokými sázkami je nezbytné, aby tyto systémy nejen dobře hodnotily, ale také poskytly měřítko jejich nejistoty ve svých predikcích, což umožňuje odmítnutí lidským hodnotícím. Předchozí práce zkoumala gradéry Gaussova procesu (GP), které se sice úspěšně nedaří škálovat s velkými datovými sadami. Hluboká neuronová síť (DNN) může být také použita k poskytnutí nejistoty pomocí Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). Tento článek navrhuje novou metodu, jak získat nejistotu a porovnává ji s GPs a DNN s MCD. Navržený přístup explicitně učí DNN mít nízkou nejistotu o tréninkových datech a vysokou nejistotu o generovaných umělých datech. Na experimentech provedených na datech z Business Language Testing Service (BULATS) bylo zjištěno, že navržený přístup překonává GPs a DNN s MCD v odmítnutí založeném na nejistotě při dosažení srovnatelného stupnění.', 'et': 'Kasvab nõudlus inglise keele oskuse automaatse hindamise järele. Need süsteemid peavad tegelema sisendandmete suurte erinevustega, kuna kandidaatide oskustasemed ja L1-d on laias valikus ning ASR-i vead. Mõned kandidaadid sobivad kehvasti koolitusandmetega, mis kahjustab prognoositava hinde kehtivust. Kõrgete riskidega testide puhul on oluline, et sellised süsteemid mitte ainult ei hindaks hästi, vaid annaksid ka hinnangute ebakindluse mõõtmise prognoosides, võimaldades hindajatel tagasi lükata. Eelmises töös uuriti Gaussi protsessi (GP) gradereid, mis, kuigi edukad, ei mahu suurte andmekogumitega hästi. Määramatuse tekitamiseks võib kasutada ka sügavat neurovõrku (DNN), kasutades Monte-Carlo loobumist (MCD). Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja uus meetod määramatuse saamiseks ja võrreldakse seda GPde ja DNN-dega MCD-ga. Kavandatud lähenemisviis õpetab selgesõnaliselt, et DNVl on koolitusandmete suhtes väike ebakindlus ja tekitatud kunstlike andmete suhtes suur ebakindlus. Ettevõtluskeele testimise teenuse (BULATS) andmetega läbiviidud katsete põhjal leiti, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab MCD-ga GPsid ja DNN-id määramatusel põhineva tagasilükkamise korral, saavutades samal ajal võrreldava hindamise tulemuslikkuse.', 'fi': 'Puhutun englannin taidon automaattiselle arvioinnille on kasvava kysyntä. Näissä järjestelmissä on käsiteltävä syöttötietojen suuria vaihteluja, koska hakijan taitotasot ja L1-tasot ovat laaja ja ASR-virheistä johtuvat. Osa ehdokkaista vastaa huonosti koulutustietoja, mikä heikentää ennustetun arvosanan pätevyyttä. Korkean panoksen testeissä on olennaista, että tällaiset järjestelmät eivät ainoastaan saa arvosanaa hyvin, vaan että niiden ennusteissa mitataan myös epävarmuutta, mikä mahdollistaa arviointien hylkäämisen. Aiemmassa työssä tarkasteltiin Gaussian Process (GP) -höylääjiä, jotka onnistuvatkin, mutta eivät skaalaudu hyvin suurten datakokonaisuuksien kanssa. Deep Neural Network (DNN) voidaan käyttää myös epävarmuuden tuottamiseen Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD) -toiminnolla. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta menetelmää epävarmuuden tuottamiseksi ja verrataan sitä GPs:iin ja DNN:iin MCD:llä. Ehdotetussa lähestymistavassa opetetaan nimenomaisesti, että DNN:llä on alhainen epävarmuus koulutustiedoista ja suuri epävarmuus tuotetuista keinotekoisista tiedoista. Business Language Testing Servicen (BULATS) datalla tehdyissä kokeissa ehdotetun lähestymistavan havaittiin olevan parempi kuin MCD:llä varustetut GPs- ja DNN-arvot epävarmuuteen perustuvassa hylkäämisessä samalla kun saavutetaan vertailukelpoinen luokitussuorituskyky.', 'jv': 'Rasané awak dhéwé karo perusahaan kanggo nggunakaké sawetara Perusahaan Inggris. Sistem iki kudu ngewehke buturan sing sampeyan akeh operasi ning data sing dikenalke nggo barang nggawe kapan mulalah sing sampeyan karo L1s, lan akeh barang ASR Perintah-perintah sing gak bakal terus sabên podho nggawe dadi nggawe, iso nggawe barang pengguna sing dirampakan nggawe gerakan. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing wis nggawe barang nggawe aturan sing bisa luwih apik, dadi iki ngono kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerayakno kanggo ngerayakno, iso nggawe ngupakan kanggo masara uwong. Workspace %d deep Neral Network (DNN) iso nggunakake kanggo ngerasakno nggo ngerasakno Gambar iki supoyo nganggo kuwi nyumbang kanggo ngerasakno lan nambah kuwi nggo GNU s karo DNNs karo MTD. Genjer-Genjer perusahaan kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan DNN kuwi ora bisa nguasai perusahaan data seneng nggawe barang seneng pisan seneng data alé Nanging peringatan surat sing gagalih nggambar data suku kelas Manual Test Language Server (BILATS), supoyo nggawe bener supoyo kanggo ngerayakno GNU karo DNNs karo MDD ora ngerasakno ora ngerasai perbudhakan winih antara sampeyan ngono nggawe gerakan kelas perusahaan anyar nggawe gerakan kelas nggawe gerakan.', 'ha': "Aka da yana ƙara tambayar ta ƙayyade abincin Ingiriya da ake faɗa farat ɗaya. Wannan na'ura sun buƙata su yi amfani da variantun girma cikin data cikin shirin ayuka, sabo da tsawo mai tsawo na zane-zane da kuma L1s, da kure daga ANR. Babu masu kandida za'a sami daidai da tsarin da aka yi amfani da shi, kuma suna ƙara gaskiyar daraja na gaba. Ji da jarrabi masu sarki, ana da muhimu wa'anar wannan na'ura, ba za'a sami tsarin su ba kawai, kuma amma dõmin a ƙayyade tsarin da ba'a sani ba a gabanin su, kuma yana son ya kange darajõji ga mutane. @ item license (short name) Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD).  Wannan takardar da ke buƙata wata hanyor node wa ya fitar da hakarta kuma ya sami da GPs da DNNS da MCd. Tsarin da aka karɓi ya bayana, yana sanar da DNN ya kasancẽwa na da hakki a kan data na zaman shawara da masu yaƙĩni da aka ƙãga data na fasihi. On jarrabo da aka samun bayani na data daga Shirin jarraba Lugha na Busy (BULETS), za'a sãmi aikin wanda aka yi niyyar a wajen gabatar da GPs da DNNS da MCD cikin kanana da ba'a da ba'a sani ba sami da ya sami gyare-gyare.", 'he': "יש דרישה גדולה להערכה אוטומטית של מיומנות אנגלית מדברת. מערכות אלה צריכות להתמודד עם שונות גדולות בנתונים הכניסה בגלל טווח רחב של רמות הכישורים המועמדים ו L1s, ושגיאות מ ASR. Some candidates will be a poor match to the training data set, undermining the validity of the predicted grade.  עבור בדיקות סיכונים גבוהים, זה חיוני עבור מערכות כאלה לא רק לצייד היטב, אלא גם לספק מידה של אי-בטוחותם בחזויות שלהם, מאפשר דחיתה לציידים האנושיים. העבודה הקודמת בדקה ציונים של תהליך גאוסי (GP) שאפילו שהצליחו, לא מגדילים היטב עם קבוצות נתונים גדולות. Deep Neural Network (DNN) may also be used to provide uncertainty using Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD).  העיתון הזה מציע שיטה חדשה כדי להביא אי-בטוחות ולהשוות אותה לג'י.פי.אס ודנ.אן.איי עם MCD. הגישה המוצעת מלמדת באופן ברור DNN שיש חוסר ביטחון נמוך על נתוני אימון וחסר ביטחון גבוה על נתונים מלאכותיים שנוצרים. בניסויים שעושים על נתונים משירות בדיקת שפת העסקים (BULATS), הגישה המוצעת נמצאת כדי להעביר את GPs ודי.אן.אן.איי עם MCD בהדחה מבוססת אי-בטוחות בזמן להשיג ביצוע ציונים שווה.", 'sk': 'Narašča se povpraševanje po avtomatičnem ocenjevanju govorjene angleščine. Ti sistemi morajo obravnavati velike razlike v vhodnih podatkih zaradi širokega razpona ravni spretnosti kandidatov in L1 ter napak zaradi ASR. Nekateri kandidati se bodo slabo ujemali z naborom podatkov o usposabljanju, kar bo ogrozilo veljavnost predvidene ocene. Pri preskusih z visokim vložkom je bistveno, da se taki sistemi ne samo dobro ocenijo, temveč tudi zagotovijo merilo njihove negotovosti v napovedih, kar omogoča zavrnitev človeških ocenjevalcev. V prejšnjem delu so preučevali merilnike Gaussian Process (GP), ki kljub uspešnim, ne merijo dobro z velikimi nabori podatkov. Globoko nevronsko omrežje (DNN) se lahko uporabi tudi za zagotavljanje negotovosti z uporabo Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD). V prispevku je predlagana nova metoda za pridobivanje negotovosti in jo primerja z GPs in DNN z MCD. Predlagani pristop izrecno uči DNN, da ima nizko negotovost glede podatkov o usposabljanju in visoko negotovost glede ustvarjenih umetnih podatkov. Na podlagi poskusov, izvedenih na podatkih službe za testiranje poslovnih jezikov (BULATS), je ugotovljeno, da predlagani pristop presega GPs in DNN z MCD pri zavrnitvi na podlagi negotovosti, hkrati pa dosega primerljivo ocenjevalno uspešnost.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཆེད་རིགས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་དགོས་ཀྱི་རེ་བ་ཞིབ་ཡོད། These systems need to handle large variations in input data owing to the wide range of candidate skill levels and L1s, and errors from ASR. ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཤས་ཆེན་ལ་ཉེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་སློབ་གྲྭར་གནང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་མཐུན་དང་། འཆར་གཞུང་གི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་མཐོ་རྩིས་མེད་པར་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ལས་ཀྱང་ཉེན་ཁོ་ན་ཡིན། སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱས་མེད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱིའི་མེ་འཁོར་མཐུད་དྲ་བ(DNN)དེ་ཡང་Monte-Carlo Dropout (MCD)སྤྱད་ནས་ངེས་པར་དྲན་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གམ་གཏོང་མེད་པ་དང་དེ་འདི་ GPs དང་DNNs་དང་MCD་དང་མཉམ་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གསལ་ནས་DNN་ལ་སྨོན་པར་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། On experiments conducted on data from the Business Language Testing Service (BULATS), the proposed approach is found to outperform GPs and DNNs with MCD in uncertainty-based rejection whilst achieving comparable grading performance.'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Dialectal Variability for Socially Equitable Language Identification', 'ar': 'دمج متغيرات اللهجات من أجل تحديد اللغة المنصف اجتماعيًا', 'es': 'Incorporar la variabilidad dialectal para la identificación del lenguaje socialmente', 'fr': 'Intégration de la variabilité dialectale pour une identification linguistique socialement équitable', 'pt': 'Incorporando a Variabilidade Dialetal para a Identificação da Linguagem Socialmente Equitativa', 'ja': '社会的に公平な言語識別のための方言変動性の組み込み', 'zh': '合方言变异性为世平言识', 'ru': 'Включение диалектальной вариабельности для социально справедливой языковой идентификации', 'hi': 'सामाजिक रूप से न्यायसंगत भाषा पहचान के लिए द्वंद्वात्मक परिवर्तनशीलता को शामिल करना', 'ga': "Ag Ionchorprú Inathraitheacht Chanúnach d'Aithint Teanga atá Cothromasach go Sóisialta", 'ka': 'სოციალურად განსხვავებელი ენის იდენტიფიკაციისთვის დიალექტური განსხვავება', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση διαλεκτικής μεταβλητότητας για κοινωνικά δίκαιη γλωσσική αναγνώριση', 'hu': 'Társadalmilag méltányos nyelvazonosításhoz szükséges dialektális változás beépítése', 'it': "Incorporare la variabilità dialettica per l'identificazione linguistica socialmente equa", 'kk': 'Жалпы тең тіл идентификациясының диалектикалық айнымалылығын ендіру', 'lt': 'Įtraukti dialektinį kintamumą socialiniu požiūriu lygiavertės kalbos identifikavimui', 'mk': 'Вклучувајќи дијалектна варијабилност за идентификација на социјално еднаков јазик', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹിക ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡയലേക്ടല്\u200d മാറ്റമാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн тэнцүү хэл танилцуулах диалектикийн өөрчлөлт', 'ms': 'Mengangkut Pembolehubah Dialeksi untuk Pengenalan Bahasa Persamaan', 'mt': 'L-Inkorporazzjoni ta’ Varjabbiltà Dijalettwali għall-Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Soċjali Ekwiġibbli', 'pl': 'Uwzględnienie zmienności dialektalnej dla społecznie sprawiedliwej identyfikacji języka', 'ro': 'Incorporarea variabilității dialecte pentru identificarea limbajului echitabil social', 'no': 'Inkorporering av dialektiske variabel for sosialt liknande språk- identifikasjon', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga luuqada sinnaanta ee bulshada', 'si': 'සාමාජිකව සමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සංවිධානය වෙනස්තුවක් සංවිධානය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Inkludera dialektisk variabilitet för socialt rättvist språkidentifiering', 'ta': 'Incorporating Dialectal Variability for Socially Equitable Language Identification', 'sr': 'Uključujući dijalektnu variabilnost za identifikaciju jezika društveno jednako', 'ur': 'اجتماعی برابری زبان شناسایت کے لئے دائیلوٹیل ویرئابلیٹ کے ساتھ شامل کیا جاتا ہے', 'vi': 'Cấu hình sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ cho nó xứng đáng', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Включване на диалектална променливост за социално справедлива езикова идентификация', 'da': 'Inddragelse af dialektisk variabilitet til socialt retfærdig sprogidentifikation', 'de': 'Einbeziehung dialekter Variablen zur sozial gerechten Sprachidentifikation', 'ko': '방언의 변이성을 결합시켜 사회의 공평한 언어 식별을 실현하다', 'id': 'Mengangkut Variabilitas Dialeksi untuk Identifikasi Bahasa Sosial Bersama', 'hr': 'Uključujući dijalektnu variabilnost za identifikaciju jezika društveno jednako', 'nl': 'Invoeren van dialectische variabele voor sociaal rechtvaardige taalidentificatie', 'tr': 'Tamamlardan Täzelikli Diller üçin Dialektik Çaşyrlygyny Girdir', 'sw': 'Kuingiza mabadiliko ya Kitambulia kwa Utambulishaji wa Lugha za Kijamii', 'sq': 'Incorporating Dialectal Variability for Socially Equitable Language Identification', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Dialeksieveranderlikes vir sosiale gelykbare taal Identifikasie', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'fa': 'شامل تغییرات دیلاکتی برای شناسایی زبان اجتماعی برابر', 'az': 'Ümumiyyətli Dil Kimlikləri üçün Dialektik dəyişiklik', 'hy': 'Սոցիալապես հավասար լեզվի հայտնաբերման դիալեկտալ տարբերակը ներառելով', 'bn': 'সামাজিক সমর্থিত ভাষার পরিচয়ের জন্য ডায়ালেক্টাল পরিবর্তন অন্তর্ভুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Incorporating Dialectal Variability for Socially Equitable Language Identification', 'bs': 'Uključujući dijalektičku variabilnost za identifikaciju jezika društveno jednako', 'fi': 'Dialektisen muuttujan sisällyttäminen sosiaalisesti tasapuoliseen kielentunnistukseen', 'cs': 'Zahrnutí dialektální proměnnosti pro sociálně spravedlivou identifikaci jazyka', 'et': 'Dialektilise muutuvuse lisamine sotsiaalselt õiglase keele identifitseerimiseks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vključevanje dialektne spremenljivosti za socialno pravično identifikacijo jezika', 'he': 'מכיל שינוי דיאלקטיבי לזהות שפה שווה באופן חברתי', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་ནུས་མཚུངས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink'}
{'en': 'Language identification (LID) is a critical first step for processing multilingual text. Yet most LID systems are not designed to handle the linguistic diversity of global platforms like Twitter, where local dialects and rampant code-switching lead language classifiers to systematically miss minority dialect speakers and multilingual speakers. We propose a new dataset and a character-based sequence-to-sequence model for LID designed to support dialectal and multilingual language varieties. Our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple LID benchmarks. Furthermore, in a case study using Twitter for health tracking, our method substantially increases the availability of texts written by underrepresented populations, enabling the development of socially inclusive NLP tools.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد اللغة (LID) خطوة أولى مهمة لمعالجة النص متعدد اللغات. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم أنظمة LID ليست مصممة للتعامل مع التنوع اللغوي للمنصات العالمية مثل Twitter ، حيث تفوت اللهجات المحلية ومصنفات اللغة الرئيسية التي تعمل على تبديل الأكواد بشكل منهجي المتحدثين بلهجات الأقليات والمتحدثين متعددي اللغات. نقترح مجموعة بيانات جديدة ونموذجًا قائمًا على التسلسل إلى التسلسل قائم على الأحرف لـ LID المصمم لدعم تنوع اللغات اللهجة ومتعددة اللغات. يحقق نموذجنا أداءً متطورًا على معايير LID المتعددة. علاوة على ذلك ، في دراسة حالة باستخدام Twitter للتتبع الصحي ، تزيد طريقتنا بشكل كبير من توفر النصوص المكتوبة من قبل السكان غير الممثلة تمثيلاً ناقصًا ، مما يتيح تطوير أدوات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية "الشاملة اجتماعيًا".', 'pt': 'A identificação de idioma (LID) é um primeiro passo crítico para o processamento de texto multilíngue. No entanto, a maioria dos sistemas LID não é projetada para lidar com a diversidade linguística de plataformas globais como o Twitter, onde os dialetos locais e a troca desenfreada de códigos levam os classificadores de idiomas a perder sistematicamente falantes de dialetos minoritários e falantes multilíngues. Propomos um novo conjunto de dados e um modelo de sequência a sequência baseado em caracteres para LID projetado para suportar variedades de idiomas dialetais e multilíngues. Nosso modelo alcança desempenho de última geração em vários benchmarks de LID. Além disso, em um estudo de caso usando o Twitter para rastreamento de saúde, nosso método aumenta substancialmente a disponibilidade de textos escritos por populações sub-representadas, permitindo o desenvolvimento de ferramentas de PNL “socialmente inclusivas”.', 'es': 'La identificación del idioma (LID) es un primer paso fundamental para procesar texto multilingüe. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los sistemas LID no están diseñados para manejar la diversidad lingüística de plataformas globales como Twitter, donde los dialectos locales y el desenfrenado cambio de código llevan a los clasificadores de idiomas a pasar sistemáticamente por alto a los hablantes de dialectos minoritarios y multilingües Proponemos un nuevo conjunto de datos y un modelo de secuencia a secuencia basado en caracteres para LID diseñado para admitir variedades lingüísticas dialectales y multilingües. Nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en múltiples puntos de referencia de LID. Además, en un estudio de caso que utiliza Twitter para el seguimiento de la salud, nuestro método aumenta sustancialmente la disponibilidad de textos escritos por poblaciones subrepresentadas, lo que permite el desarrollo de herramientas de PNL «socialmente inclusivas».', 'fr': "L'identification de la langue (LID) est une première étape essentielle pour le traitement de texte multilingue. Pourtant, la plupart des systèmes LID ne sont pas conçus pour gérer la diversité linguistique des plateformes mondiales telles que Twitter, où les dialectes locaux et le changement de code rampant conduisent les classificateurs de langues à ignorer systématiquement les locuteurs de dialectes minoritaires et les locuteurs multilingues. Nous proposons un nouveau jeu de données et un modèle séquence-séquence basé sur des caractères pour LID, conçu pour prendre en charge les variétés de langues dialectales et multilingues. Notre modèle atteint des performances de pointe sur plusieurs tests LID. De plus, dans une étude de cas utilisant Twitter pour le suivi de la santé, notre méthode augmente considérablement la disponibilité de textes écrits par des populations sous-représentées, permettant ainsi le développement d'outils de PNL «\xa0socialement inclusifs\xa0».", 'ja': '言語識別（ LID ）は、多言語テキストを処理するための重要な最初のステップです。しかし、ほとんどのLIDシステムは、Twitterのようなグローバルプラットフォームの言語的多様性を扱うようには設計されていません。地元の方言と横行しているコード切り替えは、言語分類を導き、マイノリティの方言話者と多言語話者を体系的に見逃すことにつながります。方言および多言語の言語の種類をサポートするように設計されたLIDの新しいデータセットおよび文字ベースのシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルを提案します。当社のモデルは、複数の蓋ベンチマークで最先端のパフォーマンスを実現しています。さらに、健康トラッキングのためにTwitterを使用したケーススタディでは、私たちの方法は、代表者不足の集団によって書かれたテキストの可用性を大幅に増加させ、「社会的に包括的な」NLPツールの開発を可能にします。', 'zh': '言语知识 (LID) 治多语言文本之要也。 然大抵LID系统非为理Twitter等全球台语多样性而设计者,于此台上,地方言及猖獗代码切换致言语分类系统地误少数方言使用者与多言使用者。 为LID建一新数集及字符之序,指赞方言多语变体。 我们的模样在多LID准测试中最先进的性能。 此外用Twitter康强踪迹之中,吾法大增代表性不足之可用性,而开世包容性之NLP具。', 'hi': 'भाषा पहचान (LID) बहुभाषी पाठ को संसाधित करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण पहला कदम है। फिर भी अधिकांश LID सिस्टम को ट्विटर जैसे वैश्विक प्लेटफार्मों की भाषाई विविधता को संभालने के लिए डिज़ाइन नहीं किया गया है, जहां स्थानीय बोलियों और बड़े पैमाने पर कोड-स्विचिंग लीड लैंग्वेज क्लासिफायर्स को व्यवस्थित रूप से अल्पसंख्यक बोली बोलने वालों और बहुभाषी वक्ताओं को याद करने के लिए डिज़ाइन नहीं किया गया है। हम एक नया डेटासेट और LID के लिए एक चरित्र-आधारित अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बोली और बहुभाषी भाषा किस्मों का समर्थन करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। हमारा मॉडल कई LID बेंचमार्क पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, स्वास्थ्य ट्रैकिंग के लिए ट्विटर का उपयोग करके एक मामले के अध्ययन में, हमारी विधि काफी हद तक कम प्रतिनिधित्व वाली आबादी द्वारा लिखे गए ग्रंथों की उपलब्धता को बढ़ाती है, जिससे "सामाजिक रूप से समावेशी" एनएलपी उपकरणों का विकास सक्षम होता है।', 'ru': 'Языковая идентификация (LID) является критически важным первым шагом для обработки многоязычного текста. Тем не менее, большинство систем LID не предназначены для обработки языкового разнообразия глобальных платформ, таких как Twitter, где местные диалекты и безудержные переключения кода ведут к тому, что классификаторы языков систематически скучают по носителям диалектов меньшинств и многоязычным носителям. Мы предлагаем новый набор данных и модель последовательности символов для ПКОЛ, предназначенную для поддержки диалектных и многоязычных языковых разновидностей. Наша модель достигает самых современных характеристик на нескольких эталонах КРЫШКИ. Кроме того, в тематическом исследовании с использованием Twitter для отслеживания состояния здоровья наш метод значительно увеличивает доступность текстов, написанных недопредставленными группами населения, что позволяет разрабатывать «социально инклюзивные» инструменты NLP.', 'ga': 'Is céim ríthábhachtach í sainaithint teanga (LID) chun téacs ilteangach a phróiseáil. Mar sin féin, níl an chuid is mó de na córais LID deartha chun éagsúlacht teanga na n-ardán domhanda cosúil le Twitter a láimhseáil, áit a mbíonn canúintí áitiúla agus aicmitheoirí teanga atá ró-luath chun cód a mhalartú le bheith caillte go córasach ar chainteoirí mionteanga agus ar chainteoirí ilteangacha. Molaimid tacar sonraí nua agus samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh bunaithe ar charachtar do LID atá deartha chun tacú le cineálacha teanga canúinteacha agus ilteangacha. Baineann ár múnla feidhmíocht den scoth amach maidir le tagarmharcanna iolracha LID. Ina theannta sin, i gcás-staidéar a úsáideann Twitter do rianú sláinte, méadaíonn ár modh go mór infhaighteacht na dtéacsanna scríofa ag daonraí tearcionadaithe, rud a chumasaíonn forbairt uirlisí NLP “cuimsitheach go sóisialta”.', 'ka': 'ენის იდენტიფიკაცია (LID) არის მრავალენგური ტექსტის გარეშე კრიტიკური პირველი ნაწილი. მაგრამ უფრო მეტი LID სისტემები არ განაზღვრებულია, რომელიც გლობალური პლატატურების სისტემისტიკური განსხვავება, როგორც ლოკალური დიალეკტები და პამპენტის კოდისტურის გადაცვლა სისტემისტიკური ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია და სიმბოლოების კონფიგურაციის მოდელი LID-ის განაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც დიალექტალური და მრავალური ენის განსხვავების ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება მრავალ LID ბანქმერის განმავლობაში. დამატებით, საკუთარი სწავლაში, რომელიც Twitter-ის გამოყენება სინამდვილეების შენახვედისთვის, ჩვენი მეთოდი ძალიან უფრო მეტივად გაზრუნდება ტექსტის ხელსახულობას, რომელიც შეუძლებელია საზოგად', 'hu': 'A nyelvazonosítás (LID) kritikus első lépés a többnyelvű szöveg feldolgozásához. A legtöbb LID rendszert azonban nem arra tervezték, hogy kezelje a globális platformok nyelvi sokszínűségét, mint például a Twitter, ahol a helyi dialektusok és a tomboló kódváltás a nyelvosztályozók szisztematikusan hiányzik a kisebbségi dialektus beszélők és a többnyelvű beszélők. Javasolunk egy új adatkészletet és egy karakter alapú szekvencia-szekvencia modellt a LID számára, amelyet a dialektuális és többnyelvű nyelvváltozatok támogatására terveztünk. Modellünk több LID referenciaértéken is korszerű teljesítményt ér el. Továbbá, egy Twitter egészségkövetésre használt esettanulmány során módszerünk jelentősen növeli az alulreprezentált populációk által írt szövegek elérhetőségét, lehetővé téve a "társadalmilag befogadó" NLP eszközök kifejlesztését.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση γλωσσών (LID) είναι ένα κρίσιμο πρώτο βήμα για την επεξεργασία πολυγλωσσικού κειμένου. Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα συστήματα LID δεν έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να χειριστούν τη γλωσσική πολυμορφία παγκόσμιων πλατφορμών όπως το Twitter, όπου οι τοπικές διαλέκτες και η ανεξέλεγκτη εναλλαγή κώδικα οδηγούν τους ταξινομητές γλωσσών να χάνουν συστηματικά τους ομιλητές της μειονοτικής διάλεκτος και τους πολύγλωσσους ομιλητές. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων και ένα μοντέλο αλληλουχίας-αλληλουχίας βασισμένο σε χαρακτήρες για την υποστήριξη διαλεκτικών και πολύγλωσσων γλωσσικών ποικιλιών. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πολλαπλά σημεία αναφοράς. Επιπλέον, σε μια μελέτη περίπτωσης που χρησιμοποιεί το Twitter για παρακολούθηση της υγείας, η μέθοδος μας αυξάνει σημαντικά τη διαθεσιμότητα κειμένων γραμμένων από υποεκπροσωπούμενους πληθυσμούς, επιτρέποντας την ανάπτυξη εργαλείων "κοινωνικά χωρίς αποκλεισμούς".', 'it': 'L\'identificazione linguistica (LID) è un primo passo fondamentale per l\'elaborazione del testo multilingue. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei sistemi LID non sono progettati per gestire la diversità linguistica di piattaforme globali come Twitter, dove dialetti locali e il dilagante cambio di codice portano i classificatori di lingue a perdere sistematicamente i dialetti minoritari e i parlanti multilingue. Proponiamo un nuovo dataset e un modello sequenziale-sequenziale basato sui caratteri per LID progettato per supportare varietà linguistiche dialettali e multilingue. Il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni all\'avanguardia su più benchmark LID. Inoltre, in un caso di studio che utilizza Twitter per il monitoraggio della salute, il nostro metodo aumenta notevolmente la disponibilità di testi scritti da popolazioni sottorappresentate, consentendo lo sviluppo di strumenti PNL "socialmente inclusivi".', 'lt': "Kalbos identifikavimas (LID) yra esminis pirmasis daugiakalbio teksto apdorojimo žingsnis. Vis dėlto dauguma LID sistemų nėra skirtos spręsti pasaulinių platformų, pavyzdžiui, Twitter, kalbų įvairovę, kurioje vietos dialektai ir nuolatiniai kodų keitimo pagrindiniai kalbų klasifikatoriai sistemingai praranda mažumų dialektų kalbėtojus ir daugiakalbius kalbėtojus. Siūlome naują LID duomenų rinkinį ir ženklais pagrįstą sekos po sekos model į, skirtą palaikyti dialektines ir daugiakalbes kalbų veisles. Mūsų modelis pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus pagal kelis LID lyginamuosius rodiklius. Furthermore, in a case study using Twitter for health tracking, our method substantially increases the availability of texts written by underrepresented populations, enabling the development of 'socially inclusive' NLP tools.", 'kk': 'Тіл идентификациясы (LID) көп тілді мәтінді өзгерту үшін бірінші қадам. Бірақ LID жүйелерінің көпшілігі Твиттер секілді жалпы платформалардың лингвистикалық түрлігін басқару үшін құрылмайды. Ол жергілікті диалекттер мен код ауыстыру тілдер классификациясының жүйелік түрлігі Біз диалектикалық және көп тіл түрлерін қолдау үшін LID үшін жаңа деректер жинағын және таңбалар негіздеген реттеу үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біздің моделіміз бірнеше LID бағдарламалардың күй- жайы әрекетін жеткізеді. Қосымша, Твиттерді саулық қадағалау үшін зерттеулерде, әдіміздің әдісіміз бағытталған мәтіндердің жеткізілігін көтереді, әлемдік қадағалау құралдарының жазылмауын мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Идентификацијата на јазикот (LID) е критичен прв чекор за обработување на мултијазичен текст. Сепак, повеќето системи на ЛИД не се дизајнирани за да се справат со јазичната различност на глобалните платформи како Твитер, каде локалните дијалекти и главните класификатори за промена на кодови систематски ги пропуштаат малцинските дијалектни говорници и мултијазичните говорници. Предложуваме нов набор на податоци и модел од секвенца до секвенца базиран на знаци за LID дизајниран за поддршка на дијалекталните и мултијазичните различности на јазикот. Нашиот модел постигнува најсовремена изведба на повеќе лиД референтни значки. Покрај тоа, во случајна студија со користење на Твитер за следење на здравјето, нашиот метод значително ја зголемува достапноста на текстови напишани од недопретставени популации, овозможувајќи развој на „социјално вклучиви“ НЛП алатки.', 'ms': "Pengenalan bahasa (LID) adalah langkah pertama kritik untuk memproses teks berbilang bahasa. Namun kebanyakan sistem LID tidak dirancang untuk mengendalikan pelbagai bahasa platform global seperti Twitter, di mana dialekt setempat dan pengtukar kod-penukar utama klasifikasi bahasa untuk secara sistematik melewatkan pembicara dialekt minoriti dan pembicara berbilang bahasa. Kami cadangkan set data baru dan model jujukan-ke-jujukan berdasarkan aksara untuk LID yang direka untuk menyokong variasi bahasa dialektal dan berbilang bahasa. Model kami mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada berbagai tanda referensi LID. Selain itu, dalam kajian kes menggunakan Twitter untuk pengesan kesehatan, kaedah kami meningkatkan kemungkinan teks yang ditulis oleh populasi yang tidak terkenal, membolehkan pembangunan alat NLP 'sosial inklusif'.", 'mt': "L-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa (LID) hija l-ewwel pass kritiku għall-ipproċessar tat-test multilingwi. Yet most LID systems are not designed to handle the linguistic diversity of global platforms like Twitter, where local dialects and rampant code-switching lead language classifiers to systematically miss minority dialect speakers and multilingual speakers.  Aħna nipproponu sett ta' dejta ġdid u mudell ta' sekwenza għal sekwenza bbażat fuq il-karattri għal LID iddisinjat biex jappoġġja varjetajiet ta' lingwi dijalettiċi u multilingwi. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq diversi punti ta’ riferiment LID. Barra minn hekk, fi studju ta’ każijiet li juża Twitter għall-monitoraġġ tas-saħħa, il-metodu tagħna jżid b’mod sostanzjali d-disponibbiltà ta’ testi miktuba minn popolazzjonijiet sottorappreżentati, li jippermetti l-iżvilupp ta’ għodod NLP “soċjalment inklużivi”.", 'ml': 'ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതു് (LID) പല ഭാഷ പദാവലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആദ്യ പടിയാണു്. എന്നിട്ടും ലിഐഡി സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേറെപ്പേരും ലോക്കല്\u200d പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളുടെ ഭാഷ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്നില്ല, അവിടെ സ്ഥാനമാ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാസെറ്റും ഒരു അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലും പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഡയലക് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ലിഡി ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം നേടുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരു കേസ് പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ട്രാക്കിങ്ങിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില', 'mn': 'Холбооны тодорхойлолт (LID) нь олон хэлний текст боловсруулахын тулд хамгийн чухал алхам юм. Гэхдээ ихэнх LID системүүд Твиттер шиг дэлхийн хэлний олон хэлбэрүүдийг зохицуулахын тулд зохицуулагдсан биш. Орон нутгийн диалектууд болон кодын хувьд хэлний хэлний хувьд бага зэрэг диалектууд болон олон хэлний илтгэгчид систем Бид диалектик болон олон хэл хэлний төрлүүдийг дэмжихийн тулд зохион бүтээгдэхүүний шинэ өгөгдлийн сангууд болон харьцааны дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын загвар өгдөг. Бидний загвар нь олон LID багц дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Твиттерийг эрүүл мэндийн даалгаврын тулд хэрэглэж буй нэгэн судалгаанд бидний арга нь сул төлөвлөгөөгүй хүмүүсийн бичигдсэн текстүүдийг ихэвчлэн нэмэгдүүлж, нийгмийн хамааралтай NLP хэрэгслүүдийг хөгжүүлж чадна.', 'ro': 'Identificarea limbii (LID) este un prim pas critic pentru procesarea textului multilingv. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea sistemelor LID nu sunt concepute să gestioneze diversitatea lingvistică a platformelor globale precum Twitter, unde dialectele locale și schimbarea de coduri dilagante determină clasificatorii de limbi să rateze sistematic vorbitorii de dialect minoritar și vorbitorii multilingvi. Propunem un nou set de date și un model secvență-la-secvență bazat pe caractere pentru LID conceput pentru a sprijini soiurile dialectale și multilingve de limbi. Modelul nostru atinge performanțe de ultimă generație pe mai multe criterii LID. Mai mult decât atât, într-un studiu de caz care utilizează Twitter pentru urmărirea sănătății, metoda noastră crește substanțial disponibilitatea textelor scrise de populații subreprezentate, permițând dezvoltarea unor instrumente PNL "social incluzive".', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja języka (LID) jest kluczowym pierwszym krokiem do przetwarzania tekstu wielojęzycznego. Jednak większość systemów LID nie jest zaprojektowana do obsługi różnorodności językowej globalnych platform, takich jak Twitter, gdzie lokalne dialekty i szalejące przełączanie kodu prowadzą klasyfikatory językowe do systematycznego braku mówców dialektu mniejszościowego i wielojęzycznych mówców. Proponujemy nowy zestaw danych oraz model sekwencji-do-sekwencji oparty na znakach dla LID zaprojektowany do obsługi dialektalnych i wielojęzycznych odmian językowych. Nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność w wielu standardach LID. Ponadto, w studium przypadku wykorzystującym Twittera do śledzenia zdrowia, nasza metoda znacznie zwiększa dostępność tekstów pisanych przez niedostatecznie reprezentowaną populację, umożliwiając rozwój narzędzi NLP "społecznie włączających się".', 'sr': 'Identifikacija jezika (LID) je kritičan prvi korak za obradu multijezičkog teksta. Ipak većina LID-ova sistema nisu dizajnirana da se bave jezičkim raznolikošću globalnih platformi kao što je Twitter, gde lokalni dijalekti i prebacivanje kodova predstavljaju vodeće jezičke klasifikatore sistematično propuštaju govornike manjinskih dijalekata i višejezičkih govornika. Predlažemo novu setu podataka i model koji je baziran na karakterima na sekvenci za LID dizajniran da podrži različite dijalektne i multijezičke jezike. Naš model postiže predstavu umjetnosti na višestrukim standardima LID-a. Nadalje, u slučaju ispitivanja korištenja Twitter za praćenje zdravlja, naša metoda značajno povećava dostupnost tekstova napisanih podpredstavljenim populacijama, omogućavajući razvoj "socijalno uključujućih" NLP alata.', 'si': 'භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය (LID) තමයි විශාල භාෂාවක් පාළුව සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පළමු පැත්තක්. නමුත් බොහෝ LID පද්ධතිය නොහැකි ජාතික ප්\u200dරවේශය වගේ භාෂාවික විවිධානය කරන්න, Twitter වගේ භාෂාවික විවිධානය කරන්න, ස්ථානික ඩායිලක්ට් සහ ව Name අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක තත්වයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට LID බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක පටන් ගන්නවා. තවත්, ස්වාස්ත්වය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ට්විටර් භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින්, අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් ලියපු පාළුවන් විශේ', 'so': "Aqoonsiga luqada (LID) waa tallaabo ugu muhiim ah marka loo baaraandegayo qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee nidaamka LID-ka badan looma sameeyo inay maamulaan jardiinada luuqadda kala duduwan oo caalamiga ah sida Twitterka, meesha ay ku qoran macluumaadka deegaanka iyo isbedela kooxaha luqada oo si kamid ah u baahan yihiin kuwa ku hadla luuqadaha yar iyo kuwa luuqadaha kala duduwan. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sawir cusub oo macluumaad ah iyo tusaale ku saleysan xaraf-iyo-soo-qaab, taasoo loo qoray in lagu caawiyo kala duduwan luuqadaha kala duduwan oo luuqadaha kala duduwan. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu sameyn karaa sameynta xaaladda farshaxanka oo ku saabsan bangiyo badan oo LID ah. Furthermore, in a case study using Twitter for health tracking, our method substantially increases the availability of texts written by underrepresented populations, enabling the development of 'socially inclusive' NLP tools.", 'sv': 'Språkidentifiering (LID) är ett viktigt första steg för att bearbeta flerspråkig text. Ändå är de flesta LID-system inte utformade för att hantera den språkliga mångfalden hos globala plattformar som Twitter, där lokala dialekter och utbredda kodbyten leder språkklassificerare till att systematiskt missa minoritetsdialekttalare och flerspråkiga talare. Vi föreslår en ny datauppsättning och en teckenbaserad sekvens-till-sekvensmodell för LID utformad för att stödja dialektiska och flerspråkiga språkvarianter. Vår modell uppnår toppmoderna prestanda på flera LID-riktmärken. I en fallstudie som använder Twitter för hälsospårning ökar vår metod dessutom avsevärt tillgängligheten av texter skrivna av underrepresenterade befolkningar, vilket möjliggör utveckling av "socialt inkluderande" NLP-verktyg.', 'ur': "زبان شناسایی (LID) multilingual text processing کے لئے ایک نہایت اہم قدم ہے. لیکن اکثر LID سیستموں کو ٹویٹر کی طرح کی زبان کی مختلفیت کے لئے طراحی نہیں کی جاتی، جہاں محلی دیالکت اور رمپانٹ کی کوڈ-سوچ کرنے والے زبان کلاسیر کو سیستماتیک طور پر چھوڑ دیے جاتے ہیں اور بہت سی زبان صحبت کرنے والوں کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نوی ڈاٹ سٹ اور ایک شخص-بنیاد سٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ک-سٹ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے LID کے لئے ڈائیلکتل اور بہت سی زبان مختلفوں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے طراحی کی۔ ہماری مدل بہت سی LID بنچمبارک پر موجود ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ایک مطالعہ میں توئیٹر کو سلامتی تراکینگ کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، ہمارا طریقہ بہت زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ کشائش کے ذریعے لکھے ہوئے پیغام کا موجودگی بڑھاتا ہے، جو 'اجتماعی شامل' NLP ابزار کی تولید کرتا ہے.", 'ta': "மொழி அடையாளம் (LID) பல மொழி உரையை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கான முதல் படி ஆகும். ஆனாலும் பெரும்பாலும் LID அமைப்புகள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்படவில்லை தொடர்பு போன்ற உலக மொழிகளின் மொழிப்பெரும்பாலான மொழிகளைப் பாதுகாப்பதற்காக வடிவமைக்கப்படவில்லை, அங நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பு மற்றும் ஒரு எழுத்து அடிப்படையான தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரி மாதிரியை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். இது டையல்கேட்டல் மற எங்கள் மாதிரி பல LID குறிப்புகளில் நிலையில் கலை செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது. மேலும், ஒரு விஷயத்தின் படிப்பாட்டில் 'சமூகத்தில் உள்ள 'NLP கருவிகள்' உரையை உருவாக்குவது பெரும்பாலாக அதிகரிக்கும்.", 'no': 'Språk- identifikasjon (LID) er ein kritisk første steg for å handsama fleirspråk tekst. Men dei fleste LID-systema er ikkje utforma for å handtera linguistiske mangfoldigheten av globale plattformar som Twitter, der lokale dialektar og rampant-omsetjing av kodeklassifikatorar for å systematisk mista minoritetstaler og fleirspråkstaler. Vi foreslår eit nytt dataset og eit teiknbasert sekvens- til- sekvensmodell for LID som er utforma for å støtta dialektiske og fleirspråk- variasjonar. Modellen vårt når det gjer ståande kunsten på fleire LID-benchmarker. I tilfelle med Twitter for helsesporing øker metoden vårt mykje tilgjengeleg tekstar skriven av underrepresenterte populasjonar, og kan utvikla «sosialt inkludert» NLP-verktøy.', 'vi': 'Nhận diện ngôn ngữ (LID) là bước đầu tiên quan trọng cho việc xử lý văn bản đa dạng. Tuy nhiên, đa số hệ thống LID không được thiết kế để giải quyết sự đa dạng ngôn ngữ của các platform to àn cầu như Twitter, nơi thổ ngữ và các phân loại ngôn ngữ phổ biến tràn lan dẫn đến nhớ thường xuyên các ngôn ngữ con số và các diễn giả ngôn ngữ đa dạng. Chúng tôi đề nghị một bộ dữ liệu mới và một mô hình dãy tự lập riêng cho LILO được thiết kế để nuôi dưỡng các loại ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngăm. Cách chúng tôi đạt được hiệu suất hiện đại nhất trên nhiều tiêu chuẩn LID. Hơn nữa, trong một nghiên cứu tình huống dùng Twitter để theo dõi sức khỏe, phương pháp của chúng ta tăng khả năng có nhiều văn bản được viết bởi dân số kém đại diện, cho phép phát triển các công cụ NLP.', 'uz': "Tilni aniqlash (LID) bir necha til matnni boshqarish uchun muhim birinchi qadam. Lekin, ko'pchilik LID tizimlari Twitter kabi dunyo platformlarining tillarini boshqarish uchun yaratilmagan emas. Bu yerda lokal dialeklar va kod- oʻzgartirib chiqishlar tizimni tizimda tizim qiladigan cheksiz tillar va ko'plab tillar tilida gapiruvchilarni yoʻqoladi. Biz dialektal va muloqat tillar tarkibini qoʻllash uchun LID uchun yangi maʼlumot set va belgi cheksiz modeli. Bizning modelimiz bir necha LID parametrlarida saqlash holatini bajaradi. Ko'rsatganda, Twitter yordamida tibbiy soʻzni taʼminlovchi bo'lgan foydalanuvchimiz, biz ko'paytirilgan odamlar yordamida yozilgan matnlarning imkoniyatlarini oshirish imkoniyatini oshirish imkoniyatini yordam beradi.", 'da': 'Sprogidentifikation (LID) er et kritisk første skridt til behandling af flersproget tekst. Alligevel er de fleste LID-systemer ikke designet til at håndtere den sproglige mangfoldighed på globale platforme som Twitter, hvor lokale dialekter og voldsomme kodeskift fører sprogklassificerere til systematisk at savne mindretalsdialekttalere og flersprogede talere. Vi foreslår et nyt datasæt og en tegnbaseret sekvens-til-sekvensmodel for LID designet til at understøtte dialektiske og flersprogede sprogsorter. Vores model opnår topmoderne ydeevne på flere LID benchmarks. Desuden øger vores metode i et casestudie med Twitter til sundhedssporing væsentligt tilgængeligheden af tekster skrevet af underrepræsenterede befolkninger, hvilket gør det muligt at udvikle "socialt inkluderende" NLP-værktøjer.', 'nl': "Taalidentificatie (LID) is een cruciale eerste stap voor het verwerken van meertalige tekst. Toch zijn de meeste LID-systemen niet ontworpen om de taaldiversiteit van wereldwijde platforms zoals Twitter aan te pakken, waar lokale dialecten en ongebreidelde code-switching ertoe leiden dat taalclassificatoren systematisch minderheidsdialectsprekers en meertalige sprekers missen. We stellen een nieuwe dataset en een karaktergebaseerd sequence-to-sequence model voor LID voor, ontworpen om dialectische en meertalige taalvariëteiten te ondersteunen. Ons model bereikt state-of-the-art prestaties op meerdere LID benchmarks. Bovendien vergroot onze methode in een casestudy met behulp van Twitter voor gezondheidstracking de beschikbaarheid van teksten geschreven door ondervertegenwoordigde bevolkingsgroepen aanzienlijk, waardoor de ontwikkeling van 'sociaal inclusieve' NLP-tools mogelijk wordt.", 'de': 'Die Spracherkennung (LID) ist ein wichtiger erster Schritt zur Verarbeitung mehrsprachiger Texte. Die meisten LID-Systeme sind jedoch nicht darauf ausgelegt, die sprachliche Vielfalt globaler Plattformen wie Twitter zu bewältigen, wo lokale Dialekte und weit verbreitete Code-Switching dazu führen, dass Sprachklassifikatoren systematisch Minderheitsdialektsprecher und mehrsprachige Sprecher vermissen. Wir schlagen einen neuen Datensatz und ein zeichenbasiertes Sequenzmodell für LID vor, das dialektale und mehrsprachige Sprachvarianten unterstützt. Unser Modell erreicht State-of-the-Art Performance auf mehreren LID Benchmarks. Darüber hinaus erhöht unsere Methode in einer Fallstudie mit Twitter für das Gesundheitstracking die Verfügbarkeit von Texten, die von unterrepräsentierten Bevölkerungsgruppen verfasst wurden, erheblich und ermöglicht die Entwicklung von "sozial inklusiven" NLP-Tools.', 'bg': 'Езиковата идентификация (ЛИД) е критична първа стъпка за обработката на многоезичен текст. Въпреки това повечето системи не са предназначени да се справят с езиковото многообразие на глобални платформи като Туитър, където местните диалекти и разгорещеното превключване на кодове водят класификаторите на езиците систематично да пропускат говорещите на малцинствени диалекти и многоезичните говорещи. Предлагаме нов набор от данни и модел, базиран на символи последователност към последователност, предназначен да поддържа диалектални и многоезични езикови разновидности. Нашият модел постига най-съвременно представяне на множество показатели за LID. Освен това, при проучване на случай, използващо Туитър за проследяване на здравето, нашият метод значително увеличава наличността на текстове, написани от недостатъчно представени популации, което позволява разработването на "социално приобщаващи" инструменти за НЛП.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija jezika (LID) je kritičan prvi korak za obradu multijezičkog teksta. Međutim, većina LID-ovih sustava nisu dizajnirani za rješavanje jezičkog raznolikosti globalnih platformi poput Twitter, gdje lokalni dijalekti i razmjenjivanje kodova predstavljaju vodeće jezičke klasifikatore sistematski propustiti govornike dijalekta manjina i višejezičke govornike. Predlažemo novu setu podataka i model koji bazira na karakterima sekvenciju do sekvence za LID koji je dizajniran za podršku različitih dijalektskih i višejezičkih jezika. Naš model postiže izvršnost umjetnosti na višestrukim standardima LID-a. Nadalje, u slučaju ispitivanja koristeći Twitter za praćenje zdravlja, naša metoda značajno povećava raspoloženje tekstova napisanih nedostavljenim populacijama, omogućavajući razvoj "socijalno uključujućih" alata NLP-a.', 'id': "Identifikasi bahasa (LID) adalah langkah pertama kritis untuk memproses teks multibahasa. Namun kebanyakan sistem LID tidak direncanakan untuk menangani kebanyakan bahasa platform global seperti Twitter, di mana dialekt lokal dan pemutar kode-pemutar utama klasifikasi bahasa untuk secara sistematis melewatkan pembicara dialekt minoritas dan pembicara berbilang bahasa. Kami mengusulkan set data baru dan model urutan-ke-urutan berdasarkan karakter untuk LID yang direncanakan untuk mendukung variasi dialektal dan berbagai bahasa. Model kita mencapai prestasi terbaik pada berbagai tanda referensi LID. Selain itu, dalam sebuah studi kasus menggunakan Twitter untuk melacak kesehatan, metode kami meningkatkan kemungkinan teks yang ditulis oleh populasi yang tidak terwakil, memungkinkan pembangunan alat NLP 'sosial inklusif'.", 'ko': "언어 인식(LID)은 다국어 텍스트를 처리하는 관건적인 첫걸음이다.그러나 대다수 LID시스템의 디자인은 트위터 등 글로벌 플랫폼의 언어 다양성에 대응하기 위한 것이 아니다. 트위터에서 현지 사투리와 창궐하는 코드 전환으로 언어 분류기는 소수민족 사투리 사용자와 다국어 사용자를 체계적으로 소홀히 했다.우리는 사투리와 다중 언어 변체를 지원하기 위해 LID에 새로운 데이터 집합과 문자 기반 서열 모델을 제시했다.우리의 모델은 여러 LID 기준에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현하였다.또한 트위터를 이용한 건강 추적 사례 연구에서 우리의 방법은 대표적으로 부족한 사람들이 쓴 텍스트의 가용성을 크게 높여'사회적 포용성'NLP 도구 개발에 도움이 되었다.", 'af': "Taal identifikasie (LID) is 'n kritiese eerste stap vir verwerking van multitaal teks. Nogtans is die meeste LID stelsels nie ontwerp om die lingwisiese verskeidigheid van globale platforme soos Twitter te hanteer nie, waar plaaslike dialekte en rampant kode-wissel lei taal klassifiseerders na sistematiese mis minoriteit dialekte sprekkers en multitaalse sprekkers. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe datastel en 'n karaktergebaseerde sequence-to-sequence model vir LID ontwerp om dialektiese en multilinguele taal verskillinge te ondersteun. Ons model bereik status-of-the-art prestasie op veelvuldige LID benchmarke. In 'n geval studie deur Twitter te gebruik vir gesondige agtervolg, verhoog ons metode die beskikbaarheid van teks wat deur ondersteunde populasie geskrywe is, en laat die ontwikkeling van 'sosially inklusief' NLP-nutsprogramme aanwend.", 'sw': "Language identification (LID) is a critical first step for processing multilingual text.  Hata hivyo, mifumo mingi ya LID haina lengo la kukabiliana na tofauti ya lugha za dunia kama Twita, ambapo wanazungumza na mabadiliko ya lugha ya maeneo ya maeneo yanayoongozwa na wataalamu wa lugha katika mfumo wa kawaida hupoteza wazungumzaji wa lugha za kidogo na wazungumzaji wa lugha mbalimbali. Tunazipendekeza seti mpya ya taarifa na muundo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa LID uliobuniwa kusaidia tofauti za lugha za lugha na lugha mbalimbali. Our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple LID benchmarks.  Zaidi ya hayo, katika utafiti wa kesi kwa kutumia Twita kwa ajili ya ufuatiliaji wa afya, mbinu yetu inaongeza kwa kiasi kikubwa upatikanaji wa maandishi yaliyoandikwa na idadi ya watu wanaoongozwa, na kusaidia maendeleo ya zana za 'zinajumuisha jamii' za NLP.", 'am': 'ቋንቋ ምረጡ ምንም እንኳን ብዙዎቹ የLID ስርዓቶች፣ የትዊተር የሚመስሉትን የዓለምአቀፍ ቋንቋዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን በተስማማማሚ ቋንቋዎች እና ብዙ ቋንቋዎች የሚናገሩትን ለመቀበል አይፈጠሩም፡፡ አዲስ ዳታተር ማሰናከል እና የፊደል ሥርዓት ለቋንቋ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎችን ለመደጋገም ለLID የተመሳሳይ እና የሥርዓት ቁጥር እና ለልዩ ቋንቋዎች ማሰናከል እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በብዛት የ.ለ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ በተጨማሪም፣ በትዊተር ለመድኃኒት ማሳየት በተጠቃሚ ትምህርት፣ የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት በአካባቢው ሕዝብ የተጻፈውን የጽሑፎችን ማግኘት ያበዛል፡፡', 'tr': "Dil tanyhmasy (LID) bir çoxli dil metini işlemek üçin critical adım. Ýöne Köp LID sistemalary dünýädäki platformlary Twitter ýaly dil görnüşinden çykarmak üçin tasarlanmaýar. Bu ýerde ýerleri dialektler we köp dil sözleşmeleri sistematik bilen az dialektler we köp dilli sözleşmeleri ýitirýärler. Biz LID üçin täze bir veri setir we karakterlere tabanly sequencer modelini teklip edip görýäris dialektal we multi diller dillerini desteklemek üçin. Biziň nusgamyz birnäçe LID sanat eserlerinde täze taýýarlar. Munuň üçin, bir durumda Twitter'i saglyk gözlemek üçin ulanan bir araşdyrymyz, biziň yönümimiz alçak adamlar tarapyndan ýazylan metinler bar, toplumda 'NLP dahil etmäge' kynçylyklaryň gelişmesine mümkin edýär.", 'sq': "Identifikimi i gjuhës (LID) është një hap i parë kritik për procesimin e tekstit shumëgjuhës. Megjithatë shumica e sistemeve LID nuk janë projektuar për të trajtuar diversitetin gjuhësor të platformeve globale si Twitter, ku dialektet lokale dhe klasifikuesit kryesorë të ndryshimit të kodeve për të munguar sistematikisht folësit e dialekteve të pakicave dhe folësit shumëgjuhës. Ne propozojmë një grup të ri të dhënash dhe një model sekuencë-në-sekuencë me karakter për LID të dizajnuar për të mbështetur varietetet dialektale dhe shumëgjuhësore gjuhësh. Modeli ynë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në pika të shumta LID. Përveç kësaj, në një studim rasti duke përdorur Twitter për gjurmimin shëndetësor, metoda jonë rrit thelbësisht disponueshmërinë e teksteve të shkruara nga popullsitë e nënpërfaqësuara, duke mundësuar zhvillimin e mjeteve NLP 'sociale përfshirëse'.", 'bn': 'মাল্টিভাষার লেখা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য ভাষা পরিচয় (LID) একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পদক্ষেপ। তবুও বেশীরভাগ LID সিস্টেম টুইটারের মত বিশ্ব প্ল্যাটফর্মের ভাষাগত বৈচিত্র্যমগুলোকে সামলাতে ব্যবস্থা করা হয়নি, যেখানে স্থানীয় ডায়ালেক্টর এবং কোড-পরিবর্তনের কোড আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট এবং একটি অক্ষর-ভিত্তিক সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা ডায়ালেক্টল এবং বহুভাষার ভাষার বৈচিত্র আমাদের মডেল বেশ কয়েকটি লিডি বেনমার্কের উপর রাষ্ট্রের প্রদর্শনীতে পারে। এছাড়াও, টুইটার ব্যবহার করে স্বাস্থ্য ট্র্যাকিং এর জন্য টুইটার ব্যবহার করে আমাদের মাধ্যমে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত জনসংখ্যাদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের লেখা লেখা', 'az': "Dil tanımlaması (LID) çoxlu dil metini işləmək üçün ilk adımdır. Halbuki çox LID sistemlərin Twitter kimi küresel platformların dillərinin müxtəlifliyini idarə etmək üçün müəyyən edilməmişdir. Yerli dialektlər və kodları dəyişən dil klasifikatorları sistematik olaraq küçük dialekt danışanlarını və çoxlu dil danışanlarını qeyb etmək üçün müəyyən edilmişdir. Biz yeni verilən qurğu və karakter-tabanlı sequence-to-sequence modeli təklif edirik. Diyalektal və çoxlu dil müxtəliflərini dəstəkləmək üçün dizayn edilmişdir. Bizim modellərimiz çoxlu LID benchmarklarında sanat performansını başa çatdırır. Daha sonra, Tövratı sağlamlıq izləməsi üçün istifadə edən bir təhsil olaraq, bizim metodumuz dəyişən nümunələr tarafından yazılmış məktubların faydalanmasını artırar və 'sosyal inkluziv' NLP vasitələrinin gelişməsini qabilleşirər.", 'ca': "L'identificació lingüística (LID) és un primer pas crític per processar text multilingüe. Però la majoria dels sistemes LID no estan dissenyats per gestionar la diversitat lingüística de plataformes globals com Twitter, on els dialectes locals i els classificadors de llenguatges principals que canvien de codi són sistemàticament faltants dels parlants de dialectes minoritàries i multilingües. Proposem un nou conjunt de dades i un model de seqüència a seqüència basat en caràcters per LID dissenyat per sostenir varietats dialectals i multilingües. El nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat en múltiples punts de referència LID. Furthermore, in a case study using Twitter for health tracking, our method substantially increases the availability of texts written by underrepresented populations, enabling the development of 'socially inclusive' NLP tools.", 'bs': 'Identifikacija jezika (LID) je kritičan prvi korak za obradu multijezičkog teksta. Međutim, većina LID-ovih sustava nisu dizajnirani za rješavanje jezičkog raznolikosti globalnih platformi poput Twitter, gdje lokalne dijalekte i prebacivanje kodova predstavljaju vodeće jezičke klasifikatore sistematski propustiti govornike dijalekta manjina i višejezičke govornike. Predlažemo novu setu podataka i model koji se bazira na karakterima na sekvenci za LID dizajniran za podršku različitih dijalektnih i multijezičkih jezika. Naš model postiže predstavu umjetnosti na višestrukim standardima LID-a. Nadalje, u slučaju ispitivanja koristeći Twitter za praćenje zdravlja, naša metoda značajno povećava dostupnost tekstova napisanih nedostavljenim populacijama, omogućavajući razvoj "socijalno uključujućih" alata NLP-a.', 'cs': 'Jazyková identifikace (LID) je klíčovým prvním krokem pro zpracování vícejazyčného textu. Přesto většina systémů LID není navržena tak, aby zvládla jazykovou rozmanitost globálních platforem, jako je Twitter, kde místní dialekty a šířivé přepínání kódů vedou klasifikátory jazyků k systematickému postrádání mluvčích menšinových dialektů a mnohojazyčných mluvčích. Navrhujeme novou datovou sadu a znakový model sekvence-to-sekvence pro LID navržený pro podporu dialektálních a vícejazyčných jazykových variant. Náš model dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu na více LID benchmarkech. Navíc v případové studii využívající Twitter pro sledování zdraví naše metoda výrazně zvyšuje dostupnost textů psaných nedostatečně zastoupenými populacemi, což umožňuje rozvoj "sociálně inkluzivních" nástrojů NLP.', 'fi': 'Kielitunnistus (LID) on tärkeä ensimmäinen vaihe monikielisen tekstin käsittelyssä. Useimmat LID-järjestelmät eivät kuitenkaan ole suunniteltu käsittelemään maailmanlaajuisten alustojen, kuten Twitterin, kielellistä monimuotoisuutta, jossa paikalliset murteet ja raivoava koodinvaihto johtavat kielten luokittelijat järjestelmällisesti kaipaamaan vähemmistömurteen puhujia ja monikielisiä puhujia. Ehdotamme uutta tietoaineistoa ja merkkipohjaista sekvenssimallia LID:lle, joka on suunniteltu tukemaan dialektisia ja monikielisiä kielivariaatioita. Mallimme saavuttaa huippuluokan suorituskyvyn useilla LID-vertailuarvoilla. Lisäksi Twitterin terveysseurantaan käyttämässä tapaustutkimuksessa menetelmämme lisää merkittävästi aliedustettujen väestöryhmien kirjoittamien tekstien saatavuutta, mikä mahdollistaa sosiaalisen osallistavan NLP-työkalun kehittämisen.', 'et': 'Keele identifitseerimine (LID) on mitmekeelse teksti töötlemisel esmatähtis samm. Ent enamik LID-süsteeme ei ole loodud selleks, et käsitleda keelelist mitmekesisust globaalsetes platvormides nagu Twitter, kus kohalikud murded ja levinud koodivahetus viivad keele klassifitseerijad süstemaatiliselt puudust vähemuste murdekõnelejatest ja mitmekeelsetest kõnelejatest. Pakume välja uue andmekogumi ja märgipõhise järjestuse mudeli LID jaoks, mis on loodud dialektiliste ja mitmekeelsete keelte erinevuste toetamiseks. Meie mudel saavutab tipptasemel jõudluse mitme LID võrdlusnäitaja puhul. Lisaks suurendab meie meetod oluliselt alaesindatud elanikkonna poolt kirjutatud tekstide kättesaadavust juhtumiuuringus, mis võimaldab arendada sotsiaalselt kaasavaid uue õppekava vahendeid.', 'hy': 'Լեզու հայտնաբերումը (ԼիԴ) բազլեզու տեքստի վերաբերյալ կարևոր առաջին քայլն է: Սակայն ԼիԴ համակարգերի մեծամասնությունը չեն նախագծված, որպեսզի վերահսկեն գլոբալ պլատֆորմերի լեզվաբանական բազմազանությունը, ինչպիսին է Թվիթերը, որտեղ տեղական դիալեկտները և անընդհատ կոդի փոխելու առաջնային լեզվի դասակարգերը սիստեմատիկ կորցնեն փո Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ և բնորոշ հաջորդականության կողմից հաջորդականության մոդել, որը նախագծված է դիալեկտալ և բազլեզու լեզվի բազմազանությունների աջակցությամբ: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է լավագույն արդյունքներին բազմաթիվ լիդի հարաբերականների վրա: Ավելին, Թվիթերի օգտագործման դեպքում առողջապահության հետևման համար մեր մեթոդը նշանակալիորեն բարձրացնում է թերներկայացված բնակչության կողմից գրված տեքստերի հասանելիությունը, ինչը հնարավորություն է տալիս զարգացնել "սոցիալական ներգրավող" ՆԼ', 'fa': 'شناسایی زبان (LID) اولین قدم مهم برای پرداخت متن چند زبان است. ولی اکثر سیستم\u200cهای LID برای کنترل گوناگونی زبان\u200cشناسی از platformهای جهانی مانند توئیتر طراحی نمی\u200cشوند، جایی که دایلکت\u200cهای محلی و تغییر کد\u200cشناسی کد\u200cشناسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی به سیستماتیک از صحبت\u200cکننده\u200cهای دایلکت\u200cهای ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید و یک مدل جدیدی برای LID که طراحی شده است برای پشتیبانی مختلف زبان\u200cهای دیالکتل و متعدد زبان\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. مدل ما به اجرای موقعیت هنری در تعداد زیادی LID رسیده است. علاوه بر این، در یک مطالعه با استفاده از توئیتر برای ردیابی سلامتی، روش ما بسیار زیادی دسترسی متن\u200cهایی که توسط جمعیت\u200cهای زیر نماینده\u200cشده\u200cاند نوشته شده\u200cاند، افزایش ابزارهای NLP «جامعه\u200cای شامل\u200cکننده» را افزایش می\u200cدهد.', 'sk': 'Identifikacija jezika (LID) je ključni prvi korak za obdelavo večjezičnega besedila. Vendar pa večina sistemov LID ni zasnovana za obvladovanje jezikovne raznolikosti globalnih platform, kot je Twitter, kjer lokalna narečja in divja zamenjava kod vodijo klasifikatorje jezikov, da sistematično zamudijo manjšinske narečja in večjezične govorce. Predlagamo nov nabor podatkov in model zaporedja do zaporedja znakov za LID, ki podpira dialektične in večjezične jezikovne različice. Naš model dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti na več merilih LID. Poleg tega naša metoda v študiji primera, ki uporablja Twitter za sledenje zdravju, bistveno povečuje razpoložljivost besedil, ki jih napišejo premalo zastopane populacije, kar omogoča razvoj "socialno vključujočih" orodij NLP.', 'he': 'זיהוי שפת (LID) הוא צעד ראשון קריטי לעבודה של טקסט רב-שפתי. אך רוב מערכות LID לא מעוצבות כדי להתמודד עם מגוון השפתיים של פלטפורמות גלובליות כמו טוויטר, שבו דיאלקטים מקומיים ומחליפים קודים מובילים מסווגים לשפת מובילים כדי לפספס באופן שיטתי את דוברי דיאלקטים של מעט ומדוברים רבות שפתיים. אנו מציעים קבוצת נתונים חדשה ומודל מבוסס על אופים רצף לרצף של LID המתכנן לתמוך במגווני שפה דיאלקטאליים ומרבות שפות. Our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple LID benchmarks.  חוץ מזה, במחקר מקרים בשימוש בטוויטר לאתר בריאות, השיטה שלנו מגבירה באופן משמעותי את זמינות הטקסטים שנכתבו על ידי אוכלוסיות מייצגות לא מוגבלות, מאפשרת הפיתוח של כלי NLP "חברתיים כוללים".', 'jv': 'name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggunakake data set tambah karo akeh sistem sing basa nang karakter-to-sekondi model kanggo LID gagal nggawe basa dialectal karo akeh akeh langgar sampeyan. Monday Digawe, barêng-barêng langêng nggambar Google kanggo ngilangno ngerasakno kanggo ngilangno nggawe perusahaan texti sing bisa enep nggawe populasi sing nêmên ngerasakno, iso nggawe ndhek iso nggawe perusahaan \'tambah pentar\' NLP.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག Yet most LID systems are not designed to handle the linguistic diversity of global platforms like Twitter, where local dialects and rampant code-switching lead language classifiers to systematically miss minority dialect speakers and multilingual speakers. We propose a new dataset and a character-based sequence-to-sequence model for LID designed to support dialectal and multilingual language varieties. ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དབྱིབས་LID འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྲོ་བ་ཡོད། ད་དུང་། ཕལ་ཆེར་ཞིག་གིས་ཌིསིར་ལྟ་སྟངས་བཙལ་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་མི་མང་པོའི་མི་སྐྱེས་པའི་མི་འབོར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད', 'ha': "Shaidar harshe (LID) yana da ƙẽtare na farko na muhimu wa yin aiki na matsayin multilala. Babu kuma ba a designe masu yawa na'urar LID don a yi manajan mulki-linguistic na fassarar abubuwan duniya kamar Twitter, a inda lokal masu shiryuwa da kuma masu buɗe kodi-na'ura na tsadiya lugha-na'ura, don a kasansa don su sava masu ƙarami da masu shiryarwa da ke cikin mulki-lingui. Tuna goyyade wani tsari na danne da wata misali mai daidaita matsayin-zuwa-sequence wa LID wanda aka yi design dõmin ya ƙarfafa wasu daban-daban da wasu harshe na'ura. Tuduniyarmu ya sami halin-sanar kan misalin mutane na LID. Furtheran, a cikin wani kashfa ya yi amfani da Twitter wa isticmani da shiryarwa wa afya, hanyoyinmu yana ƙara bayani da Tilayan matsayin da aka rubũta na ƙaranci populations, kuma yana yarda a ƙarfafa zanen 'jamii-included' na NLP."}
{'en': 'Evaluating Compound Splitters Extrinsically with Textual Entailment', 'ar': 'تقييم التقسيمات المركبة خارجيًا باستخدام الاستنتاج النصي', 'es': 'Evaluación extrínseca de separadores compuestos con implicación textual', 'fr': 'Évaluation extrinsèque des séparateurs composés avec implication textuelle', 'pt': 'Avaliando divisores compostos extrinsecamente com vinculação textual', 'ja': 'テキストエンテイメントを使用して化合物スプリッターを本質的に評価する', 'zh': '因文本内涵自外于角度评估复合器', 'hi': 'पाठ्य अनिवार्यता के साथ यौगिक विभाजक बाह्य रूप से मूल्यांकन करना', 'ru': 'Оценка составных сплиттеров внешне с текстовым влечением', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar Scoilteoirí Comhdhlúite go hEintreach le hEaráid Téacsúil', 'hu': 'Összetevő elosztók kiértékelése külsőleg textuális kiegészítéssel', 'el': 'Εκτίμηση σύνθετων διαχωριστών εξωτερικά με την κειμενική επεξεργασία', 'it': 'Valutazione dei separatori composti esternamente con miglioramento testuale', 'lt': 'Sudėtinių dalijimosi ekstremaliai su tekstiniu sutrikimu vertinimas', 'mk': 'Оценување на компонзираните поделеници екстринзички со текстуална болест', 'ms': 'Mengevaluasi Pembahagian Komponen secara Ekstransik dengan Kesakitan Teks', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ എന്\u200dടെക്സ്റ്റെല്ലെന്\u200dറുമെന്\u200dറുമായി ചൂണ്ടുള്ള ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്റ്റിന്\u200dറ് എക്സ്റ', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni ta’ Splitters Komposti b’mod Estrinżiku b’Malti Tekstivi', 'mn': 'Хоосон хуваагдагчийг текст бүтээгдэхүүнтэй үнэлгээ', 'no': 'Evaluerer samansett deleterar ekstrinsisk med tekstfullføring', 'pl': 'Ocena zewnętrznych rozdzielaczy złożonych za pomocą tekstowego wykończenia', 'kk': 'Тіркелген бөлгіштерді мәтіндік бөлгіштермен оқу', 'ro': 'Evaluarea separatoarelor compuse extrinzând cu extindere textuală', 'sr': 'Оценавање сложених разделитера екстринзично са текстуалним затвором', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qiimeynta qeybta koowaad', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av sammansatta splittrar extrinskt med textuell förstärkning', 'ur': 'ترکیب ترکیب ترکیب ٹیکسٹر کے ساتھ مطالعہ کیا جاتا ہے', 'ta': 'கூட்டத்தின் பிரிவுகளை விரிவாக உரையாடலுடன் மதிப்பிடுகிறது', 'ka': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đánh giá các bộ tách chắp vá Có cấu trúc kết cấu', 'da': 'Evaluering af sammensatte splittere eksternt med tekstuel udvidelse', 'nl': 'Extrinsiek evalueren van samengestelde splitters met tekstuele verfijning', 'bg': 'Оценка на съединените разделители екстринзично с текстово увиване', 'de': 'Extrinsische Bewertung von Compound Splittern mit textueller Veredelung', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Pemisah Komponen secara ekstrim dengan Kesakitan Teks', 'ko': '용어편은 외부 평가에서 복합분사를 내포하고 있다', 'fa': 'ارزیابی تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cهای ترکیب با تولید متن\u200c', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje rastavljača kombinacije ekstrinzički s tekstualnom kompletom', 'tr': 'Tamamlandyryşlary metin öňliki bilen deňlenýär', 'af': 'Geevalueer Gesamelekteerde Splitters Extrinsies met Textual Entailment', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Տեքստոլային հիվանդության հետ կապված բաժանումների գնահատումը', 'sw': 'Kupima vipande vya chini kwa kiasi kikubwa na Ujumbe wa Kiteknolojia', 'az': 'Kombinat Bölücüləri Textual Entailment ilə müxtəlif olaraq değerləşdirilir', 'bn': 'টেক্সটুয়াল ইমেন্টের সাথে মূল্যায়ন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje kompozicijskih razdvajača Extrinzički sa tekstualnom kompozicijom', 'ca': 'Evaluation Compound Splitters Extrinsically with Textual Disease', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i ndarjeve të kompozuara ekstremisht me probleme tekstuale', 'cs': 'Extrinzní hodnocení rozdělovačů sloučenin s textovým vylepšením', 'et': 'Kombineeritud lõikurite hindamine ekstriiniliselt tekstilise ühendusega', 'fi': 'Yhdistelmäsplittereiden arviointi ekstrinsiittisesti Textual Entailmentilla', 'jv': 'Validity', 'he': 'Evaluating Compound Splitters Extrinsically with Textual Entailment', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vrednotenje sestavljenih delilnikov ekstrinzično z besedilnim zavezovanjem', 'bo': 'མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Traditionally, compound splitters are evaluated intrinsically on gold-standard data or extrinsically on the task of statistical machine translation. We explore a novel way for the extrinsic evaluation of compound splitters, namely recognizing textual entailment. Compound splitting has great potential for this novel task that is both transparent and well-defined. Moreover, we show that it addresses certain aspects that are either ignored in intrinsic evaluations or compensated for by taskinternal mechanisms in statistical machine translation. We show significant improvements using different compound splitting methods on a German textual entailment dataset.', 'ar': 'تقليديا ، يتم تقييم المقسمات المركبة بشكل جوهري على بيانات قياسية ذهبية أو خارجيًا في مهمة الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية. نحن نستكشف طريقة جديدة للتقييم الخارجي للمقسمات المركبة ، وهي التعرف على الاستنتاج النصي. يحتوي التقسيم المركب على إمكانات كبيرة لهذه المهمة الجديدة التي تتسم بالشفافية والمحددة جيدًا. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أنه يعالج جوانب معينة إما يتم تجاهلها في التقييمات الجوهرية أو يتم تعويضها عن طريق الآليات الداخلية للمهمة في الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية. نعرض تحسينات كبيرة باستخدام طرق مختلفة للتقسيم المركب على مجموعة بيانات نصية ألمانية.', 'es': 'Tradicionalmente, los divisores compuestos se evalúan intrínsecamente en datos de referencia o extrínsecamente en la tarea de traducción automática estadística. Exploramos una forma novedosa para la evaluación extrínseca de los separadores compuestos, a saber, reconocer la implicación textual. La división de compuestos tiene un gran potencial para esta nueva tarea que es transparente y está bien definida. Además, demostramos que aborda ciertos aspectos que se ignoran en las evaluaciones intrínsecas o que se compensan con mecanismos internos de tareas en la traducción automática estadística. Mostramos mejoras significativas utilizando diferentes métodos de división compuesta en un conjunto de datos de implicación textual alemana.', 'fr': "Traditionnellement, les séparateurs composés sont évalués de manière intrinsèque sur des données de référence ou extrinsèquement sur la tâche de traduction automatique statistique. Nous explorons une nouvelle méthode d'évaluation extrinsèque des séparateurs composés, à savoir la reconnaissance de l'implication textuelle. Le fractionnement de composés présente un grand potentiel pour cette nouvelle tâche à la fois transparente et bien définie. De plus, nous montrons qu'il aborde certains aspects qui sont soit ignorés dans les évaluations intrinsèques, soit compensés par des mécanismes internes à la tâche dans la traduction automatique statistique. Nous montrons des améliorations significatives à l'aide de différentes méthodes de division composée sur un jeu de données d'implication textuelle en allemand.", 'pt': 'Tradicionalmente, divisores compostos são avaliados intrinsecamente em dados padrão-ouro ou extrinsecamente na tarefa de tradução automática estatística. Exploramos uma nova maneira para a avaliação extrínseca de divisores compostos, ou seja, reconhecendo a vinculação textual. A divisão composta tem um grande potencial para esta nova tarefa que é transparente e bem definida. Além disso, mostramos que ela aborda certos aspectos que são ignorados em avaliações intrínsecas ou compensados por mecanismos internos de tarefas na tradução automática estatística. Mostramos melhorias significativas usando diferentes métodos de divisão composta em um conjunto de dados de vinculação textual alemão.', 'ja': '伝統的に、化合物分割器は、ゴールドスタンダードのデータに本質的に評価されるか、または統計的機械翻訳のタスクに本質的に評価される。化合物分割器の外因性評価のための新たな方法、すなわち、テキストの巻き込みを認識する方法を探求する。複合分割は、透明で明確に定義されたこの新規タスクに大きな可能性を秘めています。さらに、統計的機械翻訳の内部メカニズムによって補償されるか、本質的評価で無視される特定の側面に対処することを示している。ドイツのテキストエンタテインメントデータセットでは、異なる化合物分割方法を使用して有意な改善を示しています。', 'zh': '古者,复合分路器质,以黄金为率,或以机器翻译计为质。 探复合分裂器外估新法,即识文本蕴涵。 复合分明有巨力。 此外明其决之,或内忽于评估,或计机器翻译于机补。 臣等于德语文本蕴涵数集上用不同复合拆分法见显改。', 'hi': 'परंपरागत रूप से, यौगिक विभाजकों का मूल्यांकन आंतरिक रूप से सोने के मानक डेटा पर या बाहरी रूप से सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद के कार्य पर किया जाता है। हम यौगिक विभाजकों के बाह्य मूल्यांकन के लिए एक उपन्यास तरीके का पता लगाते हैं, अर्थात् पाठ्य अनिवार्यता को पहचानते हैं। यौगिक विभाजन में इस उपन्यास कार्य के लिए बड़ी क्षमता है जो पारदर्शी और अच्छी तरह से परिभाषित दोनों है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि यह कुछ पहलुओं को संबोधित करता है जो या तो आंतरिक मूल्यांकन में अनदेखा कर दिए जाते हैं या सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद में कार्य-आंतरिक तंत्र द्वारा क्षतिपूर्ति की जाती है। हम एक जर्मन textual entailment डेटासेट पर विभिन्न यौगिक विभाजन विधियों का उपयोग कर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Традиционно составные сплиттеры оцениваются по данным золотого стандарта или по задаче статистического машинного перевода. Мы исследуем романный путь для внешней оценки составных разделителей, а именно распознавая текстовое влечение. Разделение компаунда имеет большой потенциал для этой новой задачи, которая одновременно прозрачна и четко определена. Более того, мы показываем, что он затрагивает определенные аспекты, которые либо игнорируются в внутренних оценках, либо компенсируются внутренними механизмами задач в статистическом машинном переводе. Мы показываем значительные улучшения с использованием различных методов разделения соединений на немецком наборе текстовых данных.', 'ga': 'Go traidisiúnta, déantar scoilteoirí cumaisc a mheas go bunúsach ar shonraí de chaighdeán óir nó go heintreach ar thasc an mheaisínaistriúcháin staidrimh. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar bhealach nua chun meastóireacht eistreach a dhéanamh ar scoilteoirí cumaisc, is é sin an t-eiteachas téacsúil a aithint. Tá cumas iontach ag scoilteadh cumaisc don tasc úr seo atá trédhearcach agus dea-shainithe. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go dtugann sé aghaidh ar ghnéithe áirithe a ndéantar neamhaird orthu i meastóireachtaí intreacha nó a gcúitítear astu trí shásraí tascanna inmheánacha san aistriúchán meaisín staidrimh. Léirímid feabhsuithe suntasacha trí úsáid a bhaint as modhanna éagsúla scoilteadh cumaisc ar thacar sonraí teagmhála téacs Gearmánach.', 'ka': 'Tradicionally, compound splitters are evaluated intrinsically on gold-standard data or extrinsically on the task of statistical machine translation. ჩვენ განვაკვირდებით პრომენტიური გზა, რომელიც ტექსტულური მოწყობილობას გამოსახულებელი გავაკვირდებით. შექმნილი გაყოფილება აქვს დიდი პრომენტი ამ პრომენტის დავალებისთვის, რომელიც both transparent and well-defined. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ის აღმოჩნდება განსაკუთრებული აპექტიკები, რომლებიც ინტერნექტური განსაკუთრებულებაში ან კონსპენსირებულებაში დავამუშავებული ჩვენ ჩვენ გაჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი უფლებები, რომლებიც გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული კომპუნეციის გაყოფილების მეტოვები გერმანეთის ტექსტულური მონაც', 'hu': 'Hagyományosan az összetett elosztókat alapvetően aranyszabású adatok alapján értékelik, vagy külső módon statisztikai gépi fordítás céljából. Az összetett osztók külső értékelésének új módját kutatjuk fel, nevezetesen a szöveges vonatkozás felismerését. Az összetett felosztás nagy potenciállal rendelkezik ehhez az új feladathoz, amely átlátható és jól meghatározott. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy olyan szempontokat foglalkozik, amelyeket vagy figyelmen kívül hagynak a belső értékelésekben, vagy kompenzálnak a statisztikai gépi fordítás feladatbeli mechanizmusai. Jelentős fejlődést mutatunk a különböző vegyületfelosztási módszerek alkalmazásával egy német szöveges vonatkozási adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Παραδοσιακά, οι σύνθετοι διαχωριστές αξιολογούνται εγγενώς σε δεδομένα χρυσού προτύπου ή εξωτερικά για το έργο της στατιστικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Ερευνούμε έναν νέο τρόπο για την εξωτερική αξιολόγηση των σύνθετων διαχωριστών, δηλαδή την αναγνώριση κειμένων. Η σύνθετη διάσπαση έχει μεγάλες δυνατότητες για αυτό το νέο έργο, το οποίο είναι διαφανές και σαφώς καθορισμένο. Επιπλέον, αποδεικνύουμε ότι αντιμετωπίζει ορισμένες πτυχές που είτε αγνοούνται στις εγγενείς αξιολογήσεις είτε αντισταθμίζονται από εσωτερικούς μηχανισμούς στη στατιστική μηχανική μετάφραση. Παρουσιάζουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικές μεθόδους διαχωρισμού σύνθετων ενώσεων σε ένα γερμανικό σύνολο δεδομένων περιεκτικότητας κειμένου.', 'it': 'Tradizionalmente, i separatori composti sono valutati intrinsecamente su dati gold-standard o estrinsecamente sul compito di traduzione automatica statistica. Esploriamo un modo nuovo per la valutazione estrinseca dei separatori composti, vale a dire riconoscere il coinvolgimento testuale. La divisione composta ha un grande potenziale per questo nuovo compito, trasparente e ben definito. Inoltre, dimostriamo che affronta alcuni aspetti che vengono ignorati nelle valutazioni intrinseche o compensati da meccanismi taskinternal nella traduzione automatica statistica. Abbiamo mostrato miglioramenti significativi utilizzando diversi metodi di suddivisione dei composti su un set di dati di implicazione testuale tedesco.', 'lt': 'Paprastai junginiai suskirstytojai vertinami iš esmės pagal aukso standartinius duomenis arba išoriniu požiūriu pagal statistikos mašinų vertimo užduotį. Mes ieškome naujo būdo išoriniam jungtinių padalijėjų vertinimui, būtent tekstinio įtraukimo pripažinimui. Sudėtinis pasidalijimas turi didelį galimybę atlikti šią naują užduotį, kuri yra skaidri ir aiškiai apibrėžta. Be to, mes parodome, kad jame nagrinėjami tam tikri aspektai, kurie arba yra ignoruojami atliekant vidaus vertinimus, arba kompensuojami atliekant statistinių vertimų mechanizmus. Mes parodome reikšmingus patobulinimus naudojant skirtingus sudėtinius suskaidymo metodus Vokietijos tekstinės įrangos duomenų rinkinyje.', 'mk': 'Традиционално, разделувачите на композиции се проценуваат внатрешно на златни стандардни податоци или надворешно на задачата на статистички машински превод. Истражуваме нов начин за екстринзичката проценка на комплексните разделувачи, имено признавањето на текстуалното вмешање. Композитното поделување има голем потенцијал за оваа нова задача која е транспарентна и добро дефинирана. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека се обраќа на одредени аспекти кои или се игнорирани во внатрешните проценки или се компензирани од внатрешни механизми во статистичкиот машински превод. We show significant improvements using different compound splitting methods on a German textual entailment dataset.', 'kk': 'Дәстүрлі бөлгіштері алтын стандартты деректеріне немесе статистикалық компьютердің аудармаларының тапсырмасына сыртқы мәлімет етеді. Біз тіркелген бөлгіштердің сыртқы оқу үшін, мәтіндік тапсырмаларын анықтау жаңа жолын зерттейміз. Біріктірілген бөлу үшін бұл жаңа тапсырманың көп мүмкіндігі бар. Бұл жаңа тапсырманың көлемі мен жақсы анықталған. Сонымен қатар, ол статистикалық машинаның аудармасындағы тапсырмалардың ішкі механизмтеріне қарай алмайтын кейбір аспектерін көрсетеді. Біз неміс мәтін тізімінің деректер жиынында әртүрлі тізімдерді бөлу әдістерін қолдану үшін маңызды жақсартуларды көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Secara tradisional, pemisah komponen diteliti secara dalaman pada data piawai emas atau secara luar pada tugas terjemahan mesin statistik. Kami mengeksplorasi cara baru untuk penilaian luar bagi pemisah komponen, iaitu mengenali penyelesaian teks. Pembahagian komponen mempunyai potensi besar untuk tugas novel ini yang kedua-dua transparan dan ditakrif dengan baik. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa ia mengatasi aspek tertentu yang sama ada diabaikan dalam penilaian dalaman atau dibayar oleh mekanisme dalaman tugas dalam terjemahan mesin statistik. Kami menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan menggunakan kaedah pembahagian campuran berbeza pada set data teks Jerman.', 'mt': 'Tradizzjonalment, il-qsim kompost jiġi evalwat intrinsikament fuq dejta standard tad-deheb jew esternament fuq il-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni statistiċi. Aħna nesploraw mod ġdid għall-evalwazzjoni esterna ta’ splitters komposti, jiġifieri r-rikonoxximent tal-involviment testwali. Compound splitting has great potential for this novel task that is both transparent and well-defined.  Barra minn hekk, naraw li tindirizza ċerti aspetti li jew jiġu injorati f’evalwazzjonijiet intrinsiċi jew ikkumpensati minn mekkaniżmi interni ta’ kompiti fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni statistiċi. We show significant improvements using different compound splitting methods on a German textual entailment dataset.', 'ml': 'സാഹചര്യത്തില്\u200d, സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസാധാരണ ഡേറ്റായിട്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വെറുതെയോ സ്റ്റാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന് We explore a novel way for the extrinsic evaluation of compound splitters, namely recognizing textual entailment.  ഈ നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയ്ക്കുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പിരിയുന്നതിന് വളരെ സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്. അത് സ്വകാര്യമായും നല്ല വിശദീകരിച്ചു അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു അത് കുറച്ചു വിഭാഗങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d അകത്തുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d  ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d മെന്\u200dറുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കോണ്\u200dഡ് വിഭജിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വളരെ', 'no': 'Tradisjonelt blir samanserte deleterar evaluert på gullstandartata eller ekstrinsic på oppgåva av statistisk maskinsomsetjing. Vi utforskar ein novel måte for ekstrinsk evaluering av komponente deleterar, som er gjenkjenning av tekstinnstillingar. Kombinerte deleting har stor potensial for denne noveloppgåva som er både gjennomsiktig og godt definert. I tillegg viser vi at det adresserer nokre aspektar som anten er ignorert i interne evalueringar eller kompensert av interne oppgåver i statistiske maskinsomsetjing. Vi viser signifikante forbedringar ved å bruka ulike komponentsdelementmetodar på eit tysk tekstinnstillingsdata.', 'mn': 'Харин ерөнхийдөө, холбоотой хуваагдагчид алт-стандарт өгөгдлийн тухай, эсвэл статистикийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын даалгаварын тухай үнэлгээ хийгддэг. Бид холбоотой хуваагдагчдын гадна дүгнэлтийн шинэ арга замыг судалж байна. Энэ нь текстур хөдөлгөөнийг хүлээн зөвшөөрдөг. Хамтдаа хуваалцах нь тодорхой болон тодорхойлогдсон шинэ даалгаварын тулд гайхалтай потенциал байдаг. Мөн бид энд статистикийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт хийх үйл ажиллагааны дотоод механизмуудын төлөө төлөөлөгдсөн зарим асуудлыг харуулж байна. Бид Германы текстур хэвлэлийн өгөгдлийн санг ашиглан өөр төрлийн хэвлэлийн аргыг ашиглан маш чухал сайжруулалт үзүүлдэг.', 'ro': 'În mod tradițional, splitterele compuse sunt evaluate intrinsec pe baza datelor gold-standard sau extrinsic pe sarcina traducerii automate statistice. Explorăm o modalitate nouă de evaluare extrinsă a splitterelor compuși, și anume recunoașterea implicării textuale. Divizarea compusă are un mare potențial pentru această sarcină nouă, care este atât transparentă, cât și bine definită. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm că abordează anumite aspecte care sunt fie ignorate în evaluările intrinsece, fie compensate de mecanisme taskinternale în traducerea automată statistică. Prezentăm îmbunătățiri semnificative utilizând diferite metode de divizare a compușilor pe un set de date de implicare textuală germană.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjnie dzielacze złożonych oceniane są intrynicznie na podstawie danych standardowych złota lub zewnętrznie w ramach zadania statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Badamy nowatorski sposób oceny zewnętrznej rozdzielaczy złożonych, a mianowicie rozpoznawania tekstowego związku. Podział związków ma ogromny potencjał dla tego nowatorskiego zadania, które jest zarówno przejrzyste, jak i dobrze zdefiniowane. Ponadto pokazujemy, że odnosi się ona do pewnych aspektów, które są albo ignorowane w ocenach wewnętrznych, albo kompensowane przez mechanizmy wewnętrzne zadań w statystycznym tłumaczeniu maszynowym. Pokazujemy znaczące ulepszenia stosując różne metody podziału złożonych na niemieckim zbiorze danych dotyczących implikacji tekstowej.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම, සම්පූර්ණ ස්ප්\u200dලිට්ටර්ස් සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය දත්ත හෝ ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්ම සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය පද්ධතිය පරිවා අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ නියම විදිහක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් විශ්වාස කරන් සම්පූර්ණ විතරයෙන් මේ කාලිකාව සඳහා විශේෂතාවක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඒක පාරදේශ සහ හොඳ තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක සමහර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා සිද්ධ විශ්නයක් ඇතුළු විශ්න අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විදියට ජර්මන් පාළුවන් තේරුම් සෙට් එක', 'sv': 'Traditionellt utvärderas sammansatta splittrar i sig utifrån guldstandard-data eller extrinsvist i samband med statistisk maskinöversättning. Vi utforskar ett nytt sätt för den yttre utvärderingen av sammansatta splitters, nämligen att erkänna textinvolvering. Sammansatt uppdelning har stor potential för denna nya uppgift som är både transparent och väldefinierad. Dessutom visar vi att den behandlar vissa aspekter som antingen ignoreras i inneboende utvärderingar eller kompenseras av arbetsinterna mekanismer i statistisk maskinöversättning. Vi visar betydande förbättringar med hjälp av olika metoder för sammansatt uppdelning på ett tyskt textdataset.', 'so': 'Inta caadiga ah waxaa si hoos ah loogu qiimeeyaa macluumaadka kaararka ah ee dahabka ama si gaar ah waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa shuqulka tarjumaadka machine. Waxaynu baaraynaa jid sawir ah qiimeynta firaaqada, taas oo ah aqoonsashada qofka qoraalka ah. Compound splitting has great potential for this novel task that is both transparent and well-defined.  Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in ay ka sheekaystaan qaar ka mid ah kaartaynta gudaha ama in loo magdhaweeyo meymisyada shaqaalaha oo lagu turjumayo takhasuska. Waxaannu hagaajinnaa horumar badan oo ku isticmaalaya qaabab kala duduwan oo lagu kala soocay qoraalka qoraalka ee Jarmalka.', 'sr': 'Tradicionalno, razdvajači kombinacije procjenjuju se unutrašnjost na zlatnim standardnim podacima ili ekstrinsicno na zadatku prevoda statističkih mašina. Istražujemo nov naèin za ekstrinsku procjenu razdvajača kombinacija, a to je priznanje tekstualne želje. Razdvajanje kombinacije ima veliki potencijal za ovaj novi zadatak koji je i transparentan i dobro definisan. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se obraća na određene aspekte koje su ili ignorisane u unutrašnjim procenama ili kompenzirane od strane unutrašnjih mehanizma zadataka u prevodu statističkih mašina. Pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje koristeći različite metode razdvajanja kompleksa na njemačkoj tekstualnoj kompleksi podataka.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரிய, கூட்டு பிரிப்பாளர்கள் தங்கமான- நிலையான தரவு அல்லது புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் செயல்பாட்டில் மதிப நாம் ஒரு புதிய வழியை தேடுகிறோம் கூட்டு பிரிப்பாளர்களின் வெளிப்பாட்டில் பிரிப்பாளர்கள் மதிப்பு, நெறிமுறை அறி கூட்டத்தை பிரிப்பது இந்த புதிய செயலுக்கு மிகவும் சிறப்பு ஆற்றல் உள்ளது அது தெளிவாக மற்றும் நன்றாக வரையறுக்கப மேலும், அது புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள சில விஷயங்களைக் குறிக்கிறது என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம நாம் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களைக் காட்டுகிறோம் ஜெர்மன் நிரல் தெரியாத தகவல் அமைப்பில் வேறு கூட்டு பிர', 'ur': 'پیدائمی طور پر، پیدائمی پیدائٹر سونے-استاندارڈ ڈیٹا یا خارجی طریقے سے استاندارڈ ماشین ترجمہ کے کام پر ارزش کیا جاتا ہے. ہم ایک نئی طریقہ کا انتظار کررہے ہیں جتنے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے کے خارج مقرر کرنے کے لئے، یعنی textual entailment کی پہچان کررہے ہیں. پیوند تقسیم کے لئے اس نوی کام کے لئے بہت بڑی امکانات ہے جو both transparent and well-defined ہے. اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ایک قسم کے منظور سے بات کرتا ہے جو یا اندھیرے ارزش میں غفلت کی جاتی ہیں یا ایسٹیسٹی ماشین ترجمہ میں دنیا کی اندھیری مکانیزوں کے ذریعہ مطابق کرتی ہیں۔ ہم ایک جرمانی ٹیکسٹ ٹیکسٹ یلنٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر مختلف ترکیب کے مطابق مختلف ترکیب کے مطابق بہت اضافہ کررہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Anʼanaviy, bir qismlarni qiymatlashtirish mumkin, gold- standard maʼlumotida yoki statistik mashina tarjima qilish vazifasida. Biz bir novel yoʻlini o'rganamiz, bu texnologiya ilmiy narsalarni aniqlashni anglatamiz. Compound splitting has great potential for this novel task that is both transparent and well-defined.  Ko'rib chiqqamiz, bu bir necha aspektlarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bu statistik mashina tarjima qilishda tashkinaviy mekanikani o'zgartirib chiqaradi. Biz faqat taʼminlovchi ma'lumotlar tarkibida bir xil kompyuterni ajratish usullarini ko'rsatumiz.", 'vi': 'Theo truyền thống, các mối nối được đánh giá theo bản chất bằng dữ liệu yêu cầu vàng hoặc cực kỳ phụ thuộc vào dịch vụ máy thống kê. Chúng ta tìm hiểu một cách mới tinh vị kiểm tra chính xác của một khúc gội, nhận ra thứ hoạch. Phân chia thành phần có tiềm năng lớn cho nhiệm vụ mới này, cả trong suốt và rõ ràng. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy nó đề cập đến một số khía cạnh bị bỏ qua trong phần đánh giá nội bộ hoặc được bồi thường bởi các cơ quan giao dịch chuyên khoa. Chúng tôi thấy một sự cải thách lớn bằng cách chia Pháp khác của một bộ giải trí văn hoạch Đức.', 'bg': 'Традиционно смесените сплитери се оценяват интензивно на златни стандарти данни или външно на задачата на статистически машинен превод. Изследваме нов начин за външна оценка на съединените сплитери, а именно разпознаване на текстово обвързване. Разделянето на съединения има голям потенциал за тази нова задача, която е едновременно прозрачна и добре дефинирана. Освен това показваме, че тя разглежда определени аспекти, които или се пренебрегват в присъщите оценки, или се компенсират от вътрешни задачи в статистическия машинен превод. Показваме значителни подобрения, използвайки различни методи за разделяне на съединения върху германски текстов набор от данни.', 'nl': 'Traditioneel worden samengestelde splitters intrinsiek geëvalueerd op basis van goudstandaardgegevens of extern op basis van statistische machinevertaling. We verkennen een nieuwe manier voor de extrinsieke evaluatie van samenstellingssplitters, namelijk het herkennen van tekstuele implicaties. Compound splitsing heeft een groot potentieel voor deze nieuwe taak die zowel transparant als duidelijk gedefinieerd is. Bovendien laten we zien dat het bepaalde aspecten aanpakt die ofwel genegeerd worden in intrinsieke evaluaties of gecompenseerd worden door taskinternale mechanismen in statistische machinevertaling. We laten significante verbeteringen zien met behulp van verschillende samengestelde splitsingmethoden op een Duitse tekstuele implicatiedatenset.', 'da': 'Traditionelt evalueres sammensatte splittere i sig selv på guld-standard data eller eksternt på opgaven med statistisk maskinoversættelse. Vi undersøger en ny måde til ekstrensisk evaluering af sammensatte splittere, nemlig anerkendelse af tekst involvering. Sammensætningsopdeling har et stort potentiale for denne nye opgave, der er både gennemsigtig og veldefineret. Desuden viser vi, at den omhandler visse aspekter, som enten ignoreres i iboende evalueringer eller kompenseres af opgaverneterne mekanismer i statistisk maskinoversættelse. Vi viser betydelige forbedringer ved hjælp af forskellige metoder til sammensætning på et tysk tekstdatasæt.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalno se razdvajatelji spojeva uvjetno procjenjuju na zlatno standardnim podacima ili ekstrinsicno na zadatku prevoda statističkih strojeva. Istražujemo nov način za ekstrinsku procjenu razdvajača kombinacija, a to je priznanje tekstualne želje. Razdvajanje kombinacije ima veliki potencijal za ovaj novi zadatak koji je i transparentan i dobro određen. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se obraća na određene aspekte koje su ili ignorirane u unutrašnjim procjenama ili kompenzirane unutrašnjim mehanizama zadatka u prevodu statističkih strojeva. Pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje koristeći različite metode razdvajanja spojeva na njemačkoj tekstualnoj skupini podataka.', 'ko': '전통적으로 복합분해기는 본질적으로 금표준 데이터에 따라 평가하거나 외부에서 통계기계 번역 임무에 따라 평가한다.우리는 복합분사에 대해 외부 평가를 하는 새로운 방법, 즉 문장의 내포를 식별하는 방법을 모색했다.화합물 분해는 투명하고 명확한 이 새로운 임무에서 커다란 잠재력을 가지고 있다.그 밖에 평가에서 무시되거나 통계기계 번역에서 내부 메커니즘에 의해 보상되는 부분도 해결했다고 밝혔다.우리는 독일어 텍스트에 포함된 데이터 집합에서 서로 다른 복합 분해 방법을 사용하는 현저한 개선을 보여 주었다.', 'de': 'Traditionell werden Compound Splitter intrinsisch auf Goldstandarddaten oder extrinsisch auf der Aufgabe der statistischen maschinellen Übersetzung ausgewertet. Wir erforschen einen neuartigen Weg zur extrinsischen Bewertung von Compound Splittern, nämlich das Erkennen von textuellen Implikationen. Das Compound Splitting hat großes Potenzial für diese neuartige Aufgabe, die sowohl transparent als auch klar definiert ist. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass es bestimmte Aspekte adressiert, die entweder in intrinsischen Bewertungen ignoriert oder durch taskinternale Mechanismen in der statistischen maschinellen Übersetzung kompensiert werden. Wir zeigen signifikante Verbesserungen mit verschiedenen Compound Splitting-Methoden auf einem deutschen textuellen Implementierungsdatensatz.', 'fa': 'به طور سنتی، ترکیب\u200cکننده\u200cهای ترکیب\u200cکننده\u200cهای ترکیب\u200cکننده\u200cها در داخل روی داده\u200cهای طلا استاندارد یا خارجی روی کار ترکیب ماشین آمار ارزیابی می\u200cشوند. ما روش نویسی برای ارزیابی خارجی از قطع\u200cکننده\u200cهای ترکیب، به عنوان تشخیص کردن متن، تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. تقسیم مجموعه برای این کار روشن و خوب تعریف پتانسیل بزرگی دارد. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که آن به عنوان برخی از نقطه\u200cهای مشخص صحبت می\u200cکند که یا در ارزیابی داخلی نادیده می\u200cشوند یا به عنوان مکانیسم داخلی کار در ترجمه ماشین آمار پاداش داده می\u200cشوند. ما با استفاده از روش\u200cهای جدا کردن ترکیب\u200cهای متفاوتی در مجموعه\u200cهای متن آلمانی بهترین\u200cها را نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Traditionally, compound splitters are evaluated intrinsically on gold-standard data or extrinsically on the task of statistical machine translation.  Tunapunguza njia ya riwaya kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa maeneo ya vigawanya, yaani kutambua maarifa ya kimsingi. Kugawanywa kwa kiasi kikubwa una uwezekano mkubwa wa kazi hii ya riwaya ambayo ni wazi na yenye ufafanuzi mzuri. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa inazungumzia masuala fulani ambayo ama hupuuzwa katika utafiti wa ndani au kulipiwa kwa njia za viwanda katika tafsiri ya mashine ya takwimu. Tunaonyesha maendeleo makubwa kwa kutumia njia tofauti za kutenganisha viungo katika seti ya taarifa za Kijerumani zinazofahamika.', 'id': 'Secara tradisional, pemisah komponen diteliti secara intrinsik pada data standar emas atau secara extrinsical pada tugas terjemahan mesin statistik. Kami mengeksplorasi cara baru untuk evaluasi ekstrinis dari pembagi komponen, yaitu mengenali keterlibatan teks. Pemisahan komponen memiliki potensi besar untuk tugas novel ini yang kedua transparan dan ditentukan dengan baik. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa hal ini mengatasi aspek tertentu yang baik diabaikan dalam evaluasi intrinsik atau dibayar oleh mekanisme taskinternal dalam terjemahan mesin statistik. Kami menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan menggunakan metode pembagian berbagai komponen pada set data tekstual Jerman.', 'tr': 'Adatça, birleşen bölümçiler altyn-standart maglumatynda ýa-da statistik maşynyň terjimesiniň görevi ýüzünde deňlenýärler. Birleşik parçalaryň çykyş deňlemesi üçin bir roman ýolyny keşfetýäris. Şu şekilde tekst çykyşyny tanaýar. Birleşen bölme üçin bu täze zadyň hem transparent hem gowy tanyş edilen täze zada örän möhüm potanslygy bar. Mundan soňra, biz munyň statistik maşynyň terjimesinde täze çözümlerde ýok edilen aýratynyň beýleki aspektlerini görkezýäris. Biz nemesçe metin daşaryşlygynda farklı tertibleme yöntemlerini ulanan möhüm gelişmeleri görkeýäris.', 'af': "Tradisjoneel word saamgekoppelde splitters intrinsiese uitgewerk op goud-standaard data of ekstrinsic op die taak van statistiese masjien vertaling. Ons ondersoek 'n nuwe manier vir die extrinsic evaluering van gemeenskappe splitters, naamlik herken tekstuele aanhouding. Kommuniseerde splitting het groot potensieal vir hierdie nuwe taak wat beide deursigtig en goed gedefinieerd is. Ook, ons wys dat dit sekere aspekte adreseer wat of in binneste evaluasies geïgnoreer word of gekompenseer word deur taak interne mekanisme in statistiese masjien vertaling. Ons wys betekende verbeteringe gebruik verskillende komponentsverdeeling metodes op 'n Duitse tekstuul verhouding datastel.", 'sq': 'Tradicionalisht, shpërndarësit e kompozitave vlerësohen në mënyrë të brendshme në të dhënat e standartit të arit apo jashtë në detyrën e përkthimit të makinave statistike. Ne eksplorojmë një mënyrë të re për vlerësimin ekstrinzik të ndarësve të përziera, veçanërisht njohjen e përfshirjes tekstuale. Ndryshimi i kompozuar ka potencial të madh për këtë detyrë të re që është transparente dhe e përcaktuar mirë. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se ajo trajton disa aspekte që ose janë injoruar në vlerësimet brenda ose kompensuar nga mekanizmat brenda detyrave në përkthimin e makinave statistike. Ne tregojmë përmirësime të rëndësishme duke përdorur metoda të ndryshme të ndarjes së përbërura në një set të dhënash tekstuale gjermane.', 'am': 'ባሕላዊው፣ የወርቅ-standard ዳታ ወይም በተለየው የstatistical machine ትርጓሜ በሚደረገው ስራ ላይ ግንኙነት የሚቆጠሩ ተቃራኒዎች፡፡ We explore a novel way for the extrinsic evaluation of compound splitters, namely recognizing textual entailment.  አካባቢ መፍታት ለዚህ አረንጓዴ አድራጊ ግልፅ እና ጥሩ መፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የስታኪናዊ ሚክኖችን በstatistical machine ትርጓሜ ውስጥ የተሳሳቱትን ወይም የተመሳሰለውን አንዳንዶችን ጉዳይ እንደሚያሳየው እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በጀርመን የጽሑፍ ማወቂያ ዳታተር ላይ የተለየውን የክፍለ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም ብዙ ጥቅምቶችን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Adətli olaraq, birləşdirilmiş bölümcülər altın-standart verilər və ya statistik makinatın çevirilməsi işində istifadə edilir. Biz birləşdirilmiş parçacıların extrinsic değerlendirməsi üçün yeni bir yolu keşfetirik, məsələlərin tərzini tanıyır. Kombinat bölüşünün bu yeni iş üçün böyük potensial var ki, hər ikisi açıq və yaxşı tanımlanmışdır. Daha sonra, biz göstəririk ki, o, statistik makinatın çevirilməsində işlər içəri mehānismi ilə mükafatlandırılmış bəzi aspektlərə baxır. Biz Almanca textual istifadə məlumatlarında müxtəlif birləşdirmə metodlarını istifadə edirik.', 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহীতভাবে স্বর্ণ-স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ডাটা বা পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদের কাজে বিভিন্ন ভাবে বিভক্ত করা হয়েছে। আমরা কোম্পান্ড বিভক্ত কর্মীদের বাইরে বিভিন্ন মূল্যের জন্য একটি উপন্যাস খুঁজে বের করি, যার মাধ্যমে টেক্সুয়াল বিভিন্ এই উপন্যাস কাজের জন্য সম্ভাবনা বিভক্ত হয়েছে যা স্বচ্ছতা এবং সুনির্দিষ্ট। এছাড়াও আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এটি বিশেষ কিছু বিষয়ের কথা বলে যাচ্ছে যা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন মেশিন অনুবাদে উপেক্ষ আমরা জার্মানী টেক্সচুয়ালেন্ট এনডাটাসেটে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কোম্পান্ড বিভক্ত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে গুরুত্বপূর্', 'hy': 'Հաճախ, համադրված բաժանիչները պարզապես գնահատվում են ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալների վրա կամ արտաքին առումով վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման խնդրի վրա: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք համադրված բաժանիչների արտաքին գնահատման նոր ձևը, հատկապես տեքստային ներգրավման ճանաչելը: Compound splitting has great potential for this novel task that is both transparent and well-defined.  Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն վերաբերում է որոշ ասպեկտներին, որոնք կամ անտեսվում են ներքին գնահատումներում, կամ փոխարինվում են վիճակագրական մեխանիզմների ներքին մեխանիզմներով: We show significant improvements using different compound splitting methods on a German textual entailment dataset.', 'bs': 'Tradicionalno se razdvajači spojenih procjenjuju unutrašnjost na zlatnom standardnom podacima ili ekstrinsicno na zadatku prevoda statističkih strojeva. Istražujemo nov način za ekstrinsku procjenu razdvajača kombinacija, a to je priznanje tekstualne želje. Razdvajanje kombinacije ima veliki potencijal za ovaj novi zadatak koji je i transparentan i dobro određen. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se obraća na određene aspekte koje su ili ignorirane u unutrašnjim procjenama ili kompenzirane od strane unutrašnjih mehanizma zadataka u prevodu statističkih strojeva. Pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje koristeći različite metode razdvajanja kompleksa na njemačkoj tekstualnoj kompleksi podataka.', 'ca': "Tradicionalment, els separadors composts s'evaluen intrínsecament en dades d'or o extrinsicament en la tasca de traducció estadística de màquines. Exploram una manera nova per a l'evaluació extrínsica dels separadors composts, a saber, reconèixer l'involucració textual. La divisió complexa té un gran potencial per a aquesta nova tasca que és tant transparent com ben definida. Moreover, we show that it addresses certain aspects that are either ignored in intrinsic evaluations or compensated for by taskinternal mechanisms in statistical machine translation.  Mostrem millores significatives fent servir diferents mètodes de divisió composta en un conjunt de dades alemanès d'involucració textual.", 'et': 'Traditsiooniliselt hinnatakse segupakkujaid lahutavalt kuldstandardi andmete põhjal või väliselt statistilise masintõlke ülesandel. Uurime uut võimalust komplektide ekstriiniliseks hindamiseks, nimelt tekstilise kaasamise tuvastamiseks. Kombineeritud jagamisel on suur potentsiaal selleks uudseks ülesandeks, mis on nii läbipaistev kui ka hästi määratletud. Lisaks näitame, et see käsitleb teatud aspekte, mida kas ignoreeritakse sisemises hindamises või kompenseeritakse statistilise masintõlke sisemise ülesandega. Näitame märkimisväärseid edusamme, kasutades erinevaid komplektide jagamise meetodeid saksa tekstilise kaasamise andmekogumil.', 'fi': 'Perinteisesti yhdistelmäjakajia arvioidaan luonnostaan kullanmuotoisten tietojen perusteella tai ulkoisesti tilastollisen konekäännöksen yhteydessä. Tutkimme uudenlaista tapaa erottajien ulkoiseen arviointiin, nimittäin tekstin merkittävyyden tunnistamiseen. Yhdistelmäjaottelulla on suuri potentiaali tähän uuteen tehtävään, joka on sekä läpinäkyvä että hyvin määritelty. Lisäksi osoitamme, että siinä käsitellään tiettyjä näkökohtia, jotka joko jätetään huomiotta sisäisissä arvioinneissa tai joita kompensoidaan tilastollisen konekäännöksen sisäisillä mekanismeilla. Esitämme merkittäviä parannuksia eri yhdistelmäjakomenetelmillä saksalaisessa tekstiviestiaineistossa.', 'cs': 'Tradičně jsou rozdělovače sloučenin hodnoceny intrinsicky na zlatých standardech nebo extrinzně na úkolu statistického strojového překladu. Zkoumáme nový způsob pro extrinsické hodnocení sloučeninových rozdělovačů, konkrétně rozpoznání textové implikace. Rozdělení sloučenin má velký potenciál pro tento nový úkol, který je transparentní a dobře definovaný. Navíc ukazujeme, že se zabývá některými aspekty, které jsou buď ignorovány při vnitřním hodnocení, nebo kompenzovány úlohovými interními mechanismy ve statistickém strojovém překladu. Ukazujeme významná zlepšení pomocí různých metod dělení složek na německém textovém datovém souboru.', 'jv': 'Tradisyonel Genjer-Genjer word Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih-luwih akeh seneng pisan sampeyan gambar nggambar sistem sing gak penting nggawe dataset textual input alam', 'sk': 'Tradicionalno se sestavljeni delilniki ocenjujejo intrinzično na podlagi zlatih standardnih podatkov ali zunaj pri nalogi statističnega strojnega prevajanja. Raziskujemo nov način za ekstrinzično vrednotenje sestavljenih cepilcev, namreč prepoznavanje besedilne posledice. Razdelitev spojin ima velik potencial za to novo nalogo, ki je pregledna in dobro opredeljena. Poleg tega pokažemo, da obravnava nekatere vidike, ki jih v notranjih vrednotenjih ignoriramo ali pa jih kompenziramo z naložbenimi notranjimi mehanizmi statističnega strojnega prevajanja. Prikazujemo pomembne izboljšave z uporabo različnih metod razdelitve sestavljenih spojin na nemškem besedilnem naboru podatkov.', 'ha': "Ana ƙidãya, an evaluce compound breakers a cikin bayani kan data na tsari na zĩnãriya ko a bayani kan aikin fassarar maɓallin takin. Tuna sami wani hani na nan zuwa ga muhimmada masu tsãgẽwa masu ƙaranci, kamar suna gane masu na takardar littãfi. Kuma rabin Compani yana da wani mai girma wa wannan aikin nan yanzu wanda za'a iya bayyane da mai bayyana. Kayya, Munã nuna cewa, ta sami wasu masu sakan da ko ba a ƙyale su a cikin muhimmada guda ko kuma ana cika wa masu taskintarnaini cikin fassarar masu ƙaranci. Tuna nũna masu kyauta mai girma da su yi amfani da shiryoyin rarrabe compound daban a kan tsarin mutane na rubũn da aka sani.", 'he': 'באופן מסורתי, מחלקים מתרכיבים מתערכים באופן טבעי על נתונים סטנדרטיים זהב או באופן חיצוני על משימה של תרגום מכונת סטטיסטיקה. אנו חוקרים דרך חדשה להערכה החיצונית של מחלקים מתרכבים, כלומר לזהות התערבות טקסטלית. לחלק המרכיב יש פוטנציאל גדול למשימה הרומנית הזו, שהיא גם שקופה וגם מוגדרת היטב. חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שהוא מתייחס לאינטרנטים מסוימים שהם או מתעלמים בהערכות פנימיות או מופרדים על ידי מנגנונים פנימיים משימה בתרגום מכונות סטטיסטיקה. אנחנו מראים שיפורים משמעותיים באמצעות שיטות נפרדות מרכיבים שונות על קבוצת נתונים של מידע טקסטולי גרמנית.', 'bo': 'Traditionally, compound splitters are evaluated intrinsically on gold-standard data or extrinsically on the task of statistical machine translation. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབུས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བསྡུར་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་ཚིག་ལ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཆ་ཆུང་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ནི་ལས་ཀ་གསར་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནུས་པ་ལ་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་རེད། Moreover, we show that it addresses certain aspects that are either ignored in intrinsic evaluations or compensated for by taskinternal mechanisms in statistical machine translation. ང་ཚོས་Aleman་ཡི་གེའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཚན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ།'}
{'en': 'Learning to Parse and Translate Improves Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'تعلم التحليل والترجمة يحسن الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'pt': 'Aprender a analisar e traduzir melhora a tradução automática neural', 'fr': "L'apprentissage de l'analyse et de la traduction améliore la traduction automatique neuronale", 'es': 'Aprender a analizar y traducir mejora la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '解析と翻訳を学ぶことで、神経機械翻訳が向上', 'zh': '学解析及译可改进神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Обучение анализу и переводу улучшает нейронный машинный перевод', 'hi': 'पार्स और अनुवाद करने के लिए सीखना तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में सुधार करता है', 'ga': 'Le Foghlaim Parsáil agus Aistriú a Fheabhsú Feabhsaítear Aistriú Meaisín Néarach', 'ka': 'შესწავლობა და გადაწყვეტილების შესაძლებელია ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტილება', 'hu': 'Az értelmezés és a fordítás megtanulása javítja a neurális gépi fordítást', 'it': 'Imparare a interpretare e tradurre migliora la traduzione automatica neurale', 'lt': 'Mokymasis analizuoti ir vertti gerina nervinių mašinų vertimą', 'mk': 'Учењето да се анализира и преведува го подобрува преведувањето на невралните машини', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk hurai dan terjemahan meningkatkan Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim għall-Analiżi u t-Traduzzjoni jtejjeb it-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлах болон хөгжүүлэх суралцах нь сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх', 'no': 'Læring for tolking og omsetjing forbetrar neuralmaskineomsetjing', 'pl': 'Nauka parsowania i tłumaczenia poprawia neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a analiza și traduce îmbunătățește traducerea automată neurală', 'sr': 'Naučenje za analizu i prevod poboljšava neuronski prevod mašine', 'si': 'විශ්ලේෂණය සහ පරිවර්තනය කරන්න ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් න්\u200dයූරල් මේෂන් පරිවර්තනය', 'so': 'Barista baaritaanka iyo turjumidda', 'sv': 'Att lära sig tolka och översätta förbättrar neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'இலக்குதல் மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு கற்று', 'ur': 'پارس اور ترجمہ کی تعلیم نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کو اضافہ کرتی ہے', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση ανάλυσης και μετάφρασης βελτιώνει τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'kk': 'Тапсырма және аудару оқыту нейралық машинаның аудармасын жақсарту', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học cách phân tích và dịch hoàn to àn máy thần kinh', 'bg': 'Научаването да анализира и превежда подобрява невралния машинен превод', 'hr': 'Naučenje za razmatranje i prevod poboljšava neuronski prevod strojeva', 'nl': 'Leren parsen en vertalen verbetert neuronale machinevertaling', 'da': 'At lære at fortolke og oversætte forbedrer neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Lernen zu Parsen und Übersetzen verbessert neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': '학습 해석 및 번역 개선 신경 기계 번역', 'id': 'Belajar untuk menganalisa dan menerjemahkan meningkatkan Translation Mesin Neural', 'sw': 'Learning to Parse and Translate Improves Neural Machine Translation', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای تولید و ترجمه کردن، ترجمه ماشین عصبی را بهتر می\u200cکند', 'af': 'Leer om te verwerk en vertaling verbeter neurale masjien vertaling', 'sq': 'Mësimi për analizimin dhe përkthimin përmirëson përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Պատմել և թարգմանել սովորելը բարելավում է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը', 'bn': 'Learning to Parse and Translate Improves Neural Machine Translation', 'ca': 'Aprendre a analitzar i traduirmillora la traducció de la màquina neuronal', 'cs': 'Naučení se parsovat a překládat zlepšuje neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Parsimise ja tõlkimise õppimine parandab neuroaalset masintõlket', 'fi': 'Käsittelyn ja kääntämisen oppiminen parantaa hermojen konekäännöstä', 'az': 'Taşınma və Tərcümə öyrənmək Nöral Makina Çeviri', 'tr': 'Taýýarlama we terjime etmek öwrenmek Näraly Maşynyň terjimesini gowy görkez', 'bs': 'Naučenje za razmatranje i prevod poboljšava neuronski prevod mašine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד לפרסם ותרגם משפר את התרגום של מכונות נוירות', 'sk': 'Učenje razčlenjevanja in prevajanja izboljša nevralni strojni prevod', 'jv': 'Yalih-alih kanggo kelas karo penting karo terjamah banter Jejaral', 'bo': 'ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དང་ལུས་བརྗོད་པ། འོད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ནི།'}
{'en': 'There has been relatively little attention to incorporating linguistic prior to neural machine translation. Much of the previous work was further constrained to considering linguistic prior on the source side. In this paper, we propose a hybrid model, called NMT+RNNG, that learns to parse and translate by combining the recurrent neural network grammar into the attention-based neural machine translation. Our approach encourages the neural machine translation model to incorporate linguistic prior during training, and lets it translate on its own afterward. Extensive experiments with four language pairs show the effectiveness of the proposed NMT+RNNG.', 'ar': 'كان هناك اهتمام ضئيل نسبيًا بدمج اللغويات قبل الترجمة الآلية العصبية. كان الكثير من العمل السابق مقيدًا بمزيد من التفكير في اللغوية مسبقًا على جانب المصدر. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجًا هجينًا ، يسمى NMT + RNNG ، يتعلم التحليل والترجمة من خلال دمج قواعد الشبكة العصبية المتكررة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه. يشجع نهجنا نموذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية على دمج اللغويات قبل التدريب ، ويسمح لها بالترجمة من تلقاء نفسها بعد ذلك. تظهر التجارب المكثفة مع أربعة أزواج لغوية فعالية NMT + RNNG المقترحة.', 'fr': "On a accordé relativement peu d'attention à l'intégration de la linguistique avant la traduction automatique neuronale. Une grande partie du travail précédent était encore limitée à la prise en compte du préalable linguistique du côté source. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle hybride, appelé NMT+RNNG, qui apprend à analyser et à traduire en combinant la grammaire récurrente du réseau neuronal dans la traduction automatique neuronale basée sur l'attention. Notre approche encourage le modèle de traduction automatique neuronale à intégrer le langage avant la formation et à le laisser traduire lui-même par la suite. Des expériences approfondies avec quatre paires de langues montrent l'efficacité du NMT+RNNG proposé.", 'es': 'Se ha prestado relativamente poca atención a la incorporación lingüística antes de la traducción automática neuronal. Gran parte del trabajo anterior se limitó aún más a considerar el idioma previo en el lado de la fuente. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo híbrido, llamado NMT+RNNG, que aprende a analizar y traducir combinando la gramática recurrente de la red neuronal en la traducción automática neuronal basada en la atención. Nuestro enfoque fomenta que el modelo de traducción automática neuronal incorpore el lenguaje antes durante el entrenamiento y permite que se traduzca por sí solo después. Experimentos extensos con cuatro pares de idiomas muestran la eficacia del NMT+RNNG propuesto.', 'pt': 'Tem havido relativamente pouca atenção à incorporação linguística antes da tradução automática neural. Grande parte do trabalho anterior foi ainda mais restrito a considerar a priorização linguística no lado da fonte. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo híbrido, chamado NMT+RNNG, que aprende a analisar e traduzir combinando a gramática de rede neural recorrente na tradução automática neural baseada em atenção. Nossa abordagem incentiva o modelo de tradução automática neural a incorporar linguística antes durante o treinamento e permite que ele traduza por conta própria depois. Extensos experimentos com quatro pares de idiomas mostram a eficácia do NMT+RNNG proposto.', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳の前に言語論理を取り入れることには比較的注意が払われていない。前作の多くはさらにソース側での事前の言語的な検討に制約されていた。本稿では，再帰的なニューラルネットワークの文法を注意に基づくニューラルマシンの翻訳に組み合わせることで解析と翻訳を学ぶ， NMT + RNNGと呼ばれるハイブリッドモデルを提案する．私たちのアプローチは、神経機械翻訳モデルがトレーニング中に言語学的な前段階を取り入れることを奨励し、その後独自に翻訳することを可能にします。４つの言語ペアを用いた広範な実験は、提案されたＮＭＴ ＋ ＲＮＮＧの有効性を示す。', 'zh': '先神经机器翻译,语言学少关注。 前事更限源端虑言先验。 本文,我们发出一种称为NMT + RNNG的混合模形,该模形将递归神经网络语法结到基于注意的神经机器翻译中来学习解析和译。 吾道劝神经机器翻译合言先验,使自译之。 4言博实验明其所言NMT+RNNG有效性.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद से पहले भाषाई को शामिल करने के लिए अपेक्षाकृत कम ध्यान दिया गया है। पिछले काम का अधिकांश हिस्सा स्रोत पक्ष पर भाषाई पूर्व पर विचार करने के लिए और अधिक विवश था। इस पेपर में, हम एक हाइब्रिड मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे एनएमटी + आरएनएनजी कहा जाता है, जो ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क व्याकरण के संयोजन से पार्स और अनुवाद करना सीखता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण प्रशिक्षण के दौरान भाषाई पूर्व को शामिल करने के लिए तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल को प्रोत्साहित करता है, और बाद में इसे अपने दम पर अनुवाद करने देता है। चार भाषा जोड़े के साथ व्यापक प्रयोग प्रस्तावित NMT + RNNG की प्रभावशीलता दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'До нейронного машинного перевода относительно мало внимания уделялось включению лингвистического перевода. Большая часть предыдущей работы была еще более ограничена рассмотрением лингвистического предшественника на стороне источника. В этой статье мы предлагаем гибридную модель, называемую NMT+ RNNG, которая учится анализировать и переводить путем объединения рекуррентной грамматики нейронной сети в основанный на внимании нейронный машинный перевод. Наш подход поощряет модель нейронного машинного перевода к включению лингвистического во время обучения, а затем позволяет ей переводить самостоятельно. Обширные эксперименты с четырьмя языковыми парами показывают эффективность предлагаемого NMT+RNNG.', 'ga': 'Is beag aird a tugadh ar theangeolaíocht a ionchorprú roimh an néaraistriúchán meaisín. Cuireadh srian breise ar go leor den obair a rinneadh roimhe seo le machnamh a dhéanamh ar chúrsaí teangeolaíochta ar thaobh na foinse. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla hibrideach, ar a dtugtar NMT+RNNG, a fhoghlaimíonn conas a pharsáil agus a aistriú tríd an ghramadach líonra néar athfhillteach a chomhcheangal san aistriúchán meaisín néarbhunaithe aird-bhunaithe. Spreagann ár gcur chuige an tsamhail néar-aistriúcháin meaisín chun réamhtheangach a ionchorprú le linn na hoiliúna, agus ligeann sé dó aistriúchán ina aonar ina dhiaidh sin. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing le ceithre phéire teanga éifeachtacht an NMT+RNNG atá beartaithe.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების წინ ლუნგურისტიკის შეყვარებისთვის პარამეტრებით პატარა აღმოჩენა. წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო უფრო უფრო დართული იყო, რომ წინ იფიქრობენ ლენგურისტიკური სამუშაოში. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ჰიბრიტური მოდელი, რომელიც NMT+RNNG, რომელიც ვისწავლის განაწყვება და განაწყვება, რომელიც განაწყვება განაწყვებული ნეიროლური ქსელის გრამატაციის გადაყვებ ჩვენი პროგორმაცია უფრო მუშაობს ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო მუშაობაში ენგურისტიკის შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ გაგრძ გაფართლებული ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც ოთხი ენის ზოგებით გამოჩვენება NMT+RNNG-ის ეფექტიურობა.', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás előtt viszonylag kevés figyelmet fordítottak a nyelvi beépítésre. Az előző munkák nagy részét továbbra is arra kényszerítették, hogy a forrás oldaláról a nyelvi előzetes vizsgálatot vegyék figyelembe. Ebben a tanulmányban egy NMT+RNNG nevű hibrid modellt javasolunk, amely megtanulja elemezni és fordítani a visszatérő neurális hálózati nyelvtan ötvözésével a figyelem alapú neurális gépi fordításba. Megközelítésünk arra ösztönzi a neurális gépi fordítási modellt, hogy a képzés során integrálja a nyelvi előzőket, majd lehetővé teszi, hogy ezt követően saját magában fordítsa. A javasolt NMT+RNNG hatékonyságát négy nyelvpárral végzett kiterjedt kísérletek mutatják be.', 'el': 'Υπήρξε σχετικά μικρή προσοχή στην ενσωμάτωση γλωσσολογικών πριν από τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Μεγάλο μέρος της προηγούμενης εργασίας περιορίστηκε περαιτέρω στην εξέταση της γλωσσικής προόδου από την πλευρά της πηγής. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα υβριδικό μοντέλο, το οποίο μαθαίνει να αναλύει και να μεταφράζει συνδυάζοντας την επαναλαμβανόμενη γραμματική νευρωνικών δικτύων στη βασισμένη στην προσοχή νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση. Η προσέγγισή μας ενθαρρύνει το μοντέλο της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης να ενσωματώσει γλωσσικά προγενέστερα κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης και να το επιτρέψει να μεταφράσει μόνος του μετά. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα με τέσσερα γλωσσικά ζεύγη δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του προτεινόμενου NMT+RNNG.', 'kk': 'Невралдық машинаның аудармасынан алдында лингвистикалық аудармасын қосу үшін салыстырмалы қызық болды. Алдыңғы жұмыстың көпшілігі көпшілігі алдында лингвистикалық жұмысын қарау үшін шектелген болды. Бұл қағазда, NMT+RNNG деп аталатын гибрид үлгісін таңдап береміз. Бұл қайталанатын невралдық желінің грамматтарын қайталанатын невралдық машинаның аудармасына біріктіріп, талдау және аударуға үйренеді. Біздің қасиетіміз невралдық компьютердің аудару үлгісін алдында лингвистикалық тілдерді біріктіру үшін көмектеседі. Содан кейін оны өзінің аудару үшін болады. Төрт тіл екі туралы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер NMT+RNNG таңдалған тәжірибесін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Palyginti mažai dėmesio skiriama kalbos įtraukimui prieš nervų mašinų vertimą. Dauguma ankstesnių darbų dar labiau apsiribojo kalbų svarstymu pirmiau šaltinio pusėje. Šiame dokumente mes siūlome hibridinį model į, vadinamą NMT+RNNG, kuris išmoko analizuoti ir verti derinant kartotinį nervinio tinklo gramatiką į dėmesio grindžiamą nervinio tinklo vertimą. Our approach encourages the neural machine translation model to incorporate linguistic prior during training, and lets it translate on its own afterward.  Išsamūs eksperimentai su keturiomis kalbų poromis rodo siūlomo NMT+RNNG veiksmingumą.', 'it': "C'è stata relativamente poca attenzione all'incorporazione linguistica prima della traduzione automatica neurale. Gran parte del lavoro precedente è stato ulteriormente limitato a considerare la precedenza linguistica dal lato sorgente. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello ibrido, chiamato NMT+RNNG, che impara ad analizzare e tradurre combinando la grammatica ricorrente della rete neurale nella traduzione automatica neurale basata sull'attenzione. Il nostro approccio incoraggia il modello di traduzione automatica neurale a incorporare il precedente linguistico durante la formazione, e consente di tradurre da solo in seguito. Esperimenti approfonditi con quattro coppie linguistiche dimostrano l'efficacia della proposta NMT+RNNG.", 'ms': 'Terdapat perhatian relatif sedikit untuk memasukkan bahasa sebelum terjemahan mesin saraf. Much of the previous work was further constrained to considering linguistic prior on the source side.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model hibrid, yang dipanggil NMT+RNNG, yang belajar menghurai dan menerjemahkan dengan menggabungkan grammar rangkaian saraf yang berulang ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan perhatian. pendekatan kita mendorong model terjemahan mesin saraf untuk memasukkan bahasa sebelum latihan, dan membiarkannya terjemahan sendiri selepas itu. Eksperimen luas dengan empat pasangan bahasa menunjukkan keefektivitas NMT+RNNG yang diusulkan.', 'mt': 'Kien hemm relattivament ftit attenzjoni għall-inkorporazzjoni lingwistika qabel it-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti kien limitat aktar biex jitqies il-lingwistiku preċedenti fuq in-naħa tas-sors. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ibridu, imsejjaħ NMT+RNNG, li jitgħallem janalizza u jittraduċi billi tikkombina l-grammar rikorrenti tan-netwerk newrali fit-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali bbażata fuq l-attenzjoni. L-approċċ tagħna jinkoraġġixxi l-mudell tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali biex jinkorpora lingwistika qabel it-taħriġ, u jippermettilha tittraduċi waħedha wara. Esperimenti estensivi b’erba’ pari lingwistiċi juru l-effikaċja tal-NMT+RNNG proposta.', 'mk': 'Имаше релативно мало внимание на вклучувањето на јазикот пред преведувањето на невралните машини. Голем дел од претходната работа беше понатаму обврзана со разгледување на јазичниот претходен на страната на изворот. Во овој весник предлагаме хибриден модел, наречен НМТ+РНГ, кој научи да анализира и преведува преку комбинација на рецидентната граматика на нервната мрежа во преведувањето на нервната машина базирана на внимание. Нашиот пристап го охрабрува моделот на превод на невралните машини да го вклучи јазикот претходно за време на обуката, и дозволува да го преводи сам по тоа. Експериментите со четири парови јазици ја покажуваат ефикасноста на предложениот НМТ+РНГ.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയ്ക്ക് മുമ്പ് ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് വളരെ കുറച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധ ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് കൂടുതല്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതരായിരുന്നു ഉറവിടത്തിനു മുമ്പ് ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d പരിഗണിക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, NMT+RNNNG എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഹൈബ്രിഡ് മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യാനും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താനും പഠിക്കുന്നു.  പരിശീലനത്തിനു മുമ്പ് ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സാഹചര്യം ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷ മോഡലിനെ ആശ്വാസിപ് നാലു ഭാഷ ജോടികളുടെ കൂടെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട NMT+RNNG-ന്റെ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്ഥന കാ', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн өмнө хэлний хэлний хөгжлийн тухай бага анхаарал төвлөрсөн. Өмнөх ажлын ихэнх нь хэлний хэлний эх үүсвэрээс өмнө нь хэлний хэлний тухай бодох шаардлагатай байсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NMT+RNNG гэдэг гибрид загварын загварыг суралцдаг. Энэ нь анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний грамматыг анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах боломжтой. Бидний ойлголт нь мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн загварыг суралцах үед өмнө нь хэлний хэлний нэгтгэх боломжтой болгож, дараа нь өөрийгөө хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Дөрвөн хэл хоёр туршилттай өргөн туршилтууд нь NMT+RNNG-ын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Det har vært relativt lite oppmerksomhet til å inkludere lingvisk før omsetjinga av neuralmaskin. Mange av det førre arbeidet var lenger begrenset for å tenke på lingvisk før på kjeldesiden. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit hybridmodell, kalla NMT+RNNG, som lærer å tolka og oversette ved å kombinerera rekurserande neuralnettverksgrammar i den oppmerksbaserte neuralmaskinen omsetjinga. Tilnærminga vårt oppfordrer den neuralmaskineoversettelsmodellen for å inkludere lingvisk før under opplæring, og lèt det omsetja etter seg eige etter. Ekstra eksperimenter med fire språkopar viser effektiviteten til den foreslåde NMT+RNNG.', 'pl': 'Przed tłumaczeniem maszynowym neuronowym stosunkowo niewiele uwagi poświęcono włączeniu języka językowego. Większość poprzednich prac była dodatkowo ograniczona do uwzględnienia języka wcześniej po stronie źródła. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model hybrydowy o nazwie NMT+RNNG, który uczy się analizować i tłumaczyć poprzez łączenie nawracającej gramatyki sieci neuronowej z tłumaczeniem maszynowym opartym na uwadze. Nasze podejście zachęca neuronowy model tłumaczenia maszynowego do włączenia językowego poprzedniego podczas szkolenia i pozwala mu tłumaczyć samodzielnie. Obszerne eksperymenty z czterema parami językowymi pokazują skuteczność proponowanego NMT+RNNG.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්තාවෙන්න කලින් භාෂාවිකාශිකය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් අවධානයක්  මුලින් වැඩේ ගොඩක් දෙයක් තියෙන්නේ ඉදිරියට කලින් භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, NMT+RNING කියලා, ඒක ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරිශ්චා කරන්න සහ අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරිශ අපේ අභ්\u200dයාසය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාපනය මදුල්යාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් කලින් භාෂාවිකාර භාෂාවක් හතරක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ NMT+RNNG ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න.', 'sr': 'Bilo je relativno malo pažnje na uključenje jezičkog prevoda prije neuralne mašine. Mnogo od prethodnog rada je bilo dalje ograničeno razmotriti jezički ranije na izvornoj strani. U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridni model nazvan NMT+RNNG, koji nauči da analizira i prevodi kombinirajući rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu gramatiku u prevod na pažnji na neuralnu mašinu. Naš pristup ohrabruje model prevođenja neuralnih mašina da uključuje jezički prevoz prije treninga, i dopušta da prevodi samog posle. Eksperimenti sa četiri jezičke parove pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog NMT+RNNG.', 'so': 'Waxaa si qiimo yar loola jeeday in la qoro afka luuqadaha ka hor turjumidda maskinada neurada ah. Shaqo badan oo hore waa la qasbay inay ka fikiraan af af ka horeysa dhinaca asalka. Kanu warqaddan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model hybrid, magaca NMT+RNNG, kaas oo baranaya inay baaraandegaan oo ku turjumaan xarunta shabakadda neural ee ku soo socda, si loo soo qoro tarjumaadka neurada Our approach encourages the neural machine translation model to incorporate linguistic prior during training, and lets it translate on its own afterward.  Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo afar labo oo luqad ah ku qoran waxay muujiyaan waxyaabaha la soo jeeday NMT+RNNG.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தை மொழிமாற்றுவதற்கு முன் மொழியை உள்ளிடுவதற்கு சிறிய கவனம் ஏற்பட்டுள்ளது. மூலத்தின் பக்கத்தில் மொழியின் முன்னால் பார்ப்பதற்கு மேலும் முன்னால் மொழியை பார்க்க வேண்டும். In this paper, we propose a hybrid model, called NMT+RNNG, that learns to parse and translate by combining the recurrent neural network grammar into the attention-based neural machine translation.  எங்கள் செயல்பாடு புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்ற மாதிரி பயிற்சியின் முன்னால் மொழிமாற்றியை சேர்க்க முடியும் பின் நான்கு மொழி ஜோடிகளுடன் விரிவான சோதனைகள் NMT+RNNG திருப்பப்பட்ட விளைவை காட்டுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Det har varit relativt lite uppmärksamhet på att införliva språk före neural maskinöversättning. Mycket av det tidigare arbetet tvingades ytterligare att överväga språkliga tidigare på källsidan. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en hybridmodell, kallad NMT+RNNG, som lär sig tolka och översätta genom att kombinera den återkommande neurala nätverksgrammatiken till den uppmärksamhetsbaserade neurala maskinöversättningen. Vårt tillvägagångssätt uppmuntrar den neurala maskinöversättningsmodellen att införliva språkliga förklaringar under utbildningen, och låter den översätta på egen hand efteråt. Omfattande experiment med fyra språkpar visar effekten av den föreslagna NMT+RNNG.', 'ur': 'نئورل ماشین ترجمہ سے پہلے زبان کی جمع کرنے کے لئے بہت کم توجه ہے۔ اگلوں کی بہت سی کام سورج کے جانب سے پہلے زبان شناسی کا غور کرنا مجبور ہوا۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ہیبراڈ موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، NMT+RNNG، جسے پارس کرنا اور ترجمہ کرنا سکھاتے ہیں، اس کے ذریعہ سے دوبارہ نورول نیٹ ورک گراماری کو توجه کی بنیادی نیرول ماشین کی ترجمہ میں جمع کرنا ہے. ہماری طریقہ نے نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ موڈل کو ترکین کے وقت پہلے زبان شناسی میں شامل کرنے کے لئے تشویق دیتا ہے اور اس کے بعد اپنے آپ کو ترجمہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. چار زبان جوڑوں کے مطابق اضافہ آزمائش NMT+RNNG کی فعالیت دکھاتے ہیں.', 'ro': 'S-a acordat relativ puțină atenție încorporării lingvistice înainte de traducerea automată neurală. O mare parte din lucrările anterioare au fost constrânse în continuare să ia în considerare anterior lingvistic pe partea sursă. În această lucrare, propunem un model hibrid, numit NMT+RNNG, care învață să analizeze și să traducă combinând gramatica recurentă a rețelei neurale în traducerea automată neurală bazată pe atenție. Abordarea noastră încurajează modelul de traducere automată neurală să includă anterior lingvistic în timpul antrenamentului și îl permite să traducă pe cont propriu ulterior. Experimente ample cu patru perechi de limbi arată eficacitatea propunerii NMT+RNNG.', 'vi': 'Có một ít sự chú ý đến việc nhập vào ngôn ngữ trước khi dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh. Phần lớn công việc trước đây bị hạn chế để xem xét ngôn ngữ trước mặt nguồn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình nhân tạo được gọi là NMT+RNNG, mà học cách phân tích và dịch bằng cách kết hợp văn ngữ pháp mạng thần kinh liên tục vào bộ dịch thiết bị thần kinh Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi khuyến khích phiên dịch cỗ máy thần kinh thành kết hợp ngôn ngữ trước khi luyện tập, và cho phép nó tự dịch sau đó. Các thí nghiệm đầy đủ với bốn cặp ngôn ngữ cho thấy hiệu quả của công ty NMT+RNNG đề xuất.', 'uz': "Name Much of the previous work was further constrained to considering linguistic prior on the source side.  Bu qogʻozda, biz NMT+RNNG (NMT+RNNG) nomli hybrid modelini tahrirlash va tarjima qilish mumkin. Qaytarish tarmoq grammatikini birlashtirish mumkin va tahrirlash mumkin. Bizning usuli o'rganishdan oldin tilni o'rganish uchun neyural tarjima modelini ishlatadi va keyin uni o'zgarishga ruxsat beradi. Name", 'bg': 'Има относително малко внимание към включването на лингвистика преди невронния машинен превод. Голяма част от предишната работа е допълнително ограничена до разглеждане на езиковото предшествие от страна на източника. В настоящата статия предлагаме хибриден модел, наречен НМТ+РННГ, който се научава да анализира и превежда чрез комбиниране на повтарящата се граматика на невронната мрежа в базиран на вниманието невронен машинен превод. Нашият подход насърчава модела на невронен машинен превод да включва лингвистични предварителни данни по време на обучението и позволява да превежда самостоятелно след това. Обширни експерименти с четири езикови двойки показват ефективността на предложените НМТ+ННГ.', 'nl': 'Er is relatief weinig aandacht besteed aan het integreren van taal voorafgaand aan neurale machinevertaling. Veel van het vorige werk was verder beperkt tot het overwegen van taalkundige voorafgaand aan de bronzijde. In dit artikel stellen we een hybride model voor, genaamd NMT+RNNG, dat leert parsen en vertalen door de terugkerende neuronale netwerkgrammatica te combineren in de aandacht-gebaseerde neurale machinevertaling. Onze aanpak moedigt het neurale machine translation model aan om linguïstische voorafgaand tijdens de training te integreren en laat het daarna zelfstandig vertalen. Uitgebreide experimenten met vier taalparen tonen de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde NMT+RNNG aan.', 'hr': 'Prije prevoda neuralnih strojeva, relativno je malo pažnje na uključenje jezičkih jezika. Većina prethodnog rada bila je dalje ograničena razmatranju jezičkih jezika ranije na izvornoj strani. U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridni model, nazvan NMT+RNNG, koji nauči analizirati i prevoditi kombinirajući rekonstruiranu gramatiku neuralne mreže u prevod na pažnji na neuralne strojeve. Naš pristup ohrabruje model prevoda neuroloških strojeva da uključi jezički prijedlog tijekom treninga i dopušta da se prevodi sam poslije toga. Eksperimenti s četiri jezičke parove pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog NMT+RNNG.', 'da': 'Der har været relativt lidt opmærksomhed på at indarbejde sproglige før neural maskinoversættelse. Meget af det tidligere arbejde var yderligere begrænset til at overveje sproglige forudgående på kildesiden. I denne artikel foreslår vi en hybrid model, kaldet NMT+RNNG, der lærer at fortolke og oversætte ved at kombinere den tilbagevendende neurale netværksgrammatik til den opmærksomhedsbaserede neurale maskinoversættelse. Vores tilgang opfordrer den neurale maskinoversættelsesmodel til at indarbejde sproglige forudgående under træning, og lader den oversætte på egen hånd bagefter. Omfattende eksperimenter med fire sprogpar viser effektiviteten af den foreslåede NMT+RNNG.', 'de': 'Vor der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung wurde der Einbeziehung linguistischer Inhalte relativ wenig Aufmerksamkeit geschenkt. Ein Großteil der vorherigen Arbeiten war weiter darauf beschränkt, linguistische Vorher auf der Quellseite zu betrachten. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein hybrides Modell namens NMT+RNNG vor, das lernt, zu parsen und zu übersetzen, indem die wiederkehrende neuronale Netzwerkgrammatik in die aufmerksamkeitsbasierte neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung kombiniert wird. Unser Ansatz ermutigt das neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsmodell, linguistische Vorkenntnisse während des Trainings zu integrieren und lässt es anschließend eigenständig übersetzen. Umfangreiche Experimente mit vier Sprachpaaren zeigen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen NMT+RNNG.', 'id': 'Ada sedikit perhatian untuk memasukkan bahasa sebelum terjemahan mesin saraf. Banyak dari pekerjaan sebelumnya lebih dikuasai untuk mempertimbangkan bahasa sebelumnya di sisi sumber. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model hibrid, yang disebut NMT+RNNG, yang belajar menghurai dan menerjemahkan dengan menggabungkan gramatika jaringan saraf berkurang ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan perhatian. Pendekatan kami mendorong model terjemahan mesin saraf untuk mengikorporasi bahasa sebelumnya selama latihan, dan membiarkannya terjemahan sendiri setelah itu. Extensive experiments with four language pairs show the effectiveness of the proposed NMT+RNNG.', 'ko': '신경기계가 번역되기 전에는 언어 통합에 대한 관심이 상대적으로 적었다.이전의 많은 일들은 원본에서 언어의 우선성을 고려하는 데 국한되었다.본고에서 우리는 NMT+RNNG라고 불리는 혼합 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 귀속신경 네트워크 문법과 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경 기계 번역을 결합시켜 해석과 번역을 배운다.우리의 방법은 신경기계 번역 모델이 훈련 과정에서 언어 선험지식을 첨가하도록 장려하고 훈련 후 스스로 번역하도록 허락한다.네 가지 언어에 대한 대량의 실험은 제시된 NMT+RNNG의 유효성을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'قبل از ترجمه ماشین عصبی، توجه نسبتا کمی برای جمع کردن زبان\u200cشناسی وجود دارد. بسیاری از کارهای قبلی بیشتر محدودیت شده بود تا قبل از اینکه روی منبع زبان صحبت کنیم. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل هیبریدی را پیشنهاد می کنیم، به نام NMT+RNNG، که یاد می گیرد که توسط ترجمه\u200cهای شبکه عصبی بازگشت را به عنوان ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی بر روی توجه برسیم و ترجمه کند. دستور ما مدل ترجمه\u200cی ماشین عصبی را تشویق می\u200cکند تا قبل از آموزش زبان\u200cشناسی را جمع کند، و اجازه می\u200cدهد بعد از آن به خود ترجمه کند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده با چهار جفت زبان نشان می\u200cدهد فعالیت پیشنهاد NMT+RNNG.', 'sw': 'Kumekuwa na mwangalizi mdogo sana wa kuingiza lugha kabla ya kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa. Kazi nyingi zilizopita ilizuiwa zaidi kuangalia lugha kabla ya upande wa chanzo hicho. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya hybrid, inayoitwa NMT+RNNG, ambayo inajifunza kucheza na kutafsiri kwa kuunganisha gramma ya mtandao wa neurali inayoendelea katika tafsiri ya mashine yenye msingi wa kisasa. Mfumo wetu unahamasisha muundo wa kutafsiri mashine ya asili ili kuingiza lugha kabla ya wakati wa mafunzo, na kuiruhusu kutafsiri baadae. Majaribio mengi yenye wanandoa wanne wa lugha zinaonyesha ufanisi wa mapendekezo ya NMT+RNNG.', 'af': "Daar is relativief klein aandag na inkorporeer lingwisiese voor neurale masjien vertaling. Baie van die vorige werk was verder gebrek om lingwisiese voorheen op die bron kant te onderwerp. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n hybrid model wat NMT+RNNG genoem word, wat leer om te verwerk en vertaling deur die herhaalde neuralnetwerk grammatiek in die aandag-gebaseerde neuralmasjien vertaling te kombinerer. Ons toegang versterk die neurale masjien vertalingsmodel om lingwisiese voorheen te inkorporeer tydens onderwerp en laat dit vertaling op sy eie daarna. Ekstensiewe eksperimente met vier taal paar vertoon die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde NMT+RNNG.", 'sq': 'Ka pasur relativisht pak vëmendje për përfshirjen e gjuhës përpara përkthimit të makinave nervore. Shumica e punës së mëparshme ishte e kufizuar më tej për të konsideruar gjuhën më parë në anën e burimit. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model hibridë, të quajtur NMT+RNNG, që mëson të analizojë dhe të përkthyer duke kombinuar gramatikën e rrjetit neural të përsëritur në përkthimin e makinës neurale të bazuar në vëmendje. Përqasja jonë inkurajon modelin e përkthimit të makinave nervore për të përfshirë gjuhën e mëparshme gjatë stërvitjes, dhe e lejon atë të përkthimit vetëm më pas. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara me katër çifte gjuhësh tregojnë efektshmërinë e NMT+RNNG të propozuar.', 'am': 'የነዌብ መሣሪያው ትርጓሜ በፊት ቋንቋውን ለመቀበል በኩል ጥቂት ጥያቄ ሆኖአል፡፡ የቀድሞው የሥራ ብዙው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ በመጀመሪያው ቀድሞ ለማስተዋል ግድ ነበር፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ NMT+RNNG የሚባል የኬብሪዲ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፣ ይህም መግለጫ እና ትርጓሜ በሚያስተምርበት የደግሞው የኔትራዊ መረብ grammar በመጠቀም በያሳያል የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ ነው፡፡ የናውሬው መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሞዴል ከግሪክ በፊት ቋንቋውን ለመቀበል እና በኋላው ለመተርጉም ይችላል፡፡ በአራቱ ቋንቋ ዓይነቶች ያሉት ተፈተናዎች የNMT+RNNG ጥያቄውን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանումից առաջ բավականին քիչ ուշադրություն է դարձել լեզվաբանության ներառման վրա: Անցյալ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը ավելի շատ պայմանավորված էր լեզվաբանական հաշվի առնելով նախկինում աղբյուր կողմում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հիբրիդ մոդել, որը կոչվում է NMT+RՆԳ, որը սովորում է վերլուծել և թարգմանել, համադրելով կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի գրամագրությունը ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ: Մեր մոտեցումը խրախուսում է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելը, որպեսզի ներառի լեզվաբանական նախկինում սովորելու ընթացքում, և թույլ է տալիս այն թարգմանել ինքնուրույն հետո: Չորս լեզվի զույգերի ընդլայնված փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս NMT+RՆԳ-ի արդյունավետությունը:', 'bn': 'নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের পূর্বে ভাষার ভাষায় যুক্ত করার জন্য খুব কম মনোযোগ রয়েছে। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের অনেকেই উৎসের পাশে ভাষার ভাষা বিবেচনা করতে বাধ্য হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি হাইব্রিড মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যার নাম NMT+RNNG, যা পার্স এবং অনুবাদ জানানো এবং প্রত্যাবর্তিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক গ্রামার মনোযোগ মাধ্ আমাদের পদ্ধতি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের সময় ভাষাগত ভাষার ভাষায় অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার জন্য উৎসাহ প্রদান করে এবং এর পরে এটি  চার ভাষার জোড়া দিয়ে বিশেষ পরীক্ষা প্রস্তাবিত এনএমটি+আরএনএঙ্গের কার্যক্রম দেখায়।', 'ca': "Hi ha hagut relativament poca atenció a l'incorporació de la llengüística abans de la traducció neuronal. Molta de la feina anterior es va limitar encara més a considerar la llengüística anterior al costat de la font. En aquest article proposem un model híbrid anomenat NMT+RNNG, que aprengui a analitzar i traduir combinant la gramàtica recurrent de la xarxa neuronal a la traducció neuromàtica basada en l'atenció. El nostre enfocament anima el model de traducció neural de la màquina a incorporar el llengüístic anterior durant l'entrenament, i permet que es traduis per si mateix després. Els extensos experiments amb quatre parelles de llenguatges mostren l'eficacia del NMT+RNNG proposat.", 'cs': 'Před neuronovým strojovým překladem byla věnována relativně malá pozornost začlenění lingvistického jazyka. Velká část předchozí práce byla dále omezena na zvažování jazykové předchozí strany na zdrojové straně. V tomto článku navrhujeme hybridní model NMT+RNNG, který se naučí analyzovat a překládat kombinací rekurentní gramatiky neuronové sítě do pozornostního strojového překladu. Náš přístup podporuje model neuronového strojového překladu, aby zahrnoval jazykový předběh během tréninku a umožňuje jej překládat samostatně. Rozsáhlé experimenty se čtyřmi jazykovými páry ukazují účinnost navrhovaného NMT+RNNG.', 'et': 'Keelelise keele kaasamisele on olnud suhteliselt vähe tähelepanu enne neuro masintõlkimist. Suurem osa eelmisest tööst oli veelgi piiratud kaaluda keelelist eelnevat allika poolel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hübriidmudeli nimega NMT+RNNG, mis õpib parsimist ja tõlkimist, kombineerides korduva närvivõrgu grammatika tähelepanupõhiseks neuromasintõlkeks. Meie lähenemisviis julgustab neuromasintõlke mudelit koolituse ajal kaasama keelelise eelkõige ja võimaldab pärast seda ise tõlkida. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid nelja keelepaariga näitavad kavandatud NMT+RNNG efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Kielen sis채llytt채miseen on kiinnitetty suhteellisen v채h채n huomiota ennen neurokonek채채nn철st채. Suuri osa edellisest채 ty철st채 oli edelleen rajoitettu tarkastelemaan kielellist채 prioriteettia l채hdepuolella. T채ss채 ty철ss채 ehdotamme hybridimallia nimelt채 NMT+RNNG, joka oppii j채sent채m채채n ja k채채nt채m채채n yhdist채m채ll채 toistuvan neuroverkon kieliopin huomiopohjaiseksi neurokonek채채nn철kseksi. L채hestymistapamme kannustaa neurokonek채채nn철smallia sis채llytt채m채채n kielellisen ennakkotiedon koulutuksen aikana ja antaa sen k채채nt채채 itsen채isesti j채lkeenp채in. Laajat kokeet nelj채ll채 kieliparilla osoittavat ehdotetun NMT+RNNG:n tehokkuuden.', 'tr': 'Näyrol maşynyň terjimesinden öň lingwistiki ýazmagy üçin biraz üns berildi. Öňki işiň köpüsi özünden öň dil dillerini daşynda düşünmekde ýok edildi. Bu kagyzda, NMT+RNNG adly hybrid nusgasyny çykarmak we terjime etmek üçin öwrenip otyrýarys. Biziň ýaryşymyz neural maşynyň terjime modelini okuwçynyň öňünden görä lingwistiki we onuň yzyndan soňra terjime etmäge rugsat berýär. Dört dil çift bilen uzakly deneyler NMT+RNNG täsirini görkez.', 'az': 'Nəyral maşına çevirilmədən əvvəl dil istiqamətlərini daxil etmək üçün çox az təsirlik var. Əvvəlki işin çoxu mənbə tərəfindən əvvəl dillərini düşünmək üçün daha çox məcbur edildi. Bu kağızda, NMT+RNNG adlı hibrid modeli təbliğ edirik. Bu, təkrarlanan nöral a ğ grammasını dikkati-tabanlı nöral maşına çevirilməyi öyrənir və təkrarlayır. Bizim tərzimiz öyrənməsindən əvvəl dil dillərini birləşdirmək üçün nöral maşına çevirmə modelini təşkil edir və bundan sonra özünü tərcümə etməyə izin verir. Dörd dil cütləri ilə genişliyi eksperimentlər NMT+RNNG təklif etdiyi NMT+RNNG təsirini göstərər.', 'bs': 'Bilo je relativno malo pažnje na uključenje jezičkih jezika prije prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Mnogo od prethodnog rada je bilo dalje ograničeno razmotriti jezički prije nego što je na izvornoj strani. U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridni model, nazvan NMT+RNNG, koji nauči analizirati i prevoditi kombinirajući rekonstruiranu gramatiku neuralne mreže u prevod na pažnji na neuronskom stroju. Naš pristup ohrabruje model prevoda neuralne mašine da uključi jezički prevod prije treninga i dopušta da prevodi samog poslije. Eksperimenti s četiri jezičke parove pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog NMT+RNNG.', 'ha': "An sami muhimmi wa haɗi linguistic tun gaba ga fassarar maɓallin neural. Babu yawa daga aikin da ya gabata an hana shi kafin ka yi tunãni ga harshensu a gaba ga wuri. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani misãlin Hybri, wanda aka yi kira NMT+RNNG, wanda yana yarda da yin parse and translate by kombing grammar na tarakin neural na'ural zuwa fassarar-based neural. KanamayinMu yana wahamar da misalin fassarar masu neural zuwa ta shigar da linguistic na farko a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma sai ya yarda ta tafsira kan kansa daban. Fitarwa mai ƙunci da saurin harshe huɗu ke nuna aikin da aka faɗa na NMT+RNG.", 'jv': 'Rasané kayané mbok sing paling-toleng kanggo nggawe Linguistik bagian aku mulai terjamahan, ingkang. Akèh sing sabanjuré karaman sing paling nggawe ngubah dilanjuré, kuwi jenis-jenis neng sebelah. Nyong pepulan iki, kita mulai model sing nyengke kapan, nambah NMT + + + + + + + . Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe modèl itoleh-ingkang Neral kanggo nguasai ingkang sapa-ingkang sapa nguasai, lan supoyo kuwi nggawe tarjamahan sak sebelah. Ngubah apa-apa sing karo nganggo tanggal apa', 'sk': 'Pred nevronskim strojnim prevajanjem je bilo relativno malo pozornosti vključevanju jezikovnega jezika. Večina prejšnjega dela je bila še naprej omejena na upoštevanje jezikovne prihodnosti na izvorni strani. V prispevku predlagamo hibridni model, imenovan NMT+RNNG, ki se nauči razčlenjevati in prevajati s kombinacijo ponavljajoče se slovnice nevronskega omrežja v strojno prevajanje, ki temelji na pozornosti. Naš pristop spodbuja model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja k vključevanju jezikovne predhodnosti med usposabljanjem, nato pa mu omogoča samostojno prevajanje. Obsežni eksperimenti s štirimi jezikovnimi pari kažejo učinkovitost predlaganega NMT+RNNG.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདི་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆོས་ཉུང་བའི་ནང་དུ་བྱུང་ཡོད། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆེ་བ་དག་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱས་ཡོད། In this paper, we propose a hybrid model, called NMT+RNNG, that learns to parse and translate by combining the recurrent neural network grammar into the attention-based neural machine translation. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་མིའུ་རྩོམ་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འདི་ རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྤྲོད་ཟིན་པའི་NMT+RNNG ལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་མངོན་འཆར།', 'he': 'היתה תשומת לב יחסית קטנה לשימוש שפתי לפני התרגום של מכונות עצביות. רבה מהעבודות הקודמות היו מוגבלות יותר לשקול שפתיים קודמים בצד המקור. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל היברידי, שנקרא NMT+RNNG, שלמד לפרסם ולתרגום על ידי שילוב את גרמטיקת הרשת העצבית המחזרה לתרגום המכונה העצבית המבוססת על תשומת לב. הגישה שלנו מעודדת את מודל התרגום המכונה העצבית כדי לשלוף קודם לשון במהלך האימון, ומאפשר לו לתרגם בעצמו לאחר מכן. ניסויים רחבים עם ארבעה זוגות שפות מראים את היעילות של NMT+RNNG המוצע.'}
{'en': 'On the Distribution of Lexical Features at Multiple Levels of Analysis', 'ar': 'حول توزيع السمات المعجمية على مستويات متعددة من التحليل', 'fr': "Sur la distribution des caractéristiques lexicales à plusieurs niveaux d'analyse", 'es': 'Sobre la distribución de las características léxicas en múltiples niveles de análisis', 'pt': 'Sobre a distribuição de características lexicais em vários níveis de análise', 'ja': '複数レベルの分析における語彙特徴の分布について', 'hi': 'विश्लेषण के एकाधिक स्तरों पर लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं के वितरण पर', 'zh': '论多层次析中词法特征之分布', 'ru': 'О распределении лексических признаков на нескольких уровнях анализа', 'ga': 'Ar Dháileadh Gnéithe Foclaíochta ag Illeibhéil Anailíse', 'el': 'Για την κατανομή των Λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών σε πολλαπλά επίπεδα ανάλυσης', 'ka': 'ლექსიკური განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით', 'hu': 'A lexikai jellemzők eloszlásáról több elemzési szinten', 'it': 'Sulla distribuzione delle caratteristiche lessicali a più livelli di analisi', 'lt': 'Dėl lexinių savybių paskirstymo keliuose analizės lygiuose', 'kk': 'Бірнеше түрлі анализ деңгейіндегі лексикалық қасиеттерін тарату үшін', 'mk': 'За дистрибуцијата на лексикалните карактеристики на повеќе нивоа на анализа', 'ml': 'പല നിലകളില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണം', 'ms': 'Pada Penghapusan Ciri-ciri Lexik pada Aras Berbilang Analisis', 'mt': 'Dwar id-Distribuzzjoni tal-Karatteristiċi Lessiċi f’Livelli Multi ta’ Analiżi', 'no': 'På distribusjon av leksiske funksjonar på fleire nivå av analyser', 'mn': 'Олон түвшинд шинжилгээний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваарилалтын тухай', 'ro': 'Despre distribuirea caracteristicilor lexicale la mai multe niveluri de analiză', 'pl': 'O dystrybucji cech leksykalnych na wielu poziomach analizy', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකාල් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ විදිහට', 'sv': 'Om fördelningen av Lexical Features på flera analysnivåer', 'sr': 'O raspodjeli leksičkih karakteristika na višestrukoj nivou analize', 'so': 'Qaybinta tababarka Leksikal ee heerarka kala duduwan', 'ur': 'تعداد سطح تحلیل کے متعدد سطح میں لکسکسیکل فکرات کے تقسیم پر', 'ta': 'பல மட்டங்களில் லெக்சிக்சியல் பண்புகளை விரிவாக்கும்போது', 'uz': 'Analysi bir nechta darajada Leksikal xususiyatlar tarqatishda', 'vi': 'Về việc phân phối các tính chất mẫu tại đa cấp phân tích', 'da': 'Om fordelingen af Lexical Features på flere niveauer af analyse', 'bg': 'За разпределението на лексикалните характеристики на множество нива на анализ', 'hr': 'O raspodjeli leksičkih karakteristika na višestrukoj razini analize', 'de': 'Zur Verteilung von Lexika auf verschiedenen Analyseebenen', 'ko': '어휘 특징이 다차원 분석에서의 분포', 'id': 'Pada Distribusi Features Lexical di Multiple Level of Analysis', 'nl': 'Over de verdeling van Lexische kenmerken op meerdere analyseniveaus', 'fa': 'در توزیع ویژه های سکسیکی در سطح چندین تحلیل', 'tr': 'Leksik hasaplaryň Çarplary Derjesi Analyzasynda', 'af': 'Op die Verspreiding van Leksiese Funksies by Veelvuldige Vlakke van Analisie', 'sq': 'Për shpërndarjen e karakteristikave leksikale në nivele të shumta të analizës', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական առանձնահատկությունների բազմաթիվ մակարդակներում', 'az': "√áoxlu s…ôviyy…ôl…ôr Analizi'nin Lexical Features Distribution on the Multiple Levels of Analysis", 'sw': 'Kuhusu usambazaji wa Tamko za Kilexico katika viwango vingi vya Uchambuzi', 'bn': 'বিশ্লেষণের অনেক স্তরে লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বিতরণ', 'bs': 'O raspodjeli leksičkih karakteristika na višestrukoj nivou analize', 'am': 'በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ', 'cs': 'O distribuci Lexických vlastností na více úrovních analýzy', 'et': 'Lexikaalsete omaduste jaotuse kohta mitmel analüüsitasandil', 'ca': "En la distribució de característiques lècsiques a molts nivells d'anàlisi", 'fi': 'Lexkaalisten ominaisuuksien jakautumisesta useilla analyysitasoilla', 'he': 'על ההפצה של תכונות לקסיות ברמות רבות של ניתוח', 'sk': 'O porazdelitvi leksičnih lastnosti na več ravneh analize', 'ha': '@ label', 'jv': 'Nang Distribution of Leksial Attributions at Multiple Grades of Test', 'bo': 'On the Distribution of Lexical Features at Multiple Levels of Analysis'}
{'en': 'Natural language processing has increasingly moved from modeling documents and words toward studying the people behind the language. This move to working with data at the user or community level has presented the field with different characteristics of linguistic data. In this paper, we empirically characterize various lexical distributions at different levels of analysis, showing that, while most features are decidedly sparse and non-normal at the message-level (as with traditional NLP), they follow the central limit theorem to become much more Log-normal or even Normal at the user- and county-levels. Finally, we demonstrate that modeling lexical features for the correct level of analysis leads to marked improvements in common social scientific prediction tasks.', 'ar': 'انتقلت معالجة اللغة الطبيعية بشكل متزايد من صياغة المستندات والكلمات إلى دراسة الأشخاص الذين يقفون وراء اللغة. قدم هذا الانتقال إلى العمل مع البيانات على مستوى المستخدم أو المجتمع المجال بخصائص مختلفة للبيانات اللغوية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتوصيف التوزيعات المعجمية المختلفة تجريبياً على مستويات مختلفة من التحليل ، موضحين أنه في حين أن معظم الميزات متفرقة وغير طبيعية على مستوى الرسالة (كما هو الحال مع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التقليدية) ، فإنها تتبع نظرية الحد المركزي لتصبح أكثر بكثير. أكثر من سجل عادي أو حتى عادي على مستوى المستخدم والمقاطعة. أخيرًا ، نوضح أن نمذجة السمات المعجمية للمستوى الصحيح من التحليل تؤدي إلى تحسينات ملحوظة في مهام التنبؤ العلمي الاجتماعي الشائعة.', 'es': 'El procesamiento del lenguaje natural ha pasado cada vez más de modelar documentos y palabras a estudiar a las personas que están detrás del lenguaje. Este paso a trabajar con datos a nivel de usuario o comunidad ha presentado al campo diferentes características de los datos lingüísticos. En este artículo, caracterizamos empíricamente varias distribuciones léxicas en diferentes niveles de análisis, mostrando que, si bien la mayoría de las características son decididamente escasas y no normales a nivel de mensaje (como ocurre con la PNL tradicional), siguen el teorema del límite central para volverse mucho más logarítmicamente normales o incluso normales en el usuarios y condados. Finalmente, demostramos que el modelado de características léxicas para el nivel correcto de análisis conduce a mejoras notables en las tareas comunes de predicción científica social.', 'pt': 'O processamento de linguagem natural mudou cada vez mais da modelagem de documentos e palavras para o estudo das pessoas por trás da linguagem. Essa mudança para trabalhar com dados no nível do usuário ou da comunidade apresentou ao campo características diferentes de dados linguísticos. Neste artigo, caracterizamos empiricamente várias distribuições lexicais em diferentes níveis de análise, mostrando que, embora a maioria das características seja decididamente esparsa e não normal no nível da mensagem (como na PNL tradicional), elas seguem o teorema do limite central para se tornarem muito mais Log-normal ou mesmo Normal nos níveis de usuário e município. Finalmente, demonstramos que a modelagem de recursos lexicais para o nível correto de análise leva a melhorias marcantes em tarefas comuns de previsão científica social.', 'fr': "Le traitement du langage naturel est de plus en plus passé de la modélisation de documents et de mots à l'étude des personnes derrière la langue. Ce passage à l'utilisation de données au niveau de l'utilisateur ou de la communauté a présenté au domaine différentes caractéristiques des données linguistiques. Dans cet article, nous caractérisons empiriquement diverses distributions lexicales à différents niveaux d'analyse, montrant que, bien que la plupart des caractéristiques soient décidément clairsemées et non normales au niveau du message (comme avec la PNL traditionnelle), elles suivent le théorème de la limite centrale pour devenir beaucoup plus log-normale ou même normale au au niveau des utilisateurs et des comtés. Enfin, nous démontrons que la modélisation des caractéristiques lexicales pour le bon niveau d'analyse conduit à des améliorations marquées dans les tâches courantes de prédiction en sciences sociales.", 'ja': '自然言語処理は、文書や単語のモデリングから、言語の背後にいる人々の研究へとますます移行しています。ユーザーまたはコミュニティレベルでデータを扱うこの動きは、言語データのさまざまな特徴をこの分野に提示しています。この論文では、さまざまなレベルの分析におけるさまざまな語彙分布を経験的に特徴づけ、ほとんどの特徴がメッセージレベルで決定的にまばらで非正規であるが（従来のNLPと同様に）、それらは中心限界定理に従って、ユーザーレベルとカウンティレベルではるかに対数正規になり、さらには正規になることを示した。最後に、正しいレベルの分析のために語彙的特徴をモデリングすることが、一般的な社会科学予測タスクの顕著な改善につながることを実証します。', 'zh': '自然语言处分益多,自建模文档及单词转究语言背后者。 此用户社区之数也使该域之异言也。 其在本文,据经验叙其词汇布,明虽多特征于消息(与旧NLP同)绝是疏非正态,然其循心极理,于用户县更对数正态也。 最后证词法特征建模以得其正,可以显善社会科学占。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण तेजी से मॉडलिंग दस्तावेजों और शब्दों से भाषा के पीछे के लोगों का अध्ययन करने की ओर बढ़ गया है। उपयोगकर्ता या सामुदायिक स्तर पर डेटा के साथ काम करने के इस कदम ने क्षेत्र को भाषाई डेटा की विभिन्न विशेषताओं के साथ प्रस्तुत किया है। इस पेपर में, हम विश्लेषण के विभिन्न स्तरों पर विभिन्न लेक्सिकल वितरणों को अनुभवजन्य रूप से चिह्नित करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि, जबकि अधिकांश विशेषताएं संदेश-स्तर पर निश्चित रूप से विरल और गैर-सामान्य हैं (पारंपरिक एनएलपी के साथ), वे उपयोगकर्ता और काउंटी-स्तरों पर बहुत अधिक लॉग-सामान्य या यहां तक कि सामान्य बनने के लिए केंद्रीय सीमा प्रमेय का पालन करते हैं। अंत में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि विश्लेषण के सही स्तर के लिए मॉडलिंग लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं से आम सामाजिक वैज्ञानिक भविष्यवाणी कार्यों में उल्लेखनीय सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Обработка естественного языка все больше переходит от моделирования документов и слов к изучению людей, стоящих за языком. В результате перехода к работе с данными на уровне пользователей или сообществ в данной области появились различные характеристики лингвистических данных. В этой работе мы эмпирически характеризуем различные лексические распределения на различных уровнях анализа, показывая, что, хотя большинство признаков явно редки и ненормальны на уровне сообщений (как и в случае с традиционной NLP), они следуют центральной предельной теореме, чтобы стать гораздо более Log-нормальными или даже нормальными на уровне пользователей и округов. Наконец, мы демонстрируем, что моделирование лексических признаков для правильного уровня анализа приводит к заметным улучшениям в общих задачах социально-научного прогнозирования.', 'ga': 'Tá próiseáil teanga nádúrtha ag bogadh níos mó ó shamhaltú doiciméid agus focail i dtreo staidéar a dhéanamh ar na daoine taobh thiar den teanga. Chuir an t-aistriú seo go dtí oibriú le sonraí ag leibhéal an úsáideora nó an phobail i láthair an réimse le tréithe éagsúla sonraí teangeolaíochta. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid tréithe eimpíreach ar dháiltí foclóireachta éagsúla ag leibhéil dhifriúla anailíse, rud a thaispeánann, cé go bhfuil an chuid is mó de na gnéithe cinnte gann agus neamhghnáth ag leibhéal na teachtaireachta (mar a dhéantar le NLP traidisiúnta), go leanann siad teoirim na teorann láir a bheith i bhfad. níos Log-gnáth nó fiú Gnáth ag an leibhéal úsáideora agus contae. Mar fhocal scoir, léirímid go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar thascanna coiteanna tuar eolaíochta sóisialta as samhaltú gnéithe foclóireachta don leibhéal ceart anailíse.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvfeldolgozás egyre inkább a dokumentumok és szavak modellezéséről a nyelv mögötti emberek tanulmányozására mozog. A felhasználói vagy közösségi szintű adatkezelésre való áttérés a nyelvi adatok különböző jellemzőivel mutatta be a területet. Ebben a tanulmányban empirikusan jellemzünk különböző lexikai eloszlásokat különböző elemzési szinteken, bemutatva, hogy bár a legtöbb jellemző határozottan ritka és nem normális az üzenetszinten (mint a hagyományos NLP esetében), a központi határtételt követik, hogy sokkal Log-normálisabbá, sőt normálisabbá váljanak felhasználói és megyei szinten. Végezetül bemutatjuk, hogy a lexikai jellemzők modellezése a megfelelő szintű elemzés érdekében jelentős javulást eredményez a közös társadalomtudományos előrejelzési feladatok terén.', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი უფრო მეტი მოდელური დოკუმენტებიდან და სიტყვებიდან ადამიანებს წავლისწავლისთვის. ეს მოძრაობა მომხმარებელი ან საზოგადოებო დონეში სამუშაო მუშაო დამუშაობისთვის განსხვავებული ინგუმისტიკური მონაცემების განსხვავებ ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ განსხვავებული ელექსიკალური განყოფილებები განსხვავებული ანალიზიციის დონეში გამოვაკეთებთ, როგორც უფრო მეტი ფუნქციები განსხვავებულია და არ ნორმალურია შეტყობინებების დონეში (როგორც ტერაციონალური NLP-ზე), ისინი უკეთესი საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ელექსიკალური განსაზღვრებების მარტივი განსაზღვრებისთვის მარტივი დონე ანალიზაციის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც საერთო სოციალური', 'el': 'Η επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας έχει μετακινηθεί όλο και περισσότερο από τη μοντελοποίηση εγγράφων και λέξεων προς τη μελέτη των ανθρώπων πίσω από τη γλώσσα. Αυτή η μετάβαση στην εργασία με δεδομένα σε επίπεδο χρήστη ή κοινότητας παρουσίασε το πεδίο με διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά γλωσσικών δεδομένων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, περιγράφουμε εμπειρικά διάφορες λεξικές διανομές σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα ανάλυσης, δείχνοντας ότι, ενώ τα περισσότερα χαρακτηριστικά είναι σαφώς αραιά και μη φυσιολογικά σε επίπεδο μηνυμάτων (όπως και με το παραδοσιακό), ακολουθούν το κεντρικό θεώρημα ορίων για να γίνουν πολύ πιο κανονικό ή ακόμα κανονικό σε επίπεδο χρήστη και κομητείας. Τέλος, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η μοντελοποίηση λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών για το σωστό επίπεδο ανάλυσης οδηγεί σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στις κοινές κοινωνικές επιστημονικές εργασίες πρόβλεψης.', 'kk': 'Тәуелді тіл процессі құжаттарды мен сөздерді тілдің артындағы адамдарды оқу үшін модельгеннен көтеріп жатқан. Бұл пайдаланушы не қоғамдық деңгейіндегі деректермен жұмыс істеу үшін өрісі лингвистикалық деректердің түрлі қасиеттерін көрсетті. Бұл қағазда біз әртүрлі лексикалық дистрибуттарды түрлі анализ деңгейінде таңдаймыз. Көпшілігі хат деңгейінде (әдімгі NLP деңгейіндегі сияқты және кәдімгі емес) дегенді көрсетеді. Олар орташа шектеу теориясына қарай журналды және па Соңында, біз анализ дұрыс деңгейіндегі лексикалық мүмкіндіктерін моделдеу үшін жалпы әлемдік ғылыми тапсырмалардың жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'it': "L'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale si è sempre più spostata dalla modellazione di documenti e parole allo studio delle persone dietro la lingua. Questo passaggio al lavoro con i dati a livello di utente o comunità ha presentato al campo diverse caratteristiche dei dati linguistici. In questo articolo, caratterizziamo empiricamente varie distribuzioni lessicali a diversi livelli di analisi, dimostrando che, mentre la maggior parte delle caratteristiche sono decisamente scarse e non normali a livello di messaggio (come con il PNL tradizionale), seguono il teorema del limite centrale per diventare molto più Log-normal o addirittura Normale a livello di utente e contea. Infine, dimostriamo che la modellazione delle caratteristiche lessicali per il corretto livello di analisi porta a miglioramenti marcati nelle attività di previsione scientifica sociale comuni.", 'ms': 'Pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi telah semakin bergerak dari pemodelan dokumen dan kata-kata untuk mempelajari orang di belakang bahasa. Pindah ini untuk bekerja dengan data pada aras pengguna atau komuniti telah memperlihatkan medan dengan ciri-ciri berbeza data bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kita secara empirik mengkaji pelbagai distribusi leksikal pada tahap-tahap analisis yang berbeza, menunjukkan bahawa, walaupun kebanyakan ciri-ciri tentunya jarang dan tidak normal pada aras mesej (seperti dengan NLP tradisional), mereka mengikut teorem had pusat untuk menjadi lebih Log-normal atau bahkan Normal pada aras pengguna dan daerah. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bahawa pemodelan ciri-ciri leksik untuk aras analisis yang betul membawa kepada peningkatan yang menandakan dalam tugas ramalan saintifik sosial umum.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും രേഖകളും വാക്കുകളും മാത്രം നീങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. @ info: status ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിതരണ വിഭാഗങ്ങളെ സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്നു. ഇത് കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, മിക്കവിധ വിഭാഗങ അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ശരിയായ പരിശോധനത്തിനുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമാണെന്നാണ്. സാമൂ', 'lt': 'Gamtinis kalbų apdorojimas vis labiau perėjo nuo dokumentų ir žodžių modeliavimo prie žmonių už kalbos tyrimo. Šis perėjimas prie bendradarbiavimo su duomenimis vartotojo ar bendruomenės lygmeniu parodė, kad laukas turi skirtingas kalbinių duomenų savybes. Šiame dokumente empiriniu būdu apibūdiname įvairius leksinius paskirstymus skirtingais analizės lygiais, rodančius, kad nors dauguma požymių yra neabejotinai retai ir nenormaliai pranešimo lygiu (kaip ir tradiciniame NLP), jie atitinka centrinę ribinę teoriją, kad taptų daug labiau Log-normali arba net Normali vartotojo ir apskritimo lygiu. Finally, we demonstrate that modeling lexical features for the correct level of analysis leads to marked improvements in common social scientific prediction tasks.', 'mk': 'Природното обработување на јазикот сé повеќе се префрли од моделирање на документи и зборови кон студирање на луѓето зад јазикот. Овој потег кон работата со податоци на корисничко или заедничко ниво го претстави полето со различни карактеристики на лингвистичките податоци. Во овој весник, емпирички ги карактеризираме различните лексикални дистрибуции на различни нивоа на анализа, покажувајќи дека, иако повеќето карактеристики се одлучно ретки и ненормални на ниво на порака (како и со традиционалниот НЛП), тие го следат централниот теорем на гранични граници за да станат многу понормални или дури и нормални на ниво Конечно, демонстрираме дека моделирањето на лексичките карактеристики за вистинското ниво на анализа води до значителни подобрувања во заедничките научни предвидувачки задачи.', 'no': 'Naturlig språkshandtering har aukande flytta frå modellering av dokument og ord til å studera folk bak språket. Denne flyttet til å arbeide med data på brukaren eller fellesskapsnivå har vist feltet med ulike karakteristikk på språkstatar. I denne papiret tegnar vi empirisk ulike leksiske distribusjonar på ulike analyseringsnivåar, som viser at, mens dei fleste funksjonar er avgjørleg sparke og ikkje-normal på meldingsnivå (som med tradisjonell NLP), følgjer dei sentrale grenseteorem for å bli mykje meir loggnormale eller til og med normale på brukaren- og county- nivået. I slutt viser vi at modellering av leksiske funksjonar for den rette nivået av analysen fører til markerte forbedringar i felles sosiale vitenskapelige foregåver.', 'mt': 'L-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi dejjem aktar ċaqlaq mill-immudellar tad-dokumenti u l-kliem lejn l-istudju tan-nies wara l-lingwa. Din il-bidla lejn il-ħidma mad-dejta fil-livell tal-utent jew tal-komunità ppreżentat il-qasam b’karatteristiċi differenti tad-dejta lingwistika. F’dan id-dokument, aħna kkaratterizzaw b’mod empiriku diversi distribuzzjonijiet lexiċi f’livelli differenti ta’ analiżi, li juru li, filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tal-karatteristiċi huma deċiżament rari u mhux normali fil-livell tal-messaġġ (bħal fil-każ ta’ NLP tradizzjonali), dawn isegwu t-teorema tal-limitu ċentrali biex isiru ħafna aktar Log-normali jew saħansitra Normali fil-livelli tal-utent u tal-kontea. Fl-aħħar nett, nagħmlu xhieda li l-immudellar ta’ karatteristiċi lexiċi għal-livell korrett ta’ analiżi jwassal għal titjib sinifikanti fil-kompiti komuni ta’ tbassir xjentifiku soċjali.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл нь хэлний ард хүмүүсийг судлах үеэс баримт болон үгийг загварчлахаас илүү их хөдөлж байна. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчийн эсвэл нийгмийн түвшинд өгөгдлийн талаар ажиллах хөдөлгөөн нь хэлний өгөгдлийн өөр өөр чанартай талаар илэрхийлж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр хэмжээний шинжилгээний түвшинд олон хэлбэрүүдийн хуваарилалтыг харуулж байна. Ихэнх чадварууд нь захиа түвшинд шийдвэрлэх болон нормалгүй (уламжлалт НLP-тай адил) байдаг. Тэд төв хязгаарлалтын теоремыг дагаж, хэрэглэгчид болон улс төрийн түвшинд илүү Эцэст нь, бид зөв хэмжээний шинжилгээний хэмжээний үлгэр загварчлал нь нийгмийн шинжлэх ухааны таамаглалтын ажил дээр илүү сайжруулагддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Procesarea limbajului natural s-a mutat din ce în ce mai mult de la modelarea documentelor și a cuvintelor spre studierea oamenilor din spatele limbii. Această trecere la lucrul cu date la nivel de utilizator sau comunitar a prezentat domeniului caracteristici diferite ale datelor lingvistice. În această lucrare, caracterizăm empiric diferite distribuții lexicale la diferite niveluri de analiză, arătând că, deși majoritatea caracteristicilor sunt decisiv rare și non-normale la nivel de mesaj (ca și în cazul PNL tradițional), ele urmează teorema limită centrală pentru a deveni mult mai Log-normal sau chiar Normal la nivel de utilizator și județ. În cele din urmă, demonstrăm că modelarea caracteristicilor lexicale pentru nivelul corect de analiză duce la îmbunătățiri semnificative în sarcinile comune de predicție socială științifică.', 'pl': 'Przetwarzanie języka naturalnego coraz częściej przesuwa się od modelowania dokumentów i słów do badania ludzi stojących za językiem. Przejście do pracy z danymi na poziomie użytkowników lub społeczności przedstawiło tej dziedzinie różne cechy danych językowych. W niniejszym artykule empirycznie charakteryzujemy różne rozkłady leksykaliczne na różnych poziomach analizy, pokazując, że chociaż większość cech jest zdecydowanie rzadka i nienormalna na poziomie komunikatu (jak w przypadku tradycyjnego NLP), podążają one za centralnym teorem granicy, aby stać się znacznie bardziej normalne lub nawet Normalne na poziomie użytkownika i hrabstwa. Wreszcie pokazujemy, że modelowanie cech leksykalnych dla właściwego poziomu analizy prowadzi do znacznej poprawy wspólnych zadań prognozowania społeczno-naukowych.', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista luqada asalka ah waxey si badan uga dhaqdhaqaaqsatay sameynta dukumentiyada iyo hadallada xagga barashada luqada ka dambeeya dadka. Dhaqaalahan ugu shaqeynta macluumaadka heerka isticmaalaha ama heerka bulshada ayaa berrinka ku diyaariyey takhasusyo kala duduwan oo macluumaadka luuqada ah. Qoraalkan waxaan si rasmi ah ugu qornaa qayb kala duduwan shahaado kala duduwan, waxaana tusinayaa, inta badan xittaa waxyaabaha badan waxay si gaar ah ugu badnaan yihiin iyo si aan caadi aheyn heerka wargeyska (sida asal ah NLP), waxay raacaan theorem dhexe si ay u noqdaan si aad u badan Log-normal ama xataa caadi ah heerarka isticmaalaha iyo tuulooyinka. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu muujinnaa in tusaale ahaan heerka saxda ah ee baaritaanka, waxay leedahay hagaajinta shaqada cilmiga bulshada ee caadiga ah.', 'sr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika je sve više krenulo od modeliranja dokumenta i reči prema proučavanju ljudi iza jezika. Ovaj potez na rad sa podacima na korisniku ili razini zajednice pokazao je polje sa različitim karakteristikama jezičkih podataka. U ovom papiru, empirički karakteriziramo različite leksičke distribucije na različitim nivoima analize, pokazujući da, iako većina karakteristika odlučno su rezervirana i ne normalna na nivou poruke (kao sa tradicionalnim NLP-om), prate centralnu graničnu teoriju da postanu mnogo normalniji ili čak i normalniji na nivou korisnika i okruga. Konačno, pokazujemo da modeliranje leksičkih karakteristika za ispravnu nivou analize vodi do označenih poboljšanja zajedničkih zadataka socijalnih naučnih predviđanja.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය වැඩියෙන් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් ලිපි මේක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නැත්තම් සමාජික ස්ථානයේ දත්ත සමඟ වැඩ කරන්නේ භාෂාවික දත්තේ වෙනස් විශේෂ සුද්ධ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි empiriically characharacharacharact varyර් ලෙක්සිකල් විතරයේ විශ්ලේෂණ ස්ථානයේ වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ, පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ගොඩක් විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්දේශ සහ නො අන්තිමේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා විශ්ලේෂණ සාමාජික විශ්ලේෂණ සැකසුම් සඳහා ලෙක්සිකාලික අවශ්\u200dය විශ', 'sv': 'Naturliga språkprocesser har alltmer flyttat från att modellera dokument och ord till att studera människorna bakom språket. Denna övergång till att arbeta med data på användar- eller samhällsnivå har gett fältet olika egenskaper hos språkliga data. I denna uppsats karakteriserar vi empiriskt olika lexikala fördelningar på olika analysnivåer, vilket visar att medan de flesta funktioner är klart glesa och icke-normala på meddelandenivå (som med traditionell NLP), följer de centrala gränssatsen för att bli mycket mer Log-normal eller till och med Normal på användare- och länsnivå. Slutligen visar vi att modellering av lexikala funktioner för korrekt analysnivå leder till markanta förbättringar i gemensamma samhällsvetenskapliga förutsägelseuppgifter.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு மாதிரி ஆவணங்கள் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளை மாற்றியமைப்பது மொழியின் பின்னால் மக்களை படிக @ info இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் வேறு நிலைகளில் பல்வேறு லெக்சியல் பங்கீடுகளை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம். இது காட்டுகிறது, பெரும்பாலான தன்மைகள் செய்தி மட்டத்தில் சிறிதாக விட்டுவிடும் சாதாரண மற்றும இறுதியில், நாம் சரியான ஆய்வு நிலைக்கு மாதிரியும் லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களை காட்டுகிறோம் என்பது பொதுவான சமூக அறிவியல் முன்', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان پردازش کی مدل اور کلمات کی مطالعہ سے زیادہ اضافہ ہوتی ہے زبان کے پیچھے لوگوں کو پڑھنے کے لئے۔ یہ ڈیٹا یا کمونٹی سطح کے ساتھ کام کرنے کے لئے فیلڈ کو زبان شناسی ڈیٹا کے مختلف خصوصے سے پیش کیا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم مختلف تحلیل کے سطح میں مختلف لکسیکل تقسیم کرنے کی تعریف کررہے ہیں، یہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ، حالانکہ اکثر فرضیات پیغام سطح میں مضبوط اور غیر عام ہیں (اس طرح سنتی NLP کے ساتھ) وہ مرکزی محدودیت نظریم کے پیچھے چلتے ہیں کہ ان کے لئے Log-normal یا اچھی طرح عام ہو جانے کے لئے کارساز اور بالآخر، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تحلیل کے درست سطح کے لئے لکسیکل ویژگی موجودات کی مدل کرنا مشترک سازمانی علمی پیش بینی کے کاموں میں مشترک improvements کی وجہ سے ہے.', 'vi': 'Cách xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên ngày càng di chuyển từ những tài liệu và từ để học những người đứng sau ngôn ngữ. Việc chuyển đến làm việc với dữ liệu ở người dùng hay cộng đồng đã giới thiệu các đặc điểm khác nhau của các dữ liệu ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm mô tả các phân phát ngôn từ khác nhau ở các mức độ phân tích khác nhau, cho thấy rằng, trong khi hầu hết các tính năng rõ ràng là do sơ sài và không bình thường ở mức thông điệp (như với ngôn ngữ ngụcl truyền thống), chúng theo định lý giới hạn trung tâm để trở nên dễ dàng hơn hoặc thậm chí còn bình thường ở mức người dùng và hạt. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng tính năng ngôn ngữ văn học mẫu cho trình độ phân tích đúng dẫn đến những cải tiến đáng kể trong các nhiệm vụ dự đoán khoa học xã hội.', 'uz': "Natural language processing has increasingly moved from modeling documents and words toward studying the people behind the language.  Name Bu qogʻozda biz har xil darajadagi leksikal tarkibini aniqlash mumkin. Ko'rsatish mumkin, ko'pchilik xususiyatlarni xabar darajada kichiklashtirish va oddiy emas (oddiy NLP kabi), ular foydalanuvchi va taʼminlik darajada qo'llab bo'lish uchun katta chegarasining chegarasining chegarasini qo'shiladi. Endi, biz o'sha ko'rsatganimiz, to ʻgʻri taʼminot darajasi uchun leksikal xususiyatlarni ko'rsatdik, bu jamiyat ilmiy kutilgan vazifalarda o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'Обработката на естествения език все повече се движи от моделиране на документи и думи към изучаване на хората зад езика. Това преминаване към работа с данни на ниво потребител или общност е представило областта с различни характеристики на лингвистичните данни. В тази статия, ние емпирично характеризираме различни лексикални разпределения на различни нива на анализ, показвайки, че макар повечето характеристики да са определено рядки и нестандартни на ниво съобщение (както при традиционната НЛП), те следват теоремата за централната граница, за да станат много по-Log-нормални или дори нормални на ниво потребител и окръг. И накрая, демонстрираме, че моделирането на лексикалните характеристики за правилното ниво на анализ води до значителни подобрения в общите задачи за социално-научно прогнозиране.', 'hr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika sve više se kreće iz modeliranja dokumenta i riječi prema proučavanju ljudi iza jezika. Taj potez na rad s podacima na razini korisnika ili zajednice pokazao je polje s različitim karakteristikama jezičkih podataka. U ovom papiru empirički karakteriziramo različite leksičke distribucije na različitim razinama analize, pokazujući da, iako su većina karakteristika odlučno rezervirana i ne normalna na razini poruke (kao sa tradicionalnim NLP-om), prate centralnu graničnu teoriju da postanu mnogo normalniji ili čak i normalniji na razinama korisnika i okruga. Konačno, pokazujemo da modeliranje leksičkih karakteristika za ispravnu razinu analize dovede do označene poboljšanja zajedničkih zadataka socijalnog znanstvenog predviđanja.', 'da': 'Naturlig sprogbehandling er i stigende grad flyttet fra modellering af dokumenter og ord til at studere mennesker bag sproget. Denne bevægelse til at arbejde med data på bruger- eller fællesskabsniveau har præsenteret feltet for forskellige karakteristika ved sproglige data. I denne artikel karakteriserer vi empirisk forskellige leksikalske fordelinger på forskellige analyseniveauer, hvilket viser, at mens de fleste funktioner er afgørende sparsomme og ikke-normale på meddelelsesniveau (som med traditionel NLP), følger de den centrale grænse teorem til at blive meget mere Log-normal eller endda Normal på bruger- og amtsniveau. Endelig demonstrerer vi, at modellering af leksikalske funktioner til det korrekte analyseniveau fører til markante forbedringer i almindelige samfundsvidenskabelige forudsigelsesopgaver.', 'de': 'Die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache hat sich zunehmend von der Modellierung von Dokumenten und Wörtern hin zum Studium der Menschen hinter der Sprache bewegt. Dieser Übergang zur Arbeit mit Daten auf Benutzer- oder Gemeindeebene hat das Feld mit unterschiedlichen Merkmalen sprachlicher Daten präsentiert. In diesem Beitrag charakterisieren wir empirisch verschiedene lexikalische Verteilungen auf verschiedenen Analyseebenen und zeigen, dass die meisten Merkmale zwar auf Nachrichtenebene sehr spärlich und nicht normal sind (wie beim traditionellen NLP), sie aber dem zentralen Grenzwerttheorem folgen, um auf Benutzer- und Bezirksebene viel mehr Log-normal oder sogar Normal zu werden. Abschließend zeigen wir, dass die Modellierung lexikalischer Merkmale für die richtige Analysestufe zu deutlichen Verbesserungen bei gängigen sozialwissenschaftlichen Vorhersageaufgaben führt.', 'id': 'Proses bahasa alam telah semakin bergerak dari model dokumen dan kata-kata untuk mempelajari orang-orang di belakang bahasa. Pindah ini untuk bekerja dengan data di tingkat pengguna atau komunitas telah memperlihatkan medan dengan karakteristik berbeda dari data bahasa. In this paper, we empirically characterize various lexical distributions at different levels of analysis, showing that, while most features are decidedly sparse and non-normal at the message-level (as with traditional NLP), they follow the central limit theorem to become much more Log-normal or even Normal at the user- and county-levels.  Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa model karakteristik leksik untuk tingkat analisis yang tepat menyebabkan peningkatan yang jelas dalam tugas prediksi ilmiah sosial umum.', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리는 모델링 문서와 단어에서 언어 배후를 연구하는 사람들로 갈수록 많아지고 있다.사용자나 지역사회 차원에서 데이터를 처리하는 이런 방법은 이 분야에 서로 다른 언어 데이터 특징을 제공했다.본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 분석 차원에서 서로 다른 어휘의 분포를 실증 분석한 결과 대부분의 특징이 메시지 차원에서 현저하게 희소하고 비정상적이지만 중심 극한의 정리를 따라 사용자와 현 1급에서 더욱 대수적 정태, 심지어 정태로 변했다.마지막으로 우리는 정확한 분석 수준을 위해 모범 어휘 특징을 구축하면 흔히 볼 수 있는 사회 과학 예측 임무를 현저하게 개선할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'پردازش زبان طبیعی بیشتر از مدل کردن سند و کلمات به مطالعه مردم پشت زبان حرکت می\u200cکند. این حرکت برای کار کردن با داده ها در سطح کاربر یا جامعه با ویژگی های مختلف داده های زبان\u200cشناسی را نشان داده است. در این کاغذ، ما به طور عمومی توزیع زبانی مختلف را در سطح مختلف تحلیل مشخص می\u200cکنیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که، در حالی که بیشتر ویژگی\u200cها در سطح پیام\u200cها (به عنوان سطح NLP سنتی) به تصمیم گرفته و غیر عادی هستند، آنها از نظر مرکزی مرکزی پیروی می\u200cکنند تا به طور معمولی یا حتی عادی در سط بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که نمونه\u200cسازی ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی برای سطح درست تحلیل باعث می\u200cشود که توسعه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی علمی اجتماعی مشترک شده\u200cاند.', 'nl': 'De verwerking van natuurlijke taal is steeds meer verplaatst van het modelleren van documenten en woorden naar het bestuderen van de mensen achter de taal. Deze overgang naar het werken met gegevens op gebruikers- of gemeenschapsniveau heeft het veld verschillende kenmerken van taalkundige gegevens gepresenteerd. In dit artikel karakteriseren we empirisch verschillende lexicale distributies op verschillende niveaus van analyse, waaruit blijkt dat, hoewel de meeste kenmerken beslist schaars en niet-normaal zijn op berichtenniveau (zoals bij traditionele NLP), ze de centrale limietstelling volgen om veel meer Log-normaal of zelfs Normaal te worden op gebruikers- en county-niveau. Ten slotte tonen we aan dat het modelleren van lexicale kenmerken voor het juiste analyseniveau leidt tot duidelijke verbeteringen in gemeenschappelijke sociaal-wetenschappelijke voorspellingstaken.', 'tr': 'Tebiýal dil işlemesi senedi we sözleriň arkasynda adamlary öwrenmek üçin köpräk göçdi. Bu ýer ullançy ýa-da jemgyýet derejesinde maglumatlar bilen işlemek üçin sahypa dil maglumatyň farklı özellikleri görkezildi. Bu kagyzda biz empirik görnüşde dürli analýusyň düzümlerinde dürli leşik paýlaşmalaryny karakteriz edýäris. Köp karakterleriň mesaj derejesinde (Däpli NLP bilen ýaly) boýunça hasaplanýar we ullanyň derejesinde has gowy Log-normali ýa-da hat-da Normal bolmagyny görýäris. Soňunda, biz esaslaryň düzgün derejesi analýusiň düzgün derejesi üçin leksiýalyň düzümlerini jemi bilim öňünden täzeliklerde täzeliklerden gowurak getirýäris.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa lugha za asili umeongezeka kutoka katika kutengeneza nyaraka na maneno yanayoelekea kuelekeza watu nyuma ya lugha. Hatua hii ya kufanya kazi na taarifa katika kiwango cha mtumiaji au jumuiya imeonyesha uwanja wenye sifa tofauti za takwimu za lugha. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka sifa mbalimbali za usambazaji wa lexico katika ngazi mbalimbali za uchambuzi, tunaonyesha kuwa, wakati vipengele vingi vinavyopungua na si kawaida katika ngazi za ujumbe (kama ilivyo kwa ujumbe wa kitamaduni wa NLP), wanafuata theorem ya katikati ili kuwa zaidi ya kujiandikisha kwa ajili ya kawaida au hata kawaida katika ngazi za mtumiaji- na nchi. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kwamba kuonyesha vipengele vya lexico kwa kiwango sahihi cha uchambuzi unapelekea kuonyesha maboresho katika kazi za utabiri wa kijamii.', 'af': 'Natuurlike taal verwerking het vergroei van modellering van dokumente en woorde tot die mense agter die taal te studeer. Hierdie skuif na werk met data op die gebruiker of gemeenskapsvlak het die veld voorgestel met verskillende karakteristieke van lingwisiese data. In hierdie papier, ons in empiriese karakteriseer verskillende leksiese verspreidings op verskillende vlakke van analisie, wys dat, terwyl die meeste funksies is besluit sparse en non-normale by die boodskap-vlak (soos met tradisionele NLP), hulle volg die sentrale beperking teoriem om baie meer Log-normale of selfs normale te word by die gebruiker- en county-vlakke. Eindelik, ons wys dat die modellering van leksiese eienskappe vir die korrekte vlak van analisie lei na gemerkte verbeteringe in gemeenskaplike sosiale wetenskaplike voorskou opdragte.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işləməsi belələri və sözləri dillərin arkasındakı insanları öyrənməyə daha çox dəyişdi. Bu istifadəçi və toplum seviyesində məlumatlarla birlikdə çalışmaq üçün sahəni dil məlumatlarının müxtəlif özellikləri ilə göstərdi. Bu kağızda, biz müxtəlif dəyişiklik dağıtımları analizi dəyişiklikdə empirik olaraq tanıyırıq, çünki çox xüsusiyyətlər mesaj seviyesində qərar verilmiş və xüsusiyyətli deyillər. Sonunda, biz göstəririk ki, analizin düzgün səviyyəsi üçün layiq tərzlərin modelləşdirilməsi ortaq sosial elmi tədbirləşdirilmiş işlərdə işarə edilmiş yaxşılıqlara yol göstərir.', 'hy': 'Natural language processing has increasingly moved from modeling documents and words toward studying the people behind the language.  Այս շարժումը օգտագործողի կամ համայնքի մակարդակի տվյալների հետ աշխատելու համար ներկայացրել է դաշտը լեզվաբանական տվյալների տարբեր հատկություններով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք էմպիրիկ կերպով բնորոշվում ենք տարբեր լեքսիկական տարածումները վերլուծության տարբեր մակարդակներում, ցույց տալով, որ մինչ հատկանիշների մեծամասնությունը հաղորդագրության մակարդակում բացարձակ է և ոչ նորմալ (ինչպես ավանդական ՆԼՊ-ի դեպքում), նրանք հետևում են կենտրոնական սահմանափակումների տեսախտին Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ վերլուծության ճիշտ մակարդակի լեքսիկական հատկությունների մոդելը հանգեցնում է հասարակական գիտական կանխատեսման հանրային խնդիրների նշանակալի բարելավմանը:', 'sq': 'Procesimi natyror i gjuhës është lëvizur gjithnjë e më shumë nga modelimi i dokumenteve dhe fjalëve drejt studimit të njerëzve pas gjuhës. This move to working with data at the user or community level has presented the field with different characteristics of linguistic data.  Në këtë letër, ne karakterizojmë empirikisht shpërndarjet e ndryshme lexike në nivele të ndryshme analize, duke treguar se, ndërsa shumica e karakteristikave janë vendimisht të pakta dhe jo-normale në nivelin e mesazhit (si me NLP tradicionale), ato ndjekin teoremin qendror të kufirit për të bërë shumë më Log-normal apo madje edhe Normal në nivelet e përdoruesit dhe qarkut. Më në fund, ne demonstrojmë se modelimi i karakteristikave lexike për nivelin e saktë të analizës çon në përmirësime të rëndësishme në detyrat e përbashkëta të parashikimit shkencore shoqëror.', 'am': 'የአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ከቋንቋው ጀምሮ ሕዝቡን ለማስተምር እና ቃላትን በመዘርጋት ይነቀሳል፡፡ ይህ መንቀሳቅስ በተጠቃሚ ወይም ማኅበረሰብ ደረጃ ላይ ከዳታ ጋር ለመሥራት የመድረክ መሬት በተለየ ቋንቋዊ ዳታ የተለየ የቋንቋ መረጃዎች ነው። በዚህ ገጽ፣ በተለየ ልዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ የሌክሲካዊ አካባቢዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም፣ የሊክሲካዊ አካላት ለመፍጠር የሚያሳየው ማኅበራዊ ሳይንቀሳዊ ትንቢት ስራዎችን የሚያሳውቅ ማድረግ ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Prirodno obrazovanje jezika se sve više kreće od modeliranja dokumenta i riječi prema proučavanju ljudi iza jezika. Ovaj potez na rad sa podacima na korisniku ili razini zajednice predstavio je polje sa različitim karakteristikama jezičkih podataka. U ovom papiru, empirički karakteriziramo različite leksičke distribucije na različitim nivoima analize, pokazujući da, iako većina karakteristika odlučno su rezervirana i ne normalna na nivou poruke (kao sa tradicionalnim NLP-om), prate centralnu teoriju ograničenja da postanu mnogo normalniji ili čak i normalniji na nivou korisnika i okruga. Konačno, pokazujemo da modeliranje leksičkih karakteristika za ispravnu razinu analize dovede do označene poboljšanja zajedničkih zadataka socijalnih naučnih predviđanja.', 'ca': "El processament natural de llenguatges ha passat cada cop més de modelar documents i paraules cap a estudiar la gent darrere del llenguatge. Aquest pas a treballar amb dades a nivell d'usuari o comunitat ha presentat el camp amb diferents característiques de les dades lingüístices. En aquest paper, caracteritzem empíricament diverses distribucions lècsiques a diferents nivells d'anàlisi, mostrant que, mentre la majoria de característiques són decididament escases i anormals a nivell de missatges (com en NLP tradicional), segueixen el teorema central de límit per convertir-se en molt més Log-normal o fins i tot Normal a nivell d'usuari i comté. Finalment, demostram que modelar característiques lècsiques per al nivell correcte d'anàlisi porta a millores significatives en tasques comunes de predicció social científica.", 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়া ভাষার পেছনে লোকদের পড়তে থাকা নথিপত্র এবং শব্দের মডেলিং থেকে বাড়তে থাকে। ব্যবহারকারী অথবা সম্প্রদায়ের স্তরে তথ্য কাজ করার জন্য এই পদক্ষেপ ভিন্ন ভাষাগত তথ্যের বিভিন্ন চরিত্র দিয়ে ক্ষে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ে বিভিন্ন লেক্সিক্যাল বিতরণের বিভিন্ন স্তরে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন লেক্সিক্যাল বিতরণের ব্যাখ্যা করি, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বেশীরভাগ বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা প্রদর্শন করছি যে সঠিক পর্যায়ে বিশ্লেষণের জন্য লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের মডেলিং ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানি', 'et': 'Looduskeele töötlemine on üha enam liikunud dokumentide ja sõnade modelleerimiselt keele taga olevate inimeste uurimisele. See üleminek andmetega töötamisele kasutaja või kogukonna tasandil on andmete valdkonnale andnud erinevaid tunnuseid keelelistele andmetele. Käesolevas töös kirjeldame empiiriliselt erinevaid leksikaalseid jaotusi erinevatel analüüsitasanditel, näidates, et kuigi enamik funktsioone on sõnumi tasandil otsustavalt hõredad ja ebanormaalsed (nagu traditsioonilise NLP puhul), järgivad nad keskse piiri teoreemi, et saada palju Log-normaalsemaks või isegi normaalsemaks kasutaja- ja maakonnatasandil. Lõpuks näitame, et leksikaalsete funktsioonide modelleerimine õige analüüsitaseme jaoks toob kaasa märkimisväärse paranemise tavalistes sotsiaalteaduslikes ennustusülesannetes.', 'cs': 'Zpracování přirozeného jazyka se stále více posunulo od modelování dokumentů a slov ke studiu lidí za jazykem. Tento přechod k práci s daty na úrovni uživatelů nebo komunity představil obor s různými charakteristikami jazykových dat. V tomto článku empiricky charakterizujeme různá lexikální rozdělení na různých úrovních analýzy, což ukazuje, že ačkoli většina funkcí je rozhodně řídká a neobvyklá na úrovni zpráv (jako u tradičního NLP), následují centrální limitní teorii a stávají se mnohem více Log-normální nebo dokonce Normální na uživatelské a okresní úrovni. Nakonec ukazujeme, že modelování lexikálních rysů pro správnou úroveň analýzy vede k výraznému zlepšení běžných sociálně vědeckých predikčních úloh.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen käsittely on yhä enemmän siirtynyt dokumenttien ja sanojen mallintamisesta kielen taustalla olevien ihmisten tutkimiseen. Siirtyminen tietojen käsittelyyn käyttäjä- tai yhteisötasolla on tuonut kentälle erilaisia kieliaineiston ominaisuuksia. Tässä työssä karakterisoimme empiirisesti erilaisia leksikaalisia jakaumia eri analyysitasoilla, osoittaen, että vaikka useimmat ominaisuudet ovat selvästikin harvoja ja epänormaaleja viestitasolla (kuten perinteisessä NLP:ssä), ne seuraavat keskusrajateoreemaa muuttuakseen paljon Log-normaaliksi tai jopa normaaliksi käyttäjä- ja maakuntatasolla. Lopuksi osoitamme, että leksikaalisten ominaisuuksien mallintaminen oikeaan analyysitasoon johtaa merkittäviin parannuksiin yhteisissä yhteiskuntatieteellisissä ennustetehtävissä.', 'jv': 'Alternate Pindah iki nggawe karo data nang sampek komunitas nggawe jadi iki banget karo perkaragan akeh perkaragan karo data Linguistik. Nang pepulan iki, kéné empiresi cara-cara akeh luwih akeh luwih basa luwih karo akeh sampeyan winih, iso disebarke, uga akeh cara sing gak dhéwé cara nyimpen lan ora Normal le rangkar sampeyan (podho karo NLP Tradisyonan), dhewe diweh sistem limiten kanggo ditambah "log-normal" atawa soko Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Normal Lha wih-wih, kita maneh da model kang dipunangé luwih dumadhi kanggo nganggep dipunangé sampeyan sing bisa dianggap kanggo nggawe barang nggawe ngubah tarjamahan sakjane sakjane sakjane.', 'he': 'עיבוד שפת טבעית נע יותר ויותר ממודל מסמכים ומילים לכיוון ללמוד את האנשים מאחורי השפה. המהלך הזה לעבוד עם נתונים ברמה של המשתמש או הקהילה הציג את השדה עם אופיינים שונים של נתונים שפתיים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מאפיינים אמפירית פיצוצים לקסיים שונים ברמות שונות של ניתוח, מראים כי, בעוד רוב המאפיינים בהחלט נדירים ולא נורמליים ברמה ההודעות (כמו עם NLP מסורתית), הם עוקבים בתיאוריית הגבול המרכזית כדי להפוך הרבה יותר לוג-נורמלי או אפילו נורמלי ברמה המשתמשים והמחוזים. סוף סוף, אנו מראים שמודילים תכונות לקסיות לרמה הנכונה של ניתוח מובילים לשיפורים מסומנים במשימות צפייה חברתיות מדעיות משותפות.', 'ha': "Tafiyar da zaman harshen na fara ta ƙara kodi daga masanin takardar da magana zuwa karatun mutane bakin harshen. Wannan motsi da ya yi aiki da data kan daraja na mai amfani da shi ko jama'a, ya bãyar da field da wasu sifati na danne cikin linguistic. Daga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade rabon littafi masu cikin daraja daban-dabam, kuma munã nuna, kuma amma mafi yawansa mistakardu sunan zartar da kuma bã masu tsayi ba a cikin zanen-message (kamar da na da ɗabi'a na NLP), suna bin theorem na tsakanin, dõmin ya zama mafi ƙari ga Log-normal ko kuma don ya zama mai normal a cikin daraja na mai amfani da-kuma-ma'anar. Gani, za mu nuna cewa misalin misalin gizo na leksikaki wa daraja madaidaici na ƙirari, yana ƙara wa marubũta a cikin aikin littafan da kuma ma'abũcin jama'a.", 'sk': 'Obdelava naravnega jezika se je vse bolj premaknila od modeliranja dokumentov in besed k preučevanju ljudi za jezikom. S tem prehodom na delo s podatki na ravni uporabnika ali skupnosti je področje predstavilo različne značilnosti jezikovnih podatkov. V tem prispevku empirično opredelimo različne leksikalne porazdelitve na različnih ravneh analize, kar kaže, da je večina značilnosti kljub temu, da je na ravni sporočil odločilno redka in nenormalna (kot pri tradicionalnem NLP), sledijo izreku osrednje meje in postanejo veliko bolj Log-normalne ali celo Normalne na ravni uporabnika in okrožja. Nazadnje dokazujemo, da modeliranje leksikalnih značilnosti za pravilno raven analize vodi do izrazitih izboljšav v skupnih družbeno-znanstvenih nalogah napovedovanja.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྐད སྤྱད་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གཙོ་བོ་དང་ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས In this paper, we empirically characterize various lexical distributions at different levels of analysis, showing that, while most features are decidedly sparse and non-normal at the message-level (as with traditional NLP), they follow the central limit theorem to become much more Log-normal or even Normal at the user-and county-levels. མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་མིག་རྟགས་ལ་གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་རིམ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Exploring Neural Text Simplification Models', 'ar': 'استكشاف نماذج تبسيط النص العصبي', 'fr': 'Exploration des modèles de simplification de', 'pt': 'Explorando modelos de simplificação de texto neural', 'es': 'Exploración de modelos de simplificación de texto', 'ja': 'ニューラルテキスト簡略化モデルの探索', 'zh': '探神经文本简模', 'ru': 'Изучение моделей упрощения нейронного текста', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका पाठ सरलीकरण मॉडल की खोज', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Simplithe Téacs Néaracha a Iniúchadh', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ტექსტის გამოყენება მოდელების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Neurális szöveg egyszerűsítési modellek feltárása', 'el': 'Εξερεύνηση μοντέλων απλοποίησης νευρωνικού κειμένου', 'it': 'Esplorare modelli di semplificazione del testo neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық мәтін қарапайым үлгілерін зерттеу', 'mk': 'Истражување на модели за едноставување на неуралниот текст', 'lt': 'Neuralinio teksto supaprastinimo modelių tyrimas', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan Model Simplifikasi Teks Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d പദാവലി എളുപ്പമുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Esplorazzjoni ta’ Mudelli ta’ Simplifikazzjoni tat-Test Newrali', 'mn': 'Цөмийн текст хялбарчлалын загваруудыг судлах', 'no': 'Utforskar nøyrale tekst- forenklingsmodular', 'pl': 'Badanie neuronowych modeli uproszczenia tekstu', 'ro': 'Explorarea modelelor de simplificare a textului neural', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući modele pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තර කරන්න', 'ta': 'Exploring Neural Text Simplification Models', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha saxda qoraalka naadiga ah', 'sv': 'Utforska modeller för förenklad neural text', 'ur': 'نئورل ٹکسٹ سفالت موڈل کا تحقیق کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá Chế độ Đơn giản văn bản thần kinh', 'bg': 'Изследване на модели за опростяване на невронния текст', 'nl': 'Het verkennen van neurale tekstvereenvoudigingsmodellen', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af forenklingsmodeller for neural tekst', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje modela pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta', 'de': 'Erforschung neuronaler Textvereinfachungsmodelle', 'id': 'Menjelaskan Model Simplifikasi Teks Neural', 'fa': 'تحقیق مدل ساده\u200cسازی متن عصبی', 'tr': 'Neural Metin Besitlendirmek Modelleri Saýlaw', 'af': 'Vertoon Nural Teks Vereenvoudiging Modelle', 'ko': '탐색 신경 텍스트 간소화 모델', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Simplified Text', 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi i modeleve të thjeshtimit të tekstit neuronal', 'az': 'N√∂ral Metin Basitl…ôŇüdirm…ô Modell…ôri', 'hy': 'Նյարդային տեքստի պարզաբանման մոդելների ուսումնասիրելը', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'নিউরেল টেক্সট সাধারণ মোডেল খুঁজে বের করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući modele pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta', 'ca': 'Explorar models de simplificació del text neuronal', 'et': 'Neuroteksti lihtsustamise mudelite uurimine', 'fi': 'Neuraalisten tekstien yksinkertaistamismallien tutkiminen', 'cs': 'Prozkoumání modelů zjednodušení neuronového textu', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje modelov za poenostavitev živčnega besedila', 'jv': 'Gebudhakan model Kemerdekaan Teks Senegal', 'bo': 'Neural Text Simplification Models འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'he': 'מחקר מודלים של פשטות טקסט עצבי', 'ha': '@ action'}
{'en': 'We present the first attempt at using sequence to sequence neural networks to model text simplification (TS). Unlike the previously proposed automated TS systems, our neural text simplification (NTS) systems are able to simultaneously perform lexical simplification and content reduction. An extensive human evaluation of the output has shown that NTS systems achieve almost perfect grammaticality and meaning preservation of output sentences and higher level of simplification than the state-of-the-art automated TS systems', 'ar': 'نقدم المحاولة الأولى لاستخدام التسلسل لتسلسل الشبكات العصبية لنمذجة تبسيط النص (TS). على عكس أنظمة TS الآلية المقترحة سابقًا ، فإن أنظمة تبسيط النص العصبي (NTS) لدينا قادرة على إجراء تبسيط معجمي وتقليل المحتوى في وقت واحد. أظهر التقييم البشري الشامل للمخرجات أن أنظمة NTS تحقق قواعد نحوية مثالية تقريبًا وتعني الحفاظ على الجمل الناتجة ومستوى أعلى من التبسيط من أحدث أنظمة TS المؤتمتة', 'fr': "Nous présentons la première tentative d'utilisation de réseaux de neurones séquence à séquence pour modéliser la simplification de texte (TS). Contrairement aux systèmes TS automatisés proposés précédemment, nos systèmes de simplification de texte neuronal (NTS) sont capables d'effectuer simultanément une simplification lexicale et une réduction de contenu. Une évaluation humaine approfondie des résultats a montré que les systèmes NTS permettent d'obtenir une grammaticalité et une signification presque parfaites, une préservation des phrases de sortie et un niveau de simplification plus élevé que les systèmes TS automatisés de pointe.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos a primeira tentativa de usar sequência para sequenciar redes neurais para modelar simplificação de texto (TS). Ao contrário dos sistemas TS automatizados propostos anteriormente, nossos sistemas de simplificação de texto neural (NTS) são capazes de realizar simultaneamente simplificação lexical e redução de conteúdo. Uma extensa avaliação humana da saída mostrou que os sistemas NTS atingem gramaticalidade quase perfeita e preservação do significado das sentenças de saída e maior nível de simplificação do que os sistemas TS automatizados de última geração', 'es': 'Presentamos el primer intento de usar la secuencia para secuenciar redes neuronales para modelar la simplificación del texto (TS). A diferencia de los sistemas de TS automatizados propuestos anteriormente, nuestros sistemas de simplificación de texto neuronal (NTS) pueden realizar simultáneamente simplificación léxica y reducción de contenido. Una amplia evaluación humana de los resultados ha demostrado que los sistemas NTS logran una gramaticalidad y preservación del significado casi perfectas de las frases de salida y un mayor nivel de simplificación que los sistemas TS automatizados de última generación', 'ja': '我々は、シーケンスを使用してニューラルネットワークをシーケンス化してテキスト単純化（ ＴＳ ）をモデル化する最初の試みを提示する。以前に提案された自動TSシステムとは異なり、当社のニューラルテキスト簡略化（ NTS ）システムは、単語の簡略化とコンテンツの削減を同時に実行することができます。出力の広範な人間による評価は、NTSシステムが、最先端の自動TSシステムよりも、出力文のほぼ完璧な文法性と意味の保存を達成し、より高いレベルの簡素化を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '序以序神经网络,以简文本(TS)建模初试。 与前所上自动化 TS 统不同,臣等神经文本简化 (NTS) 统得兼行词法简而损益之。 凡输广工料,NTS统致全语法性与出句之义存,而先自动化TS者简化', 'hi': 'हम मॉडल पाठ सरलीकरण (टीएस) के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क अनुक्रम करने के लिए अनुक्रम का उपयोग करने का पहला प्रयास प्रस्तुत करते हैं। पहले से प्रस्तावित स्वचालित टीएस सिस्टम के विपरीत, हमारे तंत्रिका पाठ सरलीकरण (एनटीएस) सिस्टम एक साथ लेक्सिकल सरलीकरण और सामग्री में कमी करने में सक्षम हैं। आउटपुट के एक व्यापक मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चला है कि NTS सिस्टम लगभग पूर्ण व्याकरणिकता और आउटपुट वाक्यों के संरक्षण और अत्याधुनिक स्वचालित टीएस सिस्टम की तुलना में सरलीकरण के उच्च स्तर को प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Представляем первую попытку использования последовательности для последовательности нейронных сетей для моделирования упрощения текста (TS). В отличие от ранее предложенных автоматизированных систем TS, наши системы нейронного упрощения текста (NTS) способны одновременно выполнять лексическое упрощение и уменьшение содержания. Проведенная человеком обширная оценка результатов показала, что системы NTS достигают почти идеальной грамматичности и смыслового сохранения выходных предложений и более высокого уровня упрощения, чем современные автоматизированные системы TS', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair an chéad iarracht ar sheicheamh a úsáid chun líonraí néaracha a sheicheamhú chun simpliú téacs a shamhaltú (TS). Murab ionann agus na córais uathoibrithe TS a moladh roimhe seo, tá ár gcórais néar-simplithe téacs (NTS) in ann simpliú foclóireachta agus laghdú ábhair a dhéanamh ag an am céanna. Tá sé léirithe ag meastóireacht fhairsing dhaonna ar an aschur go mbaineann córais NTS amach gramadaí beagnach foirfe agus caomhnú brí abairtí aschuir agus leibhéal níos airde simplithe ná na córais uathoibrithe TS úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პირველი შეცდომის გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელი ტექსტის გამოყენებაზე ტექსტის გამოყენება (TS). ჩვენი ნეიროლური ტექსტის გამოყენება (NTS) სისტემებისგან ერთადერთად ლექსიკალური გამოყენება და შემდგომარების გამოყენება შეუძლებელია. NTS სისტემები გავაკეთება უფრო სრულია გრამატიკალურობა და ნიშნავს გავაკეთებული სიტყვების და უფრო სრულად სრულად სრულად გავაკეთებული TS სისტემებისგან.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη προσπάθεια χρήσης ακολουθίας για ακολουθία νευρωνικών δικτύων για μοντελοποίηση απλοποίησης κειμένου (TS). Σε αντίθεση με τα προηγουμένως προτεινόμενα αυτοματοποιημένα συστήματα, τα συστήματα απλοποίησης νευρωνικού κειμένου (NTS) μας είναι σε θέση να εκτελούν ταυτόχρονα λεξική απλοποίηση και μείωση περιεχομένου. Μια εκτεταμένη ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση της παραγωγής έδειξε ότι τα συστήματα NTS επιτυγχάνουν σχεδόν τέλεια γραμματικότητα και διατήρηση της έννοιας των προτάσεων εξόδου και υψηλότερο επίπεδο απλοποίησης από τα αυτοματοποιημένα συστήματα TS τελευταίας τεχνολογίας', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az első kísérletet arra, hogy az idegi hálózatok szekvenciáját használjuk a szöveg egyszerűsítésének modellezésére (TS). A korábban javasolt automatizált TS rendszerekkel ellentétben neurális szövegegyszerűsítő (NTS) rendszereink egyidejűleg képesek lexikális egyszerűsítést és tartalomcsökkentést végezni. A kimenet átfogó emberi értékelése azt mutatta, hogy az NTS rendszerek a kimeneti mondatok szinte tökéletes nyelvtanitását és jelentésének megőrzését és magasabb szintű egyszerűsítést érnek el, mint a korszerű automatizált TS rendszerek', 'it': "Presentiamo il primo tentativo di utilizzare la sequenza per sequenziare le reti neurali per modellare la semplificazione del testo (TS). A differenza dei sistemi TS automatizzati precedentemente proposti, i nostri sistemi di semplificazione del testo neurale (NTS) sono in grado di eseguire contemporaneamente la semplificazione lessicale e la riduzione dei contenuti. Un'ampia valutazione umana dell'output ha dimostrato che i sistemi NTS raggiungono una grammaticalità e una conservazione del significato quasi perfetta delle frasi di output e un livello più elevato di semplificazione rispetto ai sistemi TS automatizzati all'avanguardia", 'lt': 'Pirmą kartą bandome naudoti seką nervinių tinklų sekai modeliuoti teksto supaprastinimą (TS). Unlike the previously proposed automated TS systems, our neural text simplification (NTS) systems are able to simultaneously perform lexical simplification and content reduction.  An extensive human evaluation of the output has shown that NTS systems achieve almost perfect grammaticality and meaning preservation of output sentences and higher level of simplification than the state-of-the-art automated TS systems', 'kk': 'Мәтін қарапайым (TS) үлгісін реттеу үшін невралдық желілерді реттеу үшін бірінші реттеу қолдануды таңдаймыз. Біріншіден автоматты түрде қолданылған TS жүйелеріне қарамастан, біздің невралдық мәтінді қарапайым (NTS) жүйелеріміз лексикалық қарапайым және мазмұнын азайту мүмкін болады. Шығыстың көптеген адамдардың оқиғасы NTS жүйелері грамматикалық және шығыс сөйлемелерді сақтау және автоматикалық TS жүйелерінен артық қарапайым деңгейінде қарапайым деңгейінде болады.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме првиот обид да се користи секвенца за секвенција на нервните мрежи за моделирање на текстовите едноставувања (TS). За разлика од претходно предложените автоматизирани ТС системи, нашите системи за неурално текст поедноставување (НТС) можат истовремено да спроведат лексичко поедноставување и намалување на содржината. Експерсивната човечка проценка на излезот покажа дека НТС системите постигнуваат речиси совршена граматикалност и значи зачувување на излезните реченици и повисоко ниво на едноставување од најсовремените автоматизирани ТС системи', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan cubaan pertama untuk menggunakan urutan untuk urutan rangkaian saraf untuk model pemudahan teks (TS). Unlike the previously proposed automated TS systems, our neural text simplification (NTS) systems are able to simultaneously perform lexical simplification and content reduction.  Evaluasi manusia luas output telah menunjukkan bahawa sistem NTS mencapai grammatikal hampir sempurna dan maknanya memelihara kalimat output dan tahap pemudahan yang lebih tinggi daripada sistem TS automatik state-of-the-art', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എളുപ്പത്തിന്റെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എളുപ്പമാക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്ററില്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കാന മുമ്പ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ ടിഎസ് സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എളുപ്പമുള്ള (NTS) സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ  പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ വിശാലമായ മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസപ്രകാരം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു NTS സിസ്റ്റം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കേറ്റിയില്\u200d എത്തു', 'mn': 'Бид дарааллыг ашиглах анхны хичээл дээр мэдрэлийн сүлжээлүүдийг текст хялбарчлалын (TS) загварын дарааллаар загварлах болно. Өмнө нь автоматжуулсан TS системээс ялгаатай, бидний мэдрэлийн текст хялбарчлалын системүүд лексикийн хялбарчлал болон content багасгаж чадна. НТС системүүд бараг бүтэн грамматик байдлыг харуулж байна. Үүний утгыг гаргах болон урлагийн автоматик TS системээс илүү өндөр хялбарчлалын түвшинд хадгалах гэсэн үг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw l-ewwel tentattiv li nużaw sekwenza biex nissekwenzaw in-netwerks newrali biex nimmudellaw is-simplifikazzjoni tat-test (TS). Għall-kuntrarju tas-sistemi tat-TS awtomatizzati proposti qabel, is-sistemi tagħna tas-simplifikazzjoni tat-test newrali (NTS) jistgħu jwettqu simultanjament simplifikazzjoni lexika u tnaqqis tal-kontenut. Evalwazzjoni estensiva tal-output mill-bniedem uriet li s-sistemi NTS jiksbu kważi grammatika perfetta u li jfisser il-preservazzjoni tas-sentenzi tal-output u livell ogħla ta’ simplifikazzjoni mis-sistemi TS awtomatizzati l-aktar avvanzati', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy pierwszą próbę wykorzystania sekwencji do sekwencji sieci neuronowych do modelowania uproszczenia tekstu (TS). W przeciwieństwie do wcześniej proponowanych zautomatyzowanych systemów TS, nasze systemy uproszczenia tekstu neuronowego (NTS) są w stanie jednocześnie wykonywać uproszczenie leksykalne i redukcję treści. Obszerna ludzka ocena wyników wykazała, że systemy NTS osiągają niemal doskonałą gramatyczność i zachowanie znaczenia zdań wyjściowych oraz wyższy poziom uproszczenia niż nowoczesne zautomatyzowane systemy TS', 'no': 'Vi viser det første forsøket på å bruka sekvens for å sekvensera neuralnettverk til å modellere tekstforenklingar (TS). I motsetjing av dei førre foreslåde automatiske TS-systema kan våre neuraltekst-forenklingssystemet (NTS) utføra samtidig leksiske forenklingar og innhaldsreduksjon. Eit utvida menneskelig evaluering av utdata har vist at NTS-systemet gjer nesten perfekt grammatisk og betyr å lagra utdata-setningar og høgare nivå av forenklingar enn kunstsystemet automatisk TS-systemet', 'ro': 'Prezentăm prima încercare de a utiliza secvența pentru secvența rețelelor neurale pentru a modela simplificarea textului (TS). Spre deosebire de sistemele TS automatizate propuse anterior, sistemele noastre de simplificare a textului neural (NTS) sunt capabile să efectueze simultan simplificarea lexicală și reducerea conținutului. O evaluare umană amplă a rezultatului a arătat că sistemele NTS obțin gramaticalitate aproape perfectă și păstrarea sensului propozițiilor de ieșire și un nivel mai ridicat de simplificare decât sistemele TS automatizate de ultimă generație', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj korištenja sekvence za sekvenciju neuralnih mreža u modelu pojednostavljenja teksta (TS). Za razliku od prethodno predloženih automatskih TS sistema, naši sistemi pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta (NTS) mogu istovremeno izvršiti leksičku pojednostavljanje i smanjenje sadržaja. Ogromna ljudska procjena proizvoda pokazala je da sistemi NTS postignu skoro savršenu gramatičnost i znači zaštitu proizvodnjih rečenica i veću nivou jednostavnosti nego automatski sustavi TS-a.', 'si': 'අපි පළමු පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළු මුලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය TS පද්ධතිය සමහරවිට, අපේ න්\u200dයූරාල් පාළුව සම්පූර්ණය (NTS) පද්ධතිය සමහරවිට ලෙක්සික සම්පූර් NTS පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විශේෂ මිනිස්සු විශේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තේරුණා', 'so': 'Jahaadada ugu horraysa ee isticmaalka xilliga si aan u soo bandhijinno shabakada neurada si aan u sameyno sahlisashada qoraalka (TS). Sil ka duwan nidaamka hore ee TS-da, nidaamka qoraalka ee neurada ah (NTS) waxay sameyn karaan siman fududaanshada leksikada iyo hoosinta waxyaabaha ku jira. Qiimeynta dhamaanka dadku wuxuu muujiyay in nidaamka NTS ay gaadhaan dhowr maareynta kaamilka ah iyo micnaheedu ay ku jeedaan ilaalinta garsoorada soo baxa iyo heerka fududaanshaha ka sarreeya nidaamka farshaxanka', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar det första försöket att använda sekvens för att sekvensera neurala nätverk för att modellera textförenkling (TS). Till skillnad från tidigare föreslagna automatiserade TS-system kan våra neurala textförenklingssystem (NTS) samtidigt utföra lexikal förenkling och innehållsminskning. En omfattande mänsklig utvärdering av resultatet har visat att NTS-system uppnår nästan perfekt grammatik och innebörd bevarande av utmatningsmeningar och högre grad av förenkling än de senaste automatiserade TS-systemen', 'ta': 'நாம் முதல் முயற்சி தொடர்ச்சியை பயன்படுத்தி பின்னணி வலைப்பின்னல்களை தொடர்ந்து உரை எளிதாக்கத்தை மாதிரியில் மு முந்தைய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட ட டிஎஸ் அமைப்புகளை தானாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்க முடியும், எங்கள் புதிய உரை எளிதாக்கு (NTS) அமைப்புகள் ஒரே நேரத்தில வெளியீட்டின் விரிவாக மனித மதிப்பீடு காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் என்ட்ஸ் அமைப்புகள் கிட்டத்தட்ட முழுமையான வரிசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் அர்த்தம்', 'ur': 'ہم نئورل نیٹورک کے مطابق پہلی کوشش کو دکھاتے ہیں تاکسٹ سفالت کے مطابق (TS) کے مطابق نئورل نیٹورک کے مطابق۔ پہلے سے پہلے پیش کیا گیا ہے TS سیسٹم کے مطابق، ہمارے نیورل ٹیکسٹ سفارش (NTS) سیسٹم ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ لکسیکی سفارش اور منزل کم کر سکتے ہیں. اپوٹٹٹ کے ایک بڑے انسان کا ارزش دکھایا گیا ہے کہ NTS سیسٹم تقریباً کامل گراماتیکی حاصل کرتا ہے اور یعنی اپوٹٹ ویٹ ویٹوں کی حفاظت اور آہستہ آہستہ ٹیس سیسٹم سے زیادہ سادگی کی سطح حاصل کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Biz matn soddalashtirish (TS) modelini birinchi harakat qilamiz. Oldingi avtomatik avtomatik talab qilingan TS tizimlariga oʻxshash, bizning neyrolik matnning soddalashtirish (NTS) tizimlarimiz bir xil paytida leksikal soddalash va tarkibini kamaytirish mumkin. Natijani kengaytirish qoidagi qiymatni koʻrsatish mumkin, NTS tizimlari faqat toʻgʻri grammatikiyatli amalga oshadi va natijalar tugmasini saqlash va oddiylik darajasi davomida oddiylik TS tizimlaridan foydalanishi mumkin.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu nỗ lực đầu tiên nhằm sử dụng chuỗi thần kinh để phân phối các mạng thần kinh để mô hình đơn giản văn bản (TS). Không như những hệ thống S tự động đã đề xuất trước đây, hệ thống điều chỉnh văn bản thần kinh của chúng ta có khả năng mô phỏng ngôn ngữ và giảm nội dung. Một đánh giá rộng con người của kết quả đã cho thấy hệ thống ĐỘ cao đã đạt được tính toán tỉ mỉ gần hoàn hảo và có nghĩa là giữ các câu kết xuất và một mức độ đơn giản cao hơn hệ thống nâng cao nghệ thuật hoàn hảo của TS.', 'bg': 'Представяме първия опит за използване на последователност за последователност на невронни мрежи за моделиране на опростяване на текста (ТС). За разлика от предложените по-рано автоматизирани системи, нашите системи за опростяване на невронния текст (НТС) са в състояние едновременно да извършват лексикално опростяване и намаляване на съдържанието. Обширна човешка оценка на продукцията показва, че системите постигат почти перфектна граматика и запазване на смисъла на изходните изречения и по-високо ниво на опростяване в сравнение с най-съвременните автоматизирани системи за ТС', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj korištenja sekvencije za sekvenciju neuronskih mreža u modelu pojednostavljenja teksta (TS). Za razliku od prethodno predloženih automatskih sustava TS-a, naše sustave pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta (NTS) mogu istovremeno provesti leksičku pojednostavljanje i smanjenje sadržaja. Ogromna ljudska procjena proizvoda pokazala je da sustavi NTS postignu skoro savršenu gramatičnost i znači očuvanje proizvodnih rečenica i višu razinu pojednostavljivanja nego automatski sustavi TS-a.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de eerste poging om sequentie te gebruiken om neurale netwerken te sequenceren om tekstvereenvoudiging (TS) te modelleren. In tegenstelling tot de eerder voorgestelde geautomatiseerde TS-systemen kunnen onze neurale tekst vereenvoudiging (NTS) systemen gelijktijdig lexicale vereenvoudiging en inhoudsreductie uitvoeren. Een uitgebreide menselijke evaluatie van de output heeft aangetoond dat NTS-systemen bijna perfecte grammaticaliteit en betekenisbehoud van uitvoerzinnen bereiken en een hoger niveau van vereenvoudiging dan de state-of-the-art geautomatiseerde TS-systemen', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer det første forsøg på at bruge sekvens til at sekvensere neurale netværk til at modellere tekst forenkling (TS). I modsætning til de tidligere foreslåede automatiserede TS-systemer er vores neurale tekstforenklingssystemer (NTS) i stand til samtidig at udføre leksikalsk forenkling og indholdsreduktion. En omfattende menneskelig evaluering af output har vist, at NTS-systemer opnår næsten perfekt grammaticalitet og betydning bevarelse af output sætninger og højere grad af forenkling end de avancerede automatiserede TS-systemer', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan percobaan pertama untuk menggunakan urutan untuk urutan jaringan saraf untuk model penyimplifikasi teks (TS). Tidak seperti sistem TS yang telah diusulkan sebelumnya, sistem penyimplifikasi teks saraf (NTS) kita mampu secara bersamaan melakukan penyimplifikasi lexik dan reduksi isi. Evaluasi ekstensif manusia dari keluaran telah menunjukkan bahwa sistem NTS mencapai gramatikal hampir sempurna dan artinya memelihara kalimat keluaran dan tingkat lebih tinggi kesederhanaan daripada sistem TS yang terbaik otomatis', 'de': 'Wir stellen den ersten Versuch vor, Sequenz zur Sequenz neuronaler Netze zur Modellierung der Textvereinfachung (TS) zu verwenden. Im Gegensatz zu den zuvor vorgeschlagenen automatisierten TS-Systemen sind unsere neuronalen Textvereinfachungssysteme (NTS) in der Lage, gleichzeitig lexikalische Vereinfachung und Inhaltsreduktion durchzuführen. Eine umfangreiche menschliche Auswertung der Ausgabe hat gezeigt, dass NTS-Systeme eine nahezu perfekte Grammatik und Bedeutungserhaltung der Ausgabesätze und ein höheres Maß an Vereinfachung erreichen als die modernen automatisierten TS-Systeme', 'ko': '텍스트 단순화(TS)를 시뮬레이션하기 위해 시퀀스에서 시퀀스에 이르는 신경 네트워크를 처음 사용해 보았습니다.앞서 제시한 자동 TS 시스템과 달리 우리의 신경 텍스트 간소화(NTS) 시스템은 어휘 간소화와 내용 축소를 동시에 수행할 수 있다.인류가 수출에 대한 광범위한 평가를 통해 NTS 시스템은 수출 문장의 거의 완벽한 문법성과 의미 보존을 실현했고 가장 선진적인 자동 TS 시스템보다 간소화 정도가 높다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha jaribio la kwanza la kutumia mfululizo wa kufuatilia mitandao ya neurali ili kutengeneza ubora wa simu za ujumbe (TS). Tofauti na mifumo ya TS zilizopendekezwa hapo awali, mfumo wetu wa urahisi wa simu za mkononi (NTS) unaweza kufanya urahisi na kupunguza maudhui kwa wakati mmoja. Tafiti kubwa la binadamu la matokeo imeonyesha kuwa mfumo wa NTS hufanikiwa takribani ukaribu kamili na maana ya kuhifadhi hukumu za utoaji na kiwango kikubwa cha urahisi kuliko mfumo wa sanaa wa TS', 'fa': 'ما اولین تلاش را برای استفاده از رده برای رده شبکه\u200cهای عصبی به ساده\u200cسازی متن (TS) نشان می\u200cدهیم. برخلاف سیستم\u200cهای TS پیش\u200cفرض شده\u200cاند، سیستم\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی متن عصبی\u200cمان (NTS) می\u200cتوانند همزمان ساده\u200cسازی و کاهش محتویات زبانی را انجام دهند. یک ارزیابی انسانی وسیع از نتیجه نشان داده است که سیستم NTS تقریباً گراماتیک کامل رسیده است و یعنی حفاظت کردن جمله\u200cهای نتیجه و سطح بیشتری از ساده\u200cسازی از سیستم\u200cهای استفاده از TS به حالت هنر', 'tr': 'Biz näyral şebekeleri metin basitleştirmek üçin hatlary ulanmak üçin ilkinji synanyşy görkeýäris. Öň öňki täze teklip eden TS sistemlere görä, näyral metin bejermelerini (NTS) sistemlerimize bir zamanda leksiýal bejermelerini we maksadyny azaltyp biler. Çikgi üçin uly adamlaryň deňlenmesi NTS sistemleriniň gramatik sistemleriniň ýakyn şekilde mükemmel bir şekilde ulaşandygyny görkezildi we çykyş sözleriň goramagyny we sungat sistemleriniň otomatik sistemlerinden ýokary ýeterlik derejesini çözdi.', 'af': "Ons stel die eerste probeer om sekwensie te gebruik om neurale netwerke te sekwensie na model teks eenvoudiging (TS). Ongelyks van die voorheen aangestel outomatiese Tss stelsels, ons neurale teks eenvoudiging (NTS) stelsels kan eenmaal leksiese eenvoudiging en inhoud reduksie uitvoer. 'n Uitbreidige menslike evaluering van die uitvoer het vertoon dat NTS stelsels amper perfekte grammatiese bereik en beteken opserving van uitvoer setinge en hoër vlak van eenvoudiging as die staat van die kuns outomatiese TS stelsels", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim përpjekjen e parë për të përdorur sekuencën për të sekuencuar rrjetet neuronale për të modeluar thjeshtësimin e tekstit (TS). Në ndryshim nga sistemet e TS-ve të propozuara më parë, sistemet tona të thjeshtësimit të tekstit nervor (NTS) janë në gjendje të kryejnë njëkohësisht thjeshtësimin lexik dhe reduktimin e përmbajtjes. Një vlerësim i gjerë njerëzor i rezultatit ka treguar se sistemi NTS arrin pothuajse grammatikalitetin e përsosur dhe kuptimin e ruajtjes së fjalëve të daljes dhe nivelin më të lartë të thjeshtësimit se sistemi i automatizuar TS më i lartë', 'am': 'We present the first attempt at using sequence to sequence neural networks to model text simplification (TS).  ከቀድሞው የተዘጋጀው የTS ሲስተም በተለየ፣ የናቡral ጽሑፍ ቀላልነት (NTS) ሲስተካከላችን ለሌክሲካዊ ቀላልነት እና የሆኑን አካሄድ በመስጠት ይችላል፡፡ የውጤት ግንኙነት የሰው ማስታወቂያ የNTS ስርዓቶች ፍጹም ግራማሪነትን እንዲያገኙ እና የውጤት ክፍተቶችን ማግኘት እና የአውጤት ግንኙነትን ከ-አርእስት-ስርዓት-ስርዓት-ስርዓት-ስርዓት-ስርዓት ስርዓት ማግኘት ከፍተኛ ስህተት ማግኘት ያስታ', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին փորձը օգտագործելու հաջորդականությունը նյարդային ցանցերի հաջորդականության համար տեքստի պարզաբանման (ՏՍ) մոդելավորման համար: Ի տարբերություն նախկինում առաջարկված ավտոմատիկ ԹՍ համակարգերին, մեր նյարդային տեքստի պարզաբանման (ՆԹՍ) համակարգերը կարող են միաժամանակ կատարել լեքսիկական պարզաբանություն և պարունակության կրճատում: Արդյունքի էքսպենսիվ մարդկային գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ ՆԹՍ համակարգերը հասնում են գրեթե կատարյալ գրամատիկականության և նշանակում են պահպանել արտադրյալ նախադասությունները և ավելի բարձր պարզաբանության մակարդակը, քան ամենաբարձր ավտոմատիկ ԹՍ համա', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj korištenja sekvencije za sekvenciju neuralnih mreža u modelu pojednostavljenja teksta (TS). Za razliku od prethodno predloženih automatskih sustava TS-a, naši sustavi pojednostavljanja neuronskog teksta (NTS) mogu istovremeno provesti leksičku pojednostavljanje i smanjenje sadržaja. Ogromna ljudska procjena proizvoda pokazala je da sistemi NTS postignu skoro savršenu gramatičnost i znači čuvanje proizvodnih rečenica i višeg nivoa jednostavnosti nego automatski sustavi TS-a.', 'ca': "Presentam el primer intent d'utilitzar seqüència per seqüenciar xarxes neurals per modelar la simplificació del text (TS). A diferència dels sistemes TS automatitzats anteriorment proposats, els nostres sistemes de simplificació del text neural (NTS) poden fer simultàniament simplificació lexical i reducció del contingut. Una extensa evaluació humana de la producció ha demostrat que els sistemes NTS aconsegueixen una gramàtica gairebé perfecta i significativa conservació de les frases de producció i un nivell més alt de simplificació que els sistemes TS automatitzats d'última generació", 'az': 'Biz ilk sıralama işləmək üçün nöral ağlarını mətn basitləşdirməsi üçün göstəririk. Əvvəlcə təklif edilmiş TS sistemlərinin bənzərinə baxmayaraq, nöral metin oxuması (NTS) sistemimiz bir yerdə leksik oxumağı və məlumat azaltmağı mümkün olar. Çıqtının böyük insan değerlendirməsi göstərdi ki, NTS sistemlərinin neredeyse tamamlanmış qrammatik olaraq, çıxış cümlələrinin qoruması və art ıq sistemlərinin automatik TS sistemlərindən daha yüksək səviyyədə basitlaşdırmağı anlamına gəlir.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রথম প্রচেষ্টা উপস্থাপন করি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক সেকেন্স ব্যবহার করার জন্য, টেক্সট সুস্পষ্ট (টিএস)। পূর্ববর্তী প্রস্তাবিত টিএস সিস্টেমগুলোর মধ্যে থেকে ভিন্ন নয়, আমাদের নিউরেল ল লেক্সিক্সিক স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং বিষয়বস্তুর কমানোর স আউটপুটের ব্যাপক মানুষের মূল্য দেখাচ্ছে যে এনটিএস সিস্টেম প্রায় সঠিক গ্রাম্যাটিকেট অর্থ প্রায় সম্পূর্ণ এবং এর অর্থ হচ্ছে আউটপুটের শাস্তি সংরক্', 'et': 'Esitleme esimest katset kasutada järjestust neurovõrkude järjestamiseks teksti lihtsustamise modelleerimiseks (TS). Erinevalt varem pakutud automatiseeritud TS-süsteemidest suudavad meie neuroteksti lihtsustamise (NTS) süsteemid samaaegselt teostada leksikaalset lihtsustamist ja sisu vähendamist. Väljundi ulatuslik inimlik hindamine on näidanud, et NTS-süsteemid saavutavad peaaegu täiusliku grammatilisuse ja tähenduse väljundväljendite säilitamise ning kõrgema lihtsustamise taseme kui kaasaegsed automatiseeritud TS-süsteemid', 'cs': 'Představujeme první pokus o použití sekvence k sekvenci neuronových sítí k modelování zjednodušení textu (TS). Na rozdíl od dříve navržených automatizovaných TS systémů jsou naše systémy neuronového zjednodušení textu (NTS) schopny současně provádět lexikální zjednodušení a redukci obsahu. Rozsáhlé lidské hodnocení výstupu ukázalo, že systémy NTS dosahují téměř dokonalé gramatičnosti a významu zachování výstupních vět a vyšší úrovně zjednodušení než moderní automatizované TS systémy', 'fi': 'Esittelemme ensimmäisen yrityksen käyttää sekvenssiä neuroverkkoja tekstin yksinkertaistamisen mallintamiseen. Toisin kuin aiemmin ehdotetut automatisoidut TS-järjestelmät, neurotekstien yksinkertaistaminen (NTS) -järjestelmämme pystyvät samanaikaisesti suorittamaan sanaston yksinkertaistamista ja sisällön vähentämistä. Laaja inhimillinen arvio tuotoksesta on osoittanut, että NTS-järjestelmät saavuttavat lähes täydellisen kielioppisuuden ja merkityksen lähtölauseiden säilymisen ja paremman yksinkertaisuuden kuin uusimmat automatisoidut TS-järjestelmät', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nang sampeyan seneng dadi seneng dadi ditumpa alat seneng pisan (TS). lah Wang kategori bantuan nggambar uwong sing ngerasai sistem NDS kuwi mesthi akeh perusahaan kelas nggawe barang nggambar kuwi mau, nik kuwi tindakan sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan langkung sampeyan liyane', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo prvi poskus uporabe zaporedja za zaporedje nevronskih omrežij za modeliranje besedilne poenostavitve (TS). Za razliko od prej predlaganih avtomatiziranih TS sistemov lahko naši sistemi za poenostavitev nevronskega besedila (NTS) hkrati izvajajo leksikalno poenostavitev in zmanjšanje vsebine. Obsežna človeška ocena rezultatov je pokazala, da sistemi NTS dosegajo skoraj popolno slovničnost in pomen ohranjanja izhodnih stavkov ter višjo stopnjo poenostavitve kot najsodobnejši avtomatizirani sistemi TS', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da jarraba ta farko da za'a yi amfani da sequence zuwa masu saka wa zanen neural zuwa motsi masu sauƙar da matsayin (TS). Fara kwamfyutan da aka buɗa wa'uran da aka fara ta farat-farat TS, na'uranmu na mutilation na matsayin neural (NTS) za'a iya samu'a aikin sauƙilisasiyar leksisi da ƙararra. Bayan hakarin mutum na faɗi ga fitarwa ya nuna cewa na'urar NTS' na sãmu nesta cikakken grammati da ma'anar tsarin tsari ga saurãre na fitarwa da daraja mafi daidaita daga state-of-the-art na-farat TS", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את הניסיון הראשון להשתמש ברצף כדי לרצף רשתות עצביות כדי לדוגמא פשטות טקסט (TS). בניגוד למערכות טס אוטומטיות המוצעות קודם, מערכות הטקסט העצבי שלנו (NTS) מסוגלות לבצע באותו הזמן הפשטות הלקסית ומפחית התוכן. הערכה אנושית רחבה של ההוצאה הראה כי מערכות NTS משיגות כמעט גרמטיקות מושלמת ומשמרת המשמעות לשמור על משפטי ההוצאה ורמה גבוהה יותר של הפשטות מאשר מערכות טס אוטומטיות מוקדמות', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་རྣམས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་དང་པོ་འདི་སྟོན་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་TS་ལག་ཆ་དང་མ་མཐུན་པས་ང་ཚོའི་དཔུད་རིས་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཉེན་ An extensive human evaluation of the output has shown that NTS systems achieve almost perfect grammaticality and meaning preservation of output sentences and higher level of simplification than the state-of-the-art automated TS systems'}
{'en': 'Understanding Task Design Trade-offs in Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'ar': 'فهم مقايضات تصميم المهام في مجموعة إعادة صياغة التعهيد الجماعي', 'fr': 'Comprendre les compromis entre la conception des tâches dans la collecte participative de paraphrases', 'es': 'Comprensión de las compensaciones del diseño de tareas en la colección de paráfrasis de colaboración colectiva', 'pt': 'Compreendendo as compensações do design de tarefas na coleção de paráfrases de crowdsourcing', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングされたパラフレーズコレクションにおけるタスク設計のトレードオフの理解', 'zh': '知众包释义合事权衡', 'ru': 'Понимание компромиссов для разработки задач в коллекции краудсорсинговых парафраз', 'hi': 'Crowdsourced पैराफ्रेज़ संग्रह में कार्य डिजाइन ट्रेड-ऑफ को समझना', 'ga': 'Comhbhabhtáil i nDearadh Tascanna a Thuiscint i mBailiúchán Parafrása Sluaite', 'ka': 'Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'el': 'Κατανόηση των συμβιβασμών σχεδιασμού εργασιών στη συλλογή παραφράσεων από κοινού', 'hu': 'A feladattervezési kompromisszumok megértése a közösségi forrásból álló parafrázgyűjteményben', 'it': 'Comprendere i compromessi di task design nella raccolta di parafrasi Crowdsourced', 'kk': 'Тапсырма құрылғының түсініктемесін түсіндіру', 'lt': 'Susipažinti su užduočių projektavimo kompromisais, susijusiais su daugumos šaltinių parafrazių rinkimu', 'mk': 'Разбирање на разликите околу дизајнот на задачите во колекцијата парафрази од многумина', 'mt': 'Ftehim ta’ Kompromessi dwar id-Disinn ta’ Ħidma fil-Ġbir ta’ Parafrażijiet ta’ Sors tal-Kultura', 'ml': 'ക്രൌഡ്സോര്\u200dസ്സോര്\u200dട്ട് പാരാഫ്രാസ് സംഘത്തില്\u200d ജോലി ഡിസൈന്\u200d വ്യാപാരം- ഓഫുകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Memahami Perubahan Rancangan Tugas dalam Koleksi Parafrasa Sumber Kelompok', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie kompromisów projektowania zadań w kolekcji parafraz społecznych', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea tranzacțiilor de proiectare a sarcinilor în colecția de parafraze Crowdsourced', 'mn': 'Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'no': 'Forstår utvikling av oppgåveutvikling i Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'so': 'Understanding Task Design-offs in Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'sv': 'Förstå uppgiftsdesign kompromisser i Crowdsourced parafrassamling', 'sr': 'Razumevanje trgovine za dizajnom zadataka u kolekciji parafraza Crowdsourced', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරෝඩ්සෝර්ස් පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් තේරුම්ගන්න', 'ur': 'Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'ta': 'க்ரூட்ஸ் மூலம் பார்ப்ராஸ் தொகுப்பில் பணி வடிவமைப்பு வண்ணத்தை புரிந்து கொள்ளும்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hiểu về Hợp đồng về thiết kế công việc trong tập hợp cụm từ', 'bg': 'Разбиране на компромисите за проектиране на задачи в колекцията с парафрази', 'da': 'Forståelse af opgavedesign kompromiser i Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'nl': 'Inzicht in Taakontwerp Trade-offs in Crowdsourced Parafrase Collection', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje trgovine za dizajnom zadataka u skupljanju parafraza Crowdsourced', 'de': 'Verständnis von Aufgabendesign-Kompromissen in der Crowdsourced Paraphrasen Collection', 'fa': 'فهمیدن تجارت طراحی کار در مجموعه پارافریز Crowdsourced', 'ko': '하도급 해석 수집 중의 임무 설계 권형을 이해하다', 'id': 'Memahami Perubahan Design Tugas dalam Koleksi Parafrasa Sumber Kelompok', 'sw': 'Kuelewa vifaa vya ubunifu wa kazi katika mkusanyiko wa Paraphrase wa Crowdsourced Paraphrase', 'tr': 'Saýlanan Paraphrase Ýyglamasynda täze Taýýarlama Wasp', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i ndërmjetësimeve të projektimit të detyrave në koleksionin e parafrazave të burimeve të turmës', 'hy': 'Հասկանալ առաջադրանքների դիզայնի հակամարտությունները ժողովրդի պարաֆրեսի հավաքածում', 'am': 'sourced Paraphrase Collection', 'af': 'Verstaan Taak Ontwerp-handel-af in Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje trgovine za dizajnom zadataka u kolekciji parafraza Crowdsourced', 'az': 'Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection', 'et': 'Ülesannete kujundamise kompromisse mõistmine ühisallikaga parafraaside kogus', 'ca': "Entendre els compromisos del disseny de tasques en la col·lecció de parafrases d'origen públic", 'bn': 'ক্রাউডসোর্স প্যারাফ্রাইস সংগ্রহে কাজের ডিজাইন- অফ বুঝতে পারে', 'cs': 'Porozumění návrhu úkolů v crowdsource kolekci parafrází', 'fi': 'Tehtävien suunnittelun kompromisseja joukkolähtöisessä parafraasikokoelmassa', 'jv': 'taskdesign', 'sk': 'Razumevanje kompromisov oblikovanja opravil v množični zbirki parafraz', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'להבין סחרי עיצוב משימה באספת פראפרזים ממקורים רבים', 'bo': 'Crowdsourced Paraphrase Collection ནང་གི་Task Design Trade-offs་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts. Crowdsourcing the process of paraphrase generation is an effective means of expanding natural language datasets, but there has been limited analysis of the trade-offs that arise when designing tasks. In this paper, we present the first systematic study of the key factors in crowdsourcing paraphrase collection. We consider variations in instructions, incentives, data domains, and workflows. We manually analyzed paraphrases for correctness, grammaticality, and linguistic diversity. Our observations provide new insight into the trade-offs between accuracy and diversity in crowd responses that arise as a result of task design, providing guidance for future paraphrase generation procedures.', 'ar': 'تعد مجموعات البيانات المتنوعة لغويًا ضرورية للتدريب وتقييم أنظمة التعلم الآلي القوية ، لكن جمع البيانات عملية مكلفة وغالبًا ما تتطلب خبراء. يعد التعهيد الجماعي لعملية إنشاء إعادة الصياغة وسيلة فعالة لتوسيع مجموعات بيانات اللغة الطبيعية ، ولكن كان هناك تحليل محدود للمفاضلات التي تنشأ عند تصميم المهام. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم أول دراسة منهجية للعوامل الرئيسية في التعهيد الجماعي لجمع إعادة الصياغة. نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار الاختلافات في التعليمات والحوافز ومجالات البيانات ومهام سير العمل. قمنا يدويًا بتحليل إعادة الصياغة من أجل الصحة والنحو والتنوع اللغوي. توفر ملاحظاتنا رؤية جديدة للمفاضلات بين الدقة والتنوع في استجابات الجمهور التي تنشأ نتيجة لتصميم المهام ، مما يوفر إرشادات لإجراءات إنشاء إعادة الصياغة في المستقبل.', 'pt': 'Conjuntos de dados linguísticamente diversos são essenciais para treinar e avaliar sistemas robustos de aprendizado de máquina, mas a coleta de dados é um processo caro que geralmente requer especialistas. O crowdsourcing do processo de geração de paráfrases é um meio eficaz de expandir os conjuntos de dados de linguagem natural, mas tem havido uma análise limitada das compensações que surgem ao projetar tarefas. Neste artigo, apresentamos o primeiro estudo sistemático dos fatores-chave na coleta de paráfrases de crowdsourcing. Consideramos variações nas instruções, incentivos, domínios de dados e fluxos de trabalho. Analisamos manualmente as paráfrases quanto à correção, gramaticalidade e diversidade linguística. Nossas observações fornecem uma nova visão sobre as compensações entre precisão e diversidade nas respostas da multidão que surgem como resultado do design da tarefa, fornecendo orientação para futuros procedimentos de geração de paráfrases.', 'es': 'Los conjuntos de datos lingüísticamente diversos son fundamentales para entrenar y evaluar sistemas de aprendizaje automático sólidos, pero la recopilación de datos es un proceso costoso que a menudo requiere expertos. La colaboración colectiva del proceso de generación de paráfrasis es un medio eficaz de expandir los conjuntos de datos de lenguaje natural, pero ha habido un análisis limitado de las compensaciones que surgen al diseñar tareas. En este artículo, presentamos el primer estudio sistemático de los factores clave en la recopilación de paráfrasis de crowdsourcing. Consideramos las variaciones en las instrucciones, los incentivos, los dominios de datos y los flujos de trabajo. Analizamos manualmente la corrección, la gramaticalidad y la diversidad lingüística de las paráfrasis. Nuestras observaciones proporcionan una nueva visión de las compensaciones entre precisión y diversidad en las respuestas de la multitud que surgen como resultado del diseño de la tarea, proporcionando orientación para futuros procedimientos de generación de paráfrasis.', 'fr': "La diversité linguistique des ensembles de données est essentielle pour la formation et l'évaluation de systèmes d'apprentissage automatique robustes, mais la collecte de données est un processus coûteux qui nécessite souvent des experts. L'externalisation ouverte du processus de génération de paraphrases est un moyen efficace d'étendre les ensembles de données en langage naturel, mais l'analyse des compromis qui se présentent lors de la conception des tâches est limitée. Dans cet article, nous présentons la première étude systématique des facteurs clés de la collecte de paraphrases en crowdsourcing. Nous prenons en compte les variations dans les instructions, les incitations, les domaines de données et les workflows. Nous avons analysé manuellement les paraphrases pour vérifier leur exactitude, leur grammaticalité et leur diversité linguistique. Nos observations fournissent de nouvelles informations sur les compromis entre précision et diversité dans les réponses de la foule résultant de la conception des tâches, fournissant ainsi des conseils pour les futures procédures de génération de paraphrase.", 'ja': '言語的に多様なデータセットは、堅牢な機械学習システムのトレーニングと評価に不可欠ですが、データ収集はしばしば専門家を必要とするコストのかかるプロセスです。パラフレーズ生成のプロセスをクラウドソーシングすることは、自然言語データセットを拡張する有効な手段であるが、タスクを設計する際に生じるトレードオフの分析は限られている。本稿では、クラウドソーシングのパラフレーズコレクションにおける主要な要因の最初の体系的な研究を紹介する。当社では、指示、インセンティブ、データドメイン、ワークフローのバリエーションを検討しています。私たちは、正しさ、文法性、および言語的多様性についてパラフレーズを手動で分析しました。当社の観察は、タスク設計の結果として生じるクラウドレスポンスの精度と多様性のトレードオフに関する新しい洞察を提供し、将来のパラフレーズ生成手順のガイダンスを提供します。', 'zh': '言语多样化数集于训练、评估强大机器学统至重,而数收一昂贵,常须专家。 众包说之道,广自然语言数集之术,而权衡有限。 于本文中,首对众包释义收中关键因素为之统究。 吾将思指令、激劝、数域、流程之变。 吾手动论释义之正确性、语法性、言多样性。 观其群准确性多样性之权衡,为未来释义生程。', 'hi': 'भाषाई रूप से विविध डेटासेट मजबूत मशीन लर्निंग सिस्टम के प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हैं, लेकिन डेटा संग्रह एक महंगी प्रक्रिया है जिसे अक्सर विशेषज्ञों की आवश्यकता होती है। क्राउडसोर्स पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया को पार करना प्राकृतिक भाषा डेटासेट के विस्तार का एक प्रभावी साधन है, लेकिन कार्यों को डिजाइन करते समय उत्पन्न होने वाले ट्रेड-ऑफ का सीमित विश्लेषण किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम क्राउडसोर्सिंग पैराफ्रेज़ संग्रह में प्रमुख कारकों का पहला व्यवस्थित अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम निर्देशों, प्रोत्साहनों, डेटा डोमेन और वर्कफ़्लोज़ में भिन्नताओं पर विचार करते हैं. हमने शुद्धता, व्याकरणिकता और भाषाई विविधता के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से व्याख्याओं का विश्लेषण किया। हमारी टिप्पणियां भीड़ प्रतिक्रियाओं में सटीकता और विविधता के बीच व्यापार-बंद में नई अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करती हैं जो कार्य डिजाइन के परिणामस्वरूप उत्पन्न होती हैं, जो भविष्य की व्याख्या पीढ़ी की प्रक्रियाओं के लिए मार्गदर्शन प्रदान करती हैं।', 'ru': 'Лингвистически разнообразные наборы данных имеют решающее значение для обучения и оценки надежных систем машинного обучения, но сбор данных является дорогостоящим процессом, который часто требует экспертов. Краудсорсинг процесса генерации перефразов является эффективным средством расширения наборов данных на естественном языке, но анализ компромиссов, возникающих при проектировании задач, был ограниченным. В данной работе мы представляем первое систематическое исследование ключевых факторов в сборе перефразов краудсорсинга. Мы рассматриваем вариации в инструкциях, стимулах, доменах данных и рабочих процессах. Мы вручную проанализировали перефразы на предмет правильности, грамматичности и лингвистического разнообразия. Наши наблюдения дают новое представление о компромиссах между точностью и разнообразием в ответах толпы, которые возникают в результате разработки задач, предоставляя руководство для будущих процедур генерации перефразов.', 'ga': 'Tá tacair shonraí atá éagsúil ó thaobh teanga ríthábhachtach chun córais láidre meaisínfhoghlama a oiliúint agus a mheasúnú, ach is próiseas costasach é bailiú sonraí a mbíonn saineolaithe ag teastáil uaidh go minic. Bealach éifeachtach chun tacair sonraí teanga nádúrtha a leathnú is ea an sluafhoinsiú ar an bpróiseas giniúna teanga, ach is beag anailís a rinneadh ar na comhbhabhtálacha a thagann chun cinn agus tascanna á ndearadh. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair an chéad staidéar córasach ar na príomhfhachtóirí a bhaineann le sluafhoinsiú a dhéanamh ar bhailiú paraphrase. Breithnímid éagsúlachtaí i dtreoracha, dreasachtaí, fearainn sonraí, agus sreafaí oibre. Rinneamar anailís de láimh ar athfhrásaí maidir le cruinneas, gramadaí agus éagsúlacht teanga. Tugann ár gcuid breathnuithe léargas nua ar na comhbhabhtálacha idir cruinneas agus éagsúlacht i bhfreagraí sluaite a thagann chun cinn mar thoradh ar dhearadh tascanna, ag tabhairt treorach do nósanna imeachta giniúna athinsinte amach anseo.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi szempontból sokszínű adatkészletek kritikusak a robusztus gépi tanulási rendszerek képzéséhez és értékeléséhez, de az adatgyűjtés költséges folyamat, amely gyakran szakértőket igényel. A parafráz generálásának folyamatának crowdsourcing hatékony eszköze a természetes nyelvű adatkészletek bővítésének, de a feladatok tervezése során felmerülő kompromisszumok elemzése korlátozott. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a crowdsourcing parafrázgyűjtés kulcsfontosságú tényezőinek első szisztematikus vizsgálatát. Figyelembe vesszük az utasítások, ösztönzők, adatterületek és munkafolyamatok eltéréseit. Manuálisan elemeztük a helyességet, a nyelvtanitást és a nyelvi sokszínűséget. Megfigyeléseink új betekintést nyújtanak a pontosság és a sokszínűség közötti kompromisszumokba, amelyek a feladattervezés eredményeként keletkeznek, és iránymutatást nyújtanak a jövőbeli parafráz generálási eljárásokhoz.', 'ka': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts. პარაფრეზის წარმოდგენის პროცესის კონდისურაცია იქნება ეფექტიური ხელსაწყოფილი თავისუფალური თავისუფალური მონაცემების გაფართვა, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრების ანალ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ პირველი სისტემატიკური კოლექტიკური ფაქტორების კოლექციაში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ განსხვავებები ინსტრუქციებში, ინსტრუქციებში, მონაცემების დიომენტებში და სამუშაო წყალებში. ჩვენ ხელსახურად დავაანალიზეთ პარაფრაზები მართლად, გრამმატიკალურად და ლენგური განსხვავებაზე. ჩვენი მონაცემებები ახალი შენახვედების შესახებ სამუშაო განსხვავებაში სამუშაო და განსხვავებაში, რომელიც მოხდება სამუშაო განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც მოხდება სამუშაო განსხვავ', 'it': "I set di dati linguistici diversificati sono fondamentali per la formazione e la valutazione di sistemi di machine learning robusti, ma la raccolta dei dati è un processo costoso che spesso richiede esperti. Il crowdsourcing del processo di generazione di parafrasi è un mezzo efficace per espandere i dataset del linguaggio naturale, ma c'è stata un'analisi limitata dei compromessi che si presentano quando si progettano compiti. In questo articolo, presentiamo il primo studio sistematico dei fattori chiave nella raccolta di parafrasi crowdsourcing. Consideriamo le variazioni di istruzioni, incentivi, domini di dati e flussi di lavoro. Abbiamo analizzato manualmente le parafrase per correttezza, grammaticalità e diversità linguistica. Le nostre osservazioni forniscono una nuova visione dei compromessi tra accuratezza e diversità nelle risposte alla folla che sorgono come risultato della progettazione dei compiti, fornendo indicazioni per le future procedure di generazione di parafrasi.", 'el': 'Τα γλωσσικά ποικίλα σύνολα δεδομένων είναι κρίσιμα για την εκπαίδευση και την αξιολόγηση ισχυρών συστημάτων μηχανικής μάθησης, αλλά η συλλογή δεδομένων είναι μια δαπανηρή διαδικασία που συχνά απαιτεί εμπειρογνώμονες. Η διαδικασία παραγωγής παραφράσεων είναι ένα αποτελεσματικό μέσο για την επέκταση των συνόλων δεδομένων φυσικής γλώσσας, αλλά έχει υπάρξει περιορισμένη ανάλυση των συμβιβασμών που προκύπτουν κατά τον σχεδιασμό εργασιών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη συστηματική μελέτη των βασικών παραγόντων στη συλλογή παραφράσεων. Λαμβάνουμε υπόψη παραλλαγές στις οδηγίες, τα κίνητρα, τους τομείς δεδομένων και τις ροές εργασίας. Αναλύσαμε χειροκίνητα παραφράσεις για ορθότητα, γραμματικότητα και γλωσσική πολυμορφία. Οι παρατηρήσεις μας παρέχουν νέα εικόνα για τις αντιθέσεις μεταξύ ακρίβειας και ποικιλομορφίας στις απαντήσεις του πλήθους που προκύπτουν ως αποτέλεσμα του σχεδιασμού εργασιών, παρέχοντας καθοδήγηση για μελλοντικές διαδικασίες παραγωγής παραφράσεων.', 'mk': 'Лингвистички различни податоци се критични за обуката и евалуирањето на силните системи на машинско учење, но собирањето на податоци е скап процес кој честопати бара експерти. Генерацијата на парафрази е ефикасен начин за проширување на националните јазички податоци, но постои ограничена анализа на разликите кои се појавуваат кога се дизајнираат задачи. In this paper, we present the first systematic study of the key factors in crowdsourcing paraphrase collection.  Размислуваме варијации во инструкциите, стимулите, домените на податоци и работните потоки. Рачно ги анализиравме парафразите за точност, граматикалност и јазична различност. Нашите набљудувања обезбедуваат нов поглед во разликите помеѓу прецизноста и различноста во одговорите на толпата кои се појавуваат како резултат на дизајнот на задачите, обезбедувајќи упатства за идните процедури на генерација на парафрази', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിനും റോബോസ്റ്റ് യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രധാനപ പാരാഫ്രേസ് തലമുറയുടെ പ്രക്രിയസ്സ് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രാകൃതിയായ രീതി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്രകാരം സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശങ്ങളിലും, ഉത്തരവാദിത്വങ്ങളിലും, ഡേറ്റാ ഡോമീനുകളിലും, ജോലിപ്പൂക്കളിലുമുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ് നമ്മള്\u200d കൈയ്യില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തിനും, ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കാര്\u200dക്കും, ഭാഷ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസവും അന്വേഷിച്ചു. ജോലി ഡിസൈനിന്റെ ഫലമായി ഉയര്\u200dന്നുവരുന്ന ജനങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള', 'mt': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts.  L-użu kollettiv tal-proċess tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi huwa mezz effettiv għall-espansjoni tas-settijiet tad-dejta tal-lingwi naturali, iżda kien hemm analiżi limitata tal-kompromessi li jinħolqu meta jitfasslu l-kompiti. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw l-ewwel studju sistematiku tal-fatturi ewlenin fil-ġbir tal-parafrażi crowdsourcing. Aħna nqisu varjazzjonijiet fl-istruzzjonijiet, l-in ċentivi, l-oqsma tad-dejta, u l-flussi tax-xogħol. Analiżijna manwalment parafrażijiet għall-korrettezza, il-grammatika, u d-diversità lingwistika. L-osservazzjonijiet tagħna jipprovdu għarfien ġdid dwar il-kompromessi bejn il-preċiżjoni u d-diversità fir-reazzjonijiet tal-popolazzjoni li jirriżultaw mit-tfassil tal-kompiti, billi jipprovdu gwida għall-proċeduri futuri għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi.', 'lt': 'Kalbų požiūriu įvairūs duomenų rinkiniai yra labai svarbūs mokymui ir patikimų mašininio mokymosi sistemų vertinimui, tačiau duomenų rinkimas yra brangus procesas, kuriam dažnai reikalingi ekspertai. Crowdsourcing the process of paraphrase generation is an effective means of expanding natural language datasets, but there has been limited analysis of the trade-offs that arise when designing tasks.  Šiame dokumente pristatome pirmąjį sistemingą pagrindinių veiksnių, susijusių su visuomenės išteklių parafrazių rinkimu, tyrimą. Svarstome instrukcijų, paskatų, duomenų sričių ir darbo srautų skirtumus. We manually analyzed paraphrases for correctness, grammaticality, and linguistic diversity.  Mūsų pastabos suteikia naują supratimą apie kompromisą tarp tikslumo ir visuomenės atsakų įvairovės, atsirandančios rengiant užduotis, ir teikia gaires būsimoms parafrazių kūrimo procedūroms.', 'ms': 'Tetapi koleksi data adalah proses yang mahal yang sering memerlukan pakar. Penyesuaian ramai proses generasi parafrasa adalah cara yang berkesan untuk mengembangkan set data bahasa semulajadi, tetapi terdapat analisis terbatas bagi kompromi yang muncul bila merancang tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kajian sistemik pertama faktor utama dalam koleksi parafrasa crowdsourcing. Kami mempertimbangkan variasi dalam arahan, insentif, domain data, dan aliran kerja. Kami menganalisis parafrasa secara manual untuk kebijaksanaan, grammatikal, dan pelbagai bahasa. Pemeriksaan kami memberikan pandangan baru mengenai perbezaan antara ketepatan dan pelbagai balasan keramaian yang muncul sebagai hasil desain tugas, memberikan petunjuk untuk prosedur generasi parafrasa masa depan.', 'no': 'Lingsforskjellige datasett er kritisk for opplæring og evaluering av robust maskinelæringssystem, men datasamlinga er ein kost prosess som ofte krev ekspertar. Kroatsourcing av prosessen for parafrase-generering er ein effektiv måte å utvida naturspråk-datasett, men det har vært begrenset analyse av utviklingane som oppstår når oppgåver er designert. I denne papiret presenterer vi den første systematiske studien av nøkkelfaktoren i crowdsourcing paraphrase-samlinga. Vi ser på variasjonar i instruksjonar, motivasjonar, datadomene og arbeidsprøym. Vi analysere parafrasar manuelt for korrekt, grammatisk og linguistic mangfold. Observasjonane våre gjev nytt innsikt i utviklingane mellom nøyaktighet og mangfoldighet i tilfeldige svar som oppstår som resultat av oppgåvedesign, og tilbyr retningar for framtidige parafrasar-genereringsprosedyrar.', 'kk': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts. Парафразды құру процесін құру - табиғи тіл деректер қорларын кеңейту мүмкіндігі, бірақ тапсырмаларды құру кезінде кейінгі тәртіптерді шектелген анализ болды. Бұл қағазда бірінші жүйелік зерттеу үшін көпкүлікті парафра жинақтарының негізгі факторларын көрсетеді. Біз мәліметтерді, стимуттарды, деректер домендерін және жұмыс ақпараттарының айырмашылығын қарастырмыз. Біз дұрыс, грамматикалық және лингвистикалық әртүрлі парафразтарды қолмен анализировадық. Біздің байқауларымыз тапсырма дизайнының нәтижесі мен көпшілікті жауаптарының арасындағы тәжірибесінің жаңа түсініктерін көрсетеді, келесі парафраз құру процедурлеріне бағыттау беред', 'pl': 'Zróżnicowane językowo zbiory danych mają kluczowe znaczenie dla szkolenia i oceny solidnych systemów uczenia maszynowego, ale gromadzenie danych jest kosztownym procesem, który często wymaga ekspertów. Crowdsourcing procesu generowania parafraz jest skutecznym sposobem poszerzania zbiorów danych języka naturalnego, jednak analiza kompromisów powstających przy projektowaniu zadań jest ograniczona. W artykule przedstawiamy pierwsze systematyczne badanie kluczowych czynników zbierania parafraz crowdsourcingowych. Rozważamy różnice w instrukcjach, zachętach, domenach danych i przepływach pracy. Ręcznie analizowaliśmy parafrazy pod kątem poprawności, gramatyczności i różnorodności językowej. Nasze obserwacje zapewniają nowy wgląd w kompromisy między dokładnością a różnorodnością reakcji tłumów, które powstają w wyniku projektowania zadań, dostarczając wskazówek dla przyszłych procedur generowania parafraz.', 'ro': 'Seturile de date diverse din punct de vedere lingvistic sunt esențiale pentru instruirea și evaluarea sistemelor robuste de învățare automată, dar colectarea datelor este un proces costisitor, care adesea necesită experți. Crowdsourcing procesul de generare a parafrazelor este un mijloc eficient de extindere a seturilor de date cu limbaj natural, dar a existat o analiză limitată a compromisurilor care apar la proiectarea sarcinilor. În această lucrare, prezentăm primul studiu sistematic al factorilor cheie din colecția de parafraze crowdsourcing. Luăm în considerare variațiile în instrucțiuni, stimulente, domenii de date și fluxuri de lucru. Am analizat manual parafrazele pentru corectitudine, gramaticalitate și diversitate lingvistică. Observațiile noastre oferă o nouă perspectivă asupra compromisurilor dintre acuratețe și diversitate în răspunsurile mulțimii care apar ca urmare a proiectării sarcinilor, oferind orientări pentru procedurile viitoare de generare a parafrazelor.', 'sr': 'Lingistički različiti podaci su kritični za obuku i procjenu robnih sistema učenja mašina, ali kolekcija podataka je skup proces koji često zahteva stručnike. Proces generacije parafraze je efikasan naèin proširenja prirodnih jezika podataka, ali postoji ograničena analiza trgovinskih odlaganja koji se pojavljuju kada dizajniraju zadataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo sistematsko istraživanje ključnih faktora u kolekciji parafraza crowdsourcing. Smatramo razlike uputstva, podsticaja, domena podataka i protoka rada. Ručno smo analizirali parafraze za ispravnost, gramatičku i jezičku raznolikost. Naše promatranje pružaju novi uvid u trgovinu između tačnosti i raznolikosti u odgovorima publike koji se pojavljuju kao rezultat dizajna zadataka, pružajući upute za buduće procedure generacije parafraze.', 'si': 'භාෂාවික විවිධ දත්ත සෙට් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ශක්තිමත් පද්ධතිය ඉගෙනීම් පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා, ඒත් ද ක්\u200dරෝඩ්සෝර්ස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව දත්ත සේට් විස්තර කරන්න ප මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරථම පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ මුලින්ම පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන අපි වෙනස් විදියට හිතන්නේ උපදේශ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, දත්ත ඩෝමේන්ස්, වැඩප්\u200dරවාහයක්. අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය, ක්\u200dරැමැතිකය, භාෂාවික විවිධානය සඳහා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය අළුත් අදහස් දෙන්නේ අනාගතය සහ විශේෂතාවක් අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වි', 'mn': 'Linguistically diverse data sets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems. But data collection is a cost process that often requires experts. Байгалийн хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудыг нэмэгдүүлэх үйл явц бол байгалийн хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудын үр дүнтэй арга юм. Гэхдээ ажлыг зохион байгуулахдаа тохиромжтой худалдааны шинжилгээ хязгаарлагдсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон нийтийн хэлбэрийн цуглуулалтын хамгийн чухал хүчин зүйлсийг анхны систематикийн судалгааг үзүүлнэ. Бид заавал, урам зориг, өгөгдлийн хэсэг болон ажлын урсгалын өөрчлөлт гэж боддог. Бид зөв, грамматик, хэлний олон төрлийн параграфийг гараар шинжилсэн. Бидний анзаарлаа ажлын дизайны үр дүнд гарсан олон нийгмийн хариултын зөв болон олон нийгмийн хариултын хоорондын худалдааны тухай шинэ ойлголт өгч ирээдүйн парафрейз бүтээгдэхүүний процесс руу зөвлөх бол', 'so': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts.  Qoraalka qarniga paraphrase waa qaab faa’iido ah oo u sii kordhiya sawirada luuqada asalka ah, laakiin waxaa jira baaritaanka baaritaanka ganacsiga ee soo baxa marka lagu qorayo shaqaalaha. Warqadan waxan ku qornaa waxbarashada ugu horeeyay ee nidaamka ah ee waxyaabaha ugu muhiimsan ee ururka fasaxa faraha badan. Waxaynu ka fekernaa isbedelka hagitaanka, dhaqaalaha, meelaha macluumaadka iyo ubaxa shaqada. Waxaannu si rasmi ah u analyeelnay arimaha saxda, grammatika iyo kala duwan luuqadaha. Fiiriyadeena waxaa ka muuqata aragti cusub xagga ganacsiga oo u dhexeeya saxda iyo kala duduwan jawaabaha guud oo ka soo baxa qorshaha shaqada sababtoo ah, kaasoo hagitaan qalabka farshaxanka mustaqbalka ah.', 'sv': 'Språkliga datauppsättningar är avgörande för utbildning och utvärdering av robusta maskininlärningssystem, men datainsamling är en kostsam process som ofta kräver experter. Crowdsourcing av processen för parafrasgenerering är ett effektivt sätt att utöka naturspråksdata, men det har varit begränsad analys av de kompromisser som uppstår vid utformningen av uppgifter. I denna uppsats presenterar vi den första systematiska studien av nyckelfaktorerna i crowdsourcing parafrassamling. Vi beaktar variationer i instruktioner, incitament, datadomäner och arbetsflöden. Vi analyserade manuellt parafraser för korrekthet, grammatik och språklig mångfald. Våra observationer ger ny inblick i de avvägningar mellan noggrannhet och mångfald i crowd respons som uppstår till följd av uppgiftsdesign, vilket ger vägledning för framtida procedurer för parafrasgenerering.', 'ta': 'வரிசையில் பல்வேறு தகவல் அமைப்பு Crowdsourcing the process of paraphrase generation is an effective means of expanding natural language datasets, but there has been limited analysis of the trade-offs that arise when designing tasks.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முதல் அமைப்பு படிப்புகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மக்கள் மூல சொற்றொடர் தொகுப்பில் முக்கிய க நாம் கட்டளைகள், ஊக்குவிப்புகள், தரவு தளங்கள் மற்றும் வேலை பூங்களில் மாறுபாடுகளை கருதுகிறோம். நாம் கைமுறையாக சரியாக, வரைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் மொழியின் பல்வேறு வார்த்தைகளை ஆராய்ந்தோம். எங்கள் பார்வைகள் செயல் வடிவமைப்பினால் தெளிவான மற்றும் பல்வேறு பதில்களுக்கிடையே புதிய தெளிவான பார்வையை வழங்குகிறது, எதிர்காலத்திற்', 'ur': 'لینگویسٹیکی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر پارافریز کی پیدائش کے مطابق کروڈ سورس کرنا طبیعی زبان ڈیٹ سٹ کے گھیرنے کے لئے اثرات کے مطابق ہے، لیکن تجارت-offs کی تحلیل محدود ہوئی ہے جو کام طراحی کرنے کے موقع پیدا ہوتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی سیستماتیک تحقیق کو جماعت کے سورسینس پارفریز جماعت میں پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے نصیحت، انگیز، ڈیٹ ڈمین، اور کارفول میں اختلاف کیا ہے۔ ہم نے سیدھی، گراماتیکی اور زبان اختلاف کے لئے پارافریزوں کو اپنے ہاتھ سے تحقیق کیا۔ ہماری نظریوں نے دقیق اور مختلف جواب کے درمیان تجارت کے بارے میں نئی نظریں پیش کی ہیں جو کام طراحی کے نتیجہ میں اترتے ہیں، اور آیندہ پارافریز پیدا کرنے کے لئے ہدایت دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Lingʻlik tarkibi maʼlumotlar tarkibi robot tizimini o'rganish va qidirish uchun muhim, lekin maʼlumot toʻplami odamlar kerak bo'lgan narsa juda qiymatdir. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz jamoatlar paraphrasning birinchi muhim matnlarini o'rganamiz. Biz ta'riflar, qiziqlar, maʼlumot domene va ishni bajarish orqali o'zgarishlarni tasavvur qilamiz. Biz qo'lbola qo'lbola bir paravraslarni toʻgʻri tarjima qildik. Bizning taqdimotimiz esa, vazifa dizayning sababda tashqi raqamli javoblarga ega bo'lgan tashkilotlar orasidagi tashkilotlarni yangi ko'rinishimiz va kelajakdagi paraphrasning bir xizmatlari jarayonlariga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Đồng bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ khác nhau rất quan trọng trong việc huấn luyện và đánh giá hệ thống học máy mạnh mẽ, nhưng thu thập dữ liệu là một tiến trình tốn kém mà thường cần đến chuyên gia. Tập trung vào công trình sản xuất liệt kê là một phương tiện hiệu quả để mở rộng dữ liệu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, nhưng đã có một phân tích giới hạn về sự quyết định từ thiện khi thiết kế nhiệm vụ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu nghiên cứu hệ thống đầu tiên về các yếu tố chủ yếu trong tập ảnh liệt. Chúng tôi xem xét sự khác nhau trong hướng dẫn, động cơ, lĩnh vực dữ liệu, và phả hệ. Chúng tôi phân tích bằng tay diễn giải tính toán, ngữ pháp và đa dạng ngôn ngữ. Những quan sát của chúng tôi cung cấp những nhận thức mới về sự phân chia giữa độ chính xác và đa dạng trong các phản ứng đám đông nảy sinh nhờ thiết kế nhiệm vụ, cung cấp hướng dẫn cho các thủ tục sản xuất thơ vọng tương lai.', 'da': 'Sprogligt forskelligartede datasæt er afgørende for uddannelse og evaluering af robuste maskinlæringssystemer, men dataindsamling er en dyr proces, der ofte kræver eksperter. Crowdsourcing af processen med parafrasegenerering er et effektivt middel til at udvide natursprogets datasæt, men der har været begrænset analyse af de kompromiser, der opstår ved udformning af opgaver. I denne artikel præsenterer vi den første systematiske undersøgelse af de centrale faktorer i crowdsourcing parafrase samling. Vi overvejer variationer i instruktioner, incitamenter, datadomæner og arbejdsgange. Vi analyserede manuelt parafraser for korrekthed, grammatik og sproglig mangfoldighed. Vores observationer giver ny indsigt i de afvigelser mellem nøjagtighed og mangfoldighed i crowd respons, der opstår som følge af opgavedesign, og giver vejledning til fremtidige procedurer for parafrasegenerering.', 'bg': 'Лингвистично разнообразните набори от данни са от решаващо значение за обучението и оценката на здрави системи за машинно обучение, но събирането на данни е скъп процес, който често изисква експерти. Броудсорсинга на процеса на генериране на парафрази е ефективно средство за разширяване на наборите от данни с естествен език, но има ограничен анализ на компромисите, които възникват при проектирането на задачи. В настоящата статия представяме първото систематично проучване на ключовите фактори в колекцията на парафрази. Ние разглеждаме вариациите в инструкциите, стимулите, домейните на данните и работните потоци. Ръчно анализирахме парафразите за коректност, граматичност и езиково разнообразие. Нашите наблюдения предоставят нова представа за компромисите между точността и разнообразието в реакциите на тълпата, които възникват в резултат на проектирането на задачите, като предоставят насоки за бъдещи процедури за генериране на парафрази.', 'nl': 'Taalkundig uiteenlopende datasets zijn cruciaal voor het trainen en evalueren van robuuste machine learning systemen, maar gegevensverzameling is een kostbaar proces waarvoor vaak experts nodig zijn. Crowdsourcing van het proces van parafrase genereren is een effectief middel om natuurlijke taaldatasets uit te breiden, maar er is beperkte analyse van de compromissen die ontstaan bij het ontwerpen van taken. In dit artikel presenteren we de eerste systematische studie van de belangrijkste factoren in crowdsourcing parafraseverzameling. We houden rekening met variaties in instructies, incentives, datadomeinen en workflows. We hebben parafrases handmatig geanalyseerd op juistheid, grammaticaliteit en taaldiversiteit. Onze observaties geven nieuw inzicht in de compromissen tussen nauwkeurigheid en diversiteit in crowdresponsen die ontstaan als gevolg van taakomschrijving, en bieden richtlijnen voor toekomstige parafrasegeneratieprocedures.', 'hr': 'Lingistički različiti podaci kritični su za obuku i procjenu robnih sustava učenja strojeva, ali kolekcija podataka je skup proces koji često zahtijeva stručnike. Proizvodnja procesa generacije parafraze je učinkovit način proširenja prirodnih jezičkih podataka, ali postoji ograničena analiza trgovinskih odlaganja koji se pojavljuju kada dizajniraju zadataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo sistematsko ispitivanje ključnih faktora u kolekciji parafraza crowdsourcing. Razmišljamo o različitim uputama, poticama, domenama podataka i tokovima rada. Ručno smo analizirali parafraze za ispravnost, gramatičku i jezičku raznolikost. Naši promatranja pružaju novi uvid u trgovinu između tačnosti i raznolikosti u odgovorima publike koji se pojavljuju kao rezultat dizajna zadataka, pružajući upute za buduće postupke generacije parafraze.', 'de': 'Sprachlich vielfältige Datensätze sind entscheidend für die Schulung und Bewertung robuster Machine Learning Systeme, aber die Datenerhebung ist ein kostspieliger Prozess, der oft Experten erfordert. Crowdsourcing des Prozesses der Paraphrasenerzeugung ist ein effektives Mittel zur Erweiterung natürlicher Sprachdatensätze, aber es gibt nur begrenzte Analysen der Kompromisse, die bei der Gestaltung von Aufgaben auftreten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die erste systematische Studie der Schlüsselfaktoren für die Crowdsourcing-Paraphrasensammlung vor. Wir berücksichtigen Variationen in Anweisungen, Anreizen, Datendomänen und Workflows. Wir analysierten Paraphrasen manuell auf Korrektheit, Grammatizität und sprachliche Vielfalt. Unsere Beobachtungen geben neue Einblicke in die Kompromisse zwischen Genauigkeit und Diversität der Crowd-Antworten, die sich aus dem Aufgabendesign ergeben, und geben Orientierung für zukünftige Paraphrasen-Generierungsverfahren.', 'id': 'Seting data berbagai bahasa sangat penting untuk latihan dan evaluasi sistem belajar mesin yang kuat, tapi koleksi data adalah proses yang mahal yang sering membutuhkan ahli. Penyembunyian proses generasi parafrasa adalah cara yang efektif untuk mengembangkan set data bahasa alam, tapi ada analisis terbatas dari kompromi yang muncul saat merancang tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan penelitian sistematis pertama dari faktor kunci dalam koleksi parafrasa crowdsourcing. Kami mempertimbangkan variasi dalam instruksi, insentif, domain data, dan aliran kerja. Kami secara manual menganalisis parafrasa untuk persis, gramatikal, dan kebanyakan bahasa. Perhatian kami menyediakan pandangan baru dalam perdagangan antara akurasi dan kebanyakan dalam respon keramaian yang muncul sebagai hasil desain tugas, menyediakan petunjuk untuk prosedur generasi parafrasa masa depan.', 'ko': '언어의 다양성 데이터 집합은 강력한 기계 학습 시스템을 훈련하고 평가하는 데 매우 중요하지만 데이터 수집은 비용이 많이 들고 전문가가 필요하다.패키지 해석 생성 과정은 자연 언어 데이터 집합을 확장하는 효과적인 수단이지만 디자인 임무를 수행할 때 나타나는 균형 분석에 한계가 있다.본고에서 우리는 처음으로 하도급 해석 수집의 관건적인 요소를 체계적으로 연구했다.우리는 지령, 격려, 데이터 영역, 작업 절차의 변화를 고려한다.우리는 해석의 정확성, 문법성과 언어의 다양성을 수동으로 분석한다.우리의 관찰은 임무 설계가 초래한 단체 반응의 정확성과 다양성 간의 균형에 새로운 견해를 제공하고 미래의 해석 생성 절차에 지도를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای زبان\u200cگویی برای آموزش و ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای استوار مهم است، ولی مجموعه داده\u200cها یک فرایند ارزشمند است که اغلب نیاز به متخصص دارد. فعالیت فرایند نسل پارافریز یک وسیله موثری برای گسترش مجموعه داده\u200cهای زبان طبیعی است، ولی تحلیل محدودیت از تجارت\u200cهای محدودیت وجود دارد که هنگامی طراحی کار می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما اولین مطالعه سیستماتیک کلیدی را در مجموعه جمع\u200cآوری جمع\u200cآوری جمع می\u200cکنیم. ما تغییرات در دستورات، تحریک، دامنهای داده و جریان کار را در نظر می گیریم. ما پارافریز\u200cهای درستی، گراماتیکی و مختلف زبان\u200cشناسی را به دست تحلیل کردیم. مشاهده\u200cهای ما درباره\u200cی تجارت\u200cهای جدید بین دقیقات و مختلفیت در پاسخ\u200cهای جمعیت که به نتیجه طراحی کار می\u200cآیند، مشاهده می\u200cکنند، و هدایت می\u200cکنند برای پردازش\u200cهای نسل\u200cهای فرجمه آینده.', 'sw': 'Seti mbalimbali za takwimu za lugha ni muhimu kwa mafunzo na kutathmini mfumo wa kujifunza mashine ya roboti, lakini mkusanyiko wa data ni mchakato wa gharama unaohitaji wataalam mara nyingi. Kutokana na mchakato wa kizazi cha paraphrase ni njia yenye ufanisi wa kupanua seti za taarifa za lugha asilia, lakini kumekuwa na uchambuzi mdogo wa matumizi ya biashara yanayotokea wakati wa kutengeneza kazi. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka utafiti wa kwanza wa mfumo wa sababu muhimu katika mkusanyiko wa misaada ya watu. Tunaona tofauti katika maelekezo, hamasa, maeneo ya data, na maeneo ya kazi. Tulichambua misingi kwa manufaa kwa ajili ya ukweli, ubora na tofauti za lugha. Maoni yetu yanatoa mtazamo mpya wa biashara kati ya uhakika na utofauti wa umma wa majibu yanayotokana na ubunifu wa kazi, na kutoa uongozi kwa mchakato wa kizazi cha baadaye.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk dürli sanat setirleri ukyp we güýçli maşyny öwrenmek sistemalaryny deňlemek üçin wajypdyr, ýöne veri toplamy ukyplaryň köplenç isleýän kän bir prosesdir. Parafraz döwletlerini ýetişdirmek tebigy dil datawatlaryny döwletlendirmek üçin etkinji bir ýolbar, ýöne zady tasarlanýanda nähili töwletlere meýilleşdirilen ýagdaýlar bar. Bu kagyzda, parafraz koleksiýasynda ilkinji sistemasiýaly esasy faktorlaryň bardygyny görkezýäris. Biz görkezmeler, rugsat noktalary, maglumat alanlarynda üýtgeşmeleri we işleýänler diýip pikir edýäris. Biz parafrazleri dogry, gramatik we dil çeşitliligi üçin elimizden analýşdyrdyk. Biziň gözlemlerimiz kalamlar jogaplaryň arasynda adalat we näçe görnüşler arasynda täze düşünjeleri saýlaýar, gelejekde parafraz döredilişi prosedürleri üçin gurultat saýlaýar.', 'sq': 'Të dhënat e ndryshme gjuhësore janë kritike për trajnimin dhe vlerësimin e sistemeve të forta të mësimit të makinave, por mbledhja e të dhënave është një proces i shtrenjtë që shpesh kërkon ekspertë. Përdorimi publik i procesit të gjenerimit të parafrazave është një mjet efektiv për zgjerimin e të dhënave të gjuhës natyrore, por ka patur analizë të kufizuar të kompromisive që ngrihen kur dizajnojnë detyra. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim studimin e parë sistematik të faktorëve kryesorë në mbledhjen e parafrazave crowdsourcing. Ne konsiderojmë ndryshime në instruksionet, stimujt, domenat e të dhënave dhe rrjedhjet e punës. Ne analizuam manualisht parafrazat për saktësinë, grammatikën dhe diversitetin gjuhësor. Vëzhgimet tona ofrojnë pamje të re në kompromisin midis saktësisë dhe diversitetit në përgjigjet e turmës që vijnë si rezultat i projektimit të detyrave, duke ofruar udhëzime për procedurat e ardhshme të krijimit të parafrazave.', 'am': 'በቋንቋ የተለያዩ የዳታ ሰርተቶች የሮቦስ መሣሪያን ማስተማር እና ማስተማር የሚያስቸግሩ ናቸው፤ ነገር ግን የዳታ ሰብስብ ብዙ ጊዜ ደህቦችን የሚያስፈልጋቸው ዋጋው ፕሮግራም ነው፡፡ የፋራphrase ትውልድ ፕሮጀክት የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን መዘርጋት የሚያስፈልግ ሀብት ነው፣ ነገር ግን ስራዎችን በመግኘት ጊዜ የንግድ-offs መተርጓሜ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቁልፎችን ጉዳይ ማሰናከል የመጀመሪያውን የስርዓት ትምህርት እናቀርባለን፡፡ ትምህርት፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ የዳታ ውይይት እና የሥራውን አበባ እናስባለን፡፡ ለጥሩ፣ ለግራማት እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ልዩነት እናሳያልን፡፡ የግንኙነታችን አዲስ የነጋዴ ግንኙነት እና የብሔራዊ መልዕክቶች በተደረገው ትክክለኛነት እና የልዩ ልዩነት ጥያቄዎች መካከል አዲስ ዓይነት የሚያደርጉት ነው፤ ለኋለኛው ትውልድ ትውልድ ሥርዓት መሪ የሚያደርጉት፡፡', 'af': "Linguistiese verskillende datastelle is kritiese vir onderwerp en evalueer robust masjien leersystemee, maar data versameling is 'n kosbare proses wat dikwels eksperte benodig. Die proses van parafrase generasie is 'n effektief betekening van uitbreiding van natuurlike taal datastelle, maar daar is beperk analisie van die handelsaf wat opkom wanneer taak ontwerp word. In hierdie papier, ons stel die eerste sistematiese studie van die sleutel faktore in die skare van parafrase versameling. Ons beskou verskillinge in instruksies, insensies, data domeine en werksvloei. Ons het die parafrase met Hand analiseer vir korrekheid, grammatiese en lingwisiese verskeidigheid. Ons opmerkinge verskaf nuwe insig in die handel-af tussen presisiteit en verskeidigheid in skare reaksies wat opkom as gevolg van taak-ontwerp, en verskaf gids vir toekomstige parafrase generasieprosedure.", 'hy': 'Լեզվաբանական տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերը կարևոր են մեքենայի ուսուցման և գնահատման համար, բայց տվյալների հավաքելը թանկ գործընթաց է, որը հաճախ անհրաժեշտ է մասնագետներին: Պարաֆրեսի ստեղծման գործընթացի բազմաթիվ օգտագործումը բնական լեզվի տվյալների համակարգերի ընդլայնման արդյունավետ միջոց է, բայց սահմանափակ վերլուծություն կա այն հակամարտությունների մասին, որոնք առաջանում են առաջադրանքների նախագծման ժամանակ: In this paper, we present the first systematic study of the key factors in crowdsourcing paraphrase collection.  Մենք հաշվի առնում ենք ուղղումների, դրդապատճառների, տվյալների ոլորտների և աշխատանքի հոսքերի տարբերությունները: Մենք ձեռքով վերլուծեցինք ճիշտության, գրամատիկականության և լեզվաբանական բազմազանության պարաֆրեզները: Մեր հետազոտությունները նոր ընկալումներ են տալիս ժողովրդի արձագանքների ճշգրտության և բազմազանության միջև գտնվող հակամարտությունների մասին, որոնք առաջանում են հանձնարարության դիզայնի արդյունքում, ապագա պարաֆրեզի սերունդների գործընթացների ուղղո', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিকভাবে বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেট প্রশিক্ষণ এবং রোবস্ট মেশিন শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থা মূল্যায়নের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, কিন্তু তথ প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়া বিস্তারিত প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ডাটাসেট বিস্তারিত একটি কার্যকর উপায়, কিন্তু কাজের ডিজাইন করার সময় ব্যবস এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথম সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করছি জনসোর্সিং প্যারাফ্রেস সংগ্রহের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কারণে আমরা নির্দেশ, উৎসাহ, ডাটা ডোমেইন এবং কাজের ফুলে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন বিবেচনা করি। আমরা নিজেরাই সঠিক, গ্রামাটিক্যালিটিক এবং ভাষার বৈচিত্র্যের জন্য বিশ্লেষণ করেছি। আমাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ভবিষ্যতের প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য সঠিকভাবে এবং বৈচিত্র্যের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মধ্যে বাণিজ্যিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার মধ্য', 'ca': "Els conjunts de dades lingüísticament diversos són crítics per formar i evaluar sistemes robustos d'aprenentatge màquinari, però la col·lecció de dades és un procés costós que sovint necessita experts. La publicitat del procés de generació de parafrases és un mètode eficaç d'ampliar els conjunts de dades de llenguatges naturals, però hi ha hagut una an àlisi limitada de les compensacions que surten al dissenyar tasques. En aquest article, presentem el primer estudi sistemàtic dels factors clau de la col·lecció de parafrases crowdsourcing. Considerem variacions en instruccions, incentius, dominis de dades i flux de treball. Vam analitzar manualment parafrases per a la correctesa, la gramàtica i la diversitat lingüística. Les nostres observacions ofereixen una nova visió sobre les compensacions entre la precisió i la diversitat de les respostes de la multitud que surten com a resultat del disseny de tasques, proporcionant orientació a procediments futurs de generació de parafrases.", 'az': 'Linguistik müxtəlif veri setləri təhsil etmək və qüvvətli maşın öyrənmək sistemlərinin değerlendirmək üçün kritik olar, amma veri koleksiyonu çox vaxtlı təhsil təhsil edir. Parafraz nəzəriyyətinin işlətməsi təbiətli dil verilənlərini genişləmək üçün etkili bir vasitədir, amma işləri dizayn etməkdə başlayan ticarət-offs analizi çəkilir. Bu kağızda, çox qüvvətli parafraz koleksiyonunun ilk sistematik təhsilini göstəririk. Biz müəyyən edilənlər, təsirlər, məlumat domenaları və işlər axtarışları ilə dəyişiklikləri düşünürük. Biz düzgün, qrammatik və dil müxtəlifliyi üçün parafrazləri əllə analiz etdik. Bizim gözləyirlərimiz, gələcək parafraz nəticəsi prosedürlərinə doğruluğu göstərən qövmünün cavab verməsi və müxtəlif cavab verməsi arasında yeni fikir verir.', 'bs': 'Lingistički različiti podaci su kritični za obuku i procjenu robnih sustava učenja strojeva, ali kolekcija podataka je skup proces koji često zahtijeva stručnike. Proizvodnja procesa generacije parafraze je učinkovit način proširenja prirodnih jezičkih podataka, ali postoji ograničena analiza trgovinskih odlaganja koji se pojavljuju kada dizajniraju zadataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvo sistematsko istraživanje ključnih faktora u kolekciji parafraza crowdsourcing. Smatramo razlike uputstva, podsticaja, domena podataka i protoka rada. Ručno smo analizirali parafraze za ispravnost, gramatičnost i jezičku raznolikost. Naše promatranje pružaju novi uvid o trgovini između tačnosti i raznolikosti u odgovorima publike koji se pojavljuju kao rezultat dizajna zadataka, pružajući upute za buduće procedure generacije parafraze.', 'cs': 'Jazykově rozmanité datové sady jsou klíčové pro školení a hodnocení robustních systémů strojového učení, ale sběr dat je nákladný proces, který často vyžaduje odborníky. Crowdsourcing procesu generování parafráz je efektivním prostředkem rozšiřování datových sad přirozeného jazyka, ale existuje omezená analýza kompromisů, které vznikají při navrhování úkolů. V tomto článku představujeme první systematickou studii klíčových faktorů ve sběru parafráz crowdsourcingu. Zvažujeme rozdíly v pokynech, pobídkách, datových doménách a pracovních postupech. Manuálně jsme analyzovali parafráze na správnost, gramatičnost a jazykovou rozmanitost. Naše pozorování poskytují nový pohled na kompromisy mezi přesností a rozmanitostí v reakcích davu, které vznikají v důsledku návrhu úkolů, a poskytují pokyny pro budoucí postupy generování parafráz.', 'et': 'Keeleliselt mitmekesised andmekogumid on tugevate masinõppesüsteemide koolitamiseks ja hindamiseks kriitilise tähtsusega, kuid andmete kogumine on kulukas protsess, mis sageli nõuab eksperte. Parafraaside genereerimise protsess on tõhus vahend looduskeelsete andmekogumite laiendamiseks, kuid ülesannete kujundamisel tekkivaid kompromisse on analüüsitud piiratud ulatuses. Käesolevas töös tutvustame esimest süstemaatilist uuringut ühishankimise parafraaside kogumise võtmetegurite kohta. Arvestame juhiste, stiimulite, andmevaldkondade ja töövoogude erinevusi. Analüüsisime käsitsi parafraase õigsuse, grammatilisuse ja keelelise mitmekesisuse kohta. Meie tähelepanekud annavad uue ülevaate ülesannete kujundamise tulemusel tekkivate rahvahulga reaktsioonide täpsuse ja mitmekesisuse vahelistest kompromissidest, andes juhiseid tulevaste parafraaside loomise protseduuride jaoks.', 'fi': 'Kielellisesti monipuoliset aineistot ovat kriittisi瓣 kest瓣vien koneoppimisj瓣rjestelmien kouluttamisessa ja arvioinnissa, mutta tiedonkeruu on kallis prosessi, joka vaatii usein asiantuntijoita. Muurahaisprosessin joukkoistaminen on tehokas keino laajentaa luonnonkieliaineistoja, mutta teht瓣vien suunnittelussa syntyvi瓣 kompromisseja on analysoitu vain v瓣h瓣n. T瓣ss瓣 ty繹ss瓣 esitell瓣瓣n ensimm瓣inen systemaattinen tutkimus joukkoistamisen parafraasikokoelman avaintekij繹ist瓣. Otamme huomioon ohjeiden, kannustimien, tietotoimialojen ja ty繹nkulkujen vaihtelut. Analysoimme k瓣sin parafraaseja oikeellisuudesta, kieliopillisuudesta ja kielellisest瓣 monimuotoisuudesta. Havainnot antavat uutta tietoa teht瓣vien suunnittelun tuloksena syntyvist瓣 kompromisseista yleis繹n vastausten tarkkuuden ja monimuotoisuuden v瓣lill瓣 ja antavat ohjeita tuleviin parafraasien luontiprosessiin.', 'jv': 'Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang mapun iki, kita mulai sistematik dadi kanggo mulai perusahaan kanggo kowé nggawe barang pancen. Awak dhéwé pisan karo cah-cah dilambang ning arahan, nggambar, pangan-data lan lan kelas barang. Awak dhéwé manut karo pasarasé kanggo njuk, dadi gramatik lan ugar dilangustik. Awak dhéwé', 'sk': 'Jezikovno raznoliki nabori podatkov so ključnega pomena za usposabljanje in ocenjevanje robustnih sistemov strojnega učenja, vendar je zbiranje podatkov drag proces, ki pogosto zahteva strokovnjake. Crowdsourcing procesa generiranja parafraz je učinkovito sredstvo za širitev naborov podatkov v naravnem jeziku, vendar je bila analiza kompromisov, ki nastanejo pri oblikovanju nalog omejena. V prispevku predstavljamo prvo sistematično študijo ključnih dejavnikov pri zbiranju parafraz množičnega sourcinga. Upoštevamo različice v navodilih, spodbudah, podatkovnih področjih in potekih dela. Ročno smo analizirali parafraze glede pravilnosti, slovničnosti in jezikovne raznolikosti. Naša opažanja zagotavljajo nov vpogled v kompromise med natančnostjo in raznolikostjo odzivov množice, ki nastanejo kot rezultat oblikovanja nalog, in zagotavljajo smernice za prihodnje postopke ustvarjanja parafraz.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name sourcercing the job of parasperase data is an Effective way of enhancing data set in natural language, but there has been an ƙunci of the business-offs that kace when designing tasks. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da farkon littafan na'ura na'ura na da matsayin muhimu a cikin jumuin parafrasa. Muna ƙaddara variant a cikin shirin ayuka, inceni, masu cikin mutane da masu aikin. Ba mu yi anayya da misalin mutane na gaskiya, grammati da linguistic. GannannanMu yana da wani gannai na cikin fatauci tsakanin tsari da masu nauyi ga jama'a waɗanda ke ƙara wa ajirar da za'a shagala ga aikin, kuma yana shiryarwa ga masu zartar da danniyar birnin da ke gaba.", 'he': 'קבוצות נתונים מגוונים בשפה הן קריטיות לאימון ולעריכת מערכות לימוד מכונות חזקות, אך אוסף נתונים הוא תהליך יקר שדרוש לעתים קרובות מומחים. Crowdsourcing the process of paraphrase generation is an effective means of expanding natural language datasets, but there has been limited analysis of the trade-offs that arise when designing tasks.  In this paper, we present the first systematic study of the key factors in crowdsourcing paraphrase collection.  אנחנו שוקלים שונות בהוראות, תמריצים, תחומי נתונים, וצרמים עבודה. ניתחנו בידיים פראפרסמות לתקנות, גרמטיקה, ומגווון שפתי. העקבות שלנו מספקות תובנות חדשות לתחרות בין מדויקת ומגווון בתגובות הקהל שנוצאות כתוצאה של עיצוב המשימה, מספקות כיוון לתהליך הדורה העתידי של פראפרזיה.', 'bo': 'Linguistically diverse datasets are critical for training and evaluating robust machine learning systems, but data collection is a costly process that often requires experts. Crowdsourcing the process of paraphrase generation is an effective means of expanding natural language datasets, but there have been limited analysis of the trade-offs that arise when designing tasks. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོང་ཁག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཁག་དང་པོ་དེ་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བརྗོད་དང་། འགྲོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཀྱང་གསལ་བསམ་བྱེད། ངེད་ཚོས་ནུས་པ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་སྨྲ་བ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལ་ལག་སྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་མི་མང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དག་བརྗོད་དང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་དབར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Arc-swift : A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'fr': "ARC-Swift\xa0: un nouveau système de transition pour l'analyse des dépendances", 'ar': 'آرك سويفت: نظام انتقالي جديد لتحليل التبعية', 'pt': 'Arc-swift: um novo sistema de transição para análise de dependência', 'ja': 'アークスイフト：依存関係解析のための新規トランジションシステム', 'hi': 'आर्क-स्विफ्ट: निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास संक्रमण प्रणाली', 'ru': 'Arc-swift: Романная Система Перехода для Разбора Зависимости', 'es': 'ARC-Swift: Un novedoso sistema de transición para el análisis de dependencias', 'zh': 'Arc-swift曰:一以解析新型过也', 'ga': 'Arc-swift: Córas Trasdultach Úrscéalta le haghaidh Parsáil Spleáchais', 'hu': 'Arc-swift: Új átmeneti rendszer a függőség-értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Ένα νέο μεταβατικό σύστημα για την ανάλυση εξάρτησης', 'ka': 'Arc- swift: Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'it': "Arc-swift: un nuovo sistema di transizione per l'analisi della dipendenza", 'kk': 'Арк- жылдамдық: Тәуелдік талдау жүйесі', 'ml': 'ആർക്ക്- വേഗം: ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം', 'mk': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'lt': 'Arc-swift: Nauja perėjimo prie priklausomybės analizavimo sistema', 'ms': 'Arc-swift: Sistem Transisi Baru untuk Menghurai Dependensi', 'pl': 'Arc-swift: Nowy system przejściowy dla parowania zależności', 'mn': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'no': 'Arc- swift: Eit Novel Transition System for Avhengighetstolking', 'sr': 'Arc-swift: Novi prelazni sistem za analizu zavisnosti', 'si': 'Name', 'mt': 'Arc-swift: Sistema Ġdida ta’ Transizzjoni għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza', 'ro': 'Arc-rapid: un nou sistem de tranziție pentru analizarea dependenței', 'sv': 'Arc-swift: Ett nytt övergångssystem för beroendetolkning', 'so': 'Deg-dhaqso: Isticmaalka ka wareegashada bannaanka', 'ta': 'ஆர்- விரைவு: சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கான நிலை மாற்றம் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'uz': 'Arc- tez: Taò¥minlovchi boò£yicha tarjima tizimi', 'vi': 'Biết trước rất nhanh: một hệ thống chuyển đổi mới cho độ phụ thuộc.', 'nl': 'Arc-swift: een nieuw overgangssysteem voor afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'de': 'Arc-swift: Ein neuartiges Übergangssystem für Dependency Parsing', 'bg': 'Арк-бързо: Нова преходна система за анализ на зависимостта', 'id': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'hr': 'Brzo: Novi prelazni sustav za analizu zavisnosti', 'fa': 'سیستم تغییر جدید برای تحلیل بستگی', 'sw': 'Mwaka haraka: Mfumo wa Kupitia Sayansi kwa ajili ya Kutengemea', 'ko': 'Arc-swift: 새로운 종속 분석 변환 시스템', 'af': "Arc- swift: ' n Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing", 'da': 'Arc-swift: Et nyt overgangssystem til afhængighedsfortolkning', 'tr': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Արք-արագ. Ախխտավորության վերլուծության նոր հաջորդադարձ համակարգ', 'az': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'sq': 'Ark-shpejt: Një Sistem i ri i Transicionit për analizimin e varësive', 'ca': 'Arc-swift: A Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing', 'et': 'Arc-swift: uus üleminekusüsteem sõltuvuse analüüsimiseks', 'fi': 'Arc-swift: Uusi siirtymäjärjestelmä riippuvuuden analysointia varten', 'bn': 'আর্ক- দ্রুত: নির্ভর পার্সিং এর জন্য একটি নোভেল পরিবর্তন সিস্টেম', 'cs': 'Arc-swift: Nový přechodový systém pro analýzu závislosti', 'bs': 'Arc-swift: Novi prelazni sistem za analizu zavisnosti', 'sk': 'Arc-swift: nov prehodni sistem za razčlenitev odvisnosti', 'he': 'Arc-swift: מערכת העברה חדשה עבור בדיקת תלויות', 'jv': 'paper size', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Arc-swift:Novel Transition System for Dependency Parsing'}
{'en': 'Transition-based dependency parsers often need sequences of local shift and reduce operations to produce certain attachments. Correct individual decisions hence require global information about the sentence context and mistakes cause error propagation. This paper proposes a novel transition system, arc-swift, that enables direct attachments between tokens farther apart with a single transition. This allows the parser to leverage lexical information more directly in transition decisions. Hence, arc-swift can achieve significantly better performance with a very small beam size. Our parsers reduce error by 3.77.6 % relative to those using existing transition systems on the Penn Treebank dependency parsing task and English Universal Dependencies.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يحتاج محللو التبعية القائمة على الانتقال إلى تسلسلات من التحول المحلي وتقليل العمليات لإنتاج مرفقات معينة. وبالتالي ، تتطلب القرارات الفردية الصحيحة معلومات عالمية حول سياق الجملة وتسبب الأخطاء انتشار الخطأ. تقترح هذه الورقة نظامًا انتقاليًا جديدًا ، قوسًا سريعًا ، يتيح إمكانية الربط المباشر بين الرموز المميزة على مسافة أبعد مع انتقال واحد. هذا يسمح للمحلل بالاستفادة من المعلومات المعجمية بشكل مباشر في قرارات الانتقال. وبالتالي ، يمكن للقوس السريع أن يحقق أداءً أفضل بشكل ملحوظ مع حجم شعاع صغير جدًا. يقوم محللونا بتقليل الخطأ بنسبة 3.7-7.6٪ بالنسبة لأولئك الذين يستخدمون أنظمة الانتقال الحالية في مهمة تحليل تبعية Penn Treebank والاعتمادية العامة للغة الإنجليزية.', 'fr': "Les analyseurs de dépendances basés sur la transition ont souvent besoin de séquences de décalage local et d'opérations de réduction pour produire certaines pièces jointes. Les décisions individuelles correctes nécessitent donc des informations globales sur le contexte de la phrase et les erreurs provoquent la propagation des erreurs. Cet article propose un nouveau système de transition, arc swift, qui permet des attaches directes entre des jetons plus éloignés avec une seule transition. Cela permet à l'analyseur d'exploiter les informations lexicales plus directement dans les décisions de transition. Par conséquent, Arc-Swift peut atteindre des performances nettement meilleures avec une très petite taille de faisceau. Nos analyseurs réduisent les erreurs de 3,7 à 7,6\xa0% par rapport à ceux qui utilisent les systèmes de transition existants sur la tâche d'analyse des dépendances Penn Treebank et les dépendances universelles anglaises.", 'es': 'Los analizadores de dependencias basados en transiciones a menudo necesitan secuencias de turnos locales y reducen las operaciones para producir ciertos adjuntos. Por lo tanto, las decisiones individuales correctas requieren información global sobre el contexto de la oración y los errores provocan la propagación de errores Este artículo propone un novedoso sistema de transición, arc-swift, que permite la unión directa entre fichas más alejadas con una sola transición. Esto permite al analizador aprovechar la información léxica de forma más directa en las decisiones de transición. Por lo tanto, arc-swift puede lograr un rendimiento significativamente mejor con un tamaño de haz muy pequeño. Nuestros analizadores reducen el error entre un 3.7 y un 7.6% en relación con aquellos que utilizan los sistemas de transición existentes en la tarea de análisis de dependencias de Penn Treebank y Dependencias universales de inglés.', 'pt': 'Os analisadores de dependência baseados em transição geralmente precisam de sequências de deslocamento local e operações de redução para produzir determinados anexos. Decisões individuais corretas, portanto, exigem informações globais sobre o contexto da frase e os erros causam a propagação de erros. Este artigo propõe um novo sistema de transição, arc-swift, que permite conexões diretas entre tokens mais distantes com uma única transição. Isso permite que o analisador aproveite as informações léxicas mais diretamente nas decisões de transição. Assim, o Arc-Swift pode alcançar um desempenho significativamente melhor com um tamanho de feixe muito pequeno. Nossos analisadores reduzem o erro em 3,7–7,6% em relação àqueles que usam sistemas de transição existentes na tarefa de análise de dependência Penn Treebank e Dependências Universais Inglesas.', 'ja': '遷移ベースの依存関係構文解析器は、しばしばローカルシフトのシーケンスを必要とし、特定の添付ファイルを生成するための動作を削減する。したがって、個々の意思決定を修正するには、文章の文脈に関するグローバルな情報が必要であり、ミスはエラーの伝播を引き起こします。本論文では、単一の遷移でより離れたトークン間の直接的なアタッチメントを可能にする新規の遷移システム、アークスイフトを提案している。これにより、構文解析器は、遷移の決定においてより直接的に語彙情報を活用することができる。したがって、アークスイフトは、非常に小さなビームサイズで大幅に優れたパフォーマンスを達成することができます。当社のパーサーは、ペンツリーバンクの依存関係解析タスクと英語のユニバーサル依存関係で既存のトランジションシステムを使用している場合と比較して、誤差を3.7 ～ 7.6 ％削減します。', 'zh': '盖转换之赖解析器常须本地移序,并减操作以成某附件。 是以正人决策,须句上下文全局信息,误致讹传。 本文建一新渡系统,arc-swift,可以单转远令牌之间直接。 此许解析器于转换决策中更直用词法信息。 故弧速可以小光束尺寸明善。 比之 Penn Treebank 赖解析事英语通用今转易,吾解析器减 3.7–7.6%矣。', 'hi': 'संक्रमण-आधारित निर्भरता पार्सर को अक्सर स्थानीय शिफ्ट के अनुक्रमों की आवश्यकता होती है और कुछ अनुलग्नकों का उत्पादन करने के लिए संचालन को कम किया जाता है। सही व्यक्तिगत निर्णय इसलिए वाक्य संदर्भ के बारे में वैश्विक जानकारी की आवश्यकता होती है और गलतियाँ त्रुटि प्रचार का कारण बनती हैं। यह पेपर एक उपन्यास संक्रमण प्रणाली, आर्क-स्विफ्ट का प्रस्ताव करता है, जो एकल संक्रमण के साथ आगे टोकन के बीच प्रत्यक्ष अनुलग्नकों को सक्षम बनाता है। यह पार्सर को संक्रमण निर्णयों में अधिक सीधे लेक्सिकल जानकारी का लाभ उठाने की अनुमति देता है। इसलिए, आर्क-स्विफ्ट एक बहुत छोटे बीम आकार के साथ काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकता है। हमारे पार्सर पेन ट्रीबैंक निर्भरता पार्सिंग कार्य और अंग्रेजी यूनिवर्सल निर्भरताओं पर मौजूदा संक्रमण प्रणालियों का उपयोग करने वालों के सापेक्ष 3.7-7.6% तक त्रुटि को कम करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Анализаторы зависимостей на основе перехода часто нуждаются в последовательности локального сдвига и сокращают операции для получения определенных вложений. Правильные индивидуальные решения, следовательно, требуют глобальной информации о контексте предложения, и ошибки вызывают распространение ошибки. В этой статье предлагается новая система перехода, дуговая сдвиг, который позволяет прямые прикрепления между токенами дальше друг от друга с одним переходом. Это позволяет парсеру использовать лексическую информацию более непосредственно при принятии решений о переходе. Следовательно, дуга-переключение может достичь значительно лучшей производительности с очень малым размером луча. Наши парсеры снижают погрешность на 3,7-7,6% по сравнению с теми, которые используют существующие системы перехода в задаче синтаксического анализа зависимостей Penn Treebank и английских универсальных зависимостей.', 'ga': 'Is minic go mbíonn seichimh aistrithe áitiúil de dhíth ar pharsálaithe spleáchais atá bunaithe ar an trasdul agus oibríochtaí a laghdú chun ceangaltáin áirithe a tháirgeadh. Mar sin teastaíonn faisnéis dhomhanda maidir le comhthéacs na habairte le cinntí cearta aonair agus bíonn botúin ina gcúis le iomadú earráide. Molann an páipéar seo córas aistrithe nua, stua-luath, a chumasaíonn ceangal díreach idir comharthaí níos faide óna chéile agus trasdul amháin. Ligeann sé seo don pharsálaí faisnéis fhoclóra a ghiaráil ar bhealach níos dírí i gcinntí aistrithe. Mar sin, is féidir le stua-luath feidhmíocht i bhfad níos fearr a bhaint amach le méid bhíoma an-bheag. Laghdaíonn ár gcuid parsálaithe earráid 3.7–7.6% i gcomparáid leo siúd a úsáideann córais aistrithe atá ann cheana féin ar thasc parsála spleáchais Penn Treebank agus Spleáchais Uilíoch Shasana.', 'hu': 'Az átmeneti alapú függőség-elemzők gyakran helyi eltolódási sorozatokat igényelnek, és csökkentik a műveleteket bizonyos mellékletek létrehozásához. A helyes egyéni döntések tehát globális információt igényelnek a mondat kontextusáról, és a hibák hibákat okoznak. Ez a tanulmány egy új, ívgyors átmeneti rendszert javasol, amely egyetlen átmenettel lehetővé teszi a távolabb lévő zsetonok közötti közvetlen kapcsolódást. Ez lehetővé teszi az elemző számára, hogy közvetlenül kihasználja a lexikai információkat az átmeneti döntésekben. Így az ívsugár jelentősen jobb teljesítményt érhet el nagyon kis sugárméret mellett. Elemzőink 3,7-7,6%-kal csökkentik a hibákat azokhoz képest, akik a Penn Treebank függőség elemzésére és az angol univerzális függőségekre használnak meglévő átmeneti rendszereket.', 'el': 'Οι αναλυτές εξαρτήσεων με βάση τη μετάβαση συχνά χρειάζονται ακολουθίες τοπικής μετατόπισης και μειώνουν τις λειτουργίες για να παράγουν ορισμένα συνημμένα. Ως εκ τούτου, οι σωστές ατομικές αποφάσεις απαιτούν σφαιρικές πληροφορίες σχετικά με το πλαίσιο της πρότασης και τα λάθη προκαλούν διάδοση σφαλμάτων. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα νέο μεταβατικό σύστημα, τόξο-γρήγορο, που επιτρέπει την άμεση σύνδεση μεταξύ των σημάτων πιο μακριά με μια μόνο μετάβαση. Αυτό επιτρέπει στον αναλυτή να αξιοποιεί τις λεξικές πληροφορίες πιο άμεσα σε αποφάσεις μετάβασης. Ως εκ τούτου, ο τόξος-γρήγορος μπορεί να επιτύχει σημαντικά καλύτερη απόδοση με ένα πολύ μικρό μέγεθος δέσμης. Οι αναλυτές μας μειώνουν το σφάλμα κατά 3.7-7.6% σε σχέση με εκείνους που χρησιμοποιούν υπάρχοντα συστήματα μετάβασης στην εργασία ανάλυσης εξάρτησης Penn Tree Bank και τις αγγλικές καθολικές εξαρτήσεις.', 'kk': 'Тіркеме негізінде тәуелдік талдаушылары көбірек жергілікті жылжыту ретінде және бір тіркемелерді құру үшін әрекеттерді азайту керек. Жеке шешімдерді түзету үшін мәліметті жүйелік мәліметті және қате туралы қате пропагациясы керек. Бұл қағаз жаңа ауыстыру жүйесі, бұрышты жылдамдық, бұл белгілер арасындағы тіркелгілерді бір ауыстырумен артық түрлендіруге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл параметрлерге ауыстыру шешімдерінде лексикалық мәліметті тәртіпке қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Сондықтан, бұрышты жылдамдығы өте кішкентай жұлдамдың өлшемі арқылы жақсы жұмыс істеуге болады. Параметрлеріміз Penn Treebank тәуелсіздік тапсырманы талдау және Англиялық Universal dependance пайдаланушыларының 3.7-7.6% қатесін шектеу керек.', 'ka': 'Transition-based dependency parsers often need sequences of local shift and reduce operations to produce certain attachments. ინდიველური გადაწყვეტილებების შემდეგ გლობალური ინფორმაციის შესახებ და შეცდომაების შეცდომა გაზრუნდება. ეს დოკუმენტი პრომენტური გადაცვლის სისტემა, არქსიტუმენტი, რომელიც შესაძლებელია პირდაპირი დაკავშირებების შესაძლებელია, რომელიც ერთი გადაცვლის შესაძლებელია ეს მოხმარება პანსერისთვის ლექსიკალური ინფორმაციას უფრო დირექტიკურად გადაწყვეტილებში. ამიტომ, arc-swift შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი უკეთესი გამოსახულებას, რომელიც ძალიან პატარა სიმბოლოებით. ჩვენი პანსერილები 3.7-7.6% შეცდომას შემდეგ შეცდომა, რომლებიც გამოყენებენ პენ ტრიბანკის დასამხოლოდ საქაღალდე და ინგლისური სამყარო დასამხოლობა.', 'lt': 'Pereinamojo laikotarpio priklausomybės analizatoriams dažnai reikia vietos perkėlimo sekų ir mažinti tam tikrų priedų gamybą. Taigi teisingi atskiri sprendimai reikalauja bendros informacijos apie sakinio kontekstą ir klaidos sukelia klaidų plitimą. Šiame dokumente siūloma nauja pereinamojo laikotarpio sistema, kuri leidžia tiesiogiai pritvirtinti ženklus tarp žymenų, atskirai nuo vieno pereinamojo laikotarpio. Tai leidžia analizatoriui tiesiogiau panaudoti lexinę informaciją priimant sprendimus dėl pereinamojo laikotarpio. Hence, arc-swift can achieve significantly better performance with a very small beam size.  Our parsers reduce error by 3.7-7.6% relative to those using existing transition systems on the Penn Treebank dependency parsing task and English Universal Dependencies.', 'it': "I parser di dipendenza basati sulla transizione spesso hanno bisogno di sequenze di spostamento locale e riducono le operazioni per produrre determinati allegati. Le decisioni individuali corrette richiedono quindi informazioni globali sul contesto della frase e gli errori causano la propagazione degli errori. Questo articolo propone un nuovo sistema di transizione, rapido ad arco, che consente collegamenti diretti tra token più distanti con un'unica transizione. Ciò consente al parser di sfruttare le informazioni lessicali più direttamente nelle decisioni di transizione. Pertanto, arco-rapido può ottenere prestazioni significativamente migliori con una dimensione del fascio molto piccola. I nostri parser riducono gli errori del 3,7-7,6% rispetto a quelli che utilizzano sistemi di transizione esistenti nell'attività di analisi delle dipendenze Penn Treebank e nelle dipendenze universali inglesi.", 'mk': 'Проверувачите за зависност базирани на транзиција честопати имаат потреба од секвенци на локални смени и намалување на операциите за производство на одредени приклучоци. Точните индивидуални одлуки бараат глобални информации за контекстот на реченицата и грешките предизвикуваат пропалирање на грешките. This paper proposes a novel transition system, arc-swift, that enables direct attachments between tokens farther apart with a single transition.  Ова му овозможува на анализаторот да ги користи лексикалните информации повеќе директно во одлуките за транзиција. Поради тоа, лук-брзо може да постигне значително подобра резултат со многу мала големина на светло. Нашите анализатори ја намалуваат грешката за 3,7-7,6 отсто во однос на оние кои користат постоечки транзициски системи на задачата за анализа на зависноста од Penn Treebank и англиските универзални зависности.', 'mt': 'Il-analizzaturi tad-dipendenza bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni ta’ spiss jeħtieġu sekwenzi ta’ bidla lokali u jnaqqsu l-operazzjonijiet biex jipproduċu ċerti aċċessorji. Id-deċiżjonijiet individwali korretti għalhekk jeħtieġu informazzjoni globali dwar il-kuntest tas-sentenza u l-iżbalji jikkawżaw propagazzjoni ta’ żbalji. Dan id-dokument jipproponi sistema ta’ tranżizzjoni ġdida, b’veloċità arka, li tippermetti l-irbit dirett bejn it-tokens ’il bogħod minn xulxin bi tranżizzjoni waħda. Dan jippermetti li l-analizzatur jagħmel użu aktar dirett mill-informazzjoni lexika fid-deċiżjonijiet ta’ tranżizzjoni. Għalhekk, il-veloċità tal-ark tista’ tikseb prestazzjoni a ħjar b’mod sinifikanti b’daqs żgħir ħafna tar-raġġ. Il-analizzaturi tagħna jnaqqsu l-iżbalji bi 3.7-7.6% meta mqabbla ma’ dawk li jużaw sistemi ta’ tranżizzjoni eżistenti fuq il-kompitu tal-analizzazzjoni tad-dipendenza tal-Penn Treebank u d-Dipendenzi Universali Ingliżi.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэлт суурилсан хамааралтай хуваалцагчид ихэвчлэн орон нутгийн шилжүүлэлтийн дарааллыг хэрэгтэй ба зарим холбоотой холбоотой үйл ажиллагааг багасгах хэрэгтэй. Хүн бүрийн шийдвэрлэлүүдийг зөв засах, тэгэхээр үгийн тухай дэлхийн мэдээлэл болон алдаа алдаа гарч ирдэг. Энэ цаас шилжилтийн систем, арк-хурдан, тэмдэгтийн хоорондын шууд холбоотой холбоотой гэдгийг санал болгодог. Энэ нь шилжилт шийдвэрүүд дээр илүү шууд хэлний мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой. Тиймээс, арк хурдан жижиг хэмжээтэй илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна. Бидний ажиллаачид Penn Treebank-ын хамааралтай ажлыг хуваалцах болон Англи хэлний Universal Dependencies дээр суурь шилжилт системийг ашигладаг хүмүүстэй холбоотой 3.7-7.6%-аар алдаа багасгадаг.', 'ms': 'Penghurai dependensi berasaskan-transisi sering memerlukan urutan shift setempat dan mengurangkan operasi untuk menghasilkan lampiran tertentu. Keputusan individu betul oleh itu memerlukan maklumat global mengenai konteks kalimat dan kesilapan menyebabkan penyebaran ralat. Kertas ini mencadangkan sistem transisi baru, lengkung-cepat, yang membolehkan lampiran langsung antara token jauh selain dengan transisi tunggal. Ini membenarkan penghurai untuk menggunakan maklumat leksikal secara langsung dalam keputusan transisi. Oleh itu, arc-swift boleh mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dengan saiz cahaya yang sangat kecil. Penghurai kami mengurangkan ralat dengan 3.7-7.6% berbanding dengan yang menggunakan sistem transisi yang wujud pada tugas hurai dependensi Pangkalan Pepohon Penn dan Dependensi Universal Inggeris.', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസിങ്ഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ലോക്കല്\u200d ഷിഫ്റ്റിന്റെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട വാക്കിന്റെ സംസ്ഥാനത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും തെറ്റുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും ഗ്ലോക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായ തീരുമാനങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്രമാണു് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നതു് ഒരു മാറ്റം കൊ ഇത് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നേരിട്ടുള്ള തീരുമാനത്തില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെവര്\u200dജെയിസ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ആര്\u200dക്ക് വേഗത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ ബീമിന്\u200dറെ വലിപ്പം കൊണ്ട് വളരെ നല്ല പ്രകടനം നേടാന്\u200d കഴിയും. പെന്\u200d ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള transition സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് 3.7-7.6 ശതമാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d തെറ്റ് കുറയ്ക്കുന്', 'ro': 'Analizoarele de dependență bazate pe tranziție au adesea nevoie de secvențe de schimbare locală și reduc operațiunile pentru a produce anumite atașamente. Deciziile individuale corecte necesită, prin urmare, informații globale despre contextul propoziției, iar greșelile cauzează propagarea erorilor. Această lucrare propune un nou sistem de tranziție, arc-rapid, care permite atașarea directă între jetoane mai departe, cu o singură tranziție. Acest lucru permite parserului să valorifice informațiile lexicale mai direct în deciziile de tranziție. Prin urmare, arcul rapid poate obține performanțe semnificativ mai bune cu o dimensiune foarte mică a fasciculului. Analizoarele noastre reduc erorile cu 3,7-7,6% în raport cu cele care utilizează sisteme de tranziție existente în activitatea de analizare a dependențelor Penn Treebank și Dependențele universale engleze.', 'no': 'Overgangsbaserte avhengighetstolkar treng ofte sekvensar av lokale forskyving og reduserer operasjonar for å produsera nokre vedlegg. Korriger individuelle beslutningar derfor krev globale informasjon om setningskonteksten og feil fører til feilpropagasjon. Denne papiret foreslår eit nytt overføringssystem, arksnøggtast, som gjer direkte vedlegg mellom teikn lenger unntatt med ei enkelt overføring. Dette tillèt tolkaren å levera leksiske informasjon meir direkte i overgangsslutningar. Derfor kan arksnøggtasten oppnå mykje bedre utvikling med ein veldig liten strålstorleik. Analiseringane våre reduserer feil med 3.7-7.6% relative to those using existing transition systems on the Penn Treebank dependency parsing task and English Universal Dependencies.', 'pl': 'Parsery zależności oparte na przejściach często potrzebują sekwencji zmian lokalnych i redukują operacje w celu wytworzenia pewnych załączników. Poprawne decyzje indywidualne wymagają więc globalnej informacji o kontekście zdania, a błędy powodują propagację błędów. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowy system przejścia, łukowy szybki, który umożliwia bezpośrednie przyłączanie pomiędzy tokenami dalej od siebie za pomocą jednego przejścia. Pozwala to parserowi wykorzystać informacje leksykalne bardziej bezpośrednio w decyzjach o przejściu. Dlatego łukowy szybki może osiągnąć znacznie lepszą wydajność przy bardzo małej wielkości wiązki. Nasze parsery redukują błędy o 3.7-7.6% w stosunku do tych, które korzystają z istniejących systemów przejściowych w zadaniu parsowania zależności Penn Treebank i angielskich uniwersalnych zależności.', 'si': 'ස්ථානික වෙනස් සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය විශේෂකයන්ට ස්ථානික වෙනස් ක්\u200dරමය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා සහ සැ ප්\u200dරතිකෘත තීරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය තීරණය සඳහා වාර්තාව සඳහා ජාතික තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ. මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්නේ නියම වෙනස් පද්ධතියක්, arc-speed, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන්  මේක පරීක්ෂකයාට ප්\u200dරවේශනය තීරණාවට ලෙක්සිකල් තොරතුරු විසින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඉතින්, සුවර්ධ වේගයක් ගොඩක් පුංචි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන හොඳ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපේ පරීස්ටර් 3.7-7.6% වලින් වැරදිලි අඩු කරනවා පෙන්න් ට්\u200dරී බැන්ක් විශේෂතාව සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජාතික විශේෂතාව සඳහා ප්\u200d', 'sr': 'Parzeri ovisnosti na prijenosu često trebaju sekvence lokalne smjene i smanjiti operacije kako bi proizveli određene veze. Upravljaju individualne odluke, zato zahtevaju globalne informacije o kontekstu rečenica i greškama uzrokuju propagaciju grešaka. Ovaj papir predlaže novi sistem za prelaz, brz, koji omogućava direktne veze između znakova daleko udaljenih sa jednom prelazom. To omogućava analizatoru da izravnije utiče na leksičke informacije u odluke o prelazu. Stoga, arc-brz može postići značajno bolje izvedbe sa veoma malim veličinom zraka. Naši parseri smanjuju grešku za 3,7-7,6% u odnosu na one koji koriste postojeće prelazne sisteme na analizu zadatka zavisnosti Penn Treebank-a i univerzalne zavisnosti engleskog jezika.', 'sv': 'Övergångsbaserade beroendetolkare behöver ofta sekvenser av lokalt skift och reducerar operationer för att producera vissa bilagor. Rätta individuella beslut kräver därför global information om meningssammanhanget och misstag orsakar felspridning. Denna uppsats föreslår ett nytt övergångssystem, bågsnabbt, som möjliggör direkta kopplingar mellan polletter längre ifrån varandra med en enda övergång. Detta gör det möjligt för tolkaren att utnyttja lexikal information mer direkt i övergångsbeslut. Därför kan bågsnabb uppnå betydligt bättre prestanda med en mycket liten strålstorlek. Våra tolkare reducerar fel med 3,7-7,6% jämfört med dem som använder befintliga övergångssystem på Penn Treebank beroendetolkningsuppgift och engelska Universal Dependences.', 'ta': 'சில இணைப்புகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கான மாற்றம் சார்ந்த சார்பு பார்சர்கள் பெரும்பாலும் உள்ளார்ந்த மாற்றத்தின் வரி இப்பொழுது சான்று சூழல் பற்றிய பொதுவான தகவல் மற்றும் பிழையை வெளிப்படுத்துவதால் சரியான தனியார் தீர்மானி இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய மாற்று அமைப்பு, ஆர்க்- விரைவு, அது குறியீடுகளுக்கு இடையே அதிகமாக இணைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்தும் ஒரு மாற இது மாற்றும் முடிவுகளில் மேலும் நேரடியாக மாற்றும் முடிவுகளில் வெளிப்பாட்டு தகவலை சேர்க்க அதனால், ஆர்க் விரைவாக ஒரு சிறிய மணி அளவுடன் மிகவும் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டை அடைய முடியும். எங்கள் பார்சர்கள் பிழையை 3.7-7.6% குறைக்கும் பென் ட்ரீபாங்க் மீது நடப்பு மாற்று அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்துபவர்களுக்கு சார்ந்தது மற்றும் ஆ', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka ku xiran ee lagu soo wareejiyo waxay inta badan u baahan yihiin isbedelka deegaanka, wuxuuna u baahan yahay in lagu sameeyo xiriir cayiman. Sidaa darteed waxaa loo baahan yahay macluumaad caalami ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka ereyga iyo qaladka sababtoo ah ogeysiiska qaladka. Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa nidaamka warqadda ah ee warqadda beddelista, kaas oo si toos ah u dhigi kara xiriir ku dhexeeya calaamadaha si ka sii dheer marka lagu soo wareejiyo hal mar. This allows the parser to leverage lexical information more directly in transition decisions.  Sidaa darteed arc-degdeg wuxuu gaadhi karaa tababar aad u wanaagsan oo aad u yar oo cambaarad ah. Baarlamayaashayada waxay khalad ku soo gaaban yihiin 3.7-7.6% kuwa isticmaalaya nidaamka soo wareegashada ee ku xiran jardiinada baaritaanka Penn Treebank iyo hawsha ku xiran ee jaamacadda Ingiriiska.', 'ur': 'Transition-based dependency parsers often need sequences of local shift and reduce operations to produce certain attachments. فرقہ فیصلے درست کریں، اس وجہ سے جہالت کے متصلے اور غلطوں کے بارے میں جہالت معلومات کی ضرورت ہے. This paper proposes a new transition system, arc-swift, that enables direct attachments between tokens further apart with a single transition. یہ پارچر کی اجازت دیتا ہے کہ لکسیکل معلومات کو تغییر فیصلے میں زیادہ مستقیم دکھائے۔ لہٰذا، آرک سوئٹ بہت اچھی عملکرد پہنچا سکتا ہے ایک بہت چھوٹی توڑ کی اندازہ سے۔ ہمارے پارچروں نے 3.7-7.6% کی خطا کو ان لوگوں کے مقابلہ میں کم کر دیا جو پن تری بینک کے اعتباری کے مطابق موجود تغییر سیستموں کو استعمال کرتے ہیں اور انگلیسی یونلورل اعتباری کے مطابق۔', 'uz': 'Comment @ info Name Name Hullas, arc-tez qismning oʻlchami bilan juda yaxshi bajarishi mumkin. Парламентларимиз хато 3.7-7.6% билан мавжуд 过渡 системаҳои Penn Treebank парламент вазифасига ва англис Умумрача парламентларга боғлиқлик вазифасига ва ўзгартириш аъзоларини фойдалантириш мумкин.', 'vi': 'Những phân tích phụ thuộc vượt thời kỳ thường cần đến chuỗi trình biến đổi địa phương và giảm bớt các hoạt động để tạo ra những mối liên kết. Sự sửa chữa quyết định cá nhân đòi hỏi thông tin toàn cầu về ngữ cảnh án và sai lầm gây ra lây lan lỗi. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một hệ thống chuyển đổi mới, tốc độ cong, giúp những mối liên kết trực tiếp giữa các vật thể tách xa hơn với một sự chuyển đổi duy nhất. Điều này cho phép phân viên sử dụng thông tin ngôn ngữ trực tiếp trong các quyết định chuyển tiếp. Do đó, tốc độ cung điện có thể đạt hiệu suất tốt hơn nhiều với kích cỡ chùm tia rất nhỏ. Các phân tích của chúng tôi giảm lỗi của 3.7-7.6. tương ứng với những người sử dụng hệ thống chuyển đổi đã có dựa vào nhiệm vụ phân tích phụ thuộc tổ chức Y tế và Anh cung.', 'hr': 'Analizatori ovisnosti na prijelazu često trebaju sekvence lokalne smjene i smanjiti operacije kako bi proizveli određene veze. Upravljaju pojedinačne odluke, zato zahtijevaju globalne informacije o kontekstu kazne i greškama uzrokuju propagaciju greške. Ovaj papir predlaže novi sustav prijenosa, brzinu, koji omogućava direktne veze između znakova daleko udaljenih s jednom prejenosa. To omogućava analizatoru da izravnije primjenjuje leksičke informacije u odlukama o prelazu. Stoga, arc-brzina može postići značajno bolje izvedbe s veoma malim veličinom zraka. Naši parseri smanjuju grešku za 3,7-7,6% u odnosu na one koji koriste postojeće prelazne sustave na analizu zadatka zavisnosti Penn Treebank-a i univerzalne zavisnosti engleskog jezika.', 'bg': 'Парсорите на зависимост, базирани на преход, често се нуждаят от последователности от локални смени и намаляват операциите, за да произвеждат определени прикачени файлове. Правилните индивидуални решения изискват глобална информация за контекста на изречението и грешките причиняват разпространение на грешки. Тази статия предлага нова преходна система, която позволява директни прикрепвания между символи, по-отдалечени от тях с един преход. Това позволява на анализатора да използва лексикалната информация по-директно при решения за преход. Следователно дъговата бързина може да постигне значително по-добра производителност с много малък размер на лъча. Нашите анализатори намаляват грешките с 3,7-7,6% спрямо тези, които използват съществуващи преходни системи в задачата за анализ на зависимостта и английските универсални зависимости.', 'nl': 'Op overgangen gebaseerde afhankelijkheidsparsers hebben vaak reeksen van lokale verschuivingen nodig en verminderen bewerkingen om bepaalde bijlagen te produceren. Correcte individuele beslissingen vereisen daarom algemene informatie over de zinnencontext en fouten veroorzaken foutpropagatie. Dit document stelt een nieuw overgangssysteem voor, arc-swift, dat directe bijlagen tussen tokens mogelijk maakt die verder uit elkaar liggen met een enkele overgang. Dit stelt de parser in staat om lexicale informatie directer te gebruiken bij overgangsbeslissingen. Daarom kan boogswift aanzienlijk betere prestaties bereiken met een zeer kleine straalgrootte. Onze parsers verminderen fouten met 3.7-7.6% ten opzichte van degenen die bestaande overgangssystemen gebruiken op de Penn Treebank afhankelijkheidsparsing taak en Engelse universele afhankelijkheden.', 'da': 'Overgangsbaserede afhængighedsfortolkere har ofte brug for sekvenser af lokalt skift og reducerer operationer for at producere visse vedhæftede filer. Korrekte individuelle beslutninger kræver derfor global information om sætningens kontekst, og fejl forårsager fejlspredning. Denne artikel foreslår et nyt overgangssystem, bue-hurtigt, der muliggør direkte vedhæftelser mellem poletter længere fra hinanden med en enkelt overgang. Dette gør det muligt for fortolkeren at udnytte leksikalsk information mere direkte i overgangsbeslutninger. Derfor kan bue-hurtig opnå betydeligt bedre ydeevne med en meget lille strålestørrelse. Vores fortolkere reducerer fejl med 3,7-7,6% i forhold til dem, der bruger eksisterende overgangssystemer på Penn Treebank afhængighed parsing opgave og engelsk Universal Dependences.', 'de': 'Übergangsbasierte Abhängigkeitsparser benötigen häufig Sequenzen lokaler Verschiebungen und reduzieren Operationen, um bestimmte Anhänge zu erzeugen. Richtige Einzelentscheidungen erfordern daher globale Informationen über den Satzkontext und Fehler verursachen Fehlerausbreitung. Dieses Papier schlägt ein neuartiges Übergangssystem vor, Arc-Swift, das direkte Anhängen zwischen Token ermöglicht, die weiter auseinander liegen mit einem einzigen Übergang. Dadurch kann der Parser lexikalische Informationen direkt bei Übergangsentscheidungen nutzen. Somit kann Arc-Swift mit einer sehr kleinen Strahlgröße deutlich bessere Leistung erzielen. Unsere Parser reduzieren Fehler um 3,7-7,6% im Vergleich zu denen, die vorhandene Übergangssysteme auf der Penn Treebank Dependence Parsing Task und English Universal Dependences verwenden.', 'id': 'Penanalis dependensi berdasarkan transisi sering membutuhkan urutan shift lokal dan mengurangi operasi untuk menghasilkan lampiran tertentu. Correct individual decisions hence require global information about the sentence context and mistakes cause error propagation.  Kertas ini mengusulkan sistem transisi baru, lengkung-cepat, yang memungkinkan ikatan langsung antara token jauh terpisah dengan transisi tunggal. Ini memungkinkan pemeriksa untuk menggunakan informasi lexik secara langsung dalam keputusan transisi. Hence, arc-swift can achieve significantly better performance with a very small beam size.  Penganalis kami mengurangi kesalahan dengan 3,7-7,6% berbanding dengan yang menggunakan sistem transisi yang ada di tugas penganalis dependensi Penn Treebank dan Dependensi Universal Inggris.', 'ko': '변환에 기반한 의존 관계 해석기는 일부 첨부 파일을 생성하기 위해 국부 이동과 Reduce 작업 시퀀스를 필요로 합니다.따라서 정확한 개인 결정은 문장 상하문에 대한 전체적인 정보를 필요로 하고 오류는 오류를 전파할 수 있다.본고는 한 번의 전환을 통해 더 먼 영패 사이의 직접적인 연결을 실현할 수 있는 새로운 전환 시스템arc swift를 제시했다.이것은 해석기가 전환 결정에서 어휘 정보를 더욱 직접적으로 이용할 수 있도록 허용한다.따라서 arc swift는 광속의 사이즈가 매우 작은 상황에서 현저하고 좋은 성능을 실현할 수 있다.Penn Treebank 종속성 분석 작업과 영어 일반 종속성에 기존 변환 시스템의 파서를 사용하는 것과 비교하면 Google 파서는 오류를 3.7~7.6% 감소시켰습니다.', 'tr': '횉altylyk tabanly baglan챌y tans챌ylary흫 k철plen챌 첵erle힊dirim g철챌체rmek 체챌in hereketlere gerek we i힊leri흫 birn채hili attachlere bejermek 체챌in azaltmaly. 힇ahsy kararlary d체zeltmek 체챌in s철zlem konteksti we 첵al흫y힊lyklar barada d체n첵채pli maglumaty gerek. Bu kagyz t채ze bir g철챌체rmek sistemasyny teklip edip, gaty 챌alt, be첵leki g철챌체rmek bilen t채ze da첵lamaklary m체mkin edip bil첵채r. Bu 첵azat챌ylara ge챌i힊ik kararlarynda lektik maglumaty dykkatly etm채ge m체mkin ed첵채r. 힇onu흫 체챌in, Ark-gysga 철r채n ki챌i bir g체첵챌 철l챌체si bilen gowy ukyp biler. Ikinji tarap챌ylarymyz 3.7-7.6% tarapynda bar ge챌i힊i sistemalary Penn Treebank baglan힊ygyny흫 parslamasyny흫 g철revi we I흫lis챌e Halkara ba휓lyklary bilen 첵itir첵채rler.', 'sw': 'Bunge linalotegemea kwa nchi hiyo mara nyingi huhitaji mfululizo wa mabadiliko ya ndani na kupunguza operesheni ili kutengeneza vipengele fulani. Maamuzi sahihi kwa hiyo yanahitaji taarifa za kimataifa kuhusu muktadha wa hukumu na makosa yanasababisha kutangaza kosa. Gazeti hili linapendekeza mfumo wa mpito wa riwaya, arc-haraka, ambalo linawezesha kuunganisha moja kwa moja kati ya alama za moja kwa moja. Hii inaruhusu mchambuzi kutumia taarifa za lexico kwa moja kwa moja katika maamuzi ya mpito. Kwa hiyo, mchoro wa haraka unaweza kupata ufanisi mzuri zaidi kwa ukubwa mdogo wa wimbo. Wabunge wetu wanapunguza makosa kwa asilimia 3.7-7.6 yanahusiana na wale wanaotumia mfumo wa mpito uliopo kwenye Penn Treebank wanategemea kazi ya kuchimba na kutegemea kwa Kiingereza Duniani.', 'sq': 'Analizatorët e varësisë me bazë në tranzicion shpesh kanë nevojë për sekuenca të ndryshimeve lokale dhe reduktojnë operacionet për të prodhuar disa lidhje. Vendimet individuale korrekte kështu kërkojnë informacion global rreth kontekstit të fjalës dhe gabimet shkaktojnë përhapjen e gabimeve. Ky dokument propozon një sistem të ri tranzicioni, ark-të shpejtë, që lejon lidhje të drejtpërdrejta midis tokave më larg nga një tranzicion i vetëm. Kjo lejon analizuesin të përdorë informacionin lexik më drejtpërdrejt në vendimet e tranzicionit. Kështu, arki i shpejtë mund të arrijë performancë më të mirë me një madhësi shumë të vogël dritë. Analizatorët tanë reduktojnë gabimet me 3.7-7.6% në krahasim me ata që përdorin sisteme tranzicionale ekzistuese në detyrën e analizimit të varësisë së Penn Treebank dhe varësitë angleze universale.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት በተመሳሳይ የተደገመ ፓርላር ብዙ ጊዜ የአሁኑን ቦታ መፍጠር ያስፈልጋል እና የአንዳንድ ምርጫዎች ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና የስህተት ግንኙነት ስህተት ምክንያት የስህተት ግንኙነት እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህም ፕሮግራም የአርካ ፈጥኖ የተለወጠውን የዞር ሲስተም ይዘጋጃል፤ በተአምራቶች መካከል በአንድ ክፍል በተለየ ቀጥተኛ ግንኙነት ይችላል፡፡ ይህም ተሳታፊው ለሌክሲካዊ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም በአጠቃላይ በተለያዩ ማስታወቂያው እንዲሰጥ ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም አርካ ፈጥኖ በጣም ትንሽ የበለጠ የብረት መጠን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ፓርላጎቻችን ስህተትን 3.7-7.6 በመቶ በPenn Treebank ላይ የሚጠቀም የፖርቲካ ስርዓት እና እንግሊዘኛ የዩንቨርስቲ ድጋፍ የሚታመሙ ሲሳዮችን ያሳድሳሉ፡፡', 'az': 'Transiciya tabanlı bağımlılıq analizacılarına çox sıralar yerli dəyişiklik seçməsi və bəzi bağlantıları ürəkləmək üçün işləri azaltmaq lazımdır. Bəlkə qərarları düzəlt, buna görə də cümlələr məlumatı və xətaları xəta yayılmasına görə küresel məlumat lazımdır. Bu kağıt yeni bir keçiş sistemini təklif edir ki, bir keçiş ilə möcüzələrin arasındakı düzgün bağlantıları daha uzaqlaşdırır. Bu, analizacının keçiş kararlarında leksik məlumatlarını daha doğrudan istifadə etməsinə imkan verir. Beləliklə, arc-swift çox kiçik bir ulduz ölçüsü ilə çox yaxşı performansı başa çata bilər. Şarzularımız, Penn Treebank bağlılığı işləri ayırmaq və İngilizə Universal Dependenciləri istifadə edənlərə 3.7-7.6%-dən xəta düşürür.', 'bn': 'পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক নির্ভরশীল পার্সার প্রায়শ স্থানীয় পরিবর্তনের প্রয়োজন এবং কিছু সংযুক্ত সংযোগ তৈরি করার জন্য যার ফলে ব্যক্তিগত সিদ্ধান্ত সঠিক সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য বিশ্বব্যাপী তথ্য প্রয়োজন যে এই বাক্যের প্রসঙ্গ এবং ভুল সম এই পত্রিকাটি একটি উপন্যাস পরিবর্তন সিস্টেম, আর্ক-দ্রুত, যা একটি প্রান্ত পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে সরাসরি সংযোগ স্থাপন করতে পারে। This allows the parser to leverage lexical information more directly in transition decisions.  তাই আর্ক-দ্রুত প্রদর্শনের কারণে খুবই সামান্য বীমের আকারের মাধ্যমে ভালো কাজ করতে পারে। আমাদের পার্সারেরা ত্রুটি কমিয়ে দিয়েছে পেন ট্রিবাঙ্কে নির্ভর করে পার্সিং কাজ এবং ইংরেজি বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভর কর্মসূচীর ব্যবহার', 'af': "Oordragsbaseerde afhanklikheidverwerkers het dikwels volgorde van plaaslike skakel nodig en verduur operasies om sekere aanhegsels te produseer. Korrigeer individuele besluitings daarom benodig globale inligting oor die setkonteks en foute veroorsaak fout propagasie. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n nuwe oorgang stelsel, boog- swift, wat direkte aanhegsels tussen tokens verder af skei met 'n enkele oorgang. Hierdie laat die ontwerker toe om leksiese inligting meer direk in oorgang besluitings te verwyder. Daarom kan boog-swift beter prestasie met 'n baie klein trap grootte bereik. Ons verwerkers verduur fout deur 3.7-7.6% relatief tot die wat bestaande oorgang stelsels gebruik word op die Penn Treebank afhanklikheid van verwerking opdrag en Engels Universele afhanklikhede.", 'fa': 'پارچرهای بستگی بر اساس تغییرات اغلب به دستورات تغییر محلی نیاز دارند و عملیات را کاهش دهند تا تولید پیوندهای خاص. تصمیم\u200cهای شخصی را درست کنید، بنابراین اطلاعات جهانی در مورد محیط جمله و اشتباه\u200cها باعث گسترش خطا می\u200cشود. این کاغذ یک سیستم تغییر تازه، سریع و سریع، که اجازه می\u200cدهد ارتباط مستقیم بین نشانه\u200cهایی که با یک تغییر تک فاصله\u200cتر می\u200cباشند، را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. این اجازه می\u200cدهد که برگزیده\u200cکننده اطلاعات زبانی را مستقیماً در تصمیمات تغییر بیشتری تحویل دهد. بنابراین، آرک-سریع می\u200cتواند با اندازه\u200cی بسیار کوچک برق بهتر انجام دهد. بازرسان ما به 3.7-7.6 درصد خطا را کاهش می\u200cدهند نسبت به کسانی که از سیستم\u200cهای تغییرات موجود استفاده می\u200cکنند بر پاکسازی مسئولیت بستگی پن تری بانک و بستگی جهانی انگلیسی استفاده می\u200cکنند.', 'bs': 'Parzeri ovisnosti na prijelazu često trebaju sekvence lokalne smjene i smanjiti operacije kako bi proizveli određene veze. Upravljaju pojedinačne odluke, zato zahtijevaju globalne informacije o kontekstu kazne i greškama uzrokuju propagaciju greška. Ovaj papir predlaže novi prelazni sistem, brz, koji omogućava direktne veze između znakova daleko udaljenih sa jednom prelazom. To omogućava analizatoru da više utiče na leksičke informacije u odluke o prelazu. Stoga, arc-brzina može postići značajno bolje izvedbe sa veoma malim veličinom zraka. Naši parseri smanjuju grešku za 3,7-7,6% u odnosu na one koji koriste postojeće prelazne sisteme na analizu zadatka zavisnosti Penn Treebank-a i univerzalne zavisnosti engleskog jezika.', 'cs': 'Parsery závislostí založené na přechodu často potřebují sekvence místních posunů a omezují operace k vytvoření určitých příloh. Správná individuální rozhodnutí proto vyžadují globální informace o kontextu věty a chyby způsobují šíření chyb. Tento článek navrhuje nový přechodový systém, obloukový rychlý, který umožňuje přímé připojení mezi žetony vzdálenější s jediným přechodem. To umožňuje parser využívat lexikální informace přímo při rozhodování o přechodu. Proto může obloukový pruh dosáhnout výrazně lepšího výkonu při velmi malé velikosti paprsku. Naše parsery snižují chyby o 3.7-7.6% ve srovnání s těmi, které používají existující přechodové systémy na úkolu parsování závislosti Penn Treebank a anglické univerzální závislosti.', 'fi': 'Siirtymäpohjaiset riippuvuuden parserit tarvitsevat usein paikallisvuorojen sekvensseja ja vähentävät toimintoja tiettyjen liitteiden tuottamiseksi. Oikeat yksittäiset päätökset edellyttävät siis maailmanlaajuista tietoa lausekontekstista ja virheet aiheuttavat virheiden leviämistä. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta siirtymäjärjestelmää, arc-swift, joka mahdollistaa suoran liittämisen merkkien välillä kauempana toisistaan yhdellä siirtymällä. Tämän avulla jäsentäjä voi hyödyntää sanastotietoa suoraan siirtymäpäätöksissä. Näin ollen arc-swift voi saavuttaa huomattavasti paremman suorituskyvyn erittäin pienellä sädekokolla. Analysoijamme vähentävät virheitä 3,7–7,6% verrattuna niihin, jotka käyttävät olemassa olevia siirtymäjärjestelmiä Penn Treebankin riippuvuuden jäsentämisessä ja Englannin yleismaailmallisissa riippuvuuksissa.', 'et': 'Üleminekupõhised sõltuvuspartserid vajavad sageli kohalike vahetuste järjestusi ja vähendavad toiminguid teatud manuste loomiseks. Õiged individuaalsed otsused nõuavad seega üldist teavet lause konteksti kohta ja vead põhjustavad vea levikut. Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja uus üleminekusüsteem, arc-swift, mis võimaldab ühe üleminekuga otseselt ühendada märkide vahel kaugemal. See võimaldab parser kasutada leksikaalset teavet otsesemalt ülemineku otsustes. Seega võib kaar-swift saavutada oluliselt parema jõudluse väga väikese tala suurusega. Meie parserid vähendavad vigu 3,7–7,6% võrreldes nendega, kes kasutavad olemasolevaid üleminekusüsteeme Penn Treebanki sõltuvuse parsimise ülesandes ja inglise keeles universaalsed sõltuvused.', 'ca': "Els analitzadors de dependencies basats en la transició sovint necessiten seqüències de canvi local i redueixen les operacions per produir determinats anexos. Les decisions individuals correctes requereixen informació global sobre el context de les frases i els errors provoquen propagació d'errors. Aquest paper proposa un nou sistema de transició, arc-ràpid, que permet els enllaços directs entre fitxes més enllà d'una sola transició. Això permet que l'analitzador aprofiti la informació lècsica més directament en decisions de transició. Hence, arc-swift can achieve significantly better performance with a very small beam size.  Els nostres analitzadors redueixen l'error en un 3,7-7,6% en comparació amb aquells que utilitzen sistemes de transició existents a la tasca d'analitzar la dependencia de Penn Treebank i les Dependencies Universals angleses.", 'hy': 'Transition-based dependency parsers often need sequences of local shift and reduce operations to produce certain attachments.  Այսպիսով, անհատական որոշումները ճիշտ են պահանջում գլոբալ տեղեկատվություն նախադասության կոնտեքստի մասին և սխալները սխալների տարածման պատճառով: Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է նոր հաղորդակցման համակարգ, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս ուղղակի կապեր տախտակների միջև մեկ հաղորդակցման ժամանակ: Սա թույլ է տալիս վերլուծողին ավելի ուղղակի օգտագործել լեքսիկական ինֆորմացիան վերափոխման որոշումներում: Hence, arc-swift can achieve significantly better performance with a very small beam size.  Մեր վերլուծումները նվազեցնում են սխալները 3.7-7.6 տոկոսով, համեմատած նրանց, ովքեր օգտագործում են գոյություն ունեցող վերափոխական համակարգերը Penn Tree Bank-ի կախվածության վերլուծում աշխատանքի և անգլերենի համաշխարհային կախվածություն', 'he': 'מחקרי התלויות המבוססים על העברה זקוקים לעתים קרובות לרצועות של שינוי מקומי ולפחות פעולות כדי לייצר קשרים מסוימים. Correct individual decisions hence require global information about the sentence context and mistakes cause error propagation.  העיתון הזה מציע מערכת מעבר חדשה, מהירה בצד, שמאפשרת קשרים ישירים בין סימנים רחוק יותר בנפרד עם מעבר אחד. זה מאפשר למחקר להשתמש במידע לקסיקלי יותר ישירות בהחלטות מעבר. לכן, קרן-מהיר יכול להשיג ביצועים טובים יותר משמעותיים עם גודל קרן קטן מאוד. המעבדים שלנו מפחידים את הטעות על 3.7-7.6% בהשוואה לאלה שמשתמשים במערכות מעבר קיימות על משימה מעבדת התלויות של פני עץ והתלויות אנגליות.', 'sk': 'Razčlenitelji odvisnosti, ki temeljijo na prehodu, pogosto potrebujejo zaporedja lokalnih premikov in zmanjšujejo operacije za ustvarjanje določenih prilog. Pravilne posamezne odločitve zato zahtevajo globalne informacije o kontekstu stavka, napake pa povzročajo širjenje napak. Ta prispevek predlaga nov prehodni sistem, lok-swift, ki omogoča neposredno pritrditev med žetoni, ki so oddaljeni z enim prehodom. To omogoča razčlenjevalcu, da bolj neposredno izkoristi leksikalne informacije pri odločitvah o prehodu. Zato lahko lok-swift doseže bistveno boljšo zmogljivost z zelo majhno velikostjo žarka. Naši razčlenjevalniki zmanjšajo napake za 3,7-7,6% v primerjavi s tistimi, ki uporabljajo obstoječe prehodne sisteme pri opravilu razčlenjevanja odvisnosti Penn Treebank in angleških univerzalnih odvisnostih.', 'jv': 'shift buddy Awak iki supoyata sistem penting, arka-khir, supoyo iso dianggawe bagian karo token gak bebas karo njujaran maneh. Learn Mode No, no Ngucap', 'bo': 'Transition-based dependency parsers often need a local shift sequence of operations to produce certain attachments. དེར་བརྟེན། མི་སྒེར་གྱི་གདམ་འཆར་བདེ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡུལ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་སྐྱེལ་འདུག འདིས་མིག་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་གཏན་སྐབས་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཁ་གཏན་ཁེལ་ཏུ་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ དེར་བརྟེན། འཁྲུག་རིས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྣེ་འཁོར་གྱི་ཞེང་ཚད་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཉུང་བ་ཡར་སྟོན་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔྱད་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་ནག་ཚང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཟུར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཕར་འཁྲུལ་བ་སྐྱེལ་འདུག', 'ha': "Parser ɗin da aka danne a kan shige da ɗabi'a, ana ƙayyade sauri masu bin shige na lokal kuma ana ƙara aikin don ya sami wasu attafani. Correct individual decisions hence require global information about the sentence context and mistakes cause error propagation.  Wannan takardar ɗin yana bukãtar da wata system ta shige nowaya, arc-farat, wanda zai iya yarda da haɗi masu shiryuwa tsakanin ayuka da suka fi girma da wata shishi guda. Wannan na yarda da Paramer ya ƙoƙara bayani ga masu labari na leksisi ko da bayani guda cikin masu saka. Saboda haka, arc-haraka yana iya sami mai kyãwo da haske mai ƙaranci. Parser na ƙara ɓata da 3.7-7.6% na danganta ga waɗanda suke yin amfani da tsarin transiti masu jira a kan Penn Treebank, yana dõgara ga fassarar parse da kuma masu ƙayyade na Ingiriya Dukkan Ingiriya."}
{'en': 'A Generative Parser with a Discriminative Recognition Algorithm', 'ar': 'محلل توليدي مع خوارزمية تمييز تمييزي', 'pt': 'Um analisador generativo com um algoritmo de reconhecimento discriminativo', 'es': 'Un analizador generativo con un algoritmo de reconocimiento discriminativo', 'fr': "Un analyseur génératif doté d'un algorithme de reconnaissance discriminatoire", 'ja': '識別認識アルゴリズムを備えた生成構文解析器', 'zh': '有判别算法生解析器', 'ru': 'Генеративный парсер с алгоритмом дискриминационного распознавания', 'hi': 'एक भेदभावपूर्ण मान्यता एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ एक उत्पादक पार्सर', 'ga': 'Parsálaí Ginideach le Algartam Aitheantais Idirdhealaitheach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Generatív elemző diszkriminatív felismerési algoritmussal', 'el': 'Ένας γενετικός αναλυτής με αλγόριθμο αναγνώρισης διακρίσεων', 'it': 'Un parser generativo con un algoritmo di riconoscimento discriminatorio', 'lt': 'Generacinis analizatorius su diskriminacinio pripažinimo algoritmu', 'kk': 'Дискриминалды анықтау алгоритмі бар жалпы талдаушы', 'mk': 'Генеративен анализатор со алгоритм за дискриминативно признавање', 'mt': 'A Generative Parser with a Discriminative Recognition Algorithm', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം കൊണ്ട് ഒരു ജനററിവ് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Бүтээлч хүүхдүүдийн шинжлэх ухааны алгоритм', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Parser generacyjny z algorytmem rozpoznawania dyskryminacyjnego', 'ro': 'Un parser generativ cu un algoritm de recunoaștere discriminatorie', 'sr': 'Generativni roditelj sa diskriminativnim algoritmom priznanja', 'sv': 'En generativ tolkning med en diskriminerande igenkänningsalgoritm', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Jardiiska aqoonsiga takoorka', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Phát ngôn viên chính gốc với Algíđếm giảm tội phạm', 'nl': 'Een generatieve parser met een discriminerend herkenningsalgorithm', 'hr': 'Generativni roditelj sa diskriminativnim algoritmom priznanja', 'bg': 'Генеративен анализ с дискриминационен алгоритъм за разпознаване', 'da': 'En genererende fortolker med en diskriminerende anerkendelsesalgoritm', 'de': 'Ein generativer Parser mit einem diskriminierenden Erkennungsalgorithmus', 'id': 'A Generative Parser with a Discriminative Recognition Algorithm', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '판별 식별 알고리즘을 갖춘 생성식 해상도', 'sw': 'Mbunge wa Kizalendo wenye Algorithi ya Kutambua Ubaguzi', 'tr': 'Diskriminden tanyş Algoritmi bilen döredik atasy', 'sq': 'Një analizues gjenerativ me një algoritëm njohjeje diskriminuese', 'hy': 'Գեներատիվ վերլուծողը, որն ունի խտրականության ճանաչության ալգորիթմ', 'af': "'n Genereerde verwerker met 'n diskriminieerde herken algoritme", 'bn': 'একটি বৈষম্যিক পরিচিতি অ্যালগরিদমের সাথে জেনারেটিভ পার্সার', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Diskriminat Tanıdırma Algoritimi olan Generatlı Üzeri', 'bs': 'Generativni roditelj sa diskriminativnim algoritmom priznanja', 'ca': 'Un analitzador generatiu amb algoritme de reconeixement discriminatiu', 'cs': 'Generační parser s algoritmem diskriminačního rozpoznávání', 'et': 'Generatiivne parser diskrimineeriva tuvastamise algoritmiga', 'fi': 'Generatiivinen jäsennys, jossa on syrjivä tunnistusalgoritmi', 'jv': 'Algorithm', 'he': 'מעבד גנרטיבי עם אלגוריתם זיהוי דיסקרמינציבי', 'sk': 'Generativni razčlenjevalec z diskriminativnim algoritmom prepoznavanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་འབྱུང་བ་དང་བྱ་རྟགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་རྩིས་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Generative models defining joint distributions over parse trees and sentences are useful for parsing and language modeling, but impose restrictions on the scope of features and are often outperformed by discriminative models. We propose a framework for parsing and language modeling which marries a generative model with a discriminative recognition model in an encoder-decoder setting. We provide interpretations of the framework based on expectation maximization and variational inference, and show that it enables parsing and language modeling within a single implementation. On the English Penn Treen-bank, our framework obtains competitive performance on constituency parsing while matching the state-of-the-art single-model language modeling score.', 'es': 'Los modelos generativos que definen distribuciones conjuntas sobre árboles de análisis y oraciones son útiles para el análisis y el modelado del lenguaje, pero imponen restricciones en el alcance de las características y, a menudo, son superados por los modelos discriminativos. Proponemos un marco para el análisis y el modelado del lenguaje que combina un modelo generativo con un modelo de reconocimiento discriminativo en un entorno de codificador-decodificador. Proporcionamos interpretaciones del marco basadas en la maximización de expectativas y la inferencia variacional, y demostramos que permite el análisis y el modelado del lenguaje en una sola implementación. En el Penn Treen-Bank inglés, nuestro marco obtiene un rendimiento competitivo en el análisis de distritos electorales al tiempo que iguala la puntuación de modelado lingüístico de modelo único de última generación.', 'pt': 'Modelos generativos que definem distribuições conjuntas sobre árvores de análise sintática e sentenças são úteis para análise e modelagem de linguagem, mas impõem restrições no escopo de recursos e geralmente são superados por modelos discriminativos. Propomos um framework para análise sintática e modelagem de linguagem que casa um modelo generativo com um modelo de reconhecimento discriminativo em um ambiente codificador-decodificador. Fornecemos interpretações da estrutura com base na maximização de expectativas e inferência variacional e mostramos que ela permite análise e modelagem de linguagem em uma única implementação. No banco inglês Penn Treen, nossa estrutura obtém desempenho competitivo na análise de grupos constituintes, ao mesmo tempo em que corresponde à pontuação de modelagem de linguagem de modelo único de última geração.', 'ar': 'النماذج التوليدية التي تحدد التوزيعات المشتركة على أشجار وجمل التحليل مفيدة في التحليل ونمذجة اللغة ، ولكنها تفرض قيودًا على نطاق الميزات وغالبًا ما تتفوق عليها النماذج التمييزية. نقترح إطارًا للتحليل ونمذجة اللغة يتزوج نموذجًا توليديًا بنموذج تمييز تمييزي في إعداد وحدة فك التشفير. نحن نقدم تفسيرات لإطار العمل بناءً على تعظيم التوقعات والاستدلال المتغير ، ونبين أنه يتيح التحليل ونمذجة اللغة ضمن تنفيذ واحد. في بنك بن ترين الإنجليزي ، يحصل إطار العمل الخاص بنا على أداء تنافسي في تحليل الدوائر الانتخابية مع مطابقة درجة نمذجة اللغة ذات النموذج الفردي الحديث.', 'fr': "Les modèles génératifs définissant des distributions conjointes sur des arbres d'analyse et des phrases sont utiles pour l'analyse et la modélisation du langage, mais imposent des restrictions sur la portée des fonctionnalités et sont souvent surpassés par les modèles discriminants. Nous proposons un cadre pour l'analyse et la modélisation du langage qui associe un modèle génératif à un modèle de reconnaissance discriminative dans un environnement encodeur-décodeur. Nous fournissons des interprétations du framework basées sur la maximisation des attentes et l'inférence variationnelle, et montrons qu'il permet l'analyse et la modélisation du langage au sein d'une seule implémentation. Sur l'English Penn Treen-bank, notre framework obtient des performances compétitives sur l'analyse des circonscriptions tout en égalant le score de modélisation de langage à modèle unique de pointe.", 'ja': '構文解析ツリーと文の間の共同分布を定義する生成モデルは、構文解析と言語モデリングに有用であるが、特徴の範囲に制限を課し、しばしば識別モデルによって凌駕される。生成モデルをエンコーダ-デコーダ設定の識別認識モデルと結合する構文解析と言語モデリングのためのフレームワークを提案します。私たちは、期待最大化と変動推論に基づいたフレームワークの解釈を提供し、それが単一の実装内で構文解析と言語モデリングを可能にすることを示します。英語のPenn Treen - bankでは、当社のフレームワークは、最先端の単一モデル言語モデリングスコアと一致しながら、選挙区解析における競争力のあるパフォーマンスを獲得します。', 'zh': '解析树句定义合布者,有用于解析言建模,而限以特征,常优于判模。 发解析言建模之框架,框架将生成模与编码器 - 解码器设中判别相合。 吾以期最大化变分理框架之说,明其可以成解析言建模。 英语 Penn Treen-bank 之上,吾框架得竞争力于汉解析,而与先进之单模言建模分数相匹。', 'hi': 'पार्स पेड़ों और वाक्यों पर संयुक्त वितरण को परिभाषित करने वाले उत्पादक मॉडल पार्सिंग और भाषा मॉडलिंग के लिए उपयोगी होते हैं, लेकिन सुविधाओं के दायरे पर प्रतिबंध लगाते हैं और अक्सर भेदभावपूर्ण मॉडल द्वारा बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया जाता है। हम पार्सिंग और भाषा मॉडलिंग के लिए एक रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर सेटिंग में भेदभावपूर्ण मान्यता मॉडल के साथ एक उत्पादक मॉडल से शादी करता है। हम अपेक्षा अधिकतमकरण और परिवर्तनीय अनुमान के आधार पर ढांचे की व्याख्याएं प्रदान करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह एक ही कार्यान्वयन के भीतर पार्सिंग और भाषा मॉडलिंग को सक्षम बनाता है। अंग्रेजी पेन ट्रीन-बैंक पर, हमारा ढांचा राज्य के अत्याधुनिक एकल-मॉडल भाषा मॉडलिंग स्कोर से मेल खाते हुए निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Генеративные модели, определяющие совместные распределения по деревьям синтаксического анализа и предложениям, полезны для синтаксического анализа и языкового моделирования, но накладывают ограничения на объем признаков и часто превосходят дискриминационные модели. Мы предлагаем фреймворк для синтаксического анализа и языкового моделирования, который объединяет генеративную модель с моделью распознавания дискриминации в настройках кодировщик-декодер. Мы предоставляем интерпретации фреймворка, основанные на максимизации ожиданий и вариационном выводе, и показываем, что он позволяет синтаксический анализ и языковое моделирование в рамках одной реализации. В английском банке Penn Treen наш фреймворк обеспечивает конкурентоспособную производительность при синтаксическом анализе избирательных округов, в то же время сопоставляя новейший показатель моделирования одномодельного языка.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha giniúna a shainíonn comhdháiltí thar chrainn pharsála agus abairtí úsáideach le haghaidh parsála agus samhaltú teanga, ach cuireann siad srianta ar raon feidhme na ngnéithe agus is minic a sháraíonn samhlacha idirdhealaitheacha iad. Molaimid creat do pharsáil agus do shamhaltú teanga a nascann samhail ghiniúna le samhail aitheantais idirdhealaitheach i suíomh ionchódóra-díchódóra. Soláthraímid léirmhínithe ar an gcreat bunaithe ar uasmhéadú ionchas agus ar thátal éagsúlachta, agus léirímid go gcumasaíonn sé parsáil agus samhaltú teanga laistigh d’fheidhmiú amháin. Ar an English Penn Treen-bank, éiríonn lenár gcreat feidhmíocht iomaíoch ar pharsáil dáilcheantair agus é ag teacht leis an scór samhaltaithe teanga aonteangach is nua-aimseartha.', 'hu': 'Az elemzési fák és mondatok közös eloszlásait definiáló generációs modellek hasznosak az elemzéshez és a nyelvi modellezéshez, de korlátozzák a funkciók körét, és gyakran megkülönböztető modellek túlteljesítik őket. Olyan elemzési és nyelvmodellezési keretrendszert javasolunk, amely egy generációs modellt és egy diszkriminatív felismerési modellt ötvöz egy kódoló-dekóder beállításban. Az elvárások maximalizálásán és variációs következtetésen alapuló keretrendszer értelmezését biztosítjuk, és megmutatjuk, hogy lehetővé teszi az elemzést és a nyelvmodellezést egyetlen implementáción belül. Az angol Penn Treen-bankon keretrendszerünk versenyképes teljesítményt ér el a választókerületi elemzésben, miközben megfelel a legkorszerűbb egymodell nyelvmodellezési pontszámnak.', 'el': 'Τα γενόσημα μοντέλα που καθορίζουν κοινές διανομές σε δέντρα ανάλυσης και προτάσεις είναι χρήσιμα για ανάλυση και μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών, αλλά επιβάλλουν περιορισμούς στο πεδίο των χαρακτηριστικών και συχνά ξεπερνούν τα διακριτικά μοντέλα. Προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο ανάλυσης και γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης που συνδυάζει ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο με ένα διακριτικό μοντέλο αναγνώρισης σε μια ρύθμιση κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή. Παρέχουμε ερμηνείες του πλαισίου με βάση τη μεγιστοποίηση προσδοκιών και την συναγωγή παραλλαγών, και δείχνουμε ότι επιτρέπει την ανάλυση και τη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών μέσα σε μια ενιαία εφαρμογή. Στην αγγλική τράπεζα Penn Treen, το πλαίσιο μας επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις στην ανάλυση εκλογικών περιφερειών, ενώ ταιριάζει με την υπερσύγχρονη βαθμολογία μοντελοποίησης γλώσσας ενός μοντέλου.', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრებული მოდელები, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებულია ერთადერთი განსაზღვრებულებები პარასის ხელებზე და სიტყვების მოდელეციისთვის გამოყენებელია, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებულებების განსაზღვრებულებაში და დისკრიმინა ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ფრამეტრის პარასირება და ენის მოდელირება, რომელიც დისკრიმინატიური მოდელის განაცნობის მოდელისთვის, რომელიც კოდერირების განაცნობის მოდელისთვის გადამყ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ პარამეტრების ინტერპუქციები მაქსიმიზაცია და განსაზღვრებული ინფრენციაზე, და ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ, რომ ის შეუძლია პარალიზაცია და ენის მოდელიზაცია ერთი განსაზღვრე ანგლისური პენ ტრინის ბანკში ჩვენი ფრამეტრი იღება კონკრენტებური გამოყენება კონსტიუტებური პანსტიუტების პანსტირებისთვის, როცა ერთმანეთის მოდელური მოდელური მოდე', 'it': "I modelli generativi che definiscono distribuzioni congiunte su alberi di analisi e frasi sono utili per l'analisi e la modellazione del linguaggio, ma impongono restrizioni all'ambito delle funzionalità e sono spesso superati da modelli discriminatori. Proponiamo un framework per l'analisi e la modellazione del linguaggio che sposa un modello generativo con un modello di riconoscimento discriminatorio in un'impostazione encoder-decoder. Forniamo interpretazioni del framework basate sulla massimizzazione delle aspettative e inferenza variazionale, e mostriamo che consente l'analisi e la modellazione del linguaggio all'interno di una singola implementazione. Sulla Penn Treen-bank inglese, il nostro framework ottiene prestazioni competitive sul parsing delle circoscrizioni mentre corrisponde al punteggio di modellazione linguistica single-model all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Жалпы үлгілерді талдау ағаштар мен сөйлемелерді талдау мен тілдерді моделдеу үшін пайдалы болады, бірақ мүмкіндіктердің масштабының шектеулерін шектеп, көбінде дискриминациялық үлгілерден шығарылады. Біз тіл моделін талдау және талдау үшін қолданып тастаймыз. Бұл кодер декодер баптауында дискриминациялық анықтау үлгісімен жасалған үлгісімен үйлестіріп тұрады. Біз бағдарламасының күтпеген максималдық және айнымалылық түрлендірімізге негізделген түрлендірімізді береміз. Бұл бір істеу үшін талдау және тіл модельдірімізді мүм Ағылшын тілінің Penn Treen-банкында, біздің бағыттамыз бір үлгі тілді моделлеу нәтижесіне сәйкес келетін меңзерлерді талдау үшін конкуренциялық істемізді алады.', 'lt': 'Generaciniai modeliai, apibrėžiantys bendrą paskirstymą apdorojamiems medžiams ir sakiniams, yra naudingi analizuojant ir modeliuojant kalbas, tačiau apriboja savybių aprėptį ir dažnai viršija diskriminacinius modelius. Siūlome analizavimo ir kalbų modeliavimo sistemą, kuri veda kartinį model į su diskriminaciniu pripažinimo modeliu kodavimo ir kodavimo sistemoje. Pateikiame sistemos aiškinimus, pagrįstus lūkesčių maksimaliavimu ir įvairiomis išvadomis, ir parodome, kad ji leidžia analizuoti ir modeliuoti kalbas vienu metu. On the English Penn Treen-bank, our framework obtains competitive performance on constituency parsing while matching the state-of-the-art single-model language modeling score.', 'ms': 'Model generatif yang menentukan distribusi kongsi di atas pepohon hurai dan kalimat berguna untuk hurai dan modelkan bahasa, tetapi memaksa keterangan pada skop ciri-ciri dan sering dilakukan oleh model diskriminatif. Kami melamar kerangka untuk hurai dan pemodelan bahasa yang berkahwin dengan model generatif dengan model pengenalan diskriminatif dalam tetapan pengekod. Kami menyediakan interpretasi kerangka berdasarkan maksimum jangkaan dan kesimpulan variasi, dan menunjukkan bahawa ia membolehkan penghuraian dan pemodelan bahasa dalam satu pelaksanaan. On the English Penn Treen-bank, our framework obtains competitive performance on constituency parsing while matching the state-of-the-art single-model language modeling score.', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും മീതെ യൂണ്ട് വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ജനറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ്ങിനും ഉപയ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ്ങിനും വേണ്ടി ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയിക്ക് നാം പ്രൊജക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഒരു ജനററിവ് മോഡല്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെയും വലുതാക്കുന്നതിനെയും അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പെന്\u200d ട്രീന്\u200d -ബാങ്കില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമോര്\u200dക്ക് സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടിസ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d മത്സരിക്കുന്ന പ്രദര്\u200dശനം ലഭിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ġenerattivi li jiddefinixxu d-distribuzzjonijiet konġunti fuq siġar tal-analiżi u sentenzi huma utli għall-analiżi u l-immudellar tal-lingwi, iżda jimponu restrizzjonijiet fuq l-ambitu tal-karatteristiċi u spiss jitwettqu minn mudelli diskriminatorji. Aħna nipproponu qafas għall-analiżi u l-immudellar tal-lingwi li jiżżewġu ma’ mudell ġenerattiv b’mudell ta’ rikonoxximent diskriminatorju f’ambjent ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder. Aħna nipprovdu interpretazzjonijiet tal-qafas ibbażati fuq il-massimizzazzjoni tal-aspettattivi u l-inferenza varjazzjonali, u nuru li dan jippermetti l-analiżi u l-mudell lingwistiku fi ħdan implimentazzjoni waħda. Fil-bank Ingliż tal-Penn Treen, il-qafas tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva fl-analiżi tal-kostitwenzi filwaqt li jqabbel il-punteġġ tal-mudell tal-lingwi l-aktar avvanzat.', 'mk': 'Генеративните модели кои дефинираат заеднички дистрибуции над дрвјата за анализирање и речениците се корисни за анализирање и јазичното моделирање, но наметнуваат ограничувања на опфатот на карактеристиките и честопати се надминати од дискриминати Предложуваме рамка за анализирање и моделирање на јазици која се венча со генеративен модел со дискриминативен модел за признавање во поставување кодер-декодер. Ние обезбедуваме интерпретации на рамката базирана на максимизација на очекувањата и варијационална конференција, и покажуваме дека овозможува анализирање и моделирање на јазиците во рамките на една спроведување. На англиската банка Пен Трен, нашата рамка добива конкурентна резултат во анализирањето на изборните окрузи додека се совпаѓа со најсовремениот резултат за моделирање на јазикот на еден модел.', 'no': 'Genererte modeller som definerer kople distribusjonar over tolkingstemmer og setningar er nyttig for tolking og språk- modellering, men imposerer avgrensingar på området av funksjonar og ofte vert utført av diskriminasjonske modeller. Vi foreslår eit rammeverk for tolking og språk- modellering som møtar med ein generelt modell med ein diskriminasjonsmodul for gjenkjenning i eit koderinnstilling. Vi tilbyr tolkingar av rammeverket basert på forventa maksimering og variasjonal infeksjon, og viser at han kan tolka og språk modellera inne ein enkelt implementasjon. På den engelske Penn Treen-banken får rammeverket vårt konkurentivt utføring ved tolking av konstitusjonar medan det passar med den enkelte modelleringspoeng for enkelte språk i kunsten.', 'mn': 'Бүтээлтийн загварууд мод болон өгүүлбэрүүдийг хуваалцах болон хэл загварын загварыг тодорхойлох нь хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ харилцааны талаар хязгаарлалтыг тавьж, ихэвчлэн хуваалцах загварууд ашигладаг. Бид хэл загварын хуваалцах болон загварын моделийг санал дэвшүүлдэг. Энэ нь бүтээлч загвартай хоорондоо ялгаагүй хүлээн зөвшөөрөх загвартай. Бид хүлээн зөвхөн олон төрлийн инфекцийн үндсэн хэлбэрийн тухай илтгэл гаргаж, нэг үйлдвэрлэлийн дотор хуваалцах болон хэл загварчлах боломж олгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Англи хэлний Пенс Treeн-банк дээр бидний хөрөнгө оруулалтын хуваалцааны өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагаа гаргадаг. Урлагийн нэг загварын загварын модель хэлний хэлбэртэй тэнцүү.', 'pl': 'Modele generacyjne definiujące wspólne rozkłady nad drzewami parsowania i zdaniami są przydatne do parsowania i modelowania językowego, ale nakładają ograniczenia w zakresie funkcji i często są przewyższone przez modele dyskryminacyjne. Proponujemy framework parsowania i modelowania językowego, który łączy model generatywny z modelem rozpoznawania dyskryminacyjnego w ustawieniu kodera-dekodera. Zapewniamy interpretacje frameworku oparte na maksymalizacji oczekiwań i wnioskach wariancyjnych oraz pokazujemy, że umożliwia parsowanie i modelowanie językowe w ramach jednej implementacji. W angielskim Penn Treen-banku nasz framework uzyskuje konkurencyjną wydajność w analizie okręgów wyborczych, jednocześnie dopasowując najnowocześniejszy wynik modelowania języka pojedynczego modelu.', 'ro': 'Modelele generative care definesc distribuțiile comune peste arbori de parsare și propoziții sunt utile pentru analizare și modelarea limbajului, dar impun restricții asupra domeniului de aplicare a caracteristicilor și sunt adesea depășite de modele discriminatorii. Propunem un cadru de analizare și modelare a limbajului care combină un model generativ cu un model de recunoaștere discriminatorie într-o setare codificator-decodor. Oferim interpretări ale cadrului bazate pe maximizarea așteptărilor și inferența variațională și arătăm că acesta permite analizarea și modelarea limbajului într-o singură implementare. Pe banca engleză Penn Treen, cadrul nostru obține performanță competitivă în analizarea circumscripției electorale în timp ce corespunde scorului de modelare lingvistică de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Generativni modeli koji definiraju zajedničke raspodjele za analizu drveća i rečenica su korisni za analizu i modelizaciju jezika, ali nameću ograničenja na oblast opsega karakteristika i često se izvršavaju diskriminacijskim modelima. Predlažemo okvir za analizu i modeliranje jezika koji se udaje za generativni model sa diskriminacijskim modelom priznanja u postavku kodera. Mi pružamo interpretacije okvira na osnovu maksimalizacije očekivanja i variacionalne infekcije i pokazujemo da omogućava analizu i modelizaciju jezika u jednoj implementaciji. Na engleskoj Penn Treen-banki, naš okvir dobija konkurentnu predstavu za analizu predstava dok odgovara rezultatu modeliranja jednomodelnog jezika države umjetnosti.', 'si': 'නිර්මාණ විශේෂණය සහ වාක්ෂා වර්ගය සහ භාෂා මොඩේලන් විශේෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපි පරීක්ෂණය සහ භාෂා මෝඩිල් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තිය අපි බලාපොරොත්තු විශාලය සහ විශාලය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සහ භාෂාව මොඩල් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන්න. ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පෙන් ට්\u200dරීන් බැන්ක් වල, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනව', 'so': 'Tusaale farshaxan oo ku qoran qaybsiga wadajirka ah oo ku qoran geedaha kaniisadda iyo imtixaanka waxey faa’iido u leedahay tusaale ahaan baaritaanka iyo qoraalka luuqada, laakiin waxay saaraan xaduudo ka saaran qaabilaada qalabka, sida badan waxaa lagu sameeyaa tusaale takoorista. Waxaan horumarinaynaa qoraal ku qoran baaritaanka iyo tusaale ahaan luuqada, kaas oo guursada tusaale abuurid ah oo ku qoran model aqoonsashada takoorista. Waxaan turjumaa turjubaanka nidaamka oo ku saleysan rajada aad u kordhisan karto iyo cudurka kala duwan, waxaana muujinaynaa in lagu sameynayo hal qaab keliya. Bankiga Ingiriiska Penn Treen-bankiga waxaa sameynaya firaaqadeena ku saabsan jardiinada baaritaanka guud ee ku saabsan qoraalka qoraalka oo kaliga ah.', 'sv': 'Generativa modeller som definierar gemensamma distributioner över parseträd och meningar är användbara för tolkning och språkmodellering, men ålägger begränsningar för omfattningen av funktioner och ofta överträffas av diskriminerande modeller. Vi föreslår ett ramverk för tolkning och språkmodellering som förenar en generativ modell med en diskriminerande igenkänningsmodell i en encoder-dekoder inställning. Vi ger tolkningar av ramverket baserat på förväntningsmarginering och variationsinferens, och visar att det möjliggör tolkning och språkmodellering inom en enda implementering. På den engelska Penn Treen-banken uppnår vårt ramverk konkurrenskraftigt resultat på valkretstolkning samtidigt som vi matchar den senaste modellen språkmodellering score.', 'ta': 'பார்ஸ் மரங்கள் மற்றும் வாக்குகள் மேல் இணைய பங்கீட்டை விவரிக்கும் பொதுவான மாதிரிகள் பாடல் மற்றும் மொழி மாதிரியை மாற்றுவதற்கு பயனுள்ளது, ஆனால் க நாங்கள் பாடல் மற்றும் மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையில் ஒரு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரியை திருமணம் செய்து ஒர எதிர்பார்ப்பு பெரிதாக்குதல் மற்றும் மாறுபாடு தோல்வியை அடிப்படையில் சட்டத்தின் விளக்கங்களை நாம் வழங்குகிறோம், அது ஒரே  ஆங்கிலத்தில் பென் ட்ரீன் பாங்கில், எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் தேவையான செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது மாதிரி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி முடிவு ப', 'ur': 'پیرس درختوں اور جماعتوں کے ذریعے جوڑے تقسیم کرنے والے موڈلے پارس اور زبان موڈلینگ کے لئے فائدہ ہیں، لیکن فکرات کے اندازے محدودیت رکھتے ہیں اور اغلب مختلف موڈلے سے کام لیتے ہیں. ہم ایک فرمود پیش کریں گے کہ پارس اور زبان موڈلینگ کے لئے جنرائیٹ موڈل سے نکاح کرے جو ایک کوڈر ڈکوڈر ڈیکوڈر ڈیکوڈر کے ذریعے بغیر تفریح پہچان کرنے والی موڈل کے ساتھ۔ ہم فرمود کی تعبیریں دیتے ہیں جو انتظار کی maximization اور متفاوت کثیر کثیر کثیر کے ذریعے بنیاد رکھتی ہیں، اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ایک عملومات میں پارس اور زبان کی مدل کرنے کی امکان دیتا ہے. انگلیسی پن تری ٹرین بانک میں، ہمارے فرمود ایک مدل زبان موڈلینگ اسکور کے ساتھ مطابق قائم ہونے کے لئے مطابق قائم ہوتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Tạo ra các mẫu phân chia chung trên cây cha xứ và câu truyện rất có ích cho việc phân tách và tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, nhưng giới hạn phạm vi các đặc điểm và thường bị hạn chế bởi các mô hình độc lập. Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở phân tích và mô hình ngôn ngữ, nó sẽ kết hợp với một mô hình tạo hóa có mô hình nhận dạng phân biệt trong bộ mã hóa. Chúng tôi cung cấp các giải pháp dựa trên khả năng đạt tối đa mong đợi và ngụ ý khác nhau, và cho thấy nó cho phép phân tích và tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ trong một ứng dụng duy nhất. Trên kênh Anh Penn Treen-Bank, chúng ta có kinh nghiệm cạnh tranh trong các phân tích bầu cử, trong khi vừa khớp với điểm tượng mẫu ngôn ngữ trang hiện đại nhất.', 'uz': "Name We propose a framework for parsing and language modeling which marries a generative model with a discriminative recognition model in an encoder-decoder setting.  Biz freymning orzularini ko'paytirish va o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish asosida qo'llab beramiz, va bu bir amalga oshirishda o'zgartirish va tilni modellash imkoniyatini koʻrsatish mumkin. Ingliz tilidagi Penn Treen-bangida, bizning freymlarimiz quyidagi bir-kuni model modeli xizmatga mos kelayotganda, қонунлик парламент аъзоларининг rivojlanishini qabul qiladi.", 'nl': 'Generatieve modellen die gezamenlijke verdelingen definiëren over parse bomen en zinnen zijn nuttig voor parsing en taalmodellering, maar leggen beperkingen op aan de reikwijdte van functies en worden vaak beter uitgevoerd door discriminatieve modellen. We stellen een framework voor parsing en taalmodellering voor dat een generatief model combineert met een discriminatief herkenningsmodel in een encoder-decoder instelling. We bieden interpretaties van het framework op basis van verwachtingsmaximalisatie en variatiele inferentie, en laten zien dat het parsen en taalmodellering mogelijk maakt binnen één enkele implementatie. Op de Engelse Penn Treen-bank verkrijgt ons framework concurrerende prestaties op het gebied van kiesdistrict parsing terwijl het overeenkomt met de state-of-the-art single-model taalmodelleringsscore.', 'hr': 'Generativni modeli koji definiraju zajedničke raspodjele za analizu drveća i rečenica koriste su za analizu i modeliranje jezika, ali nameću ograničenja na oblast opsega karakteristika i često se nadmađuju diskriminacijskim modelima. Predlažemo okvir za analizu i modeliranje jezika koji se udaje za generativni model sa diskriminacijskim modelom priznanja u postavljanju kodera. Mi pružamo interpretacije okvira na temelju maksimalizacije očekivanja i variacionalne infekcije i pokazujemo da omogućava analiziranje i modelizaciju jezika unutar jednog provedbe. Na engleskoj Penn Treen-banki, naš okvir dobija konkurentne učinke u analiziranju predstava dok odgovara rezultatu modeliranja jednomodelnog jezika države umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Generative Modelle, die gemeinsame Verteilungen über Parse-Bäume und Sätze definieren, sind nützlich für Parsen und Sprachmodellierung, setzen jedoch Einschränkungen in den Umfang der Features ein und werden oft von diskriminierenden Modellen übertroffen. Wir schlagen ein Framework für Parsing und Sprachmodellierung vor, das ein generatives Modell mit einem diskriminierenden Erkennungsmodell in einer Encoder-Decoder-Einstellung verbindet. Wir liefern Interpretationen des Frameworks basierend auf Erwartungsmaximierung und Variationsinterferenz und zeigen, dass es Parsing und Sprachmodellierung innerhalb einer einzigen Implementierung ermöglicht. Auf der englischen Penn Treen-Bank erzielt unser Framework eine wettbewerbsfähige Leistung bei der Parsing-Analyse von Wahlkreisen und gleicht gleichzeitig dem State-of-the-Art Single-Model Language Modeling Score ab.', 'da': 'Generative modeller, der definerer fælles fordelinger over parsetræer og sætninger, er nyttige til parsing og sprogmodellering, men pålægger begrænsninger på omfanget af funktioner og er ofte udført af diskriminerende modeller. Vi foreslår en ramme for parsing og sprogmodellering, der forener en generativ model med en diskriminerende genkendelsesmodel i en encoder-dekoder indstilling. Vi tilbyder fortolkninger af rammerne baseret på forventningsmaksimering og variationsmæssig inferens, og viser, at det muliggør parsing og sprogmodellering inden for en enkelt implementering. På den engelske Penn Treen-bank opnår vores framework konkurrencedygtig præstation på valgkreds parsing, samtidig med at vi matcher den avancerede single-model sprogmodellering score.', 'ko': '해석 트리와 문장에 연합 분포를 정의하는 생성 모델은 해석과 언어 모델링에 유용하지만 특징의 범위에 제한을 주고 구분 모델보다 우수하다.우리는 문법 분석과 언어 모델링의 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 코딩 환경에서의 생성 모델과 감별 식별 모델을 결합시킨다.우리는 기대의 최대화와 변분 추리를 바탕으로 하는 구조적 해석을 제공했고, 단일 실현에서 해석과 언어 모델링을 실현할 수 있음을 나타냈다.영어 Penn Treen bank에서 우리의 프레임워크는 선택 영역 해석에 있어 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻었고 가장 선진적인 단일 모델 언어 모델링 점수와 일치한다.', 'bg': 'Генеративните модели, определящи съвместни разпределения върху анализиращи дървета и изречения, са полезни за анализиране и езиково моделиране, но налагат ограничения върху обхвата на функциите и често са надминати от дискриминационните модели. Предлагаме рамка за анализ и езиково моделиране, която съчетава генеративен модел с дискриминативен модел за разпознаване в настройка на кодер-декодер. Предоставяме интерпретации на рамката въз основа на максимизиране на очакванията и вариационно заключение и показваме, че тя позволява анализиране и езиково моделиране в рамките на една имплементация. На английската банка Пен Трейн нашата рамка постига конкурентни резултати при анализирането на избирателните райони, като същевременно съвпада с най-съвременния резултат за езиково моделиране на единичен модел.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای نسل\u200cآفرینی که توزیع\u200cهای مشترک در درخت\u200cها و جمله\u200cها را تعریف می\u200cکنند، برای بررسی و مدل\u200cسازی زبانها مفید است، ولی محدودیت\u200cها را روی محدودیت ویژه\u200cها قرار می\u200cدهند و اغلب توسط مدل\u200cهای جدایی انجام می\u200cده ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب برای بررسی و مدل\u200cسازی زبان که با یک مدل ژنترافی با یک مدل شناسایی جدا و جدا در یک تنظیم\u200cسازی\u200cهای کوډر\u200cسازی ازدواج می\u200cکند. ما تعبیر چهارچوب را بر اساس انتظار maximization و inference متفاوتی می\u200cدهیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن توان تولید کردن و نمونه\u200cسازی زبان را در یک عملکرد تنها انجام دهد. در بانک پن ترین انگلیسی، چهارچوب ما اجرای مسابقه\u200cای را دریافت می\u200cکند در حالی که با نمونه\u200cهای نمونه\u200cسازی زبان\u200cهای یک مدل هنر مسابقه می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kizalendo unaoelezea usambazaji wa pamoja katika miti ya bunge na hukumu zinafaa kwa ajili ya wimbo wa wimbo na mtindo wa lugha, lakini wanaweka vizuizi kwa kiwango cha tabia na mara nyingi huendeshwa na mifano ya ubaguzi. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa wimbo wa wimbo na mifano ya lugha ambayo inaoa muundo wa kizazi na modeli ya kutambua ubaguzi katika mazingira ya kodi. Tunatoa tafsiri za mfumo huo kwa sababu ya matumaini ya kuongezeka na maambukizi mabadiliko, na kuonyesha kuwa inawezesha kuimba na mifano ya lugha ndani ya utekelezaji mmoja. Kwenye Benki ya Penn Treen ya Kiingereza, mifumo yetu inapata ufanisi wa ushindani wa kugombea uchaguzi wa bunge wakati akilinganisha vipindi vya lugha ya moja-ya-sanaa.', 'tr': 'Tary힊dyrma aga챌lary we s철zleri흫 arasynda bir b철l체m d철redijilik nusgalary ahtarma we dil modellendirmesi 체챌in faydaly d철re첵채r, 첵철ne 철zellikleri흫 howpsuzynda 챌yky힊lar we k철plen챌 diskrimin modelleri tarapyndan 챌ykaryl첵ar. Biz k철dleme ta첵첵arlamasy we dil modlemesi 체챌in bir 챌er챌ew teklip edip g철r첵채ris. Bu k철dleme ta첵첵arlamasy 체챌in d철redir. Biz 챌er채d채ni흫 maksimal we 체첵tge힊ik hasaplamasyna dayanan 챌yky힊laryny temin edip, we ol bir implementasi첵ada hat we dil modellendirmegine m체mkin edip bil첵채ndigini g철rkez. I흫lis챌e Penn Treen-bankda bizi흫 챌er첵채miz konstitucion 챌yky힊yny흫 첵eke sanat dili modelle첵채n merkezi bilen du힊u힊yk gazan첵ar.', 'id': 'Model generatif yang mendefinisikan distribusi kongsi di atas pohon analisis dan kalimat berguna untuk analisis dan model bahasa, tetapi memaksa batasan pada jangkauan fitur dan sering dilakukan oleh model diskriminatif. Kami mengusulkan cadangan untuk menghurai dan model bahasa yang menikah dengan model generatif dengan model pengenalan diskriminatif dalam setting encoder-decoder. Kami menyediakan interpretasi dari kerangka berdasarkan maksimalisasi harapan dan kesimpulan variasi, dan menunjukkan bahwa itu memungkinkan penghuraian dan model bahasa dalam satu implementasi. Pada bank Penn Treen Inggris, cadangan kami mendapatkan prestasi kompetitif dalam penghuraian konstitusi sementara cocok dengan skor model bahasa yang terbaik.', 'sq': 'Modelet gjenerative që përcaktojnë shpërndarjet e përbashkëta mbi pemët e analizimit dhe fjalët janë të dobishme për analizimin dhe modelimin e gjuhës, por imponojnë kufizime në fushën e karakteristikave dhe shpesh kalojnë nga modelet diskriminuese. Ne propozojmë një kuadër për analizimin dhe modelimin e gjuhës që martohet me një model gjenerativ me një model njohjeje diskriminuese në një konfigurim kodues-dekoder. Ne ofrojmë interpretime të kuadrit bazuar në maksimalizimin e shpresave dhe përfundimin variacional dhe tregojmë se kjo mundëson analizimin dhe modelimin gjuhësor brenda një zbatimi të vetëm. Në bank ën angleze Penn Treen, kuadri ynë fiton shfaqje konkurruese në analizimin e qarkut zgjedhor ndërsa përputhet me rezultatin e modelimit të gjuhës së vetme më të moderne.', 'am': 'በፓርላማ ዛፎች እና በቋንቋ ምሳሌ ላይ የተጠቃሚ የውይይት አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች ለማጋራት እና ለቋንቋ ምሳሌ ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ ግን በአካባቢዎች ክፍል ላይ ግንኙነትን እና በብዛት በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች ይደረጋሉ፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማጋራት እና የቋንቋ ምሳሌ መፍጠርን እናስጀራለን፡፡ በተመሳሳይ እና በተለየ ውጤት ላይ የተመሳሰለውን የፍሬመሬት ትርጓሜዎችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ፕን ቴን Treen-bank፣ የፍሬማችን ሥርዓት አንድ-model ቋንቋ መተላለፊያውን በመተካከል በፓርቲው ፓርቲ ላይ የሚዋጋውን ድምፅ ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գեներատիվ մոդելները, որոնք սահմանում են ընդհանուր տարածումը վերլուծության ծառերի և նախադասությունների վրա, օգտակար են վերլուծության և լեզվի մոդելների համար, բայց սահմանափակում են առանձնահատկությունների շարժումը և հաճախ գերազանցու Մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգ վերլուծության և լեզվի մոդելավորման համար, որը ամուսնանում է սերունդային մոդելի հետ խտրականում ճանաչողական մոդելի կոդերի միջոցով: Մենք տրամադրում ենք շրջանակի մեկնաբանություններ, հիմնված ակնկալիքների մեծացման և տարբերակային հետևանքների վրա, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն հնարավորություն է տալիս վերլուծում և լեզվի մոդելներ մեկ իրականացման ընթացքում: Անգլերենի Penn Treen-բանկի վրա մեր շրջանակը ստանում է ընտրական շրջանների վերլուծության մրցակցության արդյունք, միաժամանակ համապատասխանում է ամենաբարձր լեզվի մոդելավորման գնահատականին:', 'af': "Genereerde modele wat saamste verspreidings bepaal oor verwerking bome en setnings is nuttig vir verwerking en taal modellering, maar beperkinge op die omvang van funksies inplaas en word dikwels uitgevoer deur diskriminasiewe modele. Ons voorstel 'n raamwerk vir verwerking en taal modellering wat met 'n genereerbare model met' n diskriminasiewe herkening model in' n enkoder- dekoder instelling. Ons verskaf uitleggings van die raamwerk gebaseer op verwagting maksimalisering en variasionale inferensie en wys dat dit toelaat verwerking en taal modeling binne 'n enkele implementasie. Op die Engelse Penn Treen-bank, ons raamwerk verkry rekenaar uitwerking op konstitusieverwerking terwyl ooreenkomstig die state-of-the-art enkel-model taal modeling aantal.", 'az': 'YardńĪm ańüaclarńĪ v…ô c√ľml…ôl…ôr √ľz…ôrind…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü dańüńĪtńĪmlarńĪ tanńĪmlayan n…ôz…ôriyy…ôtli modell…ôr analiz…ô v…ô dil modell…ôrin…ô faydalńĪ olar, amma f…ôrqli h√ľquqlarńĪn m√ľ…ôyy…ônl…ôŇüdirilm…ôsini v…ô √ßox sńĪxńĪntńĪlńĪ modell…ôr il…ô istifad…ô edirl…ôr. Biz koder-dekoder qurńüularńĪnda diskriminat tanńĪma modeli il…ô generikli modell…ô evl…ônm…ôk v…ô dil modell…ôrini ayńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn bir qurńüu t…ôklif edirik. Biz g√∂zl…ôm…ô m√ľxt…ôlif t…ôsirl…ôrin v…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik t…ôsirl…ôrin istifad…ôsin…ô dayanan frameworkl…ôrin yorumlarńĪnńĪ t…ômin edirik v…ô t…ôk bir implementasyon i√ßind…ô ayńĪrma v…ô dil modell…ôrini m√ľmk√ľn edir. ńįngilizci Penn Treen-bankasńĪnda, bizim qurńüumuz m√ľqayis…ôd…ô bir modell…ô dil modell…ôrinin n√∂qt…ôsin…ô uyńüun halda, m√ľqayis…ôd…ô m√ľqayis…ôd…ô m√ľqayis…ôd…ô performans alńĪr.', 'ca': "Models generatius que defineixen distribucions conjuntes sobre arbres i frases són útils per analitzar i modelar idiomes, però imposen restriccions a l'alcance de les característiques i sovint són superats per models discriminatius. Proposem un marc per analitzar i modelar idiomes que es casi amb un model generador amb un model de reconeixement discriminatiu en un entorn de codificador-decodificador. Oferecem interpretacions del marc basades en la maximització de l'expectativa i la inferència variacional, i demostram que permet analitzar i modelar idiomes en una sola implementació. On the English Penn Treen-bank, our framework obtains competitive performance on constituency parsing while matching the state-of-the-art single-model language modeling score.", 'bs': 'Generativni modeli koji definiraju zajedničke raspodjele za analizu drveća i rečenica su korisni za analizu i modeliranje jezika, ali nameću ograničenja na oblast opsega karakteristika i često se iznosi diskriminacijskim modelima. Predlažemo okvir za analizu i modeliranje jezika koji se udaje za generativni model sa diskriminativnim modelom priznanja u postavljanju kodera. Mi pružamo interpretacije okvira na osnovu maksimalizacije očekivanja i variacionalne infekcije i pokazujemo da omogućava analizu i modelizaciju jezika u jednoj implementaciji. Na engleskoj Penn Treen-banki, naš okvir dobija konkurentne funkcije u analiziranju predstava dok odgovara rezultatu modeliranja jednomodelnog jezika države umjetnosti.', 'fi': 'Generatiiviset mallit, jotka määrittelevät yhteisiä jakaumia jäsennyspuille ja lauseille, ovat hyödyllisiä jäsentämisessä ja kielimallinnuksessa, mutta asettavat rajoituksia ominaisuuksien laajuudelle ja ovat usein diskriminatiivisia malleja parempia. Ehdotamme jäsennys- ja kielimallinnuskehystä, joka yhdistää generatiivisen mallin diskriminatiiviseen tunnistusmalliin kooderi-dekooderissa. Esitämme viitekehyksen tulkintoja odotusten maksimointiin ja variaatiopäättelyyn perustuen ja osoitamme, että se mahdollistaa jäsentämisen ja kielimallinnuksen yhdessä toteutuksessa. Englanninkielisessä Penn Treen -pankissa viitekehyksemme saavuttaa kilpailullista suorituskykyä vaalipiirien jäsentämisessä samalla kun se vastaa huippuluokan yhden mallin kielimallinnuksen pistemäärää.', 'bn': 'পার্স গাছ এবং ভাষা মডেলিং এর জন্য যৌথ বিতরণের বিষয়বস্তু নির্ধারণ করার জন্য প্রজন্ম মডেল, কিন্তু বৈষম্যমূলক মডেল দ্বারা প্রায়শ বৈষম্যিক মডেলের মা আমরা পার্সিং এবং ভাষা মডেলিং এর জন্য একটি ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করি যা একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল বিয়ে করে একটি বৈষম্যিক স্বীকৃতির মডেলের সাথে একটি  আমরা এই ফ্রেমের ব্যাখ্যা প্রদান করি প্রত্যাশা এবং বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত আক্রান্ত ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এটি  On the English Penn Treen-bank, our framework obtains competitive performance on constituency parsing while matching the state-of-the-art single-model language modeling score.', 'cs': 'Generační modely definující společná distribuce nad parse stromy a věty jsou užitečné pro parsování a jazykové modelování, ale ukládají omezení rozsahu funkcí a jsou často překonány diskriminačními modely. Navrhujeme rámec pro parsování a jazykové modelování, který spojuje generativní model s diskriminačním modelem rozpoznávání v nastavení kodéru-dekodéru. Poskytujeme interpretace frameworku založené na maximalizaci očekávání a variační inferenci a ukazujeme, že umožňuje analýzu a jazykové modelování v rámci jedné implementace. Na anglické Penn Treen-bank náš framework získává konkurenční výkon při analýze volebních obvodů a současně odpovídá nejmodernějšímu skóre modelování jazyka pro jednotlivé modely.', 'et': 'Generatiivsed mudelid, mis määratlevad ühisjaotusi parsimispuude ja lausete üle, on kasulikud parsimiseks ja keele modelleerimiseks, kuid kehtestavad piirangud funktsioonide ulatusele ja on sageli diskrimineerivad mudelid ületavad. Pakume välja parsimise ja keele modelleerimise raamistiku, mis ühendab generatiivse mudeli diskrimineeriva tuvastusmudeliga kodeerija-dekooderi seadistuses. Pakume raamistiku tõlgendusi ootuste maksimeerimisel ja variatsioonilisel järeldusel ning näitame, et see võimaldab parsimist ja keele modelleerimist ühe rakenduse raames. Inglise Penn Treen pangas saavutab meie raamistik konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse valimisringkondade parsimisel, samas sobitades kaasaegse ühe mudeli keele modelleerimise skoori.', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Kana goyyar da wani firam wa yin parse da misalin harshe wanda ke auri wata motel mai dabar-daban da wani motel na ganin da baka-kode. Munã bã da fassarar fassarar firam a kan kwatanka wa matumain faɗa ɗawa da wata cuta-dabam, kuma Muke nuna cewa, ita yana iya amfani da misalin paring da harshe guda a cikin shirin da aka nuna. Ga bangon Ingiriya na Penn Treen-Banki, firam tana sami da mai gauraya a kan parse na constituni idan yana daidaita ga halin-da-mai-sanawa-hoton-salon-salon.', 'he': 'דוגמנים גנרטיביים שמגדרים פיצוצים משותפים על עצי מעבדה ומשפטים הם שימושיים עבור מעבדה ודוגמנים לשפה, אך מכריחים מגבלות על מגוון המאפיינים ולפעמים הם מתגברים על ידי דוגמנים דיסקרטיביים. אנו מציעים מסגרת עבור בדיקת ודוגמניות שפה שמתחתנת לדוגמנית דולרית עם דוגמנית זיהוי דיסקרטיבית בסיס קוד-קידור. אנו מספקים פרשנות של המסגרת המבוססת על המקסימום ציפיות והתוצאה שונה, ולהראות שזה מאפשר לאבד ודוגמה לשפה בתוך הפעלה אחת. על בנק הפן טרין האנגלית, המסגרת שלנו מקבלת ביצועים תחרותיים על בדיקת מחוז הבחירות בזמן שיתואם את נקודת הדוגמניות של שפת חד-מודל המאודל ביותר.', 'sk': 'Generativni modeli, ki opredeljujejo skupne porazdelitve preko razčlenjevalnih dreves in stavkov, so koristni za razčlenjevanje in jezikovno modeliranje, vendar nalagajo omejitve obsega funkcij in jih pogosto presegajo diskriminativni modeli. Predlagamo okvir za razčlenjevanje in jezikovno modeliranje, ki združuje generativni model z diskriminativnim modelom prepoznavanja v nastavitvi kodirnika-dekoderja. Zagotavljamo interpretacije okvira na podlagi maksimizacije pričakovanj in variacijskih sklepov ter pokažemo, da omogoča razčlenitev in jezikovno modeliranje znotraj ene implementacije. Na angleški banki Penn Treen naš okvir doseže konkurenčno uspešnost pri razčlenitvi volilnih okrožij in hkrati ujema najsodobnejšo rezultato enomodelnega jezikovnega modeliranja.', 'jv': 'Generative model defines joint Distributions Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo nggawe tarjamahan karo model model model model dêrbêr, dinopakan karo model dêrbêr. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nggunaken winih sing saben nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan langgar, lan akeh iso nggawe layakno karo perusahaan langgar sapa nguasai winih. Nang ingkang Pen Stasi sing paling nggambar, kita sampeyan akeh pengaturan sing berarti sawar nggawe nguasai paten sing paling nggawe gerakan kelas state-of-the-arts singular model', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མིང་དཔྱད་དང་སྐད་རིགས་མིང་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ཅིག ང་ཚོས་རེ་བ་ཆེ་ཤོས་དང་འགྱུར་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་ལ་རྨན་པར་གཞི་སྒྲིག་framework་གི་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ལས་ཉེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་སྐད་རིགས་མ དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་Penn Treen-bank་ཐེངས་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གིས་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་མངོན་འཆར་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Towards String-To-Tree Neural Machine Translation', 'pt': 'Em direção à tradução automática neural String-to-Tree', 'ar': 'نحو ترجمة الآلة العصبية من سلسلة إلى شجرة', 'fr': 'Vers la traduction automatique neuronale chaîne à arbre', 'es': 'Hacia la traducción automática neuronal de cadena a árbol', 'ja': 'String - to - Tree神経機械翻訳に向けて', 'zh': '得字符串到树之神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'स्ट्रिंग-टू-ट्री न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद की ओर', 'ru': 'К нейронному машинному переводу от строки к дереву', 'ga': 'I dTreo Aistriúchán Meaisín Neural Teaghrán Go Crann', 'ka': 'სიმბოლოს- სა- ხე ნეირალური მაქინის გადაწყვანა', 'hu': 'Towards String-to-Tree Neural Machine Translation', 'el': 'Προς τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση από συμβολοσειρά σε δέντρο', 'it': 'Verso la traduzione automatica neurale stringa-albero', 'kk': 'Бұтақтағы мәтін- ағаш нейралы машинаның аудармасына қарсы', 'lt': 'Nuorių į medį skleidžiamos neurotinės mašinos vertimo link', 'mk': 'Надвор кон дрво', 'ms': 'Ke arah Terjemahan Mesin Neural String-To-Tree', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്കു് നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Lejn Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali minn String-To-Tree', 'no': 'Gå til streng- til- tre- neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'ro': 'Către traducerea automată neurală din coardă în copac', 'pl': 'W kierunku neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego ciągu do drzewa', 'sr': 'На превод невралног машине на стрину до древа', 'so': 'Towards String-to-Tree Neural machine Translation', 'si': 'String- To- Tree නිර්මාණ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනයට', 'sv': 'Mot sträng-till-träd neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'மேலே சரம்- இருந்து மரத்தில் இருந்து நெருக்கல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'String-to-Tree Neural Machine Translation', 'mn': 'Мөртгийг модны мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө руу', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Hướng tới phiên dịch thần kinh tới Chuỗi-tới-cây', 'bg': 'Към машинен превод от низове до дърво', 'hr': 'Prijevod neuroloških strojeva', 'da': 'Mod streng-til-træ neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Naar String-to-Tree neurale machinevertaling', 'de': 'In Richtung String-to-Tree neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung', 'id': 'Menuju Translation Mesin Neural String-To-Tree', 'ko': '트리에 문자열', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'fa': 'به سمت ترجمه ماشین عصبی سیم به درخت', 'tr': "Hat'a Gara Neural Makine terjime", 'af': 'Gaan na String- To- Boom Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të përkthimit të makinës nervore në dru', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Առաջին ծառի նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն', 'az': 'String-to-Tree Neural Makine √áeviri t…ôr…ôfind…ô', 'bn': 'স্ট্রিং- থেকে গাছের নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'cs': 'Směrem k neuronovému strojovému překladu řetězce na strom', 'ca': 'Vers la traducció de la màquina neuronal corda a arbre', 'et': 'String-to-Tree neural Machine Translation', 'fi': 'Kohti merkkijonoista puuhun -neurokonekäännöstä', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'לכיוון התרגום של מכונת עצבית חוט לעץ', 'sk': 'Proti strojnemu prevajanju nizov v drevo', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྙིགས་རིས་ལ་དབྱིབས་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་མིང་ལག་གི་ཚིག་འདྲེན་'}
{'en': 'We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees. An experiment on the WMT16 German-English news translation task resulted in an improved BLEU score when compared to a syntax-agnostic NMT baseline trained on the same dataset. An analysis of the translations from the syntax-aware system shows that it performs more reordering during translation in comparison to the baseline. A small-scale human evaluation also showed an advantage to the syntax-aware system.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة بسيطة لدمج المعلومات النحوية حول اللغة الهدف في نظام الترجمة الآلية العصبية من خلال الترجمة إلى أشجار دائرة انتخابية خطية ومعاجمية. أسفرت تجربة عن مهمة ترجمة الأخبار الألمانية-الإنجليزية في WMT16 عن درجة BLEU محسّنة عند مقارنتها بخط أساسي NMT غير محايد في بناء الجملة تم تدريبه على نفس مجموعة البيانات. يُظهر تحليل الترجمات من النظام المدرك للصياغة أنه يؤدي إلى مزيد من إعادة الترتيب أثناء الترجمة مقارنة بخط الأساس. أظهر تقييم بشري صغير أيضًا ميزة للنظام المدرك للنحو.', 'es': 'Presentamos un método simple para incorporar información sintáctica sobre el idioma de destino en un sistema de traducción automática neuronal mediante la traducción en árboles de circunscripciones linealizados y lexicalizados. Un experimento sobre la tarea de traducción de noticias alemán-inglés del WMT16 dio como resultado una mejor puntuación BLEU en comparación con una línea base de NMT independiente de la sintaxis entrenada en el mismo conjunto de datos. Un análisis de las traducciones del sistema sensible a la sintaxis muestra que realiza más reordenamientos durante la traducción en comparación con la línea base. Una evaluación humana a pequeña escala también mostró una ventaja para el sistema sensible a la sintaxis.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une méthode simple pour intégrer des informations syntaxiques sur la langue cible dans un système de traduction automatique neuronale en les traduisant en arbres de constituants lexicalisés et linéarisés. Une expérience sur la tâche de traduction d'actualités allemand-anglais WMT16 a permis d'obtenir un score BLEU amélioré par rapport à une base de référence NMT indépendante de la syntaxe formée sur le même ensemble de données. Une analyse des traductions du système sensible à la syntaxe montre qu'il effectue plus de réorganisation pendant la traduction par rapport à la base. Une évaluation humaine à petite échelle a également montré un avantage pour le système sensible à la syntaxe.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um método simples para incorporar informações sintáticas sobre o idioma de destino em um sistema de tradução automática neural, traduzindo em árvores de constituintes linearizadas e lexicalizadas. Um experimento na tarefa de tradução de notícias alemão-inglês WMT16 resultou em uma pontuação BLEU aprimorada quando comparada a uma linha de base NMT agnóstica de sintaxe treinada no mesmo conjunto de dados. Uma análise das traduções do sistema sensível à sintaxe mostra que ele realiza mais reordenações durante a tradução em comparação com a linha de base. Uma avaliação humana em pequena escala também mostrou uma vantagem para o sistema sensível à sintaxe.', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳システムにターゲット言語に関する構文情報を、線形化された語彙化された選挙区木に翻訳することによって組み込む簡単な方法を提示する。ＷＭＴ １ ６ドイツ語－英語ニュース翻訳タスクの実験は、同じデータセットで訓練された構文非依存性ＮＭＴベースラインと比較した場合、改善されたＢＬＥＵスコアをもたらした。構文認識システムからの翻訳を分析すると、ベースラインと比較して翻訳中により多くの並べ替えを実行することが示されています。小規模な人間による評価では、構文認識システムにも利点があることが示された。', 'zh': '建一简之法,因翻译成线性化、词法化之树,合其语言句法息于神经机器翻译统。 WMT16德语 - 英语新闻翻译之实验,与同数集上训练之语法,非关NMT基线BLEU得分有所提高。 语法译之分析表明,比于基线,其重排更多。 小规模的人工评料也显示语法感知系统的优势。', 'hi': 'हम रैखिक, lexicalized निर्वाचन क्षेत्र के पेड़ों में अनुवाद करके एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली में लक्ष्य भाषा के बारे में वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को शामिल करने के लिए एक सरल विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। WMT16 जर्मन-अंग्रेजी समाचार अनुवाद कार्य पर एक प्रयोग के परिणामस्वरूप एक ही डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित वाक्यविन्यास-अज्ञेयवादी NMT बेसलाइन की तुलना में एक बेहतर BLEU स्कोर हुआ। सिंटैक्स-जागरूक सिस्टम से अनुवादों के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि यह बेसलाइन की तुलना में अनुवाद के दौरान अधिक पुन: क्रमबद्ध करता है। एक छोटे पैमाने पर मानव मूल्यांकन ने भी वाक्यविन्यास-जागरूक प्रणाली के लिए एक लाभ दिखाया।', 'ru': 'Предложен простой способ включения синтаксической информации о целевом языке в систему нейронного машинного перевода путем перевода в линеаризованные, лексикализованные дерева избирателей. Эксперимент по задаче перевода новостей WMT16 на немецкий и английский языки привел к улучшению оценки BLEU по сравнению с синтаксис-диагностическим базовым уровнем НБ, обученным на том же наборе данных. Анализ переводов из системы, основанной на синтаксисе, показывает, что она выполняет больше переупорядочения во время перевода по сравнению с базовой линией. Мелкомасштабная оценка деятельности человека также продемонстрировала преимущества системы, основанной на синтаксисе.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair modh simplí chun faisnéis chomhréire faoin sprioctheanga a ionchorprú i gcóras meaisín-aistrithe néarach trí aistriú go crainn toghcheantair líneacha, foclóirithe. Mar thoradh ar thurgnamh ar thasc aistriúcháin nuachta Gearmáinis-Béarla WMT16 tháinig feabhas ar scór BLEU i gcomparáid le bunlíne NMT comhréire-agnostic a fuair oiliúint ar an tacar sonraí céanna. Léiríonn anailís ar na haistriúcháin ón gcóras atá feasach ar chomhréir go ndéanann sé níos mó athordú le linn an aistriúcháin i gcomparáid leis an mbunlíne. Léirigh measúnú daonna ar scála beag buntáiste freisin don chóras a bhí feasach ar chomhréir.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვიყვანეთ სინტექტიკური ინფორმაციის შესახებ სინეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელების სისტემის სისტემის შესახებ სინეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელების სისტემის შესახებ, რო Name სინტაქსის ცნობიერების სისტემიდან შეტყობინებების ანალიზაცია ჩვენებს, რომ ის უფრო მეტი შეტყობინება შემდეგ შეტყობინებაში. მალკი ადამიანის განსაზღვრება ასევე გამოიყენება სინტაქსის ცნობიერების სისტემის გასაზღვრება.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή μέθοδο ενσωμάτωσης συντακτικών πληροφοριών για τη γλώσσα-στόχο σε ένα νευρωνικό σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης μεταφράζοντας σε γραμμοποιημένα, λεξιλογικά εκλογικά δέντρα. Ένα πείραμα στην εργασία μετάφρασης γερμανικών-αγγλικών ειδήσεων WMT16 είχε ως αποτέλεσμα μια βελτιωμένη βαθμολογία BLEU σε σύγκριση με μια σύνταξη-αγνωστική βάση NMT που εκπαιδεύτηκε στο ίδιο σύνολο δεδομένων. Μια ανάλυση των μεταφράσεων από το σύστημα που γνωρίζει τη σύνταξη δείχνει ότι εκτελεί περισσότερη αναδιατάσταση κατά τη διάρκεια της μετάφρασης σε σύγκριση με τη γραμμή βάσης. Μια μικρής κλίμακας ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση έδειξε επίσης ένα πλεονέκτημα στο συντακτικό σύστημα.', 'hu': 'Egy egyszerű módszert mutatunk be a célnyelvre vonatkozó szintaktikus információk beépítésére egy neurális gépi fordítási rendszerbe linearizált, lexikalizált választókerületi fákra történő fordításával. A WMT16 német-angol hírfordítási feladatával végzett kísérlet eredményeképpen javult a BLEU pontszám az ugyanazon adatkészleten képzett szintaxis-agnosztikus NMT alapkészlethez képest. A szintaxistudatos rendszerből származó fordítások elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a fordítás során több átrendezést hajt végre, mint az alapterv. Egy kisméretű emberi értékelés is előnyt mutatott a szintaxistudatos rendszer számára.', 'it': "Presentiamo un metodo semplice per incorporare informazioni sintattiche sulla lingua di destinazione in un sistema di traduzione automatica neurale traducendo in alberi di circoscrizione linearizzati e lessicalizzati. Un esperimento sul compito di traduzione tedesco-inglese WMT16 ha portato a un punteggio BLEU migliore rispetto a una base NMT sintassi agnostica addestrata sullo stesso set di dati. Un'analisi delle traduzioni dal sistema sintassi-consapevole mostra che esegue più riordino durante la traduzione rispetto alla base. Una valutazione umana su piccola scala ha anche mostrato un vantaggio per il sistema sintassi-consapevole.", 'lt': 'Mes pateikiame paprastą metodą, kaip integruoti sintaksinę informaciją apie tikslinę kalbą į nervinės mašinos vertimo sistemą, vertdami į linijinius, leksikalinius rinkinių medžius. Eksperimentuojant WMT16 Vokietijos ir anglų kalbų naujienų vertimo užduotį, buvo pagerintas BLEU rezultatas, palyginti su sintaksinės-agnostinės NMT bazės duomenimis, apmokytomis tame pačiame duomenų rinkinyje. Vertimų iš sintaksą žinončios sistemos analizė rodo, kad vertimo metu ji atlieka daugiau pertvarkymo, palyginti su pradine verte. Mažo masto žmogaus vertinimas taip pat parodė naudą sintaksinę sistemą.', 'kk': 'Біз нақты тілді невралдық компьютердің аудару жүйесінде синтактикалық мәліметті сызықты, лексикализацияланған кеңістік ағаштарға аударып, қарапайым тәсілді таңдаймыз. WMT16 неміс- ағылшын жаңалық аудару тапсырмасының тәжірибесі бір деректер жиынында оқылған синтаксис- агностикалық NMT негізгі жолымен салыстырғанда, BLEU нәтижесін жақсартқан болды. Синтаксис түсінікті жүйесінің аудармасының анализ аудармасының негізгі жолымен салыстыру кезінде қайта реттеу жолын көрсетеді. Кішкене адамның бағалауы сондай-ақ синтаксис түсінікті жүйесіне артықшылық көрсетілді.', 'mk': 'We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees.  Експериментот на WMT16 германско-англискиот превод на вестите резултираше со подобрен БЛЕУ резултат во споредба со синтаксичен агностички НМТ основен резултат трениран на истиот податок. Анализата на преведувањата од системот на свесност за синтаксија покажува дека извршува повеќе реорганизација за време на преведувањето во споредба со базата. Мала човечка проценка, исто така, покажа предност за системот на свесност за синтаксите.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kaedah sederhana untuk memasukkan maklumat sintaktik mengenai bahasa sasaran dalam sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dengan terjemahan ke pokok-pokok suku bersifat linear, leksikal. Satu eksperimen pada tugas terjemahan berita Jerman-Inggeris WMT16 menghasilkan peningkatan skor BLEU bila dibandingkan dengan dasar NMT sintaks-agnostik dilatih pada set data yang sama. Name A small-scale human evaluation also showed an advantage to the syntax-aware system.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഭാഷ കുറിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്ക് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ രീതിയിലാണ് ഞങ് WMT16 ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണം ഒരേ ഡാറ്റാസറെറ്റില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒര സിന്റാക്സ്- വിവരമറിയുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ബെസ്റ ഒരു ചെറിയ സാധാരണ മനുഷ്യന്റെ വിലാസവും സിന്റാക്സ് അറിയുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് ഒരു ഉപകാരവും കാണിച്ചു.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw metodu sempliċi biex ninkorporaw informazzjoni sintattika dwar il-lingwa fil-mira f’sistema ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali billi nittrasferixxu f’siġar kostitwenti linearizzati u lexikalizzati. Esperiment dwar il-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni tal-a ħbarijiet tal-Ġermanja-Ingliż tad-WMT16 irriżulta f’punteġġ BLEU imtejjeb meta mqabbel ma’ linja bażi tal-NMT sintaksi-agnostika mħarrġa fuq l-istess sett ta’ dejta. An analysis of the translations from the syntax-aware system shows that it performs more reordering during translation in comparison to the baseline.  Evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem fuq skala żgħira wriet ukoll vantaġġ għas-sistema ta’ għarfien tas-sintaks.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдээллийг мэдээллийн тухай шинжлэх ухаан нь мэдээллийн тухай мэдээллийг мэдрэлийн машины орчуулалтын системд шугам, лексикализод байгуулалтын мод руу орлуулж байна. WMT16 Герман-Англи хэлний хэвлэлийн даалгаварын туршилт нь ижил өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын синтаксис-агностик NMT сургалтыг харьцуулахад BLEU оноо сайжруулсан юм. Синтаксис ойлголтын системийн орчуулалтын шинжилгээ нь үндсэн шулуунтай харьцуулахад илүү шинжилгээ хийдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бага хэмжээний хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээ мөн синтаксис ойлголтын системд ашиг үзүүлсэн.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein enkel metode for å inkludere syntaksisk informasjon om målspråket i eit neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystem ved å omsetja til lineært, leksikalisert konstitusjonstråde. Eit eksperiment på WMT16 tysk- engelsk nyhetsgiveringsoppgåva resulterte i eit forbetra BLEU- score når det sammenlignet med ein syntaks- agnostisk NMT- baseline trengt på samme datasett. Eit analyse av omsetjingane frå syntaksmerke systemet viser at det gjer meir ordning ved omsetjing i sammenligning med baselinja. Ein lite menneskelig evaluering viste også eit fordel til syntaksmerke systemet.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy prostą metodę włączenia informacji składniowych o języku docelowym w neuronowym systemie tłumaczenia maszynowego poprzez tłumaczenie na linearyzowane, leksykalizowane drzewa wyborcze. Eksperyment na zadaniu tłumaczenia wiadomości niemiecko-angielskich WMT16 zaowocował poprawą wyniku BLEU w porównaniu z bazą NMT agnostyczną dla składni trenowaną na tym samym zbiorze danych. Analiza tłumaczeń z systemu świadomego składni pokazuje, że podczas tłumaczenia wykonuje on większe zmiany porządku w porównaniu do bazy bazowej. Mała ocena ludzi wykazała również zaletę dla systemu świadomego składni.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o metodă simplă de încorporare a informațiilor sintactice despre limba țintă într-un sistem de traducere automată neurală prin traducerea în arbori circumscripționali linearizați, lexicalizați. Un experiment asupra sarcinii WMT16 german-engleză de traducere a știrilor a dus la un scor BLEU îmbunătățit în comparație cu o bază NMT agnostică de sintaxă instruită pe același set de date. O analiză a traducerilor din sistemul conștient de sintaxă arată că efectuează mai multă reordonare în timpul traducerii în comparație cu nivelul de referință. O evaluare umană la scară mică a arătat, de asemenea, un avantaj pentru sistemul conștient de sintaxă.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavnu metodu da uključimo sintaktične informacije o ciljnom jeziku u sistem prevoda neuralnih mašin a, prevodeći se na linearne, leksikalizirane drveće. Eksperiment o zadatku za prevod njemačke-engleske vesti WMT16 rezultirao je poboljšan rezultat BLEU u usporedbi sa sintaksističkim agnostičkim početnim linijom NMT-a obučenim na istom setu podataka. Analiza prevoda iz sistema svjesnog sintaksa pokazuje da radi više reorderinga tokom prevoda u usporedbi sa početnom linijom. Mala procjena ljudske procjene takođe pokazala je prednost sistemu svjesnog sintaksa.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ඉලක්ෂ භාෂා ගැන සංකේතික තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල මැෂින් වාර්ථාව පද Name වාක්ෂික පද්ධතියෙන් වාක්ෂික විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක වාක්ෂික විධානය විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහ පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පද්ධතියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': "We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees.  Imtixaan ku qoran shaqada wargelinta ee WMT16 Jarmal-Ingiriis waxay sababtay beddelan score BLEU marka la barbarbarto qoraalka kooxaha syntax-agnostic NMT oo lagu bartay isku danaha databaseline. Baaritaanka turjumaadda ee nidaamka syntax-aqoonta ka yimid waxay muuqataa in turjumaadda lagu sameeyo mid ka sii bedelmaya marka lagu turjumayo si u barbarbardhigga saldhigga. Qiimeynta dadku waxey sidoo kale u muuqatay faa'iido u leh nidaamka cashuurta.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en enkel metod f철r att inf철rliva syntaktisk information om m책lspr책ket i ett neuralt maskin철vers채ttningssystem genom att 철vers채tta till linj채riserade, lexikaliserade valkretstr채d. Ett experiment med WMT16 tysk-engelska nyhets철vers채ttningsuppgiften resulterade i en f철rb채ttrad BLEU-po채ng j채mf철rt med en syntaxagnostisk NMT-baslinje utbildad p책 samma dataupps채ttning. En analys av 철vers채ttningarna fr책n det syntaxmedvetna systemet visar att det utf철r mer omordning under 철vers채ttningen j채mf철rt med baslinjen. En liten m채nsklig utv채rdering visade ocks책 en f철rdel f철r det syntaxmedvetna systemet.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு சுலபமான முறைமையை கொண்டு இலக்கு மொழியை சேர்க்க ஒரு புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்றும் முறைமையில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முறைமையை  Name @ info: whatsthis ஒரு சிறிய அளவு மனித மதிப்பெண்கள் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் அமைப்பிற்கு ஒரு நன்மையை காண்பித்தது.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ موجود زبان کے بارے میں سینٹکتیک معلومات کو ایک نیورل ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم میں ترجمہ کریں linearized, lexicalized constituency trees میں. WMT16 جرمن-انگلیسی خبروں کی ترجمہ کے کام پر ایک آزمائش کا نتیجہ ہوا جب ایک سینٹکس-agnostic NMT بیس لین کے مقابلہ میں ایک سینٹکس-اگنیسی ڈیٹسٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی تھی۔ سینٹکس-آگاہ سیسٹم سے ترجمہ کی تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ اس کی ترجمہ میں بیس لین کے مقابلہ میں زیادہ ترجمہ کرتی ہے. ایک چھوٹی اندازہ آدمی کا ارزش بھی سونٹکس جاننے والی سیسٹم کے لئے ایک فائدہ دکھائی۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp đơn giản để cung cấp thông tin cú pháp về ngôn ngữ đích trong một hệ thống dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh bằng cách thông dịch thành các cây có phân tích mã hóa. Một thí nghiệm về giải dịch tin tức WRT16 Đức-Anh đã có kết quả cải thiện lượng LELIU khi so sánh với một cơ sở phát âm NMT cộng hưởng từ cùng một tập tin. Phân tích bản dịch từ hệ thống nhận thức cú pháp cho thấy nó tái thiết lập hơn trong khi dịch chuyển so với cơ sở cơ bản. Một đánh giá con người nhỏ cũng cho thấy một lợi thế đối với hệ thống nhận thức cú pháp.', 'uz': "Biz bir oddiy usulni qo'yish, leksikalik daraxtlarga tarjima qilish uchun bir necha maskina tarjima tizimida qo'yish uchun qo'yish usuli. Name @ info: whatsthis Menyuning kichik qiymatlari haqida bir qancha narsa tizimga tizim yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Представяме прост метод за включване на синтактична информация за целевия език в невронна система за машинен превод чрез превод на линейни, лексикализирани избирателни дървета. Експеримент по задачата за превод на новини на немски-английски език доведе до подобрен резултат в сравнение със синтаксис-агностична база на НМТ, обучена на същия набор от данни. Анализ на преводите от системата, която познава синтаксиса, показва, че тя извършва по-голямо пренареждане по време на превода в сравнение с базовата линия. Малката човешка оценка също показа предимство на системата, която познава синтаксиса.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en enkel metode til at indarbejde syntaktisk information om målsproget i et neuralt maskinoversættelsessystem ved at oversætte til lineariserede, leksikaliserede valgkredsstræer. Et eksperiment med WMT16 tysk-engelsk nyhedsoversættelsesopgave resulterede i en forbedret BLEU score sammenlignet med en syntaksagnostisk NMT baseline trænet på samme datasæt. En analyse af oversættelserne fra det syntaksbevidste system viser, at det udfører mere omarrangering under oversættelse i forhold til oprindelig linje. En lille menneskelig evaluering viste også en fordel for det syntaksbevidste system.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een eenvoudige methode om syntactische informatie over de doeltaal op te nemen in een neuraal machinevertaalsysteem door te vertalen naar lineariseerde, lexicaliseerde kiesdistrictbomen. Een experiment met de WMT16 Duits-Engels nieuws vertaaltaak resulteerde in een verbeterde BLEU score in vergelijking met een syntaxis-agnostische NMT baseline getraind op dezelfde dataset. Een analyse van de vertalingen van het syntaxisbewuste systeem toont aan dat het tijdens de vertaling meer herschikking uitvoert in vergelijking met de basislijn. Een kleinschalige menselijke evaluatie toonde ook een voordeel voor het syntaxisbewuste systeem.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine einfache Methode vor, syntaktische Informationen über die Zielsprache in ein neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungssystem zu integrieren, indem sie in linearisierte, lexikalisierte Wahlkreisbäume übersetzt werden. Ein Experiment mit der Deutsch-Englischen Nachrichtenübersetzungsaufgabe WMT16 führte zu einem verbesserten BLEU-Score im Vergleich zu einer syntax-agnostischen NMT-Baseline, die auf demselben Datensatz trainiert wurde. Eine Analyse der Übersetzungen aus dem syntaxbewussten System zeigt, dass es während der Übersetzung mehr Neuordnungen durchführt als die Baseline. Eine kleine menschliche Auswertung zeigte auch einen Vorteil für das syntaxbewusste System.', 'ko': '우리는 목표 언어의 문법 정보를 선형화, 어휘화의 기능 트리로 전환시켜 신경기계 번역 시스템에 통합시키는 간단한 방법을 제시했다.WMT16 독일어-영어 뉴스 번역 임무는 같은 데이터 세트에서 훈련된 문법을 알 수 없는 NMT 기선에 비해 실험 결과 BLEU 점수가 향상된 것으로 나타났다.문법 감지 시스템의 번역에 대한 분석에 따르면 기선에 비해 번역 과정에서 더 많은 재배열을 실행한다.소규모 인공 평가도 문법 감지 시스템의 장점을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan metode sederhana untuk mengikorporasi informasi sintaksi tentang bahasa sasaran dalam sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dengan menerjemahkan ke pohon konstitusi linearised, leksikalisasi. Sebuah eksperimen pada tugas terjemahan berita Jerman-Inggris WMT16 menghasilkan peningkatan skor BLEU ketika dibandingkan dengan dasar NMT sintaks-agnostik dilatih pada set data yang sama. Analisis terjemahan dari sistem sadar sintaks menunjukkan bahwa ia melakukan lebih banyak reorganisasi selama terjemahan dibandingkan dengan dasar. Evaluasi manusia skala kecil juga menunjukkan keuntungan bagi sistem sadar sintaks.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavnu metodu uključujući sintaktičke informacije o ciljnom jeziku u sustav prevoda neuronskih strojeva prevodeći se na linearno, leksikalizirano drveće. Eksperiment na zadatku za prevod njemačke-engleske vijesti WMT16 rezultirao je poboljšan rezultat BLEU-a u usporedbi s sintaksičkom agnostičnom početnom linijom NMT-a obučenom na istoj seriji podataka. Analiza prevoda iz sustava svjesnog sintaksije pokazuje da radi više reorderinga tijekom prevoda u usporedbi s početnom linijom. Male procjene ljudske procjene također pokazale su prednost sustavu svjesnog sintaksa.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش ساده برای جمع کردن اطلاعات سنتاکتیک در مورد زبان هدف در سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی با ترجمه به درختان محیط\u200cهای خط\u200cشناسی و لکس\u200cکالیزی نشان می\u200cدهیم. یک آزمایش در مورد تابع نویسی آلمانی و انگلیسی WMT16 به نتیجه یک امتیاز BLEU بهتر شد وقتی در مقایسه با یک خط بنیادی NMT سنتاکس-agnostic آموزش داده شد. یک تحلیل از ترجمه\u200cها از سیستم آگاه\u200cسازی نشان می\u200cدهد که در طول ترجمه بیشتری در مقایسه با خط پایین انجام می\u200cدهد. یک مقدار کوچک ارزیابی انسان همچنین یک سودی برای سیستم آگاهی سنتاکس نشان داد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mbinu rahisi ya kuingiza taarifa za ushirikiano kuhusu lugha inayolenga katika mfumo wa utafsiri wa mashine ya asili kwa kutafsiri kuwa miti ya mistari, yenye ukoloni. Mjaribio wa kazi ya utafsiri wa habari ya WMT16 ya Ujerumani na Kiingereza ulisababisha score bora ya BLEU wakati ukilinganishwa na mstari wa NMT ulioendeshwa kwenye seti hiyo ya data. Uchambuzi wa tafsiri kutoka mfumo wa usawa wa kodi unaonyesha kwamba unafanya amri zaidi wakati wa kutafsiri ukilinganishwa na msingi. Utafiti mdogo wa kibinadamu pia ulionyesha faida kwa mfumo wa usahihi wa kodi.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n eenvoudige metode om sintakteel inligting oor die doel taal in 'n neurale masjien vertaling stelsel te inkorpreer deur te vertaling binne lineariseerde, leksikaliseerde konstituency bome. Name 'n Analiseer van die vertalings van die sintaks- bewys stelsel vertoon dat dit meer herordening uitvoer tydens vertaling in vergelyking met die basisline. 'n Klein-skaal menslike evaluasie het ook 'n voordeel aan die sintaks-bevestig stelsel vertoon.", 'tr': 'Biz sentaktik dili neural maşynyň terjime sistemasyna terjime etmek üçin ýeňil bir yöntem görkeýäris. WMT16 Alman-iňlisçe täzelikler terjime edilen suratynda bir synagnostik NMT üýtgedilen synagnostik netijesine deňleşdirdi. Sintaks bilinç sisteminden terjime edilen çözümler çözümleriniň beýikligi ýagdaýda terjime etmek üçin köp terjime edilsin. Kiçijik bir adam çözümlenmesi hem syntaks bilen tanyş sistemasyna bir fayda görkezildi.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë të thjeshtë për të përfshirë informacion sintaktik rreth gjuhës objektive në një sistem përkthimi nervor makineri duke u përkthyer në pemë të linearizuara, të lexikalizuara zgjedhore. Një eksperiment në detyrën e përkthimit të lajmeve gjermano-angleze WMT16 rezultoi në një rezultat të përmirësuar BLEU kur krahasohet me një bazë sintaks-agnostike NMT të stërvitur në të njëjtin set të dhënash. Një analizë e përkthimeve nga sistemi i ndërgjegjshëm sintaksi tregon se ai kryen më shumë riorganizim gjatë përkthimit në krahasim me bazën. Një vlerësim njerëzor në shkallë të vogël tregoi gjithashtu një avantazh për sistemin e ndërgjegjshëm për sintaksin.', 'am': 'We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees.  በWMT16 የጀርመን-እንግሊዘኛ ዜና ትርጓሜ አድራሻ ላይ የተፈተና ፈተና በአንድ ዳታተር የተጠቃሚ የሲንካስቲ-agnostic NMT-baseline በተስተማረው ጊዜ የBLEU score አሻራጅ ሆኖአል፡፡ ከሲንካስብ-ማስታወቂያው ሲስተም ትርጓሜዎችን ማተርጓሜ በመስመር ላይ በተስተያየት ይጨምርበታል፡፡ ትንሽ የሰው ውጤት የሲታወቂው ስርዓት ጥቅማዊ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Biz sintaktik dil haqqında nöral maşına çevirmə sistemində sintaktik məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün basit bir yolu göstəririk. Sətraflı, leksikləndirilmiş məlumat a ğaclarına çeviririk. WMT16 Alman-İngilizce xəbərlərin çeviri işində bir təcrübə eyni veri qutusunda təhsil edilmiş syntaks-agnostik NMT baseline ilə müqayisədə daha yaxşılaşdı. Sintaks bilən sistemindən tercümələrin analizi, tercümə sırası ilə dəyişdirilməsi üçün daha çox reordering etdiyini göstərir. Küçük ölçülü insan değerlendirməsi də sintaksi bilən sistemin faydasını göstərdi.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի պարզ մեթոդ, որպեսզի ներառենք նպատակային լեզվի մասին սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվություն նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգում թարգմանելով գծային, լեքսիկական ընտրական ծառերի մեջ: Գերմաներեն-անգլերեն նորությունների թարգմանման աշխատանքի վերաբերյալ մի փորձ հանգեցրեց բարելավված ԲԼԵԵՎ-ի գնահատականի համեմատած ՆՄԹ-ի սինտաքսի ագնոստիկ հիմքի հետ, որը ուսուցանվել է նույն տվյալների համակարգում: An analysis of the translations from the syntax-aware system shows that it performs more reordering during translation in comparison to the baseline.  Մարդկային փոքր մասշտաբի գնահատումը ցույց տվեց նաև առավելություն սինտաքսի գիտակցող համակարգին:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি সাধারণ পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবস্থায় টার্গেট ভাষা সম্পর্কে সিন্ট্যাকটিক তথ্য যুক্ত করার জন্য। লেক্সিক্সি উএমটি১৬ জার্মান-ইংরেজি সংবাদ অনুবাদ কাজের একটি পরীক্ষার ফলে একই ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষিত এক সিন্ক্যাক্স-অ্যাগনোস্টিক এনএমটি বেসাইনে সিন্ট্যাক্স-সচেতন সিস্টেম থেকে অনুবাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে বেসেলাইনের তুলনায় অনুবাদের অনুবাদের তুলনায় এটি আর সিন্যাক্স-সচেতনতার সিস্টেমের জন্য একটি ছোট মানুষের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'ca': "Presentam un mètode senzill d'incorporar informació sinàctica sobre el llenguatge alvo en un sistema de traducció neuronal traducint-nos en arbres electorals linearitzats i lexicalitzats. Un experiment sobre la tasca de traducció de notícies alemanya-anglès WMT16 va resultar en una millor puntuació BLEU en comparació amb un NMT basal sintaxi-agnòstic entrenat en el mateix conjunt de dades. Una anàlisi de les traduccions del sistema conscient de la sintaxi mostra que realitza més reorganització durant la traducció en comparació amb el basal. Una evaluació humana a petita escala també va mostrar un avantatge al sistema conscient de la sintaxi.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo jednostavnu metodu da uključimo sintaktične informacije o ciljnom jeziku u sistem prevoda neuronskih strojeva prevodeći se na linearno, leksikalizirano drveće. Eksperiment o zadatku za prevod njemačke-engleske vijesti WMT16 rezultirao je poboljšan rezultat BLEU-a u usporedbi sa sintaksičkom agnostičnom početnom linijom NMT-a obučenom na istom setu podataka. Analiza prevoda iz sustava svjesnog sintaksa pokazuje da radi više reorderinga tijekom prevoda u usporedbi sa početnom linijom. Mala procjena ljudske procjene također pokazala je prednost sistemu svijesti sintaksa.', 'et': 'Esitleme lihtsat meetodit sihtkeele süntaktilise informatsiooni lisamiseks neuromasintõlkesüsteemi, tõlkides lineaarsetesse, leksikaliseeritud valimisringkondade puudesse. WMT16 saksa-inglise uudiste tõlkimise ülesande eksperiment tõi tulemuseks parema BLEU skoori võrreldes sama andmekogumi alusel koolitatud süntaksiagnostilise NMT lähtetasemega. Süntaksiteadlikust süsteemist pärit tõlkete analüüs näitab, et tõlkimise ajal toimub see algväärtusega võrreldes rohkem ümberkorraldamist. Väikesemahuline inimeste hindamine näitas ka eelist süntaksiteadlikule süsteemile.', 'cs': 'Představujeme jednoduchou metodu začlenění syntaktických informací o cílovém jazyce do neuronového strojového překladu pomocí překladu do linearizovaných, lexikalizovaných volebních stromů. Experiment na německo-anglickém překladu zpráv WMT16 vedl ke zlepšení skóre BLEU ve srovnání se syntax-agnostickou NMT základnou trénovanou na stejné datové sadě. Analýza překladů ze systému s vědomím syntaxe ukazuje, že během překladu provádí více změn uspořádání ve srovnání s výchozí linií. Malé lidské hodnocení také ukázalo výhodu systému vědomého syntaxe.', 'fi': 'Esit채mme yksinkertaisen menetelm채n sis채llytt채채 syntaktista tietoa kohdekielest채 neurokonek채채nn철sj채rjestelm채채n k채채nt채m채ll채 lineaarisiksi, leksikalisoituiksi vaalipiiripuiksi. WMT16:n saksa-englanti-uutisk채채nn철steht채v채n kokeilu paransi BLEU-pisteit채 verrattuna syntaksiagnostiseen NMT-l채ht철tilanteeseen, joka oli koulutettu samasta aineistosta. Analyysi syntaksitietoisesta j채rjestelm채st채 saaduista k채채nn철ksist채 osoittaa, ett채 se suorittaa k채채nn철ksen aikana enemm채n uudelleenj채rjestelyj채 kuin perusaikataulu. Pienimittainen ihmisen arviointi osoitti my철s edun syntaksitietoiselle j채rjestelm채lle.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo preprosto metodo za vključitev sintaktičnih informacij o ciljnem jeziku v sistem nevronskega strojnega prevajanja s prevajanjem v linearizirana, leksikalizirana drevesa volilnih okrožij. Poskus na nalogi prevajanja novic v nemško-angleščini WMT16 je povzročil izboljšanje rezultata BLEU v primerjavi s sintakso agnostično osnovno vrednostjo NMT, usposobljeno na istem naboru podatkov. Analiza prevodov iz sistema, ki se zaveda sintakse, kaže, da med prevajanjem opravlja več preurejanja v primerjavi z osnovno vrednostjo. Majhna ocena človeka je pokazala tudi prednost sistemu, ki se zaveda sintakse.', 'ha': "We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees.  Wata jarraba na WMT16n aikin fassarar lãbãri na Jarman-Ingiriya ta ƙara wani gyãra na BLEU score idan da aka sammenliki da a sami'a na syntax-agnostic NMT Baselin da aka yi wa tsarin da ke samu. Ana yi anadi ga fassarar daga system-mai-haƙƙin na nuna cewa, yana tafiyar da sauri mafi girma a lokacin fassarar da aka sami zuwa basin. Ki rabon mutum ƙarami ko da ya nuna wani amfani da na'urar tamkar ta samu'i.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan kanggo nggawe informasi sistem sing nggawe tarjamahan karo alêr, ingkang sampeyan sistem kuwi ngrusaké tualah lineareng, kawula-sampeyan anyar. Wang nyong kapan karo perangkat sing nggawe wigatining German-Inggris Wanalèh kanggo tarjamahan ing sistem sing paling-awak dhéwé kuwi, kuwi njaluk sing bisa nguasai supoyatan ning tarjamahan kanggo nggerarané karo sistem sing bisa basa. Wanggang langgambar uwong sing wis ana karo sistem sing ngendalikno seneng nggambar.', 'he': 'We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees.  ניסוי על משימת התרגום של חדשות גרמנית-אנגלית WMT16 הוביל לתוצאה BLEU שיפור בהשוואה לבסיס NMT סינטקס-אגנוסטי מאומן באותו קבוצת נתונים. ניתוח של התרגשות מהמערכת מודעת לסינטקס מראה שהיא מבצעת שינוי יותר במהלך התרגשות בהשוואה לבסיס. הערכה אנושית קטנה גם הראה יתרון למערכת מודעת לסינטקס.', 'bo': 'We present a simple method to incorporate syntactic information about the target language in a neural machine translation system by translating into linearized, lexicalized constituency trees. An experiment on the WMT16 German-English news translation task resulted in an improved BLEU score when compared to a syntax-agnostic NMT baseline trained on the same dataset. དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ནས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚིག་ལས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ མ་ཟད་མ་ཞིབ་ཚད་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕར་སྤྱོད་གཅིག་ཡང་མངོན་འཆར་བྱུང་།'}
{'en': 'Learning Lexico-Functional Patterns for First-Person Affect', 'ar': 'تعلم الأنماط الوظيفية المعجمية لتأثير الشخص الأول', 'fr': "Apprentissage des modèles lexico-fonctionnels pour l'affect à la première personne", 'pt': 'Aprendendo Padrões Funcionais Léxico para Afeto em Primeira Pessoa', 'es': 'Aprender patrones léxico-funcionales para el afecto en primera persona', 'ja': '一人称視点の影響のためのレキシコ機能パターンの学習', 'zh': '学第一人称所染词汇功能模式', 'hi': 'प्रथम व्यक्ति के प्रभाव के लिए लेक्सिको-कार्यात्मक पैटर्न सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение лексико-функциональных паттернов воздействия от первого лица', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Pátrúin Fhoclóra-Feidhmiúla le haghaidh Tionchar Céad Duine', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μάθηση Λεξικό-Λειτουργικών Μοτίβων για το Πρώτο Πρόσωπο Επίδρασης', 'hu': 'Lexico-funkcionális minták első személyű érintettek tanulása', 'it': "Imparare modelli lessico-funzionali per l'impatto in prima persona", 'kk': 'Лексико- функциялық үлгілерді бірінші тәжірибе үшін оқыту', 'mk': 'Научи лексико- функционални шаблони за влијание на првата личност', 'lt': 'Mokymasis leksiniais ir funkciniais modeliais pirmojo asmens poveikiui', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കോ- ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d പാട്ടെര്\u200dണ്ണന്\u200dസ് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim ta’ Patterni Lessiko-Funzjonali għall-Affett tal-Ewwel Persuna', 'mn': 'Лексико-функцийн загвар сурах', 'no': 'Læring av lesekofunksjonsmønsterelement for første personeffekt', 'pl': 'Nauka wzorców funkcjonalnych Lexico dla efektu pierwszej osoby', 'ro': 'Învățarea modelelor Lexico-funcționale pentru afectarea primei persoane', 'sr': 'Učenje leksičkih-funkcionalnih uzorka za prvu osobu', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකෝ- ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Learning Lexico-Functional Patterns for First-Person Affect', 'sv': 'Lära sig Lexico-funktionella mönster för första person affekt', 'ta': 'Learning Lexico-Functional Patterns for First-Person Affect', 'ur': 'Lexico-Functional Patterns for First Person Effect', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học lại môi trường hoạt động ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Учене на лексико-функционални модели за въздействие от първо лице', 'hr': 'Učenje leksičkih funkcionalnih uzorka za prvu osobu', 'nl': 'Leren Lexico-Functionele Patronen voor First-Person Affect', 'da': 'Læring Lexico-funktionelle mønstre for førstepersons påvirkning', 'de': 'Lernen von Lexiko-Funktionsmustern für First-Person Affect', 'id': 'Mempelajari Pattern Fungsi-Lexico untuk Afeksi Person Pertama', 'ko': '일인칭 감정의 어휘 기능 모델을 배우다', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Wazalendo wa kazi wa Lexico', 'sq': 'Mësimi i modeleve leksiko-funksionale për ndikimin e personit të parë', 'tr': 'Birinci Şahsy Etkinlik üçin Leksiko-Funksiyonal Nusgalary öwrenmek', 'am': 'መጀመሪያ-Person Affect', 'hy': 'Առաջին անձի ազդեցության համար լեքսիկո-ֆունկցիոնալ մոդելներ սովորելը', 'az': 'İlk kişilik müsibəti üçün Leksiko-Funksiyonlu Şablonlar öyrənmək', 'bn': 'প্রথম- ব্যক্তিগত প্রভাবের জন্য লেক্সিকো- কার্যকর প্যাটার্ন শিখা', 'bs': 'Učenje leksičkih-funkcionalnih uzorka za prvu osobu', 'ca': "Aprendre patrons lèxico-funcionals per a l'afecte de la primera persona", 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمونه\u200cهای لکسیکو-عملکرد برای تاثیر اولین شخص', 'af': 'Name', 'cs': 'Učení se Lexiko-funkčních vzorů pro efekt první osoby', 'et': 'Lexico-funktsionaalsete mustrite õppimine esimese isiku mõju jaoks', 'fi': 'Lexicotoiminnallisten mallien oppiminen ensimmäisen persoonan vaikutuksiin', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד דפוסים פעילים לקסיקו לאדם ראשון', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje leksiko-funkcionalnih vzorcev za vpliv prve osebe', 'bo': 'Lexico-Functional གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་བསླབ་པའི་མི་དང་པོ་ནི་'}
{'en': 'Informal first-person narratives are a unique resource for computational models of everyday events and people’s affective reactions to them. People blogging about their day tend not to explicitly say I am happy. Instead they describe situations from which other humans can readily infer their affective reactions. However current sentiment dictionaries are missing much of the information needed to make similar inferences. We build on recent work that models affect in terms of lexical predicate functions and affect on the predicate’s arguments. We present a method to learn proxies for these functions from first-person narratives. We construct a novel fine-grained test set, and show that the patterns we learn improve our ability to predict first-person affective reactions to everyday events, from a Stanford sentiment baseline of.67F to.75F.', 'pt': 'Narrativas informais em primeira pessoa são um recurso único para modelos computacionais de eventos cotidianos e reações afetivas das pessoas a eles. As pessoas que escrevem sobre o seu dia tendem a não dizer explicitamente que estou feliz. Em vez disso, descrevem situações a partir das quais outros humanos podem inferir prontamente suas reações afetivas. No entanto, os dicionários de sentimentos atuais estão perdendo muitas das informações necessárias para fazer inferências semelhantes. Baseamos-nos em trabalhos recentes que os modelos afetam em termos de funções lexicais de predicados e afetam os argumentos do predicado. Apresentamos um método para aprender proxies para essas funções a partir de narrativas em primeira pessoa. Construímos um novo conjunto de testes refinados e mostramos que os padrões que aprendemos melhoram nossa capacidade de prever reações afetivas em primeira pessoa a eventos cotidianos, de uma linha de base de sentimento de Stanford de 0,67F a 0,75F.', 'ar': 'تعد الروايات غير الرسمية بضمير المتكلم مصدرًا فريدًا للنماذج الحسابية للأحداث اليومية وردود الفعل العاطفية للناس عليها. يميل الأشخاص الذين يدونون حول يومهم إلى عدم القول صراحة إنني سعيد. بدلاً من ذلك ، يصفون المواقف التي يمكن من خلالها للبشر الآخرين بسهولة استنتاج ردود أفعالهم العاطفية. ومع ذلك ، تفتقد قواميس المشاعر الحالية الكثير من المعلومات اللازمة لعمل استدلالات مماثلة. نحن نبني على العمل الأخير الذي تؤثر فيه النماذج من حيث وظائف المسند المعجمية وتؤثر على حجج المسند. نقدم طريقة لتعلم وكلاء لهذه الوظائف من سرد الشخص الأول. نحن نبني مجموعة اختبار جديدة دقيقة الحبيبات ، ونبين أن الأنماط التي نتعلمها تحسن قدرتنا على التنبؤ بردود الفعل العاطفية من منظور الشخص الأول على الأحداث اليومية ، من خط أساس المشاعر في ستانفورد .67 إلى .75 درجة فهرنهايت.', 'fr': "Les récits informels à la première personne constituent une ressource unique pour les modèles informatiques des événements de la vie quotidienne et des réactions affectives des personnes à ces événements. Les blogueurs à propos de leur journée ont tendance à ne pas dire explicitement que je suis heureux. Au lieu de cela, ils décrivent des situations à partir desquelles d'autres humains peuvent facilement déduire leurs réactions affectives. Cependant, les dictionnaires d'opinion actuels manquent de la plupart des informations nécessaires pour faire des déductions similaires. Nous nous appuyons sur des travaux récents selon lesquels les modèles affectent en termes de fonctions de prédicat lexical et affectent les arguments du prédicat. Nous présentons une méthode pour apprendre des proxys pour ces fonctions à partir de récits à la première personne. Nous construisons un nouvel ensemble de tests précis et montrons que les modèles que nous apprenons améliorent notre capacité à prédire les réactions affectives à la première personne aux événements quotidiens, à partir d'une base de référence de Stanford de 0,67F à 0,75F.", 'es': 'Las narrativas informales en primera persona son un recurso único para los modelos computacionales de los eventos cotidianos y las reacciones afectivas de las personas ante ellos. La gente que bloguea sobre su día tiende a no decir explícitamente que soy feliz. En cambio, describen situaciones de las que otros humanos pueden inferir fácilmente sus reacciones afectivas. Sin embargo, a los diccionarios de opinión actuales les falta gran parte de la información necesaria para hacer inferencias similares. Nos basamos en trabajos recientes en los que los modelos afectan en términos de funciones de predicado léxico y afectan a los argumentos del predicado. Presentamos un método para aprender sustitutos para estas funciones a partir de narrativas en primera persona. Construimos un conjunto de pruebas novedoso y detallado y mostramos que los patrones que aprendemos mejoran nuestra capacidad para predecir las reacciones afectivas en primera persona a los eventos cotidianos, desde una línea de base de sentimiento de Stanford de 0.67 F a .75 F.', 'ja': '非公式の一人称叙述は、日常的な事象の計算モデルと人々のそれらに対する情動的反応のためのユニークなリソースです。毎日ブログを書いている人は、私が幸せだと明言しない傾向があります。代わりに、他の人間が情動反応を容易に推論できる状況を説明します。しかし、現在のセンチメント辞書は、同様の推論を行うために必要な多くの情報を欠いています。私たちは、語彙述語関数の観点からモデルに影響を与え、述語の引数に影響を与える最近の研究に基づいて構築しています。これらの機能の代用を一人称的な物語から学習する方法を提示する。私たちは、新しい細かいテストセットを構築し、私たちが学ぶパターンが、日常的な事象に対する一人称の情動反応を予測する能力を向上させることを示しています。スタンフォードのセンチメントのベースラインは、.67 Fから.75 Fです。', 'ru': 'Неформальные нарративы от первого лица - это уникальный ресурс для вычислительных моделей повседневных событий и аффективных реакций людей на них. Люди, ведущие блог о своем дне, как правило, прямо не говорят, что я счастлив. Вместо этого они описывают ситуации, из которых другие люди могут легко вывести свои аффективные реакции. Однако в существующих словарях настроений отсутствует значительная часть информации, необходимой для того, чтобы сделать аналогичные выводы. Мы основываемся на недавних работах, которые модели влияют с точки зрения лексических предикатных функций и влияют на аргументы предиката. Предложен метод изучения прокси для этих функций из рассказов от первого лица. Мы создаем новый мелкозернистый тестовый набор и показываем, что модели, которые мы изучаем, улучшают нашу способность прогнозировать аффективные реакции от первого лица на повседневные события, от базового уровня Стэнфордских настроений от 0,67 до 0,75 F.', 'zh': '非正者第一人称叙事计模形及人情反应之特资也。 人书其博客日,往往不明说。 其他可以易推断出其情应者也。 然当时之情词典阙于推信。 吾以近事为基,因词汇谓词函数而建模之谓词参数。 举第一人称叙事受函数代法。 构一新细粒度试集,并明学式高吾占第一人称情感反应之能,从斯坦福大学之情基线为0.67F至0.75F。', 'hi': 'अनौपचारिक प्रथम-व्यक्ति कथाएं रोजमर्रा की घटनाओं के कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल और उनके लिए लोगों की भावात्मक प्रतिक्रियाओं के लिए एक अद्वितीय संसाधन हैं। अपने दिन के बारे में ब्लॉगिंग करने वाले लोग स्पष्ट रूप से यह नहीं कहते हैं कि मैं खुश हूं। इसके बजाय वे उन स्थितियों का वर्णन करते हैं जिनसे अन्य मनुष्य आसानी से अपनी भावात्मक प्रतिक्रियाओं का अनुमान लगा सकते हैं। हालांकि वर्तमान भावना शब्दकोशों को इसी तरह के अनुमान लगाने के लिए आवश्यक जानकारी का बहुत याद आ रहा है। हम हाल के काम पर निर्माण करते हैं जो मॉडल लेक्सिकल विधेय कार्यों के संदर्भ में प्रभावित करते हैं और विधेय के तर्कों को प्रभावित करते हैं। हम प्रथम-व्यक्ति कथाओं से इन कार्यों के लिए प्रॉक्सी सीखने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम एक उपन्यास ठीक-दाने वाले परीक्षण सेट का निर्माण करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि हम जो पैटर्न सीखते हैं, वे .67F से .75F तक स्टैनफोर्ड भावना बेसलाइन से रोजमर्रा की घटनाओं के लिए पहले व्यक्ति की भावात्मक प्रतिक्रियाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने की हमारी क्षमता में सुधार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is acmhainn uathúil iad insintí neamhfhoirmiúla den chéad duine le haghaidh samhlacha ríomhaireachtúla d’imeachtaí laethúla agus freagairtí mothúchánacha daoine ina leith. De ghnáth ní deir daoine atá ag blagáil faoina lá go bhfuilim sásta go soiléir. Ina áit sin déanann siad cur síos ar chásanna ónar féidir le daoine eile a n-imoibrithe mothaithe a thuiscint go héasca. Mar sin féin tá mórán den fhaisnéis atá de dhíth chun tátail chomhchosúla a dhéanamh in easnamh ar fhoclóirí meon reatha. Tógaimid ar obair le déanaí a mbíonn tionchar ag samhlacha i dtéarmaí feidhmeanna foclóireachta agus a théann i bhfeidhm ar argóintí an tuar. Cuirimid i láthair modh chun seachvótálaithe a fhoghlaim do na feidhmeanna seo ó insintí céad duine. Déanaimid tacar tástála mínghráinneach úrnua, agus léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn na patrúin a fhoghlaimímid ár gcumas frithghníomhartha mothachta an chéad duine ar imeachtaí laethúla a thuar, ó bhunlíne meon Stanford de .67F go .75F.', 'hu': 'Az informális első személyes narratívák egyedülálló forrást jelentenek a mindennapi események és az emberek érzelmi reakcióinak számítástechnikai modelljeinek. Az emberek a napjukról blogolnak nem mondják kifejezetten, hogy boldog vagyok. Ehelyett olyan helyzeteket írnak le, amelyekből más emberek könnyen következtethetik érzelmi reakcióikat. A jelenlegi hangulatszótárak azonban hiányznak a hasonló következtetésekhez szükséges információk nagy része. A legutóbbi munkákra építünk, amelyeket a modellek a lexikai predikátfüggvények szempontjából befolyásolnak és befolyásolnak a predikátus argumentumaira. Bemutatunk egy olyan módszert, amelynek segítségével első személyű narratívákból tanulhatjuk meg ezeket a funkciókat. Egy új finomszemcsés tesztkészletet építünk fel, és megmutatjuk, hogy az általunk tanult minták javítják a mindennapi eseményekre adott első személyű affektív reakciók megjósolásának képességét, a Stanford érzelmi alapja 0,67F és 0,75F.', 'el': 'Οι άτυπες αφηγήσεις πρώτου προσώπου αποτελούν έναν μοναδικό πόρο για υπολογιστικά μοντέλα καθημερινών γεγονότων και των συναισθηματικών αντιδράσεων των ανθρώπων σε αυτά. Οι άνθρωποι που γράφουν για την ημέρα τους τείνουν να μην λένε ρητά ότι είμαι χαρούμενος. Αντίθετα περιγράφουν καταστάσεις από τις οποίες άλλοι άνθρωποι μπορούν εύκολα να συμπεράνουν τις συναισθηματικές τους αντιδράσεις. Ωστόσο, τα τρέχοντα λεξικά συναισθημάτων λείπουν πολλές από τις πληροφορίες που απαιτούνται για να βγάλουν παρόμοια συμπεράσματα. Βασιζόμαστε σε πρόσφατη εργασία που τα μοντέλα επηρεάζουν από την άποψη των λεξικών υπαρκτικών συναρτήσεων και επηρεάζουν τα επιχειρήματα του υπαρκτού. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο εκμάθησης αντιπροσώπων για αυτές τις λειτουργίες από αφηγήσεις πρώτου προσώπου. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο λεπτόκοκκο σετ δοκιμών, και δείχνουμε ότι τα μοτίβα που μαθαίνουμε βελτιώνουν την ικανότητά μας να προβλέψουμε συναισθηματικές αντιδράσεις πρώτου προσώπου σε καθημερινά γεγονότα, από μια βάση συναισθημάτων του Στάνφορντ από .67έως .75Φ.', 'ka': 'ინფორმალური პირველი ადამიანის პარატიგები უნიკალური რესურსი ყოველდღე მოვლენების კომპუტაციალური მოდელებისთვის და ადამიანის შესაძლებელი რეაქციებისთვის. ადამიანები, რომლებიც ბლოგურებენ თავის დღეს, არ უნდა ვთქვათ, რომ მე ღახალი ვარ. შემდეგ ისინი აღწერენ სიტუაციები, რომლებიდან სხვა ადამიანები შეუძლიათ წარმოადგენოთ თავისი შესაძლებელი რეაქციები. მაგრამ მიმდინარე სენტიმენტის სიტყვარები ძალიან არსებობს მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციაში, რომელიც უნდა გავაკეთოთ სხვა ინფორმაცია. ჩვენ ახალი სამუშაო დავაკეთებთ, რომ მოდელები ლექსიკალური პრედიკალური ფუნქციების შესახებ გააკეთებენ და გააკეთებენ პრედიკალური არგუნქცი ჩვენ ჩვენ პირველი ადამიანის სიტყვებისგან პროქსის შესწავლობას მეტი. ჩვენ პრომენტის კონფიგურაციული ტესტის სენტი შექმნა და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენ ვისწავლეთ ჩვენი შესაძლებლობა გაუწვება პირველი ადამიანის განახლებელი რეაქციები ყოველდღე მოვლენებზე, სტანფორდის სენტიმენ', 'it': 'Le narrazioni informali in prima persona sono una risorsa unica per modelli computazionali degli eventi quotidiani e delle reazioni affettive delle persone ad essi. La gente che scrive sulla propria giornata tende a non dire esplicitamente che sono felice. Invece descrivono situazioni da cui altri esseri umani possono facilmente dedurre le loro reazioni affettive. Tuttavia gli attuali dizionari sentimental mancano molte delle informazioni necessarie per trarre conclusioni simili. Costruiamo su lavori recenti che i modelli influenzano in termini di funzioni lessicali dei predicati e influenzano gli argomenti del predicato. Presentiamo un metodo per imparare i proxy per queste funzioni dalle narrazioni in prima persona. Costruiamo un nuovo set di test a grana fine, e mostriamo che i modelli che impariamo migliorano la nostra capacità di prevedere reazioni affettive in prima persona agli eventi quotidiani, da un valore di base del sentiment Stanford di 0,67F a 0,75F.', 'lt': 'Neoficialios pirmojo asmens istorijos yra unikalus kasdienių įvykių skaičiavimo modelių ir žmonių jautrių reakcijų į juos išteklius. Žmonės, bloguojantys apie savo dieną, paprastai nenurodo, kad esu laimingas. Vietoj to jie apibūdina situacijas, iš kurių kiti žmonės gali lengvai daryti išvadą apie savo pažeidžiamas reakcijas. Tačiau dabartiniams jausmų žodynams trūksta daug informacijos, reikalingos panašioms išvadoms padaryti. Mes remiamės pastaruoju metu atliktu darbu, kuriame modeliai daro poveikį tekstinėms sudėtingoms funkcijoms ir daro poveikį tekstinėms argumentams. We present a method to learn proxies for these functions from first-person narratives.  Sukursime naują švelniagrūdinį bandymų rinkinį ir parodysime, kad modeliai, kuriuos mes išmokome, gerina mūsų gebėjimą prognozuoti pirmojo asmens reakcijas į kasdienius įvykius, nuo Stanfordo jausmų pradinės vertės nuo .67F iki .75F.', 'mk': 'Неформалните приказни за првата личност се уникатен ресурс за компјутерските модели на секојдневните настани и љубезните реакции на луѓето кон нив. Луѓето кои блогираат за нивниот ден обично не велат дека сум среќен. Наместо тоа тие опишуваат ситуации од кои другите луѓе можат лесно да ги заклучат своите афективни реакции. Сепак, моменталните речници за чувства недостасуваат многу од информациите потребни за да се направат слични конференции. Ние изградуваме на неодамнешната работа која моделите влијаат во однос на лексичките предикатни функции и влијаат на аргументите на предикатот. Презентираме метод за учење прокси за овие функции од приказните на првата личност. Конструираме нов тестовен сет, и покажуваме дека шемите кои ги научиме ја подобруваат нашата способност да ги предвидеме првите реакции на секојдневните настани, од почетокот на сентиментот на Стенфорд од .67F до .75F.', 'kk': 'Мәлімгі бірінші адамның түсініктері - күнделік оқиғалардың есептеу үлгілерінің бірнеше ресурсы және адамдардың әсер етпейтін түсініктері. Күні туралы блог жасайтын адамдар мені бақытты деп айтпайды. Бұл орнына басқа адамдар өзінің әсер етпейтін реакцияларын оқытуға болады. Бірақ қазіргі сезімдік сөздіктері ұқсас жасау үшін керек мәліметтің көп жоқ. Біз жаңа жұмыстар үлгілерді лексикалық предикциялық функциялардың қасиетіне әсер етеді және предикциялық аргументтеріне әсер етеді. Біз бұл функцияларды бірінші адамның түсініктерінен прокси оқыту әдісін таңдаймыз. Біз романдық жақсы тест жиынын құрып, бірінші адамдың күнделік оқиғаларға әсер етпейтін әрекеттерді көрсету мүмкіндіктерімізді үйренеміз, Станфорд сезімінің негізгі шегінен 67F-75F-ге қарай жеткізетін.', 'ms': 'Ceritasi informal orang pertama adalah sumber unik untuk model perhitungan peristiwa sehari-hari dan reaksi kasih sayang orang kepada mereka. Orang-orang yang blog tentang hari mereka cenderung tidak secara jelas mengatakan saya gembira. Sebaliknya, mereka menggambarkan situasi yang mana manusia lain boleh menyimpulkan reaksi kasih sayang mereka. Namun kamus sentimen semasa hilang sebahagian besar maklumat yang diperlukan untuk membuat kesimpulan yang sama. Kami membangun pada kerja baru-baru ini bahawa model mempengaruhi dalam terma fungsi predikasi leksikal dan mempengaruhi argumen predikasi. We present a method to learn proxies for these functions from first-person narratives.  Kita membina set ujian yang bagus dan menunjukkan corak yang kita belajar meningkatkan kemampuan kita untuk meramalkan reaksi afektif orang pertama kepada peristiwa sehari-hari, dari dasar sentimen Stanford dari .67F hingga .75F.', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ ദിവസങ്ങളുടെയും കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ആദ്യ വ്യക്തിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആളുകള്\u200d തങ്ങളുടെ ദിവസത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വ്യാജമാക്കുന്നു എനിക്ക് സന്തോഷം തന്നെ മറ്റു മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് അവയുടെ പ്രഭാവിക പ്രതികരണങ്ങളെ എളുപ്പമാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d അവര്\u200d വിവര എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ നിയന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുപോലുള്ള രോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളി അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. മോഡലുകള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ബാധിക ആദ്യമനുഷ്യരുടെ കഥകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രോക്സികള്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയുണ്ട്. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ സെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ആദ്യത്തെ സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതികരിക്ക', 'pl': 'Nieformalne narracje pierwszej osoby są unikalnym źródłem obliczeniowych modeli codziennych wydarzeń i reakcji afektywnych ludzi na nie. Ludzie blogujący o swoim dniu nie mówią wyraźnie, że jestem szczęśliwy. Zamiast tego opisują sytuacje, z których inni ludzie mogą łatwo wywnioskować swoje reakcje afektywne. Jednak obecne słowniki sentymentów brakuje wielu informacji potrzebnych do wyciągnięcia podobnych wniosków. Opieramy się na ostatnich pracach, które modele wpływają pod względem funkcji predykatów leksykalnych i wpływają na argumenty predykatu. Przedstawiamy metodę uczenia się proxy tych funkcji z narracji pierwszej osoby. Budujemy nowy zestaw drobnoziarnistych testów i pokazujemy, że wzorce, które się uczymy, poprawiają naszą zdolność do przewidywania reakcji afektywnych pierwszej osoby na codzienne wydarzenia, od podstawy sentymentu Stanforda od .67F do .75F.', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн анхны түүх нь өдөр тутмын үйл явдлын тооцоололтын загварууд болон хүмүүсийн нөлөөлдөг урвалууд юм. Хүмүүс өөрсдийн өдрийн талаар блог хийдэг нь намайг аз жаргалтай гэж хэлж чадахгүй. Үүний оронд бусад хүмүүс өөрсдийнхөө нөлөөлдөг урвалыг амархан халдварлаж чадах нөхцөлийг тайлбарладаг. Гэвч одоогийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үгсэлтүүд ихэнхдээ төстэй төвөгтэй мэдээллийг алдаж байна. Бид саяхан ажил дээр загвар нь лектикийн алдартай функцуудын тухай нөлөөлдөг бөгөөд алдартай аргументуудын тухай нөлөөлдөг. Бид эдгээр функцуудыг анхны түүхийн тухай суралцах аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид шинэ шинэ шалгалтыг бүтээж, анхны хүний өдөр тутмын урвалд нөлөөлдөг үйл явдлыг таамаглах чадварыг суралцаж, Стэнфордын сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс 67F хүртэл 75F хүртэл хөгжүүлэх шалгалтыг сайжруулж байна.', 'no': 'Informalt første personnarrativ er ein unikt ressurs for datamaskinen av kvardag hendingar og folkens påvirkningsreaksjonar til dei. Folk som blogger om dagen deres har tendens ikkje å seie at eg er lykkeleg. I staden beskriver dei situasjonar som andre mennesker kan løyse opp sine påverka reaksjonar. Likevel manglar gjeldande sentimentordbok mykje av informasjonen nødvendig for å gjera liknande inferensningar. Vi bygger på nyleg arbeid at modeller påvirkar i uttrykk av leksiske predikative funksjonar og påvirkar på predikarte argument. Vi presenterer ein metode for å lære mellomtenar for desse funksjonane frå første personnarrativ. Vi konstruerer eit nytt fin-korn testsett, og viser at mønsterene vi lærer å forbedra våre kapasiteten for å foregå første personer påvirkar reaksjonar til kvardag hendingar, frå ein Stanford sentiment baseline av .67F til .75F.', 'ro': 'Narațiunile informale de primă persoană reprezintă o resursă unică pentru modelele computaționale ale evenimentelor cotidiene și ale reacțiilor afective ale oamenilor la ele. Oamenii care blogează despre ziua lor tind să nu spună explicit că sunt fericită. În schimb, ele descriu situații din care alți oameni pot deduce cu ușurință reacțiile lor afective. Cu toate acestea, dicționarele sentimentale actuale lipsesc o mare parte din informațiile necesare pentru a face concluzii similare. Construim pe lucrările recente pe care modelele le afectează din punct de vedere al funcțiilor predicatului lexical și influențează argumentele predicatului. Vă prezentăm o metodă de a învăța proxy-uri pentru aceste funcții din narațiuni de prima persoană. Construim un nou set de teste cu granule fine și arătăm că modelele pe care le învățăm ne îmbunătățesc capacitatea de a prezice reacțiile afective la prima persoană la evenimentele cotidiene, de la o valoare de referință a sentimentului Stanford de 0,67F la 0,75F.', 'sr': 'Neformalne priče prve osobe su jedinstveni resurs za računalne modele svakodnevnih događaja i ljudske uticajne reakcije na njih. Ljudi koji bloguju o svom danu ne kažu da sam sreæan. Umjesto toga opisuju situacije iz kojih drugi ljudi mogu lako zaraziti svoje utjecajne reakcije. Međutim, trenutne reči sentimenta nedostaju mnogo informacija potrebnih za slične inferencije. Napravljamo na nedavnom poslu koji modeli utiču na leksičke predikatne funkcije i utiču na predikatne argumente. Predstavljamo metodu da naučimo proksije za ove funkcije iz priče o prvoj osobi. Napravili smo novi komplet finog zrnca test a i pokazujemo da obrasce koje naučimo poboljšavaju našu sposobnost da predviđamo prvu osobu uticajne reakcije na svakodnevne događaje, od početne linije sentimenta Stanforda od 67F do 75F.', 'so': 'Wargelinta qofka ugu horeeya waa noocyada dhacdooyinka xisaabta iyo waxyaabaha saameyn ku leh ee dadka. Dadku waxey si cad u yidhaahdaan waan farxay. Halkaas waxaa ka bedela xaaladaha ay dadka kale si fudud ugu saameyn karaan jawaabahooda saameysan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaad badan oo loo baahan yahay in la sameeyo cuduro isku mid ah. Waxaynu dhisnaa shaqada la soo dhowaaday, kaas oo modeladu saameyn ku yeelan karo shuqullada leksikada iyo saameyn ku yeelan karo arrimaha la doortay. Waxaynu keennaa qaab aan ku barno xilliyadan oo ay ka timaadaan sheekooyinka qofka hore. Waxaynu dhisnaa saxda baaritaanka si fiican loo tijaabiyey, waxaana tusaynaa qaababka aan ku barno inuu horumariyo awoodkeenna aan ka hor dhigno dhacdooyinka qofka ugu horeeya ee dhacdooyinka maalin walba, taasoo ka horeysa fikrada Stanford ilaa .67F-75F.', 'sv': 'Informella f철rstapersonsber채ttelser 채r en unik resurs f철r ber채kningsmodeller av vardagliga h채ndelser och m채nniskors k채nslom채ssiga reaktioner p책 dem. Folk som bloggar om sin dag brukar inte uttryckligen s채ga att jag 채r glad. Ist채llet beskriver de situationer fr책n vilka andra m채nniskor l채tt kan h채rleda sina k채nslom채ssiga reaktioner. Men nuvarande sentimentordb철cker saknar mycket av den information som beh철vs f철r att g철ra liknande slutsatser. Vi bygger vidare p책 det senaste arbetet som modeller p책verkar i termer av lexikala predikatfunktioner och p책verkar predikats argument. Vi presenterar en metod f철r att l채ra sig proxies f철r dessa funktioner fr책n f철rstapersonsber채ttelser. Vi konstruerar en ny finkornig testupps채ttning, och visar att de m철nster vi l채r oss f철rb채ttrar v책r f철rm책ga att f철ruts채ga f철rsta persons affektiva reaktioner p책 vardagliga h채ndelser, fr책n en Stanford sentiment baseline p책 0,67F till 0,75F.', 'ur': 'غیر معمولی پہلی شخص کی کہانیاں ہر روزی حادثہ کی کمپیوٹریشن موڈلیوں کے لئے ایک مختلف منبع ہیں اور لوگوں کی ان کے بارے میں اثر اثر اثر انگیزی. لوگوں نے اپنے دن کے بارے میں بلاگ کیا ہے وہ صریح طور پر نہیں کہتے کہ میں خوش ہوں۔ اس عوض یہ لوگ ایسی موقعیتیں بیان کرتے ہیں جن سے دوسرے انسان ان ان کے اثرات واکنش آسان کر سکتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ موجود احساسات لکھانے کے لئے بہت سی معلومات گم ہوتی ہیں۔ ہم اچھے کاموں پر بناتے ہیں کہ موڈل لکسیکی پیشڈیکٹ فونکس کے مطابق اثر دیتے ہیں اور پیشڈیکٹ کے معاملات پر اثر دیتے ہیں. ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ پہلی شخص کی کہانیاں سے ان کے لئے پروکسی سکھائیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی مصنوعی دانے کی تست سٹ بنائی ہے اور دکھائی ہے کہ ہمارے پٹرنے کو پہلی شخص کی روزہ حادثوں پر اثر دینے کی قابلیت پہنچا سکتی ہے، اسٹنسفورد کا احساس بنیس لین سے .67F تک .75F تک۔', 'ta': 'நாள் நிகழ்வுகளின் கணக்கிட மாதிரிகளுக்கு தகவல் முதல் நபர் செய்திகள் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட மூலம் ஆகும் மற்றும் மக்களின் பாதிப்பு விளை மக்கள் தங்கள் நாள் பற்றி வாங்குகிறார்கள் வெளிப்படையாக நான் மகிழ்ச்சியாக இருக்கிறேன் என்று கூ அதற்கு பதிலாக அவர்கள் விளக்குகிறார்கள் மற்ற மனிதர்கள் எளிதாக அவர்களுடைய பாதிப்பு விளைவுகளை பாதிக்க முட ஆனால் தற்போதைய உணர்வு அகராதிகள் போன்ற நோய்களை செய்ய வேண்டிய தகவல்களில் பெரும்பாலானது. நாம் சமீபத்தில் வேலையில் கட்டுகிறோம் மாதிரிகள் லெக்சிக்சியல் குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாடுகளை பாதிக்கும் மற்றும் க இந்த செயல்பாடுகளை முதல் நபர் கதைகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு முறையை நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம். நாம் ஒரு புதைய சோதனையை உருவாக்கி, மற்றும் நாம் கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கும் வடிவங்களை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம் முதல் நபர் தாக்கும் விளைவுகளை ஒவ்வொரு நாளுக்கும்', 'mt': "Narattivi informali tal-ewwel persuna huma riżorsa unika għal mudelli komputattivi ta’ avvenimenti ta’ kuljum u r-reazzjonijiet affettivi tan-nies għalihom. In-nies li jagħmlu blogging dwar il-jum tagħhom għandhom it-tendenza li ma jgħidux espliċitament li jien kuntent. Instead they describe situations from which other humans can readily infer their affective reactions.  Madankollu, id-dikjararji tas-sentimenti attwali huma nieqsa ħafna mill-informazzjoni meħtieġa biex isiru inferenzi simili. Aħna nibnu fuq xogħol reċenti li mudelli jaffettwaw f'termini ta' funzjonijiet predikati lexiċi u jaffettwaw fuq l-argumenti tal-predikat. Aħna nippreżentaw metodu biex nitgħallmu proċessi għal dawn il-funzjonijiet minn narrattivi tal-ewwel persuna. Aħna nibnu sett ġdid ta’ testijiet b’ħbub irfini, u nuru li x-xejriet li nitgħallmu jtejbu l-abbiltà tagħna li nipprojbixxu reazzjonijiet affettivi għall-ewwel persuna għall-avvenimenti ta’ kuljum, minn linja bażi tas-sentimenti ta’ Stanford ta’ .67F sa .75F.", 'si': 'මුලින් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ කතාවක් තමයි හැමදායකින් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පරිගණනය විදියට පරික්ෂා විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200d මිනිස්සු ඔවුන්ගේ දවස ගැන බ්ලෝග් කරනවා කියලා මම සතුටුයි කියලා කියන්නෙ නෑ. ඒ වෙනුවෙන් ඔවුන් අනිත් මිනිස්සුන්ට ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප කොහොමත් ප්\u200dරස්තූත වාර්තාවක් සංවේදනය අතුරුදන් වෙනවා වගේ සංවේදනය කරන්න. අපි අලුත් වැඩේ නිර්මාණය කරනවා මොඩල් ලෙක්සිකල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා ඒ අපි මුලින් මිනිස්සු කතාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරොක්සියක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරක්සියක් තියෙනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා, ස්ටෑන්ෆෝර්ඩ් වලින් .67F වලින් .75F වලින් ප්\u200dරධානයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්න, අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරධ', 'uz': "Birinchi odamning haqida maʼlumotlar har kuni hamma hodisalar modellarining qismi va odamlar ularning muammolari uchun unik manbalar. Odamlar o'z kuni haqida bog'langan odamlar shaxsiy deb aytmaydi. Ular o'rniga boshqa odamlar o'zgarishlarni o'zgartira oladigan holatlarni anglatadi. Lekin ҳозирги sentiment lugʻatlari esa huddi kasalliklarni yaratish uchun kerakli maʼlumot yoʻq. Yaqinda ishga tushunamiz, bu modellar leksikal prekat funksiyatlariga qo'yiladi va predikatlarning argumentlariga qo'llaniladi. Biz bu funksiyatlarni birinchi odamning qismlaridan o'rganish uchun proksini o'rganish usulni hozir qilamiz. Biz yaxshi ajoyib tashqi tizimni yaratib, va biz har kuni qo'shish uchun birinchi odamni ko'rganamiz qobiliyatni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, Stanford hisobotidan .67F va .75F asosidagi birinchi odamni ko'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Những lời kể ngắn gọn của người đầu là một tài nguyên duy nhất cho các mô hình tính to án của các s ự kiện hàng ngày và phản ứng tâm lý. Người ta viết blog về ngày của họ thường không nói rõ ràng rằng tôi đang hạnh phúc. Thay vào đó, họ miêu tả những tình huống mà con người có thể dễ dàng kết luận các phản ứng cảm xúc. Tuy nhiên các từ điển tình cảm hiện tại đang thiếu rất nhiều thông tin cần thiết để đưa ra kết quả tương tự. Chúng tôi xây dựng dựa trên những công việc gần đây mà các mô- đun ảnh hưởng đến các chức năng khó khăn từ vựng và ảnh hưởng tới các đối tượng khó khăn. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để học các dự án dựa trên những nhân vật đầu tiên. Chúng tôi xây dựng một tập thử nghiệm mới, và cho thấy những mẫu chúng tôi học cải thiện khả năng dự đoán phản ứng cảm động của người đầu tiên với các sự kiện hàng ngày, từ một cơ sở của cảm xúc Stanford của.67F đến.75F.', 'bg': 'Неформалните разкази от първо лице са уникален ресурс за изчислителни модели на ежедневните събития и афективните реакции на хората към тях. Хората, които блогат за деня си, не казват изрично, че съм щастлива. Вместо това те описват ситуации, от които други хора могат лесно да заключат своите афективни реакции. Въпреки това настоящите речници на сентимента липсва голяма част от информацията, необходима за извършване на подобни изводи. Ние изграждаме върху скорошна работа, която моделите влияят от гледна точка на лексикалните предикатни функции и влияят върху аргументите на предиката. Представяме метод за изучаване на проксии за тези функции от разкази от първо лице. Ние конструираме нов финокръвен тест комплект и показваме, че моделите, които научаваме подобряват способността ни да предвиждаме емоционални реакции от първо лице към ежедневните събития, от Станфордска сентиментална база от 0.67F до 0.75F.', 'nl': 'Informele first-person verhalen zijn een unieke bron voor computermodellen van alledaagse gebeurtenissen en de affectieve reacties van mensen daarop. Mensen die bloggen over hun dag hebben de neiging niet expliciet te zeggen dat ik blij ben. In plaats daarvan beschrijven ze situaties waaruit andere mensen gemakkelijk hun affectieve reacties kunnen afleiden. In de huidige sentimentwoordenboeken ontbreekt echter veel informatie die nodig is om vergelijkbare conclusies te trekken. We bouwen voort op recent werk dat modellen beïnvloeden in termen van lexicale predicaatfuncties en beïnvloeden op de argumenten van het predicaat. We presenteren een methode om proxies voor deze functies te leren van first-person narratives. We bouwen een nieuwe fijnkorrelige testset en laten zien dat de patronen die we leren ons vermogen verbeteren om affectieve reacties van eerste persoon op alledaagse gebeurtenissen te voorspellen, van een Stanford sentiment baseline van .67F tot .75F.', 'da': 'Uformelle førstepersonsfortællinger er en unik ressource til beregningsmodeller af hverdagsbegivenheder og folks affektive reaktioner på dem. Folk der blogger om deres dag har tendens til ikke udtrykkeligt at sige, at jeg er glad. I stedet beskriver de situationer, hvorfra andre mennesker let kan udlede deres affektive reaktioner. Men nuværende sentimentordbøger mangler meget af de oplysninger, der er nødvendige for at gøre lignende konklusioner. Vi bygger videre på nyligt arbejde, som modeller påvirker i form af leksikalske prædikatfunktioner og påvirker prædikatets argumenter. Vi præsenterer en metode til at lære proxies for disse funktioner fra førstepersons fortællinger. Vi konstruerer et nyt finkornet testsæt, og viser, at de mønstre, vi lærer, forbedrer vores evne til at forudsige førstepersons affektive reaktioner på hverdagsbegivenheder, fra en Stanford sentiment baseline på .67F til .75F.', 'hr': 'Neformalne priče prve osobe su jedinstveni resurs za računalne modele svakodnevnih događaja i ljudske utjecajne reakcije na njih. Ljudi koji bloguju o svom danu ne govore da sam sretna. Umjesto toga opisuju situacije iz kojih drugi ljudi mogu lako inferirati svoje utjecajne reakcije. Međutim, trenutne riječi osjećaja nedostaju mnogo informacija potrebnih za slične inferencije. Nalazimo na nedavnom poslu koji se modeli utječu na leksičke predikatne funkcije i utječu na predikatne argumente. Predstavljamo metodu da naučimo proksije za te funkcije iz priče o prvoj osobi. Napravili smo nov komplet ispitivanja, i pokazujemo da obrasce koje naučimo poboljšavaju sposobnost predviđanja prve osobe utjecajnih reakcija na svakodnevne događaje, od početne linije osjećanja Stanford a od 67F do 75F.', 'de': 'Informelle First-Person-Erzählungen sind eine einzigartige Ressource für computergestützte Modelle alltäglicher Ereignisse und affektiver Reaktionen von Menschen darauf. Leute, die über ihren Tag bloggen, neigen dazu, nicht explizit zu sagen, dass ich glücklich bin. Stattdessen beschreiben sie Situationen, aus denen andere Menschen leicht ihre affektiven Reaktionen ableiten können. In aktuellen Sentiment Wörterbüchern fehlen jedoch viele Informationen, die für ähnliche Schlussfolgerungen erforderlich sind. Wir bauen auf neueren Arbeiten auf, die Modelle in Bezug auf lexikalische Prädikatfunktionen und auf die Argumente des Prädikats beeinflussen. Wir stellen eine Methode vor, Proxies für diese Funktionen aus Ego-Person-Erzählungen zu lernen. Wir konstruieren ein neuartiges, feinkörniges Testset und zeigen, dass die erlernten Muster unsere Fähigkeit verbessern, First-Person-affektive Reaktionen auf alltägliche Ereignisse vorherzusagen, von einer Stanford Sentiment Baseline von .67F bis .75F.', 'id': 'Cerita informal orang pertama adalah sumber daya unik untuk model komputasi peristiwa sehari-hari dan reaksi afektif orang kepada mereka. Orang-orang yang blog tentang hari mereka cenderung tidak secara eksplicit mengatakan saya bahagia. Sebaliknya mereka menggambarkan situasi dari mana manusia lain dapat dengan mudah menyimpulkan reaksi afektif mereka. Namun kamus sentimen saat ini hilang banyak informasi yang diperlukan untuk membuat kesimpulan yang sama. Kami membangun pada pekerjaan baru-baru ini bahwa model mempengaruhi dalam terma fungsi predikasi lexik dan mempengaruhi argumen predikasi. Kami mempersembahkan metode untuk belajar proksi untuk fungsi ini dari cerita orang pertama. Kita membangun set tes yang baru, dan menunjukkan bahwa pola yang kita pelajari meningkatkan kemampuan kita untuk memprediksi reaksi afektif orang pertama pada peristiwa sehari-hari, dari dasar sentimen Stanford dari .67F sampai .75F.', 'ko': '비공식 1인칭 서사는 일상적인 사건 계산 모델과 사람들의 감정에 대한 독특한 자원이다.블로그에 하루를 쓰는 사람들은 종종 내가 즐겁다고 명확하게 말하지 않는다.반대로 그들은 다른 사람들이 그들의 감정 반응을 쉽게 추측할 수 있는 상황을 묘사했다.그러나 현재의 정서 사전은 유사한 추측을 하기 위해 필요한 많은 정보가 부족하다.우리는 최근의 작업에서 이러한 작업은 어휘 술어 함수와 술어 파라미터의 측면에서 모델에 영향을 미친다.우리는 일인칭 서술에서 이 함수들을 배우는 대리하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 스탠퍼드 정서 기선의 0.67F에서 0.75F까지 1인칭 일상 사건에 대한 감정 반응을 예측하는 능력을 향상시키는 새로운 세립도 테스트집을 구축했다.', 'fa': 'داستان اولین شخص غیر معمولی یک منبع متفاوتی برای مدل های کامپیوتری روزانه و واکنش های تاثیر مردم به آنها هستند. مردم در مورد روزشان بلاگ می\u200cکنند، نمی\u200cگویند که من خوشحالم. به جای اینکه وضعیت های دیگر را توصیف می کنند که مردم می توانند به آسانی واکنش های تاثیر خود را آلوده کنند. ولی کلمات احساسات فعلی بسیاری از اطلاعات لازم است که برای ساختن مشابهی مشابهی وجود دارد. ما روی کارهای اخیر ساختیم که مدل ها به عنوان تاثیر عملکرد پیشدیک زبانی تأثیر می دهند و بر ارائه های پیشدیک تأثیر می دهند. ما یک روش برای یاد گرفتن پراکسی برای این عملکرد را از داستان اولین شخص نشان می دهیم. ما یک مجموعه آزمایش آزمایش خوب ساختیم و نشان می دهیم که الگوهایی که یاد می گیریم توانایی اولین نفر را برای پیش بینی کردن واکنش های تاثیرگذاری به رویدادهای روزانه، از یک خط پایین احساس استنفورد از .67F تا .75F بهتر کنیم.', 'sq': 'Historitë informale të personit të parë janë një burim unik për modelet llogaritëse të ngjarjeve të përditshme dhe reagimet afektive të njerëzve ndaj tyre. Njerëzit që blogojnë për ditën e tyre kanë tendencë të mos thonë shprehësisht se jam i lumtur. Në vend të kësaj ata përshkruajnë situata nga të cilat njerëzit e tjerë mund të përfundojnë lehtë reagimet e tyre afektive. Megjithatë fjalorët e ndjenjave aktuale mungon shumë nga informacioni i nevojshëm për të bërë përfundime të ngjashme. Ne ndërtojmë në punën e fundit që modelet ndikojnë në lidhje me funksionet lexike të predikuara dhe ndikojnë në argumentet e predikuarit. Ne paraqesim një metodë për të mësuar proxy për këto funksione nga tregimet e personit të parë. Ne ndërtojmë një sërë test të hollë dhe tregojmë se modelet që mësojmë përmirësojnë aftësinë tonë për të parashikuar reagimet afektive të personit të parë ndaj ngjarjeve të përditshme, nga një bazë e ndjenjave të Stanfordit nga .67F në .75F.', 'sw': 'Simulizi za taarifa za mtu wa kwanza ni rasilimali ya kipekee kwa mifano ya hisabati ya matukio ya kila siku na miitikio ya watu yanayowathiri. Watu wanablogu kuhusu siku zao hawapendi kusema kwa uwazi kuwa ninafurahia. Badala yake wanaelezea hali ambazo binadamu wengine wanaweza kusababisha miitikio yao. Hata hivyo, lugha za sasa zinakosa taarifa nyingi zinazohitajika kutengeneza maambukizi yanayofanana. Tunajenga kwenye kazi za hivi karibuni ambazo mifano inaathiri kwa mujibu wa shughuli za utabiri za lexico na kuathiri hoja za utabiri. Tunatoa mbinu ya kujifunza proksi kwa kazi hizi kutoka hadithi za mtu wa kwanza. Tunajenga seti ya riwaya yenye uchunguzi mzuri, na kuonyesha kwamba miundo tunayojifunza kuboresha uwezo wetu wa kutabiri matukio ya mtu wa kwanza yanayoathiri kila siku, kutoka kwenye msingi wa hisia za Stanford hadi .67F hadi .75F.', 'tr': 'Hemme bilimsel birinji adam hekaýatlar günlük nusgalaryň hasaplanjak nusgalarynyň we adamlaryň täsirli nusgalarynyň özlerine meýilleşdirýän çeşmeleridir. Adamlar günleri barada blogging edýänler meniň bagytlygymy aýtmaýarlar. Bunun yerine diğer insanların etkileşimli tepkilerini kolayca bulabileceği durumları anlatırlar. Ýöne häzirki duýgym sözleri meňzeş bir şekilde çykarmak üçin gerekli maglumatyň köpüsi ýok. Ýakyndaky işe görä modeller leksiýaly öň-öňkili fonksiýalary aňladýar we öňkili argumentlere täsirleýäris. Birinji kişiniň hekaýatlardan proksiler öwrenmek üçin bir yöntem görkezýäris. Biz romanyň gowy görnüş testi düzenini inşa edýäris we ilkinji adamyň günlük bolup geçýän işlerini öwrenip bilmegimizi başaraýan şekilleri , Stanford duýgularyň üssünden 67F we 75F-a çenli hasaplamagyndan gowy görýäris.', 'hy': 'Առաջին անձի ոչ տեղեկատվական պատմությունները յուրահատուկ ռեսուրսներ են առօրյա իրադարձությունների հաշվարկների մոդելների և մարդկանց ազդեցիկ ռեակցիաների համար: Մարդիկ, ովքեր բլոգում են իրենց օրվա մասին, հակված չեն բացահայտորեն ասել, որ ես երջանիկ եմ: Փոխարենը նրանք նկարագրում են այն իրավիճակները, որոնցից մյուս մարդիկ կարող են հեշտությամբ եզրակացնել իրենց աֆեկտիվ ռեակցիաները: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս զգացմունքների բառարանները բացակայում են նման եզրակացությունների կատարելու համար անհրաժեշտ տեղեկատվության մեծ մասը: Մենք հիմնված ենք վերջին աշխատանքի վրա, որտեղ մոդելները ազդում են լեքսիկական բարդ ֆունկցիաների և ազդում են բարդ բանավեճերի վրա: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեթոդ, որպեսզի սովորենք այս ֆունկցիաների համար առաջին անձի պատմություններից: Մենք կառուցում ենք նոր գեղեցիկ փորձարկումներ և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն կաղապարները, որոնք մենք սովորում ենք բարելավել մեր կարողությունը կանխատեսել առաջին անձի ազդեցությունը առօրյա իրադարձություններին, Սթանֆորդի զգացմունքների հիմնական սկզբունքից մինչև .67F-ը:', 'af': "Onformele eerste persoon verklaratiewe is 'n unieke hulpbron vir rekenaar modele van elke dag gebeurtenis en mense se effektiewe reaksies na hulle. Mense wat blogeer oor hul dag, moet nie uitduidelik sê dat ek gelukkig is nie. In plaas beskrywe hulle situasies waarvan ander mense hul effektiewe reaksies gelees kan word. Maar huidige sentiment woordeboekvorms het baie van die inligting wat benodig is om similar inferences te maak. Ons bou op onlangse werk dat modele beïnvloor in terms of lexical predicate functions and affect on the predicate's arguments. Ons stel 'n metode om proksies te leer vir hierdie funksies van eerste persoon narraties. Ons konstrukteer 'n roman fyn-graad toets stel, en wys dat die patrone wat ons leer, ons vermeerder ons vermoë om eerste persoon te voorskou effektiewe reaksies na elke dag gebeurtenis, van 'n Stanford sentiment basisline van .67F tot .75F.", 'am': 'የመጀመሪያው የሰው ታሪክ የዕለቱ ሁኔታዎች እና የሰው ጥያቄዎች የደረሰባቸው መልዕክቶች የተለየ ሀብት ነው፡፡ ሰዎች ስለ ቀኑ የሚጦሙ ሰዎች አብልጦ ደስ ይለኛል ይላሉ፡፡ በፋንታ ሌሎች ሰዎች የሚያስጨንቋቸውን ጥያቄዎች በችሎታ የሚችሉበትን ጉዳይ ይናገራሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ የስሜት መዝገብ መዝገብ መዝገብ ብዙውን የመረጃ ውይይት ለማድረግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለዚህ ሥርዓቶች መጀመሪያ ታሪክ ለመማር ሥርዓትን እናቀርባለን፡፡ በ.67F እስከ .75F ድረስ የፊተኛውን የአንድ ሰው መልዕክቶችን ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን ምሳሌዎች እናሳየናለን፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রথম ব্যক্তির গল্প হচ্ছে প্রতিদিনের অনুষ্ঠানের গণনা মডেল এবং মানুষের প্রভাবিত প্রতিক্রিয়ার জন্য। মানুষ তাদের দিন সম্পর্কে ব্লগ করছে তারা স্পষ্ট ভাবে বলে না যে আমি খুশি। তার পরিবর্তে তারা পরিস্থিতি বর্ণনা করেছে যেখান থেকে অন্য মানুষ তাদের প্রভাবের প্রতিক্রিয়া সহজে আক্রা তবে বর্তমান অনুভূতির অভিভাবকগুলো একই ধরনের আক্রান্ত বানানোর জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য হারিয়ে যাচ্ছে। আমরা সাম্প্রতিক কাজে নির্মাণ করি যে মডেল লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল প্রাপ্ত কাজের মাধ্যমে প্রভাবিত হয় এবং যুক্তির প্রভাব ফেল আমরা প্রথম ব্যক্তিগত গল্প থেকে প্রক্সিকে শিখার একটা পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি। আমরা একটি সুন্দর পরীক্ষা সেট নির্মাণ করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রাথমিক ব্যক্তির প্রতিদিনের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিক্রিয়া ভবিষ্যদ্বাণ করার ক্ষমতা আমাদের উন্নত করে শিখা য', 'az': 'İlk insan hekayələri günlük olaraq hesaplayan modellərin və insanların təsirli reaksiyonların istifadə edilməsi üçün təhsil edir. İnsanlar günləri haqqında blogging edirlər ki, mənim xoşbəxtəm deyirlər. Əvəzində onlar başqa insanların təsirlərini asanlıqla dəyişdirə biləcəyi şəkilləri təsbir edirlər. Ancaq həmin hiss sözləri bənzərini yaratmaq üçün ehtiyacı olan məlumatların çoxunu yox edir. Biz yeni işlərdə modellərin leksik predikat funksiyaları ilə təsir edir və predikat argumentlərinə təsir edirik. Biz bu funksiyaları ilk kişinin hekayələrindən proksi öyrənmək üçün bir yolu göstəririk. Biz yeni sünbül bir test setini inşa edirik və göstəririk ki, öyrəndiyimiz modellərin ilk kişinin günlük olaraq təsirli reaksiyonları təmin edə biləcəyi tədbirləri , Stanforda 67F-75F hissəsindən təsirli hissəsindən daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bs': 'Neformalne priče prve osobe su jedinstveni resurs za računalne modele svakodnevnih događaja i ljudske utjecajne reakcije na njih. Ljudi koji bloguju o svom danu ne govore da sam sretna. Umjesto toga opisuju situacije iz kojih drugi ljudi mogu lako zaraziti svoje utjecajne reakcije. Međutim, trenutne rečenice osjećaja nedostaju mnogo informacija potrebne za slične inferencije. Napravljamo na nedavnom poslu koji modeli utiču na leksičke predikatne funkcije i utjecaju na predikatne argumente. Predstavljamo metodu da naučimo proksije za ove funkcije iz priče o prvoj osobi. Napravili smo novi komplet finog zrnca test a i pokazujemo da obrasce koje naučimo poboljšavaju našu sposobnost predvidjeti prvu osobu utjecajne reakcije na svakodnevne događaje, od početne linije sentimenta Stanforda od 67F do 75F.', 'ca': "Les narratives informals de primera person a s ón un recurso únic per a models computacionals d'esdeveniments cotidians i les reaccions afectives de la gent a ells. La gent que blogueix sobre el seu dia tendeix a no dir explícitament que estic feliç. En comptes d'això descriuen situacions d'on altres humans poden deduir fàcilment les seves reaccions afectives. Però els diccionaris de sentiments actuals falten molta de la informació necessària per fer inferències similars. Construim en treballs recent s que els models afecten en termes de funcions predicates lècsiques i afecten els arguments del predicat. Presentam un mètode d'aprendre proxies per aquestes funcions a partir de narratives de primera persona. Construim un nou conjunt d'exàmens fines i demostram que els patrons que aprenem milloren la nostra capacitat de predir reaccions afectives de primera person a a events cotidians, des d'una base de sentiments de Stanford de 0,67F a 0,75F.", 'cs': 'Neformální vyprávění z první osoby jsou jedinečným zdrojem pro výpočetní modely každodenních událostí a afektivních reakcí lidí na ně. Lidé, kteří blogují o svém dni, mají tendenci výslovně neříkat, že jsem šťastná. Místo toho popisují situace, ze kterých ostatní lidé mohou snadno odvodit své afektivní reakce. Současným sentimentním slovníkům však chybí mnoho informací potřebných k vyvození podobných závěrů. Stavíme na nedávné práci, které modely ovlivňují z hlediska lexikálních predikátových funkcí a ovlivňují argumenty predikátu. Představujeme metodu, jak se naučit proxy těchto funkcí z vyprávění z první osoby. Vytváříme nový jemnozrnný testovací soubor a ukážeme, že vzorce, které se naučíme, zlepšují naši schopnost předpovídat afektivní reakce první osoby na každodenní události, od stanfordské sentimentální základny .67F po .75F.', 'et': 'Mitteametlikud esimese isiku narratiivid on ainulaadne ressurss igapäevaste sündmuste arvutusmudelite ja inimeste afektiivsete reaktsioonide jaoks. Inimesed, kes blogivad oma päevast, ei ütle selgesõnaliselt, et olen õnnelik. Selle asemel kirjeldavad nad olukordi, millest teised inimesed saavad kergesti järeldada oma afektiivseid reaktsioone. Kuid praegused sentimentaalsed sõnastikud puuduvad palju teavet, mida on vaja sarnaste järelduste tegemiseks. Tugineme hiljutisele tööle, et mudelid mõjutavad leksikaalseid predikaadi funktsioone ja mõjutavad predikaadi argumente. Tutvustame meetodit nende funktsioonide proxies õppimiseks esimese isiku narratiividest. Me ehitame uudse peeneteralise testikomplekti ja näitame, et õppitud mustrid parandavad meie võimet ennustada esimese isiku afektiivseid reaktsioone igapäevastele sündmustele, Stanfordi sentimentaalse algtaseme 0,67F kuni 0,75F.', 'fi': 'Epäviralliset ensimmäisen persoonan kertomukset ovat ainutlaatuinen resurssi jokapäiväisten tapahtumien laskennallisille malleille ja ihmisten niihin kohdistuville affektiivisille reaktioille. Päivästään bloggaavat ihmiset eivät yleensä sano, että olen onnellinen. Sen sijaan ne kuvaavat tilanteita, joista muut ihmiset voivat helposti päätellä heidän affektiiviset reaktionsa. Nykyisistä tunteiden sanakirjoista puuttuu kuitenkin paljon tietoja, joita tarvitaan samankaltaisten päätelmien tekemiseen. Perustamme viimeaikaiseen työhön, jossa mallit vaikuttavat leksikaalisiin predikaattitoimintoihin ja predikaatin argumentteihin. Esittelemme menetelmän, jolla opimme näiden toimintojen proxyyrejä ensimmäisen persoonan kertomuksista. Rakennamme uuden hienorakeisen testisarjan ja osoitamme, että oppimamme kuviot parantavat kykyämme ennustaa ensimmäisen persoonan affektiivisiä reaktioita arkitapahtumiin Stanfordin tunteiden lähtötasosta 0,67F 0,75F.', 'jv': 'Injih perbudhakan langkung sampeyan luwih dumadhi sing perusahaan karo model komputasi tentang karo evelho karo hal-hal sing dirangatan karo hal dikenakno Wong wong-wong liya banjur-wong liya kuwi ora tatag apik. Bilih sedhaya manungsa punika dipunangkapan langkung saé mungkin babagan oleh luwih dumadhi iki. Kamadhi, Dijarian sing dibutuhke langkung rawuh akeh informasi dipunangé nggawe luwih dumadhi Awak dhéwé nggawe barang-alaman sing model kuwi banjuré dadi luwih-luwih cara nggawe barang akeh dumadhan karo ingkang dipunaaket. Rasane Awak dhéwé nggawe éntuk pernik-pernik nik nganggo nggawe sapa éntuk, lan ngerasai winih sing nyimpen kuwi nggawe ngubah awak dhéwé iso nggawe pernik sampek deweke nglanga kuwi events kuwi sampek, sak sudah kuwi wis kumpulan seneng stadfor sampek tanggal .isif sampek 75 F.', 'he': 'סיפורים לא רשמיים של אדם ראשון הם משאב ייחודי לדוגמנים מחשביים של אירועים יומיים והתגובות החביבות של אנשים אליהם. אנשים שמבלוגים על היום שלהם נוטים לא לומר באופן ברור שאני שמח. במקום זה הם מתארים מצבים ממנו בני אדם אחרים יכולים בקלות להוציא את התגובות החיבותיות שלהם. עם זאת המילונים הרגשיים הנוכחים חסרים הרבה מהמידע הנדרש כדי לעשות מסקנות דומות. אנו בונים על עבודה לאחרונה שמדגמנים משפיעים במונחים של תפקידים קודמים לקסיים ושפיעים על הטיעונים של הקודמים. אנחנו מציגים שיטה ללמוד פרוקסי לפונקציות האלה מסיפורים של אדם ראשון. אנחנו בונים קבוצת מבחן חדשה עם גרעינים טובים, ולהראות שהדפוסים שאנחנו לומדים משתפרים את היכולת שלנו לחזות תגובות חיוביות של אדם ראשון לאירועים יומיים, מראש רגשות סטנפורד של .67F ל .75F.', 'ha': 'Kirayaikin kowanka na farko yana da wata abinci wa misalin ayukan da ake lissafa a yinin kwanan da kuma musamman mutane da ke amfani da su. Mutãne sunã yin Blogi game da yinin su ba su taƙaita bayan su ce "Nĩ da farin ciki". Ina faɗa halin da wasu mutane ke iya ƙara wa kirayensu da sauƙi. Hata da haka, ba za\'a sava dictionary na yanzu masu yawa na ma\'anar da za\'a sami maras miski kamar wannan. We build on recent work that models affect in terms of lexical predicate functions and affect on the predicate\'s arguments.  Tuna zo da wata hanyor da za mu sanar proksi wa wannan functionin na farkon mutum. Munã samar wani matsayin nan da aka samar da sami mai kyau, kuma Muke nũna misãlai da za mu iya ƙara wa awonmu da za\'a yi bayani ga masu gabani na farko da bakin filayen ko da yauni, daga a ƙarin Stanford zuwa .67F zuwa .75F.', 'sk': 'Neformalne pripovedi prve osebe so edinstven vir za računalniške modele vsakdanjih dogodkov in afektivne reakcije ljudi na njih. Ljudje, ki blogajo o svojem dnevu, ne izrecno rečejo, da sem srečna. Namesto tega opisujejo situacije, iz katerih lahko drugi ljudje zlahka sklepajo svoje afektivne reakcije. Vendar trenutni čustveni slovarji manjkajo veliko informacij, potrebnih za podobne sklepe. Gradimo na nedavnem delu, na katerega modeli vplivajo v smislu leksikalnih funkcij predikatov in vplivajo na argumente predikatov. Predstavljamo metodo za učenje proxies za te funkcije iz pripovedi prve osebe. Izdelali smo nov drobnozrnat testni niz in pokazali, da vzorci, ki jih naučimo, izboljšujejo našo sposobnost napovedovanja afektivnih reakcij v prvi osebi na vsakodnevne dogodke, od Stanfordovega sentimentalnega izhodišča 0,67F do 0,75F.', 'bo': 'མ་ཤེས་པའི་མི་དང་པོ་མི་རྣམས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གཅིག་རེད། མི་མང་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཉིན་དུས་ཀྱི་དོན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ང་རང་དགའ་བའི་ཡིན་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་མི་ཐུབ། འདི་ལ་དེ་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དབང་བཤད་ན་ཕན་ཚུར་བསྐྱེད་བྱས་ཏེ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ད་ལྟོའི་སེམས་ཚུལ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་མེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་པོ་སྤྲོད་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ནས་གཟུགས་རིས་ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་སྔོན'}
{'en': 'Lifelong Learning CRF for Supervised Aspect Extraction', 'ar': 'نموذج التعلم مدى الحياة لاستخراج الجانب الخاضع للإشراف', 'pt': 'CRF de Aprendizado ao Longo da Vida para Extração Supervisionada de Aspectos', 'fr': "CRF d'apprentissage tout au long de la vie pour l'extraction", 'es': 'CRF de aprendizaje permanente para la extracción supervisada de aspectos', 'ja': '監督下のアスペクト抽出のための生涯学習CRF', 'hi': 'पर्यवेक्षित पहलू निष्कर्षण के लिए आजीवन सीखना सीआरएफ', 'zh': 'дї•зЫСеПЦзїИиЇЂе≠¶CRF', 'ru': 'ИРК для обучения на протяжении всей жизни с целью контролируемого извлечения аспекта', 'ga': 'Foghlaim ar Feadh an tSaoil CRF le haghaidh Eastóscadh Gné Mhaoirseachta', 'ka': 'CRF სწორედ მონაცემებული აზექტის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Az egész életen át tartó tanulás CRF a felügyelt aspektusok kivonásához', 'el': 'Δια βίου μάθησης CRF για την εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή πτυχών', 'it': "CRF di apprendimento permanente per l'estrazione di aspetti supervisionati", 'kk': 'Бақылау аспекті тарқату үшін CRF оқу', 'mk': 'Цело животно учење CRF за надгледувана екстракција на аспект', 'lt': 'Mokymosi visą gyvenimą CRF, skirtas prižiūrėtam aspekto ekstraktui', 'ms': 'CRF Pelajaran Selama Hidup untuk Ekstraksi Aspekt Diperhatikan', 'ml': 'സുപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി CRF പഠിച്ചു', 'mt': 'CRF għat-Tagħlim Tul il-Ħajja għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Aspett Sorveljat', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн хэлбэрийн тархины CRF суралцах үед', 'no': 'Læring av CRF for oversikt utpakking', 'pl': 'Uczenie się przez całe życie CRF dla nadzorowanej ekstrakcji aspektów', 'sr': 'Učenje CRF za izvlačenje nadzornog aspekta', 'ro': 'CRF de învățare pe tot parcursul vieții pentru extragerea aspectelor supravegheate', 'so': 'Lifelong Learning CRF for Supervised Aspect Extraction', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණාකරණ ස්පෙක්ට් නිර්මාණය සඳහා CRF ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'CRF för livslångt lärande för utvinning av övervakad aspekt', 'ta': 'பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட காட்சி வெளியீட்டுக்கான CRF கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது', 'ur': 'Supervised Aspect Extraction for Lifelong Learning CRF', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chương trình giáo dục để xử lý nhân tố', 'bg': 'Учене през целия живот за контролирано извличане на аспекти', 'da': 'CRF for livslang læring til overvåget aspekt ekstraktion', 'nl': 'Een leven lang leren CRF voor supervised aspect extraction', 'hr': 'Učenje CRF za izvlačenje nadzornog aspekta', 'de': 'Lebenslanges Lernen CRF für Supervised Aspect Extraction', 'ko': '감독에서 추출한 평생학습 CRF', 'id': 'CRF Pelajaran seumur hidup untuk Ekstraksi Aspek Tersupervisi', 'sw': 'Kujifunza CRF kwa ajili ya Kutolewa kwa Aspect', 'fa': 'در طول یادگیری CRF برای استخراج نقطه تحت نظر', 'af': 'Ligtige leer CRF vir ondersoekte aspekt uitpakking', 'tr': 'Supervised Aspect Açmak üçin CRF öwrenmek üçin durmuşy', 'sq': 'Mësimi gjatë gjithë jetës CRF për nxjerrjen e aspektit të mbikqyrur', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Կյանքի ընթացքում սովորելու ԿՌՖ-ը վերահսկված ասպեկտի արտահանման համար', 'az': 'Supervised Aspect Extraction 칲칞칲n 칐yr톛n톛n CRF', 'bs': 'Učenje CRF za izvlačenje nadzornog aspekta', 'bn': 'Supervied Aspect Extraction', 'ca': 'Lifelong Learning CRF for Supervised Aspect Extraction', 'cs': 'Celoživotní vzdělávání CRF pro kontrolovanou extrakci aspektů', 'et': 'Elukestva õppe CRF järelevalvega aspektide väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'Elinikäisen oppimisen CRF valvottuun aspektien poistoon', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'CRF ללמוד לאורך כל חיים למצוא ספקט משומר', 'sk': 'Vseživljenjsko učenje CRF za nadzorovano ekstrakcijo vidikov', 'bo': 'Supervised Aspect Extraction དུས་ཚོད་ཀྱི་CRF སྤྲོ་བརྒྱུད་རུང'}
{'en': 'This paper makes a focused contribution to supervised aspect extraction. It shows that if the system has performed aspect extraction from many past domains and retained their results as knowledge, Conditional Random Fields (CRF) can leverage this knowledge in a lifelong learning manner to extract in a new domain markedly better than the traditional CRF without using this prior knowledge. The key innovation is that even after CRF training, the model can still improve its extraction with experiences in its applications.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة مساهمة مركزة في الاستخراج الخاضع للإشراف. يوضح أنه إذا كان النظام قد أجرى استخراجًا جانبيًا من العديد من المجالات السابقة واحتفظ بنتائجها كمعرفة ، فيمكن للحقول العشوائية الشرطية (CRF) الاستفادة من هذه المعرفة بطريقة التعلم مدى الحياة لاستخراجها في مجال جديد أفضل بشكل ملحوظ من نموذج CRF التقليدي دون استخدام هذه المعرفة المسبقة. يتمثل الابتكار الرئيسي في أنه حتى بعد تدريب نموذج CRF ، لا يزال بإمكان النموذج تحسين استخراجه من خلال التجارب في تطبيقاته.', 'pt': 'Este artigo faz uma contribuição focada para a extração de aspecto supervisionada. Isso mostra que, se o sistema executou a extração de aspectos de muitos domínios anteriores e reteve seus resultados como conhecimento, os Campos Aleatórios Condicionais (CRF) podem alavancar esse conhecimento em uma maneira de aprendizado ao longo da vida para extrair em um novo domínio marcadamente melhor do que o CRF tradicional sem usar esse conhecimento prévio. A principal inovação é que mesmo após o treinamento CRF, o modelo ainda pode melhorar sua extração com experiências em suas aplicações.', 'fr': "Cet article apporte une contribution ciblée à l'extraction d'aspect supervisée. Cela montre que si le système a effectué une extraction d'aspect de nombreux domaines passés et conservé leurs résultats en tant que connaissances, les champs aléatoires conditionnels (CRF) peuvent exploiter ces connaissances d'une manière d'apprentissage tout au long de la vie pour extraire dans un nouveau domaine nettement mieux que le CRF traditionnel sans utiliser ce connaissances. L'innovation clé réside dans le fait que même après la formation CRF, le modèle peut encore améliorer son extraction grâce à l'expérience acquise dans ses applications.", 'es': 'Este artículo hace una contribución específica a la extracción supervisada de aspectos. Muestra que si el sistema ha realizado la extracción de aspectos de muchos dominios anteriores y ha conservado sus resultados como conocimiento, los campos aleatorios condicionales (CRF) pueden aprovechar este conocimiento de una manera de aprendizaje permanente para extraer en un nuevo dominio notablemente mejor que el CRF tradicional sin usar este conocimiento. La innovación clave es que, incluso después de la capacitación de CRF, el modelo aún puede mejorar su extracción con experiencias en sus aplicaciones.', 'ja': 'この論文は、監督された側面抽出に集中的に貢献します。これは、システムが多くの過去のドメインからのアスペクト抽出を実施し、その結果を知識として保持している場合、条件付きランダムフィールド（ CRF ）は、この既存の知識を使用せずに、この知識を生涯学習方法で活用して、従来のCRFよりも著しく優れた新しいドメインで抽出することができることを示している。鍵となるイノベーションは、CRFトレーニング後も、モデルはアプリケーションでの経験を活用して抽出を改善することができるということです。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पर्यवेक्षित पहलू निष्कर्षण के लिए एक केंद्रित योगदान देता है। इससे पता चलता है कि यदि सिस्टम ने कई पिछले डोमेन से पहलू निष्कर्षण किया है और ज्ञान के रूप में अपने परिणामों को बनाए रखा है, तो सशर्त रैंडम फील्ड्स (सीआरएफ) इस पूर्व ज्ञान का उपयोग किए बिना पारंपरिक सीआरएफ की तुलना में पारंपरिक सीआरएफ की तुलना में स्पष्ट रूप से बेहतर तरीके से निकालने के लिए एक आजीवन सीखने के तरीके से इस ज्ञान का लाभ उठा सकते हैं। प्रमुख नवाचार यह है कि सीआरएफ प्रशिक्षण के बाद भी, मॉडल अभी भी अपने अनुप्रयोगों में अनुभवों के साथ अपने निष्कर्षण में सुधार कर सकता है।', 'zh': '本文重点监督。 其统已取诸旧域,存之为知,则随机场(CRF)可以终身用之,不用此先验,明优于旧CRF。 要创新者,虽在CRF培训之后,犹可因而改之。', 'ru': 'Этот документ вносит целенаправленный вклад в контролируемое извлечение аспектов. Это показывает, что если система выполнила извлечение аспектов из многих прошлых областей и сохранила их результаты в качестве знаний, условные случайные поля (ОФП) могут использовать эти знания на протяжении всей жизни, чтобы извлечь в новой области заметно лучше, чем традиционные ОФП без использования этих предварительных знаний. Ключевым нововведением является то, что даже после обучения по ОФД модель все еще может улучшить свое извлечение с опытом в своих приложениях.', 'ga': 'Cuidíonn an páipéar seo le hastarraingt gné faoi mhaoirseacht. Léiríonn sé má rinne an córas eastóscadh gné ó go leor fearainn san am atá caite agus má choinnigh siad a dtorthaí mar eolas, is féidir le Réimsí Randamach Coinníollacha (CRF) an t-eolas seo a ghiaráil ar mhodh foghlama ar feadh an tsaoil chun sliocht i bhfearann nua go suntasach níos fearr ná an CRF traidisiúnta gan úsáid a bhaint as. an t-eolas seo roimhe seo. Is é an príomh-nuáil ná fiú tar éis oiliúint CRF, is féidir leis an tsamhail a eastóscadh a fheabhsú fós le taithí ina chuid feidhmeanna.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία συμβάλλει εστιασμένη στην εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή πτυχών. Δείχνει ότι εάν το σύστημα έχει πραγματοποιήσει εξαγωγή πτυχών από πολλούς παλαιότερους τομείς και διατήρησε τα αποτελέσματά τους ως γνώση, τα υπό όρους τυχαία πεδία μπορούν να αξιοποιήσουν αυτή τη γνώση με τρόπο διά βίου μάθησης για να εξάγουν σε ένα νέο τομέα σημαντικά καλύτερο από το παραδοσιακό χωρίς να χρησιμοποιούν αυτές τις προηγούμενες γνώσεις. Η βασική καινοτομία είναι ότι ακόμα και μετά την εκπαίδευση το μοντέλο μπορεί να βελτιώσει την εξαγωγή του με εμπειρίες στις εφαρμογές του.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány fókuszált hozzájárulást nyújt a felügyelt aspektusok kivonásához. Ez azt mutatja, hogy ha a rendszer számos korábbi tartományból végzett aspektkivonást és megtartotta eredményeit tudásként, a feltételes véletlenszerű mezők (CRF) ezt a tudást egész életen át tartó tanulási módon kihasználhatják, hogy egy új tartományban jelentősen jobban kinyerjék, mint a hagyományos CRF, ezen előzetes ismeretek felhasználása nélkül. A legfontosabb innováció az, hogy még a CRF képzés után is a modell továbbra is javítani tudja a kitermelését az alkalmazások tapasztalataival.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი გავაკეთება მონაცემულებული აპექტაქტის ექსტრაქციას. ის ჩვენებს, რომ თუ სისტემა გავაკეთეთ აპექტიკური ექსტრექცია ბევრი წინ დემონიდან და გადარჩენა მათი შედეგი როგორც ცნობიერება, შეუძლია ამ ცნობიერებას ცხოვრებული სწავლების გამოყენება ახალი დემონიდან გამოყენება, როგორც სა კლძფერი ინონოციაცია არის, რომ კრიფერი განსწავლების შემდეგ მოდელი შეუძლია უფრო უფრო აღმოქმედება მისი ექსტრაქციას, რომელიც მისი პროგრამე', 'lt': 'Šis dokumentas daugiausia prisideda prie prižiūrimos aspektų gavybos. Ji rodo, kad jeigu sistema atliko aspektų ištraukimą iš daugelio ankstesnių sričių ir išlaikė savo rezultatus kaip žinias, sąlyginės atsitiktinės sritys (angl. Conditional Random Fields, CRF) gali panaudoti šias žinias mokymosi visą gyvenimą būdu, kad ištrauktų iš naujos srities gerokai geresnę nei tradicinė CRF, nenaudodamos šių ankstesnių žinių. The key innovation is that even after CRF training, the model can still improve its extraction with experiences in its applications.', 'it': "Questo articolo fornisce un contributo mirato all'estrazione supervisionata degli aspetti. Mostra che se il sistema ha eseguito l'estrazione degli aspetti da molti domini passati e ha mantenuto i loro risultati come conoscenza, i campi casuali condizionali (CRF) possono sfruttare questa conoscenza in un modo di apprendimento permanente per estrarre in un nuovo dominio nettamente migliore rispetto al CRF tradizionale senza utilizzare queste conoscenze preliminari. L'innovazione chiave è che anche dopo la formazione CRF, il modello può ancora migliorare la sua estrazione con esperienze nelle sue applicazioni.", 'mk': 'Овој документ е фокусиран придонес за надгледуваната екстракција на аспекти. Истиот покажува дека ако системот изврши екстракција на аспекти од многу минати домени и ги задржи нивните резултати како знаење, условните случајни пола (CRF) може да го искористи ова знаење на животен начин на учење за да екстрактира во нов домен значително подобро од традиционалниот CRF без користење на ова претходно знаење. Клучната иновација е дека дури и по обуката на ЦРФ, моделот сé уште може да го подобри своето извлекување со искуства во неговите апликации.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini membuat kontribusi fokus untuk ekstraksi aspek yang dikendalikan. Ia menunjukkan bahawa jika sistem telah melakukan ekstraksi aspek dari banyak domain masa lalu dan menyimpan keputusan mereka sebagai pengetahuan, Medan Rawak Conditional (CRF) boleh menggunakan pengetahuan ini dalam cara belajar sepanjang hidup untuk ekstrak dalam domain baru jauh lebih baik daripada CRF tradisional tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan sebelumnya. Innovasi utama ialah bahawa walaupun selepas latihan CRF, model masih boleh meningkatkan ekstraksi dengan pengalaman dalam aplikasinya.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас дамжуулагдсан асуудлыг хадгалахын тулд анхаарал төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ нь хэрвээ систем өнгөрсөн хэсэгт асуудлыг гаргаж, мэдлэг гэж үр дүнг хадгалж байвал, шалтгаан санамсаргүй салбарууд (CRF) энэ мэдлэгийг өмнө нь мэдлэг ашиглахгүй уламжлалтаас илүү сайхан шинэ хэсэгт ашиглаж чадна. Хамгийн гол шинэчлэл нь КРФ сургалтын дараа хүртэл загвар хэрэглээний туршлагатай түүний гаргалтыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jagħti kontribut iffukat għall-estrazzjoni tal-aspetti sorveljati. Dan juri li jekk is-sistema wettqet estrazzjoni tal-aspetti minn ħafna dominji tal-passat u żammet ir-riżultati tagħhom bħala għarfien, il-Qasam Kondizzjonali Random (CRF) jista’ jgawdi minn dan l-għarfien b’mod ta’ tagħlim tul il-ħajja biex tiġi estratta f’dominju ġdid ferm a ħjar mis-CRF tradizzjonali mingħajr ma jintuża dan l-għarfien minn qabel. L-innovazzjoni ewlenija hija li anke wara t-taħriġ tas-CRF, il-mudell xorta jista’ jtejjeb l-estrazzjoni tiegħu bl-esperjenzi fl-applikazzjonijiet tiegħu.', 'no': 'Denne papiret gjer ein fokusert bidrag til oversikt utpakking av aspekt. Det viser at viser at dersom systemet har utført aspektekstrahering frå mange tidlegare domene og beholde resultatet sine som kunnskap, kan Conditional Random Fields (CRF) levera denne kunnskapen på ein levende læringsmåte for å pakka ut i ein ny domene som merket betre enn den tradisjonelle CRF utan å bruka denne førre kunnskapen. Nøkkelinovasjonen er at selv etter CRF-trening kan modellen framleis forbedre utpakkinga sin med opplevelsar i programmet sin.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł wnosi skupiony wkład w nadzorowaną ekstrakcję aspektów. Pokazuje ono, że jeśli system przeprowadził ekstrakcję aspektów z wielu poprzednich domen i zachował ich wyniki jako wiedzę, warunkowe pola losowe (CRF) mogą wykorzystać tę wiedzę w sposób uczenia się przez całe życie, aby wydobyć w nowej dziedzinie znacznie lepiej niż tradycyjne CRF bez wykorzystania tej wcześniejszej wiedzy. Kluczową innowacją jest to, że nawet po szkoleniu CRF model może ulepszyć swoją ekstrakcję dzięki doświadczeniom w swoich zastosowaniach.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare aduce o contribuție concentrată la extragerea aspectelor supravegheate. Aceasta arată că dacă sistemul a efectuat extragerea aspectelor din multe domenii anterioare și și-a păstrat rezultatele ca cunoaștere, Condițional Random Fields (CRF) poate valorifica aceste cunoștințe într-o manieră de învățare pe tot parcursul vieții pentru a extrage într-un domeniu nou semnificativ mai bine decât CRF tradițional fără a utiliza aceste cunoștințe anterioare. Inovația cheie este că, chiar și după instruirea CRF, modelul își poate îmbunătăți extracția cu experiențe în aplicațiile sale.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бақылау аспекті тарқатуға көңіл көмектеседі. Бұл жүйе өткен домендерден аспекттерді тарқату және оның нәтижесін білім ретінде сақтап тұрса, шарт кездейсоқ өрістер (CRF) бұл білімді өмір бойынша оқыту тәсілінде жаңа доменге алдындағы білім қолданбаған әдетті CRF- ден артық Ол үлгі инновация - CRF оқытуынан кейін де үлгі қолданбаларындағы тәжірибелерімен өзінің тарқатуын жақсартуға болады.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir čini fokusirani doprinos izvlačenju nadzornog aspekta. Pokazuje da ako je sistem izvršio izvlačenje aspekta iz mnogih prošlih domena i zadržao njihove rezultate kao znanje, uvjetne slučajne polje (CRF) mogu uticati na to znanje na način životnog učenja da izvuče u novom domenu ozbiljno bolje od tradicionalnog CRF bez upotrebe ovog prethodnog znanja. Ključna inovacija je da čak i nakon treninga CRF-a model može i dalje poboljšati izvlačenje sa iskustvom u svojim aplikacijama.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරලා බලන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා. ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ මේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් ගොඩක් අතීත ඩෝමේන් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් දන්නවක් විදියට තියෙනවා නම්, ස්ථා ප්\u200dරධාන නිර්මාණය තමයි CRF ප්\u200dරධානයට පස්සේ, මොඩේල් එක තවමත් ඒකේ අත්භාවයේ අත්භාවය සමග අත්භාවය', 'so': 'Warqaddaas waxay ka dhigtaa mid ku kharashaysa in la ilaaliyo dhinaca la ilaaliyo. Waxay muuqataa in haddii nidaamka uu ka soo baxay meelo badan oo hore oo uu ku haysto resultigooda aqoonta, xaaladda qarsoodiga ah (CRF) wuxuu aqoontan ugu soo bandhigi karaa qaab nolol dheer oo lagu barto si aad uga soo bixiso xafiiska cusub oo asal ah CRF, iyadoon isticmaalin aqoontan hore. Wax abuurista muhiimka ah waa in marka xittaa waxbarashada CRF kadib, modelku weli wuu beddeli karaa soo bixinta aragtidiisa, waayo-aragnimo leh codsigiisa.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഭാഗത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പങ്കുണ്ട്. ഇത് കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് പല ഡോമെനെന്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിജ്ഞാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കി CRF പരിശീലനത്തിനു ശേഷം പോലും മോഡല്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളിലെ അനുഭവങ്ങളുമായി പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats ger ett fokuserat bidrag till övervakad aspektutvinning. Det visar att om systemet har utfört aspektextraktion från många tidigare domäner och behållit sina resultat som kunskap, kan Conditional Random Fields (CRF) utnyttja denna kunskap på ett livslångt lärande sätt för att extrahera i en ny domän markant bättre än den traditionella CRF utan att använda denna tidigare kunskap. Den viktigaste innovationen är att även efter CRF-utbildning kan modellen fortfarande förbättra sin utvinning med erfarenheter av sina tillämpningar.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கு செய்கிறது பார்க்கப்பட்ட பகுதியை பிரித்துக் கொள்ளும். இது காண்பிக்கிறது முந்தைய தளங்களிலிருந்து பல விளைவுகளை பிரித்து அதன் முடிவுகளை அறிவாக வைத்திருந்தால், நிலையான கிடைக்கும் புலங்கள் (CRF) இந்த அறிவினை வெளியேற்றும CRF பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட பிறகும் மாதிரி அதன் பெறுவதற்கு முன்னேற்றப்படும் அனுபவத்தை பயன்பாடுகளில் முன்னேற்றலாம்.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک مضبوط حصہ اٹھانے کے لئے مضبوط حصہ بناتا ہے۔ یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ اگر سیسٹم نے بہت سے گزشتہ دامنوں سے منحصر نکالی ہے اور ان کے نتائج کو علم کے طور پر نگہ رکھا ہے، Conditional Random Fields کلیدی نوآوری یہ ہے کہ سی آر اف کی تربیت کے بعد بھی، مدل اپنے اخراج کے ساتھ اپنے کاربریوں میں تجربے کے ساتھ بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "This paper makes a focused contribution to supervised aspect extraction.  Agar tizim bir necha domen'dan bir necha qo'llangan qismni bajarsa va natijalarini ilmiy sifatida davom etilsa, Hodisa Tasodifiy Maydon (CRF) hayotida o'rganish davomida yangi domen'da o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganish imkoniyatlaridan yaxshi ko'ra oladi. Keyingi ijodkorlik, CRF ta'minlovchi soʻzdan key in model bu dasturdagi tajribalarni ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đóng góp một phần tập trung vào việc giám sát trích các khía cạnh. Nó cho thấy nếu hệ thống đã thực hiện việc trích xuất các khía cạnh từ nhiều miền trước và giữ lại kết quả như là kiến thức, các trường báo ứng (CRF) có thể điều khiển kiến thức này theo một cách học tập cả đời để khai thác một lĩnh vực mới rõ ràng hơn CRF truyền thống mà không cần sử dụng kiến thức này. Chủ yếu là ngay cả sau khi đào tạo CRF, mô hình vẫn có thể cải thiện việc khai thác bằng kinh nghiệm trong ứng dụng.', 'bg': 'Тази статия прави фокусиран принос към контролираното извличане на аспекти. Тя показва, че ако системата е извършила извличане на аспекти от много предишни области и е запазила резултатите си като знания, условните случайни полета (УСР) могат да използват тези знания по начин на учене през целия живот, за да извлекат в нов домейн значително по-добре от традиционния УСР, без да използват тези предишни знания. Ключовата иновация е, че дори и след обучение моделът все още може да подобри извличането си с опит в приложенията си.', 'nl': 'Deze paper levert een gerichte bijdrage aan supervised aspect extraction. Het toont aan dat als het systeem aspect extractie heeft uitgevoerd uit vele eerdere domeinen en hun resultaten als kennis heeft behouden, Conditional Random Fields (CRF) deze kennis op een levenslange leermanier kunnen benutten om in een nieuw domein aanzienlijk beter te extraheren dan de traditionele CRF zonder gebruik te maken van deze voorkennis. De belangrijkste innovatie is dat het model zelfs na CRF training zijn extractie nog kan verbeteren met ervaringen in zijn toepassingen.', 'da': 'Denne artikel yder et fokuseret bidrag til overvåget aspekt udtrækning. Det viser, at hvis systemet har udført aspektudtrækning fra mange tidligere domæner og bevaret deres resultater som viden, kan Conditional Random Fields (CRF) udnytte denne viden på en livslang læring måde til at udtrække i et nyt domæne markant bedre end den traditionelle CRF uden at bruge denne forudgående viden. Den vigtigste innovation er, at selv efter CRF-træning, modellen stadig kan forbedre sin udvinding med erfaringer i sine applikationer.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir čini fokusirani doprinos izvlačenju nadzornog aspekta. Pokazuje da ako je sistem izvršio izvlačenje aspekta iz mnogih prošlih domena i zadržao njihove rezultate kao znanje, uvjetne slučajne polje (CRF) mogu uticati na to znanje na način životnog učenja kako bi izvukao u novom domenu ozbiljno bolje od tradicionalnog CRF bez upotrebe ovog prije znanja. Ključna inovacija je da čak i nakon obuke CRF-a model još uvijek može poboljšati izvlačenje s iskustvom u svojim primjenama.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag leistet einen fokussierten Beitrag zur überwachten Aspektextraktion. Es zeigt, dass Conditional Random Fields (CRF) dieses Wissen auf lebenslange Weise nutzen können, um in einer neuen Domäne deutlich besser als die traditionelle CRF zu extrahieren, ohne dieses Vorwissen zu verwenden. Die wichtigste Innovation ist, dass das Modell auch nach der CRF-Ausbildung seine Extraktion mit Erfahrungen in seinen Anwendungen noch verbessern kann.', 'id': 'Kertas ini membuat kontribusi fokus untuk ekstraksi aspek yang diawasi. Ini menunjukkan bahwa jika sistem telah melakukan ekstraksi aspek dari banyak domain masa lalu dan menyimpan hasilnya sebagai pengetahuan, Conditional Random Fields (CRF) dapat menggunakan pengetahuan ini dalam cara belajar sepanjang hidup untuk ekstraksi dalam domain baru yang jauh lebih baik dari CRF tradisional tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan sebelumnya. Innovasi kunci adalah bahkan setelah pelatihan CRF, model masih dapat meningkatkan ekstraksi dengan pengalaman dalam aplikasinya.', 'ko': '본고는 감독 방면의 추출에 중점을 두고 공헌을 했다.연구에 따르면 시스템이 많은 과거 분야에서 추출을 하고 그 결과를 지식으로 보존한다면 조건랜덤필드(CRF)는 평생 공부하는 방식으로 이 지식을 활용하여 새로운 분야에서 추출할 수 있으며 전통적인 CRF보다 현저히 우수하며 이런 선험지식을 사용할 필요가 없다.관건적인 혁신은 CRF 교육 후에도 이 모델은 응용 중의 경험을 이용하여 추출을 개선할 수 있다는 데 있다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک کمک تمرکز به خارج کردن نقطه تحت نظر قرار می دهد. این نشان می\u200cدهد که اگر سیستم اخراج نقطه\u200cای از بسیاری از دامنه\u200cهای گذشته انجام داده و نتیجه\u200cهایشان را به عنوان دانش نگه داشته باشد، زمینه\u200cهای تصادفی (CRF) می\u200cتوانند این دانش را به طریق یادگیری طولانی عمر برای اخراج در دامنه\u200cای جدید که نشانه\u200cای بهتر از CRF سنتی است بدون استفاده نوآوری کلید این است که حتی بعد از تمرین CRF، مدل هنوز می\u200cتواند استخراجش را با تجربه\u200cهایی در کاربردهای خود بهتر کند.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mchango wenye lengo la kufuatiliwa kwa mtazamo. Inaonyesha kwamba kama mfumo umefanya maeneo yanayotokana na maeneo mengi yaliyopita na kuhakikisha matokeo yake kama maarifa, Maeneo ya Hali (CRF) yanaweza kutumia maarifa haya kwa njia ya kujifunza kwa muda mrefu ya maisha ya kuondoa katika eneo jipya linaloonyesha vizuri zaidi ya utamaduni wa CRF bila kutumia maarifa haya ya kabla. The key innovation is that even after CRF training, the model can still improve its extraction with experiences in its applications.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz g철zle첵채n aspekt a 챌magy 체챌in 체ns ber첵채r Sistem 철흫ki sahypalardan aspekt 챌eki힊inden we netijelerini bilgi h철km체nde sakla첵an bolsa, 힇ahsy Random sahypalar (CRF) bu bilimi 철흫ki bir 철wrenmek 힊eklinde t채ze bir domanda t채ze bir domanda 철wrenmek 체챌in bu bilim 체첵tgedigini 철흫ki bilgi 첵ok bolmadan gowy d철redip bil첵채r. A챌an innowasi첵a 힊udyr ki, CRF okuw챌ysyndan so흫ra, nusga 첵ene-de 철z uygulamalarynda tecr체besi bilen a챌ylygyny geli힊tirip biler.', 'af': "Hierdie papier maak 'n fokuseerde bydraag aan die ondersoekte aspekte uittrekking. Dit wys dat as die stelsel aspekt uittrek uit baie verlede domeine uitgevoer het en hulle resultate as kennis gehou het, kondisionale Lukrake velde (CRF) kan hierdie kennis in 'n lewenlange leer manier uittrek in 'n nuwe domein beter as die tradisionele CRF sonder hierdie voorheende kennis te gebruik. Die sleutel innowasie is dat selfs na die CRF-oefening kan die model nog steeds sy uittrekking verbeter met erfarings in sy toepassings.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër bën një kontribut të përqëndruar në nxjerrjen e aspekteve të mbikqyrura. Ajo tregon se në qoftë se sistemi ka kryer nxjerrjen e aspekteve nga shumë fusha të kaluara dhe ka mbajtur rezultatet e tyre si njohuri, fusha kushtetuese të rastësishme (CRF) mund të përdorin këtë njohuri në një mënyrë mësimi gjatë gjithë jetës për të nxjerrë në një fushë të re shumë më të mirë se CRF tradicionale pa përdorur këtë njohuri të mëparshme. Inovacioni kryesor është se edhe pas trajnimit të CRF, modeli mund të përmirësojë ende nxjerrjen e tij me përvojë në aplikimet e tij.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ በተመለከተው የፊደል ውጤት ለመጠበቅ ያሳያል፡፡ ይታያል፡፡ የቁልፍ አዲስ ፍጥረት ግን ከCRF ትምህርት በኋላ እንኳ ሞዴላው በፕሮግራሞቹ ውስጥ ምህረት ሲያሳድግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին կենտրոնացված ներդրում է վերահսկվող ասպեկտների վերացման մեջ: Այն ցույց է տալիս, որ եթե համակարգը արել է տարբեր ասպեկտներ վերացնելու անցյալ ոլորտներից և պահպանել իրենց արդյունքները որպես գիտելիք, պայմանավոր պատահական ոլորտները (ԿՌՖ) կարող են օգտագործել այս գիտելիքը կյանքի ընթացքում սովորելու ձևով, որպեսզի վերացնեն նոր ոլորտներում, որոնք Հիմնական նորարարությունն այն է, որ նույնիսկ ԿՌՖ-ի ուսումնասիրությունից հետո, մոդելը դեռևս կարող է բարելավել իր վերացումը իր ծրագրերի փորձով:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt gözlənilmiş aspekt çıxarmağına odaqlanmış bir qismət edər. Əgər sistemin keçmiş domenilərdən aspekt çıxarılması və sonuçlarını bilgi kimi qoruyub saxladığını göstərsə, şartlı Random Fields (CRF) bu bilgi əvvəlki bilgi istifadə etmədən yeni bir domenin üstünə çıxarılması üçün həyat öyrənməsi yolunda yaradıla bilər. Anahtar yenilənməsi is ə, CRF təhsil etdikdən sonra, modeli hələ də özünün istifadələrində təcrübələri ilə istifadə edə bilər.', 'ca': "Aquest paper fa una contribució centrada a l'extracció supervisada d'aspectes. Mostra que si el sistema ha fet extracció d'aspectes de molts dominis passats i ha conservat els seus resultats com coneixement, Conditional Random Fields (CRF) pot aprofitar aquest coneixement d'una manera d'aprenentatge durant tota la vida per extraure en un nou domini molt millor que el CRF tradicional sense utilitzar aquest coneixement anterior. La innovació clau és que fins i tot després de la formació del CRF, el model encara pot millorar la seva extracció amb experiències en les seves aplicacions.", 'bn': 'This paper makes a focused contribution to supervised aspect extraction.  এটি দেখাচ্ছে যে যদি সিস্টেম অতীতের অনেক ডোমেন থেকে বিদেশের দিক থেকে বের করে নেয় এবং তাদের ফলাফল জ্ঞান হিসেবে রাখতে পারে, তবে পরিস্থিতি রান্ডোমোল্ড ফিল্ড (সিএফ) এই জ্ঞানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উদ্ভাবন হচ্ছে যে এমনকি CRF প্রশিক্ষণের পরেও মডেল এখনও এর অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের অভিজ্ঞতার সাথে তাদের বের কর', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir čini fokusirani doprinos izvlačenju nadzornog aspekta. Pokazuje da ako je sistem izvršio izvlačenje aspekta iz mnogih prošlih domena i zadržao njihove rezultate kao znanje, uvjetne slučajne polje (CRF) mogu uticati na to znanje na način životnog učenja da izvuče u novom domenu ozbiljno bolje od tradicionalnog CRF bez upotrebe ovog ranog znanja. Ključna inovacija je da čak i nakon obuke CRF-a model još uvijek može poboljšati izvlačenje sa iskustvom u svojim aplikacijama.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje zaměřený příspěvek k kontrolované extrakci aspektů. Ukazuje se, že pokud systém provedl extrakci aspektů z mnoha minulých domén a zachoval si jejich výsledky jako znalosti, podmíněné náhodné pole (CRF) mohou využít tyto znalosti způsobem celoživotního učení k extrakci v nové doméně výrazně lepší než tradiční CRF bez využití těchto předchozích znalostí. Klíčovou inovací je, že i po školení CRF může model stále zlepšit svou extrakci zkušenostmi s aplikacemi.', 'et': 'Käesolev dokument annab keskendunud panuse järelevalve aspekti ekstraheerimisele. See näitab, et kui süsteem on teostanud aspektide ekstraheerimise paljudest varasematest valdkondadest ja säilitanud nende tulemused teadmistena, saavad tingimuslikud juhuslikud väljad (CRF) neid teadmisi elukestva õppe viisil kasutada, et ekstraheerida uus valdkond märkimisväärselt paremini kui traditsiooniline CRF ilma neid varasemaid teadmisi kasutamata. Peamine innovatsioon on see, et isegi pärast CRF koolitust saab mudel oma rakenduste kogemustega parandada oma väljavõtmist.', 'fi': 'Tämä paperi antaa kohdennetun panoksen valvotun aspect poiminta. Se osoittaa, että jos järjestelmä on suorittanut näkökulman poimintaa monista aikaisemmista toimialoista ja säilyttänyt tulokset tietona, ehdolliset satunnaiskentät (CRF) voivat hyödyntää tätä tietoa elinikäisessä oppimisessa poimintaan uudella alalla huomattavasti paremmin kuin perinteinen CRF käyttämättä tätä aikaisempaa tietoa. Keskeinen innovaatio on, että jopa CRF-koulutuksen jälkeen malli voi edelleen parantaa sen hyödyntämistä käyttökokemuksilla.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki ngono nggawe barang nggo neng titik-titik neng ngono ngono nggawe barang. Mungkin wong-wong kuwi, nek sistem iso disenyarno akeh Aspek dodolan winih sing dumadhi iki bakal terus ono kesempatan, kondisioné Rasané (CFF) iso disenyarno awak dhéwé iki ning awak dhéwé kapan langgar sami kudu winih dhéwé, ndéwé awak dhéwé kuwi dianggap akeh dumadhi winih sing dumadhi, kuwi dianggap per Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'העבודה הזו נותנת תרומה ממוקדת לחטיפת היבט המפוקחת. הוא מראה שאם המערכת ביצעה חיטוף אפקט ממשפחות רבות בעבר ושמרה את תוצאותיהם כידע, שדות אקראיים תנאים (CRF) יכולים להשתמש בידע הזה בדרך למידה לאורך כל חיים כדי לחטוף בתחום חדש הרבה יותר טוב מהCRF המסורתית מבלי להשתמש בידע קודם זה. החדשות המפתחות הן שאפילו לאחר אימון CRF, המודל עדיין יכול לשפר את החולף שלו עם ניסיונות בתוכניותיו.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek je osredotočen na nadzorovano ekstrakcijo vidikov. To kaže, da če je sistem izvedel ekstrakcijo vidikov iz številnih preteklih področij in ohranil svoje rezultate kot znanje, lahko pogojna naključna polja (CRF) izkoristijo to znanje na način vseživljenjskega učenja, da se izvlečejo v novo področje znatno bolje kot tradicionalni CRF brez uporabe tega predhodnega znanja. Ključna inovacija je, da lahko tudi po usposabljanju CRF model še vedno izboljša svoje izkoriščanje z izkušnjami pri uporabi.', 'ha': "@ action: inmenu Yana nũna cewa idan system ya sami surori daga masu yawa na farko kuma ya tsare matsalarsu kamar ilmi, shirin Hazara Fifields (CRF) zai iya ƙara wannan ilmi a cikin hanyar rãyar da za'a sanar da shi, don ya yi amfani da wannan sanki ba. Maɓallin ƙiro ni'ani ne cẽwa, kõ dã daga bayan shirin CRF, shirin zai iya ƙara kwamfyuta don ya sami fitarwa a cikin shirin ayukansa.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་དབྱིབས་འཕར་རིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་བློ་གཏོང་ཞིག་ཡོད། It shows that if the system has performed aspect extraction from many past domains and retained their results as knowledge, Conditional Random Fields (CRF) can leverage this knowledge in a lifelong learning manner to extract in a new domain markedly better than the traditional CRF without using this prior knowledge. གཙོ་ཆེ་གསར་གཏོང་བར་ན། CRF སློབ་ཐག་བརྗོད་ཀྱང་མ་དབྱིབས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Domain Knowledge via Grouped Weight Sharing with Application to Text Categorization', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento del conocimiento del dominio mediante el uso compartido de peso agrupado con la categorización de aplicaciones', 'fr': 'Exploitation des connaissances du domaine via le partage de poids groupé avec application à la catégorisation de texte', 'ar': 'استغلال معرفة المجال من خلال مشاركة الوزن المجمعة مع تصنيف التطبيق على النص', 'pt': 'Explorando o conhecimento do domínio por meio do compartilhamento de peso agrupado com categorização de aplicativo para texto', 'ja': 'アプリケーションとのグループ化された重み共有を介したテキストカテゴリ分類によるドメイン知識の活用', 'zh': '分组权重共享和应用程序到文本分类以用领域', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए अनुप्रयोग के साथ समूहीकृत वजन साझा करण के माध्यम से डोमेन ज्ञान का शोषण', 'ru': 'Использование знаний о домене с помощью группового распределения веса с приложением для категоризации текста', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Eolas Fearainn trí Chomhroinnt Meáchain Grúpáilte le Feidhmiú ar Chatagóiriú Téacs', 'hu': 'A tartományi ismeretek kihasználása csoportosított súlymegosztással az alkalmazás a szövegre kategorizálással', 'ka': 'პროგრამეტთან ტექსტის კატეგორიზაციაზე პროგრამეტთან გაყოფილი დომინის ცნობიერება', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση της γνώσης τομέα μέσω ομαδοποιημένης κοινής χρήσης βάρους με εφαρμογή σε ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'it': "Sfruttare la conoscenza del dominio tramite condivisione di peso raggruppata con la categorizzazione dell'applicazione al testo", 'kk': 'Домен білімін мәтін санаттарына қолданбамен топтық тең ортақтастыру', 'lt': 'Domeno žinių panaudojimas naudojant grupuotą svorio pasidalijimą taikant teksto kategorijas', 'mk': 'Користење на знаење за домен преку групирано делење тежина со апликација на текстова категоризација', 'ml': 'ഗ്രൂപ്പ് ചെയ്ത വൈറ്റ് പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ഗ്രൂപ്പുഡ് വൈറ്റ് പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുമായി ഡ', 'mt': 'L-Isfruttar tal-Għarfien tad-Dominju permezz tal-Kondiviżjoni tal-Piż f’Grupp mal-Applikazzjoni għall-Kategorizzazzjoni tat-Test', 'ms': 'Penggunaan Pengetahuan Domain melalui Perkongsian Berat Berkumpulan dengan Aplikasi ke Kategori Teks', 'mn': 'Хугацааны хэмжээний мэдлэг нь Хугацааны Хувь Хувь Хувь Хувь Хувь Хувь Хувь Хувь Текст Хувь Хувь', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie wiedzy domeny poprzez grupowane udostępnianie wagi z aplikacją do kategorizacji tekstu', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući znanje domena kroz grupirano podeljenje težine sa aplikacijom na kategoriju teksta', 'ro': 'Exploatarea cunoștințelor de domeniu prin partajarea greutății grupate cu categorizarea aplicației la text', 'so': 'Ogaanshaha internetka ee ku saabsan Grouped Weight Sharing with Application to Text Categorization', 'sv': 'Utnyttja domänkunskap via grupperad viktdelning med applikationskategorisering till text', 'si': 'පාළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමඟ විශේෂ කරනවා ඩොමේන් දන්නය', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுடன் பயன்பாடுகளுடன் குழுப்பிடப்பட்ட வாய்ப்பு பகிர்ந்து கொண்டு களம் அறிவை வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'ڈومین علم کو گروپ کی وزن کے ذریعہ تفصیل دینے کے لئے پیغام کے ساتھ شریک کرنا', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Truyền thức miền qua tập thể cân bằng bằng với chương trình hóa văn bản', 'bg': 'Използване на познания за домейн чрез групирано споделяне на теглото с приложение към категоризация на текст', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van domeinkennis via gegroepeerd gewichtsdeling met applicatie naar tekst categorisatie', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af domæneviden via grupperet vægtdeling med Application to Text Kategorisering', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući znanje domena kroz grupirano dijeljenje težine s aplikacijom za kategoriju teksta', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi Pengetahuan Domain melalui Pembahagian Berat Berkumpulan dengan Aplikasi ke Kategori Teks', 'ko': '그룹 권한 공유를 바탕으로 하는 분야 지식 발굴 및 텍스트 분류에서의 응용', 'fa': 'استفاده از دانش دامنی با طریق شریک وزن گروهی با کاربرد به عنوان تقسیم متن', 'de': 'Nutzung von Domänenwissen durch gruppierte Gewichtsfreigabe mit Application to Text Kategorisierung', 'sw': 'Kusambaza ufahamu wa Domain kupitia Ushirikiano wa Wengo wa Grouped With Application to Categorization Text', 'tr': 'Programden Metin Kategoriýasy bilen Aýratyn Bilişi', 'af': 'Verspreiding Domein kennis deur groepgewig Deel met toepassing na Teks Kategoriseering', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i njohurive të dominit nëpërmjet ndarjes së peshës së grupuar me kategorizimin e aplikacionit në tekst', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': '䷉饴渠䭡瑥杯物祡獩祡珄넠楬즙⁕祧畬慭愠楬즙⁂쎶泃볅齤쎼牭즙欠癡獩瓉饳楬즙⁄潭敮愠䉩汩洊', 'bn': 'অ্যাপ্লিকেশন টেক্সট বিভাগের সাথে গ্রুপেড উইটশেয়ার করার মাধ্যমে ডোমেইন জ্ঞান প্রসারিত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući znanje domena kroz grupirano dijeljenje težine s aplikacijom za kategoriju teksta', 'hy': 'Դոմենի գիտելիքների օգտագործումը խմբավորված կշռության կիսման միջոցով ծրագրի հետ տեքստի կատեգորիզացիայի մեջ', 'ca': 'Utilitzar el coneixement de domini a través de compartir pes en grup amb aplicacions a categorització de text', 'cs': 'Využití znalostí domény prostřednictvím skupinového sdílení hmotnosti s kategorizací aplikace na text', 'et': 'Domeeniteadmiste kasutamine rühmitud kaalu jagamise kaudu rakenduse tekstikategooriasse', 'fi': 'Verkkoverkkotunnustiedon hyödyntäminen ryhmitetyn painonjaon avulla sovelluksesta tekstiin luokittelun avulla', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje znanja domen prek skupne delitve teže s kategorizacijo aplikacije za besedilo', 'he': 'ניצל ידע שטח באמצעות שיתוף משקל קבוצתי עם תוכנית לקטגוריזציה טקסטית', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚོ་ཁག་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཡི་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་འགྲོ་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་པ'}
{'en': 'A fundamental advantage of neural models for NLP is their ability to learn representations from scratch. However, in practice this often means ignoring existing external linguistic resources, e.g., WordNet or domain specific ontologies such as the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). We propose a general, novel method for exploiting such resources via weight sharing. Prior work on weight sharing in neural networks has considered it largely as a means of model compression. In contrast, we treat weight sharing as a flexible mechanism for incorporating prior knowledge into neural models. We show that this approach consistently yields improved performance on classification tasks compared to baseline strategies that do not exploit weight sharing.', 'ar': 'الميزة الأساسية للنماذج العصبية في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية هي قدرتها على تعلم التمثيلات من الصفر. ومع ذلك ، من الناحية العملية ، يعني هذا غالبًا تجاهل الموارد اللغوية الخارجية الموجودة ، على سبيل المثال ، WordNet أو الأنطولوجيا الخاصة بالمجال مثل نظام اللغة الطبية الموحد (UMLS). نقترح طريقة عامة وجديدة لاستغلال هذه الموارد من خلال تقاسم الوزن. لقد اعتبر العمل السابق على تقاسم الوزن في الشبكات العصبية إلى حد كبير وسيلة لضغط النموذج. في المقابل ، نتعامل مع تقاسم الوزن كآلية مرنة لدمج المعرفة السابقة في النماذج العصبية. نظهر أن هذا النهج يؤدي باستمرار إلى تحسين الأداء في مهام التصنيف مقارنة باستراتيجيات خط الأساس التي لا تستغل تقاسم الوزن.', 'es': 'Una ventaja fundamental de los modelos neuronales para la PNL es su capacidad para aprender representaciones desde cero. Sin embargo, en la práctica esto a menudo significa ignorar los recursos lingüísticos externos existentes, por ejemplo, WordNet o ontologías específicas de dominio, como el Sistema Unificado de Lenguajes Médicos (UMLS). Proponemos un método general y novedoso para explotar dichos recursos mediante el reparto del peso. Los trabajos anteriores sobre el reparto del peso en las redes neuronales lo han considerado en gran medida como un medio de compresión de modelos. Por el contrario, tratamos el reparto del peso como un mecanismo flexible para incorporar los conocimientos previos en los modelos neuronales. Demostramos que este enfoque produce sistemáticamente un mejor rendimiento en las tareas de clasificación en comparación con las estrategias de referencia que no aprovechan el reparto del peso.', 'pt': 'Uma vantagem fundamental dos modelos neurais para PNL é sua capacidade de aprender representações do zero. No entanto, na prática, isso geralmente significa ignorar recursos linguísticos externos existentes, por exemplo, WordNet ou ontologias específicas de domínio, como o Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Propomos um método geral e inovador para explorar tais recursos via compartilhamento de peso. Trabalhos anteriores sobre compartilhamento de peso em redes neurais o consideraram amplamente como um meio de compressão de modelo. Em contraste, tratamos o compartilhamento de peso como um mecanismo flexível para incorporar conhecimento prévio em modelos neurais. Mostramos que essa abordagem produz consistentemente melhor desempenho em tarefas de classificação em comparação com estratégias de linha de base que não exploram o compartilhamento de peso.', 'fr': "Un avantage fondamental des modèles neuronaux pour la PNL est leur capacité à apprendre des représentations à partir de zéro. Toutefois, dans la pratique, cela implique souvent d'ignorer les ressources linguistiques externes existantes, par exemple WordNet ou des ontologies spécifiques à un domaine telles que le Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Nous proposons une nouvelle méthode générale d'exploitation de ces ressources via le partage du poids. Des travaux antérieurs sur le partage du poids dans les réseaux de neurones l'ont largement considéré comme un moyen de compression de modèle. En revanche, nous considérons le partage du poids comme un mécanisme souple permettant d'intégrer les connaissances antérieures dans les modèles neuronaux. Nous montrons que cette approche améliore constamment les performances des tâches de classification par rapport aux stratégies de base qui n'exploitent pas le partage du poids.", 'ja': 'NLPにとってのニューラルモデルの根本的な利点は、表現を一から学ぶ能力である。しかし、実際には、これは多くの場合、WordNetなどの既存の外部言語リソース、またはUnified Medical Language System （ UMLS ）などのドメイン固有のオントロジーを無視することを意味する。このような資源を重量分担を通じて利用するための一般的で斬新な方法を提案します。ニューラルネットワークにおける重み分担に関する先行研究では、主にモデル圧縮の手段として検討されている。対照的に、私たちは重量分担を、既存の知識をニューラルモデルに組み込むための柔軟なメカニズムとして扱います。このアプローチは、重み共有を利用しないベースライン戦略と比較して、分類タスクのパフォーマンスが一貫して向上することを示しています。', 'zh': 'NLP神经模形之大端,其可以始学也。 然在实践中者,忽于外言之资,如WordNet特定于领域之体,如一医之统(UMLS)。 我们立了一种权重共享来开发这些资源的通用的新法。 前神经网络权重共享者,以为模形压缩一术也。 比之以权重共享为将先验知识入神经模样之灵活机制。 吾明与不用权重共享之基线,终始如一。', 'hi': 'एनएलपी के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल का एक मौलिक लाभ खरोंच से प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने की उनकी क्षमता है। हालांकि, व्यवहार में इसका मतलब अक्सर मौजूदा बाहरी भाषाई संसाधनों की अनदेखी करना होता है, उदाहरण के लिए, वर्डनेट या डोमेन विशिष्ट ऑन्टोलोजी जैसे कि एकीकृत चिकित्सा भाषा प्रणाली (यूएमएलएस)। हम वजन साझा करने के माध्यम से इस तरह के संसाधनों का शोषण करने के लिए एक सामान्य, उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। तंत्रिका नेटवर्क में वजन साझा करने पर पहले के काम ने इसे काफी हद तक मॉडल संपीड़न के साधन के रूप में माना है। इसके विपरीत, हम तंत्रिका मॉडल में पूर्व ज्ञान को शामिल करने के लिए एक लचीले तंत्र के रूप में वजन साझा करने का इलाज करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह दृष्टिकोण लगातार बेसलाइन रणनीतियों की तुलना में वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है जो वजन साझा करने का फायदा नहीं उठाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Фундаментальным преимуществом нейронных моделей для NLP является их способность изучать представления с нуля. Однако на практике это часто означает игнорирование существующих внешних лингвистических ресурсов, например, WordNet или специфических для домена онтологий, таких как Единая медицинская языковая система (UMLS). Мы предлагаем общий, новый метод эксплуатации таких ресурсов посредством разделения веса. Предыдущая работа по распределению веса в нейронных сетях рассматривала его в основном как средство сжатия модели. Напротив, мы рассматриваем распределение веса как гибкий механизм для включения предшествующих знаний в нейронные модели. Мы показываем, что этот подход постоянно дает лучшие результаты в выполнении задач классификации по сравнению с базовыми стратегиями, которые не используют распределение веса.', 'ga': 'Buntáiste bunúsach a bhaineann le samhlacha néaracha do NLP is ea a gcumas léiriúcháin a fhoghlaim ón tús. Mar sin féin, i ndáiríre ciallaíonn sé seo go minic neamhaird a dhéanamh ar acmhainní seachtracha teanga atá ann cheana féin, m.sh. WordNet nó ontologies a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann mar an Córas Teanga Aontaithe Míochaine (UMLS). Molaimid modh ginearálta, nua chun leas a bhaint as acmhainní den sórt sin trí chomhroinnt meáchain. Mheas réamhobair ar chomhroinnt meáchain i líonraí néaracha é den chuid is mó mar mhodh comhbhrú samhlacha. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, caithfimid comhroinnt meáchain mar mheicníocht sholúbtha chun réamheolas a ionchorprú i múnlaí néaracha. Léirímid go n-eascraíonn an cur chuige seo go seasta feidhmíocht fheabhsaithe ar thascanna aicmithe i gcomparáid le straitéisí bonnlíne nach mbaineann leas as comhroinnt meáchain.', 'hu': 'Az NLP neurális modelleinek alapvető előnye, hogy képesek a reprezentációkat a semmiből tanulni. A gyakorlatban azonban ez gyakran azt jelenti, hogy figyelmen kívül hagyjuk a meglévő külső nyelvi erőforrásokat, például a WordNet vagy a tartományspecifikus ontológiákat, mint például az Egységes Orvosi Nyelvi Rendszer (UMLS). Egy általános, új módszert javasolunk az ilyen erőforrások súlymegosztás révén történő kiaknázására. Az idegi hálózatokban végzett súlymegosztással kapcsolatos korábbi munkák nagyrészt modelltömörítés eszközének tekintették. Ezzel szemben a súlymegosztást rugalmas mechanizmusként kezeljük az előzetes ismeretek idegi modellekbe történő beépítésére. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a megközelítés következetesen jobb teljesítményt eredményez az osztályozási feladatok tekintetében az alapvető stratégiákhoz képest, amelyek nem használják ki a súlymegosztást.', 'el': 'Ένα θεμελιώδες πλεονέκτημα των νευρωνικών μοντέλων είναι η ικανότητά τους να μαθαίνουν αναπαραστάσεις από το μηδέν. Ωστόσο, στην πράξη αυτό συχνά σημαίνει ότι αγνοούμε υφιστάμενους εξωτερικούς γλωσσικούς πόρους, π.χ. το WordNet ή οντολογίες ειδικού τομέα όπως το Ενιαίο Ιατρικό Σύστημα Γλωσσών (UMLS). Προτείνουμε μια γενική, νέα μέθοδο αξιοποίησης τέτοιων πόρων μέσω κατανομής βάρους. Προηγουμένες εργασίες σχετικά με την κατανομή βάρους στα νευρωνικά δίκτυα το έχουν εξετάσει σε μεγάλο βαθμό ως μέσο συμπίεσης μοντέλου. Αντιθέτως, αντιμετωπίζουμε την κατανομή βάρους ως έναν ευέλικτο μηχανισμό για την ενσωμάτωση προηγούμενων γνώσεων σε νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση αποδίδει σταθερά βελτιωμένες επιδόσεις σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης σε σύγκριση με στρατηγικές βάσης που δεν εκμεταλλεύονται τον καταμερισμό βάρους.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ, პრაქტიკში ეს ხშირად ნიშნავს, რომ არსებობს გარეშე ენდომისტიკური რესურსები, მაგალითად WordNet ან domain-სპექტიკური ანტოლოგიები, როგორც ერთადერთებული მედიციური ენდომის ჩვენ გვეძლევა ერთი განსაზღვრებული, პრომენტიური მეთოდი, რომელიც ასეთი რესურსების გამოყენებაში გავაკეთებთ სიმაღლეში. პირველი სამუშაო სამუშაო გაყოფილი ნეიროლური ქსელებში იფიქრობდა, რომ ეს უფრო დიდ იყო მოდელური კომპრესიის სისტემა. კონტრასტურად, ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სივრცე გაყოფილი სივრცე როგორც ძალიან ძალიან მექანსიური მექანსი, როგორც წინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პროგრამის შესაძლებლობით კლასიფიკაციის საქმებზე უფრო მეტად გამოიყენება, რომელიც არ გამოიყენებს გაზომილების გაზომილება.', 'it': "Un vantaggio fondamentale dei modelli neurali per NLP è la loro capacità di imparare le rappresentazioni da zero. Tuttavia, in pratica questo significa spesso ignorare le risorse linguistiche esterne esistenti, ad esempio WordNet o ontologie specifiche di dominio come l'Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Proponiamo un metodo generale e nuovo per sfruttare tali risorse attraverso la condivisione del peso. Il lavoro precedente sulla condivisione del peso nelle reti neurali lo ha considerato in gran parte come un mezzo di compressione del modello. Al contrario, trattiamo la condivisione del peso come un meccanismo flessibile per incorporare conoscenze preliminari nei modelli neurali. Mostriamo che questo approccio fornisce costantemente prestazioni migliori sulle attività di classificazione rispetto alle strategie di base che non sfruttano la condivisione del peso.", 'kk': 'NLP үшін невралдық моделдерінің негізгі артықшылығы - олардың таңбаларын жүгіртуден үйрену мүмкіндігі. Бірақ әрекетте, бұл көбінде бар сыртқы лингвистикалық ресурстарды елемеу, мысалы, WordNet немесе доменге біріктірілген медицински тіл жүйесі (UMLS) секілді онтологияларды елемеу деген сөз Біз бұл ресурстарды қатты ортақтастыру арқылы жалпы, романдық әдістерін қолданып тастаймыз. Невралды желілерде қатты ортақтастыру үшін алдыңғы жұмыс оны үлгі компрессиялау үлгісі деп ойлады. Осылайша, біз тең ортақтастыруды невралдық моделдеріне ендіру үшін гибсикалық механизм ретінде қалаймыз. Біз бұл тәртібі бағалау тапсырмаларының жұмыс істеуді бағалау стратегияларына салыстырып жұмыс істейді.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinis NLP nervų modelių pranašumas yra jų gebėjimas iš nulio mokytis reprezentacijų. Tačiau praktikoje tai dažnai reiškia ignoruoti esamus išorinius kalbinius išteklius, pvz., WordNet arba konkrečias sritis, pvz., Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Siūlome bendrą naują metodą tokių išteklių naudojimui dalijantis svoriu. Ankstesnis darbas, susijęs su dalijimusi svoriu nervų tinkluose, iš esmės laikė jį modelio kompresijos priemone. Priešingai, mes vertiname svorio pasidalijimą kaip lankstą mechanizmą, skirtą ankstesnių žinių įtraukimui į nervų modelius. Mes rodome, kad šis metodas nuosekliai užtikrina geresnius klasifikavimo užduočių rezultatus, palyginti su pagrindinėmis strategijomis, kuriose nenaudojamas svorio pasidalijimas.', 'mk': 'Фундаментална предност на нервните модели за НЛП е нивната способност да научат претставувања од нула. Сепак, во практиката ова честопати значи игнорирање на постојните надворешни јазични ресурси, на пример WordNet или конкретни онтологии на доменот, како што е унифицираниот медицински јазик систем (УМЛС). Предложуваме генерален, нов метод за искористување на ваквите ресурси преку поделба на тежината. Претходната работа на поделбата на тежината во нервните мрежи ја смета за средство за моделна компресија. За разлика од тоа, ја третираме поделбата на тежината како флексибилен механизам за вклучување на претходното знаење во нервните модели. Ние покажуваме дека овој пристап постојано предизвикува подобри резултати во врска со класификациските задачи во споредба со основните стратегии кои не ја искористуваат поделбата на тежината.', 'ms': 'Keuntungan dasar dari model saraf untuk NLP adalah kemampuan mereka untuk belajar perwakilan dari awal. Namun, dalam praktek ini sering bermakna mengabaikan sumber bahasa luaran yang ada, cth., WordNet atau ontologi khusus domain seperti Sistem Bahasa Perubatan Unified (UMLS). Kami mengusulkan cara umum, baru untuk mengeksploitasi sumber-sumber tersebut melalui berkongsi berat badan. Prior work on weight sharing in neural networks has considered it largely as a means of model compression.  Sebaliknya, kita memperlakukan berkongsi berat sebagai mekanisme fleksibel untuk memasukkan pengetahuan terdahulu ke dalam model saraf. We show that this approach consistently yields improved performance on classification tasks compared to baseline strategies that do not exploit weight sharing.', 'mt': "A fundamental advantage of neural models for NLP is their ability to learn representations from scratch.  Madankollu, fil-prattika dan spiss ifisser li jiġu injorati r-riżorsi lingwistiċi esterni e żistenti, pereżempju WordNet jew ontoloġiji speċifiċi g ħad-dominju bħas-Sistema Medika Unifikata (UMLS). Aħna nipproponu metodu ġenerali u ġdid għall-isfruttar ta' dawn ir-riżorsi permezz tal-qsim tal-piż. Ħidma preċedenti dwar il-qsim tal-piż fin-netwerks newrali qieset dan fil-biċċa l-kbira bħala mezz ta’ kompressjoni mudell. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, jittrattaw il-qsim tal-piż bħala mekkaniżmu flessibbli għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ għarfien minn qabel fil-mudelli newrali. Aħna nuru li dan l-approċċ b’mod konsistenti jwassal għal prestazzjoni mtejba fil-kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni meta mqabbel ma’ strateġiji bażi li ma jisfruttawx il-qsim tal-piż.", 'ml': 'NLP-ന്റെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഉപകാരമാണ് അവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള കഴിവ്. എന്നാലും ഇതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഇതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം എപ്പോഴും നിലവിലുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഉദാ. വാര്\u200dഡ്നെറ്റ ഭാരം പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ഇത്തരം വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d, നോവല്\u200d രീതിയിലാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ് ഭാരം പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് ജോലി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാരം പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പുള്ള അറിവ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്ലാക നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു ഈ നടപടിയില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ജോലികളില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ', 'no': 'Ein grunnleggjande avansert av nøyralmodeller for NLP er deres kapasitet til å lære representasjonar frå rulla. Men i praksis betyr dette ofte å ignorera eksisterande eksterne språksressursar, f.eks. WordNet eller domenespesifikke ontologiar som Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Vi foreslår ein generell, novel metode for å bruka slike ressursar gjennom vektsdeling. Førre arbeid på vektsdeling i nøyralnettverk har sett det til stort som ein måte å komprimera modellen. I contrast, we treat weight sharing as a flexible mechanism for incorporating prior knowledge into neural models. Vi viser at denne tilnærminga gjer konsekvent forbetra utviklingar på klassifikasjonsprogrammet samanlikna med baseline strategiar som ikkje brukar vektsdeling.', 'pl': 'Podstawową zaletą modeli neuronowych dla NLP jest ich zdolność do uczenia się reprezentacji od zera. Jednak w praktyce często oznacza to ignorowanie istniejących zewnętrznych zasobów językowych, np. WordNet lub ontologii specyficznych dla domeny, takich jak Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Proponujemy ogólną, nowatorską metodę wykorzystywania takich zasobów poprzez podział wagi. Wcześniejsze prace nad podziałem masy ciała w sieciach neuronowych uważały go w dużej mierze za środek kompresji modelu. Natomiast podział wagi traktujemy jako elastyczny mechanizm włączania wcześniejszej wiedzy do modeli neuronowych. Pokazujemy, że takie podejście konsekwentnie przynosi lepszą wydajność zadań klasyfikacyjnych w porównaniu do strategii bazowych, które nie wykorzystują podziału masy ciała.', 'ro': 'Un avantaj fundamental al modelelor neurale pentru PNL este capacitatea lor de a învăța reprezentări de la zero. Cu toate acestea, în practică, acest lucru înseamnă adesea ignorarea resurselor lingvistice externe existente, de exemplu WordNet sau ontologii specifice domeniului, cum ar fi Sistemul Unificat de Limbă Medicală (UMLS). Propunem o metodă generală, nouă pentru exploatarea acestor resurse prin partajarea greutății. Lucrările anterioare privind partajarea greutății în rețelele neurale au considerat-o în mare măsură ca un mijloc de compresie a modelului. În schimb, tratăm partajarea greutății ca un mecanism flexibil pentru încorporarea cunoștințelor anterioare în modelele neuronale. Aratăm că această abordare generează în mod constant performanțe îmbunătățite în ceea ce privește sarcinile de clasificare comparativ cu strategiile de bază care nu exploatează partajarea greutății.', 'mn': 'NLP-ийн мэдрэлийн загварын үндсэн давуу тал нь тэдний зурагтаа сурах чадвар юм. Гэхдээ үүнийг дасгал хөдөлгөөнд ихэвчлэн өөр гадаад хэлний нөөц боломжуудыг эсэргүүцэх гэсэн үг юм. Бид үүнийг жингийн хуваалцааны аргаар ашиглах ерөнхий, шинэ арга зам зааж байна. Өмнөх ажил нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд жин хуваалцах талаар үүнийг ихэвчлэн загварын даралтын арга гэж үздэг. Харамсалтай нь бид өмнө мэдлэгийг мэдрэлийн загвар руу оруулахын тулд жингийн хуваалцах механизм гэж үздэг. Бид энэ арга баримтууд жингийн хуваалцааныг ашиглахгүй суурь шугам стратегийг харьцуулахын тулд хуваалцааны даалгаврыг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'sr': 'Osnovna prednost neuralnih modela za NLP je njihova sposobnost naučiti zastupanje od ogrebotine. Međutim, na praksi to često znači ignorisanje postojećih vanjskih jezičkih resursa, na primer, WordNet ili specifičnih ontologija domena poput Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Predlažemo generalnu, novu metodu za iskorištavanje takvih resursa putem podeljenja težine. Prije rad na dijeljenju težine u neuralnim mrežama smatra da je to u velikoj mjeri kompresije model a. Za suprotno, tretiramo dijeljenje težine kao fleksibilni mehanizam za uključenje prethodnih znanja u neuralne modele. Pokazujemo da taj pristup stalno donosi poboljšan učinak na klasifikacijske zadatke u usporedbi sa početnim strategijama koja ne koriste dijeljenje težine.', 'sv': 'En grundläggande fördel med neurala modeller för NLP är deras förmåga att lära sig representationer från grunden. I praktiken innebär detta dock ofta att man ignorerar befintliga externa språkresurser, t.ex. WordNet eller domänspecifika ontologier som Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Vi föreslår en allmän, ny metod för att utnyttja sådana resurser genom viktdelning. Tidigare arbete med viktdelning i neurala nätverk har betraktat det till stor del som ett medel för modellkomprimering. Däremot behandlar vi viktdelning som en flexibel mekanism för att införliva tidigare kunskap i neurala modeller. Vi visar att detta tillvägagångssätt konsekvent ger bättre prestanda på klassificeringsuppgifter jämfört med baslinjestrategier som inte utnyttjar viktdelning.', 'so': 'Noocyada neurada ee NLP waxaa awood u leh in ay ka barto noocyada xiliga ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka loo jeedo in marka badan iska tago manfacyada luuqadaha dibadda ah, tusaale ahaan WordNet ama domain xirfado gaar ah, sida nidaamka caafimaadka e e Midowga (UMLS). We propose a general, novel method for exploiting such resources via weight sharing.  Shaqo hore oo ku saabsan saameyn ku saabsan shabakada neurada waxaa looga tiriyey sida qaab sameynta model. Isku saabsan, waxaynu u dhaqsanaynaa sharafta miisaanka sida meyr caqli leh, si aan aqoonta hore uga dhigno modelalka neurada. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaababkan si joogto ah u soo bixinayaa shaqooyinka fasaxa oo la barbaro qoraalada qoraalka hoose ee aan isticmaalayn sharafta miisaanka.', 'ur': 'NLP کے لئے نئورل موڈل کا بنیادی فائدہ یہ ہے کہ ان کی روشنی سے تعلیم سکھائیں. However, in practice this often means ignoring existing external linguistic resources, e.g., WordNet or domain specific ontologies such as the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). ہم ایک عمومی، نئی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ اس طرح کے سرمایہ کو وزن شریک کے ذریعے استعمال کریں۔ نئورل نیٹورک میں وزن شریک کرنے پر پہلے کام اس کو اکثر مدل کمپرس کے وسیلہ بنایا گیا ہے. مخالف، ہم وزن کے شریک کرنے کو نئورل موڈل میں پہلے علم کو جمع کرنے کے لئے ہلکا مکانیزم بناتے ہیں. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ ہمیشہ کلاسیفوں کے کاموں کے مقابلہ میں بہترین فعالیت پیدا کرتا ہے جو بوجھ شریک نہیں کرتی۔', 'ta': 'NLP க்கான புதிய மாதிரிகளின் அடிப்படையான பயன்பாடு என்றால் அவர்களுடைய பிரதிநிதினங்களை கற்று கொள்ள முடியும். ஆனால், இது பொதுவாக இருக்கும் வெளி மொழி வளங்களை புறக்கணிக்கும், உ. ம். வார்ட்நெட் அல்லது களத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிமொழி முறைமையை போன்று நாம் எடை பகிர்தல் மூலம் இந்த வளங்களை பயன்படுத்த ஒரு பொது, புதிய முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். புதிய வலைப்பின்னலில் பங்கிடுதல் முன்னிருப்பு வேலை அதை மாதிரி சுருக்கத்தின் வழியாக கருதுகிறது. முன்னால் அறிவை புதிய மாதிரிகளில் சேர்க்க முடியும் முன்னால் சேர்க்க, நாம் பங்கு பங்கீட்டை ஒரு flexible mechanism ஆக நாம் இந்த நெருக்கம் முறையாக காட்டுகிறது வகுப்பு பணிகளில் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டை வெளியிடுகிறது என்பதை அடிப்படைக', 'si': 'NLP වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩේල් එකේ මූලික ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේදී මේක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් අදහස් කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිදේශ භාෂාවික භාෂාවික භාෂාව අවස්ථාවක් නැති වෙන්න අපි සාමාන්\u200dය, නවාත්මක විදිහක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ජාතික ජාතිකයේ බලය සමාගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩකට ඒක ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරනවා මොඩාල් සංකුණ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි බලාගැනීමක් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් කලින් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් දැන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් විශේෂණ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට වැඩි වෙනවා කියලා', 'uz': "Name However, in practice this often means ignoring existing external linguistic resources, e.g., WordNet or domain specific ontologies such as the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS).  Biz bunday rasmlarni o'zgartirish orqali o'zgartirish uchun umumiy, novel usulini talab qilamiz. Name Ko'pchilik, biz birinchi ilmiy modellarni birlashtirish uchun oddiy qismini bir fleksiblik mechanism deb o'ylaymiz. Biz buni ko'rsatganimiz, bu usulni davomida tafsilotning vazifalarida o'zgartirib chiqaradi. Ularni o'zgartirish mumkin emas.", 'vi': 'Một lợi thế cơ bản của các mô hình thần kinh của đài NLP là khả năng học từ đầu. Tuy nhiên, trong thực tế, điều này thường có nghĩa là bỏ qua tài nguyên ngôn ngữ ngoại ngữ hiện tại, ví dụ như WordNet hay kiểm tra đặc biệt về miền như Hệ thống ngôn ngữ Y khoa bất hợp pháp (UMLS). Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp phổ biến mới để khai thác nguồn tài nguyên đó qua chia sẻ trọng lượng. Trước đây công việc chia sẻ trọng lượng trong mạng thần kinh đã xem nó là một phương tiện nén mô hình. Ngược lại, chúng tôi coi việc chia sẻ trọng lượng như một cơ chế linh hoạt để nhúng kiến thức trước vào các mô hình thần kinh. Chúng tôi cho rằng phương pháp này luôn có một thành công hoạt động hơn trong việc phân hạng so với những chiến thắng cơ sở cờ mà không khai thác một chia hành lượng.', 'bg': 'Основно предимство на невронните модели за НЛП е способността им да учат репрезентации от нулата. На практика обаче това често означава пренебрегване на съществуващите външни езикови ресурси, например WordNet или домейн специфични онтологии като Унифицираната медицинска езикова система (UMLS). Предлагаме общ, нов метод за използване на такива ресурси чрез споделяне на теглото. Предишна работа по споделяне на теглото в невронните мрежи го разглежда до голяма степен като средство за компресия на модела. За разлика от това, ние третираме споделянето на теглото като гъвкав механизъм за включване на предишни знания в невронните модели. Показваме, че този подход последователно дава по-добра производителност на задачите по класификация в сравнение с базовите стратегии, които не използват споделянето на теглото.', 'nl': 'Een fundamenteel voordeel van neurale modellen voor NLP is hun vermogen om representaties vanaf nul te leren. In de praktijk betekent dit echter vaak het negeren van bestaande externe taalbronnen, zoals WordNet of domeinspecifieke ontologieën zoals het Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Wij stellen een algemene, nieuwe methode voor het benutten van dergelijke middelen via gewichtsverdeling voor. Eerder onderzoek naar gewichtsverdeling in neurale netwerken heeft het grotendeels beschouwd als een middel voor modelcompressie. Daarentegen behandelen we gewichtsdeling als een flexibel mechanisme om voorkennis in neurale modellen op te nemen. We laten zien dat deze aanpak consistent betere prestaties oplevert bij classificatietaken in vergelijking met basisstrategieën die geen gebruik maken van gewichtsverdeling.', 'da': 'En grundlæggende fordel ved neurale modeller for NLP er deres evne til at lære repræsentationer fra bunden. I praksis betyder dette dog ofte, at man ignorerer eksisterende eksterne sproglige ressourcer, f.eks. WordNet eller domænespecifikke ontologier som Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Vi foreslår en generel, ny metode til at udnytte sådanne ressourcer via vægtdeling. Tidligere arbejde med vægtdeling i neurale netværk har betragtet det stort set som et middel til modelkomprimering. I modsætning hertil behandler vi vægtdeling som en fleksibel mekanisme til at indarbejde tidligere viden i neurale modeller. Vi viser, at denne tilgang konsekvent giver forbedret ydeevne på klassificeringsopgaver sammenlignet med basisstrategier, der ikke udnytter vægtdeling.', 'hr': 'Osnovna prednost neuralnih modela za NLP je njihova sposobnost naučiti zastupanje od ogrebotine. Međutim, na praksi to često znači ignoriranje postojećih vanjskih jezičkih resursa, na primjer WordNet ili specifičnih ontologija domena poput ujedinjenog medicinskog jezičkog sustava (UMLS). Predlažemo generalnu, novu metodu za iskorištavanje takvih resursa putem dijeljenja težine. Prije rad na dijeljenju težine u neuronskim mrežama smatra da je uglavnom kao sredstvo kompresije model a. Za suprotno, liječimo dijeljenje težine kao fleksibilni mehanizam za uključenje prethodnih znanja u neuralne modele. Pokazujemo da taj pristup stalno donosi poboljšanje učinka na klasifikacijskim zadatkima u usporedbi s početnim strategijama koja ne koriste dijeljenje težine.', 'id': 'Sebuah keuntungan dasar dari model saraf untuk NLP adalah kemampuan mereka untuk belajar representation dari nol. Namun, pada praktek ini sering berarti mengabaikan sumber daya bahasa eksternal yang ada, misalnya WordNet atau ontologi domain spesifik seperti Sistem Bahasa Medis Unified (UMLS). Kami mengusulkan metode umum, baru untuk mengeksploitasi sumber daya tersebut melalui berbagi berat badan. Pekerjaan sebelumnya untuk berbagi berat badan dalam jaringan saraf telah mempertimbangkannya sebagian besar sebagai cara kompresi model. Sebaliknya, kita memperlakukan pembagian berat badan sebagai mekanisme fleksibel untuk memasukkan pengetahuan sebelumnya ke model saraf. We show that this approach consistently yields improved performance on classification tasks compared to baseline strategies that do not exploit weight sharing.', 'fa': 'یک سودهای بنیادی از مدل عصبی برای NLP توانایی آنها برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای خاکستری است. با این وجود، این معنی اغلب به نادیده گرفتن منابع زبان خارجی وجود دارد، مثلاً WordNet یا domain specific ontologies such as the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). ما یک روش ژنرال و نویس برای استفاده از این منابع از طریق شریک وزن پیشنهاد می کنیم. کارهای اولیه در شریک وزن در شبکه های عصبی آن را بیشتر به عنوان وسیله فشار مدل به نظر گرفته است. در مقابل این، ما به عنوان یک مکانیسم flexible برای شروع علم قبلی به مدل عصبی درمان می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این روش همیشه عملکرد بهتر روی کارهای مختصری در مقایسه با استراتژی\u200cهای پایین که از شریک وزن استفاده نمی\u200cکنند.', 'ko': 'NLP의 신경 모형의 기본적인 장점은 처음부터 표현을 배울 수 있다는 것이다.그러나 실천에서 이것은 통상적으로 기존의 외부 언어 자원, 예를 들어WordNet이나 특정 분야의 본체, 예를 들어 통일의학언어시스템(UMLS)을 무시한다는 것을 의미한다.우리는 권중 공유를 통해 이 자원을 이용하는 통용적이고 참신한 방법을 제시했다.이전에 신경 네트워크에서의 권중 공유에 관한 연구는 주로 이를 모델 압축의 수단으로 여겼다.이에 비해 권중공유는 선험지식을 신경모델에 포함시키는 유연한 메커니즘으로 본다.우리는 권중공유를 이용하지 않는 기선 전략에 비해 이런 방법은 분류 임무에서 지속적으로 더 좋은 성능을 발생시킨다는 것을 보여준다.', 'de': 'Ein grundlegender Vorteil neuronaler Modelle für NLP ist ihre Fähigkeit, Darstellungen von Grund auf neu zu lernen. In der Praxis bedeutet dies jedoch oft, dass vorhandene externe linguistische Ressourcen wie WordNet oder domänenspezifische Ontologien wie das Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) ignoriert werden. Wir schlagen eine allgemeine, neuartige Methode zur Nutzung solcher Ressourcen durch Gewichtsverteilung vor. Frühere Arbeiten zur Gewichtsverteilung in neuronalen Netzen haben es weitgehend als Mittel der Modellkompression betrachtet. Im Gegensatz dazu betrachten wir Gewichtsverteilung als flexiblen Mechanismus, um Vorkenntnisse in neuronale Modelle zu integrieren. Wir zeigen, dass dieser Ansatz im Vergleich zu Basisstrategien, bei denen die Gewichtsverteilung nicht ausgenutzt wird, konsistent zu einer verbesserten Performance bei Klassifikationsaufgaben führt.', 'tr': 'NLP üçin nural modelleriniň esasy uly öňkilidir. Ýöne praktika g örä bu köplenç meýdança çykyş dillerini ýok etmek diýip görýär, meselâ, WordNet ýa Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) ýaly WordNet ýa-da domain takyky ontologiýalary. Biz bu ýaly çeşmeleri a ğırlyk paylaşma bilen ulanmak üçin jeneral, nowel yöntemi teklip edip görýäris. Niral şebekelerinde ölçüli iň öňki işiň bu şekilde nusgala kompressiýasynyň bir nusgasy diýip pikir edýär. Daha tersi, öňki bilim sistemini nöral modellere dahil etmek üçin kil paylaşmayı fleksible bir mekanizma olarak tedavi ediyoruz. Biz bu ýalaýyşyň klasifikasiýa görevleriniň üýtgetmeýän basit stratejiýalary bilen daşary gowy gazanýandygyny görkeýäris.', 'sq': 'Një avantazh thelbësor i modeleve neuronale për NLP është aftësia e tyre për të mësuar përfaqësime nga zero. Megjithatë, në praktikë kjo shpesh do të thotë injorimin e burimeve të jashtme gjuhësore ekzistuese, për shembull WordNet apo ontologjitë specifike në domeni të tilla si Sistemi i Bashkuar i Gjuhave Mjekësore (UMLS). Ne propozojmë një metodë të përgjithshme, të re për shfrytëzimin e burimeve të tilla nëpërmjet ndarjes së peshës. Prior work on weight sharing in neural networks has considered it largely as a means of model compression.  Në ndryshim, ne trajtojmë ndarjen e peshës si një mekanizëm fleksibel për përfshirjen e njohurive të mëparshme në modelet neuronale. Ne tregojmë se kjo qasje sjell vazhdimisht rezultate të përmirësuara në detyrat klasifikuese krahasuar me strategjitë bazë që nuk shfrytëzojnë ndarjen e peshës.', 'sw': 'Utanzo wa msingi wa mifano ya ubongo wa NLP ni uwezo wao wa kujifunza uwakilishi kutoka kwenye viwanja vya habari. Hata hivyo, katika mazoea haya mara nyingi huwa inamaanisha kuacha rasilimali za lugha za nje, mfano, WordNet au maeneo maalum ya ndani kama vile Mfumo wa Lugha ya Kitiba (UMLS). Tunazipendekeza njia ya kijamii, ya riwaya kwa kutumia rasilimali kama hizi kwa kutumia usambazaji wa uzito. Kazi ya awali ya kushirikiana na uzito katika mitandao ya neura imechukulia kama njia ya shinikizo la mifano. Tofauti na hilo, tunatumia kushirikiana uzito kama mfumo mzuri wa kuingiza maarifa ya awali katika mifano ya ubongo. Tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu hii kwa ujumla unaleta ufanisi wa kuboresha kazi za usambazaji ukilinganishwa na mikakati ya msingi ambayo hayatumia ushirikiano wa uzito.', 'af': "'n Basiese voordeel van neurale modelles vir NLP is hul moontlik om voorstellings te leer van skrewe. Maar in praksie beteken dit dikwels om bestaande eksterne lingvisse hulpbronne te ignoreer, bv. WordNet of domein spesifieke ontologies soos die Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Ons voorstel 'n algemeen, roman metode om sodanige hulpbronne te gebruik deur gewig deel. Vorige werk op gewig deel in neuralnetwerke het dit groot as 'n bediening van model kompressie aangesien. Ons behandel gewig deel as 'n fleksibel mekanisme om voorheede kennis in neurale modele te inkorporeer. Ons wys dat hierdie toegang konsistentlik verbeterde effektuur op klassifikasie taak vergelyk word met baselyn strategies wat nie gewig deel nie.", 'am': 'የNLP ብሔራዊ ጠቅላላ የናውሮው ሞዴላዎች ከክፍለ ክፍል የተመሳሳይ መብት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ይህ ሁኔታ የውጭው ቋንቋዎች ሀብትን በመውሰድ፣ ለምሳሌ የWordNet ወይም ዶሜን በተለያዩ የጤናዊ መፍተኛ ቋንቋ ሲስተም (UMLS) የሚለውን ትምህርት ነው፡፡ We propose a general, novel method for exploiting such resources via weight sharing.  የናውራዊ መረብ መጋቢነት ከመጀመሪያው ሥራ በብዛት የሞዴል አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በተለይ፣ የውቀትን ቀድሞ እውቀትን በናውሬል ሞዴላዎችን ለመቀበል አካባቢ መሆኑን እንቆጣለን፡፡ ይህም ሥርዓት በተለያዩ የክፍለ ሥርዓት ትክክል ማሰናከል የማይችሉትን የመሠረተሪያ ትክክለኛ ስርዓት እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մոդելների հիմնական առավելությունը ՆԵՊ-ի համար նրանց կարողությունն է զրոյից ներկայացուցիչներ սովորել: Այնուամենայնիվ, իրականության մեջ դա հաճախ նշանակում է անտեսել գոյություն ունեցող արտաքին լեզվաբանական ռեսուրսները, օրինակ WordNet-ը կամ բնագավառի մասնավոր օնտոլոգիաները, ինչպիսիք են Միացյալ բժշկական լեզվաբանական Մենք առաջարկում ենք ընդհանուր, նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք այս ռեսուրսները կշիռի կիսման միջոցով: Prior work on weight sharing in neural networks has considered it largely as a means of model compression.  Դրան հակառակ, մենք կշիռի կիսվելը վերաբերում ենք որպես ճկուն մեխանիզմ նախորդ գիտելիքների ներգրավման նյարդային մոդելների մեջ: We show that this approach consistently yields improved performance on classification tasks compared to baseline strategies that do not exploit weight sharing.', 'az': 'NLP üçün nöral modellərin əsas mənfəəti çəkilməsindən öyrənməyə qadirdir. Lakin bu təqdirdə çox çox dəyişiklik deyil, həmçin in birləşdirilmiş Təbbi Dil Sistemi (UMLS) kimi WordNet və domain specifik ontologiyalarını g örməyə məcburiyyət edir. Biz böyük kaynaqları a ğırlı paylaşma vasitəsilə istifadə etmək üçün genel, yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Nöral a ğlarında ağırlıq paylaşılması haqqında əvvəlki işlər bunu çox modeli kompresiyon vasitəsi kimi hesab edir. Əvvəlki bilgi nöral modellərə daxil olmaq üçün a ğırlıq paylaşılmasını fleksib bir mehanizmi kimi təmin edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, bu metod, ağırlıq paylaşılmasını istifadə etməyən tədbir stratejiləri ilə müqayisədə klasifikasiya işlərində daha yaxşı performans yaradır.', 'bn': 'এনএলপির জন্য নিউরেল মডেলের মৌলিক সুবিধা তবে প্রায়শই বিদেশী ভাষার সম্পদ উপেক্ষা করে, যেমন ওয়ার্ডনেট অথবা ডোমেইনের বিশেষ পরিকল্পনা যেমন ইউনিটেডিকেল ভাষা সিস্টেম (UMLS)। আমরা ওজন শেয়ার করার মাধ্যমে এরকম সম্পদ ব্যবহার করার জন্য একটি জেনারেল, নোভেল পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কে ভাগাভাগি করার প্রাথমিক কাজ বিবেচনা করেছে যে এটি মোডেল সম্পাদনের একটি উপায় হিসেবে। বিপরীতে, আমরা পূর্ববর্তী জ্ঞান নিউরেল মডেলে যুক্ত করার জন্য একটি ফ্লিক্সিবল মেকানিস হিসেবে ভাগাভাগি করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রযুক্তিটি বেসাইলাইনের কৌশলের তুলনায় ক্লাসেফ কাজের উপর উন্নত কার্যক্রম উৎপাদন করে যা ওজন শেয়ার করে না।', 'ca': "Un avantatge fonamental dels models neuronals per a NLP és la seva habilitat d'aprendre representacions des de zero. Però en la pràctica això sovint vol dir ignorar els recursos lingüístics externs existents, per exemple WordNet o ontologies específices de dominis com el Sistema Unificat de Llingua Médica (UMLS). Proposem un mètode general i nou per explotar aquests recursos mitjançant el compartiment de pes. La feina anterior en compartir pes en xarxes neurals l'ha considerat en gran part com un mitjà de compressió model. En canvi, tractem la compartició de pes com un mecanisme flexible per incorporar coneixements anteriors als models neuronals. Mostrem que aquest enfocament produeix un rendiment millorat en les tasques de classificació en comparació amb estratègies de base que no expliquen el compartiment de pes.", 'et': 'NLP närvimudelite oluline eelis on nende võime õppida esitusi nullist. Praktikas tähendab see sageli olemasolevate väliste keeleliste ressursside eiramist, nt WordNet või domeenispetsiifiliste ontoloogiate, nagu ühtne meditsiiniline keelesüsteem (UMLS). Me pakume välja üldise ja uudse meetodi selliste ressursside kasutamiseks kaalu jagamise kaudu. Varasem töö kaalu jagamisel närvivõrkudes on pidanud seda suures osas mudeli kompressiooni vahendiks. Seevastu käsitleme kaalu jagamist paindliku mehhanismina eelnevate teadmiste lisamiseks närvimudelitesse. Näitame, et selline lähenemisviis annab klassifitseerimisülesannete täitmisel järjepidevalt parema tulemuse võrreldes baasstrateegiatega, mis ei kasuta kaalu jagamist ära.', 'bs': 'Osnovna prednost neuralnih modela za NLP je njihova sposobnost naučiti zastupanje od ogrebotine. Međutim, na praksi to često znači ignoriranje postojećih vanjskih jezičkih resursa, na primjer WordNet ili specifičnih ontologija domena poput Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Predlažemo generalnu, novu metodu za iskorištavanje takvih resursa putem podjele težine. Prije rad na dijeljenju težine u nervnim mrežama smatra da je u velikoj mjeri kompresije model a. Za suprotno, tretiramo dijeljenje težine kao fleksibilni mehanizam za uključenje prethodnih znanja u neuralne modele. Pokazujemo da taj pristup konsekventno donosi poboljšanje učinka na klasifikacijskim zadatkima u usporedbi s početnim strategijama koja ne koriste dijeljenje težine.', 'fi': 'NLP:n neuromallien perusetu on niiden kyky oppia representaatioita tyhjästä. Käytännössä tämä tarkoittaa kuitenkin usein olemassa olevien ulkoisten kieliresurssien, kuten WordNetin tai verkkotunnuskohtaisten ontologioiden, kuten Unified Medical Language System (UMLS), sivuuttamista. Ehdotamme yleistä, uutta menetelmää tällaisten resurssien hyödyntämiseksi painon jakamisen avulla. Aiempi työ painon jakamisesta neuroverkoissa on pitänyt sitä pitkälti mallikompression välineenä. Sen sijaan käsittelemme painonjakoa joustavana mekanismina aikaisemman tiedon sisällyttämiseksi neuromalleihin. Osoitamme, että tämä lähestymistapa parantaa johdonmukaisesti luokitustehtävien suorituskykyä verrattuna perusstrategioihin, joissa painonjakoa ei hyödynnetä.', 'cs': 'Základní výhodou neuronových modelů pro NLP je jejich schopnost učit se reprezentace od nuly. V praxi to však často znamená ignorování existujících externích jazykových zdrojů, např. WordNet nebo doménově specifické ontologie, jako je Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Navrhujeme obecnou, novou metodu využívání těchto zdrojů prostřednictvím sdílení hmotnosti. Předchozí práce na sdílení hmotnosti v neuronových sítích ji považovaly z velké části za prostředek komprese modelu. Naproti tomu považujeme sdílení hmotnosti za flexibilní mechanismus pro začlenění předchozích znalostí do neuronových modelů. Ukazujeme, že tento přístup důsledně přináší lepší výkon klasifikačních úkolů ve srovnání se základními strategiemi, které nevyužívají sdílení hmotnosti.', 'jv': 'Layout politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem Generalé, yu bagian nggawe dolanan kaya ngono nggawe dolanan podho share. Wicd layers-action Awak dhéwé ngerasah bener iki dadi nggawe akeh luwih nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasai winih sing luwih basa sing bisa gerakan nggawe gerakan akeh perusahaan winih dhéwé.', 'ha': "Wani kyautar misalin neural wa NLP yana da awon su iya karanta halartattu daga taɓa. A lokacin da ake amfani da shi, ko ko kuma yana madaidaita a ƙididdige manyan harshen na ƙarƙashin da ke gaba, misali, tsarin maganar Net ko Domen masu ƙayyade lokalogi kamar Shirin Lazarar da aka Unified (UMLS). Tuna buɗa'a wata hanyowa mai gabatar da kuma za mu yi amfani da abincin wannan a tsakanin sharing masu nauyi. Kayyan aikin sharinin nau'i cikin zangaron neural, ya ƙaddara shi yana da wani hanyor misumarni. Tsammãnin shi, Munã sami sharinin masu nau'i kamar mekanin mai lokacin da za'a shigar da ilmi a gabãni zuwa misãlai neura. Tuna nũna cewa wannan hanyarwa yana fitar da mafiya kyau a kan aikin classifori sami da takikin bakwai waɗanda ba su sami sharin nau'i ba.", 'sk': 'Temeljna prednost nevronskih modelov za NLP je njihova sposobnost učenja reprezentacij iz nič. Vendar pa v praksi to pogosto pomeni ignoriranje obstoječih zunanjih jezikovnih virov, npr. WordNet ali domenske ontologije, kot je Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). Predlagamo splošno, novo metodo za izkoriščanje takih virov z delitvijo teže. Predhodno delo na področju delitve teže v nevronskih omrežjih ga je v veliki meri obravnavalo kot sredstvo kompresije modela. Nasprotno pa delitev teže obravnavamo kot fleksibilen mehanizem za vključevanje predhodnega znanja v nevronske modele. Pokazali smo, da ta pristop dosledno zagotavlja boljšo učinkovitost pri opravilih klasifikacije v primerjavi z osnovnimi strategijami, ki ne izkoriščajo porazdelitve teže.', 'he': 'יתרון בסיסי של דוגמנים עצביים של NLP הוא היכולת שלהם ללמוד מייצגים מאפס. בכל אופן, למעשה זה לעתים קרובות אומר להתעלם משאבים שפתיים חיצוניים קיימים, למשל WordNet או אונטולוגיות ספציפיות לתחום כמו מערכת השפה הרפואית המאוחדת (UMLS). We propose a general, novel method for exploiting such resources via weight sharing.  העבודה הקודמת על שיתוף משקל ברשתות עצביות חשבה בה בעיקר כאמצע לחיצה מודל. בניגוד לזה, אנחנו מתייחסים לחלוק משקל כמנגנון גמיש להכניס ידע קודם לדוגמנים עצביים. אנו מראים שהגישה הזאת נותנת ביצועים משתפרים במשימות מסווג בהשוואה לאסטרטגיות בסיסיות שלא מנצלות שיתוף משקל.', 'bo': 'NLP དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིད་ཚད་ཞིབ་བཤེར་ནས་གྲངས་སྟོན་རྩིས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། However, in practice this often means ignoring existing external linguistic resources, e.g., WordNet or domain specific ontologies such as the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS). ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཆེན་དུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་སྤྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ནུས་མཐུན་དྲ་ཐོག ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ནི་རྟག་པར་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ལས་འགུལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ན།'}
{'en': 'Improving Neural Parsing by Disentangling Model Combination and Reranking Effects', 'ar': 'تحسين الاعراب العصبي عن طريق فك التشابك بين النموذج وتأثيرات إعادة الترتيب', 'fr': "Amélioration de l'analyse neuronale par démêlage des combinaisons de modèles et des effets de reclassement", 'pt': 'Melhorando a análise neural ao desembaraçar a combinação de modelos e os efeitos de reclassificação', 'es': 'Mejora del análisis neuronal al desenredar la combinación de modelos y los efectos de cambio de clasificación', 'ja': 'モデルの結合と再ランキング効果の分離による神経解析の改善', 'hi': 'Disentangling मॉडल संयोजन और Reranking प्रभाव द्वारा तंत्रिका पार्सिंग में सुधार', 'zh': '因解模结,以进神经解析', 'ru': 'Улучшение нейронного синтаксического анализа за счет распутания комбинации моделей и эффектов реранжировки', 'ga': 'Parsáil Néarach a Fheabhsú trí Chomhcheangal Múnlaí agus Éifeachtaí a Athrangú a Dhícheangal', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της Νευρικής Ανάλυσης με τον συνδυασμό μοντέλων και τα αποτελέσματα επανακατάταξης', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A neurális értelmezés javítása modellkombinációs és átrendező hatások eltávolításával', 'it': "Miglioramento dell'analisi neurale mediante la separazione della combinazione di modelli e la riorganizzazione degli effetti", 'kk': 'Невралды талдау үлгісін біріктіру және қайта реттеу эффекттері арқылы', 'ms': 'Menyambungkan Penghuraian Neural dengan Penggabungan Model Menyahsuai dan Kesan Penghuraian Semula', 'lt': 'Geresnis neurologinis analizavimas naudojant atsijungiantį modelį derinant ir klasifikuojant poveikį', 'mk': 'Improving Neural Parsing by Disentangling Model Combination and Reranking Effects', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഡിസ്റ്റെന്റ് ചെയ്യുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d കോമ്മിനഷനും പുനരുതിയ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളും മുന്\u200dകൂട', 'mt': 'Titjib tal-Analiżi Newrali permezz tal-Effetti ta’ Kombinazzjoni u Klassifikazzjoni mill-ġdid tal-Mudell ta’ Disentangling', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварын холбоотой болон дахин зарцуулах эффектүүд', 'no': 'Å forbetra nøyralt tolking ved å kombinere og rekreaseringseffektar i modellen', 'pl': 'Poprawa analizy nerwowej poprzez połączenie modelu dezintegrowania i efekty zmiany rankingu', 'ro': 'Îmbunătăţirea analizării neurale prin dezlegarea combinaţiei modelelor şi rearanjarea efectelor', 'si': 'විශාල විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විශාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින්.', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje neurološkog analiza sa kombinacijom modela i rendžanjem efekta', 'so': 'Improving Parsing Neural by Disentangling Model Combination and Reranking Effects', 'ta': 'மாதிரி இணைப்பு மற்றும் மறுபடியும் விளைவுகள் மூலம் நெய்யால் பாசிங்கள் முன்னேற்றப்படுகிறது', 'sv': 'Förbättra neural tolkning genom att desintera modellkombination och omrrangera effekter', 'ur': 'نائرئرل پارسینگ کو ڈیٹانٹنگلینگ موڈل کی تعمیر اور دوبارہ رینڈینگ اثرات کے ذریعہ بہتر کر رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng khả năng phân tích thần kinh bằng cách kết hợp mô hình rối loạn', 'nl': 'Verbetering van neurale parsing door Disentangling Model Combinatie en Reranking Effecten', 'bg': 'Подобряване на невралното анализиране чрез комбиниране на моделите и преподреждане на ефектите', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje neurološkog razmatranja s kombinacijom modela i ponovnim učinkama', 'da': 'Forbedring af neural fortolkning ved at fjerne modelkombination og omarrangere effekter', 'id': 'Menembak Analisasi Neural Dengan Kombinasi Model Disentangling dan Efek Reranking', 'de': 'Verbesserung der neuronalen Analyse durch Disentangling-Modellkombination und Reranking-Effekte', 'tr': 'Taýdan çykarmak Modeli birleştirmek we ýene derejlenmek etkinlerden bejermek', 'fa': 'بهترین تحلیل عصبی با تغییر تغییرات مدل ترکیب و تغییر رنجینگ', 'ko': '분리 모델 조합과 재배열 효과로 신경 해석 개선', 'af': 'Verbeter Neurale Onderwerking deur Onderwerking Model Kombineer en Herranking Effekte', 'sw': 'Kuboresha ubaguzi wa Neural na Kuchanganya Model Combination and Restarting Effects', 'am': 'drawable-action', 'az': 'N√∂ral analizi √ß…ôkilm…ô modeli birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk v…ô yeni r…ôngli Etkileri il…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrma', 'bn': 'মোডেল সংযোগ এবং পুনরায় রেঙ্কিং প্রভাবের মাধ্যমে নিউরাল পার্সিং এর উন্নতি', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i analizimit nervor nga Kombinacioni i Modelit të Zhgënjyeshëm dhe Efektet e Rirenditjes', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje neurološkog analiza pod kombinacijom modela i ponovnom reagiranjem učinka', 'hy': 'Զարգացնել նյարդային վերլուծությունը զարգացնող մոդելի համադրման և վերադասավորման էֆեկտների միջոցով', 'ca': "millorar l'analització neuronal mitjançant les combinacions i els efectes de reclassificació del model desenvolupant", 'cs': 'Zlepšení neuronového analýzování pomocí kombinace modelu Disentangling a účinků přehodnocení', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen parsauksen parantaminen disentangling-malliyhdistelmän ja uudelleensijoitusvaikutusten avulla', 'et': 'Neuraalse parsimise parandamine disentangling mudeli kombinatsiooni ja ümberkorraldamise efektide abil', 'jv': 'Gjelongi penting Nyural Rasing nganggep Desantagling model Kombintion lan Reranging Effects', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שיפור בדיקת נוירואלית על ידי שילוב מודל משוחרר ושפעות מחדש', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje živčnega razvrščanja s kombinacijo disentangling modela in učinki prerazvrščanja', 'bo': 'Disentangling Model Combination and Reranking Effects ໂດຍ་བརྒྱུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Recent work has proposed several generative neural models for constituency parsing that achieve state-of-the-art results. Since direct search in these generative models is difficult, they have primarily been used to rescore candidate outputs from base parsers in which decoding is more straightforward. We first present an algorithm for direct search in these generative models. We then demonstrate that the rescoring results are at least partly due to implicit model combination rather than reranking effects. Finally, we show that explicit model combination can improve performance even further, resulting in new state-of-the-art numbers on the PTB of 94.25 F1 when training only on gold data and 94.66 F1 when using external data.', 'es': 'Un trabajo reciente ha propuesto varios modelos neuronales generativos para el análisis de las circunscripciones que logran resultados de última generación. Dado que la búsqueda directa en estos modelos generativos es difícil, se han utilizado principalmente para volver a puntuar las salidas candidatas de los analizadores base en los que la decodificación es más sencilla. Presentamos primero un algoritmo de búsqueda directa en estos modelos generativos. Luego demostramos que los resultados de la recalificación se deben, al menos en parte, a una combinación de modelos implícita en lugar de a efectos de cambio de clasificación. Por último, mostramos que la combinación explícita de modelos puede mejorar aún más el rendimiento, lo que resulta en nuevos números de última generación en el PTB de 94,25 F1 cuando se entrena solo con datos de oro y 94,66 F1 cuando se utilizan datos externos.', 'ar': 'اقترح العمل الأخير العديد من النماذج العصبية التوليدية لتحليل الدوائر الانتخابية التي تحقق أحدث النتائج. نظرًا لأن البحث المباشر في هذه النماذج التوليدية صعب ، فقد تم استخدامها في المقام الأول لإعادة تحديد النواتج المرشحة من الموزعين الأساسيين حيث يكون فك التشفير أكثر وضوحًا. نقدم أولاً خوارزمية للبحث المباشر في هذه النماذج التوليدية. نوضح بعد ذلك أن نتائج الإنقاذ ترجع جزئيًا على الأقل إلى تركيبة نموذج ضمني بدلاً من تأثيرات إعادة التصنيف. أخيرًا ، نظهر أن مجموعة النماذج الصريحة يمكن أن تحسن الأداء بشكل أكبر ، مما ينتج عنه أرقام جديدة على أحدث طراز على PTB من 94.25 F1 عند التدريب فقط على بيانات الذهب و 94.66 F1 عند استخدام البيانات الخارجية.', 'fr': "Des travaux récents ont proposé plusieurs modèles neuronaux génératifs pour l'analyse des constituants qui permettent d'obtenir des résultats de pointe. Comme la recherche directe dans ces modèles génératifs est difficile, ils ont principalement été utilisés pour réévaluer les sorties candidates des analyseurs de base dans lesquels le décodage est plus simple. Nous présentons d'abord un algorithme de recherche directe dans ces modèles génératifs. Nous démontrons ensuite que les résultats de la nouvelle évaluation sont au moins en partie dus à une combinaison de modèles implicite plutôt qu'à des effets de changement de classement. Enfin, nous montrons que la combinaison explicite de modèles peut améliorer encore les performances, ce qui se traduit par de nouveaux chiffres de pointe sur le PTB de 94,25 F1 lors de l'entraînement uniquement sur des données Gold et de 94,66 F1 lors de l'utilisation de données externes.", 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes propuseram vários modelos neurais generativos para análise de constituintes que alcançam resultados de última geração. Como a busca direta nesses modelos generativos é difícil, eles têm sido usados principalmente para rescorer saídas candidatas de analisadores de base nos quais a decodificação é mais direta. Apresentamos primeiro um algoritmo para busca direta nesses modelos generativos. Em seguida, demonstramos que os resultados de reclassificação são, pelo menos em parte, devido à combinação implícita de modelos, em vez de efeitos de reclassificação. Por fim, mostramos que a combinação explícita de modelos pode melhorar ainda mais o desempenho, resultando em novos números de última geração no PTB de 94,25 F1 ao treinar apenas em dados gold e 94,66 F1 ao usar dados externos.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、最先端の結果を達成する選挙区構文解析のためのいくつかの生成ニューラルモデルが提案されている。これらの生成モデルにおける直接検索は困難であるため、それらは主にデコードがより簡単であるベース構文解析器からの候補出力を再スコアリングするために使用されてきた。まず、これらの生成モデルで直接検索するためのアルゴリズムを提示します。次いで、再スコアリング結果が、少なくとも部分的に、再ランク効果ではなく、暗黙のモデルの組み合わせに起因することを実証する。最後に、明示的なモデルの組み合わせは、パフォーマンスをさらに向上させることができ、金データのみでトレーニングする場合は94.25 F 1、外部データを使用する場合は94.66 F 1のPTB上の新しい最先端の数値をもたらします。', 'zh': '近事举解析成神经,则先进矣。 凡此诸形,径索甚难,故其要在重评分解析器选输,其解码更直。 我们先在这些生成模形中发出一种直搜索的算法。 然后验其复评分者,隐式合而不名也。 显式可进一步提高,当仅教以黄金,PTB上PTB为94.25 F1,外数以数,PTB为94.66 F1。', 'ru': 'Недавние работы предложили несколько генеративных нейронных моделей для анализа избирательных округов, которые достигают самых современных результатов. Поскольку прямой поиск в этих генеративных моделях затруднен, они в первую очередь используются для спасения результатов-кандидатов из базовых парсеров, в которых декодирование является более простым. Сначала мы представляем алгоритм прямого поиска в этих генеративных моделях. Затем мы демонстрируем, что результаты оценки, по крайней мере, частично обусловлены неявной комбинацией моделей, а не эффектами перестановки. Наконец, мы показываем, что явная комбинация моделей может улучшить производительность еще больше, в результате чего новые современные цифры на PTB составят 94,25 F1 при обучении только по данным Gold и 94,66 F1 при использовании внешних данных.', 'hi': 'हाल के काम ने निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग के लिए कई उत्पादक तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तावित किए हैं जो अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। चूंकि इन उत्पादक मॉडलों में प्रत्यक्ष खोज मुश्किल है, इसलिए उनका उपयोग मुख्य रूप से बेस पार्सर से उम्मीदवार आउटपुट को फिर से बनाने के लिए किया गया है जिसमें डिकोडिंग अधिक सरल है। हम पहले इन उत्पादक मॉडलों में प्रत्यक्ष खोज के लिए एक एल्गोरिथ्म प्रस्तुत करते हैं। फिर हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि rescoring परिणाम कम से कम आंशिक रूप से reranking प्रभाव के बजाय अंतर्निहित मॉडल संयोजन के कारण हैं। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि स्पष्ट मॉडल संयोजन प्रदर्शन में और भी सुधार कर सकता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप 94.25 एफ 1 के पीटीबी पर नए अत्याधुनिक संख्याएं होती हैं जब बाहरी डेटा का उपयोग करते समय केवल सोने के डेटा और 94.66 एफ 1 पर प्रशिक्षण होता है।', 'ga': 'Tá roinnt samhlacha néaracha giniúna molta ag obair le déanaí do pharsáil toghlaigh a ghnóthaíonn torthaí den scoth. Ós rud é go bhfuil sé deacair cuardach díreach a dhéanamh ar na samhlacha giniúna seo, baineadh úsáid astu go príomha chun aschuir iarrthóirí a athscóráil ó bhunpharsálaithe ina bhfuil díchódú níos simplí. Cuirimid algartam i láthair don chuardach díreach ar dtús sna samhlacha giniúna seo. Léirímid ansin go bhfuil na torthaí aiséirithe i bpáirt ar a laghad mar gheall ar chomhcheangal samhlacha intuigthe seachas éifeachtaí athrangaithe. Mar fhocal scoir, léirímid gur féidir le comhcheangal múnla sainráite feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht níos mó, rud a fhágann go mbeidh uimhreacha nua-aimseartha ar an PTB de 94.25 F1 nuair nach bhfuil ach oiliúint ar shonraí óir agus 94.66 F1 nuair a úsáidtear sonraí seachtracha.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν προτείνει διάφορα γενετήσια νευρωνικά μοντέλα για ανάλυση εκλογικών περιφερειών που επιτυγχάνουν αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Δεδομένου ότι η άμεση αναζήτηση σε αυτά τα παραγωγικά μοντέλα είναι δύσκολη, έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί πρωτίστως για να επαναπροσδιορίσουν τις υποψήφιες εξόδους από αναλυτές βάσης, στους οποίους η αποκωδικοποίηση είναι πιο απλή. Πρώτα παρουσιάζουμε έναν αλγόριθμο άμεσης αναζήτησης σε αυτά τα παραγωγικά μοντέλα. Στη συνέχεια, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα αποτελέσματα αναπροσαρμογής οφείλονται τουλάχιστον εν μέρει σε έμμεσο συνδυασμό μοντέλων και όχι σε αποτελέσματα επανακατάταξης. Τέλος, δείχνουμε ότι ο ρητός συνδυασμός μοντέλων μπορεί να βελτιώσει ακόμα περισσότερο την απόδοση, με αποτέλεσμα να προκύψουν νέοι αριθμοί τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στον PTB 94.25 F1 όταν προπονείται μόνο σε χρυσά δεδομένα και 94.66 F1 όταν χρησιμοποιεί εξωτερικά δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi munkák több generációs neurális modellt javasoltak a választókerületi elemzéshez, amelyek korszerű eredményeket érnek el. Mivel a közvetlen keresés ezekben a generációs modellekben nehéz, ezeket elsősorban arra használták, hogy újraértékeljék a jelölt kimeneteket báziselemzőkből, ahol a dekódolás sokkal egyszerűbb. Először bemutatunk egy algoritmust a közvetlen kereséshez ezekben a generációs modellekben. Ezt követően bebizonyítjuk, hogy az átrendezési eredmények legalább részben implicit modellkombinációnak köszönhetőek, nem pedig átrendezési hatásoknak. Végezetül megmutatjuk, hogy a kifejezett modellkombináció még tovább javíthatja a teljesítményt, ami új, korszerű számokat eredményez a PTB 94.25 F1-en, amikor csak arany adatokon edzünk, és 94.66 F1-en külső adatok használata esetén.', 'ka': 'ახალი სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო წარმოდგენენტური ნეირალური მოდელები, რომლებიც შემდეგ წარმოდგენების შესახებ. მაშინ ეს გენერაციური მოდელში დირექტიური ძებნა ძალიან რთული იყო, მათ უფრო მხოლოდ გამოყენებულია კანდიდენტის გამოსახულებების შემდეგ ბაზის პარასერიდან, რომელიც კოდიოდი ჩვენ პირველად დავიწყეთ ალგორიტიმ ამ გენერაციური მოდელებში. შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ მოდელური კომბიზაციის შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შე საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ განსხვავებული მოდელური კომბუნიკაცია უფრო მეტი შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ მუშაობას, როდესაც შეგვიძლია ახალი სიცოცხლის რიცხვები 94.25 F1-ის PTB-ში, როდესაც მხ', 'mk': 'Recent work has proposed several generative neural models for constituency parsing that achieve state-of-the-art results.  Бидејќи директното пребарување во овие генерационални модели е тешко, тие се користат претежно за препознавање на кандидатските излези од базичките анализатори во кои декодирањето е поедноставно. Прво претставуваме алгоритм за директно пребарување во овие генеративни модели. Потоа демонстрираме дека резултатите на презапишувањето се барем делумно поради имплицитна комбинација на моделот наместо повторно враќање на ефектите. Конечно, покажуваме дека експлицитната комбинација на моделот може да ја подобри резултатот уште понатаму, резултирајќи со нови најнови броеви на ПТБ од 94,25 Ф1 кога се обучуваат само за златни податоци и 94,66 Ф1 кога се користат надворешни податоци.', 'it': "Recenti lavori hanno proposto diversi modelli neurali generativi per l'analisi delle circoscrizioni che raggiungono risultati all'avanguardia. Poiché la ricerca diretta in questi modelli generativi è difficile, sono stati utilizzati principalmente per rescorre gli output candidati da parser base in cui la decodifica è più semplice. Per prima cosa presentiamo un algoritmo per la ricerca diretta in questi modelli generativi. Dimostriamo quindi che i risultati del rescoring sono dovuti almeno in parte alla combinazione implicita di modelli piuttosto che agli effetti di ricalcolazione. Infine, mostriamo che la combinazione esplicita di modelli può migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni, con nuovi numeri all'avanguardia sul PTB di 94.25 F1 quando si allena solo su dati dorati e 94.66 F1 quando si utilizzano dati esterni.", 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktas darbas pasiūlė keletą kartų sukeltų nervų modelių rinkimų apygardai analizuoti, kad būtų pasiekti naujausi rezultatai. Kadangi tiesioginis šių kartų modelių paieškas yra sudėtingas, jie pirmiausia buvo naudojami kandidatų rezultatams iš bazinių analizatorių, kuriuose dekodiavimas yra paprastesnis. Pirmiausia pristatome algoritmą tiesioginiam paieškai šiose kartose. Tada parodysime, kad rezultatai iš dalies atsiranda dėl netiesioginio modelio derinio, o ne dėl pakartotinio ryšio poveikio. Galiausiai parodome, kad aiškus modelio derinys gali dar labiau pagerinti veiklos rezultatus, todėl naudojant išorinius duomenis gali būti nauji naujausi 94,25 F1 PTB numeriai.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жұмыс бірнеше жалпы невралдық моделдерді ұсынады. Бұл құрылғының нәтижесін жеткізеді. Бұл генерациялық үлгілерде тікелей іздеу қиын болғандықтан, олар негізгі талдаушылардың шығысын қайта жеткізу үшін қолданылады. Біріншіден бұл генеративтік үлгілерде тікелей іздеу алгоритмін таңдаймыз. Содан кейін біз қайта сақтау нәтижелерін қайта сақтау үшін кемінде бірнеше нәтижелерін көрсетедік. Соңында, біз түсінікті үлгі жинақтастыруды жақсы жасауға болады дегенді көрсету үшін 94,25 F1 PTB-нің жаңа күй- жайы нөмірлерін тек алтын деректеріне және 94,66 F1-нің сыртқы деректерін қолданғанда оқыту', 'ms': 'Recent work has proposed several generative neural models for constituency parsing that achieve state-of-the-art results.  Kerana pencarian langsung dalam model generasi ini sukar, mereka telah digunakan untuk menyalin semula output calon dari penghurai asas di mana penyahkodan lebih mudah. Kita pertama-tama memperkenalkan algoritma untuk mencari langsung dalam model generasi ini. Kemudian kita menunjukkan bahawa hasil penyegerakan sekurang-kurangnya sebahagian disebabkan kombinasi model secara implicit selain daripada penyegerakan semula kesan. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bahawa kombinasi model eksplicit boleh meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut, yang menghasilkan nombor-nombor baru-state-of-the-art pada PTB 94.25 F1 apabila latihan hanya pada data emas dan 94.66 F1 apabila menggunakan data luaran.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ജെനറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രാദോധിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. കോണ്\u200dട്ടിസ്റ്റിക്ക ഈ ജനറല്\u200d മോഡലിലെ നേരിട്ട് തെരച്ചില്\u200d കഠിനമായിരിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ടാണ്, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dസറില്\u200d നിന്നും പുതുക്കുന്നതിനാ നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഈ ജനറല്\u200d മോഡലില്\u200d നേരിട്ട് തെരച്ചില്\u200d ഒരു ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വീണ്ടും പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ക അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രത്യേക മാതൃകയുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയും, പുറത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d 94.25 F1 പിടിബ', 'mt': 'Xogħol reċenti ppropona diversi mudelli newrali ġenerattivi għall-analiżi tal-kostitwenzi li jiksbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati. Minħabba li t-tiftix dirett f’dawn il-mudelli ġenerattivi huwa diffiċli, dawn intużaw primarjament biex jiġu skoperti mill-ġdid il-prodotti kandidati minn analizzaturi bażi li fihom id-dekodifikazzjoni hija aktar sempliċi. L-ewwel nippreżentaw algoritmu għal tiftix dirett f’dawn il-mudelli ġenerattivi. Imbagħad nippruvaw li r-riżultati tal-iskedar mill-inqas parzjalment huma minħabba kombinazzjoni impliċita tal-mudell minflok l-effetti tal-iskedar mill-ġdid. Fl-aħħar nett, nuru li kombinazzjoni espliċita ta’ mudell tista’ ttejjeb il-prestazzjoni anke aktar, li tirriżulta f’numri ġodda tal-aktar avvanzati fuq il-PTB ta’ 94.25 F1 meta t-taħriġ isir biss fuq id-dejta tad-deheb u 94.66 F1 meta tintuża dejta esterna.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хугацаанд ажиллаж байгаа олон төрлийн мэдрэлийн загваруудыг хуваалцах боломжтой болсон. Эдгээр үйлдвэрлэлийн загваруудыг шууд хайх нь хэцүү учраас, тэд анхны түвшинд нэр дэвшигчдийн үр дүнг суурь ажиллаачидаас дахин ашиглаж байгаа. Эхлээд бид эдгээр бүтээлч загваруудыг шууд хайх алгоритмыг тайлбарлаж байна. Дараа нь бид дахин сэргээх үр дүн нь бага хэсэг нь загварын нэгтгэлийн үр дүнг дахин шилжүүлэхээс илүү холбогдолтой байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эцэст нь, бид тодорхой загварын нэгтгэлээр дахин илүү дасгал үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна. Ингэснээр 94.25 F1-ийн PTB-д зөвхөн алтын өгөгдлийг болон 94.66 F1-г ашиглах үед шинэ урлагийн тоо гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Nyleg har arbeidet foreslått fleire genererte neuralmodeller for å tolka konstitusjonar som oppnår resultatet av kunsten. Sidan direkte søk i desse genererige modelane er vanskeleg, har dei brukt hovudsakelig for å gjenoppretta utdata frå grunntolkare der dekoding er enklare. Vi viser først ein algoritme for direkte søk i desse genererige modelane. Vi viser derfor at resultatene for gjenoppretting er minst delvis på grunn av implisitt modellkombinasjon i staden for å gjenoppretta effektar. I slutt viser vi at eksplisitt modelkombinasjon kan forbetra utviklinga enda lenger, og resulterer i nye kunsttall på PTB av 94,25 F1 når du berre treng på gulldata og 94,66 F1 når du bruker eksterne data.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace zaproponowały kilka generacyjnych modeli neuronowych do analizy okręgów wyborczych, które osiągają najnowocześniejsze wyniki. Ponieważ bezpośrednie wyszukiwanie w tych modelach generatywnych jest trudne, są one przede wszystkim wykorzystywane do rescore wyjść kandydatów z analizatorów bazowych, w których dekodowanie jest bardziej proste. Najpierw przedstawiamy algorytm wyszukiwania bezpośredniego w tych modelach generatywnych. Następnie wykazujemy, że wyniki rescoring są przynajmniej częściowo spowodowane ukrytym połączeniem modeli, a nie zmianą rankingu efektów. Wreszcie pokazujemy, że wyraźne połączenie modeli może jeszcze bardziej poprawić wydajność, skutkując powstaniem nowych najnowocześniejszych numerów na PTB 94.25 F1 podczas treningu tylko na złotych danych i 94.66 F1 podczas korzystania z danych zewnętrznych.', 'ro': 'Lucrările recente au propus mai multe modele neuronale generative pentru analizarea circumscripției care obțin rezultate de ultimă generație. Deoarece căutarea directă în aceste modele generative este dificilă, acestea au fost folosite în principal pentru a remorca ieșirile candidate din parserele de bază în care decodarea este mai simplă. Mai întâi prezentăm un algoritm de căutare directă în aceste modele generative. Apoi demonstrăm că rezultatele de rescoring se datorează cel puțin parțial combinării implicite a modelului, mai degrabă decât efectelor de re-ranking. În cele din urmă, arătăm că combinația explicită a modelului poate îmbunătăți performanța și mai mult, rezultând noi numere de ultimă generație pe PTB de 94.25 F1 atunci când se antrenează numai pe date aurii și 94.66 F1 atunci când se utilizează date externe.', 'sr': 'Nedavni rad je predložio nekoliko generativnih neuralnih modela za analizu predstavljanja koji postignu rezultate umetnosti. Budući da je direktna potraga u ovim generativnim modelima teška, oni su primarno korišteni za ponovno osnivanje rezultata kandidata iz baznih parsera u kojima je dekodiranje jednostavnije. Prvo predstavljamo algoritam za direktnu potragu u ovim generativnim modelima. Onda pokazujemo da su rezultati preusmjerenja najmanje djelomično zbog implicitne kombinacije modela umjesto preusmjerenja efekata. Konačno, pokazujemo da eksplicitna kombinacija modela može poboljšati učinkovitost još dalje, što rezultira novim brojevima umjetnosti na PTB 94,25 F1 kada obuka samo na zlatnim podacima i 94,66 F1 kada koristi vanjske podatke.', 'si': 'අලුත් වැඩේ වැඩේ සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ සිද්ධ විශ්වාසික න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩේල් වලින් සිද්ධ මේ ජීනේටර් මෝඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිකාර පරීක්ෂණය අමාරුයි නිසා, ඔවුන් මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරිත ප අපි මුලින්ම මේ ජීනේටර් මෝඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා හොයාගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් පෙන්වනවා. පස්සේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නැවත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියලා අන්තිමේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරකාශිත මදුල සංවිධානය විශේෂය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අළුත් ස්ථානයේ අංක 94.25 F1 වල PTB වලින් සුන් දත්ත', 'so': 'Shaqo la soo dhowaaday wuxuu soo jeeday tusaalo neuro ah oo dhaqdhaqaale ah oo ku qoran jardiinada baaritaanka, taas oo soo gaadha resultinta arimaha farshaxanka. Sida darteed raadinta tooska ah ee modelladan geneeral waa adag, waxaa ugu horeyn loo isticmaalay in laga soo celiyo marxalada baarlamaanka aasaasiga ah, taas oo lagu sahlan karo. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo bandhignaa algorithm si toos ah u raadinta tusaalahan. Markaas waxaynu muujinnaa in arimaha soo celinta ay ugu yaraan yihiin qeyb ka mid ah sababtoo ah isku xidhiidhka modellka badala dib u celinta saamaynta. Ugu dambaysta waxaan tusnaynaa in koobnaadka tusaale ah uu horumarin karaa xittaa sii kordhin karo sameynta sameynta, taasoo sababto ah nambarka farshaxanka ee PTB ee 94.25 F1 marka lagu baranayo macluumaadka dahabka oo kaliya iyo 94.66 F1 marka isticmaalaya macluumaadka dibadda ah.', 'sv': 'Det senaste arbetet har föreslagit flera generativa neurala modeller för valkretstolkning som uppnår toppmoderna resultat. Eftersom det är svårt att söka direkt i dessa generativa modeller har de främst använts för att återskapa kandidatutgångar från bastolkare där avkodning är enklare. Vi presenterar först en algoritm för direkt sökning i dessa generativa modeller. Vi visar sedan att rescoring resultat åtminstone delvis beror på implicit modellkombination snarare än omräkningseffekter. Slutligen visar vi att explicit modellkombination kan förbättra prestandan ytterligare, vilket resulterar i nya toppmoderna siffror på PTB 94,25 F1 när du tränar enbart på gulddata och 94,66 F1 när du använder externa data.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் வேலை பல பொதுவான புதிய புதிய மாதிரிகளை பாசிடுவதற்காக பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அது செய்து கலை முடிவுகளை  Since direct search in these generative models is difficult, they have primarily been used to rescore candidate outputs from base parsers in which decoding is more straightforward.  நாம் முதலில் இந்த பொதுவான மாதிரிகளில் நேரடியாக தேடுவதற்கான ஒரு அல்பரிட்டம் கொண்டுள்ளோம். மீண்டும் விளைவுகளை மீண்டும் திருப்புவதற்கு பதிலாவது மாதிரி இணைப்பு காரணத்தால் குறைந்தது பாகமானது. இறுதியில், நாம் வெளிப்படையான மாதிரி இணைப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம். வெளி தரவை பயன்படுத்தும்போது புதிய நிலையில் 94.25 F1', 'ur': 'اچھا کام بہت سی نسل نائرول موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ کانسیٹنسٹ پارسینٹ کے لئے بہت سی نئرول موڈل پہنچ جاتے ہیں۔ اس وجہ سے کہ ان جنرائیٹ موڈلوں میں سیدھا تلاش مشکل ہے، ان کی اصلی بات یہ ہے کہ ان کے لئے بنسس پارسر سے کڈیٹ اٹپوٹ دوبارہ کرنا استعمال کیا گیا ہے جہاں ڈیکوڈ زیادہ آسان ہے. ہم پہلے ایک الگوریتم کو ان جنرائیٹ موڈل میں سیدھی تلاش کے لئے پیش کریں گے۔ پھر ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ریسکورینگ نتیجے کم کم حصہ کے ذریعہ موڈل کی ترکیب کے باعث ہیں، بلکہ دوبارہ ریسکورینگ اثرات کے باعث۔ آخر میں، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ صریح موڈل کی ترکینس اضافہ کر سکتا ہے، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں 94.25 F1 کی نئی حالت-آرت نمبر کی پیٹ بیٹی پر ہے جب صریح سونے ڈیٹا اور 94.66 F1 کی ترکینس کرتی ہے جب بیٹی ڈیٹا استعمال کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda ishni bir necha generativ neyrolik modellarini tahrirlash imkoniyatini beradi. Bu generativ modellarda direktoriya qidirish qiyin juda qiyin, asosida ularning asosiy parserdagi vazifalarning natijasini qaytadan foydalanish uchun ishlatiladi. Biz shu generativ modellarda direkt qidirish uchun algoritni hozir qilamiz. Keyin biz qayta tiklash natijalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin model kombinasini qaytadan ko'rib chiqarishimiz mumkin. Endi, biz ko'rsatganimiz, shaxsiy maʼlumot yordamida faqat gull maʼlumotlari va 94.66 F1 bilan ishlatilganda PTB'ning yangi sonlar raqamlarini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã đề xuất vài mô hình thần kinh hệ gen cho các bầu cử phân tích nhằm đạt được kết quả tối tân. Vì việc tìm kiếm trực tiếp trong các mô hình tạo này rất khó khăn, chúng đã được sử dụng chủ yếu để thu hồi kết quả của ứng viên phân tách cơ sở mà giải thì dễ dàng hơn. Trước tiên chúng tôi trình bày thuật toán tìm kiếm trực tiếp trong các mô hình tạo này. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng kết quả cải tạo ít nhất là do sự kết hợp mô hình ngầm chứ không phải là do lặp lại hiệu ứng. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy sự kết hợp điển hình rõ ràng có thể cải thiện hiệu suất thêm, dẫn đến những con số hiện đại mới trên PTB của 925 F1 khi tập luyện chỉ dựa trên vàng và 966 F1 khi dùng dữ liệu bên ngoài.', 'nl': 'Recent werk heeft verschillende generatieve neurale modellen voorgesteld voor kiesdistrict parsing die state-of-the-art resultaten behalen. Aangezien direct zoeken in deze generatieve modellen moeilijk is, zijn ze voornamelijk gebruikt om kandidaat-outputs te herscore van basis parsers waarin decodering eenvoudiger is. We presenteren eerst een algoritme voor direct search in deze generatieve modellen. Vervolgens tonen we aan dat de rescoring resultaten ten minste gedeeltelijk te wijten zijn aan impliciete modelcombinatie in plaats van aan herschikkingseffecten. Tot slot laten we zien dat expliciete modelcombinatie de prestaties nog verder kan verbeteren, wat resulteert in nieuwe state-of-the-art cijfers op de PTB van 94.25 F1 bij training alleen op gouden data en 94.66 F1 bij gebruik van externe data.', 'da': 'Nyligt arbejde har foreslået flere generative neurale modeller til valgkreds parsing, der opnår state-of-the-art resultater. Da det er vanskeligt at søge direkte i disse generative modeller, er de primært blevet brugt til at omdanne kandidatoutput fra basefortolkere, hvor afkodning er mere ligetil. Vi præsenterer først en algoritme til direkte søgning i disse generative modeller. Vi viser derefter, at rescoring resultaterne i det mindste delvist skyldes implicit modelkombination snarere end omlægningseffekter. Endelig viser vi, at eksplicit modelkombination kan forbedre ydeevnen yderligere, hvilket resulterer i nye state-of-the-art numre på PTB 94,25 F1, når du kun træner på guld data og 94,66 F1, når du bruger eksterne data.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan baru-baru ini telah mengusulkan beberapa model saraf generasi untuk penganalisan konstitusi yang mencapai hasil state-of-the-art. Karena pencarian langsung dalam model generasi ini sulit, mereka terutama digunakan untuk mengirim kembali output kandidat dari parser dasar di mana decoding lebih sederhana. Pertama kita mempersembahkan algoritma untuk pencarian langsung dalam model generasi ini. Kemudian kita menunjukkan bahwa hasil penyulitan setidaknya sebagian karena kombinasi model implicit daripada mengubah efek penyulitan. Finally, we show that explicit model combination can improve performance even further, resulting in new state-of-the-art numbers on the PTB of 94.25 F1 when training only on gold data and 94.66 F1 when using external data.', 'bg': 'Последна работа предлага няколко генеративни невронни модела за анализ на избирателните райони, които постигат най-съвременни резултати. Тъй като директното търсене в тези генеративни модели е трудно, те са били използвани предимно за преоткриване на кандидат изходите от базови анализатори, в които декодирането е по-лесно. Първо представяме алгоритъм за директно търсене в тези генеративни модели. След това демонстрираме, че резултатите от преобразуването се дължат поне отчасти на имплицитна комбинация от модели, а не на ефекти от пренареждане. И накрая, показваме, че изричната комбинация от модели може да подобри производителността още повече, което води до нови най-съвременни номера на ПТБ от 94.25 при тренировка само на златни данни и 94.66 при използване на външни данни.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je rad predložio nekoliko generativnih neuralnih modela za analizu predstavljanja koji postignu rezultate stanja umjetnosti. Budući da je direktna potraga u ovim generativnim modelima teška, primjereno su korišćena za ponovno osnovanje rezultata kandidata iz baznih parsera u kojima je dekodiranje jednostavnije. Prvo predstavljamo algoritam za direktnu potragu u ovim generativnim modelima. Onda pokazujemo da su rezultati preusmjerenja najmanje djelomično zbog implicitne kombinacije modela umjesto preusmjerenja učinka. Konačno, pokazujemo da pojasno modelna kombinacija može poboljšati učinkovitost još dalje, što bi rezultiralo novim brojevima umjetnosti PTB 94,25 F1 kada se obučavamo samo na zlatnim podacima i 94,66 F1 kada koristimo vanjske podatke.', 'ko': '최근의 작업에서 선택 영역 분석에 사용되는 생성성 신경 모델 몇 개를 제시했는데 이런 모델들은 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻을 수 있다.이러한 생성 모델에서 직접 검색하는 것은 비교적 어렵기 때문에 주로 기본 해석기의 후보 출력을 다시 저장하는 데 사용되고 기본 해석기에서 디코딩은 더욱 간단하다.우리는 먼저 이러한 생성 모델에서 직접 검색 알고리즘을 제시했다.그리고 우리는 재배열의 결과는 적어도 일부는 은식 모형의 조합 때문이지 재배열의 영향이 아니라는 것을 증명했다.마지막으로 우리는 현식 모델 조합이 성능을 더욱 향상시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다. gold 데이터만 사용하여 훈련할 때 PTB의 최신 데이터는 94.25 F1이고 외부 데이터를 사용할 때 PTB의 최신 데이터는 94.66 F1이다.', 'de': 'Neuere Arbeiten haben mehrere generative neuronale Modelle für das Parsen von Wahlkreisen vorgeschlagen, die State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse erzielen. Da die direkte Suche in diesen generativen Modellen schwierig ist, wurden sie hauptsächlich verwendet, um Kandidatenausgaben von Basis-Parsern zu rescore, in denen die Dekodierung einfacher ist. Zunächst stellen wir einen Algorithmus für die direkte Suche in diesen generativen Modellen vor. Wir zeigen dann, dass die Rescoring-Ergebnisse zumindest teilweise auf implizite Modellkombinationen statt auf Reranking-Effekte zurückzuführen sind. Abschließend zeigen wir, dass explizite Modellkombinationen die Performance noch weiter verbessern können, was zu neuen State-of-the-Art Zahlen in der PTB von 94.25 F1 führt, wenn nur auf Golddaten trainiert wird und 94.66 F1 bei Verwendung externer Daten.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya hivi karibuni imependekeza mifano kadhaa ya uboreshaji wa ubongo kwa ajili ya kuimba uchaguzi ambao unaweza kupata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa. Kwa kuwa kutafuta moja kwa moja katika mifano hii ya kizazi ni vigumu, kwa ujumla, wametumiwa kujenga upya matokeo ya mgombea kutoka kwenye mabunge ya msingi ambapo kupunguza kwa urahisi zaidi. Kwanza tunaweka algorithi ya kutafuta moja kwa moja katika mifano hii ya kizazi. Kisha tunaonyesha kwamba matokeo yanayobadilika ni kwa uchache kwa sababu ya kuunganisha muundo badala ya kutengeneza madhara. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kuwa muunganiko wa muundo wa wazi unaweza kuboresha ufanisi zaidi, na kusababisha idadi mpya ya sanaa ya PTB ya 94.25 F1 wakati mafunzo ya takwimu za dhahabu na 94.66 F1 wakati wanatumia data za nje.', 'sq': 'Puna e fundit ka propozuar disa modele gjenerative neuronale për analizimin e qarkut zgjedhor që arrijnë rezultate më të larta. Duke qenë se kërkimi i drejtpërdrejtë në këto modele gjenerative është i vështirë, ato janë përdorur kryesisht për të rishkruajtur daljet e kandidatëve nga analizuesit bazë në të cilët dekodimi është më i thjeshtë. Së pari prezantojmë një algoritëm për kërkim të drejtpërdrejtë në këto modele gjenerative. Pastaj demonstrojmë se rezultatet e rishkrimit janë të paktën pjesërisht për shkak të kombinimit implicit të modelit në vend të rishkrimit të efekteve. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se kombinimi eksplicit i modelit mund të përmirësojë performancën edhe më tej, duke rezultuar në numra të reja më të lartë në PTB 94.25 F1 kur trajnohet vetëm në të dhënat e art ë dhe 94.66 F1 kur përdoret e dhëna të jashtme.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ስራ የ-አርእስት ውጤቶች ለማግኘት የፓርቲው ማዘጋጀት ብዙዎች የውይይት የናውሬት ዓይነቶች አግኝቷል፡፡ Since direct search in these generative models is difficult, they have primarily been used to rescore candidate outputs from base parsers in which decoding is more straightforward.  አስቀድመን በዚህ አወራጅ ዓይነቶች ውስጥ ቀጥተኛ ፈልግ ዘንድ አሌጎርቲምን እናቀርባለን፡፡ በኋላም ማስታወቂያው ፍሬዎች በማንስ እኩል በሞዴል ማቀናቀል ምክንያት እንደሆነ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም፣ የተለየ ምሳሌ ማቀናቀል የውጭው ዳታዎችን በተጠቀም ጊዜ በ94.25 F1 የPTB የአዲስ የልዩ ቁጥር ቁጥር እንዲያሳድግ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Onlangse werk het verskeie genereerbare neurale modele voorgestel vir konstituency verwerking wat staat-van-kuns-resultate bereik word. Omdat direk soektog in hierdie genereerbare modele moeilik is, is hulle voorstel gebruik om kandidate uitvoerings van basiese verwerkers te herstel waarin dekodering meer eenvoudig is. Ons voorstel eerste 'n algoritme vir direk soek in hierdie genereerbare modele. Ons wys dan dat die herkoring resultate is ten minste gedeeltelik vanweë inplisite model kombinasie eerder as herkoring effekte. Eindelik, ons wys dat eksplisiese modelkombinasie selfs verder funksie kan verbeter, wat resultaat in nuwe staat-van-kunstennommers op die PTB van 94.25 F1 wanneer leer slegs op goud data en 94.66 F1 onderwerp wanneer eksterne data gebruik word.", 'hy': 'Վերջին աշխատանքը առաջարկել է ընտրական շրջանների վերլուծության մի քանի սերունդ նյարդային մոդելներ, որոնք հասնում են ամենաբարձր արդյունքների: Քանի որ այս սերունդների մոդելներում անմիջական որոնումը դժվար է, դրանք հիմնականում օգտագործվել են թեկնածու արտադրանքների վերականգնման համար հիմնական վերամշակողներից, որտեղ վերականգնումը ավելի պարզ է: Սկզբում մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս սերունդների մոդելների ուղղակի որոնման ալգորիթմ: Այնուհետև մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ վերագրման արդյունքները առնվազն մասամբ պատճառ են կազմում ենթարկված մոդելի համադրման փոխարեն, ոչ թե վերագրման արդյունքների փոխարեն: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ բացատրական մոդելների համադրումը կարող է ավելի լավ բարելավել արդյունքը, ինչը հանգեցնում է 94.25 F1-ի ՀՏԲ-ի նոր ամենահետաքրքիր թվերի, երբ ուսումնասիրում են միայն ոսկու տվյալների և 94.66 F1-ի վրա, երբ օգտագործվում են', 'fa': 'کارهای اخیرا چند مدل عصبی ژنتیکی برای تجزیه کردن محیط\u200cها پیشنهاد کرده است که نتیجه\u200cهای هنری را به موقعیت رسیده است. چون جستجوی مستقیم در این مدل\u200cهای ژنترافی سخت است، آنها در اصل برای بازسازی نتیجه\u200cهای کاندیداتی از پارسال\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشوند که دکوندن ساده\u200cتر است. اولین بار یک الگوریتم برای جستجوی مستقیم در این مدل\u200cهای ژنترافی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. سپس نشان می دهیم که نتیجه بازسازی حداقل بخشی به خاطر ترکیب مدل معمولی به جای بازسازی تاثیر است. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که ترکیب مدل روشنی می تواند عملکرد را بیشتر بهتر کند، و به نتیجه تعداد جدید هنری در PTB 94.25 F1 در زمان آموزش فقط بر داده های طلا و 94.66 F1 در زمان استفاده از داده های خارجی.', 'az': "Son işləri müəyyən edilənlər üçün bir neçə generativ nöral modellərini təbliğ etdi. Bu generativ modellərdə doğru arama çətin olduğuna görə, onlar ilk dəfə çox asanlıqla kodlama çəkilmək üçün kandidát çıxışlarını dəyişdirmək üçün istifadə edildilər. Biz ilk dəfə bu generativ modellərdə doğru axtarmaq üçün algoritmi göstəririk. Sonra yenilənmək sonuçlarının ən az bir hissəsi modellərin birləşdirilməsi yerinə yenilənmək effektlərinə görə olduğunu göstəririk. Sonunda, açıq modellərin birləşdirilməsini daha da art ıra biləcəyini göstəririk. Dışarı məlumatları istifadə edərkən, PTB 94.25 F1'nin yeni məlumatlarını təhsil edir.", 'tr': "Ýakynda Ullanylan işe konstitucional hatlamak üçin birnäçe jeneral nuýral modelleri taýýarlapdyr. Bu jeneral nusgalarda düzgün gözlemek kyn sebäbi olar ilkinji gezek kandidatyň çykyşyny bejermek üçin ullanýarlar. Bu nusgalaryň kodlemesi aňsatlyk ýok. Ilkinji gezek bu döredijili nusgalarda direkt gözlemek üçin bir algoritmi görkezýäris Daha soňra taýýarlama netijeleriniň iň azyndan täsirlere ýene çykarmak yerine täsirli nusga üçin döredigini görkez. Soňunda, biz takyk nusgasyň birleşmegi başga bir şekilde üýtgedip biljekdigini görkeýäris. Bu sebäbi PTB 94.25 F1'de täze sanat sanat sanatynyň täze bolupdyr. Diňe altyn maglumatyny we 94.66 F1-de daşaryk maglumaty ullanýanda eğitim alýardy.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কাজ বেশ কয়েকটি জেনারেটিভ নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করেছে সংসদ পার্সিং এর জন্য যারা রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল যেহেতু এই জেনারেটিভ মডেলগুলোতে সরাসরি অনুসন্ধান কঠিন, তারা প্রার্থীর আউটপুট ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বেস পার্সার থেকে পুনরায় সংরক্ষণ কর আমরা প্রথমে এই জেনারেটিভ মডেলে সরাসরি অনুসন্ধানের জন্য একটি অ্যালগরিদম উপস্থাপন করি। তারপর আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে পুনরায় সংস্কারের ফলাফল অন্তত অংশের কারণে মডেল কোম্পানির মাধ্যমে পুনরায় প্রভাব বিস্তার করার চেয় অবশেষে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পরিস্কার মডেল কোম্পানি এমনকি আরো উন্নতি করতে পারে, যার ফলে বাইরের তথ্য ব্যবহার করার সময় সোনার তথ্য এবং ৯৪.', 'cs': 'Nedávná práce navrhla několik generativních neuronových modelů pro analýzu volebních obvodů, které dosahují nejmodernějších výsledků. Vzhledem k tomu, že přímé vyhledávání v těchto generativních modelech je obtížné, byly primárně použity k rescore kandidátských výstupů z bázových parserů, ve kterých je dekódování jednodušší. Nejprve představujeme algoritmus pro přímé vyhledávání v těchto generativních modelech. Následně demonstrujeme, že výsledky rescoringu jsou alespoň částečně způsobeny implicitní kombinací modelů spíše než efekty změny řazení. Nakonec ukazujeme, že explicitní kombinace modelů může ještě více zlepšit výkon, což vede k novým nejmodernějším číslům na PTB 94.25 F1 při tréninku pouze na zlatých datech a 94.66 F1 při použití externích dat.', 'bs': 'Nedavno je rad predložio nekoliko generativnih neuralnih modela za analizu predstavljanja koji postignu rezultate stanja umjetnosti. Budući da je direktna potraga u ovim generativnim modelima teška, oni su primjereno korišteni za ponovno osnivanje rezultata kandidata iz baznih parsera u kojima je dekodiranje jednostavnije. Prvo predstavljamo algoritam za direktnu potragu u ovim generativnim modelima. Onda pokazujemo da su rezultati preusmjerenja najmanje djelomično zbog implicitne kombinacije modela umjesto preusmjerenja efekta. Konačno, pokazujemo da eksplicitna kombinacija modela može još bolje poboljšati učinkovitost, što bi rezultiralo novim brojevima umjetnosti PTB 94,25 F1 kada se obučava samo na zlatnim podacima i 94,66 F1 kada se koristi vanjskih podataka.', 'ca': "La feina recent ha proposat varis models neurals generadors per a l'analització electoral que aconsegueixen resultats més avançats. Com que la cerca directa d'aquests models generadors és difícil, s'han utilitzat principalment per rescanviar els resultats dels candidats dels analitzadors de base en els quals la descodificació és més senzilla. Primer presentem un algoritme de recerca directa en aquests models generadors. Llavors demostrem que els resultats de la revisió, almenys en part, es deuen a la combinació implícita del model en lloc d'efectes de revisió. Finalment, demostram que la combinació de model explícit pot millorar encara més el rendiment, i resulta en números més avançats en el PTB de 94,25 F1 quan només treinem en dades d'or i 94,66 F1 quan utilitzem dades externes.", 'fi': 'Viimeaikainen työ on ehdottanut useita generatiivisia neuromalleja vaalipiirien jäsentämiseen, joilla saavutetaan huipputason tuloksia. Koska suora haku näissä generatiivisissa malleissa on vaikeaa, niitä on ensisijaisesti käytetty palauttamaan ehdokastuotoksia perusparsereista, joissa dekoodaus on yksinkertaisempaa. Esitämme ensin algoritmin suoraa hakua varten näissä generatiivisissa malleissa. Tämän jälkeen osoitamme, että uudelleenjärjestelyn tulokset johtuvat ainakin osittain implisiittisestä malliyhdistelmästä eikä uudelleenjärjestelystä. Lopuksi osoitamme, että eksplisiittinen malliyhdistelmä voi parantaa suorituskykyä entisestään, mikä johtaa uusiin huippuluokan numeroihin PTB: llä 94,25 F1: llä harjoitettaessa vain kultatiedoilla ja 94,66 F1: llä ulkoisilla tiedoilla.', 'et': 'Hiljutises töös on välja pakutud mitmeid generatiivseid närvimudeleid valimisringkondade parsimiseks, mis saavutavad kaasaegseid tulemusi. Kuna nende generatiivsete mudelite otsene otsing on keeruline, on neid eelkõige kasutatud kandidaadi väljundite taastamiseks baaspartseritest, kus dekodeerimine on lihtsam. Esitleme algoritmi otseotsimiseks nendes generatiivsetes mudelites. Seejärel näitame, et ümberkorraldamise tulemused on vähemalt osaliselt tingitud kaudsest mudelikombinatsioonist, mitte ümberkorraldamise efektidest. Lõpuks näitame, et selgesõnaline mudelikombinatsioon võib jõudlust veelgi parandada, mille tulemuseks on PTB-l uued tipptasemel numbrid 94,25 F1 ainult kullaandmetel treenimisel ja 94,66 F1 välisandmete kasutamisel.', 'ha': "A yanzu aikin da aka buɗe wasu misãlai masu jama'a na neura wa parse da ke sami fassarar-al'amar-art. Tana da search dira cikin waɗannan misãlai masu nau'i, sai aka yi amfani da su koda matsayin kandanta daga mazaɗar parse wanda ke yin kodi mafi kusa. Muna gabatar da algoritm don ka sami fili masu dira cikin wannan misali. Sa'an nan kuma Muke nũna cewa matsalar da za'a rage rabo ko kuma don ya sami mutane da misãlai. Gani, za mu nũna wa komai-misalin misalin misalin ya iya ƙara mafiya tsarin performance, kuma yana ƙara gaba-halin-sanatarwa wa PTB na 94.25 F1 idan an yi mafunzo kawai kan data na zĩnãriya da 94.66 F1 idan ana yi amfani da data na bakwai.", 'sk': 'Nedavno delo je predlagalo več generativnih nevronskih modelov za analiziranje volilnih okrožij, ki dosegajo najsodobnejše rezultate. Ker je neposredno iskanje v teh generativnih modelih težko, so se uporabljali predvsem za ponovno iskanje kandidatnih izhodov iz osnovnih razčlenjevalnikov, v katerih je dekodiranje bolj enostavno. Najprej predstavljamo algoritem za neposredno iskanje v teh generativnih modelih. Nato dokazujemo, da so rezultati preoblikovanja vsaj delno posledica implicitne kombinacije modela in ne učinkov prerazporejanja. Nazadnje pokažemo, da lahko eksplicitna kombinacija modelov še dodatno izboljša zmogljivost, kar ima za posledico nove najsodobnejše številke na PTB 94,25 F1 pri treningu samo na zlatih podatkih in 94,66 F1 pri uporabi zunanjih podatkov.', 'he': 'העבודה האחרונה הציעה מספר דוגמנים עצביים דוריים עבור ניתוח מחוז הבחירות שמגיע לתוצאות חדשות. מאחר שחיפוש ישיר בדוגמנים הדורתיים האלה קשה, הם השתמשו בעיקר כדי לחקור מחדש תוצאות מועמדים מפרסמים הבסיסים שבהם הפענוח הוא פשוט יותר. ראשית אנחנו מציגים אלגוריתם לחיפוש ישיר בדוגמנים הדורתיים האלה. ואז אנחנו מראים שהתוצאות החדשות לפחות חלקית בגלל שילוב מודל מילוי במקום שילוב השפעות מחדש. סוף סוף, אנו מראים שילוב מודל ברור יכול לשפר את ההופעה אפילו יותר, מה שהוביל במספרים חדשים מצוינים על PTB של 94.25 F1 כאשר האימונים רק על נתוני זהב ו-94.66 F1 כאשר משתמשים בנתונים חיצוניים.', 'jv': 'Algorithm lahi Samsul Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono cah-cah dadi nguasai winih ngono ngono perusahaan modèl sing beraksi, dadi ngono nggawe efekat maneh. Lha wih-wih, kita ngomongke ngomong nik akeh model sing bisa nyebute nggawe gerakan kanggo dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno dumadhi tarjamahan kanggo kelas NLB candi', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་ཁམས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་སྔོན་མ་ཡོད་ཚད་རྩ་བའི་དབུས་མཐུན་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་དམིགས འོན་ཀྱང་། ཇི་ནོར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཐག་ཀར་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་མིག་འདི་དག་གི་སྔོན་ནས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ས algorithm ས་གཅིག་གནང་བ་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་པ་དེ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ཉེན་ Finally, we show that explicit model combination can improve performance even further, resulting in a new state-of-the-art numbers on the PTB of 94.25 F1 when training only on gold data and 94.66 F1 when using external data.'}
{'en': 'Information-Theory Interpretation of the Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function', 'ar': 'تفسير نظرية المعلومات للوظيفة الموضوعية لأخذ العينات السالبة تخطي الجرام', 'fr': "Interprétation de la théorie de l'information de la fonction objectif d'échantillonnage négatif à saut de gramme", 'es': 'Interpretación de la teoría de la información de la función objetiva Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling', 'pt': 'Interpretação da Teoria da Informação da Função Objetivo de Amostragem Negativa de Skip-Gram', 'ja': 'スキップグラム陰性サンプリング目的関数の情報理論的解釈', 'zh': '斯基普-革兰氏负采样函数信理解', 'hi': 'सूचना-सिद्धांत छोड़ें-ग्राम नकारात्मक-नमूना उद्देश्य समारोह की व्याख्या', 'ru': 'Информационно-теоретическая интерпретация целевой функции пропуска грамотрицательной выборки', 'ga': 'Léirmhíniú Teoiric Faisnéise ar Fheidhm an Chuspóra Skip-Gram Diúltach-Samplála', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Információelméleti értelmezése a kihagyás-gramm negatív mintavételi objektív függvénynek', 'el': 'Ερμηνεία Πληροφοριών-Θεωρίας της αντικειμενικής συνάρτησης αρνητικής δειγματοληψίας', 'it': "Interpretazione teorica dell'informazione della funzione obiettivo di campionamento negativo Skip-Gram", 'lt': 'Information-Theory Interpretation of the Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function', 'kk': 'Өткізу- грамма негативті- нобайлық түрлендіру функциясының мәлімет- теориясы интерпретациясы', 'ml': 'സ്കിപ്- ഗ്രാം നെഗേറ്റീവ്- സമാമ്പിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d- തിയേറ്റി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Skip-Gram сөрөг-Sampling Objective функцийн мэдээлэл-Теорийн интерпретация', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Interpretacja teorii informacji obiektywnej funkcji pomijania grama negatywnego próbkowania', 'ro': 'Interpretarea teoretică a informației a funcției obiective de eșantionare negativă de tip Skip-Gram', 'mk': 'Информациска теорија за интерпретација на објективната функција на пропуштање- грам- негативно примерување', 'ms': 'Comment', 'mt': 'Interpretazzjoni tat-Teorija tal-Informazzjoni tal-Funzjoni Objettiva ta’ Kampjunar Negattiv Skip-Gram', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Information-Theory Interpretation of the Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function', 'sr': 'Interpretacija informativne teorije o negativnoj funkciji prebacivanja granica', 'sv': 'Informationsteori Tolkning av den objektiva funktionen Hoppa-Gram negativ provtagning', 'ta': 'தகவல்- பொருள் செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objektiv فعالیت کی اطلاعات-تئوری تفسیر', 'uz': 'Information-Theory Interpretation of the Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function', 'vi': 'Thông tin-lí thuyết giải thích hàm mục tiêu tiêu tiêu Giỏi- Gram', 'bg': 'Информационно-теоретична интерпретация на обективната функция с отрицателно вземане на проби', 'nl': 'Informatie-Theoretische Interpretatie van de Slap-Gram Negative-Sampling Objectieve Functie', 'hr': 'Interpretacija informativne teorije negativne funkcije za uzorak prebacivanja grama', 'da': 'Informationsteori fortolkning af spring-gram negativ prøveudtagning objektiv funktion', 'de': 'Informationstheoretische Interpretation der Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objektivfunktion', 'id': 'Interpretasi Teori Informasi dari Fungsi Objektif Pemampilan-Negatif Skip-Gram', 'ko': '케일란 음성 샘플링 목표 함수를 건너뛰는 정보론 해석', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mawasiliano ya Utafiti wa Mifano ya Kujitenga', 'tr': 'Skip-Gram Negatif-Sampling Objektýän Funksiyonun Bilgi-Teoriýasy', 'sq': 'Interpretimi i Teorisë së Informacionit i Funksionit Objektiv të Zgjidhjes Negative të Skip-Gram', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Skip-Gram নেগেটিভ- Sampling Object Functionের তথ্য-থিওর ব্যাখ্যা', 'az': 'Skip-Gram Negativ-Sampling Objektiv Funksiyasının məlumat-Teoriyası', 'bs': 'Interpretacija informativne teorije objektivne funkcije Skip-Gram negativne uzorke', 'ca': "Interpretació de la teoria d'informació de la funció objectiva de recollir mostres negatius", 'cs': 'Informačně-teoretická interpretace objektivní funkce Skip-Gram negativního vzorkování', 'et': 'Iga grammi negatiivse proovivõtmise objektiivse funktsiooni infoteooria tõlgendamine', 'fi': 'Skip-Gram-negatiivisen näytteenoton objektiivisen funktion informaatioteorian tulkinta', 'jv': 'Tulungan Informasi-theori', 'sk': 'Informacijsko-teorijska interpretacija objektivne funkcije preskakovanja gramov negativnega vzorčenja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'פירוש תיאוריית מידע של תפקיד המטרה של דגימה שלילית Skip- Gram', 'bo': 'Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function (Information-Theory Interpretation of the Skip-Gram Negative-Sampling Objective Function)'}
{'en': 'In this paper we define a measure of dependency between two random variables, based on the Jensen-Shannon (JS) divergence between their joint distribution and the product of their marginal distributions. Then, we show that word2vec’s skip-gram with negative sampling embedding algorithm finds the optimal low-dimensional approximation of this JS dependency measure between the words and their contexts. The gap between the optimal score and the low-dimensional approximation is demonstrated on a standard text corpus.', 'ar': 'نحدد في هذا البحث مقياسًا للتبعية بين متغيرين عشوائيين ، بناءً على تباعد جنسن-شانون (JS) بين توزيعهما المشترك وحاصل ضرب توزيعاتهما الهامشية. بعد ذلك ، نوضح أن خوارزمية التخطي في word2vec مع خوارزمية التضمين لأخذ العينات السلبية تجد التقريب الأمثل منخفض الأبعاد لقياس تبعية JS بين الكلمات وسياقاتها. يتم توضيح الفجوة بين الدرجة المثلى والتقريب منخفض الأبعاد في مجموعة نصية قياسية.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo definimos uma medida de dependência entre duas variáveis aleatórias, com base na divergência de Jensen-Shannon (JS) entre sua distribuição conjunta e o produto de suas distribuições marginais. Em seguida, mostramos que o skip-gram do word2vec com algoritmo de incorporação de amostragem negativa encontra a aproximação ideal de baixa dimensão dessa medida de dependência JS entre as palavras e seus contextos. A diferença entre a pontuação ideal e a aproximação de baixa dimensão é demonstrada em um corpus de texto padrão.', 'es': 'En este artículo definimos una medida de dependencia entre dos variables aleatorias, basada en la divergencia de Jensen-Shannon (JS) entre su distribución conjunta y el producto de sus distribuciones marginales. A continuación, mostramos que el algoritmo de omisión-grama de word2vec con incrustación de muestreo negativo encuentra la aproximación de baja dimensión óptima de esta medida de dependencia JS entre las palabras y sus contextos. La brecha entre la puntuación óptima y la aproximación de baja dimensión se demuestra en un corpus de texto estándar.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous définissons une mesure de dépendance entre deux variables aléatoires, basée sur la divergence de Jensen-Shannon (JS) entre leur distribution conjointe et le produit de leurs lois marginales. Ensuite, nous montrons que l'algorithme d'inclusion d'échantillonnage négatif de word2vec trouve l'approximation basse dimensionnelle optimale de cette mesure de dépendance JS entre les mots et leurs contextes. L'écart entre le score optimal et l'approximation de faible dimension est démontré sur un corpus de texte standard.", 'ja': 'この論文では、2つのランダム変数の間の依存関係の尺度を、それらの合同分布とそれらの限界分布の積の間のJensen - Shannon (JS)発散に基づいて定義した。次に、負のサンプリング埋め込みアルゴリズムを持つword 2 vecのスキップグラムが、単語とそのコンテキストとの間のこのJS依存関係測定値の最適な低次元近似を見つけることを示します。最適スコアと低次元近似との間のギャップは、標準テキストコーパスで実証されている。', 'zh': '本文定义两随机变量恃其度量,盖其合布边际乘积之Jensen-Shannon(JS)背也。 然后明word2vec之带负采样嵌算法者skip-gram得单词及其上下文之间JS依赖性度量之最低维近也。 最佳分数与低维近似之间差在格文本语料库上得验。', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы определяем меру зависимости между двумя случайными переменными, основываясь на расхождении Дженсена-Шеннона (JS) между их совместным распределением и произведением их предельных распределений. Затем мы показываем, что скип-грамма word2vec с алгоритмом встраивания отрицательной выборки находит оптимальное низкоразмерное приближение этой меры зависимости JS между словами и их контекстами. Разрыв между оптимальной оценкой и низкоразмерным приближением демонстрируется на стандартном текстовом корпусе.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम दो यादृच्छिक चर के बीच निर्भरता के एक उपाय को परिभाषित करते हैं, जो उनके संयुक्त वितरण और उनके सीमांत वितरण के उत्पाद के बीच जेन्सेन-शैनन (जेएस) विचलन पर आधारित है। फिर, हम दिखाते हैं कि नकारात्मक नमूना एम्बेडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ वर्ड 2वेक के स्किप-ग्राम को शब्दों और उनके संदर्भों के बीच इस जेएस निर्भरता उपाय का इष्टतम कम आयामी सन्निकटन मिलता है। इष्टतम स्कोर और कम आयामी सन्निकटन के बीच का अंतर एक मानक पाठ कॉर्पस पर प्रदर्शित किया जाता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo sainímid tomhas spleáchais idir dhá athróg randamach, bunaithe ar an éagsúlacht Jensen-Shannon (JS) idir a gcomhdháileadh agus toradh a ndáiltí imeallacha. Ansin, léirímid go n-aimsíonn scip-gram word2vec agus algartam leabaithe samplála diúltach an comhfhogasú ísealtoiseach is fearr ar an tomhas spleáchais JS seo idir na focail agus a gcomhthéacsanna. Léirítear an bhearna idir an scór optamach agus an comhfhogasú ísealthoiseach ar chorpas caighdeánach téacs.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ განსაზღვრებთ განსაზღვრებულობა ორი გამოსაკუთრებული ცვლილებების შორის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც Jensen-Shannon (JS) განსაზღვრებულობაზე იყო მათი ერთადერთი განსაზღვრებულობა და მათი მართ შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სიტყვას 2vec-ის გადაწყვეტი გრამი, რომელიც მინდომის გადაწყვეტილი ალგორიტიმი შეიძლება, რომ ეს JS-ის დასამხოლობა სიტყვების და მათი შემდეგ შორის აღმოჩენ ოპტიმალური წერტილის და ჩამოდიმენციოლური წერტილის განსხვავება ჩვენი სტანდარტული ტექსტის კორპუსში მომწყენება.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία καθορίζουμε ένα μέτρο εξάρτησης μεταξύ δύο τυχαίων μεταβλητών, με βάση την απόκλιση μεταξύ της κοινής κατανομής τους και του προϊόντος των οριακών κατανεμήσεων τους. Στη συνέχεια, δείχνουμε ότι ο αλγόριθμος ενσωμάτωσης αρνητικής δειγματοληψίας βρίσκει τη βέλτιστη προσέγγιση χαμηλής διαστάσεων αυτού του μέτρου εξάρτησης μεταξύ των λέξεων και των πλαισίων τους. Το χάσμα μεταξύ της βέλτιστης βαθμολογίας και της χαμηλής διαστάσεων προσέγγιση καταδεικνύεται σε ένα τυποποιημένο σώμα κειμένου.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban két véletlenszerű változó közötti függőség mértékét definiáljuk, a Jensen-Shannon (JS) eltérése alapján a közös eloszlásuk és a marginális eloszlásuk terméke között. Ezután megmutatjuk, hogy a word2vec kihagyási gramja negatív mintavételi beágyazási algoritmussal megtalálja ennek a JS függőségi mértéknek az optimális alacsony dimenziós közelítését a szavak és a kontextusok között. Az optimális pontszám és az alacsony dimenziós közelítés közötti rést egy szabványos szövegkorpuszon mutatjuk be.', 'it': "In questo articolo definiamo una misura di dipendenza tra due variabili casuali, basata sulla divergenza Jensen-Shannon (JS) tra la loro distribuzione congiunta e il prodotto delle loro distribuzioni marginali. Quindi, mostriamo che l'algoritmo di incorporazione del campionamento negativo di word2vec trova l'approssimazione ottimale a bassa dimensione di questa misura di dipendenza JS tra le parole e i loro contesti. Il divario tra il punteggio ottimale e l'approssimazione a bassa dimensione è dimostrato su un corpus di testo standard.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз Jensen-Shannon (JS) дегеннің біріктірілген үлестіріміз мен олардың шегі үлестірімінің мазмұның арасындағы екі кездейсоқ айнымалылығының тәуелдігін анықтаймыз. Содан кейін, сөздерді 2vec ауыстыру граммасының негативті түрлендіру алгоритмімен ендіру алгоритмі сөздер мен орындағылардың арасындағы сөздердің негативті тең өлшемінің оптималдық түрлендірімін көрсетеді. Оптималық нәтижелер мен төмен өлшемді жақындау арасындағы аралық стандартты мәтін корпуста көрсетіледі.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kita takrifkan ukuran dependensi antara dua pembolehubah rawak, berdasarkan perbezaan Jensen-Shannon (JS) antara distribusi kongsi mereka dan produk distribusi marginal mereka. Kemudian, kita tunjukkan bahawa kelompok-gram word2vec dengan algoritma penyampilan sampel negatif menemukan pendekatan dimensi rendah optimal bagi ukuran dependensi JS antara perkataan dan konteks mereka. Lubang antara skor optimal dan pendekatan dimensi rendah dipaparkan pada korpus teks piawai.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ജെന്\u200dസെന്\u200d -ഷാന്\u200dനോന്\u200d (ജെയിന്\u200dസ്) അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെട്ട് അവരുടെ യൂട്ട് വിതരണവും അവരുടെ മാര്\u200dഗിനല്\u200d വിതരണവും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസവും വ്യത് പിന്നെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് വാര്\u200dഡ്2വിക്കിന്\u200dറെ സ്പിപ്പ്-ഗ്രാമിന്\u200dറെ നെഗരിറ്റ് മാതൃകയുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഈ ജെസ്സിന്\u200dറെ ആശ്രയിതമായ കു സാധാരണ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ഉപയോഗപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ഇടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസം കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddefinixxu kejl ta’ dipendenza bejn żewġ varjabbli aleatorji, ibbażati fuq id-diverġenza bejn Jensen-Shannon (JS) bejn id-distribuzzjoni konġunta tagħhom u l-prodott tad-distribuzzjonijiet marġinali tagħhom. Imbagħad, aħna nuru li l-gramma skip-gram ta’ word2vec b’algoritmu ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kampjunar negattiv isib l-approssimazzjoni ottimali b’dimensjoni baxxa ta’ din il-miżura ta’ dipendenza JS bejn il-kliem u l-kuntesti tagħhom. Id-differenza bejn il-punteġġ ottimali u l-approssimazzjoni dimensjonali baxxa tintwera fuq korpus tat-test standard.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Jensen-Shannon (JS) хоёр санамсаргүй хувьсалын хоорондын хамааралтай хамааралтай хэмжээг тодорхойлдог. Тэгээд бид 2вектийн алгоритмыг сөрөг хэмжээсүүдийн алгоритмыг харуулж байна. Энэ JS-ийн хамааралтай хэмжээсүүдийн хамгийн бага хэмжээсүүдийн ойролцоог үг болон орчин тойроны хоорондоо харуулж байна. Эцсийн тоо болон бага хэмжээст ойролцооны хоорондын ялгаа стандарт текст корпус дээр харагдаж байна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret definerer vi ein mål av avhengighet mellom to tilfeldige variabler, basert på forskjellen av Jensen-Shannon (JS) mellom sine joint distribusjon og produktet av sine marginale distribusjonar. Så viser vi at ordet 2vec er hoppa over med negativt samplingsalgoritme som innebygger sampling, finn det optimalt lådimensjonal tilnærming av denne JS-avhengighetsmålet mellom ordene og kontekstane sine. Mellomrommet mellom optimalt poengsum og lågare tilnærming vert demonstrert på ein standard tekstkorpus.', 'pl': 'W artykule zdefiniowano miarę zależności pomiędzy dwoma zmiennymi losowymi, opartą na rozbieżności Jensena-Shannona (JS) między ich wspólnym rozkładem a produktem ich rozkładów marginalnych. Następnie pokazujemy, że skip-gram Word2vec z negatywnym algorytmem osadzania próbek znajduje optymalną niskowymiarową aproximację tej miary zależności JS między słowami a ich kontekstami. Różnica między optymalnym wynikiem a przybliżeniem niskowymiarowym jest demonstrowana na standardowym korpusie tekstowym.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare definim o măsură a dependenței între două variabile aleatorii, bazată pe divergența Jensen-Shannon (JS) dintre distribuția lor comună și produsul distribuțiilor lor marginale. Apoi, arătăm că gramul skip al word2vec cu algoritmul de încorporare a eșantioanelor negative găsește aproximarea optimă a dimensiunii joase a acestei măsurători a dependenței JS între cuvinte și contextele lor. Diferența dintre scorul optim și aproximarea dimensională scăzută este demonstrată pe un corpus text standard.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru definišemo mjeru ovisnosti između dve nasumične varijante, na osnovu razlike Jensen-Shannon (JS) između njihovog zajedničkog distribucije i proizvoda njihovih marginalnih distribucija. Onda pokažemo da preskočivanje reèi 2veka sa negativnim algoritmom ubacivanja uzorka nalazi se optimalno niskodimenzionalno približavanje ove mjere ovisnosti JS između reèi i njihovih konteksta. Praznina između optimalnog rezultata i niskodimenzionalnog približavanja pokazuje se na standardnom tekstskom korpusu.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibrėžiame priklausomybės tarp dviejų atsitiktinių kintamųjų dydį, pagrįstą Jensen-Shannon (JS) skirtumu tarp jų jungtinio paskirstymo ir jų ribinių paskirstymų produkto. Tada parodysime, kad žodžio 2vec skip-gram su neigiamu mėginių ėmimo įterpimo algoritmu randa optimal ų mažo matmens šio JS priklausomybės matavimo suderinimą tarp žodžių ir jų kontekstų. Standartiniame tekstiniame korpuse įrodomas atotrūkis tarp optimalaus rezultato ir mažo matmens suderinimo.', 'mk': 'In this paper we define a measure of dependency between two random variables, based on the Jensen-Shannon (JS) divergence between their joint distribution and the product of their marginal distributions.  Потоа, покажуваме дека пропуштањето на word2vec со негативно примерување на примероци вклучувајќи алгоритм го пронајде оптималното нискодимензионално приближување на оваа JS мерка на зависност помеѓу зборовите и нивните контексти. Празнината помеѓу оптималната оценка и нискодимензионалната приближување се демонстрира на стандарден текст корпус.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නියම වෙනස් දෙකක් අතර, ජෙන්සෙන්-ශැනොන් (JS) විශ්වාසය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණ ඊට පස්සේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වචන 2Vec's Skip-gram එක්ක අනතුරු සැම්ප්ලිංග් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක හොයාගන්නේ මේ JS විශේෂතාව අතර අතර අතර අතර අතර අතර විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය පාළුවක් කොර්පස් වල පෙන්ව", 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qiyaastii ku xiran labada isbedelka ah, iyadoo lagu saleysan Jensen-Shannon (JS) kala duwan qaybinta wadajirka ah iyo dhaqaalaha qaybinta qaranka. Markaas waxaan tusaynaa in qoriga 2vec oo sameynta negative ee qoriga ku jira uu helaa qiyaastii JS ee ku xiran hadallada iyo xilliyadooda. Isku xiriirka lambarka caadiga ah iyo xiliga hoose waxaa lagu muujiyaa koonfur saxan ah oo caadi ah.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats definierar vi ett mått på beroende mellan två slumpmässiga variabler, baserat på Jensen-Shannon (JS) skillnader mellan deras gemensamma fördelning och produkten av deras marginalfördelning. Sedan visar vi att word2vecs hoppa-gram med negativ samplingsinbäddningsalgoritm hittar den optimala lågdimensionella approximationen av detta JS beroendemått mellan orden och deras sammanhang. Skillnaden mellan den optimala poängen och den lågdimensionella approximationen visas på en standardtextkorpus.', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில் ஜென்சென்- சான்னோன் (JS) அவர்களுடைய இணைய பங்கீட்டு மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய கூட்டு பங்கீட்டின் வித்தியாசத்திற்கும் இடையே உள்ள Then, we show that word2vec's skip-gram with negative sampling embedding algorithm finds the optimal low-dimensional approximation of this JS dependency measure between the words and their contexts.  வித்தியாசமான மதிப்பெண் மற்றும் குறைந்த பரிமாற்றத்திற்கும் இடைவெளிப்பாடு ஒரு நிலையான உரை குறும்புகளில் காட", 'ur': 'ہم نے اس کاغذ میں دو تصادفی تغییرات کے درمیان ایک اندازہ اعتباری کا مقرر کیا ہے جو جنسن-شانون (JS) کے متفرق ہے ان کے متفرق تقسیم اور ان کے متفرق تقسیم کے متفرق پر بنیاد ہے. پھر ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمات 2vec کے اسکیپ گرم کو منفی سمپلینگ الگوریٹم کے ساتھ ڈھانپ لینے والی الگوریٹم کو اس JS کی نائب کی اندازہ کے درمیان اچھی کم اندازہ کی تقرب پاتا ہے بہترین اسکور اور کم اندازے کی تقرب کے درمیان فاصلہ ایک استاندارد ٹکس کورپوس پر دکھائی جاتی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz Jensen-Shannon (JS) bilan birlashtirish va chegara tarqatish loyihasi bilan ikkita oʻzgarishlar orasidagi tashkilotni aniqlamaymiz. Keyin biz bu so'zlar va murakkablarining orasidagi negativ samol bilan soni 2vec'ning yuqori grammatika yordamida qo'llanib qo'yish mumkin. Andoza matn funksiyasini koʻrsatish.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xác định một thước đo độ phụ thuộc giữa hai biến số ngẫu nhiên, dựa trên sự khác biệt giữa phân phối chung của họ và sản phẩm của các phân phối ngoại lệ. Sau đó, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng thuật toán nhảy cóc của Từ 2Véc với thuật toán kết nạp âm tính tìm ra phương pháp tương ứng tối ưu với chiều lượng phụ thuộc JR giữa các từ và ngữ cảnh của chúng. Khoảng cách giữa tỉ số tối ưu và mức áp suất thấp được hiển thị trên một tập thể chữ chuẩn.', 'bg': 'В тази статия се дефинира мярка на зависимост между две случайни променливи, базирана на дивергенцията между съвместното им разпределение и продукта на маргиналните им разпределения. След това показваме, че алгоритъмът за вграждане на отрицателни извадки намира оптималната нискоизмерна приблизителност на тази мярка за зависимост между думите и техните контексти. Пролуката между оптималния резултат и нискоизмерната приблизителност е демонстрирана на стандартен текстов корпус.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru definiramo mjeru ovisnosti između dvije nasumične promjene na temelju razlike Jensen-Shannon (JS) između njihovog zajedničkog distribucije i proizvoda njihovih marginalnih distribucija. Onda pokažemo da preskočivanje rečenica 2veca sa negativnim algoritmom za uzorke uključuje optimalno nisko dimenzionalno približavanje ove mjere ovisnosti JS između riječi i njihovih konteksta. Praznina između optimalnog rezultata i niskodimenzionalnog približavanja pokazuje se na standardnom tekstskom korpusu.', 'nl': "In dit artikel definiëren we een maat voor de afhankelijkheid tussen twee willekeurige variabelen, gebaseerd op de Jensen-Shannon (JS) divergentie tussen hun gezamenlijke verdeling en het product van hun marginale verdelingen. Vervolgens laten we zien dat word2vec's skip-gram met negatief sampling embedding algoritme de optimale laagdimensionale approximatie van deze JS afhankelijkheidsmaat tussen de woorden en hun contexten vindt. De kloof tussen de optimale score en de laagdimensionale approximatie wordt aangetoond op een standaard tekstcorpus.", 'da': 'I denne artikel definerer vi et mål for afhængighed mellem to tilfældige variabler, baseret på Jensen-Shannon (JS) divergensen mellem deres fælles fordeling og produktet af deres marginale fordelinger. Derefter viser vi, at word2vecs spring-gram med negativ sampling indlejring algoritme finder den optimale lavdimensionelle tilnærmelse af denne JS afhængighed måling mellem ordene og deres sammenhænge. Afstanden mellem den optimale score og den lavdimensionelle tilnærmelse påvises på et standardtekstkorpus.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kita mendefinisikan ukuran dependensi antara dua variabel acak, berdasarkan divergensi Jensen-Shannon (JS) antara distribusi kongsi mereka dan produk distribusi marginal mereka. Kemudian, kita menunjukkan bahwa kata 2vec skip-gram dengan algoritma penemuan sampel negatif menemukan pendekatan dimensi rendah optimal dari ukuran dependensi JS ini antara kata-kata dan konteks mereka. Lubang antara skor optimal dan pendekatan dimensi rendah dipaparkan pada corpus teks standar.', 'ko': '본고는 두 개의 무작위 변수의 연합 분포와 그 한계 분포 곱셈 사이의 Jensen-shannon(JS) 산도를 바탕으로 두 개의 무작위 변수 간의 의존성 도량을 정의했다.그리고 워드2vec의 skip gram과 마이너스 샘플링 삽입 알고리즘이 단어와 그들의 상하문 사이에서 이 JS 의존도량의 가장 낮은 차원과 비슷한 것을 찾았다는 것을 증명했다.표준 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 최적 점수와 저차원 근사 사이의 차이를 증명했다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag definieren wir ein Maß für die Abhängigkeit zwischen zwei Zufallsvariablen, basierend auf der Jensen-Shannon (JS) Divergenz zwischen ihrer gemeinsamen Verteilung und dem Produkt ihrer Grenzverteilungen. Dann zeigen wir, dass word2vecs Skip-Gramm mit negativem Sampling Einbettungsalgorithmus die optimale niederdimensionale Approximation dieses JS Abhängigkeitsmesss zwischen den Wörtern und ihren Kontexten findet. Die Lücke zwischen der optimalen Punktzahl und der niederdimensionalen Approximation wird an einem Standard-Textkorpus demonstriert.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaelezea kiasi cha kutegemea kati ya mabadiliko mawili yasiyo na hisia, kwa kutumia tofauti ya Jensen-Shannon (JS) kati ya usambazaji wao wa pamoja na uzalishaji wa usambazaji wao wa msingi. Kisha, tunaonyesha kwamba mpango wa ndege wa Word2vec wenye mifano hasi yenye sampuli inayoweka inagundua takribani kiasi cha chini cha hatua hii ya kutegemea ya JS kati ya maneno na matatizo yao. Kutofautiana kati ya vipimo vya optimizi na takribani kwa kiwango cha chini kinaonyesha kwenye viungo vya maandishi vya kawaida.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër ne përcaktojmë një masë varësie midis dy ndryshuesve të rastësishme, bazuar në dallimin e Jensen-Shannon (JS) midis shpërndarjes së tyre të përbashkët dhe prodhimit të shpërndarjeve të tyre marginale. Then, we show that word2vec's skip-gram with negative sampling embedding algorithm finds the optimal low-dimensional approximation of this JS dependency measure between the words and their contexts.  Rruga midis rezultatit optimal dhe afërsisë dimensionale të ulët është demonstruar në një korpus teksti standard.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም በሁለቱ መለያያየት መካከል የJensen-Shannon (JS) የተለየ ጥያቄ እና የግንኙነታቸውን አካባቢ ክፍል በተመሳሳይ እና የግንኙነታቸውን ትክክል በማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የWord2vec የመስኮት-ግራም በአልጎሪትም ውስጥ የነበረውን የአልጎሪትም የዚህን የJS ትዕግስት ቃላት እና የግንኙነታቸው ክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን መግለጫ ማግኘት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በአስተዳዳሚ ጽሑፍ ቁጥር እና በዝቅተኛ ቁጥር መካከል የሚለይ ክፍል ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք սահմանում ենք կախվածության չափումը երկու պատահական փոփոխականների միջև, հիմնված Ջենսեն-Շանոնի (JS) տարբերությունների միջև իրենց միավոր տարածումների և իրենց սահմանափակ տարածումների արդյունքի միջև: Then, we show that word2vec's skip-gram with negative sampling embedding algorithm finds the optimal low-dimensional approximation of this JS dependency measure between the words and their contexts.  Օպտիմալ գնահատականի և ցածր չափերի մոտիմացիայի միջև տարբերությունը ցույց է տալիս ստանդարտ տեքստի կորպոսի վրա:", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک اندازه بستگی بین دو تغییر تصادفی را تعریف می کنیم، بر اساس تغییر جنسن-شانون (JS) بین تقسیم مشترک و محصول تقسیم محدودیت آنها. سپس نشان می دهیم که کلمه ۲vek را با الگوریتم\u200cهای نمونه\u200cهای منفی وارد کردن پیدا می\u200cکند که نزدیک شدن نسبت به اندازه\u200cهای بستگی JS بین کلمه\u200cها و محیط\u200cهایشان پایین\u200cترین پیدا می\u200cکند. فاصله بین امتیاز optimal و نزدیک شدن بعدی پایین روی یک قالب متن استاندارد نشان داده می شود.', 'az': "Bu kağızda Jensen-Shannon (JS) arasında olan iki rastgele dəyişiklik arasında bağımlılıq ölçüsünü belə tanımlıyıq. Sonra, biz bu s özlərin negatif nümunə çəkməsi ilə 2vec'in atlayış grafisini göstərdik ki, bu sözlərin və məlumatlarının arasındakı optimal düşük ölçülük ölçüsünün yaxınlığını görür. Optimal nöqtəsi və a şağı ölçülük yaxınlaşması arasındakı boşluq standart mətn korpusu ilə göstərilir.", 'af': "In hierdie papier definieer ons 'n maat van afhanklikheid tussen twee willekeurige veranderlikes, gebaseer op die Jensen-Shannon (JS) verskil tussen hul joint verspreiding en die produkt van hul marjinale verspreidings. Dan, ons wys dat woorde 2vec se skip- gram met negatiewe versameling inbêring algoritme vind die optimale lae- dimensie-besondering van hierdie JS afhanklikheid-maat tussen die woorde en hulle konteks. Die afstand tussen die optimale punt en die lae-dimensie toekoms is deursien op 'n standaard teks korpus.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda Jensen-Shannon (JS) bilelikli dağıtımlaryň arasynda iki tesadüf üýtgeşmeleri arasynda bağlılıklygyň ölçüsini belirleýäris. Sonra da сөздi2vek'in önlük grafisini negatif örnek alma algoritmi ile gösteriyoruz ki, bu JS bağlılığı ölçüs ü ve kelimeleri arasında en iyisi yukarı ölçüde bulunuyor. Optimalik merkeň we düşük ölçü ýakynlaşygyň arasyndaky gapy standart metin korpusynda görkezilýär.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru definišemo mjeru ovisnosti između dvije nasumične varijante, na temelju razlike Jensen-Shannon (JS) između njihovog zajedničkog distribucije i proizvoda njihovih marginalnih distribucija. Onda pokažemo da preskočiti grama rečenice 2veka sa negativnim algoritmom ubacivanja uzorka nalazi se optimalno niskodimenzionalno približavanje ove mjere ovisnosti JS između riječi i njihovih konteksta. Praznina između optimalnog rezultata i niskodimenzionalnog približavanja pokazuje se na standardnom tekstskom korpusu.', 'ca': "En aquest paper definim una mesura de dependencia entre dues variables aleatòries, basada en la divergència Jensen-Shannon (JS) entre la seva distribució articular i el producte de les seves distribucions marginals. Llavors, demostram que el skip-gram de word2vec amb algoritme d'incorporació de mostres negatius troba l'aproximació de baixa dimensió òptima d'aquesta mesura de dependencia JS entre les paraules i els seus contextos. La diferència entre la puntuació óptima i l'aproximació baixa dimensional es demostra en un cos de text estàndard.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku definujeme měřítko závislosti mezi dvěma náhodnými proměnnými, založené na Jensenově-Shannonově (JS) divergenci mezi jejich společným rozdělením a produktem jejich mezních rozdělení. Následně ukazujeme, že přeskočený gram Word2vec s algoritmem vkládání negativního vzorkování nalezne optimální nízkorozměrnou aproximaci tohoto JS měřítka závislosti mezi slovy a jejich kontextem. Mezera mezi optimálním skórem a nízkorozměrnou aproximací je demonstrována na standardním textovém korpusu.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা জেনেসেন-শান্নোন (জেএসএস) তাদের যৌথ বিতরণ এবং তাদের মার্মিনিয়াল বিতরণের উৎপাদনের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন পার্থক্যের উপর ভিত্তিতে দু তারপর আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ওয়ার্ড২ভেকের জাহাজ-গ্রামের নেতিবাচক নমুনা দিয়ে আলগরিদমের সাথে এই জেএসএস-এর নির্ভরশীল মাপ এবং তাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মধ্যে এই বিষয় স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার টেক্সট কোর্পাসের মধ্যে অপটিমাল স্কোর এবং নিম্নলিখিত সংখ্যার মধ্যে পার্থক্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়।', 'fi': 'T채ss채 ty철ss채 m채채ritell채채n kahden satunnaismuuttujan riippuvuuden mitta, joka perustuu Jensen-Shannonin (JS) eroavuuteen niiden yhteisen jakautumisen ja niiden marginaaliajonojen tuotteen v채lill채. Sitten osoitamme, ett채 word2vecin skip-gram negatiivisella n채ytteenottoupotusalgoritmilla l철yt채채 optimaalisen pieniulotteisen likim채채rityksen t채st채 JS-riippuvuusmittarista sanojen ja niiden kontekstien v채lill채. Optimaalisen pistem채채r채n ja pieniulotteisen likim채채rityksen v채linen ero osoitetaan vakiotekstikorpusella.', 'et': "Käesolevas töös määratleme sõltuvuse mõõdu kahe juhusliku muutuja vahel, põhinedes Jensen-Shannoni (JS) lahknevusel nende ühisjaotuse ja nende marginaaljaotuse produkti vahel. Seejärel näitame, et word2vec'i skip-gramm koos negatiivse valimi manustamise algoritmiga leiab optimaalse madalamõõtmelise lähenemise sellele JS sõltuvusmõõdule sõnade ja nende konteksti vahel. Lõhe optimaalse skoori ja madalamõõtmelise lähenemise vahel on näidatud standardses tekstikorpuses.", 'jv': 'In this paper we define a measurement of the sampling and the sampling of a Variable 2 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Attribute', 'he': "בעיתון הזה אנו מגדירים מידה של תלויה בין שני משתנים אקראיים, בהתבסס על ההבדל ג'נסן-שאנון (JS) בין ההפצה המשותפת שלהם לבין המוצר של ההפצה הגבוהה שלהם. ואז, אנו מראים שדיקופ-גרם של מילת 2vec עם אלגוריתם קיצוב דגימות שלילית מוצאים את התקרבות המימדית היטב האופטימית של המידה ההתלויות של JS בין המילים והקשרים שלהם. הפער בין הציון האופטימלי וההתקרבות המימדית הנמוכה על קורפוס טקסט סטנדרטי.", 'ha': "A cikin wannan takardan, Munã bayyana wani gwargwadon tsari mai tsakaita a tsakanin variablen biyu da ba'a so ba, a kan tsakanin jensen-Shannon (JS). Sa'an nan, za mu nuna cewa duk gram-gram na word2vc da misali mai nega da ke cikin algoritm na sami'a, yana s ãmu da tsakanin JS da takardar gaskiyar haske a tsakanin kalmõmi da misãlai. Ana nuna gaɓa tsakanin kwanan kwamfyuta da cire-girmar da aka nuna kan wata matsayin na daidaita.", 'sk': 'V prispevku smo opredelili merilo odvisnosti med dvema naključnima spremenljivkama, ki temelji na Jensen-Shannonovi (JS) razliki med njihovo skupno porazdelitvijo in produktom njihovih mejnih porazdelitev. Nato pokažemo, da word2vec preskoči gram z negativnim algoritmom vgradnje vzorčenja najde optimalno nizkodimenzionalno približevanje tega merjenja odvisnosti JS med besedami in njihovimi konteksti. Vrzel med optimalnim rezultatom in nizkodimenzionalnim približevanjem je prikazan na standardnem besedilnem korpusu.', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་རྐྱེན་ཚད་རྩིས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྗོད་རིས་2vec's skip-gram་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཕབ་ཚད་ཉུང་བའི་རྩ་བའི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ཉུང་བའི་རིམ་འབྲས་དང་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་དབར་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་།"}
{'en': 'The Role of Prosody and Speech Register in Word Segmentation : A Computational Modelling Perspective', 'ar': 'دور تسجيل الكلام والكلام في تجزئة الكلمات: منظور النمذجة الحسابية', 'pt': 'O Papel da Prosódia e do Registro de Fala na Segmentação de Palavras: Uma Perspectiva de Modelagem Computacional', 'es': 'El papel de la prosodia y el registro del habla en la segmentación de palabras: una perspectiva de modelado computacional', 'fr': 'Le rôle de la prosodie et du registre vocal dans la segmentation des mots\xa0: une perspective de modélisation informatique', 'ja': 'ワードセグメンテーションにおけるプロソディーとスピーチレジスタの役割：計算モデリングの視点', 'zh': '韵音寄存器在分词,计建模视角', 'hi': 'Word Segmentation में Prosody और Speech Register की भूमिका: एक कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडलिंग परिप्रेक्ष्य', 'ru': 'Роль регистров просодии и речи в сегментации слов: перспектива компьютерного моделирования', 'ga': 'Ról an Phrósóid agus Clár Cainte i nDíighilt Focal: Peirspictíocht Samhalta Ríomhaireachta', 'ka': 'პროცედის და სიტყვების რეგისტერის პროლია სიტყვების სეგენტაციაში: კომპუტაციალური მოდელური პერცექტი', 'el': 'Ο Ρόλος της Προσωδίας και του Μητρώου Λόγου στην Κατάτμηση λέξεων: Μια προοπτική υπολογιστικής μοντελοποίησης', 'hu': 'A prosódia- és beszédnyilvántartás szerepe a szövegszegmentációban: számítástechnikai modellezési perspektíva', 'it': 'Il ruolo della prosodia e del registro vocale nella segmentazione delle parole: una prospettiva di modellazione computazionale', 'kk': 'Сөздік сегментациясындағы производия және сөздік тізімінің рөлі: Компьютерлік үлгілеу перспективасы', 'mk': 'Ролата на регистарот на прозодијата и говорот во секментацијата на зборовите: Компутационална перспектива за моделирање', 'lt': 'Prosody and Speech Register Role in Word Segmentation: A Computational Modelling Perspective', 'ms': 'Comment', 'mn': 'Үг хэлбэрийн прокурод, ярианы регистрийн үүрэг: Компьютерийн загварын Перспектив', 'mt': 'Ir-Rwol tar-Reġistru tal-Prosodija u tal-Kellem fis-Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem: Perspettiva tal-Immudellar Komputazzjonali', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d പ്രോസോഡിയിലും സംസാര ര രേജിസ്റ്റര്\u200d', 'no': 'Rolen av prosjektet og taleregistrering i ordsegmentasjon: Ein datamodelleringsperspektiv', 'ro': 'Rolul procesului și al registrului de vorbire în segmentarea cuvintelor: o perspectivă de modelare computațională', 'pl': 'Rola prozodii i rejestru mowy w segmentacji słowa: perspektywa modelowania obliczeniowego', 'sr': 'Role proizvodnje i govornog registra u rečnoj segmentaciji: Kompjuterska modelna perspektiva', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'The Role of Prosody and Speech Register in Word Segmentation: A Computational Modelling Perspective', 'sv': 'Rollen av prosodi- och talregister i ordsegmentering: Ett berĂ¤kningsmodellperspektiv', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ویڈ سیگنٹمنٹ میں پروڈی اور بات ثبت کے رول: ایک کمپیوٹریشن موڈلینگ پرسپرس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Công việc của Bộ trưởng phim lời nói và luật lệ trong ghi chép từ: A Tính cách nhìn tương lai', 'nl': 'De rol van prosodie en spraakregister in woordsegmentatie: een computermodelleringsperspectief', 'bg': 'Ролята на регистъра на просодията и речта в сегментацията на думите: перспектива на компютърното моделиране', 'da': 'Rollen af Prosodi og Tale Register i Ordsegmentering: Et Computational Modelling Perspective', 'hr': 'Uloga registracije proizvodnje i govora u segmentaciji riječi: Računalni model perspektiva', 'de': 'Die Rolle von Prosodie und Sprachregister in der Wortsegmentierung: Eine computergestützte Modellierungsperspektive', 'id': 'The Role of Prosody and Speech Register in Word Segmentation: A Computational Modelling Perspective', 'fa': 'نقش ثبت دادن و سخنرانی در قسمت کلمه: یک نقشه نمونه\u200cسازی کامپیوتری', 'ko': '운율과 어역이 분사에서의 작용: 계산 모델링의 시각', 'sw': 'Sheria ya Udhibiti na Uandishi wa Hotuba katika Segment of Word: A Computational Modelling perspective', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Prosedi we söz Registeriň roli söz segmentasynda: A Computational Modeling Perspective', 'sq': 'Roli i regjistrimit të Prosodisë dhe Fjalës në Segmentacionin e Fjalëve: Një Perspektiv Modelimi Komputacional', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k v톛 S칬zl칲k Sekm톛nasiyas캼ndak캼 S칬zl칲k v톛 S칬zl칲k Sekm톛nasiyas캼n캼n Roli: Komputasiya Modelling Perspektivi', 'am': 'The Role of Prosody and Speech Register in Word Segmentation: A Computation Modelling Perspective', 'hy': 'Խոսքի և խոսքի արձագանքի դերը բառերի բաժանման մեջ', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'El paper del registre de proòssia i discurs en la segmentació de paraules: una perspectiva de modelació computacional', 'cs': 'Úloha prozodií a řečového registru v segmentaci slova: perspektiva výpočetního modelování', 'bs': 'Uloga proizvodnje i govornog registra u segmentaciji riječi: Kompjuterska modelna perspektiva', 'et': 'Prooodia- ja kõneregistri roll sõnasegmentatsioonis: arvutuslik modelleerimise perspektiiv', 'fi': 'Prosodia- ja puherekisterin rooli sanasegmentoinnissa: laskennallinen mallinnusnäkökulma', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'התפקיד של רשום פרוסודיה ודיבורים בסגמנטציה מילים: פרספקטיבה למדגם מחשבי', 'sk': 'Vloga prosodije in govornega registra v segmentaciji besed: perspektiva računalniškega modeliranja', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'The Role of Prosody and Speech Register in Word Segmentation: A Computational Modelling Perspective'}
{'en': 'This study explores the role of speech register and prosody for the task of word segmentation. Since these two factors are thought to play an important role in early language acquisition, we aim to quantify their contribution for this task. We study a Japanese corpus containing both infant- and adult-directed speech and we apply four different word segmentation models, with and without knowledge of prosodic boundaries. The results showed that the difference between registers is smaller than previously reported and that prosodic boundary information helps more adult- than infant-directed speech.', 'ar': 'تستكشف هذه الدراسة دور سجل الكلام والعرض الموسيقي لمهمة تجزئة الكلمات. نظرًا لأنه يُعتقد أن هذين العاملين يلعبان دورًا مهمًا في اكتساب اللغة في وقت مبكر ، فإننا نهدف إلى تحديد مساهمتهما في هذه المهمة. ندرس مجموعة نصية يابانية تحتوي على كل من الكلام الموجه للرضع والبالغين ونطبق أربعة نماذج مختلفة لتجزئة الكلمات ، مع وبدون معرفة بالحدود الصوتية. أظهرت النتائج أن الفرق بين السجلات أصغر مما تم الإبلاغ عنه سابقًا وأن معلومات الحدود العامة تساعد في الكلام الموجه للبالغين أكثر من الكلام الموجه للرضع.', 'es': 'Este estudio explora el papel del registro del habla y la prosodia para la tarea de segmentación de palabras. Dado que se cree que estos dos factores desempeñan un papel importante en la adquisición temprana del lenguaje, nuestro objetivo es cuantificar su contribución a esta tarea. Estudiamos un corpus japonés que contiene el habla dirigida tanto a niños como a adultos y aplicamos cuatro modelos diferentes de segmentación de palabras, con y sin conocimiento de los límites prosódicos. Los resultados mostraron que la diferencia entre los registros es menor que la informada anteriormente y que la información sobre los límites prosódicos ayuda más al habla dirigida a adultos que a bebés.', 'pt': 'Este estudo explora o papel do registro de fala e da prosódia para a tarefa de segmentação de palavras. Uma vez que se acredita que esses dois fatores desempenham um papel importante na aquisição precoce da linguagem, nosso objetivo é quantificar sua contribuição para essa tarefa. Estudamos um corpus japonês contendo fala dirigida a crianças e adultos e aplicamos quatro modelos diferentes de segmentação de palavras, com e sem conhecimento de limites prosódicos. Os resultados mostraram que a diferença entre os registros é menor do que o relatado anteriormente e que as informações de fronteira prosódica auxiliam mais na fala dirigida ao adulto do que ao infantil.', 'fr': "Cette étude explore le rôle du registre vocal et de la prosodie dans la segmentation des mots. Puisque ces deux facteurs sont considérés comme jouant un rôle important dans l'acquisition précoce de la langue, nous cherchons à quantifier leur contribution à cette tâche. Nous étudions un corpus japonais contenant des discours dirigés à la fois par des enfants et des adultes et nous appliquons quatre modèles de segmentation de mots différents, avec et sans connaissance des limites prosodiques. Les résultats ont montré que la différence entre les registres est plus faible que ce qui a été rapporté précédemment et que les informations sur les limites prosodiques favorisent davantage la parole dirigée par les adultes que par les nourrissons.", 'ja': 'この研究は、単語セグメンテーションのタスクのための音声レジスタとプロソディの役割を探求する。これら2つの要因は、早期の言語習得に重要な役割を果たしていると考えられるため、このタスクに対するそれらの貢献を定量化することを目指しています。私たちは、乳幼児向けと成人向けのスピーチの両方を含む日本語コーパスを研究し、プロソディー境界の知識の有無にかかわらず、4つの異なる単語セグメンテーションモデルを適用します。結果は、レジスタ間の差が以前に報告されたよりも小さく、プロソディック境界情報が乳幼児向けの発話よりも成人向けの発話を助けることを示した。', 'zh': '本讨论语音寄存器韵在分词任。 二者以早言习得中起重,故量化其效也。 论包婴儿、导语音之日语语料库,而用四分词之形,无论韵界。 结果显示,寄存器之异小于报道,韵界信息过于婴儿之言。', 'ru': 'Это исследование исследует роль регистра речи и просодии для задачи сегментации слов. Поскольку считается, что эти два фактора играют важную роль в раннем изучении языка, мы стремимся количественно оценить их вклад в решение этой задачи. Мы изучаем японский корпус, содержащий как младенческую, так и взрослую речь, и применяем четыре различные модели сегментации слов, со знанием и без знания просодических границ. Результаты показали, что разница между регистрами меньше, чем сообщалось ранее, и что просодическая граничная информация помогает более взрослой, чем младенческой речи.', 'hi': 'यह अध्ययन शब्द विभाजन के कार्य के लिए भाषण रजिस्टर और प्रोसोडी की भूमिका की पड़ताल करता है। चूंकि इन दो कारकों को प्रारंभिक भाषा अधिग्रहण में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाने के लिए माना जाता है, इसलिए हम इस कार्य के लिए उनके योगदान को मापने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हम एक जापानी कॉर्पस का अध्ययन करते हैं जिसमें शिशु और वयस्क-निर्देशित भाषण दोनों होते हैं और हम चार अलग-अलग शब्द विभाजन मॉडल लागू करते हैं, प्रोसोडिक सीमाओं के ज्ञान के साथ और बिना। परिणामों से पता चला है कि रजिस्टरों के बीच का अंतर पहले की रिपोर्ट की तुलना में छोटा है और प्रोसोडिक सीमा जानकारी शिशु-निर्देशित भाषण की तुलना में अधिक वयस्कों की मदद करती है।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an staidéar seo an ról atá ag clár cainte agus prósáid don tasc a bhaineann le deighilt focal. Ós rud é go gceaptar go bhfuil ról tábhachtach ag an dá thoisc seo i sealbhú na teanga go luath, tá sé mar aidhm againn an méid a chuireann siad leis an tasc seo a chainníochtú. Déanaimid staidéar ar chorpas Seapánach ina bhfuil caint faoi threoir naíonán agus daoine fásta araon agus cuirimid i bhfeidhm ceithre mhúnla deighilte focal éagsúla, le agus gan eolas ar theorainneacha prosodacha. Thaispeáin na torthaí go bhfuil an difríocht idir cláir níos lú ná mar a tuairiscíodh roimhe seo agus go gcabhraíonn faisnéis faoi theorainneacha prósóideacha le níos mó cainte daoine fásta ná naíonán.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη διερευνά το ρόλο του μητρώου ομιλίας και της προνodiας για το έργο της τμηματοποίησης λέξεων. Δεδομένου ότι οι δύο αυτοί παράγοντες θεωρούνται ότι διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο στην πρώιμη εκμάθηση γλωσσών, στόχος μας είναι να ποσοτικοποιήσουμε τη συμβολή τους σε αυτό το έργο. Μελετάμε ένα ιαπωνικό σώμα που περιέχει ομιλία τόσο για βρέφη όσο και για ενήλικες και εφαρμόζουμε τέσσερα διαφορετικά μοντέλα τμηματοποίησης λέξεων, με και χωρίς γνώση των προσωδικών ορίων. Τα αποτελέσματα έδειξαν ότι η διαφορά μεταξύ των μητρώων είναι μικρότερη από ό,τι αναφέρθηκε προηγουμένως και ότι οι προσodische οριακές πληροφορίες βοηθούν περισσότερο την ομιλία που κατευθύνεται προς ενήλικες παρά προς βρέφη.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a beszédregiszter és a prosódia szerepét vizsgálja a szószegmentálás feladatában. Mivel ez a két tényező fontos szerepet játszik a korai nyelvtanulásban, arra törekszünk, hogy számszerűsítsük a feladathoz való hozzájárulásukat. Tanulmányozunk egy japán korpuszt, amely csecsemők és felnőttek által egyaránt irányított beszédet tartalmaz, és négy különböző szegmentációs modellt alkalmazunk, a prozódikus határok ismerete nélkül. Az eredmények azt mutatták, hogy a regiszterek közötti különbség kisebb, mint korábban jelentették, és hogy a prozódiás határértékekkel kapcsolatos információk több felnőtt, mint csecsemő irányított beszédet segítenek.', 'ka': 'ეს სწავლება განსხვავებს სიტყვების რეგისტრისტის პროლის და პროცედის სიტყვების რეგისტრისტის პარამეტრებისთვის. რადგან ეს ორი ფაქტორი იფიქრობენ, რომ იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია საწყისო ენის მიღებაში, ჩვენ მინდა გავაკეთოთ მათი მიღება ამ დავალებისთვის. ჩვენ იაპონური კორპუსს სწავლობთ, რომელიც ბავშვები და გავაკეთებული სიტყვას და ჩვენ 4 განსხვავებული სიტყვას სექმენტირების მოდელების გამოყენება, რომელიც პროცედიური დრო წარმოდგენები გამოჩნდა, რომ რეგისტრისების განსხვავება უფრო პატარა, ვიდრე წინ შეტყობინებულია და რომ პროცოდიური განსხვავებული ინფორმაცია უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენებული', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime nagrinėjamas kalbos registro ir prosodijos vaidmuo žodžių segmentacijos uždaviniui. Kadangi manoma, kad šie du veiksniai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį ankstyvuoju kalbų įgijimu, siekiame kiekybiškai įvertinti jų indėlį į šią užduotį. Mes tiriame Japonijos korpusą, kuriame kalbama tiek kūdikių, tiek suaugusiųjų atžvilgiu, ir taikome keturis skirtingus žodžių segmentacijos modelius, su prosodinėmis ribomis ir be jų. Rezultatai parodė, kad registrų skirtumas yra mažesnis nei anksčiau, ir kad prosodinė informacija apie ribines vertes padeda kalbėti daugiau suaugusiųjų nei kūdikių.', 'it': "Questo studio esplora il ruolo del registro vocale e della prosodia per il compito della segmentazione delle parole. Poiché si ritiene che questi due fattori svolgano un ruolo importante nell'acquisizione precoce delle lingue, miriamo a quantificare il loro contributo per questo compito. Studiamo un corpus giapponese contenente sia il discorso diretto da neonati che adulti e applichiamo quattro diversi modelli di segmentazione delle parole, con e senza conoscenza dei confini prosodici. I risultati hanno mostrato che la differenza tra i registri è più piccola di quanto precedentemente riportato e che le informazioni sui confini prosodici aiutano più adulti rispetto ai neonati.", 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу сөздерді сегментациялау тапсырмасының жұмысының жұмысын зерттейді. Бұл екі факторды бастағы тілдерді алу үшін маңызды роль ойнайтын деп ойлайды, біз олардың бұл тапсырма үшін қатынасын есептеу мақсатымыз. Біз жапон корпусын зерттейміз, балалардың және әрқашандағы сөздердің көмегімен, төрт әртүрлі сөздердің сегментациялау үлгілерін қолданамыз. Біз проsodic шектерді білмей және Нәтижелер жазулардың арасындағы айырмашылығы алдыңғы хабарлаған дегеннен кіші және просодикалық шектер мәліметі балалардың сөздеріне көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Оваа студија ја истражува улогата на регистарот на говорот и прозодијата за задачата на сегментацијата на зборовите. Бидејќи се смета дека овие два фактори имаат важна улога во раното набавување јазик, ние имаме за цел да го квантификуваме нивниот придонес за оваа задача. Истражуваме јапонски корпус кој содржи говор насочен кон бебиња и возрасни и применуваме четири различни модели за сегментација на зборови, со и без знаење на прозодичните граници. Резултатите покажаа дека разликата помеѓу регистрите е помала од претходно објавените и дека прозодичните гранични информации помагаат во поголем разговор за возрасни отколку за бебиња.', 'ms': 'kajian ini mengeksplorasi peran daftar ucapan dan prosody untuk tugas segmen perkataan. Oleh kerana kedua faktor ini dianggap bermain peran penting dalam pemberian bahasa awal, kami bertujuan untuk kuantifikasi kontribusi mereka untuk tugas ini. Kami mempelajari korpus Jepun yang mengandungi ucapan yang mengarah kepada kanak-kanak dan orang dewasa dan kami melaksanakan empat model segmen kata yang berbeza, dengan dan tanpa pengetahuan sempadan prosodik. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa perbezaan antara daftar lebih kecil daripada yang dilaporkan sebelumnya dan bahawa maklumat sempadan prosodik membantu lebih ramai-daripada ucapan yang diarah bayi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനം വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രോസോഡിയുടെയും വാക്കുകളുടെയും സംസാര ര രേജിസ്റ്റര്\u200dസിന്റെയും പ്രോസ്ഡിയുട ഈ രണ്ടു കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യ ഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ്ക് കളിക്കാന്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിക്ക് അവരുടെ പങ്ക്  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജപ്പാനീസ് കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് പഠിക്കുന്നു. കുട്ടികള്\u200dക്കും മുതിര്\u200dന്നവര്\u200dക്കും നേര്\u200dവഴിയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. നാലു വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ് മുമ്പ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തതിനെക്കാള്\u200d വ്യത്യാസവും പ്രോസോഡിക്ക് അതിര്\u200dത്തിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കുട്ടിക്കാള്\u200d നേരിട്ട സ', 'mt': 'Dan l-istudju jesplora r-rwol tar-reġistru tad-diskors u l-prosodija għall-kompitu tas-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem. Since these two factors are thought to play an important role in early language acquisition, we aim to quantify their contribution for this task.  Aħna nistudjaw korpus Ġappuniż li fih kemm diskors dirett lejn it-trabi kif ukoll lejn l-adulti u napplikaw erba’ mudelli differenti ta’ segmentazzjoni tal-kliem, bi u mingħajr għarfien tal-fruntieri prosodiċi. Ir-riżultati wrew li d-differenza bejn ir-reġistri hija iżgħar minn dik irrappurtata qabel u li l-informazzjoni prosodika dwar il-fruntieri tgħin għal diskors aktar dirett lejn adulti milli lejn it-trabi.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаа үгийн хэвлэлийн регистр, хэвлэлийн загварын ажлыг судалдаг. Эдгээр хоёр хүчин зүйлүүд эхний хэл худалдан авах нь чухал үүрэг тоглох гэж боддог учраас бид тэдний үүрэгт зориулалтыг тооцоолж байна. Бид хүүхдүүд болон насанд хүрэгчдийн яриаг дүрсэлж байгаа Японы корпус суралцаж 4 өөр үг загварчлалын загварыг ашиглаж, хууль загварын хил хязгаарыг мэдэхгүй байдаг. Үр дүрсийн үр дүн нь өмнө зарцуулсан зарцуулсан зарцуулагчдын ялгаа бага байдаг. Хүүхдүүдийн яриагаас илүү том хүүхдүүдэд тусалдаг.', 'pl': 'W pracy badano rolę rejestru mowy i prozodii w zadaniu segmentacji słów. Ponieważ uważa się, że te dwa czynniki odgrywają ważną rolę we wczesnym nabywaniu języka, staramy się określić ilościowo ich wkład w to zadanie. Badamy japoński korpus zawierający mowę skierowaną zarówno do niemowląt, jak i dorosłych oraz stosujemy cztery różne modele segmentacji słów, z i bez znajomości granic prozodycznych. Wyniki wykazały, że różnica pomiędzy rejestrami jest mniejsza niż wcześniej opisywana i że informacje o granicach prozodowych pomagają w większym stopniu mowy skierowanej do dorosłych niż do niemowląt.', 'no': 'Denne studien utforskar rolen på taleregistrering og prosodi for oppgåva av ordsegmentering. Sidan desse to faktorene vert tenkt på å spela ein viktig rolle i tidlegare språk, må vi kvantifisere bidraga sine for denne oppgåva. Vi studerer ein japansk korpus som inneheld både barn- og voksne tale og bruker fire forskjellige ordsegmenteringsmodeller, med og utan kunnskap om prosodiske grenser. Resultatet viste at forskjellen mellom registrer er mindre enn tidlegare rapportert, og at prosodiske grenseinformasjon hjelper meir voksne enn språk med infanter.', 'ro': 'Acest studiu explorează rolul registrului de vorbire și al prosodiei pentru sarcina segmentării cuvintelor. Deoarece se consideră că acești doi factori joacă un rol important în dobândirea timpurie a limbilor străine, ne propunem să cuantificăm contribuția lor la această sarcină. Studiem un corpus japonez care conține atât vorbirea regizată de sugari cât și de adulți și aplicăm patru modele diferite de segmentare a cuvintelor, cu și fără cunoaștere a limitelor prosodice. Rezultatele au arătat că diferența dintre registre este mai mică decât raportată anterior și că informațiile privind limitele prosodice ajută mai mult la vorbirea adresată adulților decât sugarilor.', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan ayaa ka baaraandegay qaybta diiwaangelinta hadalka iyo prosody ee shaqada qeybinta hadalka. Sida darteed labadaas sabab ah waxaa loo malaynayaa inay qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraan helashada afka hore, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa in loo qiyaaso qaybtooda shaqadan. Waxaynu baranaynaa qofka japaniya oo ku jira hadal la hagayo carruurta iyo dadka waaweyn, waxaana codsanaynaa afar qaab oo kala duduwan oo hadal ah, iyadoo aan aqoon lahayn xuduudaha dhimirka. Arimahaas waxay tuseen in kala duwanaanshaha diiwaangelinta ay ka yar tahay wixii horay loo soo sheegay, iyo in macluumaadka xuduudaha dhimirka ay caawinayso in ka badan hadal la hagayo dhallinyarada.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කතාවක් ලිපිනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන විශාල වැඩකට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. මේ විශේෂ දෙකක් හිතන්නේ පළවෙනි භාෂාව අල්ලගන්න වැදගත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් කියලා, අපි අල්ලගන්නවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරධ අපි ජාපානි කොර්පුස් එකක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා පුරුද්ධ- සහ වැඩිපුරුද්ධ කිරීමේ කතාවක් තියෙනවා, අපි වෙනස් වචන විශේෂ වච ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Denna studie undersöker taleregistrets och prosodins roll för ordsegmentering. Eftersom dessa två faktorer anses spela en viktig roll i tidig språkinlärning strävar vi efter att kvantifiera deras bidrag för denna uppgift. Vi studerar en japansk korpus som innehåller både spädbarns- och vuxenriktat tal och tillämpar fyra olika ordsegmenteringsmodeller, med och utan kunskap om prosodiska gränser. Resultaten visade att skillnaden mellan register är mindre än tidigare rapporterat och att prosodisk gränsinformation hjälper mer vuxna än spädbarnsriktat tal.', 'sr': 'Ova studija istražuje ulogu registra govora i prosodije za zadatak segmentacije riječi. Pošto se smatra da su ova dva faktora imala važnu ulogu u prikupljanju jezika ranog, mi ciljamo da kvantificiramo njihov doprinos za ovaj zadatak. Proučavamo japanski korpus koji sadrži govor na djetinjskoj i odrasloj strani i primjenjujemo četiri različite modele segmentacije riječi, sa i bez znanja o prosodijskim granicama. Rezultati su pokazali da je razlika između registracija manja od ranije prijavljenih i da prosodična granična informacija pomaže odraslijoj - od govora usmjerenog na djecu.', 'ur': 'یہ مطالعہ لفظ ثبت اور سپٹیٹ کے کام کے لئے بات ثبت کے رول کا تحقیق کرتا ہے. اس وجہ سے کہ یہ دو فاکتوروں کو پہلے زبان خریدنے میں ایک اہم رول بنانا سمجھا جاتا ہے، ہم ان کی مدد کو اس کام کے لئے مقدار کرنے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں. ہم ایک جاپانیایی کورپوس کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں جو بچے اور بڑے آدمی کی بات ہے اور ہم چار مختلف کلمات جدائی کے نمونے لکھتے ہیں، اس کے ساتھ اور بغیر علم کے. نتیجے دکھائے گئے کہ رسیسٹر کے درمیان تفاوت پہلے گزارے ہوئے سے چھوٹی ہے اور یہ کہ پروسوڈیک مرز معلومات بڑے بڑے بڑے آدمی کی بات سے زیادہ مدد کرتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த படிப்பாடு பேச்சு பதிவேட்டு மற்றும் பிரோசோடி வார்த்தை பிரிப்பத்தின் பணி இந்த இரண்டு காரணிகள் முதல் மொழி பெறுவதில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கு விளையாடுவதாக நினைக்கிறார்கள் என்பதால், இந்த பணிக்கு அவர் நாங்கள் ஒரு ஜப்பானிய குறியீட்டை படிக்கிறோம் குழந்தையும் பெரியவர் பேச்சையும் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சும் இருக்கு முடிவு', 'uz': "Bu o'qituvchi so'zni ajratish vazifasi uchun gapiruvchi registratori va prosodi xususiyatini aniqlaydi. Chunki bu ikkita factori oldingi tillar olish uchun muhim rollen o'ynashni o'ylashadi, biz bu vazifa uchun ularning qiymatini ko'paytirishni istaymiz. Biz chaqaloq va o'smirlar bilan gapiradigan japoncha kopusni o'rganamiz va biz to'rtta so'zlar qismlash modellarini qo'llamiz va prosodik chegaralarini bilmaymiz. @ info", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này nghiên cứu về vai trò của bộ trưởng ngôn ngữ và giai đoạn cho nhiệm vụ phân chia từ. Vì hai yếu tố này được cho là đóng vai trò quan trọng trong việc giành được ngôn ngữ sớm, nên chúng tôi muốn định lượng sự đóng góp của họ cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu một tập thể Nhật có chứa cả ngôn ngữ hướng dẫn trẻ em và người lớn và chúng tôi áp dụng bốn cách phân biệt từ khác nhau, với và không có kiến thức về giới hạn của người văn. Kết quả cho thấy sự khác nhau giữa các ngăn kéo nhỏ hơn so với những báo cáo trước đây và rằng thông tin giới hạn văn học giúp nhiều người lớn hơn bài diễn văn trẻ sơ sinh.', 'bg': 'Това изследване изследва ролята на речния регистър и прозодията за задачата на сегментацията на думите. Тъй като се смята, че тези два фактора играят важна роля в ранното придобиване на езика, ние се стремим да определим количествено техния принос за тази задача. Изследваме японски корпус, съдържащ както детска, така и възрастна реч и прилагаме четири различни модела на сегментация на думи, със и без познания за прозодните граници. Резултатите показаха, че разликата между регистрите е по-малка от докладваната преди това и че прозодната гранична информация помага повече за възрастните, отколкото за децата.', 'da': 'Dette studie undersøger taleregistrets og prosodys rolle for opgaven med ordsegmentering. Da disse to faktorer menes at spille en vigtig rolle i tidlig sprogtilegnelse, sigter vi mod at kvantificere deres bidrag til denne opgave. Vi studerer et japansk korpus, der indeholder både spædbørns- og voksenerettet tale, og vi anvender fire forskellige ordsegmenteringsmodeller, med og uden viden om prosodiske grænser. Resultaterne viste, at forskellen mellem registre er mindre end tidligere rapporteret, og at prosodiske grænseoplysninger hjælper mere voksen end spædbørnsrettet tale.', 'nl': 'Deze studie onderzoekt de rol van spraakregister en prosodie voor de taak van woordsegmentatie. Aangezien deze twee factoren een belangrijke rol spelen in de vroege taalverwerving, willen we hun bijdrage voor deze taak kwantificeren. We bestuderen een Japans corpus met zowel baby- als volwassen gerichte spraak en we passen vier verschillende woordsegmentatiemodellen toe, met en zonder kennis van prosodische grenzen. De resultaten toonden aan dat het verschil tussen registers kleiner is dan eerder gerapporteerd en dat prosodische grensinformatie meer volwassen dan baby-gerichte spraak helpt.', 'de': 'Diese Studie untersucht die Rolle von Sprachregister und Prosodie für die Aufgabe der Wortsegmentierung. Da diese beiden Faktoren für den frühen Spracherwerb eine wichtige Rolle spielen, wollen wir ihren Beitrag für diese Aufgabe quantifizieren. Wir untersuchen einen japanischen Korpus, der sowohl kindlich- als auch adult-directed speech enthält und verwenden vier verschiedene Wortsegmentierungsmodelle, mit und ohne Kenntnis prosodischer Grenzen. Die Ergebnisse zeigten, dass der Unterschied zwischen den Registern kleiner ist als bisher berichtet und dass prosodische Grenzinformationen mehr Erwachsenen- als Säuglings-gerichtete Sprache helfen.', 'id': 'Studi ini mengeksplorasi peran dari register pidato dan prosody untuk tugas segmentasi kata. Karena dua faktor ini dianggap bermain peran penting dalam pengakuasi bahasa awal, kami bermaksud untuk mengurangi kontribusi mereka untuk tugas ini. Kami mempelajari tubuh Jepang yang mengandung pidato yang direksi bayi-bayi dan dewasa dan kami menerapkan empat model segmentasi kata yang berbeda, dengan dan tanpa pengetahuan batas prosodik. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa perbedaan antara register lebih kecil dari yang dilaporkan sebelumnya dan bahwa informasi perbatasan prosodik membantu berbicara lebih dewasa daripada yang direksi bayi.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju istražuje ulogu registra govora i prosodije za zadatak segmentacije riječi. Budući da se smatraju da ova dva faktora imaju važnu ulogu u prikupljanju jezika ranije, mi ciljamo kvantificirati njihov doprinos za ovaj zadatak. Proučavamo japanski korpus koji sadrži govor djetinjstva i odraslih i primjenjujemo četiri različite modele segmentacije riječi, sa i bez znanja o prosodijskim granicama. Rezultati su pokazali da je razlika između registrija manja od ranije prijavljene i da prosodična granična informacija pomaže odraslijoj - nego riječi o djetinjstvu.', 'fa': 'این مطالعه نقش ثبت سخنرانی و تحقیق برای وظیفه جدا کردن کلمات را تحقیق می کند. از اونجایی که این دو عوامل فکر می\u200cشود که نقش مهم در دریافت زبان اول بازی کنند، ما قصد داریم که کمک آنها را برای این کار تعداد کنیم. ما یک کورپوس ژاپنی را مطالعه می کنیم که با سخنرانی کودکان و بزرگسالان رهبری می کند و چهار مدل جدایی کلمات متفاوت را تفاوت می کنیم، با و بدون دانش محدودیت پروسدیک. نتیجه\u200cها نشان دادند که تفاوت بین ثبت\u200cها از گزارش پیش کوچکتر است و این اطلاعات محدوده\u200cی محدوده\u200cی prosodic به بزرگسالان بیشتر کمک می\u200cکند- از سخنرانی که به کودکان هدایت می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu unagundua jukumu la uandikishaji wa hotuba na prosody kwa ajili ya kazi ya kuangaliwa kwa maneno. Kwa kuwa sababu hizi mbili zinafikiriwa kucheza jukumu muhimu katika kupata lugha za mwanzo, tunalenga kuweka kiasi cha mchango wao kwa kazi hii. Tunafoma makampuni ya Kijapani yenye hotuba ya mtoto na wazima inayoongozwa na tunatumia mifano minne tofauti ya maneno, na bila kujua mipaka ya uzazi. Matokeo yalionyesha kuwa tofauti kati ya waandishi ni ndogo kuliko ilivyoripotiwa na kwamba taarifa za mipaka za ngono zinasaidia watu wazima zaidi ya hotuba inayoongozwa na watoto.', 'tr': 'Bu araşdyrma söz segmentasiýasynyň görevi üçin çykyş registerynyň we esasy rolini gözləýär. Bu iki faktör irräk dil almakda möhüm rol oýnamak diýip pikir edilýän bolansoň, biz olaryň bu işiň üçin täsirlerini bejermek üçin maksadyk edýäris. Biz hem çaga hem yetişkinler şeklinde konuşan bir Japonça korpusu öğrendik ve dört farklı kelime segmentasyon modellerini uygulayıp, prosodik sınırları bilen ve kullanarak uygulayıp oturuyoruz. netijeler ýagdaýlaryň öňki rapor edenlerden has kiçi bolandygyny görkezildi we prosodik muga malümatynyň uly adamlara - çagalar diňe gürleşmeden kömekleşendigini görkezildi.', 'af': "Hierdie studie ondersoek die rol van spraak register en prosodie vir die taak van woord segmentasie. Omdat hierdie twee faktore gedink word om 'n belangrike rol te speel in vroeg taal aanvanging, doen ons doel om hul bydraai vir hierdie taak te kvantifiseer. Ons studeer 'n Japaanse korpus wat beide kindergarte en oudergrond-direkte spreek bevat, en ons wend vier verskillende woord segmentasie modele, met en sonder kennis van prosodiese grense. Die resultate het vertoon dat die verskil tussen registre kleiner is as voorheen verspreiding en dat prosodiese grens inligting hulp meer oudergrond - as kindergarte verspreiding.", 'sq': 'Ky studim eksploron rolin e regjistrimit të fjalës dhe prosodinë për detyrën e segmentimit të fjalëve. Meqë këta dy faktorë mendohet se luajnë një rol të rëndësishëm në blerjen e parakohshme të gjuhës, ne synojmë të kuantifikojmë kontributin e tyre për këtë detyrë. We study a Japanese corpus containing both infant- and adult-directed speech and we apply four different word segmentation models, with and without knowledge of prosodic boundaries.  Rezultatet treguan se dallimi midis regjistrave është më i vogël se raportuar më parë dhe se informacioni i kufirit prosodik ndihmon më shumë fjalim të rritur sesa të drejtuar nga foshnja.', 'am': 'ይህም ትምህርት የንግግር register እና ፕሮግራዲዮ ለቃላት ክፍል ማድረግ የሚደረገውን ትርጓሜ ይፈልጋል፡፡ እነዚህ ሁለቱ ምክንያቶች በመጀመሪያ ቋንቋ ውስጥ መግኘት የሚያስፈልጉት ትልቅ ሽፋን በመጫወት ምክንያት ለዚህ ስራ አካሄዳቸውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የጃፓን ኮርፓስ እና የሕፃናትን እና የአካባቢውን ንግግር እናስተምራለን፣ እናም የፕሮጀክት ዳርቻ በማወቅ አራት የተለየ ቃላት ምሳሌዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ ከመቀድሞው ካለፈው የበለጠ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ዳርቻ መረጃዎች ከሕፃንነቱ ከመገኘት የበለጠውን ንግግር ይረዳሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը ուսումնասիրում է խոսքի ռեստորգի և բարեկեցության դերը բառերի սեգրեգացիայի խնդրի համար: Քանի որ այս երկու գործոնները կարծում են, որ կարևոր դեր են խաղում լեզվի վաղ ձեռք բերման մեջ, մենք նպատակում ենք չափել նրանց ներդրումը այս խնդրի համար: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մի ճապոնական մարմին, որը պարունակում է երեխաների և չափահասների ուղղությամբ խոսակցություն, և կիրառում ենք չորս տարբեր բառերի սեգմետրացիայի մոդելներ, առանց և առանց պրոսոդիկ սահմանների գիտելիքի: The results showed that the difference between registers is smaller than previously reported and that prosodic boundary information helps more adult- than infant-directed speech.', 'az': 'Bu təhsil sözlərin səhifələrinin və sözlərin səhifələrinin rolünü keşfetir. Bu iki faktör ilk dil alınmasında möhüm rol oynamaq üçün düşünüldüyünüzdən sonra, biz onların bu işin qismətini hesablamaq istəyirik. Biz həm uşaq, həm də yetişkin sözləri olan Japonca korpusu öyrənirik, həm də dörd fərqli söz segmentasyon modellərini prosodik sınırları bilmədiyimiz halda istifadə edirik. Sonuçlar belə göstərdi ki, registerlərin arasındakı fərqli əvvəlcə bildirilmədiyindən kiçik və prosodik sınır məlumatlarının çox yetişkinlərə kömək edir.', 'bs': 'Ova studija istražuje ulogu registra govora i prosodije za zadatak segmentacije riječi. Pošto se smatra da su ova dva faktora imala važnu ulogu u prikupljanju jezika ranije, mi ciljamo kvantificirati njihov doprinos za ovaj zadatak. Proučavamo japanski korpus koji sadrži govor na djetinjskoj i odrasloj strani i primjenjujemo četiri različite modele segmentacije riječi, sa i bez znanja o prosodijskim granicama. Rezultati su pokazali da je razlika između registrija manja od ranije prijavljene i da prosodična granična informacija pomaže odraslijoj - nego govor na djetinjstvu.', 'bn': 'This study explores the role of speech register and prosody for the task of word segmentation.  যেহেতু এই দুই কারখানা প্রাথমিক ভাষায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা খেলার চেষ্টা করছে, আমরা এই কাজের জন্য তাদের অবদান পরিমাণ কর আমরা একটি জাপানী কোর্পাস গবেষণা করছি যার মধ্যে শিশু এবং প্রাপ্তবয়স্ক ভাষণ রয়েছে এবং আমরা চারটি বিভিন্ন শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পূর্ববর্তী প্রতিবেদনের চেয়ে নিবন্ধনের মধ্যে পার্থক্য কম এবং প্রোসোডিক সীমানার তথ্য বেশী প্রাপ্তবয়স', 'ca': "Aquest estudi explora el paper del registre de la paraula i la prosòdia de la tasca de la segmentació de paraules. Com que aquests dos factors juguen un paper important en l'adquisició precoce de llenguatges, volem quantificar la seva contribució a aquesta tasca. Estudem un cos japonès que conté un discurs dirigit a nens i adults i aplicam quatre models de segmentació de paraules diferents, amb i sense coneixement de límits prosòdics. Els resultats van demostrar que la diferència entre registres és més petita que la anterior i que la informació de fronteres prosòdics ajuda a parlar més adults que infants.", 'et': 'Käesolev uuring uurib kõneregistri ja prosoodia rolli sõna segmenteerimise ülesandes. Kuna need kaks tegurit mängivad olulist rolli varases keele omandamises, püüame kvantifitseerida nende panust sellesse ülesandesse. Uurime jaapani korpust, mis sisaldab nii imiku- kui täiskasvanute suunatud kõnet, ning rakendame nelja erinevat sõnasegmenteerimismudelit, teadmistega prosoodilistest piiridest ja ilma. Tulemused näitasid, et erinevus registrite vahel on väiksem kui varem kirjeldatud ja et prosoodiline piiriinfo aitab rohkem täiskasvanute kui imikute suunatud kõnet.', 'cs': 'Tato studie zkoumá roli rejstříku řeči a prozodii pro úlohu segmentace slov. Vzhledem k tomu, že tyto dva faktory hrají důležitou roli v raném osvojování jazyka, se snažíme kvantifikovat jejich přínos k tomuto úkolu. Studujeme japonský korpus obsahující řeč pro děti i dospělé a aplikujeme čtyři různé modely segmentace slov, s a bez znalosti prozodických hranic. Výsledky ukázaly, že rozdíl mezi registry je menší než dříve hlášený a že informace o prozodických hranicích pomáhají více dospělým než kojeneckým řeči.', 'ko': '본 연구는 어역과 운율이 분사 임무에서의 작용을 탐구하였다.이 두 가지 요소가 초기 언어 습득에서 중요한 역할을 한다고 여겨졌기 때문에, 우리는 이 임무에 기여한 바를 계량화하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.우리는 아기와 성인의 정향 음성을 포함하는 일본어 어료 라이브러리를 연구했고 네 가지 서로 다른 분사 모델을 응용했다. 운율 경계가 있는 지식과 운율 경계가 없는 지식이다.그 결과 어역 간의 차이는 이전에 보도된 것보다 작고 운율 경계 정보는 아기의 정향 음성보다 성인에게 더 도움이 된다.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa tutkitaan puherekisterin ja prosodian roolia sanan segmentoinnissa. Koska näiden kahden tekijän uskotaan olevan tärkeä rooli varhaisessa kielenkäytössä, pyrimme kvantifioimaan niiden osuutta tähän tehtävään. Tutkimme japanilaista korpusta, joka sisältää sekä vauva- että aikuisohjattua puhetta ja sovellamme neljää eri sanasegmentointimallia prosodisten rajojen tuntemuksella ja ilman sitä. Tulokset osoittivat, että rekistereiden välinen ero on aiemmin raportoitua pienempi ja prosodinen rajatieto auttaa enemmän aikuisten kuin vauvan ohjaamaa puhetta.', 'jv': 'Workspace 1 Dino sampeyan iki bakal sing luwih nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe alih luwih apik, awak dhéwé njaluk kanggo kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan Jepang- lan alam-alam kuwi padha nganggo perusahaan langkung sampek, dadi ngono kejahatan kanggo ngerasakno Rejalingan wong-wong kuwi cah kleng-cah sabanjur gampang ning registr sing mungkin karo diulimu winih sing gak bakal terus nggawe wih-wih sabanjure kelas terakhir.', 'ha': "Wannan lõkaci na gane rolin rajistare magana da mazaɓa wa aikin sungo. Tana da waɗannan fakta biyu aka yi zato suna wani rabo mai muhimu a gaba ga rabon farko, za'a ƙayyade iyakar su zuwa wannan aikin. Tuna karatun wani nauyi na japane wanda yana da dukkan magana masu shiryarwa da tsohon, kuma tuna shirya misãlai huɗu masu kalma daban-daban, da kuma bã da sani ga tarakin na zato. Mataimakin ta nuna cewa gaɓallin takardar ta zama mafi ƙaranci daga abin da ya riga aka faɗa kuma, ma'anar zartar da tsarin na mutane yana ƙaranci da mazan-da aka shiryar da shi.", 'sk': 'Raziskava raziskuje vlogo govornega registra in prosodije pri nalogi segmentacije besed. Ker menimo, da imata ta dva dejavnika pomembno vlogo pri zgodnjem pridobivanju jezika, želimo kvantificirati njun prispevek k tej nalogi. Proučujemo japonski korpus, ki vsebuje govor, usmerjen v dojenčke in odrasle, in uporabljamo štiri različne modele segmentacije besed, z in brez poznavanja prosodičnih mej. Rezultati so pokazali, da je razlika med registri manjša od predhodno poročanih in da prosodične mejne informacije pomagajo več govora odraslih kot dojenčkov.', 'he': 'מחקר זה חוקר את התפקיד של רשום הנאום והפרוסודיה למשימה של סגמנציה מילים. Since these two factors are thought to play an important role in early language acquisition, we aim to quantify their contribution for this task.  אנחנו לומדים גוף יפני שמכיל גם נאום בין תינוקות וגם מבוגרים, ואנחנו משתמשים בארבעה דוגמנים של סגרת מילים שונים, עם ובלי ידע של גבולות פרוסודיים. התוצאות הראו שההבדל בין רשומות קטן ממה שדווח קודם, ושמידע הגבול פרוסודי עוזר לנאום מבוגר יותר מאשר הנאום של תינוקות.', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གཏམ་གླེང་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ཐུམ་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་རྩིས་བརྟན་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་ཡོད། ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྔ་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྩོལ་ནུས་གལ་ཆེན་ཞིག་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ལས། ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདི་ལ་ We study a Japanese corpus containing both infant- and adult-directed speech and we apply four different word segmentation models, with and without knowledge of prosodic boundaries. གནད་དོན་དག་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་དག་སྔོན་སྙན་ཡོད་པའི་ཟུར་བ་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཆེན་མང་ཙམ་རྟོགས་བྱུང་།'}
{'en': 'A Two-Stage Parsing Method for Text-Level Discourse Analysis', 'ar': 'طريقة اعراب على مرحلتين لتحليل الخطاب على مستوى النص', 'fr': "Une méthode d'analyse en deux étapes pour l'analyse du discours au niveau du texte", 'pt': 'Um método de análise de dois estágios para análise de discurso em nível de texto', 'es': 'Un método de análisis de dos etapas para el análisis del discurso a nivel de texto', 'ja': 'テキストレベルの話題分析のための2段階構文解析法', 'ru': 'Двухэтапный метод анализа для анализа дискурса на текстовом уровне', 'zh': '一文本级语析两端解析法', 'hi': 'पाठ-स्तर के प्रवचन विश्लेषण के लिए एक दो-चरण पार्सिंग विधि', 'ga': 'Modh Parsála Dhá Chéim le hAnailís Dioscúrsa ar Leibhéal Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის დონეზე დისკურსების ანალიზაციისთვის ორ დონეზე გადაწერის მეტი', 'el': 'Μια μέθοδος ανάλυσης δύο σταδίων για ανάλυση συζήτησης σε επίπεδο κειμένου', 'hu': 'Kétlépcsős értelmezési módszer a szövegszintű beszédelemzéshez', 'it': "Un metodo di analisi in due fasi per l'analisi del discorso a livello di testo", 'kk': 'Мәтін- деңгейіндегі дискурстарды анализ үшін екі- түйіндегі талдау әдісі', 'lt': 'Dviejų etapų teksto lygio diskurso analizės analizės analizės metodas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'പദാവലി നില വിശ്വാസത്തിനുള്ള രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് രീതി', 'mt': 'Metodu ta’ Analiżi ta’ Diskors f’Żewġ Stadji', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Текст хэмжээний ярианы шинжилгээний хоёр хэмжээний талбарлах арга', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Dwustopniowa metoda analizy dyskursu na poziomie tekstu', 'ro': 'O metodă de parsare în două etape pentru analiza discursului la nivel text', 'sr': 'Metod za analizu diskusija na razini teksta', 'so': 'A Two-Stage Parsing Method of Text-Level Discourse Analysis', 'si': 'පාළ- තත්වයට පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්ටේජ් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණ විධානය', 'sv': 'En tvåstegs tolkningsmetod för diskursanalys på textnivå', 'ta': 'உரை- மட்டத்தின் விவரங்களுக்கான இரண்டு நிலை பாடல் முறைமை', 'ur': 'Text-Level Discourse Analysis کے لئے دو-Stage Parsing Method', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp phân tích hai giai đoạn cho phân tích nhãn cấp', 'bg': 'Двуетапен метод за анализ на дискурса на ниво текст', 'da': 'En todrins fortolkningsmetode til analyse af diskurser på tekstniveau', 'nl': 'Een tweefasige parsing methode voor discoursanalyse op tekstniveau', 'hr': 'Method za analizu diskusija na razini teksta', 'ko': '텍스트급 문장 분석의 2단계 문법 분석 방법', 'fa': 'یک روش تولید دو مرحله برای تحلیل گفتگوهای سطح متن', 'id': 'Sebuah Metode Penganalis Dua Tahap untuk Analisis Diskus Tingkat Teks', 'de': 'Eine zweistufige Parsing-Methode für die Diskursanalyse auf Textebene', 'tr': 'Metin Seviye Diskusiýasy Analyzasy üçin iki paket analyzma Metini', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Uchunguzi wa Kiwango cha Habari', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një metodë analizimi dy fazash për analizën e diskursit në nivel teksti', 'am': 'የተለመደው ዕይታ አስቀምጥ', 'bn': 'টেক্সট- স্তর বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি দুই স্টেগ পার্সিং পদ্ধতি', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Metin s톛viyy톛si Diskusiya Analizi 칲칞칲n 캻ki s톛viyy톛 Analizi metodu', 'bs': 'Metod za analizu diskusija na razini teksta', 'ca': "Un mètode d'analís de discurs en dos etapes per a nivell de text", 'cs': 'Dvoufázová metoda analýzy diskursu na textové úrovni', 'et': 'Tekstitaseme diskursianalüüsi kaheastmeline parsimismeetod', 'fi': 'Kaksivaiheinen jäsennysmenetelmä tekstitason diskurssianalyysiin', 'jv': 'Ndoleh Two-Stage Parasing Method kanggo Kemerdekaan structural navigation', 'he': 'שיטת מעבדה בשתי שלבים לניתוח דיסקורס ברמה טקסט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Dvostopenjska metoda razčlenjanja za analizo diskurza na ravni besedila', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་གནས་རིམ་གྱི་བསམ་བཤེར་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལེན་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་པ'}
{'en': 'Previous work introduced transition-based algorithms to form a unified architecture of parsing rhetorical structures (including span, nuclearity and relation), but did not achieve satisfactory performance. In this paper, we propose that transition-based model is more appropriate for parsing the naked discourse tree (i.e., identifying span and nuclearity) due to data sparsity. At the same time, we argue that relation labeling can benefit from naked tree structure and should be treated elaborately with consideration of three kinds of relations including within-sentence, across-sentence and across-paragraph relations. Thus, we design a pipelined two-stage parsing method for generating an RST tree from text. Experimental results show that our method achieves state-of-the-art performance, especially on span and nuclearity identification.', 'ar': 'قدم العمل السابق خوارزميات قائمة على التحول لتشكيل بنية موحدة لتحليل الهياكل البلاغية (بما في ذلك الامتداد والنووية والعلاقة) ، لكنها لم تحقق أداءً مرضيًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح أن النموذج القائم على الانتقال هو أكثر ملاءمة لتحليل شجرة الخطاب العاري (أي تحديد الامتداد والنووية) بسبب تباين البيانات. في الوقت نفسه ، نجادل بأن وضع العلامات على العلاقات يمكن أن يستفيد من هيكل الشجرة المجردة ويجب التعامل معه بشكل متقن مع مراعاة ثلاثة أنواع من العلاقات بما في ذلك العلاقات داخل الجملة وعبر الجملة وعبر الفقرة. وبالتالي ، فإننا نصمم طريقة تحليل على مرحلتين موصلة بالأنابيب لتوليد شجرة RST من النص. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تحقق أداءً متطورًا ، لا سيما في تحديد الامتداد والنووية.', 'fr': "Des travaux antérieurs ont introduit des algorithmes basés sur la transition pour former une architecture unifiée d'analyse des structures rhétoriques (y compris la portée, la nucléarité et la relation), mais n'ont pas obtenu de performances satisfaisantes. Dans cet article, nous proposons que le modèle basé sur la transition est plus approprié pour analyser l'arbre du discours nu (c'est-à-dire identifier la portée et la nucléarité) en raison de la rareté des données. Dans le même temps, nous soutenons que l'étiquetage des relations peut bénéficier de la structure arborescente nue et devrait être traité de manière approfondie en tenant compte de trois types de relations, y compris les relations à l'intérieur d'une phrase, entre phrases et entre paragraphes. Ainsi, nous concevons une méthode d'analyse en pipeline en deux étapes pour générer un arbre RST à partir de texte. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode atteint des performances de pointe, en particulier en matière d'identification de portée et de nucléarité.", 'es': 'Trabajos anteriores introdujeron algoritmos basados en la transición para formar una arquitectura unificada de análisis de estructuras retóricas (incluyendo span, nuclearidad y relación), pero no lograron un rendimiento satisfactorio. En este artículo, proponemos que el modelo basado en la transición es más apropiado para analizar el árbol del discurso desnudo (es decir, identificar el alcance y la nuclearidad) debido a la escasez de datos. Al mismo tiempo, argumentamos que el etiquetado de relaciones puede beneficiarse de la estructura de árbol desnudo y debe tratarse de manera elaborada teniendo en cuenta tres tipos de relaciones, incluidas las relaciones dentro de una oración, entre oraciones y entre párrafos. Por lo tanto, diseñamos un método de análisis de dos etapas canalizado para generar un árbol RST a partir del texto. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método logra un rendimiento de vanguardia, especialmente en la identificación de span y nuclearidad.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos anteriores introduziram algoritmos baseados em transição para formar uma arquitetura unificada de análise de estruturas retóricas (incluindo amplitude, nuclearidade e relação), mas não obtiveram desempenho satisfatório. Neste artigo, propomos que o modelo baseado em transição é mais apropriado para analisar a árvore do discurso nu (ou seja, identificar span e nuclearidade) devido à esparsidade de dados. Ao mesmo tempo, argumentamos que a rotulagem de relação pode se beneficiar da estrutura de árvore nua e deve ser tratada de forma elaborada com a consideração de três tipos de relações, incluindo relações dentro da frase, entre frases e entre parágrafos. Assim, projetamos um método de análise de dois estágios em pipeline para gerar uma árvore RST a partir de texto. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método atinge desempenho de última geração, especialmente na identificação de span e nuclearidade.', 'ja': '以前の研究では、遷移ベースのアルゴリズムを導入して、修辞構造（スパン、核、関係を含む）の構文解析の統一アーキテクチャを形成したが、満足のいくパフォーマンスは得られなかった。この論文では、遷移ベースのモデルは、データの乏しさのために、裸の議論ツリーを解析する（すなわち、スパンと核性を識別する）ためにより適切であると提案した。同時に、関係ラベリングは裸の木構造から恩恵を受けることができ、文章内、文章間、パラグラフ間の関係を含む3種類の関係を考慮して詳細に扱うべきであると主張する。したがって、テキストからRSTツリーを生成するためのパイプライン化された2段階の解析方法を設計します。実験結果は、当社の方法が、特にSPANと核性の同定において、最先端の性能を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '前事引入转算,以成解析修辞构(包跨度,核性与)同架构,而未能满意也。 于本文,发于转换之体解析宜于疏性之裸话语树(即识跨度核性)。 同时,我们认为关系标签可以从裸树结构中受益,并且应该仔细三种关系,包括句子内,句间和段落间关系。 故设一流水线式两段解析法,以生 RST 树。 实验结果表明者,跨度核度鉴定有先进之性也。', 'hi': 'पिछले काम ने संक्रमण-आधारित एल्गोरिदम को पार्सिंग बयानबाजी संरचनाओं (अवधि, परमाणुता और संबंध सहित) की एक एकीकृत वास्तुकला बनाने के लिए पेश किया, लेकिन संतोषजनक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त नहीं किया। इस पेपर में, हम प्रस्ताव करते हैं कि संक्रमण-आधारित मॉडल डेटा स्पर्सिटी के कारण नग्न प्रवचन पेड़ (यानी, अवधि और परमाणुता की पहचान) को पार्स करने के लिए अधिक उपयुक्त है। उसी समय, हम तर्क देते हैं कि संबंध लेबलिंग नग्न पेड़ की संरचना से लाभान्वित हो सकती है और तीन प्रकार के संबंधों पर विचार करने के साथ विस्तृत रूप से व्यवहार किया जाना चाहिए, जिसमें वाक्य के भीतर, वाक्य के पार और पार-पैराग्राफ संबंध शामिल हैं। इस प्रकार, हम पाठ से एक RST पेड़ उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक पाइपलाइन दो-चरण पार्सिंग विधि डिजाइन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है, विशेष रूप से अवधि और परमाणुता की पहचान पर।', 'ru': 'Предыдущая работа вводила переходные алгоритмы для формирования единой архитектуры синтаксического анализа риторических структур (включая диапазон, ядерность и отношение), но не достигла удовлетворительной производительности. В этой статье мы предлагаем, чтобы модель, основанная на переходе, была более подходящей для синтаксического анализа открытого дерева дискурса (т. е. определения диапазона и ядерной активности) из-за ограниченности данных. В то же время мы утверждаем, что маркировка отношений может извлекать выгоду из структуры голого дерева и должна рассматриваться тщательно с учетом трех видов отношений, включая отношения внутри предложения, между предложениями и между пунктами. Таким образом, мы разрабатываем конвейерный двухэтапный метод синтаксического анализа для генерации RST-дерева из текста. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод достигает самых современных показателей, особенно в отношении определения размаха и ядерной энергии.', 'ga': 'Thug obair roimhe seo isteach algartaim tras-bhunaithe chun ailtireacht aontaithe de pharsáil struchtúir reitriciúil a chruthú (lena n-áirítear réise, núicléach agus gaol), ach níor bhain sé amach feidhmíocht shásúil. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid go mbeadh múnla atá bunaithe ar an trasdul níos oiriúnaí chun an crann dioscúrsa nocht a pharsáil (i.e., réise sainaitheanta agus núicléachas) mar gheall ar ghanntanas sonraí. Ag an am céanna, áitímid gur féidir le lipéadú caidrimh leas a bhaint as struchtúr crann nocht agus gur cheart déileáil leis go mion agus trí chineál caidrimh lena n-áirítear caidreamh laistigh de phianbhreith, caidreamh tras-phianbhreithe agus trasna-alt. Mar sin, dearaimid modh parsála dhá chéim píblíne chun crann RST a ghiniúint ó théacs. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár modh feidhmíocht úrscothach amach, go háirithe maidir le sainaithint réise agus núicléach.', 'hu': 'A korábbi munkák átmeneti alapú algoritmusokat vezettek be a retorikai struktúrák elemzésének egységes architektúrájához (beleértve a spant, a nuklearitás és a kapcsolatot), de nem értek el kielégítő teljesítményt. Jelen tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy az adatok ritkasága miatt az átmeneti alapú modell megfelelőbb a meztelen diskurzusfa elemzésére (azaz a span és a nuklearitás azonosítására). Ugyanakkor azzal érvelünk, hogy a kapcsolatok címkézése előnyös lehet a meztelen fa szerkezetéből, és alaposan kell kezelni három fajta kapcsolatot, beleértve a mondaton belüli, a mondaton keresztüli és a bekezdések közötti kapcsolatokat. Ezért egy csővezetékes kétlépcsős elemzési módszert tervezünk egy RST fa szövegből történő generálására. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk korszerű teljesítményt ér el, különösen a span és a nukleáris azonosítás terén.', 'el': 'Οι προηγούμενες εργασίες εισήγαγαν αλγόριθμους που βασίζονται στη μετάβαση για να διαμορφώσουν μια ενοποιημένη αρχιτεκτονική ανάλυσης ρητορικών δομών (συμπεριλαμβανομένης της έκτασης, της πυρηνικής και της σχέσης), αλλά δεν πέτυχαν ικανοποιητική απόδοση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ότι το μοντέλο που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση είναι καταλληλότερο για την ανάλυση του γυμνού δέντρου λόγου (δηλ. τον προσδιορισμό της έκτασης και της πυρηνικότητας) λόγω της σπανιότητας δεδομένων. Ταυτόχρονα, υποστηρίζουμε ότι η σήμανση σχέσεων μπορεί να ωφεληθεί από τη δομή γυμνού δέντρου και θα πρέπει να αντιμετωπιστεί λεπτομερώς λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τρία είδη σχέσεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των σχέσεων εντός της πρότασης, πέρα από τις προτάσεις και πέρα από τις παραγράφους. Έτσι, σχεδιάζουμε μια μέθοδο ανάλυσης δύο σταδίων για τη δημιουργία ενός δέντρου από κείμενο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ειδικά στον προσδιορισμό της έκτασης και της πυρηνικότητας.', 'ka': 'პირველი სამუშაო გადავიყენეთ გადაწყენების ალგორიტიმები, რომელიც რეტორიკალური სტრუქტურების გადაწყენების ერთადერთი არქტიქტურის შექმნა (მაგრამ განზომილება, ნუკლიერობა და შესახე ამ დოკუპში ჩვენ გვეძლოთ, რომ გადაწყვეტილების მოდელი უფრო სწორედ იყოს გადაწყვეტილებისთვის საკუთარი დოკუპური ხე (მაგალითად, განსაზღვრება სენ და ნუკუპერიცია) მონაცემების ერთადერთი დროში, ჩვენ აღწერეთ, რომ პრობლემები შეიძლება გამოიყენება სახელის სტრუქტურიდან და უნდა იყოს სამი ტიპი პრობლემების შესახებ, რომლებიც სახელის შესახებ, სახელის შესახებ ამიტომ, ჩვენ ტექსტიდან RST ხე წარმოქმებას გადავიქმნათ ორ ფაეჯის პანსტირების მეტი. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქთწრ მვრჲე ეჲჟრигნაგა ოპვეჟრაგვნთვრჲ ნა თჱკლძფთრვლნჲჟრ, ჲჟჲბვნჲ ნა ჟოანრან თ ნსკლთპთ', 'it': "Il lavoro precedente ha introdotto algoritmi basati sulla transizione per formare un'architettura unificata di analisi delle strutture retoriche (tra cui span, nuclearità e relazione), ma non ha raggiunto prestazioni soddisfacenti. In questo articolo, proponiamo che il modello basato sulla transizione sia più appropriato per analizzare l'albero del discorso nudo (cioè, identificare span e nuclearity) a causa della scarsità dei dati. Allo stesso tempo, sosteniamo che l'etichettatura delle relazioni può beneficiare della struttura ad albero nudo e dovrebbe essere trattata elaboratamente tenendo conto di tre tipi di relazioni tra cui relazioni interne, interfrase e interparagrafo. Pertanto, progettiamo un metodo di analisi pipelined a due stadi per generare un albero RST dal testo. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro metodo raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia, soprattutto per quanto riguarda l'identificazione di span e nuclearity.", 'kk': 'Алдыңғы жұмыс реторикалық құрылғыларды талдау үшін біріктірілген архитектураларды (көлемі, нюклитеттік және қатынасы) бастады, бірақ әсер етпейді. Бұл қағазда, ауыстыру негіздеген үлгі деректердің көлемі сияқтығынан (т.е. ауыстыру мен нюклитеттерді анықтау) дискурстардың ағашын талдау үшін қолданылады. Бірақ біз қатынас жарлығы жазылған ағаш құрылымынан пайда болады деп айтып тұрамыз. Бұл үш түрлі қатынастарды сұрақтар, сөйлемелер және бөлшектердің қатынастарына қатынасыз келеді. Сонымен біз RST ағашын мәтіннен құру үшін екі этап талдау әдісін құрамыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің әдіміміздің күй-жайы әрекеттерімізді жеткізеді, өзгертілік және ядролық идентификациясында.', 'lt': 'Ankstesniame darbe buvo įvesti pereinamojo laikotarpio algoritmai, kuriais siekiama sukurti vieningą retorinių struktūrų analizavimo struktūrą (įskaitant apimtį, branduolinį poveikį ir santykius), tačiau nepasiekta patenkinamų rezultatų. Šiame dokumente siūlome, kad pereinamuoju laikotarpiu grindžiamas model is būtų tinkamesnis nagam diskurso medžiui (t. y. nustatant intervalą ir branduolinį savybę) analizuoti dėl duomenų trūkumo. Kartu teigiame, kad santykių ženklinimas gali būti naudingas nuogių medžių struktūra ir turėtų būti išsamiai vertinamas atsižvelgiant į trijų rūšių santykius, įskaitant santykius tarp sakinių, įvairių sakinių ir įvairių dalių. Taigi mes sukuriame dviejų etapų analizavimo metodą RST medžiui gaminti iš teksto. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus, ypač nustatant sklypą ir branduolinius veiksnius.', 'mk': 'Претходната работа воведе алгоритми базирани на транзиција со цел да формира унифицирана архитектура на анализирање на реторичките структури (вклучително и растојание, нуклеарност и односи), но не постигна задоволни резултати. Во овој документ, предложуваме моделот базиран на транзиција да биде посоодветен за анализирање на голото дрво на дискурсот (т.е., идентификација на растојание и нуклеарност) поради скратноста на податоци. Истовремено, тврдиме дека означувањето на односите може да има корист од голата структура на дрво и треба да се третира лабораторно со разгледување на три видови односи, вклучувајќи односи меѓу речениците, меѓуречениците и меѓупараграфските односи. Затоа дизајнираме двофазивен метод за анализирање за генерирање на РСТ дрво од текст. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод постигнува најдобра резултат, особено во врска со идентификацијата на растојание и нуклеарност.', 'ms': 'Pekerjaan terdahulu memperkenalkan algoritma berdasarkan transisi untuk membentuk arkitektur bersatu penghuraian struktur retorik (termasuk jangkauan, nukleariti dan hubungan), tetapi tidak mencapai prestasi yang menyenangkan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyarankan bahawa model berasaskan-transisi lebih sesuai untuk menghurai pokok diskors telanjang (iaitu, mengidentifikasi jangka dan nukleariti) disebabkan kecerahan data. Pada masa yang sama, kita menyangka bahawa label hubungan boleh bermanfaat dari struktur pokok telanjang dan perlu dilakukan secara teliti dengan mempertimbangkan tiga jenis hubungan termasuk dalam kalimat, melalui kalimat dan melalui paragraf hubungan. Oleh itu, kami merancang kaedah penghuraian dua tahap pipelined untuk menghasilkan pokok RST dari teks. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art, terutama pada pengenalan jangka dan nukleariti.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയിടത്തെ ക്രാന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനം പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഹെറ്റോറിക്കല്\u200d സ്ഥാപ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, മാറ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡല്\u200d നഗ്നസംസാര വൃക്ഷത്തെ പാര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് ഏറ്റവും പ്രയോജനമാണെന് അതേ സമയത്ത്, നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നത് നഗ്നനായ മരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോജനമുണ്ടെന്നും, വിശദീകരണവും,  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് പാര്\u200dസിങ് രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒരു RST വൃക്ഷത്തെ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു പൈപ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാപ്തികമാക്കു', 'mt': 'Ix-xogħol preċedenti introduċa algoritmi bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni biex jiffurmaw arkitettura unifikata tal-analiżi tal-istrutturi retoriċi (inklużi l-firxa, in-nuklearità u r-relazzjoni), iżda ma kisbux prestazzjoni sodisfaċenti. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu li mudell ibbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni huwa aktar xieraq għall-analiżi tas-siġra tad-diskors nuda (jiġifieri, l-identifikazzjoni tal-firxa u n-nuklearità) minħabba l-iskarsezza tad-dejta. Fl-istess ħin, nagħmlu l-argument li t-tikkettar tar-relazzjonijiet jista’ jibbenefika mill-istruttura tas-siġar nudi u għandu jiġi ttrattat b’mod elaborat b’kunsiderazzjoni ta’ tliet tipi ta’ relazzjonijiet inklużi fi ħdan is-sentenza, bejn is-sentenzi u bejn il-paragrafi. Għalhekk, a ħna niddisinjaw metodu ta’ analiżi f’żewġ fażijiet ippubblikat għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ siġar RST mit-test. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata, speċjalment fuq l-identifikazzjoni tal-firxa u n-nuklearità.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх ажлын тухай шилжилт дээр суурилсан алгоритмыг нэгтгэл роторикийн бүтэц (өргөн, цөмийн, харилцаа) хуваалцах архитектур бүтээсэн. Гэхдээ хангалттай үйл ажиллагаа гаргадаггүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрчлөлт дээр суурилсан загвар өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолтын шалтгааныг тодорхойлох боломжтой болно. Гэвч бид холбоотой тэмдэглэгдэх нь модны бүтээгдэхүүнээс ашиг ашигтай гэдгийг хэлж байна. Гэвч тэмдэглэгдэхэд 3 төрлийн холбоотой байх хэрэгтэй. Тиймээс бид RST модыг текстээс гаргах хоолойн хоёр дахь талаар хуваалцах арга загвар бүтээж байна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна. Ялангуяа хэмжээст болон цөмийн тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тулд.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie prace wprowadziły algorytmy oparte na przejściu, aby tworzyć ujednoliconą architekturę parsowania struktur retorycznych (w tym span, nuklearność i relacja), ale nie osiągnęły satysfakcjonującej wydajności. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy, że model oparty na przejściu jest bardziej odpowiedni do analizy nagiego drzewa dyskursu (tj. identyfikacji rozpiętości i nuklearności) ze względu na niewielką ilość danych. Jednocześnie argumentujemy, że etykietowanie relacji może korzystać z nagiej struktury drzewa i powinno być traktowane szczegółowo z uwzględnieniem trzech rodzajów relacji, w tym relacji wewnątrz zdań, między zdaniami i między akapitami. W ten sposób projektujemy dwustopniową metodę parsowania do generowania drzewa RST z tekstu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność, zwłaszcza w zakresie identyfikacji rozpiętości i nuklearności.', 'no': 'Førre arbeid innførte overgangsbaserte algoritme for å laga ein vienot arkitektur av tolking av retoriske strukturar (inkludert span, nukliritet og relasjon), men oppnådd ikkje tilfredsstillende utvikling. I denne papiret foreslår vi at overgangsbasert modell er meir korrekt for å tolka den nokte diskurstråden (t.d. identifisera breidde og nukleritet) på grunn av datasparsiteten. I samtidig argumenterer vi at relasjonsmerkelappen kan nytte frå nåkte tre-strukturen og bør behandleast med forståelse av tre typar relasjonar som inkluderer inne setningar, gjennom setningar og gjennom avsnittet. Dette er altså ein metode for å laga ein RST-treet frå tekst i to staden. Eksperimentale resultater viser at metoden vårt når det gjer kunstendige utviklinga, spesielt på spesielt og nuklinisk identifikasjon.', 'ro': 'Lucrările anterioare au introdus algoritmi bazați pe tranziție pentru a forma o arhitectură unificată de analizare a structurilor retorice (inclusiv span, nuclearitate și relație), dar nu au obținut performanțe satisfăcătoare. În această lucrare, propunem ca modelul bazat pe tranziție să fie mai potrivit pentru analizarea arborelui discursului gol (adică, identificarea spațiului și nuclearității) datorită spartității datelor. În același timp, susținem că etichetarea relațiilor poate beneficia de structura copacilor dezbrăcați și ar trebui tratată elaborat având în vedere trei tipuri de relații, inclusiv relațiile dintre frază, dincolo de frază și dincolo de paragraf. Astfel, proiectăm o metodă de analizare pipeline în două etape pentru generarea unui arbore RST din text. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră obține performanțe de ultimă generație, în special în ceea ce privește identificarea intervalului și a nuclearității.', 'sr': 'Prethodni rad je uveo algoritme na osnovu prijenosnosti da bi stvorio ujedinjenu arhitekturu razmatranja retoričkih struktura (uključujući razinu, nuklearnost i odnos), ali nije postigao zadovoljavajuću funkciju. U ovom papiru predlažemo da je model koji se temelji na prijenosu odgovarajući za analizu golog diskurskog drveta (tj. identifikaciju razdoblja i nuklearnosti) zbog rezerviteta podataka. U isto vreme, tvrdimo da označavanje odnosa može imati korist od gole strukture drveta i treba se ponašati detaljno s obzirom na tri vrste odnosa uključujući unutar rečenice, preko rečenice i preko paragrafskih odnosa. Dakle, mi dizajniramo metodu za analizu sa cijevima dve faze za stvaranje RST drveta iz teksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postiže stanje umjetnosti, posebno na identifikaciji razdoblja i nuklearnosti.', 'so': 'Shaqo hore wuxuu soo bandhigay algorityo ku saleysan transition si uu u sameeyo dhismo la wada ururiyey dhismaha baaritaanka deegaanka (including span, nuurnimada iyo xiriirka), laakiin ma gaadhin sameynta farsamada raalliga ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa in qaababka lagu soo wareejiyo uu ugu haboon yahay in lagu baaraandeeyo geedka hadalka qaaliga ah (tusaale ahaan cirka iyo nadiifsanaanshaha) sababtoo ah dhaqdhaqaalaha macluumaadka. Isla waqtigaas, waxaynu ka fekernaa in xiriirka la xiriiro ay wax ka faa’iido karto dhismaha geedka qaawan iyo in loo baaraandegayo si si fiican looga fikiro saddex nooc oo xiriir ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah garsooridda gudahooda, xukunka kala duduwan iyo xiriirka saxda ah. Sidaas darteed waxaynu qoraynaa qaab baaritaanka labo marxaladood oo lagu sameeyo geed RST laga sameeyo qoraal. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in qaababkayagu uu helo bandhigyada farshaxanka, khusuusan aqoonsiga dhalashada iyo nuurka.', 'sv': 'Tidigare arbete introducerade övergångsbaserade algoritmer för att bilda en enhetlig arkitektur för tolkning av retoriska strukturer (inklusive span, nuklearitet och relation), men uppnådde inte tillfredsställande prestanda. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att övergångsbaserad modell är lämpligare för att tolka det nakna diskursträdet (dvs identifiera span och nuklearitet) på grund av datasparhet. Samtidigt hävdar vi att relationsmärkning kan gynnas av naken trädstruktur och bör behandlas ingående med hänsyn till tre typer av relationer inklusive inom mening, över mening och över stycke relationer. Därför utformar vi en pipelinerad tvåstegs tolkningsmetod för att generera ett RST träd från text. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod uppnår toppmoderna prestanda, särskilt när det gäller spännvidd och nuklearitetsidentifiering.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய வேலை மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான ஆல்ஜிரிட்டர்களை ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாடுகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு (span, nuclearity and relation) ஆனால் திருப்திய செயலை அட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மாற்றம் அடிப்படையில் மாதிரி மாதிரி தகவல் வெளிப்பாட்டின் காரணத்தினால் இலவச பேச்சு மரத்தை பாசிக்க முடி அதே நேரத்தில், நாம் விவாதம் செய்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் என்றால் தொடர்பு விளக்கம் இலங்கை மரம் அமைப்பிலிருந்து நன்மை செய்ய முடியும் மற்றும் ம எனவே, நாம் உரையில் இருந்து ஒரு RST மரத்தை உருவாக்க ஒரு புள்ளியிடப்பட்ட இரண்டு stage பாடல் முறைமையை வடிவமைக்கிறோம். முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம் முறைமையில் கலை செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையை பெறுகிறது, குறிப்பாக ஸ்பான் மற', 'si': 'මුලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරවර්තනය අධාරිත ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරන්නේ වෙනස් අධ්\u200dයානය වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න වැඩිය හොඳයි (ඉතින්, දත්ත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නි එකම වෙලාවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සම්බන්ධය ලේබිල් එක්ක නියම ගස් සැකසුම් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාව ඉතින්, අපි පායිප්ලින්ඩ් දෙකක් ස්ටේජ් විශ්ලේෂණ විධානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා RST ගස්සක් පාළුව පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, විශේෂයෙ', 'ur': 'پچھلے کام کی تغییر بنیادی الگوریٹم کو معلوم کیا گیا ہے کہ ایک متحدہ معمار بنا سکے جو ریتوریک ساختاروں کے بارے میں (اندازہ، نوکلریت اور ارتباط میں) پھیر لیتی ہے، لیکن یہ کامیابی کامیابی نہیں پہنچ سکتی۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ تغییر کی بنیادی موڈل ڈیٹ پرستی کے باعث ناپختہ گفتگو درخت (یعنی اسپانیٹ اور ناک روشنی کی شناسایی) کے لئے زیادہ مناسب ہے۔ اسی طرح ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ ارتباط لیبلینگ نالے درخت کی ساخت سے فائدہ دے سکتا ہے اور تین طرح کے ارتباط کے مطابق مفصل کرنا چاہیے کہ کلام کے اندر، کلام کے اندر اور مختلف پراگراف کے ارتباط میں شامل ہوں۔ اسی طرح ہم ایک پائیپ لین دو مرحلہ پارسینگ طریقہ طراحی کرتے ہیں ایک RST درخت پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ Experimental results show that our method achieves state-of-the-art performance, especially on span and nuclearity identification.', 'uz': "Oldingi ishni o'zgarish asosida algoritlarni birlashtirish uchun o'zgarishga (span, nuqta va munosabatlarni) yaratish uchun birlashtirilgan narsalarni ishga tushirish mumkin, lekin murakkab bajarmadi. Bu hujjatda, biz o'zgarish asosiy model i maʼlumot yozuvligi sababda o'zgarishga o'xshash so'zlarni ajratish uchun juda qulay bo'ladi. Shunday paytda biz murojaatlik tuzilishini yaxshi ko'ra olamiz va uch daraxt tuzilishidan foydalanishi mumkin va uch turli munosabatlarni o'ylab turishi kerak, bir maxfiy soʻzda, bir necha maxfiy soʻzda va koʻproq parametrlar bilan ajratish kerak. Shunday qilib, biz matndan RST daraxtni yaratish uchun ikki daraja parsing usulini yaratishimiz. Tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning usuli shaxsiy ishlab chiqaradi, hususan span va nuqta shaxsiyatlarida.", 'vi': 'Trước đây, các thuật to án được tạo ra để tạo ra một kiến trúc thống nhất phân tích các cấu trúc tu từ, bao gồm giai cấp, nhân quả và quan hệ, nhưng không đạt được thành quả thỏa đáng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị mô hình dựa trên sự chuyển đổi phù hợp hơn cho việc phân tích cây tính rỗng tuếch (tức là, xác định giai đoạn và nhân tính) do thông tin sơ sài. Đồng thời, chúng tôi tranh luận rằng nhãn kết quan hệ có thể được hưởng lợi từ cấu trúc cây trần trụi và cần được đối xử tích cực với ba loại quan hệ, bao gồm nội dung, các câu nói dài và các đoạn khác nhau. Do đó, chúng tôi thiết kế một phương pháp phân tích đường ống hai giai đoạn để tạo ra một cây RST từ văn bản. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả hiện đại nhất, đặc biệt là khi xác định giai đoạn và nhân quả.', 'hr': 'Prethodni rad uvodio je algoritme na temelju prijenosa kako bi stvorio ujedinjenu arhitekturu razmatranja retoričkih struktura (uključujući razinu, nuklearnost i odnos), ali nije postigao zadovoljavajuću učinku. U ovom papiru predlažemo da je model koji se temelji na prijelazu odgovarajući za analizu golog diskurskog drveta (tj. identifikaciju razdoblja i nuklearnosti) zbog rezerviteta podataka. U isto vrijeme, tvrdimo da označavanje odnosa može koristiti od gole strukture drveta i treba se određeno liječiti s obzirom na tri vrste odnosa uključujući unutar rečenice, prekoračne rečenice i prekoračne odnose. Dakle, dizajniramo metodu za analizu cijevi od dvije faze za stvaranje RST drveta iz teksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postigne stanje umjetnosti, posebno na razdoblju i identifikaciji nuklearnosti.', 'da': 'Tidligere arbejde introducerede overgangsbaserede algoritmer til at danne en samlet arkitektur for tolkning af retoriske strukturer (herunder span, nuklearitet og relation), men opnåede ikke tilfredsstillende ydeevne. I denne artikel foreslår vi, at overgangsbaseret model er mere hensigtsmæssig til at analysere det nøgne diskurstræ (dvs. identificere spænd og nuklearitet) på grund af datasparthed. Samtidig argumenterer vi for, at relationsmærkning kan drage fordel af nøgen træstruktur og bør behandles udførligt med hensyn til tre slags relationer, herunder inden-sætning, tværs-sætning og tværs-afsnit relationer. Således designer vi en pipelined to-trins parsing metode til at generere et RST træ fra tekst. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode opnår state-of-the-art performance, især på span og nuklearitet identifikation.', 'bg': 'Предишна работа въвежда алгоритми, базирани на преход, за да формира единна архитектура на анализиране на реторични структури (включително обхват, ядреност и връзка), но не постига задоволително представяне. В тази статия предлагаме, че моделът, базиран на преход, е по-подходящ за анализиране на голото дискурсно дърво (т.е. идентифициране на обхват и ядреност) поради оскъдността на данните. В същото време ние твърдим, че етикетирането на отношенията може да се възползва от структурата на голото дърво и трябва да се третира подробно, като се вземат предвид три вида отношения, включително вътрешно изречение, междуизречение и междуабзац отношения. По този начин проектираме двустепенен метод за анализ на тръбопроводи за генериране на дърво от текст. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият метод постига най-съвременни резултати, особено при определяне на обхвата и ядреността.', 'nl': 'Eerder werk introduceerde transitie-gebaseerde algoritmes om een uniforme architectuur te vormen van het parsen van retorische structuren (inclusief span, nucleariteit en relatie), maar bereikte geen bevredigende prestaties. In dit artikel stellen we voor dat transitie-gebaseerd model geschikter is voor het parsen van de naakte discoursboom (d.w.z. het identificeren van span en nucleariteit) vanwege de schaarse data. Tegelijkertijd stellen we dat relatielabelschrijving baat kan hebben bij naakte boomstructuur en uitgebreid moet worden behandeld met inachtneming van drie soorten relaties, waaronder binnen-zin, over-zin en over-alinea relaties. Zo ontwerpen we een pipeline tweetraps parsing methode voor het genereren van een RST boom uit tekst. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode state-of-the-art prestaties bereikt, vooral op het gebied van span- en nucleariteitsidentificatie.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan sebelumnya memperkenalkan algoritma berdasarkan transisi untuk membentuk arsitektur yang bersatu untuk menghurai struktur retorik (termasuk span, nuklir dan hubungan), tetapi tidak mencapai prestasi yang memuaskan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyarankan bahwa model berdasarkan transisi lebih sesuai untuk menghurai pohon diskors telanjang (i.e., mengidentifikasi jangka dan nuklir) karena kadar data. Pada saat yang sama, kita berdebat bahwa label hubungan dapat berguna dari struktur pohon telanjang dan harus diperlakukan secara teliti dengan mempertimbangkan tiga jenis hubungan termasuk dalam kalimat, melintasi kalimat dan melintasi-paragraf hubungan. Jadi, kami merancang metode penghuraian dua tahap untuk menghasilkan pohon RST dari teks. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita mencapai prestasi terbaik, terutama pada identifikasi jangka dan nuklir.', 'de': 'Frühere Arbeiten führten transitionsbasierte Algorithmen ein, um eine einheitliche Architektur der Parsing rhetorischer Strukturen (einschließlich Spanne, Nuklearität und Relation) zu bilden, erzielten jedoch keine zufriedenstellende Leistung. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, dass ein transitionsbasiertes Modell besser geeignet ist, den nackten Diskursbaum zu analysieren (d.h. Spannweite und Nuklearität zu identifizieren) aufgrund der Datenschwierigkeit. Gleichzeitig argumentieren wir, dass Beziehungsbeschriftung von nackten Baumstrukturen profitieren kann und unter Berücksichtigung von drei Arten von Beziehungen, einschließlich innerhalb von Sätzen, über Sätze und über Absätze hinweg, ausführlich behandelt werden sollte. Daher entwerfen wir eine pipelined zweistufige Parsing-Methode zur Generierung eines RST-Baums aus Text. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode den neuesten Stand der Technik erreicht, insbesondere bei der Span- und Nuklearitätsidentifikation.', 'fa': 'کارهای قبلی الگوریتم\u200cهای بر اساس تغییر آمیزش را معرفی کردند تا یک معماری متحد از جدا کردن ساختارهای بازیگری (شامل طول، نوکری و ارتباط) را معرفی کند، ولی عملکرد راضی به دست نیاورد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مدل بر اساس تغییرات برای پاره کردن درخت سخنرانی لخت (یعنی شناسایی منطقه و نوکری) به دلیل پاره\u200cای داده\u200cها مناسب\u200cتر است. در همین زمان، بحث می\u200cکنیم که نقاشی ارتباط می\u200cتواند از ساختار درخت لخت سود بگیرد و باید با توجه به سه نوع ارتباط درباره\u200cی ارتباط\u200cهایی که شامل جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی بنابراین، ما یک روش پرسیدن دو مرحله لوله را برای تولید یک درخت RST از متن طراحی می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای ما به انجام وضعیت هنری رسیده است، مخصوصاً در طول و شناسایی نوکری.', 'ko': '이전의 작업은 전환을 바탕으로 하는 알고리즘을 도입하여 통일된 수사 구조 해석 체계(경계, 핵성과 관계 포함)를 형성했지만 만족스러운 성능을 얻지 못했다.본고에서 데이터가 희소하기 때문에 우리는 전환을 바탕으로 하는 모델이 나어편 트리(즉 식별 넓이와 핵도)를 해석하기에 더욱 적합하다고 주장했다.또한 우리는 관계 표시가 나수 구조에서 이익을 얻을 수 있다고 생각하기 때문에 문장 안, 크로스 문장과 크로스 단락의 세 가지 관계를 꼼꼼히 고려해야 한다.그래서 우리는 텍스트에서 RST 트리를 생성하는 데 사용되는 유수선 2단계 해석 방법을 설계했다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 가장 선진적인 성능, 특히 경계와 핵 식별 방면에 이르렀다.', 'sq': 'Previous work introduced transition-based algorithms to form a unified architecture of parsing rhetorical structures (including span, nuclearity and relation), but did not achieve satisfactory performance.  Në këtë letër, propozojmë që model i i bazuar në tranzicion të jetë më i përshtatshëm për analizimin e pemës së diskursit lakuriq (pra, identifikimin e zgjatjes dhe bërthamës) për shkak të pakësisë së të dhënave. Në të njëjtën kohë, argumentojmë se etiketat e marrëdhënieve mund të përfitojnë nga struktura e drurit lakuriq dhe duhet trajtuar në mënyrë të hollësishme me konsideratë e tre llojeve të marrëdhënieve duke përfshirë marrëdhëniet brenda dënimit, ndërmjet fjalëve dhe ndërmjet paragrafeve. Kështu, ne dizajnojmë një metodë analizimi në dy faza për të krijuar një pemë RST nga teksti. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë arrin performancën më të lartë, veçanërisht në identifikimin e gjerësisë dhe nuklearitetit.', 'sw': 'Kazi iliyopita ilizindua mifululizo yenye msingi wa mpito ili kutengeneza muundo wa pamoja wa kujenga miundombinu ya kimapenzi (ikiwa ni pamoja na usafi, usafi na mahusiano), lakini hawakupata ufanisi wa furaha. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuwa muundo wa mpito unaoendelea kuongeza mti wa mazungumzo ya uchi (yaani kutambua utambulisho na usafi) kutokana na upepo wa taarifa. Wakati huo huo, tunahoji kuwa alama ya mahusiano inaweza kunufaika kutoka katika muundo wa mti wa uchi na inapaswa kutengenezwa kwa ufanisi wa namna tatu za mahusiano ikiwa ni pamoja na kifungo cha ndani, hukumu mbalimbali na mahusiano mbalimbali. Kwa hiyo, tunaunda njia ya wimbo wa wimbo wa jukwaa mbili kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mti wa RST kutoka kwenye maandishi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inafanikiwa hali ya utendaji wa sanaa, hasa kwenye utambulisho wa usafi na usafi.', 'tr': 'Öňki işden geçişe tabanly algoritmalar çykarmak üçin bir arhitektura (span, nuclearity we relasiýa) düzenlemek üçin bir birleşik arhitektura girdi. Bu kagyzda, geçi şe tabanly nusga daşary çykyş agajyny (ýalňyş gürrüňlik ýagdaýyny tanyşdyrmak) üçin has gowydygyny teklip edýäris. Şol wagtda, gürrüň etiketlemesi ýaz agaç strukturyndan fayda berip biler we sözleriň içinde, sözleriň we paragrafyň arasynda üç nähili baglaşyklaryň daşyndan daşary bolmaly diýip pikir edýäris. Şonuň üçin biz RST agajyny metinden döretmek üçin pipeline iki staýdan ayırmak yöntemi tasarlýarys. Durmanyň netijeleri biziň ýüregimiz sungatyň durumyny tapyp barýandygyny görkezýär, özellikle çykyş we nuklearnyk tanyýasynda.', 'af': "Vorige werk introduseer oordragsbaseerde algoritme om ֳ¢ֲ€ֲ™n eenvoudige arkitektuur te formeer van verwerking van retoriese strukture (insluitend span, nukleuriteit en verwanting), maar het nie verstandige prestasie bereik nie. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel dat transisie-gebaseerde model meer geskik is vir verwerking van die naak diskursie boom (i.e. identifiseer span en nukleuriteit) vanweֳ« data sparsiteit. Op dieselfde tyd het ons gespreek dat verwanting etiketting kan voordeel van naak boomstruktuur en moet verwantig behandel word met aandag van drie soorte verwantings insluitend binne-seting, oorsoek-seting en oorsoek-paragraaf verwantings. So, ons ontwerp 'n pipelinede twee-stadige verwerking metode vir die genereer van 'n RST boom van teks. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode staat-van-kuns-prestasie bereik, veral op span en nukleuriteit-identifikasie.", 'hy': 'Անցյալ աշխատանքը ներկայացրեց վերափոխման հիմնված ալգորիթմներ, որպեսզի ձևավորվի միավոր ճարտարապետություն վերլուծելու ռետորական կառուցվածքների (ներառյալ տարածությունը, միջուկայությունը և հարաբերությունը), բայց բավարար արդյունք չհաս Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք, որ տեղափոխման հիմնված մոդելը ավելի համապատասխան է մերկ խոսակցության ծառի վերլուծմանը (այսինքն՝ տարածության և միջուկայության հայտնաբերումը) տվյալների հազվադեպության պատճառով: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ հարաբերությունները պիտակում կարող է օգտակար լինել մերկ ծառերի կառուցվածքից և պետք է խրախությամբ վերաբերվեն երեք տեսակի հարաբերություններին, ներառյալ նախադասություններում, նախադասություններում և պարբերակ Այսպիսով, մենք ստեղծում ենք երկու փուլում կատարվող վերլուծության մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք ՌՍԹ ծառ տեքստից: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին, հատկապես տարածության և միջուկայության հայտնաբերման հարցում:', 'am': 'የቀድሞው ስራ በተለየ የፖለቲካ መሠረት (span, nuclearity እና ግንኙነት) ለመፍጠር የተጠቃሚ የአልgorithም አካውንት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ በመተላለፍ የተመሳሳይ ሞዴል ከዳታ ብዛት የተነሣ ነቁራዊ ንግግር ዛፍ (ምናልባት ስፓን እና ንጹሕነት) ለማጋራት የተሻለ ነው ብለን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በዚያው ሰዓት፣ የግንኙነት መፈለግ የራቁቱን ዛፍ አካባቢ እንዲጠቅም እና በሦስት ዓይነት ግንኙነት ውስጥ፣ በፍርድ ውይይት እና በክፍል ተጨማሪ ግንኙነትን እንዲያስፈልግ እናስባለን፡፡ ከጽሑፍ የRST ዛፍ መፍጠር የሁለት ደረጃዎች የፓርቲ ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የ-የ-የ-የ-ዓርት ሥርዓት እንዲያገኝ ነው፤ በተለየ ስፓን እና የነፃነት ግንኙነት እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী কাজ পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক অ্যালগরিদম একটি একত্রিত স্থাপত্য তৈরি করার জন্য প্রস্তুত করেছে, যার মধ্যে স্প্যান, পরিষ্কার এবং সম্পর্ক রয়েছে), কিন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেলের জন্য নগ্ন কথোপকথন গাছ পার্স করার জন্য আরো যথেষ্ট (যেমন ডাটা স্পেন এবং পরিষ্কার একই সাথে আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে সম্পর্ক লেবেলের লেবেল নাগান গাছের কাঠামো থেকে সুবিধা পাবে এবং তিন ধরনের সম্পর্ক বিস্তারিত বিবেচনা করা উচিত, যার মধ তাই আমরা টেক্সট থেকে একটি RST গাছ তৈরি করার জন্য একটি পাইপেলিং দুই মেনে পার্সিং পদ্ধতি ডিজাইন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের কাজ অর্জন করে, বিশেষ করে স্প্যান এবং পরিষ্কার পরিচয়পত্রের', 'bs': 'Prethodni rad je predstavio algoritme na temelju prijenosa za formiranje ujedinjene arhitekture razmatranja retoričkih struktura (uključujući razinu, nuklearnost i odnos), ali nisu postigli zadovoljavajuću funkciju. U ovom papiru predlažemo da je model koji se temelji na prijelazu odgovarajući za analizu golog diskurskog drveta (tj. identifikacija razdoblja i nuklearnosti) zbog rezerviteta podataka. U isto vrijeme, tvrdimo da označavanje odnosa može koristiti od gole strukture drveta i treba se ponašati detaljno s obzirom na tri vrste odnosa uključujući unutar rečenice, preko rečenice i preko paragrafskih odnosa. Dakle, dizajniramo metodu za analizu na cijevima od dvije faze za stvaranje RST drveta iz teksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postigne stanje umjetnosti, posebno na identifikaciji razdoblja i nuklearnosti.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki işin, keçmişdəki hərəkət-tabanlı algoritmalarını təşkil etdi ki, retorik yapılarını ayırmaq üçün birləşdirilmiş bir arhitektir (genişliyi, nukleariti və əlaqələri də dahil olmaqla), amma təşəkkür göstəricisi yetirmədi. Bu kağızda, keçi ş modelinin dağıtım sıxıntısı üzündən çıplaq söhbət ağacını ayırmaq üçün daha uyğun olmasını təklif edirik. Aynı zamanda biz mübahisə edirik ki, bağlantı etiketi çıplaq ağac yapısından fayda verə bilər və sözlərin, cümlələrin və paragraflı ilişkilerin içində olan üç türlü ilişkilerin müəyyən edilməsi lazımdır. Beləliklə, bir RST a ğacını mətndən yaratmaq üçün iki dəfə ayırma metodu təyin edirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçlarımız təcrübə müəyyənləşdirilməsi təqdirdə, xüsusilə səviyyədə və nuklearitə təşkil edilməsini göstərir.', 'ca': "La feina anterior va introduir algoritmes basats en la transició per formar una arquitectura unificada d'analitzar estructures retòriques (incloent l'espai, la nuclearitat i la relació), però no va aconseguir un rendiment satisfactori. En aquest paper, proposem que el model basat en la transició sigui més apropiat per analitzar l'arbre de discurs nu (i.e., identificar l'espai i la nuclearitat) degut a la escassetat de dades. At the same time, we argue that relation labeling can benefit from naked tree structure and should be treated elaborately with consideration of three kinds of relations including within-sentence, across-sentence and across-paragraph relations.  Així que dissenyem un mètode d'analització en dos etapes per generar un arbre RST a partir del text. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode aconsegueix el rendiment més avançat, especialment en l'identificació de l'espai i la nuclearitat.", 'cs': 'Předchozí práce představila algoritmy založené na přechodu k vytvoření jednotné architektury parsování rétorických struktur (včetně rozpětí, nuklearity a vztahu), ale nedosáhla uspokojivého výkonu. V tomto článku navrhujeme, že model založený na přechodu je vhodnější pro analýzu nahého diskurzního stromu (tj. identifikaci rozpětí a nuklearity) z důvodu řídkosti dat. Současně argumentujeme, že značení vztahů může mít prospěch ze struktury nahého stromu a mělo by být zacházeno důkladně s ohledem na tři druhy vztahů, včetně vztahů uvnitř věty, napříč větou a napříč odstavci. Proto navrhujeme dvoustupňovou parsovací metodu pro generování RST stromu z textu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů, zejména při identifikaci rozpětí a nuklearity.', 'fi': 'Aiemmassa työssä esiteltiin siirtymäpohjaisia algoritmeja muodostamaan yhtenäinen arkkitehtuuri retorisista rakenteista (mukaan lukien span, nuklearity ja relation), mutta ei saavutettu tyydyttävää suorituskykyä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että siirtymäpohjainen malli sopii paremmin paljaan diskurssipuun jäsentämiseen (eli spanin ja nukleariteetin tunnistamiseen) datan niukkuuden vuoksi. Samalla väitämme, että suhdemerkinnät voivat hyötyä alastomasta puurakenteesta ja että niitä tulisi käsitellä yksityiskohtaisesti ottaen huomioon kolmenlaiset suhteet, mukaan lukien lauseen sisäiset, lauseen väliset ja kappaleen väliset suhteet. Suunnittelemme putkimaisen kaksivaiheisen jäsennysmenetelmän RST-puun tuottamiseen tekstistä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn erityisesti span- ja nukleariteetin tunnistamisessa.', 'et': 'Varasemad tööd tutvustasid üleminekupõhiseid algoritme, et moodustada ühtne arhitektuur retooriliste struktuuride parsimiseks (sh ulatus, nukleaarsus ja seos), kuid ei saavutanud rahuldavat jõudlust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja, et üleminekupõhine mudel sobib palja diskursuspuu parsimiseks (st ulatuse ja tuumaarsuse tuvastamiseks) andmete hõreduse tõttu. Samal ajal väidame, et seoste märgistamine võib saada kasu alasti puustruktuurist ja seda tuleks käsitleda põhjalikult, arvestades kolme liiki suhteid, sealhulgas lausesisesed, lauseülesed ja lõiguülesed suhted. Seega projekteerime kaheastmelise parsimismeetodi RST puu genereerimiseks tekstist. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod saavutab tipptasemel jõudluse, eriti ulatuse ja tuumaarsuse tuvastamisel.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Nang pemilih iki, kita supoyo nggawe model sing basa dadi wis nggawe nggo ngerasai winih karo perusahaan winih (i.e.g. nambah-nambah karo perusahaan karo perusahaan) Kita sampeyan ngono, kita sawetara meluran kanggo kelas telu nggawe barang ngenggo cara bot lan kudu supoyo karo katêpakan karo perusahaan sugih liyane So, we design a wirelined 2-phase Ngucap', 'ha': "Kayan aikin da ya gabãta ya introduce algoritm-salon transiti dõmin ya ƙiƙiro an daidaita matsakatin parparse masu bakwai (kamar span, nufi da mazaunin), kuma amma ba ya isa aikin mai yarda. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade cẽwa misalin a kan shishi yana mafi daidai wa parse ga itãce na magana nake (misali, idan an gane span i da nufi) kan saba'an na tsarin data. A lokacin da muka yi jãyayya, musamman ma'anar mazaɓa yana iya amfani da shi daga matsayin itãce na nake kuma ana kamata a yi kafa da kafaffiyata kafaffiyata masu nau'i uku-nau'i, dukkan hukumi da kowaci-parade. Kamar haka, Muke ƙayyade wata hanyor yin parsewa ta biyu-daraja don ka samu wata itãce na RSA daga matsayi. Matarin jarrabai yana nũna cewa metodenmu yana sãmun halin-sanar, hasa'a, kan ganin spani da nufi.", 'sk': 'Predhodno delo je uvedlo algoritme, ki temeljijo na prehodu, za oblikovanje enotne arhitekture razčlenjevanja retoričnih struktur (vključno s spanom, nuklearnostjo in relacijo), vendar ni doseglo zadovoljive zmogljivosti. V prispevku predlagamo, da je model, ki temelji na prehodu, bolj primeren za razčlenitev golega diskurznega drevesa (tj. identifikacijo obsega in nuklearnosti) zaradi redkosti podatkov. Hkrati pa trdimo, da lahko označevanje relacij koristi od strukture golega drevesa in bi ga bilo treba obravnavati natančno ob upoštevanju treh vrst relacij, vključno z znotraj stavka, med stavki in med odstavki. Zato smo oblikovali cevovodno dvostopenjsko metodo razčlenjanja za ustvarjanje drevesa RST iz besedila. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti, zlasti pri identifikaciji obsega in nuklearnosti.', 'he': 'העבודה הקודמת הציגה אלגוריתמים מבוססים במעבר כדי ליצור ארכיטקטורה מאוחדת של חקירת מבנים רטוריים (כולל חלל, גרעינית וקשר), אך לא השיגה ביצועים מרוצים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שמודל מבוסס במעבר מתאים יותר לאבחן את עץ הדיור הערום At the same time, we argue that relation labeling can benefit from naked tree structure and should be treated elaborately with consideration of three kinds of relations including within-sentence, across-sentence and across-paragraph relations.  לכן, אנחנו מעצבים שיטת בדיקת שתי שלבים מוצננת כדי ליצור עץ RST מהטקסט. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהשיטה שלנו משיגה ביצועים מצוינים, במיוחד על זיהוי הגרעינית ומרחב.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་འདི་དག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་གཞི་བརྗོད་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་རྩལ་བ་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ནས་ཕར་སྒྲིག་རྩིས་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་གཞུང་གི་མ་དབུགས་འདི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་། དུས་གཅིག་པ་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་འདུག་ ང་ཚོས་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཁང་བ་ཁང་གི་དབུགས་འབྲེལ་གསུམ་ཚོར་བཤད་ནི་ Thus, we design a pipelined two-stage parsing method for generating an RST tree from text. Experimental Results show that our method is to achieve state-of-the-art performance, especially on span and nuclearity identification.'}
{'en': 'Error-repair Dependency Parsing for Ungrammatical Texts', 'ar': 'إصلاح أخطاء التبعية للنصوص غير النحوية', 'es': 'Análisis de dependencias de reparación de errores para textos agramaticales', 'fr': "Analyse des dépendances de réparation d'erreurs pour les textes non grammaticaux", 'pt': 'Análise de dependência de reparo de erro para textos não gramaticais', 'ja': 'エラー-非文法テキストの依存関係解析の修復', 'zh': '误修不合语法文本所恃以解析', 'hi': 'त्रुटि-सुधार निर्भरता Ungrammatical ग्रंथों के लिए पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ зависимостей исправления ошибок для неграмматических текстов', 'ga': 'Earráid-dheisiú Spleáchais Parsáil le haghaidh Téacsanna Neamhghramadaí', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Hibajavítás Függőség-értelmezés nyelvtelen szövegekhez', 'el': 'Ανάλυση εξάρτησης επιδιόρθωσης σφαλμάτων για μη γραμματικά κείμενα', 'it': 'Analisi delle dipendenze per i testi non grammaticali', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық мәтіндердің қатесін түзету тәуелдігін талдау', 'mk': 'Анализирање на зависноста од поправка на грешки за неграматски тексти', 'lt': 'Klaidų ištaisymo priklausomybės analizavimas neagramatiniams tekstams', 'ms': 'Ralat-perbaikan Menghurai Dependensi untuk Teks Tidak Gramatik', 'mt': 'Analiżi tad-Dipendenza tat-Tiswija ta’ Żbalji għal Testi Mhux grammatiċi', 'ml': 'അഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പദാവലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പിശക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ആശ്രയിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Грамматик текстүүдийн алдаа засах хамааралтай талдаа', 'no': 'Feilrettingsavhengighetstolking for unggrammatiske tekst', 'pl': 'Parsowanie zależności od naprawy błędów dla tekstów niegramatycznych', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței pentru texte neregramaticale', 'sr': 'Обрачање зависимости за ремонта грешка за неграмматични текстове', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාම්ටික් නැති පාළුව සඳහා වැරදි විශේෂතාව විශාලනය', 'sv': 'Felreparation Beroendetolkning för Ungematiska texter', 'so': 'Heshiiska qiimaha la’aanta', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடாத உரைகளுக்கான பிழை மீட்டு சார்ந்த சார்பு பாசிடுதல்', 'ur': 'Ungrammatical Texts کے لئے تیراندازی-تعمیر اعتباری پارسینگ', 'uz': 'QRegExp', 'vi': 'Chế độ phụ thuộc lỗi sửa chữa lỗi', 'bg': 'Анализиране на зависимостта при отстраняване на грешки за неграматични текстове', 'hr': 'Očitanje zavisnosti za popravak grešaka za nepgramatične tekste', 'da': 'Fejlreparation afhængighedsfortolkning for umgrammatiske tekster', 'nl': 'Afhankelijkheidsparsing voor ongegrammaticale teksten', 'id': 'Penganalisan Dependensi Perbaikan-Galat untuk Teks Tidak Gramatik', 'ko': '오류 복구 비문법 텍스트 의존항 분석', 'fa': 'تخمین بستگی تعمیر خطا برای متن غیرگرامیک', 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya Uhuru wa Kutegemea', 'de': 'Fehlerkorrektur-Abhängigkeitsparsing für ungrammatische Texte', 'af': 'Fout- herstelling afhanklikheid verwerking vir ongrammatiese teks', 'sq': 'Parzimi i varësisë për tekstet jo grammatike', 'tr': 'Wagtlaýyn faýllary tenzim etmek üçin hata ynamlyky', 'bn': 'অগ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল টেক্সটের জন্য ত্রুটির নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং', 'az': 'Qəta-düzəltmə Bağlamlığı Özgürlüyü Özgürlüyü Özgürlüyü', 'ca': 'Analització de dependencies per a textos no gramàtics', 'am': "ፋይል '%s'ን ለማንበብ ስህተት አለ፦ %s", 'hy': 'Error-repair Dependency Parsing for Ungrammatical Texts', 'et': 'Vigade parandamise sõltuvuse parsimine mittegrammatiliste tekstide puhul', 'bs': 'Očitanje zavisnosti za popravak grešaka za nepgramatične tekste', 'cs': 'Parsování závislosti na opravě chyb pro negramatické texty', 'fi': 'Virheiden korjaus Riippuvuuden parsaus epäkieliopillisille teksteille', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'he': 'מחקר תלויות תקנה שגיאות לטקסטים לא גרמטיים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev odvisnosti od popravila napak za neslovnična besedila', 'bo': 'རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྗེས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ'}
{'en': 'We propose a new dependency parsing scheme which jointly parses a sentence and repairs grammatical errors by extending the non-directional transition-based formalism of Goldberg and Elhadad (2010) with three additional actions : SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Because these actions may cause an infinite loop in derivation, we also introduce simple constraints that ensure the parser termination. We evaluate our model with respect to dependency accuracy and grammaticality improvements for ungrammatical sentences, demonstrating the robustness and applicability of our scheme.', 'ar': 'نقترح مخططًا جديدًا لتحليل التبعية يقوم بتحليل جملة بشكل مشترك وإصلاح الأخطاء النحوية من خلال توسيع الشكلية غير الاتجاهية القائمة على الانتقال في Goldberg و Elhadad (2010) مع ثلاثة إجراءات إضافية: الاستبدال ، الحذف ، الإدراج. نظرًا لأن هذه الإجراءات قد تسبب حلقة لا نهائية في الاشتقاق ، فإننا نقدم أيضًا قيودًا بسيطة تضمن إنهاء المحلل اللغوي. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا فيما يتعلق بدقة التبعية والتحسينات النحوية للجمل غير النحوية ، مما يدل على متانة نظامنا وقابليته للتطبيق.', 'es': 'Proponemos un nuevo esquema de análisis de dependencias que analiza conjuntamente una oración y repara los errores gramaticales ampliando el formalismo basado en la transición no direccional de Goldberg y Elhadad (2010) con tres acciones adicionales: SUSTITUIR, ELIMINAR, INSERTAR. Debido a que estas acciones pueden provocar un bucle infinito en la derivación, también introducimos restricciones simples que garantizan la terminación del analizador. Evaluamos nuestro modelo con respecto a la precisión de la dependencia y las mejoras gramaticales para oraciones agramaticales, lo que demuestra la solidez y aplicabilidad de nuestro esquema.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau schéma d'analyse des dépendances qui analyse conjointement une phrase et répare les erreurs grammaticales en étendant le formalisme basé sur la transition non directionnelle de Goldberg et Elhadad (2010) avec trois actions supplémentaires\xa0: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Comme ces actions peuvent provoquer une boucle infinie de dérivation, nous introduisons également des contraintes simples qui garantissent la fin de l'analyseur. Nous évaluons notre modèle en ce qui concerne la précision des dépendances et les améliorations grammaticales pour les phrases non grammaticales, démontrant ainsi la robustesse et l'applicabilité de notre schéma.", 'pt': 'Propomos um novo esquema de análise de dependência que analisa conjuntamente uma sentença e repara erros gramaticais estendendo o formalismo baseado em transição não direcional de Goldberg e Elhadad (2010) com três ações adicionais: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Como essas ações podem causar um loop infinito na derivação, também introduzimos restrições simples que garantem o término do analisador. Avaliamos nosso modelo com relação à precisão de dependência e melhorias gramaticais para sentenças não gramaticais, demonstrando a robustez e aplicabilidade do nosso esquema.', 'ja': '我々は、GoldbergとElhadad （ 2010 ）の非方向遷移ベースの形式主義を3つの追加のアクションで拡張することによって、文を共に解析し、文法的誤りを修復する新しい依存関係解析スキームを提案します：代入、削除、挿入。これらのアクションは導出に無限ループを引き起こす可能性があるため、構文解析器の終了を保証する単純な制約も導入します。私たちは、非文法的な文章の依存性の精度と文法性の改善に関してモデルを評価し、スキームの堅牢性と適用性を示します。', 'hi': 'हम एक नई निर्भरता पार्सिंग योजना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संयुक्त रूप से एक वाक्य को पार्स करता है और तीन अतिरिक्त कार्यों के साथ गोल्डबर्ग और एल्हादाद (2010) के गैर-दिशात्मक संक्रमण-आधारित औपचारिकता का विस्तार करके व्याकरणिक त्रुटियों की मरम्मत करता है: स्थानापन्न, DELETE, INSERT। क्योंकि ये क्रियाएं व्युत्पत्ति में एक अनंत लूप का कारण बन सकती हैं, इसलिए हम सरल बाधाओं को भी पेश करते हैं जो पार्सर समाप्ति सुनिश्चित करते हैं। हम अव्याकरणिक वाक्यों के लिए निर्भरता सटीकता और व्याकरणिकता सुधारों के संबंध में हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, जो हमारी योजना की मजबूती और प्रयोज्यता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '新赖解析方,广GoldbergElhadad(2010)非向渡形式主义,共解析句而修复语法错误,并有三表:代除插入。 或使生无穷,引入保解析器终。 吾以非语法句之依赖性准确性,与语法性更进质吾形,展吾方之稳健性适用性。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую схему синтаксического анализа зависимостей, которая совместно анализирует предложение и исправляет грамматические ошибки, расширяя ненаправленный формализм на основе перехода Гольдберга и Эльхадада (2010) тремя дополнительными действиями: ПОДСТАВИТЬ, УДАЛИТЬ, ВСТАВИТЬ. Поскольку эти действия могут привести к бесконечному циклу в производной, мы также вводим простые ограничения, которые обеспечивают завершение парсера. Мы оцениваем нашу модель с точки зрения точности зависимостей и улучшения грамматики для неграмматических предложений, демонстрируя надежность и применимость нашей схемы.', 'ga': 'Molaimid scéim nua parsála spleáchais a dhéanann parsáil i gcomhpháirt ar phianbhreith agus a cheartaíonn earráidí gramadaí trí fhoirmiúlacht Goldberg agus Elhadad (2010) atá bunaithe ar thrasdulta neamhthreoracha a leathnú le trí ghníomh breise: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Toisc go bhféadfadh lúb gan teorainn a bheith mar thoradh ar na gníomhartha seo sa díorthú, tugaimid isteach srianta simplí freisin a chinntíonn foirceannadh an pharsálaí. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla maidir le cruinneas spleáchais agus feabhsuithe gramadaí le haghaidh abairtí neamhghramadaí, ag léiriú stóinseacht agus infheidhmeacht ár scéime.', 'hu': 'Egy új függőségi elemzési rendszert javasolunk, amely együttesen értelmez egy mondatot és javítja a nyelvtani hibákat Goldberg és Elhadad (2010) nem irányú átmeneti alapú formalizmusát három további intézkedéssel: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Mivel ezek a műveletek végtelen hurkot okozhatnak a származásban, egyszerű korlátozásokat is bevezetünk, amelyek biztosítják az elemző végződését. Modellünket értékeljük a függőség pontossága és a nyelvtani fejlesztések tekintetében a nem-grammatikai mondatok esetében, bizonyítva rendszerünk robusztusságát és alkalmazhatóságát.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο σχέδιο ανάλυσης εξάρτησης το οποίο από κοινού αναλύει μια πρόταση και διορθώνει γραμματικά λάθη επεκτείνοντας τον μη κατευθυντικό μεταβατικό φορμαλισμό του Γκόλντμπεργκ και του Ελχανδάντ (2010) με τρεις πρόσθετες δράσεις: ΥΠΟΣΤΗΤΙΤΕ, ΑΠΟΔΕΙΞΗ, ΕΝΔΕΙΞΗ. Επειδή αυτές οι ενέργειες μπορεί να προκαλέσουν έναν άπειρο βρόχο παραγώγων, εισάγουμε επίσης απλούς περιορισμούς που εξασφαλίζουν τον τερματισμό του αναλυτή. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας σε σχέση με την ακρίβεια εξάρτησης και τη γραμματικότητα βελτιώσεων για μη γραμματικές προτάσεις, αποδεικνύοντας την αξιοπιστία και τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής του σχήματος μας.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo schema di analisi delle dipendenze che analizza congiuntamente una frase e ripara gli errori grammaticali estendendo il formalismo non direzionale basato sulla transizione di Goldberg e Elhadad (2010) con tre azioni aggiuntive: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Poiché queste azioni possono causare un ciclo infinito nella derivazione, introduciamo anche semplici vincoli che assicurano la terminazione del parser. Valutiamo il nostro modello per quanto riguarda l'accuratezza della dipendenza e i miglioramenti grammaticali per frasi non grammaticali, dimostrando la robustezza e l'applicabilità del nostro schema.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი დამხოლოდ განაცემება სქემა, რომელიც ერთმანეთის განაცემება და განახლება გრამიკალური შეცდომები, რომელიც Goldberg და Elhadad (2010) დამატებული სამი დამატებული მოქმედებით განახლებით, განახლებით, განახლებით, და იმიტომ, რომ ეს მოქმედება შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ უფრო ბრძნელი სიგრძე, ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ უფრო მარტივი ზომილებები, რომელიც გადარწმუნეთ პანს ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ დავაკეთებთ განსაკუთრებულობა და გრამიმატიკულობის უფრო მეტადებაზე, რომელიც ჩვენი სქემის ძალიან ძალიან და აპლექტირებულობას გამოწვებას.', 'kk': 'Біз жаңа тәуелсіздік талдау сұлбасын ұсынамыз. Бұл сұлбаны біріктіріп, грамматикалық қателерді қайталап, Goldberg және Elhadad (2010) үш қосымша әрекеттер бойынша бағытталмаған ауыстыру офимализмін кеңейту үшін қосымша әрекеттерді: SU Себебі бұл әрекеттер түрлендірімізде шегімсіз қылқалауы мүмкін болуы мүмкін, біз де талдау аяқтауын қарапайым шектеулерді таңдаймыз. Біз моделіміздің тәуелдік дұрыстығына және грамматикалық сөйлемелердің жақсартылығына қатынасыз керек, сұлбамыздың дұрыстығын және қолдануға қатынасызды көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują priklausomybės analizavimo sistemą, kuria bendrai analizuojami sakiniai ir ištaisomos gramatinės klaidos, išplečiant Goldbergo ir Elhadado (2010 m.) formalumą ne kryptimi pereinamuoju laikotarpiu trimis papildomais veiksmais: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Kadangi šie veiksmai gali sukelti neribotą ciklą išvestinėse medžiagose, mes taip pat įvedame paprastus apribojimus, kurie užtikrina analizatoriaus nutraukimą. Vertiname savo model į atsižvelgiant į priklausomybės tikslumą ir gramatiškumo gerinimą neagramatinių sakinių atžvilgiu, įrodydami mūsų sistemos patikimumą ir taikymą.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова схема за анализирање на зависноста која заедно анализира реченица и поправи граматички грешки со проширување на ненасокиот формализам базиран на транзиција на Голдберг и Елхадад (2010) со три дополнителни акции: СУБСТИТУТ, ДЕЛЕТ, ИНСЕРТ. Бидејќи овие акции можат да предизвикаат бесконечна врска во деринацијата, ние исто така воведуваме едноставни ограничувања кои обезбедуваат прекинување на анализаторот. Го проценуваме нашиот модел во однос на прецизноста на зависноста и подобрувањето на граматичноста на неграматичните реченици, покажувајќи ја силноста и апликабилноста на нашата шема.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan skema penghuraian dependensi baru yang secara bersama menghurai kalimat dan memperbaiki ralat grammatik dengan memperluas formalisme bukan-arah berasaskan transisi Goldberg dan Elhadad (2010) dengan tiga tindakan tambahan: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Kerana tindakan ini boleh menyebabkan gelung tak terbatas dalam penghasilan, kita juga memperkenalkan kegunaan sederhana yang memastikan penghurai tamat. Kami menilai model kami dengan kaitan dengan ketepatan dependensi dan peningkatan grammatikal untuk kalimat ungrammatik, menunjukkan kekuatan dan kemudahan skema kami.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പദ്ധതി പാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രായോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു വാക്ക് പാര്\u200dക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഗോള്\u200dഡ്ബെര്\u200dഗിന്\u200dറെയും എല്\u200dഹാദിന്\u200dറെയും നേര്\u200dച്ചയില് Because these actions may cause an infinite loop in derivation, we also introduce simple constraints that ensure the parser termination.  ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതും ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നമ്മുടെ പദ', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu skema ġdida ta' analiżi tad-dipendenza li b'mod konġunt tanalizza sentenza u tiswija żbalji grammatiċi billi testendi l-formaliżmu mhux direzzjonali bbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni ta' Goldberg u Elhadad (2010) bi tliet azzjonijiet addizzjonali: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Minħabba li dawn l-azzjonijiet jistgħu jikkawżaw ċirku infinit fid-derivazzjoni, aħna nintroduċu wkoll restrizzjonijiet sempliċi li jiżguraw it-terminazzjoni tal-analizzatur. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell tagħna fir-rigward tal-preċiżjoni tad-dipendenza u t-titjib fil-grammatika għas-sentenzi mhux grammatiċi, li juru r-robustezza u l-applikabbiltà tal-iskema tagħna.", 'mn': 'Бид шинэ хамааралтай хамааралтай хуваалцах схемийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь өгүүлбэрийг хамтдаа хуваалцаж, грамматикийн алдаа шилжүүлж, Goldberg болон Elhadad (2010) дээр газрын шилжүүлбэргүй загварыг нэмэгдүүлж, гурван нэмэлт үйл ажиллагаатай: СУБСТИТУТ,  Яагаад гэвэл эдгээр үйл ажиллагаанууд урвалд хязгааргүй холбоотой болж чадна, бид мөн хуваарилагчийн дуусалтыг гаргах энгийн хязгаарлалтыг тайлбарлаж чадна. Бид өөрсдийн загварын загварыг үнэлгээд бус өгүүлбэрүүдийн зөв байдал, грамматикийн сайжруулалтын тухай үнэлгээд, бидний төлөвлөгөөний хүчтэй, хэрэгжүүлэх чадварыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt tolking av avhengighet som samanliknar eit setning og reparerer grammatiske feil ved å utvide ikkje-retningsbasert formalisme på Goldberg og Elhadad (2010) med tre tillegg: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Fordi desse handlingane kan føra til ein uendelig loop i derivasjon, introduserer vi også enkle begrensningar som sikrar at tolkaren avsluttar. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt med hensyn til nøyaktighet for avhengighet og grammatiske forbedringar for ungrammatiske setningar, som demonstrarer kraftighet og tilgjengeligheten av skjemaet vårt.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowy schemat analizy zależności, który wspólnie analizuje zdanie i naprawia błędy gramatyczne poprzez rozszerzenie niekierunkowego formalizmu przejściowego Goldberga i Elhadada (2010) o trzy dodatkowe działania: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Ponieważ te działania mogą powodować nieskończoną pętlę w pochodzeniu, wprowadzamy również proste ograniczenia, które zapewniają zakończenie parsera. Oceniamy nasz model pod kątem dokładności zależności i poprawy gramatyczności zdań nieramatycznych, wykazując solidność i zastosowanie naszego schematu.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă schemă de analizare a dependențelor care analizează împreună o propoziție și repară erorile gramaticale prin extinderea formalismului non-direcțional bazat pe tranziție Goldberg și Elhadad (2010) cu trei acțiuni suplimentare: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Deoarece aceste acțiuni pot provoca o buclă infinită în derivare, introducem, de asemenea, constrângeri simple care asigură terminarea parserului. Evaluăm modelul nostru în ceea ce privește acuratețea dependenței și îmbunătățirea gramaticalității pentru propozițiile nerrammatice, demonstrând robustețea și aplicabilitatea schemei noastre.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novu šemu analize zavisnosti koja zajednički analizira rečenicu i popravlja gramatične greške proširenjem neodirektivnog prelaznog formalizma Goldberg a i Elhadada (2010) sa tri dodatne akcije: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Jer ove akcije mogu uzrokovati beskrajni petljak u derivaciji, takođe predstavljamo jednostavne ograničenje koje osiguravaju terminaciju analizatora. Procjenjujemo naš model u odnosu na preciznost zavisnosti i poboljšanje gramatičnosti za ungrammatične rečenice, pokazujući robotu i primjenu našeg šema.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් විශේෂතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය සමග වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් වාර්තාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා සහ වාර්තාවක් විශේෂ කරනවා ගොල්ඩබර්ග් සහ එල්හාඩ් වලින් අ මොකද මේ ක්\u200dරියාවල් අවසානයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අවසානයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, අපි පරීක්ෂකය අවසානයක් ස අපි අපේ මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරනවා අපේ සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ග්\u200dරාම්තිකතාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපේ සැකසුම් ගැන ශක්තිමතාව', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qorshaha baarlamaanka cusub oo ku saabsan, kaas oo si wada jir ah u baaraandegaya xumaatooyinka lagu hagaajiyo iyo hagaajiya qalabka grammatika, kaas oo ku fidinaya formaliska aan tooska ahayn ee Goldberg iyo Elhadad (2010) oo saddex waxqabad oo kale ah: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Sababtaas darteed falimahaas waxay noqon karaan qallooc aan dhamayn, waxaynu sameynaa qasab fudud oo ku sahlan in la joojiyo baaritaanka baaritaanka. Tusaalkayaga waxaynu qiimeynaynaa saxda ku xiran iyo horumarinta grammanimada, si aan u muujinno tababarka iyo habka qorshaha.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett nytt beroendetolkningssystem som tillsammans tolkar en mening och reparerar grammatiska fel genom att utvidga Goldbergs och Elhadads (2010) icke-riktade övergångsbaserade formalism med ytterligare tre åtgärder: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Eftersom dessa åtgärder kan orsaka en oändlig slinga i härledning, introducerar vi också enkla begränsningar som säkerställer parser avslutning. Vi utvärderar vår modell med avseende på beroendenoggrannhet och grammatik förbättringar för icke-rammatiska meningar, vilket visar robustheten och användbarheten av vårt schema.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய சார்பு பாடல் முறைமையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். அது சேர்ந்து ஒரு வாக்கியத்தை பிரித்து மற்றும் சரிபார்க்கும் சிகிரமம் பிழைகளை கூடுதலாக கோல்ட்பெர்க் மற்றும் எல்ஹ ஏனென்றால் இந்த செயல்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்பில் ஒரு முடிவில்லாத சுழற்சி காண்பிக்கலாம், நாம் சுலபமான கட்டுப்பாடுகளை கு நம்முடைய மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் சார்ந்த திட்டத்திற்கு சார்ந்தது சரியாக மற்றும் வரைப்பட முன்னேற்றங்களை பற்றி, எங்கள் திட்டத', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی اعتمادی پارشاینگ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک جماعت کو مشترک پارشاینس کرتا ہے اور گراماتیکی خطاؤں کو دور کرتا ہے، گلڈبرگ اور الہداد (2010) کی غیر دقیق تغییرات کی فرمولیسم کے مطابق تین اضافہ عمل کے ساتھ پھیلاتا ہے: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSE کیونکہ یہ اقدامات ایک بے حدی لوپ کی وجہ ہو سکتی ہے، ہم نے بھی سادھی محدودیت پیش کرتی ہیں جو پارچر پابندی کا یقین رکھتے ہیں. ہم نے ہماری مدل کا مطابق انتظام کرتا ہے کہ دقیقات اور گراماتیکی باتوں کے لئے اضافہ کریں، ہماری طرح کی طاقت اور کاربردی دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz yangi tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz. Bu so'zlarni birlashtirish va grammatikal xatolarni o'zgartiradi. Chunki bu amallar cheksiz qo'llanib chiqarishi mumkin, biz parametrlarni tugatishga ishlatish uchun oddiy tartiblarni anglatamiz. Biz modelimizni tasdiqlash va grammatikal o'zgarishga qiymatimiz, hamma so'zlarning o'zgarishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một kế hoạch phân tích phụ thuộc mới, đồng thời phân tích một câu và sửa lỗi theo ngữ pháp bằng cách mở rộng thủ tục không đạo đức của Goldberg and Elhadad (dc) với ba hành động thêm: SINGMITUTE, Deletie, INERT. Bởi vì những hành động này có thể gây ra vòng thời gian bắt nguồn, chúng ta cũng đưa ra những giới hạn đơn giản để phá bỏ vị cha phân. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi về độ chính xác và kỹ thuật của lệ thuộc về các câu không biểu tình, cho thấy sự vững chắc và áp dụng của kế hoạch.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова схема за анализ на зависимостта, която съвместно анализира изречение и поправя граматически грешки чрез разширяване на формализма, базиран на преход от Голдбърг и Елхадад (2010) с три допълнителни действия: субСТИТУРА, ИЛИТИРА. Тъй като тези действия могат да причинят безкраен цикъл в дериватирането, ние също въвеждаме прости ограничения, които гарантират завършването на анализатора. Ние оценяваме нашия модел по отношение на точността на зависимостта и подобренията на граматиката за неграматични изречения, демонстрирайки здравината и приложимостта на нашата схема.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny afhængighedsfortolkningsordning, der i fællesskab fortolker en sætning og reparerer grammatiske fejl ved at udvide den ikke-retningsbestemte overgangsbaserede formalisme af Goldberg og Elhadad (2010) med tre yderligere handlinger: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Fordi disse handlinger kan forårsage en uendelig løkke i derivation, indfører vi også enkle begrænsninger, der sikrer parserens afslutning. Vi evaluerer vores model med hensyn til afhængighedsnøjagtighed og grammatiske forbedringer for ungrammatiske sætninger, hvilket viser robustheden og anvendeligheden af vores ordning.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novu shēmu analize zavisnosti koja zajedno analizira rečenicu i popravlja gramatične greške proširenjem neosmjernog prelaznog formalizma Goldberg i Elhadad (2010) s tri dodatne akcije: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Jer te akcije mogu uzrokovati beskrajni krug u derivaciji, također predstavljamo jednostavne ograničenje koje osiguravaju prekid analizatora. Procjenjujemo naš model s obzirom na preciznost ovisnosti i poboljšanje gramatičnosti za ungrammatične rečenice, pokazujući snagu i primjenu našeg šema.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw afhankelijkheidsparsing schema voor dat gezamenlijk een zin parst en grammaticale fouten herstelt door het niet-directionele transitie-gebaseerde formalisme van Goldberg en Elhadad (2010) uit te breiden met drie extra acties: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Omdat deze acties een oneindige lus in afleiding kunnen veroorzaken, introduceren we ook eenvoudige beperkingen die de beëindiging van de parser garanderen. We evalueren ons model met betrekking tot afhankelijkheidsnauwkeurigheid en grammaticaliteitsverbeteringen voor niet-grammaticale zinnen, wat de robuustheid en toepasbaarheid van ons schema aantoont.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neues Dependency Parsing Schema vor, das gemeinsam einen Satz parst und grammatikalische Fehler repariert, indem der nicht-direktionale Übergangsformalismus von Goldberg und Elhadad (2010) um drei zusätzliche Aktionen erweitert wird: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Da diese Aktionen eine unendliche Schleife in der Ableitung verursachen können, führen wir auch einfache Einschränkungen ein, die die Beendigung des Parsers gewährleisten. Wir bewerten unser Modell hinsichtlich Abhängigkeitsgenauigkeit und Grammatizitätsverbesserungen für ungrammatische Sätze und demonstrieren die Robustheit und Anwendbarkeit unseres Schemas.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک برنامه جدید تجزیه\u200cکننده بستگی که با همدیگر یک جمله را بررسی می\u200cکند و اشتباه\u200cهای گراماتیکی را با افزایش رسمی\u200cهای غیر مسیری از گلدبرگ و الهاداد (2010) با سه عمل اضافه\u200cای: SUBSTITUTE، DELETE، INSERT. این برنامه\u200cای است که با تغییر تجزیه چون این حرکتها ممکن است باعث یک چرخه بی نهایت در تولید شود، ما همچنین محدودیت ساده را معرفی می کنیم که به پایان پایان\u200cدهنده مطمئن می\u200cشوند. ما مدل خود را با ارزش دقیق بستگی و بهتر شدن گراماتیکی برای جمله\u200cهای ناگراماتیکی ارزش می\u200cدهیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم استواری و کاربردی برنامه\u200cمان.', 'tr': 'Biz täze bir baglançylyk parslama taslamasyny teklip edip, ol bir sözlem bilen gramatik hatalary çykarýar we çykarýar. Goldberg we Elhadad (2010) üç ýene bir hereket edip, golbergiň we Elhadad (2010) iň daşyrymyk eserlemeleri bilen golbergiň ýüzünden geçirilmeýän formalismini golaýlaýar. Çünkü bu eylemler türümlerde sonsuz bir döngü sebep olabilir, Ayrıca çözümler bitirmesini sağlayan basit sınırları da tanıştırıyoruz. Biz öz nusgymyzy çykyşymyz döredilik dogryslygyna we gramatika sözlerimiz üçin ýüzeleşikliklere görä çykýarys, taslamamyzyň güýçli we uyumylygyny görkez.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mpango mpya wa mabunge wa kutegemea uhuru ambao unaunganisha hukumu na kurekebisha makosa ya grammani kwa kuongeza ufanisi wa mabadiliko yasiyo ya moja kwa moja ya mabadiliko ya Goldberg na Elhadad (2010) kwa hatua nyingine tatu: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Kwa sababu vitendo hivi vinaweza kusababisha uchunguzi usio na maana, pia tunaanzisha vikwazo rahisi ili kuhakikisha kusitishwa kwa mbunge. Tunatathmini mifano yetu kwa kuhusiana na uhakika na maendeleo ya ubora kwa ajili ya hukumu zisizo za kimapenzi, kuonyesha uvunjifu na matumizi ya mpango wetu.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan skema penghuraian dependensi baru yang bersama-sama menguji kalimat dan memperbaiki kesalahan grammatik dengan memperluas formalisme bukan-arah berdasarkan transisi Goldberg dan Elhadad (2010) dengan tiga tindakan tambahan: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Karena tindakan ini mungkin menyebabkan loop tak terbatas dalam derivasi, kita juga memperkenalkan batas sederhana yang memastikan penghasilan. We evaluate our model with respect to dependency accuracy and grammaticality improvements for ungrammatical sentences, demonstrating the robustness and applicability of our scheme.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe afhanklikheid verwerking skema wat saamstig 'n seting en herstel grammatiese foute deur die nie-rigting-oorgang-gebaseerde formalisme van Goldberg en Elhadad (2010) met drie addisionele aksies: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT te verleng. Omdat hierdie aksies dalk 'n onbeëindige loop in afgeleide kan veroorsaak, kan ons ook eenvoudige beheinings voorsien wat die ontleerder terminasie seker. Ons evalueer ons model met betrekking na afhanklikheid-presies en grammatiese verbeteringe vir onrammatiese setinge en die kragtigheid en toepassing van ons skema.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një skemë të re analizimi të varësisë që analizon së bashku një fjalim dhe riparon gabimet gramatike duke zgjeruar formalizmin jo-drejtues bazuar në tranzicion të Goldbergut dhe Elhadadit (2010) me tre veprime shtesë: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Because these actions may cause an infinite loop in derivation, we also introduce simple constraints that ensure the parser termination.  Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë lidhur me saktësinë e varësisë dhe përmirësimet gramatike për fjalimet ungrammatike, duke demonstruar fuqinë dhe aplikabilitetin e skemës sonë.', 'az': 'Biz yeni bağımlılıq ayırma taslağı təbliğ edirik ki, bu cümləyi birlikdə ayırır və gramatik xətalarını Goldberg və Elhadad (2010. gadā) üç əlavə işləri ilə uzaqlaşdırır: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Çünki bu əməllər çəkilənlərdə sonsuz bir dönüş olaraq, ayrıca parçacılıq sonunu təsdiqləyən basit müəyyənləşdirirlər. Biz modelimizi, bağımlılığımızın doğruluğuna və gramatik cümlələrə görə çox qüvvətli və uyğunluğunu göstəririk.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং পরিকল্পনা প্রস্তাব করি যা একত্রে একটি বাক্য এবং গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল ভুল পার্স করে গোল্ডবার্গ এবং এলহাদ্দ (২০১০) নির্দিষ্ট কাজের মাধ্যমে গোল্ডবার্গ এবং  কারণ এই কাজগুলো বিভ্রান্তিতে অসম্পূর্ণ লুপের সৃষ্টি করতে পারে, আমরা সাধারণ বিধানের সুযোগ প্রদান করি যাতে প্যারার্স আমরা আমাদের মডেলের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি যে আমাদের পরিকল্পনার নির্ভরশীল সঠিকভাবে এবং গ্রামাটিক্যালের উন্নয়নের ব্যাপারে বিশ্বাস এব', 'am': 'የአዲስ ጥያቄ የጎልዳቤርግ እና ኤልሃዳድ (2010) በተጨማሪም ድርጊት፣ SUBSTITUTE፣ DELETE፣ INSERT፣ የግል ጠንካራ ስህተቶችን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም የግራማማዊ ስህተቶችን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም አዲስ የፓርቲካ ፕሮግራም እና አዲስ ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ምክንያቱም እነዚህ ተግባሮች የማይቋረጥ ውጤት እንዲያሳስል፣ ተሳታፊውን መግለጫ እንዲያረጋግጥ ቀላል ግንኙነት እናስገራለን፡፡ በጥያቄ እና የፕሮግራሙን ስርዓት እና የግልሙን ትክክል ማድረግ እናስተዋልናለን፡፡', 'ko': 'Goldberg과 Elhadad(2010)를 확장하여 비정상적인 형식주의를 바탕으로 세 가지 추가 조작을 사용한다. 바로 교체, 삭제와 삽입, 문장을 연합하여 해석하고 문법 오류를 복원하는 것이다.이러한 조작은 파생에서 무한 순환을 초래할 수 있기 때문에, 우리는 해석기의 종료를 확보하는 간단한 제약을 도입했다.우리는 우리의 모델이 비문법 문장에 대한 의존의 정확성과 문법적 개선을 평가하여 우리 방안의 안정성과 적용성을 증명했다.', 'hy': "Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կախվածության վերլուծության ծրագիր, որը միասին վերլուծում է նախադասությունը և վերականգնում է գրամատիկ սխալները' ընդլայնելով Գոլդբերգի և Էլհադադի ոչ ուղղությամբ տեղափոխվող ֆորմալիզմը (2010) երեք ավելացնող գործողություններով' ՍՈՍՏԻՏՈւՏՈւ Քանի որ այս գործողությունները կարող են անսահմանափակ շրջան պատճառել վերջիններում, մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք պարզ սահմանափակումներ, որոնք ապահովում են վերացման վերացումը: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը կախվածության ճշգրիտության և գրամատիկական բարելավման առումով անգրամատիկական նախադասությունների համար, ցույց տալով մեր ծրագրի կայունությունը և կիրառելիությունը:", 'bs': 'Predlažemo novu shēmu analize zavisnosti koja zajedno analizira rečenicu i popravlja gramatične greške proširenjem neodirektivnog prelaznog formalizma Goldberg i Elhadad (2010) sa tri dodatne akcije: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Zato što ove akcije mogu uzrokovati beskonačan krug u derivaciji, također predstavljamo jednostavne ograničenje koje osiguravaju terminaciju analizatora. Procjenjujemo naš model u pogledu preciznosti zavisnosti i poboljšanja gramatičnosti za ungrammatične rečenice, pokazujući robustnost i primjenu našeg šema.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nové schéma analýzy závislostí, které společně analyzuje větu a opravuje gramatické chyby rozšířením nesměrového přechodového formalismu Goldberga a Elhadádu (2010) o tři další akce: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Protože tyto akce mohou způsobit nekonečnou smyčku v odvození, zavádíme také jednoduchá omezení, která zajišťují ukončení parseru. Hodnotíme náš model s ohledem na přesnost závislosti a zlepšení gramatiky pro negrammatické věty, což prokáže robustnost a použitelnost našeho schématu.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue sõltuvuse parsimise skeemi, mis ühiselt parsib lauset ja parandab grammatilisi vigu, laiendades Goldbergi ja Elhadadi (2010) suunamatut üleminekupõhist formaalsust kolme lisategevusega: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Kuna need toimingud võivad põhjustada lõpmatu tsükli tuletamisel, kehtestame ka lihtsad piirangud, mis tagavad parseri lõpetamise. Hindame oma mudelit sõltuvuse täpsuse ja grammatilisuse parandamise suhtes mittegrammatiliste lausete puhul, näidates meie skeemi tugevust ja rakendatavust.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta riippuvuuden jäsennysjärjestelmää, joka yhdessä jäsentää lauseen ja korjaa kieliopilliset virheet laajentamalla Goldbergin ja Elhadadin (2010) ei-suuntasiirtymään perustuvaa formalismia kolmella lisätoimella: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Koska nämä toiminnot voivat aiheuttaa äärettömän silmukan päättelyssä, otamme käyttöön myös yksinkertaisia rajoituksia, jotka varmistavat jäsentäjän päättämisen. Arvioimme malliamme riippuvuuden tarkkuuden ja kieliopillisuuden parantamisen suhteen epäsymmetrisissä lauseissa, mikä osoittaa järjestelmämme kestävyyden ja sovellettavuuden.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou esquema d'analització de la dependencia que analitza conjuntament una frase i repara errors gramàtics extendient el formalisme no oriental basat en la transició de Goldberg i Elhadad (2010) amb tres accions adicionals: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Perquè aquestes accions poden causar un bucle infinit en la derivació, també introduïm restriccions senzilles que asseguren la terminació del analizador. Evaluam el nostre model en relació a la precisió de la dependència i a la millora gramàtica de les frases ungrammàtiques, demostrant la robustet i aplicabilitat del nostre esquema.", 'jv': 'We proposal a new diphendisehensitive Awak dh챕w챕 aksi iki iso nggawe barang tanggal gak bukane ora dadi, kita ngubah perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngubah layang Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk model awak dh챕w챕 nggawe akeh dewek gerakan kanggo ngerasakno dadi, nik awak dh챕w챕 kuwi mau, nik awak dh챕w챕 nggawe sistem sing gak dh챕w챕.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo shemo razčlenitve odvisnosti, ki skupaj razčleni stavek in popravi slovnične napake z razširitvijo nesmernega prehodnega formalizma Goldberg in Elhadad (2010) s tremi dodatnimi ukrepi: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. Ker lahko ta dejanja povzročijo neskončno zanko pri izpeljanju, uvajamo tudi preproste omejitve, ki zagotavljajo končanje razčlenjevalnika. Naš model ocenjujemo glede na natančnost odvisnosti in izboljšave slovničnosti za ungrammatične stavke, kar dokazuje robustnost in uporabnost naše sheme.', 'he': 'We propose a new dependency parsing scheme which jointly parses a sentence and repairs grammatical errors by extending the non-directional transition-based formalism of Goldberg and Elhadad (2010) with three additional actions: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT.  מכיוון שהפעולות האלה יכולות לגרום לולאה אינסופית בהגזרה, אנחנו גם מציגים מחסומים פשוטים שמבטיחים את הפסקת המחקר. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמא שלנו בנוגע לדיוקת תלויות ושיפורים גרמטיים למשפטים לא גרמטיים, בהוכיחה את החזקה והאפשרות של התוכנית שלנו.', 'ha': "Mu buɗa wata jiyyar parse ɗin da ke samun ta yin parse da matsayin ayuka da kuma ke gyare makorariya grammatisk, da yalwatin formalism na-da-bayani na Goldberg da Elhadad (2010) da wasu aiki uku dabam-dabam: SUBSATIT, DALET, INSART. Saboda haka, waɗannan aikatãwar za'a sabo da ba wanda ya so ba, sai za'a ƙudura masu sauƙi da za'a sikre bakin zartar da parser. Tuna ƙaddara misalinmu da masu tsari ga gaskiya da gyarata masu gyarata ga mutane, kuma munã nuna ustawi da amfani da shirin ayukanmu.", 'bo': 'We propose a new dependency parsing scheme which jointly parses a sentence and repairs grammatical errors by extending the non-directional transition-based formalism of Goldberg and Elhadad (2010) with three additional actions: SUBSTITUTE, DELETE, INSERT. The following proposals are: Since these actions may cause an infinite loop in derivation, we also introduce simple constraints that ensure the parser termination. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Attention Strategies for Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ar': 'استراتيجيات الانتباه للتعلم متعدد المصادر من التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'pt': 'Estratégias de Atenção para Aprendizagem de Sequência a Sequência de Várias Fontes', 'fr': "Stratégies d'attention pour l'apprentissage séquence-à-séquence multi-sources", 'es': 'Estrategias de atención para el aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia de múltiples fuentes', 'ja': 'マルチソースシーケンスツーシーケンスラーニングの注目度戦略', 'zh': '多源序于序', 'hi': 'बहु-स्रोत अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए ध्यान रणनीतियाँ', 'ru': 'Стратегии внимания для многоисточников последовательности к последовательности обучения', 'ga': 'Straitéisí Airde don Fhoghlaim Ilfhoinse ó Sheicheamh go Seicheamh', 'ka': 'მრავალური წერტილის შემდეგების სწავლებისთვის სტრატიგია', 'hu': 'Figyelem stratégiák a többforrásos szekvencia-szekvencia tanuláshoz', 'el': 'Στρατηγικές προσοχής για την εκμάθηση διαδοχής σε ακολουθία πολλαπλών πηγών', 'lt': 'Daugiašalio mokymosi iš eilės į eilę strategijos', 'kk': 'Көптеген көздегі реттеу- және реттеу оқыту стратегиялары', 'it': "Strategie di attenzione per l'apprendimento sequenziale multi-sorgente", 'mk': 'Стратегии на внимание за учење на секвенција од повеќе извори до секвенција', 'ml': 'Multi- Source Sequence- to- Sequence Learning for Attention Strategies', 'ms': 'Strategi Perhatian untuk Pelajaran Sekuensi-ke-Sekuensi Berberbilang Sumber', 'mn': 'Олон эх үүсвэрийн дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах ухааны стратеги', 'no': 'Merkingsstrategiar for fleirkjeldesekvens- til- sekvens- læring', 'mt': 'Strateġiji ta’ Attenzjoni għal Tagħlim minn Sekwenza għal Sekwenza Multi-Sors', 'pl': 'Strategie uwagi dla uczenia się sekwencji wielu źródeł', 'ro': 'Strategii de atenție pentru învățarea secvență-la-secvență multisursă', 'sr': 'Strategije pažnje za učenje višeizvorskog sekvence do sekvence', 'sv': 'Uppmärksamhet Strategier för Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ta': 'பல மூலத்தின் வரிசையில் இருந்து வரிசையில் கற்றுக்கான கவனிப்பு Strategies', 'si': 'Multi-source sequence-to-sequence ඉගෙනීම සඳහා අවධානය සාධානය', 'so': 'Attention Strategies for Multi Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'ur': 'Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning کے لئے غور کا استراتژی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các phương pháp chú ý giáo trình đa nguồn:', 'da': 'Opmærksomhedsstrategier for flere kilder sekvens til sekvens læring', 'nl': 'Aandacht Strategieën voor Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'hr': 'Strategije pažnje za učenje višeizvorskog sekvence do sekvence', 'id': 'Perhatian Strategi untuk Pelajaran Sekuensi-ke-Sekuensi Bersumber', 'fa': 'استراتژی توجه برای آموزش تعداد تعداد منبع زیادی', 'bg': 'Внимание Стратегии за обучение от последователност към последователност от множество източници', 'tr': 'Köp-çeşme Tersi-täze öwrenmek üçin üns Strateji', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeitsstrategien für Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence Learning', 'af': 'Aangaande strategies vir veelvuldige bron-volgorde-na-volgorde-leer', 'sq': 'Strategjitë e vëmendjes për mësimin nga sekuenca në sekuencë me burime të shumta', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sw': 'Tamko za kusikiliza kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa vyanzo vingi', 'bn': 'বহুসূত্রের সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স শিক্ষার জন্য মনোযোগ স্ট্যাটেজি', 'hy': 'Ուշադրություն դարձրել բազմաթիվ աղբյուրների հաջորդականության սովորելու ռազմավարությունները', 'ca': "Estrategies d'atenció per aprendre secuencia a secuencia multifonts", 'bs': 'Strategije pažnje za učenje višeizvorskog sekvence do sekvence', 'ko': '다원 서열이 서열 학습에 대한 주의 전략', 'cs': 'Strategie pozornosti pro více zdrojů sekvence-to-sekvence učení', 'et': 'Tähelepanu strateegiad mitme allika järjestusest järjestusesse õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Useiden lähteiden sekvenssi-sekvenssi-oppimista koskevat huomiostrategiat', 'az': 'Multi-Source Sequence-to-Sequence 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n Attention Strategies', 'jv': 'Attribute', 'sk': 'Strategije pozornosti za učenje več virov med zaporedji', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'אסטרטגיות תשומת לב ללימוד רצף למקור רב', 'bo': 'སྣ་འབྱུང་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་བའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ།'}
{'en': 'Modeling attention in neural multi-source sequence-to-sequence learning remains a relatively unexplored area, despite its usefulness in tasks that incorporate multiple source languages or modalities. We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical. We compare the proposed methods with existing techniques and present results of systematic evaluation of those methods on the WMT16 Multimodal Translation and Automatic Post-editing tasks. We show that the proposed methods achieve competitive results on both tasks.', 'ar': 'تظل نمذجة الانتباه في التعلم المتسلسل إلى التسلسل متعدد المصادر العصبية منطقة غير مستكشفة نسبيًا ، على الرغم من فائدتها في المهام التي تتضمن لغات أو طرائق متعددة المصدر. نقترح طريقتين جديدتين للجمع بين مخرجات آليات الانتباه على كل تسلسل مصدر ، مسطح وتسلسل هرمي. نحن نقارن الطرق المقترحة مع التقنيات الحالية ونقدم نتائج التقييم المنهجي لتلك الأساليب في مهام الترجمة متعددة الوسائط WMT16 والتحرير التلقائي اللاحق. نوضح أن الطرق المقترحة تحقق نتائج تنافسية في كلا المهمتين.', 'es': 'El modelado de la atención en el aprendizaje neuronal de secuencia a secuencia de múltiples fuentes sigue siendo un área relativamente inexplorada, a pesar de su utilidad en tareas que incorporan múltiples lenguajes o modalidades de origen. Proponemos dos enfoques novedosos para combinar las salidas de los mecanismos de atención en cada secuencia de origen, plana y jerárquica. Comparamos los métodos propuestos con las técnicas existentes y presentamos los resultados de la evaluación sistemática de esos métodos en las tareas de Traducción Multimodal y Postedición Automática de WMT16. Demostramos que los métodos propuestos logran resultados competitivos en ambas tareas.', 'fr': "La modélisation de l'attention dans l'apprentissage neuronal séquence-à-séquence multi-sources reste un domaine relativement inexploré, malgré son utilité dans les tâches qui intègrent plusieurs langues sources ou modalités. Nous proposons deux approches novatrices pour combiner les sorties des mécanismes d'attention sur chaque séquence source, plate et hiérarchique. Nous comparons les méthodes proposées avec les techniques existantes et présentons les résultats de l'évaluation systématique de ces méthodes sur les tâches de traduction multimodale et de post-édition automatique WMT16. Nous montrons que les méthodes proposées permettent d'obtenir des résultats compétitifs sur les deux tâches.", 'pt': 'Modelar a atenção na aprendizagem sequência-a-sequência multi-fonte neural continua sendo uma área relativamente inexplorada, apesar de sua utilidade em tarefas que incorporam múltiplas linguagens ou modalidades de origem. Propomos duas novas abordagens para combinar as saídas dos mecanismos de atenção sobre cada sequência fonte, plana e hierárquica. Comparamos os métodos propostos com as técnicas existentes e apresentamos resultados da avaliação sistemática desses métodos nas tarefas de Tradução Multimodal e Pós-edição Automática do WMT16. Mostramos que os métodos propostos alcançam resultados competitivos em ambas as tarefas.', 'ja': 'ニューラルマルチソースシーケンスからシーケンスへの学習におけるモデリングの注意は、複数のソース言語またはモダリティを組み込むタスクで有用であるにもかかわらず、比較的未探索の領域であり続けている。私たちは、各ソースシーケンスにわたる注目メカニズムの出力を組み合わせるための2つの新しいアプローチを提案します。平坦で階層的です。提案された方法を既存の技術と比較し、WMT 16マルチモーダル翻訳および自動ポスト編集タスクでこれらの方法を体系的に評価した結果を提示します。提案された方法は、両方のタスクで競争的な結果を達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '神经多源序于序建模犹为未索之域,虽多言模态用。 二新之法,各以意机合其源序,扁平与分层。 以所发之法,较之今术,WMT16多模式译自译后编辑之法,系统评估。 臣等明之,所陈皆有竞争力也。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका बहु-स्रोत अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने में मॉडलिंग ध्यान एक अपेक्षाकृत अज्ञात क्षेत्र बना हुआ है, कई स्रोत भाषाओं या तौर-तरीकों को शामिल करने वाले कार्यों में इसकी उपयोगिता के बावजूद। हम प्रत्येक स्रोत अनुक्रम, फ्लैट और पदानुक्रमित पर ध्यान तंत्र के आउटपुट को संयोजित करने के लिए दो उपन्यास दृष्टिकोणों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम मौजूदा तकनीकों के साथ प्रस्तावित विधियों की तुलना करते हैं और WMT16 मल्टीमॉडल अनुवाद और स्वचालित पोस्ट-संपादन कार्यों पर उन विधियों के व्यवस्थित मूल्यांकन के वर्तमान परिणामों की तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रस्तावित तरीके दोनों कार्यों पर प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Моделирование внимания в нейронном многоисточнике междупоследовательного обучения остается относительно неизученной областью, несмотря на его полезность в задачах, которые включают в себя несколько языков-источников или модальностей. Мы предлагаем два новых подхода к объединению выходов механизмов внимания над каждой исходной последовательностью, плоской и иерархической. Мы сравниваем предлагаемые методы с существующими методами и представляем результаты систематической оценки этих методов по задачам мультимодального перевода и автоматического пост-редактирования WMT16. Показано, что предложенные методы достигают конкурентных результатов по обеим задачам.', 'ga': 'Réimse sách neamh-iniúchta fós é aird a shamhaltú i bhfoghlaim néarfhoinse ó sheicheamh go seicheamh, in ainneoin a úsáidí i dtascanna a chuimsíonn teangacha foinseacha nó módúlachtaí iolracha. Molaimid dhá chur chuige nua chun aschuir na meicníochtaí aire a chomhcheangal thar gach seicheamh foinse, cothrom agus ordlathach. Déanaimid comparáid idir na modhanna atá beartaithe agus na teicnící atá ann cheana agus cuirimid i láthair torthaí meastóireachta córasach ar na modhanna sin ar thascanna WMT16 Aistriúchán Ilmhódúil agus Iar-eagarthóireacht Uathoibríoch. Léirímid go mbaineann na modhanna molta torthaí iomaíocha ar an dá thasc.', 'ka': 'მოდელირება ნეიროლური მრავალური წერტილის სწავლების მოდელირება დარჩენა პარამეტრებით უნდა გამოკითხვა ფართობა, მაგრამ მისი გამოსახულებელობა რამდენიმე წერტილის ან მოდილიტებში. ჩვენ გვეძლევა ორი პრომენტის შესაძლებლობა, რომ ყველა ფეხურის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობა ყველა ფეხურის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ პროგრამების მიმდინარე ტექნოგიებით და მიმდინარე სისტემატიური განსაზღვრების შედეგი WMT16 მრატიმოდიალური განსაზღვრების და ავტომატიური დარედაქტირების მოვლენების ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პროგრამეტრებული მეტივები კონპექტიური შედეგი ორივე საქმებზე.', 'el': 'Η μοντελοποίηση της προσοχής στη νευρωνική εκμάθηση αλληλουχίας-αλληλουχίας πολλών πηγών παραμένει μια σχετικά ανεξερεύνητη περιοχή, παρά τη χρησιμότητά της σε εργασίες που ενσωματώνουν πολλαπλές γλώσσες πηγής ή μεθόδους. Προτείνουμε δύο νέες προσεγγίσεις για να συνδυάσουμε τα αποτελέσματα των μηχανισμών προσοχής σε κάθε ακολουθία πηγής, επίπεδη και ιεραρχική. Συγκρίνουμε τις προτεινόμενες μεθόδους με τις υπάρχουσες τεχνικές και παρουσιάζουμε αποτελέσματα συστηματικής αξιολόγησης των μεθόδων αυτών στις εργασίες Πολυmodal Translation και Αυτόματης Μεταedition. Δείχνουμε ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι επιτυγχάνουν ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα και στα δύο καθήκοντα.', 'hu': 'A figyelem modellezése a neurális többforrásos szekvencia-szekvencia tanulásban viszonylag feltáratlan terület marad, annak ellenére, hogy hasznos a több forrásnyelvet vagy módszert magában foglaló feladatokban. Két új megközelítést javasolunk a figyelemmechanizmusok kimeneteinek kombinálására az egyes forrássorozatok felett, lapos és hierarchikus. A javasolt módszereket összehasonlítjuk a meglévő technikákkal, és a WMT16 multimodális fordítási és automatikus utószerkesztési feladatokban bemutatjuk ezen módszerek szisztematikus értékelésének eredményeit. Megmutatjuk, hogy a javasolt módszerek mindkét feladatban versenyképes eredményeket érnek el.', 'it': "Modellare l'attenzione nell'apprendimento sequenziale multi-sorgente neurale rimane un'area relativamente inesplorata, nonostante la sua utilità in compiti che incorporano più lingue o modalità di origine. Proponiamo due approcci innovativi per combinare gli output dei meccanismi di attenzione su ogni sequenza di sorgenti, piatti e gerarchici. Confrontiamo i metodi proposti con le tecniche esistenti e presentiamo i risultati della valutazione sistematica di tali metodi nelle attività di traduzione multimodale WMT16 e post-editing automatico. Dimostriamo che i metodi proposti raggiungono risultati competitivi su entrambi i compiti.", 'mk': 'Моделирањето на вниманието во нервното учење од повеќето извори по секвенца останува релативно неистражена област, и покрај нејзината корисност во задачите кои вклучуваат повеќето извори јазици или моделности. Предложуваме два нови пристапи за комбинација на излезите од механизмите на внимание во секоја изворна секвенца, рамна и хиерархична. Ги споредуваме предложените методи со постоечките техники и ги претставуваме резултатите од систематска евалуација на овие методи на задачите на Мултимодилниот превод и автоматското постуредување на WMT16. Ние покажуваме дека предложените методи постигнуваат конкурентни резултати на двете задачи.', 'lt': 'Atkreipimo į daugialypį mokymąsi iš eilės į eilę modeliavimas išlieka santykinai neaiškus, nepaisant jo naudingumo uždaviniuose, kuriuose yra įvairių šaltinių kalbų ar būdų. We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical.  Palyginame siūlomus metodus su esamais metodais ir pateikiame sistemingo šių metodų vertinimo rezultatus, susijusius su WMT16 daugiarūšio vertimo ir automatinio redagavimo užduotimis. Mes parodome, kad siūlomais metodais abiejų užduočių atžvilgiu pasiekti konkurenciniai rezultatai.', 'kk': 'Невралдық көп көп көздегі тілдерді не әдістерді біріктірген тапсырмалардың пайдалығына қарай, бірнеше көздегі тілдерді не әдістерді біріктіретін тапсырмалардың үлгісін өзгерту салыстырып кел Біз әрбір көздердің ретінде, қарапайым және иерархиялық түрлендіру механизмінің шығысын біріктіру үшін екі романдық арқылы ұсынамыз. Біз келтірілген әдістерді бар технологиялармен салыстырып, WMT16 көп модельді аудару және автоматты түрде өңдеу тапсырмаларының жүйелік бағалау нәтижелерін көрсетедік. Біз тапсырмалардың екі тапсырмаларда жарықтық нәтижелерін жеткізетін әдістерді көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Memodel perhatian dalam pembelajaran urutan-ke-urutan-berbilang-sumber saraf tetap kawasan relatif tidak dikenalpasti, walaupun ia berguna dalam tugas yang mengangkut bahasa atau modaliti sumber berbilang. We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical.  Kami membandingkan kaedah yang diusulkan dengan teknik yang wujud dan menghasilkan keputusan penilaian sistemik kaedah-kaedah tersebut pada tugas Translation Multimodal WMT16 dan Post-edit Automatik. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan mencapai keputusan kompetitif pada kedua-dua tugas.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറലിലെ പല-സോര്\u200dസ്സുകളുടെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d മോഡലിങ് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും കൂടുതല്\u200d അപരിശോധിക്കാത്ത ഭൂമിയാ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് നോവലിന്റെ അടുത്തേക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഓരോ സോര്\u200dസ്സ് സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെയും ഫ്ലാറ്റും ഹിയെരാര നിലവിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളോടൊപ്പം നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികളോട് തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഈ രീതികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റമിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും മത്സരിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tal-attenzjoni fit-tagħlim newrali minn sekwenza għal sekwenza għadu qasam relattivament mhux esplorat, minkejja l-utilità tiegħu f’kompiti li jinkorporaw lingwi jew modalitajiet multipli ta’ sors. Aħna nipproponu żewġ approċċi ġodda biex jingħaqdu r-riżultati tal-mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni fuq kull sekwenza tas-sorsi, ċatti u ġerarkiċi. Aħna nqabblu l-metodi proposti mat-tekniki eżistenti u nippreżentaw ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni sistematika ta’ dawk il-metodi dwar il-kompiti tat-Traduzzjoni Multimodali u ta’ Wara l-Edizzjoni Awtomatika tad-WMT16. Aħna nuru li l-metodi proposti jiksbu riżultati kompetittivi fuq iż-żewġ kompiti.', 'no': 'Modellering av oppmerksomhet i nøyrale fleirkjeldesekvens-til-sekvens er relativt uventa område, selv om det er nyttig i oppgåver som inkluderer fleire kjeldespråk eller modaliteter. Vi foreslår to novel tilnærmingar for å kombinere utdata av oppmerksmekanismen over kvar kjeldesekvens, flat og hierarkisk. Vi sammenliknar dei første metodane med eksisterande teknikk og presenterer resultatet av systematisk evaluering av desse metodane på WMT16 multimodal omsetjing og automatisk post- redigeringsoppgåva. Vi viser at dei foreslåde metodane når det gjer konkurentære resultat på begge oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Modelowanie uwagi w neuronowym uczeniu się sekwencji-sekwencji wielu źródeł pozostaje stosunkowo niezbadanym obszarem, pomimo jego przydatności w zadaniach obejmujących wiele języków źródłowych lub modalności. Proponujemy dwa nowe podejścia do łączenia wyników mechanizmów uwagi w każdej sekwencji źródłowej, płaskiej i hierarchicznej. Porównujemy proponowane metody z istniejącymi technikami i przedstawiamy wyniki systematycznej oceny tych metod na zadaniach multimodalnego tłumaczenia WMT16 oraz automatycznego postedytowania. Pokazujemy, że proponowane metody osiągają konkurencyjne rezultaty w obu zadaniach.', 'ro': 'Modelarea atenției în învățarea secvență la secvență neurală multi-sursă rămâne o zonă relativ neexplorată, în ciuda utilității sale în sarcini care includ mai multe limbi sursă sau modalități. Propunem două abordări noi pentru a combina rezultatele mecanismelor de atenție peste fiecare secvență sursă, plată și ierarhică. Comparăm metodele propuse cu tehnicile existente și prezentăm rezultatele evaluării sistematice a acestor metode pe sarcinile de traducere multimodală WMT16 și post-editare automată. Arătăm că metodele propuse obțin rezultate competitive în ambele sarcini.', 'mn': 'Олон эх үүсвэрийн дарааллаас дарааллаар суралцах анхаарал загварын загвар нь олон эх үүсвэрийн хэл эсвэл арга загварын тулд хэрэглэгдэх үйл ажиллагаанд харьцангуй тодорхойгүй хэсэг байдаг. Бид эх үүсвэрийн дараа бүр анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмын үр дүнг нийлүүлэхийн тулд хоёр шинэ арга зам өгдөг. Бид суурилсан технологиудыг харьцуулж, WMT16 олон модул хөрөнгө оруулах, автоматжуулалтын эцэст хөрөнгө оруулах үйл ажиллагааны систематик үнэлгээний үр дүнг харьцуулж байна. Бид санал өгсөн арга зам хоёр даалгаврын өрсөлдөг үр дүнг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'so': "Waxbarashada cudurada kala duduwan ee neurada xiliga kala duduwan waxay ku jirtaa meel aan la shaqeyn karo, haba yeeshee faa'iidadeedii ku jirta shaqaalaha ku qoran luuqado ama qaabab badan oo noocyo ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba qodol oo qodob ah si aan u soo wadano midowyada maandooriyaha oo ku qoran noocyo kasta, flat iyo hierarchical. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaababka la soo jeedo qaababka ay ku jiraan teknolojiyada iyo arimaha lagu qiimeeyo qaababkaas si systemic ah ee ku saabsan tarjumaadka badan ee WMT16 iyo shaqooyinka bilowga-editidda ka dib. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay labada shaqaalaha ku helaan resulto iskutar ah.", 'sv': 'Modellering av uppmärksamhet i neuralt multi-source sekvens-to-sekvens lärande förblir ett relativt outforskat område, trots dess användbarhet i uppgifter som innefattar flera källspråk eller modaliteter. Vi föreslår två nya tillvägagångssätt för att kombinera resultaten av uppmärksamhetsmekanismer över varje källsekvens, platt och hierarkisk. Vi jämför de föreslagna metoderna med befintliga tekniker och presenterar resultat av systematisk utvärdering av dessa metoder i WMT16 Multimodal Översättning och Automatisk Efterredigering. Vi visar att de föreslagna metoderna ger konkurrenskraftiga resultat på båda uppgifterna.', 'sr': 'Modeliranje pažnje u neuronskom multiizvornom sekvenciji do sekvencije ostaje relativno neočekivano područje, unatoč njenoj korisnosti u zadatke koje uključuju višestruke izvorne jezike ili modalitete. Predlažemo dva novog pristupa u kombinaciji rezultata pažnje mehanizma za svaku sekvenciju izvora, ravnu i hijerarhičku. Uspoređujemo predložene metode sa postojećim tehnikama i predstavljamo rezultate sistematične procjene tih metoda na multimodalnim prevodnim i automatskim posledišnjim zadacima. Pokazujemo da predložene metode postignu konkurentne rezultate na oba zadatka.', 'si': 'අවධානයක් න්\u200dයූරාල් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ නැති ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වැඩක් වගේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ නියමය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම අවස්ථාවක්ම, ස අපි තියෙන්න තාක්ෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයය සඳහා WMT16 ගොඩක අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ද', 'ur': 'نئورل multi-source sequence-to-sequence تعلیم کے ذریعہ توجه کی مدل کرنا ایک نسبتا غیر انتظار کی منطقه ہے، اگرچہ اس کے کاموں میں بہت سی سراسر زبانیں یا موڈیلوں کے شامل ہوتے ہیں. ہم نے دو نومین طریقے پیشنهاد فرماتے ہیں کہ ہر سراسر سطح، سطح اور سطح طریقے پر توجه کے مکانیزوں کے نتائج جمع کریں۔ ہم پیشنهاد طریقوں کو موجود تکنیک کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرتے ہیں اور ان طریقوں کی سیستماتی ارزش کے نتائج پیش کرتے ہیں WMT16 Multimodal Translation and Automatic Post-editing tasks پر. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقے دونوں کاموں پر مسابقات کا نتیجہ پہنچاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'பல மூல மொழி மொழிகள் அல்லது வகைகளை சேர்க்கும் பணிகளில் பயனுள்ளதாக இருந்தாலும் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. நாம் ஒவ்வொரு மூல வரிசையிலும், பிளாட் மற்றும் அசைவூட்டி முறைமைகளின் வெளியீடுகளை ஒன்றிணை We compare the proposed methods with existing techniques and present results of systematic evaluation of those methods on the WMT16 Multimodal Translation and Automatic Post-editing tasks.  நாம் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைகள் இரு பணிகளிலும் போராடிய முடிவுகளை அடையும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோ', 'uz': "Bir nechta manba tili yoki usullarni bir nechta bogʻliq boʻlgan vazifalarning foydalanishi mumkin. Biz har bir manba tarkibini, flat va hierarchik tartibi bilan birlashtirish uchun ikkita novel usullarni tahlil qilamiz. Biz taʼminlovchi usullarni mavjud teknikolar bilan kamaytamiz va hozir WMT16 Multimodal tarjima va avtomatik tahrirlash vazifalari bilan bu usullarning tizim qiymati natijalariga qiymatimiz. Biz quyidagi usullarni ikkita vazifalarga rivojlanish natijalarini ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Sự chú ý sắp xếp trong việc học tiếp theo các chuỗi phân-tới-số thần kinh vẫn là một khu vực chưa được khám phá tương đối, mặc dù nó có hữu dụng trong các công việc chứa nhiều ngôn ngữ hay phương thức nguồn. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai phương pháp mới để kết hợp kết hợp kết quả các cơ quan chú ý trên mỗi chuỗi nguồn, phẳng và cấp trên. Chúng tôi so sánh các phương pháp được đề xuất với các kỹ thuật đã có và có kết quả của một đánh giá có hệ thống về các phương pháp đa cách của WRT16 và các công việc tổng biên. Chúng tôi cho thấy các phương pháp đề xuất đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh giữa hai nhiệm vụ.', 'bg': 'Моделирането на вниманието в невронното многоизточниково обучение последователност към последователност остава относително неизследвана област, въпреки неговата полезност в задачи, които включват множество изходни езици или модали. Предлагаме два нови подхода за комбиниране на изходните механизми на вниманието върху всяка последователност на източника, плосък и йерархичен. Сравняваме предложените методи със съществуващите техники и представяме резултати от систематична оценка на тези методи по задачите Мултимодален превод и Автоматична Постредактиране. Показваме, че предложените методи постигат конкурентни резултати и по двете задачи.', 'da': 'Modellering af opmærksomhed i neural multi-source sekvens-til-sekvens læring forbliver et relativt uudforsket område, på trods af dets nytte i opgaver, der omfatter flere kildesprog eller modaliteter. Vi foreslår to nye tilgange til at kombinere resultaterne af opmærksomhedsmekanismer over hver kildesekvens, flad og hierarkisk. Vi sammenligner de foreslåede metoder med eksisterende teknikker og præsenterer resultaterne af systematisk evaluering af disse metoder på WMT16 Multimodal Oversættelse og Automatisk Postredigering opgaver. Vi viser, at de foreslåede metoder opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på begge opgaver.', 'hr': 'Modeliranje pažnje u učenju neuralnog multiizvorskog sekvencije do sekvence ostaje relativno neočekivano područje, unatoč njenoj korisnosti u zadatke koje uključuju višestruke izvorske jezike ili modalitete. Predlažemo dva novog pristupa kombiniranju rezultata mehanizma pažnje nad svakom sekvencijom izvora, ravnim i hijerarhičkim. Mi uspoređujemo predložene metode sa postojećim tehnikama i predstavljamo rezultate sistematske procjene tih metoda o multimodalnim prevodnim i automatskim posledicama. Pokazujemo da predložene metode postignu konkurentne rezultate na oba zadatka.', 'ko': '신경 다원 서열에서 서열 학습에 이르기까지의 주의력 모델링은 여전히 상대적으로 개발되지 않은 분야이다. 비록 여러 가지 원시 언어나 모델을 포함하는 임무에서 매우 유용하지만.우리는 두 가지 새로운 방법을 제시하여 모든 원시 서열의 주의 메커니즘의 출력, 평면과 차원을 결합시켰다.우리가 제시한 방법은 기존 기술과 비교하고 WMT16 다중모드 번역과 자동 후기 편집 임무에서 이러한 방법의 시스템 평가 결과를 제시했다.우리는 제시한 방법이 두 가지 임무에서 모두 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다는 것을 증명했다.', 'de': 'Die Modellierung der Aufmerksamkeit im neuronalen Multi-Source Sequenz-to-Sequenz Lernen bleibt ein relativ unerforschtes Gebiet, trotz seiner Nützlichkeit für Aufgaben, die mehrere Quellsprachen oder Modalitäten beinhalten. Wir schlagen zwei neue Ansätze vor, um die Outputs von Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen über jede Quellenfolge zu kombinieren, flach und hierarchisch. Wir vergleichen die vorgeschlagenen Methoden mit bestehenden Techniken und präsentieren Ergebnisse der systematischen Evaluation dieser Methoden auf den WMT16 Multimodal Translation und Automatische Post-Editing Aufgaben. Wir zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Methoden bei beiden Aufgaben wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse erzielen.', 'id': 'Memodelkan perhatian dalam pembelajaran urutan-urutan-ke-urutan multisumber saraf tetap daerah relatif tidak dikenalpasti, meskipun berguna dalam tugas yang mengangkut berbagai bahasa sumber atau modalitas. We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical.  Kami membandingkan metode yang diusulkan dengan teknik yang ada dan mempersembahkan hasil dari evaluasi sistematis dari metode tersebut pada tugas WMT16 Multimodal Translation dan Automatic Post-editing. We show that the proposed methods achieve competitive results on both tasks.', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van aandacht in neurale multi-source sequence-to-sequence leren blijft een relatief onontdekt gebied, ondanks het nut ervan in taken die meerdere brontalen of modaliteiten omvatten. We stellen twee nieuwe benaderingen voor om de outputs van aandachtsmechanismen over elke bronreeks te combineren, vlak en hiërarchisch. We vergelijken de voorgestelde methoden met bestaande technieken en presenteren resultaten van systematische evaluatie van deze methoden op de WMT16 Multimodale Vertaling en Automatische Post-editing taken. We laten zien dat de voorgestelde methoden concurrerende resultaten opleveren bij beide taken.', 'af': "Modeleer aandag in neurale multibron sekvensie-na-sekvensie leer bly 'n relativief onversoekte area, ten ag van sy gebruikerheid in opdragte wat veelvuldige bron tale of modaliteite inkorpreer. Ons voorstel twee novele toegang om die uitvoerdes van aandag mekanisme te kombinieer oor elke bronkonkombinasie, plat en hierarkies. Ons vergelyk die voorgestelde metodes met bestaande teknike en voorsien resultate van systematiese evaluering van dié metodes op die WMT16 Multimodale Vertaling en Automaties Pos- redigeering taak. Ons wys dat die voorgestelde metodes rekenaar resultate op beide opdragte bereik.", 'tr': 'N채ural k철p-챌e힊me karsynda 철wrenmek 체챌in 체ns nama첵y힊lary g철rn철힊i 첵aly g철r체nmedik b철legi galypdyr. Birn채챌e 챌e힊me dilleri 첵a modalitlerde i힊le첵채n i힊lerde n채hili 체챌in ullan첵ar. Biz her 챌e힊me seri첵asy, basa we hijerarhi첵aly netijelerini birle힊tirmek 체챌in iki roman gollanmagy teklip ed첵채ris. Biz bar tekniklerle 철ng철r체len metodlary we WMT16 횉oklumodal terjime we otomatik so흫ra editleme zadyny흫 sistem 챌철z체mlerini kar힊캇la힊tyr첵arys. Biz teklip eden y철nleri흫 her iki i힊i흫 체st체nde 첵ary힊ykly netijelerini 첵etip biljekdigini g철rke첵채ris.', 'sw': 'Kusisitiza msimamo katika mfululizo wa lugha nyingi kwa mfululizo wa uraia bado unabaki kuwa eneo lisiloeleweka, pamoja na manufaa yake katika kazi ambazo hujumuisha lugha mbalimbali au namna nyingine za vyanzo. We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical.  Tunawalinganisha mbinu zilizopendekezwa na mbinu zilizopo na matokeo ya sasa ya uchunguzi wa mfumo wa namna hizo kwenye Tafsiri za Multimodal na Tafsiri za Baada ya Uhariri. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinapata matokeo ya ushindani katika kazi hizo mbili.', 'am': 'ብዙዎች የኩነቶች ቋንቋዎች ወይም ልዩነትን በሚያሳስቡ ስራዎች ውስጥ ጥቅም ቢሆን በሥርዓት ውስጥ የብዙዎች ቋንቋዎች ወይም ሥርዓቶች በሚያስተካክሉ ስርዓቶች ውስጥ ጥቅም ቢሆን በቁጥር የተለየ ቦታ ይኖራል፡፡ We propose two novel approaches to combine the outputs of attention mechanisms over each source sequence, flat and hierarchical.  በWMT16 Multimodal ትርጉም እና አውቶማቲካዊ በኋላ ማቀናጃ ስራዎችን በተቃራኒ ስርዓት እናሳያታለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ስራ ላይ የሚቃወም ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኙ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Modelimi i vëmendjes në mësimin nga sekuenca në sekuencë me shumë burime nervore mbetet një fushë relativisht e pazgjidhur, pavarësisht nga përfitimi i saj në detyrat që përfshijnë gjuhë apo modalitete të shumta burimi. Ne propozojmë dy metoda të reja për të kombinuar rezultatet e mekanizmave të vëmendjes mbi secuencën e burimit, të rrafshta dhe hierarkike. Ne krahasojmë metodat e propozuara me teknikat ekzistuese dhe paraqesim rezultatet e vlerësimit sistematik të këtyre metodave në detyrat e WMT16 Multimodal Translation dhe Automatic Post-editing. Ne tregojmë se metodat e propozuara arrijnë rezultate konkurruese në të dy detyrat.', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության մոդելավորումը նյարդային բազմա աղբյուրների հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության մեջ մնում է համեմատաբար անուսումնասիրելի ոլորտում, չնայած դրա օգտակարությանը այն առաջադրանքներում, որոնք ներառում են բազմաթիվ աղբյուրների Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու նոր մոտեցում ուշադրության մեխանիզմների արտադրանքները համադրելու յուրաքանչյուր աղբյուրի հաջորդականության մեջ, հարուստ և հիերարխիկ: Մենք համեմատում ենք առաջարկած մեթոդները գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների հետ և ներկայացնում ենք այդ մեթոդների համակարգչային գնահատման արդյունքները, որոնք կատարվում են աշխարհի աշխարհում 16-ի բազմամոդալ թարգմանման և ավտոմատիկ հետխմբագրման Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդները համընդհանուր արդյունքներ են ստանում երկու խնդիրների վրա:', 'fa': 'مدل توجه در تعلیم تعلیم\u200cهای مختلف منبع\u200cهای عصبی به دنبال تعلیم نسبتاً غیر توضیح است، با وجود استفاده از آن در وظیفه\u200cهایی که زبان\u200cهای منبع یا روش\u200cهای مختلف شامل می\u200cشوند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم دو دستیابی روزنامه برای ترکیب نتیجه\u200cهای مکانیسم توجه بر روی هر دستیابی منبع، سطح و سطح و آفرینش. ما روش پیشنهاد را با تکنیک\u200cهای موجود مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و نتیجه\u200cهای ارزیابی سیستماتی از آن روش\u200cها را در مورد ترجمه\u200cهای زیادی WMT16 و بعد از ویرایش\u200cهای خودکار مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که روش پیشنهاد نتیجه رقابتی در هر دو وظیفه رسیده است.', 'bn': 'নিউরেলের মাল্টিউসোর্সের সেকেন্ড-দ্বিতীয় শিক্ষার মোডেল মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করা হচ্ছে একটি আকর্ষণীয় অকল্পিত এলাকা, যদিও তার কাজের কাজের প্রয়োজন যা বেশ আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রত্যেক উৎস সেকেন্ড, ফ্ল্যাট এবং হিরেরার্কিক্যালের উপর মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের আউটপুটের জন্য দুই নভেলের ক আমরা প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিগুলোকে বিদ্যমান প্রযুক্তির সাথে তুলনা করি এবং উইএমটি১৬ মাল্টিমোডাল অনুবাদ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পিছু সম্পাদন করার আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দুটো কাজে প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'cs': 'Modelování pozornosti v neuronovém více zdrojovém učení sekvence-na-sekvence zůstává relativně neprozkoumanou oblastí, navzdory své užitečnosti v úkolech, které zahrnují více zdrojových jazyků nebo modalit. Navrhujeme dva nové přístupy ke kombinaci výstupů mechanismů pozornosti nad každou zdrojovou sekvencí, ploché a hierarchické. Navržené metody porovnáváme s existujícími technikami a prezentujeme výsledky systematického vyhodnocování těchto metod na úlohách multimodálního překladu WMT16 a automatického post-editování. Ukazujeme, že navržené metody dosahují konkurenčních výsledků na obou úkolech.', 'bs': 'Modeliranje pažnje u neuronskom multiizvornom sekvencijskom učenju do sekvencije ostaje relativno neočekivano područje, uprkos njenoj korisnosti u zadatke koje uključuju višestruke izvorne jezike ili modalitete. Predlažemo dva novog pristupa da kombiniramo rezultate mehanizma pažnje na svaku sekvencu izvora, ravnu i hijerarhičku. Upoređujemo predložene metode sa postojećim tehnikama i predstavljamo rezultate sistematske procjene tih metoda o multimodalnim prevodnim i automatskim posledicama. Pokazujemo da predložene metode postignu konkurentne rezultate na oba zadatka.', 'az': 'Nəyral çoxlu mənbə sequence-to-sequence öyrənməsi çoxlu mənbə dillərini və modüllərini birləşdirən işlərdə faydalanılmasına rağmen, çoxlu mənbə dillərində və işlərdə çoxlu istifadə edilməyən bir məlumatdır. Biz hər mənbə seçgisi, düz və hiyerarşik üçün dikkati mehanizmilərin sonunu birləşdirmək üçün iki yeni approach təklif edirik. Biz qurduğumuz metodları mevcut tekniklərlə qarşılaşdırırıq və WMT16 çoxlu modal tercümə və Avtomatik Post-editing işlərində sistematik təcrübələrinin sonuçlarını göstəririk. Biz təklif etdiyimiz metodların hər ikisi işin müqayisədi sonuçlarına nail olacağını göstəririk.', 'et': 'Tähelepanu modelleerimine neuraalsete mitmeallikate järjestusest järjestuseni õppes on endiselt suhteliselt uurimata valdkond, vaatamata selle kasulikkusele ülesannetes, mis hõlmavad mitut lähtekeelt või -viise. Pakume välja kaks uut lähenemisviisi, et kombineerida tähelepanumehhanismide väljundid iga allika järjestuse kohta, tasane ja hierarhiline. Võrdleme väljapakutud meetodeid olemasolevate tehnikatega ning esitame nende meetodite süstemaatilise hindamise tulemusi WMT16 multimodaalse tõlke ja automaatse järeltöötluse ülesannetes. Näitame, et kavandatud meetoditega saavutatakse konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi mõlemas ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Huomion mallintaminen monilähteen neuroopissa sekvenssistä sekvenssiin on edelleen suhteellisen tutkimaton alue, vaikka se on hyödyllinen tehtävissä, joissa on useita lähdekieliä tai modaliteetteja. Ehdotamme kahta uutta lähestymistapaa, joilla voidaan yhdistää huomiomekanismien tuotokset kussakin lähdejärjestyksessä, tasainen ja hierarkkinen. Vertaamme ehdotettuja menetelmiä olemassa oleviin tekniikoihin ja esitämme tuloksia näiden menetelmien systemaattisesta arvioinnista WMT16 Multimodal Translation and Automatic Post-editing -tehtävissä. Osoitamme, että ehdotetuilla menetelmillä saavutetaan molemmissa tehtävissä kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia.', 'ca': "Modelar l'atenció en l'aprenentatge neuronal de seqüència a seqüència múltiple segueix una àrea relativament inexplorada, malgrat la seva utilitat en tasques que incorporen múltiples llengües o modalitats de fonts. Proposem dos enfocaments noves per combinar els resultats dels mecanismes d'atenció en cada seqüència de fonts, plans i jeràrquics. Comparem els mètodes proposats amb les tècniques existents i presentem resultats d'una evaluació sistemàtica d'aquests mètodes en les tasques de traducció multimodal WMT16 i post-edició automàtica. Mostrem que els mètodes proposats aconsegueixen resultats competitius en ambdues tasques.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing dibutuhke iki dadi kanggo nguasakno nggawe sistem pakan ning sampeyan seneng dolanan, basan lan akerat. Awak dhéwé pisan karo perusahaan sistem sing gawe nggawe teknik saiki ono karo sistem sing dadi nggawe barang nggawe modal terjamahan karo akeh sistem sing berarti cara-teka karo WWT 16 Multimodal Terjamahan lan Automatik Pôt-Edit tasks kuwi. Awak dhéwé ngertuk cara-cara sing ngerasakno iki dadi iki dadi sing luwih apik', 'he': 'דוגמנית תשומת לב בלמדת רצף-רצף-לרצף-העצבי נשארת אזור יחסית בלתי חוקר, למרות שימושיתו במשימות שמכילות שפות מקורות רבות או מודיאליות רבות. אנו מציעים שתי גישות חדשות לשלב את התוצאות של מנגנוני תשומת לב על כל רצף מקור, שטוח וייררכי. אנחנו משוותים את השיטות המוצעות עם טכניקות קיימות ומציגים תוצאות של הערכה מערכתית של השיטות הללו על משימות התרגום המולטומודאלי WMT16 ואוטומטי לאחר העורר. אנחנו מראים שהשיטות המוצעות מגיעות לתוצאות תחרותיות בשני המשימות.', 'ha': "Yi amfani da amfani da ke cikin aikin da za'a shigar da harshen masu yawa ko motsi na'urar-masu ƙaranci na rubutu yana da wani gwargwadon da ba'a yi buƙata ba, kuma amma yana da amfani da shi a cikin aikin da za'a shigar da harshen masu yawa. Munã goyyar da matsayin sauran biyu dõmin su haɗa matsayin muhalli masu nau'i kan duk marufukiya, flat da hierrchical. Tuna samfanar da shiryoyin da aka faɗa game da metoden da ke da kuma yana da matsalar masu ƙidãya wa waɗannan hanyõyin a kan WMT16Translate da Fassarori na farat-editing. Tuna nũna da metoden da aka buƙata, su sami matsalar masu bastarwa a kan aikin dukansu.", 'sk': 'Modeliranje pozornosti v nevronskem učenju iz zaporedja do zaporedja ostaja relativno neraziskano področje, kljub njegovi uporabnosti pri nalogah, ki vključujejo več izvornih jezikov ali modalitet. Predlagamo dva nova pristopa za združevanje rezultatov mehanizmov pozornosti v vsakem zaporedju vira, ravno in hierarhično. Predlagane metode primerjamo z obstoječimi tehnikami in predstavljamo rezultate sistematičnega vrednotenja teh metod na nalogah WMT16 Multimodalnega prevajanja in avtomatskega post-urejanja. Pokazali smo, da predlagane metode dosegajo konkurenčne rezultate pri obeh nalogah.', 'bo': 'དབུལ ང་ཚོས་གསར་བ་དང་མཐུན་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཉམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དམིགས་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟངས་རེ་རེ་རེའི་ནང་ནས། We compare the proposed methods with existing techniques and present results of systematic evaluation of those methods on the WMT16 Multimodal Translation and Automatic Post-editing tasks. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཡིན་པ་'}
{'en': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'ar': 'نموذج عصبي لتحديد الموقع الجغرافي للمستخدم وعلم اللهجات المعجمي', 'es': 'Un modelo neuronal para la geolocalización de usuarios y la dialectología léxica', 'pt': 'Um modelo neural para geolocalização do usuário e dialetologia léxica', 'fr': 'Un modèle neuronal pour la géolocalisation des utilisateurs et la dialectologie lexicale', 'zh': '一以用户地词汇方言学神经法', 'ja': 'ユーザージオロケーションと語彙方言学のためのニューラルモデル', 'hi': 'प्रयोक्ता Geolocation और Lexical Dialectology के लिए एक तंत्रिका मॉडल', 'ru': 'Нейронная модель для геолокации пользователя и лексической диалектологии', 'ga': 'Samhail Néarach le haghaidh Geoshuíomh Úsáideora agus Canúint Fhoclóra', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρικό Μοντέλο Γεωεντοπισμού Χρήστη και Λεξικής Διαλεκτικής', 'hu': 'Neurális modell a felhasználói geolokációhoz és a lexikális dialektológiához', 'it': 'Un modello neurale per la geolocalizzazione degli utenti e la dialelettologia lessicale', 'lt': 'Naudotojo geolokacijos ir leksinės dialektologijos neuralinis modelis', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Неурален модел за геолокација на корисникот и лексикална дијалектологија', 'ms': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell Newrali għall-Ġeolokazzjoni tal-Utent u d-Dijalettoloġija Lessika', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч Geolocation болон Lexical Dialectology-ын мэдрэлийн загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model neuronowy dla geolokalizacji użytkownika i dialektologii leksykalnej', 'sr': 'Neuralni model za geolokaciju korisnika i leksičku dijalektologiju', 'ro': 'Un model neural pentru geolocalizarea utilizatorului și dialectologia lexică', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Model of Neural for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'sv': 'En neural modell för användargeolokalisering och Lexikal Dialektologi', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thần kinh cho địa vị người dùng và ngôn ngữ dược', 'hr': 'Neuralni model za geolokaciju korisnika i leksičku dijalektologiju', 'bg': 'Невроден модел за геолокация на потребителя и лексикална диалектология', 'da': 'En neural model til brugergeolocation og Lexical Dialektology', 'nl': 'Een neuraal model voor gebruikersgeolocatie en Lexical Dialectology', 'de': 'Ein neuronales Modell für Benutzergeolokalisierung und Lexische Dialektologie', 'id': 'Model Neural untuk Geolokasi Pengguna dan Dialektologi Lexik', 'ko': '사용자 지리적 포지셔닝과 어휘 방언학의 신경 모형', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Neural kwa Mtumiaji Geolocation and Lexico', 'sq': 'Një model neuronal për gjeologjinë e përdoruesve dhe dialektologjinë leksikale', 'tr': 'Ullançy Geolocation we Leksik Dialektologiýa üçin bir näral nusga', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'az': 'İstifadəçi Geolokasyonu və Leksik Dialektolojisi üçün Nöral Modeli', 'bn': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'ca': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'bs': 'Neuralni model za geolokaciju korisnika i leksičku dijalektologiju', 'cs': 'Neurální model pro geolokaci uživatelů a Lexickou dialektologii', 'et': 'Kasutaja geolokatsiooni ja leksikoloogia neuromudel', 'fi': 'Käyttäjän geolokaation ja leksikologian hermomalli', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology', 'sk': 'Živčni model za uporabniško geolokacijo in leksično dialektologijo', 'bo': 'A Neural Model for User Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology'}
{'en': 'We propose a simple yet effective text-based user geolocation model based on a neural network with one hidden layer, which achieves state of the art performance over three Twitter benchmark geolocation datasets, in addition to producing word and phrase embeddings in the hidden layer that we show to be useful for detecting dialectal terms. As part of our analysis of dialectal terms, we release DAREDS, a dataset for evaluating dialect term detection methods.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا بسيطًا وفعالًا لتحديد الموقع الجغرافي للمستخدم يعتمد على النص استنادًا إلى شبكة عصبية ذات طبقة مخفية واحدة ، مما يحقق أداءً متطورًا عبر ثلاث مجموعات بيانات لتحديد الموقع الجغرافي المعياري على تويتر ، بالإضافة إلى إنتاج كلمات وعبارات في الطبقة المخفية. تبين أنها مفيدة لاكتشاف المصطلحات اللهجة. كجزء من تحليلنا للمصطلحات اللهجة ، أصدرنا DAREDS ، وهي مجموعة بيانات لتقييم طرق اكتشاف مصطلح اللهجة.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle de géolocalisation utilisateur basé sur du texte simple mais efficace, basé sur un réseau de neurones avec une couche cachée, qui permet d'obtenir des performances de pointe sur trois ensembles de données de géolocalisation de référence Twitter, en plus de produire des intégrations de mots et de phrases dans la couche masquée que nous montrons utiles pour détection de termes dialectaux. Dans le cadre de notre analyse des termes dialectaux, nous publions DAREDS, un ensemble de données pour évaluer les méthodes de détection des termes dialectaux.", 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo de geolocalización de usuarios simple pero efectivo basado en texto basado en una red neuronal con una capa oculta, que logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en tres conjuntos de datos de geolocalización de referencia de Twitter, además de producir incrustaciones de palabras y frases en la capa oculta que demostramos ser útiles para detectar términos dialectales. Como parte de nuestro análisis de los términos dialectales, publicamos DAREDS, un conjunto de datos para evaluar los métodos de detección de términos dialectales.', 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo de geolocalização de usuário baseado em texto simples, mas eficaz, baseado em uma rede neural com uma camada oculta, que alcança desempenho de última geração em três conjuntos de dados de geolocalização de benchmark do Twitter, além de produzir embeddings de palavras e frases na camada oculta que nós mostram ser úteis para detectar termos dialetais. Como parte de nossa análise de termos dialetais, lançamos DAREDS, um conjunto de dados para avaliar métodos de detecção de termos dialetais.', 'zh': '吾举隐神经网络之微而效者,用户地理之形,自隐层中生单词、短语嵌之外,可以三Twitter准数集上成最先进之性,吾证其有用于检测方言术语也。 为方言术语分,吾发DAREDS,此一以质方言术语检测之数集也。', 'hi': 'हम एक छिपी हुई परत के साथ एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी पाठ-आधारित उपयोगकर्ता जियोलोकेशन मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो तीन ट्विटर बेंचमार्क जियोलोकेशन डेटासेट पर कला प्रदर्शन की स्थिति प्राप्त करता है, इसके अलावा छिपी हुई परत में शब्द और वाक्यांश एम्बेडिंग का उत्पादन करने के अलावा, जिसे हम द्वंद्वात्मक शब्दों का पता लगाने के लिए उपयोगी दिखाते हैं। बोलचाल की शर्तों के हमारे विश्लेषण के हिस्से के रूप में, हम DAREDS जारी करते हैं, जो बोली शब्द का पता लगाने के तरीकों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक डेटासेट है।', 'ja': '私たちは、1つの隠されたレイヤーを持つニューラルネットワークに基づいたシンプルで効果的なテキストベースのユーザージオロケーションモデルを提案します。これは、方言用語の検出に役立つことを示す隠されたレイヤーに単語とフレーズの埋め込みを生成することに加えて、3つのTwitterベンチマークジオロケーションデータセットにわたって最先端のパフォーマンスを達成します。方言用語の分析の一環として、方言用語検出方法を評価するためのデータセットであるDAREDSをリリースします。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем простую, но эффективную текстовую модель геолокации пользователей, основанную на нейронной сети с одним скрытым слоем, которая достигает современной производительности по трем наборам данных сравнительной геолокации Twitter, в дополнение к созданию вложений слов и фраз в скрытом слое, которые, как мы показываем, полезны для обнаружения диалектных терминов. В рамках нашего анализа диалектных терминов мы выпускаем DAREDS, набор данных для оценки методов определения диалектных терминов.', 'ga': 'Molaimid múnla geoshuímh úsáideora téacs-bhunaithe simplí ach éifeachtach bunaithe ar líonra néarúil le ciseal folaithe amháin, a bhainfidh an fheidhmíocht úrscothach amach thar thrí thacar sonraí geolocation tagarmharcála Twitter, chomh maith le leabaithe focal agus frása a tháirgeadh sa chiseal folaithe atá againn. thaispeáint a bheith úsáideach chun téarmaí canúinteacha a bhrath. Mar chuid dár n-anailís ar théarmaí canúinteacha, scaoilimid DAREDS, tacar sonraí chun modhanna braite téarma canúintí a mheas.', 'hu': 'Egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony szövegalapú felhasználói geolokációs modellt javasolunk, amely egy rejtett réteggel rendelkező neurális hálózaton alapul, és amely három Twitter benchmark geolokációs adatkészleten felül a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el, emellett szó- és kifejezési beágyazásokat készít a rejtett rétegbe, amelyek hasznosak a dialektuális kifejezések felismeréséhez. A dialektuális kifejezések elemzésének részeként kiadjuk a DAREDS adatkészletet, amely a dialektuális kifejezések detektálási módszereinek értékelésére szolgál.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα απλό αλλά αποτελεσματικό μοντέλο γεωεντοπισμού χρήστη βασισμένο σε κείμενο βασισμένο σε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο με ένα κρυφό στρώμα, το οποίο επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας πάνω από τρία σύνολα γεωεντοπισμού αναφοράς του εκτός από την παραγωγή ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και φράσεων στο κρυφό στρώμα που αποδεικνύουμε ότι είναι χρήσιμο για την ανίχνευση διαλεκτικών όρων. Στο πλαίσιο της ανάλυσης των διαλεκτικών όρων, κυκλοφορούμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την αξιολόγηση μεθόδων ανίχνευσης ορού διαλεκτικής.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მხოლოდ ტექსტის ზეოლოგიაციის მომხმარებელი მოდელი, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელზე ერთი დახმარებულია, რომელიც სამი Twitter ბენქმარკის ზეოლოგიაციის მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთა მდგომარე როგორც ჩვენი დიალექტალური სიტყვების ანალიზაციის ნაწილი, ჩვენ DAREDS-ს გახსნა, დიალექტური ტერმის განახსნა მეტისთვის განახსნა.', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello di geolocalizzazione utente semplice ma efficace basato su testo basato su una rete neurale con un livello nascosto, che raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia su tre set di dati di geolocalizzazione di riferimento Twitter, oltre a produrre incorporazioni di parole e frasi nel livello nascosto che dimostriamo utili per rilevare termini dialettali. Nell'ambito della nostra analisi dei termini dialettali, rilasciamo DAREDS, un dataset per valutare i metodi di rilevamento dei termini dialettali.", 'kk': 'Біз бір жасырын қабатты неврал желіне негізделген, бірақ мәтін негізделген пайдаланушылардың географиялық орналасуы үлгісін қолданамыз. Бұл үш Твиттер белгісінің географиялық деректер қорларының күйін жеткізеді. Біз жасырын қабатта сөз мен фраза Диалектикалық терминдердің анализациясының бір бөлігі болса, ДАРЕДС - диалекттік терминдерді анықтау әдістерін бағалау үшін деректер жиынын шығару.', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą tekstu pagrįstą naudotojo geolokacijos model į, pagrįstą neuraliniu tinklu su vienu paslėptu sluoksniu, kuris pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus per tris Twitter etaloninius geolokacijos duomenų rinkinius, be to, kad gaminami žodžiai ir frazės įdėjimai į paslėptą sluoksnį, kuris, kaip rodome, yra naudingas dialektiniams terminams aptikti. Kaip dalis mūsų dialektinių terminų analizės, mes išleidžiame DAREDS, duomenų rinkinį dialektinių terminų aptikimo metodams įvertinti.', 'ml': 'We propose a simple yet effective text-based user geolocation model based on a neural network with one hidden layer, which achieves state of the art performance over three Twitter benchmark geolocation datasets, in addition to producing word and phrase embeddings in the hidden layer that we show to be useful for detecting dialectal terms.  ഡയലക്ട്രിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡാറെഡിസിനെ വിടുന്നു. ഡയലക്ട്രെക്റ്റ് വാക്ക് കണ്ടെ', 'mn': 'Бид текст суурилсан хэрэглэгчийн географийн загварыг нэг нууцлаг хэлбэрээр суурилсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилуулдаг. Энэ нь бидний диалектикийн хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг үг болон хэлбэрээр бий болгох хэмжээний дараа гурван Твиттерийн багтах географийн өгөгдлийн сан дээр ур Диалектикийн томъёоны нэг хэсэг болгон, ДАРЕДС-г, диалектикийн томъёоны нээлтийн аргыг үнэлэх өгөгдлийн сан гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit enkelt, men effektivt tekstbasert brukargeoplasseringsmodell basert på eit neiralt nettverk med eit gøymd lag, som når kunstfullføringa er tilgjengeleg over tre datasett for geoplassering av Twitter-benchmarken, i tillegg til å produsere ord og fråinnbygging i det gøymde laget som vi viser nyttig for å finna dialektiske uttrykk. Som ein del av våre analyse av dialektiske uttrykk, så løyser vi DAREDS, ein dataset for evaluering av dialektuttrykk-metodar.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy prosty, ale skuteczny model geolokalizacji użytkownika oparty na tekstach oparty na sieci neuronowej z jedną ukrytą warstwą, który osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność na trzech zestawach geolokalizacyjnych Twittera, oprócz produkcji osadzeń słów i fraz w ukrytej warstwie, które okazujemy się przydatne do wykrywania terminów dialektalnych. W ramach analizy terminów dialektycznych wydajemy DAREDS, zbiór danych służący do oceny metod wykrywania terminów dialektowych.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model simplu, dar eficient de geolocalizare a utilizatorului bazat pe text bazat pe o rețea neurală cu un singur strat ascuns, care obține performanțe de ultimă oră peste trei seturi de date de geolocalizare Twitter benchmark, pe lângă producerea de cuvinte și fraze în stratul ascuns care ne arată a fi utile pentru detectarea termenilor dialectali. Ca parte a analizei noastre a termenilor dialectali, lansăm DAREDS, un set de date pentru evaluarea metodelor de detectare a termenilor dialecte.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudell sempliċi iżda effettiv tal-ġeolokazzjoni tal-utent ibbażat fuq it-test ibbażat fuq netwerk newrali b’saff wieħed moħbi, li jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta tal-ġeolokazzjoni ta’ parametri referenzjarji ta’ Twitter, flimkien mal-produzzjoni ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem u frażi fis-saff moħbi li juru li huma utli biex jinstabu termini dijalettiċi. Bħala parti mill-analiżi tagħna tat-termini dijalettiċi, nirrilaxxaw DAREDS, sett ta’ dejta għall-evalwazzjoni tal-metodi ta’ detezzjoni tat-termini dijalettiċi.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model geolokasi pengguna berdasarkan teks yang mudah dan berkesan berdasarkan rangkaian saraf dengan satu lapisan tersembunyi, yang mencapai prestasi seni di atas tiga set data geolokasi tanda referensi Twitter, selain menghasilkan penyampaian kata dan frasa dalam lapisan tersembunyi yang kami tunjukkan berguna untuk mengesan terma dialektal. As part of our analysis of dialectal terms, we release DAREDS, a dataset for evaluating dialect term detection methods.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo jednostavan, ali efikasan model geolokacije korisnika na tekstu baziran na neuralnoj mreži sa jednim skrivenim slojem, koji postigne stanje izvođenja umjetnosti preko tri serije geolokacije podataka o geolokaciji tvitera, osim proizvodnje riječi i fraza u skrivenom sloju koje pokazujemo korisno za otkrivanje dijalektnih termina. Kao deo naše analize dijalektalnih termina, oslobađamo DAREDS, set podataka za procjenu metoda detekcije dijalekta termina.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa tusaale sahlan oo faa’iido ah oo ku saleysan shabakad neural ah oo isku daran qarsoon ah, kaas oo faa’iido ku yeelanaya xaaladda farshaxanka oo ka badan saddex xafiiska meelaha lagu qoro ee Twita benchmark geo-location, ka sokow sameynta hadal iyo hadal ku dhex yaal darafka qarsoon oo aan u muujinno inay faa’iido u tahay in la ogaado qoraalka. Qayb ka mid ah baaritaankeenna qoraalka, waxaynu daahirinaa DAREDS, taas oo ah koox macluumaad ah oo ku qiimeynaya qaababka baaritaanka xiliga.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය හැබැයි පාළුවන් භාවිත ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නියුරාල ජාලයෙන් එක්ක හැංගිත ස්ථානය ස අපේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ කොටසක් විදිහට, අපි DAREDS විස්තර කරන්න, ඩායිලක්ට් වචන පරීක්ෂණ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න දත්ත ස', 'mk': 'Предложуваме едноставен, но ефикасен, текстовиот геолокациски модел на корисникот базиран на неурална мрежа со еден скриен слој, кој постигнува најсовремена резултат преку три геолокациски набори на Твитер, покрај производството на вградувања на зборови и фрази во скриениот слој кои покажуваме дека се корисни за детектирање на дија As part of our analysis of dialectal terms, we release DAREDS, a dataset for evaluating dialect term detection methods.', 'sv': 'Vi fﾃｶreslﾃ･r en enkel men effektiv textbaserad anvﾃ､ndargeolokaliseringsmodell baserad pﾃ･ ett neuralt nﾃ､tverk med ett dolt lager, som uppnﾃ･r toppmoderna prestanda ﾃｶver tre Twitter benchmark geolokaliseringsdata, fﾃｶrutom att producera ord och fraser inbﾃ､ddningar i det dolda lagret som vi visar vara anvﾃ､ndbara fﾃｶr att upptﾃ､cka dialektiska termer. Som en del av vﾃ･r analys av dialektiska termer slﾃ､pper vi DAREDS, ett dataset fﾃｶr utvﾃ､rdering av dialektiska termdetekteringsmetoder.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு மறைந்த அடுக்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள ஒரு புதிய பிணையத்தை அடிப்படையில் செயல்படுத்தும் சுலபமான ஆனாலும் செயல்படுத்தும் உரை அடிப்படையில் பயன்படுத்தும் பயனர் புதிய மாதிரி முறைமையை நிறைவ விளக்கச்சீட்டு வார்த்தைகளின் ஆய்வு ஒரு பகுதி', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل نیٹورک پر ایک مخفی لائر پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، جو تین ٹویٹر بنچم مارک جئوٹورک ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعے ایک ساده اور عمدہ متن بنیاد استعمال کی مدل کرتا ہے، جو ایک مخفی لائر میں لکھی ہوئی لئر میں لکھی ہوئی لئر اور عبارت کے مطابق لکھنے کے لئے فائدہ ہے۔ ہمارے دیالکتل ترمیم کی تحلیل کے ایک حصہ سے ہم DAREDS کو آزاد کرتے ہیں، دیالکت ترمیم ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کو آزاد کرنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Biz bir bekitilgan darajadagi bir necha tarmoq asosida ishlatilgan matn asosiy geometrli modelini tahlil qilamiz. U 3 ta Twitter benchmark geometrli maʼlumotlar bazasining holatini amalga oshirish mumkin. Dialektikal so'zlarimizning analyzerimizning qismlarimizga DAREDS, dialek soʻzni aniqlash usulini qiymatish uchun maʼlumot setini chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình văn bản đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả dựa trên một mạng thần kinh với một lớp ẩn, đạt được trình độ nghệ thuật cao hơn ba bộ dữ liệu địa điểm địa điểm trên Twitter, thêm vào việc sản xuất xuất xuất từ và cụm từ ngữ trong lớp ẩn mà chúng tôi cho thấy có ích để tìm ra các thuật ngữ địa. Chúng tôi phân tích ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi công bố DARPA, một tập dữ liệu để đánh giá phương pháp phát hiện ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме прост, но ефективен текстово-базиран потребителски геолокационен модел, базиран на невронна мрежа с един скрит слой, който постига най-съвременно представяне над три сравнителни геолокационни набора данни в допълнение към създаването на думи и фрази вградени в скрития слой, които доказваме като полезни за откриване на диалектални термини. Като част от нашия анализ на диалектните термини, ние публикуваме набор от данни за оценка на методите за откриване на диалектни термини.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein einfaches, aber effektives textbasiertes Benutzergeolokalisierungsmodell vor, das auf einem neuronalen Netzwerk mit einer versteckten Schicht basiert, das State-of-the-Art-Leistung über drei Twitter Benchmark-Geolokalisierungsdatensätze erreicht, zusätzlich zur Produktion von Wort- und Phrasenbebetten in der versteckten Schicht, die wir zeigen, dass sie nützlich für die Erkennung dialektaler Begriffe sind. Im Rahmen unserer Analyse dialektaler Begriffe veröffentlichen wir DAREDS, einen Datensatz zur Auswertung von Dialekttermdetektionsmethoden.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en enkel, men effektiv tekstbaseret brugergeolocationsmodel baseret på et neuralt netværk med ét skjult lag, som opnår topmoderne ydeevne over tre Twitter benchmark geolocation datasæt, ud over at producere ord og sætninger indlejringer i det skjulte lag, som vi viser at være nyttige til at detektere dialektiske termer. Som en del af vores analyse af dialektiske termer udgiver vi DAREDS, et datasæt til evaluering af dialektiske termdetekteringsmetoder.', 'nl': 'We stellen een eenvoudig maar effectief tekst-gebaseerd geolocatiemodel voor gebruikers voor gebaseerd op een neuraal netwerk met één verborgen laag, dat state-of-the-art prestaties bereikt over drie Twitter benchmark geolocatiegegevens, naast het produceren van woord- en zinsinsluitingen in de verborgen laag die we tonen nuttig te zijn voor het detecteren van dialectische termen. Als onderdeel van onze analyse van dialecte termen, brengen we DAREDS uit, een dataset voor het evalueren van dialecte termdetectiemethoden.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model geolokasi pengguna berdasarkan teks yang sederhana namun efektif berdasarkan jaringan saraf dengan satu lapisan tersembunyi, yang mencapai prestasi seni di atas tiga set data geolokasi benchmark Twitter, selain memproduksi kata dan frasa dalam lapisan tersembunyi yang kami tunjukkan berguna untuk mendeteksi istilah dialektal. Sebagai bagian dari analisis istilah dialektal kami, kami melepaskan DAREDS, sebuah set data untuk mengevaluasi metode deteksi istilah dialektal.', 'ko': '우리는 간단하고 효과적인 텍스트 기반의 사용자 지리적 포지셔닝 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 숨겨진 층을 가진 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 세 개의 트위터 기준 지리적 포지셔닝 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다. 또한 숨겨진 층에 단어와 짧은 말이 삽입되어 있어 사투리 용어를 검출하는 데 매우 유용하다.사투리 용어 분석의 일부로서, 우리는 사투리 용어의 검측 방법을 평가하는 데 사용되는 데이터 집합인 DAREDS를 발표했다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل جایگاه استفاده از متن بسیار ساده و تاثیر بر اساس یک شبکه عصبی با یک طبقه پنهان، که موقعیت فعالیت هنری را بر روی سه تنظیم داده\u200cهای جایگاهی جایگاهی ترویتر می\u200cرساند، در اضافه به تولید کردن کلمه و عبارت در طبقه پنهان که برای شناسایی شرایط دیال به عنوان بخشی از تحلیل شرایط دیالکتی ما، ما DAREDS را آزاد می کنیم، یک مجموعه داده برای ارزیابی روش شناسایی ترم دیالکتی.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo jednostavan, ali učinkovit model geolokacije korisnika na tekstu baziran na neuralnoj mreži s jednim skrivenim slojem, koji postigne stanje učinkovitosti umjetnosti preko tri seta geolokacije podataka o geolokaciji tviterskih kriterija, osim proizvodnje riječi i fraza u skrivenom sloju koje pokazujemo korisno za otkrivanje dijalektnih termina. Kao dio naše analize dijalektalnih uvjeta, oslobađamo DAREDS, set podataka za procjenu metoda otkrivanja dijalektnog termina.', 'tr': "Biz ýene gizli taýýarlar bilen daýanýarlar ýene-de ýeňil täsirli metin daýanýarlar geolokalizasyny teklip edip, bu şekilde biziň garaşan sözler we fraz daýatlaryny tapmak üçin faydaly bolar. dialektal termynlaryň bir bölegi bolsa, biz DAREDS'i, dialekt termyny tanyşdyrma yöntemlerini deňlemek üçin veri setirini çykarýarys.", 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige, nog effektief teksbaseerde gebruiker geoligging model gebaseer op 'n neurale netwerk met een verborge laag, wat bereik staat van die kuns prestasie oor drie Twitter benchmark geoligging datastelle, in addition to producing word and phrase embedding in the hidden layer that we show to be useful for detecting dialectal terms. As deel van ons analiseer van dialekte terme, verlos ons DAREDS, 'n datastel vir evaluering van dialekte term opdekking metodes.", 'sw': 'Tunawapendekeza mtindo rahisi na hata ufanisi wa kituo cha habari kinachotumika na mtandao wa neura wenye kiwango kimoja cha kujificha, ambacho kinafanikiwa hali ya utendaji wa sanaa zaidi ya seti za maeneo matatu ya bendera ya Twita, pamoja na kutengeneza maneno na maneno katika uwanja wa kujificha ambao tunaonyesha kuwa na manufaa kwa kutambua vipengele vya kidijitali. Kama sehemu ya uchambuzi wetu wa maneno ya dialectal, tunaachia DAREDS, seti ya taarifa kwa ajili ya kutathmini njia za uchunguzi wa muhula.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të thjeshtë, megjithatë efektiv të gjeolokalimit të përdoruesit bazuar në tekst bazuar në një rrjet nervor me një shtresë të fshehtë, i cili arrin shfaqjen më të lartë të teknologjisë mbi tre grupe të dhënash gjeolokalimi në Twitter, përveç prodhimit të përfshirjeve të fjalëve dhe frazave në shtresën e fshehtë që ne tregojmë se janë të dobishme për zbulimin e termave dialekt Si pjesë e analizës sonë të termave dialektale, ne lëshojmë DAREDS, një grup të dhënash për vlerësimin e metodave të zbulimit të termave dialektale.', 'am': 'በ አንዲት ደረጃ ላይ የተሸሸገ የጽሑፍ ተጠቃሚ የህዮአዊ መረብ ላይ የተመሳሳይ እና የጽሑፍ ቦታ አካባቢ አካል እና በተሰወረ ደረጃ ውስጥ ቃላት እና ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና በአካባቢው ደረጃዎች ላይ ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅመውን የዲያሌክራል ቋንቋዎችን ለማግኘት የሚጠቅመውን እና ቃላትን ለመጠቀም እናስገድል፡፡ ዳሌካዊ ቋንቋችን ለማስተዋል ክፍል፣ ዳሬድS (ዳሌክ term detection methods) ለማስተካከል የዳታ ሳጥን እናስወግዳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ, սակայն արդյունավետ տեքստի հիմնված օգտագործողի երկրագծի մոդել, որը հիմնված է նյարդային ցանցի վրա, որը ունի մեկ թաքնված շերտ, որը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին Թվիթերի երկրագծի երեք համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով, բառերի և արտահայտությունների ներդրումների արտադրման համար Որպես դիալեկտալ տերմինների վերլուծության մի մաս, մենք արտադրում ենք DAREDS-ը, որը դիալեկտալ տերմինների հայտնաբերման մեթոդների գնահատման տվյալների համակարգ է:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর ভিত্তিক কার্যকর একটি টেক্সট ভিত্তিক ব্যবহারকারী ভূমিকা মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যা একটি লুকিয়ে রেখেছে, যা তিন টুইটার বেঞ্চার্কের ভূমিকা ডাটাসেটের উপর শিল্পের অবস্থা  ডায়ালেকটাল শর্তের বিশ্লেষণের অংশ হিসেবে আমরা ডায়ালেক্টরের মাধ্যমে ডাটাসেট মুক্তি দেই।', 'az': "Biz təklif edirik ki, bir gizli səviyyədə olan nöral a ğ üstündə, üç Twitter benchmark geolokasyon verilənlərin üstündə, gizli səviyyədə yazılmış söz və fraz in şallarını ürəkləndirmək üçün faydalı göstərir. Diyalektal şartların analizimizin bir parçası olaraq, DAREDS'i, dialekt termini tanıtma metodlarını değerləşdirmək üçün verilən verilən qurğuları yayındırırıq.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme jednoduchý, ale efektivní textový geolokační model uživatelů založený na neuronové síti s jednou skrytou vrstvou, který dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu na třech referenčních geolokačních datových sadách Twitteru, kromě produkce vložení slov a frází do skryté vrstvy, které jsou užitečné pro detekci dialektálních termínů. V rámci analýzy dialektálních termínů vydáváme datovou sadu DAREDS pro hodnocení metod detekce dialektních termínů.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo jednostavan, ali efikasan model geolokacije korisnika na tekstu baziran na neuralnoj mreži sa jednim skrivenim slojem, koji postigne stanje učinkovitosti umjetnosti preko tri seta geolokacije podataka o geolokaciji tvitera, osim proizvodnje riječi i fraza u skrivenim slojem koji pokazuje da je korisno za otkrivanje dijalektnih termina. Kao dio naše analize dijalektnih termina, oslobodimo DAREDS, set podataka za procjenu metoda detekcije dijalektnog termina.', 'et': 'Pakume välja lihtsa, kuid efektiivse tekstipõhise kasutaja geolokatsioonimudeli, mis põhineb ühe peidetud kihiga neurovõrgul, mis saavutab kolme Twitteri võrdlusaluse geolokatsiooni andmekogumi tipptasemel jõudluse lisaks sõnade ja fraaside manustamisele peidetud kihis, mida näitame olevat kasulikud dialektiliste terminite tuvastamisel. Dialektiliste terminite analüüsi käigus anname välja DAREDS, andmekogumi dialektiliste terminite tuvastamise meetodite hindamiseks.', 'ca': "Proposem un model de geolocalització d'usuaris simple i efectiu basat en text basat en una xarxa neural amb una capa amagada, que aconsegueix un rendiment d'última generació a través de tres conjunts de dades geolocalitzades de referència de Twitter, a més de produir integracions de paraules i frases a la capa amagada que demostrem útils per detectar termes dialectals. Com part de la nostra anàlisi de termes dialectals, alliberam DAREDS, un conjunt de dades per avaluar mètodes de detecció de termes dialectals.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme yksinkertaista, mutta tehokasta tekstipohjaista k瓣ytt瓣j瓣geolokaatiomallia, joka perustuu yhden piilotetun kerroksen neuroverkkoon, joka saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn kolmen Twitter-vertailupaikkatietoaineiston yli sek瓣 tuottaa piilotettuun kerrokseen sanoja ja lauseita, joiden osoitamme olevan hy繹dyllisi瓣 dialektisten termien havaitsemisessa. Osana murretermien analyysi瓣 julkaisemme DAREDS-aineiston murretermien tunnistusmenetelmien arviointiin.', 'jv': 'We proposal a Simple and Effect text-basic user jelocation model supported on a Neral network with one hidden layer, that pans state of the arts success about 3 Google bench jelocation dataset, in Addition to manushing word and text embedding in the hidden layer that we show to be used for detecting dialectal terms. Tanggal urip dialectal sing dibutuhi, kita nambah DERED, dataset kanggo ngecat urip dialectal sing ditambah layar', 'sk': 'Predlagamo preprost, a učinkovit besedilni model geolokacije uporabnikov, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju z eno skrito plastjo, ki doseže najsodobnejšo zmogljivost preko treh referenčnih geolokacijskih naborov Twitterja, poleg tega pa ustvarja besedne in frazne vdelave v skrito plast, za katere dokazujemo, da so koristne pri odkrivanju dialektičnih izrazov. V okviru analize dialektičnih izrazov objavljamo DAREDS, nabor podatkov za ocenjevanje metod odkrivanja dialektičnih izrazov.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל גאומייקציה של משתמשים מבוסס בטקסט פשוט אך יעיל מבוסס על רשת עצבית עם שכבה אחת חבויה, אשר משיג את הצגה המאומנת במהלך שלושה קבוצות מידע גאומייקציה של תוויטר, בנוסף לייצור מילים ובמילים בתוך שכבה החבויה שאנחנו מראים שימושיים לגלות תנאים דיאלקטאליים. כחלק מהניתוח שלנו של התנאים הדיאלקטאליים, אנחנו משחררים DAREDS, קבוצת נתונים להערכה שיטות גילוי התנאים הדיאלקטאליים.', 'ha': "Munã buɗe wani misali na amfani da mazaɓa mai amfani da matsayin mai amfani da kwamfyuta a kan wani zane na neural da wani runduna ɓoye, wanda ke iya sãmun halin sanar da ke ƙara matsayin mazaɓa taki uku, da kuma, ka ƙara da ya sami maganar da fureta cikin fanel wanda za'a iya amfani da shi ga gane wa masu buƙata tsaro. Kama wani rabo na fassarar kayan yi wa-diakata, za'a saka DAERDS, wani tsari na danganiya dõmin ya yi evaluation ga metoden gane-zaƙatan.", 'bo': 'We propose a simple yet effective text-based user geolocation model based on a neural network with one hidden layer, which achieves state of the art performance over three Twitter benchmark geolocation datasets, in addition to producing word and phrase embeddings in the hidden layer that we show to be useful for detecting dialectal terms. As part of our analysis of dialectal terms, we release DAREDS, a dataset for evaluating dialect term detection methods.'}
{'en': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction : A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'ar': 'العمارة العصبية لاستخراج الارتباط الزمني: نهج Bi-LSTM للكشف عن الحاويات السردية', 'pt': 'Arquitetura Neural para Extração de Relações Temporais: Uma Abordagem Bi-LSTM para Detecção de Contêineres Narrativos', 'es': 'Arquitectura neuronal para la extracción de relaciones temporales: un enfoque bi-LSTM para detectar contenedores narrativos', 'fr': "Architecture neuronale pour l'extraction de relations temporelles\xa0: une approche bi-LSTM pour la détection de conteneurs narratifs", 'ja': '時間関係抽出のためのニューラルアーキテクチャ：ナラティブコンテナを検出するためのバイLSTMアプローチ', 'zh': '以时取神经架构:以检叙容器之双 LSTM 法', 'ru': 'Нейронная архитектура для извлечения временных связей: подход Bi-LSTM для обнаружения повествовательных контейнеров', 'hi': 'अस्थायी संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए तंत्रिका वास्तुकला: कथा कंटेनरों का पता लगाने के लिए एक द्वि-एलएसटीएम दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Ailtireacht Néarach le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh Ama: Cur Chuige Dé-LSTM chun Coimeádáin Inste a Bhrath', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική αρχιτεκτονική για την εξαγωγή προσωρινών σχέσεων: Μια προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση αφηγηματικών εμπορευματοκιβωτίων', 'hu': 'Idegi architektúra az időkapcsolat kivonásához: Bi-LSTM megközelítés a narrációs konténerek felismeréséhez', 'kk': 'Температуралық қатынастарды тарқату үшін нейрондық архитектура: Нарративті контейнерді анықтау үшін Bi- LSTM қатынасы', 'it': "Architettura neurale per l'estrazione di relazioni temporali: un approccio Bi-LSTM per la rilevazione di contenitori narrativi", 'mk': 'Неурална архитектура за екстракција на привремени односи: БИ-ЛСТМ пристап за детектирање на наративни контејнери', 'lt': 'Laikinojo santykio ekstrakcijos neurologinė architektūra: dviejų LSTM metodas narkotinių talpyklų aptikimui', 'ml': 'താല്\u200dപ്പരാല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിച്ചെക്റ്റര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Arkitettura Newrali għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Temporali: Approċċ Bi-LSTM għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Kontenituri Narrativi', 'ms': 'Arkitektur Neural untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Temporal: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'mn': 'Температурын харилцааны хамааралтын мэдрэлийн архитектур: Хэрвээ хамааралтай агуулагчдыг олохын тулд Bi-LSTM ойлголт', 'no': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction: A Bi- LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'ro': 'Arhitectura neurală pentru extragerea relațiilor temporale: o abordare bi-LSTM pentru detectarea containerelor narative', 'sr': 'Neuralna arhitektura za ekstrakciju temporalnih odnosa: Bi-LSTM pristup za otkrivanje narkotivnih kontejnera', 'pl': 'Architektura neuronowa do ekstrakcji relacji czasowych: podejście Bi-LSTM do wykrywania pojemników narracyjnych', 'si': 'තමුස්ථාව සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණ සංවිධානය: Bi- LSTM සම්බන්ධතාවක් හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction: En Bi-LSTM-metod för att upptäcka Narrativa Containers', 'ur': 'Temporal Relation Extraction for Neural Architecture: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'ta': 'தற்காலிக தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதலுக்கான நெருக்கமான பாதுகாப்பு', 'so': 'Arhitecture for temporary Relations Extraction: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thần kinh kiến trúc cho Lôi Đình Thời Gian: phương pháp Bi-LSTM để trinh sát các ngăn chặn lén lút.', 'bg': 'Неврозна архитектура за извличане на времеви взаимоотношения: Би-ЛСТМ подход за откриване на разказващи контейнери', 'nl': 'Neurale Architectuur voor Tijdelijke Relatie Extractie: Een Bi-LSTM benadering voor het Detecteren van Narratieve Containers', 'da': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction: En Bi-LSTM tilgang til detektering af fortællingsbeholdere', 'hr': 'Neuralna arhitektura za ekstrakciju vremenskih odnosa: Bi-LSTM pristup za otkrivanje narkotičnih kontejnera', 'de': 'Neuronale Architektur für die temporale Beziehungsextraktion: Ein Bi-LSTM-Ansatz zur Erkennung narrativer Container', 'id': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'fa': 'معماری عصبی برای اخراج رابطه\u200cهای Temporary: یک دسترسی BILSTM برای شناسایی کانتیرهای مصنوعی', 'ko': '시간 관계 추출의 신경 구조: 서사 용기를 검출하는 Bi-LSTM 방법', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wa kisasa kwa ajili ya kuondolewa kwa muda wa kuangaliwa na uhusiano wa muda: Utafiti wa Bi-LSTM kwa ajili ya Kutambua Contents Narrative', 'tr': 'Tymsal Baglanyşy Extraction: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'sq': 'Arkitektura neuronale për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të përkohshme: një metodë bi-LSTM për zbulimin e kontenitorëve narrativë', 'af': 'Neural Architecture for Temporal Relation Extraction: A Bi- LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'Temporal Relations Extraction for Neural Architecture: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers', 'hy': 'Ժամանակական հարաբերությունների արտադրման նյարդային արխեկտությունը. երկու-ԼՍԹՄ մոտեցում, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք նախապահպանակներ', 'bn': 'টেম্পুরাল সম্পর্ক এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশনের জন্য নিউরেল আর্কিটেক্টর: ন্যারেটিভ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিএলসিএম-এর কা', 'ca': "L'arquitectura neuronal per l'extracció de relacions temporals: Un enfocament biLSTM per detectar contenedors narratius", 'bs': 'Neuralna arhitektura za izvlačenje vremenskih odnosa: Bi-LSTM pristup za otkrivanje narkotičnih kontejnera', 'cs': 'Neuronová architektura pro extrakci časových vztahů: Bi-LSTM přístup pro detekci narativních kontejnerů', 'et': 'Neuraalne arhitektuur temporaalsete suhete ekstraheerimiseks: Bi-LSTM lähenemisviis narratiivsete konteinerite tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen arkkitehtuuri aikasuhteiden purkamiseen: Bi-LSTM-menetelmä narratiivisten konttien havaitsemiseen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Nevralna arhitektura za ekstrakcijo časovnih relacij: Bi-LSTM pristop za odkrivanje narativnih kontejnerjev', 'he': 'ארכיטקטורה עצבית לחלץ יחסים זמניים: גישה ביי-LSTM', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་ཞབས་འཛུགས་དང་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་དང་གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བ: A Bi-LSTM Approach for Detecting Narrative Containers'}
{'en': 'We present a neural architecture for containment relation identification between medical events and/or temporal expressions. We experiment on a corpus of de-identified clinical notes in English from the Mayo Clinic, namely the THYME corpus. Our model achieves an F-measure of 0.613 and outperforms the best result reported on this corpus to date.', 'ar': 'نقدم بنية عصبية لتحديد علاقة الاحتواء بين الأحداث الطبية و / أو التعبيرات الزمنية. نجرب على مجموعة من الملاحظات السريرية مجهولة الهوية باللغة الإنجليزية من Mayo Clinic ، وهي مجموعة THYME. يحقق نموذجنا مقياس F يبلغ 0.613 ويتفوق على أفضل نتيجة تم الإبلاغ عنها في هذه المجموعة حتى الآن.', 'es': 'Presentamos una arquitectura neuronal para la identificación de relaciones de contención entre eventos médicos y/o expresiones temporales. Experimentamos con un corpus de notas clínicas no identificables en inglés de Mayo Clinic, a saber, el cuerpo THYME. Nuestro modelo alcanza una medida F de 0.613 y supera el mejor resultado reportado en este corpus hasta la fecha.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma arquitetura neural para identificação da relação de contenção entre eventos médicos e/ou expressões temporais. Experimentamos um corpus de notas clínicas desidentificadas em inglês da Mayo Clinic, ou seja, o corpus THYME. Nosso modelo atinge uma medida F de 0,613 e supera o melhor resultado relatado neste corpus até o momento.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une architecture neuronale pour l'identification de la relation de confinement entre des événements médicaux et/ou des expressions temporelles. Nous expérimentons un corpus de notes cliniques anonymisées en anglais de la Mayo Clinic, à savoir le corpus THYME. Notre modèle atteint une mesure F de 0,613 et surpasse le meilleur résultat rapporté sur ce corpus à ce jour.", 'ja': '医学的事象および／または時間的表現の間の封じ込め関係を識別するための神経アーキテクチャを提示する。メイヨークリニックの英語の脱識別された臨床ノートのコーパス、すなわちサイリウムコーパスを実験しました。当社のモデルは、0.613のFメジャーを達成し、これまでにこのコーパスで報告された最高の結果を上回っています。', 'zh': '建一神经结构,以别医/、日月之间。 梅奥诊所(Mayo Clinic)之英语识临床笔记语料库上实验之,百里香语料库也。 吾形成 0.613 F 量,而优于迄今为止语料库上告之最也。', 'hi': 'हम चिकित्सा घटनाओं और / या अस्थायी अभिव्यक्तियों के बीच रोकथाम संबंध की पहचान के लिए एक तंत्रिका वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम मेयो क्लिनिक से अंग्रेजी में डी-आइडेंटिफाइड क्लिनिकल नोट्स के एक कॉर्पस पर प्रयोग करते हैं, अर्थात् थाइम कॉर्पस। हमारा मॉडल 0.613 का एफ-माप प्राप्त करता है और आज तक इस कॉर्पस पर रिपोर्ट किए गए सर्वोत्तम परिणाम को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем нейронную архитектуру для идентификации отношения сдерживания между медицинскими событиями и/или временными выражениями. Мы экспериментируем на корпусе деидентифицированных клинических записок на английском языке из клиники Майо, а именно на корпусе ТИМЬЯНА. Наша модель достигает F-измерения 0,613 и превосходит лучший результат, о котором сообщалось в этом корпусе на сегодняшний день.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid ailtireacht néarúil i láthair le haghaidh sainaithint gaol srianta idir imeachtaí leighis agus/nó nathanna ama. Déanaimid tástáil ar chorpas de nótaí cliniciúla dí-aitheanta i mBéarla ó Chlinic Mhaigh Eo, eadhon an corpas THYME. Baineann ár múnla amach beart-F de 0.613 agus sáraíonn sé an toradh is fearr a tuairiscíodh ar an gcorpas seo go dtí seo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღებთ ნეიროლური არქტიქტიკური განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებისთვის მედიცინური მოვლენების და/ან ტემპალური განსაზღვრებისთვის. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით კლინიკური კლინიკური მაიო კლინიკური კოპპუსის კოპუსიდან გამოვიყენებთ, რომელიც მათი კოპუსიდან. ჩვენი მოდელი 0.613-ის F-მაზიანი და უფრო მეტი გავაკეთება ამ კორპუსზე საუკეთესო შესახებ.', 'hu': 'Egy idegi architektúrát mutatunk be az orvosi események és/vagy időbeli kifejezések közötti elszigetelési kapcsolat azonosítására. Kísérletezünk egy angol nyelvű, de-azonosított klinikai jegyzetekből álló korpuszon, nevezetesen a THYME korpuszon. Modellünk 0,613 F-mértéket ér el, és túllépi az eddigi legjobb eredményt ebben a korpuszban.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νευρική αρχιτεκτονική για τον προσδιορισμό σχέσης περιορισμού μεταξύ ιατρικών συμβάντων ή/και χρονικών εκφράσεων. Πειραματιζόμαστε σε ένα σώμα μη ταυτοποιημένων κλινικών σημειώσεων στα αγγλικά από την Κλινική Μάγιο, δηλαδή το σώμα ΘΥΜΕ. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ένα μέτρο Φ 0.613 και ξεπερνά το καλύτερο αποτέλεσμα που αναφέρθηκε μέχρι σήμερα σε αυτό το σώμα.', 'it': "Presentiamo un'architettura neurale per l'identificazione delle relazioni di contenimento tra eventi medici e/o espressioni temporali. Sperimentiamo su un corpus di note cliniche de-identificate in inglese dalla Mayo Clinic, vale a dire il corpus THYME. Il nostro modello raggiunge una misura F di 0,613 e supera il miglior risultato riportato su questo corpus fino ad oggi.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame neurologinę architektūrą medicininių reiškinių ir (arba) laiko išraiškų ribojimo ryšio nustatymui. Eksperimentuojame su nenustatytų klinikinių pranešimų korpusu anglų kalba iš Majo klinikos, būtent THYME corpus. Mūsų modelis pasiekia F rodiklį 0,613 ir atitinka geriausią rezultatą, apie kurį iki šiol pranešta apie šį korpusą.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нервна архитектура за идентификација на врските помеѓу медицинските настани и/или временски изрази. Експериментираме на корпус од деидентификувани клинички ноти на англиски од клиниката Мајо, имено на корпусот ТИМЕ. Нашиот модел постигна F-мерка од 0,613 и го надминува најдобриот резултат известен за овој корпус досега.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur saraf untuk pengenalan hubungan penahanan antara peristiwa perubatan dan/atau ungkapan sementara. Kami eksperimen pada korpus nota klinik yang tidak dikenali dalam bahasa Inggeris dari Klinik Mayo, iaitu korpus THYME. Model kita mencapai F-ukuran 0.613 dan melampaui hasil terbaik yang dilaporkan pada korpus ini hingga sekarang.', 'ml': 'മെഡിക്കല്\u200d സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയിലുമുള്ള ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ഒരു പുരുതൽ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. മായോ ക്ലിനിക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും മായോ ക്ലിനിക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  Our model achieves an F-measure of 0.613 and outperforms the best result reported on this corpus to date.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw arkitettura newrali għall-identifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni ta’ trażżin bejn avvenimenti mediċi u/jew espressjonijiet temporali. Aħna ninsperimentaw fuq korpus ta ’ noti kliniċi li ma ġewx identifikati bl- Ingliż mill- Klinika Mayo, jiġifieri l- korpus THYME. Our model achieves an F-measure of 0.613 and outperforms the best result reported on this corpus to date.', 'mn': 'Бид эмнэлгийн үйл явдал болон/эсвэл хугацааны илэрхийллийн хоорондох хамааралтай байдлын мэдрэлийн архитектурыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид Англи хэлний англи хэлний дүгнэлтийн корпус дээр Майо Клиник-ээс туршилт хийдэг. Энэ нь тэдний корпус. Бидний загвар 0.613 хэмжээний F-хэмжээг гаргаж, энэ корпус дээрх хамгийн сайн үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein neuralarkitektur for identifikasjon av kontaktrelasjon mellom medisinske hendingar og/eller tidlegare uttrykk. Vi eksperimenterer på ein korpus av de-identifiserte kliniske notat i engelsk frå Mayo-klinikken, som er THYME corpus. Modellen vårt oppnår eit F-mål på 0,613 og utfører den beste resultatet som er rapportert på denne korpusen til dag.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy architekturę neuronową umożliwiającą identyfikację relacji przechowywania pomiędzy zdarzeniami medycznymi i/lub wyrażeniami czasowymi. Eksperymentujemy na korpusie dezidentyfikowanych notatek klinicznych w języku angielskim z Mayo Clinic, a mianowicie korpus THYME. Nasz model osiąga F-miarę 0.613 i przewyższa najlepszy wynik zgłoszony dotychczas na tym korpusie.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o arhitectură neurală pentru identificarea relaţiilor de izolare între evenimentele medicale şi/sau expresiile temporale. Experimentăm pe un corpus de note clinice dezidentificate în limba engleză de la Clinica Mayo, și anume corpul THYME. Modelul nostru atinge o măsură F de 0,613 și depășește cel mai bun rezultat raportat pe acest corpus până în prezent.', 'si': 'අපි වෛද්\u200dය සැකසුම් සහ/නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් සංවේශනය සඳහා නිර්මාණ අපි මායෝ ක්ලිනික් වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, මෙයාගේ කොර්පස්. අපේ මොඩේල් එක 0.613 විසින් F-මාර්ගයක් ලැබෙනවා ඒ වගේම මේ කොර්පුස් එක්ක හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩ කරනවා.', 'kk': 'Медицинские оқиғалар мен/немесе уақытша өрнектердің арасындағы қатынастық идентификациялау үшін невралдық архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Біз ағылшын тілінде де белгілі клиникалық ноттардың корпусынан, МАЙО Клинициясынан, МАЙ Корпус дегенді тәжірибедік. Біздің үлгіміз 0,613 деген F-өлшемін жеткізеді. Бұл корпустың ең жақсы нәтижесін жасайды.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu arhitekturu za identifikaciju veze sa zadržavanjem između medicinskih događaja i/ili temporalnih izraza. Eksperimentiramo na korpusu dezidentifikovanih kliničkih notova na engleskom jeziku iz Mayo Klinike, a to je njihov korpus. Naš model postiže F-mjeru od 0,613 i iznosi najbolji rezultat prijavljenog na ovom korpusu do sada.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismo neurada ah oo ku qoran aqoonsiga xiriirka ee dhacdooyinka caafimaadka iyo/ama hadalka ku meelgaarka ah. Waxaannu ku tijaabinaynaa qoraalka dhakhaatiirta ee lagu aqoonsaday afka Ingiriiska, kaniiniga Mayo ee THYME. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa F-qiyaas 0.613 kadibna wuxuu sameynayaa dhammaadka ugu fiican ee lagu soo sheegay korooskan ilaa maantadan.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en neural arkitektur för identifiering av inneslutningsrelationer mellan medicinska händelser och/eller temporala uttryck. Vi experimenterar på en korpus av de-identifierade kliniska anteckningar på engelska från Mayo Clinic, nämligen THYME corpus. Vår modell uppnår ett F-mått på 0,613 och överträffar det bästa resultat som rapporterats på denna korpus hittills.', 'ta': 'மருத்துவ நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும்/அல்லது கால வெளிப்படையான கூறுகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள தொடர்பு அடையாளம் கொண்டுள்ள ஒரு ப நாங்கள் மேயோ கிளினிக்கிலிக் இருந்து ஒரு கார்ப்ஸ் தெரியும் குறிப்புகளின் குறிப்பு மீது சோதனைப்படுகிறோம், THYME க எங்கள் மாதிரி 0.613-ன் F-அளவை பெறுகிறது மற்றும் இந்த கோப்புஸ் மீது அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட சிறந்த முடிவை செய்கிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل معماری پیش کرتے ہیں جو مدرسی اتفاقات اور/یا موقتی اثرات کے درمیان موجود تعریف کے لئے قائم رہنے والی تعریف کے لئے۔ ہم نے انگلیسی میں ناشناختہ کلینیک نوٹوں کے ایک کورپوس پر آزمائش کی، یعنی ان کی کورپوس سے۔ ہماری مدل 0.613 کی F-اندازہ پہنچتی ہے اور اس کورپوس پر یہاں تک بہترین نتیجہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz tibbiy hodisalar va/yoki vaqt ifodalar orasidan murojaat aniqlash uchun neyrolik arxituvchisini hozir qilamiz. Biz Mayo Clinicdan o'rganilgan klinik notatlarini ko'rinishimiz mumkin, THYME corpusi. Bizning modelimiz 0.613ning F ўлчовini topadi va har kuni bu kopus haqida berilgan eng yaxshi natijani bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc thần kinh để xác định mối quan hệ ngăn chặn giữa các sự kiện y tế và/hay biểu hiện thời gian. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm trên tập hợp các ghi chú lâm sàng được xác định bằng tiếng Anh từ phòng khám Mayo, là tập thể THYME. Mô hình của chúng ta đạt được hiệu ứng F của 0.63 và đạt được kết quả tốt nhất được báo cáo trên tập đoàn này.', 'bg': 'Представяме невронна архитектура за идентифициране на връзката между медицински събития и/или времеви изрази. Експериментираме върху корпус от деидентифицирани клинични бележки на английски език от клиника Майо, а именно корпуса ТЙМЕ. Нашият модел постига мярка от 0.613 и превъзхожда най-добрия докладван резултат за този корпус до момента.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en neural arkitektur til identifikation af indeslutningsforhold mellem medicinske hændelser og/eller tidsmæssige udtryk. Vi eksperimenterer på et korpus af de-identificerede kliniske noter på engelsk fra Mayo Clinic, nemlig THYME korpus. Vores model opnår et F-mål på 0,613 og overgår det bedste resultat rapporteret på dette korpus til dato.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu arhitekturu za identifikaciju veze s zadržavanjem između medicinskih događaja i/ili privremenih izraza. Eksperimentiramo na korpusu dezidentificiranih kliničkih notova na engleskom jeziku iz Mayo Clinika, a to je njihov korpus. Naš model postiže F-mjeru od 0,613 i iznosi najbolji rezultat prijavljenog na ovom korpusu do sada.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een neurale architectuur voor identificatie van containment relaties tussen medische gebeurtenissen en/of temporele expressies. We experimenteren op een corpus van de-geïdentificeerde klinische aantekeningen in het Engels van de Mayo Clinic, namelijk het THYME corpus. Ons model bereikt een F-maat van 0.613 en presteert beter dan het beste resultaat dat tot nu toe op dit corpus is gerapporteerd.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan arsitektur saraf untuk identifikasi hubungan penahanan antara peristiwa medis dan/atau ekspresi temporal. Kami eksperimen pada tubuh catatan klinis yang tidak dikenal dalam bahasa Inggris dari Klinik Mayo, yaitu tubuh THYME. Model kita mencapai F-ukuran 0,613 dan melebihi hasil terbaik yang dilaporkan pada korpus ini sampai sekarang.', 'ko': '우리는 의학 사건과/또는 시간 표현식 사이에 관계를 포함하는 신경 구조를 식별하는 데 사용한다.우리는 메오클리닉(Mayo Clinic)의 비식별 영문 임상 필기 자료 라이브러리(즉 백리향 자료 라이브러리)에서 실험을 진행했다.우리의 모델은 0.613의 F-도량을 실현했고 지금까지 이 어료 라이브러리에서 보고한 가장 좋은 결과보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine neuronale Architektur zur Identifikation von Containment Relations zwischen medizinischen Ereignissen und/oder zeitlichen Ausdrücken. Wir experimentieren mit einem Korpus von entidentifizierten klinischen Notizen in englischer Sprache der Mayo Clinic, nämlich dem THYME-Korpus. Unser Modell erreicht ein F-Maß von 0.613 und übertrifft das bisher beste Ergebnis dieses Korpuss.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری عصبی را برای شناسایی ارتباط تحمل بین اتفاقات پزشکی و/یا توضیح موقتی نشان می دهیم. ما روی یک کورپوس از نوشته های کلینیکی ناشناخته شده در انگلیسی از کلینیک مایو آزمایش می کنیم، یعنی کورپوس اونها. مدل ما به اندازه 0.613 می رسد و بهترین نتیجه گزارش داده شده در این کورپوس به حال انجام می دهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kujenga majengo ya kisasa kwa ajili ya kutambua uhusiano kati ya matukio ya kitabibu na/au maoni ya muda. Tunazijaribu kwenye viungo vya vipindi vya kliniki vilivyotambuliwa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza kutoka Kikliniki cha Mayo, yaani kampuni ya THYME. Mfano wetu unafanikiwa kipimo cha F cha 0.613 na kinafanya matokeo bora zaidi yaliyoripotiwa kwenye mashindano haya mpaka sasa.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n neurale arkitektuur voor bevestiging van bevestiging verhouding tussen mediese gebeurtenis en/of tydelike uitdrukkings. Ons eksperimenteer op 'n korpus van de-identifiseerde kliniese notas in Engels van die Mayo Clinic, bedoel die daardie korpus. Ons model bereik 'n F-maat van 0.613 en uitvoer die beste resultaat wat op hierdie korpus tot dag berig is.", 'tr': 'Biz tıbbi durumlar we/ýa zamaly ifadeler arasynda saklanmak üçin bir nöral arhitektura görkezip otyrýarys. Biz Mayo Klinikiýanyň iňlisçe tanyş edilen kliniki notlaryň köpüsi üstünde synanyşýarys. Biziň nusgamyz 0.613 ýagdaýynda bir F ölçüsi bar we şu wagtda berilen iň gowy netijeden çykar.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një arkitekturë nervore për identifikimin e lidhjes me pengimin midis ngjarjeve mjekësore dhe/ose shprehjeve të përkohshme. Eksperimentojmë në një korpus të shënimeve klinike të zhdukura në anglisht nga Klinika Mayo, veçanërisht korpus THYME. Modeli ynë arrin një matje F prej 0.613 dhe arrin rezultatin më të mirë të raportuar në këtë korpus deri tani.', 'am': 'በጥምቀት ሁኔታ እና/ወይም በጊዜው አካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነት ማውቀት የሚችሉትን የናቡር መሠረት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የማየ ኪሊኪን ካርፓስ፣ የቴይሜ ካርፓስ በሚባል በንግግሊዝኛ ግንኙነት የቆንጆ ቋንቋዎችን እናፈትናለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የ0.613 መስኮት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz təhsil olaraq və/yaxud müddətli ifadələr arasında müəyyən edilməsi üçün nöral arhitektir göstəririk. Biz Mayo Klinikindən təşkil edilmiş klinik notların korpusu ilə təşkil edirik, bu da onların korpusu. Bizim modelimiz 0.613 ölçüsünün F-ölçüsünü başa çatdı və bu korpus haqqında bildirilmiş ən yaxşı sonuçlarını daha üstün etdi.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի բժշկական իրադարձությունների և Մենք փորձում ենք Մայո կլինիկայից անգլերենում բացահայտված կլինիկական նոտաների մի մարմնի վրա, հատկապես THYme մարմնի վրա: Our model achieves an F-measure of 0.613 and outperforms the best result reported on this corpus to date.', 'bn': 'আমরা চিকিৎসা অনুষ্ঠান এবং/অথবা সাময়িক প্রকাশের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক নিয়ন্ত্রণের জন্য একটি নিউরুল কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করছি। আমরা মায়ো ক্লিনিক থেকে চিহ্নিত ক্লিনিক নোটের একটি কোর্পাসে পরীক্ষা করছি, যার মধ্যে থাইম কোর্পাস। আমাদের মডেল 0.613 এর এক F-মাপ অর্জন করে এবং এখন পর্যন্ত এই কোর্পাসে রিপোর্ট করা সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল প্রদান করে।', 'ca': "Presentam una arquitectura neuronal per identificar la relació de conteniment entre esdeveniments mèdics i/o expressions temporals. Experimentem en un corpus de notes clíniques desedentificades en anglès de la Clínica Mayo, a saber, el corpus THYME. El nostre model aconsegueix una mesura F de 0,613 i supera el millor resultat que s'ha informat en aquest cos fins ara.", 'cs': 'Představujeme neuronovou architekturu pro identifikaci uzavřených vztahů mezi lékařskými událostmi a/nebo časovými výrazy. Experimentujeme na korpusu deidentifikovaných klinických poznámek v angličtině z Mayo Clinic, konkrétně korpusu THYME. Náš model dosahuje F-míry 0.613 a překonává dosud nejlepší výsledek uvedený na tomto korpusu.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu arhitekturu za identifikaciju veze sa zadržavanjem između medicinskih događaja i/ili privremenih izraza. Eksperimentiramo na korpusu dezidentificiranih kliničkih notova na engleskom jeziku iz Mayo Clinika, a to je njihov korpus. Naš model postiže F-mjeru od 0,613 i iznosi najbolji rezultat izvješćenog na ovom korpusu do sada.', 'et': 'Esitame närviarhitektuuri meditsiiniliste sündmuste ja/või ajaliste väljendite vaheliste piiramissuhete tuvastamiseks. Me eksperimenteerime Mayo kliiniku ingliskeelse identifitseeritud kliiniliste märkmete korpusega, nimelt THYME korpusega. Meie mudel saavutab F-mõõdu 0,613 ja ületab selle korpuse parimat tulemust seni.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme neuroarkkitehtuurin lääketieteellisten tapahtumien ja/tai ajallisten ilmaisujen välisen eristämissuhteen tunnistamiseksi. Kokeilemme Mayo Clinicin englanninkielistä tunnistamattomia kliinisiä muistiinpanoja eli THYME-korpusta. Mallimme saavuttaa F-mittarin 0,613 ja ylittää parhaan tähän mennessä raportoidun tuloksen.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה עצבית לזהות יחסים בין אירועים רפואיים ו/או ביטויים זמניים. אנחנו מנסים על קורפוס של פתקים קליניים לא מזוהים באנגלית מהקליניקה של מאיו, כלומר הקורפוס של THYME. המודל שלנו משיג F-מדידה של 0.613 ומביא את התוצאה הטובה ביותר לדווח על הקורפוס הזה עד היום.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani matsayin neura wanda ke samun bayani na haɗi da mazaɓa tsakanin takarda da/ko magana masu lokaci. Tuna jarraba a kope of de-defined nicknames in English from the Mayo clicknic, nothin TRYME. Tuddalinmu yana sãmu an F-ma'aunin 0.613 kuma yana samar da mafi kyaun fassarar abin da aka sanar da shi a yanzu.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nevronsko arhitekturo za identifikacijo zadrževalnih relacij med medicinskimi dogodki in/ali časovnimi izrazi. Eksperimentiramo na korpusu deidentificiranih kliničnih zapiskov v angleščini iz klinike Mayo, in sicer korpusu THYME. Naš model dosega F-merilo 0,613 in presega najboljši rezultat, o katerem so poročali doslej.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringClone Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan anyari dadi nggagané pancening nggambar nggambar barang urip nggambar barang nggambar barang-urip nggagané Panjenenganié Awak dhéwé iso nggawe parang F-measurement kanggo 0.6 karo ngono nggawe barang kanggo barang kanggo ngerasahan barang iki dadi.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསེར་སྒེར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང/ཡང་ན་གནས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་མཚུངས་པའི་སྒུལ་ཆས་གཞུང་བཟོ་བཅོས ང་ཚོས་གླིང་སྒྲོམ་(Mayo Clinic)ལས་ཨིན་ཡིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མིང་དང་མིང་ཐོག་པའི་ནང་གི་སྒེར་གནང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་ཚད་0.613་ལས་མཐུན་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'How to Make Context More Useful? An Empirical Study on Context-Aware Neural Conversational Models', 'ar': 'كيف تجعل السياق أكثر فائدة؟ دراسة تجريبية على نماذج المحادثة العصبية الواعية بالسياق', 'fr': 'Comment rendre le contexte plus utile\xa0? Une étude empirique sur les modèles conversationnels neuronaux sensibles au contexte', 'es': '¿Cómo hacer que el contexto sea más útil? Un estudio empírico sobre modelos conversacionales neuronales sensibles al contexto', 'pt': 'Como tornar o contexto mais útil? Um estudo empírico sobre modelos de conversação neural sensíveis ao contexto', 'ja': 'コンテキストをより便利にするにはどうすればよいですか？文脈意識ニューラル会話モデルに関する実証的研究', 'zh': '何以益上下文? 情境感知神经会话模范之实', 'hi': 'Context को और अधिक उपयोगी कैसे बनाएं? संदर्भ-जागरूक तंत्रिका संवादात्मक मॉडल पर एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Как сделать контекст более полезным? Эмпирическое исследование контекстно-зависимых нейронных дискуссионных моделей', 'ga': 'Conas Comhthéacs a Dhéanamh Níos Úsáidí? Staidéar Eimpíreach ar Mhúnlaí Comhrá Néaracha ar an gComhthéacs', 'ka': 'როგორ გამოყენება კონტექსტის უფრო გამოყენებელი? კონტექსტური განვიხსოვრებული ნეირალური კონტაქციო მოდელების შესახებ', 'el': 'Πώς να κάνετε το περιβάλλον πιο χρήσιμο; Εμπειριακή Μελέτη για Νευρικά Μοντέλα Συνοχής', 'hu': 'Hogyan lehet hasznosabbá tenni a kontextust? Empirikus tanulmány a kontextustudatos neurális beszélgetési modellekről', 'it': 'Come rendere il contesto più utile? Uno studio empirico sui modelli di conversazione neurali consapevoli del contesto', 'kk': 'Контексті қалай пайдаланушы болады? Контексті түсінікті нейралық қатынау үлгілері туралы империялық оқу', 'lt': 'Kaip padaryti kontekstą naudingesnį? An Empirical Study on Context-Aware Neural Conversational Models', 'mk': 'Како да го направиме контекстот покорисен? Name', 'ms': 'Bagaimana membuat Konteks lebih berguna? Name', 'mn': 'Яаж контекст илүү ашигтай болгох вэ? Контекст-Aware Neural Conversation Models', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതെങ്ങനെ? എക്സ്റ്റെന്റ്- അറിയുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഒരു എമിരിക്കല്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Kif għandek tagħmel il-kuntest aktar utli? Studju Impiriku dwar Mudelli ta’ Konverżjoni Newrali Konxji mill-Kuntest', 'no': 'Korleis kontekst skal vera nyttig? Name', 'pl': 'Jak uczynić kontekst bardziej użytecznym? Badanie empiryczne na temat kontekstowych neuronowych modeli konwersacji', 'ro': 'Cum de a face contextul mai util? Un studiu empiric privind modelele conversaționale neurale conștiente de context', 'sr': 'Kako napraviti kontekst korisniji? Impiričko istraživanje o neuralnim razgovornim modelima', 'si': 'කොහොමද සංවේදනය වැඩිය පාවිච්චි කරන්න? සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාකාරණ මොඩේල්', 'so': 'Sidee aad uga samaysaa wax faa’iido dheeraad ah? An Empirical Study on Context-Aware Neural Conversational Models', 'sv': 'Hur man gör sammanhanget mer användbart? En empirisk studie om kontextmedvetna neurala konversationsmodeller', 'ta': 'எப்படி உள்ளடக்கத்தை மேலும் பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும்? Name', 'ur': 'کیسے کنٹکسٹ مہربانی کرنا؟ Context-Aware Neural Conversational Models', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Làm sao để ngữ cảnh hữu dụng hơn? A Empirical study on Contquent-Nhận Neural Conversation Models', 'bg': 'Как да направим контекста по-полезен? Емпирично проучване на невралните модели за разговор, осъзнаващи контекста', 'nl': 'Hoe maak je context nuttiger? Een empirische studie naar contextbewuste neurale conversatiemodellen', 'de': 'Wie kann man Kontext nützlicher machen? Eine empirische Studie zu kontextbewussten neuronalen Gesprächsmodellen', 'hr': 'Kako učiniti kontekst korisnijim? Empiričko ispitivanje o Neuralnim razgovornim modelima s uvjerenjem konteksta', 'da': 'Hvordan man gør kontekst mere nyttig? Et empirisk studie om kontekstbevidste neurale samtalemodeller', 'fa': 'چگونه قرار دادن محیط بیشتر مفید باشد؟ یک مطالعه امپراتیک در مورد مدل\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cهای عصبی آگاهی متن', 'id': 'Bagaimana membuat konteks lebih berguna? Sebuah Studi Kekaisaran mengenai Model Konversiasi Neural Aware-Konteks', 'tr': 'Konteksti nädip faydalandyrmaly? Kontekst-duýgunlaşdyryş Nusgala Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Inawezaje kufanya Maudhui yanayotumika zaidi? Utafiti wa Utamaduni kwenye Modeli za Mazungumzo ya Kimataifa', 'ko': '어떻게 상하문을 더욱 유용하게 합니까?어경 감지 신경 회화 모델의 실증 연구', 'af': 'Hoe om Konteks meer gebruik te maak? Name', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս ավելի օգտակար դարձնել կոնտեքստը: Իմպրիկական ուսումնասիրություն, որը վերաբերում է համատեքստի գիտակցած նեյրոնային հաղորդակցման մոդելներին', 'sq': 'Si të bësh kontekstin më të dobishëm? Një studim perandor mbi modelet e bisedës nervore të ndërgjegjshme në kontekst', 'am': 'ይዞታዎች የውይይት መረጃ', 'az': 'Konteksti necə daha faydalandıracaq? Context-Aware Neural Qonuşma Modelləri', 'bn': 'কিভাবে বিষয়বস্তু আরও ব্যবহার করা হবে? Name', 'bs': 'Kako učiniti kontekst korisnijim? Empiričko istraživanje o Neuralnim razgovornim modelima na kontekstu', 'cs': 'Jak udělat kontext užitečnější? Empirická studie o kontextově orientovaných neuronových konverzačních modelech', 'et': 'Kuidas muuta kontekst kasulikumaks? Kontekstiteadlike neuraalsete vestlusmudelite empiiriline uuring', 'fi': 'Miten tehdä kontekstista hyödyllisempi? Empiirinen tutkimus kontekstitiivisistä hermokeskusteluista', 'ca': 'Com fer el context més útil? Un estudi empíric sobre models de conversació neuronal conscients del context', 'jv': 'Kijane Teko Kontext Wuterakno? Workspace', 'sk': 'Kako narediti kontekst bolj koristen? Empirična študija o živčnih pogovornih modelih, ki se zavedajo konteksta', 'ha': '@ action: button KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'איך להפוך את הקשר שימושי יותר? מחקר אימפריקלי על מודלים שיחה נוירואלים מודעים לקונקסט', 'bo': 'ཇི་ལྟར་ཞིབ་ཡི་གེས་ཡུན་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པར་བཟོ་དགོས་སམ Context-Aware Neural Conversational Models'}
{'en': 'Generative conversational systems are attracting increasing attention in natural language processing (NLP). Recently, researchers have noticed the importance of context information in dialog processing, and built various models to utilize context. However, there is no systematic comparison to analyze how to use context effectively. In this paper, we conduct an empirical study to compare various models and investigate the effect of context information in dialog systems. We also propose a variant that explicitly weights context vectors by context-query relevance, outperforming the other baselines.', 'ar': 'تجذب أنظمة المحادثة التوليدية اهتمامًا متزايدًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). لاحظ الباحثون مؤخرًا أهمية معلومات السياق في معالجة الحوار ، وقاموا ببناء نماذج مختلفة لاستخدام السياق. ومع ذلك ، لا توجد مقارنة منهجية لتحليل كيفية استخدام السياق بشكل فعال. في هذه الورقة ، نجري دراسة تجريبية لمقارنة النماذج المختلفة والتحقيق في تأثير معلومات السياق في أنظمة الحوار. نقترح أيضًا متغيرًا يرجح صراحة متجهات السياق من خلال صلة استعلام السياق ، متفوقًا على خطوط الأساس الأخرى.', 'fr': "Les systèmes conversationnels génératifs attirent de plus en plus l'attention dans le traitement du langage naturel (PNL). Récemment, les chercheurs ont remarqué l'importance des informations contextuelles dans le traitement des dialogues et ont élaboré divers modèles pour utiliser le contexte. Cependant, il n'existe aucune comparaison systématique permettant d'analyser la façon d'utiliser le contexte de manière efficace. Dans cet article, nous menons une étude empirique pour comparer différents modèles et étudier l'effet des informations contextuelles dans les systèmes de dialogue. Nous proposons également une variante qui pondère explicitement les vecteurs de contexte en fonction de la pertinence de la requête contextuelle, surpassant ainsi les autres lignes de base.", 'pt': 'Sistemas de conversação generativos estão atraindo cada vez mais atenção no processamento de linguagem natural (PNL). Recentemente, pesquisadores perceberam a importância das informações de contexto no processamento de diálogos e construíram vários modelos para utilizar o contexto. No entanto, não há comparação sistemática para analisar como usar o contexto de forma eficaz. Neste artigo, realizamos um estudo empírico para comparar vários modelos e investigar o efeito das informações de contexto em sistemas de diálogo. Também propomos uma variante que pondera explicitamente os vetores de contexto pela relevância da consulta de contexto, superando as outras linhas de base.', 'es': 'Los sistemas conversacionales generativos están atrayendo cada vez más la atención en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Recientemente, los investigadores han notado la importancia de la información de contexto en el procesamiento de diálogos y han creado varios modelos para utilizar el contexto. Sin embargo, no hay una comparación sistemática para analizar cómo usar el contexto de manera efectiva. En este artículo, realizamos un estudio empírico para comparar varios modelos e investigar el efecto de la información de contexto en los sistemas de diálogo. También proponemos una variante que pondera explícitamente los vectores de contexto según la relevancia de la consulta de contexto, superando a las otras líneas base.', 'ja': '生成会話システムは、自然言語処理（ NLP ）においてますます注目を集めている。最近、研究者は、ダイアログ処理におけるコンテキスト情報の重要性に気付き、コンテキストを利用するための様々なモデルを構築しました。しかし、コンテキストを効果的に使用する方法を分析するための体系的な比較はありません。本稿では、様々なモデルを比較し、ダイアログシステムにおける文脈情報の効果を調査するための実証的研究を行う。また、コンテキストクエリの関連性によってコンテキストベクトルを明示的に重み付けし、他のベースラインを上回るバリアントも提案します。', 'zh': '生成式会话系自然语言处(NLP)中日益多。 近者,治人留意上下文信在言要,立诸模形以用上下文。 然未有系统较之以效上下文。 本文以实考之,比之上下文信于言统。 又立一变体,当变体因上下文问相关性显式加权上下文向量,优于他基线。', 'ru': 'Генеративные разговорные системы привлекают все большее внимание в обработке естественного языка (NLP). Недавно исследователи заметили важность контекстной информации в обработке диалога и построили различные модели для использования контекста. Однако систематического сравнения для анализа того, как эффективно использовать контекст, не существует. В данной работе мы проводим эмпирическое исследование для сравнения различных моделей и исследования влияния контекстной информации в диалоговых системах. Мы также предлагаем вариант, который явно взвешивает контекстные векторы по релевантности контекстного запроса, превосходя другие базовые линии.', 'hi': 'उत्पादक संवादात्मक प्रणालियां प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) में बढ़ते ध्यान को आकर्षित कर रही हैं। हाल ही में, शोधकर्ताओं ने संवाद प्रसंस्करण में संदर्भ जानकारी के महत्व को देखा है, और संदर्भ का उपयोग करने के लिए विभिन्न मॉडल बनाए हैं। हालांकि, संदर्भ का प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग करने के तरीके का विश्लेषण करने के लिए कोई व्यवस्थित तुलना नहीं है। इस पेपर में, हम विभिन्न मॉडलों की तुलना करने और संवाद प्रणालियों में संदर्भ जानकारी के प्रभाव की जांच करने के लिए एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन करते हैं। हम एक संस्करण का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो स्पष्ट रूप से संदर्भ-क्वेरी प्रासंगिकता द्वारा संदर्भ वैक्टर को वजन देता है, अन्य बेसलाइन को पछाड़ता है।', 'ga': 'Tá aird mhéadaitheach á tarraingt ar chórais chomhrá giniúna i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha (NLP). Le déanaí, thug taighdeoirí faoi deara an tábhacht a bhaineann le faisnéis chomhthéacs i bpróiseáil dialóige, agus tógadh samhlacha éagsúla chun úsáid a bhaint as comhthéacs. Mar sin féin, níl aon chomparáid chórasach ann chun anailís a dhéanamh ar conas comhthéacs a úsáid go héifeachtach. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar eimpíreach chun samhlacha éagsúla a chur i gcomparáid agus chun éifeacht na faisnéise comhthéacs ar chórais dialóige a imscrúdú. Molaimid freisin malairt a dhéanann veicteoirí comhthéacs a ualú go sainráite de réir ábharthacht ceisteanna comhthéacs, a sháraíonn na bonnlínte eile.', 'ka': 'განვითარებული კონფიგურაციული სისტემები უფრო მეტი ახალგაზრდება ბუნებური ენის პროცესი (NLP). მიმდინარე, შესწავლობელი დააჩვენეთ კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის მნიშვნელობა დიალოგის პროცესი და განსხვავებული მოდელები, რომლებიც კონტექსტურის გამ მაგრამ არსებობს სისტემატიური შემდგომარება, როგორ ეფექტიურად გამოყენება. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ ემპერიკალური სწავლის გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული მოდელების შესაბამისთვის და განსხვავება კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის ეფექტის დიალოგი ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ გარიანტი, რომელიც კონტექსტური კონტექსტური გვექტორებით კითხვის მნიშვნელობით გამოყენება, სხვა ფექსტური ხაზების გარეშე.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα γενικής συνομιλίας προσελκύουν αυξανόμενη προσοχή στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας (NLP). Πρόσφατα, οι ερευνητές παρατήρησαν τη σημασία των πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος στην επεξεργασία διαλόγου, και έχτισαν διάφορα μοντέλα για να χρησιμοποιήσουν το πλαίσιο. Ωστόσο, δεν υπάρχει συστηματική σύγκριση για να αναλύσει πώς να χρησιμοποιήσει αποτελεσματικά το πλαίσιο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια εμπειρική μελέτη για να συγκρίνουμε διάφορα μοντέλα και να διερευνήσουμε την επίδραση των πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος στα συστήματα διαλόγου. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια παραλλαγή που σταθμίζει ρητά τα διανύσματα περιβάλλοντος με συνάφεια ερωτήματος περιβάλλοντος, ξεπερνώντας τις άλλες γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'A generációs beszélgetési rendszerek egyre nagyobb figyelmet keltenek a természetes nyelvfeldolgozásban (NLP). A közelmúltban a kutatók észrevették a kontextus információk fontosságát a párbeszédfeldolgozásban, és különböző modelleket építettek fel a kontextus használatára. Nincs azonban szisztematikus összehasonlítás annak elemzésére, hogyan lehet hatékonyan használni a kontextust. Ebben a tanulmányban empirikus tanulmányt végzünk különböző modellek összehasonlítására és a kontextus információk hatásának vizsgálatára párbeszédrendszerekben. Javasolunk egy olyan változatot is, amely kifejezetten súlyozza a kontextusvektorokat kontextus-lekérdezés relevanciája szerint, felülmúlva a többi alapvonalat.', 'it': "I sistemi conversazionali generativi stanno attirando sempre più attenzione nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL). Recentemente, i ricercatori hanno notato l'importanza delle informazioni di contesto nell'elaborazione dei dialoghi e hanno costruito vari modelli per utilizzare il contesto. Tuttavia, non esiste un confronto sistematico per analizzare come utilizzare efficacemente il contesto. In questo articolo, conduciamo uno studio empirico per confrontare vari modelli e indagare l'effetto delle informazioni di contesto nei sistemi di dialogo. Proponiamo anche una variante che pondera esplicitamente i vettori di contesto per rilevanza contestuale-query, superando le altre linee di base.", 'lt': 'Generacinės pokalbių sistemos vis daugiau dėmesio skiria gamtiniam kalbų apdorojimui (NLP). Neseniai mokslininkai pastebėjo konteksto informacijos svarbą dialogo procese ir parengė įvairius konteksto naudojimo modelius. Tačiau nėra sistemingo palyginimo, kaip veiksmingai naudoti kontekstą. Šiame dokumente atliekame empirinį tyrimą, kad palygintume įvairius modelius ir ištirtume kontekstinės informacijos poveikį dialogo sistemose. Taip pat siūlome variant ą, kuris aiškiai sveria konteksto vektorius pagal konteksto klausimo svarbą ir viršija kitas bazines linijas.', 'kk': 'Жаратылған аудармалы жүйелер табиғи тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) арқылы көтеріп тұрады. Жуырдағы зерттеушілер диалогты өңдеу үшін контексті мәліметтің маңыздысын түсіндіріп, контексті қолдану үшін әртүрлі үлгілер құрылды. Бірақ контексті қалай пайдаланатын талдау үшін жүйелік салыстыру жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біз әртүрлі моделдерді салыстырып, диалог жүйелерінде контексті мәліметтердің эффектін зерттеу үшін импирикалық зерттеуді істедік. Біз сондай-ақ контексті векторларды контексті сұраныс маңыздылығымен, басқа негізгі сызықтардың маңыздылығына жеткізетін вариантті таңдаймыз.', 'mk': 'Генеративните разговарачки системи привлекуваат сé поголемо внимание во природното обработување на јазиците (НЛП). Неодамна истражувачите ја забележаа важноста на контекстните информации во обработувањето на дијалогот и изградија различни модели за користење на контекст. Сепак, нема систематска споредба за анализирање како да се користи контекст ефикасно. Во овој весник, спроведуваме емпириска студија за споредување на различни модели и истражување на ефектот на контекстните информации во дијалошките системи. Ние, исто така, предложуваме варијант кој експлицитно ги тежи контекстните вектори по релевантност контекст-прашање, надминувајќи ги другите бази линии.', 'ms': 'Sistem percakapan generatif menarik perhatian semakin meningkat dalam pemprosesan bahasa alam (NLP). Baru-baru ini, peneliti telah perasan penting maklumat konteks dalam pemprosesan dialog, dan membina pelbagai model untuk menggunakan konteks. Namun, tiada perbandingan sistemik untuk menganalisis bagaimana menggunakan konteks secara efektif. Dalam kertas ini, kami melakukan kajian empirik untuk membandingkan pelbagai model dan menyelidiki kesan maklumat konteks dalam sistem dialog. Kami juga mengusulkan variasi yang secara eksplicit timbangan vektor konteks mengikut relevansi konteks-pertanyaan, melebihi garis dasar yang lain.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു അടുത്തുതന്നെ പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധി എങ്കിലും സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് താല്പര്യം എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ടതെന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കേണ്ടത്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളോട് തുല്യമാക്കുവാനും ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കു വെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറ് വെക്ട്രോറുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി തൂക്കുന്ന ഒരു വേറിയനെറ്റ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റുള്ള ബ', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ġenerattivi ta’ konverżjoni qed jiġbdu aktar attenzjoni fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP). Dan l-aħħar, ir-riċerkaturi nnotaw l-importanza tal-informazzjoni tal-kuntest fl-ipproċessar tad-djalogu, u bnew diversi mudelli biex jużaw il-kuntest. Madankollu, m’hemmx paragun sistematiku biex jiġi analizzat kif jintuża l-kuntest b’mod effettiv. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu studju empiriku biex inqabblu diversi mudelli u ninvestigaw l-effett ta’ informazzjoni ta’ kuntest fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu. Aħna nipproponu wkoll varjant li jżid espliċitament il-vetturi tal-kuntest skont ir-rilevanza tal-mistoqsija tal-kuntest, li jaqbeż il-linji bażi l-oħra.', 'no': 'Genererte konvertasjonssystemer attrakter økt oppmerksomhet i naturspråkshandtering (NLP). Nyleg har forskere merke på viktigheten til kontekstinformasjon i dialoghandsaming, og bygd ulike modeller for å bruka kontekst. Men det finst ingen systematisk sammenlikning å analysera korleis konteksten skal brukast effektivt. I denne papiret gjer vi eit empirisk studie for å sammenligne ulike modeller og undersøke effekten av kontekstinformasjon i dialogsystemet. Vi foreslår også ein variant som utviklar kontekstvektorar med kontekstspørsmålsrelevant, som utfører dei andre baselinjene.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлд (NLP) анхаарлыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Сүүлийн үед судлаачид диалог үйлдвэрлэлийн тухай мэдээллийн чухал ач холбогдолыг анзаарч, өөр өөр загвар бүтээсэн. Гэхдээ хэрхэн нөлөөтэй хэрэглэх вэ гэдгийг судлах систематикийн харьцуулалт байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон загваруудыг харьцуулахын тулд эмперикийн судалгаа хийж, диалог системийн мэдээллийн нөлөөг судалдаг. Мөн бид өөр суурь шулуунуудыг бага зэрэг тодорхой хэмжээний векторуудыг тодорхой хэмжээний хэмжээг илэрхийлж чадна.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de conversație generative atrag atenția tot mai mare în procesarea limbajului natural (PNL). Recent, cercetătorii au observat importanța informațiilor contextuale în procesarea dialogurilor și au construit diferite modele pentru a utiliza contextul. Cu toate acestea, nu există o comparație sistematică pentru a analiza modul de utilizare eficientă a contextului. În această lucrare, realizăm un studiu empiric pentru a compara diferite modele și a investiga efectul informațiilor de context în sistemele de dialog. De asemenea, propunem o variantă care ponderează explicit vectorii contextului după relevanța contextului-interogare, depășind celelalte linii de referință.', 'pl': 'Generatywne systemy konwersacji przyciągają coraz większą uwagę w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego (NLP). Ostatnio naukowcy zauważyli znaczenie informacji kontekstowych w przetwarzaniu dialogów i zbudowali różne modele do wykorzystania kontekstu. Nie ma jednak systematycznego porównania do analizy skutecznego wykorzystania kontekstu. W artykule przeprowadzamy badanie empiryczne w celu porównania różnych modeli i zbadania wpływu informacji kontekstowych w systemach dialogowych. Proponujemy również wariant, który wyraźnie waży wektory kontekstowe według znaczenia kontekstowego zapytania, przewyższając pozostałe linie bazowe.', 'sr': 'Generativni razgovorni sistemi privlače veću pažnju u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Nedavno su istraživači primetili važnost kontekstskih informacija u procesu dijaloga i izgradili različite modele za korištenje konteksta. Međutim, ne postoji sistematski usporedba u analiziranju kako efektivno koristiti kontekst. U ovom papiru vodimo empiričko istraživanje kako bi usporedili različite modele i istražili učinak kontekstske informacije u dijalogskim sistemima. Takoðe predlažemo variant koji eksplicitno teži kontekstske vektore po relevantnosti konteksta-ispitivanja, iznosi ostale osnovne linije.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය (NLP) වල සිද්ධ වාර්තා පද්ධතිය සංවාදනය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ දැනගත්තා සංවාද පරීක්ෂණයේ සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු ගැන අවශ්\u200dයය, සහ සම්බන්ධතාව නමුත්, සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පද්ධතියක් නෑ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි විවිධ මදුල් සමුදානය කරන්න සහ සංවාද පද්ධතියේ සංවාද පද්ධතියේ පරීක්ෂණ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිකා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qaabilsan ee la hadlo waxey si korodhsan u dhaqdhaqaaqayaan daryeelka afka dabiicadda ah (NLP). Hadii u dhowayd, baaritaanayaal waxay arkeen muhiim u ah macluumaadka hoose ee la xiriira baaritaanka dialogka, waxayna dhiseen qaabab kala duduwan si ay u isticmaalaan qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, wax isbarbardhig oo nidaamka ah looma baarayo sida loo isticmaalayo daboolka si faa’iido leh. Warqaddan waxaynu ku sameynaa waxbarasho xirfadeed si aan u barbarbarno tusaalooyin kala duduwan islamarkaasna waxaynu baaritaan saamaynta macluumaadka kooxaha ee nidaamka dialogka. Sidoo kale waxaan soo jeedaynaa kala duwan oo si cad u miisaamaya wadooyin kooxa ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka qoraalka, oo ku sameynaya saldhigyada kale.', 'sv': 'Generativa konversationssystem drar till sig allt större uppmärksamhet inom naturlig språkbehandling (NLP). Nyligen har forskare märkt betydelsen av kontextinformation i dialogbehandling, och byggt olika modeller för att utnyttja kontext. Det finns dock ingen systematisk jämförelse för att analysera hur man använder kontext effektivt. I denna uppsats genomför vi en empirisk studie för att jämföra olika modeller och undersöka effekten av kontextinformation i dialogsystem. Vi föreslår också en variant som uttryckligen väger kontextvektorer efter kontext-frågerelevans, vilket överträffar de andra baslinjerna.', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கும் பேச்சு அமைப்புகள் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் கவனத்தை அதிகரிக்கிறது. சமீபத்தில், ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் உரையாடல் செயல்படுத்தலில் முக்கியத்தின் முக்கியமானதை கவனித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளார் ஆனால், எவ்வாறு சூழலை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை ஆய்வு செய்ய முறைமையான ஒப்பிடுதல் இல்லை. In this paper, we conduct an empirical study to compare various models and investigate the effect of context information in dialog systems.  நாம் ஒரு மாறியையும் தேர்வு செய்கிறோம் மற்ற அடிப்படைக்கோடுகளை வெளிப்படையாக எடுக்கும் சூழல் கேள்வி தொடர்பு மூலம்', 'ur': 'پیدا کرنے والی مکالمانی سیسٹم (NLP) طبیعی زبان پردازی میں اضافہ کرنے والی توجه اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اچھے سے، تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے سمجھ لیا ہے کہ کانٹس معلومات کی اہم بات پردازی میں ہے، اور مختلف موڈل بنائے ہیں کہ کانٹس کا استعمال کریں۔ لیکن اس کے لئے کوئی سیستمی مقایسہ نہیں ہے کہ کائنات کے مطابق کس طرح استعمال کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم مختلف موڈلوں کے مطابق مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے ایک مطابق تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور مختلف موڈلوں کے مطابق تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک الفاظ بھی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جسے کنٹکس ویکتروں کے ذریعہ کنٹکس-کیوری اثرات کے ذریعہ بطور واضح وزن کرتا ہے، اور دوسرے بنیاس لینوں کے ذریعہ بغیر اثرات کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda o'qituvchilar muloqat boshqaruvchidagi muloqat maʼlumotining muhimligini ko'rsatadi va tarkibini foydalanish uchun har xil modellarni yaratadi. Ammo, ma'lumotni qanday ishlatish uchun tizim nazarda aniqlash uchun tizim nazarda mavjud emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz har xil modellarni kamaytirish va muloqat tizimlarida ma'lumotning effektini qidirish uchun muvaffaqiyatli o'rganamiz. Biz boshqa asboblarni bajarish uchun oddiy boshqa vektorlarni tahrirlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống đối thoại phát triển đang thu hút sự chú ý vào việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Gần đây, các nhà nghiên cứu đã chú ý tầm quan trọng của thông tin ngữ cảnh trong việc xử lý hộp thoại, và xây dựng các mô hình khác nhau để sử dụng ngữ cảnh. Tuy nhiên, không có một cuộc so sánh có hệ thống để phân tích cách sử dụng ngữ cảnh hiệu quả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu có kinh nghiệm để so sánh các mô hình khác nhau và nghiên cứu hiệu quả của thông tin ngữ cảnh trong hệ thống hộp thoại. Chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một biến thể hiển thị tạ các véc- tơ ngữ cảnh dựa vào liên quan thẩm vấn ngữ cảnh, vượt trội các cơ sở cơ bản khác.', 'nl': 'Generatieve conversatiesystemen trekken steeds meer aandacht in natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP). Recent hebben onderzoekers het belang van contextinformatie in dialoogverwerking opgemerkt en verschillende modellen gebouwd om context te gebruiken. Er is echter geen systematische vergelijking om te analyseren hoe context effectief kan worden gebruikt. In dit artikel voeren we een empirische studie uit om verschillende modellen te vergelijken en het effect van contextinformatie in dialoogsystemen te onderzoeken. We stellen ook een variant voor die contextvectoren expliciet weegt op context-query relevantie, die de andere baselines overtreft.', 'bg': 'Генеративните разговорни системи привличат все по-голямо внимание в обработката на естествения език (НЛП). Наскоро изследователите забелязаха значението на контекстната информация в обработката на диалога и изградиха различни модели за използване на контекста. Въпреки това, няма систематично сравнение, за да се анализира как да се използва контекста ефективно. В настоящата статия провеждаме емпирично проучване за сравняване на различни модели и изследване на ефекта на контекстната информация в диалоговите системи. Предлагаме и вариант, който изрично претегля контекстните вектори по релевантност на контекста-заявка, надминавайки другите базови линии.', 'da': 'Generative samtalesystemer tiltrækker stigende opmærksomhed i naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP). For nylig har forskere bemærket betydningen af kontekst information i dialog behandling, og bygget forskellige modeller til at udnytte kontekst. Der er dog ingen systematisk sammenligning til at analysere, hvordan man bruger kontekst effektivt. I denne artikel gennemfører vi en empirisk undersøgelse for at sammenligne forskellige modeller og undersøge effekten af kontekstinformation i dialogsystemer. Vi foreslår også en variant, der eksplicit vægter kontekstvektorer efter kontekst-forespørgselsrelevans, hvilket overgår de andre basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Generativni razgovorni sustavi privlače veću pažnju u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Nedavno su istraživači primijetili važnost kontekstskih informacija u procesu dijaloga i izgradili različite modele za upotrebu konteksta. Međutim, ne postoji sistematski usporedba za analiziranje načina efektivnog korištenja konteksta. U ovom papiru vodimo empiričko ispitivanje kako bi usporedili različite modele i istražili učinak kontekstskih informacija u dijalogskim sustavima. Također predlažemo variant koji pojasno teži kontekstski vektori po važnosti konteksta ispitivanja, iznosi ostale osnovne linije.', 'ko': '생성식 세션 시스템은 자연 언어 처리(NLP)에서 갈수록 주목을 받고 있다.최근 몇 년 동안 연구원들은 언어 환경 정보가 대화 처리에서의 중요성을 알아차리고 각종 모델을 구축하여 언어 환경을 이용했다.그러나 언어 환경을 어떻게 효과적으로 사용하는지 체계적인 비교가 없다.본고에서 우리는 실증 연구를 실시하여 각종 모델을 비교하고 언어 환경 정보가 대화 시스템에서의 작용을 연구했다.우리는 또 상하문 조회를 통해 상하문 벡터에 대해 관련성을 현저하게 가중시키는 변체를 제기했는데 다른 기선보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Generative Konversationssysteme rücken in der Natural Language Processing (NLP) zunehmend in den Fokus. In letzter Zeit haben Forscher die Bedeutung von Kontextinformationen in der Dialogverarbeitung bemerkt und verschiedene Modelle entwickelt, um Kontext zu nutzen. Es gibt jedoch keinen systematischen Vergleich, um zu analysieren, wie Kontext effektiv genutzt werden kann. In dieser Arbeit führen wir eine empirische Studie durch, um verschiedene Modelle zu vergleichen und die Wirkung von Kontextinformationen in Dialogsystemen zu untersuchen. Wir schlagen auch eine Variante vor, die Kontextvektoren explizit nach Kontext-Abfragerelevanz gewichtet und die anderen Baselines übertrifft.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cهای نسبت دارند که توجه افزایش توجه در پردازش زبانهای طبیعی (NLP) را جذب می\u200cکنند. اخیرا، محققان متوجه اهمیت اطلاعات محیط در پرداخت محیط و مدل های مختلف برای استفاده از محیط کردند. با این حال، مقایسه سیستمی برای تحلیل کردن چگونه از موضوع موثرت استفاده کنیم وجود ندارد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مطالعه امپراتیک را انجام می دهیم تا مدل مختلف را مقایسه کنیم و تاثیر اطلاعات محیط در سیستم\u200cهای محیط محیط تحقیق کنیم. ما همچنین یک فرق پیشنهاد می کنیم که به طور واضح ویکتورهای محیط توسط مربوط به مربوط به محیط-سوال وزن می کند، که بیشتر از خطوط پایین\u200cهای دیگر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'Sistem konversasi generatif menarik perhatian semakin meningkat dalam proses bahasa alam (NLP). Baru-baru ini, peneliti telah memperhatikan penting informasi konteks dalam proses dialog, dan membangun berbagai model untuk menggunakan konteks. Namun, tidak ada perbandingan sistematis untuk menganalisa bagaimana menggunakan konteks secara efektif. In this paper, we conduct an empirical study to compare various models and investigate the effect of context information in dialog systems.  Kami juga mengusulkan varian yang secara eksplicit berat vektor konteks dengan relevansi konteks-pertanyaan, melebihi garis dasar lainnya.', 'tr': 'Täbiýal diller işleýäninde (NLP) döredijili soňra gürrüň sistemleri üns çekip otyrýar. Soňky wagtlar bilen araştyranlar dialogyň işlemlerinde özüniň kontekst maglumatynyň wajyplygyny bildirdiler we kontekst ullamak üçin dürli nusgalary guruldylar. Ýagna görä, kontekstiň nähili faýly ulanmalydygyny çözümlemek üçin sistemasik karşılaşyk ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz dürli nusgalary karşılaştyrmak üçin empirik bir studiýa etdik we düzgün sistemlerde kontekst maglumatyň täsirini çözdirip barýarys. Biz de bir variant teklif ediyoruz ki, kontekst sorgulaması gerektiğine göre, diğer baz çizgilerden daha a ğırlı olan kontekst vektörlerini öneririz.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kizalendo unavutia kuongezeka kwa uchunguzi wa lugha asili (NLP). Hivi karibuni, watafiti wamegundua umuhimu wa taarifa za muktadha katika upasuaji wa mazungumzo, na wamejenga mifano mbalimbali ili kutumia muktadha. Hata hivyo, hakuna ulinganisho wa mfumo wa uchambuzi wa namna ya kutumia mazingira kwa ufanisi. Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya utafiti wa msisitizo kulinganisha mifano mbalimbali na kuchunguza madhara ya taarifa za muktadha katika mfumo wa mazungumzo. Pia tunapendekeza tofauti ambazo zinabeba vectors za muktadha kwa muhimu wa utafiti wa muktadha, kutengeneza misingi mengine.', 'sq': 'Sistemet gjenerative të bisedimeve po tërheqin vëmendjen në rritje në procesimin natyror të gjuhës (NLP). Kohët e fundit, kërkuesit kanë vënë re rëndësinë e informacionit të kontekstit në procesimin e dialogut dhe kanë ndërtuar modele të ndryshme për të përdorur kontekstin. Megjithatë, nuk ka krahasim sistematik për të analizuar si të përdoret konteksti efektivisht. Në këtë letër, ne kryejmë një studim empirik për të krahasuar modele të ndryshme dhe për të hetuar efektin e informacionit të kontekstit në sistemet e dialogut. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një variant që peshon eksplicitisht vektorët e kontekstit me rëndësi kontekst-pyetje, duke kaluar linjat e tjera bazë.', 'af': "Genereerde omskakelingsstelsels aantrek vergroot aandag in natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP). Onlangs het resekers aanmerk die belangrikheid van konteksinligting in dialoog verwerking en verskeie modele gebou om konteks te gebruik. Maar daar is geen sistematiese vergelyking om te analyseer hoe die konteks effektief te gebruik nie. In hierdie papier doen ons 'n empiriese studie om verskillende modele te vergelyk en die effek van konteksinligting in dialoog stelsels te ondersoek. Ons beveel ook 'n variant wat uitgewig konteks vekteurs deur konteks-navraag relevansie, uitvoer die ander basisline.", 'am': 'የውይይት ንግግር ስርዓቶች ፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል (NLP) ሲያደጋል፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ ተመሪዎቹ የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን በመስመር ማቀናጃ ግንኙነት አስተዋልተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሥርዓት ተሳያየት እንዴትስ እንዲጠቀም የሚያስተምር ምንም የለውም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን ለማስተካከል እና የጥያቄ መረጃዎችን በጥያቄ ስርዓት ውስጥ ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሁኔታ-ምርጫውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Գեներատիվ հաղորդակցման համակարգերը ավելի ուշադրություն են դարձնում բնական լեզվի վերամշակում (ՆԼՊ). Վերջերս հետազոտողները նկատել են կոնտեքստի ինֆորմացիայի կարևորությունը դասախոսում և կառուցել են տարբեր մոդելներ կոնտեքստի օգտագործման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ոչ մի սիստեմատիկ համեմատություն չկա, որպեսզի վերլուծենք, թե ինչպես օգտագործել կոնտեքստը արդյունավետ: In this paper, we conduct an empirical study to compare various models and investigate the effect of context information in dialog systems.  Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի տարբերակ, որը բացահայտորեն կշռում է կոնտեքստի վեկտորները ըստ կոնտեքստի հարցերի կարևորության, գերազանցելով այլ հիմնական գծերը:', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় মনোযোগ বৃদ্ধির আকর্ষণ করছে (এনএলপি)। সম্প্রতি গবেষকরা ডায়ালগ প্রক্রিয়ার তথ্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয় লক্ষ্য করেছেন এবং বিভিন্ন মডেল ব্যবহার করার জন্য বিভিন তবে কোন সিস্টেমিক তুলনা বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য কোন ব্যবস্থা নেই কিভাবে কার্যকর করে ব্যবহার করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন মডেলের তুলনা করার জন্য এক সামরিক গবেষণা করি এবং ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের প্রভাবের তথ্য তদন্ত করি। We also propose a variant that explicitly weights context vectors by context-query relevance, outperforming the other baselines.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işləməsində (NLP) məlumatları artırmaq üçün nəzəriyyətli danışma sistemləri təbii edir. Son zamanlarda, araştırmacılar məlumatların məlumatının məlumatını Dialoog işləməsində gördülər və məlumatı istifadə etmək üçün müxtəlif modellər in şa etdilər. Lakin, müxtəlif məlumatların necə istifadə ediləcəyini analiz etmək üçün sistematik salışma yoxdur. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif modelləri ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün empirik təhsil etdik və müxtəlif məlumatların sistemlərində təsirini incidirik. Biz həmçinin başqa dəyişikliklərdən daha çox çəkilən kontekst vektörlərini təklif edirik.', 'ca': "Els sistemes generatius de conversació atrauen cada vegada més atenció en el processament natural de llenguatges (NLP). Recentment, els investigadors han notat l'importància de la informació contextual en el processament del diàleg, i han construït diversos models per utilitzar el context. No obstant això, no hi ha comparació sistemàtica per analitzar com utilitzar el context efectivament. En aquest paper, fem un estudi empíric per comparar diversos models i investigar l'efecte de l'informació contextual en els sistemes de diàleg. També proposem una variant que pesa explícitament els vectors contextuals per la pertinencia de la consulta contextual, superant les altres línies de base.", 'bs': 'Generativni razgovorni sistemi privlače veću pažnju u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Nedavno su istraživači primijetili važnost kontekstskih informacija u procesu dijaloga i izgradili različite modele za korištenje konteksta. Međutim, ne postoji sistematski usporedba za analiziranje načina efektivnog korištenja konteksta. U ovom papiru provodimo empiričku studiju kako bi usporedili različite modele i istražili učinak kontekstskih informacija u dijalogskim sistemima. Također predlažemo varijant koji izrazito teži kontekstske vektore po važnosti konteksta-ispitivanja, iznosi ostale osnovne linije.', 'cs': 'Generační konverzační systémy přitahují stále větší pozornost v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). V poslední době si výzkumníci všimli významu kontextových informací při zpracování dialogů a vytvořili různé modely pro využití kontextu. Neexistuje však žádné systematické srovnání pro analýzu efektivního využití kontextu. V tomto článku provádíme empirickou studii porovnávající různé modely a zkoumáme vliv kontextových informací v dialogových systémech. Navrhujeme také variantu, která explicitně váží kontextové vektory podle relevance kontextového dotazu a překonává ostatní základní linie.', 'et': 'Generatiivsed vestlussüsteemid tõmbavad looduskeele töötlemisel üha enam tähelepanu. Hiljuti on teadlased märganud kontekstiteabe tähtsust dialoogi töötlemisel ja ehitanud erinevaid mudeleid konteksti kasutamiseks. Siiski puudub süstemaatiline võrdlus, et analüüsida, kuidas konteksti efektiivselt kasutada. Käesolevas töös teostame empiirilise uuringu, et võrrelda erinevaid mudeleid ja uurida kontekstiteabe mõju dialoogisüsteemides. Samuti pakume välja variandi, mis selgesõnaliselt kaalub kontekstivektoriid kontekstipäringu asjakohasuse järgi, ületades teisi lähtejooni.', 'fi': 'Generatiiviset keskustelujärjestelmät herättävät yhä enemmän huomiota luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnissa (NLP). Viime aikoina tutkijat ovat huomanneet kontekstitiedon merkityksen dialogin käsittelyssä ja rakentaneet erilaisia malleja kontekstin hyödyntämiseksi. Ei kuitenkaan ole systemaattista vertailua analysoida, miten kontekstia käytetään tehokkaasti. Tässä työssä teemme empiirisen tutkimuksen, jossa vertaillaan erilaisia malleja ja tutkitaan kontekstitietojen vaikutusta dialogijärjestelmiin. Ehdotamme myös varianttia, joka nimenomaisesti punnitsee kontekstivektorit kontekstikyselyn relevanssin mukaan ja ylittää muut perusviivat.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Kowé kudu-kudu, nambahi nambah akeh barang nggawe informasi kontext ning pisan dialog lan nggawe model sing sampeyan kanggo nggawe kontext. Nanging, ora ono sampeyang sistem nungsak nggunakaké kanggo bisalui kapan titik kontext. Nang pepul iki, kéné gunakake ingkang empires kanggo nggambar model sing sampeyan karo panggayutan kanggo ujian informasi kontext kanggo sistem dialog. We are again offline', 'sk': 'Generativni pogovorni sistemi privabljajo vse večjo pozornost pri obdelavi naravnega jezika (NLP). V zadnjem času so raziskovalci opazili pomen kontekstnih informacij pri obdelavi dialogov in zgradili različne modele za uporabo konteksta. Vendar pa ni sistematične primerjave za analizo učinkovite uporabe konteksta. V prispevku smo izvedli empirično študijo za primerjavo različnih modelov in raziskavo učinka kontekstnih informacij v dialognih sistemih. Predlagamo tudi različico, ki izrecno uteže vektorje konteksta glede na relevantnost kontekstne poizvedbe, kar presega druge osnovne črte.', 'he': 'מערכות שיחה גנרטיביות מושכות תשומת לב גדולה בעבודת שפת טבעית (NLP). Recently, researchers have noticed the importance of context information in dialog processing, and built various models to utilize context.  עם זאת, אין שווה מערכתית כדי לנתח איך להשתמש בקשר בעובדה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מבצעים מחקר אמפירי כדי לשוות דוגמנים שונים ולחקור את השפעה של מידע הקשר במערכות דיאלוג. אנחנו גם מציעים שינוי שמשקל באופן ברור את הוקטורים הקשר על ידי רלוונטיות בקשר לבקש הקשר, ומעביר את השורות הבסיסיות האחרות.', 'ha': "@ item: inmenu A yanzu, kewayi, sun gane muhimu wa maɓalli na mazaɓa cikin shirin zauren akwatin bayani, kuma suka sami misãlai masu amfani da mazaɓa. Babu wani sami na'urar da zai yi amfani da mazaɓa mai amfani da shi. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tafiyar wani littafi mai amfani da kwamfyuta misalin wasu misãlai kuma munã ƙidãya mai amfani da amfani da mazaɓa cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani. Tune goyyar da wata variant wanda ke sami shiryoyi masu hushi da mazaɓa-tambayi, kuma masu sami da sauran bango.", 'bo': 'མ་མཐུན་ནུས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ལ་གནད་དོན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་མི་འདུག Recently, researchers have noticed the importance of context information in dialog processing, and built various models to utilize context. ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་སྟངས་གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ལམ་མི་འདུག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྦྱར་བ་དང་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་བཙལ་ཞི ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྒྱུད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉེན་ཡིན་པ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents', 'ar': 'تجزئة الخطاب متعدد اللغات وعبر المجالات لوثائق كاملة', 'fr': 'Segmentation du discours multilingue et interdomaine de documents entiers', 'ja': 'ドキュメント全体のクロスリンガルおよびクロスドメインのセグメンテーション', 'es': 'Segmentación del discurso multilingüe y multidominio de documentos completos', 'pt': 'Segmentação de discurso entre idiomas e domínios de documentos inteiros', 'zh': '一文档跨语与跨域语分', 'hi': 'पूरे दस्तावेजों के क्रॉस-भाषी और क्रॉस-डोमेन प्रवचन विभाजन', 'ru': 'Межязыковая и междоменная сегментация целых документов', 'ga': 'Deighilt dioscúrsa tras-teangach agus tras-fearainn de dhoiciméid iomlána', 'ka': 'უფრო ენგური და უფრო დიომენტის სივდუმენტის სივდუმენტი', 'hu': 'Teljes dokumentumok nyelveken átnyúló és területeken átnyúló diskurzus szegmentálása', 'el': 'Διαγλωσσική και διεπαγγελματική τμηματοποίηση ολόκληρων εγγράφων', 'it': 'Segmentazione interlinguistica e interdisciplinare del discorso di interi documenti', 'kk': 'Құжаттардың бірнеше тілді және бірнеше доменге ауысу', 'lt': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents', 'mk': 'Сегментација на цели документи преку јазик и преку домен', 'ms': 'Segmen diskors melintas-bahasa dan melintas-domain bagi seluruh dokumen', 'ml': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni ta’ diskors bejn il-lingwi u d-dominji ta’ dokumenti sħaħ', 'mn': 'Дасгал хэлний болон хэлбэртэй холбоотой бүх баримтуудын загварыг ярьдаг.', 'no': 'Krysspråk og krysdomenediskurser segmentasjon av heile dokument', 'ro': 'Segmentarea discursului între limbi și domenii a întregii documente', 'pl': 'Segmentacja dyskursu między językami i między domenami całych dokumentów', 'sr': 'Krozjezički i krozdomene diskursi o segmentaciji celih dokumenta', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Segmentering av hela dokument över språk och domäner', 'so': 'Luqadaha iskutallaabta iyo hadalka kala duwan ee dukumentiyada oo dhan', 'ta': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse of all documents segmentation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thuyết giáo xuyên lục địa phân chia tài liệu', 'nl': 'Meertalige en domeinoverschrijdende discourssegmentatie van hele documenten', 'hr': 'Krozjezički i krozdomene diskursi o segmentaciji cijelih dokumenta', 'bg': 'Междуезична и междудомейнна дискурсна сегментация на цели документи', 'da': 'Diskurssegmentering på tværs af sprog og tværs af domæner af hele dokumenter', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende und domänenübergreifende Diskurssegmentierung ganzer Dokumente', 'ko': '전체 문서의 크로스 언어와 크로스 영역 문장 분할', 'tr': 'Dillerden geçiş we çoklu domeny tüm senediň segmentasyny çykar', 'id': 'Segmen diskors saling bahasa dan domain saling dari seluruh dokumen', 'fa': 'قطعه\u200cای از تمام سند\u200cها با زبان\u200cهای زیادی و دامنه\u200cهای زیادی صحبت می\u200cکنند', 'sw': 'Kugawanywa kwa lugha na mazungumzo ya ndani', 'af': 'Kruistale en kruisdomein diskurseer segmentasie van hele dokumente', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i diskursit ndërgjuhësor dhe transdomenik i të gjithë dokumenteve', 'am': 'ቋንቋ እና የድምፅ ንግግር ክፍል የሁሉንም ሰነድ ክፍል', 'hy': 'Ամբողջ փաստաթղթերի միջլեզվային և տիեզերական խոսակցությունը', 'az': 'T칲m d칬k칲m톛l톛rin 칞ox dilli v톛 칞ox domain segmentasiyas캼n캼 s칬yl톛yir', 'bn': 'পুরো ডকুমেন্টের বিভাগ', 'bs': 'Krozjezički i krozdomenički diskursi o segmentaciji cijelih dokumenta', 'ca': 'Segmentació de discurs translingüístic i transdomínic de documents senceres', 'cs': 'Segmentace diskurzu mezi jazyky a mezi doménami celých dokumentů', 'et': 'Kogu dokumentide keeleülene ja valdkondadevaheline diskursuse segmenteerimine', 'fi': 'Kokonaisten asiakirjojen monikielinen ja monialainen diskurssisegmentointi', 'jv': 'Cut-language and inter-domain disc segmentation of whole documents', 'he': 'ניתוח דיבורים בין שפתיים ובין שפתיים של מסמכים שלמים', 'sk': 'Medjezična in meddomenska segmentacija diskurza celotnih dokumentov', 'ha': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual and cross-domain discourse segmentation of entire documents'}
{'en': 'Discourse segmentation is a crucial step in building end-to-end discourse parsers. However, discourse segmenters only exist for a few languages and domains. Typically they only detect intra-sentential segment boundaries, assuming gold standard sentence and token segmentation, and relying on high-quality syntactic parses and rich heuristics that are not generally available across languages and domains. In this paper, we propose statistical discourse segmenters for five languages and three domains that do not rely on gold pre-annotations. We also consider the problem of learning discourse segmenters when no labeled data is available for a language. Our fully supervised system obtains 89.5 % F1 for English newswire, with slight drops in performance on other domains, and we report supervised and unsupervised (cross-lingual) results for five languages in total.', 'ar': 'يُعد تجزئة الخطاب خطوة حاسمة في بناء محللي الخطاب الشامل. ومع ذلك ، فإن مجزّئات الخطاب موجودة فقط لعدد قليل من اللغات والمجالات. عادةً ما يكتشفون فقط حدود المقطع داخل الإرسال ، بافتراض الجملة القياسية الذهبية وتجزئة الرمز المميز ، والاعتماد على التحليل النحوي عالي الجودة والاستدلال الغني الذي لا يتوفر بشكل عام عبر اللغات والمجالات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح شرائح الخطاب الإحصائي لخمس لغات وثلاثة مجالات لا تعتمد على التعليقات التوضيحية الذهبية. نحن أيضًا نأخذ في الاعتبار مشكلة تعلم مجزئات الخطاب عندما لا تتوفر بيانات مصنفة للغة. حصل نظامنا الخاضع للإشراف الكامل على 89.5٪ F1 للإخبار الإنجليزية ، مع انخفاض طفيف في الأداء في المجالات الأخرى ، ونبلغ عن النتائج الخاضعة للإشراف وغير الخاضعة للإشراف (عبر اللغات) لخمس لغات في المجموع.', 'es': 'La segmentación del discurso es un paso crucial en la creación de analizadores de discurso de extremo a extremo. Sin embargo, los segmentadores del discurso solo existen para unos pocos idiomas y dominios. Por lo general, solo detectan límites de segmentos intra-sentenciales, asumiendo la segmentación de oraciones y tokens estándar de oro, y se basan en análisis sintácticos de alta calidad y heurística rica que generalmente no están disponibles en todos los idiomas y dominios. En este artículo, proponemos segmentadores estadísticos del discurso para cinco idiomas y tres dominios que no se basan en anotaciones previas de oro. También consideramos el problema de aprender a segmentar el discurso cuando no hay datos etiquetados disponibles para un idioma. Nuestro sistema totalmente supervisado obtiene un 89,5% de F1 para la cadena de noticias en inglés, con ligeras caídas en el rendimiento en otros dominios, e informamos resultados supervisados y no supervisados (multilingües) para cinco idiomas en total.', 'fr': "La segmentation du discours est une étape cruciale dans la création d'analyseurs de discours de bout en bout. Cependant, les segmentateurs de discours n'existent que pour quelques langues et domaines. En général, ils ne détectent que les limites de segment intra-sententielles, en supposant une segmentation de phrase et de jeton de référence, et en s'appuyant sur des analyses syntaxiques de haute qualité et des heuristiques riches qui ne sont généralement pas disponibles dans les langues et les domaines. Dans cet article, nous proposons des segmentateurs statistiques de discours pour cinq langues et trois domaines qui ne reposent pas sur des pré-annotations Gold. Nous examinons également le problème de l'apprentissage des segmentateurs de discours lorsqu'aucune donnée étiquetée n'est disponible pour une langue. Notre système entièrement supervisé obtient 89,5\xa0% de F1 pour les fils de nouvelles en anglais, avec de légères baisses de performance dans d'autres domaines, et nous rapportons des résultats supervisés et non supervisés (multilingues) pour cinq langues au total.", 'pt': 'A segmentação de discurso é um passo crucial na construção de analisadores de discurso de ponta a ponta. No entanto, os segmentadores de discurso existem apenas para algumas línguas e domínios. Normalmente, eles detectam apenas limites de segmentos intra-sentenciais, assumindo a segmentação padrão-ouro de sentenças e tokens, e contando com análises sintáticas de alta qualidade e heurísticas ricas que geralmente não estão disponíveis em idiomas e domínios. Neste artigo, propomos segmentadores estatísticos de discurso para cinco idiomas e três domínios que não contam com pré-anotações de ouro. Também consideramos o problema de aprender segmentadores de discurso quando não há dados rotulados disponíveis para uma linguagem. Nosso sistema totalmente supervisionado obtém 89,5% de F1 para notícias em inglês, com pequenas quedas no desempenho em outros domínios, e relatamos resultados supervisionados e não supervisionados (cross-lingual) para cinco idiomas no total.', 'zh': '语分者,构端到语解析器之要也。 然语分割器止于言语领域。 常检句段内界,假令黄金格句与令牌分割,而赖高质量之句法解析丰启发式析之,此解析富之启发式,不能跨言域用也。 五言三域计语分割器,不赖黄金预注。 又念无标数可学语分割器。 吾全监系于英语新闻通讯录中得89.5%之F1,稍降于他域,告凡五言监、无监(跨语)。', 'hi': 'प्रवचन विभाजन एंड-टू-एंड प्रवचन पार्सर के निर्माण में एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम है। हालांकि, प्रवचन सेगमेंटर केवल कुछ भाषाओं और डोमेन के लिए मौजूद हैं। आमतौर पर वे केवल इंट्रा-सेवेंशियल सेगमेंट सीमाओं का पता लगाते हैं, सोने के मानक वाक्य और टोकन विभाजन को मानते हैं, और उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले वाक्यात्मक पार्स और समृद्ध ह्यूरिस्टिक्स पर भरोसा करते हैं जो आमतौर पर भाषाओं और डोमेन में उपलब्ध नहीं होते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम पांच भाषाओं और तीन डोमेन के लिए सांख्यिकीय प्रवचन सेगमेंटर्स का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सोने के पूर्व-एनोटेशन पर भरोसा नहीं करते हैं। हम प्रवचन सेगमेंटर्स सीखने की समस्या पर भी विचार करते हैं जब किसी भाषा के लिए कोई लेबल डेटा उपलब्ध नहीं होता है। हमारी पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित प्रणाली अंग्रेजी न्यूज़वायर के लिए 89.5% एफ 1 प्राप्त करती है, जिसमें अन्य डोमेन पर प्रदर्शन में मामूली गिरावट आती है, और हम कुल मिलाकर पांच भाषाओं के लिए पर्यवेक्षित और असुरक्षित (क्रॉस-भाषाई) परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ja': 'ディスコースセグメンテーションは、エンドツーエンドのディスコース構文解析器を構築するための重要なステップです。しかしながら、論語セグメンターは少数の言語と領域に対してのみ存在する。典型的には、それらは、金の標準文およびトークンセグメンテーションを仮定し、言語およびドメイン全体で一般的に利用できない高品質の構文解析および豊富なヒューリスティックに依存して、文内のセグメント境界のみを検出します。この論文では、ゴールドの事前注釈に依存しない5つの言語と3つのドメインの統計的言説セグメンテーションを提案します。また、言語にラベル付けされたデータが利用できない場合には、ディスクロージャーを学習する問題も考慮します。当社の完全に監督されたシステムは、英語のニュースワイヤで89.5%のF 1を取得し、他のドメインでのパフォーマンスがわずかに低下しています。私たちは、合計5つの言語の監督された結果と監督されていない（クロスリンガル）結果を報告します。', 'ru': 'Сегментация дискурса является решающим шагом в построении сквозных парсеров дискурса. Тем не менее, сегменты дискурса существуют только для нескольких языков и доменов. Как правило, они обнаруживают только внутрипредметные границы сегментов, предполагая сегментацию золотого стандартного предложения и токенов и полагаясь на высококачественные синтаксические синтаксические анализы и богатую эвристику, которые, как правило, не доступны между языками и доменами. В этой статье мы предлагаем статистические сегменты дискурса для пяти языков и трех областей, которые не полагаются на золотые предварительные аннотации. Мы также рассматриваем проблему изучения сегментов дискурса, когда для языка нет маркированных данных. Наша полностью контролируемая система получает 89,5% F1 для английских новостей, с небольшим падением производительности в других доменах, и мы сообщаем контролируемые и неконтролируемые (межязыковые) результаты для пяти языков в общей сложности.', 'ga': 'Is céim ríthábhachtach é deighilt dioscúrsa chun parsálaithe dioscúrsa ceann go ceann a thógáil. Mar sin féin, níl deighleoga dioscúrsa ann ach do chúpla teanga agus fearann. Go hiondúil ní aimsíonn siad ach teorainneacha deighleogacha inbhreithe, ag glacadh leis go bhfuil caighdeán ór-dheighilt abairtí agus comharthaí, ag brath ar pharsanna comhréire ardcháilíochta agus ar heorasaíocht shaibhir nach bhfuil ar fáil go ginearálta trasna teangacha agus fearainn. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid deighleoga dioscúrsa staitistiúla do chúig theanga agus trí fhearann nach bhfuil ag brath ar réamh-anótáil óir. Breathnaímid freisin ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le deighiltí dioscúrsa a fhoghlaim nuair nach bhfuil aon sonraí lipéadaithe ar fáil do theanga. Faigheann ár gcóras lán-mhaoirsithe 89.5% F1 do shreang nuachta Béarla, le laghduithe beaga ar fheidhmíocht i bhfearainn eile, agus tuairiscímid torthaí maoirsithe agus neamh-mhaoirsithe (trasteangacha) do chúig theanga san iomlán.', 'el': 'Η κατακερματισμός λόγου είναι ένα κρίσιμο βήμα για την οικοδόμηση ολοκληρωμένων αναλύσεων λόγου. Ωστόσο, οι διαιρέτες λόγου υπάρχουν μόνο για λίγες γλώσσες και τομείς. Συνήθως ανιχνεύουν μόνο ενδο-νοητικά όρια τμημάτων, υποθέτοντας τον χρυσό τυποποιημένο διαχωρισμό προτάσεων και σημάτων, και βασίζονται σε υψηλής ποιότητας συντακτικές αναλύσεις και πλούσιες heuristics που δεν είναι γενικά διαθέσιμες σε γλώσσες και τομείς. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε στατιστικούς διαχωριστές λόγου για πέντε γλώσσες και τρεις τομείς που δεν βασίζονται σε χρυσές προειδοποιήσεις. Εξετάζουμε επίσης το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης τμημάτων λόγου όταν δεν υπάρχουν δεδομένα με ετικέτα για μια γλώσσα. Το πλήρως εποπτευόμενο σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει 89,5% F1 για την αγγλική εφημερίδα, με μικρές μειώσεις στην απόδοση σε άλλους τομείς, και αναφέρουμε εποπτευμένα και χωρίς επίβλεψη αποτελέσματα για πέντε γλώσσες συνολικά.', 'hu': 'A diskurzus szegmentáció kulcsfontosságú lépés a end-to-end diskurzus elemzők kialakításában. A diskurzusszegmenterek azonban csak néhány nyelvre és tartományra léteznek. Általában csak érzékenységen belüli szegmenshatárokat észlelnek, aranyszabású mondatokat és tokenszegmentációt feltételeznek, és kiváló minőségű szintaktikus elemezésekre és gazdag heurisztikákra támaszkodnak, amelyek általában nem elérhetők a nyelvek és tartományok között. Ebben a tanulmányban öt nyelvre és három területre vonatkozó statisztikai diskurzus szegmentálókat javasolunk, amelyek nem arany előjegyzésekre támaszkodnak. Figyelembe vesszük a diskurzusszegmenterek tanulásának problémáját is, amikor egy nyelvhez nem állnak rendelkezésre címkézett adatok. Teljes körűen felügyelt rendszerünk 89,5%-os F1-t ér el az angol híradók esetében, enyhe teljesítménycsökkenéssel a többi domain esetében, és összesen öt nyelven felügyelt és felügyelet nélküli (többnyelvű) eredményeket jelentünk.', 'ka': 'დისკურსი სეგუმენტირება არის მნიშვნელოვანი კონფიგური კონფიგურაციის განმავლებაში. მაგრამ განსხვავებული სეგმენტები არსებობს მხოლოდ რამდენიმე ენაზე და დომენზე. ტიპულად ისინი მხოლოდ სინტაქტიური პარაზები და ბედნიერი ჰესერტიკები, რომლებიც საერთოდ ენაზები და დომენეები არ აქვს. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ გვეძლევთ სტატისტიკური დისკურსების სექმენტები ხუთ ენების და სამი დომენეში, რომლებიც არ დარწმუნდება დოლანტიკური წინ ანოტ ჩვენ ასევე ვფიქრობთ პრობლემა, როდესაც სახელისთვის არსებობს მონაცემები. ჩვენი ყველაფერად დანახვა სისტემა მიიღება 89,5% F1 ინგლისური ინგლისური ინგლისური სისტემაში, რომელიც ცოტა კონფიგურაციაში სხვა დიომენტებზე, და ჩვენ შევხედოთ დანახვა და არ განსხვავებული (კრისი', 'it': "La segmentazione del discorso è un passo cruciale nella costruzione di parser di discorso end-to-end. Tuttavia, i segmentatori di discorso esistono solo per alcune lingue e domini. In genere rilevano solo i confini del segmento intra-sentenziale, assumendo la segmentazione gold standard di frase e token, e facendo affidamento su analisi sintattiche di alta qualità e euristiche ricche che non sono generalmente disponibili in tutte le lingue e domini. In questo articolo proponiamo segmentatori di discorso statistici per cinque lingue e tre domini che non si basano sulle pre-annotazioni d'oro. Consideriamo anche il problema dell'apprendimento dei segmentatori del discorso quando non sono disponibili dati etichettati per una lingua. Il nostro sistema completamente supervisionato ottiene l'89,5% F1 per il newswire inglese, con lievi cali nelle prestazioni su altri domini, e riportiamo risultati supervisionati e non supervisionati (cross-lingual) per cinque lingue in totale.", 'lt': 'Discourse segmentation is a crucial step in building end-to-end discourse parsers.  Tačiau kalbų segmentatoriai egzistuoja tik keliose kalbose ir srityse. Paprastai jie aptinka tik tarpsakinių segmento ribas, darant prielaidą, kad aukso standartinis sakinys ir žymenų segmentavimas, ir remiasi aukštos kokybės sintaksiniais analizatoriais ir turtingais heuristikais, kurie paprastai nėra prieinami įvairiose kalbose ir srityse. Šiame dokumente siūlome penkių kalbų ir trijų sričių statistinių diskursų segmentatorius, kurie nesikliauja aukso išankstinėmis anotacijomis. Mes taip pat svarstome diskurso segmentatorių mokymosi problem ą, kai kalbai nėra pažymėtų duomenų. Mūsų visiškai prižiūrima sistema gauna 89,5 proc. F1 anglų žiniasklaidai, o kitų sričių rezultatai šiek tiek mažėja, o iš viso pranešame apie prižiūrimus ir nepastebimus (tarpkalbinius) rezultatus penkiose kalbose.', 'kk': 'Дискурстың сегментациясы - соңғы- соңғы дискурстың талдаушыларын құру үшін маңызды қадам. Бірақ дискурс сегменттері тек бірнеше тіл мен домендер үшін болады. Әдетте олар тек тілдер мен домендер бойынша қол жеткізбейтін синтактикалық талдау және баян хиуристикалық шектерін анықтайды. Бұл қағазда, бес тіл мен үш доменге сенбейтін статистикалық дискурстар сегменттерін ұсынамыз. Мұндай-ақ біз тіл үшін белгіленген деректер қол жеткізбегенде дискурс сегменттерін оқыту мәселесін ойлаймыз. Біздің толық бақылау жүйесіміз ағылшын жаңалықтар үшін 89,5% F1 арқылы ағылшын тіліне жеткізеді, басқа домендердің істерінде кішкентай қалдырып, бақылау және бақыламаған (бірнеше тілі) бес тілдер үшін жаса', 'ms': 'Segmen bercakap adalah langkah penting dalam membina penghurai bercakap akhir-akhir. Namun, segmen diskors hanya wujud untuk beberapa bahasa dan domain. Typically they only detect intra-sentential segment boundaries, assuming gold standard sentence and token segmentation, and relying on high-quality syntactic parses and rich heuristics that are not generally available across languages and domains.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan segmen diskors statistik untuk lima bahasa dan tiga domain yang tidak bergantung pada pre-annotasi emas. Kami juga mempertimbangkan masalah pembelajaran segmen diskors apabila tiada data labeled tersedia untuk bahasa. Sistem kita yang diawasi sepenuhnya mendapat 89.5% F1 untuk wayar berita Inggeris, dengan sedikit titik dalam prestasi pada domain lain, dan kami laporkan hasil yang diawasi dan tidak diawasi (saling bahasa) untuk lima bahasa secara keseluruhan.', 'mk': 'Сегментацијата на дискурсот е клучен чекор во изградбата на дискурсни анализатори од крај до крај. Сепак, дискурсните сегментери постојат само за неколку јазици и домени. Типично тие ги детектираат само границите на меѓу речениците на сегментот, претпоставувајќи златна стандардна реченица и сегментација на знаци, и се потпираат на висококвалитетни синтактички анализи и богати хеористики кои генерално не се достапни низ јазици и домени. Во овој весник предложуваме статистички сегментери на дискурс за пет јазици и три домени кои не се потпираат на златни преанотации. Ние, исто така, го разгледуваме проблемот со учењето на дискурсни сегментери кога не се достапни означени податоци за јазик. Нашиот целосно надгледуван систем добива 89,5 отсто од F1 за англиската новинска жица, со мали намалувања на изведбата на други домени, и известуваме надгледувани и ненадгледувани резултати (прекујазични) за вкупно пет јазици.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് അവസാന സംസാര പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പടിയാണ്. എന്നാലും സംസാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d കുറച്ച് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും ഡോമെന്\u200dസിനും മാത്രമേ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ. സാധാരണയായി അവര്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ സാധാരണ വാക്കും സ്ഥിതിയുടെ വിധികളും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് മാത്രമേ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് അഞ്ചു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും മൂന്നു ഡോമെന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയാണ്. സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണത്തിനു മുന്\u200d സംസാരം പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം നമ്മളും വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലാ നമ്മുടെ മുഴുവന്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് 89.5% F1 ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ന്യൂസ്വീറിന് വേണ്ടി, മറ്റുള്ള ഡൊമെയിനുകളില്\u200d ചെറിയ സ്വതന്', 'mt': "Is-segmentazzjoni tad-diskors hija pass kruċjali fil-bini ta’ analizzaturi tad-diskors minn tarf sa tarf. Madankollu, is-segmentaturi tad-diskors jeżistu biss għal ftit lingwi u dominji. Typically they detect only intra-sentential segment boundaries, assuming gold standard sentence and token segmentation, and relying on high-quality syntactic parses and rich heuristics that are generally not available across languages and domains. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu segmentaturi tad-diskors statistiku għal ħames lingwi u tliet oqsma li ma jiddependux fuq annotazzjonijiet minn qabel tad-deheb. Aħna nqisu wkoll il-problem a tat-tagħlim tas-segmentaturi tad-diskors meta m’hemmx dejta ttikkettata disponibbli għal lingwa. Is-sistema tagħna sorveljata bis-sħiħ tikseb 89.5% F1 għall-newswire Ingliż, bi tnaqqis żgħir fil-prestazzjoni f'oqsma oħra, u nirrappurtaw riżultati sorveljati u mhux sorveljati (translingwi) għal ħames lingwi b'kollox.", 'no': 'Oppdagingssegmentasjon er ein viktig steg i bygging av ende-til-slutt diskursanalsar. Det finst berre diskurssegmenterer for nokre språk og domene. Vanlegvis finn dei berre grensene for sentensielle segment med gullsstandard setning og teiknssegmentasjon, og brukar på høg kvalitet syntaktiske tolking og rike heuristikk som ikkje vanlegvis er tilgjengelege over språk og domene. I denne papiret foreslår vi statistiske diskurssegmentarar for fem språk og tre domene som ikkje brukar gull før merking. Vi ser også på problemet med å lære diskurssegmentarar når ingen merkelige data er tilgjengeleg for eit språk. Vårt fullstendig overvåkingssystem får 89,5% F1 for engelsk nysstråd, med liten nedtrekk i utføring på andre domene, og vi rapporterer resultatet av overvåkingsspråk og ukjent (krysspråk) for fem språk totalt.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн хэвлэл нь эцэст нь төгсгөл ярианы ажиллагчид бүтээх чухал алхам юм. Гэхдээ ярианы сегментерүүд хэдэн хэл болон сүлжээнд л байдаг. Энгээд тэд зөвхөн алт стандарт өгүүлбэр, тэмдэглэгдэх, өндөр чанартай синтактик хэлбэр, баян хюристик хэлбэрээр ашиглахгүй баян хэлбэрээр хадгалагддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид статистикийн ярианы захирагчид таван хэл, гурван захирагчид алтын өмнө анзаардаггүй захирагчид сануулдаг. Бид мөн хэл дээр нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг ашиглаж чадахгүй үед ярианы сегментерүүдийн суралцах асуудлыг бодож үзнэ. Бидний бүрэн удирдлагатай систем Англи хэлний мэдээллийн салбарт 89.5% F1-г авч, бусад салбарууд дээр бага зэрэг дамжуулж байдаг. Бид удирдлагагүй, дамжуулагүй (олон хэлний) хэлний үр дүнг нийтэд таван хэлний үр дүнг', 'pl': 'Segmentacja dyskursu jest kluczowym krokiem w budowaniu kompleksowych parserów dyskursu. Jednak segmenty dyskursu istnieją tylko dla kilku języków i domen. Zazwyczaj wykrywają tylko wewnątrz-sentencjalne granice segmentów, zakładając złotą standardową segmentację zdań i tokenów oraz opierając się na wysokiej jakości parsach składni i bogatej heurystyce, które nie są ogólnie dostępne w różnych językach i domenach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy segmenty dyskursu statystycznego dla pięciu języków i trzech dziedzin, które nie opierają się na złotych adnotacjach. Rozważamy również problem uczenia się segmentów dyskursu, gdy nie są dostępne etykietowane dane dla danego języka. Nasz w pełni nadzorowany system uzyskuje 89,5% F1 dla angielskich wiadomości, z nieznacznym spadkiem wydajności w innych domenach, a my raportujemy nadzorowane i bez nadzoru (wielojęzyczne) wyniki dla pięciu języków łącznie.', 'ro': 'Segmentarea discursului este un pas crucial în construirea unor analize de discurs end-to-end. Cu toate acestea, segmentatorii de discurs există doar pentru câteva limbi și domenii. De obicei, acestea detectează doar limitele segmentului intra-sentimental, presupunând o frază gold standard și segmentare token, și bazându-se pe parse sintactice de înaltă calitate și euristice bogate care nu sunt disponibile în general în toate limbile și domeniile. În această lucrare, propunem segmentări statistice de discurs pentru cinci limbi și trei domenii care nu se bazează pe pre-adnotări de aur. De asemenea, luăm în considerare problema învățării segmentatorilor de discurs atunci când nu sunt disponibile date etichetate pentru o limbă. Sistemul nostru complet supravegheat obține 89,5% F1 pentru newswire engleză, cu ușoare scăderi ale performanței pe alte domenii, și raportăm rezultate supravegheate și nesupravegheate (cross-lingve) pentru cinci limbi în total.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කතාවක් පරීක්ෂකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න වැදගත් පැත්තක්. නමුත්, කතා කරණාකරණාකරුවන් භාෂාව සහ ඩෝමේන් කිහිපයක් විතරයි. සාමාන්\u200dය විදියටම ඔවුන් intra-Senensial Sector Borders විතරයි හොයාගන්නේ, සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ටොකෙන් සෙග්ටම් වාර්තාවක් හොයාගන්න, හැබැයි විශේෂ සංකේතික මේ පත්තරේ අපි සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක කතා කරනවා භාෂා පහක් සහ ඩෝමේන් තුනක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ සුන්තිය ප්\u200dරිනෝත්තියෙන්  අපි භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ලේබල් තොරතුරක් නැති විදිහට කතාවක් සෙග්ටර් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හිත අපේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වාර්තාව සඳහා 89.5% F1 ගන්නවා, අනිත් ඩෝමේන් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුව', 'sr': 'Segmentacija diskusija je ključni korak u izgradnji razmatrača diskusija na kraju do kraja. Međutim, segmenteri diskursa postoje samo za nekoliko jezika i domena. Obično otkrivaju samo granice unutar sentencijalnog segmenta, prema pretpostavku zlatne standardne rečenice i segmentacije znakova, i oslanjaju se na visoke kvalitetne sintaktičke analize i bogate heuristike koje uopšte nisu dostupne na jezicima i domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo segmentere statističkih diskursa za pet jezika i tri domena koje se ne oslanjaju na zlatne predanotacije. Takođe smatramo problemom učenja segmentera diskursa kada nije dostupno označenih podataka za jezik. Naš potpuno nadzirani sistem dobija 89,5% F1 za englesku novinarsku žicu, sa manjim kapima u funkciji na drugim domenama, i izvještavamo nadzirani i neodređeni rezultati (preko jezika) za pet jezika ukupno.', 'so': 'Discourse segmentation is a crucial step in building end-to-end discourse parsers.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee dadka kala hadla oo kaliya waxay ku jiraan luuqado iyo deegaano. Sida caadiga ah waxaa la ogaanayaa xuduudaha xiliga ah oo kaliya, sida loo xaqiijiyo xuduudaha caadiga ah iyo qeybta calaamada, waxayna ku kalsoonaadaan baararka sintada sare iyo hiuristiyada hodanka ah oo aan sida caadiga ah u helin luuqadaha iyo deegaanka. Warqaddan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa kooxaha hadalka takhasuska ah shan luuqadood iyo saddex meelood oo aan isku hallaynin habaarka hore oo dahab ah. Waxaynu sidoo kale ka fiirsanaynaa dhibaatada barashada dadka barashada hadalka, marka aan luqada lagu helin macluumaad la xiriira. Sirkayada oo dhan la ilaaliyey waxay heli karaan 89.5% F1 in lagu sameeyo dabar Ingiriis, waxayna leedahay dhibicyo yar oo lagu sameeyo meelaha kale, waxaana wargelinaynaa in lagu ilaaliyo oo aan la ilaalinayn (af luuqad kala duwan) uu u soo jeedo shan luqadood oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Diskurssegmentering är ett avgörande steg för att bygga end-to-end diskurstolkare. Diskurssegmentering finns dock bara för ett fåtal språk och domäner. Typiskt detekterar de bara intrasentimentala segmentgränser, antar gold standard mening och token segmentering, och förlitar sig på högkvalitativa syntaktiska tolkningar och rik heuristik som inte är allmänt tillgänglig över språk och domäner. I denna uppsats föreslår vi statistiska diskurssegmentatorer för fem språk och tre domäner som inte förlitar sig på guldförkortningar. Vi tar även hänsyn till problemet med att lära sig diskurssegmentare när det inte finns några märkta data för ett språk. Vårt fullt övervakade system erhåller 89,5% F1 för engelska nyhetssändningar, med små nedgångar i prestanda på andra domäner, och vi rapporterar övervakade och obevakade (tvärspråkiga) resultat för totalt fem språk.', 'ta': 'விஷயங்கள் பிரிவு என்பது முடிவு பேச்சு பார்ச்சர்கள் கட்டுவதில் ஒரு முக்கியமான படி உள்ளது. ஆனால், பேச்சு பிரிவுகள் சில மொழிகள் மற்றும் தளங்களுக்கு மட்டும் உள்ளன. பொதுவாக அவர்கள் பொருள் நிலையான வாக்கியம் மற்றும் குறியீட்டு பிரிவு பிரிவுகள் மட்டுமே தெரியும், மற்றும் அதிக தரமான ஒத்திசைவு பாகங்கள் மற்றும் பணக்கூடிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புள்ளிவிவரமான பேச்சு பிரிவுகளை ஐந்து மொழிகள் மற்றும் மூன்று களங்களுக்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிற மொழிக்கு எந்த குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலும் கிடைக்கவில்லை என்றால் பேச்சு பிரிவுகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பிரச்ச எங்கள் முழுவதும் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கணினியில் 89.5% F1 பெறுகிறது, மற்ற தளங்களில் செயல்படும் சிறிய துண்டுகள் கிடைக்கும், மற்றும் நாம் மொத்தமாக 5 மொழிகளுக', 'ur': 'بحث سگرمیٹ کا ایک ضروری قدم ہے آخر سے پارچر بنانے میں۔ لیکن صحبت کرنے والے صرف چند زبانوں اور دامنوں کے لئے موجود ہیں. یہ صرف سونے کی استاندارڈ واژن اور ٹوکین سیگنٹیک پارسیس اور ثروتمند حوریستیک پر بھروسہ کرتے ہیں جو زبانوں اور ڈومینوں میں نہ موجود ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم پانچ زبانوں اور تین دامنوں کے لئے آمار کی صحبت کرنے والوں کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو سونے کے پہلے اظہارات پر اعتماد نہیں کرتے۔ ہم نے بھی کلام سکونٹ سکونٹنے کے مسئلہ کو سمجھ لیا ہے جب کسی زبان کے لئے کوئی لابلی نہیں ہے۔ ہماری پوری نظارت کی سیسٹم انگلیسی نیوزویر کے لئے 89.5% F1 حاصل کرتی ہے، اور دوسری دامنوں پر کم ڈروپ کرتی ہے، اور ہم نے پانچ زبانوں کے نتیجے پر نظارت کی اور غیر نظارت کی (کرس-زبان) گزاری ہیں۔', 'uz': "Ахборлаш парламентнинг охир-охирги суҳбат парламентларини ўрнатиш учун муҳим бир қадам. Lekin suhbat qismlari faqat bir necha tillar va domen uchun mavjud. Odatda ular faqat eng sentensial chegarasini aniqlash mumkin, gull standard soʻzni va signal ajratish imkoniyatini anglatadi, va yuqori tibbiy sintaktik parcha va taxminan heuritik chegaralarini ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu tillar va domen bilan umumiy mavjud emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz besh tillar va uch domen uchun statistical gapiruvchilarni o'zgartirayapmiz. Bu davlatda, gull taqdimotidan oldin ishlatmaydi. Biz tilning uchun hech qanday yordam maʼlumot mavjud emas. Bizning butunlay taʼminlovchi tizimmiz ingliz tilidagi yangiliklar uchun 89.5% F1 bo'ladi, boshqa domenadagi bir kichkina chiroqlar bor. Biz bir necha tilda taʼminlovchi va saqlanmagan natijalarni butunlay 5 tillar uchun xabar qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Chuỗi phân loại Discourse là một bước quan trọng trong việc xây dựng các nhà phân tích. Tuy nhiên, các gián đoạn chỉ tồn tại trong vài ngôn ngữ và miền. Thường thì chúng chỉ phát hiện ranh giới đoạn trong phiên xử, thừa nhận mức án vàng và chi tiết biểu trưng bày, và dựa vào các phân tích pháp thuật cao chất lượng và thần kinh giàu có không thường có trên các ngôn ngữ và miền. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất các gián điệp trong văn bản thống kê cho năm ngôn ngữ và ba lĩnh vực không dựa vào tiền sử vàng. Chúng tôi cũng xem xét vấn đề về các gián đoạn học tập khi không có dữ liệu ghi chú cho một ngôn ngữ. Hệ thống giám sát đầy đủ của chúng tôi nhận được 85=. F1 cho đài phát thanh Anh quốc, với một ít ảnh hưởng trong các lĩnh vực khác, và chúng tôi báo cáo toàn bộ kết quả giám sát và không giám sát (ngôn ngữ khác nhau) cho năm ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Сегментацията на дискусиите е решаваща стъпка в изграждането на анализатори на дискусии от край до край. Обаче дискурсните сегментатори съществуват само за няколко езика и области. Обикновено те откриват само граници на сегмента в рамките на сентенциалните сегменти, като приемат златен стандарт изречение и сегментация на символи и разчитат на висококачествени синтактични анализи и богата евристика, които обикновено не са достъпни за езици и домейни. В настоящата статия предлагаме статистически дискурсни сегментатори за пет езика и три области, които не разчитат на златни преданотации. Разглеждаме и проблема с изучаването на дискурсни сегментатори, когато няма обозначени данни за даден език. Нашата напълно контролирана система получава 89,5% за английски новини, с лек спад в представянето в други области, а ние отчитаме резултати под надзор и без надзор (междуезични) за общо пет езика.', 'da': 'Diskurssegmentering er et afgørende skridt i opbygningen af end-to-end diskursfortolkere. Diskurssegmentere findes dog kun for få sprog og domæner. Typisk registrerer de kun intra-sententielle segmentgrænser, antager gold standard sætning og token segmentering, og stoler på højkvalitets syntaktiske fortolkninger og rig heuristik, der ikke er generelt tilgængelige på tværs af sprog og domæner. I denne artikel foreslår vi statistiske diskurssegmentere for fem sprog og tre domæner, der ikke er afhængige af guldpræannotationer. Vi overvejer også problemet med at lære diskurssegmentere, når der ikke findes mærkede data for et sprog. Vores fuldt overvågede system opnår 89,5% F1 for engelsk nyhedsbrev, med små fald i ydeevnen på andre domæner, og vi rapporterer overvågede og ubevågede (tværsprogede) resultater for fem sprog i alt.', 'hr': 'Segmentacija diskursa je ključni korak u izgradnji razmatrača diskursa do kraja. Međutim, segmenteri diskursa postoje samo za nekoliko jezika i domena. Obično otkrivaju samo granice unutar sentencijalnog segmenta, s pretpostavkom zlatne standardne rečenice i segmentacije znakova, i oslanjaju se na visokokvalitetne sintaktičke analize i bogate heuristike koje uobičajeno nisu dostupne na jezicima i domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo segmentere statističkih diskusija za pet jezika i tri domena koje se ne oslanjaju na zlatne predanotacije. Također razmišljamo o problemu učenja segmentera diskursa kada nije dostupno označene podatke za jezik. Naš potpuno nadzirani sustav dobija 89,5% F1 za englesku novinsku žicu, s malo kapi na djelovanju na drugim domenama, i izvještavamo nadzirani i neodržani rezultati (cross-lingual) za ukupno pet jezika.', 'nl': 'Discurssegmentatie is een cruciale stap in het bouwen van end-to-end discoursparsers. Discurssegmenters bestaan echter slechts voor een paar talen en domeinen. Meestal detecteren ze alleen intra-sententiële segmentgrenzen, uitgaande van goudstandaard zin- en tokensegmentatie, en vertrouwen ze op hoogwaardige syntactische parsen en rijke heuristieken die niet over het algemeen beschikbaar zijn in talen en domeinen. In dit artikel stellen we statistische discourssegmenters voor voor vijf talen en drie domeinen die niet afhankelijk zijn van gouden pre-annotaties. We kijken ook naar het probleem van het leren van discourssegmenters wanneer er geen gelabelde gegevens beschikbaar zijn voor een taal. Ons volledig begeleide systeem behaalt 89,5% F1 voor Engelse newswire, met lichte dalingen in prestaties op andere domeinen, en we rapporteren gecontroleerde en niet-begeleide (cross-lingual) resultaten voor vijf talen in totaal.', 'de': 'Diskurssegmentierung ist ein entscheidender Schritt beim Aufbau von End-to-End Diskursparsern. Diskurssegmenter existieren jedoch nur für wenige Sprachen und Domänen. Typischerweise erkennen sie nur intrasentielle Segmentgrenzen, wobei sie eine Goldstandard-Satz- und Tokensegmentierung annehmen und sich auf qualitativ hochwertige syntaktische Parses und reiche Heuristiken stützen, die nicht in allen Sprachen und Domänen verfügbar sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir statistische Diskurssegmente für fünf Sprachen und drei Domänen vor, die nicht auf Gold-Präannotationen angewiesen sind. Wir betrachten auch das Problem des Lernens von Diskurssegmenten, wenn keine markierten Daten für eine Sprache verfügbar sind. Unser vollständig überwachtes System erzielt 89,5% F1 für englische Nachrichten, mit leichten Leistungseinbrüchen in anderen Bereichen, und wir melden überwachte und unbeaufsichtigte (sprachübergreifende) Ergebnisse für insgesamt fünf Sprachen.', 'id': 'Segmen diskors adalah langkah penting dalam membangun parser diskors akhir-akhir. However, discourse segmenters only exist for a few languages and domains.  Biasanya mereka hanya mendeteksi batas segmen intra-kalimat, menganggap kalimat standar emas dan segmen token, dan bergantung pada analisis sintaks kualitas tinggi dan heuristik kaya yang umumnya tidak tersedia di berbagai bahasa dan domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan segmen diskors statistik untuk lima bahasa dan tiga domain yang tidak bergantung pada pre-anotasi emas. We also consider the problem of learning discourse segmenters when no labeled data is available for a language.  Sistem kita yang diawasi sepenuhnya mendapatkan 89,5% F1 untuk kabel berita Inggris, dengan sedikit titik dalam prestasi di domain lain, dan kami melaporkan hasil yang diawasi dan tidak diawasi (saling bahasa) untuk lima bahasa secara total.', 'ko': '문장의 구분은 끝에서 끝까지 문장 분석기를 구축하는 관건적인 절차이다.그러나 문장 절분기는 소수의 언어와 분야에만 존재한다.일반적으로 그들은 문장 내의 단편적 경계만 측정하고 황금 표준의 문장과 표기 분할을 사용하며 고품질의 문법 분석과 풍부한 계발식 방법에 의존한다고 가정하는데 이런 방법은 언어와 분야에서 일반적으로 사용할 수 없다.본고에서 우리는 다섯 가지 언어와 세 가지 분야의 통계 문장 절분기를 제시했는데 이런 절분기는gold예주석에 의존하지 않는다.우리는 표기 데이터가 없는 상황에서 문장 절분기를 배우는 문제도 고려했다.우리의 전체 감독 시스템은 영어 뉴스 전선에서 89.5%의 F1을 얻었고 다른 분야에서는 성능이 약간 떨어졌다. 우리는 총 5개 언어의 감독과 비감독(크로스 언어) 결과를 보고했다.', 'fa': 'قسمت گفتگو یک قدم مهم در ساختن پایان و پایان سخنرانی است. با این حال، صحبت\u200cکننده\u200cها فقط برای چند زبان و دامنه وجود دارند. معمولاً فقط مرزهای بخش\u200cهای داخل احساسات را شناسایی می\u200cکنند، با فرض کردن جمله\u200cهای استاندارد طلا و بخش\u200cهای نشانه\u200cها و بر پاره\u200cهای سنتاکتیک\u200cهای کیفیت بالا و هوریستیک\u200cهای ثروتمند که عموماً در زبان و دامنه\u200cها دسترسی ندارند. در این کاغذ، ما برای پنج زبان و سه دامنی صحبت آمار آمار پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اثر آشنایی طلا اعتماد ندارند. ما همچنین مشکل یادگیری از بخش\u200cدهندگان صحبت را در نظر می\u200cگیریم وقتی داده\u200cهای برچسب برای یک زبان وجود ندارد. سیستم کامل تحت نظر ما 89.5 درصد F1 را برای سیم خبری انگلیسی می\u200cگیرد، با کمی سقوط در اجرای روی دیگر دامنه\u200cها، و ما گزارش می\u200cدهیم نتیجه\u200cهای تحت نظر و غیرقابل تحت نظر (متوسط زبان) برای پنج زبان در کل.', 'sw': 'Kutengana na mazungumzo ni hatua muhimu katika kujenga wabunge wa mazungumzo ya mwisho. Hata hivyo, wanazungumzaji wapo kwa lugha chache na maeneo. Kwa kawaida wanagundua mipaka ya upande wa hisia, wakidhani hukumu ya kiwango cha dhahabu na kuongezeka kwa alama, na wanategemea vikosi vya usambazaji mkubwa na vizuri ambavyo kwa ujumla hawapatikani katika lugha na maeneo mbalimbali. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza vigogo wa mazungumzo ya takwimu kwa lugha tano na maeneo matatu ambayo hayatategemea mabadiliko ya dhahabu kabla ya matatizo. Pia tunafikiria tatizo la kujifunza wanachama wa mazungumzo wakati hakuna taarifa zinazowekwa kwa lugha. Mfumo wetu uliothibitishwa unapata asilimia 89.5 F1 kwa ajili ya pazia la habari la Kiingereza, na kupungua kidogo kwenye utendaji wa maeneo mengine, na tunaripoti matokeo ya lugha tano kwa ujumla.', 'af': "Skakel segmentasie is 'n kruipende stap in die bou van end- to- end diskurse verwerkers. Maar afspraak segmenters bestaan slegs vir 'n paar tale en domeine. Tipe vind hulle slegs intra-sentenciale segment grense, aanvaar goud standaard seting en token segmentasie, en vertrou op hoë-kwaliteit sintakteel verwerking en ryk heuristiek wat gewoonlik nie beskikbaar is oor tale en domeine nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons statistiese diskursie segmenters vir vyf tale en drie domeine wat nie op goud voor-notasies vertrou nie. Ons beskou ook die probleem van leer diskursie segmenters wanneer geen etiketeerde data beskikbaar is vir 'n taal nie. Ons volledige ondersoekte stelsel kry 89,5% F1 vir Engelske nuuswire, met klein druppe in prestasie op ander domeine, en ons rapporteer ondersoekte en onondersoekte (kruistale) resultate vir vyf tale in totaal.", 'sq': 'segmentimi i diskursit është një hap vendimtar në ndërtimin e analizuesve të diskursit nga fundi në fund. Megjithatë, segmentuesit e diskursave ekzistojnë vetëm për disa gjuhë dhe domena. Zakonisht ata zbulojnë vetëm kufijtë e segmentit brenda fjalëve, duke supozuar fjalën e artë standarte dhe segmentimin e token dhe duke u mbështetur në analiza sintaktike të cilësisë së lartë dhe heuristikë të pasura që nuk janë përgjithësisht të disponueshme nëpër gjuhë dhe domeni. Në këtë letër, propozojmë segmentues të diskursit statistik për pesë gjuhë dhe tre fusha që nuk mbështeten në paraanotacionet e artë. Ne gjithashtu konsiderojmë problemin e mësimit të segmentuesve të diskursit kur nuk ka të dhëna të etiketuara në dispozicion për një gjuhë. Sistemi ynë i mbikqyrur plotësisht merr 89.5% F1 për lajmet angleze, me rënie të vogla në paraqitje në fusha të tjera dhe raportojmë rezultate të mbikqyrur dhe të pazgjidhur (ndërgjuhës) për pesë gjuhë në përgjithësi.', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት መጨረሻ ለፍጻሜ ንግግር ፓርስር ለመሥራት የግድ አካሄድ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ለጥቂት ቋንቋዎች እና ዳርቻዎች ንግግሮችን ማድረግ ብቻ ነው፡፡ በተዘጋጀም የሚኖሩት የውይይት ግንኙነት ብቻ ነው፤ የወርቅ ድምፅ እና የምልክት ግንኙነት እና በቋንቋዎች እና በሀብታሞች ውስጥ ያልተገኙ ባለ ሀብታሞች አርጤክስቶችን በመጠቀም ይታመካሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በአምስት ቋንቋዎች እና በሦስት ድጋፍ የሚታመኑ የወርቅ አስቀድሞ ማሰቃየት የማይጠጉትን የstatistical ንግግር ተቃውሞ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ደግሞም የንግግር አካባቢዎችን ለመማር ጉዳይ ለቋንቋ ምንም ዳታ ሳይገኝ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሙሉ የተጠበቀው ስርዓታችን 89.5% F1 በመቶ እንግሊዘኛ አዲስ ሳውር አግኝቷል፣ በሌላ ድረ ገበታዎች ላይ ትንሽ ነጥቦች አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Դիսկորսի սեգմետրացիան կարևոր քայլ է կառուցելու վերջ-վերջ քննարկումների մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, խոսակցության սեգմերները գոյություն ունեն միայն մի քանի լեզուների և բնագավառների համար: Սովորաբար նրանք բացահայտում են միայն ներս նախադասությունների սահմանները, ենթադրելով ոսկու ստանդարտ նախադասությունը և նշանների սեգմետրացիան, և հիմնված են բարձր որակի սինտակտիկ վերլուծումների և հարուստ հորիստիկայի վրա, որոնք ընդհանուր առմամբ հասանելի չեն լե Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք վիճակագրական խոսակցության սեգմերներ հինգ լեզուների և երեք բնագավառների համար, որոնք չեն հիմնված ոսկու նախաannoտացիաների վրա: Մենք նաև դիտարկում ենք խոսակցության սեգմերների ուսումնասիրության խնդիրը, երբ լեզվի համար ոչ մի պիտակ տվյալներ չկան: Մեր ամբողջովին վերահսկված համակարգը ստանում է 89.5 տոկոս F1 անգլերեն նորությունների լարերի համար, այլ ոլորտներում նվազեցող արտադրողությունների փոքր անգամ նվազեցնելով, և մենք զեկուցում ենք վերահսկված և անվերահսկված (փոխլեզվով) արդյունքների մասին, որոնք ըն', 'bn': 'আলোচনার বিভাগ হচ্ছে শেষ পর্যন্ত কথোপকথন পার্সার নির্মাণের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পদক্ষেপ। তবে কথোপকথন শুধুমাত্র কয়েকটি ভাষা এবং ডোমেইনের জন্য বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিষয়বস্তু রয়েছে। সাধারণত তারা শুধুমাত্র সেন্টেন্টিক বিভাগের সীমানা খুঁজে বের করে, ধারণা করে সোনার স্ট্যান্ডারেন্ডারের শাস্তি এবং চিহ্নিত পার্স এবং সমৃদ্ধ হিরিস্টি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পরিসংখ্যানের কথোপকথন প্রস্তাব করছি পাঁচ ভাষা এবং তিনটি ডোমেন্টের জন্য যারা স্বর্ণের পূর্বে নির্ভর করে না। আমরা একই সাথে ভাষার জন্য কোন লেবেলেড ডাটা পাওয়া যাচ্ছে না কেন। আমাদের পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষিত সিস্টেমে ৮৯. ৫% এফ১ পেয়েছে ইংরেজী নিউসুয়ারের জন্য, অন্যান্য ডোমেনের প্রদর্শনীতে সামান্য ফ্ল্যাপ প পেয়েছে, আর আমরা পাঁ', 'bs': 'Segmentacija diskusija je ključni korak u izgradnji razmatrača diskusija na kraju do kraja. Međutim, segmenteri diskursa postoje samo za nekoliko jezika i domena. Obično otkrivaju samo granice unutar sentencijalnog segmenta, s pretpostavkom zlatne standardne rečenice i segmentacije znakova, i oslanjaju se na visokokvalitetne sintaktičke analize i bogate heuristike koje uobičajeno nisu dostupne na jezicima i domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo segmentere statističkih diskursa za pet jezika i tri domena koje se ne oslanjaju na zlatne predanotacije. Također smatramo problemom učenja segmentera diskursa kada nije dostupno označene podatke za jezik. Naš potpuno nadzirani sistem dobija 89,5% F1 za englesku novinarsku žicu, sa malim kapima u provedbi na drugim domenama, i izvještavamo nadzirani i neodržani rezultati (cross-lingual) za pet jezika ukupno.', 'ca': "Discourse segmentation is a crucial step in building end-to-end discourse parsers.  Tanmateix, els segmentadors de discurs només existeixen per algunes llengües i dominis. Typically they only detect intra-sentential segment boundaries, assuming gold standard sentence and token segmentation, and relying on high-quality syntactic parses and rich heuristics that are not generally available across languages and domains.  En aquest article proposem segmentadors estadístics de discurs per cinc llengües i tres dominis que no confien en les préanotacions d'or. També considerem el problem a d'aprendre segmentadors de discurs quan no hi ha dades etiquetades disponibles per a una llengua. El nostre sistema plenament supervisat obté un 89,5% de F1 per al cable de notícies anglès, amb petites baixes de rendiment en altres dominis, i informem de resultats supervisats i no supervisats (translingüístics) per cinc llengües en total.", 'tr': 'Seglemek üçin soňra-soňra çykyş taryşçylary in şa etmek üçin wajyp bir adım. Ýöne gürrüň segmenteleri diňe birnäçe diller we domlar üçin bar. Adatça olar diňe sözlem hatlaryny aňlaýarlar, altyn sözlem we token segmentlerini oňlaýarlar, we ýokary kalitede syntaktik parslere we baý heuristiklere adatça diller we domenalaryň içinde faydalanmayan baý heuristiklere ynanýarlar. Bu kagyzda, beş dil we üç sany sahypa almayan statistik gürrüň segmentlerini teklip edip görýäris. Biz hem diskusiýa segmentleriň öwrenmesiniň meselelerini pikir edýäris, haçan etiket edilen maglumatlar bir dil üçin tapylmady. Biziň tamamlanmamyz gözlemýän sistemimiz Iňlis dilinde 89.5% F1 sany gazanýar, beýleki sahypalarda azajyk tapylýar we süýtgeýän (cross-language) dilleriň netijesi bar.', 'cs': 'Segmentace diskurzu je klíčovým krokem při budování end-to-end diskurzních parserů. Diskursní segmenty však existují pouze pro několik jazyků a domén. Obvykle detekují pouze vnitřní hranice segmentů, předpokládají zlatostandardní segmentaci vět a tokenů a spoléhají na vysoce kvalitní syntaktické analýzy a bohaté heuristiky, které nejsou obecně dostupné napříč jazyky a doménami. V tomto článku navrhujeme statistické segmenty diskurzu pro pět jazyků a tři domény, které nejsou spoléhány na zlaté předanotace. Zvažujeme také problém učení segmentů diskurzu, když pro jazyk nejsou k dispozici žádná označená data. Náš plně dohlížený systém získává 89,5% F1 pro anglické zpravodajství s mírným poklesem výkonu v jiných doménách a hlásíme výsledky pod dohledem a bez dohledu (cross-jazyčné) pro celkem pět jazyků.', 'et': 'Diskursuse segmenteerimine on oluline samm lõpust lõpuni diskursuse parserite loomisel. Kuid diskursuse segmenteerijad eksisteerivad ainult mõne keele ja valdkonna jaoks. Tavaliselt tuvastavad nad ainult sententiaalse segmendi piire, eeldades kuldstandardi lause ja märgi segmenteerimist ning tuginedes kvaliteetsele süntaktilisele parsimisele ja rikkalikule heuristikale, mis ei ole üldiselt kättesaadavad keeltes ja domeenides. Käesolevas töös pakume välja statistilised diskursuse segmenteerijad viiele keelele ja kolmele valdkonnale, mis ei tugine kuldsetele eelmannotatsioonidele. Samuti kaalume diskursuse segmenteerijate õppimise probleemi, kui keele kohta ei ole märgistatud andmeid. Meie täielikult järelevalvestatud süsteem saavutab inglise uudiste puhul 89,5% F1, teiste valdkondade jõudluse väikese langusega ning teatame järelevalveta ja järelevalveta (keeleülesed) tulemustest kokku viies keeles.', 'fi': 'Diskurssisegmentointi on ratkaiseva askel diskurssiparsereiden rakentamisessa. Diskurssisegmentoreita on kuitenkin olemassa vain muutamilla kielillä ja toimialoilla. Tyypillisesti ne havaitsevat vain sententiaalisia segmenttirajoja olettaen kultaisen standardin lause- ja token-segmentoinnin ja luottaen korkealaatuisiin syntaktisiin jäsennyksiin ja rikkaisiin heuristikoihin, joita ei yleensä ole saatavilla kaikilla kielillä ja toimialueilla. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme tilastollisia diskurssisegmenttejä viidelle kielelle ja kolmelle toimialueelle, jotka eivät perustu kultaisiin esiannotointeihin. Käsittelemme myös diskurssisegmentoreiden oppimista, kun kielestä ei ole saatavilla merkittyä tietoa. Täysin valvottu järjestelmämme saa 89,5% F1:n englanninkielisille uutiskirjeille, ja suorituskyky laskee hieman muilla toimialoilla, ja raportoimme valvottuja ja valvomattomia (monikielisiä) tuloksia yhteensä viidellä kielellä.', 'az': 'Söhbət segmentasiyası sona-sona söhbət ayırıcıları in şa etmək üçün vacib bir adımdır. Lakin söhbət segmentləri yalnız bir neçə dil və domen üçün mövcuddur. Yalnız sözlərin içindəki segment sınırlarını keşfetirlər, altın standart sözləri və token segmentasiyasını qəbul edirlər, yüksək kaliteli sintaktik analizələrə və dillərdə və domenlərdə faydalanmayan zengin heuristiklərə təvəkkül edirlər. Bu kağızda, beş dil və üç domen üçün Statistik danışma segmentləri təklif edirik ki, altın əvvəl danışmalarına təvəkkül etmirlər. Biz də dil üçün etiketli məlumatlar tapılmadığı zaman diskursu segmentləri öyrənmək problemini düşünürük. Bizim tamamlanmış sistemimiz İngilizci xəbərdarlıq vasitəsi üçün 89,5% F1 alır, digər domenalar üzərində az düşmüş və mühafizə edilməmiş (çox dilli) 5 dillərə müvafiq sonuçlarını bildiririk.', 'jv': 'command politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe Nanging kuwi iki, kita ngerasah akeh langkung populer kanggo limo banjur lan telu lokal sing ora bisa dianggawe liyo sing wis ana luwih apik. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan kanggo nggawe segmenter resmi, sane ono data sing wis etikeng kanggo langa. Awak dhéwé sistem sing nggawe luwih-luwih luwih nggawe ng-luwih kanggo balêt kanggo basa sing urêh inggiles, lan ijol-ijolan puteh sing ngewehke tarjamahan kanggo sabên siji maneh, lan awak dhéwé ngertuakaké perusahaan lan unggadi dianggawe lan ijol-ijolan winih sing berarti.', 'ha': "Tsarawa ta zama na muhimu a cikin kuɓutar da mazaɓa mai bayani zuwa ƙara. A lokacin da, sai masu da mazaɓa da mazaɓa na cikin harshen da baka kaɗan. Ana iya ƙayyade, suna gane grensa na guda-centati, ana yi amfani da cewa na kalma na zĩnãriya da segment na alama, kuma sunã dõgara a kan parse masu nau'i da taƙaita da heuristic waɗanda ba su iya ƙayyade kodi a cikin harshe da saurãre. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa masu karatun mazaɓa da takwai da sauti waɗanda ba su dõgara a kan kunnuwanta zĩnãriya ba. We also consider the problem of learning discourse segmenters when no labeled data is available for a language.  Ga tsarin da aka cika, yana da 89.5% F1 wa mai sauri na Ingiriya, da ɗan sauri masu cikin aikin sauri masu sauri a kan sauran guda, kuma muna buga wani matsayin tsari da ba'a tsare (tsofalin linguin).", 'he': 'סגמנציה של דיסקורס היא צעד קריטי בניית חוקרי דיסקורס סוף-סוף. בכל אופן, חלקי דיבורים קיימים רק לכמה שפות ודומינים. בדרך כלל הם מגלים רק גבולות סגנון בתוך משפט, בהנחה משפט זהב סטנדרטי וסגנון סימנים, ובסמכות על מחקרי סינטקטיקה איכות גבוהה והיוריסטיקה עשירה שאינם זמינים בדרך כלל ברחבי שפות ותחומים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מגזרים דיבורים סטטיסטיים עבור חמש שפות ושלושה שדות שלא תלויים על ציונים מוקדמים זהב. אנחנו גם שוקלים את הבעיה של ללמוד סגמנטרי דיבורים כאשר אין נתונים על תווית זמינים לשפה. המערכת המפוקחת שלנו מקבלת 89.5% F1 עבור חוט חדשות אנגלי, עם טיפות קלות בהופעה בתחומים אחרים, ואנחנו מדווחים על תוצאות מפקחות ולא מפקחות (בין שפות) לכל חמש שפות.', 'sk': 'Segmentacija diskurza je ključen korak pri gradnji razčlenjevalnikov diskurza od konca do konca. Vendar pa diskurzni segmentirji obstajajo le za nekaj jezikov in domen. Običajno zaznavajo le meje segmentov znotraj sententialnega segmentacije, pri čemer predpostavljajo zlati standard stavkov in segmentacijo žetonov ter se zanašajo na kakovostne sintaktične razčlenitve in bogate heuristike, ki splošno niso na voljo v jezikih in domenah. V prispevku predlagamo statistične diskurzne segmentarje za pet jezikov in tri domene, ki se ne zanašajo na zlate predanote. Obravnavamo tudi problem učenja segmentatorjev diskurza, kadar za jezik ni na voljo označenih podatkov. Naš popolnoma nadzorovan sistem doseže 89,5% F1 za angleške novinarje, z rahlimi zmanjšanji učinkovitosti na drugih področjih, poročamo pa o rezultatih nadzorovanih in nenadzorovanih (medjezičnih) rezultatih za skupno pet jezikov.', 'bo': 'Discourse segmentation is a crucial step in building end-to-end discourse parsers. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་དང་ཁྲོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་ཚོ་ལས་མི་འདུག Typically they only detect intra-sentential segment boundaries, assuming gold standard sentence and token segmentation, and relying on high-quality syntactic parses and rich heuristics that are generally not available across languages and domains. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྒྲུང་ཐོག་གསུམ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཀྱི་གཏོང་མཁན་ཚུ་ལ་སྔོན་ལྟར་གཏོང་གཏོ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱས་ཟིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་ཀྱང་མཐུད་པའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ཡང་ལྟ་བུ་བཏུབ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཡོངས་བསྡད་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་89.5% F1 རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment : Theory vs. Practice', 'ar': 'تقييم جودة الجدال: النظرية مقابل الممارسة', 'fr': "Évaluation de la qualité de l'argumentation\xa0: théorie et pratique", 'es': 'Evaluación de la calidad de la argumentación: teoría vs. práctica', 'pt': 'Avaliação da Qualidade da Argumentação: Teoria vs. Prática', 'zh': '论曰:理与行', 'hi': 'तर्क गुणवत्ता मूल्यांकन: सिद्धांत बनाम अभ्यास', 'ja': '議論の質の評価：理論と実践', 'ru': 'Оценка качества аргументации: теория против практики', 'ga': 'Measúnú Cáilíochta Argóint: Teoiric vs Cleachtadh', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტიკაციის კვალეტის აცენტი: ტეორია vs. პრაქტიკაცია', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση ποιότητας επιχειρημάτων: Θεωρία εναντίον πρακτικής', 'hu': 'Argumentáció Minőségértékelés: elmélet vs. gyakorlat', 'it': 'Valutazione della qualità: teoria vs pratica', 'kk': 'Аргументация сапасы оценка: теория және практика', 'lt': 'Argumentacijos kokybės vertinimas: teorija ir praktika', 'mk': 'Оценка на квалитетот на аргументацијата: Теорија против практика', 'ms': 'Nilai Kualiti Argumentasi: Teori vs. Praktik', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റേഷന്\u200d ഗുണവിശേഷം: പ്രമേയം vs. പരിശീലനം', 'mt': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment: Theory vs. Practice', 'mn': 'Аргументацийн сайн оценка: Теории эсвэл дасгал', 'no': 'Argumentasjonskvalitetassensering: Teorien mot øving', 'pl': 'Ocena jakości argumentacji: teoria vs praktyka', 'ro': 'Evaluarea calității argumentației: Teorie vs. Practică', 'sr': 'Оценка качества аргументације: Теорија против практике', 'si': 'විශේෂ කුළුවත් අවශ්\u200dය: තීරණය විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විශේෂය', 'sv': 'Argumentation Kvalitetsbedömning: Teori vs praktik', 'so': 'Qiimeynta takhasuska heshiiska: Tiyaar vs. tababar', 'ta': 'கருத்து தரம் மதிப்பு', 'ur': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment: Theory vs. Practice', 'uz': 'Argumentning qiymati: Mavzu vs. bajarish', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra chất lượng:', 'da': 'Argumentation Kvalitetsvurdering: Teori vs. Praksis', 'bg': 'Оценка на качеството на аргументиране: теория срещу практика', 'hr': 'Procjena kvalitete argumentacije: teorija protiv vježbe', 'nl': 'Argumentatie Kwaliteitsbeoordeling: Theorie versus praktijk', 'ko': '논문 품질 평가: 이론과 실천', 'de': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment: Theorie vs. Praxis', 'id': 'Penghargaan Kualitas Argumentasi: Teori vs. Praktik', 'fa': 'ارزیابی کیفیت ارزیابی: تئوری علیه تمرین', 'sq': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment: Theory vs. Practice', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya Uwango wa Ujadala: Maudhui na mazoea', 'tr': 'Argumentasyň Kalamy Görkezme: Teoriýa we Pratik', 'af': 'Argumentasie Kwaliteit Assensie: Teorie teen Oefening', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Argumentasyon Qıymeti Assessment: Teoriya vs. Praksiya', 'bn': 'আর্গুমেন্টেশনের মান সমতা: থিয়ের বিরুদ্ধে প্রশিক্ষণ', 'hy': 'Արգեմենտացիայի որակի գնահատում. տեսություն համեմատած փորձը', 'bs': 'Procjena kvalitete argumentacije: teorija protiv vježbe', 'ca': "Evaluació de la qualitat de l'argumentació: teoria vs. pràctica", 'cs': 'Argumentace Hodnocení kvality: teorie vs. praxe', 'et': 'Argumentatsiooni kvaliteedi hindamine: teooria versus praktika', 'fi': 'Argumentaation laadunarviointi: teoria vs. käytäntö', 'jv': 'Validity', 'he': 'הערכת איכות הטענה: תיאוריה נגד מעשה', 'sk': 'Ocena kakovosti argumentacije: teorija in praksa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Argumentation Quality Assessment: Theory vs. Practice'}
{'en': 'Argumentation quality is viewed differently in argumentation theory and in practical assessment approaches. This paper studies to what extent the views match empirically. We find that most observations on quality phrased spontaneously are in fact adequately represented by theory. Even more, relative comparisons of arguments in practice correlate with absolute quality ratings based on theory. Our results clarify how the two views can learn from each other.', 'pt': 'A qualidade da argumentação é vista de forma diferente na teoria da argumentação e nas abordagens de avaliação prática. Este artigo estuda até que ponto as opiniões coincidem empiricamente. Descobrimos que a maioria das observações sobre qualidade formuladas espontaneamente são de fato adequadamente representadas pela teoria. Ainda mais, comparações relativas de argumentos na prática se correlacionam com classificações de qualidade absoluta baseadas na teoria. Nossos resultados esclarecem como as duas visões podem aprender uma com a outra.', 'fr': "La qualité de l'argumentation est perçue différemment dans la théorie de l'argumentation et dans les approches d'évaluation pratique. Cet article étudie dans quelle mesure les points de vue concordent empiriquement. Nous trouvons que la plupart des observations sur la qualité formulées spontanément sont en fait correctement représentées par la théorie. De plus, les comparaisons relatives d'arguments dans la pratique sont corrélées à des évaluations de qualité absolue fondées sur la théorie. Nos résultats clarifient la façon dont les deux points de vue peuvent apprendre l'un de l'autre.", 'ar': 'يُنظر إلى جودة الجدال بشكل مختلف في نظرية الجدل وفي مناهج التقييم العملي. تدرس هذه الورقة إلى أي مدى تتطابق الآراء تجريبيًا. نجد أن معظم الملاحظات على الجودة التي تمت صياغتها تلقائيًا يتم تمثيلها في الواقع بشكل كافٍ من خلال النظرية. أكثر من ذلك ، المقارنات النسبية للحجج في الممارسة ترتبط بتصنيفات الجودة المطلقة بناءً على النظرية. توضح نتائجنا كيف يمكن للرأيتين التعلم من بعضهما البعض.', 'es': 'La calidad de la argumentación se ve diferente en la teoría de la argumentación y en los enfoques de evaluación práctica. Este artículo estudia hasta qué punto los puntos de vista coinciden empíricamente. Encontramos que la mayoría de las observaciones sobre la calidad expresadas espontáneamente están, de hecho, adecuadamente representadas por la teoría. Aún más, las comparaciones relativas de los argumentos en la práctica se correlacionan con las calificaciones de calidad absolutas basadas en la teoría. Nuestros resultados aclaran cómo los dos puntos de vista pueden aprender el uno del otro.', 'ru': 'Качество аргументации рассматривается по-разному в теории аргументации и в подходах к практической оценке. В настоящем документе изучается степень эмпирического совпадения взглядов. Мы обнаружили, что большинство наблюдений за качеством в спонтанной формулировке на самом деле адекватно представлены теорией. Более того, относительные сравнения аргументов на практике коррелируют с абсолютными рейтингами качества, основанными на теории. Наши результаты проясняют, как эти два взгляда могут учиться друг у друга.', 'ja': '弁論術の質は、弁論術理論と実践的な評価アプローチでは異なる見方がされている。この論文では、視点が実証的にどの程度一致するかを研究する。私たちは、自発的に表現された品質に関する観察のほとんどが、実際には理論によって十分に表現されていることを発見します。さらに、実際の議論の相対的な比較は、理論に基づく絶対的な品質評価と相関している。私たちの結果は、2つの見解がどのように互いに学ぶことができるかを明確にしています。', 'zh': '论理与受质,于论不同。 本文究其说,多大程度与经验相符。 吾见多自发之量,皆得其理。 重者,行之对论点,较之于理,评级相关也。 我们果然明白了这两种学问。', 'hi': 'तर्क की गुणवत्ता को तर्क सिद्धांत में और व्यावहारिक मूल्यांकन दृष्टिकोण में अलग तरह से देखा जाता है। यह पेपर अध्ययन करता है कि विचार किस हद तक अनुभवजन्य रूप से मेल खाते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि अनायास वाक्यांशित गुणवत्ता पर अधिकांश टिप्पणियां वास्तव में सिद्धांत द्वारा पर्याप्त रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व की जाती हैं। इससे भी अधिक, व्यवहार में तर्कों की सापेक्ष तुलना सिद्धांत के आधार पर पूर्ण गुणवत्ता रेटिंग के साथ सहसंबंधित है। हमारे परिणाम स्पष्ट करते हैं कि दोनों विचार एक-दूसरे से कैसे सीख सकते हैं।', 'ga': 'Breathnaítear ar cháilíocht na hargóintí ar bhealach difriúil i dteoiric na hargóintí agus i gcur chuige measúnaithe praiticiúla. Déanann an páipéar seo staidéar ar a mhéid a mheaitseálann na tuairimí go heimpíreach. Faighimid amach go bhfuil an chuid is mó de na breathnuithe ar cháilíocht a luaitear go spontáineach léirithe go leordhóthanach ag teoiric. Níos mó fós, tá comhghaol idir comparáidí coibhneasta argóintí i gcleachtas agus rátálacha absalóideacha cáilíochta bunaithe ar theoiric. Soiléiríonn ár dtorthaí conas is féidir leis an dá thuairim foghlaim óna chéile.', 'ka': 'არგუმენტების კალგატი განსხვავებულია არგუმენტების თეორიაში და პრაქტიკური მოწმებაში. ეს დოკუმენტი იწყება, რომლის განსაზღვრებას ემპერიკურად დაკავშირება. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ უფრო მეტი მონაცემები კალგატის ფრაზების სპონტანოდ ფაქტიურად იყოს საკმაოდ თეორიაზე. უფრო მეტი, პრაქტიკში არგუმენტების შემდგომარებული შემდგომარება აბსოლუტური კოლეტინტებით თეორიაზე ბაზიან. ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ჲბწჟნწგარ კაკ ეგამარა დლვეარა მჲზარ ეა ჟვ ნასფწრ ვეთნ ჲრ ეპსდ.', 'el': 'Η ποιότητα επιχειρηματολογίας αντιμετωπίζεται διαφορετικά στη θεωρία επιχειρηματολογίας και στις πρακτικές προσεγγίσεις αξιολόγησης. Η παρούσα εργασία μελετά σε ποιο βαθμό οι απόψεις ταιριάζουν εμπειρικά. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι περισσότερες παρατηρήσεις σχετικά με την ποιότητα που διατυπώνονται αυθόρμητα αντιπροσωπεύονται επαρκώς από τη θεωρία. Ακόμη περισσότερο, οι σχετικές συγκρίσεις επιχειρημάτων στην πράξη συσχετίζονται με τις απόλυτες αξιολογήσεις ποιότητας βασισμένες στη θεωρία. Τα αποτελέσματά μας διευκρινίζουν πώς οι δύο απόψεις μπορούν να διδαχθούν μεταξύ τους.', 'hu': 'Az érvelés minőségét az érvelés elméletében és a gyakorlati értékelési megközelítésekben eltérően tekintik. Ez a tanulmány azt tanulmányozza, hogy a nézetek milyen mértékben illenek empirikusan. Úgy találjuk, hogy a legtöbb spontán megfogalmazott minőségi megfigyelés valójában megfelelően reprezentálódik az elmélet. Sőt, az érvek relatív összehasonlítása a gyakorlatban korrelál az elméleti alapon alapuló abszolút minőségi minősítésekkel. Eredményeink tisztázzák, hogy a két nézet hogyan tanulhat egymástól.', 'lt': 'Argumentacijos kokybė vertinama skirtingai argumentavimo teorijoje ir praktiniuose vertinimo metoduose. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama, kokiu mastu nuomonės atitinka empirinius aspektus. We find that most observations on quality phrased spontaneously are in fact adequately represented by theory.  Dar labiau, santykiniai argumentų palyginimai praktiškai koreliuoja su teoriniu pagrindu pagrįstais absoliučiais kokybės vertinimais. Mūsų rezultatai paaiškina, kaip abi nuomonės gali pasimokyti viena iš kitos.', 'it': "La qualità dell'argomentazione è vista in modo diverso nella teoria dell'argomentazione e negli approcci pratici di valutazione. Questo articolo studia fino a che punto le opinioni coincidono empiricamente. Troviamo che la maggior parte delle osservazioni sulla qualità formulate spontaneamente sono in realtà adeguatamente rappresentate dalla teoria. Ancora di più, i confronti relativi di argomenti nella pratica correlano con valutazioni di qualità assolute basate sulla teoria. I nostri risultati chiariscono come i due punti di vista possono imparare l'uno dall'altro.", 'mk': 'Ковалитетот на аргументацијата се гледа различно во теоријата на аргументацијата и во практичните пристапи на проценка. Овој весник истражува во каков степен гледањата се совпаѓаат емпирички. Најмногу набљудувања за квалитетот спонтано се всушност соодветно претставени од теоријата. Уште повеќе, релативните споредби на аргументите во практиката се корелираат со апсолутните квалитетни рејтинзи базирани на теорија. Нашите резултати објаснуваат како двата погледи можат да научат еден од друг.', 'kk': 'Аргументациялық сапасы аргументациялық теориясында және практикалық оқиғаларында әртүрлі қарады. Бұл қағаз көріністер эмпирикалық түрде сәйкес келеді. Біз сапатты сөздердің көпшілігін автоматты түрде теория бойынша дұрыс көрсетіледі. Теориясына негізделген абсолюттік сапаттық рейтинге сәйкестік аргументтердің салыстырулары. Біздің нәтижеміз екі көріністің бір-бірінен қалай үйрене алатынын анықтайды.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാദ്യാഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ തിയറിയിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റേഷന്\u200d ഗുണവും കാണുന്നു. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d എവിടെയാണ് പൊരുതുന്നതെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നത്. സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി പറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d നോക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. തിയറിയില്\u200d പ കൂടുതല്\u200d, പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d വാദികളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d താല്പര്യമുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥയുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു ഈ രണ്ടു കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d നിന്ന് എങ്ങനെ പഠിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും?', 'ms': 'Kualiti argumen dipandang berbeza dalam teori argumen dan dalam pendekatan penilaian praktik. Kertas ini mempelajari seberapa tinggi pandangan sepadan empirik. Kami mendapati bahawa kebanyakan pengamatan tentang kualiti yang diberikan secara spontan adalah sebenarnya mewakili secara adekwat oleh teori. Walaupun lebih, perbandingan relatif argumen dalam praktek berkorrelasi dengan nilai kualiti mutlak berdasarkan teori. Hasil kita menjelaskan bagaimana kedua-dua pandangan boleh belajar dari satu sama lain.', 'mn': 'Аргментацийн чанар аргументын онол болон практикийн үнэлгээний аргументын аргументын талаар өөр өөр хэлбэртэй харагдаж байна. Энэ цаас харагдах үзэл ямар хэмжээний харагдах вэ? Бид ихэнх шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрийн талаар үнэндээ онолын хувьд илэрхийлэгддэг байдаг. Илүү, дасгалын аргументын харьцаатай харьцуулалт нь онол дээр үндсэн абсолюттай сайн чанартай харьцуулагддаг. Бидний үр дүнд хоёр үзэл бие биенээс хэрхэн сурах талаар тодорхойлж байна.', 'pl': 'Jakość argumentacji jest postrzegana inaczej w teorii argumentacji i w praktycznych metodach oceny. Niniejszy artykuł bada, w jakim stopniu poglądy pasują empirycznie. Stwierdzamy, że większość spostrzeżeń dotyczących jakości sformułowanych spontanicznie jest w rzeczywistości odpowiednio reprezentowana przez teorię. Co więcej, względne porównania argumentów w praktyce korelują z bezwzględnymi ocenami jakości opartymi na teorii. Nasze wyniki wyjaśniają, w jaki sposób oba poglądy mogą się od siebie uczyć.', 'mt': 'Il-kwalità tal-argumentazzjoni titqies b’mod differenti fit-teorija tal-argumentazzjoni u f’approċċi prattiċi ta’ valutazzjoni. Dan id-dokument jistudja sa liema punt il-fehmiet jaqblu empirikament. Issibu li l-biċċa l-kbira tal-osservazzjonijiet dwar il-kwalità espressi b’mod spontanju huma fil-fatt rappreżentati b’mod adegwat mit-teorija. Aktar minn hekk, tqabbil relattiv ta’ argumenti fil-prattika jikkorrella ma’ klassifikazzjonijiet assoluti tal-kwalità bbażati fuq it-teorija. Ir-riżultati tagħna jiċċaraw kif iż-żewġ fehmiet jistgħu jitgħallmu minn xulxin.', 'no': 'Argumentkvalitet vert vist ulike i argumentteorien og i praktiske vurderingstilnærmingar. Denne papiret studerer kor stor storleik visinga passar med empirisk. Vi finn at dei fleste observasjonar om kvalitetfrasen spontane er faktisk tilstrekkelig representert av teorien. Sammenligning av argumenter i praksis korrelatert med absolutte kvalitetsverdiar basert på teorien. Resultatet våre klarer korleis dei to visinga kan lære frå kvarandre.', 'ro': 'Calitatea argumentației este văzută diferit în teoria argumentației și în abordările practice de evaluare. Această lucrare studiază în ce măsură punctele de vedere se potrivesc empiric. Considerăm că majoritatea observațiilor asupra calității exprimate spontan sunt de fapt reprezentate adecvat de teorie. Mai mult, comparațiile relative ale argumentelor în practică corelează cu ratingurile de calitate absolută bazate pe teorie. Rezultatele noastre clarifică modul în care cele două puncte de vedere pot învăța unul de la celălalt.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවක්ෂිත විශේෂතාවක් වෙනස් විදිහට බලන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සහ ප්\u200dරකාශිත විශේෂතාවක්  මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා බලන්නේ කොච්චර ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ද කියලා. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරී තවත් වැඩියි, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් සමග සම්පූර්ණ වි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දේවල් පැහැදිලි කරන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් එක්කෙනෙක්ගෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න.', 'sr': 'Kvaliteta argumentacije se drugačije posmatra u teoriji argumentacije i praktičnim pristupima procjene. Ovaj papir studira u kolikoj mjeri pogled odgovara empirički. Nalazimo da većina posmatranja o kvaliteti rečenica spontano predstavljaju teorijom. Još više, relativne usporedbe argumenata u praksi povezuju sa apsolutnim kvalitetnim ocjenama na temelju teorije. Naši rezultati objašnjavaju kako se dva pogleda mogu naučiti jedno od drugog.', 'so': 'Qiimaha heshiiska waxaa si kala duwan looga arkaa qoraalka sheekeysiga iyo qaababka qiimeynta caadiga ah. Warqaddaas wuxuu ku baranayaa sida ay aragtidu ugu habboon tahay. Waxaynu helnaa in aragtida badan oo ku saabsan hadalka qiimo-qiimo ah ay si rasmi ah ugu filan yihiin fikrada. Inta dheer waxaa la xiriiraa tusaalooyin qiimaha ka mid ah oo ku saabsan qiimaha tayada oo ku saleysan tiyaatarada. Fashihiisu waxay u caddaan yihiin sida labada arag midkoodba midka kale uga baran karo.', 'sv': 'Argumentationskvalitet ses olika i argumentationsteori och i praktiska bedömningsmetoder. Denna uppsats undersöker i vilken utsträckning synpunkterna matchar empiriskt. Vi finner att de flesta observationer om kvalitet formulerade spontant faktiskt är tillräckligt representerade av teori. Relativa jämförelser av argument i praktiken korrelerar dessutom med absoluta kvalitetsbedömningar baserade på teori. Våra resultat klargör hur de två åsikterna kan lära sig av varandra.', 'ta': 'வார்ப்பு திட்டத்திலும் செயல்பாடு முறையிலும் மாறுபட்ட மதிப்பு பார்க்கப்படுகிறது. காட்சிகள் எத்தனை அளவில் பொருந்துகின்றன என்பதை இந்த தாள் படிப்பார்கள். நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பெரும்பாலான கண்காணிப்புகள் தானாகவே தேவையான வாக்கியத்தில் போதுமானவர்கள். மேலும், முயற்சியில் வார்த்தைகளின் சார்ந்த ஒப்பீடுகள் திடீரியை அடிப்படையில் முழுமையான தரம் விகிதத் நமது முடிவுகள் இரண்டு காட்சிகள் எப்படி ஒருவர் மற்றொருவரிடமிருந்து கற்று கொள்ள முடியும் என்பதை தெ', 'ur': 'Argumentation quality is viewed differently in argument theory and practical assessment approaches. یہ کاغذ کس طرح مطالعہ کرتا ہے کہ نظر کس طرح مطالعہ سے ملتے ہیں۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ بہت سی نظریہ نظریہ کے ذریعہ سے بہت سی نظریہ ہیں اور زیادہ، نظریہ پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے بحثوں کے مقابلہ مقابلہ کے مطابق بالکل کیفیت ریٹینگ سے تعلق ہے. ہمارے نتیجے واضح کر رہے ہیں کہ دونوں نظر ایک دوسرے سے کیسے سیکھ سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻoz ko'rinishini tasavvur qiladi. Biz o'rganamiz, ko'pchilik tadbirlik tilida o'xshash fikrlarni teoriga tayyorlash kerak. Ko'pchilik, ma'lumotlarning qismlariga o'xshash fikrlarni teoriga asosida yaratish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz ikkita ko'rini bir-бирларидан qanday o'rganishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chất lượng tranh luận được nhìn nhận theo cách khác nhau trong thuyết luận và trong các phương pháp đánh giá thực tế. Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu xem xem tầm nhìn phù hợp với kinh nghiệm. Chúng tôi thấy hầu hết các quan sát về chất lượng được nêu tự động được thực tế là đầy đủ theo lý thuyết. Hơn nữa, so sánh tương đối trong thực tế với tỉ lệ chất lượng tuyệt đối dựa trên lý thuyết. Kết quả của chúng ta đã làm rõ cách nào hai quan điểm có thể học hỏi lẫn nhau.', 'bg': 'Качеството на аргументацията се разглежда различно в теорията на аргументацията и в практическите подходи за оценка. Тази статия изследва до каква степен възгледите съвпадат емпирично. Намираме, че повечето наблюдения за качеството, формулирани спонтанно, всъщност са адекватно представени от теорията. Още повече, относителните сравнения на аргументите на практика корелират с абсолютните оценки за качество, базирани на теория. Нашите резултати изясняват как двете възгледи могат да се учат един от друг.', 'da': 'Argumentationskvalitet ses forskelligt i argumentationsteori og i praktiske vurderingsmetoder. Denne artikel undersøger i hvilket omfang synspunkterne matcher empirisk. Vi finder, at de fleste observationer af kvalitet formuleret spontant er faktisk tilstrækkeligt repræsenteret af teori. Endnu mere korrelerer relative sammenligninger af argumenter i praksis med absolutte kvalitetsvurderinger baseret på teori. Vores resultater tydeliggør, hvordan de to synspunkter kan lære af hinanden.', 'nl': 'Argumentatiekwaliteit wordt verschillend gezien in argumentatietheorie en in praktische assessment benaderingen. In dit artikel wordt onderzocht in hoeverre de standpunten empirisch overeenkomen. We vinden dat de meeste spontaan geformuleerde kwaliteitswaarnemingen in feite adequaat worden vertegenwoordigd door theorie. Sterker nog, relatieve vergelijkingen van argumenten in de praktijk correleren met absolute kwaliteitsbeoordelingen gebaseerd op theorie. Onze resultaten verduidelijken hoe de twee opvattingen van elkaar kunnen leren.', 'de': 'Argumentationsqualität wird in der Argumentationstheorie und in praktischen Bewertungsansätzen unterschiedlich betrachtet. In diesem Beitrag wird untersucht, inwieweit die Ansichten empirisch übereinstimmen. Wir stellen fest, dass die meisten spontan formulierten Beobachtungen zur Qualität tatsächlich durch Theorie adäquat repräsentiert werden. Noch mehr korrelieren relative Argumentvergleiche in der Praxis mit absoluten Qualitätsbewertungen basierend auf Theorie. Unsere Ergebnisse verdeutlichen, wie die beiden Ansichten voneinander lernen können.', 'hr': 'kvaliteta argumentacija se drugačije smatra u teoriji argumentacije i praktičnim pristupima procjene. Ovaj papir studira u kolikoj mjeri mišljenja odgovara empirički. Nalazimo da su većina primjećivanja kvalitete spontano izrečenih, zapravo odgovarajući predstavljeni teorijom. Još više, relativne usporedbe argumentacija u praksi povezuju s apsolutnim ocjenama kvalitete na temelju teorije. Naši rezultati objašnjavaju kako se dva pogleda mogu naučiti jedno od drugog.', 'id': 'Kualitas argumen dipandang berbeda dalam teori argumen dan dalam pendekatan penilaian praktis. Kertas ini mempelajari seberapa tinggi pandangan cocok empiris. Kami menemukan bahwa kebanyakan pengamatan pada kualitas frasa secara spontan pada fakta cukup mewakili oleh teori. Bahkan lebih, perbandingan relatif argumen dalam praktek berkorelasi dengan nilai kualitas mutlak berdasarkan teori. Hasil kami menjelaskan bagaimana kedua pandangan bisa belajar dari satu sama lain.', 'sw': 'Uwango wa mazungumzo unaonekana tofauti katika nadharia ya mazungumzo na katika mbinu za utafiti. Kanisa hili linatafiti kwa kiasi gani maoni yanafanana na hali ya juu. Tunaona kwamba maoni mengi kuhusu maneno yenye sifa ya kujitolea yanawakilishwa na nadharia ya kutosha. Zaidi zaidi, ukilinganishwa na hoja za mazoea yanahusiana na kiwango kikubwa kinachotokana na nadharia. Matokeo yetu yanafafanua namna maoni haya mawili yanavyoweza kujifunza kutoka kwa wao.', 'fa': 'کیفیت ارجмент در نظریه توضیح و نزدیک ارزیابی عملی متفاوت نگاه می\u200cشود. این کاغذ مطالعه می\u200cکند که چقدر دیدگاه\u200cها با امپراطوری مسابقه می\u200cشوند. ما فهمیدیم که بیشترین مشاهده\u200cها در مورد کیفیت مفصل\u200cهای خودخواهی، در حقیقت به طور مناسب توسط تئوری معرفی می\u200cشوند. حتی بیشتر، مقایسه\u200cهای نسبتی از ارائه\u200cها در تمرین با ارائه\u200cهای کیفیت کامل بر اساس تئوری ارائه دارند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما روشن می\u200cکنند چگونه دو نگاه می\u200cتوانند از یکدیگر یاد بگیرند.', 'ko': '논증 이론과 실천 평가 방법에서 논증의 질에 대한 견해는 다르다.본고는 실증적인 각도에서 이러한 관점의 일치 정도를 연구하였다.우리는 대다수의 자발적으로 품질에 대한 관찰이 사실상 이론으로 충분히 표현될 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.더욱 중요한 것은 실천에서 논점의 상대적인 비교는 이론을 바탕으로 하는 절대적인 품질 평가와 관련이 있다.우리의 결과는 이 두 가지 관점이 어떻게 서로 배웠는지 천명하였다.', 'af': 'Argumentasie-kwaliteit is verskillende aangesien in argumentasie-teoriee en in praktiese evalueringstoegang. Hierdie papier leer tot wat uitbreiding die aansigte oereenkomstig. Ons vind dat mees opmerking op kwaliteit gespreek spontaneer is in werklikheid adequate deur teorie voorgestel. Selfs meer, relatiewe vergelykings van argumente in praksie korrelaat met absolute kwaliteit-reitings gebaseer op teorie. Ons resultate verduidelik hoe die twee aansigte van mekaar kan leer.', 'tr': 'Argumentasyň kalitesi argumentasy teoriýasy we praktik deňleme golaýynda başga görnüşdirilýär. Bu kagyz görüntülerin nähili empirik bilen meňzeşleýändigini öwrenýär. Biz esaslardan köp görnüş ifade edilen kelläp görnüşleri teoriýa görä ýeterlik şekilde ifade edilýäris. Daha köp, praktikadaki argumlaryň görnüşleri teoriýa daýanýan kesinlikli mykdarlar bilen meňzeşdirler. Näme netijelerimiz bu iki pikir bir-birimizden nähili öwrenjekdigini tassyklaýar.', 'sq': 'Kwaliteti i argumentit shihet ndryshe në teorinë e argumentit dhe në metodat praktike të vlerësimit. Kjo letër studion në se sa përshtypjet përshtaten empirisht. Ne zbulojmë se shumica e vëzhgimeve mbi cilësinë e shprehur spontanisht janë në fakt përfaqësuar në mënyrë të përshtatshme nga teoria. Edhe më shumë, krahasimet relative të argumenteve në praktikë korrelojnë me vlerësimet absoluta të cilësisë bazuar në teori. Rezultatet tona sqarojnë se si të dy pikëpamjet mund të mësojnë nga njëri-tjetri.', 'am': 'የአውራጫው ጥያቄ በተለያየ ክርክር ታሪዮ እና በአስቸጋሪው አካሄድ ውስጥ በተለየ ይታያል፡፡ ይህ የሕዝባብ መልዕክት ምን ያህል እንደሚያሳየው ትምህርት ነው፡፡ ብዙዎቹ የጥሩ ቃላት በተለየ ብልሃት በጥያቄ በጥያቄ ይታያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች በጥያቄ ላይ በተመሳሳይ ታሪዮ የተደረገውን የጥያቄ እውቀት ይታሰራሉ፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የሁለቱን ተመልከቶች እርስ በርሳቸው እንዴት እንደሚማሩ ይግለጽላቸዋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Արգենտացիայի որակը տարբերվում է բանավեճի տեսության և պրակտիկ գնահատման մոտեցումների մեջ: Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է, թե ինչքանով են տեսանկյունները համապատասխանում էմպիրիկապես: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ինքնաբուխ արտահայտված որակի վերաբերյալ հետազոտությունների մեծ մասը բավարար պատկերված է տեսության միջոցով: Ավելի շատ, իրականում բանավեճերի հարաբերական համեմատությունները կապված են բացարձակ որակի գնահատականների հետ, հիմնված տեսության վրա: Մեր արդյունքները պարզաբանում են, թե ինչպես են երկու տեսանկյունները կարող սովորել միմյանց:', 'az': 'Argumentasyon qiyməti argumentasyon teorisində və praktik qiymətlərin yaxınlıqlarında farklı görünür. Bu kağıt görüntülərin necə qədər empirik olaraq uyuşduğunu öyrənir. Həqiqətən, çox qiymətli ifadə edilən məlumatların nəzəriyyə təsdiqlənməsi nəzəriyyə görə bilərik. Daha çox, təcrübədə müəyyən edilən argumentlərin əlaqəsizlikləri teoriaya dayanan absolut kaliteli qiymətləri ilə əlaqəsizlik edir. Sonuçlarımız bir-birindən necə öyrənə bilər?', 'bn': 'আর্গুমেন্টেশনের মান ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন এই পত্রিকাটি শিক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি কি পর্যায়ে সামর্থ্যিকভাবে মিল। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে মানের বেশীরভাগ পর্যবেক্ষণ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তত্ত্বাবধানে যথেষ্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব করছে। এছাড়াও, প্রক্রিয়ায় যুক্তির আত্মিক তুলনার তুলনায় তত্ত্বের ভিত্তিতে পরিপূর্ণ মানের রেজার সাথে যুক্ আমাদের ফলাফল পরিষ্কার করে দেখা যায় কিভাবে দুই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি একে অপরের কাছ থেকে শিখতে পারে।', 'ca': "La qualitat de l'argumentació es veu de manera diferent en la teoria de l'argumentació i en enfocaments pràctics d'evaluació. Aquest paper estudia en quin punt les vistes coinciden empíricament. Trobem que la majoria de les observacions sobre la qualitat expressades espontàniament estan de fet adequadament representades per la teoria. Encara més, les comparacions relativas dels arguments en la pràctica correlacionen amb valoracions absolutes de qualitat basades en la teoria. Els nostres resultats clarifiquen com les dues vistes poden aprendre els uns dels altres.", 'cs': 'Kvalita argumentací je vnímána odlišně v argumentační teorii a v praktických hodnotících přístupech. Tento článek zkoumá, do jaké míry se názory empiricky shodují. Zjišťujeme, že většina pozorování o kvalitě frázovaných spontánně jsou ve skutečnosti adekvátně reprezentována teorií. Ještě více relativní srovnání argumentů v praxi koreluje s absolutními hodnoceními kvality založenými na teorii. Naše výsledky objasňují, jak se oba názory mohou od sebe navzájem učit.', 'et': 'Argumentatsiooni kvaliteeti vaadeldakse erinevalt argumenteerimisteoorias ja praktilises hindamismeetodis. Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse, mil määral seisukohad empiiriliselt sobivad. Me leiame, et enamik tähelepanekuid kvaliteedi sõnastatud spontaanselt on tegelikult piisavalt esindatud teooria. Veelgi enam on argumentide suhtelised võrdlused praktikas seotud absoluutsete kvaliteedihinnangutega, mis põhinevad teoorial. Meie tulemused selgitavad, kuidas need kaks vaadet võivad üksteiselt õppida.', 'bs': 'kvalitet argumentacije se drugačije smatra u teoriji argumentacije i praktičnim pristupima procjene. Ovaj papir studira u kolikoj mjeri mišljenja odgovara empirički. Nalazimo da je većina posmatranja o kvaliteti rečenice spontano zastupljena teorijom. Još više, relativne usporedbe argumenata u praksi povezuju sa apsolutnim kvalitetnim ocjenama na temelju teorije. Naši rezultati objašnjavaju kako dva pogleda mogu naučiti jedno od drugog.', 'fi': 'Argumentaation laatua tarkastellaan eri tavalla argumentointiteoriassa ja käytännön arvioinnissa. Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan, missä määrin näkemykset vastaavat empiirisesti. Havaitsemme, että useimmat spontaanisti muotoillut laatuhavainnot ovat itse asiassa riittävästi edustettuina teoriassa. Lisäksi argumenttien suhteelliset vertailut korreloivat teoriaan perustuvien absoluuttisten laatuluokitusten kanssa. Tuloksemme selventävät, miten nämä kaksi näkemystä voivat oppia toisiltaan.', 'jv': 'AllProgress Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi kapan ngono kuwi kapan nggawe persilangan ngono empire. Awak dhéwé ngerti, nggo ngerasakno kanggo kaliwat supaya sakjane kapan-kapan karo ngono sinau supaya sakjane luwih apik. Tulungan luwih apik, perusahaan langgar sampulan seneng pating pratike sembaran karo kaliwat sing apik batar nggawe Tioroi. Rejalaké awakdhéwé ngerasakno piye ngerasakno iki bakal kelas ngono bengko.', 'sk': 'Kakovost argumentacije se razlikuje v teoriji argumentacije in praktičnih pristopih ocenjevanja. V prispevku se preučuje, v kolikšni meri se pogledi empirično ujemajo. Ugotavljamo, da je večina spontano izraženih opazovanj o kakovosti dejansko ustrezno zastopana s teorijo. Še več, relativne primerjave argumentov v praksi povezujejo z absolutnimi ocenami kakovosti, ki temeljijo na teoriji. Naši rezultati pojasnjujejo, kako se lahko oba pogleda učita drug od drugega.', 'he': 'איכות התווכחות נראית אחרת בתיאוריית התווכחות ובגישות הערכה מעשיות. העיתון הזה לומד עד כמה הנוף מתאים אמפירית. אנו מוצאים שרוב התבוננות על איכות המבוטאות באופן ספונטני למעשה מייצגות באופן מספיק על ידי תיאוריה. אפילו יותר, השוואות יחסיות של ויכוחים בעבודה מתחברות עם ציוני איכות מוחלט מבוססים על תיאוריה. התוצאות שלנו מסבירות איך שני הנוף יכולים ללמוד אחד מהשני.', 'ha': "Ana nuna nau'in Argumenta yana dabam-dabam cikin teori na mazaɓa da kuma a cikin hanyoyin muhimmanci. Wannan karatun na karanta zuwa inda duk gani suke kami da empirically. Muna gane mafiya yawan kalmõmi a kan maganar wani da aka faɗa farat ɗaya suna da ma'anar gaskiyar. Even more, relative comparisons of arguments in practice correlate with absolute quality ratings based on theory.  MatamayinMu ta bayyana yadda gani gani biyu suke iya barci daga sãshensu.", 'bo': 'Argumentation quality is viewed differently in argumentation theory and in practical assessment approaches. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་ཀློག་ཚུལ་གང་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོང་སྣང་མང་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་པས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་གཞི་རྩལ་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་གཉིས་དབར་ནས་ཁ་བྱས་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'A Recurrent Neural Model with Attention for the Recognition of Chinese Implicit Discourse Relations', 'ar': 'نموذج عصبي متكرر مع الاهتمام بالاعتراف بعلاقات الخطاب الضمني الصينية', 'fr': 'Un modèle neuronal récurrent avec une attention particulière pour la reconnaissance des relations implicites du discours chinois', 'pt': 'Um modelo neural recorrente com atenção para o reconhecimento das relações discursivas implícitas chinesas', 'es': 'Un modelo neuronal recurrente con atención al reconocimiento de las relaciones discursales implícitas chinas', 'zh': '一识汉语内隐语循环神经模', 'ru': 'Рекуррентная нейронная модель с вниманием к признанию китайских неявных дискурсивных отношений', 'ja': '中国の暗黙の言論関係の認識に注目した再発性ニューラルモデル', 'hi': 'चीनी अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंधों की मान्यता के लिए ध्यान के साथ एक आवर्ती तंत्रिका मॉडल', 'ga': 'Samhail Néarach Athfhillteach le hAghaidh Aird ar Aitheantas do Chaidreamh Dioscúrsa intuigthe na Síne', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Ismétlődő idegmodell, figyelemmel a kínai implicit beszédkapcsolatok elismerésére', 'el': 'Ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Μοντέλο με προσοχή για την αναγνώριση των κινεζικών έμμεσων σχέσεων συζήτησης', 'lt': 'Kartotinis neurologinis modelis, kuriame atkreipiamas dėmesys į Kinijos netiesioginių diskurso santykių pripažinimą', 'it': 'Un modello neurale ricorrente con attenzione per il riconoscimento delle relazioni di dialogo implicite cinesi', 'kk': 'Қытайша имплиттік дискурстардың қатынасын анықтау үшін қайталанатын невралдық моделі', 'mk': 'Повторен нервен модел со внимание за признавање на кинеските имплицитни односи со дискурс', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell Newrali Rikorrenti b’Attenzjoni għar-Rikonoxximent tar-Relazzjonijiet ta’ Diskors Impliċitu Ċiniżi', 'mn': 'Хятад эзэмшигтэй ярилцлагын харилцааны анхаарлын дахин сэтгэл санааны загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model powtarzający się neuronalny z uwzględnieniem rozpoznawania chińskich implicyjnych stosunków dyskusyjnych', 'sr': 'Povratni neuronski model sa pažnjom za priznanje kineskih poslednjih diskurskih odnosa', 'ro': 'Un model neural recurent cu atenție pentru recunoașterea relațiilor de discurs implicit chinezesc', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Recurrent Neural Model with Attention for the Recognition of Chinese Implicit Discourse Relations', 'sv': 'En återkommande neural modell med uppmärksamhet för erkännande av kinesiska implicita diskursrelationer', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک دوبارہ نئورل موڈل جو چین کی اثبات رابطہ کی پہچان کرنے کے لئے توقع رکھتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thần kinh có liên tục với chú ý về việc nhận biết quan hệ ngầm của Trung Quốc', 'bg': 'Повтарящ се неврален модел с внимание за разпознаване на китайските имплицитни дискурсни отношения', 'hr': 'Povratni neuronski model s pažnjom na priznanje kineskih posljedičnih odnosa', 'da': 'En tilbagevendende neural model med opmærksomhed på anerkendelse af kinesiske implicitte diskursrelationer', 'nl': 'Een recurrent neural model met aandacht voor de erkenning van Chinese impliciete discoursverhoudingen', 'id': 'A Recurrent Neural Model with Attention for the Recognition of Chinese Implicit Discourse Relations', 'de': 'Ein wiederkehrendes neuronales Modell mit Aufmerksamkeit für die Anerkennung chinesischer impliziter Diskursbeziehungen', 'ko': '중국어 내은어편 관계 식별의 주의 귀속 신경 모델', 'fa': 'یک مدل عصبی دوباره با توجه به شناختن رابطه های معمولی چین', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Neural unaoendelea kwa ajili ya kutambua Kuhusiana na Utawala wa China', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çinçe Implicit Gezginleri tanaýmak üçin bir nural nusgasy', 'am': 'A Recurrent Neural Model with Attention for the Recognition of Chinese Implicit Discourse Relations', 'hy': 'Կրկին նյարդային մոդել, ուշադրություն դարձնելով Չինաստանի աննշանակալի հաղորդակցման հարաբերությունների ճանաչման համար', 'az': 'Ã‡in Ä°plikitli SÃ¶zlÉ™r Ä°liÅŸkilÉ™rini tanÄ±yÄ±b', 'sq': 'Një model neural i përsëritur me vëmendje për njohjen e marrëdhënieve kineze të diskutimit të përfshirë', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Un model neural recurrent amb atenció al reconeixement de les relacions de discurs implícits xinesos', 'cs': 'Recidivní neuronový model s pozorností na uznání implicitních diskursních vztahů v Číně', 'bs': 'Povratni neuronski model sa pažnjom za priznanje kineskih implicitnih diskurskih odnosa', 'et': 'Korduv neuraalne mudel tähelepanu Hiina kaudsete diskursussuhete tunnustamisele', 'fi': 'Toistuva hermomalli, jossa kiinnitetään huomiota kiinalaisten implisiittisten diskurssisuhteiden tunnustamiseen', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Néural sing wis ngupakan karo Aturan kanggo Kearno Stringkil Program Chinese', 'he': 'מודל נוירולי מחדש עם תשומת לב לזהות מערכות יחסים סיניות משמעותיות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Ponavljajoči se živčni model s pozornostjo pri prepoznavanju kitajskih implicitnih diskurznih odnosov', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་གི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ལ་རྟོགས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་དང་།'}
{'en': 'We introduce an attention-based Bi-LSTM for Chinese implicit discourse relations and demonstrate that modeling argument pairs as a joint sequence can outperform word order-agnostic approaches. Our model benefits from a partial sampling scheme and is conceptually simple, yet achieves state-of-the-art performance on the Chinese Discourse Treebank. We also visualize its attention activity to illustrate the model’s ability to selectively focus on the relevant parts of an input sequence.', 'ar': 'نقدم Bi-LSTM القائم على الانتباه لعلاقات الخطاب الضمني الصيني ونوضح أن أزواج النمذجة كسلسلة مشتركة يمكن أن تتفوق على مناهج ترتيب الكلمات. يستفيد نموذجنا من مخطط أخذ العينات الجزئي وهو بسيط من الناحية المفاهيمية ، ولكنه يحقق أداءً متطورًا على بنك الخطاب الصيني. نتخيل أيضًا نشاط الانتباه الخاص به لتوضيح قدرة النموذج على التركيز بشكل انتقائي على الأجزاء ذات الصلة من تسلسل الإدخال.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um Bi-LSTM baseado em atenção para relações discursivas implícitas chinesas e demonstramos que a modelagem de pares de argumentos como uma sequência conjunta pode superar abordagens agnósticas de ordem de palavras. Nosso modelo se beneficia de um esquema de amostragem parcial e é conceitualmente simples, mas alcança desempenho de última geração no Chinese Discourse Treebank. Também visualizamos sua atividade de atenção para ilustrar a capacidade do modelo de focar seletivamente nas partes relevantes de uma sequência de entrada.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un Bi-LSTM basé sur l'attention pour les relations de discours implicites chinois et démontrons que la modélisation de paires d'arguments en tant que séquence conjointe peut surpasser les approches indépendantes de l'ordre des mots. Notre modèle bénéficie d'un plan d'échantillonnage partiel et est conceptuellement simple, tout en atteignant des performances de pointe sur le Chinese Discourse Treebank. Nous visualisons également son activité d'attention pour illustrer la capacité du modèle à se concentrer de manière sélective sur les parties pertinentes d'une séquence d'entrée.", 'es': 'Presentamos un BI-LSTM basado en la atención para las relaciones de discurso implícitas en chino y demostramos que modelar pares de argumentos como una secuencia conjunta puede superar a los enfoques independientes del orden de las palabras. Nuestro modelo se beneficia de un esquema de muestreo parcial y es conceptualmente simple, pero logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en el Banco de árboles del discurso chino. También visualizamos su actividad de atención para ilustrar la capacidad del modelo para centrarse selectivamente en las partes relevantes de una secuencia de entrada.', 'ja': '我々は、中国の暗黙の話題関係のための注意に基づくBi - LSTMを導入し、共同シーケンスとしての引数ペアをモデリングすることで、単語の順序-非推論的アプローチを上回ることができることを実証した。当社のモデルは、部分的なサンプリングスキームの恩恵を受けており、概念的にはシンプルですが、中国のDiscourse Treebankで最先端のパフォーマンスを実現しています。また、その注意活動を視覚化して、入力シーケンスの関連する部分に選択的に焦点を当てるモデルの能力を示します。', 'zh': '余为中文隐式语引入一Bi-LSTM,并证将参数对建模为合序可以优词序之法。 吾道益抽样方,其概甚简,而于中国话语树库最先进之性。 又可视化其注意动作,以明模形有择地关注输入序列之力。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим основанный на внимании Bi-LSTM для китайских неявных отношений дискурса и демонстрируем, что моделирование пар аргументов как совместной последовательности может превосходить подходы к порядку слов-диагностики. Наша модель извлекает выгоду из частичной схемы выборки и концептуально проста, но в то же время достигает самой современной производительности на китайском Treebank дискурса. Мы также визуализируем его активность внимания, чтобы проиллюстрировать способность модели выборочно фокусироваться на соответствующих частях входной последовательности.', 'hi': 'हम चीनी अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंधों के लिए एक ध्यान-आधारित द्वि-एलएसटीएम पेश करते हैं और प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि संयुक्त अनुक्रम के रूप में तर्क जोड़े मॉडलिंग शब्द आदेश-अज्ञेयवादी दृष्टिकोणों को बेहतर बना सकते हैं। हमारा मॉडल एक आंशिक नमूना योजना से लाभ उठाता है और वैचारिक रूप से सरल है, फिर भी चीनी प्रवचन ट्रीबैंक पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। हम इनपुट अनुक्रम के प्रासंगिक भागों पर चुनिंदा रूप से ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए मॉडल की क्षमता को चित्रित करने के लिए इसकी ध्यान गतिविधि की भी कल्पना करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach Bi-LSTM aird-bhunaithe do chaidreamh dioscúrsa intuigthe na Síne agus léirímid gur féidir le péirí argóinte samhaltaithe mar sheicheamh comhpháirteacha sárobair a dhéanamh ar chur chuige ord focal-agnóiseach. Baineann ár samhail leas as scéim pháirteach samplála agus tá sé simplí ó thaobh coincheapa de, ach baineann sé an fheidhmíocht is nua-aimseartha amach ar Dhioscúrsa Treebank na Síne. Léirímid a ghníomhaíocht aird freisin chun cumas an mhúnla díriú go roghnach ar na codanna ábhartha de sheicheamh ionchuir a léiriú.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε ένα βασισμένο στην προσοχή Bi-LSTM για τις κινεζικές σιωπηρές σχέσεις λόγου και καταδεικνύουμε ότι η μοντελοποίηση ζευγαριών επιχειρημάτων ως κοινή ακολουθία μπορεί να ξεπεράσει τις προσεγγίσεις της τάξης λέξεων. Το μοντέλο μας επωφελείται από ένα μερικό σύστημα δειγματοληψίας και είναι εννοιολογικά απλό, αλλά επιτυγχάνει την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση στην κινεζική τράπεζα δέντρων συζητήσεων. Επίσης, οπτικοποιούμε τη δραστηριότητα προσοχής του για να απεικονίσουμε την ικανότητα του μοντέλου να εστιάζει επιλεκτικά στα σχετικά μέρη μιας ακολουθίας εισαγωγής.', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy figyelem-alapú Bi-LSTM-t a kínai implicit diskurzus kapcsolatokra, és bemutatjuk, hogy az argumentumpárok közös sorozatként való modellezése felülmúlhatja a szórend-agnosztikus megközelítéseket. Modellünk részleges mintavételi rendszerből áll, és koncepcionálisan egyszerű, mégis korszerű teljesítményt ér el a kínai diskurzus fa bankon. Azt is vizualizáljuk, hogy a modell képes arra, hogy szelektíven összpontosítson a bemeneti sorozat releváns részeire.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩინეთი ინომპლიციტური განსაზღვრებისთვის ბი-LSTM-ს დააყენებთ და მოდენსურებთ, რომ მოდენტირებული არგუმენტის ზოგი როგორც ერთადერთი განსაზღვრებისთვის შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ სიტყვებ ჩვენი მოდელი ფართო სქემიდან გამოიყენება და კონცექტურად მარტივია, მაგრამ ჩინეთი განსაკუთრებული სქემიდან უფრო მარტივია. ჩვენ ასევე ვიუზუალურებთ მისი აღმოჩენება მოდელის შესაძლებლობას გამოიყენება მოდელის შესაძლებლობაზე, რომელიც შესაძლებელად გადაყენება შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლო', 'it': "Introduciamo un Bi-LSTM basato sull'attenzione per le relazioni implicite del discorso cinese e dimostriamo che modellare le coppie di argomenti come sequenza congiunta può superare gli approcci agnostici dell'ordine delle parole. Il nostro modello beneficia di uno schema di campionamento parziale ed è concettualmente semplice, ma raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia sulla Chinese Discourse Treebank. Visualizziamo anche la sua attività di attenzione per illustrare la capacità del modello di concentrarsi selettivamente sulle parti rilevanti di una sequenza di input.", 'kk': 'Біз қытайша имплитті дискурстар қатынастарына бойынша Bi-LSTM бағдарламасын келтіріп, біріктірілген ретінде аргументтің екеуі біріктірілген ретінде сөздердің ретінде агностикалық қатынастарына көмектесе ала Біздің үлгіміз бөлігін баптау сұлбасынан пайда болады және концептуалды қарапайым, бірақ Қытай Дискурстар Бұтабанкындағы күй- жайымдық әрекеттерді жеткізеді. Мұндай-ақ, үлгісінің таңдау мүмкіндігін таңдау үшін оның назарын көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету үшін енгізу ретінің маңызды бөліктеріне көздейміз.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame dėmesio pagrindu grindžiamą dvi-LSTM Kinijos netiesioginiams diskursiniams santykiams ir įrodome, kad modeliavimo argument ų poros kaip bendra seka gali viršyti žodžių tvarkos-agnostinių metodų. Mūsų model is naudojasi dalinio mėginių ėmimo sistema ir yra koncepciniu požiūriu paprastas, tačiau pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus Kinijos diskurso medžio banke. Taip pat apžvelgiame jo dėmesio veiklą, kad parodytume modelio gebėjimą pasirinktinai sutelkti dėmesį į atitinkamas įėjimo sekos dalis.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме Би-ЛСТМ базиран на внимание за кинеските имплицитни дискурсни односи и демонстрираме дека моделирањето аргументи парови како заедничка секвенца може да ги надмине зборовите наредба-агностички пристапи. Нашиот модел има корист од шемата на делумно примероци и е концептуално едноставен, но постигнува најсовремена претстава на Кинеската дискурсна банка. Ние, исто така, ја визуелизираме нејзината активност на внимание за да ја илустрираме способноста на моделот да се фокусира селективно на релевантните делови од внесната секвенца.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan Bi-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian untuk hubungan percakapan implicit Cina dan menunjukkan bahawa pasangan argumen model sebagai urutan kongsi boleh melampaui pendekatan tertib-agnostik perkataan. Model kami berguna dari skema sampel sebahagian dan secara konsep mudah, namun mencapai prestasi terbaik di Pangkalan Perbuatan Cina. Kami juga membayangkan aktiviti perhatiannya untuk memperlihatkan kemampuan model untuk fokus secara selektif pada bahagian-bahagian relevan urutan input.', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായത്തിലെ സംസാര ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഗിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ടി ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകാരമുണ്ടാകുന്നു. എന്നിട്ടും സാധാരണമായി എളുപ്പമാണ്, എന്നിട്ടും ചൈനീസ് ഡിസ്ക അതിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തെയും നാം കാണുന്നു. ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാനുള്', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu Bi-LSTM ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni għal relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors impliċiti Ċiniżi u nippruvaw li l-mudellar ta’ pari ta’ argumenti bħala sekwenza konġunta jista’ jwettaq approċċi ta’ ordni-agnostiċi tal-kelma. Il-mudell tagħna jibbenefika minn skema ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni parzjali u huwa kunċettwalment sempliċi, iżda jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq il-Bank Ċiniż tad-Diskors. Niviżwalizzaw ukoll l-attività ta’ attenzjoni tagħha biex nixhdu l-kapaċità tal-mudell li jiffoka b’mod selettiv fuq il-partijiet rilevanti ta’ sekwenza ta’ input.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy Bi-LSTM oparty na uwadze dla chińskich ukrytych relacji dyskursyjnych i pokazujemy, że modelowanie par argumentów jako wspólnej sekwencji może przewyższyć podejścia agnostyczne. Nasz model korzysta z częściowego schematu próbkowania i jest koncepcyjnie prosty, a jednocześnie osiąga najnowocześniejsze osiągnięcia na chińskim dyskursowym drzewie. Wizualizujemy również jego aktywność uwagi, aby zilustrować zdolność modelu do selektywnego skupienia się na istotnych częściach sekwencji wejściowej.', 'ro': 'Introducem un Bi-LSTM bazat pe atenție pentru relațiile de discurs implicit chinezesc și demonstrăm că modelarea perechilor de argumente ca o secvență comună poate depăși abordările agnostice ale ordinii de cuvinte. Modelul nostru beneficiază de o schemă de eșantionare parțială și este conceptual simplu, dar obține performanțe de ultimă generație pe Chinese Discourse Treebank. De asemenea, vizualizăm activitatea sa de atenție pentru a ilustra capacitatea modelului de a se concentra selectiv pe părțile relevante ale unei secvențe de intrare.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer eit oppmerksomhetsbasert bi-LSTM for kinesiske implisitte diskursrelasjonar og demonstrerer at modellende argument par som ei saman sekvens kan utføra ordordordorde-agnostiske tilnærmingar. Modellen vårt nyttar frå eit delvis samlingsskjema og er konseptelt enkelt, men når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten på Kinesisk opplesing Treebank. Vi visualiserer også oppmerksomhetens aktivitet for å illustrare modellen til å velje fokus på dei relevante delene av ein inndata-sekvens.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pažnju baziranu na Bi-LSTM za kineske implicitne diskurske odnose i pokazujemo da modelirajući par argumenata kao zajedničku sekvencu mogu izvršiti riječi-agnostičke pristupe. Naš model koristi djelomičnu shēmu uzorka i konceptualno je jednostavan, a ipak postiže izvedbu države umjetnosti na kineskoj Treebank diskursu. Takođe vizualiziramo njegovu pažnju aktivnosti da ilustrujemo sposobnost modela selektivno fokusirati se na relevantne dijelove ulazne sekvence.', 'si': 'අපි චීනියාව අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා බලාපොරොත්තු බිල්ස්ටිම් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වාර්තාව සඳ අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයි, ඒත් චීනි වි අපි ඔහුගේ අවධාන ක්\u200dරියාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඇතුළත් අවධාන ක්\u200dරියාව පෙන්වන්න.', 'so': 'Bi-LSTM waxaa loo soo bandhigayaa xiriir ku saabsan hadalka Shiino, waxaana muujinnaa in tusaale ahaan labada lammaanood oo ay isku haysato ay soo bandhigi karto qaab ay ku qoran karto qoraal-agnostik. Tusaale ahaan noogu kaalmeeyo qorshaha sameynta qeyb ahaan oo aad si fudud u leedahay, wuxuuse gaadhaa xaaladda farshaxanka ee ku saabsan Treebank a Shiinaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu fiirinaynaa waxqabadka la jeedo si aan u muujinno awoodda modelka si gaar ah ugu kalsoonaanno qaybaha la xidhiidha habka soo galka.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en uppmärksamhetsbaserad Bi-LSTM för kinesiska implicita diskursrelationer och visar att modellering av argumentpar som en gemensam sekvens kan överträffa ordordningsagnostiska tillvägagångssätt. Vår modell drar nytta av ett partiellt provtagningsschema och är konceptuellt enkel, men uppnår state-of-the-art prestanda på Chinese Discourse Treebank. Vi visualiserar också dess uppmärksamhetsaktivitet för att illustrera modellens förmåga att selektivt fokusera på relevanta delar av en inmatningssekvens.', 'ur': 'ہم چین کے معاملہ میں ایک توجه کی بنیادی بیل ٹیمز کو معلوم کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمادلینگ آرکوٹ جوڑوں کو ایک جوڑی آرکوٹ کے طور پر کلمات آگانیک آرکوٹ سے زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارا مدل ایک حصہ نمونے کی طرح سے فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے اور اسے نظریہ آسان ہے، لیکن چینی ڈرسکورس درخت بانک پر موجود ہے. ہم نے اس کی توجه کی فعالیت کو بھی دکھائی کہ مدل کے قابلیت کو انتخاب سے انتخاب کرنے کے لئے ایک اینپیٹ سطح کے معاملہ حصوں پر تمرکز کریں.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு கவனம் அடிப்படையில் சீனா பேச்சு தொடர்புகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு சேர்ந்த வரிசையில் ஒரு கூட்டு வார்த்தை ஆர எங்கள் மாதிரி பாகம் எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும் திட்டத்திலிருந்து பயன்பாடுகள் மற்றும் கருத்தால் எளிதாக இருக்கும், ஆனால் சீனா வடிவ வடிவமை ஒரு உள்ளீடு வரிசையின் முக்கியமான பாகங்களை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க முடியும் மாதிரியின் ஆற்றலை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும்.', 'mn': 'Бид анхаарлын үндсэн Би-ЛСТМ-г Хятад холбоотой ярианы харилцааныг танилцуулж, холбоотой аргументын хоёрыг холбоотой дарааллаар үг дарааллаар агностик аргументын тулд илүү ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний загвар нь хэсэг хэсэг хэлбэрээр дүрслэх схемээс ашигтай. Энэ нь ойлгомжтой энгийн, гэхдээ Хятад Дүрслэх Treebank дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Мөн бид загварын загварыг сонголтой хэсэгт анхаарлын үйл ажиллагааг үзүүлдэг.', 'uz': "Biz Xitoycha ma'lum talabatlar uchun Bi-LSTM (Bi-LSTM) asosida ko'rsatumiz va bir qoidagi argumentlar qo'llanmalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bir qo'shish darajasi soʻzning tartib-agnostik usullarini bajarishi mumkin. Bizning modelimiz qism sampul qolipdan foydalanadi va oddiy, lekin Xitoycha Foydalanuvchi Treebankning holatini bajaradi. Biz modelni tanlash uchun foydalanuvchi qismning muhim qismlariga foydalanishini ko'rinamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Bi-LSTM dựa trên sự chú ý cho quan hệ ngôn ngữ ngầm của Trung Quốc và cho thấy rằng cặp lập các lời lẽ mẫu như một chuỗi đôi có thể vượt qua các phương pháp trật tự. Mô hình của chúng tôi được hưởng từ một kế hoạch lấy mẫu đơn giản, nhưng đạt được trình độ công nghệ cao nhất trên cầu xoay đảo Trung Hoa. Chúng tôi cũng hình dung hoạt động chú ý của nó để minh họa khả năng mô phỏng các phần liên quan của chuỗi nhập.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме базиран на вниманието Би-ЛСТМ за китайските имплицитни дискурсни отношения и демонстрираме, че моделирането на аргументите като съвместна последователност може да надмине подходите на агностичния ред на думите. Нашият модел се възползва от схема за частична извадка и е концептуално прост, но постига най-съвременно представяне на китайската дискурсна банка. Също така визуализираме активността на вниманието му, за да илюстрираме способността на модела да се фокусира селективно върху съответните части от входната последователност.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en opmærksomhedsbaseret Bi-LSTM for kinesiske implicitte diskursrelationer og demonstrerer, at modellering af argumentpar som en fælles sekvens kan overgå ordrækkefølge-agnostiske tilgange. Vores model drager fordel af en delvis prøveudtagning ordning og er konceptuelt enkel, men opnår state-of-the-art performance på den kinesiske diskurse treebank. Vi visualiserer også dens opmærksomhedsaktivitet for at illustrere modellens evne til selektivt at fokusere på de relevante dele af en inputsekvens.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een op aandacht gebaseerde Bi-LSTM voor Chinese impliciete discoursrelaties en tonen aan dat het modelleren van argumentparen als een gezamenlijke volgorde beter kan presteren dan woordorde-agnostische benaderingen. Ons model profiteert van een gedeeltelijke sampling schema en is conceptueel eenvoudig, maar bereikt state-of-the-art prestaties op de Chinese Discourse Treebank. We visualiseren ook zijn aandachtsactiviteit om het vermogen van het model te illustreren om selectief te focussen op de relevante delen van een invoerreeks.', 'de': 'Wir führen ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Bi-LSTM für chinesische implizite Diskursbeziehungen ein und zeigen, dass die Modellierung von Argumentpaaren als gemeinsame Sequenz wortordnungs-agnostische Ansätze übertreffen kann. Unser Modell profitiert von einem partiellen Sampling-Schema und ist konzeptionell einfach, erreicht aber state-of-the-art Performance auf der chinesischen Discourse Treebank. Wir visualisieren auch seine Aufmerksamkeitsaktivität, um die Fähigkeit des Modells zu veranschaulichen, selektiv auf die relevanten Teile einer Eingabesequenz zu fokussieren.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan Bi-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian untuk hubungan diskors implicit Cina dan menunjukkan bahwa model argumen pasangan sebagai urutan bersama dapat melampaui pendekatan perintah-agnostik kata. Model kita berguna dari skema sampel parsial dan konsep sederhana, namun mencapai prestasi terbaik di Pangkalan Perjalanan Cina. Kami juga membayangkan aktivitas perhatiannya untuk membayangkan kemampuan model untuk secara selektif fokus pada bagian-bagian relevan dari urutan input.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pažnju baziranu na Bi-LSTM za kineske implicitne diskurske odnose i pokazujemo da modelirajući par argumentacija kao zajednička sekvencija mogu iznijeti riječi-agnostičke pristupe. Naš model koristi djelomičnu shēmu uzorka i konceptualno je jednostavan, a ipak postiže državni izvor umjetnosti na kineskoj Treebank-u. Također vizualiziramo njegovu pažnju na ilustraciju sposobnosti modela selektivno fokusirati se na relevantne dijelove ulazne sekvence.', 'ko': '우리는 주의를 바탕으로 한 중국어 내은어편 관계인 Bi-LSTM을 소개했고 논원대 모델링을 하나의 연합 서열로 하는 것이 어순이 알 수 없는 방법보다 낫다는 것을 증명했다.우리의 모델은 일부 표본 추출 방안 덕분에 개념이 간단하지만 중국어 언어 라이브러리에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.우리는 또한 그의 주의력 활동을 가시화하여 모델이 입력 서열과 관련된 부분을 선택적으로 주목하는 능력을 설명한다.', 'tr': 'Biz Çinçe gürrüňsiz gürrüňler üçin üns tabanly Bi-LSTM bilen tanyşdyrylýarys we nusgalaryň biri diýip görkezilýän argumlaryň çift sanyny bir aralyg şeklinde kelime terjime-agnostik golaýlaryny çykaryp biljekdigini görkez. Biziň nusgamyz bölümlemek taslamasyndan faydalandyrýar we bu düşünjelerimiz a ňsat, ýöne Hytaý Diskusiýa agajynyň durumyny ýetip barýar. Biz munuň ünsüni daşary giriş dizisiniň nähili böleklerine görkezmek üçin nusgasyny görkez.', 'fa': 'ما با توجه به دو-LSTM برای رابطه\u200cهای مشترک صحبت چینی معرفی می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که جفت\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی به عنوان یک دستور مشترک می\u200cتواند نزدیک\u200cهای پست\u200cآگانیک کلمه\u200cها را بیشتر انجام دهد. مدل ما از نقشه\u200cی نمونه\u200cهای قسمتی سود می\u200cدهد و به نظر می\u200cرسد ساده است، ولی هنری در درخت\u200cبانک صحبت چینی می\u200cرسد. ما همچنین فعالیت توجهش را تصویر می\u200cکنیم تا توانایی مدل را نشان دهیم که با انتخاب روی بخش\u200cهای مربوط به یک دستور ورودی تمرکز کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha msimamo wa Bi-LSTM kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya mazungumzo yanayohusiana na China na kuonyesha kuwa kuonyesha hoja za ndoa kwa kuwa mfululizo wa pamoja unaweza kutengeneza mbinu za maneno yenye utaratibu. Mfano wetu unafaidika kutoka kwa mpango wa vipimo vya sampuli na ni rahisi sana, lakini bado unafikia hali ya mambo ya sanaa kwenye Treebank ya Utetezi wa China. Tunaweza pia kuonyesha shughuli zake za kusikiliza kuonyesha uwezo wa modeli wa kuchagua hatua muhimu za mfumo wa input.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një Bi-LSTM bazuar në vëmendje për marrëdhëniet kineze të diskursive implicite dhe demonstrojmë se modelimi i argumenteve çifte si një sekuencë e përbashkët mund të kalojë qasjet e fjalës rendi-agnostike. Modeli ynë përfiton nga një skemë mosmarrëveshjeje e pjesshme dhe është konceptualisht e thjeshtë, megjithatë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në bazën kineze të diskutimit. Ne gjithashtu vizualizojmë veprimtarinë e vëmendjes s ë saj për të ilustruar aftësinë e modelit për të përqëndruar selektivisht në pjesët e rëndësishme të një sekuence hyrjesh.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n aandag-gebaseerde Bi-LSTM vir die Sjinese inplisite diskurse relasies en wys dat modellering argumente paar as 'n joint sekvens word ordordorde-agnostiese toegang kan uitvoer. Ons model voordeel van 'n gedeeltelike versameling skema en is konseptieële eenvoudig, maar verkry staat-van-kunsten-prestasie op die Sjinese Discourse Treebank. Ons visualiseer ook sy aandag aktiviteit om die model se moontlikheid te illustreer om selektief fokus te fokus op die relevante dele van 'n invoer sekwensie.", 'am': 'በቻይናውያን የንግግር ግንኙነት የቢ-LSTM እናሳየዋለን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ምሳሌያችን ከክፍል ምሳሌ ፕሮግራም የሚጠቅመው እና በአሳብ ቀላል ነው፣ ነገር ግን በቻይና የጥያቄ ትርጉም ላይ የቻይና ውይይት ትርጉም አግኝቷል፡፡ እና የምናሳየው ተግባር እናሳየዋለን የሞላው ስልጣኑን በመምረጥ በጥያቄው ግንኙነት ላይ ለመምረጥ የሚችለውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուշադրության վրա հիմնված Երբ-ԼՍԹՄ չինական աննշանակալի խոսակցական հարաբերությունների համար և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մոդելներ ստեղծելու հարաբերությունները միավոր հաջորդականությամբ կարող են գերազանցել բառերի կարգ-ագնոստիկ Մեր մոդելը օգտակար է մասամբ նմուշներ վերցնելու ծրագիրից և հասկացաբար պարզ է, սակայն իրականացնում է ամենակարևոր ներկայացումներ Չինաստանի դիսկուրսի ծառի վրա: Մենք նաև տեսնում ենք դրա ուշադրության ակտիվությունը, որպեսզի ցույց տանք մոդելի ընտրականորեն կենտրոնանալու հնարավորությունը ներմուծման հաջորդականության նշանակալի մասերի վրա:', 'az': "Biz Çinlə müəyyən müzakirə əlaqələri üçün ünvanlı bi-LSTM'i tanıdırıq və modelləşdirən argument çiftlərinin birlikdə sıralama olaraq sözlərin sıralama agnostik əlaqələrindən daha üstün olaraq göstəririk. Bizim modellərimiz parçacıq nümunələr qurmasından faydalanır və düşüncəli olaraq asandır, amma Çin Discourse Treebank'da sanat qurması mümkündür. Biz həmçinin modelinin s əhifələrini seçmək üçün onun dikkatini göstərdik.", 'bn': 'আমরা চীনা বিভিন্ন কথোপকথন সম্পর্কের জন্য একটি বিএলস্টিমের মনোযোগ দেখাচ্ছি এবং প্রদর্শন করছি যে যুক্তি প্রদান করা যুক্তি জোড়া যুক্তি যেহেতু একটি যু আমাদের মডেল একটি অংশের নমুনা পরিকল্পনা থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করে এবং ধারণা সহজ, কিন্তু চীনা ডিসার্স ট্রিবাঙ্কে শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি পা এছাড়াও আমরা তার মনোযোগের কার্যক্রম দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে মডেলের ক্ষমতা নির্বাচন করে একটি ইনপুটের সেকেন্ডের প্রয়োজনীয় অংশের উপর মন', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pažnju baziranu na Bi-LSTM za kineske implicitne diskurske odnose i pokazujemo da modelirajući par argumentacija kao zajednička sekvencija mogu iznijeti riječi-agnostičke pristupe. Naš model koristi od djelomične shme uzorka i konceptualno je jednostavan, a ipak postiže državni izvor umjetnosti na kineskoj Treebank diskursu. Također vizualiziramo njegovu pažnju na ilustraciju sposobnosti modela selektivno fokusirati se na relevantne dijelove ulazne sekvence.', 'ca': "Introduïm un Bi-LSTM basat en l'atenció per les relacions de discurs xinesos implícites i demostrem que la modelació de parells d'arguments com una seqüència conjunta pot superar els enfocaments d'ordre-agnòstic de paraules. El nostre model beneficia d'un esquema de mostratge parcial i és conceptualment senzill, però aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat a la Banca de Discursos xinesa. També visualitzem la seva activitat d'atenció per il·lustrar l'habilitat del model de centrar-se selectivament en les parts pertinents d'una seqüència d'entrada.", 'fi': 'Esittelemme huomiopohjaisen Bi-LSTM:n kiinalaisille implisiittisille diskurssisuhteille ja osoitamme, että argumenttiparien mallintaminen yhteisenä sekvenssina voi olla sanajärjestyksen agnostisia lähestymistapoja parempi. Mallimme hyötyy osittaisesta näytteenottojärjestelmästä ja on käsitteellisesti yksinkertainen, mutta saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn kiinalaisessa diskurssipuupankissa. Visualisoimme myös sen huomioaktiivisuuden havainnollistaaksemme mallin kykyä keskittyä valikoivasti syöttösarjan olennaisiin osiin.', 'cs': 'Představujeme Bi-LSTM založený na pozornosti pro čínské implicitní diskurzní vztahy a demonstrujeme, že modelování argumentových párů jako společné sekvence může překonat přístupy agnostického řádu slov. Náš model těží ze schématu částečného vzorkování a je koncepčně jednoduchý, přesto dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu na čínském diskursním stromu. Také vizualizujeme jeho pozornost aktivity, abychom ilustrovali schopnost modelu selektivně zaměřit se na relevantní části vstupní sekvence.', 'et': 'Tutvustame tähelepanupõhist Bi-LSTM-i hiina kaudsete diskursussuhete jaoks ja näitame, et argumentipaaride modelleerimine ühise jadana võib ületada sõnajärjekorra agnostiliste lähenemisviiside. Meie mudel saab kasu osalisest valimisskeemist ja on kontseptuaalselt lihtne, kuid saavutab viimase taseme Hiina diskurssipangas. Samuti visualiseerime selle tähelepanu, et illustreerida mudeli võimet keskenduda valikuliselt sisendjada asjakohastele osadele.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan macem sing saben nggawe bi-LTT M kanggo wong liyane perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe barang seneng sampek iso nggawe tarjamahan seneng sampek iso nggawe operasi sing berarti ujarang pangang. Awak dhéwé sistem sing perusahaan kelas nang sampling nggawe lan ngerasakno iki dadi, kuwi iso nggawe barang-sistem sing dumadhi uwong neng sistem sing nesaturan tambah bantuan Karo sing Cheyene Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk aksis nêmên kanggo ngerasakno kapan model nggawe diuwisan kanggo nggawe barang seneng input sekondirne.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pozornost temelječo Bi-LSTM za kitajske implicitne diskurzne odnose in dokazujemo, da modeliranje argumentov parov kot skupnega zaporedja lahko preseže pristope z agnostičnim vrstnim redom besed. Naš model ima koristi od sheme delnega vzorčenja in je konceptualno preprost, vendar dosega najsodobnejšo predstavo na kitajski diskurzni banki. Vizualiziramo tudi njegovo dejavnost pozornosti, da ponazarjamo sposobnost modela, da se selektivno osredotoči na ustrezne dele vhodnega zaporedja.', 'ha': "Tuna nuna wani bincike da aka bincike Bi-LSM wa mazaɓa masu cikin China kuma Muke nuna cewa misalin mutane da mazaɓa da mazaɓa kamar a samu'in haɗi, za'a iya samar da matsayin-agnostic. @ action: button Kayya, Munã nuna aikin muhimmanci da za'a bayyana awon shirin ayuka kan ka kiyaye zura kan masu da muhimmi na cikin sauri.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ביי-LSTM מבוסס על תשומת לב עבור יחסי דיבור סיני מילויים ומוכיחים שדוגמנים טוענים זוגות כרצף משותף יכולים להתגבר על גישות סדר מילים-אגנוסטיות. הדוגמא שלנו מועילה ממערכת דגימות חלקית והיא פשוטה מבחינה מושפטית, אך משיגה הופעה מוקדמת על בינק העץ הסיני. אנחנו גם מדמיינים את פעילות תשומת לבו כדי להדמיין את היכולת של המודל להתמקד באופן בוחרי בחלקים רלוונטיים של רצף הכניסה.', 'bo': 'We introduce an attention-based Bi-LSTM for Chinese implicit discourse relations and demonstrate that modeling argument pairs as a joint sequence can outperform word order-agnostic approaches. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཕན་ཆེར་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་དེའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གདམ་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་གདམ་ཁ་འདོར་བ'}
{'en': 'Improving Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition with Discourse-specific Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'تحسين الاعتراف بالعلاقة الضمنية للخطاب مع تضمين الكلمة الخاصة بالخطاب', 'fr': "Améliorer la reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours grâce à l'intégration de mots spécifiques au discours", 'pt': 'Melhorando o Reconhecimento de Relação de Discurso Implícito com Incorporações de Palavras Específicas de Discurso', 'es': 'Mejorar el reconocimiento implícito de las relaciones del discurso con incrustaciones de palabras específicas del discurso', 'ja': 'ディスクール固有の単語埋め込みによる暗黙のディスクール関係認識の改善', 'zh': '因特定语词销改隐式语相别', 'hi': 'प्रवचन-विशिष्ट शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता में सुधार', 'ru': 'Улучшение неявного распознавания отношений в дискурсе с помощью вложений слов, специфичных для дискурса', 'ga': 'Aitheantas an Chaidrimh Impleachta Dioscúrsa a Fheabhsú le Leabú Focal a bhaineann go sonrach le Dioscúrsa', 'hu': 'Az implicit beszédkapcsolat felismerésének javítása a beszédspecifikus szóbeágyazásokkal', 'ka': 'იმპლიტიკური დისკურსების რეფორმაციის განაცნობის უფრო მეტია დისკურსების სპექტიფიკური სიტყვების შემდეგ', 'it': 'Miglioramento del riconoscimento implicito delle relazioni di discorso con le incorporazioni di parole specifiche per discorso', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της αναγνώρισης της έμμεσης σχέσης λόγου με ενσωματωμένες λέξεις που αφορούν τον λόγο', 'kk': 'Дискурстар ерекше сөздерді ендіру', 'lt': 'Netiesioginio diskurso ryšio pripažinimo gerinimas su diskursui būdingais žodžių įterpimais', 'ml': 'ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ്- പ്രത്യേക വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ харилцааны холбоотой мэдлэг нэмэгдүүлэх нь', 'no': 'Forbetra gjenkjenning av spesifiserte spesifiserte ord', 'mt': 'It-Titjib tar-Rikonoxximent Impliċitu tar-Relazzjoni tad-Diskors bl-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem speċifiċi għad-Diskors', 'pl': 'Poprawa implicyjnego rozpoznawania relacji dyskursowych za pomocą osadzeń słów specyficznych dla dyskursu', 'ms': 'Improving Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition with Discourse-specific Word Embeddings', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje prepoznavanja veza s diskusijom specifičnim rečima', 'mk': 'Подобрување на имплицитното препознавање на односите со дискурс- специфични вградувања на зборови', 'si': 'විශේෂ විශේෂ වචන සම්බන්ධය සමග සංවිධානය අඳුරගන්න', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea recunoașterii implicite a relațiilor de discurs cu încorporarea cuvintelor specifice discursului', 'so': 'Implicit Discourse Recognition with Discourse-specific Word Emulators', 'sv': 'Förbättra erkännandet av implicit diskursrelation med diskursspecifika ordinbäddningar', 'ta': 'விஷயங்கள்- குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தை உடைப்புகளுடன் செயல்படுத்துதல் தொடர்பு அறிதலை மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'سخنرانی مخصوص کلمات ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ اثبات کی سخنرانی رابطہ شناسایی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng khả năng giảm liên lạc với môi trường lời khai thác', 'bg': 'Подобряване на разпознаването на имплицитна дискурсна връзка с вграждането на думи, специфични за дискурса', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje prepoznavanja veza s prikazama specifičnim riječima', 'da': 'Forbedring af implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse med diskursspecifikke ordindlejringer', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de impliciete herkenning van discoursrelaties met discoursspecifieke woordinsluitingen', 'de': 'Verbesserung der impliziten Erkennung von Diskursbeziehungen mit diskursspezifischen Worteinbettungen', 'fa': 'بهترین شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای صحبت عملی با جمع کردن کلمات خاص صحبت', 'id': 'Menembangkan Pengenalan Hubungan Discourse Implicit dengan Pencampuran Kata Spesifik Discourse', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Kutambua Kuhusiana na Tamko maalum', 'tr': 'Gezgi Aýratyn Täze Sözler bilen Iňleşýär', 'af': 'Verbeter Implicite Speletjie Verhouding Herkenning met Opvoer-spesifieke Woord Inbetering', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i njohjes së marrëdhënieve të diskursit të përfshirë me përfshirje fjalësh specifike të diskursit', 'am': 'Discourse-specific Word Embedding', 'hy': 'Խոսերի մասնավոր բառերի ներգրավման հետ', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje prepoznavanja veza s prikazama specifičnim riječima', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛si 캻fad톛si 캻fad톛sini 캻fad톛 Et', 'bn': 'ডিসোর্স- নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের মধ্যে স্বীকৃতির সংযোগ স্বীকৃতি উন্নত করা হচ্ছে', 'ko': '문장 특정 단어의 삽입을 이용하여 내은 문장 관계의 식별을 향상시키다', 'ca': 'millorar el reconeixement implícit de la relació de discurs amb incorporacions de paraules específices de discurs', 'cs': 'Zlepšení implicitního rozpoznávání vztahů diskursu pomocí vložení slov specifických pro diskurs', 'et': 'Diskursussuhte kaudse tuvastamise parandamine diskursuspetsiifiliste sõnade manustamisega', 'fi': 'Implisiittisen diskurssisuhteen tunnistamisen parantaminen diskurssikohtaisilla sanaupotuksilla', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje implicitnega prepoznavanja razmerja med diskusi z vdelavami besed za posamezne diskusije', 'jv': 'Gjelongi tanggal Gak-tanggal Galian sing dibutuhke gambar Kemerdekaan sing wis dipun', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שיפור זיהוי מערכת יחסים משמעותית עם קישורים מילים מסויימים לשיחה', 'bo': 'Improving Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition with Discourse-specific Word Embeddings'}
{'en': 'We introduce a simple and effective method to learn discourse-specific word embeddings (DSWE) for implicit discourse relation recognition. Specifically, DSWE is learned by performing connective classification on massive explicit discourse data, and capable of capturing discourse relationships between words. On the PDTB data set, using DSWE as features achieves significant improvements over baselines.', 'es': 'Presentamos un método simple y efectivo para aprender la incrustación de palabras específicas del discurso (DSWE) para el reconocimiento implícito de la relación discursiva. Específicamente, DSWE se aprende mediante la realización de una clasificación conectiva en datos masivos y explícitos del discurso, y es capaz de capturar las relaciones del discurso entre las palabras. En el conjunto de datos de PDTB, el uso de DSWE como características logra mejoras significativas con respecto a las líneas base.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um método simples e eficaz para aprender incorporações de palavras específicas do discurso (DSWE) para reconhecimento de relações discursivas implícitas. Especificamente, DSWE é aprendido através da realização de classificação conectiva em dados maciços de discurso explícito e capaz de capturar relações de discurso entre palavras. No conjunto de dados PDTB, o uso de DSWE como recursos alcança melhorias significativas em relação às linhas de base.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة بسيطة وفعالة لتعلم حفلات الزفاف الخاصة بالخطاب (DSWE) من أجل التعرف على علاقة الخطاب الضمني. على وجه التحديد ، يتم تعلم DSWE من خلال إجراء تصنيف ضام على بيانات خطاب صريح ضخمة ، وقادرة على التقاط علاقات الخطاب بين الكلمات. في مجموعة بيانات PDTB ، يحقق استخدام DSWE كميزات تحسينات كبيرة على خطوط الأساس.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une méthode simple et efficace pour apprendre les intégrations de mots spécifiques au discours (DSWE) pour la reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours. Plus précisément, le DSWE est appris en effectuant une classification conjonctive sur des données de discours explicites massives, et capable de capturer les relations de discours entre les mots. Sur l'ensemble de données PDTB, l'utilisation de DSWE en tant que fonctionnalités permet d'obtenir des améliorations significatives par rapport aux valeurs de référence.", 'zh': '余言简效以学语特定嵌(DSWE),以成隐式语。 具体来说者,DSWE以大显式言数连类而学之,而获单词语也。 在 PDTB 数集上,用 DSWE 为特征比基线著改进。', 'ja': '私たちは、暗黙の話題関係認識のための話題固有の単語埋め込み（ DSWE ）を学ぶための単純で効果的な方法を導入します。具体的には、DSWEは、大規模な明示的な話題データに対して結合的分類を行うことによって学習され、言葉間の話題関係を捕捉することができる。PDTBデータセットでは、DSWEを機能として使用すると、ベースラインよりも大幅に改善されます。', 'hi': 'हम अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता के लिए प्रवचन-विशिष्ट शब्द एम्बेडिंग (DSWE) सीखने के लिए एक सरल और प्रभावी विधि पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, डीएसडब्ल्यूई को बड़े पैमाने पर स्पष्ट प्रवचन डेटा पर संयोजी वर्गीकरण करके सीखा जाता है, और शब्दों के बीच प्रवचन संबंधों को कैप्चर करने में सक्षम होता है। PDTB डेटा सेट पर, सुविधाओं के रूप में DSWE का उपयोग करना बेसलाइन पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы вводим простой и эффективный метод изучения вложений слов, специфичных для дискурса (DSWE), для неявного распознавания отношений дискурса. В частности, DSWE изучается путем выполнения соединительной классификации на массивных явных данных дискурса и способен захватывать отношения дискурса между словами. В наборе данных PDTB использование DSWE в качестве функций позволяет добиться значительных улучшений по сравнению с исходными уровнями.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach modh simplí agus éifeachtach chun leabú focal sainiúil dioscúrsa (DSWE) a fhoghlaim le haghaidh aitheantais intuigthe caidreamh dioscúrsa. Go sonrach, foghlaimítear DSWE trí aicmiú nascach a dhéanamh ar shonraí dioscúrsa ollmhóra follasacha, agus atá in ann gaolmhaireachtaí dioscúrsa idir focail a ghabháil. Ar thacar sonraí an PDTB, baintear feabhsuithe suntasacha amach thar bhunlínte trí úsáid a bhaint as DSWE mar ghnéithe.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια απλή και αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για την εκμάθηση συγκεκριμένων λέξεων για την αναγνώριση σιωπηρής σχέσης λόγου. Συγκεκριμένα, το μαθαίνεται με την εκτέλεση συνδετικής ταξινόμησης σε μαζικά ρητά δεδομένα λόγου, και είναι ικανό να συλλάβει σχέσεις λόγου μεταξύ λέξεων. Στο σύνολο δεδομένων PDTB, η χρήση ως χαρακτηριστικών επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy egyszerű és hatékony módszert a diskurzusspecifikus szóbeágyazások (DSWE) tanulására az implicit diskurzus kapcsolatok felismerésére. Konkrétan a DSWE-t úgy tanulják meg, hogy kötődő osztályozást végeznek masszív explicit diskurzusadatokon, és képesek a szavak közötti diskurzus kapcsolatok rögzítésére. A PDTB adatkészleten a DSWE funkcióként való használata jelentős javulást eredményez az alapértékekhez képest.', 'it': "Introduciamo un metodo semplice ed efficace per imparare le incorporazioni di parole specifiche del discorso (DSWE) per il riconoscimento implicito delle relazioni del discorso. Nello specifico, il DSWE viene appreso eseguendo una classificazione connettiva su dati espliciti massicci del discorso e in grado di catturare le relazioni del discorso tra le parole. Sul set di dati PDTB, l'utilizzo di DSWE come funzionalità consente miglioramenti significativi rispetto alle linee di base.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame paprastą ir veiksmingą metodą mokytis diskurso specifinių žodžių įdėjimų (DSWE) netiesioginiam diskurso santykių pripažinimui. Specifically, DSWE is learned by performing connective classification on massive explicit discourse data, and capable of capturing discourse relationships between words.  PDTB duomenų rinkinyje DSWE kaip savybės gerokai pagerina bazines linijas.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме едноставен и ефикасен метод за научување на дискурсоспецифични зборови вложувања (DSWE) за имплицитно препознавање на дискурсот врска. Специфично, ДСВЕ се научи преку извршување на поврзувачка класификација на масовни експлицитни дискурсни податоци, и способни за заземање на дискурсни односи меѓу зборовите. Во сетот на податоци на PDTB, користењето на DSWE како карактеристика постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на основните линии.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kaedah sederhana dan efektif untuk belajar penyampaian perkataan khusus-diskors (DSWE) untuk pengenalan hubungan diskors secara implicit. Secara khusus, DSWE belajar dengan melaksanakan klasifikasi sambungan pada data diskors eksplicit yang besar, dan mampu menangkap hubungan diskors antara perkataan. On the PDTB data set, using DSWE as features achieves significant improvements over baselines.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമും  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഡിഎസ്വെയിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ സംസാര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ സംസാര ബന്ധങ്ങള പിഡിടിബി ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d, DSWE ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ബേസ്റ്റെലൈനുകളില്\u200d മികച്ച മെച്', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu metodu sempliċi u effettiv biex nitgħallmu inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem speċifiċi għal diskors (DSWE) għar-rikonoxximent impliċitu tar-relazzjoni ta’ diskors. Speċifikament, DSWE titgħallem billi titwettaq klassifikazzjoni konnettiva fuq dejta ta’ diskors espliċitu massiva, u kapaċi tinkiseb relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors bejn il-kliem. Fuq is-sett ta’ dejta PDTB, l-użu ta’ DSWE bħala karatteristiċi jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq il-linji bażi.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვიყენებთ განსაკუთრებული სიტყვების შესახებ (DSWE) სპექტიური და ეფექტიური პროგრამის შესახებ. განსაკუთრებულად, DSWE მოსწავლია შესაძლებელია გადაკავშირებული კლასიფიკაცია მასიური განსაკუთრებული დისკურსური მონაცემებზე და შესაძლებელია სიტყვების შორის დისკურსური შესახე PDTB მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, DSWE-ს გამოყენება როგორც ფუნქციები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია დაახლოებით ფუნქციურ ხაზებით.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein enkel og effektiv metode for å lære spesifikke ord-innbygging (DSWE) for implisitt diskursrelasjon. Spesielt er DSWE lært ved å utføra tilkoplingsklassifikasjon på massiv eksplisitt diskurs- data og kan henta diskursrelasjonar mellom ord. På PDTB-datasettet, brukar DSWE som funksjonar gjer signifikante forbedringar over baselinjer.', 'mn': 'Бид ярианы тодорхойлолтой үг нэвтрүүлэх (DSWE) хэрэглэх энгийн, эффективны аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Тухайлбал, DSWE нь маш олон тодорхой ярианы өгөгдлийн холбоотой холбоотой хэлбэрийг хийж сурсан бөгөөд үгийн хоорондын ярианы холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байх боломжтой. PDTB өгөгдлийн багц дээр DSWE-г ашиглаж суурь шугам дээр чухал сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог.', 'kk': 'Біз дискурстарды белгілеу үшін қарапайым және эффективті әдісін таңдаймыз. Ескерту үшін, DSWE сұлбалар мен сөздер арасындағы дискурстардың қатынасын түсіндіру мүмкіндігі арқылы қосылымды классификациялау арқылы үйреніледі. PDTB деректер жинағында, DSWE қолданылатын мүмкіндіктері негізгі жолдарда маңызды жақсартуларды жеткізеді.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i efikasan metod da naučimo prepoznavanje veze s izrazom specifičnih reči (DSWE). Posebno, DSWE se nauèi izvršavajuæi povezanu klasifikaciju o velikim eksplicitnim podacima diskursa i sposobnim da uhvati veze sa diskursima izmeðu reèi. Na setu PDTB podataka, koristeći DSWE kao karakteristike postiže značajno poboljšanje na početnim linijama.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy prostą i skuteczną metodę nauki osadzeń słów specyficznych dla dyskursu (DSWE) dla dorozumianego rozpoznawania relacji dyskursu. W szczególności DSWE uczy się poprzez wykonywanie klasyfikacji łącznej na masywnych danych wyraźnych dyskursu i zdolność do uchwycenia relacji dyskursowych między słowami. W zestawie danych PDTB wykorzystanie DSWE jako funkcji osiąga znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do linii bazowych.', 'ro': 'Introducem o metodă simplă și eficientă de a învăța încorporări de cuvinte specifice discursului (DSWE) pentru recunoașterea implicită a relațiilor discursului. Mai exact, DSWE este învățat prin efectuarea clasificării conjunctive pe date masive explicite de discurs și capabil să capteze relațiile discursului dintre cuvinte. Pe setul de date PDTB, utilizarea DSWE ca caracteristici obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de liniile de referință.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab fudud oo faa’iido ah oo aan barno hadal gaar ah oo ku qoran hadal (DSWE) si loo aqoonsado xiriirka. Si gaar ah, DSWE waxaa lagu baraa fasax xiriir ah oo ku saabsan macluumaad kala duduwan oo hadalka, wuxuuna awoodaa in la qabsado xiriirka hadalka dhexdooda. Sida loo isticmaalayo DSWE waxyaabaha PDTB-ka ah wuxuu ku helaa hagaajin aad u weyn sameynta saldhigyada.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සහ හැකියාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා කතාවක් විශේෂ වචන සම්බන්ධයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, DSWE ඉගෙන ගත්තා වචනය අතර සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය කරන්න, වචනය අතර සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය PDTB දත්ත සූදානයෙන්, DSWE භාවිතා කරන්නේ අවශ්\u200dය වලින් විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ', 'ta': 'பேச்சு குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தைகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு எளிய மற்றும் வேலையான முறையை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் பேச்சு தொடர் குறிப்பிட்டு, DSWE பெரிய வெளிப்படையான பேச்சு தகவல் மேல் இணைப்பு வகைப்பை செய்து, வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே பேச்சு தொடர்புகளை பெ PDTB தரவு அமைப்பில், DSWE தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்தி அடிப்படைகளில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை பெறுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en enkel och effektiv metod för att lära sig diskursspecifika ordinbäddningar (DSWE) för implicit diskursrelationsgenerering. Specifikt lärs DSWE genom att utföra bindningsklassificering på massiva explicita diskursdata, och kapabla att fånga diskursrelationer mellan ord. På PDTB-datauppsättningen uppnår DSWE som funktioner betydande förbättringar jämfört med utgångsvärdena.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ صحبت کے مطابق مخصوص صحبت کے معاملہ کے لئے (DSWE) کلمات کے مطابق پیدا کریں۔ مخصوص طور پر، DSWE کو بہت سی کھول کھول کھول کھول دینے والی ڈیٹا پر اتصال کی کلاسیفوں کے ذریعہ سیکھا جاتا ہے اور کلمات کے درمیان سخنرانی رابطہ کو پکڑنے کے قابل ہے. PDTB ڈیٹ سٹ پر، DSWE کا استعمال کرتا ہے جیسے فرصت بنسٹ لین پر بہت اضافہ ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz suhbat bilan bog'liq tashkilotni aniqlash uchun oddiy va effektiv usulni o'rganamiz. Ko'rsatilgan DSWE, katta taʼminlovchi muloqat maʼlumotida bogʻliq darajasini bajarish orqali o'rganadi, va so'zlar orasidan aloqalarni olish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp đơn giản và hiệu quả để học nhận dạng mối liên hệ ngôn ngữ. Đặc biệt, DSS được học bởi thực hiện các phân tích liên kết trên dữ liệu đàm luận rõ ràng lớn, và có khả năng nắm giữ các mối quan hệ ngôn luận giữa các từ. Trên bộ dữ liệu PDTB, dùng DSWE như các tính năng đạt đến những cải tiến đáng kể trên đường cơ bản.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i učinkovit način da naučimo ugrađenje riječi o specifičnim diskusijama (DSWE) za prepoznavanje veze s implicitnim diskusijama. Posebno, DSWE se uči izvršavajući veznu klasifikaciju o masivnim pojasnim podacima o diskusiji i sposobnim prihvatiti veze s diskusijama između riječi. Na setu podataka PDTB, koristeći DSWE kao karakteristike postiže značajno poboljšanje na početnim linijama.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een eenvoudige en effectieve methode om discours-specifieke woord embeddings (DSWE) te leren voor impliciete discours relations herkenning. Specifiek, DSWE wordt geleerd door het uitvoeren van connectieve classificatie op massale expliciete discoursgegevens, en in staat om discoursrelaties tussen woorden vast te leggen. Op de PDTB-gegevensset bereikt het gebruik van DSWE als functies aanzienlijke verbeteringen ten opzichte van basislijnen.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en enkel og effektiv metode til at lære diskursspecifikke ord embeddings (DSWE) til implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse. Specielt læres DSWE ved at udføre bindende klassificering på massive eksplicitte diskursdata og i stand til at fange diskursrelationer mellem ord. På PDTB-datasættet opnår DSWE som funktioner betydelige forbedringer i forhold til basislinjerne.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме прост и ефективен метод за изучаване на дискурсно-специфични словни вграждания (ДСУ) за имплицитно разпознаване на дискурсни отношения. По-конкретно, ДСУ се учи чрез извършване на съединителна класификация върху масивни експлицитни дискурсни данни и способни да улавят дискурсните взаимоотношения между думите. При набора от данни използването на DSWE като функции постига значителни подобрения в сравнение с базовите линии.', 'ko': '본고는 내은 문장 관계 식별에 사용되는 간단하고 효과적인 문장 특정 단어 삽입(DSWE)을 학습하는 방법을 소개했다.구체적으로 DSWE는 대량의 현식 언어 데이터에 대한 연결 분류를 통해 학습하고 단어 간의 언어 관계를 포착할 수 있다.PDTB 데이터 세트에서 DSWE를 베이스라인보다 특징적으로 사용하는 것이 크게 향상되었습니다.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine einfache und effektive Methode vor, diskursspezifische Worteinbettungen (DSWE) für die implizite Diskursrelationserkennung zu erlernen. Insbesondere wird DSWE durch eine konnektive Klassifizierung auf massiven expliziten Diskursdaten erlernt und in der Lage, Diskursbeziehungen zwischen Wörtern zu erfassen. Im PDTB-Datensatz erreicht die Verwendung von DSWE als Features signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber Baselines.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش ساده و موثر برای یاد گرفتن گفتگوهای مخصوص (DSWE) برای شناسایی نسبت به گفتگوهای مخصوص معرفی می کنیم. مخصوصا، DSWE با اجرای مختصات ارتباطی در اطلاعات سخنرانی مشخصی بزرگ یاد می\u200cگیرد و قادر به گرفتن رابطه\u200cهای صحبت بین کلمات است. در مجموعه داده\u200cهای PDTB، از DSWE استفاده می\u200cکند به عنوان ویژه\u200cها بهترین شدید در خطوط پایین رسیده می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Biz gürrüňi tanamak üçin basit we etkinlik bir täsirli sözleri (DSWE) sözleri takyklamak üçin yada a çýarys. Adatça DSWE, sözler arasyndaky sözler baglaýyşy barlamak üçin baglaýyşy klasifikasyon etmäge öwrenip bilýär. PDTB maglumat setirinde, DSWE'i üýtgedikleri üýtgedikler üýtgedikleri üçin esasy gelişmeler ýeterýär.", 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha njia rahisi na yenye ufanisi wa kujifunza maneno maalum ya mazungumzo (DSWE) kwa ajili ya kutambua mahusiano ya mazungumzo. Kwa ujumla, DSWE inajifunza kwa kufanya mchanganyiko wa kiungo kuhusiana na taarifa za mazungumzo ya wazi, na uwezo wa kupata mahusiano kati ya maneno. Katika seti ya data za PDTB, kwa kutumia DSWE kama vipengele vinaweza kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya misingi.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n eenvoudige en effektief metode om diskursie-spesifieke woord inbettings (DSWE) te leer vir inplisite diskursie verwanting van herken. Spesifieke word DSWE geleer deur verbindingsklassifikasie te doen op massief eksplisiese diskursie data en in staat om diskursie verhouding tussen woorde te vang. Op die PDTB-data stel, gebruik DSWE as funksies bereik betaling verbeteringe oor basisline.", 'am': 'ለንግግር ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማወቅ ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ DSWE በብዙ ግንኙነት ዳታ ላይ ግንኙነት በማድረግ ይማራል፣ እናም በንግግር መካከል ግንኙነት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በPDTB ዳታዎች ላይ DSWE እንደ ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም በአሳማሚ ደረጃዎች ላይ ትልቅ ማድረግ ያገኛል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë të thjeshtë dhe efektive për të mësuar fjalë specifike diskursi (DSWE) për njohjen implicite të lidhjes diskurse. Specifikisht, DSWE mësohet duke kryer klasifikimin lidhës në të dhënat masive të shprehura të diskursit dhe të aftë për të kapur marrëdhënie diskurse midis fjalëve. Në grupin e të dhënave PDTB, përdorimi i DSWE si funksione arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme mbi linjat bazë.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք պարզ և արդյունավետ մեթոդ, որպեսզի սովորենք խոսակցության կոնկրետ բառերի ներդրումներ (DSWE) խոսակցության հարաբերությունների աննշան ճանաչելու համար: Հատկապես, DSWE-ը սովորվում է կապերի դասակարգում կատարելով հսկայական բացատրական խոսքի տվյալների վրա և հնարավոր է վերցնել խոսքի հարաբերությունները բառերի միջև: PDTB-ի տվյալների համակարգում DSWE-ի օգտագործումը որպես առանձնահատկություններ նշանակալի բարելավում է հիմնական գծերի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Biz müəyyən sözlər tanıması üçün çox asanlıq və etkili bir metod öyrənirik. Özellikle, DSWE böyük açıq danışma məlumatlarında bağlantılı klasifikasyonu edərək öyrənir və sözlərin arasındakı danışma bağlantılarını yakalamaq bacarır. PDTB məlumatları qurulduğunda, DSWE ilə mövcud tərzlərin üstündə mövcud düzəltmələri başa düşər.', 'bn': 'আমরা কথোপকথন-নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের প্রবেশ শিক্ষা শিখার একটি সহজ এবং কার্যকর পদ্ধতি তুলে ধরি যাতে কথোপকথন সম্পর্কের স্বীকৃতি প্রকাশ বিশেষ করে, ডিএসওয়াই বিশাল পরিস্কারের তথ্য নিয়ে যোগাযোগ বিভাগ করার মাধ্যমে সংযোগ বিভাগ শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং শব্দের মধ্যে য পিডিটিবি ডাটা সেটে ডিএসওয়াই ব্যবহার করে বেসারেলাইনে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পায়।', 'ca': 'Introduïm un mètode simple i efectiu per aprendre incorporacions de paraules específices al discurs (DSWE) per al reconeixement implícit de la relació discursiva. En concret, DSWE es aprene fent una classificació conectiva en dades de discurs explícits massives, i capaç de capturar relacions de discurs entre paraules. En el conjunt de dades PDTB, utilitzar DSWE com a característiques aconsegueix millores significatives sobre les línies de base.', 'id': 'We introduce a simple and effective method to learn discourse-specific word embeddings (DSWE) for implicit discourse relation recognition.  Secara spesifik, DSWE belajar dengan melakukan klasifikasi konektif pada data diskors eksplisit besar, dan mampu menangkap hubungan diskors antara kata-kata. Dalam set data PDTB, menggunakan DSWE sebagai fitur mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas garis dasar.', 'cs': 'Představujeme jednoduchou a efektivní metodu naučení se diskurzně specifických slovních embeddingů (DSWE) pro implicitní rozpoznávání diskurzních vztahů. Konkrétně se DSWE naučí prováděním pojivové klasifikace na masivních explicitních diskurzních datech a schopností zachytit diskurzní vztahy mezi slovy. V PDTB datové sadě dochází použití DSWE jako funkcí k výraznému zlepšení oproti základním liniím.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i efikasan metod da naučimo prepoznavanje veze s izrazom određenih riječi (DSWE) za implicitne diskurske veze. Posebno, DSWE se uči provođenjem povezivanja klasifikacije o velikim eksplicitnim podacima diskursa i sposobnim da uhvati veze s diskursima između riječi. Na setu podataka PDTB, koristeći DSWE kao karakteristike postiže značajno poboljšanje preko početnih linija.', 'et': 'Tutvustame lihtsat ja tõhusat meetodit diskursuspetsiifiliste sõnade manustamiseks (DSWE) kaudse diskursussuhte tuvastamiseks. Täpsemalt on DSWE õppinud massiivsete selgesõnaliste diskursusandmete siduva klassifikatsiooni teostamisel ja suutnud jäädvustada sõnadevahelisi diskursussuhteid. PDTB andmekogumis saavutatakse DSWE funktsioonide kasutamisega võrreldes lähtetasemega märkimisväärseid parandusi.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme yksinkertaisen ja tehokkaan menetelmän oppia diskurssispesifisiä sanaupotuksia (DSWE) implisiittistä diskurssisuhteiden tunnistamista varten. Tarkemmin sanottuna DSWE oppii suorittamalla sidektiivistä luokittelua massiiviseen eksplisiittiseen diskurssidataan ja kykenee vangitsemaan sanojen väliset diskurssisuhteet. PDTB-datasarjassa DSWE:n käyttäminen ominaisuuksina parantaa merkittävästi lähtötasoja.', 'jv': 'We are here echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello worldkey echo Nang sethaya dadi pilihan', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים שיטה פשוטה ויעילה ללמוד מילים ספציפיות לדיסקורס (DSWE) לזהות יחסי דייסקורס מרושעים. במיוחד, DSWE לומד על ידי ביצוע מסווג חיבורי על נתוני דיבורים מוחלטים מסיביים, ומסוגלים לתפוס יחסים דיבורים בין מילים. במערכת הנתונים של PDTB, השימוש בסיס DSWE כתכונות משיג שיפורים משמעותיים מעל קווי הבסיס.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo preprosto in učinkovito metodo učenja diskurzov specifičnih besednih vdelav (DSWE) za implicitno prepoznavanje diskurznih relacij. Natančneje se DSWE nauči z izvajanjem vezivne klasifikacije na masivnih eksplicitnih diskurznih podatkih in sposobnosti zajemanja diskurznih odnosov med besedami. V naboru podatkov PDTB uporaba DSWE kot funkcije doseže znatne izboljšave v primerjavi z osnovnimi vrednostmi.', 'ha': 'Tuna fara wani shiryi mai sauƙi da mai amfani da yin fahimtar maganar da aka buƙata (DSWU) wa tabbatar da mazaɓa. A ƙayyade, an sanar DSWU game da tafiyar da fassarar da haɗi kan data na da aka yi wa magana mai girma, kuma yana iya iya samun haɗi da magana tsakanin magana. Ga tsarin PDTB, ya yi amfani da DSWU kamar tayari, ya sami gyãra mai girma kan layin basu.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྤྲོད་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་ནུས་པ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་དགོས། Specifically, DSWE is learned by performing connective classification on massive explicit discourse data, and capable of capturing discourse relationships between words. On the PDTB data set, using DSWE as features achieve significant improvements over baselines.'}
{'en': 'Oracle Summaries of Compressive Summarization', 'ar': 'ملخصات أوراكل للتلخيص الضاغط', 'es': 'Resúmenes de Resumen Compresivo de Oracle', 'pt': 'Resumos Oracle de sumarização compressiva', 'fr': 'Résumés Oracle de la synthèse compressive', 'ja': '圧縮要約のOracle要約', 'ru': 'Краткое изложение сжатия Oracle', 'zh': 'Oracle 压缩摘要摘要', 'hi': 'Oracle Compressive Summarization के सारांश', 'ga': 'Achoimrí Oracle ar Achoimriú Comhbhrúiteach', 'hu': 'Oracle összefoglalói', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Προφορικές Σύνοψεις Συμπιεστικής Συνοψίας', 'kk': 'Comment', 'it': 'Sintesi Oracle della sintesi compressiva', 'mk': 'Пророчни резултати на компресивната резултата', 'lt': 'Geriamosios kompresinės santraukos', 'ms': 'Ringkasan Oracle bagi Ringkasan Pemampat', 'mt': 'Sommarji Orali tas-Sommarju Kompressiv', 'mn': 'Oracle-ын нийлүүлэлт', 'ml': 'Compressive Summary of Oracle Summary', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Sažetke orakla kompresivne sažetke', 'pl': 'Podsumowania kompresyjnego podsumowania Oracle', 'ro': 'Rezumatele Oracle ale sumarizării compresive', 'sv': 'Oracle sammanfattningar av komprimerad sammanfattning', 'so': 'Oracle Summary of Compressive Summary', 'ta': 'Compressive சுருக்கம்', 'si': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Hisobot hisoboti', 'vi': 'Nhà Tiên Tri Tóm đè nén', 'bg': 'Резюме на компресивно обобщение на Oracle', 'nl': 'Oracle Samenvattingen van Compressieve Samenvatting', 'da': 'Oracle Summaries of Compressive Summarization', 'hr': 'Oracle sažetke kompresivne sažetke', 'de': 'Oracle Summaries of Compressive Summarization', 'id': 'Ringkasan Oracle dari Ringkasan Kompresif', 'ko': 'Oracle 압축 요약 정보', 'fa': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Sykylaýyn holasasy', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Mkutano wa Mkutano wa Kushinikiza', 'hy': 'Կեմպրեսիվ համառոտագրության Oracle համառոտագրությունները', 'sq': 'Përmbledhje Orakulli e përmbledhjes kompresive', 'am': 'ማጠቃለያ ማጠቃለያ', 'az': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সম্পুর্ণ সংক্ষেপের অরাকেল সংক্ষেপ', 'ca': 'Resumes Oraculars de la Resumen Compressiva', 'bs': 'Sažetke Oracle kompresivne sažetke', 'cs': 'Oracle Shrnutí kompresivního shrnutí', 'et': 'Oracle kokkuvõtte kokkuvõtted', 'fi': 'Oraclen tiivistelmät tiivistelmästä', 'sk': 'Oracle Povzetki kompresivnega povzetka', 'he': 'סדרות אורקל של סדרות לוחצת', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Oracle Summary of Compressive Summarization'}
{'en': 'This paper derives an Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulation to obtain an oracle summary of the compressive summarization paradigm in terms of ROUGE. The oracle summary is essential to reveal the upper bound performance of the paradigm. Experimental results on the DUC dataset showed that ROUGE scores of compressive oracles are significantly higher than those of extractive oracles and state-of-the-art summarization systems. These results reveal that compressive summarization is a promising paradigm and encourage us to continue with the research to produce informative summaries.', 'ar': 'تستمد هذه الورقة صيغة البرمجة الخطية الصحيحة (ILP) للحصول على ملخص أوراكل لنموذج التلخيص الانضغاطي بدلالة ROUGE. ملخص أوراكل ضروري للكشف عن أداء الحد الأعلى للنموذج. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة بيانات DUC أن درجات ROUGE من الأوهام الانضغاطية أعلى بكثير من تلك الخاصة بأوراكل الاستخراجية وأنظمة التلخيص الحديثة. تكشف هذه النتائج أن التلخيص الانضغاطي هو نموذج واعد ويشجعنا على مواصلة البحث لإنتاج ملخصات إعلامية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo deriva uma formulação de Programação Linear Inteira (ILP) para obter um resumo oracular do paradigma de sumarização compressiva em termos de ROUGE. O resumo do oráculo é essencial para revelar o desempenho do limite superior do paradigma. Resultados experimentais no conjunto de dados DUC mostraram que as pontuações ROUGE de oráculos compressivos são significativamente mais altas do que as de oráculos extrativos e sistemas de sumarização de última geração. Esses resultados revelam que a sumarização compressiva é um paradigma promissor e nos incentiva a continuar com a pesquisa para produzir resumos informativos.', 'es': 'Este artículo deriva una formulación de Programación Lineal Integer (ILP) para obtener un resumen oráculo del paradigma de la sumarización compresiva en términos de ROUGE. El resumen del oráculo es esencial para revelar el rendimiento del límite superior del paradigma. Los resultados experimentales en el conjunto de datos DUC mostraron que las puntuaciones ROUGE de los oráculos compresivos son significativamente más altas que las de los oráculos extractivos y los sistemas de resumen de última generación. Estos resultados revelan que la sumarización compresiva es un paradigma prometedor y nos animan a continuar con la investigación para producir resúmenes informativos.', 'fr': "Cet article dérive une formulation de programmation linéaire entière (ILP) pour obtenir un résumé oracle du paradigme de synthèse compressive en termes de ROUGE. Le résumé de l'oracle est essentiel pour révéler les performances supérieures du paradigme. Les résultats expérimentaux sur l'ensemble de données DUC ont montré que les scores ROUGE des oracles compressifs sont significativement plus élevés que ceux des oracles d'extraction et des systèmes de synthèse de pointe. Ces résultats révèlent que la synthèse compressive est un paradigme prometteur et nous encouragent à poursuivre la recherche afin de produire des résumés informatifs.", 'ja': '本論文は、ルージュの観点から圧縮要約パラダイムのオラクルサマリを得るための整数線形プログラミング（ ILP ）の定式化を導き出した。パラダイムの上限パフォーマンスを明らかにするには、オラクルサマリーが不可欠です。DUCデータセットの実験結果は、圧縮性骨格のROUGEスコアが、抽出性骨格および最先端の要約システムのスコアよりも有意に高いことを示した。これらの結果は、圧縮的要約が有望なパラダイムであることを明らかにし、情報のある要約を作成するための研究を継続することを奨励します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर रूज के संदर्भ में संपीड़न सारांश प्रतिमान का एक ओरेकल सारांश प्राप्त करने के लिए एक पूर्णांक रैखिक प्रोग्रामिंग (आईएलपी) सूत्रीकरण प्राप्त करता है। ओरेकल सारांश प्रतिमान के ऊपरी बाध्य प्रदर्शन को प्रकट करने के लिए आवश्यक है। DUC डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चला है कि संपीड़न oracles के रूज स्कोर extractive oracles और अत्याधुनिक summarization प्रणालियों की तुलना में काफी अधिक हैं। इन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि संपीड़न summarization एक आशाजनक प्रतिमान है और हमें जानकारीपूर्ण सारांश का उत्पादन करने के लिए अनुसंधान के साथ जारी रखने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करते हैं।', 'zh': '本文推导一整数线性规画(ILP)公式,以得ROUGE压缩摘要式之预言机摘要。 言机摘要于揭示上限性至重。 DUC数集之实验结果表明,ROUGE压缩预言机之得分明高于提预言机先进之摘要统。 此结果表明压缩总结是一种有前途的范式,并劝我们继续研究以生信息丰盛的摘要。', 'ru': 'В этой статье выведена формулировка целочисленного линейного программирования (ILP) для получения оракулярного резюме парадигмы сжатого суммирования в терминах ROUGE. Краткое изложение оракула имеет важное значение для выявления верхних границ функционирования парадигмы. Экспериментальные результаты по набору данных DUC показали, что баллы ROUGE компрессивных оракул значительно выше, чем у добывающих оракул и современных систем суммирования. Эти результаты показывают, что сжатое обобщение является многообещающей парадигмой, и побуждают нас продолжать исследования для получения информативных резюме.', 'ga': 'Faigheann an páipéar seo foirmliú Clár Líneach Slánuimhir (ILP) chun achoimre oracle a fháil ar an bparaidím achoimre comhbhrú i dtéarmaí ROUGE. Tá achoimre an oracle riachtanach chun feidhmíocht theorainn uachtair an pharaidím a thaispeáint. Léirigh torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacar sonraí DUC go bhfuil scóir ROUGE d’oracail chomhbhrúite i bhfad níos airde ná iad siúd a bhaineann le oracles eastóscacha agus córais achoimrithe den scoth. Léiríonn na torthaí seo gur paraidím geallta é an t-achoimriú comhbhrúiteach agus spreagann siad sinn chun leanúint leis an taighde chun achoimrí faisnéiseacha a tháirgeadh.', 'ka': 'ეს დოგუმენტი პროგრამიზაცია, რომელიც ROUGE- ის შესახებ კომპრესიური კომპრესიური პარადიგმის ორაკული საზოგადომის მიღება. პარადიგმის მარცხენა გამოსახულება მნიშვნელოვანია. ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემები DUC მონაცემების შესახებ გამოჩენა, რომ ROUGE მონაცემები კომპრესიური ორაკულების შესახებ უფრო მეტია, ვიდრე ექსტრაქტიური ორაკულების და სა ეს შედეგი გააჩვენებს, რომ კომპრესიური კომპრესიური კომპრესიზაცია არის გვაქვს პარადიგმა და გვაძლევს ჩვენ გადარწმუნოთ სწავლებას ინფორმაციური კომ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αντλεί μια διατύπωση Ακέραιου Γραμμικού Προγραμματισμού (ILP) για να λάβει μια προφορική περίληψη του παραδείγματος συμπίεσης με όρους ROUGE. Η περίληψη του μαντείου είναι απαραίτητη για να αποκαλύψει την ανώτερη απόδοση του παραδείγματος. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων έδειξαν ότι οι βαθμολογίες των συμπιεστικών μαντείων είναι σημαντικά υψηλότερες από αυτές των εκχυλιστικών μαντείων και των σύγχρονων συστημάτων σύνοψης. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά αποκαλύπτουν ότι η συμπιεστική σύνοψη είναι ένα υποσχόμενο παράδειγμα και μας ενθαρρύνουν να συνεχίσουμε την έρευνα για την παραγωγή ενημερωτικών περιλήψεων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy egész lineáris programozás (ILP) formulációját eredményezi, amelynek célja a tömörítő összefoglaló paradigma orákulus összefoglalása a ROUGE szempontjából. Az orákulum összefoglalása elengedhetetlen ahhoz, hogy feltárja a paradigma felső határát. A DUC adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatták, hogy a nyomóorákulok ROUGE pontszáma jelentősen magasabb, mint az extraktív orákulok és a korszerű összefoglaló rendszerek. Ezek az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a kompressziós összefoglalás ígéretes paradigma, és arra ösztönöznek minket, hogy folytassuk a kutatást információs összefoglalók készítésére.', 'it': "Questo articolo deriva una formulazione ILP (Integer Linear Programming) per ottenere un riassunto oracolo del paradigma di sintesi compressiva in termini di ROUGE. Il riassunto dell'oracolo è essenziale per rivelare le prestazioni superiori del paradigma. I risultati sperimentali sul set di dati DUC hanno mostrato che i punteggi ROUGE degli oracoli compressivi sono significativamente più alti di quelli degli oracoli estrattivi e dei sistemi di sintesi all'avanguardia. Questi risultati rivelano che la sintesi compressiva è un paradigma promettente e ci incoraggiano a continuare con la ricerca per produrre riassunti informativi.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ROUGE үшін компресивті тұжырымдастыру парадигмінің оралық тұжырымдамасын алу үшін бүкіл сан сызық бағдарламасы (ILP) формулациясын құрады. Оракул тұжырымдамасы парадигмінің жоғары жағындағы әрекеттерін көрсету үшін маңызды. DUC деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелі нәтижелер ROUGE компресивті оралардың нәтижелері шығыс оралардың және оралардың күй- жайындағы тәжірибелі жүйелерден ең жоғары деп көрсетілді. Бұл нәтижелер компрессиялық тұжырымдамасы - мәліметтік тұжырымдамасын жасау үшін бізді зерттеуді жалғастыруға көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama formuluotė „Visas linijinis programavimas“ (angl. Integer Linear Programming, ILP), kuria siekiama gauti žodinę kompresinio apibendrinimo paradigmos santrauką ROUGE atžvilgiu. Oraklo santrauka yra labai svarbi siekiant atskleisti viršutinę paradigmos charakteristiką. Experimental results on the DUC dataset showed that ROUGE scores of compressive oracles are significantly higher than those of extractive oracles and state-of-the-art summarization systems.  Šie rezultatai rodo, kad kompresinė santrauka yra perspektyvus paradigmas ir skatina mus tęsti mokslinius tyrimus, kad parengtume informacines santraukas.', 'mk': 'Овој документ изведува формулација на Целиот линијарен програмирање (ILP) за да добие ораклен резиме на компресивниот парадигм на резимизација во поглед на ROUGE. Оракулското сумирање е суштинско за откривање на врвот на перформансата на парадигмата. Експерименталните резултати на податоците на ДУЦ покажаа дека резултатите на РУГЕ од компресивните оракли се значително повисоки од оние на екстрактивните оракли и најсовремените системи за резултатирање. Овие резултати откриваат дека компресивната резултатација е ветувачки парадигм и не охрабруваат да продолжиме со истражувањето за да создадеме информативни резултати.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan bentuk Program Linear Integer (ILP) untuk mendapatkan ringkasan orakul paradigma pengumpulan pemampatan dalam terma ROUGE. Ringkasan orakul penting untuk mengungkapkan prestasi terbatas paradigma. Keputusan percubaan pada set data DUC menunjukkan skor ROUGE orakel pemampatan jauh lebih tinggi daripada skor orakel ekstraktif dan sistem ringkasan state-of-the-art. Hasil-hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa pengumpulan kompresif adalah paradigm a yang berjanji dan mendorong kita untuk teruskan kajian untuk menghasilkan ringkasan maklumat.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d റൂജെയിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ (ILP) പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ് ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു അതിന്റെ മുകളിലുള്ള പ്രകടനം വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി ഒറ്റക്കല്\u200d ചുരുക്കം ആവശ്യമാണ്. ഡിയുസി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d രൂജെയിലെ സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d പുറത ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു പ്രത്യേക പാര', 'no': 'Denne papiret utfører eit heiltal linjerprogramming (ILP) for å få eit orakulsamandrag av den komprimerte samandringsparadigmen i tillegg til ROUGE. Omsetjinga for orakulet er nødvendig for å opna den øvre både utviklinga for paradigmet. Eksperimentale resultat på DUC- datasettet viste at ROUGE- poeng av komprimeringsoraklar er betydelig høgare enn dei av ekstraktiv oraklar og sammendragssystemet for kunstheten. Desse resultatene viser at komprimeringssammendrag er ein promising paradigm og oppfordrer oss til å fortsette med forskningen for å produsera informativ sammendrag.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opracowuje formułę programowania liniowego całkowitego (ILP), aby uzyskać podsumowanie wyroczni paradygmatu streszczenia kompresji w kategorii ROUGE. Podsumowanie wyroczni jest niezbędne do ujawnienia górnej granicy paradygmatu. Wyniki eksperymentalne na zbiorze danych DUC wykazały, że wyniki ROUGE wyroczni ściskanych są znacznie wyższe niż wyrocznie ekstrakcyjnych i najnowocześniejszych systemów podsumowywania. Wyniki te ujawniają, że podsumowanie kompresyjne jest obiecującym paradygmatem i zachęcają nas do kontynuowania badań w celu tworzenia podsumowań informacyjnych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare derivă o formulă de programare liniară întreagă (ILP) pentru a obține un rezumat oracol al paradigmei de rezumare compresivă în termeni de ROUGE. Rezumatul oracolului este esențial pentru a dezvălui performanța superioară a paradigmei. Rezultatele experimentale ale setului de date DUC au arătat că scorurile ROUGE de oracole compresive sunt semnificativ mai mari decât cele ale oracolelor extractive și sistemelor de sintetizare de ultimă generație. Aceste rezultate dezvăluie că rezumatul compresiv este o paradigmă promițătoare și ne încurajează să continuăm cercetarea pentru a produce rezumate informative.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir izvršava formulaciju integralnog linijskog programiranja (ILP) kako bi dobio oralni sažetak paradigme kompresivne sažetke u smislu ROUGE. Sažetak oraka je važan za otkrivanje uspeha paradigme. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka DUC pokazali su da su rezultati ROUGE kompresivnih orakla značajno veći od onih ekstraktivnih orakla i sažetivnih sustava umetnosti. Ovi rezultati otkrivaju da je kompresivna sažetka obećavajuća paradigma i ohrabruje nas da nastavimo sa istraživanjem da proizvedemo informativne sažetke.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරමුණ ලිනියර් ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණය (ILP) සංකේතයක් ලැබෙනවා ROUGE වලින් සම්පූර්ණ සංකේතනය සම්පූර්ණ සංක පාර්ඩිග්ම් වල ඉහළ ප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි. DUC දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ROUGE ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වඩා වි මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පු', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ka helaa qorsheynta qoraalka qoraalka qoraalka caadiga ah (ILP) si uu u helo qoraal u eg qoraalka kooxaha ah oo lagu qoray ROUGE. Waa muhiim in uu muujiyo heerka ugu dhexeeya, in uu muujiyo heerka ugu sareeya. Imtixaanka ku saabsan danbiyada DUC waxay muuqatay in ROUGE scoro kooban oo erayo compromi ay aad uga sarreeyaan meelaha la soo saaro iyo nidaamka qoraalka farshaxanka ah. Abaalkaasi waxay muuqataa in jimicsigu uu yahay mid ballanqaadsan oo noogu dhiirrigelinaya inaan sii wadno waxbarashada si aan u soo saaro summariyo macluumaad ah.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jidderiva formulazzjoni Integer Linear Programming (ILP) biex jinkiseb sommarju orali tal-paradigma kompressiva ta’ sommarju f’termini ta’ ROUGE. Is-sommarju tal-oracle huwa essenzjali biex jiżvela l-prestazzjoni ta’ fuq il-limitu tal-paradigma. Experimental results on the DUC dataset showed that ROUGE scores of compressive oracles are significantly higher than those of extractive oracles and state-of-the-art summarization systems.  Dawn ir-riżultati juru li s-sommarju kompressiv huwa paradigm a promettenti u jinkoraġġilna nkomplu bir-riċerka biex jipproduċu sommarji informativi.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас ROUGE-ын хувьд хэвлэгдэх жижиг хэвлэгдэх парадигмыг олж авах бүтэн шугамны программын (ILP) томъёо гаргадаг. Дүгнэлтийн хэвлэл нь парадигмын дээд хэмжээний үйл ажиллагааг илрүүлэхэд чухал. DUC өгөгдлийн хэмжээний туршилтын үр дүнд ROUGE хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээсүүд нэмэгдүүлэх үг болон урлагийн хэмжээсүүдийн системээс илүү өндөр байдаг гэдгийг харуулсан. Эдгээр үр дүнд хэмжээний жишээг нь амлалтай парадигм гэдгийг харуулж, мэдээллийн жишээг гаргах судалгаагаар үргэлжлүүлэхийг хүсэж байна.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats härleder en Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulering för att få en orakel sammanfattning av kompressiv sammanfattning paradigm i termer av ROUGE. Oraklets sammanfattning är nödvändig för att avslöja paradigmets övre prestanda. Experimentella resultat på DUC datauppsättningen visade att ROUGE poäng av kompressionsorakel är signifikant högre än de för extraktiva orakel och state-of-the-art sammanfattningssystem. Resultaten visar att komprimerande sammanfattning är ett lovande paradigm och uppmuntrar oss att fortsätta med forskningen för att producera informativa sammanfattningar.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் ஒரு முழு கோடு நிரல் (ILP) வடிவமைப்பை கிடைக்கும் சுருக்க சுருக்கிய சுருக்கம் இந்த சுருக்கம் அளபுருவின் மேல் பிணைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டை வெளிப்படுத்த முக்கியமானது. DUC தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பித்தது ROUGE மதிப்புகள் சுருக்கும் சொற்களின் மதிப்புகள் வெளியேற்ற சொல்லுகள் மற்றும் கலை சுர இந்த முடிவுகள் சுருக்கும் சுருக்கம் ஒரு வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட அளபுருவாகும் மற்றும் தகவல் சுருக்கம் உருவாக்க ஆராய்ச்சி', 'ur': 'This paper derives an Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulation to obtain a oracle summary of the compressive summarization paradigm in terms of ROUGE. سرگوشی کا ذکر ضرورت ہے کہ پارادیگ کے اوپر چلنے کی عمدگی ظاہر کریں DUC ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے کا نتیجہ دکھایا گیا ہے کہ ROUGE اسکورٹیوں کے ذریعہ مضبوط اورکل اور آهنت کے سامنے سیسٹم سے بہت زیادہ بلند ہیں. یہ نتیجے ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ کمزور ترکیب ایک وعدہ دینے والی پارادیگ ہے اور ہمیں اس تحقیق کے ساتھ ادامه دینے کے لئے محسوس کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu oradagi kichkina paradigmning eng yuqori bog'liq bajarishni koʻrsatish muhim. Name Bu natijalar murakkab ajoyib hisoblanishni tasavvur qiladi va bizga haqida maʼlumot hisobotini yaratishga davom etishga ishonch hohlaydi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này phân tích ra một công cụ cài đặt dây chằng ruột (ILP) để có được một tổng kết tổng quát của mô hình đột xuất tuyệt thu theo dạng ROG. Lời tiên tri là điều cần thiết để tiết lộ khả năng thiên trình ràng buộc cao nhất. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu kia cho thấy rằng ROCE với số hiệu quả cưỡng ép cao hơn nhiều so với các nhà tiên tri có thể lấy được và hệ thống kê khai thác hiện đại. Những kết quả này cho thấy việc tổng hợp nén là một mô hình hứa hẹn và thúc đẩy chúng ta tiếp tục nghiên cứu để cung cấp những bản tóm tắt thông tin.', 'bg': 'Тази статия извлича формулировка за цялостно линейно програмиране (ИЛП), за да се получи резюме на оракула на парадигмата за компресивно обобщаване по отношение на ROUGE. Резюмето на оракула е от съществено значение, за да се разкрие горната граница на изпълнението на парадигмата. Експерименталните резултати на ДУК показаха, че оценките на компресивните оракули са значително по-високи от тези на екстрактивните оракули и най-съвременните системи за обобщаване. Тези резултати разкриват, че компресивното обобщаване е обещаваща парадигма и ни насърчават да продължим с изследванията за изготвяне на информативни резюмета.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir proizvodi formulaciju cjelokupnog linijskog programiranja (ILP) kako bi dobio oralni sažetak paradigme kompresivnog sažetka u smislu ROUGE-a. Sažetak oraka je ključni za otkrivanje uspješnosti paradigme. Eksperimentalni rezultati na sastavu podataka DUC pokazali su da su rezultati ROUGE kompresivnih oraka značajno viši od ekstraktivnih oraka i sustava sažetanja stanja umjetnosti. Ovi rezultati pokazuju da je kompresivna sažetka obećavajuća paradigma i poticaju nas da nastavimo istraživanje kako bi proizveli informativne sažetke.', 'nl': 'Dit document leidt een Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulering af om een orakel samenvatting van het compressieve samenvattingsparadigma in termen van ROUGE te verkrijgen. De orakel samenvatting is essentieel om de bovengrens prestaties van het paradigma te onthullen. Experimentele resultaten op de DUC dataset toonden aan dat ROUGE scores van compressieve orakels significant hoger zijn dan die van extractieve orakels en state-of-the-art samenvattingssystemen. Deze resultaten tonen aan dat compressieve samenvatting een veelbelovend paradigma is en moedigen ons aan om verder te gaan met het onderzoek om informatieve samenvattingen te produceren.', 'da': 'Denne artikel udleder en Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulering til at opnå et orakel resumé af kompressiv opsummering paradigme i form af ROUGE. Oraklets resumé er afgørende for at afsløre paradigmets øvre præstation. Eksperimentelle resultater på DUC datasættet viste, at ROUGE scores af kompressive orakler er betydeligt højere end dem for ekstraktive orakler og state-of-the-art resuméeringssystemer. Disse resultater afslører, at komprimerende opsummering er et lovende paradigme og opfordrer os til at fortsætte med forskningen for at producere informative opsummeringer.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit leitet eine Integer Linear Programming (ILP) Formulierung ab, um eine Orakelzusammenfassung des kompressiven Zusammenfassungsparadies in Bezug auf ROUGE zu erhalten. Die Orakelzusammenfassung ist unerlässlich, um die obere Grenzleistung des Paradigmas aufzudecken. Experimentelle Ergebnisse am DUC-Datensatz zeigten, dass die ROUGE-Werte von kompressiven Orakeln signifikant höher sind als die von extraktiven Orakeln und modernen Zusammenfassungssystemen. Diese Ergebnisse zeigen, dass kompressive Zusammenfassung ein vielversprechendes Paradigma ist und ermutigen uns, die Forschung fortzusetzen, um informative Zusammenfassungen zu erstellen.', 'ko': '본고는 압축 요약 모델이 연지 분야의oracle 요약을 얻기 위해 정수선형계획(ILP) 공식을 유도했다.oracle 요약은 범례의 상한 성능을 보여주는 데 매우 중요하다.DUC 데이터집에서의 실험 결과 압축예언서의 연지 평점은 추출예언서와 최첨단 요약시스템보다 현저히 높았다.이러한 결과에 따르면 압축 요약은 전도가 유망한 범례이며 정보가 풍부한 요약을 만들기 위해 계속 연구를 하도록 격려한다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan formulasi Integer Linear Programming (ILP) untuk mendapatkan ringkasan orakel dari paradigma pengumpulan kompresif dalam terma ROUGE. Ringkasan orakul penting untuk mengungkapkan prestasi terbatas paradigma. Hasil eksperimental pada dataset DUC menunjukkan bahwa skor ROUGE dari orakel kompresif jauh lebih tinggi dari yang dari orakel ekstraktif dan sistem ringkasan state-of-the-art. These results reveal that compressive summarization is a promising paradigm and encourage us to continue with the research to produce informative summaries.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mpango wa Shirika la Ujumbe (ILP) ili kupata muhtasari wa muhtasari wa muhtasari wa muhtasari wa kompyuta kwa mujibu wa ROUGE. Ujumbe wa hivi karibuni ni muhimu wa kuonyesha ufanisi wa juu wa upinzani. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti ya data ya DUC yalionyesha kuwa vipindi vya RUGE vya maneno yanayoshinikiza vizuri zaidi ya zile za maneno yasiyo na mifumo ya muhtasari wa sanaa. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha kuwa muhtasari wa ukomvi unaoahidini na kutuhamasisha kuendelea na utafiti wa kutengeneza muhtasari wa taarifa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ROUGE ýagdaýynda laýyk terjimesini almak üçin Haýyl Hat Programlamagyny (ILP) formasyny çykar. Lalaýyn toparyny paradigmanyň üstünde taýýarlanmagyny açmak üçin wajypdyr. DUC veri setindeki örän netijeleri ROUGE titizlikleri ekstra sözlerniň we sungat sistemleriniň durumyndan has gowudygyny görkezilýär. Bu netijeler gizlemeli toplantyň söz verilen paradigmanyň bir parçadygyny görüp, araştırmalaryň informatif toplantlary üretmek üçin devam etmegimizi töwekleyýär.', 'af': "Hierdie papier afgelei 'n Heelgetalle Linear Programming (ILP) formasie om 'n orakel opsomming van die kompressief opsomming paradigm te kry in terms van ROUGE. Die opsomming van die orakel is noodsaaklik om die boonste gebonde prestasie van die paradigme te openbaar. Eksperimentale resultate op die DUC datastel het vertoon dat ROUGE telling van kompressiewe orakels betekenlik hoër is as wat van ekstraktiewe orakels en state-of-the-art opsomming stelsels. Hierdie resultate vertoon dat kompressiewe opsomming 'n beloftende paradigme is en ons moedig om voort te gaan met die ondersoek om informatiewe opsommings te produseer.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ فرمول برنامه\u200cبندی کلی خطی (ILP) را برای گرفتن یک جمعیت اصلی از پارادیگ جمعیت مزرعی به صورت ROUGE تولید می\u200cکند. جمع اعلام اصطلاحی برای نشان دادن عملکرد پاردیگ بالا ضروری است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای DUC نشان داده\u200cاند که امتیاز ROUGE از زبان\u200cهای فشار بسیار بالاتر از آن\u200cها از زبان\u200cهای فشار و سیستم\u200cهای فشار هنر هستند. این نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که جمع\u200cآوری محکم یک پارادیگ قول\u200cدهنده است و ما را تشویق می\u200cدهد که با تحقیقات ادامه دهیم تا جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای اطلاعاتی تولید کنیم.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument nxjerr një formulim Integer Linear Programming (ILP) për të marrë një përmbledhje orakulli të paradigm ës kompresive të përmbledhjes në terma të ROUGE. Përmbledhja e orakullit është thelbësore për të zbuluar performancën më të lartë të paradigm ës. Rezultatet eksperimentale në grupin e të dhënave të DUC treguan se rezultatet ROUGE të orakleve kompresive janë ndjeshëm më të larta se ato të orakleve ekstraktive dhe të sistemeve të përmbledhjes më të moderne. Këto rezultate tregojnë se përmbledhja kompresive është një paradigm ë premtuese dhe na inkurajojnë të vazhdojmë me kërkimet për të prodhuar përmbledhje informative.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የውይይት መስመር ፕሮግራሙር (ILP) በተጨማሪው ማጠቃለያ ማቀናጃ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ማኅበረሰብ የላይኛውን አካባቢ ውጤት ለመግለጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Experimental results on the DUC dataset showed that ROUGE scores of compressive oracles are significantly higher than those of extractive oracles and state-of-the-art summarization systems.  እነዚህም ፍሬዎች አፍቃሪው ተቃውሞ የሚያስፈራራው ተቃውሞ ነው እና የመረጃ ተቃውሞ ለመፍጠር እና ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ստեղծվում է ամբողջ գծային ծրագրավորումների (ILP) ձևավորում, որպեսզի ստանանք ընկճող համառոտագրման պարադիգմայի կառուցվածքը ROUGe-ի առումով: Օրակալ համառոտագրությունը կարևոր է պարադիգմայի վերին սահմանները բացահայտելու համար: ԴուԿ տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ ROUGe-ի ընդգծող օրակլերի գնահատականները շատ ավելի բարձր են քան արտադրողական օրակլերի և ամենաբարձր համառոտագրման համակարգերի գնահատականները: Այս արդյունքները բացահայտում են, որ ճնշող համառոտագրությունը խոստացող պարադիգմ է և խրախուսում են մեզ շարունակել հետազոտությունները ինֆորմատիվ համառոտագրություններ ստեղծելու համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt ROUGE vasitəsilə birlikdə kompressiv toplama paradigm in in oraqlı təmizlənməsi üçün Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formülünü təşkil edir. Səfərlənmək paradigmanın üstündəki performansını göstərmək üçün vacibdir. DUC verilənlərin təcrübəsi sonuçlarının ROUGE sıkıştırıcı sözlərin səviyyələri ekstraktif sözlərin və sanat təcrübəsinin sistemlərindən çox yüksək olduğunu göstərdi. Bu sonuçlar, sıxıntılı yığışdırma tələb edən bir paradigm olduğunu göstərir və bizi məlumatlı yığışdırmalar üçün araştırma ilə devam etməmizə təvəkkül edir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি রোউজের মাধ্যমে সম্পূর্ণ সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের সারসারিক সংক্ষেপ প পাওয়ার জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ লাইনের প্রোগ্রামিং ( প্যারাডিমের উচ্চবিধান প্রদর্শনের জন্য oracle সারসংক্ষেপ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। ডিউসির ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে রুজের সংক্রান্ত কণ্ঠস্বরের সংখ্যাগুলোর চেয়ে বেশী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সংক্ষেপ। এই ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে যে সম্পূর্ণ সংক্ষেপ একটি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল প্যারাডিম এবং তথ্যের সারিম তৈরি করার জন্য আমাদের গবেষণার সাথে', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir proizvodi formulaciju integralnog linijskog programiranja (ILP) kako bi dobio oralni sažetak paradigme kompresivne sažetke u smislu ROUGE. Sažetak oraka je ključni za otkrivanje gornjeg uspeha paradigme. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka DUC pokazali su da su rezultati ROUGE kompresivnih oraka značajno viši od ekstraktivnih oraka i sustava sažetanja stanja umjetnosti. Ovi rezultati pokazuju da je kompresivna sažetka obećavajuća paradigma i poticaju nas da nastavimo sa istraživanjem da proizvedemo informativne sažetke.', 'ca': "Aquest paper deriva una formulació Integer Linear Programming (ILP) per obtenir un resum oracle del paradigma de resum compressiu en termes de ROUGE. El resum de l'oracle és essencial per revelar el rendiment superior del paradigma. Els resultats experimentals del conjunt de dades DUC van demostrar que les puntuacions ROUGE d'oracles compressius són significativament més altes que les d'oracles extractius i els sistemes de resume més avançats. These results reveal that compressive summarization is a promising paradigm and encourage us to continue with the research to produce informative summaries.", 'cs': 'Tento článek odvozuje formulaci integer lineárního programování (ILP) pro získání věšteckého shrnutí kompresivního souhrnu z hlediska ROUGE. Shrnutí věštců je nezbytné pro odhalení horní hranice výkonu paradigmatu. Experimentální výsledky na datové sadě DUC ukázaly, že ROUGE skóre kompresivních věštců jsou výrazně vyšší než u extrakčních věštců a nejmodernějších souhrnných systémů. Tyto výsledky ukazují, že kompresivní shrnutí je slibným paradigmatem a povzbuzují nás, abychom pokračovali ve výzkumu a vytvářeli informativní shrnutí.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tuletab Integer Linear Programming (ILP) formulatsiooni, et saada oraakeli kokkuvõte kompressiivse kokkuvõtte paradigmast seoses ROUGE. Oraakli kokkuvõte on oluline, et paljastada paradigma ülemise piiri tulemuslikkus. DUC andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitasid, et kompressiivsete oraakelite ROUGE skoorid on oluliselt kõrgemad kui ekstraktiivsete oraakelite ja kaasaegsete kokkuvõtlussüsteemide skoorid. Need tulemused näitavad, et kompressiivne kokkuvõte on paljutõotav paradigma ja julgustavad meid jätkama uurimistööd informatiivsete kokkuvõtete koostamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli johtaa Integer Linear Programming (ILP) -formulaation saadakseen oraakkeliyhteenvedon kompressiivisesta yhteenvedosta suhteessa ROUGE. Oraakkeliyhteenveto on olennainen, jotta voidaan paljastaa paradigman yläraja-arvo. Kokeelliset tulokset DUC-aineistosta osoittivat, että puristusorakkelien ROUGE-pisteet ovat merkittävästi korkeammat kuin ekstraktiivien oraakkelien ja viimeisimpien yhteenvetojärjestelmien. Tulokset osoittavat, että kompressiivinen yhteenveto on lupaava paradigma ja kannustavat jatkamaan tutkimusta informatiivisten yhteenvetojen tuottamiseksi.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi kelompok Entger Linary Program (IBP) nggawe kelompok oracul dadi kapan kompresi, dadi LOUGE Rasané oras diolah sing ngendalikno ngomong nik akeh wong liyane Defs Rejalaké iki bakal kelakon ngerasakno asakno iki dadi, kita ngomongke sampek kanggo ngilanggar sampek kanggo ngilanggar sisakake informasi.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek izpelje formulacijo celotnega linearnega programiranja (ILP) za pridobitev oraklenega povzetka paradigme kompresivnega povzetka v smislu ROUGE. Povzetek orakla je bistven za razkritje zgornje meje uspešnosti paradigme. Eksperimentalni rezultati na naboru podatkov DUC so pokazali, da so ROUGE rezultati kompresivnih oraklov bistveno višji od rezultatov ekstraktivnih oraklov in najsodobnejših sistemov za povzetek. Ti rezultati kažejo, da je kompresivna povzetka obetavna paradigma in nas spodbujajo k nadaljevanju raziskav in izdelavi informativnih povzetkov.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na mottar da shirin Shirin Linke na Intel (ILP) dõmin ya sami wani orani na ƙararrar da tsorori na Compression game da MARUGE. Babu muhimu a nuna aikin da aka samar da paradigm. Matarin da aka jarraba kan database na DUC ya nuna cewa nau'in rubutu na rubutu masu girma da wasu kalmõmi na kasa masu ƙaranci na tsarin-rubutun da-sanar. Haƙĩƙa waɗannan matsalar sun bayyana cewa tsarinta mai ƙaranci shi ne mai yi wa'adi, kuma yana kwaɗayi mu ƙara a kan research don ya sami takardar da fassarar lãbãri.", 'he': 'הנייר הזה מגיע לתכנית לינרית שלמה (ILP) כדי להשיג סכם אורקלי של הפרדיגמה של הסיוריזציה הדחופת במונחים של ROUGE. הסכם האורקל חיוני כדי לחשוף את ההופעה העליונה של הפרדיגמה. תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצת נתונים DUC הראו כי נקודות ROUGE של אורקלים מדחפים גבוהות באופן משמעותי מאלה של אורקלים חושפים ומערכות סאמריזציה מוקדמות. התוצאות האלה חושפות שסכם מדכא הוא פרדיגמה מבטיחה ולעודד אותנו להמשיך עם המחקר כדי לייצר סכם מידעי.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རྩིས་ཐག་གི་ལྡོག་རིམ་བྱ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་ལྡན་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་ཞིག་ཐོབ་པ མཛུབ་མཁན་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་དུ་ཆེན་མཁན་ཡིན་པས་སྔོན་རྒྱག་སྐྱོར་བ་རྟོགས་དགོས། DUC གནད་སྡུད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ནང་གི་Experimental 結果་དག་ནི་ གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་དག་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་མཁན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཞིག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Japanese Sentence Compression with a Large Training Dataset', 'ar': 'ضغط الجمل اليابانية مع مجموعة بيانات تدريب كبيرة', 'pt': 'Compressão de frases em japonês com um grande conjunto de dados de treinamento', 'fr': "Compression de phrases en japonais avec un ensemble de données d'entraînement", 'es': 'Compresión de oraciones en japonés con un gran conjunto de datos', 'ja': '大規模なトレーニングデータセットを使用した日本語の文章圧縮', 'zh': '以大练数集压缩日语句', 'hi': 'एक बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट के साथ जापानी वाक्य संपीड़न', 'ru': 'Сжатие японского предложения с большим набором обучающих данных', 'ga': 'Comhbhrú Pianbhreithe Seapánach le Tacar Mór Sonraí Oiliúna', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Japán mondattömörítés egy nagy edzési adatkészlettel', 'el': 'Ιαπωνική συμπίεση φράσεων με ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων κατάρτισης', 'it': 'Compressione della frase giapponese con un grande set di dati di allenamento', 'kk': 'Жапон сөздерді үлкен оқыту деректер бағдарламасының компрессиясы', 'lt': 'Japonijos nuosprendžių kompresija su dideliu mokymo duomenų rinkiniu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Japanese Sentence Compression with a Large Training Dataset', 'ml': 'വലിയ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റുമുള്ള ജപ്പാനീസിന്റെ വാക്കുകൊടുക്കുക', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Япон үгийн дарааллын дарааллыг том дасгал өгөгдлийн сан', 'pl': 'Kompresja zdań japońskich z dużym zestawem danych treningowych', 'ro': 'Comprimarea sentințelor japoneze cu un set mare de date de antrenament', 'sr': 'Japanska presuda sa velikim podacima obuke', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Japanese Sentence Compression with a large Training Dataset', 'sv': 'Japansk meningskompression med ett stort träningsdataset', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhật Name=Nén hình vành Name', 'bg': 'Компресиране на японски изречения с голям набор от данни за обучение', 'nl': 'Japanse zinscompressie met een grote trainingsdataset', 'da': 'Japansk sætning komprimering med et stort træningsdatasæt', 'hr': 'Japanska kompresija kazne sa velikim podacima obuke', 'de': 'Japanische Satzkomprimierung mit einem großen Trainingsdatensatz', 'id': 'Kompresi hukuman Jepang dengan Set Data Pelatihan Besar', 'ko': '대형 훈련 데이터 집합 기반의 일본어 문장 압축', 'fa': 'فشار سخنرانی ژاپنی با یک داده\u200cهای آموزش بزرگ', 'tr': 'Ýaponiýa sözleri Ullakan Ewez Maglumaty bilen Sykmak', 'sw': 'Kushinikiza hukumu ya Japani kwa seti kubwa ya mafunzo', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Kompresion i dënimeve japoneze me një bazë të dhënash të madhe trainimit', 'az': 'B칲y칲k t톛hsil veril톛n Yaponca S칬z칲 Komprimesi', 'bn': 'বিশাল প্রশিক্ষণের সাথে জাপানী শাস্তি সম্পাদনা', 'am': 'Japanese Sentence Compression with a large Training Dataset', 'ca': "Compressió japonesa de sentences amb un gran conjunt de dades d'entrenament", 'bs': 'Japanska presuda sa velikim podacima obuke', 'cs': 'Komprese japonských vět s velkou sadou tréninkových dat', 'et': 'Jaapani lausete tihendamine suure koolitusandmetega', 'fi': 'Japanin lauseiden pakkaaminen suurella harjoitustietojoukolla', 'hy': 'Comment', 'jv': 'Compresion Spanish', 'sk': 'Japonska stiskanje stavkov z velikim naborom podatkov o usposabljanju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'דיכוי משפטים יפני עם ערכת מידע אימונים גדולה', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀློག་སྟངས་གནད་སྡུད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྱད་ནས་ཉེ་པོ་ནི་ཚོར་མཚམས་ཆེན།'}
{'en': 'In English, high-quality sentence compression models by deleting words have been trained on automatically created large training datasets. We work on Japanese sentence compression by a similar approach. To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language. The created dataset is used to train Japanese sentence compression models based on the recurrent neural network.', 'es': 'En inglés, los modelos de compresión de oraciones de alta calidad mediante la eliminación de palabras se han entrenado en grandes conjuntos de datos de entrenamiento creados automáticamente. Trabajamos en la compresión de oraciones en japonés con un enfoque similar. Para crear un conjunto de datos de entrenamiento japonés grande, se modifica un método para crear un conjunto de datos de entrenamiento de inglés en función de las características del idioma japonés. El conjunto de datos creado se utiliza para entrenar modelos japoneses de compresión de oraciones basados en la red neuronal recurrente.', 'pt': 'Em inglês, os modelos de compressão de frases de alta qualidade por meio da exclusão de palavras foram treinados em grandes conjuntos de dados de treinamento criados automaticamente. Trabalhamos na compressão de frases em japonês por uma abordagem semelhante. Para criar um grande conjunto de dados de treinamento em japonês, um método de criação de conjunto de dados de treinamento em inglês é modificado com base nas características do idioma japonês. O conjunto de dados criado é usado para treinar modelos de compressão de frases em japonês com base na rede neural recorrente.', 'ar': 'في اللغة الإنجليزية ، تم تدريب نماذج ضغط الجملة عالية الجودة عن طريق حذف الكلمات على مجموعات بيانات تدريب كبيرة تم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا. نحن نعمل على ضغط الجملة اليابانية من خلال نهج مماثل. لإنشاء مجموعة بيانات تدريب يابانية كبيرة ، يتم تعديل طريقة إنشاء مجموعة بيانات تدريب باللغة الإنجليزية بناءً على خصائص اللغة اليابانية. تُستخدم مجموعة البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها لتدريب نماذج ضغط الجملة اليابانية بناءً على الشبكة العصبية المتكررة.', 'fr': "En anglais, des modèles de compression de phrases de haute qualité en supprimant des mots ont été entraînés sur de grands ensembles de données d'entraînement créés automatiquement. Nous travaillons sur la compression de phrases en japonais selon une approche similaire. Pour créer un ensemble de données d'entraînement japonais volumineux, une méthode de création de jeu de données d'entraînement en anglais est modifiée en fonction des caractéristiques de la langue japonaise. L'ensemble de données créé est utilisé pour entraîner des modèles de compression de phrases japonais basés sur le réseau neuronal récurrent.", 'ja': '英語では、単語を削除することで高品質の文圧縮モデルが自動的に作成された大きなトレーニングデータセットでトレーニングされています。同様のアプローチによる日本語の文圧縮に取り組んでいる。大きな日本語トレーニングデータセットを作成するには、日本語の特性に基づいて英語トレーニングデータセットを作成する方法を修正します。作成されたデータセットは、再帰ニューラルネットワークに基づいて日本語の文章圧縮モデルをトレーニングするために使用されます。', 'zh': '英语之中,删单词高质量句压缩模形已创集上数。 以类论日语句压缩。 创大日语练数集,因日语改创英语训练数集之法。 创数集以练递归神经网络日语句压缩模形。', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी में, शब्दों को हटाकर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले वाक्य संपीड़न मॉडल को स्वचालित रूप से बनाए गए बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया गया है। हम एक समान दृष्टिकोण से जापानी वाक्य संपीड़न पर काम करते हैं। एक बड़ा जापानी प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट बनाने के लिए, अंग्रेजी प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट बनाने की एक विधि जापानी भाषा की विशेषताओं के आधार पर संशोधित की जाती है। बनाए गए डेटासेट का उपयोग आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर जापानी वाक्य संपीड़न मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'На английском языке высококачественные модели сжатия предложений путем удаления слов были обучены на автоматически созданных больших обучающих наборах данных. Мы работаем над японским сжатием предложений, используя аналогичный подход. Для создания большого обучающего набора данных японского языка метод создания обучающего набора данных английского языка модифицируется на основе характеристик японского языка. Созданный набор данных используется для обучения японских моделей сжатия предложений на основе рекуррентной нейронной сети.', 'ga': 'I mBéarla, cuireadh oiliúint ar mhúnlaí comhbhrú abairtí ardcháilíochta trí fhocail a scriosadh ar thacair shonraí oiliúna mhóra a cruthaíodh go huathoibríoch. Oibrímid ar chomhbhrú abairtí na Seapáine trí chur chuige comhchosúil. Chun tacar sonraí oiliúna Seapánach mór a chruthú, modhnaítear modh chun tacar sonraí oiliúna Béarla a chruthú bunaithe ar shaintréithe na Seapáine. Úsáidtear an tacar sonraí cruthaithe chun samhlacha comhbhrú abairtí Seapánacha a oiliúint bunaithe ar an ngréasán néarach athfhillteach.', 'ka': 'ანგლისურად, სიტყვების წაშლად მარტივი კომპრექციის მოდელები ავტომატურად შექმნა დიდი განაკლების მონაცემების შესახებ განაკლებულია. ჩვენ იაპონური სიტყვების კომპრექციაზე მსგავსი გაგრძნობით. დიდი იაპონური განაკლების მონაცემების შექმნა, ანგლისური განაკლების მონაცემების შექმნა მონაცემები იქნება იაპონური ენის პროგრამეტრების განაკლებების შექმნილი მონაცემების საქაღალდე იყენება ჯაპონეთის კომპრესი მოდელების შესაბამისთვის, რომელიც რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის დაბა', 'el': 'Στα αγγλικά, υψηλής ποιότητας μοντέλα συμπίεσης προτάσεων με τη διαγραφή λέξεων έχουν εκπαιδευτεί σε αυτόματα δημιουργημένα μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Δουλεύουμε στην συμπίεση των ιαπωνικών προτάσεων με μια παρόμοια προσέγγιση. Για να δημιουργήσετε ένα μεγάλο ιαπωνικό σύνολο δεδομένων κατάρτισης, τροποποιείται μια μέθοδος δημιουργίας γλωσσικών δεδομένων κατάρτισης με βάση τα χαρακτηριστικά της ιαπωνικής γλώσσας. Το δημιουργημένο σύνολο δεδομένων χρησιμοποιείται για την εκπαίδευση ιαπωνικών μοντέλων συμπίεσης προτάσεων βασισμένων στο επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρικό δίκτυο.', 'hu': 'Angolul kiváló minőségű mondattömörítési modelleket képeztek a szavak törlésével automatikusan létrehozott nagyméretű képzési adatkészletekre. Hasonló megközelítéssel dolgozunk a japán mondatok tömörítésén. Egy nagy japán képzési adatkészlet létrehozásához az angol képzési adatkészlet létrehozásának módszerét a japán nyelv jellemzői alapján módosítják. A létrehozott adatkészletet japán mondattömörítő modellek képzésére használják a visszatérő neurális hálózat alapján.', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінде сөздерді өшіру арқылы, үлкен оқыту деректер жиындарына автоматты түрде оқыту үшін сапатты сапатты сәйкестік үлгілер үлгілері өші Біз жапон сөздерді ұқсас жағдайда сәйкес көмегімен жұмыс істейміз. Ең үлкен жапон оқыту деректер жиынын құру үшін ағылшын оқыту деректер жиынын құру әдісі жапон тілінің қасиеттерінің негізінде өзгертіледі. Құрылған деректер жиыны қайталанатын невралдық желіне негізделген жапон тізбекті компрессия үлгілерін оқыту үшін қолданылады.', 'it': 'In inglese, modelli di compressione di frasi di alta qualità eliminando parole sono stati addestrati su set di dati di formazione creati automaticamente. Lavoriamo sulla compressione delle frasi giapponesi con un approccio simile. Per creare un grande set di dati di formazione giapponese, viene modificato un metodo di creazione di set di dati di formazione inglese in base alle caratteristiche della lingua giapponese. Il dataset creato viene utilizzato per formare modelli giapponesi di compressione delle frasi basati sulla rete neurale ricorrente.', 'lt': 'Anglų kalba aukštos kokybės sakinių kompresijos modeliai ištrinant žodžius buvo išmokyti automatiškai sukurtuose dideliuose mokymo duomenų rinkiniuose. Mes dirbame Japonijos sakinių spaudimui panašiu požiūriu. Siekiant sukurti didelį Japonijos mokymo duomenų rinkinį, anglų mokymo duomenų rinkinio kūrimo metodas keičiamas atsižvelgiant į Japonijos kalbos savybes. Sukurtas duomenų rinkinys naudojamas Japonijos sakinių kompresijos modeliams, pagrįstiems pasikartojančiu nerviniu tinklu, treniruoti.', 'mk': 'На англиски, висококвалитетни модели за компресија на реченици со бришење на зборови се обучени на автоматски создадени големи податоци за обука. Работиме на јапонска компресија со сличен пристап. To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language.  Створениот датотек се користи за обука на јапонски модели за компресија на реченици базирани на рецидентната нервна мрежа.', 'ms': 'Dalam bahasa Inggeris, model pemampatan kaliti tinggi perkataan dengan memadam perkataan telah dilatih pada set data latihan besar dicipta secara automatik. Kami bekerja pada pemampatan kalimat Jepun dengan pendekatan yang sama. To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language.  Set data dicipta digunakan untuk melatih model pemampatan kalimat Jepun berdasarkan rangkaian saraf berulang.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തിയ വാക്കുകളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്വയം വലിയ ട്രെയിനിന്\u200d ഡാറ നമ്മള്\u200d ജാപ്പനീസ് വാക്ക് സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ ജപ്പാനീസ് പരിശീലന ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിശീലന ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു  സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ജാപ്പനീസ് വാക്ക് സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ആവര', 'mt': 'Fl-Ingliż, mudelli ta’ kompressjoni ta’ sentenzi ta’ kwalità għolja billi tħassru l-kliem ġew imħarrġa fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ kbar maħluqa awtomatikament. Aħna naħdmu fuq il-kompressjoni tas-sentenzi Ġappuniżi b’approċċ simili. Biex jinħoloq sett ta’ dejta kbir ta’ taħriġ Ġappuniż, metodu għall-ħolqien ta’ sett ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ Ingliż huwa modifikat abbażi tal-karatteristiċi tal-lingwa Ġappuniża. Is-sett ta’ dejta maħluq jintuża għat-taħriġ ta’ mudelli ta’ kompressjoni tas-sentenzi Ġappuniżi bbażati fuq in-netwerk newrali rikorrenti.', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний хэлээр, үгийг устгахад өндөр чанартай өгүүлбэрийн шинжлэх загвар автоматаар том сургалтын өгөгдлийн санг бий болгосон. Бид япон өгүүлбэрийг нэг төстэй арга хэмжээнд ажилладаг. Японы том сургалтын өгөгдлийн санг бий болгохын тулд Англи сургалтын өгөгдлийн санг Японы хэлний чанарын тулд өөрчлөгдсөн арга юм. Бүтээгдсэн өгөгдлийн сангууд Японы өгүүлбэрийг дахин дахин мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд сургалтын загвар сургалтын тулд хэрэглэгддэг.', 'no': 'I engelsk er komprimeringsmodeller med høg kvalitet for setningar ved å sletta ord trengte på automatisk oppretta stor opplæringsdatasett. Vi arbeider på komprimering av japansk setningar med ein liknande tilnærming. For å laga eit stor opplæringsdataset for japansk, er ein metode for å laga engelsk opplæringsdataset endra basert på eigenskapane til japansk språk. Den oppretta datasettet vert brukt til å trenja komprimeringsmodeller i japansk setningar basert på gjentaande neuralnettverk.', 'pl': 'W języku angielskim, wysokiej jakości modele kompresji zdań poprzez usuwanie słów zostały przeszkolone na automatycznie utworzonych dużych zbiorach danych treningowych. Pracujemy nad japońską kompresją zdań przy użyciu podobnego podejścia. Aby utworzyć duży zestaw danych treningowych japońskiego, metoda tworzenia angielskiego zestawu danych treningowych jest modyfikowana w oparciu o cechy języka japońskiego. Stworzony zestaw danych służy do treningu japońskich modeli kompresji zdań opartych na powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej.', 'ro': 'În limba engleză, modele de compresie a frazelor de înaltă calitate prin ștergerea cuvintelor au fost instruite pe seturi de date de instruire mari create automat. Lucrăm la compresia frazelor japoneze printr-o abordare similară. Pentru a crea un set mare de date de instruire japoneză, o metodă de creare a setului de date de instruire în limba engleză este modificată în funcție de caracteristicile limbii japoneze. Setul de date creat este folosit pentru a instrui modele japoneze de compresie a frazelor bazate pe rețeaua neurală recurentă.', 'so': 'Luqada Ingiriiska waxaa lagu baray tusaalaha hoos u dhigashada hadalka la deleto, si automatic ah ayaa u abuurtay koorasyada waxbarashada oo waaweyn. Waxaynu ku shaqeynaa qoraalka Japoniya oo isku mid ah. Si loo sameeyo koorasyo waxbarasho oo waaweyn oo jabanees ah, waa qaab ku sameynta macluumaadka waxbarashada ingiriisiga lagu beddelo ku saleysan takhasuska afka Jabaneeska. The created dataset is used to train Japanese sentence compression models based on the recurrent neural network.', 'sv': 'På engelska har högkvalitativa meningskompressionsmodeller genom att radera ord tränats på automatiskt skapade stora träningsdataset. Vi arbetar med japansk meningskompression med ett liknande tillvägagångssätt. För att skapa ett stort japanskt utbildningsdataset ändras en metod för att skapa engelska utbildningsdataset baserat på egenskaperna hos det japanska språket. Den skapade datauppsättningen används för att träna japanska meningskompressionsmodeller baserade på det återkommande neurala nätverket.', 'sr': 'Na engleskom jeziku, modeli kompresije visokokvalitetne rečenice izbrisajući reči obučeni su na automatski stvorenim velikim podacima obuke. Radimo na kompresiji japanske rečenice sličnim pristupom. Da bi stvorio veliku japansku obuku podataka, metod stvaranja podataka engleskog obuke se modifikuje na temelju karakteristika japanskog jezika. Napravljeni set podataka se koristi za obuku modela kompresije japanske rečenice na temelju ponovne neuralne mreže.', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින්, විශේෂ වාක්ෂිත වාක්ෂාව සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ් මොඩේල් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන්  අපි ජාපාන් වාක්ෂාව සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණයක් වලින් වැඩ කරනවා. ලොකු ජාපානි ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සූදානයක් හදන්න, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සූදානයක් ජාපානි භාෂාවේ  නිර්මාණය කරපු දත්ත සෙට් ජාපාන් වාක්ය සංකූපණ මොඩේල් කිරීමට භාවිත කරයි.', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலத்தில், உயர்தரமான வாக்கு சுருக்க மாதிரிகளை நீக்கும் வார்த்தைகளை தானாகவே பெரிய பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்பு நாம் ஜப்பானிய வாக்கியத்தை சுருக்குவத்தில் வேலை செய்கிறோம் அதே போன்ற செயல்பாடுகளால To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language.  உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பு திரும்பப் புதிய பிணையம் வலைப்பின்னலை அடிப்படையில் ஜாப்பானின் சொல் சுருக்கு', 'ur': 'انگلیسی میں، کلمات حذف کرنے کے ذریعہ، بہت سی کیفیت جماعت کے مطابق زیادہ مطابق جماعت کی مدلکوں کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے، بڑے ٹرینگ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ۔ ہم جیاپنی جماعت پر ایک جیسے طریقہ سے کام کرتے ہیں۔ ایک بڑے جاپانیایی تطارین ڈاٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے، انگلیسی تطارین ڈاٹ سٹ بنانے کا طریقہ جاپانیایی زبان کی خصوصیات پر بدل دیا جاتا ہے. پیدا کیا گیا ڈاٹ سٹ جاپانیایی جماعت کمپریشن موڈل کو دوبارہ نیورل نیٹ ورک پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Inglizcha tilida, so'zlarni oʻchirish orqali katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini avtomatik yaratish mumkin. Biz yaponiya so'zni o'zgartirib ishlayapmiz, bir xil usul bilan ishlayapmiz. Yaponcha taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bazasini yaratish uchun ingliz tili taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bazasini yaratish usuli Japoniya tilning xususiyatlari asosida oʻzgartiriladi. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Tiếng Anh, những mô hình ép bản chất chất cao bằng cách xóa bỏ từ đã được huấn luyện trên các tập tin lớn tự động tạo ra. Chúng tôi làm việc trong trường hợp chữ nén bằng một cách tương tự. Để tạo ra một tập tin lớn về Nhật Bản, một phương pháp tạo dữ liệu về đào tạo người Anh được sửa đổi dựa trên các đặc điểm của ngôn ngữ Nhật. Bộ dữ liệu đã tạo ra được dùng để đào tạo các mô hình nén bản án Nhật Bản dựa trên mạng thần kinh thường xuyên.', 'da': 'På engelsk er sætningskompressionsmodeller af høj kvalitet ved at slette ord blevet trænet i automatisk oprettede store træningsdatasæt. Vi arbejder på japansk sætningskompression med en lignende tilgang. For at oprette et stort japansk træningsdatasæt ændres en metode til oprettelse af engelsk træningsdatasæt baseret på det japanske sprogs karakteristika. Det oprettede datasæt bruges til at træne japanske sætningskompressionsmodeller baseret på det tilbagevendende neurale netværk.', 'hr': 'Na engleskom jeziku, modeli kompresije visokokvalitetne rečenice izbrisajući riječi obučeni su na automatski stvorenim velikim podacima obuke. Radimo na kompresiji japanske kazne sličnim pristupom. Da bi stvorili veliku japansku obuku podataka, metod stvaranja podataka engleskog obuke se modifikuje na temelju karakteristika japanskog jezika. Napravljeni set podataka se koristi za obuku modela kompresije japanske rečenice na temelju ponovne neuralne mreže.', 'nl': 'In het Engels zijn hoogwaardige zinnencompressiemodellen door woorden te verwijderen getraind op automatisch gemaakte grote trainingsdatasets. We werken aan Japanse zinnencompressie door een soortgelijke aanpak. Om een grote Japanse trainingsdataset te maken, wordt een methode voor het maken van Engelse trainingsdataset aangepast op basis van de kenmerken van de Japanse taal. De gecreëerde dataset wordt gebruikt om Japanse zinnencompressiemodellen te trainen op basis van het terugkerende neurale netwerk.', 'bg': 'На английски език висококачествените модели за компресиране на изречения чрез изтриване на думи са обучени върху автоматично създадени големи набори от данни за обучение. Работим върху компресирането на японски изречения по подобен подход. За да се създаде голям набор от данни за обучение на японски език, методът за създаване на набор от данни за обучение на английски език се модифицира въз основа на характеристиките на японския език. Създаденият набор от данни се използва за обучение на японски модели за компресиране на изречения въз основа на повтарящата се невронна мрежа.', 'de': 'Im Englischen wurden hochwertige Satzkomprimierungsmodelle durch Löschen von Wörtern auf automatisch erstellten großen Trainingsdatensätzen trainiert. Wir arbeiten mit einem ähnlichen Ansatz an der japanischen Satzkomprimierung. Um einen großen japanischen Trainingsdatensatz zu erstellen, wird eine Methode zum Erstellen eines englischen Trainingsdatensatzes basierend auf den Eigenschaften der japanischen Sprache geändert. Der erstellte Datensatz wird verwendet, um japanische Satzkomprimierungsmodelle basierend auf dem wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerk zu trainieren.', 'ko': '영어에서는 단어를 삭제하는 고품질 문장 압축 모델을 통해 자동으로 만들어진 대형 훈련 데이터 집합에서 훈련을 진행했다.우리는 유사한 방법을 채택하여 일본어 문장을 압축한다.대형 일본어 훈련 데이터 집합을 만들기 위해 일본어의 특징에 따라 영어 훈련 데이터 집합을 만드는 방법을 수정했다.이 데이터 집합은 귀속 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 일본어 문장 압축 모델을 훈련하는 데 쓰인다.', 'id': 'In English, high-quality sentence compression models by deleting words have been trained on automatically created large training datasets.  Kami bekerja pada kompresi kalimat Jepang dengan pendekatan yang sama. Untuk menciptakan dataset pelatihan Jepang besar, metode untuk menciptakan dataset pelatihan Inggris diubah berdasarkan karakteristik bahasa Jepang. Set data yang diciptakan digunakan untuk melatih model kompresi kalimat Jepang berdasarkan jaringan saraf yang berulang.', 'fa': 'در انگلیسی، مدلهای فشار کیفیت زیادی از جمله با حذف کردن کلمات بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آموزش بزرگ خودکار آموزش داده شده\u200cاند. ما با یک طریق مشابه روی فشار جمله ژاپنی کار می کنیم. برای ایجاد یک مجموعه داده آموزش ژاپنی بزرگ، روش ایجاد مجموعه داده آموزش انگلیسی بر اساس ویژگی زبان ژاپنی تغییر داده می شود. مجموعه داده\u200cهای ساخته برای آموزش مدل\u200cهای فشار جمله ژاپنی بر اساس شبکه عصبی بازگشت استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe, iňlisçe ýokary kalit sözler sykylamak nusgalary sözlerini pozarak otomatik bilen uly okuw sanatlaryny üýtgedildi. Biz Japonça sözlerin sykylanmasynda meňzeş ýaly işleýäris. Ýaponiýanyň uly okuw sanlaryny bejermek üçin iňlisçe okuw sanlaryny bejermek üçin japonça diliniň özlerine görä üýtgedildi. Ýaponiýa sözleşme nusgalaryny tekrarly netijele daýanýan ýagdaýda öwrenmek üçin ullanylýar', 'sw': 'Kwa Kiingereza, mifano ya upinzani wa hukumu yenye kiwango cha juu kwa kufuta maneno yamefundishwa kwenye seti kubwa za mafunzo. Tunafanya kazi kwenye shinikizo la hukumu ya Japani kwa njia inayofanana na hilo. Kutengeneza takwimu kubwa za mafunzo ya Japani, njia ya kutengeneza takwimu za mafunzo ya Kiingereza imebadilishwa kwa kutumia sifa za lugha ya Japani. Taasisi ya taarifa zilizotengenezwa inatumika kufundisha mifano ya kompyuta ya hukumu ya Japani kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura unaoendelea.', 'sq': 'Në anglisht, modelet e kompresionit të fjalëve të cilësisë së lartë duke fshirë fjalët janë trajnuar në automatikisht krijuar grupe të dhënash të mëdha trajnimi. Ne punojmë në shtypjen e fjalëve japoneze me një metodë të ngjashme. Për të krijuar një grup të madh të dhënash për trainimin japonez, një metodë për krijimin e një grupi të dhënash për trainimin anglez modifikohet bazuar në karakteristikat e gjuhës japoneze. Të dhënat e krijuara përdoren për të trajnuar modelet japoneze të kompresimit të fjalëve bazuar në rrjetin neural të përsëritur.', 'am': 'በንግግሊዝኛ፣ ከፍተኛ የቃላት ክፍል ሞዴል በማጥፋት ቃላትን በቶሎ ትልቅ ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን በመፍጠር ተማርተዋል፡፡ በጃፓን ፍርድ ክስ ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ትልቅ የጃፓን ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ ማድረጊያውን ለመፍጠር፣ የጃፓንኛ ቋንቋ አካላትን በመፍጠር የኢንግሊዝኛ ትምህርት ዳታተር ማድረግ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ የተፈጠረው የዳታ ሳጥን የጃፓን የቁጥጥር መክፈት ሞዴላዎችን በመቀጠል በኔural መረብ ላይ ለመማር ይጠቀማል።', 'hy': 'Անգլերենում բարձր որակի նախադասությունների ճնշումների մոդելները բառերի ջնջման միջոցով ավտոմատ ստեղծվել են մեծ ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ: Մենք աշխատում ենք ճապոնական նախադասությունների ճնշումների վրա նման մոտեցումներով: To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language.  The created dataset is used to train Japanese sentence compression models based on the recurrent neural network.', 'az': 'İngilizce dilində, yüksək kaliteli cümlələr sıkıştırma modelləri sözləri silerek otomatik olaraq böyük təhsil veri qurmaqlarında təhsil edilmişdir. Biz Japonca cümlələrin sıkışılmasını bənzər bir yolla çalışırıq. Büyük Japonca təhsil verilər qurulması üçün, İngiliz təhsil verilər qurulması üçün Japon dilinin özelliklərinə görə dəyişdirilmişdir. Yapılmış verilən quruluş japonca cümlələr kompressiya modellərini təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilir.', 'bn': 'In English, high-quality sentence compression models by deleting words have been trained on automatically created large training datasets.  আমরা জাপানের শাস্তি সম্পূর্ণ বিষয়ে কাজ করি একই ধরনের প্রতিক্রিয়ায়। বিশাল জাপানী প্রশিক্ষণের ডাটাসেট তৈরি করার জন্য, ইংরেজী প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য তৈরি করার একটি পদ্ধতি জাপানি ভাষার চরিত্র পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক জাপানের বাক্য সম্পূর্ণ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য তৈরি করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': "En anglès, models de compressió de frases d'alta qualitat eliminant paraules han estat entrenats en conjunts de dades d'entrenament automàticament creats. We work on Japanese sentence compression by a similar approach.  Per crear un gran conjunt de dades japonès d'entrenament, un mètode de creació de conjunt de dades d'entrenament anglès es modifica basant-se en les característiques del japonès. El conjunt de dades creat s'utilitza per formar models japonesos de compressió de frases basats en la xarxa neural recurrent.", 'bs': 'Na engleskom jeziku, modeli kompresije visokokvalitetne rečenice izbrisajući riječi obučeni su na automatski stvorenim velikim podacima obuke. Radimo na kompresiji japanske kazne sličnim pristupom. Da bi stvorio veliku japansku obuku podataka, metod stvaranja podataka engleskog obuke se modifikuje na temelju karakteristika japanskog jezika. Stvoren set podataka se koristi za obuku modela kompresije japanske rečenice na temelju ponovne neuralne mreže.', 'et': 'Inglise keeles on kvaliteetseid lausetihendusmudeleid sõnade kustutamise teel koolitatud automaatselt loodud suurte treeningandmekogumitega. Me töötame Jaapani lause tihendamisel sarnase lähenemisviisi abil. Suure jaapani koolitusandmekogumi loomiseks muudetakse inglise keele koolitusandmekogumi loomise meetodit, lähtudes jaapani keele omadustest. Loodud andmekogumit kasutatakse Jaapani lause tihendamise mudelite koolitamiseks, mis põhinevad korduval närvivõrgul.', 'cs': 'V angličtině byly vysoce kvalitní modely komprese vět mazáním slov trénovány na automaticky vytvořených velkých tréninkových datových sadách. Podobným přístupem pracujeme na kompresi japonských vět. Chcete-li vytvořit velký japonský tréninkový datový soubor, metoda vytváření anglického tréninkového datového souboru je upravena na základě charakteristik japonského jazyka. Vytvořená sada dat slouží k tréninku japonských modelů komprese vět založených na recidivní neuronové síti.', 'fi': 'Englanniksi on koulutettu korkealaatuisia lausepakkausmalleja poistamalla sanoja automaattisesti luotuihin suuriin harjoitustietoaineistoihin. Työskentelemme japanilaisten lauseiden pakkaamisessa vastaavalla tavalla. Suuren japanilaisen koulutusaineiston luomiseksi englanninkielistä koulutusaineistoa muokataan japanin kielen ominaisuuksien perusteella. Luodun aineiston avulla harjoitetaan japanilaisia lausekompressiomalleja, jotka perustuvat toistuvaan hermoverkkoon.', 'af': "In Engels, hoë- kwaliteit setkompressie modele deur die uitvee van woorde is opgelei op automaties geskep groot onderwerp datastel. Ons werk op japanse setkompressie deur 'n gelyke toegang. Om 'n groot japanse onderwerp datastel te skep, 'n metode om Engelske onderwerp datastel te skep, word gewysig gebaseer op die karakteristieke van die japanse taal. Die gemaakte datastel is gebruik om japanse setkompressie modele te trein gebaseer op die herhaalde neuralnetwerk.", 'he': 'באנגלית, דוגמני לחיצת משפטים באיכות גבוהה על ידי מחיקת מילים הוכשרו באופן אוטומטי על קבוצות מידע אימונים גדולות. We work on Japanese sentence compression by a similar approach.  To create a large Japanese training dataset, a method of creating English training dataset is modified based on the characteristics of the Japanese language.  קבוצת המידע הנוצרת משתמשת באימון דוגמני דחיסה משפטים יפנים מבוססים על רשת העצבים המחזורת.', 'sk': 'V angleščini so bili visokokakovostni modeli stiskanja stavkov z brisanjem besed usposobljeni na samodejno ustvarjenih velikih naborih podatkov o usposabljanju. Delamo na japonskem stiskanju stavkov s podobnim pristopom. Za ustvarjanje velikega nabora podatkov o japonskem usposabljanju je metoda ustvarjanja nabora podatkov o angleškem usposabljanju spremenjena glede na značilnosti japonskega jezika. Ustvarjen nabor podatkov se uporablja za usposabljanje japonskih modelov kompresije stavkov, ki temeljijo na ponavljajočem se nevronskem omrežju.', 'jv': 'Anyone Awak dhéwé nggo ngeraké kesempresi kapan Jepang Ngubah kang nggawe dataset tukang japun sing, nganggo pertama kang nggawe dataset ingkang dipunahing Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': '@ action: button We work on Japanese sentence compression by a similar approach.  To, in ƙiƙira danna mai girma na tsari na Jamapi, an canza wata hanyoyi na ƙidãya danna muhimmin Ingiriya, a kan an canza a kan karatun sifatinin harshen Jamapi. An yi amfani da tsarin da aka halitta kwamfyutan ya tunkuɗe misãlai ga umarni na Japane a kan zane da zanen tsarin da aka dace.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ། high-quality ཚིག་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པ་ཞིག་ལས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སློབ་གྲྭའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ གསར་འཛུགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་སྤྱད་ནས་ཉེན་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཆ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ལ་སྟོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'English Event Detection With Translated Language Features', 'ar': 'كشف الحدث باللغة الإنجليزية مع ميزات اللغة المترجمة', 'fr': "Détection d'événements en anglais avec fonctionnalités traduites", 'es': 'Detección de eventos en inglés con funciones de idiomas traducidos', 'pt': 'Detecção de eventos em inglês com recursos de idioma traduzidos', 'ja': '翻訳された言語機能を備えた英語イベント検出', 'ru': 'Обнаружение событий на английском языке с функциями переведенного языка', 'zh': '有译语言功能英语事', 'hi': 'अनुवादित भाषा सुविधाओं के साथ अंग्रेज़ी ईवेंट डिटेक्शन', 'ga': 'Brath Imeachtaí Béarla Le Gnéithe Teanga Aistrithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Angol eseményfelismerés fordított nyelvi funkciókkal', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση γεγονότων στα Αγγλικά με χαρακτηριστικά μεταφρασμένης γλώσσας', 'it': 'Rilevamento di eventi in inglese con funzionalità linguistiche tradotte', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тіл қасиеттерімен ақпарат оқиғаларын табуName', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Детектирање на англиски настани со преведени јазични објекти', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ Avvenimenti bl-Ingliż b’Karatteristiċi tal-Lingwi Traduti', 'ms': 'English Event Detection With Translated Language Features', 'ml': 'പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഭാഷ വിശേഷതകളുമായി ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അവസ്ഥ തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mn': 'Англи хэл хөдөлгөөнийг орчуулсан хэл боломжуудыг олох', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie zdarzeń w języku angielskim z funkcjami przetłumaczonego języka', 'no': 'Finn engelsk hendingar med omsette språk- funksjonar', 'ro': 'Detectarea evenimentelor în limba engleză cu caracteristici de limbă tradusă', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje engleskih događaja sa prevedenim jezičkim karakterima', 'sv': 'Engelska händelsedetektering med översatta språkfunktioner', 'so': 'Xafiisyada dhacdooyinka Ingiriiska', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பண்புகளுடன் ஆங்கில நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'si': 'භාෂාව භාෂාව සඳහා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි අවස්ථාව හොයාගන්න', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'English Event Detection With Translated Language Features', 'vi': 'Phát hiện sự kiện bằng tiếng Anh', 'bg': 'Откриване на събития на английски език с преведени езикови функции', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje engleskog događaja sa prevedenim jezičkim karakterima', 'nl': 'Engelse gebeurtenisdetectie met vertaalde taalfuncties', 'ko': '번역 언어 특징이 있는 영어 이벤트 검출', 'da': 'Engelsk hændelsesregistrering med oversatte sprogfunktioner', 'de': 'Englische Ereigniserkennung mit Funktionen der übersetzten Sprache', 'id': 'Deteksi Kejadian Inggris Dengan Features Bahasa Terterjemahan', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن رویداد انگلیسی با ویژگی زبان ترجمه', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe çykyş hasaplanjak Terjime edilen Diller hasaplanjak bilen tapylma', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Tukio la Kiingereza kwa Tafsiri za Lugha', 'sq': 'Detektimi i ngjarjeve angleze me funksione gjuhësh të përkthyera', 'hy': 'Անգլերենի իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերումը թարգմանված լեզվի հատկություններով', 'am': 'የንግሊዝኛ ጉዳይ ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje engleskog događaja sa prevedenim jezičkim karakterima', 'az': 'Tərcümlənmiş dil özellikləri ilə İngiliz Vaqiyyəti keşif', 'cs': 'Detekce událostí v angličtině s přeloženými jazykovými funkcemi', 'et': 'Inglise sündmuste tuvastamine koos tõlgitud keele funktsioonidega', 'bn': 'অনুবাদ করা ভাষা বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে ইংরেজি ইভেন্ট সনাক্ত', 'fi': 'Englanninkielinen tapahtumantunnistus käännetyillä kieliominaisuuksilla', 'ca': "Detecció d'eventos en anglès amb característiques de llenguatge traducit", 'jv': 'Perkarahan Inggris Perkarahan kang dibutuhke tresnaning', 'he': 'גילוי אירועים באנגלית עם תכונות שפה מתרגמות', 'ha': 'English Event Detection With Translated Language Features', 'sk': 'Angleščina Zaznavanje dogodkov s prevedenimi jezikovnimi značilnostmi', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འབྱུང་སྟངས་རྙེད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཁྱད་པར་'}
{'en': 'We propose novel radical features from automatic translation for event extraction. Event detection is a complex language processing task for which it is expensive to collect training data, making generalisation challenging. We derive meaningful subword features from automatic translations into target language. Results suggest this method is particularly useful when using languages with writing systems that facilitate easy decomposition into subword features, e.g., logograms and Cangjie. The best result combines logogram features from Chinese and Japanese with syllable features from Korean, providing an additional 3.0 points f-score when added to state-of-the-art generalisation features on the TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget task.', 'ar': 'نقترح ميزات جذرية جديدة من الترجمة الآلية لاستخراج الحدث. يعد اكتشاف الأحداث مهمة معالجة لغوية معقدة يكون من خلالها جمع بيانات التدريب أمرًا مكلفًا ، مما يجعل التعميم أمرًا صعبًا. نحن نستمد ميزات كلمات فرعية ذات مغزى من الترجمات التلقائية إلى اللغة الهدف. تشير النتائج إلى أن هذه الطريقة مفيدة بشكل خاص عند استخدام اللغات مع أنظمة الكتابة التي تسهل التحليل السهل إلى ميزات الكلمات الفرعية ، على سبيل المثال ، Logograms و Cangjie. تجمع أفضل نتيجة بين ميزات تسجيل الدخول من الصينية واليابانية مع ميزات مقطع لفظي من اللغة الكورية ، مما يوفر 3.0 نقاط f-Score إضافية عند إضافتها إلى أحدث ميزات التعميم في مهمة TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'fr': "Nous proposons de nouvelles fonctionnalités radicales allant de la traduction automatique pour l'extraction d'événements. La détection d'événements est une tâche complexe de traitement linguistique pour laquelle la collecte de données de formation est coûteuse, ce qui rend la généralisation difficile. Nous déduisons des fonctionnalités de sous-mots significatives à partir de traductions automatiques dans la langue cible. Les résultats suggèrent que cette méthode est particulièrement utile lors de l'utilisation de langages avec des systèmes d'écriture qui facilitent la décomposition en caractéristiques de sous-mots, par exemple, les logogrammes et le cangjie. Le meilleur résultat combine les caractéristiques du logogramme chinois et japonais avec des caractéristiques syllabiques coréennes, fournissant un score f supplémentaire de 3,0 points lorsqu'il est ajouté aux fonctionnalités de généralisation de pointe de la tâche Pépite d'événement TAC KBP 2015.", 'es': 'Proponemos funciones radicales novedosas desde la traducción automática para la extracción de eventos. La detección de eventos es una tarea compleja de procesamiento del lenguaje para la que resulta caro recopilar datos de entrenamiento, lo que dificulta la generalización. Derivamos características significativas de subpalabras a partir de traducciones automáticas al idioma de destino. Los resultados sugieren que este método es particularmente útil cuando se utilizan lenguajes con sistemas de escritura que facilitan la descomposición en características de subpalabras, por ejemplo, logotipos y Cangjie. El mejor resultado combina características de logotipos de chino y japonés con características de sílabas del coreano, lo que proporciona una puntuación f adicional de 3.0 puntos cuando se agrega a las funciones de generalización de última generación en la tarea Event Nugget de TAC KBP 2015.', 'pt': 'Propomos novos recursos radicais de tradução automática para extração de eventos. A detecção de eventos é uma tarefa complexa de processamento de linguagem para a qual é caro coletar dados de treinamento, tornando a generalização um desafio. Derivamos recursos significativos de subpalavras de traduções automáticas para o idioma de destino. Os resultados sugerem que este método é particularmente útil ao usar linguagens com sistemas de escrita que facilitam a fácil decomposição em recursos de subpalavras, por exemplo, logogramas e Cangjie. O melhor resultado combina recursos de logograma de chinês e japonês com recursos de sílabas do coreano, fornecendo uma pontuação f adicional de 3,0 pontos quando adicionados a recursos de generalização de última geração na tarefa TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'zh': '发自事取新颖激进特征。 事检者,杂言处事,故集练数本甚高,故泛化有挑战性。 自言翻译成得子词能。 结果表明当用易解为子词特征(如logogram、Cangjie)书系统语言,其法尤有用。 最佳者合中文及日文徽标特徵及韩文音节特征,在TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget务入最先进泛化功能,供额外3.0分f分数。', 'ja': 'イベント抽出のための自動翻訳から斬新なラジカル機能を提案します。イベント検出は、トレーニングデータを収集するのに費用がかかる複雑な言語処理タスクであり、一般化を困難にします。自動翻訳からターゲット言語に意味のあるサブワード機能を導き出します。結果は、この方法は、サブワード機能、例えばロゴグラムやCangjieへの分解を容易にする書き込みシステムを持つ言語を使用する場合に特に有用であることを示唆しています。最良の結果は、中国語と日本語のロゴグラム機能と韓国語の音節機能を組み合わせ、TAC KBP 2015イベントナゲットタスクの最先端の一般化機能に追加すると、追加の3.0ポイントfスコアを提供します。', 'hi': 'हम घटना निष्कर्षण के लिए स्वचालित अनुवाद से उपन्यास कट्टरपंथी सुविधाओं का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ईवेंट डिटेक्शन एक जटिल भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्य है जिसके लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा एकत्र करना महंगा है, जिससे सामान्यीकरण चुनौतीपूर्ण हो जाता है। हम लक्ष्य भाषा में स्वचालित अनुवाद से सार्थक उपशब्द सुविधाओं को प्राप्त करते हैं। परिणाम बताते हैं कि लेखन प्रणालियों के साथ भाषाओं का उपयोग करते समय यह विधि विशेष रूप से उपयोगी है जो सबवर्ड सुविधाओं में आसान अपघटन की सुविधा प्रदान करती है, उदाहरण के लिए, लॉगोग्राम और कैंगजी। सबसे अच्छा परिणाम कोरियाई से शब्दांश सुविधाओं के साथ चीनी और जापानी से logogram सुविधाओं को जोड़ता है, एक अतिरिक्त 3.0 अंक एफ-स्कोर प्रदान करता है जब टीएसी KBP 2015 इवेंट नगेट कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक सामान्यीकरण सुविधाओं में जोड़ा जाता है।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новые радикальные особенности автоматического перевода для извлечения событий. Обнаружение событий - сложная задача языковой обработки, для которой сбор обучающих данных является дорогостоящим, что затрудняет обобщение. Мы получаем значимые особенности подслова из автоматических переводов на целевой язык. Результаты предполагают, что этот метод особенно полезен при использовании языков с системами письма, которые облегчают легкую декомпозицию на особенности подслова, например, логограммы и Cangjie. Лучший результат сочетает в себе функции логограммы из Китая и Японии с функциями слога из Кореи, обеспечивая дополнительный показатель 3,0 балла при добавлении к современным функциям обобщения в задаче TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'ga': 'Molaimid gnéithe radacacha úra ó aistriúchán uathoibríoch le haghaidh asbhaint imeachtaí. Is tasc próiseála teanga casta é brath imeachtaí a mbíonn sé costasach sonraí oiliúna a bhailiú ina leith, rud a fhágann go bhfuil an ginearálú dúshlánach. Faighimid gnéithe fo-fhocail brí ó aistriúcháin uathoibríocha go sprioctheanga. Tugann torthaí le tuiscint go bhfuil an modh seo thar a bheith úsáideach agus teangacha á n-úsáid le córais scríbhneoireachta a éascaíonn dianscaoileadh go gnéithe fofhocail, m.sh., logeagraim agus Cangjie. Is é an toradh is fearr a chomhcheanglaíonn gnéithe logagram ón tSínis agus ón tSeapáinis le gnéithe siollaí ón gCóiréis, ag soláthar scóir f-scór breise 3.0 pointe nuair a chuirtear le gnéithe ginearálaithe den scoth ar thasc Nugget Imeachta TAC KBP 2015.', 'hu': 'Új radikális funkciókat javasolunk az automatikus fordításból az események kivonásához. Az eseményfelismerés egy összetett nyelvi feldolgozási feladat, amelyhez költséges a képzési adatok gyűjtése, ami kihívást jelent az általánosítás. A célnyelvre történő automatikus fordításokból jelentős alszó funkciókat nyerünk. Az eredmények azt sugallják, hogy ez a módszer különösen hasznos, ha olyan nyelveket használunk, amelyek megkönnyítik az alszó funkciókra történő könnyű lebomlást, pl. logogramokra és Cangjie-re. A legjobb eredmény ötvözi a kínai és japán logogram funkciókat a koreai szótagjellemzőkkel, így további 3,0 pontos f pontszámot biztosít a TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget feladat korszerű általánosítási funkcióihoz.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის პარადიკალური ფუნქციები მოვლენების ექსტრაქციისთვის ავტომატური გადაწყვეტილიდან. მოვლენების განახლება არის კომპლექსი ენის პროცესი რაოდენობა, რომლის შესაძლებელად უკეთესია განახლების მონაცემების კომპლექტირება, რომლის შესაძლებელ ჩვენ ავტომატურად გადაწყვეტილებით მინიშვნელოვანი სუბსიტური ფუნქციები მინიშვნელოვანი ენაში. წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ეს მეტი სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა წარმოდგენება ყველაზე საუკეთესო შედეგი შედეგი ლოგრამის ფუნქციები ჩინეთიდან და იაპონეთიდან შილაბური ფუნქციებით კორეიდან, როცა დამატებული 3.0 ფუნქტის f- score, როცა დამატებულია ტაკის KBP 2015 მოვლენის Nugge', 'it': "Proponiamo nuove caratteristiche radicali dalla traduzione automatica per l'estrazione di eventi. Il rilevamento degli eventi è un compito complesso di elaborazione linguistica per il quale è costoso raccogliere dati di formazione, rendendo difficile la generalizzazione. Otteniamo caratteristiche significative di sottoparola dalle traduzioni automatiche nella lingua di destinazione. I risultati suggeriscono che questo metodo è particolarmente utile quando si utilizzano linguaggi con sistemi di scrittura che facilitano la decomposizione in caratteristiche sottoparole, ad esempio logogrammi e Cangjie. Il risultato migliore combina caratteristiche di logogramma dal cinese e dal giapponese con caratteristiche di sillaba dal coreano, fornendo un punteggio f aggiuntivo di 3,0 punti se aggiunto alle funzionalità di generalizzazione all'avanguardia nell'attività TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.", 'kk': 'Оқиға тарқату үшін автоматты аудармасынан романдық радикалық мүмкіндіктерді ұсынамыз. Оқиғаларды анықтау - жалпы тілді өңдеу тапсырмасы. Оқиғаларды жинау үшін, жалпы тілді өңдеу тапсырмасы. Біз автоматты аудармалардан мақсатты ішкі сөздің мүмкіндіктерін мақсатты тіліне түсіндіреміз. Нәтижелер бұл әдісті жазу жүйелерімен тілдерді қолдану үшін көңіл сөз қасиеттеріне бұл әдісті, мысалы, логограммалар және Cangjie- ге көмектеседі. Ең жақсы нәтижесі Қытай және Японияның логограмма мүмкіндіктерін кореяндағы сөздік мүмкіндіктерімен біріктіреді. ТаC KBP 2015 Оқиға Nugget тапсырмасындағы жалпы күй- жалпы орындау мүмкіндігіне қосылған кезд', 'lt': 'Siūlome naujų radikalių savybių iš automatinio vertimo renginių ekstrahavimui. Įvykių aptikimas yra sudėtinga kalbų apdorojimo užduotis, kuriai brangu rinkti mokymo duomenis ir dėl to apskritai kyla sunkumų. Iš automatinių vertimų į tikslinę kalbą mes gauname reikšmingų požymių. Rezultatai rodo, kad šis metodas yra ypač naudingas naudojant kalbas su rašymo sistemomis, kurios palengvina lengvą suskaidymą į požymius, pvz., logogramas ir Cangjie. The best result combines logogram features from Chinese and Japanese with syllable features from Korean, providing an additional 3.0 points f-score when added to state-of-the-art generalisation features on the TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget task.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нови радикални карактеристики од автоматски превод за екстракција на настани. Детектирањето на настаните е комплексна задача за обработување јазик за која е скапо да се соберат податоци за обука, што ја прави генерализацијата предизвикувачка. Добиваме значајни функции на подзборови од автоматски преводи на јазик на мета. Резултатите покажуваат дека овој метод е особено корисен кога се користат јазици со системи за пишување кои олеснуваат лесно декомпозиционирање во карактеристики на подзборови, на пример лоограми и Cangjie. Најдобар резултат ги комбинира лоограмските карактеристики од кинески и јапонски со силобалните карактеристики од корејски, обезбедувајќи дополнителни 3,0 поени ф-поени кога се додаваат на најновите генерализациски карактеристики на задачата ТаЦ КБП 2015 Event Nugget.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan ciri radikal baru dari terjemahan automatik untuk pengekstrakan peristiwa. Pengesanan peristiwa adalah tugas pemprosesan bahasa kompleks yang mahal untuk mengumpulkan data latihan, menjadikan generalisasi mencabar. Kami menghasilkan ciri-ciri subkata yang bermakna dari terjemahan automatik ke bahasa sasaran. Hasil menyarankan kaedah ini sangat berguna bila menggunakan bahasa dengan sistem tulis yang memudahkan penyahkomposisi mudah ke fitur subkata, cth. logogram dan Cangjie. Hasil terbaik menggabungkan ciri-ciri logogram dari Cina dan Jepun dengan ciri-ciri silabel dari Korea, menyediakan 3.0 titik f-skor tambahan bila ditambah ke ciri-ciri generalisasi state-of-the-art pada tugas TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε νέα ριζοσπαστικά χαρακτηριστικά από την αυτόματη μετάφραση για εξαγωγή γεγονότων. Η ανίχνευση συμβάντων είναι μια πολύπλοκη εργασία επεξεργασίας γλωσσών για την οποία είναι δαπανηρή η συλλογή δεδομένων κατάρτισης, καθιστώντας τη γενίκευση δύσκολη. Παράγουμε σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά υπολέξεων από αυτόματες μεταφράσεις στη γλώσσα-στόχο. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι αυτή η μέθοδος είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμη όταν χρησιμοποιείτε γλώσσες με συστήματα γραφής που διευκολύνουν την εύκολη αποσύνθεση σε χαρακτηριστικά υπολέξεων, π.χ. λογόγραμμα και Καντζί. Το καλύτερο αποτέλεσμα συνδυάζει χαρακτηριστικά λογογραφήματος από τα κινέζικα και τα ιαπωνικά με χαρακτηριστικά συλλαβών από τα κορεάτικα, παρέχοντας μια πρόσθετη βαθμολογία 3.0 σημείων όταν προστίθεται σε χαρακτηριστικά γενικοποίησης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την εργασία Βασικό στοιχείο συμβάντος TAC KBP 2015.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d റേഡിക്കല്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാകുന്നു. അവസ്ഥ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിഷമമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയാണ്. അതിനാല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പി സ്വയം പരിഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയിലേക്ക് അര്\u200dത്ഥമായ സബ്വോര്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കിട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നത് ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകള്\u200d എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നതാണെന്നാണ്. അതിനാ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലം ചൈനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും ജപ്പാനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും ലോഗോഗ്രാമിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. കൊറിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d 3. 0 പോയിന്റ', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu karatteristiċi radikali ġodda mit-traduzzjoni awtomatika għall-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti. L-iskoperta ta’ avvenimenti hija kompitu kumpless ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi li għalih huwa għali li tinġabar dejta ta’ taħriġ, u dan jagħmel il-ġeneralizzazzjoni diffiċli. Aħna nidderivaw karatteristiċi ta’ subkelma sinifikanti minn traduzzjonijiet awtomatiċi fil-lingwa fil-mira. Results suggest this method is particularly useful when using languages with writing systems that facilitate easy decomposition into subword features, e.g., logograms and Cangjie.  L-aħjar riżultat jikkombina karatteristiċi tal-logogramma miċ-Ċiniżi u l-Ġappuniżi ma’ karatteristiċi sillabbli mill-Korea, li jipprovdu punteġġ f addizzjonali ta’ 3.0 punti meta miżjud mal-karatteristiċi ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni l-aktar avvanzati fuq il-kompitu tat-TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår novel radikalle funksjonar frå automatisk oversettelse for hendingar. Oppdaging av hendingar er ein kompleks språkshandsaming av oppgåve som er dyp for å samla opplæringsdata, som gjer generellisering vanskeleg. Vi deriverer meaningfulle underordfunksjonar frå automatiske omsetjingar til målspråk. Resultatet tyder på at denne metoden er spesielt nyttig når språk brukar med skrivesystemet som gjer lett dekomposisjon i underordfunksjonar, f.eks. logogrammer og Cangjie. Den beste resultatet kombinerer logogrammefunksjonar frå kinesisk og japansk med syllabelege funksjonar frå Koreansk, og tilbyr ei ekstra 3,0 punkt f-score når det er lagt til status-of-the-art generaliseringsfunksjonar på TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget oppgåva.', 'mn': 'Бид үйл явдлыг авахын тулд автоматически орчуулалтын шинэ радикал боломжуудыг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Эцэст нь мэдээллийг цуглуулах, ерөнхийлөгчийн шаардлагатай болгох төвөгтэй хэл боловсруулах үйл ажиллагаа юм. Бид автоматаар зориулагдсан хэл руу автоматаар орчуулагддаг суб-үг боловсруулагддаг. Үүний үр дүнд энэ арга нь хэл ашиглах боломжтой гэсэн үг юм. Жишээлбэл, логограмм болон Канджи гэх зэрэг хялбар үг хуваагдах боломжтой. Хамгийн сайн үр дүнд Хятад болон Японы логограммын хувьд Солонгосын илэрхийлэл хэмжээсүүдтэй холбогдож, TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget-ын ажил дээр нэмэлт 3.0 цэг f-score өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe radykalne funkcje z automatycznego tłumaczenia do ekstrakcji zdarzeń. Wykrywanie zdarzeń jest złożonym zadaniem przetwarzania języka, dla którego zbieranie danych treningowych jest kosztowne, co stawia ogólne wyzwanie. Z automatycznych tłumaczeń na język docelowy wywodzimy znaczące cechy podsłów. Wyniki sugerują, że ta metoda jest szczególnie przydatna w przypadku używania języków z systemami pisania, które ułatwiają rozkład na funkcje podsłów, np. logogramy i Cangjie. Najlepszy wynik łączy cechy logogramu z chińskiego i japońskiego z cechami sylaby z koreańskiego, zapewniając dodatkowy wynik 3,0 punktów f po dodaniu do najnowocześniejszych funkcji uogólnienia w zadaniu TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'ro': 'Propunem caracteristici radicale noi din traducerea automată pentru extragerea evenimentelor. Detectarea evenimentelor este o sarcină complexă de procesare a limbajului pentru care este costisitoare colectarea datelor de formare, ceea ce face generalizarea dificilă. Provinem caracteristici semnificative ale subcuvintelor din traducerile automate în limba țintă. Rezultatele sugerează că această metodă este deosebit de utilă atunci când se utilizează limbi cu sisteme de scriere care facilitează descompunerea ușoară în caracteristici subcuvinte, de exemplu logograme și Cangjie. Cel mai bun rezultat combină caracteristicile logogramei din chineză și japoneză cu caracteristicile silabei din coreeană, oferind un scor f suplimentar de 3,0 puncte atunci când este adăugat la caracteristicile de generalizare de ultimă generație în activitatea TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novim radikalnim karakteristikama iz automatskog prevoda za izvlačenje događaja. Otkrivanje događaja je kompleksan zadatak obrađivanja jezika za koji je skup prikupljanje podataka o obuci, čineći generalizaciju izazovnim. Izvodimo značajne podrečne karakteristike iz automatskih prevoda na ciljni jezik. Rezultati sugeriraju da je ova metoda posebno korisna kada se koristi jezika sa pisaćim sistemima koji olakšavaju lako rasključenje u podrečne funkcije, npr. logograme i Cangjie. Najbolji rezultat kombinira logogramske karakteristike kineskog i japanskog sa silabelnim karakteristikama iz Korejske, pružajući dodatni 3,0 bodova f-rezultata kada se doda na opštine generalizacije države umjetnosti na zadatku TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාන්ත වාර්ථාවික විශේෂයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත වාර්ථාවික විශේෂය ප අවස්ථාව හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණ කාර්යයක්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සංගුණු කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂාවෙන් තේරුම් විශේෂය සබ්වභාෂාවක් අව ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතියෙන් මේ විධානය විශේෂයෙන් භාෂාව භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිපත්තේ චීනි සහ ජාපානි වලින් ලොග්\u200dරාම් අවශ්\u200dයතාවය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කෝරියාන් වලින් සිල්ලබ් අවශ්\u200dයතාවය සමග, තව 3.0 පින්තුවක් f', 'so': 'We propose novel radical features from automatic translation for event extraction.  Dhacdooyinka la ogaado waa shaqo baaraandegista luuqada adag, taas oo aad ugu qaali tahay in lagu soo ururiyo macluumaadka waxbarashada, taasoo ka sameynaya dhibaatooyin la soo saaro. Waxaynu ka helaynaa faahfaahin faa’iido ah oo hoos-hadal ah oo ka jeeda turjumidda iskaa-maamulka oo luuqada goalka ah. Midabkan waxaa loola jeedaa inay si gaar ah u faa’iido leedahay marka lagu isticmaalo luuqadaha qoraalka oo ku habboon nidaam fudud oo u fududeeya kooxooyinka hoosword, tusaale ahaan logograms iyo Cangjie. Midhaha ugu wanaagsan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qoraalo ka mid ah Shiino iyo Jabanees, waxayna ka helaan kooxo kale oo Korean ka mid ah 3.0 poeng f-score marka lagu daray xaaladda farshaxanka oo ku qoran shaqooyinka dhacdooyinka ee TAC KBP 2015.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår nya radikala funktioner från automatisk översättning för händelseutvinning. Händelsemätning är en komplicerad språkbehandlingsuppgift där det är dyrt att samla in utbildningsdata, vilket gör generaliseringen utmanande. Vi härleder meningsfulla underordsfunktioner från automatiska översättningar till målspråk. Resultaten tyder på att denna metod är särskilt användbar när man använder språk med skrivsystem som underlättar enkel nedbrytning till underordsfunktioner, t.ex. logogram och cangjie. Det bästa resultatet kombinerar logogramfunktioner från kinesiska och japanska med stavelsefunktioner från koreanska, vilket ger ytterligare 3,0 poäng f-poäng när det läggs till toppmoderna generaliseringsfunktioner i aktiviteten TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'ta': 'நாம் நிகழ்வு பெறுவதற்கு தானாகவே மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் இருந்து புதிய ஆரம்ப பண்புகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோ நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பது ஒரு சிக்கலான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் செயல் தானியங்கி மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளில் இருந்து அர்த்தமான உச்சொல்லின் குணங்களை இலக்கு மொழிக்கு கொண்டு முடிவு சிறந்த முடிவு சீனா மற்றும் ஜப்பானியிலிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களை சேர்க்கும், கொரியாவிலிருந்து கூடுதல் 3. 0 புள்ளிகள் f- மதிப்புகளை கூட்டும் TAC KBP 2015 செயல்', 'ur': 'ہم نئی راڈیکل ویٹیوں کو ایڈیٹ اخراج کے لئے اتمام ترجمہ سے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ حادثہ شناسایی ایک پیچیدہ زبان پردازی کا کام ہے جس کے لئے تدریس دیٹے جمع کرنے کے لئے بہت گران ہے، جرانیل سازی کا مشکل بنانے کے لئے۔ ہم نے اپنا مطلوب سوبرویڈ فوئٹوں کو موجود زبان کی ترجمہ سے پیدا کیا ہے۔ نتیجے اس طریقہ کو معلوم کرتے ہیں کہ اس طریقہ کا مفید ہے جب لکھنے سیسٹم کے ساتھ زبانوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو سابٹ ورڈ کے فرضیوں میں آسان طریقہ ڈھونڈ کرتی ہیں، جیسے لوگوگرم اور کانگجی. The best result combines logogram features from Chinese and Japanese with syllable features from Korean, providing an additional 3.0 points f-score when added to state-of-the-art generalisation features on the TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget task.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Hodisani aniqlash - murakkab tilni boshqarish vazifasi, u uchun taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni olish qiymati juda qiymat. Biz avtomatik tarjimalar tildan foydalanadigan tub soʻzning xususiyatlariga ega. @ info: whatsthis Bu eng yaxshi natijasi, Xitoycha va Yaponchadan foydalanuvchilarni Koreyschadan qo'shish mumkin. Bu tashkilotni TAC KBP 2015 uchun shaxsiy generalisation xususiyatlarini qoʻshishda 3.0 point f scorga qoʻshish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị những tính năng cơ bản mới từ phiên dịch tự động cho các sự kiện. Việc khám phá sự kiện là một nhiệm vụ xử lý ngôn ngữ phức tạp mà rất tốn kém khi thu thập dữ liệu về huấn luyện, làm cho việc phát triển rộng thách thức. Chúng tôi nhận thấy tính chất chữ phụ có ý nghĩa từ việc dịch sang ngôn ngữ đích. Kết quả cho thấy phương pháp này đặc biệt hữu dụng khi sử dụng các ngôn ngữ có hệ thống viết để dễ dàng phân hủy thành các tính năng con chữ phụ, ví dụ như logo và Cangjie. Kết quả tốt nhất là kết hợp các tính năng đăng nhập từ Trung Quốc và Nhật với các tính năng âm tiết từ Hàn Quốc, cung cấp thêm 3.0 điểm điểm điểm điểm điểm điểm điểm F khi được thêm vào các tính năng tổng quát nghệ thuật to àn diện về các tác phẩm đỉnh cao về tập đoàn của TAC KBP 205 diễn biến Nugget.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår nye radikale funktioner fra automatisk oversættelse til begivenhedsudvinding. Registrering af hændelser er en kompleks sprogbehandlingsopgave, hvor det er dyrt at indsamle træningsdata, hvilket gør generaliseringen udfordrende. Vi udleder meningsfulde underordsfunktioner fra automatiske oversættelser til målsprog. Resultaterne tyder på, at denne metode er særligt nyttig, når du bruger sprog med skrivesystemer, der letter nem nedbrydning i underordsfunktioner, f.eks. logogrammer og Cangjie. Det bedste resultat kombinerer logogramfunktioner fra kinesisk og japansk med stavelsesfunktioner fra koreansk, hvilket giver yderligere 3,0 point f-score, når det føjes til state-of-the-art generaliseringsfunktioner på TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget-opgaven.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нови радикални характеристики от автоматичен превод за извличане на събития. Откриването на събития е сложна задача за обработка на езика, за която е скъпо събирането на данни за обучение, което прави обобщението трудно. Ние извличаме смислени функции на поддума от автоматични преводи на целевия език. Резултатите показват, че този метод е особено полезен при използване на езици със системи за писане, които улесняват лесно разграждане на поддуми, например логограми и кангджи. Най-добрият резултат съчетава логограмни функции от китайски и японски с срички от корейски, осигурявайки допълнителен резултат от 3,0 точки, когато се добавят към най-съвременните функции за обобщаване на задачата за събитие 2015.', 'nl': 'We stellen nieuwe radicale functies voor van automatische vertaling voor gebeurtenisextractie. Gebeurtenisdetectie is een complexe taalverwerkingstaak waarvoor het duur is om trainingsgegevens te verzamelen, waardoor generalisering uitdagend is. We leiden betekenisvolle subwoordfuncties af van automatische vertalingen naar doeltaal. De resultaten suggereren dat deze methode vooral nuttig is bij het gebruik van talen met schrijfsystemen die eenvoudige decompositie vergemakkelijken in subwoordfuncties, zoals logogrammen en Cangjie. Het beste resultaat combineert logogramfuncties uit het Chinees en Japans met lettergrepen uit het Koreaans, waardoor een extra 3.0 punten f-score wordt toegevoegd aan state-of-the-art generalisatiefuncties voor de TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget-taak.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novim radikalnim karakteristikama iz automatskog prevoda za izvlačenje događaja. Otkrivanje događaja je složen zadatak obrađivanja jezika za kojeg je skup prikupiti podatke o obuci, čineći opće izazov. Nalazimo značajne podriječje karakteristike iz automatskih prevoda na ciljni jezik. Rezultati sugeriraju da je ova metoda posebno korisna kada se koristi jezika sa pisaćim sustavima koji olakšavaju lako rasključenje u podriječje funkcije, npr. logograme i Cangjie. Najbolji rezultat kombinira logogramske karakteristike kineskog i japanskog sa slobodnim karakteristikama iz Korejske, pružajući dodatni 3,0 bodova f-rezultata kada se doda na općenite karakteristike države umjetnosti na zadatku TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen neue radikale Funktionen aus der automatischen Übersetzung für die Ereignisextraktion vor. Die Ereigniserkennung ist eine komplexe Sprachverarbeitungsaufgabe, bei der es teuer ist, Trainingsdaten zu sammeln, was die Verallgemeinerung schwierig macht. Aus automatischen Übersetzungen in die Zielsprache leiten wir aussagekräftige Unterwortmerkmale ab. Die Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass diese Methode besonders nützlich ist, wenn Sprachen mit Schreibsystemen verwendet werden, die eine einfache Zerlegung in Unterwortfunktionen ermöglichen, z.B. Logogramme und Cangjie. Das beste Ergebnis kombiniert Logogrammmerkmale aus dem Chinesischen und Japanischen mit Silbenmerkmalen aus dem Koreanischen und bietet eine zusätzliche 3,0-Punkte-f-Punktzahl, wenn sie den modernen Generalisierungsfunktionen für die TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget-Aufgabe hinzugefügt werden.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza taswira za riwaya za msisimko kutoka katika tafsiri ya kujitegemea kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa tukio. Kugundua matukio ni jukumu la upasuaji wa lugha tata ambalo ni ghali kwa kukusanya data za mafunzo, na kufanya changamoto za uzalendo. Tunatoa sifa za maneno yenye maana kutoka tafsiri za kujitegemea katika lugha ya lengo. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii ina manufaa hasa pale kutumia lugha kwa kuandika kwa mfumo wa kuandika unaosaidia kupungua kwa urahisi katika vipindi vya maneno, kwa mfano, logograms na Cangjie. Matokeo bora zaidi inaunganisha picha za logogramu kutoka Kichina na Kijapani ikiwa na vipande vinavyoonyesha kutoka Korea, na kutoa vitu zaidi 3.0 kwa kipindi ambacho kinaongeza kwenye hali ya uzalishaji wa sanaa katika kazi ya TAC KBP 2015 ya Nugget.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan karakteristik radikal baru dari terjemahan otomatis untuk ekstraksi peristiwa. Deteksi peristiwa adalah tugas proses bahasa kompleks yang mahal untuk mengumpulkan data pelatihan, membuat generalisasi menantang. We derive meaningful subword features from automatic translations into target language.  Hasil menunjukkan metode ini sangat berguna ketika menggunakan bahasa dengan sistem menulis yang memudahkan dekomposisi mudah ke fitur subword, misalnya logogram dan Cangjie. Hasil terbaik menggabungkan fitur logogram dari Cina dan Jepang dengan fitur syllable dari Korea, menyediakan 3,0 poin f-skor tambahan ketika ditambah ke fitur generalisasi state-of-the-art pada tugas TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'tr': "Vaqialary açmak üçin romanlary awtomatik terjime edip teklip edýäris. Vatikalar tanyşdyrmak üçin karmaşık dil işleýän işidir. Bu üçin okuwçy maglumatlary toplamak üçin gadyr. Biz öz terjimeden maksady sözler özelliklerinden maksady sözler çykarýarys. Netijenler bu ýoly ýazma sistemleri bilen ýe ňil sözlerniň üýtgewlerine aňsat boşandyrmak üçin ullanyşyny maslahat berýär. myselm logogramlar we Cangjie. Iň gowy netijede Çinçe we Ýaponiýanyň görkezilişi köreçeden logogram karakterleri bilen birleştirir. 2015-nji ýyldan çykyş noktalary TAC KBP'de olar nugget täblisasynda ýene-de bir 3.0 punkt f-score ekleýär.", 'ko': '우리는 이벤트 추출에 사용할 새로운 급진적인 특징을 자동 번역에서 제시했다.이벤트 검출은 복잡한 언어 처리 임무로 훈련 데이터를 수집하는 비용이 높기 때문에 범화는 도전적이다.우리는 목표 언어의 자동 번역에서 의미 있는 자사 특징을 얻는다.그 결과 하위 단어로 쉽게 분해되는 특징이 있는 쓰기 시스템의 언어를 사용할 때 logogram과 Cangjie와 같은 방법이 특히 유용하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.가장 좋은 결과는 중국어와 일본어의 logogram 특징과 한글의 음절 특징을 결합시켜 2015년 TACKBP 사건 발굴 임무에서 가장 선진적인 개괄적 특징에 추가하면 추가 3.0점 f점수를 얻을 수 있다.', 'af': "Ons voorstel novele radikale funksies van outomatiese vertaling vir gebeurtenis uitvoer. @ info Ons verkry betekende subwoord funksies van outomatiese vertalings na doel taal. @ info Die beste resultaat kombinieer logogram funksies van Sjinese en Japanese met syllable funksies van Koreaanse, verskaf 'n addisionele 3. 0 punte f- score wanneer bygevoeg na state- of- the- art generalisasie funksies op die TAC Kb 2015 Event Nugget taak.", 'am': 'We propose novel radical features from automatic translation for event extraction.  የሁኔታ ግለጫ የቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ስራ ነው፡፡ አዋቂዎች የደብዳቤ ቃላት ግንኙነቶችን ከአስማታዊ ትርጉም ወደ ተቃውሞ ቋንቋ እናገኛለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ ምሳሌ በተለየ ቋንቋዎች በጽሑፍ ስርዓቶች የተጠቃሚ ክፍተት ማግኘት የሚያስፈልጋቸው ይችላል፤ ለምሳሌ logograms እና Cangjie ከቻይና እና ጃፓንኛ የተባለው የጦማሪያን ምርጫዎች ከቆሮሚያ በተጨማሪው የ3.0 ነጥቦች f-score ሲጨመር በTAC KBP 2015 ጉዳይ ላይ የልዩ አርእስት ግንኙነት ላይ በተጨመረ ጊዜ የተጨማሪውን ደረጃ ማቀናቀል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz yeni radikalı xüsusiyyətləri təbliğ edirik. Vaqialar keşfetməsi kompleks dil işləməsi işidir ki, təhsil məlumatlarını toplamaq və generalizasyon çətinliklərini çəkmək üçün xərcləyir. Biz öz-özündən məqsəd dilinə anlamlı sözlərin əlamətlərini alırıq. Sonuçlar bu metodu, yazma sistemləri ilə dillərin istifadəsində çox asanlıqla çəkilməsi üçün faydalı olaraq istifadə edirlər. Ən yaxşı sonuç Çincə və Japonca ilə Koreyadan silahlı xüsusiyyətlər ilə logogram xüsusiyyətləri birləşdirir, TAC KBP 2015 Vaqiyat Nugget işinə əlavə edildiyi zaman art ıq 3.0 puç f-score verir.', 'fa': 'ما ویژگی\u200cهای رادیکال نویسی را از ترجمه\u200cهای خودکار برای اخراج رویداد پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. کشف حادثه یک کار پردازش زبان پیچیده است که برای آن پول داده های آموزش گرون است، باعث مشکل سازی عمومی است. ما ویژگی\u200cهای زیر کلمه معنی را از ترجمه\u200cهای خودکار به زبان هدف می\u200cگیریم. نتیجه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که این روش مخصوصاً در زمان استفاده از زبانها با سیستم نوشتن که آسان جدا کردن به ویژه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cها، مثال logograms و Cangjie است. بهترین نتیجه، ویژگی\u200cهای لوگوگرم از چینی و ژاپنی با ویژگی\u200cهای کلابی از کره\u200cای ترکیب می\u200cکند، وقتی افزودن به ویژگی\u200cهای عمومی\u200cسازی ایالت-of-the-art در وظیفه\u200cی TAC KBP ۲۰۱۵، نقطه f-score اضافه می\u200cکند.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novim radikalnim karakteristikama iz automatskog prevoda za izvlačenje događaja. Otkrivanje događaja je kompleksan zadatak obrađivanja jezika za koji je skup prikupljanje podataka obuke, čineći generalizaciju izazovnim. Nalazimo značajne podriječne karakteristike iz automatskih prevoda na ciljni jezik. Rezultati sugeriraju da je ova metoda posebno korisna kada se koristi jezika sa pisaćim sustavima koji olakšavaju lako rasključenje u podriječne funkcije, npr. logograme i Cangjie. Najbolji rezultat kombinira logogramske karakteristike iz kineskog i japanskog sa silabelnim karakteristikama iz Koreje, pružajući dodatni 3,0 bodova f-rezultata kada se doda na općenite karakteristike države umjetnosti na zadatku TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë karakteristika radikale të reja nga përkthimi automatik për nxjerrjen e ngjarjeve. Gjetja e ngjarjeve është një detyrë komplekse e procesimit të gjuhës për të cilën është e shtrenjtë të mbledhësh të dhënat e trajnimit, duke bërë gjeneralizimin sfidues. Ne nxjerrim karakteristika të kuptueshme nënfjalësh nga përkthimet automatike në gjuhën e objektivit. Rezultatet sugjerojnë se ky metodë është veçanërisht i dobishëm kur përdoret gjuhë me sisteme shkrimi që lehtësojnë shpërndarjen e lehtë në karakteristikat e nënfjalëve, për shembull logograma dhe Cangjie. Rezultati më i mirë kombinon karakteristikat e logogramit nga kinezët dhe japonezët me karakteristikat e sillabilit nga koreanët, duke ofruar një pikë shtesë 3.0 pikë f kur shtohet në karakteristikat e gjeneralizimit më të lartë në detyrën TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nové radikální funkce z automatického překladu pro extrakci událostí. Detekce událostí je složitý úkol zpracování jazyka, pro který je nákladné shromažďovat údaje o tréninku, což znamená náročnou generalizaci. Z automatických překladů do cílového jazyka odvozujeme smysluplné funkce podslov. Výsledky naznačují, že tato metoda je obzvláště užitečná při použití jazyků se systémy psaní, které usnadňují snadnou dekompozici do podslovních funkcí, např. logogramů a Cangjie. Nejlepší výsledek kombinuje logogramové prvky z čínštiny a japonštiny se slabikami z korejštiny, což poskytuje další 3,0 body f-skóre, pokud je přidáno k nejmodernějším zobecněním funkcím úlohy TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'hy': "Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ռադիկալ առանձնահատկություններ' ավտոմատիկ թարգմանությունից իրադարձությունների վերացման համար: Պատահարների հայտնաբերումը բարդ լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիր է, որի համար թանկ է հավաքել ուսուցման տվյալներ, դարձնելով ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընթացքը դժվար: Մենք ստանում ենք իմաստալից ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկություններ ավտոմատիկ թարգմանություններից դեպի նպատակային լեզու: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մեթոդը հատկապես օգտակար է գրողական համակարգերի լեզուների օգտագործման համար, որոնք հեշտությամբ բաժանեն բառերի առանձնահատկություններ, օրինակ լոգոգրամեր և Կանգյու: Ամենալավ արդյունքը միավորում է չինական և ճապոնացի լոգոգրամային հատկությունները կորեացի խմբավոր հատկությունների հետ, ապահովում է 3.0 միավոր f-գնահատականներ, երբ դրանք ավելացվում են լավագույն ընդհանուր հատկություններին, որոնք տեղի են ունենում 2015 թվականի ԹԱԿ ԿԲՊ-", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uusia radikaaleja ominaisuuksia automaattisesta käännöksestä tapahtumien purkamiseen. Tapahtumantunnistus on monimutkainen kielinkäsittelytehtävä, johon koulutustietojen kerääminen on kallista, mikä tekee yleistämisestä haastavaa. Johdamme merkityksellisiä alasanaominaisuuksia automaattisista käännöksistä kohdekielelle. Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että tämä menetelmä on erityisen hyödyllinen käytettäessä kieliä, joissa on kirjoitusjärjestelmiä, jotka helpottavat hajoamista alasanaominaisuuksiin, kuten logogrammeihin ja Cangjieen. Paras tulos yhdistää kiinan ja japanin logogrammion ominaisuudet korealaiseen tavuun ja tuottaa 3,0 pisteen f-pisteen lisättynä TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget -tehtävän viimeisimpiin yleistysominaisuuksiin.', 'bn': 'আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনুবাদের জন্য নোভেল রেডিয়াল বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রস্তাব করি। ইভেন্ট আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে একটি জটিল ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ যার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য সংগ্রহ করার জন্য দাম, জেনারেলালেশন চ্য আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় অনুবাদ থেকে লক্ষ্য ভাষায় অর্থহীন সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদান করি। ফলাফল পরামর্শ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে এই পদ্ধতি বিশেষ করে ব্যবহার করে যখন লেখা সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করা হয়, যা সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মধ্যে সহজে ডিকমোপসেশন সহজ সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল চীনা এবং জাপানী থেকে লোগোগ্রামের বৈশিষ্ট্যের সংযুক্ত করে কোরিয়া থেকে প্রতীক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়ে আরো ৩.', 'ca': "Proposem noves característiques radicales de traducció automàtica per a l'extracció d'eventos. La detecció d'events és una tasca complex a de processament de llenguatges per la qual és cara recollir dades d'entrenament, fent que la generalització sigui difícil. Deriven característiques significatives de subparaules de traduccions automàtiques al llenguatge d'objectiu. Els resultats suggereixen que aquest mètode és particularment útil quan utilitzen llengües amb sistemes d'escriptura que faciliten la descomposició fàcil en característiques de subparaules, per exemple, logogrames i Cangjie. El millor resultat combina característiques de logograma xinès i japonès amb característiques sílables coreanes, proporcionant una puntuació f adicional de 3,0 punts quan s'afegeixen a les característiques de generalització més avançada de la tasca TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.", 'et': 'Pakume sündmuste ekstraheerimiseks automaatse tõlke uudseid radikaalseid funktsioone. Sündmuste tuvastamine on keeruline keeletöötlusülesanne, mille jaoks koolitusandmete kogumine on kallis, muutes üldistamise keeruliseks. Tuletame tähenduslikud alamsõna omadused automaatse tõlke sihtkeelde. Tulemused näitavad, et see meetod on eriti kasulik keelte kasutamisel kirjutamissüsteemidega, mis hõlbustavad hõlpsat lagunemist alamsõna funktsioonideks, nt logogrammideks ja Cangjieks. Parim tulemus ühendab hiina ja jaapani logogrammi funktsioonid korea silpifunktsioonidega, mis annavad TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget ülesande tipptasemel üldistamisfunktsioonidele täiendava 3,0 punkti f-skoori.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nove radikalne lastnosti avtomatskega prevoda za ekstrakcijo dogodkov. Zaznavanje dogodkov je zapletena naloga jezikovne obdelave, za katero je zbiranje podatkov o usposabljanju drago, zaradi česar je generalizacija zahtevna. Pomembne podbesede izpeljemo iz avtomatskih prevodov v ciljni jezik. Rezultati kažejo, da je ta metoda še posebej uporabna pri uporabi jezikov s sistemi pisanja, ki omogočajo enostavno razgradnjo v podbesedne funkcije, npr. logogrami in Cangjie. Najboljši rezultat združuje logogramske značilnosti iz kitajske in japonske ter zlogne značilnosti iz korejske, kar zagotavlja dodatno 3,0 točke f-rezultata, ko se doda najsodobnejšim funkcijam posploševanja v opravilu TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget.', 'jv': 'Monday Where am I Awak dhéwé éntuk perintah sing dikangkapan kelas nang terjamahan bangsa Pametuné suggeruju akeh method iki dadi nggambar luwih apik kanggo nggambar idiomat karo sistem sing paling nggawe layar neng akeh popularan surat kanggo meh dadi apakno, isih. log ogram lan Canggie. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Tune goyyade masu shiryuwa na sauran da radical daga translation farat ɗaya wa masu zartar da shirin ayuka. Ana gane wa ɗabi'a, shi ne wani aikin mai aiki mai adadi na harshen, don haka kuma ana fi kyauta a samo data na amfani da shi, kuma ya sanya masu gauraya a cikin shirin ayuka. Tuna sami fassarar-magana masu inganci daga fassarar-farat farat ɗaya zuwa harshen goa. Results suggest this method is particularly useful when using languages with writing systems that facilitate easy decomposition into subword features, e.g., logograms and Cangjie.  Babu mafi kyaun fassara yana haɗa logogram masu tsari daga China da Jabaniya, da masu fassara masu inganci daga Koriya, yana samar da wata 3.0 points f-score idan an ƙara zuwa state-of-art-the-art feature on the TAC KBP 2015 Miskin Nuguet.", 'he': "אנחנו מציעים תכונות רדיקליות חדשות מהתרגום אוטומטי לחלץ אירועים. גילוי אירועים הוא משימה מעבדת שפת מורכבת שבה יקר לאסוף נתוני אימון, מה שעושה את הגנרליזציה מאתגרת. אנחנו משיגים תכונות מתחת למילים משמעותיות מתרגמות אוטומטיות לשפה המטרה. התוצאות מציעות ששיטה זו שימושית במיוחד כשמשתמשות בשפות עם מערכות כתיבה שמקלות על פירוק קל לתוכניות מתמילים, למשל לוגוגרמים וקאנג'י. התוצאה הטובה ביותר משלבת תכונות לוגוגרם מסינים ויפנים עם תכונות סילובלים מקוריאנים, מספקת 3.0 נקודות f נוספות כשהווספת למתכונות הגנרליזציה המאוחרות במשימת האירועים TAC KBP 2015.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ཕྱིར་འདྲེན་པར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་སྟངས་དག་བསམ་བྱེད། བྱུང་ལས་གནད་དོན་རྟོགས་ནི་སྐད་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལས་ཀ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡ ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚོགས་ཕན་ཐོགས་འདུག Results suggest this method is particularly useful when using languages with writing systems that facilitate easy decomposition into subword features, e.g. logograms and Cangjie. The best result combines logogram features from Chinese and Japanese with syllable features from Korean, providing an additional 3.0 points f-score when added to state-of-the-art generalisation features on the TAC KBP 2015 Event Nugget task.'}
{'en': 'EviNets : Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'ar': 'EviNets: الشبكات العصبية للجمع بين إشارات الأدلة للإجابة على أسئلة Factoid', 'es': 'EVINets: redes neuronales para combinar señales de evidencia para responder preguntas factoides', 'fr': 'Evinets\xa0: réseaux de neurones pour combiner des signaux de preuves pour répondre à des questions factoïdes', 'pt': 'EviNets: Redes Neurais para Combinar Sinais de Evidência para Resposta a Perguntas Fatoides', 'ja': 'EviNets: Factoid Question Answeringのための証拠信号を組み合わせるためのニューラルネットワーク', 'ru': 'EviNets: Нейронные сети для объединения сигналов доказательств для ответа на фактоидные вопросы', 'zh': 'EviNets曰:合证以对神经网络', 'hi': 'EviNets: Factoid प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए साक्ष्य संकेतों के संयोजन के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ga': 'EviNets: Líonraí Néaracha chun Comharthaí Fianaise a Chomhcheangail le Freagraí ar Cheisteanna Factoid', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρικά δίκτυα για τον συνδυασμό σημάτων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων για την απάντηση σε πραγματικές ερωτήσεις', 'hu': 'EviNets: Neurális hálózatok a bizonyíték jelek kombinálására a tényálló kérdések megválaszolásához', 'it': 'EviNets: Reti neurali per combinare segnali di prova per rispondere alle domande fattuali', 'kk': 'Comment', 'lt': 'EviNets: Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'mk': 'EviNets: Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'ms': 'EviNets: Rangkaian Neural untuk Menggabungkan Sinyal Bukti untuk Jawapan soalan Factoid', 'ml': 'EviNets: ഫാക്ടോയിഡ് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'EviNets: Netwerks newrali għall-Kombinazzjoni ta’ Sinjali ta’ Evidenza għat-Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Fattojdi', 'mn': 'EviNets: Фактоид асуулт хариултын баталгаа хамтын мэдрэлийн сүлжээ', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'EviNets: Sieci neuronowe do łączenia sygnałów dowodowych dla odpowiedzi na pytania faktoidowe', 'ro': 'EviNets: Rețele neurale pentru combinarea semnalelor de probă pentru răspunsul la întrebări factoide', 'sr': 'EviNets: Neuralna mreža za kombinaciju dokaza za odgovor na faktoidne pitanja', 'si': 'Comment', 'ta': 'EviNets: கேள்வி பதில்', 'so': 'EviNets: Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'sv': 'EviNets: Neurala nätverk för att kombinera bevissignaler för faktainsvar', 'ur': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đường dẫn: Mạng thần kinh để kết hợp các tín hiệu bằng chứng về các câu hỏi.', 'uz': 'Comment', 'hr': 'EviNets: Neuralna mreža za kombinaciju dokaza za odgovor na pitanje Factoida', 'bg': 'Неврални мрежи за комбиниране на доказателства за отговор на фактоидни въпроси', 'da': 'EviNets: Neurale netværk til at kombinere bevissignaler til faktisk spørgsmål besvarelse', 'nl': 'EviNets: Neurale Netwerken voor het combineren van bewijssignalen voor het beantwoorden van factoïde vragen', 'ko': 'EviNets: 증거 신호를 조합하여 인자식 문답을 하는 신경 네트워크', 'de': 'EviNets: Neuronale Netzwerke zur Kombination von Evidenzsignalen für faktoide Fragestellungen', 'id': 'EviNets: Networks Neural for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'EviNets: Mtandao wa Neural kwa ajili ya Kuunganisha Signaa za Uthibitisho kwa ajili ya kujibu swali la Factoid', 'tr': 'EviNets: Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering', 'sq': 'EviNets: Rrjete neuronale për kombinimin e sinjaleve të provave për përgjigjen e pyetjeve faktoide', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረብ', 'hy': 'Եվինեթ. Ֆատոյդի հարցերի պատասխանի վկայության ազդանշանների համադրման նյարդային ցանցեր', 'bn': 'EviNets: ফ্যাক্টোয়াড প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'EviNets: Neuralna mreža za kombinaciju dokaza za odgovor na pitanje faktoida', 'az': 'EviNet: Faktoid sual cavab vermək üçün dəlillər birləşdirmək üçün nöral ağları', 'ca': 'EviNets: Redes neuronals per combinar signes de prova per respondre a preguntes de fets', 'et': 'EviNets: Närvivõrgud tõendite signaalide kombineerimiseks faktoidi küsimustele vastamiseks', 'cs': 'EviNets: Neurální sítě pro kombinaci důkazních signálů pro faktoidní odpovědi na otázky', 'fi': 'EviNets: Neuraaliset verkostot todistesignaalien yhdistämiseksi faktoidien kysymyksiin vastaamiseen', 'he': 'EviNets: רשתות עצביות לשילוב סימני ראיות לענות על שאלות פקטואידיות', 'sk': 'EviNets: Nevralne mreže za kombiniranje dokaznih signalov za odgovor na vprašanja faktoida', 'ha': '@ info: tooltip', 'jv': 'KFileDialog', 'bo': 'EviNets: Neural Networks for Combining Evidence Signals for Factoid Question Answering'}
{'en': 'A critical task for question answering is the final answer selection stage, which has to combine multiple signals available about each answer candidate. This paper proposes EviNets : a novel neural network architecture for factoid question answering. EviNets scores candidate answer entities by combining the available supporting evidence, e.g., structured knowledge bases and unstructured text documents. EviNets represents each piece of evidence with a dense embeddings vector, scores their relevance to the question, and aggregates the support for each candidate to predict their final scores. Each of the components is generic and allows plugging in a variety of models for semantic similarity scoring and information aggregation. We demonstrate the effectiveness of EviNets in experiments on the existing TREC QA and WikiMovies benchmarks, and on the new Yahoo ! Answers dataset introduced in this paper. EviNets can be extended to other information types and could facilitate future work on combining evidence signals for joint reasoning in question answering.', 'ar': 'من المهام الحاسمة للإجابة على الأسئلة مرحلة اختيار الإجابة النهائية ، والتي يجب أن تجمع بين الإشارات المتعددة المتاحة حول كل مرشح إجابة. تقترح هذه الورقة EviNets: بنية شبكة عصبية جديدة للإجابة على الأسئلة. تسجل EviNets كيانات إجابات المرشحين من خلال الجمع بين الأدلة الداعمة المتاحة ، على سبيل المثال ، قواعد المعرفة المنظمة والمستندات النصية غير المهيكلة. تمثل EviNets كل قطعة من الأدلة مع ناقل حفلات زفاف كثيف ، وتسجيل مدى ملاءمتها للسؤال ، وتجمع الدعم لكل مرشح للتنبؤ بنتائجهم النهائية. كل مكون عام ويسمح بتوصيل مجموعة متنوعة من النماذج لتسجيل نقاط التشابه الدلالي وتجميع المعلومات. نبرهن على فعالية EviNets في التجارب على معايير TREC QA و WikiMovies الحالية ، وعلى Yahoo! تم تقديم مجموعة بيانات الإجابات في هذه الورقة. يمكن أن تمتد EviNets إلى أنواع أخرى من المعلومات ويمكن أن تسهل العمل المستقبلي على دمج إشارات الأدلة من أجل التفكير المشترك في الإجابة على السؤال.', 'fr': "Une tâche essentielle pour répondre aux questions est l'étape finale de sélection de la réponse, qui doit combiner plusieurs signaux disponibles pour chaque candidat à la réponse. Cet article propose Evinets\xa0: une nouvelle architecture de réseau neuronal pour répondre à des questions factuelles. Evinets note les entités de réponse des candidats en combinant les preuves disponibles, par exemple des bases de connaissances structurées et des documents texte non structurés. Evinets représente chaque élément de preuve avec un vecteur d'intégration dense, note leur pertinence par rapport à la question et agrège le support pour chaque candidat afin de prédire ses scores finaux. Chacun des composants est générique et permet d'intégrer une variété de modèles pour la notation de similarité sémantique et l'agrégation d'informations. Nous démontrons l'efficacité d'Evinets dans le cadre d'expériences sur les benchmarks TREC QA et WikiMovies existants, ainsi que sur le nouveau système Yahoo\xa0! Jeu de données de réponses présenté dans cet article. Evinets peut être étendu à d'autres types d'informations et pourrait faciliter les travaux futurs sur la combinaison de signaux de preuves pour un raisonnement conjoint dans la réponse aux questions.", 'pt': 'Uma tarefa crítica para responder a perguntas é o estágio final de seleção de respostas, que deve combinar vários sinais disponíveis sobre cada candidato a resposta. Este artigo propõe EviNets: uma nova arquitetura de rede neural para resposta a questões factóides. O EviNets pontua as entidades de resposta do candidato combinando as evidências de suporte disponíveis, por exemplo, bases de conhecimento estruturadas e documentos de texto não estruturados. EviNets representa cada evidência com um vetor de embeddings denso, pontua sua relevância para a pergunta e agrega o suporte para cada candidato para prever suas pontuações finais. Cada um dos componentes é genérico e permite conectar uma variedade de modelos para pontuação de similaridade semântica e agregação de informações. Demonstramos a eficácia do EviNets em experimentos nos benchmarks TREC QA e WikiMovies existentes, e no novo Yahoo! Conjunto de dados de respostas introduzido neste artigo. As EviNets podem ser estendidas a outros tipos de informações e podem facilitar trabalhos futuros na combinação de sinais de evidências para raciocínio conjunto na resposta a perguntas.', 'es': 'Una tarea fundamental para responder a las preguntas es la etapa final de selección de la respuesta, que tiene que combinar múltiples señales disponibles sobre cada candidato a la respuesta. Este artículo propone EVINets: una nueva arquitectura de red neuronal para responder preguntas factoides. EVINets califica las entidades de respuesta de los candidatos combinando la evidencia de respaldo disponible, por ejemplo, bases de conocimiento estructuradas y documentos de texto no estructurados. EVINets representa cada pieza de evidencia con un vector de incrustaciones denso, califica su relevancia para la pregunta y agrega el apoyo de cada candidato para predecir sus puntuaciones finales. Cada uno de los componentes es genérico y permite conectar una variedad de modelos para la puntuación de similitud semántica y la agregación de información. Demostramos la eficacia de eViNeTS en experimentos sobre los puntos de referencia existentes de TREC QA y WikiMovies, y en el nuevo Yahoo! Conjunto de datos de respuestas presentado en este documento. EVINets se puede extender a otros tipos de información y podría facilitar el trabajo futuro en la combinación de señales de evidencia para el razonamiento conjunto en la respuesta a preguntas.', 'ja': '質問に答えるための重要なタスクは、各回答候補者について利用可能な複数のシグナルを組み合わせなければならない最終的な回答選択段階です。 EviNets ：事実に基づく質問に答えるための新規のニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを提案した。 EviNetsは、構造化された知識ベースや非構造化文書など、利用可能な裏付けとなるエビデンスを組み合わせることにより、候補者の回答エンティティをスコアリングします。 EviNetsは、濃密な埋め込みベクトルで各証拠を表し、質問への関連性をスコア化し、各候補者の最終スコアを予測するためのサポートを集約します。 各コンポーネントは一般的であり、意味的類似性スコアリングと情報集約のためのさまざまなモデルを差し込むことができます。 既存のTREC QAおよびWikiMoviesベンチマーク、および新しいYahoo! 本稿で紹介した回答データセット. EviNetsは、他の情報タイプに拡張することができ、問題の回答における共同推論のための証拠信号の組み合わせに関する将来の作業を容易にすることができます。', 'ru': 'Критической задачей для ответа на вопрос является этап окончательного выбора ответа, который должен объединить несколько сигналов, доступных о каждом кандидате на ответ. В этой статье предлагается EviNets: новая архитектура нейронной сети для ответа на фактические вопросы. EviNets оценивает субъекты-кандидаты на ответы, объединяя доступные подтверждающие доказательства, например, структурированные базы знаний и неструктурированные текстовые документы. EviNets представляет каждую часть доказательств с вектором плотных вложений, оценивает их актуальность для вопроса и агрегирует поддержку для каждого кандидата, чтобы предсказать их окончательные баллы. Каждый из компонентов является общим и позволяет подключать множество моделей для оценки семантического сходства и агрегирования информации. Мы демонстрируем эффективность EviNets в экспериментах по существующим критериям TREC QA и WikiMovies, а также по новому Yahoo! Ответы на набор данных, представленный в настоящем документе. EviNets может быть распространена на другие типы информации и может облегчить будущую работу по объединению сигналов доказательств для совместного ответа на вопрос.', 'zh': '问答的一个要务是终于答案选择阶段,该阶段必须合有每个答案候选人的多可以信号。 本文EviNets:一以实对新型神经网络架构。 EviNets合可用者(如结构化知识库非结构化文档)评分选对案。 EviNets以密嵌向量示一证,评分其相关性,总其选人以测其终分。 每组件通用,许插诸形以语义相似性评分合。 今TREC QA、WikiMovies基准及本文介绍之新Yahoo! Answers数集之实验,证EviNets之有效性。 EviNet可以广信息之类,而可以合信于未来之事。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य अंतिम उत्तर चयन चरण है, जिसे प्रत्येक उत्तर उम्मीदवार के बारे में उपलब्ध कई संकेतों को संयोजित करना पड़ता है। यह पेपर EviNets का प्रस्ताव करता है: factoid प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर। EviNets उपलब्ध सहायक साक्ष्य, उदाहरण के लिए, संरचित ज्ञान आधार और असंरचित पाठ दस्तावेजों के संयोजन से उम्मीदवार उत्तर संस्थाओं को स्कोर करता है। EviNets एक घने एम्बेडिंग वेक्टर के साथ सबूत के प्रत्येक टुकड़े का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, प्रश्न के लिए उनकी प्रासंगिकता स्कोर करता है, और प्रत्येक उम्मीदवार के लिए अपने अंतिम स्कोर की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए समर्थन एकत्र करता है। घटकों में से प्रत्येक सामान्य है और शब्दार्थ समानता स्कोरिंग और जानकारी एकत्रीकरण के लिए मॉडल की एक किस्म में plugging की अनुमति देता है. हम मौजूदा TREC QA और WikiMovies बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोगों में EviNets की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और इस पेपर में पेश किए गए नए Yahoo! उत्तर डेटासेट पर। EviNets को अन्य जानकारी प्रकारों तक बढ़ाया जा सकता है और प्रश्न उत्तर देने में संयुक्त तर्क के लिए साक्ष्य संकेतों के संयोजन पर भविष्य के काम की सुविधा प्रदान कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tasc ríthábhachtach chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt is ea an chéim dheiridh maidir le roghnú na bhfreagraí, a chaithfidh na comharthaí iolracha atá ar fáil faoi gach iarrthóir freagraí a chomhcheangal. Molann an páipéar seo EviNets: ailtireacht líonra néarúil nua le haghaidh freagra ceisteanna factoid. Scórálann EviNets aonáin fhreagra iarrthóra tríd an bhfianaise tacaíochta atá ar fáil a chomhcheangal, m.sh., bunachair struchtúrtha eolais agus doiciméid téacs neamhstruchtúrtha. Léiríonn EviNets gach píosa fianaise le veicteoir dlúth leabaithe, scórálann sé a n-ábharthacht don cheist, agus comhiomlánaíonn sé an tacaíocht do gach iarrthóir lena scóir deiridh a thuar. Tá gach ceann de na comhpháirteanna cineálach agus ceadaíonn sé éagsúlacht samhlacha a phlugáil isteach le haghaidh scóráil chosúlachta shéimeantach agus comhiomlánú faisnéise. Léirímid éifeachtacht EviNets i dturgnaimh ar thagarmharcanna reatha TREC QA agus WikiMovies, agus ar na Yahoo! Tacar sonraí freagraí tugtha isteach sa pháipéar seo. Is féidir EviNets a leathnú chuig cineálacha eile faisnéise agus d’fhéadfaidís obair amach anseo a éascú ar chomharthaí fianaise a chomhcheangal le haghaidh comhréasúnaithe i bhfreagraí ceisteanna.', 'ka': 'კითხვის შესაძლებლობისთვის კრიტიკური რაოდენობა არის ბოლო პასუხისთვის მონიშნელი ფაეზი, რომელიც უნდა გამოყენება მრავალ სიგნალები, რომელიც ყოველ ეს დაახლოები EviNets- ს პრომენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურა ფაქტოიდის კითხვების გასაგებისთვის. Name Name ყოველ კომპონენტების განსაკუთრებულია და შესაძლებელია სემონტიკური სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად ჩვენ ევმონსტირებთ EviNets-ის ექსპერიმენტებში ექსპერიმენტებში არსებობს TREC QA და WikiMovies ბენქმარკზე, და ახალი Yahoo! ზე! დაახსენება მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში. Name', 'el': 'Ένα κρίσιμο έργο για την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις είναι το τελικό στάδιο επιλογής απάντησης, το οποίο πρέπει να συνδυάσει πολλαπλά σήματα διαθέσιμα για κάθε υποψήφιο απάντησης. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων για την απάντηση πραγματικών ερωτήσεων. Το αξιολογεί τις υποψήφιες οντότητες απάντησης συνδυάζοντας τα διαθέσιμα αποδεικτικά στοιχεία, π.χ. δομημένες βάσεις γνώσεων και μη δομημένα έγγραφα κειμένου. Το αντιπροσωπεύει κάθε στοιχείο με ένα πυκνό διάνυσμα ενσωμάτωσης, βαθμολογεί τη συνάφειά τους με την ερώτηση και συγκεντρώνει την υποστήριξη για κάθε υποψήφιο για να προβλέψει τις τελικές βαθμολογίες του. Κάθε ένα από τα συστατικά είναι γενικό και επιτρέπει τη σύνδεση μιας ποικιλίας μοντέλων για τη σημασιολογική βαθμολογία ομοιότητας και τη συγκέντρωση πληροφοριών. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα των σε πειράματα στα υπάρχοντα κριτήρια αξιολόγησης και αξιολόγησης καθώς και στο νέο Yahoo! Σύνολο δεδομένων απαντήσεων που εισήχθησαν στην παρούσα εργασία. Τα EviNets μπορούν να επεκταθούν σε άλλους τύπους πληροφοριών και θα μπορούσαν να διευκολύνουν τη μελλοντική εργασία για τον συνδυασμό σημάτων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων για την κοινή συλλογιστική των ερωτήσεων.', 'hu': 'A kérdések megválaszolásának kulcsfontosságú feladata a végső válaszkiválasztási szakasz, amelynek több jelet kell kombinálnia az egyes válaszjelöltekről. Ez a tanulmány az EviNets-et javasolja: egy új neurális hálózati architektúra a tényleges kérdések megválaszolására. Az EviNets a rendelkezésre álló alátámasztó bizonyítékok, például strukturált tudásbázisok és strukturálatlan szöveges dokumentumok kombinálásával értékeli a jelölt válaszokat. Az EviNets minden bizonyítékot sűrű beágyazási vektorral képvisel, pontszámozza relevanciájukat a kérdéshez, és összesíti az egyes jelöltek támogatását a végső pontszámok előrejelzéséhez. Mindegyik összetevő általános, és lehetővé teszi a különböző modellek beépítését a szemantikai hasonlósági pontszámok és az információösszesítés érdekében. Bemutatjuk az EviNets hatékonyságát a meglévő TREC QA és WikiMovies referenciaértékeken, valamint az új Yahoo! A tanulmányban bemutatott válaszok adatkészlet. Az EviNets kiterjeszthető más információtípusokra is, és megkönnyítheti a bizonyítékok jelzéseinek kombinálására irányuló jövőbeli munkát a kérdéses válaszok közös érvelése érdekében.', 'it': "Un compito fondamentale per la risposta alle domande è la fase finale di selezione delle risposte, che deve combinare più segnali disponibili su ogni candidato di risposta. Questo articolo propone EviNets: una nuova architettura di rete neurale per rispondere effettivamente alle domande. EviNets valuta le entità di risposta candidate combinando le prove di supporto disponibili, ad esempio basi di conoscenza strutturate e documenti di testo non strutturati. EviNets rappresenta ogni elemento di prova con un denso vettore di incorporazioni, segna la loro rilevanza per la domanda e aggrega il supporto per ogni candidato per prevedere i propri punteggi finali. Ciascuno dei componenti è generico e consente di collegare una varietà di modelli per il punteggio semantico della somiglianza e l'aggregazione delle informazioni. Dimostriamo l'efficacia di EviNets negli esperimenti sui benchmark TREC QA e WikiMovies esistenti, e sul nuovo Yahoo! Data set di risposte introdotto in questo documento. EviNets può essere esteso ad altri tipi di informazioni e potrebbe facilitare il lavoro futuro sulla combinazione di segnali di prova per il ragionamento congiunto in questione.", 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру үшін маңызды тапсырма - соңғы жауап таңдау кезегі. Бұл әрбір жауап кандидаты туралы бірнеше сигналды біріктіру керек. Бұл қағаз EviNets- ді жауап беру үшін романдық невралдық желінің архитектурасын ұсынады. Name EviNets әрбір бөлігін тұрақтық ендіру векторында көрсетеді, сұрақтың маңыздылығын көрсетеді, әрбір кандидаттың соңғы нәрселерін таңдау үшін қолдауын жинақтайды. Әрбір компоненттер жалпы және semantic ұқсас сәйкестіктерді және мәлімет сәйкестіктерді қосуға мүмкіндік береді. Мынау TREC QA және WikiMovie бағдарламаларында, жаңа Yahoo! туралы эксперименттерінде EviNets әсер етілігін көрсетедік. Бұл қағазда ендірілген жауап деректер жиыны. EviNet басқа мәлімет түрлеріне кеңейтуі мүмкін жұмыс істеуге болашақ жұмыс істеуге болады. Сұрақ жауап беру үшін біріктірілген мәлімет сигналдарын біріктіруге бол', 'lt': 'Svarbi užduotis atsakyti į klausimus yra galutinis atsakymų atrankos etapas, kuriame turi būti derinami keli turimi signalai apie kiekvieną kandidatą į atsakymą. Šiame dokumente siūloma „EviNets“: nauja neurologinio tinklo architektūra, skirta atsakyti į faktinius klausimus. EviNets vertina kandidatų atsakymo subjektus derinant turimus patvirtinamuosius įrodymus, pvz., struktūrizuotas žinių bazes ir nesustruktūrizuotus teksto dokumentus. EviNets pateikia kiekvieną įrodymų rinkinį su tankiu įterpimo vektoriumi, įvertina jų svarbą klausimui ir apibendrina paramą kiekvienam kandidatui prognozuoti savo galutinius rezultatus. Kiekviena sudedamoji dalis yra generinė ir leidžia įjungti įvairius modelius semantiniam panašumo vertinimui ir informacijos suvestinei. Mes parodome EviNets veiksmingumą eksperimentuojant esamus TREC QA ir WikiMovies lyginamuosius rodiklius bei naujus Yahoo! Answers dataset introduced in this paper.  EviNets gali būti išplėsta ir apimti kitas informacijos rūšis, o ateityje galėtų būti lengviau derinti įrodymų signalus, kad būtų galima bendrai pagrįsti atsakymą į klausimą.', 'mk': 'Критична задача за одговор на прашањата е финалната фаза за избор на одговорот, која мора да комбинира повеќе сигнали достапни за секој кандидат за одговор. Овој весник предложува EviNets: нова архитектура на нервната мрежа за одговори на фактоидни прашања. EviNets ги оценува кандидатските ентитети за одговор преку комбинација на достапните поддржувачки докази, на пример, структурирани бази на знаење и неструктурирани текстови документи. EviNets го претставува секој доказ со густ вектор за вложување, ја оценува нивната релевантност на прашањето и ја агрегира поддршката за секој кандидат да ги предвиде нивните последни оценки. Секој од компонентите е генеричен и овозможува поврзување на различни модели за семантичка оценка на сличност и агрегација на информации. Ја демонстрираме ефикасноста на EviNets во експериментите на постојните референтни значки TREC QA и WikiMovies, и на новиот Yahoo! Answers dataset introduced in this paper.  EviNets може да се прошири на други видови информации и може да ја олесни идната работа за комбинација на сигнали на докази за заедничко размислување на одговорот на прашањето.', 'ms': 'Tugas kritik untuk menjawab soalan adalah tahap pemilihan jawapan terakhir, yang mesti menggabungkan isyarat berbilang yang tersedia mengenai setiap calon jawapan. Kertas ini mencadangkan EviNets: arkitektur rangkaian saraf baru untuk menjawab soalan faktoid. EviNets skor entiti jawapan calon dengan menggabungkan bukti sokongan yang ada, cth., dasar pengetahuan struktur dan dokumen teks tidak struktur. EviNets mewakili setiap bukti dengan vektor penyembedding yang padat, mencetak relevansi mereka kepada soalan, dan menyempurnakan sokongan bagi setiap calon untuk meramalkan skor akhir mereka. Setiap komponen adalah generik dan membolehkan pemalam dalam pelbagai model untuk skor kesempatan semantik dan agregasi maklumat. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan EviNets dalam eksperimen pada nilai referensi TREC QA dan WikiMovies yang ada, dan pada Yahoo yang baru! Answers dataset introduced in this paper.  EviNets boleh diperluaskan kepada jenis maklumat lain dan boleh memudahkan kerja masa depan untuk menyatukan isyarat bukti untuk alasan kongsi dalam menjawab soalan.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലി അവസാന ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേജാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d EviNets: ഫാക്ടോയിഡ് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റാല്\u200d ശൃംഖല ആര്\u200dക്കിട് EviNets scores candidate answer entities by combining the available supporting evidence, e.g., structured knowledge bases and unstructured text documents.  എല്ലാ തെളിവുകളും എവിനെറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ആഴത്തിലുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടത് സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട എല്ലാ ഘടകങ്ങളും സാധാരണമാണ്. സെമാന്റിക് സമമാക്കുന്നതിനും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കുന്നതിനും വ്യക്തമായ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d സംയോജക് നിലവിലുള്ള ട്രെയിസി കിയാവിനെയും വിക്കിമോവിസ് ബെന്\u200dച്ചമാര്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d എവിനെറ്റുകളുടെ പ്രവർത്തിയെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. EviNets മറ്റു വിവരങ്ങളുടെ തരത്തിലേക്ക് വികസിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ്', 'mn': 'Хариултыг хариулах шаардлагатай ажил бол хамгийн сүүлийн хариултын сонголтын шаардлагатай, хариултын удирдагч бүрт олон сигналыг нийлүүлэх шаардлагатай. Энэ цаас EviNets-г санал болгож байна: фактоид асуулт хариулах шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектур. EviNets нь дэмжиж байгаа баримтуудыг нийлүүлж, бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг суурь болон бүтээгдэхүүнгүй текст баримтуудыг нэгтгэдэг. EviNets нь жинхэнэ хэмжээний вектортай баримт бүрийг илэрхийлж, асуултын хамааралтай байдлыг тодорхойлдог, тэдний хамгийн сүүлийн тоонуудыг таамаглах зорилго бүрийн дэмжлэг нийлүүлдэг. Эдгээр компонент бүр ерөнхий хэлбэртэй бөгөөд хэдэн төрлийн төстэй хэлбэрээр мөн мэдээллийн цуглуулалт хийх боломжтой болно. Бид EviNets-ийн үр дүнг TREC QA, WikiMovie багц дээр туршилтуудын үр дүнг харуулж, шинэ Yahoo! дээр харуулж байна. Хариулт өгөгдлийн сангууд энэ цаасан дээр танилцуулсан. EviNets нь бусад мэдээллийн төрлүүд рүү нэмэгдэж болох бөгөөд дараагийн ажиллагааг асуулт хариулах боломжтой ойлголтын шинжлэх ухааны сигналуудыг нэгтгэх боломжтой болгодог.', 'no': 'Eit kritisk oppgåve for svar på spørsmål er det siste utval av svaret, som må kombinere fleire signaler tilgjengelege om kvar svarkandidat. Denne papiret foreslår EviNets: ein novel neuralnettverksarkitektur for å svara på faktoidspørsmål. Name Name Kvar av komponentane er generiske og tillet å leggja inn fleire modeller for semantisk samlingar og informasjonssamlingar. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av EviNets i eksperimentane på eksisterande TREC QA og WikiMovie-benchmarkane, og på den nye Yahoo! Svar- datasett i denne papira. Name', 'ro': 'O sarcină critică pentru răspunsul la întrebări este etapa finală de selectare a răspunsului, care trebuie să combine mai multe semnale disponibile despre fiecare candidat de răspuns. Această lucrare propune EviNets: o arhitectură nouă de rețea neurală pentru răspunsul factoid la întrebări. EviNets punctează entitățile candidate de răspuns prin combinarea dovezilor justificative disponibile, de exemplu baze de cunoștințe structurate și documente text nestructurate. EviNets reprezintă fiecare probă cu un vector dens de încorporări, punctează relevanța lor pentru întrebare și agregă sprijinul fiecărui candidat pentru a-și prezice scorurile finale. Fiecare componentă este generică și permite conectarea unei varietăți de modele pentru punctarea similarității semantice și agregarea informațiilor. Demonstrăm eficacitatea EviNets în experimente pe criteriile de referință TREC QA și WikiMovies existente și pe noul Yahoo! Setul de date pentru răspunsuri introdus în această lucrare. EviNets poate fi extins la alte tipuri de informații și ar putea facilita lucrările viitoare privind combinarea semnalelor dovedite pentru raționamentul comun în ceea ce privește răspunsul la chestiune.', 'pl': 'Kluczowym zadaniem dla odpowiedzi na pytania jest ostateczny etap wyboru odpowiedzi, który musi łączyć wiele sygnałów dostępnych dla każdego kandydata na odpowiedź. W artykule zaproponowano EviNets: nową architekturę sieci neuronowej służącą do faktycznego odpowiedzi na pytania. EviNets ocenia kandydatów odpowiedzi poprzez łączenie dostępnych dowodów, np. zorganizowanych baz wiedzy i nieustrukturyzowanych dokumentów tekstowych. EviNets reprezentuje każdy kawałek dowodu z gęstym wektorem osadzeń, ocenia ich znaczenie dla pytania i gromadzi wsparcie dla każdego kandydata w celu przewidzenia ich ostatecznych wyników. Każdy z komponentów jest ogólny i umożliwia podłączenie różnych modeli oceny podobieństwa semantycznego i agregacji informacji. Efektywność EviNets demonstrujemy w eksperymentach na istniejących standardach TREC QA i WikiMovies oraz na nowym Yahoo! Zestaw danych dotyczących odpowiedzi przedstawiony w niniejszym artykule. EviNety mogą być rozszerzone na inne rodzaje informacji i mogłyby ułatwić przyszłe prace nad łączeniem sygnałów dowodowych dla wspólnego rozumowania odpowiedzi na pytania.', 'mt': 'Kompitu kritiku għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet huwa l-istadju finali tal-għażla tat-tweġibiet, li għandu jikkombina sinjali multipli disponibbli dwar kull kandidat għat-tweġibiet. Dan id-dokument jipproponi EviNets: arkitettura ġdida tan-netwerk newrali għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fattojdi. EviNets tikkoreġi entitajiet kandidati li jwieġbu billi tikkombina l-evidenza ta’ appoġġ disponibbli, pereżempju bażijiet ta’ g ħarfien strutturati u dokumenti tat-test mhux strutturati. EviNets jirrappreżenta kull biċċa ta’ evidenza b’vettur dens ta’ inkorporazzjoni, jikkalkula r-rilevanza tagħhom għall-mistoqsija, u jaggrega l-appoġġ għal kull kandidat biex jipprevedi l-punteġġi finali tagħhom. Each of the components is generic and allows plugging in a variety of models for semantic similarity scoring and information aggregation.  Aħna nuru l-effikaċja tal-EviNets fl-esperimenti dwar il-punti ta’ riferiment TREC QA u WikiMovies eżistenti, u dwar il-Yahoo l-ġdid! It-tweġibiet tas-sett tad-dejta introdott f’dan id-dokument. EviNets tista’ tiġi estiża għal tipi oħra ta’ informazzjoni u tista’ tiffaċilita ħidma futura fuq il-kombinazzjoni ta’ sinjali ta’ evidenza għal raġunament konġunt fir-risposta inkwistjoni.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ වැඩක් තමයි අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තෝරගන්න ස්ථානය, ඒක මේ පැත්තේ EviNets ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා: න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය Name Name හැම අංකයෙක්ම සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් සහ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයෙන් විවිධ මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්ලග් කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න. අපි EviNets ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නම් තියෙන්නේ TREC QA සහ Wiki චිත්\u200dරපටි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සහ අළුත් Yahoo!  ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සෙට් මේ පත්තරේ ඇතුළත් කරනවා. EviNets විසින් අනිත් තොරතුරු වර්ගයකට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්රියා කරන්න සාක්ෂි සංඥාවක්', 'sv': 'En viktig uppgift för att besvara frågor är det slutliga urvalsstadiet, som måste kombinera flera tillgängliga signaler om varje svarskandidat. Denna uppsats föreslår EviNets: en ny neural nätverksarkitektur för faktisk frågeställning. EviNets scorar kandidatsvarsenheter genom att kombinera tillgängliga underlag, t.ex. strukturerade kunskapsbaser och ostrukturerade textdokument. EviNets representerar varje bevis med en tät inbäddningsvektor, poängterar deras relevans för frågan och aggregerar stödet för varje kandidat att förutsäga sina slutliga poäng. Var och en av komponenterna är generiska och gör det möjligt att koppla in en mängd olika modeller för semantisk likhetspoäng och informationsaggregering. Vi demonstrerar EviNets effektivitet i experiment på de befintliga TREC QA- och WikiMovies-riktmärkena och på den nya Yahoo! Datauppsättningen svar introduceras i detta dokument. EviNets kan utvidgas till att omfatta andra informationstyper och skulle kunna underlätta framtida arbete med att kombinera evidenssignaler för gemensamt resonemang i fråga svar.', 'sr': 'Kritični zadatak za odgovor na pitanje je konačna faza izbora odgovora, koja mora kombinirati višestruke signale dostupne za svaki kandidat odgovora. Ovaj papir predlaže EviNets: novu neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu za odgovor na faktoidno pitanje. EviNets rezultira kandidatske odgovorne entitate kombinirajući dostupne podrške dokaze, npr. strukturirane baze znanja i neostrukturirane tekstske dokumente. EviNeti predstavljaju svaki komad dokaza sa gustim vektorom ugrađenja, rezultira njihovu relevantnost na pitanje, i skuplja podršku svakom kandidatu da predvidi njihove konačne rezultate. Svaki komponent je generičan i omogućava priključavanje različitih modela za semantičku sličnost i aggregaciju informacija. Pokazujemo efikasnost EviNeta u eksperimentima o postojećim kriterijama TREC QA i WikiMovie, i o novom Yahoo! Odgovora podataka uvedena u ovom papiru. EviNet se može proširiti na druge vrste informacija i olakšati budući rad na kombinaciji dokaza za zajedničke razumne odgovore na pitanje.', 'so': "Shaqada muhiimka ah ee jawaabta su'aalku waa goobta doorashada ugu dambeeya, kaas oo u baahan in la isku xiro calaamado badan oo ku saabsan kandidada jawaabta. Kanu warqaddan wuxuu soo jeedaa EviNets: xarunta shabakadda neurada ee warqada ah ee ka jawaaba su'aalaha factoid. EviNets wuxuu qiimeeyaa jawaabta kandida ah oo lagu soo ururiyaa calaamadaha taageerada ah, tusaale ahaan aasaaska aqoonta la dhisay iyo dukumentiyada qoraalka. EviNet wuxuu ka mid yahay wax kasta oo caddeyn ah oo ay ku jiraan wado qarsoon oo ay ku xiran yihiin su'aalka, wuxuuna kaloo kordhiyaa kaalmada qof kasta oo mushaar ah si uu ugu dambeeyo u sii sheego scoraha ugu dambeeya. Qeybaha kastaaba waa mid caadi ah islamarkaasna wuxuu sidoo kale ku habboon karaa tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo isbedelka lambarka ah iyo iskuulaadka macluumaadka. Waxaynu muujinnaa waxyaabaha ku saabsan imtixaanka ku jira TREC QA iyo WikiMovies iyo cusub Yahoo! Jawaabtaa kooxda macluumaadka ee warqadan lagu soo qoray. EviNets can be extended to other information types and could facilitate future work on combining evidence signals for joint reasoning in question answering.", 'ta': 'கேள்விக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்படும் செயல் கடைசி விடை தேர்வு நிலையாகும், அது ஒவ்வொரு பதில் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பாளரை பற்றி பல இந்த தாள் EviNets: ஒரு புதிய புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் கட்டுப்பாடு EviNets கிடைக்கும் ஆதரவு ஆதரவு தெளிவுகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் விடை பொருள்களை மதிப்பெடுக்கிறது, உதாரணமாக,  EviNets ஒவ்வொரு ஆதாரங்களின் துண்டும் குறிக்கும் ஒரு ஆழ்ந்த நெறிமுறை வெக்டர் உடன், கேள்வியின் தொடர்பை மதிப்பிடுகிறது, ஒவ்வொரு தேர்வாளருக ஒவ்வொரு பொருளும் பொதுவாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் பாதிப்பு ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் தகவல் பிரித்தலுக்கு பல மாதிரிகளை சொ நாங்கள் தற்போதைய TREC QA மற்றும் விகிசிபிமோ குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் புதிய ய யாஹூ இந்த தாளில் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு பதிலளிக்கிறது. EviNets மற்ற தகவல் வகைகளுக்கு விரிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்ற தகவல் வகைகளுக்கு மேலும் கேள்விக்கு பதில் கூட்டு காரணத்திற்கான', 'ur': 'سوال جواب کے لئے ایک ضروری کام ہے آخری جواب انتخاب سٹیج ہے، جو ہر جواب کاندینٹ کے بارے میں بہت سیگنالوں کو جمع کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. یہ کاغذ EviNets کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے: ایک نور نیورل نیٹ ورک الکتریکٹ کا جواب دینے کے لئے۔ Name EviNets ہر شہادت کے ٹکڑے کو ایک گہرے ایمبڈینگ ویکتور کے ساتھ نمایش دیتا ہے، سوال سے ان کا معاملہ اسکور کرتا ہے، اور ہر کاندینٹ کے مدد کو جمع کرتا ہے کہ اپنی آخری اسکور کو پیش بینی کریں. ہر قسمت کی قسمت معمولی ہے اور سیمانٹی برابری سکونگ اور اطلاعات جمع کرنے کے لئے مختلف موڈلوں میں پگل کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم EviNets کے مطابقت کو نمایش دیتے ہیں TREC QA اور WikiMovies benchmarks پر اور نو یاهو پر! اس کاغذ میں معلوم ہوا ڈیٹ سٹ کا جواب دیتا ہے. EviNets کو دوسرے معلومات کی طرح پھیلایا جا سکتا ہے اور مستقبل جواب دینے کے لئے گواہی سیگنالوں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے آسان کر سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjat EviNets: Faktoid savol javobi uchun novel neyrol tarmoqni yaratuvchi. EviNets scores candidate answer entities by combining the available supporting evidence, e.g., structured knowledge bases and unstructured text documents.  EviNets har bir hujjatning bir qismlarini bir qismdan foydalanadi va savol bilan bog'liqni qo'yish va har bir kandida qoʻllaniladi. @ info Biz mavjud TREC QA va WikiMovies haqida EviNetning effektini ko'rsatdik va yangi Yahoo haqida! Ushbu qogʻozda ishlatilgan maʼlumotlarni javob beradi. @ info", 'vi': 'Một nhiệm vụ quan trọng để trả lời câu hỏi là giai đoạn chọn câu trả lời cuối, mà phải kết hợp ra nhiều tín hiệu sẵn sàng về mỗi ứng cử viên trả lời. Tờ giấy này đề xuất EviNets: một cấu trúc mạng thần kinh mới để giải đáp các câu hỏi Factionless. Bằng cách kết hợp bằng chứng cứ hỗ trợ, ví dụ, cơ sở kiến thức cơ bản cấu trúc và tài liệu văn bản không xây dựng. EviNets đại diện cho mỗi chứng cứ có một véc- tơ nhận sự nhúng vào dày, ghi rõ tầm quan trọng của nó với câu hỏi, và tổng hợp hỗ trợ cho mỗi ứng viên dự đoán điểm số cuối cùng. Mỗi thành phần là chung và cho phép kết nối các mô hình khác nhau để theo dõi nét giống nhau và tổng hợp thông tin. Chúng tôi chứng minh sự hiệu quả của EviNets trong các thí nghiệm về chất lượng TREC kiê_vàWikiLMovie, và trên Yahoo mới! Bộ dữ liệu của kỹ thuật được đưa vào. EviNets có thể được mở rộng với các loại thông tin khác và có thể giúp việc tương lai kết hợp các dấu hiệu bằng chứng cho việc giải quyết chung.', 'da': 'En kritisk opgave for spørgsmålsbesvarelse er den endelige svarudvælgelsesfase, som skal kombinere flere tilgængelige signaler om hver svarkandidat. Denne artikel foreslår EviNets: en ny neural netværksarkitektur til faktisk spørgsmål besvarelse. EviNets scorer kandidatens svar enheder ved at kombinere den tilgængelige dokumentation, f.eks. strukturerede vidensbaser og ustrukturerede tekstdokumenter. EviNets repræsenterer hvert bevis med en tæt indlejringsvektor, scorer deres relevans for spørgsmålet og samler støtten til hver kandidat til at forudsige deres endelige scorer. Hver af komponenterne er generiske og gør det muligt at tilslutte en række forskellige modeller til semantisk lighedsscoring og informationsaggregering. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af EviNets i eksperimenter på de eksisterende TREC QA og WikiMovies benchmarks, og på den nye Yahoo! Datasæt om svar, der er indført i dette dokument. EviNets kan udvides til andre informationstyper og kunne lette det fremtidige arbejde med at kombinere evidenssignaler til fælles ræsonnement i spørgsmålet besvarelse.', 'bg': 'Критична задача за отговор на въпроси е крайният етап на избор на отговор, който трябва да комбинира множество налични сигнали за всеки кандидат за отговор. Настоящата статия предлага нова архитектура на невронната мрежа за фактоиден отговор на въпроси. ЕвиНетс оценява кандидатите за отговор чрез комбиниране на наличните подкрепящи доказателства, например структурирани бази от знания и неструктурирани текстови документи. Представя всяко доказателство с плътен вектор за вграждане, оценява тяхната релевантност към въпроса и обобщава подкрепата за всеки кандидат, за да предскаже крайните си резултати. Всеки един от компонентите е генеричен и позволява включване на различни модели за семантично сходство и обобщаване на информация. Демонстрираме ефективността на ЕвиНетс при експерименти върху съществуващите критерии за качество и Уикифилми, както и върху новия Яху! Данните за отговори, въведени в тази статия. EviNets могат да бъдат разширени към други видове информация и биха могли да улеснят бъдещата работа по комбиниране на доказателствени сигнали за съвместно обосноване на отговорите на въпросите.', 'nl': 'Een cruciale taak voor het beantwoorden van vragen is de laatste antwoordselectiefase, die meerdere beschikbare signalen over elke antwoordkandidaat moet combineren. Dit artikel stelt EviNets voor: een nieuwe neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor factoïde vragen beantwoorden. EviNets scoort kandidaat-antwoordentiteiten door het beschikbare bewijsmateriaal te combineren, zoals gestructureerde kennisdatabases en ongestructureerde tekstdocumenten. EviNets vertegenwoordigt elk bewijsstuk met een dichte embeddingsvector, scoort hun relevantie voor de vraag en aggregeert de steun voor elke kandidaat om hun eindscores te voorspellen. Elk van de componenten is generiek en maakt het mogelijk om een verscheidenheid aan modellen in te pluggen voor semantische vergelijkingsscore en informatie aggregatie. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van EviNets in experimenten op de bestaande TREC QA en WikiMovies benchmarks, en op de nieuwe Yahoo! Antwoorden dataset geïntroduceerd in dit document. EviNets kunnen worden uitgebreid tot andere informatietypen en kunnen toekomstige werkzaamheden vergemakkelijken om bewijssignalen te combineren voor gezamenlijke redenering in vragen te beantwoorden.', 'hr': 'Kritični zadatak za odgovor na pitanje je konačna faza izbora odgovora, koja mora kombinirati višestruke signale dostupne za svaki kandidat odgovora. Ovaj papir predlaže EviNets: novu arhitekturu neurone mreže za odgovor na faktoidno pitanje. EviNets rezultira kandidatskim odgovornim subjektima kombinirajući dostupne podrške dokaze, npr. strukturirane baze znanja i neostrukturirane tekstske dokumente. EviNets predstavlja svaki komad dokaza sa gustim ugrađenim vektorom, rezultira njihovu relevantnost na pitanje i skuplja podršku svakom kandidatu kako bi predvidjela njihove konačne rezultate. Svaki komponent je generičan i omogućava priključavanje različitih modela za semantičku sličnost i aggregaciju informacija. Pokazujemo učinkovitost EviNeta u eksperimentima o postojećim kriterijama TREC QA i WikiMovies, i o novom Yahoo! Odgovora podataka uvedena u ovom papiru. EviNets se može proširiti na druge vrste informacija i olakšati budući rad na kombinaciji dokaza za zajednički odgovor na pitanje.', 'id': 'Tugas kritis untuk menjawab pertanyaan adalah tahap seleksi jawaban akhir, yang harus menggabungkan beberapa sinyal tersedia tentang setiap calon jawaban. Kertas ini mengusulkan EviNets: arsitektur jaringan saraf baru untuk menjawab pertanyaan faktoid. EviNets mencetak nilai entitas jawaban kandidat dengan menggabungkan bukti dukungan yang tersedia, misalnya, dasar pengetahuan strukturasi dan dokumen teks tidak strukturasi. EviNets mewakili setiap bukti dengan vektor embedding padat, mencetak relevansi mereka untuk pertanyaan, dan menyempurnakan dukungan untuk setiap kandidat untuk memprediksi skor akhir mereka. Setiap komponen adalah generik dan memungkinkan plugging dalam berbagai model untuk skor kesempatan semantis dan agregasi informasi. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas EviNets dalam eksperimen pada benchmark TREC QA dan WikiMovies yang ada, dan pada Yahoo yang baru! Jawab set data yang diperkenalkan dalam kertas ini. EviNets can be extended to other information types and could facilitate future work on combining evidence signals for joint reasoning in question answering.', 'fa': 'یک وظیفه مهم برای پاسخ سوال مرحله انتخاب پایانی است که باید چندین سیگنال را در مورد هر کاندیدای پاسخ ترکیب کند. این کاغذ به EviNets پیشنهاد می\u200cکند: یک معماری نور شبکه عصبی برای جواب سوال فکتوید. Name EviNets نشان می\u200cدهد هر قسمت مدرک با یک ویکتور داخل داخل داخل شدن، موافقت آنها را به سؤال می\u200cرساند، و حمایت هر کاندیده را برای پیش بینی کردن امتیاز نهایی خود جمع می\u200cکند. هر قسمت از قسمت\u200cها معمولی است و اجازه می\u200cدهد که در قسمت\u200cهای مختلف مدل\u200cهای مشابه\u200cای و جمع اطلاعات در جستجو\u200cهای شبیه\u200cهای semantic باشد. ما فعالیت EviNets را در آزمایشات روی نقشه\u200cهای TREC QA و WikiMovies موجود نشان می\u200cدهیم، و روی Yahoo جدید! مجموعه داده\u200cهای پاسخ در این کاغذ معرفی شده است. EviNets می\u200cتواند به نوع اطلاعات دیگر گسترش داده شود و می\u200cتواند کار آینده را آسان سازی کند که نشانه\u200cهای مدرک برای مجموعه\u200cهای مشترک در جواب سوال است.', 'de': 'Eine entscheidende Aufgabe für die Beantwortung von Fragen ist die abschließende Antwortauswahlphase, die mehrere verfügbare Signale für jeden Antwortkandidaten kombinieren muss. Dieses Papier schlägt EviNets vor: eine neuartige neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur für faktoide Fragestellungen. EviNets bewertet Kandidaten-Antwortentitäten durch die Kombination der verfügbaren Belege, z.B. strukturierte Wissensbasen und unstrukturierte Textdokumente. EviNets stellt jedes Beweisstück mit einem dichten Einbettungsvektor dar, bewertet ihre Relevanz für die Frage und aggregiert die Unterstützung für jeden Kandidaten, um seine endgültigen Ergebnisse vorherzusagen. Jede der Komponenten ist generisch und ermöglicht die Einbindung einer Vielzahl von Modellen für semantische Ähnlichkeitsbewertung und Informationsaggregation. Wir demonstrieren die Effektivität von EviNets in Experimenten mit den bestehenden TREC QA- und WikiMovies-Benchmarks sowie mit dem neuen Yahoo! In diesem Papier vorgestellter Datensatz der Antworten. EviNets können auf andere Informationstypen erweitert werden und könnten künftige Arbeiten an der Kombination von Evidenzsignalen für gemeinsame Argumentationsantworten erleichtern.', 'ko': '문제 대답의 관건적인 임무는 최종 답안 선택 단계이다. 이 단계는 모든 후보 답안에 대한 여러 개의 사용 가능한 신호를 결합시켜야 한다.본고는 EviNets: 인자식 문답에 사용되는 신형 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시했다.EviNets는 구조화된 지식 라이브러리와 비구조화된 텍스트 문서 등 사용 가능한 지원 증거를 결합시켜 후보 답안 실체를 평가한다.EviNets는 모든 증거를 밀집된 삽입 벡터로 표시하고 문제와 관련성을 평가하며 각 후보에 대한 지지를 모아 최종 점수를 예측한다.모든 구성 요소는 통용되고 다양한 모델을 삽입하여 의미 유사성 평점과 정보 집합에 사용할 수 있다.기존 TREC QA와 Wiki Movies 벤치마크 및 새로운 Yahoo!본고는 답안 데이터 집합을 소개했다.EviNets는 다른 정보 유형으로 확장할 수 있으며, 앞으로 질의응답에서 증거 신호를 결합해 공동 추리를 하는 작업에 도움이 될 것으로 보인다.', 'sw': 'Kazi muhimu kwa jibu la swali ni jukwaa la mwisho la uchaguzi, ambalo linapaswa kuunganisha alama kadhaa zinazopatikana kuhusu mgombea wa jibu. Gazeti hili linapendekeza EviNets: ujenzi wa mtandao wa kijeshi wa kisasa kwa ajili ya kujibu maswali ya kifactoid. EviNets anaonyesha majibu ya wagombea kwa kuunganisha ushahidi unaoendelea kuunga mkono, mfano, msingi wa maarifa na nyaraka za maandishi zilizojengwa. EviNets represents each piece of evidence with a dense embeddings vector, scores their relevance to the question, and aggregates the support for each candidate to predict their final scores.  Kila vifaa ni umuhimu na inaruhusu kuunganisha mifano mbalimbali kwa ajili ya uvunjifu wa kimapenzi na upigaji habari. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa EviNet katika majaribio yanayopo kwenye bendera za TREC QA na WikiMovies, na kwa Yahoo mpya! Jibu seti ya data iliyoonyeshwa katika gazeti hili. EviNet inaweza kupanuka kwenye aina nyingine za taarifa na inaweza kusaidia kazi za baadaye kuhusu kuunganisha ishara za ushahidi kwa kujadili maswali yanayojibu.', 'sq': 'A critical task for question answering is the final answer selection stage, which has to combine multiple signals available about each answer candidate.  Ky dokument propozon EviNets: një arkitekturë e re rrjeti nervor për përgjigjen e pyetjeve faktike. EviNets scores candidate answer entities by combining the available supporting evidence, e.g., structured knowledge bases and unstructured text documents.  EviNets përfaqëson çdo pjesë provash me një vektor të dendur të përfshirjes, shënon rëndësinë e tyre ndaj pyetjes dhe bashkon mbështetjen për çdo kandidat për të parashikuar rezultatet e tyre përfundimtare. Secila prej komponenteve është gjenerike dhe lejon lidhjen në një varietet modelesh për shënimin semantik të ngjashmërisë dhe agregimin e informacionit. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e EviNets-it në eksperimente mbi standartet ekzistuese TREC QA dhe WikiMovies, dhe në Yahoo! Përgjigje të dhënat e paraqitura në këtë letër. EviNets mund të zgjerohet në lloje të tjera informacioni dhe mund të lehtësojë punën e ardhshme mbi kombinimin e sinjaleve të provave për arsyetimin e përbashkët në përgjigje në pyetje.', 'am': 'የጥያቄ መልስ መጨረሻ የመምረጥ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ EviNets: የኖላው የኔትርቨርስቲ መረብ የመሠረታዊ የፋክሮዲ ጥያቄ መልስ ያሳያል፡፡ EviNets የፊደል ቅርጽ አካላትን በመጠቀም የሚችሉትን አካባቢዎች አካባቢዎችን አቀናቅሎታል፡፡ EviNets የሁሉን ምስክር ክፍል በጥልቅ የውጤት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና ፍቃዳቸውን ለጥያቄው እና የመጨረሻው ሁኔታዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን የደጋግሞውን ድጋፍ ያበዛል፡፡ ሁሉም ሰንሰቦች የgeneric ነው እና ለsemantic similarity scoring እና መረጃ ማቀናቀል በተለየ ዓይነቶች ተጨማሪ ያደርጋል፡፡ የአሁኑን TREC QA እና WikiMovies ገጽ ላይ እና አዲስ Yahoo ላይ የኢቪኔተሮችን ውጤት እናሳያልን! በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ያስታወቀውን ዳታ-set ይመልሳል። EviNet በሌላ መረጃ ዓይነቶች ላይ ሊሰፋበት ይችላል እና የመጨረሻውን ሥራ በመቀናኘት ማስረጃ ሲክሎችን በመጠቀም በተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ላይ ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': "Jogap bermek üçin wajyp zady soňky jogaby saýlamak sahypasyna düşürmelidir. Bu howça her cevap kandidatyna barada birnäçe sanat işaretini birleştirmeli. Bu kagyz EviNets'i teklip edip otyrýar: faktoid soragy jogap üçin bir roman näurul şebeke arhitektegi. EviNet üýtgewleriň kandidat jogabaty bar we meňzeş destekleýän kanunlaryň birleşerek, örän strukturlary bilen meýdançalary we struktursyz metin senedlerini birleşdirýär. EviNet'ler her kanıt parçasını yoğun yerleştirme vektörü ile gösterir ve soruyla ilgili önemliliğini gösterir ve son notlarını tahmin etmek için her kandidatın desteğini toplar. Her bölüm generiki we semantik meňzeşliki gollaşdyrmak üçin bir näçe modellere girişdirmek üçin mümkin edýär. Biz EviNets'in etkinliýetini bar TREC QA we WikiMovie deňzindeki deneylerde, we täze Yahoo! barada görkezilýäris Bu kagyzda girdirilen maglumatlary jogap berýär Evinetler başga maglumat türlerine golaýlaşyp biler we gelejekde işi soragda gabat bermek üçin kanlag signallerini birleşdirmek üçin kömek edip biler.", 'af': "'n Kritiske taak vir vraag antwoord is die eindelike antwoord keuse stadium, wat moet veelvuldige seinale beskikbaar kombineer oor elke antwoord kandidate. Hierdie papier stel EviNets voorstel 'n nuwe neuralnetwerk arkitektuur vir faktoide vraag antwoord. Name Name Elke van die komponente is generiek en toelaat inprop in 'n verskillende modele vir semantiese gelykenis skoring en inligting samekoring. Ons wys die effektiviteit van EviNets in eksperimente op die bestaande TREC QA en WikiMovies benchmarke, en op die nuwe Yahoo! Antwoorde datastel ingestel in hierdie papier. Name", 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանելու կարևոր խնդիրը վերջնական պատասխանների ընտրության փուլն է, որը պետք է համադրի բազմաթիվ ազդանշաններ, որոնք հասանելի են յուրաքանչյուր պատասխանի թեկնածու մասին: Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է "Եվինեթս": նոր նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն փակտոիդ հարցերի պատասխանելու համար: Եվինեսը գնահատում է թեկնածուների պատասխանատվությունները՝ համադրելով հասանելի աջակցող ապացույցները, օրինակ, կառուցվածքային գիտելիքների հիմքերը և անկառուցվածքային տեքստի փաստաթղթերը: Եվինեսը ներկայացնում է յուրաքանչյուր ապացույցի կտոր խիստ ներդրման վեկտորով, գնահատում է նրանց կարևորությունը հարցին և համադրում յուրաքանչյուր թեկնածու աջակցությունը իրենց վերջնական գնահատականների կանխատեսելու համար: Այս բաղադրիչներից յուրաքանչյուրը ընդհանուր է և թույլ է տալիս միացնել սեմանտիկ նմանության գնահատման և տեղեկատվության ագրեգացիայի բազմաթիվ մոդելներ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս Էվինետի արդյունավետությունը գոյություն ունեցող ԹՌԵԿ QA-ի և Վիքիֆիլմի հարաբերականների և նոր Yahoo-ի դեպքում: Պատասխանում է այս թղթի մեջ ներկայացված տվյալների համակարգին: Եվինեթը կարող է ընդլայնվել այլ ինֆորմացիայի տեսակներին և կարող է հեշտացնել ապագա աշխատանքը ապացույցների ազդանշանների համադրման համար, որպեսզի այս հարցի ընդհանուր մտածելակերպման պատասխանը լինի:', 'az': "Suğul cavab vermək üçün kritik bir görevi son cavab seçmə sahəsidir. Bu hər cavab kandidatı haqqında çoxlu signalları birləşdirmək lazımdır. Bu kağıt EviNets'i təklif edir: faktoid sual cavab vermək üçün yeni nöral a ğ arhitektarı. EviNet mümkün dəlilləri birləşdirib, müəyyən edilən elm üssələrini və qurulmadığı mətn səhifələrini birləşdirir. EviNet hər bir kanıt parçasını yox inbing vektoru ilə göstərir, suala bağlılıqlarını göstərir, hər kandidatın son nöqtələrini öndərmək üçün dəstəkini toplar. Hər komponent generikdir və semantik simantik similarlığı və məlumat toplaması üçün müxtəlif modellərə bağlanmağa imkan verir. Biz EviNets'in müəyyən edilmiş TREC QA və WikiMovie benchmarklarında və yeni Yahoo! barəsində təcrübələrində etkinlik göstəririk. Bu kağızda daxil edilən verilər qurğuları cavab verir. EviNet digər məlumat növlərinə genişlənir və mütləq cavab vermək üçün dəlil sinyallərini birləşdirə bilər.", 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ হচ্ছে সর্বশেষ উত্তর নির্বাচনের পর্যায়, যা প্রত্যেক উত্তর প্রার্থী সম্পর্কে ব এই পত্রিকাটি EviNets প্রস্তাব করেছে: ফ্যাক্টোইড প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ক্যাক্টারের কাঠাম EviNets প্রার্থীর উত্তর বিষয়বস্তুর স্কোর করে বিদ্যমান প্রমাণ সমর্থিত প্রমাণের সাথে যুক্ত করে, যেমন স্থাপন করা জ্ঞানের বেস এবং আঁ ইভিনেটস প্রত্যেকটি প্রমাণের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছেন গভীর ভেক্টরের সাথে, প্রশ্নের প্রতি তাদের প্রভাব স্কোর করেছেন এবং প্রত্যেক প্রার্থীর সমর প্রত্যেক উপাদান সাধারণ এবং সেম্পেন্টিকের সমতুল্য সংক্রান্ত এবং তথ্য গ্রেফতারের জন্য বিভিন্ন ধরনের মডেলে প্লাগ করতে প আমরা ইভিনেটদের প্রভাব প্রদর্শন করছি বিদ্যমান ট্রিটিসি কিউএ এবং উইকিমোভিজ বেনমার্ক এবং নতুন ইয়াহু! এই কাগজে উপস্থিত ডাটাসেটের উত্তর দেয়। EviNets অন্যান্য তথ্য ধরনের কাছে ব্যাপক করা যাবে এবং প্রশ্নের উত্তরে যোগ দেওয়ার জন্য প্রমাণ সিগন্যাল সম্পর্কে ভবিষ্যতের কাজ', 'ca': "Una tasca crítica per respondre a preguntes és la etapa final de selecció de resposta, que ha de combinar múltiples senyals disponibles sobre cada candidat a resposta. Aquest article proposa EviNets: una nova arquitectura de xarxa neural per respondre a preguntes factoides. EviNets puntualitza les entitats candidates que responen combinant les evidències de suport disponibles, per exemple les bases de coneixements estructurats i els documents de text no estructurats. EviNets representa cada peça d'evidència amb un vector dens d'incorporació, apunta la seva pertinencia a la pregunta i agrega el suport de cada candidat per predir les seves puntuacions finals. Cada un dels components és genèric i permet connectar una varietat de models de puntuació semàntica de similitud i agregació d'informació. We demonstrate the effectiveness of EviNets in experiments on the existing TREC QA and WikiMovies benchmarks, and on the new Yahoo!  Responden al conjunt de dades introduït en aquest article. EviNets es pot estendre a altres tipus d'informació i podria facilitar el futur treball en combinar senyals d'evidència per respondre al raonament conjunt en qüestió.", 'cs': 'Kritickým úkolem pro zodpovězení otázek je konečná fáze výběru odpovědi, která musí kombinovat více signálů dostupných pro každého kandidáta na odpověď. Tento článek navrhuje EviNets: novou architekturu neuronové sítě pro faktické odpovědi na otázky. EviNets hodnotí kandidátské subjekty odpovědí kombinací dostupných podpůrných důkazů, např. strukturovaných znalostních bází a nestrukturovaných textových dokumentů. EviNets představuje každý důkaz s hustým vektorem vložení, hodnotí jejich relevanci pro otázku a agreguje podporu pro každého kandidáta pro předpověď jejich konečného skóre. Každá z komponent je obecná a umožňuje zapojení různých modelů pro skórování sémantické podobnosti a agregaci informací. Účinnost EviNets demonstrujeme v experimentech na stávajících referencích TREC QA a WikiMovies a na novém Yahoo! Soubor odpovědí uvedených v tomto článku. EviNety mohou být rozšířeny na další typy informací a mohou usnadnit budoucí práci na kombinování důkazních signálů pro společné uvažování dotazů.', 'bs': 'Kritični zadatak za odgovor na pitanje je konačna faza izbora odgovora, koja mora kombinirati višestruke signale dostupne za svaki kandidat odgovora. Ovaj papir predlaže EviNets: novu arhitekturu neuronske mreže za odgovor na faktoidno pitanje. EviNets rezultira kandidatske odgovorne entitate kombinirajući dostupne podrške dokaze, npr. strukturirane baze znanja i neostrukturirane tekstske dokumente. EviNets predstavlja svaki komad dokaza sa gustim vektorom ugrađenja, rezultira njihovu relevantnost na pitanje, i skuplja podršku svakom kandidatu da predvidi njihove konačne rezultate. Svaki komponent je generičan i omogućava priključavanje različitih modela za semantičku skupinu sličnosti i aggregaciju informacija. Pokazujemo učinkovitost EviNeta u eksperimentima o postojećim kriterijama TREC QA i WikiMovies, i o novom Yahoo! Odgovora podataka uvedena u ovom papiru. EviNet se može proširiti na druge vrste informacija i olakšati budući rad na kombinaciji dokaza za zajedničke razumne odgovore na pitanje.', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamise kriitiline ülesanne on lõplik vastuse valimise etapp, mis peab ühendama mitu signaali, mis on kättesaadavad iga vastuse kandidaadi kohta. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja EviNets: uus neurovõrgu arhitektuur faktilistele küsimustele vastamiseks. EviNets hindab kandidaadivastuse üksusi, kombineerides olemasolevaid tõendeid, nt struktureeritud teadmistebaase ja struktureerimata tekstidokumente. EviNets esindab iga tõendusmaterjali tiheda manustamise vektoriga, hindab nende asjakohasust küsimusele ja koondab iga kandidaadi toetuse lõplike tulemuste prognoosimiseks. Iga komponent on üldine ja võimaldab ühendada erinevaid mudeleid semantilise sarnasuse hindamiseks ja teabe koondamiseks. Näitame EviNetsi efektiivsust eksperimentides olemasolevate TREC QA ja WikiMovies võrdlusnäitajatega ning uue Yahoo! Käesolevas dokumendis esitatud vastused. EviNetsi saab laiendada teistele teabeliikidele ja see võiks hõlbustada edaspidist tööd tõendite signaalide kombineerimiseks küsimustele vastamiseks ühiseks arutluseks.', 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaamisen kannalta ratkaiseva tehtävä on lopullinen vastausvaihe, jossa on yhdistettävä useita signaaleja jokaisesta vastausehdokkaasta. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan EviNets: uutta neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria faktoidiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen. EviNets pisteyttää hakijavastauskokonaisuudet yhdistämällä saatavilla olevat todisteet, kuten strukturoidut tietopohjat ja strukturoimattomat tekstit. EviNets edustaa jokaista todistusaineistoa tiheällä upotusvektorilla, arvioi niiden merkityksen kysymykseen ja kokoaa kunkin ehdokkaan tuen lopullisten pisteiden ennustamiseksi. Jokainen komponentti on yleinen ja mahdollistaa erilaisten mallien liittämisen semanttisen samankaltaisuuden pisteytystä ja tiedon aggregointia varten. Demonstroimme EviNetsin tehokkuuden kokeiluissa TREC QA- ja WikiMovies-vertailuarvoilla sekä uudella Yahoo! Tässä asiakirjassa esitelty vastausaineisto. EviNets-verkkoja voidaan laajentaa muihin tietotyyppeihin, ja ne voisivat helpottaa tulevaisuudessa tutkimustyötä todistesignaalien yhdistämiseksi yhteiseen päättelyyn vastaamiseksi.', 'sk': 'Ključna naloga za odgovor na vprašanja je končna faza izbire odgovorov, ki mora združiti več razpoložljivih signalov o vsakem kandidatu za odgovor. Ta prispevek predlaga EviNets: nova arhitektura nevronskega omrežja za dejansko odgovarjanje na vprašanja. EviNets ocenjuje subjekte kandidatov za odgovore z združevanjem razpoložljivih dokazov, npr. strukturiranih baz znanja in nestrukturiranih besedilnih dokumentov. EviNets predstavlja vsak dokaz z gostim vektorjem vdelav, ocenjuje njihovo relevantnost za vprašanje in združuje podporo za vsakega kandidata za napovedovanje njihovih končnih rezultatov. Vsaka komponenta je generična in omogoča vključitev različnih modelov za semantično podobnost in združevanje informacij. Učinkovitost EviNets dokazujemo v eksperimentih na obstoječih referenčnih merilih TREC QA in WikiMovies ter na novem Yahoo! Zbirka podatkov o odgovorih, predstavljenih v tem dokumentu. EviNets je mogoče razširiti na druge vrste informacij in bi lahko olajšali prihodnje delo na področju združevanja dokaznih signalov za skupno obrazložitev odgovorov na vprašanja.', 'ha': "Wani aikin mai muhimu wa mai karɓa wa tambaya yana cikin jujjar zaɓa ta ƙarami, wanda ya kamata ya haɗa wasu saini masu iya amfani da kowane kanana. Wannan takardar da ke bukãtar da EiNets: An sanya tsarin jerin neural na yanzu wa mai karɓa wa tambayar faktoid. @ info: whatsthis EiNets yana wakin duk takardar bayani da ke sami shiryori mai sauri, yana karatun muhimmanci ga tambayar, kuma yana ƙarfafa taimakon kõwane kandidan ya yi bayani ga score na ƙarshen. Kila ƙanshin yana da jeni kuma yana yarda a shigar da wasu misãlai masu daidaita wa semantic kodi da tsohon faɗa ɗawa. Tuna nũna masu aikin EiNets a cikin jarrabo masu gaba ga TREC QA da WikiMovies, kuma kan sãbuwa Yahoou! Yanã karɓa da tsarin da aka shigar da shi cikin wannan takardan. Ana iya faɗaɗa zuwa wasu nau'i na maɓalli, kuma yana iya amfani da aikin bayani na haɗa sain ayukan ayukan ayukan ayukan da aka haɗa wa masu husũma da su tambayi.", 'he': 'משימה קריטית לענות על שאלות היא שלב הבחירה האחרון של תשובה, אשר צריך לשלב סימנים רבים זמינים על כל מועמד לתשובה. העיתון הזה מציע את EviNets: ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית חדשה לענות על שאלות עובדות. EviNets מציג את נקודות התשובה המועמדים על ידי שילוב את הראיות המתמיכות הנוכחות, למשל בסיסי ידע מובנים ומסמכי טקסט לא מובנים. EviNets מייצג כל חתיכת ראיות עם וקטור קישורים צפופים, מצביע את הרלוונטיות שלהם לשאלה, ומאסף את התמיכה לכל מועמד כדי לחזות את התוצאות האחרונות שלהם. כל אחד מהרכיבים הוא גנרלי ומאפשר להכניס מגוון של דוגמנים לדוגמאות סמנטית אנו מראים את היעילות של EviNets בניסויים על נקודות התייחסות של TREC QA ו WikiMovies קיימות, ועל Yahoo החדש! עונות קבוצת נתונים הוציאה בעיתון הזה. EviNets יכול להירחב לסוגים אחרים של מידע ויכול להקל לעבודה עתידית על שילוב אותות ראיות לתשובה משותפת לסיבה על שאלה.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ལན་གསལ་གལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ཆེན་གྱི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གདམ་ཀ་ཤིག་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་EviNets་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཉེན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་། EviNets scores candidate answer entities by combining the available supporting evidence, e.g., structured knowledge bases and unstructured text documents. EviNets represents each piece of evidence with a dense embeddings vector, scores their relevance to the question, and aggregates the support for each candidate to predict their final scores. ཆ་ཤས་རེ་རེར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་སྒྲིག་ཆས་མཐུན་རྣམ་པ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་ཆས། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་TREC QA དང WikiMovie་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་ངལ་འབྲེལ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པ་དང་Yahoo! གསར་པ་གུ་ ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལན་པ ཁོང་ཚོས་ཉེན་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་རིགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་སྲིད་དང་། མ་འོངས་བའ', 'jv': "Una eswi akèh barêng langkung cejang respon sing wis ngganti tanggal nggawe gerakan, sing kudu digowungno plural Perintah sing paling nggawe Ubuntu 12.04 Where's the reference? Sapa sampeyan kelompok ing generic lan supoyo iso disenyong plugin karo model sing sampeyan semanti sampeyan karo akeh informasi Awak dhéwé éntuk efek kanggo Ubuntu nets kanggo ujaran neng bendhurin TRUE lan waki Films, lan nganggo Yahoo! sing uwis ! Nambah data setung dipunangé karo paper iki GNOME"}
{'en': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'ar': 'سكان قاعدة معارف الجيب', 'pt': 'População da Base de Conhecimento de Bolso', 'fr': 'Population de base de connaissances Pocket', 'es': 'Población de base de conocimientos de bolsillo', 'ja': 'ポケットナレッジベースの人口', 'zh': '袖珍知识库人口', 'hi': 'पॉकेट नॉलेज बेस जनसंख्या', 'ru': 'Население базы знаний Pocket Knowledge Base', 'ga': 'Daonra Bonn Eolais Póca', 'hu': 'Pocket Knowledge Base populáció', 'el': 'Πληθυσμός βάσης γνώσεων τσέπης', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Popolazione Pocket Knowledge Base', 'kk': 'Покет білім негізі', 'mk': 'Популација со база на знаење', 'lt': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'ms': 'Populasi Asas Pengetahuan Pocket', 'ml': 'പോക്കറ്റ് അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാന പ്രസംഖ്യ', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн мэдлэг үндсэн хүн', 'mt': 'Popolazzjoni bbażata fuq l-Għarfien tal-Pocket', 'no': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'ro': 'Populația bazei de cunoștințe de buzunar', 'pl': 'Populacja kieszeniowej bazy wiedzy', 'sr': 'Poštanska baza znanja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Dadka aasaasiga ah ee aqoonta qofka', 'sv': 'Population av Pocket Knowledge Base', 'ta': 'போக்கெட் அறிவு அடிப்படை தொகுப்பு', 'ur': 'پوکٹ علم بنیاس جماعت', 'uz': 'Manzili:', 'vi': 'Nhóm tri thức Pocket', 'bg': 'Население от джобната база от знания', 'hr': 'Početna baza znanja', 'de': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'id': 'Populasi Dasar Pengetahuan Pocket', 'da': 'Pocket Knowledge Base-population', 'nl': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'fa': 'جمعیت بنیادی دانش پوکت', 'ko': '휴대용 지식 라이브러리 인구', 'sw': 'Huduma', 'tr': 'Poket Bilgi Etkisi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Popullimi i bazës së njohurive të paketës', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'পকেটের তথ্যের মূল জনসংখ্যা', 'az': 'Pocket Bilim Base Population', 'ca': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population', 'et': 'Tasku teabebaasi populatsioon', 'cs': 'Populace kapesní znalostní báze', 'bs': 'Poštanska baza znanja', 'fi': 'Taskutietokannan populaatio', 'he': 'אוכלוסיה בסיס הידע', 'jv': 'populasi Siji Kemerdekaan Panjenengan', 'sk': 'Populacija žepne baze znanja', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'Pocket Knowledge Base Population'}
{'en': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. We propose Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), the task of dynamically constructing a KB of entities related to a query and finding the best characterization of relationships between entities. We describe novel Open Information Extraction methods which leverage the PKB to find informative trigger words. We evaluate using existing KBP shared-task data as well anew annotations collected for this work. Our methods produce high quality KB from just text with many more entities and relationships than existing KBP systems.', 'ar': 'تستخرج أساليب مجموعة قاعدة المعارف الحالية العلاقات من مخطط علائقي مغلق بتغطية محدودة تؤدي إلى قواعد KB متفرقة. نقترح Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) ، وهي مهمة الإنشاء الديناميكي لـ KB من الكيانات ذات الصلة باستعلام وإيجاد أفضل توصيف للعلاقات بين الكيانات. نصف طرق استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة الجديدة التي تستفيد من PKB للعثور على كلمات تحفيز مفيدة. نقوم بتقييم استخدام بيانات المهام المشتركة الموجودة في KBP بالإضافة إلى التعليقات التوضيحية الجديدة التي تم جمعها لهذا العمل. تنتج أساليبنا قاعدة المعارف عالية الجودة من مجرد نص يحتوي على العديد من الكيانات والعلاقات أكثر من أنظمة KBP الحالية.', 'es': 'Los métodos de población de la base de conocimientos existentes extraen las relaciones de un esquema relacional cerrado con una cobertura limitada que conduce a KB dispersos. Proponemos Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), la tarea de construir dinámicamente una KB de entidades relacionadas con una consulta y encontrar la mejor caracterización de las relaciones entre entidades. Describimos métodos novedosos de extracción de información abierta que aprovechan la PKB para encontrar palabras de activación informativas. Evaluamos el uso de datos de tareas compartidas de KBP existentes, así como nuevas anotaciones recopiladas para este trabajo. Nuestros métodos producen KB de alta calidad a partir de solo texto con muchas más entidades y relaciones que los sistemas KBP existentes.', 'fr': "Base de connaissances existante Les méthodes de population extraient des relations à partir d'un schéma relationnel fermé avec une couverture limitée, ce qui conduit à des Ko épars. Nous proposons Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), la tâche de construire dynamiquement un Ko d'entités liées à une requête et de trouver la meilleure caractérisation des relations entre les entités. Nous décrivons de nouvelles méthodes d'extraction d'informations ouvertes qui exploitent la PKB pour trouver des mots déclencheurs informatifs. Nous évaluons en utilisant les données de tâches partagées KBP existantes ainsi que les nouvelles annotations collectées pour ce travail. Nos méthodes produisent des bases de connaissances de haute qualité à partir de texte contenant beaucoup plus d'entités et de relations que les systèmes KBP existants.", 'pt': 'Os métodos existentes do Knowledge Base Population extraem relações de um esquema relacional fechado com cobertura limitada levando a KBs esparsos. Propomos Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), a tarefa de construir dinamicamente um KB de entidades relacionadas a uma consulta e encontrar a melhor caracterização de relacionamentos entre entidades. Descrevemos novos métodos de extração de informações abertas que aproveitam o PKB para encontrar palavras-chave informativas. Avaliamos usando dados de tarefas compartilhadas KBP existentes, bem como novas anotações coletadas para este trabalho. Nossos métodos produzem KB de alta qualidade a partir de apenas texto com muito mais entidades e relacionamentos do que os sistemas KBP existentes.', 'ja': '既存のナレッジベースの母集団メソッドは、対象範囲が限られている閉じたリレーショナルスキーマから関係を抽出し、まばらなKBにつながります。Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP)は、クエリに関連するエンティティのKBを動的に構築し、エンティティ間の関係の最良の特徴付けを見つけるタスクを提案します。私たちは、PKBを活用して情報的なトリガーワードを見つける新規のオープン情報抽出方法について説明します。既存のKBP共有タスクデータと、この作業のために収集された新しい注釈を使用して評価します。当社のメソッドは、既存のKBPシステムよりも多くのエンティティとリレーションシップを持つテキストから高品質のKBを生成します。', 'zh': '今知识库总取诸闭架构,其覆盖范围有限,以致 KB 疏。 臣等建 Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP),即动与询访相关知识库,并求其最佳者。 述新开信息提取法,当以PKB求信息性触发词。 臣等用见 KBP 共享职数及新注评之。 比之于今 KBP 统,吾法惟多实体、文本生高质量之 KB。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा नॉलेज बेस जनसंख्या विधियाँ सीमित कवरेज के साथ एक बंद संबंधपरक स्कीमा से संबंधों को निकालती हैं जो विरल केबी के लिए अग्रणी होती हैं। हम पॉकेट नॉलेज बेस पॉपुलेशन (PKBP) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो गतिशील रूप से एक क्वेरी से संबंधित संस्थाओं के KB का निर्माण करने और संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधों का सबसे अच्छा लक्षण वर्णन खोजने का कार्य है। हम उपन्यास ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन विधियों का वर्णन करते हैं जो सूचनात्मक ट्रिगर शब्दों को खोजने के लिए पीकेबी का लाभ उठाते हैं। हम मौजूदा KBP साझा-कार्य डेटा के साथ-साथ इस कार्य के लिए एकत्र किए गए नए एनोटेशन का उपयोग करके मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे तरीके मौजूदा KBP सिस्टम की तुलना में कई अधिक संस्थाओं और संबंधों के साथ सिर्फ पाठ से उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले KB का उत्पादन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Методы заполнения существующей базы знаний извлекают отношения из закрытой реляционной схемы с ограниченным охватом, что приводит к редким КБ. Мы предлагаем PKBP (Pocket Knowledge Base Population), задачу динамического построения КБ сущностей, связанных с запросом, и нахождения наилучшей характеристики отношений между сущностями. Мы описываем новые методы извлечения открытой информации, которые используют PKB для поиска информативных триггерных слов. Мы оцениваем, используя существующие данные KBP по общим задачам, а также новые аннотации, собранные для этой работы. Наши методы производят высокое качество KB из простого текста с гораздо большим количеством сущностей и отношений, чем существующие СИСТЕМЫ kbp.', 'ga': 'Bunús Eolais atá ann cheana Baineann modhanna daonra gaolta as scéimre choibhneasta dhúnta le clúdach teoranta as a dtagann KBanna gann. Molaimid Pocket Knowledge Base Daonra (PKBP), a bhfuil sé mar chúram air KB aonáin a bhaineann le ceist a thógáil go dinimiciúil agus an tréithriú is fearr ar chaidrimh idir aonáin a aimsiú. Déanaimid cur síos ar mhodhanna núíosacha Astarraingthe Faisnéise Oscailte a ghiaráil an PKB chun focail spreagtha faisnéiseacha a aimsiú. Déanaimid measúnú ag baint úsáide as sonraí tasc comhroinnte KBP atá ann cheana féin chomh maith le nótaí nua a bhailítear don obair seo. Táirgeann ár modhanna KB ardchaighdeáin ó théacs díreach le i bhfad níos mó eintiteas agus caidreamh ná na córais KBP atá ann cheana féin.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι πληθυσμιακής βάσης εξάγουν σχέσεις από ένα κλειστό σχέδιο σχεσιακών σχέσεων με περιορισμένη κάλυψη που οδηγεί σε σπάνιες KBs. Προτείνουμε το έργο της δυναμικής κατασκευής μιας ΚΒ οντοτήτων που σχετίζονται με ένα ερώτημα και της εύρεσης του καλύτερου χαρακτηρισμού των σχέσεων μεταξύ οντοτήτων. Περιγράφουμε νέες μεθόδους εξαγωγής ανοικτής πληροφορίας που χρησιμοποιούν το PKB για να βρουν πληροφοριακές λέξεις ενεργοποίησης. Αξιολογούμε χρησιμοποιώντας υπάρχοντα δεδομένα κοινής εργασίας καθώς και νέες παρατηρήσεις που συλλέγονται για την εργασία αυτή. Οι μέθοδοι μας παράγουν υψηλής ποιότητας ΚΒ μόνο από κείμενο με πολύ περισσότερες οντότητες και σχέσεις από τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα ΚΒ.', 'hu': 'A meglévő tudásbázis populációs módszerek egy korlátozott lefedettségű zárt relációs sémából vonják ki a kapcsolatokat, amelyek ritka KB-khoz vezetnek. A Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) feladatot javasoljuk, hogy dinamikusan felépítsük a lekérdezéshez kapcsolódó entitások KB-ját és megtaláljuk az entitások közötti kapcsolatok legjobb jellemzését. Olyan új Open Information Extraction módszereket írunk le, amelyek a PKB-t tájékoztató kiváltó szavak megtalálására használják. Kiértékeljük a meglévő KBP megosztott feladatokkal kapcsolatos adatokat, valamint az ehhez a munkához összegyűjtött új megjegyzéseket. Módszereink kiváló minőségű KB-t hoznak létre csupán szövegből, sokkal több entitással és kapcsolattal, mint a meglévő KBP rendszerek.', 'ka': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population Methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. ჩვენ პროგრამ "Pocket Knowledge Base Population" (PKBP), დინამიკურად კობეტის კობეტის კობეტის კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც კითხვის შესახებ და ინტერტიების შესახებ უკეთესი პროგრამიზაცია. ჩვენ პრომენტის გახსნა ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის მეტოვები, რომელიც PKB-ს გამოყენებს ინფორმაციური გახსნა სიტყვები. ჩვენ გავამუშაოთ, რომ KBP shared-task მონაცემების გამოყენება და ახალი მონაცემები, რომლებიც ამ სამუშაოდ შექმნა. ჩვენი მეტოვები უფრო დიდი კოლეტური ტექსტიდან გამოიყენება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ინტერტიკებით და შესახებები, ვიდრე მსგავსი KBP სისტე', 'lt': 'Dabartiniai žinių bazės populiacijos metodai ištraukia santykius iš uždaros santykinės schemos su ribota aprėptimi, dėl kurių mažai KB. Mes siūlome Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), užduotį dinamiškai sukurti KB subjektų, susijusių su klausimu, ir rasti geriausią subjektų santykių apibūdinimą. Aprašome naujus atviros informacijos ekstrahavimo metodus, kurie skatina PKB rasti informacinius įjungimo žodžius. Vertiname naudojant esamus KBP bendrų užduočių duomenis ir naujas šiam darbui surinktas anotacijas. Mūsų metodai gamina aukštos kokybės KB iš tiesiog teksto su daug daugiau subjektų ir ryšių nei esamos KBP sistemos.', 'it': 'I metodi esistenti della Knowledge Base Population estraggono le relazioni da uno schema relazionale chiuso con copertura limitata che porta a KBs scarsi. Proponiamo Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), il compito di costruire dinamicamente una KB di entità relative ad una query e trovare la migliore caratterizzazione delle relazioni tra entità. Descriviamo nuovi metodi di estrazione delle informazioni aperte che sfruttano il PKB per trovare parole trigger informative. Valutiamo utilizzando dati KBP condivisi esistenti e nuove annotazioni raccolte per questo lavoro. I nostri metodi producono KB di alta qualità solo dal testo con molte più entità e relazioni rispetto ai sistemi KBP esistenti.', 'kk': 'Бар білім негізгі Атаулық әдістері жабылған қатынас сұлбасынан шектелген мәліметтің көлемі Кб- тең қатынасын шығару әдістері. Біз Pocket білім негізінде қатынас (PKBP) дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл сұраныс туралы Кб нысандарды динамикалық құру және нысандар арасындағы қатынастардың ең жақсы сипаттамасын табу тапсырмасы. Біз Open Information Extraction әдістерін PKB- ге мәліметті жегуші сөздерді табу үшін таңдаймыз. Бұл жұмыс үшін жинақталған KBP ортақтастырылған тапсырмалар деректерін қолдану және жаңа жазбаларды қолдану үшін бағалаймыз. Біздің әдістеріміз KBP жүйелерінен артық көптеген мәтіннен көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген Кб сапасы жасайды.', 'mk': 'Постојачките методи на популација со база на знаење извлекуваат односи од затворен релативен шем со ограничено покривање што води до мали КБ. Ние предложуваме популација со база на знаење на покет (PKBP), задача да се конструира динамично КБ ентитети поврзани со прашањето и да се најде најдобрата карактеризација на односите помеѓу ентитетите. Опишуваме нови методи за извлекување на отворени информации кои го искористуваат ПКБ за да најдат информативни активни зборови. Ги проценуваме користејќи постојните податоци за поделба на KBP како и нови анотации собрани за оваа работа. Нашите методи произведуваат висок квалитет КБ од само текст со многу повеќе ентитети и врски отколку постојните КБП системи.', 'ms': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs.  Kami cadangkan Populasi Pangkalan Pengetahuan Pocket (PKBP), tugas untuk membina KB entiti secara dinamik berkaitan dengan pertanyaan dan mencari karakterisasi terbaik hubungan antara entiti. Kami menggambarkan kaedah ekstraksi Maklumat Buka yang menggunakan PKB untuk mencari perkataan pemicu maklumat. Kami menilai menggunakan data berkongsi-tugas KBP yang ada serta anotasi baru yang dikumpulkan untuk kerja ini. Kaedah kami menghasilkan KB kualiti tinggi dari teks sahaja dengan lebih banyak entiti dan hubungan daripada sistem KBP yang wujud.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പൊതുക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d കെബികളെ സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി മൂടിയ ബന്ധുക്കളുടെ സ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പോക്കറ്റ് അറിവ് ബേസ് പ്രസംഗിക്കുന്നു (പികെബിപി), ഒരു ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഒരു കെബിയുടെ ജോലി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി പ് നോവല്\u200d തുറന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്റ്റ്രാക്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ് നിലവിലുള്ള കെബിപി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങളും ഈ പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങളും ശേഖരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. Our methods produce high quality KB from just text with many more entities and relationships than existing KBP systems.', 'mt': "Il-metodi eżistenti bbażati fuq l-għarfien Il-popolazzjoni testrezzjona r-relazzjonijiet minn skema relattiva magħluqa b’kopertura limitata li twassal għal KBs baxxi. Aħna nipproponu Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), il-kompitu li jinbena dinamikament KB ta’ entitajiet relatati ma’ mistoqsija u li jinstab l-a ħjar karatterizzazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet bejn l-entitajiet. Aħna niddeskrivu metodi ġodda ta' estrazzjoni ta' Informazzjoni Miftuħa li jagħtu spinta lill-PKB biex isibu kliem ta' attivazzjoni informativa. Aħna jevalwaw bl-użu tad-dejta eżistenti dwar kompiti kondiviżi tal-KBP kif ukoll annotazzjonijiet ġodda miġbura għal dan ix-xogħol. Il-metodi tagħna jipproduċu KB ta’ kwalità għolja minn test sempliċi b’ħafna aktar entitajiet u relazzjonijiet minn sistemi KBP eżistenti.", 'mn': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population Methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. Бид Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) гэх мэт санал өгдөг. Бүтээлүүдийн хоорондын хамгийн сайн харилцааны харилцааны КБ-г бий болгох боломжтой. Бид шинэ нээлттэй мэдээллийн хайлтын арга замыг тайлбарлаж өгдөг. Бид KBP-ийн хуваалтын ажлын өгөгдлийг ашиглаж, энэ ажлын хувьд цуглуулсан шинэ мэдээлэл ашиглаж байдаг. Бидний аргаар KBP системээс илүү олон бүтэц болон харилцааныг бий болгодог.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande kunnskapsbasemetodar for populasjonsbaser ekstraherer relasjonar frå eit lukka relasjonsskjema med begrenset dekning som fører til sparse KBs. Vi foreslår Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), oppgåva for dynamisk konstruksjon av ein KB av einingar som er relatert til eit spørjing og finn den beste karakteriseringa av forhold mellom einingar. Vi beskriver novel Open Information Extraction metodar som leverer PKB for å finna informativ utløysarord. Vi evaluerer med eksisterande KBP- delt- oppgåvedata og nye notasjonar samla for denne arbeida. Metodane våre produserer høg kvalitet KB frå berre tekst med mange fleire einingar og forhold enn eksisterande KBP-systemer.', 'ro': 'Metodele existente de populație din baza de cunoștințe extrag relațiile dintr-o schemă relațională închisă, cu acoperire limitată, care duce la KBs rare. Propunem Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), sarcina de a construi dinamic un KB de entități legate de o interogare și de a găsi cea mai bună caracterizare a relațiilor dintre entități. Descriem metode noi de extragere a informațiilor deschise care utilizează PKB pentru a găsi cuvinte declanșatoare informative. Evaluăm utilizând datele KBP de activitate partajată existente, precum și adnotările noi colectate pentru această lucrare. Metodele noastre produc KB de înaltă calitate doar din text cu mult mai multe entități și relații decât sistemele KBP existente.', 'pl': 'Istniejące metody populacji bazy wiedzy wyodrębniają relacje z zamkniętego schematu relacyjnego o ograniczonym zasięgu prowadzącego do rzadkich KBs. Proponujemy Pocket Base Population (PKBP), zadanie dynamicznego budowania KB podmiotów związanych z zapytaniem oraz znalezienia najlepszej charakterystyki relacji między jednostkami. Opisujemy nowe metody Open Information Extraction, które wykorzystują PKB do znalezienia informacyjnych słów wyzwalających. Oceniamy z wykorzystaniem istniejących danych KBP współdzielonych zadań, jak również kolejnych adnotacji zebranych do tej pracy. Nasze metody tworzą wysokiej jakości KB z tekstu o wiele więcej podmiotów i relacji niż istniejące systemy KBP.', 'sr': 'Postoje metode stanovništva baze znanja izvlače odnose iz zatvorene vezne šeme sa ograničenim pokrivanjem koji vodi do rezervnih KB-a. Predlažemo stanovništvu baze poznavanja Pocket a (PKBP), zadatak dinamički konstruiranja KB entiteta povezanog sa pitanjem i pronalaženjem najboljih karakterizacija odnosa između entitata. Opišemo nove metode izvlačenja otvorene informacije koje utiču na PKB da pronađemo informativne reči okidača. Procjenjujemo korištenje postojećih podataka podataka za dijeljenje KBP-taska kao i novih annotacija prikupljenih za ovaj posao. Naše metode proizvode visoke kvalitete KB iz teksta sa mnogo više entiteta i odnosa od postojećih KBP sustava.', 'si': 'තියෙන්නේ දන්නවත් මූලික ප්\u200dරමාණ විධානයක් වහලා සම්බන්ධ ස්කම්මක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් පිටවෙ අපි පොකෙට් දැනගන්න බේස් ජාතිකය (PKBP), ජාතිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න KB කිරීමක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුව අපි නොවැඩක් විස්තර කරන්නේ විවෘත කරන්න තොරතුරු නික්\u200dරියාණ විධානය, ඒ වගේම PKB විස්තර කරන්න තොරතුරු ප අපි තියෙන්නේ KBP භාවිත කාර්ය දත්ත භාවිතා කරන්න අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්නේ මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් අළුත් අවශ්\u200dයය සහ අපේ විද්\u200dයාවය KB විශේෂතාවක් විතරයි තියෙන්නෙ KBP පද්ධතියට වඩා විතරයි අයිති සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙ', 'so': "Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs.  Waxaan horay u soo jeedaynaa dadka aasaasiga aqoonta ee Pocket (PKBP), shaqada ku sameynaya dhaqdhaqaaq ku saabsan su'aal iyo baaritaanka ugu fiican ee xiriirka labada waxyaabaha dhexdooda. Waxaynu sawiraynaa hababka macluumaadka furan ee ku qoran PKB si aad u hesho hadal macluumaad ah. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa isticmaalka macluumaadka la qaybsan karo oo ku jira KBP iyo ogeysiiska cusub ee shaqadan loo soo ururiyey. Methoyinkayagu waxay ka soo saaraan qoraal kaliya oo kaliya oo ay leeyihiin dad badan iyo xiriir ka badan nidaamka KBP.", 'sv': 'Befintliga kunskapsbaspopulationsmetoder extraherar relationer från ett slutet relationsschema med begränsad täckning som leder till glesa KBs. Vi föreslår Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), uppgiften att dynamiskt konstruera en KB av entiteter relaterade till en fråga och hitta den bästa karaktäriseringen av relationer mellan entiteter. Vi beskriver nya Open Information Extraction metoder som utnyttjar PKB för att hitta informativa triggerord. Vi utvärderar med hjälp av befintliga KBP-delade uppgifter samt nya anteckningar som samlats in för detta arbete. Våra metoder producerar högkvalitativ KB från bara text med många fler entiteter och relationer än befintliga KBP-system.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய அறிவு அடிப்படை தொகுதியின் முறைமையிலிருந்து தொடர்புகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, கேபிகளை சேர்க்கும் மூடிய தொடர்ப நாம் போக்கெட் அறிவு அடிப்படை தொகுதி We describe novel Open Information Extraction methods which leverage the PKB to find informative trigger words.  தற்போதைய கேபிபி பகிர்ந்த பணி தகவல்களையும் இந்த வேலைக்கான புதிய அறிவிப்புகளையும் நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். எங்கள் முறைமைகள் கேபிபி அமைப்புகளை விட இருக்கும் மேலும் உரையிலிருந்து உயர்தரமான KB உரையை உருவாக்குகிறது.', 'ur': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. ہم پوکت علم بنیاس جماعت (PKBP) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ایک سوال کے باعث ایک کیب ایٹیوں کی تعمیر کرتی ہے اور ایک ایٹیوں کے درمیان بہترین رابطہ کی تعریف پاتے ہیں۔ ہم نومین کھولنے کی اطلاعات اضافہ طریقوں کو توصیح دیتے ہیں جو PKB کو اطلاعات ٹریگر کلمات تلاش کرنے کے لئے لکھتے ہیں. ہم نے موجود KBP shared-task data کے استعمال کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کرلیا ہے اور اس کام کے لئے نیوی اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ہمارے طریقے صرف ایک ٹیکسٹ سے بلند کیلوٹی کیلوٹی پیدا کرتے ہیں جو موجود KBP سیسٹم سے بہت زیادہ وابستہ اور رابطہ رکھتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Biz Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), soʻrov bilan bogʻliq mavzularning vazifani dynamik yaratish va obʼektlar orasidagi eng eng yaxshi shaklni topish. @ info Biz mavjud KBP bilan birlashtirilgan vazifa maʼlumotini va shu vazifa uchun yangi yangi taʼminlovchilar bilan qiymatmiz. Bizning usullari faqat mavjud KBP tizimlaridan ko'proq narsalar va munosabatlar bilan juda katta qiymat KB' dan chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Phương pháp bẩm sinh tồn tại chiết xuất mối quan hệ từ một kế hoạch liên quan đóng kín với mức độ tối thiểu dẫn tới các KB. Chúng tôi đề nghị dân số Nhà tri thức Pocket (PK P), nhiệm vụ kiến trúc động một KB của các thực thể liên quan đến một câu hỏi và tìm ra mô tả tốt nhất các mối quan hệ giữa các thực thể. Chúng tôi mô tả tiểu thuyết Mở thông tin Phương pháp chiết xuất để thúc đẩy PK tìm từ kích hoạt thông tin. Chúng tôi đánh giá bằng các dữ liệu chia sẻ của KBP cũng như những ghi chú mới được thu thập cho công việc này. Các phương pháp của chúng tôi sản xuất KB chất lượng cao chỉ với nhiều thực thể và mối quan hệ hơn hệ của KBP.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите методи на популация от базата на знания извличат релации от затворена релационна схема с ограничено покритие, което води до оскъдни КБ. Предлагаме популация от джобна база знания (ПКБП), задачата за динамично изграждане на КБ от обекти, свързани с заявка и намиране на най-добрата характеристика на взаимоотношенията между субектите. Описваме нови методи за извличане на отворена информация, които използват ПКБ за намиране на информативни задействащи думи. Ние оценяваме, като използваме съществуващи данни за споделени задачи, както и нови анотации, събрани за тази работа. Нашите методи произвеждат висококачествени КБ от само текст с много повече обекти и връзки, отколкото съществуващите системи.', 'hr': 'Postoje metode stanovništva baze znanja izvlače odnose iz zatvorene vezne shme s ograničenim pokrivanjem koji vodi do rezervnih KBs. Predlažemo stanovništvu baze znanja Pocket a (PKBP), zadatak dinamički konstruiranja KB entiteta povezanih sa pitanjem i pronalaženjem najboljih karakterizacija odnosa između entitata. Opišemo nove metode izvlačenja otvorenih informacija koje utiču na PKB da pronađemo informativne riječi okidača. Procjenjujemo korištenje postojećih podataka o području zajedničkog zadatka KBP-a kao i novih annotacija prikupljenih za ovaj rad. Naše metode proizvode visoke kvalitete KB iz teksta sa mnogim više entiteta i odnosa nego postojećim KBP sustavima.', 'da': 'Eksisterende Knowledge Base Population metoder udtrækker relationer fra et lukket relationsskema med begrænset dækning, der fører til sparsomme KBs. Vi foreslår Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), opgaven med dynamisk at konstruere en KB af enheder relateret til en forespørgsel og finde den bedste karakterisering af relationer mellem enheder. Vi beskriver nye Open Information Extraction metoder, der udnytter PKB til at finde informative triggerord. Vi evaluerer ved hjælp af eksisterende KBP delte opgavedata samt nye noter indsamlet til dette arbejde. Vores metoder producerer KB af høj kvalitet ud fra kun tekst med mange flere entiteter og relationer end eksisterende KBP-systemer.', 'nl': 'Bestaande kennisbasepopulatiemethoden halen relaties uit een gesloten relationeel schema met beperkte dekking, wat leidt tot schaarse KBs. We stellen Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) voor, de taak van het dynamisch opbouwen van een KB van entiteiten gerelateerd aan een query en het vinden van de beste karakterisering van relaties tussen entiteiten. We beschrijven nieuwe Open Information Extraction methoden die de PKB gebruiken om informatieve triggerwoorden te vinden. We evalueren met behulp van bestaande KBP shared-task data en opnieuw verzamelde annotaties voor dit werk. Onze methoden produceren hoogwaardige KB uit tekst met veel meer entiteiten en relaties dan bestaande KBP-systemen.', 'de': 'Bestehende Methoden der Wissensdatenbank Population extrahieren Beziehungen aus einem geschlossenen relationalen Schema mit begrenzter Abdeckung, was zu spärlichen KBs führt. Wir schlagen Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) vor, die Aufgabe, dynamisch eine KB von Entitäten zu konstruieren, die mit einer Abfrage zusammenhängen und die beste Charakterisierung von Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten zu finden. Wir beschreiben neuartige Open Information Extraction Methoden, die die PKB nutzen, um informative Triggerwörter zu finden. Wir werten bestehende KBP Shared-Task-Daten sowie neu für diese Arbeit gesammelte Anmerkungen aus. Unsere Methoden erzeugen qualitativ hochwertige KB aus reinem Text mit viel mehr Entitäten und Beziehungen als bestehende KBP-Systeme.', 'id': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs.  Kami mengusulkan Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), tugas untuk membangun KB dari entitas yang berhubungan dengan pertanyaan dan menemukan karakterisasi terbaik dari hubungan antara entitas. Kami menggambarkan metode ekstraksi informasi terbuka yang mempengaruhi PKB untuk menemukan kata pemicu informatif. Kami mengevaluasi menggunakan data KBP berbagi tugas dan anotasi baru yang dikumpulkan untuk pekerjaan ini. Metode kami menghasilkan KB kualitas tinggi dari hanya teks dengan banyak entitas dan hubungan lebih dari sistem KBP yang ada.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای بنیادی دانش وجود دارد، رابطه\u200cهای جمعیت را از یک برنامه رابطه\u200cای بسته با پوشش محدودیت که باعث می\u200cشود به کیب\u200cهای خالی برطرف کند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که جمعیت بنیادی دانش\u200cشناسی Pocket (PKBP) مسئله\u200cی ساختن یک کیلومتری از برنامه\u200cها مرتبط به یک سوال و پیدا کردن بهترین ویژه\u200cشناسی رابطه بین برنامه\u200cها باشد. ما روش استخراج اطلاعات باز را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که PKB را برای پیدا کردن کلمات فشار اطلاعات تأثیر می\u200cدهد. ما با استفاده از داده\u200cهای مشترک کار KBP موجود ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و نوشته\u200cهای جدید برای این کار جمع شده است. روش\u200cهای ما کیلومتر بالا از متن با متن بیشتری از سیستم\u200cهای KBP وجود دارد.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Ujuzi unaoendelea unaoendelea kuondoa mahusiano kutoka kwenye mpango wa ufungwa wa mahusiano na taarifa mpya inayosababisha kupunguza KBs. Tunawapendekeza Asili ya Ujuzi wa Pocket (PKBP), jukumu la kutengeneza viwanda vya KB vilivyohusiana na utafiti na kutafuta ufafanuzi bora wa mahusiano kati ya vitu. Tunaelezea mbinu za kutengeneza taarifa za wazi zinazotumia PKB ili kutafuta maneno yanayoanza taarifa. Tutathmini kwa kutumia taarifa zilizopo kwenye kazi za KBP pamoja na matangazo mapya yaliyokusanywa kwa ajili ya kazi hii. Mindo yetu inatengeneza KB yenye kiwango kikubwa kutoka kwenye ujumbe wa kuandika na vifaa vingi zaidi na mahusiano kuliko mifumo ya KBP.', 'tr': 'Öňki Bilim Basesi Halkara metodlary ýapylan baglanyşy sistemden çykar baglanyşy käbrlerden çykar. Pocket Bilim Basisi Halkara (PKBP), bir soragy bilen bir KB gurama we barlygyň iň gowy karakterifikasyny tapmak üçin teklip edip bilýäris. Biz kitaby Aç Maglumat Aç Metini Taýşartýarys Biz bu işe üçin häzirki KBP paylaşyk-gören maglumatlaryny we täze täze täze täzelikleri ulanýarys Biziň yöntemlerimiz bar KBP sistemlerden birnäçe kiçi/beýik kalitesinden metin edip bar.', 'ko': '기존의 지식 라이브러리 충전 방법은 범위가 제한된 폐쇄 관계 모델에서 관계를 추출하여 지식 라이브러리가 희소하게 만든다.Pocket Knowledge Base Population(PKBP)은 조회와 관련된 실체 지식 라이브러리를 동적으로 구축하고 실체 간의 관계에 대한 가장 좋은 표징을 찾아내는 것입니다.PKB를 사용하여 정보 트리거어를 찾는 새로운 개방형 정보 추출 방법을 설명합니다.기존 KBP 공유 작업 데이터와 이 작업을 위해 수집한 새로운 주석을 사용하여 평가합니다.우리의 방법은 텍스트에서만 고품질의 지식 라이브러리를 생성하는데 그 실체와 관계는 기존의 지식 라이브러리 시스템보다 훨씬 많다.', 'af': "Bestaande kennis Base Bewoningsmetodes uitpak relasies van 'n gesluit relatiewe skema met beperkte dekking wat na sparse Kbs lei. Ons voorstel Pocket kennis basiese bevolking (PKBP), die taak van dynamiese konstruksie van 'n Kb van entiteite wat verwante na' n navraag en vind die beste karakterisering van verwantings tussen entiteite. Ons beskryf novel Open Informasie Uitpak Metodes wat die Pkb verwyder om inligtige uitpak woorde te vind. Ons evalueer gebruik bestaande Kpos gedeelde- taak data as ook nuwe notasies versamel vir hierdie werk. Ons metodes produseer hoë kwaliteit Kb van net teks met baie meer entiteite en verhouding as bestaande Kb stelsels.", 'am': 'የአውቀት መድረክ የፖት እውቀት መቀመጫዎች (PKBP)፣ በተጠያቂው ውይይት የKB አካባቢዎችን በመሠረት እና በአካባቢዎች መካከል የተሻለ ግንኙነት ማግኘት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የክፈት መረጃ አካባቢ ቃላትን ለማግኘት የPKB ሰጥቷል፡፡ የአሁኑን KBP የስራ ዳታ እና ለዚህ ሥራ የተሰበሰቡትን አዲስ ማስታወቂያ እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የKBP ስርዓቶች ከመገኘት ይልቅ ብዙ አካባቢዎች እና ግንኙነት ጋር ከጽሑፍ ከፍተኛ ጥያቄ የKB ጥያቄ የሚያደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. Biz Pocket Bilim Base Population (PKBP) təklif edirik, dinamik olaraq bir query ilə bağlı bir KB entitə inşa etmək və məxluqat arasındakı ən yaxşı ilişkilərin qarşılığını tapmaq üçün. Biz yeni Açıq Malümat Ekstrasyon metodlarını, PKB'i informativ tetikçi sözlərini tapmaq üçün təsirləndiririk. Biz bu işin üçün toplanmış KBP paylaşdırılmış iş məlumatları və yeni məlumatları istifadə edirik. Bizim metodlarımız KBP sistemlərindən çox mövcud mövcud olan mətnlərdən yüksək kaliteli KB ürəklənir.", 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক জনসংখ্যার মাধ্যমে একটি বন্ধ স্কীমা থেকে সম্পর্ক বের করে যাওয়া সীমাবদ্ধ কাভারেজ, যার ফলে কে- বিএস আমরা পকেটের জ্ঞান বেসের জনসংখ্যা (পিকেবিপি) প্রস্তাব করছি, যার কাজে একটি প্রশ্নের সাথে সম্পর্কিত বস্তুর কেবি নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে এবং বস্তুর মধ্যে সম্পর্ আমরা উপন্যাস খোলা তথ্য বিস্তারিত পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করি যা তথ্য প্রকাশ করার জন্য পিকেবিকে প্রদান করে। বিদ্যমান কেবিপি শেয়ার কর্মসূচী তথ্য ব্যবহার করে এবং এই কাজের জন্য নতুন বিষয়বস্তু সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে। আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিদ্যমান কেবিপি সিস্টেমের চেয়ে অনেক বৈশিষ্ট্য ও সম্পর্ক থেকে উচ্চ মানের কেবি তৈরি করে।', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող գիտելիքի հիմնական բնակչության մեթոդները հանում են հարաբերությունները փակ հարաբերական սխեմայից, որտեղ սահմանափակ ծավալը հանում է հազվադեպ կԲ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք Pocket-ի գիտելիքի հիմնական բնակչությունը (PKOP), առաջադրանքը դինամիկ կառուցել ԿԲ-ի կազմակերպություններ, որոնք կապված են հարցում և գտնել կազմակերպությունների միջև հարաբերությունների լավագույն բնորոշումը: Մենք նկարագրում ենք նոր բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանման մեթոդներ, որոնք օգնում են PK-ին գտնել ինֆորմատիվ ազդանշան բառեր: Մենք գնահատում ենք, օգտագործելով գոյություն ունեցող ԿԲՊ-ի ընդհանուր հանձնարարության տվյալներ, ինչպես նաև նոր annoտացիաներ, որոնք հավաքվել են այս աշխատանքի համար: Our methods produce high quality KB from just text with many more entities and relationships than existing KBP systems.', 'ca': "Els mètodes existents de la població basada en el coneixement extreuen les relacions d'un esquema relatiu tancat amb cobertura limitada que porta a KB escassos. Proposem Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), la tasca de construir dinàmicament un KB d'entitats relacionades amb una consulta i trobar la millor caracterització de les relacions entre entitats. Descrivem nous mètodes d'extracció d'informació oberta que aprofiten al PKB per trobar paraules informatives. Evaluam utilitzant les dades de KBP compartides i anotacions noves recollides per aquesta feina. Els nostres mètodes produeixen KB d'alta qualitat a partir de text amb moltes més entitats i relacions que els sistemes KBP existents.", 'cs': 'Stávající metody populace znalostní báze extrahují vztahy z uzavřeného relačního schématu s omezeným pokrytím, což vede k řídkým KBs. Navrhujeme Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), úkol dynamického vytvoření KB entit souvisejících s dotazem a nalezení nejlepší charakterizace vztahů mezi entitami. Popisujeme nové metody Open Information Extraction, které využívají PKB k nalezení informativních triggerových slov. Vyhodnocujeme na základě stávajících dat sdílených úkolů KBP a nových poznámek shromážděných pro tuto práci. Naše metody produkují vysoce kvalitní KB z textu s mnohem více entit a vztahů než stávající systémy KBP.', 'sq': 'Metodat ekzistuese të bazës së njohurive të popullsisë nxjerrin marrëdhëniet nga një skemë e mbyllur marrëdhënie me mbulim të kufizuar që shpie në KB të pakta. Ne propozojmë popullsinë bazë të njohurive të Pocket (PKBP), detyrën e ndërtimit dinamik të një KB njësive lidhur me një pyetje dhe gjetjen e karakterizimit më të mirë të marrëdhënieve midis njësive. Ne përshkruajmë metodat e reja të nxjerrjes së informacionit të hapur që nxisin PKB-në për të gjetur fjalë të nxitësve informative. Ne vlerësojmë përdorimin e të dhënave ekzistuese KBP të detyrave të ndara si dhe anotacionet e reja të mbledhura për këtë punë. Metodat tona prodhojnë KB cilësi të lartë nga vetëm teksti me shumë njësi dhe marrëdhënie më shumë se sistemi ekzistues KBP.', 'bs': 'Postoje metode stanovništva baze znanja izvlače odnose iz zatvorene vezne shme sa ograničenim pokrivanjem koji vodi do rezervnih KBs. Predlažemo stanovništvu baze znanja Pocket a (PKBP), zadatak dinamički konstruiranja KB entiteta povezanog sa pitanjem i pronalaženjem najboljih karakterizacija odnosa između entitata. Opišemo nove metode izvlačenja otvorene informacije koje utiču na PKB da pronađemo informativne riječi okidača. Procjenjujemo korištenje postojećih podataka podataka podijeljenih KBP-task kao i novih annotacija prikupljenih za ovaj posao. Naše metode proizvode visoke kvalitete KB iz teksta sa mnogo više entiteta i odnosa od postojećih KBP sustava.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad teabebaasi populatsiooni meetodid ekstraheerivad suhteid piiratud katvusega suletud relatsiooniskeemist, mille tulemusel tekivad hõredad KBd. Pakume välja Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), mille ülesandeks on dünaamiliselt ehitada KB päringuga seotud olemitest ja leida parim kirjeldus olemitevahelistest suhetest. Kirjeldame uudseid avatud teabe ekstraheerimise meetodeid, mis kasutavad PKB-d informatiivsete käivitussõnade leidmiseks. Hindame olemasolevaid KBP jagatud ülesannete andmeid ja uusi selle töö jaoks kogutud märkusi. Meie meetodid toodavad kvaliteetset KB lihtsalt tekstist palju rohkem olemeid ja seoseid kui olemasolevad KBP süsteemid.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat Knowledge Base Population -menetelmät poimivat suhteita suljetusta relaatiokaaviosta, jonka kattavuus on rajoitettu, mikä johtaa harvoihin KB-pisteisiin. Ehdotamme Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP) -populaation (Pocket Knowledge Base Population), jonka tehtävänä on dynaamisesti rakentaa kyselyyn liittyviä kokonaisuuksia ja löytää paras karakterisointi entiteettien välisistä suhteista. Kuvailemme uusia avoimen tiedon uuttamismenetelmiä, jotka hyödyntävät PKB:tä informatiivisten trigger-sanojen löytämiseen. Arvioimme olemassa olevia KBP:n jaettuja tehtäviä koskevia tietoja sekä uusia tähän työhön kerättyjä huomautuksia. Menetelmämme tuottavat korkealaatuista KB:tä pelkästä tekstistä, jossa on paljon enemmän kokonaisuuksia ja suhteita kuin olemassa olevat KBP-järjestelmät.', 'jv': 'Sayensi We proposal the Dokett knowknowknowknowknowknowknowknownLanguage Awak dhéwé ngerwih pernik Open Info We assess Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing wis nggawe kbit luwih apik, lan akeh sampeyan karo sistem sing gawe kbit saiki.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Tune ƙayyade Babban Sani'a na Pocket (PKBP), aikin da za'a samar da kimar KB masu husũna da wani tambayi kuma Mu gane mafi kyaun gyarata masu husũma tsakanin abubuwa. @ info: whatsthis Tuna ƙaddara da amfani da KBP da data mai raba aiki da kuma da zane-yanzu da aka samu zuwa wannan aikin. Kayan hanyõyinmu, za'a samar da nau'i KB daga matsayin kowanin da wasu masu da mazaɓa da danganta masu yawa daga tsarin KBP masu jira.", 'he': 'שיטות אוכלוסיית מבסיס ידע קיימות חוטפות יחסים מתוכנית מערכת יחסים סגורה עם כיסוי מוגבל שמוביל ל KBs נדיר. We propose Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), the task of dynamically constructing a KB of entities related to a query and finding the best characterization of relationships between entities.  אנו מתארים שיטות מחלץ מידע פתוח חדשות שממשכות את PKB למצוא מילים מפעילות מידעית. אנו מעריכים באמצעות נתונים משימות משותפות קיימים של KBP וגם הערות חדשות שנאספו עבור העבודה הזאת. השיטות שלנו יוצרות KB איכות גבוהה רק טקסט עם הרבה יותר יחסים מערכות KBP קיימות.', 'sk': 'Obstoječe metode populacije zbirke znanja izvlečejo relacije iz zaprte relacijske sheme z omejeno pokritostjo, kar vodi do redkih KB-jev. Predlagamo žepno populacijo baze znanja (PKBP), nalogo dinamičnega gradnje KB entitet, povezanih z poizvedbo, in iskanja najboljše karakterizacije odnosov med entitetami. Opisujemo nove metode odprtega pridobivanja informacij, ki uporabljajo PKB za iskanje informacijskih sprožilnih besed. Ocenjujemo z uporabo obstoječih podatkov o opravilih v skupni rabi KBP in novih opomb, zbranih za to delo. Naše metode proizvajajo visokokakovostne KB iz samo besedila z veliko več entitetami in relacijami kot obstoječi sistemi KBP.', 'bo': 'Existing Knowledge Base Population methods extract relations from a closed relational schema with limited coverage leading to sparse KBs. We propose Pocket Knowledge Base Population (PKBP), the task of dynamically constructing a KB of entities related to a query and finding the best characterization of relationships between entities. ང་ཚོས་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱིས་ཁ་ཕྱེ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་KBP་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གནས ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་གནས་ཡུལ་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་དབྱིབས་དང་འབྲེལ་ལམ་མང་ཙམ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རིམ་མཐུན'}
{'en': 'Answering Complex Questions Using Open Information Extraction', 'ar': 'الإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة باستخدام استخلاص المعلومات المفتوحة', 'es': 'Respuesta a preguntas complejas mediante la extracción abierta de información', 'fr': "Répondre à des questions complexes grâce à l'extraction d'informations", 'pt': 'Respondendo a perguntas complexas usando a extração de informações abertas', 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出を使用した複雑な質問への回答', 'zh': '用开放式信提答复杂', 'ru': 'Ответы на сложные вопросы с помощью извлечения открытой информации', 'hi': 'खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण का उपयोग कर जटिल सवालों के जवाब', 'ga': 'Ag Freagairt Ceisteanna Coimpléascacha Ag Úsáid Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte', 'el': 'Απάντηση σε σύνθετες ερωτήσεις χρησιμοποιώντας την ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών', 'hu': 'Összetett kérdések megválaszolása nyílt információkivonat segítségével', 'ka': 'დასრულებული კითხვების პასუხი გახსნა ინფორმაციის გამოყენება', 'it': "Rispondere a domande complesse utilizzando l'estrazione di informazioni aperte", 'kk': 'Ашылған мәліметті тарқату арқылы толық сұрақтарды жауап беру', 'lt': 'Atsakymai į sudėtingus klausimus naudojant atviros informacijos ekstrakciją', 'mk': 'Одговарање на комплексни прашања со исклучување на отворени информации', 'ms': 'Jawab soalan kompleks menggunakan Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka', 'ml': 'തുറക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്പ്രാക്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കോമ്പ്ലക്സിന്റെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi bl-użu ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni miftuħa', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл нээж авах хэрэглэгддэг комплекс асуултуудыг хариулах', 'no': 'Svar komplekse spørsmål ved bruk av opna informasjon', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na złożone pytania za pomocą otwartej ekstrakcji informacji', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări complexe utilizând extragerea informațiilor deschise', 'so': 'Iska isticmaalka bixinta macluumaadka furan', 'sv': 'Svara på komplexa frågor med hjälp av extraktion av öppen information', 'ta': 'திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டைப் பயன்படுத்தி சிக்கல் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்கிறது', 'ur': 'کھولتا ہوا معلومات اخراج کے استعمال سے مکمل سؤال جواب دیتے ہیں', 'sr': 'Odgovor na kompleksnih pitanja koristeći ekstrakciju otvorene informacije', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් පිළිබඳින්න', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi phức tạp, sử dụng giải cứu thông tin', 'hr': 'Odgovor na kompleksnih pitanja koristeći izvlačenje otvorenih informacija', 'da': 'Besvarelse af komplekse spørgsmål ved hjælp af Open Information Extraction', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на сложни въпроси чрез извличане на открита информация', 'nl': 'Complexe vragen beantwoorden met behulp van open informatie extractie', 'id': 'menjawab pertanyaan kompleks menggunakan ekstraksi informasi terbuka', 'ko': '개방된 정보 추출을 사용하여 복잡한 문제에 대답하다', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوالات کامل از استفاده از خروج اطلاعات باز', 'de': 'Beantwortung komplexer Fragen mit Open Information Extraction', 'af': 'Antwoord volledige vrae wat gebruik Open Informasie Uitpak', 'sw': 'Jibu maswali ya kompleksi kwa kutumia utoaji wa habari', 'tr': 'Aç Maglumat Açmak üçin Tamamlary Soraglary Jogap', 'hy': 'Պատասխանել բարդ հարցերին՝ օգտագործելով բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանումը', 'az': 'Açıq Malümatı Açırmaq', 'sq': 'Përgjigja pyetjeve komplekse duke përdorur nxjerrjen e informacionit të hapur', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'bs': 'Odgovor na kompleksnih pitanja koristeći ekstrakciju otvorene informacije', 'bn': 'খোলা তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন ব্যবহার করে কমপ্লেক্স প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়া হচ্ছে', 'ca': "Respondre preguntes complexes utilitzant l'extracció d'informació oberta", 'cs': 'Zodpovězení složitých otázek pomocí otevřené extrakce informací', 'fi': 'Monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin vastaaminen avoimen tiedon poimimisen avulla', 'et': 'Keerulistele küsimustele vastamine avatud teabe väljavõtmise abil', 'jv': 'Ngubah Gambar Kelangang Puteran', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na kompleksna vprašanja z uporabo odprtega pridobivanja informacij', 'he': 'תשובה לשאלות מורכבות באמצעות יציאת מידע פתוח', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འཕགས་རིས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་མཐར་འཁྱོར་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ལན་པ'}
{'en': 'While there has been substantial progress in factoid question-answering (QA), answering complex questions remains challenging, typically requiring both a large body of knowledge and inference techniques. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) provides a way to generate semi-structured knowledge for QA, but to date such knowledge has only been used to answer simple questions with retrieval-based methods. We overcome this limitation by presenting a method for reasoning with Open IE knowledge, allowing more complex questions to be handled. Using a recently proposed support graph optimization framework for QA, we develop a new inference model for Open IE, in particular one that can work effectively with multiple short facts, noise, and the relational structure of tuples. Our model significantly outperforms a state-of-the-art structured solver on complex questions of varying difficulty, while also removing the reliance on manually curated knowledge.', 'ar': 'بينما كان هناك تقدم كبير في الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) ، تظل الإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة صعبة ، وتتطلب عادةً مجموعة كبيرة من المعرفة وتقنيات الاستدلال. يوفر استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة (Open IE) طريقة لإنشاء معرفة شبه منظمة لضمان الجودة ، ولكن حتى الآن لم يتم استخدام هذه المعرفة إلا للإجابة على أسئلة بسيطة باستخدام طرق قائمة على الاسترجاع. لقد تغلبنا على هذا القيد من خلال تقديم طريقة للتفكير باستخدام معرفة Open IE ، مما يسمح بمعالجة أسئلة أكثر تعقيدًا. باستخدام إطار عمل تحسين الرسم البياني للدعم الذي تم اقتراحه مؤخرًا لـ QA ، قمنا بتطوير نموذج استدلال جديد لـ Open IE ، لا سيما النموذج الذي يمكنه العمل بفعالية مع العديد من الحقائق القصيرة والضوضاء والبنية العلائقية لـ tuples. يتفوق نموذجنا بشكل كبير على أحدث الحلول المنظمة في الأسئلة المعقدة ذات الصعوبة المتفاوتة ، بينما يزيل أيضًا الاعتماد على المعرفة المنسقة يدويًا.', 'es': 'Si bien ha habido un progreso sustancial en la respuesta a preguntas (QA) factoides, responder a preguntas complejas sigue siendo un desafío, por lo general, requiere un gran conjunto de conocimientos y técnicas de inferencia. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) proporciona una forma de generar conocimiento semiestructurado para el control de calidad, pero hasta la fecha ese conocimiento solo se ha utilizado para responder preguntas simples con métodos basados en la recuperación. Superamos esta limitación presentando un método de razonamiento con conocimiento de Open IE, que permite manejar preguntas más complejas. Utilizando un marco de optimización de gráficos de soporte propuesto recientemente para el control de calidad, desarrollamos un nuevo modelo de inferencia para Open IE, en particular uno que puede funcionar eficazmente con múltiples datos breves, ruido y la estructura relacional de las tuplas. Nuestro modelo supera significativamente a un solucionador estructurado de última generación en cuestiones complejas de dificultad variable, al tiempo que elimina la dependencia del conocimiento curado manualmente.', 'pt': 'Embora tenha havido um progresso substancial na resposta a perguntas factóides (QA), responder a perguntas complexas continua sendo um desafio, normalmente exigindo um grande corpo de conhecimento e técnicas de inferência. A Extração de Informação Aberta (Open IE) fornece uma maneira de gerar conhecimento semiestruturado para QA, mas até o momento esse conhecimento só foi usado para responder a perguntas simples com métodos baseados em recuperação. Superamos essa limitação apresentando um método de raciocínio com conhecimento de Open IE, permitindo o tratamento de questões mais complexas. Usando um framework de otimização de grafos de suporte proposto recentemente para QA, desenvolvemos um novo modelo de inferência para Open IE, em particular um que pode funcionar efetivamente com vários fatos curtos, ruídos e a estrutura relacional de tuplas. Nosso modelo supera significativamente um solucionador estruturado de última geração em questões complexas de dificuldade variável, além de remover a dependência do conhecimento selecionado manualmente.', 'fr': "Bien que des progrès considérables aient été réalisés en matière de réponse aux questions factuelles (AQ), répondre à des questions complexes reste difficile, nécessitant généralement à la fois un vaste ensemble de connaissances et des techniques d'inférence. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) fournit un moyen de générer des connaissances semi-structurées pour l'AQ, mais à ce jour, ces connaissances n'ont été utilisées que pour répondre à des questions simples à l'aide de méthodes basées sur la récupération. Nous surmontons cette limite en présentant une méthode de raisonnement avec des connaissances Open IE, permettant de traiter des questions plus complexes. À l'aide d'un framework d'optimisation de graphe de support récemment proposé pour l'assurance qualité, nous développons un nouveau modèle d'inférence pour Open IE, en particulier un modèle qui peut fonctionner efficacement avec de multiples faits courts, du bruit et la structure relationnelle des tuples. Notre modèle surpasse de manière significative un solveur structuré de pointe pour des questions complexes de difficulté variable, tout en supprimant la dépendance aux connaissances sélectionnées manuellement.", 'ja': '事実に基づく質疑応答（ QA ）では実質的な進歩があったが、複雑な質問に答えることは依然として困難であり、通常、多くの知識と推論技術の両方が必要である。オープン情報抽出（ Open IE ）は、QAのための半構造化された知識を生成する方法を提供しますが、このような知識はこれまで、検索ベースの方法で単純な質問に答えるためにのみ使用されてきました。この制限を克服するために、オープンIEの知識を持つ推論方法を提示し、より複雑な質問に対処できるようにしました。最近提案されたQAのサポートグラフ最適化フレームワークを使用して、Open IEのための新しい推論モデルを開発しました。特に、複数の短い事実、ノイズ、およびタプルの関係構造で効果的に働くことができる推論モデルを開発しました。当社のモデルは、さまざまな難易度の複雑な質問に対して、最先端の構造化されたソルバーを大幅に上回り、手動でキュレーションされた知識への依存を排除します。', 'zh': '虽于事实问答(QA)得实质性进,而应对杂问犹有挑战性,常须多知理术。 开信取(Open IE),为QA生半结构化之道,而迄今为止之于检索之道。 吾以Open IE知胜之,以听其杂也。 用近者QA扶图优化框架,为Open IE发一新推理模型,尤一可效者数事,噪声与元组结构。 臣等模形,显优先进之结构化求解器,兼消手动策之赖。', 'hi': 'जबकि तथ्यात्मक प्रश्न-उत्तर (क्यूए) में पर्याप्त प्रगति हुई है, जटिल प्रश्नों का उत्तर देना चुनौतीपूर्ण बना हुआ है, आमतौर पर ज्ञान और अनुमान तकनीकों के एक बड़े शरीर दोनों की आवश्यकता होती है। ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन (ओपन आईई) क्यूए के लिए अर्ध-संरचित ज्ञान उत्पन्न करने का एक तरीका प्रदान करता है, लेकिन आज तक इस तरह के ज्ञान का उपयोग केवल पुनर्प्राप्ति-आधारित विधियों के साथ सरल प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए किया गया है। हम ओपन आईई ज्ञान के साथ तर्क के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करके इस सीमा को दूर करते हैं, जिससे अधिक जटिल प्रश्नों को संभाला जा सकता है। क्यूए के लिए हाल ही में प्रस्तावित समर्थन ग्राफ अनुकूलन ढांचे का उपयोग करते हुए, हम ओपन आईई के लिए एक नया अनुमान मॉडल विकसित करते हैं, विशेष रूप से एक जो कई छोटे तथ्यों, शोर और ट्यूपल्स की संबंधपरक संरचना के साथ प्रभावी ढंग से काम कर सकता है। हमारा मॉडल अलग-अलग कठिनाई के जटिल प्रश्नों पर एक अत्याधुनिक संरचित सॉल्वर को काफी बेहतर बनाता है, जबकि मैन्युअल रूप से क्यूरेट किए गए ज्ञान पर निर्भरता को भी हटा देता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя был достигнут существенный прогресс в фактическом ответе на вопросы (QA), ответы на сложные вопросы остаются сложными, обычно требующими как большого объема знаний, так и методов вывода. Открытое извлечение информации (Open IE) предоставляет способ генерировать полуструктурированные знания для QA, но до сих пор такие знания использовались только для ответов на простые вопросы методами, основанными на поиске. Мы преодолеваем это ограничение, представляя метод рассуждения со знанием Open IE, позволяющий решать более сложные вопросы. Используя недавно предложенную схему оптимизации графа поддержки для QA, мы разрабатываем новую модель вывода для Open IE, в частности, ту, которая может эффективно работать с несколькими короткими фактами, шумом и реляционной структурой кортежей. Наша модель значительно превосходит современный структурированный решатель по сложным вопросам различной сложности, а также устраняет зависимость от вручную курируемых знаний.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta i bhfíricí freagra ceisteanna (QA), tá sé dúshlánach i gcónaí ceisteanna casta a fhreagairt, go hiondúil teastaíonn corpas mór eolais agus teicnící tátail araon. Soláthraíonn Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte (Open IE) bealach chun eolas leath-struchtúrtha a ghiniúint do QA, ach go dtí seo níor úsáideadh eolas dá leithéid ach amháin chun ceisteanna simplí a fhreagairt le modhanna aisghabhála-bhunaithe. Sáraítear an teorannú seo trí mhodh réasúnaíochta a chur i láthair le heolas Open IE, rud a ligeann do cheisteanna níos casta a láimhseáil. Ag baint úsáide as creat leas iomlán a bhaint graif tacaíochta a moladh le déanaí le haghaidh QA, forbraímid samhail tátail nua le haghaidh Open IE, go háirithe múnla a fhéadfaidh oibriú go héifeachtach le fíricí gearra iolracha, torann, agus struchtúr gaolmhar tuples. Is fearr go mór lenár múnla ná réiteoir struchtúrtha úrscothach maidir le ceisteanna casta a bhfuil deacrachtaí éagsúla ag baint leo, agus ag an am céanna ag fáil réidh leis an spleáchas ar eolas coimeádta de láimh.', 'hu': 'Bár jelentős előrelépés történt a tényleges kérdések megválaszolása terén, az összetett kérdések megválaszolása továbbra is kihívást jelent, jellemzően széles körű tudást és következtetési technikákat igényel. Az Open Information Extraction (Open IE) lehetővé teszi a félstrukturált tudás generálását a minőségbiztosítás számára, de eddig ilyen ismereteket csak egyszerű kérdésekre használtak visszakeresési alapú módszerekkel. Ezt a korlátozást úgy oldjuk meg, hogy bemutatjuk az Open IE ismeretekkel rendelkező érvelési módszert, amely lehetővé teszi a bonyolultabb kérdések kezelését. Egy nemrégiben javasolt támogatási grafikonoptimalizálási keretrendszer segítségével kidolgozunk egy új következtetési modellt az Open IE számára, különösen egy olyat, amely hatékonyan működik több rövid ténnyel, zajjal és a tuplek relatív struktúrájával. Modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb strukturált megoldót a különböző nehézségű komplex kérdésekben, miközben eltávolítja a manuálisan kezelt tudásra való támaszkodást.', 'el': 'Ενώ έχει σημειωθεί σημαντική πρόοδος στην πραγματική απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις (QA), η απάντηση σε σύνθετες ερωτήσεις παραμένει πρόκληση, συνήθως απαιτεί τόσο ένα μεγάλο σώμα γνώσεων όσο και τεχνικές συμπερασμάτων. Η ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών παρέχει έναν τρόπο για την παραγωγή ημιδομημένης γνώσης για την αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας, αλλά μέχρι σήμερα η γνώση αυτή χρησιμοποιείται μόνο για να απαντήσει σε απλές ερωτήσεις με μεθόδους που βασίζονται στην ανάκτηση. Υπερβάλλουμε αυτόν τον περιορισμό παρουσιάζοντας μια μέθοδο συλλογισμού με γνώσεις ανοιχτού διαδικτύου, επιτρέποντας την αντιμετώπιση πιο σύνθετων ερωτήσεων. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα πρόσφατα προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο βελτιστοποίησης γραφήματος υποστήριξης για την QA, αναπτύσσουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο συμπερασμάτων για το Open IE, ιδιαίτερα ένα που μπορεί να λειτουργήσει αποτελεσματικά με πολλαπλά σύντομα γεγονότα, θόρυβο και τη σχεσιακή δομή των Tuples. Το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά έναν προηγμένο δομημένο λύτη σε σύνθετα ερωτήματα ποικίλης δυσκολίας, ενώ παράλληλα αφαιρεί την εξάρτηση από χειροκίνητα επεξεργασμένες γνώσεις.', 'it': "Mentre ci sono stati progressi sostanziali nella risposta alle domande di fatto (QA), rispondere a domande complesse rimane difficile, in genere richiede sia un ampio corpo di conoscenze che tecniche di inferenza. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) fornisce un modo per generare conoscenze semi-strutturate per il QA, ma finora tali conoscenze sono state utilizzate solo per rispondere a domande semplici con metodi basati sul recupero. Superiamo questa limitazione presentando un metodo di ragionamento con conoscenza Open IE, che consente di gestire domande più complesse. Utilizzando un framework di ottimizzazione dei grafici di supporto recentemente proposto per il QA, sviluppiamo un nuovo modello di inferenza per Open IE, in particolare uno che può funzionare efficacemente con molteplici fatti brevi, rumore e la struttura relazionale dei tuples. Il nostro modello supera significativamente un risolutore strutturato all'avanguardia su questioni complesse di varia difficoltà, eliminando al contempo la dipendenza da conoscenze curate manualmente.", 'lt': 'Nors buvo padaryta didelė pažanga sprendžiant faktinius klausimus, atsakymas į sudėtingus klausimus tebėra sudėtingas, paprastai reikalauja daug žinių ir išvadų metodų. Atvira informacijos ekstrakcija (atvira IE) suteikia galimybę kurti pusstruktūrines žinias apie QA, tačiau iki šiol tokios žinios buvo naudojamos tik paprastiems klausimams atsakyti naudojant surinkimo metodus. Mes įveikiame šį apribojimą pateikdami metodą, kaip pagrįsti atviras IE žinias, leidžiantį spręsti sudėtingesnius klausimus. Naudodami neseniai pasiūlytą paramos grafiko optimizavimo sistemą QA, mes parengiame naują atviros IE išvadų model į, visų pirma modelį, kuris galėtų veiksmingai veikti su keliais trumpalaikiais faktais, triukšmu ir dvigubų sąsajų struktūra. Mūsų modelis gerokai viršija pažangiausią struktūrizuotą sprendimą sprendžiant sudėtingus įvairių sunkumų keliamus klausimus, taip pat pašalinant priklausomybę nuo rankiniu būdu tvarkomų žinių.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што постигна значителен напредок во фактоидното одговорување на прашањата (QA), одговорот на комплексните прашања останува предизвикувачки, обично барајќи големо тело знаење и техники на конференција. Отворена информација екстракција (Отворена ИЕ) обезбедува начин за генерирање поластруктурирано знаење за QA, но досега ваквото знаење се користи само за одговор на едноставни прашања со методи базирани на преземање. Го надминуваме ова ограничување со претставување на метод за размислување со отворено IE знаење, овозможувајќи да се решат покомплексни прашања. Користејќи неодамна предложена рамка за оптимизација на графикот за поддршка за QA, развиваме нов модел на инференција за Отворена IE, особено еден кој може да работи ефикасно со повеќе кратки факти, бучава и односната структура на двојките. Нашиот модел значително го надминува современиот структуриран решител за комплексни прашања со различни тешкотии, истовремено отстранувајќи ја и зависноста од рачно курирано знаење.', 'ms': 'While there has been substantial progress in factoid question-answering (QA), answering complex questions remains challenging, typically requiring both a large body of knowledge and inference techniques.  Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka (Open IE) menyediakan cara untuk menghasilkan pengetahuan semi-struktur untuk QA, tetapi hingga kini pengetahuan tersebut hanya digunakan untuk menjawab soalan sederhana dengan kaedah asas pemulihan. Kami mengatasi keterangan ini dengan memperkenalkan kaedah untuk alasan dengan pengetahuan IE terbuka, membolehkan soalan yang lebih kompleks untuk dikendalikan. Menggunakan kerangka optimasi graf yang diusulkan baru-baru ini untuk QA, kami mengembangkan model kesimpulan baru untuk Open IE, terutama yang boleh berfungsi dengan efektif dengan fakta pendek berbilang, bunyi, dan struktur hubungan dua kali. Model kita jauh melebihi penyelesaian struktur yang terbaik pada soalan kompleks yang sukar berbeza, sementara juga menghapuskan kepercayaan pada pengetahuan yang dikurasi secara manual.', 'ml': 'While there has been substantial progress in factoid question-answering (QA), answering complex questions remains challenging, typically requiring both a large body of knowledge and inference techniques.  @ info: status തുറന്ന IE അറിവുമായി സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം ഈ പരിധിയെ പരിജയിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d ചികിത്രമായ ചോദ്യങ് ക്യൂഎയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി അടുത്തുതന്നെ ഒരു പ്രായശ്ചിത്രം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ ഐഎ ഫ്രെയിമേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുറക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ അപരിഹ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറ', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li kien hemm progress sostanzjali fit-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fattojdi (QA), it-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi tibqa’ sfida, li tipikament teħtieġ kemm korp kbir ta’ għarfien kif ukoll tekniki ta’ inferenza. L-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa (IE Miftuħa) tipprovdi mod kif jiġi ġġenerat għarfien semistrutturat għall-QA, iżda s’issa tali għarfien intuża biss biex iwieġeb mistoqsijiet sempliċi b’metodi bbażati fuq l-irkupru. Aħna ngħelbu din il-limitazzjoni billi nippreżentaw metodu għar-raġunament bl-għarfien miftuħ tal-IE, li jippermetti li jiġu ttrattati kwistjonijiet aktar kumplessi. Bl-użu ta’ qafas ta’ ottimizzazzjoni tal-grafika ta’ appoġġ propost reċentement għall-QA, a ħna niżviluppaw mudell ġdid ta’ inferenza għall-IE Miftuħa, b’mod partikolari wieħed li jista’ jaħdem b’mod effettiv b’diversi fatti qosra, storbju, u l-istruttura relattiva tat-doppji. Our model significantly outperforms a state-of-the-art structured solver on complex questions of varying difficulty, while also removing the reliance on manually curated knowledge.', 'kk': 'Фактуалды сұрақтар жауап беру (QA) үшін көп жағдай болғанда, комплекс сұрақтарды жауап беру қажетті болады, әдетте білім мен инференциялық технологиялардың көп бөлігін қажет етеді. Ашылған мәліметті тарқату (Open IE) QA үшін жарым- құрылған білім құру жолын береді, бірақ осы білім қазірше тек қарапайым сұрақтарды алу тәсілдермен жауап беру үшін қолданылды. Біз осы шектеуді ашық IE білімімен түсіндіру әдісін көрсету арқылы көпшілікті сұрақтарды басқаруға мүмкіндік береміз. QA үшін жаңа ұсынылған графикалық оптимизациялау бағдарламасын қолданып, Open IE үшін жаңа инференциялау үлгісін құрамыз, осындай-ақ бірнеше қысқа факттар, дыбыс және түпкелердің қатынастық құрылымы Біздің моделіміз өзгертілген мәселелердің комплекс сұрақтарында құрылған құрылғының күйінің шешімін өзгертеді, сондай-ақ қолмен өзгертілген білімдерге сенімділігін өшіруге бол', 'no': 'Mens det har vært vanskeleg framgang i faktoid spørsmål-svar (QA), er det vanskeleg å svara på komplekse spørsmål, som vanlegvis krev både ein stor kropp av kunnskap og inferensningsteknikk. Opna informasjonsekstraksjon (Opna IE) gjev ein måte å laga halvstrukturerte kunnskap for QA, men til dag er denne kunnskapen berre brukt for å svara på enkle spørsmål med hentingsbaserte metodar. Vi overfører denne grensen ved å gjere ein metode for å rasjona med Open IE- kunnskapen, og tillat meir komplekse spørsmål å handtera. Bruk eit nyleg foreslått støtte-optimaliseringsrammeverk for QA, utviklar vi eit nytt infeksjonsmodul for Opna IE, spesielt ein som kan arbeide effektivt med fleire korte faktar, støy og relasjonelle struktur for tuplar. Vårt modell utfører betydelig eit strukturert løysar på komplekse spørsmål om forskjellige vanskelegheter, mens også fjernar tilbakekallinga på manuelt korta kunnskap.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy odnotowano znaczny postęp w odpowiedzi na faktyczne pytania (QA), odpowiedzi na złożone pytania pozostają trudne, zazwyczaj wymagające zarówno dużej wiedzy, jak i technik wnioskowania. Otwarta ekstrakcja informacji (Open IE) zapewnia sposób na generowanie półstrukturalnej wiedzy dla QA, ale do tej pory wiedza ta była wykorzystywana jedynie do odpowiedzi na proste pytania metodami pobierania. Przezwyciężamy to ograniczenie przedstawiając metodę rozumowania z wiedzą Open IE, umożliwiającą obsługę bardziej złożonych pytań. Wykorzystując niedawno zaproponowany framework optymalizacji grafów wsparcia dla QA, opracowujemy nowy model wnioskowania dla Open IE, w szczególności taki, który może skutecznie pracować z wieloma krótkimi faktami, szumem i strukturą relacyjną krotek. Nasz model znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejszy strukturalny rozwiązywacz złożonych pytań o różnych trudnościach, jednocześnie eliminując poleganie na ręcznie kurowanej wiedzy.', 'ro': 'Deși s-au înregistrat progrese substanțiale în ceea ce privește răspunsul efectiv la întrebări (QA), răspunsul la întrebări complexe rămâne o provocare, necesitând de obicei atât un corp mare de cunoștințe, cât și tehnici de deducție. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) oferă o modalitate de a genera cunoștințe semi-structurate pentru QA, dar până în prezent astfel de cunoștințe au fost folosite doar pentru a răspunde la întrebări simple cu metode bazate pe recuperare. Depășim această limită prin prezentarea unei metode de raționament cu cunoștințe Open IE, permițând soluționarea întrebărilor mai complexe. Folosind un cadru de optimizare a graficului de suport propus recent pentru QA, dezvoltăm un nou model de inferență pentru Open IE, în special unul care poate funcționa eficient cu mai multe fapte scurte, zgomot și structura relațională a tuplelor. Modelul nostru depășește semnificativ un soluționar structurat de ultimă generație pe probleme complexe de dificultate diferită, eliminând în același timp încrederea în cunoștințele curate manual.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර (QA) වලින් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අ Name අපි මේ සීමාව ප්\u200dරධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ, Open IE දන්නවන් සඳහා සලකුණු විදිහට, තව ස QA වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විවෘත කරනවා IE වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ අපේ මොඩල් විශේෂයෙන් වෙනස් අමාරුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, සමහර විශේෂ විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන', 'sr': 'Iako je postojao značajan napredak u odgovoru na faktoidne pitanja (QA), odgovor na složena pitanja ostaje izazovan, obično zahteva veliko tijelo znanja i infekcije. Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (Otvorena IE) pruža način za stvaranje polu-strukturiranog znanja za QA, ali do sada se takvo znanje koristilo samo za odgovor na jednostavna pitanja sa metodama na osnovu povratka. Prešaljemo ovu ograničenje predstavljajući metodu rasprave sa znanjem otvorenog IE-a, omogućavajući da se rješavaju složenije pitanja. Koristeći nedavno predloženi okvir optimizacije grafika za QA, razvijamo novi model infekcije za otvoren IE, posebno onaj koji može efektivno raditi sa višekratnim činjenicama, bukom i vezanom strukturom tupla. Naš model značajno iznosi stanje-umjetničkog strukturiranog rješavača na kompleksnih pitanja različitih poteškoća, a takođe uklanjanje pouzdanosti na ručno iskriveno znanje.', 'mn': 'Фактойдын асуулт хариулт (QA) дээр маш чухал хөгжлийн үр дүнд орсон ч комплекс асуултуудын хариулт нь хэцүү байдаг. Яг ихэвчлэн мэдлэг болон халдварын технологи хоёуланг хэрэгтэй. Мэдээлэл нээх (Open IE) нь QA-ын хагас бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг үүсгэх арга юм. Гэхдээ энэ мэдлэг хүртэл зөвхөн хамгийн энгийн асуултуудыг авах арга замаар хариулах боломжтой болсон. Бид энэ хязгаарыг нээлттэй IE мэдлэгтэй илүү нарийн асуултуудыг удирдах арга замаар илэрхийлж чадна. QA-ын саяхан дэмжих графикийг ашиглан бид Open IE-ийн шинэ инференцийн загварыг ашиглаж, ялангуяа олон богино жинхэнэ үнэндээ, чимээг, харилцааны бүтэц бүтээмжтэй ажиллаж чадна. Бидний загвар нь өөр өөр хэцүү асуултуудын төвөгтэй байдал болон урлагийн бүтээгдэхүүний шийдвэрлэгчийг илүү чухал болгодог.', 'ka': 'მაგრამ ფექტიოდის კითხვების გარეშე (QA) მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი იყო, როგორც კომპლექტური კითხვების გარეშე უკვე შესაძლებელია, როგორც განსაკუთრებული იყო, როგორც უნდა Name ჩვენ გადავიწყეთ ეს დაზრუქება, რომელიც გახსნა IE მეცნიერებით გასაკეთებელი პროცემის გასაკეთებელად, რომელიც უფრო კომპლექტური კითხვების გასაკეთ QA-ის ახლა დავიყენებთ ახალი ინფრენციის მოდელის გამოყენება, განსაკუთრებით ერთი, რომელიც შეუძლია მრავალ კოტატური ფაქტებით, шуმაში და პირობილური სტრუქტურაციით მუშაობით მუშა ჩვენი მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანად გავაკეთებს სტრუქტურული პროცემს კომპლექტირებული კითხვების განსხვავებული შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობაზე, როგორც მხოლოდ მანძილურად გადაწყენებ', 'so': "Intii jawaabta su'aalaha xafiiska ah (QA) waxaa jirtay horumar aad u weyn, jawaabta su'aalaha adag waxay sii jiraan dhibaato, sida caadiga ah waxay u baahan yihiin jidh aad u badan aqoon iyo qalabka cilmiga. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) provides a way to generate semi-structured knowledge for QA, but to date such knowledge has only been used to answer simple questions with retrieval-based methods.  Waxaannu ka adkaynaynaa xaduudan, si aan u soo bandhignayno qaab ay ula doodaan aqoonta furan ee IE, waxaana u ogolaannaynaa in lagu xambaaro su'aalo adag. Sida lagu isticmaalayo xarunta kaalmada ee QA, waxaynu horumarinaynaa model cusub oo cudur ah oo furan IE, khusuusan qof si faa’iido leh u shaqeyn karo waxyaabo badan oo gaaban, cod, iyo dhismaha isku xiran ee dumarka. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu si weyn u muujiyaa xaalad farshaxan oo ay ku xalliyaan su'aalo adag oo dhibaatooyin kala duduwan, isla markaasna uu ka fogeeyaa kalsoonaanta aqoonta si rasmi ah loo qoray.", 'sv': 'Även om det har gjorts betydande framsteg i faktisk frågeställning, är svaret på komplexa frågor fortfarande utmanande, vilket vanligtvis kräver både en stor mängd kunskap och slutsatsstekniker. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) ger ett sätt att generera semistrukturerad kunskap för QA, men hittills har sådan kunskap endast använts för att besvara enkla frågor med hjälp av hämtningsbaserade metoder. Vi övervinner denna begränsning genom att presentera en metod för resonemang med Open IE kunskap, vilket gör det möjligt att hantera mer komplexa frågor. Med hjälp av ett nyligen föreslaget ramverk för optimering av stödgrafer för QA utvecklar vi en ny inferensmodell för Open IE, särskilt en som kan fungera effektivt med flera korta fakta, buller och tuplers relationsstruktur. Vår modell presterar betydligt bättre än en toppmodern strukturerad lösare på komplexa frågor av varierande svårighetsgrad, samtidigt som den tar bort tilliten till manuellt kuraterad kunskap.', 'ta': 'கேள்வியின் பதில் கேள்வியில் மிகப்பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் இருக்கும் போது, சிக்கல் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்கும் சிக்கல் கேள்விகள் சவா @ info We overcome this limitation by presenting a method for reasoning with Open IE knowledge, allowing more complex questions to be handled.  சமீபத்தில் கியூஏவுக்கான ஆதரவு வரைப்படத்தின் முன்னுரிமைப்படுத்தல் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் திறந்த IE க்கு புதிய பாதிப்பு மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிற நம்முடைய மாதிரி முக்கியமாக ஒரு நிலையில் உள்ள கலை வடிவமைப்பு தீர்வு செய்கிறது பல்வேறு கடினமான கேள்விகளின் மீது சிக்கலான தீர்வு ச', 'ur': 'اگرچہ حقیقی سوال جواب دینے (QA) میں بہت بڑی پیشرفت کی گئی ہے، پیچیدہ سوال کا جواب دینا بھی مشکل ہے، جسے معمولاً علم اور نفاق تکنیک کی بڑی جسم کی ضرورت ہے۔ Open Information Extraction (Open IE) QA کے لئے نصف ساختہ علم پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیدا کرتا ہے، لیکن یہ علم تازگی تک صرف اٹھانے کے ذریعے ساده سوالوں کے جواب کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم اس محدودیت پر غالب آتے ہیں ایک طریقہ ظاہر کرنے کے لئے آسان IE علم کے ساتھ بحث کرنے کے لئے، اور اس سے زیادہ پیچیدہ سوال کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں. QA کے لئے اچھے سے پیش فرض کی حمایت گراف optimization فرم کے مطابق، ہم ایک نوی اپنا انفارنس ماڈل کو کھولتے ہیں، مخصوصاً ایک جو بہت چھوٹی حقیقت، صدا اور ٹوپل کے ارتباط ساختار کے ساتھ کامیابی کرسکتا ہے. ہماری مدل بہت زیادہ مشکلات کے پیچیدہ سوالوں پر ایک ایسی حالت کی ساختہ حل کرنے والی ہے، اور اپنے ہاتھ سے دھوکا ہوا علم پر اعتماد بھی ہٹاتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Tuy rằng đã có tiến triển đáng kể trong việc giải đáp các câu hỏi bằng chứng, nhưng trả lời các câu hỏi phức tạp vẫn là một thử thách, đặc biệt đòi hỏi cả hai kỹ thuật hiểu biết và luận. Việc khai thác thông tin (Open Iễ) cung cấp một cách để tạo hiểu biết semi-structure of QA, nhưng cho tới nay chỉ dùng những kiến thức này để trả lời các câu hỏi đơn giản bằng phương pháp phục hồi. Chúng ta vượt qua giới hạn này bằng cách đưa ra phương pháp lý luận với kiến thức Iễ Xanh, cho phép xử lý những câu hỏi phức tạp hơn. Sử dụng hệ thống tối đa đồ thị dự kiến gần đây cho QA, chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình nhận biết mới cho Open Iễ, đặc biệt là một loại có thể hoạt động hiệu quả với nhiều sự kiện ngắn, tiếng ồn, và cấu trúc liên quan của tuples. Cách này khả năng cao hơn một chuyên gia giải quyết cấu trúc tiên tiến về những vấn đề phức tạp khác nhau và cũng xóa bỏ sự dựa dẫm vào kiến thức được giám sát bằng tay.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Biz bu chegarani ochish IE haqida murakkab savollarni boshqarishga ruxsat beramiz. Using a recently proposed support graph optimization framework for QA, we develop a new inference model for Open IE, in particular one that can work effectively with multiple short facts, noise, and the relational structure of tuples.  Bizning modelimiz murakkablik muammolarning murakkablik muammolari haqida ishlab chiqaradi, va qoʻlbola qo'lbola qo'llangan ilma ishonini olib tashlaydi.", 'bg': 'Въпреки че има значителен напредък в областта на фактическото отговаряне на въпроси, отговорът на сложни въпроси остава предизвикателство, обикновено изисква както голям набор от знания, така и техники за заключения. Отвореното извличане на информация (Отворено ИЕ) осигурява начин за генериране на полуструктурирани знания за оценка на качеството, но до днешна дата такива знания са били използвани само за отговор на прости въпроси с методи, базирани на извличане. Ние преодоляваме това ограничение, като представим метод за разсъждаване с познания за отворено ИЕ, позволявайки да бъдат разгледани по-сложни въпроси. Използвайки наскоро предложена рамка за оптимизиране на графиката за поддръжка на качеството, ние разработваме нов модел за заключения за отворен ИЕ, по-специално такъв, който може да работи ефективно с множество кратки факти, шум и релационната структура на туплите. Нашият модел значително надминава най-съвременните структурирани решения по сложни въпроси с различна трудност, като същевременно премахва зависимостта от ръчно подбрани знания.', 'hr': 'Iako je postojao značajan napredak u odgovoru na faktoidne pitanja (QA), odgovor na složena pitanja ostaje izazovan, obično zahtijevajući i veliko tijelo znanja i infekcije. Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (Otvorena IE) pruža način za proizvedenje polu strukturiranih znanja za QA, ali do sada se takvo znanje koristilo samo za odgovor na jednostavna pitanja s metodama na osnovu povratka. Prekidamo ovu ograničenje predstavljajući metodu rasprave s znanjem otvorenog IE-a, omogućavajući rješavanje složenijih pitanja. Koristeći nedavno predloženi okvir optimizacije grafa podrške za QA, razvijamo novi model infekcije otvorenog IE-a, posebno onaj koji može učinkovito raditi s višekratnim činjenicama, bukom i odnosim strukturom tupla. Naš model značajno iznosi stanje-umjetničkog strukturiranog rješavača na kompleksnih pitanja različitih poteškoća, istovremeno uklanjajući pouzdanost na rukopisano znanje.', 'nl': 'Hoewel er aanzienlijke vooruitgang is geboekt op het gebied van factoïde vragen beantwoorden (QA), blijft het beantwoorden van complexe vragen uitdagend en vereist meestal zowel een grote hoeveelheid kennis als inferentietechnieken. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) biedt een manier om semi-gestructureerde kennis te genereren voor QA, maar tot op heden wordt deze kennis alleen gebruikt om eenvoudige vragen te beantwoorden met behulp van retrieval-gebaseerde methoden. We overwinnen deze beperking door een methode voor redeneren te presenteren met Open IE kennis, waardoor complexere vragen kunnen worden behandeld. Met behulp van een recent voorgesteld ondersteuningsgraf optimalisatie framework voor QA, ontwikkelen we een nieuw inferentiemodel voor Open IE, in het bijzonder een dat effectief kan werken met meerdere korte feiten, ruis en de relationele structuur van tupels. Ons model presteert aanzienlijk beter dan een state-of-the-art gestructureerde oplosser voor complexe vragen van verschillende moeilijkheden, terwijl het ook de afhankelijkheid van handmatig samengestelde kennis wegneemt.', 'id': 'Meskipun ada kemajuan yang besar dalam menjawab pertanyaan faktoid (QA), menjawab pertanyaan kompleks tetap menantang, biasanya memerlukan tubuh besar pengetahuan dan teknik kesimpulan. Ekstraksi Informasi Buka (Open IE) menyediakan cara untuk menghasilkan pengetahuan semi-struktur untuk QA, tetapi sehari-hari pengetahuan tersebut hanya digunakan untuk menjawab pertanyaan sederhana dengan metode berdasarkan retrieval. We overcome this limitation by presenting a method for reasoning with Open IE knowledge, allowing more complex questions to be handled.  Using a recently proposed support graph optimization framework for QA, we develop a new inference model for Open IE, in particular one that can work effectively with multiple short facts, noise, and the relational structure of tuples.  Model kami sangat melebihi penyelesaian struktur yang terbaik pada pertanyaan kompleks dari kesulitan yang berbeda, sementara juga menghapus kepercayaan pada pengetahuan yang dikurasi secara manual.', 'de': 'Zwar gibt es erhebliche Fortschritte bei der faktischen Beantwortung von Fragen (QA), die Beantwortung komplexer Fragen bleibt jedoch eine Herausforderung, die typischerweise sowohl ein großes Wissen als auch Inferenztechniken erfordert. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) bietet eine Möglichkeit, semi-strukturiertes Wissen für QA zu generieren, aber bisher wurde dieses Wissen nur verwendet, um einfache Fragen mit Retrieval-basierten Methoden zu beantworten. Wir überwinden diese Einschränkung, indem wir eine Methode zum Argumentieren mit Open IE-Wissen vorstellen, die es erlaubt, komplexere Fragen zu bearbeiten. Unter Verwendung eines kürzlich vorgeschlagenen Frameworks zur Optimierung von Unterstützungsdiagrammen für QA entwickeln wir ein neues Inferenzmodell für Open IE, insbesondere eines, das effektiv mit mehreren kurzen Fakten, Rauschen und der relationalen Struktur von Tupeln arbeiten kann. Unser Modell übertrifft einen hochmodernen strukturierten Löser bei komplexen Fragestellungen unterschiedlicher Schwierigkeitsgrade deutlich und beseitigt gleichzeitig die Abhängigkeit von manuell kuratiertem Wissen.', 'ko': '요소문답(QA)에서 실질적인 진전이 있었지만, 복잡한 질문에 답하는 데는 여전히 도전적이어서 대개 많은 지식과 추리 기술이 필요하다.개방형 정보 추출(Open Information Extraction, Open IE)은 QA에 반구조화된 지식을 생성하는 방법을 제공하지만, 지금까지 이런 지식은 검색 기반 방법으로만 간단한 질문에 대답하는 데 사용되었다.우리는 개방적인 IE 지식을 이용하여 추리하는 방법을 제공함으로써 이 한계를 극복하고 더욱 복잡한 문제를 처리할 수 있도록 한다.최근에 제시한 지원도를 이용하여 QA 프레임워크를 최적화하고 우리는 개방식 IE를 위해 새로운 추리 모델을 개발했다. 특히 여러 개의 짧은 사실, 소음과 원조 관계 구조를 효과적으로 처리할 수 있는 추리 모델을 개발했다.서로 다른 난이도의 복잡한 문제에서 우리의 모델은 가장 선진적인 구조화 구해기보다 현저히 우수하고 수동 기획에 대한 지식에 대한 의존도 없앴다.', 'da': 'Selvom der er sket betydelige fremskridt i faktisk spørgsmål-besvarelse (QA), er besvarelsen af komplekse spørgsmål stadig udfordrende, hvilket typisk kræver både en stor mængde viden og inference teknikker. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) giver mulighed for at generere semi-struktureret viden til QA, men hidtil har denne viden kun været brugt til at besvare enkle spørgsmål med hentningsbaserede metoder. Vi overvinder denne begrænsning ved at præsentere en metode til ræsonnement med Open IE viden, så mere komplekse spørgsmål kan håndteres. Ved hjælp af et nyligt foreslået understøttegrafoptimeringsramme for QA udvikler vi en ny inference model for Open IE, især en, der kan arbejde effektivt med flere korte fakta, støj og den relationelle struktur af tupler. Vores model overgår betydeligt en state-of-the-art struktureret løser på komplekse spørgsmål af varierende vanskeligheder, samtidig med at afhængigheden af manuelt kurateret viden fjernes.', 'sw': 'Wakati kulikuwa na maendeleo makubwa katika majibu ya maswali ya kiukweli (QA), kujibu maswali ya tatizo bado yanaendelea kuwa na changamoto, kwa kawaida inahitaji vyote vikubwa vya maarifa na teknolojia zisizo na uvumi. Utoa wa Habari Huru (Open IE) unatoa njia ya kutengeneza maarifa yenye ujenzi wa sekondari kwa ajili ya QA, lakini mpaka sasa maarifa kama haya yametumika kujibu maswali rahisi kwa njia za kurejea. Tunaishinda vizuizi hiki kwa kutoa njia ya kujadiliana na ufahamu wa wazi wa Umoja wa Mataifa (IE), na kuwaruhusu maswali magumu yanayowakabili. Kwa kutumia mfumo wa uboreshaji wa picha wa hivi karibuni unapendekezwa kuunga mkono mkono QA, tunatengeneza modeli mpya ya maambukizi kwa ajili ya Uhuru wa IE, hususani moja ambalo inaweza kufanya kazi kwa ufanisi na ukweli mfupi, sauti, na muundo wa mahusiano wa vifaa. Mfano wetu unaonyesha hali ya sanaa inayotengenezwa kwa utatuzi wa maswali magumu kuhusu matatizo tofauti yanayotofauti, na pia kuondoa kutegemea imani ya maarifa yanayotokana na mikononi.', 'fa': 'در حالی که پیشرفت زیادی در جواب سوال\u200cهای فکتوئید (QA) وجود داشته است، جواب سوال\u200cهای پیچیده باقی مانده\u200cاند، معمولاً به عنوان یک بدن بزرگ از دانش و تکنیک\u200cهای آلودگی نیاز دارد. اخراج اطلاعات باز (Open IE) راهی برای تولید دانش نیمه ساخته برای QA پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، ولی برای تازگی این دانش فقط برای پاسخ پرسش ساده با روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cگیری استفاده می\u200cشود. ما این محدودیت را از طریق پیشنهاد یک روش برای منطقی با دانش IE باز می کنیم و اجازه می دهیم سوالات پیچیده\u200cتر را حل کنند. استفاده از یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مدل ما به طور کلی یک حل ساخته شده هنری را بر سوالات پیچیده از مشکلات مختلف انجام می دهد، در حالی که اعتماد به دانش دستی محکوم می شود.', 'af': "Alhoewel daar betekende vordering in faktoide vraag-antwoord (QA) is, sal die antwoord van komplekse vraagte bly aangelyk, tydelik verlang beide 'n groot liggaam van kennis en inferensie-teknike. Open Informasie Uitpakking (Open IE) verskaf 'n manier om semistruktureerde kennis vir QA te genereer, maar tot datum sodanige kennis is slegs gebruik om eenvoudige vrae te antwoord met ontvang- gebaseerde metodes. Ons oorwin hierdie beperking deur 'n metode te voorsien vir rede met Open IE kennis, wat meer komplekse vrae kan hanteer word. By gebruik van 'n onlangs voorgestelde ondersteunde graaf optimalisasie raamwerk vir QA, ontwikkel ons 'n nuwe inferensie model vir Open IE, spesifieke een wat effektief kan werk met veelvuldige kort fakte, ruis en die relasionele struktuur van tuples. Ons model uitvoer betekenlik 'n staat van die kuns structureerde oplosser op komplekse vrae van verskillende moeilikheid, terwyl ook die vertrouing van die eie vertroue kennis verwyder.", 'sq': "Ndërsa ka patur përparim thelbësor në përgjigjen faktoide të pyetjeve (QA), përgjigja e pyetjeve komplekse mbetet e vështirë, duke kërkuar zakonisht si një trup të madh njohurie dhe teknikash përfundimi. Ekstraktimi i Informacionit të Hapur (Open IE) ofron një mënyrë për të gjeneruar njohuri gjysmë-strukturuar për QA, por deri tani njohuria e tillë është përdorur vetëm për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve të thjeshta me metoda bazuar në marrje. We overcome this limitation by presenting a method for reasoning with Open IE knowledge, allowing more complex questions to be handled.  Duke përdorur një kuadër optimizimi të grafikut të propozuar kohët e fundit për QA, ne zhvillojmë një model të ri përfundimi për Open IE, veçanërisht një që mund të funksionojë efektivisht me fakte të shumta të shkurtra, zhurmë dhe strukturën marrëdhënie të dyfisheve. Modeli ynë mbivlerëson ndjeshëm një zgjidhës strukturuar më të lartë në çështje komplekse me vështirësi të ndryshme, duke hequr gjithashtu mbështetjen në njohuritë e kuruara manualisht.", 'tr': 'Faktoid soragy jogap bermek üçin örän täsirli ilerleme bar bolsa-da kompleks soraglary jogap bermek hem kynçylyk ýok bolýar, adatça hem bilim we alçak teknikleriň uly bedeni gerek bolýar. Aç Maglumat Açmak Biz bu limiti Aç IE bilgi bilen düşünmek üçin bir yöntemi göstererek, a ňsatlyk soraglary çözmesine rugsat berdik. QA üçin iň soňky teklip eden grafik optimizasy frameworkyny ullanýarys. Biz Aç IE üçin täze bir a şyk nusgasy düzenleýäris. Özellikde birnäçe gysga faktalar, gürrüň we tupunlaryň relasiýaly strukturasy bilen etkinleşebilir. Biziň modelimiz çykyş kynçylyklaryň karmaşık soraglarynda möhüm bir şekilde döredir, elle çykyş bilen ynamyny ýitirýär.', 'am': 'የውጤት ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) በተለየ ጥያቄዎችን በመመለስ ጊዜ ትክክለኛ ጥያቄዎችን በመቀበል የሚቀበል ነው፤ በተለያይነት የእውቀትና የግንኙነት ስህተት እና የግንኙነት ጥያቄዎችን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የኩነቶች መረጃ ማውጣት (ክፈት IE) ለQA የsemi-ሠረታዊ እውቀትን ለመፍጠር የሚችል መንገድ ነው፤ ነገር ግን እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ ይህ እውቀት ቀላል ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ በተደረገ መጠቀም ጥያቄዎች ብቻ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የኢሜይል እውቀት ጋር ለመነጋገር የግንኙነትን ሥርዓት እናሸንፈዋለን፣ እና ብዙ ጭንቀት ጥያቄዎችን ለመቆጠር እንችላለን፡፡ በቅርብ ዘመን ለQA የተመሳሳይ የግራፍ ምርጫዎች ፍሬም በመጠቀም፣ ለክፈት IE አዲስ ውጤቶች፣ ድምፅ እና ግንኙነት አካባቢ መሠረት የሚችል አዲስ ነጻ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በተለያዩ ጭንቀት ጥያቄዎች ላይ የተመሳሰለውን የሀገሩን ሥርዓት ትክክለኛ ፍትሕት እና እውቀትን በተለየ እውቀት ላይ መተማመንን እናስወግዳለን፡፡', 'az': 'Faktioid sual cavab verməkdə çox ileri gəlib çatdığı halda, kompleks suallara cavab vermək çətin deyildir, genellikle də bilgi və infeksiya tekniklərinin böyük bir bedeni ehtiyacı var. QA üçün yarı strukturlı bilgi yaratmaq üçün a çıq məlumat Extraction (Open IE) yolu göstərir, amma bu bilgi günə qədər yalnız alınma metodları ilə basit suallara cavab vermək üçün istifadə edildi. Biz bu limiti a çıq IE elmi ilə müzakirə etmək üçün bir metod göstərdik, daha kompleks sualları çəkməyə izin veririk. QA üçün yeni təbliğ edilmiş grafik optimizasyon framework ünü istifadə edərək, Açıq IE üçün yeni infeksiya modeli təmizləyirik, özlərinə də çoxlu qısa faktalarla, səslərlə və tüpüllərin əlaqəsi ilə müvafiq olaraq çalışa bilər. Bizim modellərimiz müxtəlif çətinliklərlə müxtəlif soruşmalar üzərində müxtəlif bir sanat müəyyən edilmiş çözücüsünü daha çox üstün edir, həmçinin də əl çəkilmiş bilgi üzərində təvəkkül edir.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ փակտոիդ հարցերի պատասխանի (QA) մեծ առաջընթաց է կատարվել, բարդ հարցերի պատասխանը դեռևս դժվար է, սովորաբար պահանջում է գիտելիքների և եզրակացության մեթոդներ: Բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանումը (բաց ինտերնետ) հնարավորություն է տալիս ստեղծել QA-ի համար կիսակառուցվածքային գիտելիքներ, բայց մինչ օրս այդ գիտելիքները օգտագործվել են միայն պարզ հարցերի պատասխանելու համար վերադարձման հիմնված մեթոդներով: Մենք հաղթահարում ենք այս սահմանափակումները՝ ներկայացնելով բաց ինտերնետային ինտերնետային գիտելիքների հետ մտածելու մեթոդ, որը թույլ է տալիս ավելի բարդ հարցեր լուծել: Օգտագործելով վերջերս առաջարկված աջակցության գրաֆիկի օպտիմացման շրջանակը QA-ի համար, մենք զարգանում ենք նոր եզրակացության մոդել բաց IP-ի համար, հատկապես մի մոդել, որը կարող է արդյունավետ աշխատել բազմաթիվ կարճ փաստերի, աղմուկի և երկ Մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր կառուցվածքավորված լուծողին տարբեր դժվարությունների բարդ հարցերի վրա, միաժամանակ վերացնում է կախվածությունը ձեռքով կորտերացված գիտելիքների վրա:', 'bn': 'যদিও ফ্যাক্টোইড প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) বিশাল অগ্রগতি রয়েছে, তবে জটিল প্রশ্নের উত্তর এখনো চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে, সাধারণত জ্ঞান এবং অনমুক্ত প্রযুক্ত খোলা তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশন (খোলা আই) কিউএ এর জন্য সেমি কাঠামো জ্ঞান তৈরি করার একটি উপায় দিয়েছে, কিন্তু এখন পর্যন্ত এই জ্ঞান পুনরুদ্ধ আমরা এই সীমাবদ্ধতার মাধ্যমে উন্মুক্ত আই.ই. জ্ঞানের সাথে যুক্তি প্রদান করার একটি পদ্ধতি প্রদান করেছি, আরো জটিল প্রশ্ন সাম্প্রতিক একটি প্রস্তাবিত গ্রাফ অপারেশন ফ্রেম ব্যবহার করে আমরা উন্মুক্ত ইউ-এর জন্য একটি নতুন আক্রান্ত মডেল তৈরি করি, বিশেষ করে যা কার্যকর কর কাজ করতে পারে বেশ কয়েকটি স আমাদের মডেল অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিভিন্ন সমস্যার সমাধানের উপর একটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের কাঠামোর সমাধান প্রকাশ করে, আর তারা নিজেদের হাতে সু', 'cs': 'Zatímco došlo k značnému pokroku v odpovědi na faktické otázky (QA), zodpovězení složitých otázek zůstává náročné, obvykle vyžaduje jak velký soubor znalostí, tak techniky odvozu. Otevřená extrakce informací (Open IE) poskytuje způsob, jak generovat polostrukturované znalosti pro QA, avšak dosud byly tyto znalosti použity pouze k odpovědi na jednoduché otázky metodami založenými na vyhledávání. Toto omezení překonáváme představením metody uvažování se znalostmi Open IE, která umožňuje řešení složitějších otázek. S využitím nedávno navrženého optimalizačního frameworku grafů pro QA vyvíjíme nový model inference pro Open IE, zejména takový, který dokáže efektivně pracovat s několika krátkými fakty, šumem a relační strukturou tulů. Náš model výrazně překonává nejmodernější strukturované řešitele složitých otázek různé obtížnosti a zároveň odstraňuje závislost na ručně kurovaných znalostech.', 'ca': "Mentre hi ha hagut progrés substancial en la resposta a preguntes factoides (QA), respondre a preguntes complexes encara és difícil, que normalment requereix tant un gran nombre de tècniques de coneixement com de inferència. L'Open Information Extraction (Open IE) proporciona una manera de generar coneixements semiestructurats per a QA, però fins ara aquest coneixement només s'ha utilitzat per respondre preguntes senzilles amb mètodes basats en la recuperació. Vam superar aquesta limitació presentant un mètode de raonament amb coneixement d'IE obert, permetent tractar preguntes més complexes. Utilitzant un marc d'optimització del gràfic de suport proposat recentment per a QA, desenvolupem un nou model de inferència per a Open IE, en particular un que pot funcionar efectivament amb múltiples fets curts, soroll i l'estructura relacional de dobles. El nostre model supera significativament un solucionador estructurat d'última generació en preguntes complexes de difícil canvi, alhora que elimina la confiança en coneixements curats manualment.", 'bs': 'Iako je postojao značajan napredak u odgovoru na faktoidne pitanja (QA), odgovor na složena pitanja ostaje izazovan, obično zahtijevajući i veliko tijelo znanja i infekcije. Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (Otvorena IE) pruža način za stvaranje polu-strukturiranog znanja za QA, ali do sada se takvo znanje koristi samo za odgovor na jednostavna pitanja sa metodama na osnovu povratka. Prešaljemo ovu ograničenje predstavljajući metodu rasprave s znanjem otvorenog IE-a, omogućavajući da se rješavaju složenije pitanja. Koristeći nedavno predloženi okvir optimizacije grafa za QA, razvijamo novi model infekcije za otvoren IE, posebno onaj koji može djelotvorno raditi sa višekratkom činjenicama, bukom i vezanom strukturom tupla. Naš model značajno nadmašuje državu umjetnosti strukturiranog rješavača na kompleksnih pitanja različitih poteškoća, a također uklanjanje pouzdanosti na rukopisano znanje.', 'et': 'Kuigi faktilistele küsimustele vastamisel on tehtud märkimisväärseid edusamme, on keerukatele küsimustele vastamine jätkuvalt keeruline, mis nõuab tavaliselt nii suurt kogumit teadmisi kui ka järeldustehnikaid. Avatud teabe ekstraheerimine (Open IE) annab võimaluse luua poolstruktureeritud teadmisi kvaliteedi tagamiseks, kuid seni on neid teadmisi kasutatud ainult lihtsatele küsimustele vastamiseks otsingupõhiste meetoditega. Me ületame selle piirangu, esitades meetodi arutlemiseks avatud IE teadmistega, mis võimaldab käsitleda keerulisemaid küsimusi. Kasutades hiljuti väljapakutud tugigraafiku optimeerimisraamistikku kvaliteedi tagamiseks, töötame välja uue järeldusmudeli avatud IE jaoks, eriti sellise, mis suudab tõhusalt töötada mitme lühifakti, müra ja tuplite suhtelise struktuuriga. Meie mudel ületab oluliselt kaasaegset struktureeritud lahendust erineva raskusega keerukatel küsimustel, eemaldades samal ajal ka käsitsi kureeritud teadmistele tuginemise.', 'fi': 'Vaikka tosiasiallisten kysymysten vastaamisessa on edistytty huomattavasti, monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin vastaaminen on edelleen haastavaa, ja se vaatii yleensä sekä laajaa tietämystä että päättelytekniikoita. Open Information Extraction (Open IE) tarjoaa tavan tuottaa puolistrukturoitua tietoa laadunvarmistukseen, mutta tähän mennessä tällaista tietoa on käytetty vain yksinkertaisiin kysymyksiin vastaamiseen hakupohjaisilla menetelmillä. Ylitämme tämän rajoituksen esittämällä avoimen IE-osaamisen päättelymenetelmän, joka mahdollistaa monimutkaisempien kysymysten käsittelyn. Käyttäen äskettäin ehdotettua tukigraafien optimointikehystä laadunvarmistukselle kehitämme uuden päättelymallin Open IE:lle, erityisesti sellaisen, joka pystyy toimimaan tehokkaasti useiden lyhyiden faktojen, kohinan ja tuplien relaatiorakenteen kanssa. Mallimme on huomattavasti parempi kuin huipputekninen strukturoitu ratkaisija monimutkaisissa ja vaikeissa kysymyksissä ja poistaa samalla riippuvuuden manuaalisesti kuratoidusta tiedosta.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ana ing nglanggar nganggo barang-suarané karo pak-suarané sing rumangsa gampang Open Info extract Awak dhéwé nggawe limiting this limitation by present a method for rationaling with Open INE knownMonitor vendor Gujaring shadow model dhéwé éntuk akeh akeh langgar-akeh luwih-akeh nggawe gerakan seneng pisan sing apik sing kalagayaan karo nggawe kesempatan, lan akeh njaluké awak dhéwé nggawe aturan sing ngedhuwèké.', 'ha': "Alhãli kuwa an sami marubuci mai girma a cikin su karɓa wa tambayar faktoid (QA), kuma masu karɓar wa maswali masu husũma yana mai walau, a bayan haka, yana tambayar su da duk jama'a mai girma ga ilmi da kuma masu yin kashẽwa. @ action: button Mu rinjãya wannan tsarin da za'a gaura wata hanyoyi wa yin magana da bayani na IU, kuma za'a yarda da su karɓi wasu maswali masu adadi. Yi amfani da wani firam na kwamfyutan tebur na goyi wa QA, za mu buɗe wata shekara na kafin kwamfyuta wa Open IU, hususann wannan da ke iya amfani da amfani da masu ƙaranci masu ƙaranci, sauti da mazaunin rubutu. Misalinmu yana fara cikin halin-sanar da aka samar da shi kan masu tambayar masu husu'a masu nau'i masu nau'i, kuma kuma yana tafiyar da aminci kan da aka faɗa da hannayen ilmi.", 'sk': 'Čeprav je bil dosežen znaten napredek pri dejanskem odgovarjanju na vprašanja, odgovarjanje na kompleksna vprašanja ostaja izziv, običajno zahteva veliko znanja in tehnike sklepanja. Odprto izvlečevanje informacij (Open IE) zagotavlja način za ustvarjanje polstrukturiranega znanja za zagotavljanje kakovosti, vendar je bilo do danes takšno znanje uporabljeno le za odgovore na preprosta vprašanja z metodami, ki temeljijo na iskanju. To omejitev premagamo s predstavitvijo metode razmišljanja z znanjem Odprtega IE, ki omogoča obravnavo bolj kompleksnih vprašanj. Z nedavno predlaganim okvirom za optimizacijo podpornih grafov za kakovost smo razvili nov model sklepanja za Open IE, zlasti tisti, ki lahko učinkovito deluje z več kratkimi dejstvi, hrupom in relacijsko strukturo tuplov. Naš model znatno presega najsodobnejše strukturirane reševalce na kompleksnih vprašanjih različnih težavnosti, hkrati pa odpravlja zanašanje na ročno kurirano znanje.', 'he': 'למרות שהייתה התקדמות משמעותית בתשובות לשאלות (QA), התשובות לשאלות מורכבות נשארות מאתגרות, בדרך כלל דורשת גוף גדול של ידע וטכניקות המצאה. הוצאת מידע פתוח (IE פתוח) מספקת דרך לייצר ידע חצי מבוסס עבור QA, אך עד היום ידע כזה השתמש רק כדי לענות על שאלות פשוטות עם שיטות מבוססות השיגה. אנו מתגברים על הגבלה הזו בכך שהציגנו שיטה להסבירה עם ידע IE פתוח, מאפשר לטפל בשאלות מורכבות יותר. Using a recently proposed support graph optimization framework for QA, we develop a new inference model for Open IE, in particular one that can work effectively with multiple short facts, noise, and the relational structure of tuples.  המודל שלנו מוביל במידה משמעותית יותר מפתור מובנה במצב מוקדם על שאלות מורכבות של קשות שונות, בעוד גם להסיר את תלויה בידע מוטפל ידנית.', 'bo': 'དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ་བ(QA)ལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡོད་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་ཀར་ངལ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ ཆ་འཕྲིན་དབྱེ་བ(Open IE)སྤྲོད་ནས་QA་ལ་ཕྱེད་གཞུང་གི་གནས We overcome this limitation by presenting a method for reasoning with Open IE knowledge, allowing more complex questions to be handled. Using a recently proposed graph optimization framework for QA, we develop a new inference model for Open IE, in particular one that can work effectively with multiple short facts, noise, and the relational structure of tuples. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་གནད་དོན་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་མེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ལས་ཕན་ཐོག་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Bootstrapping for Numerical Open IE', 'ar': 'Bootstrapping لـ IE العددية المفتوحة', 'es': 'Arranque para Numerical Open IE', 'pt': 'Bootstrapping para Numerical Open IE', 'fr': 'Bootstrapping pour Numerical Open IE', 'ja': '数値オープンIEのブートストラップ', 'zh': '数开 IE 自举', 'hi': 'संख्यात्मक ओपन IE के लिए बूटस्ट्रैपिंग', 'ru': 'Bootstrapping for Numerical Open IE (Загрузка для числового открытого IE)', 'ga': 'Bootstrapping le haghaidh Uimhriúil Oscailte IE', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Indításjavítás numerikus nyílt IE-hez', 'el': 'Bootstrapping για Numerical Open IE', 'it': 'Avvio per IE aperto numerico', 'kk': 'Төмірлік ашылған IE үшін көшірмелеу', 'lt': 'Skaitmeninio atviro IE įjungimas', 'ms': 'Perangkap Boot untuk IE Buka Nomrik', 'ml': 'അക്കങ്ങള്\u200d തുറക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ബുട്ട്രാപ്പിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Trażżin tad-dgħajjes għal IE Numerika Miftuħa', 'mn': 'Тоон нээлттэй IE-ийн хувьд дэлгүүр', 'no': 'Bootstrapping for numerisk open IE', 'pl': 'Bootstrapping dla numerycznego otwartego IE', 'ro': 'Pornire pentru IE deschisă numerică', 'sr': 'Skupina za brojni otvoreni IE', 'si': 'අංක විවෘත IE වෙනුවෙන් බුට්ස්ට්\u200dරැප් කරනවා', 'so': 'Bannaanta boosaska lambarada furan IE', 'sv': 'Startband för numerisk öppen IE', 'mk': 'Стартување за броевно отворено IE', 'ur': 'Numerical Open IE کے لئے Bootstrapping', 'ta': 'எண்வகை திற IE க்கான புத்தகக்குறிப்பு', 'uz': 'Raqamli ochiq IE uchun xatchoʻplarni olish', 'vi': 'Khởi động cho Số Cơ Quan Sinh', 'bg': 'Bootstrapping for Numérico Open IE', 'hr': 'Skupina za brojni otvoreni IE', 'nl': 'Bootstrapping voor numeriek open IE', 'id': 'Bootstrapping for Numerical Open IE', 'de': 'Bootstrapping für Numerical Open IE', 'fa': 'فصل\u200cبندی برای IE باز شماره', 'tr': 'Eded Aç IE üçin alim gaýşartma', 'ko': '디지털 오픈 IE의 자진', 'da': 'Bootstraping for Numerical Open IE', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Bootstrapping vir Numeriese Open IE', 'sq': 'Trap për IE të hapur numëror', 'az': 'Say캼sal A칞캼q IE 칲칞칲n n칬qt톛l톛r', 'sw': 'Kupima vitabu kwa ajili ya Open IE', 'bn': 'সংখ্যা খোলার জন্য বুটট্র্যাপিং', 'hy': 'Comment', 'et': 'Alglaadimine numbrilise avatud IE jaoks', 'ca': 'Bootstrapping for Numerical Open IE', 'cs': 'Bootstrapping pro numerický otevřený IE', 'bs': 'Skupina za brojni otvoreni IE', 'fi': 'Käynnistysnauha numeeriselle avoimelle IE: lle', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'לכודת מגפיים עבור IE פתוחה מספרית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zagonski trak za numerično odprto IE', 'bo': 'ཨང་གྲངས་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བའི་IE ལ་འཕགས་རིས'}
{'en': 'We design and release BONIE, the first open numerical relation extractor, for extracting Open IE tuples where one of the arguments is a number or a quantity-unit phrase. BONIE uses bootstrapping to learn the specific dependency patterns that express numerical relations in a sentence. BONIE’s novelty lies in task-specific customizations, such as inferring implicit relations, which are clear due to context such as units (for e.g., ‘square kilometers’ suggests area, even if the word ‘area’ is missing in the sentence). BONIE obtains 1.5x yield and 15 point precision gain on numerical facts over a state-of-the-art Open IE system.', 'fr': "Nous concevons et publions BONIE, le premier extracteur de relations numériques ouvert, pour extraire des tuples Open IE où l'un des arguments est un nombre ou une phrase d'unité de quantité. BONIE utilise le bootstrapping pour apprendre les modèles de dépendance spécifiques qui expriment les relations numériques dans une phrase. La nouveauté de BONIE réside dans les personnalisations spécifiques aux tâches, telles que la déduction de relations implicites, qui sont claires en raison du contexte tel que les unités (par exemple, «\xa0kilomètres carrés\xa0» suggère une superficie, même si le mot «\xa0surface\xa0» est absent dans la phrase). BONIE obtient un rendement de 1,5 fois et un gain de précision de 15 points sur des faits numériques grâce à un système Open IE de pointe.", 'ar': 'نقوم بتصميم وإصدار BONIE ، أول مستخرج للعلاقات الرقمية المفتوحة ، لاستخراج مجموعات Open IE حيث تكون إحدى الوسيطات عبارة عن رقم أو عبارة وحدة كمية. يستخدم BONIE bootstrapping لمعرفة أنماط التبعية المحددة التي تعبر عن العلاقات العددية في الجملة. تكمن حداثة BONIE في التخصيصات الخاصة بالمهمة ، مثل استنتاج العلاقات الضمنية ، والتي تكون واضحة بسبب السياق مثل الوحدات (على سبيل المثال ، تشير كلمة "كيلومتر مربع" إلى المنطقة ، حتى إذا كانت كلمة "المنطقة" مفقودة في الجملة). تحصل BONIE على عائد 1.5x ومكاسب دقة تبلغ 15 نقطة على الحقائق الرقمية عبر نظام Open IE المتطور.', 'es': 'Diseñamos y publicamos BONIE, el primer extractor de relaciones numéricas abierto, para extraer tuplas Open IE donde uno de los argumentos es un número o una frase de unidad de cantidad. BONIE utiliza el bootstrapping para aprender los patrones de dependencia específicos que expresan las relaciones numéricas en una oración. La novedad de BONIE radica en las personalizaciones específicas de las tareas, como la deducción de relaciones implícitas, que son claras debido al contexto, como las unidades (por ejemplo, «kilómetros cuadrados» sugiere área, incluso si falta la palabra «área» en la oración). BONIE obtiene un rendimiento de 1,5 veces y una ganancia de precisión de 15 puntos en datos numéricos a través de un sistema Open IE de última generación.', 'pt': "Projetamos e lançamos o BONIE, o primeiro extrator de relação numérica aberta, para extrair tuplas do Open IE onde um dos argumentos é um número ou uma frase de unidade de quantidade. BONIE usa bootstrapping para aprender os padrões de dependência específicos que expressam relações numéricas em uma frase. A novidade do BONIE está em customizações específicas de tarefas, como inferir relações implícitas, que são claras devido ao contexto, como unidades (por exemplo, 'quilômetros quadrados' sugere área, mesmo que a palavra 'área' esteja faltando na frase). O BONIE obtém rendimento de 1,5x e ganho de precisão de 15 pontos em fatos numéricos sobre um sistema Open IE de última geração.", 'zh': '设而 BONIE之,此首开式数之提取器,以取开式 IE 元组,其一参数为数短语。 BONIE 用导以学于句中者特定依式焉。 BONIE之新在特定务之自定义,推隐式之际,由单上下文而明(,"平方公里"示面积,虽句阙"面积"之)。 BONIE以至先进开放式IE系于数直1.5倍其15益。', 'ja': '引数の1つが数値または数量単位のフレーズであるOpen IEタプルを抽出するために、最初のオープン数値関係抽出器であるBONIEを設計してリリースします。BONIEは、ブートストラップを使用して、文の数値関係を表現する特定の依存関係パターンを学習します。BONIEの新規性は、暗黙の関係を推論するなどのタスク固有のカスタマイズにあり、単位などのコンテキストによって明確になります（たとえば、「平方キロメートル」は、文中に「面積」という単語がない場合でも、面積を示唆します）。BONIEは、最先端のオープンIEシステムで数値的事実に基づいて1.5倍の利回りと15ポイントの精度の向上を実現します。', 'hi': "हम डिजाइन और जारी BONIE, पहला खुला संख्यात्मक संबंध चिमटा, खुला IE tuples निकालने के लिए, जहां तर्कों में से एक एक संख्या या एक मात्रा इकाई वाक्यांश है निकालने के लिए. BONIE बूटस्ट्रैपिंग का उपयोग विशिष्ट निर्भरता पैटर्न सीखने के लिए करता है जो एक वाक्य में संख्यात्मक संबंधों को व्यक्त करते हैं। बोनी की नवीनता कार्य-विशिष्ट अनुकूलनों में निहित है, जैसे कि अंतर्निहित संबंधों का अनुमान लगाना, जो इकाइयों जैसे संदर्भ के कारण स्पष्ट हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, 'वर्ग किलोमीटर' क्षेत्र का सुझाव देता है, भले ही वाक्य में 'क्षेत्र' शब्द गायब हो)। BONIE 1.5x उपज और 15 अंक परिशुद्धता एक अत्याधुनिक ओपन आईई प्रणाली पर संख्यात्मक तथ्यों पर लाभ प्राप्त करता है।", 'ru': 'Мы проектируем и выпускаем BONIE, первый открытый экстрактор числовых отношений, для извлечения кортежей Open IE, где одним из аргументов является числовая или количественная фраза. BONIE использует bootstrapping для изучения конкретных шаблонов зависимостей, которые выражают числовые отношения в предложении. Новизна BONIE заключается в конкретных настройках задачи, таких как вывод неявных отношений, которые понятны из-за контекста, такого как единицы (например, «квадратные километры» предполагают площадь, даже если в предложении отсутствует слово «площадь»). BONIE получает 1,5-кратный выход и 15-балльный точный прирост по численным фактам по сравнению с современной системой Open IE.', 'ga': 'Dearaimid agus scaoilfimid BONIE, an chéad eastóscadh gaol uimhriúil oscailte, chun tuples Open IE a bhaint as áit arb é uimhir nó frása aonad cainníochta ceann de na hargóintí. Úsáideann BONIE bootstrapping chun na patrúin spleáchais ar leith a chuireann caidreamh uimhriúil in iúl in abairt a fhoghlaim. Luíonn úrnuacht BONIE i saincheapadh tasc-shonracha, mar chaidreamh intuigthe a thabhairt le fios, atá soiléir de bharr comhthéacs mar aonaid (mar shampla, ‘ciliméadar cearnach’ le fios achar, fiú má tá an focal ‘limistéar’ in easnamh san abairt). Faigheann BONIE toradh 1.5x agus gnóthachan beachtas de 15 phointe ar fhíricí uimhriúla thar chóras Open IE atá den scoth.', 'hu': 'Megtervezzük és kiadjuk a BONIE-t, az első nyílt numerikus kapcsolat-extraktort, nyílt IE tuplek kinyerésére, ahol az egyik argumentum egy szám vagy egy mennyiség-egység kifejezés. A BONIE rendszerindítást használ arra, hogy megtanulja azokat a speciális függőségi mintákat, amelyek numerikus kapcsolatokat fejeznek ki egy mondatban. A BONIE újdonsága a feladatspecifikus testreszabásokban rejlik, mint például implicit kapcsolatok következtetése, amelyek egyértelműek a kontextus miatt, mint például az egységek (pl. "négyzetkilométer" területet sugall, még akkor is, ha a mondatban hiányzik a "terület" szó). A BONIE 1,5x hozamot és 15 pontos pontossági javulást ér el numerikus tényeken egy korszerű Open IE rendszeren keresztül.', 'el': 'Σχεδιάζουμε και απελευθερώνουμε τον πρώτο ανοικτό εξαγωγέα αριθμητικών σχέσεων, για την εξαγωγή ανοιχτών τίτλων όπου ένα από τα ορίσματα είναι ένας αριθμός ή μια φράση ποσοτικής μονάδας. Το χρησιμοποιεί για να μάθει τα συγκεκριμένα μοτίβα εξάρτησης που εκφράζουν αριθμητικές σχέσεις σε μια πρόταση. Η καινοτομία του έγκειται στις προσαρμογές που αφορούν συγκεκριμένες εργασίες, όπως η εξαγωγή έμμεσων σχέσεων, οι οποίες είναι σαφείς λόγω του πλαισίου όπως οι μονάδες (για παράδειγμα, "τετραγωνικά χιλιόμετρα" υποδηλώνει περιοχή, ακόμα και αν λείπει η λέξη "περιοχή" στην πρόταση). Η Μπόνι αποκτά απόδοση 1,5και κέρδος ακρίβειας 15-σημείων σε αριθμητικά δεδομένα μέσω ενός υπερσύγχρονου συστήματος ανοικτού ΙΡ.', 'ka': "ჩვენ განაკეთებთ და გამოუშვებით BONIE, პირველი გახსნა რიცხვულ შესახებ ექსტრაკტორი, რომელიც გახსნა IE tuples გამოყენება, სადაც ერთი არგუმენტი არის რიცხვი ან რაოდენობით ერთი ფ BONIE გამოყენება სპექტიფიკალური დასამხოლობა, რომელიც მრიცხველური დაკავშირებების გამოყენება. BONIE-ის ახალგაზრულობა კონტექტიფიკური კონფიგურაციაში, როგორც ინფლიქტიკური შესახებ, რომლებიც კონტექსტის შესახებ, როგორც ერთეულები (მაგალითად `კვადრატური კილომეტრები' შესახებ განსაზღვრება,  BONIE მიიღება 1,5x წარმოდგენა და 15 წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა რიცხვური ფექტურების შესახებ გახსნა IE სისტემაზე.", 'it': "Progettiamo e rilasciamo BONIE, il primo estrattore di relazioni numeriche aperte, per estrarre tuple Open IE dove uno degli argomenti è un numero o una frase quantità-unità. BONIE utilizza il bootstrapping per imparare i modelli di dipendenza specifici che esprimono relazioni numeriche in una frase. La novità di BONIE sta nelle personalizzazioni specifiche per attività, come l'deduzione di relazioni implicite, che sono chiare a causa del contesto come le unità (per esempio, 'chilometri quadrati' suggerisce area, anche se manca la parola 'area' nella frase). BONIE ottiene un rendimento di 1,5x e un guadagno di precisione di 15 punti su fatti numerici attraverso un sistema Open IE all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Mes suprojektuojame ir išleidžiame BONIE, pirmąjį atvirą skaitmeninį santykio ekstraktorių, kad išgautume atvirus IE dublius, kai vienas iš argumentų yra numeris arba kiekio vieneto frazė. BONIE naudoja bootstrapping, kad išsiaiškintų konkrečius priklausomybės modelius, kurie išreiškia skaitmeninius santykius sakinyje. BONIE naujovė susijusi su konkrečiomis užduotimis, pavyzdžiui, su netiesioginiais santykiais, kurie yra aiškūs dėl tokio konteksto kaip vienetai (pvz., kvadratiniai kilometrai rodo plotą, net jei sakinyje trūksta žodžio "plotas"). BONIE gauna 1,5x derlingumo ir 15 taškų tikslumo didinimą skaitmeniniais faktais pagal naujausią atvirosios IE sistemą.', 'kk': "Біз бірінші ашылған сандарды тарқатушы боNIE- ді құрастырып, шығару үшін, Open IE tuples- ды тарқату үшін, олардың бірі саны немесе санды бірлікті бірлікті сөзді. BONIE сандардың қатынасын көрсету үшін керек тәуелсіздік үлгілерін үйрену үшін жүктеуді қолданады. БООНИЕ жаңалығы тапсырмалардың ерекше баптауларында, мысалы, бірліктердің контекстігі (мысалы, `квадрат километр' деген сөзді жоқ болса да, бұл сөзді `аумағында' деген мәтінде таңдау үшін таңдалған қатынастарды таңдау BONIE 1,5x тарықтығы және 15 нүктенің дұрыстығы жетілдірілген IE жүйесінің күйі бойынша сандардың факторында болады.", 'mk': 'Ние дизајнираме и ослободуваме BONIE, првиот отворен екстрактор на броеви односи, за екстракција на отворени IE дупли каде еден од аргументите е број или фраза квантитетно-единица. BONIE користи bootstrapping за да ги научи специфичните шеми на зависност кои изразуваат броевни односи во реченица. Новоста на БОНИЕ се наоѓа во прилагодувањата специфични за задачите, како што е инференцијата на имплицитните односи, кои се јасни поради контекст како што се единиците (на пример, „квадратни километри“ предлагаат област, дури и ако зборот „ област “ недостасува во реченицата). Бони добива 1,5x придонес и 15 точки прецизност на броевите факти преку најсовремениот отворен ИЕ систем.', 'ms': "Kami merancang dan melepaskan BONIE, pengekstraktor hubungan nombor terbuka pertama, untuk mengekstrak dua IE terbuka dimana salah satu argumen adalah nombor atau frasa kuantiti-unit. BONIE menggunakan bootstrapping untuk belajar corak dependensi khusus yang mengekspresikan hubungan nombor dalam kalimat. Kebaru BONIE terletak dalam suaian khusus tugas, seperti menyimpulkan hubungan implicit, yang jelas disebabkan konteks seperti unit (contohnya, `kilometer kuasa dua' cadangkan kawasan, walaupun kata `area' hilang dalam kalimat). BONIE mendapat 1.5x hasil dan 15 titik peningkatan ketepatan pada fakta nombor melalui sistem IE terbuka state-of-the-art.", 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ തുറന്ന സംഖ്യബന്ധം എടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ബോണിയെ ഡിസൈന്\u200d ചെയ്യുകയും വിടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു നമ്പർ അല്ലെങ്ക BONIE uses bootstrapping to learn the specific dependency patterns that express numerical relations in a sentence.  ബോണിയുടെ നോവലിയില്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേക സ്വഭാവങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരിക്കുന്നു, പോലെ ഉള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളെ ആക്രമിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d പോലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിരിക ബോണിയില്\u200d 1. 5x ഫലം ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. 15 പോയിന്റ് പരിസ്ഥിതി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓപ്പ് ഐ സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനത്തി', 'mt': "Aħna niddisinjaw u nirrilaxxaw BONIE, l-ewwel estrattur ta’ relazzjoni numerika miftuħa, għall-estrazzjoni ta’ doppji IE miftuħa fejn wieħed mill-argumenti huwa numru jew frażi ta’ kwantità-unit à. BONIE tuża bootstrapping biex titgħallem ix-xejriet speċifiċi ta’ dipendenza li jesprimu relazzjonijiet numeriċi f’sentenza. L-innovazzjoni ta' BONIE tinsab f'personalizzazzjonijiet speċifiċi g ħall-kompiti, bħall-inferiment ta' relazzjonijiet impliċiti, li huma ċari minħabba kuntest bħall-unitajiet (pereżempju, `kilometri kwadri' jissuġġerixxu erja, anke jekk il-kelma 'żona' hija nieqsa fis-sentenza). BONIE tikseb rendiment ta’ 1.5x u żieda ta’ preċiżjoni ta’ 15-il punt fuq fatti numeriċi fuq sistema ta’ IE miftuħa l-aktar avvanzata.", 'mn': "Бид анхны нээлттэй тоон хамааралтай хамааралтай BONIE-г зохион бүтээж, гаргаж өгдөг. Нэг аргумент нь тоо эсвэл хэмжээст нэгж хэмжээний үг юм. BONIE нь тоон харилцааныг өгүүлбэрт илэрхийлж байгаа тодорхой хамааралтай загваруудыг суралцахын тулд bootstrapping ашигладаг. БОНИЙийн шинэ нээлт нь ажлын тодорхойлолтын хувьд байдаг. Жишээлбэл хамааралтай холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Яг нэгжүүдийн тухай тодорхойлолтой байдаг (жишээлбэл `квадрат километр'-ын талбайг илэрхийлж байна, гэхдээ `талбай'-н ү BONIE нь 1.5x үржүүлэлт, 15 цэгийн тоон үнэндээ нэмэгдсэн IE системийн хувьд тоон үнэндээ нэмэгддэг.", 'pl': "Projektujemy i wydajemy BONIE, pierwszy otwarty ekstraktor relacji numerycznych, do wyodrębniania otwartych kropek IE, gdzie jednym z argumentów jest liczba lub fraza jednostkowa ilość. BONIE używa bootstrappingu, aby nauczyć się specyficznych wzorców zależności, które wyrażają relacje liczbowe w zdaniu. Nowością BONIE są dostosowania specyficzne dla zadań, takie jak wnioskowanie relacji domyślnych, które są jasne ze względu na kontekst taki jak jednostki (np. ‚kilometry kwadratowe' sugerują obszar, nawet jeśli w zdaniu brakuje słowa `obszar'). BONIE uzyskuje 1,5x wydajność i 15-punktowy wzrost precyzji na faktach liczbowych za pomocą najnowocześniejszego systemu Open IE.", 'ro': 'Proiectăm și lansăm BONIE, primul extractor de relații numerice deschise, pentru extragerea tuplelor Open IE unde unul dintre argumente este un număr sau o frază cantitate-unitate. BONIE folosește bootstrapping pentru a învăța modelele specifice de dependență care exprimă relațiile numerice într-o propoziție. Noutatea BONIE constă în personalizările specifice sarcinilor, cum ar fi deducerea relațiilor implicite, care sunt clare datorită contextului cum ar fi unitățile (de exemplu, "kilometri pătrați" sugerează suprafață, chiar dacă cuvântul "suprafață" lipsește în propoziție). BONIE obține randament de 1,5x și câștig de precizie de 15 puncte pe fapte numerice printr-un sistem Open IE de ultimă generație.', 'no': 'Vi design and release BONIE, the first open numerical relation extractor, for extracting Open IE tuples where one of the arguments is a number or a quantity-unit phrase. Constellation name (optional) BONIE s in novelitet ligg i oppgåvespesifikke tilpassingar, slik som å gjera implisitte forhold, som er klar på grunn av konteksten som einingar (for eksempel « kvadrat kilometer » foreslår området, sjølv om ordet « area » manglar i setninga). BONIE får 1,5x-verdi og 15 punkt-presisjon på numeriske faktoar over eit opna IE-systemet i kunsten.', 'si': 'අපි විද්\u200dයාපනය සහ ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා BONIE, පළවෙනි අංක අංක සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරකාශකයෙන්, විවෘත IE ටුප්ලිස් අරගෙන යන්න, ප්\u200dරකාශකයෙ BONIE භාවිතා කරනවා වාක්යෙක් වලින් අංක සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතා  BONIE ගේ අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ වැඩක් විශේෂ සැකසුම් වලට, හරියට සම්පූර්ණ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා පැහැදිලි වෙන්නේ, යුනිට් වගේ සංවේදනය සඳහා ස්පූ BONIE 1.5x ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලැබෙනවා සහ අංක ප්\u200dරධානයක් 15 ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'sr': "Mi dizajniramo i oslobodimo BONIE, prvi otvoreni brojni odnos ekstraktor, za izvlačenje otvorenih IE tupla, gde je jedan od argumenata broj ili fraza za količinu jedinica. BONIE koristi šipke za naučenje specifičnih obrazaca zavisnosti koje izražavaju brojne odnose u rečenici. Novost BONIE nalazi s e u posebnim prilagođavanjima zadataka, kao što su uvođenje implicitnih odnosa, koji su jasni zbog konteksta poput jedinica (npr. „kvadratnih kilometara“ predlaže područje, čak i ako reč `područje' nedostaje u rečenici). BONIE dobija 1,5x račun i 15 bodova preciznosti dobija brojne činjenice oko sustava otvorenog IE-a.", 'so': "BONIE, kii ugu horreeyay ee furan xiriir kala duduwan, waxaynu u qoraynaa oo ka bixinaynaa furan IE tuples, meesha uu midkood ka mid yahay qiimaha lambarka ama qayb-tiro ah. BONIE wuxuu isticmaalaa boosaska aasaasiga ah si uu u barto noocyo gaar ah oo ku qoran xiriir tiro badan oo ku qoran. Qoraalka BONIE wuxuu ku yaalaa meelo gaar ah oo shaqo ah, tusaale ahaan dhibaato la’aan ah, taas oo ay u cad yihiin xiriir sida qalabka (tusaale ahaan `kilometer'), xitaa haddii ereyga `area'' laga waayay). BONIE wuxuu helaa midhaha 1,5x iyo 15 barxad oo qiimo ah oo ku taal waxyaabo tiro badan oo ku qoran nidaamka furan IE.", 'sv': 'Vi designar och släpper BONIE, den första öppna numeriska relationsextraktorn, för att extrahera Open IE-tupler där ett av argumenten är ett tal eller en kvantitetsenhetsfras. BONIE använder bootstrapping för att lära sig de specifika beroendemönster som uttrycker numeriska relationer i en mening. BONIE:s nyhet ligger i uppgiftsspecifika anpassningar, såsom att härleda implicita relationer, som är tydliga på grund av sammanhang som enheter (t.ex. "kvadratkilometer" antyder område, även om ordet "område" saknas i meningen). BONIE erhåller 1,5x avkastning och 15 punkts precisionsvinst på numeriska fakta över ett toppmodernt Open IE-system.', 'ta': "நாம் BONIE, முதல் திறந்த எண் தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டாளரை வடிவமைத்து வெளியேற்ற வேண்டும். BONIE வாக்கியத்தில் எண்ணிக்கை தொடர்புகளை வெளிப்படுத்தும் குறிப்பிட்ட சார்பு முறைமைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள த போனியின் புதைய செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட தனிப்பயன்களில் உள்ளது, போனியின் தொடர்புகளை பாதிக்கும், அது போன்ற அலகுகள் போன்ற சூழல் தெளிவாக இருக்கிறது (உதாரணமாக, `சதுர கிலோமீட்டர்' வ BONIE obtains 1.5x yield and 15 point precision gain on numerical facts over a state-of-the-art Open IE system.", 'ur': "ہم طراحی اور رخصت دیتے ہیں BONIE، پہلی کھولی عدد کے ارتباط اضافہ کرنے والے، کھولی IE ٹوپل کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے جہاں ایک ارتباط ایک شمار یا ایک عدد یونیٹ فریز ہے. BONIE بوٹ سٹرپ استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ایک جماعت میں تعدادی رابطہ کی تعریف کرنے کے لئے مخصوص اعتباری پٹرنے کو سیکھنے کے لئے بوٹ سٹرپ استعمال کرتا ہے. BONIE کی نوائی تابع کے مخصوص اختیاروں میں ہے، جیسے مشکل رابطہ کے ذریعہ آزاد کرنا ہے، جو متصلہ کے سبب واضح ہیں جیسے واحدیں (جیسے واحدوں کے لئے `square kilometers' کا منطقه پیش کرتا ہے، اگرچہ کلمہ `area' لکھا جاتا ہے)۔ BONIE 1.5x فائدہ حاصل کرتا ہے اور 15 پوینٹ دقیق فائدہ حاصل کرتا ہے ایک آهنت اوپنی سیسٹم پر شماری حقیقت پر۔", 'uz': "Biz birinchi ochiq raqamli aloqa ekstraktori BONIE' ni tasdiqlash va chiqarish uchun ochish IE tugmalarini ajratish uchun. Bogʻ ichida raqamli aloqalarni koʻrsatish uchun foydalanadi. BONIE noveli vazifa haqida mavjud moslamalar, masalan umumiy aloqalarni birlashtirish mumkin, huddi bir necha aloqa sababchi boʻlgan holatda (m- n, `square kilometer' imkoniyatini boshqaradi, agar gapning soʻzi yoʻq boʻlsa). BONIE taʼminlovchisi 1.5x tuzuvga ega va 15 nuqta qiymatda qiymatni ochish IE tizimi davomida raqam faqatlarni oshadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi thiết kế và phát hành BONIE, người dẫn đầu mối quan hệ số mở đầu tiên, để lấy bộ áo ngực Open Iễ nơi một trong các đối tượng là một số hoặc một cụm từ quy lượng. BONIE sử dụng bốt khởi động để học các mô hình phụ thuộc cụ thể diễn tả các quan hệ số trong một câu. Sự mới lạ của BONIE nằm trong s ự thay đổi đặc nhiệm, như ngụ ý của mối quan hệ ngầm, rõ ràng nhờ vào các trường hợp như các đơn vị (v.d., cây số cây số vuông\'g ợi ý vùng này, ngay cả khi từ "vùng" bị thiếu trong câu. BONIE nhận được sản lượng 1.5x và 15-điểm chính xác tăng trên các dữ kiện số trên một hệ thống Open Iễ hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Ние проектираме и пускаме първият отворен екстрактор на числови релации, за извличане на Отворени ИЕ тупли, където един от аргументите е число или фраза за количествена единица. BONIE използва Bootstrapping, за да научи специфичните модели на зависимост, които изразяват числови отношения в изречение. Новостта на БОНИ се крие в специфичните задачи персонализирания, като например извеждането на имплицитни релации, които са ясни поради контекст като единици (напр. "квадратни километри" предполагат площ, дори ако думата "площ" липсва в изречението). Бони получава 1.5х добив и 15 точки прецизно увеличение на цифрови факти чрез най-модерна система с отворено ИЕ.', 'da': "Vi designer og frigiver BONIE, den første åbne numeriske relation ekstractor, til udtrækning af Open IE tupler, hvor et af argumenterne er et tal eller en kvantitet-enhedssætning. BONIE bruger bootstrapping til at lære de specifikke afhængighedsmønstre, der udtrykker numeriske relationer i en sætning. BONIE's nyhed ligger i opgavespecifikke tilpasninger, såsom at udlede implicitte relationer, som er klare på grund af kontekst som enheder (for eksempel antyder 'kvadratkilometer' areal, selvom ordet 'område' mangler i sætningen). BONIE opnår 1,5x udbytte og 15 point præcisionsgevinst på numeriske fakta over et state-of-the-art Open IE system.", 'nl': "We ontwerpen en lanceren BONIE, de eerste open numerieke relatie extractor, voor het extraheren van Open IE tupels waarbij een van de argumenten een getal of een kwantiteit-eenheid frase is. BONIE gebruikt bootstrapping om de specifieke afhankelijkheidspatronen te leren die numerieke relaties in een zin uitdrukken. De nieuwigheid van BONIE ligt in taakspecifieke aanpassingen, zoals het afleiden van impliciete relaties, die duidelijk zijn door context zoals eenheden (bijvoorbeeld, 'vierkante kilometer' suggereert oppervlakte, zelfs als het woord 'gebied' ontbreekt in de zin). BONIE verkrijgt 1,5x opbrengst en 15-punts precisiewinst op numerieke feiten via een state-of-the-art Open IE systeem.", 'hr': "Mi dizajniramo i oslobodimo BONIE, prvi otvoreni brojni odnos ekstraktor, za izvlačenje otvorenih IE tupla, gdje je jedan od argumenata broj ili fraza jedinice količine. BONIE koristi čišćenje kako bi naučio specifične obrasce zavisnosti koje izražavaju brojne odnose u rečenici. Novost BONIE-a nalazi s e u posebnim prilagođavanjima zadataka, poput uvođenja implicitnih odnosa, koje su jasne zbog konteksta poput jedinica (npr. „kvadratnih kilometara“ predlaže područje, čak i ako riječ `područje' u rečenici nedostaje). BONIE dobija 1,5x račun i 15 bodova preciznost dobija brojne činjenice nad sustavom otvorenog IE-a.", 'ko': "우리는 첫 번째 개방식 디지털 관계 추출기 BONIE를 설계하고 발표했는데, 그 중 하나는 숫자나 수량 단위 단어이다.BONIE는 bootstrapping을 사용하여 문장의 디지털 관계를 표현하는 특정한 의존 모델을 배웁니다.BONIE의 신기한 점은 임무의 특정한 맞춤형 제작, 예를 들어 은밀한 관계를 추정하는 데 있다. 이런 관계는 단위 등 상하문에 따라 뚜렷하다(예를 들어'제곱킬로미터'는 면적을 나타내는데 문장에'면적'이라는 단어가 없어도).BONIE는 가장 선진적인 개방식 IE시스템에서 1.5배의 생산량과 15점의 정밀도 이득을 얻었다.", 'id': "We design and release BONIE, the first open numerical relation extractor, for extracting Open IE tuples where one of the arguments is a number or a quantity-unit phrase.  BONIE menggunakan bootstrapping untuk mempelajari pola ketergantuan spesifik yang mengekspresikan hubungan numerik dalam kalimat. Kebaikan BONIE terletak dalam suai-suai khusus tugas, seperti menyimpulkan hubungan implicit, yang jelas karena konteks seperti unit (misalnya, `kilometer persegi' menunjukkan area, bahkan jika kata `area' hilang dalam kalimat). BONIE mendapatkan 1,5x hasil dan 15 titik hasil presisi pada fakta numerik melalui sistem IE terbuka state-of-the-art.", 'de': "Wir entwerfen und veröffentlichen BONIE, den ersten offenen numerischen Beziehungsextraktor, für das Extrahieren von Open IE Tupeln, bei denen eines der Argumente eine Zahl oder eine Menge-Einheit-Phrase ist. BONIE verwendet Bootstrapping, um die spezifischen Abhängigkeitsmuster zu lernen, die numerische Beziehungen in einem Satz ausdrücken. Die Neuheit von BONIE liegt in aufgabenspezifischen Anpassungen, wie dem Ableiten impliziter Beziehungen, die durch Kontext wie Einheiten klar sind (z.B. `Quadratkilometer' suggeriert Fläche, auch wenn das Wort `Fläche' im Satz fehlt). BONIE erzielt 1,5x Ertrag und 15-Punkt-Präzisionsgewinn auf numerischen Fakten über ein hochmodernes Open IE-System.", 'fa': 'ما طراحی و آزادی BONIE را طراحی می کنیم، اولین ارتباط تعدادی باز برای اخراج توپ\u200cهای IE باز که یکی از این ارتباطات یک عدد یا یک جمله تعدادی واحد است. BONIE برای یاد گرفتن الگوهای بستگی خاص که رابطه\u200cهای شماری در یک جمله توضیح می\u200cدهد استفاده می\u200cکند. نوآوری BONIE در تغییرات مشخصی برای کار است، مثل تغییر رابطه\u200cهای مشخصی، که به دلیل موضوع مانند واحدها (برای مثال „کیلومتر مربع” منطقه را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، حتی اگر کلمه „منطقه\u200c در مجله گم شده باشد). BONIE 1.5x ثواب و 15 نقطه دقیق در حقیقت تعدادی بر روی یک سیستم IE باز هنری دریافت می\u200cکند.', 'sw': "Tunaweza kutengeneza na kuachia BONIE, mtangazaji wa kwanza wa uhusiano wa nambari, kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vifaa vya Open IE ambapo moja ya hoja ni namba au aina ya kipekee. BONIE inatumia vifaa vya boot ili kujifunza mitindo maalum ya kutegemea inayoonyesha mahusiano kadhaa katika hukumu. Ukurasa wa BONIE unaweka katika matumizi maalum ya kazi, kama vile kuathiri mahusiano yasiyo na maana, ambao ni wazi kutokana na muktadha kama vile vitengo (kwa mfano, 'kilometa' hupendekeza eneo la viwanja, hata kama neno 'eneo' haupo katika hukumu). BONIE ina uzalishaji wa 1.5x na pointi 15 kinaongezeka kwa ukweli kadhaa juu ya mfumo wa wazi wa Umoja wa Mataifa.", 'af': "Ons ontwerp en verlos BONIE, die eerste oop numeriese verhouding van uitpaker, vir uitpakking van Open IE tuples waar een van die argumente is 'n nommer of 'n quantity-unit frase. BONIE gebruik boot strapping na leer die spesifieke afhanklikheid patrone wat numeriese relasies in 'n seting uitdruk. BONIE s e nuutskappy lê in opdragspesifieke pasmaasies, soos inplisite verhouding, wat is duidelik vanweë konteks soos eenhede (bv. `vierkantikilometers' voorstel area, selfs as die woord `area' in die seting mis is). BONIE kry 1.5x verkry en 15 punt presisie verkry op numeriese fakties oor 'n staat-van-die-kuns Open IE stelsel.", 'tr': 'Biz "Open IE tuples" tüplerini a çmak üçin ilkinji açyk sanal harplary çykarýarys we çykarýarys. BONIE sözlemde sayısal ilişkileri ifade etmek üçin belli bağlılık örneklerini öwrenmek üçin bastırmak işleýär. BONIE ň täzelikleri takyk-wagtlary g örkezilýän zada görkezilýän görnüşdelerde, şol ýaly gizlin baglaşyklary daşyrýan ýaly birikdeleriň sebäpli paýlaşdyr (meselâ, `karratur kilometer\' meýdançasyny çaklaýar, eger `meýdança\' s özleriň ýok bolsa-da). BONIE 1.5x verişi ve 15 nokta takyk kazanç bir sanat Aç IE sisteminde.', 'am': 'የፊተኛውን ክፍት የቁጥር ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ BONIE የቁጥጥር ግንኙነት በንግግር ውስጥ የሚያሳውቅ ምርጫዎችን ለመማር የሚጠቅመውን የጭብጥ ምርጫዎችን ይጠቅማል። የቦኖኢ ረጅም የስራ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን እንደምታስቡ አካባቢ፣ እንደኢትዮጵያ ብጤቶች (ለምሳሌ ‹ስፍራት›› ክፍሉ ቢጎድል እንኳ የ`ስፍራው› ቃል ቢጎድል) BONIE 1.5x ፍሬን እና 15 ነጥብ ቁጥር በክፈት IE ስርዓት ክፍተት ላይ የቁጥር ውጤቶችን ያገኛል።', 'bn': "আমরা বোনিয়ে প্রথম খোলা সংখ্যা সম্পর্কের বিনিময়ে ডিজাইন এবং মুক্তি দেই, যেখানে যুক্তিগুলোর একটি সংখ্যা অথবা পরিমাণ ইউনিটের বাক্য। বোনিই বাটস্ট্র্যাপিং ব্যবহার করে একটি বাক্যে সংখ্যাগরিক সম্পর্ক প্রকাশ করার জন্য নির্দিষ্ট নির্ভরিত প্যাটার বোনিয়ের স্বপ্ন কাজের নির্দিষ্ট স্বনির্ধারিত ব্যবহারের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যেমন ইউনিটের মতো সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক আক্রান্ত, যা পরিষ্কার (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, `স্কোয়ার কিলোমিটার' পরামর বোনিই ১. ৫ক্স উৎপাদন এবং ১৫ পয়েন্টের সংখ্যাগরিক বাস্তবতার উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছে একটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের প", 'hy': "Մենք նախագծում ենք և հրատարակում ենք BONY-ը, առաջին բաց թվային հարաբերությունների արտահանողը, բաց I-ի երկու անգամ արտահանելու համար, որտեղ բանավեճերից մեկը թվեր է կամ չափի-միավոր արտահայտություն է: ԲՈՆԻ-ն օգտագործում է սկզբնական սահմանումը, որպեսզի սովորի հատուկ կախվածության կաղապարները, որոնք արտահայտում են թվային հարաբերությունները նախադասության մեջ: BONY-ի նորությունը գտնվում է խնդիրների հատուկ հատուկ հատկումներում, ինչպիսիք են ենթադրությունները, որոնք պարզ են այնպիսի կոնտեքստի պատճառով, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ միավորները (օրինակ, `քառակուսի կիլոմետրեր' առաջարկում են տարածքը, նույնիսկ եթե նախադասում բառը `տարածք' բա Բոնին ստանում է 1.5x արդյունք և 15 կետ ճշգրիտ արդյունք թվային փաստերի վրա ամենաբարձր բաց ինտերնետային համակարգի միջոցով:", 'az': "Biz birinci a çıq sayısal ilişki ekstraktörü BONIE-ni tasarlayırıq və yayındırırıq. Açıq IE tupularından birinin sayı ya da sayı birinci frazidir. BONIE sözlərdə sayısal ilişkileri ifadə edən xüsusi bağımlılıq örtüklərini öyrənmək üçün bootstrapping istifadə edir. BONIE'nin yenilənməsi, bənzərin imkansız ilişkiləri daxil etmək məqsədilə istifadə etmək məqsədilə istifadə edir (məs ələn `kvadrat kilometrlər' məlumatı təbliğ edir, hətta `alan' sözləri cümlədə yox olsa belə). BONIE 1.5x verilən və 15 puç dəqiqliyi sayısal faktlarda Açıq IE sistemi üzərində əlaqəsi alır.", 'sq': "Ne dizajnojmë dhe lëshojmë BONIE, nxjerrësin e parë të marrëdhënieve të hapura numerike, për nxjerrjen e dyfisheve të hapura IE ku një nga argumentet është një numër apo një frazë sasi-njësi. BONIE përdor bootstrapping për të mësuar modelet specifike të varësisë që shprehin marrëdhënie numërore në një fjalim. BONIE's novelty lies in task-specific customizations, such as inferring implicit relations, which are clear due to context such as units (for e.g., `square kilometers' suggests area, even if the word `area' is missing in the sentence).  BONIE merr 1.5x rezultat dhe 15 pikë përfitim në fakte numërore mbi një sistem IE të hapur më të lartë.", 'ca': "dissenyem i alliberam BONIE, el primer extractor de relació numèrica oberta, per extraure dobles IE obertes on un dels arguments és un nombre o una frase de quantitat-unitat. BONIE utilitza bootstrapping per aprendre els patrons específics de dependencia que expressen relacions numèriques en una frase. La novetat de BONIE e s troba en personalitzacions específices per a les tasques, com la inferència de relacions implícites, que s ón clares a causa de contextes com les unitats (per exemple, `quilòmetres quadrats' suggereix àrea, fins i tot si la paraula `àrea' falta en la frase). BONIE obté un rendiment de 1,5x i un guany de precisió de 15 punts en fets numèrics a través d'un sistema d'IE obert d'última generació.", 'cs': "Navrhujeme a uvolňujeme BONIE, první otevřený extraktor numerických relací, pro extrakci Open IE tulů, kde jedním z argumentů je číslo nebo fráze množství-jednotky. BONIE používá bootstrapping k naučení specifických vzorců závislosti, které vyjadřují číselné vztahy ve větě. Novinka BONIE spočívá v přizpůsobení specifických úkolů, jako je odvození implicitních vztahů, které jsou jasné díky kontextu, jako jsou jednotky (např. ‚čtvereční kilometry' naznačuje plochu, i když ve větě chybí slovo ‚plocha'). BONIE získává 1,5x výtěžnost a 15-bodový zisk přesnosti na numerických faktech prostřednictvím nejmodernějšího systému Open IE.", 'bs': "Mi dizajniramo i oslobodimo BONIE, prvi otvoreni brojni odnos ekstraktor, za izvlačenje otvorenih IE tuplija gdje je jedan od argumenata broj ili fraza jedinice količine. BONIE koristi čizme kako bi naučio specifične obrasce zavisnosti koje izražavaju brojne odnose u rečenici. Novost BONIE nalazi s e u posebnim prilagođavanjima zadataka, poput uvođenja implicitnih odnosa, koje su jasne zbog konteksta poput jedinica (npr. „kvadratnih kilometara“ predlaže područje, čak i ako riječ `područje' nedostaje u rečenici). BONIE dobija 1,5x račun i 15 bodova preciznosti dobija brojne činjenice oko sustava otvorenog IE-a.", 'et': 'Me kavandame ja avaldame BONIE, esimese avatud numbrilise seose ekstraktori, avatud IE tuplite ekstraheerimiseks, kus üks argumentidest on number või kogusühiku fraas. BONIE kasutab bootstrapping, et õppida konkreetseid sõltuvusmustreid, mis väljendavad lauses numbrilisi seoseid. BONIE uudsus seisneb ülesandespetsiifilistes kohandustes, näiteks kaudsete suhete järeldamises, mis on selged selliste kontekstide tõttu nagu ühikud (näiteks ruutkilomeetrid viitavad pindalale, isegi kui lauses puudub sõna "pindala"). BONIE saavutab 1,5-kordse tootlikkuse ja 15-punktilise täpsusega arvuliste faktide abil kaasaegse Open IE süsteemi abil.', 'fi': 'Suunnittelemme ja julkaisemme BONIE, ensimmäisen avoimen numeerisen suhteen uuttajan, Open IE tuplien purkamiseen, jossa yksi argumenteista on luku tai määrä-yksikkö lause. BONIE käyttää bootstrapping oppia erityisiä riippuvuusmalleja, jotka ilmaisevat numeerisia suhteita lauseessa. BONIEn uutuus piilee tehtäväkohtaisissa mukautuksissa, kuten implisiittisten suhteiden päättelemisessä, jotka ovat selkeitä esimerkiksi yksiköiden kontekstin vuoksi (esim. "neliökilometrit" viittaa alueeseen, vaikka lauseesta puuttuisi sana "alue"). BONIE saa 1,5-kertaisen tuoton ja 15 pisteen tarkkuusviennin numeerisista faktoista huipputekniikan Open IE -järjestelmässä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe lan mbukakipun BONIE, nambah tanggal perusahaan nambarang manung, nggawe Open SE taples nggawe barang akeh sampek dadi, perusahaan karo perusahaan tanggal gawe BONIE Ngawe Perintah Pangan Nowé BONIE kuwi nglanggar wigatining kanggo nganggep-wigatining nggawe gerakan karo perkaraan s in g koyo nggawe barang kapetan, sing wisalam kanggo kowé nggo sampek karo unirat BONIE rambarang 1.5 x bukane lan 10 punti, dadi tanggal 1.5 perusahaan banget karo sistem Open', 'he': "אנחנו מעצבים ושחררים את BONIE, החולץ הראשון של מערכת יחסים מספריות פתוחה, כדי לחלץ פעמיים IE פתוחים שבו אחד הטיעונים הוא מספר או ביטוי של יחידת כמות. BONIE משתמש במעטפות כדי ללמוד את דפוסי התלויות המיוחדים שמביעים יחסים מספריים במשפט. החדשות של BONIE נמצאת בהתאמות מסויימות למשימות, כמו להוציא מערכות יחסים מרושעות, אשר ברורות בגלל הקשר כמו יחידות (למשל, `קילומטרים מרובעים' מציעים אזור, גם אם המילה 'אזור' חסרה במשפט). בוני מקבל תוצאה של 1.5x ו-15 נקודות תוצאה מדויקת על עובדות מספריות מעל מערכת IE פתוחה מוקדמת.", 'sk': 'Oblikujemo in izdajamo BONIE, prvi odprti ekstraktor numeričnih relacij, za ekstrakcijo odprtih IE tuplov, kjer je eden od argumentov številka ali fraza količinske enote. BONIE uporablja bootstrapping, da se nauči specifičnih vzorcev odvisnosti, ki izražajo numerične relacije v stavku. BONIE-jeva novost leži v prilagoditvah posameznih opravil, kot je sklepanje implicitnih relacij, ki so jasne zaradi konteksta, kot so enote (npr. "kvadratni kilometri" kažejo na površino, tudi če v stavku manjka beseda "območje"). BONIE pridobi 1,5-kratni donos in 15 točkovni natančni dobiček na numeričnih dejstvih prek najsodobnejšega Open IE sistema.', 'ha': "Munã design kuma sakar BUNIU, na farkon mai buɗe na masu haɗi na raɗa ɗi, don ka sami buɗe shirin ayuka da ke buɗe shirin ayuka da ke cikin shirin ayuka ko kuma yana da wata sifar-faɗi. BUNIU yana amfani da farat-ƙari dõmin ya sanar da wasu shiryoyin da ke ƙayyade masu inganci da ke bayyana masu raɗari cikin birnin. Sunan BANIU yana cikin shirin ayuka masu ƙayyade aiki, kamar misãlan, ana sami tsari masu cikin haɗi masu ƙunci, da waɗanda aka tsarkake kwamfyuta kamar shirin ayuka (misali, `kilometers' yana shawarar da area, kõ dã ba'a sava maganar `area'). BOIU yana da nau'in 1,5x kuma yana da hakki 15 points kan fakta masu lissafa kan halin-state-of-the-art Open IU.", 'bo': "We design and release BONIE, the first open numerical relation extractor, for extracting Open IE tuples where one of the arguments is a number or a quantity-unit phrase. BONIE ཡིས་ཚིག་ཚང་ནང་གི་ཨང་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ BONIE's novelty lies in task-specific customizations, such as inferring implicit relations, which are clear due to context such as units (for example, `square kilometers' suggests area, even if the word `area' is missing in the sentence). BONIE འཕྲོད་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་སྔར་གསུམ་དང་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ལྡན་༡༥པ་མང་ཙམ་ཐོབ་པ།"}
{'en': 'Feature-Rich Networks for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ar': 'شبكات غنية بالميزات لإكمال قاعدة المعرفة', 'pt': 'Redes ricas em recursos para conclusão da base de conhecimento', 'fr': 'Réseaux riches en fonctionnalités pour compléter la base de connaissances', 'es': 'Redes con abundantes funciones para completar la base de conocimientos', 'ja': 'ナレッジベース完了のための機能豊富なネットワーク', 'zh': '以成知识库之功能丰富网络', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस पूर्णता के लिए सुविधा-रिच नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Сети с широким набором функций для завершения создания базы знаний', 'ga': 'Líonraí Gné-Saibhir chun Bonn Eolais a Chríochnú', 'el': 'Δίκτυα πλούσια σε δυνατότητες για την ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσης', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Szolgáltatásokban gazdag hálózatok a tudásbázis befejezéséhez', 'it': 'Reti ricche di funzionalità per il completamento della Knowledge Base', 'kk': 'Comment', 'mk': 'Feature-Rich Networks for Knowledge Base Completion', 'lt': 'Feature-Rich Networks for Knowledge Base Completion', 'mt': 'Netwerks Rikjesti fil-Karatteristiċi għat-Tlestija tal-Bażi tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь төгсгөлийн төгсгөлд болох Feature-Rich Networks', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Kaya-Feature untuk Penyempurnaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'no': 'Comment', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രിയേറ്റ്- റിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള', 'pl': 'Bogate funkcje sieci dla uzupełniania bazy wiedzy', 'sr': 'Završavanje baze znanja', 'ro': 'Rețele bogate în caracteristici pentru finalizarea bazei de cunoștințe', 'so': 'Shabakada aqoonta ee xirfadda', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Funktionsrika nätverk för slutförande av kunskapsbasen', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை முடிப்பதற்கான குணங்கள்- சார்ந்த வலைப்பின்னல்கள்', 'uz': 'Maò¥lumot bazasini toò£ldirish uchun imkoniyat tarmoq', 'vi': 'Mạng có đủ để hoàn thành Kiến thức', 'hr': 'Završenje baze znanja', 'bg': 'Богати на функции мрежи за завършване на базата от знания', 'nl': 'Netwerken rijk aan functies voor de voltooiing van de kennisbank', 'da': 'Funktionsrige netværk til færdiggørelse af videnbase', 'de': 'Funktionsreiche Netzwerke zur Vervollständigung der Wissensdatenbank', 'id': 'Rangkaian Kaya-Feature untuk Penyempurnaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ko': '기능이 풍부한 지식 라이브러리 네트워크', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Tajiri wa Kutimiza Ujuzi', 'tr': 'Bilim Basi Tamamlandyrması üçin karakter-Rich Networks', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Rrjete të pasura për kompletimin e bazës së njohurive', 'az': 'Bilim Basi Tamamlama üçün Feature-Rich Networks', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান বেস সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্য- সম্পদ নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Završenje baze znanja', 'ca': 'Redes ricas en característiques per a completar la base de coneixements', 'cs': 'Sítě bohaté na funkce pro dokončení znalostní báze', 'et': 'Funktsioonirikkad võrgud teabebaasi täiendamiseks', 'fi': 'Ominaisuuksia hyödyntävät verkostot tietokannan täydentämiseksi', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Omrežja, bogata s funkcijami, za dokončanje zbirke znanja', 'he': 'Comment', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་ཆོས་ཉེན་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཁ་ཤས་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་'}
{'en': 'We propose jointly modelling Knowledge Bases and aligned text with Feature-Rich Networks. Our models perform Knowledge Base Completion by learning to represent and compose diverse feature types from partially aligned and noisy resources. We perform experiments on Freebase utilizing additional entity type information and syntactic textual relations. Our evaluation suggests that the proposed models can better incorporate side information than previously proposed combinations of bilinear models with convolutional neural networks, showing large improvements when scoring the plausibility of unobserved facts with associated textual mentions.', 'ar': 'نقترح بشكل مشترك نمذجة قواعد المعرفة والنص المتوافق مع الشبكات الغنية بالميزات. تؤدي نماذجنا "إكمال قاعدة المعارف" من خلال تعلم تمثيل أنواع الميزات المتنوعة وتكوينها من موارد متوائمة جزئيًا وصاخبة. نجري تجارب على Freebase باستخدام معلومات نوع الكيان الإضافية والعلاقات النصية النحوية. يشير تقييمنا إلى أن النماذج المقترحة يمكن أن تدمج المعلومات الجانبية بشكل أفضل من المجموعات المقترحة سابقًا للنماذج ثنائية الخطوط مع الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية ، مما يُظهر تحسينات كبيرة عند تسجيل معقولية الحقائق غير المرصودة مع الإشارات النصية المرتبطة بها.', 'es': 'Proponemos modelar conjuntamente las bases de conocimientos y el texto alineado con las redes ricas en funciones. Nuestros modelos realizan la finalización de la base de conocimientos al aprender a representar y componer diversos tipos de funciones a partir de recursos parcialmente alineados y ruidosos. Realizamos experimentos en Freebase utilizando información adicional sobre el tipo de entidad y relaciones textuales sintácticas. Nuestra evaluación sugiere que los modelos propuestos pueden incorporar mejor información secundaria que las combinaciones propuestas anteriormente de modelos bilineales con redes neuronales convolucionales, lo que muestra grandes mejoras al calificar la plausibilidad de hechos no observados con menciones textuales asociadas.', 'fr': "Nous proposons de modéliser conjointement des bases de connaissances et un texte aligné avec des réseaux riches en fonctionnalités. Nos modèles effectuent la complétion de la base de connaissances en apprenant à représenter et à composer divers types d'entités à partir de ressources partiellement alignées et bruyantes. Nous réalisons des expériences sur Freebase en utilisant des informations supplémentaires sur les types d'entités et des relations textuelles syntaxiques. Notre évaluation suggère que les modèles proposés peuvent mieux intégrer des informations secondaires que les combinaisons précédemment proposées de modèles bilinéaires avec des réseaux neuronaux convolutifs, montrant des améliorations importantes lors de l'évaluation de la plausibilité de faits non observés avec des mentions textuelles associées.", 'pt': 'Propomos a modelagem conjunta de Bases de Conhecimento e texto alinhado com Redes Ricas em Recursos. Nossos modelos executam a conclusão da base de conhecimento aprendendo a representar e compor diversos tipos de recursos a partir de recursos parcialmente alinhados e ruidosos. Realizamos experimentos no Freebase utilizando informações de tipo de entidade adicionais e relações textuais sintáticas. Nossa avaliação sugere que os modelos propostos podem incorporar informações secundárias melhor do que as combinações propostas anteriormente de modelos bilineares com redes neurais convolucionais, mostrando grandes melhorias ao pontuar a plausibilidade de fatos não observados com menções textuais associadas.', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースとテキストを機能豊富なネットワークと共同でモデリングすることを提案します。当社のモデルは、部分的に整列したノイズの多いリソースから多様な機能タイプを表現して構成することを学ぶことで、ナレッジベースの完了を実行します。追加のエンティティタイプ情報と構文テキスト関係を利用してFreebaseで実験を行います。我々の評価は、提案されたモデルは、畳み込みニューラルネットワークを備えたバイリニアモデルの以前に提案された組み合わせよりも良い側面情報を組み込むことができることを示唆しており、関連するテキストの言及で観察されていない事実の妥当性をスコアリングするときに大きな改善を示している。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем совместное моделирование баз знаний и согласованный текст с богатыми функциями сетями. Наши модели выполняют Завершение базы знаний, учась представлять и составлять различные типы функций из частично выровненных и шумных ресурсов. Мы проводим эксперименты на Freebase, используя дополнительную информацию о типе сущности и синтаксические текстовые отношения. Наша оценка предполагает, что предложенные модели могут лучше включать в себя побочную информацию, чем ранее предложенные комбинации билинейных моделей со сверточными нейронными сетями, показывая значительные улучшения при оценке правдоподобия ненаблюдаемых фактов с соответствующими текстовыми упоминаниями.', 'zh': '请以知识库建模与功能丰富网络齐文本。 吾法学齐嘈杂之资,合诸要素类型以行知识库成。 用Freebase额外信息及句法文实验。 臣等评估,比于前双线性,比于卷积神经网络,则愈整合侧信,于未察之合理性评分显见大改。', 'hi': 'हम संयुक्त रूप से मॉडलिंग नॉलेज बेस और फीचर-रिच नेटवर्क के साथ संरेखित पाठ का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल आंशिक रूप से संरेखित और शोर संसाधनों से विविध सुविधा प्रकारों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने और रचना करने के लिए सीखने के द्वारा नॉलेज बेस पूर्णता करते हैं। हम Freebase पर अतिरिक्त इकाई प्रकार की जानकारी और वाक्यात्मक पाठ्य संबंधों का उपयोग करके प्रयोग करते हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल कन्वोल्यूशनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क के साथ द्विरेखीय मॉडल के पहले प्रस्तावित संयोजनों की तुलना में साइड जानकारी को बेहतर ढंग से शामिल कर सकते हैं, जो संबंधित पाठ्य उल्लेखों के साथ अनपेक्षित तथ्यों की तर्कसंगतता को स्कोर करते समय बड़े सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid go ndéanfaí comhshamhaltú ar Bhunáití Eolais agus ar théacs ailínithe le Líonraí Gné-saibhir. Feidhmíonn ár múnlaí Críochnú an Bhonn Eolais trí fhoghlaim conas cineálacha éagsúla gnéithe a léiriú agus a chumadh as acmhainní atá ailínithe go páirteach agus torannach. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar Freebase ag baint úsáide as faisnéis bhreise de chineál aonáin agus caidreamh comhréire téacs. Tugann ár meastóireacht le tuiscint gur fearr is féidir leis na samhlacha atá beartaithe faisnéis thaobh a ionchorprú ná mar a bhí molta roimhe seo de shamhlacha dénearacha le líonraí néaracha comhbheartaithe, rud a léiríonn feabhsuithe móra nuair a dhéantar sochreidteacht fíricí neamhbhraite a scóráil agus tagairtí téacsúla gaolmhara.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ერთადერთად მოდელურებთ მეცნიერების ბაზები და ტექსტის შენახვა ფუტურა-რიქტი ქსელებით. ჩვენი მოდელები ცნობიერების ბაზის დასრულებას გავაკეთებთ, სწავლებით განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ფუნქციების ტიპების გამოყენება და კომპოზაცია ფართობით დასრ ჩვენ Freebase-ზე ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენებთ დამატებული ინფორმაცია და სინტაქტიული ტექსტულური შესახებ. ჩვენი განსაზღვრება იტყვებს, რომ მოდელები უფრო უფრო უფრო შეუძლიათ დავყენოთ მხარეს ინფორმაციას, ვიდრე წინ მოწყობინებული ორიბილური მოდელების კონგუროლური ნეიროლური ქსელების კონგუროლური', 'hu': 'Javasoljuk a Tudásbázisok és a funkciókban gazdag hálózatokkal való összehangolt szövegek modellezését. Modelljeink úgy végzik el a Tudásbázis-kiegészítést, hogy megtanulják különböző funkciótípusokat képviselni és komponálni részben egyeztetett és zajos erőforrásokból. Kísérleteket végzünk Freebase-on további entitástípusú információk és szintaktikus szövegkapcsolatok felhasználásával. Értékelésünk azt sugallja, hogy a javasolt modellek jobban tudják beépíteni az oldalsó információkat, mint a korábban javasolt bilináris modellek konvolúciós neurális hálózatokkal, ami jelentős javulást mutat a figyelmen kívül hagyott tények valószínűségének pontozásakor a kapcsolódó szöveges említésekkel.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε από κοινού μοντελοποίηση Βάσεων Γνώσης και ευθυγραμμισμένο κείμενο με Δίκτυα Πλούσια σε χαρακτηριστικά. Τα μοντέλα μας εκτελούν την ολοκλήρωση της Γνωσιακής βάσης μαθαίνοντας να αναπαριστούν και να συνθέτουν διάφορους τύπους χαρακτηριστικών από μερικώς ευθυγραμμισμένους και θορυβώδεις πόρους. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα στο χρησιμοποιώντας πρόσθετες πληροφορίες τύπου οντότητας και συντακτικές σχέσεις κειμένου. Η αξιολόγησή μας δείχνει ότι τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα μπορούν να ενσωματώσουν καλύτερα δευτερεύουσες πληροφορίες από ό,τι προηγουμένως προτεινόμενους συνδυασμούς διπλοϊκών μοντέλων με συσταλτικά νευρωνικά δίκτυα, δείχνοντας μεγάλες βελτιώσεις κατά τη βαθμολόγηση της αξιοπιστίας μη παρατηρούμενων γεγονότων με σχετικές γραπτές αναφορές.', 'it': 'Proponiamo di modellare congiuntamente Knowledge Base e testo allineato con Feature-Rich Networks. I nostri modelli eseguono il completamento della Knowledge Base imparando a rappresentare e comporre diversi tipi di funzionalità da risorse parzialmente allineate e rumorose. Eseguiamo esperimenti su Freebase utilizzando informazioni aggiuntive sul tipo di entità e relazioni testuali sintattiche. La nostra valutazione suggerisce che i modelli proposti possono meglio incorporare informazioni laterali rispetto alle combinazioni precedentemente proposte di modelli bilineari con reti neurali convoluzionali, mostrando grandi miglioramenti quando si segna la plausibilità di fatti non osservati con menzioni testuali associate.', 'kk': 'Біз білім негізін біріктіру және Feature- Rich желілерімен түрленген мәтінді біріктіру керек. Өзіміздің үлгілеріміз білім негізінің толтыруын өзгертіп, бірнеше мүмкіндік түрлерін бөлікті түрлендірілген және дыбыс ресурстардан түрлендіру және құру үші Біз Freebase- де қосымша нысандардың түрі мәліметін және синтактикалық мәтіннің қатынастарын қолданатын эксперименттерді орындаймыз. Біздің оқиғамыз келтірілген үлгілердің алдындағы екі жақын үлгілердің біріктірілген невралдық желілерді біріктіруге болады деп ойлайды. Бұл үлгілердің біріктірілмеген мәтіндік жазбаларының көп жақсартылығын көр', 'lt': 'Siūlome bendrai modeliuoti žinių bazes ir suderinti tekstą su turinčiais ypatumus. Mūsų modeliai atlieka žinių bazės užbaigimą mokydami atstovauti įvairių savybių tipams ir juos sudaryti iš dalies suderintų ir triukšmingų išteklių. Darome eksperimentus Freebase naudojant papildomą subjekto tipo informaciją ir sintaksinius tekstinius santykius. Mūsų vertinimas rodo, kad siūlomi modeliai gali geriau įtraukti šalutinę informaciją nei anksčiau siūlomi dviejų tinklų modelių deriniai su konvoliuciniais nerviniais tinklais, rodantys didelį pagerėjimą vertinant nepastebimų faktų patikimumą su susijusiomis tekstinėmis mintimis.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме заедничко моделирање на базите на знаење и израмнување на текстот со мрежите богати со примероци. Нашите модели извршуваат комплетирање на базата на знаење со учење да ги претставуваат и составуваат различни типови на карактеристики од делумно изедначени и бучни ресурси. Правиме експерименти на Freebase користејќи дополнителни информации за типот на ентитет и синтактички текстуални односи. Our evaluation suggests that the proposed models can better incorporate side information than previously proposed combinations of bilinear models with convolutional neural networks, showing large improvements when scoring the plausibility of unobserved facts with associated textual mentions.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത്. വിശേ നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അറിവ് അടിസ്ഥാനം പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും ഭാഗമായ സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത കൂടുതല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തരം വിവരങ്ങളും സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക് ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഫ്രീബേസില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ നമ്മുടെ വിലാസം നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബിലിബിലിറ്റ് മോഡലുകളുടെ കണക്ഷനുകളെക്കാള്\u200d ഭ', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudelli konġunti tal-Bażijiet tal-Għarfien u t-test allinjat man-Netwerks Rikjesti fil-Karatteristiċi. Il-mudelli tagħna jwettqu t-Tlestija tal-Bażi tal-Għarfien billi jitgħallmu jirrappreżentaw u jikkostitwixxu tipi differenti ta’ karatteristiċi minn riżorsi parzjalment allinjati u storbjużi. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq Freebase bl-użu ta’ informazzjoni addizzjonali tat-tip ta’ entità u relazzjonijiet testwali sintattiċi. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna tissuġġerixxi li l-mudelli proposti jistgħu jinkorporaw aħjar l-informazzjoni tal-ġenb minn kombinazzjonijiet ta’ mudelli bilinear proposti preċedentement ma’ netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali, li juru titjib kbir meta jikkalkulaw il-plawsibbiltà ta’ fatti mhux osservati b’semmijiet testwali assoċjati.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдлэг суурь болон Feature-Rich Networks-тэй хамтдаа загварчлах боломжтой текст санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бидний загварууд мэдлэг үндсэн төгсгөл хийдэг бөгөөд өөр өөр өөр өөр төрлүүдийг хэсэг хэсэг болон чимээгүй эх үүсвэрээс илэрхийлж, бүтээх боломжтой болгодог. Бид Freebase-д нэмэлт нэгж төрлийн мэдээлэл, синтактикийн текст харилцаа ашиглан туршилтыг хийдэг. Бидний дүгнэлт нь санал өгсөн загварууд өмнө нь хоёр ойролцоогоор санал өгсөн загваруудын хоорондох загваруудаас илүү сайн мэдээллийг нэгтгэх боломжтой гэж үздэг. Энэ загварууд нь хоорондох мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хоорондох загваруудын хооро', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan secara kongsi mengubah Pangkalan Pengetahuan dan teks disesuaikan dengan Rangkaian Kaya-Feature. Model kami melaksanakan Penyempurnaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan dengan belajar mewakili dan komponen jenis ciri-ciri berbeza dari sumber yang sebahagian disesuaikan dan bunyi. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada Freebase menggunakan maklumat jenis entiti tambahan dan hubungan teks sintaktik. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang direncanakan boleh menggabungkan maklumat sisi lebih baik daripada kombinasi model bilinear yang direncanakan sebelumnya dengan rangkaian saraf konvolusi, menunjukkan peningkatan besar apabila menilai kemungkinan fakta yang tidak diperhatikan dengan sebutan teks yang berkaitan.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy wspólne modelowanie baz wiedzy i dostosowanych tekstów z sieciami bogatymi w funkcje. Nasze modele wykonują uzupełnianie bazy wiedzy, ucząc się reprezentować i komponować różne typy funkcji z częściowo wyrównanych i hałaśliwych zasobów. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na Freebase z wykorzystaniem dodatkowych informacji o typie jednostek i składni relacji tekstowych. Nasza ocena sugeruje, że proponowane modele mogą lepiej uwzględniać informacje boczne niż wcześniej proponowane kombinacje modeli dwunearowych z konwolucyjnymi sieciami neuronowymi, wykazując dużą poprawę w ocenie wiarygodności niezauważonych faktów z powiązanymi wzmiankami tekstowymi.', 'ro': 'Propunem modelarea în comun a bazelor de cunoștințe și a textului aliniat cu rețelele bogate în caracteristici. Modelele noastre realizează finalizarea bazei de cunoștințe prin învățarea de a reprezenta și compune diferite tipuri de caracteristici din resurse parțial aliniate și zgomotoase. Efectuăm experimente pe Freebase folosind informații suplimentare de tip entitate și relații text sintactice. Evaluarea noastră sugerează că modelele propuse pot încorpora mai bine informații secundare decât combinațiile propuse anterior de modele bilineare cu rețele neuronale convoluționale, arătând mari îmbunătățiri atunci când se evaluează plauzibilitatea faptelor neobservate cu mențiuni textuale asociate.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår saman modellering av kjennebaser og justert tekst med funksjonar- rikt nettverk. Modellane våre utfører kjennebasefullføring ved å læra å representera og lagra ulike funksjonstypar frå delvis justert og støy-ressursar. Vi utfører eksperimenter på Freebase som brukar ekstra entitetstype- informasjon og syntaktiske tekstrelasjon. Vårt evaluering foreslår at den foreslåde modellen kan bedre inkludere sideinformasjon enn tidlegare foreslåde kombinasjonar av bilinær modeller med konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk, som viser stor forbedringar når det gjer tilsynleg tilgjengeleg tekst.', 'so': 'Waxaan horay u soo jeedaynaa sameynta aasaaska aqoonta ee wadajirka ah iyo qoraal la sawiray shabakada Feature-Rich. Tusaalooyinkayadu waxay sameynayaan dhammaystirka aasaaska aqoonta lagu barto inay ka mid noqoto iyo soo koobaan noocyo kala duduwan oo ay qayb ahaan uga soo bandhigaan iyo qayb ka dhawaaqa. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan Freebase, isticmaalaya macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la xiriira dhaqanka ee qoraalka. Qiimeyntayada waxaa loola jeedaa in modelalka la soo jeeday ay ay ka wanaagsan yihiin in lagu soo geliyo macluumaad dhinaca sidoo kale oo horay loo talo galay isbitaalo laba dhow oo ku jira shabakado dabeecada ah, kuwaas oo tusaya hagaajinta badan marka lagu sawiro suuradda aan la arag waxyaabaha la xiriira macluumaadka qoraalka ah.', 'sr': 'Mi predlažemo zajedno modelirati bazu znanja i poravnati tekst sa mrežama Feature-Rich. Naši modeli izvršavaju kompletnu bazu znanja učeći da predstavljamo i sastavljamo različite vrste karakteristika iz djelomično usklađenih i bukovih resursa. Izvodimo eksperimente na Freebase koristeći dodatne informacije o tipu entiteta i sintaktične tekstualne odnose. Naša procjena ukazuje na to da predloženi modeli mogu bolje uključiti strane informacije nego prethodno predložene kombinacije bilinear modela sa konvolucionalnim neuralnim mrežama, pokazujući velike poboljšanja kada se pregleda uvjerljivost neočuvanih činjenica sa povezanim tekstualnim spomenama.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår gemensamt modellering av kunskapsbaser och anpassad text med funktionsrika nätverk. Våra modeller utför kunskapsbaskomplettering genom att lära sig representera och komponera olika funktionstyper från delvis anpassade och bullriga resurser. Vi utför experiment på Freebase med hjälp av ytterligare entitetstypinformation och syntaktiska textrelationer. Vår utvärdering tyder på att de föreslagna modellerna bättre kan inkorporera sidoinformation än tidigare föreslagna kombinationer av bilineara modeller med konvulutionella neurala nätverk, vilket visar stora förbättringar när man scorar sannolikheten av icke observerade fakta med tillhörande textomnämnanden.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒன்றாக அறிவு அடிப்படைகளை மாதிரியும் மற்றும் செல்லும் உரையை சேர் எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் அறிவு அடிப்படை முடிவு செய்து பாகமாக ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் சப்தம் வளங்களிலிருந்து பல்வேறு கூட்டும் வகைகள நாம் கூடுதல் உண்மையின் வகை தகவல் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு நிரல் தொடர்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். எங்கள் மதிப்பு முன்னோட்டப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் முன்பு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட இருந்து மாதிரிகளின் இணைப்புகளை விட சிறந்த பக்கத்தில் தகவலை சேர்க்க முடியும் என்பது தெரியு', 'ur': 'ہم ایک دوسرے سے مدل کرنے کے لئے علم بنسس اور پیغام کے ذریعہ متصل کرنے کے لئے متصل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہمارے مدلز علم Base Completion کی تعلیم کرتی ہیں کہ مختلف فائدے کی طرح کو نمایش کرنا اور پیدا کرنا اور آہستہ سراسروں سے مختلف طرح پیدا کریں۔ ہم فریبنس پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور اضافہ انٹیٹی کی طرح معلومات اور سینٹاکتیک ٹکسٹیول رابطہ استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہماری ارزیابی کا یہ معلوم ہے کہ پیشنهادہ نمونڈل اس سے پہلے پیشنهادہ کیا گیا تھا کہ دوئلینزیل نمونڈلوں کی ترکیب سے بہتر سائل معلومات شامل کر سکتے ہیں، جبکہ اس سے بہت زیادہ اضافہ کی جاتی ہے جبکہ مشترک متن کے ذکر کے ساتھ بغیر نظارت کی حقیقت کی قابل', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරනවා දන්න විද්\u200dයාපනය අධ්\u200dයාපනය සහ විද්\u200dයාපනය අධ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා පාළුව සඳහා  අපේ මොඩේල් දන්නවන අධ්\u200dයාත්මක සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සහ සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා විවිදිහට විවිදිහට ප්\u200dරක අපි ෆ්\u200dරීබේස් වල ප්\u200dරවෘති තොරතුරු සහ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පැත්ත තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප', 'uz': "Maʼlumot bazasini birlashtirish va Matn taʼminlovchi tarmoq bilan birlashtirish imkoniyatini tahlil qilamiz. Bizning modellarimiz taʼrif asosiy tizimini bajarish va qismdan bir xil oʻxshash va tovush rasmlaridan turli xil xususiyatlarni tahrirlash orqali o'rganadi. Biz qoʻshimcha ma'lumotning turi maʼlumoti va syntactik textb murakkablaridan foydalanish uchun Freebase'ning imtiyozlarini bajaramiz. Bizning qiymatlarimiz aytganimiz, taʼminlovchi modellar oldin talab qilingan bilinear modellari bilan birlashtirilgan bir tarmoq tarmoqlaridan ham yaxshi ma'lumotni qo'yish mumkin. Bu narsa texnologiya taʼminlovchilar bilan bog'liqlangan narsalarni qo'yishda katta rivojlanishini koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị làm mẫu cùng nhau Nhà khoa học và kết hợp văn bản với Trung tâm. Những mẫu của chúng tôi thực hiện Việc hoàn thành của Nhà tri thức bằng cách học cách đại diện và sáng tác các loại khác nhau từ các nguồn có liên kết và ồn ào. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm trên Freebase nhờ kết nối thông tin dạng thực thể bổ sung và kết cấu pháp. Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình đề xuất có thể cung cấp thông tin phụ tốt hơn những kết hợp mật với các mô hình thần kinh rối loạn trước đây, hiển thị những cải tiến lớn khi ghi lại sự hiển nhiên chưa được ghi nhận với các đề cập kết cấu.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår i fællesskab modellering af vidensbaser og justeret tekst med funktionsrige netværk. Vores modeller udfører Knowledge Base Completion ved at lære at repræsentere og komponere forskellige funktionstyper fra delvist justerede og støjende ressourcer. Vi udfører eksperimenter på Freebase ved hjælp af yderligere entitetstypeinformation og syntaktiske tekstrelationer. Vores evaluering tyder på, at de foreslåede modeller bedre kan indarbejde sideinformation end tidligere foreslåede kombinationer af bilinære modeller med konvulutionelle neurale netværk, hvilket viser store forbedringer ved scoring af sandsynligheden af uobserverede fakta med tilhørende tekstomtaler.', 'nl': 'We stellen voor om samen Kennisbanken en uitgelijnde tekst te modelleren met Feature-Rich Networks. Onze modellen voeren Knowledge Base Completion uit door te leren om verschillende functietypen uit gedeeltelijk uitgelijnde en lawaaierige bronnen weer te geven en samen te stellen. We voeren experimenten uit op Freebase met behulp van extra entiteitstype informatie en syntactische tekstrelaties. Onze evaluatie suggereert dat de voorgestelde modellen beter zijdelinformatie kunnen bevatten dan eerder voorgestelde combinaties van bilineaire modellen met convolutionele neurale netwerken, wat grote verbeteringen laat zien bij het scoren van de plausibiliteit van niet-waargenomen feiten met bijbehorende tekstvermeldingen.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме съвместно моделиране на бази от знания и подравняване на текста с богати на функции мрежи. Нашите модели изпълняват завършване на базата данни от знания, като се научат да представят и композират различни типове функции от частично подравнени и шумни ресурси. Извършваме експерименти на Фрийбаз, използвайки допълнителна информация за типа същност и синтактични текстови връзки. Нашата оценка предполага, че предложените модели могат по-добре да включват странична информация, отколкото предложените преди това комбинации от билинерни модели с конволюционни невронни мрежи, показвайки големи подобрения при оценката на правдоподобните факти със свързаните текстови споменания.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo zajedno modelirati baze znanja i poravnati tekst sa mrežama Feature-Rich. Naši modeli izvršavaju kompletnu bazu znanja učeći predstavljanje i sastavljanje različitih vrsta karakteristika iz djelomično usklađenih i bukovih resursa. Izvodimo eksperimente na Freebase koristeći dodatne informacije o tipu entiteta i sintaktičke tekstualne odnose. Naša procjena ukazuje na to da predloženi modeli mogu bolje uključiti strane informacije nego prethodno predložene kombinacije bilinear modela sa konvolucionalnim neuronskim mrežama, pokazujući velike poboljšanje kada se pregleda uvjerljivost neočuvanih činjenica s povezanim tekstualnim spomenuma.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen vor, gemeinsam Wissensbasen zu modellieren und Text mit funktionsreichen Netzwerken auszurichten. Unsere Modelle führen die Wissensdatenbank-Vervollständigung durch, indem sie lernen, verschiedene Feature-Typen aus teilweise ausgerichteten und lauten Ressourcen darzustellen und zu komponieren. Wir führen Experimente auf Freebase durch, indem wir zusätzliche Entitätstypinformationen und syntaktische Textbeziehungen nutzen. Unsere Evaluation legt nahe, dass die vorgeschlagenen Modelle Seiteninformationen besser integrieren können als bisher vorgeschlagene Kombinationen von bilinearen Modellen mit convolutionalen neuronalen Netzen, was große Verbesserungen beim Scoring der Plausibilität unbeobachteter Fakten mit zugehörigen Texterwähnungen zeigt.', 'id': 'We propose jointly modelling Knowledge Bases and aligned text with Feature-Rich Networks.  Model kami melaksanakan Penyelesaian Pangkalan Pengetahuan dengan belajar untuk mewakili dan menyatukan tipe karakteristik berbeda dari sumber daya yang sebagian disesuaikan dan berisik. Kami melakukan eksperimen di Freebase menggunakan informasi tipe entitas tambahan dan hubungan tekstual sintaksi. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan dapat lebih baik memasukkan informasi sisi daripada kombinasi model bilinear yang diusulkan sebelumnya dengan jaringan saraf konvolusi, menunjukkan peningkatan besar ketika mencetak plausibilitas fakta yang tidak diperhatikan dengan sebutan tekstual yang terkait.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بنیاد دانش را با هم مدل کنیم و متن را با شبکه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ثروت متصل کنیم. مدلهای ما کامل بنیاد دانش را با یاد گرفتن برای نمایش و ساختن نوع ویژه های مختلف از منابع بخشی متصل و صدا انجام می دهند. ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را روی Freebase انجام می\u200cدهیم که با استفاده از اطلاعات نوع واحد بیشتری و رابطه\u200cهای متن سنتاکتیک استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ارزیابی ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که مدلهای پیشنهاد می\u200cتوانند اطلاعات جانبی را بهتر شامل کنند تا قبل از ترکیب پیشنهاد مدلهای دو نزدیک با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی غیرعامل، که در موقع تحقیق قابلیت واقعیت\u200cهای غیرقابل نظارت با یادآوری textual ارتباط دارند.', 'ko': '우리는 모형 지식 라이브러리를 연합하여 텍스트와 기능이 풍부한 네트워크를 맞추는 것을 건의합니다.우리의 모델은 부분적으로 정렬되고 시끄러운 자원에서 서로 다른 특징 유형을 표시하고 조합하는 것을 학습함으로써 지식 라이브러리의 구축을 완성한다.Freebase에서는 추가 솔리드 유형 정보와 구문-텍스트 관계를 사용하여 실험을 수행합니다.우리의 평가에 따르면 이전에 제기된 쌍선형 모델과 권적신경 네트워크의 조합에 비해 제시된 모델은 사이드 정보를 더욱 잘 결합시킬 수 있고 관찰되지 않은 사실과 관련 텍스트가 언급한 합리성에 대해 평가를 할 때 큰 개선을 보였다.', 'af': 'Ons voorstel joint modeling kennis basis en gelyk teks met Feature-Rich Netwerke. Ons modele uitvoer kennis Basis Voltooiïng deur te leer om verskeie funksie tipes te stel en te stel van gedeeltelik gelyk en gelyk hulpbronne. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op Freebase wat addisionele entiteit tipe inligting en sintaktiewe tekstuurrelasies gebruik word. Ons evaluering stel voorstel dat die voorgestelde modele beter kan inkorporeer kantinligting as voorheen voorgestelde kombinasies van bilinêre modele met konvolusionele neuralnetwerke, wat groot verbeteringe vertoon word wanneer die veroorsaaklikheid van onbevestige fakte met geassosieerde tekstuele bepaalde aansoek word.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë të modelojmë së bashku bazat e njohurive dhe tekstin e përshtatur me rrjetet e pasura me funksione. Modelet tona kryejnë kompletimin e bazës së njohurive duke mësuar për të përfaqësuar dhe përbërë lloje të ndryshme karakteristike nga burime pjesërisht të renditura dhe zhurmëshme. Ne bëjmë eksperimente në Freebase duke përdorur informacion shtesë të llojit të njësisë dhe marrëdhënie tekstuale sintaktike. Vlerësimi ynë sugjeron se modelet e propozuara mund të përfshijnë më mirë informacion anësor sesa kombinimet e propozuara më parë të modeleve dypalëshe me rrjetet nervore konvolutive, duke treguar përmirësime të mëdha kur shënojnë besueshmërinë e fakteve të pazgjidhura me përmendimet tekstuale të lidhura.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza kuunda misingi ya ufahamu pamoja na kuandika ujumbe kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Tajiri-Tajiri. Mifano yetu hufanya Kutimiza Ujuzi kwa kujifunza kuwakilisha na kutengeneza aina mbalimbali kutoka rasilimali zilizotengenezwa na kelele. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye Freebase kwa kutumia aina ya taarifa na mahusiano ya kimsingi. Utafiti wetu unapendekezwa unaonyesha kuwa miundo mbili zinaweza kuingiza taarifa za upande zaidi ya mapendekezo ya miundo mbili yenye mitandao ya kikatili ya neura, ikionyesha maendeleo makubwa pale yanapoonyesha uvumilivu wa ukweli usiotarajiwa na maarifa yanayohusiana na makubaliano ya msingi.', 'tr': "Biz bilem tabanlarını bir arada modelleştirmek ve özellikleri Rich Netekler bilen düzeltmek teklifini teklif ediyoruz. Biziň modellerimiz Bilim Basisi Tamamlandyrylygyny öwrenmek we çykyş özelliklerimizi parça çykarmak we gürrüňli çeşmelerden çykarmak üçin edip bilýän Basisi tamamlandyrýar. Biz Freebase'da bir tek hili maglumaty we sintaktik metin baglaýyşlaryny ulanýarys. Biziň deňleşmegimiz teklip eden nusgalaryň öňki golaý nusgalaryň birleşmesinden has gowy ýagdaý maglumatlaryny alyp biljekdigini düşünýär.", 'am': 'We propose jointly modelling Knowledge Bases and aligned text with Feature-Rich Networks.  ሞዴላዎቻችን እውቀትን መደገፊያ በማስተማርና በተለየ እና የድምፅ ሀብት በተለየ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን ማሳየት እውቀት መደገፊያውን ይሠራሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ዓይነት መረጃ እና የስናታዊ የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት በመጠቀም ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ማስታወቂያችን አስቀድሞ በተዘጋጀው የቢሊቅር ሞዴላዎችን ከሙሉ የናውሬት መረብ ጋር ካደረጉት የበለጠ መረጃዎችን እንዲያሳስብ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք միասին մոդելավորել գիտելիքի հիմքերը և համապատասխանել տեքստը ֆունկցիոնալ հարուստ ցանցերի հետ: Մեր մոդելները կատարում են գիտելիքի հիմքի ավարտումը սովորելով ներկայացնել և կազմել բազմազան հատկանիշներ մասամբ կազմված և աղմկոտ ռեսուրսներից: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձեր ազատ հիմքի վրա օգտագործելով ավելացյալ անհատականության տեսակի ինֆորմացիա և սինտակտիկ տեքստային հարաբերություններ: Մեր գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելները ավելի լավ կարող են ներառել կողմնակի ինֆորմացիա, քան նախկինում առաջարկված երկու մոդելների համադրությունները հակառակցված նեյրոնային ցանցերի հետ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մեծ բարելավումներ, երբ գնահատում են անդիտարկված փաստերի հավ', 'az': 'Biz birlikdə modelləşdirmək Bilim Bütləri və Feature-Rich Networks ilə metinləri təyin edirik. Bizim modellərimiz Bilim Basi tamamlamasını öyrənib parçalanmış və gürültü kaynaqlardan müxtəlif fərqli fərqli fərqli növləri təşkil edir. Biz Freebase-da əlavə məlumatları və sintaktik məlumatları istifadə edirik. Bizim değerlendirmək təklif edilmiş modellərin əvvəlcə təklif edilmiş bilik-yaxın modellərin birləşdirilməsindən daha yaxşı təklif məlumatlarını birləşdirə biləcəyini iddia edir. Bu modellərin çox yaxşılıqlarını göstərir, təklif edilməyən təklif məlumatları ilə birləşdirilmiş təklif məlumatların', 'bs': 'Predlažemo zajedno modelirati baze znanja i poravnati tekst sa mrežama Feature-Rich. Naši modeli izvršavaju kompletnu bazu znanja učeći predstavljanje i sastavljanje različitih vrsta karakteristika iz djelomično usklađenih i bukovih resursa. Izvodimo eksperimente na Freebase koristeći dodatne informacije o tipu entiteta i sintaktične tekstualne odnose. Naša procjena ukazuje na to da predloženi modeli mogu bolje uključiti strane informacije nego prethodno predložene kombinacije bilinear modela sa konvolucionalnim neuronskim mrežama, pokazujući velike poboljšanja kada se pregleda uvjerljivost neočuvanih činjenica sa povezanim tekstualnim spomenuma.', 'ca': "We propose jointly modelling Knowledge Bases and aligned text with Feature-Rich Networks.  Our models perform Knowledge Base Completion by learning to represent and compose diverse feature types from partially aligned and noisy resources.  Fem experiments a Freebase utilitzant informació adicional del tipus d'entitat i relacions textuals sinàctiques. La nostra evaluació suggereix que els models proposats poden incorporar millor informació paral·lela que les combinacions anteriorment proposades de models bilinear amb xarxes neurals convolucionals, mostrant grans millors al puntuar la plausibilitat de fets no observats amb mencions textuals associades.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme společné modelování znalostních bází a sladěného textu s funkčně bohatými sítěmi. Naše modely provádějí dokončování znalostní báze tím, že se naučí reprezentovat a sestavovat různé typy funkcí z částečně zarovnaných a hlučných zdrojů. Provádíme experimenty na Freebase s využitím dalších informací o typu entity a syntaktických textových vztahů. Naše hodnocení naznačuje, že navržené modely mohou lépe zahrnovat vedlejší informace než dříve navržené kombinace bilineárních modelů s konvolučními neuronovými sítěmi, což ukazuje velké zlepšení při hodnocení věrohodnosti nepozorovaných faktů s souvisejícími textovými zmínkami.', 'bn': 'আমরা সাথে জ্ঞানের বেসের মডেল করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি এবং ফিটার-সম্পদ নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে সংযুক্ত লেখা। আমাদের মডেল আংশিকভাবে একত্রিত এবং আওয়াজের সম্পদ থেকে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ও তৈরি করার শিক্ষা দিয়ে জ্ঞ We perform experiments on Freebase utilizing additional entity type information and syntactic textual relations.  আমাদের মুল্যায়ন পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল পূর্বের প্রস্তাবিত বিলিবাইট মডেলের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের মিনিটের চেয়ে ভালো তথ্য পার্শ', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme yhdessä tietokantojen mallintamista ja tekstin yhtenäistämistä Feature-Rich Networks -verkostojen kanssa. Mallimme suorittavat Knowledge Base Completion -suorituksen oppimalla esittämään ja säveltämään erilaisia ominaisuustyyppejä osittain kohdistetuista ja meluisista resursseista. Teemme Freebasella kokeita käyttäen muita entiteettityyppitietoja ja syntaktisia tekstisuhteita. Arviointi osoittaa, että ehdotetut mallit pystyvät sisällyttämään sivuinformaatiota paremmin kuin aiemmin ehdotetut kaksikerroksisten mallien yhdistelmät konvolutionaalisten hermoverkkojen kanssa, mikä osoittaa suuria parannuksia pistettäessä huomaamattomien faktojen uskottavuutta niihin liittyvillä tekstimaininnoilla.', 'et': "Me teeme ettepaneku ühiselt modelleerida teadmistebaase ja viia teksti joonde funktsionaalsete võrkudega. Meie mudelid täidavad teabebaasi lõpetamist, õppides esindama ja koostama erinevaid funktsioonitüüpe osaliselt joondatud ja mürakatest ressurssidest. Me teeme Freebase'is eksperimente, kasutades täiendavat olemitüüpi infot ja süntaktilisi tekstisuhteid. Meie hinnang näitab, et kavandatud mudelid suudavad paremini sisaldada kõrvalteavet kui varem kavandatud kaksikmudelite kombinatsioonid konvolutsiooniliste närvivõrkudega, näidates suuri paranemisi tähelepanuta jäetud faktide usutavuse hindamisel seoses tekstiliste märkustega.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים ביחד לדוגמא בסיסי הידע וטקסט מואמן עם רשתות עשירות. הדוגמנים שלנו מבצעים השלמת בסיס הידע על ידי לימוד לייצג ומרכיב סוגי תכונות מגוונים משאבים מסוימים וחלקיים. We perform experiments on Freebase utilizing additional entity type information and syntactic textual relations.  הערכה שלנו מציעה שהדוגמנים המוצעים יכולים להכיל יותר מידע צדדי מאשר קודם הציעו שילובים של דוגמנים בילינאריים עם רשתות עצביות משתנות, שמראים שיפורים גדולים כשניקוי את סבירות העובדות הלא צפויות עם זיכרונות טקסטאליים קשורים.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake beraksi layang-akèh lan seneng nggawe barang-alam kuwi ribuksi-rikan netwark. modellus Awak dhéwé éntuk perintas nang freebaz gambar informasi layang entek lan senjatik textual karo barang. Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak bener nggawe informasi sing luwih apik karo perusahaan kelompok dianggawe sistem sing dibutuhé dhéwé, karo netawak dhéwé, éntuk akeh luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe perusahaan langgar-sistem sing susahé perusahaan unggadi.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyade masu motsari da Bayan Sannin da ake daidaita matsayin da Feature-rich Networks. Kamayõyinmu suna cika Basin Cilmi da ake iya cikakken su da aka sanar da su kuma su sami typi masu nau'in abubuwa daga rabin da aka daidaita da kuma tsãwa. Munã jarraba jarrabo a kan Freebase da ke amfani da nau'in abun da ma'anar gaske na tsarin matsayin da suka yi syntactic. Ana ƙaddara ayukanmu yana gaya cẽwa misãlai da aka rufe su haɗi lãbãri ga side information mafi alhẽri daga wanda aka buɗa wa komai na biyu-biyu da zanen neura masu bastarwa, sunã nuna mafiya kyau a lokacin da aka ƙididdige musamman da ma'abũcin matsayi masu husũma na rubutu.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo skupno modeliranje baz znanja in usklajeno besedilo z omrežji, bogatimi s funkcijami. Naši modeli izvajajo dokončanje zbirke znanja tako, da se naučijo predstavljati in sestavljati različne vrste funkcij iz delno poravnanih in hrupnih virov. Izvajamo eksperimente na Freebase z uporabo dodatnih informacij o vrstah entitet in sintaktičnih besedilnih relacij. Naša ocena kaže, da lahko predlagani modeli bolje vključijo stranske informacije kot predhodno predlagane kombinacije bilinearnih modelov s konvolucijskimi nevronskimi omrežji, kar kaže velike izboljšave pri ocenjevanju verjetnosti neopaženih dejstev s povezanimi besedilnimi omembami.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཆོས་ཉིད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་དབྱིབས་རིགས་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡི་གེ་ཆོས་ཉིད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་བསྡུས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། Our models perform Knowledge Base Completion by learning to represent and compose diverse feature types from partially aligned and noisy resources. ང་ཚོས་Freebase་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་རིགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དབྱིབས ང་ཚོའི་evaluacion་གིས་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ལས་སྔོན་གྱི་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཚགས་མ་གཟུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད་པའི་མཛོད'}
{'en': 'Fine-Grained Entity Typing with High-Multiplicity Assignments', 'ar': 'طباعة الكيانات بدقة عالية مع تكليفات التعدد العالية', 'es': 'Tipificación de entidades detallada con asignaciones de alta multiplicidad', 'fr': 'Saisie fine des entités avec des affectations à multiplicité élevée', 'pt': 'Digitação de entidade refinada com atribuições de alta multiplicidade', 'ja': '多重性の高い課題を伴う細かいエンティティのタイプ', 'zh': '有高多重性赋值之细粒度类型化', 'hi': 'उच्च-बहुलता असाइनमेंट के साथ ठीक-दाने वाली एंटिटी टाइपिंग', 'ru': 'Мелкозернистый ввод сущностей с высокократными назначениями', 'ga': 'Aonán Mínghráthaithe ag Clóscríobh le Sannacháin Ard-Iolrachais', 'ka': 'მარტივი განსაზღვრებული ელემენტის დაწერა', 'el': 'Πληκτρολόγηση λεπτόκοκκων οντοτήτων με αναθέσεις υψηλής πολλαπλότητας', 'hu': 'Finomszemű szervezetek gépelése nagy többszörösségű hozzárendelésekkel', 'kk': 'Жоғары көптеген көптеген бөлшектерді таңдау', 'lt': 'Tinkamai grūdintų subjektų tipavimas su didelio daugumos asignavimais', 'it': 'Tipizzazione di entità a grana fine con assegnazioni ad alta molteplicità', 'mk': 'Впишување на фино- зелени ентитети со високомножествени прилози', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Tip ta’ Entità b’Ħruġ Fin b’Assignazzjonijiet ta’ Multipliċità Għolja', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d പലിപ്പിടിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം നല്ല ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് എന്റിറ്റി ടൈപ്പിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'Сайн хэмжээст бүтэц өндөр олон хэмжээтэй бичих', 'no': 'Skriv inn finn gransert eining med høg multipliseringsverdiar', 'pl': 'Drobnoziarniste pisanie jednostek z przydziałami o dużej wielości', 'ro': 'Tastarea entităților cu granule fine cu atribuții de multiplicitate ridicată', 'sr': 'Fine-Grained Entity Typing with High-Multiplicity Assignments', 'so': 'Isku-qorista ganacsiga ee Finnishka ah ee lagu isticmaalo Assista sare', 'sv': 'Finkornig enhetstypning med h├Čgmultiplicitetsuppgifter', 'si': 'හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් අන්තිත්වය ලිපිනය උඩ- ගොඩක් ගොඩක් අන්තිමය සමග', 'ta': 'அதிகப்படியான பல்மடங்கு ஒப்புக்களுடன் சரியான சிறப்பு உள்ளீடு தட்டல்', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ گرینڈ ایٹنی ٹائیپینگ بالا-کثیر تقسیم کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thiết bị đánh chữ đặc biệt', 'da': 'Typning af finkornede enheder med tildelinger med høj multiplicitet', 'hr': 'Fine-Grained Entity Typing with High-Multiplicity Assignments', 'bg': 'Финозърнесто писане на обекти с задания с високо множество', 'nl': 'Fijn korrelige entiteiten typen met opdrachten met hoge multipliciteit', 'de': 'Feinkörnige Entity-Eingabe mit Zuweisungen mit hoher Multiplizität', 'ko': '높은 다중성 분배를 가진 세립도 실체 유형', 'id': 'Jenis Entitas Berbentuk Baik dengan Pengiriman Multiplikasi Tinggi', 'sw': 'Kutumia Ujumbe wa Kiingereza', 'fa': 'نوشتن واحد بسته\u200cای خوب با ارائه\u200cهای بسیار زیادی', 'tr': 'Yüksek köpşilik Taýýarlama', 'sq': 'Njerëzimi i njësisë së rrafshuar me shumëfishkësi të lartë', 'am': 'undo-type', 'af': 'Fin- Grain Eenheid Tipe met Hoog- Multiplisiteit Toegang', 'az': 'Yüksək çoxluq Hazırlıqları ilə yaxşı-çəkilmiş Entit Yazılımı', 'hy': 'Բավականին բազմազանություն բաժանվող առանձնահատկություններով գրելը', 'bn': 'উচ্চ-বহুগুণ্ডিত অবজেন্টের সাথে সুন্দর গ্রেন্ড এন্টিটি টাইপিং', 'ca': "Escritura d'una entitat amb grans grans amb atribucions d'alta multiplicitat", 'cs': 'Jemnozrnné zadávání entit s přiřazením s vysokou násobností', 'bs': 'Fine-Grained Entity Typing with High-Multiplicity Assignments', 'et': 'Pehmeteraline olemi tippimine suure mitmekordsusega ülesannetega', 'fi': 'Hienojyväinen entiteetin kirjoittaminen suuren moninkertaisuuden tehtävillä', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Tipkanje drobnozrnatega subjekta z nalogami z visoko množljivostjo', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'Fine-Grained Entity Typing with High-Multiplicity Assignments', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བྱུང་བའི་ནང་དོན་དག་ཚད་ལྡན་པ། རྩིས་བྲལ་མཐོ་བ་དང་མཚུངས་སྤྱོད་པ'}
{'en': 'As entity type systems become richer and more fine-grained, we expect the number of types assigned to a given entity to increase. However, most fine-grained typing work has focused on datasets that exhibit a low degree of type multiplicity. In this paper, we consider the high-multiplicity regime inherent in data sources such as Wikipedia that have semi-open type systems. We introduce a set-prediction approach to this problem and show that our model outperforms unstructured baselines on a new Wikipedia-based fine-grained typing corpus.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لأن أنظمة نوع الكيان أصبحت أكثر ثراءً ودقة ، فإننا نتوقع زيادة عدد الأنواع المخصصة لكيان معين. ومع ذلك ، فقد ركزت معظم أعمال الكتابة الدقيقة على مجموعات البيانات التي تظهر درجة منخفضة من تعدد الأنواع. في هذه الورقة ، نأخذ في الاعتبار نظام التعددية العالية المتأصل في مصادر البيانات مثل ويكيبيديا التي تحتوي على أنظمة شبه مفتوحة. نقدم نهج مجموعة التنبؤ لهذه المشكلة ونوضح أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس غير المنظمة في مجموعة الكتابة الدقيقة الجديدة المستندة إلى ويكيبيديا.', 'es': 'A medida que los sistemas de tipos de entidad se vuelven más ricos y refinados, esperamos que aumente el número de tipos asignados a una entidad determinada. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los trabajos de mecanografía detallados se han centrado en conjuntos de datos que exhiben un bajo grado de multiplicidad de tipos. En este artículo, consideramos el régimen de alta multiplicidad inherente a las fuentes de datos como Wikipedia que tienen sistemas de tipo semiabierto. Introducimos un enfoque de predicción de conjuntos para este problema y demostramos que nuestro modelo supera a las líneas de base no estructuradas en un nuevo corpus de mecanografía detallado basado en Wikipedia.', 'pt': 'À medida que os sistemas de tipo de entidade se tornam mais ricos e mais refinados, esperamos que o número de tipos atribuídos a uma determinada entidade aumente. No entanto, a maioria dos trabalhos de tipagem refinados concentrou-se em conjuntos de dados que exibem um baixo grau de multiplicidade de tipos. Neste artigo, consideramos o regime de alta multiplicidade inerente a fontes de dados como a Wikipedia que possuem sistemas do tipo semiaberto. Introduzimos uma abordagem de previsão de conjunto para esse problema e mostramos que nosso modelo supera as linhas de base não estruturadas em um novo corpus de tipagem refinado baseado na Wikipedia.', 'fr': "À mesure que les systèmes de types d'entités s'enrichissent et s'affinent, nous nous attendons à ce que le nombre de types attribués à une entité donnée augmente. Cependant, la plupart des travaux de typage précis se sont concentrés sur des ensembles de données présentant un faible degré de multiplicité de types. Dans cet article, nous examinons le régime de multiplicité élevé inhérent aux sources de données telles que Wikipédia qui ont des systèmes de type semi-ouverts. Nous introduisons une approche de prédiction d'ensembles à ce problème et montrons que notre modèle surpasse les baselines non structurées sur un nouveau corpus de typage fin basé sur Wikipedia.", 'ja': 'エンティティタイプシステムがより豊かになり、より細かくなるにつれて、特定のエンティティに割り当てられるタイプの数が増加することが予想されます。しかし、ほとんどの細かいタイピング作業は、タイプの多様性の程度が低いデータセットに焦点を当てている。本稿では、セミオープン型システムを持つウィキペディアなどのデータソースに内在する高多重性制度について考察する。私たちはこの問題に対するセット予測アプローチを紹介し、ウィキペディアベースの新しい細かい型付けコーパスでは、私たちのモデルが非構造化ベースラインを上回っていることを示します。', 'zh': '随其统而益丰细粒度,计给定之数将益之。 然多细粒度类型化事皆集于多样性数集上。 于本文之中,虑有半开之统数据源(如维基百科)之固多重性。 合而占之,以维基百科新细粒度语料库上优于非结构化基线。', 'hi': 'जैसा कि एंटिटी प्रकार सिस्टम अमीर और अधिक महीन हो जाते हैं, हम किसी दिए गए इकाई को असाइन किए गए प्रकारों की संख्या में वृद्धि की उम्मीद करते हैं। हालांकि, अधिकांश ठीक-ठाक टाइपिंग कार्य ने डेटासेट पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है जो निम्न स्तर की बहुलता प्रदर्शित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम विकिपीडिया जैसे डेटा स्रोतों में निहित उच्च-बहुलता शासन पर विचार करते हैं जिसमें अर्ध-खुले प्रकार के सिस्टम हैं। हम इस समस्या के लिए एक सेट-भविष्यवाणी दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल एक नए विकिपीडिया-आधारित ठीक-दाने वाले टाइपिंग कॉर्पस पर असंरचित बेसलाइन को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'По мере того, как системы типов сущностей становятся более богатыми и мелкозернистыми, мы ожидаем, что количество типов, назначенных данной сущности, будет увеличиваться. Однако большая часть работы по мелкозернистой типизации сосредоточена на наборах данных, которые демонстрируют низкую степень кратности типов. В этой статье мы рассмотрим режим высокой мультипликативности, присущий таким источникам данных, как Википедия, которые имеют полуоткрытые системы. Мы вводим подход к этой проблеме с заданным прогнозом и показываем, что наша модель превосходит неструктурированные базовые линии на новом мелкозернистом машинописном корпусе, основанном на Википедии.', 'ga': 'De réir mar a éiríonn córais de chineál aonáin níos saibhre agus níos míne, táimid ag súil go dtiocfaidh méadú ar líon na gcineálacha a shanntar d’aonán ar leith. Mar sin féin, dhírigh an chuid is mó den obair chlóscríofa mhionsonraithe ar thacair sonraí a léiríonn leibhéal íseal iolrachta cineáil. Sa pháipéar seo, breithnímid ar an réimeas ard-iomadúlachta is gné dhílis de fhoinsí sonraí ar nós Vicipéid a bhfuil córais leath-oscailte acu. Tugaimid isteach cur chuige réamh-mheastacháin maidir leis an bhfadhb seo agus léirímid go sáraíonn ár samhail na bunlínte neamhstruchtúrtha ar chorpas nua clóscríofa atá bunaithe ar Vicipéid.', 'ka': 'როგორც ინტერტიკური ტიპის სისტემი უფრო დიდი და უფრო დიდი სისტემი იქნება, ჩვენ გვეწოდება, რამდენიმე ტიპების რაოდენობა, რამდენიმე განსაზღვრული ინ მაგრამ, უფრო მსგავსი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი მონაცემების შესახებ, რომლებიც საკუთარი ტიპის მრავალობის ცოტაცია გამოჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ მაღალი მრავალეობის რეზიმი, როგორც ვიკიპედია, რომელიც ნახევალ გახსნა ტიპის სისტემები. ჩვენ ამ პრობლემაზე დავიწყებთ სექტიკური პრობლემა და ჩვენი მოდელემა გავაკეთებთ, რომ ახალი სექტიკური ფექტიკური ფექტიკური ფექტიკური ფექტიკური ფექტიკური ფე', 'el': 'Καθώς τα συστήματα τύπου οντότητας γίνονται πλουσιότερα και πιο λεπτόκοκκα, αναμένουμε να αυξηθεί ο αριθμός των τύπων που αντιστοιχούν σε μια δεδομένη οντότητα. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες λεπτόκοκκες εργασίες δακτυλογράφησης έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε σύνολα δεδομένων που παρουσιάζουν χαμηλό βαθμό πολλαπλότητας τύπων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε το καθεστώς υψηλής πολλαπλότητας εγγενές σε πηγές δεδομένων όπως η Βικιπαίδεια που έχουν συστήματα ημιανοιχτού τύπου. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση πρόβλεψης συνόλων σε αυτό το πρόβλημα και δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις ανορθρωμένες γραμμές βάσης σε ένα νέο σώμα λεπτόκοκκης πληκτρολόγησης βασισμένο στη Βικιπαίδεια.', 'hu': 'Ahogy az entitástípusú rendszerek gazdagabbak és finomabbak lesznek, elvárjuk, hogy az adott entitáshoz rendelt típusok száma növekedni fog. A legtöbb finomszemcsés gépelési munka azonban olyan adatkészletekre összpontosított, amelyek alacsony mértékű típustöbbséget mutatnak. Ebben a tanulmányban az olyan adatforrásokban rejlő nagy sokszorosítási rendszert vizsgáljuk, mint például a Wikipédia, amelyek félig nyitott típusú rendszerekkel rendelkeznek. Bevezetünk egy set-prediction megközelítést erre a problémára, és megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk egy új Wikipédia alapú finomszemcsés gépelési korpuszon felülmúlja a strukturálatlan alapvonalakat.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на тоа што системите на типот на ентитети стануваат побогати и пофини, очекуваме бројот на типови доделени на одреден ентитет да се зголеми. However, most fine-grained typing work has focused on datasets that exhibit a low degree of type multiplicity.  Во овој документ, ние го сметаме режимот на висока множество за ингерентни во извори на податоци како Википедија кои имаат полуотворени системи. Ние го воведуваме пристапот на сет-предвидување на овој проблем и покажуваме дека нашиот модел надминува неструктурирани основни линии на нов фино-зелен пишувачки корпус на Википедија.', 'it': 'Man mano che i sistemi di tipo entità diventano più ricchi e a grana fine, ci aspettiamo che il numero di tipi assegnati a una determinata entità aumenti. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei lavori di battitura a grana fine si è concentrata su set di dati che mostrano un basso grado di molteplicità del tipo. In questo articolo, consideriamo il regime di alta molteplicità inerente a fonti di dati come Wikipedia che hanno sistemi di tipo semi-aperto. Introduciamo un approccio predittivo a questo problema e mostriamo che il nostro modello supera le linee di base non strutturate su un nuovo corpus di battitura a grana fine basato su Wikipedia.', 'kk': 'Бөліктердің түрі жүйелері бағатты және бағатты болғанда, біз келтірілген бөліктердің санын күтпейміз. Бірақ ең жақсы жазу жұмысының көпшілігі түрлердің көпшілігін көрсету үшін деректер жиындарына назар аударды. Бұл қағазда, біз бөлім ашылған түрлі жүйелердің Wikipedia секілді деректер көзіндегі көптеген көптеген режимін ойлаймыз. Біз осы мәселеге бағдарламаларды таңдап, үлгіміздің жаңа Википедияға негізделген жаңа бағдарламалардың бағдарламалардың бағдарламаларды орындайтынын көрсетедік.', 'lt': 'As entity type systems become richer and more fine-grained, we expect the number of types assigned to a given entity to increase.  Vis dėlto dauguma smulkių grūdų rašymo darbų daugiausia dėmesio skyrė duomenų rinkiniams, kuriuose yra nedidelis tipo dauginimosi lygis. Šiame dokumente manome, kad duomenų šaltiniuose, pvz., Wikipedia, kuriuose yra pusiau atviros tipo sistemos, būdingas didelio dauginimo režimas. Įdiegiame šios problemos nustatymo metodą ir parodysime, kad mūsų modelis viršija nestruktūrizuotas bazines linijas naujoje Wikipedia pagrįstoje smulkiai grūdintoje spausdinimo korpuse.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ തരത്തിലുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം സമ്പന്നതയും കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ല കൈക്കൊള്ളുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ  എന്നാലും, ഏറ്റവും നല്ല കൃത്യമുള്ള ടൈപ്പിങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന പണിയാണ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നത്. അത്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയുടെ തരത്തിലുള്ള വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയെ പോലെയുള്ള ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്ന വിധ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത് ഒരു സെറ്റ് പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പുതിയ വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഒരു നല', 'mt': 'Hekk kif is-sistemi tat-tip ta’ entità jsiru aktar rikki u aktar fini, nistennew li n-numru ta’ tipi assenjati lil entità partikolari jiżdied. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol tat-tipografija b’ħbub fin iffoka fuq settijiet ta’ dejta li juru grad baxx ta’ multipliċità tat-tip. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqisu r-reġim ta’ multipliċità għolja inerenti f’sorsi ta’ dejta bħall-Wikipedia li għandhom sistemi tat-tip semimiftuħa. Aħna nintroduċu approċċ ta’ tbassir tas-sett għal din il-problem a u nuru li l-mudell tagħna huwa aktar minn linji bażi mhux strutturati fuq korpus ġdid ta’ tipografija b’ħbub fin ibbażat fuq il-Wikipedia.', 'mn': 'Бүтээлтийн төрлийн систем баян, илүү сайхан үр дүнтэй болж байхад бид тодорхойлогдсон бүтээгдэхүүнд нэмэгдэх хэдэн төрлийн тоо гэж бодож байна. Гэхдээ ихэнх сайхан бичих ажил нь хэлбэрийн үржүүлэлт бага хэмжээтэй өгөгдлийн санд төвлөрсөн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Wikipedia шиг хагас нээлттэй төрлийн системтэй өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэртэй ихэвчлэн олон төрлийн засгийн газрын засгийн газрын олон засгийн газрыг ойлгож байна. Бид энэ асуудлыг тодорхойлох арга загвар тайлбарлаж, бидний загвар нь шинэ Википедийн суурь багасгагүй суурь шугамыг шинэ бичих корпус дээр гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W miarę jak systemy typu entity stają się bogatsze i bardziej precyzyjne, oczekujemy, że liczba typów przypisanych do danej jednostki będzie rosła. Jednak większość precyzyjnych prac typowania skupiła się na zbiorach danych, które wykazują niski stopień wielości typów. W niniejszym artykule rozważamy reżim wysokiej mnożności nieodłączny źródłom danych, takim jak Wikipedia, które posiadają systemy typu półotwartego. Wprowadzamy do tego problemu podejście do przewidywania zbiorów i pokazujemy, że nasz model przewyższa nieustrukturyzowane linie bazowe w nowym korpusie typowania opartym na Wikipedii.', 'no': 'Etter at entitetstype vert ryggere og meir fyrke, forventar vi at talet på typar tildelt ei gitt entitet skal aukast. Dette er imidlertid det meste fyrste skrivearbeidet fokusert på datasett som viser ein liten grad av type multiplikasjon. I denne papiret ser vi på høg multiplikasjonssystemet som inneheld i datakilder som Wikipedia som har halvåpne type-systemer. Vi introduserer ein settforegåve tilnærming til dette problemet og viser at modellen vårt utfører ikkje strukturerte baselinjer på eit nytt Wikipediabasert fin-korn skrivekorpus.', 'ro': 'Pe măsură ce sistemele de tip entitate devin mai bogate și mai fine granulate, ne așteptăm ca numărul de tipuri atribuite unei anumite entități să crească. Cu toate acestea, cele mai multe lucrări de tipare cu granule fine s-au concentrat pe seturi de date care prezintă un grad scăzut de multiplicitate a tipului. În această lucrare, luăm în considerare regimul de multiplicitate ridicată inerent surselor de date, cum ar fi Wikipedia, care au sisteme de tip semi-deschis. Introducem o abordare de predicție a setului la această problemă și arătăm că modelul nostru depășește liniile de bază nestructurate pe un nou corpus de tipare cu granule fine bazat pe Wikipedia.', 'si': 'ඉන්තිමත් වර්ගයක් පද්ධතියක් විශේෂයෙන් වඩා විශේෂයෙන් වෙනවා වගේම, අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා දෙන්න තියෙන අ නමුත්, ගොඩක් හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් ලිපින් වැඩේ තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට අවධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරක මේ පත්තරයේ අපි හිතන්නේ විකිපිඩියා වගේ දත්ත ප්\u200dරවෘතියේ තියෙන ප්\u200dරවෘති පද්ධතියක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වගේ. අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට සෙට් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විකිපිඩියා අධාරිත විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ම', 'sr': 'Dok sistemi tipa entiteta postaju bogatiji i lepši, očekujemo da će broj tipa određenih određenom entitetu povećati. Međutim, većina napravljenih pisanja je fokusirana na podatke koje pokazuju nisku stupnju mnogobrojnosti tipa. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o režimu visokomultipliciteta koja sadrži izvore podataka poput Wikipedije koji imaju polu-otvorene sisteme. Predstavljamo pristup predviđanja ovom problemu i pokazujemo da naš model iznosi neostrukturirane osnovne linije na novom korpusu na Wikipediji baziranom finom zrnom pisanju.', 'so': 'Sida ay nidaamka jidhku u hodan yihiin oo aad u dhaqdhaqaaqi karto, waxaynu rajaynaynaa in ay tirada noocyada loo dhigay in la kordhiyo jidh la siiyo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqada qoraalka aad u wanaagsan oo aad u qoran karto waxay ku kalsoonaadaan sawirada, taasoo muuqata iskuul yar oo kala duduwan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa dowladda koronta ah oo ku jirta sourceoyinka macluumaadka sida Wikipedia oo haysta nidaamka semi-furan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab la sii sheegayo dhibaatadan, waxaana tusnaynaa in modelkayagu ka soo baxo saldhigyo aan la dhisay oo lagu qoray warqad cusub oo ku qoran Wikipedia.', 'ms': 'As entity type systems become richer and more fine-grained, we expect the number of types assigned to a given entity to increase.  Bagaimanapun, kebanyakan pekerjaan penaip-benih telah fokus pada set data yang menunjukkan darjah rendah gandakan jenis. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan režim pelbagai tinggi yang ada dalam sumber data seperti Wikipedia yang mempunyai sistem jenis setengah terbuka. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan set-ramalan kepada masalah ini dan menunjukkan bahawa model kami melampaui garis dasar tidak terstruktur pada korpus penaip yang berasaskan Wikipedia baru.', 'sv': 'När entitetstypsystem blir rikare och mer finkorniga förväntar vi oss att antalet typer som tilldelas en viss entitet ökar. De flesta finkorniga typarbeten har dock fokuserat på datauppsättningar som uppvisar en låg grad av typmultiplicitet. I denna uppsats tar vi hänsyn till den högmultiplikationsregim som är inneboende i datakällor som Wikipedia som har halvöppna system. Vi introducerar ett set-prediction tillvägagångssätt för detta problem och visar att vår modell presterar bättre än ostrukturerade baslinjer på en ny Wikipedia-baserad finkornig typkorpus.', 'ta': 'பொருள் வகை அமைப்புகள் பணக்கூடிய மற்றும் அதிக நன்மையான கையடக்கப்படும் போது, கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பொருளுக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட ஆனால், பெரும்பாலான சிறப்பு பிடிக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு வேலை உள்ள தரவுத்தளங்களின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது,  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தரவு மூலங்களில் உள்ள அதிக பெருக்கல் விட்சிபிடியா முறைமைகள் போன்று கருதுகிறோம். நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனைக்கு ஒரு அமைப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பு முறையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் காட்டுகிறோம் நம் மாதிரி ஒரு புதிய விகிபிடி', 'ur': 'جیسے انٹیٹی ٹائپ سیسٹم ثروتمند اور زیادہ پاکیزہ دانہ ہوجاتے ہیں، ہم انتظار کرتے ہیں کہ ایک شخص کے لئے اضافہ ہونے کی تعداد ہے. However, most fine grain typing work has focused on data sets that exhibit a low degree of type multiplicity. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے دئیٹا سورستوں میں شامل ہونے والی زیادہ غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم نے اس مسئلہ کے ساتھ ایک سٹ کی پیش بینی کا طریقہ پیش کیا ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل ایک نوی ویکیپیڈیا کی بنیاد پاکیزہ دانے ٹائیپینگ کورپوس پر غیر ساختہ بنیادی لینوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "As entity type systems become richer and more fine-grained, we expect the number of types assigned to a given entity to increase.  Lekin ko'pchilik yozib qo'llangan ishni bir necha darajada ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha ko'paytirilgan tizimni o'ylab, Wikipediya kabi maʼlumotlar manbasiga ega. Biz bu muammo uchun bir tuzuvni anglatamiz va bizning modelmiz yangi Wikipedia asosida yaratilgan o'xshash qo'llanmalarni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Khi hệ thống dạng thực thể trở nên giàu có và hưng phấn hơn, chúng tôi mong số loại được phân công ty chi phối sẽ tăng lên. Tuy nhiên, phần lớn công việc đánh chữ thập được tô màu đã tập trung vào các tập tin có tỷ lệ ứng biến thấp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xem xét chế độ đa số cao vốn có trong các nguồn dữ liệu như Wikipedia, những người có hệ thống kiểu bán lỗ. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dự đoán cụ thể cho vấn đề này và cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi hoàn thiện những căn cứ không xây dựng trên một tập thể đánh chữ Wikipedia mới.', 'nl': 'Naarmate entiteitstypesystemen rijker en fijnkorreliger worden, verwachten we dat het aantal types dat aan een bepaalde entiteit is toegewezen, zal toenemen. Het meeste fijnkorrelige typewerk heeft zich echter gericht op datasets die een lage mate van typemeliciteit vertonen. In dit artikel bekijken we het hoge-multiplicity regime inherent aan gegevensbronnen zoals Wikipedia die semi-open type systemen hebben. We introduceren een set-prediction benadering voor dit probleem en laten zien dat ons model beter presteert dan ongestructureerde baselines op een nieuw Wikipedia-gebaseerd fijnkorrelig typecorpus.', 'hr': 'Dok sustavi tipa entiteta postaju bogatiji i zgodniji, očekujemo da će broj tipa određenih određenom entitetu povećati. Međutim, većina zgodnih pisanja usredotočila se na podatke koje pokazuju nisku stupnju mnogobrojnosti tipa. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o režimu visokomultipliciteta koja sadrži izvore podataka poput Wikipedia koji imaju polu-otvorene sustave tipa. Predstavljamo pristup predviđanja ovom problemu i pokazujemo da naš model iznosi neostrukturirane osnovne linije na novom korpusu na Wikipediji baziranom finom zrnom pisanju.', 'bg': 'Тъй като системите от типове обекти стават по-богати и по-фини, очакваме броят на типовете, присвоени на дадено предприятие, да се увеличи. Въпреки това, повечето фино-зърнести печатни работи са фокусирани върху набори от данни, които показват ниска степен на многообразие на типовете. В тази статия разглеждаме режима на висока множественост, присъщ на източници на данни като Уикипедия, които имат полуотворени системи. Въвеждаме подход за предсказване на множеството на този проблем и показваме, че нашият модел надминава неструктурираните базови линии на нов базиран на Уикипедия финозърнест корпус за печатане.', 'da': 'Efterhånden som enhedstypesystemer bliver rigere og mere finkornede, forventer vi, at antallet af typer tildelt en given enhed vil stige. Men de fleste finkornede skrivearbejder har fokuseret på datasæt, der udviser en lav grad af typemultiplicitet. I denne artikel betragter vi den høje multiplikationsordning, der er forbundet med datakilder som Wikipedia, der har semi-åbne typesystemer. Vi introducerer en set-prediction tilgang til dette problem og viser, at vores model overgår ustrukturerede basislinjer på en ny Wikipedia-baseret finkornet skriftkorpus.', 'de': 'Wenn Entity-Type-Systeme reicher und feiner werden, erwarten wir, dass die Anzahl der Typen, die einer bestimmten Entität zugewiesen werden, zunimmt. Die meisten feinkörnigen Schreibarbeiten konzentrieren sich jedoch auf Datensätze, die eine geringe Typvielfalt aufweisen. In diesem Beitrag betrachten wir das hohe Multiplizitätsregime von Datenquellen wie Wikipedia, die semi-offene Typsysteme haben. Wir führen einen Satz-Vorhersageansatz für dieses Problem ein und zeigen, dass unser Modell unstrukturierte Baselines auf einem neuen Wikipedia-basierten feinkörnigen Tippkorpus übertrifft.', 'fa': 'همانطور که سیستم\u200cهای نوع entity ثروتمند و خوشگل\u200cتر می\u200cشوند، انتظار داریم تعداد نوع\u200cهایی که به یک entity داده شده به افزایش دهد. ولی بیشترین کار نوشتن دانه\u200cهای زیبا روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها تمرکز کرده\u200cاند که درجه زیادی از تعداد نوع را نشان می\u200cدهند. در این کاغذ، ما رژیم بسیار زیادی را در منابع داده هایی مانند ویکیپدیا می بینیم که سیستم\u200cهای نوع نیمه باز دارند. ما روش پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مجموعه را به این مشکل معرفی می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل ما از خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای ناساخته\u200cای روی یک کورپوس نوشته\u200cهای پاک\u200cدانه\u200cای که بر روی ویکیپدییا بنیاد دارد پاک\u200cدانه\u200cای', 'ko': '실체 유형 시스템이 더욱 풍부해지고 세립도가 높아짐에 따라 우리는 주어진 실체에 분배되는 유형의 수량이 증가할 것이라고 기대한다.그러나 대부분의 세립도 유형 작업은 유형의 다양성이 낮은 데이터 집합에 집중된다.본고에서 우리는 위키백과처럼 반개방식 시스템의 데이터 원천이 고유한 높은 다양성 메커니즘을 고려했다.우리는 이 문제를 해결하기 위해 집합 예측 방법을 도입했고, 위키백과를 기반으로 한 새로운 세립도 유형 어료 라이브러리에서 우리의 모델이 비구조화된 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Kama mifumo ya vifaa vinaendelea utajiri na vizuri zaidi, tunatarajia idadi ya aina zinazotolewa na entity given kuongezeka. Hata hivyo, kazi nzuri ya kuandika vizuri imejikita kwenye seti za data zinazoonyesha kiwango kidogo cha ongezeko la aina hiyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunafikiria utawala wa umeme wa juu unaoingia kwenye vyanzo vya data kama vile Wikipedia wenye mifumo ya aina ya sekondari. Tunaonyesha mbinu za kutabiri kwa tatizo hili na kuonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanya msingi usiotengenezwa kwenye makampuni mpya ya Wikipedia yenye makampuni mazuri.', 'tr': 'Entitek hili sistemalary baýramçylyk we ýuwaşlyk gazanýan bolsa, bizde berilen bir zada bolan hili hili hili hili sanlary artmak üçin garaşýarys. Ýöne iň köp taýram ýazmak işi veri setirlerine üýtgeden bir hili çarpyşlygyny görkez. Bu kagyzda, Wikipediýa ýarym açyk hili sistemalar ýaly maglumat çeşmelerinde esasy ýokary azaltylyk rejimini düşünýäris. Biz bu mesele üçin düzümlenmeli tahmin etmek ýagdaýyny tanyşdyrýarys we nusgamyzyň täze Wikipediýa daşary taýýarlyk üçin döredigini görkez.', 'id': 'Sebagai sistem tipe entitas menjadi lebih kaya dan lebih halus, kita mengharapkan jumlah tipe yang ditugaskan kepada entitas tertentu untuk meningkat. Namun, kebanyakan pekerjaan mengetik yang baik telah fokus pada set data yang menunjukkan tingkat rendah tipe multiplicity. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan rezim multiplicitas tinggi yang inheren dalam sumber data seperti Wikipedia yang memiliki sistem tipe semi-terbuka. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan set-prediksi untuk masalah ini dan menunjukkan bahwa model kami melampaui batas dasar yang tidak terstruktur pada sebuah korpus typing fine grained berbasis Wikipedia baru.', 'am': 'አካባቢ ዓይነት ስብስብ ሀብታሞች ሲሆኑ እና በተሰጠው አካል የሚጨመር ዓይነት ቁጥር እናስፈራራለን፡፡ ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ ጥሩ የተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ሥራ የዓይነት ብዛት ታናሽ ክፍል በሚያሳየው ዳታተሮች ላይ ተማክሮአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የደረጃ ብዛት ሥልጣን እንደ Wikipedia ምሳሌ የተከፈተ የስርዓት ዓይነት ያሉት የሀብት ምንጮች ሲኖር እናስባለን፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ የመፍጠርን ቀዳሚ እናሳየዋለን እና ሞዴላያችን በአዲስ Wikipedia የተመሠረተውን የተመሳሳይን የጽሑፍ ደብዳቤ መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Երբ անհատականության տեսակի համակարգերը հարուստ են դառնում և ավելի նրբագեղ են, մենք ակնկալում ենք, որ որոշ անհատականությանը տրված տեսակների թիվը աճի: Այնուամենայնիվ, գեղեցիկ գրողության մեծ մասը կենտրոնացել է տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք ցույց են տալիս ցածր տեսակի բազմազանություն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կարծում ենք, որ տվյալների աղբյուրներում բնորոշ է բազմազանության մակարդակը, ինչպիսին է Վիքիփեդիան, որը ունի կիսաբաց տեսակի համակարգեր: We introduce a set-prediction approach to this problem and show that our model outperforms unstructured baselines on a new Wikipedia-based fine-grained typing corpus.', 'af': "As entiteittipe stelsels ryker en meer fyn-koring word, verwag ons die aantal tipes wat aan 'n gegewe entiteit toegelaat word om te vermeerder. Maar, die mees fyn-koring tipe werk het gefokus op datastelle wat 'n lae grad tipe veelvuldigheid vertoon. In hierdie papier, ons beskou die hoë-meerderheid režiem wat in data bronne inherent soos Wikipedia wat semi-oop tipe stelsels het. Ons introduseer 'n stel-voorskou toegang aan hierdie probleem en wys dat ons model uitvoer onstruktureerde basisline op 'n nuwe Wikipedia-gebaseerde fyn-graad tiping corpus.", 'sq': 'Ndërsa sistemet e llojit të njësisë bëhen më të pasur dhe më të hollë, presim që numri i llojeve të caktuara një njësie të caktuar të rritet. Megjithatë, shumica e punës së shkrimit të hollë është përqëndruar në grupe të dhënash që ekspozojnë një shkallë të ulët të shumëfishmërisë së llojit. Në këtë letër, ne konsiderojmë regjimin e shumëfishimit të lartë të natyrshëm në burimet e të dhënave të tilla si Wikipedia që kanë sisteme gjysmë të hapura. Ne paraqesim një qasje parashikimi për këtë problem dhe tregojmë se modeli ynë mbizotëron linjat bazë të paistrukturuara në një korpus të ri të shkrimit me drithëra të holla bazuar në Wikipedia.', 'bn': 'যেহেতু বস্তুর ধরনের সিস্টেম সমৃদ্ধ এবং আরো ভালো ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়ে যায়, আমরা আশা করি একটি প্রদত্ত বস্তুর সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি করতে প However, most fine-grained typing work has focused on datasets that exhibit a low degree of type multiplicity.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডাটা উৎসের মধ্যে থাকা উচ্চবৃদ্ধি শাসকদের বিবেচনা করি যেমন উইকিপিডিয়া যাদের সেমি খোলা ধরনের ব্যবস্থা আছে। আমরা এই সমস্যার প্রতি একটি সেট ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর প্রতিক্রিয়া পরিচালনা করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল নতুন উইকিপিডিয়ার ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তি', 'bs': 'Dok sistemi tipa entiteta postaju bogatiji i zgodniji, očekujemo da će broj tipa određenih određenom entitetu povećati. Međutim, većina napravljenih pisanja usredotočila se na podatke koje pokazuju nisku stupnju mnogobrojnosti tipa. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o režimu visokomultipliciteta koja sadrži izvore podataka poput Wikipedije koji imaju polu-otvorene sisteme. Predstavljamo pristup predviđanja ovom problemu i pokazujemo da naš model iznosi neostrukturirane osnovne linije na novom korpusu na Wikipediji baziranom finom zrnom pisanju.', 'az': 'İntikat tipi sistemləri daha zengin və daha güclü dənələr olaraq, biz verilən bir entitəyə verilən növ növlərin sayını artırmağını gözləyirik. Lakin ən çox təmiz yazma işləri çoxluğunu göstərən verilən qurğulara odaqlandı. Bu kağızda, yarı açıq tür sistemləri olan Wikipedia kimi məlumatlarda olan yüksək çoxluq rejimini düşünürük. Biz bu problem ə quruluş tədbir metodlarını tanıyırıq və modellərimizin yeni Wikipedia tabanlı sünbül yazıcı korpusu ilə müəyyən edilməmiş baz çətinliklərini göstəririk.', 'cs': 'Jak se systémy typů entity stávají bohatšími a jemnějšími, očekáváme, že počet typů přiřazených dané entitě se zvýší. Nicméně, většina jemnozrnných psacích práce se zaměřuje na datové sady, které vykazují nízký stupeň množství typů. V tomto článku se zabýváme režimem vysoké množství, který je inherentní v datových zdrojích, jako je Wikipedia, které mají polotevřené typové systémy. Představujeme přístup k predikci množin a ukazujeme, že náš model překonává nestrukturované základní linie na novém korpusu jemnozrnného typování založeném na Wikipedii.', 'fi': 'Kun entiteettityyppij瓣rjestelm瓣t rikastuvat ja hienojakoisemmiksi, odotamme tietylle entiteetille m瓣瓣ritettyjen tyyppien m瓣瓣r瓣n kasvavan. Suurin osa hienorakeisesta kirjoitusty繹st瓣 on kuitenkin keskittynyt aineistoihin, joiden tyyppimoninaisuus on alhainen. T瓣ss瓣 artikkelissa tarkastelemme suuren moninaisuuden j瓣rjestelm瓣瓣, joka on luontainen tietol瓣hteisiin, kuten Wikipediaan, joissa on puoliavoimia j瓣rjestelmi瓣. Esittelemme joukon ennustamisen l瓣hestymistavan t瓣h瓣n ongelmaan ja osoitamme, ett瓣 mallimme suoriutuu paremmin kuin rakenteettomat perusviivat uudessa Wikipediaan perustuvassa hienorakeisessa kirjoituskorpusessa.', 'et': 'Kui olemitüübi süsteemid muutuvad rikkamaks ja peenemaks, eeldame, et antud olemile määratud tüüpide arv suureneb. Enamik täpsemaid trükitöösid on siiski keskendunud andmekogumitele, millel on väike tüüpide mitmekesisus. Käesolevas töös käsitleme kõrge mitmekordsuse režiimi, mis on omane andmeallikatele nagu Wikipedia, millel on poollatud tüüpi süsteemid. Tutvustame sellele probleemile komplektide prognoosimise lähenemisviisi ja näitame, et meie mudel ületab struktureerimata lähtejooni uues Wikipedia-põhises peeneteralises trükikorpuses.', 'ca': "A mesura que els sistemes de tipus d'entitat es tornen més rics i més fins, esperem que el nombre de tipus assenyats a una determinada entitat augmenti. Tot i així, la majoria de treballs d'escriptura fina s'ha centrat en conjunts de dades que mostran un baix grau de multiplicitat de tipus. En aquest paper, considerem el règim d'alta multiplicitat inherent a fonts de dades com Wikipedia que tenen sistemes semioberts. Introduïm un enfocament de predicció en aquest problem a i demostrem que el nostre model supera les línies de base no estructurats en un nou corps d'escriptura fines basat en Wikipedia.", 'jv': 'Jeneng sistem Entis sing wis dibujak barêng lan yakuwis layang sampeyan slot Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé sawetara sistem sing luwih akeh perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo sistem dadi kaya pediya sing ngewehi luwih opera. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan nambah kanggo ngerasah perbudhakan iki lan ngerasah mèhke awak dhéwé kuwi diangturakno sing nggawe barang urip sistem anyar dhéwé', 'ha': "Kama da nau'in abun za'a fi girma kuma za'a sami mafi kyau, muna ƙayyade yawan nau'i da aka ƙayyade zuwa wani abun da aka ba su ƙara. A lokacin da, aikin mai kyau mai rubutu na rubutu ya fokus a kan daidaita danahan da ke nuna wani nau'in nau'in rubutu. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade mulki na ƙaranci wanda ke cikin sourcen data kamar Wikimedia da ke da wasu na'urar-nau'i na semi-buɗe. We introduce a set-prediction approach to this problem and show that our model outperforms unstructured baselines on a new Wikipedia-based fine-grained typing corpus.", 'sk': 'Ko sistemi vrste entitet postanejo bogatejši in bolj drobnozrnati, pričakujemo, da se bo število vrst, dodeljenih določenemu entitetu, povečalo. Vendar se je večina drobnozrnatega tipalnega dela osredotočila na nabore podatkov, ki kažejo nizko stopnjo množičnosti tipov. V tem prispevku obravnavamo režim visoke multiplikacije, ki je neločljiv za vire podatkov, kot je Wikipedija, ki imajo polodprte sisteme tipa. Predstavljamo pristop predvidevanja množic k tej težavi in pokažemo, da naš model presega nestrukturirane osnovne črte na novem drobnozrnatem tipkarskem korpusu, ki temelji na Wikipediji.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་དང་ཆེ་བའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ལ་ཇེ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རིགས་རྩལ་ཤུགས་སྐྱེས་ཚད ཡིན་ནའང་། ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་ཆེ་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་ཡོད་པའི་ ཝི་ཀེ་ཌི་ཡ་ལ་རིགས་ཁ་ཕྱེད་པའི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་པའམ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་པའི་རྨང་གཞིའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ཏུ་', 'he': 'כשמערכות מסוג היחידות נעשות עשירות ויותר עצומות, אנו מצפים ממספר הסוגים שנוספים ליחידה מסוימת לגדול. בכל אופן, רוב העבודות הטיפוסים המתוקפות על קבוצות נתונים שמוצגים מדרגה נמוכה של רבות סוג. בעיתון הזה, אנו מחשיבים את משטר ההרבות הגבוהה הנכון במקורי נתונים כמו ויקיפדיה שיש להם מערכות סוג חצי פתוחות. אנחנו מציגים גישה צפויה לבעיה הזאת ולהראות שהמודל שלנו מוביל מעל קווי בסיס לא מבוססים על קורפוס טביעה חדש מבוסס בוויקיפדיה.'}
{'en': 'Group Sparse CNNs for Question Classification with Answer Sets', 'ar': 'قم بتجميع شبكات CNN المتفرقة لتصنيف الأسئلة مع مجموعات الإجابة', 'es': 'Agrupar CNN dispersas para la clasificación de preguntas con conjuntos de respuestas', 'pt': 'Agrupe CNNs esparsas para classificação de perguntas com conjuntos de respostas', 'fr': 'Regrouper des CNN épars pour la classification des questions avec des ensembles de réponses', 'ja': '回答セットを使用した質問分類のためのまばらなCNNのグループ化', 'zh': '用对案集对疏 CNN 分朋以类之', 'hi': 'उत्तर सेट के साथ प्रश्न वर्गीकरण के लिए समूह विरल CNN', 'ru': 'Групповые редкие CNN для классификации вопросов с наборами ответов', 'ga': 'Grúpáil CNNanna gann le haghaidh Aicmiú Ceisteanna le Tacair Freagraí', 'el': 'Ομάδα Σπάνια για την ταξινόμηση ερωτήσεων με σύνολα απαντήσεων', 'hu': 'Kérdések osztályozásához szükséges ritka CNN-ek csoportosítása válaszkészletekkel', 'lt': 'Klasifikuoti klausimus su atsakymų rinkiniais', 'it': 'CNN di gruppo sparse per la classificazione delle domande con set di risposte', 'mn': 'Хариулт хэлбэртэй асуулт классификацийн хэлбэрээр бүлэг Sparse CNN', 'mt': 'Grupp ta’ CNNs Sparse għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Mistoqsijiet b’Settijiet ta’ Tweġibiet', 'ms': 'Kumpulan CNN Sparse untuk Klasifikasi soalan dengan Set Jawapan', 'sv': 'Grupp Sparse CNN för frågeklassificering med svarssatser', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න සෙට් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා කණ්ඩායම් ස්පස් CNN', 'mk': 'Групирај ниски CNN за класификација на прашања со набори на одговори', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Grupa rzadkich CNN do klasyfikacji pytań z zestawami odpowiedzi', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്പെയിസ് സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200dസ് ഗ്രൂപ്പ് ചെയ്യുക', 'ka': 'გრაფიკური კლასიფიკაციის შესაძლებელად გარეშე', 'kk': 'Жауап баптауларының сұрақ классификациясы', 'so': 'Koox Sparse CNNs for Question Classification with answers Sets', 'ro': 'CNN-uri rare de grup pentru clasificarea întrebărilor cu seturi de răspunsuri', 'ta': 'கேள்வி வகைப்படுத்தலுடன் பதில் அமைப்புகளுக்கான சிஎன்னின் குழு', 'sr': 'Группија СПЗ за класификацију питања са набором отговора', 'ur': 'جواب سٹ کے ساتھ سوال کلاسیفٹ کے لئے گروپ Sparse CNN', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'da': "Gruppe sparsomme CNN'er til spørgsmål klassificering med svar sæt", 'nl': "Groep Sparse CNN's voor Question Classification met Antwoordensets", 'hr': 'Group Sparse CNN za klasifikaciju pitanja sa setima odgovora', 'de': 'Gruppe Sparse CNNs für die Klassifizierung von Fragen mit Antwortsätzen', 'id': 'Grup CNN Sparse untuk Klasifikasi Pertanyaan dengan Set Jawaban', 'bg': 'Групови свободни НН за класификация на въпроси с набор от отговори', 'fa': 'گروهی سی\u200cن\u200cهای مختلف برای کلاس\u200cبندی سوال با مجموعه جواب\u200cها', 'sw': 'Kikundi cha Uhispania CNNN kwa ajili ya Kutangaza swali na Miitikio ya majibu', 'tr': 'Hata Setleri bilen Jogabat Sözlemek üçin Renkler', 'af': 'Groep Sparse CNN vir Fraag Klassifikasie met Antwoord Opstellings', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ko': '답안 집합에 기반한 문제 분류 그룹 희소 CNN', 'az': 'Cevap qurğuları ilə sual klasifikasiyası üçün qrup Sparse CNN', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'sq': 'Grup CNN të paktën për klasifikimin e pyetjeve me Set përgjigjesh', 'cs': 'Skupina řídkých CNN pro klasifikaci otázek se sadami odpovědí', 'et': 'Grupp Sparse CNN küsimuste klassifitseerimiseks vastusekomplektidega', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য গ্রুপ স্পের্স সিএনএন', 'bs': 'Group Sparse CNN za klasifikaciju pitanja sa setima odgovora', 'ca': 'Grup de CNN escassos per classificar preguntes amb conjunts de respostes', 'fi': 'Ryhmä Sparse CNN: t kysymysluokitukseen vastaussarjoilla', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringNew', 'sk': 'Skupina redkih CNN za klasifikacijo vprašanj z nabori odgovorov', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚོ་ཁག་གི་བར་སྟོང་ཆ་དབྱེ་སེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ཚོགས་པ'}
{'en': 'Question classification is an important task with wide applications. However, traditional techniques treat questions as general sentences, ignoring the corresponding answer data. In order to consider answer information into question modeling, we first introduce novel group sparse autoencoders which refine question representation by utilizing group information in the answer set. We then propose novel group sparse CNNs which naturally learn question representation with respect to their answers by implanting group sparse autoencoders into traditional CNNs. The proposed model significantly outperform strong baselines on four datasets.', 'ar': 'تصنيف السؤال هو مهمة مهمة مع تطبيقات واسعة. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأساليب التقليدية تتعامل مع الأسئلة على أنها جمل عامة ، وتتجاهل بيانات الإجابة المقابلة. من أجل النظر في معلومات الإجابة في نمذجة الأسئلة ، نقدم أولاً أجهزة تشفير تلقائية متفرقة لمجموعة جديدة تعمل على تحسين تمثيل الأسئلة من خلال استخدام معلومات المجموعة في مجموعة الإجابات. ثم نقترح مجموعة جديدة من شبكات CNN المتفرقة والتي تتعلم بشكل طبيعي تمثيل الأسئلة فيما يتعلق بإجاباتها عن طريق زرع مجموعة مشفرة تلقائية متفرقة في شبكات CNN التقليدية. يتفوق النموذج المقترح بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس القوية في أربع مجموعات بيانات.', 'fr': "La classification des questions est une tâche importante avec de nombreuses applications. Cependant, les techniques traditionnelles traitent les questions comme des phrases générales, ignorant les données de réponse correspondantes. Afin de prendre en compte les informations de réponse dans la modélisation des questions, nous introduisons d'abord de nouveaux auto-encodeurs de groupe clairsemés qui affinent la représentation des questions en utilisant les informations de groupe dans l'ensemble de réponses. Nous proposons ensuite de nouveaux CNN épars de groupe qui apprennent naturellement la représentation des questions par rapport à leurs réponses en implantant des auto-encodeurs de groupe clairsemés dans des CNN traditionnels. Le modèle proposé surpasse de façon significative les valeurs de base solides pour quatre ensembles de données.", 'es': 'La clasificación de preguntas es una tarea importante con aplicaciones amplias. Sin embargo, las técnicas tradicionales tratan las preguntas como oraciones generales, ignorando los datos de respuesta correspondientes. Para considerar la información de respuesta en el modelado de preguntas, primero introducimos nuevos autocodificadores dispersos de grupo que refinan la representación de preguntas utilizando información de grupo en el conjunto de respuestas. A continuación, proponemos nuevas CNN dispersas de grupo que naturalmente aprenden la representación de preguntas con respecto a sus respuestas mediante la implantación de autocodificadores dispersos de grupo en las CNN tradicionales. El modelo propuesto supera significativamente a las sólidas líneas de base en cuatro conjuntos de datos.', 'pt': 'A classificação de perguntas é uma tarefa importante com amplas aplicações. No entanto, as técnicas tradicionais tratam as perguntas como sentenças gerais, ignorando os dados de resposta correspondentes. Para considerar as informações de resposta na modelagem de perguntas, primeiro introduzimos novos autoencoders esparsos de grupo que refinam a representação de perguntas utilizando informações de grupo no conjunto de respostas. Em seguida, propomos novas CNNs esparsas de grupo que aprendem naturalmente a representação de perguntas em relação às suas respostas, implantando autoencoders esparsos de grupo em CNNs tradicionais. O modelo proposto supera significativamente as linhas de base fortes em quatro conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': '質問の分類は、幅広い用途を持つ重要なタスクです。しかし、従来のテクニックでは、質問は一般的な文章として扱われ、対応する回答データは無視されます。質問モデリングに回答情報を考慮するために、まず回答セットのグループ情報を活用して質問表現を洗練させる新規グループスパースオートエンコーダーを導入する。次に、従来のCNNにグループスパースオートエンコーダを移植することによって、回答に関して質問表現を自然に学習する新規のグループスパースCNNを提案します。提案されたモデルは、4つのデータセットで強力なベースラインを大幅に上回っています。', 'zh': '分类者,广泛应用之要务也。 然旧术以为常句,忽于应对。 为将答案问建模中,先引入新组疏自编码器,编码器因集优化之。 然后立群疏CNN,因编码器植入群疏自习CNN。 所立模形于四集上显优于强基线。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न वर्गीकरण व्यापक अनुप्रयोगों के साथ एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। हालांकि, पारंपरिक तकनीकें प्रश्नों को सामान्य वाक्यों के रूप में मानती हैं, संबंधित उत्तर डेटा को अनदेखा करती हैं। प्रश्न मॉडलिंग में उत्तर जानकारी पर विचार करने के लिए, हम पहले उपन्यास समूह विरल ऑटोएनकोडर पेश करते हैं जो उत्तर सेट में समूह की जानकारी का उपयोग करके प्रश्न प्रतिनिधित्व को परिष्कृत करते हैं। फिर हम उपन्यास समूह विरल CNN का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो स्वाभाविक रूप से पारंपरिक CNN में समूह विरल ऑटोएनकोडर्स को प्रत्यारोपित करके अपने उत्तरों के संबंध में प्रश्न प्रतिनिधित्व सीखते हैं। प्रस्तावित मॉडल चार डेटासेट पर मजबूत बेसलाइन को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Классификация вопросов является важной задачей с широким применением. Однако традиционные методы рассматривают вопросы как общие предложения, игнорируя соответствующие данные ответов. Для того, чтобы рассмотреть информацию об ответах в моделировании вопросов, мы сначала вводим новые разрозненные автокодировщики групп, которые уточняют представление вопросов, используя информацию о группах в наборе ответов. Затем мы предлагаем романную группу редких CNN, которые, естественно, изучают представление вопросов в отношении их ответов путем имплантации групп редких автокодеров в традиционные CNN. Предлагаемая модель значительно превосходит сильные исходные данные по четырем наборам данных.', 'ga': "Is tasc tábhachtach é rangú ceisteanna le feidhmeanna leathana. Mar sin féin, déileálann teicnící traidisiúnta le ceisteanna mar abairtí ginearálta, gan aird a thabhairt ar na sonraí freagartha comhfhreagracha. D'fhonn faisnéis freagartha a chur san áireamh i samhaltú ceisteanna, tugaimid isteach ar dtús uath-ionchódóirí tearca grúpa úra a fheabhsóidh léiriú ceisteanna trí úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis ghrúpa sa tacar freagraí. Molaimid ansin CNNanna gann de ghrúpaí úra a fhoghlaimíonn go nádúrtha léiriú ceisteanna maidir lena bhfreagraí trí uath-ionchódóirí tearca grúpa a ionchlannú i CNNanna traidisiúnta. Sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta bonnlínte láidre ar cheithre thacar sonraí.", 'ka': 'კითხვის კლასიფიკაცია არის მნიშვნელოვანი დავალება, რომელიც უფრო დიდი პროგრამებით. თუმცა, ტრადიციონალური ტექნექციები კითხვები როგორც საერთო სიტყვები იქნება, როგორც კითხვების მონაცემების მონაცემები იგნონ საკითხების მოდელირების შესახებ, ჩვენ პირველად პრომენტის შესახებ ავტოკოდერების გამოყენება, რომელიც კითხვის გამოყენებას დააკვირდება ჯგუფის ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით გა შემდეგ ჩვენ პრომენტის ჯგუფი გავაკეთებთ CNN-ს, რომელსაც naturally learn question representation with respect to their answers by implanting group sparse autoencoders into traditional CNN. პროგრამების მოდელი ძალიან უფრო ძალიან ძალიან საბაზო ხაზები 4 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში.', 'it': 'La classificazione delle domande è un compito importante con ampie applicazioni. Tuttavia, le tecniche tradizionali trattano le domande come frasi generali, ignorando i dati di risposta corrispondenti. Al fine di considerare le informazioni di risposta nella modellazione delle domande, introduciamo in primo luogo nuovi codificatori automatici sparsi di gruppo che affinano la rappresentazione delle domande utilizzando le informazioni di gruppo nel set di risposte. Proponiamo quindi nuove CNN sparse di gruppo che naturalmente imparano la rappresentazione delle domande rispetto alle loro risposte impiantando autoencoder sparse di gruppo nelle CNN tradizionali. Il modello proposto supera significativamente le solide linee di base su quattro set di dati.', 'hu': 'A kérdések osztályozása fontos feladat széles körű alkalmazásoknál. A hagyományos technikák azonban általános mondatként kezelik a kérdéseket, figyelmen kívül hagyva a megfelelő válaszadatokat. Annak érdekében, hogy a válaszok információit kérdésmodellálásba vegyük, először új csoportos ritka autokódolókat vezetünk be, amelyek finomítják a kérdések reprezentációját a válaszkészletben található csoportos információk felhasználásával. Ezt követően új csoportos ritka CNN-eket javasolunk, amelyek természetesen megtanulják a kérdések reprezentációját a válaszaik tekintetében azáltal, hogy csoportos ritka autoencodereket ültetnek a hagyományos CNN-ekbe. A javasolt modell négy adatkészleten jelentősen felülmúlja az erős alapvető értékeket.', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση των ερωτήσεων είναι ένα σημαντικό έργο με ευρείες εφαρμογές. Ωστόσο, οι παραδοσιακές τεχνικές αντιμετωπίζουν τις ερωτήσεις ως γενικές προτάσεις, αγνοώντας τα αντίστοιχα δεδομένα απάντησης. Προκειμένου να εξετάσουμε τις πληροφορίες απάντησης στη μοντελοποίηση ερωτήσεων, εισάγουμε πρώτα νέους αυτόματους κωδικοποιητές ομάδων που βελτιώνουν την αναπαράσταση ερωτήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας πληροφορίες ομάδας στο σύνολο απαντήσεων. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε νέες ομάδες αραίων που μαθαίνουν φυσικά την αναπαράσταση ερωτήσεων σε σχέση με τις απαντήσεις τους, εμφυτεύοντας ομάδες αραίων αυτόματων κωδικοποιητών σε παραδοσιακά CNN. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'lt': 'Klausimų klasifikavimas yra svarbus uždavinys su plataus masto taikymo sritimis. Tačiau tradiciniais metodais klausimai vertinami kaip bendri sakiniai, ignoruojant atitinkamus atsakymų duomenis. Siekiant apsvarstyti atsakymų informaciją kaip klausimų modeliavimą, pirmiausia įvedame naujus nedidelius autokodatorius, kurie patobulina klausimų atstovavimą naudojant grupės informaciją atsakymų rinkinyje. We then propose novel group sparse CNNs which naturally learn question representation with respect to their answers by implanting group sparse autoencoders into traditional CNNs.  Siūlomas modelis gerokai viršija stiprias keturių duomenų rinkinių bazes.', 'kk': 'Сұрақ шектеу - жалпы қолданбалармен маңызды тапсырма. Бірақ дәстүрлі техникалар сұрақтарды жалпы сөйлемелер ретінде қалайды, жауап деректерін елемейді. Жауап мәліметін сұрақ модельдеріне қарау үшін біріншіден, жауап бағдарламасында топтың мәліметін пайдалану арқылы, автокодерді таңдау үшін, жауап бағдарламасына көшірмеледі. Содан кейін, біз романдық топ CNN көтерілген сұрақтарды жауаптарына қатынау үшін үйренеміз, топты әдетті CNN көтерілген автокодтарды енгізуге арналған. Келтірілген үлгі төрт деректер қорларындағы күш негізгі жолдардан артық болады.', 'ml': 'വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുമായി ചോദ്യം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ്. എന്നാലും പാരമ്പര്യമായ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളായി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഉത്തരം വിവരങ് ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ മോഡലിങ്ങില്\u200d ഉത്തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചിന്തിക്കാന്\u200d, ആദ്യം നോവല്\u200d കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്ന സ്പോര്\u200dട്ട പിന്നീട് നോവല്\u200d ഗ്രൂപ്പ് സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200dസിനെ സ്വാഭാവികമായി ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവികമായി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d  നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെ', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi soalan adalah tugas penting dengan aplikasi luas. Namun, teknik tradisional memperlakukan soalan sebagai kalimat umum, mengabaikan data jawapan yang sepadan. Untuk mempertimbangkan maklumat jawapan ke dalam pemodelan soalan, kita pertama-tama memperkenalkan kumpulan baru mengendahkan pengekod otomatik yang menyempurnakan perwakilan soalan dengan menggunakan maklumat kumpulan dalam set jawapan. Kemudian kami cadangkan kumpulan baru menghilangkan CNN yang secara alami belajar perwakilan soalan mengenai jawapan mereka dengan implantasi kumpulan menghilangkan auto-pengekod ke CNN tradisional. Model yang diusulkan jauh melebihi garis dasar yang kuat pada empat set data.', 'mk': 'Класификацијата на прашањата е важна задача со широки апликации. Сепак, традиционалните техники ги третираат прашањата како општи реченици, игнорирајќи ги соодветните податоци за одговорот. За да ги разгледаме информациите за одговорот во моделирање на прашања, прво воведуваме нови групи кои ги намалуваат автокодирачите кои го пофинираат претставувањето на прашањата со користење на групните информации во групата на одговорите. Потоа предложуваме нова група да ги ослободи ЦНН кои природно научи претставување на прашања во однос на нивните одговори со имплантација на групата да ги ослободи автокодерите во традиционалните ЦНН. Предложениот модел значително ги надминува силните бази на четири податоци.', 'mn': 'асуулт хуваалцах нь өргөн хэрэглэмжтэй чухал ажил юм. Гэхдээ уламжлалт техникууд асуултуудыг ерөнхий өгүүлбэртэй гэж үздэг. Хариулт өгүүлбэрийг нь үгүй үздэг. Хариултын мэдээллийг асуулт загварын хувьд бодохын тулд бид эхлээд шинэ бүлгийг автоматжуулалтын коддогчийг танилцуулдаг. Хариулт хэлбэрээр бүлгийн мэдээллийг ашиглаж асуулт тайлбарладаг. Дараа нь бид шинэ бүлэг нь СНХ-г нэмэгдүүлдэг бөгөөд тэдний хариултаар асуулт илэрхийлэл суралцаж байдаг бөгөөд бүлэг нь уламжлалт СНХ-д автокодлогчийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Өөрчлөлтийн загвар нь дөрвөн өгөгдлийн сангийн суурь шугам дээр хүчтэй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja pytań jest ważnym zadaniem z szerokimi zastosowaniami. Jednak tradycyjne techniki traktują pytania jako zdania ogólne, ignorując odpowiednie dane odpowiedzi. Aby uwzględnić informacje o odpowiedzi w modelowaniu pytań, wprowadzamy najpierw nowe autokodery grupowe, które udoskonalają reprezentację pytań poprzez wykorzystanie informacji grupowych w zestawie odpowiedzi. Następnie proponujemy nowe grupowe rzadkie CNN, które naturalnie uczą się reprezentacji pytań w odniesieniu do swoich odpowiedzi poprzez implantowanie grupowych rzadkich autokoderów do tradycyjnych CNN. Proponowany model znacznie przewyższa silne linie bazowe na czterech zbiorach danych.', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet hija kompitu importanti b’applikazzjonijiet wiesgħa. Madankollu, it-tekniki tradizzjonali jittrattaw il-mistoqsijiet bħala sentenzi ġenerali, filwaqt li jinjoraw id-dejta korrispondenti tat-tweġibiet. Sabiex tikkunsidra t-tagħrif dwar it-tweġibiet f’mudell ta’ mistoqsijiet, l-ewwel aħna nintroduċu awtokoders ġodda li jnaqqsu l-awtokoders li jirrifinaw ir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet billi nużaw l-informazzjoni tal-grupp fis-sett ta’ tweġibiet. Imbagħad nipproponu gruppi ġodda li jnaqqsu s-CNN li naturalment jitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet fir-rigward tat-tweġibiet tagħhom billi jimplimentaw awtokoders tal-grupp li jnaqqsu s-CNN tradizzjonali. Il-mudell propost jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi b’saħħithom fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'no': 'Klassifikasjon av spørsmål er ein viktig oppgåve med breidde program. Tradisjonale teknikk behandler imidlertid spørsmål som generelle setningar, og ignorerer tilsvarande svardata. For å forstå svarinformasjon i spørsmønstillingane, introduserer vi først novelgruppe automatisk kodar som refiner spørsmønstillingane ved å bruka gruppeinformasjon i svarsetet. Vi foreslår så nytt gruppe sparse CNNs som naturleg lærer spørsmålsrepresentasjon med respekt til svara sine ved å implantera gruppe sparse autokoder i tradisjonelle CNNs. Det foreslåde modellet utfører signifikante sterke baselinjer på fire datasett.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea întrebărilor este o sarcină importantă cu aplicații largi. Cu toate acestea, tehnicile tradiționale tratează întrebările ca fraze generale, ignorând datele corespunzătoare de răspuns. Pentru a lua în considerare informațiile de răspuns în modelarea întrebărilor, introducem mai întâi noi codoare auto rare de grup care rafinează reprezentarea întrebărilor prin utilizarea informațiilor de grup în setul de răspunsuri. Apoi propunem CNN-uri noi de grup care învață în mod natural reprezentarea întrebărilor în ceea ce privește răspunsurile lor prin implantarea de autoencodere de grup rare în CNN-uri tradiționale. Modelul propus depășește în mod semnificativ valorile de referință puternice pe patru seturi de date.', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija pitanja je važan zadatak sa širom aplikacijom. Međutim, tradicionalne tehnike odnose na pitanja kao opće rečenice, ignorirajući odgovarajuće podatke odgovora. Da bismo razmotrili odgovorne informacije u modeliranje pitanja, prvo predstavljamo novu grupu rezervirane autokodere koji refiniraju zastupanje pitanja koristeći grupske informacije u setu odgovora. Zatim predlažemo novu grupu rezervirati CNN-e koje prirodno nauče zastupanje pitanja u pogledu njihovih odgovora implantujući grupu rezervirati autokodere u tradicionalne CNN-e. Predloženi model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije na četiri seta podataka.', 'so': "Iswidishka su'aalku waa shaqo muhiim ah oo la xiriira codsiga ballaadhan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee teknikada caadiga ah waxay su’aalo u macaamiloodaan su’aalo sida qoraalka guud, iskaga tagista macluumaadka jawaabta. Si aan ugu fiirsano macluumaadka jawaabta tusaale ahaan su'aalaha, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa kooxda warqada aan kooxda ka badnayno kooxda iskuullada, taas oo ku sawiraya macluumaadka kooxda ee lagu isticmaalayo qoraalka jawaabta. Markaas waxaan soo jeedaynaa kooxda warqada ah oo ka badbaadiya CNNNs, kuwaas oo si dabiiqada ah u barta su'aalaha ay ka soo jeedaan jawaabahooda, taas oo ay kooxda kooxda kooxda ka badisaa kooxda kooxda oo ay u noqoto kooxaha caadiga ah CNNNs. Tusaale la soo jeeday ayaa si muhiim ah u sameynaya saldhigyo xoog badan oo ku qoran afar databases.", 'ur': 'سوال کلاسپیٹ ایک بڑی اہم کام ہے جس کے ساتھ وسیع کاربریاں ہیں. However, traditional techniques treat questions as general sentences, ignoring the corresponding answer data. سوال موڈلینگ میں جواب کی معلومات کو دیکھنے کے لئے، ہم پہلی بار نومین گروپ کو اٹوکوڈر بناتے ہیں جو جواب سٹ میں گروپ معلومات کا استعمال کرنا کے ذریعہ سوال کی تصویر کرتی ہیں۔ پھر ہم نئی گروپ کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ CNN کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں جو ان کے جواب کے بارے میں سوال کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کرتی ہیں اور گروپ کو اٹوکوڈر سنتی CNN میں چھوڑ دیتے ہیں۔ پیشنهاد کی موڈل چار ڈیٹ سٹ پر مضبوط بنسٹ لینٹوں سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂණය තමයි විශාල වැඩසටහන් තියෙන වැදගත් වැඩක්. නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ උත්තර ප්\u200dරශ්ණ මොඩල් වලට උත්තර තොරතුරු ගැන හිතන්න, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්ණ කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායමක් ස්වයංකේතකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ අපි පස්සේ නියම කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් CNNs ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සමග උත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් හතරක් බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි.', 'sv': 'Frågaklassificering är en viktig uppgift med breda tillämpningar. Traditionella tekniker behandlar dock frågor som allmänna meningar och ignorerar motsvarande svarsdata. För att beakta svarsinformation i frågemodellering introducerar vi först nya glesa autoencoders som förfinar frågerepresentation genom att använda gruppinformation i svarsuppsättningen. Vi föreslår sedan nya glesa CNN-enheter som naturligt lär sig frågerepresentation med avseende på deras svar genom att implantera glesa autokodare i traditionella CNN-enheter. Den föreslagna modellen överträffar avsevärt starka baslinjer för fyra datauppsättningar.', 'ta': 'விரிவான பயன்பாடுகளுடன் கேள்வி வகைப்படுத்தல் ஒரு முக்கியமான செயல். ஆனால், மரபார்ந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் கேள்விகளை பொதுவான வாக்கியங்களாக சிகிச்சை செய்கிறது, பதில் பதில் தகவலை  கேள்வி முறைமையாக்கத்திற்கு விடையான தகவலை கருத்து, நாம் முதலில் புத்தகக் குழுவை தானியங்கி குறியீடுகளை குறியீடுகளில் க பின்னர் நாம் புதிய குழுவை சிஎன்என்னை விட்டுவிடும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சாதாரண கேள்வி குறியீடுகளை குழுவின் பதில் கு திருத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரி நான்கு தரவுத்தளங்களில் வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, tabiiy teknologiya savollarni umumiy so'zlar sifatida ishlatadi, javob beruvchi maʼlumotga eʼtibor beradi. Name Keyin biz novel guruhi CNN'larni saqlash imkoniyatini tahlil qilamiz. Bu savol asosiy o'rganadi, guruhni avtomatik CNNS'ga saqlash imkoniyatini o'rganadi. Koʻrsatilgan modeli to'rtta maʼlumotlar sohasida sterk asboblarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Câu hỏi được phân loại là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng với nhiều ứng dụng. Tuy nhiên, kỹ thuật truyền thống coi câu hỏi như câu bình thường, lờ đi dữ liệu đáp án tương ứng. Để xem xét các thông tin trả lời trong việc mô hình nghi vấn, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu những bộ tự mã số của nhóm mới, mà tinh lọc các câu hỏi bằng cách sử dụng thông tin của nhóm trong bộ câu trả lời. Chúng tôi đề xuất các kênh CNN phát triển tiểu thuyết mà học hỏi về các câu trả lời của họ bằng cách cấy ghép các bộ tự mã gien của nhóm mình vào bộ CNN truyền thống. Kiểu mẫu được đề nghị vượt trội hơn nhiều so với bốn tập tin mẫu.', 'bg': 'Класификацията на въпросите е важна задача с широки приложения. Традиционните техники обаче третират въпросите като общи изречения, игнорирайки съответните данни за отговор. За да разгледаме информацията за отговорите в моделирането на въпроси, първо въвеждаме нови групови редки автокодери, които усъвършенстват представянето на въпросите чрез използване на групова информация в комплекта отговори. След това предлагаме нови групови редки CNN, които естествено научават представянето на въпросите по отношение на техните отговори чрез имплантиране на групови редки автокодери в традиционните CNN. Предложеният модел значително надминава силните базови линии на четири набора от данни.', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija pitanja je važan zadatak s širom aplikacijom. Međutim, tradicionalne tehnike odnose na pitanja kao opće rečenice, ignorirajući odgovarajuće podatke odgovora. Da bismo razmotrili odgovorne informacije u modeliranje pitanja, prvo ćemo predstaviti novu skupinu rezervirati autokodere koji refiniraju zastupanje pitanja koristeći grupne informacije u setu odgovora. Zatim predlažemo novu skupinu rezervirati CNN-e koje prirodno uče zastupanje pitanja u pogledu njihovih odgovora implantirajući grupu rezervirati autokodere u tradicionalne CNN-e. Predloženi model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije na četiri podataka.', 'nl': "Vragenclassificatie is een belangrijke taak met brede toepassingen. Traditionele technieken behandelen vragen echter als algemene zinnen, waarbij de overeenkomstige antwoordgegevens worden genegeerd. Om antwoordinformatie in vragenmodellering te verwerken, introduceren we eerst nieuwe group sparse autoencoders die de vragenrepresentatie verfijnen door gebruik te maken van groepsinformatie in de antwoordset. Vervolgens stellen we nieuwe group sparse CNN's voor die van nature leren vragenrepresentatie met betrekking tot hun antwoorden door group sparse autoencoders in traditionele CNN's te implanteren. Het voorgestelde model presteert aanzienlijk beter dan sterke baselines op vier datasets.", 'da': "Spørgsmål klassificering er en vigtig opgave med brede anvendelser. Traditionelle teknikker behandler imidlertid spørgsmål som generelle sætninger og ignorerer de tilsvarende svar data. For at overveje svar information i spørgsmål modellering, introducerer vi først nye gruppe sparsomme autoencodere, der forfiner spørgsmål repræsentation ved at bruge gruppeoplysninger i svarsættet. Vi foreslår derefter nye gruppesparsomme CNN'er, som naturligvis lærer spørgsmål repræsentation i forhold til deres svar ved at implantere gruppesparsomme autoencodere i traditionelle CNN'er. Den foreslåede model overgår betydeligt stærke basislinjer på fire datasæt.", 'id': 'Klasifikasi pertanyaan adalah tugas penting dengan aplikasi luas. Namun, teknik tradisional memperlakukan pertanyaan sebagai kalimat umum, mengabaikan data jawaban yang sama. Untuk mempertimbangkan informasi jawaban menjadi model pertanyaan, kami pertama kali memperkenalkan kelompok baru mengorbankan otokoder yang menyempurnakan perwakilan pertanyaan dengan menggunakan informasi kelompok dalam set jawaban. Kemudian kami mengusulkan kelompok baru menghilangkan CNN yang secara alami belajar persembahan pertanyaan mengenai jawaban mereka dengan mengimplantasi kelompok menghilangkan otokoder ke CNN tradisional. Model yang diusulkan jauh melebihi garis dasar yang kuat pada empat set data.', 'de': 'Die Klassifizierung von Fragen ist eine wichtige Aufgabe bei breiten Anwendungen. Traditionelle Techniken behandeln Fragen jedoch als allgemeine Sätze und ignorieren die entsprechenden Antwortdaten. Um Antwortinformationen in die Fragemodellierung einfließen zu lassen, stellen wir zunächst neuartige gruppensparende Autoencoder vor, die die Fragedarstellung durch die Verwendung von Gruppeninformationen im Antwortsatz verfeinern. Wir schlagen dann neuartige gruppensparende CNNs vor, die auf natürliche Weise die Fragedarstellung in Bezug auf ihre Antworten erlernen, indem sie gruppensparende Autoencoder in traditionelle CNNs implantieren. Das vorgeschlagene Modell übertrifft starke Baselines auf vier Datensätzen signifikant.', 'ko': '문제의 분류는 광범위하게 응용되는 중요한 임무이다.그러나 전통 기술은 문제를 일반 문장으로 보고 해당하는 답안 데이터를 소홀히 했다.문제 모델링에서 답안 정보를 고려하기 위해 우리는 먼저 새로운 그룹 희소 자동 인코더를 도입했다. 이 인코더는 답안이 집중된 그룹 정보를 이용하여 문제 표시를 세분화했다.그리고 우리는 전통적인 CNN에 그룹 희소 자동 인코더를 심어 답안과 관련된 문제를 자연스럽게 학습하는 새로운 그룹 희소 CNN을 제시했다.네 개의 데이터 집합에서 이 모델의 표현은 강기선보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'کلیسازی سوال یک کار مهم با کاربرد های گسترده است. ولی تکنیک های سنتی سوال را به عنوان جمله\u200cهای عمومی درمان می\u200cکنند، با نادیده داده\u200cهای جواب\u200cهای مناسب. برای حفظ جواب اطلاعات به مدل سوال، اولین بار گروه نویس را معرفی می کنیم که از طریق استفاده از اطلاعات گروه در مجموعه جواب استفاده می کنیم. سپس ما گروه نویسی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که CNN را به طور طبیعی یاد می\u200cگیرند که نمایش سوال را با ارتباط به پاسخ\u200cهایشان با توجه به گروه\u200cهایی که افزایش داده می\u200cشود، خودکار\u200cکننده\u200cها را به CNN سنتی می\u200cدهد. مدل پیشنهاد خیلی بیشتر از خطوط بنیادی قوی بر چهار مجموعه داده انجام می دهد.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa swali ni kazi muhimu yenye matumizi mengi. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kitamaduni hutumia maswali kama sentensi ya jumla, kutoa taarifa zinazojibu. Ili kuangalia jibu la taarifa katika mifano ya maswali, kwanza tunaonyesha kundi la riwaya linalojitoa kodi za kujibu ambalo linasayarisha uwakilishi wa maswali kwa kutumia taarifa za kikundi katika seti ya jibu. Kisha tunapendekeza kikundi cha riwaya kuacha CNN ambacho kinajifunza uwakilishi wa maswali kwa kuheshimu majibu yao kwa kuingiza kundi la kuachia kodi la kujitegemea katika mashirika ya kitamaduni ya CNN. Mfano huu unapendekezwa kwa kiasi kikubwa unafanya misingi yenye nguvu kwenye seti nne za takwimu.', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i pyetjeve është një detyrë e rëndësishme me aplikime të gjera. Megjithatë, teknikat tradicionale trajtojnë pyetjet si fjalë të përgjithshme, duke injoruar të dhënat e përgjigjes korrespondente. Me qëllim që të konsiderojmë informacionin e përgjigjeve në modelimin e pyetjeve, ne së pari futim grupe të reja të shkurtojnë autokoduesit që rafinojnë përfaqësimin e pyetjeve duke përdorur informacionin e grupit në grupin e përgjigjeve. Pastaj propozojmë grupe të reja të shkurtojnë CNN që natyrisht mësojnë përfaqësimin e pyetjeve lidhur me përgjigjet e tyre duke vendosur grupe të shkurtojnë autokoduesit në CNN tradicionale. Modeli i propozuar tejkalon ndjeshëm linjat bazë të forta në katër grupe të dhënash.', 'tr': "Sorag klasifikasy geniş programler bilen wajyp zadyr. Ýöne däpli teknikler soraglary umumy sözler hökmünde alýar, täsirli jogabat maglumatyny görmezden. Sorag modelleşine jogap berişi düşünmek üçin, biz ilkinji kitap ködlemeleri taýýarlap topar maglumatyny ulanyp soraglary taýýarlapdyr. Sonra, kitap topary CNN ködlerini saýlamaga teklip edip görýäris. Dogruplar ködlerini tradisiýa CNN'a taýýarlap soraglaryny üýtgederler. Görkezilen nusga dört sany datasetlerde güýçli temel hatlary çykarýar.", 'af': "Vrag klasifikasie is 'n belangrike taak met wye toepassings. Alhoewel, tradisionele teknike behandel vrae as algemene setinge en ignoreer die ooreenstemmende antwoord data. Om antwoord inligting in vraag modellering te beskou, introduseer ons eerste roman groep spanseer outokodere wat vraag verteenwoordigheid herstel deur groep inligting in die antwoord stel te gebruik. Ons voorstel dan nuwe groep sparse CNN wat natuurlik vraag verteenwoording leer met respek na hul antwoorde deur groep sparse autokoders in tradisionele CNN te implanteer. Die voorgestelde model is betekeurig uitvoer sterke basisline op vier datastelle.", 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন বিশাল অ্যাপলিকেশনের সাথে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। তবে ঐতিহ্যবাহী প্রযুক্তিগুলো সাধারণ বাক্য হিসেবে প্রশ্নের প্রশ্ন হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করে, যার সাথে সাড় প্রশ্নের মডেলিং এর উত্তর তথ্য বিবেচনা করার জন্য আমরা প্রথমে নোভেল গ্রুপের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্পোর্স করে দেই যা প্রশ্নের প্রতিনি তারপর আমরা উপন্যাস গ্রুপ সিএনএন-কে স্বাভাবিকভাবে প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারি যা স্বাভাবিকভাবে তাদের উত্তরের সম্পর্কে প্রশ্ প্রস্তাবিত মডেল চারটি ডাটাসেটে শক্তিশালী বেসাইন প্রয়োগ করে।', 'am': 'Question classification is an important task with wide applications.  ነገር ግን የባሕላዊ ስህተት ጥያቄዎችን እንደ ጠያማዊ ቃላት በመስጠት የመልስ ዳታ እየሳሳቱ ነው፡፡ የመጠያቂያውን መልስ በመጠየቅ ምሳሌ ለማስተካከል ለመጀመሪያ የኖረን ጉባኤ የፖለቲካ ኮድ ማሳየትን በመጠቀም የጉዳዩ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የኖረብ ቡድን የCNNs ጥያቄን በማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በአራቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ ብርቱ መደገፊያዎችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': "Soru klasifikasiyası geniş proqramlar ilə möhüm bir işdir. Halbuki, qeyri-adi tekniklər sualları genel cümlələr kimi görünür, müəyyən cavab verilənlərini dərk edirlər. Məlumatları sual modellərinə cavab vermək üçün ilk dəfə yeni qrup avtomatik kodlayıcıları tanıyırıq ki, bu sual ifadəsi ilə qrup məlumatlarını istifadə edərək dəyişdirirlər. Sonra yeni qrup CNN'ləri təklif edirik ki, qrup öz cavablarına görə sual ifadə edilməsini öyrənir, qrup təklif edən avtomatik kodlayıcıları nəticəli CNN'lərə təklif edir. Önülləşdirilmiş model dörd verilən qutuqlarda möhkəm sətirlər çəkir.", 'bs': 'Klasifikacija pitanja je važan zadatak sa širom aplikacijom. Međutim, tradicionalne tehnike odnose na pitanja kao opće rečenice, ignorirajući odgovarajuće podatke odgovora. Da bismo razmotrili odgovorne informacije u modeliranje pitanja, prvo predstavljamo nove grupe rezervirane autokodere koji refiniraju zastupanje pitanja koristeći grupne informacije u setu odgovora. Zatim predlažemo novu grupu rezervirati CNN-ove koje prirodno nauče zastupanje pitanja u vezi njihovih odgovora implantirajući grupu rezervirati autokodere u tradicionalne CNN-e. Predloženi model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije na četiri podataka.', 'ca': "La classificació de preguntes és una tasca important amb aplicacions amples. Però les tècniques tradicionals tracten les preguntes com frases generals, ignorant les dades de resposta correspondents. Per tal de considerar la informació de resposta en la modelació de preguntes, primer introduïm nous grups d'autocodificadors escassos que refinen la representació de preguntes utilitzant la informació de grup en el conjunt de respostes. Llavors proposem que els noves grups redueixen els CNN que, naturalment, aprenen la representació de preguntes en relació amb les seves respostes implantant els grups redueixen els autocodificadors a les CNN tradicionals. El model proposat supera significativament les línies de base fortes de quatre conjunts de dades.", 'et': 'Küsimuste klassifitseerimine on oluline ülesanne laialdaste rakendustega. Traditsioonilised meetodid käsitlevad küsimusi aga üldiste lausetena, ignoreerides vastavaid vastuste andmeid. Selleks, et arvestada vastusteavet küsimuste modelleerimises, tutvustame esmalt uudseid gruppide hõredaid automaatkodeerijaid, mis täpsustavad küsimuste esitamist, kasutades vastuste komplektis gruppinfot. Seejärel pakume välja uudsed rühmahõredad CNN-d, mis loomulikult õpivad küsimuste esitamist nende vastuste suhtes, implanteerides rühmahõredad autokodeerijad traditsioonilistesse CNN-idesse. Kavandatud mudel ületab oluliselt tugevaid lähtejooni nelja andmekogumi puhul.', 'fi': 'Kysymysten luokittelu on tärkeä tehtävä laajoilla sovelluksilla. Perinteiset tekniikat kuitenkin käsittelevät kysymyksiä yleisinä lauseina, jättäen vastaajien tiedot huomiotta. Jotta vastausinformaatio otettaisiin huomioon kysymysmallituksessa, esittelemme ensin uusia ryhmäharvoja automaattikoodereita, jotka tarkentavat kysymyksen esittämistä käyttämällä ryhmätietoa vastaussarjassa. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme uusia ryhmäharvoja CNN-koodereita, jotka luonnollisesti oppivat kysymysten esittämisen niiden vastausten suhteen implantoimalla ryhmäharvoja automaattikoodereita perinteisiin CNN-koodereihin. Ehdotettu malli ylittää merkittävästi vahvat lähtökohdat neljässä aineistossa.', 'hy': 'Հարցերի դասակարգման կարևոր խնդիր է լայն ծրագրերում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ավանդական տեխնիկաները հարցերը վերաբերում են որպես ընդհանուր նախադասություններ, անտեսելով պատասխանի տվյալները: Որպեսզի պատասխանի ինֆորմացիան վերաբերի հարցերի մոդելներին, մենք առաջին անգամ ներկայացնում ենք նոր խմբեր, որոնք փոքրացնում են հարցերի ներկայացումը՝ օգտագործելով խմբի ինֆորմացիան պատասխանների համակարգում: Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խումբ հազվադեպ CNN-ներ, որոնք բնականաբար սովորում են հարցերի ներկայացումը իրենց պատասխանների նկատմամբ, տեղադրելով խումբը հազվադեպ հազվադեպ ավտոկոդեր ավտոկոդերների մեջ Առաջարկված մոդելը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է չորս տվյալների հիմնական գծերը:', 'cs': 'Klasifikace otázek je důležitým úkolem s širokými aplikacemi. Tradiční techniky ovšem považují otázky za obecné věty a ignorují odpovídající údaje o odpovědi. Abychom zvážili informace o odpovědi do modelování otázek, nejprve představujeme nové skupinové řídké autokodéry, které upřesňují reprezentaci otázek využitím skupinových informací v sadě odpovědí. Následně navrhujeme nové skupinové řídké CNN, které se přirozeně naučí reprezentovat otázky s ohledem na své odpovědi implantováním skupinových řídkých autokodérů do tradičních CNN. Navržený model výrazně překonává silné základní linie na čtyřech datových sadách.', 'sk': 'Razvrščanje vprašanj je pomembna naloga s široko uporabo. Vendar pa tradicionalne tehnike obravnavajo vprašanja kot splošne stavke, pri čemer ne upoštevajo ustreznih podatkov o odgovorih. Da bi informacije o odgovorih upoštevali v modeliranje vprašanj, smo najprej uvedli nove redke skupinske samokodirje, ki izboljšajo predstavitev vprašanj z uporabo skupinskih informacij v naboru odgovorov. Nato predlagamo nove redke CNN skupine, ki se naravno naučijo reprezentacije vprašanj glede na svoje odgovore z vsaditvijo redkih skupinskih samokodirnikov v tradicionalne CNN. Predlagani model znatno presega močne osnovne črte na štirih naborih podatkov.', 'jv': 'email-custom-header-Security politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe bisa ngubah informasi sing mbukak ning model sing kesempatan, awak dhéwé ngewehi nggawe kelompok tarjamahan sing ngewehi autokoder Awak dhéwé nggunakake nggawe kelompok aturan kanggo nyengké nggawe kesempatan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang kelompok autokoder kanggo Kebonan Tradisyonal Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Shiryoyin Ayuka na tambayi yana da wani aikin mai amfani da shiryoyin ayuka. A lokacin da, kunnukiya masu kawaici masu tambaya kamar maganar jama'a, kuma yana ƙorin data da ke daidai. Dõmin ka ƙayyade masu karɓar information cikin misalin tambayi, za mu ƙara farkon komai na yanzu kodi farat ɗaya da za'a gyara tsarin masĩfa da amfani da maɓallin jama'a cikin set-up. Sa'an nan kuma muna goyyar da jama'a na novela don ka sami CNNNs wanda ke karatun masĩfar da su a naturally, da kuma masu samun sunansu da za'a sami kodi farat ɗaya zuwa CNNN'in. @ info: whatsthis", 'he': 'מסווג שאלות הוא משימה חשובה עם שימושים רחבים. עם זאת, טכניקות מסורתיות מתייחסות לשאלות כמשפטים כלליים, מתעלמות ממידע התשובה המתאים. In order to consider answer information into question modeling, we first introduce novel group sparse autoencoders which refine question representation by utilizing group information in the answer set.  ואז אנו מציעים קבוצה חדשה מפחידה CNN שמלמדת באופן טבעי מייצג שאלות בנוגע לתשובותיהם על ידי השתלת קבוצה מפחידה קודמים אוטומטיים לתוך CNN מסורתיים. המודל המוצע מגביר באופן משמעותי את קווי הבסיס חזקים בארבעה קבוצות נתונים.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ནི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཆེ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གལ་ཆེན་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚིག་རྣམས་མེད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པ། To consider answer information in to question modeling, we first introduce novel group sparse autoencoders which refine question representation by using group information in the answer set. དེ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་ཚོ་ཁག་ཅིག་གནང་བ་ནི་རྣམ་པ་གསར་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་པ་དང་། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་བཞིན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཕན་ཐོགས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Cardinal Virtues : Extracting Relation Cardinalities from Text', 'ar': 'الفضائل الكاردينال: استخراج أصول العلاقة من النص', 'pt': 'Virtudes Cardeais: Extraindo Cardinalidades de Relações do Texto', 'fr': 'Vertus cardinales\xa0: Extraire les cardinalités des relations du texte', 'es': 'Virtudes cardinales: extraer cardinalidades de relación del texto', 'ja': '枢機卿の美徳：テキストから関係の枢機卿を抽出する', 'ru': 'Кардинальные добродетели: извлечение соотношения кардинальностей из текста', 'zh': '大略:取文本', 'hi': 'कार्डिनल गुण: पाठ से संबंध Cardinalities निकालने', 'ga': 'Buanna Cairdinéalacha: Cairdinéalacha Gaol a Bhaint as Téacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Καρδινάλιες Αρτές: Εκχύλισμα των Καρδιναλίων Σχέσεων από το Κείμενο', 'hu': 'Bíboros erények: Kapcsolat bíborosságok kivonása a szövegből', 'kk': 'Картиналды виртуалдар: Қатысушылық кардиналықтарды мәтіннен тарқату', 'it': 'Virtù Cardinali: Estrarre Cardinalità Relative dal Testo', 'mk': 'Кардинални виртуи: извлекување кардинали од текстот', 'lt': 'Kardinaliniai pranašumai: santykinių kardinalių ekstrahavimas iš teksto', 'ml': 'കാര്\u200dഡിനാല്\u200d വൈര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d: പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന കാര്\u200dഡിനിലുകള്\u200d പുറത്താക്', 'ms': 'Virtual Kardinal: Mengekstrak Kardinali Hubungan Dari Teks', 'mn': 'Картиналын виртуал: Харилцааны кардиналуудыг текстээс гаргах', 'mt': 'Virtużi Kardinali: Kardinalitajiet ta’ Relazzjoni Estrattiva mit-Test', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Kardynałowe Cnoty: Wydobycie kardynalności relacji z tekstu', 'ro': 'Virtuţi cardinale: Extragerea cardinalităţilor relaţionale din text', 'sr': 'Kardinalne virtuele: izvlačenje kardinalnosti odnosa iz teksta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Faraanka cardinka: Iska saarista cardinalities text', 'ta': 'Cardinal Virtues: Extracting Relation Cardinalities from Text', 'sv': 'Kardinal dygder: Extrahera Relation Kardinaliteter från text', 'ur': 'Cardinal Virtues: Relation Cardinalities Extracting from Text', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hồng y virtues: Lấy tim mạch từ văn bản ra ngoài', 'da': 'Kardinal dyder: Udtrække Relation Kardinaliteter fra tekst', 'nl': 'Kardinaal deugden: Relatiekardinaliteiten uit Tekst halen', 'hr': 'Kardinalne virtuele: izvlačenje kardinalnih odnosa iz teksta', 'bg': 'Кардинални добродетели: извличане на отношенията кардинални от текста', 'de': 'Kardinale Tugenden: BeziehungskardinalitĂ¤ten aus Text extrahieren', 'id': 'Virtual Kardinal: Ekstraksi Kardinalitas Hubungan Dari Teks', 'ko': '기본 장점: 텍스트에서 관계 기수 추출', 'fa': 'مجازات کاردینال: اخراج کاردینال ارتباط از متن', 'sw': 'Vitendo vya Kardini: Kutoa Kardini za Kuhusiana', 'tr': 'Kardinal Çaplanjak: Elipbi Kardinalatlary Metinden Çikgi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Virtuet kardinale: nxjerrja e kardinaliteve të lidhjes nga teksti', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'hy': 'Կարդինալ Վիրտուսներ. Հաբերությունների կարդինալիտները հեռացնելը տեքստից', 'az': 'Kardinal Virtual: İlişki Kardinallıqları Metindən Çıqart', 'bn': 'কার্ডিনাল ভার্টুয়েস: টেক্সট থেকে সম্পর্কিত কার্ডিনিলিটি বের করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Kardinalne virtuele: izvlačenje kardinalnosti odnosa iz teksta', 'ca': 'Virtues cardenals: Extraent les cardenalitats de relació del text', 'cs': 'Kardinální ctnosti: extrahování vztahových kardinalit z textu', 'et': 'Kardinaalsed voorused: suhte kardinaalsuse ekstraheerimine tekstist', 'fi': 'Kardinaalin hyveet: Suhteen kardinaaliteettien erottaminen tekstistä', 'jv': 'name', 'sk': 'Kardinalne vrline: črpanje odnosov kardinalnosti iz besedila', 'he': 'תוויות קרדינליות: להוציא קרדינליות יחסים מהטקסט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Cardinal Virtues: Extracting Relation Cardinalities from Text'}
{'en': 'Information extraction (IE) from text has largely focused on relations between individual entities, such as who has won which award. However, some facts are never fully mentioned, and no IE method has perfect recall. Thus, it is beneficial to also tap contents about the cardinalities of these relations, for example, how many awards someone has won. We introduce this novel problem of extracting cardinalities and discusses the specific challenges that set it apart from standard IE. We present a distant supervision method using conditional random fields. A preliminary evaluation results in precision between 3 % and 55 %, depending on the difficulty of relations.', 'ar': 'ركز استخراج المعلومات (IE) من النص إلى حد كبير على العلاقات بين الكيانات الفردية ، مثل من فاز بالجائزة. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم ذكر بعض الحقائق بشكل كامل ، ولا توجد طريقة IE لديها استدعاء مثالي. وبالتالي ، من المفيد أيضًا النقر فوق محتويات حول العناصر الأساسية لهذه العلاقات ، على سبيل المثال ، عدد الجوائز التي فاز بها شخص ما. نقدم هذه المشكلة الجديدة لاستخراج العناصر الأساسية ونناقش التحديات المحددة التي تميزها عن معيار IE. نقدم طريقة إشراف بعيدة باستخدام الحقول العشوائية المشروطة. ينتج عن التقييم الأولي دقة تتراوح بين 3٪ و 55٪ ، اعتمادًا على صعوبة العلاقات.', 'pt': 'A extração de informações (IE) do texto se concentrou amplamente nas relações entre entidades individuais, como quem ganhou qual prêmio. No entanto, alguns fatos nunca são totalmente mencionados e nenhum método de IE tem memória perfeita. Assim, é benéfico também explorar conteúdos sobre as cardinalidades dessas relações, por exemplo, quantos prêmios alguém ganhou. Apresentamos este novo problema de extração de cardinalidades e discutimos os desafios específicos que o diferenciam do IE padrão. Apresentamos um método de supervisão à distância usando campos aleatórios condicionais. Uma avaliação preliminar resulta em precisão entre 3% e 55%, dependendo da dificuldade das relações.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'informations (IE) à partir d'un texte s'est largement concentrée sur les relations entre les entités individuelles, par exemple qui a remporté quel prix. Cependant, certains faits ne sont jamais entièrement mentionnés, et aucune méthode IE n'a un rappel parfait. Ainsi, il est utile de tirer également parti du contenu sur les cardinalités de ces relations, par exemple le nombre de récompenses remportées par une personne. Nous introduisons ce nouveau problème d'extraction des cardinalités et discutons des défis spécifiques qui le distinguent de l'IE standard. Nous présentons une méthode de supervision distante utilisant des champs aléatoires conditionnels. Une évaluation préliminaire permet d'obtenir une précision comprise entre 3\xa0% et 55\xa0%, en fonction de la difficulté des relations.", 'es': 'La extracción de información (IE) del texto se ha centrado en gran medida en las relaciones entre entidades individuales, como quién ha ganado qué premio. Sin embargo, algunos hechos nunca se mencionan por completo, y ningún método de IE tiene una memoria perfecta. Por lo tanto, es beneficioso tocar también los contenidos sobre las cardinalidades de estas relaciones, por ejemplo, cuántos premios ha ganado alguien. Presentamos este novedoso problema de extraer cardinalidades y discutimos los desafíos específicos que lo diferencian del IE estándar. Presentamos un método de supervisión a distancia que utiliza campos aleatorios condicionales. Una evaluación preliminar da como resultado una precisión de entre el 3 y el 55%, según la dificultad de las relaciones.', 'ja': 'テキストからの情報抽出（ IE ）は、誰がどの賞を受賞したかなど、個々のエンティティ間の関係に主に焦点を当てています。しかしながら、いくつかの事実は完全には言及されておらず、IE法は完全に想起されるものではありません。したがって、これらの関係の基本的な内容、例えば、誰かがいくつの賞を獲得したかについてもタップすることが有益である。カージナルスの抽出という新たな問題を紹介し、標準IEとは異なる具体的な課題について考察する。条件付きランダムフィールドを用いた遠隔監視法を提示する。予備的な評価では、関係の難易度に応じて、3 ％から55 ％の間の精度が得られます。', 'zh': '取信于文本(IE)主集于诸体,如得孰奖项。 然事有未尽及者,且无IE术有全者。 故善用其基本要素者,某人奖项多少。 因言此新事,论IE分与分。 吾言随机字段者远程督之。 初估之精在3%55%之间,在於难度。', 'hi': 'पाठ से सूचना निष्कर्षण (आईई) ने काफी हद तक व्यक्तिगत संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है, जैसे कि किसने कौन सा पुरस्कार जीता है। हालांकि, कुछ तथ्यों का कभी भी पूरी तरह से उल्लेख नहीं किया जाता है, और किसी भी आईई विधि में सही याद नहीं है। इस प्रकार, इन संबंधों की cardinalities के बारे में सामग्री को टैप करना भी फायदेमंद है, उदाहरण के लिए, किसी ने कितने पुरस्कार जीते हैं। हम cardinalities निकालने की इस उपन्यास समस्या का परिचय देते हैं और विशिष्ट चुनौतियों पर चर्चा करते हैं जो इसे मानक आईई से अलग करते हैं। हम सशर्त यादृच्छिक क्षेत्रों का उपयोग करके एक दूर की पर्यवेक्षण विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एक प्रारंभिक मूल्यांकन के परिणामस्वरूप संबंधों की कठिनाई के आधार पर 3% और 55% के बीच परिशुद्धता होती है।', 'ru': 'Извлечение информации (IE) из текста в основном сосредоточено на отношениях между отдельными субъектами, например, кто выиграл эту награду. Тем не менее, некоторые факты никогда не упоминаются полностью, и ни один метод IE не имеет идеального отзыва. Таким образом, полезно также прослушивать содержание о кардинальности этих отношений, например, сколько наград кто-то выиграл. Мы представляем эту новую проблему извлечения кардинальностей и обсуждаем конкретные проблемы, которые выделяют ее из стандартного ИС. Представлен метод дистанционного наблюдения с использованием условных случайных полей. Предварительная оценка дает точность от 3% до 55%, в зависимости от сложности отношений.', 'ga': 'Dhírigh eastóscadh faisnéise (IE) ón téacs den chuid is mó ar an gcaidreamh idir eintitis aonair, mar shampla cé a bhuaigh an dámhachtain. Mar sin féin, ní luaitear roinnt fíricí go hiomlán, agus níl cuimhne foirfe ag aon mhodh IE. Dá bhrí sin, tá sé tairbheach ábhar a thapú freisin faoi uaisleacht na gcaidreamh seo, mar shampla, cé mhéad dámhachtain a bhuaigh duine éigin. Tugaimid isteach an fhadhb nua seo maidir le huasghrádú a bhaint amach agus pléimid na dúshláin shonracha a fhágann é seachas IE caighdeánach. Cuirimid modh maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin i láthair ag baint úsáide as réimsí randamacha coinníollach. Tá cruinneas idir 3% agus 55% mar thoradh ar réamh-mheastóireacht, ag brath ar an deacracht a bhaineann le caidreamh.', 'ka': 'ტექსტიდან ინფორმაციის ექსტრექცია მაგრამ, ზოგიერთი ფაქტები არასდროს საუკეთესოდ ამბობს, და არ არის IE მეტი საუკეთესო გოგონება. ამიტომ, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რამდენიმე მონაცემები ვინმე ვინმე გაიღეთ. ჩვენ ამ პრომენტის პრობლემა, რომელიც კარიდენალიტების გამოყენება და განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით, რომელიც მას სტანდარული IE-დან გაყოფილი პრობლემა. ჩვენ გავაკეთებ 3% და 55%-ის შორის წინასწარმოდგენება, რომელიც შესახებ შესახებ შესაძლებლობას.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή πληροφοριών (IE) από το κείμενο επικεντρώθηκε σε μεγάλο βαθμό στις σχέσεις μεταξύ μεμονωμένων οντοτήτων, όπως το ποιος έχει κερδίσει ποιο βραβείο. Ωστόσο, ορισμένα γεγονότα δεν αναφέρονται ποτέ πλήρως και καμία μέθοδος δεν έχει τέλεια ανάκληση. Έτσι, είναι ευεργετικό να αξιοποιήσετε επίσης περιεχόμενο σχετικά με τις καρδινάλιες αυτών των σχέσεων, για παράδειγμα, πόσα βραβεία έχει κερδίσει κάποιος. Παρουσιάζουμε αυτό το νέο πρόβλημα της εξαγωγής καρδιναλίων και συζητάμε τις συγκεκριμένες προκλήσεις που το διαφοροποιούν από το πρότυπο Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο απομακρυσμένης εποπτείας χρησιμοποιώντας τυχαία πεδία υπό όρους. Μια προκαταρκτική αξιολόγηση οδηγεί σε ακρίβεια μεταξύ 3% και 55%, ανάλογα με τη δυσκολία των σχέσεων.', 'hu': 'A szövegből származó információkinyerés (IE) nagyrészt az egyes entitások közötti kapcsolatokra összpontosított, például, hogy ki nyerte meg a díjat. Azonban néhány tényt soha nem említenek teljesen, és nincs IE módszer tökéletes visszahívás. Ezért előnyös, ha ezeknek a kapcsolatoknak a fontosságairól szóló tartalmakat is érintjük, például hány díjat nyert valaki. Bemutatjuk a kardinalitások kivonásának új problémáját, és megvitatjuk azokat a speciális kihívásokat, amelyek megkülönböztetik a standard IE-től. Az előzetes értékelés a kapcsolatok nehézségétől függően 3% és 55% közötti pontosságot eredményez.', 'it': "L'estrazione di informazioni (IE) dal testo si è concentrata in gran parte sulle relazioni tra singole entità, ad esempio chi ha vinto quale premio. Tuttavia, alcuni fatti non sono mai completamente menzionati, e nessun metodo IE ha un richiamo perfetto. Quindi, è utile toccare anche i contenuti sulle cardinalità di queste relazioni, ad esempio, quanti premi qualcuno ha vinto. Introduciamo questo nuovo problema di estrazione delle cardinalità e discutiamo le sfide specifiche che lo distinguono dalla IE standard. Presentiamo un metodo di supervisione a distanza utilizzando campi casuali condizionali. Una valutazione preliminare porta ad una precisione compresa tra il 3% e il 55%, a seconda della difficoltà delle relazioni.", 'mk': 'Извадењето на информациите (ИЕ) од текстот се фокусираше во голема мера на односите помеѓу индивидуалните ентитети, како што е оној кој ја освои која награда. Сепак, некои факти никогаш не се споменуваат целосно, и ниту еден метод на ИЕ нема совршено потсетување. Така, корисно е, исто така, да се исклучи содржината за кардиналитетите на овие односи, на пример, колку награди некој победи. Ние го претставуваме овој нов проблем со извлекувањето кардиналитети и дискутираме за специфичните предизвици кои го одделуваат од стандардниот ИЕ. Прелиминарната проценка резултира со прецизност помеѓу 3 и 55 отсто, во зависност од тешкотијата на односите.', 'lt': 'Informacijos gavimas iš teksto daugiausia dėmesio skyrė atskirų subjektų santykiams, pavyzdžiui, laimėjusiųjų, kuriuos apdovanojimus. Tačiau kai kurie faktai niekada nėra visiškai paminėti ir jokio IE metodo visiškai neatsižvelgiama. Taigi naudinga taip pat pasinaudoti turiniu apie šių santykių kardinalumus, pavyzdžiui, kiek apdovanojimų kažkas laimėjo. Mes pristatome šią naują kardinalių išgavimo problem ą ir aptariame konkrečius iššūkius, kurie atsiskyrė nuo standartinio IE. Mes pristatome nuotolinį priežiūros metodą naudojant sąlyginius atsitiktinius laukus. Išankstinio vertinimo rezultatas yra 3–55 proc. tikslumas, priklausomai nuo santykių sunkumų.', 'kk': 'Мәтіннен мәліметті тарқату (IE) әрбір бөлімдер арасындағы қатынастар, мысалы, бұл бөлімі жетілдірген мәліметтің қатынастарына көбірек аударылды. Бірақ кейбір факттер ешқашан толық айтылмайды, және IE әдісі толық еске алмайды. Мысалы, бұл қатынастардың күнделіктерінің мазмұнын қанша ұсынып, қанша ұсынып кетті. Біз күнделіктерді тарқату және стандартты IE- ден бөлек күнделіктерді талқылаймыз. Алдыңғы оқиға 3% мен 55% арасындағы дұрыс болады, қатынастың қиындығына тәуелді.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi maklumat (IE) dari teks telah fokus pada hubungan antara entiti individu, seperti yang telah menang penghargaan yang mana. Namun, beberapa fakta tidak pernah disebut sepenuhnya, dan tiada kaedah IE mempunyai pengingatan sempurna. Oleh itu, ia adalah bermanfaat untuk menggunakan kandungan mengenai kardinalitas hubungan ini, misalnya, berapa banyak hadiah seseorang telah menang. Kami memperkenalkan masalah baru ini untuk mengekstrak kardinalitas dan membincangkan cabaran spesifik yang membezakannya dari IE piawai. Kami memperkenalkan kaedah pengawasan jauh menggunakan medan rawak syarat. Evaluasi awal mengakibatkan ketepatan antara 3% dan 55%, bergantung pada kesukaran hubungan.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni (IE) mit-test iffokat fil-biċċa l-kbira fuq ir-relazzjonijiet bejn entitajiet individwali, bħal min rebaħ liema premju. Madankollu, xi fatti qatt ma jissemmew bis-sħiħ, u l-ebda metodu IE ma għandu ġbid lura perfettament. Għalhekk, huwa ta’ benefiċċju wkoll li jiġu sfruttati l-kontenuti dwar il-kardinalitajiet ta’ dawn ir-relazzjonijiet, pereżempju, kemm rebaħ xi ħadd. Aħna nintroduċu din il-problem a ġdida tal-estrazzjoni tal-kardinalitajiet u niddiskutu l-isfidi speċifiċi li qajmu lil hinn mill-IE standard. Evalwazzjoni preliminari tirriżulta fi preċiżjoni bejn 3% u 55%, skont id-diffikultà tar-relazzjonijiet.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നത് വ്യക്തിപരമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മേല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ എന്നാലും, ചില സത്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരിക്കലും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും പ്രസ്താവിക്കാതിരിക്കുന്നിട്ടില്ല, യി.ഐ രീതിയ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ കാര്\u200dഡിനിറ്റിയെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കം ടാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും ഉപയോഗമാണ്, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായ കാര്\u200dഡിനിറ്റികളെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഈ നോവല്\u200d പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, അത് സാധാരണ ഐയിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന വ്യ മൂന്നു ശതമാനത്തിനും 55 ശതമാനത്തിനുമിടയില്\u200d ഒരു ആദ്യ വിലാസപ്രകാരം മൂല്യം പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ പ്രയ', 'no': 'Ekstrasjon av informasjon (IE) frå teksten har stort fokusert på relasjonar mellom individuelle einingar, slik som han har vann kva verdi. Somme faktar er imidlertid aldri fullstendig oppgjeven, og ingen IE-metode har perfekt oppgåve. Dette er også nyttig å tappa innhaldet om kordinalitet av desse forholdene, for eksempel kor mange prøver noen har vann. Vi introduserer denne roman problem med å pakka ut kardinalitet og diskuterer dei spesifikke utfordringane som sett det ut frå standard IE. Vi presenterer ein ekstern overvåkingsmetode ved hjelp av vilkårleg felter. Eit tidlegare evaluering resulterer i nøyaktighet mellom 3 % og 55 %, avhengig av vanskeligheten for relasjonar.', 'mn': 'Текстүүдийн мэдээлэл татах (IE) нь хүн бүрийн хоорондын харилцаа ихэнхдээ анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Гэвч зарим үнэндээ хэзээ ч бүрэн хэлж чадахгүй, IE арга нь бүрэн санаа авч чадахгүй. Тиймээс, эдгээр харилцааны үндсэн зүйлсийг ч мөн хэрэгтэй. Жишээ нь хэн нэгнийг ялсан шагнал. Бид үүнийг стандарт IE-ээс ялгаатай зорилготой зүйлсийг нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ асуудлыг тайлбарлаж, нөхцөл санамсаргүй салбаруудыг ашиглан хол харах арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Эхний оюутнууд нь харилцааны хэцүү хэцүү байдлын тулд 3% болон 55% хоорондын тодорхойлолтой байдаг.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji (IE) z tekstu koncentrowała się w dużej mierze na relacjach pomiędzy poszczególnymi podmiotami, takich jak kto zdobył jaką nagrodę. Jednak niektóre fakty nigdy nie są w pełni wymienione, a żadna metoda IE nie ma doskonałego przypomnienia. Dlatego korzystne jest również wykorzystanie treści o kardynalnościach tych relacji, na przykład, ile nagród ktoś zdobył. Przedstawiamy ten nowatorski problem ekstrakcji kardynalności i omawiamy specyficzne wyzwania, które wyróżniają ją od standardowego IE. Przedstawiamy metodę nadzoru z wykorzystaniem warunkowych pól losowych. Wstępna ocena skutkuje precyzją od 3% do 55%, w zależności od trudności relacji.', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor (IE) din text s-a axat în mare măsură pe relațiile dintre entitățile individuale, cum ar fi cine a câștigat care premiu. Cu toate acestea, unele fapte nu sunt niciodată menționate pe deplin, și nici o metodă IE nu are rechemare perfectă. Astfel, este benefic să atingeți, de asemenea, conținutul despre cardinalitățile acestor relații, de exemplu, câte premii a câștigat cineva. Introducem această nouă problemă de extragere a cardinalităților și discutăm provocările specifice care o deosebesc de IE standard. Prezentăm o metodă de supraveghere la distanță folosind câmpuri condiționate aleatorii. O evaluare preliminară rezultă între 3% și 55%, în funcție de dificultatea relațiilor.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija informacija (IE) iz teksta se uglavnom fokusirala na odnose između pojedinih entitata, poput one koji su osvojili nagradu. Međutim, neke činjenice nikada ne spominju, i nijedna metoda IE nije savršena sjećanja. Stoga je korisno takođe da se uključimo i sadržaj o kardinalnosti ovih odnosa, na primer, koliko je nagrada netko osvojio. Predstavljamo ovaj novi problem izvlačenja kardinalija i razgovaramo o specifičnim izazovima koje ga razdvajaju od standardnih IE-a. Predstavljamo daleki metod nadzora s uslovima nasumičnih polja. Preliminarna procena rezultira preciznosti između 3% i 55%, ovisno o teškosti odnosa.', 'ta': 'உரையிலிருந்து தகவல் வெளியீடு (IE) பெரும்பாலாக தனிப்பட்ட பொருளுக்கிடையே தொடர்பு எனினும், சில உண்மைகள் முழுமையாக குறிப்பிடப்படவில்லை, மற்றும் IE முறைமை உதாரணமாக, யாராவது வெற்றி பெற்றார்களோ எத்தனை விருப்பங்களை பற்றி உள்ளடக்கங்களையும் டாப் பயனுள்ளது. நாம் அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுவதின் புதிய பிரச்சனையை அறிவிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் இதை இயல்பான ஐஐயை விட்டு வெளியேற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட சவா முதல் மதிப்புகள் தொடர்புகளின் கடினமைப்பை சார்ந்து கொண்டு 3% மற்றும் 55% க்கு இடையே துல்லியமான விளைவுகளை வெளிய', 'ur': 'پیغام سے اطلاعات اٹھانے والی (IE) ایک شخص کے درمیان رابطہ پر زیادہ مشورہ کیا گیا ہے، جیسے وہ جس کا اجر مل گیا ہے۔ لیکن بعض حقیقتوں کا ذکر کبھی پورا نہیں ہے اور کوئی IE طریقہ پورا نہیں ہے۔ اسی طرح، یہ ان رابطے کے اعتبار کے بارے میں بھی موجود ہے، مثال، کس طرح کا صلہ کس نے جیتا ہے. ہم نے اسے استاندارد IE سے جدا جدا کر دینے والی مختلف چالوں کے اضافہ کرنے کے لئے یہ روانی مسئلہ پیش کرتا ہے. ہم ایک دور نظارت طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں اور اس کے مطابق مختلف چالوں سے بحث کرتے ہیں. آغاز ارزیابی کا نتیجہ 3% اور 55% کے درمیان دقیق ہوتا ہے، رابطہ کے مشکلات پر مضبوط ہے.', 'sv': 'Informationsutvinning (IE) från text har till stor del fokuserat på relationer mellan enskilda enheter, till exempel vem som har vunnit vilket pris. Men vissa fakta nämns aldrig helt, och ingen IE-metod har perfekt återkallande. Således är det fördelaktigt att också peka på innehåll om kardinaliteten i dessa relationer, till exempel hur många utmärkelser någon har vunnit. Vi introducerar detta nya problem med att extrahera kardinaliteter och diskuterar de specifika utmaningar som skiljer det från standard IE.Vi presenterar en fjärrövervakningsmetod med villkorliga slumpmässiga fält. En preliminär utvärdering resulterar i precision mellan 3% och 55%, beroende på svårigheterna i relationerna.', 'si': 'පාළුවෙන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය (IE) පිළිබඳින් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අතර සම්බන්ධයක් ගැන වැඩියෙන් පිළිබඳින නමුත්, සමහර විදියට කවදාවත් සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම කියන්නේ නෑ, ඒ වගේම IE විදියට සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ඉතින්, මේ සම්බන්ධයේ කාර්ඩිනාලිත්වය ගැන සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි, උදාහරණයෙන්, කවුරුහරි ගි අපි මේ කාර්ඩිනලිත්වය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් IE වලින් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ මුලින්ම විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ 3% සහ 55% අතර, සම්බන්ධ අමාරුයේ අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන්.', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad la soo saaro (IE) oo laga soo baxay qoraal aad u badan wuxuu ku kalsoonaaday xiriir u dhexeeya waxyaabaha gaarka ah, tusaale ahaan qofka guulaystay warqadaas. Si kastaba ha ahaatee xaqiiqyada qaarkood lama sheego si buuxda ah, qaab IE ahna ma ahan in la soo xusuusto kaamil ah. Sidoo kale waxey faa’iido u leedahay in lagu dumiyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan shuruudaha xiriirka, tusaale ahaan inta mushaar qof ka adkaaday. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa dhibaatadan warqada ah oo ka soo bixinta cardinimada, waxaana kala sheekaynaa dhibaatooyin gaar ah oo aan ka dhigno caalamka IE-ka caalamiga ah. Waxaannu keennaa qaab aad u fog oo lagu isticmaalayo beero sharaf ah. Qiimeynta hore wuxuu ka soo jeedaa saxda u dhexeeya 3% iyo 55 boqolkiiba, iyadoo ku xiran dhibaatada xiriirka.', 'uz': 'Матндан маълумот ажратиш (IE) катта таркибида шахс объеклари орасидаги алоқаларга муҳтож кўринади, мисоли кимнинг ҳуқуқига эришди. Lekin, bu haqida hech qachon narsa topilmadi, va IE usuli butunlay eslab qolmaydi. Thus, it is beneficial to also tap contents about the cardinalities of these relations, for example, how many awards someone has won.  Biz qardinalarni ajratish uchun bu novel muammolarni anglatamiz va uning andoza IE tomonidan tashqari hodisa muammolarni talab qilamiz. Biz taʼminlovchi soʻzlardan foydalanish uchun uzoq muvaffaqiyatlarni boshqaramiz. Birinchi qiymatni 3% va 55% dan foydalanadi. Ulanish qiymatiga murakkab boʻlishi mumkin.', 'vi': 'Việc trích xuất thông tin từ cơ bản đã chủ động tập trung vào mối quan hệ giữa các cơ quan cá nhân, như ai đã thắng giải nào. Tuy nhiên, một số dữ kiện chưa bao giờ được đề cập hoàn toàn, và không có phương pháp Iễ nào được nhắc hoàn hảo. Do đó, nó có lợi cho việc khai thác nội dung của các mối quan hệ này, ví dụ như, bao nhiêu phần thưởng một người đã thắng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp giám sát xa xôi sử dụng các trường ngẫu nhiên có điều kiện. Một cuộc đánh giá sơ bộ dẫn đến sự chính xác giữa 3=.=và 55, phụ thuộc vào mối quan hệ khó khăn.', 'nl': 'Informatie extractie (IE) uit tekst is grotendeels gericht op relaties tussen individuele entiteiten, zoals wie welke prijs heeft gewonnen. Sommige feiten worden echter nooit volledig vermeld en geen IE-methode heeft een perfecte herinnering. Het is dus voordelig om ook inhoud te tikken over de kardinaliteiten van deze relaties, bijvoorbeeld hoeveel prijzen iemand heeft gewonnen. We introduceren dit nieuwe probleem van het extraheren van kardinaliteiten en bespreken de specifieke uitdagingen die het onderscheidt van standaard IE. We presenteren een remote supervision methode met behulp van voorwaardelijke random velden. Een voorlopige evaluatie resulteert in precisie tussen 3% en 55%, afhankelijk van de moeilijkheid van de relaties.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija informacija (IE) iz teksta uglavnom se fokusirala na odnose između pojedinih entitata, poput one koji su osvojili koju nagradu. Međutim, neke činjenice nikada ne spominju u potpunosti, i nijedna metoda IE-a nije savršena sjećanja. Stoga je korisno također uključiti sadržaj o kardinalnosti tih odnosa, na primjer, koliko je nagrada netko osvojio. Predstavljamo ovaj novi problem izvlačenja kardinalija i razgovaramo o specifičnim izazovima koji ga razdvajaju od standardnog IE-a. Predstavljamo daleki metod nadzora s uslovnim slučajnim poljima. Preliminarna procjena rezultira preciznosti između 3% i 55%, ovisno o teškoći odnosa.', 'bg': 'Извличането на информация (ИЕ) от текста до голяма степен се фокусира върху отношенията между отделните субекти, като например кой е спечелил коя награда. Някои факти обаче никога не се споменават напълно и нито един метод на ИЕ няма перфектно припомняне. По този начин е полезно да докоснете съдържанието за кардиналите на тези отношения, например колко награди някой е спечелил. Въвеждаме този нов проблем за извличане на кардинали и обсъждаме специфичните предизвикателства, които го отличават от стандартния Представяме метод за дистанционен надзор, използващ условни произволни полета. Предварителната оценка води до прецизност между 3% и 55%, в зависимост от трудността на отношенията.', 'da': 'Informationsudvinding (IE) fra tekst har i vid udstrækning fokuseret på relationer mellem enkelte enheder, f.eks. hvem der har vundet hvilken pris. Men nogle fakta er aldrig fuldt ud nævnt, og ingen IE metode har perfekt tilbagekaldelse. Således er det gavnligt også at trykke på indhold om kardinaliteterne i disse relationer, for eksempel, hvor mange priser nogen har vundet. Vi introducerer dette nye problem med at udtrække kardinaliteter og diskuterer de specifikke udfordringer, der adskiller det fra standard IE. Vi præsenterer en fjernovervågningsmetode ved hjælp af betingede tilfældige felter. En foreløbig evaluering resulterer i nøjagtighed mellem 3% og 55%, afhængigt af vanskelighederne i forbindelserne.', 'de': 'Die Informationsextraktion (IE) aus Texten hat sich weitgehend auf die Beziehungen zwischen einzelnen Entitäten konzentriert, beispielsweise wer welchen Preis gewonnen hat. Einige Fakten werden jedoch nie vollständig erwähnt, und keine IE-Methode hat einen perfekten Rückruf. So ist es vorteilhaft, auch Inhalte über die Kardinalitäten dieser Beziehungen zu tippen, zum Beispiel, wie viele Auszeichnungen jemand gewonnen hat. Wir stellen dieses neuartige Problem der Extraktion von Kardinalitäten vor und diskutieren die spezifischen Herausforderungen, die es von Standard IE unterscheiden. Wir stellen eine Fernüberwachungsmethode unter Verwendung von bedingten Zufallsfeldern vor. Eine vorläufige Bewertung ergibt eine Genauigkeit zwischen 3% und 55%, abhängig von der Schwierigkeit der Beziehungen.', 'ko': '텍스트에서 정보를 추출하는 것은 주로 개체 실체 간의 관계에 주목한다. 예를 들어 누가 어떤 상을 받았는지에 주목한다.그러나 어떤 사실들은 충분히 언급되지 않았고, IE 방법이 완벽한 회상 능력을 가지고 있는 것은 없었다.따라서 이런 관계의 기본 요소인 어떤 사람이 얼마나 많은 상을 받았는지 발굴하는 것도 유익하다.우리는 이 추출 기수의 새로운 문제를 소개하고 표준 IE와 다른 구체적인 도전을 토론했다. 우리는 사용 조건의 랜덤 필드의 원격 모니터링 방법을 제시했다.관계의 난이도에 따라 초보 평가의 정확도는 3%에서 55% 사이이다.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi informasi (IE) dari teks telah fokus pada hubungan antara entitas individu, seperti yang telah memenangkan penghargaan yang mana. Namun, beberapa fakta tidak pernah disebutkan sepenuhnya, dan tidak ada metode IE memiliki ingatan sempurna. Oleh karena itu, berguna juga menggambarkan isi tentang kardinalitas hubungan ini, misalnya, berapa banyak hadiah seseorang telah menang. Kami memperkenalkan masalah baru ini untuk mengekstraksi kardinalitas dan mendiskusikan tantangan spesifik yang membedakannya dari IE standar. Evaluasi awal menghasilkan presisi antara 3% dan 55%, tergantung pada kesulitan hubungan.', 'sw': 'Information extraction (IE) from text has largely focused on relations between individual entities, such as who has won which award.  Hata hivyo, baadhi ya ukweli haujatajwa kabisa, na hakuna njia ya IE haina kukumbuka kabisa. Kwa hiyo, inafaa pia kupoteza maudhui yanayohusu katiba ya mahusiano haya, kwa mfano, tuzo ngapi ambazo mtu ameshinda. Tunawasilisha tatizo hili la riwaya la kutengeneza katuni na kujadili changamoto maalum ambazo zinatenga tofauti na IE ya kawaida. Utafiti wa awali unasababisha uhakika kati ya asilimia 3 na 55, ukitegemea matatizo ya mahusiano.', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات (IE) از متن بیشتر روی رابطه بین واحدهای فردی تمرکز کرده است، مانند کسانی که برنده شدن جایزه است. ولی بعضی حقایق هرگز کاملاً به ذکر نمی\u200cرسند، و هیچ روش IE کامل یادآوری ندارد. بنابراین، برای مثال، محتوای کاردینالیت این رابطه، چقدر جایزه\u200cهای کسی برنده است، منافع است. ما این مشکل رمانی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که از اخراج کاردینالیت\u200cها و در مورد چالش\u200cهای خاصی که آن را از IE استاندارد جدا می\u200cکند، بحث می\u200cکنیم. ما روش نظارت دور را با استفاده از زمینه\u200cهای تصادفی مشخص می\u200cکنیم. یک ارزیابی پیشینیان نتیجه دقیق بین 3% و 55%، بستگی به مشکلات رابطه است.', 'af': "Informasie uitpakking (IE) van teks het groot gefokus op relasies tussen individuele entiteite, soos wie het gewen wat verskaf. Maar sommige fakte word nooit volledig gemennis nie, en geen IE metode het volledige rekening nie. So, dit is nuttig om ook inhoud oor die kardinaliteit van hierdie relasies te slaan, byvoorbeeld, hoeveel baie inwarings het iemand gewen. Ons introduseer hierdie novele probleem van uitpakking van kardinaliteit en bespreek die spesifieke uitdrukkings wat dit uitstel van standaard IE. Ons stel 'n afgeleë supervisie metode voor te gebruik voorwaardige willekeurige velde. 'n Vorige evaluasie resultaat in presisie tussen 3% en 55%, afhanklik van die moeilikheid van verwantings.", 'sq': 'Nxirja e informacionit (IE) nga teksti është përqëndruar kryesisht në marrëdhëniet midis njësive individuale, të tilla si kush ka fituar çmimin. Megjithatë, disa fakte nuk përmenden kurrë plotësisht dhe asnjë metodë IE nuk ka kujtim perfekt. Kështu, është e dobishme të përdorësh gjithashtu përmbajtjen rreth kardinaliteteve të këtyre marrëdhënieve, për shembull, sa çmime ka fituar dikush. Ne prezantojmë këtë problem të ri të nxjerrjes së kardinaliteteve dhe diskutojmë sfidat specifike që e përjashtojnë atë nga IE standard. Një vlerësim paraprak rezulton në saktësi midis 3% dhe 55%, në varësi të vështirësisë së marrëdhënieve.', 'tr': 'Metinden maglumat gaýşartmak (IE) hatlary hatda hatlaryň arasyndaky baglaýyşlara üns berdi, şol üçin ýeňdi. Ýöne käbir sanat hiç haçan diýilmez, we hiçbir IE metody beýleki hatyrlamady. Şol sebäpli, bu relasiýanyň kardinalitikleri barada hem maksady çykmak kynçylykdyr. Mesela, biriniň näçe uly gazandygyny üçin. Kardinalatlary taýýarlamak üçin bu atly meseleni guruldyrýarys we muny standart IE-den a ýratyn çözgütleri ylalaşýarys. Biz ähli uzyn yöntemi moda görkezýäris. Öňki çözgüt ýagdaýynyň 3% we 55% aralygynda dogry ýagdaýynyň çykyşlygyna görýär.', 'hy': 'Տեքստից տեղեկատվություն ստանալը հիմնականում կենտրոնացել է անհատական կազմակերպությունների միջև հարաբերությունների վրա, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ, ովքեր հաղթել են ո՞ր մրցանակը: Այնուամենայնիվ, որոշ փաստեր երբեք ամբողջովին չեն նշել, և ոչ մի ինտերնետային մեթոդ կատարյալ հիշողություն չունի: Այսպիսով, օգտակար է նաև ներկայացնել այս հարաբերությունների կարծրատիվությունները, օրինակ, ինչ-որ մրցանակներ է մեկը հաղթել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս նոր խնդիրը, որը կապված է սրտինալիտների վերացման հետ, և քննարկում ենք այն հատուկ մարտահրավերները, որոնք բաժանում են այն ստանդարտ ինտերնետային ինտերնետային ինտերնետից, մենք ներկայացնում ենք հեռավոր վերահսկողական Առաջին գնահատման արդյունքում ճշգրտությունը 3-55 տոկոսի միջև է, կախված հարաբերությունների դժվարությունից:', 'am': 'ከጽሑፍ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች (IE) በተለየ የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነት ላይ አስማክሮአል፤ እንደዚህ ማድረግ ማን አሸነፈ፡፡ However, some facts are never fully mentioned, and no IE method has perfect recall.  እንደዚሁም የዚህን ግንኙነት በሥርዓት ማድረግ ማድረግ ይጠቅማል፤ ምሳሌ ማንም ያሸነፈው ስንት ድጋፍ ነው፡፡ የካርዲኖችን ማውጣት የረኀብ ጉዳይ እናሳየዋለን እና ከዓላማዊ IE የተለየውን ቁጥጥር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ውጤት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ላይ የሚታመን 3 በመቶ እና 55 በመቶ የሚታወቀው ግንኙነት ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'টেক্সট থেকে তথ্য বের করা হয়েছে ব্যক্তিগত বিষয়বস্তুর মধ্যে সম্পর্কের প্রতি বেশীরভাগ মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, যেমন কে পুরস্কার প তবে কিছু বাস্তবতা সম্পূর্ণ উল্লেখ করা হয়নি এবং কোন আইE পদ্ধতি সম্পূর্ণ মনে রাখে না। যেহেতু এই সম্পর্কের কার্ডিনিলিটির বিষয়বস্তু নিয়ে ট্যাপ করার জন্য এটা সুবিধা, উদাহরণস্বরূপ, কেউ কতটা পুরস্কার পেয়েছ আমরা কার্ডিনিলিটিকে বের করার এই উপন্যাসের সমস্যাকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিয়েছি এবং নির্দিষ্ট চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে আলোচনা করি যা স্ট্যান্ডার্ড আই.ই. ছাড় A preliminary evaluation results in precision between 3% and 55%, depending on the difficulty of relations.', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija informacija (IE) iz teksta uglavnom se fokusirala na odnose između pojedinih entitata, poput one koji su osvojili koju nagradu. Međutim, neke činjenice nikada ne spominju u potpunosti, i nijedan metod IE nije savršen sjećanje. Stoga je korisno također prihvatiti sadržaj o kardinalnosti tih odnosa, na primjer, koliko je nagrada netko osvojio. Predstavljamo ovaj novi problem izvlačenja kardinalija i razgovaramo o specifičnim izazovima koji ga razdvajaju od standardnih IE-a. Predstavljamo daleki metod nadzora s uslovima nasumičnih polja. Preliminarna procjena rezultira preciznosti između 3% i 55%, ovisno o teškosti odnosa.', 'ca': "L'extracció de la informació (IE) del text s'ha centrat en gran part en les relacions entre entitats individuals, com per exemple qui ha guanyat quin premi. No obstant això, alguns fets mai s'mencionen plenament, i cap mètode d'IE no té una recordació perfecta. Així, és beneficiós també aprofitar continguts sobre les cardinalitats d'aquestes relacions, per exemple, quants premis algú ha guanyat. Introduïm aquest nou problem a de l'extracció de cardinalitats i discutem els reptes específics que ho van separar de l'IE standard. Presentam un mètode de supervisió remot utilitzant camps condicionats aleatoris. Una evaluació preliminar porta a una precisió entre el 3% i el 55%, segons la dificultat de les relacions.", 'az': 'Metind…ôn m…ôlumat √ßńĪxarńĪlmasńĪ (IE) individual entit…ôl…ôr arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlara √ßox odaklanmńĪŇüdńĪr, b…ôlk…ô √∂d√ľll…ôri kazanmńĪŇüdńĪr. Lakin, b…ôzi faktlar he√ß vaxt tamamlanmadńĪr v…ô he√ß bir IE metodu tamamlanmadńĪr. Bel…ôlikl…ô, bu iliŇükil…ôrin kardinallńĪqlarńĪ bar…ôsind…ô h…ôm√ßinin ne√ß…ô q…ôd…ôr √∂d√ľll…ôr kazandńĪńüńĪ m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr istifad…ô etm…ôk faydalandńĪr. Biz kardinallńĪqlarńĪ √ßńĪxartmaq v…ô standart IE-d…ôn ayrńĪlan m√ľzakir…ôl…ôri il…ô m√ľbahis…ô edirik. ∆Źvv…ôlki deńüerlendirm…ô 3%-55%-in arasńĪndakńĪ d…ôqiqliyyat olaraq, …ôlaq…ôl…ôrin √ß…ôtinlikl…ôr…ô bańülńĪ olaraq.', 'et': 'Teabe väljavõtmine tekstist on suures osas keskendunud üksikute üksuste vahelistele suhetele, näiteks kes on võitnud millise auhinna. Kuid mõned faktid ei ole kunagi täielikult mainitud ja ükski IE meetod ei ole täiuslik meeldetuletus. Seega on kasulik puudutada ka sisu nende suhete kardinaalsuse kohta, näiteks mitu auhinda keegi on võitnud. Tutvustame seda uudset kardinaalide ekstraheerimise probleemi ning arutleme konkreetseid väljakutseid, mis eristavad seda standardsest IE-st. Esitleme kaugjärelevalvemeetodit, mis kasutab tingimuslikke juhuslikke välju. Esialgse hindamise tulemuseks on täpsus 3–55%, sõltuvalt suhete raskustest.', 'cs': 'Extrakce informací (IE) z textu se do značné míry zaměřuje na vztahy mezi jednotlivými subjekty, například kdo vyhrál cenu. Nicméně, některá fakta nejsou nikdy úplně zmíněna a žádná IE metoda nemá dokonalé vybavení. Je tedy výhodné také využít obsah o kardinálech těchto vztahů, například kolik ocenění někdo vyhrál. Představujeme tento nový problém extrakce kardinalit a diskutujeme konkrétní výzvy, které ho odlišují od standardního IE. Představujeme metodu vzdáleného dohledu pomocí podmíněných náhodných polí. Předběžné hodnocení vede k přesnosti mezi 3% a 55%, v závislosti na obtížnosti vztahů.', 'fi': 'Tiedonhankinta tekstistä on keskittynyt pitkälti yksittäisten tahojen välisiin suhteisiin, kuten siihen, kuka on voittanut minkä palkinnon. Joitakin tosiasioita ei kuitenkaan koskaan mainita täysin, eikä yksikään IE-menetelmä ole täydellinen muistaminen. Näin ollen on hyödyllistä napauttaa myös sisältöä näiden suhteiden kardinaaleista, esimerkiksi kuinka monta palkintoa joku on voittanut. Esittelemme uuden kardinaalien poimimisen ongelman ja pohdimme niitä erityisiä haasteita, jotka erottavat sen standardista IE:stä. Alustavan arvioinnin tulos on 3–55 prosentin tarkkuus riippuen suhteiden vaikeudesta.', 'ha': "Cikakken bayani na IU daga matsayin ya kiɓa ana zura makini a tsakanin abubuwa guda, kamar wanda ya rinjãya ko da musamman. A lokacin da, ba za'a taɓa wasu gaskiyar ba, kuma babu wani metode na IU ya cika rabo. Wannan yana da amfani da ku sami kayan masu husũma da waɗannan, misali, da yawa zawara wanda ya rinjãya. Munã ƙara wa wannan matsalar nowaya na fita kardinaliti kuma Munã yi jayayya masu ƙayyade masu ƙayyade da ke daidaita shi daga tsakanin IU. Kuma Munã zo da wata hanyor tsari mai nĩsa da za'a yi amfani da field masu buƙata. Wata qiymati na farko ta ƙara yana da hakki a tsakanin 3% da 55%, yana daidai ga buƙatan haɗuwa.", 'sk': 'Pridobivanje informacij iz besedila se je v veliki meri osredotočilo na odnose med posameznimi subjekti, na primer, kdo je dobil katero nagrado. Vendar pa nekatera dejstva niso nikoli v celoti omenjena in nobena metoda IE nima popolnega spomina. Zato je koristno, da se dotaknete tudi vsebine o kardinalnostih teh odnosov, na primer, koliko nagrad je nekdo osvojil. Predstavljamo nov problem ekstrakcije kardinalnosti in obravnavamo specifične izzive, ki ga ločujejo od standardnega IE, predstavljamo metodo oddaljenega nadzora z uporabo pogojnih naključnih polj. Rezultat predhodne ocene je natančnost med 3% in 55%, odvisno od težavnosti odnosov.', 'jv': 'Display information extract (SE) from text politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nambah, lan kabèh bener kanggo nganggo karduluhan wong iki dadi, sampek, sing nyimpen karduluhan uwong sampek. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngéwé éntuk kartinêrung pamirêt karéné petani sing beraksi perusahaan karéné kalagayarno nggawe barang nggawe barang apik nyelarangé (intermediate) Tarjamahan sing perusahaan dadi kapan tanggal sabanjur 3% lan 5%, mengko-tanggal kuwi nggawé kanggo kalagayaan urang.', 'he': 'החולץ מידע (IE) מהטקסט התמקד בעיקר במערכת יחסים בין יחסים בודדים, כמו מי זכה באיזה פרס. עם זאת, עובדות מסוימות אף פעם לא מזכירות לחלוטין, ולא שיטת IE יש זיכרון מושלם. לכן, זה מועיל גם להקליט תוכן על קרדינליות מערכות היחסים האלה, לדוגמה, כמה פרסים מישהו זכה. אנו מציגים את הבעיה החדשה הזו של החולץ קרדינליות ודיונים על האתגרים המיוחדים שהפרידו אותה מהIE סטנדרטית. הערכה קודמית תוצאה בדיוק בין 3% ל-55%, בהתאם לקשיקות יחסים.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་མང་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ཤས་གཅིག་ཀྱང་མ་སྤྲོད་པར་འཛིན་གྱིན་མེད། IE་ལམ་ལུགས་སྒྲིག་གི་དོན་ལ་བས དེར་བརྟེན། འབྲེལ་བ་འདི་ཚོ་དང་བློ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཀྱང་ལས་ཕན་ཐུབ་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བཞག ང་ཚོས་Cardinalities་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ཐབས་བའི་གསར་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་སྤྲོད་ནས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་དོན་མིན་འདུག་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབར་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། འབྲེལ་བ་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་ཚད་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་གཏ'}
{'en': 'Integrating Deep Linguistic Features in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'es': 'Integración de características lingüísticas profundas en la predicción de hechos sobre conjuntos de datos unificados', 'pt': 'Integrando recursos linguísticos profundos na previsão de factualidade em conjuntos de dados unificados', 'ar': 'دمج السمات اللغوية العميقة في التنبؤ الواقعي على مجموعات البيانات الموحدة', 'fr': 'Intégration de fonctionnalités linguistiques approfondies dans la prédiction factuelle sur des ensembles de données unifiés', 'hi': 'एकीकृत डेटासेट पर तथ्यात्मकता भविष्यवाणी में गहरी भाषाई विशेषताओं को एकीकृत करना', 'ru': 'Интеграция глубоких лингвистических особенностей в прогнозирование фактичности над унифицированными наборами данных', 'zh': '在统一数集的事情性占中集成深度言语特征', 'ja': '統合されたデータセット上の事実予測における深い言語機能の統合', 'ga': 'Gnéithe Doimhneacha Teangeolaíocha a Chomhtháthú sa Réamhthuar Fíorais thar Thacair Sonraí Aontaithe', 'hu': 'Mélynyelvi funkciók integrálása a tényleges előrejelzésben az egységes adatkészletekkel', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση βαθέων γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών στην πρόβλεψη πραγματικότητας μέσω ενοποιημένων συνόλων δεδομένων', 'ka': 'ინტერგურაცია ძალიან ლინგურისტიკური ფუნქციების განსაზღვრებაში ერთადერთებული მონაცემების შესახებ', 'it': 'Integrare funzionalità linguistiche profonde nella previsione della realtà su set di dati unificati', 'kk': 'Біріктірілген деректер қорының қасиеттерін түсіндіру', 'ms': 'Integrating Deep Linguistic Features in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഫാക്കൂളിറ്റിയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനത്തില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Нэгдсэн өгөгдлийн мэдээлэл дээр гүн гүнзгий хэлбэрийн боломжуудыг нэгтгэх', 'mt': 'L-integrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi lingwistiċi profondi fil-previżjoni tal-fattwalità fuq settijiet ta’ dejta unifikati', 'lt': 'Išsamių kalbinių savybių integravimas į suvienodintų duomenų rinkinių faktinių prognozes', 'mk': 'Интегрирање на длабоките јазички карактеристики во предвидувањето на фактуалноста преку унифицираните датотеки', 'no': 'Integrerer dyppa linguistiske funksjonar i førehandsvising av faktualitet over uniserte databaser', 'pl': 'Integracja głębokich funkcji językowych w prognozowaniu faktyczności w ujednoliconych zbiorach danych', 'ro': 'Integrarea caracteristicilor lingvistice profunde în predicția realității peste seturi de date unificate', 'sr': 'Integracija dubokih lingvističkih karakteristika u predviđanju činjenice o jedinstvenim podacima', 'so': 'Isku qabsashada deeper Linguistic Features in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'sv': 'Integrera djupa språkliga funktioner i faktaundervisning över enhetliga datauppsättningar', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ලින්ගුස්ටික විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න', 'ta': 'ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'عمیق لینگ گوئسٹیسٹ فکرات کو ایک یونیافیڈ ڈاٹیسٹ کے بارے میں تضامن کرنا', 'vi': 'Cài đặt các chức năng ngôn ngữ sâu trong tính xấu hạn chế qua các bộ dữ liệu hợp lệ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'nl': 'Integreren van diepe taalkundige functies in feitelijkheidsvoorspelling over uniforme datasets', 'hr': 'Integruranje dubokih lingvističkih karakteristika u predviđanju činjenice o jednostavnim podacima', 'bg': 'Интегриране на дълбоки лингвистични характеристики в прогнозирането на фактологията върху унифицирани набори от данни', 'da': 'Integrering af dybe sproglige funktioner i faktiske forudsigelser over Unified Datasæt', 'de': 'Integration tiefgreifender linguistischer Funktionen in die Faktenvorhersage über einheitliche Datensätze', 'id': 'Integrating Deep Linguistic Features in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'ko': '데이터 집합의 진실성 예측 중심층 언어 특징의 통합을 통일하다', 'fa': 'جمع کردن ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cگیری عمیق در پیشنهاد واقعیت بر روی داده\u200cهای متحد', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Tamko za Kilinguistic Kingi katika Udhibiti wa Ukweli juu ya seti za Data Unified', 'af': 'Integreer Deep Linguistiese Funksies in Faktiwiteitvoorskrywing oor Unified Datasets', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ինտեգրել խորը լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունները միավորված տվյալների վերաբերյալ', 'bn': 'একত্রিত তথ্য সেটের উপর ফ্যাক্চুয়ালিটিতে গভীর লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য যুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'X칲susiyy톛t t톛rzind톛 Deep Linguistic Features Integrating in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'tr': 'Dereje Dil Görnüşiklerinde Gerçeklik Program Birleşik Maglumaty', 'sq': 'Integrimi i karakteristikave gjuhësore të thella në parashikimin e faktit mbi të dhënat e unifikuara', 'bs': 'Integracija dubokih lingvističkih karakteristika u predviđanju činjenice nad ujedinjenim podacima', 'cs': 'Integrace hlubokých jazykových funkcí do predikce skutečnosti přes sjednocené datové sady', 'fi': 'Syvien kielisten ominaisuuksien integrointi faktojen ennustukseen yhdistettyjen tietokokonaisuuksien kautta', 'et': 'Sügavate keeleliste funktsioonide integreerimine faktilisuse prognoosimisse ühtsete andmekogumite kaudu', 'ca': 'Integrar les característiques lingüístiques profundes en la predicció de la realitat sobre els conjunts de dades unificats', 'jv': 'Attribute', 'he': 'שילוב תכונות שפתיים עמוקות בתחזית העובדה על קבוצות נתונים מאוחדות', 'sk': 'Vključevanje globokih jezikovnih funkcij v napovedovanje dejstva prek enotnih naborov podatkov', 'bo': 'Integrating Deep Linguistic Features in Factuality Prediction over Unified Datasets', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Previous models for the assessment of commitment towards a predicate in a sentence (also known as factuality prediction) were trained and tested against a specific annotated dataset, subsequently limiting the generality of their results. In this work we propose an intuitive method for mapping three previously annotated corpora onto a single factuality scale, thereby enabling models to be tested across these corpora. In addition, we design a novel model for factuality prediction by first extending a previous rule-based factuality prediction system and applying it over an abstraction of dependency trees, and then using the output of this system in a supervised classifier. We show that this model outperforms previous methods on all three datasets. We make both the unified factuality corpus and our new model publicly available.', 'es': 'Los modelos anteriores para la evaluación del compromiso con un predicado en una oración (también conocido como predicción de hechos) se entrenaron y se probaron contra un conjunto de datos anotado específico, lo que posteriormente limitó la generalidad de sus resultados. En este trabajo proponemos un método intuitivo para mapear tres cuerpos previamente anotados en una sola escala de hechos, lo que permite probar los modelos en todos estos cuerpos. Además, diseñamos un modelo novedoso para la predicción de hechos ampliando primero un sistema anterior de predicción de hechos basado en reglas y aplicándolo sobre una abstracción de árboles de dependencias, y luego utilizando la salida de este sistema en un clasificador supervisado. Mostramos que este modelo supera a los métodos anteriores en los tres conjuntos de datos. Ponemos a disposición del público tanto el corpus unificado de hechos como nuestro nuevo modelo.', 'pt': 'Modelos anteriores para a avaliação do comprometimento com um predicado em uma sentença (também conhecido como previsão de factualidade) foram treinados e testados contra um conjunto de dados anotado específico, limitando posteriormente a generalidade de seus resultados. Neste trabalho propomos um método intuitivo para mapear três corpora previamente anotados em uma única escala de factualidade, permitindo assim que modelos sejam testados em todos esses corpora. Além disso, projetamos um novo modelo para previsão de factualidade, primeiro estendendo um sistema de previsão de factualidade anterior baseado em regras e aplicando-o sobre uma abstração de árvores de dependência e, em seguida, usando a saída desse sistema em um classificador supervisionado. Mostramos que esse modelo supera os métodos anteriores em todos os três conjuntos de dados. Disponibilizamos publicamente o corpus de factualidade unificado e nosso novo modelo.', 'fr': "Les modèles précédents pour l'évaluation de l'engagement envers un prédicat dans une phrase (également connu sous le nom de prédiction factuelle) ont été entraînés et testés par rapport à un ensemble de données annoté spécifique, limitant par la suite la généralité de leurs résultats. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode intuitive pour mapper trois corpus précédemment annotés sur une seule échelle de factualité, permettant ainsi de tester des modèles sur ces corpus. De plus, nous concevons un nouveau modèle de prédiction de factualité en étendant d'abord un système précédent de prédiction de factualité basé sur des règles et en l'appliquant à une abstraction d'arbres de dépendance, puis en utilisant la sortie de ce système dans un classificateur supervisé. Nous montrons que ce modèle surpasse les méthodes précédentes sur les trois ensembles de données. Nous mettons à la disposition du public le corpus factuel unifié et notre nouveau modèle.", 'ar': 'تم تدريب النماذج السابقة لتقييم الالتزام تجاه المسند في الجملة (المعروف أيضًا باسم التنبؤ الواقعي) واختبارها مقابل مجموعة بيانات مشروحة محددة ، وبالتالي الحد من عمومية نتائجها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة بديهية لرسم خرائط لثلاث مجموعات تم شرحها مسبقًا على مقياس واقعي واحد ، مما يتيح اختبار النماذج عبر هذه المجموعات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نصمم نموذجًا جديدًا للتنبؤ الواقعي من خلال توسيع نظام التنبؤ الواقعي السابق المستند إلى القواعد أولاً وتطبيقه على تجريد من أشجار التبعية ، ثم استخدام ناتج هذا النظام في مصنف خاضع للإشراف. نظهر أن هذا النموذج يتفوق على الأساليب السابقة في جميع مجموعات البيانات الثلاث. نجعل كلاً من مجموعة الحقائق الموحدة ونموذجنا الجديد متاحين للجمهور.', 'zh': '前以评估句中谓词之诺者(亦谓之事实之占)盖特定注数集训练而试之,随限其普遍性。 于此等事,立一直观之法,映三前注语料库于单量表,使模形得试于此语料库。 设一于事占之新模,先扩前法之实性占系统,而施于依树之象,然后于监分类器中用其统之输。 凡三数集上皆优于前法。 我显一事语料库与我新模。', 'ja': '文の述語に対するコミットメントの評価の以前のモデル（事実性予測としても知られる）を訓練し、特定の注釈付きデータセットに対してテストし、その結果の一般性を制限した。この研究では、3つの以前に注釈されたコーパスを単一の事実性スケールにマッピングするための直感的な方法を提案し、これらのコーパス全体でモデルをテストすることを可能にします。さらに、我々は、先行するルールベースの事実予測システムを拡張し、それを依存性ツリーの抽象化に適用し、監視された分類子でこのシステムの出力を使用することによって、事実予測のための新規モデルを設計します。このモデルは、3つのデータセットすべてで以前のメソッドよりも優れていることが示されています。統一された事実コーパスと新しいモデルの両方を公開しています。', 'hi': 'एक वाक्य में एक विधेय के प्रति प्रतिबद्धता के मूल्यांकन के लिए पिछले मॉडल (जिसे तथ्यात्मकता भविष्यवाणी के रूप में भी जाना जाता है) को प्रशिक्षित किया गया था और एक विशिष्ट एनोटेट डेटासेट के खिलाफ परीक्षण किया गया था, बाद में उनके परिणामों की व्यापकता को सीमित कर दिया गया था। इस काम में हम एक ही तथ्यात्मकता पैमाने पर तीन पहले एनोटेटेड कॉर्पोरेट को मैप करने के लिए एक सहज ज्ञान युक्त विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिससे इन कॉर्पोरेट में मॉडल का परीक्षण किया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, हम पहले पिछले नियम-आधारित तथ्यात्मकता भविष्यवाणी प्रणाली का विस्तार करके और निर्भरता पेड़ों के अमूर्त पर इसे लागू करके तथ्यात्मकता भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक उपन्यास मॉडल डिजाइन करते हैं, और फिर एक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर में इस प्रणाली के आउटपुट का उपयोग करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह मॉडल सभी तीन डेटासेट पर पिछले तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। हम दोनों एकीकृत तथ्यात्मकता कॉर्पस और हमारे नए मॉडल को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं।', 'ru': 'Предыдущие модели для оценки приверженности к предикату в предложении (также известные как прогнозирование фактологичности) были обучены и протестированы в сравнении с конкретным аннотированным набором данных, что впоследствии ограничило общий характер их результатов. В этой работе мы предлагаем интуитивно понятный метод для отображения трех ранее аннотированных тел на одной шкале фактичности, тем самым позволяя тестировать модели между этими телами. Кроме того, мы разрабатываем новую модель для предсказания фактичности, сначала расширяя предыдущую систему предсказания фактичности, основанную на правилах, и применяя ее к абстракции деревьев зависимостей, а затем используя вывод этой системы в контролируемом классификаторе. Показано, что данная модель превосходит предыдущие методы по всем трем наборам данных. Мы делаем общедоступными как единый корпус фактов, так и нашу новую модель.', 'ga': 'Cuireadh oiliúint ar mhúnlaí roimhe seo chun tiomantas a mheas i leith réamhaithrise i bpianbhreith (ar a dtugtar réamhaisnéis na fírinne freisin) agus tástáladh iad i gcoinne tacar sonraí anótáilte ar leith, rud a chuir srian le ginearáltacht a dtorthaí ina dhiaidh sin. San obair seo molaimid modh iomasach chun trí chorpora a bhfuil anót orthu roimhe seo a mhapáil ar scála fíorasacht amháin, rud a fhágann gur féidir samhlacha a thástáil ar fud na gcorparáidí sin. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid múnla nua a dhearadh do thuar fíorais trí chóras réamh-mheasta fírinneachta bunaithe ar riail a shíneadh ar dtús agus é a chur i bhfeidhm thar astarraingt de chrainn spleáchais, agus ansin úsáid a bhaint as aschur an chórais seo in aicmitheoir maoirsithe. Léirímid go sáraíonn an tsamhail seo modhanna roimhe seo ar na trí thacair sonraí go léir. Cuirimid an corpas fíorais aontaithe agus ár múnla nua ar fáil go poiblí.', 'hu': 'Egy mondatban szereplő predikátum iránti elkötelezettség értékelésére szolgáló korábbi modelleket (más néven tényszerűség-előrejelzés) egy konkrét jegyzetelt adatkészlet alapján képezték és tesztelték, ezáltal korlátozták eredményeik általánosságát. Ebben a munkában egy intuitív módszert javasolunk arra, hogy három korábban megjegyzett korpuszt egyetlen ténységi skálára feltérképezzünk, lehetővé téve a modellek tesztelését ezekben a korpuszokban. Ezenkívül új modellt tervezünk a tényszerűség-előrejelzésre, először egy korábbi szabályokon alapuló tényszerűség-előrejelzési rendszer kiterjesztésével és alkalmazásával a függőségi fák absztrakciójára, majd ennek a rendszernek a kimenetét felügyelt osztályozóban használjuk fel. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a modell mindhárom adatkészleten felülmúlja a korábbi módszereket. Mind az egységes tényszerűségi korpuszt, mind az új modellünket nyilvánosan elérhetővé tesszük.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενα μοντέλα για την αξιολόγηση της δέσμευσης προς ένα προδιάγραφο σε μια πρόταση (γνωστή και ως πρόβλεψη πραγματικότητας) εκπαιδεύτηκαν και εξετάστηκαν με βάση ένα συγκεκριμένο σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων, περιορίζοντας στη συνέχεια τη γενικότητα των αποτελεσμάτων τους. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια διαισθητική μέθοδο χαρτογράφησης τριών προηγουμένως σχολιασμένων σωμάτων σε μια ενιαία κλίμακα πραγματικότητας, επιτρέποντας έτσι τα μοντέλα να δοκιμαστούν σε αυτά τα σώματα. Επιπλέον, σχεδιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο πρόβλεψης πραγματικότητας επεκτείνοντας πρώτα ένα προηγούμενο σύστημα πρόβλεψης πραγματικότητας βασισμένο σε κανόνες και εφαρμόζοντάς το πάνω από μια αφαίρεση δέντρων εξάρτησης, και στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιώντας την παραγωγή αυτού του συστήματος σε έναν εποπτευόμενο ταξινομητή. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό το μοντέλο ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους και στα τρία σύνολα δεδομένων. Κάνουμε τόσο το ενοποιημένο σώμα πραγματικότητας όσο και το νέο μας μοντέλο δημοσίως διαθέσιμο.', 'ka': 'წინა მოდელები, რომლებიც წარმოდგენების შესახებ წარმოდგენების შესახებ წარმოდგენების შესახებ წარმოდგენების შესახებ (რომლებიც იცით ფაქტურალური წარმოდგენებით) მოსწავლია და შემდეგ შემდეგ შე ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ინტევიტიური მეტი, რომელიც სამდენიმე წინასწორებული კოპორაზე ერთი ფექტურალური მაგალითში დავწყებთ, რომელიც მოდელები ამ კოპორაში გავრცენა. დამატებით, ჩვენ პრომენტის მოდელს ფაქტულობის წინასწარმოდგენისთვის გავაკეთებთ წინასწარმოდგენისთვის ფექტულობის წინასწარმოდგენისთვის და დავყენებთ ის აბსტრაქციაზე დასამუშავებული ხელების, და შემდეგ ამ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მოდელი წინასწარმოდგენა ყველა სამი მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ ერთადერთებული ფექტალურობის კორპუსი და ჩვენი ახალი მოდელი საშუალოდ დავიყენებთ.', 'it': "I modelli precedenti per la valutazione dell'impegno nei confronti di un predicato in una frase (noto anche come predizione della factualità) sono stati addestrati e testati sulla base di uno specifico dataset annotato, limitando successivamente la generalità dei loro risultati. In questo lavoro proponiamo un metodo intuitivo per mappare tre corpora precedentemente annotati su un'unica scala di fattualità, consentendo così di testare i modelli attraverso questi corpora. Inoltre, progettiamo un nuovo modello per la previsione della fattualità estendendo prima un precedente sistema di previsione della fattualità basato su regole e applicandolo su un'astrazione di alberi di dipendenza, e poi utilizzando l'output di questo sistema in un classificatore supervisionato. Mostriamo che questo modello supera i metodi precedenti su tutti e tre i set di dati. Rendiamo pubblici sia il corpus unificato di fatti che il nostro nuovo modello.", 'lt': 'Ankstesni įsipareigojimo įvertinti įsipareigojimą, susijusį su sunkumu sakinyje (taip pat žinomas kaip faktų prognozė), modeliai buvo parengti ir išbandyti remiantis konkrečiu anotuotu duomenų rinkiniu, vėliau apribojant jų rezultatų bendrumą. Šiame darbe siūlome intuityvų metodą trijų anksčiau anotuotų korprų žemėlapiui nustatyti į vieną faktų skalę, taip sudarant galimybę bandyti modelius visoje šioje korprų. Be to, mes sukuriame naują faktinių prognozių model į, pirmiausia išplėsdami ankstesnę taisyklėmis pagrįstą faktinių prognozių sistemą ir ją taikant ant priklausomybės medžių abstrakcijos, o vėliau naudojant šios sistemos išėjimą prižiūrime klasifikatoriuje. Mes rodome, kad šis modelis atitinka ankstesnius visų trijų duomenų rinkinių metodus. Mes viešai paskelbiame vieningą faktų korpusą ir mūsų naują model į.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d (സത്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവചനം എന്ന പോലും അറിയാവുന്ന സത്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിജ്ഞാനത്തിലേക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഉടമ്പടിയുടെ മുമ്പുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d മുമ്പ് മൂന്ന് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട കൂടാതെ, സത്യസന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നാം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം മുമ്പ് ഒരു നിയമവിധിയിലുള്ള യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് വികസി മൂന്ന് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മുമ്പ് മാറ്റിയ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരും ഒരുമിച്ച സത്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസും പുതിയ മോഡലും പ്രസിദ്ധമാക്കുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы үлгілер сұрақтағы (мәліметтік таңдау деп белгіленген) деген сөйлемеге қатынау үлгілерін оқыту және тексеру үлгілері өзінің нәтижесінің жалпы мәліметті шектеп жатыр. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бұрынғы үш корпораға бір шындық масштабына тескерту үшін интуитивті әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл корпораға моделдерді тексеру мүмкіндігін рұқсат етеді. Қосымша, біз бұрынғы ережелер негіздеген фактикалық таңдау жүйесін жасап, оны тәуелдік ағаштардың абстрактрациясы арқылы қолданатын, жүйенің шығысын басқару классификаторында қолданатын романдық моделі құрамыз. Бұл үлгі барлық үш деректер жиынында алдыңғы әдістерді жасайды. Біз біріктірілген шындық корпус мен жаңа моделімізді жалпы жұмыс істейміз.', 'ms': 'Model terdahulu untuk penilaian komitmen terhadap predikat dalam satu kalimat (juga dikenali sebagai ramalan faktualiti) dilatih dan diuji melawan set data yang dicatat khusus, kemudian membatasi keseluruhan keputusan mereka. Dalam kerja ini kami cadangkan kaedah intuitif untuk memetakan tiga corpora yang pernah dicatat sebelumnya ke skala faktualiti tunggal, dengan itu membolehkan model untuk diuji di seluruh corpora ini. Selain itu, kami merancang model baru untuk ramalan faktualiti dengan memperluas sistem ramalan faktualiti berdasarkan peraturan terdahulu dan melaksanakannya melalui abstraksi pokok dependensi, dan kemudian menggunakan output sistem ini dalam pengendali yang diawasi. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model ini melampaui kaedah terdahulu pada semua tiga set data. We make both the unified factuality corpus and our new model publicly available.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх загвар нь өгүүлбэр дээр (мөн жинхэнэ тодорхойлолт гэж нэрлэгддэг) хэлбэрээр ажиллаж, тодорхойлогдсон өгөгдлийн сангийн эсрэг шалгалт хийгдсэн, дараа нь үр дүнгийн ерөнхийлөгчийг хязгаарлаж байлаа. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид өмнө нь гурван жинхэнэ жинхэнэ хэмжээнд холбогдсон корпора зураг зураг зураг зааж өгдөг. Энэ нь эдгээр корпора дахь загваруудыг шалгах боломжтой. Мөн бид өмнөх дүрэм дээр үнэндээ таамаглах шинэ загвар бүтээж, хамааралтай мод дээр ашиглаж, дараа нь энэ системийн үр дүнг удирдлагатай классификатор ашиглаж байна. Бид энэ загвар 3 өгөгдлийн сангийн өмнөх аргыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид хоёулаа нэгтгэл үнэний корпус болон шинэ загварыг нийтэд ашиглаж чадна.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli preċedenti għall-valutazzjoni tal-impenn lejn predikat f’sentenza (magħrufa wkoll bħala tbassir tal-fattwalità) ġew imħarrġa u ttestjati kontra sett ta’ dejta annotata speċifiku, li sussegwentement tillimita l-ġeneralità tar-riżultati tagħhom. F’dan ix-xogħol nipproponu metodu intwittiv għall-immappjar ta’ tliet korpuri annotati qabel fuq skala waħda ta’ fattwalità, u b’hekk nippermettu li l-mudelli jiġu ttestjati madwar dawn il-korpuri. Barra minn hekk, a ħna niddisinjaw mudell ġdid għat-tbassir tal-fattwalità billi l-ewwel jestendu sistema preċedenti ta’ tbassir tal-fattwalità bbażata fuq ir-regoli u napplikawha fuq astrazzjoni ta’ siġar ta’ dipendenza, u mbagħad nużaw l-output ta’ din is-sistema f’klassifikatur superviż. Aħna nuru li dan il-mudell jirriżulta minn metodi preċedenti fuq it-tliet settijiet ta’ dejta kollha. Aħna nagħmlu kemm il-korpus tal-fattwalità unifikat kif ukoll il-mudell il-ġdid tagħna disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie modele oceny zaangażowania wobec predykatu w zdaniu (zwane również predykcją faktyczności) zostały przeszkolone i testowane na podstawie konkretnego adnotacji zbioru danych, ograniczając następnie ogólność ich wyników. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy intuicyjną metodę mapowania trzech wcześniej adnotacji korpusów na jedną skalę faktyczności, umożliwiając tym samym testowanie modeli w tych korpusach. Ponadto projektujemy nowatorski model predykcji faktyczności poprzez rozszerzenie poprzedniego systemu predykcji faktyczności opartego na regułach i zastosowanie go na abstrakcji drzew zależności, a następnie wykorzystanie wyjścia tego systemu w nadzorowanym klasyfikatorze. Pokazujemy, że model ten przewyższa poprzednie metody na wszystkich trzech zbiorach danych. Udostępniamy publicznie zarówno ujednolicony korpus faktyczności, jak i nasz nowy model.', 'ro': 'Modelele anterioare de evaluare a angajamentului față de un predicat dintr-o propoziție (cunoscut și sub numele de predicție a faptualității) au fost instruite și testate pe baza unui set de date adnotate specific, limitând ulterior generalitatea rezultatelor lor. În această lucrare propunem o metodă intuitivă pentru maparea a trei corpore adnotate anterior pe o singură scară a faptualității, permițând astfel modelele să fie testate pe aceste corpore. În plus, proiectăm un model nou pentru predicția factualității prin extinderea mai întâi a unui sistem anterior de predicție a factualității bazat pe reguli și aplicarea acestuia peste o abstracție a copacilor dependenței, apoi folosirea rezultatelor acestui sistem într-un clasificator supravegheat. Arătăm că acest model depășește metodele anterioare pe toate cele trei seturi de date. Punem la dispoziția publicului atât corpul unificat al faptualității, cât și noul nostru model.', 'mk': 'Претходните модели за проценка на посветеноста кон предикатот во реченицата (позната и како предвидување на факталноста) беа обучени и тестирани против специфичен национален податок, кој потоа ја ограничува генералноста на нивните резултати. Во оваа работа предлагаме интуитивен метод за мапирање на три претходно анотирани тела на една скала на факталност, овозможувајќи модели да бидат тестирани низ овие тела. Покрај тоа, дизајнираме нов модел за предвидување на факталноста со прво проширување на претходниот систем за предвидување на факталноста базиран на правилата и аплицирање на истиот врз апстракција на дрвјата на зависност, а потоа користење на излезот од овој систем во надгледуван класификатор Покажуваме дека овој модел ги надминува претходните методи на сите три податоци. We make both the unified factuality corpus and our new model publicly available.', 'sr': 'Prethodni modeli za procjenu obaveze prema predikatu rečenice (takođe poznato kao predviđanje činjenice) bili su obučeni i testirani protiv određenog označenog seta podataka, a zatim ograničavajući generalnost njihovih rezultata. U ovom poslu predlažemo intuitivnu metodu za mapiranje tri prethodno annotirane tela na jednu skalu činjenice, tako da omogućavamo da modeli budu testirani preko ove tela. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo novi model za predviđanje činjenice prvo proširenjem prethodnog sistema predviđanja činjenice na pravilu i primjenjivanjem ga na apstrakciji drveća zavisnosti, a onda koristimo izlaz ovog sistema u nadzornom klasifikatoru. Pokazujemo da ovaj model iznosi prethodne metode na svim tri seta podataka. Ujedinjeni korpus činjenice i naš novi model javno dostupni.', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinkii hore ee qiimeynta heshiiska lagu soo bandhigay erayo lagu qoray (sidoo kale la yidhaahdo wax xaqiiq ah) waa la baray oo la tijaabiyey koox ka gaar ah oo la caddeeyey, markaasna waxaa lagu xadgudbay dhamaanka resultigooda. Shaqadan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab dhakhtar ah oo ku sawiraya saddex shirkad oo horay ay loo dhibay, si ay u sameyn karto samooyinkaas oo dhan. Taas waxaa dheer, waxaynu qoraynaa model warqad ah oo warqadda xaqiiqnimada ah marka ugu horeysa ku sii fidinnaa nidaamka warqadda hore ee sharciga ku qoran, waxaana ku codsanaynaa inay ka soocdo geedaha ku xiran, kadibna waxaynu isticmaalnaa midhihiisa nidaamkan si aad u ilaaliso fasalka. Waxan tusaynaa in modelkanu uu sameeyo qaabab hore oo ku jira saddexda databases oo dhan. Dhammaan waxaan u sameynaa qof runta ah iyo modelkeenna cusub si bayaan ah.', 'si': 'මුලින් මොඩේල්ස් සඳහා සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා  මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුලින්ම ඒ වගේම, අපි පළවෙනි නීති අධ්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා සහ ඒක ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය වර්ගයක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ මේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරවෘත් අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් තුනක් තුනක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා කියලා. අපි දෙන්නම එක්ක ඇත්ත කොර්පස් එක්ක සහ අපේ අලුත් මොඩේල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Tidigare modeller för bedömning av engagemang för ett predikat i en mening (även känd som faktauppvisning) tränades och testades mot en specifik kommenterad datauppsättning, vilket därefter begränsade deras generella resultat. I detta arbete föreslår vi en intuitiv metod för att kartlägga tre tidigare kommenterade korpora i en enda faktasskala, vilket gör det möjligt att testa modeller över dessa korpora. Dessutom utformar vi en ny modell för faktaundervisning genom att först utöka ett tidigare regelbaserat faktaundervisningssystem och tillämpa det över en abstraktion av beroendeträd, och sedan använda resultatet av detta system i en övervakad klassificerare. Vi visar att denna modell överträffar tidigare metoder på alla tre datauppsättningar. Vi gör både den enhetliga faktakroppen och vår nya modell offentligt tillgängliga.', 'no': 'Førre modeller for vurdering av forandringa mot ein predikat i eit setning (også kjent som førehandsvising av faktualitet) vart trengte og testert mot eit spesifikke notat datasett, og derfor avgrensa generelitet av resultatet sine. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein intuitiv metode for å kartera tre førre markerte korpora på ein enkel faktualitetsskala, slik at modeller kan testast over desse korporane. I tillegg designerer vi eit nytt modell for å foregå faktualitet ved å først utvida eit førre regelbasert førehandsvising av faktualitet og bruka det over ein abstraksjon av avhengighetstrår, og deretter bruka utdata av denne systemet i ein oversikt klassifiserer. Vi viser at denne modellen utfører førre metodar på alle tre datasett. Vi gjer både den einige faktualitetskorpusen og vår nye modellen offentlig tilgjengeleg.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய மாதிரிகள் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியத்தை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான முன்னால் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது (உண்மையான ம இந்த வேலையில் நாம் முன்னால் ஏற்படுத்தப்பட்ட மூன்று நிறுவனத்தை வரைப்படத்திற்கு ஒரு உண்மையான அளவில் வரைப்படத்திற்கு ஒரு சுலபமான முறையை  மேலும், நாம் முதலில் முந்தைய விதிமுறையில் முறையான முறைமையை விரிவாக்கி சார்ந்த மரங்களின் சார்ந்த மரங்களை வெளியீடு மேல் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், பின்னர் கண இந்த மாதிரி அனைத்து மூன்று தரவுத்தளங்களிலும் முந்தைய முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை நா நாம் இரண்டு ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட உண்மையான குறியீடு மற்றும் எங்கள் புதிய மாதிரி பொதுவாக கிடைக்கு', 'ur': 'ایک فیصلہ میں (بھی معلوم ہو چکا ہے کہ حقیقت کی پیش بینی) کے لئے پہلے کی نمونڈل کی تعلیم کے لئے آزمائش کی گئی تھی، پھر ان کے نتیجے کی عمومی تعلیم کے لئے آزمائش کی گئی تھی۔ اس کام میں ہم نے تین سے پہلے جسم کی جسم کا مکاپیٹ کرنے کے لئے ایک حقیقت مقدار پر ایک نظریہ طریقہ پیش کیا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے مدلکوں کو ان کی جسم میں آزمائش کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ ہم نے ایک نو موڈل ڈیزائن کر رکھا ہے کہ حقیقت کی پیش بینی کے لئے پہلی بار ایک قانون کی بنیاد رکھی ہوئی حقیقت کی پیش بینی سیسٹم کو پھیلاتے ہیں اور اس کو ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن کرتا ہے اور اس کے بعد اس سیسٹم کا نتیجہ استعمال کرتا ہے ایک نظارت ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈل تین ڈیٹسٹ پر پہلے طریقے سے کام لیتا ہے۔ ہم دونوں کو ایک حقیقت کی کورپوس اور ہماری نئی مدل ظاہر طور پر موجود بناتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Oldingi modellar birinchi so'zlarda qo'llanilgan gaplarni qiymatga o'rganish uchun o'rganish va uning notoʻgʻri maʼlumotlar tizimi bilan ishlatilgan va keyin natijalarining generaligini chegara qiladi. Bu ishda biz avval uchta qo'shilgan qo'shilgan uchta qo'shiqni bir haqiqat darajaga chiqarish uchun eng intuitiv usulni anglatamiz, shunday qilib bu kompaniya ichidagi modellarni sinash mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz birinchi boshqa qoidagi haqiqiqatlarni oldingi qoidadan oldin tasavvur qilish tizimini ajratish va buni ishlatuvchi daraxtlarni tasavvur qilish va keyin bu tizimning natijasini boshqaruvchi darajada foydalanish mumkin. Biz bu model hamma uchta maʼlumotlar sohasida oldingi usullarni bajaradi. Biz ikkita birlashtirilgan haqiqat qo'shlarini va yangi modelmizni ko'proq mavjud qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Những mô hình trước để đánh giá cam kết đối với một giai đoạn khó khăn (còn được gọi là dự đoán về tính dữ liệu) đã được đào tạo và thử nghiệm dựa trên một bộ dữ liệu được ghi chú cụ thể, sau đó hạn chế độ chung của kết quả. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp thuận lợi để vẽ bản đồ ba chữ "hạ sĩ" trước đây lên một quy mô về tính sản, bằng cách đó cho phép thử các mẫu trên các hạ sĩ này. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thiết kế một mô hình mới cho dự đoán về mặt sinh tố bằng cách mở rộng hệ thống dự đoán tính số dựa trên quy định trước và áp dụng nó với việc trừu tượng các cây độ phụ thuộc, rồi sử dụng sản xuất của hệ thống này trong một phân loại giám sát. Chúng tôi cho thấy mẫu này vượt trội các phương pháp trước trên cả ba bộ dữ liệu. Chúng tôi công khai công khai về nhân tố tổng hợp và mô hình mới của chúng tôi.', 'bg': 'Предишни модели за оценка на ангажимента към предикат в изречение (известни още като прогнозиране на фактическостта) са обучени и тествани срещу конкретен анотиран набор от данни, което впоследствие ограничава общото разпространение на техните резултати. В тази работа предлагаме интуитивен метод за картографиране на три предварително анотирани корпуси в една скала на фактическост, като по този начин позволява моделите да бъдат тествани в тези корпуси. В допълнение, ние проектираме нов модел за прогнозиране на фактологичността, като първо разширим предишна система за прогнозиране на фактологичността, базирана на правила, и я прилагаме върху абстракция на дървета на зависимост, а след това използваме изхода на тази система в контролиран класификатор. Показваме, че този модел превъзхожда предишните методи на трите набора от данни. Ние правим както единния корпус на фактологичността, така и нашия нов модел публично достъпни.', 'hr': 'Prethodni modeli za procjenu posvećenosti predikata u rečenici (također poznati kao predviđanje činjenice) bili su obučeni i testirani protiv određenog označenog seta podataka, nakon toga ograničavajući generalnost njihovih rezultata. U ovom poslu predlažemo intuitivnu metodu za mapiranje tri ranije annotirane tijela na jednu mjeru činjenice, tako omogućavajući modele da se testiraju širom tih tijela. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo novi model za predviđanje činjenice prvo proširenjem prethodnog sustava predviđanja činjenice na temelju pravila i primjenjivanjem ga na apstrakciji drveća zavisnosti, a onda koristimo izlaz ovog sustava u nadzornom klasifikatoru. Pokazujemo da ovaj model iznosi prethodne metode na svim tri seta podataka. Ujedinjeni korpus činjenice i naš novi model javno dostupni.', 'da': 'Tidligere modeller til vurdering af engagement i forhold til et prædikat i en sætning (også kendt som faktualitetsforudsigelse) blev uddannet og testet i forhold til et specifikt kommenteret datasæt, hvilket efterfølgende begrænsede den generelle karakter af deres resultater. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en intuitiv metode til kortlægning af tre tidligere annoterede korpora på en enkelt faktualitetsskala, hvorved modeller kan testes på tværs af disse korpora. Derudover designer vi en ny model for faktualitetsforudsigelse ved først at udvide et tidligere regelbaseret faktualitetsforudsigelsessystem og anvende det over en abstraktion af afhængighedstræer, og derefter bruge output fra dette system i en overvåget klassificering. Vi viser, at denne model overgår tidligere metoder på alle tre datasæt. Vi gør både det samlede faktiskorpus og vores nye model offentligt tilgængelige.', 'nl': "Eerdere modellen voor de beoordeling van commitment ten opzichte van een predicaat in een zin (ook bekend als feitelijkheidsvoorspelling) werden getraind en getest aan een specifieke geannoteerde dataset, waardoor de algemeenheid van hun resultaten werd beperkt. In dit werk stellen we een intuïtieve methode voor om drie eerder geannoteerde corpora's in kaart te brengen op één feitelijke schaal, waardoor modellen in deze corpora kunnen worden getest. Daarnaast ontwerpen we een nieuw model voor feitelijkheidsvoorspelling door eerst een eerder regelgebaseerd feitelijkheidsvoorspellingssysteem uit te breiden en toe te passen op een abstractie van afhankelijkheidsbomen, en vervolgens de output van dit systeem te gebruiken in een begeleide classificator. We laten zien dat dit model de vorige methoden overtreft op alle drie de datasets. We maken zowel het uniforme feitelijke corpus als ons nieuwe model openbaar.", 'id': 'Previous models for the assessment of commitment towards a predicate in a sentence (also known as factuality prediction) were trained and tested against a specific annotated dataset, subsequently limiting the generality of their results.  Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan metode intuitif untuk memetakan tiga korpora yang sebelumnya dicatat ke skala faktualitas tunggal, sehingga memungkinkan model untuk diuji di seluruh korpora ini. Selain itu, kami merancang model baru untuk prediksi faktualitas dengan pertama memperluas sistem prediksi faktualitas berdasarkan peraturan sebelumnya dan menerapkannya atas abstraksi pohon dependensi, dan kemudian menggunakan output dari sistem ini dalam klasifikasi yang diawasi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini melebihi metode sebelumnya pada semua tiga set data. Kita membuat tubuh faktualitas bersatu dan model baru kita tersedia publik.', 'ko': '이전에 문장에서 술어의 약속을 평가하는 모델(사실성 예측이라고도 부른다)은 특정한 주석 데이터 집합을 대상으로 훈련하고 테스트한 것이기 때문에 그 결과의 통용성을 제한했다.이 작업에서 우리는 세 개의 이전에 주석한 자료 라이브러리를 하나의 단일한 사실량표에 비추어 모델이 이런 자료 라이브러리에서 테스트를 할 수 있도록 직관적인 방법을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 진실성 예측 모델을 설계했다. 먼저 이전에 규칙을 바탕으로 한 진실성 예측 시스템을 확장하고 이를 트리에 의존하는 추상에 응용한 다음에 이 시스템의 출력을 감독 분류기에 사용했다.우리는 이 모델이 모든 세 개의 데이터 집합에서 이전의 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 준다.우리는 사실 자료 라이브러리와 우리의 새로운 모델을 통일하여 공개할 것이다.', 'de': 'Bisherige Modelle zur Beurteilung der Bindung an ein Prädikat in einem Satz (auch Faktenprädiktion genannt) wurden trainiert und anhand eines spezifischen annotierten Datensatzes getestet, wodurch die Allgemeingültigkeit ihrer Ergebnisse eingeschränkt wurde. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine intuitive Methode vor, um drei zuvor annotierte Korpora auf eine einzige Fakultätsskala abzubilden, wodurch Modelle über diese Korpora hinweg getestet werden können. Darüber hinaus entwerfen wir ein neuartiges Modell zur Fakultätsvorhersage, indem wir zunächst ein vorheriges regelbasiertes Fakultätsvorhersagesystem erweitern und es über eine Abstraktion von Abhängigkeitsbäumen anwenden und dann die Ausgabe dieses Systems in einem überwachten Klassifikator verwenden. Wir zeigen, dass dieses Modell die bisherigen Methoden auf allen drei Datensätzen übertrifft. Wir machen sowohl das einheitliche Faktenkorpus als auch unser neues Modell öffentlich zugänglich.', 'sw': 'Mifano ya zamani kwa ajili ya kutathmini ahadi dhidi ya utabiri katika hukumu (pia inajulikana kama utabiri wa ukweli) yalifundishwa na kuchunguzwa dhidi ya seti maalum za taarifa zilizotajwa, baadae ikizuia umuhimu wa matokeo yao. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza njia yenye ufanisi wa ramani ya ramani ya kampuni tatu zilizotangazwa na kuchochea kwenye kiwango cha ukweli pekee, na kwa hiyo tunawezesha mifano ya kuchunguzwa kupitia makampuni haya. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaunda mtindo wa riwaya wa kutabiri ukweli kwa mara ya kwanza kwa kuongeza mfumo wa utabiri wa ukweli wa zamani wa utawala na kuitumia juu ya kuondolewa kwa miti ya kutegemea, na kisha kwa kutumia matokeo ya mfumo huu katika darasa linalothibitiwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba mtindo huu unafanya mbinu zilizopita katika seti zote tatu za data. Tunafanya viwili viungo vya ukweli pamoja na mtindo wetu mpya unapatikana hadharani.', 'fa': 'مدلهای قبلی برای ارزیابی تعهد به یک مجموعه (همچنین به عنوان پیش\u200cبینی حقیقت) بر خلاف مجموعه داده\u200cهای مشخص شده آموزش داده شده و آزمایش کردند، سپس به تعداد عمومی نتیجه\u200cهایشان محدود می\u200cشود. در این کار ما یک روش بصیرت برای نقشه\u200cسازی سه شرکت که قبلاً به یک مقیاس حقیقت مشخص شده است پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با این وجود توانایی مدل\u200cها در این شرکت آزمایش شود. در addition, we design a new model for factuality prediction by extending a rule-based factuality prediction system and applying it over an abstraction of dependency trees, and then using the output of this system in a supervised classifier. ما نشان می دهیم که این مدل روش قبلی را در تمام سه مجموعه داده انجام می دهد. ما هردومون کورپوس واقعيت متحده و مدل جديدمون رو به طور عمومي در دسترسي ميديم', 'tr': 'Öňki nusgalar bir sözleýäniň önüm nusgasyna görkezmek üçin önüm nusgalar (hakykatdanam çaklama diýip bilinýär) şeklinde bilinmediler we nusgalarynyň jeneralyny barlap bardylar. Biz bu işde öňki korpora ýagdaýynda görkezilen üçin bir nusga çykmak üçin bir nusga teklip edip, bu sebäpli bu korpora görä nusgalary barlamaga mümkin edýäris. Munuň üstine, biz aslynyň önümlerine görä bir nusga nusga düzenledik we muny öňki düzgünlerde ynamlylyk agaçlaryň çykyşynyň üstünde üýtgedip, soňra bu sistemanyň netijesini kontrol edilen klasifikada ulanýarys. Biz bu nusga üç sany datasetlerde öňki yönden çykarýandygyny görkez. Biz hem birleşik çyndanam korpusymyzy hem täze nusgymyzy publika mejbur edip bileris.', 'sq': 'Modelet e mëparshme për vlerësimin e angazhimit ndaj një predikate në një dënim (të njohur gjithashtu si parashikimi faktik) u trajnuan dhe u testuan kundër një sëre të dhënash specifike të shënuara, duke kufizuar më pas gjeneralitetin e rezultateve të tyre. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një metodë intuitive për hartimin e tre korprave të anotuara më parë në një shkallë të vetme faktike, duke lejuar kështu modelet të testohen në të gjithë këto korpra. Përveç kësaj, ne dizajnojmë një model të ri për parashikimin e faktit duke zgjeruar së pari një sistem të paraparashikimit të faktit bazuar në rregulla të mëparshëm dhe duke e aplikuar mbi një abstraktë të pemëve të varësisë, dhe pastaj duke përdorur daljen e këtij sistemi në një klasifikues të mbikqyrur. Ne tregojmë se ky model ekzekuton metodat e mëparshme në të tre grupet e të dhënave. Kemi bërë publikisht në dispozicion korpusin e bashkuar të faktit dhe modelin tonë të ri.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የውይይት ግንኙነት (እውነት እውቀት እንደሚታወቅ) የተማሩ እና የተፈተኑ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች ላይ ተፈትነዋል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ሦስት የኮርፖራ ክፍል በተለየ አንዲት እውነተኛ ክፍል ላይ መዘርጋት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቀድሞው የሕግ ቅድሚያ ውይይት ስርዓት መፍጠርን በመስጠት እና በተደገመ ዛፎችን ለመለይ እና ከዚያም በኋላ የዚህን ስርዓት ውጤት በተጠበቀው ክፍል በመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ ምሳሌ በሦስት ዳታተሮች ሁሉ የቀድሞውን ሥርዓት እንዲያሳየው እናሳየዋለን፡፡ እና አዲስ ሞዴል በሙሉ የተገኘ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անցյալ մոդելները, որոնք օգտագործում են նախադասության (նաև հայտնի են որպես փաստականության կանխատեսումներ) վերաբերյալ պայմանավորված պայմանագրված տվյալների համեմատ, հետագայում սահմանափակում էին նրանց արդյունքների ընդհանրությունը: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ինտուիտիվ մեթոդ երեք նախկինում նշումնավորված մարմնի քարտեզագրման համար մեկ փաստականության սանդղակի վրա, ինչը թույլ է տալիս փորձարկել այս մարմնի մոդելները: Ավելին, մենք նախագծում ենք փաստականության կանխատեսման նոր մոդել՝ առաջին անգամ ընդլայնելով նախկին կանոններով հիմնված փաստականության կանխատեսման համակարգը և կիրառելով այն կախվածության ծառերի վերացմանը, հետո օգտագործելով այս համակարգի արդյունքը վերահսկված դասակարգում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոդելը գերազանցում է նախորդ մեթոդները բոլոր երեք տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Մենք հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր նոր մոդելը և միավոր փաստացիական մարմինը:', 'az': 'Əvvəlki modellər bir cümlədə (həmçin in həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həm Bu işdə, əvvəlcə üç kişini təkcə bir həqiqət ölçüsü ilə müəyyən etmək üçün intuitiv bir yol təklif edirik, bununla modelləri bu korpora boyunca imtahana çəkməyə qadir edirik. Daha sonra, əvvəlki qayda üzrə layiqlik tədbir sistemini genişləyib, bağımlılıq a ğacların abstraksyonu üzərində uyğunlayıb bu sistemin çıxışını nəzarətləndirilmiş klassifikdə istifadə edirik. Biz bu modellərin əvvəlki metodların üç verilən qutularda istifadə edilməsini göstəririk. Biz hər ikimizi birləşdirilmiş həyat korpusu və yeni modelimizi açıq-aşkar mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী মডেল একটি বাক্যের প্রতি নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিশ্রুতির মূল্যের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণ ও পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছিল একটি নির্দিষ্ট বিশেষ তথ্যের বিরুদ্ধে পরীক এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি তিনটি পূর্বে কোর্পোরাকে একটি বাস্তবতা পরিমাপে মানচিত্রের জন্য, যার ফলে এই কোর্পোরা জুড়ে তিনটি মডেল পরীক্ষ এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রথমে একটি পূর্ববর্তী নিয়ম ভিত্তিক ভবিষ্যৎবাণী সিস্টেম বৃদ্ধি প্রসারিত করে নির্ভরশীল গাছের বিরুদ্ধে প্রয়োগ করি, তারপর এই সিস্টেমের আউটপুট ব্ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মডেল পূর্ববর্তী তিনটি ডাটাসেটে প্রকাশ করে। আমরা একত্রিত বাস্তবতা কোর্পাস এবং আমাদের নতুন মডেল প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছি।', 'af': "Vorige modele vir die evaluering van aanvaardigheid tot 'n predikaat in 'n seting (ook bekend as faktualiteit voorskou) is onderwerp en toegestel teen 'n spesifieke aanmerkte datastel, volgens die genereliteit van hulle resultate beperk. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n intuitiewe metode vir die kaart van drie voorheen annotateerde korpora op 'n enkele faktualiteit skaal, deur dit te aktiveer om modele deur hierdie korpora te testeer. In addition, we design a novel model for factuality prediction by first extending a previous rule-based factuality prediction system and applying it over an abstraction of dependency trees, and then using the output of this system in a supervised classifier. Ons wys dat hierdie model voorheen metodes op alle drie datastel uitvoer. Ons maak beide die eenmaakte faktualiteit korpus en ons nuwe model openlik beskikbaar.", 'ca': "Els models anteriors d'evaluació de l'compromís amb un predicat en una frase (també conegut com predicció de factualitat) van ser entrenats i testats en comparació amb un conjunt de dades anotats específics, limitant posteriorment la generalitat dels seus resultats. In this work we propose an intuitive method for mapping three previously annotated corpora onto a single factuality scale, thereby enabling models to be tested across these corpora.  A més, dissenyem un nou model de predicció de factualitat extengint primer un sistema de predicció de factualitat basat en les regles anteriors i l'aplicant sobre una abstracció d'arbres de dependencia, i després utilitzant la producció d'aquest sistema en un classificador supervisat. Mostrem que aquest model supera els mètodes anteriors en tots els tres conjunts de dades. Fem públic el cos unificat de factualitat i el nostre nou model.", 'et': 'Varasemaid mudeleid lauses sisalduva predikaadi suhtes kohustuse hindamiseks (tuntud ka kui faktilisuse prognoosimine) koolitati ja testiti konkreetse märgitud andmekogumi vastu, piirates seejärel nende tulemuste üldist ulatust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja intuitiivse meetodi kolme eelnevalt anoteeritud korpuse kaardistamiseks ühele faktilisusskaalale, võimaldades seeläbi mudeleid testida nendes korpustes. Lisaks töötame välja uue faktilisuse prognoosimise mudeli, laiendades esmalt varasemat reeglipõhist faktilisuse prognoosimise süsteemi ja rakendades seda sõltuvuspuude abstraktsioonile ning kasutades seejärel selle süsteemi väljundit järelevalve all olevas klassifitseerijas. Näitame, et see mudel ületab varasemaid meetodeid kõigil kolmel andmekogumil. Teeme nii ühtse faktilisuse korpuse kui ka uue mudeli avalikkusele kättesaadavaks.', 'cs': 'Předchozí modely pro hodnocení závazku vůči predikátu ve větě (také známé jako predikce faktu) byly trénovány a testovány na základě specifické anotované sady dat, což následně omezilo obecnost jejich výsledků. V této práci navrhujeme intuitivní metodu mapování tří dříve anotovaných korpusů na jednu skutečnostní stupnici, což umožňuje testování modelů napříč těmito korpusy. Navíc navrhujeme nový model pro predikci věcnosti tím, že nejprve rozšíříme předchozí systém predikce věcnosti založený na pravidlech a aplikujeme jej na abstrakci závislostních stromů a poté používáme výstup tohoto systému v dohledovaném klasifikátoru. Ukazujeme, že tento model překonává předchozí metody na všech třech datových sadách. Veřejně zpřístupníme jak sjednocený skutečnostní korpus, tak náš nový model.', 'bs': 'Prethodni modeli za procjenu obaveze prema predikatu u rečenici (također poznatom kao predviđanje činjenice) bili su obučeni i testirani protiv određenog navedenog seta podataka, a zatim ograničavajući generalnost njihovih rezultata. U ovom poslu predlažemo intuitivnu metodu za mapiranje tri ranije annotirane tijela na jednu skalu činjenice, tako omogućavajući da se modeli testiraju širom ove tijela. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo novi model za predviđanje činjenice, prvo proširenjem prethodnog sustava predviđanja činjenice baziranog na pravilima i primjenjivanjem ga na apstrakciji drveća zavisnosti, a onda koristimo izlaz ovog sistema u nadzornom klasifikatoru. Pokazujemo da ovaj model iznosi prethodne metode na svim tri seta podataka. Ujedinjeni korpus činjenice i naš novi model javno dostupni.', 'fi': 'Aiemmat mallit lauseen predikaattia kohtaan sitoutumisen arvioimiseksi (tunnetaan myös nimellä faktiliteetin ennustus) koulutettiin ja testattiin tiettyä merkitsemää aineistoa vastaan, mikä rajoitti tulosten yleisyyttä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme intuitiivista menetelmää kolmen aiemmin merkityn korpusen kartoittamiseen yhdelle faktiasteikolle, mikä mahdollistaa mallien testaamisen näiden korpusten välillä. Lisäksi suunnittelemme uuden mallin faktiliteetin ennustamiseen laajentamalla ensin aikaisempaa sääntöpohjaista faktiliteetin ennustusjärjestelmää ja soveltamalla sitä riippuvuuspuiden abstraktioon ja käyttämällä tämän järjestelmän tuotosta valvotussa luokittelussa. Osoitamme, että tämä malli ylittää aiemmat menetelmät kaikissa kolmessa aineistossa. Annamme sekä yhtenäisen asiakkuuskorpuksen että uuden mallimme julkisesti saataville.', 'jv': 'gadoh Digawe iki ulih dumadhi unyangno sistem (offisie)iki dadi dianggawe sistem(e.g. karting)iki banget dadi nyonggo ndelah cara-cara sing wis nguasai perusahaan sistem singar Actual scale (e.g. iso dianggawe model iso dianggawe cara-cara iki banget). Genjer-Genjer Monday Awak dhéwé éntuk kabèh sing beraksi perusahaan karo model sing gak dhéwé', 'he': 'דוגמנים קודמים להערכה של מחויבות כלפי משפט (הידועים גם כצפוי עובדות) היו מאומנים ובדיקות נגד קבוצת נתונים מסויימת שמצביעה, ולאחר מכן מגבילות את הגנרליות של התוצאות שלהם. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים שיטה אינטואיטיבית למפות שלושה גופות שנכתבו קודם לכן על סקל עובדות אחד, כך מאפשר לדוגמאות להיבחן ברחבי גופות אלה. בנוסף, אנחנו מעצבים מודל חדש לחזוי עובדות על ידי ההארכה קודם מערכת חיזוי עובדות מבוססת על חוקים קודם והשתמשה בו על אסטראקציה של עצי תלויות, ואז בשימוש בתוצאה של מערכת זו במסגרת מושגת. אנו מראים שהמודל הזה מוביל שיטות קודמות על כל שלושת קבוצות נתונים. אנחנו מקבלים את גופוס העובדות המאוחד והמודל החדש שלנו פנוי לציבור.', 'ha': "An sanar da misãlai na farko wa tunkuɗe alƙawarin zuwa wani cewa wanda aka ƙayyade (kuma aka sanar da shi tabbatacce) a sami kuma aka jarraba shi a kan wani tsari na takardar da aka ƙayyade, bayan haka yana ƙunsa da jujjarin matsalarsu. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi na fassara ta wajen yin karni-karni na uku ta gabãni, a kan takardar gaskiya guda, kuma yana yarda a jarraba misumarni a kan wannan firma. Da wannan, za mu ƙayyade wani misali na noyi wa kungiyar gaskiyar da ya farko ta shimfiɗa system-na'ura na zaman rubutun da gaskiyar gaskiya kuma mu samu shi a kan karatun misalin it ãcen baka ɗabi'a, sa'an nan kuma Mu yi amfani da matsalar wannan na'urar cikin wani mai tsaro. Tuna nũna cewa wannan misalin ya sami hanyoyin zaman a kan duk zalumai uku. Munã sami dukansu da ke samar sami da misalinmu na gaskiya.", 'sk': 'Prejšnji modeli za oceno zaveze k predikatu v stavku (znani tudi kot napoved dejstva) so bili usposobljeni in testirani glede na določen opisan nabor podatkov, kar je nato omejilo splošnost njihovih rezultatov. V tem delu predlagamo intuitivno metodo za mapiranje treh predhodno označenih korpusov na eno samo lestvico dejanske realnosti, s čimer omogočimo testiranje modelov v teh korpusih. Poleg tega smo oblikovali nov model napovedovanja dejanskih dejanj, tako da najprej razširimo prejšnji sistem napovedovanja dejanskih dejanskih dejanj, ki temelji na pravilih in ga uporabimo na abstrakciji dreves odvisnosti, nato pa uporabimo izhod tega sistema v nadzorovanem klasifikatorju. Pokazali smo, da ta model presega prejšnje metode na vseh treh naborih podatkov. Tako enotni korpus dejstev kot naš novi model dajemo javnosti na voljo.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྣམས་ཚོར་བ་གཅིག་གི་སྔོན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ལ་བསམ་བྱས་པར། འུ་ཅག་གི་ལས་འགན་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་སྤྱོད་ཚུལ་མཛོད་ཁང་འབྲེལ་རྩིས་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱོ ང་ཚོས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལ་རྗེས་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་མི་དབུགས་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་མང་ཆོས་ཡོད་པ་བསྒྲགས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Question Answering on Knowledge Bases and Text using Universal Schema and Memory Networks', 'ar': 'الإجابة على الأسئلة حول قواعد المعرفة والنص باستخدام المخطط العالمي وشبكات الذاكرة', 'fr': "Réponse aux questions sur les bases de connaissances et le texte à l'aide de réseaux de schéma universel et", 'es': 'Respuestas a preguntas sobre bases de conocimiento y texto mediante redes de memoria y esquemas universales', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas sobre bases de conhecimento e texto usando esquemas universais e redes de memória', 'ja': 'ユニバーサルスキーマとメモリネットワークを使用したナレッジベースとテキストに関する質問の回答', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы о базах знаний и тексте с использованием универсальных схем и сетей памяти', 'zh': '用通用模式及内存网络知识库及文本问答', 'hi': 'यूनिवर्सल स्कीमा और मेमोरी नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर नॉलेज बेस और टेक्स्ट पर प्रश्न उत्तर देना', 'ga': 'Freagra Ceist ar Bhoinn Eolais agus Téacs ag úsáid Scéimre Uilíoch agus Líonraí Cuimhne', 'el': 'Απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις σε βάσεις γνώσης και κείμενο με χρήση καθολικού σχήματος και δικτύων μνήμης', 'hu': 'Kérdések megválaszolása tudásbázisokban és szövegekben univerzális séma és memória hálózatok használatával', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Atsakymai į klausimus dėl žinių bazių ir teksto naudojant visuotinę schemą ir prisiminimo tinklus', 'it': 'Risposta alle domande su basi di conoscenza e testo utilizzando schemi universali e reti di memoria', 'mk': 'Одговорите на прашањата на базите на знаење и текстот користејќи универзален шем и сеќавачки мрежи', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan pada Pangkalan pengetahuan dan Teks menggunakan Skema Universal dan Rangkaian Memori', 'kk': 'Name', 'ml': 'അറിവുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലും പദാവലിയിലുമുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-Bażijiet tal-Għarfien u t-Test bl-użu tal-Iskema Universali u n-Netwerks tal-Memorja', 'pl': 'Odpowiedzi na pytania w bazach wiedzy i tekstach przy użyciu uniwersalnych schematów i sieci pamięci', 'ro': 'Răspunsuri la întrebări privind bazele de cunoștințe și text utilizând schema universală și rețelele de memorie', 'no': 'Spørsmål svar på kjensbaser og tekst ved hjelp av universelle skjema og minnet', 'mn': 'Универсал схема, санамжийн сүлжээг ашиглан мэдлэг суурь болон текст дээр хариулт', 'si': 'Name', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha ku saabsan aasaasiga aqoonta iyo qoraalka isticmaalka shabakadda iyo xasuusta jaamacadda", 'sr': 'Odgovor pitanja na bazi znanja i tekst koristeći univerzalnu šemu i mrežu pamćenja', 'sv': 'Frågesvar på kunskapsbas och text med hjälp av Universal Schema och Minnesnätverk', 'ta': 'பொதுவான திட்டம் மற்றும் நினைவு வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி அறிவு அடிப்படைகள் மற்றும் உரையின் கேள்வி', 'ur': 'علم Bases اور Text پر سوال جواب دینے والی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi Trả lời về Nhà khoa học và văn bản bằng mạng giản đồ và bộ nhớ chung', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси относно базата на знания и текст с използване на универсална схема и мрежи за памет', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden op kennisbases en tekst met behulp van universeel schema en geheugennetwerken', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse på vidensbaser og tekst ved hjælp af universelle skema- og hukommelsesnetværk', 'hr': 'Odgovor pitanja na bazi znanja i tekstu koristeći univerzalnu šemu i mrežu pamćenja', 'de': 'Beantwortung von Fragen auf Wissensbasen und Text mithilfe von universellen Schema- und Speichernetzwerken', 'id': 'Jawaban Pertanyaan pada Pangkalan Pengetahuan dan Teks menggunakan Skema Universal dan Rangkaian Memori', 'ko': '유니버설 모델과 메모리 네트워크를 바탕으로 한 지식 라이브러리와 텍스트 퀴즈', 'tr': 'Bilim Basitleri we Metin üzerinde sorag jogap', 'sw': 'Swali la kujibu kuhusu Basi ya Ufahamu na Maandishi kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Ujumbe na Kumbukumbu', 'af': 'Vraog antwoord op kennis basis en teks gebruik Universele Skema en Geheue Netwerke', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال بر پایه\u200cهای دانش و متن با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای نقشه\u200cای جهانی و حافظه\u200cها', 'am': 'ጥያቄ', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve në bazat e njohurive dhe tekstit duke përdorur skemën universale dhe rrjetet e kujtesës', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմքերի և տեքստի հարցերի պատասխանը համաշխարհային սխեմայի և հիշողության ցանցերի միջոցով', 'az': 'Bilim Üstündə və Metin Üniversal Şema və Yadın Sənələrini istifadə edən sual cavabı', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় স্কীমা এবং মেমরি নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে জ্ঞানের ভেস এবং লেখা সম্পর্কে', 'bs': 'Odgovor pitanja na bazi znanja i tekstu koristeći univerzalnu šemu i mrežu pamćenja', 'ca': 'La resposta a preguntes sobre les bases de coneixements i el text utilitzant esquema universal i xarxes de memòria', 'fi': 'Tietokantojen ja tekstin kysymyksiin vastaaminen yleismallin ja muistiverkkojen avulla', 'cs': 'Zodpovězení otázek na znalostní bázi a textu pomocí univerzálních schémat a paměťových sítí', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaaside ja teksti kohta universaalse skeemi ja mäluvõrkude abil', 'jv': 'Jabungan Jaringan Nanggang Balisaké lan Teks Ngawe gunakake Universal scheme karo Network', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja o bazah znanja in besedilu z uporabo univerzalne sheme in pomnilniških omrežij', 'ha': 'Socket error code NotSupported', 'he': 'תשובה לשאלות על בסיסי ידע וטקסט בשימוש במערכת יוניברסלית ורשתות זיכרון', 'bo': 'Question Answering on Knowledge Bases and Text using Universal Schema and Memory Networks'}
{'en': 'Existing question answering methods infer answers either from a knowledge base or from raw text. While knowledge base (KB) methods are good at answering compositional questions, their performance is often affected by the incompleteness of the KB. Au contraire, web text contains millions of facts that are absent in the KB, however in an unstructured form. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space. In this paper we extend universal schema to natural language question answering, employing Memory networks to attend to the large body of facts in the combination of text and KB. Our models can be trained in an end-to-end fashion on question-answer pairs. Evaluation results on Spades fill-in-the-blank question answering dataset show that exploiting universal schema for question answering is better than using either a KB or text alone. This model also outperforms the current state-of-the-art by 8.5 F1 points.', 'ar': 'تستنتج طرق الإجابة على الأسئلة الحالية الإجابات إما من قاعدة المعرفة أو من النص الخام. في حين أن طرق قاعدة المعارف (KB) جيدة في الإجابة على الأسئلة التركيبية ، إلا أن أداؤها غالبًا ما يتأثر بعدم اكتمال قاعدة المعارف. على النقيض من ذلك ، يحتوي نص الويب على ملايين الحقائق الغائبة في قاعدة المعارف ، ولكن بشكل غير منظم. يمكن أن يدعم المخطط العام الاستدلال على اتحاد كل من KBs المهيكلة والنص غير المهيكل عن طريق محاذاتهم في مساحة مضمنة مشتركة. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتوسيع المخطط العام ليشمل الإجابة على أسئلة اللغة الطبيعية ، مستخدمين شبكات الذاكرة للتعامل مع مجموعة كبيرة من الحقائق في مزيج من النص و KB. يمكن تدريب عارضينا بطريقة شاملة على أزواج من الأسئلة والأجوبة. تظهر نتائج التقييم على مجموعة البيانات التي تجيب على سؤال ملء الفراغ Spades أن استغلال المخطط العام للإجابة على الأسئلة أفضل من استخدام إما KB أو نص بمفرده. يتفوق هذا النموذج أيضًا على الحالة الفنية الحالية بمقدار 8.5 نقطة F1.', 'es': 'Los métodos de respuesta a preguntas existentes deducen las respuestas a partir de una base de conocimientos o de texto sin formato. Si bien los métodos de la base de conocimientos (KB) son buenos para responder preguntas de composición, su rendimiento a menudo se ve afectado por la falta de integridad de la base de conocimientos. Por el contrario, el texto web contiene millones de datos que están ausentes en el KB, pero de forma no estructurada. El esquema universal puede apoyar el razonamiento sobre la unión de los KB estructurados y el texto no estructurado al alinearlos en un espacio integrado común. En este artículo ampliamos el esquema universal a la respuesta a preguntas en lenguaje natural, empleando redes de memoria para atender la gran cantidad de datos en la combinación de texto y KB. Nuestros modelos se pueden capacitar de principio a fin en pares de preguntas y respuestas. Los resultados de la evaluación del conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de relleno en blanco de Spades muestran que aprovechar el esquema universal para responder preguntas es mejor que usar solo un KB o texto. Este modelo también supera al actual estado de la técnica en 8,5 puntos F1.', 'pt': 'Os métodos de resposta a perguntas existentes inferem respostas de uma base de conhecimento ou de texto bruto. Embora os métodos da base de conhecimento (KB) sejam bons para responder a perguntas de composição, seu desempenho é frequentemente afetado pela incompletude da KB. Ao contrário, o texto da web contém milhões de fatos que estão ausentes na KB, porém de forma não estruturada. O esquema universal pode suportar o raciocínio sobre a união de KBs estruturados e texto não estruturado, alinhando-os em um espaço incorporado comum. Neste artigo, estendemos o esquema universal para responder perguntas em linguagem natural, empregando redes de memória para atender ao grande corpo de fatos na combinação de texto e KB. Nossos modelos podem ser treinados de ponta a ponta em pares de perguntas e respostas. Os resultados da avaliação no conjunto de dados de resposta a perguntas de preenchimento de lacunas do Spades mostram que explorar o esquema universal para responder a perguntas é melhor do que usar um KB ou texto sozinho. Este modelo também supera o atual estado da arte em 8,5 pontos F1.', 'fr': "Les méthodes de réponse aux questions existantes déduisent les réponses à partir d'une base de connaissances ou d'un texte brut. Bien que les méthodes de base de connaissances (KB) répondent bien aux questions de composition, leur performance est souvent affectée par le caractère incomplet de la base de connaissances. Au contraire, le texte web contient des millions de faits qui sont absents de la base de connaissances, mais sous une forme non structurée. Le schéma universel peut prendre en charge le raisonnement sur l'union des KB structurés et du texte non structuré en les alignant dans un espace intégré commun. Dans cet article, nous étendons le schéma universel à la réponse aux questions en langage naturel, en utilisant des réseaux de mémoire pour traiter le grand nombre de faits dans la combinaison de texte et de Ko. Nos modèles peuvent être formés de bout en bout sur des paires question-réponse. Les résultats de l'évaluation de l'ensemble de données de réponse aux questions à compléter de Spades montrent qu'il est préférable d'exploiter le schéma universel pour répondre aux questions que d'utiliser une base de connaissances ou du texte seul. Ce modèle surpasse également l'état actuel de la technologie de 8,5 points F1.", 'ja': '既存の質問回答方法は、知識ベースまたは生のテキストから回答を推論します。 ナレッジベース（ KB ）メソッドは構成的な質問に答えるのが得意ですが、そのパフォーマンスはKBの不完全さに影響されることがよくあります。 それに反して、ウェブテキストには、KBにはない何百万もの事実が含まれていますが、構造化されていません。 ユニバーサルスキーマは、構造化KBと非構造化テキストの両方を共通の埋め込み空間に配置することで、それらの結合に関する推論をサポートすることができます。 この論文では、テキストとKBの組み合わせで多くの事実に対応するためにメモリネットワークを使用して、普遍的なスキーマを自然言語の質問回答に拡張します。 私たちのモデルは、質問と回答のペアでエンドツーエンドでトレーニングすることができます。 Spadesの空白の質問への回答データセットの評価結果は、質問への回答のためにユニバーサルスキーマを利用することは、KBまたはテキストのいずれかのみを使用するよりも優れていることを示しています。 また、このモデルは現在の最新鋭のF 1を8.5ポイント上回るパフォーマンスを発揮します。', 'zh': '现在问答方法从知识库或原始文本中推断答案。 虽知识库 (KB) 术善应对,然其性常受知识库不完整性。 反是,Web文本含知识库中所阙数百万个实,然以非结构化文存焉。 通用架构可于公共嵌入式空中对齐结构化 KB 与非结构化文本支并集推理。 于本文中,将通式扩到自然语言问答,因记忆网络以处文本及知识库组中事实。 吾法可以问对以端到端教之。 黑桃填空问数集评结果表明,因通用架构问对,贤于独用知识库文本。 其性亦高于先进之8.5 F1。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा प्रश्न उत्तर देने की विधियाँ या तो नॉलेज बेस से या कच्चे पाठ से उत्तर का अनुमान लगाती हैं। जबकि नॉलेज बेस (केबी) विधियां रचनात्मक प्रश्नों का उत्तर देने में अच्छी हैं, उनका प्रदर्शन अक्सर केबी की अपूर्णता से प्रभावित होता है। Au contraire, वेब पाठ में लाखों तथ्य होते हैं जो KB में अनुपस्थित होते हैं, हालांकि एक असंरचित रूप में। यूनिवर्सल स्कीमा संरचित केबी और असंरचित पाठ दोनों के संघ पर तर्क का समर्थन कर सकती है, उन्हें एक सामान्य एम्बेडेड स्थान में संरेखित करके। इस पेपर में हम प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए सार्वभौमिक स्कीमा का विस्तार करते हैं, पाठ और केबी के संयोजन में तथ्यों के बड़े शरीर में भाग लेने के लिए मेमोरी नेटवर्क को नियोजित करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल को प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े पर एक एंड-टू-एंड फैशन में प्रशिक्षित किया जा सकता है। हुकुम भरने पर मूल्यांकन परिणाम-इन-द-रिक्त प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले डेटासेट से पता चलता है कि प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए सार्वभौमिक स्कीमा का शोषण करना या तो KB या अकेले पाठ का उपयोग करने से बेहतर है। यह मॉडल भी 8.5 F1 अंकों से वर्तमान राज्य के कला outperforms.', 'ru': 'Существующие методы ответов на вопросы выводят ответы либо из базы знаний, либо из необработанного текста. В то время как методы базы знаний (КБ) хороши в ответах на композиционные вопросы, на их эффективность часто влияет неполнота КБ. Напротив, веб-текст содержит миллионы фактов, которые отсутствуют в КБ, однако в неструктурированной форме. Универсальная схема может поддерживать рассуждения об объединении как структурированных КБ, так и неструктурированного текста, выравнивая их в общем встроенном пространстве. В этой статье мы распространяем универсальную схему на ответы на вопросы естественного языка, используя сети памяти для рассмотрения большого объема фактов в сочетании текста и КБ. Наши модели могут быть обучены сквозным образом на парах вопрос-ответ. Результаты оценки набора данных для ответа на пустой вопрос Spades показывают, что использование универсальной схемы для ответа на вопрос лучше, чем использование только КБ или текста. Эта модель также превосходит современную на 8,5 пункта F1.', 'ga': 'Baineann modhanna freagartha ceisteanna atá ann cheana freagraí ó bhunachar eolais nó ó bhuntéacs. Cé go bhfuil modhanna bonn eolais (KB) go maith chun ceisteanna cumadóireachta a fhreagairt, is minic a chuireann neamhiomlán an KB isteach ar a bhfeidhmíocht. Ina theannta sin, tá na milliúin fíricí sa téacs gréasáin nach bhfuil sa KB, ach i bhfoirm neamhstruchtúrtha. Is féidir le scéimre uilíoch tacú le réasúnaíocht ar aontú KB struchtúrtha agus téacs neamhstruchtúrtha trí iad a ailíniú i spás leabaithe coiteann. Sa pháipéar seo leathnaímid scéimre uilíoch chuig freagra ceisteanna teanga nádúrtha, ag úsáid líonraí Cuimhne chun freastal ar an gcorp mór fíricí sa chomhcheangal idir téacs agus KB. Is féidir ár múnlaí a oiliúint ó cheann ceann go ceann ar phéirí ceisteanna-freagra. Léiríonn torthaí meastóireachta ar thacar sonraí freagartha ceisteanna líon isteach-an-bán Spades gur fearr leas a bhaint as scéimre uilíoch chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt ná KB nó téacs amháin a úsáid. Tá 8.5 pointe F1 níos fearr ag an tsamhail seo freisin ná an staid reatha.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις συνάγουν απαντήσεις είτε από μια βάση γνώσεων είτε από ακατέργαστο κείμενο. Ενώ οι μέθοδοι της βάσης γνώσης (ΚΒ) είναι καλές στην απάντηση σε σύνθετες ερωτήσεις, η απόδοσή τους επηρεάζεται συχνά από την ανεπάρκεια της ΚΒ. Αντίθετα, το κείμενο του διαδικτύου περιέχει εκατομμύρια γεγονότα που απουσιάζουν στην ΚΒ, ωστόσο σε μη δομημένη μορφή. Το καθολικό σχήμα μπορεί να υποστηρίξει τη συλλογιστική σχετικά με την ένωση τόσο των δομημένων KBs όσο και του μη δομημένου κειμένου ευθυγραμμίζοντας τα σε έναν κοινό ενσωματωμένο χώρο. Στην παρούσα εργασία επεκτείνουμε το καθολικό σχήμα στην απάντηση ερωτήσεων φυσικής γλώσσας, χρησιμοποιώντας δίκτυα μνήμης για να ασχοληθούμε με το μεγάλο σύνολο γεγονότων στο συνδυασμό κειμένου και ΚΒ. Τα μοντέλα μας μπορούν να εκπαιδευτούν με τρόπο ολοκληρωμένο σε ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης στο σύνολο δεδομένων απάντησης ερωτημάτων συμπληρώνουν την κενή ερώτηση δείχνουν ότι η εκμετάλλευση καθολικού σχήματος για απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις είναι καλύτερη από τη χρήση είτε ενός ΚΒ είτε μόνο κειμένου. Αυτό το μοντέλο ξεπερνά επίσης την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας κατά 8.5 σημεία F1.', 'hu': 'A meglévő kérdésválasztási módszerek tudásbázisból vagy nyers szövegből erednek válaszokat. Míg a tudásbázis (KB) módszerek jók a kompozíciós kérdések megválaszolásában, teljesítményüket gyakran befolyásolja a KB hiányossága. Ellenkezőleg, a webes szöveg több millió olyan tényt tartalmaz, amelyek hiányoznak a KB-ban, de strukturálatlan formában. Az univerzális séma támogatja a strukturált KB-k és a strukturálatlan szövegek egyesítésének érvelését egy közös beágyazott térbe igazításával. Ebben a tanulmányban kiterjesztjük az univerzális sémát a természetes nyelvű kérdések megválaszolására, memória hálózatokat alkalmazva a szöveg és KB kombinációjában a tények nagy mennyiségének figyelembevételére. Modelljeinket teljes körűen képezhetjük kérdés-válasz párokra. Az üres kérdések kitöltésére vonatkozó adatkészletek értékelési eredményei azt mutatják, hogy az univerzális séma kihasználása a kérdések megválaszolására jobb, mint egy KB vagy egy szöveg használata. Ez a modell 8,5 F1 ponttal felülmúlja a jelenlegi korszerűséget.', 'it': "I metodi di risposta alle domande esistenti deducono le risposte da una base di conoscenze o da un testo grezzo. Mentre i metodi di knowledge base (KB) sono bravi a rispondere a domande compositive, le loro prestazioni sono spesso influenzate dall'incompletezza della KB. Al contrario, il testo web contiene milioni di fatti che sono assenti nella KB, tuttavia in una forma non strutturata. Lo schema universale può supportare il ragionamento sull'unione di KBs strutturati e testo non strutturato allineandoli in uno spazio incorporato comune. In questo articolo estendiamo lo schema universale alla risposta alle domande del linguaggio naturale, utilizzando reti di memoria per occuparsi del grande corpo di fatti nella combinazione di testo e KB. I nostri modelli possono essere addestrati in modo end-to-end sulle coppie domanda-risposta. I risultati della valutazione sul set di dati di risposta alle domande riempite in bianco di picche mostrano che sfruttare lo schema universale per la risposta alle domande è meglio che usare solo una KB o un testo. Questo modello supera anche lo stato dell'arte attuale di 8,5 punti F1.", 'ka': 'მსგავსი კითხვის გასაღების მეტირების შესაძლებლობა იგივე უცნობის ბაზიდან ან მხარე ტექსტიდან გასაღების შესაძლებლობა. მაგრამ მეცნიერების ბაზი (KB) პროცემები კომპოზიციონალური კითხვების პასუხისთვის კარგია, მათი კომპოზიციონალური კომპოზიციონალური კითხვები Au contrary, web text contains millions of facts that are absent in the KB, however in an unstructured form. უნივერსალური სქემა შეუძლია აზრისტირებას კობ და არსტრუქტურული ტექსტის სუნიონის აზრისტირებას დაეხმარება, რომელიც ისინი საერთო დაბრუქტურებული სივ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ უნივერსალური სქემას ნახვა ენის კითხვაზე გადავიტანოთ, მეხსიერების ქსელების გამოყენება, რომ ტექსტის და KB-ის კომბიუნციაში ფაქტის დიდი კომბიუ ჩვენი მოდელები შეიძლება იყოს საკუთარი დასასრულებელი მოდელში კითხვა-პასუხისთვის. შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მონაცემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი სქემის გამ ამ მოდელის მაგრამ მიმდინარე სურათის სურათი 8.5 F1 წერტილებით გამოყენება.', 'lt': 'Esami atsakymo į klausimus metodai rodo atsakymus arba iš žinių bazės, arba iš žaliavinio teksto. Nors žinių bazės (KB) metodai gerai atsako į sudėties klausimus, jų rezultatus dažnai veikia KB neišsamumas. Priešingai, interneto tekste yra milijonų faktų, kurių KB nėra, tačiau jų nėra struktūriškai. Visuotinė schema gali padėti pagrįsti struktūrizuotų KB sąjungą ir nesustruktūrizuotą tekstą, suderindama juos su bendrąja integruota erdve. Šiame dokumente mes išplečiame universalią schemą ir sprendžiame natūralių kalbų klausimus, naudojame prisiminimo tinklus, kad būtų sprendžiama daug faktų derinant tekstą ir KB. Mūsų modeliai gali būti apmokomi nuo pabaigos į pabaigą klausimų ir atsakymų poromis. Vertinimo rezultatai, gauti atsakant į klausimus, atsakant į klausimus, kuriuose atsakoma į klausimus, rodo, kad universaliosios schemos naudojimas atsakymui į klausimus yra geresnis nei vien tik naudojant KB arba tekstą. Šis modelis taip pat viršija dabartinę pažangą 8,5 F1 punktu.', 'ms': 'Existing question answering methods infer answers either from a knowledge base or from raw text.  Walaupun kaedah pangkalan pengetahuan (KB) baik dalam menjawab soalan komposisi, prestasi mereka sering terpengaruh oleh ketidaklengkap KB. Sebaliknya, teks web mengandungi jutaan fakta yang tiada dalam KB, bagaimanapun dalam bentuk tidak terstruktur. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space.  Dalam kertas ini kami memperluas skema universal kepada jawapan soalan bahasa semulajadi, menggunakan rangkaian Memori untuk menghadiri kepada tubuh besar fakta dalam kombinasi teks dan KB. Model kita boleh dilatih dengan cara akhir-akhir pada pasangan soalan-jawapan. Hasil penilaian pada Spades mengisi-dalam-kosong set data menjawab soalan menunjukkan bahawa mengeksploitasi skema universal untuk menjawab soalan lebih baik daripada menggunakan KB atau teks sahaja. Model ini juga melebihi keadaan semasa dengan 8.5 titik F1.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും അറിവുള്ള ബേസില്\u200d നിന്നും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വൃത്ത അറിവുകളുടെ (കെബി) രീതികള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതില്\u200d നല്ലതാണെങ്കില്\u200d, അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും കെബ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കെബിയില്\u200d അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വെബ്ലിന്റെ വാചകം ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. എങ്കിലും ഒരു സ്ഥാപിതമായ ര കെബികളുടെ യൂണിയനിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നതിനെയും സ്കീമായെയും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സാധാരണ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള സ്ഥലത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിലേക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മെമ്മറി നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു അവസാനത്തേക്ക് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോട്ടുകാരി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന സ്പെയിസ് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിന് ശൂന്യമായ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d 8. 5 F1 പോയിന്റുകളാല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Бар сұрақ жауап беру әдістері білім негізінен немесе сызық мәтіннен жауап береді. Білім негізі (КБ) әдістері композиционалық сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін жақсы, олардың әдістерін КБ- тың толықтығынан әсер етеді. Тек қарсы, веб- мәтіні КБ- де жоқ миллион факттар бар, бірақ құрылмаған пішінде. Әдетті сұлба құрылмаған КБ және құрылмаған мәтіннің біріктірімін қолдайды. Оларды жалпы ендірілген орында тәртіптеу арқылы. Бұл қағазда біз әлемді сұлбаны табиғи тілдің сұрақтарына жауап береміз, жадын желілерін мәтін мен КБ тізімінде қатынау үшін үлкен факттардың жиынына қолданып, жадын желі Біздің үлгілеріміз сұрақ және жауаптар екеуіне соңындағы модейде оқылмай алады. Spades толтырылған бос сұрақ жауап беретін деректер жиынының нәтижелері сұрақ сұлбасының қолдануы KB не мәтін тек қолданудан артық екенін көрсетеді. Бұл үлгі сондай-ақ 8,5 F1 нүктелерімен назардағы орындың күйін жасайды.', 'mk': 'Постојаните методи на одговор на прашањата инферираат одговори или од база на знаење или од суров текст. Иако методите на базата на знаење (КБ) се добри во одговорот на композициските прашања, нивната перформанса честопати е влијана на нецелосноста на КБ. Напротив, веб-текстот содржи милиони факти кои се отсутни во КБ, сепак во неструктурирана форма. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space.  Во овој документ го прошируваме универзалниот шем на одговорите на природните јазички прашања, користејќи мрежи на Меморија за да присуствуваме на големото тело факти во комбинацијата на текст и КБ. Нашите модели можат да бидат обучени од крај до крај на парови прашања-одговори. Резултатите од евалуацијата на поставувањето на прашањата за исполнување на празните писма покажуваат дека искористувањето на универзалниот шем за одговор на прашањата е подобро отколку само користењето на КБ или текст. Овој модел, исто така, ја надминува актуелната техничка состојба за 8,5 Ф1 поени.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande spørsmålemotoder som svarar på svar, kan gjera svar anten frå ein kunnskapsbase eller frå råtekst. Mens kunnskapsbasen (KB) er gode for å svara på komponentsielle spørsmål, vil kjørsmålene deres ofte påvirka av ikkje fullstendigheten av KB- en. Au motsatt, nettteksten inneheld millioner faktar som ikkje er i KB, men i eit ikkje strukturert form. Universell skjema kan støtta rasjonar på union av både strukturerte KB og ikkje strukturerte tekst ved å justera dei i eit felles innebygd plass. I denne papiret utvidar vi universelle skjemaet til naturspråksspørsmålet, og brukar minnetverk for å delta på den store kroppen av fakta i kombinasjonen av tekst og KB. Modellene våre kan trenjast på ein sluttmodus på spørsmål- svarpar. Evalueringsresultat på Spades-fyll-inn-tomt spørsmål som svarar på dataset viser at bruking av universelle skjema for spørsmål er bedre enn bruking enten ein KB eller ein tekst alene. Dette modellet utfører også den gjeldande kunsttilstanden med 8,5 F1-punkt.', 'mt': 'Il-metodi eżistenti ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet jindikaw tweġibiet jew minn bażi ta’ għarfien jew minn test mhux ipproċessat. Filwaqt li l-metodi tal-bażi tal-għarfien (KB) huma tajbin fit-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kompożittivi, il-prestazzjoni tagħhom spiss tiġi affettwata mill-inkompleta tal-KB. Għall-kuntrarju, it-test fuq l-internet fih miljuni ta’ fatti li mhumiex fil-KB, madankollu f’forma mhux strutturata. L-iskema universali tista’ tappoġġja r-raġunament dwar l-unjoni kemm tal-KBs strutturati kif ukoll tat-test mhux strutturat billi tallinjahom fi spazju inkorporat komuni. F’dan id-dokument aħna jestendu l-iskema universali għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet tal-lingwa naturali, bl-użu tan-netwerks tal-Memorja biex jattendu għall-korp kbir ta’ fatti flimkien mat-test u l-KB. Il-mudelli tagħna jistgħu jiġu mħarrġa b’mod minn tarf sa tarf fuq pari ta’ mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet. Evaluation results on Spades fill-in-the-blank question answering dataset show that exploiting universal schema for question answering is better than using either a KB or text alone.  Dan il-mudell jaqbeż ukoll l-aħħar livell attwali bi 8.5 punti F1.', 'mn': 'Ингээд суралцаж байгаа асуулт хариултын арга нь мэдлэгийн суурь эсвэл цэвэр текстээс хариултыг олж авдаг. Хэдийгээр мэдлэг суурь (КБ) арга нь биеийн асуултуудыг хариулах нь сайн байдаг ч, тэдний үйл ажиллагаа ихэвчлэн КБ-ын төгсгөлгүй байдалд нөлөөлдөг. Харамсалтай нь, Веб текст КБ-д байхгүй сая сая зүйлсийг агуулдаг. Гэхдээ бүтээгдэхгүй хэлбэрээр байдаг. Олон төрлийн схема нь бүтээгдэхүүнтэй КБ болон бүтээгдэхүүнгүй текст хоёулаа ойлголтыг дэмжиж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ерөнхий схемийг байгалийн хэл асуултын хариултын тулд нэмэгдүүлнэ. Мэдээллийн сүлжээний хувилбаруудыг хэрэглэх боломжтой. Мэдээллийн сүлжээний хувилбарууд нь текст болон К- Бидний загварууд асуулт хариулт хоёр дээр төгсгөл загвар дээр суралцах боломжтой. Spades-ын дүүрэн-хоосон асуулт өгөгдлийн сангийн хариултын үр дүнг нь асуулт хариултын универсал схемийг ашиглах нь KB эсвэл текст ганцаараа ашиглахаас илүү сайн юм. Энэ загвар нь мөн 8.5 F1 цэг дээр орчин үеийн урлагийн байдлыг дамжуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Metodele existente de răspuns la întrebări deduc răspunsuri fie dintr-o bază de cunoștințe, fie dintr-un text brut. În timp ce metodele bazei de cunoștințe (KB) sunt bune la răspunsul la întrebări compoziționale, performanța lor este adesea afectată de incompletitudinea KB. Au contraire, textul web conține milioane de fapte care sunt absente în KB, totuși într-o formă nestructurată. Schema universală poate susține raționamentul privind unirea atât a KBs structurate, cât și a textului nestructurat, alinierea acestora într-un spațiu comun încorporat. În această lucrare extindem schema universală la răspunsul la întrebări în limbaj natural, folosind rețele de memorie pentru a participa la corpul mare de fapte în combinația de text și KB. Modelele noastre pot fi instruite într-un mod end-to-end pe perechi de întrebări-răspuns. Rezultatele evaluării privind setul de date pentru răspunsul la întrebări umple-în-gol de pică arată că exploatarea schemei universale pentru răspunsul la întrebări este mai bună decât utilizarea numai a unui KB sau a unui text. Acest model depășește, de asemenea, starea actuală de artă cu 8,5 puncte F1.', 'pl': 'Istniejące metody odpowiedzi na pytania wnioskują odpowiedzi albo z bazy wiedzy, albo z tekstu surowego. Chociaż metody bazy wiedzy (KB) są dobre w odpowiedzi na pytania kompozycyjne, na ich wydajność często wpływa niekompletność KB. Przeciwnie, tekst internetowy zawiera miliony faktów nieobecnych w KB, jednak w nieustrukturyzowanej formie. Uniwersalny schemat może wspierać rozumowanie dotyczące połączenia zarówno ustrukturyzowanych KBów, jak i nieustrukturyzowanego tekstu poprzez wyrównanie ich we wspólnej przestrzeni osadzonej. W niniejszym artykule rozszerzamy uniwersalny schemat na odpowiedzi na pytania języka naturalnego, wykorzystując sieci pamięci do uwzględnienia dużego zbioru faktów w połączeniu tekstu i KB. Nasze modele mogą być szkolone w sposób end-to-end na parach pytania-odpowiedzi. Wyniki oceny zestawu danych dotyczących odpowiedzi na pytania spades wypełniają puste pytania pokazują, że wykorzystanie uniwersalnego schematu do odpowiedzi na pytania jest lepsze niż używanie KB lub samego tekstu. Model ten również przewyższa obecny state-of-the-art o 8,5 punkty F1.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් තියෙන් Name විරුද්ධයෙන්, වෙබ් පාළුවේ මිලියන් ඇත්ත තියෙන්නේ KB වල නැති ඇත්ත, නමුත් ස්ථාපනයක් නැති විදියට. සාමාන්\u200dය ස්කීමාට පුළුවන් KBs සහ නිර්මාණයක් නැති පාළුවේ සංවිධානය සඳහා සමාන්\u200dය සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධතා කරන්න මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, පත්තර ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග ව අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන් Name මේ මොඩල් එක්කත් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ස්ථිතිය 8.5 F1 පින්තුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා.', 'so': "Jawaabta jawaabta su'aalaha ku jira waa ka fewer yihiin jawaabaha aasiga aqoonta ama qoraalka xunxun. Inta lagu jawaabo su'aalaha aasaasiga aqoonta (KB) waxaa inta badan saameyn ku leh shaqo la'aanta KB. Bogga internetka waxaa ku jira milyan warqadood oo ka maqan KB, habase yeeshee foom aan la dhisay. Siyaamka caalamiga ah wuxuu kaalmeyn karaa iskuulaadka ku saabsan ururada KBs iyo qoraalka la dhisay ee lagu magacaabiyo meel caadi ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ku fidinnaa qorshaha caalamiga ah si aan ugu jawaabno su'aalaha afka asalka ah, waxaan shaqaynaynaa shabakado xubnaha si ay uga qeybqaato dhaqdhaqaaq badan ee warqada iyo KB. Tusaalooyinkayada waxaa lagu baran karaa qaab ugu dhammaad labada jawaabta su'aalaha. Qiimeynta waxaa ka wanaagsan in la isticmaalo qorshaha caalamiga ama qoraal kaliya. Tusaaladan wuxuu sidoo kale ku qoran karaa xaaladda hore oo ay ku jirto 8.5 F1 points.", 'ur': 'Existing question replying methods infer answers either from a knowledge base or from raw text. حالانکہ علم بنسس (KB) طریقے کامپیوتر سوالوں کی جواب دینے کے لئے اچھے ہیں، ان کے کامپیوتر اکثر کب کی غلطی کے ذریعہ اثر دیتے ہیں. اوہ مخالف، ویب ٹیکسٹ میں لاکھوں حقیقتیں ہیں جو KB میں نہیں ہیں، اگرچہ ایک غیر ساختہ فرم میں. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space. اس کاغذ میں ہم دنیاوی اسکیم کو طبیعی زبان سوال کی جواب دینے کے لئے پھیلاتے ہیں، متن اور کیب کی ترکیب میں بہت بڑے حقیقت کے جسم کے لئے مہمانی نیٹورک کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے مدلز سوال جوڑوں کے ذریعے ایک آخر و آخر مدل میں آموزش کی جاتی ہیں۔ Spades filled-in-the-blank-question dataset پر جواب دینے والی سؤال کے نتائج کا ارزش کرنا دکھاتا ہے کہ سؤال جواب کے لئے یونلورٹ سکیم کا استعمال کرنا صرف ایک KB یا متن کے استعمال سے بہتر ہے. یہ موڈل بھی 8.5 F1 پوینٹ کے ذریعے موجود آرتی کی موقعیت کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'sr': 'Postoje pitanja odgovarajuće metode infekcije odgovora ili iz baze znanja ili iz sirovog teksta. Iako metode znanja (KB) su dobre na odgovoru na kompozicionalna pitanja, njihova učinka često utječe na nepotpunost KB-a. U suprotnom, web tekst sadrži milione činjenica koje nisu u KB-u, međutim, u neostrukturovanom obliku. Univerzalna šema može podržati razgovor o sindikatu strukturovanih KB-ova i neostrukturovanih tekstova poravnajući ih u zajedničkom ugrađenom prostoru. U ovom papiru proširimo univerzalnu šemu na odgovor na prirodno jezičko pitanje, koristeći mreže pamćenja da prisustvujemo velikom tijelu činjenica u kombinaciji teksta i KB. Naši modeli mogu biti obučeni na kraju do kraja na par odgovora. Rezultati procjene na ispunjavanju Spades-a-prazno pitanje odgovarajućeg seta podataka pokazuju da je korištenje univerzalne šeme za odgovor na pitanje bolje nego korištenje ili samo KB ili teksta. Ovaj model takođe iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti za 8,5 F1 bodova.', 'sv': 'Befintliga frågesvarsmetoder härleder svar antingen från en kunskapsbas eller från råtext. Även om kunskapsbasmetoder (KB) är bra på att besvara kompositionsfrågor påverkas deras prestanda ofta av att KB är ofullständig. Tvärtom innehåller webbtext miljontals fakta som saknas i KB, dock i ostrukturerad form. Universellt schema kan stödja resonemang om förening av både strukturerade KBs och ostrukturerad text genom att justera dem i ett gemensamt inbäddat utrymme. I den här uppsatsen utvidgar vi universella scheman till att besvara frågor på naturligt språk, genom att använda minnesnätverk för att ta hand om den stora mängden fakta i kombination av text och KB. Våra modeller kan utbildas på ett heltäckande sätt på fråga-svar par. Utvärderingsresultat för datauppsättningen Spades fill-in-the-blank frågesvar visar att det är bättre att utnyttja universellt schema för frågesvar än att enbart använda en KB eller text. Denna modell överträffar också nuvarande state-of-the-art med 8,5 F1 poäng.', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் கேள்வி பதில் முறைகள் அறிவு அடிப்படையில் இருந்து அல்லது குறைந்த உரை அறிவு அடிப்படை (KB) முறைமைகள் தொகுதியான கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் நன்றாக இருக்கும் போது, அவை செயல்பாடு பெரும்பாலும் கேபிய அல்லது எதிர்பார்ப்பு, வலைப்பின் உரையில் மில்லியன் கோடிகள் கேபியில் இல்லாத உண்மைகள் உள்ளன, ஆனால் அடையாளம் செய்யப்படா பொதுவான உட்பொதிந்த இடைவெளியில் ஒதுங்கிக் கொள்ளும் பொதுவான குறிப்பிட்ட உரையை உருவாக்குவதற்கான குறிப்பிட்ட கா இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பொதுவான திட்டத்தை இயற்கையான மொழி கேள்விக்கு பதில் விரிவாக்குகிறோம், நினைவகத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல்கள எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் முடிவில் முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவில் பயிற்சி செய்ய முடியும் கேள்வி கேட்க-வ வெற்று கேள்விக்கு பதில் கேட்பு அமைப்பில் வெற்று கேள்வியை பயன்படுத்தும் பொதுவான திட்டம் அல்லது உரை தனியாக பயன்படுத்துவதை விட சிறந்தத இந்த மாதிரி தற்போதைய நிலையை 8. 5 F1 புள்ளிகளால் செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'uz': "Mavjud savol javob beruvchi usullari maʼlumot bazasidan yoki kichkina matnning javob beradi. Ogohlantirish asosiy (KB) usullari kompaniyalar savollariga javob berishda juda yaxshi ko'proq, ularning bajarishi ko'pincha KB'ning notoʻgʻri qo'shiladi. @ info: whatsthis Ushbu tugmalar birikmasini birlashtirish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz tabiiy tilning javobi javob beruvchiga, xotira tarmoqlarini ishlayapmiz va matn va KB bilan birlashtirish uchun juda katta fakta tarmoqni ishlatamiz. Bizning modellarimiz soʻrov javob-javob qobiliyatida oxiriga o'rganishi mumkin. Evaluation results on Spades fill-in-the-blank question answering dataset show that exploiting universal schema for question answering is better than using either a KB or text alone.  Uskuna 8. 5 F1 nuqta bilan joriy sananing holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phương pháp câu hỏi hiện có ngụ ý câu trả lời từ một căn cứ kiến thức hoặc từ văn bản thô. Trong khi phương pháp của nhà kiến thức (KB) rất giỏi trong việc trả lời các câu hỏi về cấu trúc, nhưng trình độ của chúng thường bị ảnh hưởng bởi sự chưa hoàn thiện của KB. Dù ngược lại, văn bản web chứa hàng triệu sự kiện mà không có trong KB, tuy nhiên là không xây dựng. Hệ thống Toàn cầu có thể hỗ trợ việc lập luận về sự kết hợp của cả cấu trúc KB và những cấu trúc khác nhau bằng cách đặt chúng vào một không gian chứa chung. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta mở rộng văn bản phổ biến đến câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, sử dụng các mạng bộ nhớ để quan tâm đến các sự kiện lớn trong sự kết hợp của văn bản và KB. Các mẫu của chúng ta có thể được huấn luyện hết mức về các cặp câu hỏi. Kết quả đánh giá về hộp giải đầy đủ câu hỏi, câu trả lời từ tập tin cho thấy việc khai thác giản đồ phổ biến để trả lời câu hỏi là tốt hơn việc sử dụng chỉ một KB hay chỉ một đoạn. Mô hình này cũng vượt trội hơn các điểm hiện thời của 8.5 F1.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите методи за отговор на въпроси извеждат отговори или от база от знания, или от суров текст. Въпреки че методите на базата от знания (КБ) са добри в отговора на композиционни въпроси, тяхното представяне често се влияе от непълнотата на КБ. Напротив, уеб текстът съдържа милиони факти, които липсват в КБ, но в неструктурирана форма. Универсалната схема може да подкрепи разсъжденията за обединението както на структурираните КБ, така и на неструктурирания текст, като ги подравни в общо вградено пространство. В тази статия ние разширяваме универсалната схема към отговора на въпроси с естествен език, като използваме мрежите на паметта, за да се погрижим за големия набор от факти в комбинация от текст и КБ. Нашите модели могат да бъдат обучени от край до край на двойки въпрос-отговор. Резултатите от оценката на набор от данни за попълване на празните въпроси показват, че използването на универсална схема за отговор на въпроси е по-добре, отколкото използването на КБ или само текст. Този модел също надминава сегашното състояние на изкуството с 8,5 точки.', 'da': "Eksisterende spørgsmålsbesvarelsesmetoder udleder svar enten fra en vidensbase eller fra rå tekst. Mens videnbase (KB) metoder er gode til at besvare kompositionsspørgsmål, påvirkes deres præstation ofte af KB's ufuldstændighed. Tværtimod indeholder webtekst millioner af fakta, der er fraværende i KB, men i en ustruktureret form. Universelt skema kan understøtte ræsonnement om foreningen af både strukturerede KBs og ustruktureret tekst ved at justere dem i et fælles indlejret rum. I denne artikel udvider vi universelt skema til naturligt sprog spørgsmål besvarelse, bruger hukommelsesnetværk til at tage sig af den store mængde fakta i kombination af tekst og KB. Vores modeller kan trænes på en end-to-end måde på spørgsmål-svar par. Evalueringsresultater af datasættet Spades fyld-i-tomme spørgsmål viser, at det er bedre at udnytte universelt skema til spørgsmål besvarelse end at bruge enten en KB eller tekst alene. Denne model overgår også den nuværende state-of-the-art med 8,5 F1 point.", 'hr': 'Postojeće pitanje odgovarajuće metode inferiranja odgovora ili iz baze znanja ili iz sirovog teksta. Iako su metode znanja (KB) dobre na odgovoru na kompozicionalna pitanja, njihova učinka često utječe na nepotpunost KB-a. A suprotno, web tekst sadrži milijune činjenica koje nisu u KB-u, međutim, u neostrukturnom obliku. Univerzalna šema može podržati razgovor o sindikatu strukturiranog KB-a i neostrukturiranog teksta poravnajući ih u zajedničkom ugrađenom prostoru. U ovom papiru proširimo univerzalnu šemu na odgovor na prirodno jezičko pitanje, koristeći mreže pamćenja kako bi prisustvovali velikom tijelu činjenica u kombinaciji teksta i KB. Naši modeli mogu biti obučeni na kraju do kraja na par odgovora. Rezultati procjene na ispunjavanju Spades-a-prazno pitanje odgovarajuće podacima pokazuju da je iskorištavanje univerzalne shme za odgovor na pitanje bolje nego korištenje samo KB ili teksta. Ovaj model također iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti 8,5 F1 točkama.', 'nl': 'Bestaande vragenantwoordmethoden leiden antwoorden uit een kennisbank of uit ruwe tekst. Hoewel kennisbasemethoden (KB) goed zijn in het beantwoorden van compositievragen, wordt hun prestaties vaak beïnvloed door de onvolledigheid van de KB. Integendeel, webtekst bevat miljoenen feiten die in de KB ontbreken, maar in ongestructureerde vorm. Universeel schema kan redeneren over de samenvoeging van zowel gestructureerde KBs als ongestructureerde tekst ondersteunen door ze uit te lijnen in een gemeenschappelijke ingesloten ruimte. In dit artikel breiden we het universele schema uit naar het beantwoorden van vragen in natuurlijke taal, waarbij we gebruik maken van geheugennetwerken om de grote hoeveelheid feiten in de combinatie van tekst en KB te behandelen. Onze modellen kunnen op een end-to-end manier getraind worden op vraag-antwoord paren. Evaluatieresultaten van Spades vul-in-the-blanco vragenantwoorddataset tonen aan dat het gebruik van een universeel schema voor het beantwoorden van vragen beter is dan het gebruik van een KB of tekst alleen. Dit model overtreft ook de huidige state-of-the-art met 8,5 F1 punten.', 'de': 'Bestehende Fragebeantwortungsmethoden leiten Antworten entweder aus einer Wissensdatenbank oder aus Rohtext ab. Während Knowledge Base (KB)-Methoden kompositorische Fragen gut beantworten können, wird ihre Leistung oft durch die Unvollständigkeit der KB beeinflusst. Im Gegensatz dazu enthält Webtext Millionen von Fakten, die in der KB fehlen, jedoch in unstrukturierter Form. Ein universelles Schema kann die Argumentation für die Vereinigung von strukturierten KBs und unstrukturiertem Text unterstützen, indem es sie in einem gemeinsamen eingebetteten Raum ausrichtet. In diesem Beitrag erweitern wir das universelle Schema auf die Beantwortung natürlicher Fragen, indem wir Memory-Netzwerke verwenden, um den großen Körper von Fakten in der Kombination von Text und KB zu berücksichtigen. Unsere Models können durchgängig auf Frage-Antwort-Paare trainiert werden. Auswertungsergebnisse für Spades fill-in-the-blank Fragebeantworter Datensatz zeigen, dass die Nutzung eines universellen Schemas für die Beantwortung von Fragen besser ist, als entweder eine KB oder Text allein zu verwenden. Auch dieses Modell übertrifft den aktuellen Stand der Technik um 8,5 F1 Punkte.', 'ko': '기존의 문답 방법은 지식 라이브러리나 원시 텍스트에서 답을 추정할 수 있다.지식 라이브러리(knowledge base, KB) 방법은 조합 질문에 잘 대답하지만, 그들의 성능은 종종 지식 라이브러리의 불완전성에 영향을 받는다.반면 웹 텍스트는 수백만 개의 사실을 포함하고 있는데 이런 사실은 지식 라이브러리에는 존재하지 않지만 비구조화된 형식으로 존재한다.유니버설 모델은 구조화된 지식 라이브러리와 비구조화된 텍스트를 공공 삽입 공간에 맞추어 그것들의 합집을 추리할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 유니버설 모델을 자연 언어 문답으로 확대하고 기억 네트워크를 이용하여 텍스트와 지식 라이브러리가 결합된 대량의 사실을 처리할 것이다.우리의 모형은 문답 대상에서 끝까지 교육을 진행할 수 있다.Spades fill 공백 Q&amp;A 데이터 세트에 대한 평가 결과, 지식 라이브러리나 텍스트를 개별적으로 사용하는 것보다 일반 모드를 이용한 Q&amp;A가 더 나은 것으로 나타났다.이 모델의 F1 성적도 현재 최첨단 모델보다 8.5점 높다.', 'id': 'Metode menjawab pertanyaan yang ada menyimpulkan jawaban baik dari dasar pengetahuan atau dari teks mentah. Meskipun metode dasar pengetahuan (KB) baik dalam menjawab pertanyaan komposisi, prestasi mereka sering terpengaruh oleh ketidaklengkap KB. Sebaliknya, teks web mengandung jutaan fakta yang tidak ada di KB, bagaimanapun dalam bentuk tidak terstruktur. Skema Universal dapat mendukung alasan tentang persatuan KB struktur dan teks tidak struktur dengan menyesuaikan mereka dalam ruang terbenam umum. Dalam kertas ini kami memperluas skema universal untuk menjawab pertanyaan bahasa alami, menggunakan jaringan Memori untuk menghadiri tubuh besar fakta dalam kombinasi teks dan KB. Model kita bisa dilatih dengan cara akhir-akhir pada pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban. Hasil evaluasi pada Spades mengisi-dalam-kosong pertanyaan menjawab set data menunjukkan bahwa eksploitasi skema universal untuk menjawab pertanyaan lebih baik daripada menggunakan KB atau teks saja. Model ini juga melebihi state-of-the-art saat ini dengan 8,5 titik F1.', 'fa': 'سوال موجود وجود دارد که روش پاسخ دادن پاسخ ها را از پایگاه دانش یا از متن خالی آزاد می کند. در حالی که روش\u200cهای علم (KB) در پاسخ سوال\u200cهای ترکیب خوب هستند، عملکرد آنها اغلب توسط غیرکامل کردن KB تأثیر می\u200cدهد. بر خلاف این، متن وب شامل میلیون\u200cها حقیقت است که در KB ناپدید می\u200cشوند، ولی در شکل ناساخته است. برنامه جهانی می\u200cتواند منظوری در اتحادیه هر دو کیب ساخته شده و متن ساخته نشده را از طریق تنظیمات آنها در فضای مشترک مشترک پشتیبانی کند. در این کاغذ ما برنامه جهانی را به جواب سوال زبان طبیعی گسترش می دهیم، با استفاده از شبکه های حافظه برای حضور به بدن بزرگ حقیقت در ترکیب متن و کیب استفاده می کنیم. مدل\u200cهای ما می\u200cتوانند در یک مدل آخر و پایان در جفت جواب سوال آموزش داده شوند. نتایج ارزیابی روی سؤال پر-in-the-blank-reply dataset نشان می دهد که استفاده از برنامه جهانی برای جواب سوال بهتر از استفاده از یک کیب یا متن تنها است. این مدل همچنین موقعیت هنر فعلی 8.5 نقطه F1 را بیشتر انجام می دهد.', 'tr': "Öň bar soragy jogaplamak yöntemleri bilgi üýtgeden ýa-da setir metinden jogaplary alyp getirir. Bilim sistemi (KB) hili pikirleri kompozisyonal soraglary jogap bermekde has gowy bolsa, olaryň ýerini käwagt KB-iň tamamlanmagyndan täsir edýär. Mümkin däl, web metin KB'de bolmadyk milliyonlary faýllary bar. Universal şemalar hem strukturlanmış KB we hem strukturlanmaýan metin bir seleňde hat edip razylygy destekleyebilir. Bu kagyzda we dünýärli sahypalary tebigy dil soragyna jogap bermek üçin ullanýarys. Hata aňlary metin we KB bilen birleşdirmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň modellerimiz sorag-jogabat çipini soňunda bilim alyp biler. Spades doldurmak üçin janlaşdyrma netijesi boş soragy jogap beren hatlaryň üstini görkez Bu nusga hem häzirki sanatyň durumyny 8.5 F1 noktalary bilen çykarýar", 'af': "Bestaande vraag antwoord metodes infer antwoorde of van 'n kennis basis of van rooi teks. Terwyl kennis basis (Kb) metodes is goed na antwoord van komponensielle vrae, word hulle prestasie dikwels geïnvloor deur die onvolledige van die Kb. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Au teenstemming, web teks bevat miljoene fakte wat in die Kb is absent, maar in 'n ongestruktureerde vorm. Universele skema kan ondersteun redering op die union van beide struktureerde Kbs en onstruktureerde teks deur hulle in 'n gemeenskaplike inbêde ruimte te aligneer. In hierdie papier uitbrei ons universele skema na natuurlike taal vraag antwoord, gebruik Geheue netwerke om by die groot liggaam van fakte in die kombinasie van teks en Kb te bied. Ons modele kan in 'n einde-tot-einde modus opgelei word op vraag-antwoord paar. Evaluering resultate op Spades fill- in- the- blank vraag antwoord datastel vertoon dat die gebruik van universele skema vir vraag antwoord is beter as die gebruik van óf 'n Kb of teks alleen. Hierdie model uitvoer ook die huidige staat van die kuns deur 8. 5 F1 punte.", 'sw': 'Swali zinazopo zinazojibu mbinu zisizo na majibu mbaya ama kutoka kwenye msingi wa maarifa au kuandika ujumbe usio sahihi. Wakati msingi wa maarifa (KB) ni vizuri katika kujibu maswali ya makundi, utendaji wao mara nyingi unaathirika na ukosefu wa KB. Au kinyume chake, maandishi ya mtandaoni ina mamilioni ya ukweli ambao haupo KB, hata hivyo katika mfumo usiotengenezwa. Mpango wa ulimwengu unaweza kuunga mkono hoja juu ya muungano wa viungo vya KBs na ujumbe ulioanzishwa kwa kuitambua katika anga la kawaida. Katika karatasi hii tunaongeza mpango wa ulimwengu wa kujibu maswali ya lugha asili, kutumia mitandao ya kumbukumbu ili kushiriki mwili mkubwa wa ukweli katika kuunganisha ujumbe na KB. Our models can be trained in an end-to-end fashion on question-answer pairs.  Matokeo ya uthibitisho katika swali la kujibu taarifa zilizopo wazi nchini Hispania yanaonyesha kuwa matumizi ya mpango wa ulimwengu wa kujibu ni bora kuliko kutumia ama kutumia ujumbe wa KB au maandishi pekee. Mfano huu pia unaonyesha hali ya sasa ya sanaa kwa pointi 8.5 F1.', 'sq': 'Metodat ekzistuese për përgjigjen e pyetjeve përfshijnë përgjigjet ose nga një bazë njohurie ose nga teksti i papërpunuar. Ndërsa metodat e bazës së njohurive (KB) janë të mira në përgjigjen e pyetjeve kompozitive, performanca e tyre shpesh ndikohet nga pakompletësia e KB-së. Përkundrazi, teksti web përmban miliona fakte që nuk janë në KB, megjithatë në një form ë të paistrukturuar. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space.  Në këtë letër zgjerojmë skemën universale në përgjigjen e pyetjeve të gjuhës natyrore, duke përdorur rrjetet e kujtesës për të ndjekur trupin e madh të fakteve në kombinimin e tekstit dhe KB. Modelet tona mund të trajnohen në një mënyrë të fundit në çifte pyetje-përgjigje. Rezultatet e vlerësimit në Spades filling-in-the-blank question answering dataset tregojnë se shfrytëzimi i skemës universale për përgjigjen e pyetjeve është më i mirë se përdorimi ose i një KB ose vetëm teksti. Ky model është gjithashtu më i lartë se aktuali me 8.5 pikë F1.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի հարցերին պատասխանելու մեթոդներ, որոնք հանգեցնում են պատասխաններին կամ գիտելիքի հիմքից, կամ նախատեսված տեքստից: Մինչդեռ գիտելիքի հիմքի (ԿԲ) մեթոդները լավ են պատասխանում բաղադրական հարցերին, նրանց արտադրությունը հաճախ ազդում է ԿԲ-ի անլրիվ արտադրությունից: Ի հակառակ դեպքում, վեբ տեքստը պարունակում է միլիոնավոր փաստեր, որոնք ԿԲ-ում բացակայում են, սակայն ոչ կառուցվածքային ձևով: Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ընդլայնում ենք համաշխարհային սխեմանը բնական լեզվի հարցերին պատասխանելու համար, օգտագործելով հիշողության ցանցերը, որպեսզի զբաղվեն փաստերի մեծ մարմինով տեքստի և Ք. Մեր մոդելները կարող են վերջ-վերջ սովորեցնել հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգերի վրա: Արժեքների արդյունքները, որոնք պատասխանում են սպիտակների դատարկ հարցերին, ցույց են տալիս, որ հարցերի պատասխանելու համաշխարհային սխեմայի օգտագործումը ավելի լավ է, քան միայն կիբ-ի կամ տեքստի օգտագործումը: Այս մոդելը նույնպես արտադրում է ներկայիս լավագույնը 8.5 F1 միավորով:', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে কম উত্তর প্রদান করা হয় অথবা ভুল টেক্সট থেকে। যদিও জ্ঞানের বেস (কেবি) পদ্ধতি সংগঠনের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে ভালোভাবে থাকে, তাদের কর্মকাণ্ড প্রায়শ কেবির অসম্পূর্ণ ক্ বিরোধী, ওয়েব টেক্সটের মধ্যে লক্ষ লক্ষ কোটি তথ্য আছে যা কেবিতে অনুপস্থিত, কিন্তু একটি নির্মিত ফর্মে। বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের স্কীমা সাধারণ বিভিন্ন স্থানে তাদের চিহ্নিত করার মাধ্যমে যুক্তি প্রদান করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের স্কীমা বাড়িয়ে দেই, মেমোরি নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে লেখা এবং  আমাদের মডেলগুলো প্রশ্নের উত্তর জোড়ায় শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা যাবে। Evaluation results on Spades fill-in-the-blank question answering dataset show that exploiting universal schema for question answering is better than using either a KB or text alone.  এই মডেল ৮. ৫ এফ১ বিন্দুর মাধ্যমে বর্তমান অবস্থানের পরিস্থিতি প্রদর্শন করে।', 'az': "Existing sual cavab verm…ôk metodlarńĪnńĪ bilgi √ľss√ľnd…ôn ya da s…ôviyy…ôd…ôn cavab verir. Bilim √ľss√ľ (KB) metodlarńĪ kompozisyonal suallarńĪna cavab verm…ôkd…ô yaxŇüńĪ olaraq, onlarńĪn performanslarńĪ sńĪk-sńĪq KB'in tamamlanmasńĪ t…ôsirind…ôn etmiŇüdir. ∆Źksin…ô, web metinl…ôri KB i√ßind…ô olmayan milyonlarca fakta i√ß…ôrir, amma qurulmadńĪńüńĪ formda. √úniversal Ňěema h…ôr ikisinin strukturlu KB v…ô strukturlu m…ôtnl…ôrin birlikd…ô razńĪlaŇümalarńĪnńĪ d…ôst…ôkl…ôy…ô bil…ôr ki, onlarńĪ orta yerd…ô yerl…ôŇüdir…ô bil…ôr. Bu kańüńĪzda √ľniversal schema t…ôbi…ôtli dil sualńĪna cavab verm…ôk, m…ôktub v…ô KB birlikd…ô b√∂y√ľk faktlarńĪn b…ôzisin…ô katńĪlmaq √ľ√ß√ľn Memory ańülarńĪnńĪ istifad…ô edirik. Bizim modell…ôrimiz sual-cavab √ßiftl…ôri il…ô son-son modda t…ôhsil edil…ô bil…ôr. Spades dolu-boŇü sual qutusunda cavab veril…ôn veril…ôn qutusundakńĪ deńüerlendirm…ô sonu√ßlarńĪ sual qutusuna cavab verm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn universel schema istifad…ô etm…ôk KB ya da metin istifad…ôsind…ôn daha xeyirlidir. Bu model h…ôm√ßinin art ńĪq durumunu 8.5 F1 noktalarńĪ il…ô istifad…ô edir.", 'am': "የአሁኑ ጥያቄ የመልስ ጥያቄዎች ወይም ከአውቀት መቀመጫው ወይም ከጥሩ ጽሑፍ መቀበል ያነሳሉ፡፡ የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች (KB) ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ መልካም ሲሆኑ፣ የሥርዓታቸውን ብዙ ጊዜ በKB ጥቅምት ይጠቅማል፡፡ ወይም ተቃውሞ፣ የዌብ ጽሑፍ በመሊዮን የሚሊዮን ውሸቶች በKB ውስጥ ያልቆጠሩ ነው፣ ነገር ግን በተመሠረተ ፎርማት ውስጥ ነው፡፡ የዓለምአቀፍ ስሜ በቁጥጥር የተመሠረቱት KBs እና የተመሠረቱት ጽሑፍ በመቀናቀል በተለየ ስፋት ማቀናቀል ይችላል፡፡ In this paper we extend universal schema to natural language question answering, employing Memory networks to attend to the large body of facts in the combination of text and KB.  ሞዴሌዎቻችን የጥያቄ መልስ ሁለትን በሚያስተምርበት ፍጻሜ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ይህ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር", 'bs': 'Postojeće pitanje odgovarajuće metode infeciraju odgovore ili iz baze znanja ili iz sirovog teksta. Iako metode znanja (KB) su dobre na odgovoru na kompozicionalna pitanja, njihova učinka često utječe na nepotpunost KB-a. A suprotno, web tekst sadrži milione činjenica koje nisu u KB-u, međutim, u neostrukturnom obliku. Univerzalna šema može podržati razgovor o sindikatu strukturiranog KB-a i neostrukturiranog teksta poravnajući ih u zajedničkom ugrađenom prostoru. U ovom papiru proširimo univerzalnu šemu na odgovor na prirodno jezičko pitanje, koristeći mreže pamćenja da prisustvujemo velikom tijelu činjenica u kombinaciji teksta i KB. Naši modeli mogu biti obučeni na kraju na kraju na par odgovora. Rezultati procjene na ispunjavanju Spades-a-prazno pitanje odgovarajućeg seta podataka pokazuju da je korištenje univerzalne šeme za odgovor na pitanje bolje nego korištenje ili samo KB ili teksta. Ovaj model također iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti 8,5 F1 bodova.', 'ca': "Els mètodes existents de resposta a preguntes infereixen respostes de una base de coneixements o de text brut. While knowledge base (KB) methods are good at answering compositional questions, their performance is often affected by the incompleteness of the KB.  Al contrari, el text web conté milions de fets que no hi ha al KB, però en forma no estructurada. Universal schema can support reasoning on the union of both structured KBs and unstructured text by aligning them in a common embedded space.  En aquest paper estenem l'esquema universal a respondre a preguntes de llenguatge natural, utilitzant xarxes de Memory per atendre al gran nombre de fets en combinació de text i KB. Els nostres models es poden entrenar de forma final a final en parells de respostes a preguntes. Els resultats de l'evaluació en Spades que respon a preguntes en blanc mostran que explotar l'esquema universal per respondre a preguntes és millor que utilitzar un KB o un text sols. Aquest model també supera l'actualitat en 8,5 punts F1.", 'cs': 'Stávající metody odpovědí na otázky odvozují odpovědi buď ze znalostní báze, nebo ze surového textu. Zatímco metody znalostní báze (KB) jsou dobré v zodpovězení kompozičních otázek, jejich výkon je často ovlivněn neúplností KB. Webový text obsahuje miliony faktů, které v KB chybí, avšak v nestrukturované podobě. Univerzální schéma může podporovat uvažování o spojení strukturovaných KBs a nestrukturovaného textu zarovnáním do společného vloženého prostoru. V tomto článku rozšiřujeme univerzální schéma na odpověď na otázky přirozeného jazyka s využitím paměťových sítí, abychom se věnovali velkému množství faktů v kombinaci textu a KB. Naše modely mohou být trénovány komplexně na párech otázek-odpověď. Výsledky hodnocení datové sady odpovědí na otázky Spades vyplňují prázdnou otázku ukazují, že využití univerzálního schématu pro zodpovězení otázek je lepší než použití KB nebo samotného textu. Tento model také překonává současný stav techniky o 8,5 body F1.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad küsimustele vastamise meetodid järeldavad vastuseid kas teadmistebaasist või toortekstist. Kuigi teadmistebaasi (KB) meetodid oskavad kompositsiooniküsimustele vastata hästi, mõjutab nende tulemuslikkust sageli KB puudulikkus. Vastupidi, veebitekst sisaldab miljoneid fakte, mis puuduvad KB-s, kuid struktureerimata kujul. Universaalne skeem võib toetada nii struktureeritud KBde kui ka struktureerimata teksti ühendamist, viies need ühisesse manustatud ruumi. Käesolevas töös laiendame universaalset skeemi looduskeelele küsimustele vastamisele, kasutades mäluvõrgustikke, et käsitleda suurt hulka fakte teksti ja KB kombinatsioonis. Meie mudeleid saab treenida otsast otsani küsimuste ja vastuste paaridel. Küsimustele vastamise andmekogumi Spades hindamistulemused näitavad, et universaalse skeemi kasutamine küsimustele vastamiseks on parem kui KB või teksti kasutamine. See mudel ületab ka praegust tehnika taset 8,5 F1 punkti võrra.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat kysymyksenvastausmenetelmﾃ､t pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelevﾃ､t vastaukset joko tietopohjasta tai raakatekstistﾃ､. Vaikka tietopohjamenetelmﾃ､t ovat hyviﾃ､ kompositiivisiin kysymyksiin vastaamisessa, niiden suorituskykyyn vaikuttaa usein tietopohjan puutteellisuus. Pﾃ､invastoin, web-teksti sisﾃ､ltﾃ､ﾃ､ miljoonia faktoja, jotka puuttuvat KB:stﾃ､, mutta rakenteettomassa muodossa. Yleismalli voi tukea pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelyﾃ､ sekﾃ､ strukturoidun KB:n ettﾃ､ strukturoimattoman tekstin yhdistﾃ､misestﾃ､ kohdistamalla ne yhteiseen sulautettuun tilaan. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa laajennamme yleismaailmallisen kaavan luonnolliseen kieleen kysymyksiin vastaamiseen kﾃ､yttﾃ､mﾃ､llﾃ､ Memory-verkostoja kﾃ､sittelemﾃ､ﾃ､n tekstin ja KB:n yhdistelmﾃ､n suuria faktoja. Mallimme voidaan kouluttaa loppuun asti kysymys-vastauspareilla. Spades fill-in-the-blank kysymysvastausaineiston arviointitulokset osoittavat, ettﾃ､ yleismallin hyﾃｶdyntﾃ､minen kysymysvastauksessa on parempi kuin pelkkﾃ､ KB tai teksti. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ malli myﾃｶs ylittﾃ､ﾃ､ nykytekniikan 8,5 F1 pisteellﾃ､.', 'jv': 'Paling Sing sapa-sapa sistem berkas (K) sing luwih apik dhéwé nang sapa-sapa sing ditambah, saiki ono saiki batasané awak dhéwé kuwi kB sing ora bisa mbatalé. Wurung malah, teks web sadine milion karo barang sing gak bukane nang Kib, sanes ora bisa seperaktur. Universal Siji iso nggunaké berarti ning union iki MB lan akeh iso nggawe Nang paper iki, kita ngubah universel sistem kanggo bantayan langgar aturan suaraning, iso nggunakake mempernik aturan kanggo gabung bantayan mruput kanggo ngubah bantayan seneng kotak lan kB model kita iso kelakon segala macerah dumadhi ra cah-cah dumadhi iki banget Validity Validity', 'ha': "Existing question answering methods infer answers either from a knowledge base or from raw text.  A lokacin da misalin ilmi (KB) masu kyau ne a karɓa wa masu cikin muhimmanci, aikin su yana da amfani da daidai na KB. Ko yi daidai, rubutun web na ƙunsa da millions masu fakta da ba'a faka cikin KB, kuma amma cikin wani tsari wanda ba'a gina shi ba. Shirya Dukkan Duniya yana iya ƙarfafa masu inganci kan haɗi na KBs da wanda aka samar da su da kuma an daidaita matsayin da ake samar da su cikin filin da aka ƙunsa da shi. Daga wannan takarda, Munã shimfiɗa skima na universal zuwa mai tambaya cikin harshen asiyya, kuma Munã amfani da tarayya na hukãrar tunãtarwa zuwa duk abu mai girma cikin kombincin littãfi da KB. Ana iya sanar da misalinmu a cikin shirin ta ƙara zuwa ta ƙara kan nau'in sunan tambaya. Sura'arin da za'a iya cika cikin Filinaiki-da-mai ba da tambayi mai amfani da matsayin da aka nuna cewa yin amfani da skima na ɗabi'a wa mai tambaya shi ne mafi alhẽri daga ka yi amfani da ko kuma don a iya amfani da wani KB ko matsayi guda. Wannan motel yana tafiyar da halin-mai yanzu da point 8.5 F1.", 'sk': 'Obstoječe metode odgovarjanja na vprašanja sklepajo odgovore bodisi iz baze znanja bodisi iz surovega besedila. Medtem ko so metode baze znanja (KB) dobre pri odgovarjanju na kompozicijska vprašanja, na njihovo uspešnost pogosto vpliva nepopolnost KB. Nasprotno, spletno besedilo vsebuje milijone dejstev, ki niso v KB, vendar v nestrukturirani obliki. Univerzalna shema lahko podpira razmišljanje o združitvi strukturiranih KB-jev in nestrukturiranega besedila tako, da jih uskladi v skupni vdelani prostor. V tem prispevku razširimo univerzalno shemo na odgovore na vprašanja v naravnem jeziku, pri čemer uporabljamo pomnilniška omrežja, da bi se posvetili velikemu naboru dejstev v kombinaciji besedila in KB. Naše modele lahko usposabljamo na celoten način na parih vprašanj-odgovorov. Rezultati vrednotenja podatkovnega nabora podatkov za odgovore na vprašanja z zapolnitvijo praznih pikov kažejo, da je izkoriščanje univerzalne sheme za odgovor na vprašanja boljše kot uporaba KB ali besedila samo. Ta model tudi presega trenutno najsodobnejše za 8,5 točke F1.', 'he': 'שיטות עונות על שאלות קיימות מעלות תשובות או מבסיס ידע או מבסיס טקסט חומר. בעוד שיטות בסיס הידע (KB) טובות בתשובה לשאלות מורכבות, ההופעה שלהם לפעמים משפיעה על ידי חוסר מלאות KB. ההפך, טקסט האינטרנט מכיל מיליוני עובדות שנעדרות בקי.בי.איי, עם זאת בצורה לא מבושלת. רשת יוניברסלית יכולה לתמוך בהיגיון על האיגוד של KB מבוססים וגם טקסט לא מבוסס על ידי התייחס אליהם במרחב מעורבב משותף. בעיתון הזה אנו ממשיכים את המערכת האוניברסלית לשאלות שפות טבעיות עונות, משתמשים ברשתות זיכרון כדי להשתתף בגופה הגדולה של עובדות בשילוב של טקסט ו KB. הדוגמנים שלנו יכולים להיות מאומנים באופן סוף-סוף על זוגות תשובות-שאלות. תוצאות הערכה על ספיידס מלאים את השאלה הריקה שמעניין על קבוצת נתונים מראות שהניצלות של סכימה אוניברסלית לענות על שאלות היא טובה יותר מאשר להשתמש באמצעות KB או טקסט בלבד. הדוגמא הזאת גם מגבירה את המצב הנוכחי של האומנות ב-8.5 נקודות F1.', 'bo': 'Existing question answering methods infer answers from a knowledge base or from raw text. ངོས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གཞི་རྟེན(KB)ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་དོན་དག་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྤྲོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་དེ་ཚོའི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལྡོག་དང་ཁྱད་པར་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཡིག་ཆ་ས་ཡ་ཙམ་རྣམས་KB ནང་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་འཆར་གཞུང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་དང་མི་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚོའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་ལ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོངས་ཁྱབ་ཆོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Spades འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྟོང་བ་ཡོད་པའི་سؤེ ས་སྟོང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྲངས མིག་སྔར་འདིས་ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱིས་འགྲོ་བ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Deep Network with Visual Text Composition Behavior', 'ar': 'شبكة عميقة مع سلوك تكوين النص المرئي', 'fr': 'Un réseau profond avec un comportement de composition de texte visuel', 'pt': 'Uma rede profunda com comportamento de composição de texto visual', 'es': 'Una red profunda con comportamiento de composición visual de texto', 'ja': '視覚的なテキスト構成動作を備えた深いネットワーク', 'hi': 'दृश्य पाठ संरचना व्यवहार के साथ एक गहरा नेटवर्क', 'zh': '有可视文本合行之深网络', 'ru': 'Глубокая сеть с визуальным текстовым поведением', 'ga': 'Líonra domhain le hOibriú Comhdhéanta Téacs Amhairc', 'el': 'Ένα βαθύ δίκτυο με συμπεριφορά σύνθεσης οπτικού κειμένου', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Mély hálózat vizuális szövegösszetételű viselkedéssel', 'kk': 'Көрінетін мәтін құрылғысының қасиеттеріName', 'it': 'Una rete profonda con comportamento di composizione del testo visivo', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Dalam Dengan Perilaku Komposisi Teks Visual', 'ml': 'കാഴ്ചയുള്ള പദാവലി കമ്പ്യൂഷന്\u200d സ്വഭാവം', 'mt': 'Netwerk Profond b’Imġiba tal-Kompożizzjoni tat-Test Viżwali', 'mn': 'Визуал Текст Сонголтын Холбоо', 'ro': 'O rețea profundă cu comportament vizual de compoziție a textului', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Głęboka sieć z wizualnym zachowaniem składania tekstu', 'sr': 'Duboka mreža sa ponašanjem vizuelnog teksta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Shabakada hoose ee la xiriira muuqashada Text Composition Behavior', 'sv': 'Ett djupt nĂ¤tverk med visuell textsammansĂ¤ttningsbeteende', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mạng chìm với cấu trúc hình ảnh', 'bg': 'Дълбока мрежа с поведение на визуален текст', 'nl': 'Een diep netwerk met visuele tekstsamenstelling', 'hr': 'Duboka mreža sa ponašanjem vizuelnog teksta', 'da': 'Et dybt netværk med visuel tekstsammensætning', 'id': 'Jaringan Dalam Dengan Perilaku Komposisi Teks Visual', 'de': 'Ein tiefes Netzwerk mit visuellem Textzusammensetzungsverhalten', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa kina wa chini yenye Ubadilishi wa Matandao ya Visual', 'tr': 'Görnöşin Metin Ýygymy bilen Zat A ýry', 'ko': '시각적 텍스트 합성 행위를 가진 심층 네트워크', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një rrjet i thellë me sjellje teksti vizual', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Görünür Metin İşleşməsi İdarəti', 'bs': 'Duboka mreža sa ponašanjem vizuelnog teksta', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Una xarxa profunda amb comportament de composició visual', 'et': 'Sügav võrk visuaalse teksti koostamise käitumisega', 'cs': 'Hluboká síť s chováním kompozice vizuálního textu', 'fi': 'Syvä verkko visuaalisella tekstin koostumuksella', 'sk': 'Globoko omrežje z obnašanjem vizualne sestave besedila', 'jv': 'deep Network with Visual Text Sampling', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'མཐོང་ནུས་ཡི་གེའི་བཤད་སྟངས་འགྲོ་སྟངས་དང་དྲ་བ་རྒྱུད་པ'}
{'en': 'While natural languages are compositional, how state-of-the-art neural models achieve compositionality is still unclear. We propose a deep network, which not only achieves competitive accuracy for text classification, but also exhibits compositional behavior. That is, while creating hierarchical representations of a piece of text, such as a sentence, the lower layers of the network distribute their layer-specific attention weights to individual words. In contrast, the higher layers compose meaningful phrases and clauses, whose lengths increase as the networks get deeper until fully composing the sentence.', 'pt': 'Embora as linguagens naturais sejam composicionais, ainda não está claro como os modelos neurais de última geração alcançam a composicionalidade. Propomos uma rede profunda, que não apenas alcança precisão competitiva para classificação de texto, mas também exibe comportamento composicional. Ou seja, ao criar representações hierárquicas de um pedaço de texto, como uma frase, as camadas inferiores da rede distribuem seus pesos de atenção específicos de camada para palavras individuais. Em contraste, as camadas superiores compõem frases e orações significativas, cujos comprimentos aumentam à medida que as redes se aprofundam até compor completamente a frase.', 'ar': 'في حين أن اللغات الطبيعية تركيبية ، فإن كيفية تحقيق أحدث النماذج العصبية للتكوين لا تزال غير واضحة. نقترح شبكة عميقة لا تحقق الدقة التنافسية لتصنيف النص فحسب ، بل تعرض أيضًا السلوك التركيبي. أي ، أثناء إنشاء تمثيلات هرمية لجزء من النص ، مثل جملة ، توزع الطبقات السفلية للشبكة أوزان الانتباه الخاصة بطبقة معينة على الكلمات الفردية. في المقابل ، تؤلف الطبقات العليا عبارات وجمل ذات مغزى ، تزداد أطوالها مع تعمق الشبكات حتى تكوين الجملة بالكامل.', 'es': 'Si bien los lenguajes naturales son compositivos, aún no está claro cómo los modelos neuronales de última generación logran la composicionalidad. Proponemos una red profunda, que no solo logre una precisión competitiva para la clasificación de textos, sino que también muestre un comportamiento compositivo. Es decir, al crear representaciones jerárquicas de un fragmento de texto, como una oración, las capas inferiores de la red distribuyen sus pesos de atención específicos de cada capa a palabras individuales. Por el contrario, las capas superiores componen frases y cláusulas significativas, cuya longitud aumenta a medida que las redes se profundizan hasta componer completamente la oración.', 'fr': "Alors que les langages naturels sont compositionnels, on ne sait toujours pas comment les modèles neuronaux de pointe atteignent la compositionalité. Nous proposons un réseau profond, qui permet non seulement d'obtenir une précision compétitive pour la classification du texte, mais qui présente également un comportement compositionnel. En d'autres termes, lors de la création de représentations hiérarchiques d'un morceau de texte, comme une phrase, les couches inférieures du réseau répartissent leur poids d'attention spécifique à chaque couche sur des mots individuels. En revanche, les couches supérieures composent des phrases et des clauses significatives, dont la longueur augmente à mesure que les réseaux s'approfondissent jusqu'à la composition complète de la phrase.", 'hi': 'जबकि प्राकृतिक भाषाएं रचनात्मक हैं, अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका मॉडल रचनात्मकता कैसे प्राप्त करते हैं, यह अभी भी स्पष्ट नहीं है। हम एक गहरे नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो न केवल पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रतिस्पर्धी सटीकता प्राप्त करता है, बल्कि रचनात्मक व्यवहार भी प्रदर्शित करता है। यही है, पाठ के एक टुकड़े के पदानुक्रमित प्रतिनिधित्व बनाते समय, जैसे कि एक वाक्य, नेटवर्क की निचली परतें व्यक्तिगत शब्दों में अपने परत-विशिष्ट ध्यान वजन वितरित करती हैं। इसके विपरीत, उच्च परतें सार्थक वाक्यांशों और खंडों की रचना करती हैं, जिनकी लंबाई बढ़ जाती है क्योंकि नेटवर्क पूरी तरह से वाक्य की रचना तक गहरे हो जाते हैं।', 'ja': '自然言語は構成的であるが、最先端のニューラルモデルがどのように構成性を達成するかはまだ明確ではない。ディープネットワークを提案し、テキスト分類の競争力のある精度を実現するだけでなく、構成的な挙動も示します。すなわち、文章などのテキストの階層的表現を作成しながら、ネットワークの下層は、レイヤー固有の注意重みを個々の単語に分配する。対照的に、上位のレイヤーは意味のあるフレーズと句を構成し、その長さは、文章を完全に構成するまでネットワークが深くなるにつれて増加します。', 'zh': '虽自然语言为性,先进神经形,未可知也。 建一深网络,则文本之竞准确性,而有构图行矣。 亦谓创一段文本(如句)之分,网络下特定于图层者,权重分之单词。 反此者,高者为短语子句,长随网络深入而益之,以至于句。', 'ru': 'Хотя естественные языки являются композиционными, все еще неясно, каким образом современные нейронные модели достигают композиционности. Мы предлагаем глубокую сеть, которая не только достигает конкурентной точности для классификации текста, но и проявляет композиционное поведение. То есть, создавая иерархические представления фрагмента текста, такого как предложение, нижние слои сети распределяют свои веса внимания к слоям по отдельным словам. Напротив, более высокие слои составляют значимые фразы и предложения, длина которых увеличивается по мере углубления сетей до полного составления предложения.', 'ga': 'Cé gur teangacha comhdhéanaimh iad na teangacha nádúrtha, ní léir fós conas a bhaineann samhlacha néarúla den scoth amach comhdhéanamh. Molaimid gréasán domhain, a ghnóthaíonn ní hamháin cruinneas iomaíoch maidir le haicmiú téacs, ach a thaispeánann iompar cumadóireachta freisin. Is é sin, agus léirithe ordlathacha á gcruthú ar phíosa téacs, cosúil le habairt, dáileann sraitheanna íochtair an líonra a n-ualú aird ar na sraitheanna ar leith ar fhocail aonair. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, cumann na sraitheanna níos airde frásaí agus clásail brí, a mhéadaíonn a bhfad de réir mar a théann na líonraí níos doimhne go dtí go gcomhdhéantar an abairt go hiomlán.', 'ka': 'თუმცა ნაირადი ენები კომპოზიციონალურია, როგორ კომპოზიციონალური მოდელები მიიღებენ კომპოზიციონალურობა უკვე არაფერი. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ძალიან ქსელი, რომელიც არა მხოლოდ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის კონპექტიური წესიერება, მაგრამ კომპოზიციონალური ქცევა გამოიყ ეს არის, როცა ტექსტის ნაწილად იერაქტიკური გამოსახულებების შექმნა, როგორც წერტილის ნაწილად, ქსელის ნაწილად განსახულებელი სიტყვებისთვის განსახულებელი ახალი სიტყვებისთ კონტრასტში, უფრო მეტი სინამდვილეები შექმნის ცნობილი ფრაზები და კლასები, რომელიც სინამდვილეები უფრო დიდია, როდესაც ქსელები უფრო დიდია, სანამ', 'el': 'Ενώ οι φυσικές γλώσσες είναι συνθηματικές, το πώς τα σύγχρονα νευρωνικά μοντέλα επιτυγχάνουν τη σύνθεση είναι ακόμα ασαφές. Προτείνουμε ένα βαθύ δίκτυο, το οποίο όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστική ακρίβεια για την ταξινόμηση κειμένων, αλλά και παρουσιάζει συνθετική συμπεριφορά. Δηλαδή, ενώ δημιουργούνται ιεραρχικές αναπαραστάσεις ενός κομματιού κειμένου, όπως μια πρόταση, τα κάτω στρώματα του δικτύου διανέμουν τα βάρη προσοχής τους σε μεμονωμένες λέξεις. Αντίθετα, τα υψηλότερα στρώματα συνθέτουν σημαντικές φράσεις και ρήτρες, των οποίων τα μήκη αυξάνονται καθώς τα δίκτυα γίνονται βαθύτερα μέχρι να συνθέσουν πλήρως την πρόταση.', 'hu': 'Míg a természetes nyelvek kompozíciós jellegűek, még mindig nem világos, hogy a legkorszerűbb neurális modellek hogyan érhetik el a kompozíciót. Olyan mély hálózatot javasolunk, amely nemcsak versenypontosságot ér el a szövegosztályozás terén, hanem kompozíciós viselkedést is mutat. Ez azt jelenti, hogy miközben hierarchikus ábrázolásokat hoznak létre egy szövegrész, például egy mondat, a hálózat alsó rétegei osztják el a rétegspecifikus figyelem súlyát az egyes szavakra. Ezzel szemben a magasabb rétegek értelmes kifejezéseket és záradékokat alkotnak, amelyek hossza növekszik, ahogy a hálózatok mélyebbülnek, amíg teljesen meg nem írják a mondatot.', 'it': "Mentre i linguaggi naturali sono compositivi, come i modelli neurali all'avanguardia raggiungano la compositività non è ancora chiaro. Proponiamo una rete profonda, che non solo raggiunge una precisione competitiva per la classificazione del testo, ma mostra anche un comportamento compositivo. Cioè, mentre creano rappresentazioni gerarchiche di un pezzo di testo, come una frase, gli strati inferiori della rete distribuiscono i loro pesi di attenzione specifici per livello alle singole parole. Al contrario, i livelli superiori compongono frasi e frasi significative, le cui lunghezze aumentano man mano che le reti diventano più profonde fino a comporre completamente la frase.", 'lt': 'While natural languages are compositional, how state-of-the-art neural models achieve compositionality is still unclear.  Siūlome gilų tinklą, kuris ne tik užtikrina konkurencinį teksto klasifikavimo tikslumą, bet ir parodo sudėtinį elgesį. Tai reiškia, kad kuriant hierarchinius teksto gabalo, pavyzdžiui, sakinį, žemesni tinklo sluoksniai paskirsto savo konkrečiam sluoksniui skirtus dėmesio svorius atskiriems žodžiams. Priešingai, aukštesniais sluoksniais sudaromos reikšmingos frazės ir išlygos, kurių ilgis didėja, nes tinklai gilėja iki visiško sakinio sudarymo.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што природните јазици се композиционални, како најдобрите нервни модели постигнуваат композиционалност сé уште не е јасно. Ние предложуваме длабока мрежа, која не само што постигнува конкурентна точност за класификацијата на текстот, туку и покажува композициско однесување. That is, while creating hierarchical representations of a piece of text, such as a sentence, the lower layers of the network distribute their layer-specific attention weights to individual words.  За разлика од тоа, повисоките слоеви сочинуваат значајни фрази и клаузули, чија должина се зголемува со тоа што мрежите стануваат подлабоки до целосно создавање на реченицата.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдері құрылған болса да, әртүрлі невралдық моделдері қалай құрылымдығын білмейді. Біз тек мәтін классификациясының тәртіпсіздігін емес, сондай-ақ композициялық әрекетін көрсетеді. Мысалы, мәтін бөлігінің иерархиялық түсініктерін құру кезінде, желінің төменгі қабаттары өзінің қабаттарының қатынасын бөліктеу үшін әрбір сөздерге таратылады. Осылайша, жоғары қабаттар мәліметті сөздер мен клюзелерді жасайды. Желілердің ұзындығы, сөзді толық құрып жатқанда, олардың ұзындығы толық түрленгенге дейін', 'ms': 'Sementara bahasa alami adalah komposisi, bagaimana model saraf state-of-the-art mencapai komposisi masih tidak jelas. Kami mengusulkan rangkaian yang dalam, yang tidak hanya mencapai ketepatan kompetitif untuk klasifikasi teks, tetapi juga menunjukkan perilaku komposisi. Sementara mencipta perwakilan hierarkis bagi sebahagian teks, seperti kalimat, lapisan bawah rangkaian mengedarkan berat perhatian tertentu lapisan kepada perkataan individu. Sebaliknya, lapisan yang lebih tinggi komponen frasa dan klausul yang bermakna, panjangnya meningkat semasa rangkaian menjadi lebih dalam sehingga penuh komponen kalimat.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li l-lingwi naturali huma kompożittivi, il-mod kif il-mudelli newrali l-aktar avvanzati jiksbu l-kompożizzjoni għadu mhux ċar. Aħna nipproponu netwerk profond, li mhux biss jikseb preċiżjoni kompetittiva għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test, iżda juri wkoll imġiba kompożittiva. Dan ifisser, filwaqt li jinħolqu rappreżentazzjonijiet ġerarkiċi ta’ biċċa ta’ test, bħal sentenza, is-saffi aktar baxxi tan-netwerk iqassmu l-piżijiet ta’ attenzjoni tagħhom speċifiċi għas-saff għal kliem individwali. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, is-saffi ogħla jikkostitwixxu frażijiet u klawżoli sinifikanti, li t-tul tagħhom jiżdied hekk kif in-netwerks isiru aktar profondi sakemm tiġi komposta bis-sħiħ is-sentenza.', 'no': 'Mens naturspråk er komposisjonelle, korleis tilstanden av kunstmodeller gjer komposisjonalitet er framleis ukjent. Vi foreslår ein dyp nettverk, som ikkje berre oppnår konkurrentivt nøyaktig for tekstklassifikasjon, men også viser komposisjonsoppførsel. Dette er, mens du lagar hierarkiske representasjonar av eit tekststykke, som eit setning, dei nedre lagene i nettverket distribuerer dei lagaspesifikke oppmerksvekta til enkelte ord. I contrast, dei høgare lagene lager betydelige fraser og klausar, som lengda øker når nettverket blir dypere til å komprimera setninga fullstendig.', 'pl': 'Chociaż języki naturalne są kompozycyjne, to w jaki sposób nowoczesne modele neuronowe osiągają kompozycyjność, wciąż nie jest jasne. Proponujemy głęboką sieć, która nie tylko osiąga konkurencyjną dokładność klasyfikacji tekstów, ale także wykazuje zachowania kompozycyjne. Oznacza to, że podczas tworzenia hierarchicznych reprezentacji kawałka tekstu, takiego jak zdanie, niższe warstwy sieci rozprowadzają swoje specyficzne dla warstwy wagi uwagi na poszczególne słowa. Natomiast wyższe warstwy tworzą znaczące frazy i klauzule, których długość zwiększa się wraz z głębszymi sieciami aż do pełnego składania zdania.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл бүтээлч байдаг ч, урлагийн мэдрэлийн загварууд хэрхэн бүтээлч байдлыг хүртэх нь тодорхой. Бид зөвхөн текст хуваалцааны зөвхөн өрсөлдөөний тодорхойлолт биш, мөн бүтээлч байдлыг илэрхийлдэг гүн гүнзгий сүлжээг суралцаж байна. Энэ нь, хэлбэрийн жишээг бий болгож байхдаа, сүлжээний доор давхар давхар нь анхаарал төрөлхтний жинхэнэ хэлбэрийг хэн нэгэн үг рүү хувааж байна. Харамсалтай нь өндөр хэлбэрүүд нь утгатай үг болон хэлбэрүүдийг бий болгодог. Шүлжээний урт нь илүү гүнзгий болдог.', 'ro': 'În timp ce limbile naturale sunt compoziționale, modul în care modelele neurale de ultimă generație ating compoziționalitatea este încă neclar. Propunem o rețea profundă, care nu numai că atinge o acuratețe competitivă pentru clasificarea textului, ci și prezintă comportament compozițional. Adică, în timp ce creează reprezentări ierarhice ale unei piese de text, cum ar fi o propoziție, straturile inferioare ale rețelei distribuie greutățile lor de atenție specifice stratului asupra cuvintelor individuale. În schimb, straturile superioare compun fraze și clauze semnificative, ale căror lungimi cresc pe măsură ce rețelele devin mai adânci până la compunerea completă a propoziției.', 'ml': 'While natural languages are compositional, how state-of-the-art neural models achieve compositionality is still unclear.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴമുള്ള ശൃംഖലം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനില്\u200d മാത്രം മത്സരിക്കുന്ന വ ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പോലെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, നെറ്റര്\u200dനെറ്റിന്റെ താഴെ തട്ടുകള്\u200d വിതരണം ച വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, അത്യുന്നതലകങ്ങള്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥമായ വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളും കൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ', 'sr': 'Iako su prirodni jezici kompozicionalni, kako su state-of-the-art neural models postigli kompozicionalnost i dalje nije jasna. Predlažemo duboku mrežu, koja ne samo postiže konkurentnu tačnost za klasifikaciju teksta, nego i pokazuje kompozicionalno ponašanje. To je, dok stvaraju hijerarhijske predstave komada teksta, poput rečenice, niže slojeve mreže distribuiraju svoju težinu pažnje posebnih slojeva na pojedinačne reči. Pored toga, viši slojevi sastavljaju smislene rečenice i klauzule, čije dužine povećavaju dok mreža ne budu dublje do potpunog sastavka rečenice.', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවල් සංවිධානය කරනවා නමුත්, කොහොමද ස්ථානය-of-the-art neural මොඩේල් සංවිධානයක් තාමත්  අපි ගොඩක් ජාලයෙක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි, ඒක තර්ජනයක් විතරයි පාළුවන් විතරයි, ඒත් ප්\u200dරති ඒක තමයි, පාළුවේ කොටස් කිරීමක් සිද්ධා කරමින්, වචනයක් වගේ, ජාලයේ පහළ ස්ථානයේ පහළ ස්ථානය ඔවුන්ගේ ස්ථානයේ  වෙනුවෙන්, උපරිම ස්ථානයේ තේරුම් වාක්ය සහ ක්ලායුස් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ජාලය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වාක්ය සම්', 'so': 'Inta lagu jiro luuqadaha dabiicadda ah waa mid la kooban yahay, sida qaababka asalka ah ee noocyada caqliga ah ay u soo gaadhaan sameynta weli ma ahan. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa shabakadda mool dheer, taas oo aan dhameystirka rasmiga u dhigista oo kaliya, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale muujiyaa dabeecada kooxaha. Taasi waa, marka aad sameynayso macluumaad ka mid ah qeyb-qoraal, tusaale ahaan xaraf, qaybsada shabakadda hoose waxay u kala qaybsadaan dhegtooda gaar ah oo u eg erayo gaar ah. In contrast, the higher layers compose meaningful phrases and clauses, whose lengths increase as the networks get deeper until fully composing the sentence.', 'sv': 'Medan naturliga språk är kompositionella, är hur state-of-the-art neurala modeller uppnår kompositionalitet fortfarande oklart. Vi föreslår ett djupt nätverk, som inte bara uppnår konkurrenskraftig noggrannhet för textklassificering, utan också uppvisar kompositionsbeteende. Det vill säga, medan man skapar hierarkiska representationer av en text, till exempel en mening, distribuerar de lägre skikten av nätverket sina lagerspecifika uppmärksamhetsvikter till enskilda ord. Däremot komponerar de högre skikten meningsfulla fraser och satser, vars längd ökar när nätverken blir djupare tills meningen är helt sammansatt.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ طبیعی زبانیں پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، کیونکر ایٹیٹ کی نئورل موڈل پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، یہاں تک بھی معلوم نہیں ہے. ہم ایک عمیق نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو نہ صرف ایک ٹیکسٹ کلاسی کے لئے مسابقات کی دقیق پہنچ سکتی ہے، بلکہ اس سے بھی کامپیوتنی رفتار کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. یہی ہے، جب ایک ٹکڑے کی عبارت بنائی جاتی ہے، جیسے ایک جماعت، نیٹ ورک کے نیچے لائرے اپنے لائر-خاص توجه کا وزن ایک دوسرے کلمات پر تقسیم کرتے ہیں. بغیر اس کے، بلند درجے مطلوب کلیزوں اور کلیزوں میں لکھتے ہیں، جن کی طول نیٹورک کی حالت میں زیادہ عمیق ہوتی ہے یہاں تک کہ کلیزوں کو پوری طرح پیدا کرنے تک.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழிகள் ஒருங்கிணைப்பாக இருக்கும் போது, நிலைமை- கலை புதிய மாதிரிகள் எப்படி ஒருங்கிணைப்பு பெறுவது இன்னு நாங்கள் ஒரு ஆழமான வலைப்பின்னலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு மட்டும் தேவையான திருத்தம் பெறுவது மட்ட இது, ஒரு வாக்கியத்திற்கு போன்ற ஒரு உரையின் துண்டத்தை உருவாக்கும் போது, வலைப்பின்னலின் குறைந்த அடுக்குகளை தனித்தனி வார்த்தைகளுக்க மாறுபட்டால், அதிக அடுக்குகள் அர்த்தமான சொற்றொடர்கள் மற்றும் குறிப்புகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறது, அதன் நீளம் பிணையத்தில் முழுமையாக சொ', 'uz': "Aslida tillar bir tartibi bo'lganda, ma'lumotning davlat neyron modellari qanday birlashtirishni bajarishi mumkin. Biz yaxshi tarmoq talab qilamiz, bu faqat matn darajasining rivojlanishiga murakkab aniqlash imkoniyatini topishimiz mumkin, balki butun bir tarmoq xuddi ko'rsatadi. Bu narsalar, bir so'z kabi matnning bir qismlarini yaratishda, tarmoq qatlamning pastki qatlamlarini bir necha so'zlarga ajratish mumkin. Ikkinchi darajada yuqori qatlamlar gapiradigan so'zlarni ma'nosiz va qatlamlarni qo'yish mumkin. Tarmoqning uzunligi bir so'zni butunlay qo'shishga qarang.", 'vi': 'Trong khi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên là nội bộ, cách thức người mẫu thần kinh hiện đại đạt độ hợp tác vẫn chưa rõ. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới sâu, không chỉ đạt được độ chính xác cạnh tranh cho việc phân loại văn bản, mà còn có hành vi hợp tác. Tức là, trong khi tạo ra các biểu tượng cấp dưới của một phần văn bản, như một câu, các tầng dưới của mạng phân chia các trọng lượng chú ý đặc biệt cấp độ cho từng chữ. Những lớp cao hơn tạo ra những đoạn văn có ý nghĩa, và những đoạn được kéo dài khi các mạng ngày một sâu hơn cho đến khi hoàn thành bản án.', 'bg': 'Докато естествените езици са композиционни, все още не е ясно как съвременните невронни модели постигат композиционна способност. Предлагаме дълбока мрежа, която не само постига конкурентна точност за класификация на текста, но и показва композиционно поведение. Тоест, докато създават йерархични представяния на парче текст, като изречение, долните слоеве на мрежата разпределят своите слоеве специфични за слоя тежести на вниманието си към отделните думи. За разлика от това, по-високите слоеве съставят смислени фрази и клаузи, чиято дължина се увеличава с напредването на мрежите до пълното съставяне на изречението.', 'da': 'Mens naturlige sprog er kompositionelle, hvordan state-of-the-art neurale modeller opnår kompositionalitet er stadig uklart. Vi foreslår et dybt netværk, der ikke kun opnår konkurrencedygtig nøjagtighed for tekstklassifikation, men også udviser kompositionsadfærd. Det vil sige, at mens der skabes hierarkiske repræsentationer af et stykke tekst, såsom en sætning, fordeler de nederste lag af netværket deres lagspecifikke opmærksomhedsvægt på individuelle ord. I modsætning hertil sammensætter de højere lag meningsfulde sætninger og sætninger, hvis længde stiger efterhånden som netværket bliver dybere, indtil sætningen er fuldstændig komponeret.', 'nl': 'Hoewel natuurlijke talen compositioneel zijn, is nog onduidelijk hoe state-of-the-art neurale modellen compositionaliteit bereiken. We stellen een diep netwerk voor, dat niet alleen concurrerende nauwkeurigheid voor tekstclassificatie bereikt, maar ook compositiegedrag vertoont. Dat wil zeggen, tijdens het creëren van hiërarchische representaties van een stuk tekst, zoals een zin, verdelen de onderste lagen van het netwerk hun laagspecifieke aandachtsgewichten over individuele woorden. Daarentegen vormen de hogere lagen betekenisvolle zinnen en clausules, waarvan de lengte toeneemt naarmate de netwerken dieper worden totdat de zin volledig is samengesteld.', 'hr': 'Iako su prirodni jezici kompozicionalni, kako su stanje umjetnih neuralnih modela postigli kompozicionalnost još uvijek nije jasno. Predlažemo duboku mrežu, koja ne samo postiže konkurentnu preciznost za klasifikaciju teksta, nego također pokazuje kompozicionalno ponašanje. To je, dok stvaraju hijerarhijske predstave komada teksta, poput rečenice, niže slojeve mreže distribuiraju svoju težinu pozornosti posebnih slojeva na pojedinačne riječi. Nasuprotno, viši slojevi sastavljaju značajne rečenice i klauzule, čije dužine povećavaju dok mreže ne budu dublje do potpunog sastavka rečenice.', 'de': 'Während natürliche Sprachen kompositorisch sind, ist noch unklar, wie moderne neuronale Modelle Compositionalität erreichen. Wir schlagen ein tiefes Netzwerk vor, das nicht nur wettbewerbsfähige Genauigkeit bei der Textklassifizierung erreicht, sondern auch kompositorisches Verhalten zeigt. Das heißt, beim Erstellen hierarchischer Darstellungen eines Textstücks, wie beispielsweise eines Satzes, verteilen die unteren Schichten des Netzwerks ihre lagenspezifischen Aufmerksamkeitsgewichte auf einzelne Wörter. Im Gegensatz dazu bilden die höheren Ebenen aussagekräftige Phrasen und Sätze, deren Länge zunimmt, wenn die Netzwerke tiefer werden, bis der Satz vollständig komponiert ist.', 'id': 'Sementara bahasa alami adalah komposisi, bagaimana model saraf state-of-the-art mencapai komposisi masih belum jelas. Kami mengusulkan jaringan dalam, yang tidak hanya mencapai akurasi kompetitif untuk klasifikasi teks, tetapi juga menunjukkan perilaku komposisi. Itu adalah, sementara menciptakan representation hierarkis dari bagian teks, seperti kalimat, lapisan bawah jaringan mendistribusikan berat perhatian spesifik lapisan mereka ke kata-kata individu. Sebaliknya, lapisan yang lebih tinggi mengumpulkan frasa dan klausul yang berarti, yang panjangnya meningkat sebagai jaringan menjadi lebih dalam sampai penuh mengumpulkan kalimat.', 'ko': '자연어는 합성이지만 가장 선진적인 신경모델이 어떻게 합성을 실현하는지는 아직 분명하지 않다.우리는 경쟁력 있는 텍스트 분류의 정확도를 실현할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 조합 행위도 나타낼 수 있는 깊이 있는 네트워크를 제시했다.즉, 텍스트(예를 들어 문장)의 차원 표시를 만들 때 네트워크의 낮은 층은 특정한 층의 주의권을 한 단어에 분배한다.그에 비해 더 높은 차원에서 의미 있는 단어와 종문을 구성하고 그 길이는 네트워크가 깊어지면서 문장이 완전히 구성될 때까지 증가한다.', 'fa': 'در حالی که زبان طبیعی ترکیب می\u200cکنند، چگونه مدل\u200cهای عصبی هنری به صورت ترکیب هنوز معلوم نیست. ما یک شبکه عمیق را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نه تنها دقیقات مسابقه برای فرهنگ متن را می\u200cرساند، بلکه همچنین رفتار ترکیب را نمایش می\u200cدهد. یعنی در حال ایجاد نمایش\u200cهای معمولی از یک قطعه متن، مثل یک جمله، لایه\u200cهای پایین شبکه، وزن توجه خاص لایه\u200cشان را به کلمات فردی تقسیم می\u200cکند. بر خلاف این، طبقه های بالاتر کلمه\u200cهای معنی و کلمه\u200cهای معنی را ترکیب می\u200cکنند، که طول آن هنگامی که شبکه\u200cها عمیق تر می\u200cشوند تا کاملاً جمله را ترکیب کند.', 'sw': 'Wakati lugha za asili ni pamoja, jinsi mifano ya kisasa ya ubongo unavyoweza kupata ushirikiano bado si wazi. Tunazipendekeza mtandao wa deep, ambalo sio tu hupata ufanisi wa ushindani wa kutangazwa kwa maandishi, bali pia huonyesha tabia za pamoja. Hiyo ni, wakati wa kutengeneza maoni ya kiuchumi ya makala ya maandishi, kama vile hukumu, vipande vya chini vya mitandao vilisambaza mitazamo yao yenye msimamo maalum kwa maneno binafsi. Tofauti na hilo, vipande vya juu vingi maneno yenye maana na makubaliano, ambavyo viwango vinavyoongezeka zaidi wakati mitandao yanapozidi kufikia hukumu hiyo.', 'af': "Terwyl natuurlike tale compositional is, hoe staat-van-die-kunste neurale modele bereik het compositionaliteit nog onbekend is. Ons stel 'n diep netwerk voor, wat nie alleen rekenaardige presies vir teks klasifikasie bereik nie, maar ook verskyn komposisielle gedrag. Dit is, terwyl hierarkies voorstellings van 'n stuk teks skep, soos 'n seting, die onderste laagte van die netwerk verdeel hul laag spesifieke aandagsvegte na individuele woorde. In contrast, die hoëre laagte stel betekende frase en klauses, wie se lengte groei as die netwerke dieper kry tot die seting volledig opstelling.", 'sq': 'Ndërsa gjuhët natyrore janë kompozitive, mënyra se si modelet neurale të moderne arrijnë kompozitivitetin është ende e paqartë. Ne propozojmë një rrjet të thellë, i cili jo vetëm arrin saktësinë konkurruese për klasifikimin e tekstit, por gjithashtu ekspozon sjellje kompozitive. Kjo është, ndërsa krijojnë përfaqësime hierarkike të një pjese teksti, të tilla si një fjalim, shtresa më të ulëta e rrjetit shpërndajnë peshat e tyre të vëmendjes specifike për shtresa ndaj fjalëve individuale. Në ndryshim, shtresat më të larta përbëjnë fraza dhe klauzula të kuptueshme, gjatësia e të cilave rritet ndërsa rrjetet bëhen më të thella deri sa të përbëjnë plotësisht frazën.', 'tr': 'Tebiýal diller meňzeşleýän bolsa-de, sungatyň durumynda nähili aýratyn bir nusga çykyp barýar. Biz çulyk a ýwany teklip klasifikasyýa üçin ýüz tutuşan däldigini teklip berýäris, ýöne kompozisyonal hereketi görkezýäris. Şeýle diýipdir, sözlem ýaly metin böleginiň iýerarhiýa suratlaryny bejermek üçin, şebekiň a şak katlarynyň ýerleri üns beren sözlere paýlaşýar. Yüksek katlar, sözlemi doly ýazmana çenli möhüm sözleri we çaklamalary ýazylýar.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋዎች በተሰናከሉ ጊዜ፣ የፀሐይ አካባቢ ዓይነቶች እንዴት እንደደረሱ ብሔራዊ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፍ ክፍተት ብቻ ሳይሆን የጥልቅ መረብ ማሰናከል እናሳስባታለን፥ ነገር ግን የተግባራዊ ሁኔታ ያሳያል፡፡ ይሄ፣ የጽሑፍ ክፍል፣ የጽሑፍ ክፍል አዋራጆችን በመፍጠር ጊዜ፣ የመረብ ደረጃዎች ታችኛውን የደረጃ-specific ትኩረት በተለየ ቃላት በሚያካክሉ ነው፡፡ በተለይም ላይ የላይኞቹ ደረጃዎች የጽሑፉን ውጤቶች እና ግንኙነትን የሚያስፈልጉትን እና ግንኙነትን ያቆማሉ፤ የመረብተኞቹም ርዝመት የፍርዱን ፍርድ እስኪፈጸም ድረስ ጥልቅ ይደርሳል።', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ բնական լեզուները բաղադրական են, մինչդեռ անհասկանալի է, թե ինչպես են ամենաբարձր նյարդային մոդելները հասնում բաղադրական կարևորության: Մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը ցանց, որը ոչ միայն հասնում է տեքստի դասակարգման մրցակցության ճշգրիտության, այլ նաև ցույց է տալիս բաղադրական վարքագիծ: Այսինքն, մինչ ստեղծում են տեքստի կտորի հիերարխիկ ներկայացումներ, ինչպիսիք են նախադասությունը, ցանցի ցածր շերտերը տարածում են իրենց շերտի կոնկրետ ուշադրության կշիռը առանձին բառերին: Դրան հակառակ, բարձր շերտերը կազմում են իմաստալից արտահայտություններ և բառեր, որոնց երկարությունը աճում է, երբ ցանցերը ավելի խորը են դառնում մինչև դասությունը ամբողջովին կազմելը:', 'bn': 'যদিও প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা একত্রিত, কিভাবে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের নিউরেল মডেলগুলো প্রতিষ্ঠান অর্জন করা এখনো অজ্ঞ। আমরা একটি গভীর নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি, যা কেবল টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশনের জন্য প্রতিযোগিতা সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে না, কিন্তু তারা একত্ এটা যখন একটি টেক্সটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করে, যেমন একটি বাক্য, নেটওয়ার্কের নীচের এলাকা বিতরণ করে ব্যক্তিগত শব্দের প্রতি তাদের স্তরের নির্দিষ বিপরীতে, উচ্চপর্যায়ের মানে অর্থহীন বাক্য এবং ক্লাস, যাদের দীর্ঘ বৃদ্ধি হচ্ছে যে পর্যন্ত নেটওয়ার্ক সম্পূর্ণ করা পর্যন্ত না তা', 'ca': "Mentre que les llengües naturals són composicionales, encara no és clar com els models neurals més avançats aconsegueixen la composicionalitat. Proposem una xarxa profunda, que no només aconsegueix la precisió competitiva de la classificació de textos, sinó també mostra comportament compositiu. Això és, mentre creant representacions jeràrquiques d'un tros de text, com una frase, les caps inferiors de la xarxa distribueixen els seus pes d'atenció específics per capa a paraules individuals. En canvi, les capes més altes componen frases i clàusules significatives, les llargues de les quals augmenten a mesura que les xarxes es profundeixen fins que componen plenament la frase.", 'cs': 'Zatímco přirozené jazyky jsou kompoziční, není ještě jasné, jak moderní neuronové modely dosahují kompozičnosti. Navrhujeme hlubokou síť, která nejen dosahuje konkurenční přesnosti pro klasifikaci textů, ale také vykazuje kompoziční chování. To znamená, že při vytváření hierarchických reprezentací kusu textu, například věty, dolní vrstvy sítě distribuují své váhy pozornosti specifické pro vrstvu na jednotlivá slova. Naproti tomu vyšší vrstvy tvoří smysluplné fráze a věty, jejichž délky se zvyšují s hlubšími sítěmi až do úplného složení věty.', 'et': 'Kuigi looduslikud keeled on kompositsioonilised, ei ole veel selge, kuidas kaasaegsed närvimudelid saavutavad kompositsiooni. Pakume välja sügava võrgustiku, mis mitte ainult ei saavuta konkurentsivõimelist täpsust teksti klassifitseerimisel, vaid näitab ka kompositsioonikäitumist. See tähendab, et samal ajal kui loovad tekstitüki hierarhilisi esitusi, näiteks lause, jaotavad võrgu alumised kihid oma kihipõhise tähelepanu kaalu üksikutele sõnadele. Seevastu kõrgemad kihid koostavad tähenduslikke lauseid ja lauseid, mille pikkus suureneb, kui võrgustikud sügavamaks muutuvad, kuni lause täielikult koostatakse.', 'fi': 'Vaikka luonnolliset kielet ovat kompositiivisia, on vielä epäselvää, miten uusimmat neuromallit saavuttavat kompositiivisuuden. Ehdotamme syvää verkostoa, joka paitsi saavuttaa kilpailullisen tarkkuuden tekstin luokittelussa, myös osoittaa sommittelukäyttäytymistä. Toisin sanoen luodessaan hierarkkisia esityksiä tekstistä, kuten lauseesta, verkon alemmat kerrokset jakavat tasokohtaiset huomiopainonsa yksittäisiin sanoihin. Sen sijaan korkeammat kerrokset muodostavat merkityksellisiä lauseita ja lauseita, joiden pituus kasvaa verkostojen syventyessä, kunnes lause on täysin sävelletty.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dillər birləşdirilmiş halda, sanat nöral modellərinin müəyyən edilməsi hələ də açıq deyildir. Biz bir a ğı təklif edirik ki, bu mətn klasifikasiyasının müqayisədi doğruluğuna nail olmaz, ancaq compositional davranışlarını da göstərir. Bu, bir mətn parças ının hiyerarşik göstəricilərini yaratmaq kimi, sözlərin a şağıdaki səviyyənin aşağı səviyyəni özlərinin tərəfindən təsirlərini indir sözlərə dağıtır. Əksinə, yüksək səviyyələr anlamlı sözlər və klauzular olub, ağların uzunluğu sözləri tamamlayana qədər daha derinlənir.', 'bs': 'Iako su prirodni jezici kompozicionalni, kako su state-of-the-art neural models postigli kompozicionalnost još uvijek nije jasna. Predlažemo duboku mrežu, koja ne samo postiže konkurentnu preciznost za klasifikaciju teksta, već i pokazuje kompozicionalno ponašanje. To je, dok stvaraju hijerarhijske predstave komada teksta, kao što je rečenica, niže slojeve mreže distribuiraju svoju težinu pažnje posebnih slojeva na pojedinačne riječi. Nasuprotno, visoki slojevi sastavljaju smislene rečenice i klauzule, čije dužine povećavaju dok mreža ne budu dublje do potpunog sastavka rečenice.', 'ha': "Aka da harshen asiyya masu haɗi, ko da misãlai-state-of-the-art za'a sami composition ba'a sani ba. Tuna goyyar da wani jerin babba, wanda bã ya iya sãmun tsari kawai ga fassarar matsayi, kuma amma yana sami aikin da ke samu. Wancan ne, a lokacin da ake ƙãga halittar hiera-wakillar wani rubutu na matsayin, kamar da maganar, sunan ƙas ƙanci na shirin tarayya na gauraya masu nauyi ga zance-ƙayyade. In contrast, the higher layers compose meaningful phrases and clauses, whose lengths increase as the networks get deeper until fully composing the sentence.", 'sk': 'Čeprav so naravni jeziki kompozicijski, še vedno ni jasno, kako najsodobnejši nevronski modeli dosegajo kompozicijsko funkcijo. Predlagamo globoko mrežo, ki ne le dosega konkurenčne natančnosti pri klasifikaciji besedila, temveč tudi izkazuje kompozicijsko vedenje. To pomeni, da med ustvarjanjem hierarhičnih predstavitev dela besedila, kot je stavek, spodnje plasti omrežja porazdelijo svojo plastno specifično pozornost na posamezne besede. Nasprotno pa višje plasti sestavljajo pomembne stavke in stavke, katerih dolžine se povečujejo, ko mreže postajajo globlje, dokler stavek ne sestavljajo v celoti.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerasakno nggawe netwisik, iki dadi iki bakal tekan kelas ping teks kless, ngono iso nggawe barang sampeyan matan. Yo wis, mengko iso nggawe sistem sistem sing perusahaan titik, nganggo dolanan tambah sing nganggo nggawe layers-perusahaan sing diralah Dijaratan, Layers sing luwih luwih dumateng kapan lan kelas nang arah sing dumateng, ditambang langgar sampeyan wih dumateng kapan lan tambah kuwi duluran luwih apik pethuk sing kompleh.', 'he': 'בעוד שפות טבעיות הן מורכבות, איך מודלים עצביים מצוינים להשיג מורכבות עדיין לא ברורים. אנו מציעים רשת עמוקה, אשר לא רק משיג מדויקת תחרותית לטקסט מסווג, אלא גם מראה התנהגות מורכבת. כלומר, בעוד יוצרים מייצגים הייררכיים של חתיכת טקסט, כמו משפט, השכבות הנמוכות של הרשת מפזרות משקלי תשומת לב ספציפי לשכבה שלהם למילים בודדות. בניגוד לזה, השכבות הגבוהות מורכבות ביטויים ומפסקים משמעותיים, שהאורך שלהם מגבילה ככל שהרשתות מקבלות עמוקות יותר עד שהמשפט יוצר באופן מלא.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་བཟོ་རྣམས་ལས་རང་ཉིད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དག་གི་ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་རག་ཐུབ་པ་ That is, while creating hierarchical representations of a piece of text, such as a sentence, the lower layers of the network distribute their layer-specific attention weights to individual words. གདོང་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་བང་རིམ་དེ་ཚོ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་ཕྲན་ཚིག་དང་ཐ་སྙད་འདི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Neural System Combination for Machine Translation', 'ar': 'مجموعة النظام العصبي للترجمة الآلية', 'pt': 'Combinação de sistema neural para tradução automática', 'fr': 'Combinaison de systèmes neuronaux pour la traduction automatique', 'es': 'Combinación de sistemas neuronales para traducción automática', 'ja': '機械翻訳のための神経系の組み合わせ', 'ru': 'Комбинация нейронных систем для машинного перевода', 'zh': '合于机器翻译神经系统', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद के लिए तंत्रिका प्रणाली संयोजन', 'ga': 'Teaglaim de Chórais Néaracha le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός νευρωνικού συστήματος για τη μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Neurális rendszer kombináció gépi fordításhoz', 'lt': 'Nervų sistemos derinys mašinų vertimui', 'kk': 'Машин аудармасының нейрондық жүйелік комбинациясы', 'it': 'Combinazione del sistema neurale per la traduzione automatica', 'ms': 'Kombinasi Sistem Neural untuk Terjemahan Mesin', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം കൊമ്മിണേഷന്\u200d', 'no': 'Neuralsystemkombinasjon for maskinsomsetjing', 'mt': 'Kombinazzjoni tas-Sistema Newrali għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'mn': 'Машин орчуулалтын мэдрэлийн системийн нэгтгэл', 'pl': 'Kombinacja układu neuronowego do tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Combinație de sistem neural pentru traducerea automată', 'sr': 'Kombinacija neuronskog sistema za prevod mašine', 'sv': 'Neural systemkombination för maskinöversättning', 'so': 'Combination of System Neural for machine Translation', 'si': 'පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධය', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான நெயுரல் அமைப்பு சேர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے نیورال سیسٹم کمbination', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết hợp hệ thần kinh cho việc phiên dịch', 'bg': 'Комбинация от невронни системи за машинен превод', 'nl': 'Neurale systeemcombinatie voor machinevertaling', 'da': 'Kombination af neural system til maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Kombinacija neuronskog sustava za prevod strojeva', 'id': 'Kombinasi Sistem Neural untuk Translation Mesin', 'de': 'Kombination neuronaler Systeme für die maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': '신경 계통 조합', 'fa': 'ترکیب سیستم عصبی برای ترجمه ماشین', 'sw': 'Neural System Combination for Machine Translation', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar terjime etmek üçin näyral sistemi birleştirme', 'af': 'Nural Stelsel Kombinasie vir Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Kombinacioni i Sistemit Neural për përkthimin e makinës', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանման նյարդային համակարգը', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Makinat Çeviri üçün Nöral Sistem Kombinasyonu', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য নিউরেল সিস্টেম কম্বাইনশন', 'bs': 'Kombinacija neuronskog sustava za prevod mašine', 'ca': 'Combinació del Sistema Neural per a la traducció màquina', 'cs': 'Kombinace neuronových systémů pro strojový překlad', 'et': 'Neurosüsteemide kombinatsioon masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Hermojärjestelmän yhdistelmä konekäännöstä varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Kombinacija živčnih sistemov za strojno prevajanje', 'he': 'Neural System Combination for Machine Translation', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་ལུགས་འདིའི་སྒེར་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཆ་མཉམ་ཕྱོགས་'}
{'en': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) becomes a new approach to machine translation and generates much more fluent results compared to statistical machine translation (SMT). However, SMT is usually better than NMT in translation adequacy. It is therefore a promising direction to combine the advantages of both NMT and SMT. In this paper, we propose a neural system combination framework leveraging multi-source NMT, which takes as input the outputs of NMT and SMT systems and produces the final translation. Extensive experiments on the Chinese-to-English translation task show that our model archives significant improvement by 5.3 BLEU points over the best single system output and 3.4 BLEU points over the state-of-the-art traditional system combination methods.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) se convierte en un nuevo enfoque de la traducción automática y genera resultados mucho más fluidos en comparación con la traducción automática estadística (SMT). Sin embargo, SMT suele ser mejor que NMT en cuanto a adecuación de la traducción. Por lo tanto, es una dirección prometedora combinar las ventajas de NMT y SMT. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de combinación de sistemas neuronales que aprovecha la NMT de múltiples fuentes, que toma como entrada las salidas de los sistemas NMT y SMT y produce la traducción final. Los extensos experimentos en la tarea de traducción del chino al inglés muestran que nuestro modelo archiva una mejora significativa de 5,3 puntos BLEU con respecto a la mejor producción de un solo sistema y 3,4 puntos BLEU con respecto a los métodos tradicionales de combinación de sistemas de última generación.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural (NMT) torna-se uma nova abordagem à tradução automática e gera resultados muito mais fluentes em comparação com a tradução automática estatística (SMT). No entanto, o SMT geralmente é melhor do que o NMT na adequação da tradução. Portanto, é uma direção promissora combinar as vantagens de NMT e SMT. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura de combinação de sistemas neurais aproveitando o NMT multi-fonte, que recebe como entrada as saídas dos sistemas NMT e SMT e produz a tradução final. Extensos experimentos na tarefa de tradução de chinês para inglês mostram que nosso modelo arquiva uma melhoria significativa de 5,3 pontos BLEU sobre a melhor saída do sistema único e 3,4 pontos BLEU sobre os métodos tradicionais de combinação de sistemas de última geração.', 'ar': 'أصبحت الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) نهجًا جديدًا للترجمة الآلية وتولد نتائج أكثر طلاقة مقارنةً بالترجمة الآلية الإحصائية (SMT). ومع ذلك ، فإن SMT عادة ما تكون أفضل من NMT في كفاية الترجمة. لذلك ، فإن الجمع بين مزايا كل من NMT و SMT يعد اتجاهًا واعدًا. في هذا البحث ، نقترح إطار عمل دمج النظام العصبي يستفيد من NMT متعدد المصادر ، والذي يأخذ كمدخلات مخرجات أنظمة NMT و SMT وينتج الترجمة النهائية. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على مهمة الترجمة من الصينية إلى الإنجليزية أن نموذجنا يحفظ تحسنًا ملحوظًا بمقدار 5.3 نقطة BLEU على أفضل مخرجات نظام فردي و 3.4 نقطة BLEU على أحدث طرق دمج النظام التقليدية.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) devient une nouvelle approche de la traduction automatique et génère des résultats beaucoup plus fluides que la traduction automatique statistique (SMT). Cependant, le SMT est généralement meilleur que le NMT en termes d'adéquation de traduction. Il est donc prometteur de combiner les avantages du NMT et du SMT. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre de combinaison de systèmes neuronaux utilisant la NMT multi-sources, qui prend en entrée les sorties des systèmes NMT et SMT et produit la traduction finale. Des expériences approfondies sur la tâche de traduction du chinois vers l'anglais montrent que notre modèle enregistre des améliorations significatives de 5,3 points BLEU par rapport à la meilleure sortie système unique et de 3,4 points BLEU par rapport aux méthodes de combinaison de systèmes traditionnelles de pointe.", 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）は機械翻訳の新しいアプローチとなり、統計的機械翻訳（ SMT ）と比較してはるかに流暢な結果を生み出す。しかし、SMTは通常、翻訳の妥当性においてNMTよりも優れている。したがって、NMTとSMTの両方の利点を組み合わせることは有望な方向である。本稿では， NMTとSMTシステムの出力を入力とし，最終的な翻訳を生み出す，マルチソースNMTを活用したニューラルシステムの組み合わせフレームワークを提案する．中国語から英語への翻訳タスクの広範な実験では、当社のモデルは、最良の単一システム出力よりも5.3 BLEUポイント、最先端の従来のシステム組み合わせ方法よりも3.4 BLEUポイント大幅な改善をアーカイブしていることが示されています。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)为机器翻译新法,比于计机器翻译(SMT),其流畅也。 然SMT于译充分性常优于NMT。 本文设用多源NMT神经系统合框架,当框架以NMTSMT输为输,并生终译。 中英译之广实验,吾道之最上者著于5.3 BLEU分,先进之统合者3.4 BLEU分。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक नया दृष्टिकोण बन जाता है और सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद (एसएमटी) की तुलना में बहुत अधिक धाराप्रवाह परिणाम उत्पन्न करता है। हालांकि, एसएमटी आमतौर पर अनुवाद पर्याप्तता में एनएमटी से बेहतर होता है। इसलिए यह NMT और SMT दोनों के फायदों को संयोजित करने के लिए एक आशाजनक दिशा है। इस पेपर में, हम बहु-स्रोत NMT का लाभ उठाने वाले एक तंत्रिका प्रणाली संयोजन ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो NMT और SMT प्रणालियों के आउटपुट को इनपुट के रूप में लेता है और अंतिम अनुवाद का उत्पादन करता है। चीनी-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद कार्य पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल सर्वश्रेष्ठ एकल सिस्टम आउटपुट पर 5.3 BLEU अंकों और अत्याधुनिक पारंपरिक सिस्टम संयोजन विधियों पर 3.4 BLEU अंकों से महत्वपूर्ण सुधार को संग्रहीत करता है।', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод (NMT) становится новым подходом к машинному переводу и генерирует гораздо более свободные результаты по сравнению со статистическим машинным переводом (SMT). Тем не менее, SMT обычно лучше, чем NMT в адекватности перевода. Поэтому перспективным направлением является объединение преимуществ как NMT, так и SMT. В этой статье мы предлагаем каркас комбинации нейронных систем с использованием многоисточника NMT, который принимает в качестве входных данных выходы систем NMT и SMT и производит окончательный перевод. Обширные эксперименты над задачей перевода с китайского на английский показывают, что наша модель архивирует значительное улучшение на 5,3 пункта BLEU по сравнению с лучшим выходом одной системы и на 3,4 пункта BLEU по сравнению с современными традиционными методами комбинирования систем.', 'ga': 'Is cur chuige nua é aistriúchán meaisín néaraíoch (NMT) maidir le haistriúchán meaisín agus gineann sé torthaí i bhfad níos líofa i gcomparáid le haistriúchán meaisín staidrimh (SMT). Mar sin féin, is gnách go mbíonn SMT níos fearr ná NMT maidir le leordhóthanacht aistriúcháin. Is treo geallta mar sin buntáistí NMT agus SMT araon a chomhcheangal. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat teaglaim córais néaraigh a ghiaráil NMT ilfhoinse, a ghlacann aschuir na gcóras NMT agus SMT mar ionchur agus a tháirgeann an t-aistriúchán deiridh. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar an tasc aistriúcháin Síneach go Béarla go bhfuil feabhas suntasach ar ár gcartlann eiseamláireach de 5.3 pointe BLEU thar an aschur córais aonair is fearr agus 3.4 pointe BLEU thar na modhanna teaglaim córais traidisiúnta den scoth.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ, SMT უფრო უკეთესია NMT-ზე, როგორც შეცვლელების შესაძლებელობაში. ამიტომ, ეს არის მუშაობელი მიზეზი, რომელიც NMT და SMT-ის გამოიყენება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მივიღებთ ნეიროლური სისტემის კომბუნირებული ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მრავალური ფორმატების NMT-ს გამოყენება, რომელიც NMT და SMT სისტემის გამოყენება და დასაწყება შე უფრო დიდი ექსპერიმენტები ჩინეთიდან ანგლისურად გაგრძელებული რაოდენობაში ჩვენი მოდელის არქიმენტები 5.3 BLEU-ზე უფრო დიდი გაგრძელება და 3.4 BLEU-ზე უფრო დიდი სისტემის გაგრძელება და', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) a gépi fordítás új megközelítésévé válik, és sokkal folyékonyabb eredményeket generál a statisztikai gépi fordításhoz képest. Azonban az SMT általában jobb, mint az NMT fordítási megfelelőség tekintetében. Ezért ígéretes irány mind az NMT, mind az SMT előnyeit kombinálni. Jelen tanulmányban egy többforrású NMT-t használó neurális rendszer kombinációs keretrendszert javasolunk, amely bemenetként veszi az NMT és SMT rendszerek kimeneteit és elkészíti a végleges fordítást. A kínai-angol fordítási feladatokkal kapcsolatos kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentős javulást készít 5,3 BLEU ponttal a legjobb egyrendszer kimenetéhez képest és 3,4 BLEU ponttal a legkorszerűbb hagyományos rendszerkombinációs módszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) γίνεται μια νέα προσέγγιση στη μηχανική μετάφραση και παράγει πολύ πιο εύπλαστα αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με τη στατιστική μηχανική μετάφραση (SMT). Ωστόσο, η SMT είναι συνήθως καλύτερη από την NMT ως προς την επάρκεια μετάφρασης. Ως εκ τούτου, είναι μια ελπιδοφόρα κατεύθυνση ο συνδυασμός των πλεονεκτημάτων τόσο της NMT όσο και της SMT. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο συνδυασμού νευρωνικών συστημάτων που χρησιμοποιεί πολλαπλές πηγές το οποίο λαμβάνει ως εισαγωγή τα αποτελέσματα των συστημάτων και παράγει την τελική μετάφραση. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σχετικά με την εργασία μετάφρασης κινέζικων-αγγλικών δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας καταγράφει σημαντική βελτίωση κατά 5.3 σημεία έναντι της καλύτερης παραγωγής ενιαίου συστήματος και 3.4 σημεία έναντι των σύγχρονων παραδοσιακών μεθόδων συνδυασμού συστημάτων.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) diventa un nuovo approccio alla traduzione automatica e genera risultati molto più fluenti rispetto alla traduzione automatica statistica (SMT). Tuttavia, SMT è solitamente migliore di NMT in termini di adeguatezza della traduzione. È quindi una direzione promettente combinare i vantaggi di NMT e SMT. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework di combinazione di sistemi neurali che sfrutta NMT multi-source, che prende come input le uscite dei sistemi NMT e SMT e produce la traduzione finale. Esperimenti approfonditi sul compito di traduzione cinese-inglese mostrano che il nostro modello registra un miglioramento significativo di 5,3 punti BLEU rispetto alla migliore uscita di sistema singolo e di 3,4 punti BLEU rispetto ai metodi tradizionali di combinazione di sistemi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Neuralinis mašinų vertimas (NMT) tampa nauju mašinų vertimo metodu ir sukuria daug lankstesnius rezultatus, palyginti su statistiniu mašinų vertimu (SMT). Tačiau SMT paprastai yra geresnis vertimo raštu tinkamumo požiūriu nei NMT. Todėl pažadu derinti NMT ir SMT privalumus. Šiame dokumente siūlome neurologinės sistemos derinio sistemą, kuria būtų naudojamas daugialypis NMT svertas, kuris kaip įnašas naudoja NMT ir SMT sistemų rezultatus ir sukuria galutinį vertimą. Išsamūs kinų ir anglų vertimo užduoties eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai pagerina 5,3 BLEU taško, palyginti su geriausia bendros sistemos produkcija, ir 3,4 BLEU taško, palyginti su naujausiais tradiciniais sistemų derinimo metodais.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menjadi pendekatan baru untuk terjemahan mesin dan menghasilkan keputusan yang lebih mudah dibandingkan dengan terjemahan mesin statistik (SMT). Namun, SMT biasanya lebih baik daripada NMT dalam keperluan terjemahan. Ia adalah arah yang berjanji untuk menggabungkan keuntungan NMT dan SMT. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka kombinasi sistem saraf yang menggunakan NMT berbilang sumber, yang mengambil sebagai input output sistem NMT dan SMT dan menghasilkan terjemahan akhir. Eksperimen luas pada tugas terjemahan Cina-bahasa Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa model kita mempunyai peningkatan yang signifikan dengan 5.3 titik BLEU atas output sistem tunggal terbaik dan 3.4 titik BLEU atas kaedah kombinasi sistem tradisional state-of-the-art.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасы (NMT) машинаның аудармасына жаңа тәсілді болып, статистикалық машинаның аудармасына (SMT) салыстырып, көп жылдамдық нәтижелерді жасайды. Бірақ, SMT әдетте NMT- ден жақсы аудармалардың адекциясы. Сондықтан NMT және SMT-тің әлемдерін біріктіру үшін бұл үлкен бағытты. Бұл қағазда, NMT жүйелердің шығысын келтіріп, соңғы аудармасын жасап, NMT жүйелердің көп көзі NMT- тің көпшілігін қолданатын невралдық жүйелерді біріктіру қоршауын ұсындық. Қытай мен ағылшын тілінен аудару тапсырмасының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері 5,3 BLEU пішімдерінің ең жақсы жүйелік шығысынан және 3,4 BLEU пішімдерінің әдетті жүйелік жинақтау әдістерін архивіміздің архи', 'mk': 'Неуралниот машински превод (НМТ) станува нов пристап до машински превод и генерира многу потесни резултати во споредба со статистичкиот машински превод (СМТ). Сепак, СМТ обично е подобро од НМТ во преводната адекватност. Затоа е ветувачка насока да се комбинираат предностите на НМТ и СМТ. Во овој документ, предлагаме рамка за комбинација на невровниот систем која влијае на мултиизворот НМТ, кој ги зема како влог излезите на НМТ и СМТ системите и го произведува конечниот превод. Експериментите од кинеска на англиска преводна задача покажуваат дека нашиот модел архивира значително подобрување за 5,3 БЛЕ поени во однос на најдобриот излез од еден систем и 3,4 БЛЕ поени во однос на најновите традиционални методи на комбинација на системот.', 'mt': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) becomes a new approach to machine translation and generates much more fluent results compared to statistical machine translation (SMT).  Madankollu, l-SMT normalment huwa aħjar mill-NMT fl-adegwatezza tat-traduzzjoni. Għalhekk hija direzzjoni promettenti li jiġu kkombinati l-vantaġġi kemm tal-NMT kif ukoll tal-SMT. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ kombinazzjoni ta’ sistema newrali li jiġġenera l-ingranaġġ ta’ NMT b’diversi sorsi, li jieħu bħala input ir-riżultati tas-sistemi NMT u SMT u jipproduċi t-traduzzjoni finali. Esperimenti estensivi dwar il-kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni Ċiniża-Ingliża juru li l-mudell tagħna jarċipa titjib sinifikanti b’5.3 punti tal-BLEU fuq l-aħjar produzzjoni tas-sistema unika u 3.4 punti tal-BLEU fuq l-aħjar metodi tradizzjonali ta’ kombinazzjoni tas-sistema.', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ അവസരം ആകുന്നു. പിന്നെ സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d  എന്നാലും എസ്എംടി പരിഭാഷത്തിന്റെ അനുമതിയില്\u200d എൻഎംടിയെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലതാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് NMT എന്നിട്ടും SMT എന്നിവയുടെയും ഉപകരണങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു വാഗ്ദാനീയമായ വഴിയാണ്. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുരുഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പല-സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d NMT എന് ചൈനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കൈവ് 5. 3 ബിലിയുവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് 5. 3 ബിലിയ', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) машины хөгжүүлэлтийн шинэ арга болж статистикийн машины хөгжүүлэлтийн (SMT) харьцуулахад илүү шингэн үр дүнг бий болгодог. Гэвч SMT нь ихэвчлэн NMT аас илүү сайн байдаг. Иймээс NMT болон SMT хоёуланг нийлүүлэх нь амлалтай зүйл юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэлийн системийн нийлүүлэлтийг олон эх үүсвэрийн NMT-г ашиглаж, NMT болон SMT системийн үр дүнг оруулж, сүүлийн орчуулалт гаргаж байна. Хятад болон Англи хэлний хөрөнгө дамжуулалтын туршилтууд бидний загвар нь 5.3 БЛЕУ-ын хамгийн сайн системийн бүтээгдэхүүний шилдэг цэг болон 3.4 БЛЕУ-ын урлагийн уламжлалт системийн нийлүүлэлтийн аргын тухай маш чухал сай', 'no': '@ info Men SMT er vanlegvis bedre enn NMT i omsetjingsprøytebruk. Det er derfor ein forståande retning å kombinere fordelene av både NMT og SMT. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit neuralsystemkombinasjonsframmeverk som leverer fleire kildekode NMT, som tar inn utdata av NMT og SMT-systemet og produserer den siste omsetjinga. Ekstra eksperimenter på omsetjinga til kinesisk til engelsk viser at modellen vårt arkiverer signifikante forbedring med 5,3 BLEU-punkt over den beste enkelte systemutdata og 3,4 BLEU-punkt over den tradisjonelle systemkombinasjonsmetoden i kunsten.', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine (NMT) postaje novi pristup prevodu mašine i stvara mnogo više tekućih rezultata u usporedbi s prevodom statističkih mašina (SMT). Međutim, SMT je obično bolji od NMT u adekvatnosti prevoda. Stoga je obećavajući pravac kombinacije prednosti NMT-a i SMT-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo kombinacijski okvir neuralnog sistema koji utiče na više izvora NMT, koji uzima kao ulaz rezultata NMT-a i SMT-a i proizvodi konačni prevod. Eksperimenti na kineskom-engleskom prevodnom zadatku pokazuju da naš model arhiva značajno poboljšanje sa 5,3 BLEU bodova na najbolji izlaz jedinstvenog sistema i 3,4 BLEU bodova na nacionalne tradicionalne metode kombinacije sustava.', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) staje się nowym podejściem do tłumaczenia maszynowego i generuje znacznie bardziej płynne wyniki w porównaniu do statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego (SMT). Jednak SMT jest zwykle lepszy od NMT pod względem adekwatności tłumaczenia. Obiecującym kierunkiem jest zatem połączenie zalet zarówno NMT, jak i SMT. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy framework kombinacji układów neuronowych wykorzystujący multi-source NMT, który bierze jako wejście wyjścia systemów NMT i SMT i tworzy końcowe tłumaczenie. Obszerne eksperymenty na temat zadania tłumaczenia chińsko-angielskiego pokazują, że nasz model archiwuje znaczącą poprawę o 5.3 punkty BLEU w stosunku do najlepszego wyjścia pojedynczego systemu i 3.4 punkty BLEU w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych tradycyjnych metod kombinacji systemów.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală (NMT) devine o nouă abordare a traducerii automate și generează rezultate mult mai fluente în comparație cu traducerea automată statistică (SMT). Cu toate acestea, SMT este de obicei mai bun decât NMT în ceea ce privește adecvarea traducerii. Prin urmare, este o direcție promițătoare de a combina avantajele atât NMT, cât și SMT. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru de combinație a sistemelor neurale utilizând NMT multi-sursă, care ia ca intrare ieșirile sistemelor NMT și SMT și produce traducerea finală. Experimentele extinse asupra sarcinii de traducere chineză-engleză arată că modelul nostru arhivează o îmbunătățire semnificativă cu 5,3 puncte BLEU față de cea mai bună ieșire a sistemului unic și 3,4 puncte BLEU față de metodele tradiționale de combinare a sistemelor de ultimă generație.', 'so': "Turjumista neural machine (NMT) wuxuu noqdaa qaab cusub oo u eg turjumista machine, wuxuuna generaa resulto badan oo fluent compared to statistical machine translation (SMT). However, SMT is usually better than NMT in translation adequacy.  Sidaa darteed waa hago ballan ah in la isku daro faa'iidada NMT iyo SMT. Kanu warqaddan, waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa kooxa kooxaha neurada ah oo u diraya noocyo badan oo noocyo badan NMT, taas oo u qaadata soo bixinta nidaamka NMT iyo SMT, wuxuuna soo saaraa tarjumaadka ugu dambeeya. Shaqooyinka turjumista ee Shiino-to-Ingiriis waxaa muujiya in modellkayagu uu sameeyo hagaajinta aad u weyn 5.3 BLEU wuxuu ku hagaa midhaha ugu wanaagsan ee nidaamka oo kaliya iyo 3.4 BLEU wuxuu ku hagaa qaababka kooxaha farsamada ah oo uu qorayo dowladda farsamada.", 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව (NMT) මැෂින් වාර්ථාව සඳහා අළුත් වාර්ථාවක් වෙනවා සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක මැෂි නමුත්, SMT සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම NMT වඩා හොඳයි අවවාදය සමාන්\u200dයයෙන්. ඉතින් ඒක පොරොන්දු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තමයි NMT සහ SMT දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා NMT ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒක NMT සහ SMT පද්ධ චීනි වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වලින් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ මොඩේල් ආර්කේෂණය 5.3 BLUE වලින් හොඳම පද්ධති ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති වලින් ප්\u200dරව', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) ஒரு புதிய மொழிபெயர்ப்பாகும் மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவரமான முடிவுகளை புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரத் எனினும், SMT பொதுவாக NMT மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் சரியானது. NMT மற்றும் SMT இருவரும் சேர்ப்பதற்கு ஒரு வாக்குறுதியான திசையாகும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையின் இணைப்பு சட்டத்தை வழங்கும் பல- மூலத்தின் NMT மற்றும் SMT முறைமைகளின் வெளியீட்டை எடுத்து இறுத சீன- முதல் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் விரிவான சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது நம் மாதிரி காப்பகத்தை 5. 3 பிலியு சிறந்த ஒற்றை கணினி வெளியீட்டின் மே', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning (NMT) blir ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för maskinöversättning och genererar mycket mer flytande resultat jämfört med statistisk maskinöversättning (SMT). SMT är dock vanligtvis bättre än NMT när det gäller översättningskrav. Det är därför en lovande riktning att kombinera fördelarna med både NMT och SMT. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi ett ramverk för neurala system som utnyttjar multi-source NMT, vilket tar som input utgångarna från NMT och SMT system och producerar den slutliga översättningen. Omfattande experiment på den kinesiska-engelska översättningsuppgiften visar att vår modell arkiverar betydande förbättringar med 5,3 BLEU-poäng jämfört med bästa enskilda systemoutput och 3,4 BLEU-poäng jämfört med de senaste traditionella systemkombinationsmetoderna.', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے نئی طریقہ ہو جاتی ہے اور اس کے مقابلہ میں بہت زیادہ فلانٹ نتیجے پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ However, SMT is usually better than NMT in translation adequacy. لہٰذا یہ ایک وعدہ دینا ہے کہ NMT اور SMT کے فائدہ جمع کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نیورال سیستم کی ترکیب فرمیک ڈال دیتے ہیں جو ملتی-سورس NMT کی ترکیب کرتی ہے، جو NMT اور SMT سیستم کے نتائج کو اٹھاتا ہے اور آخری ترکیب پیدا کرتی ہے. چین سے انگلیسی ترجمہ کے تابع پر اضافہ کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری مدل 5.3 بلیوس کے ذریعہ بہترین سیستمی آوٹ پینٹ اور 3.4 بلیوس کے ذریعہ آزمائش سیستمی ترجمہ طریقے پر اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Ammo, oddiy SMT tarjima tilida yetarjima'lik NMT dan yaxshi. Шундай қилиб, бу NMT ва SMT манфаатларини тўплашга ишончли усулдир. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha manba NMT va SMT tizimning natijalarini kiritish va oxirigi tarjima beradi. Name", 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) trở thành một phương pháp mới trong việc dịch chuyển máy và tạo ra nhiều kết quả thông thạo hơn nhiều so với dịch vụ máy thống kê (SMT). Tuy nhiên, SMT thường giỏi hơn NMT về sự chuẩn bị dịch chuyển. Đây là hướng hứa hẹn để kết hợp lợi thế của NMT và SMT. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị hệ thần kinh kết hợp hệ thống điều khiển NMB đa nguồn, mà sử dụng như nhập kết xuất của các hệ thống NMT và SMT và sản xuất dịch cuối cùng. Các thí nghiệm đầy đủ về nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển giữa Trung Quốc và Anh cho thấy các tài liệu mẫu của chúng ta đã được cải thiện đáng kể bởi 5', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод (НМТ) се превръща в нов подход към машинния превод и генерира много по-плавни резултати в сравнение със статистическия машинен превод (СМТ). Въпреки това, SMT обикновено е по-добра от NMT по отношение на адекватността на превода. Ето защо е обещаваща посока да се комбинират предимствата на NMT и SMT. В настоящата статия предлагаме рамка за комбиниране на невронна система, използваща многоизточника НМТ, която взема като вход изходите на НМТ и СМТ системи и произвежда окончателния превод. Обширни експерименти на задачата за превод от китайски на английски език показват, че нашият модел архивира значително подобрение с 5,3 точки спрямо най-добрия изход на системата и 3,4 точки спрямо най-съвременните традиционни методи за комбиниране на системи.', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) bliver en ny tilgang til maskinoversættelse og genererer langt mere flydende resultater sammenlignet med statistisk maskinoversættelse (SMT). SMT er dog normalt bedre end NMT i oversættelsesmæssighed. Det er derfor en lovende retning at kombinere fordelene ved både NMT og SMT. I denne artikel foreslår vi en neural system kombination ramme, der udnytter multi-source NMT, som tager output fra NMT og SMT systemer som input og producerer den endelige oversættelse. Omfattende eksperimenter med oversættelsesopgaven fra kinesisk til engelsk viser, at vores model arkiverer en betydelig forbedring med 5,3 BLEU-point i forhold til den bedste enkelte systemoutput og 3,4 BLEU-point i forhold til de avancerede traditionelle systemkombinationsmetoder.', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) wordt een nieuwe benadering van machinevertaling en genereert veel vloeiender resultaten in vergelijking met statistische machinevertaling (SMT). SMT is echter meestal beter dan NMT wat vertaaltoereikendheid betreft. Het is daarom een veelbelovende richting om de voordelen van zowel NMT als SMT te combineren. In dit artikel stellen we een neuraal systeem combinatieframework voor dat gebruik maakt van multi-source NMT, dat als input de outputs van NMT en SMT systemen neemt en de uiteindelijke vertaling produceert. Uitgebreide experimenten met de Chinees-naar-Engels vertaaltaak tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijke verbeteringen archiveert met 5.3 BLEU punten ten opzichte van de beste single system output en 3.4 BLEU punten ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art traditionele systeem combinatiemethoden.', 'hr': 'Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) postaje novi pristup prevodu strojeva i stvara mnogo više tekućih rezultata u usporedbi s prevodom statističkih strojeva (SMT). Međutim, SMT je obično bolji od NMT u adekvatnosti prevoda. Stoga je obećavajući pravac kombinirati prednosti NMT-a i SMT-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo kombinacijski okvir neuralnog sustava koji utiče na više izvora NMT-a, koji uzima kao ulaz rezultata NMT-a i SMT-a i proizvodi konačni prevod. Prošireni eksperimenti na zadatku prevođenja kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuju da naš model arhivira značajno poboljšanje od 5,3 BLEU bodova na najbolji izlaz jedinstvenog sustava i 3,4 BLEU bodova nad metodama kombinacije tradicionalnog sustava.', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) wird zu einem neuen Ansatz der maschinellen Übersetzung und erzeugt wesentlich flüssigere Ergebnisse im Vergleich zur statistischen maschinellen Übersetzung (SMT). Allerdings ist SMT in der Regel besser als NMT in Bezug auf die Übersetzungsaadäquanz. Es ist daher eine vielversprechende Richtung, die Vorteile von NMT und SMT zu kombinieren. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuronales System-Kombinationsframework vor, das Multi-Source-NMT nutzt, das die Outputs von NMT- und SMT-Systemen als Input nimmt und die endgültige Übersetzung erzeugt. Umfangreiche Experimente zur Chinesisch-Englisch-Übersetzungsaufgabe zeigen, dass unser Modell signifikante Verbesserungen um 5.3 BLEU-Punkte gegenüber der besten Einzelsystemausgabe und 3.4 BLEU-Punkte gegenüber den modernen traditionellen Systemkombinationsmethoden archiviert.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menjadi pendekatan baru untuk terjemahan mesin dan menghasilkan hasil yang jauh lebih fluent dibandingkan dengan terjemahan mesin statistik (SMT). Namun, SMT biasanya lebih baik dari NMT dalam kesepakatan terjemahan. Karena itu adalah arah yang berjanji untuk menggabungkan keuntungan NMT dan SMT. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan kombinasi sistem saraf yang menggunakan NMT multisumber, yang mengambil sebagai input output dari NMT dan SMT sistem dan memproduksi terjemahan akhir. Eksperimen ekstensif pada tugas terjemahan Cina-bahasa Inggris menunjukkan bahwa model kita arsip meningkat dengan 5,3 poin BLEU atas output sistem tunggal terbaik dan 3,4 poin BLEU atas metode kombinasi sistem tradisional state-of-the-art.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)은 기계번역의 새로운 방법이 됐고, 통계기계번역(SMT)보다 그 결과가 더 매끄럽다.그러나 SMT는 일반적으로 번역의 충분성 면에서 NMT보다 우수하다.따라서 NMT와 SMT의 장점을 결합하는 것은 유망한 방향이다.본고에서 우리는 다원적 NMT를 이용한 신경 시스템 조합 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 NMT와 SMT 시스템의 출력을 입력으로 하고 최종 번역을 생성한다.한영 번역 임무에 대한 대량의 실험에 따르면 우리의 모델은 최상의 단일 시스템 수출보다 5.3개의 BLEU점, 가장 선진적인 전통 시스템 조합 방법보다 3.4개의 BLEU점을 높였다.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) یک روش جدید برای ترجمه ماشین تبدیل می\u200cشود و نتیجه\u200cهای fluent بیشتری را در مقایسه با ترجمه ماشین آمار (SMT) تولید می\u200cکند. اما SMT معمولاً بهتر از NMT در مناسب ترجمه است. بنابراین این یک مسیر قول\u200cدهنده است که سودهای NMT و SMT را ترکیب کند. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای در مورد تابع ترجمه\u200cهای چین و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما با 5.3 BLEU نقطه\u200cهای بزرگی بر بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای سیستم تنها و 3.4 BLEU نقطه\u200cها بر روی روش\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای سیستم سنتی در حالت\u200cهای سیستم سنتی\u200cهای', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine ya kijamii (NMT) inakuwa njia mpya ya kutafsiri mashine na inatengeneza matokeo mengi yanayofanana na tafsiri ya mashine ya takwimu (SMT). Hata hivyo, SMT mara nyingi ni bora kuliko NMT kwa tafsiri inafaa. Kwa hiyo ni mwelekeo wa kuahidini kuunganisha faida za NMT na SMT. In this paper, we propose a neural system combination framework leveraging multi-source NMT, which takes as input the outputs of NMT and SMT systems and produces the final translation.  Majaribio mengi kuhusu kazi ya kutafsiri kwa Kiingereza yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inaweka uboreshaji wa uboreshaji mkubwa kwa njia 5.3 BLEU inaonyesha uzalishaji bora zaidi wa mfumo wa mfumo wa moja na 3.4 BLEU inapointi juu ya mbinu za mfumo wa mfumo wa utamaduni wa sanaa.', 'tr': 'NMT, enjamyň terjimesine täze bir golaý öwrülýär we Statistik maşynyň terjimesine (SMT) baglaýyşynda birnäçe wajyp netijesi bar. Ýöne, SMT adatça NMTden gowydyr terjime edilmeginde. Şonuň üçin NMT we SMT-iň üstünliklerini birleştirmek üçin söz berýän yöntemdir. Bu kagyzda, biz näyral sistemi birleştirme çerçevesini, NMT we SMT sistemlerinin netijesini girdirip, soňky terjime edip başlaýar. Çinçe-we Iňlisçe terjime täblisasynda örän çarpyş deneyler 5.3 BLEU tarapynda möhüm gelişmeleri we 3.4 BLEU düzenli sistemiň birleşme täblisasynda gurlaýar.', 'af': "Neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) word 'n nuwe toegang tot masjien vertaling en genereer baie meer fluente resultate vergelyk met statistiese masjien vertaling (SMT). Maar SMT is gewoonlik beter as NMT in vertaling adekuasie. Dit is dan 'n beloftende rigting om die voordeel van beide NMT en SMT te kombinieer. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n neurale stelsel kombinasie raamwerk wat multibronne NMT verskaf, wat neem as invoer die uitvoerdes van NMT en SMT stelsels en produseer die eindelike vertaling. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op die Sjinese-na-Engels vertaling taak wys dat ons model argief betaling verbetering deur 5.3 BLEU punte oor die beste enkele stelsel uitvoer en 3.4 BLEU punte oor die staat-van-die-kuns tradisionele stelsel kombinasie metodes.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi nervor i makinave (NMT) bëhet një qasje e re për përkthimin e makinave dhe gjeneron rezultate shumë më të fluente krahasuar me përkthimin statistikor të makinave (SMT). Megjithatë, SMT është zakonisht më i mirë se NMT në përshtatjen e përkthimit. Prandaj është një drejtim premtues për të kombinuar avantazhet si të NMT-së ashtu edhe të SMT-së. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër kombinimi të sistemit nervor që përfshin NMT me shumë burime, e cila merr si hyrje rezultatet e sistemeve NMT dhe SMT dhe prodhon përkthimin përfundimtar. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në detyrën e përkthimit kinez-anglez tregojnë se modeli ynë arkivon përmirësime të rëndësishme me 5.3 pikë BLEU lidhur me prodhimin më të mirë të sistemit të vetëm dhe 3.4 pikë BLEU lidhur me metodat e kombinimit tradicional të sistemit më të lartë.', 'am': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) becomes a new approach to machine translation and generates much more fluent results compared to statistical machine translation (SMT).  ነገር ግን SMT በተርጓሚው ትርጉም የሚሻል ነው፡፡ እንግዲህ የNMT እና SMT ጥቅሞችን ለማቀናቀል የተስፋ መንገድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የNMT እና SMT ስርዓቶች ውጤቶችን እንደሚያስገባ እና የኋለኛውን ትርጓሜ እንዲያሳድጋል የየናውሬል ሲስተካከል የክፍለ ሥርዓት አካባቢ አካባቢ መፍጠር እና የመጨረሻውን ትርጉም እናደርጋለን፡፡ በቻይና-ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ሥራ ላይ ብዙ ፈተናዎች የሞዴል አካባቢነታችን 5.3 BLEU በተመረጠው ውጤት እና 3.4 BLEU በሀገሪቱ-የባሕላዊ ስርዓት ግንኙነት ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል ሥርዓት ላይ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) դառնում է մեքենայի թարգմանման նոր մոտեցում և ստեղծում է շատ ավելի ճկուն արդյունքներ, համեմատած վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման (SMT) հետ: Սակայն, SMT-ը սովորաբար ավելի լավ է, քան NMT-ը թարգմանման համապատասխանության մեջ: Հետևաբար խոստացող ուղղություն է համադրել ՆՄԹ-ի և ՍՄԹ-ի առավելությունները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային համակարգի համադրման շրջանակ, որը օգտագործում է բազմա աղբյուրներ ունեցող NMT-ը, որը օգտագործում է NMT-ի և SMT-ի արդյունքները և արտադրում է վերջնական թարգմանությունը: Extensive experiments on the Chinese-to-English translation task show that our model archives significant improvement by 5.3 BLEU points over the best single system output and 3.4 BLEU points over the state-of-the-art traditional system combination methods.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) মেশিন অনুবাদের নতুন পদ্ধতি হিসেবে পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদের তুলনায় আরো বেশী ফ্লায়েন্ট ফলাফল ত তবে সাধারণত এসএমটি অনুবাদের যথেষ্ট পরিমাণে এনএমটির চেয়েও ভালো। এনএমটি এবং এসএমটির সুবিধা একত্রিত করার জন্য এটি একটি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল দিক। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নিউরেল সিস্টেম সম্মিলন ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করছি যা বহুসূত্র এনএমটি এবং এসএমটি সিস্টেমের আউটপুটপুট হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করে এবং  চীন-থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদ কর্মসূচিতে বিশাল পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল আর্কাইভ ৫. ৩ বিলিউ নির্দেশ করে সেরা সিস্টেম আউটপুট এবং ৩.', 'bs': 'Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) postaje novi pristup prevodu strojeva i stvara mnogo više tekućih rezultata u usporedbi s prevodom statističkih strojeva (SMT). Međutim, SMT je obično bolji od NMT u adekvatnosti prevoda. Stoga je obećavajući pravac kombinacije prednosti NMT-a i SMT-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo kombinacijski okvir neuralnog sustava koji utiče na višeizvorni NMT, koji uzima kao ulaz rezultata NMT-a i SMT-a i proizvodi konačni prevod. Prošireni eksperimenti na zadatku prevođenja kineskog i engleskog jezika pokazuju da naš model arhiva značajno poboljšanje sa 5,3 BLEU bodova na najbolji izlaz jedinstvenog sistema i 3,4 BLEU bodova na nacionalne tradicionalne metode kombinacije sustava.', 'ca': "La traducció neural de màquines (NMT) es converteix en un nou enfocament a la traducció de màquines i genera resultats molt més fluents comparats amb la traducció estadística de màquines (SMT). No obstant això, el SMT és normalment millor que el NMT en l'adequació de traducció. Per tant, és una direcció prometedora combinar les avantatges tant de la NMT com de la SMT. En aquest paper, proposem un marc de combinació del sistema neural que aprofita NMT de múltiples fonts, que pren com entrada els productes dels sistemes NMT i SMT i produeix la traducció final. Els extensos experiments sobre la tasca de traducció de xinès a anglès demostren que el nostre model arquiva una millora significativa en 5,3 punts BLEU sobre el millor sistema de producció única i 3,4 punts BLEU sobre els mètodes de combinació tradicionals més avançats del sistema.", 'az': 'NMT maşına çevirilən nöral maşına yeni bir tərzim olar və statistik maşına çevirilən (SMT) ilə qarşılaşdığı neçə-neçə fəsad sonuçları yaradır. Ancaq, SMT normally is better than NMT in translation adequacy. Buna görə də NMT və SMT mənfəətlərini birləşdirmək vəd verici bir yoldur. Bu kağızda, NMT və SMT sistemlərinin sonuncu çevirisini yaratmaq üçün nöral sistem kombinatsiyası framework ü təklif edirik. Çinlə-İngilizə çevirilməsi törətməsində çox geniş təcrübələr göstərir ki, modellərimiz 5.3 BLEU ilə ən yaxşı sistem çıxışı və 3.4 BLEU şəkildə müxtəlif sistem kombinatsiyası metodlarının üstündə mövcuddur.', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) se stává novým přístupem k strojovému překladu a generuje mnohem plynulější výsledky ve srovnání se statistickým strojovým překladem (SMT). Nicméně SMT je obvykle lepší než NMT v přiměřenosti překladu. Je tedy slibným směrem kombinovat výhody NMT i SMT. V tomto článku navrhujeme kombinační rámec neuronových systémů využívající multi-source NMT, který bere jako vstup výstupy NMT a SMT systémů a vytváří finální překlad. Rozsáhlé experimenty s čínsko-anglickým překladem ukazují, že náš model archivuje výrazné zlepšení o 5.3 BLEU body nad nejlepším výstupem jednoho systému a 3.4 BLEU body oproti moderním tradičním metodám kombinace systémů.', 'et': 'Neuraalsest masintõlkest (NMT) saab uus lähenemisviis masintõlkele ja annab palju sujuvamaid tulemusi võrreldes statistilise masintõlkega (SMT). Kuid SMT on tõlke piisavuse osas tavaliselt parem kui NMT. Seetõttu on nii NMT kui SMT eeliste ühendamine paljulubav suund. Käesolevas töös pakume välja neuraalsüsteemi kombinatsiooniraamistiku, mis võimendab mitmeallilist NMT-d, mis võtab sisendina NMT- ja SMT-süsteemide väljundid ja toodab lõpliku tõlke. Põhjalikud eksperimendid hiina-inglise tõlke ülesandega näitavad, et meie mudel arhiveerib märkimisväärset paranemist 5,3 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes parima üksiksüsteemi väljundiga ja 3,4 BLEU punkti võrreldes tipptasemel traditsiooniliste süsteemide kombinatsioonimeetoditega.', 'fi': 'Neurolis채st채 konek채채nn철ksest채 (NMT) tulee uusi l채hestymistapa konek채채nn철kseen ja tuottaa paljon sujuvampia tuloksia verrattuna tilastolliseen konek채채nn철kseen (SMT). Kuitenkin SMT on yleens채 parempi kuin NMT k채채nn철sten riitt채vyydess채. Siksi on lupaava suunta yhdist채채 sek채 NMT:n ett채 SMT:n edut. T채ss채 ty철ss채 ehdotamme monil채hdeist채 NMT:t채 hy철dynt채v채채 neuroj채rjestelm채n yhdistelm채kehyst채, joka ottaa sy철tteen채 NMT- ja SMT-j채rjestelmien tuotokset ja tuottaa lopullisen k채채nn철ksen. Laajat kokeet kiina-englanti k채채nn철steht채v채st채 osoittavat, ett채 mallimme arkistoi merkitt채vi채 parannuksia 5,3 BLEU-pistett채 verrattuna parhaaseen yksitt채iseen j채rjestelm채채n ja 3,4 BLEU-pistett채 verrattuna uusimpiin perinteisiin j채rjestelm채yhdistelm채menetelmiin.', 'ha': "translation A lokacin da, SMT ke kasancẽwa mafi alhẽri daga NMT cikin fassarar daidai. Saboda haka, shi ne wata shirin mai yi wa'adi da ya haɗa amfani da dukansu na NMT da SMT. In this paper, we propose a neural system combination framework leveraging multi-source NMT, which takes as input the outputs of NMT and SMT systems and produces the final translation.  Cijari masu ƙaranci a kan aikin fassari na China-to-Ingiriya yana nuna cewa misalinmu yana ƙari mai girma game da 5.3 BLEU na points kan mafi kyaun matsayin na tsari guda da 3.4 BLEU yana pointar a kan halin-of-the-art-metoden komati na tsari.", 'jv': '@NMT) Nanging, SMT adalesi luwih luwih apik kanggo NMT nang adalesi itoleh. Mangkin dadi, kita langkung wigatinipun kanggo ngerasakno iki dadi NMT lan SMT iki dadi. Nang pentungé iki, kita supoyata sistem sing nyerung nggawe sistem Neral kang nggawe NMT, sing nyimpen tanggal NMT lan SMT kejahatan mbutuhak sistem sing ngewehke mbutuhak gambar. OUT = VeriSign Trust Network (OUT)', 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod (NMT) postane nov pristop k strojnemu prevajanju in ustvarja veliko bolj tekoče rezultate v primerjavi s statističnim strojnim prevajanjem (SMT). Vendar pa je SMT običajno boljši od NMT glede ustreznosti prevodov. Zato je obetavna smer združevanja prednosti NMT in SMT. V prispevku predlagamo kombinacijski okvir nevronskih sistemov, ki uporablja več virov NMT, ki vključuje izhode sistemov NMT in SMT ter izdeluje končni prevod. Obsežni poskusi prevajanja kitajsko-angleščino kažejo, da naš model arhivira znatno izboljšanje za 5,3 točke BLEU v primerjavi z najboljšim sistemskim izhodom in 3,4 točke BLEU v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi tradicionalnimi metodami kombinacije sistemov.', 'he': 'התרגום של מכונות נוירות (NMT) הופך לגישה חדשה לתרגום מכונות ויוצר תוצאות הרבה יותר נוזלות בהשוואה לתרגום מכונות סטטיסטי (SMT). בכל אופן, SMT בדרך כלל טובה יותר מאן NMT בתרגום מתאים. לכן זה כיוון מבטיח לשלב את היתרונות של NMT וגם SMT. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת שילוב מערכת עצבית משתמשת NMT ממקורים רבים, אשר לוקחת כתוצאה של NMT ומערכות SMT ומפיקה את התרגום הסופי. ניסויים רחבים על משימת התרגום הסינית לאנגלית מראים שהדוגמא שלנו ארכיב שיפור משמעותי על ידי 5.3 נקודות BLEU על יציאת המערכת היחידה הטובה ביותר ו-3.4 נקודות BLEU על שיטות שילוב המערכת המסורתית המאוחרת ביותר.', 'bo': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) becomes a new approach to machine translation and generates more fluent results compared to statistical machine translation (SMT). ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆོག་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་ཕན་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་SMT ལས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཆེན་པོ་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། NMT དང་SMT གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕགས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། In this paper, we propose a neural system combination framework leveraging multi source NMT, which takes as input the outputs of NMT and SMT systems and produces the final translation. རྒྱ་ནག་ལས་ཨིན་ཇིའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'An Empirical Comparison of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'مقارنة تجريبية لطرق تكييف المجال للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': "Une comparaison empirique des méthodes d'adaptation de domaines pour la traduction automatique neuronale", 'es': 'Una comparación empírica de los métodos de adaptación de dominios para la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Uma comparação empírica de métodos de adaptação de domínio para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のためのドメイン適応方法の実証的比較', 'ru': 'Эмпирическое сравнение методов адаптации домена для нейронного машинного перевода', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन विधियों की एक अनुभवजन्य तुलना', 'zh': '神经机器翻译领域应法之实较之', 'ga': "Comparáid eimpíreach ar Mhodhanna Oiriúnaithe Fearainn d'Aistriúchán Néar-Inneallta", 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Domain adaptációs módszerek empirikus összehasonlítása a neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Εμπειρική σύγκριση μεθόδων προσαρμογής τομέων για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Confronto empirico dei metodi di adattamento del dominio per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Comparison Empirical of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'lt': 'Empiriškas srities prisitaikymo prie nervinių mašinų vertimo metodų palyginimas', 'kk': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Неврал Машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын Домен Адаптационы хувилбарын эзэмшил харьцуулалт', 'pl': 'Porównanie empiryczne metod adaptacji domen dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'O comparație empirică a metodelor de adaptare a domeniului pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'si': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'sv': 'En empirisk jämförelse av domänanpassningsmetoder för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'mt': 'An Empirical Comparison of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'sr': 'Empirička usporedba metoda adaptacije domena za neurološki prevod mašine', 'so': 'Isbarbardhigga Domain Adaptation Methods for Translation of Neural machine', 'vi': 'Một sự so sánh nhỏ với quỷ gốc theo cách giải thoát mã hội.', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'En empirisk sammenligning af domænetilpasningsmetoder til neural maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'Емпирично сравнение на методите за адаптация на домейна за неврален машинен превод', 'id': 'An Empirical Comparison of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'de': 'Ein empirischer Vergleich von DomĂ¤nenanpassungsmethoden fĂ¼r neuronale maschinelle Ăœbersetzung', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 영역 자체 적응 방법의 실증 비교', 'nl': 'Een empirische vergelijking van domeinadaptatiemethoden voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'sw': 'Kampuni ya Uwezeshaji ya njia za Adaptation za Domain kwa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurali', 'tr': 'Nural Maşynyň terjimesi üçin Domain Adlemek Mettleriniň Wagtlaýyşy', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një krahasim perandor i metodave të adaptimit të domenit për përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hr': 'Empirička usporedba metoda adaptacije domena za neurološki prevod stroja', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման իմպրիկական համեմատությունը', 'fa': 'Name', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'Empirické srovnání metod adaptace domén pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'ca': "Una comparació empírica de mètodes d'adaptació del domini per a la traducció de màquines neurals", 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamise meetodite empiiriline võrdlus neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Empiirinen vertailu verkkotunnuksen mukauttamismenetelmistä neurokonekäännöksessä', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çevirməsi üçün Domain Adaptation Methods for An Empirical Comparison of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Empirička usporedba metoda adaptacije domena za neurološki prevod mašine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'An Empirical Comparison of Domain Adaptation Methods for Neural Machine Translation', 'sk': 'Empirična primerjava metod prilagajanja domenskih domen za nevralni strojni prevod', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་དྲ་ཁྲོད་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་མཉམ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a novel domain adaptation method named mixed fine tuning for neural machine translation (NMT). We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT. We first train an NMT model on an out-of-domain parallel corpus, and then fine tune it on a parallel corpus which is a mix of the in-domain and out-of-domain corpora. All corpora are augmented with artificial tags to indicate specific domains. We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لتكييف المجال تسمى "الضبط الدقيق المختلط" للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT). نحن نجمع بين نهجين حاليين هما الضبط الدقيق و NMT متعدد المجالات. نقوم أولاً بتدريب نموذج NMT على مجموعة موازية خارج المجال ، ثم نقوم بضبطه على مجموعة موازية والتي هي مزيج من الجسم داخل المجال وخارج المجال. يتم زيادة جميع المجموعات بعلامات اصطناعية للإشارة إلى مجالات محددة. نحن نقارن طريقتنا المقترحة بشكل تجريبي مع أساليب الضبط الدقيق ومتعددة المجالات ونناقش مزاياها وعيوبها.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode d'adaptation de domaine appelée «\xa0réglage fin mixte\xa0» pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT). Nous combinons deux approches existantes, à savoir le réglage fin et la NMT multidomaine. Nous formons d'abord un modèle NMT sur un corpus parallèle hors domaine, puis nous l'ajustons sur un corpus parallèle qui est un mélange de corpus dans le domaine et hors domaine. Tous les corpus sont complétés par des marqueurs artificiels pour indiquer des domaines spécifiques. Nous comparons empiriquement la méthode que nous proposons avec des méthodes de réglage fin et multidomaines et nous discutons de ses avantages et de ses inconvénients.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo método de adaptación de dominio llamado «ajuste fino mixto» para la traducción automática neuronal (NMT). Combinamos dos enfoques existentes, a saber, el ajuste fino y la NMT multidominio. Primero entrenamos un modelo de NMT en un corpus paralelo fuera del dominio, y luego lo ajustamos en un corpus paralelo que es una mezcla de los cuerpos dentro y fuera del dominio. Todos los cuerpos se aumentan con etiquetas artificiales para indicar dominios específicos. Comparamos empíricamente nuestro método propuesto con los métodos de ajuste fino y multidominio y discutimos sus beneficios y deficiencias.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo método de adaptação de domínio chamado “ajuste fino misto” para tradução automática neural (NMT). Combinamos duas abordagens existentes, a saber, ajuste fino e NMT de vários domínios. Primeiro treinamos um modelo NMT em um corpus paralelo fora do domínio e, em seguida, ajustamos em um corpus paralelo que é uma mistura dos corpora no domínio e fora do domínio. Todos os corpora são aumentados com tags artificiais para indicar domínios específicos. Comparamos empiricamente nosso método proposto com métodos de ajuste fino e multidomínio e discutimos seus benefícios e deficiências.', 'ja': '本論文では、神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）のための「混合微調整」と名付けられた新規ドメイン適応法を提案した。私たちは、微調整とマルチドメインNMTという2つの既存のアプローチを組み合わせています。まずドメイン外のパラレルコーパスでNMTモデルをトレーニングし、次にドメイン内とドメイン外のコーパスの混合物であるパラレルコーパスで微調整します。すべてのコーパは、特定のドメインを示すために人工タグで拡張されています。私たちは、提案された方法を微調整およびマルチドメイン方法と実証的に比較し、その利点と欠点について議論します。', 'zh': '本文,我们发出一种用神经机器翻译(NMT)的名"混合微调"的新型域应法。 合二见之法,即微和多域NMT。 先于域外并行语料库上练 NMT 模形,然后微调于并行语料库,语料库是域内外语料库之混合体。 凡语料库皆增人工标签,以示特定域。 以经验之,与微调多域,论其善恶。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) के लिए "मिश्रित ठीक ट्यूनिंग" नामक एक उपन्यास डोमेन अनुकूलन विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम दो मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण अर्थात् ठीक ट्यूनिंग और मल्टी डोमेन NMT गठबंधन. हम पहले एक आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन समानांतर कॉर्पस पर एक एनएमटी मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और फिर इसे एक समानांतर कॉर्पस पर ठीक करते हैं जो इन-डोमेन और आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन कॉर्पोरेट का मिश्रण है। सभी कॉर्पोरेट विशिष्ट डोमेन को इंगित करने के लिए कृत्रिम टैग के साथ संवर्धित किए जाते हैं। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से ठीक ट्यूनिंग और मल्टी डोमेन विधियों के खिलाफ हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि की तुलना करते हैं और इसके लाभों और कमियों पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем новый метод адаптации домена под названием «смешанная точная настройка» для нейронного машинного перевода (НМП). Мы объединяем два существующих подхода, а именно тонкую настройку и мультидоменную НМТ. Сначала мы обучаем модель NMT на внедоменном параллельном корпусе, а затем тонко настраиваем ее на параллельном корпусе, который представляет собой смесь внутридоменных и внедоменных корпусов. Все тела дополнены искусственными тегами, указывающими на конкретные домены. Мы эмпирически сравниваем предлагаемый нами метод с точной настройкой и многодоменными методами и обсуждаем его преимущества и недостатки.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh oiriúnaithe fearainn nua darb ainm “míntiús measctha” d’aistriúchán meaisín néarach (NMT). Cuirimid dhá chur chuige reatha le chéile, eadhon mionchoigeartú agus NMT ilfhearainn. Déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnla NMT ar dtús ar chorpas comhthreomhar lasmuigh den fhearann, agus ansin é a mhionchoigeartú ar chorpas comhthreomhar atá ina mheascán den chorpas laistigh agus lasmuigh den fhearann. Méadaítear gach corpora le clibeanna saorga chun fearainn ar leith a léiriú. Déanaimid comparáid eimpíreach idir ár modh molta agus modhanna mionchoigeartaithe agus ilfhearainn agus pléimid na buntáistí agus na heasnaimh atá leis.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új domain adaptációs módszert javasolunk, "vegyes finomhangolás" a neurális gépi fordításhoz (NMT). Két meglévő megközelítést kombinálunk, nevezetesen finomhangolást és több domain NMT-t. Először egy NMT modellt képezünk egy tartományon kívüli párhuzamos korpuszra, majd finomhangoljuk egy párhuzamos korpuszra, ami a tartományon belüli és a tartományon kívüli korpusz keveréke. Az összes corpora mesterséges címkékkel bővül, amelyek bizonyos tartományokat jeleznek. empirikusan összehasonlítjuk javasolt módszerünket a finomhangolási és multi domain módszerekkel, és megvitatjuk annak előnyeit és hiányosságait.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di adattamento del dominio chiamato 'mixed fine tuning' per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT). Combiniamo due approcci esistenti: fine tuning e multi dominio NMT. Prima addestriamo un modello NMT su un corpus parallelo fuori dominio, e poi lo perfezioniamo su un corpus parallelo che è un mix di corpora in-dominio e fuori dominio. Tutti i corpora sono aumentati con tag artificiali per indicare domini specifici. Confrontiamo empiricamente il nostro metodo proposto con metodi di fine tuning e multi dominio e discutiamo i suoi benefici e carenze.", 'ka': "ამ დომენში ჩვენ პრომენტური დიომენის ადაპტიფიკაციის მეტი, რომელიც სახელია 'წყვეტილი კონფიგურაცია' ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგულისთვის (NMT). ჩვენ კომბიუნეთებთ ორი მსგავსი პროგრამები, რომელიც საუკეთესო კონფიგურაცია და მრავალ დიომინი NMT. ჩვენ პირველად NMT მოდელის გარეშე დიომინის პარალელი კორპოსში გავსწავლოთ, და შემდეგ სწორად დავსწავლოთ პარალელი კორპოსში, რომელიც არის კორპოსის გარეშე და გარეშე დიომინის კორპოსის შე გჟთფკთ კჲპოჲპა ჟა ოჲგვფვნთ ჟ კსპრთტთფნთ რვლვდთ, ჱა ეა ოჲკაზარ ჟოვუთტთფნთ ეჲმვნთ. ჩვენ ემპერიკურად ჩვენი პროგრამების გადასრულება სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვ", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, предложуваме нов метод на адаптација на доменот наречен „мешано фино адаптација“ за превод на неврални машини (НМТ). We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT.  Прво тренираме НМТ модел на паралелен корпус надвор од домен, а потоа фино го прилагодуваме на паралелен корпус кој е мешање на корпус во домен и надвор од домен. All corpora are augmented with artificial tags to indicate specific domains.  Емпирички го споредуваме нашиот предложен метод со методите на фино прилагодување и мулти домени и разговараме за неговите бенефиции и недостатоци.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда, невралдық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) үшін 'аралас жақсы түзету' деген романдық домендің адаптациялау әдісін ұсынамыз. Біз қолданыстағы екі жағдайды біріктіреміз, мысалы, дұрыс баптау және көп домен NMT дегенді біріктіреміз. Біз біріншіден NMT үлгісін доменге параллелі корпус жоқ болып, оны параллелі корпус арқылы доменге және доменге тыс корпорасының арасындағы арасындағы корпорасына жасап береміз. Барлық корпора белгілі домендерді көрсету үшін өзгертілген тегтермен көтеріледі. Біз қолданылатын әдімімізді дұрыс баптау мен көптеген домендің әдістерімен салыстырып, оның артықшылығын және қажеттерін талқылаймыз.", 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο προσαρμογής τομέων που ονομάζεται "μικτός συντονισμός" για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT). Συνδυάζουμε δύο υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις, δηλαδή την τελειοποίηση και την πολυτομική NMT. Πρώτα εκπαιδεύουμε ένα μοντέλο σε ένα παράλληλο σώμα εκτός πεδίου, και στη συνέχεια το συντονίζουμε σε ένα παράλληλο σώμα που είναι ένα μείγμα των σωμάτων εντός και εκτός πεδίου. Όλα τα σώματα είναι εμπλουτισμένα με τεχνητές ετικέτες για να υποδείξουν συγκεκριμένους τομείς. Συγκρίνουμε εμπειρικά την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο με τις μεθόδους συντονισμού και πολλαπλών τομέων και συζητάμε τα οφέλη και τις ελλείψεις της.', 'lt': "In this paper, we propose a novel domain adaptation method named 'mixed fine tuning' for neural machine translation (NMT).  Mes deriname du esamus metodus, būtent tikslų koregavimą ir daugiadominius NMT. Pirmiausia treniruojame NMT model į su lygiagrečiu korpusu už domeno ribų, o tada puikiai sureguliuojame jį su lygiagrečiu korpusu, kuris yra domeno ir ne domeno korpuso mišinys. Visi korporai yra padidinti dirbtiniais ženklais, kad būtų nurodyti konkretūs domenai. Empiriškai palyginame savo siūlomą metodą su patobulinimu ir daugelio sričių metodais ir aptariame jo naudą ir trūkumus.", 'ms': "In this paper, we propose a novel domain adaptation method named 'mixed fine tuning' for neural machine translation (NMT).  We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT.  Kita terlebih dahulu melatih model NMT pada korpus selari luar domain, dan kemudian tune ia pada korpus selari yang merupakan campuran dalam domain dan luar domain corpora. Semua korpra ditambah dengan tag buatan untuk menunjukkan domain tertentu. We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) гэдэг шинэ зохиолын адилтгал загварыг санал болгож байна. Бид хоёр сууж байгаа арга барилгуудыг нийлүүлнэ гэдэг нь сайн тохиолдол, олон тохиолдол NMT. Эхлээд бид NMT загварын загварыг параллел корпус дээр сургаж, дараа нь параллел корпус дээр зохион байгуулах болно. Энэ бол холбоотой, холбоотой корпора юм. Бүх корпора тодорхой газрыг харуулахын тулд уран бүтээлч тэмдэгт нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид өөрсдийн санал өгсөн арга замыг сайн зохицуулах, олон тооны арга замын эсрэг харьцуулж, ашиг, буруу зүйлсийг ярьж байна.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയ്ക്ക് 'mixed fine tuning' എന്ന പേരുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ഡോമെന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ് നിലവിലുള്ള രണ്ട് വഴികളെ നമ്മള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. നല്ല ടൂണിങ്ങും പല ഡോമെന്\u200d എന്\u200dഎംടി. നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു NMT മോഡല്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു ഡോമെയിന്\u200d പുറത്തുള്ള പാരാളില്\u200d പോലീല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d, പിന്നീട് അതിന്\u200dറെ പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ഡൊമെയിനുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കാന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോര എല്ലാം കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സുന്ദരിയ്ക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മുന", 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o metodă nouă de adaptare a domeniului numită "reglare fină mixtă" pentru traducerea automată neurală (NMT). Combinăm două abordări existente și anume reglarea fină și NMT multi domeniu. Mai întâi antrenăm un model NMT pe un corpus paralel în afara domeniului, apoi îl reglăm fin pe un corpus paralel care este un amestec de corpuri în domeniu și în afara domeniului. Toate corpurile sunt amplificate cu etichete artificiale pentru a indica domenii specifice. Comparăm empiric metoda propusă cu metodele de reglare fină și multi-domeniu și discutăm beneficiile și deficiențele acesteia.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi eit roman domeneadaptasjonsmetode med namn «mixed fine tuning» for neural machine translation (NMT). Vi kombinerer to eksisterande tilnærmingar med namnet fint tuning og fleire domene NMT. Vi treng først eit NMT-modell på ein parallell korpus utenfor domenet, og så fint opp det på ein parallell korpus som er ein mix av domenet og utenfor domenet. Alle korporane blir auka med kunstige merker for å indisera spesifikke domene. Vi sammenliknar vår foreslått metode mot fine tuning og fleire domenemetodar og diskuterer fordelene og kortbehandlingane.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයුරල් යන්ත්\u200dරය භාවිතාව (NMT) සඳහා 'මිශ්\u200dරේෂණ හොඳ සංවිධානය' කිරී අපි තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් දෙකක් එකතු කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හොඳ සංවිධානය සහ විශාල ප්\u200dරධා අපි මුලින්ම NMT මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ ඒක සමාන්\u200dය සියළු කොර්පෝරා විශේෂ ස්ථානය පෙන්වන්න විශේෂ ස්ථානය සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ටැග් එක්ක ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට හොඳ සංවිධානය සහ ගොඩක් විදියට සම්පූර්ණ", 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta' adattament tad-dominju msejjaħ 'a ġġustament finu mħallat' għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT). Aħna ngħaqdu żewġ approċċi eżistenti, jiġifieri l-aġġustament fin u n-NMT f’diversi dominji. L-ewwel a ħna nħarrġu mudell NMT fuq korpus parallelu barra mid-dominju, u mbagħad in ħarrġuh fin fuq korpus parallelu li huwa taħlita tal-korpus fid-dominju u barra mid-dominju. All corpora are augmented with artificial tags to indicate specific domains.  Inqabblu empirikament il-metodu propost tagħna mal-metodi ta’ aġġustament fin u b’diversi dominji u niddiskutu l-benefiċċji u n-nuqqasijiet tiegħu.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny domänanpassningsmetod kallad "blandad finjustering" för neural maskinöversättning (NMT). Vi kombinerar två befintliga tillvägagångssätt nämligen finjustering och multidomän NMT. Först tränar vi en NMT-modell på en parallell korpus utanför domänen, och sedan finjusterar vi den på en parallell korpus som är en blandning av korpus inom domänen och utanför domänen. Alla korpora är förstärkta med artificiella taggar för att indikera specifika domäner. Vi jämför empiriskt vår föreslagna metod mot finjusterings- och flerdomänsmetoder och diskuterar dess fördelar och brister.', 'ta': "இந்த தாளில், நாம் புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு 'கலப்பு நன்றாக மாற்று' என்ற பெயரிடப்பட்ட புதிய கலப்பு முறைமைய நாம் இருக்கும் இரண்டு முறைகளையும் சேர்க்கிறோம் நல்ல துண்டுதல் மற்றும் பல டோமைன் NMT. நாம் முதலில் ஒரு டொமைன் வெளியே இணைப்பு கார்ப்ஸ் மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்து, பின்னர் ஒரு இணைப்பு கார்புஸ் மீது சரியான தூண்டுகிறோம். அது டோமைன் மற்று அனைத்து குறிப்பிட்ட களங்களை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கான குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட அனைத்து குறிப்புகளு நாங்கள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் நல்ல தூண்டுதல் மற்றும் பல களம் முறைமைகளை எதிர்க்க மற்றும் அதன் பயன்", 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نور ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے ایک نوم ڈومین ادامه کا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے۔ ہم دو موجود طریقے کو جمع کرتے ہیں یعنی ٹھیک ٹونگ اور بہت سی ڈومین NMT۔ ہم پہلی بار ایک NMT موڈل کو ایک دومین خارج سے پارالی کورپوس پر آموزش دیتے ہیں، پھر اسے ایک پارالی کورپوس پر ٹھیک ٹھیک کر دیتے ہیں جو دامین اور خارج دامین کورپور کی ملکیت ہے. تمام کمپورا مفصل ٹاگ کے ساتھ اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے کہ مخصوص دامنوں کو دکھائے۔ ہم نے اپنی پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ٹھیک تنظیم اور بہت سی ڈومین طریقوں سے مقایسہ کیا ہے اور اس کے فائدے اور کمزوریوں کے بارے میں بحث کرتے ہیں.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową metodę adaptacji domeny o nazwie "mieszane dostrojenie" dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT). Łączymy dwa istniejące podejścia, mianowicie fine tuning i multidomenowe NMT. Najpierw szkolimy model NMT na korpusie równoległym poza domeną, a następnie dostrajamy go na korpusie równoległym, który jest mieszanką korpusów w domenie i poza domeną. Wszystkie korpory są rozszerzone o sztuczne tagi wskazujące określone domeny. Porównujemy empirycznie naszą proponowaną metodę z metodami precyzyjnego dostrajania i wielodomiennymi oraz omawiamy jej korzyści i niedociągnięcia.', 'sr': "U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu adaptacije domena po imenu 'pomešana dobra pjesma' za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT). Kombiniramo dva postojeæa pristupa, a to je fina podešavanja i višestruka domena NMT. Prvo treniramo NMT model na paralelnom korpusu van domena, a zatim ga dobro sredimo na paralelnom korpusu koji je mješavina korpore u domenu i van domena. Sva tela se povećava sa umjetnim znakovima da bi pokazala specifične domene. Mi empirički uspoređujemo našu predloženu metodu protiv dobrih metoda i mnogih domena i razgovaramo o njenim koristima i nedostatkima.", 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab bedelka ee qoyska ee la yidhaahdo 'mixed fine tuning' oo loo turjumo tarjumaadka maskinada neural (NMT). Waxaynu isku dareynaa laba qaabab oo joogta ah, taas oo ah sidoo kale labada caadooyin oo qurxoon oo kala duduwan NMT. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu ku tababarinaynaa model NMT oo ka mid ah korpus, kadibna waxaynu ku sawirannaa korpus lambarka ah oo ku xiran gudaha gudaha iyo shirkadaha dibadda ah. Shirkadaha oo dhan waxaa lagu daraa alaabta farshaxanka ah si ay uga muuqato meelo gaar ah. Si fiican ayaannu isbarbardhigno nooca la soo jeeday oo ka gees ah hababka suuradda iyo hababka deegaanka kala duduwan, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa faa'iidadeeda iyo baahidiisa.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp thích nghi miền mới tên là "độ tinh chỉnh lẫn nhau" cho dịch thiết bị thần kinh (NMB). Chúng ta kết hợp hai phương pháp đã có: độ âm thanh và NMB đa miền. Chúng ta đầu tiên huấn luyện một mô hình NMB trên một hãng song đức ngoài lãnh thổ, và sau đó giai điệu nó trên một tập thể song song song, là một hỗn hợp của cơ thể nội bộ và ngoài lãnh thổ. Tất cả cơ thể được tăng thêm với các thẻ nhân tạo để chỉ ra mỗi miền. Chúng tôi dự liệu có thể so sánh phương phải đóng lại xác nhận và đa miền và bảo vệ nó nhiều điều xảy và thiếu đựng của nó.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻozda, biz neyrolik tarjima uchun "mixed fine tuning" nomli novel domen adaptation usulini tahrirlash. Biz ikkita mavjud narsalarni birlashtiramiz, bir necha domen NMT. Biz birinchi NMT modelini domen\'dan tashqi kompyuterda o\'rganamiz, keyin u suhbat kompyuterdagi va domen kompaniyasida bir qanchalik tartib bo\'ladi. @ info: whatsthis Biz yaxshi ko\'plab domen usullarini o\'rganish va bir necha domen usullarini o\'rganish va uning vazifalarini va qisqatlarini tashqi qilamiz.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за адаптация на домейна, наречен "смесена фина настройка" за невронен машинен превод (НМТ). Ние комбинираме два съществуващи подхода, а именно фина настройка и многодомейн НМТ. Първо тренираме модел на НМТ върху извъндомейнен паралелен корпус, а след това фино го настройваме върху паралелен корпус, който е смесица от вътредомейн и въндомейн корпора. Всички корпуси са разширени с изкуствени тагове, за да указват конкретни домейни. Емпирично сравняваме предложения метод с методите за фина настройка и мулти домейн и обсъждаме ползите и недостатъците му.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe domein adaptatie methode voor genaamd 'mixed fine tuning' voor neuronale machine translation (NMT). We combineren twee bestaande benaderingen, namelijk fine tuning en multi domein NMT. We trainen eerst een NMT model op een buiten-domein parallel corpus, en dan finetunen we het op een parallel corpus dat een mix is van de in-domein en out-of-domein corpora. Alle corpora's zijn uitgebreid met kunstmatige tags om specifieke domeinen aan te geven. We vergelijken onze voorgestelde methode empirisch met finetuning en multi domein methoden en bespreken de voordelen en tekortkomingen ervan.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu adaptacije domena po imenu 'pomiješan fin tuning' za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT). Kombiniramo dva postojeća pristupa, a to je fina prilika i višestruka domena NMT. Prvo treniramo NMT model na paralelnom korpusu izvan domena, a zatim ga dobro sredimo na paralelnom korpusu koji je mješavina korpusa u domenu i izvan domena. Sva tijela se povećava s umjetnim znakovima kako bi pokazala specifične domene. Mi empirički uspoređujemo našu predloženu metodu protiv dobrih mjera i mnogih metoda domena i razgovaramo o njenim koristima i nedostatkima.", 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 새로운 신경기계 번역 분야의 자체 적응 방법인'혼합미조'를 제시했다.마이크로스피커와 다중 도메인 NMT라는 기존의 두 가지 방법을 결합했습니다.우리는 먼저 역외 평행 자료 라이브러리에서 NMT 모델을 훈련한 다음에 역내와 역외 자료 라이브러리가 혼합된 평행 자료 라이브러리에서 이를 미세하게 조정한다.모든 어료 라이브러리에 인공 표기를 추가하여 특정한 영역을 지시한다.우리는 우리가 제시한 방법과 미조와 다역법을 실증적으로 비교하고 그 장단점을 토론했다.", 'da': "I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny domænetilpasningsmetode kaldet 'blandet finjustering' til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT). Vi kombinerer to eksisterende tilgange nemlig finjustering og multi domæne NMT. Vi træner først en NMT model på et parallelt korpus uden for domænet, og finjusterer det på et parallelt korpus, som er en blanding af korpus inden for domænet og uden for domænet. Alle korpora er forstærket med kunstige tags for at angive bestemte domæner. Vi sammenligner empirisk vores foreslåede metode med finjustering og multi domæne metoder og diskuterer dens fordele og mangler.", 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neuartige Domﾃ､nenanpassungsmethode namens "Mixed Fine Tuning" fﾃｼr neuronale maschinelle ﾃ彙ersetzung (NMT) vor. Wir kombinieren zwei bestehende Ansﾃ､tze, nﾃ､mlich Finetuning und Multi Domain NMT. Zuerst trainieren wir ein NMT-Modell auf einem parallelen Korpus auﾃ歹rhalb der Domﾃ､ne, und dann verfeinern wir es auf einem parallelen Korpus, der eine Mischung aus in-domain und out-of-domain Korpora ist. Alle Korpora sind mit kﾃｼnstlichen Tags erweitert, um bestimmte Domﾃ､nen anzuzeigen. Wir vergleichen unsere vorgeschlagene Methode empirisch mit Finetuning- und Multi-Domain-Methoden und diskutieren deren Vor- und Nachteile.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش تغییر\u200cسازی دومین نویسی به نام «تنظیم\u200cسازی خوب پیوند» برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT). ما دو دسترسی موجود هستیم که به عنوان تنظیمات خوب و دامنی چند NMT را ترکیب می کنیم. ما اولین بار یک مدل NMT را روی یک کورپوس پارالی خارج از دامنه آموزش می دهیم، و سپس خوب آن را بر یک کورپوس پارالی ترکیب می دهیم که یک ترکیب از کورپورا خارج از دامنه و خارج از دامنه است. تمام شرکت\u200cها با نقاشی مصنوعی افزایش می\u200cشوند تا نشان دهند سرزمینهای خاص. ما به طور امپراطوری روش پیشنهاد خود را با روش\u200cهای تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cی خوب و متعدد دامنی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و در مورد سودهایی و ناکامی\u200cهایش بحث می\u200cکنیم.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode adaptasi domain novel bernama 'penyesuaian halus campuran' untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT). Kami menggabungkan dua pendekatan yang ada, yaitu penyesuaian baik dan NMT multi domain. Kita pertama-tama melatih model NMT pada sebuah korpus paralel luar domain, dan kemudian memperbaikinya pada korpus paralel yang merupakan campuran dari korpus dalam domain dan luar domain. Semua corpora ditambah dengan tag buatan untuk menunjukkan domain spesifik. We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kubadilisha riwaya yenye jina la ‘mchanganyiko mzuri’ kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya kidini (NMT). Tunaunganisha mbinu mbili zilizokuwepo kwa jina la utangazaji mzuri na sehemu nyingi za NMT. Kwanza tunamfundisha muundo wa NMT kwenye mashindano ya nje ya ndani yanayofanana, na kisha kuyapaa vizuri kwenye chombo kilichofanana na ambacho ni mchanganyiko wa ndani na nje ya makampuni ya ndani. All corpora are augmented with artificial tags to indicate specific domains.  Tunawalinganisha kwa nguvu mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa dhidi ya utoaji mzuri na njia nyingi za ndani na kujadili faida zake na upungufu wake.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የናውሬል መሣሪያዎች ትርጓሜ (NMT) የሚባል ‘mixed fine tuning’ የሚል የኖዌብ ዶሜን አካባቢ ማድረግ እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ሁለትን የተገኘውን ጥያቄ እና በብዙ ዶሜኔን እናስቀላቅላለን፡፡ አስቀድመን የNMT ምሳሌ ከዶሜን ውጪ የኮርፓስ እና በሙሉ ውስጥ እና ከዶሜን ኮርፖርት ውጭ መቀላቀል በሚል የኮርፓስ ላይ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ኮርፖርት ሁሉም የተለያዩ አዲስ ዶሜኖችን ለማሳየት በተጨማሪው ማሰሪያ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re të përshtatjes në domeni të quajtur 'përcaktimi i përzier i mirë' për përkthimin nervor të makinave (NMT). Ne kombinojmë dy metoda ekzistuese, në të vërtetë rregullimin e mirë dhe NMT në shumë domeni. Së pari trajnojmë një model NMT në një korpus paralel jashtë domenit, dhe pastaj e rregullojmë atë në një korpus paralel që është një përzierje e korprave jashtë domenit dhe jashtë domenit. Të gjitha trupat janë shtuar me etiketa artificiale për të treguar domeni specifike. We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր բնագավառի ադապտացիայի մեթոդ, որը կոչվում է "խառնված գեղեցիկ հարմարեցման" նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար (NMT). We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT.  Առաջին հերթին մենք վարժեցնում ենք NMT-ի մոդելը օտար տիեզերքի զուգահեռ կորպոսի վրա, հետո նրբագեցնում ենք այն զուգահեռ կորպոսի վրա, որը տիեզերքի և օտար տիեզերքի խառնուրդ է: Բոլոր մարմները ավելացվում են արհեստական նշաններով, որպեսզի նշեն որոշակի բնագավառներ: Մենք էմպրիկապես համեմատում ենք մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը բարձրակարգման և բազմաբնագավառների մեթոդների հետ և քննարկում ենք դրա առավելությունները և բացակայությունները:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য একটি নভেল ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপেটশন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। আমরা দুটি বিদ্যমান উপায়ের সাথে একত্রিত করি যার নামে ভাল টুইনিং এবং বহুবার ডোমেইন এনএমটি। আমরা প্রথম একটি এনএমটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করি ডোমেইনের বাইরে প্যারালেল কর্পাসের উপর, তারপর এটাকে সুন্দর করে দেই একটি প্যারালেল কোর্পাসের উপর যা ডোমেইনের মিশ্রিত এবং ড সকল কর্পোরা বিশেষ ডোমেইন নির্দেশ করার জন্য শৈল্পিক ট্যাগ দিয়ে যোগ করা হয়েছে। আমরা প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির তুলনায় আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত উপায় এবং বহুজাতিক ডোমেইন পদ্ধতির বিরুদ্ধে তুলনা করি এবং তার সুবিধা ও', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n roman domein aanpassing metode genaamd 'gemengde fyn tuning' vir neurale masjien vertaling (NMT). Ons kombinieer twee bestaande toegang naamlik fyn tuning en multi domein NMT. Ons trein eerste 'n NMT model op 'n uit-domein parallele korpus, en dan fin dit op 'n parallele korpus wat 'n gemeng van die in-domein en uit-domein korpora is. Alle korpore word met kunstenaar etikette vergroot om spesifieke domeine te wys. Ons vergelyk ons voorgestelde metode met fyn tuning en meer domein metodes en bespreek sy voordele en kortpad.", 'bs': "U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu adaptacije domena po imenu 'pomešana dobra pjesma' za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT). Kombiniramo dva postojeća pristupa, a to je fina prilika i multidomena NMT. Prvo treniramo model NMT-a na paralelnom korpusu van domena, a zatim ga dobro sredimo na paralelnom korpusu koji je mješavina korpore u domenu i van domena. Sva tela se povećava sa umjetnim znakovima kako bi pokazala specifične domene. Mi empirički uspoređujemo našu predloženu metodu protiv dobrih mjera i mnogih metoda domena i razgovaramo o njenim koristima i nedostatkima.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz neural makine terjimesi üçin \'karışık güzel täňleme\' adynda bir domena adaptasyon yöntemi teklip edip görýäris. Biz iki bar yaklaşmayı "güzel düzenleme" ve çoklu domena NMT olarak birleştiriyoruz. İlk olarak NMT modelini, domuz dışındaki paralel korpus üzerinde eğitiriz ve sonrasında onu paralel korpusa ayarlayın. Bu da domuz dışındaki ve domuz korporasının karışığı. Hemme korpora belli alanlary görkezmek üçin sungaty etiketler bilen artdyrılýar. Biz teklif edilen yöntemimizi ince düzenleme ve çoklu domeny yöntemlerine karşılaştırıp, faydalarını ve iğrençlerini tartıştırıyoruz.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu adaptace domény s názvem "smíšené jemné ladění" pro neuronový strojový překlad (NMT). Kombinujeme dva existující přístupy, a to jemné ladění a multidoménové NMT. Nejprve trénujeme NMT model na paralelním korpusu mimo doménu a pak jej jemně naladíme na paralelním korpusu, který je směsí korpusů in-domény a mimo doménu. Všechny korpusy jsou rozšířeny umělými tagy pro označení konkrétních domén. Naši navrhovanou metodu empiricky porovnáváme s jemným laděním a multidoménovými metodami a diskutujeme její přínosy a nedostatky.', 'ca': "En aquest article, proposem un mètode d'adaptació de domini nou anomenat 'ajustament fins mixte' per a la traducció neuromàtica (NMT). Combinem dos enfocaments existents, a saber, ajustes fins i NMT de múltiples dominis. Primer entrenem un model NMT en un corpus paral·lel fora de domini, i després ho ajuntem finament en un corpus paral·lel que és una combinació de corpora en domini i fora de domini. Tots els corpores estan augmentats amb etiquetes artificials per indicar dominis específics. Comparem empíricament el nostre mètode proposat amb els mètodes d'ajustament fins i multidominis i discutem els seus beneficis i deficiències.", 'az': "Bu kağızda, nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün 'karışıq güzel tuning' adlı yeni domena uyğulama metodu təklif edirik. Biz iki mövcud tərəfləri birləşdiririk ki, yaxşı tərəflər və çox domain NMT. Biz ilk dəfə NMT modelini bağlı bir paralel korpusa təhsil edirik, sonra onu paralel korpusa təhsil edirik ki, domeinin və dış domeinin karışıqlığı var. Bütün korpora müəyyən domenaları göstərmək üçün məhsul etiketlərlə artırılır. Biz təklif etdiyimiz metodları yaxşı düzəltmək və çoxlu domena metodları ilə qarşılaşdırırıq və onun mənfəətlərini və ucbatlarını mübahisə edirik.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse domeeni kohandamise meetodi nimega "mixed fine tuning" neuronal masintõlke (NMT) jaoks. Kombineerime kaks olemasolevat lähenemisviisi, nimelt peenhäälestus ja mitmevaldkondlik NMT. Kõigepealt treenime NMT mudelit väljaspool domeeni paralleelsel korpusel ja seejärel häälestame selle paralleelsel korpusel, mis on segu domeeni- ja väljaspool domeeni korpustest. Kõik korpused on täiendatud kunstlike siltidega, mis näitavad konkreetseid domeene. Me võrdleme empiiriliselt oma kavandatud meetodit peenhäälestus- ja multidomeenimeetoditega ning arutame selle eeliseid ja puudusi.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta verkkotunnuksen sopeutumismenetelmää nimeltä "mixed fine tuning" neurokonekäännökseen (NMT). Yhdistämme kaksi olemassa olevaa lähestymistapaa eli hienosäätöä ja usean toimialueen NMT. Ensin koulutamme NMT-mallin toimialueen ulkopuolisella rinnakkaisella korpusella, ja sitten hienosäädämme sitä rinnakkaisella korpusella, joka on sekoitus toimialueen sisäisiä ja ulkoisia korpusia. Kaikkia korpusia täydennetään keinotekoisilla tunnisteilla, jotka osoittavat tiettyjä verkkotunnuksia. Vertaamme ehdotettua menetelmää empiirisesti hienosäätö- ja monialuemenetelmiin ja keskustelemme sen hyödyistä ja puutteista.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we proposal a new domain modification method name \'Mixed Fining tuning\' for Neral device translation (NMT). We comb 2 available accesses namely Fintuning and multi domain NMT. We first vlan an NMT model on an out-of politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We empirecally align we proposal method against Fintuning and multi domain Methods and debut the benets and shortcom ings.', 'sk': "V prispevku predlagamo novo domensko prilagoditveno metodo z imenom 'mešano fino tuning' za nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT). Združujemo dva obstoječa pristopa, in sicer fine tuning in multi domain NMT. Najprej treniramo model NMT na zunajdomenskem paralelnem korpusu, nato pa ga natančno nastavimo na vzporednem korpusu, ki je mešanica notranjih in zunajdomenskih korpusov. Vsi korpusi so dopolnjeni z umetnimi oznakami, ki označujejo določene domene. Empirično primerjamo našo predlagano metodo z metodami finega uravnavanja in večdomenskih metod ter razpravljamo o njenih koristih in pomanjkljivostih.", 'ha': "Daga wannan takardar, muna goyyade wata shirin adaptation na nohannun da aka suna 'misfarce mai kyau' wa fassarar maɓallin neural (NMT). We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT.  Kayyar da misalin NMT kan wani misalin da ke fita daga dukkan damu, sa'an nan kuma ke sami shi a kan karbon da ke daidaita, wanda ya zama mai haɗi da guda da kuma wanda ba ya fita daga makampuni. Dukan shirin firana ana ƙara tagogi masu basu'ar da za'a nuna kayan da ke ƙayyade. Tuna samfani game da hanyoyinMu wanda aka yi niyyar da shi, kan tunkuɗe wa mai kyau da hanyõyin mutane masu yawa, kuma mu yi jayayya a cikin amfani da da ƙaranci.", 'bo': "In this paper, we propose a novel domain adaptation method named 'mixed fine tuning' for neural machine translation (NMT). We combine two existing approaches namely fine tuning and multi domain NMT. We first train an NMT model on an out-of-domain parallel corpus, and then fine tune it on a parallel corpus which is a mix of the in-domain and out-of-domain corpora. སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆོས་སུ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་དོན་བྲིས་དང་སྣ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།", 'he': "In this paper, we propose a novel domain adaptation method named 'mixed fine tuning' for neural machine translation (NMT).  אנחנו משלבים שני גישות קיימות, כלומר התרגיל מעולה ומספר שדות NMT. We first train an NMT model on an out-of-domain parallel corpus, and then fine tune it on a parallel corpus which is a mix of the in-domain and out-of-domain corpora.  All corpora are augmented with artificial tags to indicate specific domains.  We empirically compare our proposed method against fine tuning and multi domain methods and discuss its benefits and shortcomings."}
{'en': 'Efficient Extraction of Pseudo-Parallel Sentences from Raw Monolingual Data Using Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'الاستخراج الفعال للجمل الموازية الزائفة من البيانات الأولية أحادية اللغة باستخدام تضمين الكلمات', 'es': 'Extracción eficiente de oraciones pseudoparalelas a partir de datos monolingües sin procesar mediante incrustaciones de palabras', 'fr': "Extraction efficace de phrases pseudo-parallèles à partir de données monolingues brutes à l'aide de l'intégration de mots", 'pt': 'Extração eficiente de sentenças pseudo-paralelas de dados monolíngues brutos usando incorporação de palavras', 'ja': '単語埋め込みを使用した生の単語データからの擬似並列文の効率的な抽出', 'hi': 'Word Embeddings का उपयोग कर कच्चे मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा से छद्म-समानांतर वाक्यों का कुशल निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Эффективное извлечение псевдопараллельных предложений из необработанных одноязычных данных с использованием вложений слов', 'zh': '用词嵌从原始单语数中高效取伪并行句', 'ga': 'Baint Éifeachtach Pianbhreitheanna Comhthreomhara as Sonraí Amha Aonteangacha ag Úsáid Leabaithe Focal', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική εξαγωγή Ψευδοπαράλληλων προτάσεων από ακατέργαστα μονογλωσσικά δεδομένα χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Pszeudopárhuzamos mondatok hatékony kivonása nyers egynyelvű adatokból Word beágyazásokkal', 'it': 'Estrazione efficiente di frasi pseudoparallele da dati monolingue grezzi utilizzando incorporazioni Word', 'kk': 'Псевдо- параллелі сөздерді бір- бір тілі деректерден шығару мүмкіндігі', 'lt': 'Efficient Extraction of Pseudo-Parallel Sentences from Raw Monolingual Data Using Word Embeddings', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Efisien Hukuman Pseudo-Paralel dari Data Monolingual Raw Mengguna Pencampuran Kata', 'mk': 'Ефикасна екстракција на псевдо- паралелни реченици од суви монолингвални податоци со користење на вградувања на зборови', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മണോളില്\u200d ഡാറ്റായില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പെയുദോ- പാരല്\u200d ശിക്ഷകളുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യ', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni Effiċjenti ta’ Sentenzi Psewdo-Paraleli minn Dejta Monolingwali Prima bl-Użu ta’ Embeddings tal-kliem', 'mn': 'Efficient Extraction of Pseudo-Parallel Sentences from Raw Monolingual Data Using Word Embeddings', 'no': 'Effektivt utpakking av Pseudo- Parallel teikn frå Raw Monolingueldata som brukar ordinnbygging', 'ro': 'Extragerea eficientă a sentințelor pseudoparalele din date monolingve brute utilizând încorporări Word', 'sr': 'Efikasno izvlačenje pseudo-paralelnih rečenica iz sirovih monolingviskih podataka korištenje rečenica', 'pl': 'Skuteczna ekstrakcja zdań pseudo-równoległych z surowych danych jednojęzycznych za pomocą osadzeń Word', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Effective Extraction of Pseudo-Parallel Sentences from Raw Monolingual Data Isticmaalka Oral Embedding', 'sv': 'Effektiv extraktion av pseudoparallella meningar från råa enspråkiga data med hjälp av Word-inbäddningar', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chỉ ra trường hợp thần kinh, dù là đơn ngôn ngữ thô, khai vị từ.', 'bg': 'Ефективно извличане на псевдо-паралелни изречения от сурови едноезични данни с помощта на вграждания на думи', 'da': 'Effektiv udvinding af pseudoparallelle sætninger fra rå ensprogede data ved hjælp af Word Embeddings', 'nl': 'Efficiënte extractie van Pseudo-Parallele zinnen uit ruwe eentalige gegevens met behulp van Word Embeddings', 'de': 'Effiziente Extraktion von Pseudo-parallelen Sätzen aus rohen einsprachigen Daten mithilfe von Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Efisien dari Hukuman Pseudo-Paralel dari Data Monolingual Raw menggunakan Embedding Word', 'fa': 'اخراج عملی از جمله\u200cهای پاراللی از داده\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cی یک زبان', 'sw': 'Kutolewa kwa ufanisi wa Mahakama ya Pseudo-Parallel kutoka Taarifa za Raw Monolingual kwa kutumia Mazungumzo ya Neno', 'tr': 'Monolingul Maglumatdan Pseudo-Parallel Sözleri Taýşart', 'hr': 'Efikasno izvlačenje pseudo-Parallelnih kazna iz sirih monolingviskih podataka korištenje uključenih riječi', 'sq': 'Ekstraktim i Efikantë i Dënimeve Pseudo-Paralele nga të dhënat Monolinguale të Raw duke përdorur përfshirje fjalësh', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'language', 'ko': '단어 삽입을 이용하여 원시 단어 데이터에서 위조 평행문을 효율적으로 추출하다', 'az': 'Pseudo-Parallel S칬z칲n칲 S톛viyy톛d톛n Etkinlik Kelimi 캻fad톛 Etm톛si', 'hy': 'Հոգեբանական-զուգահեռ նախադասությունների արդյունավետ արտահանումը դասախոսությունների միջոցով', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'Efektivní extrakce Pseudo-paralelních vět z surových jednojjazyčných dat pomocí vložení Word', 'et': 'Pseudo-paralleelsete lausete tõhus ekstraheerimine ühekeelsetest tooraindmetest sõnade manustamise abil', 'ca': 'Extracció eficient de sentences pseudo-paralleles a partir de dades monolíngues brutes amb incorporació de paraules', 'bs': 'Efikasno izvlačenje pseudo-paralelnih kazna iz sirovih monolingviskih podataka korištenje integracija riječi', 'fi': 'Pseudo-rinnakkaisten lauseiden tehokas purkaminen raakakielisestä datasta Word Embeddingsin avulla', 'jv': 'Efeffectent extract of pseudo-Paralll Sententions from rou Monolngual data Using Word embedings', 'sk': 'Učinkovito ekstrakcijo psevdo-vzporednih stavkov iz surovih enojezičnih podatkov z uporabo besednih vdelav', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'הוציאה יעילה של משפטים פסאודו-פאראליים ממידע מונולינגולי ראש בשימוש בתיקוי מילים', 'bo': 'Efficient Extraction of Pseudo-Parallel Sentences from Raw Monolingual Data Using Word Embeddings'}
{'en': 'We propose a new method for extracting pseudo-parallel sentences from a pair of large monolingual corpora, without relying on any document-level information. Our method first exploits word embeddings in order to efficiently evaluate trillions of candidate sentence pairs and then a classifier to find the most reliable ones. We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.', 'ar': 'نقترح طريقة جديدة لاستخراج جمل زائفة متوازية من زوج من المجموعات الكبيرة أحادية اللغة ، دون الاعتماد على أي معلومات على مستوى المستند. تستغل طريقتنا أولاً تضمين الكلمات من أجل التقييم الفعال لتريليونات أزواج الجمل المرشحة ثم المصنف للعثور على أكثرها موثوقية. أبلغنا عن تحسينات كبيرة في تكييف المجال للترجمة الآلية الإحصائية عند استخدام نموذج ترجمة تم تدريبه على أزواج الجمل المستخرجة من مجموعات أحادية اللغة داخل المجال.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour extraire des phrases pseudo-parallèles d'une paire de grands corpus monolingues, sans dépendre d'informations au niveau du document. Notre méthode exploite d'abord les intégrations de mots afin d'évaluer efficacement des milliards de paires de phrases candidates, puis un classificateur pour trouver les plus fiables. Nous rapportons des améliorations significatives dans l'adaptation de domaines pour la traduction automatique statistique lors de l'utilisation d'un modèle de traduction formé sur les paires de phrases extraites de corpus monolingues dans le domaine.", 'es': 'Proponemos un nuevo método para extraer oraciones pseudoparalelas de un par de cuerpos monolingües grandes, sin depender de ninguna información a nivel de documento. Nuestro método primero explota las incrustaciones de palabras para evaluar de manera eficiente billones de pares de oraciones candidatas y luego un clasificador para encontrar las más confiables. Reportamos mejoras significativas en la adaptación de dominios para la traducción automática estadística cuando se utiliza un modelo de traducción entrenado en los pares de oraciones extraídos de cuerpos monolingües dentro del dominio.', 'pt': 'Propomos um novo método para extrair sentenças pseudo-paralelas de um par de grandes corpora monolíngues, sem depender de nenhuma informação em nível de documento. Nosso método primeiro explora a incorporação de palavras para avaliar com eficiência trilhões de pares de frases candidatas e, em seguida, um classificador para encontrar os mais confiáveis. Relatamos melhorias significativas na adaptação de domínio para tradução automática estatística ao usar um modelo de tradução treinado nos pares de frases extraídos de corpora monolíngues no domínio.', 'ja': '文書レベルの情報に依存することなく、一対の大きな単一言語のコーパから擬似並行文を抽出するための新しい方法を提案します。私たちの方法は、まず、数兆の候補文ペアを効率的に評価するために単語埋め込みを利用し、次に最も信頼できるものを見つけるための分類子を利用します。統計的機械翻訳のためのドメイン適応において、ドメイン内の単一言語のコーラから抽出された文のペアでトレーニングされた翻訳モデルを使用した場合の有意な改善を報告しています。', 'zh': '取大单语语料库伪并行句法,无所依文档。 吾法先以词嵌数万亿个候句为是,然后以类器得句对。 臣等言,当用域内单语语料库中取句对译模,计机器翻译之域适应性有显改。', 'hi': 'हम किसी भी दस्तावेज़-स्तर की जानकारी पर भरोसा किए बिना, बड़े मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट की एक जोड़ी से छद्म-समानांतर वाक्यों को निकालने के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि पहले शब्द एम्बेडिंग का शोषण करती है ताकि ट्रिलियन उम्मीदवार वाक्य जोड़े का कुशलतापूर्वक मूल्यांकन किया जा सके और फिर सबसे विश्वसनीय लोगों को खोजने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर। हम सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार की रिपोर्ट करते हैं जब इन-डोमेन मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट से निकाले गए वाक्य जोड़े पर प्रशिक्षित अनुवाद मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новый метод извлечения псевдопараллельных предложений из пары больших одноязычных корпусов, не полагаясь на какую-либо информацию на уровне документа. Наш метод сначала использует вложения слов, чтобы эффективно оценить триллионы пар предложений-кандидатов, а затем классификатор, чтобы найти наиболее надежные. Мы сообщаем о значительных улучшениях в адаптации домена для статистического машинного перевода при использовании модели перевода, обученной парам предложений, извлеченным из внутридоменных одноязычных корпусов.', 'ga': "Molaimid modh nua chun abairtí bréagacha comhthreomhara a bhaint as péire corpora móra aonteangacha, gan a bheith ag brath ar aon fhaisnéis ar leibhéal doiciméad. Baineann ár modh leas as leabú focal ar dtús chun trilliún de phéirí abairtí iarrthóra a mheas go héifeachtach agus ansin aicmitheoir chun na cinn is iontaofa a aimsiú. Tuairiscímid feabhsuithe suntasacha in oiriúnú fearainn d'aistriúchán meaisín staitistiúil nuair a úsáidtear samhail aistriúcháin atá oilte ar na péirí abairtí a bhaintear as corpora aonteangacha in-fearainn.", 'hu': 'Egy új módszert javasolunk a pszeudopárhuzamos mondatok kivonására egy nagy, egynyelvű corpora párból, anélkül, hogy bármilyen dokumentum szintű információra támaszkodnánk. Módszerünk először a szóbeágyazásokat használja ki annak érdekében, hogy hatékonyan értékelje a jelölt mondatpárok billióit, majd egy osztályozó, hogy megtalálja a legmegbízhatóbbakat. Jelentős fejlődést jelentünk a statisztikai gépi fordításhoz szükséges domain adaptációban, ha a domain egynyelvű corporákból kivont mondatpárokra képzett fordítási modellt használjuk.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την εξαγωγή ψευδο-παράλληλων προτάσεων από ένα ζευγάρι μεγάλων μονογλωσσικών σωμάτων, χωρίς να βασιζόμαστε σε οποιαδήποτε πληροφορία σε επίπεδο εγγράφου. Η μέθοδός μας εκμεταλλεύεται πρώτα την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων για να αξιολογήσει αποτελεσματικά τρισεκατομμύρια υποψήφιων ζευγαριών προτάσεων και στη συνέχεια έναν ταξινομητή για να βρει τα πιο αξιόπιστα. Αναφέρουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην προσαρμογή τομέα για στατιστική μηχανική μετάφραση όταν χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μοντέλο μετάφρασης εκπαιδευμένο στα ζεύγη προτάσεων που εξάγονται από μονογλωσσικά σώματα εντός του τομέα.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი მეთოდი პესეუდო-პარალელური სიტყვების გამოყენება დიდი მონოლენგური კოპორაზე, რომელიც კოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის ინფორმაციას არ დავ ჩვენი მეთოდი პირველი გამოყენება სიტყვების ინტებიზაცია, რომელიც ეფექტიურად გამოყენება ტრილიონის კონდიდენტის კონდიდენტის ზოგის და შემდეგ კლასიფიკაციერი,  ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ მნიშვნელოვანი კომპორაციაში სტატისტური მანქანის გაგრძელების შესახებ, როდესაც გამოყენება მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური გაგრძელებული მანქან', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo metodo per estrarre frasi pseudo-parallele da una coppia di grandi corpora monolingue, senza contare su alcuna informazione a livello di documento. Il nostro metodo sfrutta prima l'embedding di parole al fine di valutare efficacemente trilioni di coppie di frasi candidate e poi un classificatore per trovare quelle più affidabili. Riportiamo miglioramenti significativi nell'adattamento del dominio per la traduzione automatica statistica quando si utilizza un modello di traduzione addestrato sulle coppie di frasi estratte da corpora monolingue nel dominio.", 'kk': 'Құжат деңгейіндегі мәліметіне сенім бермеген псевдо- параллелі сөздерді бір үлкен монолингі корпорасынан шығару үшін жаңа әдісін таңдаймыз. Біздің әдіміміз біріншіден үлкен сөздерді ендіру үшін триллионарды кандидаттік сөздердің екеуін оқу үшін жұмыс істейді. Содан кейін ең сенімді табу үшін классифи Біз домендегі монолинг корпорасынан шығарылған тілкелер үшін аудару үлгісін қолданғанда доменнің адаптациялауының көптеген жақсы жақсартуларын есептеп береміз.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują metodą pseudolygiagrečių sakinių ištraukimui iš dviejų didelių vienakalbių korporų, nepasitikius jokia dokumentų lygmens informacija. Mūsų metodas pirmiausia naudoja žodžių įterpimą siekiant veiksmingai įvertinti trilijonus kandidatų sakinių poros, o vėliau klasifikatorių rasti patikimiausius. We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нов метод за извлекување псевдо-паралелни реченици од еден пар големи монојазични корпора, без да се потпираме на никакви информации на ниво на документ. Нашиот метод прво ги искористува зборовите за ефикасна оценка на трилиони парови на кандидатски реченици и потоа класификатор за да ги најде најдоверливите. Ние известуваме значителни подобрувања во адаптацијата на доменот за статистички машински превод кога користиме преводен модел трениран на парови реченици извадени од монојазичната корпора во доменот.', 'ml': 'We propose a new method for extracting pseudo-parallel sentences from a pair of large monolingual corpora, without relying on any document-level information.  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആദ്യം വാക്ക് അകത്തേക്ക് പോകുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്. പിന്നെ വിശ്വസ്തനായ വാക്കിന്റെ ട്രില്യണ്\u200d  ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്ന് പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പരിശീലന മ', 'mn': 'Бид нэг том хэл корпораас pseudo-параллел өгүүлбэрийг шинэ арга зааж өгдөг. Документын түвшинд ямар ч мэдээллийг итгэхгүй. Эхлээд бидний арга нь хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглаж, хэмжээсүүдийн триллион хэмжээсүүдийг үр дүнтэй үнэлгээд, дараа нь хамгийн итгэлтэй хэмжээсүүдийг олохын тулд хуваалцагч юм. Бид статистикийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын тусламжтайгаар тодорхой сайжруулалтын тусламжтайгаар өгүүлбэл нэг хэлний корпорас гаргасан өгүүлбэл хөрөнгө оруулалтын загварыг ашиглаж', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein ny metode for å pakka ut pseudoparallelle setningar frå eit par stor monospråk korpora, utan å påverka på informasjon om dokumentnivå. Metoden vårt først eksploderer ordinnbygging for å effektivt evaluera trillioner av kandidate setningpar og så ein klassifiserer for å finna dei mest betre. Vi rapporterer signifikante forbedringar i domeneadaptasjonen for statistiske maskinsomsetjing når du brukar eit omsetjingsmodul treng på setningsmappar som er ekstrahert frå monolinguske korpora i domenet.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nową metodę wyodrębniania zdań pseudo-równoległych z pary dużych jednojęzycznych korpusów, bez polegania na jakichkolwiek informacjach na poziomie dokumentu. Nasza metoda najpierw wykorzystuje osadzenia słów w celu skutecznej oceny trylionów par kandydatów zdań, a następnie klasyfikator do znalezienia najbardziej wiarygodnych. Raportujemy znaczącą poprawę adaptacji domeny dla statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego przy użyciu modelu tłumaczenia trenowanego na parach zdań ekstrahowanych z korpusów jednojęzycznych w domenie.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă metodă de extragere a propozițiilor pseudo-paralele dintr-o pereche de corpore monolingve mari, fără a se baza pe informații la nivel de document. Metoda noastră exploatează mai întâi încorporarea cuvintelor pentru a evalua eficient trilioane de perechi de propoziții candidate și apoi un clasificator pentru a găsi cele mai fiabile. Raportăm îmbunătățiri semnificative în adaptarea domeniului pentru traducerea automată statistică atunci când utilizăm un model de traducere instruit pe perechile de propoziții extrase din corpore monolingve în domeniu.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novu metodu za izvlačenje pseudoparalelnih rečenica iz par velikih monojezičkih korpora, bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve informacije o nivou dokumenta. Naša metoda prvo iskorištava reč uključenja kako bi efikasno procenila trilijune parova kandidatskih rečenica i onda klasifikatora da pronađe najpouzdanije. Prijavljujemo značajne poboljšanje u adaptaciji domena za prevod statističkih mašin a kada koristimo model prevoda obučen na par rečenica izvučen iz monojezičke korpore u domenu.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub oo aan ku kalsoonaan macluumaad ku saabsan heerka dukumentiga. Our method first exploits word embeddings in order to efficiently evaluate trillions of candidate sentence pairs and then a classifier to find the most reliable ones.  Waxaannu wargelinaynaa kororsashada guriga si muhiim ah oo loo beddelo tarjumaadda takhasuska marka lagu isticmaalo tusaale turjumaan lagu baray labada noocyo oo ka soo baxay korporada afka gudaha.', 'si': 'අපි අලුත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ලොකු භාෂාභාෂික කොර්පෝරාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නිකාශ කර අපේ පළමු විධානය ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා වචනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා වචනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශ අපි වාර්තා කරන්නේ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ව', 'ms': 'Kami mengusulkan kaedah baru untuk mengekstrak kalimat pseudo-paralel dari pasangan besar corpora monobahasa, tanpa bergantung pada sebarang maklumat aras dokumen. Our method first exploits word embeddings in order to efficiently evaluate trillions of candidate sentence pairs and then a classifier to find the most reliable ones.  Kami laporkan perbaikan yang signifikan dalam penyesuaian domain untuk terjemahan mesin statistik apabila menggunakan model terjemahan dilatih pada pasangan kalimat yang dikekstrakkan dari korpra monobahasa domain.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-estrazzjoni ta’ sentenzi psewdo-paralleli minn koppja ta’ korpura monolingwi kbar, mingħajr ma nistrieħu fuq informazzjoni fuq livell ta’ dokument. Il-metodu tagħna l-ewwel jisfrutta l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem sabiex jevalwa b’mod effiċjenti triljuni ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi kandidati u mbagħad klassifikatur biex isib dawk l-aktar affidabbli. Aħna nirrappurtaw titjib sinifikanti fl-adattament tad-dominju għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni tal-istatistika meta nużaw mudell ta’ traduzzjoni mħarreġ fuq pari ta’ sentenzi estratti minn korpura monolingwi fid-dominju.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny metod för att extrahera pseudoparallella meningar från ett par stora enspråkiga korpora, utan att förlita sig på någon dokumentnivå information. Vår metod utnyttjar först ordinbäddningar för att effektivt utvärdera biljoner kandidatmeningar och sedan en klassificerare för att hitta de mest tillförlitliga. Vi rapporterar betydande förbättringar i domänanpassningen för statistisk maskinöversättning när vi använder en översättningsmodell som är utbildad på de meningspar som extraheras från enspråkiga corpora inom domänen.', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ ایک بڑے ایک زبان کوپرا کی جڑ سے ایک دوسرے سے ایک دوسرے کے منحصر کے مطابقہ کے بغیر کسی دفتر سطح کی معلومات پر بھروسہ کریں۔ ہمارا طریقہ پہلی بار ابڈینگ لکھنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ کڈینڈیٹ جماعت جوڑوں کے تریلیونوں کا ارزش کرے اور پھر ایک کلیسائر کے لئے بہترین اعتماد داروں کو پیدا کرے۔ ہم ڈومین کی تعمیر میں اضافہ کرنے کی ضرورت ترجیح دیتے ہیں جبکہ ڈومین میں ایک تک زبان کوپرا سے اٹھایا گیا ایک ترجمہ موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு பெரிய மொன்மொழி நிறுவனத்தில் இருந்து புதிய முறைமையை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு, எந்த ஆவண- மட்டத்தில் தகவலையும் நம்பாமல் ஒரு புதிய எங்கள் முறைமையில் முதலில் வார்த்தையை உள்ளடக்கும் வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத்தி வார்த்தையாளர் வாக்கு ஜோடிகளை விளக்க முடியும் பின மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரி பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தும் போது களம் ஒழுங்குப்பொருளில் முன்னேற்றத்', 'uz': "Biz juda katta munosabatlarni bir necha bog'liq so'zlarni chiqarish uchun yangi usulni talab qilamiz, hech qanday hujjat darajadagi maʼlumot yoʻq. Bizning birinchi usuli shunday so'zni o'zgartiradi, bir necha millionlab so'zlarni tasavvur qilish uchun va keyin eng ishlatadigan narsalarni topish uchun tadbirlik qiladi. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới để trích ra các câu giả song song từ một cặp tay bự, bằng ngôn ngữ, mà không dựa vào bất kỳ thông tin về tài liệu nào. Cách của chúng tôi lần đầu tiên khai thác các từ để đánh giá hiệu quả hàng tỷ tỷ tỷ tỷ tỷ tỷ câu cho ứng cử viên và sau đó một người phân loại để tìm những câu đáng tin cậy nhất. Chúng tôi báo cáo những cải tiến quan trọng trong việc sửa chữa miền cho phiên dịch máy thống kê khi sử dụng một mô hình dịch được đào tạo trên các cặp câu được chiết xuất từ một cơ thể ngôn ngữ nội bộ.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novu metodu izvlačenja pseudoparalelnih rečenica iz par velikih monojezičkih tijela, bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve informacije o nivou dokumenta. Naša metoda prvo iskorištava riječ ugrađenja kako bi učinkovito procijenio trilijune parova kandidatskih kazna, a zatim klasifikatora da pronađe najpouzdanije. Prijavljujemo značajne poboljšanje u adaptaciji domena za prevod statističkih strojeva kada koristimo model prevoda obučen na par rečenica izvučen iz monojezičke korpore u domenu.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов метод за извличане на псевдопаралелни изречения от двойка големи едноезични корпуси, без да разчитаме на информация на ниво документ. Нашият метод първо използва вграждането на думи, за да оцени ефективно трилиони кандидатски двойки изречения, а след това класификатор, за да намери най-надеждните. Докладваме значителни подобрения в адаптацията на домейна за статистически машинен превод при използване на преводачески модел, обучен върху двойките изречения, извлечени от едноезични корпуси в домейна.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe methode voor om pseudo-parallelle zinnen uit een paar grote eentalige corpora te extraheren, zonder te vertrouwen op informatie op documentniveau. Onze methode gebruikt eerst woord embeddings om triljoenen kandidaat-zinnenparen efficiënt te evalueren en vervolgens een classificator om de meest betrouwbare te vinden. We rapporteren significante verbeteringen in domeinaanpassing voor statistische machinevertaling bij het gebruik van een vertaalmodel dat getraind is op de zinnenparen die uit monolinguale corpora in-domein worden geëxtraheerd.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny metode til at udtrække pseudo-parallelle sætninger fra et par store ensprogede korpora uden at stole på nogen dokumentniveau information. Vores metode udnytter først ord indlejringer for effektivt at evaluere billioner af kandidatsætningspar og derefter en klassificerer for at finde de mest pålidelige. Vi rapporterer betydelige forbedringer i domænetilpasning til statistisk maskinoversættelse, når vi bruger en oversættelsesmodel, der er trænet på sætningsparene udvundet fra monosprogede corpora i domænet.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine neue Methode vor, pseudo-parallele Sätze aus einem Paar großer einsprachiger Korpora zu extrahieren, ohne sich auf Informationen auf Dokumentenebene zu verlassen. Unsere Methode nutzt zunächst Worteinbettungen, um Billionen von Kandidatenpaaren effizient zu bewerten und dann einen Klassifikator, um die zuverlässigsten zu finden. Wir berichten über signifikante Verbesserungen in der Domänenanpassung für statistische maschinelle Übersetzung, wenn wir ein Übersetzungsmodell verwenden, das auf den Satzpaaren trainiert wurde, die aus in-domain monolingualen Korpora extrahiert wurden.', 'ko': '우리는 대형 단어 자료 라이브러리에서 위조 평행문을 추출하는 새로운 방법을 제시했는데, 이 방법은 어떠한 문서급 정보에도 의존하지 않는다.우리의 방법은 우선 단어 삽입을 이용하여 수만 억 개의 후보 문장 쌍을 효과적으로 평가한 다음에 분류기를 사용하여 가장 믿을 만한 문장 쌍을 찾는 것이다.우리는 역내 단어 자료 라이브러리에서 추출한 문장을 사용하여 훈련된 번역 모델을 사용할 때 통계기계 번역의 영역 적응성이 현저히 개선되었다고 보고했다.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza njia mpya ya kuondoa hukumu zilizofanana na pseudo kutoka makampuni makubwa ya kiutaifa, bila kutegemea taarifa yoyote ya nyaraka. Utawala wetu wa kwanza unatumia maneno yanayoingia ili kutathmini mamilioni ya hukumu ya wagombea kwa ufanisi na kisha mfanyakazi wa kutafuta mambo yanayoaminika zaidi. Tunashiria maendeleo makubwa ya kuboresha ndani kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya takwimu wakati kwa kutumia mfumo wa utafsiri ulioelekezwa kwenye hukumu ya wawili waliotolewa kutoka kwenye makampuni ya kimapenzi ya ndani.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk mengekstrak kalimat pseudo-paralel dari sepasang corpora monobahasa besar, tanpa bergantung pada informasi tingkat dokumen. Metode kami pertama mengeksploitasi pembangunan kata untuk mengevaluasi secara efisien triliun pasangan kalimat kandidat dan kemudian klasifikasi untuk menemukan yang paling dipercaya. We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.', 'sq': 'We propose a new method for extracting pseudo-parallel sentences from a pair of large monolingual corpora, without relying on any document-level information.  Metoda jonë shfrytëzon së pari përfshirjen e fjalëve me qëllim që të vlerësojmë efektivisht trilione çifte të dënimeve kandidate dhe pastaj një klasifikues për të gjetur a to më të besueshme. Ne raportojmë përmirësime të rëndësishme në përshtatjen e domenit për përkthimin statistikor të makinave kur përdorim një model përkthimi të trajnuar në çiftet e fjalëve të nxjerra nga korpra monogjuhësore në domeni.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe metode vir uitpakking van pseudo- parallele setings van 'n paar groot monolinge korpora, sonder om op enige dokumentvlak inligting te vertrou. Ons metode verwerp eerste woord inbettings om trilyne van kandidate sin paar te evalueer en dan 'n klassifiseerder te vind die mees betroubare. Ons rapporteer betekende verbeteringe in domein aanpassing vir statistiese masjien vertaling wanneer 'n vertaling model gebruik word wat op die setpaar uitgevoer is van in-domein monolinge korpora.", 'am': 'ከሁለት ታላላቅ በሞሎንጋል ኮርፖርት ያሉትን አዲስ ሥርዓት በማንኛውም የሰነድ ደረጃ መረጃ ሳይታመን አዲስ ስርዓት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ የቃላችን ቃላት የሚወስደውን እና በሺሕ ሚሊዮን የሚቆጠሩን የፍርድ ግንኙነት እና በኋላም የሚታመኑትን ነገር ለማግኘት ትክክለኛ ነው፡፡ በዶሜን በሞሎንቋል ኮርፖራ ላይ የተወለደውን የግንኙነት ዓይነቶች በተማረ ጊዜ ለstatistical machine ትርጓሜ ማድረግ በዶሜን አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Biz pseudo-paralel cümlələri böyük bir monodil korporadan çıxartmaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik, heç bir döküm səviyyəsinə təvəkkül etmədən. Bizim metodumuz ilk dəfə sözləri istifadə etmək üçün trilyonlarını kandidát cümlələrin çiftlərini və sonra ən güvenilir olanları tapmaq üçün seçici sözləri istifadə edər. Biz, domenin monodil korporatından çıxarılan cümlənin çiftlərində təhsil edilmiş çevirim modelini istifadə edərkən statistik makinat çeviri üçün dəyişiklik düzəltmələrini bildiririk.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ կեղծ-զուգահեռ նախադասությունների դուրս բերելու երկու մեծ միալեզու կոպորատից, առանց որևէ փաստաթղթի մակարդակի ինֆորմացիայի վրա հիմնվելու: Մեր մեթոդը նախ օգտագործում է բառերի ներդրումը, որպեսզի արդյունավետ գնահատենք երլիարդավոր նախադասության զույգեր և հետո դասակարգիչ գտնենք ամենավստահելի դասակարգիչները: Մենք զեկուցում ենք, որ վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման վիճակագրական ադապտացիայի ոլորտում կարևոր բարելավումներ են կատարվում, երբ օգտագործվում ենք թարգմանման մոդել, որը պատրաստված է դասությունների զույգերի վրա, որոնք ստաց', 'fa': 'ما یک روش جدید برای اخراج کردن جمله\u200cهای pseudo-parallel از یک جفت شرکت بزرگ یک زبان پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم بدون اعتماد به هیچ اطلاعات سطح سند. روش ما اول کلمه\u200cای را استفاده می\u200cکند که به طور موثر ارزیابی تریلیون جفت جمله\u200cهای کاندیدا باشد و سپس یک راهنمایی برای پیدا کردن بهترین قابل اعتماد\u200cکنندگان است. ما گزارش می\u200cدهیم بهترین توسعه\u200cهای بزرگی در تغییرات دومین برای ترجمه ماشین آماری وقتی استفاده از یک مدل ترجمه آموزش داده شده بر جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cای که از یک شرکت تنها زبان در دامین خارج شده است.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে কোন ডকুমেন্ট-স্তরের তথ্য নির্ভর করে না থাকে একটি দুই বিশাল মোনোলিভাল কোর্পোরা থেকে প্যা আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রথমে শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে কার্যকর কোটি কোটি প্রার্থীর বাক্যের জোড়া বিষয়টি মূল্যায়ন করতে পারে এবং তারপর তারা সব We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novu metodu izvlačenja pseudoparalelnih rečenica iz par velikih monojezičkih korpora, bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve informacije o nivou dokumenta. Naša metoda prvo iskorištava riječ o integraciji kako bi učinkovito procijenio trilijune parova kandidatskih kazna, a zatim klasifikatora da pronađe najpouzdanije. Prijavljujemo značajne poboljšanje u adaptaciji domena za prevod statističkih strojeva kada koristimo model prevoda obučen na par rečenica izvučen iz monojezičke korpore u domenu.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme novou metodu extrakce pseudo-paralelních vět z dvojice velkých jednojjazyčných korpusů bez spoléhání na informace na úrovni dokumentu. Naše metoda nejprve využívá vložení slov k efektivnímu vyhodnocení bilionů kandidátských větových párů a pak klasifikátor k nalezení těch nejspolehlivějších. Zaznamenáváme významné zlepšení adaptace domén pro statistický strojový překlad při použití překladového modelu trénovaného na větových párech extrahovaných z monojazyčných korpusů v doméně.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou mètode d'extracció de frases pseudo parallel d'un parell de grans corpores monolingües, sense confiar en cap informació a nivell de document. El nostre mètode explota primer l'incorporació de paraules per avaluar eficientment bilions de parells de frases candidates i després un classificador per trobar les més fiables. Informem millores significatives en l'adaptació de dominis a la traducció estadística de màquines quan utilitzem un model de traducció entrenat en parells de frases extraïdes de corpora monolingüe en domini.", 'et': 'Pakume välja uue meetodi pseudoparalleelsete lausete ekstraheerimiseks paarist suurtest ühekeelsetest korpustest, tuginemata ühelegi dokumenditasemel teabele. Meie meetod kasutab kõigepealt sõnade manustamist, et tõhusalt hinnata triljoniid kandidaadilausepaare ja seejärel klassifikaatorit, et leida kõige usaldusväärsemad. Teatame olulisest paranemisest domeeni kohandamises statistilise masintõlke jaoks, kasutades tõlkemudelit, mis on koolitatud domeenisiseste ühekeelsete korpuste lausepaaridel.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta menetelmää pseudorinnakkaisten lauseiden purkamiseen suurista yksikielisistä korpusista luottamatta dokumenttitason tietoihin. Menetelmämme hyödyntää ensin sanaupotuksia arvioidakseen tehokkaasti biljoonia ehdokaslausepareja ja sitten luokittelija löytää luotettavimmat. Raportoimme merkittäviä parannuksia verkkotunnuksen sopeutumisessa tilastolliseen konekäännökseen käytettäessä käännösmallia, joka on koulutettu domeenin yksikielisistä korpusista poimittuihin lausepareihin.', 'tr': 'Biz pseudo-parallel sözlerni beýleki monodil korporatdan çykarmak üçin täze bir täze täze täze täze täze täze teklip berýäris, hiç bir sened derejesinde maglumaty ýitirmek üçin. Biziň täzimimiz ilkinji gezek sözlerimizi daşarylşyrýar, üçin trilyon sany kandidýa sözleriň çiftlerini muňsat etmek üçin, we soňra iň güýçli sözlerimizi tapmak üçin klassifikatçimizi ulanýar. Bir terjime nusgasyny ulananda, domençylyk monolingual korporatdan çykan çiftlerde, domençylyk adilamasynda möhüm gelişmeleri bilýäris.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing bagian kanggo nggawe pseudrot-parangjelangul Awakdhéwé wis nggawe barang kelas embedding word nggawe layan tanggal nggawe trilian sing apik dadi winih, unyak sekondirno ingkang dianggawe barang dhéwé. We report Signual advancements in domain modification for istatical device translation when use a translation model cured on the word paras extract from in-domain Monlanguage Body.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wata hanyowa na fita cire-takardar ɗin da ke daidaita daga makampuni biyu biyu na sauri, kuma bã zã mu yi ƙayyade ba kan wani maɓalli na takardar. Taimakonmu na farko ta buɗe maganar ta cikin bayani dõmin ya ƙaddara ma'abũcin mutane da kuma a dabam, mai fassara zuwa ga masu da aminci. Tuna rapori masu ƙari mai kyau cikin adaptori na guda wa fassarar masu ƙarani da kuma idan, za'a yi amfani da wani motsi na fassarar da shi idan an sanar da su a kan salon duk biyu wanda aka fito daga makampuni na-Domen na monoli-harshen.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo metodo za ekstrakcijo psevdo-vzporednih stavkov iz dveh velikih enojezičnih korpusov, ne da bi se zanašali na informacije na ravni dokumenta. Naša metoda najprej izkorišča vdelave besed, da bi učinkovito ocenili bilijone kandidatnih stavkov, nato pa klasifikator, da bi našli najbolj zanesljive. Poročamo o pomembnih izboljšavah pri prilagajanju domenskih področij statističnega strojnega prevajanja pri uporabi prevajalskega modela, usposobljenega za par stavkov, izvlečenih iz enojezičnih korpusov v domeni.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים שיטה חדשה להוציא משפטים פסאודו-מקבילים מזוג של גופורה מונושפה גדולה, בלי לסמוך על מידע רמה מסמכים. השיטה שלנו מנצלת קודם את המילים בכדי להעריך באופן יעיל טריליונים של זוגות משפטים מועמדים ואז מסווג למצוא את המילים הכי אמינים. We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚིག་ལས་དུས་འཚོལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་པོ་དེ་ཡིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཕྲག་སྒྲིག We report significant improvements in domain adaptation for statistical machine translation when using a translation model trained on the sentence pairs extracted from in-domain monolingual corpora.'}
{'en': 'Feature Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'ar': 'ميزة التجزئة لتحديد اللغة واللهجة', 'pt': 'Hash de recursos para identificação de idioma e dialeto', 'es': 'Función de hashing para la identificación de idiomas y dialectos', 'ja': '言語と方言識別のための機能ハッシュ', 'hi': 'भाषा और बोली पहचान के लिए सुविधा हैशिंग', 'zh': '语言方言之功哈希', 'ru': 'Хэширование функций для идентификации языка и диалекта', 'ga': 'Gné Hashing le hAithint Teanga agus Canúintí', 'fr': "Hachage de fonctionnalités pour l'identification de la langue et du dial", 'ka': 'Language and Dialect Identification', 'el': 'Χαρακτηριστικό Hashing για αναγνώριση γλώσσας και διαλέκτων', 'hu': 'Funkcióhasználat a nyelv- és tárcsaazonosításhoz', 'it': "Feature Hashing per l'identificazione della lingua e del dialetto", 'kk': 'Тіл мен таңдау идентификациясы', 'lt': 'Language and Dialect Identification', 'mk': 'Функционално пребарување за идентификација на јазикот и дијалектот', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хол болон сонголтын тодорхойлолтын төлөө', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയ്ക്കും ഡയലക്ട്രിക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാനുമായി ഹാഷിങ്ങിന്റെ വിശിഷ്ടമാക്കുക', 'mt': 'Feature Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'pl': 'Hashing funkcji dla identyfikacji języka i dialektu', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Caracteristici Hashing pentru identificarea limbii și a dialectelor', 'sr': 'Zakljuèavanje funkcije za identifikaciju jezika i dijalekcije', 'si': 'භාෂාව සහ නිරීක්ෂණය විශේෂතා හැසින්ග්', 'sv': 'Funktionshashing för språk- och uppringningsidentifiering', 'so': 'Isticmaalka aqoonsiga luqada iyo diyaarinta', 'ta': 'மொழி மற்றும் உரையாடல் அடையாளத்திற்கான வேகம்', 'ur': 'Language and Dialect Identification for Feature Hashing', 'uz': 'Til va diagramma shaxsiyatlaridan foydalanish', 'vi': 'Độ nóng muốn xác minh ngôn ngữ và thoại', 'da': 'Feature Hashing for sprog og dialekt identifikation', 'hr': 'Hashing karaktera za identifikaciju jezika i dijaliziranja', 'bg': 'Характеристики за идентификация на език и диалект', 'nl': 'Functiehashing voor taal- en dialectidentificatie', 'fa': 'تنظیم ویژه برای شناسایی زبان و برگزیدن', 'de': 'Feature Hashing für Sprache und Dialekt Identifizierung', 'id': 'Feature Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'tr': 'Dil we Saýlaw Kimligi üçin Taýşartma Hashing', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Feature Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'am': 'ቋንቋ እና ዶሴ ምረጡ', 'sw': 'Tafadhali kwa ajili ya utambulisho wa lugha na Dialect', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ko': '사투리 식별과 언어 특징', 'ca': 'Features Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'bs': 'Hashing karaktera za identifikaciju jezika i dijalekta', 'az': 'Dil və Diyal Seçim Kimliğinin Hashing', 'bn': 'ভাষা এবং ডায়ালেক্ট পরিচয়ের জন্য হ্যাশিং বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী', 'et': 'Funktsioonide hashing keele ja dialekti identifitseerimise jaoks', 'fi': 'Feature Hashing for Language and Dialect Identification', 'cs': 'Funkce Hashing pro identifikaci jazyka a dialektu', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Hashing funkcij za identifikacijo jezika in klica', 'he': 'חיסוי אופייני לזהות שפת וחיבור', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་འདེམས་པའི་ངོས་འཛིན་ལ་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས'}
{'en': 'We evaluate feature hashing for language identification (LID), a method not previously used for this task. Using a standard dataset, we first show that while feature performance is high, LID data is highly dimensional and mostly sparse (99.5 %) as it includes large vocabularies for many languages ; memory requirements grow as languages are added. Next we apply hashing using various hash sizes, demonstrating that there is no performance loss with dimensionality reductions of up to 86 %. We also show that using an ensemble of low-dimension hash-based classifiers further boosts performance. Feature hashing is highly useful for LID and holds great promise for future work in this area.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتقييم ميزة التجزئة لتحديد اللغة (LID) ، وهي طريقة لم يتم استخدامها من قبل لهذه المهمة. باستخدام مجموعة بيانات قياسية ، نوضح أولاً أنه في حين أن أداء الميزات مرتفع ، فإن بيانات LID ذات أبعاد عالية وغالبًا ما تكون متفرقة (99.5٪) لأنها تتضمن مفردات كبيرة للعديد من اللغات ؛ تزداد متطلبات الذاكرة مع إضافة اللغات. بعد ذلك ، نطبق التجزئة باستخدام أحجام تجزئة مختلفة ، مما يدل على عدم وجود خسارة في الأداء مع تخفيضات في الأبعاد تصل إلى 86٪. نظهر أيضًا أن استخدام مجموعة من المصنفات منخفضة الأبعاد القائمة على التجزئة يعزز الأداء بشكل أكبر. تجزئة الميزة مفيدة للغاية لـ LID وتبشر بالعمل المستقبلي في هذا المجال.', 'es': 'Evaluamos el hashing de funciones para la identificación de idioma (LID), un método que no se utilizaba anteriormente para esta tarea. Al usar un conjunto de datos estándar, primero mostramos que, si bien el rendimiento de las funciones es alto, los datos LID son altamente dimensionales y en su mayoría escasos (99,5%), ya que incluyen vocabularios extensos para muchos idiomas; los requisitos de memoria aumentan a medida que se agregan idiomas. A continuación, aplicamos hash utilizando varios tamaños de hash, lo que demuestra que no hay pérdida de rendimiento con reducciones de dimensionalidad de hasta un 86%. También demostramos que el uso de un conjunto de clasificadores basados en hash de baja dimensión aumenta aún más el rendimiento. El hashing de características es muy útil para LID y es muy prometedor para el trabajo futuro en esta área.', 'pt': 'Avaliamos o hashing de recursos para identificação de linguagem (LID), um método não usado anteriormente para esta tarefa. Usando um conjunto de dados padrão, primeiro mostramos que, embora o desempenho do recurso seja alto, os dados LID são altamente dimensionais e principalmente esparsos (99,5%), pois incluem grandes vocabulários para muitos idiomas; os requisitos de memória aumentam à medida que os idiomas são adicionados. Em seguida, aplicamos o hash usando vários tamanhos de hash, demonstrando que não há perda de desempenho com reduções de dimensionalidade de até 86%. Também mostramos que o uso de um conjunto de classificadores baseados em hash de baixa dimensão aumenta ainda mais o desempenho. O hash de recursos é altamente útil para o LID e é uma grande promessa para trabalhos futuros nessa área.', 'fr': "Nous évaluons le hachage des fonctionnalités pour l'identification de la langue (LID), une méthode qui n'avait jamais été utilisée auparavant pour cette tâche. À l'aide d'un jeu de données standard, nous montrons tout d'abord que même si les performances des entités sont élevées, les données LID sont très dimensionnelles et pour la plupart fragmentées (99,5\xa0%) car elles incluent des vocabulaires volumineux pour de nombreuses langues\xa0; les besoins en mémoire augmentent à mesure que des langues sont ajoutées Ensuite, nous appliquons le hachage en utilisant différentes tailles de hachage, démontrant ainsi qu'il n'y a pas de perte de performance avec des réductions de dimensionnalité allant jusqu'à 86\xa0%. Nous montrons également que l'utilisation d'un ensemble de classificateurs basés sur le hachage de faible dimension améliore encore les performances. Le hachage des fonctionnalités est très utile pour LID et est très prometteur pour les travaux futurs dans ce domaine.", 'ja': 'このタスクでは、以前に使用されていなかった言語識別（蓋）のための機能ハッシュを評価します。標準的なデータセットを使用すると、まず、機能のパフォーマンスが高い一方で、LIDデータは非常に寸法が高く、多くの言語の大規模なボキャブラリーを含むため、ほとんどがまばらです（ 99.5%）。言語が追加されるにつれて、メモリ要件が増大します。次に、さまざまなハッシュサイズを使用してハッシュを適用し、最大86 ％の寸法削減でパフォーマンス損失がないことを実証します。また、低次元ハッシュベースの分類子のアンサンブルを使用すると、パフォーマンスがさらに向上することを示しています。機能ハッシュは、蓋に非常に役立ち、この分野での将来の作業に大きな希望を持っています。', 'zh': '吾评语识 (LID) 之特徵哈希,此前未用之道也。 用格数集,吾等先明,虽性能高,而LID数高维,多疏(99.5%),以其多言词汇。 内存求随语增长。 臣等用诸哈希大小宜用哈希,证无性损,降维高达86%。 明于哈希之低维,合之以进一步提高性也。 功能散列于LID甚有用,而为未来之大望也。', 'hi': 'हम भाषा पहचान (LID) के लिए सुविधा हैशिंग का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, एक विधि जो पहले इस कार्य के लिए उपयोग नहीं की गई थी। एक मानक डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हुए, हम पहले दिखाते हैं कि जबकि सुविधा प्रदर्शन उच्च है, LID डेटा अत्यधिक आयामी है और ज्यादातर विरल (99.5%) है क्योंकि इसमें कई भाषाओं के लिए बड़ी शब्दावली शामिल है; स्मृति आवश्यकताओं के रूप में भाषाओं को जोड़ा जाता है के रूप में बढ़ते हैं. इसके बाद हम विभिन्न हैश आकारों का उपयोग करके हैशिंग लागू करते हैं, यह प्रदर्शित करते हुए कि 86% तक की आयामीता में कटौती के साथ कोई प्रदर्शन हानि नहीं है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि कम-आयाम हैश-आधारित क्लासिफायरों की एक टुकड़ी का उपयोग करना प्रदर्शन को और बढ़ा देता है। फीचर हैशिंग LID के लिए अत्यधिक उपयोगी है और इस क्षेत्र में भविष्य के काम के लिए महान वादा रखता है।', 'ru': 'Мы оцениваем хеширование признаков для идентификации языка (LID), метод, который ранее не использовался для этой задачи. Используя стандартный набор данных, мы сначала показываем, что, несмотря на высокую производительность функции, данные LID являются высокоразмерными и в основном разреженными (99,5%), поскольку они включают в себя большие словари для многих языков; требования к памяти растут по мере добавления языков. Далее мы применяем хеширование с использованием различных размеров хешей, демонстрируя, что нет потери производительности с уменьшением размерности до 86%. Мы также показываем, что использование набора низкоразмерных хеш-классификаторов дополнительно повышает производительность. Функция хеширования очень полезна для КРЫШКИ и имеет большие перспективы для будущей работы в этой области.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid measúnú ar hashing gné le haghaidh aitheantais teanga (LID), modh nár úsáideadh roimhe seo don tasc seo. Ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí caighdeánach, léirímid ar dtús, cé go bhfuil feidhmíocht gnéithe ard, go bhfuil sonraí LID an-tromchúiseach agus den chuid is mó gann (99.5%) mar go n-áirítear ann stór focal mór do go leor teangacha; fásann riachtanais chuimhne de réir mar a chuirtear teangacha leis. Ansin cuirimid hashing i bhfeidhm ag baint úsáide as méideanna éagsúla hash, rud a thaispeánann nach bhfuil aon chaillteanas feidhmíochta le laghduithe toise suas le 86%. Léirímid freisin go gcuireann baint úsáide as ensemble de aicmitheoirí hash-toise íseal le feidhmíocht. Tá hashing gné an-úsáideach le haghaidh LID agus tá gealladh mór ann maidir le hobair sa réimse seo amach anseo.', 'hu': 'A nyelvazonosítás (LID) funkciókivonását értékeljük, amelyet korábban nem használtak erre a feladatra. Egy szabványos adatkészlet használatával először azt mutatjuk meg, hogy bár a funkciók teljesítménye magas, a LID adatok rendkívül dimenziósak és többnyire ritkák (99,5%), mivel sok nyelven nagy szótárakat tartalmaznak; A nyelvek hozzáadásával nőnek a memóriaigények. Ezután különböző hash méreteket alkalmazunk, bizonyítva, hogy nincs teljesítményvesztés 86%-os dimenziócsökkentéssel. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy az alacsony dimenziós hash-alapú osztályozók csoportjának használata tovább növeli a teljesítményt. A funkciók hashing rendkívül hasznos a LID számára, és nagy ígéretet tart a jövőbeli munkához ezen a területen.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ენის ინდიდინტიფიკაციისთვის (LID) ფუნქციების ჰექსინგის გამოსაყენება, რომელიც პირველად არ გამოყენებულია ამ დავალებისთვის. სტანდარტული მონაცემების გამოყენება, ჩვენ პირველად გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ფუნქციების გამოყენება უფრო მეტია, LID მონაცემები ძალიან განზომილებელია და უფრო მეტი განზომილებელია (99, მეხსიერების შესაძლებლობა იქნება როგორც ენები დამატებული. შემდეგ ჩვენ აყენებთ ჰაქტის განსხვავებული ჰაქტის განზომილებების გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოჩენება, რომ განზომილებული განზომილებების გადასრულება 86%-დან არ არის. ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ, რომ მაღალი განზომილებების კლასიფიკაცირების გამოყენება უფრო მეტი გამოყენება. თმა მნჲდჲ ოჲლჲზვნჲ ჱა LID თ ეყპზთ ეჲბპჲ ჲბვღანვ ჱა ბყევღარა პაბჲრა გ რაჱთ პაйона.', 'it': "Valutiamo l'hashing delle funzionalità per l'identificazione della lingua (LID), un metodo non utilizzato in precedenza per questa attività. Utilizzando un set di dati standard, mostriamo innanzitutto che mentre le prestazioni delle funzionalità sono elevate, i dati LID sono altamente dimensionali e per lo più scarsi (99,5%) in quanto includono grandi vocabolari per molte lingue; I requisiti di memoria aumentano man mano che vengono aggiunte le lingue. Successivamente applichiamo hashing utilizzando varie dimensioni di hash, dimostrando che non ci sono perdite di performance con riduzioni dimensionali fino all'86%. Mostriamo anche che l'utilizzo di un insieme di classificatori basati su hash di bassa dimensione aumenta ulteriormente le prestazioni. L'hashing delle funzionalità è molto utile per LID e promette molto lavoro futuro in questo settore.", 'el': 'Αξιολογούμε την κατακερματισμό χαρακτηριστικών για τον προσδιορισμό γλώσσας (LID), μια μέθοδος που δεν χρησιμοποιήθηκε προηγουμένως για αυτήν την εργασία. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων, αποδεικνύουμε πρώτα ότι ενώ η απόδοση χαρακτηριστικών είναι υψηλή, τα δεδομένα είναι εξαιρετικά διαστατικά και ως επί το πλείστον αραιή (99.5%) καθώς περιλαμβάνουν μεγάλα λεξικά για πολλές γλώσσες. Οι απαιτήσεις μνήμης αυξάνονται καθώς προστίθενται γλώσσες. Στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζουμε κατακερματισμό χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορα μεγέθη κατακερματισμού, αποδεικνύοντας ότι δεν υπάρχει απώλεια απόδοσης με μειώσεις διαστασιμότητας έως 86%. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η χρήση ενός συνόλου ταξινομητών χαμηλής διάστασης που βασίζονται σε κατακερματισμούς αυξάνει περαιτέρω την απόδοση. Ο κατακερματισμός χαρακτηριστικών είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμος για το LID και έχει μεγάλη υπόσχεση για μελλοντικές εργασίες σε αυτόν τον τομέα.', 'kk': 'Тілді идентификациялау (LID) үшін мәліметтерді бағалаймыз. Бұл тапсырма үшін алдында қолданбаған әдіс. Стандартты деректер жиынын қолданғанда, біріншіден, мүмкіндіктердің көпшілігі жоғары болғанда, LID деректері үлкен өлшемі және көпшілікті (99, 5%) дегенді көрсетеді, өйткені ол к жады қажеттері тілдерді қосу үшін өсіру. Келесіден біз басқа hash өлшемдерін қолданып, өлшемдерді 86% дегенге дейін өзгерту жоқ дегенді көрсетеді. Мұндай-ақ біз басқа қатар, осындай-ақ бөлшекті бағытталған классификаторларды қолдануға болады. ЛИД үшін мүмкіндіктерді жасау үшін көп пайдалы және бұл аумақтағы болашақ жұмыс үшін үлкен әлемді ұстайды.', 'lt': 'Vertiname kalbos identifikavimo (LID) būdus, kurie anksčiau nebuvo naudojami šiam uždaviniui. Naudojant standartinį duomenų rinkinį pirmiausia parodome, kad nors charakteristikų rezultatai yra aukšti, LID duomenys yra labai matmenys ir dažniausiai retai (99,5 %), nes juose yra dideli daugelio kalbų žodynai; prisiminimo reikalavimai didėja, kai pridedamos kalbos. Vėliau naudojame hash ą naudojant įvairius hashų dydžius, parodant, kad nėra jokių veiklos nuostolių, o matmenų sumažėjimas iki 86 %. Taip pat parodome, kad naudojant mažo matmens klasifikatorių kompleksą toliau didinami rezultatai. Atitinkamas hashing yra labai naudingas LID ir yra labai pažadus ateityje dirbti šioje srityje.', 'mk': 'Го проценуваме хаширањето на функциите за идентификација на јазикот (LID), метод кој претходно не е употребен за оваа задача. Користејќи стандарден компјутер на податоци, прво покажуваме дека иако перформансата на карактеристиките е висока, податоците на LID се високодимензионални и претежно ретки (99,5 отсто), бидејќи вклучуваат големи речници за многу јазици; потребите од меморија растат додека се додаваат јазици. Следно ќе аплицираме хашинг користејќи различни големини на хашинг, демонстрирајќи дека нема загуба на резултатите со намалување на димензионалноста до 86 отсто. Исто така покажуваме дека употребата на ансембл на нискодимензионални класификатори базирани на хаш понатаму ја зголемува перформансата. Функционалното хаширање е многу корисно за ЛИД и има големи ветувања за идната работа во оваа област.', 'ms': 'Kami menilai hashing ciri untuk pengenalpasti bahasa (LID), kaedah yang belum digunakan sebelumnya untuk tugas ini. Mengguna set data piawai, kita pertama-tama menunjukkan bahawa walaupun prestasi ciri-ciri tinggi, data LID sangat dimensi dan kebanyakan jarang (99.5%) kerana ia termasuk vokbulari besar untuk banyak bahasa; keperluan ingatan tumbuh semasa bahasa ditambah. Seterusnya kita laksanakan hashing menggunakan saiz hash berbeza, menunjukkan bahawa tiada kehilangan prestasi dengan pengurangan dimensi sehingga 86%. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan kumpulan klasifikasi dasar hash dimensi rendah meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut. Hashing ciri-ciri sangat berguna untuk LID dan memegang janji besar untuk kerja masa depan di kawasan ini.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയ്ക്ക് മുമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത ഒരു രീതി Using a standard dataset, we first show that while feature performance is high, LID data is highly dimensional and mostly sparse (99.5%) as it includes large vocabularies for many languages;  ഭാഷകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മെമ്മറി ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വളരുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഹാഷ് വലിപ്പം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഹാഷ്ടിങ്ങ് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പ്രകടന നഷ്ടമില്ലെന്ന് തെളി നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് കുറച്ച് തരത്തിലുള്ള ഹാസ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫറുകളുടെ ഒരു പ്രകടനം ഉപയോഗിച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഹാസ്റ്റ് ലിഡിന് വളരെ പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നു. ഭാവിയുടെ ജോലിക്ക് നല്ല വാഗ്ദാനം ഈ പ്രദേശത', 'mn': 'Бид хэлний идентификацийн хашгийг (LID) тооцоолж байдаг. Өмнө нь энэ үйл ажилд хэрэглэгддэггүй арга. Стандарттай өгөгдлийн санг ашиглан бид анхны даалгаврын үйл ажиллагаа өндөр байхдаа LID өгөгдлийн санаа маш их хэмжээст, ихэнхдээ жижиг (99.5%) гэдгийг харуулж байна. дурсамж хэрэгцээг хэл нэмэгдүүлэхэд нэмэгддэг. Дараа нь бид олон хашгийн хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглан хашшинг ашиглаж, хэмжээсүүдийг 86% хүртэл багасгаж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид хэмжээст бага хэмжээст хашгийн үндсэн хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглан илүү дасгал үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлдэг. ЛИД-д маш хэрэгтэй бөгөөд ирээдүйн ажилд маш их амлалтай байдаг.', 'ro': 'Evaluăm hashing-ul caracteristicilor pentru identificarea limbii (LID), o metodă care nu a fost utilizată anterior pentru această sarcină. Folosind un set de date standard, arătăm mai întâi că, în timp ce performanța caracteristicilor este ridicată, datele LID sunt foarte dimensionale și în mare parte rare (99,5%), deoarece include vocabulare mari pentru multe limbi; Cerinţele de memorie cresc odată cu adăugarea limbilor. Apoi aplicăm hashing folosind diferite dimensiuni hash, demonstrând că nu există pierderi de performanță cu reduceri dimensionale de până la 86%. De asemenea, arătăm că utilizarea unui ansamblu de clasificatori bazați pe hash de dimensiuni mici sporește și mai mult performanța. Funcții hashing este foarte util pentru LID și deține o mare promisiune pentru lucrările viitoare în acest domeniu.', 'mt': 'Aħna jevalwaw il-karatteristiċi hashing għall-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa (LID), metodu li ma ntużax qabel għal dan il-kompitu. Bl-użu ta’ sett ta’ dejta standard, l-ewwel nuru li filwaqt li l-prestazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi hija għolja, id-dejta LID hija dimensjonali ħafna u fil-biċċa l-kbira hija baxxa (99.5%) peress li tinkludi vokabulari kbar għal ħafna lingwi; ir-rekwiżiti tal-memorja jikbru hekk kif jiżdiedu l-lingwi. Imbagħad napplikaw il-hashing bl-użu ta’ daqsijiet varji tal-hash, li juru li ma hemm l-ebda telf fil-prestazzjoni bi tnaqqis fid-dimensjonalità sa 86 %. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-użu ta’ ensemble ta’ klassifikaturi bbażati fuq hash b’dimensjoni baxxa jkompli jsaħħaħ il-prestazzjoni. Il-hashing karatteristiku huwa utli ħafna għall-LID u għandu wegħda kbira għal xogħol futur f’dan il-qasam.', 'no': 'Vi evaluerer funksjonshashing for språk- identifikasjon (LID), eit metode som ikkje tidlegare brukt for denne oppgåva. Bruk eit standard datasett viser vi først at mens funksjonen er høg, er LID-data høg dimensjonal og mest sparke (99,5%) sidan det inneheld store ordlister for mange språk. minnenkrevst aukar som språk vert lagt til. Neste bruker vi hashing med forskjellige hash-storleik, som viser at det ikkje finst noko tap av utviklingar med dimensjonalitetsreduksjonar til 86%. Vi viser også at med ein ensembel av lågare hash-baserte klassifikatorar størrar utviklingar. Feature hashing er svært nyttig for LID og holdt stor lov for framtidige arbeid i dette området.', 'pl': 'Oceniamy hashing funkcji dla identyfikacji języka (LID), metodę niestosowaną wcześniej do tego zadania. Korzystając ze standardowego zbioru danych, najpierw pokazujemy, że choć wydajność funkcji jest wysoka, dane LID są bardzo wymiarowe i głównie rzadkie (99,5%) ponieważ zawierają duże słowniki dla wielu języków; Wymagania pamięci rosną wraz z dodawaniem języków. Następnie stosujemy hashing przy użyciu różnych rozmiarów hashu, co pokazuje, że nie ma utraty wydajności przy redukcji wymiarowości do 86%. Pokazujemy również, że wykorzystanie zestawu klasyfikatorów niskowymiarowych opartych na hash dodatkowo zwiększa wydajność. Hashing funkcji jest bardzo przydatny dla LID i ma wielką obietnicę dla przyszłych prac w tym obszarze.', 'so': 'Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa aqoonsiga luqada (LID), qaab aan horay loo isticmaalin shaqadaas. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu tusnaynaa in marka lagu sameynayo sameynta farsamada aqoontu aad u dheer yahay, macluumaadka LID waa mid aad u qiimo badan oo aad u yar (99.5%) sida ay ku jirto hadal faro badan oo luuqado badan; baahida xusuusta ayaa kordha sida luuqadaha lagu daro. Dabadeedna waxaynu isticmaalaynaa alaabta alaabta kala duduwan, waxaynu caddaynaynaa inaan dhamaan waxyaabaha la’aanta ee lagu liito ilaa 86 boqolkiiba. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in lagu isticmaalo tusaale ahaan fasalada hoose-hoose ah oo ay ku qoran yihiin tababar dheeraad ah. Waxyaabaha aad u faa’iido leh ee la isticmaalo LID, wuxuuna qabanayaa ballan weyn oo u wanaagsan shaqada mustaqbalka ah ee dalkan.', 'sv': 'Vi utvärderar funktionshashing för språkidentifiering (LID), en metod som inte tidigare använts för denna uppgift. Med hjälp av en standarddatauppsättning visar vi först att även om funktionsprestandan är hög, är LID-data mycket dimensionell och mestadels gles (99,5%) eftersom den innehåller stora vokabulärer för många språk; Minneskraven ökar i takt med att språk läggs till. Därefter använder vi hashing med olika hashstorlekar, vilket visar att det inte finns någon prestandaförlust med dimensionella minskningar på upp till 86%. Vi visar också att användningen av en ensemble av hashbaserade klassificerare med låg dimension ökar prestandan ytterligare. Feature hashing är mycket användbart för LID och håller stora löften för framtida arbete inom detta område.', 'sr': 'Procjenjujemo hashing karakteristike za identifikaciju jezika (LID), metodu koja se ranije ne koristi za ovaj zadatak. Koristeći standardnu setu podataka, prvo pokazujemo da dok je funkcija visoka, podaci LID su izuzetno dimenzionalni i uglavnom rezervni (99,5%) jer uključuju velike rečenice za mnoge jezike; Potrebe za pamćenje rastu dok se dodaju jezici. Sledeće ćemo primjenjivati hashing koristeći različite veličine hash, pokazujući da nema gubitka rezultata s smanjenjem dimenzionalnosti do 86%. Takoðe pokazujemo da korištenje ensembla niskodimenzionalnih klasifikatora na hashu dodatno povećava izvoðenje. Hasing karakteristike je jako korisno za LID i održava veliko obećanje za budući rad u ovoj oblasti.', 'ta': 'நாம் மொழி அடையாளத்திற்கான குணங்களை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். இந்த பணிக்கு முன்னால் பயன்படுத்தப்படாத முறையில். நிலையான தரவுத்தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி முதலில் நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் பண்புகள் செயல்பாடு உயரமாக இருக்கும் போது, LID தரவு மிகவும் பரிமாற்றம் மற்றும் அதிகமா மொழிகள் சேர்க்கப்பட்டால் நினைவகம் தேவைகள் வளரும். அடுத்து நாம் பல்வேறு hash அளவுகளைப் பயன்படுத்தி தேவையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், செயல்பாட்டின் இழப்பு இல்லை என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் குறைந்த மங்குத் திரையில் உள்ள வகுப்பாளர்கள் மேலும் செயல்பாட்டை அதிகப்படுத்துகிறது. குணங்கள் தேவைப்படுகிறது LID க்கு மிகவும் பயனுள்ளது மற்றும் இந்த பிற்பகுதியில் எதிர்கால வேலைக்கு நல்ல வ', 'ur': 'ہم زبان شناسایی (LID) کے لئے شائستہ ہشینگ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ جو پہلے اس کام کے لئے استعمال نہیں کیا جاتا۔ ایک استاندارد ڈاٹ سٹ کے استعمال میں ہم پہلی بار دکھاتے ہیں کہ جبکہ فائدہ فعالیت اچھی ہے، LID ڈاٹ بہت اچھی اندازہ ہے اور اکثر اسپرس (99.5%) ہے جبکہ وہ بہت سی زبانوں کے لئے بڑے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے ہیں۔ مہمانی کی ضرورت بڑھتی ہے جیسے زبانیں اضافہ کی جاتی ہیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم مختلف ہشا سائز کے مطابق ہشانگ کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، دکھاتے ہیں کہ اس کے اندازے سے 86% تک کبھی فعالیت خسارہ نہیں ہے۔ ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ کم اندازے کے ہشا بنیادی کلاسفار کے استعمال سے اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ لیڈ کے لئے زیادہ فائدہ ہے اور اس منطقه میں مستقبل کام کے لئے بڑا وعدہ رکھتا ہے.', 'si': 'අපි භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය (LID) වෙනුවෙන් හැසින් විශේෂතාව අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා, මේ වැඩ සඳහා මුලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජ ප්\u200dරමාණ දත්ත සැට් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා කියලා, LID දත්ත ගොඩක් අභාවිතයි (99.5%) වලින් විශාල භාෂාව මතකය අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා වගේම. ඊලඟට අපි හැෂ් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා හැෂ් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් භාවිත කරන්න, පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 86% වෙනුවෙන් කිසිම අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පහත් පහත් පහත් පහත් විදිහට පහත් විදිහට පහත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වි LID වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්නේ අනාගතයේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්.', 'uz': "Biz bu vazifa uchun oldin ishlatilmagan usuli uchun tilni aniqlash uchun imkoniyatlarni qiymatmiz. @ info: whatsthis xotira keraklari tilni qoʻshilganda uzadi. Keyingi biz har xil hash oʻlchamini ishlatishni qo'llayapmiz va 86 foizga qo'yishni ko'rsatadi. Biz shunday ko'rsatganimiz, biz kichkina shaklga tashkilotlar bilan bir misol bilan ishlashtirishni oshirish mumkin. Xossalari LID uchun juda foydali va bu maydondagi kelajakdagi ish uchun juda yaxshi ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đánh giá việc này để xác định ngôn ngữ (LID), một phương pháp chưa được sử dụng cho nhiệm vụ này. Sử dụng một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, chúng ta đầu tiên cho thấy rằng mặc dù khả năng đặc trưng là cao, dữ liệu có đa số không gian và hầu hết là phổ biến (99.5. Độ nhớ cần thiết tăng dần khi thêm ngôn ngữ. Tiếp theo chúng tôi áp dụng việc cắt cỏ bằng nhiều kích cỡ khoai tây, chứng minh rằng không có mất hiệu suất với độ chia chiều của tới 86=. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy rằng sử dụng một kết hợp của các phân loại khoai tây có chiều thấp. Việc này rất có ích với Bộ phận LID và rất hứa hẹn cho công việc tương lai trong lĩnh vực này.', 'bg': 'Ние оценяваме хеширането на функции за идентификация на езика (метод, който не е използван преди това за тази задача. Използвайки стандартен набор от данни, първо показваме, че макар ефективността на функциите да е висока, данните са силно измерени и предимно рядко (99.5%), тъй като включват големи речници за много езици; Изискванията за памет нарастват с добавянето на езици. След това прилагаме хешинг с различни размери хеш, демонстрирайки, че няма загуба на производителност с намаления на размерите до 86%. Също така показваме, че използването на ансамбъл от нискоизмерени хеш-базирани класификатори допълнително повишава производителността. Характеристиката е изключително полезна за ЛИД и носи голямо обещание за бъдеща работа в тази област.', 'nl': 'We evalueren feature hashing voor taalidentificatie (LID), een methode die niet eerder voor deze taak werd gebruikt. Met behulp van een standaard dataset laten we eerst zien dat hoewel feature performance hoog is, LID data zeer dimensionaal en meestal schaars is (99,5%) omdat het grote woordenboeken bevat voor vele talen; geheugenvereisten groeien naarmate talen worden toegevoegd. Vervolgens passen we hashing toe met behulp van verschillende hashgroottes, waaruit blijkt dat er geen prestatieverlies is met dimensionaliteitsverminderingen tot 86%. We laten ook zien dat het gebruik van een ensemble van low-dimensie hash gebaseerde classificatoren de prestaties verder verbetert. Feature hashing is zeer nuttig voor LID en heeft grote belofte voor toekomstig werk op dit gebied.', 'da': 'Vi evaluerer funktionshashing til sprogidentifikation (LID), en metode, der ikke tidligere er brugt til denne opgave. Ved hjælp af et standarddatasæt viser vi først, at mens funktionsydelsen er høj, er LID-data meget dimensionelle og for det meste sparsomme (99,5%), da de omfatter store ordforråd for mange sprog; hukommelseskravene vokser efterhånden som sprogene tilføjes. Derefter anvender vi hashing ved hjælp af forskellige hashstørrelser, hvilket viser, at der ikke er noget performance tab med dimensionelle reduktioner på op til 86%. Vi viser også, at brugen af et ensemble af hash-baserede klassificeringer i lav dimension yderligere øger ydeevnen. Feature hashing er meget nyttigt for LID og holder store løfter for fremtidigt arbejde på dette område.', 'de': 'Wir evaluieren Feature Hashing zur Sprachidentifikation (LID), eine Methode, die bisher nicht für diese Aufgabe verwendet wurde. Anhand eines Standarddatensatzes zeigen wir zunächst, dass die Funktionsleistung zwar hoch ist, LID-Daten jedoch hochdimensional und meist spärlich sind (99,5%) da sie große Vokabulare für viele Sprachen enthalten; Der Speicherbedarf steigt mit dem Hinzufügen von Sprachen. Als nächstes wenden wir Hashing mit verschiedenen Hashgrößen an und zeigen, dass es bei Dimensionalitätsreduktionen von bis zu 86% keinen Leistungsverlust gibt. Wir zeigen auch, dass die Verwendung eines Ensembles von niederdimensionalen Hash-basierten Klassifikatoren die Performance weiter steigert. Feature Hashing ist sehr nützlich für LID und verspricht viel für zukünftige Arbeiten in diesem Bereich.', 'hr': 'Procjenjujemo hashing karakteristike za identifikaciju jezika (LID), metodu koja se ranije ne koristi za ovaj zadatak. Koristeći standardnu setu podataka, prvo pokazujemo da dok je funkcija visoka, podaci LID-a su izuzetno dimenzionalni i uglavnom rezervni (99,5%) jer uključuju velike riječi za mnoge jezike; zahtjevi pamćenja rastu dok se dodaju jezici. Sljedeće primjenjujemo hashing s različitim veličinama hash, pokazujući da nema gubitka učinkovitosti s smanjenjem dimenzionalnosti do 86%. Također pokazujemo da korištenje ensembla niskodimenzionalnih klasifikatora na hash-u dodatno povećava učinkovitost. Hashing karakteristike je jako korisno za LID i održava veliko obećanje za budući rad u ovom području.', 'sw': 'Tunatathmini utambulisho wa lugha (LID), njia ambayo haijatumiwa kabla kwa kazi hii. Kwa kutumia seti ya taarifa za kiwango cha kawaida, tunaonyesha kuwa wakati utendaji wa tabia ni mkubwa, takwimu za LID zina kiwango kikubwa na zinapungua zaidi (asilimia 99.5) kwa sababu inajumuisha lugha kubwa kwa lugha nyingi; mahitaji ya kumbukumbu yanakua wakati lugha zinaongezeka. Baadae tunatumia hasira kwa kutumia ukubwa wa hasira tofauti, wakionyesha kwamba hakuna uharibifu wa utendaji ukipungua kwa kiwango cha kufikia asilimia 86. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba kwa kutumia mifano ya wataalamu wenye mitazamo ya chini yanayoweza kufanya kazi zaidi. Kitendo cha hisia kina faida sana kwa ajili ya LID na kina ahadi nzuri kwa ajili ya kazi za baadaye katika eneo hili.', 'fa': 'ما برای شناسایی زبان (LID) یک روش پیش برای این کار استفاده نشده را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از مجموعه داده\u200cهای استاندارد، اولین بار نشان می\u200cدهیم که در حالی که فعالیت ویژه بالا است، داده\u200cهای LID بسیار اندازه\u200cای است و بسیار بیشتر کم (99.5%) به عنوان کلمات بزرگ برای زبان\u200cهای بسیاری شامل می\u200cشود نیازهای حافظه به عنوان زبانها اضافه می شوند. بعدش با استفاده از اندازه\u200cهای مختلف هشی تفاوت می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که هیچ خسارتی از عملکرد با کاهش اندازه\u200cای به حدود 86 درصد وجود ندارد. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که با استفاده از نمونه\u200cای از نمونه\u200cهای راهنمایی\u200cکننده\u200cهای پایین\u200cاندازه\u200cای بیشتر عملکرد را افزایش می\u200cدهد. خصوصیت هاشینگ برای LID بسیار مفید است و قول بزرگی برای کار آینده در این منطقه دارد.', 'id': 'Kami mengevaluasi hashing fitur untuk identifikasi bahasa (LID), metode yang belum digunakan sebelumnya untuk tugas ini. Menggunakan set data standar, kami pertama-tama menunjukkan bahwa sementara prestasi karakteristik tinggi, data LID sangat dimensi dan kebanyakan jarang (99,5%) karena termasuk vocabulari besar untuk banyak bahasa; keperluan ingatan tumbuh saat bahasa ditambah. Selanjutnya kami menerapkan hashing menggunakan berbagai ukuran hash, menunjukkan bahwa tidak ada kehilangan prestasi dengan reduksi dimensionalitas sampai 86%. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan ensemble dari klasifikasi dasar hash dimensi rendah lebih meningkatkan prestasi. Hashing fitur sangat berguna untuk LID dan memegang janji besar untuk pekerjaan masa depan di daerah ini.', 'tr': 'Biz dil kimligi üçin hashing edip bilmedik (LID), öňki täze üçin ullanylmaýan bir täb. Birinji standart veriler ullanýarys, ilkinji gezek özellikler ýokary bolsa LID maglumaty uly ölçüde we köp diller üçin uly sözleri dahil edýändir (99.5%) hatyra islemleri eklenýän diller ösdürýär. Indiki hash ölçülerini ulanarak hash etmäni uygulaýarys, 86% tarapynda etmäniň ýitilmegini boşadyrmaýar. Biz hem hash tabanly klasifikalarynyň üýtgeşigini ulanyp ýokary ukyplaýarys. Özellikler hashing LID üçin örän faydaly we gelejekde iş üçin uly söz berýär.', 'af': "Ons evalueer funksie hashing vir taal identifikasie (LID), ' n metode nie voorheen gebruik word vir hierdie taak. Die gebruik van 'n standaard datastel, wys ons eerste dat terwyl funksie uitvoerings hoog is, is LID data baie dimensjoneel en meeste sparse (99.5%) omdat dit groot woordeboeke vir baie tale insluit; geheue benodigte groei as tale bygevoeg word. Volgende ons aanwend hashing met verskillende hash grootte, wat wys dat daar geen prestasie verlies is met dimensionaliteit reduksies van tot 86%. Ons wys ook dat die gebruik van 'n ensemble van lae-dimensie hash-gebaseerde klassifiseerders verder verhoog die prestasie. Funksie hashing is baie nuttig vir LID en hou groot belofte vir toekomstige werk in hierdie area.", 'am': 'We evaluate feature hashing for language identification (LID), a method not previously used for this task.  የመድረክ ዳታ ሳጥን በመጠቀም በመጀመሪያ እና የአፍሪካ ስርዓት ከፍተኛ ሲሆን የLID ዳታ እጅግ ብዛት እና በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ብዙዎችን አቃራቢያ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ ቋንቋዎች እንደሚጨመሩ የማስታወሻ ፈቃድ ያድጋል፡፡ የሚቀጥለውን የሐሳብ መጠን በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የፊደል ጉዳይ ለLID እጅግ የሚጠቅመው እና በዚህች ቦታ ውስጥ ለመገናኘት ሥራ የተሰፋ ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡', 'ko': '우리는 언어 식별(LID)에 사용되는 특징 해시를 평가했는데 이것은 이전에 이 작업에 사용되지 않았던 방법이다.표준 데이터 집합을 사용하면 우리는 먼저 특징 성능이 높지만 LID 데이터는 고차원적이고 대부분이 희소하기 때문(99.5%)이라고 밝혔다. 왜냐하면 많은 언어의 대형 어휘표를 포함하기 때문이다.언어가 증가함에 따라 메모리 수요도 증가하고 있다.다음에 우리는 각종 산열 크기로 산열을 응용하여 비트가 86% 에 이르는 상황에서 성능 손실이 발생하지 않는다는 것을 증명한다.우리는 또한 저차원 산열을 바탕으로 하는 분류기 집합을 사용하면 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있다고 밝혔다.특징 산열은 LID에 매우 유용하고 이 분야의 미래 업무에 큰 희망을 가진다.', 'sq': 'Ne vlerësojmë hashing për identifikimin e gjuhës (LID), një metodë që nuk është përdorur më parë për këtë detyrë. Duke përdorur një set të dhënash standarte, ne së pari tregojmë se ndërsa paraqitja e funksioneve është e lartë, të dhënat LID janë shumë dimensionale dhe kryesisht të pakta (99.5%) pasi përfshin fjalorë të mëdha për shumë gjuhë; kërkesat e kujtesës rriten ndërsa shtohen gjuhët. Pastaj ne aplikojmë hashing duke përdorur madhësitë e ndryshme hash, duke demonstruar se nuk ka humbje performance me reduksione dimensionale deri në 86%. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se përdorimi i një ansambli të klasifikuesve me dimensione të ulët bazuar në hash rrit më tej performancën. Heshkimi i përshtatshëm është shumë i dobishëm për LID dhe mban premtim të madh për punën e ardhshme në këtë fushë.', 'hy': 'Մենք գնահատում ենք լեզվի հայտնաբերման հատկանիշներ (ԼիԴ), մի մեթոդ, որը նախկինում չէր օգտագործվել այս խնդրի համար: Օգտագործելով ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգ, մենք առաջին անգամ ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մինչ հատկանիշների արտադրողությունը բարձր է, ԼիԴ տվյալները բարձր չափով են և հիմնականում հազվադեպ (99.5 տոկոս), քանի որ դրանք ներառում են բառերի մե հիշողության պահանջները աճում են լեզուների ավելացման ժամանակ: Հաջորդը մենք կիրառում ենք հաշվի առնելը օգտագործելով տարբեր հաշվի չափսեր, ցույց տալով, որ չկա արդյունավետության կորստ մինչև 86 տոկոս չափսերի կրճատում: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ցածր չափերի հաշվի վրա հիմնված դասակարգումների օգտագործելը շարունակում է բարձրացնել արդյունքը: Feature hashing is highly useful for LID and holds great promise for future work in this area.', 'bn': 'আমরা ভাষা পরিচয়ের জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশেষ মূল্যায়ন করি, যা এই কাজের জন্য পূর্বে ব্যবহৃত নয়। একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ডাল ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে আমরা প্রথম দেখাচ্ছি যে যখন বৈশিষ্ট্যের কার্যক্রম উচ্চতায়, তখন লিডি ডাটা খুব বেশী মাত্রায় এবং বেশীরভাগ স ভাষা যোগ করার সময় মেমরি প্রয়োজন বৃদ্ধি হয়। পরবর্তীতে আমরা বিভিন্ন হ্যাশ আকার ব্যবহার করে হ্যাশট্যাগ প্রয়োগ করি, যেখানে প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে মাত্রাত্মক হ্যাশট্যাগের মা আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে হ্যাশভিত্তিক শ্রেণীদের ক্ষেত্রে আরো বৃদ্ধি প্রদর্শনের ব্যবহার করে। বৈশিষ্ট্য হ্যাশটি লিডির জন্য অত্যন্ত কার্যকর এবং এই এলাকায় ভবিষ্যতের কাজের জন্য ভালো প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদা', 'az': 'Biz dil kimlikləri (LID) üçün xüsusiyyətlərini değerləşdiririk, əvvəlcə bu işlər üçün istifadə edilməmiş bir metod. Standardlı verilən qurğu ilə ilk dəfə göstərdik ki, fərqli işləri yüksək olduğunda, LID verilənləri çox ölçülü və çox az (99.5%) deyil, çünki bu çox dillər üçün böyük sözlər içərir. yaddaş şartları dillərin əlavə edildiyi kimi artır. Sonradan biz müxtəlif hash ölçüləri ilə hashing uygulayırıq, ölçülük ölçülərinin 86%-ə qədər azaldığını göstərir. Biz də göstəririk ki, aşağı ölçülük hash-tabanlı klassifikatların istifadəsi daha da artırar. Özellik hashing LID üçün çox faydaldır və bu bölgedə gələcək işlər üçün böyük vəd verir.', 'bs': 'Procjenjujemo hashing karakteristike za identifikaciju jezika (LID), metodu koja se ranije ne koristi za ovaj zadatak. Koristeći standardnu setu podataka, prvo pokazujemo da dok je funkcija visoka, podaci LID-a su visoko dimenzionalni i uglavnom rezervni (99,5%) jer uključuju velike rečenice za mnoge jezike; zahtjevi pamćenja rastu dok se dodaju jezici. Sljedeće primjenjujemo hashing s različitim veličinama hash, pokazujući da nema gubitka rezultata s smanjenjem dimenzionalnosti do 86%. Također pokazujemo da korištenje ensembla niskodimenzionalnih klasifikatora na hashu dodatno povećava učinkovitost. Hashing karakteristike je jako korisno za LID i održava veliko obećanje za budući rad u ovom području.', 'ca': "Evaluam el hashing de característiques per a identificar la llengua (LID), un mètode que no s'ha utilitzat abans per aquesta tasca. Utilitzant un conjunt de dades estàndard, primer demostram que mentre el rendiment de les característiques és alt, les dades LID són altament dimensionals i majoritàriament escases (99,5%) com inclou grans vocabularis per moltes llengües; els requisits de memòria creixen a mesura que s'afegeixen llengües. Després aplicam el hashing fent servir diferents tamanys, demostrant que no hi ha pèrdua de rendiment amb reduccions de dimensionalitat fins al 86%. També demostram que utilitzar un conjunt de classificadors de baixa dimensió basats en hash augmenta el rendiment. El hashing de característiques és molt útil per a LID i té una gran promesa per a treballar futurament en aquesta àrea.", 'cs': 'Vyhodnocujeme funkční hashování pro jazykovou identifikaci (LID), metodu, která pro tento úkol dříve nepoužívala. Pomocí standardní datové sady nejprve ukážeme, že i když je výkon funkcí vysoký, data LID jsou vysoce dimenzionální a většinou řídká (99,5%) protože obsahují velké slovníky pro mnoho jazyků; Požadavky na paměť rostou s přidáváním jazyků. Dále aplikujeme hashing pomocí různých velikostí hash, což prokáže, že nedochází ke ztrátě výkonu při snížení dimenzionality až do 86%. Také ukazujeme, že použití souboru klasifikátorů založených na nízkých dimenzích hash dále zvyšuje výkon. Hashování funkcí je velmi užitečné pro LID a má velký slib pro budoucí práci v této oblasti.', 'fi': 'Arvioimme feature hashing for language identification (LID) -menetelmää, jota ei ole aiemmin käytetty tässä tehtävässä. Standardiaineiston avulla näytämme ensin, että vaikka ominaisuuksien suorituskyky on korkea, LID-tiedot ovat erittäin mittavia ja enimmäkseen harvoja (99,5%), koska ne sisältävät suuria sanastoja monille kielille; Muistivaatimukset kasvavat kielten lisäämisen myötä. Seuraavaksi sovellamme hajautusta erilaisilla hajautuskokoilla, mikä osoittaa, että suorituskykyä ei ole menetetty jopa 86%:n mittakaavavähennyksellä. Osoitamme myös, että matalan ulottuvuuden hash-pohjaisten luokittelijoiden yhdistelmä parantaa suorituskykyä entisestään. Ominaisuuksien hajautus on erittäin hyödyllinen LID:lle ja on lupaava tulevalle työlle tällä alalla.', 'et': 'Hindame funktsioonide räsitust keele identifitseerimiseks (LID), meetodit, mida selles ülesandes varem ei kasutatud. Standardset andmekogumit kasutades näitame esmalt, et kuigi funktsioonide jõudlus on kõrge, on LID andmed väga mõõtmelised ja enamasti hõredad (99,5%), sest need sisaldavad suuri sõnavara paljudes keeltes; mälunõuded kasvavad keelte lisamisega. Järgmisena rakendame rästitust erinevate rästite suuruste abil, näidates, et jõudluse kadu ei ole kuni 86% suuruse vähendamisega. Samuti näitame, et madalamõõtmeliste räšipõhiste klassifikaatorite ansambli kasutamine suurendab jõudlust veelgi. Funktsioonide rähistamine on LID jaoks väga kasulik ja pakub suurt lubadust tulevaseks tööks selles valdkonnas.', 'jv': 'We asserting special hashing for language ID (LID), a method that was not used first for this task. section echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world #Next > Awak dhéwé éntuk ngono nggawe barang-barang langgambar luwih-barang basa hash karo nggawe barang nggawe barang. Aku hash Panjenengan langkung dipunangé kanggo LID lan saiki akeh tur angel kanggo awak dhéwé iki ning arep iki.', 'sk': 'Ocenjujemo haširanje funkcij za identifikacijo jezika (LID), metoda, ki se za to nalogo še ni uporabljala. Z uporabo standardnega nabora podatkov najprej pokažemo, da so podatki LID visoko dimenzionalni in večinoma redki (99,5%), saj vključujejo velike besednike za številne jezike; Z dodajanjem jezikov se zahteve po pomnilniku povečujejo. Nato uporabimo hashing z različnimi velikostmi hash, kar dokazuje, da ni izgube zmogljivosti z zmanjšanjem dimenzionalnosti do 86%. Pokazali smo tudi, da uporaba ansambla nizkih dimenzijskih klasifikatorjev, ki temeljijo na haših, dodatno povečuje učinkovitost. Hašiščenje funkcij je zelo koristno za LID in veliko obeta za prihodnje delo na tem področju.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙayyade tsarin da ke da wa gane wa lugha (LID), wata hanyor wanda ba a yi amfani da shi ba a gabãni wa wannan aikin. Yi amfani da tsarin danasãri na daidaita, za'a nũna farko, a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da aikin faniki ya fi girma, data na LID ya zama mai girma kuma yana ƙaranci da yawa (99.5%) kamar da yake ƙunsa da wasu zane-zane masu girma; Ba'a buƙata kumbar ta ƙara kamar an ƙara harshe. Dakata Munã amfani da hash-huɗu masu haske ko da, kuma Muke nuna cewa bãbu wata hasãra ga aikin aiki idan an ƙara girgije zuwa 86%. Kayya da Muke nũna, ko da wani misfolin da ke ƙaranci-darafõfi masu ƙaranci. Tsarin haske na da amfani mai girma ga LID kuma yana da wa'adi mai kyau wa aikin nan gaba ɗaya cikin wannan wuri.", 'he': 'We evaluate feature hashing for language identification (LID), a method not previously used for this task.  באמצעות קבוצת נתונים סטנדרטית, אנו מראים קודם כי בעוד ביצועים של תכונות גבוהים, נתונים LID הם מימדים גבוהים ורוב נדירים (99.5%) כיוון שהוא כולל מילים גדולים עבור שפות רבות; דרישות זיכרון גדלו כששפות הוספות. ואז אנו משתמשים בהחסינג בעזרת גודלים שונים של חסינג, בהוכיחה שאין אבדן ביצועים עם פחות מימדיות עד 86%. אנחנו גם מראים שהשימוש באנסמבל של קלאסיפורים במימד נמוך מבוססים על האש מגביר יותר ביצועים. המחסן אופייני הוא מאוד שימושי עבור LID ומחזיק הבטחה גדולה לעבודה עתידית באזור הזה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་བྱས་པར་ང་ཚོས་ཐོག སྐད་རིགས་ཁ་སྣོན་ཡོད་བཞིན་པའི་དྲན་སྒྲིག་དགོས་པ འོག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཤེས་བྱང་སྦྱར་བ་སྤྱོད་པ་དེ་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྷན་རྐྱེན་ཚད ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་རིགས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཤར་བ། ལྕགས་རིག་གི་ཞེས་འཇུག་ནི་LID ལ་ཕན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ང་ཚོས་ཁྱེར་གྱི་མ་འོངས་ལ་ཁས'}
{'en': 'Detection of Chinese Word Usage Errors for Non-Native Chinese Learners with Bidirectional LSTM', 'ar': 'الكشف عن أخطاء استخدام الكلمة الصينية لمتعلمي اللغة الصينية غير الأصليين باستخدام LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه', 'fr': "Détection des erreurs d'utilisation de mots chinois pour les apprenants non natifs chinois grâce à la technologie LSTM bidirectionnelle", 'es': 'Detección de errores de uso de palabras en chino para estudiantes de chino no nativos con LSTM bidireccional', 'pt': 'Detecção de erros de uso de palavras chinesas para alunos não nativos de chinês com LSTM bidirecional', 'ja': '双方向LSTMを持つ非ネイティブ中国語学習者のための中国語の単語使用エラーの検出', 'zh': '用双向LSTM检非母语汉语学者汉语单词用非', 'hi': 'द्विदिश LSTM के साथ गैर-मूल चीनी शिक्षार्थियों के लिए चीनी शब्द उपयोग त्रुटियों का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение ошибок в использовании китайских слов для неродных китайских учащихся с двунаправленным LSTM', 'ga': "Earráidí Úsáid Focal Síneacha a Bhrath d'Fhoghlaimeoirí Neamhdhúchasacha na Síne le LSTM Déthreo", 'el': 'Ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων χρήσης κινεζικών λέξεων για μη ιθαγενείς Κινέζους μαθητές με αμφίδρομο LSTM', 'ka': 'ჩინეთის სიტყვების გამოყენების შეცდომა ჩინეთების ბიეთეთრექციონალური LSTMName', 'hu': 'Kínai szóhasználati hibák észlelése nem őslakos kínai tanulók számára kétirányú LSTM segítségével', 'kk': 'Қытайша сөзді қолдану қатесін Қытайша екі бағытты LSTM бағытталмаған қытайша оқытушыларының қатесін анықтау', 'it': 'Rilevamento di errori di utilizzo della parola cinese per gli studenti cinesi non nativi con LSTM bidirezionale', 'mk': 'Детектирање грешки во кинеското користење на зборови за непродродни кинески ученици со двоупотребен LSTM', 'lt': 'Kinijos žodžių naudojimo klaidų nustatymas neturtiniams Kinijos mokytojams su dvikryptiniu LSTM', 'ml': 'ജാതികമില്ലാത്ത ചൈനീസ് ലെന്\u200dറര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പിശകുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Ralat Penggunaan Kata Cina untuk Pelajar Cina Bukan-asli dengan LSTM Dua Arah', 'mt': 'Żbalji fl-Użu tal-Kliem Ċiniżi għal Tagħlimiet Ċiniżi Mhux Nazzjonali b’LSTM Bidirezzjonali', 'no': 'Oppdaging av feil med kinesiske ordbruk for ikkje-originale kinesiske lærarar med to retning LSTM', 'mn': 'Хятадын үг хэрэглээний алдаа Хятадын Хятадын сурагчид хоёр багын LSTM', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie błędów używania chińskich słów dla uczących się języka chińskiego nienative za pomocą dwukierunkowego LSTM', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje grešaka korištenja kineskih riječi za neproditeljne kineske učitelje sa dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om', 'si': 'දෙපාර්ථික LSTM සමග චීනි වචන භාවිත වැරදිලි සොයාගන්න', 'ro': 'Detectarea erorilor de utilizare a cuvintelor chinezești pentru învățătorii chinezi non-nativi cu LSTM bidirecțional', 'so': 'Xaaladaha isticmaalka afka Chinese ee loogu talagalay LSTM', 'sv': 'Upptäckt av fel för användning av kinesiska ord för icke-infödda kinesiska elever med dubbelriktad LSTM', 'ta': 'Detection of Chinese Word Usage Errors for Non-Native Chinese Learners with Bidirectional LSTM', 'ur': 'غیر منطقی چین یادگاروں کے لئے چینی کلمات استعمال خطاؤں کی تلاش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện lỗi sử dụng từ Trung Quốc cho những học giả Trung Quốc chưa gốc với LSD hai hướng', 'bg': 'Откриване на грешки в използването на китайски думи за неместни китайски ученици с двупосочен ЛСТМ', 'da': 'Registrering af fejl i brug af kinesiske ord for ikke-indfødte kinesiske lærere med bidirektionel LSTM', 'nl': 'Detectie van fouten in het gebruik van Chinese woorden voor niet-inheemse Chinese studenten met Bidirectionele LSTM', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje grešaka korištenja kineskih riječi za neproditeljne kineske učitelje s dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om', 'de': 'Erkennung von chinesischen Wortverwendungsfehlern für nicht-native chinesische Lernende mit bidirektionalem LSTM', 'id': 'Deteksi Kesalahan Penggunaan Kata Cina untuk Pelajar Cina bukan-asli dengan LSTM bidireksi', 'ko': '쌍방향 LSTM 기반의 비모국어 중국어 학습자 중국어 어휘 사용 오류 검출', 'tr': 'Ýabşyrly Çinçe Uldançylar üçin Hytaý söz Kullanyşyň hatalaryny tapylýa', 'sw': 'Kugundua Tatizo la Utumiaji wa neno la Kichina kwa Wanafunzi wa Kichina wasio na asili na LSTM', 'af': 'Opdekking van Sjinese Woordgebruik Foute vir Nie- Natiewe Sjinese Leerders met Bidireksionale LSTM', 'fa': 'کشف خطاهای استفاده کلمه چینی برای دانش\u200cآموزان غیر طبیعی چینی با LSTM دو مسیر', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i gabimeve të përdorimit të fjalëve kineze për mësuesit kinezë jo-vendas me LSTM dy-drejtues', 'am': 'የቻይና ቃላት የተጠቃሚ ስህተት ለመጠቀም የቻይና ትምህርት ተማሪዎችን በBidirectional LSTM ጋር', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի բառերի օգտագործման սխալներ հայտնաբերելը ոչ բնիկ չինական ուսանողների համար, ովքեր ունեն երկուղղությամբ LSMT', 'az': '칂inc톛 S칬zl칲k Qullan캼m캼 Q톛talar캼n캼 캻-y칬n톛li LSTM il톛 Qinci 칂inc톛 칐yr톛n톛n톛nl톛r 칲칞칲n', 'bn': 'চীনা শব্দ ব্যবহার ব্যবহারের ত্রুটি সনাক্ত করা হয়েছে বাইডেডিয়াল এলএসএমএর সাথে চীনা শিক্ষকদের জন্য', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje grešaka korištenja kineskih riječi za neproditeljne kineske učitelje sa dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om', 'ca': 'Detection of Chinese Word Usage Errors for Non-Native Chinese Learners with Bidirectional LSTM', 'cs': 'Detekce chyb používání čínských slov pro nenativní čínští učitele s obousměrným LSTM', 'et': 'Hiina sõna kasutamise vigade tuvastamine mitte-emakeelsete hiina õppijate jaoks kahesuunalise LSTM-iga', 'fi': 'Kiinalaisten sanojen käyttövirheiden havaitseminen ei-natiivien kiinalaisten oppilaiden kaksisuuntaisella LSTM:llä', 'jv': 'Caret', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje napak pri uporabi kitajske besede za tuje kitajske učence z dvosmernim LSTM', 'he': 'גילוי שגיאות השימוש במילים סיניות למלמידים סינים לא מקומיים עם LSTM ביכיווני', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Detection of Chinese Word Usage Errors for Non-Native Chinese Learners with Bidirectional LSTM'}
{'en': 'Selecting appropriate words to compose a sentence is one common problem faced by non-native Chinese learners. In this paper, we propose (bidirectional) LSTM sequence labeling models and explore various features to detect word usage errors in Chinese sentences. By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset. For 80.79 % of the test data, the model ranks the ground-truth within the top two at position level.', 'ar': 'يعد اختيار الكلمات المناسبة لتكوين جملة مشكلة شائعة يواجهها المتعلمون الصينيون غير الأصليين. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نماذج تسمية تسلسل LSTM (ثنائية الاتجاه) واستكشاف الميزات المختلفة لاكتشاف أخطاء استخدام الكلمات في الجمل الصينية. من خلال الجمع بين ميزات تضمين كلمة CWINDOW ومعلومات نقاط البيع ، يحقق أفضل نموذج LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه الدقة 0.5138 و MRR 0.6789 على مجموعة بيانات HSK. بالنسبة لـ 80.79٪ من بيانات الاختبار ، يصنف النموذج الحقيقة الأرضية ضمن أعلى اثنين على مستوى الموضع.', 'fr': "La sélection des mots appropriés pour composer une phrase est un problème courant auquel sont confrontés les apprenants non natifs chinois. Dans cet article, nous proposons des modèles d'étiquetage de séquence LSTM (bidirectionnels) et explorons diverses fonctionnalités pour détecter les erreurs d'utilisation des mots dans les phrases chinoises. En combinant les fonctionnalités d'intégration de mots CWINDOW et les informations POS, le meilleur modèle LSTM bidirectionnel atteint une précision de 0,5138 et un MRR 0,6789 sur l'ensemble de données HSK. Pour 80,79\xa0% des données de test, le modèle classe la vérité de terrain parmi les deux premières au niveau de la position.", 'es': 'La selección de palabras adecuadas para componer una oración es un problema común que enfrentan los estudiantes de chino no nativos. En este artículo, proponemos modelos de etiquetado de secuencias LSTM (bidireccionales) y exploramos varias características para detectar errores de uso de palabras en oraciones chinas. Al combinar las funciones de incrustación de palabras de CWINDOW y la información de PDV, el mejor modelo LSTM bidireccional logra una precisión de 0,5138 y MRR de 0,6789 en el conjunto de datos HSK. Para el 80,79% de los datos de prueba, el modelo clasifica la verdad sobre el terreno entre los dos primeros a nivel de posición.', 'pt': 'A seleção de palavras apropriadas para compor uma frase é um problema comum enfrentado por alunos não nativos de chinês. Neste artigo, propomos modelos de rotulagem de sequências LSTM (bidirecional) e exploramos vários recursos para detectar erros de uso de palavras em frases em chinês. Ao combinar recursos de incorporação de palavras CWINDOW e informações POS, o melhor modelo LSTM bidirecional atinge precisão de 0,5138 e MRR 0,6789 no conjunto de dados HSK. Para 80,79% dos dados de teste, o modelo classifica a verdade entre os dois primeiros no nível de posição.', 'ja': '文章を構成するために適切な単語を選択することは、非ネイティブの中国語学習者が直面する一般的な問題の1つです。本稿では、（双方向） LSTMシーケンスラベリングモデルを提案し、中国語の文章における単語使用ミスを検出するための様々な特徴を探求する。CWINDOWワード埋め込み機能とPOS情報を組み合わせることで、最高の双方向LSTMモデルは、HSKデータセット上の精度0.5138とMRR 0.6789を達成します。試験データの80.79 ％については、モデルは上位2つの位置レベルで地上真実をランク付けします。', 'zh': '择其单词以成句是非母语汉语学者临一常见问题。 于本文中,立(双向)LSTM序标模,并寻检句单词用法谬误诸特征。 合CWINDOW词嵌POS信息,最佳双向LSTM形于HSK数集上成0.5138MRR 0.6789之精。 80.79% 之测试数据,先列于位。', 'hi': 'एक वाक्य लिखने के लिए उपयुक्त शब्दों का चयन करना गैर-देशी चीनी शिक्षार्थियों द्वारा सामना की जाने वाली एक आम समस्या है। इस पेपर में, हम (द्विदिश) LSTM अनुक्रम लेबलिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और चीनी वाक्यों में शब्द उपयोग त्रुटियों का पता लगाने के लिए विभिन्न सुविधाओं का पता लगाते हैं। CWINDOW शब्द एम्बेडिंग सुविधाओं और POS जानकारी के संयोजन से, सबसे अच्छा द्विदिश LSTM मॉडल HSK डेटासेट पर सटीकता 0.5138 और MRR 0.6789 प्राप्त करता है। परीक्षण डेटा के 80.79% के लिए, मॉडल स्थिति स्तर पर शीर्ष दो के भीतर जमीनी सच्चाई को रैंक करता है।', 'ru': 'Выбор подходящих слов для составления предложения является одной из распространенных проблем, с которой сталкиваются неродные китайские учащиеся. В этой статье мы предлагаем (двунаправленные) модели маркировки последовательностей LSTM и исследуем различные особенности для обнаружения ошибок в использовании слов в китайских предложениях. Благодаря сочетанию функций встраивания слов CWINDOW и информации POS, лучшая двунаправленная модель LSTM достигает точности 0,5138 и MRR 0,6789 в наборе данных HSK. Для 80,79% тестовых данных модель ранжирует наземную истину в двух верхних позициях на уровне позиции.', 'ga': 'Fadhb choitianta amháin a bhíonn ag foghlaimeoirí Síneacha neamhdhúchasacha is ea focail chuí a roghnú le habairt a chumadh. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid (déthreo) múnlaí lipéadaithe seicheamh LSTM agus iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar ghnéithe éagsúla chun earráidí úsáide focal in abairtí Síneacha a bhrath. Trí ghnéithe leabú focal CWINDOW agus faisnéis POS a chomhcheangal, baineann an tsamhail déthreorach LSTM is fearr amach cruinneas 0.5138 agus MRR 0.6789 ar thacar sonraí HSK. I gcás 80.79% de na sonraí tástála, rangaíonn an tsamhail an fhírinne iomlán sa dá cheann is airde ag leibhéal an tsuímh.', 'el': 'Η επιλογή κατάλληλων λέξεων για τη σύνθεση μιας πρότασης είναι ένα κοινό πρόβλημα που αντιμετωπίζουν οι μη ιθαγενείς μαθητές κινέζικων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε (αμφίδρομη) μοντέλα μαρκαρίσματος ακολουθίας και εξερευνούμε διάφορα χαρακτηριστικά για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων χρήσης λέξεων σε κινεζικές προτάσεις. Συνδυάζοντας τα χαρακτηριστικά ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και τις πληροφορίες το καλύτερο αμφίδρομο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 0.5138 και 0.6789 στο σύνολο δεδομένων. Για 80.79% των δεδομένων δοκιμής, το μοντέλο κατατάσσει την επίγεια αλήθεια στα δύο κορυφαία σε επίπεδο θέσης.', 'hu': 'A megfelelő szavak kiválasztása egy mondat összeállításához egy gyakori probléma a nem anyanyelvű kínai tanulók számára. Ebben a tanulmányban (kétirányú) LSTM szekvencia címkézési modelleket javasolunk, és különböző funkciókat fedezünk fel a kínai mondatok szavahasználati hibáinak felismerésére. A CWINDOW szóbeágyazási funkciók és POS információk kombinációjával a legjobb kétirányú LSTM modell a HSK adatkészleten 0,5138 és MRR 0,6789 pontosságot ér el. A tesztadatok 80,79%-a esetében a modell pozíciószinten az első kettő közé sorolja az alap-igazságot.', 'ka': 'შესაბამისი სიტყვების გამოყენება არის ერთი საერთო პრობლემა, რომელიც არ არის საერთო ჩინეთის სწავლებელი. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ (ბიდერექციონალური) LSTM წერტილის მოდელების შესახებ და განსხვავება განსხვავებული ფუნქციების შეცდომა ჩინეთის წერტილებში. CWINDOW სიტყვის შებრუნებული ფუნქციები და POS ინფორმაციის შებრუნებით, ყველაზე საუკეთესო LSTM მოდელი მიიღება 0. 5138 და MRR 0. 6789 HSK მონაცემების შებრუნებაში. 80,79% ტესტის მონაცემებისთვის მოდელმა უფრო ნაწილის სინამდვილეობაში ორივე დონეზე.', 'it': "Scegliere parole appropriate per comporre una frase è un problema comune affrontato dagli studenti cinesi non nativi. In questo articolo, proponiamo modelli (bidirezionali) di etichettatura della sequenza LSTM ed esploriamo varie funzionalità per rilevare errori di utilizzo delle parole nelle frasi cinesi. Combinando le funzioni di incorporazione di parole CWINDOW e le informazioni POS, il miglior modello bidirezionale LSTM raggiunge una precisione di 0,5138 e MRR 0,6789 sul set di dati HSK. Per l'80,79% dei dati di test, il modello classifica la verità di base tra i primi due a livello di posizione.", 'kk': 'Сөзді құру үшін дұрыс сөздерді таңдау - жергілікті қытайша оқытушылардың бір жалпы мәселесі. Бұл қағазда LSTM реттеу үлгілерін таңдап, Қытай сөздерінде сөз қолдану қатесін анықтау үшін әртүрлі мүмкіндіктерді іздейміз. CWINDOW сөздерді ендіру мүмкіндіктерін және POS мәліметін біріктіріп, HSK деректер жиындағы ең дұрыс 0, 5138 және MRR 0, 6789 үлгісін жеткізеді. Сынақ деректерінің 80, 79% үшін үлгісі екі жоғарғы орны деңгейінде жергілікті деңгейінде.', 'ms': 'Pilih perkataan yang sesuai untuk membuat kalimat adalah satu masalah umum yang dihadapi oleh pelajar Cina bukan asli. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan (bidireksi) model peletakan urutan LSTM dan mengeksplorasi pelbagai ciri-ciri untuk mengesan ralat penggunaan perkataan dalam kalimat Cina. Dengan menggabungkan ciri-ciri penyembelihan kata CWINDOW dan maklumat POS, model LSTM bidireksi terbaik mencapai ketepatan 0.5138 dan MRR 0.6789 pada set data HSK. Untuk 80.79% daripada data ujian, model menandakan kebenaran-tanah di dalam dua atas pada tahap kedudukan.', 'lt': 'Viena iš bendrų problem ų, su kuriomis susiduria ne gimtųjų Kinijos besimokantys asmenys, yra tinkamų žodžių pasirinkimas, kad būtų sudarytas sakinys. Šiame dokumente siūlome (dvikrypčius) LSTM sekos ženklinimo modelius ir tiriame įvairias savybes, kad būtų galima nustatyti žodžių naudojimo klaidas Kinijos sakiniuose. Suderinus CWINDOW žodžių įterpimo charakteristikas ir POS informaciją, geriausias dvikryptis LSTM modelis užtikrina tikslumą 0,5138 ir MRR 0,6789 HSK duomenų rinkinyje. 80,79 proc. bandymų duomenų modelis pozicijos lygiu klasifikuoja žeminę tiesą dviejuose aukščiausiuose taškuose.', 'mk': 'Изборот на соодветни зборови за составување на реченица е еден заеднички проблем со кој се соочуваат неродните кинески ученици. Во овој весник, предложуваме (двојно) LSTM секвенциски модели за означување на модели и истражуваме различни карактеристики за детектирање грешки во користењето на зборови во кинеските реченици. Со комбинацијата на CWINDOW карактеристики за вградување на зборови и POS информации, најдобриот дворечен модел на LSTM постигнува точност 0,5138 и MRR 0,6789 на HSK податоците. За 80,79 отсто од тестовите податоци, моделот ја рангира земјата-вистината во рамките на највисоките двајца на позициско ниво.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്ക് സജ്ജീകരിക്കാനുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ ചൈനീസ് പഠിക്കാത്തവരുടെ മുന്നി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d LSTM സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലേബിള്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുകയും ചൈനീസ് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പിശകുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുകയും ചെയ CWINDOW വാക്ക് കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും പോസ് വിവരങ്ങളും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ബിഡര്\u200dട്ടിക്ഷന്\u200d LSTM മോഡല്\u200d 0. 5138 എന്നിട്ട 80.79% ടെസ്റ്റ് ഡേറ്റായിട്ട്, മോഡല്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്ഥാനത്ത് നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യത്തിന', 'no': 'Vel passande ord for å skriva eit setning er ein vanleg problem med ikkje-native kinesiske lærarar. I denne papiret foreslår vi (bidireksjonale) LSTM-sekvensmerkelapp og utforsk ulike funksjonar for å finna feil i ordbruk i kinesiske setningar. Ved å kombinere CWINDOW- ord- innebyggingsfunksjonar og POS- informasjon, oppnår den beste bidireksjonale LSTM- modellen nøyaktig 0, 5138 og MRR 0, 6789 på HSK- datasettet. For 80,79 % av test data reknar modellen bakgrunnsannheten i toppen to på posisjonsnivå.', 'mn': 'Хятад сурагчид биш орон сурагчид тулгарч байгаа зөв үгийг бий болгох нь ерөнхий асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид LSTM дарааллын загварын загварыг суралцаж, Хятадын өгүүлбэр дээр үг хэрэглээний алдаа олохын тулд өөр өөр төрлүүдийг судалж байна. CWINDOW үг хамтын чанар болон POS мэдээллийг нэгтгэхэд хамгийн шилдэг LSTM загварын загвар нь HSK өгөгдлийн санд 0.5138 болон MRR 0.6789 зөв байдаг. Тест өгөгдлийн 80.79 хувь нь загвар нь дээд хоёр дахь газрын үнэндээ байрлал дээр байрлалд байдаг.', 'pl': 'Wybór odpowiednich słów do składania zdania jest jednym z powszechnych problemów, z którymi borykają się uczący się chińscy nie-native. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy (dwukierunkowe) modele etykietowania sekwencji LSTM i zbadamy różne funkcje wykrywania błędów używania słów w zdaniach chińskich. Dzięki połączeniu funkcji osadzania słów CWINDOW i informacji o POS, najlepszy dwukierunkowy model LSTM osiąga dokładność 0.5138 i MRR 0.6789 w zestawie danych HSK. W przypadku 80,79% danych testowych model klasyfikuje prawdę podstawową w pierwszej dwójki na poziomie pozycji.', 'ro': 'Selectarea cuvintelor adecvate pentru a compune o propoziție este o problemă comună cu care se confruntă cursanții chinezi non-nativi. În această lucrare, propunem modele (bidirecționale) de etichetare a secvențelor LSTM și explorăm diferite caracteristici pentru a detecta erorile de utilizare a cuvintelor în propozițiile chinezești. Prin combinarea caracteristicilor de încorporare a cuvintelor CWINDOW și a informațiilor POS, cel mai bun model bidirecțional LSTM atinge acuratețea de 0,5138 și MRR 0,6789 pe setul de date HSK. Pentru 80,79% din datele de testare, modelul clasează adevărul de la sol în primele două la nivel de poziție.', 'sr': 'Izabranje odgovarajućih reči za sastavu rečenice je jedan zajednički problem sa kojim se suočavaju neirodni kineski učenici. U ovom papiru predlažemo modele označavanja LSTM sekvencije i istražujemo različite karakteristike za otkrivanje grešaka korištenja reči u kineskim rečenicama. Kombinacijom CWINDOW reèi ukljuèujuæi karakteristike i informacije o POS-u, najbolji model LSTM postiže taènost 0,5138 i MRR 0,6789 na setu podataka HSK. Za 80,79% testnih podataka, model čini zemaljsku istinu unutar dva vrha na nivou pozicije.', 'si': 'වචනයක් සංවිධානය කරන්න හොඳ වචනයක් තෝරාගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති චීනි ශිෂ්ඨාන්ති මේ පැත්තට, අපි LSTM ක්\u200dරමාණය ලේබිල් මොඩල් සැකසුම් කරනවා සහ චීනි වචනයේ වචනය භාවිත වැරදි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. CWINDOW වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවය සහ POS තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, හොඳම විශේෂතාවක් LSTM මොඩේලය HSK දත්ත සැටේ 0.5138 සහ MRR 0.6789 විශේෂතා පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත 80.79% විතරයි, මොඩේල් ස්ථානයේ තියෙන්නේ තියෙන තියෙන්නේ පෘථිවිය ඇත්ත.', 'so': 'Doorashada hadalka ku haboon si loo qeybiyo waa dhibaato caadi ah oo ay u jeedaan dadka aan asal ahayn Shiino. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa tusaalaha qoraalka LSTM ee ku qoran iyo baaritaanka kala duduwan si ay u ogaato qalabka isticmaalka ee qoraalka ee Shiino. Markii uu ku soo ururiyo CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, modelka ugu fiican ee LSTM wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 0.5138 iyo MRR 0.6789 oo ku qoran HSK dataset. 80.79 % oo ka mid ah macluumaadka imtixaanka, tusaaladu wuxuu ka dhigaa runta dhulka ee ugu sarreeya heerka labaad.', 'sv': 'Att vﾃ､lja lﾃ､mpliga ord fﾃｶr att komponera en mening ﾃ､r ett vanligt problem fﾃｶr icke-infﾃｶdda kinesiska elever. I denna uppsats fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi (dubbelriktade) LSTM sekvensmﾃ､rkningsmodeller och utforskar olika funktioner fﾃｶr att upptﾃ､cka ordanvﾃ､ndningsfel i kinesiska meningar. Genom att kombinera CWINDOW-ordinbﾃ､ddningsfunktioner och POS-information uppnﾃ･r den bﾃ､sta dubbelriktade LSTM-modellen noggrannhet 0,5138 och MRR 0,6789 pﾃ･ HSK-datauppsﾃ､ttningen. Fﾃｶr 80,79% av testdata rankar modellen grundsanningen bland de tvﾃ･ bﾃ､sta pﾃ･ positionsnivﾃ･.', 'ta': 'ஒரு வாக்கியத்தை ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு பொருத்தமான வார்த்தைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவும் சீன கற்றுக்கொள்பவர்களால் ஒரு ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் LSTM தொடர்ச்சி குறிப்பு மாதிரிகளை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து சீன வாக்கியங்களில் சொல்ல பயன்பாடு பிழைகளை கண்டறிய (ப CWINDOW வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் குணங்கள் மற்றும் POS தகவல்களை ஒன்று சேர்த்து, சிறந்த முனைய LSTM மாதிரி சரியான 0. 5138 மற்றும் MRR 0. 6789 HSK தரவுத்தளத்தில 80.79% சோதனை தரவுக்கு, மாதிரி மேல் இரண்டு நிலையில் உள்ள நிலையில் நிலையில் பூமி உண்மையை வரைகிறது.', 'mt': 'L-għa żla ta’ kliem xieraq biex tkun komposta sentenza hija problem a komuni waħda li jiffaċċjaw studenti Ċiniżi mhux nattivi. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudelli (bidirezzjonali) ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza LSTM u nesploraw diversi karatteristiċi biex jinstabu żbalji fl-użu tal-kliem fis-sentenzi Ċiniżi. By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset.  Għal 80.79% tad-dejta tat-test, il-mudell jikklassifika l-ground-truth fi ħdan l-ogħla tnejn fil-livell tal-pożizzjoni.', 'ur': 'ایک جماعت لکھنے کے لئے مناسب کلمات کا انتخاب کرنا ایک مشکل ہے جو غیر منطقی چین یادگاروں کے سامنے موجود ہوتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے (دوسری) LSTM کاغذ لیبلینگ موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتا ہے اور کلمات استعمال کی خطائیں چین جماعتوں میں تلاش کرنے کے لئے مختلف ویژگی کا تحقیق کرتا ہے۔ CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information combining, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK data set. آزمائش ڈیٹا کے 80.79% کے لئے، موڈل دو کے اوپر سطح کے اندر زمین حقیقت کا درجہ ہے.', 'uz': "Bog\xa0Ľni qo\xa0Ľyish uchun mos keladigan so'zlarni tanlash, natijasi Xitoy o'rganishlar bilan bir umumiy muammo. Bu qog\xa0Ľozda, biz LSTM tarkibi modellarni tahrirlash va Xitoycha so\xa0Ľzlarda foydalanish xatolarini aniqlash uchun har xil xususiyatlarni aniqlash. Name Imzo ma\xa0ľlumotlarining 80.79% uchun model yuqori ikki darajadagi ground- haqida ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Lựa chọn từ thích hợp để soạn một câu là một vấn đề phổ biến đối mặt với người dân Trung Quốc. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị các mô hình cho kết quả LSD và khám phá các tính năng khác nhau để phát hiện lỗi sử dụng từ trong câu Trung Quốc. Bằng cách kết hợp các tính năng nhúng từ của CWINDOW và POS Information, the best bidtrực al LSTM model đạt độ chính xác 0.5138 và MRX 0.6789 on the HSK dataset. Trong số dữ liệu thí nghiệm 80.97.the model Xếp thành phần mặt đất ở đỉnh hai vị trí.', 'hr': 'Izabranje odgovarajućih riječi za sastavu rečenice je jedan zajednički problem s kojim se suočavaju neirodni kineski učenici. U ovom papiru predlažemo (bidirectional) modele označavanja LSTM sekvencije i istražujemo različite karakteristike za otkrivanje grešaka korištenja riječi u kineskim kaznama. Kombinacijom CWINDOW riječi uključujući karakteristike i informacije o POS-u, najbolji model LSTM postiže točnost 0,5138 i MRR 0,6789 na setu podataka HSK-a. Za 80,79% testnih podataka, model čini zemaljsku istinu unutar dva vrha na razini pozicije.', 'bg': 'Изборът на подходящи думи за съставяне на изречение е един често срещан проблем, пред който се сблъскват чуждестранните китайски ученици. В тази статия предлагаме (двупосочни) модели за етикетиране на последователността и изследваме различни функции за откриване на грешки в използването на думи в китайски изречения. Чрез комбинирането на функциите за вграждане на думи и информация за ПОС, най-добрият двупосочен модел постига точност 0.5138 и 0.6789 на набора от данни. За 80,79% от тестовите данни моделът класира основната истина сред първите две на ниво позиция.', 'da': 'At vælge passende ord til at sammensætte en sætning er et almindeligt problem for ikke-indfødte kinesiske elever. I denne artikel foreslår vi (bidirektionelle) LSTM sekvensmærkningsmodeller og udforsker forskellige funktioner til at opdage ordbrugsfejl i kinesiske sætninger. Ved at kombinere CWINDOW-ordindlejringsfunktioner og POS-oplysninger opnår den bedste tovejede LSTM-model nøjagtighed 0,5138 og MRR 0,6789 på HSK-datasættet. For 80,79% af testdataene rangerer modellen grundsandheden blandt de to øverste på positionsniveau.', 'nl': 'Het selecteren van geschikte woorden voor het samenstellen van een zin is een veelvoorkomend probleem voor niet-native Chinese studenten. In dit artikel stellen we (bidirectionele) LSTM sequence labeling modellen voor en onderzoeken we verschillende functies om woordgebruik fouten in Chinese zinnen te detecteren. Door CWINDOW-functies voor woordinbedding en POS-informatie te combineren, bereikt het beste bidirectionele LSTM-model nauwkeurigheid 0.5138 en MRR 0.6789 op de HSK-dataset. Voor 80,79% van de testgegevens rangschikt het model de ground-truth binnen de top twee op positieniveau.', 'de': 'Die Auswahl geeigneter Wörter, um einen Satz zu verfassen, ist ein häufiges Problem, mit dem nicht-muttersprachliche chinesische Lernende konfrontiert sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir (bidirektionale) LSTM Sequenzmodelle vor und untersuchen verschiedene Funktionen, um Wortverwendungsfehler in chinesischen Sätzen zu erkennen. Durch die Kombination von CWINDOW Worteinbettungsfunktionen und POS-Informationen erreicht das beste bidirektionale LSTM-Modell die Genauigkeit 0.5138 und MRR 0.6789 auf dem HSK-Datensatz. Für 80,79% der Testdaten rangiert das Modell die Ground-Truth auf Positionsebene unter den ersten beiden.', 'id': 'Selecting appropriate words to compose a sentence is one common problem faced by non-native Chinese learners.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan (bidireksi) model label urutan LSTM dan mengeksplorasi berbagai fitur untuk mendeteksi kesalahan penggunaan kata dalam kalimat Cina. Dengan menggabungkan ciri-ciri penerbangan kata CWINDOW dan informasi POS, model LSTM bidireksi terbaik mencapai akurasi 0.5138 dan MRR 0.6789 pada set data HSK. Untuk 80,79% dari data ujian, model mengatur dasar-kebenaran di dalam dua top pada tingkat posisi.', 'fa': 'انتخاب کلمات مناسب برای ترکیب یک جمله یک مشکل مشترک است که توسط دانش\u200cآموزان غیر متحده چینی روبرو می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما مدلهای برچسب برچسب\u200cبندی LSTM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و ویژگی\u200cهای مختلف را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا اشتباهی استفاده از کلمات در جمله چینی را شناسایی کنیم. با ترکیب ویژگی\u200cهای پیوند کلمه CWINDOW و اطلاعات POS، بهترین مدل LSTM\u200cهای دوره\u200cای دقیق 0.5138 و MRR 0.6789 در مجموعه داده\u200cهای HSK می\u200cرسد. برای ۸۰.۹۹ درصد داده های آزمایش، مدل حقیقت زمینی در طبقه ۲ بالا در سطح موقعیت است.', 'ko': '적당한 단어를 선택하여 문장을 만드는 것은 비모국어 중국어 학습자들이 직면하는 흔한 문제이다.본고에서 우리는 (쌍방향) LSTM 서열 표기 모델을 제시하고 중국어 문장에서 단어의 사용 오류를 측정하는 각종 특징을 탐색했다.CWINDOW 단어의 삽입 특징과 어성 정보를 결합함으로써 최적 양방향 LSTM 모델은 HSK 데이터 집합에서의 정확도가 0.5138이고 MRR은 0.6789이다.80.79%의 테스트 데이터에 대해 이 모델은 위치 단계에서 지면의 진상을 두 번째로 꼽았다.', 'sw': 'Kuchagua maneno mazuri ya kuunganisha hukumu ni tatizo moja la kawaida linalokabiliwa na wanafunzi wasio asili wa China. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfululizo wa LSTM unaoelezea mifano na kuchunguza vipengele kadhaa ili kutambua makosa ya matumizi ya maneno katika sentensi ya China. By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset.  Kwa asilimia 80.79 ya takwimu za jaribio, mtindo huo una ukweli wa ardhi ndani ya ngazi mbili za juu.', 'tr': 'Bir sözlem ýazmak üçin ýerli sözleri saýlamak ýene-de ýerli Çinçe öwrenmeýänler tarapyndan çykan meselädir. Bu kagyzda biz (ikinji görnöşim) LSTM sanlary etiketleme nusgalaryny teklip edip, sözleriň içinde sözleriň hatalaryny tanamak üçin dürli özellikleri tapylýarys. CWINDOW sözleri ekleýän özellikleri we POS maglumatyny birleşdirerek, iň gowy bidireksiyonal LSTM modi HSK veri setinde 0.5138 we MRR 0.6789 derejesini tapylýar Synaglaryň 80.79% sahypasyna görä, nusgasy iki iň üst depesinde ýerleşdirir.', 'af': "Kies geskikte woorde om 'n seting te skryf is een gemeenskaplike probleem met die aangesig van nie-natiewe Sjinese leerneerders. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons (bidirectional) LSTM sekvensie etiketting modele en ondersoek verskillende funksies om woord gebruik foute in Sjinese setnings te vind. Deur CWINDOW woord inbêring funksies en POS inligting te kombinerer, word die beste bidireksjonale LSTM-model die presisie 0. 5138 en MRR 0. 6789 op die HSK-datastel bereik. Vir 80.79% van die toets data, die model rankeer die grondwaarheid binne die boonste twee by posisie vlak.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e fjalëve të përshtatshme për të përbërë një fjalë është një problem i përbashkët me të cilin përballen nxënësit kinezë jo-vendas. Në këtë letër, propozojmë (dy drejtime) modele të etiketave të sekuencës LSTM dhe eksplorojmë karakteristika të ndryshme për të zbuluar gabimet e përdorimit të fjalëve në fjalët kineze. Duke kombinuar karakteristikat e integrimit të fjalëve CWINDOW dhe informacionin POS, modeli më i mirë dy-drejtues LSTM arrin saktësinë 0.5138 dhe MRR 0.6789 në sistemin e të dhënave HSK. Për 80.79% të të dhënave të testit, modeli rendit të vërtetën tokësore brenda dy të lartëve në nivelin e pozicionit.', 'am': 'የቻይና ተማሪዎችን የሚቀበል አንድ የተለየ ቃላት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ LSTM የግንኙነት ዓይነቶች እና በቻይና ፍርድ ውስጥ የቃላትን መጠቀም ስህተት ለማግኘት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset.  ለ80.79 በመቶ ፈተናው ዳታ ምሳሌው በላይኛው ሁለተኛው ክፍል መሬት እውነቱን ይደረጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առաջին նախադասությունը բառերի ընտրությունը մի ընդհանուր խնդիր է, որին հանդիպում են ոչ բնիկ չինական ուսանողները: In this paper, we propose (bidirectional) LSTM sequence labeling models and explore various features to detect word usage errors in Chinese sentences.  CWindows բառերի ներգրավման հատկությունները և POS տեղեկատվությունը համադրելով, լավագույն երկու ուղղությամբ LStm մոդելը հասնում է 0.5138 և MRR 0.6789 ճշգրտության HSK տվյալների համակարգում: Տեստի տվյալների 80.79 տոկոսի համար մոդելը տեղադրության մակարդակում դասակարգում է երկուսի ամենաբարձր ճշմարտությունը:', 'bn': 'একটি বাক্য তৈরি করার জন্য যথেষ্ট শব্দ নির্বাচন করা হচ্ছে একটি সাধারণ সমস্যা। In this paper, we propose (bidirectional) LSTM sequence labeling models and explore various features to detect word usage errors in Chinese sentences.  CWINDOW শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং পোস তথ্য সংযুক্ত করার মাধ্যমে সর্বোচ্চ বিদ্যমান এলস্টিএম মডেলটি সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছে যায় 0. 5138 এবং এমআরR 0. 6789 হাসকে  পরীক্ষার তথ্যের ৮০.', 'bs': 'Izabranje odgovarajućih riječi za sastavu rečenice je jedan zajednički problem sa kojim se suočavaju neirodni kineski učenici. U ovom papiru predlažemo (bidirectional) modele označavanja LSTM sekvence i istražujemo različite karakteristike za otkrivanje grešaka korištenja riječi u kineskim kaznama. Kombinacijom CWINDOW riječi uključujući karakteristike i informacije o POS-u, najbolji model LSTM postiže tačnost 0,5138 i MRR 0,6789 na setu podataka HSK. Za 80,79% testnih podataka, model čini zemaljsku istinu unutar najvišeg dva na nivou pozicije.', 'ca': "Seleccionar paraules apropiades per composir una frase és un problem a comú que enfronten els alumnes xinesos no natius. En aquest article, proposem models d'etiquetar seqüències LSTM (bidireccionals) i explorem diverses característiques per detectar errors d'ús de paraules en frases xineses. Combinant característiques d'incorporació de paraules CWINDOW i informació POS, el millor model bidireccional LSTM aconsegueix la precisió 0,5138 i MRR 0,6789 en el conjunt de dades HSK. Per al 80,79% de les dades de prova, el model classifica la veritat terrestre entre els dos primers a nivell de posició.", 'az': 'Sözlüyü yaratmaq üçün uyğun sözləri seçmək, yerli olmayan Çin öyrənənənlərin qarşısındakı ortaq bir problemdir. Bu kağızda LSTM seçmə modellərini təklif edirik və Çin cümlələrində sözlər istifadə etmə hatalarını keşfetmek üçün müxtəlif fərqlərdən keşfetirik. CWINDOW sözləri birləşdirən fərqli və POS məlumatlarını birləşdirərək, ən yaxşı Dərqli LSTM modeli HSK veri qutusunda 0.5138 və MRR 0.6789 ədaləti başa düşər. Testlərin 80.79%-i üçün modeli iki yüksək dəstədə yerdə həqiqəti dəyişdirir.', 'cs': 'Výběr vhodných slov pro složení věty je jedním z běžných problémů, kterým čelí nerodilí žáci čínštiny. V tomto článku navrhujeme (obousměrné) LSTM sekvenční značení modelů a zkoumáme různé funkce pro detekci chyb použití slov v čínských větách. Kombinací funkcí vložení slov CWINDOW a informací o POS dosahuje nejlepší obousměrný model LSTM přesnosti 0.5138 a MRR 0.6789 v datové sadě HSK. Pro 80,79% testovacích dat řadí model pozemní pravdu mezi nejvyšší dvě na úrovni pozice.', 'et': 'Sobivate sõnade valimine lause koostamiseks on üks levinud probleem, millega mitte-emakeelsed hiina õppijad silmitsi seisavad. Käesolevas töös pakume välja (kahesuunalised) LSTM jada märgistamise mudelid ja uurime erinevaid funktsioone, et tuvastada sõnakasutuse vigu hiina lausetes. Kombineerides CWINDOW sõna manustamise funktsioone ja POS-teavet, saavutab parim kahesuunaline LSTM mudel HSK andmekogumi täpsuse 0,5138 ja MRR 0,6789. 80,79% katseandmete puhul on mudel positsioonitasemel kahe esimese hulgas.', 'fi': 'Asianmukaisten sanojen valitseminen lauseen laatimiseen on yksi yleinen ongelma, jota ei-syntyperäiset kiinalaiset oppijat kohtaavat. Tässä työssä ehdotamme (kaksisuuntaisia) LSTM-sekvenssimallennusmalleja ja tutkimme erilaisia ominaisuuksia sanojen käyttövirheiden havaitsemiseksi kiinalaisissa lauseissa. Yhdistämällä CWINDOW-sanan upotusominaisuuksia ja kassatietoja paras kaksisuuntainen LSTM-malli saavuttaa HSK-aineiston tarkkuuden 0,5138 ja MRR 0,6789. Malli sijoittuu 80,79%:n testitiedoista kahden parhaan joukkoon positiotasolla.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang paper iki, kéné suggere (Biireksyonal) model sing berangaké alat lan nggawe perintah sing sampeyan kanggo ngerasakno eror kuwi nggambar barang string" in "jugal Cino Mungkin ngregani CWINDOw pawaran sing paling nggawe karo informasi PokS, model sing dibenalke bah dhéwé, Sampeyan nambah dhéwé: 0.1sek karo MRR 0.1sek barêng dataset HsK Ngawe', 'ha': "@ action: inmenu Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗe misãlai mai rubũtãwa na LTRM da kuma Muke buɗe wasu misãlai da za'a gane makorari ga amfani da magana cikin salofar China. Ga a koma da maganar CWINDAW masu buɗewa na tsari da kuma maɓallin PoS, shirin nan da mafi kyaun shirin LSSM na sami tsari 0.5138 da MRR 0.6789 kan tsarin HSK. Ga 80.79% daga data na jarraba, shirin ya ɗaukaka gasken bakin cikin daraja biyu a saman.", 'sk': 'Izbira ustreznih besed za sestavljanje stavka je pogosta težava, s katero se soočajo tujci kitajske učence. V tem prispevku predlagamo (dvosmerne) modele označevanja zaporedja LSTM in raziskujemo različne funkcije za odkrivanje napak pri uporabi besed v kitajskih stavkih. Z združevanjem funkcij vgradnje besed CWINDOW in informacij POS najboljši dvosmerni model LSTM doseže natančnost 0,5138 in MRR 0,6789 na naboru podatkov HSK. Za 80,79% testnih podatkov model uvršča osnovno resnico med najboljša dva na ravni položaja.', 'he': 'הבחירה במילים הולמות כדי להכין משפט היא בעיה אחת משותפת שמעמדת מול לומדים סינים לא מקומיים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים (שני כיוונים) טביעות רצף LSTM טביעות דוגמנים ולחקור תכונות שונות כדי לגלות שגיאות השימוש במילים במשפטים סינים. By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset.  עבור 80.79% מהנתונים הבדיקות, הדוגמא מגוון את האמת הקרקעית בתוך שני הראשונים ברמה של עמדה.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཚན་གཅིག་གི་འབྲི་དགོས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གདམ་པ་དེ་ཚོར In this paper, we propose (bidirectional) LSTM sequence labeling models and explore various features to detect word usage errors in Chinese sentences. By combining CWINDOW word embedding features and POS information, the best bidirectional LSTM model achieves accuracy 0.5138 and MRR 0.6789 on the HSK dataset. བརྟག་ཞིབ་འཇུག་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཚད་80.79%བར་མཚམས་ཡིན་པས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་མཐུན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'es': 'Atribución automática de compositores en el primer folio de Shakespeare', 'fr': "Attribution automatique d'un compositeur dans le premier folio de Shakespeare", 'ar': 'الإسناد التلقائي للملحن في الورقة الأولى لشكسبير', 'pt': 'Atribuição automática de compositor no primeiro fólio de Shakespeare', 'zh': '莎士比亚第一对开页中自合成器属性', 'ja': 'シェイクスピアの最初のフォリオにおける自動作曲者の帰属', 'hi': 'शेक्सपियर के पहले फोलियो में स्वचालित कंपोज़िटर एट्रिब्यूशन', 'ru': 'Автоматическая атрибуция композитора в первом фолианте Шекспира', 'ga': 'Attribution Compositor Attribution in the First Ffolio of Shakespeare', 'ka': 'ქექსპერის პირველი ფოლიოში ავტომატური კომპოზიტორის ატრიბუტირება', 'hu': 'Automatikus zeneszerzői tulajdonítás Shakespeare első foliójában', 'el': 'Αυτόματη απόδοση συνθέτη στο πρώτο φύλλο του Σαίξπηρ', 'it': 'Attribuzione automatica del compositore nel primo folio di Shakespeare', 'lt': 'Automatinis kompozitoriaus atributas pirmame Šekspiro folijoje', 'kk': 'Шекспирдің бірінші Folio- ында автоматты композитор атрибуттары', 'mk': 'Автоматска атрибутација на композиторот во првото фолио од Шекспир', 'ms': 'Atribusi Kompositor Automatik dalam Folio Pertama Shakespeare', 'mt': 'Attribuzzjoni tal-Kompożitur Awtomatiku fl-Ewwel Folju ta’ Shakespeare', 'ml': 'ഷാക്സ്പീയരിലെ ആദ്യത്തെ സ്വയം കോമ്പോസ്റ്റര്\u200d അക്രമത്തില്\u200d', 'mn': 'Шекспирийн анхны Folio-д автоматтын композитор атрибутыг', 'no': 'Automatisk kompositørattribusjon i den første folioen av Shakespeare', 'pl': 'Automatyczne przypisywanie kompozytorów w pierwszym Foliu Szekspira', 'ro': 'Atribuirea automată a compozitorului în primul folio al lui Shakespeare', 'sr': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'si': 'ශෙක්ස්පියර් පළමු ෆොලියෝ වල ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සම්පූර්ණකයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවේදකය', 'so': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'sv': 'Automatisk kompositör Attribution i den första Folio av Shakespeare', 'ta': 'Shakespeare யின் முதல் தொடர்பில் தானாகவே குறிப்பாளர் Attribution', 'ur': 'شیکسپئیر کی پہلی فولیو میں آٹوٹ پیٹوٹر آبریٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Автоматично приписване на композитори в първото фолио на Шекспир', 'hr': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'da': 'Automatisk komponist Attribution i den første folio af Shakespeare', 'ko': '셰익스피어 제1대 개본의 자동 식자 귀속', 'id': 'Atribusi Kompositor Otomatis di Folio Pertama Shakespeare', 'fa': 'خصوصیت پیوندگر خودکار در اولین فولیو شیکسپیر', 'sw': 'Mchoraji wa Automatic Attribution in the First Fold of Shakespeare', 'af': 'Outomatiese Kompositeur Attribute in die Eerste Folio van Shakespeare', 'tr': "Shakespeare'iň Ilkinji Foliýasynda Otomatik Ýygymçysy", 'nl': 'Automatische compositor attributie in het eerste blad van Shakespeare', 'de': 'Automatische Zuordnung von Komponisten im ersten Folio von Shakespeare', 'sq': 'Atributimi automatik i kompozitorit në folion e parë të Shekspirit', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Սեքսպիրի առաջին ֆոլիոյի ավտոմատ համակարգչի առանձնահատկությունը', 'az': "Shakespeare İlk Folio'da Avtomatik Kompositör İlişkisi", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় কমপোস্টোর অ্যাট্রিবিউশন শাকস্পিয়ারের প্রথম ফোলিও-এ', 'bs': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'ca': 'Atribució automàtica del compositor del primer fòlio de Shakespeare', 'cs': 'Automatické přidělování skladatelů v prvním Shakespearově listu', 'et': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'fi': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'jv': 'Sampeyan ngucap Automatik', 'ha': 'Automatic Compositor Attribution in the First Folio of Shakespeare', 'he': 'שימוש מחשב אוטומטי בפוליו הראשון של שייקספיר', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko avtorsko avtorstvo skladateljev v prvi Shakespearovi foliji', 'bo': 'Shakespeare ཡི་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་Folio་ཐོག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆ་རྩིས་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁ་ཆོས་'}
{'en': 'Compositor attribution, the clustering of pages in a historical printed document by the individual who set the type, is a bibliographic task that relies on analysis of orthographic variation and inspection of visual details of the printed page. In this paper, we introduce a novel unsupervised model that jointly describes the textual and visual features needed to distinguish compositors. Applied to images of Shakespeare’s First Folio, our model predicts attributions that agree with the manual judgements of bibliographers with an accuracy of 87 %, even on text that is the output of OCR.', 'ar': 'إسناد المؤلف ، تجميع الصفحات في مستند تاريخي مطبوع بواسطة الفرد الذي قام بتعيين النوع ، هو مهمة ببليوغرافية تعتمد على تحليل التباين الإملائي وفحص التفاصيل المرئية للصفحة المطبوعة. في هذا البحث ، نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا غير خاضع للإشراف يصف بشكل مشترك الميزات النصية والمرئية اللازمة لتمييز المُكوِّنين. عند تطبيقه على صور الملف الأول لشكسبير ، يتنبأ نموذجنا بالإحالات التي تتفق مع الأحكام اليدوية لمؤلفي المراجع بدقة تبلغ 87٪ ، حتى على النص الذي يمثل ناتج التعرف الضوئي على الحروف.', 'fr': "L'attribution du compositeur, le regroupement des pages d'un document imprimé historique par la personne qui a défini le type, est une tâche bibliographique qui repose sur l'analyse de la variation orthographique et l'inspection des détails visuels de la page imprimée. Dans cet article, nous présentons un nouveau modèle non supervisé qui décrit conjointement les caractéristiques textuelles et visuelles nécessaires pour distinguer les compositeurs. Appliqué aux images du premier folio de Shakespeare, notre modèle prédit les attributions qui concordent avec les jugements manuels des bibliographes avec une précision de 87\xa0%, même sur du texte issu de l'OCR.", 'es': 'La atribución del compositor, el agrupamiento de páginas en un documento histórico impreso por la persona que estableció el tipo, es una tarea bibliográfica que se basa en el análisis de la variación ortográfica y la inspección de los detalles visuales de la página impresa. En este artículo, presentamos un nuevo modelo no supervisado que describe conjuntamente las características textuales y visuales necesarias para distinguir a los compositores. Aplicado a las imágenes del primer folio de Shakespeare, nuestro modelo predice atribuciones que están de acuerdo con los juicios manuales de los bibliógrafos con una precisión del 87%, incluso en el texto que es el resultado del OCR.', 'pt': 'A atribuição de compositor, o agrupamento de páginas em um documento histórico impresso pelo indivíduo que definiu o tipo, é uma tarefa bibliográfica que se baseia na análise da variação ortográfica e na inspeção de detalhes visuais da página impressa. Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo modelo não supervisionado que descreve conjuntamente os recursos textuais e visuais necessários para distinguir os compositores. Aplicado às imagens do First Folio de Shakespeare, nosso modelo prevê atribuições que concordam com os julgamentos manuais dos bibliógrafos com uma precisão de 87%, mesmo em texto que é saída de OCR.', 'ja': 'タイプを設定した個人による過去の印刷文書内のページのクラスタリングであるCompositor attributionは、印刷されたページのオルソグラフィ変動の分析と視覚的詳細の検査に依存する書誌タスクです。本稿では、作曲者を区別するために必要なテキスト的特徴と視覚的特徴を共同で記述する、斬新で監督されていないモデルを紹介する。シェイクスピアのファーストフォリオの画像に適用される当社のモデルは、OCRの出力であるテキストであっても、87 ％の精度で書誌学者の手動判断に一致する属性を予測します。', 'hi': 'Compositor एट्रिब्यूशन, उस व्यक्ति द्वारा एक ऐतिहासिक मुद्रित दस्तावेज़ में पृष्ठों का क्लस्टरिंग जो प्रकार सेट करता है, एक ग्रंथ सूची कार्य है जो ऑर्थोग्राफिक भिन्नता के विश्लेषण और मुद्रित पृष्ठ के दृश्य विवरणों के निरीक्षण पर निर्भर करता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास असुरक्षित मॉडल पेश करते हैं जो संयुक्त रूप से कंपोज़िटर्स को अलग करने के लिए आवश्यक पाठ्य और दृश्य सुविधाओं का वर्णन करता है। शेक्सपियर के पहले फोलियो की छवियों पर लागू, हमारा मॉडल एट्रिब्यूशन की भविष्यवाणी करता है जो 87% की सटीकता के साथ ग्रंथ सूचीकारों के मैनुअल निर्णयों से सहमत हैं, यहां तक कि ओसीआर का आउटपुट पाठ पर भी।', 'zh': '合成器归因者,设人之印刷文档而聚类于页面,此一书目之任也,所以正字法变化之析,刷页面之察也。 本文中,我们说了一种新的无监督模形,该模形共述了区别合成器所需的文本和视觉特征。 应用莎士比亚第一对开页像,我们的模形占候与书目作者的手动决定一样的归因,准确率为87%,虽OCR输出的文本也如此。', 'ru': 'Атрибуция композитора, кластеризация страниц в историческом напечатанном документе лицом, задавшим тип, является библиографической задачей, которая опирается на анализ орфографической вариации и проверку визуальных деталей напечатанной страницы. В этой статье мы вводим новую неконтролируемую модель, которая совместно описывает текстовые и визуальные особенности, необходимые для различения композиторов. Применительно к изображениям Первого фолианта Шекспира, наша модель предсказывает атрибуции, которые согласуются с ручными суждениями библиографов с точностью 87%, даже на тексте, который является результатом OCR.', 'ga': 'Is tasc bibleagrafaíochta é sannadh cumadóir, cnuasach na leathanach i ndoiciméad clóite stairiúil ag an duine a shocraigh an cineál, a bhraitheann ar anailís ar éagsúlacht ortagrafach agus ar iniúchadh sonraí amhairc an leathanaigh chlóite. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach samhail úrscéal gan mhaoirseacht a dhéanann cur síos i gcomhpháirt ar na gnéithe téacsúla agus amhairc is gá chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir na cumadóirí. Agus é curtha i bhfeidhm ar íomhánna den Chéad Fhóilió de chuid Shakespeare, tuar ár múnla na haithrí a aontaíonn le breithiúnais láimhe leabharliostaí le cruinneas 87%, fiú ar théacs arb é aschur OCR é.', 'hu': 'A komponist attribúció, a történelmi nyomtatott dokumentumban lévő oldalak klaszterezése a típust megadó személy által, olyan bibliográfiai feladat, amely az ortográfiai variációk elemzésén és a nyomtatott oldal vizuális részleteinek vizsgálatán alapul. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új, felügyelet nélküli modellt, amely együttesen leírja a komponisták megkülönböztetéséhez szükséges szöveges és vizuális jellemzőket. Shakespeare első foliójának képeire alkalmazva modellünk 87%-os pontossággal jósolja meg a bibliográfusok manuális ítéletével megegyező tulajdonságokat, még az OCR kimenetét képező szövegeken is.', 'el': 'Η απόδοση συνθέτη, η ομαδοποίηση σελίδων σε ένα ιστορικό έντυπο έγγραφο από το άτομο που έθεσε τον τύπο, είναι μια βιβλιογραφική εργασία που βασίζεται στην ανάλυση ορθογραφικών παραλλαγών και στην επιθεώρηση οπτικών λεπτομερειών της τυπωμένης σελίδας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο χωρίς επίβλεψη που περιγράφει από κοινού τα κείμενα και τα οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά που απαιτούνται για τη διάκριση των συνθετών. Εφαρμόζεται σε εικόνες του πρώτου φύλλου του Σαίξπηρ, το μοντέλο μας προβλέπει αποδόσεις που συμφωνούν με τις χειροκίνητες κρίσεις των βιβλιογράφων με ακρίβεια 87%, ακόμη και σε κείμενο που είναι το αποτέλεσμα της OCR.', 'ka': 'კომპოზიტორის ატრიბუტირება, ისტორიური დაშორებული დოკუმენტის კოსტერირება, რომელიც ტიპის დააყენებული ინდივიდუმენტის, არის ბიბლიოგრაფიკური დავალება, რომელიც დარწმუნება პრინტებული გვერდის ვიზუალ ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში პრომენტის არ განსხვავებული მოდელი ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ, რომელიც ერთად აღწერს ტექსტულური და ვიზუალური ფუნქციები, რომელიც მოჭირდება კო ქექსპერის პირველი ფოლიოს გამოსახულებებისთვის, ჩვენი მოდელი წარმოიდგინეთ ატრიბუციები, რომლებიც ბიბლიოგრაფიების პირველი წესებისთვის 87%-ის წესებით, კიდევ ტექსტისთვის, რომელი', 'lt': "Kompozitoriaus priskyrimas, puslapių klasifikavimas istoriniame spausdintame dokumente, kurį nustatė tipas, yra bibliografinė užduotis, grindžiama ortografinių pokyčių analize ir spausdinto puslapio vizualinių duomenų patikrinimu. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują nepastebimą model į, kuriame kartu aprašomos tekstinės ir vizualinės savybės, reikalingos kompozitoriams atskirti. Taikant Shakespeare's First Folio vaizdus, mūs ų model is numato atributus, kurie sutinka su bibliografų rankiniu vertinimu, tikslumu 87 %, net tekstu, kuris yra OCR išėjimas.", 'it': "L'attribuzione del compositore, il raggruppamento di pagine in un documento storico stampato da parte dell'individuo che ne ha impostato il tipo, è un compito bibliografico che si basa sull'analisi della variazione ortografica e sull'ispezione dei dettagli visivi della pagina stampata. In questo articolo presentiamo un nuovo modello non supervisionato che descrive congiuntamente le caratteristiche testuali e visive necessarie per distinguere i compositori. Applicato alle immagini del Primo Folio di Shakespeare, il nostro modello prevede attribuzioni che concordano con i giudizi manuali dei bibliografi con una precisione dell'87%, anche su testo che è l'output di OCR.", 'mk': 'Припишувањето на композиторот, групирањето на страниците во историски печатен документ од страна на индивидуалот кој го поставува типот, е библиографска задача која се потпира на анализа на ортографска варијација и инспекција на визуелни детали на печатената страница. Во овој весник, воведуваме нов ненадгледуван модел кој заедно ги опишува текстуалните и визуелните карактеристики потребни за разлика на композиторите. Примено на сликите од првото фолио на Шекспир, нашиот модел предвидува атрибути кои се согласуваат со рачните пресуди на библиографите со точност од 87 отсто, дури и на текстот кој е излез од ОКР.', 'kk': 'Түрі орнатылған адамдардың тарихлық басып шығарылған құжаттың парақтардың сәйкестігі - библиографикалық тапсырмасы, басып шығарылған парақтардың ортографикалық айнымалылығын анализ және көрінетін егжей- тегжейін тексеру ар Бұл қағазда, композиторды түрлендіру үшін керек мәтін және визуалдық мүмкіндіктерді біріктіретін романды таңдап береміз. Шекспирдің бірінші Фолионың кескіндеріне қолданылады. Біздің үлгіміз библиографикалардың қолмен түсініктеріне 87% деген дұрыс болып тұратын мәтінде, сондай-ақ, ОКР шығаруының мәтінде.', 'ms': "Atribusi kompositor, kumpulan halaman dalam dokumen dicetak sejarah oleh individu yang menetapkan jenis, adalah tugas bibliografik yang bergantung pada analisis variasi ortografik dan pemeriksaan perincian visual halaman dicetak. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model novel yang tidak diawasi yang secara bersama menggambarkan ciri-ciri teks dan visual yang diperlukan untuk membezakan penggubah. Applied to images of Shakespeare's First Folio, our model predicts attributions that agree with the manual judgements of bibliographers with an accuracy of 87%, even on text that is the output of OCR.", 'ml': 'ഒരു ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d പ്രിന്റ് ചെയ്ത രേഖയിലുള്ള പേജുകളുടെ സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഒരു ബ്ലിയോഗ്രാഫിക് ജോലിയാണ്. പ്രിന്റ് ചെയ്ത ത താളിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുണ്ട്. ഒരുമിച്ച് കൂടി വേര്\u200dപെടുത്താന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള ടെക്സ്ട്ടുളിലും കാഴ് ഷാക്സ്പെയിന്\u200dറെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഫോളിയോയുടെ ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബ്യൂബിളോഗ്രാഫ്യരുടെ കൈകാ', 'mt': 'L-attribuzzjoni tal-kompożitur, l-għaqda ta’ paġni f’dokument stampat storiku mill-individwu li jistabbilixxi t-tip, hija kompitu bibljografiku li jiddependi fuq analiżi tal-varjazzjoni ortografika u spezzjoni tad-dettalji viżwali tal-paġna stampata. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu mudell ġdid mhux sorveljat li jiddeskrivi b’mod konġunt il-karatteristiċi testwali u viżivi meħtieġa biex jiddistingwu l-kompożituri. Applikat għal immaġni tal-Ewwel Folio ta’ Shakespeare, il-mudell tagħna jipprevedi attribuzzjonijiet li jaqblu mal-ġudizzji manwali tal-bibliografi b’preċiżjoni ta’ 87%, anke fuq test li huwa l-output tal-OCR.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэвлэгдсэн баримтын хэвлэгдсэн хэвлэгдэх хуудас нь библиографик даалгавар юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид композиторуудыг ялгах шаардлагатай текстур болон үзүүлэлтийг нийлүүлдэг шинэ загварыг танилцуулдаг. Шекспирийн Анхны Фолионы зураг дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Бидний загвар нь библиографичдын гарын шүүмжлэгчид 87%-ын тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой байдлыг таамагладаг. ОКР-ын бүтээгдэхүүнд ч мөн.', 'pl': 'Atrybucja kompozytora, grupowanie stron w historycznym drukowanym dokumencie przez osobę, która określa typ, jest zadaniem bibliograficznym polegającym na analizie zmienności ortograficznej i kontroli wizualnych szczegółów drukowanej strony. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowy model bez nadzoru, który wspólnie opisuje cechy tekstowe i wizualne potrzebne do odróżnienia kompozytorów. Zastosowany do obrazów Pierwszego Folia Szekspira, nasz model przewiduje atrybucje zgodne z ręcznymi ocenami bibliografów z dokładnością 87%, nawet na tekście będącym wynikiem OCR.', 'ro': 'Atribuirea compozitorului, gruparea paginilor într-un document tipărit istoric de către persoana care stabilește tipul, este o sarcină bibliografică care se bazează pe analiza variației ortografice și inspecția detaliilor vizuale ale paginii tipărite. În această lucrare, introducem un nou model nesupravegheat care descrie împreună caracteristicile textuale și vizuale necesare pentru a distinge compozitorii. Aplicat imaginilor Primului Folio al lui Shakespeare, modelul nostru prezice atribuții care sunt de acord cu judecățile manuale ale bibliografilor cu o acuratețe de 87%, chiar și pe textul care este rezultatul OCR.', 'sr': 'Prilikovanje kompozitora, skupljanje stranica u istorijskom štampanom dokumentu pojedinca koji je postavio taj tip, je bibliografički zadatak koji se oslanja na analizu ortografske varijacije i inspekciju vizuelnih detalja štampanih stranica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo roman neodređen model koji zajedno opisuje tekstualne i vizualne karakteristike potrebne za razliku kompozitora. Primijenio se na slike prvog Folija Šekspira, naš model predviđa atribucije koje se slažu sa rukovnim presudima bibliografa sa preciznošću od 87%, čak i na tekstu koji je rezultat OCR-a.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාර මේ පැත්තට, අපි නිර්භාවිත නැති නිර්භාවිත නිර්භාවිත මොඩේලයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් පැත ශෙක්ස්පියර්ගේ පළමු ප්\u200dරධාන පින්තූරයේ පින්තූරයට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා බිබිලියෝග්\u200dරා', 'so': 'Compositor attribution, soo bandhigga buugaagta oo ku qoran warqada taariikhda ah ee qofka u qoray nooca, waa shaqo buugaagta ah oo ku tiirsan baaritaanka isbedelka ortografiga iyo baaritaanka waxyaabaha muuqata ah ee sawirka sawirka laga qoray. Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa model aan la ilaalinayn, kaas oo si wadajir ah u sawiraya noocyada dhaqanka iyo waxyaabaha aragga ee loo baahan yahay inay kala soocaan xarumaha. Shakespeare waxaa lagu codsaday sawirada asalka ugu horeeya ee Shakespeare, modellkayagii wuxuu sheegaa qalabka ay ku heshiiyaan xukunka qoraalka qoraalka ee ay qoraalka qoraalka ka heshiiyaan saxda 87 boqolkiiba, xataa qoraalka soo baxa OCR.', 'sv': 'Komponentattribution, klustring av sidor i ett historiskt tryckt dokument av den person som anger typen, är en bibliografisk uppgift som bygger på analys av ortografisk variation och besiktning av visuella detaljer på den tryckta sidan. I denna uppsats introducerar vi en ny oövervakad modell som tillsammans beskriver de text- och visuella egenskaper som behövs för att särskilja kompositörer. Tillämpad på bilder av Shakespeares första folio förutspår vår modell attributioner som överensstämmer med bibliografers manuella bedömningar med en noggrannhet på 87%, även på text som är resultatet av OCR.', 'ta': "இந்த வகையை அமைத்த தனித்தான் ஒரு வரலாற்று அச்சிட்ட ஆவணத்தில் பக்கத்தின் கூட்டுதல், ஒரு நிறுவனம், அச்சிட்ட பக்கத்தின் பார்வையான மாற்றத்தையும் பரிசோதிக்கும் பார் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது ஒன்றாக நிரல் மற்றும் பார்வையில் கு Shakespeare's First Folio படங்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது, எங்கள் மாதிரி பங்குகளை முன்வாக்குகிறது அது நாடுகளின் கைமுறை தீர்ப்புகளுடன் ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறது 87%, அது OCR வ", 'ur': 'پیغمبر کی تعریف، ایک تاریخی پرینٹ ڈکومکٹ میں صفحے کا کلسٹر ہے جو شخص نے اس طرح کو تنظیم کیا ہے، ایک bibliographic task ہے جو پرینٹ کی صفحے کی بحثی اور بحثی معلومات کی تحلیل پر باقی رہتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوم کو معلوم کر دیا ہے جو ایک جوڑا غیر قائم ہوا موڈل ہے جو ایک جوڑا کرتا ہے کہ کائناٹروں کو اختلاف کرنے کے لئے لازم ہے متشابہ اور بصیرت فرصت کا معلوم کرتا ہے۔ شیکسپیر کی پہلی فولیو کے تصاویروں پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے، ہماری موڈل کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے کہ ابلیوگرافروں کے مستحکم فیصلہ کرنے والوں کے ساتھ 87% کی دقیقیقیت کے ساتھ موافق ہیں، حتی اس متن پر جو OCR کے نتیجے ہیں۔', 'no': 'Dette er ein bibliografisk oppgåve som er avhengig av analysen av ortografiske variasjonar og inspeksjon av visuelle detaljar på utskriftssida. I denne papiret introduserer vi eit roman ikkje-oppretta modell som kopla beskriver tekstuelle og visuelle funksjonane som treng for å distisera samlingar. I bruk til bilete av Shakespeare sin første Folio, er modellen vårt forhåndsvising av tilbud som samsvarar med manuelle uttrykk av bibliografikarar med en nøyaktig 87%, selv på teksten som er utdata av OCR.', 'uz': "Compositor attribution, the clustering of pages in a historical printed document by the individual who set the type, is a bibliographic task that relies on analysis of orthographic variation and inspection of visual details of the printed page.  Bu hujjatda, biz qoʻllanilmaydigan xavfsiz modelni anglatamiz. Ularni o'zgartirish kerak boʻlgan matn va ko'rining xususiyatlarini ajratish kerak. Shakespeare Birinchi Folio rasmlariga qoʻllaniladi, modelimiz bibliograflarning qoʻlbola xususiyatlarini aniqlaydi 87%, xato OCR natijasi matnni o'xshash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phụ trách kết hợp, kết cấu các trang trong một tài liệu in lịch sử của người đã đặt kiểu đó, là một nhiệm vụ ảo thuật, dựa trên phân tích âm tính và kiểm tra chi tiết hình ảnh của trang in. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một mô hình mới không giám sát. Cùng nhau mô tả các tính chất văn bản và hình ảnh cần thiết để phân biệt thành viên. Đối với những hình ảnh của ngôn ngữ Đầu tiên của Shakespeare, một truyền hình đạo đoán đoạn lờn hợp với những tổ chức của mộ tổ tài sách của một Sổ tay của mộ họa s ĩ', 'bg': 'Приписването на композитор, групирането на страници в исторически отпечатан документ от лицето, което задава типа, е библиографска задача, която разчита на анализ на ортографските вариации и проверка на визуалните детайли на отпечатаната страница. В настоящата статия представяме нов модел без надзор, който съвместно описва текстовите и визуалните особености, необходими за разграничаване на композиторите. Приложен към изображенията на Шекспировото първо фолио, нашият модел прогнозира приписи, които са съгласни с ръчните преценки на библиографите с точност 87%, дори за текст, който е изход на ОКР.', 'da': 'Komponist attribution, klyngning af sider i et historisk trykt dokument af den person, der angiver typen, er en bibliografisk opgave, der bygger på analyse af ortografisk variation og inspektion af visuelle detaljer på den trykte side. I denne artikel introducerer vi en ny model uden opsyn, der i fællesskab beskriver de tekstlige og visuelle træk, der er nødvendige for at skelne kompositører. Anvendt på billeder af Shakespeares Første Folio, vores model forudsiger attributioner, der er i overensstemmelse med bibliografernes manuelle vurderinger med en nøjagtighed på 87%, selv på tekst, der er output af OCR.', 'nl': "Compositor attributie, het clusteren van pagina's in een historisch gedrukt document door de persoon die het type instelt, is een bibliografische taak die gebaseerd is op analyse van orthografische variatie en inspectie van visuele details van de afgedrukte pagina. In dit artikel introduceren we een nieuw model zonder toezicht dat gezamenlijk de tekstuele en visuele kenmerken beschrijft die nodig zijn om compositors te onderscheiden. Toegepast op afbeeldingen van Shakespeare's First Folio, voorspelt ons model toeschrijvingen die overeenkomen met de handmatige oordelen van bibliografen met een nauwkeurigheid van 87%, zelfs op tekst die de output is van OCR.", 'hr': 'Pritisak kompozitora, skupljanje stranica u istorijskom štampanom dokumentu pojedinca koji je postavio taj tip, je bibliografički zadatak koji se oslanja na analizu ortografske varijacije i inspekciju vizuelnih detalja štampanih stranica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo roman neodređen model koji zajedno opisuje tekstualne i vizualne karakteristike potrebne za razliku kompozitora. Primjeren na slike Shakespeareovog prvog Folija, naš model predviđa pritisak koji se slažu s ručnim osuđivanjem bibliografa sa preciznošću 87%, čak i na tekst koji je rezultat OCR-a.', 'id': "Atribusi kompositor, kumpulan halaman dalam dokumen cetak sejarah oleh individu yang menetapkan tipe, adalah tugas bibliografis yang bergantung pada analisis variasi ortografik dan inspeksi rincian visual halaman cetak. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model novel yang tidak diawasi yang secara bersama menggambarkan fitur tekstual dan visual yang diperlukan untuk membedakan kompositor. Diaplikasikan pada gambar Shakespeare's First Folio, model kami memprediksi atribut yang setuju dengan penilaian manual bibliografer dengan akurasi 87%, bahkan pada teks yang adalah output OCR.", 'ko': '식자원 귀속은 식자원이 역사 인쇄 파일의 페이지를 분류하는 책의 임무로 인쇄 페이지의 정자법 변화와 시각적 디테일에 대한 분석에 의존한다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 무감독 모델을 소개했는데 이 모델은 합성기를 구분하는 데 필요한 텍스트와 시각적 특징을 연합하여 묘사했다.셰익스피어의 첫 번째 개본에 응용된 이미지에서 우리의 모델이 예측한 속성은 책 작성자의 수동적인 판단과 일치하고 정확도는 87% 이다. OCR에서 출력한 텍스트라도.', 'fa': 'تعریف ترکیب\u200cکننده، تعریف صفحه\u200cها در یک سند تاریخی چاپ شده توسط فردی که این نوع را تنظیم می\u200cکند، یک کار کتابی است که بر تحلیل تغییرات orthographic و بازرسی جزئیات دیده صفحه چاپ می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل غیر قابل توجه به روزنامه معرفی می کنیم که با هم ویژه\u200cهای متن و دیده\u200cای که نیاز دارند برای تعریف سازنده\u200cها را توصیف می\u200cکند. برای تصاویر اولین فولیو شیکسپیر، مدل ما پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند که با قضاوت\u200cهای دستی کتاب\u200cنویسندگان با دقیق 87%، حتی بر متن که نتیجه OCR است، موافق است.', 'sw': 'Mchangiaji wa kompositori, kuunganishwa kwa kurasa katika nyaraka ya kihistoria iliyochapishwa na mtu aliyeweka a in a hiyo, ni kazi ya kitabibliographic inayotegemea uchambuzi wa mabadiliko ya kiorthografia na kutazama maelezo ya picha ya ukurasa wa printed. In this paper, we introduce a novel unsupervised model that jointly describes the textual and visual features needed to distinguish compositors.  Kwa kutumia picha za Folio la kwanza la Shakespeare, model yetu inatabiri matamko ambayo yanakubaliana na maamuzi ya kitabiblia kwa uhakika wa asilimia 87, hata kwenye maandishi ambayo ni matokeo ya OCR.', 'tr': "Saýlanan hatlary, taryhy çaplanan senediň sahypalarynyň koplamagy, çaplanan sahypanyň görsel hatlarynyň analyzasyna geçirjek bibliografik zady. Bu kagyzda, compositorlary tapawutlamak üçin gerekli tekst we görsel özellikleri bilen tassyklanýan a ýdyma täze bir nusga alýarys. Shakespeare'iň ilkinji Foliýanyň suratlara uygulanýar, biziň modelimiz Bibliograflaryň el kararymlary bilen 87%-den dogrylyk bilen ylalaşýandygyny tahmin edip otyrýar.", 'af': "Kompositeur-toeligging, die klastering van bladsye in 'n historiese drukke dokument deur die individuele wat die tipe stel, is 'n bibliografiese taak wat op analisie van orthografiese veranderinge en inspeksie van visuele besonderhede van die drukke bladsy aflyk. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n roman onverondersteunde model wat saamstig beskryf die tekstuele en visuele funksies wat benodig is om compositors te verkies. Aanvoudig na beelde van Shakespeare se Eerste Folio, is on s model voorskou toestemmings wat ooreenkomstig met die hand oordelings van bibliographers met 'n presisie van 87%, selfs op teks wat die uitvoer van OCR is.", 'am': 'አካባቢ አዋጅ፣ በተርታ ታሪክ የተጠለፈ ሰነድ ውስጥ ገጾችን ማሰናከል፣ ይህ ዓይነቱን በሚያቆምበት ሰው የብሊዮግራፍ አድራሻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ ጉዳዮች ለመለየት የሚያስፈልገውን የጽሑፍ እና የራእይ ምርጫዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሳክስፌር ፊደል ፎቶ ላይ የሚጠይቁትን እና ሞዴላታችን የጦማሪያን የብሊዮግራፎችን ፍርድ በቁጥጥር 87 በመቶ የሚያስረግሙትን እና የOCR ውጤት በሚያሳየው ጽሑፍ ላይ የሚቀበል ጥያቄዎችን ይናገራል፡፡', 'sq': 'Atributimi i kompozitorit, grupimi i faqeve në një dokument të shtypur historik nga individi që vendos tipin, është një detyrë bibliografike që mbështetet në analizën e variacionit ortografik dhe inspektimin e detajeve vizuale të faqes së shtypur. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model të ri pa mbikqyrur që përshkruan së bashku karakteristikat tekstuale dhe vizuale të nevojshme për të dalluar kompozitorët. I aplikuar në imazhet e Folio s s ë Parë të Shekspirit, modeli ynë parashikon atribute që janë dakord me gjykimet manuale të bibliografëve me një saktësi 87%, edhe në tekstin që është rezultati i OCR.', 'hy': 'Կեմպոզիտոր հատկագրությունը, էջերի խմբավորումը պատմական տպագրված փաստաթղթի մեջ այն անհատի կողմից, ով սահմանում է տեսակը, գրաֆիկական խնդիր է, որը հիմնված է տպագրված էջի օրտոգրաֆիկ տարբերությունների վերլուծության և վիզուալ մանրամասների վերահսկման Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր անվերահսկված մոդել, որը միասին նկարագրում է տեքստալ և տեսողական հատկությունները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են ստեղծողների տարբերակելու համար: Համակարգված Շեքսպիրի Առաջին ֆոլիոյի նկարներին, մեր մոդելը կանխատեսում է հատկավորություններ, որոնք համաձայն են գրագրողների ձեռքի դատողությունների հետ 87 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ, նույնիսկ OCR-ի արտադրության տեքստի վրա:', 'bn': 'যে ব্যক্তি এই ধরনের নির্ধারণ করেছে তার ঐতিহাসিক মুদ্রণের পাতাগুলোতে পৃষ্ঠা স্থাপন করা হয়েছে, তা একটি বাইব্লিওগ্রাফিক ক কাজ যা প্রিন্ট পেজের অরটোগ্রাফিক ভের এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নোভেল অরক্ষিত মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা যুক্তিভাবে পার্থক্য করার প্রয়োজনীয় টেক্সচুয়াল এবং দৃশ্য বৈশিষ্ট শাকস্পিয়ারের প্রথম ফোলিও-এর ছবিগুলোতে প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে, আমাদের মডেল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করেছে যারা বাইব্লিগ্রাফারদের হাতের বিচারের সাথে একমত হয়েছে ৮৭ শত', 'de': 'Die Compositor-Attribution, die Gruppierung von Seiten in einem historischen gedruckten Dokument durch die Person, die den Typ festgelegt hat, ist eine bibliographische Aufgabe, die auf der Analyse der orthographischen Variation und der Überprüfung der visuellen Details der gedruckten Seite beruht. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges unüberwachtes Modell vor, das gemeinsam die textuellen und visuellen Merkmale beschreibt, die zur Unterscheidung von Kompositoren erforderlich sind. Angewendet auf Bilder von Shakespeares First Folio, prognostiziert unser Modell Zuschreibungen, die mit den manuellen Urteilen von Bibliographen übereinstimmen, mit einer Genauigkeit von 87%, auch auf Text, der die Ausgabe von OCR ist.', 'az': "Tövrü təyin edən kişi tarafından yazılmış səhifələrin qoşulması, yazılmış səhifənin ortografik dəyişikliklərinin analizi və görünür detaylarının təsdiqlənməsinə təvəkkül edən bibliografik işidir. Bu kağızda, müəyyən edilməmiş bir yeni modeli təşkil edirik ki, compositorları ayırmaq üçün ehtiyacı olan textual və visual özellikləri təşkil edir. Shakespeare'in İlk Folio'nun görüntülərinə uyğun edildi. Modelimiz, hətta OCR'in çıxarıldığı mətn üzərində 87%-in doğruluğu ilə bibliografçıların əlli hökmlərinə razılığını təmin edir.", 'bs': 'Pritisak kompozitora, skupljanje stranica u istorijskom štampanom dokumentu pojedinca koji je postavio taj tip, je bibliografički zadatak koji se oslanja na analizu ortografske varijacije i inspekciju vizuelnih detalja štampanih stranica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo roman neodređen model koji zajedno opisuje tekstualne i vizualne karakteristike potrebne za razliku kompozitora. Primjeren na slike Shakespeareovog prvog Folija, naš model predviđa atribucije koje se slažu sa ručnim presudima bibliografa sa preciznošću od 87%, čak i na tekstu koji je rezultat OCR-a.', 'ca': "L'atribució del compositor, la agrupació de pàgines en un document històric impres per l'individu que ha definit el tipus, és una tasca bibliogràfica que es basa en l'anàlisi de la variació ortogràfica i la inspecció de detalls visuals de la pàgina impresa. En aquest article introduim un nou model sense supervisió que descriu conjuntament les característiques textuals i visuals necessàries per distingir els compositors. Aplicat a imatges del First Folio de Shakespeare, el nostre model prediu atribucions que estan d'acord amb els judicis manual s dels bibliogràfics amb una precisió del 87%, fins i tot en text que és la producció de OCR.", 'cs': 'Přiřazení složitelů, shlukování stránek v historickém tištěném dokumentu jednotlivcem, který typ nastavil, je bibliografický úkol, který spočívá na analýze ortografické variace a kontrole vizuálních detailů tištěné stránky. V tomto článku představujeme nový model bez dozoru, který společně popisuje textové a vizuální rysy potřebné k rozlišení kompozitů. Aplikovaný na obrázky Shakespearova prvního folia, náš model předpovídá atribuce, které souhlasí s manuálním úsudkem bibliografů s přesností 87%, i na textu, který je výstupem OCR.', 'fi': 'Tekstityypin määrittäneen henkilön tekemä sivujen ryhmittely historialliseen tulostettuun asiakirjaan on bibliografinen tehtävä, joka perustuu ortografisen vaihtelun analysointiin ja tulostetun sivun visuaalisten yksityiskohtien tarkastukseen. Tässä työssä esitellään uusi valvomaton malli, joka yhdessä kuvaa säveltäjien erottamiseen tarvittavia tekstillisiä ja visuaalisia piirteitä. Shakespearen First Folion kuviin sovellettuna mallimme ennustaa 87% tarkkuudella viittauksia, jotka sopivat Raamatunkirjoittajien manuaalisten arvioiden kanssa jopa OCR:n tuotokseen perustuvassa tekstissä.', 'et': "Komposiitori omistamine ehk lehekülgede klastristamine ajaloolises trükitud dokumendis tüübi määranud isiku poolt on bibliograafiline ülesanne, mis tugineb ortograafiliste variatsioonide analüüsile ja trükitud lehekülje visuaalsete üksikasjade kontrollimisele. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut järelevalveta mudelit, mis kirjeldab ühiselt kompositsioonide eristamiseks vajalikke teksti- ja visuaalseid omadusi. Shakespeare'i Esimese Folio piltidele rakendatud mudel prognoosib omistatusi, mis vastavad raamatupidajate käsitsi otsustele täpsusega 87%, isegi teksti puhul, mis on OCR-i väljund.", 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Ga wannan takardan, za mu nuna wani salon da ba'a tsare ba, wanda ke bayyana shi kodi na takardar rubutu da idãnu da za'a buƙata masu buƙata. Aka amfani da zanen Shakepeare'ar farko, misalinmu yana bayani ga matabbata wanda ke yarda da hukuncin littafa na rubutu da taƙaitaccen 87%, ko kuma kan matsayin da ke fitarwa na OCR.", 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Nang mapun iki, kita mulai model sing ora bisa nguasai nggawe ngubah ngerwih perusahaan textual karo iso nggambar aturan sing bisa nguasai komputer. Aplikasi kanggo gambar First Folo of ShakEspeare, model dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerarané karo hukum sing manut kanggo didasakno Manual karo Biblegrapher sing nganggo katêpakan karo asai budhakan kanggo budhakan budhakan budhakan karo', 'he': 'התייחסות המרכיב, הקבוצה של דפים במסמך המדפס היסטורי על ידי האדם שקבע את הטיפוס, היא משימה ביבלוגרפית שמבוססת על ניתוח של ויריאציה אורטוגרפית ובדיקת פרטים ויזואליים של הדף המדפס. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים מודל חדש ללא השגחה שמתאר ביחד את האופיינים הטקסטוליים ויזואליים הנדרשים כדי להבדיל את המרכיבים. שימש לתמונות של פוליו הראשון של שייקספיר, המודל שלנו חושף את התיקויים שמסכימים עם השיפוטים הידיים של ביבלוגרפים עם מדויקה של 87%, אפילו על טקסט שהוא יציאה של OCR.', 'bo': "Compositor attribution, the clustering of pages in a historical printed document by the individual who set the type, is a bibliographic task that relies on analysis of orthographic variation and inspection of visual details of the printed page. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་དེབ་ལ་སྟོན་མེད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཐོང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམས་སྒྲིག་པ་ཚོར་མི་འདྲ་བ་ Applied to images of Shakespeare's First Folio, our model predicts attributions that agree with the manual judgements of bibliographers with an accuracy of 87%, even on text that is the output of OCR.", 'sk': 'Pripisovanje skladatelja, združevanje strani v zgodovinskem tiskanem dokumentu s strani posameznika, ki je nastavil vrsto, je bibliografsko opravilo, ki temelji na analizi ortografskih variacij in pregledu vizualnih podrobnosti tiskane strani. V prispevku predstavljamo nov neobzorovan model, ki skupaj opisuje besedilne in vizualne značilnosti, ki so potrebne za razlikovanje skladateljev. Naš model, ki se uporablja za slike Shakespearovega prvega folija, napoveduje pripise, ki se strinjajo z ročnimi presojami bibliografov z natančnostjo 87%, tudi za besedilo, ki je rezultat OCR.'}
{'en': 'STAIR Captions : Constructing a Large-Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset', 'ar': 'تعليقات STAIR: إنشاء مجموعة بيانات التسمية التوضيحية للصور اليابانية واسعة النطاق', 'es': 'Subtítulos de STAIR: construcción de un conjunto de datos de subtítulos de imágenes en japonés a gran escala', 'pt': 'Legendas STAIR: construindo um conjunto de dados de legenda de imagem japonesa em grande escala', 'fr': "Légendes STAIR\xa0: Création d'un jeu de données de légendes d'images japonaises à grande échelle", 'ja': '階段キャプション:大規模な日本語画像キャプションデータセットの構築', 'hi': 'STAIR कैप्शन: एक बड़े पैमाने पर जापानी छवि कैप्शन डेटासेट का निर्माण', 'zh': 'STAIR 字幕:构大日语图字幕数集', 'ru': 'Подписи к ЛЕСТНИЦАМ: создание крупномасштабного набора данных для японских изображений', 'ga': 'Fotheidil STAIR: Tacar Sonraí um Fhotheideal Íomhá Seapánach ar Mhórscála a Thógáil', 'hu': 'STAIR feliratok: Egy nagyméretű japán feliratos adatkészlet létrehozása', 'el': 'Τίτλοι: Κατασκευή μιας μεγάλης κλίμακας ιαπωνικής σειράς δεδομένων λεζάντας εικόνας', 'lt': 'STAIR antraštės: Didelio masto Japonijos vaizdo antraščių duomenų rinkinio kūrimas', 'ka': 'Comment', 'kk': 'STAIR айдарлары: Жапон кескін айдарының үлкен масштабын құру', 'it': 'Didascalie STAIR: Costruzione di un set di dati giapponesi per didascalie di immagini su larga scala', 'mk': 'STAIR капиции: Конструирање на голема јапонска датотека за капиции на слики', 'ms': 'Titik STAIR: Membina Set Data Titik Imej Jepun Skala Besar', 'mt': 'Titoli STAIR: Il-kostruzzjoni ta’ Sett ta’ Dejta tal-Kapitolazzjoni tal-Immaġni Ġappuniż fuq skala kbira', 'mn': 'STAIR Ном: Том-Масштабын Японы зураг Ном Мэдээлэл', 'no': 'STAIR- tittel: Konstruerer ein stor skalering av japansk biletittel', 'ml': 'STAIR തലക്കെട്ടുകള്\u200d: വലുതായ ഒരു ജാപ്പനീസ് ചിത്രം തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക', 'pl': 'Podpisy STAR: Konstrukcja dużego zestawu danych o napisach obrazu japońskiego', 'sr': 'STAIR Kapije: Izgradavanje podataka o velikoj skali japanske slike', 'ro': 'Capturări STAIR: Construirea unui set de date japonez de imagini la scară largă', 'so': 'STAIR Captions: Construction a Large-Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset', 'sv': 'STAIR Captions: Konstruera en storskalig japansk bildbildsdata', 'ta': 'STAIR தலைப்புகள்:', 'si': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'uz': 'Japoniya rasm sarlavhasi maʼlumotini yaratish', 'vi': 'Theo ảnh cá nhân: Việc xây dựng ảnh chụp ảnh lớn', 'bg': 'Звездни надписи: Изграждане на голям набор от данни за надписи на японски изображения', 'hr': 'STAIR kapije: Izgradavanje podataka o velikoj skali japanske slike', 'da': 'STAIR Billedtekster: Konstruktion af et stort japansk billedtekstdatasæt', 'nl': 'STAR Captions: Een grootschalige dataset voor Japanse afbeeldingsondertiteling maken', 'de': 'STAIR-Bildunterschriften: Erstellen eines großen japanischen Bildunterschriftendatensatzes', 'id': 'STAIR Captions: Constructing a Large-Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset', 'fa': 'عنوان STAIR: ساختن یک مقیاس بزرگ برای عنوان عنوان تصویر ژاپنی', 'sw': 'Makala ya STAIR: Kujenga Taarifa za Picha kubwa kwa Kijapani', 'ko': '계단 자막: 대규모 일본어 이미지 자막 데이터 세트 구축', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sq': 'STAIR Captions: Constructing a Large Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset', 'tr': 'STAIR Käpşenler: Ullakan-Ullakan Ýaponiň Resim Käpşeni Maglumaty', 'am': 'የኢትዮጵያ ምስል አርእስት', 'hy': 'STAR Caption: Creating a Large-Scene', 'az': 'STAIR Başlıqları', 'bn': 'STAIR শিরোনাম: জাপানীয় ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন ডাটা আঁকা হবে', 'bs': 'STAIR Kapije: Izgradavanje podataka o velikoj skali japanske slike', 'cs': 'STAR titulky: Vytvoření rozsáhlé japonské sady dat titulků obrazu', 'ca': 'STAIR Captions: Constructing a Large-Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset', 'et': 'STAIR pealdised: Suuremahulise Jaapani pildi pealdiste andmekogumi loomine', 'fi': 'STAIR Captions: Laadukkaan japanilaisen kuvatekstitystiedoston rakentaminen', 'jv': 'STAIR Captions: Learning a big-scale japanese Image Caption data', 'he': 'תורגם וסטאר: בניית קבוצת נתונים של תואר תמונות יפנית ברמה גדולה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'STAIR Napisi: Izdelava obsežnega japonskega nabora podatkov o napisi slik', 'bo': 'STAIR Captions: Constructing a Large-Scale Japanese Image Caption Dataset'}
{'en': 'In recent years, automatic generation of image descriptions (captions), that is, image captioning, has attracted a great deal of attention. In this paper, we particularly consider generating Japanese captions for images. Since most available caption datasets have been constructed for English language, there are few datasets for Japanese. To tackle this problem, we construct a large-scale Japanese image caption dataset based on images from MS-COCO, which is called STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions consists of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 images. In the experiment, we show that a neural network trained using STAIR Captions can generate more natural and better Japanese captions, compared to those generated using English-Japanese machine translation after generating English captions.', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، جذب الإنشاء التلقائي لأوصاف الصور (التسميات التوضيحية) ، أي التعليق على الصور ، قدرًا كبيرًا من الاهتمام. في هذه الورقة ، نفكر بشكل خاص في إنشاء تسميات توضيحية يابانية للصور. نظرًا لأن معظم مجموعات بيانات التسميات التوضيحية المتاحة قد تم إنشاؤها للغة الإنجليزية ، فهناك عدد قليل من مجموعات البيانات للغة اليابانية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، قمنا بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات التسمية التوضيحية للصور اليابانية على نطاق واسع استنادًا إلى الصور من MS-COCO ، والتي تسمى STAIR Captions. تتكون تعليقات STAIR من 820310 تسمية توضيحية يابانية لـ 164.062 صورة. في التجربة ، أظهرنا أن الشبكة العصبية التي تم تدريبها باستخدام STAIR Captions يمكنها إنشاء تسميات توضيحية يابانية أكثر طبيعية وأفضل ، مقارنةً بتلك التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام الترجمة الآلية من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية بعد إنشاء تسميات توضيحية باللغة الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, la generación automática de descripciones de imágenes (subtítulos), es decir, subtítulos de imágenes, ha llamado mucho la atención. En este documento, consideramos especialmente la generación de subtítulos en japonés para las imágenes. Dado que la mayoría de los conjuntos de datos de subtítulos disponibles se han creado para el idioma inglés, hay pocos conjuntos de datos para el japonés. Para resolver este problema, creamos un conjunto de datos de subtítulos de imágenes japonesas a gran escala basado en imágenes de MS-COCO, que se llama STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions consta de 820.310 subtítulos en japonés para 164.062 imágenes. En el experimento, mostramos que una red neuronal entrenada con subtítulos STAIR puede generar subtítulos en japonés más naturales y mejores, en comparación con los generados con la traducción automática inglés-japonés después de generar subtítulos en inglés.', 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, a geração automática de descrições de imagens (captions), ou seja, legendas de imagens, tem atraído muita atenção. Neste artigo, consideramos particularmente a geração de legendas em japonês para imagens. Como a maioria dos conjuntos de dados de legendas disponíveis foi construída para o idioma inglês, existem poucos conjuntos de dados para japonês. Para resolver esse problema, construímos um conjunto de dados de legenda de imagem japonesa em grande escala com base em imagens do MS-COCO, chamado STAIR Captions. O STAIR Captions consiste em 820.310 legendas em japonês para 164.062 imagens. No experimento, mostramos que uma rede neural treinada usando STAIR Captions pode gerar legendas em japonês mais naturais e melhores, em comparação com aquelas geradas usando tradução automática inglês-japonês após gerar legendas em inglês.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, la génération automatique de descriptions d'images (légendes), c'est-à-dire le sous-titrage d'images, a beaucoup retenu l'attention. Dans cet article, nous examinons en particulier la génération de légendes japonaises pour les images. Étant donné que la plupart des jeux de données de légendes disponibles ont été créés pour la langue anglaise, il existe peu de jeux de données pour le japonais. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous construisons un jeu de données de légendes d'images japonaises à grande échelle basé sur des images de MS-COCO, appelé STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions comprend 820 310 légendes japonaises pour 164 062 images. Dans l'expérience, nous montrons qu'un réseau de neurones formé à l'aide des sous-titres STAIR peut générer des sous-titres japonais plus naturels et de meilleure qualité, par rapport à ceux générés par la traduction automatique anglais-japonais après avoir généré des sous-titres en anglais.", 'zh': '近年以来,图(captions)自生,即图字幕,大相关注。 在本文中,特思图像成日语标题。 多可用者字幕数皆英语构之,故日语数集少。 为解此事,于MS-COCO像构大日本题数集,谓之STAIR Captions。 STAIR 字幕由 164,062 张图片之 820,310 成日语字幕。 实验之中,明与生成英语字幕后用英语-日语机器翻译生之神经网络,用 STAIR 字幕之教神经网络可以生自然之日语字幕。', 'ja': '近年、画像説明（キャプション）、すなわち画像キャプションの自動生成が大きな注目を集めている。本稿では特に画像の日本語字幕の生成について考察する。ほとんどの利用可能なキャプションデータセットは英語用に構築されているため、日本語用のデータセットはほとんどありません。この問題に対処するために、MS - COCOからの画像を基に大規模な日本語の画像キャプションデータセットを構築し、これを階段キャプションと呼びます。キャプション階段は164,062枚の画像に対して820,310枚の日本語キャプションで構成されている。実験では、階段キャプションを使用して訓練されたニューラルネットワークは、英語のキャプションを生成した後に英語と日本語の機械翻訳を使用して生成されたものと比較して、より自然でより良い日本語のキャプションを生成することができることを示しました。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में, छवि विवरण (कैप्शन) की स्वचालित पीढ़ी, अर्थात्, छवि कैप्शनिंग, ने बहुत अधिक ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। इस पेपर में, हम विशेष रूप से छवियों के लिए जापानी कैप्शन उत्पन्न करने पर विचार करते हैं। चूंकि अधिकांश उपलब्ध कैप्शन डेटासेट अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए बनाए गए हैं, इसलिए जापानी के लिए कुछ डेटासेट हैं। इस समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम एमएस-कोको से छवियों के आधार पर एक बड़े पैमाने पर जापानी छवि कैप्शन डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं, जिसे STAIR कैप्शन कहा जाता है। सीढ़ी कैप्शन 164,062 छवियों के लिए 820,310 जापानी कैप्शन के होते हैं। प्रयोग में, हम दिखाते हैं कि STAIR कैप्शन का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क अंग्रेजी कैप्शन उत्पन्न करने के बाद अंग्रेजी-जापानी मशीन अनुवाद का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न लोगों की तुलना में अधिक प्राकृतिक और बेहतर जापानी कैप्शन उत्पन्न कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы большое внимание привлекает автоматическая генерация описаний изображений (подписей), то есть подписей к изображениям. В этой статье мы, в частности, рассматриваем возможность создания японских подписей для изображений. Поскольку большинство доступных наборов данных для подписей были созданы для английского языка, существует мало наборов данных для японского языка. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы создаем крупномасштабный японский набор данных для подписей к изображениям на основе изображений из MS-COCO, который называется STAIR Captions. Подписи на ЛЕСТНИЦЕ состоят из 820 310 японских подписей для 164 062 изображений. В эксперименте мы показываем, что нейронная сеть, обученная с использованием надписей на ЛЕСТНИЦЕ, может генерировать более естественные и лучшие японские надписи по сравнению с теми, которые генерируются с использованием английско-японского машинного перевода после генерирования английских надписей.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tá giniúint uathoibríoch de thuairiscí íomhá (fotheidil), is é sin, fotheidealú íomhánna, tar éis go leor aird a tharraingt. Sa pháipéar seo, breithnímid go háirithe ar fhotheidil Seapánacha a ghiniúint le haghaidh íomhánna. Ós rud é gur do Bhéarla a tógadh an chuid is mó de na tacair sonraí fotheideal atá ar fáil, is beag tacar sonraí atá ann don tSeapáinis. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, tógaimid tacar sonraí ar mhórscála le haghaidh fortheideal íomhánna Seapánacha bunaithe ar íomhánna ó MS-COCO, ar a dtugtar STAIR Captions. Is éard atá i bhfotheidil STAIR ná 820,310 fotheideal Seapánach do 164,062 íomhá. Sa turgnamh, léirímid gur féidir le líonra néarúil atá oilte ag baint úsáide as STAIR Captions fortheidil Seapánacha níos nádúrtha agus níos fearr a ghiniúint, i gcomparáid leo siúd a ghintear ag baint úsáide as aistriúchán meaisín Béarla-Seapáinis tar éis fortheidil Bhéarla a ghiniúint.', 'ka': 'ახლა წლის შემდეგ ავტომატური გამოსახულების გამოსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების განსახულების შესა ჩვენ განსაკუთრებით აღმოვაჩნეთ წაპონეთის შესახებ გამოსახულებისთვის. ბევრი შესაძლებელი თარიღების მონაცემები ინგლისური ენათისთვის კონფიგურაცია იყო, რამდენიმე მონაცემები იაპონისთვის. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით დიდი მაგალითი იაპონური გამოსახულების სახელის სახელის მონაცემები MS-COCO-ის გამოსახულებიდან, რომელიც სახელია STAIR STAIR კაპონტაქციები არის 820 310 იაპონური კაპონტაქციები 164 062 გამოსახულებისთვის. ექსპერიმენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც STAIR კაპონტაციების გამოყენებით, შეგვიძლია უფრო ნართვის და უკეთესი წაპონეთის კონტაციების შემდე', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években nagy figyelmet keltett a képleírások (feliratok) automatikus generálása, azaz a képalkotás. Ebben a tanulmányban különösen fontolóra vesszük a japán feliratok készítését. Mivel a legtöbb elérhető feliratos adatkészlet angol nyelvre készült, kevés adatkészlet van japán nyelvre. A probléma megoldása érdekében egy nagyszabású japán feliratos adatkészletet építünk fel MS-COCO képek alapján, amelyet STAIR feliratoknak hívnak. A STAIR Feliratok 820 310 japán feliratot tartalmaznak 164 062 képhez. A kísérletben megmutattuk, hogy egy STAIR Feliratok használatával kiképzett neurális hálózat természetesebb és jobb japán feliratokat tud generálni, mint az angol-japán gépi fordítással készült angol feliratok generálása után.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, η αυτόματη παραγωγή περιγραφών εικόνων (λεζάντες), δηλαδή, λεζάντες εικόνας, έχει προσελκύσει μεγάλη προσοχή. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε ιδιαίτερα τη δημιουργία ιαπωνικών λεζάντων για εικόνες. Δεδομένου ότι τα περισσότερα διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων λεζάντας έχουν κατασκευαστεί για την αγγλική γλώσσα, υπάρχουν λίγα σύνολα δεδομένων για τα ιαπωνικά. Για να αντιμετωπίσουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα, κατασκευάζουμε ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας ιαπωνικό σύνολο δεδομένων λεζάντας εικόνας βασισμένο σε εικόνες από το το οποίο ονομάζεται Σταρ Λεζάντες. Οι λεζάντες αποτελείται από 820,310 ιαπωνικές λεζάντες για 164,062 εικόνες. Στο πείραμα, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο εκπαιδευμένο με τις λεζάντες μπορεί να δημιουργήσει πιο φυσικές και καλύτερες ιαπωνικές λεζάντες, σε σύγκριση με αυτές που παράγονται με τη χρήση της αγγλικής-ιαπωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης μετά τη δημιουργία Αγγλικών λεζάντων.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, la generazione automatica delle descrizioni delle immagini (didascalie), cioè la didascalia delle immagini, ha attirato molta attenzione. In questo articolo, consideriamo in particolare la generazione di didascalie giapponesi per le immagini. Poiché la maggior parte dei set di dati disponibili per le didascalie sono stati costruiti per la lingua inglese, ci sono pochi set di dati per il giapponese. Per affrontare questo problema, costruiamo un set di dati giapponesi su larga scala basati su immagini di MS-COCO, chiamato STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions consiste di 820.310 sottotitoli giapponesi per 164.062 immagini. Nell'esperimento, mostriamo che una rete neurale addestrata utilizzando le didascalie STAIR può generare didascalie giapponesi più naturali e migliori, rispetto a quelle generate utilizzando la traduzione automatica inglese-giapponese dopo aver generato didascalie inglesi.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais labai daug dėmesio pritraukė automatinis vaizdo aprašų (antraščių), t. y. vaizdo antraščių kūrimas. In this paper, we particularly consider generating Japanese captions for images.  Kadangi dauguma turimų antraščių duomenų rinkinių buvo sukurti anglų kalbai, yra nedaug duomenų rinkinių japonų kalba. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, sukuriame didelio masto Japonijos vaizdo pavadinimų duomenų rinkinį, pagrįstą MS-COCO vaizdais, vadinamu STAIR pavadinimu. STAIR antraštes sudaro 820 310 Japonijos antraščių 164 062 paveikslėliams. Eksperimente parodome, kad nervinis tinklas, apmokytas naudojant STAIR antraštes, gali sukurti natūralesnius ir geresnius japonų antraštes, palyginti su antraštėmis, gautomis naudojant anglų ir japonų vertimą mašinomis po anglų antraščių sukūrimo.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда, суреттің түсініктемелерін автоматты түрде жасау (айдарлар), мысалы, суреттің айдары, көп түсінікті болды. Бұл қағазда, өзіміз жапон айдарын кескіндерге жасау үшін ойлаймыз. Айдарлардың көпшілігі ағылшын тіліне құрылған себебі жапон тілінде бірнеше деректер қорлары бар. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін, MS- COCO кескіндерінің негізінде, STAIR айдарлары деп аталатын жапон кескіндердің айдарының үлкен масштабын құрамыз. STAIR айдарлары 164 062 кескіндердің 820 310 жапон айдарында. Осы тәжірибеде, STAIR көшірмелерімен оқылған неврал желі ағылшын айдарын құрғаннан кейін ағылшын- жапон компьютерінің аудармасынан салыстырылған адамдардың табиғи және жақсы жапон айдарын жасай алады.', 'mk': 'Во последниве години, автоматска генерација на описи на сликите (наслови), тоа значи, насловување на сликите, привлече големо внимание. Во овој весник, особено размислуваме за генерирање јапонски наслови за слики. Бидејќи повеќето достапни набори на податоци за наслови се изградени за англиски јазик, постојат неколку набори на податоци за јапонски јазик. За да го решиме овој проблем, конструираме големо јапонско нацртање на податоци за слики базирани на слики од MS-COCO, кое се нарекува STAIR капиции. СтАИР наслови се состојат од 820, 310 јапонски наслови за 164, 062 слики. Во експериментот покажуваме дека нервната мрежа обучена со користење на STAIR Captions може да генерира поприродни и подобри јапонски наслови, во споредба со оние генерирани со англиско-јапонски машински превод по генерирање англиски наслови.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d, ചിത്ര വിവരണങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയം തലമുറയുടെ (തലക്കെട്ടുകള്\u200d), അതാണ് ചിത്രം പിടികൂടുന്നത്, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി ജപ്പാനികളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത ഏറ്റവും ലഭ്യമായ തലക്കെട്ടിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിന ഈ പ്രശ്നം എതിര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ സ്പാനപ്പെട്ട ചിത്ര തലക്കെട്ടിടേഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. എസ് സ്റ്റാര്\u200d തപ്പുകളില്\u200d 820,310 ജപ്പാനികളുടെ തപ്പുകള്\u200d 164,062 ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ളതാണ്. പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് STAIR ക്യാപ്റ്റനുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നാണ്. അതില്\u200d', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд автоматжуулан зураг дүрслэлүүдийн тодорхойлолт (нэр тодорхойлолт) гэдэг нь зураг дүрслэлүүд маш их анхаарал татаж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ялангуяа япон зурагт бий болгож байна. Ихэнх тайлбар өгөгдлийн санг Англи хэл дээр бүтээсэн учраас Японы хэл дээр хэдэн өгөгдлийн санг байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид MS-COCO-ын зураг дээр үндсэн том хэмжээний Японы зураг зураг өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна. STAIR дурангууд 164,062 зургийн 820,310 Япон дурангуудтай байдаг. Энэ туршилтанд бид STAIR зураг ашиглан сургалтын мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд илүү байгалийн, илүү сайн Япон зураг бий болгож чадна. Англи хэлний дуранг бий болгон Англи-Японы машин хөгжүүлэх хүмүүстэй харьцуулсан.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har automatisk generering av biletskrifter (tittel), som er tittel på biletet, attributt mykje oppmerksomhet. I denne papiret ser vi spesielt på å laga japanske tittel for bilete. Siden dei fleste tilgjengelege titteldatasetta er konstruert for engelsk språk, er det få datasett for japansk. For å løsa dette problemet, konstruerer vi ein stor skala datasett for japansk biletittel basert på bilete frå MS-COCO, som vert kalla STAIR-tittel. STAIR Captions consist of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 images. I eksperimentet viser vi at eit neuralnettverk trent med STAIR-tittel kan laga meir naturlege og bedre japanske tittel, sammenlignet med dei genererte med engelsk-japansk maskinsomsetjing etter å laga engelsk tittel.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach automatyczne generowanie opisów obrazów (napisów), czyli podpisów obrazów, przyciągnęło dużą uwagę. W niniejszym artykule szczególnie rozważamy generowanie japońskich napisów do obrazów. Ponieważ większość dostępnych zbiorów danych napisów została skonstruowana dla języka angielskiego, istnieje kilka zbiorów danych dla japońskiego. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, budujemy duży zestaw danych japońskich podpisów oparty na obrazach z MS-COCO, który nazywa się STAIR Captions. STAR Captions składa się z podpisów japońskich 820,310 dla obrazów 164,062. W eksperymencie pokazujemy, że sieć neuronowa trenowana przy użyciu podpisów STAR może generować bardziej naturalne i lepsze podpisy japońskie, w porównaniu z tymi generowanymi przy użyciu tłumaczenia maszynowego po generowaniu podpisów angielskich.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, generarea automată a descrierilor imaginilor (subtitrări), adică a subtitrării imaginilor, a atras o mare atenție. În această lucrare, luăm în considerare în special generarea de subtitrări japoneze pentru imagini. Deoarece majoritatea seturilor de date disponibile au fost construite pentru limba engleză, există puține seturi de date pentru japoneză. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, construim un set de date japonez de imagini la scară largă bazat pe imagini de la MS-COCO, care se numește STAIR Captions. CAPTELE STAIR constă din 820.310 subtitrări japoneze pentru 164.062 imagini. În experiment, vom arăta că o rețea neurală instruită folosind STAIR Captions poate genera mai multe subtitrări japoneze naturale și mai bune, comparativ cu cele generate folosind traducerea automată engleză-japoneză după generarea subtitrărilor în engleză.', 'sr': 'Za poslednje godine, automatska generacija opisa slika (naslova), to je, naslov slika, privukla je mnogo pažnje. U ovom papiru, posebno razmišljamo o stvaranju japanskih naslova za slike. Budući da su većina dostupnih podataka za titulu izgrađena za engleski jezik, postoji nekoliko podataka za japanski. Da bi se riješili ovaj problem, izgradili smo veliku japansku kompletu podataka o imenu imidža na osnovu slika MS-COCO-a, koja se zove STAIR Kapioni. Kapije STAIR sastoje od 820.310 japanskih kapacija za 164.062 slika. U eksperimentu, pokazujemo da neuronska mreža obučena koristeći STAIR Kapije može stvoriti prirodne i bolje japanske kapcije, u usporedbi sa onima koji su stvoreni koristeći prevod engleskog japanskog mašine nakon proizvodnje engleskih kapcija.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පින්තූර විස්තර (පින්තූරණය), ඉතින්, පින්තූර විස්තර, ගොඩක් අවධා මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශේෂයෙන්ම ජාපාන් පින්තූර වලින් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සඳහා විශේෂ දත්ත සෙට් සිද්ධ වෙලා ඉන්ජාපින් භාෂාව සඳහා, ජාපාන් ව මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න, අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ජාපාන් පින්තූර පින්තූර දත්ත සෙට් එකක් හදන්නේ MS-COCO පින්තූර වල ස්ටායිර් කැප්ටන් ඉන්නවා 164,062 පින්තූරට ජාපානි කැප්ටන් 820,310. පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ STAIR කැප්ටන් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජාපානි කැප්ටන් වලින් ස්වභාවික ස', 'so': 'In recent years, automatic generation of image descriptions (captions), that is, image captioning, has attracted a great deal of attention.  Warqadan waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa si gaar ah oo aan u sameyno sawirada Japoniya. Sida darteed waxaa loo dhisay sawirada macluumaadka luuqada Ingiriiska, Jabanees waxaa laga helaa sawirro yar. Si aan u xambaarano dhibaatadan, waxaynu dhisaynaa taariikhda sawirka japaniya oo aad u weyn, oo lagu saleeyo sawirro ka soo baxay MS-CO, kaas oo la yidhaahdo STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions consi of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 sawirro. Imtixaanka, waxaynu muujinnaa shabakadda neurada ee lagu tababaray isticmaalka STAIR, waxay sameyn karaan bandhigyo badan oo dabiicadda iyo ka wanaagsan japaniya, barbardhig ahaan kuwa ku soo dhashay isticmaalka tarjumaadka mashiinka Ingiriiska-Japanese kadibna dhashay xarafka ingiriisiga.', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har automatisk generering av bildbeskrivningar (bildtexter), det vill säga bildtexter, väckt stor uppmärksamhet. I denna uppsats överväger vi särskilt att skapa japanska bildtexter för bilder. Eftersom de flesta tillgängliga bildtextningsdatauppsättningar har konstruerats för engelska språket, finns det få datauppsättningar för japanska. För att ta itu med detta problem konstruerar vi en storskalig japansk bildtextningsdataset baserad på bilder från MS-COCO, som kallas STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions består av 820 310 japanska bildtexter för 164 062 bilder. I experimentet visar vi att ett neuralt nätverk som tränats med STAIR Captions kan generera mer naturliga och bättre japanska bildtexter, jämfört med de som genereras med engelsk-japansk maskinöversättning efter att ha genererat engelska bildtexter.', 'ms': 'Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, generasi automatik deskripsi imej (tajuk), iaitu, captioning imej, telah menarik perhatian yang besar. Dalam kertas ini, kita terutama berfikir menghasilkan tajuk Jepun untuk imej. Sejak kebanyakan set data tajuk tersedia telah dibina untuk bahasa Inggeris, terdapat beberapa set data untuk bahasa Jepun. Untuk menangani masalah ini, kami membina set data tajuk imej Jepun skala besar berdasarkan imej dari MS-COCO, yang dipanggil tajuk STAIR. STAIR Captions consists of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 images.  Dalam eksperimen ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian saraf dilatih menggunakan Capsi STAIR boleh menghasilkan lebih alami dan lebih baik tajuk Jepun, dibandingkan dengan yang dihasilkan menggunakan terjemahan mesin bahasa Inggeris-Jepun selepas menghasilkan tajuk bahasa Inggeris.', 'mt': 'F’dawn l-a ħħar snin, il-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika tad-deskrizzjonijiet tal-immaġni (titoli), jiġifieri l-intestatura tal-immaġni, ġibdet ħafna attenzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, qed nikkunsidraw b’mod partikolari l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ intestaturi Ġappuniżi għall-immaġni. Minħabba li l-biċċa l-kbira tas-settijiet tad-dejta tal-intestaturi disponibbli nbnew għall-lingwa Ingliża, hemm ftit settijiet tad-dejta għall-Ġappuniż. To tackle this problem, we construct a large-scale Japanese image caption dataset based on images from MS-COCO, which is called STAIR Captions.  STAIR Captions consists of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 images.  Fl-esperiment, naraw li netwerk newrali mħarreġ bl-użu tal-Kapzjonijiet STAIR jista’ jiġġenera aktar titoli naturali u a ħjar Ġappuniżi, meta mqabbel ma’ dawk iġġenerati bl-użu tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni Ingliż-Ġappuniż wara li jiġġeneraw titoli Ingliż.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் பிம்பத்தின் வரைபடங்கள் (தலைப்புகள்) தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பிம்பத்தை பெறுவது, அது பிம்பத்தை நிறைவாக கவனத இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் குறிப்பாக பிம்பங்களுக்கு ஜப்பானிய தலைப்புகளை உருவாக்குவதை கருதுகி @ info இந்த பிரச்சினையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு பெரிய அளவு ஜப்பானிய பிம்பத்தின் தலைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம். எஸ்எஸ்- CO என்ற STAIR தலைப்புகள் 164,062 படங்களுக்கு 820,310 ஜப்பானிய தலைப்புகள் உள்ளன. இந்த சோதனையில், STAIR தலைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் காட்டுகிறது அதிக இயற்கையான மற்றும் சிறப்பான ஜப்பானிய பி', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں، تصویر کی تعریف (کپٹن) کی آٹوٹی نسل، یعنی تصویر کپٹینگ، بہت سی توجه اٹھایا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم مخصوصاً تصاویروں کے لئے جاپانی کاپٹ پیدا کرنے کی فکر کرتے ہیں۔ انگلیسی زبان کے لئے زیادہ موجود کیپٹن ڈاٹ سٹ بنائے گئے ہیں، جاپانی کے لئے کم ڈاٹ سٹ ہیں. اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک بڑی اسکیل جاپانی تصویر کیپشن ڈیٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں جو MS-COCO کی تصویروں پر بنیاد ہے، جس کا نام STAIR کیپشن ہے. STAIR کپٹینز 164,062 تصاویر کے لئے 820,310 ژاپنی کپٹینز ہیں. اس آزمائش میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ STAIR کاپینٹوں کے مطابق تعلیم کی ایک نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک زیادہ طبیعی اور اچھی جاپانی کاپینٹ پیدا کر سکتا ہے، انگلیسی کاپینٹوں کی پیدائش کے بعد انگلیسی-جاپانی مشین ترجمہ', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ichida rasm taʼriflarini avtomatik avtomatik foydalanish (sarlavhalar), bu rasm tashkilotlarini ko'p paydo qiladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz faqat Yaponiya tashkilotlarini rasmlar uchun yaratishni tasavvur qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz Japoniya rasm sarlavhasi maʼlumotini yaratishmiz. U STAIR Sarlavhaslari deb nomlanadi. STAIR sarlavhasi 164,062 rasmlar uchun 820,310 Japoniya sarlavhasi bor. Tajribada, biz STAIR sarlavhasi bilan o'rganilgan neyrol tarmoqni ko'rsatdik, ingliz tili tashkilotlarini yaratishdan keyin eng-Yaponcha mashinasini tarjima qilishdan foydalanadigan tarmoqni yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, việc sản xuất tự động mô tả hình ảnh (tiêu đề), có nghĩa là phần đánh giá ảnh, đã thu hút rất nhiều sự chú ý. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đặc biệt cân nhắc tạo ra dòng chữ Nhật cho ảnh. Bởi vì các tập tin có phần lớn đã được xây dựng cho ngôn ngữ Anh, có rất ít dữ liệu cho Nhật. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập tin lưu lượng ảnh lớn của Nhật dựa trên ảnh chụp xơ rải rác, Phim STAIR Bắt đầu gồm 82,310 các dòng chữ nhật cho 164,062 Trong thử nghiệm, chúng tôi cho thấy một mạng lưới thần kinh được đào tạo bằng các hình ảnh STAIR có thể tạo ra nhiều đánh giá tự nhiên và tốt hơn của Nhật so với những hình ảnh được tạo ra bằng cách dịch máy Anh-Nhật sau khi tạo ra chúng tôi đã tạo ra...', 'bg': 'През последните години автоматичното генериране на описания на изображенията (надписи), т.е. надписи на изображения, привлече голямо внимание. В тази статия специално разглеждаме генерирането на японски надписи за изображения. Тъй като повечето налични набори от данни за надписи са създадени за английски език, има малко набори от данни за японски език. За да се справим с този проблем, ние конструираме мащабен японски набор от данни за надписи на изображения, базиран на изображения от който се нарича ЗВЕТНИ надписи. СВЕДНИТЕ надписи се състоят от 820 310 японски надписи за 164 062 изображения. В експеримента показваме, че невронна мрежа, обучена с помощта на надписи, може да генерира по-естествени и по-добри японски надписи в сравнение с тези, генерирани с помощта на английски-японски машинен превод след генериране на надписи на английски.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren heeft het automatisch genereren van beeldbeschrijvingen (bijschriften), dat wil zeggen beeldbijschriften, veel aandacht getrokken. In dit artikel overwegen we vooral het genereren van Japanse ondertitels voor afbeeldingen. Aangezien de meeste beschikbare ondertitelingsdatasets zijn gemaakt voor de Engelse taal, zijn er weinig datasets voor Japans. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, bouwen we een grootschalige Japanse beeldbijschriftdataset op basis van afbeeldingen uit MS-COCO, die STAIR Captions heet. STAR Captions bestaat uit 820,310 Japanse ondertitels voor 164,062 afbeeldingen. In het experiment laten we zien dat een neuraal netwerk getraind met behulp van STAIR Captions natuurlijkere en betere Japanse ondertitels kan genereren, vergeleken met die welke gegenereerd worden met behulp van Engels-Japanse machinevertaling na het genereren van Engelse ondertitels.', 'da': 'I de seneste år har automatisk generering af billedbeskrivelser (billedtekster), det vil sige billedtekster, tiltrukket stor opmærksomhed. I denne artikel overvejer vi især at generere japanske billedtekster til billeder. Da de fleste tilgængelige billedtekstdatasæt er konstrueret til engelsk sprog, er der få datasæt til japansk. For at løse dette problem konstruerer vi et stort japansk billedtekstdatasæt baseret på billeder fra MS-COCO, som kaldes STAIR Captions. STAIR Captions består af 820.310 japanske billedtekster til 164.062 billeder. I eksperimentet viser vi, at et neuralt netværk uddannet ved hjælp af STAIR Captions kan generere mere naturlige og bedre japanske billedtekster sammenlignet med dem, der genereres ved hjælp af engelsk-japansk maskinoversættelse efter generering af engelsk-japanske billedtekster.', 'hr': 'U posljednjih godina, automatska generacija opisa slika (naslova), to što je, navedenje slika, privuklo je mnogo pažnje. U ovom papiru, posebno razmišljamo o stvaranju japanskih naslova za slike. Budući da je većina dostupnih podataka o naslovima izgrađena za engleski jezik, postoji nekoliko podataka za japanski jezik. Za rješavanje ovog problem a, izgradimo veliku japansku nagradu podataka o naslovu slika na temelju slika MS-COCO-a, koja se zove STAIR Kapioni. STAIR Kapije sastoji se od 820.310 japanskih kapacija za 164.062 slika. U tom eksperimentu pokazujemo da neuronska mreža obučena koristeći STAIR Kapije može proizvesti prirodne i bolje japanske kapcije u usporedbi s onima koji su proizvedeni koristeći prevod engleskog japanskog stroja nakon proizvedenja engleskog kapcija.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren hat die automatische Generierung von Bildbeschreibungen (Bildunterschriften), also Bildunterschriften, große Aufmerksamkeit auf sich gezogen. In diesem Beitrag betrachten wir insbesondere die Erzeugung japanischer Bildunterschriften. Da die meisten verfügbaren Beschriftungsdatensätze für die englische Sprache erstellt wurden, gibt es nur wenige Datensätze für Japanisch. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, konstruieren wir einen großen japanischen Bildunterschriftedatensatz basierend auf Bildern aus MS-COCO, der STAIR Captions genannt wird. STAR Captions besteht aus 820,310 japanischen Untertiteln für 164,062 Bilder. Im Experiment zeigen wir, dass ein neuronales Netzwerk, das mit STAR Captions trainiert wird, natürlichere und bessere japanische Untertitel erzeugen kann, im Vergleich zu denen, die mit maschineller Übersetzung Englisch-Japanisch generiert werden, nachdem englische Untertitel generiert wurden.', 'id': 'Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, generasi otomatis deskripsi gambar (captions), yaitu, captioning gambar, telah menarik perhatian yang besar. Dalam kertas ini, kita terutama mempertimbangkan penulisan Jepang untuk gambar. Karena sebagian besar dataset caption tersedia telah dibangun untuk bahasa Inggris, ada beberapa dataset untuk bahasa Jepang. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami membangun sebuah set data caption gambar Jepang skala besar berdasarkan gambar dari MS-COCO, yang disebut Captions STAIR. Capsi STAIR terdiri dari 820,310 captions Jepang untuk 164,062 gambar. In the experiment, we show that a neural network trained using STAIR Captions can generate more natural and better Japanese captions, compared to those generated using English-Japanese machine translation after generating English captions.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 이미지 묘사(자막)의 자동 생성, 즉 이미지 자막은 사람들의 광범위한 관심을 불러일으켰다.본문에서 우리는 특히 이미지를 위해 일본어 자막을 생성하는 것을 고려한다.대부분의 사용 가능한 자막 데이터 집합은 영어를 위해 구축된 것이기 때문에 일본어의 자막 데이터 집합은 매우 적다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 MS-COCO 이미지를 바탕으로 한 대규모 일본어 이미지 자막 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 이를 계단 자막이라고 부른다.계단 설명은 820310개의 일본어 설명으로 구성되어 164062폭의 이미지에 사용된다.실험에 따르면 영어 자막을 생성한 후 영일 기계번역으로 생성된 일본어 자막보다 계단 자막으로 훈련된 신경 네트워크가 더욱 자연스럽고 좋은 일본어 자막을 생성할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, kizazi cha kujitegemea cha maelezo ya picha (taswira), ambacho, kuonyesha picha, umevutia hisia kubwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunafikiria kutengeneza taswira za Japani kwa picha. Tangu seti za taarifa zinazopatikana zimetengenezwa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, kuna seti chache kwa ajili ya Kijapani. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunatengeneza taarifa za picha kwa kiwango kikubwa cha Japani kwa kutumia picha kutoka MS-CO, inayoitwa STAIR. Video vya STAIR zinajumuisha vichwa vya Kijapani 820,310 kwa picha 164,062. Katika jaribio hilo, tunaonyesha kuwa mtandao wa neurali uliojifundishwa kwa kutumia vipande vya STAIR vinaweza kutengeneza maoni bora zaidi ya asilia na bora ya Japani, ukilinganisha na wale waliozaliwa kwa kutumia utafsiri wa mashine ya Kiingereza na Kijapani baada ya kutengeneza vichwa vya habari vya Kiingereza.', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllarda, surat taýýarlamanyň (käpşenler), meýdança surat taýýarlamanyň köp ünsüni çekdi. Bu kagyzda, esasy taýýarlap suratlar üçin japonça käpşeni döretmäge pikir edýäris. Iňlisçe diller üçin elýeterli käpşer terjime edilen bäri, Japonça üçin birnäçe terjime düzümler bar. Bu meseleni çözmek üçin MS-COCO suratlarından daşary edilen uly ölçekli japonça surat taýýarlamagy çykarýarys STAIR Käpşenler 164,062 surat üçin 820,310 Ýaponiň käpşenlerinden meňzeýär. Deneyde, STAIR köpşenleri ulanarak bilinmeli nuýral şebekesi Iňlisçe köpşenleri döreden soňra Iňlisçe-japonça maşyny terjime edenleriň ýagdaýynda has dogry we gowy japonça käpşenleri döredip biler.', 'fa': 'در سالهای اخیر، نسل اتوماتیک توضیح تصویر (عنوان عنوان) یعنی عنوان تصویر، توجه بسیاری را جذب کرده است. در این کاغذ، مخصوصاً ما به تولید عنوان ژاپنی برای تصاویر فکر می کنیم. از آنجا که بیشتر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عنوان برای زبان انگلیسی ساخته شده\u200cاند، چند مجموعه داده\u200cهای ژاپنی وجود دارد. برای حل این مشکل، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای عنوان تصویر ژاپنی بزرگ را بر اساس تصویر MS-COCO ساختیم که به نام کاپیتان STAIR می\u200cگویند. Captions STAIR consist of 820,310 Japanese captions for 164,062 images. در این آزمایش، ما نشان می دهیم که یک شبکه عصبی که با استفاده از کاپیتان STAIR آموزش یافته شده است می تواند کلمه های طبیعی و بهتر ژاپنی را تولید کند، در مقایسه با کسانی که تولید شده از ترجمه ماشین انگلیسی ژاپنی و ژاپنی بعد از', 'sq': 'Në vitet e fundit, gjenerata automatike e përshkrimit të imazhit (tituj), që do të thotë, përshkrimi i imazhit, ka tërhequr shumë vëmendje. Në këtë letër, ne veçanërisht konsiderojmë krijimin e titujve japonezë për imazhe. Që kur shumica e të dhënave të titujve të disponueshme janë ndërtuar për gjuhën angleze, ka pak të dhëna për japonezën. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne ndërtojmë një grup të dhënash në shkallë të madhe japoneze të regjistrimit të imazheve bazuar në imazhe nga MS-COCO, i cili quhet regjistrimi STAIR. Titujt STAIR përbëhen nga 820,310 tituj japonez për 164,062 imazhe. Në eksperiment, ne tregojmë se një rrjet nervor i trajnuar duke përdorur kapitujt STAIR mund të gjenerojë tituj më natyror dhe më të mirë japonez, krahasuar me ata të gjeneruar duke përdorur përkthimin anglo-japonez të makinave pas gjenerimit të titujve angleze.', 'af': "In onlangse jaar, outomatiese generasie van beeldbeskrywings (titels), dit is, beeldbeskrywing, het 'n groot aandag aantrek. In hierdie papier, ons besonderlik besluit om japanse titels vir beelde te genereer. Omdat die meeste beskikbaar titel datastel vir Engelske taal gebou is, is daar 'n paar datastel vir Japanse. Om hierdie probleem te probeer, konstrukteer ons 'n groot- skaal japanse beeldtitel datastel gebaseer op beelde van MS- COCO, wat STAIR Captions genoem word. Constellation name (optional) In die eksperiment, wys ons dat 'n neuralnetwerk wat onderwerp word deur die gebruik van STAIR Kapitels, meer natuurlike en beter japanse kapitele kan genereer, vergelyk met die wat genereer word deur die gebruik van Engelse-japanse masjien vertaling na die genereer van Engelse kapitele", 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում պատկերի նկարագրությունների ավտոմատիկ սերունդը, այսինքն, պատկերի նկարագրությունը, շատ ուշադրություն է գրավել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք հատկապես մտածում ենք պատկերների համար ճապոնացի վերնագրեր ստեղծելու համար: Քանի որ հասանելի վերնագրերի տվյալների շատերը կառուցվել են անգլերեն լեզվի համար, շատ քիչ տվյալներ կան ճապոներեն: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք մի մեծ ճապոնացի պատկերների վերնագրման տվյալներ, հիմնված SM-COCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOS պատկերների վրա, որը կոչվում է STAER վերնագրեր: STAR գլխարկները կազմված են 1820,310 ճապոնական գլխարկներից 164,062 նկարի համար: Փորձարկումների ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ STAR Caption-ի օգտագործման սովորեցված նեյրոնային ցանցը կարող է ստեղծել ավելի բնական և ավելի լավ ճապոնական վերնագրություններ, համեմատած այն վերնագրություններին, որոնք ստեղծվել են անգլերեն-ճապոնական մեքենայի թար', 'am': 'In recent years, automatic generation of image descriptions (captions), that is, image captioning, has attracted a great deal of attention.  በዚህ ገጽ፣ በተለይም የጃፓን ምሳሌዎች ለምስሎች መፍጠር እናስባለን፡፡ የኢንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ የተገኘ አርእስት ዳታ ማዕከላዎች ከሆኑ ጀምሮ ለጃፓንኛ ጥቂት ዳታተሮች አሉ። ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የጃፓን ምስል አካባቢ የኢሜএস-ኮኮ ምስሎች የተመሳሳይ የኢሜስኮ አካባቢ (STAIR) ቁጥር የተባለውን የያፓን ምስል አካባቢ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የSTAIR አርእስቶች 164,062 ምስሎች ላይ 820,310 የጃፓን አርእስቶች ናቸው። በተፈተናው ውስጥ STAIR ባለሥልጣናት የተጠቃሚ የነዌብ መረብ የኢንጂልኛ-ጃፓን የግልፅ አረንጓዴዎችን ከመፍጠር በኋላ የበለጠ የጃፓን ምርጫዎች የሚያደርግ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে ছবির বর্ণনা (শিরোনাম) স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রজন্মের (ছবি) ছবির ক্ষেত্রে ছবি তুলে ধরা হয়েছে তারা  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশেষ করে জাপানী শিরোনামের ছবির জন্য তৈরি করা বিবেচনা করি। যেহেতু বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান শিরোনামের তথ্য নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে ইংরেজী ভাষায়, জাপানীদের জন্য কয়েকটি তথ্ এই সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা জাপানী ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি যা এমএস-সিকো থেকে ছবির উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, যার নাম স্টিএআর শি ১৬৪,০৬২ ছবির জন্য স্টারের শিরোনামে ৮২০,৩১০ জাপানী শিরোনাম রয়েছে। In the experiment, we show that a neural network trained using STAIR Captions can generate more natural and better Japanese captions, compared to those generated using English-Japanese machine translation after generating English captions.', 'bs': 'U posljednjih godina, automatska generacija opisa slika (naslova), to je, naslov slika, privukla je mnogo pažnje. U ovom papiru, posebno razmišljamo o stvaranju japanskih naslova za slike. Budući da je većina dostupnih podataka za titulu izgrađena za engleski jezik, postoji nekoliko podataka za japanski. Za rješavanje ovog problem a, izgradimo veliku japansku grupu podataka za snimke slika na osnovu slika MS-COCO-a, koja se zove STAIR Kapioni. Kapije STAIR sastoje od 820.310 japanskih kapacija za 164.062 slika. U tom eksperimentu pokazujemo da neuronska mreža obučena koristeći STAIR Kapije može stvoriti prirodne i bolje japanske kapcije u usporedbi s onima koji su stvoreni koristeći prevod engleskog japanskog mašine nakon proizvodnje engleskog kapetana.', 'ca': "En els últims anys, la generació automàtica de descripcions d'imatges (títulos), és a dir, el título d'imatges, ha atraït molta atenció. En aquest article, considerem generar títulos japonès per a imatges. Des que la majoria dels grups de dades de títulos disponibles han estat construïts per a l'anglès, hi ha pocs grups de dades per al japonès. Per abordar aquest problem a, construïm un conjunt de dades de títols d'imatges japonès a gran escala basat en imatges de MS-COCO, anomenat STAIR Captions. Els títulos STAIR consisteixen en 820.310 títulos japonès per 164.062 imatges. En l'experiment, demostram que una xarxa neural entrenada usant Capcions STAIR pot generar títulos japonès més naturals i millors, en comparació amb els generats usant traducció anglo-japonès després de generar títulos anglès.", 'cs': 'V posledních letech zaujalo automatické generování popisů obrázků (titulků), tedy titulků obrázků velkou pozornost. V tomto článku se zejména zabýváme generováním japonských titulků pro obrázky. Vzhledem k tomu, že většina dostupných datových sad titulků byla vytvořena pro anglický jazyk, existuje málo dat pro japonštinu. Pro řešení tohoto problému vytvoříme velký japonský datový soubor popisků obrázků založený na obrázkech z MS-COCO, který se nazývá STAR Titions. STAR Titions se skládá z 820,310 japonských titulků pro 164,062 obrázky. V experimentu ukazujeme, že neuronová síť trénovaná pomocí STAR Titions může generovat přirozenější a lepší japonské titulky ve srovnání s titulky generovanými pomocí anglicko-japonského strojového překladu po generování anglických titulků.', 'et': "Viimastel aastatel on palju tähelepanu äratanud pildikirjelduste automaatne genereerimine (pealdised), st pildikirjeldus. Selles raamatus kaalume eelkõige Jaapani pealkirjade genereerimist piltidele. Kuna enamik saadaolevaid pealkirjade andmekogumeid on ehitatud inglise keele jaoks, on jaapani jaoks vähe andmekogumeid. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks ehitame MS-COCO piltidel põhineva suuremahulise Jaapani piltide pealdiste andmekogumi, mida nimetatakse STAIR pealdisteks. STAIR pealkirjad koosnevad 820 310 Jaapani pealkirjast 164 062 pildi jaoks. Eksperimentis näitame, et STAIR Captions'i abil koolitatud närvivõrk võib luua loomulikumaid ja paremaid jaapani pealdisi võrreldes inglise-jaapani masintõlke abil pärast inglise pealdiste genereerimist.", 'fi': 'Viime vuosina kuvakuvausten automaattinen generointi eli kuvatekstitys on herättänyt paljon huomiota. Tässä artikkelissa harkitsemme erityisesti japanilaisten tekstitysten luomista kuville. Koska suurin osa saatavilla olevista tekstitystiedostoista on rakennettu englanniksi, japanin aineistoja on vain vähän. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi rakennamme MS-COCOn kuviin perustuvan suuren japanilaisen kuvatekstitystiedoston, jota kutsutaan STAIR Captions -kuvaksi. STAIR Captions sisältää 820 310 japanilaista tekstitystä 164 062 kuvalle. Kokeessa osoitamme, että STAIR Captions -tekniikalla koulutettu neuroverkko voi tuottaa luonnollisempia ja parempia japanilaisia tekstityksiä verrattuna englanti-japani konekäännöksen avulla luotuihin tekstityksiin englanninkielisen tekstityksen jälkeen.', 'az': 'Son illərdə, şəkillərin (başlıqların) avtomatik nəsili, o cür şəkillərin başlığı, çox dikkat çekmişdir. Bu kağızda, özlərinə də nümunələr üçün Japon başlıqlarını yaratmağı düşünürük. İngilizə dili üçün ən çox məlumat veri qurğuları inşa edildikdən sonra, Japon üçün az veri qurğuları var. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, MS-COCO suratlarından qurulmuş böyük ölçülü Japon surat başlığı verilər quruluruq. Buna STAIR Kapıları deyilir. STAIR Kapitələri 164,062 surat üçün 820,310 Japon başlıqlarından olub. Bu təcrübədə, STAIR Captions vasitəsilə təcrübə edilmiş bir nöral a ğ İngilizə başlıqlarını yaratdıqdan sonra İngilizə-Japon maşına çevirənlərlə qarşılaşdırılır.', 'jv': 'Tool Options, Layersdock Nanging papat iki, awak dhéwé sawaliké nggawe bijine surat kanggo ngilanggar surat Japang Sugeng dhéwé, akeh dataset sing dibunaké kanggo nggawe kanggo langgambar Inggris, durung ono dataset sing dibunaké kanggo japon. Ngawe kang nggawe perusahaan iki bot, kita sampek akeh langgar-scale Caption dataset Jepang STAIR Captions entuk bukane ng 8.3 atik Jepang kanggo didasai kanggo 1,06 2 gambar Nang ekjer-ingkang, kita sembarang kelas kuwi netwisan Neral sing isin gambar STAIR Captions iso nggawe kapan pribadhakan lan alaman sing luwih apik, nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo mulasai tanggal ingkang-japongan sing bisa nguasai tanggal kuwi tanggal ingkang.', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko, jama'ar taƙaita masu zane farat ɗaya (tsohon sunayen), wanda, taskiya zane, ya nuna zane, yã ƙori masu ƙaranci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙaddara masu iya samun sunayen Japane wa zane. Dõmin an ƙiƙira koɓa masu tsari na sunan sunan aiki da ke iya ƙayyade zuwa harshen Ingiriya, don haka da sau masu da tsari masu buƙata zuwa Japane. To, dõmin ka yi motsa ga wannan mataimaki, muna samun sunan zane na japane mai girma, bakin da aka samar da zane daga M-COCO, wanda ake kiran na SDAR. KCharselect unicode block name Daga jarrabin, Muna nũna cewa, wata tarayya na neural wanda aka yi wa shirin rubutu da na SAIR, yana iya ƙiƙiro wasu taskõki masu natsi da mafi kyaun japane, sammenliki da waɗand a aka haife su da fassarar harshen Ingiriya-japane daban da ya ƙãga tsarin Ingiriya.", 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות, דור אוטומטי של תיאורים של תמונות (כתיבות), כלומר, תיאור תמונות, נמשך הרבה תשומת לב. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו שוקלים במיוחד ליצור כותרים יפנים לתמונות. מאחר שרוב המערכות נתונים הנוכחים בנו לשפה אנגלית, יש מעט קבוצות נתונים ליפנית. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו בונים קבוצת נתונים של תואר תמונות יפניות בקנה מידה גדולה מבוססת על תמונות מ-MS-COCO, שנקראת "תואר" תואר. תורגם ע"י STAIR כולל 820,310 תורגם יפני עבור 164,062 תמונות. בניסיון, אנו מראים שרשת עצבית מאומנת בשימוש בכותבות STAIR יכולה ליצור כותרות יפניות טבעיות יותר טובות, בהשוואה לאלה שנgenerו בשימוש התרגום מכונת אנגלית-יפנית אחרי ליצור כותרות אנגלית.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je avtomatsko generiranje opisov slik (napisov), to je napisovanje slik, pritegnilo veliko pozornosti. V tem članku še posebej razmišljamo o ustvarjanju japonskih napisov za slike. Ker je bila večina razpoložljivih naborov podatkov o napisih zgrajenih za angleški jezik, obstaja malo naborov podatkov za japonščino. Za reševanje tega problema izdelamo obsežen japonski nabor podatkov o napisih slik, ki temelji na slikah iz MS-COCO, ki se imenuje STAIR Captions. STAIR Napisi sestavljajo 820.310 japonskih napisov za 164.062 slik. V eksperimentu smo pokazali, da lahko nevronsko omrežje, usposobljeno z uporabo STAIR Captions, ustvari bolj naravne in boljše japonske napise v primerjavi s tistimi, ki so ustvarjeni z angleško-japonskim strojnim prevajanjem po ustvarjanju angleških napisov.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོས་ཀྱི་རིང་ལ། རང་འགུལ་གྱི་བརྙན་རིས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འགོ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ཡིན། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བཟོ་བ་དང་། ཐོབ་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ནས་ཉེན་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀ To tackle this problem, we construct a large-scale Japanese image caption dataset based on images from MS-COCO, which is called STAIR Captions. STAIR པར་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་164,062 པར་རིས་820,310 སེམས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡོད། འུ་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་སྐྱེལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་རང་བཞིན་དང་སྒྲིག་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་འགྲིམས་བཤད་མང'}
{'en': 'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire : A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection', 'ar': '"كاذب ، سروال كاذب مشتعل": مجموعة بيانات معيارية جديدة لاكتشاف الأخبار الزائفة', 'fr': '«\xa0Liar, Liar Pants on Fire\xa0»\xa0: un nouveau jeu de données de référence pour la détection des fausses nouvelles', 'es': '«Liar, Liar Pants on Fire»: Un nuevo conjunto de datos de referencia para la detección de noticias falsas', 'pt': '“Liar, Liar Pants on Fire”: um novo conjunto de dados de referência para detecção de notícias falsas', 'ja': '「嘘つき、嘘つきズボンを燃やす」：フェイクニュース検出のための新しいベンチマークデータセット', 'zh': '"诳子,骗子裤着火了":假新闻检测的新基准数据集', 'hi': '"झूठा, आग पर झूठा पैंट": नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए एक नया बेंचमार्क डेटासेट', 'ru': '«Лжец, лжец в огне»: новый набор данных для обнаружения фейковых новостей', 'ga': '“Liar, Liar Pants on Fire”: Tacar Sonraí Tagarmharcála Nua le haghaidh Braite Nuachta Bréige', 'ka': "'ლყზვუ, ლყზვუ ოანრთ ოჲზალწრ': ნჲგა ბანქმაპკა ბანქმაპკა ჱა ტალქთგა ნჲგთნთ ჲრკპთგანვ", 'hu': '"Hazug, hazug nadrág tűz": Új referenciaadatkészlet a hamis hírek felismeréséhez', 'lt': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection", 'it': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': un nuovo set di dati di riferimento per la rilevazione di notizie false", 'el': '"Ψεύτης, Ψεύτης Παντελόνια στη φωτιά": Ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς για την ανίχνευση πλαστών ειδήσεων', 'kk': "'Жалғасты, жалғасты панельдер жанында': Жаңа жаңа жаңалық анықтау деректер бағдарламасы", 'mk': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection", 'ms': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection", 'ml': "'നുണ പറയൂ, തീയില്\u200d നുണയുള്ള പാന്റ്സ്': ഫെയിക്ക് വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ", 'no': '« Lågt, lågspanel på brann »: En ny benchmarkdatabasen for falske informasjon', 'ro': "'Mincinos, pantaloni mincinoși pe foc': un nou set de date de referință pentru detectarea știrilor false", 'mn': '"Хуудчилгаа, худлаа худлаа гал дээр" гэсэн үг.', 'pl': '"Kłamca, kłamca spodnie w ogniu": Nowy zestaw danych odniesienia do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości', 'si': "'බොරු කියලා, බොරු පැන්ට්ස් අගින් ඉන්නවා' : අලුත් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සොයාගන්න", 'so': "'Beenaalayaal, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Detection of Fake News", 'sr': 'Lažljivci, lažljivci u vatri: Novi podaci za lažne novine.', 'mt': "'Minqar, Qliezet Minqar fin-Nirien': Sett ta' Data Ġdid ta' Benchmark għal Sejbien ta' A ħbarijiet Falsi", 'sv': '"Lögnare, lögnare byxor i brand": En ny benchmark datauppsättning för falska nyheter detektering', 'ta': "'பொய், நெருப்பில் பொய் பாண்ட்கள்': பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான புதிய பெங்க்மார்க் தகவல்", 'ur': 'جھوٹے، جھوٹے پانٹ آگ پر ہیں: ایک نئی بنچم مارک ڈیٹس جھوٹی خبروں کی تلاش کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': "'Liar, Liar Pants on fire': A New Benchmark Database for Fake news trinh thám", 'bg': '"Лъжец, лъжец панталон в огън": нов набор от данни за сравнение за откриване на фалшиви новини', 'hr': "'Lažljivci, lažljivci u vatri': Novi bazni podaci za lažne vijesti", 'nl': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': Een nieuwe Benchmark Dataset voor nepnieuws detectie", 'ko': '"사기꾼, 사기꾼 바지에 불이 났다": 새로운 가짜 뉴스 검사 기준 데이터 세트', 'da': "'Løgner, løgnerbukser i brand': Et nyt benchmark datasæt til falske nyheder detektering", 'de': '"Lügner, Lügner Hosen im Feuer": Ein neuer Benchmark-Datensatz für Fake News Detection', 'id': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection", 'fa': '"دروغگو، تفنگ دروغگو در آتش": یک اطلاعات سنجیر جدید برای شناسایی اخبار دروغگو', 'sw': "'Udanganyiko, Pants on Fire': Taarifa mpya ya Benchma kwa ajili ya Kugundua Habari za Udanganyiko", 'sq': "'Gënjeshtar, pantallona gënjeshtare në zjarr': Një bazë të dhënash të reja për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme", 'am': "'ውሸት፣ ውሸት ባንጥሮች ላይ እሳት': አዲስ የውሸት ዜና መግለጫ ማውጣት", 'az': 'Yalan s칬yl톛yir, yalan칞캼 Pants on fire: Yalan s칬yl톛yir', 'tr': "'Yalançy, yalançy Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection", 'af': "'Laaier, Laaier Pante op Vuur': ' n Nuwe Benchmark Dataset vir Verfalse Nuusbeskrywing", 'ca': "'Menteus, pantalons mentirosos al foc': Un nou conjunt de dades de referència per la detecció de notícies falses", 'hy': '"Սուրբ, Սուրբ Պանտիկներ կրակի վրա": Նոր համեմատական տվյալներ կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար', 'bn': "'মিথ্যা, আগুনের মিথ্যা প্যান্ট': ফেক সংবাদ সনাক্তির জন্য একটি নতুন বাংমার্ক ডেটাসেট", 'et': '"Valetaja, valetaja püksid tules": uus võrdlusandmekogum võltsitud uudiste tuvastamiseks', 'fi': '"Liar, Liar Pants on Fire": Uusi vertailuaineisto väärennettyjen uutisten havaitsemiseen', 'bs': "'Lažljivci, lažljivci u vatri': Novi bazni podaci za lažne novine", 'cs': '"Lhář, lhář kalhoty v ohni": Nová referenční sada dat pro detekci falešných zpráv', 'jv': "'teka, lianr Pants on fire': A New Bench Datease for Fake New detection", 'ha': "'Yi'ar ƙarya, Liyar Pant on Firar': A New Hanyar Aiki", 'sk': '"Lažnivec, lažnivec hlač na ognju": nov nabor podatkov o primerjavi za odkrivanje lažnih novic', 'he': '"שקרן, מכנסיים שקרנים על אש": קבוצת נתונים חדשה לגלות חדשות מזויפות', 'bo': "'Liar, Liar Pants on Fire': A New Benchmark Dataset for Fake News Detection"}
{'en': 'Automatic fake news detection is a challenging problem in deception detection, and it has tremendous real-world political and social impacts. However, statistical approaches to combating fake news has been dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets. In this paper, we present LIAR : a new, publicly available dataset for fake news detection. We collected a decade-long, 12.8 K manually labeled short statements in various contexts from PolitiFact.com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case. This dataset can be used for fact-checking research as well. Notably, this new dataset is an order of magnitude larger than previously largest public fake news datasets of similar type. Empirically, we investigate automatic fake news detection based on surface-level linguistic patterns. We have designed a novel, hybrid convolutional neural network to integrate meta-data with text. We show that this hybrid approach can improve a text-only deep learning model.', 'ar': 'يعد الكشف التلقائي عن الأخبار المزيفة مشكلة صعبة في اكتشاف الخداع ، وله تأثيرات سياسية واجتماعية هائلة في العالم الحقيقي. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم تقييد الأساليب الإحصائية لمكافحة الأخبار المزيفة بشكل كبير بسبب الافتقار إلى مجموعات البيانات المعيارية المصنفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم LIAR: مجموعة بيانات جديدة ومتاحة للجمهور لاكتشاف الأخبار المزيفة. قمنا بتجميع بيانات قصيرة مدتها عقد من الزمن ، و 12.8 ألفًا تم تصنيفها يدويًا في سياقات مختلفة من PolitiFact.com ، والتي توفر تقرير تحليل مفصل وروابط إلى مستندات المصدر لكل حالة. يمكن استخدام مجموعة البيانات هذه للتحقق من صحة الأبحاث أيضًا. والجدير بالذكر أن مجموعة البيانات الجديدة هذه هي ترتيب من حيث الحجم أكبر من أكبر مجموعات بيانات أخبار مزيفة عامة من نفس النوع. تجريبيًا ، نحقق في الكشف التلقائي عن الأخبار المزيفة بناءً على الأنماط اللغوية السطحية. لقد صممنا شبكة عصبية تلافيفية هجينة جديدة لدمج البيانات الوصفية مع النص. نظهر أن هذا النهج الهجين يمكن أن يحسن نموذج التعلم العميق للنص فقط.', 'pt': 'A detecção automática de notícias falsas é um problema desafiador na detecção de fraudes e tem tremendos impactos políticos e sociais no mundo real. No entanto, as abordagens estatísticas para combater notícias falsas foram drasticamente limitadas pela falta de conjuntos de dados de referência rotulados. Neste artigo, apresentamos o LIAR: um novo conjunto de dados disponível publicamente para detecção de notícias falsas. Coletamos uma década de 12,8 mil declarações curtas rotuladas manualmente em vários contextos do PolitiFact.com, que fornece um relatório de análise detalhado e links para documentos de origem para cada caso. Esse conjunto de dados também pode ser usado para pesquisas de verificação de fatos. Notavelmente, esse novo conjunto de dados é uma ordem de magnitude maior do que os maiores conjuntos de dados públicos de notícias falsas de tipo semelhante. Empiricamente, investigamos a detecção automática de notícias falsas com base em padrões linguísticos de nível superficial. Projetamos uma nova rede neural convolucional híbrida para integrar metadados com texto. Mostramos que essa abordagem híbrida pode melhorar um modelo de aprendizado profundo somente de texto.', 'fr': "La détection automatique des fausses nouvelles est un problème difficile dans la détection des tromperies, et elle a d'énormes répercussions politiques et sociales dans le monde réel. Cependant, les approches statistiques de lutte contre les fausses informations ont été considérablement limitées par le manque de jeux de données de référence étiquetés. Dans cet article, nous présentons LIAR\xa0: un nouvel ensemble de données accessible au public pour la détection des fausses nouvelles. Nous avons recueilli sur Politifact.com un rapport d'analyse détaillé et des liens vers des documents sources pour chaque cas, sur une dizaine d'années et étiquetés manuellement dans divers contextes. Cet ensemble de données peut également être utilisé pour la recherche de vérification des faits. Notamment, ce nouvel ensemble de données est d'un ordre de grandeur plus important que les ensembles de données de fausses nouvelles publiques de type similaire auparavant les plus importants. De manière empirique, nous étudions la détection automatique des fausses nouvelles sur la base de modèles linguistiques au niveau de la surface. Nous avons conçu un nouveau réseau de neurones convolutifs hybride pour intégrer les méta-données au texte. Nous montrons que cette approche hybride peut améliorer un modèle d'apprentissage profond en mode texte uniquement.", 'es': 'La detección automática de noticias falsas es un problema desafiante en la detección de engaños y tiene enormes impactos políticos y sociales en el mundo real. Sin embargo, los enfoques estadísticos para combatir las noticias falsas se han visto drásticamente limitados por la falta de conjuntos de datos de referencia etiquetados. En este artículo, presentamos LIAR: un nuevo conjunto de datos disponible públicamente para la detección de noticias falsas. Recopilamos 12,8 mil declaraciones breves etiquetadas manualmente de una década de duración en varios contextos de Politifact.com, que proporcionan un informe de análisis detallado y enlaces a documentos fuente para cada caso. Este conjunto de datos también se puede utilizar para la investigación de verificación de datos. En particular, este nuevo conjunto de datos es un orden de magnitud mayor que los conjuntos de datos de noticias falsas públicas anteriormente más grandes de tipo similar. Empíricamente, investigamos la detección automática de noticias falsas en función de patrones lingüísticos superficiales. Hemos diseñado una novedosa red neuronal convolucional híbrida para integrar los metadatos con el texto. Demostramos que este enfoque híbrido puede mejorar un modelo de aprendizaje profundo solo de texto.', 'ja': '自動フェイクニュース検出は、欺瞞検出における困難な問題であり、現実世界の政治的および社会的影響が非常に大きい。 しかし、フェイクニュースに対抗するための統計的アプローチは、ラベル付けされたベンチマークデータセットの欠如によって劇的に制限されています。 この論文では、嘘つき：フェイクニュース検出のために公開されている新しいデータセットを紹介します。 PolitiFact.comから、10年間、12.8Kの手動でラベル付けされた短文をさまざまなコンテキストで収集しました。これは、詳細な分析レポートと各ケースのソースドキュメントへのリンクを提供します。 このデータセットは、ファクトチェック研究にも使用できます。 注目すべきことに、この新しいデータセットは、以前の最大の公的なフェイクニュースデータセットの類似のタイプよりも大きい桁数です。 実証的に、地表レベルの言語パターンに基づいて自動的にフェイクニュース検出を調査します。 私たちはメタデータとテキストを統合するための斬新なハイブリッド畳み込みニューラルネットワークを設計しました このハイブリッドアプローチは、テキストのみのディープラーニングモデルを改善できることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение фейковых новостей является сложной проблемой в обнаружении обмана, и это имеет огромные политические и социальные последствия в реальном мире. Однако статистические подходы к борьбе с фейковыми новостями были резко ограничены из-за отсутствия маркированных базовых наборов данных. В этой статье мы представляем LIAR: новый, общедоступный набор данных для обнаружения фейковых новостей. Мы собрали на PolitiFact.com 12.8K кратких заявлений, помеченных вручную в различных контекстах, которые содержат подробный аналитический отчет и ссылки на исходные документы для каждого случая. Этот набор данных также может использоваться для проверки фактов. Примечательно, что этот новый набор данных на порядок больше, чем ранее крупнейшие публичные поддельные наборы данных аналогичного типа. Эмпирически мы исследуем автоматическое обнаружение фейковых новостей на основе лингвистических моделей поверхностного уровня. Мы разработали новую гибридную сверточную нейронную сеть для интеграции метаданных с текстом. Мы показываем, что этот гибридный подход может улучшить только текстовую модель глубокого обучения.', 'zh': '自假新闻检者,欺检之一挑战性也,其于治世也大矣。 然以乏标数集,击假新闻之计极矣。 本文上LIAR:一新者,公假新闻检数集。 PolitiFact.com 收十年之12.8K手动表记短长,其详析告及每案之源文档链接。 该数集亦可于事实勘究。 值得注意者,此数集比最大者假新闻集大一数量级。 以经验之,究其言语模式者自假新闻检测。 设新混合卷积神经网络,以集元数。 我们明白,这种混合法可以改进纯文本深度学习模样。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित नकली समाचार का पता लगाना धोखे का पता लगाने में एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है, और इसमें जबरदस्त वास्तविक दुनिया के राजनीतिक और सामाजिक प्रभाव हैं। हालांकि, नकली समाचारों का मुकाबला करने के लिए सांख्यिकीय दृष्टिकोण नाटकीय रूप से लेबल किए गए बेंचमार्क डेटासेट की कमी से सीमित हो गए हैं। इस पेपर में, हम LIAR पेश करते हैं: नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए एक नया, सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट। हमने एक दशक लंबे, 12.8K को मैन्युअल रूप से PolitiFact.com से विभिन्न संदर्भों में छोटे बयानों को लेबल किया, जो प्रत्येक मामले के लिए विस्तृत विश्लेषण रिपोर्ट और स्रोत दस्तावेजों के लिंक प्रदान करता है। इस डेटासेट का उपयोग तथ्य-जांच अनुसंधान के लिए भी किया जा सकता है। विशेष रूप से, यह नया डेटासेट समान प्रकार के पहले के सबसे बड़े सार्वजनिक नकली समाचार डेटासेट की तुलना में बड़े परिमाण का एक आदेश है। अनुभवजन्य रूप से, हम सतह-स्तर के भाषाई पैटर्न के आधार पर स्वचालित नकली समाचार का पता लगाने की जांच करते हैं। हमने पाठ के साथ मेटा-डेटा को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक उपन्यास, हाइब्रिड कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क तैयार किया है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण एक पाठ-केवल गहरी सीखने के मॉडल में सुधार कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is fadhb dhúshlánach í brath uathoibríoch nuachta falsa maidir le meabhlaireacht a bhrath, agus bíonn tionchair pholaitiúla agus shóisialta an-mhóra aige ar an saol fíor. Mar sin féin, tá srian mór tagtha ar chur chuige staidrimh chun nuacht bhréige a chomhrac mar gheall ar an easpa tacar sonraí tagarmharcála lipéadaithe. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair LIAR: tacar sonraí nua atá ar fáil go poiblí chun nuacht bhréige a bhrath. Bhailíomar ráitis ghearra deich mbliana ar fad, 12.8K lipéadaithe de láimh i gcomhthéacsanna éagsúla ó PolitiFact.com, a sholáthraíonn tuarascáil mhionsonraithe anailíse agus naisc le doiciméid foinse do gach cás. Is féidir an tacar sonraí seo a úsáid le haghaidh taighde seiceála fíricí freisin. Go háirithe, is ord méide é an tacar sonraí nua seo ná na tacair sonraí poiblí bréige den chineál céanna is mó roimhe seo. Go heimpíreach, déanaimid imscrúdú ar bhrath uathoibríoch nuachta bréige bunaithe ar phatrúin teanga ar leibhéal an dromchla. Tá gréasán néarúil comhbheartaithe hibrideach nua deartha againn chun meiteashonraí a chomhtháthú le téacs. Léirímid gur féidir leis an gcur chuige hibrideach seo samhail foghlama domhain téacs-amháin a fheabhsú.', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური ტალქტური ინფორმაცია არის საშუალო პრობლემა, რომელიც განვიცნობაში, და ის აქვს ძალიან ნამდვილად მსოფლიო პოლიტიკური და სოციალური შედეგები მაგრამ, სტატისტიკური დახმარებები ტალქტიკური ნუზების გაბრძნობისთვის დირამატიკურად დავდგენა მარტიკურად მარტიკური მონაცემების არაა. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ LIAR-ს ახალი, ადამიანურად ხელმისაწყებელი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის მონაცემები. ჩვენ შევქმნით 10 წლის განმავლობაში, 12.8კელი პირდაპირად მინიშნული კრეტური გამოსახულებები პოლიტიფექტის განმავლობაში. com, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ანალიზილის შეტყობინება და კომპორტის დოკუმენტებით, ყოველ შემთხვევაში. ეს მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია შეიძლება გამოყენება ფაქტის შემოწმებისთვის. ამ ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია უფრო დიდი მეტია, ვიდრე მხოლოდ უფრო დიდი ადამიანური გახსნა მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია. იმპერიკურად, ჩვენ ავტომატურად ტალქტური ინფორმაციის განსახულებას ინფორმაციას ინფორმაციაში დავიწყებთ. ჩვენ პრომენტის, ჰიბრიტური კონგუროლური ნეიროლური ქსელის შექმნა ტექსტით მეტა-მონაცემების ინტერგურაცია. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ჰიბრიდის მიღება შეუძლია გაუკეთოთ ტექსტის მხოლოდ დიდი სწავლების მოდელი.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων είναι ένα προκλητικό πρόβλημα στην ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης και έχει τεράστιες πολιτικές και κοινωνικές επιπτώσεις στον πραγματικό κόσμο. Ωστόσο, οι στατιστικές προσεγγίσεις για την καταπολέμηση των ψεύτικων ειδήσεων έχουν περιοριστεί δραματικά από την έλλειψη επισημασμένων συνόλων δεδομένων αναφοράς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο, δημοσίως διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων για την ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Συλλέξαμε μια δεκαετία, 12.8Κ χειροκίνητα μαρκαρισμένες σύντομες δηλώσεις σε διάφορα πλαίσια από το PolitiFact. το οποίο παρέχει λεπτομερή έκθεση ανάλυσης και συνδέσμους προς έγγραφα πηγής για κάθε περίπτωση. Αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων μπορεί επίσης να χρησιμοποιηθεί για έρευνα ελέγχου γεγονότων. Ιδιαίτερα, αυτό το νέο σύνολο δεδομένων είναι μια σειρά μεγέθους μεγαλύτερο από τα παλαιότερα μεγαλύτερα δημόσια σύνολα ψεύτικων ειδήσεων παρόμοιου τύπου. Εμπειρικά, ερευνούμε την αυτόματη ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων βασισμένη σε γλωσσικά πρότυπα επιφανειακού επιπέδου. Σχεδιάσαμε ένα νέο υβριδικό νευρωνικό δίκτυο για να ενσωματώσουμε μετα-δεδομένα με κείμενο. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η υβριδική προσέγγιση μπορεί να βελτιώσει ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης μόνο με κείμενο.', 'it': 'Il rilevamento automatico delle fake news è un problema impegnativo nel rilevamento degli inganni e ha enormi impatti politici e sociali nel mondo reale. Tuttavia, gli approcci statistici alla lotta contro le fake news sono stati drasticamente limitati dalla mancanza di set di dati di riferimento etichettati. In questo articolo presentiamo LIAR: un nuovo set di dati pubblicamente disponibile per il rilevamento delle fake news. Abbiamo raccolto da PolitiFact una decina di anni, 12.8K brevi dichiarazioni etichettate manualmente in vari contesti. com, che fornisce report di analisi dettagliati e link ai documenti di origine per ogni caso. Questo set di dati può essere utilizzato anche per la ricerca di fatto-check. In particolare, questo nuovo set di dati è un ordine di grandezza maggiore rispetto ai più grandi set di dati di notizie false pubbliche di tipo simile. Empiricamente, investighiamo il rilevamento automatico delle fake news basato su modelli linguistici di superficie. Abbiamo progettato una nuova rete neurale convoluzionale ibrida per integrare i meta-dati con il testo. Dimostriamo che questo approccio ibrido può migliorare un modello di deep learning basato solo sul testo.', 'kk': 'Автоматты жаңалықтарды анықтау - жалғастыру табуының көп мәселесі. Бұл әлемдегі шын әлемдегі саяси және әлемдегі нәрселері бар. Бірақ, жалғыз жаңалықтарды қолданудың статистикалық жағдайлары жалғыз белгілер деректер жиындарының жоқ болмауы драматикалық шектелген. Бұл қағазда LIAR: жалғыз жаңа, жалғыз мәліметті анықтау үшін жаңа деректер жиынын таңдаймыз. Біз ондық жылдық ұзындық, 12,8K қолмен PolitiFact-ден кейбір жағдайда қысқа сөйлемелерді жазып алдық. com, әрбір үшін көздегі құжаттардың тегжейі анализ хабарламасын және сілтемелерін көрсетеді. Бұл деректер жиыны тексеру үшін де қолданылады. Бұл жаңа деректер жиыны ұқсас түрлерінің ең үлкен жалғыз жаңалық деректер жиындарынан ең үлкен реті. Империялық түрде біз автоматты жаңалықтарды анықтау тілдік үлгілеріне негізделген. Метадеректерді мәтінмен біріктіру үшін романдық, гибридтік гибридтік невралдық желі құрылдық. Бұл гибридтік тәртібі тек түсінікті оқыту үлгісін жақсартуға болады.', 'lt': 'Automatinis suklastotų naujienų aptikimas yra sunki apgaulės aptikimo problem a ir turi didžiulį realaus pasaulio politinį ir social in į poveikį. Tačiau statistiniai metodai kovojant su suklastotomis žiniomis buvo labai riboti dėl žymėtų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių trūkumo. Šiame dokumente pristatome LIAR: naują, viešai prieinamą suklastotų naujienų aptikimo duomenų rinkinį. Iš PolitiFact surinkėme dešimtmečio trukmę, 12,8K rankiniu būdu pažymėtus trumpus pareiškimus įvairiomis aplinkybėmis. com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case.  Šis duomenų rinkinys taip pat gali būti naudojamas faktų patikrinimui atlikti. Ypač šis naujas duomenų rinkinys yra didesnis už anksčiau didžiausius panašaus tipo viešuosius suklastotų naujienų duomenų rinkinius. Empiriškai, mes tiriame automatinį suklastotų naujienų aptikimą, pagrįstą paviršiaus lygio kalbiniais modeliais. Sukūrėme naują hibridinį konvoliucinį nervų tinklą, kad metaduomenys būtų integruojami į tekstą. Mes parodome, kad šis hibridinis požiūris gali pagerinti tik teksto gilaus mokymosi model į.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus hamis hírek felismerése kihívást jelent a megtévesztés felismerésében, és óriási valós politikai és társadalmi hatással van. A hamis hírek elleni küzdelem statisztikai megközelítéseit azonban drámaian korlátozta a címkézett referenciaadatok hiánya. Ebben a cikkben bemutatjuk a LIAR: egy új, nyilvánosan elérhető adatkészletet a hamis hírek felismerésére. Egy évtizedes, 12,8 ezer manuálisan feliratozott rövid állítást gyűjtöttünk össze a PolitiFact-től különböző kontextusokban. com, amely minden esetben részletes elemzési jelentést és hivatkozásokat biztosít a forrásdokumentumokhoz. Ez az adatkészlet használható tények ellenőrzésére is. Ez az új adatkészlet nagyságrendje nagyobb, mint korábban a legnagyobb hasonló típusú nyilvános hamis hírek adatkészletei. Empirikusan vizsgáljuk az automatikus hamis hírek felismerését felszíni nyelvi minták alapján. Egy új, hibrid konvolúciós neurális hálózatot terveztünk, amely integrálja a metaadatokat a szöveggel. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a hibrid megközelítés javíthatja a csak szöveges mélytanulási modellt.', 'mk': 'Автоматското детекција на лажни вести е предизвикувачки проблем во детекцијата на измами, и има огромни политички и социјални влијанија на реалниот свет. Сепак, статистичките пристапи кон борбата против лажните вести се драматично ограничени од недостатокот на обележани бази на податоци. Во овој весник, го претставуваме ЛИАР: нов, јавно достапен податок за детекција на лажни вести. Собиравме една деценија долга, 12,8K рачно означени кратки изјави во различни контексти од PolitiFact. ком, кој обезбедува детални анализи извештаи и врски со изворните документи за секој случај. Овој набор на податоци може да се користи и за истражување за проверка на факти. Посебно, овој нов податок е редот на големина поголем од претходно најголемите јавни лажни податоци на сличен тип. Импирски, ние истражуваме автоматска детекција на лажни вести базирана на лигвистички шеми на површина. Ние дизајниравме нова хибридна конволуционална нервна мрежа за интеграција на мета-податоци со текст. Ние покажуваме дека овој хибриден пристап може да го подобри моделот на длабоко учење само за текст.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan berita palsu automatik adalah masalah yang menantang dalam pengesan penipuan, dan ia mempunyai dampak politik dan sosial yang luar biasa. Namun, pendekatan statistik untuk melawan berita palsu telah dibatasi secara dramatis oleh kekurangan set data benchmark yang ditabel. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan LIAR: set data baru, yang tersedia secara awam untuk pengesan berita palsu. Kami mengumpulkan pernyataan pendek yang ditabel dengan tangan 12.8K dalam berbagai konteks dari PolitiFact. com, yang menyediakan laporan analisis terperinci dan pautan ke dokumen sumber untuk setiap kes. Set data ini boleh digunakan untuk penyelidikan pemeriksaan fakta juga. Nampaknya, set data baru ini adalah tertib ukuran yang lebih besar daripada set data palsu awam terbesar sebelumnya jenis yang sama. Empirikal, kita menyelidiki pengesan berita palsu automatik berdasarkan corak bahasa tahap permukaan. We have designed a novel, hybrid convolutional neural network to integrate meta-data with text.  Kita tunjukkan bahawa pendekatan hibrid ini boleh meningkatkan model belajar dalam teks sahaja.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta awtomatika tal-a ħbarijiet foloz hija problem a ta’ sfida fl-iskoperta tal-inganni, u għandha impatti politiċi u soċjali enormi fid-dinja reali. Madankollu, l-approċċi statistiċi għall-ġlieda kontra l-aħbarijiet foloz kienu limitati b’mod drammatiku minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji ttikkettati. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw LIAR: sett ta’ dejta ġdid u disponibbli għall-pubbliku għall-individwazzjoni ta’ a ħbarijiet foloz. Inġabru dikjarazzjonijiet qosra ttikkettati manwalment għal għaxar snin minn PolitiFact. com, li jipprovdi rapport ta’ analiżi dettaljat u rabtiet mad-dokumenti tas-sors għal kull każ. Dan is-sett ta’ dejta jista’ jintuża wkoll għar-riċerka ta’ verifika tal-fatti. Notably, this new dataset is an order of magnitude larger than previously largest public fake news datasets of similar type.  Empirically, we investigate automatic fake news detection based on surface-level linguistic patterns.  Iddisinjajna netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali ibridu ġdid biex jintegra l-metadejta mat-test. Aħna nuru li dan l-approċċ ibridu jista’ jtejjeb mudell ta’ tagħlim profond għat-test biss.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം വ്യാജവാര്\u200dത്ഥ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വഞ്ചനയുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു വിലപാട് പ്രശ്നമാണ്. അതില However, statistical approaches to combating fake news has been dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ലിയാര്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു: തെറ്റായ വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d പുതിയ, പ്ര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പത്തൊരു കാലമായി ശേഖരിച്ചു, 12.8K കൈയ്യില്\u200d നിന്നും പോലിസ്റ്റ് ഫാക്റ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രഖ ഓരോ കേസിനും വിശദീകരിച്ച വിശദീകരണവും റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടും ലിങ്കുകളും നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും സത്യത്തില്\u200d പരിശോധന പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാം. ഈ പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് മുമ്പുള്ള പൊതുവായ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ തരത്തെക്കാള്\u200d വലുതായി വലുതാക്കുന്ന ഒരു ക്രമീകരണം. സാമ്രാജ്യത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം തെറ്റായ വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d, ഹൈബ്രിഡിന്റെ സാധാരണ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ ഹൈബ്രിഡിന്റെ നടപടി ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മാത്രം ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠ', 'mn': 'Автоматтын хуурамч мэдээг олох нь хуурамч байдлын шийдвэрлэлд хэцүү асуудал юм. Энэ нь үнэхээр бодит ертөнцийн улс төрийн, нийгмийн нөлөөтэй. Гэвч хуурамч мэдээллийн эсрэг зохицох статистикийн арга баримтууд тэмдэглэгдсэн банк өгөгдлийн сангийн байдлаар маш их хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид LIAR-г хуурамч мэдээллийг олох шинэ, олон нийтэд ашиглах өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид 10 жилийн хугацааны 12.8K-г PolitiFact-ын олон нөхцөлд богино хэлэлцүүлэгүүд гараар цуглуулсан. тохиолдол бүрийн эх баримтын холбоотой талаарх шинжилгээний мэдээлэл болон холбоотой. Энэ өгөгдлийн санг үнэндээ шалгах судалгаанд ч мөн ашиглаж болно. Үнэндээ энэ шинэ өгөгдлийн сангууд өмнө нь ижил төрлийн хуурамч мэдээлэл өгөгдлийн сангуудаас илүү том байдаг. Үнэндээ бид гадаргуу хэмжээний хэлбэрийн загвар дээр автоматик хуурамч мэдээллийг судалж байна. Бид шинэ, гибрид сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг текст дээр мета-өгөгдлийг нэгтгэхэд зохион бүтээсэн. Бид энэ гибрид арга зам нь текст зөвхөн гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a știrilor false este o problemă provocatoare în detectarea înșelăciunii și are impacturi politice și sociale extraordinare în lumea reală. Cu toate acestea, abordările statistice de combatere a știrilor false au fost limitate dramatic de lipsa seturilor de date de referință etichetate. În această lucrare, prezentăm LIAR: un nou set de date disponibil public pentru detectarea știrilor false. Am colectat de la PolitiFact declarații scurte etichetate manual de 12,8 mii de decenii, în diferite contexte. com, care oferă raport detaliat de analiză și linkuri către documentele sursă pentru fiecare caz. Acest set de date poate fi folosit și pentru cercetarea de verificare a faptelor. De remarcat, acest nou set de date este un ordin de mărime mai mare decât cele mai mari seturi de date publice de știri false de tip similar. Empiric, investigăm detectarea automată a știrilor false bazată pe modele lingvistice la nivel de suprafață. Am proiectat o rețea neuronală inovatoare, hibridă convoluțională pentru a integra meta-date cu text. Noi arătăm că această abordare hibridă poate îmbunătăți un model de învățare profundă numai pentru text.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti je izazovni problem u otkrivanju prevare i ima ogromne političke i socijalne utjecaje na stvarni svijet. Međutim, statistički pristupi borbi protiv lažnih vijesti su dramatično ograničeni nedostatkom označenih baznih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo LIAR: novi, javno dostupni podaci za lažno otkrivanje vesti. Skupljali smo dugo decenije, 12,8K ručno označene kratke izjave u različitim kontekstima iz PolitiFakta. com, koja pruža detaljni izveštaj analize i veze sa izvornim dokumentima za svaki slučaj. Ova seta podataka se može koristiti i za istraživanje èinjenica. Ova nova seta podataka je naređenje veličine veće od prethodno najveće javne lažne vesti podataka sličnog tipa. U praksi, istražujemo automatsko lažno otkrivanje vesti na temelju jezičkih obrazaca na površini. Mi smo dizajnirali roman, hibridni konvolucionalni neuralni mreža da integrišemo metapodatke sa tekstom. Pokazujemo da ovaj hibridni pristup može poboljšati model samo dubokog učenja teksta.', 'no': 'Automatisk falske oppdaging av nyhetar er eit vanskeleg problem i oppdaging av deltakar, og det har enorme politiske og sosiale effektar i verden. Statistiske tilnærmingar til å kombinere falske nyhetar er imidlertid dramatisk begrenset av manglar på merkelige benchmarkdatasett. I denne papiret presenterer vi LIAR: eit nytt, offentlig tilgjengeleg dataset for falske informasjon. Vi samla ei tiåret lang, 12,8K manuelt merket kort uttrykk i ulike kontekstar frå PolitiFact. com, som tilbyr detaljert analyserrapport og lenkjer til kjeldedokument for kvar tilfelle. Denne datasettet kan også brukast for å sjekka forskning med faktum. Dette nye datasettet er likevel ein rekkjefølgje av storleiken større enn tidlegare største offentlege falske nyhetsdatabatabane i liknande typar. For tidspunkt, vi undersøker automatisk falske oppdaging av nyhetar basert på språk mønsteret på overflatenavå. Vi har laga eit roman, hybrid konvolusjonell neuralnettverk for å integrera meta data med tekst. Vi viser at denne hybridtilnærminga kan forbetra eit dypt læringsmodell for tekst.', 'so': 'Sida dhaqdhaqaaq ah in warka been ah la ogaado waa dhibaato adag oo ku saabsan khiyaanada, wuxuuna leeyahay saameyn badan oo siyaasadeed iyo bulshada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, meelaha statistical ah ee la dagaallama wararka been ayaa si aad u xaday baahida taariikhda qoraalka lagu qoray. Warqaddan waxaynu ku qornaa LIAR: taariikhda cusub oo hadhuudh ah oo loo helo si loo garto warbixinta been ah. Waxaan soo ururiyey toban sano oo dhaadheer, 12.8K oo dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo aan ku qornay qoraal gaaban oo kala duduwan khilaaf siyaasadeed ah. com, kaas oo ku qoran wargelinta baaritaanka iyo xiriirka dukumentiyada sourceed ee xaalad walba. Taasinimadan waxaa sidoo kale loo isticmaali karaa baaritaanka xaqiiqada ah. Si taxadar ah, sawiradan cusub waa nidaam aad u weyn ka horeysay macluumaadka warqada beenta ah ee dadweynaha ee hore u weyn. Waxaan si fiican u baaraandegaa macluumaad been ah oo ku saleysan noocyada luuqada afka dhulka. Waxaannu qornay shabakad, shabakad dabeecada ah oo ah hybrid si aan ugu wada qabsato macluumaadka meta-data. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkan hiwaayadu uu kordhin karo qaababka waxbarashada oo kaliya oo mool dheer.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie fałszywych wiadomości jest trudnym problemem w wykrywaniu oszustw i ma ogromne skutki polityczne i społeczne w świecie rzeczywistym. Jednakże podejście statystyczne do zwalczania fałszywych wiadomości zostało dramatycznie ograniczone przez brak oznaczonych zbiorów danych referencyjnych. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy LIAR: nowy, publicznie dostępny zestaw danych do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości. Zebraliśmy dekadę, 12.8K ręcznie oznaczonych krótkich wypowiedzi w różnych kontekstach z PolitiFact. com, który zawiera szczegółowy raport analizy i linki do dokumentów źródłowych dla każdego przypadku. Ten zestaw danych może być również wykorzystywany do badań sprawdzających fakty. Co szczególne, ten nowy zestaw danych jest rząd wielkości większy niż wcześniej największe publiczne fałszywe wiadomości tego typu. Empirycznie badamy automatyczne wykrywanie fałszywych wiadomości w oparciu o wzorce językowe na poziomie powierzchni. Zaprojektowaliśmy nową, hybrydową konwolucyjną sieć neuronową do integracji metadanych z tekstem. Pokazujemy, że takie hybrydowe podejście może ulepszyć model głębokiego uczenia się tylko tekstowego.', 'ta': 'தானாகவே பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பது மயக்க கண்டுபிடிப்பதில் ஒரு சவாலான பிரச்சனையாகும், அது உண்மையான உலக அரசியல் மற்ற ஆனால், பொய் செய்தி போராடுவதற்கு புள்ளிவிவரமான வழிகள் சிட்டையில் குறிப்பிட்ட பென்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்கள் குறைப் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் LIAR காண்பிக்கிறோம்: பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான புதிய, பொதுவான தகவல் அமை நாங்கள் ஒரு பத்தாண்டு நீண்ட, 12.8K கைமுறையாக கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தைகளை சேகரித்துள்ளோம் போட்ட @ info இந்த தகவல் அமைப்பு உண்மையை சரிபார்க்கும் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கும் பயன்படுத்தலாம். @ info: whatsthis வெற்றிகரமாக, நாம் தானாகவே பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம் மூலத்தின் மட்டத்தின் மொழிமாற நாங்கள் ஒரு புதையத்தை வடிவமைத்துள்ளோம், ஹைப்ரிட் முழுமையான புதிய பிணையத்தை உரையை ஒன்று சேர்க்க. நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த ஹைப்ரிட் செயல்பாடு ஒரு உரையை மட்டும் ஆழமான கற்றல் மாதிரியை மேம்படுத்', 'ur': 'اٹوٹوٹ گھڑی خبر شناسایی ایک مشکل ہے فریب شناسایی میں، اور اس میں بہت بڑی حقیقی دنیا کی سیاسی اور سوسیال اثرات ہے. However, statistical approaches to combat fake news are dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets. اس کاغذ میں ہم LIAR کو پیش کرتے ہیں: ایک نئی، ظاہر طور پر دسترسی ڈاٹ سٹ جو جھوٹی خبر شناسائی کے لئے ہے۔ ہم نے ایک دس سال کی طول، 12.8K کے ذریعے سیاسی فکت سے مختلف موقعیت میں چھوٹے مثالیں لگائے۔ کم، جو ہر کیس کے لئے سئورس دکھانے کے لئے تفصیل ریپورٹ اور لینک پیدا کرتا ہے. یہ ڈاٹ سٹ بھی حقیقت کی تحقیق کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے. یقیناً یہ نئی ڈاٹ سٹ ایک بڑی آرام ہے جو پہلے سے بہت بڑی عمومی جھوٹی خبر ڈاٹ سٹ ہے۔ ہم سطح سطح سطح سطح کی زبان شناسی پٹرنوں پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک روانی، ہیبراڈ کنویرول نیورال نیٹورک کی طراحی کی ہے تاکسٹ کے ساتھ مٹا-ڈیٹا اکٹرال کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ہیبریڈ طریقہ صرف ایک متن کی سیکھنے کی مدل کو بہتر کر سکتا ہے۔', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විහිළුවක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි විහිළුවක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒක ගොඩක් ඇත්ත ලෝක නමුත්, බොරු වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ කරන්න සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ලේබල් කරපු බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් නොහැ මේ පත්තරේ අපි LIAR එක පෙන්වන්නේ: අළුත්, ලොකු වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න දත්ත සෙට් එකක්. අපි දහස්සක් වෙලාවක්, 12.8K වලින් පොලිටිෆේක්ට් වලින් විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වලින් කොටු ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් ලේබ Name මේ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන්. අනිවාර්යෙන්ම, මේ අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් තමයි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වඩා ලොකු ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ. අපි පාළුවෙන් මෙටාඩාටා එක්ක එකතු කරන්න පුළුවන්, හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයෙක් සැකස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විදියට පැත්තක් විතරයි ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Automatisk detektering av falska nyheter är ett utmanande problem i bedrägeridetektering, och det har enorma verkliga politiska och sociala konsekvenser. De statistiska metoderna för att bekämpa falska nyheter har dock begränsats dramatiskt av bristen på märkta referensdatauppsättningar. I denna uppsats presenterar vi LIAR: en ny, allmänt tillgänglig datauppsättning för detektering av falska nyheter. Vi samlade in ett decennium långa, 12,8 K manuellt märkta korta uttalanden i olika sammanhang från PolitiFact. com, som tillhandahåller detaljerad analysrapport och länkar till källdokument för varje ärende. Denna dataset kan också användas för faktakontroll forskning. Framförallt är denna nya datauppsättning en storleksordning större än tidigare största offentliga fake news datauppsättningar av liknande typ. Empiriskt undersöker vi automatisk detektering av falska nyheter baserat på språkliga mönster på ytnivå. Vi har designat ett nytt, hybridkonvulutivt neuralt nätverk för att integrera metadata med text. Vi visar att denna hybridmetod kan förbättra en textbaserad djupinlärningsmodell.', 'uz': "Автоматича ёлғон хабарни аниқлаб чиқиш холи кўринишда қизиқчи маслаҳат, ва у ҳаётда ҳақиқий лойиҳа сиёсий ва мамлакат таъсирлари бор. Lekin, xato haqida xabar qilish uchun statistical usullar yordamida qo'llangan benchmark maʼlumotlar maʼlumotlari yoʻq. Bu hujjatda biz LIARni hozir qilamiz: falsk news aniqlash uchun yangi, barcha maʼlumot satri. Biz bir yil yil yil ichida 12.8K qo'lbola qo'llab qo'llangan davlatlarni qo'lbola'llab berdik. @ info @ info @ info: whatsthis Biz o'zimiz, surface- darajadagi lingvistik shakllari asosida avtomatik fake news aniqlashni aniqlamiz. Biz meta-maʼlumotlarni matn bilan birlashtirish uchun hech qanday neyrob tarmoqni yaratdik. Biz shu hybrid usulida faqat eng dyp o'rganish modelini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tự động phát hiện tin giả mạo là một vấn đề thách thức trong việc phát hiện lừa dối, và nó có tác động chính trị và xã hội lớn trong thế giới thực. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp thống kê để chống lại tin giả đã bị giới hạn đột ngột bởi sự thiếu các tập tin tiêu chuẩn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu: một bộ dữ liệu mới công khai để phát hiện tin giả. Chúng tôi đã thu thập thập thập kỷ dài, 12.8K đánh dấu các phát biểu ngắn trong các mặt khác nhau từ PolitiFact. C, cung cấp một báo cáo phân tích chi tiết và liên kết với các tài liệu nguồn cho mỗi vụ. Bộ dữ liệu này cũng có thể dùng cho việc kiểm tra thực tế. Đặc biệt, bộ dữ liệu mới này là một quy trình về độ lớn hơn những tập tin giả hàng loạt lớn trước đây có dạng tương tự. chúng ta điều tra tin giả tự động dựa trên các mô hình ngôn ngữ trên bề mặt. Chúng tôi đã thiết kế ra một mạng lưới thần kinh hỗn hợp mới để nhập các siêu dữ liệu bằng văn bản. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp lai hợp này có thể cải thiện mô hình học sâu chỉ văn bản.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на фалшиви новини е предизвикателен проблем при откриването на измами и има огромно политическо и социално въздействие в реалния свят. Статистическите подходи за борба с фалшивите новини обаче са драстично ограничени от липсата на обозначени базови данни. В тази статия представяме нов, публично достъпен набор от данни за откриване на фалшиви новини. Събрахме десетилетие, 12,8 хиляди ръчно обозначени кратки изявления в различни контексти от ПолитиФакт. Ком, който предоставя подробен анализ доклад и връзки към изходните документи за всеки случай. Този набор от данни може да се използва и за изследване на фактите. По-специално, този нов набор от данни е с порядък по-голям от най-големите досега публични набори от данни за фалшиви новини от подобен тип. Емпирично разследваме автоматично откриване на фалшиви новини въз основа на езикови модели на повърхностно ниво. Създадохме нова, хибридна конволюционна невронна мрежа за интегриране на метаданни с текст. Показваме, че този хибриден подход може да подобри само текстов модел на дълбоко обучение.', 'da': 'Automatisk fake news detektering er et udfordrende problem i bedrageri detektering, og det har enorme politiske og sociale konsekvenser i den virkelige verden. Statistikken til bekæmpelse af falske nyheder er imidlertid blevet dramatisk begrænset af manglen på mærkede benchmark-datasæt. I denne artikel præsenterer vi LIAR: et nyt, offentligt tilgængeligt datasæt til detektering af falske nyheder. Vi samlede et årti langt, 12,8 K manuelt mærkede korte udsagn i forskellige sammenhænge fra PolitiFact. com, som indeholder detaljerede analyserapporter og links til kildedokumenter for hver enkelt sag. Dette datasæt kan også bruges til fact-checking forskning. Bemærk, at dette nye datasæt er en størrelsesorden større end tidligere største offentlige fake news datasæt af lignende type. Empirisk undersøger vi automatisk detektering af falske nyheder baseret på sproglige mønstre på overfladeniveau. Vi har designet et nyt, hybrid konvulutivt neuralt netværk til at integrere meta-data med tekst. Vi viser, at denne hybride tilgang kan forbedre en tekstbaseret deep learning model.', 'nl': 'Automatische detectie van nepnieuws is een uitdagend probleem bij het detecteren van misleidingen, en het heeft enorme politieke en sociale gevolgen in de echte wereld. Statistische benaderingen voor de bestrijding van nepnieuws zijn echter dramatisch beperkt door het ontbreken van gelabelde benchmarkdatasets. In dit artikel presenteren we LIAR: een nieuwe, publiekelijk beschikbare dataset voor fake news detectie. We verzamelden een decennium lang, 12.8K handmatig gelabelde korte statements in verschillende contexten van PolitiFact. com, die een gedetailleerd analyserapport en links naar brondocumenten voor elk geval biedt. Deze dataset kan ook worden gebruikt voor fact-checking onderzoek. Deze nieuwe dataset is een orde van grootte groter dan voorheen grootste publieke nepnieuws datasets van soortgelijk type. Empirisch onderzoeken we automatische fake news detectie op basis van taalpatronen op oppervlakteniveau. We hebben een nieuw, hybride convolutioneel neuraal netwerk ontworpen om metadata met tekst te integreren. We laten zien dat deze hybride aanpak een tekst-only deep learning model kan verbeteren.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti je izazovni problem u otkrivanju prevare i ima ogromne političke i društvene utjecaje na stvarno-svijetu. Međutim, statistički pristupi borbi protiv lažnih vijesti su dramatično ograničeni nedostatkom označenih kritičnih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo LIAR: novi, javno dostupni podaci za lažno otkrivanje vijesti. Skupili smo dugo desetljeće, 12,8K ručno označene kratke izjave u različitim kontekstima iz PolitiFact a. com, koja pruža detaljni izvještaj analize i povezanje s izvornim dokumentima za svaki slučaj. To se može koristiti i za istraživanje činjenica. Naravno, ovaj novi set podataka je naređenje veličine veće od prethodno najveće javne lažne datoteke slične vrste. Empirički istražujemo automatsko lažno otkrivanje vijesti na temelju jezičkih obrazaca na površini. Mi smo dizajnirali novu, hibridnu konvolucionalnu nervnu mrežu da integriramo metapodatke s tekstom. Pokazujemo da ovaj hibridni pristup može poboljšati samo duboki model učenja teksta.', 'de': 'Die automatische Erkennung von Fake News ist ein herausforderndes Problem bei der Betrugserkennung und hat enorme politische und soziale Auswirkungen in der realen Welt. Allerdings wurden statistische Ansätze zur Bekämpfung von Fake News durch das Fehlen von markierten Benchmark-Datensätzen dramatisch eingeschränkt. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir LIAR vor: einen neuen, öffentlich zugänglichen Datensatz zur Erkennung von Fake News. Wir haben zehn Jahre lang 12.8K manuell beschriftete Kurzmitteilungen in verschiedenen Kontexten von PolitiFact gesammelt. com, die detaillierte Analyseberichte und Links zu Quelldokumenten für jeden Fall bietet. Dieser Datensatz kann auch für die Faktenüberprüfung genutzt werden. Bemerkenswert ist, dass dieser neue Datensatz um eine Größenordnung größer ist als bisher größte öffentliche Fake News Datensätze ähnlicher Art. Empirisch untersuchen wir die automatische Fake News Erkennung basierend auf sprachlichen Mustern auf Oberflächenebene. Wir haben ein neuartiges, hybrides neuronales Faltungsnetzwerk entwickelt, um Metadaten mit Text zu integrieren. Wir zeigen, dass dieser hybride Ansatz ein textbasiertes Deep Learning Modell verbessern kann.', 'id': 'Deteksi berita palsu otomatis adalah masalah yang menantang dalam deteksi penipuan, dan memiliki dampak politik dan sosial yang luar biasa di dunia nyata. Namun, pendekatan statistik untuk melawan berita palsu telah secara dramatis terbatas oleh kekurangan dataset benchmark label. Dalam koran ini, kami mempersembahkan LIAR: sebuah set data baru, yang tersedia publik untuk deteksi berita palsu. We collected a decade-long, 12.8K manually labeled short statements in various contexts from PolitiFact. com, yang menyediakan laporan analisis terperinci dan link ke dokumen sumber untuk setiap kasus. Set data ini juga dapat digunakan untuk pemeriksaan fakta penelitian. Terutama, dataset baru ini adalah perintah ukuran yang lebih besar dari sebelumnya dataset palsu umum terbesar dari tipe yang sama. Empirically, we investigate automatic fake news detection based on surface-level linguistic patterns.  We have designed a novel, hybrid convolutional neural network to integrate meta-data with text.  We show that this hybrid approach can improve a text-only deep learning model.', 'ko': '허위 뉴스의 자동 검출은 사기 검출에서 도전적인 문제로 현실 세계의 정치와 사회에 큰 영향을 미친다.그러나 표기된 기준 데이터 집합이 부족해 가짜 뉴스에 타격을 주는 통계 방법은 큰 제한을 받았다.본고에서 우리는 사기꾼: 새로운, 공개된 허위 뉴스 검측 데이터 집합을 제시했다.우리는 Politi Fact에서 10년, 12.8K, 서로 다른 언어 환경에서 수동으로 표시된 간단한 성명을 수집했다.com, 상세한 분석 보고서와 모든 사례의 원본 파일 링크를 제공합니다.이 데이터 집합은 사실 조사 연구에도 쓰일 수 있다.주의해야 할 것은 이 새로운 데이터 집합은 이전에 같은 종류의 가장 큰 공개 가짜 뉴스 데이터 집합보다 수량급이 크다는 것이다.실증 측면에서 우리는 표층 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 허위 뉴스 자동 검측을 연구했다.우리는 원 데이터와 텍스트를 결합시키는 새로운 혼합 권적 신경 네트워크를 설계했다.우리는 이런 혼합 방법이 순수한 텍스트 심도 있는 학습 모델을 개선할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی اخبار دروغ خودکار یک مشکل سخت در کشف فریب است، و تاثیرات سیاسی و اجتماعی جهان واقعی بسیار بزرگ دارد. با این حال، روش\u200cهای آمار\u200cشناسی برای مبارزه با اخبار\u200cهای دروغ محدودیت از دست داده\u200cهای نوشته\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده به شدت محدودیت شده است. در این کاغذ، ما LIAR را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید و عمومی برای شناسایی اخبار دروغ. ما یک دهه مدت طول ۱۲.۸ کیلومتر را با دستگیری به عنوان گزارش کوتاه در موقعیت های مختلف از سیاسی حقیقت جمع کردیم. com، که گزارش تحلیل جزئیات و ارتباط به سند منبع برای هر پرونده پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. این مجموعه داده\u200cها برای تحقیقات حقیقت هم استفاده می\u200cشود. خصوصاً این مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید یک دستور بزرگتر از بزرگترین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای حقیقی عمومی از نوع مشابه است. در حقیقت، ما از طریق الگوهای زبان\u200cشناسی سطح تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما یک شبکه عصبی راهنمایی طراحی کرده ایم تا اطلاعات متا را با متن جمع کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این روش هایبرید می تواند یک مدل درس عمیق متن را بهتر کند.', 'sq': 'Automatic fake news detection is a challenging problem in deception detection, and it has tremendous real-world political and social impacts.  Megjithatë, qasjet statistike për luftën kundër lajmeve të rreme janë kufizuar dramatikisht nga mungesa e të dhënave të etiketuara të referencës. Në këtë letër, prezantojmë LIAR: një set të ri të dhënash publikisht të disponueshme për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme. Ne mbledhëm një dekadë të gjatë, 12.8K me etiketë manuale deklarata të shkurtra në kontekste të ndryshme nga PolitiFact. com, që ofron raport të hollësishëm analize dhe lidhje me dokumentet e burimit për çdo rast. This dataset can be used for fact-checking research as well.  Në mënyrë të veçantë, ky grup i ri i të dhënave është një rend me madhësi më të madhe se më parë të dhënat më të mëdha publike të lajmeve të rreme të llojit të ngjashëm. Empirically, we investigate automatic fake news detection based on surface-level linguistic patterns.  We have designed a novel, hybrid convolutional neural network to integrate meta-data with text.  Ne tregojmë se kjo qasje hibride mund të përmirësojë një model mësimi të thellë vetëm teksti.', 'tr': "Yalanyşyň otomatik ýalňyşlyk tapylygy aldatma kynçylykly meseledir we onuň ähmiýeti dünýäde syýasy we sosialy täsirleri bar. Ýöne, ýalňyş haberler bilen mücadele etmek üçin statistik golaýlary etitlenýän benchmark veri setirleriniň ýok bolmagynyň darajynda edildi. Bu kagyzda, biz LIAR'i: ýalňyş täze, publika meňzeş veri setirini ýalňyş täzelikler keşif etmek üçin alýarys On ýyldan bäri, 12.8K PolitiFact-dan soňky a ýratyny golaýlaşdyrdyk. com, her kişi üçin detaylı analiz raporuna ve kaynaklı senelere bağlantılar sağlar. Hat barlamak üçin bu maglumat setirini hem ullanabilir. Mümkin däl, bu täze datum setidi öňki täze adamlaryň ýakyn täze hillerden uly bir görkezilişi. Üst dereje dilinde daýanýan ýalňyş haberler tapylmasyny awtomatik barlamyz. Biz meta-data tekst bilen birleştirmek üçin bir roman, hybrid bilen boýunça näral şebekesi tasarladyk. Biz bu hybrid ýaryşynyň diňe ýöne derin öwrenmek nusgasyny gowurap biljekdigini görkeýäris.", 'af': "Outomatiese falske nuusbeskrywing is 'n pragtige probleem in verleiding, en dit het groot regte wêreld politieke en sosiale impakte. Maar statistiese toegangs om falske nuus te veg is dramatiese beperk deur die ontbreek van gemerkte benchmark datastelle. In hierdie papier, ons stel lyr voor 'n nuwe, publiek beskikbaar datastel vir falske nuusbeskrywing. Ons het 'n dekade lank, 12,8K manueel die kort uitdrukkings in verskillende kontekste van PolitiFact versamel. @ info: whatsthis Hierdie datastel kan ook gebruik word vir feit- kontroleering ondersoek. Notief, hierdie nuwe datastel is 'n volgorde van grootte grootter as voorheen grootste publieke falske nuus datastel van soortgelyke tipe. Empiriese, ons ondersoek outomatiese falske nuusbeskrywing gebaseer op oorspronklike vlak lingvisiese patrone. Ons het 'n roman, hibride konvolusionele neuralnetwerk ontwerp om meta data met teks te integreer. Ons wys dat hierdie hybridtoegang kan 'n slegs diep onderwerp model verbeter.", 'am': 'የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የሽንገላ ግጭት ነው፣ እናም የዓለም አካባቢ ፖለቲካ እና ማኅበራዊ ጉዳይ አላቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሐሰት ዜናዎችን ለመቀላቀል የstatistical approaches በጽሑፍ የbenchmark ዳታ ማተሚያ ጎደለበት በአጭር ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ In this paper, we present LIAR: a new, publicly available dataset for fake news detection.  አሥር ዓመታት ያህል፣ 12.8K የፖለቲካ ውይይት በተለየ ጥያቄዎች ላይ አቋራጭ ንግግር ሰብሰብን፡፡ com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case. This dataset can be used for fact-checking research as well.  ይህ አዲስ የዳታ setup ከዚህ በፊት ካለፉት ትልቁ የውሸት ዜና ዳታዎችን እንደዚህ ዓይነት ትልቅ ነው፡፡ በአፍሪካዊ ደረጃው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የሐሰት ዜና ግንኙነትን እናመርመራለን፡፡ መሀከል ዳታዎችን በጽሑፍ ለመጠቀም የኬብሪድ የናቡር መረብ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ ይህ የኬብሪድ ልግስና የጽሑፍ ብቻ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ምሳሌ እንዲሻል እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': "Avtomatik sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsi yalançılıq keşfetməsində çox çətin bir problemdir və bu həqiqət dünyanın siyasi və sosyal təsirlərinin böyük təsiri var. Lakin, sahte xəbərlər ilə müharibə etmək statistik yolları etiketli benchmark veri qurularının yoxduğu ilə dəyişdirilmişdir. Bu kağızda LIAR'u göstəririk: sahte xəbərlər keşfetmək üçün yeni, publicly mümkün verilən verilər qutusu. Biz on illərin uzunluğunu, 12.8K ilə PolitiFact-dən müxtəlif şəkildə qısa ifadələr etiketləndirdik. com, hər vaxt üçün detalı analiz raporu və mənbə dökümələrinə bağlantı verir. Bu veri qurğuları həmçinin həqiqəti təsdiqləmək üçün də istifadə edə bilər. Şübhəsiz ki, bu yeni verilən qurğu, əvvəlcədən daha böyük halkı sahte xəbər verilən qurğulardan daha böyükdür. Əmparatorlıq, biz səviyyə səviyyəsi dil modellərinə dayanan avtomatik sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsini incidirik. Biz məktubla meta-məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün roman, hibrid konvolucional nöral a ğ tasarladıq. Biz göstəririk ki, bu hibrid tərəfindən yalnız çətin öyrənmə modelini yaxşılaşdıra bilər.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মিথ্যা সংবাদ আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে প্রতারণার একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ সমস্যা, আর এটি বিশ্বের বাস্তবতায় রাজনৈতিক এবং সা তবে মিথ্যা সংবাদের বিরুদ্ধে যুদ্ধের পরিসংখ্যানের পরিসংখ্যানের ক্ষেত্রে সীমাবদ্ধতা সীমাবদ্ধ হয়েছে। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা লিআরকে উপস্থাপন করছি: মিথ্যা সংবাদ আবিষ্কারের জন্য একটি নতুন, প্রকাশিত তথ্য সেট। আমরা এক দশক দীর্ঘদিন ধরে সংগ্রহ করেছি, ১২.৮০০ হাত থেকে বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতায় সংক্ষিপ্ত বিবৃতি প্রকাশ করেছি। কম, যা প্রত্যেক কেসের জন্য উৎস নথিপত্রের সাথে বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ রিপোর্ট এবং লিঙ্ক দিয়েছে। এই ডাটাসেট বাস্তবতা পরীক্ষা গবেষণার জন্য ব্যবহার করা যাবে। এই নতুন ডাটাসেট পূর্ববর্তী জনগণের বৃহত্তম ভুয়া সংবাদ তথ্যের চেয়ে বড় একটি আদেশ। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার ভিত্তিক ভাষায় ভিত্তিক সংবাদ সনাক্ত করি স্বয়ংক্রিয় সংবাদ সনাক্ত করি। আমরা একটি উপন্যাস, হাইব্রিড সুপ্রতিষ্ঠিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক গঠন করেছি টেক্সট দিয়ে মেটা-ডাটা একত্রিত করতে। We show that this hybrid approach can improve a text-only deep learning model.', 'sw': 'Kugundua habari bandia ni tatizo la changamoto katika kutambua udanganyifu, na in a athari kubwa sana za kisiasa na kijamii duniani. However, statistical approaches to combating fake news has been dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets.  Katika karatasi hii, tunailetea LIAR: taarifa mpya za wazi zinazopatikana kwa ajili ya kutambua habari potofu. Tumekusanya tamko fupi kwa muda wa muongo mmoja, 12.8K kwa manufaa katika michango mbalimbali ya kisiasa. com, ambayo inatoa taarifa za uchambuzi na viungo vya nyaraka za vyanzo kwa kila kesi. Taasisi hii ya takwimu inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya utafiti wa ukweli pia. Hata hivyo, seti hii mpya ya taarifa ni amri kubwa zaidi ya taarifa za uongo za umma zilizopita zaidi ya vyombo vya habari vya uongo vya aina hiyo. Kwa ujumla, tunachunguza utambuzi wa habari bandia kwa kutumia mitindo ya lugha ya juu ya usoni. Tumeunda mtandao wa kisasa, huduma ya kikatili ya mahusiano kwa ajili ya kuunganisha taarifa za meta kwa ujumbe. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii ya ukarimu inaweza kuboresha mtindo wa kujifunza kwa ujumbe pekee wa kina.', 'ca': "Automatic fake news detection is a challenging problem in deception detection, and it has tremendous real-world political and social impacts.  No obstant això, els enfocaments estadístics de la lluita contra les notícies falses han estat dramàticament limitats per la falta de conjunts de dades etiquetats de referència. In this paper, we present LIAR: a new, publicly available dataset for fake news detection.  Vam recollir una dècada de durant, 12,8K declaracions curtes etiquetades manualment en diversos contextos de PolitiFact. com, que proporciona un informe d'anàlisi detallat i enllaços a documents de font per cada cas. Aquest conjunt de dades també pot ser utilitzat per a investigar els fets. Notablement, aquest nou conjunt de dades és un ordre de magnitud més gran que el més gran conjunt de dades públices falses de tipus similar. Empiricament, investigam la detecció automàtica de notícies falses basada en patrons lingüístics a nivell superficial. Hem dissenyat una nova xarxa neural convolucional híbrida per integrar metadades amb text. Mostrem que aquest enfocament híbrid pot millorar un model d'aprenentatge profund que només té text.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti je izazovni problem u otkrivanju prevare i ima ogromne političke i socijalne utjecaje na stvarno-svijetu. Međutim, statistički pristupi borbi protiv lažnih vijesti su dramatično ograničeni nedostatkom označenih kritičnih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo LIAR: novi, javno dostupni podaci za lažno otkrivanje vijesti. Skupili smo desetljećinu, 12,8K ručno označene kratke izjave u različitim kontekstima iz PolitiFact a. com, koja pruža detaljni izvještaj analize i veze s izvornim dokumentima za svaki slučaj. Ovo se može koristiti i za istraživanje činjenica. Ova nova seta podataka je naređenje veličine veće od prethodno najveće javne lažne vesti podataka slične vrste. Empirički istražujemo automatsko lažno otkrivanje vijesti na temelju jezičkih obrazaca na površini. Mi smo dizajnirali roman, hibridna konvolucionalna nervna mreža da integrišemo metapodatke sa tekstom. Pokazujemo da ovaj hibridni pristup može poboljšati samo duboki model učenja teksta.', 'et': 'Automaatne valeuudiste tuvastamine on pettuse tuvastamisel keeruline probleem ning sellel on tohutu poliitiline ja sotsiaalne mõju reaalses maailmas. Statistilisi lähenemisviise valeuudiste vastu võitlemiseks on aga märgistatud võrdlusandmekogumite puudumine märkimisväärselt piiranud. Käesolevas artiklis tutvustame valeuudiste tuvastamiseks uut avalikult kättesaadavat andmekogumit LIAR. Kogusime PolitiFactilt kümnendi pikkuse 12,8 000 käsitsi märgistatud lühikese avalduse erinevates kontekstides. com, mis sisaldab üksikasjalikku analüüsiaruannet ja lingid lähtedokumentidele iga juhtumi kohta. Seda andmekogumit saab kasutada ka faktide kontrollimiseks. Eelkõige on see uus andmekogum suurusjärgus suurem kui varem suurimad avalikud valeuudiste andmekogumid sarnast tüüpi. Empiiriliselt uurime automaatset valeuudiste tuvastamist pinnataseme keeleliste mustrite põhjal. Oleme loonud uudse hübriidse konvolutsioonivõrgu metaandmete integreerimiseks tekstiga. Näitame, et selline hübriidne lähenemisviis võib parandada ainult tekstipõhist sügavõppe mudelit.', 'fi': 'Automaattinen valeuutisten havaitseminen on haastava ongelma petoksen havaitsemisessa, ja sillä on valtavia todellisia poliittisia ja sosiaalisia vaikutuksia. Tilastollisia lähestymistapoja väärennettyjen uutisten torjumiseen on kuitenkin merkittävästi rajoittanut merkittyjen vertailuaineistojen puute. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme LIAR: uuden, julkisesti saatavilla olevan datajoukon fake news detection. Keräsimme PolitiFactilta vuosikymmenen mittaisen, 12,8 tuhatta manuaalisesti merkittyä lyhyttä lausuntoa eri yhteyksissä. com, joka tarjoaa yksityiskohtaisen analyysiraportin ja linkit lähdeasiakirjoihin kussakin tapauksessa. Tätä aineistoa voidaan käyttää myös faktojen tarkistamiseen. Erityisesti tämä uusi aineisto on suuruusluokka suurempi kuin aiemmin suurimmat samantyyppiset julkiset fake news -aineistot. Empiirisesti tutkimme automaattista fake news -tunnistusta pintatason kielikuvioihin perustuen. Olemme suunnitelleet uuden, konvolutionaalisen hybridiverkoston yhdistämään metatiedot tekstiin. Osoitamme, että tämä hybridi-lähestymistapa voi parantaa vain tekstiä sisältävää syväoppimismallia.', 'cs': 'Automatická detekce falešných zpráv je náročným problémem při detekci podvodů a má obrovské politické a sociální dopady v reálném světě. Statistické přístupy k boji proti falešným zprávám však byly dramaticky omezeny nedostatkem označených referenčních datových souborů. V tomto článku představujeme LIAR: nový, veřejně dostupný datový soubor pro detekci falešných zpráv. Z PolitiFactu jsme shromáždili desetiletí, 12.8K ručně označené krátké výroky v různých kontextech. com, který poskytuje podrobnou analýzu zprávy a odkazy na zdrojové dokumenty pro každý případ. Tento datový soubor lze použít i pro kontrolu faktů výzkumu. Tento nový datový soubor je o řád větší než dříve největší veřejné datové soubory falešných zpráv podobného typu. Empiricky zkoumáme automatickou detekci falešných zpráv založenou na jazykových vzorcích na povrchové úrovni. Navrhli jsme novou hybridní konvoluční neuronovou síť pro integraci metadat s textem. Ukazujeme, že tento hybridní přístup může zlepšit pouze textový model hlubokého učení.', 'hy': 'Automatic fake news detection is a challenging problem in deception detection, and it has tremendous real-world political and social impacts.  However, statistical approaches to combating fake news has been dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք «ԼիԱր»: Նոր, հանրային հասանելի տվյալներ կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար: We collected a decade-long, 12.8K manually labeled short statements in various contexts from PolitiFact. com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case.  This dataset can be used for fact-checking research as well.  Նույնիսկ, այս նոր տվյալների համակարգը մեծ է, քան նախկինում ամենամեծ հանրային կեղծ լրատվյալների համակարգը նման տեսակի: Empirically, we investigate automatic fake news detection based on surface-level linguistic patterns.  Մենք նախագծել ենք նոր, հիբրիդ կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի ինտեգրենք մետա-տվյալները տեքստի հետ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս հիբրիդ մոտեցումը կարող է բարելավել միայն տեքստի խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելը:', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sing otomatik perbudhakan kanggo kelas kuwi kesalahan kanggo nguasahan winih, lan iki dadi sing perbudhakan politik lan soko-sakjane sing apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang mapun iki, kita sadhaya LIAR: nganggo dataset sing gak dhéwé, nganggo perusahaan kanggo keksi wartané sing isiné. Awak dhéwé éntuk lawasèh, 12.8 K manuk tentang ngaturaken nggawe ngupakakno ditambah sing ngetik daftar winih. com, nggawe luwih akeh mbhasah bantuan lan nganggo dokumen kelompok kanggo saben kelas. dataset iki iso ngejaraké kanggo titik barêng-barêng. slot type Anyone Awak dhéwé wis digawe sing nyumbal, sedhaya, namungan seneng alat sing nyebutaké meta-data karo teks. Awak dhéwé ngerti dadi winih-winih iki iso nglanggar modèl kuwi nggambar textin.', 'he': 'גילוי חדשות מזויפות אוטומטי הוא בעיה מאתגרת בזיהוי הונאה, ויש לה השפעות פוליטיות וחברתיות עצומות בעולם האמיתי. עם זאת, גישות סטטיסטיות להילחם בחדשות מזויפות הוגבלו באופן דרמטי על ידי חוסר קבוצת נתונים רמזים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים LIAR: קבוצת נתונים חדשה, זמינה לציבור חדשות מזויפות. אספנו הצהרות קצרות במשך עשורים, 12.8 אלף דולר בידיים בתוך קשרים שונים מהPolitiFact. com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case.  קבוצת נתונים זו יכולה להשתמש גם במחקר בדיקת עובדות. במיוחד, קבוצת נתונים החדשה הזו היא סדר גודל גדול יותר מאשר קבוצת נתונים מזויפות הציבורית הגדולה בעבר של סוג דומה. באימפריה, אנו חוקרים גילוי חדשות מזויפות אוטומטי מבוסס על דפוסים שפתיים ברמה השטחית. עיצבנו רשת עצבית שינוי חדשה, היברידית כדי להשתלב במטה-נתונים עם טקסט. אנחנו מראים שהגישה היברידית הזו יכולה לשפר מודל למידה עמוקה רק לטקסט.', 'ha': "Kayyar gane na lãbãri na ƙarya, yana da wata mataimaki a cikin gareshi ɗin, kuma yana da matsayin masu girma masu cikin masu halin-duniya. Haƙĩƙa, statistical metodes to batar information ƙarya have been significantly barred by the managi data set of labled bonkimarkin. Ga wannan takardan nan, Munã halatar da LIR: wata sãbuwa da ake samu da bayani don gane na ƙarya. Suna samun bayani-daidai shekara, 12.8K da hannuwanmu na rubutu a cikin wasu muhimmada daga Siyasa. com, wanda ke ƙunsa da takardun kwanan kwanan takardun aiki da aka rarraba shi daki-daki. @ info A kiyaye, wannan tsarin danne-yanzu yana da wata umurni mai girma mafi girma daga zaman mafi girma ga jama'a maƙaryaci na ƙarya tsarin nau'in da ke daidaita. Ina amfani da shi, munã karatun gane na ƙarya farat ɗaya a kan misalin linguistic cikin bakin-daraja. Mun ƙayyade wani jerin da ya samu'a da Hybrid, don ka sami tsarin meta-data da littãfi. Tuna nũna cewa wannan hanyor hibiri yana iya ƙara wani misalin karatun na matsayi kawai.", 'sk': 'Samodejno odkrivanje lažnih novic je zahteven problem pri odkrivanju prevar in ima ogromne politične in družbene učinke v realnem svetu. Vendar pa je statistične pristope k boju proti lažnim novicam dramatično omejilo pomanjkanje označenih referenčnih naborov podatkov. V tem članku predstavljamo LIAR: nov javno dostopen nabor podatkov za odkrivanje lažnih novic. Iz PolitiFacta smo zbrali desetletje dolgo, 12,8 tisoč ročno označenih kratkih izjav v različnih kontekstih. com, ki zagotavlja podrobno analizno poročilo in povezave do izvornih dokumentov za vsak primer. Ta nabor podatkov se lahko uporablja tudi za preverjanje dejstev. Zlasti je ta novi nabor podatkov velikosti večji od prej največjih javnih naborov podatkov o lažnih novicah podobne vrste. Empirično raziskujemo samodejno odkrivanje lažnih novic na podlagi jezikovnih vzorcev na površini. Zasnovali smo novo, hibridno konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje za integracijo metapodatkov z besedilom. Pokazali smo, da lahko ta hibridni pristop izboljša model globokega učenja samo besedila.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ཞུ་བ་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏུང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག However, statistical approaches to combating fake news have been dramatically limited by the lack of labeled benchmark datasets. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་LIAR་ལ་སྟོན་པ། མི་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་རྟོགས་བཤེར ང་ཚོས་དུས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་གནད་དོན་བཅུ་ལྷག་རིང་དང་ ༡༢༨༨་ཡིན་ལག་གིས་རྗེས་ཐོག་ལས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་ com, which provides detailed analysis report and links to source documents for each case. སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ། དེར་བརྟེན། ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་བ་འདིས་སྔོན་གྱི་མི་མང་གི་ཡིན་པས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པའི་གོ་རིམ ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་གདོང་ཁུངས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡོད་པའི་བརྡ་རྟོགས་བཙལ་ཞིབ ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་དཔར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གིས་ འུ་ཅག་གིས་hybrid་ལམ་འདི་གྲོས་ཁྱེར་གྱི་མིག་ལམ་ལུགས་ལས་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'English Multiword Expression-aware Dependency Parsing Including Named Entities', 'pt': 'Análise de dependência com reconhecimento de expressão multipalavra em inglês, incluindo entidades nomeadas', 'es': 'Inglés Análisis de dependencias con reconocimiento de expresiones multipalabras, incluidas entidades con nombre', 'ar': 'تحليل التبعية متعدد الكلمات الإنجليزية بما في ذلك الكيانات المسماة', 'fr': "Analyse de dépendance basée sur l'expression multi-mots en anglais, y compris les entités nommées", 'zh': '英语多字表达式感知赖解析,备名实体', 'hi': 'अंग्रेज़ी मल्टीवर्ड अभिव्यक्ति-जागरूक निर्भरता पार्सिंग सहित नामित निकायों', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティを含む英語のマルチワード式認識依存関係解析', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ зависимостей, основанный на использовании нескольких слов, включая именованные сущности', 'ga': 'Béarla Ilfhoclach Parsáil Spleáchais Sonraithe lena n-áirítear Aonáin Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'ანგლისური მრავალური სიტყვის გამოსახულების შესაძლებლობა გადაწყენება სახელსახულებული ელემენტები', 'el': 'Ανάλυση εξάρτησης με γνώση πολλών λέξεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ονομάτων οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'Angol Többszós kifejezés-tudatos függőség-elemzés, beleértve a nevezett entitásokat', 'it': "Analisi della dipendenza basata sull'espressione multipla, comprese le entità nominate", 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінде бірнеше сөз өрнектері түсінікті Тәуелдік талдау', 'lt': 'Anglų kalba Daugiažodžiais išraiškais žinomas Dependency Parsing Including Named Entities', 'mk': 'Англиска разгледувачка на зависност свесна за експрес, вклучувајќи именувани ентитети', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Dependensi Berkata-Berbahasa Inggeris Termasuk Entiti Nama', 'mt': 'Ingliż Multiword Expression-aware Dependence Parsing Including Named Entities', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പലവാക്ക് എക്സ്പ്രഷന്\u200d - അറിയുന്ന ആശ്രയം പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний олон үг илэрхийллийг мэдэх хамааралтай байдал нэрлэгдсэн бүтэц', 'pl': 'Angielski Parsowanie zależności wielosłownych wyrażeń z uwzględnieniem nazwanych podmiotów', 'no': 'Engelsk fleire ord-uttrykk med avhengighet med tolking med namnet einingar', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței conștientă de expresii multiple, inclusiv entitățile denumite', 'sr': 'Engleski višeriječni izraz svestan zavisnost za razmatranje uključujući imenovane entitate', 'so': 'Ingiriis Multiword Expression-aware Dependence Parsing Including Named Entities', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය ගොඩක් වචනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය- අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sv': 'Engelska Expressionsmedveten beroendetolkning med flera ord inklusive namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'English Multiword Expression-aware Dependency Parsing Including Named Entities', 'ur': 'انگلیسی Multiword Expression-aware Dependency Parsing Including Named Entities', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Engelsk Udtryksbevidst afhængighedsfortolkning med flere ord inklusiv navngivne enheder', 'bg': 'Многословно анализиране на зависимостта, свързана с изразите, включително имена', 'nl': 'Engels Meerwoord expressie-bewust afhankelijkheidsparsing inclusief benoemde entiteiten', 'de': 'Englisch Mehrwortausdrucksbewusstes Dependency Parsing einschließlich benannter Entitäten', 'hr': 'Engleski višeriječni izraz znaju zavisnost za ocjenjivanje, uključujući imenovane subjekte', 'id': 'Bahasa Inggris Multiword Expression-aware Dependency Parsing Termasuk Entitas Nama', 'ko': '명명 실체를 포함하는 영어 다사 표현식 감지 의존 해석', 'fa': 'وابستگی با تعریف چند کلمه انگلیسی در مورد تولید نامیده\u200cها', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe köp söz fraým bilen Taýýarlanan Jamynlary Aýrylýan', 'sq': 'Shprehje e varësisë me shprehje të shumëfjalëshme angleze duke përfshirë njësitë e emëruara', 'am': 'እንግሊዝኛ', 'sw': 'Uhuru wa Kiingereza wa Tamko la kujieleza kwa ufahamu', 'af': 'Engels Veelwoord Uitdrukking- bewaarde Afhanklikheid Verwerking Including Named Entities', 'bs': 'Engleski višeriječni izraz znaju zavisnost za razmatranje, uključujući imenovane subjekte', 'bn': 'Name', 'hy': 'Անգլերեն բազմաբառ արտահայտություն գիտակցող կախվածություն վերլուծում, ներառելով անվանված հաստատություններ', 'ca': "Analització de dependencies conscient de l'expressió multiparaula anglesa incloent les entitats anomenades", 'cs': 'Parsování závislosti na víceslovném výrazu včetně pojmenovaných entit', 'fi': 'Englanti Monisanainen ilmaisutietoinen riippuvuuden analysointi, mukaan lukien nimetyt yhteisöt', 'et': 'Inglise keeles Mitmesõnalise avaldise teadlik sõltuvuse parsimine, sealhulgas nimetatud üksused', 'az': 'İngilizci çoxlu söz ifadəsi-bilik bağlılığı İsmim Entitələri də dahil edilir', 'jv': 'Perancis layang Multiword Expression', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev odvisnosti, ki se zaveda večbesednih izrazov, vključno z imenovanimi subjekti', 'he': 'מבחן תלויות מודע למילים רבות אנגלית, כולל יחידות בשמות', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མིང་བཏགས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Because syntactic structures and spans of multiword expressions (MWEs) are independently annotated in many English syntactic corpora, they are generally inconsistent with respect to one another, which is harmful to the implementation of an aggregate system. In this work, we construct a corpus that ensures consistency between dependency structures and MWEs, including named entities. Further, we explore models that predict both MWE-spans and an MWE-aware dependency structure. Experimental results show that our joint model using additional MWE-span features achieves an MWE recognition improvement of 1.35 points over a pipeline model.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لأن الهياكل النحوية وامتدادات التعبيرات متعددة الكلمات (MWEs) يتم شرحها بشكل مستقل في العديد من النصوص التركيبية النحوية الإنجليزية ، فإنها بشكل عام غير متسقة فيما يتعلق ببعضها البعض ، مما يضر بتنفيذ نظام مجمع. في هذا العمل ، نقوم ببناء مجموعة تضمن الاتساق بين هياكل التبعية و MWE ، بما في ذلك الكيانات المسماة. علاوة على ذلك ، نستكشف النماذج التي تتنبأ بكل من امتدادات MWE وبنية تبعية مدركة لـ MWE. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا المشترك الذي يستخدم ميزات MWE-span الإضافية يحقق تحسنًا في التعرف على MWE يبلغ 1.35 نقطة على نموذج خط الأنابيب.', 'fr': "Étant donné que les structures syntaxiques et les étendues d'expressions multimots (MWE) sont annotées indépendamment dans de nombreux corpus syntaxiques anglais, elles sont généralement incohérentes les unes par rapport aux autres, ce qui nuit à la mise en œuvre d'un système agrégé. Dans ce travail, nous construisons un corpus qui garantit la cohérence entre les structures de dépendance et les MWE, y compris les entités nommées. En outre, nous explorons des modèles qui prédisent à la fois les travées MWE et une structure de dépendance prenant en compte les MWE. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle de joint utilisant des caractéristiques supplémentaires de portée MWE permet d'obtenir une amélioration de la reconnaissance MWE de 1,35 point par rapport à un modèle de pipeline.", 'es': 'Debido a que las estructuras sintácticas y los intervalos de expresiones multipalabras (MWE) se anotan de forma independiente en muchos cuerpos sintácticos en inglés, generalmente son inconsistentes entre sí, lo que es perjudicial para la implementación de un sistema agregado. En este trabajo, construimos un corpus que asegura la coherencia entre las estructuras de dependencia y las MWE, incluidas las entidades nombradas. Además, exploramos modelos que predicen tanto los intervalos de MWE como una estructura de dependencia que tenga en cuenta las MWEs. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo conjunto que utiliza funciones adicionales de MWE-span logra una mejora en el reconocimiento de MWE de 1,35 puntos con respecto a un modelo de canalización.', 'pt': 'Como as estruturas sintáticas e extensões de expressões multipalavras (MWEs) são anotadas independentemente em muitos corpora sintáticos em inglês, elas geralmente são inconsistentes umas com as outras, o que é prejudicial à implementação de um sistema agregado. Neste trabalho, construímos um corpus que garante consistência entre estruturas de dependência e MWEs, incluindo entidades nomeadas. Além disso, exploramos modelos que preveem intervalos de MWE e uma estrutura de dependência com reconhecimento de MWE. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo conjunto usando recursos adicionais de extensão de MWE alcança uma melhoria de reconhecimento de MWE de 1,35 pontos em relação a um modelo de pipeline.', 'ja': '構文構造及び多言語表現のスパン（ ＭＷＥ ）は、多くの英語の構文体系において独立して注釈されているため、それらは互いに概して矛盾しており、これは集計システムの実装に有害である。この作業では、依存構造と名前付きエンティティを含むMWEの間の一貫性を保証するコーパスを構築します。さらに、MWEスパンとMWEを意識した依存構造の両方を予測するモデルを探索します。実験結果は、追加のMWEスパン機能を使用した当社のジョイントモデルが、パイプラインモデルよりも1.35ポイントのMWE認識改善を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '多词表达式(MWEs)之句法结跨度独立于英语句法语料库,故其常不相一,其害于合也。 于是构一语料库,以保构MWE(名实)之一致性。 又寻同时测 MWE 跨度与 MWE 感知结构。 实验结果表明,比于管道,以附MWE跨度之合而成1.35分之MWE。', 'hi': 'क्योंकि वाक्यात्मक संरचनाएं और मल्टीवर्ड एक्सप्रेशन (MWEs) के स्पैन स्वतंत्र रूप से कई अंग्रेजी वाक्यात्मक कॉर्पोरेट में एनोटेट किए जाते हैं, वे आम तौर पर एक दूसरे के संबंध में असंगत होते हैं, जो एक समग्र प्रणाली के कार्यान्वयन के लिए हानिकारक है। इस काम में, हम एक कॉर्पस का निर्माण करते हैं जो निर्भरता संरचनाओं और MWEs के बीच स्थिरता सुनिश्चित करता है, जिसमें नामित संस्थाएं भी शामिल हैं। इसके अलावा, हम उन मॉडलों का पता लगाते हैं जो एमडब्ल्यूई-स्पैन और एमडब्ल्यूई-जागरूक निर्भरता संरचना दोनों की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि अतिरिक्त MWE-span सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके हमारा संयुक्त मॉडल पाइपलाइन मॉडल पर 1.35 अंकों का MWE मान्यता सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Поскольку синтаксические структуры и интервалы многословных выражений (MWE) независимо аннотированы во многих английских синтаксических корпусах, они, как правило, несовместимы друг с другом, что вредно для реализации агрегированной системы. В этой работе мы строим корпус, который обеспечивает согласованность между структурами зависимостей и MWE, включая именованные сущности. Кроме того, мы исследуем модели, которые предсказывают как MWE-расширения, так и структуру зависимостей, основанную на MWE. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша совместная модель, использующая дополнительные функции MWE-диапазона, достигает улучшения распознавания MWE на 1,35 пункта по сравнению с моделью трубопровода.', 'ga': 'Toisc struchtúir chomhréireacha agus raonta na nathanna cainte ilfhocail (MWEanna) a anótáil go neamhspleách i go leor corpora comhréire Béarla, bíonn siad ar neamhréir lena chéile go hiondúil, rud a dhéanann dochar d’fheidhmiú córas comhiomlán. San obair seo, déanaimid corpas a chinntíonn comhsheasmhacht idir struchtúir spleáchais agus MWEanna, lena n-áirítear eintitis ainmnithe. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid iniúchadh ar shamhlacha a dhéanann réamh-mheastachán ar réisí MWE agus ar struchtúr spleáchais atá feasach ar MWE. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár gcomhshamhail a úsáideann gnéithe breise MWE-réise feabhas aitheantais MWE de 1.35 pointe thar shamhail píblíne.', 'hu': 'Mivel a szintaktikus struktúrák és a többszós kifejezések (MWE) tartományai függetlenül vannak jegyzetelve számos angol szintaktikus korpusban, általában következetlenek egymással szemben, ami káros egy aggregált rendszer bevezetésére. Ebben a munkában olyan korpuszt építünk fel, amely biztosítja a függőségi struktúrák és MWE-k közötti összhangot, beleértve a nevezett entitásokat is. Továbbá olyan modelleket vizsgálunk, amelyek előrejelzik az MWE-tartományokat és az MWE-tudatos függőségi struktúrát. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a további MWE-span funkciókat használó közös modellünk 1,35 pontos MWE felismerést ér el egy csővezeték modellhez képest.', 'el': 'Επειδή οι συντακτικές δομές και οι περιοχές των πολυλέξεων εκφράσεων (MWE) σχολιάζονται ανεξάρτητα σε πολλά αγγλικά συντακτικά σώματα, είναι γενικά ασυμβίβαστες μεταξύ τους, γεγονός που είναι επιβλαβείς για την εφαρμογή ενός συγκεντρωτικού συστήματος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, κατασκευάζουμε ένα σώμα που εξασφαλίζει συνέπεια μεταξύ δομών εξάρτησης και ΜΣΕ, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ονομαζόμενων οντοτήτων. Περαιτέρω, εξερευνούμε μοντέλα που προβλέπουν τόσο τις ζώνες όσο και μια δομή εξάρτησης που είναι ενήμερη για τις διαστάσεις. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το κοινό μας μοντέλο χρησιμοποιώντας πρόσθετα χαρακτηριστικά επιτυγχάνει μια βελτίωση αναγνώρισης 1.35 σημείων σε σχέση με ένα μοντέλο αγωγών.', 'ka': 'რადგან მრავალური გამოსახულებების სინტექტიკური სტრუქტურები და განსხვავებები (MWEs) მრავალურად ინგლისური სინტექტიკური კორპორაში აღმოჩენიან, ისინი ერთმანეთს განსხვავებულია, რომელიც ადგრატიკური სის ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ კორპუსს შევქმნით, რომელიც დარწმუნდება განსაკუთრებული სტრუქტურების და MWEs-ს შორის კონსტენსტურება, რომელიც სახელი ინტე დამატებით, ჩვენ მოდელების გამოვაკვირდებით, რომლებიც MWE-spans და MWE-aware დააკვირდებული სტრუქტურა. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელის გამოყენება დამატებული MWE-სპენტის ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობად 1,35 პუნტების შესაძლებლობას მოქმნა MWE-სპენტის მონა', 'lt': 'Kadangi daugelyje anglų sintaksinių korprų atskirai pažymėtos daugiakalbių išraiškų sintaksinės struktūros ir juostos, jos paprastai nesuderinamos viena su kita, o tai kenkia bendrai sistemai įgyvendinti. Šiame darbe sukuriame korpusą, kuris užtikrintų priklausomybės struktūrų ir MWEs, įskaitant pavadintus subjektus, nuoseklumą. Further, we explore models that predict both MWE-spans and an MWE-aware dependency structure.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų jungtinis modelis, naudojantis papildomas MWE intervalo charakteristikas, pagerina MWE pripažinimą 1,35 punkto, palyginti su vamzdyno modeliu.', 'it': "Poiché le strutture sintattiche e gli intervalli di espressioni multiword (MWE) sono annotati indipendentemente in molti corpora sintattici inglesi, sono generalmente incoerenti tra loro, il che è dannoso per l'implementazione di un sistema aggregato. In questo lavoro, costruiamo un corpus che assicura coerenza tra strutture di dipendenza e MWE, incluse entità nominate. Inoltre, esploriamo modelli che predicono sia gli intervalli MWE che una struttura di dipendenza MWE-aware. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello congiunto che utilizza funzionalità aggiuntive MWE-span raggiunge un miglioramento del riconoscimento MWE di 1,35 punti rispetto a un modello di pipeline.", 'kk': 'Себебі бірнеше сөздің синтактикалық құрылымдары мен бірнеше сөз өрнектері (MWEs) көп ағылшын синтактикалық корпорасында тәуелсіз белгіледі, олар әдетте бір-біріне қарсы емес, бұл бір-бірінің жүйесінің іске асыратына қа Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз тәуелсіздік құрылымдар мен MWEs арасындағы тәуелсіздік ортасын құрамыз. Келесіден біз MWE-спанс пен MWE-тең тәуелдік құрылғысын алдын алатын үлгілерді зерттейміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің жалпы моделіміздің қосымша MWE-спен мүмкіндіктерімізді қолдану үшін 1,35 нүктелерді қалай жетілдіру үшін MWE-ге жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Бидејќи синтактичките структури и растојанија на мултизборни изрази (MWEs) се независно анотирани во многу англиски синтактички корпора, тие генерално се несогласни во однос меѓусебно, што е штетно за спроведувањето на агрегетивен систем. Во оваа работа, конструираме корпус кој обезбедува конзистентност помеѓу структурите на зависност и МВЕ, вклучувајќи ги и именуваните ентитети. Покрај тоа, ние истражуваме модели кои предвидуваат меѓу MWE и меѓусебна структура на зависност. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот заеднички модел користејќи дополнителни карактеристики на МВЕ-спанзија постигнува подобрување на признавањето на МВЕ од 1,35 поени во однос на моделот на гасоводот.', 'ms': 'Kerana struktur sintaktik dan jangkauan ungkapan berbilang perkataan (MWEs) dicatat secara bebas dalam banyak korpra sintaktik Inggeris, mereka secara umum tidak konsisten dengan satu sama lain, yang merugikan implementasi sistem aggregat. Dalam kerja ini, kita membina sebuah korpus yang memastikan konsistensi antara struktur dependensi dan MWEs, termasuk entiti bernama. Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi model yang meramalkan kedua-dua jangkauan MWE dan struktur dependensi yang sedar-sedar MWE. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model bersama kami menggunakan ciri-ciri MWE-span tambahan mencapai peningkatan pengenalan MWE 1.35 mata atas model saluran paip.', 'ml': 'പലവാക്കുകളുടെ സംസാരത്തിന്റെയും സ്പാന്\u200dസുകളുടെയും സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സിന്റാക്റ്റിക് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി വ്യാപിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും എംവിഎസിന്\u200dറെയും ഇടയില്\u200d സ്ഥി അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. MWE-സ്പെയിന്\u200dസും എംഡബ്ലിക്ക് സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ്ഥാനമാണ്. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ യൂട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d MWE-സ്പാന്\u200d ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d മോഡ', 'mt': 'Minħabba li l-istrutturi sintetiċi u l-firxiet ta’ espressjonijiet b’ħafna kliem (MWEs) huma annotati b’mod indipendenti f’ħafna korpi sintetiċi Ingliżi, huma ġeneralment inkonsistenti fir-rigward ta’ xulxin, li huwa ta’ ħsara għall-implimentazzjoni ta’ sistema aggregata. F’dan ix-xogħol, nibnu korpus li jiżgura konsistenza bejn l-istrutturi tad-dipendenza u l-MWEs, inklużi entitajiet imsemmija. Barra minn hekk, nesploraw mudelli li jipprevedu kemm il-firxiet tal-MWE kif ukoll struttura ta’ dipendenza konxja mill-MWE. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell konġunt tagħna li juża karatteristiċi addizzjonali ta’ firxa MWE jikseb titjib fir-rikonoxximent ta’ MWE ta’ 1.35 punt fuq mudell ta’ pipeline.', 'mn': 'Учир нь олон үг илэрхийллийн синтактик бүтэц болон хэмжээний хэмжээсүүд (MWEs) Англи хэлний синтактик корпоратын хувьд тусгаарлагддаг учраас тэд ихэвчлэн хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хохиромжгүй байдаг. Энэ нь нийт Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хамааралтай бүтэц болон MWE-ын хоорондох хоорондох корпус бүтээж байна. Тэгээд бид MWE-spans болон MWE-ийн мэдэх хамааралтай бүтцийг тодорхойлдог загваруудыг судалж байна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний нийлбэр загвар нь нэмэлт MWE-н хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглан хоолойн загварын дээр 1.35 цэг дээр нэмэгдүүлж чадна.', 'no': 'Fordi syntaktiske strukturar og mellomrom av fleire ord-uttrykk (MWEs) er uavhengig oppmerkt i mange engelske syntaktiske korpora, er dei vanlegvis inkonsistent med hensyn til ein annan, som er skadelig for implementering av eit aggregate system. I denne arbeida konstruerer vi ein korpus som sikrer konsistens mellom avhengighetsstrukturer og MWEs, inkludert namnet på einingar. I tillegg utforskar vi modeller som foregår både MWE-spans og eit MWE-aware avhengighetsstruktur. Eksperimentale resultat viser at vår kople modell med tillegg av MWE-span-funksjonar gjer eit forbetring av MWE-gjenkjenning av 1,35 punkt over eit røyringsmodul.', 'pl': 'Ponieważ struktury składni i zakresy wyrażeń wielowłowych (MWE) są niezależnie adnotatowane w wielu angielskich korpusach składni, zazwyczaj są one niespójne względem siebie nawzajem, co jest szkodliwe dla implementacji systemu zagregowanego. W niniejszej pracy budujemy korpus zapewniający spójność pomiędzy strukturami zależności a MWE, w tym nazwanymi podmiotami. Ponadto badamy modele, które przewidują zarówno zakresy MWE, jak i strukturę zależności świadomej MWE. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz wspólny model wykorzystujący dodatkowe funkcje MWE-span osiąga poprawę rozpoznawania MWE o 1,35 punktów w porównaniu z modelem rurociągu.', 'ro': 'Deoarece structurile sintactice și intervalele de expresii multiword (MWE) sunt adnotate independent în multe corpuri sintactice engleze, ele sunt, în general, inconsecvente una față de cealaltă, ceea ce este dăunător implementării unui sistem agregat. În această lucrare, construim un corpus care asigură coerența între structurile de dependență și MWE, inclusiv entitățile denumite. Mai mult, explorăm modele care prezic atât intervalele MWE, cât și o structură de dependență conștientă de MWE. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru comun care utilizează caracteristici suplimentare MWE-span realizează o îmbunătățire a recunoașterii MWE de 1,35 puncte față de un model de conductă.', 'sr': 'Zato što su sintaktične strukture i spajanje višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) neovisno annotirane u mnogim engleskim sintaktičkim korporama, oni su općenito neskladni jedni prema drugima, što je štetno implementaciji aggregatnog sistema. U ovom poslu, izgradimo korpus koji osigurava konsekvenciju između struktura zavisnosti i MWE-a, uključujući imene entiteta. Nadalje, istražujemo modele koji predviđaju i MWE-spans i strukturu zavisnosti sa MWE-om. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš zajednički model koristeći dodatne funkcije MWE-span postiže poboljšanje prepoznavanja MWE-a od 1,35 bodova nad model naftne linije.', 'si': 'මොකද සංවිධානය සංවිධානය සහ විශේෂ සංවිධානය (MWE) ගොඩක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සංවිධානය සංවිධානයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවිධානයෙන් අනු මේ වැඩේ අපි කොර්පස් එකක් හදන්නේ, ඒ වගේම විශ්වාස ස්ථානය සහ MWE වලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්නේ. ඉතින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මොඩේල් එක්ක MWE-spans සහ MWE-දැනගත්ත අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ගැන. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය MWE-ස්පන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා මු', 'so': 'Sida darteed dhismaha isbitaalka ah iyo isboortiga hadal kala duduwan (MWEs) waxaa si xor ah looga xanuunsadaa shirkado badan oo afka Ingiriiska ah, sida caadiga ah waa mid ka mid ah kooxaha qaarkood, taasoo dhibaato ku leh in la sameeyo nidaamka aggregate. Shaqadan ayaannu dhisnaa qof, kaas oo hubsada isku xirnaanta dhismaha ku xiran iyo MWEs, kuwaas oo ku jira macluumaadyada la magacaabay. Taas waxaa kaloo baaraynaa modelal ah oo wax ka sii sheegaya dhaqdhaqaaqa MWE iyo dhismaha ay MWE taqaan ku xiran tahay. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaababka wadajirka ah oo lagu isticmaalayo qaabab dheeraad ah oo MWE-span ah uu helo hagaajinta Aqoonsashada MWE 1.35 points oo ka kordhaya modelka baabuurka.', 'sv': 'Eftersom syntaktiska strukturer och spännvidder av flerordsuttryk (MWE) är oberoende kommenterade i många engelska syntaktiska korpora, är de generellt inkonsekventa i förhållande till varandra, vilket är skadligt för implementeringen av ett aggregerat system. I detta arbete konstruerar vi en korpus som säkerställer samstämmighet mellan beroendestrukturer och MWE, inklusive namngivna entiteter. Vidare utforskar vi modeller som förutspår både MWE-spans och en MWE-medveten beroendestruktur. Experimentella resultat visar att vår gemensamma modell med ytterligare MWE-span-funktioner uppnår en MWE-igenkänningsförbättring på 1,35 punkter jämfört med en pipeline-modell.', 'ta': 'ஏனென்றால் பல வார்த்தை கூறுகளின் ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் ஸ்பேன்கள் (MWEs) பல ஆங்கிலத்தில் ஒத்திசைவு நிறுவனத்தில் தானாகவே குறிக்கப்படுகிறது, அவை பொது இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு குறியீட்டை உருவாக்கி சார்ந்த அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் MWEs க்கும் இடையே ஒத்திசையை உறுதிப்படுத் மேலும், நாம் மாதிரிகளை கண்டறிகிறோம் MWE-ஸ்பேன்ஸ் மற்றும் MWE-aware சார்ந்த அமைப்பு. முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது கூடுதலான MWE- ஸ்பேன் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி எங்கள் இணைய மாதிரி தெரியும் தெரியும் தெளிவாக்கு', 'ur': 'کیونکہ بہت سی انگلیسی سینٹکتیک ساختاریں اور بہت سی کلمات کی مثالیں (MWEs) اکثر انگلیسی سینٹکتیک شرکت میں آزاد ہوتے ہیں، یہ ایک دوسرے کے بارے میں مختلف ہیں، جو ایک جمع سیسٹم کی عملومات کے لئے نقصان ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک جسم بناتے ہیں جو نیکوکاری ساختاروں اور MWEs کے درمیان موجودگی کا ثابت رکھتا ہے، جس میں نامہ دار ساختاروں کے ساتھ۔ اور اس کے بعد ہم مدل کو اچھی طرح لگاتے ہیں جو MWE-spans اور MWE-aware dependency ساختار کو اچھی طرح لگاتے ہیں۔ Experimental results show that our joint model using additional MWE-span features achieve an MWE recognition improvement of 1.35 points over a pipeline model.', 'uz': "Because syntactic structures and spans of multiword expressions (MWEs) are independently annotated in many English syntactic corpora, they are generally inconsistent with respect to one another, which is harmful to the implementation of an aggregate system.  Bu ishda, biz tashkilotni yaratib, tashkilotlar va MWS dasturlari bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Ko'rib, biz MWE spans va MWE haqida ishlatadigan qo'llanmalarni ko'rganamiz. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, bizning birlashtirish modelimiz MWE-span imkoniyatlaridan foydalanishimiz mumkin, pipeline modelida 1.35 nuqta muvaffaqiyatli MWE tasdiqlash imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Vì cấu trúc cấu trúc cú pháp và chi tiết của các biểu thức đa từ (MWEs) được ghi chú độc lập tại nhiều Hạ sĩ cú pháp Anh Quốc, họ không phù hợp với nhau với nhau, gây hại đến hệ thống tổng hợp. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập thể đảm bảo sự đồng nhất giữa các cấu trúc phụ thuộc và MWEs, bao gồm những thực thể có tên. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu các mô hình dự đoán cả khoá MWE và một cấu trúc phụ thuộc có tiềm năng MWE. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng mô hình chung của chúng ta dùng các tính năng lắp ráp kiểu MWE đạt được sự cải thiện số 1.35 với một mô hình đường ống.', 'da': "Da syntaktiske strukturer og spænder af flerordsudtryk (MWE) er uafhængigt noteret i mange engelske syntaktiske korpora, er de generelt inkonsekvente i forhold til hinanden, hvilket er skadeligt for implementeringen af et aggregeret system. I dette arbejde konstruerer vi et korpus, der sikrer konsistens mellem afhængighedsstrukturer og MWE'er, herunder navngivne entiteter. Yderligere undersøger vi modeller, der forudsiger både MWE-spænder og en MWE-bevidst afhængighedsstruktur. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores fælles model ved hjælp af yderligere MWE-span funktioner opnår en MWE-genkendelse forbedring på 1,35 point i forhold til en rørledningsmodel.", 'nl': "Omdat syntactische structuren en overspanningen van multiword expressies (MWE's) onafhankelijk worden geannoteerd in veel Engelse syntactische corpora, zijn ze over het algemeen inconsistent ten opzichte van elkaar, wat schadelijk is voor de implementatie van een geaggregeerd systeem. In dit werk bouwen we een corpus dat zorgt voor consistentie tussen afhankelijkheidsstructuren en MWE's, inclusief benoemde entiteiten. Verder onderzoeken we modellen die zowel MWE-spans als een MWE-bewuste afhankelijkheidsstructuur voorspellen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons gezamenlijk model met behulp van extra MWE-span functies een MWE herkenningsverbetering bereikt van 1,35 punten ten opzichte van een pijpleidingmodel.", 'bg': 'Тъй като синтактичните структури и диапазоните на многословните изрази са самостоятелно анотирани в много английски синтактични корпуси, те обикновено са несъвместими помежду си, което е вредно за внедряването на агрегирана система. В тази работа конструираме корпус, който осигурява съгласуваност между структурите на зависимостта и МВС, включително наименованите субекти. Освен това изследваме модели, които предвиждат както обхвата на МВЕ, така и структурата на зависимостта, която познава МВЕ. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият съвместен модел, използващ допълнителни функции, постига подобрение на разпознаването на МВЕ с 1,35 точки спрямо модела на тръбопровода.', 'hr': 'Zato što su sintaktičke strukture i spajanje višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) neovisno annotirane u mnogim engleskim sintaktičkim tijelima, oni su općenito neskladni jedni prema drugima, što je štetno provedbi aggregatnog sustava. U ovom poslu, izgradimo korpus koji osigurava konsekvenciju između struktura zavisnosti i MWE-a, uključujući imene entiteta. Nadalje, istražujemo modele koji predviđaju i MWE-spans i strukturu ovisnosti s MWE-om. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš zajednički model koristeći dodatne karakteristike MWE-a postiže poboljšanje priznanja MWE-a od 1,35 bodova nad model cijevi.', 'de': 'Da syntaktische Strukturen und Spannungen von Mehrwortausdrücken (MWEs) in vielen englischen syntaktischen Korpora unabhängig annotiert werden, sind sie im Allgemeinen inkonsistent zueinander, was für die Implementierung eines Aggregatsystems schädlich ist. In dieser Arbeit konstruieren wir einen Korpus, der die Konsistenz zwischen Abhängigkeitsstrukturen und MWEs, einschließlich benannter Entitäten, gewährleistet. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir Modelle, die sowohl MWE-Spannen als auch eine MWE-bewusste Abhängigkeitsstruktur vorhersagen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser gemeinsames Modell mit zusätzlichen MWE-Spann-Features eine MWE-Erkennungsverbesserung von 1,35 Punkten gegenüber einem Rohrleitungsmodell erreicht.', 'id': 'Karena struktur sintaks dan jangkauan ekspresi multikata (MWEs) secara independen dicatat dalam banyak korpra sintaks Inggris, mereka umumnya tidak konsisten dengan satu sama lain, yang merugikan implementasi sistem agregat. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami membangun sebuah korpus yang memastikan konsistensi antara struktur dependensi dan MWEs, termasuk entitas bernama. Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi model yang memprediksikan jangkauan MWE dan struktur dependensi yang menyadari MWE. Experimental results show that our joint model using additional MWE-span features achieves an MWE recognition improvement of 1.35 points over a pipeline model.', 'fa': 'چون ساختارهای سنتاکتیک و فضایی از تعریف چندین کلمه (MWEs) در بسیاری از شرکتهای سنتاکتیک انگلیسی به خصوصی علامت زده می\u200cشوند، آنها عموماً با احترام یکدیگر مخالف می\u200cشوند، که به عملکرد یک سیستم جمع زیان می\u200cرسد. در این کار، ما یک جسد ساخته می\u200cکنیم که هماهنگی بین ساختارهای بستگی و MWEs، شامل ساختارهای نامیده می\u200cشود. بعلاوه، ما مدل\u200cها را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که هر دو ساختار بستگی MWE-spans و MWE-aware را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل مشترک ما با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای MWE به بهترین شناسایی MWE از 1.35 نقطه بر یک مدل لوله رسیده است.', 'tr': 'Çünki köp iňlis dilinde syntaktik düzümler we ýerleşmeler (MWEs) birnäçe iňlis dilini syntaktik korporaty bilen boýun gaýşartýarlar, birnäçe bir-birine degişli däldirler, bu bir toplam sistemanyň implementasiýasyna bir ýaramakdyr. Bu işde biz bir korpus düzəlýäris we olar MWE-leriň arasynda, adly zatlary dahil etmelidir. Mundan başga, MWE-spans we MWE-den tanyş baglanşyk strukturyny öňünden örän nusgalary keşfetýäris. Durmanyň netijesi biziň birleşik nusgamyz MWE-span üýtgewlerimizi ulanan MWE 1.35 punktlerniň pipeline modeliniň üstünde çykarmagy üçin ýeterleýär.', 'sw': 'Kwa sababu miundombinu ya ushirikiano na maeneo ya maneno mengi (MWEs) yanaudhibishwa kwa uhuru katika makampuni mengi ya ushirikiano wa Kiingereza, kwa ujumla hawana maana ya kuheshimiana, ambayo yanaathirika kutekeleza mfumo wa uchochezi. Katika kazi hii, tunajenga chombo kinachohakikisha umoja kati ya miundombinu ya kutegemea na MWEs, ikiwa ni pamoja na vyombo vinavyoitwa. Further, we explore models that predict both MWE-spans and an MWE-aware dependency structure.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu wa pamoja kwa kutumia vipengele vya ziada vya usafiri wa MWE hupata maboresho ya kutambua MWE kwenye pointi 1.35 juu ya mtindo wa pipesi.', 'sq': 'Sepse strukturat sintaktike dhe shtresat e shprehjeve shumëfjalëshe (MWEs) janë anotuar në mënyrë të pavarur në shumë korpra sintaktike angleze, ato janë përgjithësisht jo konsistente në lidhje me njëri-tjetrin, gjë që është e dëmshme për zbatimin e një sistemi agregat. Në këtë punë, ne ndërtojmë një korpus që siguron konsistencën midis strukturave të varësisë dhe MWEs, duke përfshirë njësitë e emëruara. Për më tepër, ne eksplorojmë modele që parashikojnë si fushat MWE-së dhe një strukturë varësie MWE-në-dijeni. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë i përbashkët duke përdorur elemente shtesë MWE-span arrin një përmirësim njohjeje MWE prej 1.35 pikë mbi një model tubacioni.', 'af': "Omdat sintaktieke strukture en spans van multiwoord uitdrukkings (MWEs) onafhanklik in baie Engelse sintaktieke korpora aangeteken word, is hulle algemeen ongelukkig met betrekking tot mekaar, wat is skadelik vir die implementering van 'n aggregate stelsel. In hierdie werk bou ons 'n korpus wat verskaf konsistensie tussen afhanklikheid strukture en MWE, insluitend genoem entiteite. Verder, ons ondersoek modele wat beide MWE-spans en 'n MWE-bewus afhanklikheid struktuur voorskou. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons joint model met addisionele MWE-span-funksies 'n MWE-herkening verbetering van 1.35 punte oor 'n pipeline model bereik word.", 'am': 'በብዙ እንግሊዝኛ ስናታዊ ኮርፖርት ውስጥ ብዙዎች የብዙዎች ቃላት እና ስፖርት (MWEs) በተቃራኒ አካባቢዎች ነፃነት በመቀላቀል፣ አብዛኛውም እርስ በርሳቸው ተቃውሞ አይገኙም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በተመሳሳይ ግንኙነት እና MWEs እና በተባለው አካባቢዎች መካከል ትክክል እንዲያረጋግጥ የኮርፕስ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር MWE-ስፋኖችን እና MWE-አውቃዊ የመደገፊያ ግንኙነት እና ምሳሌዎችን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የኅብረት ሞዴል በጨማሪ MWE-ስፓን ምርጫዎች የሚጠቀም የMWE ማስታወቂያውን 1.35 ነጥቦች በጥቅላዊ ሞዴል ላይ የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Քանի որ բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքները և տարածքները անկախ են նշում շատ անգլերենի սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքներում, նրանք ընդհանուր առմամբ անհամաձայն են միմյանց հետ, ինչը վնասավոր է համախմբված համակարգի իրականացման համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կառուցում ենք մի կորպուս, որը ապահովում է կախվածության կառուցվածքների և անկախվածության կառուցվածքների միջև, ներառյալ անվանված էակների: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մոդելներ, որոնք կանխատեսում են MWE-ի տարածքները և MWE-ի գիտակցած կախվածության կառուցվածքը: Experimental results show that our joint model using additional MWE-span features achieves an MWE recognition improvement of 1.35 points over a pipeline model.', 'az': 'Çünki sintaktik yapılar və çoxlu sözlər ifadəsi (MWEs) çoxlu İngilis sintaktik korporasında təkrarlanmışdır, onlar genellik bir-birinə qarşı müqayisədə deyillər, bu bir toplum sistemin istifadəsinə zərər verir. Bu işdə, bizlər adı verilən məsələlər də dahil olmaqla bağımlılıq quruları və MWE arasındakı bir korpus inşa edirik. Daha sonra, MWE-spans və MWE-dən bilinmiş bağımlılıq strukturlarını təmin edən modelləri keşfetirik. Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim birləşdirilmiş modellərimiz, MWE-dən artıq özellikləri ilə birləşdirilmiş bir boru modeli üzərində 1.35 nöqtələrin daha yaxşılığını görür.', 'bn': 'কারণ অনেক ইংরেজী সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কোর্পোরায় সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামো এবং মাল্টিশবার্তা প্রকাশের স্প্যান (এমডিউএসএস) স্বাধীনতায় বিরক্তিকর কাঠামো এবং স্প এই কাজে আমরা একটি কোর্পাস নির্মাণ করি যাতে নির্ভরশীল কাঠামো এবং এমডিউএসএর মধ্যে নির্ভর করা নিশ্চিত করে, যার মধ্যে নামের বস্ এছাড়াও, আমরা মডেল খুঁজে বের করি যা এমডিউই-স্প্যান এবং এমডিউই-এর সচেতন নির্ভর কাঠামো পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের যৌথ মডেল এমডিউই-স্প্যানের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে একটি পাইপেলাইন মডেলে ১.', 'ko': '많은 영어 문법 자료 라이브러리에서 여러 단어가 표현하는 문법 구조와 경계(MWE)는 독립적인 주석이기 때문에 그들 사이는 통상적으로 일치하지 않기 때문에 집합 시스템의 실현에 해롭다.이 작업에서 우리는 구조와 MWE(명명 실체 포함) 간의 일치성을 확보하기 위해 자료 라이브러리를 구축했다.또한 MWE의 경계와 MWE 감지 의존 구조를 예측하는 모델도 모색했습니다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 연합 모델은 추가적인 MWE 경계 특징을 사용하여 파이프 모델에 비해 MWE 식별이 1.35개 높아졌다.', 'ca': "Perquè les estructures sinàctiques i l'abast d'expressions multiparaules (MWEs) són anotats de manera independent en molts corpores sinàctics anglesos, generalment no són coherents entre elles, que és perjudicial per la implementació d'un sistema agregat. En aquest treball, construim un corpus que asseguri la consistencia entre les estructures de dependencia i les MWEs, incloent les entitats anomenades. També explorem models que predeixen tant l'espai MWE com una estructura de dependencia conscient de MWE. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model conjunt que utilitza característiques adicionals d'ampliació MWE aconsegueix una millora del reconeixement MWE de 1,35 punts sobre un model de pipeline.", 'cs': 'Protože syntaktické struktury a rozpětí víceslovných výrazů (MWE) jsou v mnoha anglických syntaktických korpusech nezávisle anotovány, jsou obecně nekonzistentní vzhledem k sobě navzájem, což je škodlivé pro implementaci agregátního systému. V této práci vytváříme korpus, který zajišťuje konzistenci mezi závislostními strukturami a MWE, včetně pojmenovaných entit. Dále zkoumáme modely, které předpovídají jak MWE-rozpětí, tak i MWE-vědomou závislostní strukturu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš spojový model s využitím dalších funkcí MWE-span dosahuje zlepšení rozpoznávání MWE o 1,35 body oproti modelu potrubí.', 'bs': 'Zato što su sintaktičke strukture i spajanje višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) neovisno annotirane u mnogim engleskim sintaktičkim korporama, oni su općenito neskladni jedni prema drugima, što je štetno provedbi aggregatnog sistema. U ovom poslu, izgradimo korpus koji osigurava konsekvenciju između struktura zavisnosti i MWE-a, uključujući imene entiteta. Nadalje, istražujemo modele koji predviđaju i MWE-spans i strukturu ovisnosti koje znaju MWE. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš zajednički model koristeći dodatne karakteristike MWE-a postiže poboljšanje priznanja MWE-a od 1,35 bodova nad modelom cijevi.', 'et': 'Kuna süntaktilised struktuurid ja mitmesõnaliste väljendite (MWE) ulatused on sõltumatult märgitud paljudes inglise süntaktilistes korpustes, on need üldiselt üksteisega vastuolus, mis kahjustab koondsüsteemi rakendamist. Selles töös ehitame korpuse, mis tagab sõltuvusstruktuuride ja MWE vahelise sidususe, sealhulgas nimetatud üksuste vahel. Lisaks uurime mudeleid, mis ennustavad nii MWE-ulatust kui ka MWE-teadlikku sõltuvusstruktuuri. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie ühismudel, mis kasutab täiendavaid MWE-ulatuse funktsioone, saavutab MWE tuvastamise paremuse 1,35 punkti võrra võrreldes torujuhtme mudeliga.', 'fi': 'Koska monikanavaisten ilmaisujen syntaktiset rakenteet ja aikarajat (MWE) on merkitty itsenäisesti monissa englanninkielisissä syntaktisissa korpusissa, ne ovat yleensä epäjohdonmukaisia toisiinsa nähden, mikä on haitallista aggregaattijärjestelmän toteuttamiselle. Tässä työssä rakennamme korpusen, joka varmistaa riippuvuusrakenteiden ja MWE:iden yhdenmukaisuuden, mukaan lukien nimetyt entiteetit. Lisäksi tutkimme malleja, jotka ennustavat sekä MWE-kattavuutta että MWE-tietoista riippuvuusrakennetta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että yhteismallimme, jossa käytetään muita MWE-span-ominaisuuksia, saavuttaa 1,35 pisteen MWE-tunnistuksen parannuksen putkimalliin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Soalé sampeyan akeh sing sampeyan karo pasar anyar tentang karo akeh-awak sing luwih (MTE) iki dadi supaya supaya karo akeh sinaksi sing nyeasahan, wong sing ngomong nik pakan karo perusahaan langgar, sing uwis metu nggawe sistem sing nggawe gerakan. Nang-uwong iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sak cara-cara sing wis dipun nguasakno karo perusahaan sampeyan karo Mba-cara sing nyelehake mrupuan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Peringatan sing paling nggambar kuwi nggawe joint model sing nyeleh nyeleh nyeleh nyeleho nggawe Mungkin ingkang 1.34 punt kanggo nyelehake sistem sing nyeleh', 'sk': 'Ker so sintaktične strukture in razponi večbesednih izrazov (MWE) neodvisno označene v mnogih angleških sintaktičnih korpusih, so na splošno neskladni med seboj, kar je škodljivo za implementacijo agregatnega sistema. V tem delu gradimo korpus, ki zagotavlja skladnost med strukturami odvisnosti in MWE, vključno z imenovanimi entitetami. Poleg tega raziskujemo modele, ki napovedujejo razpone MWE in strukturo odvisnosti, ki se zaveda MWE. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš skupni model z uporabo dodatnih funkcij MWE-razpona doseže izboljšanje prepoznavanja MWE za 1,35 točke v primerjavi z modelom cevovoda.', 'ha': "Because syntactic structures and spans of multiword expressions (MWEs) are independently annotated in many English syntactic corpora, they are generally inconsistent with respect to one another, which is harmful to the implementation of an aggregate system.  Daga wannan aikin, Muke samar da wata nau'i mai tsaro a tsakanin tsarin da ake dõgara da MWEs, kamar da aka sune abubuwa. Furan haka, munã karatun misãlai da ke yi bayani ga dukkan MWU-spani da bakin-MWU-da-sani. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa misalinmu na wadangan da ke amfani da wasu hanyõyin MWU-span na ƙara, ya sami gyaranta na MWU ya sami shiryoyin ayukan 1.35 points kan wata misali.", 'he': 'מכיוון שהמבנים הסינטקטיים והרחבות של ביטויים רבים במילים (MWEs) נכתבים באופן עצמאי בקופורה הסינטקטית האנגלית רבה, הם בדרך כלל לא מתאימים אחד עם השני, שזה מזיק להפעלת מערכת אגוגריטית. בעבודה הזו, אנו בונים קורפוס שמבטיח תועקבות בין מבנים תלויות לבין MWEs, כולל ישויות בשמות. חוץ מזה, אנו חוקרים דוגמנים שחזויים את שטח MWE ומבנה תלויות מודע למWE. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמודל המשותף שלנו בשימוש בתחומים MWE-span נוספים משיג שיפור זיהוי MWE של 1.35 נקודות מעל מודל צינורות.', 'bo': 'གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། དབུས་སྡུད་གཞུང་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཕྱི་རིང་ཚོགས་ནང་གི་སྣང་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། ལས་ཀར་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འབྲེལ་དང་། MWE-spans་དང་MWE-aware་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། Experimental results show that our joint model using additional MWE-span features achieve an MWE recognition improvement of 1.35 points over a pipeline model.'}
{'en': 'Improving Semantic Composition with Offset Inference', 'ar': 'تحسين التركيب الدلالي باستدلال الإزاحة', 'fr': "Améliorer la composition sémantique grâce à l'inférence de décalage", 'es': 'Mejora de la composición semántica con inferencia de desplazamiento', 'pt': 'Melhorando a composição semântica com inferência de deslocamento', 'ja': 'オフセット推論によるセマンティック構成の改善', 'zh': '以偏移推理改进语义合', 'hi': 'ऑफसेट अनुमान के साथ शब्दार्थ संरचना में सुधार', 'ru': 'Улучшение семантического состава с выводом о смещении', 'ga': 'Comhdhéanamh Séimeantach a Fheabhsú le Tátail Fhritháirimh', 'ka': 'სემონტიკური კომპოზიციაციის უფრო მეტირება', 'hu': 'A szemantikus összetétel javítása offset inferenciával', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της σημασματικής σύνθεσης με συμπέρασμα αντιστάθμισης', 'it': "Migliorare la composizione semantica con l'inferenza offset", 'lt': 'Semantinės sudėties gerinimas taikant kompensacijos normą', 'kk': 'Жылжыту қасиеттерімен семантикалық құрылғыны жақсарту', 'mk': 'Подобрување на семантичката композиција со инференција на отсечение', 'ml': 'ഓഫ്സെറ്റിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായം കൊണ്ട് സെമാന്റിക് കോപ്പോസിഷന്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menembangkan Komposisi Semantik dengan Inferensi Ofset', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-Kompożizzjoni Semantika bl-Inferenza tal-Offset', 'mn': 'Оффесст хамааралтай Semantic Composition сайжруулах', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea compoziției semantice cu inferența offset', 'no': 'Forbetra semiantisk samansetting med forskyving', 'pl': 'Poprawa składu semantycznego za pomocą wniosku offsetowego', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje semantičkog kompozicija sa povezanjem premještaja', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් සංවිධානය විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Improving Semantic Composition with Offset Inference', 'sv': 'Förbättra semantisk sammansättning med offset inferens', 'ta': 'Offset Inference உடன் செமான்டிக் கூட்டத்தை மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'اوفسٹ انفارنس کے ساتھ سیمنٹی کمپیوٹیون کو بہتر کر رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường sự kết hợp giữa kỳ với liên quan', 'bg': 'Подобряване на семантичната композиция с компенсация', 'da': 'Forbedring af semantisk sammensætning med offset inference', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje semantičke kompozicije s povećanjem premještaja', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de semantische samenstelling met Offset Inference', 'de': 'Verbesserung der semantischen Zusammensetzung mit Offset Inferenz', 'id': 'Menembangkan Komposisi Semantik dengan Inferensi Offset', 'ko': '편이 추리를 이용하여 의미 합성을 개선하다', 'fa': 'بهتر ترکیب ترکیب سیمانتیک با تفاوت افسرد', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Makasiliano ya Semantic with Offset Inference', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler bilen Semantik Ýygymy gowylaşdyr', 'af': 'Verbeter Semantiese Komposisie met Offset Inferensie', 'sq': 'Duke përmirësuar përbërjen Semantike me Inferencën e Offset', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'অফ-সেট ইনফেরেন্স দ্বারা সেম্যান্টিক কোম্পোসিশন উন্নতি', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje semantičke kompozicije s povezanjem premještaja', 'az': 'N칬qt톛si 칐l칞칲s칲', 'et': 'Semantilise koosseisu parandamine tasakaalu järeldustega', 'cs': 'Zlepšení sémantického složení s offsetovým závěrem', 'ca': 'millorar la composició Semàtica amb la infracció', 'fi': 'Semanttisen koostumuksen parantaminen offset-päättelyllä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje semantične sestave z ugotavljanjem zamikov', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'שיפור התערבות סמנטית עם פרסום', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Count-based distributional semantic models suffer from sparsity due to unobserved but plausible co-occurrences in any text collection. This problem is amplified for models like Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), that take the grammatical type of a co-occurrence into account. We therefore introduce a novel form of distributional inference that exploits the rich type structure in APTs and infers missing data by the same mechanism that is used for semantic composition.', 'ar': 'تعاني النماذج الدلالية التوزيعية القائمة على العد من التباين بسبب التكرارات المشتركة غير المرصودة ولكن المعقولة في أي مجموعة نصية. يتم تضخيم هذه المشكلة لنماذج مثل Anchored Packed Trees (APTs) ، التي تأخذ في الاعتبار النوع النحوي للتكرار المشترك. لذلك نقدم شكلاً جديدًا من الاستدلال التوزيعي الذي يستغل بنية النوع الغني في APTs ويستنتج البيانات المفقودة بنفس الآلية المستخدمة للتكوين الدلالي.', 'pt': 'Modelos semânticos de distribuição baseados em contagem sofrem de esparsidade devido a co-ocorrências não observadas, mas plausíveis em qualquer coleção de texto. Este problema é amplificado para modelos como Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), que levam em consideração o tipo gramatical de uma coocorrência. Portanto, introduzimos uma nova forma de inferência distributiva que explora a estrutura de tipos ricos em APTs e infere dados ausentes pelo mesmo mecanismo usado para composição semântica.', 'fr': "Les modèles sémantiques distributionnels basés sur les dénombrements souffrent de parcimonie en raison de cooccurrences non observées mais plausibles dans n'importe quelle collection de texte. Ce problème est amplifié pour les modèles tels que les arbres emballés ancrés (APT), qui prennent en compte le type grammatical d'une cooccurrence. Nous introduisons donc une nouvelle forme d'inférence distributionnelle qui exploite la structure de type riche dans les APT et déduit les données manquantes par le même mécanisme que celui utilisé pour la composition sémantique.", 'es': 'Los modelos semánticos distributivos basados en recuentos sufren de escasez debido a coocurrencias no observadas pero plausibles en cualquier colección de texto. Este problema se amplifica para modelos como Anchored Packed Trees (APT), que tienen en cuenta el tipo gramatical de una coocurrencia. Por lo tanto, introducimos una nueva forma de inferencia distribucional que explota la rica estructura de tipos en los APT e infiere los datos faltantes mediante el mismo mecanismo que se utiliza para la composición semántica.', 'ja': 'カウントベースの分布意味モデルは、任意のテキストコレクションで観察されていないが妥当な共起が起こるため、希少性に苦しむ。この問題は、文法的な種類の共起を考慮したアンカーパックされた木（ APT ）のようなモデルでは増幅されます。そこで、APTにおける豊富な型構造を利用し、意味構成に用いるのと同じメカニズムによって欠落データを推論する新規な分布推論の形式を導入した。', 'zh': '盖计数之分布语义模形于一切文本之中未见而理之共现疏也。 锚定树(APT)者,大之,共现之语法也。 是以引入一新,因APT之富,合语义之机,推阙失数。', 'hi': 'गिनती-आधारित वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल किसी भी पाठ संग्रह में अनपेक्षित लेकिन प्रशंसनीय सह-घटनाओं के कारण स्पर्सिटी से पीड़ित हैं। यह समस्या एंकर्ड पैक्ड ट्रीज़ (APTs) जैसे मॉडल के लिए प्रवर्धित है, जो सह-घटना के व्याकरणिक प्रकार को ध्यान में रखते हैं। इसलिए हम वितरण अनुमान का एक उपन्यास रूप पेश करते हैं जो एपीटी में समृद्ध प्रकार की संरचना का शोषण करता है और उसी तंत्र द्वारा लापता डेटा का अनुमान लगाता है जिसका उपयोग शब्दार्थ संरचना के लिए किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Семантические модели распределения, основанные на подсчете, страдают от редкости из-за ненаблюдаемых, но правдоподобных совмещений в любой текстовой коллекции. Эта проблема усиливается для таких моделей, как якорные упакованные деревья (APT), которые учитывают грамматический тип совместного возникновения. Поэтому мы вводим новую форму распределения, которая использует структуру богатых типов в APTs и выводит недостающие данные с помощью того же механизма, который используется для семантической композиции.', 'ga': 'Tá tearcúlacht ag baint le samhlacha dáilte shéimeantacha atá bunaithe ar chomhaireamh mar gheall ar chomhtharlúintí neamhbhraite ach sochreidte in aon bhailiúchán téacs. Méadaítear an fhadhb seo do mhúnlaí cosúil le Crainn Phacáilte Ancaire (APTanna), a chuireann cineál gramadaí comhtharlú san áireamh. Dá bhrí sin, tugaimid isteach foirm nua de thátal dáileacháin a bhaineann leas as an gcineál struchtúr saibhir in APTanna agus a thugann le tuiscint sonraí atá in easnamh tríd an meicníocht chéanna a úsáidtear le haghaidh comhdhéanamh séimeantach.', 'ka': 'ბოლო განსაზღვრებული სიმენტიკური მოდელები არ დააჩვენებული, მაგრამ ყველა ტექსტის კოლექციაში შეიძლება შეიძლება გადააჩვენებული ერთადერთი მოხდება. ეს პრობლემა იქნება მოდელებისთვის, როგორც ანფორიზებული პექტი (APT), რომლებიც ერთადერთი მოხდების გრამიკალური ტიპის შესახებ. ამიტომ ჩვენ შევაჩვენეთ პრომენტი განსაზღვრებული ინფრენციის ფორმა, რომელიც აფექცირებს ბედნიერი ტიპის სტრუქტურაციას APT-ში და შევცვალობთ მონაცემები იგივე მექანსისთ', 'hu': 'A számláláson alapuló eloszlási szemantikai modellek a szöveggyűjteményben nem észrevett, de valószínű együttes előfordulások miatt szenvednek ritkaságban. Ez a probléma erősítődik olyan modelleknél, mint a Anchored Packed Trees (APT), amelyek figyelembe veszik az együttes előfordulás nyelvtani típusát. Ezért bevezetjük a disztribúciós következtetés új formáját, amely kihasználja az APT-k gazdag típusú struktúráját, és ugyanazzal a mechanizmussal következteti le a hiányzó adatokat, mint a szemantikai összetétel.', 'el': 'Τα σημασιολογικά μοντέλα κατανομής που βασίζονται στον αριθμό υποφέρουν από έλλειψη λόγω μη παρατηρούμενων αλλά εύλογων συμπτωμάτων σε οποιαδήποτε συλλογή κειμένου. Αυτό το πρόβλημα ενισχύεται για μοντέλα όπως τα Anchored Packed Trees (APT), τα οποία λαμβάνουν υπόψη τον γραμματικό τύπο μιας συνύπαρξης. Ως εκ τούτου, εισάγουμε μια νέα μορφή κατανεμητικού συμπεράσματος που εκμεταλλεύεται τη δομή πλούσιου τύπου στα APT και συμπεραίνει ελλείποντα δεδομένα με τον ίδιο μηχανισμό που χρησιμοποιείται για τη σημασιολογική σύνθεση.', 'it': 'I modelli semantici distributivi basati sul conteggio soffrono di scarsità a causa di co-occorrenze non osservate ma plausibili in qualsiasi raccolta di testo. Questo problema è amplificato per modelli come Anchored Packed Trees (APT), che tengono conto del tipo grammaticale di una co-occorrenza. Introducemo quindi una nuova forma di inferenza distributiva che sfrutta la struttura ricca di tipo negli APT e deduce i dati mancanti dallo stesso meccanismo utilizzato per la composizione semantica.', 'kk': 'Сан негізінде таратылған семантикалық үлгілерді бақыламаған, бірақ кез-келген мәтін жинақтағы кездескен кездескен кездескендерге күтпейді. Бұл мәселе біріктіру үлгілері (АТТ) секілді Анкорды бұтақтар (АТТ) үлгілерінде күшейтілген, грамматикалық түрін есептеп береді. Сондықтан Біз APT баяны түрлі құрылымын жұмыс істейтін және керек деректерді семантикалық құрылымына қолданылатын механизм арқылы жаңа бөлімінің түрін келтіреміз.', 'lt': 'Skaičiais pagrįsti semantiniai platinimo modeliai kenčia nuo nedidelio skaičiaus dėl nepastebimų, bet tikėtinų pasikartojimų bet kuriame tekstų rinkinyje. This problem is amplified for models like Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), that take the grammatical type of a co-occurrence into account.  Todėl įvedame naują paskirstymo išvados form ą, kuri naudoja turtingą APT struktūrą ir daro išvadą, kad trūksta duomenų taikant tą patį mechanizmą, kuris naudojamas semantinei kompozicijai.', 'mk': 'Бројно базирани дистрибуционални семантични модели страдаат од реткост поради неопсервирани, но веројатни коопозиции во било која текстова колекција. Овој проблем е засилен за модели како Анкорените пакувани дрвја (APTs), кои го земаат во предвид граматичкиот тип на коопозиција. Затоа воведуваме нова форма на дистрибуционална инференција која ја експлоатира богатата структура во АПТ и ги инферира недостасувачките податоци со истиот механизам кој се користи за семантична композиција.', 'ms': 'Count-based distributional semantic models suffer from sparsity due to unobserved but plausible co-occurrences in any text collection.  Masalah ini ditambah untuk model seperti Pohon Paket Terikat (APTs), yang mengambil akaun jenis grammatik bagi sambungan. Oleh itu, kami memperkenalkan bentuk baru kesimpulan distribusi yang mengeksploitasi struktur jenis kaya dalam APT dan menyimpulkan data hilang oleh mekanisme yang sama yang digunakan untuk komposisi semantik.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli semantiċi tad-distribuzzjoni bbażati fuq l-għadd isofru mill-iskarsezza minħabba kookkorrenzi mhux osservati iżda plawżibbli fi kwalunkwe ġbir tat-testi. Din il-problem a hija amplifikata għal mudelli bħas-Siġar Pakkjat Ankorat (APTs), li jqisu t-tip grammatiku ta’ kookkorrenza. Għalhekk a ħna nintroduċu form a ġdida ta’ inferenza distributtiva li tisfrutta l-istruttura tat-tip rikk fl-APTs u tininferi dejta nieqsa bl-istess mekkaniżmu li jintuża għall-kompożizzjoni semantika.', 'mn': 'Тооны үндсэн хуваарилалтын semantic загварууд нь харагдаагүй, гэхдээ ямар ч текст цуглуулалтын тулд итгэлтэй холбоотой байдлыг шалтгаалдаг. Энэ асуудал нь анкорзид багцсан мод (APT) шиг загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлсэн бөгөөд үүнийг грамматик хэлбэрээр харуулдаг. Иймээс бид APT-д баян төрлийн бүтэц ашиглаж, semantic composition-д хэрэглэгддэг механизмаар алдагдсан мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлдэг тархины халдварын шинэ хэлбэрийг танилцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Talbaserte distribusjonsbaserte semantiske modeller køyrer frå sparsitet på grunn av ikkje observerte, men tilfelle i alle tekstsamlingane. Dette problemet er styrkert for modeller som ankorarte pakke tre (APT), som tar den grammatiske typen samtidige oppføringar i konto. Vi introduserer derfor eit nytt form av distribusjonsinfeksjon som eksploderer rikte type-strukturen i APT og inferer manglande data med det same mekanismen som vert brukt for semantisk samansetting.', 'ml': 'കണ്ടില്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d കണക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വിതരണ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്പെയിസിറ്റിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അനുഭവിക്കുന്നു. എന്ന ഈ പ്രശ്നം ആങ്കോര്\u200dഡ് പാക്ക് ചെയ്ത വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യാപ്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഗ്രാമാ അതുകൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d വിതരണ സംഭവം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഏപിഎസിലെ സമ്പന്നരായ രീതിയിലെ സ്ഥാനം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാ', 'pl': 'Dystrybucyjne modele semantyczne oparte na liczbach cierpią na słabość z powodu nieobserwowanych, ale wiarygodnych współwystępowań w dowolnej kolekcji tekstu. Problem ten jest wzmacniany dla modeli takich jak Anchored Packed Trees (APT), które biorą pod uwagę typ gramatyczny współwystępowania. Dlatego wprowadzamy nową formę wnioskowania dystrybucyjnego, która wykorzystuje strukturę bogatego typu w APT i wnioskuje brakujące dane za pomocą tego samego mechanizmu, który jest używany do kompozycji semantycznej.', 'ro': 'Modelele semantice distribuționale bazate pe număr suferă de slabicitate datorită coerențelor neobservate, dar plauzibile, în orice colecție de text. Această problemă este amplificată pentru modele precum Anchored Packed Trees (APT), care iau în considerare tipul gramatical al unei co-evenimente. Prin urmare, introducem o nouă formă de inferență distribuțională care exploatează structura bogată de tip din APT și deduce datele lipsă prin același mecanism care este folosit pentru compoziția semantică.', 'sr': 'Prema broju distribucijskih semantičkih modela pati od sparsiteta zbog neočuvanih ali uvjerljivih saradnjih događaja u bilo kojoj kolekciji teksta. Ovaj problem se pojačava za modele kao što su Ankorirani pakovani drveći (APT), koji uzimaju u obzir gramatički tip saradnje. Stoga predstavljamo novi oblik distribucije infekcije koja iskorištava bogatu strukturu tipa u APT-u i infecira nestale podatke istim mehanizam koji se koristi za semantički sastav.', 'si': 'ගණන් අධාරිත විතරය සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් පරික්ෂා වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නැහැ නමුත් විශ්වාස කරන්න මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ඇන්කෝර්ඩ් පැක්ස් ගස් වගේ මොඩේල්ස් වලට විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය වර ඉතින් අපි ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය APT වලට ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය කර', 'so': "Tusaalooyinka qaybsiga qaybinta ee kooban waxay ku xanuunsadaan dhaqdhaqaaq aan la arkeyn, laakiin waa dhacdooyinka wadajirka ah ee qoraal kasta lagu soo ururiyo. Dhibaatadan waxaa loo kordhiyey tusaalooyin kale oo ah geedaha lagu soo bandhigay (APTs), kaas oo xisaabta qaababka grammatika ah oo ku dhacda wadajirka ah. Sidaa darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nooca cudurka kala qaybsan oo ku isticmaalaya dhismaha taajirka ah ee APTs, taas oo ay ka fekeraan macluumaadka la'aanta ee isla midiidinnada loo isticmaalo sawir ah.", 'sv': 'Count-baserade distributionsbaserade semantiska modeller lider av sparsamhet på grund av obemärkta men rimliga samförekomster i någon textsamling. Detta problem förstärks för modeller som Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), som tar hänsyn till den grammatiska typen av samförekomst. Vi introducerar därför en ny form av distributionell inferens som utnyttjar den rika typstrukturen i APT och härleder saknade data genom samma mekanism som används för semantisk sammansättning.', 'ta': 'எண்ணிக்கையில் உள்ள பங்கீட்டு பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகள் பார்க்கவில்லை என்றாலும் எந்த உரை தொகுப்பிலும் செயல்படும் செயல தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தொகுப்பு மரங்கள் போன்ற மாதிரிகளுக்கு இந்த பிரச்சினை அதிகப்படுத்தப்படும், அது ஒரு சேர்ந்த நிகழ்வு வகைய எனவே நாம் ஒரு புதிய பங்கீட்டு நோய் வடிவமைப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது APT-ல் உள்ள பணக்க வகையான அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் காணவில்லை தகவல் க', 'ur': 'گنت کی بنیادی تقسیم کی سیمانٹی موڈلیاں بغیر نظارت کی وجہ سے پارکیٹی سے پڑتی ہیں لیکن ہر متن جملگی میں قابل قابل شروع ہونے کی وجہ سے۔ یہ مسئلہ اندھیرے پیک کے درخت (APT) کے مطابق مدلکوں کے لئے بڑھایا جاتا ہے جو ایک شروع کی گراماتیکی طرح کا حساب لیتے ہیں. لہٰذا ہم نے تقسیم کرنے والی عفونت کا ایک نو شکل پیش کیا ہے جو APTs میں مالدار طرح کی ساختاری اضافہ کرتا ہے اور اسی طرح گم ہونے والی ڈیٹا کے ذریعہ اس طرح کے ذریعہ مکانیزی کے ذریعہ مکانیزی کرتا ہے جو سی', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Шундай қилиб, biz APTsdagi taqdim tur tizimini ishlab chiqarishimiz va qaytamik tuzuvga ishlatilgan bir mekanik bilan bir yo'q maʼlumot yo'q.", 'vi': 'Các mô- đun phân phối theo mức độ phân phát bị hạn chế do các sự kiện liên quan bí mật nhưng hợp lý trong các tập hợp văn bản. Vấn đề này được tăng cường cho các mô hình như những cây Thậm chí đóng gói (APT) để cân nhắc các dạng ngôn ngữ của việc xảy ra cùng nhau. Chúng tôi đưa ra một hình thức phân phối khác nhau dẫn đến việc khai thác các cấu trúc giàu có trong các dạng APT và ngụ ý rằng các dữ liệu bị mất tích cũng bởi cùng một cơ chế dùng để cấu tạo chữ nghĩa.', 'da': "Tællebaserede distributionsmæssige semantiske modeller lider af sparsomhed på grund af uobserverede, men plausible samtidige forekomster i enhver tekstsamling. Dette problem forstærkes for modeller som Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), der tager højde for den grammatiske type af en samtidig forekomst. Vi introducerer derfor en ny form for distributionsmæssig slutning, der udnytter den rige typestruktur i APT'er og udleder manglende data ved den samme mekanisme, der bruges til semantisk sammensætning.", 'bg': 'Дистрибуционните семантични модели страдат от рядкост поради ненаблюдавани, но правдоподобни съвпадения във всяка текстова колекция. Този проблем се усилва за модели като анкерирани опаковани дървета (АПТ), които вземат предвид граматичния тип на съвместно възникване. Ето защо въвеждаме нова форма на дистрибуционно заключение, която експлоатира богатата типова структура в АПТ и извежда липсващи данни чрез същия механизъм, който се използва за семантичен състав.', 'nl': "Telgebaseerde distributionele semantische modellen lijden onder schaarste als gevolg van onopgemerkt maar plausibele co-voorkomen in elke tekstverzameling. Dit probleem wordt versterkt voor modellen zoals Anchored Packed Trees (APT's), die rekening houden met het grammaticale type van een co-incident. We introduceren daarom een nieuwe vorm van distributionele inferentie die de rijke typestructuur in APT's exploiteert en ontbrekende gegevens afleidt door hetzelfde mechanisme dat wordt gebruikt voor semantische compositie.", 'hr': 'Prema broju distribucijskih semantičkih modela pati od rezerviteta zbog neočuvanih ali uvjerljivih istodobnih događaja u bilo kojoj kolekciji teksta. Ovaj problem se pojačava za modele kao što su Anchored Packed Trees (APT), koji uzimaju u obzir gramatički tip istodogađaja. Stoga predstavljamo novi oblik distribucijske infekcije koja iskorištava bogatu strukturu tipa u APT-u i inferira nestale podatke istim mehanizam koji se koristi za semantički sastav.', 'ko': '계수를 바탕으로 하는 분포 의미 모델은 어떤 텍스트 집합에서도 관찰되지 않았지만 합리적인 공현으로 보이기 때문에 희소성의 영향을 받는다.앵커 채우기 트리(APTs)와 같은 모델에 대해 이 문제는 확대되었고 공통된 문법 유형을 고려했다.따라서 APTs의 풍부한 유형 구조를 활용하고 의미 합성과 같은 메커니즘을 통해 결여 데이터를 추정하는 새로운 분포 추리 형식을 도입했다.', 'id': 'Model distribusi semantis berdasarkan jumlah menderita dari kecepatan karena tidak diperhatikan tetapi mungkin terjadi pada koleksi teks apapun. Masalah ini ditambah untuk model seperti Pohon Paket Terikat (APT), yang mempertimbangkan tipe grammatik dari korespondensi. Oleh karena itu kami memperkenalkan bentuk baru dari kesimpulan distribusi yang mengeksploitasi struktur tipe kaya dalam APT dan menyimpulkan data yang hilang oleh mekanisme yang sama yang digunakan untuk komposisi semantis.', 'de': 'Zählbasierte distributionale semantische Modelle leiden aufgrund von unbeobachteten, aber plausiblen Co-Vorkommen in jeder Textsammlung unter Sparsität. Dieses Problem wird verstärkt für Modelle wie Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), die den grammatischen Typ eines Co-Vorkommens berücksichtigen. Wir stellen daher eine neuartige Form der Distributionsinferenz vor, die die Rich-Type-Struktur in APTs ausnutzt und fehlende Daten durch denselben Mechanismus, der für die semantische Zusammensetzung verwendet wird, ableitet.', 'tr': "Sa첵lanan da첵lamak semantik nusgalary ga첵talanmadyk 체챌in hasaplan첵an, 첵철ne el챌i metin 첵ygnamynda 첵akynla힊yp biljek nusgalary 체챌in 챌ek첵채r. Bu mesele Gadyrlanm캇힊 Guller (APT) 첵aly nusgalar 체챌in k철pr체힊diril첵채r. Bu mesele 챌yky힊 bolan bir nusga 체챌in aga챌 al첵ar. 힇ol seb채pli, APT'y흫 ba첵 tiplerini ulanan da힊ary 챌yky힊 hasaplanja흫 t채ze bir nusgasyny tany힊dyr첵arys we semantik kompozisyona ulanan mekanizma bilen 첵itiril첵채n mekanizma bilen 첵itiril첵채n hasaplanja흫 nusgasyny 챌yk첵arys.", 'sw': 'Mradi wa sekondari wa usambazaji unaoambatana na maeneo ya nchi unateseka kutokana na uchunguzi wa hali isiyoonekana lakini unafanyika kwa pamoja katika mkusanyiko wowote wa maandishi. Tatizo hili linaongezeka kwa mifano kama vile mti wa Mipaka ya Anchored Packed (APTs), ambao unachukua aina ya takwimu inayotokea kwa pamoja. Kwa hiyo tunaonyesha a in a ya ajabu ya ugonjwa wa usambazaji unaotumia muundo tajiri wa aina ya APTs na wale wasiopungua taarifa hizo na mfumo huo uliotumiwa kwa ajili ya ujenzi wa kimapenzi.', 'fa': 'Models semantic distribution based on counts suffer from sparsity due to non-observed but believable occurrences in any text collection. این مشکل برای مدل\u200cهای مانند درختان بسته\u200cشده\u200cای (APT) گسترش داده می\u200cشود که نوع گراماتیک یک اتفاق همراه را به حساب می\u200cگیرند. بنابراین ما یک شکل رمانی از آلودگی تقسیم را معرفی می کنیم که ساختار نوع ثروتمند را در APT استفاده می کند و اطلاعات ناپدید شده را با همان مکانیسمی که برای ترکیب سنتی استفاده می شود آلودگی می کند.', 'sq': 'Modelet shpërndarëse semantike bazuar në numër vuajnë nga pakësia për shkak të bashkëndodhjeve të pazgjidhura por të besueshme në çdo koleksion teksti. Ky problem është amplifikuar për modele si Pemët e Pakuara të Ankoruara (APTs), që marrin parasysh llojin gramatik të një bashkëndodhie. Prandaj ne futim një form ë të re të përfundimit shpërndarës që shfrytëzon strukturën e pasur të llojit në APT dhe përfshin të dhënat e munguara nga i njëjti mekanizëm që përdoret për përbërjen semantike.', 'af': "Tel-gebaseerde verspreidingssemantiese modele lyk van sparsiteit vanweë onbekende maar veroorsaaklike sameverende in enige teks versameling. Hierdie probleem is versterk vir modele soos Anchored Packed Trees (APT), wat die grammatiese tipe van 'n co- occurrence in rekening neem. Ons introduseer dan 'n nuwe vorm van verspreidingsinferensie wat die ryk tipe struktuur in APTs uitbreek en infereer gevalle data deur dieselfde mekanisme wat gebruik word vir semantiese opstelling.", 'am': 'በጽሑፍ ክፍል ውስጥ የሚደረግ እና ማሰናከል በቁጥር የተሰራረፈ የsemantic ዓይነቶች ከስፍራው የተነሳ ነው፡፡ ይህች ችግር በተጨማሪው የግራማዊ ዓይነት በቁጥጥር እንደሚያሳየው ምሳሌዎች ይበረታታል፡፡ ስለዚህ በAPT ውስጥ ባለጠጋ ዓይነት አካውንት የሚወስደውን የዘላለም አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ በተጠቃሚ አካሄድ የተጠቃሚ አካል እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "Kont-tabanlı dağıtım semantik modelləri gözləməmiş olmayan, lakin hər bir mətn koleksiyonundan möhkəm olaraq rastlaşdırmaq üzündən zəiflik çəkirlər. Bu problemi, birlikdə olanların gramatik növünü hesablayan Anchored Packed Trees (APT) kimi modellər üçün genişlənir. Beləliklə, APT'nin zengin türünü istifadə edir və semantik kompozisyon üçün istifadə edilən mehanizmi ilə missing məlumatları daxil edirik.", 'bn': 'কাউন্ট ভিত্তিক বিতরণের সেমেন্টিক মডেল অদৃশ্যের কারণে স্পারিস্টি থেকে কষ্ট পায়, কিন্তু যে কোন টেক্সট সংগ্রহে  এই সমস্যাটি অ্যাঙ্কোরেড প্যাকেট গাছের (APT) মত মডেলের জন্য বৃদ্ধি করা হয়েছে, যা একাউন্টে একটি গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল ধরনের সাথে সংঘর We therefore introduce a novel form of distributional inference that exploits the rich type structure in APTs and infers missing data by the same mechanism that is used for semantic composition.', 'ca': "Els models semàntics distribuidors basats en comptes pateixen una escassetat degut a coincidències no observades però plausibles en qualsevol col·lecció de textos. Aquest problem a s'amplifica per a models com els Anchored Packed Trees (APTs), que tenen en compte el tipus gramàtic d'una coincidència. Per tant, introduïm una nova form a de inferència distribucional que explota l'estructura de tipus ric en APT i infereix les dades que falten pel mateix mecanisme que s'utilitza per a la composició semàntica.", 'hy': 'Հաշվով հիմնված տարածման սեմանտիկ մոդելները տառապում են հազվադեպության պատճառով, որ ոչ դիտարկված, բայց հավանական համապատասխանությունները կատարվում են ցանկացած տեքստի հավաքածում: Այս խնդիրը ամպլիֆիզացվում է այնպիսի մոդելների համար, ինչպիսիք են Անկորդված փակցված ծառերը (APT), որոնք հաշվի են առնում համապատասխանատվության գրամատիկական տեսակը: Այսպիսով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք բաշխման նոր ձև, որը օգտագործում է APT-ի հարուստ տեսակի կառուցվածքը և հետևում է, որ բացակայում են տվյալներ նույն մեխանիզմի միջոցով, որը օգտագործվում է սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքի համար:', 'cs': 'Distribuční sémantické modely založené na počtu trpí řídkostí kvůli nepozorovaným, ale věrohodným koexistencím v libovolné textové sbírce. Tento problém je zesílený u modelů, jako jsou Anchored Packed Trees (APT), které berou v úvahu gramatický typ společného výskytu. Proto představujeme novou formu distribučního inference, která využívá struktury bohatého typu v APT a odvozuje chybějící data stejným mechanismem, který se používá pro sémantickou kompozici.', 'bs': 'Prema broju distribucijskih semantičkih modela pati od rezervnosti zbog neočuvanih ali uvjerljivih događaja u bilo kojoj kolekciji teksta. Ovaj problem se pojačava za modele kao što su Anchored Packed Trees (APT), koji uzimaju u obzir gramatički tip saradnje. Stoga predstavljamo novi oblik distribucije infekcije koja iskorištava bogatu strukturu tipa u APT-u i inferira nestale podatke istim mehanizam koji se koristi za semantički sastav.', 'et': 'Loenduspõhised jaotussemantilised mudelid kannatavad vähese tähelepanuta, kuid usutavate koostoimete tõttu mis tahes tekstikogus. Seda probleemi võimendatakse selliste mudelite puhul nagu ankurdatud pakitud puud (APT), mis võtavad arvesse kaasesinemise grammatilist tüüpi. Seetõttu tutvustame uut distributsioonilise järelduse vormi, mis kasutab ära rikkalikku tüüpi struktuuri APT-des ja järeldab puuduvad andmed sama mehhanismi abil, mida kasutatakse semantilise kompositsiooni puhul.', 'fi': 'Laskentapohjaiset jakelusemanttiset mallit kärsivät niukkuudesta johtuen havainnoimattomista mutta uskottavista rinnakkaisesiintymisistä missä tahansa tekstikokoelmassa. Tätä ongelmaa laajennetaan sellaisissa malleissa kuin ankkuroidut pakatut puut (APT), jotka ottavat huomioon rinnakkaisesiintymisen kieliopillisen tyypin. Tämän vuoksi esittelemme uudenlaisen jakaumapäättelyn, joka hyödyntää APT:n rikastyyppirakennetta ja päättelee puuttuvat tiedot samalla mekanismilla, jota käytetään semanttisessa koostumuksessa.', 'jv': 'Siji-wis diangkat diangkat sistem semanti sing dadi kalong kelas nang sekasat kaya ngono nggawe layanan sing perusahaan karo ngono nggawe akeh bantuan. Aspect ratio Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk éntuk perusahaan anyar éné perusahaan winih kanggo nyelaraké éntuk sistem sing warisan karo ApT karo ingkang dadi sing perusahaan karo mekaniyen sing koyo nggawe sistem semanti.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Saboda haka, Muke introduce wani tsari na daban-dabar da za'a yi amfani da matsayin matajiri a cikin PATs kuma yana kasancẽwa da data da ba'a gane da shi na matsayin da ke amfani da wa compositin semantic.", 'sk': 'Distribucijski semantični modeli, ki temeljijo na štetju, trpijo zaradi neopaženih, vendar verjetnih sočasnih pojavov v kateri koli zbirki besedil. Ta problem je okrepljen za modele, kot so sidrana pakirana drevesa (APT), ki upoštevajo slovnično vrsto sočasnega pojava. Zato uvajamo novo obliko distribucijskega sklepanja, ki izkorišča strukturo bogatega tipa v APT-jih in sklepa manjkajoče podatke z istim mehanizmom, ki se uporablja za semantično sestavo.', 'he': 'דוגמנים סמנטיים פיצועים מבוססים בספירה סובלים מהנדירות בגלל התרחשות משותפות בלתי צפויות, אך סבירות בכל אוסף טקסט. הבעיה הזאת מוצצת לדוגמאות כמו עצי חבילות (APTs), אשר לוקחים בחשבון את סוג גרמטי של התרחשות משותפת. We therefore introduce a novel form of distributional inference that exploits the rich type structure in APTs and infers missing data by the same mechanism that is used for semantic composition.', 'bo': 'Count-based distributional semantic models suffer from sparsity due to unobserved but plausible co-occurrences in any text collection. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ནི་ཨ་ཀོ་རིས་ཐུག་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་པར་སྦྱར་བ་བཏོན་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་ལྟ་བུའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་རྩ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཅིག་སྟོན་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Temporal Word Analogies : Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'تشبيهات الكلمات الزمنية: تحديد الاستبدال المعجمي باستخدام تطويقات كلمة غير متزامنة', 'pt': 'Analogias de palavras temporais: identificando substituição lexical com incorporação de palavras diacrônicas', 'es': 'Analogías de palabras temporales: identificación del reemplazo léxico con incrustaciones de palabras diacrónicas', 'fr': 'Analogies temporelles des mots\xa0: identification du remplacement lexical par des incrustations de mots diachroniques', 'ja': '時間的な単語の類似：ダイアクロニックな単語の埋め込みによる語彙置換の識別', 'hi': 'टेम्पोरल वर्ड उपमाएं: डायक्रोनिक वर्ड एम्बेडिंग के साथ लेक्सिकल रिप्लेसमेंट की पहचान करना', 'zh': '时词类比:以历词嵌识词法代之', 'ru': 'Временные сходства слов: идентификация лексической замены с диахроническими вложениями слов', 'ga': 'Analógacha Focal Sealadacha: Athsholáthar Foclóra le Leabú Focal Diachrónach a Aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Időbeli szóanalógiák: A lexikális helyettesítés azonosítása diakrónikus szóbeágyazásokkal', 'lt': 'Name', 'it': 'Analogie temporali di parole: identificare la sostituzione lessicale con incorporazioni diacroniche di parole', 'kk': 'Температуралық сөз аналогиялары: Диахроникалық сөз ендірулерімен лексикалық алмастыруды анықтау', 'mk': 'Привремена аналогија на зборови: Идентификување на лексикална замена со дијахронични вградувања на зборови', 'ms': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'el': 'Προσωρινές αναλογίες λέξεων: Αναγνώριση της Λεξικής αντικατάστασης με διαχρονικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων', 'mt': 'Analoġiji Temporali tal-Kliem: L-identifikazzjoni tas-Sostituzzjoni Lessika b’Embeddings Diakroniċi tal-Kliem', 'mn': 'Температур үг аналоги: Диахроник үг нэвтрэмжтэй лексикийн солилцоог тайлбарлах', 'pl': 'Analogia słów czasowych: identyfikacja zastępstwa leksykalnego za pomocą diachronicznych osadzeń słów', 'ml': 'താമസിക വാക്ക് അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d: ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റം ഡയക്രോണിക് വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുമായി തിരിച്ചറിയ', 'ro': 'Analogii temporale ale cuvintelor: identificarea înlocuirii lexicale cu încorporarea diacronică a cuvintelor', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වචන විශ්ලේෂණය: ලෙක්සිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සංවිධානය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Temporalne analogije reèi: identifikacija leksièke zamjene sa dijagronskim ukljuèenjem reèi', 'no': 'Mellombels ord- analogiar: Identifiserer leksisk erstatning med diakroniske ord- innbygging', 'so': 'Kalajar ku meelgaar ah: Identification Lexical Replacement with Diakrone Word Embedding', 'sv': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifiera Lexical Replacement med Diakroniska Word Embeddings', 'ta': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Vaqtinchalik soʻz analog: Leksikal almashtirish', 'vi': 'Âm thanh thời gian: xác định thay đổi ngôn ngữ và ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Времеви думи аналогии: идентифициране на лексикална замяна с диахронични словни вграждания', 'da': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identificering af Lexical Replacement med Diakroniske Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke woordanalogieën: Lexische vervanging identificeren met diachrone woordinsluitingen', 'hr': 'Temporalne analogije riječi: identifikacija leksičke zamjene dijagronskim uključenjima riječi', 'de': 'Temporale Wortanalogien: Identifizierung von Lexika-Ersatz durch diachrone Worteinbettungen', 'fa': 'تحلیل\u200cهای کلمه موقتی: شناسایی جایگزینی Lexical با وارد کردن کلمه Diachronic', 'ko': '시간 어휘 유형 비교: 어휘 교체와 역시어 삽입 식별', 'tr': 'Wagtlaýyn Söz Analogileri: Ilkinsel Kelimi Diýetlendirmek bilen tanişeýär', 'sw': 'Anachambua neno la muda: Kutambua Mabadiliko ya Lexico kwa Hadithi ya Kidiakronisa', 'af': 'Temporale Woord Analogies: Identifiseer Leksiese Vervang met Diachroniese Woord Inbetering', 'am': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'az': 'Qısqa Söz Analogiləri: Diakroniki Söz İdxalarıyla Leksik Əvəzini İşləndirilir', 'bn': 'অস্থায়ী শব্দ বিশ্লেষণ: ডায়াক্রোনিক শব্দ দূরে লেক্সিক্যাল প্রতিস্থাপন', 'sq': 'Analogjet e fjalëve të përkohshme: Identifikimi i zëvendësimit leksikal me përfshirjet e fjalëve diakronike', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Temporalne analogije riječi: identifikacija leksičke zamjene dijagronskim integracijama riječi', 'et': 'Ajalised sõnade analoogid: Lexikaalse asendamise tuvastamine diakrooniliste sõnade manustamisega', 'fi': 'Aikasanaanalogiat: Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'ca': 'Analògies temporals de paraules: Identificar la substitució lèxica amb incorporacions diacròniques de paraules', 'cs': 'Časové slovní analogie: identifikace Lexikální nahrazení diachronickými slovními vloženími', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'Temporal Word Analogies: Identifying Lexical Replacement with Diachronic Word Embeddings', 'ha': 'Analyjiya ga Kalmar da ake ƙayyade: Idertain Mai Shirin Leksika da Ƙara da Hadalla na Tsariya', 'sk': 'Analogije časovnih besed: prepoznavanje leksične zamenjave z diakroničnimi besednimi vdelavami', 'bo': 'གནས་སྐབས་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ། མཐའ་དབྱིབས་ཚབ་བཅུག་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཚབ་མཚོན་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces the concept of temporal word analogies : pairs of words which occupy the same semantic space at different points in time. One well-known property of word embeddings is that they are able to effectively model traditional word analogies (word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4) through vector addition. Here, I show that temporal word analogies (word w_1 at time t _ is like word w_2 at time t _) can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space. When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997, or Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007.w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4”) through vector addition. Here, I show that temporal word analogies (“word w_1 at time t_\\alpha is like word w_2 at time t_\\beta”) can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space. When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as “Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997”, or “Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007”. ', 'ar': 'يقدم هذا البحث مفهوم تشابه الكلمات الزمنية: أزواج من الكلمات التي تشغل نفس المساحة الدلالية في نقاط زمنية مختلفة. إحدى الخصائص المعروفة لتضمينات الكلمات هي أنها قادرة على تصميم مقارنات الكلمات التقليدية بشكل فعال ("الكلمة w_1 هي الكلمة w_2 كما الكلمة w_3 تعني الكلمة w_4") من خلال إضافة المتجهات. هنا ، أوضح أن تشبيهات الكلمات الزمنية ("الكلمة w_1 في الوقت t_α تشبه الكلمة w_2 في الوقت t_β") يمكن تصميمها بشكل فعال مع تضمين كلمة متزامنة ، بشرط أن يتم تحويل مسافات التضمين المستقلة من كل فترة زمنية بشكل مناسب إلى متجه مشترك الفراغ. عند تطبيقها على مجموعة غير متزامنة من المقالات الإخبارية ، فإن هذه الطريقة قادرة على تحديد تشابهات الكلمات الزمنية مثل "رونالد ريغان عام 1987 يشبه بيل كلينتون عام 1997" ، أو "ووكمان عام 1987 مثل جهاز iPod في عام 2007".', 'es': 'Este artículo introduce el concepto de analogías de palabras temporales: pares de palabras que ocupan el mismo espacio semántico en diferentes momentos del tiempo. Una propiedad bien conocida de la incrustación de palabras es que son capaces de modelar eficazmente analogías de palabras tradicionales («la palabra w_1 es la palabra w_2 como la palabra w_3 es la palabra w_4») mediante la adición de vectores. Aquí, muestro que las analogías de palabras temporales («palabra w_1 en el tiempo t_α es como la palabra w_2 en el tiempo t_β») pueden modelarse eficazmente con incrustaciones de palabras diacrónicas, siempre que los espacios de incrustación independientes de cada período de tiempo se transformen adecuadamente en un espacio vectorial común. Cuando se aplica a un corpus diacrónico de artículos de noticias, este método es capaz de identificar analogías de palabras temporales como «Ronald Reagan en 1987 es como Bill Clinton en 1997», o «Walkman en 1987 es como el iPod en 2007».', 'pt': 'Este artigo introduz o conceito de analogias temporais de palavras: pares de palavras que ocupam o mesmo espaço semântico em diferentes pontos no tempo. Uma propriedade bem conhecida dos word embeddings é que eles são capazes de efetivamente modelar analogias tradicionais de palavras (“palavra w_1 é para a palavra w_2 como a palavra w_3 é para a palavra w_4”) por meio da adição de vetores. Aqui, mostro que analogias temporais de palavras (“palavra w_1 no tempo t_α é como a palavra w_2 no tempo t_β”) podem efetivamente ser modeladas com embeddings de palavras diacrônicas, desde que os espaços de embedding independentes de cada período de tempo sejam apropriadamente transformados em um vetor comum espaço. Quando aplicado a um corpus diacrônico de artigos de notícias, esse método é capaz de identificar analogias temporais de palavras como “Ronald Reagan em 1987 é como Bill Clinton em 1997” ou “Walkman em 1987 é como o iPod em 2007”.', 'fr': "Cet article introduit le concept d'analogies temporelles de mots\xa0: des paires de mots qui occupent le même espace sémantique à différents moments dans le temps. Une propriété bien connue des intégrations de mots est qu'elles sont capables de modéliser efficacement les analogies de mots traditionnelles («\xa0le mot w_1 est le mot w_2 alors que le mot w_3 est le mot w_4\xa0») par addition vectorielle. Ici, je montre que les analogies temporelles de mots («\xa0le mot w_1 au temps t_α est comme le mot w_2 au temps t_β\xa0») peuvent être modélisées efficacement avec des intégrations de mots diachroniques, à condition que les espaces d'intégration indépendants de chaque période de temps soient transformés de manière appropriée en un espace vectoriel commun. Appliquée à un corpus diachronique d'articles de presse, cette méthode est capable d'identifier des analogies temporelles telles que «\xa0Ronald Reagan en 1987 est comme Bill Clinton en 1997\xa0» ou «\xa0Walkman en 1987 est comme un iPod en 2007\xa0».", 'ja': 'この論文では、時間的な単語類推の概念を紹介した。時間的な異なる時点で同じ意味空間を占める単語のペアである。単語埋め込みの既知の特性の１つは、それらがベクトル追加を通じて従来の単語のアナロジーを効果的にモデル化することができることである（「単語ｗ ＿ １は単語ｗ ＿ ２に対して、単語ｗ ＿ ３は単語ｗ ＿ ４に対して」）。ここで、時間的な単語の類似（「時間t_αにおける単語w_1は、時間t_βにおける単語w_2のようなもの」）は、各時間周期からの独立した埋め込み空間が共通のベクトル空間に適切に変換されることを条件として、ダイアクロニックワード埋め込みで効果的にモデル化することができることを示す。この方法は、ニュース記事のダイアクロニックコーパスに適用すると、「1987年のロナルド・レーガンは1997年のビル・クリントンのようなもの」、または「1987年のウォークマンは2007年のiPodのようなもの」などの時間的な単語の類推を識別することができます。', 'zh': '本文引时词类:异时据同语义空词对。 词嵌一众所知,能向量加法拟古词类比("词w_1词w_2,犹词w_3词w_4")。 余展其时类("t_α时词w_1如时t_β词w_2")可以效用历时词嵌建模,前此每时间段独立嵌空,转为公共向量空间。 当用于新闻文之历语料库时,其法识时词类,如"1987年之罗纳德·里根,犹1997年之比尔·克林顿",或"1987年之听,犹2007年之iPod"也。', 'ru': 'В данной работе вводится понятие временных аналогий слов: пары слов, занимающие одно и то же семантическое пространство в разные моменты времени. Одним из известных свойств вложений слов является то, что они способны эффективно моделировать традиционные аналогии слов («слово w_1 является словом w_2, как слово w_3 является словом w_4») посредством векторного сложения. Здесь я показываю, что временные аналогии слов («слово w_1 во время t_α похоже на слово w_2 во время t_β») могут быть эффективно смоделированы с помощью диахронических вложений слов, при условии, что независимые пространства вложений из каждого периода времени соответствующим образом преобразуются в общее векторное пространство. Применительно к диахроническому корпусу новостных статей этот метод способен идентифицировать временные аналогии слов, такие как «Рональд Рейган в 1987 году похож на Билла Клинтона в 1997 году» или «Уокман в 1987 году похож на iPod в 2007 году».', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अस्थायी शब्द उपमाओं की अवधारणा का परिचय देता है: शब्दों के जोड़े जो समय में विभिन्न बिंदुओं पर एक ही शब्दार्थ स्थान पर कब्जा करते हैं। शब्द एम्बेडिंग की एक प्रसिद्ध संपत्ति यह है कि वे वेक्टर जोड़ के माध्यम से पारंपरिक शब्द उपमाओं को प्रभावी ढंग से मॉडल करने में सक्षम हैं ("शब्द w_1 शब्द w_2 शब्द के रूप में शब्द w_3 शब्द w_4 है") को शब्द के रूप में मॉडल करने में सक्षम हैं। यहां, मैं दिखाता हूं कि अस्थायी शब्द उपमाएं ("शब्द w_1 समय पर t_α शब्द w_2 की तरह है t_β समय पर") को प्रभावी रूप से डायक्रोनिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ मॉडलिंग किया जा सकता है, बशर्ते कि प्रत्येक समय अवधि से स्वतंत्र एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान उचित रूप से एक सामान्य वेक्टर स्थान में परिवर्तित हो जाएं। जब समाचार लेखों के एक डायक्रोनिक कॉर्पस पर लागू किया जाता है, तो यह विधि अस्थायी शब्द उपमाओं की पहचान करने में सक्षम होती है जैसे कि "1987 में रोनाल्ड रीगन 1997 में बिल क्लिंटन की तरह है", या "1987 में वॉकमैन 2007 में आइपॉड की तरह है"।', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo isteach coincheap analaí ama focal: péirí focal a áitíonn an spás shéimeantach céanna ag pointí éagsúla ama. Airíonna aitheanta amháin de leabú focal is ea go bhfuil siad in ann analaí traidisiúnta focal a shamhaltú go héifeachtach ("is é an focal w_1 an focal w_2 mar fhocal w_3 agus an focal w_4") trí shuimiú veicteoireach. Anseo, léirím gur féidir analaí focal ama (“focal w_1 ag am t_α cosúil le focal w_2 ag am t_β”) a mhúnlú go héifeachtach le leabaithe focal diacrónacha, ar choinníoll go ndéantar na spásanna leabaithe neamhspleácha ó gach tréimhse ama a chlaochlú go cuí ina veicteoir coitianta spás. Nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar chorpas déachónach d’ailt nuachta, tá an modh seo in ann analógacha focal ama ar nós “Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997”, nó “Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007” a aithint.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტის კონფიგურაცია ტემპალური სიტყვის ანალოგიების კონფიგურაცია: სიტყვის კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც განსხვავებული წერტილებში იგივე სიმმანტიური ერთი უცნობილი სიტყვების შესახებ არის რომ ისინი ეფექტიურად შეუძლებელია ტრადიციონალური სიტყვების ანალოგიების მოდელი ('სიტყვებ w_ 1 არის სიტყვების w_ 2, როგორც სიტყვები w_ 3 არის სიტყვების w_  მე აქ ჩვენებს, რომ ტემპალური სიტყვის ანალოგიები ('სიტყვი w_ 1 დროს t_ ' არის სიტყვი w_ 2 დროს t_') შეიძლება эფექტიურად მოდელურება დიაჰრონიური სიტყვის შებრუნებით, თუ ყოველ დროს პერიოდიდან განსარგებული შებრუნებული სი როდესაც ახალგაზრულების დიაპრონიკური კოპუსში გამოყენებულია, ეს პროცემი შეუძლია იდენტიფიკუროთ დრომალური სიტყვის ანალოგიები, როგორც 'პონალე რეგენი 1987 წლის ბილ კლინტონის 1997 წლის განმავლ", 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja az időbeli szóanalógiák fogalmát: olyan szavak párjait, amelyek különböző időpontokban ugyanazt a szemantikai teret foglalják el. A szóbeágyazások egyik jól ismert tulajdonsága, hogy képesek hatékonyan modellezni a hagyományos szóanalógiákat ("w_1 szó a w_2 szóhoz, mint w_3 szó a w_4 szóhoz") vektorhozzáadással. Itt megmutatom, hogy az időbeli szóanalógiák ("w_1 szó időben t_ olyan, mint a w_2 szó időben t_ ") hatékonyan modellezhetők diakrónikus szóbeágyazásokkal, feltéve, hogy az egyes időperiódusok független beágyazási terei megfelelően átalakulnak egy közös vektortérré. Ha egy diakrónikus hírcsoportra alkalmazzák, ez a módszer képes azonosítani az időbeli szóanalógiákat, mint például "Ronald Reagan 1987-ben olyan, mint Bill Clinton 1997-ben", vagy "Walkman 1987-ben olyan, mint az iPod 2007-ben".', 'lt': "This paper introduces the concept of temporal word analogies: pairs of words which occupy the same semantic space at different points in time.  One well-known property of word embeddings is that they are able to effectively model traditional word analogies ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4') through vector addition.  Here, I show that temporal word analogies ('word w_1 at time t_  is like word w_2 at time t_ ') can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space.  When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз уақытша сөздің аналогияларының концепциясын келтіреді: уақытта бірнеше семантикалық кеңістіктерінде бір екі сөзді ұстайды. Сөздерді ендіру үшін бір таңдалған қасиеті - олар әдетті сөздерді аналогиялар үлгілеуге болады ('w_ 1 сөз w_ 2 сөз w_ 3 сөз w_ 4 сөз деп) векторды қосу арқылы үлгілеуге болады. Мұнда, уақытша сөздің аналогиясы ('w_ 1 уақытта t_ ' сөз w_ 2 уақытта t_ 2 уақытта) диагроникалық сөздерді ендіру үшін тәуелсіз орындар әрбір уақытта ендіру кеңістігін жалпы вектор орынға аударылады. Жаңалық мақалалардың диагроникалық корпусына қолданылса, бұл әдіс 1987 жылы Роналд Рейган 1997 жылы Билл Клинтон сияқты деп аталады немесе 1987 жылы Walkman 2007 жылы iPod сияқты деп аталады.", 'it': "Questo articolo introduce il concetto di analogie temporali delle parole: coppie di parole che occupano lo stesso spazio semantico in punti diversi nel tempo. Una proprietà ben nota delle incorporazioni di parole è che sono in grado di modellare efficacemente analogie di parole tradizionali ('parola w_1 è a parola w_2 come parola w_3 è a parola w_4') attraverso l'aggiunta vettoriale. Qui, mostro che le analogie temporali di parole ('parola w_1 al tempo t_ è come parola w_2 al tempo t_ ') possono essere efficacemente modellate con incorporazioni diacroniche di parole, a condizione che gli spazi di incorporazione indipendenti di ogni periodo temporale siano opportunamente trasformati in uno spazio vettoriale comune. Quando applicato a un corpus diacronico di articoli di notizie, questo metodo è in grado di identificare analogie temporali di parole come 'Ronald Reagan nel 1987 è come Bill Clinton nel 1997', o 'Walkman nel 1987 è come iPod nel 2007'.", 'ms': "This paper introduces the concept of temporal word analogies: pairs of words which occupy the same semantic space at different points in time.  One well-known property of word embeddings is that they are able to effectively model traditional word analogies ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4') through vector addition.  Here, I show that temporal word analogies ('word w_1 at time t_  is like word w_2 at time t_ ') can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space.  When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'.", 'ml': "This paper introduces the concept of temporal word analogies: pairs of words which occupy the same semantic space at different points in time.  വാക്ക് അകത്തേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ ഒരു സ്വത്തുക്കള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ 'വാക്ക് w_ 1 എന്ന വാക്ക് w_ 3 എന്ന വാക്ക് w_ 4' എന്ന വാക്ക് വാ ഇവിടെ ഞാന്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ('സമയത്തു് w_ 1 _' വാക്ക് w_ 2 എന്നതു് സമയത്തു് വാക്കു് w_ 2 എന്നു് പോലെയാണു് എന്നു് ഞാന്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തു് നി വാര്\u200dത്താക്കുകളുടെ കാര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ ഒരു ഡയക്രോണിക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന് പ്രയോഗിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d, 1987-ല്\u200d 'റോണാള്\u200dഡ് റിഗന്\u200d എന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ വിശ്വാസം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ഈ രീത", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jintroduċi l-kunċett ta’ analogiji temporali tal-kliem: pari ta’ kliem li jokkupaw l-istess spazju semantiku f’punti differenti fil-ħin. One well-known property of word embeddings is that they are able to effectively model traditional word analogies ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4') through vector addition.  Here, I show that temporal word analogies ('word w_1 at time t_  is like word w_2 at time t_ ') can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space.  Meta applikat għal korpus dijakroniku ta' artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet, dan il-metodu huwa kapaċi jidentifika analogiji temporali ta' kliem bħal 'Ronald Reagan fl-1987 huwa bħal Bill Clinton fl-1997', jew 'Walkman fl-1987 huwa bħal iPod fl-2007'.", 'mk': "Овој весник го претставува концептот на привремена аналогија на зборови: парови зборови кои го окупираат истиот семантичен простор во различни точки на времето. One well-known property of word embeddings is that they are able to effectively model traditional word analogies ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4') through vector addition.  Овде, покажувам дека временската аналогија на зборови ('зборот w_ 1 на време t_  е како зборот w_ 2 на време t_ ') може ефикасно да се моделира со дијахронични вградувања на зборови, со услов дека независните вградувачки простори од секој временски период се соодветно трансформирани во заеднички векторен простор. Кога се применува на дијахроничен корпус на вести, овој метод може да ги идентификува временските аналогии на зборови како што е „Роналд Реган во 1987 година е како Бил Клинтон во 1997 година“, или „Волкман во 1987 година е како iPod во 2007 година“.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει την έννοια των χρονικών αναλογιών λέξεων: ζεύγη λέξεων που καταλαμβάνουν τον ίδιο σημασιολογικό χώρο σε διαφορετικά χρονικά σημεία. Μια πολύ γνωστή ιδιότητα των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων είναι ότι είναι σε θέση να μοντελούν αποτελεσματικά παραδοσιακές αναλογίες λέξεων ("λέξη είναι στη λέξη ως λέξη είναι στη λέξη λέξη σε_2 ως λέξη σε λέξη σε λέξη σε_4") μέσω της πρόσθεσης διανυσματικών. Εδώ, δείχνω ότι οι χρονικές αναλογίες λέξεων ("λέξη w_1 σε χρόνο t_ είναι όπως η λέξη w_2 σε χρόνο t_") μπορούν αποτελεσματικά να μοντελοποιηθούν με διαχρονικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων, υπό την προϋπόθεση ότι οι ανεξάρτητοι ενσωματωμένοι χώροι από κάθε χρονική περίοδο μετατρέπονται κατάλληλα σε κοινό διανυσματικό χώρο. Όταν εφαρμόζεται σε ένα διαχρονικό σώμα άρθρων ειδήσεων, αυτή η μέθοδος είναι σε θέση να προσδιορίσει χρονικές αναλογίες λέξεων όπως "Ronald Reagan στο 1987 είναι όπως ο Bill Clinton στο 1997", ή "Walkman στο 1987 είναι σαν το iPod στο 2007".', 'pl': 'W artykule wprowadzono koncepcję analogii słów czasowych: pary słów, które zajmują tę samą przestrzeń semantyczną w różnych punktach czasu. Jedną z dobrze znanych właściwości osadzeń słów jest to, że są one w stanie skutecznie modelować tradycyjne analogie słów ("słowo w_1 jest do słowa w_2 jako słowo w_3 jest do słowa w_4") poprzez dodawanie wektorów. Tutaj pokazuję, że analogie słów czasowych ("słowo w_1 w czasie t_ jest jak słowo w_2 w czasie t_") można skutecznie modelować za pomocą diachronicznych osadzeń słowa, pod warunkiem że niezależne przestrzenie osadzania z każdego okresu czasu są odpowiednio przekształcane w wspólną przestrzeń wektorową. W przypadku zastosowania do diachronicznego korpusu artykułów wiadomościowych metoda ta jest w stanie zidentyfikować czasowe analogie słów, takie jak "Ronald Reagan w 1987 jest jak Bill Clinton w 1997", czy "Walkman w 1987 jest jak iPod w 2007".', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer konsepten på mellombels ordanalogiar: par ord som innebyr same semantisk plass på ulike punkt i tidspunkt. Eit godt kjent eigenskap for ordinnbygging er at dei kan effektivt modellere tradisjonelle ordanalogiar (« ord w_ 1 » er ordet w_ 2 som ordet w_ 3 er ordet w_ 4 ») gjennom vektortillegg. Her viser jeg a t mellombels ordanalogiar (« ordet w_ 1 ved tid t_ » er lik ordet w_ 2 ved tid t_ ») kan effektivt modelerast med diakroniske ordinnbygging, dersom dei uavhengige innbyggingsmellomroma frå kvar tidspunkt vert tilpassa til eit vanleg vektorrom. Når denne metoden er brukt på eit diakronisk korpus av nye artiklar, kan denne metoden identifisera mellombels ord analogiar som « Ronald Reagan i 1987 er lik Bill Clinton i 1997 », eller « Walkman i 1987 er lik iPod i 2007 ».', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă conceptul analogiilor temporale cuvintelor: perechi de cuvinte care ocupă același spațiu semantic în diferite puncte ale timpului. O proprietate bine cunoscută a încorporărilor de cuvinte este că acestea sunt capabile să modeleze eficient analogiile tradiționale de cuvinte ("cuvântul w_1 este la cuvântul w_2 ca cuvântul w_3 este la cuvântul w_4") prin adăugarea vectorială. Aici, arăt că analogiile temporale ale cuvintelor (\'cuvântul w_1 la momentul t_ este ca cuvântul w_2 la momentul t_ \') pot fi modelate efectiv cu încorporări diacronice de cuvinte, cu condiția ca spațiile independente de încorporare din fiecare perioadă de timp să fie transformate în mod corespunzător într-un spațiu vectorial comun. Atunci când este aplicată unui corpus diacronic de articole de știri, această metodă este capabilă să identifice analogii temporale cuvinte precum "Ronald Reagan în 1987 este ca Bill Clinton în 1997", sau "Walkman în 1987 este ca iPod în 2007".', 'mn': "Энэ цаас цаг хугацааны үгийн аналоги ойлголтыг тайлбарладаг: цаг хугацаанд ижил хэмжээний орон зайд хоёр үгийг ашигладаг. Нэг нэр томъёоны шинж чанар нь тэд уламжлалт үгний аналогийг эффективно загварчлах боломжтой ('w_1 үг нь w_2 үг w_3 үг нь w_4') гэсэн үг юм. Энд би цаг хугацааны үг аналогийг харуулж байна ('w_1 үг t_' үг t_' үг үед w_2 үг t_' үг шиг) диагроник үг нэвтрүүлэхээр эффективно загвар өгөх боломжтой болно. Хэрвээ цаг бүрт хамааралгүй орон зай нь ерөнхий вектор орон зай болно. Хэрвээ мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн диагроник корпус дээр хэрэглэгдэхэд энэ арга 1987 онд Рональд Рейган нь 1997 онд Билл Клинтон шиг, 1987 онд Вокман 2007 онд iPod шиг байдаг.", 'sr': "Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept temporalnih reèi analogija: par reèi koje okupljaju isti semantički prostor u razlièitim taèkama u vremenu. Jedna poznata vlasništvo ugrađenja riječi je da mogu učinkovito modelirati tradicionalne analogije riječi ('reč w_1 je reč w_2 kao reč w_3 je reč w_4') kroz dodavanje vektora. Ovde pokazujem da je temporalna reč analogija ('reč w_1 u vreme t_ ' kao reč w_2 u vreme t_') efikasno moguće da se modelira sa dijagronskim integracijama reèi, ako se nezavisni integracijski prostor iz svakog period a prilièno pretvara u zajednički vektorski prostor. Kada se primjenjuje na dijagronski korpus novinskih članaka, ovaj metod može identifikovati temporalne reèi analogije poput Ronald Reagan 1987. godine kao Bill Clinton 1997. ili 'Walkman 1987. je kao iPod 2007.", 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa fekerka hadalka ku saameyn ah: noocyo hadal ah oo isku mid ah goobaha isbedelka. Qayb ka mid ah oo aad u yaqaan hadal ku habboon waa in ay awoodi karaan si saxda ah u sameyn karaan kalajarida hadalka caadiga ah ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4'). Halkan, waxaan tusayaa in goor ku meelgaar ah (word w_1 w a a sida word w_2 xilliga t_) si fiican looga sameyn karo hadal ku qoran karo, haddii goor kasta goor xor ah meelo gaar ah oo ka mid ah ay ku bedelaan goob gaar ah. Markii lagu codsaday qoraalada warqadaha ee warqadaha, qaabkaasu wuxuu aqoonsan karaa wax ku saabsan hadalka ku saabsan sida 'Ronald Reagan 1987 waa sida Bill Clinton sanadkii 1997', ama 'Walkman sanadkii 1987 waa sida iPod sanadkii 2007'.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats introducerar begreppet temporala ordanalogier: ordpar som upptar samma semantiska rum vid olika tidpunkter. En välkänd egenskap hos ordinbäddningar är att de effektivt kan modellera traditionella ordanalogier (\'ord w_1 är till ord w_2 som ord w_3 är till ord w_4\') genom vektoraddition. Här visar jag att tidsmässiga ordanalogier (\'ord w_1 vid tiden t_ är som ord w_2 vid tiden t_ \') effektivt kan modelleras med diakroniska ordinbäddningar, förutsatt att de oberoende inbäddningsområdena från varje tidsperiod på lämpligt sätt omvandlas till ett gemensamt vektorutrymme. När den tillämpas på en diakronisk korpus av nyhetsartiklar, kan denna metod identifiera tidsmässiga ordanalogier som "Ronald Reagan 1987 är som Bill Clinton 1997", eller "Walkman 1987 är som iPod 2007".', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ වෙනස් පැත්තේ වෙනස් පැත්තේ වචන විශේෂ වචන විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා: වෙනස් පැත්තේ වෙනස් වචන වචන වචන වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවයේ එක හොඳයි දන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වෙක්ටර් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට ('වචන w_1' වචන w_2 මෙන්න, මම පෙන්වන්නේ කාලයික වචන විශේෂය ('වචන w_1 a t time t_ ) වචන w_2 at time t_') වගේ වචන විශේෂය විශේෂයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් කාලයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් කාලයෙන් ස්ථා මේ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, 1987 වල රොනාල්ඩ් රිගාන් වලින් 1997 වලින් බිල් ක්ලින්ටන් වගේ, නැත්තම් '1987 වලින් ව", 'ta': "இந்த தாள் தற்காலிக வார்த்தை ஆராய்ச்சியின் கருத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது: அதே போன்ற புள்ளிகளில் அதே ஒற்றைப் போன்ற பு ஒரு நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட வார்த்தை உள்ளீடுகளின் பண்பு என்னவென்றால் அவர்கள் பாரம்பரிய வார்த்தை analog மாதிரியாக முடியும் ('word w_ 1 is to word w_ 3 as word w_ 4 is to word w_ 4') வழி இங்கே நான் காட்டுகிறேன் ('வார்த்தை w_ 1 நேரத்தில் t__' என்பது நேரத்தில் w_ 2 போன்ற வார்த்தையை நிர்ணயிக்கும் வார்த்தையின் பொதுவான இடைவெளியீடுகளை ஒவ்வொரு காலத்திலிர செய்தி கட்டுரைகளின் குறிப்புகளுக்கு ஒரு வழக்கமான குறிப்பு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட போது, நேர வார்த்தை ஆராய்ச்சிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் 'ரானால்ட் ராகன்' 1987 ல் பி", 'ur': "یہ کاغذ موقت کلمات آنلالوژی کا مطلب معلوم کرتا ہے: کلمات کے جوڑے جو زمانہ میں مختلف نقطے میں ایک سیمنٹی جگہ پر مصرف کرتی ہیں. ویڈینگ کی ایک معلوم ویڈینگ کے اموال یہ ہے کہ وہ مثبت کے ساتھ سنتی کلمات آنلوژی موڈل کر سکتے ہیں ('کلمات w_1 'کلمات w_2 'کلمات w_3 'کلمات w_4' کے ذریعہ) ویکتور اضافہ کے ذریعہ۔ یہاں، میں دکھاتا ہوں کہ موقت لفظ آنلالوجی ('word w_ 1 a t time t_ ' is like word w_ 2 at time t_') can be effectively modeled with diachronic word embedding, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space. جب اخبار لاکھوں کے ایک دیاگرنیک کورپوس پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، یہ طریقہ ہے کہ مدتی کلمات آنلوژی کا پہچان سکتا ہے جیسے '1987 میں رانالد ریگن 1997 میں بیل کلینٹن جیسا ہے' یا '1987 میں واکمن 2007 میں iPod جیسا ہے'.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu khái niệm ngôn ngữ thời gian: các cặp chữ luôn chiếm cùng một khoảng ngữ pháp ở các điểm khác nhau trong thời gian. Một tài sản nổi tiếng của sự nhúng tay từ là họ có khả năng mô tả các từ tương tự truyền thống (từ w 1 là từ w 2 như từ w 3 là từ w chữ W* 4) qua sự bổ sung vector. Ở đây, t ôi cho thấy rằng các từ tương tự thời gian (từ w 1 lúc t). cũng giống như từ w\'2 lúc này\'có thể được mô hình bằng sự nhúng từ tương niên, miễn là không gian ghép riêng tư từ mỗi thời gian được biến đổi thích hợp thành một khối vector. Khi được áp dụng vào một tập kết kinh điển của các bài báo, phương pháp này có khả năng xác định các từ thời gian tương tự như "Ronald Reagan in 1987 giống Bill Clinton in 1997", hoặc "Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in Giải phóng.', 'uz': 'Ushbu qogĘ»oz vaqt soĘ»zni analog qiladi: bir necha so\'zlar va har xil vaqtda bitta semantik boĘ»sh joyni boshqaradi. Name Bu yerda, vaqt soĘ»zning analog (\'vaqtda w_ 1\' soĘ»z w_2\' vaqtda ) kabi so\'z va diakronisk soĘ»zning chegaralari bilan modellashi mumkin, agar har vaqtdan foydalanuvchi boĘ»sh joy bir vaqtdan foydalanish mumkin. Vaqt soĘ»zni 1987 yilda "Ronald Reagan" kabi "Bill Clinton" deb aniqlash mumkin, yoki 1987 yilda Walkman 2007 yilda iPod kabi.', 'nl': "Dit artikel introduceert het concept van tijdelijke woordanalogieën: woordparen die dezelfde semantische ruimte op verschillende tijdstippen innemen. Een bekende eigenschap van woord embeddings is dat ze in staat zijn om effectief traditionele woord analogieën te modelleren ('woord w_1 is naar woord w_2 als woord w_3 is naar woord w_4') door vectortoevoeging. Hier laat ik zien dat temporele woordanalogieën ('woord w_1 op tijd t_ is als woord w_2 op tijd t_') effectief gemodelleerd kunnen worden met diachrone woordinbeddingen, mits de onafhankelijke inbeddingsruimten van elke tijdsperiode adequaat worden omgezet in een gemeenschappelijke vectorruimte. Wanneer toegepast op een diachron corpus nieuwsberichten, is deze methode in staat om tijdelijke woordanalogieën te identificeren zoals 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is als Bill Clinton in 1997', of 'Walkman in 1987 is als iPod in 2007'.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя понятието за времеви думи аналогии: двойки думи, които заемат едно и също семантично пространство в различни моменти от времето. Едно добре познато свойство на вграждането на думи е, че те са в състояние ефективно да моделират традиционните думични аналогии ("думата w_1 е дума w_2, а думата w_3 е дума w_4") чрез векторно добавяне. Тук показвам, че времевите думични аналогии ("думата w_1 по време t_ е като думата w_2 по време t_ ") могат ефективно да бъдат моделирани с вградени диахронични думи, при условие че независимите вграждащи пространства от всеки период от време са подходящо трансформирани в общо векторно пространство. Когато се прилага към диахроничен корпус от новини, този метод е в състояние да идентифицира времеви аналогии на думи като "Роналд Рейгън през 1987 г. е като Бил Клинтън през 1997 г." или "Уокман през 1987 г. е като iPod през 2007 г."', 'da': "Denne artikel introducerer begrebet tidslige ordanalogier: par af ord, der optager det samme semantiske rum på forskellige tidspunkter. En velkendt egenskab ved ordindlejringer er, at de effektivt kan modellere traditionelle ordanalogier ('ord w_1 er til ord w_2 som ord w_3 er til ord w_4') gennem vektortilføjelse. Her viser jeg, at tidslige ordanalogier ('ord w_1 på tidspunktet t_ er som ord w_2 på tidspunktet t_ ') effektivt kan modelleres med diakroniske ordindlejringer, forudsat at de uafhængige indlejringsrum fra hver tidsperiode er passende omdannet til et fælles vektorrum. Når den anvendes på et diakronisk korpus af nyhedsartikler, er denne metode i stand til at identificere tidslige ordanalogier såsom 'Ronald Reagan i 1987 er som Bill Clinton i 1997', eller 'Walkman i 1987 er som iPod i 2007'.", 'hr': "Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept privremenih riječi analogija: par riječi koje okupljaju isti semantički prostor u različitim točkama u vremenu. Jedna poznata vlasništvo uključenih riječi je da su u stanju učinkovito modelirati tradicionalne riječi analogije ('riječ w_1 je riječ w_2 kao riječ w_3 je riječ w_4') kroz dodavanje vektora. Ovdje pokazujem da privremene riječi analogije ('riječ w_1 u vrijeme t_ ' je poput riječi w_2 u vrijeme t_') mogu se efikasno modelirati s dijagronskim ugrađenjem riječi, ako se nezavisni ugrađeni prostor iz svakog razdoblja odgovaraju transformirati u zajednički vektorski prostor. Kada se primjenjuje na dijagronski korpus novinskih članaka, ova metoda može identificirati privremene riječi analogije poput 'Ronald Reagan 1987. godine kao Bill Clinton 1997. ili 'Walkman 1987. je kao iPod 2007.", 'id': "Kertas ini memperkenalkan konsep dari analogi kata temporal: pasangan kata yang menguasai ruang semantis yang sama pada titik-titik waktu yang berbeda. Salah satu ciri-ciri yang terkenal dari penyambungan kata adalah bahwa mereka dapat memmodelir secara efektif analogi kata tradisional ('kata w_1 adalah untuk kata w_2 sebagai kata w_3 adalah untuk kata w_4') melalui penambahan vektor. Di sini, saya menunjukkan bahwa analogi kata sementara ('kata w_1 pada waktu t_  seperti kata w_2 pada waktu t_ ') dapat secara efektif dipodelkan dengan penyampaian kata diakronis, dengan syarat bahwa ruang penyampaian independen dari setiap periode waktu yang sesuai diubah menjadi ruang vektor umum. When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt das Konzept der zeitlichen Wortanalogien vor: Wortpaare, die denselben semantischen Raum zu verschiedenen Zeitpunkten einnehmen. Eine bekannte Eigenschaft von Wort-Einbettungen ist, dass sie in der Lage sind, traditionelle Wortanalogien effektiv zu modellieren (\'Wort w_1 ist zu Wort w_2 als Wort w_3 ist zu Wort w_4\') durch Vektoraddition. Hier zeige ich, dass zeitliche Wortanalogien (\'Wort w_1 zum Zeitpunkt t_ wie Wort w_2 zum Zeitpunkt t_\') effektiv mit diachronen Worteinbettungen modelliert werden können, vorausgesetzt, dass die unabhängigen Einbettungsräume aus jeder Zeitspanne angemessen in einen gemeinsamen Vektorraum transformiert werden. Wenn sie auf einen diachronen Korpus von Nachrichtenartikeln angewendet wird, ist diese Methode in der Lage, zeitliche Wortanalogien wie "Ronald Reagan in 1987 ist wie Bill Clinton in 1997" oder "Walkman in 1987 ist wie iPod in 2007" zu identifizieren.', 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaonyesha dhana ya neno la muda wa uchambuzi: maneno mawili ambayo yanashughulikia nafasi hiyo ya kimapenzi kwa wakati tofauti. Utumi mmoja maarufu wa ujumla wa maneno yanayotumiwa ni kwamba wanaweza kufanya mifano ya utamaduni ('word w_1 ni maneno w_2 kama neno w_3 ni maneno w_4') kupitia kuongeza vector. Hapa, ninaonyesha kuwa neno la muda ('neno w_1 kwa wakati w a time_) ni kama neno w_2 kwa wakati wa time_) linaweza kuchukuliwa kwa ufanisi na maneno ya kihistoria, ikiwa nafasi huru za kuingia kutoka kila kipindi hubadilishwa kuwa sehemu ya vector moja kwa moja. When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'.", 'fa': "این کاغذ مفهوم انالوژی کلمه موقتی را معرفی می\u200cکند: جفت کلمه\u200cهایی که همان فضای semantic را در نقطه\u200cهای مختلف در زمان مشغول می\u200cکنند. یک ویژگی شناخته شده از جمع کردن کلمات این است که آنها می توانند از طریق جمع کردن واژه\u200cهای سنتی مدل دهند ('کلمات w_1 به کلمات w_2 به عنوان کلمات w_3 به عنوان کلمات w_4') از طریق جمع کردن واژه\u200cهای سنتی باشند. اینجا نشان می\u200cدهم که آنلوژی\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای موقتی (کلمه w_ 1 در زمان t_) مانند کلمه w_ 2 در زمان t_) می\u200cتوانند با جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای مختلف مدل\u200cسازی شوند، با توجه به این صورت که فضای محافظت وارد کردن مستقل از هر مدت زمانی به طور مناسب به یک فضای ویکتور معمولی تبدیل می\u200cشوند. هنگامی که بر یک مجموعهٔ داستانی از مجموعه\u200cهای اخبار استفاده می\u200cشود، این روش قادر است به شناسایی آنالوژی کلمه\u200cهای موقتی مانند رانالد ریگان در سال 1987 مانند بیل کلینتون در سال ۱۹۹۷ باشد، یا «واکمن در سال ۱۹۹۷ مانند آیپود در سال ۲", 'ko': '본고는 시제어 유비의 개념을 소개했다. 서로 다른 시간점에서 같은 의미 공간을 차지하는 성대어이다.단어가 박혀 있는 모두가 알고 있는 특성 중 하나는 벡터 덧셈을 통해 전통적인 단어의 비례를 효과적으로 모의할 수 있다는 것이다. ("단어 w 1은 단어 w 2이고, 마치 단어 w 3은 단어 w 4와 같다.")여기서 시간대별 독립된 삽입 공간을 공공 벡터 공간으로 적절하게 전환하면 시간 어류비("t\\u시의 단어 w\\u1은 t\\u시의 단어 w\\u2"와 같다)는 시간 단어 삽입으로 모델링을 효과적으로 할 수 있음을 나타낸다.역사적 뉴스 문장 자료 라이브러리에 적용될 때 이 방법은\'1987년의 로나드 리건과 1997년의 빌 클린턴이 비슷했다\',\'1987년의 워킹맨과 2007년의 아이폰이 비슷했다\'는 시간 어휘 비례를 식별할 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër fut konceptin e analogjive të fjalëve temporale: çifte fjalësh që pushtojnë të njëjtin hapësirë semantike në pika të ndryshme të kohës. Një pronësi e njohur e përfshirjeve të fjalëve është se ato janë në gjendje të modelojnë efektivisht analogjitë tradicionale të fjalëve (\'fjala w_1 është për fjalën w_2 si fjala w_3 është për fjalën w_4\') nëpërmjet shtimit të vektorit. Këtu, unë tregoj se analogjitë e fjalëve t ë përkohshme (\'fjala w_1 në kohën t_  është si fjala w_2 në kohën t_ \') mund të modelohen efektivisht me përfshirje të fjalëve diakronike, me kusht që hapësirat e pavarura të përfshirjes nga çdo periudhë kohore janë transformuar në mënyrë të përshtatshme në një hapësirë vektori të përbashkët. Kur aplikohet në një korpus diakronik të artikujve të lajmeve, ky metodë është në gjendje të identifikojë analogjitë e fjalëve të përkohshme të tilla si "Ronald Reagan në 1987 është si Bill Clinton në 1997", ose "Walkman në 1987 është si iPod në 2007".', 'tr': "Bu kagyz temporal s철z analogi첵asyny흫 d체힊체nj체ni g철rkez첵채r: semantik bo첵un챌a wagty흫 be첵leki noktalarynda 첵erle힊첵채n s철zler 체챌in 챌ift. Bir tany힊 kelime eklen첵채n h채si첵eti 힊udyr ki, olar d채pli kelime analogi첵alary흫 eserle힊mesini ba힊arar ('w_1 word is w_2 word as w_3 word is w_4') vekt철r eklen첵채ndir. Bu 첵erde, men wagt s철zleri흫 analogi첵asyny ('w_1 zamanda t_ ' s철zleri흫 첵aly s철zleri흫 t_' s철zleri흫) diakroniki s철zleri흫 giri힊igi bilen me첵ille힊dirilip biler g철rkezip biler, her gezek periyodaky t 채ze ga첵d edilen sele흫leri m체mkin bir vekt철r sele흫e 체첵tgedilir. T채zelikleri흫 diakronik k철p체si 첵agda첵a uygulanan wagt bu 첵agda첵 'Ronald Reagan 1987-nji 첵ylda bil Clinton 첵aly ''1987-nji 첵ylda Walkman 2007-nji 첵ylda iPod 첵aly '.", 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է ժամանակական բառերի նմանությունների գաղափարը' բառերի զույգեր, որոնք տարբեր ժամանակի կետերում նույն սեմանտիկ տարածքը են զբաղվում: Բառերի ներդրման լավ հայտնի հատկությունն այն է, որ նրանք կարողանում են արդյունավետ մոդելավորել ավանդական բառերի նմանությունները ('բառը w_1 է w_2 բառը, քանի որ բառը w_3 է w_4 բառը') վեկտորի ավելացման միջոցով: Այստեղ ես ցույց եմ տալիս, որ ժամանակական բառի նմանությունները ('w_1 բառը ժամանակ t \\ նման է w_2 բառին ժամանակ t \\') կարող են արդյունավետ մոդելավորվել դիաքրոնական բառերի ներդրման միջոցով, եթե յուրաքանչյուր ժամանակաշրջանի անկախ ներդրման տարածքները ճիշտ վերածվում են ընդհանուր վեկտորի տարածքին: Երբ կիրառվում է լրատվական հոդվածների դիաքրոնիկ կորպուսին, այս մեթոդը կարողանում է հայտնաբերել ժամանակական բառերի նմանությունները, ինչպիսիք են 'Ռոնալդ Ռեգանը 1987 թվականին, նման է Բիլ Քլինտոնին 1997 թվականին' կամ 'Ուոլքմանը 1987 թվականին, նման է i", 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer die konsepte van tydelike woord analogies: paar woorde wat dieselfde semantiese spasie in verskillende punte in tyd occupeer. Een goed bekende eienskap van woord inbêding is dat hulle kan effektief tradisionele woord analogies ('woord w_1 is na woord w_2 as woord w_3 is na woord w_4') deur vektor byvoeg. Hier, ek wys dat tydelike woord analogies ('woord w_ 1 op tyd t_  is soos woord w_ 2 op tyd t_') kan effektief met diakroniske woord inbêding modelleer word, voorsien dat die onveilige inbêding spasies van elke tydperk van elke tydperk is toepaslik verander na 'n gemeenskaplike vektor spasie. Wanneer aan 'n diakroniske korpus van nuus artikels aangepas word, kan hierdie metode tydelike woord analogies soos 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 identifiseer soos Bill Clinton in 1997' of 'Walkman in 1987 is soos iPod in 2007'.", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ የጣቢያ ቃላት ምናልዮችን ያስታውሳል፤ በተለየ ሁኔታ በተለያዩ ቦታዎች ላይ የሚቆጠሩ ሁለት ቃላት ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ቃላት አካባቢ Here, I show that temporal word analogies ('word w_1 at time t_  is like word w_2 at time t_ ') can effectively be modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space.  የዜና ጽሑፎች ዳርሞክራሲ በመጠየቅ ጊዜ፣ ይህች ሥርዓት ‹ሮnald Reagan› በ1987 እንደ ቢል ኪሎቶን› ወይም ‹አዋላkman› በ1987 እንደ ኢፓድ ነው፡፡", 'bn': "এই প্রবন্ধে সাময়িক শব্দ বিশ্লেষণের ধারণা উল্লেখ করে: যে শব্দের মধ্যে একই সেমেন্টিক জায়গা বিভিন্ন বিন্দুতে বিভিন্ একটি পরিচিত শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্য হচ্ছে যে তারা কার্যকভাবে ঐতিহ্যবাহী শব্দ বিশ্লেষণের মডেল করতে পারে ('word w_1 is to word w_2 as word w_3 is to word w_4') ভেক্টর যোগ করে শ এখানে আমি দেখাচ্ছি যে স্থায়ীয় শব্দ বিশ্লেষণ ('সময়ে w_1 বাক্যালেজগুলোর ব্যাপারটি টি_২সময় টি_ট_') কার্যকর ভাবে ডায়রোনিক শব্দের বিভিন্ন স্থানের মাধ্যমে মডেল করা যাবে, যদি  When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'.", 'az': "Bu kağıt zamanlı sözlərin analogilərinin məsələsini təşkil edir: zamanla eyni semantik məsafəni müxtəlif nöqtələrdə istifadə edir. Sözlük içərisində tanınmış bir qüvvət vektör əlavəsi ilə növbəti olaraq növbəti kelimelərin analogilərini modellə edə biləcəkləri ('w_1 kelimesi w_2 kelimesi w_3 kelimesi w_4 kelimesi olaraq') deyildir. Burada, mən vəziyyətli söz analogiləri ('w_ 1 zamanda t_ ' sözü w_ 2 zamanda t_ ' sözü kimidir) diakronisk söz inbingləri ilə müfəssəl modellə edilə bilərəm, çünki hər dəfə müəyyən vaxtlardan müstəssəl inbingə məsafələri müəyyən bir vektör məsafəsinə dəyişə bilərlər. Bu metod, 1987-ci Ronald Reagan 1997-ci Bill Clinton kimidir, ya da 1987-ci Walkman 2007-ci iPod kimidir.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse ajalise sõna analoogiate kontseptsiooni: paari sõnu, mis hõivavad sama semantilise ruumi erinevates ajapunktides. Üks tuntud sõnade manustamise omadus on see, et nad suudavad tõhusalt modelleerida traditsioonilisi sõnaloogiaid (\'sõna w_1 on sõna w_2 kui sõna w_3 on sõna w_4\') vektoriliitmise kaudu. Siin näitan, et ajalise sõna analoogiat (\'sõna w_1 ajal t_ on nagu sõna w_2 ajal t_ \') saab efektiivselt modelleerida diakrooniliste sõnade manustamisega, tingimusel et iga ajaperioodi sõltumatud manustamisruumid muudetakse sobivalt ühiseks vektoriruumiks. Kui seda meetodit rakendatakse uudisteartiklite diakroonilise korpuse suhtes, suudab see meetod tuvastada ajaliste sõnade analoogiaid nagu "Ronald Reagan 1987. aastal on nagu Bill Clinton 1997. aastal" või "Walkman 1987. aastal on nagu iPod 2007. aastal".', 'ca': 'Aquest article introdueix el concepte d\'analògies temporals de paraules: parells de paraules que ocupen el mateix espai semàntic en diferents punts del temps. Una propietat coneguda de les integracions de paraules és que són capaços de modelar efectivament analògies tradicionals de paraules (\'paraula w_1 és la paraula w_2 com la paraula w_3 és la paraula w_4\') a través de l\'afecció de vector. Aquí mostro que les analogies temporals de paraules (\'paraula w_1 al moment t_  és com la paraula w_2 al moment t_ \') poden ser modelades efectivament amb incorporacions diacròniques de paraules, a condició que els espais independents d\'incorporació de cada període de temps s\'transformin adequadament en un espai vector comú. Quan s\'aplica a un corpus diacrònic d\'articles de notícies, aquest mètode pot identificar analogies temporals de paraules com "Ronald Reagan el 1987 és com Bill Clinton el 1997", o "Walkman el 1987 és com iPod el 2007".', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee käsitteen ajallisia sanaanalogiat: sanapareja, jotka käyttävät samaa semanttista tilaa eri ajankohtina. Yksi tunnettu sana upotusten ominaisuus on se, että ne pystyvät tehokkaasti mallintamaan perinteisiä sanaanalogiat (\'sana w_1 on sana w_2 kuin sana w_3 on sana w_4\') vektorilisäyksen avulla. Tässä osoitan, että ajallisia sanaanalogiat (\'sana w_1 ajalla t_ on kuin sana w_2 ajalla t_ \') voidaan tehokkaasti mallintaa diakroonisilla sanaupotuksilla edellyttäen, että kunkin ajanjakson itsenäiset upotustilat muunnetaan asianmukaisesti yhteiseksi vektoriavaruudeksi. Kun tätä menetelmää käytetään diakroonisiin uutisartikkeleihin, voidaan tunnistaa ajallisia sanavertauksia, kuten "Ronald Reagan vuonna 1987 on kuin Bill Clinton vuonna 1997" tai "Walkman vuonna 1987 on kuin iPod vuonna 2007".', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje koncept časových slovních analogií: párů slov, které zabírají stejný sémantický prostor v různých časových bodech. Jednou z dobře známých vlastností slovních vložení je, že jsou schopny efektivně modelovat tradiční slovní analogie (\'slovo w_1 je slovo w_2 jako slovo w_3 je slovo w_4\') pomocí vektorového přidání. Zde ukazuji, že časové slovní analogie (\'slovo w_1 v čase t_ je jako slovo w_2 v čase t_\') lze efektivně modelovat s diachronními slovními vloženími za předpokladu, že nezávislé vkládací prostory z každého časového období jsou vhodně transformovány do společného vektorového prostoru. Při aplikaci na diachronický korpus zpravodajských článků je tato metoda schopna identifikovat časové slovní analogie, jako je "Ronald Reagan v 1987 je jako Bill Clinton v 1997", nebo "Walkman v 1987 je jako iPod v 2007".', 'bs': "Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept privremenih riječi analogija: par riječi koje okupljaju isti semantički prostor u različitim točkama u vremenu. Jedna poznata vlasništvo uključenih riječi je da su u stanju učinkovito modelirati tradicionalne analogije riječi ('riječ w_1 je riječ w_2 kao riječ w_3 je riječ w_4') kroz dodavanje vektora. Ovdje pokazujem da je temporalna riječ analogija ('riječ w_1 u vrijeme t_ ' kao riječ w_2 u vrijeme t_') efikasno moguće modelirati s dijagronskim integracijama riječi, ako se nezavisni integracijski prostor iz svakog period a u odgovarajući način pretvara u zajednički vektorski prostor. Kada se primjenjuje na dijagronski korpus novinskih članaka, ova metoda može identificirati temporalne riječi analogije poput 'Ronald Reagan 1987. godine kao Bill Clinton 1997. ili 'Walkman 1987. je kao iPod 2007.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi nggawe kelompok alamat sampeyan: kelompok alat sing dumadhi sematik nang sampeyan titik. 1.2 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggunakaké karo diahronik karo artik balêr, kuwi ngono iso nggawe perkaran kelas ranolèji koyo \'Ronal Reggan\' ning dipunasabé sak \'Bil Cliton\' ning 1997, opo \'Walman ning sak bengko karo ipot ning 2007.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את הרעיון של אנלוגיות מילים זמניות: זוגות מילים שמעסקות באותו מרחב סמנטי בנקודות שונות בזמן. רכוש אחד הידוע היטב של קישומי מילים הוא שהם מסוגלים למדגם באופן יעיל אנלוגיות מילים מסורתיות (\'מילה w_1 היא למילה w_2 כמילה w_3 היא למילה w_4\') דרך הוספת ווקטור. כאן, אני מראה שאנלוגיות מילים זמניות (\'מילה w_1 בזמן t_ ) היא כמו מילה w_2 בזמן t_ \') יכולות להיות דוגמניות באופן יעיל בעזרת קישורים מילים דיאכרוניות, בהנחה שמרחבי קישור עצמאיים מכל תקופה הזמן משתנים באופן מתאים לחלל ווקטור משותף. בשיטה זו מסוגלת לזהות אנלוגיות מילים זמניות כמו "רונלד רייגן ב-1987 הוא כמו ביל קלינטון ב-1997", או "ווקמן ב-1987 הוא כמו iPod ב-2007".', 'sk': 'Prispevek predstavlja koncept časovnih besednih analogij: parov besed, ki zasedajo isti semantični prostor na različnih časovnih točkah. Ena dobro znana lastnost besednih vdelav je, da lahko učinkovito modelirajo tradicionalne besedne analogije ("beseda w_1 je beseda w_2, beseda w_3 je beseda w_4") prek vektorskega dodajanja. Tukaj pokažem, da je časovne analogije besed (\'beseda w_1 v času t_ podobna besedi w_2 v času t_ \') mogoče učinkovito modelirati z diakroničnimi vgradnimi besedami, pod pogojem, da se neodvisni vgradni prostori iz vsakega časovnega obdobja ustrezno pretvorijo v skupni vektorski prostor. Ko se uporablja za diakronični korpus novic, lahko ta metoda identificira časovne analogije besed, kot je "Ronald Reagan leta 1987 je kot Bill Clinton leta 1997" ali "Walkman leta 1987 je kot iPod leta 2007".', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da zaɓen kalmar mai lokaci: nau'i biyu da ke riƙon duk fili na semantic a cikin lokaci daban. Babu wani halin da aka san sune cikin kalmar da aka shigar da su yana iya iya amfani da su motsar masu ƙidãya wa kalmar mai kiɗari ('word w_1 ne zuwa maganar w_2 kamar maganar w_3 ne zuwa maganar w_4') zuwa ƙara sakan. Hali, ina nũna w a fassarar kalmar da aka ƙayyade ('word w_1 a lokacin t_' kamar magana w_2 a lokacin t_') za'a daidaita shi mai amfani da magana wanda ke cikin tsarin diƙaitacce, idan an gaskata filayen da ba'a koma ba, da kuma a shige filayen da ke koma duk lokacin, da haka kuma a shige shi zuwa filin mai gaura. Idan an applied zuwa wani jerin-kure na makala'ar lãbãra, wannan metode yana iya iya iya gane fassarar magana masu ƙayyade kamar 'Ronald readgan in 1987 ne kamar bill clickonton 1997', ko 'Walken in 1987 yana kamar iPod in 2007'.", 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དུས་ཚོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་དག་གི་ལྟ་བུ་སྟོན་འདུག： གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་analogies་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། འདིར་ངའི་ནང་དུ་མཚམས་འཇུག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་analogies ('word w_1 a t time t_ ] is like word w_2 at time t_') can be effectively modeled with diachronic word embeddings, provided that the independent embedding spaces from each time period are appropriately transformed into a common vector space. When applied to a diachronic corpus of news articles, this method is able to identify temporal word analogies such as 'Ronald Reagan in 1987 is like Bill Clinton in 1997', or 'Walkman in 1987 is like iPod in 2007'."}
{'en': 'Methodical Evaluation of Arabic Word Embeddings', 'es': 'Evaluación metódica de la incrustación de palabras en árabe', 'ar': 'التقييم المنهجي لتطريز الكلمة العربية', 'pt': 'Avaliação metódica de incorporações de palavras em árabe', 'fr': 'Évaluation méthodique des intégrations de mots arabes', 'ja': 'アラビア語埋め込みの方法論的評価', 'zh': '阿拉伯词嵌系统评估', 'ru': 'Методическая оценка вложений в арабское слово', 'hi': 'अरबी शब्द एम्बेडिंग का व्यवस्थित मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht Modhúil ar Leabú Focal Araibis', 'el': 'Μεθοδολική αξιολόγηση των ενσωμάτωσης αραβικών λέξεων', 'hu': 'Az arab szóbeágyazások módszertani értékelése', 'ka': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'it': 'Valutazione metodica delle integrazioni di parole arabe', 'kk': 'Араб сөздер ендірудің методикалық оқу', 'lt': 'Metodinis Arabų žodžių įterpimo vertinimas', 'mk': 'Методична евалуација на вклопувањето на арапски зборови', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni Metodika tal-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-Kliem Għarab', 'ml': 'അറബി വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങുകളുടെ മെറ്റോഡിക്കല്\u200d Evaluation', 'ms': 'Evaluasi Metodik Penjelmaan Perkataan Arab', 'mn': 'Араб үгийн нэмж', 'no': 'Metodisk evaluering av arabiske ordinnbygging', 'pl': 'Metodyczna ocena arabskich osadzeń słów', 'ro': 'Evaluarea metodică a încorporărilor cuvintelor arabe', 'sr': 'Методична оценка арабских слова', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Heymiska afka Carabiga', 'sv': 'Metodisk utvärdering av inbäddade arabiska ord', 'ta': 'அரபி வார்த்தை உட்பொதிகளின் முறைமையான evaluation', 'ur': 'عربی کلمات جمڈنگ کے مطابق طریقی ارزش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giám sát nhúng nhúng thánh khí từ A Rập', 'bg': 'Методическа оценка на арабските словни вграждания', 'hr': 'Metodička procjena ulaganja arapskih riječi', 'de': 'Methodische Bewertung von arabischen Word Embeddings', 'nl': 'Methodische evaluatie van Arabische woordinsluitingen', 'ko': '아랍어 단어가 삽입된 시스템 평가', 'da': 'Metodologisk evaluering af indlejringer af arabiske ord', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya Kiarabu ya Matokeo', 'id': 'Evaluasi Metodik Penciptaan Perkataan Arab', 'tr': 'Arabça Kelimleriň Metini Taýýarlama', 'sq': 'Methodical Evaluation of Arabic Word Embeddings', 'af': 'Metodiese Evaluering van Arabske Woord Inbetering', 'hy': 'Արաբական բառերի ներգրավման մեթոդային գնահատումը', 'az': 'Arap칞al캼q S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛rinin Metodik Q캼ymeti', 'fa': 'ارزیابی روش ابزارهای کلمه عربی', 'bn': 'আরবী শব্দের অভিবেদনের মূল্যায়ন', 'bs': 'Metodička procjena integracija arapskih riječi', 'ca': "Evaluació mètodica de l'incorporació de paraules àrabs", 'am': 'Methodical Evaluation of Arabic Word Embeddings', 'et': 'Araabia sõnade manustamise metoodiline hindamine', 'cs': 'Metodické hodnocení arabských slovních vložek', 'fi': 'Arabian sanasulautusten metodinen arviointi', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Metodično ocenjevanje arabskih besednih vdelav', 'he': 'הערכה שיטתית של פיצוי מילים ערבית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཨ་རབ་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Many unsupervised learning techniques have been proposed to obtain meaningful representations of words from text. In this study, we evaluate these various techniques when used to generate Arabic word embeddings. We first build a benchmark for the Arabic language that can be utilized to perform intrinsic evaluation of different word embeddings. We then perform additional extrinsic evaluations of the embeddings based on two NLP tasks.', 'pt': 'Muitas técnicas de aprendizado não supervisionado foram propostas para obter representações significativas de palavras a partir do texto. Neste estudo, avaliamos essas várias técnicas quando usadas para gerar incorporações de palavras em árabe. Primeiro, criamos um benchmark para o idioma árabe que pode ser utilizado para realizar a avaliação intrínseca de diferentes incorporações de palavras. Em seguida, realizamos avaliações extrínsecas adicionais dos embeddings com base em duas tarefas de PNL.', 'es': 'Se han propuesto muchas técnicas de aprendizaje sin supervisión para obtener representaciones significativas de las palabras del texto. En este estudio, evaluamos estas diversas técnicas cuando se utilizan para generar incrustaciones de palabras en árabe. Primero creamos un punto de referencia para el idioma árabe que se puede utilizar para realizar una evaluación intrínseca de diferentes incrustaciones de palabras. A continuación, realizamos evaluaciones extrínsecas adicionales de las incorporaciones en función de dos tareas de PNL.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح العديد من تقنيات التعلم غير الخاضعة للرقابة للحصول على تمثيلات ذات مغزى للكلمات من النص. في هذه الدراسة ، نقوم بتقييم هذه التقنيات المختلفة عند استخدامها لإنشاء زخرفة كلمة عربية. نبني أولاً معيارًا للغة العربية يمكن استخدامه لإجراء تقييم جوهري لحفلات الزفاف المختلفة. نقوم بعد ذلك بإجراء تقييمات خارجية إضافية لحفلات الزفاف بناءً على مهمتين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'fr': "De nombreuses techniques d'apprentissage non supervisé ont été proposées pour obtenir des représentations significatives des mots à partir d'un texte. Dans cette étude, nous évaluons ces différentes techniques lorsqu'elles sont utilisées pour générer des intégrations de mots arabes. Nous créons d'abord une référence pour la langue arabe qui peut être utilisée pour effectuer une évaluation intrinsèque de différents intégrations de mots. Nous effectuons ensuite des évaluations extrinsèques supplémentaires des intégrations sur la base de deux tâches de PNL.", 'hi': 'पाठ से शब्दों के सार्थक प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए कई असुरक्षित सीखने की तकनीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है। इस अध्ययन में, हम अरबी शब्द एम्बेडिंग उत्पन्न करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने पर इन विभिन्न तकनीकों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम पहले अरबी भाषा के लिए एक बेंचमार्क का निर्माण करते हैं जिसका उपयोग विभिन्न शब्द एम्बेडिंग के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन को करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। फिर हम दो एनएलपी कार्यों के आधार पर एम्बेडिंग के अतिरिक्त बाह्य मूल्यांकन करते हैं।', 'ja': 'テキストから単語の意味のある表現を得るために、多くの無教師学習技術が提案されている。この研究では、アラビア語の単語埋め込みを生成するためにこれらのさまざまなテクニックを評価します。まず、異なる単語の埋め込みの固有評価を実行するために利用できるアラビア語のベンチマークを構築します。次に、2つのNLPタスクに基づいて、埋め込みの追加の外部評価を実行します。', 'zh': '既多无督学,以得义单词。 于此论之,吾评生成阿拉伯语单词嵌之异术也。 首为阿拉伯语立一准,可以销异词。 然后以两NLP对嵌额外为评。', 'ru': 'Было предложено много методов самостоятельного обучения для получения значимых представлений слов из текста. В этом исследовании мы оцениваем эти различные методы, когда они используются для создания вложений арабского слова. Сначала мы создаем эталон для арабского языка, который может быть использован для выполнения внутренней оценки различных вложений слов. Затем мы выполняем дополнительные внешние оценки вложений на основе двух задач NLP.', 'ga': 'Moladh go leor teicníochtaí foghlama gan mhaoirseacht chun léirithe bríocha a fháil ar fhocail ón téacs. Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid meastóireacht ar na teicníochtaí éagsúla seo nuair a úsáidtear iad chun leabú focal Araibis a ghiniúint. Tógaimid tagarmharc don teanga Araibis ar dtús is féidir a úsáid chun meastóireacht intreach a dhéanamh ar leabú focal difriúil. Déanaimid meastóireachtaí eistreacha breise ansin ar na neaduithe bunaithe ar dhá thasc NLP.', 'ka': 'ბევრი არსებული სწავლების ტექნოგიები მოძლევა, რომ ტექსტიდან სიტყვების მნიშვნელოვანი გამოყენება. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ ამ განსხვავებული ტექნექციების განსაზღვრება, როდესაც აპაბური სიტყვების შექმნა გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ პირველად აპაბიური ენისთვის ბანქმერი შევქმნით, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება განსხვავებული სიტყვების ინტერნექტური განსაზღვრება. შემდეგ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ დამატებული ექსტრინიკური განსაზღვრებების შესახებ ორი NLP საქმებზე.', 'hu': 'Számos felügyelet nélküli tanulási technikát javasoltak a szövegből származó szavak értelmes ábrázolására. Ebben a tanulmányban ezeket a különböző technikákat értékeljük, amikor arab szóbeágyazásokat hoznak létre. Először olyan referenciaértéket építünk fel az arab nyelvre, amely felhasználható a különböző szóbeágyazások belső értékelésére. Ezután további külső értékeléseket végezünk a beágyazásokról két NLP feladat alapján.', 'el': 'Πολλές τεχνικές μάθησης χωρίς επίβλεψη έχουν προταθεί για την απόκτηση ουσιαστικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων από το κείμενο. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, αξιολογούμε αυτές τις διάφορες τεχνικές όταν χρησιμοποιούνται για την παραγωγή ενσωμάτωσης αραβικών λέξεων. Αρχικά χτίζουμε ένα σημείο αναφοράς για την αραβική γλώσσα που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την εκτέλεση εσωτερικής αξιολόγησης διαφορετικών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Στη συνέχεια, διενεργούμε πρόσθετες εξωτερικές αξιολογήσεις των ενσωματώσεων με βάση δύο εργασίες.', 'it': 'Molte tecniche di apprendimento non supervisionate sono state proposte per ottenere rappresentazioni significative delle parole dal testo. In questo studio, valutiamo queste varie tecniche quando utilizzate per generare incorporazioni di parole arabe. Per prima cosa costruiamo un benchmark per la lingua araba che può essere utilizzato per eseguire una valutazione intrinseca di diverse incorporazioni di parole. Eseguiamo quindi ulteriori valutazioni estrinseche delle incorporazioni basate su due attività NLP.', 'kk': 'Мәтіннен маңызды сөздерді көрсету үшін көптеген оқыту технологиялары ұсынылды. Бұл зерттеулерде араб сөздерді ендіру үшін қолданылатын әртүрлі техникаларды бағалаймыз. Біз біріншіден әртүрлі сөздерді ендіру үшін араб тіліне қолданатын банкмарка құрамыз. Содан кейін екі NLP тапсырмасына негізделген ендірудің қосымша сыртқы оқиғаларын орындаймыз.', 'lt': 'Siekiant iš teksto gauti prasmingus žodžių vaizdus, buvo pasiūlyta daug nepastebimų mokymosi metodų. Šiame tyrime vertiname šiuos įvairius metodus, kai jie naudojami arabų žodžių įterpimui gaminti. Pirmiausia sukuriame arabų kalbos lyginamąjį tašką, kuris gali būti naudojamas atliekant įvairaus žodžio įtraukimo vertinimą. Tuomet atliksime papildomus išorės vertinimus, pagrįstus dviem NLP užduotimis.', 'ms': 'Banyak teknik pembelajaran tidak diawasi telah diusulkan untuk mendapatkan perwakilan perkataan yang bermakna dari teks. Dalam kajian ini, kami menilai teknik-teknik berbeza ini apabila digunakan untuk menghasilkan penyambungan perkataan Arab. Kami pertama-tama membina tanda referensi untuk bahasa Arab yang boleh digunakan untuk melakukan penilaian dalaman bagi penyembedding perkataan yang berbeza. Kemudian kita melakukan penilaian ekstrinsik tambahan dari penyembedding berdasarkan dua tugas NLP.', 'ml': 'സൂക്ഷിച്ചില്ലാത്ത പഠിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dഥ്യ പ് ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അറബി വാക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d അറബി ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് പണിയുന്നു. അത് വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നി പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു NLP ജോലികള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അകത്തേക്കുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'mk': 'Многу ненадгледувани техники за учење се предложени за добивање значајни претставувања на зборовите од текстот. Во оваа студија ги проценуваме овие различни техники кога се користат за генерирање на арапски зборови. Прво изградуваме референтна точка за арапскиот јазик кој може да се искористи за да се изврши внатрешна проценка на различни зборови внатрешни. Потоа спроведуваме дополнителни екстринзички проценки на вклучувањата врз основа на две НЛП задачи.', 'pl': 'Proponowano wiele technik uczenia się bez nadzoru, aby uzyskać znaczące reprezentacje słów z tekstu. W tym badaniu oceniamy te różne techniki stosowane do generowania osadzeń słów arabskich. Najpierw budujemy odniesienie dla języka arabskiego, który może być wykorzystany do wykonywania wewnętrznej oceny różnych osadzeń słów. Następnie wykonujemy dodatkowe zewnętrzne oceny osadzeń w oparciu o dwa zadania NLP.', 'mn': 'Мөн олон суралцах технологиуд текстээс илүү утгатай үгнүүдийг олж авах гэсэн санал болсон. Энэ судалгаанд бид эдгээр олон техникуудыг Араб үг нэмж бий болгохын тулд үнэлдэг. Эхлээд бид араб хэл дээр өөр үгнүүдийн дотор дүгнэлт хийхэд хэрэглэгдэж болно. Дараа нь бид NLP хоёр ажил дээр суурилсан нэмэлт гадаадаг дүгнэлт хийдэг.', 'no': 'Mange ulike læringsteknikkar er foreslått å få meningsrepresentasjonar av ord frå tekst. I denne studien evaluerer vi desse forskjellige teknikke når det er brukt til å laga arabiske ordinnbygging. Vi bygger først ein benchmarke for den arabiske språket som kan brukast for å utføra inntrykk evaluering av ulike ordinnbygging. Vi utfører så ekstrinske evaluering av innbygginga basert på to NLP-oppgåver.', 'mt': 'Ħafna tekniki ta’ tagħlim mhux sorveljati ġew proposti biex jinkisbu rappreżentazzjonijiet sinifikanti ta’ kliem mit-test. F’dan l-istudju, aħna jevalwaw dawn it-tekniki varji meta ntużaw biex jiġġeneraw inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem Għarab. L-ewwel a ħna nibnu punt ta’ riferiment għall-lingwa Għarbija li jista’ jintuża biex twettaq evalwazzjoni intrinsika ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem differenti. Imbagħad nagħmlu evalwazzjonijiet esterni addizzjonali tal-inkorporazzjonijiet ibbażati fuq żewġ kompiti tal-NLP.', 'ro': 'Multe tehnici de învățare nesupravegheate au fost propuse pentru a obține reprezentări semnificative ale cuvintelor din text. În acest studiu, evaluăm aceste tehnici diferite atunci când sunt utilizate pentru a genera încorporări de cuvinte arabe. Mai întâi construim un punct de referință pentru limba arabă care poate fi utilizat pentru a efectua evaluarea intrinsecă a diferitelor încorporări de cuvinte. Apoi efectuăm evaluări extrinsice suplimentare ale încorporărilor pe baza a două sarcini PNL.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි විද්\u200dයාවක් ලිපිනයෙන් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි මේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරවේශය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා අරාබි වචන සිද්ධා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් විද අපි මුලින්ම අරාබි භාෂාව සඳහා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් හදන්න පුළුවන් ඒක වෙනස් වචන සංවිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් ව අපි ඊට පස්සේ NLP වැඩේ දෙකක් අධිරූපයෙන් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් විශ්ලේෂණ අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න.', 'so': 'Waxbarasho badan oo aan la ilaalinayn waxaa loo talo galay in lagu helo noocyo faa’iido ah oo erayo laga soo jeedo qoraal. Waxbarashadan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qalabkan kala duduwan marka loo soo bandhigay hadalka Carabiga. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu dhisnaa qoraal ku qoran afka Carabiga, kaas oo loo isticmaali karo in lagu sameeyo qiimeynta hoose ee hadalka kala duduwan. Markaas waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta dibadda ah oo ku saleysan labo shaqo oo NLP ah.', 'sr': 'Mnoge neodređene tehnike učenja su predložene da dobiju smislene predstave riječi iz teksta. U ovoj studiji, procjenjujemo te različite tehnike kada se koristi za generiranje arapskih reči. Prvo izgradimo kritiku za arapski jezik koji se može iskoristiti kako bi izvršili unutrašnju procjenu različitih rečenica. Onda izvršavamo dodatne ekstrinske procjene ugrađenja na temelju dva zadatka NLP-a.', 'sv': 'Många oövervakade inlärningstekniker har föreslagits för att få meningsfulla representationer av ord från text. I denna studie utvärderar vi dessa olika tekniker när de används för att generera arabiska ord inbäddningar. Vi bygger först ett riktmärke för det arabiska språket som kan användas för att utföra inneboende utvärdering av olika ordinbäddningar. Vi utför sedan ytterligare externa utvärderingar av inbäddningarna baserat på två NLP-uppgifter.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத கற்றல் தொழில்நுட்பம் உரையிலிருந்து வார்த்தைகளுக்கு புரிந்துள இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், இந்த பல தொழில்நுட்பங்களை நாம் மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம் அரபி வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்கு முதலில் நாம் அரபி மொழிக்கு ஒரு பென்க்மேக் கட்டுகிறோம். இது வேறு வார்த்தைகளின் உள்ளடக்கம் பரிசோதிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட பின்னர் நாம் இரண்டு NLP பணிகளை அடிப்படையில் கூடுதல் வெளியேற்ற மதிப்புகளை செய்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'بہت سے غیر قابل تعلیم تکنیک کی پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے کہ لکھوں کی معنی معلوم تعلیم حاصل کریں۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم ان مختلف ٹیکنیکوں کا ارزش کرتے ہیں جب عربی کلمات ابڈینگ پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار عربی زبان کے لئے ایک بنچم مارک بناتے ہیں جو مختلف کلمات ابڈینگ کے داخل ارزش کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم دو NLP کاموں پر بنیاد رکھنے والی انبودینگ کے اضافہ خارجی ارزش کر رہے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Rất nhiều kỹ thuật học không giám sát đã được đề xuất để có được những biểu hiện đầy ý nghĩa từ văn bản. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đánh giá các kỹ thuật này khi được dùng để tạo ra sự nhúng chữ tiếng Ả Rập. Đầu tiên chúng tôi xây dựng một tiêu chuẩn cho ngôn ngữ Á Rập có thể được sử dụng để thực hiện một sự đánh giá nội bộ của từ khác nhau. Sau đó, chúng tôi thực hiện những đánh giá chi tiết bổ sung dựa trên hai công việc.', 'uz': "Quyidagi qoʻllanmagan o'rganish texnologiyani matnning ma'lum so'zlardan foydalanish uchun talab qilinadi. Bu o'qituvda, biz arab so'zlarni yaratishga ishlatayotganda bu har xil teknikolarni qiymatimiz. Birinchi marta biz arab tilga benchmark yaramiz, bu boshqa so'zlarning ichki qiymatni bajarish mumkin. Keyin biz ikki NLP vazifalar asosida qoʻshimcha tashkilotlarni bajaramiz.", 'bg': 'Предложени са много техники за обучение без надзор, за да се получат смислени представи на думи от текста. В това проучване ние оценяваме тези различни техники, когато се използват за генериране на вградени арабски думи. Първо изграждаме еталон за арабския език, който може да се използва за извършване на вътрешна оценка на различни вграждания на думи. След това извършваме допълнителни външни оценки на вгражданията въз основа на две задачи от НЛП.', 'nl': 'Er zijn veel leertechnieken zonder toezicht voorgesteld om betekenisvolle representaties van woorden uit tekst te verkrijgen. In deze studie evalueren we deze verschillende technieken bij het genereren van Arabische woord embeddings. We bouwen eerst een benchmark voor de Arabische taal die kan worden gebruikt om intrinsieke evaluatie van verschillende woord embeddings uit te voeren. Vervolgens voeren we extra extrinsieke evaluaties uit van de embeddings op basis van twee NLP taken.', 'da': 'Mange uautoriserede læringsteknikker er blevet foreslået for at opnå meningsfulde repræsentationer af ord fra tekst. I denne undersøgelse evaluerer vi disse forskellige teknikker, når de bruges til at generere arabiske ord embeddings. Vi bygger først et benchmark for det arabiske sprog, der kan bruges til at udføre iboende evaluering af forskellige ord embeddings. Derefter udfører vi yderligere eksterne evalueringer af indlejringerne baseret på to NLP-opgaver.', 'hr': 'Mnoge neodređene tehnike učenja su predložene kako bi dobili značajne predstave riječi iz teksta. U ovom ispitivanju procjenjujemo te različite tehnike kada se koristi za proizvedenje arapskih riječi. Prvo izgradimo kritiku za arapski jezik koji se može iskoristiti kako bi izvršili unutrašnju procjenu različitih riječi. Onda ćemo izvršiti dodatne ekstrinske procjene ugrađenja na temelju dva zadatka NLP-a.', 'id': 'Banyak teknik pembelajaran tidak diawasi telah diusulkan untuk mendapatkan representation berarti dari kata-kata dari teks. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mengevaluasi berbagai teknik ini ketika digunakan untuk menghasilkan bahasa Arab embedding. Kita pertama-tama membangun benchmark untuk bahasa Arab yang dapat digunakan untuk melakukan evaluasi intrinsik dari pembangunan kata yang berbeda. Kemudian kita melakukan evaluasi ekstrinis tambahan dari embedding berdasarkan dua tugas NLP.', 'de': 'Viele unbeaufsichtigte Lerntechniken wurden vorgeschlagen, um aussagekräftige Darstellungen von Wörtern aus Text zu erhalten. In dieser Studie evaluieren wir diese verschiedenen Techniken, um arabische Worteinbettungen zu generieren. Zunächst erstellen wir einen Benchmark für die arabische Sprache, der verwendet werden kann, um die intrinsische Bewertung verschiedener Worteinbettungen durchzuführen. Anschließend führen wir zusätzliche extrinsische Auswertungen der Einbettungen anhand von zwei NLP-Aufgaben durch.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از تکنیک\u200cهای آموزش غیرقابل تحقیق پیشنهاد داده شده است تا نمایش\u200cهای معنی کلمات را از متن بگیرد. در این مطالعه، ما این تکنیک\u200cهای مختلف را در زمان تولید کردن کلمه عربی ارزش می\u200cدهیم. اولین بار یک نقشه برای زبان عربی ساختیم که می تواند برای انجام ارزیابی داخلی کلمات مختلف استفاده شود. بعدش ارزیابی اضافه\u200cای از ارزیابی\u200cهای بیرونی بر اساس دو کار NLP انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Teknolojia nyingi za kujifunza zisizo sahihi zimependekezwa kupata maoni mengi ya maneno kutoka kwenye maandishi. Katika utafiti huu, tunatathmini mbinu hizi tofauti ambazo zilitumika kutengeneza maneno ya Kiarabu yanayotumika. Kwanza tunajenga bendera kwa lugha ya Kiarabu ambayo inaweza kutumika kufanya uchunguzi wa kina wa maneno tofauti. Kisha tunafanya tathmini za ziada za nje za mabango hayo kwa kutumia kazi mbili za NLP.', 'ko': '텍스트에서 의미 있는 단어 표시를 얻기 위해 사람들은 무감독 학습 기술을 많이 제기했다.이 연구에서 우리는 아랍어 단어를 생성하는 데 사용되는 다양한 기술을 평가했다.우리는 먼저 아랍어를 위한 기준을 세워 서로 다른 단어의 삽입에 대해 내재적인 평가를 할 수 있다.그런 다음 두 개의 NLP 작업을 기반으로 내장에 대한 추가 외부 평가를 수행합니다.', 'tr': 'Köp sany gaýd edilmedik öwrenmek teknikleri metin eden sözleriniň wajyplygyny almak üçin teklip edildi. Bu arada arabça sözleri döretmek üçin ullanýan dürli teknikleri çykýarys. Ilkinji gezek arap dili üçin ullanılabilir, farklı söz integrlerini çykarmak üçin bir benchmark inşa etdik. Sonra NLP iki işine daýanýan çykyş çykyşynyň esasy çykyşyny edip otyrys.', 'af': "Baie onverondersteunde leer teknike is voorgestel om betekenlike voorstellings van woorde van teks te kry. In hierdie studie, ons evalueer hierdie verskillende teknike wanneer gebruik word om Arabiese woord inbêding te genereer. Ons bou eerste 'n benchmark vir die Arabiese taal wat kan gebruik word om binneste evaluering van verskillende woorde inbêding te doen. Ons doen dan ekstrinsiese evaluasies van die inbêding wat op twee NLP-opdragte gebaseer is.", 'sq': 'Shumë teknika mësimi të pazgjidhura janë propozuar për të marrë përfaqësime të kuptueshme të fjalëve nga teksti. Në këtë studim, ne vlerësojmë këto teknika të ndryshme kur përdoren për të gjeneruar përfshirje fjalësh arabe. Ne së pari ndërtojmë një pikë referimi për gjuhën arabe që mund të përdoret për të kryer vlerësimin e brendshëm të përfshirjeve të fjalëve të ndryshme. Pastaj kryejmë vlerësime shtesë ekstreme të përfshirjeve bazuar në dy detyra NLP.', 'az': 'Mətndən anlamlı sözlərin ifadə edilməsi üçün çox təklif edilmişdir. Bu təhsil içində, ərəb sözlərini yaratmaq üçün bu müxtəlif teknikləri değerlendiririk. Biz ilk dəfə ərəbcə dili üçün bir benchmark inşa edirik ki, müxtəlif sözlər inşa edilməsi üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Sonra iki NLP işinə dayanan inbinglərin ekstrinsici değerlendirmələrini yerinə yetiririk.', 'hy': 'Շատ անվերահսկված ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել տեքստից բառերի իմաստալից ներկայացման համար: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք գնահատում ենք այս տարբեր տեխնիկաները, երբ օգտագործվում ենք արաբական բառերի ներգրավման համար: Սկզբում մենք կառուցում ենք արաբական լեզու համեմատական նշան, որը կարող է օգտագործվել տարբեր բառերի ներդրման ներքին գնահատման համար: Այնուհետև մենք կատարում ենք ավելացյալ ներդրման արտաքին գնահատումներ, հիմնված երկու ՆԼՊ խնդիրների վրա:', 'am': 'Many unsupervised learning techniques have been proposed to obtain meaningful representations of words from text.  በዚህ ትምህርት፣ እነዚህን የተለያየ ልዩ ልቦች አረብኛ ቃላትን መፍጠር በተጠቀሙ ጊዜ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ ለቋንቋ የሚጠቀሙትን የልዩ ቃላት ግንኙነት ለማድረግ የሚጠቀሙትን የብረት መጻሕፍት እንሠራለን፡፡ በኋላም ሁለት NLP ስራ በመሠረት የውጭ አዳራሽ ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Mnoge neodređene tehnike učenja su predložene da dobiju smislene predstave riječi iz teksta. U ovoj studiji, procjenjujemo te različite tehnike kada se koristi za stvaranje arapskih riječi. Prvo izgradimo kritiku za arapski jezik koji se može iskoristiti kako bi izvršili unutrašnju procjenu različitih riječi. Onda izvršavamo dodatne ekstrinske procjene ugrađenja na temelju dva zadatka NLP-a.', 'bn': 'অনেক অরক্ষিত শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে টেক্সট থেকে শব্দের অর্থ প্রতিনিধিত্ব পাওয়ার জন্য। এই গবেষণায় আমরা এই বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তিগুলো মূল্যায়ন করি যখন আরবী শব্দের বানানোর জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। আমরা প্রথমে আরবী ভাষার জন্য একটি বেনম্যার্ক তৈরি করি যা ব্যবহার করা যায় বিভিন্ন শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষায় বিশেষ মূ তারপর আমরা দুই এনএলপি কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বাইরে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মূল্য প্রদান করি।', 'ca': "S'han proposat moltes tècniques d'aprenentatge no supervisades per obtenir representacions significatives de paraules del text. En aquest estudi, evaluem aquestes tècniques quan es fan servir per generar integracions de paraules àrabs. We first build a benchmark for the Arabic language that can be utilized to perform intrinsic evaluation of different word embeddings.  Després fem evaluacions extrinsiques adicionals de les integracions basades en dues tasques del NLP.", 'cs': 'Pro získání smysluplných reprezentací slov z textu bylo navrženo mnoho technik učení bez dozoru. V této studii hodnotíme tyto různé techniky při generování arabských slov vložení. Nejprve vytvoříme referenční měřítko pro arabský jazyk, které lze použít k provedení vnitřního vyhodnocení různých vložení slov. Následně provádíme další extrinzické hodnocení vložení na základě dvou NLP úloh.', 'fi': 'Monia valvomattomia oppimistekniikoita on ehdotettu, jotta tekstistä saataisiin mielekkäitä ilmaisuja. Tässä tutkimuksessa arvioimme näitä erilaisia tekniikoita, kun niitä käytetään arabiankielisten sanaupotusten tuottamiseen. Aluksi rakennamme arabian kielelle vertailukohdan, jota voidaan hyödyntää erilaisten sanaupotusten luontaiseen arviointiin. Tämän jälkeen suoritamme upotusten ulkoisia arviointeja kahden NLP-tehtävän perusteella.', 'et': 'Tekstist on välja pakutud mitmeid järelevalveta õppemeetodeid, et saada sõnade sisulisi esitusi. Selles uuringus hindame neid erinevaid tehnikaid, kui neid kasutatakse araabia sõna manustamiseks. Esmalt ehitame araabia keele võrdlusaluse, mida saab kasutada erinevate sõnade manustamise sisemiseks hindamiseks. Seejärel teostame manustamise täiendavaid välishindamisi kahe NLP ülesande põhjal.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé teknik sing ora nggawe nesaturan akeh luwih dumadhi kanggo ngerasai gambar kelangan langgar kuwi teks. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné asserti kuwi tindakan kadalah teknik sing koyotokno kanggo ngewat ujaran pangan arab. Awak dhéwé nggawe bendhèwèké kanggo nggawe barang arap sing bisa ngejaraké perusahaan kanggo nggunakaké ujaran kuwi mbang-ujaran. Awak dhéwé ngerti cara-cara sing luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilangno cara NLP iki.', 'he': 'טכניקות למידה רבות לא מעוקבות הציעו כדי להשיג מייצגים משמעותיים של מילים מהטקסט. במחקר הזה, אנו מעריכים את הטכניקות השונים האלה כשמשתמשים לייצר מילים ערביות. אנחנו קודם בונים רמז לשפה הערבית שאפשר להשתמש בו כדי לבצע עריכה פנימית של מילים שונות. ואז אנחנו מבצעים ערכות חיצונייות נוספות של התכניות בהתבסס על שתי משימות NLP.', 'ha': "An buƙata masu yawa masu shiryuwa da shiryoyin ayuka da ba'a tsare ba, dõmin a sami wasu shiryoyin ayuka daga matsayin. In this study, we evaluate these various techniques when used to generate Arabic word embeddings.  Tuna samar da wani littãfi wa harshe na Larabci wanda za'a yi amfani da shi dõmin a cika ƙidãya ga kalmõmi masu buƙata. Sa'an nan kuma Muke cika ƙidãya da ke cikin aikin nan biyu na NLP.", 'sk': 'Za pridobitev smiselnih predstavitev besed iz besedila so bile predlagane številne tehnike učenja brez nadzora. V tej študiji smo ocenili te različne tehnike pri ustvarjanju arabskih besed vdelav. Najprej zgradimo merilo za arabski jezik, ki ga lahko uporabimo za izvedbo notranjega vrednotenja različnih besednih vdelav. Nato izvajamo dodatne zunanje vrednotenje vdelav na podlagi dveh nalog NLP.', 'bo': 'སྐྱོན་རྗེས་མེད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གཞས་ཚིའི་ངོ་མ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཕྱོགས་སྐོར་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ར عرབ་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་དག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་ཨའི་རིགས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གསལ་རྗེས་ཁ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་ འོན་ཀྱང་། NLP ལས་ཀ་གཉིས་རྟེན་ནས་སྦྱར་བའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་extrinsic evaluations གཞན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Connotation Frames : A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'ar': 'إطارات دلالات متعددة اللغات: دراسة حالة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي لتحليل وتوقع المشاعر المستهدفة', 'fr': 'Cadres de connotation multilingues\xa0: une étude de cas sur les réseaux sociaux pour une analyse et une prévision ciblées des sentiments', 'es': 'Marcos de connotación multilingües: un estudio de caso en las redes sociales para el análisis y pronóstico de sentimientos específicos', 'pt': 'Quadros de conotação multilíngue: um estudo de caso sobre mídias sociais para análise e previsão de sentimentos direcionados', 'ja': '多言語コノテーションフレーム：ターゲットを絞った感情分析と予測のためのソーシャルメディアのケーススタディ', 'zh': '多言涵框架:基于社交媒体针对性情析占例', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी अर्थ फ्रेम्स: लक्षित भावना विश्लेषण और पूर्वानुमान के लिए सोशल मीडिया पर एक केस स्टडी', 'ru': 'Многоязычные рамки коннотации: тематическое исследование социальных сетей для анализа и прогнозирования целевых настроений', 'ga': 'Frámaí Connotation Ilteangacha: Cás-Staidéar ar na Meáin Shóisialta le haghaidh Anailís agus Réamhaisnéis Spriocdhírithe', 'ka': 'Multilingual Connotation Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű összekapcsolási keretek: esettanulmány a közösségi médiáról a célzott érzelmek elemzéséhez és előrejelzéséhez', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσικά πλαίσια σύνδεσης: Μια μελέτη περίπτωσης στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης για στοχευμένη ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και πρόβλεψη', 'it': 'Quadri di connotazione multilingue: un caso di studio sui social media per analisi e previsioni mirate dei sentimenti', 'mk': 'Мултијазични коннотациски рамки: Студија на случаи за социјалните медиуми за анализа и прогноза на насочени чувства', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілдерді таңдау фреймдері: Мақсатты уақытты анализ және таңдау үшін әлеуметтік медиақтарды оқу', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbės konnotacijos sistemos: Socialinės žiniasklaidos tyrimas, skirtas tikslinei jautrumo analizei ir prognozei', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Qafas ta’ Konnotazzjoni Multilingwi: Studju ta’ Każijiet dwar il-Midja Soċjali għall-Analiżi u t-Tbassir tas-Sentiment immirati', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ കോണ്\u200dടോട്ടേഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമുകള്\u200d: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d ഒരു കേസ് സ്റ്റൌണ്ടി സ്റ്റൂട്ടി ചെയ്യുക', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний тодорхойлолтын хэлбэрүүд: Нийгмийн мэдээллийн судалгаа зориулсан мэдээллийн хувьд', 'no': 'Fleirspråkskjenneramme: Eit tilfeldig undersøking om sosialmedia for målsettingsanalyser og forhåndsvising', 'ro': 'Cadre de conectare multilingvă: un studiu de caz pe rețelele sociale pentru analiza și prognoza sentimentelor țintite', 'sr': 'Višejezički okvir konnotacije: Istraživanje slučaja o socijalnim medijima za ciljnu analizu i prognozu', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne ramy konotacji: studium przypadku mediów społecznościowych dla ukierunkowanej analizy sentymentów i prognozy', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවික සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරමාණය: සාමාජික මිඩියාව සඳහා සාමාජික විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'so': 'Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Targed Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'ta': 'பல மொழி இணைப்பு சட்டங்கள்:', 'sv': 'Flerspråkiga kopplingsramar: En fallstudie på sociala medier för riktad känsloanalys och prognos', 'ur': 'Multilingual Connotation Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'uz': 'Bir nechta aloqa freymlar: Shaxsiy Sentiment Analysis va Forecast', 'vi': 'Phim đa ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ học về phương tiện xã hội phân tích tâm lý phân tích tâm học', 'bg': 'Многоезични рамки за конотация: казус на социалните медии за целенасочен анализ и прогноза на сентимента', 'nl': 'Meertalige connotatiekaders: een casestudy op sociale media voor gerichte sentimentanalyse en voorspelling', 'hr': 'Višejezički okvir izjave: Istraživanje slučaja o socijalnim medijima za ciljnu analizu i prognozu', 'da': 'Flersprogede sammenkoblingsrammer: Et casestudie på sociale medier til målrettet følelsesanalyse og prognose', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Connotationsrahmen: Eine Fallstudie zu Social Media für gezielte Stimmungsanalyse und Prognose', 'fa': 'چشمه\u200cهای تعریف زیادی زبان: یک مطالعه پرونده در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برای تحلیل و پیش\u200cبینی موجود', 'id': 'Bingkai Connotasi Berbahasa: Sebuah Penelitian Kasus tentang Media Sosial untuk Analisi Sentimen Bersasaran dan Forecast', 'ko': '다언어적 의미 구조: 맞춤형 정서 분석과 예측을 위한 소셜 미디어 사례 연구', 'sw': 'Uhusiano wa lugha mbalimbali: Utafiti wa kesi kwenye mitandao ya kijamii kwa Uchambuzi na Matokeo', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli düşündirim Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'af': "Veelvuldige Konnotasie Raams: ' n Kas Besoeking op sosiale Media vir Teëlte Sentiment Analisie en Voorwerp", 'am': 'የቋንቋ አቀማመጥ ፍሬዎች: A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'sq': 'Kornizat shumëgjuhësore të konnotacionit: Një studim rasti mbi mediat sociale për analizën dhe parashikimin e ndjenjave të synuara', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու կոնոտացիոն շրջանակներ. Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների դեպքերի ուսումնասիրություն նպատակային զգացմունքների վերլուծության և կանխատեսման համար', 'bn': 'বহুভাষার সংযোগ ফ্রেম: সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে একটি মামলা গবেষণা বিশ্লেষণ এবং ভবিষ্যৎ', 'az': 'Multilingual Connotation Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Target Sentiment Analysis and Forecast', 'bs': 'Višejezički okvir izjave: Istraživanje slučaja o socijalnim medijima za ciljnu analizu i prognozu', 'ca': "Marcs de connotació multilingües: Un estudi de cas sobre mitjans socials per a l'anàlisi i previsió de sentiments mirats", 'cs': 'Vícejazyčné konotační rámce: Případová studie sociálních médií pro cílenou analýzu sentimentů a předpověď', 'et': 'Mitmekeelsed koostööraamistikud: sotsiaalmeedia juhtumiuuring suunatud tunnete analüüsi ja prognoosi jaoks', 'fi': 'Monikieliset conotation frames: tapaustutkimus sosiaalisesta mediasta kohdennettua tunteiden analysointia ja ennusteita varten', 'jv': 'Multilanguage connotetion frame: A Case Learning on Digital Media for Targeded Sentiment Test and Forward', 'sk': 'Večjezični okviri povezovanja: študija primera socialnih medijev za ciljno analizo in napoved sentimenta', 'he': 'מסגרי זיהוי רבות שפות: מחקר מקרים על מדיה חברתית עבור ניתוח תחושה ומטרה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Multilingual Connotation Frames: A Case Study on Social Media for Targeted Sentiment Analysis and Forecast'}
{'en': 'People around the globe respond to major real world events through social media. To study targeted public sentiments across many languages and geographic locations, we introduce multilingual connotation frames : an extension from English connotation frames of Rashkin et al. (2016) with 10 additional European languages, focusing on the implied sentiments among event participants engaged in a frame. As a case study, we present large scale analysis on targeted public sentiments toward salient events and entities using 1.2 million multilingual connotation frames extracted from Twitter.', 'ar': 'يستجيب الأشخاص في جميع أنحاء العالم لأحداث العالم الحقيقي الكبرى من خلال وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. لدراسة المشاعر العامة المستهدفة عبر العديد من اللغات والمواقع الجغرافية ، نقدم إطارات دلالات متعددة اللغات: امتداد من إطارات الدلالة الإنجليزية لراشكين وآخرون. (2016) مع 10 لغات أوروبية إضافية ، مع التركيز على المشاعر الضمنية بين المشاركين في الحدث المنخرطين في إطار. كدراسة حالة ، نقدم تحليلاً واسع النطاق للمشاعر العامة المستهدفة تجاه الأحداث والكيانات البارزة باستخدام 1.2 مليون إطار دلالات متعدد اللغات مستخرج من Twitter.', 'es': 'Personas de todo el mundo responden a los principales eventos del mundo real a través de las redes sociales. Para estudiar los sentimientos públicos específicos en muchos idiomas y ubicaciones geográficas, introducimos marcos de connotación multilingües: una extensión de los marcos de connotación en inglés de Rashkin et al. (2016) con 10 idiomas europeos adicionales, centrándose en los sentimientos implícitos entre los participantes del evento que participan en un marco. Como estudio de caso, presentamos un análisis a gran escala de los sentimientos públicos dirigidos hacia eventos y entidades destacados utilizando 1,2 millones de marcos de connotación multilingües extraídos de Twitter.', 'fr': "Des personnes du monde entier répondent aux grands événements du monde réel par le biais des réseaux sociaux. Pour étudier les sentiments du public ciblé dans de nombreuses langues et zones géographiques, nous introduisons des cadres de connotation multilingues\xa0: une extension des cadres de connotation anglais de Rashkin et al. (2016) avec 10 langues européennes supplémentaires, en mettant l'accent sur les sentiments implicites parmi les participants à un événement engagés dans un cadre. En tant qu'étude de cas, nous présentons une analyse à grande échelle des sentiments publics ciblés à l'égard d'événements et d'entités marquants à l'aide de 1,2 million de cadres de connotation multilingues extraits de Twitter.", 'pt': 'Pessoas em todo o mundo respondem a grandes eventos do mundo real por meio das mídias sociais. Para estudar os sentimentos públicos direcionados em muitos idiomas e localizações geográficas, apresentamos quadros de conotação multilíngues: uma extensão dos quadros de conotação em inglês de Rashkin et al. (2016) com 10 idiomas europeus adicionais, com foco nos sentimentos implícitos entre os participantes do evento envolvidos em um quadro. Como estudo de caso, apresentamos uma análise em larga escala dos sentimentos públicos direcionados a eventos e entidades relevantes usando 1,2 milhão de frames de conotação multilíngue extraídos do Twitter.', 'ja': '世界中の人々がソーシャルメディアを通じて現実世界の大きな出来事に対応しています。多くの言語と地理的位置にわたるターゲットを絞った世間の感情を研究するために、私たちは多言語の意味づけのフレームを導入します。これは、Rashkin et al .( 2016)の英語の意味づけのフレームから、フレームに関わるイベント参加者の暗示的な感情に焦点を当てた10のヨーロッパの言語を追加したものです。ケーススタディとして、私たちはTwitterから抽出した120万の多言語の意味合いフレームを使用して、顕著な事象およびエンティティに対するターゲットを絞った一般的な感情に関する大規模な分析を提示します。', 'hi': 'दुनिया भर के लोग सोशल मीडिया के माध्यम से प्रमुख वास्तविक दुनिया की घटनाओं का जवाब देते हैं। कई भाषाओं और भौगोलिक स्थानों पर लक्षित सार्वजनिक भावनाओं का अध्ययन करने के लिए, हम बहुभाषी अर्थ फ्रेम पेश करते हैं: 10 अतिरिक्त यूरोपीय भाषाओं के साथ रैश्किन एट अल (2016) के अंग्रेजी अर्थ फ्रेम से एक विस्तार, एक फ्रेम में लगे घटना प्रतिभागियों के बीच निहित भावनाओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना। एक मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में, हम ट्विटर से निकाले गए 1.2 मिलियन बहुभाषी अर्थ फ्रेम का उपयोग करके प्रमुख घटनाओं और संस्थाओं की ओर लक्षित सार्वजनिक भावनाओं पर बड़े पैमाने पर विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'zh': '世界各地者社交媒体以应世事。 多言地位针对性公众情,引入多言涵框架:从Rashkin等(2016)英语涵框架广为别10种欧洲语,重点关框架参与者隐情。 为例究之,取 Twitter 中 120 万个多言涵框架,大析针对性众情。', 'ru': 'Люди во всем мире реагируют на крупные события в реальном мире через социальные сети. Для изучения адресных общественных настроений во многих языках и географических местоположениях мы вводим многоязычные рамки коннотации: расширение от английских рамок коннотации Рашкина и др. (2016) с 10 дополнительными европейскими языками, фокусируясь на подразумеваемых чувствах среди участников мероприятия, занятых в рамках. В качестве тематического исследования мы представляем широкомасштабный анализ адресных общественных настроений по отношению к значимым событиям и сущностям с использованием 1,2 миллиона многоязычных фреймов коннотации, извлеченных из Twitter.', 'ga': 'Freagraíonn daoine ar fud na cruinne d’imeachtaí móra an domhain trí na meáin shóisialta. Chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar dhearcthaí poiblí spriocdhírithe thar go leor teangacha agus suíomhanna geografacha, tugaimid isteach frámaí connotation ilteangacha: síneadh ó frámaí connotation Béarla de Rashkin et al. (2016) le 10 dteanga Eorpacha bhreise, ag díriú ar na mothúcháin intuigthe i measc rannpháirtithe na n-imeachtaí atá i mbun fráma. Mar chás-staidéar, cuirimid i láthair anailís mhórscála ar dhearcthaí spriocdhírithe an phobail i leith imeachtaí suntasacha agus eintitis shuntasaigh ag baint úsáide as 1.2 milliún fráma connotation ilteangach a bhaintear as Twitter.', 'hu': 'Az emberek világszerte válaszolnak a nagy valós eseményekre a közösségi médián keresztül. Annak érdekében, hogy számos nyelven és földrajzi helyen célzott közvéleményt tanulmányozzunk, többnyelvű konnotációs kereteket vezetünk be: a Rashkin et al. (2016) angol konnotációs kereteinek kiterjesztése 10 további európai nyelvvel, amelyek az esemény résztvevőinek egy keretben részt vevő hallgatólagos érzelmeire összpontosítanak. Esettanulmányként nagyszabású elemzést mutatunk be a kiemelkedő eseményekkel és entitásokkal szembeni célzott közvéleményekről, 1,2 millió többnyelvű konnotációs keretet használva a Twitterről.', 'el': 'Οι άνθρωποι σε όλο τον κόσμο ανταποκρίνονται σε σημαντικά γεγονότα του πραγματικού κόσμου μέσω των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Για να μελετήσουμε στοχευμένα δημόσια συναισθήματα σε πολλές γλώσσες και γεωγραφικές τοποθεσίες, εισάγουμε πολυγλωσσικά πλαίσια συμβολισμού: μια επέκταση από τα αγγλικά πλαίσια συμβολισμού του Ρασκίν κ.α. (2016) με δέκα επιπλέον ευρωπαϊκές γλώσσες, εστιάζοντας στα υπονοούμενα συναισθήματα μεταξύ των συμμετεχόντων της εκδήλωσης που εμπλέκονται σε ένα πλαίσιο. Ως μελέτη περίπτωσης, παρουσιάζουμε ανάλυση μεγάλης κλίμακας για στοχευμένα δημόσια συναισθήματα προς σημαντικά γεγονότα και οντότητες χρησιμοποιώντας 1,2 εκατομμύρια πολυγλωσσικά πλαίσια συμβολισμού που εξάγονται από το Twitter.', 'ka': 'ადამიანები მსოფლიოში სამყარო მსოფლიო მოვლენებისთვის გარეგენება. თუ რამდენიმე ენები და გეგოგოგიური ადგილზე მიღებული საზოგადოებო სენტიმენტების გასწავლებისთვის, ჩვენ მრავალენგური კონნოტიაციის ფრამების გასწავლავთ: ანგლისური კონოტიაციის ფრამების გასრულება Rashkin et al. (2016) ახალი ა როგორც კითხვაში, ჩვენ გვეყვანეთ დიდი მაგალითი ანალიზი სახელსაწინო სტატიმენტების შესახებ, რომელიც სახელსაწინო მოვლენებისთვის და ინტერტიებისთვის გამოყენებული 1,2', 'it': "Le persone di tutto il mondo rispondono ai principali eventi del mondo reale attraverso i social media. Per studiare i sentimenti pubblici mirati in molte lingue e località geografiche, introduciamo cornici di connotazione multilingue: un'estensione dai frame di connotazione inglese di Rashkin et al. (2016) con altre 10 lingue europee, concentrandosi sui sentimenti impliciti tra i partecipanti all'evento impegnati in un frame. Come caso di studio, presentiamo analisi su larga scala sui sentimenti pubblici mirati verso eventi ed entità salienti utilizzando 1,2 milioni di fotogrammi di connotazione multilingue estratti da Twitter.", 'lt': 'Žmonės visame pasaulyje per socialinę žiniasklaidą reaguoja į svarbiausius realiojo pasaulio įvykius. Siekiant ištirti tikslinius visuomenės jausmus įvairiose kalbose ir geografinėse vietose, įvedame daugiakalbes konnotacijos sistemas: išplėtimą iš anglų konnotacijos sistemų Rashkin et al. (2016 m.) su 10 papildomų Europos kalbų, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant numatomiems jausmums tarp renginių dalyvių, dalyvaujančių programoje. Atliekant atvejų tyrimą pristatome didelę visuomenės požiūrio į svarbius įvykius ir subjektus analizę, naudojančią 1,2 mln. daugiakalbių konnotacijų sistemų, gautų iš Twitter.', 'kk': 'Әлемдегі адамдар әлемдегі әлемдегі маңызды оқиғаларға әрекет береді. Көпшілік тілдер мен географиялық орналасуындағы көпшілік сезімдерді зерттеу үшін біз көпшілік коннотациялық фреймдерді келтіреміз: Ағылшынша коннотациялық фреймдерінен Рашкин et al. (2016) 10 қосымша Еуропалық тілдері бар, оқиғаларды Оқиғаларды зерттеу үшін, біз Твиттерден таратылған 1,2 миллион көп тілдік коннотациялық фреймдерді қолдану үлкен мақсатты көпшілік сезімдерді жасап көрдік.', 'ms': 'Orang-orang di seluruh dunia bertindak balas kepada peristiwa dunia nyata besar melalui media sosial. Untuk mempelajari perasaan awam yang ditujukan melalui banyak bahasa dan lokasi geografik, kami memperkenalkan bingkai konnotasi berbilang bahasa: sambungan dari bingkai konnotasi Inggeris Rashkin et al. (2016) dengan 10 bahasa Eropah tambahan, fokus pada perasaan yang termasuk di antara peserta peristiwa yang terlibat dalam bingkai. Sebagai kajian kes, kami mempersembahkan analisis skala besar tentang perasaan awam sasaran terhadap peristiwa dan entiti yang penting menggunakan 1.2 juta bingkai konnotasi berbilang bahasa yang dikeluarkan dari Twitter.', 'ml': 'ലോകം ചുറ്റുമുള്ള ആളുകള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രതികരിക്കുന്നു. സാമൂഹിക മീഡി പല ഭാഷകളിലും ഭൂഗ്രാഫിക സ്ഥലങ്ങളിലും ലക്ഷ്യമുള്ള പൊതു വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളുടെയും കോണ്\u200dട്രോട്ടെഷന്\u200dറ് ഫ്രെയിമില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: ഇംഗ്ലീഷി ഒരു കേസ് പഠനത്തിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d, ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്ന് പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മില്ല്യണ്\u200d മില്ല്യന്\u200d കോണ്\u200dട്ടിക്കേഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പു', 'mk': 'Луѓето низ целиот свет одговараат на големите настани во реалниот свет преку социјалните медиуми. За да студираме насочени јавни чувства низ многу јазици и географски локации, воведуваме мултијазични коннотациски рамки: проширување од англиски коннотациски рамки на Рашкин и други (2016) со 10 дополнителни европски јазици, фокусирајќи се на имплицираните чувства меѓу учесниците на настаните вклучени во рамка Како случајна студија, претставуваме голема анализа на насочени јавни чувства кон познати настани и ентитети користејќи 1,2 милиони мултијазички коннотациски рамки извадени од Твитер.', 'mt': 'In-nies madwar id-dinja jirrispondu għall-avvenimenti ewlenin tad-dinja reali permezz tal-midja soċjali. Biex nistudjaw is-sentimenti pubbliċi mmirati f’ħafna lingwi u postijiet ġeografiċi, a ħna nintroduċu oqfsa ta’ konnotazzjoni multilingwi: estensjoni mill-oqfsa ta’ konnotazzjoni Ingliża ta’ Rashkin et al. (2016) b’10 lingwi Ewropej addizzjonali, li jiffokaw fuq is-sentimenti implikati fost il-parteċipanti tal-avvenimenti involuti f’qafas. Bħala studju ta’ każ, qed nippreżentaw analiżi fuq skala kbira dwar sensazzjonijiet pubbliċi mmirati lejn avvenimenti u entitajiet salienti li jużaw 1.2 miljun qafas ta’ konnotazzjoni multilingwi estratti minn Twitter.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн ертөнцийн хүмүүс нийгмийн мэдээллийн хувьд үндсэн ертөнцийн үйл явдлыг хариулж байна. Олон хэл болон географик байр сургалтын мэдрэмжүүдийг судлах үед олон хэлний коннотацийн фрэймүүд бий болгодог: Рашкин и аль хэлний Англи хэлний коннотацийн фрэймүүдийн нэмэлт нэмэлт нэмэлт 10 Европын хэлнүүд бөгөөд үйл явц оролцогчдын хоорондын мэдрэмжүүди Мэдээж судалгааны хувьд бид Твиттерээс гаргасан олон хэлний коннотацийн фреймүүдийг ашиглаж байгаа нийтийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай том хэмжээний шинжилгээг үзүүлнэ.', 'no': 'Folk rundt verden svarar på store verdshendingar gjennom sosiale media. For å studera målt offentlige følelser på mange språk og geografiske stader, introduserer vi fleirspråk konnotasjonsrammer: eit utviding frå engelske konnotasjonsrammer i Rashkin et al. (2016) med 10 tillegg europeiske språk, som fokuserer på dei impliserte følelsene mellom hendingar som deltakarar i eit ramme. Som ein tilfeldige studie, presenterer vi store skalanalyser om målte offentlige følelser mot salient hendingar og einingar med 1,2 millioner fleirspråk konnotasjonsrammer utpakka frå Twitter.', 'pl': 'Ludzie na całym świecie reagują na najważniejsze wydarzenia w realnym świecie za pośrednictwem mediów społecznościowych. Aby zbadać ukierunkowane nastroje społeczne w wielu językach i lokalizacjach geograficznych, wprowadzamy wielojęzyczne ramy konotacji: rozszerzenie angielskich ram konotacji Raszkin et al. (2016) o dziesięć dodatkowych języków europejskich, koncentrujące się na dorozumianych sentymentach wśród uczestników wydarzenia zaangażowanych w ramę. W ramach studium przypadku przedstawiamy szeroką skalę analizę ukierunkowanych nastrojów publicznych wobec ważnych wydarzeń i podmiotów wykorzystujących 1,2 milion wielojęzycznych ram konotacji wydobytych z Twittera.', 'ro': 'Oamenii din întreaga lume răspund la evenimente majore din lumea reală prin intermediul rețelelor sociale. Pentru a studia sentimentele publice specifice în multe limbi și locații geografice, introducem cadre de conotație multilingvă: o extensie din cadrele de conotație engleză ale lui Rashkin et al. (2016) cu 10 limbi europene suplimentare, concentrându-se pe sentimentele implicite ale participanților la eveniment implicați într-un cadru. Ca studiu de caz, prezentăm o analiză la scară largă a sentimentelor publice orientate spre evenimente și entități importante, folosind 1,2 milioane de cadre de conotație multilingvă extrase de pe Twitter.', 'si': 'ලෝකයේ මිනිස්සුන් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න To study Targeded Public Senensions over a lot of language and geographic locations, we Introspect Multilanguage Connotion freems: an extraction from English Connote frees of Rashin et al. (2016) with 10 extra EUROPEAN භාෂාවන්, focus on the imputed Senensions of the case partipartipartipartints engaging in a form. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට, අපි ලොකු විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ ජනතාවික සැකසුම් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'so': 'Dadka dunida ku wareegsan waxay ka jawaabaan dhacdooyinka caalamiga ee runta ah ee ku dhex jira mitandada bulshada. Si a an u barano fikirrada dadweynaha oo ku qoran luuqado badan iyo goobaha geographicyada, waxaan soo bandhigaynaa kooxaha la xiriira luuqadaha kala duduwan: koritaanka afka ingiriisiga ee Rashkin et al. (2016) waxay leeyihiin 10 luuqadood oo kale oo Yurub ah, oo ku kalsoonaadaan xisaabta la xiriira marka ay dhacdo kuwa ka qayb galay. Sida waxbarashada xaalada ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa baaritaan aad u weyn oo ku saabsan fikirrada dadweynaha oo la hagaajiyey dhacdooyinka dhibaatada iyo waxyaabaha la isticmaalayo 1,2 milyan qofood oo luuqadaha kala duduwan oo Twitterka ka soo baxay.', 'sr': 'Ljudi širom svijeta reaguju na velike stvarne događaje svijeta kroz društvene medije. Da bi proučavali ciljane javne osjećaje na mnogim jezicima i geografskim lokacijama, predstavljamo višejezičke konnotacione okvire: proširenje od engleskih konnotacionih okvira Rashkin et al. (2016) sa 10 dodatnih evropskih jezika, fokusiranje na implicirane osjećaje među sudionicima događaja koji su učestvovali u okviru. Kao istraživanje slučajeva, predstavljamo veliku skalu analize o ciljanim javnim osjećajima prema salijanim događajima i entitetima koristeći 1,2 miliona višejezičkih konnotacijskih okvira izvedenih iz Twitter.', 'sv': 'Människor runt om i världen svarar på stora verkliga händelser via sociala medier. För att studera riktade känslor för allmänheten på många språk och geografiska platser introducerar vi flerspråkiga konnotationsramar: en förlängning från engelska konnotationsramar av Rashkin et al. (2016) med ytterligare 10 europeiska språk, med fokus på de underförstådda känslorna bland evenemangsdeltagarna engagerade i en ram. Som en fallstudie presenterar vi storskalig analys av riktade offentliga känslor mot viktiga händelser och enheter med hjälp av 1,2 miljoner flerspråkiga konnotationsramar hämtade från Twitter.', 'ta': 'உலகின் சுற்றியுள்ள மக்கள் சமூக ஊடகங்கள் மூலம் உண்மையான உலக நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு பதிலளிக்கின்றனர். பல மொழிகள் மற்றும் பூவியியல் இடங்களிலும் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட பொது உணர்வுகளை படிக்க, பல மொழிக் குறிப்பிட்ட சட்டங்களை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம்: ஆங்கிலத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட சட்டங்கள ஒரு விஷயத்தின் படிப்பாட்டாக, நாம் தொடர்பிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட மில்லியன் பல மொழி குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்புரைகளை பயன்படுத்தி', 'ur': 'دنیا کی تمام انسانوں نے اجتماعی میڈیا کے ذریعے بڑے حقیقی دنیا کی حادثات پر جواب دیا۔ ہم بہت سی زبانوں اور جغرافیک جگہ کے مطابق مشغول احساسات کی مطابق کرنے کے لئے بہت سی زبانوں کے مطابق مطابق کریں گے، ہم بہت سی زبانوں کی کننوٹیशन فرموں کو معلوم کریں گے: راشکین و ال کی انگلیسی کننوٹیशन فرموں سے ایک اضافہ ہے۔ ایک کیس مطالعہ کے طور پر، ہم نے توئیٹر سے نکالے گئے 1.2 میلیون متعدد زبان کانوٹ فرموں کے مطالعہ سے مقررہ عمومی احساسات کے بارے میں بہت بڑی اسکیل تحلیل پیش کیا ہے.', 'uz': "dunyodagi odamlar jamiyat media orqali asosiy dunyo hodisalariga javob beradi. Ko'pchilik tillar va geografik joylarda qanday o'rganish uchun, biz bir necha tillar qo'shish freymlarini o'rganamiz: Rashkin et al. (2016) tillardan kengaytmalar Rashkin va 10 tillardan qo'shilgan yetarli yuvropacha o'ylab keladigan hisoblarni o'rganishingiz mumkin. Masalan o'rganish uchun biz Twitterdan bir minglab tillar qo'shilgan bir million qo'llangan bir xil tildan foydalanilgan shaxsiy hisoblar va obʼektlarni qanday ko'plab o'zgartiradik.", 'vi': 'Người dân trên to àn cầu đáp ứng những sự kiện thực tế lớn qua truyền thông xã hội. Để nghiên cứu tình cảm của công chúng về nhiều thứ ngôn ngữ và địa lý, chúng tôi giới thiệu các khung dẫn về ngôn ngữ đa dạng: một phần mở rộng so với những khung ngữ Anh của Rashkin et al. (ng66) với mười ngôn ngữ Châu Âu bổ sung, tập trung vào tình cảm ngụ ý của các diễn viên sự kiện được sắp xếp. Như một nghiên cứu ca bệnh, chúng tôi đưa ra các phân tích lớn về tình cảm của người dân về các sự kiện nổi tiếng và thực thể sử dụng loại 1.2 triệu khung dẫn ngôn ngữ đa dạng lấy từ Twitter.', 'nl': 'Mensen over de hele wereld reageren op belangrijke gebeurtenissen in de echte wereld via sociale media. Om doelgerichte publieke sentimenten in vele talen en geografische locaties te bestuderen, introduceren we meertalige connotatiekamers: een uitbreiding van Engelse connotatiekamers van Rashkin et al. (2016) met tien extra Europese talen, waarbij de nadruk ligt op de impliciete sentimenten onder deelnemers die betrokken zijn bij een frame. Als casestudy presenteren we grootschalige analyse van doelgerichte publieke sentimenten ten opzichte van belangrijke gebeurtenissen en entiteiten met behulp van 1,2 miljoen meertalige connotatieframes die uit Twitter zijn gehaald.', 'da': 'Folk over hele verden reagerer på store virkelige begivenheder gennem sociale medier. For at studere målrettede offentlige følelser på tværs af mange sprog og geografiske steder, introducerer vi flersprogede konnotationsrammer: en udvidelse fra engelske konnotationsrammer af Rashkin et al. (2016) med yderligere 10 europæiske sprog, der fokuserer på de underforståede følelser blandt arrangementdeltagere involveret i en ramme. Som et casestudie præsenterer vi en storstilet analyse af målrettede offentlige følelser mod vigtige begivenheder og enheder ved hjælp af 1,2 millioner flersprogede konnotationsrammer udvundet fra Twitter.', 'bg': 'Хората по целия свят реагират на големи събития от реалния свят чрез социалните медии. За да изследваме целевите обществени чувства на много езици и географски места, въвеждаме многоезични конотационни рамки: разширение от английските конотационни рамки на Рашкин и др. (2016) с още 10 европейски езика, фокусирайки се върху подразбиращите се чувства сред участниците в събитието, ангажирани в рамка. Като примерно проучване представяме мащабен анализ на целевите обществени настроения към значими събития и образувания, използвайки 1,2 милиона многоезични конотационни рамки, извлечени от Туитър.', 'hr': 'Ljudi širom svijeta reaguju na velike realne događaje svijeta kroz društvene medije. Za proučavanje ciljanih javnih osjećaja na mnogim jezicima i geografskim lokacijama, predstavljamo višejezičke konnotacijske okvire: proširenje od engleskih konnotacijskih okvira Rashkin et al. (2016) sa 10 dodatnih evropskih jezika, fokusirajući se na implicirane osjećaje među sudionicima događaja koji su učestvovali u okviru. Kao istraživanje slučajeva, predstavljamo veliku skalu analizu o ciljanim javnim osjećajima prema salijanim događajima i entitetima koristeći 1,2 milijuna višejezičkih konnotacijskih okvira izvučenih iz Twitter.', 'id': 'Orang-orang di seluruh dunia merespon pada peristiwa dunia nyata besar melalui media sosial. Untuk mempelajari sentimen masyarakat yang ditujukan di berbagai bahasa dan lokasi geografik, kami memperkenalkan bingkai konnotasi berbagai bahasa: ekstensi dari bingkai konnotasi Inggris Rashkin et al. (2016) dengan 10 bahasa Eropa tambahan, fokus pada sentimen yang diimplikasikan antara peserta peristiwa yang terlibat dalam bingkai. Sebagai penelitian kasus, kami mempersembahkan analisis skala besar pada sensasi publik yang ditujukan menuju peristiwa dan entitas yang saling menggunakan 1,2 juta bingkai konnotasi berbagai bahasa yang diekstraksi dari Twitter.', 'de': 'Menschen auf der ganzen Welt reagieren über soziale Medien auf große Ereignisse in der realen Welt. Um gezielte öffentliche Stimmungen über viele Sprachen und geographische Standorte hinweg zu untersuchen, führen wir mehrsprachige Konnotationsrahmen ein: eine Erweiterung von englischen Konnotationsrahmen von Rashkin et al. (2016) mit zehn weiteren europäischen Sprachen, die sich auf die impliziten Stimmungen unter Veranstaltungsteilnehmern konzentrieren, die in einem Rahmen beteiligt sind. Als Fallstudie präsentieren wir großflächige Analysen zu gezielten öffentlichen Stimmungen zu wichtigen Ereignissen und Entitäten, die 1,2 Millionen mehrsprachige Konnotationsrahmen aus Twitter verwenden.', 'ko': '세계 각지의 사람들은 소셜 미디어를 통해 현실 세계의 중대한 사건에 대해 반응한다.다양한 언어와 지리적 위치를 뛰어넘는 맞춤형 공중정서를 연구하기 위해 우리는 다중 언어의 내포 구조를 도입했다. Rashkin 등(2016)의 영어 내포 구조에서 다른 10가지 유럽 언어로 확대하고 참여 구조의 활동 참여자의 은밀한 정서에 중점을 두었다.사례 연구로서 우리는 트위터에서 추출한 120만 개의 다중 언어 내포 구조를 이용하여 현저한 사건과 실체에 대한 목표 공중정서를 대규모로 분석했다.', 'sw': 'Watu duniani kote wanajibu matukio makubwa ya dunia kupitia mitandao ya kijamii. Kusoma hisia za umma zinazolenga katika lugha nyingi na maeneo ya kijiografia, tunaonyesha mfumo wa utangazaji wa lugha mbalimbali: kuongezeka kwa mfumo wa utangazaji wa Kiingereza wa Rashkin et al. (2016) na lugha nyingine za Ulaya, zinazolenga hisia zinazohusika miongoni mwa washiriki wa tukio hilo. Kama utafiti wa kesi, tunaweka uchambuzi mkubwa wa hisia za umma zinazolengwa dhidi ya matukio ya mabadiliko na vyombo vinavyotumia mifumo milioni 1.2 za lugha zilizotolewa kutoka Twita.', 'fa': 'مردم اطراف جهان به اتفاقات بزرگ جهان واقعی از طریق رسانه های اجتماعی پاسخ می دهند. برای مطالعه احساسات عمومی که در بسیاری از زبانها و جایگاهی جغرافی هدف دارند، ما فرم\u200cهای متعدد زبان\u200cها را معرفی می\u200cکنیم: فرم\u200cهای متعدد انگلیسی راسکین و ال. (۲۰۱۶) با ۱۰ زبان\u200cهای اضافی اروپایی که روی احساسات متعدد شده بین مشترک\u200cکنندگان روی یک فرم به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده، ما تحلیل مقیاس بزرگی را در مورد احساسات عمومی هدف می\u200cدهیم به عنوان اتفاق\u200cهایی که با استفاده از ۱.۲ میلیون فرم\u200cهای متعدد زبان\u200cشناسی از توئیتر خارج شده است.', 'tr': "D체n첵채de adamlar sosyal med첵채ni첵a tarapyndan 챌yky힊 d체n첵채de esasy 챌yky힊lara jogap ber첵채rler. Birn채챌e diller we geografiki 첵erlerde jemgy첵et du첵gularyny 철wrenmek 체챌in, bir n채챌e dil bilen Raskinet al'y흫 i흫lis챌e tany힊 framlaryndan uzakla힊dyryl첵arys. (2016) 10 sany 첵erle힊첵채n Avrupa dilleri bilen, bir fra첵m i챌inde chikan챌ylar arasynda tany힊 edilen du첵gularyna 체ns ber첵채ris. Bir 첵agda첵 챌yky힊 bolsa, Twitter-dan 챌ykyl첵an 1.2 milli첵on bilim g체rr체흫leme framlaryny ulanan jemgy첵etli du첵gular hakynda b체y체k 철l챌ekli 챌yky힊 analyzasyny 챌ykar첵arys.", 'sq': 'Njerëzit anembanë botës përgjigjen ngjarjeve të mëdha të botës reale nëpërmjet mediave sociale. Për të studiuar ndjenjat publike të synuara nëpër shumë gjuhë dhe vende gjeografike, ne futim korniza të konnotacionit shumëgjuhës: një zgjerim nga kornizat e konnotacionit anglez të Rashkin et al. (2016) me 10 gjuhë shtesë evropiane, duke u përqëndruar në ndjenjat e implikuara midis pjesëmarrësve të veprimtarisë të angazhuar në një kornizë. Si një studim rasti, ne paraqesim analizë në shkallë të madhe mbi ndjenjat publike të synuara ndaj ngjarjeve dhe njësive të rëndësishme duke përdorur 1.2 milion korniza të konnotacionit shumëgjuhës të nxjerra nga Twitter.', 'hy': 'Ամբողջ աշխարհի մարդիկ պատասխանում են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների միջոցով իրական իրադարձություններին: To study targeted public sentiments across many languages and geographic locations, we introduce multilingual connotation frames: an extension from English connotation frames of Rashkin et al. (2016) with 10 additional European languages, focusing on the implied sentiments among event participants engaged in a frame.  Ինչպես դեպքի ուսումնասիրություն, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեծ մասշտաբով վերլուծություն հանրային նպատակային զգացմունքների վերաբերյալ կարևոր իրադարձությունների և միավորների վրա, որոնք օգտագործում են Թվիթերից ստացված 1,2 միլիոն բազլեզու կո', 'af': "Mense rondom die globaal antwoord na grootste regte wêreld gebeurtenis deur sosiale media. Om die doel van publieke sentimente te ondersoek oor baie tale en geografiese liggings, introduseer ons veelvuldige tale konnotasie rame: â\x80\x99n uitbreiding van Engelske konnotasie rame van Rashkin et al. (2016) met 10 addisionele Europeese tale, fokus op die inplaatste sentimente onder die gebeurtenis deelnaders wat in 'n raam aansluit is. As 'n geval studie, laat ons groot skaal analisie voorsien op die doel van openbare sentimente na salient gebeurtenis en entiteite met gebruik van 1.2 miljoen multitaalske konnotasie rame wat uit Twitter uitgevoer is.", 'am': 'በዓለም ዙሪያ ያሉት ሰዎች ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የታላቁ የዓለም ሁኔታዎችን ይመልሳሉ፡፡ ብዙዎች ቋንቋዎች እና የጂዮግራፊ ቦታዎች ያሉትን የህዝብ አሳብ ለመማር፣ የበዛ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ፍሬዎችን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በጉዳዩ ትምህርት፣ ከትዊተር የተወለደውን 1.2 ሚሊዮን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች እና አካባቢዎች ላይ በተመሳሳይ የህዝብ አዳራዊ አስተያየትን እናቀርባለን፡፡', 'az': "Dünyadakı insanlar sosyal media vasitəsilə böyük dünya olaraqlarına cavab verirlər. Birçox dil və ģeogrāfiski məqamlarda məqsədil hisslərini təhsil etmək üçün çoxlu dil konnotasyon framlarını təşkil edirik: Rashkin et al'in İngilizce konnotasyon framlarının uzaqlaşdırılması. (2016) 10 Əlavə Avropa dillərini təşkil edir, bir framda iştirak edənlər arasındakı hisslərin təşkil edilməsini təşkil edirik. Bir məsələn təhsil olaraq, Twitter-dən çıxarılan 1.2 milyon çox dilli konnotasyon framlarını istifadə edən halkı duyguları haqqında böyük ölçü analizi göstəririk.", 'ca': 'La gent arreu del món respon a grans esdeveniments del món real a través dels mitjans socials. Per estudiar sentiments públics mirats en moltes llengües i llocs geogràfics, introduïm marcs de connotació multilingües: una extensió dels marcs de connotació anglès de Rashkin et al. (2016) amb 10 llengües europees adicionals, centrant-nos en els sentiments implicats entre els participants en un marc. Com a estudi de cas, presentem una anàlisi a gran escala sobre sentiments públics mirats cap a esdeveniments i entitats salients utilitzant 1,2 milions de marcs multilingües de connotació extraïts de Twitter.', 'bs': 'Ljudi širom svijeta reaguju na velike realne događaje svijeta kroz društvene medije. Da bi proučavali ciljane javne osjećaje na mnogim jezicima i geografskim lokacijama, predstavljamo višejezičke konnotacije okvire: proširenje od engleskih konnotacijskih okvira Rashkin et al. (2016) sa 10 dodatnih evropskih jezika, fokusirajući se na implicirane osjećaje među sudionicima događaja koji su učestvovali u okviru. Kao istraživanje slučajeva, predstavljamo veliku skalu analize o ciljanim javnim osjećajima prema salijanim događajima i entitetima koristeći 1,2 milijuna višejezičkih konnotacijskih okvira izvučenih iz Twitter.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের মাধ্যমে বিশ্বের প্রধান বিশ্বের মানুষের প্রতি প্রতিক্রিয়া জা অনেক ভাষা এবং ভূগ্রাফিক স্থানের লক্ষ্যে জনগণের অনুভূতি গবেষণার জন্যে আমরা বহুভাষাভাষী জানানো ফ্রেমের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই: রাশ্চিনের বিশেষ কোনোটেশন ফ্রেম থেকে একটি বিস্তারি একটি কেস গবেষণা হিসেবে আমরা টুইটার থেকে বেরিয়ে আসা ১.', 'cs': 'Lidé po celém světě reagují na významné skutečné události prostřednictvím sociálních médií. Abychom mohli studovat cílené veřejné sentimenty napříč mnoha jazyky a geografickými lokalitami, představujeme vícejazyčné konotační rámce: rozšíření z anglických konotačních rámců Rashkin et al. (2016) o deset dalších evropských jazyků, se zaměřením na implikované sentimenty mezi účastníky akce zapojenými do rámce. Jako případová studie představujeme rozsáhlou analýzu cílených veřejných sentimentů k významným událostem a subjektům pomocí 1,2 milionů vícejazyčných konotačních rámců extrahovaných z Twitteru.', 'et': 'Inimesed üle kogu maailma reageerivad suurtele reaalmaailma sündmustele sotsiaalmeedia kaudu. Et uurida sihipäraseid avalikkuse tundeid paljudes keeltes ja geograafilistes asukohtades, tutvustame mitmekeelseid konnotatsiooniraamistikke: Rashkin et al. (2016) inglise konnotatsiooniraamistikke veel 10 Euroopa keelega, keskendudes raamistikus osalejate kaudsetele tundetele. Juhtumiuuringuna tutvustame laiaulatuslikku analüüsi avalikkuse sihipäraste arvamuste kohta silmapaistvate sündmuste ja üksuste suhtes, kasutades Twitterist eraldatud 1,2 miljonit mitmekeelset konnotatsiooniraami.', 'fi': 'Ihmiset ympäri maailmaa reagoivat merkittäviin tositapahtumiin sosiaalisen median kautta. Tutkiaksemme kohdennettuja yleisötunteita monilla kielillä ja maantieteellisillä paikoilla esittelemme monikielisiä konnotaatiokehyksiä: laajennus Rashkin et al. (2016) englanninkielisistä konnotaatiokehyksistä kymmenellä muulla eurooppalaisella kielellä, keskittyen kehykseen osallistuvien tapahtumien implisiittisiin tunteisiin. Tapaustutkimuksena esittelemme laajan mittakaavan analyysin kohdennetuista yleisömielipiteistä merkittäviin tapahtumiin ja yhteisöihin käyttäen 1,2 miljoonaa monikielistä conotaatiokehystä Twitteristä.', 'jv': 'Wong wong liya sing rumangsa nik kabèh dumadhi akèh barêng-barêng langkung saé supoyo media sotiki. Ngawe gadhakan langkung karo perbudhakan langkung karo akeh luwih lan jeografi, kita nguasai nggawe barang kanggo langgar sampeyan karo ingkang: kawasai tanggal nggo Kemerdekaan karo Rashkin et al. tau karo 10 luwih akeh ingkang dipun Sampeyan gadoh, kita nggawe akeh éntuk akeh sistem luwih apik karo perusahaan langkung gawe nguasai winih karo hal-hal kuwi tindakan sing nggawe sistem 1.2 miliyon karo sistem multilenguase gambar shado akeh dhéwé', 'sk': 'Ljudje po vsem svetu se odzivajo na velike dogodke v realnem svetu prek družbenih medijev. Za proučevanje ciljnih javnih občutkov v številnih jezikih in geografskih lokacijah uvajamo večjezične konotacijske okvire: razširitev iz angleških konotacijskih okvirov Rashkin et al. (2016) z 10 dodatnimi evropskimi jeziki, s poudarkom na implicitnih občutkih udeležencev dogodka, ki so vključeni v okvir. Kot študija primera predstavljamo obsežno analizo ciljno usmerjenih javnih občutkov do pomembnih dogodkov in entitet z uporabo 1,2 milijona večjezičnih konotacijskih okvirjev iz Twitterja.', 'ha': "People around the globe respond to major real world events through social media.  Ko karatun hisia'anar umma masu amfani da su a cikin wasu harshe da wurãren sigogi, za'a ƙunsa da firam masu mulki-nau'i: firam na rubutun Ingiriya na Raskhin et al. (2016) da wasu harshen Yurubiya guda 10, ana yi makini a kan hisani da ke samun da ke cikin firam. Kama karatun wani kashfa, Munã halatar da Ana ƙidãya mai girma a kan hisãbi na jamii da aka yi amfani da su da firam bakwai bakwai da bakwai-bakin multilingu da aka fizge daga Twitter.", 'he': 'אנשים ברחבי העולם מגיבים לאירועים גדולים בעולם האמיתי באמצעות תקשורת חברתית. כדי ללמוד רגשות ציבוריים מיועדים ברחבי שפות רבות ומיקומים גאוגרפיים, אנחנו מכירים מסגרות קונוטציה רבות שפות: התרחשות ממסגרות קונוטציה אנגלית של ראשין וס. (2016) עם 10 שפות אירופאיות נוספות, המתמקדות על הרגשות המתוקפות בין משתתפים באירועים מעורבים במסגרת. כמחקר מקרים, אנו מציגים ניתוח בקנה מידה גדולה על רגשות ציבוריים ממוקדים כלפי אירועים ומרכיבות מפורסמים בשימוש במסגרות קונוטציה רבות שפויות של 1.2 מיליון טויטר.', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་མི་མང་གིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཆེན་པོ་དང་ To study targeted public sentiments across many languages and geographic locations, we introduce multilingual connotation frames: an extension from English connotation frames of Rashkin et al. (2016) with additional European languages, focusing on the implied sentiments among event participants engaged in a frame. ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་གིས་བསམ་བྱས་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་ཆེ་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མང་ཆེ་བས་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Best-Worst Scaling More Reliable than Rating Scales : A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'ar': 'المقياس الأفضل والأسوأ أكثر موثوقية من مقاييس التصنيف: دراسة حالة حول الشرح التوضيحي لشدة المشاعر', 'fr': "Meilleure échelle pire plus fiable que les échelles de notation\xa0: une étude de cas sur l'annotation de l'intensité des sentiments", 'pt': 'Melhor-Pior Escala Mais Confiável do que Escalas de Avaliação: Um Estudo de Caso sobre Anotação de Intensidade de Sentimento', 'es': 'El escalamiento mejor-peor es más confiable que las escalas de calificación: un estudio de caso sobre la anotación de intensidad de sentimiento', 'ja': '評価尺度よりも信頼性の高い最悪のスケーリング：センチメント強度注釈に関するケーススタディ', 'zh': '比评级量表更可凭-最差缩放:情度注例研究', 'hi': 'रेटिंग तराजू की तुलना में सर्वश्रेष्ठ-सबसे खराब स्केलिंग अधिक विश्वसनीय: भावना तीव्रता एनोटेशन पर एक केस स्टडी', 'ru': 'Самое худшее масштабирование более надежное, чем рейтинговые шкалы: тематическое исследование по аннотации интенсивности настроений', 'ga': 'An Scálú Is Fearr is Measa Níos Iontaofa ná Scálaí Rátála: Cás-staidéar ar Anótáil ar Dhéine Mointe', 'ka': 'ყველაზე საუკეთესო სკვილის შესახებ უფრო დარწმუნებელია, ვიდრე რეტინგური სკვილის: სკვილის შესახებ სკვილის შესახებ ინტენტინტივის ან', 'el': 'Καλύτερη-χειρότερη κλιμάκωση πιο αξιόπιστη από τις κλίμακες αξιολόγησης: Μια μελέτη περίπτωσης για την παρατήρηση έντασης συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'Megbízhatóbb, mint az értékelési mérlegek: Esettanulmány az érzékenység intenzitásáról', 'it': "Più affidabile delle scale di valutazione: un caso di studio sull'annotazione dell'intensità dei sentimenti", 'kk': 'Ең үлкен масштабтау Рейтинг масштабынан артық үлкен: Жұлдыз масштабтау туралы үлкен- кіші оқу', 'ms': 'Skala Terburuk Lebih Dipercayakan Daripada Skala Penandaan: Penelitian kes pada Annotasi Intensiti Sentiment', 'lt': 'Geriausias labiau patikimas mastelis nei vertinimo masteliai: jutimo intensyvumo anotacijos atvejų tyrimas', 'ml': 'റേറ്റ് സ്കേലിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച വലിപ്പം വിശ്വാസമുള്ളത്: സെന്\u200dടീമെന്\u200dറ് ഇന്\u200dറെന്റിറ്റിയേഷനിലെ ഒരു കേസ്', 'mt': 'L-A ħjar Skala Aktar affidabbli mill-Skali tal-Klassifikazzjoni: Studju ta’ Każ dwar l-Annotazzjoni tal-Intensità tas-Sentiment', 'pl': 'Najgorsze skalowanie bardziej niezawodne niż skale oceniające: studium przypadku na temat adnotacji intensywności sentymentów', 'mk': 'Најлошото скалирање е подоверливо од скалите на оценка: случајна студија за анатација на интензитетот на чувството', 'ro': 'Cel mai proastă scalare Mai fiabilă decât scalele de rating: un studiu de caz privind adnotarea intensității sentimentelor', 'si': 'හොඳම ස්කේලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ', 'sr': 'Najgore skaliranje poverljivije od skala rejtinga: istraživanje slučaja o oznake sentimentne intenzitete', 'mn': 'Хамгийн муу хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээнээс илүү хамааралтай: Хувьсгалтын хэмжээний судалгаа', 'sv': 'Bästa sämsta skalning Mer tillförlitlig än betygsskalor: En fallstudie om notering av känselintensitet', 'no': 'Beste høgste skalering meir tilhøgsbart enn valueringsskalar: Eit bokstav- studering på følgjande intensitet- notasjon', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka ugu liita ee ugu liita ee ugu caadi badan qiyaastii Rating: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'ur': 'بہترین بدترین اسکیلینگ راٹینگ اسکیلوں سے زیادہ اچھی ہے: ایک کیس تحصیل سنتی انٹنسیٹ اظہار پر', 'ta': 'Rating அளவுகளை விட சிறந்த அளவிட மேலும் reliable: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'uz': 'Rating qiymatlaridan eng eng eng eng yaxshi oʻlchami: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'vi': 'Thu hoạch tệ nhất có thể đáng tin hơn mức độ phân loại: Một nghiên cứu về độ mạnh cảm xúc', 'bg': 'Най-лошото скалиране е по-надеждно от рейтинговите скали: казус за анотация на интензивността на сентимента', 'nl': 'Best-Worst Scaling Betrouwbaarder dan Rating Scales: Een case study over Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'de': 'Best-Worst Scaling Zuverlässiger als Rating Scales: Eine Fallstudie zur Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'da': 'Bedste værste skalering Mere pålidelig end vurderingsskalaer: Et casestudie om notering af følelsesintensitet', 'id': 'Skala Terburuk Lebih Menakjubkan Dari Skala Penakjuban: Studi Kasus pada Annotasi Intensitas Sentiment', 'fa': 'بهترین مقیاس بدتری از مقیاس مقیاس ارزش بیشتری است: یک مطالعه پرونده\u200cای در مورد ارزش هوشمند حساب', 'sw': 'Ukumbuzi bora zaidi unaoaminika zaidi ya kiwango cha uchunguzi: Utafiti wa kesi kuhusu Tamko la Usafiti', 'ko': '최적 - 최악의 양표가 등급 평가량표보다 더 믿을 만하다: 정서 강도 주석의 사례 연구', 'sq': 'Shkalla më e keqe më e besueshme se shkallët e vlerësimit: Një studim rasti mbi anotacionin e intensitetit të ndjenjave', 'hr': 'Najgore skaliranje poverljivije od skala ocjene: istraživanje slučaja o oznake o osjećajnoj intenziteti', 'af': "Beste- Worste Skalering meer vergelykbaar as Rating Skales: ' n Kas Leer op Sentiment Intensiteit Annotasie", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'En iň gowy Mykdarlanjak Derleme Görnüşleri: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'hy': 'Best-Worst Scaling More Reliable than Rating Scales: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'az': '쿮n pis 칬l칞칲 Rating 칬l칞칲l톛rind톛n daha 칞ox istifad톛 ed톛 bil톛r: Sentiment Intensity Annotation', 'bn': 'রেটিং স্কেলের চেয়ে সর্বোচ্চ সর্বোচ্চ পরিমাণ বিশ্বাসযোগ্য: সেন্টিমেন্ট ইনসেটিমেন্টের বিজ্ঞাপনের একটি কেস', 'bs': 'Najgore skaliranje poverljivije od skala ocjene: istraživanje slučaja o oznake o sentimentnoj intenziteti', 'cs': 'Nejlepší nejhorší škálování Spolehlivější než hodnotící škály: Případová studie o anotaci intenzity sentimentů', 'et': 'Parim-halvim skaleerimine usaldusväärsem kui hindamisskaalad: juhtumiuuring sentimendi intensiivsuse annotatsiooni kohta', 'fi': 'Paras-huonoin skaalaus Luotettavampi kuin luokitusasteikot: Tapaustutkimus tunteiden intensiteetin huomautuksista', 'ca': "La millor escala més fiable que la de valoració: Un estudi de cas sobre l'anotació de la intensitat del sentiment", 'jv': 'Plain', 'sk': 'Najboljše najslabše tehtanje je zanesljivejše od ocenjevalnih lestvic: študija primera opombe intenzivnosti sentimenta', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'הסימן הכי גרוע ביותר יותר אמין מסימני הערכה: מחקר מקרים על ציוני חוש', 'bo': 'Best-Worst Scaling More Reliable than Rating Scales: A Case Study on Sentiment Intensity Annotation'}
{'en': 'Rating scales are a widely used method for data annotation ; however, they present several challenges, such as difficulty in maintaining inter- and intra-annotator consistency. Bestworst scaling (BWS) is an alternative method of annotation that is claimed to produce high-quality annotations while keeping the required number of annotations similar to that of rating scales. However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established. Here for the first time, we set up an experiment that directly compares the rating scale method with BWS. We show that with the same total number of annotations, BWS produces significantly more reliable results than the rating scale.', 'ar': 'مقاييس التصنيف هي طريقة مستخدمة على نطاق واسع لتعليق البيانات ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإنها تطرح العديد من التحديات ، مثل صعوبة الحفاظ على التناسق بين المعلقين وداخلهم. القياس الأفضل - الأسوأ (BWS) هو طريقة بديلة للتعليق التوضيحي يُزعم أنه ينتج عنها تعليقات توضيحية عالية الجودة مع الاحتفاظ بالعدد المطلوب من التعليقات التوضيحية المشابهة لمقاييس التصنيف. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم إثبات صحة هذا الادعاء بشكل منهجي. هنا ولأول مرة ، قمنا بإعداد تجربة تقارن مباشرة طريقة مقياس التصنيف مع BWS. نوضح أنه مع نفس العدد الإجمالي للتعليقات التوضيحية ، ينتج عن نظام BWS نتائج أكثر موثوقية بشكل ملحوظ من مقياس التصنيف.', 'es': 'Las escalas de calificación son un método ampliamente utilizado para la anotación de datos; sin embargo, presentan varios desafíos, como la dificultad para mantener la coherencia entre anotadores e intraanotadores. La escala Best—Worst (BWS) es un método alternativo de anotación que, según se afirma, produce anotaciones de alta calidad y, al mismo tiempo, mantiene el número necesario de anotaciones similar al de las escalas de calificación. Sin embargo, la veracidad de esta afirmación nunca se ha establecido sistemáticamente. Aquí, por primera vez, creamos un experimento que compara directamente el método de la escala de calificación con el BWS. Demostramos que con el mismo número total de anotaciones, BWS produce resultados significativamente más fiables que la escala de calificación.', 'fr': "Les échelles de notation sont une méthode largement utilisée pour l'annotation des données\xa0; cependant, elles présentent plusieurs défis, tels que la difficulté de maintenir la cohérence entre les annotateurs et les annotateurs. La meilleure mise à l'échelle la plus mauvaise (BWS) est une méthode alternative d'annotation censée produire des annotations de haute qualité tout en conservant le nombre d'annotations requis similaire à celui des échelles de notation. Cependant, la véracité de cette affirmation n'a jamais été systématiquement établie. Pour la première fois, nous avons mis en place une expérience qui compare directement la méthode de l'échelle de notation avec BWS. Nous montrons qu'avec le même nombre total d'annotations, BWS produit des résultats nettement plus fiables que l'échelle de notation.", 'pt': 'As escalas de classificação são um método amplamente utilizado para anotação de dados; no entanto, apresentam vários desafios, como a dificuldade em manter a consistência inter e intra-anotador. O melhor-pior dimensionamento (BWS) é um método alternativo de anotação que alega produzir anotações de alta qualidade, mantendo o número necessário de anotações semelhante ao das escalas de classificação. No entanto, a veracidade desta afirmação nunca foi sistematicamente estabelecida. Aqui, pela primeira vez, montamos um experimento que compara diretamente o método da escala de classificação com o BWS. Mostramos que com o mesmo número total de anotações, o BWS produz resultados significativamente mais confiáveis do que a escala de classificação.', 'ja': 'レーティングスケールは、データアノテーションのために広く使用されている方法ですが、アノテーター間およびアノテーター内の一貫性を維持することが困難であるなど、いくつかの課題があります。最悪スケーリング（ BWS ）は、評価尺度と同様に必要な注釈の数を維持しながら、高品質の注釈を生成するように主張される注釈の代替方法である。しかし、この主張の真実性は体系的に確立されたことはない。ここで、評価尺度法とBWSを直接比較する実験を初めて立ち上げた。注釈の総数が同じでも、BWSは評価尺度よりも著しく信頼性の高い結果を生み出すことが示されています。', 'zh': '评级量表者,广用之数也。 然致挑战,如难持注者、注器内一致性。 最佳-最差缩放 (BWS) 为代注之法,据称可成高质量注,兼守所须注释数与评级量表注数相似。 然此说真实未尝得系统证实。 于是始立实验,以评级量表法校BWS。 臣等明同注总数,BWS生比评级量表为可恃。', 'hi': 'रेटिंग तराजू डेटा एनोटेशन के लिए एक व्यापक रूप से उपयोग की जाने वाली विधि है; हालांकि, वे कई चुनौतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जैसे कि अंतर- और इंट्रा-एनोटेटर स्थिरता को बनाए रखने में कठिनाई। सर्वश्रेष्ठ-सबसे खराब स्केलिंग (बीडब्ल्यूएस) एनोटेशन का एक वैकल्पिक तरीका है जिसे रेटिंग तराजू के समान एनोटेशन की आवश्यक संख्या को रखते हुए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले एनोटेशन का उत्पादन करने का दावा किया जाता है। हालांकि, इस दावे की सत्यता कभी भी व्यवस्थित रूप से स्थापित नहीं की गई है। यहां पहली बार, हमने एक प्रयोग स्थापित किया है जो सीधे बीडब्ल्यूएस के साथ रेटिंग स्केल विधि की तुलना करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एनोटेशन की समान कुल संख्या के साथ, बीडब्ल्यूएस रेटिंग पैमाने की तुलना में काफी अधिक विश्वसनीय परिणाम पैदा करता है।', 'ru': 'Шкалы оценок являются широко используемым методом аннотирования данных; однако они создают ряд проблем, таких как трудности в поддержании согласованности между аннотаторами и внутри них. Наихудшее масштабирование (BWS) является альтернативным методом аннотирования, который, как утверждается, обеспечивает высококачественные аннотации, сохраняя при этом требуемое количество аннотаций, аналогичное количеству шкал оценок. Однако достоверность этого утверждения никогда не подтверждалась на систематической основе. Здесь мы впервые настроили эксперимент, который напрямую сравнивает метод рейтинговой шкалы с BWS. Мы показываем, что при одинаковом общем количестве аннотаций BWS дает значительно более надежные результаты, чем рейтинговая шкала.', 'ga': 'Is modh é scálaí rátála a úsáidtear go forleathan chun anótáil sonraí; Mar sin féin, tá go leor dúshlán ag baint leo, mar shampla deacracht le comhsheasmhacht idir anótairí agus laistigh de na nótaí a choinneáil. Is modh eile anótála é an scálú is fearr is measa (BWS) a mhaítear go dtáirgeann sé nótaí ardcháilíochta agus an líon riachtanach nótaí a choinneáil cosúil le líon na scálaí rátála. Mar sin féin, níor bunaíodh fírinneacht an éilimh seo go córasach. Anseo den chéad uair, chuireamar turgnamh ar bun a dhéanann comparáid dhíreach idir an modh scála rátála agus BWS. Léirímid leis an líon iomlán céanna nótaí, go mbíonn torthaí i bhfad níos iontaofa ag BWS ná an scála rátála.', 'el': 'Οι κλίμακες αξιολόγησης είναι μια ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη μέθοδος για την επισήμανση δεδομένων. Ωστόσο, παρουσιάζουν αρκετές προκλήσεις, όπως δυσκολία στη διατήρηση της συνοχής μεταξύ και εντός σχολιαστών. Η καλύτερη κλιμάκωση (BWS) είναι μια εναλλακτική μέθοδος σχολιασμού που ισχυρίζεται ότι παράγει σχολιασμούς υψηλής ποιότητας διατηρώντας τον απαιτούμενο αριθμό σχολίων παρόμοιο με αυτόν των κλιμάκων αξιολόγησης. Ωστόσο, η αλήθεια αυτού του ισχυρισμού δεν έχει αποδειχθεί ποτέ συστηματικά. Εδώ για πρώτη φορά, στήσαμε ένα πείραμα που συγκρίνει άμεσα τη μέθοδο κλίμακας αξιολόγησης με το BWS. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι με τον ίδιο συνολικό αριθμό σχολίων, η BWS παράγει σημαντικά πιο αξιόπιστα αποτελέσματα από την κλίμακα αξιολόγησης.', 'hu': 'A minősítési skálák széles körben használt módszer az adatok jegyzetelésére; Ugyanakkor számos kihívást jelentenek, mint például nehézségek a kommentátorok közötti és a kommentátorokon belüli következetesség fenntartásában. A legrosszabb skálázás (BWS) egy alternatív megjegyzési módszer, amely állítólag kiváló minőségű megjegyzéseket készít, miközben a minősítési skálákhoz hasonló számú megjegyzést tartja fenn. Ennek az állításnak a valóságát azonban soha nem állapították meg szisztematikusan. Itt először állítottunk össze egy kísérletet, amely közvetlenül összehasonlítja a minősítési skála módszerét a BWS-vel. Megmutatjuk, hogy a BWS ugyanannyi megjegyzéssel jelentősen megbízhatóbb eredményeket hoz létre, mint a minősítési skála.', 'ka': 'მონაცემების ანოტაციისთვის უფრო გამოყენებული რეტინგური სკეალები არიან. მაგრამ ისინი მრავალ გამოცდილებები, როგორც შესაძლებლობა შორის და შორის ამოცდილების შესაძლებელობაში. ყველაზე საუკეთესო სკეალტიფიკაცია (BWS) არის ანტორაციის ანტორაციის ალტენტრუმენტური მეტი, რომელიც უფრო საუკეთესო ანტორაციების გამოყენება, რომელიც უფრო საუკეთესო წარმოდგ მაგრამ, ამ წარმოდგენის სიმართლეობა არასდროს სისტემატიკურად დააყენება. აქ პირველი ჯერ, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტი დავყენეთ, რომელიც პირველად რეიტენტის მანძილის გამოყენება BWS-ზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ იგივე ყველა რიცხვით ამოცანებით, BWS წარმოიქმნა მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენა უფრო დარწმუნებელოვანი წარმოდგენები, ვიდ', 'it': "Le scale di valutazione sono un metodo ampiamente usato per l'annotazione dei dati; Tuttavia, presentano diverse sfide, come la difficoltà di mantenere la coerenza tra gli annotatori e tra gli annotatori. Best-worst scaling (BWS) è un metodo alternativo di annotazione che si dice produce annotazioni di alta qualità mantenendo il numero richiesto di annotazioni simili a quello delle scale di valutazione. Tuttavia, la veridicità di questa affermazione non è mai stata sistematicamente stabilita. Qui, per la prima volta, abbiamo messo a punto un esperimento che confronta direttamente il metodo della scala di rating con BWS. Dimostriamo che con lo stesso numero totale di annotazioni, BWS produce risultati significativamente più affidabili rispetto alla scala di valutazione.", 'kk': 'Бағалау масштабы - деректерді жаңарту үшін көп қолданылатын әдіс; value Бірақ олар бірнеше мәселелерді көрсетеді, мысалы, мезгілдік және белгілердің қатынасын сақтау қиындығы. Ең жақсы масштабтау (BWS) деген альтернативті ескерту әдісі - рейтинг масштабына сәйкес келетін жазбалардың санын сақтау үшін сапатты жазбаларды жазылады. Бірақ бұл жағдайдың шындығы жүйелік түрде орнатылмаған. Мұнда бірінші рет, оқиғалардың масштабын BWS- мен салыстыратын экспериментті орнатық. Біз бір жалпы жазбалар санын көрсету үшін БWS оқиғалардың масштабынан ең сенімді нәтижелерін өзгертеді.', 'lt': 'reitingų skalės yra plačiai naudojamas duomenų anotacijos metodas; vis dėlto jos kelia keletą uždavinių, pavyzdžiui, sunkumų išlaikyti annotatorių tarpusavio ir vidaus nuoseklumą. Geriausias blogiausias skaliavimas (BWS) yra alternatyvus anotacijos metodas, kuris, kaip teigiama, sukelia aukštos kokybės anotacijas ir kartu išlaiko reikalingą anotacijų skaičių, panašų į reitingų skalių skaičių. However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  Čia pirmą kartą sukūrėme eksperimentą, kuris tiesiogiai palygina reitingų skalės metodą su BWS. Mes rodome, kad BWS gauna daug patikimesnių rezultatų, palyginti su reitingų skale.', 'mk': 'Рајтинг скалите се широко употребен метод за анотација на податоци; сепак, тие претставуваат неколку предизвици, како што се тешкотиите во одржувањето на константноста меѓу и внатре-анотаторите. Најлошото скалирање (БВС) е алтернативен метод на анотација кој се тврди дека произведува висококвалитетни анотации, додека го задржува потребниот број на анотации сличен на оние на скалите на рејтинг. Сепак, вистината на ова тврдење никогаш не е систематски утврдена. Овде за прв пат, поставуваме експеримент кој директно го споредува методот на оценка со БВС. Покажуваме дека со истиот вкупен број анотации, БВС произведува значително подоверливи резултати отколку рејтинг скалата.', 'ms': 'Rating scales are a widely used method for data annotation;  bagaimanapun, ia menghasilkan beberapa cabaran, seperti kesulitan dalam menjaga konsistensi antar- dan intra-annotator. Skala terbaik terburuk (BWS) adalah kaedah alternatif anotasi yang diklaim untuk menghasilkan anotasi kualiti tinggi sambil menyimpan bilangan anotasi yang diperlukan yang sama dengan skala rating. Namun, kebenaran klaim ini tidak pernah ditetapkan secara sistematik. Di sini untuk pertama kalinya, kami menetapkan eksperimen yang secara langsung membandingkan kaedah skala rating dengan BWS. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dengan jumlah total annotasi yang sama, BWS menghasilkan keputusan yang jauh lebih dipercayai daripada skala rating.', 'ml': 'റേറ്റിങ്ങ് സ്കേല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ അഭിപ്രായത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു വ്യാപ്തമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതി എന്നാലും അവര്\u200d പല വിലാസങ്ങളും കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു, അതുപോലെയുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പ്രയാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ് ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചതായ പരിശോധനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (BWS) ഒരു മാറ്റമായ രീതിയാണ്, അതിന്റെ വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഉയര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ആവശ്യമുള്ള വിച എന്നാലും ഈ വാക്കുകളുടെ സത്യം സിസ്ഥിരമായി സ്ഥാപിച്ചിട്ടില്ല. ആദ്യത്തേതിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തെ നേരിട്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. റെയിങ്ങ് സ്കേല്\u200d രീതിയിലെ രീത നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് അതേ മൊത്തം അഭിപ്രായം കൊണ്ടാണ്, ബിഡബ്ലിഎസ് റേഷന്\u200d സ്കേലിനെക്കാള്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തന', 'mt': 'L-iskali tal-klassifikazzjoni huma metodu użat ħafna għall-annotazzjoni tad-dejta; madankollu, jippreżentaw diversi sfidi, bħad-diffikultà biex tinżamm il-konsistenza bejn u fi ħdan l-annotaturi. L-agħar skalar (BWS) huwa metodu alternattiv ta’ annotazzjoni li huwa ddikjarat li jipproduċi annotazzjonijiet ta’ kwalità għolja filwaqt li jżomm in-numru meħtieġ ta’ annotazzjonijiet simili għal dak tal-iskali ta’ klassifikazzjoni. However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  Here for the first time, we set up an experiment that directly compares the rating scale method with BWS.  Aħna nuru li bl-istess numru totali ta’ annotazzjonijiet, il-BWS tipproduċi riżultati sinifikanti aktar affidabbli mill-iskala tal-klassifikazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Рейтинг хэмжээсүүд нь өгөгдлийн нотолгоо ашиглах шинэ арга юм. Гэхдээ тэд хэдэн сорилтуудыг харуулдаг. Жишээлбэл, интро-нотологчдын сорилтуудыг хадгалах хэцүү. Хамгийн муу түвшилт (BWS) нь өндөр сайн сайн түвшилтэй анзаарах арга юм. Харин шаардлагатай анзаарах хэмжээний тоо нь түвшилтэй түвшилтэй адилхан байдаг. Гэхдээ энэ хэлбэрийн үнэнийг хэзээ ч системийн байгуулалт байгуулагдаагүй. Эхлээд бид үнэт хэмжээний аргыг BWS-тэй шууд харьцуулдаг туршилт хийсэн. Бид үүнийг ижил хэмжээтэй харуулж байгаа бWS нь үнэлгээс илүү итгэлтэй үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Scalele de rating sunt o metodă utilizată pe scară largă pentru adnotarea datelor; Cu toate acestea, acestea prezintă mai multe provocări, cum ar fi dificultatea menținerii coerenței inter-adnotator și intra-adnotator. Best-worst scaling (BWS) este o metodă alternativă de adnotare care se pretinde că produce adnotări de înaltă calitate, păstrând în același timp numărul necesar de adnotări similar cu cel al scalelor de rating. Cu toate acestea, veridicitatea acestei afirmații nu a fost niciodată stabilită sistematic. Aici, pentru prima dată, am stabilit un experiment care compară direct metoda scalei de rating cu BWS. Noi arătăm că, cu același număr total de adnotări, BWS produce rezultate semnificativ mai fiabile decât scara de rating.', 'pl': 'Skale ratingowe są szeroko stosowaną metodą adnotacji danych; Stanowią one jednak kilka wyzwań, takich jak trudności w utrzymaniu spójności między i wewnątrz adnotatorów. Skalowanie najlepszego najgorszego (BWS) jest alternatywną metodą adnotacji, która twierdzi, że produkuje adnotacje wysokiej jakości przy zachowaniu wymaganej liczby adnotacji podobnej do skali ratingowych. Jednak prawdziwość tego twierdzenia nigdy nie została systematycznie ustalona. Tutaj po raz pierwszy przygotowaliśmy eksperyment, który bezpośrednio porównuje metodę skali ratingowej z BWS. Pokazujemy, że przy tej samej łącznej liczbie adnotacji BWS daje znacznie wiarygodniejsze wyniki niż skala ratingowa.', 'no': 'Rating skala er ein breidde brukt metode for data- notasjon. Note this is a KRunner keyword Dei gjer imidlertid fleire utfordringar, slik som vanskeleghet for å gjera konsistens mellom og inni annotatorar. Den beste største skaleringa (BWS) er ein alternativ metode for merking som vert tvrd å produsera høg kvalitetsinnotasjonar medan du held det nødvendige talet på merkingar som er liknande med verdiskala. Men sannheten av denne tvaringa er aldri systematisk oppretta. For første gang sett vi opp ein eksperiment som direkte samanliknar retningsmetoden med BWS. Vi viser at med det samme antallet notasjonar, produserer BWS mykje meir betrekkar resultat enn ratingsskala.', 'sr': 'skale ocjene su široko korišteni metod za annotaciju podataka; međutim, predstavljaju nekoliko izazova, kao što je teško održavati konsekvenciju među annotatorima. Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je alternativni metod annotacije koji se tvrdi da proizvodi najkvalitetne annotacije dok drži potrebni broj annotacija sličan onim skalama ocjena. Međutim, vernost ove tvrdnje nikada nije uspostavljena sistematski. Ovde smo prvi put postavili eksperiment koji direktno uspoređuje metodu skale ocjena sa BWS-om. Pokazujemo da sa istim ukupnim brojem annotacija, BWS proizvodi značajno pouzdaniji rezultat od skale ocjena.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka qiyaastu waa qaab aad u faa’iido ah oo loo isticmaalayo warbixinta macluumaadka; Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay soo saaraan dhibaatooyin badan, tusaale ahaan dhibaato ku jirta in la sii wadato mid-xiriir iyo mid-dhexe. Kalluumeynta ugu wanaagsan (BWS) waa qaab kale oo la doortay in la soo saaro dhibaatooyin aad u baahan tahay marka la haysto tirada baaritaanka loo baahan yahay oo u eg qaababka qiyaasta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee daacadnimada dacwaddanu marna si habboon looma dhisin. Halkan marka ugu horeysay, waxaan sameynnay imtixaan si toos u siman qaabka qiyaasta ee BWS. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in BWS uu ku sameeyo isla tirada lamid ah oo la mid ah, wuxuu keenaa resultooyin aad u badan oo aamin ah tan qiyaasta.', 'si': 'රේටින් ස්කේල් විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජන විධානයක් දත්ත කිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජන විධානයක්; නමුත්, ඔවුන් අභ්\u200dයානයක් වෙනස් දෙයක් තියෙනවා, වගේම අභ්\u200dයානයක් සහ අභ්\u200dයානයක් තියාගන්න අමාරුයි - සහ හොඳම නරකම් ස්කේලන් (BWS) තමයි රේටින් ස්කේලන් වගේම අවශ්\u200dය සංචාරයක් තියාගන්න අවශ්\u200dය සංචාරයක් තියාගන්න පුළුවන් විකල නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ විශ්වාස කවදාවත් පද්ධතියෙන් ස්ථාපිත වෙලා නෑ. මෙතන පළමු වතාවෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ රේටින් ස්කල් විධානය BWS එක්ක. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒකෙන් සම්පූර්ණ සංඛ්යාවක් තියෙන්නේ, BWS විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසිත විදිහට වඩා විශ්', 'sv': 'Ratingsskalor är en allmänt använd metod för datanotering; De innebär dock flera utmaningar, t.ex. svårigheter att upprätthålla samstämmighet mellan och inom kommentatorerna. Best-worst scaling (BWS) är en alternativ metod för notering som påstås producera högkvalitativa noteringar samtidigt som det erforderliga antalet noteringar behålls liknande den för betygsskalor. Sannolikheten i detta påstående har dock aldrig systematiskt fastställts. Här sätter vi för första gången upp ett experiment som direkt jämför betygsskalan med BWS. Vi visar att BWS med samma totala antal kommentarer ger betydligt mer tillförlitliga resultat än betygsskalan.', 'ta': 'தரவு அறிவிப்புக்கு விரிவான அளவுகள் ஒரு பெரிய பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறையாகும். எனினும், அவர்கள் பல சவால்களை காண்பிக்கிறார்கள், அதாவது, இடையில் மற்றும் உள்ளிருக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட பொருத்தமான ச சிறந்த அளவிடுதல் (BWS) ஒரு மாற்று முறைமையாகும். அது உயர்தரமான அறிவிப்புகளை உருவாக்கும் போது தேவைப்பட்ட அறிவிப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை வைத However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  முதல் முறைக்கு, நாம் ஒரு பரிசோதனையை அமைத்து, அது BWS யை நேரடியாக ஒப்பிடும். நாம் அதே மொத்த எண்ணிக்கையுடன் காட்டுகிறோம், பிவிட்ஸ் விகிதத்தின் அளவை விட மிகவும் நம்பிக்கை முடியும் முடிவு', 'ur': 'ریٹینگ اسکیل ڈیٹا انٹوریٹ کے لئے وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ لیکن وہ بہت سے مشکلات پیش کرتے ہیں، جیسے مشکل ہے کہ ان کے درمیان اور ان کے درمیان مضبوطی کا حفاظت کرنا ہے. بہترین ترین ترین ترین ترین ترین ترین ترین ترکیب (BWS) ایک الٹی ترکیب طریقہ ہے جس کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ اس کے ساتھ بہترین کیفیت ترکیب کے مطابق اچھی ترکیب کے مطابق اچھی ترکیب کے مطابق اچھی ترکیب کے مطابق اچھی ترکیب کے لیکن اس ادعا کی سچائی کبھی سیستماتیک طور پر قائم نہیں کی گئی۔ یہاں پہلی بار ہم نے ایک آزمائش بنائی جو مستقیماً ریٹینگ اسکیل طریقہ BWS سے مقایسہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اسی طرح کی جمع تعداد کے ذریعے BWS ریٹینگ اسکیل سے زیادہ مطمئن نتیجہ پیدا کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Tỷ lệ đánh giá là phương pháp được sử dụng rộng rãi để ghi chú dữ liệu. Tuy nhiên, họ có nhiều thách thức, như là khó khăn trong việc duy trì sự đồng nhất liên tục và nội tạng. Giỏi-tệ nhất (BWS) là một phương pháp ghi chú khác được tuyên bố là sản xuất các chú thích chất lượng cao, trong khi vẫn còn giữ số ghi chú cần thiết tương tự với số lượng đánh giá. Tuy nhiên, sự thật chưa bao giờ được xác định một cách có hệ thống. Đây là lần đầu tiên, chúng tôi thiết lập một thí nghiệm để so sánh trực tiếp các phương pháp đánh giá tỉ lệ với BWS. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng với số chú thích chung, công ty BWS còn gây ra kết quả đáng tin cậy hơn cả tỉ lệ đánh giá nữa.', 'uz': "Ma\xa0ºlumot ta\xa0ºminlovchisi uchun katta ishlatiladigan usul; Lekin ular bir necha challenglarni hozir qiladi, masalan, inter- va intra-annotator davomida davom etishga qiyin. @ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu davlatning haqiqatgina tizim bo'lmaydi. Bu yerda birinchi marta, biz BWS bilan birinchi ta\xa0ºminlov qilishni boshladik. Biz bir necha tajribalar soni bilan ko'rsatganimiz, BWS qiymatning chegarasidagi juda ishonch natijalarini yaratadi.", 'nl': 'Ratingschalen zijn een veel gebruikte methode voor gegevensannotatie; Zij brengen echter verschillende uitdagingen met zich mee, zoals moeilijkheden bij het handhaven van inter- en intra-annotatorconsistentie. Best-worst scaling (BWS) is een alternatieve methode voor annotatie waarbij wordt beweerd dat ze hoogwaardige annotaties produceert terwijl het vereiste aantal annotaties vergelijkbaar blijft met dat van ratingschalen. De waarachtigheid van deze bewering is echter nooit systematisch vastgesteld. Hier zetten we voor het eerst een experiment op dat de beoordelingsschaalmethode direct vergelijkt met BWS. We laten zien dat BWS met hetzelfde totale aantal annotaties aanzienlijk betrouwbaardere resultaten oplevert dan de ratingschaal.', 'da': 'Rating skalaer er en meget udbredt metode til datanotering; De indebærer imidlertid flere udfordringer, f.eks. vanskeligheder med at opretholde konsistens mellem og mellem kommentatorer. Best-worst skalering (BWS) er en alternativ metode til notering, der hævdes at producere annotationer af høj kvalitet, samtidig med at det krævede antal noteringer bevares svarende til ratingsskalaerne. Sandheden af denne påstand er imidlertid aldrig blevet systematisk fastslået. Her oprettede vi for første gang et eksperiment, der direkte sammenligner vurderingsskalaemetoden med BWS. Vi viser, at BWS med det samme samlede antal noteringer producerer betydeligt mere pålidelige resultater end vurderingsskalaen.', 'id': 'Skala penilaian adalah metode yang sangat digunakan untuk anotasi data; namun, mereka menghadapi beberapa tantangan, seperti kesulitan dalam mempertahankan konsistensi inter- dan intra-annotator. Skaling terbaik terburuk (BWS) adalah metode alternatif anotasi yang diklaim untuk menghasilkan anotasi kualitas tinggi sambil menyimpan jumlah anotasi yang diperlukan yang sama dengan skala rating. However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  Di sini untuk pertama kalinya, kami mengatur eksperimen yang secara langsung membandingkan metode skala rating dengan BWS. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dengan jumlah total annotasi yang sama, BWS menghasilkan hasil yang jauh lebih dipercaya daripada skala rating.', 'hr': 'Veličine ocjene su široko korišćena metoda za annotaciju podataka; međutim, oni predstavljaju nekoliko izazova, kao što je teško održavati konsekvenciju među annotatorima i unutar annotatora. Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je alternativni metod annotacije koji se tvrdi da proizvodi visoke kvalitetne annotacije dok drži potrebni broj annotacija sličan onim skalama ocjena. Međutim, istinitost ove tvrdnje nikada nije sustavno utvrđena. Ovdje smo prvi put postavili eksperiment koji direktno uspoređuje metodu skale ocjena s BWS-om. Pokazujemo da s istim ukupnim brojem annotacija, BWS proizvodi značajno pouzdaniji rezultati nego skala ocjena.', 'ko': '평점량표는 광범위하게 사용되는 데이터 표기 방법이다.그러나 주석자 간과 내부의 일치성을 유지하기 어렵다는 도전을 가져왔다.Best-worst scaling(BWS)은 등급표와 비슷한 주석 수를 유지하면서 고품질의 주석을 생성할 수 있는 또 다른 주석 방법입니다.그러나 이 주장의 진실성은 체계적으로 증명된 적이 없다.여기서 우리는 처음으로 분량표법과 BWS법을 직접 비교하는 실험을 진행했다.주석의 총수가 같은 상황에서 BWS는 평점표에서 나온 결과보다 훨씬 믿을 만하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Mikondo ya rangi ni njia inayotumiwa sana kwa ajili ya kutangaza taarifa; Hata hivyo, wanaleta changamoto kadhaa, kama vile vigumu kuendelea kuendelea kwa matatizo yanayoendelea. Uchaguzi mbaya zaidi (BWS) ni njia mbadala ya kuchanganyikiwa kinachodai kutengeneza matangazo ya kiwango kikubwa wakati wakiweka idadi ya matatizo yanayohitajika yanayofanana na kiwango cha rangi. However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  Here for the first time, we set up an experiment that directly compares the rating scale method with BWS.  Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa idadi moja ya matatizo hayo, BWS inatoa matokeo yenye kuaminika zaidi ya kiwango cha rangi.', 'de': 'Ratingskalen sind eine weit verbreitete Methode zur Datenannotierung; Sie stellen jedoch mehrere Herausforderungen dar, wie z.B. Schwierigkeiten bei der Aufrechterhaltung der Inter- und Intra-Annotator-Konsistenz. Best-worst scaling (BWS) ist eine alternative Methode der Annotation, bei der behauptet wird, qualitativ hochwertige Annotationen zu erzeugen, während die erforderliche Anzahl von Annotationen ähnlich wie bei Ratingskalen bleibt. Die Wahrhaftigkeit dieser Behauptung wurde jedoch nie systematisch festgestellt. Hier haben wir erstmals ein Experiment aufgebaut, das die Ratingskalenmethode direkt mit BWS vergleicht. Wir zeigen, dass BWS bei gleicher Gesamtanzahl an Anmerkungen deutlich zuverlässigere Ergebnisse liefert als die Ratingskala.', 'bg': 'Рейтинговите скали са широко използван метод за анотация на данни; те обаче представляват няколко предизвикателства, като например трудност при поддържането на междуанотаторна и вътреанотаторна последователност. Най-лошото скалиране (BWS) е алтернативен метод на анотация, за който се твърди, че произвежда висококачествени анотации, като същевременно запазва необходимия брой анотации, подобен на този на рейтинговите скали. Верността на това твърдение обаче никога не е била систематично установена. Тук за първи път създаваме експеримент, който директно сравнява метода на рейтинговата скала с БУС. Показваме, че със същия общ брой анотации произвежда значително по-надеждни резултати от рейтинговата скала.', 'tr': '= Ancak, birka챌 챌철z체m sunuyorlar, b철ylece bir s체r체 챌철z체m s체rd체r체yor. I흫 gowy g철rkezili힊i (BWS) terjime etmek 체챌in be첵ik kalitede du첵durmany흫 체첵tgetmesi di첵ip kabul edilen terjime etmek 체챌in ba힊ga bir d채ldir. 횦철ne bu iddialany흫 hakykaty hi챌 ha챌an sistematik bilen guruldy. Bu 첵erde ilkinji gezek, derej채 derej채 철l챌체 첵체zesini BWS bilen gurla첵an bir deney d체zenledik. Biz bir topar hasaplanja bilen, BWS derejleme 철l챌ekinden has ynamly netijeleri 체ret첵채ris.', 'fa': 'مقیاس ارزش یک روش عمومی برای اظهار داده استفاده شده است. ولی آنها چند چالش را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنند، مانند مشکلی در حفظ هماهنگی بین- و داخل آهنگ\u200cکنندگان. بهترین مقیاس\u200cبندی (BWS) روش جایگزینی از نوشته\u200cبندی است که می\u200cگویند برای تولید نوشته\u200cهای کیفیت بالا باشد در حالی که تعداد نوشته\u200cهای لازم مانند مقیاس\u200cبندی است. ولی حقیقت این ادعا هرگز به صورت سیستماتیک ثابت نشده است. برای اولین بار اینجا، یک آزمایش را ساختیم که مستقیماً روش مقیاس مقیاس را با BWS مقایسه می کند. ما نشان می دهیم که با تعداد کلی نویسندگی، BWS نتیجه های قابل اعتماد بیشتری از مقیاس نویسندگی تولید می کند.', 'af': "Rating skaal is 'n vaste gebruikte metode vir data annotasie; maar hulle voorsien verskeie uitdagings, soos moeilikheid in die onderhou van inter- en intra- annotator-konsistensie. Beste- worst skaling (BWS) is 'n alternatiewe metode van annotasie wat aangeroep word om hoë- kwaliteit annotasies te produseer terwyl die benodige nommer van annotasies gelyk aan wat van rating skale hou. Maar die waarheid van hierdie aandrukking is nooit systematiese geïnstalleer nie. Hier vir die eerste keer, het ons 'n eksperiment opgestel wat direk vergelyk die reetingskaal metode met BWS. Ons wys dat met dieselfde totaal aantal notasies, BWS produseer betekenlik meer betroubaar resultate as die rating skaal.", 'az': 'Vəziyyətlər məlumatlar məlumatları üçün geniş istifadə edilən bir yöntemdir; Ancaq onlar bir neçə çətinlikləri göstərirlər, çünki bir-birindən çətinlikləri qorumaq çətinliklərinə bənzər. Ən yaxşı dəyişiklik (BWS) dəyişiklik məlumatı yüksək kaliteli notlara gətirmək iddia edilən alternatif yoludur, çünki ehtiyacı olan nöqtələrin sayısını dəyişiklik məlumatının istifadəsinə bənzəyir. Ancaq bu iddianın doğruluğu sistematik olaraq heç vaxt qurulmadı. İlk dəfə bu təcrübəsini BWS ilə müəyyən edən bir təcrübə yaratdıq. BWS dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərindən daha güvenilir sonuçlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'রেটিং স্কেল হলো ডাটা অ্যান্টারেশনের জন্য ব্যাপক ব্যবহৃত পদ্ধতি; however, they present several challenges, such as difficulty in maintaining inter- and intra-annotator consistency.  সবচেয়ে খারাপ স্কেলিং (বিডিউএস) হচ্ছে বিকল্প একটি বিকল্প পদ্ধতি যা দাবি করা হচ্ছে উচ্চ মানের বিষয়বস্তু তৈরি করার জন্য, যেখানে রেটের মানের মতো  তবে এই দাবীর সত্যি কখনোই সিস্টেমিকভাবে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়নি। এখানে প্রথমবারের জন্য আমরা একটি পরীক্ষা স্থাপন করেছি যা রেটিং স্ক্যালের পদ্ধতির সাথে সরাসরি তুলনা করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একই সংখ্যার সংখ্যা দিয়ে বিডিউএস রেটিং মাত্রার চেয়ে বেশি বিশ্বস্ত ফলাফল তৈরি করে।', 'am': 'undo-type however, they present several challenges, such as difficulty in maintaining inter- and intra-annotator consistency.  ከሁሉ የከበረው ስቃይ (BWS) በተለየ ቁጥር በሚያሳየው ቁጥር በሚያሰናከሉ መጠቀሚያ ላይ የሚያስፈልገውን አሰናክሎ የሚያስፈልገውን ማሰናከል የተለየ ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የዚህ አካሄድ እውነቱ በሥርዓት ውስጥ ምንም አልተገኘም፡፡ ወደዚህ ለመጀመሪያ ጊዜ ከBWS ጋር አስተያየት የሚያስፈልገውን ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናሳየዋለን በሙሉ ማስታወቂያ ቁጥር፣ BWS ከሚያረጋግጥ ትክክል ፍሬዎችን ከፍ የሚያደርጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ագնահատման մակարդակները տարածաբար օգտագործված մեթոդ են տվյալների annoտացիայի համար: սակայն դրանք բազմաթիվ մարտահրավերներ են ներկայացնում, ինչպիսիք են, օրինակ, դժվարությունը պահպանելու ինտերնետային և ինտերնետորային համապատասխանությունը: Լավագույն չափման (BW S) այլընտրանքային մոտեցում է, որը պնդվում է բարձր որակի նոտացիաներ արտադրելու համար, մինչդեռ պահպանվում է նշումների պահանջված քանակը, որը նման է գնահատականների չափին: However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  Առաջին անգամ մենք մի փորձ ենք կազմակերպել, որը ուղղակիորեն համեմատում է գնահատականի մեթոդը BW-ի հետ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նույն համաշխարհային նշումների քանակով, BW-ն արտադրում է ավելի վստահելի արդյունքներ, քան գնահատման սանդղակը:', 'ca': "Rating scales are a widely used method for data annotation;  però presenten diversos reptes, com la dificultat de mantenir la consistencia entre i entre els anotators. La millor escala (BWS) és un mètode alternativ d'anotació que es diu que produeix anotacions d'alta qualitat mentre manté el nombre requerit d'anotacions semblant a l'escala de valoració. Però la veritat d'aquesta afirmació mai s'ha establit sistemàticament. Aquí per primera vegada vam fer un experiment que compara directament el mètode d'escala de valoració amb BWS. Mostrem que amb el mateix nombre total d'anotacions, BWS produeix resultats significativament més fiables que l'escala de valoració.", 'bs': 'Veličine ocjene su široko korišćena metoda za annotaciju podataka; Međutim, predstavljaju nekoliko izazova, kao što je teško održavati konsekvenciju među annotatorima. Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je alternativni metod annotacije koji se tvrdi da proizvodi visoke kvalitetne annotacije dok drži potrebni broj annotacija sličnih onim skalama ocjena. Međutim, istinitost ove tvrdnje nikada nije uspostavljena sistematski. Ovdje smo prvi put postavili eksperiment koji direktno uspoređuje metodu skale ocjena sa BWS-om. Pokazujemo da sa istim ukupnim brojem annotacija, BWS proizvodi značajno pouzdaniji rezultat od skale ocjena.', 'et': 'Hindamisskaalad on laialdaselt kasutatav andmete märgistamise meetod; kuid need põhjustavad mitmeid probleeme, näiteks raskusi annotatoritevahelise ja -sisese järjepidevuse säilitamisel. Parim halvim skaleerimine (BWS) on alternatiivne annoteerimismeetod, mis väidetavalt toodab kvaliteetseid annoteeringuid, säilitades samal ajal nõutava arvu annoteeringuid sarnaselt reitinguskaalaga. Selle väite õigsust ei ole siiski süstemaatiliselt kindlaks tehtud. Esimest korda loome siin eksperimendi, mis otseselt võrdleb reitinguskaala meetodit BWSiga. Näitame, et sama märkuste koguarvuga annab BWS märkimisväärselt usaldusväärsemaid tulemusi kui reitinguskaala.', 'cs': 'Ratingové stupnice jsou široce používanou metodou anotace dat; Představují však několik problémů, například obtížnosti při zachování konzistence mezi anotátory a uvnitř anotátorů. Best-worst scaling (BWS) je alternativní metoda anotace, která tvrdí, že produkuje vysoce kvalitní anotace při zachování požadovaného počtu anotací podobného ratingovým stupnicím. Pravdivost tohoto tvrzení však nikdy nebyla systematicky prokázána. Zde jsme poprvé nastavili experiment, který přímo porovnává metodu ratingové škály s BWS. Ukazujeme, že při stejném celkovém počtu anotací BWS dosahuje výrazně spolehlivějších výsledků než ratingová stupnice.', 'sq': 'Skalat e vlerësimit janë një metodë e përdorur gjerësisht për anotimin e të dhënave; however, they present several challenges, such as difficulty in maintaining inter- and intra-annotator consistency.  Best-worst scaling (BWS) is an alternative method of annotation that is claimed to produce high-quality annotations while keeping the required number of annotations similar to that of rating scales.  Megjithatë, vërtetësia e kësaj pretendimi nuk është përcaktuar kurrë sistematikisht. Këtu për herë të parë, vendosim një eksperiment që krahason drejtpërdrejt metodën e shkallës së vlerësimit me BWS. Ne tregojmë se me të njëjtin numër total të anotacioneve, BWS prodhon rezultate më të besueshme se shkalla e vlerësimit.', 'fi': 'Arviointiasteikot ovat laajalti käytetty menetelmä tietojen merkitsemiseen; Niissä on kuitenkin useita haasteita, kuten vaikeuksia ylläpitää huomautusten välistä ja sisäistä johdonmukaisuutta. Best-worst scaling (BWS) on vaihtoehtoinen merkintämenetelmä, jonka väitetään tuottavan korkealaatuisia merkintöjä säilyttäen vaaditun määrän merkintöjä samanlaisena kuin luokitusasteikolla. Väitteen todenmukaisuutta ei kuitenkaan ole koskaan järjestelmällisesti vahvistettu. Perustamme tässä ensimmäistä kertaa kokeen, jossa verrataan suoraan luokitusasteikon menetelmää BWS:ään. Osoitamme, että samalla merkintämäärällä BWS tuottaa huomattavasti luotettavampia tuloksia kuin luokitusasteikko.', 'ha': "Rating scales are a widely used method for data annotation;  Kayya, sai su zo da wasu tsõratar, kamar yin adadi ga tsari a tsakanin-da-tsakanin. Babbar filininta mafi girma (BWS) shi ne wata hanyor shirin zartar da za'a ƙãga shi da za'a ƙãga tsarin mai nau'i da kuma a tsare ƙidãya da aka buƙata da shi da tsakanin rabo. A lokacin da gaskiyar wannan daidai ba ta riga an daidaita shi ba. Hali na farkon farko, za'a sami wani jarrabi wanda ke sami kwamfyutan tsari da BWS. Tuna nũna cewa, da duk misãlan haske da BWS ke fitar ma'anar fassara mai aminci ko da tsakanin rabo.", 'he': 'Rating scales are a widely used method for data annotation;  בכל אופן, הם מציגים מספר אתגרים, כמו קשה לשמור על התקבלות בין ולפני המכתבים. Best-worst scaling (BWS) is an alternative method of annotation that is claimed to produce high-quality annotations while keeping the required number of annotations similar to that of rating scales.  However, the veracity of this claim has never been systematically established.  כאן בפעם הראשונה, הקמנו ניסוי שישוווה ישירות את שיטת סקל ההערכה עם BWS. We show that with the same total number of annotations, BWS produces significantly more reliable results than the rating scale.', 'bo': 'རིམ་པ་ཚད་འཛིན་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་མི་ཁོང་ཚོས་དཀའ་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཚད་བརྟན་སྐྱེལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གྲོས་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ཡིན་ནའང་། གཏན་ཁེལ་གྱི་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དེ་སྟངས་འཛུགས་མ་བྱུང་། འདིར་ངེད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཐེངས་དང་པོ་མཇུག་ལ་སྒྲིག་པའི་བརྟག་ཚིག་གི་རིམ་པ་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུར་བ་ཅིག ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་བསྡུར', 'sk': 'Ocenjevalne lestvice so pogosto uporabljena metoda za označevanje podatkov; Vendar pa predstavljajo številne izzive, kot so težave pri ohranjanju skladnosti med opombalniki in znotraj njih. Najboljše najslabše lestvice (BWS) je alternativna metoda označevanja, ki naj bi ustvarila visokokakovostne označbe, hkrati pa ohranila zahtevano število označb, podobno tistemu pri bonitetnih lestvicah. Vendar pa resničnost te trditve nikoli ni bila sistematično ugotovljena. Tu smo prvič vzpostavili eksperiment, ki neposredno primerja metodo bonitetne lestvice z BWS. Pokazali smo, da BWS z enakim skupnim številom opomb doseže bistveno zanesljivejše rezultate kot ocenjevalna lestvica.', 'jv': 'textattr Nanging, yo uwong-uwong sing sepisan akeh sing urak, kaya susah-susahe kanggo nggawe nguasai tarjamahan karo iso nggawe Monday Nanging, adalah, kuwi nglanggar-adalah iki ora bisa ditambah sistematik. Sampeyan banget, kita sampeyan nagara un barêng nggawe dadi bisa nggawe gerarung metu nggawe barang nggawe BWS. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngono nganggo puntuan sing gak adhil, BWS njaluk akeh njaluk dadi sing luwih basa sing luwih disebarke'}
{'en': 'Parser Adaptation for Social Media by Integrating Normalization', 'ar': 'محلل التكيف لوسائل الإعلام الاجتماعية من خلال دمج التطبيع', 'fr': "Adaptation de l'analyseur pour les réseaux sociaux grâce à l'intégration de la normalisation", 'es': 'Adaptación del analizador para redes sociales mediante la integración de la normalización', 'pt': 'Adaptação do analisador para mídias sociais integrando a normalização', 'ja': '正規化を統合することによるソーシャルメディアの構文解析の適応', 'zh': '因集成规范化社交媒体之解析器以应之', 'ru': 'Адаптация анализатора для социальных сетей путем интеграции нормализации', 'hi': 'सामान्यीकरण को एकीकृत करके सामाजिक मीडिया के लिए पार्सर अनुकूलन', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Parsálaí do na Meáin Shóisialta trí Normalú a Chomhtháthú', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიათების პანელექტის ადაპტიფიკაცია ნორმალიზაციის ინტერგურაციით', 'hu': 'Parser adaptáció a közösségi médiához a normalizáció integrálásával', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή για τα κοινωνικά μέσα μέσω της ενσωμάτωσης της κανονικοποίησης', 'kk': 'Нормализацияны интеграциялау арқылы социалдық медиаға талдау адаптациясы', 'it': 'Adattamento Parser per i Social Media Integrando la Normalizzazione', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Penjana untuk Media Sosial dengan Integrasi Normalisasi', 'mk': 'Адаптација на анализаторот за социјалните медиуми со интеграција на нормализацијата', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos analizatoriaus pritaikymas integruojant normalizaciją', 'mt': 'Adattament tal-analizzatur għall-Midja Soċjali permezz tal-Integrazzjoni tan-Normalizzazzjoni', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн талаар шинэчлэлтийн загвар', 'no': 'Tolkingstilpassing for sosialmedia ved integrering av normalisering', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയ്ക്കുള്ള പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുക', 'sr': 'Analizatorska adaptacija za socijalne medije integrisanjem normalizacije', 'pl': 'Parser Adaptacja dla mediów społecznościowych poprzez integrację normalizacji', 'ro': 'Adaptarea Parser pentru Social Media prin integrarea normalizării', 'so': 'Heshiiska baarlamaanka ee Maamulka bulshada', 'ta': 'Parser Adaptation for Social Media by Integrating Normalization', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا کے لئے پارسر اڈپٹیٹ کیٹ کرتی ہے', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය සඳහා පරීක්ෂකය අනුමාණය', 'sv': 'Parser Anpassning för sociala medier genom att integrera normalisering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tính cách thích ứng phương tiện xã hội bằng cách tính hoá', 'bg': 'Адаптация на анализатор за социални медии чрез интегриране на нормализацията', 'hr': 'Analizatorska adaptacija za socijalne medije integriranjem normalizacije', 'da': 'Parser tilpasning til sociale medier ved at integrere normalisering', 'de': 'Parser Anpassung für Social Media durch Integration von Normalisierung', 'id': 'Adaptasi Parser untuk Media Sosial dengan Integrasi Normalisasi', 'ko': '통합 규범화를 통해 소셜 미디어에 대한 해상도 조정', 'nl': 'Parser aanpassing voor sociale media door normalisatie te integreren', 'sw': 'Toleo la Mpango wa Vyombo vya Habari vya Kijamii kwa Kujumuisha Ujadala', 'fa': 'تغییرات پژوهش برای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی با ترکیب نورملازی', 'tr': 'Sowet Medýdançalary bejermek üçin janlaşdyrma', 'af': 'Toets aanpassing vir sosiale media deur te integreer Normaliseering', 'sq': 'Parser Adaptation for Social Media by Integrating Normalization', 'az': 'Nörmalizasyon integrasyonu ilə Sosyal Mediyaların analizacı Adjustasyonu', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের জন্য প্যারেজার অ্যাডাপ্টেশন স্বাভাবিকভাবে যুক্ত করে', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Parser Adaptace pro sociální média integrací normalizace', 'et': 'Parser kohanemine sotsiaalmeedia jaoks normaliseerimise integreerimise kaudu', 'bs': 'Analizatorska adaptacija za socijalne medije integracijom normalizacije', 'ca': "Adaptació d'analitzadors per als mitjans socials integrant la normalització", 'fi': 'Parserin sopeutuminen sosiaaliseen mediaan integroimalla normalisointi', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje razčlenjevalnika za socialne medije z integracijo normalizacije', 'he': 'התאמה של המעבר למדיה חברתית על ידי השתלב בנורמליזציה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་ལ་ཆ་མཚོན་པའི་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'This work explores different approaches of using normalization for parser adaptation. Traditionally, normalization is used as separate pre-processing step. We show that integrating the normalization model into the parsing algorithm is more beneficial. This way, multiple normalization candidates can be leveraged, which improves parsing performance on social media. We test this hypothesis by modifying the Berkeley parser ; out-of-the-box it achieves an F1 score of 66.52. Our integrated approach reaches a significant improvement with an F1 score of 67.36, while using the best normalization sequence results in an F1 score of only 66.94.', 'ar': 'يستكشف هذا العمل طرقًا مختلفة لاستخدام التطبيع للتكيف مع المحلل اللغوي. تقليديا ، يتم استخدام التطبيع كخطوة معالجة مسبقة منفصلة. نوضح أن دمج نموذج التطبيع في خوارزمية الإعراب أكثر فائدة. بهذه الطريقة ، يمكن الاستفادة من عدة مرشحين للتطبيع ، مما يحسن أداء التحليل على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. نقوم باختبار هذه الفرضية من خلال تعديل محلل بيركلي. خارج الصندوق يحقق درجة F1 تبلغ 66.52. يصل نهجنا المتكامل إلى تحسن كبير مع درجة F1 تبلغ 67.36 ، بينما يؤدي استخدام أفضل تسلسل تطبيع إلى الحصول على درجة F1 تبلغ 66.94 فقط.', 'fr': "Ce travail explore différentes approches de l'utilisation de la normalisation pour l'adaptation des analyseurs. Traditionnellement, la normalisation est utilisée comme étape de prétraitement séparée. Nous montrons que l'intégration du modèle de normalisation dans l'algorithme d'analyse est plus bénéfique. De cette façon, plusieurs candidats à la normalisation peuvent être exploités, ce qui améliore les performances d'analyse sur les réseaux sociaux. Nous testons cette hypothèse en modifiant l'analyseur Berkeley\xa0; dès le départ, il atteint un score F1 de 66,52. Notre approche intégrée atteint une amélioration significative avec un score F1 de 67,36, tandis que l'utilisation de la meilleure séquence de normalisation donne un score F1 de seulement 66,94.", 'pt': 'Este trabalho explora diferentes abordagens de uso de normalização para adaptação de parser. Tradicionalmente, a normalização é usada como etapa de pré-processamento separada. Mostramos que integrar o modelo de normalização ao algoritmo de análise sintática é mais benéfico. Dessa forma, vários candidatos à normalização podem ser aproveitados, o que melhora o desempenho da análise nas mídias sociais. Testamos essa hipótese modificando o analisador de Berkeley; out-of-the-box atinge uma pontuação F1 de 66,52. Nossa abordagem integrada alcança uma melhora significativa com uma pontuação F1 de 67,36, enquanto o uso da melhor sequência de normalização resulta em uma pontuação F1 de apenas 66,94.', 'es': 'Este trabajo explora diferentes enfoques del uso de la normalización para la adaptación del analizador. Tradicionalmente, la normalización se utiliza como paso de preprocesamiento independiente. Demostramos que integrar el modelo de normalización en el algoritmo de análisis es más beneficioso. De esta manera, se pueden aprovechar múltiples candidatos de normalización, lo que mejora el rendimiento del análisis en las redes sociales. Probamos esta hipótesis modificando el analizador de Berkeley; listo para usar, logra una puntuación F1 de 66.52. Nuestro enfoque integrado logra una mejora significativa con una puntuación F1 de 67,36, mientras que el uso de la mejor secuencia de normalización da como resultado una puntuación F1 de solo 66,94.', 'ja': 'この研究では、構文解析器の適応に正規化を使用するさまざまなアプローチを探求しています。従来、正規化は別個の前処理ステップとして使用される。正規化モデルを解析アルゴリズムに統合する方が有益であることを示しています。このようにして、複数の正規化候補を活用することができ、ソーシャルメディアでの構文解析のパフォーマンスが向上します。私たちはこの仮説をバークレーパーサーを修正してテストしました。すぐにF 1スコア66.52を達成します。私たちの統合されたアプローチは、67.36のF 1スコアで有意な改善に達し、一方、最良の正規化配列を使用すると、わずか66.94のF 1スコアになる。', 'zh': '其事究用规范化解析器所宜异术。 故事,规范化以为独预处理。 明集规范化模形解析算法益之。 如此者,可以多规范化候选项,以重社交媒体解析之性也。 改伯克利解析器以试之。 开箱即用,其F1分为66.52。 其集成法著,F1 分为 67.36,而用最佳归一化序者 F1 得分为 66.94。', 'ru': 'В данной работе рассматриваются различные подходы к использованию нормализации для адаптации парсера. Традиционно нормализация используется в качестве отдельного этапа предварительной обработки. Показано, что интеграция модели нормализации в алгоритм синтаксического анализа более выгодна. Таким образом, можно использовать несколько соискателей нормализации, что улучшает производительность синтаксического анализа в социальных сетях. Мы проверяем эту гипотезу, модифицируя парсер Berkeley; из коробки он достигает оценки F1 66,52. Наш комплексный подход достигает значительного улучшения с оценкой F1 67,36, в то время как использование лучшей последовательности нормализации приводит к оценке F1 только 66,94.', 'hi': 'यह काम पार्सर अनुकूलन के लिए सामान्यीकरण का उपयोग करने के विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों की पड़ताल करता है। परंपरागत रूप से, सामान्यीकरण का उपयोग अलग-अलग पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण चरण के रूप में किया जाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि पार्सिंग एल्गोरिथ्म में सामान्यीकरण मॉडल को एकीकृत करना अधिक फायदेमंद है। इस तरह, कई सामान्यीकरण उम्मीदवारों का लाभ उठाया जा सकता है, जो सोशल मीडिया पर पार्सिंग प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। हम बर्कले पार्सर को संशोधित करके इस परिकल्पना का परीक्षण करते हैं; आउट-ऑफ-द-बॉक्स यह 66.52 का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त करता है। हमारा एकीकृत दृष्टिकोण 67.36 के F1 स्कोर के साथ एक महत्वपूर्ण सुधार तक पहुंचता है, जबकि केवल 66.94 के F1 स्कोर में सर्वोत्तम सामान्यीकरण अनुक्रम परिणामों का उपयोग करते हुए।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an saothar seo cuir chuige éagsúla chun normalú a úsáid le haghaidh oiriúnú parsálaí. Go traidisiúnta, úsáidtear normalú mar chéim réamhphróiseála ar leithligh. Léirímid go bhfuil sé níos tairbhí an tsamhail normalaithe a chomhtháthú san algartam parsála. Ar an mbealach seo, is féidir il-iarrthóirí normalaithe a ghiaráil, rud a fheabhsaíonn feidhmíocht parsála ar na meáin shóisialta. Déanaimid tástáil ar an hipitéis seo trí pharsálaí Berkeley a mhodhnú; as-an-bhosca baineann sé amach scór F1 de 66.52. Sroicheann ár gcur chuige comhtháite feabhas suntasach le scór F1 de 67.36, agus úsáid á baint as na torthaí seicheamh normalaithe is fearr i scór F1 de ach 66.94.', 'ka': 'ეს სამუშაო განსხვავებული მოწყობილობის გამოყენება ნორმალიზაციის აკაპექტირებისთვის. ტრადიციონალურად, ნორმალიზაცია გამოყენებულია როგორც განსაკუთრებული წინაპროცესის ნაწილი. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ნორმალიზაციის მოდელის ინტერგურაცია ალგორიტიმში უფრო გამოსაყენებელია. ასე, რამდენიმე ნორმალიზაციის კანდიდენტები შეიძლება გააკეთება, რომელიც სოციალური მედიაში გააკეთება განაკეთება. ჩვენ ამ ჰიპოტესტის შეცვლით, ბერკლის პანსერტის შეცვლით; F1 წერტილი 66.52-ის გარეშე. ჩვენი ინტერგურაციული პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა მიიღება მნიშვნელოვანი დააბრუნება 67.36 წერტილით F1 წერტილით, როცა ყველაზე საუკეთესო ნორმალიზაციის წერტილის შესაძლებლობა', 'hu': 'Ez a munka a normalizáció használatának különböző megközelítéseit vizsgálja fel a parser adaptációhoz. Hagyományosan a normalizációt külön előfeldolgozási lépésként használják. Megmutatjuk, hogy a normalizációs modell integrálása az elemzési algoritmusba sokkal előnyösebb. Ily módon több normalizációs jelöltet lehet kihasználni, ami javítja a közösségi médián történő elemzési teljesítményt. Ezt a hipotézist a Berkeley elemző módosításával teszteljük; A dobozból kiindulva 66,52 F1 pontszámot ér el. Integrált megközelítésünk jelentős javulást ér el 67,36 F1 pontszámmal, miközben a legjobb normalizációs sorozat használatával mindössze 66,94 F1 pontszámot ér el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις για τη χρήση της ομαλοποίησης για την προσαρμογή του αναλυτή. Παραδοσιακά, η ομαλοποίηση χρησιμοποιείται ως ξεχωριστό βήμα προεπεξεργασίας. Δείχνουμε ότι η ενσωμάτωση του μοντέλου ομαλοποίησης στον αλγόριθμο ανάλυσης είναι πιο επωφελής. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, μπορούν να αξιοποιηθούν πολλαπλοί υποψήφιοι ομαλοποίησης, γεγονός που βελτιώνει την απόδοση ανάλυσης στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Δοκιμάζουμε αυτή την υπόθεση τροποποιώντας τον αναλυτή Μπέρκλεϊ. Έξω από το κουτί επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία F1 66.52. Η ολοκληρωμένη προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση με βαθμολογία 67.36, ενώ χρησιμοποιώντας την καλύτερη ακολουθία ομαλοποίησης καταλήγει σε βαθμολογία μόνο 66.94.', 'it': "Questo lavoro esplora diversi approcci di utilizzo della normalizzazione per l'adattamento del parser. Tradizionalmente, la normalizzazione viene utilizzata come fase separata di pre-elaborazione. Mostriamo che integrare il modello di normalizzazione nell'algoritmo di analisi è più vantaggioso. In questo modo, è possibile sfruttare più candidati alla normalizzazione, migliorando le prestazioni di analisi sui social media. Testiamo questa ipotesi modificando il parser Berkeley; out-of-the-box raggiunge un punteggio F1 di 66,52. Il nostro approccio integrato raggiunge un miglioramento significativo con un punteggio F1 di 67,36, mentre utilizzando la migliore sequenza di normalizzazione si ottiene un punteggio F1 di soli 66,94.", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс талдау адаптациясының нормализациясын қолдану арқылы түрлі арқылы іздейді. Дәстүрлі, нормализация бөлек алдын- ала өңдеу қадамы ретінде қолданылады. Біз нормализациялау үлгісін талдау алгоритміне ендіру арқылы болады. Бұл үшін бірнеше нормализациялау кандидаттары көмектесе алады, олар социалдық медиақтағы талдау әрекеттерін жақсартып береді. Біз бұл гипотезаны Беркли талдаушысын өзгертіп тексердік. F1 нәтижесін 66,52 деп жеткізеді. Біздің біріктірілген тәсіліміміз 67,36 деген F1 нөмірінде маңызды жақсарту үшін жеткізеді. Бірақ ең жақсы нормализациялау ретінде тек 66,94 деген F1 нөмірінде болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe nagrinėjami skirtingi metodai normalizacijai pritaikyti analizatoriui. Paprastai normalizacija naudojama kaip atskiras išankstinis perdirbimo etapas. Mes rodome, kad normalizacijos modelio integravimas į analizavimo algoritmą yra naudingesnis. This way, multiple normalization candidates can be leveraged, which improves parsing performance on social media.  Bandome šią hipotezę modifikuodami Berkeley analizatorių; išorinėje dėžutėje F1 rezultatas yra 66,52. Mūsų integruotas metodas pasiekia reikšmingą pagerėjimą 67,36 F1 balais, o geriausia normalizacijos seka rodo tik 66,94 F1 balais.', 'mk': 'Оваа работа истражува различни пристапи за користење на нормализација за адаптација на анализаторот. Традиционално, нормализацијата се користи како одделен чекор на преобработување. Ние покажуваме дека интеграцијата на моделот на нормализација во алгоритмот за анализирање е покорисна. На овој начин, можно е да се искористат многуте кандидати за нормализација, што ја подобрува анализата на резултатите на социјалните медиуми. Ние ја тестираме оваа хипотеза со модификација на Беркли анализаторот; надвор од кутијата постигнува резултат F1 од 66,52. Our integrated approach reaches a significant improvement with an F1 score of 67.36, while using the best normalization sequence results in an F1 score of only 66.94.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധാരണ വ്യത്യസ്ത വഴികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന പാര്\u200dട്ടികമായി, സാധാരണ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പടിയായി ഉപ പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് അല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിലേക്ക് സാധാരണ മോഡല്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപകാരമാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുതരുന ഇതുവഴി പല സാധാരണ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി വരാം, അത് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പ്രസ്താവി ബെര്\u200dക്കെലി പരിഗണന മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിയെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു; out-of-the-box it achieves an F1 score of 66.52.  നമ്മുടെ ഒരുമിച്ച പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d 67. 36 സ്കോര്\u200d മാത്രം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്. ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സാധാരണ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ചാല്\u200d F1 സ്കോര്\u200d മാത', 'ms': 'Kerja ini mengeksplorasi pendekatan berbeza menggunakan normalisasi untuk penyesuaian hurai. Secara tradisional, normalisasi digunakan sebagai langkah awal-proses terpisah. Kami menunjukkan bahawa integrasi model normalisasi ke dalam algoritma penghuraian lebih berguna. Dengan cara ini, calon normalisasi berbilang boleh digunakan, yang meningkatkan penghuraian prestasi pada media sosial. Kami menguji hipotesis ini dengan mengubah penghurai Berkeley; keluar dari kotak ia mencapai skor F1 66.52. Pendekatan integrasi kita mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dengan skor F1 67.36, sementara menggunakan urutan normalisasi terbaik menghasilkan skor F1 hanya 66.94.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажил хуваагдах загварын тулд нормализацийг ашиглах өөр аргыг судалдаг. Харин уламжлалтай нь нормализацийг хуваалцах алхам гэж хэрэглэгддэг. Бид нормализацийн загварыг хуваалцах алгоритмыг илүү ашигтай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Иймээс олон нормализацийн удирдагчид нийгмийн хэвлэлийн ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна. Бид үүнийг Беркли хуваарьчийг өөрчлөхөд шалгаж байна. F1 оноо 66.52 гарч ирнэ. Бидний нэгтгэл арга барилга нь F1-ийн 67.36 оноос илүү сайжруулсан сайжруулалт гарч ирнэ. Хамгийн сайжруулах арга барилга нь F1-ийн 66.94 оноос гарч ирнэ.', 'pl': 'W pracy badano różne podejścia do wykorzystania normalizacji do adaptacji parsera. Tradycyjnie normalizacja jest stosowana jako oddzielny etap przetwarzania wstępnego. Pokazujemy, że integracja modelu normalizacji z algorytmem parsowania jest bardziej korzystna. W ten sposób można wykorzystać wielu kandydatów normalizacyjnych, co poprawia wydajność analizy w mediach społecznościowych. Testujemy tę hipotezę poprzez modyfikację parsera Berkeley; Po wyjściu z pudełka osiąga wynik F1 66.52. Nasze zintegrowane podejście osiąga znaczącą poprawę dzięki wynikowi F1 67,36, przy jednoczesnym zastosowaniu najlepszej sekwencji normalizacji uzyskuje wynik F1 zaledwie 66,94.', 'no': 'Dette arbeidet utforskar ulike tilnærmingar for å bruka normalisering for tolkaradaptasjon. Vanlegvis vert normalisert brukt som eigne forhandsamingssteg. Vi viser at integrering av normaliseringsmodulen i tolkingsgoritmen er meir nyttig. Med denne måten kan fleire normaliseringsskandidatar leverast, som forbetrar tolkingsfunksjonen på sosiale media. Vi testar denne hipotesen ved å endra Berkeley-analysen. avboksen oppnår han eit F1- poeng med 66, 52. Det integrerte tilnærminga vårt når ein betydelig forbedring med eit F1- poeng med 67,36, mens det beste normaliseringssekvensen resulterer i eit F1- poeng med berre 66,94.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare explorează diferite abordări de utilizare a normalizării pentru adaptarea parser. În mod tradițional, normalizarea este utilizată ca etapă separată de pre-procesare. Arătăm că integrarea modelului de normalizare în algoritmul de analizare este mai benefică. În acest fel, pot fi utilizați mai mulți candidați de normalizare, ceea ce îmbunătățește performanța analizării pe rețelele de socializare. Testăm această ipoteză prin modificarea parserului Berkeley; Acesta obține un scor F1 de 66,52. Abordarea noastră integrată atinge o îmbunătățire semnificativă cu un scor F1 de 67,36, în timp ce utilizăm cea mai bună secvență de normalizare rezultate într-un scor F1 de doar 66,94.', 'sr': 'Ovaj rad istražuje različite pristupe korištenja normalizacije za adaptaciju analizatora. Tradicionalno, normalizacija se koristi kao odvojeni korak pre obrade. Pokazujemo da je integracija normalizacije u algoritmus za analizu korisniji. Na taj naèin, mogu se ukljuèiti višestruki kandidati za normalizaciju, koji poboljšavaju analizu učinka na društvenim medijima. Testiramo ovu hipotezu modificiranjem Berkeley parsera; izvan kutije postiže rezultat F1 od 66,52. Naš integrirani pristup postiže značajno poboljšanje s rezultatom F1 od 67,36, dok koristimo najbolju normalizaciju rezultat rezultata F1 rezultata samo 66,94.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ විශාලකය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට භාවිත කරන විවිදියට විවිදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට, සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පෙරතිරිපද්ධති පැත්තක් විදියට භාවිත කරනවා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වඩා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි. මෙහෙම විදියට, සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයා අපි මේ හිතාව පරීක්ෂා කරනවා බර්ක්ලි විශේෂකය වෙනස් කරලා; පෙට්ටියෙන් එළියට එන්න පුළුවන් F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 66.52 වෙනුවෙන්. අපේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට F1 ස්කෝර් 67.36 වලින් විශේෂ විදියට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, F1 ස්කෝර් 66.94 වලින් හොඳම සාමාන්\u200dය වි', 'so': "Shaqadaasu wuxuu baaraandegaa habooyin kala duduwan oo isticmaalka caadiga loo beddelo baaritaanka. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa qaabab gaar ah. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in la qabsashada modelka caadiga ah oo ku habboon qoraalka baarlamaanka ay faa'iido badan tahay. Sidan darteed waxaa loo dhiibi karaa mushaariyaalo badan oo caadi ah, kaas oo hagaajiya bandhigyada shabakadda bulshada. We test this hypothesis by modifying the Berkeley parser;  kasoo baxo waxay gaadhaa koox F1 oo 66.52. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga la qabsaday waxay gaadhaa hagaajinta aad u weyn ee F1 iskuul 67.36, xitaa isticmaalidda ugu wanaagsan xiliga caadi ahaanshaha waxaa ka soo baxa iskuul F1 oo kaliya 66.94.", 'sv': 'Detta arbete utforskar olika metoder för att använda normalisering för parser anpassning. Traditionellt används normalisering som separat förbehandling steg. Vi visar att det är mer fördelaktigt att integrera normaliseringsmodellen i parsningsalgoritmen. På så sätt kan flera normaliseringskandidater utnyttjas, vilket förbättrar tolkningen på sociala medier. Vi testar denna hypotes genom att ändra Berkeley parser; out-of-the-box den uppnår en F1 poäng på 66,52. Vårt integrerade tillvägagångssätt uppnår en signifikant förbättring med en F1 poäng på 67,36, medan användningen av den bästa normaliseringssekvensen resulterar i en F1 poäng på endast 66,94.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலை தேவைப்படும் சாதாரண ஒதுக்கீட்டிற்கு பயன்படுத்தும் வேறு வழிகளை தேடுகிறது. பாரம்பரிய, வழக்கம் தனிப்பட்ட முன் செயல்படுத்தல் படியாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. சாதாரண மாதிரியை காட்டும் பாசிங் ஆல்பரிமானத்தில் ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். இந்த வழியில், பல இயல்பான தேர்வாளர்கள் கொடுக்கப்படும், அது சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பாடல் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்தும். பெர்க்லி பகுதியை மாற்றி இந்த hypothesis சோதிக்கிறோம். பெட்டியிலிருந்து அது ஒரு F1 புள்ளியை அடைக்கும் 66.52. நம்முடைய ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு 67.36 புள்ளியில் ஒரு முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றத்தை அடைக்கும், சிறந்த இயல்பான வரிசை பயன்படுத்தும் போத', 'ur': 'یہ کام مختلف طریقے کا تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ پارٹر کے اندازے کے لئے عامل کرنا استعمال کرے۔ پیغمبری طور پر، عاملی استعمال کی جاتی ہے مختلف پیش پرسس سٹح کے طور پر۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ نورمنیزی موڈل کو پارسینگ الگوریتم میں ترکیب کرنا بہت فائدہ ہے۔ اسی طرح، بہت سی عاملی کاندینٹوں کو لائر کر سکتے ہیں، جو سوسیل میڈیا میں پارسینٹ کی فعالیت بہتر کرتی ہے. ہم اس فرضی کو آزماتے ہیں کہ برکلی پارچر کو بدل دیتے ہیں۔ باکس کے بیرون سے یہ 66.52 کی F1 اسکو پہنچ سکتا ہے۔ ہماری تفریق طریقہ 67.36 کی F1 سکوٹ کے ساتھ ایک بڑی اضافہ تک پہنچتی ہے، حالانکہ بہترین عامل طریقہ کا استعمال کرتا ہے F1 سکوٹ میں صرف 66.94 ہے.', 'mt': 'Dan ix-xogħol jesplora approċċi differenti għall-użu tan-normalizzazzjoni għall-adattament tal-analizzatur. Tradizzjonalment, in-normalizzazzjoni tintuża bħala pass separat ta’ qabel l-ipproċessar. Aħna nuru li l-integrazzjoni tal-mudell ta’ normalizzazzjoni fl-algoritmu tal-analiżi hija aktar ta’ benefiċċju. B’dan il-mod, jistgħu jiġu sfruttati diversi kandidati għan-normalizzazzjoni, li jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-analiżi fuq il-midja soċjali. Aħna ntestjaw din l-ipoteżi billi mmodifikaw il-parser Berkeley; out-of-the-box it achieves an F1 score of 66.52.  L-approċċ integrat tagħna jilħaq titjib sinifikanti b’punteġġ F1 ta’ 67.36, filwaqt li l-użu tal-a ħjar sekwenza ta’ normalizzazzjoni jirriżulta f’punteġġ F1 ta’ 66.94 biss.', 'uz': "Name Name Biz oddiylik modelini parsing algorithiga birlashtirishni ko'rsatganimiz juda foydali. Bunday qilib, ko'pchilik oddiylik kandidalar qo'shish mumkin, bu jamiyat media'da bir necha tadbirlik vazifasini oshirish mumkin. Biz bu hypotheyasini Berkeley parametrlarini o'zgartirish orqali tizimiz; tugmalar birikmasi 66.52 pochta ishga tushadi. Our integrated approach reaches a significant improvement with an F1 score of 67.36, while using the best normalization sequence results in an F1 score of only 66.94.", 'vi': 'Việc này nghiên cứu các phương pháp khác nhau về việc sử dụng Bình thường cho phù hợp cha phân. Theo truyền thống, sự bình thường được dùng như một bước phân biệt. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc tổng hợp mô hình bình thường vào thuật toán phân tích sẽ hữu ích hơn. Bằng cách này, nhiều ứng viên có thể tăng lực phục hồi, nhằm cải thiện hiệu suất phân tích trên các phương tiện xã hội. Chúng tôi kiểm tra giả thuyết này bằng cách sửa sai vị cha xứ Berkeley. Nó đạt được điểm số F1 của thiệp cao 62. Cách tiếp cận tổng hợp của chúng ta đạt đến một cải tiến đáng kể bằng điểm F1 của 67', 'bg': 'Тази работа изследва различни подходи за използване на нормализация за адаптация на анализатора. Традиционно нормализацията се използва като отделна стъпка на предварителната обработка. Показваме, че интегрирането на модела на нормализация в алгоритъма за анализ е по-полезно. По този начин могат да бъдат използвани множество кандидати за нормализиране, което подобрява ефективността на анализирането в социалните медии. Тестваме тази хипотеза чрез модифициране на Бъркли анализатора; Извън кутията постига резултат от 66.52. Нашият интегриран подход достига значително подобрение с резултат от 67,36, докато използването на най-добрата последователност на нормализиране води до резултат от само 66,94.', 'hr': 'Ovaj rad istražuje različite pristupe korištenja normalizacije za adaptaciju analizatora. Tradicionalno se normalizacija koristi kao odvojeni korak predobrazovanja. Pokazujemo da je integracija normalizacije u algoritam analize korisniji. Na taj način se mogu uključiti višestruki kandidati za normalizaciju, koji poboljšavaju analizaciju učinka na društvenim medijima. Testiramo ovu hipotezu modificiranjem Berkeley analizatora; izvan kutije postiže rezultat F1 od 66,52. Naš integrirani pristup postiže značajno poboljšanje s rezultatom F1 od 67,36, dok koristimo najbolju normalizaciju rezultat rezultata F1 rezultata samo 66,94.', 'nl': 'Dit werk verkent verschillende benaderingen van het gebruik van normalisatie voor parseradaptatie. Traditioneel wordt normalisatie gebruikt als afzonderlijke stap voor voorbewerking. We laten zien dat het integreren van het normalisatiemodel in het parsing algoritme voordeliger is. Op deze manier kunnen meerdere normalisatiekandidaten worden benut, wat de parsing prestaties op sociale media verbetert. We testen deze hypothese door de Berkeley parser te wijzigen; Out-of-the-box behaalt het een F1 score van 66.52. Onze geïntegreerde aanpak bereikt een significante verbetering met een F1 score van 67.36, terwijl het gebruik van de beste normalisatiesequentie resulteert in een F1 score van slechts 66.94.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde udforsker forskellige tilgange til at bruge normalisering til parser tilpasning. Traditionelt anvendes normalisering som separat forbehandling trin. Vi viser, at integration af normaliseringsmodellen i parsing algoritmen er mere gavnlig. På denne måde kan flere normaliserings kandidater udnyttes, hvilket forbedrer fortolkningens ydeevne på sociale medier. Vi tester denne hypotese ved at ændre Berkeley-fortolkeren; Ud af boksen opnår den en F1 score på 66,52. Vores integrerede tilgang opnår en betydelig forbedring med en F1 score på 67,36, mens brugen af den bedste normaliseringssekvens resulterer i en F1 score på kun 66,94.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan ini mengeksplorasi pendekatan berbeda menggunakan normalisasi untuk adaptasi parser. Secara tradisional, normalisasi digunakan sebagai langkah pre-proses terpisah. Kami menunjukkan bahwa integrasi model normalisasi ke algoritma penghuraian lebih berguna. Dengan cara ini, beberapa kandidat normalisasi dapat diaktifkan, yang memperbaiki parsing prestasi di media sosial. Kami menguji hipotesis ini dengan mengubah parser Berkeley; keluar dari kotak itu mencapai skor F1 66,52. pendekatan integrasi kita mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dengan skor F1 67,36, sementara menggunakan urutan normalisasi terbaik hasilnya hanya skor F1 66,94.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit untersucht verschiedene Ansätze zur Verwendung von Normalisierung für Parseradaptation. Traditionell wird die Normalisierung als separater Vorbearbeitungsschritt verwendet. Wir zeigen, dass die Integration des Normalisierungsmodells in den Parsing-Algorithmus vorteilhafter ist. Auf diese Weise können mehrere Normalisierungskandidaten genutzt werden, was die Parsing-Performance in sozialen Medien verbessert. Wir testen diese Hypothese, indem wir den Berkeley Parser modifizieren; Out-of-the-Box erreicht es eine F1-Punktzahl von 66.52. Unser integrierter Ansatz erreicht eine signifikante Verbesserung mit einem F1-Score von 67,36, während die Verwendung der besten Normalisierungssequenz zu einem F1-Score von nur 66,94 führt.', 'ko': '이 작업은 규범화된 해석기를 사용하여 스스로 적응하는 다양한 방법을 모색했다.전통적으로 표준화는 단독의 예처리 절차로 사용된다.우리는 규범화 모델을 해석 알고리즘에 집적하는 것이 더욱 유리하다고 밝혔다.이런 방식을 통해 여러 개의 규범화 후보 옵션을 활용하여 소셜 미디어의 해석 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.Berkeley 파서를 수정하여 이 가정을 확인합니다.개봉 즉시 사용한 F1은 66.52점을 기록했다.우리의 종합적인 방법은 현저한 발전을 이루었다. F1은 67.36을 얻었고 최상의 표준화 서열을 사용한 F1은 66.94에 불과했다.', 'fa': 'این کار از طریق\u200cهای مختلف استفاده از نورمیزی برای تغییر تغییر دادن تحقیق می\u200cکند. به طور رسمی، عادی\u200cسازی به عنوان قدم پیش\u200cپردازی جدا استفاده می\u200cشود. ما نشان می دهیم که جمع کردن مدل عادی به الگوریتم جدا کردن بیشتر سودمندانه است. از این طریق، کاندیداتی\u200cهای تعدادی عادی\u200cسازی می\u200cتوانند استفاده کنند، که عملکرد\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cسازی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی را بهتر می\u200cکند. ما این فرضیه را با تغییر دادن بازیگر برکلی آزمایش می کنیم. خارج از جعبه به یک نمونه F1 از 66.52 رسیده است. دستور متحد ما با امتياز F1 در حدود 67.36 به بهترين پيشرفت رسيده است، در حالي که از بهترين دستور عامل\u200cسازي نتيجه\u200cاي در امتياز F1 در حدود 66.94 است.', 'sw': 'This work explores different approaches of using normalization for parser adaptation.  Kwa kawaida, utaratibu unatumiwa kama hatua tofauti ya upasuaji. Tunaonyesha kuwa kuunganisha muundo wa kawaida katika wimbo wa parge ni faida zaidi. Kwa namna hii, wagombea wengi wa kawaida wanaweza kutumika, ambao unabadilisha utendaji wa parge kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Tunajaribu nadharia hii kwa kubadilisha mchambuzi wa Berkeley; nje ya boksi hilo linafanikiwa score ya F1 ya 66.52. Hatua yetu ya pamoja inafikia maboresho makubwa yenye score ya F1 yenye 67.36, wakati kwa kutumia mfululizo bora wa kawaida unasababisha score za F1 pekee 66.94.', 'tr': 'Bu iş çözümleme üçin normalizasyony ulanmak üçin başga nusgalary keşfetýär. Däpli görä, adatça öň-emeli adım ýaly ullanylýar. Biz normaliziýa nusgasyny analiziýan algoritmä beter bir faydaly bölýändigini görkeýäs. Bu şekilde, köp adalatlamak kandidatlary sosyal medýýatlarda hat çykyşyny gowylaşdyrýar. Biz bu hipotezi Berkeley ayırtıcısını değiştirerek testi yapıyoruz; daşarydaky gutlançylar 66,52 sany f1 noktasy bar. Biziň integral ýaryşymyz F1 अ 67,36 we iň gowy normalizasyon dizisini ulanyp diňe 66,94 sany diýip çarpýar.', 'sq': 'Ky punë eksploron metoda të ndryshme të përdorimit të normalizimit për përshtatjen e analizuesit. Traditionally, normalization is used as separate pre-processing step.  Ne tregojmë se integrimi i modelit të normalizimit në algoritmin e analizimit është më i dobishëm. Kështu, kandidatët e shumëfishtë të normalizimit mund të përdoren, gjë që përmirëson analizimin e performancës në mediat shoqërore. Ne testojmë këtë hipotezë duke modifikuar analizuesin Berkeley; jashtë kutisë arrin një rezultat F1 prej 66.52. Our integrated approach reaches a significant improvement with an F1 score of 67.36, while using the best normalization sequence results in an F1 score of only 66.94.', 'am': 'ይሄ ሥራ የተለየ ተሳታፊ ማቀናጃ ለመጠቀም የተለየ ደረጃዎችን ይፈልጋል፡፡ ባሕላዊው፣ የተለየ ፕሮግራም ደረጃ እንዲሆን ይጠቀማል፡፡ ወደ ፓርቲው አልጎሪም መቀናቀል የሚጠቅመውን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ ብዙዎች የተለመደው ተማሪዎች በማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ የፓርቲውን ማድረግ ያሳድጋሉ፡፡ የቤርክሊ ተቃዋሚውን በማሻሻል ይህን hypothesis እንሞክራለን፤ ከ-box የF1 ነጥብ 66.52 ደረጃ ያገኛል፡፡ የተሰበሰቡን ልግስናችን የF1 ደረጃ የ67.36 ደረጃ እንዲያሳድገው ይደረጋል፤ በተጠቃሚ የድምፅ ቁጥጥር ግን 66.94 ነጥብ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাজের ব্যবহারের স্বাভাবিক ব্যবহারের বিভিন্ন উপায় খুঁজে বের করা হচ্ছে প্যারার্স অ্যাডাপেট ঐতিহ্যবাহীতভাবে, স্বাভাবিকভাবে পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার পদক্ষেপ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পার্সিং অ্যালগরিদমে স্বাভাবিক মডেল যুক্ত করা যায় তা আরো উপকার। এভাবে বেশ কয়েকটি স্বাভাবিক প্রার্থীকে প্রতিষ্ঠান করা যায়, যা সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় পার্সিং প্রদর্শনের প্রভা We test this hypothesis by modifying the Berkeley parser;  বাক্স থেকে বের হয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য এটি একটি F1 স্কোর অর্জন করেছে ৬৬. 52। আমাদের একত্রিত পদ্ধতি ৬৭. ৩৬ স্কোরের মাধ্যমে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পৌঁছে যায়। এদিকে সেরা স্বাভাবিক সেকেন্ড ব্যবহার করে শুধুমাত্র', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ուսումնասիրում է տարբեր մոտեցումներ՝ օգտագործելով նորմալիզացիան վերադասավորման համար: Հավանդաբար, նորմալիզացիան օգտագործվում է որպես առանձին նախընտրական քայլ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նորմալիզացիայի մոդելի ինտեգրումը վերլուծության ալգորիթմի մեջ ավելի օգտակար է: Այսպես, բազմաթիվ նորմալիզացիայի թեկնածուներ կարող են օգտագործվել, ինչը բարելավում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների արդյունքների վերլուծումը: Մենք փորձում ենք այս հիպոթեզը Բերքլին վերլուծողի փոփոխության միջոցով, արկղից դուրս այն հասնում է F1 գնահատականի 66.52: Մեր ինտեգրված մոտեցումը հասնում է նշանակալի բարելավմանը F1-ի 67.36 գնահատականով, մինչդեռ օգտագործելով լավագույն նորմալիզացիայի հաջորդականությունը արդյունքում է F1-ի միայն 66.94 գնահատականը:', 'ca': "Aquesta feina explora diferents enfocaments d'utilitzar la normalització per adaptar-se al analizador. Tradicionalment, la normalització s'utilitza com a pas separat de pré-processament. Mostrem que integrar el model de normalització en l'algoritme d'analització és més beneficiós. D'aquesta manera, es poden aprofitar múltiples candidats a la normalització, cosa que millora l'analisi del rendiment dels mitjans socials. Testem aquesta hipòtesi modificant l'analitzador Berkeley; de fora de la caixa aconsegueix una puntuació F1 de 66,52. El nostre enfocament integrat aconsegueix una millora significativa amb una puntuació F1 de 67,36, mentre l'ús de la millor seqüència de normalització resulta en una puntuació F1 de només 66,94.", 'bs': 'Ovaj rad istražuje različite pristupe korištenja normalizacije za adaptaciju analizatora. Tradicionalno, normalizacija se koristi kao odvojeni korak predobrazovanja. Pokazujemo da je integracija normalizacije u algoritmus za analizu korisnija. Na taj način se mogu uključiti višestruki kandidati za normalizaciju, koji poboljšavaju analizu učinka na društvenim medijima. Testiramo ovu hipotezu modificiranjem Berkeley parsera; izvan kutije postiže rezultat F1 od 66,52. Naš integrirani pristup postiže značajno poboljšanje s rezultatom F1 od 67,36, dok koristimo najbolju normalizaciju rezultat rezultata F1 rezultata samo 66,94.', 'cs': 'Tato práce zkoumá různé přístupy k využití normalizace pro adaptaci parseru. Tradičně se normalizace používá jako samostatný krok předzpracování. Ukazujeme, že integrace normalizačního modelu do parsovacího algoritmu je výhodnější. Tímto způsobem lze využít více kandidátů na normalizaci, což zlepšuje výkon analýzy na sociálních médiích. Tuto hypotézu testujeme modifikací Berkeley parseru; Z balení dosahuje F1 skóre 66,52. Náš integrovaný přístup dosahuje výrazného zlepšení s F1 skóre 67,36, přičemž využití nejlepší normalizační sekvence vede k F1 skóre pouze 66,94.', 'af': "Hierdie werk ondersoek verskillende toegange van gebruik van normalisering vir ontwerker aanpassing. Name Ons wys dat integrering van die normaliseringmodel in die verwerking algoritme is meer nuttig. Hierdie manier kan veelvuldige normaliseerde kandidate verplig word, wat verbeter verwerking van prestasie op sosiale media. Ons probeer hierdie hipotesis deur die Berkeley ontwerker te verander; uit-die-boks is dit bereik 'n F1 telling van 66.52. Ons integreerde toegang bereik 'n betekende verbetering met 'n F1 telling van 67.36, terwyl die beste normalisering reeks gebruik word, resultaat in 'n F1 telling van slegs 66.94.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uuritakse erinevaid lähenemisviise normaliseerimise kasutamiseks parseri kohandamisel. Traditsiooniliselt kasutatakse normaliseerimist eraldi eeltöötluse etapina. Näitame, et normaliseerimismudeli integreerimine parsimisalgoritmi on kasulikum. Nii saab kasutada mitut normaliseerimise kandidaati, mis parandab sotsiaalmeedias parsimise jõudlust. Me testime seda hüpoteesi, muutes Berkeley parser; Väljaspool kastist saavutab see F1 skoori 66,52. Meie integreeritud lähenemisviis saavutab märkimisväärse paranemise F1 skooriga 67,36, samas kui parima normaliseerimise jada kasutamine annab F1 skoori vaid 66,94.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tutkitaan erilaisia lähestymistapoja normalisoinnin käyttämiseen parserin sopeutumisessa. Perinteisesti normalisointia käytetään erillisenä esikäsittelyn vaiheena. Osoitamme, että normalisointimallin integrointi jäsennysalgoritmiin on hyödyllisempää. Näin voidaan hyödyntää useita normalisointiehdokkaita, mikä parantaa sosiaalisen median jäsennystä. Testaamme tätä hypoteesia muuttamalla Berkeleyn jäsentäjää; Se saavuttaa F1 pisteet 66,52. Integroitu lähestymistapamme saavuttaa merkittävän parannuksen F1-pisteellä 67,36, kun taas parhaan normalisointisekvenssin avulla F1-pisteet ovat vain 66,94.', 'az': 'Bu işin analizasyon üçün normalizasyonu istifadə etmək üçün müxtəlif fikirləri keşfetir. Adətli olaraq, normalizasyon ayrı ön işləmə adımı olaraq qullanılır. Biz normalizasyon modelini ayırma algoritminin daha faydalı olduğunu göstəririk. Bu yolla, çoxlu normalizasyon kandidātları istifadə edə bilər ki, sosyal mediyalarda analizasyon performansını daha yaxşılaşdırır. Biz bu hipotezi Berkeley ayırıcısını dəyişdirib imtahana çəkirik. Bu qutudan çıxıb 66.52 dəfə F1 nöqtəsinə yetirir. Bizim birləşdirilmiş yaxınlığımız, F1 dərəcəsi 67,36 ilə möhkəm uzlaşdırmağa çatdı, və ən yaxşı normalizasyon sıralarını istifadə edərkən F1 dərəcəsi yalnız 66,94 dərəcəsi olar.', 'jv': 'Caret AllProgressBar Genjer Punika, akeh sing dipun digawe sing wis ana luwih nggawe, sing mau njaluk ngerasahan urip nggawe media sotiki. Awak dhéwé ujian seneng ipotes iki bakal ngewehi mèhku bakal dumadhil balek; iki XLIF Awakdhéwé sistem sing ditambang nggawe barang nggawe lanjut luwih dumadhi kanggo kelas F1 sing 6.6, sampeyan ngono nggawe sistem sistem sing gawe nêmêr terus kanggo kelas F1 sing ditambah kanggo 6.6', 'sk': 'To delo raziskuje različne pristope uporabe normalizacije za prilagajanje razčlenjevalnika. Tradicionalno se normalizacija uporablja kot ločen korak predobdelave. Pokazali smo, da je integracija modela normalizacije v algoritem razčlenitve koristnejša. Na ta način je mogoče izkoristiti več kandidatov za normalizacijo, kar izboljša učinkovitost razčlenitve na družbenih omrežjih. To hipotezo testiramo s spreminjanjem Berkeleyjevega razčlenjevalnika; Izven škatle doseže rezultat F1 66,52. Naš integriran pristop doseže znatno izboljšanje z rezultatom F1 67,36, medtem ko uporaba najboljšega zaporedja normalizacije doseže rezultat F1 le 66,94.', 'ha': "Wannan aikin yana gane wasu hanyõyi dabam-dabam na yi amfani da shiryarwa wa adaptori wa parse. Traditionally, normalization is used as separate pre-processing step.  Tuna nũna in haɗi misãlin mai normal zuwa algoritin parse yana da mafi amfani. A kan wannan, za'a samar da kandida masu yawa na normal, wadda ke ƙara gyaran parparing a kan mita jamii. Za jarraba wannan harsunan da za'a gyãra fasalin Berkely; Babu-kasar ta sami wani score F1 na 66.52. Tsarakanmu da aka haɗa ta zuwa wani mai kyakko mai girma na F1 score 67.36, kuma da amfani da mafi kyaun sequence na normal yana ƙarami score F1 na 66.94 kawai.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו חוקרת גישות שונות של השימוש בנורמליזציה בהתאמה למחקר. באופן מסורתי, נורמליזציה משתמשת בתור צעד פרט לפני העבודה. אנו מראים שהאינטגרציה של מודל הנורמליזציה לאלגוריתם המחקר יותר מועילה. ככה, מועמדים נורמליזציה מרובים יכולים להשתמש, מה שמשפר את ההפעלה של בדיקת התקשורת החברתית. אנו בודקים את ההיפתוזה הזו על ידי שינוי המחקר ברקלי; מחוץ לקופסה הוא משיג נקודת F1 של 66.52. הגישה המשותפת שלנו מגיעה לשיפור משמעותי עם נקודת F1 של 67.36, בעוד השימוש ברצף הנורמליזציה הטוב ביותר תוצאה נקודת F1 של 66.94 בלבד.', 'bo': 'This work explores different approaches of using normalization for parser adaptation. རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་བེད་སྔོན་ལས་རིམ་གྱི་གྲལ་རིམ་སྦྱར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དེ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་པ་ཤར་བ དེར་བརྟེན། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ ང་ཚོས་Berkeley དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་ཆེ་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། out-of-the-box ཐོབ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ནི། F1 གྲངས་ཀྱི་66.52ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་གི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་F1 རིམ་པ་67.36 ཡིས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆེན་ཤུགས་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'AliMe Chat : A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'ar': 'AliMe Chat: تسلسل للتسلسل ومحرك Chatbot المستند إلى Rerank', 'es': 'AliMe Chat: Una secuencia para secuenciar y un motor de chatbot basado en Rrank', 'fr': 'Chat AliMe\xa0: un moteur de chatbot basé sur une séquence et un classement', 'pt': 'AliMe Chat: uma sequência para sequenciar e reclassificar o Chatbot Engine', 'ja': 'AliMeチャット：シーケンスと再ランクベースのチャットボットエンジンへのシーケンス', 'zh': 'AliMe鑱婂ぉ,鏈哄櫒浜哄紩鎿庡簭閲嶆帓', 'hi': 'AliMe चैट: अनुक्रम और Rerank आधारित Chatbot इंजन के लिए एक अनुक्रम', 'ru': 'AliMe Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'ga': 'Comhrá AliMe: Seicheamh don Inneall Chatbot atá bunaithe ar Sheicheamh agus Athrangú', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια ακολουθία για ακολουθία και επαναταξινόμηση βασισμένη στη μηχανή Chatbot', 'hu': 'AliMe Chat: A Sequence to Sequence és Újrasorolás alapú Chatbot Engine', 'kk': 'Name', 'it': 'AliMe Chat: una sequenza per sequenziare e riorientare il motore Chatbot basato', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'അലിയിം ചാറ്റ്: സെക്കന്\u200dസിനും റെയ്രാഡിനും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ചാറ്റ്ബോട്ട് എഞ്ചിനുമുള്ള സെക്കന്\u200dസ്', 'mt': 'AliMe Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'mn': 'AliMe Chat: A sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'AliMe Chat: Sekwencja do sekwencji i zmiany rankingu oparta na silniku Chatbot', 'sr': 'Alime Chat: Sekvencija Sekvencije i Rerank bazirani Chatbot Motor', 'ro': 'AliMe Chat: O secvență pentru secvență și rearanjare bazată pe Chatbot Engine', 'si': 'AliMe කතාව: A sequence to sequence and re-rang based ChatBot EngineName', 'so': 'Alime Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot engine', 'sv': 'AliMe Chat: En sekvens till sekvens och omräkning baserad Chatbot Engine', 'ta': 'Alime அரட்டை: தொடர்ச்சி மற்றும் மறுவரிசையில் அடிப்படையான சாட்பாட் இயந்திரம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giọng nói kiểu AliMe: Một dãy số tới chuỗi chuỗi và Cấp bậc dựa trên Chatbot', 'bg': 'Чат с пряко име: последователност към последователност и пренареждане базиран Чатбот двигател', 'nl': 'Alime Chat: een sequentie om sequentie en rangschikking gebaseerd Chatbot-engine', 'da': 'AliMe Chat: En sekvens til sekvens og genrangering baseret Chatbot Engine', 'hr': 'AliMe Chat: Sekvencija sekvence i ponovno reagiranje baziranog Chatbot motora', 'id': 'AliMe Chat: Sebuah Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'de': 'AliMe Chat: Eine sequenzbasierte Chatbot-Engine für Sequenz und Reranking', 'ko': 'AliMe Chat: 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 및 라이브러리를 기반으로 하는 챗봇 엔진', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'AliMe Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'sq': 'AliMe Chat: Një Sekuencë në Sekuencë dhe Rerank bazuar në Motorin Chatbot', 'sw': 'AliMe Chat: Mfumo wa Kuzungumza na Mhandisi wa Chatbot anayeishi Rerank', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'AliMe Chat: A sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'bn': 'আলিম চ্যাট: সেকেন্স এবং রেগ্রেন্ড ভিত্তিক চ্যাটবোট ইঞ্জিনের জন্য এক সেকেন্স', 'bs': 'Alime Chat: Sekvencija sekvence i ponovno reagiranje baziranog Chatbot motora', 'ca': 'AliMe Chat: Un motor de càlcul basat en seqüència i rebocatge', 'fi': 'AliMe Chat: Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine', 'et': 'AliMe vestlus: jada järjestusele ja ümberarvestamisele põhinev jutuboti mootor', 'cs': 'AliMe Chat: Sekvence pro sekvenci a přehodnocení založený na Chatbotu Engine', 'am': 'Alime Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot engine', 'jv': 'AliMe Dialog', 'sk': 'AliMe Chat: Zaporedje za zaporedje in prerazvrstitev na osnovi Chatbot Engine', 'ha': 'AliMe Chat: A Sequence to Sequence and rerang based on Chatbot Engine', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'AliMe གླེང་མོལ་བ: A sequence to Sequence and Rerank based Chatbot Engine'}
{'en': 'We propose AliMe Chat, an open-domain chatbot engine that integrates the joint results of Information Retrieval (IR) and Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq) based generation models. AliMe Chat uses an attentive Seq2Seq based rerank model to optimize the joint results. Extensive experiments show our engine outperforms both IR and generation based models. We launch AliMe Chat for a real-world industrial application and observe better results than another public chatbot.', 'ar': 'نقترح AliMe Chat ، محرك روبوت محادثة مفتوح المجال يدمج النتائج المشتركة لنماذج الجيل القائمة على استرداد المعلومات (IR) والتسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq). يستخدم برنامج AliMe Chat نموذج إعادة تشغيل مبني على Seq2Seq لتحسين النتائج المشتركة. تظهر التجارب المكثفة أن محركنا يتفوق على كل من النماذج القائمة على الأشعة تحت الحمراء والتوليد. أطلقنا AliMe Chat لتطبيق صناعي حقيقي ونلاحظ نتائج أفضل من روبوت الدردشة العام الآخر.', 'fr': "Nous proposons AliME Chat, un moteur de chatbot de domaine ouvert qui intègre les résultats conjoints des modèles de génération basés sur la récupération d'informations (IR) et la séquence à séquence (Seq2Seq). AliME Chat utilise un modèle de classement attentif basé sur Seq2Seq pour optimiser les résultats conjoints. Des expériences approfondies montrent que notre moteur surpasse les modèles IR et les modèles basés sur la génération. Nous lançons AliME Chat pour une application industrielle réelle et obtenons de meilleurs résultats qu'un autre chatbot public.", 'es': 'Proponemos AliMe Chat, un motor de chatbot de dominio abierto que integra los resultados conjuntos de los modelos de generación basados en Information Retrieval (IR) y Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat utiliza un atento modelo de ranking basado en Seq2Seq para optimizar los resultados conjuntos. Los exhaustivos experimentos muestran que nuestro motor supera a los modelos basados en generación e IR. Lanzamos AliMe Chat para una aplicación industrial del mundo real y observamos mejores resultados que otro chatbot público.', 'pt': 'Propomos o AliMe Chat, um mecanismo de chatbot de domínio aberto que integra os resultados conjuntos de modelos de geração baseados em Information Retrieval (IR) e Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). O AliMe Chat usa um modelo de reclassificação atencioso baseado em Seq2Seq para otimizar os resultados conjuntos. Extensos experimentos mostram que nosso motor supera os modelos baseados em IR e geração. Lançamos o AliMe Chat para uma aplicação industrial do mundo real e observamos melhores resultados do que outro chatbot público.', 'ja': '情報検索（ IR ）とSequence to Sequence （ Seq 2 Seq ）ベースの生成モデルの共同結果を統合したオープンドメインのチャットボットエンジンであるAliMe Chatを提案します。AliMe Chatは、注意深いSeq 2 Seqベースの再ランクモデルを使用して、ジョイント結果を最適化します。広範囲にわたる実験によると、当社のエンジンはIRとジェネレーションベースの両方のモデルよりも優れています。私たちは、現実の産業アプリケーションのためにAliMeチャットを開始し、他のパブリックチャットボットよりも良い結果を観察します。', 'zh': '吾举AliMe Chat,是一开放域聊天机器人引擎,基于信息检索(IR)序(Seq2Seq)而成形者也。 AliMe Chat用Seq2Seq细心复名模形以优化合之。 博实验之明,吾发动机优于IR发电。 为世工夫应用程序推出AliMe Chat,看胜诸公机器人。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем AliMe Chat, движок чат-ботов с открытым доменом, который интегрирует совместные результаты моделей генерации на основе извлечения информации (IR) и последовательности к последовательности (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat использует внимательную модель повторного ранжирования на основе Seq2Seq для оптимизации совместных результатов. Обширные эксперименты показывают, что наш двигатель превосходит как инфракрасные, так и генераторные модели. Мы запускаем чат AliMe для реального промышленного приложения и наблюдаем лучшие результаты, чем другой публичный чат-бот.', 'hi': 'हम AliMe चैट, एक ओपन-डोमेन चैटबॉट इंजन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (IR) और अनुक्रम से अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) आधारित पीढ़ी मॉडल के संयुक्त परिणामों को एकीकृत करता है। AliMe चैट संयुक्त परिणामों को अनुकूलित करने के लिए एक चौकस Seq2Seq आधारित rerank मॉडल का उपयोग करता है। व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा इंजन आईआर और पीढ़ी आधारित मॉडल दोनों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। हम एक वास्तविक दुनिया के औद्योगिक अनुप्रयोग के लिए AliMe चैट लॉन्च करते हैं और एक और सार्वजनिक चैटबॉट की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम देखते हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid AliMe Chat, inneall chatbot fearainn oscailte a chomhtháthaíonn comhthorthaí samhlacha giniúna bunaithe ar Aisghabháil Faisnéise (IR) agus Seicheamh go Seicheamh (Seq2Seq). Úsáideann AliMe Chat samhail athrangaithe atá bunaithe ar Seq2Seq aireach chun na torthaí comhpháirteacha a bharrfheabhsú. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing go n-éiríonn lenár n-inneall samhlacha IR agus giniúna-bhunaithe araon. Seolaimid AliMe Chat le haghaidh feidhmchlár tionsclaíoch fíor-dhomhanda agus breathnaimid ar thorthaí níos fearr ná bot comhrá poiblí eile.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ AliMe Chat-ს პროგრამებით, გახსნილი დიომინის ჩატვირთვის მოწყობილობა, რომელიც ინფორმაციის მიღება (IR) და შემდეგ შემდეგ (Seq2Seq) მოდელების ერთადერთი შემდეგ ინტერგრაცია. Name განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მოწყობილობა IR და generaციის მოდელების გარეშე. ჩვენ AliMe Chat დავიწყებთ რეალურად მსოფლიოს ინსტრუალური პროგრამებისთვის და უკეთესი წარმოდგენება, ვიდრე სხვა პობლიკური სატუალური', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια μηχανή ανοικτού τομέα που ενσωματώνει τα κοινά αποτελέσματα των μοντέλων παραγωγής βασισμένων στην ανάκτηση πληροφοριών (IR) και στη διαδοχή (Sequence to Sequence (Sequence). Η συνομιλία χρησιμοποιεί ένα προσεκτικό μοντέλο επαναβαθμολόγησης βασισμένο στο για να βελτιστοποιήσει τα κοινά αποτελέσματα. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι ο κινητήρας μας ξεπερνά τόσο τα υπέρυθρα όσο και τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε γενιά. Ξεκινάμε τη συνομιλία για μια πραγματική βιομηχανική εφαρμογή και παρατηρούμε καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από ένα άλλο δημόσιο chatbot.', 'hu': 'Javasoljuk az AliMe Chat-et, egy nyílt domain chatbot motort, amely integrálja az információvisszakeresés (IR) és Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq) alapú generációs modellek közös eredményeit. Az AliMe Chat figyelmes Seq2Seq alapú újratöltési modellt használ az ízületi eredmények optimalizálására. A kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy motorunk mind infravörös, mind generációs alapú modelleket felülmúlja. Az AliMe Chatet egy valós ipari alkalmazásra indítjuk el, és jobb eredményeket figyelünk meg, mint egy másik nyilvános chatbot.', 'lt': 'Siūlome AliMe chat, atviro domeno chatbot variklį, kuris integruoja bendrus informacijos gavimo (IR) ir sekos po sekos (Seq2Seq) modelių rezultatus. AliMe Chat naudoja atsargų Seq2Seq pagrindu pagrįstą pakartotinio anko model į, kad būtų optimizuoti jungtiniai rezultatai. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų variklis yra didesnis už IR ir generacijos modelius. Mes pradedame AliMe chat tikrojo pasaulio pramonės programai ir stebime geresnius rezultatus nei kitas viešasis chatbotas.', 'kk': 'Біз AliMe Chat дегенді, ашық домендегі шатбот тетігін, мәліметті алу (IR) және реттеу (Seq2Seq) негіздеген үлгілердің біріктірілген нәтижелерін біріктіреді. AliMe Chat қосымша нәтижелерді оптимизациялау үшін Seq2Seq негіздеген реранк үлгісін қолданады. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер біздің тетігіміздің IR және құрылғының негіздеген үлгілерін көрсетеді. Біз AliMe Chat-ды шын әлемді индустриалдық қолданбалар үшін жұмыс істеп, басқа әлемдік шаттаудан жақсы нәтижелерді қараймыз.', 'it': "Proponiamo AliMe Chat, un motore di chatbot a dominio aperto che integra i risultati congiunti dei modelli di generazione basati su Information Retrieval (IR) e Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat utilizza un attento modello di rerank basato su Seq2Seq per ottimizzare i risultati articolari. Esperimenti approfonditi dimostrano che il nostro motore supera sia i modelli IR che quelli basati sulla generazione. Lanciamo AliMe Chat per un'applicazione industriale reale e osserviamo risultati migliori di un altro chatbot pubblico.", 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме AliMe Chat, мотор на отворен домен chatbot кој ги интегрира заедничките резултати на моделите на генерација базирани на Информациско преземање (IR) и Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat користи внимателен Seq2Seq базиран реланк модел за оптимизација на заедничките резултати. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот мотор е поголем од IR и генерационалните модели. We launch AliMe Chat for a real-world industrial application and observe better results than another public chatbot.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (IR) യൂട്ട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഒന്നിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചട്ട് എഞ്ചിനും സെക്കെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ (സെക ആലിമി ചാറ്റ് സെക്ക്2സെക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള റിയാങ്ക് മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. യൂട്ട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മാന വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ എഞ്ചിനുകള്\u200d ഐആരിലും തലമുറതലമുറയിലുമുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന നമ്മള്\u200d ശരിക്കും ലോകത്തിലെ വ്യവസായ പ്രയോഗത്തിനായി അലിമെ ചാറ്റ് തുടങ്ങി മറ്റൊരു പൊതുവായ ചട്ട്ബോട്ടിനെക്', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan Chat AliMe, enjin chatbot domain terbuka yang mengintegrasikan keputusan kongsi dari model generasi berasaskan Penerimaan Maklumat (IR) dan Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). Name Eksperimen panjang menunjukkan enjin kita melampaui prestasi model berasaskan IR dan generasi. Kami melancarkan AliMe Chat untuk aplikasi industri dunia nyata dan mengamati hasil yang lebih baik daripada chatbot awam lain.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu AliMe Chat, magna open-domain chatbot li tintegra r-riżultati konġunti tal-mudelli tal-ġenerazzjoni bbażati fuq il-ġbir tal-informazzjoni (IR) u s-Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat juża mudell attent ta’ rerank ibbażat fuq Seq2Seq biex jiġu ottimizzati r-riżultati tal-ġogi. Esperimenti estensivi juru l-prestazzjoni tal-magna tagħna kemm fuq mudelli bbażati fuq IR kif ukoll fuq ġenerazzjoni. We launch AliMe Chat for a real-world industrial application and observe better results than another public chatbot.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår AliMe Chat, ein open-domain chatbot-motor som integrerer samsvarande resultat av informasjonshenting (IR) og sekvens til sekvens basert genereringsmodeller (Seq2Seq). Name Ekstra eksperimenter viser motoren vårt utfører både IR- og genereringsbaserte modeller. Vi startar AliMe Chat for eit virkelige verdensindustriell program og observerer bedre resultat enn ein annan offentlig samtale.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy AliMe Chat, otwarty silnik chatbotów, który integruje wspólne wyniki modeli generacji opartych na sekwencji opartych na pozyskiwaniu informacji (IR) i sekwencji do sekwencji (Sequence to Sequence). AliMe Chat wykorzystuje uważny model renankowania oparty na Seq2Seq, aby zoptymalizować wspólne wyniki. Obszerne eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz silnik przewyższa zarówno modele IR, jak i modele oparte na generacji. Uruchamiamy AliMe Chat dla realnej aplikacji przemysłowej i obserwujemy lepsze wyniki niż inny publiczny chatbot.', 'ro': 'Vă propunem AliMe Chat, un motor de chatbot cu domeniu deschis care integrează rezultatele comune ale modelelor de generație bazate pe recuperarea informațiilor (IR) și secvență la secvență (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat utilizează un model atent de remarcare bazat pe Seq2Seq pentru a optimiza rezultatele articulațiilor. Experimentele ample arată că motorul nostru depășește atât modelele IR, cât și modelele de generație. Lansăm AliMe Chat pentru o aplicație industrială reală și observăm rezultate mai bune decât un alt chatbot public.', 'mn': 'Бид AliMe Chat, нээлттэй холбоотой шатбот машин, мэдээлэл авах (IR) болон Seq2Seq-ын нийлбэр үр дүнг бүрдүүлэх боломжийг санал болгож байна. AliMe Chat холбоотой үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд ухаантай Seq2Seq-д суурилсан реранк загварыг ашигладаг. Маш олон туршилтууд бидний хөдөлгөөн нь IR болон үеийн суурилсан загваруудыг харуулдаг. Бид AliMe Chat-г жинхэнэ дэлхийн үйлдвэрлэлийн хэрэглээний тулд нээлттэй, олон нийтийн яриагаас илүү сайн үр дүн үзүүлдэг.', 'si': 'අපි AliMe චැට්ට්, විවෘත-ඩොමේන් චැට්බෝට් එංජින් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර (IR) සහ පරීක්ෂණ (Seq2Seq) පරීක්ෂණ විද්\u200dයා AliMe චැට්ට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපත් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය අපේ ඉංජින් එකේ IR සහ පරීක්ෂණය අධාරිත මොඩල් දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා. අපි ඇලිමි චැට් එක පටන් ගන්නවා ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ව්\u200dයාපාරික ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'sr': 'Predlažemo AliMe Chat, motor otvorenog domena za razgovor koji integriše zajedničke rezultate prikupljanja informacija (IR) i sekvence na sekvenciji (Seq2Seq) modela generacije. AliMe Chat koristi pažljiv model rezultata na osnovu Seq2Seq kako bi optimizirao zajedničke rezultate. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš motor nadmašuje i modele na osnovu IR-a i generacije. lansiramo AliMe Chat za industrijsku aplikaciju u stvarnom svijetu i posmatramo bolje rezultate od drugog javnog govornika.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa AliMe Chat, mashiinka chatbot oo furan oo wada ururiya midhihii wadajirka ah ee soo celinta macluumaadka (IR) iyo Seq2Seq (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat wuxuu isticmaalaa model ku saleysan Seq2Seq, si uu u optimiso midhihiisa wadajirka ah. Imtixaano dheeraad ah waxay muujiyaan injiilkeena muusikada IR iyo qarniga ku saleysan. Waxaynu bilownaa Alime Chat si aan u codsiga shaqaalaha ee halista ah ee dunida, waxaana fiirinaynaa arimaha ugu wanaagsan oo ka wanaagsan jabsada chatbot kale oo dadweynaha.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår AliMe Chat, en öppen domän chattbot motor som integrerar gemensamma resultat av informationshämtning (IR) och sekvens till sekvens (Seq2Seq) baserade generationsmodeller. AliMe Chat använder en uppmärksam Seq2Seq baserad återförankningsmodell för att optimera ledresultaten. Omfattande experiment visar att vår motor överträffar både IR- och generationsbaserade modeller. Vi lanserar AliMe Chat för en verklig industriell applikation och observerar bättre resultat än en annan offentlig chattbot.', 'ta': 'நாம் அலிமே அரட்டை, ஒரு திறந்த டொமைன் அரட்டை இயந்திரம், அது தகவல் திரும்ப முடிவுகளின் இணைய முடிவுகளை ஒன்றிணைக்கும் மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து வரிசையில் உள் Alime அரட்டை செக்2Seq அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மீண்டும் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறது இணைப்பு முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு. விரிவான சோதனைகள் IR மற்றும் சந்திப்பு அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகளையும் காட்டும். நாம் ஒரு உண்மையான உலக தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன்பாட்டுக்கான அலிம் அரட்டை துவங்கி மற்றும் மற்றொரு பொது அரட்டை விட', 'ur': 'ہم AliMe Chat کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک کھلے ڈومین چاٹبوٹ انجین جو اطلاعات پھیرنے (IR) اور سکوئنس (Seq2Seq) کی بنیاد رکھنے والی موڈل کے جوڑے نتیجے کو جمع کرتا ہے. Name اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش ہمارے انجینٹ کو IR اور نسل کے سامنے بنیاد نمونڈل کو دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک حقیقی دنیاوی صنعتی کاربرد کے لئے AliMe Chat کو آغاز کرتے ہیں اور دوسری عمومی چاٹبوٹ سے بہتر نتائج دیکھتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz AliMe Chat bilan ochiq domen chatbot motorini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash va Seq2Seq asosiy qarshi modellarini birlashtirish mumkin. Name Koʻproq tajribalar bizning injini IR va yaratilgan modellarni ko'rsatadi. Biz haqiqiy dunyo industrial dastur uchun AliMe Chat ishga tushirib boshlamiz va boshqa public chatbotdan yaxshi natijalarni ko'rib turamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị AliMe Chat, một động cơ chat mở miền mà bao gồm kết quả tổng hợp của Information Retrievel (IR) và Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seqq) based generation models. AliMe Chat sử dụng một mô hình phục hồi lỗi thời Seq2Seq để tối ưu hoá kết quả khớp. Thử nghiệm bao quát cho thấy động cơ của chúng ta vượt trội cả các mô hình IR và thế hệ. Chúng tôi khởi động AliMe Chat cho một ứng dụng công nghiệp trên thế giới thực và quan sát kết quả tốt hơn một Chatbot công cộng.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo AliMe Chat, motor otvorenog domena za razgovor koji integrira zajedničke rezultate prikupljanja informacija (IR) i sekvence na sekvenciji (Seq2Seq) baziranih modela generacije. AliMe Chat koristi pažljiv model na osnovu rekonstrukcije na Seq2Seq kako bi optimizirao zajedničke rezultate. Prošireni eksperimenti pokazuju da naš motor nadmašuje i modele na temelju IR-a i generacije. Lansiramo AliMe Chat za industrijsku primjenu u stvarnom svijetu i promatramo bolje rezultate od drugog javnog govornika.', 'nl': 'We stellen AliMe Chat voor, een open-domein chatbot engine die de gezamenlijke resultaten van Information Retrieval (IR) en Sequence to Sequence (Sequence) gebaseerde generatiemodellen integreert. AliMe Chat maakt gebruik van een attent Seq2Seq gebaseerd rerank model om de gezamenlijke resultaten te optimaliseren. Uitgebreide experimenten tonen aan dat onze motor beter presteert dan IR en generatie gebaseerde modellen. We lanceren AliMe Chat voor een echte industriële toepassing en observeren betere resultaten dan een andere openbare chatbot.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår AliMe Chat, en chatbot motor med åbent domæne, der integrerer de fælles resultater af informationshentning (IR) og sekvens til sekvens (Seq2Seq) baserede generationsmodeller. AliMe Chat bruger en opmærksom Seq2Seq baseret rerank model til at optimere fælles resultater. Omfattende eksperimenter viser, at vores motor overgår både IR- og generationsbaserede modeller. Vi lancerer AliMe Chat til en virkelig industriel applikation og observerer bedre resultater end en anden offentlig chatbot.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме Чат машина с отворен домейн, който интегрира съвместните резултати от генерационните модели базирани на извличане на информация (IR) и последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq). Използва внимателен модел за повторно банкиране, базиран на Сек2Сек, за да оптимизира съвместните резултати. Обширните експерименти показват, че двигателят ни превъзхожда както инфрачервените, така и генерационните модели. Ние стартираме за реално индустриално приложение и наблюдаваме по-добри резултати от друг публичен чатбот.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan AliMe Chat, mesin chatbot domain terbuka yang mengintegrasikan hasil kongsi dari model generasi yang berdasarkan Penerimaan Informasi (IR) dan Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat menggunakan model rebank berdasarkan Seq2Seq yang perhatian untuk optimisasi hasil kongsi. Eksperimen ekstensif menunjukkan mesin kita lebih berharga dari model IR dan generasi. We launch AliMe Chat for a real-world industrial application and observe better results than another public chatbot.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen AliMe Chat vor, eine Open-Domain-Chatbot-Engine, die die gemeinsamen Ergebnisse von Information Retrieval (IR) und Sequence to Sequence (Sequence) basierten Generierungsmodellen integriert. AliMe Chat verwendet ein aufmerksames Seq2Seq basierendes Rerank-Modell, um die gemeinsamen Ergebnisse zu optimieren. Umfangreiche Experimente zeigen, dass unser Motor sowohl IR- als auch generationsbasierte Modelle übertrifft. Wir starten AliMe Chat für eine reale industrielle Anwendung und beobachten bessere Ergebnisse als ein anderer öffentlicher Chatbot.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم فریاد AliMe Chat، یک موتور صحبت\u200cبندی در دامنی باز که نتیجه\u200cهای مشترک بازیابی اطلاعات (IR) و سعادت به مدل\u200cهای نسل\u200cبندی (Seq2Seq) را جمع می\u200cکند. Name آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای به موتور ما نشان می\u200cدهد که هر دو مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cای و نسل را انجام می\u200cدهد. ما الیم چات را برای یک کاربرد صنعتی دنیای واقعی آغاز می کنیم و نتایج بهتر از یک صحبت عمومی مشاهده می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunawapendekeza mazungumzo ya AliMe, moto wa mazungumzo ya wazi ya ndani unaohamasisha matokeo ya pamoja ya upya wa taarifa (IR) na mifano ya kizazi kilichoko kwenye Seq2Seq. AliMe Chat anatumia muundo wa mpya anayeishi Seq2Seq ili kuboresha matokeo ya pamoja. Majaribio mengi yanaonyesha injini yetu inafanya mifano ya IR na kizazi yenye msingi. Tunaanzisha mazungumzo ya AliMe kwa ajili ya matumizi ya viwanda duniani halisi na kuangalia matokeo bora zaidi ya mazungumzo mengine ya umma.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë AliMe Chat, një motor chatbot me domini të hapur që integron rezultatet e përbashkëta të modeleve të gjeneratës bazuar në marrjen e informacionit (IR) dhe Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat përdor një model të vëmendshëm Seq2Seq për të optimizuar rezultatet e përbashkëta. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara tregojnë se motori ynë është më i mirë se modelet IR dhe të gjeneratave. Ne fillojmë AliMe Chat për një aplikacion industrial të botës reale dhe vëzhgojmë rezultate më të mira se një tjetër chatbot publik.', 'af': "Ons voorstel AliMe Chat, 'n open-domain chatbot masjien wat integreer die gemeenskappe resultate van Informasie Herhaal (IR) en Sequence na Sequence (Seq2Seq) gebaseerde generasie modele. AliMe Chat gebruik 'n aandaglike Seq2Seq gebaseerde herank model om die gemeenskappe resultate te optimaliseer. Name Ons lanseer AliMe Chat vir 'n reël-wêreld industriele toepassing en hou beter resultate as 'n ander openbare chatbot.", 'tr': "Biz AliMe Chat, açyk-domena çätbot motoryny informasiýa gaýşartma (IR) we sıralanja (Seq2Seq) döredilme nusgalaryny birleştirip teklip edýäris. AliMe Chat Seq2Seq daýan ýan ýene-täze nusgasyny bejermek üçin ullanýar. Ullanyş deneyler biziň motorymyzyň IR we generasiýa daýan nusgalarynyň üstini görkezýär. Biz AliMe Chat'y hakyky dünýäde senagat uygulamalary üçin başladyk we halk çykyşyndan gowy netijeleri görýäris.", 'am': 'የአሊሜ ቻት፣ የተከፈተ ድምፅ አካባቢ ኢንተር (IR) እና የተመሳሳይ የድርጅት ትውልድ ምሳሌዎች (Seq2Seq) የሚደረገውን ድርጅት የሚጠቅመውን እናሳልጋለን፡፡ Alime Chat የተመሳሳይ Seq2Seq የተመሠረተውን የሥርዓት ሞዴል ለመጠቀም የውይይት ፍሬዎችን ለማሻሻል ይጠቅማል። የስፋት ፈተናዎች የኢንጂነታችንን የIR እና የትውልድ ምሳሌዎችን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ አሊሜን ማነጋገርን እውነተኛ ዓለም የቋንቋ ፕሮግራም ለመጀመር እናደርጋለን እና ከሌላ የህዝብ ጋጥቦት የበለጠ ፍሬዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন চ্যাট্টবোট ইঞ্জিন প্রস্তাব করছি যা তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার (আইআর) এবং সেকেন্সের (সেক্স২সেক) ভিত্তিক প্রজন্ম মডেলের যৌথ ফলাফল সম্ আলিম চ্যাট সেক২সেক ভিত্তিক রিয়াঙ্ক মডেল ব্যবহার করেছে যোগাযোগের ফলাফল সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য। বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে আমাদের ইঞ্জিন আইআর আর প্রজন্মের ভিত্তিক মডেল। আমরা সত্যিকারের বিশ্ব শিল্পের আয়োজনের জন্য আলিম চ্যাট চালু করি এবং অন্যান্য জনগণের চ্যাটবোটের চেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল দে', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք "Ալիմե Chat"-ը, բաց տիեզերքի շբաթ շարժիչ, որը ինտեգրում է տեղեկատվության ստանալու (ԻՌ) և SeQU2SeQ-ի (SeQU2SeQ) հիմնված սերնդի մոդելների միավոր արդյունքները: AliMe Chat uses an attentive Seq2Seq based rerank model to optimize the joint results.  Մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շարժիչը հաջողություն ունի և ինֆորմացիոն և սերնդի հիմնված մոդելներ: Մենք սկսում ենք "Ալիմե" զրույցը իրական աշխարհի արդյունաբերական ծրագրերի համար և հետևում ենք ավելի լավ արդյունքներ, քան մեկ այլ հանրային զրույցը:', 'ko': '우리는 AliMe Chat을 제기했다. 이것은 개방역 채팅 로봇 엔진으로 정보 검색(IR)과 서열에서 서열(Seq2Seq)에 이르기까지의 생성 모델을 통합한 연합 결과이다.AliMe Chat은 Seq2Seq 기반 재순위 모델을 사용하여 결합 결과를 최적화합니다.대량의 실험은 우리의 엔진이 적외선과 생성에 기초한 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.우리는 실제 산업 애플리케이션을 위해 AliMe Chat을 시작하고 다른 공공 채팅 로봇보다 더 좋은 결과를 관찰했다.', 'az': "Biz AliMe Chat, açıq-domani çəkmə motoru təklif edirik ki, məlumat alması (IR) və Seq2Seq-ə dayanan nəsil modellerinin birləşdirilmiş sonuçlarını birləşdirir. AliMe Chat joint sonuçları optimizləmək üçün seq2Seq tabanlı rerank modelini istifadə edir. Müxtəlif eksperimentlər motorumuzdan də IR və nəsillərə dayanan modelləri göstərir. Biz AliMe Chat'ı gerçek dünya endüstri uyğulaması üçün başladıq və başqa bir halk çəkişindən daha yaxşı sonuçları gözləyirik.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme AliMe Chat, otevřený chatbotový engine, který integruje společné výsledky generačních modelů založených na získávání informací (IR) a sekvenci na sekvenci (Sequence to Sequence). AliMe Chat používá pozorný Seq2Seq založený na rerankovém modelu pro optimalizaci společných výsledků. Rozsáhlé experimenty ukazují, že náš motor překoná jak IR, tak generační modely. Spouštíme AliMe Chat pro reálnou průmyslovou aplikaci a pozorujeme lepší výsledky než jiný veřejný chatbot.', 'ca': "Proposem AliMe Chat, un motor de chatbot de domini obert que integra els resultats conjunts dels models de generació basats en la Obtenida d'Informació (IR) i Seq2Seq. AliMe Chat utilitza un model atent de rerank basat en Seq2Seq per optimitzar els resultats conjunts. Els extensos experiments mostren que el nostre motor supera tant els models basats en IR com en generació. Llanzem AliMe Chat per una aplicació industrial del món real i observem millors resultats que un altre chatbot públic.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme AliMe Chat, avoimen verkkotunnuksen chatbot-moottoria, joka integroi tiedonhaku (IR) ja Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq) -pohjaisten sukupolvimallien yhteiset tulokset. AliMe Chat käyttää tarkkaavaista Seq2Seq-pohjaista uudelleenpankkimallia yhteisten tulosten optimoimiseksi. Laajat kokeet osoittavat, että moottorimme on sekä IR- että sukupolvipohjaisia malleja parempi. Lanseeraamme AliMe Chatin todelliseen teolliseen sovellukseen ja seuraamme parempia tuloksia kuin muut julkiset chatbotit.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo AliMe Chat, motor otvorenog domena za razgovor koji integrira zajedničke rezultate uzdržavanja informacija (IR) i sekvence na modelima generacije baziranih na sekvenciji (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat koristi pažljiv model na osnovu rekonstrukcije na Seq2Seq kako bi optimizirao zajedničke rezultate. Provećani eksperimenti pokazuju da naš motor nadmašuje i modele na osnovu IR-a i generacije. Lansiramo AliMe Chat za industrijsku aplikaciju u stvarnom svijetu i posmatramo bolje rezultate od drugog javnog govornika.', 'et': 'Pakume välja avatud domeenilise chatboti mootori AliMe Chat, mis ühendab teabe hankimise (IR) ja järjestuse (Seq2Seq) põhinevate generatsioonimudelite ühised tulemused. AliMe Chat kasutab ühiste tulemuste optimeerimiseks tähelepanelikku Seq2Seq põhinevat ümberpankimismudelit. Laiaulatuslikud katsed näitavad, et meie mootor ületab nii IR- kui ka generatsioonipõhiseid mudeleid. Me käivitame AliMe Chati reaalse tööstusliku rakenduse jaoks ja jälgime paremaid tulemusi kui mõni teine avalik chatbot.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo AliMe Chat, odprto domenski chatbot motor, ki združuje skupne rezultate generacijskih modelov na osnovi pridobivanja informacij (IR) in Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat uporablja pozoren model ponovnega bankiranja Seq2Seq za optimizacijo rezultatov skupnih rezultatov. Obsežni poskusi kažejo, da je naš motor boljši od IR modelov in generacijskih modelov. Predstavljamo AliMe Chat za resnično industrijsko aplikacijo in opazujemo boljše rezultate kot drug javni chatbot.', 'ha': "Tune goyyar da AliMe Chat, wata mashine mai buɗe-Domen mai haɗa matsalar masu iya haɗa matsalar masu iya cikin shirin ayuka na Shirin da ake saka (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat yanã amfani da wata motel mai inganci na Seq2Seq mai canza tsaro ga kwamfyutan matsalan da ke haɗa. Cire masu shimfiɗa, za'a nuna muhallin injinmu na samar da zayen IR da danne. Tuna gabatar da AliMe Chat a samun applet na dũniya da gaske kuma tuna mafiya kyauta matsayi daga wata jama'a.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים שיחה AliMe, מנוע chatbot בתחום פתוח שמכיל את התוצאות המשותפות של דוגמני הדור המבוססים על קיבלת מידע (IR) וברצף לקורות (Seq2Seq). AliMe Chat uses an attentive Seq2Seq based rerank model to optimize the joint results.  ניסויים רחבים מראים שהמנוע שלנו מוביל יותר מדי דוגמנים מבוססים על IR וגם על דור. אנחנו משגרים שיחה AliMe עבור שימוש תעשייתי בעולם אמיתי ונצפה בתוצאות טובות יותר מאשר שיחה ציבורית אחרת.', 'jv': 'We proposal AliMe Talk, an open-domain chantbot engine that embedes the joint output of information retretriation (IR) and Sence to Sence (Seq2Seq) supported Generation modes. AliMe Dialog menehi Attentive Seq2Seq nambah rerank model kanggo ngewat oleh dadi sing ditambah. Name Awak dhéwé malih AliMe Talk kanggo aplikasi manus sing gak bener lan ngulinakake dipoleh sing luwih apik kanggo nganggo barang popolasi sing luwih apik.', 'bo': 'We propose AliMe Chat, an open-domain chatbot engine that integrates the joint results of Information Retrieval (IR) and Sequence to Sequence (Seq2Seq) based generation models. AliMe Chat སྤྱོད་པ་ནི་attentive Seq2Seq གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡང་བསྐྱར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་འབྲས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Extensive experiments show our engine outperforms both IR and generation based models. Examples: ང་ཚོས་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་མི་མང་གི་གླེང་མོལ་གཞན་ལས་མཐོང་སྐྱེས་ཚོ'}
{'en': 'A Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'ar': 'إطار عمل متغير شرطي لتوليد الحوار', 'pt': 'Uma Estrutura Variacional Condicional para Geração de Diálogos', 'fr': 'Un cadre variationnel conditionnel pour la génération de dialogues', 'es': 'Un marco variacional condicional para la generación de diálogos', 'ja': 'ダイアログ生成のための条件付きバリエーションフレームワーク', 'ru': 'Условная вариационная структура для генерации диалога', 'ga': 'Creat Coinníollach Athraitheach do Ghiniúint Dialóige', 'zh': '所以然者变分框架', 'hi': 'संवाद जनरेशन के लिए सशर्त भिन्नतात्मक ढाँचा', 'el': 'Ένα πλαίσιο παραλλαγών υπό όρους για τη δημιουργία διαλόγου', 'hu': 'A párbeszéd létrehozásának feltételes variációs kerete', 'kk': 'Диалогты құру үшін шарт айнымалы фрейм', 'ka': 'დიალოგის განვითარებისთვის შესახებ განრავლების პარამეტრიName', 'it': 'Un quadro di variazione condizionale per la generazione del dialogo', 'ms': 'A Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സാഹചര്യമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫ്രെയിംവര്\u200dക്കു്Name', 'mt': 'A Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'mn': 'Диалог үүсгэх шаардлагатай өөрчлөлтийн хэлбэр', 'no': 'Name', 'lt': 'Sąlyginė dialogo kūrimo keitimo sistema', 'pl': 'Warunkowych wariantów ramowych dla generowania dialogów', 'sr': 'Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un cadru condiționat de variație pentru generarea dialogurilor', 'so': 'A Conditional Framework for Dialog Generation', 'sv': 'En ram för villkorlig variation för dialogskapande', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ڈیلگو پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک شرط واژوئیشن فرمیورک', 'mk': 'Условен варијационален рамка за генерација на дијалози', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thay đổi điều kiện cho tạo hộp thoại', 'bg': 'Условна вариационна рамка за генериране на диалогов прозорец', 'nl': 'Een voorwaardelijk variatiekader voor dialooggeneratie', 'da': 'En betinget variationsramme for dialoggenerering', 'hr': 'Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'id': 'Sebuah Framework Variasi Kondisional untuk Generasi Dialog', 'de': 'Ein Conditional Variational Framework für die Dialoggenerierung', 'ko': '대화상자 생성에 사용되는 조건 변분 프레임', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'диалог Jetiblemek üçin şartly Çeşişikler', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mabadiliko ya mazingira kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Dialog', 'sq': 'Një kuadër ndryshimi kushtues për gjenerimin e dialogut', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Պատկերների ստեղծման պայմանական տարբերակային շրջանակ', 'bs': 'Conditional Variational Framework for Dialog Generation', 'az': 'Dialoog M톛xluqat캼', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Un marc de variació condicional per a generar diàleg', 'fi': 'Ehdollinen vaihtelukehys dialogin luomiselle', 'cs': 'Podmíněný variační rámec pro generování dialogů', 'et': 'Dialoogi loomise tingimuslik variatsiooniraamistik', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מסגר שינוי תנאי ליצירת דיאלוגים', 'sk': 'Pogojni variacijski okvir za ustvarjanje pogovornega okna', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཀྱི་སྲོལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅན་གྱི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས'}
{'en': 'Deep latent variable models have been shown to facilitate the response generation for open-domain dialog systems. However, these latent variables are highly randomized, leading to uncontrollable generated responses. In this paper, we propose a framework allowing conditional response generation based on specific attributes. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected. Moreover, the dialog states for both speakers are modeled separately in order to reflect personal features. We validate this framework on two different scenarios, where the attribute refers to genericness and sentiment states respectively. The experiment result testified the potential of our model, where meaningful responses can be generated in accordance with the specified attributes.', 'ar': 'تم عرض نماذج متغيرة كامنة عميقة لتسهيل توليد الاستجابة لأنظمة حوار المجال المفتوح. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه المتغيرات الكامنة عشوائية للغاية ، مما يؤدي إلى استجابات متولدة لا يمكن السيطرة عليها. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا يسمح بإنشاء استجابة مشروطة بناءً على سمات محددة. يمكن تعيين هذه السمات يدويًا أو اكتشافها تلقائيًا. علاوة على ذلك ، تم تصميم حالات الحوار لكلا المتحدثين بشكل منفصل من أجل عكس السمات الشخصية. نحن نتحقق من صحة هذا الإطار في سيناريوهين مختلفين ، حيث تشير السمة إلى حالات عامة وعاطفية على التوالي. شهدت نتيجة التجربة إمكانات نموذجنا ، حيث يمكن إنشاء استجابات ذات مغزى وفقًا للسمات المحددة.', 'pt': 'Modelos de variáveis latentes profundas foram mostrados para facilitar a geração de resposta para sistemas de diálogo de domínio aberto. No entanto, essas variáveis latentes são altamente aleatórias, levando a respostas geradas incontroláveis. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura que permite a geração de respostas condicionais com base em atributos específicos. Esses atributos podem ser atribuídos manualmente ou detectados automaticamente. Além disso, os estados de diálogo para ambos os alto-falantes são modelados separadamente para refletir características pessoais. Validamos este framework em dois cenários diferentes, onde o atributo refere-se a estados de genericidade e sentimento, respectivamente. O resultado do experimento atestou o potencial do nosso modelo, onde respostas significativas podem ser geradas de acordo com os atributos especificados.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los modelos de variables latentes profundas facilitan la generación de respuestas para los sistemas de diálogo de dominio abierto. Sin embargo, estas variables latentes están altamente aleatorizadas, lo que conduce a respuestas generadas incontrolables. En este artículo, proponemos un marco que permite la generación de respuestas condicionales basadas en atributos específicos. Estos atributos se pueden asignar manualmente o detectar automáticamente. Además, los estados de diálogo de ambos altavoces se modelan por separado para reflejar las características personales. Validamos este marco en dos escenarios diferentes, donde el atributo se refiere a los estados de generidad y sentimiento, respectivamente. El resultado del experimento demostró el potencial de nuestro modelo, en el que se pueden generar respuestas significativas de acuerdo con los atributos especificados.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les modèles de variables latentes profondes facilitent la génération de réponses pour les systèmes de dialogue de domaine ouvert. Cependant, ces variables latentes sont hautement aléatoires, ce qui entraîne des réponses générées incontrôlables. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre permettant la génération de réponses conditionnelles basées sur des attributs spécifiques. Ces attributs peuvent être attribués manuellement ou détectés automatiquement. De plus, les états de dialogue des deux haut-parleurs sont modélisés séparément afin de refléter les caractéristiques personnelles. Nous validons ce cadre sur deux scénarios différents, où l'attribut fait référence respectivement à des états de générosité et de sentiment. Le résultat de l'expérience témoigne du potentiel de notre modèle, dans lequel des réponses significatives peuvent être générées conformément aux attributs spécifiés.", 'ja': '深層潜伏変数モデルは、オープンドメインのダイアログシステムの応答生成を容易にすることが示されている。しかしながら、これらの潜在的変数は、非常にランダム化されており、制御不能な生成された応答をもたらす。本稿では，特定の属性に基づく条件付き応答生成を可能にするフレームワークを提案する．これらの属性は、手動で割り当てることも、自動的に検出することもできます。さらに、両方のスピーカーのダイアログ状態は、個人の特徴を反映するために別々にモデル化されています。このフレームワークを2つの異なるシナリオで検証します。属性はそれぞれ一般性と感情状態を指します。実験結果は、指定された属性に従って有意義な応答を生成することができる私たちのモデルの可能性を証明しました。', 'ru': 'Было показано, что модели глубоких скрытых переменных облегчают генерацию ответа для диалоговых систем с открытым доменом. Однако эти скрытые переменные сильно рандомизированы, что приводит к неконтролируемым сгенерированным ответам. В этой статье мы предлагаем структуру, позволяющую генерировать условные ответы на основе конкретных атрибутов. Эти атрибуты могут быть назначены вручную или автоматически обнаружены. Кроме того, диалоговые состояния для обоих спикеров моделируются отдельно, чтобы отразить личные особенности. Мы проверяем этот фреймворк на двух различных сценариях, где атрибут относится к общим состояниям и состояниям настроений соответственно. Результат эксперимента засвидетельствовал потенциал нашей модели, где могут быть сгенерированы значимые ответы в соответствии с указанными атрибутами.', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe go n-éascaíonn samhlacha athróg folaigh giniúint freagartha do chórais dialóige fearainn oscailte. Mar sin féin, tá na hathróga folaigh seo randamachithe go mór, rud a fhágann freagairtí ginte neamhrialaithe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat a cheadaíonn giniúint freagra coinníollach bunaithe ar shaintréithe. Is féidir na tréithe seo a shannadh de láimh nó a bhrath go huathoibríoch. Ina theannta sin, déantar na stáit dialóige don dá chainteoir a mhúnlú ar leithligh chun gnéithe pearsanta a léiriú. Déanaimid an creat seo a bhailíochtú ar dhá chás dhifriúla, áit a dtagraíonn an tréith do stáit cineálach agus meon faoi seach. Thug toradh an turgnaimh fianaise d’acmhainneacht ár samhail, áit ar féidir freagraí bríocha a ghiniúint de réir na tréithe sonraithe.', 'zh': '已证深度潜变量模样有助于开放域对话系统的应生。 然则潜于变量者,高随机也,而不可控生应之。 本文中,立一许特定属性应生框架。 此性可手动分自动检测。 二扬声器者,独建模也。 验之两场,框架性各引通用性情。 实验以效吾形之力,其可以指性成义应也。', 'hi': 'गहरे अव्यक्त चर मॉडल को ओपन-डोमेन संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी की सुविधा के लिए दिखाया गया है। हालांकि, ये अव्यक्त चर अत्यधिक यादृच्छिक हैं, जिससे बेकाबू उत्पन्न प्रतिक्रियाएं होती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम विशिष्ट विशेषताओं के आधार पर सशर्त प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी की अनुमति देने वाले एक ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इन विशेषताओं को या तो मैन्युअल रूप से असाइन किया जा सकता है या स्वचालित रूप से पता लगाया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, दोनों वक्ताओं के लिए संवाद राज्यों को व्यक्तिगत विशेषताओं को प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए अलग-अलग मॉडलिंग की जाती है। हम इस ढांचे को दो अलग-अलग परिदृश्यों पर मान्य करते हैं, जहां विशेषता क्रमशः सामान्यता और भावना राज्यों को संदर्भित करती है। प्रयोग के परिणाम ने हमारे मॉडल की क्षमता की गवाही दी, जहां निर्दिष्ट विशेषताओं के अनुसार सार्थक प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न की जा सकती हैं।', 'ka': 'დიალოგის დიალოგის სისტემისთვისთვის გახსნა დიალოგის გარეშე მოდელები ჩვენებულია. მაგრამ, ეს წინასწორი ცვლილები ძალიან გამოყენებულია, რომლებიც შეიძლება კონტროლურად შექმნა განახლება. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მივიღებთ პარამეტრები, რომელიც შესაძლებელია სპეციფიკური ატრიბუტების დაბათებული განსხვავება. ეს ატრიბუტები შეიძლება ან ხელსახურად დააყენება ან ავტომატურად განაღება. დამატებით, ორივე საუკეთესო საუკეთესო დიალოგის სტატი მოდელურია განსაკუთრებით პირადგილური განსაკუთრებისთვის. ჩვენ განსხვავებული სენარიოში ამ ფრამეტრის გავაკეთებთ, სადაც ატრიბუტი განსხვავებულია გენერიკურობა და სენტიმენტის ღირებულია. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგება ჩვენი მოდელის პონციალური შესახებ, სადაც სანიშვნელოვანი პასუხი შეიძლება შექმნა განსახულებული ატრიბუტების შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A mély látens változó modellek megkönnyítik a válasz generálását a nyílt tartományú párbeszédrendszerek esetében. Ezek a látens változók azonban nagyon randomizáltak, ami kontrollálhatatlan generált válaszokhoz vezet. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan keretrendszert javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi a feltételes válasz generálását konkrét tulajdonságok alapján. Ezek az attribútumok manuálisan vagy automatikusan érzékelhetők. Ezenkívül mindkét hangszóró párbeszédállapotát külön modellezzük, hogy tükrözzék a személyes jellemzőket. Ezt a keretrendszert két különböző forgatókönyvben validáljuk, ahol az attribútum generikusságra és sentiment állapotokra utal. A kísérleti eredmények tanúsították modellünk potenciálját, ahol a megadott attribútumokkal összhangban értelmes válaszok generálhatók.', 'el': 'Τα βαθιά λανθάνοντα μοντέλα μεταβλητών έχουν αποδειχθεί για να διευκολύνουν τη δημιουργία απόκρισης για συστήματα διαλόγου ανοικτού τομέα. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές είναι ιδιαίτερα τυχαίες, οδηγώντας σε ανεξέλεγκτες παραγόμενες απαντήσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο που επιτρέπει τη δημιουργία υπό όρους απόκρισης με βάση συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά. Αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά μπορούν είτε να εκχωρηθούν με μη αυτόματο τρόπο είτε να ανιχνευθούν αυτόματα. Επιπλέον, οι καταστάσεις διαλόγου και για τους δύο ομιλητές μοντελοποιούνται ξεχωριστά ώστε να αντικατοπτρίζουν τα προσωπικά χαρακτηριστικά. Επιβεβαιώνουμε αυτό το πλαίσιο σε δύο διαφορετικά σενάρια, όπου το χαρακτηριστικό αναφέρεται σε γενικές και συναισθηματικές καταστάσεις αντίστοιχα. Το αποτέλεσμα του πειράματος κατέδειξε τις δυνατότητες του μοντέλου μας, όπου μπορούν να δημιουργηθούν ουσιαστικές απαντήσεις σύμφωνα με τα καθορισμένα χαρακτηριστικά.', 'it': "Sono stati mostrati modelli variabili latenti profondi per facilitare la generazione di risposte per i sistemi di dialogo a dominio aperto. Tuttavia, queste variabili latenti sono altamente randomizzate, portando a risposte generate incontrollabili. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework che consente la generazione di risposte condizionali basate su attributi specifici. Questi attributi possono essere assegnati manualmente o rilevati automaticamente. Inoltre, gli stati di dialogo per entrambi i relatori sono modellati separatamente per riflettere le caratteristiche personali. Validiamo questo framework su due diversi scenari, dove l'attributo si riferisce rispettivamente agli stati di genericità e sentiment. Il risultato dell'esperimento ha testimoniato il potenziale del nostro modello, dove risposte significative possono essere generate in conformità con gli attributi specificati.", 'kk': 'Ашық- домен диалог жүйелерінің жауапты құру үшін тегіс айнымалы үлгілер көрсетілді. Бірақ бұл келесі айнымалыларды кездейсоқ түрлендіреді, бұл құрылмайтын жауаптарды бақылау мүмкін емес. Бұл қағазда біз арнаулы атрибуттарға негізделген шарттар жауаптарын жасауға мүмкіндік беретін фреймін ұсынамыз. Бұл атрибуттар қолмен берілген не автоматты түрде анықталады. Сонымен қатар, екі сөйлейткердің диалогының күйі жеке мүмкіндіктерін көрсету үшін бөлек түрле модельді. Біз бұл фреймді екі әртүрлі сценариясында тексереміз. Бұл атрибуттың жалпы және сезімдік күйіне сәйкес келеді. Тәжірибенің нәтижесі біздің моделіміздің мүмкіндігін көрсетті, қайда маңызды жауаптар келтірілген атрибуттарға сәйкес жасай алады.', 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad giliai latentiniai kintamieji modeliai palengvina atviro domeno dialogo sistemų atsako generavimą. Tačiau šie latentiniai kintamieji yra labai atsitiktinių imčių būdu suskirstyti ir sukelia nekontroliuojamą sukeltą atsaką. Šiame dokumente siūlome sistemą, leidžiančią parengti sąlyginį atsaką, pagrįstą konkrečiais požymiais. Šie požymiai gali būti priskiriami rankiniu būdu arba automatiškai aptinkami. Be to, abiejų kalbėtojų dialogo sąlygos modeliuojamos atskirai, kad atspindėtų asmenines savybes. Patvirtiname šią sistemą dviem skirtingais scenarijais, kai požymis susijęs atitinkamai su generiškumu ir jausmu. Eksperimento rezultatas parodė mūsų modelio potencialą, kur prasmingi atsakai gali būti gauti pagal nustatytus požymius.', 'ms': 'Model pembolehubah tersembunyi dalam telah dipaparkan untuk memudahkan generasi balas untuk sistem dialog domain terbuka. Namun, pembolehubah tersembunyi ini sangat rawak, mengarah kepada balasan yang tidak boleh dikawal. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka yang membenarkan generasi balas syarat berdasarkan atribut khusus. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected.  Lagipun, keadaan dialog untuk kedua-dua pembicara dipodelkan secara terpisah untuk mencerminkan ciri-ciri peribadi. Kami sahkan kerangka ini pada dua skenario yang berbeza, di mana atribut merujuk kepada keadaan generik dan sentimen secara berdasarkan. Hasil eksperimen menyatakan potensi model kita, di mana jawapan bermakna boleh dijana sesuai dengan atribut yang ditentukan.', 'ml': '@ info എന്നാലും ഈ അവസാന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു, നിയന്ത്രിക്കാവാത്ത ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. നിശ്ചയമായ പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ന ഈ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d കൈയ്യില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയോ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യാം. വ്യക്തിപരമായ വ്യക്തിത്വങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതിഫലിപ്പിക്കാനായി രണ്ടു സംസാരികള്\u200dക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കു രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത സീനാരിയയില്\u200d ഈ ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നമുക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെ പ്രതിഫലം സാധാ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ സാധ്യതയാണെന്ന് സാക്ഷ്യം വഹിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Djupne latente variabel- modeller er viste for å gjere tilgjengeleg opprettinga av svar for open- domain- dialogsystemar. Desse latente variabelene er likevel tilfeldig, som fører til ikkje kontrollerbare opprettande svar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit rammeverk som tillèt generering av vilkårlege svar basert på spesifikke attributt. Desse attributtane kan anten brukast manuelt eller automatisk oppdagast. I tillegg er dialogvindauget for begge taler modelte for å refleksera personlege funksjonar. Vi validerer dette rammeverket på to ulike scenarior, der attributtet refererer til generikitet og sentimentstillingar. Eksperimentresultatet viste potensialen til modellen vår, der det kan gjerast meningsverdiar som kan gjerast i tillegg til dei spesifiserte attributtane.', 'pl': 'Wykazano głębokie utajone modele zmiennych ułatwiające generowanie odpowiedzi dla systemów dialogowych otwartej domeny. Jednak te utajone zmienne są bardzo randomizowane, prowadząc do niekontrolowanych odpowiedzi generowanych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy ramy umożliwiające generowanie warunkowych odpowiedzi w oparciu o określone atrybuty. Atrybuty te mogą być przypisywane ręcznie lub automatycznie wykrywane. Ponadto stany dialogowe dla obu głośników są modelowane oddzielnie w celu odzwierciedlenia cech osobistych. Weryfikujemy te ramy na dwóch różnych scenariuszach, w których atrybut odnosi się odpowiednio do stanów generyczności i sentymentu. Wynik eksperymentu potwierdził potencjał naszego modelu, w którym można generować znaczące odpowiedzi zgodnie z określonymi atrybutami.', 'mn': 'Хариултыг нээлттэй холбоотой диалог системийн хариу үйлдвэрлэхэд гүн гүнзгий хувьсгал загваруудыг харуулсан. Гэвч эдгээр сүүлийн хувьсагчид маш их санамсаргүй байдаг. Үүнийг хяналтгүй хариулт үүсгэдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид тодорхой хариу үйлдвэрлэхэд шалтгаан үйлдвэрлэх хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Эдгээр атрибутыг гараар тайлбарлах эсвэл автоматаар нээж болно. Дараа нь, хоёр илтгэгчдийн диалог байгууллагууд хувийн чадварыг харуулахын тулд өөр өөр өөр загвар бүрдүүлдэг. Бид үүнийг хоёр өөр хувилбар дээр шалгаж, харьцуулалт нь ерөнхий зан чанар, сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлыг харьцуулдаг. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загварын потенциал боломжтой байдлыг харуулсан. Ямар ч утгатай хариулт нь тодорхойлогдсон хариулттай холбоотой.', 'mk': 'Deep latent variable models have been shown to facilitate the response generation for open-domain dialog systems.  Сепак, овие лантни променливи се многу randomized, водејќи до неконтролирани генерирани одговори. Во овој документ предложуваме рамка која овозможува генерација на условен одговор базирана на специфични атрибути. Овие атрибути може да се придружат или рачно или автоматски да се детектираат. Покрај тоа, дијалогот вели дека двете говорници се моделирани одделно со цел да се одразат личните карактеристики. Ние ја потврдиме оваа рамка на два различни сценарија, каде атрибутот се однесува на генеричната и чувствителната состојба. Резултатот на експериментот го сведочеше потенцијалот на нашиот модел, каде што значајни одговори може да се генерираат во согласност со специфицираните атрибути.', 'sr': 'Pokazani su duboki latentni varijantni modeli kako bi olakšali generaciju odgovora za sisteme dialoga otvorenog domena. Međutim, ove latentne promjene su vrlo randomizirane, što vodi do nekontrolirajućih generiranih odgovora. U ovom papiru predlažemo okvir koji omogućava generaciju uslovnih odgovora na osnovu specifičnih atributa. Ovi atributi mogu da budu manualno dodijeljeni ili automatski otkriveni. Osim toga, države dijaloga za oba govornika se modeliraju odvojeno kako bi odrazili lične karakteristike. Potvrđujemo ovaj okvir na dva različita scenarija, gdje se atribut odnosi na velikodušnost i države sentimenta. Rezultat eksperimenta je svjedočio potencijal našeg modela, gde se može stvoriti smisleni odgovori u skladu sa specifičnim atributima.', 'ro': 'Au fost prezentate modele variabile latente profunde pentru a facilita generarea de răspunsuri pentru sistemele de dialog cu domeniu deschis. Cu toate acestea, aceste variabile latente sunt extrem de randomizate, conducând la răspunsuri generate necontrolabile. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru care să permită generarea de răspunsuri condiționale bazate pe atribute specifice. Aceste atribute pot fi atribuite manual sau detectate automat. Mai mult decât atât, stările de dialog pentru ambii vorbitori sunt modelate separat pentru a reflecta caracteristicile personale. Validăm acest cadru pe două scenarii diferite, în care atributul se referă la starea generică și respectiv sentiment. Rezultatul experimentului a demonstrat potențialul modelului nostru, unde răspunsurile semnificative pot fi generate în conformitate cu atributele specificate.', 'mt': 'Intwera mudelli varjabbli moħbija profondi li jiffaċilitaw il-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons għal sistemi ta’ djalogu open-domain. Madankollu, dawn il-varjabbli latenti huma magħżula b’mod każwali ħafna, u jwasslu għal risponsi ġġenerati mhux ikkontrollabbli. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas li jippermetti ġenerazzjoni ta’ reazzjoni kondizzjonali bbażata fuq attributi speċifiċi. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected.  Barra minn hekk, l-istati tad-djalogu għaż-żewġ kelliema huma mfassla separatament sabiex jirriflettu l-karatteristiċi personali. Aħna jivvalidaw dan il-qafas fuq żewġ xenarji differenti, fejn l-attribut jirreferi għal stati ta’ ġeneriċità u sentiment rispettivament. The experiment result testified the potential of our model, where meaningful responses can be generated in accordance with the specified attributes.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான தற்போதைய மாறிகள் மாதிரிகள் திறந்த- டோமைன் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளுக்கு பதில் உருவாக்கத்தை உபயோகிக்கும However, these latent variables are highly randomized, leading to uncontrollable generated responses.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சட்டத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களை அடிப்படையில் நிரந்தரமான பதில் உருவாக்கு இந்த குணங்கள் கைமுறையாக ஒதுக்கப்படும் அல்லது தானாகவே கண்டறியப்படும். மேலும், இரு பேச்சாளருக்கும் உரையாடல் குறிப்புகள் தனியாக மாதிரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட பண்ப நாம் இந்த சட்டத்தை இரண்டு வேறு வித்தியாசமான காட்சிகளில் சரிபார்க்கிறோம், அதில் குணப்பு பொதுவான மற்றும் உணர் இந்த சோதனை முடிவு குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களை பொருத்தி எங்கள் மாதிரியின் சாத்தியம் காண்பித்தது.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ලේටින් වෙනස් මොඩේල් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව නිර්මාණය සහාය කරන්න. නමුත්, මේ වෙනස් වෙනස් ගොඩක් අවසානය කරලා තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නිර්මාණය කරන්න බැරි ප්\u200dරතික මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශේෂ විශේෂතාවට අධිරූපයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව මේ විශේෂතාවට අත්තර්ගයෙන් සැකසුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් නැත්නම් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් හොයා ඉතින්, ස්පීකර් දෙන්නටම සංවාදය ස්ථානය වෙනුවෙන් පුද්ගලික විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුව අපි මේක වෙනස් සීනාරියෝ දෙකට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සීනාර්ථාවය සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය සහ හිතුවක් සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දැක්කා අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha ugu dambeeya ee bedelan ee mool dheer waxaa lagu tusay in lagu sahliyo qarniga jawaabta ee nidaamka dialogka furan ee domain. Si kastaba ha ahaatee isbedelkan ugu dambeeya waa la kala beddelaa si aad ah, waxaana sababtaa jawaabo aan la ilaalin karin. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa firaaqad ku saabsan dhaqdhaqaaqa shuruudaha ah oo ku saleysan qalabka gaarka ah. Tusaalahan waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa qof ama si gaar ah loo ogaan karo. Sidoo kale labada hadal oo ku hadla waxaa loo sameynayaa qaab gooni ah si ay u fiiriyaan tababar gaar ah. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa noocyadan labada muuqan oo kala duduwan, taas oo lagu jeedo xaaladaha geneeral iyo xisaabta. Imtixaanka waxaa ku maray suurtagalka modellkayaga, meesha lagu sameeyo jawaabo macquul ah oo lagu waafaqsan karo tusaalaha la caddeeyey.', 'sv': 'Djuplatenta variabelmodeller har visat sig underlätta svarsgenerering för öppna domändialogsystem. Dessa latenta variabler är dock mycket randomiserade, vilket leder till okontrollerbara genererade svar. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett ramverk som möjliggör villkorad responsgenerering baserat på specifika attribut. Dessa attribut kan antingen tilldelas manuellt eller detekteras automatiskt. Dessutom modelleras dialogstaterna för båda talarna separat för att återspegla personliga egenskaper. Vi validerar detta ramverk på två olika scenarier, där attributet hänvisar till generik respektive sentimenttillstånd. Experimentresultatet vittnade om potentialen i vår modell, där meningsfulla svar kan genereras i enlighet med de angivna attributen.', 'ur': 'عمیق لاٹینٹ ویرائیٹ موڈل دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ کھولنے والی ڈومین ڈیلوگر سیسٹم کے لئے جواب کی نسل آسانی کرنے کے لئے۔ However, these latent variables are highly randomized, leading to uncontrollable generated responses. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک فرم پیشنهاد کریں جو مشخص خاصات پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، اس کی اجازت دیتا ہے. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected. اور اس کے علاوہ، دونوں صحبت کرنے والوں کے لئے صحبت کی حالت مختلف طریقے کے لئے نمودار کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اس فرمود کو دو مختلف سناریوں پر ثابت قدم کرلیا ہے جہاں یہ خصوصی جنسیت اور احساسات ایٹیٹوں کی نسبت ہے. آزمائش کا نتیجہ ہمارے موڈل کے امکانات کی گواہی دے رہا ہے، جہاں معنی جواب مطلوب ہو سکتا ہے، مقرر کردہ خاصات کے مطابق.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu keyingi oʻzgarishlar juda tarqatish, boshqarilmagan javoblar sababchi. Bu qogʻozda, biz xusus attributlarni asoslangan holat javob yaratishga ruxsat beramiz. Ushbu atributlarni qoʻlbola koʻrsatish yoki avtomatik aniqlash mumkin. Ko'pchilik, ikkita so'zlar uchun muloqat tahrirchi shaxsiy imkoniyatlarni tashqi qilish uchun muloqat oynasi alohida aylanadi. Biz bu freymni boshqa ikki xil aniqlarida to ʻgʻri qilamiz. Bu holatda umumiy va hisob holatning turli holatlarini anglatadi. Name", 'vi': 'Các mô hình biến nhúng chàm sâu đã được hiển thị để giúp tạo phản ứng cho hệ thống hộp thoại mở miền. Tuy nhiên, các biến số tiềm ẩn này rất ngẫu nhiên, dẫn đến các phản ứng không kiểm soát. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở để tạo phản ứng phụ thuộc vào đặc điểm cụ thể. Những thuộc tính này có thể được chỉ định trực tiếp hoặc tự động phát hiện. Hơn nữa, các trạng thái hộp thoại cho cả hai người nói được mô hình riêng để phản ánh các tính năng cá nhân. Chúng tôi xác nhận khung cảnh này dựa trên hai tình huống khác nhau, nơi thuộc tính này gọi là hào hiệp và tình cảm. Kết quả thí nghiệm khai ra tiềm năng của mô hình này, nơi có thể tạo ra các phản ứng có ý nghĩa theo các thuộc tính đã xác định.', 'da': 'Dybe latente variabelmodeller er blevet vist for at lette responsgenerering for åbne domæner dialogsystemer. Disse latente variabler er imidlertid meget randomiserede, hvilket fører til ukontrollerbare genererede reaktioner. I dette dokument foreslår vi en ramme, der muliggør generering af betinget respons baseret på specifikke egenskaber. Disse attributter kan enten tildeles manuelt eller automatisk registreres. Desuden modelleres dialogstaterne for begge talere separat for at afspejle personlige træk. Vi validerer denne ramme på to forskellige scenarier, hvor attributten henviser til henholdsvis genericitet og sentiment state. Eksperimentets resultat vidnede potentialet i vores model, hvor meningsfulde svar kan genereres i overensstemmelse med de angivne attributter.', 'bg': 'Доказано е, че моделите на дълбоки латентни променливи улесняват генерирането на отговор за диалогови системи с отворен домейн. Тези латентни променливи обаче са силно рандомизирани, което води до неконтролируеми генерирани отговори. В настоящата статия предлагаме рамка, позволяваща генериране на условни реакции въз основа на специфични атрибути. Тези атрибути могат да бъдат или ръчно задавани, или автоматично откривани. Освен това диалоговите състояния за двата говорителя са моделирани отделно, за да отразяват личните характеристики. Ние валидираме тази рамка на два различни сценария, където атрибутът се отнася съответно до генералност и сентиментални състояния. Резултатът от експеримента свидетелства за потенциала на нашия модел, при който могат да бъдат генерирани смислени отговори в съответствие с посочените атрибути.', 'nl': "Deep latent variabele modellen zijn aangetoond om de responsgeneratie voor open-domein dialoogsystemen te vergemakkelijken. Deze latente variabelen zijn echter zeer gerandomiseerd, wat leidt tot oncontroleerbare gegenereerde reacties. In dit document stellen we een raamwerk voor dat voorwaardelijke respons genereert op basis van specifieke kenmerken. Deze attributen kunnen handmatig worden toegewezen of automatisch worden gedetecteerd. Bovendien worden de dialoogstaten voor beide sprekers afzonderlijk gemodelleerd om persoonlijke kenmerken weer te geven. We valideren dit framework op twee verschillende scenario's, waarbij het kenmerk verwijst naar respectievelijk genericiteit en sentiment states. Het experiment resultaat getuigde van het potentieel van ons model, waarbij betekenisvolle reacties kunnen worden gegenereerd volgens de opgegeven attributen.", 'de': 'Es wurde gezeigt, dass tiefe latente Variablenmodelle die Antwortgenerierung für offene Dialogsysteme erleichtern. Diese latenten Variablen sind jedoch stark randomisiert, was zu unkontrollierbaren generierten Antworten führt. In diesem Papier schlagen wir ein Framework vor, das bedingte Reaktionen basierend auf spezifischen Attributen ermöglicht. Diese Attribute können entweder manuell zugewiesen oder automatisch erkannt werden. Darüber hinaus werden die Dialogzustände für beide Lautsprecher separat modelliert, um persönliche Merkmale widerzuspiegeln. Wir validieren dieses Framework an zwei verschiedenen Szenarien, in denen sich das Attribut auf Generizität bzw. Sentiment-Zustände bezieht. Das Versuchsergebnis belegte das Potenzial unseres Modells, bei dem aussagekräftige Antworten gemäß den angegebenen Attributen generiert werden können.', 'hr': 'Pokazani su duboki latentni varijačni modeli kako bi olakšali generaciju odgovora za sustave dijaloga otvorenog domena. Međutim, ove latentne promjene su vrlo randomizirane, što dovodi do nekontrolirajućih izrađenih odgovora. U ovom papiru predlažemo okvir koji omogućava generaciju uvjetnih odgovora na temelju specifičnih atributa. Ovi atributi mogu biti manualno dodijeljeni ili automatski otkriveni. Osim toga, države dijaloga za obe govornike modeliraju se odvojeno kako bi razmišljali o osobnim karakteristikama. Potvrđujemo ovaj okvir na dva različita scenarija, gdje se atribut odnosi na velikodušnost i države osjećanja. Rezultat eksperimenta je svjedočio potencijal našeg modela, gdje se smisleni odgovori mogu stvoriti u skladu s određenim atributima.', 'fa': 'مدلهای متغیر عمیق عمیق نشان داده شده است تا نسل پاسخ را برای سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ دامنی باز سازی کند. با این حال، این تغییرات latent بسیار تصادفی می\u200cشوند که به پاسخ\u200cهای تولید ناکنترل قابل تولید می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد نسل پاسخ شرایط بر اساس ویژه\u200cهای خاص باشد. این خصوصیت\u200cها می\u200cتوانند یا به دستی تعیین شوند یا خودکار شناسایی شوند. علاوه بر این، وضعیت محاوره برای هر دو صحبت کننده\u200cی صحبت\u200cکننده جداً برای تفکیر ویژه\u200cهای شخصی می\u200cشوند. ما این چهارچوب را در دو سناریو متفاوت تأیید می کنیم، جایی که این ویژه به وضعیت های نسبت و احساسات ارتباط دارد. نتیجه آزمایش، پتانسیل مدل ما را گواهی داد، جایی که جوابهای معنی می توانند در طبق ویژه های مشخص تولید شود.', 'id': 'Model variabel latent dalam telah ditunjukkan untuk memudahkan generasi respon untuk sistem dialog domain terbuka. Namun, variabel latent ini sangat kagum, yang menyebabkan reaksi yang tidak terkendali yang dihasilkan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan yang memungkinkan generasi respon kondisional berdasarkan atribut spesifik. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected.  Selain itu, keadaan dialog untuk kedua pembicara dipodelkan secara terpisah untuk merefleksikan fitur pribadi. Kami mengkvalifikasi kerangka ini pada dua skenario yang berbeda, di mana atribut merujuk kepada keagamaan dan keagamaan secara serentak. The experiment result testified the potential of our model, where meaningful responses can be generated in accordance with the specified attributes.', 'tr': 'Aç domenen dijalog sistemleri için janlaşma döredilmesi üçin derin geçen değişiklik modelleri gösterildi. Bu son değişiklikler birdenbire tesadüf edildi ve kontrol edilemez şekilde üretildiler. Bu kagyzda, biz şartly jogabat döretmäge mümkin bir çerçew teklip edip görýäris. Bu atributler ya el bilen tanyşdyrylyp biler ya da otomatik bilen tanyşdyrylyp biler. Munuň üçin ikisi çykyşler üçin dialogyň durumlary şahsy özelliklerini gözlemek üçin aýratyn görkezildi. Biz bu framany iki dürli senaryýada ukyplaýarys, we bu atribut jeneral we duýgym döwletlere görnüşi. Testiň netijesi biziň modelimiň potensialyny tanyşdyryldy, nähili möhüm jogaplary belirtilen atributlar bilen döredilebilir.', 'sw': 'Mifano ya mabadiliko ya kina ya hivi karibuni imeonyesha kuwezesha kizazi cha majibu kwa ajili ya mifumo ya mazungumzo ya wazi. Hata hivyo, mabadiliko haya ya hivi karibuni yanatengenezwa sana, na yanasababisha majibu yasiyokuwa na udhibiti. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kuiruhusu kizazi cha mazingira kwa kutumia mifano maalum. Vifaa hivi vinaweza kutumiwa mkono au kutambuliwa kwa manufaa. Zaidi ya hayo, mazungumzo yanaelezea kwa wazungumzaji wawili wanatengenezwa tofauti ili kutafakari tabia binafsi. Tunaweza kuhakikisha mfumo huu kwenye mitazamo miwili tofauti, ambapo mtazamo huo unamaanisha hali ya kawaida na hisia kwa namna fulani. Matokeo hayo yalishuhudia uwezekano wa mifano yetu, ambapo majibu mengi yanaweza kutengenezwa kwa mujibu wa vipengele maalum.', 'sq': 'Modele të thella të ndryshueshme të fshehta janë shfaqur për të lehtësuar gjenerimin e përgjigjes për sistemet e dialogut të dominit të hapur. Megjithatë, këto variable të fshehta janë shumë të rastësizuara, duke çuar në përgjigje të gjeneruara të pakontrollueshme. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër që lejon gjenerimin e përgjigjes kushtuese bazuar në atribute specifike. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected.  Përveç kësaj, shtetet e dialogut për të dy folësit janë modeluar veçanërisht me qëllim që të pasqyrojnë karakteristikat personale. Ne e vlerësojmë këtë kuadër në dy skenarë të ndryshme, ku atributi referohet respektivisht në gjeneritetin dhe ndjenjat. Rezultati i eksperimentit dëshmoi potencialin e modelit tonë, ku përgjigjet e kuptueshme mund të gjenerohen në përputhje me atributet e specifikuara.', 'af': "Deep latent veranderlike modele is vertoon om die antwoord genereering vir open- domain dialoog stelsels te eenvoudig. Maar hierdie latente veranderlikes is baie willekeurig, wat lei na onkontroleer genereerde reaksies. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n raamwerk wat toelaat voorwaardige antwoord genereering gebaseer op spesifieke eienskappe. Hierdie eienskappe kan of hand aangewys of automaties ontdek word. Ook, die dialoog staat vir beide sprekkers is geskei om persoonlike funksies te reflekteer. Ons bevestig hierdie raamwerk op twee verskillende scenarios, waar die eienskap verwys na generikheid en sentiment staatskappe respektief. Die eksperimentresultaat getuig die potensiele van ons model waar betekenlike antwoordes kan genereer word in ooreenkomstig die gespesifiseerde eienskappe.", 'am': 'የጥልቅ ምርጫዎች ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ አዲስ መለያየት እጅግ ተለይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በአካባቢው የሥርዓት ትውልድ በተለያዩ ጥያቄዎች ላይ ለመፍታት የሚችል የሥርዓት ሥርዓት መፍጠርን እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ምርጫዎች ደግሞም ለሁለቱ ንግግር የሚናገሩት ጥያቄ ለብቻው የተለየ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ፍሬም በተለየ ሁለት የተለየ ባሕላዊ እውቀት እና የስሜት ሀገሮች በሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ ፈተናው ፍጻሜው የሞዴል ስልጣናውን በተወሰነ ጥያቄ መጠቀም የሚያስፈልገውን መልስ መስክሮአል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ցույց են տվել խորը թաքնված փոփոխականների մոդելները, որոնք օգնում են բաց բնագավառի տարածաշրջանի համակարգերի պատասխանի ստեղծման հեշտացնելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս թաքնված փոփոխականները շատ պատահական են, ինչը հանգեցնում է անվերահսկելի ստեղծված արձագանքներին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի շրջանակ, որը թույլ է տալիս պայմանավոր արձագանքի ստեղծել հատուկ առանձնահատկությունների վրա հիմնված: Այս առանձնահատկությունները կարելի է ձեռք բերել կամ ինքնաբացահայտել: Ավելին, երկու խոսացողների համար երկու տարբերակները առանձին ձևափոխվում են, որպեսզի արտացոլում են անձնական հատկանիշները: Մենք ստուգում ենք այս շրջանակը երկու տարբեր սցենարի վրա, որտեղ առանձնահատկությունը վերաբերում է ընդհանուր և զգացմունքային վիճակին: Փորձարկման արդյունքը վկայեց մեր մոդելի պոտենցիալը, որտեղ իմաստալից արձագանքներ կարող են ստեղծվել ըստ որոշ առանձնահատկությունների:', 'az': 'Açıq domena dialog ı sistemlərinin reaksiyonu asanlaşdırmaq üçün derin latent dəyişiklik modelleri göstərildi. Ancaq bu latent dəyişikliklər çox rastlaşdırılmışdır, bu dəyişikliklər kontrol edilməz təsirlərə yol açar. Bu kağızda, müəyyən qismətlərə dayanan şəkildə cavab verən bir framework ə təklif edirik. Bu xüsusiyyətlər ya manually assigned ya da automatic detected olar. Daha sonra, ikisinin danışanların dijalog durumları kişisel xüsusiyyətləri göstərmək üçün ayrı-ayrı modelləşdirilmişdir. Biz bu çarşığı iki müxtəlif senaryoyla təsdiqləyirik, hansı bir təsəvvür generiklik və duygusallıq durumlarına müvəffəq edir. İşlem sonuçları modelimizin potensialına şahidlik etdi, hansı anlamlı cavab verə bilər ki, belə yazılmış xüsusiyyətlərə uyğun olar.', 'ko': '심잠 변수 모델은 개방역 대화 시스템의 응답 생성에 도움이 된다는 것이 증명되었다.그러나 이러한 잠재적 변수는 고도로 무작위적이어서 통제할 수 없는 반응을 일으킨다.본고에서 우리는 특정 속성을 바탕으로 조건 응답을 생성할 수 있는 구조를 제시했다.이러한 속성은 수동으로 할당하거나 자동으로 감지할 수 있습니다.그 밖에 개인의 특징을 반영하기 위해 두 말하는 사람의 대화 상태는 모두 단독으로 모델링된 것이다.우리는 두 개의 서로 다른 장면에서 이 구조를 검증했는데 그 중에서 속성은 각각 일반성과 정서 상태를 가리킨다.실험 결과는 우리 모델의 잠재력을 증명하고 지정된 속성에 따라 의미 있는 응답을 생성할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'bs': 'Pokazani su duboki latentni varijantni modeli kako bi olakšali generaciju odgovora za sisteme dialoga otvorenog domena. Međutim, ove latentne promjene su vrlo randomizirane, što vodi do nekontrolirajućih izrađenih odgovora. U ovom papiru predlažemo okvir koji omogućava generaciju uvjetnih odgovora na temelju specifičnih atributa. Ovi atributi mogu biti manualno dodijeljeni ili automatski otkriveni. Osim toga, države dijaloga za oba govornika se modeliraju odvojeno kako bi razmišljali o ličnim karakteristikama. Potvrđujemo ovaj okvir na dva različita scenarija, gdje se atribut odnosi na velikodušnost i države osjećanja. Rezultat eksperimenta je svjedočio potencijal našeg modela, gdje se može stvoriti smisleni odgovori u skladu sa određenim atributima.', 'cs': 'Byly ukázány hluboké modely latentních proměnných, které usnadňují generování odpovědí pro otevřené dialogové systémy. Tyto latentní proměnné jsou však vysoce randomizované, což vede k nekontrolovatelným generovaným odpovědím. V tomto článku navrhujeme rámec umožňující generování podmíněné reakce na základě specifických atributů. Tyto atributy lze buď ručně přiřadit nebo automaticky detekovat. Kromě toho jsou dialogové stavy pro oba reproduktory modelovány samostatně, aby odrážely osobní rysy. Tento rámec ověřujeme na dvou různých scénářích, kde atribut odkazuje na obecnost a stavy sentimentu. Výsledek experimentu svědčil o potenciálu našeho modelu, kde lze v souladu se zadanými atributy generovat smysluplné reakce.', 'et': 'On näidatud, et sügavate latentsete muutujate mudelid hõlbustavad avatud domeeni dialoogisüsteemide vastuste genereerimist. Siiski on need latentsed muutujad väga randomiseeritud, mis põhjustab kontrollimatuid genereeritud vastuseid. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja raamistiku, mis võimaldab konkreetsetel omadustel põhinevat tingimuslikku reageerimist. Neid atribuute saab kas käsitsi määrata või automaatselt tuvastada. Lisaks on mõlema kõneleja dialoogi olekud modelleeritud eraldi, et kajastada isiklikke omadusi. Me valideerime seda raamistikku kahel erineval stsenaariumil, kus atribuut viitab vastavalt generiksusele ja sentimentaalsetele seisunditele. Katsetulemus andis tunnistust meie mudeli potentsiaalist, kus vastavalt määratud atribuutidele on võimalik luua olulisi vastuseid.', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। তবে এই সাম্প্রতিক বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা যায় না তৈরি প্রতি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি ফ্রেম কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে ক্ষেত্রের প্রজন্ম নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর উপর ভ এই বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীগুলো হাতে বানানো অথবা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সনাক্ত করা যাবে। এছাড়াও, দুই ভাষাকে ব্যক্তিগত বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রতিফলিত করার জন্য ডায়ালগের বিষয়টি বিভিন্ন ভাবে মডেল করা হয়। আমরা দুটি ভিন্ন দৃশ্যের উপর এই ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রম বৈধ করি, যেখানে বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুভূতি এবং অনুভূতির কথা উল এই পরীক্ষার ফলে আমাদের মডেলের সম্ভাবনা সাক্ষ্য দিয়েছে, যেখানে অর্থহীন প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করা যাবে নির্দিষ্ট বৈশি', 'ca': "S'han demostrat models variables profundament latents que faciliten la generació de resposta per a sistemes de diàleg de domini obert. Tot i així, aquestes variables latents són altament aleatòries, i porten a respostes generades incontrolables. En aquest paper, proposem un marc que permet generar resposta condicional basada en atributs específics. These attributes can be either manually assigned or automatically detected.  A més, els estats del diàleg per ambdós oradors són modelats per separat per reflexionar les característiques personals. Validim aquest marc en dos escenaris diferents, on l'atributrefereix a estats de genericitat i sentiment respectivament. El resultat de l'experiment va testificar el potencial del nostre model, on es poden generar respostes significatives d'acord amb els atributs especificats.", 'fi': 'Syvien piilevien muuttujamallien on osoitettu helpottavan vastausten syntymistä avoimissa dialogijärjestelmissä. Nämä piilevät muuttujat ovat kuitenkin hyvin satunnaistettuja, mikä johtaa hallitsemattomiin vasteisiin. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotamme kehystä, joka mahdollistaa ehdollisen vastauksen tuottamisen tiettyjen ominaisuuksien perusteella. Nämä attribuutit voidaan joko määrittää manuaalisesti tai tunnistaa automaattisesti. Lisäksi molempien puhujien dialogitilat mallinnetaan erikseen henkilökohtaisten ominaisuuksien huomioon ottamiseksi. Validoimme tämän viitekehyksen kahdessa eri skenaariossa, joissa attribuutti viittaa genericness ja sentiment states vastaavasti. Kokeen tulos todisti mallimme potentiaalin, jossa merkityksellisiä vastauksia voidaan tuottaa määriteltyjen attribuuttien mukaisesti.', 'jv': 'File change Nang pepul iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem kanggo nyebute nggawe respons conditis Attribute iki iso disebarke manuelé politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe barang iki sampeyan luwih dumadhi, wong-wong attributan nggawe barang kelas karo perusahaan Sensitif. Refer', 'sk': 'Pokazano je bilo, da globoki latentni modeli spremenljivk olajšajo ustvarjanje odzivov za sisteme pogovornega okna odprte domene. Vendar pa so te latentne spremenljivke zelo naključne, kar vodi do nenadzorovanih generiranih odzivov. V tem dokumentu predlagamo okvir, ki omogoča ustvarjanje pogojnega odziva na podlagi posebnih atributov. Te atribute je mogoče dodeliti ročno ali samodejno zaznati. Poleg tega so pogovorna stanja za oba govornika oblikovana ločeno, da se odražajo osebne značilnosti. Ta okvir potrjujemo na dveh različnih scenarijih, kjer se atribut nanaša na generičnost oziroma sentimentalna stanja. Rezultat eksperimenta je pričal o potencialu našega modela, kjer je mogoče ustvariti smiselne odzive v skladu z določenimi atributi.', 'he': 'הוראו דוגמנים משתנים עמוקים וסודנים כדי להקל את יוצר התגובה למערכות דיאלוגים בתחום פתוח. עם זאת, המשתנים הלאונטים האלה מאחוריים מאוד, מה שמוביל לתגובות יוצרות ללא שליטה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת שמאפשרת לדור תגובה תנאי מבוססת על תכונות ספציפיות. אפשר לקבוע את התכונות האלה בידיים או לגלות באופן אוטומטי. חוץ מזה, הדיולוג מציין לשני הדופקים מודלים בנפרד כדי לשקף תכונות אישיות. אנו מאשרים את המסגרת הזאת על שני תרחישים שונים, שבו התכונה מתייחסת למצבים גנרליות ומרגשות בהתאם. תוצאת הניסוי עדה על הפוטנציאל של המודל שלנו, שבו אפשר ליצור תגובות משמעותיות בהתאם לתכונות המוגדרות.', 'ha': "An nuna motsi masu buɗe da kwanan kwanan kwanan da aka nuna don ya amfani da kiyayen ajir wa tsarin zauren akwatin bayanin bayani na buɗe. A lokacin da, waɗannan variabler nan da aka riga ransoma mai girma, sunã ƙara wa su bakan da ba'a controlle ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyade wani firam wanda ke yarda da kizata masu jiba wa sharri a kan sali masu ƙayyade. Ana iya haɗa wannan halin a ƙayyade ko kuma a gane shi farat ɗaya. Da haka, za'a motsa zauren akwatin bayani ga duk waɗanda ke cikin magana guda dõmin a yi tunãni game da zauren akwatin bayani. Tuna gyarar wannan firam a kan surori biyu dabam-daban, a inda halin yana ƙayyade taƙaitori masu bakwai da matsayi. Matarin jarrabai ya gaskata awon misalinmu, a inda za'a iya samar da majibu masu muhimu da sami'a da ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'Deep latent variable models have been shown to facilitate the response generation for open-domain dialog systems. ཡིན་ནའང་། དུས་མཚམས་འགྱུར་ཅན་འདི་ཚོ་སྣང་མེད་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱུང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལྟར་བཀོད་པའི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་ལག་ཐོག་ལས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱས་པའམ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སོ་སོ་སོ་རྣམས་མིན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་མདུན་རིས་གཉིས་མིན་ཐང་སྒྲུབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་རྟོགས་བྱས་ཡོད། དེ་འདིས་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས'}
{'en': 'Question Answering through Transfer Learning from Large Fine-grained Supervision Data', 'ar': 'الإجابة على الأسئلة من خلال نقل التعلم من بيانات الإشراف الدقيقة الدقيقة', 'es': 'Respuesta a preguntas mediante la transferencia de aprendizaje a partir de grandes datos de supervisión detallados', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas por meio de aprendizado de transferência de dados de supervisão de grande granularidade', 'fr': "Réponse aux questions grâce à l'apprentissage par transfert à partir de données de supervision détaillées et volumineuses", 'ja': '大規模な細かい監督データからの転送学習による質問への回答', 'hi': 'बड़े ठीक दानेदार पर्यवेक्षण डेटा से स्थानांतरण सीखने के माध्यम से प्रश्न का उत्तर देना', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы путем передачи обучения на основе больших данных мелкозернистого контроля', 'zh': '因从大细粒度督数迁徙以对', 'ga': 'Freagra na gCeisteanna trí Fhoghlaim a Aistriú ó Shonraí Maoirseachta Mínithe Móra', 'hu': 'Kérdések megválaszolása a nagy finomszemű felügyeleti adatokból származó transzfertanulással', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Απάντηση ερωτήσεων μέσω μεταφοράς Μάθηση από μεγάλα λεπτόκοκκα δεδομένα εποπτείας', 'it': "Risposta alle domande attraverso l'apprendimento del trasferimento da dati di supervisione a grana fine di grandi dimensioni", 'lt': 'Klausimų atsakymas perkeliant mokymąsi iš didelių smulkių grūdų priežiūros duomenų', 'mk': 'Одговори на прашањата преку пренесување на научување од големи фино-насочени надзорни податоци', 'kk': 'Транспорт оқыту үлкен жұмыс бақылау деректерінен жауап беру', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan melalui Pemindahan Belajar dari Data Supervisi Besar Berbenih-Baik', 'mt': 'Tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet permezz ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment minn Dejta ta’ Superviżjoni Kbar b’Ħruġ Fin', 'mn': 'Транспорт суралцах асуулт хариулт', 'no': 'Spørsmål svarar gjennom overføringsling frå store finn overvåkingsdata', 'pl': 'Odpowiedzi na pytania poprzez transfer uczenia się z dużych drobnoziarnistych danych nadzoru', 'sr': 'Odgovor pitanja kroz prijenos učenje od velikih finog nadzornog podataka', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări prin transfer de învățare din date mari de supraveghere fină', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Frågasvar genom överföring av lärande från stora finkorniga tillsynsdata', 'ta': 'பெரிய வெற்று கையடக்கப்பட்ட மேலாண்மை தகவலிலிருந்து மாற்றும் கற்றத்தின் மூலம் கேள்வி பதில்', 'ur': 'سؤال جواب دینے کے ذریعے بڑے پاکیزہ دانہ سوپرویزین ڈاٹ سے استعمال کرنے کے ذریعے', 'ml': 'വലിയ ഫൈന്\u200d പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വവിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha ku saabsan waxbarashada wareejinta", 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi đáp trả qua dịch vụ học tập từ dữ liệu cấp cao.', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси чрез трансферно обучение от големи финазърнести данни за надзор', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden via overdracht leren van grote fijnkorrelige supervisiegegevens', 'hr': 'Odgovor na pitanje preko učenja prijenosa iz velikih podataka nadzora', 'da': 'Besvarelse af spørgsmål gennem overførsel af læring fra store finkornede overvågningsdata', 'de': 'Beantwortung von Fragen durch Transferlernen aus großen feinkörnigen Supervisionsdaten', 'id': 'Pertanyaan menjawab melalui Transfer Learning dari Big Fine-Grained Supervision Data', 'ko': '대립도 감시 데이터 기반 이동 학습 문제 해결', 'fa': 'سوال جواب دادن از طریق انتقال یادگیری از اطلاعات نظارت زیبایی بزرگ', 'sw': 'Swali likijibu kupitia Ufunzi Kutoka Taarifa kubwa ya Ujumbe', 'tr': 'Transfer Öwrenmesi Ullakan Faýlyk Gözlemek Maglumatdan Sorag Jogap', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve nëpërmjet Mësimit të Transferimit nga të dhënat e mëdha të mbikqyrjes me kokrra të holla', 'am': 'ጥያቄ', 'hy': 'Հարցը փոխանցման միջոցով սովորելով մեծ գեղեցիկ վերահսկողական տվյալներից', 'az': 'Transfer Öyrənməsi Büyük Yaxşı Gözləmə Verilərindən Öyrənmək vasitəsilə cavab vermək', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর বিশাল ফাইন- গ্রেফতার সুপার্ভিশন ডাটা থেকে অনুসন্ধান শিক্ষা দিয়েছে', 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanje preko učenja prijenosa iz velikih podataka o finom nadzoru', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes a través de l'aprenentatge de transferències a partir de dades de supervisió grans i grans", 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky prostřednictvím transferového učení z velkých jemnozrnných dohledových dat', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine ülekande õppe kaudu suurtest peeneteralistest järelevalveandmetest', 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaaminen siirtämällä oppimista suurista hienojakoisista valvontatiedoista', 'jv': 'Sugeng Jabung Perkarang Ketok Tambah', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja s prenosom učenja iz velikih drobnozrnatih nadzornih podatkov', 'ha': 'Socket error code NotSupported', 'he': 'תשובה לשאלות באמצעות לימוד העברה ממידע גדול של מעקב מעולה', 'bo': 'Transfer Learning from Large Fine-grained Supervision Data'}
{'en': 'We show that the task of question answering (QA) can significantly benefit from the transfer learning of models trained on a different large, fine-grained QA dataset. We achieve the state of the art in two well-studied QA datasets, WikiQA and SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), through a basic transfer learning technique from SQuAD. For WikiQA, our model outperforms the previous best model by more than 8 %. We demonstrate that finer supervision provides better guidance for learning lexical and syntactic information than coarser supervision, through quantitative results and visual analysis. We also show that a similar transfer learning procedure achieves the state of the art on an entailment task.', 'ar': 'نوضح أن مهمة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) يمكن أن تستفيد بشكل كبير من نقل التعلم للنماذج المدربة على مجموعة بيانات مختلفة كبيرة ودقيقة لضمان الجودة. نحقق أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في مجموعتين من بيانات ضمان الجودة مدروسة جيدًا ، WikiQA و SemEval-2016 (المهمة 3A) ، من خلال تقنية تعلم نقل أساسية من SQuAD. بالنسبة إلى WikiQA ، يتفوق نموذجنا على أفضل نموذج سابق بأكثر من 8٪. نثبت أن الإشراف الدقيق يوفر إرشادات أفضل لتعلم المعلومات المعجمية والنحوية من الإشراف الخشن ، من خلال النتائج الكمية والتحليل المرئي. نوضح أيضًا أن إجراءً تعليمياً مشابهاً يحقق أحدث ما وصلت إليه المهمة المطلوبة.', 'fr': "Nous montrons que la tâche de réponse aux questions (AQ) peut bénéficier de manière significative de l'apprentissage par transfert de modèles formés sur un ensemble de données d'assurance qualité large et précis différent. Nous atteignons la pointe de la technologie dans deux ensembles de données d'assurance qualité bien étudiés, WikiQA et SemEval-2016 (tâche 3A), grâce à une technique d'apprentissage par transfert de base de SQuAD. Pour WikiQA, notre modèle surpasse le meilleur modèle précédent de plus de 8\xa0%. Nous démontrons qu'une supervision plus fine fournit de meilleurs conseils pour l'apprentissage des informations lexicales et syntaxiques qu'une supervision plus grossière, grâce à des résultats quantitatifs et à une analyse visuelle. Nous montrons également qu'une procédure similaire d'apprentissage par transfert permet d'atteindre l'état de l'art sur une tâche d'implication.", 'es': 'Demostramos que la tarea de respuesta a preguntas (QA) puede beneficiarse significativamente de la transferencia de aprendizaje de modelos entrenados en un conjunto de datos de control de calidad grande y detallado diferente. Logramos el estado del arte en dos conjuntos de datos de control de calidad bien estudiados, wikiQA y SemEval-2016 (Tarea 3A), a través de una técnica básica de aprendizaje por transferencia de sQuad. Para WikiQA, nuestro modelo supera al mejor modelo anterior en más de un 8%. Demostramos que una supervisión más precisa proporciona una mejor orientación para aprender información léxica y sintáctica que una supervisión más basta, a través de resultados cuantitativos y análisis visuales. También mostramos que un procedimiento de aprendizaje por transferencia similar logra el estado del arte en una tarea de implicación.', 'pt': 'Mostramos que a tarefa de responder a perguntas (QA) pode se beneficiar significativamente do aprendizado de transferência de modelos treinados em um conjunto de dados de QA grande e refinado. Alcançamos o estado da arte em dois conjuntos de dados de QA bem estudados, WikiQA e SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), por meio de uma técnica básica de transferência de aprendizado do SQuAD. Para o WikiQA, nosso modelo supera o melhor modelo anterior em mais de 8%. Demonstramos que a supervisão mais refinada fornece melhor orientação para aprender informações lexicais e sintáticas do que a supervisão mais grosseira, por meio de resultados quantitativos e análise visual. Mostramos também que um procedimento semelhante de aprendizagem por transferência atinge o estado da arte em uma tarefa de vinculação.', 'ja': '質問応答（ QA ）のタスクは、異なる大規模で細かいQAデータセットでトレーニングされたモデルの転送学習から大きな利益を得ることができることを示しています。私たちは、SQuADからの基本的な転送学習技術を通じて、WikiQAとSemEval -2016 （タスク3 A ）という2つのよく研究されたQAデータセットで最先端を達成します。WikiQAでは、当社のモデルは以前のベストモデルを8%以上上回っています。私たちは、より細かい監督が、定量的な結果と視覚的な分析を通じて、より粗い監督よりも語彙的および構文的な情報を学習するためのより良いガイダンスを提供することを示しています。また、同様の転送学習手順が、随伴タスクで最先端を達成することも示されている。', 'zh': '曰:问(QA)异务细粒度QA数集上迁学受益匪浅。 吾因SQuAD之本而迁学之,两穷QA数集WikiQA与SemEval-2016(3A)之最先进者也。 其于WikiQA,吾模高于前8%以上。 吾证以定量析可视化,更精者监于粗者为学词汇与句法信息为善。 我们还明白,类的迁学程序在内涵上得到最先进的技术。', 'hi': 'हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रश्न उत्तर देने का कार्य (क्यूए) एक अलग बड़े, ठीक-ठाक क्यूए डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के हस्तांतरण सीखने से काफी लाभ उठा सकता है। हम दो अच्छी तरह से अध्ययन किए गए क्यूए डेटासेट, विकीक्यूए और सेमेवल -2016 (टास्क 3 ए) में कला की स्थिति को प्राप्त करते हैं, SQuAD से एक बुनियादी हस्तांतरण सीखने की तकनीक के माध्यम से। WikiQA के लिए, हमारा मॉडल पिछले सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल को 8% से अधिक बेहतर बनाता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि बेहतर पर्यवेक्षण मात्रात्मक परिणामों और दृश्य विश्लेषण के माध्यम से मोटे पर्यवेक्षण की तुलना में लेक्सिकल और वाक्यात्मक जानकारी सीखने के लिए बेहतर मार्गदर्शन प्रदान करता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि एक समान स्थानांतरण सीखने की प्रक्रिया एक अनिवार्य कार्य पर कला की स्थिति को प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Мы показываем, что задача ответа на вопросы (QA) может значительно выиграть от изучения переноса моделей, обученных на другом большом, мелкозернистом наборе данных QA. Мы достигли уровня техники в двух хорошо изученных наборах данных QA, WikiQA и SemEval-2016 (Задача 3A), с помощью базовой техники обучения переносу от SQuAD. Для WikiQA наша модель опережает предыдущую лучшую модель более чем на 8%. Мы демонстрируем, что более тщательный надзор обеспечивает лучшее руководство для изучения лексической и синтаксической информации, чем более грубый надзор, посредством количественных результатов и визуального анализа. Мы также показываем, что аналогичная процедура обучения при переводе достигает современного уровня по задаче влечения.', 'ga': 'Léirímid gur féidir le tasc freagartha ceisteanna (QA) leas suntasach a bhaint as foghlaim aistrithe na múnlaí atá oilte ar thacar sonraí QA mór mionghnéithe éagsúla. Bainimid scoth an chláir amach in dhá thacar sonraí QA dea-staidéir, WikiQA agus SemEval-2016 (Tasc 3A), trí theicníc bhunúsach foghlama aistrithe ó SQuAD. Maidir le WikiQA, sáraíonn ár samhail an tsamhail is fearr roimhe seo de níos mó ná 8%. Léirímid go soláthraíonn maoirseoireacht níos míne treoir níos fearr chun eolas foclóireachta agus comhréire a fhoghlaim ná maoirseacht níos gairbhe, trí thorthaí cainníochtúla agus trí anailís amhairc. Léirímid freisin go sroicheann nós imeachta foghlama aistrithe comhchosúil an úrscothacht ar thasc eitíochta.', 'el': 'Δείχνουμε ότι το καθήκον της απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA) μπορεί να ωφεληθεί σημαντικά από την εκμάθηση μεταφοράς μοντέλων εκπαιδευμένων σε ένα διαφορετικό μεγάλο, λεπτόκοκκο σύνολο δεδομένων QA. Επιτυγχάνουμε την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε δύο καλά μελετημένα σύνολα δεδομένων QA, WikiQA και SemEval-2016 (Εργασία 3A), μέσω μιας βασικής τεχνικής μάθησης μεταφοράς από το SQuAD. Για το WikiQA, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά το προηγούμενο καλύτερο μοντέλο κατά περισσότερο από 8%. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η καλύτερη εποπτεία παρέχει καλύτερη καθοδήγηση για την εκμάθηση λεξικών και συντακτικών πληροφοριών από την πιο χονδρική εποπτεία, μέσω ποσοτικών αποτελεσμάτων και οπτικής ανάλυσης. Αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι μια παρόμοια διαδικασία μάθησης μεταφοράς επιτυγχάνει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε μια εργασία συνεπαγόμενης εκπαίδευσης.', 'hu': 'Megmutatjuk, hogy a kérdések megválaszolásának feladata jelentősen előnyös lehet a különböző nagyméretű, finomszemű minőségi adatkészleten képzett modellek transzfertanulásából. Két jól tanulmányozott minőségbiztosítási adatkészletben, a WikiQA és a SemEval-2016-ban (3A feladat) érjük el a legmodernebb technikát az SQAD alapvető transzfer tanulási technikájával. A WikiQA esetében modellünk több mint 8%-kal felülmúlja az előző legjobb modellt. Bemutatjuk, hogy a finomabb felügyelet mennyiségi eredmények és vizuális elemzés révén jobb iránymutatást nyújt a lexikai és szintaktikus információk tanulásához, mint a durvább felügyelet. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy egy hasonló transzfertanulási eljárás eléri a legkorszerűbb technológiát egy bevonási feladatban.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კითხვის პასუხი (QA) შესაძლებელია მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანი მოდელების გასწავლებისგან განსწავლა განსხვ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სურათის მდგომარეობა ორი საკმაოდ სწავლილი QA მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთან, WikiQA და SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) სურათის გამოყენება SQuAD-ის ფუნდამეტრის სწავლის ტექნო WikiQA-სთვის, ჩვენი მოდელი უკეთესი მოდელს 8%-ზე მეტი გავაკეთება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ უკეთესი მონაცემები უკეთესი ლექსიკური და სინტაქტიური ინფორმაციის შესაბამისათვის უკეთესი მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის, როგორც კოლუ ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სწორედ განსწავლების პროცექტური პროცექტურა მიიღებს ხელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა რაოდენობაზე.', 'it': "Dimostriamo che il compito di risposta alle domande (QA) può trarre notevoli benefici dall'apprendimento del trasferimento di modelli formati su un diverso set di dati QA di grandi dimensioni e a grana fine. Otteniamo lo stato dell'arte in due set di dati QA ben studiati, WikiQA e SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), attraverso una tecnica di trasferimento di base di SQUAD. Per WikiQA, il nostro modello supera il precedente migliore modello di oltre l'8%. Dimostriamo che una supervisione più fine fornisce una guida migliore per l'apprendimento delle informazioni lessicali e sintattiche rispetto a una supervisione più grossolana, attraverso risultati quantitativi e analisi visiva. Mostriamo anche che una simile procedura di trasferimento di apprendimento raggiunge lo stato dell'arte su un compito di implicazione.", 'lt': 'We show that the task of question answering (QA) can significantly benefit from the transfer learning of models trained on a different large, fine-grained QA dataset.  Dviejuose gerai išnagrinėtuose QA duomenų rinkiniuose WikiQA ir SemEval-2016 (3A užduotis) mes pasiekiame pažangiausią pažangą naudojant pagrindinius perkėlimo mokymosi metodus iš SQuAD. WikiQA modelis viršija ankstesnį geriausią model į daugiau kaip 8 proc. Mes įrodome, kad geresnė priežiūra teikia geresnes mokymosi leksinės ir sintaktinės informacijos gaires nei griežtesnė priežiūra, pasitelkiant kiekybinius rezultatus ir vizualinę analizę. Taip pat rodome, kad panaši perkėlimo mokymosi procedūra įgyja naujausią pažangą įtraukimo užduotyje.', 'kk': 'Біз сұрақ жауап беру тапсырмасы (QA) басқа үлкен QA деректер жиынында оқылған үлгілерді аударуға мүмкіндік бере аламыз. Біз 2 жақсы оқылған QA деректер қорларында, WikiQA және SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) орындау күйіне жеткіздік. SQuAD- дан негізгі оқыту техникасы арқылы. WikiQA үшін, біздің үлгіміз 8% ден артық ең жақсы үлгісін жасайды. Біз дұрыс наблюдение лексикалық және синтактикалық мәліметтерді бақылау үшін, санативтік нәтижелер мен визуалдық анализ арқылы көмектесетін мәліметтерден жақсы бағыттауды көр Біз сондай-ақ ұқсас аудару оқыту процедурының орындау тапсырмасының күйін жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Kami menunjukkan bahawa tugas menjawab soalan (QA) boleh bermanfaat secara signifikan dari pembelajaran pemindahan model yang dilatih pada set data QA yang berbeza yang besar dan sempurna. Kami mencapai kemajuan dalam dua set data QA yang dipelajari dengan baik, WikiQA dan SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), melalui teknik pembelajaran pemindahan asas dari SQuAD. Untuk WikiQA, model kita melebihi model terbaik terdahulu dengan lebih dari 8%. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pengawasan yang lebih baik memberikan panduan yang lebih baik untuk belajar maklumat leksikal dan sintaktik daripada pengawasan yang lebih kasar, melalui keputusan kuantitatif dan analisis visual. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa prosedur pembelajaran pemindahan yang sama mencapai kemajuan dalam tugas penyelesaian.', 'mk': 'Ние покажуваме дека задачата за одговори на прашања (QA) може значително да има корист од трансферот на учење на модели обучени на различни големи, фино обележани QA податоци. Ние ја постигнуваме најновата техника во две добро проучени податоци за QA, WikiQA и SemEval-2016 (задача 3A), преку основна техника на пренесување на училиште од SQuAD. За WikiQA, нашиот модел го надминува претходниот најдобар модел за повеќе од 8 отсто. Демонстрираме дека подобар надзор обезбедува подобри упатства за учење лексикални и синтактички информации отколку поголем надзор, преку квантитивни резултати и визуелна анализа. We also show that a similar transfer learning procedure achieves the state of the art on an entailment task.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം വ്യത്യസ്തമായ, നല്ല ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിച്ച മോഡലുകളുടെ പ സ്കുവാഡില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാന പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d നിന്നും ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d സ്ഥിതി വിക്കിക്ക്യൂഎയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d 8% കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. കോഴ്സെര്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് നല്ല വഴ ഒരു പോലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയും അറിവില്ലാത്ത ഒരു ജോലിയില്\u200d കലാകാരത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ പ്രാപ', 'mn': 'Бид асуулт хариултын ажил (QA) нь өөр том, сайхан жингийн QA өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын загварын шилжүүлэлтийн тусламжтай ашигтай болж чадна. Бид хоёр сайн судалсан QA өгөгдлийн сан, WikiQA болон SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) дээр урлагийн байр сургалтыг SQuAD-ын сургалтын үндсэн шилжүүлэлтийн техник ашиглаж чадна. WikiQA-ын хувьд бидний загвар өмнөх хамгийн сайн загварыг 8%-аас илүү хийдэг. Бид хэмжээний үр дүнг болон харааны шинжилгээс илүү сайн хандлага нь лексик болон синтактик мэдээллийг сурах боломжтой болгон илүү сайн удирдлага гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид мөн адилхан шилжүүлэлтийн суралцах процедур урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны тухай хүргэж чадна.', 'mt': 'Aħna nuru li l-kompitu tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) jista’ jibbenefika b’mod sinifikanti mit-tagħlim tat-trasferiment ta’ mudelli mħarrġa fuq sett ta’ dejta tal-QA kbir u fin differenti. Aħna nilħqu l-aktar avvanzati f’żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta QA studjati sewwa, WikiQA u SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), permezz ta’ teknika bażika ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment minn SQuAD. Għall-WikiQA, il-mudell tagħna jaqbeż l-aħjar mudell preċedenti b’aktar minn 8%. We demonstrate that finer supervision provides better guidance for learning lexical and syntactic information than coarser supervision, through quantitative results and visual analysis.  Aħna nuru wkoll li proċedura simili ta’ tagħlim dwar it-trasferiment tikseb l-aktar ħidma avvanzata dwar kompitu ta’ involviment.', 'no': 'Vi viser at oppgåva for spørsmålssvar (QA) kan vere betydelig nyttig frå overføringslæringa av modeller som trengte på ein annan stor, fyngkorn QA- dataset. Vi oppnår kunsten i to godstuderte QA-datasett, WikiQA og semiEval-2016 (Task 3A), gjennom ein grunnleggjande overføringsteknikk frå SQuAD. For WikiQA, vår modell utfører den førre beste modellen med meir enn 8%. Vi viser at det finere overvåking gjev bedre retningar for å lære leksiske og syntaktiske informasjon enn overvåking av undersøkarar, gjennom kvantitative resultat og visuelle analyser. Vi viser også at ein liknande læringsprosedyr gjer statusen til kunsten på eit oppgåve for innføring.', 'pl': 'Pokazujemy, że zadanie odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) może znacząco skorzystać z transferowego uczenia się modeli przeszkolonych na innym dużym, drobnoziarnistym zbiorze danych QA. Osiągamy najnowocześniejszy stan techniki w dwóch dobrze zbadanych zbiorach danych QA, WikiQA i SemEval-2016 (Zadanie 3A), poprzez podstawową technikę uczenia się transferu z SQuAD. W przypadku WikiQA nasz model przewyższa poprzedni najlepszy model o ponad 8%. Wykazujemy, że lepszy nadzór zapewnia lepsze wskazówki w nauce się informacji leksykalnych i składni niż grubszy nadzór, poprzez wyniki ilościowe i analizę wizualną. Pokazujemy również, że podobna procedura uczenia się transferowego osiąga stan wiedzy w zakresie zadania implikacyjnego.', 'ro': 'Noi arătăm că sarcina de răspuns la întrebări (QA) poate beneficia în mod semnificativ de învățarea transferului de modele instruite pe un set de date QA diferit de dimensiuni mari și fine. Realizăm starea de ultimă oră în două seturi de date QA bine studiate, WikiQA și SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), printr-o tehnică de învățare de bază de transfer de la SQUAD. Pentru WikiQA, modelul nostru depășește cel mai bun model anterior cu mai mult de 8%. Demonstrăm că supravegherea mai fină oferă o orientare mai bună pentru învățarea informațiilor lexicale și sintactice decât supravegherea mai grosieră, prin rezultate cantitative și analiză vizuală. De asemenea, demonstrăm că o procedură similară de învățare prin transfer atinge stadiul tehnologiei în ceea ce privește o sarcină de implicare.', 'sr': 'Pokazujemo da zadatak odgovora na pitanje (QA) može znatno koristiti od učenja prijenosa modela obučenih na drugom velikom, fino zrnom kompletu QA podataka. Postigli smo stanje umjetnosti u dva dobro proučena QA dataset, WikiQA i SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), kroz osnovnu tehniku učenja transfer a iz SQuAD-a. Za WikiQA, naš model iznosi prethodni najbolji model za više od 8%. Pokazujemo da bolji nadzor pruža bolje uputstvo za učenje leksičkih i sintaktičkih informacija nego nadzor nadzora nadzornika, kroz kvantitativne rezultate i vizuelnu analizu. Takoðe pokazujemo da slièna procedura za učenje transfer a postiže stanje umjetnosti na zadatku za zadatke.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය (QA) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් ලොකු QA දත්ත සෙට් වලි අපි හොඳ විදියට QA දත්ත සේට් දෙකක්, WikiQA සහ semeval-2016 (වැඩ 3A) කිරීමේ ස්ථානය ලබාගත්තා, SQuAD වලින් මූලික විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරක විකික්යාව සඳහා, අපේ මොඩේල් 8% වඩා වඩා හොඳ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා. අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා හොඳ බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලෙක්සිකාලි සහ සංකේතික තොරතුරු ඉගෙනීමට හොඳ මාර්ගය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ වගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනවා කියලා ක', 'sv': 'Vi visar att uppgiften att besvara frﾃ･gor (QA) kan dra stor nytta av transferlﾃ､randet av modeller som utbildats pﾃ･ en annan stor, finkornig QA-dataset. Vi uppnﾃ･r den senaste tekniken i tvﾃ･ vﾃ､l studerade QA-dataset, WikiQA och SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), genom en grundlﾃ､ggande ﾃｶverfﾃｶringsinlﾃ､rningsteknik frﾃ･n SQUAD. Fﾃｶr WikiQA ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar vﾃ･r modell den tidigare bﾃ､sta modellen med mer ﾃ､n 8%. Vi visar att finare handledning ger bﾃ､ttre vﾃ､gledning fﾃｶr att lﾃ､ra sig lexikal och syntaktisk information ﾃ､n grovare handledning, genom kvantitativa resultat och visuell analys. Vi visar ocksﾃ･ att ett liknande ﾃｶverfﾃｶringsinlﾃ､rningsfﾃｶrfarande uppnﾃ･r det senaste inom en involveringsuppgift.', 'ta': 'நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் கேள்வி பதில் (QA) செயல் வேறு பெரிய பிடித்த கியூஏ தரவுத்தளத்தில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் கற்ற We achieve the state of the art in two well-studied QA datasets, WikiQA and SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), through a basic transfer learning technique from SQuAD.  விகிகியூஏ க்கு, எங்கள் மாதிரி முந்தைய சிறந்த மாதிரியை 8% க்கு மேற்படுத்துகிறது. நாம் சிறந்த கண்காணிப்பு காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்று குறிப்பிடுகிறது தெற்றி கண்காணிப்பை விட சிறந்த வழிகாட்டி மற்றும் ஒத்திசை நாம் ஒரு போன்ற மாற்று கற்றல் செயல்பாடு ஒரு அறிவில்லாத பணியில் கலை நிலையை பெறுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'so': "Waxaynu tusnaynaa in shaqada jawaabta su'aalaha (QA) uu si weyn uga faa'iido badnaan karo bedelka barashada modelalka lagu baray koorasyada QA-da oo kala duduwan oo aad u wanaagsan. Dhacdooyinka farshaxanka waxaynu ku gaadhnaa labada kooban ee QA, WikiQA iyo SemEval-2016 (Shaqada 3A), qaab ah teknikada waxbarashada aasaasiga ah ee SQuAD. WikiQA, modelkeenu wuxuu sameynayaa modelkii hore oo ka badan 8 boqolkiiba. Waxaynu muujinnaa in ilaalinta wanaagsan lagu siiyo hagitaan barashada lexicada iyo syntactic macluumaadka la xiriira ilaalinta koorsooyinka, koorsooyinka iyo baaritaanka aragga ee qiyaas ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in heerka waxbarashada oo la mid ah uu dhamaado xaalada farshaxanka ee shaqada aqoonta.", 'ur': 'ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ سوال کے جواب کا کام (QA) ایک بڑے اور اچھے دانے QA ڈیٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی مدلکوں کی ترنسیٹ کی تعلیم سے بہت اچھا فائدہ دے سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے آرتی کی حالت کو دو اچھے مطالعہ کے QA ڈیٹسٹ میں پہنچایا ہے، WikiQA اور SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) کے ذریعے، SQuAD سے ایک بنیادی ترنسیس سیکھنے کی تکنیک کے ذریعے۔ ویکیکئا کے لئے ہمارا موڈل 8% سے زیادہ اگلے بہترین موڈل کرتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ بہترین نظر لیکن اور سینٹکتیک معلومات کی تعلیم کے لئے بہترین سیدھی راہ دکھاتے ہیں، کورسر نظر سے، مقدار نتیجے اور بصیرت تحلیل کے ذریعے۔ ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک جیسا ترنسیٹر سیکھنے کی پردازش ایک کام پر هنر کی حالت پوری ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Biz savol javob berish vazifasi boshqa katta gramma QA maʼlumotlar tarkibida o'rganish modellarni o'rganishdan juda muhim foydalanadi. Biz ikkita yaxshi o'rganilgan QA maʼlumotlar sohasida, WikiQA va SemEval-2016 (Vazifa 3A), SQuADdan asosiy o'rganish texnologiya orqali o'rganish imkoniyatini bajaramiz. WikiQA uchun, bizning oldingi eng eng yaxshi modelni 8%'dan ortiq ishlayapti. Biz ko'proq muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'proq natijalar va ko'rinadigan analytik orqali o'rganish uchun o'rganishda yaxshi ko'proq ma'lumot yordam beradi. Biz o'rganish vazifasi ilmiy vazifaning holatini amalga oshirishni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cho thấy nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi (QA) có thể có ích đáng kể từ việc học chuyển giao các mẫu được đào tạo trên một tập tin cá nhân lớn, hoàn hảo. Chúng ta đạt được trạng thái nghệ thuật trong hai nhà dữ liệu QA được nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng, WikiLQA và SemEvl-thẩm 6 (Task 3a), nhờ một kỹ thuật học chuyển nhượng cơ bản từ SQurAD. Với WikiLQA, mẫu của chúng tôi hoàn thiện hình mẫu tốt trước hơn 8 Name Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng sự chăm sóc kỹ hơn cung cấp hướng dẫn cho việc học thông tin ngôn ngữ và pháp thuật tốt hơn là giám sát kỹ lưỡng, thông qua kết quả số lượng và phân tích thị giác. Chúng tôi cũng cho rằng một cách học chuyển khác cũng đạt được sức mới về công việc này.', 'bg': 'Показваме, че задачата за отговор на въпроси (Отговор на въпроси) може значително да се възползва от трансферното обучение на модели, обучени върху различен голям, финокръвен набор от данни за Отговор на качеството. Постигаме най-съвременните постижения в два добре проучени набора от данни за оценка на качеството, чрез основна техника за трансферно обучение от СКуАД. За УикиКа нашият модел превъзхожда предишния най-добър модел с повече от 8%. Ние демонстрираме, че по-финият надзор осигурява по-добри насоки за учене на лексикална и синтактична информация, отколкото по-груб надзор, чрез количествени резултати и визуален анализ. Показваме също, че подобна процедура за трансферно обучение постига най-съвременните постижения по отношение на задача по обвързване.', 'da': 'Vi viser, at opgaven med spørgsmålsbesvarelse (QA) i høj grad kan drage fordel af overførselsindlæring af modeller, der er trænet på et andet stort, finkornet QA datasæt. Vi opnår den nyeste teknologi i to velundersøgte QA datasæt, WikiQA og SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), gennem en grundlæggende transfer learning teknik fra SQAD. For WikiQA overgår vores model den tidligere bedste model med mere end 8%. Vi demonstrerer, at finere overvågning giver bedre vejledning til at lære leksikisk og syntaktisk information end groft overvågning gennem kvantitative resultater og visuel analyse. Vi viser også, at en lignende transfer learning procedure opnår den nyeste teknologi på en involveringsopgave.', 'hr': 'Pokazujemo da zadatak odgovora na pitanje (QA) može značajno koristiti od učenja prijenosa modela obučenih na drugoj velikoj, zgodnoj QA podaci. Postigli smo stanje umjetnosti u dvije dobro ispitivane QA dataset, WikiQA i semiEval-2016 (Task 3A), kroz osnovnu tehniku učenja prijenosa iz SQuAD-a. Za WikiQA, naš model iznosi prethodni najbolji model za više od 8%. Pokazujemo da bolji nadzor pruža bolje uputstvo za učenje leksičkih i sintaktičkih informacija nego nadzor nadzora nadzornika, kroz kvantitativne rezultate i vizuelnu analizu. Također pokazujemo da slična procedura za učenje prijenosa postigne stanje umjetnosti na zadatku za zadatke.', 'nl': 'We laten zien dat de taak van het beantwoorden van vragen (QA) aanzienlijk kan profiteren van het overdrachtsleren van modellen die zijn getraind op een andere grote, fijnkorrelige QA dataset. We bereiken de state of the art in twee goed bestudeerde QA datasets, WikiQA en SemEval-2016 (Taak 3A), door middel van een basis transfer learning techniek van SQuAD. Voor WikiQA presteert ons model met meer dan 8%. We tonen aan dat fijnere supervisie betere begeleiding biedt voor het leren van lexicale en syntactische informatie dan grovere supervisie, door middel van kwantitatieve resultaten en visuele analyse. We laten ook zien dat een soortgelijke transfer learning procedure de stand van de techniek bereikt op een implicatietaak.', 'de': 'Wir zeigen, dass die Aufgabe der Beantwortung von Fragen (QA) signifikant vom Transfer-Lernen von Modellen profitieren kann, die auf einem anderen großen, feinkörnigen QA-Datensatz trainiert wurden. Wir erreichen den Stand der Technik in zwei gut untersuchten QA-Datensätzen, WikiQA und SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), durch eine grundlegende Transfer-Lerntechnik von SQuAD. Für WikiQA übertrifft unser Modell das bisherige beste Modell um mehr als 8%. Durch quantitative Ergebnisse und visuelle Analysen zeigen wir, dass eine genauere Supervision eine bessere Anleitung zum Lernen lexikalischer und syntaktischer Informationen bietet als eine gröbere Supervision. Wir zeigen auch, dass ein ähnliches Transferlernverfahren den Stand der Technik bei einer Implementierungsaufgabe erreicht.', 'id': 'Kami menunjukkan bahwa tugas menjawab pertanyaan (QA) dapat berguna secara signifikan dari pengajaran transfer dari model yang dilatih pada set data QA yang berbeda besar dan fine grained. Kami mencapai state of the art dalam dua set data QA yang dipelajari dengan baik, WikiQA dan SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), melalui teknik pembelajaran transfer dasar dari SQuAD. Bagi WikiQA, model kita melebihi model terbaik sebelumnya dengan lebih dari 8%. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pengawasan yang lebih baik memberikan petunjuk yang lebih baik untuk belajar informasi lexik dan sintaksi daripada pengawasan yang lebih kasar, melalui hasil kuantitatif dan analisis visual. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa prosedur pembelajaran transfer yang sama mencapai kemajuan dalam tugas penyelesaian.', 'ko': '우리는 퀴즈 미션(QA)은 서로 다른 대형 세립도 QA 데이터 집합에서 훈련된 모델의 이동 학습에서 현저한 장점을 얻을 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리는 충분한 연구를 거친 두 개의 품질보증 데이터 집합인 위키QA와SemEval-2016(임무3A) 중에서 팀에서 나온 기본적인 이전 학습 기술을 통해 가장 선진적인 수준에 이르렀다.WikiQA의 경우 이전 모델보다 8% 이상 높은 모델입니다.우리는 정량 결과와 시각 분석을 통해 거친 감독에 비해 정교한 감독이 어휘와 문법 정보의 학습을 더욱 잘 지도할 수 있음을 증명했다.우리는 또 유사한 이동 학습 절차가 내포된 임무에서 가장 선진적인 수준에 이르렀다고 밝혔다.', 'fa': 'ما نشان می دهیم که کار جواب سوال (QA) می تواند از یادگیری انتقال مدل های آموزش داده شده در یک مجموعه داده های بزرگ و خوشمزه\u200cای QA به معنی سود دهد. ما موقعیت هنر را در دو مجموعه داده های QA خوب مطالعه می کنیم، WikiQA و SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) از طریق یک تکنیک انتقال بنیادی از SQuAD. برای ویکیکیو ای، مدل ما بهترین مدل قبلی را بیشتر از ۸ درصد انجام می دهد. ما نشان می دهیم که بررسی بهتر برای یادگیری از اطلاعات زبان و سنتاکتیک بهتر از بررسی کنترل، از طریق نتایج مقداری و تحلیل دیده، هدایت بهتر را پیشنهاد می دهد. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که یک روش یادگیری انتقال شبیه به وضعیت هنر در یک وضعیت انتقال رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha kwamba jukumu la kujibu maswali (QA) linaweza kuwa na faida kubwa kutoka kwa uhamishaji wa kujifunza kwa mifano inayofundishwa katika seti ya takwimu za QA kwa kiasi kikubwa. Tunapata hali ya sanaa katika seti mbili zilizosomwa vizuri za QA, WikiQA na SemEval-2016 (Kazi 3A), kupitia teknolojia ya kujifunza kwa msingi kutoka SQuAD. For WikiQA, our model outperforms the previous best model by more than 8%.  Tunaonyesha kuwa ufuatiliaji bora unatoa uongozi bora kwa kujifunza taarifa za lexico na ushirikiano kuliko ufuatiliaji wa kodi, kwa kupitia matokeo mengi na uchambuzi wa macho. Pia tunaonyesha kuwa mchakato wa uhamishaji wa elimu unaofanana unaweza kupata hali ya sanaa katika kazi ya wasiofahamu.', 'tr': "Biz sorag jogaplarynyň (QA) zadynyň beýleki uly, iň-tagamly QA veri setirinde bilinen nusgalaryň öwrenmesiniň üstüne bir faydasy bar diýip görkezip bileris. Biz 2 gowy öwrenmeli QA veri setirlerinde sungatyň durumyny, WikiQA we SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) SQuAD'dan esasy terjime öwrenmek tekniki bilen ýetirdik. WikiQA üçin biziň nusgamyz öňki iň gowy nusga 8%-den gowy görýär. Biz gowy gözetleme, leksik we sintaktik maglumatlar öwrenmek üçin lektik we syntaktik maglumatlar üçin köpräk görnöşi we görsel analizi bilen gowy görnöşi temin etýändigini görkeýäris. Biz hem meňzeş transfers öwrenmesi prosedüsiniň sungatyň durumyny çykyp bilmek üçin garaşýarys.", 'am': 'የጥያቄ መልስ መልስ (QA) የሚደረገው ሥራ በተለየ ትልቅ የተጠቃሚ የQA ዳታ ማህበረሰብ ከሚያስተማሩ ሞዴል ማቀናቀል እጅግ የሚጠቅመው ነው፡፡ የQA ዳታዎችን፣ WikiQA እና SemEval-2016 (ስራ 3A) በመቀናቀል ትምህርት ትምህርት የተለወጠን የጥያቄን ድርጅት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለWikiQA ሞዴላያችን የቀድሞውን መልካሙን ሞዴል 8 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፡፡ የበለጠ ጉዳይ የኮርፖር ስልጣንን ከመማር ለሌክሲካዊ እና ለሲንታታዊ መረጃዎችን በማስተማር እናሳየናለን፡፡ እንደዚህም የሚመስል ትምህርት ሥርዓት ባለማወቅ ሥራ ላይ የዐርሹን ሥርዓት እንዲደርስ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne tregojmë se detyra e përgjigjes së pyetjeve (QA) mund të përfitojë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme nga transferimi i mësimit të modeleve të trajnuar në një set të dhënash të madhe QA të hollësishme. Ne arrijmë gjendjen e fundit në dy grupe të dhënash të studiuara mirë QA, WikiQA dhe SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), nëpërmjet një teknike bazë mësimi transferimi nga SQuAD. Për WikiQA, modeli ynë paraqet modelin më të mirë të mëparshëm me më shumë se 8%. Ne demonstrojmë se mbikqyrje më e mirë ofron udhëzime më të mira për mësimin e informacionit lexik dhe sintaktik sesa mbikqyrje më e ashpër, nëpërmjet rezultateve kuantitative dhe analizave vizuale. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se një procedurë e ngjashme e mësimit të transferit arrin gjendjen e fundit në një detyrë përfshirjeje.', 'af': "Ons wys dat die taak van vraag antwoord (QA) betekenlik kan voordeel van die oordrag leer van modele wat op 'n ander groot, fyn- kornerende QA datastel opgeleer is. Ons bereik die staat van die kuns in twee goed studieerde QA datastelle, WikiQA en SemEval-2016 (Taak 3A), deur 'n basiese oordragtekniks van SQuAD. Vir WikiQA, ons model uitvoer die vorige beste model met meer as 8%. Ons wys dat die finere supervisie beter gids verskaf vir die leer van leksies en sintaksies inligting as die ondersoeker supervisie deur kvantitatiewe resultate en visuele analisie. Ons wys ook dat 'n vergelykende oordrag leer prosedure die staat van die kuns op 'n aanhouding taak bereik.", 'hy': 'Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հարցերին պատասխանելու խնդիրը կարող է նշանակալի շահույթ ունենալ այն մոդելների փոխանցումից, որոնք վարժեցվել են տարբեր մեծ, գեղեցիկ QA տվյալների համակարգում: Մենք հասնում ենք արվեստի լավագույնը երկու լավ ուսումնասիրել QA տվյալների համակարգերի, WiKiQA-ի և Half-2016-ի միջոցով (հանձնարարություն 3A), SQUADից սովորելու հիմնական մեթոդների միջոցով: WiKiQA-ի համար մեր մոդելը ավելի քան 8 տոկոսով արտադրում է նախորդ լավագույն մոդելը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ավելի լավ վերահսկողությունը ավելի լավ ուղղություն է տալիս լեքսիկական և սինտակտիկ ինֆորմացիայի սովորելու համար, քան ավելի խիստ վերահսկողությունը, քանակական արդյունքների և վիզուալ վերլուծության միջոցով Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նմանատիպ փոխանցման ուսումնական գործընթացը հասնում է արվեստի բարձրացումը ներգրավման խնդրի վրա:', 'bs': 'Pokazujemo da zadatak odgovora na pitanje (QA) može značajno koristiti od učenja prijenosa modela obučenih na drugom velikom, fino zrnom kompletu podataka QA-a. Postigli smo stanje umjetnosti u dva dobro proučena QA dataset, WikiQA i SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), kroz osnovnu tehniku učenja prijenosa iz SQuAD-a. Za WikiQA, naš model iznosi prethodni najbolji model za više od 8%. Pokazujemo da bolji nadzor pruža bolje uputstvo za učenje leksičkih i sintaktičkih informacija nego nadzor nadzora nadzornika, kroz kvantitativne rezultate i vizuelnu analizu. Također pokazujemo da slična procedura za učenje prijenosa postigne stanje umjetnosti na zadatku izvršenja.', 'az': 'Biz sual cavab verəcəyi iş (QA) müxtəlif böyük, müxtəlif QA veri qutusunda təhsil edilmiş modellərin öyrənməsindən çox fayda verə bilər. Biz QA veri qutusu, WikiQA və SemEval-2016 (Task 3A) ilə, SQuAD tərəfindən təkrar öyrənmə tekniki vasitəsilə, sanatın durumunu başa çatdıq. WikiQA üçün modellərimiz əvvəlki ən yaxşı modelləri 8%-dən artıq edər. Biz göstəririk ki, daha yaxşı gözətçi, leksik və sintaktik bilgi öyrənmək üçün daha yaxşı yol göstərir, kvantitatlı sonuçlar və görsel analizi vasitəsilə. Biz də belə göstəririk ki, bənzər bir transfer öyrənmə prosedüsinin məlumatının vəziyyətini başa düşər.', 'cs': 'Ukazujeme, že úkol odpovědi na otázky (QA) může významně těžit z přenosového učení modelů trénovaných na různých velkých, jemně zrnitých QA datových sadách. Dosahujeme nejnovějšího stavu techniky ve dvou dobře studovaných QA datových sadách, WikiQA a SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), prostřednictvím základní techniky transferového učení ze SQuAD. Pro WikiQA náš model překonává předchozí nejlepší model o více než 8%. Dokazujeme, že jemnější dohled poskytuje lepší pokyny pro učení lexikálních a syntaktických informací než hrubší dohled, prostřednictvím kvantitativních výsledků a vizuální analýzy. Dále ukazujeme, že podobný postup transferového učení dosahuje nejmodernějšího stavu techniky na úkolu implikace.', 'ca': "Mostrem que la tasca de resposta a preguntes (QA) pot beneficiar significativament de l'aprenentatge de transfer ència de models entrenats en un conjunt de dades QA grans i grans diferents. Obtenim l'actualitat en dos conjunts de dades QA ben estudiats, WikiQA i SemEval-2016 (tasca 3A), a través d'una tècnica bàsica d'aprenentatge de transfer ències de SQuAD. For WikiQA, our model outperforms the previous best model by more than 8%.  Demonstrem que una supervisió millor proporciona millor orientació per aprendre informació lècsica i sinàctica que una supervisió més grossa, a través de resultats quantitatius i anàlisi visual. També demostram que un procés similar d'aprenentatge de transfer ència aconsegueix l'avançat en una tasca d'involucració.", 'et': 'Näitame, et küsimustele vastamise ülesanne (QA) võib märkimisväärselt kasu saada erineva suure, peeneteralise QA andmekogumi alusel koolitatud mudelite edasiandmisest. Me saavutame tehnika taseme kahes hästi uuritud kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumis, WikiQA ja SemEval-2016 (ülesanne 3A), läbi põhilise siirdeõppe tehnika SQuAD. WikiQA puhul ületab meie mudel eelmise parima mudeli rohkem kui 8%. Näitame, et täpsem järelevalve pakub kvantitatiivsete tulemuste ja visuaalse analüüsi kaudu paremat juhendamist leksikaalse ja süntaktilise teabe õppimiseks kui jämedam järelevalve. Samuti näitame, et sarnase siirdeõppe protseduuriga saavutatakse kaasamisülesandel tehnika taseme.', 'fi': 'Osoitamme, ettﾃ､ kysymyksenvalvontatehtﾃ､vﾃ､ (QA) voi merkittﾃ､vﾃ､sti hyﾃｶtyﾃ､ eri suureen, hienorakeiseen QA-aineistoon koulutettujen mallien siirtooppimisesta. Saavutamme viimeisintﾃ､ tekniikkaa kahdessa hyvin tutkittussa laadunvarmistustiedossa, WikiQA ja SemEval-2016 (Tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ 3A), kﾃ､yttﾃ､en SQuAD:n siirtooppimistekniikkaa. WikiQA:ssa mallimme suoriutuu edellisestﾃ､ parhaasta mallista yli 8%. Osoitamme kvantitatiivisten tulosten ja visuaalisen analyysin avulla, ettﾃ､ hienompi ohjaus tarjoaa parempaa ohjausta leksikaalisen ja syntaktisen tiedon oppimiseen kuin karkeampi ohjaus. Osoitamme myﾃｶs, ettﾃ､ vastaavalla siirtooppimismenetelmﾃ､llﾃ､ saavutetaan uusinta tekniikkaa osallistamistehtﾃ､vﾃ､ssﾃ､.', 'bn': 'আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের কাজ অন্য একটি বিশাল, সুন্দর কিউ এ ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল শিক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে গুরুত্বপ স্কুয়াড থেকে একটি মৌলিক কিছু শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে আমরা দুটি ভালো পরিচিত কিউএ ডাটাসেট, উইকিকিউএ এবং সেমইভাল-২০১৬ (কাজ ৩এ) এ শিল্ উইকিকিউএ-এর জন্য, আমাদের মডেল পূর্ববর্তী সেরা মডেলের মাধ্যমে ৮ শতাংশের বেশি প্রদর্শন করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সুন্দর পর্যবেক্ষণের ফলাফল এবং দৃশ্য বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে লেক্সিক এবং সিন্ট্যাকটিক তথ্য শিক্ষা শিখার জন্য ভালো পরিচ আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে একই ধরনের পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা প্রক্রিয়া অজ্ঞাত কাজে শিল্পের অবস্থা অর্জন করে।', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasakno lan saiki nggambar responsing (qA) iso nglanggar bantuan nguasai sistem sing dituruti model sing dituruti nggambar barang sampeyan gambar Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar aturan karo hal-iki wis dipului luwih-luwih mên, wakikya karo semebal-2013 (task 3 A), Ngawe barang kelas telas nggawe teknik sisale nggawe tarjamahan seneng sêngé sêngé Nyong ngopo-ngopo Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono akeh babus luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilangno lejih lan sengatik informasi sing luwih apik kudu nggawe nguasakno, dadi akeh dadi ngono ngono anjelisi wersisal. Awakdhéwé mengko nganggo kuwi nggawe bener operasi layang kanggo ngerasar tentang kanggo nguasai kapan kuwi nggawe barang.', 'he': 'אנו מראים שהמשימה של עניין על שאלות (QA) יכולה להרוויח באופן משמעותי מההעברה ללמוד של דוגמנים מאומנים על קבוצת מידע QA גדולה ורובה שונה. אנחנו משיגים את המצב האמנותי בשני קבוצות מידע QA למדו היטב, WikiQA ו SemEval-2016 (משימה 3A), באמצעות טכניקת לימוד העברה בסיסית מSQuAD. עבור WikiQA, המודל שלנו מוביל את המודל הטוב ביותר קודם ב יותר מ-8%. אנו מראים שפיקוח מעולה יותר מספק כיוון טוב יותר ללמוד מידע לקסי וסינטקטי מאשר פיקוח עצום יותר, דרך תוצאות קונטיביות וניתוח ויזואלי. אנחנו גם מראים שיליך לימוד ההעברה דומה משיג את המצב של האמנות על משימה מעורבת.', 'sk': 'Pokazali smo, da lahko naloga odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA) bistveno koristi od prenosnega učenja modelov, usposobljenih na drugačnem velikem, drobnozrnatem naboru podatkov o kakovosti. Najsodobnejše dosegamo v dveh dobro preučenih naborih podatkov o kakovosti, WikiQA in SemEval-2016 (naloga 3A), s pomočjo osnovne tehnike prenosa učenja iz SQuAD. Za WikiQA naš model presega prejšnji najboljši model za več kot 8%. S kvantitativnimi rezultati in vizualno analizo dokazujemo, da natančnejši nadzor zagotavlja boljše usmerjanje za učenje leksikalnih in sintaktičnih informacij kot grob nadzor. Pokazali smo tudi, da podoben postopek transfernega učenja doseže najsodobnejšo tehnično nalogo vključevanja.', 'ha': "Tuna nũna cewa aikin mai karɓar tambaya (QA) yana iya amfani da mai girma daga motsar da aka sanar da misãlai wanda aka yi wa shirin a kan wani tsarin QA mai girma, mai kyãwo. Mu sami halin sanar da aka karanta QA data sau biyu, WikiQA da SemEl-2016 (aikin 3 A), a sami kuma a sami muhimmin muhimmin muhimmin sanarwa daga SQuAD. For WikiQA, our model outperforms the previous best model by more than 8%.  Tuna nũna cewa mafiya ƙaranci yana da shiryarwa mafiya alhẽri ga learin littafin leksiya da syntactic ko surorin kokuriya, a kan fassarar da fassarar ko basĩri. Kayya da Muke nũna cewa masu samuran a matsayin sanar da ke samun aikin da ba'a sani ba.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རེ་བ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་ལན་གསལ་བ(QA)གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིག་ཆས་གཞི་རྩལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་སྐྱེལ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ཆོག We achieve the state of the art in two well-studied QA datasets, WikiQA and SemEval-2016 (Task 3A), through a basic transfer learning technique from SQuAD. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས We demonstrate that finer supervision provides better guidance for learning lexical and syntactic information than coarser supervision, through quantitative results and visual analysis. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་ལས་སྐྱེལ་ཆོས་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐོར་ལས་གནས་སྟངས་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་པ་དེ་སྟོན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'تدريب التعهيد الذاتي لاستخراج العلاقة', 'pt': 'Treinamento de Autocrowdsourcing para Extração de Relacionamento', 'fr': "Formation en auto-externalisation pour l'extraction de relations", 'es': 'Entrenamiento de auto-crowdsourcing para la extracción de relaciones', 'ja': 'リレーション抽出のためのセルフクラウドソーシングトレーニング', 'ru': 'Обучение методам самостоятельного краудсорсинга для извлечения взаимосвязей', 'zh': '所取自众包培训', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए स्व-क्राउडसोर्सिंग प्रशिक्षण', 'ga': 'Oiliúint Féin-Sluaite le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εκπαίδευση αυτο-Crowdsourcing για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Önközösségi támogatási képzés a kapcsolatok kivonására', 'it': "Formazione di auto-crowdsourcing per l'estrazione di relazioni", 'kk': 'Қатысушылар тарқату үшін өзіңіздің құрылғыларының оқытуы', 'lt': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'ms': 'Latihan Self-Crowdsourcing untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan', 'mt': 'Taħriġ għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet ta’ Appoġġ Awtomatiku', 'no': 'Sjølvkrøver- trening for utpakking av relasjonar', 'mk': 'Сопствена обука за екстракција на врски', 'mn': 'Өөрийн холбоотой холбоотой гаргах сургалт', 'ml': 'sourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'pl': 'Szkolenie w zakresie ekstrakcji relacji', 'ro': 'Instruire auto-crowdsourcing pentru extragerea relațiilor', 'sr': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Sourceing Training for Relation Extraction', 'sv': 'Självcrowdsourcing-utbildning för relationsextraktion', 'ta': 'sourceing Training for Relation Extraction', 'ur': 'رابطہ اخراج کے لئے خود کروڈ سورس ٹرینینگ', 'vi': 'Tự thân đông người đào tạo tương lai', 'uz': 'sourceing Training for Relation Extraction', 'bg': 'Обучение за самостоятелно групово обучение за извличане на взаимоотношения', 'da': 'Selvcrowdsourcing uddannelse til udtrækning af relationer', 'nl': 'Zelfcrowdsourcing training voor relatieontwikkeling', 'hr': 'Sam-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'de': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training zur Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'ko': '관계 추출의 하도급 교육', 'fa': 'آموزش خودکشی برای اخراج رابطه', 'sw': 'Source training for Extraction', 'tr': 'Hatlary Açmak üçin Öz Gaýtalama Ewezamy', 'af': 'Self- Crowdsourcing Training for Relationship Extraction', 'sq': 'Trenimin e vetë-turmës për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রোডsourceing Training for Relation Extraction', 'hy': 'Ինքնաժողովրդի հարաբերությունների արտահանման համար', 'az': 'İlişkilərin çıxarılması üçün Özü-Özü Köpçülük Eğitimi', 'ca': "Formació automàtica per a l'extracció de relacions", 'cs': 'Výcvik self-crowdsourcingu pro extrakci vztahů', 'et': 'Eneseühiskondlik koolitus suhete ekstraheerimiseks', 'bs': 'Self-Crowdsourcing Training for Relation Extraction', 'am': 'sourceing Training for Relation Extraction', 'fi': 'Itseohjautuva koulutus suhteiden purkamista varten', 'jv': 'translation', 'he': 'אימונים בעצמם למציאת יחסים', 'ha': 'sourceing Training for Relation Extration', 'sk': 'Usposabljanje samo-množičnega izobraževanja za ekstrakcijo odnosov', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་གཙང་འབོར་བ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྲོ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མཐའ་གཙང་འབེད་དུས།'}
{'en': 'In this paper we introduce a self-training strategy for crowdsourcing. The training examples are automatically selected to train the crowd workers. Our experimental results show an impact of 5 % Improvement in terms of F1 for relation extraction task, compared to the method based on distant supervision.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذه الورقة استراتيجية تدريب ذاتي للاستعانة بمصادر خارجية جماعية. يتم تحديد أمثلة التدريب تلقائيًا لتدريب عمال الحشد. تظهر نتائجنا التجريبية تأثير تحسن بنسبة 5٪ من حيث F1 لمهمة استخراج العلاقة ، مقارنة بالطريقة القائمة على الإشراف عن بعد.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une stratégie d'auto-formation pour le crowdsourcing. Les exemples de formation sont automatiquement sélectionnés pour former les travailleurs de foule. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent un impact de 5% d'amélioration en termes de F1 pour la tâche d'extraction de relation, par rapport à la méthode basée sur la supervision à distance.", 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos una estrategia de autoformación para el crowdsourcing. Los ejemplos de capacitación se seleccionan automáticamente para capacitar a los trabajadores de la multitud. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran un impacto de mejora del 5% en términos de F1 para la tarea de extracción de relaciones, en comparación con el método basado en la supervisión a distancia.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma estratégia de autotreinamento para crowdsourcing. Os exemplos de treinamento são selecionados automaticamente para treinar os trabalhadores da multidão. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram um impacto de 5% de melhoria em termos de F1 para a tarefa de extração de relação, em comparação com o método baseado em supervisão à distância.', 'ja': '本稿では、クラウドソーシングのセルフトレーニング戦略を紹介します。トレーニング例は自動的に選択され、クラウドワーカーをトレーニングします。当社の実験結果は、遠隔監督に基づく方法と比較して、関係抽出タスクのF 1に関して5 ％の改善の影響を示しています。', 'zh': '本文中,言诸包自培训策。 将自择训练示例以训人工作者。 吾实验结果表明,比于远程督之法,F1取任之5%也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम क्राउडसोर्सिंग के लिए एक आत्म-प्रशिक्षण रणनीति पेश करते हैं। प्रशिक्षण उदाहरण स्वचालित रूप से भीड़ श्रमिकों को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए चुने जाते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दूर के पर्यवेक्षण के आधार पर विधि की तुलना में संबंध निष्कर्षण कार्य के लिए F1 के संदर्भ में 5% सुधार का प्रभाव दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем стратегию самообучения для краудсорсинга. Примеры обучения автоматически отбираются для обучения работников толпы. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают влияние 5% Улучшения в плане F1 для задачи извлечения отношения по сравнению с методом, основанным на дистанционном надзоре.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid isteach straitéis féin-oiliúna maidir le sluafhoinsiú. Roghnaítear na samplaí oiliúna go huathoibríoch chun na slua-oibrithe a oiliúint. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha tionchar Feabhsúcháin 5% i dtéarmaí F1 le haghaidh tasc eastósctha gaol, i gcomparáid leis an modh atá bunaithe ar mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ მუშაობის სტრატიგია. მაგალითები ავტომატურად მონიშნულია, რომ სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაოების გარშემო. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს 5% უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a crowdsourcing önképzési stratégiáját. A képzési példákat automatikusan kiválasztják a tömegmunkások képzésére. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy az F1 szempontjából 5%-os javulást mutatnak a kapcsolat extrakciós feladat esetében, összehasonlítva a távoli felügyeleten alapuló módszerrel.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία εισάγουμε μια στρατηγική αυτοκατάρτισης για το crowdsourcing. Τα παραδείγματα κατάρτισης επιλέγονται αυτόματα για να εκπαιδεύσουν τους εργαζόμενους πλήθους. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν επίδραση 5% βελτίωσης από την άποψη F1 για την εργασία εξαγωγής σχέσεων, σε σύγκριση με τη μέθοδο που βασίζεται σε μακρινή επίβλεψη.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз көпшілік көпшіліктерді өзгерту стратегиясын келтіреміз. Көпшілік жұмыстарын оқыту үшін оқыту мысалдары автоматты түрде таңдалады. Тәжірибелікті нәтижелеріміз F1 қасиетінде қатынау тапсырмасына қатынау үшін 5% жасау нәтижесін көрсетеді, қашықтағы қашықтағы қатынау тәсіліне салыстырылған.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes pateikiame savarankiško mokymo strategiją visuomenės ištekliams. Mokymo pavyzdžiai automatiškai renkami apmokyti visuomenės darbuotojus. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad santykių gavybos užduoties F1 atžvilgiu 5 % pagerėjimas, palyginti su nuotoline priežiūra pagrįstu metodu.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan strategi latihan diri untuk crowdsourcing. Contoh latihan dipilih secara automatik untuk melatih pekerja ramai. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan kesan 5% Perbaikan dalam terma F1 untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan, dibandingkan dengan kaedah berdasarkan pengawasan jauh.', 'it': 'In questo articolo presentiamo una strategia di auto-formazione per il crowdsourcing. Gli esempi di formazione vengono selezionati automaticamente per formare i lavoratori della folla. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano un impatto di miglioramento del 5% in termini di F1 per il compito di estrazione della relazione, rispetto al metodo basato sulla supervisione a distanza.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയം പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന strategy പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പരിശീലന ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയമായി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളെ  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അകലെ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d എഫ്1% മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായ', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nintroduċu strateġija ta’ taħriġ awtonomu għall-crowdsourcing. L-eżempji tat-taħriġ jintgħażlu awtomatikament biex jitħarrġu l-ħaddiema tal-massa. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru impatt ta’ 5% Titjib f’termini ta’ F1 għall-kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet, meta mqabbel mal-metodu bbażat fuq superviżjoni mill-bogħod.', 'mk': 'In this paper we introduce a self-training strategy for crowdsourcing.  Примерите за обука се автоматски избрани за обука на работниците на толпата. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат влијание од 5 отсто подобрување во однос на F1 за задачата за извлекување врски, во споредба со методот базиран на далечен надзор.', 'no': 'I denne papiret introduserer vi ein sjølvøvingsstrategi for crowdsourcing. Eksempel på trening er automatisk valt for å trenja folkarbeidarar. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser eit effekt på 5% Verbedring i forhold til F1 for forandring av utpakkinga, sammenlignet med metoden basert på distant oversikt.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare introducem o strategie de auto-formare pentru crowdsourcing. Exemplele de formare sunt selectate automat pentru a instrui lucrătorii mulțimii. Rezultatele experimentale arată un impact de 5% îmbunătățire în termeni de F1 pentru sarcina de extragere a relației, comparativ cu metoda bazată pe supraveghere la distanță.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නය උදාහරණයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් තෝරාගන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් වෙන්න. අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ F1 වලට ස', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy strategię samokształcenia dla crowdsourcingu. Przykłady szkoleń są automatycznie wybierane do szkolenia pracowników tłumu. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują wpływ 5% Poprawy F1 na zadanie ekstrakcji relacji w porównaniu z metodą opartą na odległym nadzorze.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон нийтэд сургалтын төлөө өөрийгөө сургалтын стратегийг танилцуулдаг. Боловсролын жишээ олон ажилтнуудыг сургуульд автоматаар сонгогдсон. Бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь F1-ийн хамааралтай хамааралтай ажлын харилцааны 5% хөгжлийн нөлөөг харуулдаг.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats introducerar vi en sj채lvutbildningsstrategi f철r crowdsourcing. Utbildningsexemplen v채ljs automatiskt f철r att utbilda publikarbetarna. V책ra experimentella resultat visar en effekt p책 5% f철rb채ttring i termer av F1 f철r relationsextraktionsuppgift, j채mf철rt med metoden baserad p책 fj채rr철vervakning.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo strategiju samopovežbe za crowdsourcing. Primjer obuke su automatski izabrani da obuèe radnike gužve. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju utjecaj na poboljšanje od 5% u smislu F1 na zadatak izvlačenja odnosa, u usporedbi sa metodom baziranim na dalekom nadzoru.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa qoraal iskuul-tababarida dadka The training examples are automatically selected to train the crowd workers.  Abaalkayaga jirrabaadka waxaa tusaya saameyn u beddelaya 5% korriga shuqulka ka soo bixinta ee F1, barbardhigta qaababka lagu saleynayo ilaalinta fog.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் மக்கள் வளர்ச்சிக்கு ஒரு தன்னியக்கமான பயிற்சி திட்டத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம். பயிற்சி உதாரணங்கள் தானாகவே தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மக்கள் பயிற்சி செய்யும். எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک سرمایہ کے لئے اپنی آموزش کا استراتژی پیش کریں گے۔ تعلیم مثالیں جماعت کارکنوں کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے خود ہی انتخاب کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے F1 کے معاملہ میں 5% اضافہ کی تاثیر دکھاتے ہیں، دور کی نظارت پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے طریقے کے مقابلہ میں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz jamoatlarni o'rganish uchun o'zimni o'rganamiz. Taʼminlovchi misollar jamoatlar ishlab chiqarish uchun avtomatik tanlangan. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz esa uzoqlash vazifasi F1 tilida 5% improviyatlarni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ đưa ra một chiến lược tự đào tạo. Những tấm hình huấn luyện được chọn tự động để huấn luyện đám đông. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả của 5=.* tiến bộ về dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng phân phối, so với phương pháp dựa trên sự giám sát xa xôi.', 'da': 'I denne artikel introducerer vi en selvtræningsstrategi for crowdsourcing. Uddannelseseksemplerne vælges automatisk til at træne crowd-medarbejderne. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser en effekt på 5% Forbedring i forhold til F1 for relation ekstraktion opgave sammenlignet med metoden baseret på fjernovervågning.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel introduceren we een zelftrainingsstrategie voor crowdsourcing. De trainingsvoorbeelden worden automatisch geselecteerd om de crowdworkers op te leiden. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen een impact van 5% Verbetering in termen van F1 voor relatieonderzoek, vergeleken met de methode gebaseerd op toezicht op afstand.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan strategi latihan diri untuk crowdsourcing. Contoh pelatihan secara otomatis dipilih untuk melatih pekerja keramaian. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan dampak 5% Perbaikan dalam terma F1 untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan, dibandingkan dengan metode berdasarkan pengawasan jarak jauh.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме стратегия за самообучение за crowdsourcing. Примерите за обучение се избират автоматично, за да се обучават работниците от тълпата. Нашите експериментални резултати показват въздействие от 5% подобрение по отношение на задачата за екстракция на релацията, в сравнение с метода базиран на дистанционен надзор.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Selbsttrainingsstrategie für Crowdsourcing vor. Die Trainingsbeispiele werden automatisch ausgewählt, um die Crowdworker zu schulen. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen einen Einfluss von 5% Verbesserung in Bezug auf F1 für Beziehungsextraktionsaufgaben im Vergleich zur Methode basierend auf Fernüberwachung.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo strategiju samouvježbe za crowdsourcing. Primjeri obuke su automatski izabrani kako bi obučili radnike gužve. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju utjecaj na poboljšanje od 5% u smislu F1 na zadatak izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi s metodom temeljenom na dalekom nadzoru.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک استراتژی خودآموزش برای سرمایه\u200cگذاری مردم را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. مثال آموزش به طور خودکار برای آموزش کارگران جمعیت انتخاب می شوند. نتیجه آزمایشی ما تأثیر 5 درصد تأثیر افزایش در نظر F1 برای وظیفه اخراج ارتباط با روش بر اساس بررسی دور نشان می دهد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda köp kömekleşmeler üçin özi-okuwçy strategiýany tanyşdyrýarys. Adamlar işgärleri okatmak üçin öwrenme misalleri otomatik bilen saýlandyrylýar. Biziň deneylerimiz netijelerimiz 5% F1-iň ýüze çykyş täsiri üçin ýüzeleşen täsiri görkezýär, uzak superwensiýa daýarylan yöntemlerimize görä.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha mkakati wa kujifunza kwa ajili ya vyanzo vya umma. Mifano ya mafunzo yanachaguliwa kwa wenyewe kuwafundisha wafanyakazi wa umma. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha athari ya maboresho ya asilimia 5 kwa mujibu wa F1 kwa ajili ya kazi ya utekelezaji wa mahusiano, ukilinganisha na njia inayotokana na uangalizi wa mbali.', 'af': "In hierdie papier introduseer ons 'n selfoerwinning strategie vir skare. Die oefening voorbeelde is automaties gekies om die skare werkers te tref. Ons eksperimentele resultate vertoon 'n effekt van 5% Verbetering in terms van F1 vir verwanting uittrekking taak, vergelyk met die metode gebaseer op afstande supervisie.", 'ko': '본고는 하청업체를 대상으로 하는 자기 교육 전략을 소개했다.훈련 예시를 자동으로 선택하여 직원들을 훈련시킬 것이다.우리의 실험 결과는 원격 감시 기반의 방법에 비해 관계 추출 임무의 F1이 5% 높아졌다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne paraqesim një strategji vetëtrajnimi për crowdsourcing. Shembujt e trajnimit zgjedhen automatikisht për të trajnuar punëtorët e turmës. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë një ndikim të 5% përmirësimit në lidhje me F1 për detyrën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve, krahasuar me metodën bazuar në mbikqyrjen e largët.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ለብሔራዊ ጉዳይ የራስን ትምህርት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሕዝቡን ሠራተኞችን ለማስተማር በራሳቸው የተመረጡ ምሳሌዎች ናቸው፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የሩቅ ጉዳይ ላይ ካደረገው ሥርዓት የF1 በመቶ አካባቢ ክፍል ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ժողովրդավարության համար ինքնավարժեցման ռազմավարություն: Օրինակները ինքնաբերաբար ընտրվում են ժողովրդի աշխատակիցներին վարժեցնելու համար: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս F1-ի վերաբերյալ 5 տոկոսի բարելավման ազդեցությունը հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդիրների համար, համեմատած հեռավոր վերահսկողության վրա հիմնված մեթոդին:', 'az': "Bu kağızda qüvvətləndirmək üçün özünün təhsil stratejisini tanıdırıq. Məsələlər qövmünü təhsil etmək üçün avtomatik seçildilər. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız, uzaq təhlükəsizlik üzərində dayanan metodların qarşısında F1'nin əlaqəsi ilə 5%-in Improvement təsiri göstərir.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo strategiju samouvježbe za crowdsourcing. Primjer obuke su automatski odabrani kako bi obučili radnike gužve. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju utjecaj na poboljšanje od 5% u smislu F1 na zadatak izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi s metodom baziranom na daljinskom nadzoru.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা জনস্কোর্সিং এর জন্য আত্মপ্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি। এই প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে জনগণের শ্রমিকদের প্রশিক্ষণ দেওয়ার জন্য নির্বাচিত হয়েছে। আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দূরবর্তী পরিদর্শনের ভিত্তিতে এফ১-এর মাধ্যমে ৫% উন্নয়নের প্রভাব প্রদর্শন করে।', 'ca': "En aquest article introduïm una estratègia d'auto-entrenament per a la crowdsourcing. Els exemples d'entrenament són seleccionats automàticament per formar els treballadors de la multitud. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren un impacte de 5% millora en termes de F1 per a la tasca d'extracció de relacions, comparat amb el mètode basat en supervisió remota.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme strategii samotného tréninku pro crowdsourcing. Příklady školení jsou automaticky vybrány pro školení crowdworkerů. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují vliv 5% zlepšení z hlediska F1 na úlohu extrakce vztahů ve srovnání s metodou založenou na vzdáleném dohledu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame ühishankimise eneseõppe strateegiat. Koolitusnäidised valitakse automaatselt rahvahulga töötajate koolitamiseks. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad 5% paranemist seoste ekstraheerimise osas F1 osas võrreldes kaugjärelevalvel põhineva meetodiga.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään joukkoistamisen itsekoulutusstrategia. Koulutusesimerkit valitaan automaattisesti joukkotyöntekijöiden kouluttamiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että F1:n vaikutus suhteessa uuttamiseen oli 5% parempi verrattuna etävalvontaan perustuvaan menetelmään.', 'jv': 'Nang kuwi iki, awake dhewe nyibagi nggawe aturan kanggo ngilanggar tarjamah kanggo ngilanggar tarjamah. Cendelak wong sing mesthi ditambah, uwong pengguna-wong liyo lan wolok Refirm', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takarda, za mu introduce wani takwai na faranta ga mutane. An zãɓi misãlai na ƙidãya farat ɗaya dõmin a sanar da aikin mutane. Matarinmu na jarrabi ya nuna matsayin mai kyau ga F1 cikin muhimmin aikin muhimmanci, sammenliki da metoden a kan tsari mai nĩsa.', 'he': 'In this paper we introduce a self-training strategy for crowdsourcing.  דוגמאות האימון נבחרו באופן אוטומטי כדי לאמן את עובדי הקהל. תוצאות הניסויים שלנו מראות השפעה של 5% שיפור במונחים של F1 עבור משימת חיפוש יחסים, בהשוואה לשיטה המבוססת על פיקוח רחוק.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo strategijo samousposabljanja za množično sourcing. Primeri usposabljanja so samodejno izbrani za usposabljanje množičnih delavcev. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo vpliv 5% izboljšanja v smislu F1 za nalogo ekstrakcije relacij v primerjavi z metodo, ki temelji na daljnem nadzoru.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མི་མང་ཆེ་ཚོར་སྤྱིར་གྱི་རང་ཉིད་གཙོ་སློང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་བྱེད། མི་མང་གི་ངལ་རྩོགས་པ་ཚོའི་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དག་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བདམས་ཟིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐོབ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་5%དཔལ་འབྱོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ'}
{'en': 'A Generative Attentional Neural Network Model for Dialogue Act Classification', 'fr': 'Un modèle de réseau neuronal attentionnel génératif pour la classification des actes de dialogue', 'ar': 'نموذج الشبكة العصبية التوليدية لتصنيف فعل الحوار', 'pt': 'Um modelo de rede neural de atenção generativa para classificação do ato de diálogo', 'es': 'Un modelo de red neuronal atencional generativa para la clasificación de la Ley de diálogo', 'ja': '対話ACT分類のための生成的注意神経ネットワークモデル', 'zh': '一以言行分类者生成性意神经网络模形', 'ru': 'Генеративная модель нейронной сети для классификации по закону диалога', 'hi': 'संवाद अधिनियम वर्गीकरण के लिए एक उत्पादक चौकस तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल', 'ga': "Samhail de Ghréasán Néarach Ginitheach Aireach d'Aicmiú Acht Agallaimh", 'ka': 'დიალოგის ქესტიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციისთვის დამყენებელი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο γενετήσιου νευρικού δικτύου προσοχής για ταξινόμηση νόμου διαλόγου', 'hu': 'Generative Attentational Neural Network Model for Dialogue Act Classification', 'it': "Modello di rete neurale reattiva generativa per la classificazione dell'atto di dialogo", 'kk': 'Диалог Законының классификациясы үшін құрылған назарлық нейралық желі үлгісі', 'lt': 'Generacinis dėmesio neutralaus tinklo modelis dialogo akto klasifikavimui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് Act Classification', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Netwerk Newrali ta’ Attenzjoni Ġenerattiva għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Att ta’ Djalogu', 'mn': 'Диалог хууль Классификацийн төлөөлөгчийн сэтгэл санааны сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний загвар', 'ro': 'Un model de rețea neurală atențională generativă pentru clasificarea actului de dialog', 'pl': 'Generatywny model sieci neuronowej uważności dla klasyfikacji ustawy dialogowej', 'sr': 'Generativni model neuronske mreže za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu', 'no': 'Name', 'sv': 'En generativ uppmärksamhetsnerral nätverksmodell för klassificering av dialoglagen', 'si': 'සංවාද ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත සාමාන්\u200dය ජාලය නිර්මාණය', 'so': 'A Generative Attention Neural Network Model for Classification of Sharciga Dialog', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் சட்டை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான பொதுவான கவனம் பிணைய பிணையத்தின் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'ڈیلوگ کیٹ کلاسیفٹ کے لئے ایک پیدا کرنے والی نائرل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mô hình mạng thần kinh truyền hình liên tiếp cho việc lập trình xã hội.', 'bg': 'Генеративен модел на невронна мрежа за опит за класификация на акта за диалог', 'da': 'En generativ opmærksomhedsnetral netværksmodel til klassificering af dialogloven', 'nl': 'Een Generatief Aandacht Neural Netwerk Model voor Dialoog Act Classificatie', 'hr': 'Generativni uzorni model neuronske mreže za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu', 'id': 'Model jaringan saraf perhatian generatif untuk Klasifikasi Akta Dialog', 'ko': '대화 행위 분류의 생성 주의 신경 네트워크 모델', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Mtandao wa Kizalendo wa Kihafidhina wa Mtandao wa Kijadala', 'tr': 'Dälog Wezipi üçin janlaýyn Taýdalyk Jawany', 'af': "'n Genereerde Aangaande Neurale Netwerk Model vir Dialoog Wet Klassifikasie", 'sq': 'A Generative Attention Neural Network Model for Dialogue Act Classification', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Dialoog Yazı Klasifikasiyası üçün Nöral A ğ Modeli', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Generalni model neuronske mreže za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu', 'de': 'Ein generatives aufmerksames neuronales Netzwerkmodell zur Klassifizierung des Dialoggesetzes', 'ca': "Un model de xarxa neuronal d'atenció generativa per classificar la llei de diàleg", 'cs': 'Generační model pozornosti neurální sítě pro klasifikaci dialogového zákona', 'et': 'Generatiivne närvivõrgustiku mudel dialoogiseaduse klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Generative Attentional Neural Network Model for Dialogue Act Classification', 'jv': 'Generative Attentive Neral Network model kanggo Dialog Weti', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Generativni model nevronskega omrežja za klasifikacijo akta o dialogu', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel generative neural network architecture for Dialogue Act classification. Building upon the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label connection for sequence learning, akin to Hidden Markov Models. The experiments show that both of these innovations lead our model to outperform strong baselines for dialogue act classification on MapTask and Switchboard corpora. We further empirically analyse the effectiveness of each of the new innovations.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova arquitetura de rede neural generativa para a classificação do Dialogue Act. Com base na estrutura da Rede Neural Recorrente, nosso modelo incorpora uma nova técnica de atenção e um rótulo para rotular a conexão para o aprendizado de sequência, semelhante aos Modelos Ocultos de Markov. Os experimentos mostram que ambas as inovações levam nosso modelo a superar as fortes linhas de base para classificação de atos de diálogo em corpora MapTask e Switchboard. Analisamos ainda empiricamente a eficácia de cada uma das novas inovações.', 'es': 'Proponemos una arquitectura de red neuronal generativa novedosa para la clasificación de la Ley de Diálogo. Basado en el marco de red neuronal recurrente, nuestro modelo incorpora una técnica de atención novedosa y una conexión de etiqueta a etiqueta para el aprendizaje de secuencias, similar a los modelos ocultos de Markov. Los experimentos muestran que ambas innovaciones llevan a nuestro modelo a superar las sólidas bases de referencia para la clasificación de actos de diálogo en los corpus de MapTask y Switchboard. Analizamos empíricamente la eficacia de cada una de las nuevas innovaciones.', 'ar': 'نقترح بنية شبكة عصبية توليد جديدة لتصنيف قانون الحوار. بناءً على إطار عمل الشبكة العصبية المتكررة ، يشتمل نموذجنا على تقنية انتباه جديدة وملصق لتسمية الاتصال للتعلم المتسلسل ، على غرار نماذج ماركوف المخفية. تظهر التجارب أن كلا هذين الابتكارين يقود نموذجنا إلى التفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس القوية لتصنيف فعل الحوار في MapTask و Switchboard corpora. نحن نحلل بشكل تجريبي فعالية كل من الابتكارات الجديدة.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle architecture de réseau neuronal génératif pour la classification Dialogue Act. S'appuyant sur le cadre du réseau neuronal récurrent, notre modèle intègre une nouvelle technique d'attention et une connexion étiquette à étiquette pour l'apprentissage de séquences, similaire aux modèles de Markov cachés. Les expériences montrent que ces deux innovations conduisent notre modèle à surpasser les bases solides pour la classification des actes de dialogue sur les corpus MapTask et Switchboard. Nous analysons de manière empirique l'efficacité de chacune des nouvelles innovations.", 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую генеративную архитектуру нейронной сети для классификации по закону Диалога. Опираясь на структуру рецидивирующей нейронной сети, наша модель включает в себя новую технику внимания и метку для маркировки соединения для обучения последовательностям, сходную со скрытыми марковскими моделями. Эксперименты показывают, что обе эти инновации приводят к тому, что наша модель превосходит сильные базовые линии для классификации диалоговых актов на корпусах MapTask и Switchboard. Далее мы эмпирически анализируем эффективность каждого из новых нововведений.', 'zh': '设一以对法案类新型生神经网络架构。 基于递归神经网络框架,则合新意表,以序学接,类隐马尔可夫模形。 实验此二者,MapTaskSwitchboard语料库上之对行优于强基线。 更论每项新创新之有效性。', 'hi': 'हम संवाद अधिनियम वर्गीकरण के लिए एक उपन्यास उत्पादक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क ढांचे पर निर्माण, हमारे मॉडल में एक उपन्यास चौकस तकनीक और अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए लेबल कनेक्शन शामिल है, जो हिडन मार्कोव मॉडल के समान है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि इन दोनों नवाचारों ने हमारे मॉडल को MapTask और Switchboard corpora पर संवाद अधिनियम वर्गीकरण के लिए मजबूत बेसलाइन को पछाड़ने के लिए प्रेरित किया। हम आगे अनुभवजन्य रूप से नए नवाचारों में से प्रत्येक की प्रभावशीलता का विश्लेषण करते हैं।', 'ja': 'Dialogue Act分類のための新規の生成ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを提案します。再発性ニューラルネットワークフレームワークに基づいて、私たちのモデルは、隠れマルコフモデルに似た、シーケンス学習のための接続をラベル付けるための新規の注意技法とラベルを組み込んでいます。実験では、これらのイノベーションの両方が、MapTaskとSwitchboard corporaの対話行為分類の強力なベースラインを上回ることが示されています。私たちはさらに、それぞれの新しいイノベーションの有効性を実証的に分析します。', 'ga': 'Molaimid ailtireacht líonra néar giniúnaigh nua le haghaidh aicmiú Acht Comhphlé. Ag tógáil ar an gcreat Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach, ionchorpraíonn ár múnla teicníocht aireúil úrnua agus nasc lipéad le lipéad chun seichimh a fhoghlaim, cosúil le Múnlaí Hidden Markov. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go bhfuil an dá nuálaíocht seo ina chúis le feidhmíocht ár samhail níos fearr ná bonnlínte láidre le haghaidh aicmiú achta idirphlé ar MapTask agus Corpora Lasc-chláir. Déanaimid anailís eimpíreach tuilleadh ar éifeachtacht gach ceann de na nuálaíochtaí nua.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα παραγωγική αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων για την ταξινόμηση του Νόμου Διάλογου. Βασιζόμενο στο πλαίσιο του Επαναλαμβανόμενου Νευρικού Δικτύου, το μοντέλο μας ενσωματώνει μια νέα τεχνική προσοχής και μια σύνδεση ετικετών για τη μάθηση ακολουθιών, παρόμοια με τα Κρυμμένα Μοντέλα Μάρκοφ. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι και οι δύο αυτές καινοτομίες οδηγούν το μοντέλο μας να ξεπεράσει τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης για την ταξινόμηση πράξεων διαλόγου σε σώματα MapTask και Switchboard. Αναλύουμε περαιτέρω εμπειρικά την αποτελεσματικότητα κάθε νέας καινοτομίας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტიური განვითარებული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურის კლასიფიკაცია დიალოგის აქტიქტიქტურის შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელეც პრომენტიური ატრუნციო ტექნექტიკის და ლექტიკის შესაბამისათვის კონფიგურაციის შესაბამისათვის, როგორც დახურებული მარკობის მოდელთან. ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ორივე ეს ინონოციაციები ჩვენი მოდელის გავაკეთება ძალიან ბაზი ხაზების შესაძლებლობად დიალოგის კლასიფიკაცია MapTask და Switchboard corpora. ჩვენ ახალი ინონოციაციების ეფექტიურობას ემპერიკურად ანალიზებთ.', 'hu': 'Új generációs neurális hálózati architektúrát javasolunk a Dialogue Act osztályozásához. Az ismétlődő neurális hálózat keretrendszerére építve modellünk egy új figyelemfelkeltő technikát és egy címkét tartalmaz a szekvencia tanulás kapcsolatának címkézésére, hasonlóan a rejtett Markov modellekhez. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy mindkét újítás arra vezeti modellünket, hogy túllépjen a párbeszéd aktus osztályozásának erős alapjaival a MapTask és a Switchboard corporákon. Továbbá empirikusan elemezzük az egyes új innovációk hatékonyságát.', 'kk': 'Біз диалог Законының классификациясы үшін романдық невралдық желінің архитектурасын жасау керек. Қайталану Невралдық желінің фрейміне құрылған, біздің үлгіміз жасырылған Марков үлгілеріне сәйкес қосылу үшін қайталану үлгісін жазылады. Тәжірибелер MapTask және Switchboard корпорасындағы диалог жұмыс істеу үшін өзіміздің үлгілеріміздің күшті негізгі сызықтарын таңдайды. Біз жаңа инновациялардың әрбірінің эффективнігін емпирикалық түрде анализирамыз.', 'it': "Proponiamo una nuova architettura di rete neurale generativa per la classificazione Dialogue Act. Basandosi sul framework Recurrent Neural Network, il nostro modello incorpora una nuova tecnica di attenzione e un'etichetta per etichettare la connessione per l'apprendimento delle sequenze, simile ai modelli nascosti Markov. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che entrambe queste innovazioni portano il nostro modello a superare le solide linee di base per la classificazione degli atti di dialogo su MapTask e Switchboard corpora. Analizziamo ulteriormente empiricamente l'efficacia di ciascuna delle nuove innovazioni.", 'lt': 'Siūlome naujos kartos nervų tinklo architektūrą dialogo akto klasifikacijai. Remdamiesi pasikartojančio nervinio tinklo sistema, mūsų modelis apima naują dėmesio metodą ir etiketę, skirtą pažymėti jungtį sekos mokymui, panašią į paslėptus Markovo modelius. Eksperimentai rodo, kad abiem šiomis naujovėmis mūsų modelis viršija tvirtas bazes dialogo veiksmų klasifikacijai dėl MapTask ir Switchboard corpora. Toliau empiriniu būdu analizuojame kiekvienos naujos inovacijos veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'We propose a novel generative neural network architecture for Dialogue Act classification.  Конформирајќи се на рамката на рекурентната неврална мрежа, нашиот модел вклучува нова техника на внимание и етикета за означување на поврзаност за учење на секвенца, слична на скриени Марков модели. Експериментите покажуваат дека двете овие иновации го водат нашиот модел да ги надмине силните основни линии за класификација на дијалог акт на MapTask и Switchboard corpora. Понатаму емпирички ја анализираме ефикасноста на секоја од новите иновации.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan arkitektur rangkaian saraf generatif baru untuk klasifikasi Akt Dialog. Membangun pada kerangka Rangkaian Neural Terulang, model kami memasukkan teknik perhatian baru dan label untuk label sambungan untuk pembelajaran urutan, sama dengan Model Markov Tersembunyi. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua inovasi ini memimpin model kita untuk melampaui garis dasar yang kuat untuk klasifikasi tindakan dialog pada Korpora MapTask dan Switchboard. Kami lebih lanjutkan secara empirik menganalisis keefektivitas setiap inovasi baru.', 'ml': 'We propose a novel generative neural network architecture for Dialogue Act classification.  വീണ്ടും വരുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന മാര്\u200dക്കോവ് മോഡോളുകളോടൊപ്പം  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ കണ്ടുപിടിപ്പുകള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരും നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശക്തിയുള് പുതിയ പുതിയ സൃഷ്ടികളുടെ പ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രകൃതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രേഷ്ഠമായി അന്വേ', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu arkitettura ġdida ġenerattiva tan-netwerk newrali għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-Att tad-Djalogu. Abbażi tal-qafas tan-Netwerk Newrali Rikorrenti, il-mudell tagħna jinkorpora teknika ta’ attenzjoni ġdida u tikketta għat-tikketta tal-konnessjoni għat-tagħlim tas-sekwenzi, simili għall-Mudelli Markov Miħbija. L-esperimenti juru li ż-żewġ innovazzjonijiet iwasslu lill-mudell tagħna biex iwettaq linji bażi b’saħħithom għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-att ta’ djalogu dwar MapTask u Switchboard corpora. Aħna nagħmlu analiżi empirika ulterjuri tal-effikaċja ta’ kull waħda mill-innovazzjonijiet il-ġodda.', 'mn': 'Бид диалог хуулийн хууль хэлэлцүүлэхэд шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг санал болгож байна. Дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний хэлбэр дээр бий болгож, бидний загвар нь нуугдсан Марков загвартай адилхан дарааллын суралцах холбоотой шинэ сэтгэл ухааны техник болон загвар бий болгодог. Энэ туршилтууд бидний загварыг MapTask болон Switchboard корпора дээр дүгнэлт хийх чадвартай суурь шулуунуудыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бид шинэ шинэ шинэчлэлүүдийн үр дүнг илүү эзэмшигтэй шинжилгээнд судалж байна.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein novel genererande neuralnettverksarkitektur for klassifikasjon av dialogakten. Byggjer på den gjeldande neuralnettverksrammeverket, inneheld vårt modell ein novel attentionalt teknikk og ein merkelapp for å merke tilkopling for sekvenslæring som er likt med gøymde Markov-modeller. Eksperimentane viser at begge av desse innovasjonane fører modellen vårt til å utføra sterke baselinjer for dialogvindauget kan bruka klassifikasjon på MapTask og Switchboard corpora. Vi analyserer meir empirisk effektiviteten av kvar av dei nye inovasjonane.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nową generatywną architekturę sieci neuronowej dla klasyfikacji ustawy Dialogu. Opierając się na ramach Recurrent Neuroral Network, nasz model zawiera nowatorską technikę uwagi i etykietę do oznaczania połączenia dla uczenia się sekwencji, podobną do ukrytych modeli Markova. Eksperymenty pokazują, że obie te innowacje doprowadzają nasz model do przewyższania silnych linii podstawowych dla klasyfikacji aktów dialogowych na korporach MapTask i Switchboard. Dalej empirycznie analizujemy skuteczność każdej z nowych innowacji.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă arhitectură generativă a rețelei neurale pentru clasificarea Dialogue Act. Bazându-se pe cadrul Rețelei Neurale Recurente, modelul nostru încorporează o tehnică de atenție nouă și o etichetă pentru etichetarea conexiunii pentru învățarea secvențelor, asemănătoare modelelor Hidden Markov. Experimentele arată că ambele inovații au condus modelul nostru să depășească liniile de bază puternice pentru clasificarea actelor de dialog pe corpora MapTask și Switchboard. Analizăm în continuare empiric eficiența fiecăreia dintre noile inovații.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novu generičnu neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu. Na osnovu ponovne neuronske mreže, naš model uključuje novu pažnju tehniku i etiketu za označavanje veze za učenje sekvence, slično skrivenim Markovskim modelima. Eksperimenti pokazuju da obje ove inovacije vode naš model da izvede jake osnovne linije za klasifikaciju dijaloga o korpori MapTask i Switchboard. Dalje empirički analiziramo efikasnost svake nove inovacije.', 'si': 'අපි සංවාද නියෝජිත විශේෂණ සඳහා නිර්මාණික ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපයක් ප්\u200dරවෘති කරනවා. ආයෙත් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ සංවිධානයේ නිර්මාණය, අපේ මොඩේලය සම්බන්ධ විධානය සහ ලේබල් සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ක්\u200dරමවිධ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ නිර්මාණය දෙන්නම අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක ස්විච්බෝර්ඩ් කොර්පෝරා වල සංවාදය සඳහා ශක්තිම අපි තව අලුත් අවස්ථාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraalka sharciga ku saabsan qaabka shabakadda neurada. Dhisaynta shabakadda Neural ee soo socday, modelkayagu wuxuu ka kooban yahay teknikada warqada ah ee la soconayo iyo calaamad la xiriira xiriirka barashada xilliga ah, iyadoo u eg noocyada qarsoon ee Markov. Imtixaanka labadaas waxay muujinayaan in labadan abuurista ah uu noogu hoggaamiyo sameynta saldhigyo xoog leh oo ku qoran qoraalka kalluumeysiga Shaqada iyo Shirkadda Switchboard. Waxaynu si fiican ugu baaraynaa waxqabadka cusub oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny generativ neural nätverksarkitektur för Dialogue Act klassificering. Vår modell bygger på ramverket Recurrent Neural Network och innehåller en ny uppmärksamhetsteknik och en etikett för att märka anslutning för sekvensinlärning, liknande Hidden Markov Models. Experimenten visar att båda dessa innovationer leder vår modell till att överträffa starka baslinjer för dialogakt klassificering på MapTask och Switchboard corpora. Vi analyserar vidare empiriskt effektiviteten av var och en av de nya innovationerna.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் உரையாடல் சட்டை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான புதிய பிணைய பிணையத்தின் உருவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். மறைந்த மார்கோவ் மாதிரிகளுக்கு பொருத்தத்திற்கான தொழில்நுட்ப ப பின்னணி சட்டத்தின் மீது கட்டமைப்பு, எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு புதிய கவனம் தொழில்நுட இந்த கண்டுபிடிப்புகளில் இருவரும் மாதிரி முறைமையில் உரையாடல் செயல் வகைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் நிறுவனம் நிறுவனத்தில் பலமான அடிப்படைகள நாம் ஒவ்வொரு புதிய புதிய புதிய புதிய புதியத்தின் விளைவை மேலும் முறையாக ஆராய்ச்சி', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی نورال نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں ڈالیلوگ قانون کلاسپیک کے لئے۔ دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک فورسم پر بنایا گیا ہے، ہمارا موڈل ایک نوم اچھی طریقہ اور ایک لابل ہے کہ کائنال سکونت کے لئے اتصال لیبل کرے، چھپائے ہوئے مارکوف موڈل کے مطابق۔ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان دونوں نوآوریوں نے ہماری مدل کو مپ ٹاکس اور سوئیچبورڈ کورپور کے ذریعے مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں کے لئے مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں کو عملہ کرنا ہے۔ ہم اضافہ طور پر ہر نوی نوآوریوں کی عمدگی کا تحقیق کر رہے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một cấu trúc hệ thần kinh mới cho việc phân loại phim. Dựa trên cấu trúc nơ-ron thần kinh liên tục, mẫu của chúng tôi có một kỹ thuật để chú ý mới và một nhãn hiệu để nhãn kết nối cho việc học trình tự, giống với mô hình Markov ẩn dấu. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy cả hai sự phát triển này đều dẫn lối cho mô hình của chúng ta vượt qua những nền tảng vững chắc cho việc phân loại bản đồ Tổ chức. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu kinh nghiệm hơn về sự hiệu quả của mỗi sự phát triển mới.', 'uz': 'Biz Dialog Act darajasini yaratish uchun novel generativ tarmoq arxituvchisini talab qilamiz. Building upon the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label connection for sequence learning, akin to Hidden Markov Models.  Tajribalar bu ikkita ijodkorlik modelimizni MapTask va Switchboard kompaniyadagi muloqat amalning darajasini bajarish uchun katta asboblarni bajarish mumkin. Biz har bir yangi ijodkorning effektligini aniqlamiz.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова генеративна невронна мрежа архитектура за класификация на Акта за диалог. Въз основа на рамката за повтаряща се неврална мрежа нашият модел включва нова техника на вниманието и етикет за етикетиране на връзката за последователно обучение, подобно на Скритите Маркови модели. Експериментите показват, че и двете от тези иновации водят нашия модел да превъзхожда силните базови линии за класификация на диалоговия акт върху корпусите MapTask и Switchboard. По-нататък анализираме емпирично ефективността на всяка от новите иновации.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novu generičnu arhitekturu neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu. Na osnovu ponovnog okvira neuronske mreže, naš model uključuje novu pažnju tehniku i etiketu za označavanje veze za učenje sekvence, sličnu skrivenim Markovskim modelima. Eksperimenti pokazuju da obje ove inovacije vode naš model do izvršavanja jakih osnovnih linija za klasifikaciju dijaloga o korporaciji MapTask i Switchboard. Dalje empirički analiziramo učinkovitost svake nove inovacije.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny generativ neural netværksarkitektur til Dialogue Act klassificering. Med udgangspunkt i det tilbagevendende neurale netværk-ramme indgår vores model en ny opmærksomhedsteknik og en etiket til at mærke forbindelse til sekvenslæring, beslægtet med skjulte Markov modeller. Eksperimenterne viser, at begge disse innovationer fører vores model til at overgå stærke baselines for dialog act klassificering på MapTask og Switchboard corpora. Vi analyserer yderligere empirisk effektiviteten af hver af de nye innovationer.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan arkitektur jaringan saraf generasi baru untuk klasifikasi Dialogue Act. Building upon the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label connection for sequence learning, akin to Hidden Markov Models.  Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa kedua inovasi ini memimpin model kita untuk melampaui garis dasar yang kuat untuk klasifikasi tindakan dialog pada MapTask dan Switchboard corpora. Kami lebih lanjut secara empiris menganalisis efektivitas setiap inovasi baru.', 'ko': '우리는 대화 행위의 분류에 사용되는 새로운 생성식 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시했다.귀속신경 네트워크 구조를 토대로 우리 모델은 새로운 주의 기술과 서열 학습에 사용되는 라벨에서 라벨로 연결하는 것을 결합시켰다. 이것은 은마르코프 모델과 유사하다.실험에 의하면 이 두 가지 혁신은 우리 모델이MapTask와 교환 자료 라이브러리에서 강력한 대화 행위 분류 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리는 모든 새로운 혁신의 유효성을 한층 더 실증적으로 분석했다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک معماری شبکه عصبی تولید کننده برای مجموعه\u200cی قانون گفتگو است. بر روی چهارچوب شبکه عصبی دوباره ساخته شده، مدل ما یک تکنیک توجه نویس و یک نقاشی برای برچسب ارتباط برای یادگیری رشته\u200cها شبیه به مدل\u200cهای قایم شده مارکوف را جمع می\u200cکند. آزمایش ها نشان می دهند که هر دو از این نوآوری\u200cها مدل ما را به انجام خط\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای قوی برای فرهنگ\u200cبندی\u200cهای مشاوره در شرکت MapTask و Switchboard می\u200cکند. ما به طور امپراطوری بیشتر فعالیت هر نوآوری جدید را تحلیل می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunapendekeza ujenzi wa mtandao wa kijamii wa kitaifa kwa ajili ya kutangaza Sheria ya Dialogu. Kujenga kwenye mfumo wa Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea hivi karibuni, mwelekeo wetu unajumuisha teknolojia ya kisasa ya kusikiliza na alama ya kuunganisha kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa mfululizo, ukilinganisha na Modeli za Markov zilizofichikana. Majaribio hayo yanaonyesha kuwa mbili za ubunifu huu huongoza mifano yetu ya kutengeneza misingi yenye nguvu ya mazungumzo katika kampuni ya MapTask na Switchboard. We further empirically analyse the effectiveness of each of the new innovations.', 'tr': 'Biz Dialog Wezguny klasifikasy üçin döredijili nuýral a ýry arhitekturlygyny teklip edip görýäris. Geçerli Neural Network çerçevesinde inşa edildi, biziň modelimiz gizlenen Markov modelleri ýaly bir roman dikkati tekniki we etiketli baglanma üçin etiketli bar. Deneyler bu täzelikleriň ikisi hem nusgamyzyň MapTask we Switchboard corpora derejesinde güýçli bazarlarymyzy çykarmak üçin nusgamyzy çykarýandyr. Biz täze täze täzelikleriň täsirleriniň täsirlerini daşyrdyk.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe genereer neuralnetwerk-arkitektuur vir Dialoog-Wet klasifikasie. By gebou op die herhaalde neurale netwerk raamwerk, ons model inkorpreer 'n novele aandaglike teknike en 'n etiket om verbinding te etiket vir volgorde leer, gelyk aan verberg Markov Modelle. Die eksperimente wys dat beide van hierdie inovāsie ons model lei om sterke basisline te uitvoer vir dialoog aksie klasifikasie op MapTask en Switchboard corpora. Ons verder empiriese analiseer die effektiviteit van elke van die nuwe inovaties.", 'am': 'አዲስ የዘላለም የኔዌር መረብ የመዝገብ መሠረት ማቀናጃ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ Building upon the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label connection for sequence learning, akin to Hidden Markov Models.  ፈተናዎቹ ሁለቱም አዲስ አዲስ ፍጥረት ሞዴላዎቻችንን በመስመር እና በመስኮት ኮርፖርተር ላይ የጥልቅ ጥያቄን ለማድረግ የሚያሳየው ናቸው፡፡ አዲስ አዲስ አዲስ ፍጥረት በማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të re gjenerative të rrjetit nervor për klasifikimin e Aktit të Dialogut. Building upon the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label connection for sequence learning, akin to Hidden Markov Models.  Eksperimentet tregojnë se të dy këto inovacione udhëheqin modelin tonë për të kaluar linjat bazë të forta për klasifikimin e veprimit të dialogut në MapTask dhe korporatën Switchboard. Ne analizojmë më tej empirikisht efektshmërinë e secilit nga inovacionet e reja.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe generatieve neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor voor Dialogue Act classificatie. Voortbouwend op het Recurrent Neural Network framework bevat ons model een nieuwe aandachtstechniek en een label to label connection voor sequence learning, vergelijkbaar met Hidden Markov Models. De experimenten tonen aan dat beide van deze innovaties ertoe leiden dat ons model beter presteert dan sterke basislijnen voor dialogactclassificatie op MapTask en Switchboard corpora. We analyseren verder empirisch de effectiviteit van elk van de nieuwe innovaties.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine neuartige generative neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur für die Klassifizierung des Dialoggesetzes vor. Aufbauend auf dem Rahmen des wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerks beinhaltet unser Modell eine neuartige Aufmerksamkeitstechnik und eine Label-to-Label-Verbindung für Sequenzlernen, ähnlich wie Hidden Markov Models. Die Experimente zeigen, dass beide dieser Innovationen dazu führen, dass unser Modell starke Basislinien für Dialogaktenklassifikation auf MapTask und Switchboard-Korpora übertrifft. Weiterhin analysieren wir empirisch die Effektivität jeder der neuen Innovationen.', 'az': 'Biz Dialoog Yazı Sınıflandırması üçün yeni nürol a ğ arhitektarını təklif edirik. Yenidən Nöral Ağ çerçivesinin üstündə inşa etdiyimiz modellərimiz gizlənmiş Markov modellərinin bənzərini örtünmək üçün yeni təsirli tekniki və etiketi içərir. Bu təcrübələr hər ikisi də modelimizi MapTask və Switchboard korporasında çox qüvvətli təcrübə çətinliklərini çəkməyə çalışır. Biz hər yeni inşalların etkinliğini daha çox empirik olaraq analiz edirik.', 'bn': 'আমরা ডায়ালগ আইনের ক্লাসাফিকেশনের জন্য একটি নvel জেনারেটিভ নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করি। পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ফ্রেমে নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে, আমাদের মডেল ল লুকিয়ে রাখা মার্কোভ মডেলের সাথে লেবেল শিখার জন্য একটি নবনের আকর্ষণীয় প্রযুক্তি  এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই দুই উদ্ভাবন আমাদের মডেলের নেতৃত্ব প্রদান করে ম্যাপটাস্ক এবং স্যুটবর্ড কোর্পোরায় ডায়ালগের ক্ল আমরা প্রত্যেক নতুন উদ্ভাবনের কার্যক্রম বিশ্লেষণ করি।', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր սերունդ ստեղծող նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն դասակարգման համար: Հաշվի առնելով վերջին անգամ նյարդային ցանցի շրջանակների վրա, մեր մոդելը ներառում է նոր ուշադրության տեխնիկա և պիտակ, որը պիտակում է կապը հաջորդականության սովորելու համար, որը նման է թաքնված Մարկով մոդելներին: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս երկու նորարարությունները առաջնորդում են մեր մոդելը, որպեսզի կատարի ավելի ուժեղ հիմքային գծեր MapTo-ի և Շյուտֆորդի կառուցվածքի դասակարգման համար: Մենք նաև էմպիրիկ կերպ վերլուծում ենք նորարարությունների յուրաքանչյուրի արդյունավետությունը:', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novu generičnu arhitekturu neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju zakona o dijalogu. Na osnovu ponovne neuronske mreže, naš model uključuje novu pažnju tehniku i etiketu za označavanje veze za učenje sekvence, sličnu sakrivenim Markovskim modelima. Eksperimenti pokazuju da obje ove inovacije vode naš model do izvršavanja jakih osnovnih linija za klasifikaciju dijaloga o korporaciji MapTask i Switchboard. Dalje empirički analiziramo učinkovitost svake nove inovacije.', 'ca': "Proposem una nova arquitectura de xarxa neural generadora per a la classificació de la Llei de Diàleg. Construïnt en el marc de la Rede Neural Recurrent, el nostre model incorpora una nova tècnica d'atenció i una etiqueta per etiquetar la connexió per l'aprenentatge de seqüències, semblant als Models Markov Ocults. Els experiments demostren que ambdues d'aquestes innovacions porten al nostre model a superar les fortes línies de base per a classificar els actes de diàleg sobre MapTask i Switchboard corpora. Anàlisim més empíricament l'eficacia de cada una de les noves innovacions.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme novou generativní architekturu neuronových sítí pro klasifikaci Dialogue Act. Náš model vychází z rámce recidivní neuronové sítě a zahrnuje novou techniku pozornosti a štítek pro popisování spojení pro sekvenční učení, podobnou skrytým Markovům modelům. Experimenty ukazují, že obě tyto inovace vedou náš model k překonání silných základních linií pro klasifikaci dialogových aktů na korpusech MapTask a Switchboard. Dále empiricky analyzujeme efektivitu každé z nových inovací.', 'et': 'Me pakume välja uudse generatiivse närvivõrgu arhitektuuri Dialoogiseaduse klassifitseerimiseks. Korduva närvivõrgu raamistikule tuginedes sisaldab meie mudel uudset tähelepanuvõtetehnikat ja märgistust järjestusõppe ühenduse märgistamiseks, sarnaselt varjatud Markovi mudelitele. Eksperimentid näitavad, et mõlemad uuendused viivad meie mudeli tulemusele tugevaid alusjooni dialoogi aktide klassifitseerimiseks MapTask ja Switchboard korpustes. Analüüsime empiiriliselt iga uue uuenduse efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta generatiivista neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria Dialogue Act -luokitukseen. Toistuvan hermoverkon viitekehykseen pohjautuva mallimme sisältää uuden huomiotekniikan ja etiketin, jolla merkitään yhteys sekvenssien oppimiseen, kuten Hidden Markov Models. Kokeet osoittavat, että molemmat näistä innovaatioista johtavat mallimme suoriutumaan MapTask- ja Switchboard-korpusten dialogi-aktiluokituksen vahvoista lähtökohdista. Lisäksi analysoimme empiirisesti jokaisen uuden innovaation tehokkuutta.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo generativno nevronsko arhitekturo za klasifikacijo Dialogue Act. Naš model, ki temelji na okviru ponavljajočega se živčnega omrežja, vključuje novo tehniko pozornosti in oznako za označevanje povezave za učenje sekvenc, podobno skritim Markovim modelom. Eksperimenti kažejo, da obe inovaciji vodijo naš model k izboljšanju močnih izhodišč za klasifikacijo dialognih aktov na korpusih MapTask in Switchboard. Nadalje empirično analiziramo učinkovitost vsake od novih inovacij.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé nggunaké nganggo dolanan pangan-alat sing dikenalkeyarno kanggo dialog Ngawe di nggawe nambah coral, rect Neral Network, model nambah ngewehi teknik atasun Atential lan etiket kanggo nambah tanggal nggo layar seng layar, sukane karo model Hidden Markow Where's the reference box? Awak dhéwé luwih karo perusahaan kanggo nyeadakno sing gak nyeadakno", 'ha': "Kana goyyar da wani matsayin jerin mai jene jerin neural na tsari ga fassarar Fasani na Dialog. Tsarin da ke kan jerin Naural na Naural da aka Motsi, yana cikin wani technical na yanzu masu aikin kwanan da kuma yana da wata label zuwa link to label for learning sequence, sami'in da aka ɓõye Models na Markof. The experiments show that both of these innovations lead our model to outperform strong baselines for dialogue act classification on MapTask and Switchboard corpora.  Ko baka tuna anayyari game da aikin kowace mafiya-yanzu.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית דוורתית חדשה להקליזת חוק דיאלוג. בניין על סגרת הרשת העצבית המחזרה, המודל שלנו מכיל טכניקה תשומת לב חדשה ותווית לתווית חיבור ללמוד רצף, דומה למודלים מארקוב מסתורים. הניסויים מראים ששני החדשויות האלה מובילים את הדוגמא שלנו להעביר את קווי הבסיס חזקים להקליזת מעשי דיאלוג על MapTask וקופורה Switchboard. We further empirically analyse the effectiveness of each of the new innovations.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཌའི་ལོག་ཉེན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དུས་མཐུན Building on the Recurrent Neural Network framework, our model incorporates a novel attentional technique and a label to label a connection for sequence learning, similar to Hidden Markov Models. experiments show that these innovations both lead to our model to outperform strong baselines for dialogue act on MapTask and Switchboard corporation. ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་གསར་གཏོད་གསར་བ་ཐེངས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གོ་སྐབས་གཙང་ཆ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Salience Rank : Efficient Keyphrase Extraction with Topic Modeling', 'ar': 'مرتبة البروز: استخراج عبارة رئيسية فعال مع نمذجة الموضوع', 'pt': 'Classificação de Saliência: Extração Eficiente de Frases-Chave com Modelagem de Tópicos', 'es': 'Rango de prominencia: extracción eficiente de frases clave con modelado de temas', 'fr': 'Salience Rank\xa0: extraction efficace de phrases clés avec modélisation de sujets', 'ja': 'サリエンスランク：トピックモデリングによる効率的なキーフレーズ抽出', 'zh': '显著性排名:用主题建模高效之要短语取', 'hi': 'लचीलापन रैंक: विषय मॉडलिंग के साथ कुशल Keyphrase निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Ранг Salience: Эффективное извлечение ключевых фраз с моделированием тем', 'ga': 'Céim na hInteachta: Eastóscadh Éifeachtach Eochairfhrása le Samhaltú Ábhair', 'ka': 'სერიენტის სიგრძე: ეფექტიური გასაღების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Κατάταξη εμβέλειας: Αποτελεσματική εξαγωγή λέξεων-κλειδιών με μοντελοποίηση θεμάτων', 'hu': 'Salience Rank: Hatékony kulcskifejezés kivonás téma modellezéssel', 'kk': 'Салиенс түрі: Нақышты үлгілеу үшін әсер етілген перне сөздерді тарқату', 'lt': 'Salience intervalas: veiksmingas raktų frazės ekstrahavimas su teminiu modeliavimu', 'mk': 'Радок на ослободување: ефикасна екстракција на клучната фраза со моделирање на тема', 'it': 'Livello saliente: Estrazione efficiente delle parole chiave con la modellazione degli argomenti', 'ml': 'സാഷ്യസ് റാങ്ക്: പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d എക്സ്ട്രേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രായോഗ്യം', 'mt': 'Firxa ta’ Salience: Estrazzjoni Effiċjenti ta’ Frażi Ewlenija b’Mudellar Topiku', 'ms': 'Rangkai Salience: Ekstraksi Frasa Kekunci Efisien dengan Modelan Topik', 'mn': 'Salience Rank: Үндсэн түлхүүр өгүүлбэр сэдвийн загвар зурах', 'pl': 'Ranking wyrażeń: efektywna ekstrakcja fraz kluczowych z modelowaniem tematów', 'no': 'Salience Rank: Utpakking av nøkkelfrasar med temamodellering', 'ro': 'Grad de saliență: Extragerea eficientă a frazelor cheie cu modelarea subiectelor', 'sr': 'Pogled Salience: efikasno izvlačenje ključne fraze sa modelima teme', 'si': 'සාලින්ස් රේන්ඩ්: විද්\u200dයාව මොඩලින් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් පිළිබඳින්න', 'so': 'Salience Rank: Effective Keyphrase Extraction with Topic Modeling', 'sv': 'Salience Rank: Effektiv nyckelfrasutvinning med ämnesmodellering', 'ta': 'வாய்ப்பு விவரம்: தலைப்பு மாதிரியுடன் தேவையான விசைச்சொற்றொடர் பிரித்தெடுப்பு', 'ur': 'سلینس رنک: موضوع موڈلینگ کے ساتھ فعال کیفریز اخراج', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Độ cao độ cao: Từ khoá hiệu quả', 'bg': 'Класиране на солеността: Ефективно извличане на ключови фрази с моделиране на тема', 'da': 'Salience Rank: Effektiv nøglesætning udtrækning med emne modellering', 'nl': 'Salience Rank: Efficiënte sleutelzin extractie met topic modelling', 'hr': 'Pozor Salience: učinkovito izvlačenje ključne fraze sa modelima teme', 'ko': '현저성 등급: 주제 모델링을 바탕으로 하는 유효한 키워드 추출', 'de': 'Salience Rank: Effiziente Keyphrasen Extraktion mit Topic Modeling', 'sw': 'Mchoro wa Salience: Utoa Mtazamo wa Tamko na Maudhui', 'id': 'Rank Salience: Ekstraksi Frasa Kunci Efisien dengan Modeling Topik', 'sq': 'Rrjedha e shfrytëzimit: Ekstraktim efikas i frazës kyçe me modelimin e temave', 'fa': 'Rank Salience: اخراج کلید کاری با مدل موضوع', 'hy': 'Արձակման դասակարգ: Աֆեկցիոնալ Հիմնական արտահայտություն թեմայի մոդելավորման օգնությամբ', 'am': 'Salience Rank: Efficient Keyphrase Extraction with Topic Modeling', 'tr': 'Taýdalyk', 'bn': 'স্যালিসেন্স র\u200d্যাঙ্ক: বিষয় মোডেলিং দ্বারা কার্যকর কীব্যাপ্ট্রেকশন', 'bs': 'Pozor Salience: Efikasna izvlačenja ključne fraze sa modelima teme', 'ca': 'Range de salut: Extracció eficient de frases clau amb modelar tòpics', 'et': 'Salience Rank: Tõhus võtmerfraasi ekstraheerimine teema modelleerimisega', 'af': 'Saliens Rank: Effektiewe sleutelfrase uitpak met onderwerp Modelering', 'cs': 'Pořadí výsledků: Efektivní extrakce klíčových frází s modelováním témat', 'az': 'S톛f톛rl톛nm톛 s톛viyy톛si: Mevzu Modell톛nm톛si il톛 effektiv Keyphrase', 'fi': 'Salience Rank: Tehokas avainlauseen poisto aiheen mallinnuksella', 'jv': 'Quit message"), "quitmsg', 'he': 'טווח משחרר: יציאה יעילה של משפט מפתח עם מודל נושא', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učinkovito ekstrakcijo ključnih fraz z modeliranjem teme', 'bo': 'Salience Rank: ནུས་ཅན་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རིས་མ་དབྱིབས་བྱེད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) uses latent topic distribution inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents. The ranking procedure consists of running PageRank K times, where K is the number of topics used in the LDA model. In this paper, we propose a modification of TPR, called Salience Rank. Salience Rank only needs to run PageRank once and extracts comparable or better keyphrases on benchmark datasets. In addition to quality and efficiency benefit, our method has the flexibility to extract keyphrases with varying tradeoffs between topic specificity and corpus specificity.', 'ar': 'يستخدم نظام ترتيب الصفحات الموضعي (TPR) توزيع الموضوعات الكامنة المستنتج من تخصيص Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) لأداء ترتيب العبارات الاسمية المستخرجة من المستندات. يتكون إجراء الترتيب من تشغيل PageRank K مرات ، حيث K هو عدد الموضوعات المستخدمة في نموذج LDA. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تعديل TPR ، يسمى Salience Rank. يحتاج Salience Rank فقط إلى تشغيل PageRank مرة واحدة واستخراج عبارات مفاتيح قابلة للمقارنة أو أفضل على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية. بالإضافة إلى مزايا الجودة والكفاءة ، تتميز طريقتنا بالمرونة لاستخراج العبارات الرئيسية مع المفاضلات المتفاوتة بين خصوصية الموضوع وخصوصية المجموعة.', 'fr': "Topical PageRank (TPR) utilise la distribution de sujets latents déduite par l'allocation Dirichlet latente (LDA) pour effectuer le classement des phrases nominales extraites de documents. La procédure de classement consiste à exécuter le PageRank K fois, où K est le nombre de sujets utilisés dans le modèle LDA. Dans cet article, nous proposons une modification du TPR, appelée Salience Rank. Salience Rank n'a besoin d'exécuter PageRank qu'une seule fois et extrait des phrases clés comparables ou meilleures sur des ensembles de données de référence. En plus d'offrir des avantages en termes de qualité et d'efficacité, notre méthode permet d'extraire des phrases clés avec différents compromis entre la spécificité du sujet et la spécificité du corpus.", 'pt': 'O Topical PageRank (TPR) usa a distribuição de tópicos latentes inferida pela Alocação de Dirichlet Latente (LDA) para realizar a classificação de frases nominais extraídas de documentos. O procedimento de classificação consiste em executar o PageRank K vezes, onde K é o número de tópicos utilizados no modelo LDA. Neste artigo, propomos uma modificação do TPR, chamada Salience Rank. O Salience Rank só precisa executar o PageRank uma vez e extrai frases-chave comparáveis ou melhores em conjuntos de dados de referência. Além do benefício de qualidade e eficiência, nosso método tem a flexibilidade de extrair frases-chave com diferentes compensações entre especificidade do tópico e especificidade do corpus.', 'es': 'El PageRank tópico (TPR) utiliza la distribución de temas latentes inferida por la asignación de Dirichlet latente (LDA) para realizar la clasificación de frases nominales extraídas de los documentos. El procedimiento de clasificación consiste en ejecutar PageRank K veces, donde K es el número de temas utilizados en el modelo LDA. En este artículo, proponemos una modificación del TPR, llamada Rango de prominencia. El rango de prominencia solo necesita ejecutar PageRank una vez y extrae frases clave comparables o mejores en los conjuntos de datos de referencia. Además del beneficio de calidad y eficiencia, nuestro método tiene la flexibilidad de extraer frases clave con diferentes compensaciones entre la especificidad del tema y la especificidad del corpus.', 'ja': 'Topical PageRank （ TPR ）は、Latent Dirichlet Allocation （ LDA ）によって推測される潜在的なトピック分布を使用して、文書から抽出された名詞句のランキングを実行します。ランキング手順は、PageRank Kを実行することで構成され、KはLDAモデルで使用されるトピックの数です。本稿では、Salience Rankと呼ばれるTPRの修正を提案する。Salience Rankは、PageRankを一度だけ実行し、ベンチマークデータセット上の同等またはそれ以上のキーフレーズを抽出する必要があります。品質と効率のメリットに加えて、当社の方法は、トピック固有性とコーパス固有性の間のさまざまなトレードオフでキーフレーズを抽出する柔軟性があります。', 'hi': 'सामयिक पेजरैंक (TPR) अव्यक्त Dirichlet आवंटन (LDA) द्वारा अनुमानित अव्यक्त विषय वितरण का उपयोग करता है ताकि दस्तावेज़ों से निकाले गए संज्ञा वाक्यांशों की रैंकिंग का प्रदर्शन किया जा सके। रैंकिंग प्रक्रिया में पेजरैंक के बार चलाना शामिल है, जहां K LDA मॉडल में उपयोग किए जाने वाले विषयों की संख्या है। इस पेपर में, हम टीपीआर के एक संशोधन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे सेलींस रैंक कहा जाता है। लचीलापन रैंक को केवल एक बार पेजरैंक चलाने की आवश्यकता होती है और बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर तुलनीय या बेहतर कीफ्रेज़ निकालता है। गुणवत्ता और दक्षता लाभ के अलावा, हमारी विधि में विषय विशिष्टता और कॉर्पस विशिष्टता के बीच अलग-अलग ट्रेडऑफ के साथ कीफ्रेज़ निकालने का लचीलापन है।', 'zh': '太题 PageRank (TPR) 用由潜于狄利克雷分 (LDA) 推断者,于主题分布对文档中提取名词短语排名。 名行 PageRank K 次, K LDA 主题数也。 本文中,TPR改,谓之显著性等。 显著性排名止行一 PageRank ,并于基准数集上取可较善要短语。 质效率之外,吾道有灵活性,可以取要短语,特异性、语料库特异性之间异权也。', 'ru': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) использует распределение скрытых тем, выведенное с помощью Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA), для ранжирования именных фраз, извлеченных из документов. Процедура ранжирования состоит из выполнения PageRank K раз, где K - количество топиков, используемых в модели LDA. В этой статье мы предлагаем модификацию TPR, называемую Salience Rank. Salience Rank нужно запустить PageRank только один раз и извлечь сопоставимые или лучшие ключевые фразы из эталонных наборов данных. В дополнение к преимуществам качества и эффективности, наш метод обладает гибкостью для извлечения ключевых фраз с различными компромиссами между специфичностью темы и специфичностью корпуса.', 'ga': 'Úsáideann Topaic PageRank (TPR) dáileadh topaicí folaigh tátal a bhaint as Leithdháileadh Folaigh Dirichlet (LDA) chun rangú a dhéanamh ar nathanna ainmfhocail a bhaintear as doiciméid. Is éard atá sa nós imeachta rangú ná amanna PageRank K a rith, áit a bhfuil K líon na dtopaicí a úsáidtear sa tsamhail LDA. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modhnú ar TPR, ar a dtugtar Salience Rank. Ní gá ach le Salience Rank PageRank a rith uair amháin agus bainfidh sé eochairfhrásaí inchomparáide nó níos fearr ar thacair sonraí tagarmhairc. Chomh maith le leas cáilíochta agus éifeachtúlachta, tá an tsolúbthacht ag ár modh chun eochairfhrásaí a bhaint as a bhfuil malairtí éagsúla idir sainiúlacht topaicí agus sainiúlacht an chorpais.', 'ka': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) გამოყენება latent topic distribution, inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) for performing ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents. პროცექტის პროცექტი იქნება PageRank K ჯერ, სადაც K არის LDA მოდელში გამოიყენებული ტემების რაოდენობა. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში TPR-ის შეცვლა, სახელი Salience Rank. Salience Rank უნდა მხოლოდ PageRank- ს ერთხელ გამოყენება და გამოყენება სწორედ ან უკეთესი კლავიფრაზები ბენქმარკის მონაცემების შესახებ. კვალეტური და ეფექტიური გამოსახულებას დამატებით, ჩვენი მეთოდის განსხვავებული კლავიფრაზების განსხვავება ტემიკის განსახულება და კორპუსს განსახულება აქვს.', 'el': 'Η Τάξη Τοπικής PageRank (TPR) χρησιμοποιεί λανθάνουσα κατανομή θεμάτων που συνάγεται από την κατανομή λανθάνοντος Dirichlet (LDA) για να εκτελέσει την κατάταξη των ουσιαστικών φράσεων που εξάγονται από έγγραφα. Η διαδικασία κατάταξης αποτελείται από την εκτέλεση των χρόνων PageRank K, όπου Κ είναι ο αριθμός των θεμάτων που χρησιμοποιούνται στο μοντέλο LDA. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια τροποποίηση του TPR, που ονομάζεται Κατάταξη Salience. Η Κατάταξη Salice χρειάζεται μόνο να εκτελεί το PageRank μία φορά και να εξάγει συγκρίσιμες ή καλύτερες φράσεις κλειδιά σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς. Εκτός από το όφελος ποιότητας και αποδοτικότητας, η μέθοδος μας έχει την ευελιξία να εξάγει βασικές φράσεις με ποικίλες διαφορές μεταξύ της ειδικότητας του θέματος και της ειδικότητας του σώματος.', 'hu': 'A Topical PageRank (TPR) a Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) által következtetett látens téma eloszlást használja a dokumentumokból kivont főnévkifejezések rangsorolásához. A rangsorolási eljárás a PageRank K-szeres futtatásából áll, ahol K az LDA modellben használt témák száma. Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk a TPR módosítását, melynek neve Salience Rank. A Salience Rank-nak csak egyszer kell futtatnia a PageRank-ot, és összehasonlítható vagy jobb kulcskifejezéseket kell kivonnia a benchmark adatkészleteken. A minőségi és hatékonysági előnyök mellett módszerünk rugalmassággal rendelkezik a kulcskifejezések kivonására, amelyek különböző kompromisszumokkal rendelkeznek a téma specificitása és a corpus specificitása között.', 'it': "Topical PageRank (TPR) utilizza la distribuzione latente degli argomenti dedotta da Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) per eseguire la classificazione delle frasi di sostantivi estratte dai documenti. La procedura di ranking consiste nell'esecuzione di PageRank K volte, dove K è il numero di argomenti utilizzati nel modello LDA. In questo articolo, proponiamo una modifica del TPR, chiamata Salience Rank. Salience Rank deve eseguire PageRank una sola volta ed estrae frasi chiave comparabili o migliori sui set di dati di benchmark. Oltre ai vantaggi di qualità ed efficienza, il nostro metodo ha la flessibilità di estrarre frasi chiave con diversi compromessi tra specificità tematica e specificità del corpo.", 'mk': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) користи latent topic distribution inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents. Процедурата на рангирање се состои од извршување на PageRank K времиња, каде K е бројот на теми кои се користат во LDA моделот. Во овој весник предложуваме модификација на ТПР, наречена Салејс Ранк. Salience Rank only needs to run PageRank once and extracts comparable or better keyphrases on benchmark datasets.  Покрај квалитетната и ефикасната корист, нашиот метод има флексибилност за извлекување клучни фрази со различни разлики помеѓу специфичноста на темата и специфичноста на телото.', 'lt': 'Teminis PageRank (TPR) naudojamas latentinis teminis pasiskirstymas pagal Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) atliekant iš dokumentų ištrauktų vardinių frazių klasifikavimą. Klasifikavimo procedūrą sudaro vykdomas PageRank K laikas, kai K yra MTA modelyje naudojamų temų skaičius. Šiame dokumente siūlome pakeisti TPR, vadinamą Salience Rank. Salience Rank turi atlikti PageRank tik vieną kartą ir ištraukti panašias arba geresnes pagrindines frazes lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Be kokybės ir efektyvumo naudos, mūsų metodas turi lankstumą išbraukti pagrindines frazes, kuriose skiriasi teminės specifikos ir korpuso specifiškumo kompromisai.', 'kk': 'Нақыштағы PageRank (TPR) құжаттан тартылған атаулық фразтарды сақтау үшін Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) таратылған latent нақышты үлестірімін қолданады. Орналастыру процедуры - жегілген PageRank K уақыттары, бұл жерде K LDA үлгісінде қолданылатын нақыштар саны болады. Бұл қағазда, Салиенс Ренк деп аталатын TPR-ді өзгерту үшін таңдаймыз. Salience Rank тек PageRank- ты бір рет орындау керек және салыстырылатын немесе жақсы перне сөздерді бағыттау деректер қорларында шығару керек. Қасиеттік және эффективнік пайдаланушының қосымша, әдіміздің көмегімен тақырыптардың тәсілдігі мен корпус тәсілдігі арасындағы әртүрлі тәртіпсіздіктерді тарқату', 'ms': 'Rank Halaman Topik (TPR) menggunakan distribusi topik tersembunyi yang disimpulkan oleh Allokasi Latent Dirichlet (LDA) untuk melakukan rangkaian frasa nama yang dikekstrak dari dokumen. Prosedur peringkat terdiri daripada menjalankan PageRank K kali, di mana K adalah bilangan topik yang digunakan dalam model LDA. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan perubahan TPR, dipanggil Salience Rank. Rank Salience hanya perlu menjalankan Rank Halaman sekali dan mengekstrak frasa kunci yang sama atau lebih baik pada set data tanda rujukan. Selain keuntungan kualiti dan efisiensi, kaedah kita mempunyai fleksibiliti untuk mengekstrak frasa kunci dengan perbezaan perbezaan antara spesifik topik dan spesifik korpus.', 'mt': 'PageRank Topiku (TPR) juża distribuzzjoni topika moħbija inferita mill-Allokazzjoni Latent Dirichlet (LDA) biex iwettaq klassifikazzjoni ta’ frażijiet nominali estratti mid-dokumenti. Il-proċedura ta’ klassifikazzjoni tikkonsisti f’ħinijiet ta’ PageRank K li jitħaddmu, fejn K huwa n-numru ta’ suġġetti użati fil-mudell LDA. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu modifika tat-TPR, imsejħa Salience Rank. Salience Rank jeħtieġ li jmexxi PageRank darba biss u joħroġ frażijiet ewlenin komparabbli jew aħjar fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza. Minbarra l-benefiċċju tal-kwalità u l-effiċjenza, il-metodu tagħna għandu l-flessibbiltà li jeżerċita frażijiet ewlenin b’kompromessi differenti bejn l-ispeċifiċità tas-suġġett u l-ispeċifiċità tal-korpus.', 'pl': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) wykorzystuje ukrytą dystrybucję tematów wywnioskowaną przez Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) do wykonywania rankingu zwrotów rzeczowników wyodrębnionych z dokumentów. Procedura rankingowa polega na uruchomieniu PageRank K razy, gdzie K to liczba tematów użytych w modelu LDA. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy modyfikację TPR, zwaną Salience Rank. Salience Rank musi uruchomić PageRank tylko raz i wyodrębnić porównywalne lub lepsze frazy kluczowe na zbiorach danych referencyjnych. Oprócz korzyści jakościowych i efektywnych, nasza metoda ma elastyczność w wydobyciu fraz kluczowych o różnych kompromisach między specyfiką tematu a specyfiką korpusu.', 'no': 'Topptekstrank (TPR) brukar latent emneformasjon gjeven av Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) for å utføra rekningar av namnefrassar ut frå dokument. Rendering-prosessen inneheld av køyrande PageRank K gangar, der K er talet på emne som vert brukt i LDA-modellen. I denne papiret foreslår vi endring av TPR, kalla Salience Rank. Salience Rank treng berre køyra PageRank ein gong og pakka ut samanlikbar eller bedre nøkkelfrasar på benchmarkdatasett. I tillegg til kvaliteten og effektiviteten har metoden vårt fleksibilitet for å pakka ut nøkkelfraser med ulike uttrykk mellom temaspesifikasjonen og korpusspesifikasjonen.', 'mn': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) use latent topic distribution to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from document. Цахилгаан процедур нь PageRank K удаа ажилладаг. K нь LDA загварын хэрэглэгдсэн сэдвүүдийн тоо юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Салиенс Ранк гэдэг TPR-ын өөрчлөлтийг санал болгож байна. Salience Rank зөвхөн PageRank-г нэг удаа ажиллаж, банкмарк өгөгдлийн санд харьцуулах эсвэл илүү сайн түлхүүр өгөгдлийг гаргах хэрэгтэй. Манай арга нь сэдвийн тодорхойлолт болон корпус тодорхойлолт хоорондын өөр өөр худалдааны тухай түлхүүр өгүүлбэр гаргах боломжтой.', 'sr': 'Topični PageRank (TPR) koristi latentnu raspodjelu teme infekcije Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) kako bi izvršili ranking imenskih fraza izvedenih iz dokumenta. Postupak reda se sastoji od trčanja PageRank K puta, gde K je broj tema korištenih u modelu LDA. U ovom papiru predlažemo modifikaciju TPR-a zvanog Saliens Rank. Salience Rank mora samo jednom pokrenuti PageRank i izvući usporednu ili bolju ključnu frazu na setima podataka o kriteriji. Uz korist kvalitete i efikasnosti, naša metoda ima fleksibilnost da izvučemo ključne rečenice sa različitim trgovinama između specifičnosti teme i specifičnosti korpusa.', 'ro': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) utilizează distribuția topică latentă dedusă de Allocarea Latent Dirichlet (LDA) pentru a efectua clasificarea frazelor substantive extrase din documente. Procedura de clasament constă în rularea PageRank K ori, unde K este numărul de subiecte utilizate în modelul LDA. În această lucrare, propunem o modificare a TPR, numită Salience Rank. Salience Rank trebuie să ruleze PageRank o singură dată și extrage fraze cheie comparabile sau mai bune pe seturile de date de referință. Pe lângă beneficiile calității și eficienței, metoda noastră are flexibilitatea de a extrage fraze cheie cu diferite compromisuri între specificul subiectului și specificul corpului.', 'si': 'විශේෂ පේජරැන්ක් (TPR) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ලටෙන්ට් ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂ විතරය, ලටෙන්ට් ඩිරිච්ලෙට් අලෝකේෂණය (LDA) නිර්මාණය ප්\u200dරමාණ පද්ධතියේ පේජ් රැන්ක් K වතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, කොහෙද K තමයි LDA මොඩේල් වල භාවිතා කරප මේ පත්තරේ අපි TPR ගැන වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන්, සැලීන්ස් රැන්ක් කියලා. සැලීන්ස් රැන්ක් පේජ් රැන්ක් එක පාරක් විතරයි විතරයි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ නැහැ හොඳ යතු ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය සහ හැකිරීමත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමඟ, අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් තියෙනවා වෙනස් විදියට විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් ස', 'so': 'Topical PageRank Xiliga safka waxaa ka mid ah sida loo soconayo PageRank K marar, meesha ay K tahay tirada maadooyinka lagu isticmaalayo modelka LDA. Warqadan waxan ku qoran, waxaan soo jeedaynaa beddelinta TPR ee la yidhaahdo Salience Rank. Jardiinooyinka badbaadada waxaa loo baahan yahay in uu mar shaqeeyo PageRank iyo in uu soo bixiyo hadal u eg ama si wanaagsan oo ku qoran sawirada benchmark. Kaalmada qiimaha iyo waxyaabaha waxqabadka waxaa dheer in qaababkayagu ay leedahay dhaqdhaqaaqnimo ka soo bixinta erayada furayaasha oo ku kala duduwan fardooyin kala duduwan oo ku saabsan gaar ah mada iyo cudurada.', 'ml': 'പൊതുവായ പേജ് റാങ്ക് (TPR) ലാറ്റെന്റ് ഡിറിച്ചില്ലെറ്റ് അംഗീകരിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത പ്രഭാഷണം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു റാങ്ങിംഗ് പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d പേജ് റാങ്ക് കെ തവണ ഓടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. എല്\u200dഡി മോഡലില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിഷയങ്ങളുടെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടിപിഎം എന്നൊരു മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. സാലിസന്\u200d റാങ്ക് ഒരിക്കല്\u200d പേജ് റാങ്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കേണ്ടി വരുന്നത് മാത്രമാണ്. ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ ഗുണവും ഫലവും ഉപകാരവും കൂടാതെ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കീവ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസ', 'sv': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) använder latent ämnesfördelning som härleds av Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) för att utföra rangordning av substantivfraser som extraheras från dokument. Rankningsproceduren består av att köra PageRank K gånger, där K är antalet ämnen som används i LDA-modellen. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ändring av TPR, kallad Salience Rank. Salience Rank behöver bara köra PageRank en gång och extraherar jämförbara eller bättre nyckelfraser i jämförelsedataset. Förutom kvalitets- och effektivitetsnytta har vår metod flexibiliteten att extrahera nyckelfraser med varierande avvägningar mellan ämnesspecificitet och korpusspecificitet.', 'ta': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) uses latent topic distribution inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents.  The ranking process consists of PageRank K times running, where K is the number of topics in the LDA model used. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சாலியன் ராங் என்ற TPR என்ற ஒரு மாற்றுதலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். பென்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் ஒப்பிட்ட அல்லது சிறந்த விசைப்பலகை சொற்றொடர்களை மட்டும் பேஜ்ரான்க் இயக்க வேண்டு தரம் மற்றும் செயல்பாட்டின் பயன்பாடு', 'ur': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) uses latent topic distribution provided by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents. رینگ پردازی پیج Rank K بار چلتی ہے، جہاں K LDA موڈل میں استعمال ہونے والی موضوع کی تعداد ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک تغییر کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، سلینس رنک۔ سالینس رنک صرف ایک بار PageRank کو چلنے کی ضرورت ہے اور بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر مثالی یا اچھی کیفریز نکالنے کی ضرورت ہے. کیفیت اور فعالیت کے فائدہ کے علاوہ، ہمارے طریقے کے لئے کیفی فریزوں کو مختلف تردیفوں کے ساتھ نکالنے کے لئے بہت اضافہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Topical PageRank (TPR) uses latent topic distribution inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents.  Name Bu hujjatda, Salience Rank deb nomlangan TPR'ni o'zgartirishni davom qilamiz. Name Uskuna va effektlik foydalanishidan foydalanishimiz mumkin, bizning usuli mavzu hususiyati va bogʻliq xususiyatlarni ajratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'The Topical PageRank (TPR) dùng các phân phối chuyên môn tiềm ẩn do Latent Dirichhlet Allocation (LDAP) để thực hiện xếp hạng các đoạn văn bản chiết xuất từ tài liệu. Thứ hạng có bao gồm chạy thời gian của trang Rank K, nơi K là số các chủ đề được dùng trong mô hình LDAP. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị thay đổi PR, là Salinace Rank. Điểm cao chỉ cần chạy Trang núi Rank một lần và rút ra các cụm từ đáng chú ý hơn hoặc những cụm từ khác trên tập tin tiêu chuẩn. Bên cạnh chất lượng và hiệu quả, phương pháp của chúng ta có sự linh hoạt để trích dẫn các cụm từ khoá có sự khác nhau giữa đặc tính chủ đề và đặc tính cơ thể.', 'hr': 'Topični PageRank (TPR) koristi latentnu raspodjelu teme zaraženu Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) kako bi izvršili ranking imenskih fraza izvučenih iz dokumenta. Postupak reda se sastoji od trčanja PageRank K puta, gdje K je broj tema korištenih u modelu LDA. U ovom papiru predlažemo izmjenu TPR-a, zvanog Salience Rank. Salience Rank mora samo jednom pokrenuti PageRank i izvući usporedbene ili bolje ključne fraze na bazama podataka o referenciji. Uz korist kvalitete i učinkovitosti, naš metod ima fleksibilnost izvlačenja ključnih fraza s različitim trgovinskim odnosima između specifičnosti teme i specifičnosti korpusa.', 'nl': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) maakt gebruik van latente topic distributie afgeleid door Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) om rangschikking uit zelfstandige frases uit documenten uit te voeren. De rankingprocedure bestaat uit het uitvoeren van PageRank K tijden, waarbij K het aantal onderwerpen is dat wordt gebruikt in het LDA model. In dit artikel stellen we een wijziging van TPR voor, genaamd Salience Rank. Salience Rank hoeft PageRank slechts één keer uit te voeren en haalt vergelijkbare of betere sleutelzinnen uit benchmarkdatasets. Naast het voordeel van kwaliteit en efficiëntie, heeft onze methode de flexibiliteit om sleutelzinnen te extraheren met verschillende compromissen tussen topic specificity en corpusspecificity.', 'bg': 'Тематичната страница (TPR) използва латентно разпределение на темите, извлечено от латентното разпределение на дириклета (LDA), за да извърши класиране на съществителни фрази, извлечени от документи. Процедурата за класиране се състои в изпълнение на К пъти, където К е броят на темите, използвани в модела. В тази статия предлагаме модификация на ТПР, наречена Salience Rank. Трябва да стартирате само веднъж и да извлечете сравними или по-добри ключови фрази в сравнителните набори от данни. В допълнение към качеството и ефективността, нашият метод има гъвкавостта да извлича ключови фрази с различни компромиси между тематичната специфичност и корпусната специфичност.', 'de': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) verwendet latente Topic Distribution, die von Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) abgeleitet wird, um das Ranking von Nomen Phrasen durchzuführen, die aus Dokumenten extrahiert wurden. Das Rankingverfahren besteht aus der Ausführung von PageRank K-Zeiten, wobei K die Anzahl der Themen ist, die im LDA-Modell verwendet werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Modifikation des TPR vor, genannt Salience Rank. Salience Rank muss PageRank nur einmal ausführen und extrahiert vergleichbare oder bessere Keyphrasen aus Benchmark-Datensätzen. Neben Qualitäts- und Effizienzvorteilen bietet unsere Methode die Flexibilität, Schlüsselphrasen mit unterschiedlichen Kompromissen zwischen Themenspezifität und Korpusspezifität zu extrahieren.', 'ko': '테마 PageRank(TPR)는 잠재적 Dirichlet 할당(LDA)으로 추정되는 잠재적 테마 분포를 사용하여 문서에서 추출한 명사 구문을 정렬합니다.랭킹 과정에는 PageRank K 회 실행이 포함되며 여기서 K는 LDA 모델에 사용된 테마 수입니다.본 문서에서 TPR을 개선한 것을 현저성 등급이라고 부른다.Salience Rank는 PageRank를 한 번만 실행하고 기준 데이터 세트에서 비교할 수 있거나 더 좋은 키워드를 추출합니다.품질과 효율의 장점을 제외하고 우리의 방법은 관건적인 단어를 유연하게 추출하고 주제의 특이성과 자료 라이브러리의 특이성 사이에 서로 다른 평가를 할 수 있다.', 'id': 'PageRank Topikal (TPR) menggunakan distribusi topik latent yang disusulkan oleh Allokasi Latent Dirichlet (LDA) untuk melakukan rangkaian frasa bernama yang diekstraksi dari dokumen. Prosedur peringkat terdiri dari menjalankan PageRank K kali, di mana K adalah jumlah topik yang digunakan dalam model LDA. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan modifikasi TPR, disebut Salience Rank. Salience Rank hanya perlu menjalankan PageRank sekali dan mengekstrak frasa kunci yang dapat dibandingkan atau lebih baik pada set data benchmark. Selain keuntungan kualitas dan efisiensi, metode kita memiliki fleksibilitas untuk mengekstrak frasa kunci dengan perbedaan perbedaan antara spesifik topik dan spesifik tubuh.', 'sw': 'PageRank (TPR) inatumia usambazaji wa mada ya hivi karibuni uliotumiwa na Umoja wa Dirichlet (LDA) kutengeneza rangi ya maneno yasiyo ya maandishi yaliyotolewa kutoka kwenye nyaraka. Mpango wa rangi unajumuisha kuendesha PageRank mara K, ambapo K ni idadi ya mada zinazotumiwa katika model ya LDA. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mabadiliko ya TPR, inayoitwa Salience Rank. Shambulio la Salience Rank linahitaji tu kuendesha PageRank mara moja na kutengeneza maneno yanayofananisha au bora kwenye seti za benchmark. Zaidi ya faida ya ubora na ufanisi, mbinu yetu ina ufanisi wa kutengeneza maneno yanayochanganyika kwa njia tofauti kati ya mada hususani na utaalam.', 'da': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) bruger latent emnefordeling udledt af Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) til at udføre rangering af substantivsætninger udvundet fra dokumenter. Rankingproceduren består af at køre PageRank K gange, hvor K er antallet af emner, der anvendes i LDA modellen. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ændring af TPR, kaldet Salience Rank. Salience Rank behøver kun at køre PageRank én gang og udtrækker sammenlignelige eller bedre nøglesætninger på benchmark datasæt. Ud over kvalitets- og effektivitetsfordele har vores metode fleksibilitet til at udtrække nøglesætninger med varierende afvigelser mellem emnespecificitet og corpus specificitet.', 'fa': 'PageRank (TPR) از تقسیم موضوع latent که توسط تقسیم Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) آزاد شده است استفاده می\u200cکند تا پایه\u200cبندی از جمله\u200cهای نامی که از سند خارج شده\u200cاند انجام دهد. پرداخت رشته\u200cبندی از راه\u200cاندازی PageRank K زمان است که K تعداد موضوع استفاده شده در مدل LDA است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تغییر TPR به نام سالینس رنک. Rank Salience فقط یک بار لازم است که PageRank را اجرا کند و جمله\u200cهای کلید مقایسه یا بهتر در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ابزار استخراج کند. در اضافه به سود کیفیت و موثرت، روش ما قابلیت flexibility دارد تا کلمه\u200cهای کلید را با تغییر تجارت بین ویژه\u200cهای موضوع و ویژه\u200cهای کورپوس خارج کند.', 'sq': 'PageRank Topical (TPR) përdor shpërndarjen e temës së fshehtë të përfshirë nga Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) për të kryer renditjen e frazave emërore të nxjerra nga dokumentet. Procedura e renditjes përbëhet nga vrasja e PageRank K herë, ku K është numri i temave të përdorura në model in LDA. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një modifikim të TPR, të quajtur Salience Rank. Salience Rank ka nevojë vetëm për të drejtuar PageRank një herë dhe nxjerr fraza kyçe të krahasueshme apo më të mira në grupet e të dhënave referenciale. Përveç përfitimit të cilësisë dhe efektshmërisë, metoda jonë ka fleksibilitetin për të nxjerrë frazat kyçe me kompromise të ndryshme midis specificitetit të temës dhe specificitetit të trupit.', 'am': 'የጦማሪያው ገጾች (TPR) ከሰነዶች የተወጡትን የንጹሕ ቃላትን ለመፈለግ የሚጠቅመውን አዲስ ጉዳይ አካባቢ (LDA) ይጠቅማል። በ LDA ሞዴል ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ ጉዳዮች ቁጥር K እንደሆነ የደረጃው ጉዳይ ቁጥር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ሳሊስ ሬንክ የሚባል የTPR ማሻሻሻል እናስባለን፡፡ ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s ከጥሩ እና ጥቅም በቀር፣ ሥርዓታችን የቁልፎችን ንግግሮች በተለየ የጭምር ውጤት እና የቆርፓስ ግንኙነት መካከል የተለየ የንግግር ግንኙነትን ለማውጣት አካባቢ አለበት፡፡', 'hy': 'Թոպիկ էջRank (TՊR) օգտագործում է թաքնված թեմայի տարածումը, որի արդյունքում հետևում է Վերջին դիրիկլետի տարածումը (ԼԴԱ) փաստաթղթերից դուրս բերված անվանումների դասակարգում կատարելու համար: Դախտավորման գործընթացը կազմված է կատարելով Դախտավորման K անգամ, որտեղ K-ն այն թեմաների քանակն է, որոնք օգտագործվում են ԼԴԱ մոդելի մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք փոփոխել ԹՊՌ-ը, որը կոչվում է "Սալենսի դասարան": Կարիք ունի միայն մեկ անգամ աշխատել էջը և վերցնել համեմատական կամ ավելի լավ բառեր համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերում: Ավելին որակի և արդյունավետության շահույթին, մեր մեթոդն ունի ճկունություն հանելու հիմնական արտահայտությունները թեմայի մասնավորության և մարմնի մասնավորության տարբեր հակամարտությունների միջև:', 'tr': 'Meňzeş sahypalar Diňe gabdaly procedurda PageRank K gezek guralýar, nirede K LDA nusgynda ullanylýan temler sany bar. Bu kagyzda Salience Rank adyndaky TPR üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris. Salinsiýa Rank diňe PageRank-y bir gezek ýöredip, benchmark veri setirlerinde döredilebilir ýa-da gowy keyfrazleri çykarmak gerek. Görnöşimiz we täsirli faydalarymyzdan daşary, biziň metodamyz açylyk sözlerimizi tema görnüşi we korpus aýratynyň arasynda dürli sözlerimizi açmak üçin howpsyzlygymyz bar.', 'az': 'Topic PageRank (TPR) Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) tarafından dağıtılan latent tema dağıtımı belələrdən çıxarılan ismi sözlərin səviyyəsini yerinə yetirmək üçün istifadə edir. Sərgə prosedüsü, K ə LDA modelində kullanılan məsələlərin sayısı olan PageRank K dəfələrindəndir. Bu kağızda Salience Rank adlı TPR dəyişikliyini təklif edirik. Salience Rank yalnız bir dəfə PageRank çalışması lazımdır və benchmark veri qurğularının üstündə qarşılaşılabilir və yaxşı anahtar sözlərini çıxarması lazımdır. Qıymetlik və etkilik faydalarına həmçinin, məsələmiz məsələlər və korpus məsələləri arasında müxtəlif ticarətlər ilə açmaq üçün fleksibiliyyətimiz var.', 'af': "Topiese PageRank (TPR) gebruik latente onderwerp verspreiding wat deur Latent Dirichlet Allocation Die rangering prosedure bestaan van hardloop PageRank K maal, waar K is die nommer van onderwerpe gebruik word in die LDA model. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n verandering van TPR, genoem Salience Rank. Salience Rank benodig slegs na hardloop PageRank een keer en uitpak vergelykbare of beter sleutelfrase op benchmark datastelle. In addition to quality and efficiency benefit, our method has the flexibility to extract keyphrases with varying tradeoffs between topic specificity and corpus specificity.", 'ca': "PageRank tòpic (TPR) utilitza la distribució tòpica latent inferida per Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) per fer la classificació de frases de nom extraïdes dels documents. El procediment de classificació consisteix en executar PageRank K vegades, on K és el nombre de temes utilitzats en el model LDA. En aquest article, proposem una modificació del TPR, anomenat Salience Rank. Salience Rank only needs to run PageRank once and extracts comparable or better keyphrases on benchmark datasets.  A més del benefici de qualitat i eficiència, el nostre mètode té la flexibilitat d'extrair frases clau amb diferents compromisos entre l'especificitat del tema i l'especificitat del cos.", 'bs': 'Topični PageRank (TPR) koristi latentnu raspodjelu teme infekcije Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) kako bi izvršili ranking imenskih fraza izvučenih iz dokumenta. Postupak reda se sastoji od trčanja PageRank K puta, gdje K je broj tema korištenih u modelu LDA. U ovom papiru predlažemo modifikaciju TPR-a zvanog Salience Rank. Salience Rank mora samo jednom pokrenuti PageRank i izvući usporedbene ili bolje ključne fraze na bazama podataka. Uz korist kvalitete i učinkovitosti, naša metoda ima fleksibilnost da izvučemo ključne fraze sa različitim trgovinom između specifičnosti teme i specifičnosti korpusa.', 'et': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) kasutab latentset teemajaotust, mille järeldab Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) dokumentidest ekstraheeritud nimisõnafraaside järjestamiseks. Järjestamisprotseduur hõlmab PageRank K korda, kus K on LDA mudelis kasutatavate teemade arv. Käesolevas töös pakume välja TPR modifikatsiooni, mida nimetatakse Salience Rank. Salience Rank peab käivitama PageRanki ainult üks kord ja ekstraheerima võrdlusandmekogumitest võrreldavaid või paremaid märksõnu. Lisaks kvaliteedile ja tõhususele on meie meetodil paindlik väljavõte teemaspetsiifilisuse ja korpuse spetsiifilisuse vahel erinevate kompromissidega.', 'bn': 'বিষয় পেজর্যাঙ্ক (TPR) ল্যাটেন্ট ডিরিচেলেট অ্যালাকশন (LDA) আক্রান্ত বিষয় বিতরণ ব্যবহার করে নথিপত্র থেকে উৎপাদন করা নিষ্কার বাক্যের রেঙ র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং প্রক্রিয়া পেজর্যাঙ্ক কে বার চালানোর মধ্যে রয়েছে, যেখানে কে এলডিএ মডেলে ব্যবহৃত বিষয়ের সংখ্যা। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা টিপিআরএ-এর পরিবর্তন প্রস্তাব করছি, যার নাম স্যালিয়েস র\u200d্যাঙ্ক। স্যালেন্স র\u200d্যাঙ্ক শুধুমাত্র একবার পেজর্যাঙ্ক চালানো দরকার এবং বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে তুলনামূলক অথবা ভালো কীব মান এবং কার্যকলাপের সুবিধা ছাড়াও, আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের বিশেষ বিশেষ বিশেষ বিষয় এবং কোর্পাসের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্', 'cs': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) používá latentní distribuci témat odvozené Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) k provedení řazení podstatných frází extrahovaných z dokumentů. Postup hodnocení spočívá v spuštění PageRank K krát, kde K je počet témat použitých v LDA modelu. V tomto článku navrhujeme modifikaci TPR nazvanou Salience Rank. Salience Rank musí spustit PageRank pouze jednou a extrahovat srovnatelné nebo lepší klíčové fráze z referenčních datových sad. Kromě přínosu kvality a efektivity má naše metoda flexibilitu extrahovat klíčové fráze s různými kompromisy mezi specificitou tématu a specificitou korpusu.', 'fi': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) käyttää latenttia aihejakaumaa, jonka Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) päättelee dokumenteista poimittujen substantiivilausumien luokitteluun. Sijoitusmenettely koostuu PageRank K -ajan ajamisesta, jossa K on LDA-mallissa käytettyjen aiheiden määrä. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme TPR:n muuttamista, nimeltään Salience Rank. Salience Rank tarvitsee suorittaa PageRank vain kerran ja poimia vertailukelpoisia tai parempia avainlauseita vertailuaineistoista. Laatu- ja tehokkuushyötyjen lisäksi menetelmässämme on joustavuutta poimia avainlauseita erilaisilla kompromisseilla aihespesifisyyden ja korpusspesifisyyden välillä.', 'jv': 'Subject Page erank Perintah sing dipunanggé gambar pagerank K usul, wong K kuwi nggawe tema sing usul ning model LTA. Nang pepul iki, kita mudhun kanggo ngerwih-nyeteraké, kang T-Pri, jeneng Aliance rank. Sarnce rank mengko iso ngubah pagerank sembarang lan mpuapakan karo bebas-seneng dadi-seneng bench. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'PageRank נושאי (TPR) משתמש בפיתוח נושאי חסוי שהוציא על ידי פיצוי Dirichlet Latent (LDA) כדי לבצע את הדרגה של משפטים בשם שנוצאים ממסמכים. הליך הדרגה כולל פעמים K של PageRank, שבו K הוא מספר הנושאים המשתמשים במודל LDA. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שינוי של TPR, שנקרא Salience Rank. Salience Rank צריך לרוץ PageRank רק פעם אחת ומוציא משפטים מפתחים שווים או טובים יותר על קבוצות נתונים רמז. בנוסף לטובת איכות ויעילות, לשיטתנו יש הגמישות לחלץ משפטים מפתחיים עם תחליפים שונים בין ספציפיות נושאית לבין ספציפיות גופוס.', 'ha': "Rank (TPR) yana amfani da rabon madaidaici na nan da aka haɗa shi na Latent Dirikle Allocation (LDA) dõmin ya yi ranar rubutun da ba'a samu'in da aka fito daga takardun. Farawa da aka ranar da aka ƙunsa da tafiyar da PageRank K sauti, inda K yana da yawan maɓalli wanda aka yi amfani da cikin shirin LDA. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata musarin TPR wanda ake kiran Saline Rank. Rank na Salistan na kamata kawai da ya tafiyar da PageRank guda ɗaya kuma ya sami sauran maɓallin da ke daidaita ko da mafi kyaun maɓallin da ke kan danne-tsari. Babu amfani da nau'in da fassarar, hanyoyinmu yana da muhimmi wa ka fitar da maɓallin ayuka da wasu fariyyar dabam-dabam tsakanin maɓallin da ƙayyade maɓallin.", 'sk': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) uporablja latentno porazdelitev teme, ki jo sklepa Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA), za izvajanje razvrščanja samostalniških stavkov, pridobljenih iz dokumentov. Postopek razvrščanja je sestavljen iz izvajanja PageRank K krat, kjer je K število tem, ki se uporabljajo v modelu LDA. V tem prispevku predlagamo spremembo TPR, imenovano Salience Rank. Salience Rank mora zagnati PageRank samo enkrat in izvleči primerljive ali boljše ključne fraze na referenčnih naborih podatkov. Poleg kakovosti in učinkovitosti ima naša metoda tudi fleksibilnost izvlečevanja ključnih fraz z različnimi kompromisi med tematsko specifičnostjo in korpusno specifičnostjo.', 'bo': 'Topical PageRank (TPR) uses latent topic distribution inferred by Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to perform ranking of noun phrases extracted from documents. རིམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲུབ་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་གཡོག་བཀོལ་བའི་PageRank K དུས་ཚོད། K ནི་LDA མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་གྲངས ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ TPR(Salience Rank)ཡི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། Salience Rank ཡིས་PageRank་གཅིག་ལས་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་གཙོ་ཚིག་ཚིག་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གཙོ་བོ་དང་ལས་སྐྱོན་རུང་བའི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་ཚིག་རྣམས་ནང་འདྲེན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་མ་ཟད།'}
{'en': 'List-only Entity Linking', 'ar': 'ربط الكيان بالقائمة فقط', 'fr': "Liaison d'entités avec liste uniquement", 'pt': 'Vinculação de entidades somente para lista', 'es': 'Vinculación de entidades solo de lista', 'ja': 'リストのみのエンティティリンク', 'zh': '唯列实体链接', 'hi': 'केवल-सूची निकाय लिंकिंग', 'ru': 'Связывание сущностей только со списком', 'ga': 'Nascáil Aonáin Liosta amháin', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ სია ელემენტის დაკავშირება', 'el': 'Σύνδεση οντότητας μόνο λίστας', 'hu': 'Csak listázó szervezetek összekapcsolása', 'it': 'Collegamento di entità di sola lista', 'kk': 'Тек нысандарды тізімдеу', 'lt': 'Tik sąrašo subjektų susiejimas', 'mk': 'Поврзување на ентитети само за листата', 'ms': 'Pautan Entiti Senarai-sahaja', 'mt': 'Linking ta’ Entità b’Lista biss', 'ml': 'പട്ടികയില്\u200d മാത്രം എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ്', 'mn': 'Зөвхөн элементийн холбоо', 'pl': 'Połączenie jednostek tylko z listą', 'sr': 'Povezivanje jedinih pojedinaca na listi', 'no': 'Berre listelenking', 'ro': 'Legătura entităților numai listă', 'si': 'ලැයිස්තුවක් විතරයි අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'Liiska-xiriirka ganacsiga oo kaliya', 'sv': 'Länkning av enbart listade enheter', 'ta': 'பட்டியலில் மட்டும் உள்ளீடு இணைப்பு', 'ur': 'صرف اینٹیٹی لینک', 'uz': 'BogĘ»lamalar roĘ»yxati', 'vi': 'Chỉ danh sách liên kết', 'da': 'Listekonkning af enheder', 'bg': 'Свързване само със списък на обекти', 'hr': 'Povezivanje jedinica na listi', 'de': 'Nur listenbezogene Entitätenverknüpfung', 'id': 'Hubungan Entitas Hanya Daftar', 'nl': 'Alleen lijst-entiteitenkoppeling', 'fa': 'ارتباط تنها عنصر فهرست', 'tr': 'Diňe Ehli Baglaýyşy Liste', 'sw': 'Kiungo cha Ujumbe pekee katika orodha', 'ko': '엔티티 링크만 나열됩니다.', 'sq': 'Lidhja e njësisë me listë të vetme', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Միայն ցուցակի անհատականության կապ', 'af': 'Lys- slegs Entiteit Linking', 'az': 'Fayl', 'bn': 'শুধুমাত্র এন্টিটি লিংকিং', 'bs': 'Povezivanje jedinica na listi', 'cs': 'Propojení entit pouze se seznamem', 'et': 'Ainult nimekirjaga üksuste linkimine', 'ca': "Enllaç d'entitats només amb llista", 'fi': 'Luetteloon perustuva kokonaisuuksien linkitys', 'ha': 'Banner page', 'he': 'קישור יחידות רשימה בלבד', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Povezovanje entitet samo na seznamu', 'bo': 'ཐོ་འགོད་བྱེད་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཁོ་ན'}
{'en': 'Traditional Entity Linking (EL) technologies rely on rich structures and properties in the target knowledge base (KB). However, in many applications, the KB may be as simple and sparse as lists of names of the same type (e.g., lists of products). We call it as List-only Entity Linking problem. Fortunately, some mentions may have more cues for linking, which can be used as seed mentions to bridge other mentions and the uninformative entities. In this work, we select most linkable mentions as seed mentions and disambiguate other mentions by comparing them with the seed mentions rather than directly with the entities. Our experiments on linking mentions to seven automatically mined lists show promising results and demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'ar': 'تعتمد تقنيات ربط الكيانات التقليدية (EL) على الهياكل والخصائص الغنية في قاعدة المعرفة المستهدفة (KB). ومع ذلك ، في العديد من التطبيقات ، قد تكون قاعدة المعارف بسيطة ومتفرقة مثل قوائم الأسماء من نفس النوع (على سبيل المثال ، قوائم المنتجات). نحن نسميها مشكلة ربط الكيان بالقائمة فقط. لحسن الحظ ، قد تحتوي بعض الإشارات على المزيد من الإشارات للربط ، والتي يمكن استخدامها كبذرة مذكورة لجسر الإشارات الأخرى والكيانات غير المعلوماتية. في هذا العمل ، نختار الإشارات الأكثر ارتباطًا كما ذكرت البذور ونزيل الغموض عن الإشارات الأخرى من خلال مقارنتها مع الإشارات الأولية بدلاً من الكيانات مباشرةً. تُظهر تجاربنا على ربط الإشارات بسبع قوائم مُلغومة تلقائيًا نتائج واعدة وتوضح فعالية نهجنا.', 'es': 'Las tecnologías tradicionales de Entity Linking (EL) se basan en estructuras y propiedades ricas en la base de conocimientos (KB) objetivo. Sin embargo, en muchas aplicaciones, la base de conocimiento puede ser tan simple y escasa como las listas de nombres del mismo tipo (por ejemplo, listas de productos). Lo llamamos problema de enlace de entidades de solo lista. Afortunadamente, algunas menciones pueden tener más señales para vincular, que pueden usarse como menciones iniciales para unir otras menciones y las entidades poco informativas. En este trabajo, seleccionamos la mayoría de las menciones enlazables como menciones iniciales y eliminamos la ambigüedad de otras menciones comparándolas con las menciones iniciales en lugar de directamente con las entidades. Nuestros experimentos sobre la vinculación de menciones a siete listas extraídas automáticamente muestran resultados prometedores y demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque.', 'fr': "Les technologies traditionnelles de liaison d'entité (EL) s'appuient sur des structures et des propriétés riches dans la base de connaissances cible (KB). Cependant, dans de nombreuses applications, la base de connaissances peut être aussi simple et clairsemée que des listes de noms du même type (par exemple, des listes de produits). Nous l'appelons problème List-only Entity Linking. Heureusement, certaines mentions peuvent avoir plus de repères pour les liens, qui peuvent être utilisés comme mentions de départ pour relier d'autres mentions et les entités non informatives. Dans ce travail, nous sélectionnons la plupart des mentions pouvant être liées en tant que mentions de départ et désambiguïdisons les autres mentions en les comparant aux mentions de départ plutôt que directement avec les entités. Nos expériences sur la liaison de mentions à sept listes extraites automatiquement montrent des résultats prometteurs et démontrent l'efficacité de notre approche.", 'pt': 'As tecnologias tradicionais de Entity Linking (EL) dependem de estruturas e propriedades ricas na base de conhecimento (KB) de destino. No entanto, em muitas aplicações, a KB pode ser tão simples e esparsa quanto listas de nomes do mesmo tipo (por exemplo, listas de produtos). Chamamos isso de problema de vinculação de entidades somente de lista. Felizmente, algumas menções podem ter mais dicas para vinculação, que podem ser usadas como menções iniciais para conectar outras menções e as entidades não informativas. Neste trabalho, selecionamos as menções mais vinculáveis como menções semente e desambiguamos outras menções comparando-as com as menções semente ao invés de diretamente com as entidades. Nossos experimentos em vincular menções a sete listas extraídas automaticamente mostram resultados promissores e demonstram a eficácia de nossa abordagem.', 'ja': '従来のエンティティリンク（ EL ）テクノロジーは、ターゲットナレッジベース（ KB ）の豊富な構造とプロパティに依存しています。しかしながら、多くの用途において、ＫＢは、同じタイプの名前のリスト（例えば、製品のリスト）と同様に単純でまばらであり得る。これをリストのみのエンティティリンクの問題と呼びます。幸いなことに、いくつかの言及には、リンクするためのより多くの手がかりがあるかもしれません。これは、他の言及と非情報的なエンティティを橋渡しするためのシード言及として使用することができます。この作業では、最もリンク可能なメンションをシードメンションとして選択し、エンティティと直接比較するのではなく、シードメンションと比較することによって、他のメンションを曖昧さを解消します。メンションを7つの自動的に採掘されたリストにリンクする実験は、有望な結果を示し、私たちのアプローチの有効性を示しています。', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक एंटिटी लिंकिंग (EL) प्रौद्योगिकियां लक्ष्य नॉलेज बेस (KB) में रिच संरचनाओं और गुणों पर निर्भर करती हैं. हालांकि, कई अनुप्रयोगों में, KB एक ही प्रकार के नामों की सूचियों के रूप में सरल और विरल हो सकता है (उदाहरण के लिए, उत्पादों की सूची)। हम इसे केवल-सूची निकाय लिंकिंग समस्या के रूप में कॉल करते हैं। सौभाग्य से, कुछ उल्लेखों में जोड़ने के लिए अधिक संकेत हो सकते हैं, जिनका उपयोग अन्य उल्लेखों और असूचनात्मक संस्थाओं को पुल करने के लिए बीज के उल्लेख के रूप में किया जा सकता है। इस काम में, हम बीज उल्लेख के रूप में सबसे linkable उल्लेख का चयन करें और उन्हें सीधे संस्थाओं के साथ के बजाय बीज उल्लेख के साथ तुलना करके अन्य उल्लेख disambiguate. सात स्वचालित रूप से खनन की गई सूचियों में उल्लेखों को जोड़ने पर हमारे प्रयोग आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाते हैं और हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Традиционные технологии связывания сущностей (EL) опираются на богатые структуры и свойства в целевой базе знаний (КБ). Тем не менее, во многих приложениях КБ может быть таким же простым и редким, как списки названий одного типа (например, списки продуктов). Мы называем это проблемой связывания сущностей только со списком. К счастью, некоторые упоминания могут иметь больше подсказок для связывания, которые могут быть использованы в качестве упоминаний семян для соединения других упоминаний и неинформативных сущностей. В этой работе мы выбираем наиболее связные упоминания в качестве упоминаний семян и устраняем двусмысленность других упоминаний, сравнивая их с упоминаниями семян, а не непосредственно с сущностями. Наши эксперименты по увязке упоминаний с семью автоматически заминированными списками показывают многообещающие результаты и демонстрируют эффективность нашего подхода.', 'zh': '古之实体链接 (EL) 术赖于知识库 (KB) 之富者也。 然众应用程序之中,知识库得与同类(名,)同简疏。 臣谓列实体链接。 幸有更多链接线索,可以为种子提及,以桥接他提及无信息实体。 于此之事,多择链接以为种者,校之而非直实以消其歧义也。 吾将及链接七自掘列表者实验见有愿,以验其有效性。', 'ga': 'Braitheann teicneolaíochtaí Traidisiúnta Nascála Aonáin (EL) ar struchtúir agus ar airíonna saibhre sa spriocbhonn eolais (KB). I go leor feidhmchlár, áfach, féadfaidh an KB a bheith chomh simplí agus chomh tearc le liostaí ainmneacha den chineál céanna (m.sh., liostaí táirgí). Glaoimid uirthi mar fhadhb Nascála Aonáin Liosta-amháin. Ar ámharaí an tsaoil, d’fhéadfadh go mbeadh níos mó leideanna ag roinnt tagairtí maidir le nascadh, ar féidir iad a úsáid mar shíolta a lua chun tagairtí eile agus na heintitis neamhfhaisnéiseacha a líonadh. Sa saothar seo, roghnaímid an chuid is mó de na tagairtí innasctha mar lua síolta agus déanaimid dí-athbhrí ar lua eile trí iad a chur i gcomparáid leis na tagairtí síolta seachas go díreach leis na heintitis. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh maidir le tagairtí a nascadh le seacht liosta a dhéantar go huathoibríoch iad, torthaí dóchasacha agus léiríonn siad éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige.', 'ka': 'ტექნოლოგიები ტრადიციონალური Entity Linking (EL) ტექნოლოგიები უფრო დიდი სტრუქტურებით და მნიშვნელობების მიხედვით უცნობის ბაზაში (KB). მაგრამ, ბევრი პროგრამებში KB შეიძლება იგივე ტიპის სახელებების სია (მაგალითად, პროგრამების სია). ჩვენ ამას მივუხედავთ, როგორც მხოლოდ სია ინტერტის კონფიგურაციის პრობლემა. ზოგიერთი ამბობები შეიძლება იყოს უფრო მეტი მინიშვნები, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება, რომელიც სხვა ამბობები და სხვა ინფორმატიური ინტერტიები. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ყველაზე შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსხვავება და განსხვავება სხვა შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსხვავება, არ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომელსაც ჩვენი დაკავშირება, აღმოჩნდება შვიდი ავტომატურად მინირებული ლისტებით, რომელიც ჩვენი დაკავშირება გვეუბნება', 'hu': 'A hagyományos Entity Linking (EL) technológiák gazdag struktúrákra és tulajdonságokra támaszkodnak a célbázisban (KB). Sok alkalmazásban azonban a KB ugyanolyan egyszerű és ritka lehet, mint az azonos típusú nevek listái (pl. terméklisták). Úgy hívjuk, hogy lista-csak entitás összekapcsolás probléma. Szerencsére néhány említésnek több utalása lehet a linkelésre, amelyeket vetőemlítésként használhatunk, hogy áthidalják más említéseket és az információtlan entitásokat. Ebben a munkában a legtöbb összekapcsolható említést vetőmag említésként választjuk ki, és egyértelműsítjük más említéseket úgy, hogy összehasonlítjuk őket a vetőmag említésekkel, mint közvetlenül az entitásokkal. Az említések hét automatikusan bányászott listához való összekapcsolására irányuló kísérleteink ígéretes eredményeket mutatnak, és bizonyítják megközelítésünk hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Οι παραδοσιακές τεχνολογίες σύνδεσης οντοτήτων (ΕΛ) βασίζονται σε πλούσιες δομές και ιδιότητες στη βάση γνώσεων στόχων (ΚΒ). Ωστόσο, σε πολλές εφαρμογές, η ΚΒ μπορεί να είναι τόσο απλή και σπάνια όσο οι λίστες ονομάτων του ίδιου τύπου (π.χ. λίστες προϊόντων). Το ονομάζουμε πρόβλημα σύνδεσης οντοτήτων μόνο λίστας. Ευτυχώς, κάποιες αναφορές μπορεί να έχουν περισσότερες ενδείξεις για τη σύνδεση, οι οποίες μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν ως αναφορές για να γεφυρώσουν άλλες αναφορές και τις μη πληροφοριακές οντότητες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επιλέγουμε τις πιο συνδεδεμένες αναφορές ως αναφορές σπόρων και αποσαφηνίζουμε άλλες αναφορές συγκρίνοντάς τις με τις αναφορές σπόρων και όχι απευθείας με τις οντότητες. Τα πειράματά μας για τη σύνδεση αναφορών σε επτά αυτόματα εξορυγμένες λίστες δείχνουν πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα και αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας.', 'it': "Le tecnologie tradizionali di Entity Linking (EL) si basano su strutture e proprietà ricche nella base di conoscenze target (KB). Tuttavia, in molte applicazioni, la KB può essere semplice e sparsa come elenchi di nomi dello stesso tipo (ad esempio elenchi di prodotti). Lo chiamiamo problema di collegamento di entità solo lista. Fortunatamente, alcune menzioni possono avere più indizi per il collegamento, che possono essere usati come menzioni di seme per collegare altre menzioni e le entità non informative. In questo lavoro, selezioniamo la maggior parte delle menzioni collegabili come menzioni di seme e disambiguamo altre menzioni confrontandole con le menzioni di seme piuttosto che direttamente con le entità. I nostri esperimenti sul collegamento delle menzioni a sette liste estratte automaticamente mostrano risultati promettenti e dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio.", 'kk': 'Тәдімгі нысандарды сілтемелеу (EL) технологиялары мақсатты білім негізінде бағатты құрылғылар мен қасиеттеріне тәуелді. Бірақ көп қолданбаларда КБ бір түрлі атаулар тізімі (мысалы, продукттардың тізімі) сияқты қарапайым болуы мүмкін. Біз оны тек тізімдегі нысандарды сілтемелеу мәселесі деп аталамыз. Кейбір жағдайда сілтемелер үшін бірнеше белгілер болуы мүмкін. Бұл басқа жазбаларды және мәлімет бермейтін нысандарды көшірмелеу үшін қолданылады. Бұл жұмыстың көбірек сілтемелерін таңдап, басқа сөйлемелерді тікелей бірліктермен салыстырып, бағдарламаларды салыстыруға болады. Біздің тәжірибеміз жеті автоматты түрде бейімделген тізімдерге жазылады. Біздің тәжірибеміздің әсер етілігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Tradicinių subjektų ryšių technologijos grindžiamos turtingomis struktūromis ir savybėmis tikslinėje žinių bazėje (KB). Tačiau daugelyje paraiškų KB gali būti toks pat paprastas ir mažas kaip tos pačios rūšies pavadinimų sąrašai (pvz., produktų sąrašai). Mes tai vadiname tik sąrašo subjektų susiejimo problema. Laimei, kai kurie paminėjimai gali turėti daugiau požymių susieti, kurie gali būti naudojami kaip sėklos paminėjimai prisijungti prie kitų paminėjimų ir neinformacinių subjektų. Šiame darbe, palygindami juos su sėklos paminėjimais, o ne tiesiogiai su subjektais, pasirinksime labiausiai susietas paminėjimus kaip sėklos paminėjimus ir išaiškiname kitas paminėjimus. Mūsų eksperimentai, susiję su septyniais automatiškai iškrautais sąrašais, rodo pažadus rezultatus ir rodo mūsų požiūrio veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Технологиите за поврзување на традиционалните ентитети (ЕЛ) зависат од богатите структури и сопствености во базата на знаење на целта (КБ). Сепак, во многу апликации, КБ може да биде едноставна и мала колку листите на имиња од истиот тип (на пример, листите на производи). Го нарекуваме проблем со поврзувањето на ентитетите само на листата. За среќа, некои спомени можеби имаат повеќе траги за поврзување, кои може да се користат како спомени за семе за мостот на други спомени и неинформативните ентитети. Во оваа работа, ги избираме најповрзаните спомени како спомени за семето и ги раздвојуваме другите спомени споменувајќи ги со спомените за семето наместо директно со ентитетите. Нашите експерименти за поврзување на спомените со седум автоматски минирани листи покажуваат ветувачки резултати и ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашиот пристап.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിംഗ് (EL) സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള പണിയു എന്നാലും പലതും പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d കെബിയില്\u200d ഒരേ തരം പേരുകളുടെ പട്ടികയായി എളുപ്പമായിരിക്കാം (ഉദാഹരണമായ ഉല്\u200dപാദികളുടെ പട്ടിക) നമ്മള്\u200d അതിനെ ലിസ്റ്റി മാത്രം ലിങ്ങിങ് പ്രശ്നമായി വിളിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, കുറച്ചു പേരുകള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതലായിരിക്കാം, അത് വിത്തുകളുടെ  ഈ പ്രവൃത്തിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വിത്തുകളുടെ പേരുകളായി ഏറ്റവും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പേരുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നു. വിത്തുകളുടെ പേരില്\u200d നേരിട നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഏഴു സ്വയമായി മൈന്\u200d ലിസ്റ്റുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത', 'mt': 'Traditional Entity Linking (EL) technologies rely on rich structures and properties in the target knowledge base (KB).  Madankollu, f’ħafna applikazzjonijiet, il-KB jista’ jkun sempliċi u ftit daqs listi ta’ ismijiet tal-istess tip (pereżempju listi ta’ prodotti). Aħna nsemmuha bħala problema ta’ rabta bejn Entitajiet b’Lista biss. Fortunatament, xi menzjonijiet jista’ jkollhom aktar sinjali ta’ rabta, li jistgħu jintużaw bħala semmiet taż-żerriegħa biex jgħaqqdu semmiet oħra u entitajiet mhux informattivi. F’din il-ħidma, aħna nagħżlu l-aktar semmiet li jistgħu jintrabtu bħala semmiet taż-żerriegħa u niżżambigaw semmiet oħra billi nqabbluhom mas-semmiet taż-żerriegħa aktar milli direttament mal-entitajiet. L-esperimenti tagħna dwar ir-rabta tas-semmiet ma’ seba’ listi awtomatikament minjiera juru riżultati promettenti u juru l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna.', 'ms': 'Teknologi Pautan Entiti Tradisional (EL) bergantung pada struktur dan ciri-ciri kaya dalam pangkalan pengetahuan sasaran (KB). Namun, dalam banyak aplikasi, KB mungkin sederhana dan jarang seperti senarai nama jenis yang sama (cth., senarai produk). Kami menyebutnya sebagai masalah Pautan Entiti Senarai-sahaja. Untungnya, beberapa sebutan mungkin mempunyai lebih banyak tanda untuk menyambung, yang boleh digunakan sebagai sebutan benih untuk menyambung sebutan lain dan entiti yang tidak informatif. Dalam kerja ini, kami memilih sebutan yang paling boleh dihubungkan sebagai sebutan benih dan nyahgunakan sebutan lain dengan membandingkannya dengan sebutan benih daripada secara langsung dengan entiti. Eksperimen kami mengenai menghubungkan sebutan ke tujuh senarai tambang secara automatik menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji dan menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan kami.', 'mn': 'Ууламжлалт Entity Linking (EL) технологи нь зорилготой мэдлэг суурь (КБ) дээр баян бүтэц болон өөрийн чадвартай байдаг. Гэвч олон программын хувьд КБ нь ижил төрлийн нэрлүүдийн жагсаалт (жишээ нь, бүтээгдэхүүний жагсаалт) шиг энгийн бөгөөд хамаагүй байж болно. Бид үүнийг зөвхөн жагсаалтын нэгж холбоотой асуудал гэж нэрлэдэг. Харамсалтай нь зарим хэлэлцээнд холбогдох илүү олон тэмдэгт байж болно. Энэ нь бусад хэлэлцээг, мэдээлэл боловсруулагүй байгууллагуудыг дамжуулахад ашиглаж болно. Энэ ажил дээр бид ихэнх холбогдолтой хэлэлцээг тарианы хэлэлцээг, бусад хэлэлцээг нь зөвхөн тарианы хэлэлцээгээр харьцуулахаар сонгож байна. Бидний холбогдох туршилтууд 7 автоматически сүүрсэн жагсаалт нь амлалтай үр дүнг харуулж, бидний ойлголтын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjne technologie Entity Linking (EL) opierają się na bogatych strukturach i właściwościach w docelowej bazie wiedzy (KB). Jednak w wielu zastosowaniach KB może być tak proste i rzadkie, jak listy nazw tego samego typu (np. listy produktów). Nazywamy to problemem łączenia jednostek tylko listy. Na szczęście niektóre wzmianki mogą mieć więcej wskazówek do linkowania, które mogą być wykorzystane jako wzmianki seed, aby połączyć inne wzmianki i jednostki nieinformacyjne. W niniejszej pracy wybieramy najbardziej łączące się wzmianki jako wzmianki nasienne i rozdzielamy inne wzmianki porównując je z wzmiankami nasiennymi, a nie bezpośrednio z podmiotami. Nasze eksperymenty dotyczące łączenia wzmianek do siedmiu automatycznie wydobywanych list pokazują obiecujące rezultaty i demonstrują skuteczność naszego podejścia.', 'ro': 'Tehnologiile tradiționale de legătură a entităților (EL) se bazează pe structuri și proprietăți bogate în baza de cunoștințe țintă (KB). Cu toate acestea, în multe aplicații, KB poate fi la fel de simplă și rară ca liste de nume de același tip (de exemplu, liste de produse). Noi o numim "Problemă de conectare a entităţilor numai listă". Din fericire, unele mențiuni pot avea mai multe indicii pentru conectare, care pot fi folosite ca mențiuni de semințe pentru a lega alte mențiuni și entități neinformative. În această lucrare, selectăm cele mai multe mențiuni legate ca mențiuni de sămânță și dezambiguizăm alte mențiuni prin compararea lor cu mențiunile de sămânță mai degrabă decât direct cu entitățile. Experimentele noastre privind conectarea mențiunilor la șapte liste extrase automat arată rezultate promițătoare și demonstrează eficiența abordării noastre.', 'no': 'Tradisjonale enhetslenking (EL) teknologiar brukar på rike struktur og eigenskapar i målkunnskapsbasen (KB). I mange program kan imidlertid KB vera så enkle og sparke som lista over namn på det same type (f.eks. lister over produktar). Vi kallar det som problem med lenkje på ulike element i lista. For godt, nokre oppgjevnader kan ha fleire merknader for å kopla til lenkje, som kan brukast som frømengde for å bryta andre oppgjevnader og dei uformative einingane. I denne arbeiden vel vi dei fleste tilknytbare menyar som frømenyar og avslå andre menyar ved å sammenligne dei med frømenyar i staden for direkte med entitetene. Eksperimentane våre på å kopla til syv automatisk minerte lister viser promiserende resultat og demonstrerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt.', 'sr': 'Tradicionalne tehnologije povezivanja entiteta (EL) oslanjaju se na bogate strukture i vlasništvo u ciljnoj bazi znanja (KB). Međutim, u mnogim aplikacijama, KB može biti jednostavan i rezervan kao popis imena iste vrste (npr. popis proizvoda). Zovemo ga kao problem sa povezivanjem jedinica sa listom. Srećom, neki spominji mogu imati više znakova za povezivanje, koje se mogu iskoristiti kao sjemenje spominjanje za ponašanje drugih spomena i neoinformativnih entitata. U ovom poslu, odaberemo najpovezanije spominjanja kao spominjanja semena i disambigujemo druge spominjanje uspoređujući ih sa spominjanjem semena umjesto direktno sa entitetima. Naši eksperimenti o povezivanju spominju sedam automatskih rudnih listi pokazuju obećavajuće rezultate i pokazuju učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'so': 'Teknolojiyada xiriirka ganacsiga caadiga ah (EL) waxay ku xiran yihiin dhismaha hodanka ah iyo hantidiisa aasaaska aqoonta (KB). Si kastaba ha ahaatee codsiga badan KB wuxuu noqon karaa sida fudud oo u sahlan sida magacyo isku mid ah (tusaale ahaan liiska waxyaabaha). Waxaynu ugu magacaabnaa dhibaatada xiriirka ganacsiga ee List-only Nasiib weyn waxaa laga yaabaa in la xiriiro macluumaad badan, taas oo looga isticmaali karo si ay u xafidaan macluumaadyo kale iyo waxyaabaha aan la aqoon karin. Shaqadan ayaannu u dooranaynaa macluumaad aad u xiran sida magaca abuurista oo aan kala duwanayno magacyo kale oo aan si toos ah ula dhigno xuquuqda abuurka. Imtixaankayada ku xiran karta magacyada todobada liiska si automatic ah loo isticmaalay waxay muujiyaan resultiyada ballanqaadsan oo waxay muujiyaan shaqaalaha qaababkayaga.', 'sv': 'Traditionell Entity Linking-teknik (EL) bygger på rika strukturer och egenskaper i målkunskapsbasen (KB). I många applikationer kan dock KB vara lika enkel och sparsam som listor över namn av samma typ (t.ex. produktlistor). Vi kallar det för List-only Entity Linking problem. Lyckligtvis kan vissa omnämnanden ha fler ledtrådar för länkning, vilket kan användas som fröomnämnanden för att överbrygga andra omnämnanden och de oinformativa entiteterna. I detta arbete väljer vi ut de flesta kopplingsbara omnämnanden som fröomnämnanden och gör andra omnämnanden otvetydiga genom att jämföra dem med fröomnämnanden snarare än direkt med entiteterna. Våra experiment med att länka omnämnanden till sju automatiskt gruvade listor visar lovande resultat och visar hur effektivt vårt tillvägagångssätt är.', 'si': 'පාරමාන්\u200dය අන්තිත්වය ලින්කින් (EL) තාක්ෂණිකාවල් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ඉලක්ෂාත්මක දන්න අධ්\u200dයානය (KB නමුත්, ගොඩක් යුද්ධාවක් වලින්, KB එකම වර්ගයේ නම් ලැයිස්තුවක් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය සහ සුරකුණු වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි ඒක ලැයිස්තුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි කියලා. සතුටුයි, සමහරවිට සමහරවිට සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒක අනිත් සම්බන්ධතාවක්  මේ වැඩේදී, අපි ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා කියන්නේ බිඳු කියලා අනිත් කියලා කියලා අනිත් කියලා කියලා අනිත් ක අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரி உள்ளீட்டு இணைப்பு (EL) தொழில்நுட்பம் இலக்கு அறிவு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பணக்கூடிய அமைப்பு ஆனால், பல பயன்பாடுகளில், KB ஒரே வகையின் பெயர்களின் பட்டியலாக எளிதாகவும் குறைக்கவும் (உதாரணமாக, பொருள்களின் பட்டியல்) நாங்கள் அதை பட்டியல் மட்டுமே உள்ளீடு இணைப்பு பிரச்சனையாக அழைக்கிறோம். அதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, சில குறிப்புகள் இணைப்பதற்கு மேலும் குணிகள் இருக்கலாம், அது விதிமுறை குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்புகளாக பயன்படுத்தப இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பெரும்பாலான இணைப்பு குறிப்புகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் விதிகள் குறிப்புகளாக மற்றும் வேறு குறிப்ப Our experiments on linking mentions to seven automatically mined lists show promising results and demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'ur': 'سنتی اینٹیٹی لینک (EL) ٹیکنالوجی موجود علم بنسس (KB) میں ثروت ساختار اور خصوصی پر اعتماد ہے. However, in many applications, the KB may be as simple and sparse as lists of names of the same type (e.g., products list). ہم اسے صرف لکھی انٹیٹی لینک مشکل بناتے ہیں. خوش شانس، کچھ ذکر ممکن ہے کہ ان کی تعلقات کے لئے زیادہ نشانیاں ملیں، جن کو دوسری ذکر اور غیر معلومات کی تعلقات کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم سب سے زیادہ متصل ہونے والی ذکر کو منتخب کرتے ہیں اور دوسری ذکر کو مٹا دیتے ہیں ان کی ذکر سے بغیر مستقیماً متصل ہونے والی ذکر سے۔ ہماری آزمائش سات مائن لیستوں کے متعلق اتصال ہونے کے ذریعہ سے سات آزمائش کا ذریعہ دکھاتے ہیں اور ہمارے طریقے کے اثرات کو دکھاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Lekin ko'pchilik dasturdagi KB bir xil loyihalar roʻyxati sifatida oddiy va kichik boʻlishi mumkin (m. g. projetlar roʻyxatlari). Biz buni roʻyxatdan faqat bogʻlash muammosi deb ataymiz. Ko'pchilikka, bir necha tadbirlik bilan bog'lash uchun ko'proq xuddi bo'lishi mumkin. Bu bir necha xususiyatlar boshqa xususiyatlarni boshqa suhbatlarni va o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish uchun ishlatiladi. Bu vazida, biz bir necha bog'liq so'zlarni avlod qilamiz va boshqa so'zlarni o'xshash bilan o'xshash qilamiz va o'zgarishlar bilan o'xshash qo'llangan so'zlar bilan boshqa so'zlarni o'zgartirish. Our experiments on linking mentions to seven automatically mined lists show promising results and demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.", 'vi': 'Công nghệ liên kết cấu trúc truyền thống (el) dựa vào các cấu trúc và thuộc tính giàu có trong căn cứ kiến thức đích (KB). Tuy nhiên, trong nhiều ứng dụng, KB có thể đơn giản và thoáng qua như danh sách các loại tên khác nhau (ví dụ như danh sách sản phẩm). Chúng tôi gọi nó là vấn đề liên kết chi nhánh danh sách. May mắn thay, một số đề cập có thể có nhiều manh mối để kết nối, mà có thể được dùng như hạt giống nhắc tới để kết nối các đề cập khác và các thực thể không định dạng. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi chọn những đề cập đầy đủ khách quan nhất khi hạt giống đề cập và chia rẽ các đề cập khác bằng cách so sánh chúng với hạt giống chỉ ra thay vì trực tiếp với thực thể. Những thí nghiệm liên kết với bảy cái danh sách khai thác tự động của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả và hiệu quả của cách tiếp cận.', 'da': 'Traditionel Entity Linking (EL) teknologi er afhængig af rige strukturer og egenskaber i målvidenbasen (KB). I mange applikationer kan KB dog være lige så enkel og sparsom som lister over navne af samme type (f.eks. lister over produkter). Vi kalder det som List-only Entity Linking problem. Heldigvis kan nogle omtaler have flere indikationer til linking, som kan bruges som frøomtaler til at bygge bro over andre omtaler og de uvinformative enheder. I dette arbejde udvælger vi de fleste sammenhængende omtaler som frøomtaler og adskiller andre omtaler ved at sammenligne dem med frøomtaler snarere end direkte med entiteterne. Vores eksperimenter med at knytte omtaler til syv automatisk udvundne lister viser lovende resultater og viser effektiviteten af vores tilgang.', 'bg': 'Традиционните технологии за свързване на субекти разчитат на богати структури и свойства в целевата база от знания (КБ). Въпреки това, в много приложения КБ може да бъде толкова прост и рядък, колкото списъци с имена от един и същ тип (например списъци с продукти). Наричаме го проблем за свързване на обекти само със списък. За щастие, някои споменавания могат да имат повече подсказки за свързване, които могат да се използват като споменавания за семена, за да свързват други споменавания и неинформативните субекти. В тази работа избираме най-свързващите се споменания като споменавания на семена и разграничаваме други споменавания, като ги сравняваме с споменаванията на семена, а не директно с entiтетите. Експериментите ни за свързване на споменавания към седем автоматично извлечени списъка показват обещаващи резултати и демонстрират ефективността на нашия подход.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalne tehnologije povezivanja objekata (EL) oslanjaju se na bogate strukture i svojstva u ciljnoj bazi znanja (KB). Međutim, u mnogim primjenama, KB može biti tako jednostavan i rezervan kao popis imena iste vrste (npr. popis proizvoda). Zovemo ga kao problem povezivanja jedinica na listi. Srećom, neki spominji mogu imati više znakova za povezivanje, koje se mogu koristiti kao sjemenje spominjanje za poništenje drugih spomena i neoinformativnih entitata. U ovom poslu, odaberemo najpovezanije spominjanja kao spominjanja sjemena i disambiguacija drugih spominjanja uspoređujući ih s spominjanjem sjemena umjesto direktno sa entitetima. Naši eksperimenti o povezivanju spominju se na sedam automatski mineralnih popisa pokazuju obećavajuće rezultate i pokazuju učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'de': 'Traditionelle Entity Linking (EL)-Technologien basieren auf reichhaltigen Strukturen und Eigenschaften in der Target Knowledge Base (KB). In vielen Anwendungen kann die KB jedoch so einfach und spärlich sein wie Listen von Namen desselben Typs (z.B. Produktlisten). Wir nennen es als List-only Entity Linking Problem. Glücklicherweise können einige Erwähnungen mehr Hinweise zum Verlinken haben, die als Seed-Erwähnungen verwendet werden können, um andere Erwähnungen und die uninformativen Entitäten zu überbrücken. In dieser Arbeit wählen wir die am meisten verknüpfbaren Erwähnungen als Seed-Erwähnungen aus und erklären andere Erwähnungen, indem wir sie mit den Seed-Erwähnungen anstatt direkt mit den Entitäten vergleichen. Unsere Experimente zur Verknüpfung von Erwähnungen mit sieben automatisch ermittelten Listen zeigen vielversprechende Ergebnisse und zeigen die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes.', 'ko': '목표 지식 라이브러리의 풍부한 실체 지식 구조(지식 라이브러리)에 의존한다.그러나 많은 응용 프로그램에서 지식 라이브러리는 같은 유형의 이름 목록(예를 들어 제품 목록)처럼 간단하고 드물 수 있다.우리는 목록 실체 링크 문제라고 부른다.다행히도, 일부 언급은 더 많은 링크 단서가 있을 수 있으며, 피드 언급으로 다른 언급과 비정보 실체를 연결할 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 가장 연결된 언급을 피드 언급으로 선택하고 피드 언급과 실체와 직접 비교하지 않고 다른 언급의 잘못된 의미를 제거한다.우리는 7개의 자동 발굴 목록에 연결된 실험을 언급하여 희망적인 결과를 나타냈고 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명할 것이다.', 'nl': 'Traditionele Entity Linking (EL)-technologieën zijn gebaseerd op rijke structuren en eigenschappen in de doelkennisbank (KB). In veel toepassingen kan de KB echter net zo eenvoudig en schaars zijn als lijsten met namen van hetzelfde type (bijvoorbeeld lijsten met producten). We noemen het een lijst-only entity linking probleem. Gelukkig kunnen sommige vermeldingen meer aanwijzingen hebben om te linken, die kunnen worden gebruikt als zaadvermeldingen om andere vermeldingen en de niet-informatieve entiteiten te overbruggen. In dit werk selecteren we de meest linkable vermeldingen als zaadvermeldingen en verduidelijken we andere vermeldingen door ze te vergelijken met de zaadvermeldingen in plaats van rechtstreeks met de entiteiten. Onze experimenten met het koppelen van vermeldingen aan zeven automatisch gemine lijsten tonen veelbelovende resultaten en tonen de effectiviteit van onze aanpak aan.', 'id': 'Teknologi Linking Entitas Tradisional (EL) bergantung pada struktur dan properti kaya di markas pengetahuan sasaran (KB). Namun, dalam banyak aplikasi, KB mungkin sederhana dan jarang seperti daftar nama jenis yang sama (contohnya daftar produk). We call it as List-only Entity Linking problem.  Untungnya, beberapa sebutan mungkin memiliki lebih banyak tanda untuk menghubungkan, yang dapat digunakan sebagai sebutan benih untuk jembatan sebutan lain dan entitas tidak informatif. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memilih sebutan yang paling terhubung sebagai sebutan benih dan membatalkan sebutan lain dengan membandingkannya dengan sebutan benih daripada secara langsung dengan entitas. Eksperimen kami mengenai menghubungkan sebutan ke tujuh daftar tambang secara otomatis menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji dan menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kita.', 'tr': 'Däpli Saýlaw Baglaýyş (EL) tehnologiýalary hedef bilgi bazynda baý struktur we hasaplanyň üstine ynanýarlar. Ýöne köp programlerde, KB birnäçe hatlaryň hatlary ýaly basit we seleňsiz bolup biler (meselâ, produktlaryň listleri). Biz ony diňe Liste Entity Baglaýyş meselesi diýip atlandyrýarys. Gynansakda, käbir agzalaryň baglaşmak üçin köp sany kitaplar bolmagy ahmal. Bu ýagdaýyň başga agzalaryň we informasiýasyny köplitmek üçin ulanylýar. Bu işde, esasy taýýarlanabilir agzalary diýip başga agzalary diýip görkezip bilen taýýarlanabilir agzalary saýlaýrys. Biziň bu synagymyz 7 awtomatik mynan listlere söz berýän netijelerimizi görkezýär we golaýymyzyň täsirini görkezýär.', 'fa': 'تکنولوژی\u200cهای متحدی (EL) بر ساختارهای ثروتمند و ویژگی در پایگاه علم هدف (KB) بستگی دارند. با این حال، در بسیاری از کاربردها، KB ممکن است به اندازه فهرست نام\u200cهای یک نوع ساده باشد (مثال فهرست محصولات). ما آن را به عنوان مشکل ارتباط تنها واحد لیست می نامیم. خوشبختانه، بعضی از اشاره\u200cها ممکن است نشانه\u200cهای بیشتری برای ارتباط برقراری داشته باشند که می\u200cتوانند به عنوان دانه\u200cهایی که برای افزایش ذکر\u200cهای دیگر و عناصر غیر اطلاعات استفاده می\u200cشوند. در این کار، بیشترین اشاره\u200cهای متصلی را به عنوان ذکر دانه\u200cها انتخاب می\u200cکنیم و با مقایسه کردن آنها با ذکر\u200cهای دانه\u200cها به جای مستقیم با ذره\u200cهای متصل می\u200cشود. آزمایشات ما در ارتباط به هفت فهرست معدنی خودکار نشان می دهد که نتایج قول می دهد و نشان می دهد که موثرت دسترسی ما را نشان می دهد.', 'sq': 'Teknologjitë tradicionale të lidhjes së njësisë (EL) mbështeten në struktura dhe prona të pasura në bazën e njohurive objektive (KB). Megjithatë, në shumë aplikime, KB mund të jetë aq e thjeshtë dhe e paktë sa listat e emrave të të njëjtit lloj (për shembull listat e produkteve). Ne e quajmë atë si problem i lidhjes së njësisë vetëm në listë. Për fat të mirë, disa përmendime mund të kenë më shumë shenja për lidhjen, të cilat mund të përdoren si përmendime të farës për të kaluar përmendime të tjera dhe njësitë pa informacion. Në këtë punë, ne zgjedhim përmendimet më të lidhura si përmendimet e farës dhe çambiguajmë përmendimet e tjera duke i krahasuar me përmendimet e farës sesa drejtpërdrejt me njësitë. Eksperimentet tona mbi lidhjen e përmendimeve me shtatë listat e minave automatikisht tregojnë rezultate premtuese dhe demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë.', 'am': 'የባሕላዊው የኢንተርት ግንኙነት (EL) ቴክሎጂዎች በአስቃቂው እውቀት መቀመጫዎች እና ባለጠጋ ግንኙነቶች ላይ ይታመናሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች፣ KB እንደ ቀላል እና እንደ same ዓይነት ስም ዝርዝሮች ሊሆን ይችላል (ምሳሌ የፍሬዎች ዝርዝሮች) እንደ ዝርዝር ብቻ የኢትዮጵያ ግንኙነት መከራ እንጠራዋለን፡፡ በብርቱ ነገር፣ አንዳንዶች ማስታወቂያዎች የሚጨምሩ ቁጥሮች ይኖራሉ፣ ይህም ሌሎችን ማስታወሻ እና ያልታወቀውን አካባቢዎች ለመቀላቀል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ አብዛኛውን የዘር ማስታወቂያ እና ከአካባቢሎቹ ጋር ከመተካከል እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ የሰባትን ዝርዝሮች በማስታወቅ ፈተናዎቻችን የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን እና የሥርዓታችንን ጥቅም ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za Kuunganisha Ujadala (EL) zinategemea miundombinu na utajiri katika msingi wa maarifa (KB). Hata hivyo, katika matumizi mengi, KB inaweza kuwa rahisi na kupunguza kama orodha ya majina ya aina hiyo (kwa mfano, orodha ya bidhaa). Tunaita kama tatizo la Ujumbe pekee la Orodha. Kwa bahati nzuri, baadhi ya maneno yanaweza kuwa na viungo vingi, ambavyo vinaweza kutumika kama tajwa za uzazi ili kujenga tajwa nyingine na vifaa vingine ambavyo havijapambulika. Katika kazi hii, tunachagua majina yanayohusiana zaidi kama majina ya kizazi na kutofautisha majina mengine kwa kuwalinganisha na majina ya kizazi badala ya moja kwa moja na vyombo vya habari. Majaribio yetu kuhusu kuunganisha tajwa na orodha saba za madini yanaonyesha matokeo yanayoahidi na kuonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu.', 'hy': "Հավանդական անհատականությունների կապ տեխնոլոգիաները հիմնված են հարուստ կառուցվածքների և հատկությունների վրա նպատակային գիտելիքների հիմքում (ԿԲ). Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ ծրագրերում ԿԲ-ը կարող է լինել նույնքան պարզ և փոքր, որքան նույն տեսակի անունների ցուցակները (օրինակ՝ ապրանքների ցուցակները): Մենք այն անվանում ենք որպես միայն ցուցակի անհատականության կապ խնդիր: Բարեբախտաբար, որոշ նշաններ կարող են ավելի շատ նշաններ ունենալ կապելու համար, որոնք կարող են օգտագործվել որպես նշաններ այլ նշանների և ոչ ինֆորմատիվ միավորների կապելու համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ընտրում ենք ամենակապված նշումները որպես սերմերի նշումներ և բացատրում ենք այլ նշումներ' համեմատելով դրանք սերմերի նշումների հետ, ոչ թե անմիջապես միավորների հետ: Մեր փորձարկումները հիշողությունների կապելու յոթ ավտոմատ հանած ցուցակների հետ ցույց են տալիս խոստացնող արդյունքներ և ցույց են տալիս մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը:", 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহী এন্টিটি লিং প্রযুক্তির প্রযুক্তি টার্গেট জ্ঞানের বেস (কেবি) সমৃদ্ধ কাঠামোর উপর নির্ভর করে। তবে অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে কেবি একই ধরনের নামের তালিকা হিসেবে সাধারণ এবং সংক্রান্ত হতে পারে আমরা এটাকে তালিকা শুধুমাত্র এন্টিটি লিংকিং সমস্যা হিসেবে ডাকি। সৌভাগ্যবশতঃ কিছু উল্লেখ করা যায় যে লিঙ্কের জন্য আরো বেশী কাউকে লিঙ্ক করার জন্য, যা অন্যান্য উল্লেখ এবং অনফরমোটিভাবে ব্র এই কাজে আমরা বৃক্ষের উল্লেখ হিসেবে বেছে নিয়েছি এবং সেগুলোর সাথে সরাসরি বিজ্ঞের উল্লেখের সাথে তুলনা করে অন্যান্য উল্লেখের ম স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত তালিকার সাথে আমাদের উল্লেখের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে প্রতিশ্রুতি', 'ca': "Les tecnologies tradicionals d'enllaç entre entitats (EL) es basan en estructures i propietats riques a la base de coneixement destinada (KB). Però en moltes aplicacions, el KB pot ser tan senzill i escas com llistes de noms del mateix tipus (per exemple, llistes de productes). Ho anomenem problema d'enllaç d'entitats només a la llista. Fortunately, some mentions may have more cues for linking, which can be used as seed mentions to bridge other mentions and the uninformative entities.  En aquest treball, seleccionem les mencions més vinculables com mencions de semilles i desambiguem altres mencions comparant-les amb les mencions de semilles en lloc de directament amb les entitats. Els nostres experiments en enllaçar les mentions amb set llistes automàticament mines mostran resultats prometedors i demostren l'eficacia del nostre enfocament.", 'bs': 'Tradicionalne tehnologije povezivanja objekata (EL) oslanjaju se na bogate strukture i svojstva u ciljnoj bazi znanja (KB). Međutim, u mnogim aplikacijama, KB može biti tako jednostavan i rezervan kao popis imena iste vrste (npr. popis proizvoda). Zovemo ga kao problem povezivanja jedinica sa listom. Srećom, neki spominji mogu imati više znakova za povezivanje, koje se mogu iskoristiti kao sjemenje spominjanje na mostu drugih spomena i neoinformativnih entitata. U ovom poslu, odaberemo najpovezanije spominjanja kao spominjanja semena i disambigujemo druge spominjanje uspoređujući ih sa sjemenom spominjanjem umjesto direktno sa entitetima. Naši eksperimenti o povezivanju spominju se na sedam automatskih rudnih listi pokazuju obećavajuće rezultate i pokazuju učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'af': 'Tradisjoneel Entity Linking (EL) teknologies vertrou op ryke strukture en eienskappe in die doel kennis basis (Kb). Maar in baie toepassings kan die Kb so eenvoudige en spanseer wees as lyste van naams van dieselfde tipe (bv. lyste van produkte). Ons noem dit as Lys- slegs Entiteit Linking Problem. Gelukkig, sommige bepaalde kan meer tekens hê vir verbinding, wat kan gebruik word as saad bepaalde om ander bepaalde en die oninformatiewe entiteite te brui. In hierdie werk, ons kies die mees verkopbare bepaalde as saad bepaalde en ontsammig ander bepaalde deur hulle te vergelyk met die saad bepaalde as direk met die entiteite. Ons eksperimente om te koppel met sewe automaties minerde lyste te wys beloftende resultate en die effektiviteit van ons toegang te wys.', 'cs': 'Tradiční technologie Entity Linking (EL) spoléhají na bohaté struktury a vlastnosti cílové znalostní báze (KB). V mnoha aplikacích však může být KB stejně jednoduchá a řídká jako seznamy názvů stejného typu (např. seznamy produktů). Říkáme tomu problém s propojením entit pouze na seznam. Naštěstí, některé zmínky mohou mít více návodů pro propojení, které lze použít jako semenné zmínky k překlenování dalších zmínek a neinformativních entit. V této práci vybíráme nejvíce propojitelné zmínky jako semenné zmínky a rozšiřujeme další zmínky porovnáním s semennými zmínkami spíše než přímo s entitami. Naše experimenty na propojení zmínek se sedmi automaticky vytěžovanými seznamy ukazují slibné výsledky a demonstrují efektivitu našeho přístupu.', 'et': 'Traditsioonilised üksuste sidumise tehnoloogiad tuginevad sihtteadmistebaasi rikkalikele struktuuridele ja omadustele. Paljudes rakendustes võib KB olla sama lihtne ja hõreda kui sama tüüpi nimede loetelud (nt toodete loetelud). Me nimetame seda nimekirja ainult olemi linkimise probleemiks. Õnneks võib mõnel nimetusel olla rohkem vihjeid seostamiseks, mida saab kasutada seemnemärkidena, et ühendada teisi nimetusi ja mitteinformatiivseid üksusi. Selles töös valime kõige rohkem seostatavaid märkusi seemneteks ja eristame teisi märkusi, võrreldes neid seemnetega, mitte otseselt olemitega. Meie katsed nimetuste sidumisel seitsme automaatselt kaevandatud nimekirjaga näitavad paljulubavaid tulemusi ja näitavad meie lähenemisviisi tõhusust.', 'fi': 'Perinteiset yhteis繹linkitystekniikat (EL) perustuvat kohdetietokannan rikkaisiin rakenteisiin ja ominaisuuksiin. Monissa sovelluksissa tietopankki voi kuitenkin olla yht瓣 yksinkertainen ja harva kuin samantyyppisten nimien luettelot (esim. tuoteluettelot). Kutsumme sit瓣 vain List-only Entity Linking ongelmaksi. Onneksi joissakin maininnoissa voi olla enemm瓣n linkkej瓣, joita voidaan k瓣ytt瓣瓣 siemenmainintoina yhdist瓣m瓣瓣n muita mainintoja ja ep瓣informatiivisia kokonaisuuksia. T瓣ss瓣 ty繹ss瓣 valitaan linkitett瓣vimm瓣t maininnat siemenmaininnoiksi ja erotetaan muut maininnat vertaamalla niit瓣 siemenmainintoihin eik瓣 suoraan entiteetteihin. Kokeemme mainintojen linkitt瓣misest瓣 seitsem瓣瓣n automaattisesti louhittuun listaan ovat lupaavia tuloksia ja osoittavat toimintamme tehokkuuden.', 'az': 'Dənişikli Entity Linking (EL) teknolojiləri məqsəd bilgi üssündə zəngin strukturlarına və xüsusiyyətlərə təvəkkül edirlər. Ancaq çoxlu proqramlarda, KB eyni növlərin adlarının listesi kimi basit və təmiz olar (məsələn, proqramların listesi kimi). Biz bunu "List-only Entity Linking Problemi" adlandırırıq. Necə ki, bəzi məlumatlar bağlamaq üçün daha çox əlamətlər ola bilər, ki bu, digər məlumatları və informatif məlumatları körpənmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Bu işdə, ən çox bağlı sözləri dənələr iddia etdiyi kimi seçir və digər sözləri dənələr ilə müəyyən etdik, bunları dəstə-dəstə istifadə etmək yerinə dənələr ilə qarşılaşdırır. Bizim təcrübələrimiz yeddi avtomatik mayın listlərinə söz verir və bizim tərəfimizin etkinliğini göstərər.', 'jv': 'tab-style Nanging, ning akeh aplikasi sing sampeyan nang kôt nang sampeyan lan mpungan lagi ndelok karo nong sampeyan sing luwih (adil, ndelok karo bendilakon bendilakon). Awak dhéwé nggambar kelompok Entité kanggo Kemerdekaan Perintah Laih, didasah sing menehi akeh pisan banget gak adhil kanggo nggawe jiné, sing bisa ngejarakake winih kanggo nggawe ngubah tindakan liyane sak ngono cah-ingkang ora informasi. Nang iné iki, kéné milih perusahaan langgar sampek winih sing bisa digambut karo perusahaan winih sing bisa dianggawe winih dhéwé uga, nik nguasai perusahaan winih sing bisa dianggawe winih iki luwih apik perusahaan winih. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe aturan kanggo ngerasakno sedhaya miner', 'he': 'טכנולוגיות קישור איגויות מסורתיות (EL) תלויות במבנים ועשירים בבסיס הידע המטרה (KB). בכל אופן, באמצעות שימושים רבים, KB יכול להיות פשוט וחסר כמו רשימות שמות של אותו סוג (למשל רשימות מוצרים). אנחנו קוראים לזה בעיה של קישור יחידות רשימה בלבד. Fortunately, some mentions may have more cues for linking, which can be used as seed mentions to bridge other mentions and the uninformative entities.  בעבודה הזו, אנחנו בוחרים את הזכרונות הכי קשורים כזכרונות זרעים ולהפריע מזכרונות אחרים על ידי השוואה אותם עם הזכרונות הזרעים במקום ישירות עם היחידות. הניסויים שלנו על הקשר הזכרונות לשבעה רשימות מוכרות באופן אוטומטי מראים תוצאות מבטיחות ולהראות את היעילות של הגישה שלנו.', 'sk': 'Tradicionalne tehnologije povezovanja entitet (EL) temeljijo na bogatih strukturah in lastnostih ciljne baze znanja (KB). V številnih aplikacijah pa je KB lahko tako preprost in redk kot seznami imen iste vrste (npr. seznami izdelkov). Temu pravimo problem povezovanja entitet samo seznama. Na srečo imajo nekatere omembe morda več namigov za povezovanje, ki jih lahko uporabimo kot semenske omembe za povezovanje drugih omemb in neinformativnih entitet. V tem delu izberemo najbolj povezane omembe kot semenske omembe in razločimo druge omembe tako, da jih primerjamo s semenskimi omembe in ne neposredno s entitetami. Naši poskusi povezovanja omenitev s sedmimi samodejno izkopanimi seznami kažejo obetavne rezultate in dokazujejo učinkovitost našega pristopa.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Amma, cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka, ko KB ya iya iya zama mai sauƙi, kuma yana ƙara kamar sunayen sunayen nau'i masu daidaita (misali, jerin abun). Munã kirãye shi kamar shirin cikin Jerin-Jerin-da-kawai. Babu rabon da wani misalin sunayen sun iya da wasu cucum da za'a yi samun linki, wanda za'a iya amfani da shi kamar an ambaci zura zuwa ga su sami sunayen wasu da ba'a sani ba. Daga wannan aikin, Munã zãɓe masu yawa da ke haɗa su kamar misalin zũriyar da kuma Muke gauraya da wasu kalmõmi dabam, a sami da su da sunan zuriyar musamman da masu kashfa. Our experiments on linking mentions to seven automatically mined lists show promising results and demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.", 'bo': 'Traditional Entity Linking (EL) technologies rely on rich structures and properties in the target knowledge base (KB). ཡིན་ནའང་། ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་པོ་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་རིགས་གཅིག་ཀྱི་མིང་ཐོ་འགོད་བཞིན་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཡིན་མིང་། ང་ཚོས་དེ་ལ་ཐོ་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཨ་རིའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་འབོད་པ Fortunately, some mentions may have more cues for linking, which can be used as seed mentions to bridge other mentions and the uninformative entities. In this work, we select most linkable mentions as seed mentions and disambiguate other mentions by comparing them with the seed mentions rather than directly with the entities. Note that this is a KRunner keyword: ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ངང་གི་ཐོ་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Disfluency Detection using a Noisy Channel Model and a Deep Neural Language Model', 'ar': 'كشف عدم الطلاقة باستخدام نموذج قناة صاخبة ونموذج لغة عصبية عميقة', 'pt': 'Detecção de disfluência usando um modelo de canal barulhento e um modelo de linguagem neural profunda', 'fr': "Détection de disfluence à l'aide d'un modèle de canal bruyant et d'un modèle de langage neuronal profond", 'es': 'Detección de disfluencias mediante un modelo de canal ruidoso y un modelo de lenguaje neuronal profundo', 'ja': 'ノイズの多いチャネルモデルと深層神経言語モデルを使用した不流動検出', 'zh': '用噪声道与深度神经语言不流检', 'ru': 'Обнаружение несплошностей с использованием модели шумного канала и модели глубокого нейронного языка', 'hi': 'एक शोर चैनल मॉडल और एक गहरी तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग कर Disfluency का पता लगाने', 'ga': 'Brath Idirleithne ag baint úsáide as Samhail Cainéal Torainn agus Samhail Nearach Teanga Dhomhain', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση ανωμαλίας χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο θορυβωδών καναλιών και ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς νευρωνικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'Rilevamento di disturbi utilizzando un modello di canale rumoroso e un modello di linguaggio neurale profondo', 'kk': 'Дыбыс арналының үлгісін және түйінгі нейралық тіл үлгісін қолданып бөлістіктерді анықтау', 'lt': 'Disfluency Detection using a Noisy Channel Model and a Deep Neural Language Model', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Детектирање на дифленцијата користејќи модел на звучен канал и модел на длабок неурален јазик', 'hu': 'Zajos csatorna modell és mély neurális nyelvmodell segítségével diszfluencia detektálás', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Kehilangan menggunakan Model Saluran Bunyi dan Model Bahasa Neural Dalam', 'ml': 'ഒരു നോസി ചാനല്\u200d മോഡലും ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലും ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള അസാധ്യതയുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mn': 'Шүлэг архины загвар болон гүнзгий мэдрэлийн хэл загварыг ашиглаж буй хатуу тогтоох', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie niepłynności za pomocą modelu kanału hałasowego i modelu języka głębokiego neuronu', 'sr': 'Detekcija nestabilnosti koristeći model zvučnog kanala i duboki neuronski model jezika', 'si': 'නෝයිසි චැනල් මොඩල් සහ ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් භාෂා මොඩල් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් හොයාගන්න', 'mt': 'Sejbien tad-Disfluwenza bl-użu ta’ Mudell tal-Kanal Storjuż u Mudell tal-Lingwa Newrali Profonda', 'no': 'Avslutningsoppdaging ved hjelp av ein støykanal- modell og ein dyp neuralspråk- modell', 'ro': 'Detectarea disfluenței utilizând un model de canal zgomotos și un model de limbaj neural profund', 'sv': 'Diskussionsdetektering med hjälp av en bullerkanalmodell och en djupneural språkmodell', 'ur': 'نائيسی چانل موڈل اور عمیق نائرل زبان موڈل کے مطابق نائسفائنست شناسایی', 'so': 'Ku isticmaalka nooca kanal iyo muusikada luqada hoose u dhexeeya', 'ta': 'தெளிவான வாய்க்கால் மாதிரி மற்றும் ஆழமான புதிய மொழி மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி தேர்வு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện thói quen dùng mô hình kênh nhiễu và mô hình ngôn ngữ ngầm', 'bg': 'Откриване на дисфлуънс с помощта на модел на шумен канал и модел на дълбок неврален език', 'nl': 'Disfluence Detection met behulp van een Noisy Channel Model en een Deep Neural Language Model', 'da': 'Afsløringsdetektion ved hjælp af en støjende kanalmodel og en dyb neural sprogmodel', 'hr': 'Detekcija poremećaja koristeći model glasnog kanala i duboki neuralni jezik', 'de': 'Erkennung von Störungen mit einem Rauschkanalmodell und einem Deep Neural Language Model', 'id': 'Deteksi Kehilangan menggunakan Model Kanal Bersuara dan Model Bahasa Neural Dalam', 'ko': '소음 채널 모델과 깊이 신경 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 불유창한 검출', 'sw': 'Kugundua Ushindi kwa kutumia Utawala wa Chaneli Noisy na Modeli ya Kingi cha Lugha', 'tr': 'Noisy Kanal Modeli we Taryh Niral Dili', 'af': "Disfluitingsdeteksie gebruik 'n Noisy Channel Model en' n Deep Neural Taal Model", 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Անհեղության հայտնաբերումը աղմուկ կաղուկի մոդելի և խորը նյարդային լեզվի մոդելի միջոցով', 'fa': 'کشف ناپذیری با استفاده از مدل کانال صدا و مدل زبان عصبی عمیق', 'az': 'Süfürmə kanalı modeli və derin nöral dil modeli ilə fərqləndirilməsi təşkil edildi', 'bn': 'একটি নোজি চ্যানেল মডেল এবং গভীর নিউরেল ভাষা মডেল ব্যবহার করে ব্যবস্থা সনাক্ত করুন', 'sq': 'Detektimi i Disfluency duke përdorur një model të kanalit të zhurmshëm dhe një model të gjuhës së thellë nervore', 'bs': 'Detekcija nestabilnosti koristeći model Noisy Channel i duboki neuronski model jezika', 'ca': 'Detecció de la disfluència utilitzant un model de canal ruidosa i un model de llenguatge neuronal profund', 'cs': 'Detekce neslušnosti pomocí modelu šumového kanálu a modelu hlubokého neuronového jazyka', 'fi': 'Häiriön tunnistus melukanavamallin ja syvähermokielimallin avulla', 'et': 'Häirete tuvastamine mürakanali mudeli ja sügava närvikeele mudeli abil', 'jv': 'Disflority detection with a Nois channel model and a deep Neral Language model', 'he': 'גילוי השפעה באמצעות מודל ערוץ רעש ומודל שפה נוירולית עמוקה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje disfluentnosti z uporabo modela hrupnega kanala in modela globokega živčnega jezika', 'bo': 'Disfluency Detection using a Noisy Channel Model and a Deep Neural Language Model'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a model for disfluency detection in spontaneous speech transcripts called LSTM Noisy Channel Model. The model uses a Noisy Channel Model (NCM) to generate n-best candidate disfluency analyses and a Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) language model to score the underlying fluent sentences of each analysis. The LSTM language model scores, along with other features, are used in a MaxEnt reranker to identify the most plausible analysis. We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا لاكتشاف عدم الطلاقة في نصوص الكلام العفوية يسمى LSTM Noisy Channel Model. يستخدم النموذج نموذج قناة صاخبة (NCM) لإنشاء تحليلات عدم طلاقة المرشح الأفضل ونموذج لغة الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) لتسجيل الجمل الأساسية بطلاقة لكل تحليل. يتم استخدام درجات نموذج لغة LSTM ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات الأخرى ، في إعادة تصنيف MaxEnt لتحديد التحليل الأكثر منطقية. نوضح أن استخدام نموذج لغة LSTM في عملية إعادة ترتيب نموذج عدم طلاقة القناة الصاخبة يحسن من أحدث التقنيات في اكتشاف عدم الطلاقة.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un modèle de détection de disfluence dans les transcriptions vocales spontanées appelé LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Le modèle utilise un modèle de canal bruyant (NCM) pour générer des analyses de disfluence des n-meilleurs candidats et un modèle de langage LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pour noter les phrases fluides sous-jacentes de chaque analyse. Les scores du modèle de langage LSTM, ainsi que d'autres fonctionnalités, sont utilisés dans un re-classement MaxEnt pour identifier l'analyse la plus plausible. Nous montrons que l'utilisation d'un modèle de langage LSTM dans le processus de reclassement d'un modèle de disfluence de canal bruité améliore l'état de la technologie en matière de détection de disfluence.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um modelo para detecção de disfluência em transcrições de fala espontânea chamado LSTM Noisy Channel Model. O modelo usa um Noisy Channel Model (NCM) para gerar n melhores análises de disfluência de candidatos e um modelo de linguagem Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) para pontuar as sentenças fluentes subjacentes de cada análise. As pontuações do modelo de linguagem LSTM, juntamente com outros recursos, são usadas em um reclassificador MaxEnt para identificar a análise mais plausível. Mostramos que o uso de um modelo de linguagem LSTM no processo de reclassificação do modelo de disfluência de canal ruidoso melhora o estado da arte na detecção de disfluência.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un modelo para la detección de disfluencias en transcripciones de voz espontáneas llamado Modelo de canal ruidoso LSTM. El modelo utiliza un modelo de canal ruidoso (NCM) para generar los análisis de disfluencia de los n-mejores candidatos y un modelo de lenguaje de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) para puntuar las frases fluidas subyacentes de cada análisis. Las puntuaciones del modelo de lenguaje LSTM, junto con otras características, se utilizan en un reclasificador de MaxEnt para identificar el análisis más plausible. Demostramos que el uso de un modelo de lenguaje LSTM en el proceso de reclasificación del modelo de disfluencia de canales ruidosos mejora el estado de la técnica en la detección de disfluencia.', 'ja': 'LSTM Noisy Channel Modelと呼ばれる自発音声転写における不流動性検出のモデルを提示した。このモデルは、雑音チャネルモデル（ ＮＣＭ ）を使用して、ｎベスト候補不流動性分析を生成し、長期記憶（ ＬＳＴＭ ）言語モデルを使用して、各分析の基礎となる流暢な文章をスコアリングする。LSTM言語モデルスコアは、他の特徴とともに、MaxEnt再ランカーで使用され、最も妥当な分析を特定します。雑音の多いチャネル不流動性モデルの再ランク化プロセスでLSTM言語モデルを使用すると、最先端の不流動性検出を改善することが示されています。', 'zh': '本文立一种用自发语音脚本中不畅检测的模样,称为LSTM噪声道模形。 用噪声道 (NCM) 生 n 最佳者不流,以长短期记 (LSTM) 言语评分。 LSTM言语模形分数及他功能用于MaxEnt重排名器中,以定至理。 吾明噪声道之不流者用LSTM言语之不流者最新平。', 'ru': 'В данной статье представлена модель обнаружения вытеснения в спонтанных расшифровках речи под названием LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Модель использует модель шумного канала (NCM) для генерации n-лучших анализов потенциальной текучести и языковую модель долгосрочной краткосрочной памяти (LSTM) для оценки основных свободных предложений каждого анализа. Баллы языковой модели LSTM, наряду с другими функциями, используются в реранкере MaxEnt для определения наиболее правдоподобного анализа. Показано, что использование языковой модели LSTM в процессе перерейтинга модели обесточивания шумных каналов улучшает современное состояние обнаружения обеднения.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सहज भाषण टेपों में disfluency का पता लगाने के लिए एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है जिसे LSTM शोर चैनल मॉडल कहा जाता है। मॉडल एक शोर चैनल मॉडल (एनसीएम) का उपयोग करता है एन-सर्वश्रेष्ठ उम्मीदवार disfluency विश्लेषण और प्रत्येक विश्लेषण के अंतर्निहित धाराप्रवाह वाक्यों को स्कोर करने के लिए एक लंबी अल्पकालिक मेमोरी (LSTM) भाषा मॉडल उत्पन्न करने के लिए। LSTM भाषा मॉडल स्कोर, अन्य सुविधाओं के साथ, सबसे प्रशंसनीय विश्लेषण की पहचान करने के लिए एक MaxEnt reranker में उपयोग किया जाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि शोर चैनल disfluency मॉडल की reranking प्रक्रिया में एक LSTM भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करने से disfluency का पता लगाने में अत्याधुनिक सुधार होता है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo múnla i láthair le haghaidh braite neamhlíofachta i dtraipisí cainte spontáineacha ar a dtugtar Samhail Cainéal Nois LSTM. Úsáideann an tsamhail Samhail Cainéal Torainn (NCM) chun n-anailísí éagsúlachta iarrthóra is fearr a ghiniúint agus samhail teanga Cuimhne Gearrthéarmach Fhada (LSTM) chun na habairtí líofa bunúsacha de gach anailís a scóráil. Úsáidtear scóir mhúnla teanga LSTM, mar aon le gnéithe eile, in athrangóir MaxEnt chun an anailís is sochreidte a shainaithint. Léirímid go bhfeabhsaítear an úrscothacht maidir le héagsúlacht a bhrath trí mhúnla teanga LSTM a úsáid sa phróiseas athrangaithe de shamhail easláine chainéil fhuaimnigh.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი მოდელს სპონტანო სიტყვების ტრანქრიპტებში, რომელიც LSTM კანალური მოდელში მოდელს. მოდელის გამოყენება n-სუფლიო კანდენტის განსხვავება ანალიზების n-სუფლიო კანდენტის განსხვავება და ყველა ანალიზების განსხვავებაში სიტყვის მეხსიერება (LSTM) ენის მოდელი. LSTM ენის მოდელის მოდულები, სხვა ფუნქციებით ერთმანეთში, MaxEnt რერენაკერაში გამოიყენება, რომელიც უფრო შესაძლებელი ანალიზაციაში გამოიყენება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ LSTM ენის მოდელის გამოყენება სიტყვი კანალის განსხვავება მოდელის პროცესში გამოყენება განსხვავებაში სიტყვის განსხვავებაში.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a spontán beszédátiratok diszfluencia detektálásának modelljét LSTM Noisy Channel Model néven. A modell egy Noisy Channel Model (NCM) modellt használ az n legjobb jelöltek diszfluencia elemzésére, és egy Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) nyelvi modellt használ az egyes elemzések alapjául szolgáló folyékony mondatok pontozására. Az LSTM nyelvi modell pontszámait, más funkciókkal együtt használják egy MaxEnt átrendezőben a legvalószínűbb elemzés azonosítására. Megmutatjuk, hogy az LSTM nyelvi modell használata a zajos csatornák diszfluencia modelljének átrendezési folyamatában javítja a diszfluencia detektálásának korszerűségét.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα μοντέλο ανίχνευσης ανωμαλίας σε αυθόρμητες μεταγραφές ομιλίας που ονομάζεται μοντέλο θορυβωδών καναλιών. Το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί ένα μοντέλο θορυβωδών καναλιών (NCM) για να δημιουργήσει αναλύσεις μη ρευστότητας υποψηφίων και ένα μοντέλο γλώσσας μακράς βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (LSTM) για να βαθμολογήσει τις υποκείμενες άπταιστες προτάσεις κάθε ανάλυσης. Οι βαθμολογίες του μοντέλου γλώσσας, μαζί με άλλα χαρακτηριστικά, χρησιμοποιούνται σε μια επανακατάταξη για τον προσδιορισμό της πιο αξιόπιστης ανάλυσης. Δείχνουμε ότι η χρήση ενός γλωσσικού μοντέλου στη διαδικασία επανακατάταξης του θορυβώδους μοντέλου δυσρευστότητας καναλιών βελτιώνει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στην ανίχνευση δυσρευστότητας.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија претставува модел за детекција на неслушност во спонтани говорни транскрипти наречени LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Моделот користи модел на шумски канал (NCM) за генерирање на n-најдобрите анализи на кандидатска несфлексност и модел на јазик на долгорочна краткорочна меморија (LSTM) за оценка на основните течни реченици на секоја анализа. Резултатите на моделот на LSTM јазик, заедно со други карактеристики, се користат во MaxEnt реанкер за идентификување на најверојатната анализа. Ние покажуваме дека користењето на модел на јазик на ЛСТМ во процесот на повторно врзување на гласниот модел на нефлексибилност на каналите го подобрува најдоброто детекција на нефлексибилност.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un modello per il rilevamento della disfluenza nelle trascrizioni spontanee del parlato chiamato LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Il modello utilizza un Noisy Channel Model (NCM) per generare analisi di disfluenza dei candidati migliori e un modello linguistico Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) per segnare le frasi fluenti sottostanti di ogni analisi. I punteggi del modello linguistico LSTM, insieme ad altre caratteristiche, sono utilizzati in un ricanker MaxEnt per identificare l'analisi più plausibile. Mostriamo che l'utilizzo di un modello di linguaggio LSTM nel processo di ricalcolazione del modello di disfluenza del canale rumoroso migliora lo stato dell'arte nel rilevamento della disfluenza.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз LSTM дыбыс арналы үлгісі деп аталатын спонтаннан сөйлеу транскрипттерінің кеңістігін анықтау үлгісін көрсетеді. Бұл үлгі n- ең жақсы кандидаттардың кеңістігін анализдерді жасау үшін Үлкен арнасының моделі (NCM) және әрбір анализдің кеңістік сөздерін жасау үшін ұзын қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) тіл моделі қолданылады. LSTM тіл үлгі нөмірлері, басқа мүмкіндіктерімен бірге, ең жақсы анализ анықтау үшін MaxEnt қайта бағыттаушында қолданылады. Біз LSTM тіл үлгісін қолдану үшін дыбыс арналдардың қайта қалпына келтіру процесінде қалпына келтіру үлгісінде өзгертілген орындың күйін жасайды.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സ്പാനിയായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d അസാധാരണമായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന ഈ മോഡല്\u200d നോസി ചാനല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (NCM) എല്ലാ വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയുടെ വിശ്വാസവും ന LSTM ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d, മറ്റുള്ള വിശേഷതകളോടൊപ്പം മാക്സെന്റ് റിയാങ്കെരില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും വ്യാജമായ അന്യായം  We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell għall-individwazzjoni tad-disfluwenza fi transkrizzjonijiet spontanji tad-diskors imsejjaħ mudell tal-Kanal tal-Istorbju LSTM. Il-mudell juża Mudell tal-Kanal tal-Istorbju (NCM) biex jiġġenera l-a ħjar analiżi ta’ diskluwenza tal-kandidati u mudell lingwistiku ta’ Memorja fit-Tul ta’ terminu qasir (LSTM) biex jikkalkula s-sentenzi fluwenti sottostanti ta’ kull analiżi. Il-punteġġi tal-mudell tal-lingwa LSTM, flimkien ma’ karatteristiċi oħra, jintużaw f’MaxEnt reranker biex tiġi identifikata l-analiżi l-aktar plawżibbli. Aħna nuru li l-użu ta’ mudell tal-lingwa LSTM fil-proċess ta’ rikonċiljazzjoni mill-ġdid tal-mudell ta’ difluwenza tal-kanali storbjużi jtejjeb l-aktar avvanzat fid-detezzjoni tad-difluwenza.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit modell for oppdaging av forskjellighet i spontane tale- transkript kalla LSTM Noisy Channel- modell. Modellen brukar ein støykanalmodell (NCM) for å laga n-beste kandidat-forskyvingsanalyser og ein lang kortmallet minne (LSTM) språk-modell for å scorera underliggande fluent setningar av kvar analyse. LSTM-språk-modeller, saman med andre funksjonar, vert bruka i ein MaxEnt-tilbakekaller for å identifisera den mest betre analysen. Vi viser at med ein LSTM-språk-modell i gjenoppretting av støykanal-forskyvingsmodellen forbedrar kunsttilstanden i oppdaging av forskyvingstilstanden.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono model wykrywania niepłynności w transkrypcjach spontanicznej mowy zwany LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model wykorzystuje model nośnego kanału (NCM) do generowania analiz niepłynności n-najlepszych kandydatów oraz model językowy Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM), aby ocenić płynne zdania każdej analizy. Wyniki modelu językowego LSTM, wraz z innymi funkcjami, są używane w ponownym rankerze MaxEnt do identyfikacji najbardziej wiarygodnej analizy. Pokazujemy, że zastosowanie modelu językowego LSTM w procesie zmiany rankingu modelu niepłynności kanałów hałasowych poprawia najnowocześniejsze wykrywanie niepłynności.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas diskrecijų aptikimo savanoriškose kalbos transkripcijose modelis, vadinamas LSTM triukšmo kanalo modeliu. Modelyje naudojamas triukšmo kanalo modelis (NCM), kad būtų gautos n geriausios kandidatų trūkumo analizės ir ilgalaikės trumpalaikės atminties (LSTM) kalbos modelis, pagal kurį būtų įvertinti kiekvienos analizės pagrindiniai skysti sakiniai. LSTM kalbos modelio rezultatai kartu su kitomis savybėmis naudojami MaxEnt pakartotiniame ankeriuje, kad būtų galima nustatyti patikimiausią analizę. Mes parodome, kad naudojant LSTM kalbos model į atliekant triukšmo kanalų trūkumo modelio perskaičiavimo procesą pagerinama naujausia trūkumo nustatymo pažanga.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan model untuk pengesan kesilapan dalam transkrip ucapan spontan yang dipanggil LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model menggunakan Model Saluran Bunyi (NCM) untuk menghasilkan analisis kelemahan calon terbaik dan model bahasa Memori Panjang-Term a (LSTM) untuk skor kalimat kelemahan didasarkan setiap analisis. Skor model bahasa LSTM, bersama dengan ciri-ciri lain, digunakan dalam pemancar semula MaxEnt untuk mengenalpasti analisis yang paling mungkin. We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za otkrivanje nestabilnosti u spontanim govornim transkriptima zvanim LSTM Noisy Channel Modelom. Model koristi model Noisy Channel (NCM) kako bi stvorio analizu n-najboljih kandidatskih nestabilnosti i model dugoročne memorije (LSTM) jezika kako bi rezultirao temeljne tekuće rečenice svake analize. Rezultati LSTM jezičkih model a zajedno sa drugim karakteristikama koriste se u rehabilitaciji MaxEnt kako bi identifikovali najuvjerljiviju analizu. Pokazujemo da korištenje LSTM jezičkog modela u procesu preokretanja modela nestabilnosti buknog kanala poboljšava stanje umjetnosti u otkrivanju nestabilnosti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас LSTM Noisy Channel загвар гэдэг илтгэлийн хэлбэрийн загварын загварыг олж харуулдаг. Загварын загвар нь n-хамгийн сайн удирдагчийн алдагдлыг шинжилгээр, урт богино-Term Memory (LSTM) хэл загварын загварыг ашигладаг. LSTM хэл загварын тоо, бусад чанартай хамт, MaxEnt-ын дахин шинжилгээнд хамгийн итгэлтэй шинжилгээг олж мэдэх үед хэрэглэгддэг. Бид LSTM хэл загварын загварыг ашиглан дуу загварын алдагдлын загварын дахин эргүүлэх үйл явцын тулд урлагийн байдлыг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ LSTM නෝයිසි චැනල් මොඩේල් කියලා ස්පොන්ටන් කතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා. මොඩේලය නෝයිසි චැනල් මොඩේලය (NCM) භාවිත කරනවා n- හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ලොකු කොටස් වාර්තාව මතකය (LSTM) භාෂාව මො LSTM භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක්, අනිත් විශේෂතාවක් සමග, MaxENT ප්\u200dරමාණකයෙන් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ LSTM භාෂා මොඩල් එකක් භාවිතා කරන්නේ ශබ්ද විශ්වාස නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා', 'ta': 'Name இந்த மாதிரி ஒவ்வொரு ஆராய்ச்சியின் அடிப்படையான தெளிவான வாக்கியங்களை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான மாதிரி முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. LSTM மொழி மாதிரி மதிப்பெண்கள், மற்ற பண்புகளுடன், மெக்சென்ட் மீண்டும் பிரிப்பாளரில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, மிகவும் விளையாட நாம் ஒரு LSTM மொழி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துவதை காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்று நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் சப்தம் வாய்க்கால் குழப்பம் மாதிரியும் போது', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un model pentru detectarea disfluenței în transcrierile spontane de vorbire numit LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Modelul utilizează un model de canal zgomotos (NCM) pentru a genera analize de disfluență ale candidaților și un model de limbaj LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) pentru a puncta propozițiile fluente subiacente ale fiecărei analize. Scorurile modelului lingvistic LSTM, împreună cu alte caracteristici, sunt utilizate într-un retanker MaxEnt pentru a identifica cea mai plauzibilă analiză. Noi arătăm că utilizarea unui model de limbaj LSTM în procesul de relocare a modelului de disfluență zgomotoasă a canalelor îmbunătățește starea de ultimă oră în detectarea disfluenței.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en modell för disfluency detection i spontana talskript kallad LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Modellen använder en Noisy Channel Model (NCM) för att generera n-bästa kandidatdiskfluensanalyser och en Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) språkmodell för att scora de underliggande flytande meningarna i varje analys. LSTM-språkmodellpoängen, tillsammans med andra funktioner, används i en MaxEnt-omräknare för att identifiera den mest sannolika analysen. Vi visar att användningen av en LSTM språkmodell i omlokaliseringsprocessen av bullriga kanaldisfluency modell förbättrar den senaste tekniken inom disfluency detection.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a model for disfluency detection in spontaneous speech transcripts called LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model uses a Noisy Channel Model (NCM) to generate n-best candidate disfluency analyses and a Long-Term Memory (LSTM) language model to score the underlying fluent sentences of each analysis. LSTM زبان موڈل اسکور، اور دوسری فرصت کے ساتھ، ایک مکس انت ریرنکر میں سب سے مضبوط تحلیل پہچان کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک LSTM زبان موڈل کی استعمال کرتا ہے کہ صدا چنال غلطی موڈل کی دوبارہ ریرنگ کی پروسس کے ذریعہ سے بغلطی کا اثبات کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa lagu qoraa tusaale ku saabsan aqoonta suurtagal ah oo ku qoran qoraalka hadalka oo lagu yidhaahdo LSTM nooca ah. Tusaale wuxuu isticmaalaa noocyada kanal (NCM) si uu u sameeyo baaritaanka suurtagalka ah oo n-ugu fiican iyo modelka luqada ee Long-Short-Term (LSTM) si uu u koobo dhamaadka baaritaanka ku hooseeya. Isticmaalka luqada LSTM waxaa lagu isticmaalaa mid lagu caddeeyo baaritaanka ugu fiican ee macEnt. Waxan tusnaynaa in lagu isticmaalo tusaale ahaan luqada LSTM oo ku qoran baaraandegista baaritaanka qaylada, uu kordhiyo xaaladda farshaxanka iyo baahida.', 'uz': 'Name Name Name We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này là một mẫu để phát hiện thói quen không lưu trong các văn bản phát biểu tự phát được gọi là model kênh nhiễu LSD. Mô hình dùng một mô hình kênh ồn ào (NCM) để tạo ra các phân tích sai sót của ứng viên n-tốt nhất và một mô hình ngôn ngữ Ký Ức Dài Hạn (LSTM) để ghi được những câu cuối cùng của mỗi phân tích. Thành tích mô- đun ngôn ngữ LSTM, cùng với các tính năng khác, được dùng trong một trình duyệt lại Maxwell Ent để xác định khả năng phân tích hợp lý nhất. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ LSTM trong quá trình tái phát sóng âm của mô hình nhiễu sóng kênh sẽ cải thiện trạng thái nghệ thuật trong việc phát hiện thói quen.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя модел за откриване на дисфлуанс в спонтанни речни транскрипции, наречен модел на шумен канал. Моделът използва модел на шумен канал (НКМ), за да генерира n-най-добри анализи на дисфлуънтността на кандидатите и езиков модел за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ), за да оцени основните гладки изречения на всеки анализ. Оценките на езиковия модел LSTM, заедно с други функции, се използват в повторно банкиране на MaxEnt за идентифициране на най-правдоподобния анализ. Показваме, че използването на езиков модел в процеса на пренасочване на модела за шумен канал на дисфлуънтност подобрява най-съвременните технологии в откриването на дисфлуънтност.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een model voor disfluencie detectie in spontane spraaktranscripten genaamd LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Het model gebruikt een Noisy Channel Model (NCM) om n-best kandidaat disfluency analyses te genereren en een Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) taalmodel om de onderliggende vloeiende zinnen van elke analyse te scoren. De LSTM taalmodel scores, samen met andere functies, worden gebruikt in een MaxEnt reranker om de meest plausibele analyse te identificeren. We tonen aan dat het gebruik van een LSTM-taalmodel in het herschikkingsproces van noise channel disfluency model de state-of-the-art in disfluency detection verbetert.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en model til detektion af diskfluens i spontane taletranskriptioner kaldet LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Modellen bruger en Noisy Channel Model (NCM) til at generere n-bedste kandidatdiskfluency analyser og en Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) sprogmodel til at score de underliggende flydende sætninger i hver analyse. LSTM sprogmodel scoringer, sammen med andre funktioner, bruges i en MaxEnt re-ranker til at identificere den mest sandsynlige analyse. Vi viser, at brugen af en LSTM sprogmodel i omlægningsprocessen af støjende kanal disfluency model forbedrer state-of-the-art i disfluency detektion.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za otkrivanje nestabilnosti u spontanskim govornim transkriptima koji se zovu LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model koristi model Noisy Channel (NCM) za proizvedenje n-najboljih analiza nestabilnosti kandidata i dugoročnog sjećanja jezika (LSTM) za rezultate temeljnih tekućih rečenica svake analize. Rezultati LSTM jezičkih model a, zajedno s drugim karakteristikama, koriste se u MaxEnt pregledniku kako bi identifikovali najvjerljiviju analizu. Pokazujemo da korištenje LSTM jezičkog modela u procesu preokretanja modela nestabilnosti bučnog kanala poboljšava stanje umjetnosti u otkrivanju nestabilnosti.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit wird ein Modell zur Erkennung von Fehlflüssigkeiten in spontanen Sprachtranskripten namens LSTM Noisy Channel Model vorgestellt. Das Modell verwendet ein Noisy Channel Model (NCM), um n-best Kandidatendisfluenz Analysen zu generieren und ein Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) Sprachmodell, um die zugrunde liegenden fließenden Sätze jeder Analyse zu bewerten. Die LSTM Sprachmodell-Scores werden zusammen mit anderen Funktionen in einem MaxEnt Reranker verwendet, um die plausibelste Analyse zu identifizieren. Wir zeigen, dass die Verwendung eines LSTM-Sprachmodells im Reranking-Prozess des Rauschkanaldisfluenzmodells den Stand der Technik in der Disfluenzerkennung verbessert.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model untuk deteksi gangguan dalam transkrip pidato spontan yang disebut LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model menggunakan Model Kanal Kebisingan (NCM) untuk menghasilkan analisis kelemahan kandidat terbaik n dan model bahasa Memori Panjang-Term (LSTM) untuk mencetak kalimat kelemahan di dasar setiap analisis. The LSTM language model scores, along with other features, are used in a MaxEnt reranker to identify the most plausible analysis.  We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل برای شناسایی ناپذیری در ترنسکرپهای سخنرانی استفاده می\u200cکند که نامیده می\u200cشود مدل کانال نویسی LSTM. این مدل از یک مدل کانال Noisy (NCM) استفاده می\u200cکند تا تحلیل ناتوانی n-بهترین کاندیداتی و یک مدل یادآوری کوتاه\u200cTerm (LSTM) برای امتیاز جمله\u200cهای پایین\u200cتر از هر تحلیل را تولید کند. نمونه\u200cهای مدل زبان LSTM، همراه با ویژه\u200cهای دیگر، در یک بازیابی MaxEnt برای شناسایی بهترین تحلیل قابل اعتماد استفاده می\u200cشوند. ما نشان می دهیم که با استفاده از یک مدل زبان LSTM در فرایند تغییر کردن مدل ناپدید شدن کانال صوتی حالت هنری در کشف ناپدید را بهتر می کند.', 'ko': '본고는 자발적인 음성 기록에서 유창하게 검출되지 않는 모델을 제시했는데 이를 LSTM 소음 채널 모델이라고 부른다.이 모델은 노이즈 채널 모델(NCM)을 사용하여 n개의 최적 후보 불유창한 분석을 생성하고, 장단시간 기억(LSTM) 언어 모델을 사용하여 각 분석의 기본 유창한 문장을 평가한다.LSTM 언어 모델 점수 및 기타 기능은 맥스엔트 리셋에 사용되어 가장 합리적인 분석을 확정하는 데 사용된다.우리는 소음 채널의 원활하지 않은 모델의 재배열 과정에서 LSTM 언어 모델을 사용하면 원활하지 않은 검측의 기술 수준을 높일 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mfano wa kutambua kutokuwepo na ufahamu katika maandishi ya kujieleza yanayoitwa LSTM Channel Noisy. Mfano huo unatumia Modeli wa Channel Noisy (NCM) kutengeneza uchambuzi wa ubora bora wa mgombea n a modeli ya lugha ya muda mrefu (LSTM) ili kuweka score sentensi za msingi za uchambuzi wa kila uchambuzi. Mfano wa lugha ya LSTM, pamoja na vipengele vingine, wanatumiwa katika mchezo wa MaxEnt ili kutambua uchambuzi unaoeleweka zaidi. Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia muundo wa lugha ya LSTM katika mchakato wa upya wa hali ya kutokuwepo kwa kelele unaoendelea kuboresha hali ya sanaa katika kugundua kutokuwepo kwa usawa.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n model vir afskuldigheid beskrywing in spontanee woorde transkripte genoem LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Die model gebruik 'n Noisy Channel Model (NCM) om n-beste kandidate afbreiding analiseer te genereer en 'n Lang Kort Term Geheue (LSTM) taal model om die onderstelling fluent setings van elke analiseer te tel. Die LSTM taal model telling, saam met ander funksies, word gebruik in 'n MaxEnt heranker om die mees verligbare analisie te identifiseer. Ons wys dat die gebruik van 'n LSTM taal model in die herankering proses van geluid kanaal afvloeidingsmodel verbeter die staat van die kuns in afvloeidingsbeskrywing.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një model për zbulimin e zhurmës në transkriptet spontane të fjalës të quajtura LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Modeli përdor një Model të Kanalit të Zhurmshëm (NCM) për të gjeneruar n-më të mirën analiza të disfluencës së kandidatit dhe një model gjuhësh të Memorisë së Lartë afat-shkurtër (LSTM) për të shënuar fjalët n ë bazë të çdo analize. The LSTM language model scores, along with other features, are used in a MaxEnt reranker to identify the most plausible analysis.  Ne tregojmë se përdorimi i një modeli gjuhësh LSTM në procesin e ripërlidhjes së modelit të zhurmshëm të kanalit përmirëson gjendjen e fundit në zbulimin e zhurmës.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የንግግር ጽሑፎች LSTM ነፃ ጣቢያ ሞዴል በሚባል የቋንቋ ጽሑፎች ላይ የሚያሳውቅ ምሳሌ ያቀርባል፡፡ ሞዴል የኖሲ ጣቢያ ሞዴል (NCM) የሚጠቅመው የክቡር ምርጫዎችን እና የረጅም አቋራጭ ማሰሪያ (LSTM) ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለመፍጠር የሚጠቅመው የሁሉንም ትክክለኛ ክፍሎች ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የLSTM ቋንቋ ሞዴል ፊደል ከሌሎች ምርጫዎች ጋር በሚካሄድ ማክስኤንት አዲስ አዳራቢ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ መተረፊያውን ለማግኘት ይጠቀማል። We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz LSTM Noisy Kanal nusgasynda arzuw etmek üçin bir nusgasyny tanyýar Bu nusga n-iň gowy kandidatyň gaýd edilmesini çykarmak üçin Noisy Channel nusgasyny ullanýar LSTM dili nusgalary, beýleki karakterleriň we ýene-de MaxEnt taýýarlayıcısynda iň beter möhüm analýşini tanamak üçin ullanýar Biz gürrüň kanallaryň gaýtalanmasyzlyk modinde LSTM dil nusgasyny ulanyp görkezip görkezilýäris. Howa kanalyň gaýtalanmasyzlyk modinde sungatyň durumyny gowuraýar.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za otkrivanje nestabilnosti u spontanskim govornim transkriptima koji se zovu LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model koristi model Noisy Channel (NCM) za proizvedenje n-najboljih analiza nestabilnosti kandidata i model dugoročnog sjećanja jezika (LSTM) za rezultate temeljnih tekućih rečenica svake analize. Rezultati LSTM jezičkih model a, zajedno sa drugim karakteristikama, koriste se u MaxEnt pregledniku kako bi identifikovali najvjerljiviju analizu. Pokazujemo da korištenje LSTM jezičkog modela u procesu preokretanja modela nestabilnosti bučnog kanala poboljšava stanje umjetnosti u otkrivanju nestabilnosti.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է սպոնտան խոսքի հաղորդակցվածքներում անհեթեթ աղմուկ կաղորդակցվածքի մոդել: Մոդելը օգտագործում է Noise Channel (NCM) մոդել, որպեսզի ստեղծի n-լավագույն թեկնածու անհնարավորության վերլուծություններ և երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության (LSMT) լեզվի մոդել յուրաքանչյուր վերլուծության հիմնական հեղուկ նախադասությունների գնահատման LSMT լեզվի մոդելի գնահատականները, ինչպես նաև այլ հատկանիշներ, օգտագործվում են MaxENT-ի վերադասավորման մեջ, որպեսզի բացահայտեն ամենահավատալի վերլուծությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ LSMT լեզվի մոդելի օգտագործումը աղմկոտ կանանց անհեղության մոդելի վերամշակման ընթացքում բարելավում է անհեղության հայտնաբերման ամենաբարձր իրավիճակը:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt LSTM Noisy Channel Modeli adlı spontanlı sözlər transkriptlərində fərqli keşif modelini göstərir. Model n-ən yaxşı kandidát fərqli analizi və hər analizinin altındakı fərqli cümlələrini göstərmək üçün uzun qısqa-Term Memory (LSTM) dil modelini istifadə edir. LSTM dil modeli nöqtələri, digər xüsusiyyətlər ilə birlikdə, MaxEnt yenidən analizi tanıtmaq üçün istifadə edilir. Biz göstəririk ki, səs kanallarının fəsad olması modeli ilə LSTM dil modelini istifadə edərək fəsad keçməsində sanatın vəziyyətini yaxşılaşdırır.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje model detekce neslušnosti ve spontánních přepisech řeči s názvem LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model používá Noisy Channel Model (NCM) k generování analýzy nejlepších kandidátů a jazykový model Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) pro hodnocení plynulých vět každé analýzy. Výsledky jazykového modelu LSTM spolu s dalšími funkcemi se používají v přezkumném rankeru MaxEnt k identifikaci nejvěrohodnější analýzy. Ukázali jsme, že použití jazykového modelu LSTM v procesu přeskupování šumu kanálového modelu zlepšuje nejmodernější detekci neslušnosti.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un model de detecció de disfluència en transcripcions espontàniques de parla anomenat LSTM Noisy Channel Model. El model utilitza un model de canal ruidoso (NCM) per generar l'a n àlisi de disfluència candidata n millor i un model de llenguatge de memòria a curt termini (LSTM) per puntuar les frases fluents subjacentes de cada anàlisi. Les puntuacions del model de llenguatge LSTM, juntament amb altres característiques, s'utilitzen en un reencarregador MaxEnt per identificar l'anàlisi més plausible. Mostrem que utilitzar un model de llenguatge LSTM en el procés de reranking del model de disfluència ruidosa del canal millora l'última en la detecció de disfluència.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse disfluentsuse tuvastamise mudelit spontaansetes kõnetranskriptsioonides nimega LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Mudel kasutab mürakanali mudelit (NCM) n-parima kandidaadi disfluentsusanalüüsi genereerimiseks ja pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu (LSTM) keelemudelit, et hinnata iga analüüsi aluseks olevaid sujuvaid lauseid. LSTM keelemudeli skoorid koos teiste funktsioonidega kasutatakse MaxEnt ümberpankeris, et tuvastada kõige usutavam analüüs. Näitame, et LSTM keelemudeli kasutamine müraka kanali disfluentsusmudeli ümberpaigutamise protsessis parandab disfluentsuse tuvastamise kaasaegset taset.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään LSTM Noisy Channel Model -malli disfluenssin havaitsemiseksi spontaaneissa puhetranskriptioissa. Malli käyttää Noisy Channel Modelia (NCM) n-parhaan ehdokkaan disfluenssianalyysien tuottamiseen ja Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) -kielimallia, jolla pisteytetään kunkin analyysin taustalla olevat sujuvat lauseet. LSTM-kielimallipisteitä ja muita ominaisuuksia käytetään MaxEnt-uudelleenpankkirissa todennäköisimmän analyysin tunnistamiseen. Osoitamme, että LSTM-kielimallin käyttäminen meluisan kanavadisfluenssimallin uudelleenjärjestelyprosessissa parantaa disfluenssimallin viimeisintä tasoa.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভাষণের ট্রান্সপ্রিপ্টের মধ্যে বিভ্রান্তি সনাক্তির জন্য একটি মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছে যার না এই মডেলটি নোইসি চ্যানেল মডেল (এনসিএম) ব্যবহার করে প্রত্যেক বিশ্লেষণের অন্তর্ভুক্ত বিশ্লেষণ এবং দীর্ঘ সংক্ষিপ্ত টার্ম ম মেমরি (এলসিএম) ভাষার মডেল স্কোর করত এলস্টিএম ভাষার মডেল স্কোর, অন্যান্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে ম্যাক্সেন্ট পুনরায় বিশ্লেষণের জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শব্দ চ্যানেলের বিস্ফোরণ মডেলের পুনরায় একটি এলস্টিএম ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে অশ্লীলতা সনাক্তির অবস্থার উন্নতি করে।', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani motel wa gano mai fassara cikin takardar magana ta farat ɗaya wanda aka yi jina Nanel na LSSM. Modelen ya yi amfani da wata Model n a Noisy Channel (NCM) dõmin ya ƙiƙiro Ana-ƙarami masu kyauta na-n-baƙata kasa-fasahan kuma wata motsi na lugha na Long-Short-Cire (LStaM) don ya ƙari da tsarin maganar gaske na bakin Ana yi. Ana yi amfani da shiryoyin misalin harshe na LTRM, da wasu shiryoyin su sami cikin wani mai haɗi da MaxEnt dõmin ya gane Ana zama mafi fasahan da za'a iya lissafa. We show that using an LSTM language model in the reranking process of noisy channel disfluency model improves the state-of-the-art in disfluency detection.", 'jv': 'Ngetongkat iki nambah model kanggo nguasai paten kanggo ndelok kang seneng pisan bangsane karo nggambar barang nggo lit lit lit lit lit modèl LTT M Nois channel Model kuwi nggunakake Nois channel model (NM) nganggep sistem gak nggawe sistem sistem gak bukar nggawe sistem yang cukup gak nggawe sistem sawar sistem long-Terminal Pungker perusahaan de langgambar, sampeyan karo perusahaan liyane, iso nggambar MaxEnt kanggo nambah akeh basa sing gak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno lan ngawehi sistem sing paling nggawe modèl kuwi nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan, kuwi jenis modèl kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen model za odkrivanje disfluentnosti v spontanih govornih transkripcijah, imenovan LSTM Noisy Channel Model. Model uporablja model hrupa kanala (NCM) za ustvarjanje n-najboljših analiz disfluentnosti kandidatov in jezikovni model Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) za ocenjevanje osnovnih tekočih stavkov vsake analize. Rezultati jezikovnega modela LSTM, skupaj z drugimi funkcijami, se uporabljajo v ponovnem ankerju MaxEnt za ugotavljanje najbolj verjetne analize. Pokazali smo, da uporaba jezikovnega modela LSTM v procesu ponovnega razvrščanja modela disfluentnosti hrupnega kanala izboljšuje najsodobnejše odkrivanje disfluentnosti.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג דוגמא לזיהוי חסרות השפעה בתסריטי נאום ספונטני שנקרא מודל ערוץ רעש LSTM. הדוגמנית משתמשת במדל ערוץ רעש (NCM) כדי ליצור ניתוחים של חוסר השפעה של מועמדים n-הטובים ביותר, ודוגמנית שפת זיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר (LSTM) כדי לקבוע את משפטי השפעה הנתונים של כל ניתוח. נקודות המודל של שפת LSTM, יחד עם תכונות אחרות, משתמשים במקסנט הקרקע מחדש כדי לזהות את הניתוח האמין ביותר. אנחנו מראים שהשימוש בדוגמא לשפה LSTM בתהליך הקשר מחדש של דוגמא ערוץ רעש משפר את המצב המיוחד בזיהוי הרשלנות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྟོན་པ། The model uses a Noisy Channel Model (NCM) to generate n-best candidate disfluency analyses and a Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) language model to score the underlying fluent sentences of each analysis. The LSTM language model scores, along with other features, are used in a MaxEnt reranker to identify the most plausible analysis. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཡང་བསྐྱར་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་LSTM་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་སྒྲིག་ནི་noisy channel disfluency་མ་བཀོད་པའི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཡར་འཕ'}
{'en': 'On the Equivalence of Holographic and Complex Embeddings for Link Prediction', 'ar': 'حول معادلة التصوير المجسم والمطرزات المعقدة للتنبؤ بالارتباط', 'fr': "Sur l'équivalence des intégrations holographiques et complexes pour la prédiction de liens", 'pt': 'Sobre a Equivalência de Embeddings Holográficos e Complexos para Predição de Link', 'es': 'Sobre la equivalencia de incrustaciones holográficas y complejas para la predicción de enlaces', 'ja': 'リンク予測のためのホログラフィックと複雑な埋め込みの等価性について', 'zh': '其链接占全息杂嵌等价性', 'hi': 'लिंक भविष्यवाणी के लिए होलोग्राफिक और जटिल एम्बेडिंग की तुल्यता पर', 'ru': 'Об эквивалентности голографических и сложных вложений для предсказания связей', 'ga': 'Ar Choibhéis Leabaithe Holagrafacha agus Coimpléascacha le haghaidh Réamhthuar Nasc', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Για την Ισοδύναμη Ολογραφικών και Πολύπλοκων Ενσωματώσεων για την πρόβλεψη συνδέσεων', 'hu': 'A holografikus és komplex beágyazások egyenértékűségéről a linkelőrejelzéshez', 'it': "Sull'equivalenza degli incorporamenti olografici e complessi per la previsione dei collegamenti", 'lt': 'Dėl Holografinių ir sudėtingų įrangų lygiavertiškumo nuorodoms prognozuoti', 'kk': 'Холографиялық және комплексті сілтеменің алдын- ала ендіру үшін тең', 'ms': 'Pada Kesamaan Penjelmaan Holografik dan Kompleks untuk Prediksi Pautan', 'mk': 'На еднаквоста на холографски и комплексни вградувања за предвидување на врските', 'ml': 'ലിങ്ക് നിയന്ത്രണത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഹോളോഗ്രാഫിക്കും കമ്പ്ലെക്സ് എംബഡിങ്ങുകളുടെയും സമഭാവം', 'mn': 'Холографик болон комплекс холбоотой байрлалын тэнцүү байдалд', 'no': 'På likvidinga av holografiske og komplekse innbygging for lenkjeførehandsvising', 'mt': 'On the Equivalence of Holographic and Complex Embeddings for Link Prediction', 'pl': 'O równoważności holograficznych i złożonych osadzeń dla prognozowania linków', 'ro': 'Despre echivalenţa încorporărilor holografice şi complexe pentru predicţia legăturilor', 'sr': 'Na ekvivalenciji holografskih i kompleksnih integracija za predviđanje povezanja', 'so': 'Si u eg qalabka xiriirka', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Om ekvivalensen av holografiska och komplexa inbäddningar för länksförutsägelse', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு முன்னிருப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Về độ tương đồng các môi trường do phơi bày và phức tạp cho hạt liên kết.', 'bg': 'За еквивалентността на холографските и комплексните вграждания за прогнозиране на връзките', 'da': 'Om ækvivalensen af holografiske og komplekse indlejringer til link forudsigelse', 'id': 'Pada Kebarangan Holografik dan Penambangan Kompleks untuk Prediksi Link', 'hr': 'Na ekvivalenciji holografskih i kompleksnih integracija za predviđanje povezanja', 'nl': 'Over de equivalentie van holografische en complexe embeddings voor linkvoorspelling', 'fa': 'در برابر تفاوت هالوگرافیک و پیچیده\u200cهای پیچیده برای پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط', 'sw': 'On the Equivalence of Holographic and Complex Embeddings for Link Prediction', 'de': 'Zur Äquivalenz holographischer und komplexer Einbettungen für die Linkprädiktion', 'af': 'Op die Gelykheid van Holografiese en Kompleksie Inbêding vir Skakel Voorskou', 'sq': 'Në ekvivalencën e përfshirjeve holografike dhe komplekse për parashikimin e lidhjeve', 'ko': '링크 예측 중 홀로그램 삽입과 복삽입의 등가성', 'am': 'በHolographic እና Complex Embedding for Link Prediction', 'hy': 'Հոլոգրաֆիկ և բարդ կապերի կանխատեսման հավասարությունը', 'az': 'Holografi v…ô Komplex ńįfad…ôl…ôrin ńįfad…ôsind…ô', 'tr': 'Holografiýa we Tamamlaýyş Baglaýyşyň Öň Girişinde', 'ca': "En l'equivalent d'incorporacions hologràfiques i complexes per a prediccionar enllaços", 'cs': 'O ekvivalenci holografických a komplexních vložení pro predikci vazeb', 'bn': 'লিঙ্ক কনফিগ্রাফিক এবং কমপ্লেক্স এমবেডিং এর সমতুল্য', 'bs': 'Na ekvivalenciji holografskih i kompleksnih integracija za predviđanje povezanja', 'et': 'Holograafiliste ja komplekssete manustamiste samaväärsuse kohta linkide prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Holografisten ja monimutkaisten sulautusten vastaavuudesta linkkien ennustamiseen', 'jv': 'Nang Samurahan kanggo Bubungan holografi lan akeh cobuk kanggo Ketok Tulungan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'על השוואה של התקפים הולוגרפיים וממורכבים לציון קשרים', 'sk': 'O enakovrednosti holografskih in kompleksnih vdelav za napoved povezav', 'bo': 'On the Equivalence of Holographic and Complex Embeddings for Link Prediction'}
{'en': 'We show the equivalence of two state-of-the-art models for link prediction / knowledge graph completion : Nickel et al’s holographic embeddings and Trouillon et al.’s complex embeddings. We first consider a spectral version of the holographic embeddings, exploiting the frequency domain in the Fourier transform for efficient computation. The analysis of the resulting model reveals that it can be viewed as an instance of the complex embeddings with a certain constraint imposed on the initial vectors upon training. Conversely, any set of complex embeddings can be converted to a set of equivalent holographic embeddings.', 'ar': 'نعرض تكافؤ نموذجين من أحدث طرازات التنبؤ بالارتباط / إكمال الرسم البياني المعرفي: الزخارف الثلاثية الأبعاد لنيكل وآخرون وطرقات الزفاف المعقدة لـ Trouillon et al. نعتبر أولاً نسخة طيفية من الزخارف الثلاثية الأبعاد ، مستغلة مجال التردد في تحويل فورييه لإجراء حساب فعال. يكشف تحليل النموذج الناتج عن أنه يمكن النظر إليه كمثال على الزخارف المعقدة مع وجود قيود معينة مفروضة على المتجهات الأولية عند التدريب. على العكس من ذلك ، يمكن تحويل أي مجموعة من الزخارف المعقدة إلى مجموعة من الزخارف الثلاثية الأبعاد المكافئة.', 'pt': 'Mostramos a equivalência de dois modelos de última geração para predição de enlaces/completar grafos de conhecimento: os embeddings holográficos de Nickel et al e os embeddings complexos de Trouillon et al.. Primeiro, consideramos uma versão espectral dos embeddings holográficos, explorando o domínio da frequência na transformada de Fourier para computação eficiente. A análise do modelo resultante revela que ele pode ser visto como uma instância de embeddings complexos com uma certa restrição imposta aos vetores iniciais no treinamento. Por outro lado, qualquer conjunto de incorporações complexas pode ser convertido em um conjunto de incorporações holográficas equivalentes.', 'es': 'Mostramos la equivalencia de dos modelos de última generación para la predicción de enlaces y la finalización de gráficos de conocimiento: las incrustaciones holográficas de Nickel et al y Trouillon et al. incrustaciones complejas. Primero consideramos una versión espectral de las incrustaciones holográficas, aprovechando el dominio de la frecuencia en la transformada de Fourier para un cálculo eficiente. El análisis del modelo resultante revela que se puede ver como una instancia de las incrustaciones complejas con una cierta restricción impuesta a los vectores iniciales durante el entrenamiento. Por el contrario, cualquier conjunto de incrustaciones complejas se puede convertir en un conjunto de incrustaciones holográficas equivalentes.', 'fr': "Nous montrons l'équivalence de deux modèles de pointe pour la prédiction de liens/complétion du graphe de connaissances\xa0: les intégrations holographiques de Nickel et al. et Trouillon et al.\xa0» Embeddings complexes. Nous considérons d'abord une version spectrale des incorporations holographiques, exploitant le domaine fréquentiel dans la transformée de Fourier pour un calcul efficace. L'analyse du modèle résultant révèle qu'il peut être considéré comme une instance des intégrations complexes avec une certaine contrainte imposée aux vecteurs initiaux lors de l'apprentissage. Inversement, n'importe quel ensemble d'intégrations complexes peut être converti en un ensemble d'intégrations holographiques équivalentes.", 'zh': '展两先进之链接/知图谱成模形之等效性:Nickel等全息嵌Trouillon等杂嵌。 首虑全息嵌频谱版本,因傅里叶易中频域高效计。 凡所得之分析表明,视为杂嵌,加向量约束。 凡嵌入转换为等效者全息嵌之。', 'ja': 'リンク予測/ナレッジグラフの完了のための2つの最先端モデルの同等性を示しています：ニッケルらのホログラフィック埋め込みとTrouillonらの複雑な埋め込み。まず、効率的な計算のためにフーリエ変換の周波数領域を利用して、ホログラフィック埋め込みのスペクトルバージョンを検討します。得られたモデルの分析により、トレーニング時に初期ベクトルに一定の制約が課された複雑な埋め込みのインスタンスとして見ることができることが明らかになりました。逆に、複雑な埋め込みの任意のセットは、等価なホログラフィック埋め込みのセットに変換することができます。', 'hi': 'हम लिंक भविष्यवाणी / ज्ञान ग्राफ पूरा करने के लिए दो अत्याधुनिक मॉडल की समानता दिखाते हैं: निकल एट अल के होलोग्राफिक एम्बेडिंग और ट्रॉइलन एट अल के जटिल एम्बेडिंग। हम पहले होलोग्राफिक एम्बेडिंग के एक वर्णक्रमीय संस्करण पर विचार करते हैं, कुशल गणना के लिए फूरियर ट्रांसफॉर्म में आवृत्ति डोमेन का शोषण करते हैं। परिणामी मॉडल के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि इसे प्रशिक्षण पर प्रारंभिक वैक्टर पर लगाए गए एक निश्चित प्रतिबंध के साथ जटिल एम्बेडिंग के एक उदाहरण के रूप में देखा जा सकता है। इसके विपरीत, जटिल एम्बेडिंग के किसी भी सेट को समकक्ष होलोग्राफिक एम्बेडिंग के सेट में परिवर्तित किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Мы показываем эквивалентность двух современных моделей для предсказания связей/завершения графа знаний: голографические вложения Никеля и др. и сложные вложения Труйона и др. Сначала рассмотрим спектральную версию голографических вложений, использующих частотную область в преобразовании Фурье для эффективного вычисления. Анализ полученной модели показывает, что ее можно рассматривать как экземпляр сложных вложений с определенным ограничением, налагаемым на исходные векторы при обучении. И наоборот, любой набор сложных вложений может быть преобразован в набор эквивалентных голографических вложений.', 'ga': 'Léirímid coibhéis dhá shamhail úrscothach le haghaidh tuar naisc/graf eolais a chríochnú: leabaithe holagrafacha Nickel et al agus leabaithe casta Trouillon et al.. Breathnaímid ar dtús ar leagan speictreach de na leabaithe holografacha, ag baint leasa as an bhfearann minicíochta i gclaochlú Fourier le haghaidh ríomh éifeachtach. Léiríonn an anailís ar an tsamhail a d’eascair as gur féidir féachaint air mar shampla de na leabaithe casta a bhfuil srian áirithe curtha ar na veicteoirí tosaigh ar oiliúint. Os a choinne sin, is féidir aon sraith de leabaithe casta a thiontú go sraith de leabaithe holagrafacha coibhéiseacha.', 'ka': "ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ორი ხელსაწყოთა მოდელების განსაზღვრება/ცნობიერების გრაფიკის დასრულება: Nickel et al's holographic embeddings და Trouillon et al's complex embeddings. ჩვენ პირველად ვფიქრობთ ჰოლოგრაფიური ინბიდნეციების სპექტრალური ვერსია, რომელიც ფორიერის ტრანფორმაციაში ეფექტიური კომპუტაციაზე გამოიყენება. შემდეგ მოდელის ანალიზაცია აღმოჩნდება, რომ ის შეიძლება იყოს კომპლექციური ინტერსია, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული შეცდომა, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული შეცდომა, რომელიც საწყ შემდეგ, ყველა კომპლექსიკური ინბევინგიების ნახვა შეიძლება გადაცვლა კომპლექციური ჰოლოგრაფიკური ინბევინგიების ნახვა.", 'hu': 'Két korszerű modell egyenértékűségét mutatjuk be a kapcsolatelőrejelzés/tudásgráf kiegészítéséhez: a nikkel és mások holografikus beágyazásai és a Trouillon és mások komplex beágyazásai. Először a holografikus beágyazások spektrális változatát vesszük figyelembe, a Fourier transzformáció frekvenciatartományát kihasználva hatékony számításhoz. A kapott modell elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a képzés során a kezdeti vektorokra vonatkozó bizonyos korlátozással rendelkező komplex beágyazások példányaként tekinthető. Ezzel szemben a komplex beágyazások bármely halmaza átalakítható egyenértékű holografikus beágyazásokká.', 'el': 'Δείχνουμε την ισοδυναμία δύο μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την πρόβλεψη/ολοκλήρωση γραφήματος γνώσης: των ολογραφικών ενσωμάτωσης του νικελίου και των σύνθετων ενσωμάτωσης του κ.α. Πρώτα εξετάζουμε μια φασματική έκδοση των ολογραφικών ενσωματώσεων, αξιοποιώντας το πεδίο συχνότητας στον μετασχηματισμό Φουριέ για αποδοτικούς υπολογισμούς. Η ανάλυση του προκύπτοντος μοντέλου αποκαλύπτει ότι μπορεί να θεωρηθεί ως μια περίπτωση πολύπλοκων ενσωμάτωσης με έναν ορισμένο περιορισμό που επιβάλλεται στους αρχικούς φορείς κατά την εκπαίδευση. Αντίθετα, οποιοδήποτε σύνολο σύνθετων ενσωματώσεων μπορεί να μετατραπεί σε ένα σύνολο ισοδύναμων ολογραφικών ενσωματώσεων.', 'it': "Mostriamo l'equivalenza di due modelli all'avanguardia per la previsione dei collegamenti/completamento del grafico della conoscenza: gli incorporamenti olografici di Nickel et al e gli incorporamenti complessi di Trouillon et al. Consideriamo innanzitutto una versione spettrale delle incorporazioni olografiche, sfruttando il dominio di frequenza nella trasformazione Fourier per un calcolo efficiente. L'analisi del modello risultante rivela che esso può essere considerato come un esempio di incorporazioni complesse con un certo vincolo imposto ai vettori iniziali durante la formazione. Al contrario, qualsiasi insieme di incorporazioni complesse può essere convertito in un insieme di incorporazioni olografiche equivalenti.", 'kk': 'Біз сілтемелер мен білім графикалық толтыру үшін екі күй- жай моделдерінің ұқсастығын көрсетедік: Никел ет алдың холографикалық интеграциялары және Trouillon et. т. комплекс интеграциялары. Біз біріншіден холографикалық ендірудің спектралық нұсқасын ойлаймыз, Fourier жылдамдығын ефективті есептеу үшін қолданатын. Негізгі үлгісінің анализиясы ол комплекс ендірудің инстанциясы болып көрсетіледі. Бастапқы векторларға оқыту үшін ендірілген шектеулердің бірнеше шектеулері бар. Сонымен қатар, әрбір комплекс ендіру жиыны тең холографикалық ендіру жиына аударылады.', 'lt': 'Mes parodome dviejų naujausių modelių, skirtų s ąsajų prognozavimui ir (arba) žinių grafikai užbaigti, ekvivalentiškumą: Nickel et al. holografiniai įdėjimai ir Trouillon et al. sudėtingi įdėjimai. Pirmiausia svarstome holografinių įdėjimų spektrinę versiją, naudojant dažnių domeną Fourier transformacijoje veiksmingam skaičiavimui. Iš gauto modelio analizės matyti, kad jis gali būti vertinamas kaip sudėtingų įdėjimų, turinčių tam tikrą pradiniams vektoriams taikomą apribojimą mokymo metu, pavyzdys. Priešingai, bet koks sudėtingų sudedamųjų dalių rinkinys gali būti konvertuojamas į lygiaverčių holografinių sudedamųjų dalių rinkinį.', 'ms': 'Kami menunjukkan persamaan dua model terbaik untuk ramalan pautan/pelengkapan graf pengetahuan: penerbangan holografik Nickel et al dan penerbangan kompleks Trouillon et al. Kami pertama-tama mempertimbangkan versi spektral bagi penyembedding holografik, mengeksploitasi domain frekuensi dalam transformasi Fourier untuk pengiraan efisien. Analisis model yang menghasilkan menunjukkan bahawa ia boleh dilihat sebagai contoh penyambungan kompleks dengan keterangan tertentu yang ditetapkan pada vektor awal semasa latihan. Conversely, any set of complex embeddings can be converted to a set of equivalent holographic embeddings.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മോഡലുകളുടെ സമാനം കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. പ്രവചനം/അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാന്\u200d: നിക്കെല്\u200d എറ്റ് അലിന്റ നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഹോളോഗ്രാഫിക് അകത്തേക്കുള്ള ഒരു സ്പെക്ട്രേക്കല്\u200d പതിപ്പിനെ വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ഡൊമെനിലെ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ആദ്യമായ വെക്റ്ററുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ഒരു തടസ്സപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണത്തിന്റെ ഒരു ഉദാഹരണമായി കാണാന അതിനെപ്പറ്റിയാല്\u200d, സമമായ ഹോളോഗ്രാഫിക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് മാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും.', 'mk': 'Ја покажуваме еквивалентноста на двата најнови модели за завршување на графикот за предвидување/знаење на врските: холографските вградувања на Никел и други и комплексните вградувања на Тројлон и други. Прво размислуваме за спектрална верзија на холографските вложувања, искористувајќи го доменот на фреквенција во трансформацијата Фуриер за ефикасна компјутација. Анализата на резултатот на моделот открива дека може да се смета за пример на комплексните вградувања со одредени ограничувања наметнати на првичните вектори по обуката. Напротив, секој сет комплексни вградувања може да се претвори во сет еквивалентни холографски вградувања.', 'mt': 'Aħna nuru l-ekwivalenza ta’ żewġ mudelli l-aktar avvanzati għat-tbassir tal-konnessjonijiet/it-tlestija tal-grafika tal-għarfien: l-inkorporazzjonijiet olografiċi ta’ Nickel et al u l-inkorporazzjonijiet kumplessi ta’ Trouillon et al. L-ewwel nikkunsidraw verżjoni spettrali tal-inkorporazzjonijiet olografiċi, li tisfrutta d-dominju tal-frekwenza fit-trasformazzjoni Fourier għal komputazzjoni effiċjenti. L-analiżi tal-mudell li jirriżulta turi li dan jista’ jitqies bħala eżempju tal-inkorporazzjonijiet kumplessi b’ċerta restrizzjoni imposta fuq il-vetturi inizjali mat-taħriġ. Għall-kuntrarju, kwalunkwe sett ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet kumplessi jista’ jiġi kkonvertit f’sett ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet olografiċi ekwivalenti.', 'mn': "Бид хоёр урлагийн төвшин загварын тэнцүү байдлыг харуулж байна. Холбоо/мэдлэг графикийн төгсгөл байдлыг харуулж байна: Никел et al's holographic embeddings, Trouillon et.l.'s complex embedding. Эхлээд бид холографик хэмжээсүүдийн спектрал хувилбарыг бодож, Форьер-ын давхар хэмжээсүүдийг үр дүнтэй тооцооллын тулд ашиглаж байна. Үүний үр дүнтэй загварын шинжилгээ нь үүнийг суралцах үед эхний векторууд дээр зарим хязгаарлагдсан комплекс орнуудын жишээ гэж үзэж болно. Харин харьцангуй нь, бүх комплекс орлуулалт нь тэнцүү холографик орлуулалт руу шилжүүлж болно.", 'pl': 'Pokazujemy równoważność dwóch najnowocześniejszych modeli przewidywania łączy/uzupełniania wykresów wiedzy: osadzeń holograficznych Nickel et al. oraz osadzeń złożonych Trouillon et al. Najpierw rozważamy widmową wersję holograficznych osadzeń, wykorzystującą obszar częstotliwości transformacji Fouriera do efektywnych obliczeń. Analiza powstałego modelu ujawnia, że można go postrzegać jako przykład złożonych osadzeń z pewnym ograniczeniem nakładanym na wektory początkowe podczas treningu. Odwrotnie, dowolny zestaw złożonych osadzeń można przekonwertować na zestaw równoważnych osadzeń holograficznych.', 'no': 'Vi viser ekvivalensen av to kunstmodeller for å fullføra lenkjeforegåve/kunnskap grafikk: holografiske innbygging av Nickel et al og komplekse innbygging av Trouillon et al. Vi ser først på ein spektral versjon av holografiske innbyggingar, som brukar frekvensdomenet i Fourier-transformasjonen for effektivt datamaskin. Analysen av den resultanta modellen viser at det kan verta vist som eksempel av komplekse innbygging med ein bestemt begrensning innløyst på den første vektorane ved opplæring. Omvendt kan alle komplekse innbyggingar konverterast til eit sett av ekvivalente holografiske innbyggingar.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm echivalența a două modele de ultimă generație pentru predicția legăturilor/completarea graficului cunoștințelor: încorporările holografice Nickel și alții și încorporările complexe Trouillon și alții. Considerăm mai întâi o versiune spectrală a încorporărilor holografice, exploatând domeniul de frecvență din transforma Fourier pentru calcul eficient. Analiza modelului rezultat arată că acesta poate fi văzut ca un exemplu al încorporărilor complexe cu o anumită constrângere impusă vectorilor inițiali la formare. Dimpotrivă, orice set de încorporări complexe poate fi convertit într-un set de încorporări holografice echivalente.', 'so': "Waxaynu tusaynaa isku mid ah labada noocyo oo farshaxan oo u eg labada iskuul ee la xiriira wax lagu sii daayay/dhamaystirayo fasaxa aqoonta: Nickel et al's holografi iyo Trouillon et al's murugaysan. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa warqad ka mid ah qolografihii, waxaana ku isticmaalaynaa meesha lagu beddelayo afarta isbedelka ee xisaabta faa’iido leh. Baaritaanka modellka soo socda wuxuu muujin karaa in lagu arko tusaale ahaan qalabka adag oo lagu qasbay wadooyinka hore ee waxbarashada. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu beddeli karaa hab kasta oo qalabka adag oo isku mid ah oo holografiga ah.", 'sr': "Pokazujemo ekvivalentnost dva modela umjetnosti za završavanje predviđanja/znanja grafika veze: holografske integracije Nickel et al i kompleksnih integracija Trouillon et al.'a. Prvo razmišljamo o spektralnoj verziji holografskih integracija, koristeći domenu frekvencije u transformaciji Fourier a za efikasno računalo. Analiza rezultatnog model a pokazuje da se može smatrati primjerom kompleksnog ugrađenja sa određenim ograničenjem uvedenim na početne vekore na obuku. U suprotnom, svaki set kompleksnih integracija se može pretvoriti u set ekvivalentnih holografskih integracija.", 'si': "අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ථානය-of-the-art මෝඩල් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්/දන්නවන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා: Nickel et al's Holographic Embdings අපි මුලින්ම හෝලෝග්\u200dරාෆික් සංවිධානයේ ස්පෙක්ටර් සංවිධානයක් හිතනවා, ෆෝරියර් සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරවිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ඒක පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙක්ටර් වලට පටන් ගත්ත වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, සංකෘතිය සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ", 'sv': 'Vi visar likvärdigheten mellan två toppmoderna modeller för länkprognose/kunskapsgrafkomplettering: Nickel et als holografiska inbäddningar och Trouillon et als komplexa inbäddningar. Vi överväger först en spektral version av holografiska inbäddningar, som utnyttjar frekvensdomänen i Fouriertransformationen för effektiv beräkning. Analysen av den resulterande modellen visar att den kan ses som ett exempel på komplexa inbäddningar med en viss begränsning på de initiala vektorerna vid utbildning. Omvänt kan alla uppsättningar komplexa inbäddningar omvandlas till en uppsättning motsvarande holografiska inbäddningar.', 'ta': 'நாம் இரண்டு நிலையில் கலை மாதிரிகளின் சமன்பாடு நாம் முதலில் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட பதிப்பை பார்க்க வேண்டும், நான்கு மாற்றத்திற்கு வெளிப்படையான கணக்கிற்கான அதிர்வெண்ட் களத்தை பயன் முடிவு மாதிரியின் ஆய்வு தெரிவிக்கும் அது பயிற்சியின் மீது சில கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட சிக்கல் உள்ளடக்கங்களின் மாதிரியாக பார்க் மாறாக, எந்த சிக்கலான பொருள்கள் உள்ளடக்கங்களுக்கும் சமமான holographic உடைப்புகளுக்கு மாற்றப்பட முடியும்.', 'ur': 'ہم نے لینک پیش بینی/علم گراف کامل کے لئے دو موڈل کی برابری دکھائی ہے: نیکل ت ال کی هولوگرافی ابڈینگ اور Trouillon et al کے پیچیدہ ابڈینگ. ہم پہلی بار هولوگرافیک ایمبڈینگ کے ایک اسپٹرال ورژن سمجھتے ہیں، فاوریر کی تغییر کے لئے فارکانسی ڈومین کو مفید کمپیوٹینگ کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. نتیجہ مدل کا تحلیل ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ اسے تعلیم پر پہلی ویکتروں پر ایک محدودیت کے ساتھ پیچیدہ ایمبڈینگ کے مثال کے طور پر دیکھ سکتا ہے. مخالفت سے، ہر پیچیدہ ایمبڈینگ کا مجموعہ برابر ہولوگرافیک ایمبڈینگ میں تبدیل کر سکتا ہے.', 'vi': "Chúng tôi cho thấy s ự tương đồng của hai mẫu thời đại để hoàn thành dự đoán liên kết/đồ đồ dẫn tri thức: Những sự tác giả ba chiều của Nicki et al's phức tạp sự gắn ghép. Trước tiên, chúng ta xem xét một phiên bản phổ biến của sự ghép hình ảo, khai thác các miền tần số trong phiên biến đổi Fourier để tính hiệu quả. Phân tích của mô hình kết quả cho thấy nó có thể được xem là một ví dụ của sự gắn kết phức tạp với một hạn chế nào đó được áp đặt lên cơ quan cơ bản của huấn luyện. Ngược lại, bất kỳ bộ trộn phức tạp nào có thể được chuyển đổi thành một bộ chứa ảnh ba chiều tương đương.", 'uz': "Biz taqdimot/ilmiy grafikni tuzish uchun ikkita holografik modellarini ko'rsamiz: Nickel et al'ning holografik tuzilishini va Trouillon et al'ning murakkab narsalarni ko'rsamiz. Biz birinchi holografik tuzilishining spektral versiyasini o'ylaymiz, to'rtta o'zgarishni qo'llash uchun foydalanuvchi frequency domain ishlatimiz. Natija modelining analyzeri xususiyatli, bu ta'limni taʼminlovchi sohasida bir qanday qanday qanday qanday qanday murakkab embedlari sifatida koʻrinadi. Ko'pchilik qanday murakkab bo'lgan narsalarning bir ko'plab holografik joylashtirishi mumkin.", 'bg': 'Показваме еквивалентността на два най-съвременни модела за прогнозиране на връзките/завършване на графиката на знанието: холографските вграждания на Никел и др. и сложните вграждания на Труйлон и др. Първо разглеждаме спектрална версия на холографските вграждания, използвайки честотния домейн в преобразуването на Фурие за ефективно изчисляване. Анализът на получения модел показва, че той може да се разглежда като пример на сложните вграждания с определено ограничение, наложено на първоначалните вектори при обучението. Обратно, всеки набор от сложни вграждания може да бъде преобразуван в набор от еквивалентни холографски вграждания.', 'hr': "Mi pokazujemo ekvivalentnost dva modela umjetnosti za završavanje predviđanja/znanja grafika povezanja: holografske integracije Nickel et al-a i kompleksnih integracija Trouillon et al.'a. Prvo razmišljamo o spektralnoj verziji holografskih integracija, koristeći domenu frekvencije u transformaciji Fourier a za učinkovito računalo. Analiza rezultatnog model a pokazuje da se može smatrati primjerom kompleksnog ugrađenja s određenim ograničenjem stavljenim na početne vekore na obuku. U suprotnom, svaki set kompleksnog ugrađenja može se pretvoriti u set ekvivalentnih holografskih ugrađenja.", 'de': "Wir zeigen die Äquivalenz zweier State-of-the-Art Modelle für Link Vorhersage/Knowledge Graph Vervollständigung: Nickel et al's holographische Einbettungen und Trouillon et al.'s komplexe Einbettungen. Zunächst betrachten wir eine spektrale Version der holographischen Einbettungen, die den Frequenzbereich in der Fourier-Transformation für effiziente Berechnungen ausnutzt. Die Analyse des resultierenden Modells zeigt, dass es als Instanz der komplexen Einbettungen mit einer gewissen Einschränkung betrachtet werden kann, die den anfänglichen Vektoren beim Training auferlegt wird. Umgekehrt kann jeder Satz komplexer Einbettungen in eine Reihe gleichwertiger holographischer Einbettungen konvertiert werden.", 'ko': '우리는 링크 예측/지식도에서 완성된 두 가지 최첨단 모델의 등가성을 보여 주었다. 니켈 등의 홀로그램 삽입과 트롤론 등의 복잡한 삽입이다.우리는 우선 홀로그램이 삽입된 스펙트럼 버전을 고려하여 푸리엽이 변환된 주파수를 이용하여 효율적인 계산을 한다.결과 모델에 대한 분석에 따르면 이것은 복잡하게 박힌 실례로 간주되고 훈련할 때 초기 벡터에 일정한 제약을 가할 수 있다.반대로, 어떤 복잡한 삽입도 같은 효과의 홀로그램 삽입으로 변환할 수 있다.', 'nl': 'We tonen de equivalentie van twee state-of-the-art modellen voor linkvoorspelling/kennisgrafiekvoltooiing: holografische embeddingen van Nickel et al. en complexe embeddingen van Trouillon et al. We overwegen eerst een spectrale versie van de holografische embeddings, waarbij het frequentiedomein in de Fourier transformatie wordt benut voor efficiënte berekening. Uit de analyse van het resulterende model blijkt dat het kan worden gezien als een voorbeeld van de complexe embeddings met een bepaalde beperking opgelegd aan de initiële vectoren bij training. Omgekeerd kan elke set complexe embeddings worden geconverteerd naar een set equivalente holografische embeddings.', 'da': "Vi viser ækvivalensen af to state-of-the-art modeller for link forudsigelse / viden graffærdiggørelse: Nickel et al's holografiske embeddings og Trouillon et al.'s komplekse embeddings. Vi overvejer først en spektral version af de holografiske indlejringer, der udnytter frekvensdomænet i Fourier transformationen til effektiv beregning. Analysen af den resulterende model viser, at den kan betragtes som et eksempel på komplekse indlejringer med en vis begrænsning for de indledende vektorer under uddannelse. Omvendt kan ethvert sæt komplekse indlejringer konverteres til et sæt tilsvarende holografiske indlejringer.", 'fa': 'ما برابری دو مدل موقعیت هنری را برای تغییر پیش بینی/تعلیم گراف علم نشان می دهیم: انبوه های هولوگرافیک نیکل et الی و انبوه های پیچیده Trouillon et al. اولین بار نسخه\u200cای از انجمن\u200cهای هولوگرافیک را در نظر می\u200cگیریم، با استفاده از دامنۀ فرکانس در تغییر فوریر برای محاسبات موثر استفاده می\u200cکنیم. تحلیل مدل نتیجه نشان می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند به عنوان نمونه\u200cای از پیچیده\u200cهای پیچیده با یک محدودیت خاصی که بر ویکتورهای اولیه در تمرین قرار داده می\u200cشود ببیند. در عوض، هر مجموعه\u200cای از پیچیده\u200cهای پیچیده می\u200cتواند به مجموعه\u200cای از پیچیده\u200cهای هولوگرافی برابر تبدیل شود.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha sawa na mifano miwili ya hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kuunganisha utabiri/ufahamu wa ufahamu: matumizi ya holografia ya Nickel na Trouillon et al. Kwanza tunafikiria toleo la maeneo ya holografia, kwa kutumia maeneo ya kiwango katika mabadiliko ya nne kwa ajili ya hisabati yenye ufanisi. Uchambuzi wa mtindo wa matokeo unaonyesha kuwa unaweza kuonekana kama mfano wa mazingira ya utata na kizuizi fulani kinachowekwa kwenye vector za mwanzo kwa mafunzo. Kwa mujibu wa hilo, mfululizo wowote wa matumizi magumu unaweza kubadilishwa kwenye mfululizo wa maeneo yanayofanana na holografia.', 'tr': "Biz 2 durum-resim modellerinin öngörüm/bilim grafisinin tamamlaması için eşittiğini gösteriyoruz: Nickel et al'in holografik içerimleri ve Trouillon et.l.'in karmaşık içerimleri. İlk olarak holografik içerimlerin spektral bir versiyonu düşünüyoruz ve Fourier'in frekans domenini etkinlik hesaplamak için kullanıyoruz. Sonuç modelinin analizi, başlangıç vektörlerde eğitim üzerinde belirlenmiş bir şekilde karmaşık integrlerin örneksi olarak görülebilir. Üstelikde, her bir karmaşık integrler birnäçe ekvivalent holografik ködlemelere üýtgedilebilir.", 'af': "Ons wys die gelykenis van twee state-of-the-art modele vir skakel voorskou/kennis graaf voltooiing: Nickel et al se holografiese inbêdings en Trouillon et al se komplekse inbêdings. Ons neem eerste aan 'n spektrale weergawe van die holografiese inbêdings, wat die frekwensiedomein in die Fourier transformeer vir effektief rekenaar uitgebruik. Die analisie van die resulteerde model vertoon dat dit as 'n voorbeeld van die komplekse inbettings met 'n sekere begrens wat op die aanvanklike vektore op onderwerp ingestel word. Omgeskakel, enige stel van komplekse inbêdings kan omskakel word na 'n stel van gelykivalente holografiese inbêdings.", 'am': 'የሁለት የአውቀት ግንኙነት አካባቢ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የኮሎographic አካባቢ ክፍል እናስታውቃለን፤ በአራቱ ውጤት የፍሬክራሲ አካባቢ ቁጥጥር ለመጠቀም እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የፍጥረቱ ሞዴል መተርጓሜ የመጀመሪያው vector በተማሪዎች ላይ ግንኙነት የተደረገ የውጤት አካባቢ ምሳሌ እንዲታይ ይገልጣል፡፡ በተለይ፣ ማንኛውም ተጨማሪ አካባቢዎች በተለያዩ የholographic አካባቢዎች ለመለስ ይችላል፡፡', 'id': 'Kami menunjukkan ekvivalensi dua model state-of-the-art untuk prediksi hubungan/selesai grafik pengetahuan: penerbangan holografik Nickel et al dan penerbangan kompleks Trouillon et al. We first consider a spectral version of the holographic embeddings, exploiting the frequency domain in the Fourier transform for efficient computation.  Analisis dari model hasilnya mengungkapkan bahwa hal ini dapat dilihat sebagai contoh dari pembangunan kompleks dengan keterangan tertentu yang ditetapkan pada vektor awal pada pelatihan. Sebaliknya, setiap set embedding kompleks dapat diubah ke set embedding holografik yang sama.', 'hy': "Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս կապերի կանխատեսման և գիտելիքի գրաֆիկի ավարտացման երկու նորագույն մոդելների հավասարակշռությունը' Նիկել և այլների հոլոգրաֆիկ ներդրումները և Թրոուլլոն և այլների բարդ ներդրումները: Սկզբում մենք դիտարկում ենք հոլոգրաֆիկ ներդրումների սպեկտրալ տարբերակը, օգտագործելով Foureer-ի հաճախականության բնագավառը արդյունավետ հաշվարկների համար: The analysis of the resulting model reveals that it can be viewed as an instance of the complex embeddings with a certain constraint imposed on the initial vectors upon training.  Հակառակը, բարդ ներդրումների ցանկացած խումբ կարող է վերածվել հավասար հոլոգրաֆիկ ներդրումների խումբի:", 'sq': 'Ne tregojmë ekvivalencën e dy modeleve më të larta për përfundimin e grafikut të parashikimit të lidhjes/njohurisë: përfundimet holografike të Nickel et al dhe përfundimet komplekse të Trouillon et al. Ne së pari konsiderojmë një version spektral të përfshirjeve holografike, duke shfrytëzuar domenin e frekuencës në transformimin Fourier për llogaritje të efektshme. Analiza e model it rezultues zbulon se mund të shihet si një shembull i përfshirjeve komplekse me një kufizim të caktuar të vënë në vektorët fillestarë në trajnim. Përkundrazi, çdo grup përfshirjesh komplekse mund të konvertohet në një grup përfshirjesh holografike ekvivalente.', 'bn': 'আমরা দুই রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের মডেলের সমতুল্য দেখাচ্ছি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী/জ্ঞান গ্রাফ পূর্ণ করার জন্য: নিকেল এন্ট আলের হোলোগ্রাফিক বিষয়বস্তু এবং ট্রুয়িলো আমরা প্রথমে হোলোগ্রাফিক বিভিন্ন সংস্করণ বিবেচনা করি, চারটি রান্নারের ফ্রেঞ্চ ডোমেইন ব্যবহার করে কার্যকর গণনার জন্য। ফলাফল মডেলের বিশ্লেষণ প্রকাশ করে যে প্রশিক্ষণের সময় প্রাথমিক ভেক্টরের উপর নির্দিষ্ট নিয়মিত একটি নিষেধাজ্ঞা হিসেবে এটি দেখা যাবে। একই সাথে যেকোন জটিল বিষয়টি জটিল বিষয়বস্তুতে পরিণত হতে পারে।', 'az': "İki möcüzə modellərin müəyyən edilməsi/bilim grafının tamamlanmasını göstəririk: Nickel et al's holographic embeddings və Trouillon et al's complex embeddings. Biz ilk dəfə holografi inbinglərin spektral versiyasını düşünürük, Fourier transformasyonunda faydalı hesablama üçün frekans domenini istifadə edirik. Növbəti modelinin analizi göstərir ki, bunun ilk vektörlərə təhsil edilməsində müəyyən edilmiş kompleks inbinglərin məsəli olaraq görə bilər. Dərgahca, hər bir kompleks içərisində eyni holografi içərisində dönüşdürülə bilər.", 'cs': 'Ukazujeme ekvivalenci dvou nejmodernějších modelů pro predikci vazeb/dokončování znalostních grafů: holografických vložení Nickel et al. a komplexních vložení Trouillon et al. Nejprve uvažujeme o spektrální verzi holografických vložení, využívající frekvenční oblasti Fourierovy transformace pro efektivní výpočet. Analýza výsledného modelu ukazuje, že jej lze považovat za instanci komplexních vložení s určitým omezením uloženým na počáteční vektory při tréninku. Naopak, libovolná sada složitých vložení může být převedena na sadu ekvivalentních holografických vložení.', 'ca': "Mostrem l'equivalent de dos models més avançats per a la predicció de enllaços/completació del gràfic del coneixement: les incorporacions hologràfiques de Nickel et al. i les complexes incorporacions de Trouillon et al. Primer considerem una versió espectral de les incorporacions hologràfiques, explotant el domini de freqüències de la transformació Fourier per a una computació eficient. The analysis of the resulting model reveals that it can be viewed as an instance of the complex embeddings with a certain constraint imposed on the initial vectors upon training.  Per altra banda, qualsevol conjunt d'integracions complexes es pot convertir en un conjunt d'integracions hologràfiques equivalents.", 'et': 'Näitame kahe kaasaegse mudeli samaväärsust seoste prognoosimiseks/teadmisgraafikute lõpetamiseks: Nickel et al holograafilised manustamised ja Trouillon et al. komplekssed manustamised. Kõigepealt kaalume holograafiliste manustamiste spektraalset versiooni, kasutades Fourieri teisenduse sageduse domeeni efektiivseks arvutamiseks. Tulemuseks saadud mudeli analüüs näitab, et seda võib vaadelda kui keerukat integreerimist, kus algvektoritele koolitusel kehtestatakse teatud piirangud. Vastupidiselt võib keeruliste manustamiste komplekti teisendada samaväärsete holograafiliste manustamiste komplektiks.', 'bs': "Mi pokazujemo ekvivalentnost dva modela umjetnosti za završavanje predviđanja/znanja grafika povezanja: holografske integracije Nickel et al i kompleksnih integracija Trouillona et al.'a. Prvo razmišljamo o spektralnoj verziji holografskih integracija, koristeći domenu frekvencije u transformaciji Fourier a za učinkovito računalo. Analiza rezultatnog model a pokazuje da se može smatrati primjerom kompleksnog ugrađenja sa određenim ograničenjem uvedenom na početne vekore na obuku. U suprotnom, svaki set kompleksnih integracija se može pretvoriti u set ekvivalentnih holografskih integracija.", 'fi': 'Osoitamme kahden viimeisintä tekniikkaa edustavan mallin vastaavuuden linkin ennustamiseen/tietograafiseen viimeistelyyn: Nickel et al:n holografiset upotukset ja Trouillon et al:n monimutkaiset upotukset. Harkitsemme ensin holografisten upotusten spektriversiota hyödyntäen Fourier-muunnoksen taajuusaluetta tehokkaaseen laskentaan. Tuloksena olevan mallin analyysi osoittaa, että sitä voidaan pitää esimerkkinä monimutkaisista upotuksista, joihin liittyy tietty rajoitus, joka kohdistuu peruskoulutukseen. Toisaalta kaikki monimutkaiset upotukset voidaan muuntaa vastaaviksi holografisiksi upotuksiksi.', 'jv': 'We show the balance of 2 state-of-the-art s modes for link preview/knownGraph Completement: NICKEL et al\'s holograph embedding and throughlan et al\'. s komplex embedding. We first contest a pectural version of the holograph embedding, expanding the rate domain in the Fireriar transform for effectual accounting. Genjer politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "Tuna nuna misãlai biyu na-state-of-art wa mai haɗi ga gabanin/cikakken fassarar ilmi: Nickel et al's olaografic embargo da Truuillon et al's samun kassauta. Kayyan farkon, za'a sami wani tsohon na hulografi da ke cikin mutane na Four-shida ko da za'a lissafa kafi. Ana ƙayyade motel ɗin ta ƙara, yana bayyana cewa za'a iya kallo shi kamar misãlin embodi masu adadi da wani ƙunci wanda aka ƙudura a kan shiryoyi na farko idan na yi wa mafarin. A sami, za'a musanya kowace matsayi masu adadi zuwa wani daidaita filografi masu daidaita.", 'he': 'אנחנו מראים את השוואה של שני דוגמנים חדשים לחזוי חיזוי/גרף הידע: ההולוגרפיות של ניקל ואל והולוגרפיות המורכבות של טרוילון ואל. We first consider a spectral version of the holographic embeddings, exploiting the frequency domain in the Fourier transform for efficient computation.  הניתוח של המודל הנוצא מראה שהוא יכול להיראות כמו דוגמא של התכניות המורכבות בניגוד לכך, כל קבוצה של תוכניות מורכבות יכולה להפוך לקבוצה של תוכניות הולוגרפיות שוויות.', 'sk': 'Prikazujemo enakovrednost dveh najsodobnejših modelov za napoved povezav/dokončanje grafov znanja: holografskih vdelav Nickel et al. in kompleksnih vdelav Trouillon et al. Najprej razmišljamo o spektralni verziji holografskih vdelav, ki izkorišča frekvenčno domeno v Fourierjevi transformaciji za učinkovito izračunavanje. Analiza rezultatov modela kaže, da ga je mogoče obravnavati kot primer kompleksnih vključitev z določeno omejitvijo začetnih vektorjev pri usposabljanju. Nasprotno pa se lahko kateri koli niz kompleksnih vdelav pretvori v niz enakovrednih holografskih vdelav.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣང་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་དང་མཐུད་གྲངས་ཀ་གི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། We first consider a spectral version of the holographic embeddings, exploiting the frequency domain in the Fourier transform for efficient computation. The analysis of the resulting model reveals that it can be viewed as an instance of the complex embeddings with a certain constraint imposed on the initial vectors upon training. དེ་ལྡོག་ནི། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་རུང་ཞིག་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཐབས་ཆོག་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Sentence Embedding for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'ar': 'تضمين الجملة لتكييف مجال ترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'es': 'Incorporación de oraciones para la adaptación de dominios de traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Incorporação de sentenças para adaptação de domínio de tradução automática neural', 'fr': "Intégration de phrases pour l'adaptation du domaine de traduction automatique neuronale", 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション・ドメイン・アダプテーションのための文章埋め込み', 'zh': '神经机器翻译域应句嵌', 'ru': 'Встраивание предложения для адаптации домена перевода нейронных машин', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए वाक्य एम्बेडिंग', 'ga': 'Leabú Pianbhreithe le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn um Aistriú Inneall Néarach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Ítélet beágyazása a Neural Machine Translation Domain adaptációhoz', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση φράσεων για την προσαρμογή του τομέα της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'it': 'Embedding della frase per adattamento del dominio di traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару домен адаптациясының сөздерді ендіру', 'mk': 'Вклучување на реченици за адаптација на доменот за превод на неврални машини', 'lt': 'Nuorodų įterpimas į neurologinių mašinų vertimo domeno pritaikymą', 'ms': 'Penjelmaan Perubahan Domain Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'Sentenza Embedding for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ശിക്ഷ എംബെഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'no': 'Innebygging av teikn for nøyrale maskinomsettingsdomene', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэх домены адаптация', 'pl': 'Wbudowanie zdań dla adaptacji domeny neuronalnego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Încorporarea sentințelor pentru adaptarea domeniului de traducere automată neurală', 'sr': 'Usporavanje rečenica za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških mašina', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවක් ඩෝමින් අනුවාර්තාවක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණය', 'so': 'Adaptation Domain', 'sv': 'Meningsinbäddning för Neural Machine Translation Domain Anpassning', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு களம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Tarjima xonasi', 'vi': 'Lê phong cho máy thần kinh dịch nền sửa chữa miền', 'da': 'Sætningsindlejring til Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaption', 'nl': 'Zinn insluiten voor Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'bg': 'Вградване на изречения за адаптиране на домейна за неврален машинен превод', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Perkataan untuk Adaptasi Domain Translation Mesin Neural', 'hr': 'Usporavanje izraza za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'de': 'Satz-Einbettung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung Domänenanpassung', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 영역 자체 적응 문장 삽입', 'tr': 'Nural Makina Çevirmek Domäni Taýýarlama üçin sözleri girdirilýär', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Hukumu inapanda kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani', 'fa': 'Comment', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Nöral Makinat Çeviri Domain Adpaqlaması', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i Dënimeve për Adaptimin e Domenit të Translacionit të Makinës Neurale', 'ca': 'Sentences Embedding for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'bs': 'Usporavanje kazna za adaptaciju domena neurološkog prevoda', 'cs': 'Vložení věty pro adaptaci domény neuronového strojového překladu', 'bn': 'Sentence Embedding for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'fi': 'Lausekkeen upotus neuraalikonekäännöksen verkkotunnuksen mukauttamista varten', 'et': 'lause manustamine neuroaalse masintõlke domeeni kohandamiseks', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'התאמה של גזר משפט עבור התרגמות של מחלקת המכונה העצבית', 'sk': 'Vgradnja stavkov za prilagajanje domene nevronskega strojnega prevajanja', 'bo': 'Neural Machine་ལུགས་སྤྱོད་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Although new corpora are becoming increasingly available for machine translation, only those that belong to the same or similar domains are typically able to improve translation performance. Recently Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has become prominent in the field. However, most of the existing domain adaptation methods only focus on phrase-based machine translation. In this paper, we exploit the NMT’s internal embedding of the source sentence and use the sentence embedding similarity to select the sentences which are close to in-domain data. The empirical adaptation results on the IWSLT English-French and NIST Chinese-English tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by 2.4-9.0 BLEU points, outperforming the existing state-of-the-art baseline by 2.3-4.5 BLEU points.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن المجموعات الجديدة أصبحت متاحة بشكل متزايد للترجمة الآلية ، إلا أن تلك التي تنتمي إلى نفس المجالات أو المجالات المماثلة هي القادرة عادةً على تحسين أداء الترجمة. أصبحت الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) مؤخرًا بارزة في هذا المجال. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم أساليب تكييف المجال الحالية تركز فقط على الترجمة الآلية القائمة على العبارات. في هذه الورقة ، نستغل التضمين الداخلي لـ NMT للجملة المصدر ونستخدم تشابه تضمين الجملة لتحديد الجمل القريبة من بيانات المجال. تُظهر نتائج التكيف التجريبي في مهام IWSLT الإنجليزية-الفرنسية و NIST الصينية-الإنجليزية أن الأساليب المقترحة يمكن أن تحسن أداء NMT بشكل كبير بمقدار 2.4-9.0 نقطة BLEU ، متفوقة على أحدث خط الأساس الحالي بنسبة 2.3-4.5 نقطة BLEU .', 'pt': 'Embora novos corpora estejam cada vez mais disponíveis para tradução automática, apenas aqueles que pertencem ao mesmo domínio ou domínios semelhantes são capazes de melhorar o desempenho da tradução. Recentemente, a tradução automática neural (NMT) tornou-se proeminente no campo. No entanto, a maioria dos métodos de adaptação de domínio existentes se concentra apenas na tradução automática baseada em frases. Neste artigo, exploramos a incorporação interna da sentença fonte do NMT e usamos a similaridade de incorporação de sentenças para selecionar as sentenças que estão próximas aos dados do domínio. Os resultados da adaptação empírica nas tarefas IWSLT inglês-francês e NIST chinês-inglês mostram que os métodos propostos podem melhorar substancialmente o desempenho do NMT em 2,4-9,0 pontos BLEU, superando a linha de base de última geração existente em 2,3-4,5 pontos BLEU .', 'es': 'Aunque cada vez hay más corpus nuevos disponibles para la traducción automática, solo aquellos que pertenecen al mismo dominio o a dominios similares pueden mejorar el rendimiento de la traducción. Recientemente, la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) se ha hecho prominente en este campo. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los métodos de adaptación de dominios existentes solo se centran en la traducción automática basada en frases. En este artículo, explotamos la incrustación interna del NMT de la oración fuente y utilizamos la similitud de incrustación de oraciones para seleccionar las oraciones que están cerca de los datos del dominio. Los resultados de adaptación empírica en las tareas IWSLT inglés-francés y chino-inglés del NIST muestran que los métodos propuestos pueden mejorar sustancialmente el rendimiento de NMT en 2.4 a 9.0 puntos BLEU, superando a la línea de base de vanguardia existente en 2.3 a 4.5 puntos BLEU.', 'fr': "Bien que de nouveaux corpus soient de plus en plus disponibles pour la traduction automatique, seuls ceux qui appartiennent au même domaine ou à des domaines similaires sont généralement capables d'améliorer les performances de traduction. Récemment, la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) est devenue importante dans le domaine. Cependant, la plupart des méthodes d'adaptation de domaine existantes se concentrent uniquement sur la traduction automatique basée sur des phrases. Dans cet article, nous exploitons l'intégration interne de la phrase source par le NMT et utilisons la similarité d'inclusion de phrases pour sélectionner les phrases proches des données internes au domaine. Les résultats empiriques de l'adaptation des tâches anglais-français IWSLT et chinois-anglais du NIST montrent que les méthodes proposées peuvent améliorer considérablement les performances NMT de 2,4 à 9,0 points UEBL, surpassant le niveau de référence actuel de 2,3 à 4,5 points BLEU.", 'ja': '新しいコーパは機械翻訳にますます利用できるようになってきていますが、通常、同じまたは類似のドメインに属するものだけが翻訳パフォーマンスを向上させることができます。最近では、ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）がこの分野で顕著になってきている。しかし、既存のドメイン適応方法のほとんどは、フレーズベースの機械翻訳にのみ焦点を当てています。本稿では、NMTのソース文の内部埋め込みを利用し、文埋め込みの類似性を利用して、ドメイン内データに近い文を選択する。IWSLT英仏およびNIST中国英語タスクの実証的な適応結果は、提案された方法は、NMTパフォーマンスを2.4〜9.0 BLEUポイント実質的に改善することができ、既存の最先端のベースラインを2.3〜4.5 BLEUポイント上回ることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यद्यपि नया कॉर्पोरेट मशीन अनुवाद के लिए तेजी से उपलब्ध हो रहा है, केवल वे जो समान या समान डोमेन से संबंधित हैं, आमतौर पर अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने में सक्षम होते हैं। हाल ही में न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) इस क्षेत्र में प्रमुख हो गया है। हालांकि, मौजूदा डोमेन अनुकूलन विधियों में से अधिकांश केवल वाक्यांश-आधारित मशीन अनुवाद पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम NMT के स्रोत वाक्य के आंतरिक एम्बेडिंग का फायदा उठाते हैं और उन वाक्यों का चयन करने के लिए समानता को एम्बेड करने वाले वाक्य का उपयोग करते हैं जो इन-डोमेन डेटा के करीब हैं। IWSLT अंग्रेजी-फ्रेंच और NIST चीनी-अंग्रेजी कार्यों पर अनुभवजन्य अनुकूलन परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित तरीके 2.4-9.0 BLEU बिंदुओं द्वारा NMT प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं, मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखा को 2.3-4.5 BLEU बिंदुओं से पीछे छोड़ सकते हैं।', 'zh': '虽新语料库益多于机器翻译,然同相似域者语料库常得重译性。 近者,神经机器翻译(NMT)出其域。 然大抵见域应法,惟关短语机器翻译。 本文以NMT对源句内嵌,而以句嵌相似性择近域数句。 IWSLT英法、NIST中英文之实应结果表明,能增NMT性2.4~9.0 BLEU,增于今基线2.3~4.5 BLEU。', 'ru': 'Хотя новые корпуса становятся все более доступными для машинного перевода, только те, которые принадлежат к одним и тем же или подобным доменам, обычно способны улучшить производительность перевода. В последнее время нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) стал заметным в этой области. Тем не менее, большинство существующих методов адаптации домена сосредоточены только на машинном переводе на основе фраз. В этой статье мы используем внутреннее встраивание НМТ исходного предложения и используем сходство встраивания предложения для выбора предложений, близких к внутридоменным данным. Эмпирические результаты адаптации по английско-французской задаче IWSLT и китайско-английской задаче NIST показывают, что предлагаемые методы могут существенно улучшить производительность NMT на 2,4-9,0 баллов BLEU, опередив существующую современную базовую линию на 2,3-4,5 баллов BLEU.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil corparáidí nua ag éirí níos mó ar fáil le haghaidh aistriúcháin mheaisín, ní bhíonn ach na cinn a bhaineann leis an bhfearann céanna nó le réimsí comhchosúla in ann feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin. Le déanaí tá Neural Machine Translation (NMT) tar éis éirí feiceálach sa réimse. Mar sin féin, ní dhíríonn an chuid is mó de na modhanna oiriúnaithe fearainn atá ann faoi láthair ach ar aistriúchán meaisín frása-bhunaithe. Sa pháipéar seo, bainimid leas as leabú inmheánach an NMT ar an abairt fhoinseach agus úsáidimid cosúlacht leabú na habairte chun na habairtí atá gar do shonraí san fhearann a roghnú. Léiríonn na torthaí oiriúnaithe eimpíreacha ar thascanna Béarla-Fraincis an IWSLT agus NIST Sínis-Béarla gur féidir leis na modhanna atá beartaithe feidhmíocht NMT a fheabhsú go suntasach de 2.4-9.0 pointe BLEU, rud a sháraíonn an bonnlíne úrscothach reatha faoi 2.3-4.5 pointe BLEU. .', 'el': 'Παρόλο που νέα σώματα γίνονται όλο και περισσότερο διαθέσιμα για μηχανική μετάφραση, μόνο εκείνα που ανήκουν στον ίδιο ή παρόμοιο τομέα είναι συνήθως σε θέση να βελτιώσουν την απόδοση μετάφρασης. Πρόσφατα η Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT) έχει γίνει εξέχουσα στον τομέα. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες από τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους προσαρμογής τομέα επικεντρώνονται μόνο στη μηχανική μετάφραση με βάση φράσεις. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αξιοποιούμε την εσωτερική ενσωμάτωση της πρότασης προέλευσης και χρησιμοποιούμε την πρόταση ενσωμάτωσης ομοιότητας για να επιλέξουμε τις προτάσεις που είναι κοντά σε δεδομένα εντός του τομέα. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα προσαρμογής στις αγγλο-γαλλικές και κινεζικές-αγγλικές εργασίες δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι μπορούν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά την απόδοση της NMT κατά τα σημεία 2.4-9.0, ξεπερνώντας την υφιστάμενη βάση βάσης κατά τα σημεία 2.3-4.5.', 'hu': 'Bár az új korpuszok egyre inkább elérhetővé válnak a gépi fordítás számára, csak azok, amelyek ugyanazokhoz vagy hasonló tartományokhoz tartoznak, jellemzően képesek javítani a fordítási teljesítményt. Az utóbbi időben a Neural Machine Translation (NMT) kiemelkedővé vált a területen. A meglévő domain adaptációs módszerek többsége azonban csak kifejezésalapú gépi fordításra összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban kihasználjuk a forráspont NMT belső beágyazását, és a mondat beágyazását használjuk a domain adatokhoz közel álló mondatok kiválasztására. Az IWSLT angol-francia és NIST kínai-angol feladatainak empirikus adaptációs eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszerek 2,4-9,0 BLEU ponttal jelentősen javíthatják az NMT teljesítményét, és 2,3-4,5 BLEU ponttal felülmúlják a meglévő legkorszerűbb alapképet.', 'ka': 'მაგრამ ახალი კორპორა იქნება მაქსინური გაგრძნობისთვის, მაგრამ ისინი, რომლებიც იგივე ან სხვადასხვა კომპორაციებისთვის თანამდვილეობაა, ტიპულად შეუძ მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტილება (NMT) იყო მნიშვნელოვანი პანელში. მაგრამ ძალიან დიომინის ადაპტიფიკაციის მეტი მხოლოდ ფრაზების მაქსინის გადაწყვეტაზე foკუნსურება. ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ NMT-ის ინტერესტური წესების ჩვენება და გამოყენებთ წესების სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ იმპერიკალური ადაპტიკაციის შედეგი IWSLT ინგლისურ-ფრანგური და NIST კინინგლისური-ანგლისური დავალების შესაძლებელია, რომ მინდომარებული მეტოვები შეუძლება გასაკეთება NMT-ის შესაძლებლობა 2.4-9.0 BLEU წერტილებით, რომლებიც მსგა', 'it': "Anche se i nuovi corpora stanno diventando sempre più disponibili per la traduzione automatica, solo quelli che appartengono a domini uguali o simili sono in genere in grado di migliorare le prestazioni di traduzione. Recentemente la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) è diventata prominente nel settore. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei metodi esistenti di adattamento del dominio si concentra solo sulla traduzione automatica basata sulle frasi. In questo articolo, sfruttiamo l'incorporazione interna della frase sorgente da parte del NMT e usiamo la somiglianza di incorporazione della frase per selezionare le frasi che sono vicine ai dati in-domain. I risultati empirici di adattamento sui compiti IWSLT inglese-francese e NIST cinese-inglese mostrano che i metodi proposti possono migliorare sostanzialmente le prestazioni NMT di 2,4-9,0 punti BLEU, superando di 2,3-4,5 punti BLEU lo stato dell'arte esistente.", 'kk': 'Жаңа корпора машинаны аудару үшін көптеген болса да, тек бір немесе ұқсас домендерге қатынаған адамдар әдетте аудару әрекетін жақсартуға болады. Жуырда нейралық машинаның аудармасы (NMT) өрісінде маңызды болды. Бірақ доменге қолдану әдістерінің көпшілігі тек сөздерді негізделген компьютердің аудармасына назар аудару. Бұл қағазда, NMT көзінің ішкі сөйлемесін қолданып, домен деректеріне жақын сөйлемелерді таңдау үшін сұлбаны ендіру үшін қолданамыз. IWSLT ағылшын-француз және NIST қытайлық-ағылшын тапсырмаларының импирикалық адаптациялау нәтижелері NMT жылдамдығын 2.4-9.0 BLEU нәтижелеріне салыстырып, 2.3-4.5 BLEU нәтижелеріне сәйкестіктердің негізгі жолын салыстыр', 'lt': 'Nors nauji korporai tampa vis prieinami vertimui mašinomis, tik tie, kurie priklauso toms pačioms ar panašioms sritims, paprastai gali pagerinti vertimo rezultatus. Neseniai šioje srityje tapo akivaizdus neurologinis mašin ų vertimas (NMT). Tačiau dauguma esamų sričių pritaikymo metodų daugiausia dėmesio skiria tik frazėmis grindžiamam mašinų vertimui. Šiame dokumente naudojame NMT vidinį pradinio sakinio įterpimą ir panašumą įterpiantį sakinį pasirinkdami sakinius, kurie yra artimi domeno duomenims. empiriniai prisitaikymo prie IWSLT anglų-prancūzų ir NIST Kinijos-anglų užduočių rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomi metodai gali gerokai pagerinti NMT veiklos rezultatus 2,4–9,0 BLEU taško, o dabartinė naujausia bazė – 2,3–4,5 BLEU taško.', 'mk': 'Иако новите корпора стануваат сé повеќе достапни за машински превод, само оние кои припаѓаат на истите или сличните домени обично можат да ја подобрат перформансата на преводот. Неодамна неурална машинска транслекција (НМТ) стана истакната на теренот. Сепак, повеќето постоечки методи за адаптација на домените се фокусираат само на машински превод базиран на фрази. Во овој весник, ја искористуваме внатрешната вградба на НМТ на изворната реченица и ја користиме реченицата со сличност за да ги избереме речениците кои се блиски до податоците во доменот. Емпиричките резултати на адаптацијата на ИВСЛТ англиско-француски и НИСТ кинеско-англиски задачи покажуваат дека предложените методи можат значително да ја подобрат резултатот на НМТ за 2,4-9,0 поени БЛЕ, надминувајќи ја постоечката најнова база за 2,3-4,5 поени БЛЕ.', 'ms': 'Walaupun korpra baru semakin tersedia untuk terjemahan mesin, hanya mereka yang milik domain yang sama atau sama biasanya mampu memperbaiki prestasi terjemahan. Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) baru-baru ini telah menjadi terkenal di medan. Namun, kebanyakan kaedah penyesuaian domain yang ada hanya fokus pada terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksploitasi penyembedding dalaman NMT kalimat sumber dan gunakan kalimat penyembedding persamaan untuk memilih kalimat yang dekat dengan data dalam domain. Hasil penyesuaian empirik pada tugas IWSLT Bahasa Inggeris-Perancis dan NIST Bahasa Cina-Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh meningkatkan prestasi NMT dengan 2.4-9.0 titik BLEU, melampaui garis dasar yang ada dengan 2.3-4.5 titik BLEU.', 'mt': "Għalkemm korpra ġdida qed issir dejjem aktar disponibbli għat-traduzzjoni bil-magni, dawk biss li jappartjenu għall-istess dominji jew dominji simili huma tipikament kapaċi jtejbu l-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni. Recently Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has become prominent in the field.  Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi eżistenti ta’ adattament tad-dominju jiffokaw biss fuq traduzzjoni bil-magna bbażata fuq il-frażi. F'dan id-dokument, aħna nesfruttaw l-inkorporazzjoni interna tan-NMT tas-sentenza tas-sors u nużaw is-sentenza li tinkludi similarità biex nagħżlu s-sentenzi li huma qrib id-dejta interna. Ir-riżultati empiriċi tal-adattament dwar il-kompiti tal-IWSLT Ingliż-Franċiż u NIST Ċiniż-Ingliż juru li l-metodi proposti jistgħu jtejbu sostanzjalment il-prestazzjoni tal-NMT b’2.4-9.0 punti BLEU, li jaqbżu l-linja bażi l-aktar avvanzata eżistenti b’2.3-4.5 punti BLEU.", 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്ക് വേണ്ടി പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ കൂടുതല്\u200d ലഭ്യമായിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും, ഒരേ ഡൊമെയിനുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ളവര്\u200d മാത്രമേ പരിഭാ അടുത്തുതന്നെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു (NMT) പാലത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിര എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള ഡൊമെയിനുള്ള അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d രീതികളില്\u200d മിക്കവാക്കുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാക്കിന്റെ ആന്തരിക വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റായിരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്ക IWSLT ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്- ഫ്രെഞ്ചിലും NIST-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജോലികളിലും ഉള്ള എക്മിരിക്കല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് 2.4-9.0 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറ് 2.3-4.5 ബ', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр шинэ корпора машины орчуулалтын хувьд нэмэгдэж байгаа ч, зөвхөн ижил эсвэл төстэй зохион байгуулалтын хувьд орчуулалтын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна. Саяхан мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) салбарт чухал болсон. Гэвч ихэнх нь суурилсан хүрээлэн зохицуулах арга зөвхөн өгүүлбэр суурилсан машины орчуулалт дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NMT-ийн дотоод өгүүлбэрийг ашиглаж, дотоод өгүүлбэртэй ойрхон өгүүлбэрийг сонгох үед тэнцүү байдлыг ашиглаж байна. IWSLT Англи-Француз болон NIST Хятад-Англи хэлний ажил дээрх эзэмшигийн адилтгалын үр дүнд NMT үйл ажиллагааг 2.4-9.0 BLEU цэгээр нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Chociaż nowe korpory stają się coraz bardziej dostępne do tłumaczenia maszynowego, tylko te należące do tej samej lub podobnej domeny są zazwyczaj w stanie poprawić wydajność tłumaczenia. Ostatnio neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) stało się ważne w tej dziedzinie. Jednak większość istniejących metod adaptacji domen skupia się tylko na tłumaczeniu maszynowym opartym na frazach. W niniejszym artykule wykorzystujemy wewnętrzne osadzenie zdania źródłowego przez NMT i wykorzystujemy zdanie osadzające podobieństwo do wyboru zdań, które są zbliżone do danych wewnątrz domeny. Wyniki empirycznej adaptacji zadań angielsko-francuskich IWSLT oraz chińsko-angielskich NIST pokazują, że proponowane metody mogą znacznie poprawić wydajność NMT o punkty 2.4-9.0 BLEU, przewyższając istniejącą najnowocześniejszą bazę bazową o punkty 2.3-4.5 BLEU.', 'no': 'Selv om nye korpora blir større tilgjengeleg for maskinsomsetjing, kan berre dei som høyrer til same eller liknande domene forbetra omsetjingsfunksjonen. Nyleg er omsetjinga av nøyralmaskinen (NMT) viktig i feltet. Dei fleste av dei eksisterande domeneadaptasjonsmetodane er berre fokusert på tekstbasert maskinsomsetjing. I denne papiret bruker vi NMT s in intern innbygging av kjeldesetninga og bruker setninga som innebygger liknande for å velja setningane som er nær i domenedata. Dette empiriske tilpassingsresultatet for IWSLT-engelsk-fransk og NIST-engelsk oppgåver viser at den foreslåde metodane kan forbedra NMT-utviklinga substituelt med 2.4-9.0 BLEU-punkt, som utfører den eksisterande baselinja av 2.3-4.5 BLEU-punkt.', 'ro': 'Deși noile corpore devin din ce în ce mai disponibile pentru traducerea automată, numai cele care aparțin acelorași domenii sau domenii similare sunt în mod obișnuit capabile să îmbunătățească performanța traducerii. Recent Neural Machine Translation (NMT) a devenit proeminent în domeniu. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea metodelor existente de adaptare a domeniului se concentrează numai pe traducerea automată bazată pe fraze. În această lucrare, exploatăm încorporarea internă a propoziției sursă de către NMT și folosim similaritatea încorporării propozițiilor pentru a selecta propozițiile care sunt aproape de datele din domeniu. Rezultatele adaptării empirice privind sarcinile IWSLT engleză-franceză și NIST chineză-engleză arată că metodele propuse pot îmbunătăți substanțial performanța NMT cu 2,4-9,0 puncte BLEU, depășind valoarea de referință actuală cu 2,3-4,5 puncte BLEU.', 'so': "In kastoo shirkadda cusub ay si badan u helaan tarjumaadda machine, waxaa si caadi ah u hormarin kara fasaxa turjumaadda. Muddo ugu dhow tarjumaadda maskinenta Neural (NMT) waxay noqotay mid weyn duurka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hababka bedelka ee gudaha ah oo kaliya waxay ku kalsoonaadaan turjumidda machine-based. In this paper, we exploit the NMT's internal embedding of the source sentence and use the sentence embedding similarity to select the sentences which are close to in-domain data.  Jawaayinka IWSLT-Ingiriis-Faraansiis iyo NIST waxay ka muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay si weyn u hagaajin karaan qabashada NMT 2.4-9.0 BLEU goobaha ku qoran karo xafiiska qoraalka-qoriga ah 2.3-4.5 BLEU.", 'sv': 'Även om nya korpora blir allt mer tillgängliga för maskinöversättning, är det bara de som tillhör samma eller liknande domäner som vanligtvis kan förbättra översättningens prestanda. Neural Machine Translation (NMT) har nyligen blivit framträdande inom området. De flesta av de befintliga domänanpassningsmetoderna fokuserar dock bara på frasbaserad maskinöversättning. I denna uppsats utnyttjar vi NMT:s interna inbäddning av källmeningen och använder meningsinbäddning likhet för att välja meningar som ligger nära domändata. De empiriska anpassningsresultaten för IWSLT:s engelsk-franska och NIST:s kinesisk-engelska uppgifter visar att de föreslagna metoderna avsevärt kan förbättra NMT-prestandan med 2,4-9,0 BLEU-poäng, vilket överträffar den befintliga toppmoderna baslinjen med 2,3-4,5 BLEU-poäng.', 'sr': 'Iako se nova korpora postaje sve dostupna za prevod mašine, samo oni koji pripadaju istim ili sličnim domenama obično mogu poboljšati izvršnost prevoda. Nedavno je neurološki prevod mašine (NMT) postao značajan na terenu. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda adaptacije domena fokusirala se samo na prevodu na frazi. U ovom papiru, iskoristimo unutrašnji uključenje NMT-a iz izvorne rečenice i koristimo rečenicu koja uključuje sličnost da izaberemo rečenice koje su bliske podacima u domenu. Rezultati empiričke adaptacije na zadatke IWSLT engleskog-francuskog i NIST kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a sa 2.4-9.0 BLEU točka, iznosi postojeće početno stanje umjetnosti od 2.3-4.5 BLEU točka.', 'si': 'අළුත් කොර්පෝරා පරිවර්තනය සඳහා පරිවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා නමුත්, එකම නැත්නම් වගේ කොර්පෝරාන්ත්\u200dරය සඳහා  අවසානයෙන් න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන (NMT) ක්\u200dෂේත්රයේ ප්\u200dරධාන වෙලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, වාර්තාවක් අධාරිත පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය විතරයි. මේ පත්තේ, අපි NMT ගේ ඇතුළු වාක්ය සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සහ සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප IWSLT ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ෆ්\u200dරෑන්සි සහ NIST චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වැඩේ ඉන්ධාරික වැඩේ ඉන්ධාරණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජන විදිහට NMT ක්\u200dරියාවය 2.4-9.0 BLUE ප', 'ta': 'புதிய நிறுவனம் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு கிடைக்கும் போதும், ஒரே அல்லது போன்ற களங்களுக்கு மட்டுமே இருக்கின்றனர் பொதுவாக ம சமீபத்தில் புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) புலத்தில் பெரியதாகி விட்டது. ஆனால், இருக்கும் பெரும்பாலான களம் ஒதுக்கும் முறைமைகளில் மட்டும் சொற்றொடர் அடிப்படையான இயந்திரத் மொழிம இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் NMT இன் உள்ளமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி மூல வாக்கியத்தின் உள்ளமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி ஒத்திசைக்கும் வாக்கியத்தை பயன்படுத்தி  The empirical adaptation results on the IWSLT English-French and NIST Chinese-English tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by 2.4-9.0 BLEU points, outperforming the existing state-of-the-art baseline by 2.3-4.5 BLEU points.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ نوی کورپورا ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے زیادہ موجود ہو رہا ہے، صرف وہ لوگ جو ایک یا برابر دامنین کے ملنے والے ہیں، معمولاً ترجمہ کی عملکرد کو بہتر کر سکتے ہیں. اچھے سے نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کھیتی میں اہم ہو گیا ہے۔ لیکن اکثر موجود ڈومین ادامه کا طریقہ صرف فریز بنیاد ماشین ترجمہ پر تمرکز کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم NMT کے داخلی داخلی جماعت کو استعمال کرتے ہیں اور اس جماعت کو مثالی کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں جو ڈومین دائٹ کے نزدیک ہیں۔ IWSLT انگلیسی-فرانسوی اور NIST چینی-انگلیسی تاسکیوں پر مضبوطی اضافہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقے NMT کا عمل 2.4-9.0 BLEU پوینٹوں سے زیادہ بہتر کر سکتے ہیں، جو 2.3-4.5 BLEU پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ موجود موجود موجود state-of-the-art baseline سے زیادہ ا', 'uz': "Agar yangi kompaniya mashinalar tarjima uchun juda ko'proq mavjud bo'ladi, faqat bitta yoki huddi domen tilidagi odatda tarjima drayverini oshirish mumkin. Yaqinda yangi tarjima (NMT) maydonda katta boʻlgan. Lekin, mavjud domen adapterining ko'pchiligi usullari faqat bir lugʻatga asosiy mashina tarjimalarini foydalanadi. Ushbu hujjatda, biz manba soʻzning ichki chegarasini ishlatamiz va domen maʼlumotini tanlash uchun bir so'zni ishlatamiz. IWSLT ingliz- Fransuzcha va NIST xitoycha- Inglizcha vazifalarining natijalariga aniqlangan natijasi 2.4-9.0 BLEU hodisa 2.3-4.5 BLEU nuqta bilan mavjud boʻlgan soʻzni 2.3-4.5 nuqta bilan bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù chuyên gia mới đang ngày càng có thể dịch chuyển bằng máy, nhưng chỉ những chuyên gia thuộc về lĩnh vực tương tự có thể cải thiện khả năng dịch chuyển. Gần đây dịch lắp thần kinh (NMB) đã trở nên nổi bật trong lĩnh vực. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp sửa chữa miền hiện thời chỉ tập trung vào dịch thuật máy bằng cụm từ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi khai thác nội bộ của công ty NMT s ử dụng bản từ điển và sử dụng bản án chứa giống nhau để chọn câu gần với dữ liệu nội bộ Các kết quả thử nghiệm về công việc I.WSLT Anh-Pháp và NIST (Trung Quốc-Anh) cho thấy rằng các phương pháp đã đề nghị có thể cải thiện hiệu suất NMT đáng kể bằng 2.4-9.0 tiếng bíp, vượt qua cơ sở cơ sở cơ bản hiện thời của 2.3-4.5 nguyên vẹn (nguyên tắc).', 'da': "Selvom nye corpora bliver i stigende grad tilgængelige for maskinoversættelse, er kun dem, der tilhører de samme eller lignende domæner, typisk i stand til at forbedre oversættelsesevnen. Neural Machine Translation (NMT) er for nylig blevet fremtrædende på området. De fleste af de eksisterende domænetilpasningsmetoder fokuserer dog kun på sætningsbaseret maskinoversættelse. I denne artikel udnytter vi NMT's interne indlejring af kildesætningen og bruger sætningen indlejring lighed til at vælge de sætninger, der er tæt på in-domæne data. De empiriske tilpasningsresultater af IWSLT's engelsk-franske og NIST kinesisk-engelske opgaver viser, at de foreslåede metoder kan forbedre NMT's ydeevne væsentligt med 2,4-9,0 BLEU-point, hvilket overstiger den eksisterende state-of-the-art basislinje med 2,3-4,5 BLEU-point.", 'hr': 'Iako se nova tijela postaje sve dostupna za prevod strojeva, samo oni koji pripadaju istim ili sličnim domenama obično mogu poboljšati učinkovitost prevoda. Nedavno je neurološki prevod stroja (NMT) postao značajan na polju. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda adaptacije domena fokusirala se samo na prevodu stroja na frazi. U ovom papiru koristimo unutrašnji uključenje NMT-a iz izvorne rečenice i koristimo rečenicu koja uključuje sličnost kako bi izabrali rečenice koje su blizu podataka u domenu. Rezultati empiričke prilagodbe na zadatke IWSLT-a engleskog francuskog i NIST kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a na 2.4-9.0 BLEU točka, nadmašući postojeće početno stanje umjetnosti od 2.3-4.5 BLEU točka.', 'nl': "Hoewel nieuwe corpora's steeds meer beschikbaar worden voor machinevertaling, kunnen alleen die corpora's die tot hetzelfde of soortgelijke domeinen behoren doorgaans de vertaalprestaties verbeteren. Recent is Neural Machine Translation (NMT) prominent geworden in het veld. De meeste bestaande domeinaanpassingsmethoden richten zich echter alleen op zinnengebaseerde machinevertaling. In dit artikel maken we gebruik van de interne inbedding van de bronzin door de NMT en gebruiken we de inbedding overeenkomst om de zinnen te selecteren die dicht bij in-domain data liggen. De empirische aanpassingsresultaten van de IWSLT Engels-Frans en NIST Chinees-Engels taken tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methoden NMT prestaties aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren met 2.4-9.0 BLEU punten, die de bestaande state-of-the-art baseline met 2.3-4.5 BLEU punten overtreffen.", 'de': 'Obwohl neue Korpora zunehmend für die maschinelle Übersetzung verfügbar werden, können in der Regel nur diejenigen, die zu denselben oder ähnlichen Domänen gehören, die Übersetzungsleistung verbessern. Neural Machine Translation (NMT) ist in letzter Zeit in diesem Bereich prominent geworden. Allerdings konzentrieren sich die meisten existierenden Methoden zur Domänenanpassung nur auf die phrasenbasierte maschinelle Übersetzung. In diesem Beitrag nutzen wir die interne Einbettung des Quellsatzes des NMT und verwenden die Einbettungsähnlichkeit des Satzes, um Sätze auszuwählen, die nah an In-Domain-Daten liegen. Die empirischen Anpassungsergebnisse der IWSLT Englisch-Französisch- und NIST Chinesisch-Englisch-Aufgaben zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Methoden die NMT-Leistung um 2.4-9.0 BLEU-Punkte erheblich verbessern können und die bestehende State-of-the-Art-Baseline um 2.3-4.5 BLEU-Punkte übertreffen.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че новите корпуси стават все по-достъпни за машинен превод, само тези, които принадлежат към същите или подобни домейни, обикновено могат да подобрят ефективността на превода. Напоследък невралният машинен превод (НМТ) стана популярен в областта. Въпреки това, повечето от съществуващите методи за адаптиране на домейна се фокусират само върху машинен превод, базиран на фрази. В тази статия ние използваме вътрешното вграждане на изречението източник и използваме приликата на вграждане на изречението, за да изберете изреченията, които са близки до данните в областта. Резултатите от емпиричната адаптация на английско-френските и китайско-английски задачи показват, че предложените методи могат значително да подобрят ефективността на НДТ с 2,4-9,0 точки, надминавайки съществуващата най-съвременна база с 2,3-4,5 точки.', 'fa': 'اگرچه شرکت جدید برای ترجمه ماشین بیشتر موجود می شود، تنها کسانی که متعلق به دامنه های مشابه یا مشابه هستند می توانند عملکرد ترجمه را بهبود دهند. اخیراً ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) در زمینه مهم شده است. ولی بیشتر از روش\u200cهای تغییر\u200cسازی دامنی موجود فقط روی ترجمه\u200cسازی ماشین بر اساس عبارت تمرکز می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما وارد شدن داخلی جمله منبع NMT را استفاده می\u200cکنیم و از جمله\u200cای که مشابه\u200cای دارد استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا جمله\u200cهای نزدیک به داده\u200cهای دامنه\u200cی دامنه\u200cای انتخاب کنیم. نتیجه تغییرات امپراتیک روی کار های انگلیسی-فرانسوی و NIST چینی-انگلیسی IWSLT نشان می دهد که روش پیشنهاد می تواند عملکرد NMT را با نقطه های BLEU ۲.۴-۹.۰ بهتر کند، در حالی که پایین\u200cخط هنری وجود دارد با نقطه\u200cهای BLEU ۲.۳-۴.۵.', 'sw': "Ingawa makampuni mpya yanaendelea kupatikana kwa kutafsiri mashine, kwa kawaida tu wale wanaoishi katika maeneo hayo au yanayofanana wanaweza kuboresha maonyesho ya tafsiri. Hivi karibuni Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) imekuwa maarufu katika uwanja. Hata hivyo, mbinu nyingi za kubadilisha ndani zinazopo zinalenga kutafsiri mashine yenye msingi wa maneno. In this paper, we exploit the NMT's internal embedding of the source sentence and use the sentence embedding similarity to select the sentences which are close to in-domain data.  Matokeo ya mabadiliko ya msimamo huo yanatokana na kazi za IWSLT ya Kiingereza na NIST za Kiingereza zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zinazopendekezwa zinaweza kuboresha utendaji wa NMT kwa kiasi kikubwa na pointi 2.4-9.0 BLEU, ikionyesha hali ya msingi wa sanaa inayotokana na pointi 2.3-4.5 BLEU.", 'id': 'Meskipun corpora baru semakin tersedia untuk terjemahan mesin, hanya mereka yang memiliki domain yang sama atau yang sama biasanya mampu meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan. Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) baru-baru ini telah menjadi terkenal di lapangan. Namun, kebanyakan metode adaptasi domain yang ada hanya fokus pada terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksploitasi penerbangan internal NMT dari kalimat sumber dan menggunakan kalimat penerbangan persamaan untuk memilih kalimat yang dekat dengan data dalam domain. Hasil adaptasi empirik pada tugas IWSLT Bahasa Inggris-Perancis dan NIST Bahasa Inggris-Cina menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat meningkatkan prestasi NMT dengan 2,4-9,0 poin BLEU, melebihi dasar yang ada dengan 2,3-4,5 poin BLEU.', 'tr': "Ýöne täze korpora maşynyň terjime etmäge köp üýtgeýän bolsa, diňe bir ýa-da meňzeş nokalaryň täze terjime etmäge mümkin edip bilýär. Soňky wagtda näral Maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) sahypada möhüm boldy. Ýöne bolan domain adaptasyon yöntemleriniň köpüsi diňe fraz tabanly makine terjimesine üns berýär. Bu kagyzda, biz NMT'iň çeşme s özleriniň içini ulanýarys we domein maglumatynda ýakyn sözlerni saýlamak üçin sözlerni ulanýarys. IWSLT IWSLT iňlis-fransuzça we NIST Çinçe-Iňlisçe taýýarlarynyň netijesi NMT eserlerini 2.4-9.0 BLEU noktalaryna görä gowurap biljekdigini görkez.", 'sq': 'Megjithëse korpra të reja po bëhen gjithnjë e më të disponueshme për përkthimin e makinave, vetëm ata që i përkasin të njëjtit domeni apo domeneve të ngjashme janë tipikisht në gjendje të përmirësojnë performancën e përkthimit. Recently Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has become prominent in the field. However, most of the existing domain adaptation methods only focus on phrase-based machine translation.  Në këtë letër, ne shfrytëzojmë përfshirjen e brendshme të NMT-s ë të fjalës së burimit dhe përdorim fjalën duke përfshirë ngjashmëri për të zgjedhur fjalët që janë pranë të dhënave në domeni. Rezultatet empirike të përshtatjes në detyrat e IWSLT Anglisht-Franceze dhe NIST Kineze-Anglisht tregojnë se metodat e propozuara mund të përmirësojnë thelbësisht performancën e NMT me 2.4-9.0 pikë BLEU, duke tejkaluar bazën ekzistuese të lartë me 2.3-4.5 pikë BLEU.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን አዲስ ኮርፖርት ለመmachine ትርጉም የሚቀበል ቢሆንም፣ በአንድ ወይም የሚመስል አካባቢዎች ብቻ ትርጓሜዎችን ማሻሻል ይችላሉ፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የናውራዊ መኪን ትርጉም (NMT) በሜዳ ክቡር ሆኖአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ ዶሜን አቀማመጥ ማድረጊያው ማድረግ ብቻ በንግግር-based መሳሪያን ማተርጓም ላይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የNMT የኩነቶች ውይይት ግንኙነት እና የዶሜን ዳታ የሚቀርቡትን ቃላት በመምረጥ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በIWSLT እንግሊዘኛ-ፈረንሳይኛ እና NIST-የቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ስራዎችን በ2.4-9.0 BLEU ጥያቄ በ2.3-4.', 'af': 'Alhoewel nuwe korpora vergroot beskikbaar word vir masjien vertaling, word slegs die wat aan dieselfde of gelyke domene behoort, tipies in staat om vertaling te verbeter. Onlangs het Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) in die veld geword. Maar die meeste van die bestaande domein adaptering metodes fokus slegs op frase-gebaseerde masjien vertaling. In hierdie papier, gebruik ons die NMT se interne inbêding van die bron seting en gebruik die seting inbêring gelykheid om die setinge te kies wat naby is na in- domein data. Die empiriese aanpassing resultate op die IWSLT Engels-Frans en NIST Sjinese-Engels-taak wys dat die voorgestelde metodes kan substantieel NMT-uitvoeging verbeter deur 2.4-9.0 BLES punte, wat die bestaande staat-van-kuns-basislien deur 2.3-4.5 BLEU punte uitvoer.', 'hy': 'Չնայած նոր կառուցվածքը դառնում է ավելի հասանելի մեքենային թարգմանման համար, միայն նրանք, ովքեր պատկանում են նույն կամ նման բնագավառներին, սովորաբար կարող են բարելավել թարգմանման արտադրությունը: Վերջերս նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) արտահայտվել է այս ոլորտում: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող ոլորտի ադապտացիայի մեթոդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է միայն արտահայտությամբ հիմնված մեքենային թարգմանության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք NMT-ի աղբյուր նախադասության ներքին ներգրավումը և օգտագործում ենք նմանությունը ներգրավող նախադասությունը՝ ընտրելու նախադասությունները, որոնք մոտ են տիեզերական տվյալներին: IW-Անգլերեն-Ֆրանսերեն և ՆԻՍթ-Չինաստանի-Անգլերեն խնդիրների էմպրիկական ադապտացիայի արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդները կարող են նշանակալիորեն բարելավել NMT-ի արտադրողականությունը 2.4-9.0 միավորով, առավել լավագույն հիմքի արդյունքը 2.3-4.', 'bn': 'যদিও নতুন কোর্পোরা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য বাড়তে পারে, তবুও শুধুমাত্র যারা একই অথবা একই ধরনের ডোমেইনের মধ্যে থাকে তারা সাধারণত অনুবাদে সম্প্রতি নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) ক্ষেত্রে বিশাল ক্ষেত্রে পরিণত হয়েছে। তবে বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান ডোমেইন আপডেটশন পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র শব্দ ভিত্তিক মেশিন অনুবাদের উপর মনোযোগ দেয়। এই প্রবন্ধে আমরা এনএমটির সূত্রের বাক্যের আভ্যন্তরীণ বিভিন্ন ব্যবহার করি এবং ডোমেইনের তথ্যের কাছে যে বাক্য নির্বাচন করা হয় তা ব্যবহার করি। আইউএসএলটি ইংরেজি ফরাসী এবং এনআইএসটি চীনা-ইংরেজী কাজের উপর প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ২.৪-৯.', 'bs': 'Iako se nova korpora postaje sve dostupna za prevod strojeva, samo oni koji pripadaju istim ili sličnim domenama obično mogu poboljšati učinkovitost prevoda. Nedavno je neurološki prevod mašine (NMT) postao značajan na terenu. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda adaptacije domena fokusirala se samo na prevodu stroja na frazi. U ovom papiru, koristimo unutrašnji uključenje NMT-a iz izvorne rečenice i koristimo rečenicu koja uključuje sličnost da izaberemo rečenice koje su blizu podataka u domenu. Rezultati empiričke adaptacije na zadatke IWSLT-a engleskog-francuskog i NIST kineskog-engleskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a sa 2.4-9.0 BLEU točka, nadmašući postojeću početnu liniju umjetnosti od 2.3-4.5 BLEU točka.', 'ko': '비록 점점 더 많은 새로운 자료 라이브러리가 기계 번역에 사용될 수 있지만, 보통 같은 분야나 유사한 분야에 속하는 자료 라이브러리만이 번역 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.최근 몇 년 동안 신경기계번역(NMT)은 이 분야에서 매우 두드러졌다.그러나 기존 분야의 적응 방법은 대부분 짧은 언어를 바탕으로 하는 기계 번역에만 주목하고 있다.본고에서 우리는 NMT를 이용하여 원본 문장에 대한 내부 삽입을 하고 문장 삽입 유사도를 이용하여 역내 데이터와 가까운 문장을 선택한다.IWSLT영법과 NIST 중영 임무의 경험적 적응 결과에 따르면 제시된 방법은 NMT의 성능 2.4-9.0 BLEU점을 현저하게 향상시키고 기존의 최첨단 기선인 2.3-4.5 BLEU점보다 우수하다.', 'az': "Əgər yeni korpora maşın çevirilməsi üçün daha çox faydalanır, sadəcə eyni və bənzər domenin sahibləri genellikle çevirilməsi performansını yaxşılaşdıra bilərlər. Son zamanlarda nöral Makin Çeviri (NMT) sahədə böyük bir şey oldu. Halbuki, mevcut domena uyğunlaşdırma metodlarının çoxu sadəcə fərz tabanlı maşın tercüməsinə odaqlanır. Bu kağızda, NMT'nin mənbə cümləs in in içəri daxilində istifadə edir və s özləri daxilində verilən cümlələri seçmək üçün istifadə edirik. IWSLT İngilizce-Fransız və NIST Çin-İngilizce işlərinin impirik uyğunlaşdırma sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif olunan metodların NMT performansını 2.4-9.0 BLEU nöqtələrindən daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər, ki, 2.3-4.5 BLEU nöqtələrində mövcuddur.", 'cs': 'Ačkoli jsou nové korpusy stále více k dispozici pro strojový překlad, pouze ty, které patří do stejné nebo podobné domény, jsou obvykle schopny zlepšit výkon překladu. Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) se v poslední době stal prominentní v oboru. Většina stávajících metod adaptace domény se však zaměřuje pouze na strojový překlad založený na frázích. V tomto článku využíváme interní vložení zdrojové věty NMT a využíváme podobnost věty, které jsou blízko v doméně dat. Výsledky empirické adaptace na anglicko-francouzské úlohy IWSLT a NIST čínsko-anglické úlohy ukazují, že navržené metody mohou výrazně zlepšit výkon NMT o 2.4-9.0 BLEU body a překonat stávající stav techniky o 2.3-4.5 BLEU body.', 'ca': "Tot i que els nous corpores estan cada cop més disponibles per a traduir màquines, només aquells que pertanyen al mateix domini o a dominis similars són típicament capaços de millorar el rendiment de la traducció. Recentment, la traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT) s'ha convertit en un tema prominent. No obstant això, la majoria dels mètodes d'adaptació de dominis existents es centren només en la traducció automàtica basada en frases. En aquest article, explotam l'incorporació interna de la frase de font de la NMT i utilitzem la frase incorporant la similitud per seleccionar les frases que estan properes de les dades en domini. Els resultats empírics d'adaptació en les tasques IWSLT anglès-francès i NIST xinès-anglès mostren que els mètodes proposats poden millorar substancialment el rendiment de la NMT en 2,4-9,0 punts BLEU, superant la base de referencia actual d'última generació en 2,3-4,5 punts BLEU.", 'et': 'Kuigi masintõlke jaoks muutuvad üha enam kättesaadavaks uued korpused, suudavad tõlketõhusust tavaliselt parandada vaid samasse või sarnasesse valdkonda kuuluvad korpused. Hiljuti on selles valdkonnas silmapaistvaks saanud neuraalne masintõlge (NMT). Enamik olemasolevaid domeeni kohandamise meetodeid keskendub siiski ainult fraasipõhisele masintõlkele. Selles töös kasutame NMT sisemist alglause manustamist ja kasutame lause manustamise sarnasust, et valida laused, mis on lähedal domeeni andmetele. Empiirilised kohandamise tulemused IWSLT inglise-prantsuse ja NIST hiina-inglise ülesannete kohta näitavad, et kavandatud meetodid võivad oluliselt parandada NMT tulemuslikkust 2,4–9,0 BLEU punkti võrra, ületades olemasoleva taseme taseme lähtetaseme 2,3–4,5 BLEU punkti võrra.', 'fi': 'Vaikka konekääntämiseen on tulossa yhä enemmän uusia korpusia, vain samoihin tai vastaaviin toimialoihin kuuluvat yritykset pystyvät yleensä parantamaan käännösten suorituskykyä. Äskettäin Neural Machine Translation (NMT) on tullut näkyväksi alalla. Suurin osa nykyisistä verkkotunnuksen mukauttamismenetelmistä keskittyy kuitenkin vain fraasipohjaiseen konekäännökseen. Tässä artikkelissa hyödynnämme NMT:n sisäistä lähdelauseen upottamista ja käytämme lauseen upottamisen samankaltaisuutta valitaksemme lauseet, jotka ovat lähellä toimialueen tietoja. IWSLT englanti-ranska- ja NIST kiina-englanti -tehtävien empiiriset mukautustulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät voivat merkittävästi parantaa NMT:n suorituskykyä 2,4–9,0 BLEU-pisteellä, mikä ylittää nykyisen huipputason lähtötilanteen 2,3–4,5 BLEU-pisteellä.', 'jv': 'Ning sampeyan mrompora sing paling beraksi kanggo tarjamahan Sumangkat yang tanggal, njuk-tanggal Mancul (NMT) dumadhi bukane nang kelangan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness In this paper, we use the NMT\'s intermediate embedding of the source word and use the word embedding Simlarity to select the words that are open to in-domain data. Awakdhéwé éntuk empirhik kanggo nggawe IWSLT Inggris-Perancis karo NISTA Chinese-Inggris barang nggambar kuwi nggawe sistem sing bisa supoyo kanggo ngerasawe tarjamahan NMT kanggo ngerasai 2.4-9.0 B luwih Point, mengko iso dianggawe stadiutag-caratan sing bisa nggonakan 2.3-4.5 B luwih', 'he': 'למרות שהגופרה החדשה נהייה זמינה יותר ויותר לתרגום מכונות, רק אלו שייכים לאותם שטחים או שטחים דומים מסוגלים בדרך כלל לשפר את ביצועי התרגום. Recently Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has become prominent in the field.  עם זאת, רוב שיטות ההתאמה לשטח הנוכחיות מתמקדות רק בתרגום מכונות מבוססת ביטויים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנצלים את ההכניסה הפנימית של NMT של המשפט המקורי ולהשתמש במשפט שמכניס דמיון כדי לבחור את המשפטים שהם קרובים למידע בתחום. תוצאות ההסתגלות האמפריות על המשימות IWSLT אנגלית-צרפתית ו-NIST סינית-אנגלית מראות שהשיטות המוצעות יכולות לשפר באופן משמעותי את ביצועי NMT על ידי 2.4-9.0 נקודות BLEU, מעבר לביצוע המרכז המיוחד הנוכחי על ידי 2.3-4.5 נקודות BLEU.', 'sk': 'Čeprav so novi korpusi vedno bolj dostopni za strojno prevajanje, lahko le tisti, ki spadajo v isto ali podobno področje, običajno izboljšajo učinkovitost prevajanja. V zadnjem času je na tem področju postal pomemben nevralni strojni prevod (NMT). Vendar pa se večina obstoječih metod prilagajanja domen osredotoča le na strojno prevajanje fraz. V tem prispevku smo izkoristili notranjo vdelavo izvornega stavka NMT in uporabili podobnost vdelave stavka za izbiro stavkov, ki so blizu podatkov v domeni. Rezultati empirične prilagoditve angleško-francoskih nalog IWSLT in kitajsko-angleških nalog NIST kažejo, da lahko predlagane metode bistveno izboljšajo uspešnost NMT za 2,4–9,0 točke BLEU, kar presega obstoječe najsodobnejše izhodišče za 2,3–4,5 točke BLEU.', 'ha': "Ingawa makampuni na yanzu za'a iya ƙara wa fassarar mashine, kawai waɗanda ke daidai da shi ko da misãlin, suna iya iya ƙara mafarin fassarar. @ info: whatsthis Babu kuma, mafi yawancin shiryoyin ayuka da ke ƙunsa da shi, yana zura zura zura cikin fassarar-zane-da-bincike. Ga wannan takardan, Munã yin amfani da shirin NaMT na guda da aka shigar da cewa na source kuma za'a yi amfani da maganar da ke ƙunsa da kwamfyuta dõmin ka zãɓi sonar waɗanda ke kusantar da data masu cikin-Domen. @ item license (short name)", 'bo': "ཡིན་ནའང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་ན་མིན་འདུག་པས་རྩིས་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ནང་ཡོད་པ་དང་འདྲ་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པའི་མང འཕྲལ་ཁམས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་སྤྲོད་ལ(NMT)ས་ཁུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཆེན་པོ་ཆགས་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་ཁ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་ཚིག་རྩིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མ་ལག་བཟོ་བཅོས In this paper, we use the NMT's internal embedding of the source sentence and use the sentence embedding similarity to select the sentences that are close to in-domain data. IWSLT དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་NIST རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ལས་འཆར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོབ་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་བརྡ་སྟོན་ན། འོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་རྒྱས་ཟུར་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞི་ཚོ"}
{'en': 'Data Augmentation for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados para tradução automática neural de poucos recursos', 'fr': 'Augmentation des données pour la traduction automatique neuronale à faibles ressources', 'es': 'Aumento de datos para la traducción automática neuronal de bajos recursos', 'ar': 'زيادة البيانات للترجمة الآلية العصبية منخفضة الموارد', 'ja': '低資源神経機械翻訳のためのデータ拡張', 'ru': 'Расширение данных для низкоресурсного нейронного машинного перевода', 'zh': '用低资源神经机器翻译之数增强', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए डेटा वृद्धि', 'ga': 'Méadú Sonraí le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín néar-Acmhainne Íseal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση δεδομένων για νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους', 'hu': 'Adatbővítés alacsony erőforrású idegi fordításhoz', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс неврал машинаның аудармасының деректерді көтеру', 'lt': 'Duomenų didinimas mažų išteklių neuroninių mašinų vertimui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pembesaran Data untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Sumber Terrendah', 'mt': 'Żieda fid-Dejta għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Riżorsi Bażi', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Бага-сан мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie danych dla niskich zasobów neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor pentru traducerea automată neurală cu resurse reduse', 'sr': 'Povećavanje podataka za prevod neuralnih mašina niskog resursa', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Dataförstärkning för Neural maskinöversättning med låg resurs', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati per la traduzione automatica neurale a basse risorse', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha macluumaadka', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கான தகவல் கூறுதல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng dữ liệu cho máy thần kinh ở vùng thấp', 'da': 'Dataudvidelse til maskinoversættelse med lav ressource', 'nl': 'Data Augmentation voor neuronale machinevertaling met weinig hulpbronnen', 'hr': 'Povećanje podataka za prevod neuroloških strojeva s niskim resursima', 'de': 'Data Augmentation für ressourcenarme neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Data Augmentation for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '저자원 신경기계 번역을 위한 데이터 확장', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на данни за нискоресурсен неврален машинен превод', 'fa': 'افزایش داده برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی کم منبع', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiasili', 'tr': 'Zapas Ressurat Nural Makina Çevirmek üçin Maglumat Uygymaty', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave për përkthimin e makinës nervore me burime të ulta', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'az': 'Aşıq ressurs nöral mašin tərcüməsi üçün məlumat yükselməsi', 'bn': 'নিম্ন- সম্পদ নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ডাটা অ্যাগমেন্টেশন', 'hy': 'Տվյալների աճը ցածր ռեսուրսների նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար', 'bs': 'Povećanje podataka za prevod neuralnih strojeva niskog resursa', 'ca': 'Data Augmentation for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'fi': 'Data Augmentation for Low Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat pro strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji', 'et': 'Andmete suurendamine vähese ressursiga neuroalse masintõlke jaoks', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'מגדל נתונים לתרגום מכונת נוירולית עם משאבים נמוכים', 'sk': 'Povečanje podatkov za strojno prevajanje nevronov z nizkimi viri', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་བསྐྱེད་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'The quality of a Neural Machine Translation system depends substantially on the availability of sizable parallel corpora. For low-resource language pairs this is not the case, resulting in poor translation quality. Inspired by work in computer vision, we propose a novel data augmentation approach that targets low-frequency words by generating new sentence pairs containing rare words in new, synthetically created contexts. Experimental results on simulated low-resource settings show that our method improves translation quality by up to 2.9 BLEU points over the baseline and up to 3.2 BLEU over back-translation.', 'ar': 'تعتمد جودة نظام الترجمة الآلية العصبية إلى حد كبير على توافر مجموعة كبيرة متوازية من النصوص. ليس هذا هو الحال بالنسبة للأزواج اللغوية منخفضة الموارد ، مما يؤدي إلى ضعف جودة الترجمة. مستوحى من العمل في رؤية الكمبيوتر ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لزيادة البيانات يستهدف الكلمات منخفضة التردد من خلال إنشاء أزواج جمل جديدة تحتوي على كلمات نادرة في سياقات جديدة تم إنشاؤها صناعياً. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على إعدادات محاكاة منخفضة الموارد أن طريقتنا تعمل على تحسين جودة الترجمة بما يصل إلى 2.9 نقطة BLEU على خط الأساس وحتى 3.2 BLEU على الترجمة الخلفية.', 'fr': "La qualité d'un système de traduction automatique neuronale dépend largement de la disponibilité de corpus parallèles importants. Ce n'est pas le cas pour les paires de langues à faibles ressources, ce qui entraîne une mauvaise qualité de traduction. Inspirés par le travail en vision par ordinateur, nous proposons une nouvelle approche d'augmentation des données qui cible les mots à basse fréquence en générant de nouvelles paires de phrases contenant des mots rares dans de nouveaux contextes créés synthétiquement. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des environnements simulés à faibles ressources montrent que notre méthode améliore la qualité de la traduction jusqu'à 2,9 points UEBL par rapport à la référence et jusqu'à 3,2 UEBL par rapport à la rétro-traduction.", 'es': 'La calidad de un sistema de traducción automática neuronal depende sustancialmente de la disponibilidad de cuerpos paralelos de gran tamaño. Este no es el caso para las combinaciones de idiomas de bajos recursos, lo que resulta en una mala calidad de la traducción. Inspirados por el trabajo en visión artificial, proponemos un novedoso enfoque de aumento de datos que apunta a palabras de baja frecuencia mediante la generación de nuevos pares de oraciones que contienen palabras raras en contextos nuevos creados sintéticamente. Los resultados experimentales en entornos simulados de bajos recursos muestran que nuestro método mejora la calidad de la traducción hasta 2,9 puntos BLEU por encima de la línea de base y hasta 3,2 BLEU por encima de la retrotraducción.', 'pt': 'A qualidade de um sistema de Tradução Automática Neural depende substancialmente da disponibilidade de corpora paralelos de tamanho considerável. Para pares de idiomas com poucos recursos, esse não é o caso, resultando em baixa qualidade de tradução. Inspirado pelo trabalho em visão computacional, propomos uma nova abordagem de aumento de dados que visa palavras de baixa frequência, gerando novos pares de frases contendo palavras raras em novos contextos criados sinteticamente. Resultados experimentais em configurações simuladas de poucos recursos mostram que nosso método melhora a qualidade da tradução em até 2,9 pontos BLEU sobre a linha de base e até 3,2 BLEU sobre a retrotradução.', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション・システムの品質は、実質的に、かなりのサイズの並列体の利用可能性に依存する。リソースの少ない言語ペアの場合はそうではないため、翻訳の品質が低下します。コンピュータビジョンの研究に触発され、合成的に作成された新しい文脈で希少な単語を含む新しい文のペアを生成することによって、低頻度の単語をターゲットにする新しいデータ拡張アプローチを提案します。シミュレートされた低リソース設定の実験結果は、当社の方法がベースラインよりも最大2.9 BLEUポイント、バックトランスレーションよりも最大3.2 BLEUポイント翻訳品質を向上させることを示しています。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译系统之质,大决于并行语料库之可用性。 其于资源匮乏之语对,事势不然,译者差劣。 受计算机之明,立数增数,合上下文包稀单词新句对以针低频单词。 拟低资源之实验结果表明,吾道增于基线2.9 BLEU,增于反译3.2 BLEU。', 'hi': 'एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली की गुणवत्ता काफी हद तक बड़े समानांतर निगम की उपलब्धता पर निर्भर करती है। कम-संसाधन भाषा जोड़े के लिए यह मामला नहीं है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप खराब अनुवाद गुणवत्ता होती है। कंप्यूटर दृष्टि में काम से प्रेरित होकर, हम एक उपन्यास डेटा वृद्धि दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो नए, सिंथेटिक रूप से बनाए गए संदर्भों में दुर्लभ शब्दों वाले नए वाक्य जोड़े उत्पन्न करके कम आवृत्ति वाले शब्दों को लक्षित करता है। सिम्युलेटेड कम-संसाधन सेटिंग्स पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि आधार रेखा पर 2.9 BLEU अंक तक और बैक-अनुवाद पर 3.2 BLEU तक अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'Качество системы нейронного машинного перевода в значительной степени зависит от наличия значительных параллельных корпусов. Для языковых пар с ограниченными ресурсами это не так, что приводит к низкому качеству перевода. Вдохновленные работой в области компьютерного зрения, мы предлагаем новый подход к увеличению данных, который нацелен на низкочастотные слова путем создания новых пар предложений, содержащих редкие слова в новых, синтетически созданных контекстах. Экспериментальные результаты по смоделированным настройкам с низким уровнем ресурсов показывают, что наш метод улучшает качество перевода до 2,9 пунктов BLEU по сравнению с базовой линией и до 3,2 пунктов BLEU по сравнению с обратной трансляцией.', 'ga': 'Braitheann caighdeán an chórais Néar-Aistriúcháin Meaisín go mór ar infhaighteacht corpora comhthreomhar mór. I gcás péirí teangacha íseal-acmhainne ní hé seo an cás, agus bíonn droch-chaighdeán aistriúcháin dá bharr. Arna spreagadh ag obair i bhfís ríomhaireachta, molaimid cur chuige nua um mhéadú sonraí a dhíríonn ar fhocail ísealmhinicíochta trí phéirí abairtí nua a ghiniúint ina bhfuil focail annamha i gcomhthéacsanna nua a chruthaítear go sintéiseach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar shocruithe insamhlaithe íseal-acmhainne go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh cáilíocht an aistriúcháin suas le 2.9 pointe BLEU thar an mbunlíne agus suas le 3.2 BLEU ar chúl-aistriúchán.', 'el': 'Η ποιότητα ενός νευρικού συστήματος μηχανικής μετάφρασης εξαρτάται σημαντικά από τη διαθεσιμότητα σημαντικών παράλληλων σωμάτων. Για γλωσσικά ζεύγη χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους αυτό δεν συμβαίνει, με αποτέλεσμα κακή ποιότητα μετάφρασης. Εμπνευσμένοι από την εργασία στην οπτική υπολογιστών, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση αύξησης δεδομένων που στοχεύει λέξεις χαμηλής συχνότητας δημιουργώντας νέα ζεύγη προτάσεων που περιέχουν σπάνιες λέξεις σε νέα συνθετικά πλαίσια. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε προσομοιωμένες ρυθμίσεις χαμηλού πόρου δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει την ποιότητα της μετάφρασης μέχρι 2.9 σημεία πάνω από τη γραμμή βάσης και έως 3.2 έναντι της αντίστροφης μετάφρασης.', 'hu': 'A Neural Machine Translation rendszer minősége nagymértékben függ a párhuzamos korpuszok rendelkezésre állásától. Az alacsony erőforrású nyelvpárok esetében ez nem így van, ami rossz fordítási minőséget eredményez. A számítógépes látásban végzett munka által inspirált új adatbővítési megközelítést javasolunk, amely az alacsony frekvenciájú szavakat célozza meg új, ritka szavakat tartalmazó mondatpárok létrehozásával új, szintetikusan létrehozott kontextusokban. A szimulált alacsony erőforrásokkal rendelkező beállítások kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk a fordítási minőséget akár 2,9 BLEU ponttal javítja az alapfelszereltséghez képest, akár 3,2 BLEU ponttal a visszafordításhoz képest.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქსინის გარგზავნა სისტემის კავილეტი მნიშვნელოვანია პარალელური კაპორაზე. მარტივი რესურსისური ენის ზოგებისთვის ეს არ არის შემთხვევაში, რომელიც შეიძლება ცოტა გაგრძელება. ჩვენ კომპიუტერის ხედვის მუშაობით, რომელიც პრომენტიური მონაცემების აგგენტაციის მიზეზი, რომელიც უფრო დამატებული სიტყვების სიტყვების მიზეზი გადაქმნა ახალი სიტყვების ზო ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სიმულაციულებული დამატებული რესურსების შესახებ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მეტადებს გადაწყვეტილების კაvaliტიას 2,9 BLEU პირველზე და 3,2 BLEU პირველზე დამატებული შე', 'it': 'La qualità di un sistema Neural Machine Translation dipende sostanzialmente dalla disponibilità di grandi corpore parallele. Per le coppie linguistiche a basso contenuto di risorse questo non è il caso, con conseguente scarsa qualità della traduzione. Ispirati dal lavoro di computer vision, proponiamo un nuovo approccio di data augmentation che mira a parole a bassa frequenza generando nuove coppie di frasi contenenti parole rare in nuovi contesti creati sinteticamente. I risultati sperimentali su impostazioni simulate a basso consumo di risorse mostrano che il nostro metodo migliora la qualità della traduzione fino a 2,9 punti BLEU rispetto alla linea di base e fino a 3,2 BLEU rispetto alla traduzione posteriore.', 'lt': 'The quality of a Neural Machine Translation system depends substantially on the availability of sizable parallel corpora.  Mažai išteklių turinčių kalbų porų atveju taip nėra, todėl vertimo kokybė prasta. Įkvėptas darbu kompiuterinėje vizijoje, mes siūlome naują duomenų didinimo metodą, kuriuo siekiama mažo dažnio žodžių sukuriant naujas sakinių poras, kuriose yra retų žodžių naujose sintetinėse aplinkybėse. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai dėl modeliuojamų mažo išteklio nustatymų rodo, kad mūsų metodas pagerina vertimo kokybę iki 2,9 BLEU taško, palyginti su pradiniu tašku, ir iki 3,2 BLEU palyginti su atgaliniu vertimu.', 'mk': 'Квалитетот на системот за превод на неврални машини значително зависи од достапноста на голема паралелна корпора. За парови на јазик со ниски ресурси ова не е случајот, што резултира со лош квалитет на превод. Inspired by work in computer vision, we propose a novel data augmentation approach that targets low-frequency words by generating new sentence pairs containing rare words in new, synthetically created contexts.  Експерименталните резултати на симулираните поставувања со ниски ресурси покажуваат дека нашиот метод го подобрува квалитетот на преводот за до 2,9 БЛЕ поени во однос на основата и до 3,2 БЛЕ во однос на задниот превод.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық компьютердің аудару жүйесінің сапасы өлшемді параллель корпора мүмкіндігіне тәуелді. Ресурстың төмен тілдер үшін бұл үлкен- кіші емес, әйтпесе аудару сапасы керек болады. Компьютердің көрінісінде жұмыс істеген, жаңа, синтетикалық құрылған контексттерде жаңа сөздерді жаңа сөздерді құру арқылы жаңа сөздердің жиілікті сөздерді бағалайтын жаңа деректерді көптеу арқылы Төмен ресурс баптауларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдіміміздің аудармалардың сапатын 2,9 BLEU бағдарламасының негізгі жолына дейін және 3,2 BLEU бағдарламасының қайта аудармалардың', 'ms': 'Kualiti sistem Terjemahan Mesin Neural bergantung pada keberhasilan korpra selari yang besar. Untuk pasangan bahasa sumber rendah ini bukanlah kes, yang mengakibatkan kualiti terjemahan yang buruk. DiInspirasikan oleh kerja dalam penglihatan komputer, kami cadangkan pendekatan peningkatan data baru yang sasarkan perkataan frekuensi rendah dengan menghasilkan pasangan kalimat baru yang mengandungi perkataan langka dalam konteks yang baru, dicipta secara sintetik. Hasil percubaan pada tetapan sumber rendah simulasi menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan dengan sehingga 2.9 titik BLEU atas asas dan sehingga 3.2 BLEU atas terjemahan belakang.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവിശേഷം വലിപ്പമുള്ള പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറിയുടെ ലഭ്യതയില്\u200d ആശ്രയി കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷ ഇണകള്\u200dക്കായി ഇത് കേസ് അല്ല, പാവം പരിഭാഷയുടെ ഗുണവും കൊണ്ടാണ്. കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ദര്\u200dശനത്തില്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നോവല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്തേക്ക് നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ വ കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതി 2. 9 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറ് മുകളില്\u200d 2. 9 ബെസ്ലിയ', 'mt': 'Il-kwalità ta’ sistema ta’ Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali tiddependi sostanzjalment fuq id-disponibbiltà ta’ korpra parallel a daqs. Għall-pari lingwistiċi b’riżorsi baxxi dan mhuwiex il-każ, li jirriżulta f’kwalità baxxa ta’ traduzzjoni. Inspired by work in computer vision, we propose a novel data augmentation approach that targets low-frequency words by generating new sentence pairs containing rare words in new, synthetically created contexts.  Riżultati esperimentali dwar setturi simulati b’riżorsi baxxi juru li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni b’sa 2.9 punti BLEU fuq il-linja bażi u sa 3.2 BLEU fuq it-traduzzjoni wara.', 'no': 'Kvaliteten til ein neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystem avhengig av tilgjengeligheten til storleikbar parallell korpora. For låg ressursspråk, er dette ikkje tilfelle, og resulterer i ugyldig omsetjingskvalitet. I arbeidet i datavising fører vi eit nytt dataaugmentasjonstilnærming som mål for låg frekvensord ved å laga nye setningpar som inneheld rare ord i nye, syntetisk oppretta kontekstar. Eksperimentale resultat på simulerte låg ressursinnstillingar viser at metoden vårt forbetrar omsetjingskvalitet med opp til 2,9 BLEU-punkt over grunnlinja og opp til 3,2 BLEU over tilbakeomsetjing.', 'pl': 'Jakość systemu neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego zależy w dużej mierze od dostępności dużych korpusów równoległych. W przypadku par językowych o niskich zasobach nie ma to miejsca, co powoduje złą jakość tłumaczenia. Zainspirowani pracą w dziedzinie wizji komputerowej proponujemy nowe podejście do powiększania danych, które ukierunkowane jest na słowa niskiej częstotliwości poprzez generowanie nowych par zdań zawierających rzadkie słowa w nowych, syntetycznie tworzonych kontekstach. Wyniki eksperymentalne symulowanych ustawień o niskim zasobie pokazują, że nasza metoda poprawia jakość tłumaczenia o nawet 2.9 punkty BLEU nad bazą bazową i do 3.2 BLEU nad tłumaczeniem wstecznym.', 'mn': 'Ньюрал машин орчуулах системийн качест нь хэмжээтэй параллел корпора хэрэглэх боломжтой байдаг. Бага боловсролын хэл хоорондоо энэ тохиолдол биш. Энэ нь ядуу орчуулах чадвартай. Компьютерийн үзэл дээр ажиллаж байгаагаар бид шинэ, синтетик бүтээгдэхүүнд ховор үгийг бий болгоход шинэ өгүүлбэрийг нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ өгүүлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бага боловсрол бага байгууллагын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь хөрөнгө оруулах чадварыг 2.9 БЛЕУ цэг дээр нэмэгдүүлж, 3.2 БЛЕУ руу дахин дахин хөрөнгө оруулж байна.', 'ro': 'Calitatea unui sistem Neural Machine Translation depinde în mod substanțial de disponibilitatea corpurilor paralele considerabile. Pentru perechile lingvistice cu resurse reduse, acest lucru nu este cazul, rezultând o calitate slabă a traducerii. Inspirat de munca în viziunea computerizată, propunem o abordare nouă de augmentare a datelor care vizează cuvintele de joasă frecvență prin generarea de noi perechi de propoziții care conțin cuvinte rare în contexte noi, create sintetic. Rezultatele experimentale privind setările simulate cu resurse reduse arată că metoda noastră îmbunătățește calitatea traducerii cu până la 2,9 puncte BLEU peste nivelul de referință și până la 3,2 BLEU peste traducerea înapoi.', 'sr': 'Kvaliteta Neuralnog sustava prevoda mašine zavisi od dostupnosti veličine paralelne korpore. Za parove sa niskim resursima, to nije slučaj, što rezultira lošem kvalitetom prevoda. Inspirirani radom u kompjuterskom viziji, predlažemo novi pristup povećanja podataka koji cilja riječi niske frekvencije stvaranjem novih parova rečenica koje sadrže rijetke reči u novim, sintetički stvorenim kontekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na simulisanim nastavama niskih resursa pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava kvalitet prevoda do 2,9 BLEU bodova na početnoj liniji i do 3,2 BLEU preko prevoda.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශේෂය විශේෂය ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ව අඩුම භාෂාවට අඩුම භාෂාවට මේක අවස්ථාවක් නෙවෙයි, අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් විශේෂයෙන පරිගණකය දර්ශනයේ වැඩක් නිසා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ නියම දත්ත විශාලනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අලුත් වාක්ය වචන වචන වලින් අලුත් ව පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න', 'so': 'Tusaalaha qoraalka turjumidda Neural ee nidaamka tarjumaadda waxay ku xiran tahay mid aad u badan heli karta shirkadda lambarka ah. Luqada hoose-resource waa noocyo aan xaaladan aheyn, taasoo sababto ah u baahan turjumista qiimo baahan. Shaqo lagu soo dhiibo muuqashada kambiyuutarka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab la kordhiyo macluumaadka saxda ah oo ku hagaajinta hadallada hoos-frequency ee lagu sameeyo hadal cusub oo ku qoran erayo khaas ah oo ku qoran hadal cusub oo cusub, oo ku qoran qaab cusub. Imtixaanka ku saabsan sawirada hoose-resource waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu kordhiyo qiimaha turjumaadda oo uu kordhiyo ilaa 2.9 BLEU points ka kordhiyo baseline iyo up to 3.2 BLEU over back-translation.', 'sv': 'Kvaliteten på ett Neural Machine Translation system beror i hög grad på tillgången på stora parallella korpor. För språkpar med låg resurs är detta inte fallet, vilket resulterar i dålig översättningskvalitet. Inspirerad av arbete inom datorseende föreslår vi en ny dataförstärkning som riktar sig mot lågfrekventa ord genom att generera nya meningar som innehåller sällsynta ord i nya, syntetiskt skapade sammanhang. Experimentella resultat på simulerade lågresursinställningar visar att vår metod förbättrar översättningskvaliteten med upp till 2,9 BLEU-poäng över baslinjen och upp till 3,2 BLEU-poäng över backöversättning.', 'ta': 'ஒரு நெருக்கரு இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்பின் தரம் அளவு இணைப்பு நிறுவனத்தின் கிடைக்கும் பொருளாக சார்ந்திருக @ info: whatsthis கணினி பார்வையில் வேலை செய்தால், நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் கூட்டுதல் முறைமையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். இது குறைந்த frequency வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு புத குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்புகளின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் முறைமையில் 2. 9 பிலியு புள்ளிகள் அடிப்படைக்கு மேல் மற்றும் மீண்டும் 3. 2', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم کی کیفیت بہت زیادہ موجود ہے کہ سایزہ parallel corpora کے موجود ہونے پر۔ کم منبع زبان جوڑوں کے لئے یہ کیس نہیں ہے، اور بدبخت ترجمہ کیفیت کے نتیجے میں ہے. کمپیوٹر ویژون میں کام کی طرف سے ہدایت کی گئی ہے، ہم نے ایک نئی ڈیٹا اضافہ کی تقریبا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو کم فرکانسی کلمات کو نشان دیتا ہے اور نئی کلمات کے جوڑے جوڑے جوڑے جوڑے پیدا کرتا ہے جو نئی، سینٹیٹی طرح پیدا کئے ہو سیمولیٹ کم رسسور سیٹیونٹوں پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ کی ترجمہ کی کیفیت 2.9 BLEU پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ اور 3.2 BLEU کے ذریعہ پشت ترجمہ کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ ترجمہ کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Kompyuterdagi ish orqali ishga ruxsat berilgan, biz yangi soʻzlarda qisqa so'zlarni yaratish uchun novel maʼlumot qoʻshish usulini talab qilamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Chất lượng của hệ thống dịch lắp thần kinh phụ thuộc vào khả năng có nhiều chữ "Bằng hữu" lớn. Đối với cặp ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên thì không phải như vậy, dẫn đến chất lượng dịch kém. Nguồn cảm hứng từ công việc trong tầm nhìn máy tính, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu mới nhắm vào các từ tần số thấp bằng cách tạo ra các câu chữ hiếm có trong các ngữ cảnh mới, tổng hợp tạo ra. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên thiết lập lập ít tài nguyên mô phỏng cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cải thiện chất lượng dịch dịch chuyển bằng cách lên tới 2.9 bắn khí liên tục trên đường cơ sở và lên tới 3.2 tiếng bíp sau phiên dịch.', 'da': 'Kvaliteten af et Neural Machine Translation system afhænger væsentligt af tilgængeligheden af store parallelle korpora. For sprogpar med lav ressource er dette ikke tilfældet, hvilket resulterer i dårlig oversættelseskvalitet. Inspireret af arbejde inden for computervision, foreslår vi en ny dataaugmentation tilgang, der målretter lavfrekvente ord ved at generere nye sætningspar indeholdende sjældne ord i nye, syntetisk skabte sammenhænge. Eksperimentelle resultater på simulerede indstillinger med lav ressource viser, at vores metode forbedrer oversættelseskvaliteten med op til 2,9 BLEU point over basislinjen og op til 3,2 BLEU over back-translation.', 'nl': "De kwaliteit van een Neural Machine Translation systeem hangt sterk af van de beschikbaarheid van omvangrijke parallelle corpora's. Voor taalparen met weinig resources is dit niet het geval, wat resulteert in een slechte vertaalkwaliteit. Geïnspireerd door werk in computervisie, stellen we een nieuwe data augmentation benadering voor die zich richt op laagfrequente woorden door nieuwe zinnenparen te genereren die zeldzame woorden bevatten in nieuwe, synthetisch gecreëerde contexten. Experimentele resultaten op gesimuleerde low-resource instellingen tonen aan dat onze methode de vertaalkwaliteit verbetert met maximaal 2.9 BLEU punten boven de baseline en tot 3.2 BLEU over back-translation.", 'id': 'Kualitas sistem Translasi Mesin Neural bergantung pada keberhasilan dari corpora paralel yang besar. For low-resource language pairs this is not the case, resulting in poor translation quality.  Terinspirasi oleh pekerjaan dalam penglihatan komputer, kami mengusulkan pendekatan peningkatan data baru yang menargetkan kata-kata frekuensi rendah dengan menghasilkan pasangan kalimat baru yang mengandung kata-kata langka dalam konteks baru, yang diciptakan secara sintetis. Hasil eksperimental pada pengaturan sumber daya rendah simulasi menunjukkan bahwa metode kita meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan dengan sampai 2,9 poin BLEU di atas dasar dasar dan sampai 3,2 BLEU di atas terjemahan belakang.', 'de': 'Die Qualität eines neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungssystems hängt wesentlich von der Verfügbarkeit großer paralleler Korpora ab. Bei ressourcenarmen Sprachpaaren ist dies nicht der Fall, was zu einer schlechten Übersetzungsqualität führt. Inspiriert von der Arbeit im Bereich Computer Vision schlagen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz zur Datenerweiterung vor, der niederfrequente Wörter durch Generierung neuer Satzpaare mit seltenen Wörtern in neuen, synthetisch erstellten Kontexten zielt. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zu simulierten ressourcenarmen Einstellungen zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Übersetzungsqualität um bis zu 2.9 BLEU-Punkte über der Basislinie und bis zu 3.2 BLEU über der Rückübersetzung verbessert.', 'bg': 'Качеството на системата за неврален машинен превод зависи значително от наличието на големи паралелни тела. При езикови двойки с ниски ресурси това не е така, което води до лошо качество на превода. Вдъхновени от работата в областта на компютърното зрение, ние предлагаме нов подход за увеличаване на данните, насочен към нискочестотни думи чрез генериране на нови двойки изречения, съдържащи редки думи в нови, синтетично създадени контексти. Експерименталните резултати на симулираните настройки с нисък ресурс показват, че методът ни подобрява качеството на превода с до 2,9 точки спрямо базовата база и до 3,2 точки спрямо обратния превод.', 'hr': 'Kvaliteta Neuralnog sustava prevoda strojeva značajno zavisi od dostupnosti veličine paralelne trupe. Za parove s niskim resursima to nije slučaj, što rezultira lošem kvalitetom prevoda. Inspirirani radom u kompjuterskom viziji, predlažemo novi pristup povećanja podataka koji cilja riječi niske frekvencije stvaranjem novih parova rečenica koje sadrže rijetke riječi u novim, sintetički stvorenim kontekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na simuliranim nastavacima niskih resursa pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava kvalitet prevoda do 2,9 BLEU bodova na početnoj liniji i do 3,2 BLEU na povratnoj prevodi.', 'fa': 'کیفیت سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی بستگی بستگی دارد از دسترسی قابل اندازه شرکت پارالی. برای جفت زبان کم منابع این پرونده نیست که به نتیجه کیفیت ترجمه بد می\u200cرسد. توسط کار در دید کامپیوتر، ما یک دستور افزایش داده های رمانی پیشنهاد می کنیم که کلمات فرکانسی کم را هدف می دهد با تولید جفت جمله های جدید با کلمات نادر در محیط های جدید و سینتیک ایجاد می کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی تنظیمات کم منابع\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی نشان می\u200cدهد که روش ما کیفیت ترجمه را تا ۲.۹ نقطه\u200cهای BLEU بر اساس خط پایین و تا ۳.۲ BLEU بر اساس ترجمه پشتیبانی بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Ukubwa wa mfumo wa Tafsiri wa Mashine ya Neural unategemea kwa kiasi kikubwa juu ya upatikanaji wa makampuni yanayofanana. Kwa lugha ndogo za rasilimali hizi sio suala hilo, linalosababisha kiwango duni cha tafsiri. Inspired by work in computer vision, we propose a novel data augmentation approach that targets low-frequency words by generating new sentence pairs containing rare words in new, synthetically created contexts.  Matokeo ya majaribio kuhusu mazingira ya rasilimali ya chini yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inaboresha kiwango cha tafsiri kwa kufikia 2.9 BLEU points juu ya msingi na hadi 3.2 BLEU juu ya tafsiri ya nyuma.', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň terjime sisteminiň kalitesi ölçüli parallel korpora ulaşabilen baglanýar. Iň kiçi-çeşme diller üçin bu kiçi däl, netije-de erbet terjime etmek tebigatynyň keyfiyeti bar. Kompýuter görnüşinde işleýän işi üçin täze sözleri döreden, syntetik döredilen senedlerde azat sözleri döreden täze sözleri döreden täze sözleri saýlamak üçin täze sözleri teklip edip görkezip Simüle edilen iň az resurslar düzümleriniň netijesi biziň taryhymyzyň 2.9 BLEU-a çevriläp terjime edip 3.2 BLEU-a çevriläpdir.', 'sq': 'Kwaliteti i një sistemi të përkthimit të makinave nervore varet në mënyrë të konsiderueshme nga disponueshmëria e korprave të mëdha paralele. Për çifte gjuhësh me burime të ulëta kjo nuk është rasti, duke rezultuar në cilësi të keqe përkthimi. Inspiruar nga puna në vizionin e kompjuterit, ne propozojmë një metodë të ri të rritjes së të dhënave që synon fjalë me frekuencë të ulët duke krijuar çifte të reja fjalësh që përmbajnë fjalë të rralla në kontekste të reja të krijuara sintetikisht. Rezultatet eksperimentale mbi rregullimet e simuluara me burime të ulta tregojnë se metoda jonë përmirëson cilësinë e përkthimit me deri në 2.9 pikë BLEU mbi bazën dhe deri në 3.2 BLEU mbi përkthimin mbrapa.', 'af': "Die kwaliteit van 'n Neurale Masjien Vertaling stelsel afhang substantief op die beskikbaarheid van groottebaar parallele korpora. Vir lae- hulpbron taal pare is hierdie nie die geval nie, wat resultaat in arm vertaling kwaliteit. Ons voorstel deur werk in rekenaar sien 'n nuwe data vergroot toegang wat die lae-frekwensiewoorde doen deur nuwe setningpaar te genereer wat selfde woorde in nuwe, sinteties geskepe konteks bevat. Eksperimentale resultate op simuleerde lae-hulpbron instellings vertoon dat ons metode oorsetting kwaliteit verbeter deur tot by 2.9 BLES punte oor die basisline en tot by 3.2 BLES oor terugvertaling.", 'am': 'የናውሩኤል መኪን ትርጉም ሲስተካከል በሚያስተካክል የኮርፖር ማግኘት በሙሉ ታዋቂ ነው፡፡ ለማንኛውም የዝቅተኛ ቋንቋ ዓይነቶች አይደሉም፡፡ ከኮምፒውተር ራእይ የተገኘ የኖረ ዳታ አካባቢ ቃላትን በመፍጠር አዲስ ቃላት በአዲስ በአዲስ፣ የተነሳ ቃላት በአዲስ ስርዓት ውስጥ የሚኖሩትን አዲስ ቃላትን በመፍጠር እናስቸጋጅላለን፡፡ ከ.9 BLEU ጥያቄ እና ከ.2.2 BLEU ጥያቄ በላይ በጥያቄ እና ወደ 3.2 BLEU በላይ ለመግለጫ ጥያቄ እንዲያሳድግ ፈተና ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգի որակը հիմնականում կախված է նշանակալի զուգահեռ մարմնի հասանելիության վրա: For low-resource language pairs this is not the case, resulting in poor translation quality.  Հոգեշնչված համակարգչի տեսողության աշխատանքով, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տվյալների աճի մոտեցում, որը նպատակում է ցածր հաճախականության բառերին ստեղծելով նոր նախադասությունների զույգեր, որոնք հազվադեպ բառեր են պարունակում նոր, սինթետի Սիմուլյացված ցածր ռեսուրսների սահմանափակումների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը բարելավում է թարգմանման որակը մինչև 2.9 միավորով բլեւ էլեկտրոնային տարբերակի և մինչև 3.2 բլեւ էլեկտրոնայի', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çeviri Sisteminin keyfiyeti ölçülü paralel korpora vasitəsilə bağlı. Tək ressurs dili çiftləri üçün bu məsəl deyil, böyük tərcümə qiyməti olaraq. Kompüter görünüşündə çalışma təşkil edildi, yeni, sintetik yaratdığı məlumatlarda nadir sözlər içərisində yeni cümlələr yaratmaq üçün düşük frekans sözlərini təşkil edir. Simülatlı düşük ressurs ayarlarının təcrübə sonuçları göstərir ki, metodumuzun tərcüm qiymətini 2,9 BLEU tərəfindən və 3,2 BLEU tərəfindən geri dönüşünə qədər yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'একটি নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের মান বিশেষ করে আকারের প্যারালেল কর্পোরার প্রতি নির্ভর করে। For low-resource language pairs this is not the case, resulting in poor translation quality.  কম্পিউটার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে কাজের অনুপ্রেরণা দিয়ে আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের তথ্য যোগাযোগের প্রস্তাব করছি যা নতুন বাক্যের মধ্যে কয়েকটি শব্দ তৈরি করে নতুন, স কম-সম্পদ বৈশিষ্ট্যের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহারের মান ২. ৯ বিলিউ বিন্দুকে বেসালাইনে পর্যন্ত উন্নত করে এবং বেশ-অনুবাদের উপর ৩', 'bs': 'Kvaliteta Neuralnog sustava prevoda mašine zavisi od dostupnosti veličine paralelne korpore. Za parove s niskim resursima, to nije slučaj, što rezultira lošem kvalitetom prevoda. Inspirirani radom u kompjuterskom viziji, predlažemo novi pristup povećanja podataka koji cilja riječi niske frekvencije stvaranjem novih parova rečenica koje sadrže rijetke riječi u novim, sintetički stvorenim kontekstima. Eksperimentalni rezultati na simulisanim nastavacima niskih resursa pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava kvalitet prevoda do 2,9 BLEU bodova na početnoj liniji i do 3,2 BLEU preko prevoda.', 'cs': 'Kvalita systému neuronového strojového překladu závisí podstatně na dostupnosti velkých paralelních korpusů. U jazykových párů s nízkými zdroji tomu tak není, což má za následek špatnou kvalitu překladu. Inspirováni prácí v oblasti počítačového vidění navrhujeme nový přístup k rozšíření dat, který se zaměřuje na nízkofrekvenční slova generováním nových větových párů obsahujících vzácná slova v nových, synteticky vytvořených kontextech. Experimentální výsledky simulovaných nastavení s nízkými zdroji ukazují, že naše metoda zlepšuje kvalitu překladu až o 2,9 BLEU body nad základní linií a až o 3,2 BLEU před zpětným překladem.', 'ca': "La qualitat d'un sistema de traducció de màquines neurals depèn substancialment de la disponibilitat de corpores paralèls. Per als parells de llengües de baix recursos, això no és el cas, i resulta en una mala qualitat de traducció. Inspirat pel treball en la visió informàtica, proposem un nou enfocament d'augmentació de dades que mira paraules de baixa freqüència generant parells de frases que contenen paraules rares en contextes nou i sintèticament creats. Els resultats experimentals de configuracions simulades de baix recursos demostren que el nostre mètode millora la qualitat de la traducció fins a 2,9 punts BLEU sobre la base i fins a 3,2 punts BLEU sobre la traducció posterior.", 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke süsteemi kvaliteet sõltub oluliselt suurte paralleelkorpuste kättesaadavusest. Vähese ressursiga keelepaaride puhul ei ole see nii, mistõttu on tõlkekvaliteet kehv. Arvutinägemise tööst inspireerituna pakume välja uudse andmete suurendamise lähenemisviisi, mis on suunatud madalsageduslikele sõnadele, luues uusi lausepaare, mis sisaldavad haruldasi sõnu uutes sünteetiliselt loodud kontekstides. Simuleeritud vähese ressursiga seadete eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod parandab tõlkekvaliteeti kuni 2,9 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes lähtetasemega ja kuni 3,2 BLEU võrreldes tagantõlkega.', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 시스템의 질은 어느 정도에 대규모 병행 어료 라이브러리의 가용성에 달려 있다.자원이 비교적 적은 언어에 대해서는 그렇지 않기 때문에 번역의 질이 떨어질 수 있다.컴퓨터 시각 작업의 계발을 받아 우리는 새로운 데이터 강화 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 새로운, 종합적으로 만들어진 상하문에서 희귀어를 포함하는 새로운 문장을 생성하고 저주파어를 목표로 한다.시뮬레이션 저자원 환경에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 기선보다 2.9개의 BLEU점, 역번역보다 3.2개의 BLEU점 높아졌다.', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen konekäännösjärjestelmän laatu riippuu merkittävästi suurten rinnakkaisten korpusten saatavuudesta. Vähävaraisten kieliparien kohdalla näin ei ole, mikä johtaa huonoon käännöslaatuun. Tietokonenäkötyön innoittamana ehdotamme uudenlaista datan lisäämistä, joka kohdistuu matalataajuuksisiin sanoihin luomalla uusia lausepareja, jotka sisältävät harvinaisia sanoja uusissa synteettisesti luoduissa konteksteissa. Kokeelliset tulokset simuloiduista vähäresurssisista asetuksista osoittavat, että menetelmämme parantaa käännöksen laatua jopa 2,9 BLEU-pistettä lähtötasoon verrattuna ja jopa 3,2 BLEU-pistettä taaksekäännökseen verrattuna.', 'he': 'איכות מערכת התרגום של מכונות נוירות תלויה באופן משמעותי בהזמינות של גופורה קבועה גדולה. בשביל זוגות שפת משאבים נמוכים זה לא המקרה, מה שמוביל באיכות תרגום גרועה. בהשראה על ידי עבודה בחזון המחשב, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה לגבירת נתונים שמטרה מילים בתדר נמוך על ידי ליצור זוגות משפטים חדשים שמכילים מילים נדירות בתוך קשרים חדשים, יוצרים באופן סינטטי. תוצאות ניסויים על סדרות משאבים נמוכים מודמות מראות ששיטתנו משפר את איכות התרגום עד 2.9 נקודות BLEU מעל הבסיס ועל 3.2 BLEU מעל התרגום האחורי.', 'ha': 'Tsarin Tafsiri na Mashin Naural, yana mai ƙayyade a ƙayyade manyan shirin faɗi da ke girma. @ action: button An Inspire shi da aikin aiki cikin gani na kwamfyuta, muna buƙata wata hanyor ƙaramako da data na ƙaranci wanda ke ƙayyade magana masu ƙasan-Frequency game da ya ƙãga sauran da sauran da ke ƙunsa da sauri guda cikin zane-yanzu, kuma ana ƙayyade matsayin a haɗe. Mataimakin jarrabãwa na sami tsarin lower-resource na nuna cewa metoden mu ƙara tsarin translation by up to 2.9 BLEU points over the base line and up to 3.2 BLEU over back-translation.', 'sk': 'Kakovost sistema nevralnega strojnega prevajanja je bistveno odvisna od razpoložljivosti velikih vzporednih korpusov. Pri jezikovnih parih z nizkimi viri to ni tako, kar ima za posledico slabo kakovost prevodov. V navdihu z delom na področju računalniškega vida predlagamo nov pristop povečanja podatkov, ki usmerja nizkofrekvenčne besede z ustvarjanjem novih stavkovnih parov, ki vsebujejo redke besede v novih, sintetično ustvarjenih kontekstih. Eksperimentalni rezultati simuliranih nastavitev z nizkimi viri kažejo, da naša metoda izboljša kakovost prevajanja za do 2,9 točke BLEU v primerjavi z osnovno vrednostjo in do 3,2 BLEU v primerjavi z nazaj prevajanjem.', 'jv': 'kalité ning sistem penteréngan Neral kang dipunangé supoyo nang kuwi nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan banget, dadi kapan tanggal Pasing Sampeyan nguasai winih komputer Rejalaké sing paling nggambar gambar dengong-dengong.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་གི་ཚིག་སྒྱུར་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཚད་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྤྱོད་རུང་བར་མཐུན་པས། རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་ཉུང་ཀྱི་རིགས་གཅིག་ཀྱང་མ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་བརྗོད་ཚད་ལྡ Inspired by work in computer vision, we propose a novel data augmentation approach that targets low-frequency words by generating new sentence pairs containing rare words in new, synthetically created contexts. རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་པས་རྐྱེན་ཆེ་བའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་འགྱུར'}
{'en': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale Decoder for Neural Machine Translation', 'es': 'Decodificador biescala basado en fragmentos para traducción automática neuronal', 'ar': 'وحدة فك الترميز ثنائية النطاق المستندة إلى الكتلة للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Décodeur bi-échelle basé sur des blocs pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'pt': 'Decodificador de duas escalas baseado em blocos para tradução automática neural', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए चंक-आधारित द्वि-स्केल डिकोडर', 'ja': 'ニューラルマシン翻訳のためのチャンクベースのバイスケールデコーダ', 'zh': '神经机器翻译者,双尺解码器也', 'ru': 'Двухмасштабный декодер для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': "Díchódóir Déscála Samh-Bhunaithe d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach", 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Vastag alapú két skálás dekóder idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Αποκωδικοποιητής διπλής κλίμακας για νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Decodificatore bidimensionale basato su chunk per traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін қос масштабының негіздеген екі масштабының декодері', 'ms': 'Pengekod Biskala Berdasarkan Bahagian untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'lt': 'Dviejų skalių dekoderis, pagrįstas dalimis, skirtas neurologiniam mašinų vertimui', 'no': 'Byskaldekoder med blokk basert for neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ചാങ്ക്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ബി- സ്കേല്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dekodifikatur Bi-Skala bbażat fuq biċċiet għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн машины хөрөнгө дамжуулагч', 'ro': 'Decodor bi-scară bazat pe bucăți pentru traducerea mașinii neurale', 'sr': 'Обазен бишкални декодер за превод невралног машина', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Chunk-baserad tvåskalig dekoder för neural maskinöversättning', 'pl': 'Dekoder dwuskalowy oparty na Chunk do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான சார்ந்த- அடிப்படையிலான Bi- அளவு Decoder', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے چانک-بنیاد بیسکل ڈیکوڈر', 'so': 'Turjumidda maskinenka Neural-Based Bi-scaler', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish vositasiName', 'vi': 'Bộ giải mã kích thước mô lớn cho máy thần kinh', 'hr': 'Dekoder na temelju komada bi skale za neuronski prevod stroja', 'bg': 'Двумащабен декодер за неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale Decoder voor Neurale Machine Translation', 'da': 'Chunk-baseret bi-skala dekoder til neural maskinoversættelse', 'id': 'Dekoder Biskala Berdasarkan Bagian untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'de': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale Decoder für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kiasili', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Naýral Mazmunlar terjimesine üçin beýik-Resimi Ködleme', 'sq': 'Dekoduesi me dy shkalla për përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çevirməsi üçün İ-Skala Dekodlayıcı', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար բաժանված երկու աստիճան', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য চাঙ্ক- ভিত্তিক বি- পরিমাপ ডিকোডার', 'bs': 'Dekoder za neurološki prevod', 'ca': 'Un codificador de biescala basat en trossos per traducció de màquines neurals', 'cs': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale Decoder pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Tükkipõhine kahesuunaline dekooder neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale Decoder for Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '블록 기반 신경 기계 번역 이중 디코더', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'Dvostranski dekoder na osnovi koščkov za živčni strojni prevod', 'he': 'מתקן שני מערכות מבוסס על חלקים לתרגום מכונות נוירוליות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Chunk-Based Bi-Scale སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་ཨང་བ'}
{'en': 'In typical neural machine translation (NMT), the decoder generates a sentence word by word, packing all linguistic granularities in the same time-scale of RNN. In this paper, we propose a new type of decoder for NMT, which splits the decode state into two parts and updates them in two different time-scales. Specifically, we first predict a chunk time-scale state for phrasal modeling, on top of which multiple word time-scale states are generated. In this way, the target sentence is translated hierarchically from chunks to words, with information in different granularities being leveraged. Experiments show that our proposed model significantly improves the translation performance over the state-of-the-art NMT model.', 'ar': 'في الترجمة الآلية العصبية النموذجية (NMT) ، يولد مفكك الشفرة جملة كلمة بكلمة ، مع تعبئة جميع التفاصيل اللغوية في نفس النطاق الزمني لـ RNN. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نوعًا جديدًا من مفكك التشفير لـ NMT ، والذي يقسم حالة فك التشفير إلى جزأين ويحدثهما في مقياسين زمنيين مختلفين. على وجه التحديد ، نتوقع أولاً حالة مقياس زمني للقطعة لنمذجة الجمل الفعلية ، على رأسها يتم إنشاء العديد من حالات مقياس الوقت للكلمات. وبهذه الطريقة ، تُترجم الجملة الهدف بشكل هرمي من مقاطع إلى كلمات ، مع الاستفادة من المعلومات في مستويات مختلفة من الدقة. تظهر التجارب أن نموذجنا المقترح يحسن أداء الترجمة بشكل كبير على نموذج NMT الحديث.', 'es': 'En la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) típica, el decodificador genera una oración palabra por palabra, empaquetando todas las granularidades lingüísticas en la misma escala de tiempo de RNN. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo tipo de decodificador para NMT, que divide el estado de decodificación en dos partes y las actualiza en dos escalas de tiempo diferentes. Específicamente, primero predecimos un estado de escala de tiempo parcial para el modelado de frases, sobre el cual se generan estados de escala de tiempo de múltiples palabras. De esta manera, la oración objetivo se traduce jerárquicamente de fragmentos a palabras, aprovechando la información en diferentes granularidades. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto mejora significativamente el rendimiento de la traducción en comparación con el modelo NMT de última generación.', 'pt': 'Na tradução automática neural típica (NMT), o decodificador gera uma frase palavra por palavra, empacotando todas as granularidades linguísticas na mesma escala de tempo do RNN. Neste artigo, propomos um novo tipo de decodificador para NMT, que divide o estado de decodificação em duas partes e as atualiza em duas escalas de tempo diferentes. Especificamente, primeiro prevemos um estado de escala de tempo de bloco para modelagem frasal, em cima do qual vários estados de escala de tempo de palavras são gerados. Dessa forma, a frase alvo é traduzida hierarquicamente de pedaços para palavras, com informações em diferentes granularidades sendo aproveitadas. Experimentos mostram que nosso modelo proposto melhora significativamente o desempenho da tradução em relação ao modelo NMT de última geração.', 'fr': "Dans la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) typique, le décodeur génère une phrase mot par mot, regroupant toutes les granularités linguistiques dans la même échelle de temps de RNN. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau type de décodeur pour NMT, qui divise l'état de décodage en deux parties et les met à jour dans deux échelles de temps différentes. Plus précisément, nous prédisons d'abord un état d'échelle de temps de morceau pour la modélisation phrasale, sur lequel plusieurs états d'échelle de temps de mots sont générés. De cette façon, la phrase cible est traduite hiérarchiquement de blocs en mots, avec des informations de différentes granularités étant exploitées. Les expériences montrent que le modèle que nous proposons améliore considérablement les performances de traduction par rapport au modèle NMT de pointe.", 'ja': '典型的なニューラル機械翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）では、デコーダは、文を単語ごとに生成し、すべての言語学的粒度をＲＮＮの同じタイムスケールに詰める。本稿では、デコード状態を2つの部分に分割し、2つの異なる時間スケールで更新するNMT用の新しいタイプのデコーダを提案する。具体的には、まずフレーズモデリングのためのチャンクタイムスケール状態を予測し、その上に複数のワードタイムスケール状態が生成される。このようにして、ターゲット文はチャンクから単語へ階層的に翻訳され、異なる粒度の情報が活用される。実験によると、提案されたモデルは、最先端のNMTモデルよりも翻訳パフォーマンスを大幅に向上させます。', 'zh': '于典刑之神经机器翻译(NMT),解码器逐字生句,将凡言粒度打包在RNN同时间尺度中。 本文有一于NMT新型解码器,分解码为二,而新之于两时间尺度。 具体来说者,先占短语建模块时间尺度,以成数单词时间尺度。 以此言之,句以层次结构从块转为单词,而因粒度之信。 实验明,比于先进之NMT,显加译性。', 'ru': 'В типичном нейронном машинном переводе (НМП) декодер генерирует предложение слово за словом, упаковывая все лингвистические детализации в одной временной шкале RNN. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый тип декодера для NMT, который разделяет состояние декодирования на две части и обновляет их в двух разных временных масштабах. В частности, мы сначала предсказываем состояние масштаба времени фрагмента для фразеологического моделирования, поверх которого генерируется несколько состояний масштаба времени слова. Таким образом, целевое предложение переводится иерархически из частей в слова, при этом используется информация в различных деталях. Эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемая нами модель значительно улучшает характеристики перевода по сравнению с самой современной моделью NMT.', 'hi': 'ठेठ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (NMT) में, डिकोडर शब्द द्वारा एक वाक्य शब्द उत्पन्न करता है, जो RNN के एक ही समय-पैमाने पर सभी भाषाई granularities पैकिंग। इस पेपर में, हम एनएमटी के लिए एक नए प्रकार के डिकोडर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो डिकोड राज्य को दो भागों में विभाजित करता है और उन्हें दो अलग-अलग समय-तराजू में अपडेट करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले phrasal मॉडलिंग के लिए एक चंक समय-पैमाने पर राज्य की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, जिसके शीर्ष पर कई शब्द समय-पैमाने पर राज्य उत्पन्न होते हैं। इस तरह, लक्ष्य वाक्य को पदानुक्रमित रूप से चंक्स से शब्दों में अनुवादित किया जाता है, जिसमें विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटीमें जानकारी का लाभ उठाया जाता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल अत्याधुनिक एनएमटी मॉडल पर अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'San aistriúchán meaisín néarach tipiciúil (NMT), gineann an díchódóir abairt focal ar fhocal, ag pacáil gach granularity teanga laistigh den scála ama céanna le RNN. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cineál nua díchódóra do NMT, a scoilteann an stát díchódaithe ina dhá chuid agus a nuashonraítear in dhá scála ama éagsúla. Go sonrach, déanaimid tuar ar dtús ar staid shmutánach scála ama le haghaidh samhaltú frásaí, ar a bharr sin gintear stáit scála ama iolracha. Ar an mbealach seo, aistrítear an sprioc-abairt go ordlathach ó smután go focail, le faisnéis i méideanna éagsúla á ghiaráil. Léiríonn turgnaimh go gcuireann ár múnla molta feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin thar mhúnla nua-aimseartha NMT.', 'ka': 'რთოთონალური ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაში (NMT) დეკოდერი სიტყვებით წარმოიქმნა სიტყვებით, ყველა ლენგური გრანულაციების გაგრძელება ერთი დროის RNN- ის დო ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი ტიპი დეკოდირების NMT-სთვის, რომელიც დეკოდირების სტატის ორი ნაწილში გაყოფა და დაახლება ორი განსხვავებული დროის სტატიში. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველი წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგი ასე, მისაღების სიტყვა იერაქტიკურად იერაქტიკურად წილადან სიტყვას, რომელიც ინფორმაცია განსხვავებული გრანულაციების განმავლობაში იქნება. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელ ძალიან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია შეცვალობას შეცვალობას NMT მოდელზე.', 'hu': 'A tipikus neurális gépi fordításban (NMT) a dekóder szóról szóra generál egy mondatot, az összes nyelvi granulációt ugyanabba az időskálába csomagolja az RNN. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új típusú dekódert javasolunk NMT-hez, amely két részre osztja a dekódolási állapotot és két különböző időskálán frissíti azokat. Konkrétan először előre megjósoljuk a frazális modellezéshez egy darab időskála állapotát, amelynek tetején több szó időskála állapot jön létre. Ily módon a célmondatot hierarchikusan fordítják le darabokról szavakra, különböző részletességű információkat használva. Kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk jelentősen javítja a fordítási teljesítményt a korszerű NMT modellhez képest.', 'el': 'Στην τυπική νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT), ο αποκωδικοποιητής παράγει μια πρόταση λέξη προς λέξη, συσκευάζοντας όλες τις γλωσσικές κοκκοποιότητες στην ίδια χρονική κλίμακα RNN. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν νέο τύπο αποκωδικοποιητή για το NMT, ο οποίος χωρίζει την κατάσταση αποκωδικοποίησης σε δύο μέρη και τις ενημερώνει σε δύο διαφορετικές χρονικές κλίμακες. Συγκεκριμένα, αρχικά προβλέπουμε μια κατάσταση χρονικής κλίμακας για τη διατύπωση μοντελοποίησης, πάνω από την οποία δημιουργούνται πολλαπλές καταστάσεις χρονικής κλίμακας λέξεων. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, η πρόταση προορισμού μεταφράζεται ιεραρχικά από κομμάτια σε λέξεις, με πληροφορίες σε διαφορετικές κοκκοποιότητες να αξιοποιούνται. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση μετάφρασης σε σχέση με το σύγχρονο μοντέλο NMT.', 'it': "Nella tipica traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), il decoder genera una frase parola per parola, impacchettando tutte le granularità linguistiche nella stessa scala temporale di RNN. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo tipo di decoder per NMT, che divide lo stato di decodifica in due parti e li aggiorna in due scale temporali diverse. Nello specifico, prevediamo prima uno stato di scala temporale chunk per la modellazione frasale, in cima al quale vengono generati stati multipli di scala temporale delle parole. In questo modo, la frase target viene tradotta gerarchicamente da blocchi a parole, con informazioni in granularità diverse che vengono sfruttate. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello proposto migliora significativamente le prestazioni di traduzione rispetto al modello NMT all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Во типичен нервен машински превод (НМТ), декодерот генерира реченица збор по збор, пакувајќи ги сите јазички грануларности во иста временска скала на РНН. Во овој весник, предложуваме нов тип на декодер за НМТ, кој ја подели состојбата на декодерање на два дела и ги ажурира на два различни временски скали. Специфично, првпат предвидуваме состојба на временска скала за фразално моделирање, над која се генерираат повеќе зборови временски скали состојби. На овој начин, реченицата на целта се преведува хиерархично од парчиња на зборови, со информации во различни грануларности кои се користат. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел значително ја подобрува перформансата на преводот во однос на најновиот модел на НМТ.', 'lt': 'Įprastame nervinės mašinos vertime (NMT) dekoderis sukuria žodį po žodžio, pakuodamas visas kalbines granuliacijas tuo pačiu RNN laiko mastu. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują NMT dekoderių tipą, kuris suskirsto dekoderių būklę į dvi dalis ir atnaujina jas dviem skirtingais laiko intervalais. Specifically, we first predict a chunk time-scale state for phrasal modeling, on top of which multiple word time-scale states are generated.  Tokiu būdu tikslinis sakinys hierarchiškai perskaičiuojamas iš gabalėlių į žodžius, naudojant įvairių granuliarumų informaciją. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis gerokai pagerina vertimo rezultatus, palyginti su naujausiu NMT modeliu.', 'kk': 'Қалыпты невралдық компьютердің аудармасында декодер сөзден сөзді жасайды, бір уақыт масштабындағы барлық лингвистикалық грануляриялықтарды RNN тізімінде жасайды. Бұл қағазда NMT үшін жаңа декодердің түрін ұсынып, оны екі бөлігіне бөліп, оларды екі түрлі уақыт масштабына жаңарту керек. Ескерту үшін, біріншіден фразалар моделі үшін бірнеше уақыт масштабының күйін көрсеткіземіз, олардың үстінен бірнеше сөз масштабының күйін құрылады. Бұл үшін мақсатты сөздердің иерархиялық бөлшектерінен сөздерге аударылады. Басқа гранулярлықтардың мәліметі бар. Тәжірибелер біздің қолданатын моделіміздің NMT үлгісінің аудармаларды жақсы жасайды.', 'ms': 'Dalam terjemahan mesin saraf biasa (NMT), dekoder menghasilkan perkataan perkataan demi perkataan, mengemas semua granulariti bahasa dalam skala masa yang sama RNN. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan jenis dekoder baru untuk NMT, yang membahagikan keadaan dekod kepada dua bahagian dan kemaskini mereka dalam dua skala masa yang berbeza. Secara khusus, kita pertama-tama meramalkan keadaan skala masa sepotong untuk pemodelan frasa, di atas mana keadaan skala masa berbilang perkataan dijana. Dengan cara ini, kalimat sasaran diterjemahkan secara hierarkis dari potongan ke kata-kata, dengan maklumat dalam granularitas yang berbeza digunakan. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kami diusulkan meningkatkan secara signifikan prestasi terjemahan daripada model NMT yang terbaik.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d (NMT) ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d വാക്കില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ഭാഷകളും RNN-ന്റെ ഒരേ സമയത്തില്\u200d പാക്കിക്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d NMT-ന്റെ പുതിയ തരത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ഡെക്കോഡേര്\u200d പ്രായസ്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട് ഭാഗങ്ങളായി ഡെക്കോഡ് സ്റ്റേ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം വാക്കുകളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മാതൃകയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു വാക്ക് സമയത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ മു In this way, the target sentence is translated hierarchically from chunks to words, with information in different granularities being leveraged.  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരിഭാഷപ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ', 'mt': 'Fit-traduzzjoni tipika tal-magna newrali (NMT), id-dekoder jiġġenera sentenza kelma b’kelma, li tippakkja l-granularitajiet lingwistiċi kollha fl-istess skala taż-żmien ta’ RNN. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu tip ġdid ta’ dekoder għall-NMT, li jaqsam l-istat tad-dekoder f’żewġ partijiet u jaġġornahom f’żewġ skedi ta’ żmien differenti. B’mod speċifiku, l-ewwel a ħna nipprojbixxu stat fuq skala ta’ żmien ta’ biċċa biċċa għall-immudellar tal-frażijiet, li fuqu jiġu ġġenerati stati fuq skala ta’ żmien ta’ kliem multiplu. B’dan il-mod, is-sentenza fil-mira tiġi tradotta ġerarkikament minn biċċiet għal kliem, bl-informazzjoni f’granularitajiet differenti tkun ingranata. L-esperimenti juru li l-mudell propost tagħna jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni fuq il-mudell NMT l-aktar avvanzat.', 'no': 'I typisk neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) lager dekoderen eit setning etter ordet og pakkar alle lingviske granularitingar i same tidsskala av RNN. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny type dekoder for NMT, som deler dekodertilstanden til to deler og oppdaterer dei i to forskjellige tidsskalar. Spesifisert, vi foregår først ein tidsgrense tilstand for frasalmodellering, over dei fleire ordstidstilstandane som er generert. I denne måten vert målsettingen omsett hierarkisk frå punkt til ord, med informasjon i ulike granulariteter som vert levert. Eksperimentar viser at vår foreslått modell betydelig forbedrar utviklinga av omsetjinga over NMT-modellen i kunsten.', 'pl': 'W typowym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym (NMT) dekoder generuje zdanie słowo po słowie, pakując wszystkie granularności językowe w tej samej skali czasowej RNN. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy typ dekodera dla NMT, który dzieli stan dekodowania na dwie części i aktualizuje je w dwóch różnych skalach czasowych. W szczególności najpierw przewidujemy stan skali czasowej dla modelowania frazałów, na którym generowane są stany skali czasu wielu słów. W ten sposób zdanie docelowe jest tłumaczone hierarchicznie z kawałków na słowa, z wykorzystaniem informacji o różnych granularnościach. Eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowany przez nas model znacznie poprawia wydajność tłumaczenia w porównaniu z nowoczesnym modelem NMT.', 'mn': 'Эдийн мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) дээр бүх хэлний гранулацийг нэг цаг хугацааны RNN хэмжээнд бүрдүүлдэг үг бий болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NMT-ийн шинэ хэлбэрийг хувааж хоёр хэсэгт хувааж, хоёр өөр цаг хугацаанд шинэчлэх хэлбэрийг санал болгоно. Ялангуяа бид анхны үеийн хугацааны хугацааны хэмжээний хугацааны тухай таамаглаж байна. Үүний дээр олон үеийн хугацааны хэмжээний төв үүсгэгддэг. Иймээс зорилготой өгүүлбэр нь хэсэгт хэсэгт хэсэгт хэлбэрээс илэрхийлэгддэг. Өөр өөр гранулацийн мэдээллийг хэрэглэгддэг. Түүнчлэл бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар NMT загварын төвшинд орчуулах үйл ажиллагааг үнэхээр сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'În traducerea automată neuronală tipică (NMT), decodorul generează o propoziție cu cuvânt, ambalând toate granularitățile lingvistice în aceeași scară de timp a RNN. În această lucrare, propunem un nou tip de decodor pentru NMT, care împarte starea de decodare în două părți și le actualizează în două scale de timp diferite. Mai exact, prezicem mai întâi o stare de scară temporală pentru modelarea frazală, peste care sunt generate mai multe stări de scară temporală de cuvinte. În acest fel, propoziția țintă este tradusă ierarhic din bucăți în cuvinte, cu informații în diferite granularități fiind utilizate. Experimentele arată că modelul propus îmbunătățește semnificativ performanța traducerii față de modelul NMT de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'U tipičnom prevodu neuralne mašine (NMT), dekoder stvara reč rečenice po rečenici, pakiranje svih jezičkih granularitija u istom vremenskom skali RNN-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi tip dekodera za NMT, koji razdvaja stanje dekodera u dva dijela i aktualizuje ih na dva različita vremenska skala. Posebno, prvo predviđamo trenutak vremenskog stanja za modeliranje frazala, na kojem se stvaraju više država vremenske skale reči. Na taj naèin, ciljna rečenica je prevedena hijerarhijski od komada na reèi, a informacije u različitim granularitima se koriste. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi model značajno poboljšava provedbu prevoda nad modelom NMT-a.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව (NMT) වලින්, ඩිකොඩර් වචනයක් වචනයෙන් සිද්ධ කරනවා, සියළු භාෂාවික වාර්තාව RNN මේ පත්තරේ අපි NMT වෙනුවෙන් අළුත් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ඩිකෝඩ් ස්ථානය දෙකක් කොටස් දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන්  විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  මෙහෙම විදියට, ලක්ෂණ වාක්ෂාව භාවිත විදිහට වචනයෙන් වචනයෙන් භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා, වෙනස් ග්\u200dරැන්ලූරි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට අනුවාදය නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය වැඩ කරනවා කියලා.', 'so': 'Turjumista maskine neural neural (NMT) ayaa qoraal ka soo saara eray ku qoran, wuxuuna ku baaban yahay dhammaan luqadaha oo ku qoran isla xiliga RNN. Kanu warqaddan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa nooc cusub oo u qoran NMT, kaas oo qaybinaya dowladda deynta oo u beddelaya laba qayb oo kala duduwan. Si gaar ah, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu hor marsiinnaa xaalada xiliga ah oo ku saabsan tusaale ahaan hadalka, taasoo lagu kordhaa wadamo badan oo ku saabsan hadalka. Sidan darteed waxaa lagu turjumaa qeybta waxqabadka la soo jeedo oo laga soo diraa luqadaha iyo hadallada, macluumaad ku saabsan waxyaabaha kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in modelkeeni la soo jeeday uu si muhiim ah u hagaajiyo sameynta tarjumaadda oo ku qoran sameynta dowladda-qoriga NMT.', 'sv': 'I typisk neural maskinöversättning (NMT) genererar avkodaren en mening ord för ord och packar alla språkliga granulariteter i samma tidsskala som RNN. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny typ av avkodare för NMT, som delar avkodningstillståndet i två delar och uppdaterar dem i två olika tidsskalor. Specifikt förutspår vi först ett tidsskaligt tillstånd för frasal modellering, ovanpå vilket flera ordtidstillstånd genereras. På så sätt översätts målmeningen hierarkiskt från bitar till ord, där information i olika granulariteter utnyttjas. Experiment visar att vår föreslagna modell avsevärt förbättrar översättningsprestandan jämfört med den senaste NMT-modellen.', 'ur': 'نورول ماشین کی ترجمہ (NMT) میں ڈیکڈر کلمات کے ذریعہ ایک کلمات پیدا کرتا ہے اور تمام زبان کی گرنولیریتیاں ایک زمانہ اسکیل RNN میں پیک کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم NMT کے لئے ایک نوی طرح ڈیکڈر پیش کریں گے جو دکوڈ کی حالت کو دو قسمتوں میں تقسیم کرتا ہے اور ان کو دو مختلف ٹیموں میں آغاز کرتا ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم پہلی بار فرزال موڈلینگ کے لئے ایک چانک وقت-اسکیل موقعیت کی پیش بینی کرتے ہیں، جس پر بہت سی کلمات-اسکیل موقعیت پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں. اسی طرح، موقعۂ جماعت کو ٹکڑے سے کلمات تک ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے، اور مختلف گرانولاریٹوں میں معلومات کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل NMT موڈل پر ترجمہ کی عمدگی اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'வழக்கமான புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றியில், குறியீட்டாளர் வார்த்தையால் உருவாக்குகிறது, அனைத்து மொழிமொழியின் மொழிமாற்று கிராண்ட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் NMT க்கான புதிய குறியீட்டாளரை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது குறியீட்டு நிலையை இரண்டு பகுதிகளாக பிரிக்கிறத குறிப்பிட்டால், நாம் முதலில் சொற்றொடர் மாதிரிக்கும் நேர அளவு நிலையை முற்படுத்துகிறோம், மேல் அதில் பல வார்த்தையின் நேர இந்த வழியில், இலக்கு வாக்கியத்தை மின்னஞ்சலில் இருந்து வார்த்தைகளுக்கு மொழிபெயர்க்கப்படுகிறது, வேறு வித்தியாசமான சி முயற்சிகள் நம்முடைய பரிந்திருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda, biz NMT uchun yangi kodlash usulini talab qilamiz. Uning kodlash holatini ikkita qismga teng qiladi va ularni ikkita xil darajada yangilash. Koʻrinishimiz mumkin, biz birinchi marta o'zgarishni birinchi marta qolish holatini oldindiz. Shunday qilib, shaxsiy soʻzni kichkina so'zlardan so'zlar tarjima qilinadi, boshqa granulatlarda maʼlumot yordamida. Taʼminlovchi modelimiz NMT modelida tarjima qilish natijasini juda muhimi oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong dịch vụ máy thần kinh điển (NMB) điển hình, bộ giải mã tạo ra một từ liên tiếp, bao bọc mọi sự hạt ngôn ngữ trong cùng một thời gian của RNN. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một loại giải mã mới cho công ty NMT, nó chia giải thành hai phần và cập nhật chúng theo hai chiều thời gian khác nhau. Cụ thể, chúng ta dự đoán trước một trường hợp thời gian khổng lồ để tạo mẫu từ, trên đó sẽ sinh ra nhiều trường hợp thời gian. Bằng cách này, mục tiêu được dịch ra theo cấp độ phân cấp từ khoanh thành từng chữ, với thông tin được tăng dần theo độ hạt khác nhau. Thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng tôi cải thiện đáng kể khả năng dịch chuyển hơn mẫu NMB hiện đại nhất.', 'nl': 'In typische neurale machinevertaling (NMT) genereert de decoder woord voor woord een zin, waarbij alle linguïstische granulariteiten in dezelfde tijdschaal van RNN worden verpakt. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw type decoder voor NMT voor, die de decode-status in twee delen splitst en deze in twee verschillende tijdschalen bijwerkt. Specifiek voorspellen we eerst een chunk time-scale state voor frasale modellering, waarop meerdere woord time-scale states worden gegenereerd. Op deze manier wordt de doelzin hiërarchisch vertaald van brokken naar woorden, waarbij informatie in verschillende granulariteiten wordt benut. Experimenten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model de vertaalprestaties aanzienlijk verbetert ten opzichte van het state-of-the-art NMT model.', 'da': 'I typisk neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) genererer dekoderen en sætning ord for ord, der pakker alle sproglige granulariteter i samme tidsskala som RNN. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny type dekoder til NMT, som opdeler dekodetilstanden i to dele og opdaterer dem i to forskellige tidsskalaer. Specielt forudsiger vi først en chunk tidsskala tilstand for phrasal modellering, oven på hvilken flere ord tidsskala tilstande genereres. På denne måde oversættes målsætningen hierarkisk fra stykker til ord, hvor information i forskellige granulariteter udnyttes. Eksperimenter viser, at vores foreslåede model forbedrer oversættelseseffektiviteten markant i forhold til den nyeste NMT model.', 'de': 'In der typischen neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) erzeugt der Decoder Wort für Wort einen Satz, der alle sprachlichen Granularitäten in der gleichen Zeitskala von RNN verpackt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuen Typ von Decoder für NMT vor, der den Dekodierungszustand in zwei Teile aufteilt und in zwei verschiedenen Zeitskalen aktualisiert. Konkret sagen wir zunächst einen Chunk-Zeitskala-Zustand für die Phrasalmodellierung voraus, auf dem mehrere Wort-Zeitskala-Zustände generiert werden. Auf diese Weise wird der Zielsatz hierarchisch von Brocken in Wörter übersetzt, wobei Informationen in unterschiedlichen Granularitäten genutzt werden. Experimente zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell die Übersetzungsleistung gegenüber dem modernen NMT-Modell signifikant verbessert.', 'bg': 'В типичния невронен машинен превод (НМТ), декодерът генерира изречение дума по дума, опаковайки всички лингвистични гранулирания в една и съща времева скала на РНН. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов тип декодер за НМТ, който разделя състоянието на декодиране на две части и ги актуализира в две различни времеви скали. По-конкретно, първо прогнозираме състояние във времевата скала за фразово моделиране, върху което се генерират няколко думи състояния във времевата скала. По този начин целевото изречение се превежда йерархично от парчета на думи, като информацията в различни подробности се използва. Експериментите показват, че предложеният ни модел значително подобрява ефективността на превода в сравнение с най-съвременния модел на НМТ.', 'hr': 'U tipičnom prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT), dekoder proizvodi reč rečenice po riječi, pakiranje svih jezičkih granularitija u istoj vremenskoj skali RNN-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi tip dekodera za NMT, koji razdvaja stanje dekodera u dva dijela i aktualizira ih na dvije različite vremenske skale. Posebno, prvo predviđamo stanje vremenske skale za modeliranje frazala, na kojem se stvaraju višestruke države vremenske skale riječi. Na taj način, ciljna rečenica se hijerarhički prevodi od dijela na riječi, s informacijama u različitim granulacijama koje se primjenjuju. Iskusi pokazuju da naš predloženi model značajno poboljšava učinkovitost prevođenja nad modelom NMT-a.', 'sw': 'Katika tafsiri ya mashine ya kawaida (NMT), kodi hiyo inatengeneza neno kwa maneno, akifungua vipengele vyote vya lugha katika kipimo cha wakati mmoja cha RNN. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza a in a mpya ya decodi kwa NMT, ambayo inagawanya nchi hiyo katika sehemu mbili na kujenga upya katika kipimo viwili tofauti. Kwa ujumla, kwanza tunatabiri hali ya kipimo cha muda mfupi kwa ajili ya mifano ya maneno, na juu yake nchi nyingi zinatengenezwa kwa kiwango kikubwa cha maneno. Kwa namna hii, hukumu ya malengo inatafsiriwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kutoka kwenye viungo vya habari hadi maneno, kwa taarifa katika vifaa vinavyotengenezwa. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu ilipendekezwa kwa kiasi kikubwa inaboresha ufanisi wa tafsiri kuhusu mifano ya sanaa ya NMT.', 'id': 'In typical neural machine translation (NMT), the decoder generates a sentence word by word, packing all linguistic granularities in the same time-scale of RNN.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan jenis dekoder baru untuk NMT, yang membagi keadaan dekode menjadi dua bagian dan memperbaharuinya dalam dua skala waktu yang berbeda. Secara spesifik, kita pertama-tama memprediksi kondisi skala waktu sepotong untuk model frasa, di atas mana beberapa kata skala waktu negara dihasilkan. Dengan cara ini, kalimat sasaran diterjemahkan secara hierarkis dari potongan ke kata, dengan informasi dalam granularitas yang berbeda sedang diaktifkan. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan secara signifikan atas model NMT yang terbaik.', 'fa': 'در ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی معمولی (NMT) دکورد کلمه\u200cای به کلمه تولید می\u200cکند، جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی را در یک مقیاس زمانی RNN بسته می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما یک نوع دیکوردر جدید برای NMT پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که وضعیت دیکود را به دو قسمت تقسیم می\u200cکند و آنها را به دو مقیاس زمانی متفاوت تبدیل می\u200cکند. دقیقاً ما اولین بار یک وضعیت زمانی را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم برای مدل فرزال، که بر آن وضعیت\u200cهای مقیاس زمانی چندین کلمه تولید می\u200cشوند. در این صورت، جمله هدف از قطعه\u200cها به کلمات ترجمه می\u200cشود، با اطلاعات در قطعه\u200cهای متفاوتی که به تغییر داده می\u200cشوند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما عملکرد ترجمه را در مورد مدل NMT قابل توجه می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Adatça näyral maşynyň terjimesinde (NMT), sözler bilen sözler gurar, hemme dil granularyny bir zamanlyk derejesinde RNN'iň derejesinde paketleýär. Bu kagyzda, NMT üçin täze bir ködleme teklip edýäris. Bu dekodiýanyň durumyny iki bölüme bölýär we olaryň iki beýleki zamanda güncelleştirilýär. Adatça, biz birinji gezek fraz modlemesi üçin bir sany zaman ölçüsi durumyny öň belleýäris. Üstünde birnäçe söz ölçüsi däldir. Bu şekilde, maksadyň sözleriň iýerarhiýa böleklerden sözlere terjime edilýär, beýleki granularynyň içinde maglumat goşulýar. Denminatlar biziň teklip eden nusgymyzyň NMT nusgasynda terjime etkinlik ukypyny örän köpräk uzlaşdyrýandygyny görkezýär.", 'af': "In tipiese neurale masjien vertaling (NMT), die dekoder genereer 'n setwoord deur woord, pak alle lingwisiese granularisies in dieselfde tyd- skaal van RNN. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe tipe dekoder vir NMT, wat die dekoder staat in twee dele verdeel en dit opdateer in twee verskillende tydskalale. Spesifieke, ons voorskou eerste 'n stuk tydskalaal staat vir frasalmodeling, bo waarvan veelvuldige woord tydskalaal staatste genereer word. Op hierdie manier word die doel setsing hierarkies vertaal van blokke na woorde, met inligting in verskillende granulariteite wat gebruik word. Eksperimente wys dat ons voorgestelde model betekeurig verbeter die vertaling van die standaard van die kunste NMT-model.", 'sq': 'Në përkthimin tipik të makinës nervore (NMT), dekoderi gjeneron një fjalë me fjalë, duke paketuar të gjitha granularitetet gjuhësore në të njëjtën skalë kohore të RNN. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një lloj të ri dekoderi për NMT, i cili ndan gjendjen e dekodimit në dy pjesë dhe i përditëson në dy shkalla kohore të ndryshme. Në mënyrë specifike, ne parashikojmë së pari një gjendje të shkallës kohore për modelimin frazël, mbi të cilën gjenerohen gjendje të shumta fjalësh të shkallës kohore. Në këtë mënyrë, fjala objektive përkthehet hierarkikisht nga copa në fjalë, me informacion në granularitete të ndryshme të përdorur. Experiments show that our proposed model significantly improves the translation performance over the state-of-the-art NMT model.', 'hy': 'Տիպիկ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման ժամանակ (NMT) դեկոդերը ստեղծում է բառ առ բառ մի նախադասություն, փակցնում է բոլոր լեզվաբանական գրանուլարիաները ՌՆԹ-ի նույն ժամանակային մակարդակում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք NMT-ի համար նոր տեսակի կոդեր, որը բաժանում է կոդերի վիճակը երկու մասի և վերականգնում դրանք երկու տարբեր ժամանակահատվածներով: Հատկապես, մենք առաջին անգամ կանխատեսում ենք ֆրազալ մոդելավորման ժամանակահատվածի վիճակը, որի վրա ստեղծվում են բազմաթիվ ժամանակահատվածի վիճակներ: Այս կերպ նպատակային նախադասությունը հիերարխիկապես թարգմանվում է մասերից բառերի մեջ, տարբեր գրանիլարություններում տեղեկատվությունը օգտագործվում է: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը նշանակալիորեն բարելավում է թարգմանման արտադրությունը ՆՄԹ-ի ամենաբարձր մոդելի դեպքում:', 'am': 'በጥያቄ የናውሬው መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT)፣ አዲስ ዶዶዶ ቃላትን በንግግር ይፍጠር፣ የቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት ሁሉ በመስጠት-መጠን ይዘረጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ ዓይነት የNMT አካባቢ አካባቢ እናሳልጋለን፣ ይህም የኮድድ ግንኙነት በሁለት ክፍሎች እና በሁለት በተለየ ጊዜው ክፍል ያነሳዋል፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ አስቀድመን፣ ለቃላት መተላለፊያ የቁጥጥር ቁጥጥር እናስፈራራለን፡፡ እንደዚህም፣ የግንኙነቱ ግንኙነት ከክፍል ወደ ቃላት እና በተለየ ግንኙነት በተለየ መልዕክቶች ይታረካል፡፡ ፈተናዎች የዘጋጀው ሞዴላችን የNMT አካባቢ-የግንኙነት አካባቢ የግንኙነቱን ትርጉም አካባቢ እንዲያበዛ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'সাধারণ নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) ভাষায় ডেকোডার শব্দের মাধ্যমে একটি বাক্য উৎপাদন করে, একই সময় RNN এর সকল ভাষাভাষার গ্রানুগ্রানুলিটি  এই পত্রিকায় আমরা এনএমটির জন্য একটি নতুন ধরনের ডেকোডার প্রস্তাব করি, যা ডেকোড রাষ্ট্রের দুটি অংশে বিভক্ত করে এবং দুটি বিভিন্ন সময়-মাত্ বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে বাক্যাল মডেলের জন্য একটি চাঙ্ক টাইম-স্কেল রাষ্ট্র ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করি, যার উপরে বেশ কয়েকটি শব্দের সময়স্কেলে এভাবে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর বাক্য অনুবাদ করা হয় বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গ্রানুলারিটিতে তথ্য দিয়ে। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে অনুবাদ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে এনএমটি মডেলের উপর।', 'az': 'Tipik nöral maşına çevirilməsində, dekoder sözlərlə cümləni yaradır, bütün dil granularitlərini aynı zamanlı RNN ölçüsində pak edir. Bu kağızda NMT üçün yeni bir cür dekoder təklif edirik ki, dekoder durumunu iki parçaya bölüşdürər və onları iki müxtəlif vaxt ölçüsində yeniləndirir. Özellikle, biz ilk dəfə frazal modelləri üçün bir parça zaman ölçüsi durumunu təmin edirik, üstündə çoxlu söz ölçüsi durumları yaradılır. Bəlkə, məqsəd cümləsi hiyerarşik olaraq parçalardan sözlərə çevirilir, müxtəlif granularitlərdə məlumat istifadə edilir. Tərəbələr təklif etdiyimiz modellərin NMT modeli ilə çeviriş performansını çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bs': 'U tipičnom prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT), dekoder proizvodi reč rečenice po rečenici, pakiranje svih jezičkih granulacija u istom vremenskom skali RNN-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi tip dekodera za NMT, koji razdvaja stanje dekodera u dva dijela i aktualizuje ih na dva različita vremenska skala. Posebno, prvo predviđamo vremensku stanju za modeliranje frazala, na kojem se stvaraju više država vremenske skale riječi. Na taj način, ciljna rečenica se hijerarhički prevodi od komada na riječi, s informacijama u različitim granulacijama koje se koriste. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi model značajno poboljšava učinkovitost prevođenja nad modelom NMT-a.', 'ca': "En la traducció típica de màquines neurals (NMT), el decodificador genera una frase per paraula, empaquetant totes les granularitats lingüístices en la mateixa escala de temps de RNN. In this paper, we propose a new type of decoder for NMT, which splits the decode state into two parts and updates them in two different time-scales.  Especificament, primer predim un estat d'escala temporal per a modelar frases, a sobre del qual es generen estats d'escala temporal múltiples paraules. D'aquesta manera, la frase alvo es tradueix hierarquicament de trossos a paraules, utilitzant informació en granularitats diferents. Els experiments demostren que el nostre model proposat millora significativament el rendiment de traducció sobre el model NMT més avançat.", 'cs': 'V typickém neuronovém strojovém překladu (NMT) dekodér generuje větu slovo po slovu a balí všechny jazykové granularity ve stejném časovém stupnici RNN. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový typ dekodéru pro NMT, který rozdělí stav dekódování na dvě části a aktualizuje je ve dvou různých časových měřítkách. Konkrétně nejprve předpovídáme stav časové škály pro frázové modelování, na jehož vrcholu se generuje více stavů časové škály slov. Tímto způsobem je cílová věta hierarchicky přeložena z kusů na slova, přičemž jsou využity informace v různých granularitách. Experimenty ukazují, že náš navržený model výrazně zlepšuje překladovou výkonnost oproti modernímu NMT modelu.', 'et': 'Tüüpilises neuraalses masintõlkes (NMT) genereerib dekooder lause sõna-sõnalt, pakkides kõik keelelised granulaarsused samasse RNN-i ajaskaalasse. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uut tüüpi dekoodri NMT jaoks, mis jagab dekoodeerimisseisundi kaheks osaks ja uuendab neid kahes erinevas ajaskaalas. Täpsemalt prognoosime fraasimodelleerimiseks kõigepealt tüki ajaskaala olekut, mille peale genereeritakse mitu sõna ajaskaala olekut. Sel viisil tõlgitakse sihtlause hierarhiliselt tükkidest sõnadesse, kusjuures võimendatakse erinevate detailidega teavet. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie pakutud mudel parandab oluliselt tõlketõhusust võrreldes kaasaegse NMT mudeliga.', 'fi': 'Tyypillisessä neurokonekäännöksessä (NMT) dekooderi luo lauseen sana sanalta ja pakkaa kaikki kielelliset yksityiskohdat samaan RNN:n aikaskaalaan. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uudenlaista dekooderia NMT:lle, joka jakaa dekooderitilan kahteen osaan ja päivittää ne kahteen eri aikaskaalaan. Tarkemmin sanottuna ennustamme ensin fraasimallinnusta varten lohkon aikaskaalan tilan, jonka päälle luodaan useita sanoja aikaskaalan tiloja. Tällä tavoin kohdelause käännetään hierarkisesti lohkoista sanoiksi, ja tietoa hyödynnetään eri rakeisina. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli parantaa merkittävästi käännöstehokkuutta verrattuna uusimpaan NMT-malliin.', 'ko': '전형적인 신경기계번역(NMT)에서는 디코더가 한 글자씩 문장을 만들어 모든 언어의 입도를 RNN의 동일한 시간 척도 안에 포장한다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 NMT 디코더를 제시했는데 디코더 상태를 두 부분으로 나누고 두 가지 서로 다른 시간 척도에서 업데이트를 진행한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 먼저 단어 모델링의 블록 시간 척도 상태를 예측하고 이를 바탕으로 여러 단어의 시간 척도 상태를 생성한다.이런 방식을 통해 목표 문장은 어구에서 단어까지 층을 나누어 번역하고 서로 다른 입도의 정보를 이용한다.실험에 의하면 기존의 NMT 모델에 비해 우리가 제시한 모델이 번역 성능을 현저히 향상시켰다.', 'jv': 'Taning Nang pepulan iki, kita mudhaya sistem anyar decoder kanggo NMT, iki dadi decode durum banjur iki patik dadi lan nganggo alat iki patik dadi sampek echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Wurung-Wurung, dadi kapan kanggo tarjamahan karo kelas nang kelas, lan kelas informasi ning cara granulasi sing wis ngawe barang. Isopo sing ngenturungi na model sing paling nggawe akeh nggambar tarjamahan kanggo model NMT kuwi duluran.', 'he': 'בתרגום של מכונת עצבית טיפוסית (NMT), הדיקודר יוצר מילה משפטית במילה, לארוז את כל הגרינוריות הלשוניות באותו מערך זמן של RNN. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים סוג חדש של מפענח עבור NMT, שמחלק את מצב הפענוח לשני חלקים ומעדכן אותם בשני מערכות זמן שונות. במיוחד, אנו קודם חושפים מצב מסוג זמן עבור דוגמנית ביטויים, מעליו יוצרים מדינות מסוג זמן מילים רבות. בדרך זו, המשפט המטרה מתרגם היררכית מחתיכות למילים, עם מידע בגרינוליות שונות מתמודד. הניסויים מראים שהמודל המוצע שלנו משפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה של התרגום על מודל NMT המאודף.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗe wata nau'i na kodi wa NMT, wanda ke rarraba halin koda ta cikin biyu na biyu kuma ana tsãge su cikin gwargwadon lokaci biyu. Aka ƙayyade, za'a gabatar da halin halin lokaci mai girma wa motsi na magana, a samansa, za'a samar da halin wasu masu kalmar-faɗi. Kamar wannan, za'a fassara cewa maganar aimakin a yi hiararkiki daga bakan kwanan zuwa magana, da information cikin granular daban'a da aka samar da. Tajarakin na nuna cewa misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana ƙari mai girma ga fassarar fassarar a kan halin-da-misalin-the-art-NMT.", 'sk': 'V tipičnem nevronskem strojnem prevajanju (NMT) dekoder ustvari stavek besede za besedo in vse jezikovne granulativnosti pakira v isti časovni lestvici RNN. V prispevku predlagamo novo vrsto dekodirnika za NMT, ki razdeli stanje dekodiranja na dva dela in ju posodobi v dveh različnih časovnih merilih. Natančneje, najprej napovedujemo stanje časovnega obsega kosov za modeliranje fraz, na vrhu katerega se ustvarijo večbesedna stanja časovnega obsega. Na ta način se ciljni stavek prevede hierarhično iz kosov v besede, pri čemer se uporabljajo informacije v različnih podrobnostih. Eksperimenti kažejo, da naš predlagani model bistveno izboljša učinkovitost prevajanja v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim modelom NMT.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ནུས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད། འོག དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་དུས་ཚོད་མེད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་རྣམས་དང་པོ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་དགོས། འདི་ལྟར། དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡན་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ནང་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་ལ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ཡོད། Experiments show that our proposed model significantly improves the translation performance over the state-of-the-art NMT model.'}
{'en': 'Model Transfer for Tagging Low-resource Languages using a Bilingual Dictionary', 'ar': 'نموذج نقل لوضع علامات على اللغات منخفضة الموارد باستخدام قاموس ثنائي اللغة', 'fr': "Transfert de modèle pour le marquage de langues à faibles ressources à l'aide d'un dictionnaire bilingue", 'es': 'Transferencia de modelos para etiquetar idiomas de bajos recursos mediante un diccionario bilingüe', 'pt': 'Transferência de modelo para marcação de idiomas de poucos recursos usando um dicionário bilíngue', 'ja': 'バイリンガル辞書を使用して低リソース言語にタグを付けるためのモデル転送', 'ru': 'Модель переноса для тегирования малоресурсных языков с использованием двуязычного словаря', 'hi': 'एक द्विभाषी शब्दकोश का उपयोग कर कम संसाधन भाषाओं टैगिंग के लिए मॉडल स्थानांतरण', 'zh': '用双语词典标低资源言语模传输', 'ga': 'Aistriú Múnla chun Teangacha Íseal-acmhainne a Chlibeáil ag úsáid Foclóir Dátheangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μοντέλο μεταφοράς για τη σήμανση γλωσσών χαμηλού πόρου χρησιμοποιώντας ένα δίγλωσσο λεξικό', 'hu': 'Modellátvitel alacsony erőforrású nyelvek címkézéséhez kétnyelvű szótár segítségével', 'it': "Trasferimento di modelli per l'etichettatura di lingue a basso contenuto di risorse utilizzando un dizionario bilingue", 'kk': 'Қосымша сөздік арқылы төмен ресурс тілдерін таңдау үшін үлгі аудару', 'ml': 'Model Transfer for Tagging Low-resource Languages using a Bilingual Dictionary', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Trasferiment għat-Tagging ta’ Lingwi b’Riżorsi Bażi bl-użu ta’ Dikjarnarju Bilingwu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Model untuk Tagging Bahasa Sumber rendah menggunakan Kamus Bilingual', 'mn': 'Дөрвөлжингийн үгийг ашиглан бага боловсруулагч хэлнүүдийг тагжуулах загвар', 'lt': 'Model Transfer for Tagging Low-resource Languages using a Bilingual Dictionary', 'pl': 'Transfer modelu dla znakowania języków niskich zasobów przy użyciu dwujęzycznego słownika', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Transfer de model pentru etichetarea limbilor cu resurse reduse folosind un dicționar bilingv', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje modela za označavanje jezika niskog resursa koristeći Bilingualni rečnik', 'si': 'බිලින්ගුල් භාෂකයක් භාවිත කරන්න අඩුම- සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් ටැග් කරන්න මඩේල් ස්ථානය', 'so': 'Gaadiidka Model for Tagging Low-resource Languages using a Dictionary', 'sv': 'Modellöverföring för märkning av lågresursspråk med hjälp av en tvåspråkig ordbok', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளுக்கான மாதிரி மாற்று', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mô hình truyền đơn để đánh dấu Ngôn ngữ thấp có điển hình', 'bg': 'Трансфер на модел за маркиране на нискоресурсни езици с двуезичен речник', 'nl': 'Modeloverdracht voor het taggen van talen met weinig bronnen met behulp van een tweetalig woordenboek', 'de': 'Modelltransfer zum Taggen ressourcenarmer Sprachen mithilfe eines zweisprachigen Wörterbuchs', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje modela za označavanje jezika niskog resursa koristeći Bilingualni rečnik', 'ko': '이중 언어 사전을 사용하여 저자원 언어의 모델 변환을 표시하다', 'fa': 'Transfer Model for Tagging Low-Resource Languages using a Bilingual Dictionary', 'da': 'Model Transfer til mærkning af lav ressource sprog ved hjælp af en tosproget ordbog', 'sw': 'Uhamasishaji wa Model kwa lugha za chini za rasilimali kwa kutumia lugha ya lugha ya lugha', 'tr': 'Bilingual sözlük ullanýan iň azynky çeşmeler üçin nusgala', 'id': 'Model Transfer for Tagging Low-resource Languages using a Bilingual Dictionary', 'am': 'መዝገበ ቃላት', 'hy': 'Comment', 'af': 'Name', 'bn': 'ট্যাগিং নিম্ন- সম্পদ ভাষার জন্য মডেল পরিবর্তন', 'sq': 'Transferimi i modelit për etiketat e gjuhëve me burime të ulta duke përdorur një fjalor dygjuhës', 'cs': 'Přenos modelu pro značení jazyků s nízkými zdroji pomocí dvojjazyčného slovníku', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje modela za označavanje jezika niskog resursa koristeći Bilingualni rečnik', 'az': 'İlk Sözlük Qullanıcısı ilə düşük ressurs dillərini etiketləmək üçün Model Transfer', 'et': 'Mudeliülekanne vähese ressursiga keelte märgistamiseks kahekeelse sõnaraamatu abil', 'ca': 'Model Transfer per etiquetar llengües de baix recursos utilitzant un diccionari bilingüe', 'fi': 'Mallinsiirto vähävaraisten kielten merkitsemiseen kaksikielisen sanakirjan avulla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'העברת מודל לטיג שפות משאבים נמוכות באמצעות מילון שתיים', 'sk': 'Prenos modela za označevanje jezikov z nizkimi viri z uporabo dvojezičnega slovarja', 'bo': 'Bilingual Dictionary་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཉུང་བའི་རྨང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual model transfer is a compelling and popular method for predicting annotations in a low-resource language, whereby parallel corpora provide a bridge to a high-resource language, and its associated annotated corpora. However, parallel data is not readily available for many languages, limiting the applicability of these approaches. We address these drawbacks in our framework which takes advantage of cross-lingual word embeddings trained solely on a high coverage dictionary. We propose a novel neural network model for joint training from both sources of data based on cross-lingual word embeddings, and show substantial empirical improvements over baseline techniques. We also propose several active learning heuristics, which result in improvements over competitive benchmark methods.', 'ar': 'يعد نقل النموذج عبر اللغات طريقة مقنعة وشائعة للتنبؤ بالتعليقات التوضيحية بلغة منخفضة الموارد ، حيث توفر مجموعة نصية متوازية جسرًا للغة عالية الموارد ، ومجموعات التعليقات التوضيحية المرتبطة بها. ومع ذلك ، فإن البيانات المتوازية ليست متاحة بسهولة للعديد من اللغات ، مما يحد من إمكانية تطبيق هذه الأساليب. نحن نعالج هذه العيوب في إطار عملنا الذي يستفيد من تضمين الكلمات عبر اللغات المدربة فقط على قاموس عالي التغطية. نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا للشبكة العصبية للتدريب المشترك من كلا مصدري البيانات استنادًا إلى تضمين الكلمات بلغات متقاطعة ، وإظهار تحسينات تجريبية كبيرة على تقنيات خط الأساس. نقترح أيضًا العديد من أساليب التعلم النشط ، والتي تؤدي إلى تحسينات مقارنة بأساليب المقارنة المعيارية التنافسية.', 'es': 'La transferencia de modelos multilingües es un método atractivo y popular para predecir anotaciones en un lenguaje de pocos recursos, mediante el cual los corpus paralelos proporcionan un puente hacia un lenguaje de altos recursos y sus corpus anotados asociados. Sin embargo, los datos paralelos no están disponibles para muchos idiomas, lo que limita la aplicabilidad de estos enfoques. Abordamos estos inconvenientes en nuestro marco, que aprovecha las incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas capacitadas únicamente en un diccionario de alta cobertura. Proponemos un nuevo modelo de red neuronal para el entrenamiento conjunto a partir de ambas fuentes de datos basado en la inserción de palabras en varios idiomas, y mostramos mejoras empíricas sustanciales con respecto a las técnicas de referencia. También proponemos varias heurísticas de aprendizaje activo, que dan como resultado mejoras con respecto a los métodos de referencia competitivos.', 'fr': "Le transfert de modèle interlinguistique est une méthode convaincante et populaire pour prédire les annotations dans un langage à faibles ressources, dans lequel les corpus parallèles fournissent un pont vers un langage à ressources élevées et ses corpus annotés associés. Cependant, les données parallèles ne sont pas facilement disponibles pour de nombreuses langues, ce qui limite l'applicabilité de ces approches. Nous abordons ces inconvénients dans notre framework qui tire parti des intégrations de mots multilingues formées uniquement sur un dictionnaire à couverture élevée. Nous proposons un nouveau modèle de réseau neuronal pour l'entraînement conjoint à partir des deux sources de données basées sur l'intégration de mots multilingues, et montrons des améliorations empiriques substantielles par rapport aux techniques de base. Nous proposons également plusieurs heuristiques d'apprentissage actif, qui se traduisent par des améliorations par rapport aux méthodes de référence concurrentielles.", 'pt': 'A transferência de modelo entre idiomas é um método atraente e popular para prever anotações em um idioma de poucos recursos, por meio do qual corpora paralelos fornecem uma ponte para um idioma de alto recurso e seus corpora anotados associados. No entanto, dados paralelos não estão prontamente disponíveis para muitos idiomas, limitando a aplicabilidade dessas abordagens. Abordamos essas desvantagens em nossa estrutura, que aproveita as incorporações de palavras em vários idiomas treinadas apenas em um dicionário de alta cobertura. Propomos um novo modelo de rede neural para treinamento conjunto de ambas as fontes de dados com base em embeddings de palavras em vários idiomas e mostramos melhorias empíricas substanciais em relação às técnicas de linha de base. Também propomos várias heurísticas de aprendizado ativo, que resultam em melhorias em relação aos métodos de benchmark competitivos.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルモデル転送は、低リソース言語で注釈を予測するための説得力のある、人気のある方法であり、それによって並列コーパは、高リソース言語へのブリッジ、およびその関連する注釈付きコーパを提供する。しかしながら、並列データは多くの言語では容易に利用できず、これらのアプローチの適用可能性を制限する。これらの欠点は、高カバレッジ辞書のみでトレーニングされたクロスリンガルの単語埋め込みを利用したフレームワークで解決します。私たちは、クロスリンガルワード埋め込みに基づく両方のデータソースからの共同トレーニングのための新規のニューラルネットワークモデルを提案し、ベースライン技術よりも実質的な経験的改善を示します。また、競合ベンチマーク法よりも改善されるいくつかのアクティブラーニングヒューリスティクスを提案します。', 'zh': '语言模传输,信服流行之法,以占低资源语之注,并行语料库给高资源言语及相关注语料库桥梁。 然诸言并行数据不易得,此限其适用性也。 框架中解此病,框架用高覆盖率字典单词。 立一基于跨语言词嵌新型神经网络,以合二数据源,显出比基线术之大经也。 又立数学启发式术,更进竞测试方法。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी मॉडल स्थानांतरण कम-संसाधन भाषा में एनोटेशन की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक सम्मोहक और लोकप्रिय विधि है, जिससे समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट एक उच्च संसाधन भाषा के लिए एक पुल प्रदान करता है, और इसके संबंधित एनोटेट कॉर्पोरेट। हालांकि, समानांतर डेटा कई भाषाओं के लिए आसानी से उपलब्ध नहीं है, इन दृष्टिकोणों की प्रयोज्यता को सीमित करता है। हम अपने ढांचे में इन कमियों को संबोधित करते हैं जो क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाता है जो पूरी तरह से एक उच्च कवरेज शब्दकोश पर प्रशिक्षित होता है। हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर डेटा के दोनों स्रोतों से संयुक्त प्रशिक्षण के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और बेसलाइन तकनीकों पर पर्याप्त अनुभवजन्य सुधार दिखाते हैं। हम कई सक्रिय सीखने के ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप प्रतिस्पर्धी बेंचमार्क विधियों पर सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Межъязыковая передача модели - это убедительный и популярный метод прогнозирования аннотаций на языке с низким уровнем ресурсов, при котором параллельные корпуса обеспечивают мост к языку с высоким уровнем ресурсов и связанным с ним аннотированным корпусам. Однако параллельные данные по многим языкам отсутствуют, что ограничивает применимость этих подходов. Мы устраняем эти недостатки в нашей структуре, которая использует преимущества кросс-лингвистических вложений слов, обученных исключительно на словаре с высоким охватом. Мы предлагаем новую модель нейронной сети для совместного обучения из обоих источников данных на основе межъязыковых вложений слов и демонстрируем существенные эмпирические улучшения по сравнению с базовыми методами. Мы также предлагаем несколько активных эвристик обучения, которые приводят к улучшениям по сравнению с конкурентными методами сравнения.', 'ga': 'Is modh an-láidir agus coitianta é tras-aistriú samhaltaithe chun nótaí a thuar i dteanga íseal-acmhainne, ina soláthraíonn corpora comhthreomhara droichead chuig teanga ard-acmhainne, agus na corpora anótáilte a bhaineann léi. Níl sonraí comhthreomhara ar fáil go héasca do go leor teangacha, áfach, rud a chuireann teorainn le hinfheidhmeacht na gcur chuige seo. Tugaimid aghaidh ar na míbhuntáistí seo inár gcreat a bhaineann leas as leabú focal tras-teangacha atá oilte ar fhoclóir ardchlúdaigh amháin. Molaimid samhail líonra néarúil nua le haghaidh comhoiliúint ón dá fhoinse sonraí bunaithe ar leabú focal tras-teangach, agus léirímid feabhsuithe suntasacha eimpíreacha ar theicnící bunlíne. Molaimid freisin roinnt heuristicí foghlama gníomhacha, as a dtagann feabhsuithe ar mhodhanna tagarmharcála iomaíocha.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მოდელის გადატანსტი არის ძალიან და პოლუბური მეტი, რომელიც პარალელი კოპორაცია მარტივი რესურსების ენაში წარმოდგენა ანოტაციების წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც მრავალური კოპორ მაგრამ, პარალელური მონაცემები მრავალური ენათებისთვის არ უკეთესი ხელსახურებელია, რომელიც ამ მონაცემების პროგრამების შესაძლებლობა დაზ ჩვენ ჩვენი პარამეტრებში ამ დაკავშირებების გამოყენება, რომელიც მრავალური სიტყვების შემდეგ გამოყენება, რომელიც მხოლოდ მარტივი დაკავშირება სიტყვებზე. ჩვენ პრომენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ერთადერთი განსწავლებისთვის ორივე მონაცემების მსოფლიოს მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც ძირითადერთი სიტყვების შესაბამი ჩვენ ასევე მრავალ აქტიური სწავლების ჰურისტიკის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შემდეგ კონპექტიური ბანქმენტიკის მეტისების შესაძლებელება.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű modellátvitel lenyűgöző és népszerű módszer az alacsony erőforrású nyelvű jegyzetek előrejelzésére, ahol a párhuzamos korpuszok hidat biztosítanak egy nagy erőforrású nyelvhez és a hozzá tartozó jegyzetelt korpuszokhoz. A párhuzamos adatok azonban nem állnak rendelkezésre számos nyelven, ami korlátozza e megközelítések alkalmazhatóságát. Ezeket a hátrányokat olyan keretrendszerünkben kezeljük, amely kizárólag egy nagy lefedettségű szótárra képzett, nyelvközi szóbeágyazásokat használ. Egy új neurális hálózati modellt javasolunk mindkét adatforrásból származó közös képzésre, amelyek keresztnyelvű szóbeágyazáson alapulnak, és jelentős empirikus javulást mutatunk az alapvető technikákhoz képest. Számos aktív tanulási heurisztikát is javasolunk, amelyek a versenyképes referenciamódszerekkel szembeni javulást eredményeznek.', 'el': 'Η διασυνοριακή μεταφορά μοντέλων είναι μια συναρπαστική και δημοφιλής μέθοδος για την πρόβλεψη σχολίων σε μια γλώσσα χαμηλού πόρου, όπου τα παράλληλα σώματα παρέχουν μια γέφυρα σε μια γλώσσα υψηλού πόρου, και τα συναφή με σχολιασμένα σώματα. Ωστόσο, τα παράλληλα δεδομένα δεν είναι άμεσα διαθέσιμα για πολλές γλώσσες, περιορίζοντας τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής αυτών των προσεγγίσεων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα μειονεκτήματα στο πλαίσιο μας, το οποίο εκμεταλλεύεται τις γλωσσικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που εκπαιδεύονται αποκλειστικά σε ένα λεξικό υψηλής κάλυψης. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου για κοινή εκπαίδευση και από τις δύο πηγές δεδομένων βασισμένο σε εγκάρσια ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, και δείχνουν ουσιαστικές εμπειρικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις τεχνικές βάσης. Προτείνουμε επίσης αρκετές ενεργές heuristics μάθησης, οι οποίες έχουν ως αποτέλεσμα βελτιώσεις έναντι των ανταγωνιστικών μεθόδων αναφοράς.', 'it': "Il trasferimento di modelli multilingue è un metodo convincente e popolare per predire le annotazioni in un linguaggio a basso contenuto di risorse, per cui i corpora paralleli forniscono un ponte verso un linguaggio ad alta risorsa e i corpora annotati associati. Tuttavia, i dati paralleli non sono facilmente disponibili per molte lingue, limitando l'applicabilità di questi approcci. Affrontiamo questi inconvenienti nel nostro framework che sfrutta le incorporazioni di parole cross-lingual addestrate esclusivamente su un dizionario ad alta copertura. Proponiamo un nuovo modello di rete neurale per la formazione congiunta da entrambe le fonti di dati basato su incorporazioni di parole cross-lingual, e mostriamo sostanziali miglioramenti empirici rispetto alle tecniche di base. Proponiamo anche diverse euristiche di apprendimento attivo, che si traducono in miglioramenti rispetto ai metodi di benchmark competitivi.", 'kk': 'Төменгі тіл үлгісін аудару - көп ресурстар тіліне жазбаларды таңдау үшін көпшілікті және көпшілікті әдімгі әдіс. Сонымен параллелі корпора көпшілік ресурстар тіліне көпшілік жә Бірақ параллел деректер көптеген тілдер үшін оқылмайды, бұл жағдайлардың қолдануды шектеу үшін. Біз біздің қоршауымыздың бұл кезектерді жасаймыз. Бұл тілдердің бірнеше тілікті сөздердің ендіру үшін тек жоғары мәліметтің сөздігінде оқылған. Біз тілдердің бірнеше тілдерді ендіру көзінен негізделген екі деректердің біріктіру үшін романдық невралдық желінің моделін жұмыс істеп, негізгі технологиялар арқылы көп импирикалық жақсартуларын Біз сондай-ақ бірнеше белсенді оқыту геуристикасын ұсынамыз. Сонымен қатар, бұл жақсы бағдарламалық бағдарламалық тәсілдерінің жақсартылығын жасайд', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbis modelio perdavimas yra įtikinamas ir populiarus metodas anotacijoms mažai išteklių turinčia kalba prognozuoti, pagal kurį lygiagreti korpora suteikia tiltą prie didelio išteklių turinčios kalbos ir su ja susijusių anotacijų turinčių korprų. Tačiau daugeliui kalbų nėra lengvai prieinami lygiagretūs duomenys, apribojantys šių metodų taikymą. Mes sprendžiame šiuos trūkumus savo sistemoje, kuri naudojasi tarpkalbiniais žodžių įdėjimais, mokomais tik aukšto aprėpties žodyne. We propose a novel neural network model for joint training from both sources of data based on cross-lingual word embeddings, and show substantial empirical improvements over baseline techniques.  Mes taip pat siūlome keletą aktyvaus mokymosi heuristikų, dėl kurių bus pagerinti konkurenciniai lyginamieji metodai.', 'mk': 'Пренесувањето на крстојазичен модел е убедлив и популарен метод за предвидување на анотации на јазик со ниски ресурси, со кој паралелната корпора обезбедува мост до јазик со високи ресурси, и неговата поврзана анотација на корпора. Сепак, паралелните податоци не се лесно достапни за многу јазици, ограничувајќи ја апликабилноста на овие пристапи. Ние ги решаваме овие недостатоци во нашата рамка која ги искористува меѓујазичните зборови вградени само на словник со високо покривање. Предложуваме нов модел на нервната мрежа за заедничка обука од двата извори на податоци базирани на меѓујазични зборови, и покажуваме значителни емпириски подобрувања во однос на основните техники. Ние, исто така, предложуваме неколку активни хористики за учење, кои резултираат со подобрувања во однос на конкурентните методи на споредба.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്-ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗമാണ്. അതിനാല്\u200d പാരാളില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ഒരു പാല്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dട് എന്നാലും പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും അളവിലുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ലഭ്യമാകുന്നില്ല, ഈ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ പ്രയോഗത്തെ അതിര്\u200dത്തിയിട നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പിന്നിലുള്ള ഈ വരയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ക്രില്\u200dലിങ്ങ് വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഡേ നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് സജ്ജമായ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്സ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് മത്സരിക്കുന', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual model transfer is a compelling and popular method for predicting annotations in a low-resource language, whereby parallel corpora provide a bridge to a high-resource language, and its associated annotated corpora.  Namun, data selari tidak mudah tersedia untuk banyak bahasa, membatasi kemampuan pendekatan ini. Kami mengatasi kelemahan-kelemahan ini dalam kerangka kami yang mengambil keuntungan dari pembangunan perkataan saling bahasa dilatih hanya pada kamus penutup tinggi. Kami cadangkan model rangkaian saraf baru untuk latihan bersama dari kedua-dua sumber data berdasarkan penyambungan perkataan saling bahasa, dan menunjukkan peningkatan empirik yang penting atas teknik asas. Kami juga melamar beberapa heuristik pembelajaran aktif, yang mengakibatkan peningkatan atas kaedah benchmark kompetitif.', 'mt': "It-trasferiment tal-mudell translingwistiku huwa metodu konvinċenti u popolari għat-tbassir ta’ annotazzjonijiet f’lingwa b’riżorsi baxxi, fejn il-korpora parallel a tipprovdi pont għal lingwa b’riżorsi għoljin, u l-korpora annotata assoċjata tagħha. Madankollu, id-dejta parallela mhijiex disponibbli faċilment għal ħafna lingwi, li tillimita l-applikabbiltà ta’ dawn l-approċċi. We address these drawbacks in our framework which takes advantage of cross-lingual word embeddings trained solely on a high coverage dictionary.  Aħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta' netwerk newrali għal taħriġ konġunt miż-żewġ sorsi ta' dejta bbażat fuq inkorporazzjoni ta' kliem translingwi, u niwrew titjib empiriku sostanzjali fuq it-tekniki ta' linja bażi. Aħna nipproponu wkoll diversi eżistemi attivi tat-tagħlim, li jirriżultaw f’titjib fuq metodi ta’ referenza kompetittivi.", 'no': 'Overføring av krysspråk-modellen er ein komplisering og populær metode for å foregå merknader i eit låg ressursspråk, der parallelle korpora tilbyr ein bridge til eit høg ressursspråk og den tilknytte korpora. Men parallelle data er ikkje lett tilgjengeleg for mange språk, avgrensa tilgjengeligheten av desse tilnærmingane. Vi adresserer desse trekkingane i vårt rammeverk som brukar fordel av krysspråk ordinnbygging som er trengte berre på eit høg dekkeordbok. Vi foreslår eit novelt neuralnettverksmodell for kopla opplæring frå begge kilder av data basert på krysspråk innbygging av ord, og viser store empiriske forbedringar over grunnspråk. Vi foreslår også fleire aktive læringsheuristikk, som fører til forbedringar over konkurentene benchmarkmetodar.', 'pl': 'Transferowanie modelu wielojęzycznego jest atrakcyjną i popularną metodą przewidywania adnotacji w języku o niskim zasobie, dzięki czemu korpusy równoległe stanowią pomost do języka o wysokim zasobie i powiązanych z nim korpusów adnotacyjnych. Jednakże dane równoległe nie są łatwo dostępne dla wielu języków, co ogranicza zastosowanie tych podejść. Te wady rozwiązujemy w ramach naszego frameworku, który korzysta z wielojęzycznych osadzeń słów szkolonych wyłącznie na słowniku o dużym zasięgu. Proponujemy nowy model sieci neuronowej dla wspólnego treningu z obu źródeł danych oparty na osadzeniu słów wielojęzycznych i pokazujemy znaczące poprawy empiryczne w stosunku do technik bazowych. Proponujemy również kilka aktywnych heurystyk uczenia się, które skutkują ulepszeniem w stosunku do konkurencyjnych metod referencyjnych.', 'ro': 'Transferul de modele interlingvistice este o metodă convingătoare și populară pentru a anticipa adnotările într-un limbaj cu resurse reduse, prin care corporele paralele oferă o punte către un limbaj cu resurse ridicate și corporele adnotate asociate acestuia. Cu toate acestea, datele paralele nu sunt ușor disponibile pentru multe limbi, ceea ce limitează aplicabilitatea acestor abordări. Abordăm aceste dezavantaje în cadrul nostru, care profită de încorporarea de cuvinte cross-lingve instruite exclusiv pe un dicționar cu acoperire ridicată. Propunem un nou model de rețea neurală pentru pregătirea comună din ambele surse de date bazate pe încorporări de cuvinte încrucișate de limbi și prezentăm îmbunătățiri empirice substanțiale față de tehnicile de bază. De asemenea, propunem mai multe euristice active de învățare, care duc la îmbunătățiri față de metodele de referință competitive.', 'mn': 'Хэдхэн хэл загварын дамжуулалт нь бага баялаг боловсролын хэл дээрх боловсролын хэл болон түүний холбогдсон холбоотой корпора хэлний тусламжтайгаар нэмэгдүүлэх шаардлагатай, олон хүн төрөлхтний арга юм. Гэвч параллел өгөгдлийн санаа олон хэл дээр амархан байхгүй. Энэ ойлголтын хэрэглээ хязгаарлаж байна. Бид эдгээр хэлбэрүүдийг бидний хэлбэрээр ашиглаж байгаа зүйлсийг зөвхөн өндөр хэлбэрээр сургалтын тусламжтайгаар авч үздэг. Бид хоёр хэлний мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрээс хамтран сургалт хийх шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварын шинэ загварын загварыг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Мөн суурь шугам техникуудын тухай үндсэн эзэмшил хөгжүүлэлт гарга Мөн бид олон актив суралцах хиуристик суралцаж байна. Энэ нь өрсөлдөөний багтаах аргыг сайжруулдаг.', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානයක් නිර්දේශ කරනවා අඩුම භාෂාවක් තියෙන්න, ඒ වගේම සමා නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත ගොඩක් භාෂාවට ලේසියෙන් ලැබෙන්නේ නැහැ, මේ වගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සීමාවිත කරන්න. අපි මේ පිළිබඳින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනු අපි සක්\u200dරිය හෙයුරිස්ටික් වලින් සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය බෙන්ච්මාර්', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje kroz jezik model a je prisiljan i popularni metod za predviđanje annotacija na jeziku niskog resursa, u kojem paralelna korpora pruža most visokom jeziku resursa i povezanim s njim annotiranom korporom. Međutim, paralelni podaci nisu lako dostupni za mnoge jezike, ograničavajući primjenu tih pristupa. Mi se obrađujemo ovim nedostatkima u našem okviru koji koristi međujezičke rečenice koje su obučene samo na visokom pokrivanju rečniku. Predlažemo nov model neuralne mreže za zajedničku obuku iz obje izvora podataka baziranog na međujezičkim uvođenjima reèi i pokažemo značajne empiričke poboljšanje prema početnim tehnikama. Takođe predlažemo nekoliko aktivnih heurističkih učenja, što rezultira poboljšanja nad metodama konkurentnih kriterija.', 'so': 'Isku wareejinta qaabka luuqadaha iskuulka ah waa qaab qasab ah oo aad u maamusan karto in la sii sheego calaamad af hoos ah, taas oo shirkadda isbarbarbarka ah ay sameyneyso qalabka luuqada sare ee resource iyo shirkadeedii la xiriiray ay ay wax dhibaataysay. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadka lambarka ah si fudud looma heli karo luuqado badan, taas oo ku xadgudbi kara qaababkan. Waxaannu ku sheekeynaa dib-u-dhabahaas, kaas oo isticmaalaya hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan oo kaliya lagu baray luqada daboolka sare. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model shabakadda neurada ah ee wadajirka waxbarashada wadajirka ah ee labada sourceed oo data ah oo ku saleysan hadalka afka kala duduwan, waxaana tusnaynaa hagaajinta aad u weyn ee ku qoran teknolojiyada aasaasiga ah. Sidoo kale waxaan horumarinaynaa qaar ka mid ah barashada horumarinta, kaas oo sababta horumarinta qaababka hababka iskutallaabta ah.', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig modellöverföring är en övertygande och populär metod för att förutsäga anteckningar på ett språk med låg resurs, där parallella korpora ger en brygga till ett språk med hög resurs, och dess tillhörande kommenterade korpora. Parallella data är dock inte lätt tillgängliga för många språk, vilket begränsar tillämpningen av dessa metoder. Vi tar itu med dessa nackdelar i vårt ramverk som utnyttjar korspråkiga ord inbäddningar utbildade enbart på en högtäckande ordbok. Vi föreslår en ny neural nätverksmodell för gemensam träning från båda datakällorna baserad på korspråkiga ord inbäddningar, och visar betydande empiriska förbättringar jämfört med baslinjetekniker. Vi föreslår också flera aktiva inlärningheuristiker, vilket resulterar i förbättringar jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga benchmarkmetoder.', 'ta': 'கிருஸ்- மொழி மாதிரி மாற்றம் ஒரு தேவையான மற்றும் பெரிய முறைமையாகும் குறைந்த மூலத்தில் அறிவிப்புகளை முன்வாக்குவதற்கான முறைமையாகும், அதனால் ஒப்பிடும However, parallel data is not readily available for many languages, limiting the applicability of these approaches.  நாம் எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் இந்த பின்னோக்குகளை முகவரி செய்கிறோம். அது மொழியில் உள்ள மொழியில் பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்துகிறது ஒர நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய பிணைய மாதிரி முறைமையை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம் மூலங்களில் இருவரும் தகவல் மூலங்களிலிருந்து இணைய பயிற்சியில் சேர் நாம் பல இயங்கும் படிப்புகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முன்நோக்குகிறோம், அது போராட்டும் பெங்குரிய முறைமைகளை மே', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual model transfer is a compelling and popular method for predicting annotations in a low-resource language, whereby parallel corpora provides a bridge to a high-resource language, and its associated annotated corpora. However, parallel data is not readily available for many languages, limiting the application of these approaches. ہم اپنے فرمیٹ میں ان دھوپ کے بارے میں جھگڑتے ہیں جو صرف ایک اچھی دھوپ لفظ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے، کرس زبان لفظ کے مطابق فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک نورال نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں گے کہ ان دونوں منبعوں کی اطلاعات سے ملک ترکین کریں جو کرس-زبان کلمات انڈیینگ پر بنیاد لین تکنیک کے ذریعے بنیاد لین تکنیک کے ذریعے بنیاد پر بہت اہم ترکین کریں ہم نے بہت سی فعال سیکھنے کی ہوریستیک کو بھی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جس کا نتیجہ یہ ہے کہ مسابقات بنچم مارک طریقوں پر زیادہ اضافہ ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, parallel maʼlumot oddiy ko'p tillar uchun mavjud emas, bu usullarning qoʻllanmagan. Biz bu chiziqlarni chegaramizda boshqaramiz, bu so'zning bir necha so'zlarining foydalanishi mumkin, faqat juda katta qarshi lugʻatda o'rganish mumkin. We propose a novel neural network model for joint training from both sources of data based on cross-lingual word embeddings, and show substantial empirical improvements over baseline techniques.  Biz yana bir necha aktiv o'rganish heuristik o'rganishni taqdimiz. Bu o'zgarishni rivojlanish imkoniyatlariga bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Giao dịch xuyên ngôn ngữ là một phương pháp thuyết phục và phổ biến để dự đoán ghi chú bằng ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên, nhờ đó chữ "đồng minh" sẽ cung cấp một cầu cho ngôn ngữ cao tài nguyên, và nhóm "ghi chú" của nó. Tuy nhiên, dữ liệu song song không sẵn sàng cho nhiều ngôn ngữ, giới hạn khả năng sử dụng các phương pháp này. Chúng tôi giải quyết những trở ngại này trong cơ sở của chúng tôi, nó lợi dụng việc nhúng từ ngữ khác nhau được đào tạo chỉ trên một từ điển phổ biến cao. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mạng thần kinh mới cho việc huấn luyện chung từ cả hai nguồn dữ liệu dựa trên sự hiểu biết chữ, và cho thấy những cải tiến thực tế đáng kể trên kỹ thuật cơ bản. Chúng tôi cũng đề xuất vài câu thần kinh học hoạt động, dẫn đến cải thiện các phương pháp tiêu chuẩn cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Трансферът на междуезичен модел е убедителен и популярен метод за предвиждане на анотации на език с ниски ресурси, при който паралелните корпуси осигуряват мост към език с високи ресурси и свързаните с него анотирани корпуси. Паралелните данни обаче не са лесно достъпни за много езици, което ограничава приложимостта на тези подходи. Ние разглеждаме тези недостатъци в нашата рамка, която се възползва от многоезични вграждания на думи, обучени единствено на речник с високо покритие. Предлагаме нов модел на невронна мрежа за съвместно обучение от двата източника на данни, базиран на многоезични вграждания на думи, и показваме значителни емпирични подобрения спрямо базовите техники. Предлагаме и няколко активни евристика на ученето, които водят до подобрения в сравнение с конкурентните референтни методи.', 'da': 'Overførsel på tværs af sprog er en overbevisende og populær metode til at forudsige noteringer på et lavt ressourcesprog, hvor parallelle korpora giver en bro til et højt ressourcesprog, og dets tilhørende annoterede korpora. Parallele data er imidlertid ikke let tilgængelige for mange sprog, hvilket begrænser anvendeligheden af disse metoder. Vi løser disse ulemper i vores rammer, som udnytter tværsprogede ord indlejringer, der udelukkende er uddannet på en høj dækning ordbog. Vi foreslår en ny neural netværksmodel til fælles træning fra begge datakilder baseret på tværsprogede ord indlejringer, og viser betydelige empiriske forbedringer i forhold til baseline teknikker. Vi foreslår også flere aktive læringsheuristikker, som resulterer i forbedringer i forhold til konkurrencedygtige benchmark metoder.', 'de': 'Der translinguale Modelltransfer ist eine überzeugende und beliebte Methode zur Vorhersage von Annotationen in einer ressourcenarmen Sprache, wobei parallele Korpora eine Brücke zu einer ressourcenintensiven Sprache und den zugehörigen annotierten Korpora bilden. Parallele Daten sind jedoch für viele Sprachen nicht ohne weiteres verfügbar, was die Anwendbarkeit dieser Ansätze einschränkt. Wir adressieren diese Nachteile in unserem Framework, das die Vorteile von sprachübergreifenden Worteinbettungen nutzt, die ausschließlich auf einem Wörterbuch mit hoher Abdeckung trainiert werden. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges neuronales Netzwerk-Modell für gemeinsames Training aus beiden Datenquellen vor, basierend auf crosslingualen Worteinbettungen und zeigen erhebliche empirische Verbesserungen gegenüber Basistechniken. Wir schlagen auch mehrere aktive Lernheuristiken vor, die zu Verbesserungen gegenüber wettbewerbsfähigen Benchmark-Methoden führen.', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual model transfer is een aantrekkelijke en populaire methode voor het voorspellen van annotaties in een low-resource taal, waarbij parallelle corpora een brug bieden naar een high-resource taal, en de bijbehorende geannoteerde corpora. Parallele gegevens zijn echter niet gemakkelijk beschikbaar voor veel talen, waardoor de toepasbaarheid van deze benaderingen beperkt is. We pakken deze nadelen aan in ons framework dat gebruik maakt van cross-lingual woord embeddings die uitsluitend zijn getraind op een woordenboek met een hoge dekking. We stellen een nieuw neuraal netwerkmodel voor gezamenlijke training voor op basis van beide gegevensbronnen gebaseerd cross-lingual woord embeddings, en tonen aanzienlijke empirische verbeteringen ten opzichte van baseline technieken. We stellen ook verschillende actieve leerheuristieken voor, die resulteren in verbeteringen ten opzichte van concurrerende benchmarkmethoden.', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje kroz jezički model je prisiljan i popularni metod predviđanja annotacija na jeziku niskog resursa, s kojim paralelna korpora pruža most visokom jeziku resursa i povezanim s njom annotiranom tijelom. Međutim, paralelni podaci nisu lako dostupni za mnoge jezike, ograničavajući primjenu tih pristupa. Obračuvamo te nedostatke u našem okviru koji koriste međujezičke rečenice obučene samo na visokom pokrivačkom rečniku. Predlažemo nov model neuralne mreže za zajedničku obuku iz obje izvora podataka na temelju uključenja međujezičkih riječi i pokazujemo značajne empiričke poboljšanje prema početnim tehnikama. Također predlažemo nekoliko aktivnih heurističkih učenja, što uzrokuje poboljšanje nad metodama konkurentnih kriterija.', 'id': 'Transfer model saling bahasa adalah metode yang meyakinkan dan populer untuk memprediksi anotasi dalam bahasa sumber daya rendah, dimana korpora paralel menyediakan jembatan ke bahasa sumber daya tinggi, dan korpora annotasinya. Namun, data paralel tidak mudah tersedia untuk banyak bahasa, membatasi aplikabilitas pendekatan ini. Kami mengatasi kelemahan-kelemahan ini dalam rangka kami yang mengambil keuntungan dari pembangunan kata saling bahasa dilatih hanya di kamus penutup tinggi. We propose a novel neural network model for joint training from both sources of data based on cross-lingual word embeddings, and show substantial empirical improvements over baseline techniques.  Kami juga mengusulkan beberapa heuristik pembelajaran aktif, yang mengakibatkan peningkatan atas metode benchmark kompetitif.', 'sw': 'Kuhamishi mifano ya lugha yenye rangi ni njia inayolazimishwa na maarufu ya kutabiri matangazo kwa lugha ya chini ya rasilimali, ambapo makampuni yanafanana yanatoa daraja kwa lugha ya rasilimali ya juu, na kampuni yake inayohusiana na kuchanganyikiwa. Hata hivyo, taarifa zinazofanana hazipatikani kwa urahisi kwa lugha nyingi, zinazuia matumizi ya namna hizi. Tunaongelea picha hizi katika mfumo wetu ambao unatumia matumizi ya maneno yanayotumika kwa lugha tofauti yanayofundishwa pekee kwa lugha ya juu. Tunazipendekeza muundo wa mtandao wa kisasa wa neurali wa mafunzo ya pamoja kutoka vyanzo vyote vya data kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maneno ya lugha tofauti, na kuonyesha maboresho makubwa zaidi ya mbinu za msingi. Pia tunapendekeza takwimu kadhaa za kujifunza maarufu, ambazo zinasababisha maendeleo zaidi ya njia za misaada ya ushindani.', 'fa': 'انتقال مدل متوسط زبان یک روش جذابی و محبوب برای پیش بینی کردن آشنایی در زبان کم منبع است که در آن شرکت متوسط یک پل به زبان منبع بالا و شرکت متوسط آن را می دهد. ولی داده\u200cهای متفاوتی برای بسیاری زبان\u200cها به آسانی دسترسی ندارند، محدودیت قابلیت این روش\u200cها را محدودیت می\u200cکند. ما این کثیف\u200cها را در چهارچوب\u200cمون دریافت می\u200cکنیم که از جمله\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای مختلف زبان استفاده می\u200cکند که تنها بر روی یک کلمه\u200cی پوشش بالا آموزش می\u200cدهند. ما یک مدل شبکه عصبی جدید برای آموزش مشترک از هر دو منبع داده بر اساس استفاده کردن کلمات متفاوتی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و بهترین امپراتیک عمده بر اساس تکنیک\u200cهای پایین نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین چندتا هوریستیک یادگیری فعال را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که به نتیجه توسعه\u200cهای روش\u200cهای مقابله رقابت می\u200cرسد.', 'ko': '크로스 언어 모델 전환은 저자원 언어에서 주석을 예측하는 믿음직스럽고 유행하는 방법으로 평행 어료 라이브러리는 고자원 언어와 관련 주석 어료 라이브러리에 다리를 제공한다.그러나 많은 언어들이 병렬 데이터를 쉽게 얻지 못하기 때문에 이러한 방법의 적용성을 제한한다.우리는 이 단점들을 프레임워크에서 해결했다. 이 프레임워크는 높은 범위의 사전에만 훈련된 다중 언어 단어를 삽입했다.우리는 두 데이터 원본에서 연합 훈련을 하는 데 사용되는 새로운 다중 언어 단어에 삽입된 신경 네트워크 모델을 제시했고 기선 기술보다 실질적인 경험 개선을 보여 주었다.우리는 또 몇 가지 주동적인 학습 계발법을 제기했는데 이런 방법은 경쟁적인 기준 방법보다 개선되었다.', 'tr': 'Çapraz dili nusgasy düşürmek üçin örän täsirli we meşhur yöntemdir. Bu sebäpden parallel korpora ýokary resurslar dili we onuň nähili täze bir köprügi saýlaýar. Ýöne, parallel maglumatlar köp diller üçin ullanyşyp bilmeýär. Bu ýakynlaryň uygulamasyny mümkin edýär. Biz bu çekilmeleri öz çerçewçimizde çykarýarys. Bu çerçewçew dillerde diňe ýokary bir sözlükde bilinen a ňsat alýar. Biz hem data çeşmelerinden uluslary söz integrasyna daýanýan, hem basit tehnikalaryň üstünde möhüm empirik gelişmelerini görkezmek üçin täze bir neural şebeke modelini teklip berýäris. Biz hem birnäçe aktiw öwrenmek heuristiklerini teklip edip görýäris. Bu näçe çempionlyk düzeltmegi ýüzerinde täzelikler bolar.', 'af': "Kruistale model oordrag is 'n verstandige en populêre metode vir voorskou van notasies in 'n lae hulpbron taal, waarmee parallele korpora 'n brig verskaf na' n hoë hulpbron taal en sy geassosieerde annotateerde korpora. Maar parallele data is nie leeg beskikbaar vir baie tale nie, beperk die toepassing van hierdie toegang. Ons adres hierdie onttrekkings in ons raamwerk wat voordeel neem van kruistale woord inbêding wat slegs op 'n hoë dekkenwoordeboek opgelei is. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe neuralnetwerk model vir joint oefening van beide bronne van data gebaseer op kruistale woorde inbettings en wys groot empiriese verbeteringe oor basisline teknike. Ons voorstel ook verskeie aktiewe heuristieke om te leer, wat resultaat in verbeteringe oor konkurrentlike benchmarkmetodes.", 'sq': 'Transferimi i modelit ndërgjuhësor është një metodë bindëse dhe popullore për parashikimin e anotacioneve në një gjuhë me burime të ulëta, me të cilën korpra paralele ofron një urë në një gjuhë me burime të larta dhe korpra të njohur me të. Megjithatë, të dhënat paralele nuk janë lehtë në dispozicion për shumë gjuhë, duke kufizuar aplikabilitetin e këtyre qasjeve. Ne i trajtojmë këto mungesa në kuadrin tonë që përfiton nga përfshirjet e fjalëve ndërgjuhësore të trajnuara vetëm në një fjalor të mbuluar të lartë. Ne propozojmë një model të ri rrjeti neural për trajnimin e përbashkët nga të dy burimet e të dhënave bazuar në përfshirjet e fjalëve ndërgjuhësore dhe tregojmë përmirësime thelbësore empirike lidhur me teknikat bazë. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu disa heuristikë të mësimit aktiv që rezultojnë në përmirësime lidhur me metodat konkurruese të referencës.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መዘዋወር አግኝቷል እና የተፈጸመ የሆኑት አካባቢ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የተለየ ዳታ ለብዙ ቋንቋዎች ቀላል አይገኝም፣ የእነዚህን ደረጃዎች አቅራቢ ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላትን ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅመውን እነዚህን ጀርባዎች በአፍረተ ገራችን እናስገራለን፡፡ በሁለቱ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ቃላት የግንኙነት የደብዳቤ መረብ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ We also propose several active learning heuristics, which result in improvements over competitive benchmark methods.', 'az': 'Çərz dil modellərin təkrarlaması düşük ressurs dilində yazılmaları təmin etmək üçün çox qüvvətli və məşhur bir yöntemdir. Beləcə, paralel korpora yüksək ressurs dilinə köprü və onunla birlikdə yazılmış korpora təkrarlayır. Lakin paralel məlumatlar çox dillər üçün asanlıqla faydalanır, bu məlumatların uyğunluğunu sınırlayır. Biz bu çətinliklərə qarşı dilli sözlərin sadəcə yüksək sözlükdə təhsil edilən çox çətinliklərdən faydalanır. Biz hər iki məlumatların çoxlu dilli sözlərin içərisində dayanan məlumatların birlikdə təhsil etmək üçün yeni nöral a ğ modeli təklif edirik və baseline teknikləri üzərində böyük empirik düzəltmələri göstəririk. Biz həmçin in bir neçə fəaliq öyrənmə heuristik təklif edirik ki, bu da müəllif benchmark metodları üzərində daha yaxşılaşdırılır.', 'hy': 'Մոդելի միջլեզվային փոխանցումը համոզիչ և հայտնի մեթոդ է ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզվով նշումների կանխատեսման համար, որի միջոցով զուգահեռ կառուցվածքները կամուրջ են տալիս բարձր ռեսուրսների լեզվով և դրանց կապված նշումների կառուցված Սակայն զուգահեռ տվյալները շատ լեզուների համար հեշտությամբ հասանելի չեն, սահմանափակում են այս մոտեցումների կիրառելիությունը: Մենք վերաբերում ենք այս թերություններին մեր շրջանակներում, որոնք օգտագործում են լեզվային բառերի խաչը ներգրավված բառերը, որոնք պատրաստված են միայն բարձր ծածկության բառարանում: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր նյարդային ցանցի մոդել, որպեսզի երկու տվյալների աղբյուրներից միասին կրթություն ստանանք, հիմնված երկլեզվային բառերի ներդրման վրա, և ցույց տանք նշանակալի էմպիրիկ բարելավումներ հիմնական տեխն Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի քանի ակտիվ ուսուցման հորիստիկ, որոնք հանգեցնում են մրցակցության համեմատական մեթոդների բարելավման:', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje kroz jezik model a je prisiljan i popularan metod predviđanja annotacija na jeziku niskog resursa, kojim paralelna korpora pruža most visokom jeziku resursa i povezanom s njim annotiranom korporom. Međutim, paralelni podaci nisu lako dostupni za mnoge jezike, ograničavajući primjenu tih pristupa. Obrađujemo te nedostatke u našem okviru koji koriste međujezičke rečenice obučene samo na visokom pokrivačkom rečniku. Predlažemo nov model neuralne mreže za zajedničku obuku iz obje izvora podataka baziranog na uključenju međujezičkih riječi i pokažemo značajne empiričke poboljšanje prema početnim tehnikama. Također predlažemo nekoliko aktivnih heurističkih učenja, što uzrokuje poboljšanje nad metodama konkurentnih kriterija.', 'ca': "La transfer ència translingüística del model és un mètode convincent i popular per predir anotacions en un llenguatge de baix recursos, en el qual la corpora paralèl·lela proporciona un pont a un llenguatge d'alt recurso, i la corpora anotata associada. No obstant això, les dades paralleles no són fàcilment disponibles per a moltes llengües, limitant l'aplicabilitat d'aquests enfocaments. Ens ocupem d'aquests inconvenients en el nostre marc que aprofita l'incorporació de paraules translingües formada només en un diccionari d'alta cobertura. Proposem un nou model de xarxa neural per formar conjuntament des de les dues fonts de dades basats en incorporacions de paraules translingües, i mostram millores empíriques substancials en relació amb les tècniques basales. També proposem diverses heurístiques actives d'aprenentatge, que resulten en millors en comparació amb mètodes competitius.", 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার মডেল পরিবর্তন একটি বাধ্যতামূলক এবং জনপ্রিয় পদ্ধতি যা কম সম্পদ ভাষায় ঘোষণা প্রত্যাখ্যান করার জন্য, যার মাধ্যমে প্যারালেল কর্পোরা উচ্চ সম্পদ ভাষার জন্য একটি ব্রি তবে প্যারালেল ডাটা অনেক ভাষার জন্য সহজে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে না, এই ধরনের পদ্ধতির প্রয়োগ সীমাবদ্ধ করা হচ্ছে। আমরা আমাদের ফ্রেমে এই আবর্জনাগুলোকে কথা বলি যা ক্রিভাষাভাষী শব্দের সুবিধা প্রদান করে শুধুমাত্র উচ্চ কাভারেজের অভিধানে প আমরা একটি নভেল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যৌথ প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য ডাটা উভয়ের সূত্রের প্রস্তাব এবং বেসালাইনের প্রযুক্তির উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তি আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি সক্রিয় শিক্ষা শিক্ষার প্রস্তাব করছি, যার ফলে প্রতিযোগিতা বেনম্যার্কের মাধ্যমে উন্নতি ঘটে।', 'cs': 'Cross-jazyčný přenos modelu je přesvědčivá a populární metoda pro predikci anotací v jazyce s nízkými zdroji, přičemž paralelní korpusy poskytují most k jazyku s vysokými zdroji a s ním souvisejícím anotovaným korpusům. Paralelní data však nejsou snadno dostupná pro mnoho jazyků, což omezuje použitelnost těchto přístupů. Tyto nevýhody řešíme v rámci našeho rámce, který využívá výhod včetně vkládání slov trénovaných výhradně na slovníku s vysokým pokrytím. Navrhujeme nový model neuronové sítě pro společný trénink z obou zdrojů dat založený na vložení více jazyků slov a ukazujeme výrazné empirické zlepšení oproti základním technikám. Navrhujeme také několik aktivních heuristik učení, které vedou ke zlepšení oproti konkurenčním benchmarkovým metodám.', 'et': 'Keeleülene mudeli ülekanne on mõjuv ja populaarne meetod märkuste prognoosimiseks vähese ressursiga keeles, kusjuures paralleelkorporid annavad silla suure ressursiga keelele ja sellega seotud märgitud korpusele. Paralleelsed andmed ei ole siiski paljude keelte kohta kergesti kättesaadavad, mis piirab nende lähenemisviiside kohaldatavust. Nende puudustega tegeleme oma raamistikus, mis kasutab ära keeleüleseid sõnade manustamist, mis on koolitatud ainult kõrge katvusega sõnastikule. Pakume välja uuendusliku neurovõrgu mudeli ühiseks koolituseks mõlemast andmeallikast, mis põhineb keeleülestel sõnadel, ning näitame olulisi empiirilisi edusamme võrreldes baastehnikatega. Samuti pakume välja mitmeid aktiivseid õppeheuristikaid, mille tulemuseks on konkurentsivõimeliste võrdlusmeetoditega võrreldes paranemine.', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälinen mallisiirto on kiehtova ja suosittu tapa ennustaa huomautuksia vähäresurssisella kielellä, jossa rinnakkaiset korpuset tarjoavat sillan korkean resurssin kieleen ja siihen liittyviin annotoituihin korpusiin. Monilta kieliltä ei kuitenkaan ole saatavilla rinnakkaisia tietoja, mikä rajoittaa näiden lähestymistapojen sovellettavuutta. Käsittelemme näitä haittoja viitekehyksessämme, jossa hyödynnetään monikielisiä sanamuotoja, jotka on koulutettu yksinomaan korkean kattavuuden sanakirjassa. Ehdotamme uudenlaista neuroverkkomallia yhteiskoulutukseen molemmista tietolähteistä, joka perustuu monikielisiin sanaupotuksiin, ja näytämme merkittäviä empiirisiä parannuksia perustekniikoihin verrattuna. Lisäksi ehdotamme useita aktiivisia oppimisheuristikoita, jotka johtavat parannuksiin verrattuna kilpailukykyisiin vertailumenetelmiin.', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates politenessoffpolite, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe barang-barang iki luwih dumaten ning sekolahan sing dibutungan winih, lan uwis kuwi nggawe barang langgar kuwi mbasun. Awak dhéwé nggunakake model sing nyeangno kuwi ngéwé, ngéwé éntukno sistem sing gawe ngupakan karo data sing basa gambarang langgar-langgar embedding, lan sembarang langgar tarjamahan kanggo nyenggawe sistem sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe sistem sing nggawe Juuristik sing bisa nyebutne gambar nggawe barang nggawe bench-arahan sing bisa basa gambar nggawe', 'he': 'Cross-lingual model transfer is a compelling and popular method for predicting annotations in a low-resource language, whereby parallel corpora provide a bridge to a high-resource language, and its associated annotated corpora.  בכל אופן, נתונים מקבילים אינם זמינים בקלות לשפות רבות, מגבילים את אפשרות הגישות הללו. אנו מתמודדים עם החסרונות האלה במסגרתנו שמשתמשים באמצעות מילים דרך שפתיים מאומנות רק במילון כיסוי גבוה. אנו מציעים מודל רשת עצבית חדש לאימונים משותפים משני מקורות נתונים מבוססים על קיצוב מילים דרך שפתיים, ולהראות שיפורים אמפיריים משמעותיים על טכניקות הבסיס. אנחנו גם מציעים כמה היוריסטיקות ללמוד פעילות, מה שמוביל בשיפורים מעל שיטות רמז תחרותיות.', 'sk': 'Medjezični prenos modela je prepričljiva in priljubljena metoda za napovedovanje opomb v jeziku z nizkimi viri, pri čemer vzporedni korpusi zagotavljajo most do jezika z visokimi viri in z njim povezanih opombnih korpusov. Vendar vzporedni podatki za številne jezike niso zlahka na voljo, kar omejuje uporabo teh pristopov. Te pomanjkljivosti obravnavamo v našem okviru, ki izkorišča večjezične vgradnje besed, usposobljene izključno na slovarju visoke pokritosti. Predlagamo nov model nevronskega omrežja za skupno usposabljanje iz obeh virov podatkov, ki temelji na medjezičnih besednih vdelavah, in prikazujemo znatne empirične izboljšave v primerjavi z osnovnimi tehnikami. Predlagamo tudi več heuristik aktivnega učenja, ki prinašajo izboljšave v primerjavi s konkurenčnimi referenčnimi metodami.', 'ha': "Motsarin misalin-harshen na fassarar-nau'in shine wata hanyoyi mai lazimta da umare wa mai bastarwa da ake yi gargaɗi cikin harshen wani wuri mai ƙasƙanci, da kuma shirin kamfansa yana samar da wata birawa zuwa harshe na sarki, da kuma yana da shirin koronata wanda aka yi na zartar da shi. A lokacin da, data masu daidaita ba za'a iya amfani da sauƙi ba ga wasu harshen masu yawa, kuma yana ƙunsa da shirin ayukan wannan masu hanyarwa. Munã wajabta wannan durowa cikin firam da ke amfani da maganar ta cikin lugha ta fara ɗaya wanda aka sanar da shi kawai kan wata takardar rufe. Tune buɗa ɗe wani misali na jerin neural na yanzu wa shirin haɗi daga duk sourcen data, a kan bincike da maganar-tsohon-linguin, kuma Mu nuna masu muhimmi wa kewayi a kan technical-layin. Kayya, Munã goyya da wasu masu karanta heuristic masu aikin da ke iya ƙaranci kodi na hanyoyin littafi.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔེ་བསྐྱེད་འདྲེན་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་དང་མི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་གཞུང་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་འདི་དག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་ཡིན་པའི་(cross-lingual word embeddings) ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་ལས་འ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞན་པ་ཤིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'EuroSense : Automatic Harvesting of Multilingual Sense Annotations from Parallel Text', 'ar': 'EuroSense: الحصاد التلقائي للتعليقات التوضيحية متعددة اللغات من النص المتوازي', 'es': 'EuroSense: Recolección automática de anotaciones sensoriales multilingües de texto paralelo', 'fr': 'EuroSense\xa0: collecte automatique des annotations de sens multilingues à partir de texte parallèle', 'pt': 'EuroSense: Coleta Automática de Anotações de Sentido Multilíngue de Texto Paralelo', 'ja': 'ユーロセンス：並列テキストからの多言語センス注釈の自動収穫', 'zh': 'EuroSense:并行文本自取多言感知注', 'hi': 'EuroSense: समानांतर पाठ से बहुभाषी भावना एनोटेशन की स्वचालित कटाई', 'ru': 'EuroSense: автоматический сбор многоязычных смысловых аннотаций из параллельного текста', 'ga': 'EuroSense: Anótálacha Braite Ilteangacha a Bhaint go Uathoibríoch ó Téacs Comhthreomhar', 'ka': 'EuroSense: პარალელი ტექსტიდან მრავალენგური სიგრძნების ავტომატური გადატანა', 'hu': 'EuroSense: Többnyelvű érzékelési jegyzetek automatikus begyűjtése párhuzamos szövegből', 'el': 'Αυτόματη συλλογή πολυγλωσσικών σχολίων από παράλληλο κείμενο', 'it': 'EuroSense: raccolta automatica di annotazioni di senso multilingue da testo parallelo', 'lt': 'EuroSense: Automatinis daugiakalbių jutimo pranešimų rinkimas iš lygiagrečiojo teksto', 'kk': 'EuroSense: параллер мәтіннен көп тілді сезімді автоматты түрде жазылу', 'mk': 'EuroSense: Автоматско собирање на повеќејазични анатации од паралелен текст', 'ms': 'EuroSense: Pengambilan Automatik Annotasi Sens Berbahasa Dari Teks Paralel', 'mt': 'EuroSense: Ħsil Awtomatiku ta’ Annotazzjonijiet ta’ Sens Multilingwi mit-Test Paralelu', 'ml': 'യൂറോപെന്\u200dസ്: പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സെന്\u200dസ് അറിയിപ്പുകളുടെ സ്വയമായി കഠിനമാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'EuroSense: Олон хэлний мэдрэмжүүдийн автоматтыг автоматжуулах', 'no': 'EuroSense: Automatisk oppretting av fleirspråk førsel- notasjonar frå parallelle tekst', 'pl': 'EuroSense: Automatyczne zbieranie wielojęzycznych adnotacji zmysłu z tekstu równoległego', 'ro': 'EuroSense: Recoltarea automată a adnotărilor de simț multilingv din text paralel', 'sr': 'EuroSense: automatska prikupljanja višejezičkih oznake o osećanju iz paralelnog teksta', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'EuroSense: Automatisk skörd av flerspråkiga Sense-anteckningar från parallell text', 'ta': 'EuroSense: Automatic Harvesting of Multilingual Sense Annotations from Parallel Text', 'ur': 'EuroSense: Auto Harvesting of Multilingual Sense Annotations from Parallel Text', 'so': 'Yurub Sense: Automatic Harvesting of Sense luuqado badan Annotations from Parallel text', 'uz': 'Oyropa Sense: Parallel matdan avtomatik koʻchirish', 'vi': 'tiết mục thu hoạch cảm xúc đa ngôn ngữ từ văn bản Parallel', 'bg': 'Автоматично събиране на многоезични сензорни анотации от паралелен текст', 'hr': 'EuroSense: automatska prikupljanja višejezičkih oznake osjećaja iz paralelnog teksta', 'da': 'EuroSense: Automatisk høst af flersprogede sanseanmærkninger fra paralleltekst', 'nl': 'EuroSense: Automatisch oogsten van meertalige zintuigaantekeningen uit parallelle tekst', 'de': 'EuroSense: Automatische Erfassung von mehrsprachigen Sense-Anmerkungen aus Paralleltext', 'ko': 'EuroSense: 평행 텍스트에서 다국어 감각적 주석 자동 가져오기', 'id': 'EuroSense: Automatic Harvesting of Multilingual Sense Annotations from Parallel Text', 'fa': 'EuroSense: اخراج خودکار از اظهار حس\u200cهای زیادی زبان از متن پارالی', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Ulaya: Kukabiliwa na Matangazo ya Sensi ya lugha nyingi kutoka Makala ya Parallel', 'tr': "EuroSense: Multilingual Sense Notasyonu Parallel Metin'den Otomatik Yayınlama", 'sq': 'EuroSense: Zgjidhja automatike e anotacioneve të sensit shumëgjuhës nga teksti paralel', 'af': 'EuroSense: Automaties aanvang van Multilingual Sense Notasies van Parallele Teks', 'hy': 'ԵվրոՍենզ. Մոտ լեզու զգացմունքների ավտոմատ հավաքելը զուգահեռ տեքստից', 'am': 'አውሮፓሊስ: Automatic Harvesting of Multilingual Sense Annotations from Parallel Text', 'az': 'EuroSense: Parallel M…ôtnd…ôn √ßoxlu dil Sense Annotations', 'bn': 'ইউরোসেন: প্যারেল লেখা থেকে বহুভাষী সেন্সের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংক্রান্ত ঘোষণা', 'ca': 'EuroSense: Recollir automàticament anotacions de sentits multilingües a partir del text parallel', 'bs': 'EuroSense: automatska prikupljanja višejezičkih oznake osjećaja iz paralelnog teksta', 'cs': 'EuroSense: Automatické shromažďování vícejazyčných poznámek smyslu z paralelního textu', 'et': 'EuroSense: mitmekeelsete sense märkuste automaatne kogumine paralleelsest tekstist', 'fi': 'EuroSense: Monikielisten aistihuomautusten automaattinen kerääminen rinnakkaistekstistä', 'jv': 'Yuro Sense: Automatically harbouring of Multilanguage Sense Text', 'he': 'EuroSense: קצירת אוטומטית של הערות של חוש רבות שפות מתוך טקסט Parallel', 'sk': 'EuroSense: Samodejno zbiranje večjezičnih opomb za senzor iz vzporednega besedila', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'EuroSense: རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྦྱར་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཏོང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཚིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྒོ་འབྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Parallel corpora are widely used in a variety of Natural Language Processing tasks, from Machine Translation to cross-lingual Word Sense Disambiguation, where parallel sentences can be exploited to automatically generate high-quality sense annotations on a large scale. In this paper we present EuroSense, a multilingual sense-annotated resource based on the joint disambiguation of the Europarl parallel corpus, with almost 123 million sense annotations for over 155 thousand distinct concepts and entities from a language-independent unified sense inventory. We evaluate the quality of our sense annotations intrinsically and extrinsically, showing their effectiveness as training data for Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'ar': 'تُستخدم النصوص المتوازية على نطاق واسع في مجموعة متنوعة من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، من الترجمة الآلية إلى توضيح حاسة الكلمات عبر اللغات ، حيث يمكن استغلال الجمل المتوازية لإنشاء تعليقات توضيحية ذات جودة عالية تلقائيًا على نطاق واسع. نقدم في هذه الورقة البحثية EuroSense ، وهو مورد متعدد اللغات متعدد الحواس يعتمد على توضيح مشترك لمجموعة Europarl المتوازية ، مع ما يقرب من 123 مليون تعليق توضيحي ذي معنى لأكثر من 155 ألف مفهوم وكيان متميز من جرد حاسة موحد مستقل عن اللغة. نقوم بتقييم جودة التعليقات التوضيحية الخاصة بنا بشكل جوهري وخارجي ، مع إظهار فعاليتها كبيانات تدريبية لتوضيح Word Sense.', 'fr': "Les corpus parallèles sont largement utilisés dans diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel, de la traduction automatique à la désambiguïsation multilingue du sens des mots, où des phrases parallèles peuvent être exploitées pour générer automatiquement des annotations sensorielles de haute qualité à grande échelle. Dans cet article, nous présentons EuroSense, une ressource multilingue annotée par les sens basée sur la désambiguïsation conjointe du corpus parallèle Europarl, avec près de 123 millions d'annotations de sens pour plus de 155 000 concepts et entités distincts à partir d'un inventaire des sens unifié indépendant de la langue. Nous évaluons la qualité de nos annotations sensorielles de manière intrinsèque et extrinsèque, démontrant leur efficacité en tant que données d'entraînement pour la désambiguïsation de sens Word.", 'es': 'Los corpus paralelos se utilizan ampliamente en una variedad de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, desde la traducción automática hasta la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras en varios idiomas, donde las oraciones paralelas se pueden aprovechar para generar automáticamente anotaciones sensoriales de alta calidad a gran escala. En este artículo presentamos EuroSense, un recurso multilingüe con anotaciones sensoriales basado en la desambiguación conjunta del corpus paralelo de Europarl, con casi 123 millones de anotaciones sensoriales para más de 155 mil conceptos y entidades distintos de un inventario de sentido unificado independiente del idioma. Evaluamos la calidad de nuestras anotaciones sensoriales intrínseca y extrínsecamente, demostrando su eficacia como datos de entrenamiento para la desambiguación de los sentidos de las palabras.', 'pt': 'Corpora paralelos são amplamente utilizados em uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, desde a tradução automática até a desambiguação de sentido de palavras em vários idiomas, onde sentenças paralelas podem ser exploradas para gerar automaticamente anotações de sentido de alta qualidade em grande escala. Neste artigo apresentamos o EuroSense, um recurso multilíngue de anotações de sentido baseado na desambiguação conjunta do corpus paralelo Europarl, com quase 123 milhões de anotações de sentido para mais de 155 mil conceitos e entidades distintas de um inventário de sentido unificado independente de idioma. Avaliamos a qualidade de nossas anotações de sentido intrínseca e extrinsecamente, mostrando sua eficácia como dados de treinamento para Desambiguação de Sentido de Palavras.', 'ja': '並列体は、機械翻訳からクロスリンガルのワードセンス曖昧化まで、さまざまな自然言語処理タスクで広く使用されており、並列文を利用して高品質のセンス注釈を自動的に大規模に生成することができます。この論文では、EuroSenseを紹介します。EuroSenseは、Europarlの並行コーパスの共同の曖昧さ解消に基づいた多言語感覚注釈付きリソースで、言語に依存しない統一感覚インベントリから155,000以上の異なる概念とエンティティに対するほぼ1億2300万の感覚注釈を備えています。私たちは、感覚的注釈の品質を本質的および外部的に評価し、ワードセンスの曖昧さ解消のためのトレーニングデータとしての有効性を示します。', 'zh': '并行语料库广施诸自然语言处分,自机器翻译至跨语言词义消歧义,其并行句可以大自生高质量者注之。 本文引EuroSense,盖Europarl并行语料库之合消歧多言感官注资,有独立于言语者过155,000异名近1.23亿个者也。 自内外评注,示以词义消歧义训练之有效性。', 'ru': 'Параллельные корпуса широко используются в различных задачах обработки естественного языка, от машинного перевода до кросс-лингвистической раздробленности смысла слова, где параллельные предложения могут быть использованы для автоматического создания высококачественных смысловых аннотаций в большом масштабе. В этой статье мы представляем EuroSense, многоязычный сенсорный аннотированный ресурс, основанный на совместной дезамбигировании параллельного корпуса Europarl, с почти 123 миллионами сенсорных аннотаций для более чем 155 тысяч различных концепций и сущностей из независимого от языка единого сенсового перечня. Мы оцениваем качество наших смысловых аннотаций как изнутри, так и извне, показывая их эффективность в качестве обучающих данных для Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'hi': 'समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट व्यापक रूप से प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों की एक किस्म में उपयोग किया जाता है, मशीन अनुवाद से क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वर्ड सेंस डिसकंबिगेशन तक, जहां समानांतर वाक्यों को बड़े पैमाने पर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले अर्थ एनोटेशन को स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न करने के लिए शोषण किया जा सकता है। इस पेपर में हम EuroSense, Europarl समानांतर कॉर्पस के संयुक्त disambiguation के आधार पर एक बहुभाषी अर्थ-एनोटेटेड संसाधन प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसमें 155 हजार से अधिक अलग-अलग अवधारणाओं और संस्थाओं के लिए लगभग 123 मिलियन सेंस एनोटेशन होते हैं। हम आंतरिक और बाह्य रूप से हमारे अर्थ एनोटेशन की गुणवत्ता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, वर्ड सेंस डिसकम्पिगेशन के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा के रूप में उनकी प्रभावशीलता दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Úsáidtear corpora comhthreomhara go forleathan i dtascanna Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha éagsúla, ó Aistriú Meaisín go Disathmbiuation Word Sense Trastheangach, áit ar féidir úsáid a bhaint as abairtí comhthreomhara chun nótaí braite ardchaighdeáin a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch ar scála mór. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid EuroSense i láthair, acmhainn ilteangach chiall-anótáilte bunaithe ar dhí-athbhrí ar chorpas comhthreomhar Europarl, a bhfuil beagnach 123 milliún nóta céadfaíochta ann do bhreis is 155 míle coincheap agus eintiteas ar leith ó fhardal aontaithe mothaithe teanga-neamhspleách. Déanaimid measúnú ar cháilíocht ár nótaí braite go bunúsach agus go heachtrach, ag taispeáint a n-éifeachtúlachta mar shonraí oiliúna le haghaidh Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'el': 'Τα παράλληλα σώματα χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως σε ποικίλες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, από τη μηχανική μετάφραση έως τη διασγλωσσική αποσαφήνιση της αίσθησης λέξεων, όπου οι παράλληλες προτάσεις μπορούν να αξιοποιηθούν για να δημιουργήσουν αυτόματα σχόλια υψηλής ποιότητας σε μεγάλη κλίμακα. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε έναν πολύγλωσσο πόρο με σημειώσεις αισθήσεων βασισμένο στην κοινή αποσαφήνιση του παράλληλου σώματος με σχεδόν 123 εκατομμύρια σημειώσεις αισθήσεων για πάνω από 155 χιλιάδες διακριτές έννοιες και οντότητες από έναν γλωσσικό ενοποιημένο κατάλογο αισθήσεων. Αξιολογούμε την ποιότητα των αισθητηριακών σχολίων μας εγγενώς και εξωτερικά, δείχνοντας την αποτελεσματικότητά τους ως δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης για την Απεμφισβήτηση της Λογικής.', 'hu': 'A párhuzamos korpuszokat széles körben használják a különböző természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokban, a gépi fordítástól a többnyelvű Word Sense Disambiguation-ig, ahol a párhuzamos mondatok kihasználhatók, hogy automatikusan kiváló minőségű érzékelési jegyzeteket generáljanak nagymértékben. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az EuroSense-t, egy többnyelvű érzékeléssel ellátott forrást, amely az Europarl párhuzamos korpusz közös egyértelműsítésén alapul, amely közel 123 millió érzékeléssel rendelkezik több mint 155 ezer különböző fogalomról és entitásról egy nyelvfüggetlen egységes érzékelési leltárból. Érzékelési jegyzeteink minőségét lényegében és külsőleg értékeljük, bemutatva azok hatékonyságát, mint a Word Sense Disambiguation képzési adatait.', 'it': 'I corpora paralleli sono ampiamente utilizzati in una varietà di attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, dalla traduzione automatica alla disambiguazione del senso delle parole multilingue, dove le frasi parallele possono essere sfruttate per generare automaticamente annotazioni di senso di alta qualità su larga scala. In questo articolo presentiamo EuroSense, una risorsa multilingue con annotazioni di senso basata sulla disambiguazione congiunta del corpus parallelo Europarl, con quasi 123 milioni di annotazioni di senso per oltre 155 mila concetti ed entità distinte da un inventario di senso unificato indipendente dalla lingua. Valutiamo la qualità delle nostre annotazioni sensoriali intrinsecamente ed estrinsecamente, mostrando la loro efficacia come dati di formazione per Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'kk': 'Параллельді корпора бірнеше түрлі Түзіндік тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларында қолданылады, машинаның аудару тілдерінен бірнеше тілдерді сөздерді өзгерту үшін, параллель сөздерді автоматты түрде үлкен масштабтағы жоғары сапатты оңдат Бұл қағазда біз EuroSense-ді бірнеше тілдердің көптеген түсініктер ресурсын Еуропалдық параллель корпус бағытталған, бірнеше мәліметтердің көптеген түсініктерінің біріктірілігіне негізделген, олардың 155 мың көптеген концепциялар мен бірікт Біз сезіміздің түсініктеріміздің сапатын ішкі және сыртқы түсініктеріміздің сапатын бағалаймыз, олардың эффективнігін Word Sense Disambiguation деректері ретінде көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Paraleliniai korporai plačiai naudojami įvairiose gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse, nuo mašin ų vertimo iki tarpkalbinio žodžių jausmų nedviprasmiškumo, kur lygiagretūs sakiniai gali būti naudojami automatiškai generuojant aukštos kokybės jutimo anotacijas dideliu mastu. Šiame dokumente pristatome EuroSense, daugiakalbį jausmų anotuotą išteklių, grindžiamą bendra Europarl paralelinio korpuso nedviprasmiškumu, su beveik 123 milijonais jausmų anotacijų daugiau kaip 155 tūkstančių skirtingų sąvokų ir subjektų, gautų iš kalbos nepriklausomo vieningo supratimo sąrašo. Mes vertiname savo jutimo anotacijų kokybę iš esmės ir iš išorės, parodydami jų veiksmingumą kaip mokymo duomenys žodžio jutimo nedviprasmiškumui.', 'ka': 'პარალვლური კოპორაცია ძალიან გამოიყენება განსხვავებული ნახვა ენერგიის პროცესი დამუშაობაში, მაქსინური გადატყვებადან მრავალური სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე, სადაც პარალვლური სიტყვები შეიძლება ავტომატურად გამოყ ამ დოგომაში ჩვენ EuroSense-ს გამოსახულებთ, მრავალენგური სიგრძნობის მონიტორებული რესურსი, რომელიც ვუპოლალის პარალელური კორპუსის ერთადერთი განამბიGUაციაზე დაბაზიან, პირველ 123 მილიონი სიგრძნობის მონიტორები 155 000 განსხვავ ჩვენ გავუმუშავებთ ჩვენი სიგრძნობის ანოტაციების საშუალოდ და extrinsically, რომლებიც ჩვენი ეფექტიურობას ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომლებიც საშუალოდ მონაცემების მონაცე', 'mk': 'Паралелната корпора е широко употребена во различни задачи за процесирање на природен јазик, од машинска преведувачка до прекујазична раздвојување на чувството на зборови, каде паралелните реченици можат да се искористат за автоматски да се генерираат висококвалитетни сетилни анотации на голема маса Во овој весник го претставуваме Еуросенс, мултијазичен ресурс со анотирано чувство, базиран на заедничката дејамбигуација на паралелниот корпус на Еурарл, со скоро 123 милиони анотирани чувства за повеќе од 155 илјади различни концепти и ентитети од инвенторијата на обединето чувство, независно од јази Ние го проценуваме квалитетот на нашите анотации на чувството интрински и надворешно, покажувајќи ја нивната ефикасност како податоци за обука за раздвојување на зборовите чувства.', 'ms': 'Korpora paralel digunakan secara luas dalam pelbagai tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami, dari Penerjemahan Mesin ke Pemindahan Sens Perkataan saling bahasa, di mana kalimat paralel boleh dieksploitasi untuk secara automatik menghasilkan anotasi sens kualiti tinggi pada skala besar. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan EuroSense, sumber berbagai bahasa yang dicatat berdasarkan penyelesaian kongsi dari korpus paralel Europarl, dengan hampir 123 juta anotasi sensi untuk lebih dari 155 ribu konsep dan entiti yang berbeza dari inventori sensi bersatu bebas bahasa. Kami menilai kualiti anotasi perasaan kita secara dalaman dan luar, menunjukkan kegunaan mereka sebagai data latihan untuk Penjelasan Sensa Perkataan.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ, മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ക്രിവ്ലാന്\u200dസ് വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d യൂറോസെന്\u200dസിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, യൂറോപ്പറല്\u200d പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പല ഭാഷക്കുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, 155,000 വ്യത്യസ്ത ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ് നമ്മുടെ മനസ്സിന്റെ ഗുണത്തെ നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അകത്തുനിന്നും പുറത്തുനിന്നുമുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d, വാക്ക് സെന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Параллель корпора нь машины хөрөнгө оруулалтаас олон хэл хөрөнгө оруулах үйл ажиллагаанд машины хөрөнгө оруулалтаас олон хэл хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулалт хийгддэг. Энэ параллел өгүүлэлт нь маш их хэмжээнд автоматаар өндөр чанартай мэд Энэ цаасан дээр бид EuroSense-г олон хэлний мэдрэмжтэй боловсролыг Европаль параллел корпус-ын нийлбэрээр багтаж байгаа олон хэлний мэдрэмжтэй боловсролыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь ойролцоогоор 123 сая хүний мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй нийлбэрээр 155 мянган тө Бид өөрсдийн мэдрэмжүүдийн хэмжээг дотор болон гадаадаг хэмжээгээр үнэлдэг. Тэдний үр дүнтэй байдлыг Word Sense Disambiguation гэх мэт сургалтын өгөгдлийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Korpora parallel a tintuża b’mod wiesa’ f’varjetà ta’ kompiti ta’ Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali, mit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni għad-Diżambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-Kliem bejn il-lingwi, fejn sentenzi paralleli jistgħu jiġu sfruttati biex awtomatikament jiġġeneraw annotazzjonijiet ta’ sens ta’ kwalità għolja fuq skala kbira. F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw EuroSense, riżorsa multilingwi annotata bis-sens ibbażata fuq id-diżambigwazzjoni konġunta tal-Europarl parallel corpus, bi kważi 123 miljun annotazzjoni bis-sens għal aktar minn 155,000 kunċett u entità distinti minn inventarju tas-sens unifikat indipendenti mil-lingwa. We evaluate the quality of our sense annotations intrinsically and extrinsically, showing their effectiveness as training data for Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'no': 'Parallel korpora vert breidd bruka i mange naturspråk- handsamar- oppgåver, frå maskineomsetjing til krysspråk- ordførsel- avsløring, der parallelle setningar kan brukast for å automatisk laga høg- kvalitetsinnstillingar på stor skala. I denne papiret presenterer vi EuroSense eit fleirspråk oppmerksområde ressurs basert på den kople disambiguasjonen av Europarliske parallelle korpus, med nesten 123 millioner innmerksområder for over 155 tusen ulike konseptar og einingar frå eit språk-uavhengig unikefølsområde. Vi evaluerer kvaliteten til følelsesannotasjonane våre innenfor og ekstrinsic, som viser effektiviteten sine som opplæringsdata for ordfølelsesavbryting.', 'pl': 'Korpusy równoległe są szeroko stosowane w różnych zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego, od tłumaczenia maszynowego do wielojęzycznego rozjasniania zmysłu Word Sense, gdzie zdania równoległe mogą być wykorzystywane do automatycznego generowania wysokiej jakości adnotacji zmysłowych na dużą skalę. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy EuroSense, wielojęzyczny zasób adnotacyjny ze zmysłami oparty na wspólnym rozproszeniu korpusu równoległego Europarl, z prawie 123 milionów adnotacji zmysłów dla ponad 155 tysięcy odrębnych koncepcji i podmiotów z niezależnego od języka ujednoliconego spisu zmysłów. Oceniamy jakość naszych adnotacji zmysłowych wewnętrznie i zewnętrznie, pokazując ich skuteczność jako dane treningowe dla Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'ro': 'Corporele paralele sunt utilizate pe scară largă într-o varietate de sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural, de la traducerea automată la dezambiguizarea simțului cuvintelor între limbi, unde propozițiile paralele pot fi exploatate pentru a genera automat adnotări de sens de înaltă calitate la scară largă. În această lucrare prezentăm EuroSense, o resursă multilingvă adnotată de simțuri bazată pe dezambiguizarea comună a corpului paralel Europarl, cu aproape 123 milioane de adnotații de simțuri pentru peste 155 mii de concepte și entități distincte dintr-un inventar unificat de simțuri independent de limbă. Evaluăm calitatea adnotărilor noastre de simțuri intrinsec și extrins, arătând eficacitatea lor ca date de instruire pentru dezambiguizarea sensului Word.', 'si': 'Parallel Corcora are vast in a variant of Native language processing Jobs, from machine translation to cross-language Word Sense Desmbguation, where Parallel Words can be exploitised to automate high-level sensation annuitions on a great scale. මේ පැත්තේ අපි යුරෝසෙන්ස්ව පෙන්වන්නේ, බොහොම භාෂාවක් අවශ්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ යුරෝපල් සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පුස් එක්ක අවශ්\u200dය නිර්මාණය සඳහා යුරෝපල් එක අපි අපේ තේරුමේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂ කරනවා, ඇතුළත් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට, ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාවක් වගේ', 'sr': 'Paralelna korporacija se široko koristi u raznim zadacima prirodnog jezika, od prevoda mašine do razbijanja raznih jezika, gde se paralelne rečenice mogu iskoristiti kako bi automatski stvorili annotacije o visokokvalitetu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo EuroSense, mnogijezički osjećajni izvor, zasnovan na zajedničkom disambiguaciji paralelnog korpusa Evropske parlamente, sa skoro 123 miliona oznake smisla za preko 155 hiljada različitih koncepta i entitata iz jednostavnog inventara za jezik nezavisnog smisla. Procjenjujemo kvalitetu naših annotacija o smislu unutrašnje i ekstrinsicije, pokazujući njihovu efikasnost kao podatke o obuci za Disambiguaciju reči o osećanju osjećaja.', 'so': "Shirkadda baaritaanka afka asalka ah waxaa si badan loogu isticmaalaa shaqooyin kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, marka laga soo wareejiyo tarjumaadka mashiinka iyo ilaa ka baaraandegista hadalka Sense ee luqada, meesha lagu isticmaali karo imtixaanka lambarka ah si aad u samayso baaritaanka aqoonta sare. Warqadan waxaan ku soo qornaa YurubSense, taas oo ku saleysan wadajirka kala soocsada qoyska midowga Yurub, kaas oo ku qoran qiyaastii 123 million oo sano oo ka badan 155 kun oo fekero oo kala duduwan iyo waxyaabo ah oo ka yimaada qoraalka maandooriyaha ee luuqada aan madax u ahaanayn. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qiimaha garashadayada si hoos ah iyo si dibadda ah, waxaana tusaynaa faa'iidadooda sida waxbarashada macluumaadka ka baaraandegista hadalka.", 'sv': 'Parallella korpora används ofta i en mängd olika Natural Language Processing uppgifter, från maskinöversättning till tvärspråkig ordförnuftsdesign, där parallella meningar kan utnyttjas för att automatiskt generera högkvalitativa sinnesanateringar i stor skala. I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi EuroSense, en flerspråkig förnuftsanaterad resurs baserad på den gemensamma distinktionen av Europarls parallellkorpus, med nästan 123 miljoner förnuftsanateringar för över 155 tusen distinkta begrepp och entiteter från en språkoberoende enhetlig förnuftsanalys. Vi utvärderar kvaliteten på våra sinnesanateringar i sig själva och ytterst och visar deras effektivitet som träningsdata för Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'ur': 'Parallel corpora is widely used in a variety of Natural Language Processing tasks, from Machine Translation to cross-language Word Sense Disambiguation, where parallel sentences can be used to automatically generate high-quality sense annotations on a large scale. اس کاغذ میں ہم یوروس سنس کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک بہت سی زبان کی سمجھ کا منظور، یوروپال کے مشترل کورپوس کے متعلق مشترک غلطی پر بنیاد رکھا ہے، جس میں تقریباً 123 میلیون سمجھ کا اظہار ہے 155 ہزار مختلف نظریں اور متعلق متعلق متعلق سمجھ کے ذریعہ سے۔ ہم اپنے احساسات کی کیفیت کا ارزش کررہے ہیں، دلیل اور خارجی طور پر، ان کی فعالیت کو Word Sense Disambiguation کے لئے آموزش دینے کے طور پر دکھاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'அளபுரு நிறுவனத்தில் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல் பணிகளில் பெரிய பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, இயந்திரத்திலிருந்து மொழிமொழிமாற்று மொழிமாற்று மொழிமாற்றி வார்த்தை கொண்டு அலட் இந்த காக்கியத்தில் நாம் இப்போது ஐரோப்பென்சின் காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு பல மொழிய புரிய உணர்வு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட மூலம், ஐரோபார்ல் இணைப்பு கூட்டத்திற்கு அடிப்படையில், கிட்டத் நாம் வார்த்தை பாதிக்கும் தகவல்களுக்கு பயிற்சி தரமாக காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'uz': "Parallel corpora are widely used in a variety of Natural Language Processing tasks, from Machine Translation to cross-lingual Word Sense Disambiguation, where parallel sentences can be exploited to automatically generate high-quality sense annotations on a large scale.  Bu hujjatda biz Ewropasening ko'pgina tilda o'xshash ma'lumot, yurub parallel corpusning bir bir bir bir xil tilda o'xshash manbalar, va bu qo'shilgan 155 mingdan ortiq g'oyalar uchun 155 mingdan ortiq g'oyalar va bir xil g'oyalarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz ma'lumotning ma'lumotlarimizning qiymatimizni qiymatimiz, o'z so'zlar o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun o'zaro qilishni o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Đồng nghiệp được sử dụng rộng rãi trong các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, từ Machine Translation to cross-ngôn ngữ từ Thời Báo mất tích, nơi các câu song song song có thể được khai thác để tự động tạo ra các chú thích cảm xúc chất lượng cao trên diện rộng. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu "Euro Senate", một nguồn nhận xét đa dạng, được ghi chú đa dạng dựa trên sự biến đổi chung của một tập thể song song Châu Âu, với hầu hết 123 triệu chú thích có hơn 155 nghìn khái niệm và thực thể khác nhau từ một bản kiểm kê cảm xúc độc lập ngôn từ một ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi đánh giá chất lượng của những chú thích cảm xúc phức tạp và tứ chi, cho thấy hiệu quả của chúng như là dữ liệu đào tạo biến mất cảm xúc từ.', 'bg': 'Паралелните корпуси се използват широко в различни задачи за обработка на естествени езици, от машинен превод до междуезично разграничаване на чувството на думи, където паралелните изречения могат да бъдат експлоатирани за автоматично генериране на висококачествени сетивни анотации в голям мащаб. В настоящата статия представяме многоезичен ресурс, обозначен със сензация, базиран на съвместното разграничаване на паралелния корпус с почти 123 милиона сензации за над 155 хиляди отделни понятия и образувания от независим от езика унифициран сетивен инвентар. Ние оценяваме качеството на нашите сетивни анотации по интензивен и външен начин, показвайки тяхната ефективност като тренировъчни данни за дисамбигуация на сетивния смисъл.', 'da': 'Parallel corpora anvendes i vid udstrækning i en række Natural Language Processing opgaver, fra maskinoversættelse til tværsproget Word Sense Disambiguation, hvor parallelle sætninger kan udnyttes til automatisk at generere sanseanmærkninger af høj kvalitet i stor skala. I denne artikel præsenterer vi EuroSense, en flersproget sanseanmærkt ressource baseret på den fælles forståelse af Europarl parallelle korpus, med næsten 123 millioner sanseanmærkninger for over 155 tusinde forskellige begreber og enheder fra en sproguafhængig ensartet sanseanmærkning. Vi evaluerer kvaliteten af vores sanseanmærkninger i sig selv og eksternt, og viser deres effektivitet som træningsdata til Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'nl': "Parallele corpora's worden veel gebruikt in een verscheidenheid van taken voor de verwerking van natuurlijke taal, van machinevertaling tot meertalige Word Sense Disambiguation, waar parallelle zinnen kunnen worden gebruikt om automatisch hoogwaardige zintuigannotaties op grote schaal te genereren. In dit artikel presenteren we EuroSense, een meertalige zintuigenannoteerde bron gebaseerd op de gezamenlijke verduidelijking van het Europarl parallelle corpus, met bijna 123 miljoen zintuigannotaties voor meer dan 155 duizend verschillende concepten en entiteiten uit een taal-onafhankelijke unified zintuig inventaris. We evalueren de kwaliteit van onze zintuigannotaties intrinsiek en extrinsiek, en laten hun effectiviteit zien als trainingsgegevens voor Word Sense Disambiguation.", 'hr': 'Paralelna tijela se široko koristi u raznim zadacima prirodnog jezika, od prevoda strojeva do razbijanja osjetljivih riječi, gdje se paralelne rečenice mogu iskoristiti kako bi automatski stvorili oznake o visokoj kvaliteti. U ovom papiru predstavljamo EuroSense, mnogijezički osjećajni izvor na temelju zajedničkog disambiguacije paralelnog korpusa Europarl a, s skoro 123 milijuna oznake smisla za preko 155 tisuća različitih koncepta i entitata iz jednostavnog inventara za jezik nezavisnog smisla. Procjenjujemo kvalitetu naših osjećajnih annotacija unutrašnjost i ekstrinsicno, pokazujući njihovu učinkovitost kao podatke o obuci za Disambiguaciju osjećaja riječi.', 'de': 'Parallele Korpora werden häufig in einer Vielzahl von Aufgaben der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache verwendet, von der maschinellen Übersetzung bis zur sprachübergreifenden Word Sense Disambiguation, wo parallele Sätze ausgenutzt werden können, um automatisch qualitativ hochwertige Sinnesannotationen in großem Maßstab zu generieren. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir EuroSense vor, eine mehrsprachige sinn-annotierte Ressource basierend auf der gemeinsamen Disambiguation des Europarl Parallelkorpus, mit fast 123 Millionen Sinnesannotationen für über 155-tausend verschiedene Konzepte und Entitäten aus einem sprachunabhängigen einheitlichen Sinnesinventar. Wir bewerten die Qualität unserer Sinnesannotationen intrinsisch und extern und zeigen ihre Wirksamkeit als Trainingsdaten für Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'ko': '평행 언어 자료 라이브러리는 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무에 광범위하게 응용되고 기계 번역에서 다중 언어의 의미 분리에 이르기까지 이런 임무에서 평행 문장은 대규모로 고품질의 의미 표시를 자동으로 생성할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 EuroSense를 소개했는데 이것은 Europarl 병행 자료 라이브러리와 연합하여 갈라진 여러 언어의 감각 주석 자원을 바탕으로 언어에 독립된 통일된 감각 목록에서 15.5만 개가 넘는 서로 다른 개념과 실체에 대해 1.23억 회에 가까운 감각 주석을 했다.우리는 내재와 외재 두 방면에서 의미 표시의 질을 평가하고 의미 변조 훈련 데이터로서의 유효성을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Kampuni ya Parallel inatumika sana katika kazi mbalimbali za mchakato wa lugha ya asili, kutoka Tafsiri ya Mashine hadi Kuzungumza kwa neno la lugha, ambapo hukumu za usambazaji zinaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza matangazo yenye usawa wa hali ya juu kwa kiwango kikubwa. Katika karatasi hii tunaoonyesha Sensi ya Ulaya, rasilimali yenye maana ya lugha mbalimbali inayohusiana na kutenganishwa kwa pamoja na makampuni ya ulinganisho wa Ulaya, yenye takriban matangazo ya hisia milioni 123 kwa zaidi ya dhana na vifaa vingi 155,000 tofauti kutoka kwenye orodha ya maana yenye uhuru wa lugha. Tunatathmini ubora wa matatizo ya hisia yetu kwa kiasi kikubwa na kwa kiasi kikubwa, kuonyesha ufanisi wao kama mafunzo ya data kwa ajili ya kukabiliana na Ukosefu wa Sensi.', 'id': 'Korpora paralel sangat digunakan dalam berbagai tugas Proses Bahasa Alami, dari Penerjemahan Mesin ke Pengambiguasi Sens Perkataan saling bahasa, di mana kalimat paralel dapat dieksploitasi untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan anotasi sens kualitas tinggi pada skala besar. Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan EuroSense, sumber daya yang digambarkan berbagai bahasa berdasarkan penyelesaian kongsi dari mayat paralel Europarl, dengan hampir 123 juta anotasi sensor untuk lebih dari 155 ribu konsep dan entitas yang berbeda dari inventaris sensor unified bebas bahasa. Kami mengevaluasi kualitas anotasi perasaan kita secara intrinsik dan ekstrins, menunjukkan efektifitas mereka sebagai data latihan untuk Pengambiguasi Sensa Perkataan.', 'fa': 'شرکت پاراللی در کلمه\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی، از ترجمه ماشین به ناپدید شدن کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان استفاده می\u200cشود، جایی که جمله\u200cهای متوسط می\u200cتوانند برای تولید کردن نوشته\u200cهای حس زیادی در یک مقیاس بزرگ استفاده می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ ما EuroSense را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک منبع با احساس متفاوت با زبان\u200cهای متفاوت بر اساس نامبوژه\u200cهای متفاوت کورپوس اروپال، با تقریباً 123 میلیون آگاهی حس برای بیشتر از 155 هزار مفهوم متفاوت و متفاوت از یک اختراع حس متفاوت به زبان. ما کیفیت اعلام احساساتمان را در داخل و خارجی ارزیابی می کنیم، که عملکرد آنها را به عنوان اطلاعات آموزش برای تغییر آزمایش کلمه حس نشان می دهد.', 'sq': 'Korpora paralele përdoren gjerësisht në një shumicë detyrash të procesimit të gjuhës natyrore, nga Trakthimi i Makinës deri në Zhdukjen e Ndikimit të Fjalëve në gjuhë, ku fjalët paralele mund të shfrytëzohen për të gjeneruar automatikisht anotacione të sensit të cilësisë së lartë në një shkallë të madhe. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim EuroSense, një burim shumëgjuhës me kuptim të anotuar bazuar në çambiguacionin e përbashkët të trupit paralel Europarl, me pothuajse 123 milion anotacione të kuptimit për mbi 155 mijë koncepte dhe njësi të veçanta nga një inventar i kuptimit të unifikuar të pavarur nga gjuha. Ne vlerësojmë cilësinë e anotacioneve tona të ndjenjave brenda dhe jashtë, duke treguar efektshmërinë e tyre si të dhënat e trajnimit për zhdukjen e ndjenjave të fjalëve.', 'tr': 'Parallel köpüri Nature diller işleýän zadalarda, maşyndan çerçe-dilli sözler sözleriň sözünden uzaklaşdyrylmak üçin parallel sözleri otomatik bilen ullanylýar. Bu kagyzda biz EuroSense ňi, Europarlyň parallel korpusynyň birlikde täsirlenmegine dayanýan bir multi dil düşündirişi hasaplanýan çeşmeleri 123 milyon sany hasaplanýardyk. Biz duýgunlarymyzyň hasaplamalarymyzyň kalitesini daşarda we daşarda değerlendirip, kelimeleriň etkinliğini Word Sense Disambiguation (Words Disambiguation) üçin okuwçylygy şeklinde görkez.', 'am': 'ፓርላሊ ኮርፖርት በተለየ በተለያዩ የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ስራዎችን፣ ከመኪን ትርጉም ወደ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ቃላት መፍታትን ለመለፍ የሚጠቅሙት፣ በተለየ ስርዓቶች ከፍተኛ-ጥሩ ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዩሮፓርል ተቃውሞ የተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች፣ በአውሮፓርላዊ የኮርፓስ ግንኙነት የተመሳሳይ የሀብት ዕቃዎች፣ ከ155 ሺህ በላይ የተለየ አእምሮዎች እና አካባቢዎች ላይ የተለየ የአውሮፓር ግንኙነት እና የቋንቋ-ነፃ አዳራሽ የተለየ የአውሮፓር ግንኙነት አካ የአውቀታችንን ድህነትን እናስተውላለን፡፡', 'af': "Parallele korpora word heeltemal gebruik in 'n verskeie van Natuurlike Taal Verwerking Opdragte, van Masjien Vertaling na kruistale Woord Sense Ontbreking, waar parallele teikene kan wees uitgebruik word om automaties hoë- kwaliteit sens notasies op 'n groot skaal te genereer. In hierdie papier stel ons EuroSense voor 'n multilinglike sens-annotateerde hulpbron gebaseer op die koppelige disambiguasie van die Europarliese parallele korpus, met amper 123 miljoen sens notasies vir meer 155 duisend verskillende konsepte en entiteite van 'n taal-onafhanklike uniseerde sens-inventorie. Ons evalueer die kwaliteit van ons sin notasies intrinsiese en extrinsic, wys hulle effektiviteit as onderwerp data vir Woord Sense Disambiguation.", 'hy': 'Փաստավոր մարմինները լայնորեն օգտագործվում են բնական լեզվի վերամշակումների բազմաթիվ խնդիրներում, մեքենայի թարգմանությունից մինչև լեզվի միջև բառերի անբացահայտություն, որտեղ զուգավոր նախադասությունները կարող են օգտագործվել մեծ մասշտաբով բարձր որակային զգացմունքների նշումների ստե Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք «Եվրոսենզ»-ը, բազլեզու զգայարաններով գրված ռեսուրսը, որը հիմնված է Եվրոպարլ զուգահեռ մարմնի միասնական բացահայտության վրա, որտեղ գրեթե 123 միլիոն զգայարաններ գրված են 155 հազար տարբեր հասկացությունների և միասնական զգայարանների համար,  Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր զգացմունքի նշումների որակը ներառյալ և արտաքին առումով, ցույց տալով նրանց արդյունավետությունը որպես բառերի զգացմունքի բացահայտության ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ:', 'az': "Parallel korpora, maşın çevirindən çox dil Sense Disambiguation'a çeşitli təbiətli dil işlərində, paralel cümlələr böyük ölçüdə yüksək kaliteli hiss məlumatlarını təşkil etmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Bu kağıtda EuroSense'i, Europarl paralel korpusunun birləşdirilməsinə dayanan çoxlu dil anlayışı çoxlu məlumatlı çoxlu məlumatı ilə göstərdik, az qala 123 milyon hiss məlumatı olaraq 155 min müxtəlif fikirlər və məlumatı dildən bağımsız bir hiss qurmağı təyin etdi. Biz duygularımızın qabiliyyətini içərisində və extrinsicə değerləşdiririk, sözlərini hiss etmək üçün təhsil verilər kimi göstərdik.", 'bs': 'Paralelna korporacija se široko koristi u raznim zadacima prirodnog jezika, od prevoda mašine do razbijanja prijevoznih riječi, gdje se paralelne rečenice mogu iskoristiti kako bi automatski stvorili annotacije visokokvalitetnog osjećaja na velikoj skali. U ovom papiru predstavljamo EuroSense, mnogijezički osjećajni izvor na temelju zajedničkog disambiguacije paralelnog korpusa Europarl a, sa skoro 123 miliona oznake smisla za preko 155 tisuća različitih koncepta i entitata iz jednostavnog inventara za jezik nezavisnih osjećaja. Procjenjujemo kvalitet naših osjećajnih annotacija unutrašnjost i ekstrinsicno, pokazujući njihovu učinkovitost kao podatke o obuci za disambigaciju riječi.', 'bn': 'প্যারালেল কর্পোরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, মেশিনের অনুবাদ থেকে বিভিন্ন ভাষাভাষী ভাষার অনুবাদের ক্ষেত্রে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ব এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ইউরোসেনের উপস্থাপন করছি, যা ইউরোপার্লের প্যারালেল কোর্পাসের যৌথ বিভ্রান্তির ভিত্তিতে একটি বহুভাষী মানসিক উৎস, যার মধ্যে প্রায় ১৫৫ হাজার বিভিন্ন ধা আমরা আমাদের অনুভূতির মানের মূল্য মূল্যের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি, বার্তা সেন্সের অপমানজনক তথ্য হিসেবে তাদের কার্যক্রম দেখাচ', 'ca': "Els corpores paralèls s'utilitzen ampliament en una varietat de tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals, des de la traducció de màquines fins a la desambiguació translingüística del sentit de paraules, on es poden explotar frases paralèls per generar automàticament anotacions de sentit d'alta qualitat a gran escala. En aquest article presentem EuroSense, un recurso multilingüe anotat amb sentit basat en la desambiguació conjunta del corps paral·lel Europarl, amb quasi 123 milions d'anotacions amb sentit per més de 155 mil conceptes i entitats distints d'un inventari de sentit unificat independent del llenguatge. Evaluam la qualitat de les anotacions del nostre sentit intrínsecament i extrinsicament, mostrant la seva eficacia com a dades d'entrenament per a la desambiguació del sentit de paraules.", 'cs': 'Paralelní korpusy jsou široce používány v různých úlohách zpracování přirozeného jazyka, od strojového překladu až po vícejazyčné rozšiřování smyslu Word Sense, kde lze využít paralelní věty k automatickému generování vysoce kvalitních smyslových anotací ve velkém měřítku. V tomto článku představujeme EuroSense, vícejazyčný smyslově anotovaný zdroj založený na společném rozcestnění paralelního korpusu Europarl, s téměř 123 milionů smyslových anotací pro více než 155 tisíce odlišných konceptů a entit z jazykově nezávislého sjednoceného smyslového inventáře. Kvalitu našich smyslových anotací hodnotíme intrinsicky i extrinsicky a ukazujeme jejich efektivitu jako tréninková data pro Word Sense Disambiguation.', 'et': "Paralleelkorporeid kasutatakse laialdaselt erinevates loodusliku keele töötlemise ülesannetes, alates masintõlkest kuni keeleülese Word Sense disambiguatsioonini, kus paralleelseid lauseid saab kasutada automaatselt kvaliteetsete tähenduslike annotatsioonide genereerimiseks suures ulatuses. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame EuroSense'i, mitmekeelset tähenduslikku märgistust, mis põhineb Europarli paralleelkorpuse ühisel selgitamisel ning milles on peaaegu 123 miljonit tähenduslikku märgistust rohkem kui 155 tuhandele erinevale kontseptsioonile ja üksusele keelesõltumatust ühtsest tähenduslikust inventuurist. Hindame oma meeleliste annotatsioonide kvaliteeti nii sisemiselt kui ka väliselt, näidates nende efektiivsust Word Sense Disambiguatsiooni treeningandmetena.", 'fi': 'Rinnakkaisia korpusia käytetään laajalti erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä konekäännöksestä monikieliseen Word Sense -disambiguaatioon, jossa rinnakkaisia lauseita voidaan hyödyntää tuottamaan automaattisesti laadukkaita aistimerkintöjä suuressa mittakaavassa. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme EuroSense-aineistoa, joka perustuu Europarl-parallel-korpusen yhteiseen erotteluun, jossa on lähes 123 miljoonaa aistimerkintää yli 155 tuhannelle erilliselle käsitteelle ja entiteetille kielestä riippumattomasta yhtenäisestä aistiinventoinnista. Arvioimme aistimerkintöjemme laatua luontaisesti ja ulkoisesti ja osoitamme niiden tehokkuuden Word Sense Disambiguation -harjoitusaineistona.', 'jv': 'Paralell coral kang dipunangé kapan nganggo perusahaan dengané sakjane Daerah-ingkang Manual Nang pepulan iki kita nggawe Yukono Sense, akeh bantugan seneng dipunanggawe nguasai perusahaan winih sing basa supaya karo nggawe nguasai perusahaan bakal terus-perusahaan ning konoh sing katya katya, karo mêng werak-katya karo akeh basa tapi tanggal gawe nguasai 1,2 tapi layan sampek akeh lanjut sampek kawit tau matan tanggal Awak dhéwé éntuk kaliwat sing ditambahak perusahaan seneng pisan-pakan ngono nglanggar, iso nggawe barang seneng pisan Manut kanggo ngilanggar data kanggo Kebebasan Sense disabled', 'ha': "QUnicodeControlCharacter Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da EURA, wani marufu na fassarar mulki-harsunan da aka yi wa fassarar da shi a sami-mutane, da taki 123 millions na sanyi da akan 155,000 na dabam-dabam da maɓalli daga jerin da ba'a taɓa wa fassaran da ba'a ba da ɗabi'a ba. Tuna ƙaddara sifar haske na saniyarmu a guda da baka, kuma munã nuna masu aikin su kamar mafarin data ga Disastan Kalmar.", 'he': 'גופורה מזוינת משתמשת באופן רחב במגוון של משימות מעבדת שפת טבעית, מהתרגום מכונת אל הפרעה של חוש מילים בין שפתיים, שבו משפטים מזוינים יכולים לנצל באופן אוטומטי כדי ליצור ציונים של חוש איכות גבוהה בקנה מידה גדולה. In this paper we present EuroSense, a multilingual sense-annotated resource based on the joint disambiguation of the Europarl parallel corpus, with almost 123 million sense annotations for over 155 thousand distinct concepts and entities from a language-independent unified sense inventory.  אנו מעריכים את איכות ההערות החשיתית שלנו באופן פנימי ובמבחינה חיצונית, מראים את היעילות שלהם בתור נתוני אימון למחלקת המילים.', 'sk': 'Vzporedni korpusi se pogosto uporabljajo pri različnih opravilih obdelave naravnega jezika, od strojnega prevoda do večjezičnega razočaranja besednega senzorja, kjer je vzporedne stavke mogoče izkoristiti za samodejno ustvarjanje visokokakovostnih opomb v velikem obsegu. V prispevku predstavljamo EuroSense, večjezični vir s pomenskimi opombami, ki temelji na skupni razločitvi vzporednega korpusa Europarl, s skoraj 123 milijoni pomenskimi opombami za več kot 155 tisoč različnih konceptov in entitet iz jezikovno neodvisnega enotnega inventarja čutov. Kakovost naših čutnih opomb ocenjujemo intrinzično in ekstrinzično, pri čemer pokažemo njihovo učinkovitost kot podatki o usposabljanju za razjasnitev Worda Sense.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མཐུད་མིང་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཚུ་ནང་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་ཡིག་ཚང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཁང་ཅིག་ལ་མཐུན་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བཟོ་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རིམ་ཐང་གཙོ་ཅན་མིན་ཐང་ཡོད་པས།'}
{'en': 'Challenging Language-Dependent Segmentation for Arabic : An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'es': 'La desafiante segmentación dependiente del idioma para el árabe: una aplicación para la traducción automática y el etiquetado de partes del habla', 'pt': 'Desafiadora segmentação dependente de idioma para árabe: uma aplicação para tradução automática e marcação de parte do discurso', 'ar': 'تحدي التجزئة المعتمدة على اللغة للغة العربية: تطبيق على الترجمة الآلية ووضع علامات على جزء من الكلام', 'fr': "Difficulté de segmentation dépendante de la langue pour l'arabe\xa0: une application à la traduction automatique et au balisage de parties de discours", 'ja': 'アラビア語のための困難な言語依存セグメンテーション：機械翻訳と言語部分タグ付けへの応用', 'zh': '有挑战性阿拉伯语语相关:机器翻译与词性表', 'hi': 'अरबी के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण भाषा-निर्भर विभाजन: मशीन अनुवाद और पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग के लिए एक आवेदन', 'ru': 'Сложная языкозависимая сегментация для арабского языка: применение к машинному переводу и тегированию части речи', 'ga': 'Deighilt Dhúshlánach Teanga-Chleithiúnach don Araibis: Feidhmchlár ar Aistriúchán Meaisín agus ar Chlibeáil Pháirt-de-Caint', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Kihívást jelentő nyelvfüggő szegmentáció arab számára: alkalmazás a gépi fordításra és a beszédrész-címkézésre', 'el': 'Προκλητική γλωσσική τμηματοποίηση για τα αραβικά: Μια εφαρμογή στη μηχανική μετάφραση και τη σήμανση μέρους λόγου', 'it': "Sfida la segmentazione dipendente dalla lingua per l'arabo: un'applicazione alla traduzione automatica e all'etichettatura part-of-speech", 'kk': 'Араб үшін тіл- тәуелді сегментациясын шақыру: Машина аудару және сөйлеменің бөлігі тегтеріне қолданбаName', 'lt': 'Iššūkis priklausomai nuo kalbos arabų kalbos segmentacijai: Programa mašinų vertimui ir kalbos dalies ženklinimui', 'mk': 'Предизвик на сегментација зависна од јазикот за арапски: Апликација за машински превод и означување на дел од говорот', 'ms': 'Challenging Language-Dependent Segmentation for Arabic: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'ml': 'Language- dependent Segmentation for Arabic: A Application to Machine Translation and Part- of- Speech Tagging', 'mt': 'Sfida tas-Segmentazzjoni Dipendenti fuq il-Lingwa għall-Għarab: Applikazzjoni għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni u Tagging tal-Parti tal-Kellem', 'mn': 'Араб хэл-хамааралтай загвар: Машин хөгжүүлэх, хэсэг-хэсэг тагжингийн програм', 'pl': 'Wymagająca segmentacja językowa dla arabskiego: aplikacja do tłumaczenia maszynowego i tagowania części mowy', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Segmentarea în funcție de limbă dificilă pentru limba arabă: o aplicație pentru traducerea automată și etichetarea parțială de vorbire', 'sr': 'Izazovanje jezika-ovisnosti segmentacije za arapski: aplikacija za prevod mašine i deo govora', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Utmanande språkberoende segmentering för arabiska: En tillämpning till maskinöversättning och märkning av del av tal', 'ta': 'அரபி மொழி- சார்ந்த பிரிவு பிரிவு: இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் பேச்சு ஒட்டிக்கு ஒரு பயன்பாடு', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Segmentation of the Challenging language-dependent language: A application to machine Translation and Part of Speech Tagging', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phạm vi ngôn ngữ phụ thuộc vào đoạn học tiếng Ả Rập: Ứng dụng sửa máy và Đánh giá phần văn', 'da': 'Udfordrende sprogafhængig segmentering for arabisk: En ansøgning til maskinoversættelse og Part-of-Tale Tagging', 'nl': 'Uitdagende taalafhankelijke segmentatie voor Arabisch: een toepassing op machinevertaling en part-of-spraak tagging', 'de': 'Anspruchsvolle sprachabhängige Segmentierung für Arabisch: Eine Anwendung für maschinelle Übersetzung und Part-of-Speech-Tagging', 'ko': '도전적인 아랍어 언어 관련 구분: 기계 번역과 어성 표시의 응용', 'hr': 'Izazovanje jezika-ovisnosti segmentacije za arapski: Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'bg': 'Предизвикателна езикова зависимост сегментация за арабски: приложение за машинен превод и етикетиране на част от речта', 'fa': 'یک کاربرد برای ترجمه ماشین و بخشی از سخنرانی', 'id': 'Mencabar Segmentasi Bergantung Bahasa untuk Bahasa Arab: Aplikasi untuk Translation Mesin dan Tagging Bagian dari Perkataan', 'sw': 'Sehemu ya Kutegemea Lugha kwa Kiarabu: Utafiti wa Tafsiri ya Mashiniki na Sehemu ya Kuzungumza', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Language-dependent Segmentation for Arabic: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'hy': 'Արաբերենի լեզվից կախված բաժանման մարտահրավեր: Մեքենայի թարգմանման և լեզվի մի մասի նշանակման ծրագիր', 'tr': 'Arapça üçin ýerleşmek üçin titr-boýunça Segmentation: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'bn': 'আরবীর জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জিং ভাষা-নির্ভরিত সেগমেন্ট: মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং অংশ- অফ ভাষার ট্যাগিং এ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন', 'az': 'Arapça dil-bağlı Segmentasyonu challenge: Makina Çevirməsi və Sözlərin Bölümü Tagging', 'sq': 'Challenging Language-Dependent Segmentation for Arabic: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'bs': 'Izazovanje jezika-ovisnosti segmentacije za arapski: aplikacija za prevod mašine i dio govora', 'ca': 'Challenging Language-Dependent Segmentation for Arabic: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'cs': 'Náročná jazykově závislá segmentace pro arabštinu: Aplikace pro strojový překlad a značení části řeči', 'et': 'Keelest sõltuv segmentatsioon araabia keele jaoks: rakendus masintõlkele ja kõneosalisele sildistamisele', 'fi': 'Haastava kieliriippuvainen segmentointi arabialle: sovellus konekääntämiseen ja puheen osaan merkitsemiseen', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'מאתגר סגמנטציה תלויה בשפה עבור ערבית: תוכנית לתרגום מכונות וחלק מהדיבור', 'sk': 'Izzivna segmentacija jezikovno odvisnih jezikov za arabščino: aplikacija za strojno prevajanje in označevanje dela govora', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Challenging Language-Dependent Segmentation for Arabic: An Application to Machine Translation and Part-of-Speech Tagging'}
{'en': 'Word segmentation plays a pivotal role in improving any Arabic NLP application. Therefore, a lot of research has been spent in improving its accuracy. Off-the-shelf tools, however, are : i) complicated to use and ii) domain / dialect dependent. We explore three language-independent alternatives to morphological segmentation using : i) data-driven sub-word units, ii) characters as a unit of learning, and iii) word embeddings learned using a character CNN (Convolution Neural Network). On the tasks of Machine Translation and POS tagging, we found these methods to achieve close to, and occasionally surpass state-of-the-art performance. In our analysis, we show that a neural machine translation system is sensitive to the ratio of source and target tokens, and a ratio close to 1 or greater, gives optimal performance.', 'ar': 'يلعب تجزئة الكلمات دورًا محوريًا في تحسين أي تطبيق عربي لمعالجة اللغات الطبيعية. لذلك ، تم إنفاق الكثير من الأبحاث في تحسين دقتها. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأدوات الجاهزة هي: 1) معقدة الاستخدام و 2) تعتمد على المجال / اللهجة. نستكشف ثلاثة بدائل مستقلة عن اللغة للتجزئة المورفولوجية باستخدام: 1) وحدات الكلمات الفرعية المعتمدة على البيانات ، 2) الأحرف كوحدة للتعلم ، و 3) تضمين الكلمات التي تم تعلمها باستخدام حرف CNN (شبكة الالتفاف العصبية). فيما يتعلق بمهام الترجمة الآلية وعلامات نقاط البيع ، وجدنا أن هذه الطرق تحقق أداءً قريبًا من الأداء المتطور وأحيانًا يتجاوزه. في تحليلنا ، أظهرنا أن نظام الترجمة الآلية العصبية حساس لنسبة المصدر والهدف ، ونسبة قريبة من 1 أو أكبر ، تعطي الأداء الأمثل.', 'fr': "La segmentation des mots joue un rôle essentiel dans l'amélioration de toute application de PNL en arabe. Par conséquent, de nombreuses recherches ont été consacrées à l'amélioration de sa précision. Les outils standard, cependant, sont\xa0: i) compliqués à utiliser et ii) dépendants du domaine/du dialecte. Nous explorons trois alternatives indépendantes de la langue à la segmentation morphologique en utilisant\xa0: i) des unités de sous-mots pilotées par les données, ii) des caractères comme unité d'apprentissage, et iii) des intégrations de mots apprises à l'aide d'un CNN (Convolution Neural Network) de caractères. En ce qui concerne les tâches de traduction automatique et de balisage POS, nous avons constaté que ces méthodes atteignaient des performances de pointe, voire surpassaient parfois. Dans notre analyse, nous montrons qu'un système de traduction automatique neuronale est sensible au rapport entre les jetons source et cible, et qu'un ratio proche de 1 ou plus donne des performances optimales.", 'pt': 'A segmentação de palavras desempenha um papel fundamental na melhoria de qualquer aplicativo de PNL em árabe. Portanto, muita pesquisa foi gasta para melhorar sua precisão. Ferramentas de prateleira, no entanto, são: i) complicadas de usar e ii) dependentes de domínio/dialeto. Exploramos três alternativas independentes de linguagem para segmentação morfológica usando: i) unidades de subpalavras orientadas por dados, ii) caracteres como unidade de aprendizado e iii) incorporações de palavras aprendidas usando um caractere CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Nas tarefas de tradução automática e marcação de POS, descobrimos que esses métodos alcançam desempenho próximo e, ocasionalmente, supera o estado da arte. Em nossa análise, mostramos que um sistema de tradução automática neural é sensível à proporção de tokens de origem e destino, e uma proporção próxima a 1 ou maior fornece desempenho ideal.', 'es': 'La segmentación de palabras desempeña un papel fundamental en la mejora de cualquier aplicación de PNL en árabe. Por lo tanto, se ha dedicado mucha investigación a mejorar su precisión. Sin embargo, las herramientas estándar son: i) complicadas de usar y ii) dependen del dominio/dialecto. Exploramos tres alternativas independientes del idioma a la segmentación morfológica utilizando: i) unidades de subpalabras basadas en datos, ii) caracteres como unidad de aprendizaje y iii) incrustaciones de palabras aprendidas con un personaje CNN (Red Neural de Convolución). En las tareas de traducción automática y etiquetado de PDV, descubrimos que estos métodos permiten alcanzar un rendimiento de vanguardia cercano y, en ocasiones, superarlo. En nuestro análisis, demostramos que un sistema de traducción automática neuronal es sensible a la proporción de tokens de origen y destino, y una relación cercana a 1 o superior, proporciona un rendimiento óptimo.', 'zh': '分词改阿拉伯语NLP应用程序起着关键作用。 由是益其准确性费。 然见成之具,i)用之甚杂,ii)赖领域/方言。 余探三语无关之形分代方案:i)数驱子单词单元,ii)字符为学单元,及iii)用字符CNN(卷积神经网络)学词嵌之。 机器翻译、POS之任,见其可近,或过于先进。 于吾言之,见神经机器翻译系统对源令牌与令牌之敏,而大于率近1,而供至性。', 'ja': 'ワードセグメンテーションは、アラビア語のNLPアプリケーションを改善する上で重要な役割を果たします。したがって、その精度向上には多くの研究が費やされてきた。ただし、既製のツールは、i ）使用が複雑であり、ii ）ドメイン/方言に依存します。私たちは、i ）データ駆動型サブワードユニット、ii ）学習の単位としての文字、およびiii ）文字CNN （ Convolution Neural Network ）を使用して学習した単語埋め込みの3つの言語に依存しない形態学的セグメンテーションの代替案を探求します。機械翻訳とPOSタグ付けのタスクでは、これらの方法が最先端のパフォーマンスに近づき、時にはそれを上回ることがわかりました。私たちの分析では、ニューラル機械翻訳システムはソーストークンとターゲットトークンの比率に敏感であり、1以上の比率で最適なパフォーマンスが得られることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Сегментация слов играет ключевую роль в улучшении любого арабского приложения NLP. Поэтому было потрачено немало исследований на повышение его точности. Однако готовые инструменты: i) сложны в использовании и ii) зависят от домена/диалекта. Мы исследуем три независимые от языка альтернативы морфологической сегментации, используя: i) единицы подслова, управляемые данными, ii) символы как единицу обучения и iii) вложения слов, изученные с помощью символа CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Что касается задач машинного перевода и маркировки POS, мы обнаружили, что эти методы близки к современным показателям и иногда превосходят их. В нашем анализе мы показываем, что система нейронного машинного перевода чувствительна к соотношению исходных и целевых токенов, а соотношение, близкое к 1 или более, дает оптимальную производительность.', 'hi': 'Word विभाजन किसी भी अरबी NLP अनुप्रयोग को बेहतर बनाने में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। इसलिए, इसकी सटीकता में सुधार करने में बहुत सारे शोध खर्च किए गए हैं। ऑफ-द-शेल्फ टूल, हालांकि, हैं: i) उपयोग करने के लिए जटिल और ii) डोमेन / बोली निर्भर। हम रूपात्मक विभाजन के लिए तीन भाषा-स्वतंत्र विकल्पों का पता लगाते हैं: i) डेटा-संचालित उप-शब्द इकाइयां, ii) सीखने की एक इकाई के रूप में वर्ण, और iii) एक चरित्र सीएनएन (कनवल्शन न्यूरल नेटवर्क) का उपयोग करके सीखे गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग। मशीन अनुवाद और पीओएस टैगिंग के कार्यों पर, हमने इन तरीकों को करीब से प्राप्त करने के लिए पाया, और कभी-कभी अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन को पार कर लिया। हमारे विश्लेषण में, हम दिखाते हैं कि एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली स्रोत और लक्ष्य टोकन के अनुपात के प्रति संवेदनशील है, और 1 या उससे अधिक के करीब अनुपात, इष्टतम प्रदर्शन देता है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról lárnach ag deighilt focal maidir le haon fheidhmchlár Araibis NLP a fheabhsú. Mar sin, tá go leor taighde caite chun a chruinneas a fheabhsú. Tá uirlisí nach bhfuil ar an tseilf, áfach: i) casta le húsáid agus ii) ag brath ar fhearann/chanúint. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar thrí rogha mhalartacha teanga-neamhspleách ar dheighilt moirfeolaíocha ag úsáid: i) aonaid fo-fhocail atá bunaithe ar shonraí, ii) carachtair mar aonad foghlama, agus iii) leabú focal a foghlaimíodh ag baint úsáide as carachtar CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Maidir leis na cúraimí a bhaineann le hAistriúchán Meaisín agus le clibeáil POS, fuaireamar amach go raibh na modhanna seo gar do fheidhmíocht úrscothach, agus go sáródh sé uaireanta. In ár n-anailís, léirímid go bhfuil córas néaraistriúcháin meaisín íogair don chóimheas idir comharthaí foinse agus sprice, agus go dtugann cóimheas gar do 1 nó níos mó, an fheidhmíocht is fearr.', 'el': 'Η τμηματοποίηση λέξεων παίζει καθοριστικό ρόλο στη βελτίωση οποιασδήποτε αραβικής εφαρμογής. Ως εκ τούτου, έχει δαπανηθεί πολλή έρευνα για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειάς του. Τα διαθέσιμα εργαλεία, ωστόσο, είναι: i) περίπλοκα στη χρήση και ii) εξαρτώνται από τομέα/διάλεκτο. Εξετάζουμε τρεις γλωσσικές εναλλακτικές λύσεις στη μορφολογική κατάτμηση χρησιμοποιώντας: α) μονάδες υπολέξεων που βασίζονται σε δεδομένα, ii) χαρακτήρες ως μονάδα μάθησης και iii) ενσωμάτωση λέξεων που μαθαίνονται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα χαρακτήρα Νευρικό Δίκτυο Σύγκλισης. Στα καθήκοντα της μηχανικής μετάφρασης και της σήμανσης βρήκαμε αυτές τις μεθόδους να επιτυγχάνουν κοντά και περιστασιακά να ξεπερνούν τις επιδόσεις της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Στην ανάλυσή μας, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ένα νευρωνικό σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης είναι ευαίσθητο στην αναλογία των σημάτων προέλευσης και στόχου, και μια αναλογία κοντά στο 1 ή μεγαλύτερη, δίνει βέλτιστη απόδοση.', 'hu': 'A szószegmentálás kulcsfontosságú szerepet játszik bármely arab NLP alkalmazás fejlesztésében. Ezért sok kutatást fordítottak a pontosság javítására. Az elérhető eszközök azonban: i) bonyolultak a használata és ii) domain/dialektus függőek. A morfológiai szegmentáció három nyelvfüggetlen alternatíváját vizsgáljuk fel: i) adat-vezérelt alszóegységek, ii) karakterek mint tanulási egység, és iii) CNN karakterek (Convolution Neural Network) segítségével tanult szóbeágyazások. A gépi fordítás és a POS címkézés feladatait illetően ezeket a módszereket találtuk meg, hogy közel álljanak a legkorszerűbb teljesítményhez, és alkalmanként felülmúlják. Elemzésünkben azt mutatjuk, hogy egy neurális gépi fordító rendszer érzékeny a forrás- és céltokenek arányára, és az 1 vagy nagyobb arány optimális teljesítményt nyújt.', 'it': "La segmentazione delle parole svolge un ruolo fondamentale nel miglioramento di qualsiasi applicazione NLP araba. Pertanto, molta ricerca è stata spesa per migliorarne l'accuratezza. Gli strumenti disponibili, tuttavia, sono: i) complicati da usare e ii) dipendenti da dominio/dialetto. Esploriamo tre alternative indipendenti dal linguaggio alla segmentazione morfologica utilizzando: i) unità di sottoparola basate sui dati, ii) caratteri come unità di apprendimento e iii) incorporazioni di parole apprese utilizzando un carattere CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Per quanto riguarda le attività di Machine Translation e POS tagging, abbiamo trovato questi metodi per raggiungere prestazioni vicine e talvolta superiori allo stato dell'arte. Nella nostra analisi, mostriamo che un sistema di traduzione automatica neurale è sensibile al rapporto tra token sorgente e target, e un rapporto vicino a 1 o superiore, dà prestazioni ottimali.", 'ka': 'სიტყვების სეგენტირება იყოს ყველა არაბული NLP პროგრამის უფრო მეტი პროლია. ამიტომ, ძალიან სწავლობა იქნება მართლას უფრო მუშაობაში. მაგრამ არაფერი ხელსაწყობილობი: i) გამოყენება და ii) დემომინი/დიალექტის დასამხოლობელია. ჩვენ შევხედავთ სამი ენის განსაცავრებული ალტენტიფიკაცია მოპოროლოგიური სეგმენტაციის გამოყენებას: i) მონაცემების სამუშაო სიტყვების ერთეულები, ii) სიტყვები როგორც სწავლების ერთეულები, და iii)  მაქსინური გაგრძელება და POS-ის ჭდეების დავალებაში, ჩვენ მოვიღეთ ეს მეტოვები, რომლებიც გავაკეთებთ დაბრძელება, და შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ წარმოქმედების განმავლობა. ჩვენი ანალიზაციაში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების სისტემა უფრო სიგრძელებელია მსოფლიოს და მინიშვნელოვანების შესახებისთვის, და 1 ან უფრო დი', 'mk': 'Сегментацијата на зборовите игра клучна улога во подобрувањето на секоја арапска апликација на NLP. Затоа, многу истражувања се потрошени за подобрување на неговата точност. Сепак, алатките надвор од полицата се: i) комплицирани за користење и ii) зависни од домен/дијалект. Истражуваме три алтернативи независни од јазикот за морфолошка сегментација користејќи: i) подзборни единици, ii) знаци како единица на учење, и iii) вгради на зборови научени користејќи знак CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Во врска со задачите на машински превод и означување на POS, ги најдовме овие методи за да постигнеме блиску до, и понекогаш да ги надминеме најдобрите изведувања. Во нашата анализа, покажуваме дека нервниот систем на превод на машина е чувствителен на односот помеѓу изворот и метата, и односот блиску до 1 или поголем, дава оптимална перформанса.', 'ms': 'Word segmentation plays a pivotal role in improving any Arabic NLP application.  Oleh itu, banyak kajian telah dibelanjakan untuk memperbaiki ketepatannya. Alat luar rak, bagaimanapun, adalah: i) rumit untuk digunakan dan ii) bergantung pada domain/dialekt. Kami mengeksplorasi tiga alternatif bebas dari bahasa untuk segmen morfologi menggunakan: i) unit sub-perkataan pemacu data, ii) aksara sebagai unit pembelajaran, dan iii) pembelajaran perkataan belajar menggunakan aksara CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Dalam tugas Terjemahan Mesin dan tag POS, kami menemukan kaedah ini untuk mencapai hampir, dan kadang-kadang melebihi prestasi state-of-the-art. Dalam analisis kami, kami menunjukkan bahawa sistem terjemahan mesin saraf sensitif kepada nisbah token sumber dan sasaran, dan nisbah dekat dengan 1 atau lebih, memberikan prestasi optimal.', 'kk': 'Сөздің сегментациясы барлық Араб NLP қолданбаларын жасау үшін негізгі рольді орындайды. Сондықтан оның дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін көптеген зерттеулер қолданылды. Бірақ қоршау құралдары тыс: i) қолданылатын және ii) домен/диалекттік тәуелді. Біз морфологиялық сегментацияның үш тілден тәуелсіз альтернативтерді зерттеп: i) деректерді қолдану ішкі сөздер бірлігі, ii) білім бірлігі ретінде таңбаларды, және iii) CNN таңбаны қолдану арқылы үйренген сөздер Машин аудару және POS тегтерінің тапсырмаларында бұл әдістерді жақын жеткізу үшін таптық және кейбірде суреттердің күйіне ауысу үшін. Біздің анализиямызда, невралдық компьютердің аудару жүйесі көзі мен мақсат белгілерінің қасиетіне сезімді деп көрсетеді, және 1 немесе үлкен қасиетінің қасиеті, оптималдық істеу бер', 'lt': 'žodžių segmentavimas atlieka svarbų vaidmenį gerinant bet kokią arabų NLP programą. Todėl daug mokslinių tyrimų buvo skirta tikslumui gerinti. Vis dėlto i šorinės priemonės yra: i) sudėtingos ir ii) priklausomos nuo domeno ir (arba) dialekto. Tiriame tris kalbomis nepriklausomas morfologinės segmentacijos alternatyvas, naudojant: i) duomenimis pagrįstus sub žodži ų vienetus, ii) simbolius kaip mokymosi vienetą ir iii) žodžių įtraukimą, išmoktą naudojant CNN (konvoliucinio neurologinio tinklo) simbolius. Kalbant apie mašinų vertimo ir POS ženklinimo užduotis, mes nustatėme šiuos metodus, kad pasiektume artimus ir kartais viršytume pažangiausius rezultatus. Mūsų analizėje parodome, kad nervinės mašinos vertimo sistema yra jautri šaltinio ir tikslinių ženklų santykiui, o santykis beveik 1 ar didesnis suteikia optimalių rezultatų.', 'ml': 'ആരെങ്കിലും അറബി NLP പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതില്\u200d വാക്ക് പിഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d ഒരു പിവോട്ടല്\u200d പങ്കുണ് അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഒരുപാട് പരിശോധന ചെലവഴിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു അതിന്\u200dറെ സത്യത്തെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d. Off-the-shelf tools, however, are: i) complicated to use and ii) domain/dialect dependent.  നമ്മള്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിക്കല്\u200d സെഗ്മെന്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മൂന്ന് ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു: i) ഡാറ്റാ നടത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സബ്\u200cവാര്\u200dഡ് യൂ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും പോസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങിന്റെ ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ രീതികള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തി, ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d അവസ്ഥ- ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സ്രോതസ്സും ലക്ഷ്യസ്ഥാനങ്ങളും', 'no': 'Tekstsegmentasjon spelar ein viktig rolle i forbedring av alle arabiske NLP- program. Derfor har mye forskning brukt i å forbetra nøyaktigheten. Dette er imidlertid av skjelverktøyet: i) komplisert å bruka og ii) domene/dialekt dependent. Vi utforskar tre språk-uavhengige alternativer til morfologiske segmentasjon med: i) underordeiningar med data, ii) teikn som ein læringseining, og iii) ordinnbygging lært med ein teikn CNN (Convolution Neural Network). På oppgåva av maskineoversettelsa og POS-merkinga fann vi desse metodane å oppnå nær, og noen ganger overstyra kunsthandlinga. I analysen vårt viser vi at eit neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystem er sensitivt til forholdet til kjeldeteikn og målteikn, og forholdet nær 1 eller større gir optimalt utvikling.', 'mn': 'Үг хэвлэл нь Араб NLP хэрэглээнийг сайжруулахад чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Тиймээс маш олон судалгаа зөв байдлыг сайжруулахад зарцуулсан. Гэхдээ холбоотой хэрэгсэл нь: i) хэрэглэх төвөгтэй, ii) холбоотой/диалектын хамааралтай. Бид морфологик загварын 3 хэл хамааралтай өөрчлөлтийг ашиглан судалж байна: i) өгөгдлийн дамжуулагдсан суб-үг нэгж, ii) суралцах нэгж, iii) сонирхолтой CNN (Convolution Neural Network) ашиглаж сурсан үг загварууд юм. Машин хөгжлийн хөгжлийн болон POS маркингийн даалгавруудын тухай бид эдгээр арга замыг ойролцоогоор, заримдаа урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны тухай илүү өндөр олсон. Бидний шинжилгээнд мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах систем эх үүсвэр, зорилготой тэмдэгтийн харьцаатай мэдрэмжтэй, харьцаатай 1 эсвэл илүү их харьцаатай байдаг.', 'mt': 'Is-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem għandha rwol kruċjali fit-titjib ta’ kwalunkwe applikazzjoni tal-NLP Għarbija. Għalhekk, infiq ħafna riċerka fit-titjib tal-preċiżjoni tagħha. Madankollu, l-għodod barra mill-ixkaffa huma: i) ikkumplikati għall-użu u ii) dipendenti fuq id-dominju/id-dijalekt. Aħna nesploraw tliet alternattivi indipendenti mil-lingwa għas-segmentazzjoni morfoloġika bl-użu ta’: i) unitajiet ta’ subkelma mmexxija mid-dejta, ii) karattri bħala unit à ta’ tagħlim, u iii) inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kelma mgħallma bl-użu ta’ karattru CNN (Netwerk Newrali ta’ Konveoluzzjoni). On the tasks of Machine Translation and POS tagging, we found these methods to achieve close to, and occasionally surpass state-of-the-art performance.  Fl-analiżi tagħna, nuru li sistema tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali hija sensittiva għall-proporzjon ta’ tokens tas-sors u tal-mira, u proporzjon qrib wieħed jew aktar, jagħti l-a ħjar prestazzjoni.', 'sr': 'Segmentacija reèi igra glavnu ulogu u poboljšanju bilo kojeg arapskog NLP aplikacije. Stoga je mnogo istraživanja potrošeno u poboljšanju tačnosti. Međutim, oružje iz police su komplikovane za upotrebu i ii) domena/dijalektna zavisna. Istražujemo tri neovisne alternative jezika za morfološku segmentaciju koristeći: i) podrečene jedinice podrečene podriječjima, ii) karaktere kao jedinicu učenja, i iii) rečne integracije naučene koristeći karakter CNN (Neuralna mreža konvolucija). Na zadatkima prevoda i označavanja POS-a, pronašli smo te metode da se postignu blizu, i ponekad prelazimo u stanju umjetnosti. U našoj analizi pokazujemo da je sistem prevoda neuralne mašine osjetljiv prema odnosu izvora i ciljnih znakova, i odnosu blizu 1 ili većeg, pruža optimalnu funkciju.', 'pl': 'Segmentacja słowa odgrywa kluczową rolę w ulepszaniu każdej arabskiej aplikacji NLP. Dlatego wiele badań zostało wydanych na poprawę jego dokładności. Dostępne narzędzia są jednak: i) skomplikowane w użyciu i ii) zależne od domeny/dialektu. Badamy trzy niezależne od języka alternatywy dla segmentacji morfologicznej wykorzystując: i) jednostki podsłów oparte na danych, ii) znaki jako jednostkę uczenia się oraz iii) osadzenia słów uczonych przy użyciu znaku CNN (Convolution Neural Network). W odniesieniu do zadań tłumaczenia maszynowego i tagowania POS, stwierdziliśmy, że te metody osiągają zbliżone i czasami przewyższają najnowocześniejsze wydajności. W naszej analizie pokazujemy, że neuronowy system tłumaczenia maszynowego jest wrażliwy na stosunek tokenów źródłowych i docelowych, a stosunek bliski 1 lub większy daje optymalną wydajność.', 'so': 'Heshiiska hadalka waxaa ka muuqata qayb dhaqaale ah horumarinta codsiga afka Carabiga ah ee NLP. Sidaa darteed waxaa loo isticmaalay waxbarasho badan si loo kordhiyo saxda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka caafimaadku waa: i) in lagu isticmaalo iyo ii) ay ku adagtahay domain/dialect. Waxaynu baaraannaa saddex qalloocan oo aan ku xoreen afka morphologiga ah oo isticmaalaya: i) xarumaha kooxaha hoos-hadalka ee macluumaadka lagu wado (ii) oo ah qaybaha waxbarashada, iii) oo hadal ku qoran karta isticmaalka xaraf CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Shaqooyinka turjumidda mashiinka iyo tagidda POS, waxaynu helnay qaababkan ay ku gaadhaan dhaw, marar marka qaar ka hormariyaan sameynta farshaxanka. Analyskayaga, waxaynu muujinnaa in nidaamka tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada ah ay u taxadaraan tirada tirada iyo calaamadaha waxyaabaha la jeedo, qaybaha ku dhow 1 ama ka weyn, waxay bixiyaan sameynta optimal.', 'ro': 'Segmentarea cuvintelor joacă un rol esențial în îmbunătățirea oricărei aplicații NLP arabe. Prin urmare, o mulțime de cercetare a fost cheltuită pentru îmbunătățirea acurateții sale. Cu toate acestea, uneltele de pe raft sunt: i) complicat de utilizat și ii) domeniu / dialect dependent. Explorăm trei alternative independente de limbă la segmentarea morfologică folosind: i) unități de subcuvinte bazate pe date, ii) caractere ca unitate de învățare și iii) încorporări de cuvinte învățate folosind un caracter CNN (Rețeaua Neurală Convoluție). În ceea ce privește sarcinile de traducere automată și etichetare POS, am găsit aceste metode pentru a obține performanțe aproape și, ocazional, depășesc performanțe de ultimă generație. În analiza noastră, arătăm că un sistem de traducere automată neurală este sensibil la raportul dintre jetoanele sursă și țintă, iar un raport apropiat de 1 sau mai mare, oferă performanțe optime.', 'sv': 'Ordsegmentering spelar en avgörande roll för att förbättra alla arabiska NLP-program. Därför har mycket forskning lagts ned på att förbättra dess noggrannhet. De färdiga verktygen är dock: i) komplicerade att använda och ii) domän/dialekt beroende. Vi utforskar tre språkoberoende alternativ till morfologisk segmentering med hjälp av: i) datadrivna underordenheter, ii) tecken som en enhet för lärande, och iii) ordinbäddningar som lärts med hjälp av ett tecken CNN (Convolution Neural Network). När det gäller maskinöversättning och POS-märkning fann vi dessa metoder för att uppnå nära, och ibland överträffa toppmoderna prestanda. I vår analys visar vi att ett neuralt maskinöversättningssystem är känsligt för förhållandet mellan källa och mål tokens, och ett förhållande nära 1 eller högre, ger optimal prestanda.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை பிரித்தல் எந்த அரபி NLP பயன்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்தும்போது ஒரு ஒலி பங்கை வைக்கிறது. அதனால், நிறைய ஆய்வுகள் அதன் சரியை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு செலவிட்டது. இருந்தாலும்- ஷெல்ப் கருவிகள் இல்லாமல் இருந்தாலும்: i) பயன்படுத்த சிக்கலானது மற்றும் ii) களம்/வைப்பு சார்ந்தது. நாம் மூன்று மொழி சுதந்தி துணை பிரிவுகளுக்கு மாற்றும் விருப்பத்தேர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடி இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் POS குறிப்புகளின் செயல்களில், நாங்கள் நெருங்கும் முறைகளை கண்டுபிடித்து, சில நேரங்களில எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சியில், ஒரு புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்று அமைப்பு மூலம் மற்றும் இலக்கு குறியீட்டின் விகிதத்திற்கு உணர்வு உள்ளது மற்றும் ஒர', 'ur': 'کلمات سپٹمنٹ کسی عربی NLP کاربرد کو بہترین کرنے میں ایک اپنا پٹولی رول لگا رہا ہے. لہذا بہت سی تحقیقات اس کی دقیقیقیت کے ساتھ خرچ کی گئی ہے۔ لیکن شیلف ابزار نافذ ہیں: i) استعمال کرنے کے لئے پیچیدہ اور ii) ڈومین/ڈائیلک اپنا معاملہ ہے. ہم اس کے مطابق تین زبان-غیر مستقل الفاظت کا انتشار کرتے ہیں: i) ڈاٹ-ڈیٹ چلنے والی سوب-ورڈ یونیٹ، ii) لکھنے والی یونیٹ کے مطابق لکھنے والی لکھنے والی ابڈینگ، اور iii) لکھنے والی ابڈینگ کا استعمال کرتا ہے ایک ماشین ترجمہ اور POS ٹاگ کے کاموں پر ہم نے ان طریقوں کو نزدیک پہنچانے کے لئے پایا ہے اور بعض اوقات میں آهنت کی عملکرد سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے. ہمارے تحلیل میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایک نیورل ماشین ترجمہ سیستم سورج اور موجود ٹوکنوں کے نسبت حساس ہے، اور ایک نسبت ایک یا بڑے کے نزدیک ہے، اچھی فعالیت دیتا ہے.', 'si': 'වචන සැකසුම් සැකසුම් කිසිම අරාබික NLP වැඩසටහන වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන භාවයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා. ඉතින්, ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණයක් වැඩ කරලා තියෙනවා එයාගේ හරියට වැඩ කරන්න. ඒත්, ශෙල්ෆ් උපකරණය නැතිවෙලා තියෙන්නේ: i) භාවිත කරන්න සහ (i) ඩොමේන්/ඩායිලක්ට් අවශ්\u200dයයි. අපි භාෂාව-ස්වාධික වෙනස් තුනක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා මොර්ෆෝලෝජික සෙප්ටම් එක්ක භාවිත කරන්න: i) දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජිත සබ- වචන එක්ක, i) අක්ෂ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සහ POS ටැග් එකේ වැඩේ අපිට මේ විදියත් හොයාගත්තා, සමහර වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධයෙන්', 'uz': "Name Shunday qilib, ko'pchilik o'rganishni tasdiqlashga ishlaydi. Ho'sh, shelf asboblari: i) domen/dialect боғлиқ. Biz o'rganish bir xil bo'lgan so'zlarni o'rganish imkoniyati sifatida o'rganish imkoniyatlarni uchta tilni o'rganamiz. Name Analytikizda, biz neyrolik tarjima tizimi manba va shaxsiy tegnlarning qismlariga juda qiziqarli, va 1 yoki ko'proq qismi, optimal bajarish imkoniyatini beradi.", 'vi': 'Phân đoạn từ đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong việc cải tiến mọi ứng dụng NLP Ả Rập. Do đó, rất nhiều nghiên cứu đã được dùng để cải thiện độ chính xác của nó. Tuy nhiên, các công cụ ngoài giá trị là: Chúng tôi khám phá ba cách độc lập ngôn ngữ với phân tách lịch sử bằng: i) các đơn vị chữ phụ dựa trên dữ liệu, II) các ký tự như một đơn vị học tập, và III) từ ngữ được học sử dụng một ký tự CNN (kênh thần kinh Thuyết phục). Về các nhiệm vụ của Machine Translation and POS taging, we found these methods to come close, and occasionally overall-of-the-art performance. Trong phân tích của chúng tôi, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng một hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh nhạy với tỉ lệ của vật chứa và vật nhãn đích, và tỉ lệ gần với 1 hay lớn hơn, cung cấp hiệu suất tối ưu.', 'da': 'Ordsegmentering spiller en afgørende rolle i forbedringen af ethvert arabisk NLP-program. Derfor er der brugt meget forskning på at forbedre dens nøjagtighed. Udsalgsværktøjer er imidlertid: i) komplicerede at bruge og ii) domæne/dialekt afhængige. Vi undersøger tre sproguafhængige alternativer til morfologisk segmentering ved hjælp af: i) datadrevne underordenheder, ii) tegn som en enhed for læring, og iii) ordindlejringer lært ved hjælp af et tegn CNN (Convolution Neural Network). På opgaverne med maskinoversættelse og POS tagging fandt vi disse metoder til at opnå tæt på, og sommetider overgå state-of-the-art ydeevne. I vores analyse viser vi, at et neuralt maskinoversættelsessystem er følsomt over for forholdet mellem kilde og mål tokens, og et forhold tæt på 1 eller større, giver optimal ydeevne.', 'nl': 'Woordsegmentatie speelt een cruciale rol bij het verbeteren van elke Arabische NLP-toepassing. Daarom is veel onderzoek besteed aan het verbeteren van de nauwkeurigheid. Standaard tools zijn echter: i) ingewikkeld in gebruik en ii) domein/dialect afhankelijk. We onderzoeken drie taalonafhankelijke alternatieven voor morfologische segmentatie met behulp van: i) data-driven sub-word eenheden, ii) tekens als een eenheid van leren, en iii) woord embeddings geleerd met behulp van een teken CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Bij de taken van Machine Translation en POS tagging vonden we dat deze methoden de state-of-the-art prestaties benaderen en soms overtreffen. In onze analyse laten we zien dat een neuraal machinevertaalsysteem gevoelig is voor de verhouding van bron- en doeltokens, en een verhouding dicht bij 1 of hoger, optimale prestaties geeft.', 'de': 'Wortsegmentierung spielt eine entscheidende Rolle bei der Verbesserung jeder arabischen NLP-Anwendung. Daher wurde viel Forschung in die Verbesserung seiner Genauigkeit investiert. Standardmäßige Werkzeuge sind jedoch: i) kompliziert zu bedienen und ii) domain/dialekt abhängig. Wir erforschen drei sprachunabhängige Alternativen zur morphologischen Segmentierung mit: i) datengetriebenen Unterworteinheiten, ii) Zeichen als Lerneinheit und iii) Worteinbettungen, die mithilfe eines Zeichens CNN (Convolution Neural Network) erlernt werden. Bei den Aufgaben der maschinellen Übersetzung und des POS-Tagging haben wir festgestellt, dass diese Methoden dem Stand der Technik nahe kommen und gelegentlich sogar übertreffen. In unserer Analyse zeigen wir, dass ein neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungssystem empfindlich auf das Verhältnis von Quell- und Zieltoken reagiert und ein Verhältnis nahe 1 oder höher eine optimale Leistung liefert.', 'id': 'Segmen kata bermain peran penting dalam memperbaiki aplikasi NLP Arab apapun. Oleh karena itu, banyak penelitian telah dihabiskan untuk meningkatkan akurasinya. Alat off-the-shelf, bagaimanapun, adalah: i) rumit untuk digunakan dan ii) domain/dialekt tergantung. Kami mengeksplorasi tiga alternatif bebas dari bahasa untuk segmentasi morfologi menggunakan: i) unit sub-kata yang didorong data, ii) karakter sebagai unit belajar, dan iii) embedding kata belajar menggunakan karakter CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Dalam tugas Translation Mesin dan tagging POS, kami menemukan metode-metode ini untuk mencapai dekat, dan kadang-kadang melebihi prestasi state-of-the-art. Dalam analisis kami, kami menunjukkan bahwa sistem terjemahan mesin saraf sensitif kepada nisbah token sumber dan target, dan nisbah dekat dengan 1 atau lebih, memberikan prestasi optimal.', 'ko': '분사는 아랍어 NLP 애플리케이션을 개선하는 데 중요한 역할을 합니다.그래서 그 정확성을 높이기 위해 많은 연구를 진행했다.그러나 기존의 도구는: i) 사용이 복잡하고 ii) 는 역 / 사투리에 의존한다.우리는 언어에 독립된 형태 구분 방법 세 가지를 탐색했다. i) 데이터 구동의 하위 단어 단원, i ii 문자를 학습 단원으로 하고, i ii는 문자 CNN (권적 신경 네트워크) 을 사용하여 학습한 단어를 삽입했다.기계 번역과 어성 표기 임무에서 우리는 이러한 방법이 접근, 때로는 가장 선진적인 성능을 초과했다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 분석에서 우리는 신경기계번역시스템이 원본 표기와 목표 표기의 비율에 매우 민감하고 1에 가깝거나 더 큰 비율이 최상의 성능을 제공할 수 있음을 발견했다.', 'bg': 'Сегментацията на думи играе ключова роля за подобряване на всяко приложение за арабски НЛО. Ето защо са изразходвани много изследвания за подобряване на неговата точност. Извънредните инструменти обаче са: i) сложни за използване и ii) зависими от домейна/диалекта. Изследваме три езикови независими алтернативи на морфологичната сегментация, използвайки: i) задвижвани от данни подсловни единици, ii) символи като единица за учене и iii) вграждания на думи, научени с помощта на символ Неврозна мрежа на конвелуцията. По задачите на машинния превод и маркирането на ПОС открихме, че тези методи са близки до, а понякога и надминават най-съвременните постижения. В нашия анализ ние показваме, че невронната система за машинен превод е чувствителна към съотношението източник и целеви токени, а съотношение близо до 1 или по-голямо, дава оптимална производителност.', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa maneno unacheza jukumu la upigaji kurasa katika kuboresha matumizi yoyote ya NLP ya Kiarabu. Kwa hiyo, utafiti mwingi umetumika katika kuboresha ukweli wake. Vifaa vinavyotengenezwa, hata hivyo, ni: I) vigumu kutumia na i i) domain/dialect inategemea. Tunafutia mabadiliko matatu yanayojitegemea lugha ya kifolojia kwa kutumia: i) kituo cha habari kinachoendeshwa kwa maneno, ii) kama kitengo cha kujifunza, na iii) maneno yaliyojifunza kwa kutumia mhusika CNN (Mtandao wa Kujitoleza Neural Neural). Kuhusu kazi za Tafsiri za Mashine na alama za POS, tuligundua njia hizi za kufikia karibu, na mara nyingine hupitia matumizi ya sanaa. Katika uchambuzi wetu, tunaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa utafsiri wa mashine ya asili unao na uelewa wa kiwango cha chanzo na alama za malengo, na kiwango cha karibu na 1 au zaidi, kinaleta utendaji wa matumaini.', 'fa': 'بخش کلمات نقش اصلی را در بهترین کاربرد NLP عربی می\u200cکند. بنابراین، تحقیقات زیادی برای بهتر دقیقاتش خرج شده است. با این حال، ابزارهای خارج از قفس، این است: i) وابستگی به استفاده از دومین/دیالکت پیچیده است. با استفاده از: i) واحد\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای داده\u200cها، ii) شخصیت\u200cها به عنوان واحد یادگیری، و iii) ابتدایی\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای استفاده از یک شخصیت سی\u200cان (شبکه عصبی تغییر) یاد گرفته\u200cاند، سه انتخاب\u200cهای مستقل به زبان استفاده می\u200cکنیم در مورد وظیفه\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین و نقاشی POS پیدا کردیم که این روش\u200cها را برای رسیدن به نزدیک و گاهی از وضعیت هنری بیشتر از آن یافتیم. در تحلیل ما نشان می دهیم که یک سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی نسبت به نسبت منبع و نشانه های هدف حساس است، و نسبت نزدیک ۱ یا بیشتر، عملکرد optimal می دهد.', 'tr': 'Söz segmentasy her bir arabça NLP programini geliştirmek üçin wajyp roli oýnaýar. Şol sebäpli, dogrylygyny gowulaşdyrmak üçin köp barlag geçirildi. Ancak shelf araçları dışında: i) kullanmak karmaşık ve ii) domun/dialekte bağlı. Biz morfolojik segmentasiýanyň üç dilden gaýratyn seçenekleri ulanýarys: i) data-driven sub-word birimlerini, ii) karakterleriň öwrenme birimi hökmünde, we iii) karakterleriň CNN (Convolution Neural Network) karakterleriň ullanlygyny öwrendirdik. Makin terjime we POS etiketlemeginiň görevlerinde bu yönler ýakyn bolup ýetmek üçin tapdyk we käwagt sungat eserleriniň durumyndan öňünden geçirip bardyk. Biziň analýusymyzda, näyral maşynyň terjime sistemasy çeşme we maksady tokenlerin proporsiýasyna hasaplanýar we 1 ýa-da gowy bir proporsiýasynda optimal etkinlik berer.', 'af': "Woord segmentasie speel 'n pivotaal rol in die verbetering van enige Arabiese NLP toepassing. Daarom is baie ondersoek gebruik in die verbetering van sy presisiteit. Off-the-shelf-nutsprogramme is egter: i) kompliseer om te gebruik en ii) domein/dialekte afhanklik. Ons ondersoek drie taal-onafhanklike alternatiewe om morfologiese segmentasie te gebruik met gebruik: i) data-gedrywe subwoord eenhede, ii) karakters as 'n eenhede van leer, en iii) woord inbettings geleer deur gebruik van 'n karakter CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Op die opdragte van Masjien Vertaling en POS-etiketting, het ons hierdie metodes gevind om naby te bereik, en eintlik oorvloei die state-of-the-art-performance. In ons analisie wys ons dat 'n neurale masjien vertaling stelsel sensitief is tot die verhouding van bron en doel tokens, en 'n verhouding naby 1 of groter, gee optimale prestasie.", 'hr': 'Segmentacija riječi igra glavnu ulogu u poboljšanju bilo kojeg arapskog primjene NLP-a. Stoga je mnogo istraživanja potrošeno u poboljšanju preciznosti. Međutim, oružje iz police su komplikovane za upotrebu i ii) domena/dijalektna zavisna. Istražujemo tri neovisne alternative jezika za morfološku segmentaciju koristeći: i) podriječne jedinice koje vode podriječi, ii) znakove kao jedinicu učenja, i iii) učenje riječi koje su učili koristeći karakter CNN (Neuralna mreža konvolucija). Na zadatkima prevoda strojeva i označavanja POS-a, pronašli smo te metode kako bi se postigli blizu, i ponekad nadmašili postupak umjetnosti. U našoj analizi pokazujemo da je sustav prevoda neuroloških strojeva osjetljiv prema odnosu izvora i ciljnih znakova, a odnos blizu 1 ili većeg, daje optimalni učinkoviti.', 'am': 'የንግግር ግንኙነት በአረብኛ የNLP ፕሮግራም በማሻሻል ላይ የተመሳሳይ የፖስቲካ ሽፋን ያሳያል፡፡ ስለዚህ ብዙ ምርመራዎች እርግጠቱን በማሻሻል ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ Off-the-shelf tools, however, are: i) complicated to use and ii) domain/dialect dependent.  በ) የዳታ-የልዩ ቃላት የልዩ ቋንቋ ነፃ አካላትን ትምህርት የኩነቶች (i i) እና (iii) ቃላት በCNN (የነፃ ነural መረብ የተማረ የጽሑፍ አካላት) እና የጽሑፍ አካላት ማውቀትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የመኪን ትርጉም እና የPOS ማዕከላዊ ስራቶች ላይ፣ እነዚህን ሥርዓቶች ለመግኘት አገኘን እና ሁኔታ የ-አርእስት ስርዓት ማድረግ ተሻግረናል፡፡ በትምህርታችን፣ የናቡር መሣሪያው ትርጉም ሲስማት የዕድሜ እና የግንኙነት ምልክቶችን ማድረግ እና በ1 ወይም የበለጠ ክፍል በጣም የተሻለ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Söz segmentasiyası hər bir ərəb NLP uyğulamasını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün böyük rol oynayır. Buna görə də çox araştırma onun doğruluğunu yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün sərf edildi. Halbuki, raf vasitələrindən çıxmış: i) istifadə etmək və ii) domena/dialekt bağlıdır. Biz morfolojik segmentasyonun üç dildən bağımsız alternatifi keşif edirik: i) verilər tərəfindən istifadə edilən apa-söz birlikləri, ii) karakterləri öyrənmək birimi kimi, və iii) CNN karakteri ilə öyrənilən söz inşalları. Makin Çeviri və POS etiketlərinin əməllərində bu metodları yaxınlaşdırmaq üçün tapdıq və bəzilərində sanat performansını aşdıq. Bizim analizimizdə, bir nöral maşın çevirim sistemi mənbənin və məqsəd tokenlərin proporsiyası ilə hissətlidir, və bir neçə-neçə yaxın proporsiyası optimal performansı verir.', 'bn': 'কোন আরবী এনএলপি অ্যাপ্লিকেশন উন্নত করার জন্য শব্দ বিভাগের ভূমিকা পালন করে। তাই অনেক গবেষণা তার সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করার জন্য ব্যয় করা হয়েছে। কিন্তু শেল্ফ টুল থেকে নির্ভর করা হচ্ছে: i) ব্যবহার করার জন্য কঠিন এবং ii) ডোমেইন/ডায়ালেক্ট নির্ভর করে। আমরা তিনটি ভাষার স্বাধীন বিকল্পের বিকল্প খুঁজে বের করি: ই) ডাটা চালানো সাব-ওয়ার্ড ইউনিট হিসেবে শিক্ষার একটি ইউনিট হিসেবে তথ্য চালিয়ে যাচ্ছে এবং আই) শব্দের প্রবেশ কর মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং পোস ট্যাগিং এর কাজে আমরা কাছাকাছি পৌঁছাতে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো পেয়েছি এবং মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে শিল্পের প্রদর্শনে আমাদের বিশ্লেষণে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একটি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য চিহ্নের হারের প্রতি সংবেদনশীল এবং একটি রেটি ১ বা বেশী', 'bs': 'Segmentacija riječi igra glavnu ulogu u poboljšanju bilo kojeg arapskog NLP aplikacije. Stoga je mnogo istraživanja potrošeno u poboljšanju preciznosti. Međutim, oružje iz police su komplikovane za upotrebu i ii) domena/dijalektna zavisna. Istražujemo tri neovisne alternative jezika za morfološku segmentaciju koristeći: i) podriječne jedinice koje vode podriječje, ii) karaktere kao jedinicu učenja, i iii) rečne integracije koje su naučile koristeći karakter CNN (Neuralna mreža konvolucija). Na zadatkima prevoda i označavanja POS-a, pronašli smo te metode da se postignu blizu, i ponekad prelazimo u stanju umjetnosti. U našoj analizi pokazujemo da je sistem prevoda neuroloških strojeva osjetljiv prema odnosu izvora i ciljnih znakova, i odnosu blizu 1 ili većeg, pruža optimalni izvor.', 'cs': 'Segmentace slov hraje klíčovou roli při zlepšování libovolné arabské aplikace NLP. Proto bylo vynaloženo mnoho výzkumu na zlepšení jeho přesnosti. Standardní nástroje jsou však: i) složité na použití a ii) závislé na doméně/dialektu. Zkoumáme tři jazykově nezávislé alternativy morfologické segmentace pomocí: i) datově řízených podslovních jednotek, ii) znaků jako jednotky učení a iii) vložení slov naučených pomocí znaku CNN (Convolution Neural Network). U úkolů strojového překladu a POS tagování jsme zjistili, že tyto metody dosahují blízkého a občas překonávají nejmodernější výkon. V naší analýze ukazujeme, že neuronový strojový překlad je citlivý na poměr zdrojových a cílových tokenů a poměr blízko 1 nebo větší poskytuje optimální výkon.', 'sq': 'Segmentimi i fjalëve luan një rol kryesor në përmirësimin e çdo aplikimi arab NLP. Prandaj, shumë kërkime janë shpenzuar për përmirësimin e saktësisë së saj. Megjithatë, mjetet jashtë raftit janë: i) të komplikuara për të përdorur dhe ii) të varura nga domeni/dialekti. Ne eksplorojmë tre alternativa të pavarura nga gjuha për segmentimin morfologjik duke përdorur: i) njësi nënfjalësh të drejtuara nga të dhënat, ii) karaktere si një njësi mësimi dhe iii) përfshirje fjalësh të mësuara duke përdorur një karakter CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Në detyrat e përkthimit të makinave dhe etiketave POS, gjetëm këto metoda për të arritur afër, dhe ndonjëherë për të kaluar shfaqjen më të lartë. Në analizën tonë, ne tregojmë se një sistem përkthimi i makinave nervore është i ndjeshëm ndaj raportit të burimit dhe shenjave objektiv, dhe një raport pranë 1 apo më të lartë, jep rezultate optimale.', 'hy': 'Բառերի սեգմետրացիան կարևոր դեր է խաղում ցանկացած արաբական ՆԼՊ ծրագիր բարելավելու համար: Therefore, a lot of research has been spent in improving its accuracy.  Այնուամենայնիվ, արտաքին գործիքները i) դժվար են օգտագործելու և Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մորֆոլոգիական սեգմետրացիայի երեք անկախ լեզվից մեկ այլ տարբերակ, օգտագործելով i) տվյալների հիմնված բառերի ենթաբառերի միավորներ, II) իմաստներ որպես սովորելու միավոր, և Մեքենայի թարգմանման և POS-ի նշանների վերաբերյալ մենք գտանք այս մեթոդները, որպեսզի հասնենք մոտ և երբեմն գերազանցենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքները: Մեր վերլուծության մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգը զգայուն է աղբյուրի և նպատակային նշանների հարաբերակցության վրա, և հարաբերակցությունը մոտ 1 կամ ավելի է, տալիս է օպտիմալ արդյունք:', 'et': 'Sõna segmenteerimine mängib olulist rolli iga araabia NLP rakenduse täiustamisel. Seetõttu on selle täpsuse parandamiseks kulutatud palju teadusuuringuid. Kasutusvalmis tööriistad on siiski: i) keeruline kasutada ja ii) domeeni/dialekti sõltuvad. Uurime kolme keelesõltumatut alternatiivi morfoloogilisele segmenteerimisele, kasutades i) andmepõhiseid alamsõnaühikuid, ii) märke õppimisüksusena ja iii) sõna manustamist, mis on õppitud märgi CNN (konvolution neural Network) abil. Masintõlke ja POS sildistamise ülesannete puhul leidsime, et need meetodid on lähedased ja aeg-ajalt ületavad tipptasemel jõudluse. Meie analüüsis näitame, et neuraalne masintõlkesüsteem on tundlik allika- ja sihtmärkide suhte suhtele ning suhe lähedal ühele või suuremale annab optimaalse jõudluse.', 'ca': "La segmentació de paraules té un paper central en millorar qualsevol aplicació àrab del NLP. Per tant, s'ha gastat molta recerca per millorar la seva precisió. Però les eines fora de la plataforma són: i) complicades per utilitzar i ii) dependents de domini/dialecte. Exploram tres alternatives independents de llenguatge a la segmentació morfològica fent servir: i) unitats de subparaules guiades per dades, ii) caràcters com a unitat d'aprenentatge, i iii) integracions de paraules aprenguts fent servir un caràcter CNN (Convolution Neural Network). En les tasques de la traducció màquina i l'etiqueta POS, vam trobar aquests mètodes per aconseguir pròxims i ocasionalment superar l'actuació més avançada. En la nostra anàlisi, demostram que un sistema de traducció de màquines neurals és sensible a la proporció de fitxes de font i d'objectiu, i una proporció propera a 1 o més, dóna un rendiment optim.", 'fi': 'Sanasegmentoinnilla on keskeinen rooli minkä tahansa arabian NLP-sovelluksen parantamisessa. Siksi sen tarkkuuden parantamiseen on käytetty paljon tutkimusta. Käytettävissä olevat työkalut ovat kuitenkin i) monimutkaisia käyttää ja ii) toimialueesta/murteesta riippuvaisia. Tutkimme kolmea kielestä riippumatonta vaihtoehtoa morfologiselle segmentoinnille käyttäen: i) datavetoisia alasanayksiköitä, ii) merkkejä oppimisyksikkönä ja iii) sanaupotuksia, jotka on opittu käyttämällä CNN-merkkiä (konvolution neural Network). Konekäännöksen ja POS-taggingin tehtävissä havaitsimme näiden menetelmien saavuttavan lähellä ja ajoittain ylittävän huipputason suorituskyvyn. Analyysissämme osoitamme, että neurokonekäännösjärjestelmä on herkkä lähde- ja kohdemerkkien suhteelle, ja suhde lähellä yhtä tai enemmän antaa optimaalisen suorituskyvyn.', 'jv': 'segmentation Kaya, akeh barêng-barêng saiki wis rampung nêmên, dadi kapan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo awak dhéwé. off-the-shell tools, like, are: i) kompliced to use and i i) domain/dialects unmanned. Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan telu nggawe sistem sing wis dipunangé karo segmentasi n modololyane gambar: i) data-drived Sub-word unit, i ii) caratar kanggo kotakno karo perangkat oleh, lan iii) caratar embedding kuwi wis dipunanggo oleh gambar caratar MT (convolution Neral Network). Nang arah sing dibutuhke Trabagian karo Pok, kita nggoleki pertama iki banget kanggo ngerasai kapan, lan mulai kuwi wis mulai state-of-the-arts maneh. Nang akeh cara-cara anyar, kita ngomong nik sistem itoleh sistem Neral kuwi wis dipesno karo peruahaan karo token sing nggawe tarjamahan, lan ratio kang sampeyan nêmêr sampeyan nêmêr sing luwih apik, mengko iso nggawe akeh barêt.', 'he': 'התחלקת מילים משחקת תפקיד מרכזי בשיפור כל תכנית NLP ערבית. Therefore, a lot of research has been spent in improving its accuracy.  כלי מחוץ למדף, בכל אופן, הם: i) מסובכים להשתמש ו ii) תלויים בתחום/דיאלקט. אנו חוקרים שלושה אלטרנטיבות עצמאות לשפה לחלק מורפולוגי באמצעות: i) יחידות מתחת מילים מונעות על ידי נתונים, ii) דמויות כיחידה של לימוד, ולiii) קיצוב מילים ללמוד באמצעות דמויות CNN (רשת נוירולית של שינוי). על המשימות של תרגום מכונות ותגיות POS, מצאנו את השיטות האלה כדי להשיג קרוב, ולפעמים להעביר את ההופעה המאומנת. בניתוח שלנו, אנו מראים שמערכת התרגום של מכונות עצביות רגישה ליחס המקור והסימנים המטרה, ויחס קרוב ל-1 או יותר, נותן ביצועים אופטימיים.', 'sk': 'Segmentacija besed igra ključno vlogo pri izboljšanju katere koli arabske aplikacije NLP. Zato je bilo za izboljšanje njegove natančnosti porabljenih veliko raziskav. Pripravljena orodja pa so: i) zapletena za uporabo in ii) odvisna od domene/narečja. Raziskovali smo tri od jezika neodvisne alternative morfološki segmentaciji z uporabo: i) podbesedne enote, ii) znakov kot enote učenja in iii) besednih vdelav, ki se jih naučimo z znakom CNN (konvolucijska nevralna mreža). Pri nalogah strojnega prevajanja in označevanja POS smo ugotovili, da so te metode blizu in občasno presegle najsodobnejše zmogljivosti. V naši analizi smo pokazali, da je nevronski strojni prevajalni sistem občutljiv na razmerje izvornih in ciljnih žetonov, razmerje blizu 1 ali več pa zagotavlja optimalno učinkovitost.', 'ha': "Word segmentation plays a pivotal role in improving any Arabic NLP application.  Saboda haka, an tumu da wasu tafiti masu ƙari ga improve taƙaitarsa. Fara-kayan aiki na shelf, amma sunan: i) da aka ƙudura wa amfani da shi da ii) daidai da Domen/dialakar. Tuna karatun wasu salon da ba'a rasa ba ta koma zuwa rabo-morfological da aka yi amfani da: i) kayan aiki da aka yi danganta da ƙananan-magana, ii) da takardar kayan aiki da aka sanar da su da wani takardar CNN (KCharselect Neural Netri). Kayan aikin Tafsiri da tagogi na Maine da PoS, za'a sãmi waɗannan hanyõyin su samu zuwa, kuma a lokacin ka sami tsarin-the-art. Yana cikin anayyanmu, Munã nũna cewa, wata na fassarar ɗin aikin neura yana mai sauƙi zuwa rabo na rayin ayukan da aka yi amfani da shi, kuma yana da rabon tsakanin da ke ƙara 1 ko mafi girma, yana bãyar da aikin ƙwarai.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཨར་བིའི་NLP ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གང་རུང་ཞིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བའི་ཚོགས་གཙོ་རིམ་ལ་གཏོ དེར་བརྟེན། འཚོལ་ཞིབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བདེ་སྟངས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད། Off-the-shelf tools, however, are: i) complicated to use and ii) domain/dialect dependent. We explore three language-independent alternatives to morphological segmentation using: i) data-driven sub-word units, ii) characters as a unit of learning, and iii) word embeddings learned using a character CNN (Convolution Neural Network). Machine Translation and POS tagging ལས་ཀ་ལྟར་འགྲོ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནང་དུ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ནུའུ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Fast and Accurate Neural Word Segmentation for Chinese', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات العصبية السريعة والدقيقة للصينية', 'fr': 'Segmentation neuronale rapide et précise des mots pour le chinois', 'pt': 'Segmentação de palavras neurais rápida e precisa para chinês', 'es': 'Segmentación de palabras neuronales rápida y precisa para chino', 'ja': '中国語のための高速かつ正確な神経単語セグメンテーション', 'zh': '速正中文神经分词', 'hi': 'चीनी के लिए फास्ट और सटीक तंत्रिका शब्द विभाजन', 'ru': 'Быстрая и точная нейронная сегментация слов для китайского языка', 'ga': 'Deighilt Focal Néarach gasta agus chruinn don tSínis', 'hu': 'Gyors és pontos idegi szegmentáció kínai számára', 'el': 'Γρήγορη και ακριβής νευρωνική τμηματοποίηση λέξεων για τα κινεζικά', 'kk': 'Қытай үшін тез және дұрыс нейрондық сөз сегментациясы', 'it': 'Segmentazione delle parole neurali veloce e accurata per il cinese', 'lt': 'Greitas ir tikslus kinų žodžių neurologinis segmentavimas', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Kata Neural Cepat dan Tepat untuk Cina', 'mk': 'Fast and Accurate Neural Word Segmentation for Chinese', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni rapida u preċiża tal-kliem newrali għaċ-Ċiniżi', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസിനുള്ള വേഗത്തിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d വാക്ക് വേഗം', 'ka': 'Name', 'no': 'Snøggt og akkurat nøyralt ordsegmentasjon for kinesisk', 'pl': 'Szybka i dokładna segmentacja słów neuronowych dla chińskich', 'mn': 'Хятадын хурдан, тодорхой мэдрэлийн үг хэвлэлт', 'ro': 'Segmentarea rapidă și precisă a cuvintelor neurale pentru chineză', 'sr': 'Brza i tačna Neuralna reč Segmentacija za kineske', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Snabb och exakt neural ordsegmentering för kinesiska', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Heshiiska qoyska ee Shiino', 'ur': 'چینی کے لئے تیز اور دقیق نئورل کلمات سپٹمنٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chuỗi cấu tạo thần kinh nhanh và chính xác cho Trung Quốc', 'nl': 'Snelle en nauwkeurige neurale woordsegmentatie voor Chinees', 'bg': 'Бърза и точна сегментация на неврални думи за китайски', 'de': 'Schnelle und genaue neuronale Wortsegmentierung für Chinesisch', 'id': 'Segmentasi Perkataan Neural Cepat dan Tepat untuk Cina', 'da': 'Hurtig og præcis neural ordsegmentering til kinesisk', 'hr': 'Brza i precizna segmentacija neuroloških riječi za kineske', 'fa': 'بخش کلمه عصبی سریع و دقیق برای چینی', 'sw': 'Fast and Accurate Neural Word Segmentation for Chinese', 'tr': 'Çinçe üçin tiz we dogry Senedleşik', 'af': 'Vinnige en akkuraat Neurale Woord Segmentasie vir Sjinees', 'sq': 'Segmentim i shpejtë dhe i saktë i fjalëve neuronale për kinezët', 'am': 'የቻይንኛ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'ko': '신속하고 정확한 중국어 신경분사', 'az': 'Çin üçün hızlı və doğru nöral Kelimi Segmentasyonu', 'bn': 'চীনাদের জন্য দ্রুত এবং সংক্রান্ত নিউরাল শব্দ বিভাগ', 'bs': 'Brza i precizna neuronska segmentacija riječi za kinesku', 'cs': 'Rychlá a přesná segmentace neuronových slov pro čínštinu', 'ca': 'Segmentació ràpida i exacta de paraules neuronals per a xinès', 'fi': 'Nopea ja tarkka neurosanasegmentointi kiinan kielelle', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի համար արագ և ճշգրիտ նյարդային բառերի բաժանման', 'et': 'Kiire ja täpne neuraalne sõna segmenteerimine hiina keele jaoks', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'sk': 'Hitra in natančna živčna segmentacija besed za kitajščino', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מילים נוירוליות מהירות ומדויקות לסינית', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཆེད་དུ་དང་ཁྱད་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐྱེལ་བའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Neural models with minimal feature engineering have achieved competitive performance against traditional methods for the task of Chinese word segmentation. However, both training and working procedures of the current neural models are computationally inefficient. In this paper, we propose a greedy neural word segmenter with balanced word and character embedding inputs to alleviate the existing drawbacks. Our segmenter is truly end-to-end, capable of performing segmentation much faster and even more accurate than state-of-the-art neural models on Chinese benchmark datasets.', 'ar': 'حققت النماذج العصبية ذات الحد الأدنى من هندسة الميزات أداءً تنافسيًا مقابل الطرق التقليدية لمهمة تجزئة الكلمات الصينية. ومع ذلك ، فإن إجراءات التدريب والعمل للنماذج العصبية الحالية غير فعالة من الناحية الحسابية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح مقطعًا جشعًا للكلمات العصبية مع مدخلات متوازنة لتضمين الكلمات والشخصيات للتخفيف من العيوب الموجودة. إن جهاز التجزئة الخاص بنا هو حقًا شامل وقادر على أداء التجزئة بشكل أسرع وأكثر دقة من أحدث النماذج العصبية على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية الصينية.', 'pt': 'Modelos neurais com engenharia de recursos mínima alcançaram desempenho competitivo em relação aos métodos tradicionais para a tarefa de segmentação de palavras chinesas. No entanto, tanto o treinamento quanto os procedimentos de trabalho dos modelos neurais atuais são computacionalmente ineficientes. Neste artigo, propomos um segmentador de palavras neural ganancioso com entradas balanceadas de incorporação de palavras e caracteres para aliviar as desvantagens existentes. Nosso segmentador é realmente de ponta a ponta, capaz de realizar segmentação muito mais rápida e ainda mais precisa do que modelos neurais de última geração em conjuntos de dados de referência chineses.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux avec une ingénierie des caractéristiques minimale ont atteint des performances compétitives par rapport aux méthodes traditionnelles pour la segmentation des mots chinois. Cependant, les procédures de formation et de travail des modèles neuronaux actuels sont inefficaces sur le plan informatique. Dans cet article, nous proposons un segmenteur de mots neuronal gourmand avec des entrées équilibrées d'intégration de mots et de caractères pour pallier les inconvénients existants. Notre segmenteur est véritablement de bout en bout, capable d'effectuer une segmentation beaucoup plus rapide et encore plus précise que les modèles neuronaux de pointe sur des ensembles de données de référence chinois.", 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales con una ingeniería de características mínima han logrado un rendimiento competitivo frente a los métodos tradicionales para la tarea de segmentación de palabras chinas. Sin embargo, tanto el entrenamiento como los procedimientos de trabajo de los modelos neuronales actuales son computacionalmente ineficientes. En este artículo, proponemos un segmentador de palabras neuronales codicioso con entradas equilibradas de incrustación de palabras y caracteres para aliviar los inconvenientes existentes. Nuestro segmentador es realmente integral, capaz de realizar la segmentación de forma mucho más rápida e incluso más precisa que los modelos neuronales de última generación en los conjuntos de datos de referencia chinos.', 'ja': '最小限の機能エンジニアリングを備えたニューラルモデルは、中国語の単語セグメンテーションのタスクのための従来の方法と比較して競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成しました。しかしながら、現在のニューラルモデルの訓練及び作業手順の両方は、計算的に非効率である。本稿では、既存の欠点を軽減するために、バランスの取れたワードと文字の埋め込み入力を備えた欲張りなニューラルワードセグメンタを提案する。当社のセグメンテーターは本当にエンドツーエンドで、中国のベンチマークデータセット上の最先端のニューラルモデルよりもはるかに速く、さらに正確にセグメンテーションを実行できます。', 'zh': '比之旧法,最少特征者神经形于中文分词务取竞争力性。 然神经模范之教,计效率皆低效也。 于本文中,发一贪神经词分割器,有平衡单词符嵌输,以纾见病。 吾分段器是真端至端,能疾于中国基准集上之最先进神经模形,甚至确行分割。', 'hi': 'न्यूनतम फीचर इंजीनियरिंग के साथ तंत्रिका मॉडल ने चीनी शब्द विभाजन के कार्य के लिए पारंपरिक तरीकों के खिलाफ प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है। हालांकि, वर्तमान तंत्रिका मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण और कामकाजी प्रक्रियाएं कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से अक्षम हैं। इस पेपर में, हम मौजूदा कमियों को कम करने के लिए संतुलित शब्द और चरित्र एम्बेडिंग इनपुट के साथ एक लालची तंत्रिका शब्द सेगमेंटर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा सेगमेंटर वास्तव में एंड-टू-एंड है, जो चीनी बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका मॉडल की तुलना में बहुत तेजी से और यहां तक कि अधिक सटीक विभाजन करने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели с минимальной функциональной инженерией достигли конкурентоспособной производительности по сравнению с традиционными методами для задачи сегментации китайских слов. Однако как тренировочные, так и рабочие процедуры современных нейронных моделей являются вычислительно неэффективными. В этой статье мы предлагаем жадный нейронный сегментатор слов со сбалансированным вводом слов и символов для устранения существующих недостатков. Наш сегментатор действительно сквозной, способный выполнять сегментацию гораздо быстрее и даже точнее, чем современные нейронные модели на китайских эталонных наборах данных.', 'ga': 'Tá feidhmíocht iomaíoch bainte amach ag samhlacha néaracha le hinnealtóireacht ghné íosta i gcoinne modhanna traidisiúnta le haghaidh deighilt focal Síneach. Mar sin féin, tá nósanna imeachta oiliúna agus oibre na múnlaí néarúla reatha neamhéifeachtach ó thaobh ríomhaireacht de. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid deighleoir focal néarach sanntach le hionchuir chothromaithe focal agus carachtair chun na míbhuntáistí atá ann faoi láthair a mhaolú. Tá ár deighleoir fíor deireadh le deireadh, in ann deighilt a dhéanamh i bhfad níos tapúla agus níos cruinne ná na samhlacha néarúla den scoth ar thacair thacair thacair thacair na Síne.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მოდელები, რომლებიც მინიმალური ფუნქციების ინზინერიციაში კონპეციენტიური კონფიგურაციას მიიღეთ ტრადიციონალური მეტვებების გა მაგრამ მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მოდელების განაკეთება და სამუშაო პროცესები კომპუტერციალურად არაეფექციურია. ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ მივეღებთ წარმოდგენელი ნეიროლური სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვები და სიტყვების შემოწყვების მონაცემები, რომლებიც არსებობს წარმოდგენების გახ ჩვენი სედმენტერი ნამდვილად საკუთარი დასრულება, შესაძლებელია სედმენტაციის გავაკეთოთ უფრო სწრაფად და უფრო უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე ჩინეთის ბენქმენტაციის მონაცემების მო', 'hu': 'A minimális funkciótervezéssel rendelkező neurális modellek versenyképes teljesítményt értek el a hagyományos módszerekkel szemben a kínai szószegmentálás feladatában. A jelenlegi neurális modellek képzési és munkafolyamatai azonban számítástechnikailag nem hatékonyak. Ebben a tanulmányban egy kapzsi neurális szószegmentálót javasolunk kiegyensúlyozott szó- és karakterbeágyazási bemenetekkel a meglévő hátrányok enyhítésére. Szegmentőnk valóban end-to-end, képes a szegmentálásra sokkal gyorsabban és még pontosabban, mint a legkorszerűbb neurális modellek kínai benchmark adatkészleteken.', 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα με την ελάχιστη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών έχουν επιτύχει την ανταγωνιστική απόδοση έναντι των παραδοσιακών μεθόδων για το έργο της κινεζικής τμηματοποίησης λέξεων. Ωστόσο, τόσο η εκπαίδευση όσο και οι διαδικασίες εργασίας των σημερινών νευρωνικών μοντέλων είναι υπολογιστικά αναποτελεσματικές. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα άπληστο τμήμα νευρωνικών λέξεων με ισορροπημένες λέξεις και χαρακτήρες που ενσωματώνουν εισόδους για την ανακούφιση των υφιστάμενων μειονεκτημάτων. Ο διαμεσολαβητής μας είναι πραγματικά ολοκληρωμένος, ικανός να εκτελέσει την τμηματοποίηση πολύ γρηγορότερα και ακόμα πιο ακριβή από τα σύγχρονα νευρωνικά μοντέλα σε κινεζικά σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς.', 'it': "I modelli neurali con funzionalità minime hanno raggiunto prestazioni competitive rispetto ai metodi tradizionali per il compito della segmentazione delle parole cinesi. Tuttavia, sia la formazione che le procedure di lavoro degli attuali modelli neurali sono computazionalmente inefficienti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un avido segmentatore neurale di parole con input bilanciati di incorporazione di parole e caratteri per alleviare gli svantaggi esistenti. Il nostro segmenter è davvero end-to-end, in grado di eseguire la segmentazione molto più veloce e persino più accurata dei modelli neurali all'avanguardia su set di dati di benchmark cinesi.", 'mk': 'Неуралните модели со минимална инженерска карактеристика постигнаа конкурентна резултат против традиционалните методи за задачата на кинеската секретација на зборови. Сепак, обуката и работните процедури на сегашните нервни модели се пресметувачки неефикасни. Во овој документ, предлагаме алчен нервен сегментер со балансиран збор и карактер вклучувајќи влози за олеснување на постојните недостатоци. Нашиот сегментер е навистина од крај до крај, способен да ја изврши сегментацијата многу побрзо и дури и попрецизен од најсовремените нервни модели на кинеските бази на податоци.', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai modeliai, turintys minimalių charakteristikų inžineriją, pasiekė konkurencinį veiksmingumą, palyginti su tradiciniais metodais, taikomais Kinijos žodžių segmentacijai atlikti. Tačiau dabartinių nervų modelių mokymo ir darbo procedūros yra skaičiavimo požiūriu neveiksmingos. Šiame dokumente siūlome paragintą nervinį žodžių segmentatorių su subalansuotais žodžiais ir simboliais įterpiant įvedimus, kad būtų sumažintos esamos trūkumų. Mūsų segmentatorius iš tikrųjų yra nuo galo iki galo, gali atlikti segmentaciją daug greičiau ir net tiksliau nei naujausi nerviniai modeliai Kinijos lyginamųjų duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'kk': 'Төменгі мүмкіндіктердің инженерлікті нейрондық үлгілер Қытай сөз сегментациясының тапсырмасының әдімгі әдеттегі әдістеріне сәйкес істеді. Бірақ қазіргі невралдық моделдердің оқу және жұмыс істеу процедурлері есептеп тұрмайды. Бұл қағазда біз балансияланған сөз мен таңбаларды ендіру үшін, барлық сұрақтарды көшірмелеу үшін қалай невралдық сөз сегменттерін ұсынамыз. Біздің сегментеріміз Шынымен аяқталған соңында, бұл сегментацияны қытайша банкмарк деректер жиындарындағы невралдық моделдерден артық және дұрыс жасауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ ജോലിക്കുള്ള പാഠങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ പരിശീലനവും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയകളും കണക്കിട്ടില്ലാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള പിന്നിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലളിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ പിന്നില്\u200d നാം ഒരു ലാ നമ്മുടെ സിഗ്മെന്റര്\u200d ശരിക്കും അവസാനിക്കുന്നതാണ്. വേഗത്തില്\u200d വേഗത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതും ചൈനീസ് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ', 'mt': 'Mudelli newrali b’inġinerija b’karatteristiċi minimi kisbu prestazzjoni kompetittiva kontra metodi tradizzjonali għall-kompitu tas-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem Ċiniż. Madankollu, kemm il-proċeduri ta’ taħriġ kif ukoll ta’ ħidma tal-mudelli newrali attwali huma komputazzjonalment ineffiċjenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu segmentatur tal-kliem newrali għaqli b’inputs ibbilanċjati ta’ kliem u karattru biex itaffu l-iżvantaġġi eżistenti. Is-segmentatur tagħna huwa verament minn tarf għal tarf, kapaċi jwettaq segmentazzjoni ħafna aktar malajr u saħansitra aktar preċiż mill-mudelli newrali l-aktar avvanzati fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza Ċiniżi.', 'mn': 'Хятад үгийн загварын үйл ажиллагааны уламжлалтын аргыг эсрэг өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагааг багахан инженерийн мэдрэлийн загварууд хүргэсэн. Гэвч одоогийн мэдрэлийн загваруудын сургалтын болон ажиллах процедур хоёуланг тооцоололтоор үр ашиггүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид баланслагдсан үг болон харьцааг бүрдүүлэх зүйлсийг багасгах зориулагч гэсэн сэтгэл зүйн хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бидний сегментерүүд үнэхээр төгсгөлд, Хятадын салбарын өгөгдлийн сан дээрх урлагийн мэдрэлийн загвараас илүү хурдан, илүү зөв загварыг хийж чадна.', 'ms': 'Model saraf dengan teknik ciri minimal telah mencapai prestasi kompetitif terhadap kaedah tradisional untuk tugas segmen perkataan Cina. Namun, kedua-dua prosedur latihan dan kerja model saraf semasa tidak berkesan secara komputasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan segmen perkataan saraf serakah dengan kata yang seimbang dan aksara memasukkan input untuk mengurangi kelemahan yang ada. Segmen kita benar-benar akhir-akhir, mampu melakukan segmen jauh lebih cepat dan bahkan lebih tepat daripada model saraf state-of-the-art pada set data benchmark Cina.', 'pl': 'Modele neuronowe z minimalnymi funkcjami inżynierii osiągnęły konkurencyjną wydajność w stosunku do tradycyjnych metod segmentacji słów chińskich. Jednak zarówno procedury treningowe, jak i pracy obecnych modeli neuronowych są nieefektywne obliczeniowo. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy chciwy segmenter słów neuronowych ze zrównoważonym osadzeniem słów i znaków, aby złagodzić istniejące wady. Nasz segmenter jest naprawdę kompleksowy, zdolny do wykonywania segmentacji znacznie szybciej i jeszcze dokładniejszy niż najnowocześniejsze modele neuronowe na chińskich zbiorach danych benchmarkowych.', 'ro': 'Modelele neurale cu inginerie minimă a caracteristicilor au obținut performanțe competitive față de metodele tradiționale pentru sarcina segmentării cuvintelor chinezești. Cu toate acestea, atât procedurile de formare, cât și procedurile de lucru ale modelelor neurale actuale sunt ineficiente din punct de vedere computațional. În această lucrare, propunem un segmentator de cuvinte neurale lacom cu intrări echilibrate de cuvinte și caractere pentru a atenua dezavantajele existente. Segmenterul nostru este cu adevărat end-to-end, capabil să efectueze segmentarea mult mai rapidă și chiar mai precisă decât modelele neurale de ultimă generație pe seturi de date de referință chinezești.', 'sr': 'Neuralni modeli sa minimalnim inženjerstvom postigli su konkurentne funkcije protiv tradicionalnih metoda za zadatak kineske segmentacije riječi. Međutim, i obuku i radne postupke trenutnih neuralnih modela su kompjuterski neefektivne. U ovom papiru predlažemo pohlepni neuralni segmenter sa ravnoteženim riječima i uložima karaktera kako bi olakšali postojeće štete. Naš segmenter je stvarno kraj do kraja, sposoban da izvede segmentaciju mnogo brže i čak tačnije od stanja umjetnih neuralnih modela na kineskim bazama.', 'no': 'Neuralmodeller med minimale funksjonsynningar har oppnådd konkurrentivt utvikling mot tradisjonelle metodar for oppgåva av kinesisk ordsegmentasjon. Men både opplæring og arbeidsprosedyrar for den gjeldande neuralmodellen er rekna ut av rekna ikkje effektiv. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein grød nøyralsegmenter med balansert ord og teikn innebygging av inndata for å løysa dei eksisterande trekkingane. Segmenteret vårt er truleg slutt til slutt, i stand til å utføre segmentasjonen mykje raskare og til og med meir nøyaktige enn kunstende neuralmodeller på kinesiske benchmarkdatasett.', 'si': 'අඩුම විශේෂතාවක් ඉංජිනියර් එක්ක න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විධාන නමුත්, ප්\u200dරධානය සහ වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ දැන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය විදිහට පරිගණනය ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය වචනය සහ අක්ෂර සම්බන්ධ වචනය සහ අක්ෂර සම්බන්ධ වචනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපේ සැකම්ටර් ඇත්තටම අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි, චීනි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට වඩා වේගයෙන් සැකසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ.', 'ta': 'குறைந்தபட்ச பண்புப் பொறியியலுடன் குறைந்தபட்ச மாதிரிகள் சீன வார்த்தை பிரிவு செய்யும் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு எதிராக போ ஆனால், தற்போதைய புதிய மாதிரிகளின் பயிற்சி மற்றும் வேலை செய்யும் செயல்பாடுகளும் கணக்கில் தேவையில்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பான புதிய வார்த்தை பிரிப்பாளரை நிலையான வார்த்தையும் உள்ளீடுகளை உள்ளிடும் எழுத்துக எங்கள் பிரிவு உண்மையில் முடிவு உள்ளது, துண்டத்தை மிகவும் வேகமாக மற்றும் அதிக சரியான மற்றும் சீனிய பென்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள நிலையில', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka naadiga ah oo ay ku haystaan injiilka waxyaabaha ugu yaraan, waxay ku dhamaadeen tababar-khilaaf ah oo ka gees ah qaababka caadiga ah ee shaqada qeybinta qoraalka Shiino. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada iyo hablada shaqada ee sameynta qaababka neurada ee joogtada ah waa mid si xisaab ah u adag. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qeyb qof damacsan oo hadal neurada ah oo ku qoran hadal iyo xaraf saxda ah si aan u fududayno dhabarka joogta. Xiriirkeennu waa dhammaadka ugu dambaysta, wuxuuna awoodaa in uu sameeyo qeybaha si dhaqso u dhaqso iyo si saxda ah oo ka sahlan qaababka neurada ee qoraalka qaranka ee Shiino ku qoran taariikhda.', 'sv': 'Neurala modeller med minimal funktionsteknik har uppnått konkurrenskraftig prestanda mot traditionella metoder för uppgiften med kinesiska ordsegmentering. Men både träning och arbetsrutiner för de nuvarande neurala modellerna är beräkningsmässigt ineffektiva. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en girig neural ordsegmenter med balanserade ord och tecken inbäddade ingångar för att lindra befintliga nackdelar. Vår segmenter är verkligen end-to-end, kapabel att utföra segmentering mycket snabbare och till och med mer exakt än state-of-the-art neurala modeller på kinesiska benchmarkdata.', 'ur': 'نئورل ماڈل کے ذریعہ ذریعہ فرصت انجینژی کے ساتھ چین لفظ کے کام کے لئے سنتی طریقے کے مقابلہ میں مسابقات کی فعالیت پہنچ چکی ہے. لیکن موجود نیورل موڈل کی تربیت اور کام کی پردازش دونوں کامپیوتر کے طور پر فائدہ نہیں ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک گہرے نئورل لفظ سپٹر کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو برانگیز لفظ اور کریٹر میں داخل ہونے کے لئے موجود دھوپٹوں کو آسان کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارا سیگنٹر بالکل پایان ہے، سیگنٹ کرنا بہت سریع اور زیادہ دقیق ہے چین بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر قادر ہے.', 'vi': 'Các mô hình thần kinh với đặc trưng tối thiểu đã đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh với các phương pháp truyền thống cho nhiệm vụ phân chia từ Trung Quốc. Tuy nhiên, cả các phương pháp huấn luyện và làm việc của các mô hình thần kinh hiện tại đều không hiệu quả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một chuỗi các từ thần kinh tham lam với các từ cân bằng và nhân cách trộn các nội dung để giảm bớt trở ngại hiện tại. Thứ-- -- -- -- có khả năng phân chia nhanh hơn và chính xác hơn nhiều so với những mô hình thần kinh tiên tiến trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn Trung Quốc.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, Joriy neyron modellarning ta'lim va ishlash vazifalari haqida emas. Bu hujjatda, biz mavjud narsalarni kamaytirish uchun bir qiziq so'zni ajratishni talab qilamiz. Bizning qismlarimiz haqiqatgina oxiriga tugatadi, qismlarni tez qilishi mumkin va Xitoycha benchmark maʼlumotlar sohasidagi davlatdan foydalanish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Невралните модели с минимално инженерство на характеристиките са постигнали конкурентни резултати спрямо традиционните методи за задачата на китайската сегментация на думи. Въпреки това, както тренировъчните, така и работните процедури на настоящите невронни модели са изчислително неефективни. В тази статия ние предлагаме алчен неврален сегментатор на думи с балансирани думи и символи вграждащи входове за облекчаване на съществуващите недостатъци. Нашият сегментатор е наистина от край до край, способен да извършва сегментация много по-бързо и дори по-точно от най-съвременните невронни модели на китайски бенчмаркови набори от данни.', 'hr': 'Neuralni modeli s minimalnim inženjerstvom funkcija postigli su konkurentne funkcije protiv tradicionalnih metoda za zadatak kineske segmentacije riječi. Međutim, i obuku i radne postupke trenutnih neuralnih modela su računalno neučinkovane. U ovom papiru predlažemo pohlepni neuralni segmenter riječi s balanciranim riječima i ulogom uloženim karakterima kako bi olakšali postojeće štete. Naš segmenter je stvarno kraj do kraja, sposoban da izvrši segmentaciju mnogo brže i čak preciznije od stanja umjetnih neuralnih modela na kineskim bazama.', 'da': 'Neurale modeller med minimal feature engineering har opnået konkurrencedygtig ydeevne i forhold til traditionelle metoder til opgaven med kinesisk ordsegmentering. Men både træning og arbejdsprocedurer i de nuværende neurale modeller er beregningsmæssigt ineffektive. I denne artikel foreslår vi en grådig neural ordsegmenter med afbalancerede ord og tegn indlejring input for at lindre de eksisterende ulemper. Vores segmenter er virkelig end-to-end, i stand til at udføre segmentering meget hurtigere og endnu mere præcis end state-of-the-art neurale modeller på kinesiske benchmark datasæt.', 'nl': 'Neurale modellen met minimale feature engineering hebben concurrerende prestaties bereikt ten opzichte van traditionele methoden voor de taak van Chinese woordsegmentatie. Echter, zowel training als werkprocedures van de huidige neurale modellen zijn computationeel inefficiënt. In dit artikel stellen we een hebzuchtige neurale woordsegmenter voor met gebalanceerde woord- en tekeninputs om de bestaande nadelen te verlichten. Onze segmenter is echt end-to-end, in staat om segmentatie veel sneller en zelfs nauwkeuriger uit te voeren dan state-of-the-art neurale modellen op Chinese benchmarkdatasets.', 'de': 'Neuronale Modelle mit minimalem Feature Engineering haben eine wettbewerbsfähige Leistung gegenüber traditionellen Methoden für die Aufgabe der chinesischen Wortsegmentierung erreicht. Sowohl das Training als auch die Arbeitsabläufe der aktuellen neuronalen Modelle sind jedoch rechnerisch ineffizient. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen gierigen neuronalen Wortsegmenter mit ausgewogenen Wort- und Zeicheneingaben vor, um die bestehenden Nachteile zu lindern. Unser Segmenter ist wirklich End-to-End und in der Lage, die Segmentierung viel schneller und noch genauer durchzuführen als moderne neuronale Modelle auf chinesischen Benchmark-Datensätzen.', 'ko': '전통적인 중국어 분사 방법에 비해 가장 작은 특징을 가진 공정을 가진 신경 네트워크 모델은 좋은 성능을 얻었다.그러나 현재 신경모형의 훈련과 작업 과정은 계산 효율이 매우 낮다.본고에서 우리는 균형 잡힌 단어와 문자를 입력에 삽입하여 기존의 단점을 완화시키는 탐욕스러운 신경분사기를 제시했다.우리의 절분기는 진정한 단말기부터 단말기까지 절분기로서 중국 기준 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 신경 모델보다 더욱 빠르고 정확하게 절분을 집행할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Model saraf dengan teknik karakteristik minimal telah mencapai prestasi kompetitif melawan metode tradisional untuk tugas segmentasi kata Cina. Namun, kedua prosedur pelatihan dan kerja model saraf saat ini tidak efektif secara komputasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan segmen kata saraf serakah dengan kata yang seimbang dan karakter memasukkan masukan untuk mengurangi kelemahan yang ada. Segmen kita benar-benar akhir-akhir, mampu melakukan segmen jauh lebih cepat dan bahkan lebih akurat dari model saraf terbaik pada set data benchmark Cina.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای عصبی با مهندسی مهندسی\u200cهای کمینه با روش\u200cهای سنتی برای کار جدا کردن کلمه\u200cهای چینی به دست آورده\u200cاند. با این حال، هر دو روش آموزش و کار مدل های عصبی فعلی به طور کامپیوتری بی\u200cفایده است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک بخش\u200cدهنده\u200cی کلمه\u200cهای عصبی با کلمه\u200cهای متناسب و شخصیت\u200cهایی که وارد می\u200cشوند تا کم\u200cسازی کشیدن\u200cهای موجود باشد. بخش\u200cکننده\u200cی ما واقعاً پایان و پایان است که تواناست از بخش\u200cبندی بسیار سریع\u200cتر و حتی دقیق\u200cتر از مدل\u200cهای عصبی هنر در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنچم\u200cمارک چینی انجام دهد.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa msingi wenye uhandisi wa ubunifu wa chini umefanikiwa kufanya ushindani dhidi ya mbinu za kitamaduni kwa ajili ya kazi ya kuchaguliwa kwa neno la China. Hata hivyo, mbinu za mafunzo na kazi za mifano ya sasa ya neurali hazina ufanisi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mgaji wa neno la ujasiri wa ubongo wenye neno na mhusika wa usawa wa maneno na mhusika unaoandaa input ili kupunguza mgongo uliopo. Mgawanya wetu ni mwisho wa mwisho, mwenye uwezo wa kutekeleza vipengele kwa haraka zaidi na sahihi zaidi ya mifano ya kisasa kwenye seti za taarifa za bendera za China.', 'sq': 'Modelet neuronale me inxhinieri minimale karakteristike kanë arritur performancë konkurruese kundër metodave tradicionale për detyrën e segmentimit të fjalëve kineze. Megjithatë, si trajnimi ashtu edhe procedurat e punës të modeleve aktuale neuronale janë llogaritësisht jo efektive. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një segmentues të fjalëve nervore lakmueshëm me fjalë të balancuara dhe karakter të përfshirë të dhëna për të lehtësuar dëmet ekzistuese. Segmenteri ynë është me të vërtetë nga fundi në fund, i aftë për të kryer segmentimin shumë më shpejt dhe edhe më të saktë se modelet neurale më të moderne në bazat kineze të dhënash.', 'af': "Neurale modele met minimale funksie inženiering het gemerk gemeenskaplike prestasie teen tradisionele metodes vir die taak van Sjinese woord segmentasie. Maar, beide onderwerp en werksprosedure van die huidige neurale modelles is rekenaasjoneel oneffektief. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n groet neurale woord segmenter met balanse woord en karakter inprop om die bestaande tekening te alleviaat. Ons segmenteerder is regtig einde tot einde, moontlik om segmentasie baie vinniger en selfs meer presies te doen as staat van die kunste neurale modelle op Sjinese benchmark datastelle.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային մոդելները, որոնք նվազագույն հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտության միջոցով են հասել մրցակցության արդյունք, հակառակ չինական բառերի սեգրեգացիայի ավանդական մեթոդներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, ինչպես նաև ներկայիս նյարդային մոդելների ուսումնասիրությունը, ինչպես նաև աշխատանքային գործընթացները հաշվարկների առումով անարդյունավետ են: In this paper, we propose a greedy neural word segmenter with balanced word and character embedding inputs to alleviate the existing drawbacks.  Մեր սեգմետրը իսկապես վերջ-վերջ է, ունակ է սեգմետրացիա կատարել շատ ավելի արագ և նույնիսկ ավելի ճշգրիտ, քան Չինաստանի համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի ամենաբարձր նյարդային մոդելները:', 'am': 'ትንሽ የቻይና ቃላት አካባቢ ስርዓት ላይ በተቃውሞ የቻይና ቃላት አካባቢ ሥርዓት ላይ የሚቃወሙትን አዋጅ አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን የአሁኑን የናውሬል ሞዴል ማስተማርና የሥራ ሥርዓት በቁጥር አይጠቅሙም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአሁኑን ጀርባ ለማሳየት የሚኖረውን ቃል እና የፊደል ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልገውን የነጥብ ነጥብ አካባቢ እና አካላትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቻይና benchmark ዳታ ማዕከላዎች ላይ የጠቅላዊ የውጤት ዓይነቶች በቻይና ላይ የሚቻል ግንኙነታችን ፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ነው፡፡', 'tr': '횉in챌e s철z segmentasi첵asyny흫 g철revi 체챌in d채pli nural modelleri 첵ok hasaplan첵ar. 횦철ne hem h채zirki n채yral modelleri흫 bilim we i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채nler kal Bu kagyzda, we 첵eterli dereje tertiblenen s철z we karakterler i챌eri giri힊inde bolan 챌izmeleri azaltmak 체챌in ullan첵an neiral s철zleri teklip ed첵채ris. Bizi흫 segmenterimiz hakykatdanam so흫unda bolan, 횉in챌e benchmark veri setirlerinde segmentasi첵any흫 durumyndan has dogry we has dogry nural modellerinden ba힊aryp bil첵채ris.', 'az': 'Çin sözlərin segmentasiyasının vəzifəsinə görə nürol modellərin minimal özellik inženjeri ilə müqayisədə müqayisədi performans çatdı. Lakin, həmin nöral modellərin təhsil və işləmə prosedürlərinin hər ikisi də hesablama olaraq faydalı deyildir. Bu kağızda, müəyyən edilmiş sözlər və karakterlər içərisində olan nöral sözlər segmentatçısını təklif edirik ki, mövcud çəkilmələri azaltsın. Sekmençimiz həqiqətən sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-son', 'bn': 'চীনা শব্দ বিভক্তির কাজের জন্য প্রথাগত পদ্ধতির বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করেছে। তবে বর্তমান নিউরেল মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ এবং কাজ করার প্রক্রিয়া গণনাত্রিকভাবে যথেষ্ট। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি লোভী নিউরেল শব্দ বিভক্তিকে প্রস্তাব করি যার মানে মানসিক শব্দ এবং চরিত্র যা ইনপুটের মধ্যে রয়েছে তা কমিয়ে দে আমাদের প্রজেন্টার আসলেই শেষ পর্যন্ত, চীনা বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্', 'bs': 'Neuralni modeli sa minimalnim inženjerstvom postigli su konkurentne funkcije protiv tradicionalnih metoda za zadatak kineske segmentacije riječi. Međutim, i obuku i radne postupke trenutnih neuralnih modela su računalno neiefikasne. U ovom papiru predlažemo pohlepni neuralni segmenter riječi sa balanciranim riječima i uložima karaktera kako bi olakšali postojeće štete. Naš segmenter je stvarno kraj do kraja, sposoban da izvede segmentaciju mnogo brže i čak tačnije od stanja umjetnih neuralnih modela na kineskim bazama.', 'ca': 'Models neuronals amb enginyeria de característiques mínimas han aconseguit un rendiment competitiu en comparació amb els mètodes tradicionals per la tasca de segmentació de paraules xineses. Però tant els procediments de formació com de treball dels models neurals actuals són ineficients computacionalment. En aquest paper, proposem un segmentador de paraules neurals coberta amb paraules i caràcters equilibrats incorporant entrades per aliviar els inconvenients existents. El nostre segmentador és realment de final a final, capaç de fer segmentació molt més ràpida i encara més precisa que els models neurals més avançats dels conjunts de dades xinesos de referència.', 'et': 'Minimaalse funktsioonidega neuromudelid on saavutanud konkurentsivõimelise jõudluse traditsiooniliste meetoditega hiina sõna segmenteerimise ülesandeks. Siiski on praeguste närvimudelite koolitus- ja tööprotseduurid arvutuslikult ebatõhusad. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ahne närvisõna segmenteerija, millel on tasakaalustatud sõna- ja märgisisendid, et leevendada olemasolevaid puudusi. Meie segmenteerija on tõeliselt otsast otsani, võimeline segmenteerima palju kiiremini ja täpsemalt kui Hiina võrdlusandmekogumite tipptasemel neuromudelid.', 'cs': 'Neurální modely s minimálními funkcemi inženýrství dosáhly konkurenčního výkonu oproti tradičním metodám pro úkol segmentace čínských slov. Nicméně tréninkové i pracovní postupy současných neuronových modelů jsou výpočetně neefektivní. V tomto článku navrhujeme chamtivý neuronový segmentátor slov s vyváženými vstupy pro vložení slov a znaků pro zmírnění stávajících nevýhod. Náš segmentátor je skutečně end-to-end, schopen provádět segmentaci mnohem rychleji a dokonce přesněji než nejmodernější neuronové modely na čínských referenčních datových sadách.', 'fi': 'Neuromallit, joissa on minimaalinen ominaisuustekniikka, ovat saavuttaneet kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn perinteisiin menetelmiin verrattuna kiinalaisen sanasegmentoinnin tehtävässä. Nykyisten neuromallien koulutus- ja työskentelymenetelmät ovat kuitenkin laskennallisesti tehottomia. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme ahneesta neurosanasegmentorista, jossa on tasapainoisia sanoja ja merkkejä sisältävä syöte nykyisten haittojen lieventämiseksi. Segmentoijamme on todella päästä päähän, pystyy suorittamaan segmentoinnin paljon nopeammin ja jopa tarkempi kuin uusimmat neuromallit kiinalaisissa vertailuaineistoissa.', 'jv': 'Nejer-model sing karo jenis menyang paling nggawe barang wis rampung pamirno karo perusahaan maneh dumadhingan kanggo nggawe barang string Chinese. Nanging, mesthi alah-alah sing sampeyan ngono nggawe perusahaan sampeyan anyar tentang Awak dhéwé, ngênêmên ngerasakno unyari ampar mên karo balans gambar lan akeh basa sing basa batir section', 'ha': "Shiryoyin neural da masu ƙaranci masu aikin inganci na ƙaranci, sun sami aikin yin gaura a kan hanyar kawaici wa aikin maganar segment na China. A lokacin da, ko kuma aikin aiki na misãlai na neural yanzu ba da lissafi ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani segmentori mai giji na maganar neura da magana da fassara wanda ke cikin inputi da za'a sauƙa ƙara bakunan da ke jira. Mai gaura da ke ƙara zuwa ƙari, yana iya iya iya cika rabon jinsiga fara kas sauri kuma mafi taƙaitacce ko da tsari daga halin-na-yanzu kan tsarin bangon-bangon na China.", 'sk': 'Živčni modeli z minimalnim inženiringom funkcij so dosegli konkurenčno zmogljivost proti tradicionalnim metodam za nalogo kitajske segmentacije besed. Vendar pa so tako usposabljanje kot delovni postopki sedanjih nevronskih modelov računalniško neučinkoviti. V tem prispevku predlagamo pohlepen nevronski segmentator besed z uravnoteženimi vnosi besed in znakov, da bi ublažili obstoječe pomanjkljivosti. Naš segmenter je resnično od konca do konca, sposoben izvajati segmentacijo veliko hitreje in še bolj natančno kot najsodobnejši nevronski modeli na kitajskih referenčnih naborih podatkov.', 'he': 'דוגמנים נוירוניים עם הנדסה מינימלית הצליחו להשיג ביצועים תחרותיים נגד שיטות מסורתיות למשימה של סגרטציה מילים סינית. בכל אופן, גם האימונים והתהליכים של הדוגמנים העצביים הנוכחיים אינם יעילים מחשבית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מגזר מילים עצביות חמדן עם מילה ומייזון ומכיל דמויות כניסות כדי להקל על החסרונות קיימות. הסגמנטר שלנו הוא באמת סוף-סוף, מסוגל לבצע סגמנטריה הרבה יותר מהר ואפילו יותר מדויק מאשר מודלים עצביים מוקדמים במערכת נתונים סינית.', 'bo': 'Neural models with minimal feature engineering have achieved competitive performance against traditional methods for the task of Chinese word segmentation. ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོས་གཞུང་གི་མིག་སྔར་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱོད་དང་ལས་ཀ་ལ In this paper, we propose a greedy neural word segmenter with balanced word and character embedding inputs to alleviate the existing drawbacks. ང་ཚོའི་དོན་དག་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་མ་ཐག་པར་བྱུང་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Pay Attention to the Ending : Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'ar': 'انتبه إلى النهاية: خطوط أساسية عصبية قوية لمهمة ROC Story Cloze', 'pt': 'Preste atenção ao final: linhas de base neurais fortes para a tarefa ROC Story Cloze', 'fr': "Faites attention à la fin\xa0: des bases neuronales fortes pour la tâche de clôture de l'histoire ROC", 'es': 'Presta atención al final: fuertes líneas de base neuronales para la tarea de cierre de la historia de ROC', 'ja': 'エンディングに注意を払う： ROCストーリークローズタスクのための強力なニューラルベースライン', 'zh': '注意结局:ROC故事闭强神经基线', 'hi': 'अंत पर ध्यान दें: आरओसी स्टोरी क्लोज़ कार्य के लिए मजबूत तंत्रिका आधार रेखाएं', 'ru': 'Обратите внимание на конец:сильные нейронные базовые линии для задачи закрытия истории ROC', 'ga': 'Tabhair aird ar an Críoch: Bunlínte Néaracha Láidre don Tasc Cloze Scéalaíochta ROC', 'ka': 'დაახმარება დასრულება:ძალიან ნეიროლური ბაზის ხაზები ROC ისტორიების დახმარების პარამეტრი', 'el': 'Δώστε προσοχή στο τέλος: Ισχυρές νευρωνικές βάσεις για την εργασία Cloze Story ROC', 'hu': 'Figyelem a befejezésre: Erős idegi alapok a ROC Story Cloze feladathoz', 'it': 'Prestare attenzione alla fine: Strong Neural Baselines per il ROC Story Cloze Task', 'kk': 'Аяқтау: ROC журналын жабу тапсырмасының күшті нейралық негізгі сызықтары', 'mk': 'Внимавајте на крајот:Силни неурални основни линии за задачата за затворање на приказната на ROC', 'lt': 'Atkreipkite dėmesį į pabaigą: stiprios neurologinės bazės ROC istorijos uždarymo uždaviniui', 'ms': 'Perhatian kepada Akhir:Baris Asas Neural Kuat untuk Tugas Tutup Cerita ROC', 'mt': 'Ħlas attenzjoni għat-Tmiem:Linji Bażiċi Newrali b’saħħithom għall-Kompitu ta’ Għeluq tal-Story ROC', 'mn': 'Эцсийн төгсгөлд анхаарлаа:ROC түүхийн зохиолын хүчтэй мэдрэлийн суурь шугам', 'no': 'Legg merksomhet til slutten:Strong neurobaseline for ROC Story Close Task', 'pl': 'Zwróć uwagę na zakończenie: silne bazy neuronowe dla zadania klozowania opowieści ROC', 'sr': 'Pažnja na kraj:Jake neurološke osnovne linije za zaključavanje ROC priče', 'si': 'අවසානයට අවස්ථාව දෙන්න', 'so': 'Pay Attention to the Ending:Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'sv': 'Var uppmärksam på slutet: Strong Neural Baselines för ROC Story Cloze Task', 'ml': 'Pay Attention to the Ending:Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'ta': 'முடிவுக்கு கவனம் செலுத்து:Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'ur': 'پایان کے لئے توجه کریں:روسی کہانی کلوز ٹاکس کے لئے طاقتور نیورال بنسس لین', 'ro': 'Acordați atenție la sfârșitul: Baze neurale puternice pentru activitatea ROC Story Cloze', 'vi': 'Chú ý đến kết thúc:Nhà thần kinh vững chắc cho nhiệm vụ nghiên cứu khoa học ROC', 'uz': 'Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'da': 'Vær opmærksom på slutningen: Stærke Neurale Baselines for ROC Story Cloze Opgave', 'hr': 'Pažnja na kraj:Jake neurološke osnovne linije za zaključavanje ROC priče', 'bg': 'Обърнете внимание на края: Силни неврални базови линии за задачата за клозе на история', 'nl': 'Let op het einde: Sterke neurale basislijnen voor de ROC Story Cloze Task', 'ko': '주의 끝: ROC 이야기 완성 빈칸 채우기 임무의 강력한 신경 기선', 'de': 'Achten Sie auf das Ende: Starke neuronale Baselines für die ROC Story Cloze Task', 'sw': 'Tahadhari kwa Mwisho: Makatili ya Neural kwa ajili ya kazi ya Story Cloze ya ROC', 'fa': 'توجه به پایان: خطوط عصبی قوی برای تاریخ ROC', 'af': 'Paag ag na die einde:Strong Neurale Basisline vir die ROC Gestorie Sluit Taak', 'tr': 'ROC Taryhy Baglanyş Görevleri üçin Güç Näraly Temel Hatlary', 'hy': 'Ուշադրություն դարձրեք վերջին հատվածին.', 'sq': 'Kujdes për përfundimin:Linjat bazë të forta neuronale për detyrën e mbylljes së tregimeve të ROC', 'id': 'Pay Attention to the Ending:Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'bs': 'Pažnja na kraj:Jake neurološke osnovne linije za zaključavanje ROC priče', 'ca': "Atenció al final: línies de base neurals fortes per a la tasca d'enclosura de la història ROC", 'cs': 'Věnujte pozornost konci: Silné neuronové základny pro úlohu ROC Story Cloze', 'bn': 'শেষ পর্যন্ত মনোযোগ দিন: রোসি গল্প ক্লোজ ক্লাসের জন্য শক্তিশালী নিউরাল মেসেলিন', 'fi': 'Kiinnitä huomiota lopputulokseen: Vahvat hermolähtökohdat ROC Story Cloze -tehtävään', 'am': 'Strong Neural Baselines for the ROC Story Cloze Task', 'az': 'Sonuna dikkat et', 'et': 'Pöörake tähelepanu lõpule: ROC Story Cloze ülesande tugevad neuraalsed lähtejooned', 'sk': 'Bodite pozorni na konec: Močne živčne osnove za nalogo ROC Story Cloze', 'ha': 'stroke Neural Baselils for the RoC History Cluze Tasks', 'bo': 'གཏོང་མཐའ་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་པ：སྟོབས་ཤུགས་པའི་ནུས་པ་གཞི་རྩལ་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཚོས་ROC གནད་སྡུད་ལས་ཀ་', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'he': 'שימו לב לסוף:קווי הבסיס העצביים החזקים למשימה לסגור סיפור ROC'}
{'en': 'We consider the ROC story cloze task (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) and present several findings. We develop a model that uses hierarchical recurrent networks with attention to encode the sentences in the story and score candidate endings. By discarding the large training set and only training on the validation set, we achieve an accuracy of 74.7 %. Even when we discard the story plots (sentences before the ending) and only train to choose the better of two endings, we can still reach 72.5 %. We then analyze this ending-only task setting. We estimate human accuracy to be 78 % and find several types of clues that lead to this high accuracy, including those related to sentiment, negation, and general ending likelihood regardless of the story context.', 'ar': 'نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار مهمة إخفاء قصة ROC (مصطفى زاده وآخرون ، 2016) ونقدم العديد من النتائج. نقوم بتطوير نموذج يستخدم الشبكات المتكررة الهرمية مع الانتباه إلى ترميز الجمل في القصة وتسجيل النهايات المرشحة. من خلال التخلص من مجموعة التدريب الكبيرة والتدريب فقط على مجموعة التحقق من الصحة ، نحقق دقة تصل إلى 74.7٪. حتى عندما نتجاهل حبكات القصة (الجمل قبل النهاية) ونتدرب فقط لاختيار أفضل نهايتين ، لا يزال بإمكاننا الوصول إلى 72.5٪. ثم نقوم بتحليل إعداد المهمة "النهاية فقط". نقدر أن الدقة البشرية تبلغ 78٪ ونجد عدة أنواع من القرائن التي تؤدي إلى هذه الدقة العالية ، بما في ذلك تلك المتعلقة بالمشاعر والنفي واحتمالية النهاية العامة بغض النظر عن سياق القصة.', 'es': 'Consideramos la tarea de cerrar la historia de ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) y presentamos varios hallazgos. Desarrollamos un modelo que utiliza redes jerárquicas recurrentes con atención para codificar las frases de la historia y puntuar los finales candidatos. Al descartar el conjunto de entrenamiento grande y solo el entrenamiento en el conjunto de validación, logramos una precisión del 74,7%. Incluso cuando descartamos las tramas de la historia (frases antes del final) y solo nos entrenamos para elegir el mejor de los dos finales, podemos alcanzar el 72,5%. A continuación, analizamos esta configuración de tarea «solo final». Estimamos que la precisión humana es del 78% y encontramos varios tipos de pistas que conducen a esta alta precisión, incluidas las relacionadas con el sentimiento, la negación y la probabilidad general de final, independientemente del contexto de la historia.', 'fr': "Nous examinons la tâche de clôture de l'histoire ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) et présentons plusieurs résultats. Nous développons un modèle qui utilise des réseaux hiérarchiques récurrents avec une attention particulière pour coder les phrases de l'histoire et noter les fins candidates. En abandonnant le grand ensemble d'entraînement et en ne s'entraînant que sur le jeu de validation, nous atteignons une précision de 74,7\xa0%. Même si nous abandonnons les intrigues (phrases avant la fin) et que nous nous entraînons uniquement à choisir la meilleure des deux fins, nous pouvons toujours atteindre 72,5\xa0%. Nous analysons ensuite ce paramètre de tâche «\xa0fin uniquement\xa0». Nous estimons la précision humaine à 78\xa0% et trouvons plusieurs types d'indices qui mènent à cette précision élevée, notamment ceux liés au sentiment, à la négation et à la probabilité générale de fin quel que soit le contexte de l'histoire.", 'pt': 'Consideramos a tarefa ROC story cloze (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) e apresentamos vários achados. Desenvolvemos um modelo que utiliza redes recorrentes hierárquicas com atenção para codificar as frases na história e pontuar finais candidatos. Ao descartar o grande conjunto de treinamento e treinar apenas o conjunto de validação, alcançamos uma precisão de 74,7%. Mesmo quando descartamos os enredos da história (frases antes do final) e treinamos apenas para escolher o melhor de dois finais, ainda podemos chegar a 72,5%. Em seguida, analisamos essa configuração de tarefa “somente final”. Estimamos a precisão humana em 78% e encontramos vários tipos de pistas que levam a essa alta precisão, incluindo aquelas relacionadas ao sentimento, negação e probabilidade geral de finalização, independentemente do contexto da história.', 'ja': '私たちは、ROCストーリークローズタスク（ Mostafazadeh et al., 2016 ）を検討し、いくつかの知見を提示します。私たちは、階層的な繰り返しネットワークを使用して、ストーリー内の文章をエンコードし、候補者のエンディングをスコア化するモデルを開発します。大きなトレーニングセットを廃棄し、検証セットのトレーニングのみを行うことで、74.7 ％の精度を実現します。ストーリープロット（エンディング前の文章）を破棄し、2つのエンディングのどちらかを選択するようにトレーニングする場合でも、72.5%に達することができます。次に、この「終了のみ」タスク設定を分析します。人間の精度は78%と推定され、ストーリーの文脈に関係なく、感情、否定、一般的な結末の可能性に関連するものを含む、この高い精度につながるいくつかのタイプの手がかりが見つかります。', 'zh': '臣等思ROC事闭塞(Mostafazadeh等,2016)发几项发觉。 发一模,用循环网络,句编码评分。 弃大练集,惟验集上教,我准确率及 74.7%。 纵弃故事情节(前句),只教择两个结局中好的,我们仍然可以到72.5%。 然后,我们分此"仅罢"的职务。 度人之准确率为78%,并得数端,致此高准确率,情理相关,故事背景如何。', 'hi': 'हम आरओसी कहानी क्लोज़ कार्य (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) पर विचार करते हैं और कई निष्कर्ष प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम एक मॉडल विकसित करते हैं जो कहानी में वाक्यों को एन्कोड करने और उम्मीदवार के अंत को स्कोर करने के लिए ध्यान देने के साथ पदानुक्रमित आवर्तक नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है। बड़े प्रशिक्षण सेट को छोड़कर और सत्यापन सेट पर केवल प्रशिक्षण, हम 74.7% की सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं। यहां तक कि जब हम कहानी भूखंडों (अंत से पहले वाक्यों) को छोड़ देते हैं और केवल दो अंतों में से बेहतर चुनने के लिए प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, तो भी हम 72.5% तक पहुंच सकते हैं। फिर हम इस "केवल-अंत" कार्य सेटिंग का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम मानव सटीकता का अनुमान 78% लगाते हैं और कई प्रकार के सुराग पाते हैं जो इस उच्च सटीकता का कारण बनते हैं, जिसमें कहानी के संदर्भ की परवाह किए बिना भावना, निषेध और सामान्य समाप्ति संभावना से संबंधित लोग शामिल हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы рассматриваем задачу закрытия истории ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) и представляем несколько выводов. Мы разрабатываем модель, которая использует иерархические повторяющиеся сети с вниманием к кодированию предложений в истории и оценке возможных концов. Отбрасывая большой обучающий набор и только обучение по валидационному набору, мы достигаем точности 74,7%. Даже когда мы отказываемся от сюжетов (предложений до конца) и тренируемся выбирать лучшее из двух концов, мы все равно можем достичь 72,5%. Затем мы анализируем эту настройку задачи «только конец». Мы оцениваем человеческую точность в 78% и находим несколько типов подсказок, которые приводят к такой высокой точности, включая те, которые связаны с настроениями, отрицанием и общей конечной вероятностью независимо от контекста истории.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid machnamh ar an tasc cloze scéal ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) agus cuirimid roinnt torthaí i láthair. Forbróimid múnla a úsáideann líonraí athfhillteacha ordlathacha le haird chun na habairtí sa scéal a ionchódú agus críochnaíonn iarrthóirí a scóráil. Tríd an tacar mór oiliúna a chaitheamh amach agus gan ach oiliúint a chur ar an tacar bailíochtaithe, bainimid amach cruinneas 74.7%. Fiú nuair a chaithfimid na ceapacha scéil (na habairtí roimh an deireadh) agus gan againn ach oiliúint a dhéanamh chun an ceann is fearr de dhá chríoch a roghnú, is féidir linn fós 72.5% a bhaint amach. Déanaimid anailís ansin ar an socrú tascanna “deireadh-amháin”. Measaimid go bhfuil cruinneas daonna 78% agus faighimid roinnt cineálacha leideanna as a dtagann an t-ardchruinneas seo, lena n-áirítear iad siúd a bhaineann le meon, diúltú, agus dóchúlachtaí deiridh ginearálta beag beann ar chomhthéacs an scéil.', 'ka': "ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ROC ისტორიების კლოზაციის რაოდენობა (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) და გამოყენებთ რამდენიმე შესახებ. ჩვენ განვითარებთ მოდელი, რომელიც იერაქტიკალური რეკურენტური ქსელების გამოყენება, რომელიც აღმოჩნდება ინფორმაციის სიტყვების კონდიდეტური დასრულებაში უფრო დიდი სამყარო და მხოლოდ სამყარო გადაწყვეტილების სამყარო შესწავლად, ჩვენ მივიღეთ 74,7%-ის სიმართლე. მაგრამ როცა ჩვენ ისტორიის პროგრამები (სიტყვები დასრულებაზე წინ) გადაწყვეტთ და მხოლოდ გავაგრძნოთ ორი დასრულებაზე უკეთესი, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია 72,5%-ს შემდეგ ჩვენ ამ 'მხოლოდ დასრულებული' პარამეტრების შესაბამის ანალიზაცია. ჩვენ ადამიანის წარმოდგენება 78%-იან და მოიძებნა რამდენიმე ტიპი კონტექსტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ამ დიდი წარმოდგენებას მიიღებენ, რომელიც სენტიმენტი, ნექცია და სხვა წარმოდგენება", 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε την εργασία κλεισίματος της ιστορίας (κ.α., 2016) και παρουσιάζουμε διάφορα ευρήματα. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα μοντέλο που χρησιμοποιεί ιεραρχικά επαναλαμβανόμενα δίκτυα με προσοχή για να κωδικοποιήσει τις προτάσεις στην ιστορία και να σκοράρει υποψήφιες λήψεις. Απορρίπτοντας το μεγάλο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο και μόνο εκπαίδευση στο σύνολο επικύρωσης, επιτυγχάνουμε μια ακρίβεια 74.7%. Ακόμα και όταν απορρίπτουμε τα πλοκάμια της ιστορίας (προτάσεις πριν από το τέλος) και προπονούμαστε μόνο για να επιλέξουμε το καλύτερο από δύο καταλήξεις, μπορούμε ακόμα να φτάσουμε στο 72.5%. Στη συνέχεια αναλύουμε αυτή τη ρύθμιση εργασίας "μόνο για το τέλος". Εκτιμούμε την ανθρώπινη ακρίβεια 78% και βρίσκουμε διάφορους τύπους ενδείξεων που οδηγούν σε αυτή την υψηλή ακρίβεια, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εκείνων που σχετίζονται με το συναίσθημα, την άρνηση και τη γενική πιθανότητα λήξης ανεξάρτητα από το πλαίσιο της ιστορίας.', 'hu': 'Figyelembe vesszük a ROC történet zárási feladatát (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016), és számos eredményt mutatunk be. Kifejlesztünk egy olyan modellt, amely hierarchikus visszatérő hálózatokat használ, figyelemmel arra, hogy kódolja a mondatokat a történetben és pontozza a jelölt végződéseket. A nagyméretű edzéskészlet eltávolításával és csak az érvényesítéskészleten végzett edzéssel 74,7%-os pontosságot érünk el. Még ha eldobjuk a történetcselekményeket (a befejezés előtti mondatokat), és csak arra edzünk, hogy kiválasszuk a jobb két befejezés közül, akkor is elérhetjük a 72,5%-ot. Ezután elemezzük ezt a "csak véget érő" feladatbeállítást. Az emberi pontosságot 78%-ra becsüljük, és számos olyan nyomot találunk, amelyek ehhez a nagy pontossághoz vezetnek, beleértve az érzelmekhez, a tagadáshoz és az általános befejezési valószínűséghez kapcsolódókat, függetlenül a történet kontextusától.', 'it': 'Consideriamo il compito di cloze della storia ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) e presentiamo diversi risultati. Sviluppiamo un modello che utilizza reti ricorrenti gerarchiche con attenzione per codificare le frasi nella storia e segnare finali candidati. Eliminando il grande set di allenamento e solo l\'allenamento sul set di convalida, otteniamo una precisione del 74,7%. Anche quando scartamo le trame della storia (frasi prima della fine) e ci alleniamo solo per scegliere il meglio di due finali, possiamo comunque raggiungere il 72,5%. Analizziamo quindi questa impostazione di attività "solo fine". Stimiamo che l\'accuratezza umana sia del 78% e troviamo diversi tipi di indizi che portano a questa precisione elevata, inclusi quelli relativi al sentimento, alla negazione e alla probabilità generale di fine indipendentemente dal contesto della storia.', 'kk': "Біз ROC оқиғаның тапсырмасын (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) сақтап, бірнеше тапсырмаларды таңдаймыз. Біз оқиғадағы сөйлемелерді кодтамыз және кандидаттарды аяқтау үшін иерархикалық қайталанатын желілерді қолданатын үлгі құрамыз. Үлкен оқыту бағдарламасын және тек тек тексеру бағдарламасында оқыту үшін 74,7% дұрыс жеткіземіз. Біз оқиғаларды (сөйлемелерді аяқтау алдында) алып тастағанда да, тек екі аяқтау үшін біз 72,5%-ға жеткізе аламыз. Содан кейін бұл 'аяқтау ғана' тапсырманың параметрлерін анализирақ. Біз адамдардың дұрыстығын 78% деп бағалап, бірнеше түрлі тапсырмалар табылады. Бұл дұрыстығы жоғары, сезімдер, негативтер және жалпы маңыздылығын бірнеше түрлі тапсырмалар табылады.", 'ms': "Kami mempertimbangkan tugas penutup cerita ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) dan memperkenalkan beberapa penemuan. Kami mengembangkan model yang menggunakan rangkaian berulang hierarkis dengan perhatian untuk mengekod kalimat dalam cerita dan skor akhir calon. Dengan membuang set latihan besar dan hanya latihan pada set pengesahihan, kita mencapai ketepatan 74.7%. Walaupun kita membuang plot cerita (kalimat sebelum akhir) dan hanya berlatih untuk memilih yang lebih baik dari dua akhir, kita masih boleh mencapai 72.5%. Kemudian kita analisis tetapan tugas 'akhir-only' ini. Kami menghargai ketepatan manusia menjadi 78% dan mencari beberapa jenis petunjuk yang membawa kepada ketepatan tinggi ini, termasuk yang berkaitan dengan perasaan, negatif, dan kemungkinan akhir umum tidak kira-kira konteks cerita.", 'mt': "Aħna nqisu l-kompitu ta’ għeluq tal-istorja tar-ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) u nippreżentaw diversi sejbiet. Aħna niżviluppaw mudell li juża netwerks ġerarkiċi rikorrenti bl-attenzjoni biex nikkodifikaw is-sentenzi fl-istorja u nikpunteġu t-tmiem tal-kandidati. Billi tneħħi s-sett kbir ta’ taħriġ u taħriġ biss dwar is-sett ta’ validazzjoni, inkisbu preċiżjoni ta’ 74,7 %. Anki meta nużaw il-plots tal-istorja (sentenzi qabel it-tmiem) u nħarrġu biss biex nagħżlu l-aħjar minn żewġ tmiem, xorta nistgħu nilħqu 72.5%. We then analyze this 'ending-only' task setting.  Aħna nistmaw li l-preċiżjoni tal-bniedem hija ta' 78% u nsibu diversi tipi ta' indikazzjonijiet li jwasslu għal din il-preċiżjoni għolja, inklużi dawk relatati mas-sentiment, in-negazzjoni, u l-probabbiltà ġenerali ta' tmiem irrispettivament mill-kuntest tal-istorja.", 'ml': "ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റോസിയുടെ കഥ ക്ലോസ് ജോലി (മോസ്റ്റാഫാസാദെഹ് എറ്റ് അല്,2016) നോക്കുകയും കുറച്ചു കണ്ടെത്തുകയും ചെയ് ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാനും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന അവസാനം സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന വലിയ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിച്ച് മാത്രമേ പരിശീലിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ, നമ്മള്\u200d 74.7 ശതമാനത്തിന്റെ പരി നമ്മള്\u200d കഥ പ്ലോട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോഴും അവസാനിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോഴും രണ്ട് അവസാനം മികച പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d 'അവസാനം' മാത്രം ജോലി സജ്ജീകരണത്തെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെ കൃത്യം 78% എന്ന് കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. കഥ സംസ്ഥാനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിചാരിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു.", 'mn': 'Бид ROC түүхийг хадгалах үйл ажиллагааг (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) ойлгож, олон зүйлийг олгодог. Бид түүхэнд өгүүлбэрүүдийг кодлох, нэр дэвшигчдийн төгсгөлд анхаарлын төвлөрөмж ашигладаг загварыг бүтээж байна. Томоохон сургалтын багш болон зөвхөн шийдвэрлэлтийн багш сургалтыг устгаснаар бид 74.7%-ын тодорхойлолт гарч ирнэ. Хэдийгээр бид түүхийн төлөвлөгөөг (өгүүлбэр төгсгөлийн өмнө) алга болгож, хоёр төгсгөлийн сайн талаар сонгохын тулд бид 72.5%-д хүрч чадна. Дараа нь бид үүнийг "төгсгөл-төгсгөл"-ээр шинжилгээ хийсэн. Бид хүн төрөлхтний тодорхойлолтыг 78% гэж тодорхойлж, түүх нөхцөл байдлаас хамаагүй энэ өндөр тодорхойлолт рүү нөлөөлж буй олон төрлийн тодорхойлолтуудыг олж, мэдрэмж, эсрэг болон ерөнхий төгсгөл мага', 'no': 'Vi ser oppgåva for å klozera ROC-historien (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) og presentera fleire oppgåver. Vi utviklar eit modell som brukar hierarkisk gjentakelsesnitt med oppmerksomhet til å koda setningane i historien og scorera kandidateiningar. Ved å avslutta det store opplæringassettet og berre opplæringa på valeringssettet, oppnår vi ein nøyaktig 74,7 %. Selv når vi avsluttar historieplane (setningar før slutten) og berre treng for å velja bedre av to sluttene, kan vi framleis nå 72,5%. Vi analyserer så denne oppgåveinnstillinga «end-only». Vi vurder at menneskelige nøyaktighet er 78 % og finn fleire typar kluser som fører til denne høy nøyaktighet, inkludert dei som er relaterte til sentiment, negasjon og generelle sluttsannsynligheten uavhengig av historiekonteksten.', 'mk': 'Ние ја сметаме задачата за затворање на приказната на РОК (Мостафазаде и други, 2016) и претставуваме неколку откритија. Развиваме модел кој користи хиерархични рецидентни мрежи со внимание за кодирање на речениците во приказната и резултати на кандидатските краеви. Со отфрлање на големиот набор обуки и само обука на наборот за валидација, постигнуваме точност од 74,7 отсто. Дури и кога ќе ги отфрлиме приказните (реченици пред крајот) и само ќе тренираме за да избереме подобри од двата крај, сé уште можеме да достигнеме 72,5 отсто. Потоа ќе го анализираме поставувањето на задачата „само за крај“. Оценуваме човечка точност на 78 отсто и најдовме неколку видови на траги кои водат до оваа висока точност, вклучувајќи ги и оние поврзани со чувствата, негативноста и генералната веројатност на крај без оглед на контекстот на приказната.', 'lt': 'Apsvarstome ROC istorijos užduotį (Mostafazadeh ir kt., 2016 m.) ir pateikiame keletą išvadų. Kuriame model į, kuris naudoja hierarchinius nuolatinius tinklus, atkreipiant dėmesį į tai, kad koduojame istorijoje esančius sakinius ir vertiname kandidatų pabaigą. Atmesti didelį mokymo rinkinį ir tik mokymą tvirtinimo rinkinyje pasiektume 74,7 proc. tikslumą. Net jei išmetame istorijos sklypus (sakinius iki pabaigos) ir tik treniruojame pasirinkti geriausius iš dviejų galų, mes vis dar galime pasiekti 72,5 proc. Tada analizuojame šį užduočių nustatymą tik pabaigoje. Apskaičiuojame, kad žmogaus tikslumas yra 78 proc. ir suradome kelių tipų įrodymus, kurie sukelia tokį aukštą tikslumą, įskaitant tuos, kurie susiję su jausmu, neigiamu poveikiu ir bendrąja galutine tikimybe, neatsižvelgiant į istorijos aplinkybes.', 'pl': 'Rozważamy zadanie ROC story cloze (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) i przedstawiamy kilka ustaleń. Opracowujemy model, który wykorzystuje hierarchiczne sieci powtarzające się z uwzględnieniem kodowania zdań w opowieści i punktowania zakończeń kandydatów. Odrzucając duży zestaw treningowy i tylko szkolenie na zestawie walidacji, osiągamy dokładność 74,7%. Nawet jeśli odrzucamy fabuły opowieści (zdania przed zakończeniem) i trenujemy tylko wybór lepszego z dwóch zakończeń, nadal możemy osiągnąć 72,5%. Następnie analizujemy to ustawienie zadań "tylko kończących". Szacujemy ludzką dokładność na 78% i znajdujemy kilka rodzajów wskazówek, które prowadzą do tej wysokiej dokładności, w tym te związane z sentymentami, negacją i ogólnym prawdopodobieństwem zakończenia niezależnie od kontekstu historii.', 'ro': 'Considerăm sarcina de închidere a poveștii ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) și prezentăm mai multe constatări. Dezvoltăm un model care utilizează rețele recurente ierarhice cu atenție pentru a codifica propozițiile din poveste și a puncta finalurile candidate. Prin eliminarea setului mare de antrenament și numai antrenamentul pe setul de validare, obținem o precizie de 74,7%. Chiar și atunci când renunțăm la intrigile povestirii (propoziții înainte de sfârșit) și ne antrenăm doar să alegem cel mai bun dintre cele două finaluri, putem ajunge în continuare la 72,5%. Apoi analizăm această setare de sarcină "numai finalizată". Estimăm acuratețea umană la 78% și găsim mai multe tipuri de indicii care duc la această acuratețe ridicată, inclusiv cele legate de sentiment, negație și probabilitatea finală generală indiferent de contextul povestirii.', 'si': "අපි ROC කතාව ක්\u200dලෝස් වැඩක් බලන්න හිතන්නේ (Mostafazedeh et al., 2016) සහ හොයාගන්න වෙනස් දේවල් තියෙන්නේ. අපි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා අවධානය සඳහා අවධානයක් තියෙනවා කතාවයේ වචන විශාල ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය විතරයි, අපිට 74.7% විතරයි. අපි කතාව අවසානය කරලා තියාගත්තොත් (කතාව අවසානය කලින් ඉවරයි) සහ අවසානය දෙකක් හොඳයි තෝරගන්න පුළුවන්, අපිට තවමත ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේක 'අවසාන විතරයි' විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. අපි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ හරියට 78% විතරයි අනුමාන කරනවා සහ කතාව සම්බන්ධ විතරයෙන් මේ අධික හරියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් හොයාගන්නවා.", 'so': 'Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa shaqada qoyska ee ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) waxaana soo bandhigaynaa qaar hela. Tusaale ah oo isticmaalaya shabakado dib u soo celinta ee hierarchical si aan u qorno erayada taariikhda oo aan u qorno dhammaadka mushaarka. Sida aan u tagno kooxda waxbarashada waaweyn iyo waxbarashada oo kaliya ee la xiriira kooxda aqoonta, waxaynu gaadhnaa saxda 74,7 boqolkiiba. Xataa marka aan qorshaha sheekooyinka (dhamaadka ka hor) iyo tareenada oo kaliya si aan u dooranno labada dhamaadka ugu wanaagsan, waxaan weli gaadhi karnaa 72.5 boqolkiiba. Markaas waxan waxaynu baaraynaa dhamaadka shaqada oo kaliya. Waxaan qiimaynaynaa saxda dadku inay tahay 78% waxaana helaynaa noocyo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan saxdan sare, kuwaas oo la xiriira fikrada, diidmada iyo dhammaadka ugu dambeeya haba kastoo ay ahaato xaaladaha sheekada.', 'sv': 'Vi överväger ROC story cloze uppgiften (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) och presenterar flera resultat. Vi utvecklar en modell som använder sig av hierarkiska återkommande nätverk med fokus på att koda meningarna i berättelsen och poängtera kandidatslut. Genom att kassera den stora träningsuppsättningen och endast träna på valideringsuppsättningen uppnår vi en noggrannhet på 74,7%. Även om vi kasserar berättelsen (meningar före slutet) och bara tränar för att välja det bättre av två slut, kan vi fortfarande nå 72,5%. Vi analyserar sedan den här uppgiftsinställningen för endast slut. Vi uppskattar mänsklig noggrannhet till 78% och hittar flera typer av ledtrådar som leder till denna höga noggrannhet, inklusive de relaterade till sentiment, negation och allmän slutsannolikhet oavsett berättelsens kontext.', 'ta': "நாங்கள் ROC கதை தடை செய்யும் பணி நாம் ஒரு மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம். இது கதையில் உள்ள வாக்குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டு மற்றும் முடிவை மதிப்பிடுகிறது. பெரிய பயிற்சி அமைப்பை விட்டு மற்றும் சரிபார்க்கும் அமைப்பில் மட்டும் பயிற்சியை வெளியேற்றி விட்டது, நாம நாம் கதை திட்டங்களை விட்டுவிடும் போதும் முடிவிற்கு முன்னாலும் இரண்டு முடிவிற்கு சிறந்ததை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க பயிற்சி மட பிறகு இந்த 'முடிவு' பணி அமைப்பை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். நாம் மனித சரியான மதிப்பு 78% என்று கணக்கிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த அதிக சரியான குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பல வகையான குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க", 'ur': 'ہم ROC کہانیاں کو مشکل بناتے ہیں (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) اور بہت سی معلومات پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک موڈل ایجاد کر رہے ہیں جو کہانیاں میں کلمات کا کوڈ کرنا اور کاندینڈ کے انتظام کا اندازہ کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ اس کے ذریعہ حیراتیکل دوبارہ نیٹ ورک استعمال کرتا ہے. بڑی تعلیم مجموعہ کو چھوڑ دینے کے ذریعہ اور صرف واضح تعلیم مجموعہ پر آموزش کرنا کے ذریعہ، ہم 74.7% کی دقیق حاصل کرتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ ہم داستان کی مکالمات کو ٹال دیتے ہیں اور صرف دو قسموں کے بہترین انتخاب کرنے کے لئے تربیت دیتے ہیں، ہم ابھی 72.5% تک پہنچ سکتے ہیں۔ پھر ہم نے اس "پانے کے سوا" کام کے مقرر کو تحقیق کیا۔ ہم انسان کی دقیقیت 78% کی قدر رکھتے ہیں اور بہت سی قسم کی نشانیاں پاتے ہیں جن میں یہ بالا دقیقیق ہے، ان میں سے جو احساسات، ناپسند اور عمومی احساسات کے باعث ہوتے ہیں۔', 'sr': 'Smatramo zadatak za kloziranje priče o ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) i predstavljamo nekoliko nalaza. Razvijamo model koji koristi hijerarhičke rekonstrukcije mreže sa pažnjom da kodiramo rečenice u priči i rezultiramo kraj kandidata. Odbacivanjem velikog seta obuke i samo obuku na setu validacije, postižemo tačnost od 74,7%. Čak i kad izbacimo planove priče (rečenice pre kraja) i samo treniramo da izaberemo bolji od dva kraja, još uvek možemo da stignemo do 72,5%. Onda analiziramo ovaj "samo kraj". Procjenjujemo ljudsku tačnost da bude 78% i nađemo nekoliko vrsta tragova koji dovode do ovog visoke tačnosti, uključujući one povezane sa osjećanjem, negacijom i općem verovatnošću završetka bez obzira na kontekst priče.', 'uz': "Biz ROC tarixini o'ylaymiz (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) va bir necha narsalarni hozir qilamiz. Biz tashqi soʻzlarni kodlash va vazifalar tugmasini qidirish uchun yetarmoqchimiz. Bu katta taʼminlovchi soʻzni tasdiqlash va faqat haqiqiqiy soʻzni tasdiqlash bilan biz 74.7%'ga yetishmiz. Agar biz hikoyalarni o'tkazib tashlasak va faqat ikkita oxiriga yaxshi o'rganish uchun o'rganamiz, biz ammo 72.5%. We then analyze this 'ending-only' task setting.  Biz odamning haqida 78 foizga ega bo'lishini qiymatmiz va bu bir necha xil yo'nalarni topamiz. Bu hisob, nega va o'zgarishga murakkab bo'lgan hissiyotlar bilan bog'liqdir.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét nhiệm vụ xử lý lịch trình ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2006) và đưa ra nhiều kết quả. Chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình sử dụng các mạng leo thang cùng với sự chú ý để mã hóa các câu câu truyện và ghi điểm kết thúc cho ứng cử viên. Bằng cách loại bỏ tập đoàn lớn và chỉ dựa vào bộ sửa chữa, chúng ta đạt được độ chính xác 74.7 Name Ngay cả khi chúng ta bỏ qua các âm bản câu chuyện (câu cuối) và chỉ tập luyện để chọn tốt hơn hai kết thúc, chúng ta vẫn có thể đến được 72.5 Name Sau đó phân tích bộ phận "cuối chỉ" này. Chúng tôi ước đoán độ chính xác con người sẽ là 7871 và tìm ra nhiều loại đầu mối dẫn đến độ chính xác cao này, bao gồm cả những gì liên quan đến tình cảm, âm bản và khả năng kết thúc chung dù bất kể hoàn cảnh lịch sử.', 'hr': 'Smatramo zadatak kloziranja priče o ROC-u (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) i predstavljamo nekoliko nalaza. Razvijamo model koji koristi hijerarhičke rekonstruirane mreže s pažnjom da kodiraju rečenice u priči i rezultiraju kraja kandidata. Odbacivajući veliku obuku i samo obuku na utvrđivanju, postigli smo preciznost 74,7%. Čak i kad izbacimo planove priče (rečenice prije kraja) i samo treniramo da izaberemo bolji od dva kraja, još uvijek možemo stići do 72,5%. Onda analiziramo ovaj "samo kraj" zadatak. Procjenjujemo ljudsku preciznost 78% i pronalazimo nekoliko vrsta tragova koji dovode do ovog visokog preciznosti, uključujući one povezane s osjećanjem, negacijom i općem vjerojatnošću završetka bez obzira na kontekst priče.', 'bg': 'Разглеждаме задачата за затваряне на историята на РОК (Мостафасадех и др., 2016) и представяме няколко открития. Разработваме модел, който използва йерархични повтарящи се мрежи с внимание за кодиране на изреченията в историята и оценка на крайните точки на кандидатите. Чрез отхвърляне на големия набор от тренировки и само обучение на комплекта за валидиране, постигаме точност от 74,7%. Дори когато отхвърлим сюжетите (изреченията преди края) и тренираме само да изберем по-добрия от двата края, все пак можем да достигнем 72,5%. След това анализираме тази настройка за задачи "само край". Ние оценяваме човешката точност на 78% и намираме няколко вида улики, които водят до тази висока точност, включително тези, свързани със сантименталност, отрицание и обща вероятност за край, независимо от контекста на историята.', 'nl': "We beschouwen de ROC story cloze taak (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) en presenteren verschillende bevindingen. We ontwikkelen een model dat gebruikmaakt van hiërarchische terugkerende netwerken met aandacht om de zinnen in het verhaal te coderen en kandidaat-einden te scoren. Door de grote trainingsset te verwerpen en alleen te trainen op de validatieset, bereiken we een nauwkeurigheid van 74,7%. Zelfs als we de verhaallijnen (zinnen voor het einde) weggooien en alleen trainen om het beste uit twee einden te kiezen, kunnen we nog steeds 72,5%. Vervolgens analyseren we deze 'end-only' taakinstelling. We schatten menselijke nauwkeurigheid op 78% en vinden verschillende soorten aanwijzingen die leiden tot deze hoge nauwkeurigheid, waaronder die gerelateerd zijn aan sentiment, ontkenning en algemene eindwaarschijnlijkheid, ongeacht de verhaallintext.", 'da': 'Vi overvejer ROC historie cloze opgaven (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) og præsenterer flere resultater. Vi udvikler en model, der bruger hierarkiske tilbagevendende netværk med opmærksomhed til at kode sætningerne i historien og score kandidatslutninger. Ved at kassere det store træningssæt og kun træning på valideringssættet opnår vi en nøjagtighed på 74,7%. Selv når vi kasserer historieplotterne (sætninger før slutningen) og kun træner til at vælge den bedre af to slutninger, kan vi stadig nå 72,5%. Vi analyserer derefter denne opgaveindstilling med kun slutning. Vi vurderer menneskelig nøjagtighed til 78% og finder flere typer spor, der fører til denne høje nøjagtighed, herunder dem relateret til sentiment, negation og generel slutsandsynlighed uanset historiens kontekst.', 'de': 'Wir betrachten die ROC Story Cloze Aufgabe (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) und stellen einige Ergebnisse vor. Wir entwickeln ein Modell, das hierarchisch wiederkehrende Netzwerke nutzt, um die Sätze in der Geschichte zu kodieren und Kandidatenenden zu bewerten. Durch das Wegwerfen des großen Trainingssets und nur Training auf dem Validierungsset erreichen wir eine Genauigkeit von 74,7%. Selbst wenn wir die Story Plots (Sätze vor dem Ende) verwerfen und nur trainieren, das bessere von zwei Enden auszuwählen, können wir trotzdem 72,5%. Wir analysieren dann diese "nur endende" Aufgabenstellung. Wir schätzen die menschliche Genauigkeit auf 78% und finden mehrere Arten von Hinweisen, die zu dieser hohen Genauigkeit führen, einschließlich derjenigen, die sich auf Sentiment, Negation und allgemeine Endwahrscheinlichkeit beziehen, unabhängig vom Story-Kontext.', 'fa': 'ما داستان ROC را مشاهده می\u200cکنیم و چند نتیجه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما یک مدل توسعه می\u200cکنیم که از شبکه\u200cهای تکرار تکرار الکتریکی استفاده می\u200cکند و توجه می\u200cکند تا جمله\u200cها را در داستان رمزبندی کند و پایان کاندیداتی را امتیاز کند. با رها کردن مجموعه آموزش بزرگ و تنها آموزش روی مجموعه تصدیق کردن، ما به دقیق 74.7 درصد رسیدیم. حتی وقتی داستان\u200cها را از بین می\u200cبریم (جمله\u200cها قبل از پایان) و تنها آموزش می\u200cدهیم که بهترین دو پایان را انتخاب کنیم، هنوز می\u200cتوانیم به 72.5 درصد برسیم. سپس این تنظیمات کاری «فقط پایان» را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. ما دقیقات انسان را به 78 درصد تقریبا می\u200cکنیم و چند نوع از نقطه\u200cها را پیدا می\u200cکنیم که به این دقیقات بالا رخ می\u200cدهند، شامل کسانی که مربوط به احساسات، منفی و احساسات عمومی به خاطر محیط داستان می\u200cشوند.', 'ko': "우리는 ROC 이야기 완형 빈칸 채우기 임무(Mostafazadeh 등, 2016년)를 고려하고 몇 가지 발견을 제시했다.우리는 차원 순환 네트워크를 이용하여 이야기 속의 문장을 인코딩하고 후보의 결말을 평가하는 모델을 개발했다.대형 훈련집을 버리고 검증집만 훈련함으로써 74.7%의 정확도를 얻었다.설령 우리가 이야기 줄거리(결말 전의 문장)를 포기하고 두 개의 결말 중에서 더 좋은 것을 선택하도록 훈련한다고 해도 우리는 여전히 72.5%에 달할 수 있다.그리고 우리는 이런'끝만'임무 설정을 분석했다.우리는 인류의 정확도를 78% 로 추정하고, 정서, 부정, 일반적인 결말 가능성과 관련된 몇 가지 높은 정확도를 초래한 단서를 찾았다. 이야기의 배경이 어떻든지 간에.", 'sw': 'Tunafahamu kazi ya kufungia habari za ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) na kuweka matokeo kadhaa. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo unaotumia mitandao ya kiraia yanayoendelea kwa makini kwa ajili ya kutangaza hukumu katika hadithi na kuinua mwisho wa wagombea. Kwa kuachana na kituo kikubwa cha mafunzo na mafunzo pekee kwenye seti ya uhakika, tunapata uhakika wa asilimia 74.7. Hata pale tunapotoa mipango ya hadithi (hukumu kabla ya mwisho) na treni pekee ya kuchagua matokeo mazuri ya mwisho miwili, bado tunaweza kufikia asilimia 72.5. Kisha tunachambua hali hii ya "kumaliza kazi pekee". We estimate human accuracy to be 78% and find several types of clues that lead to this high accuracy, including those related to sentiment, negation, and general ending likelihood regardless of the story context.', 'sq': "Ne konsiderojmë punën e mbylljes së historisë ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) dhe paraqesim disa gjetje. Ne zhvillojmë një model që përdor rrjete hierarkike të përsëritura me vëmendje për të koduar fjalët në histori dhe për të shënuar përfundimet e kandidatëve. Duke hequr kompletin e madh të stërvitjes dhe vetëm stërvitjen në kompletin e vlerësimit, ne arrijmë një saktësi prej 74.7%. Edhe kur ne heqim plotat e historisë (fjalët para fundit) dhe vetëm stërvitemi për të zgjedhur më të mirën e dy fundit, ne ende mund të arrijmë 72.5%. Pastaj analizojmë këtë rregullim të detyrës 'vetëm përfundimtare'. Ne vlerësojmë saktësinë njerëzore në 78% dhe gjejmë disa lloje udhëzimesh që çojnë në këtë saktësi të lartë, duke përfshirë ato që lidhen me ndjenjat, negativitet dhe mundësitë e përgjithshme përfundimi pavarësisht nga konteksti i historisë.", 'tr': "Biz ROC hikayesini (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) klasifikasynda düşünýäris we birnäçe netijeleri görkeýäris. Biz hekaýada sözlerni kodlamak we kandidatyň soňunda bir nusga ulanan iýerarhiýa tekrarly şebekeleri ullanýarys. Uly okuw setirini taşlamak we diňe takyklama setirini taşlamak bilen, 74.7% dogrylygyny ýetip barýarys. Hikaya planlaryny taşlandykda hem (sözler soňunda öň) diňe iki soňunda gowy sözlerini saýlamak üçin otly ederis, biz henizem 72.5%-e ýetirip bileris. Sonra bu 'diňe-iňe-soňrak' zadyň düzümlerini çözeriz. Biz adamlaryň dogrylygyny 78 % diýip çaklaýarys we bu ýokary dogry ýagdaýa getirýän birnäçe näçe näçe nähili ipleri tapýarys, duýgular, boýunçylyk we umumy sözüň bardygyny düşünýäris.", 'af': "Ons beskou die ROC storie klose taak (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) en voorsien verskeie gevindings. Ons ontwikkel 'n model wat hierarkies herhaalde netwerke gebruik met aandag om die setnings in die storie te kodeer en te tel kandidate einde. Deur die groot oefening stel en slegs oefening op die geldigheidstel te verwerp, het ons 'n presisie van 74,7% bereik. Selfs wanneer ons die storie plotte verwerp (teikens voor die einde) en slegs trein om die beter van twee einde te kies, kan ons nog 72,5% bereik. Ons analyseer dan hierdie 'einde-slegs' taak instelling. Ons estimateer menslike presisie as 78% en vind verskeie tipe klusse wat lei na hierdie hoë presisie, insluitend die verwante met sentiment, negasie en algemene eindelikheid ongeag van die storieskonteks.", 'hy': 'Մենք կարծում ենք, որ ROC-ի պատմությունը ավարտում է աշխատանքը (Մոստաֆազադեհ և այլն., 2016) և ներկայացնում որոշ հայտնաբերություններ: Մենք ստեղծում ենք մի մոդել, որը օգտագործում է հիերարխիկ կրկնվող ցանցեր ուշադրություն դարձնելով պատմության նախադասությունները կոդավորելու և հաշվարկելու թեկնածու ավարտին: Արձակելով մեծ ուսուցման համակարգը և միայն ստուգելու համակարգը, մենք հասնում ենք 74.7 տոկոսի ճշգրտության: Նույնիսկ երբ մենք հեռացնում ենք պատմության գծագրերը (նախադասությունները մինչև ավարտը) և միայն փորձում ենք ընտրել երկու ավարտից լավագույնը, մենք դեռ կարող ենք հասնել 72.5 տոկոսին: Այնուհետև մենք վերլուծում ենք այս "միայն վերջնական" գործընթացը: Մենք գնահատում ենք մարդկային ճշգրտությունը 78 տոկոսով և գտնում ենք մի քանի տեսակի հնարավորություններ, որոնք հանգեցնում են այս բարձր ճշգրտությանը, ներառյալ նրանք, որոնք կապված են զգացմունքների, մերժման և ընդհանուր ավարտական հավանականության հետ անկախ պատմության կո', 'bn': 'আমরা রোসির গল্প বন্ধ করা কাজ (মোস্তাফাজাদেহ এবং আল, ২০১৬) বেশ কয়েকটি আবিষ্কার উপস্থাপন করি। We develop a model that uses hierarchical recurrent networks with attention to encode the sentences in the story and score candidate endings.  বিশাল প্রশিক্ষণের সেট ছেড়ে দিয়ে এবং শুধুমাত্র বৈধ সেটের প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে আমরা ৭৪. এমনকি যখন আমরা এই গল্প পরিকল্পনা ছেড়ে দেই (শেষ হওয়ার আগে) এবং শুধুমাত্র ট্রেন নির্বাচন করার জন্য, আমরা এখনো ৭২. তারপর আমরা শেষ-শুধুমাত্র কাজের বিশ্লেষণ করি। আমরা মানুষের সঠিকভাবে ৭৮% হিসেবে হিসেব করি এবং বেশ কিছু ধরনের ধারণা খুঁজে বের করি যা এই বিষয়টি উচ্চপরিস্থিতির কাছে যায়, যার মধ্যে যারা এই ঘটনার', 'am': 'የROC ታሪክ ክፍል አድራጊ (ሞስታፋzadeh et al., 2016) እናቆጥረዋለን፡፡ በታሪክ እና የአካባቢው ፍጻሜውን ለመቀበል እና የተቃውሞውን ቃላትን ለማድረግ የሚጠቅመውን የመረጃ መረብ የሚጠይቅ ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ታላቂቱን ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ እና ማስተማርን ብቻ ሲሆን 74.7 በመቶ አግኝተናል፡፡ Even when we discard the story plots (sentences before the ending) and only train to choose the better of two endings, we can still reach 72.5%.  ይህንን "መጨረሻ ብቻ" ስራ ማተሚያ እናስተምር:: የሰው እርግጠኛ 78 በመቶ እንዲሆን እና ከታሪክ ግንኙነት ምንም እንኳ ቢሆንም፣ የስሜት፣ ሽፋን እና የፍጻሜውን የፍላጎት ምናልባት እንደሆነ ከዚህ ከፍ ያለ እርግጠት የሚመራ ብዙ ዓይነቶችን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Smatramo zadatak kloziranja priče o ROC-u (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) i predstavljamo nekoliko nalaza. Razvijamo model koji koristi hijerarhijske rekonstrukcije mreže sa pažnjom da kodiramo rečenice u priči i rezultiramo kraj kandidata. Odbacujući veliku obuku i samo obuku na setu validacije, postigli smo preciznost od 74,7%. Čak i kad izbacimo planove priče (rečenice prije kraja) i samo treniramo da izaberemo bolji od dva kraja, još uvijek možemo postići 72,5%. Onda analiziramo ovaj "samo kraj". Procjenjujemo ljudsku preciznost 78% i pronalazimo nekoliko vrsta tragova koji dovode do ovog visoke preciznosti, uključujući one povezane sa osjećanjem, negacijom i općem verovatnošću kraja bez obzira na kontekst priče.', 'cs': 'Zvažujeme ROC story cloze úlohu (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) a prezentujeme několik zjištění. Vyvíjíme model, který využívá hierarchické recidivující sítě s pozorností kódovat věty v příběhu a skórovat kandidátské konce. Odhozením velké tréninkové sady a pouze tréninkem na validační sadě dosáhneme přesnosti 74,7%. I když zahodíme příběhy (věty před koncem) a trénujeme pouze na to, abychom si vybrali lepší ze dvou konců, stále můžeme dosáhnout 72,5%. Následně analyzujeme toto nastavení úkolů pouze pro konec. Odhadujeme lidskou přesnost na 78% a najdeme několik typů vodítek, které vedou k této vysoké přesnosti, včetně těch, které se týkají sentimentu, negace a obecné pravděpodobnosti konce bez ohledu na kontext příběhu.', 'az': 'Biz ROC hikayesini (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) seçdik və bir neçə məlumat göstərdik. Biz hekayədəki sözləri kodlamaq və kandidat sonlarını göstərmək üçün hiyerarşik yenidən fəaliyyət a ğlarını istifadə edən bir modeli təhsil edirik. Büyük təhsil quruluğunu və yalnız təhsil quruluğunda təhsil etmək üçün 74.7%-in doğruluğuna nail olduq. Biz hekayənin hiyləsini tərk etdiyimiz və ancaq iki sonun daha yaxşısını seçmək üçün təhsil edirdiyimiz zaman 72,5%-ə yetişə bilərik. Sonra bu "sonlandırma" işi analiz edirik. Biz insan doğruluğu 78 % kimi təmin edirik və bu yüksək doğruluğuna yol verən bir neçə növ iplər tapırıq, həmçinin hisslər, negasyonlar və məlumatlar haqqında heç bir şey olmasa da bütün məlumatlar arasında.', 'fi': 'Tarkastelemme ROC:n tarinan cloze -tehtävää (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) ja esittelemme useita löydöksiä. Kehitämme mallin, joka käyttää hierarkkisia toistuvia verkostoja kiinnittäen huomiota tarinan lauseiden koodaamiseen ja ehdokkaiden päätteiden pisteyttämiseen. Hävittämällä suuren harjoitussarjan ja vain validointisarjan harjoittelun saavutamme 74,7%:n tarkkuuden. Vaikka hylkäämme tarinajuonet (lauseet ennen loppua) ja harjoittelemme valitsemaan vain paremman kahdesta lopusta, voimme silti saavuttaa 72,5%. Tämän jälkeen analysoimme tätä "vain loppua" -tehtäväasetusta. Arvioimme ihmisten tarkkuuden olevan 78% ja löydämme useita johtolankoja, jotka johtavat tähän korkeaan tarkkuuteen, mukaan lukien tunteeseen, kieltämiseen ja yleiseen lopputodennäköisyyteen liittyvät johtolangat tarinan kontekstista riippumatta.', 'id': "We consider the ROC story cloze task (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) and present several findings.  Kami mengembangkan model yang menggunakan jaringan jerarkis berkurang dengan perhatian untuk mengkode kalimat dalam cerita dan mencetak akhir kandidat. By discarding the large training set and only training on the validation set, we achieve an accuracy of 74.7%.  Even when we discard the story plots (sentences before the ending) and only train to choose the better of two endings, we can still reach 72.5%.  Kami kemudian menganalisis seting tugas 'akhir-only'. We estimate human accuracy to be 78% and find several types of clues that lead to this high accuracy, including those related to sentiment, negation, and general ending likelihood regardless of the story context.", 'ca': 'Considerem la tasca d\'enclosura de la història ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) i presentem diverses descobriments. Desenvolvem un model que utilitza xarxes jeràrquiques recurrents amb atenció per codificar les frases de la història i puntuar els finals dels candidats. By discarding the large training set and only training on the validation set, we achieve an accuracy of 74.7%.  Fins i tot quan descartam les trames de la història (frases abans del final) i només entrenem per escollir el millor de dos finals, encara podem arribar al 72,5%. Després analitzem aquest entorn de tasques "fins a acabar". Estem que la precisió humana és del 78% i trobem diversos tipus de pistes que porten a aquesta alta precisió, incloent aquells relacionats amb el sentiment, la negatió i la probabilitat d\'acabar en general sense importar el context de la història.', 'et': 'Me kaalume ROC loo cloze ülesannet (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) ja esitame mitmeid tulemusi. Töötame välja mudeli, mis kasutab hierarhilisi korduvaid võrgustikke, pöörates tähelepanu lausete kodeerimisele loos ja kandidaadi lõppude skoorimisele. Suure treeningkomplekti ja ainult valideerimiskomplekti treeningute kõrvaldamisega saavutame 74,7% täpsuse. Isegi kui looplaanid (laused enne lõppu) kõrvale jätame ja ainult treenime, et valida parem kahest lõpust, võime siiski jõuda 72,5%ni. Seejärel analüüsime seda "ainult lõpp" ülesannete seadistust. Hindame, et inimese täpsus on 78% ja leiame mitut tüüpi vihjeid, mis viivad selle kõrge täpsuseni, sealhulgas need, mis on seotud sentimentaalsuse, eitamise ja üldise lõpptõenäosusega sõltumata loo kontekstist.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé isih pancene nggawe barang-barang nggawe barang-barang (Mustapasadeh et al, 2013) lan nganggo barang sampek. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing paling pengguna sistem akeh perusahaan seneng pisan banghun kanggo kode nggawe barang nggawe dolanan karo dolanan liyane Ngawe ngilangno wektu nggo kalah-kalah dumadhi lan nganggo layang-layang kanggo ngilangno yen ditambah, awak dhéwé wis kumpa gerakan kanggo 75.7%. Saiki awak dhéwé ngeweh nduwé kesalahan dolanan (suwek awak dhéwé) lan nganggo dolanan sing luwih apik dhéwé, kéné isih iso sampek 75.5%. text-editor-action Awak dhéwé ngerasai pangan sing beraksi 75% lan ngelawak dhéwé ngerasai perkaranan sing gak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan sing nggawe gerakan, gambar obah-obahan ngono nggawe gerakan sampek, terus-tekan lan soko sakjane kuwi nggawe barang-sistem sing gak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Obravnavamo nalogo ROC story cloze (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) in predstavljamo več ugotovitev. Razvijamo model, ki uporablja hierarhična ponavljajoča se mreža s pozornostjo za kodiranje stavkov v zgodbi in ocenjevanje koncev kandidatov. Z zavržitvijo velikega nabora vadb in samo usposabljanjem na naboru validacije dosežemo natančnost 74,7%. Tudi če zavržemo zgodbene ploske (stavke pred koncem) in samo treniramo, da izberemo boljšega od dveh koncev, lahko še vedno dosežemo 72,5%. Nato analiziramo to nastavitev opravil "samo na koncu". Ocenjujemo, da je človeška natančnost 78% in najdemo več vrst namigov, ki vodijo do te visoke natančnosti, vključno s tistimi, povezanimi s čustvi, zanikanjem in splošno verjetnostjo konca, ne glede na kontekst zgodbe.', 'ha': "We consider the ROC story cloze task (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) and present several findings.  Tuna buɗe wani motsi wanda ke amfani da zanen tarakin da aka karo shi na hiterarchical da za'a kiyaye maganar a cikin kwanan kwanan da ke ƙara ƙarshen Candidan. Ga ka sami tsarin mafarin babba da shirin da kawai ke tsari kan daidaita inganci, za'a sami rasmi na 74.7%. Haƙĩƙa idan ba mu goge bakin lãbãrin (da za'a gabatar ta) kuma mu ƙari kawai dõmin mu zãɓi mafi kyaun ƙarshen biyu, sai za mu isa ga asilimin 7.5. Sa'an nan kuma munã rarraba wannan tsarin 'ya'yan aikin bayani kawai. Ana ƙaddara tsarin mutum ya zama 78% kuma munã sãmu wasu nau'i na dabam-dabam, waɗanda ke ƙara zuwa wannan tabbatacce, kamar waɗannan da ke yi danganta da hisãbi, haske da kuma tsakanin gabani, ko kuma duk yana da ikon bayani ko da mazaunin lãbãrin.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ROC་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔོན་ལྟར་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཚད་རྩིས་མེད་པར་ཐག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་མ་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་74.7% གི་བདེན་ཐག་ ང་ཚོས་མི་ཚེའི་མཇུག་གི་ཚིག་འཆར་བཤེར་སྐབས་ཀྱང་། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་འགུལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདིའི་ཆ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མིའི་ངོ་བོར་གང་ཡིན་ཟེར་ན། མིའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་78% རེད་བྱས་ནས་ངོ་བོར་བཞིན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མཐོང་ཚད་འདི་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡད་ཡོད།', 'he': 'אנו שוקלים את משימה סיפור סיפור ROC (Mostafazadeh et al., 2016) ולהציג מספר מציאות. We develop a model that uses hierarchical recurrent networks with attention to encode the sentences in the story and score candidate endings.  על ידי השליטה של קבוצת האימונים הגדולה ורק האימונים על קבוצת האימונים, אנחנו משיגים מדויקה של 74.7%. אפילו כשאנו זורקים את התכניות של הסיפור (משפטים לפני הסוף) ורק מתאמנים לבחור את הטוב ביותר משני הסוף, אנחנו עדיין יכולים להגיע ל-72.5%. ואז אנו מנתחים את הסדרת המשימה הזאת "רק בסוף". אנו מעריכים מדויקת אנושית להיות 78 אחוזים ומצאים כמה סוגים של רמזים שמובילים לדיוקת גבוהה זו, כולל אלה שקשורים לרגשות, שליטה, וסיכוי לסיום כללי ללא קשר לסיפור.'}
{'en': 'Representing Sentences as Low-Rank Subspaces', 'ar': 'تمثيل الجمل على أنها مسافات فرعية منخفضة الرتبة', 'es': 'Representación de oraciones como subespacios de rango bajo', 'fr': 'Représenter des phrases comme des sous-espaces de bas rang', 'pt': 'Representando sentenças como subespaços de baixo nível', 'ja': '文を低ランクのサブスペースとして表す', 'zh': '以句为空间', 'ru': 'Представление предложений как подпространств низкого ранга', 'hi': 'निम्न-रैंक सबस्पेस के रूप में वाक्यों का प्रतिनिधित्व करना', 'ga': 'Pianbhreitheanna a Léiriú mar Fhospásanna ar Leibhéal Íseal', 'el': 'Αντιπροσωπεύοντας τις προτάσεις ως δευτερεύουσες θέσεις', 'ka': 'შეტყობინებები როგორც ნაკლები', 'hu': 'Az ítéletek ábrázolása alacsony rangú alterületekként', 'kk': 'Сөздерді төмендегі төмендегі орындар ретінде келтіру', 'ms': 'mewakili perkataan sebagai Subspace-Rang Rendah', 'lt': 'Nurodomi sakiniai kaip žemos apimties pakopai', 'mk': 'Презентирање на речениците како ниски подпростори', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ റാങ്ക് സബ്സ്പെയിസ്കുകളായി ശിക്ഷകള്\u200d പ്രതികരിക്കുന്നു', 'no': '@ info: whatsthis', 'it': 'Rappresentare le frasi come sottospazio di basso rango', 'mn': 'Хоёр хэмжээсүүдийг бага хэмжээсүүд гэж үзүүлэх', 'mt': 'Rappreżentar tas-Sentenzi bħala Sottospazji ta’ Grad Baxx', 'pl': 'Reprezentowanie zdań jako podprzestrzeni niskiej rangi', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea sentințelor ca subspații de rang scăzut', 'si': 'වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න', 'so': 'Ka celinta daryeelka', 'sv': 'Representera meningar som underområden med låg rang', 'ta': 'குறைந்த துணை இடைவெளிகளாக அனுப்பப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'کم رنک زیر جگہ', 'sr': 'Predstavljajući kazne kao podprostore niskog položaja', 'uz': 'Sensorlarni kichik chegara boʻsh joy sifatida tiklash', 'vi': 'Đại diện cho các câu chuyện', 'bg': 'Представяне на изреченията като подпространства с нисък ранг', 'de': 'Sätze als untergeordnete Unterräume darstellen', 'id': 'Mempersembahkan hukuman sebagai Subspace Tinggi', 'hr': 'Predstavljajući kazne kao podprostore niskog razreda', 'da': 'Repræsentere sætninger som underrum med lav rang', 'nl': 'Zinnen vertegenwoordigen als subruimten van lage rang', 'sw': 'Akijibu Vitendo kama Viwango vya chini', 'fa': 'نمایش کلمات به عنوان جایگاهی پایین نقطه', 'sq': 'Përfaqësues i dënimeve si hapësira të nivelit të ulët', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'af': 'Voorstelling Uitdrukkings as Laag Rank Subspasies', 'ko': '문장을 저질자 공간으로 표시하다', 'hy': 'Ներկայացնել նախադասությունները որպես ցածր շարժումներ', 'bn': 'শাস্তি নিম্ন- র\u200d্যাঙ্ক সাবপেস হিসেবে পুনরায় প্রতিক্রিয়া করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Predstavljajući kazne kao podprostore niskog položaja', 'tr': 'Sözleri Az Taryh Gaýd Et', 'et': 'Launete esitamine madala astme alamruumidena', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden esittäminen matalan tason aliväliöinä', 'az': 'Sözümləri aşağı dərəcə altı yeri olaraq temsillənir', 'ca': 'Representar les frases com substàcies de baix rangs', 'cs': 'Zastupování vět jako nízkých podprostorů', 'he': 'Representing Sentences as Low-Rank Subspaces', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'jv': 'Validity', 'bo': 'ཚིག་རྟགས་ལྡོག་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་ཉུང་བའི་བར་སྟོང་བ', 'sk': 'Predstavljanje stavkov kot nizkih podprostorov'}
{'en': 'Sentences are important semantic units of natural language. A generic, distributional representation of sentences that can capture the latent semantics is beneficial to multiple downstream applications. We observe a simple geometry of sentences   the word representations of a given sentence (on average 10.23 words in all SemEval datasets with a standard deviation 4.84) roughly lie in a low-rank subspace (roughly, rank 4). Motivated by this observation, we represent a sentence by the low-rank subspace spanned by its word vectors. Such an unsupervised representation is empirically validated via semantic textual similarity tasks on 19 different datasets, where it outperforms the sophisticated neural network models, including skip-thought vectors, by 15 % on average.', 'ar': 'الجمل هي وحدات دلالية مهمة للغة الطبيعية. يعتبر التمثيل التوزيعي العام للجمل التي يمكنها التقاط الدلالات الكامنة مفيدًا للعديد من التطبيقات النهائية. نلاحظ هندسة بسيطة للجمل - تمثيل الكلمات لجملة معينة (في المتوسط 10.23 كلمة في جميع مجموعات بيانات SemEval بانحراف معياري 4.84) تقع تقريبًا في فضاء فرعي منخفض الرتبة (تقريبًا ، المرتبة 4). بدافع من هذه الملاحظة ، نحن نمثل جملة بواسطة فضاء فرعي منخفض الرتبة يمتد بواسطة متجهات الكلمة. يتم التحقق من صحة مثل هذا التمثيل غير الخاضع للإشراف تجريبيًا عبر مهام التشابه النصي الدلالية في 19 مجموعة بيانات مختلفة ، حيث يتفوق على نماذج الشبكة العصبية المعقدة ، بما في ذلك متجهات التفكير التخطي ، بنسبة 15٪ في المتوسط.', 'fr': "Les phrases sont des unités sémantiques importantes du langage naturel. Une représentation distributionnelle générique de phrases capable de capturer la sémantique latente est bénéfique pour de multiples applications en aval. Nous observons une géométrie simple des phrases\xa0: les représentations de mots d'une phrase donnée (en moyenne 10,23 mots dans tous les ensembles de données SemEval avec un écart type de 4,84) se situent approximativement dans un sous-espace de bas rang (approximativement, rang 4). Motivés par cette observation, nous représentons une phrase par le sous-espace de bas rang couvert par ses vecteurs de mots. Une telle représentation non supervisée est validée empiriquement via des tâches de similarité textuelle sémantique sur 19 ensembles de données différents, où elle surpasse de 15\xa0% en moyenne les modèles de réseaux neuronaux sophistiqués, y compris les vecteurs de saut de pensée.", 'es': 'Las oraciones son unidades semánticas importantes del lenguaje natural. Una representación genérica y distributiva de oraciones que pueda capturar la semántica latente es beneficiosa para múltiples aplicaciones posteriores. Observamos una geometría simple de oraciones: las representaciones de palabras de una oración dada (en promedio 10.23 palabras en todos los conjuntos de datos de SemEval con una desviación estándar de 4.84) se encuentran aproximadamente en un subespacio de rango bajo (aproximadamente, rango 4). Motivados por esta observación, representamos una oración por el subespacio de rango bajo abarcado por sus vectores de palabras. Una representación no supervisada de este tipo se valida empíricamente mediante tareas de similitud textual semántica en 19 conjuntos de datos diferentes, donde supera en promedio un 15% a los sofisticados modelos de redes neuronales, incluidos los vectores de pensamiento saltado.', 'pt': 'As sentenças são unidades semânticas importantes da linguagem natural. Uma representação genérica e distributiva de sentenças que pode capturar a semântica latente é benéfica para vários aplicativos downstream. Observamos uma geometria simples de frases - as representações de palavras de uma determinada frase (em média 10,23 palavras em todos os conjuntos de dados SemEval com um desvio padrão de 4,84) estão aproximadamente em um subespaço de baixa classificação (aproximadamente, classificação 4). Motivados por essa observação, representamos uma sentença pelo subespaço de baixo nível gerado por seus vetores de palavras. Essa representação não supervisionada é validada empiricamente por meio de tarefas de semelhança textual semântica em 19 conjuntos de dados diferentes, onde supera os modelos sofisticados de rede neural, incluindo vetores de pensamento ignorado, em 15% em média.', 'ja': '文は自然言語の重要な意味単位である。潜在的な意味論を取り込むことができる文の一般的な分布表現は、複数のダウンストリームアプリケーションにとって有益である。私たちは、文の単純な幾何学的構造を観察します。与えられた文の単語表現（標準偏差が4.84のすべてのSemEvalデータセットで平均10.23単語）は、おおよそ低いランクのサブスペース（おおよそ、ランク4 ）にあります。この観察に動機づけられて、私たちはそのワードベクトルによってスパンされた低ランクのサブ空間によって文章を表現します。そのような監視されていない表現は、19の異なるデータセット上のセマンティックテキスト類似性タスクを介して経験的に検証され、スキップ思考ベクトルを含む洗練されたニューラルネットワークモデルを平均15 ％上回る。', 'hi': 'वाक्य प्राकृतिक भाषा की महत्वपूर्ण शब्दार्थ इकाइयां हैं। वाक्यों का एक सामान्य, वितरणात्मक प्रतिनिधित्व जो अव्यक्त शब्दार्थ को कैप्चर कर सकता है, कई डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों के लिए फायदेमंद है। हम वाक्यों की एक सरल ज्यामिति का निरीक्षण करते हैं - किसी दिए गए वाक्य के शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व (मानक विचलन 4.84 के साथ सभी SemEval डेटासेट में औसतन 10.23 शब्द) मोटे तौर पर एक निम्न-रैंक सबस्पेस (मोटे तौर पर, रैंक 4) में झूठ बोलते हैं। इस अवलोकन से प्रेरित होकर, हम निम्न-रैंक वाले सबस्पेस द्वारा एक वाक्य का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं जो इसके शब्द वैक्टर द्वारा फैलाया जाता है। इस तरह के एक असुरक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व को 19 अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता कार्यों के माध्यम से अनुभवजन्य रूप से मान्य किया जाता है, जहां यह परिष्कृत तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल को मात देता है, जिसमें स्किप-थॉट वैक्टर भी शामिल हैं, औसतन 15% तक।', 'zh': '句者,自然语言之要语义单元。 可得潜语义之句通用布施应用程序有益于下流。 观一简句几何形 - 给定句之单词(于所有标准差为4.84SemEval数聚均为10.23单词)大抵居下排名空间(略为排名4)。 受此观察,以其词向量越秩子空间示一句。 此无监者19异数而验之语义文本相似性事,其表均于杂神经网络(及其跳思向量)出15%。', 'ru': 'Предложения являются важными семантическими единицами естественного языка. Общее, распределенное представление предложений, которое может охватить скрытую семантику, выгодно для нескольких последующих приложений. Мы наблюдаем простую геометрию предложений – словопредставления данного предложения (в среднем 10,23 слова во всех наборах данных SemEval со стандартным отклонением 4,84) грубо лежат в подпространстве низкого ранга (грубо, ранг 4). Исходя из этого наблюдения, мы представляем предложение подпространством низших рангов, охватываемое его словесными векторами. Такое неконтролируемое представление эмпирически подтверждается с помощью семантических задач текстового сходства на 19 различных наборах данных, где оно превосходит сложные модели нейронной сети, включая векторы пропусков, в среднем на 15%.', 'ga': 'Is aonaid shéimeantacha thábhachtacha den teanga nádúrtha iad abairtí. Tá léiriú cineálach, dáileacháin ar phianbhreitheanna ar féidir leo an tséimeantaic fholaigh a ghabháil tairbheach d’ilfheidhmchláir iartheachtacha. Breathnaímid ar chéimseata shimplí abairtí – tá na huiríll focal d’abairt ar leith (10.23 focal ar an meán i ngach tacair sonraí SemEval le diall caighdeánach 4.84) go garbh i bhfospás íseal-ranga (thart ar rang 4). Spreagtha ag an bhreathnóireacht seo, léirímid abairt ag an bhfospás íseal-ranga a chuimsíonn a veicteoirí focal. Déantar léiriú neamh-mhaoirsithe den sórt sin a bhailíochtú go heimpíreach trí thascanna cosúlachta téacs shéimeantacha ar 19 tacar sonraí éagsúla, áit a sáraíonn sé na samhlacha néarlíonra sofaisticiúla, lena n-áirítear veicteoirí scipeála, 15% ar an meán.', 'ka': 'სიტყვები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სიმენტიკური ერთეულებია. სხვადასხვა, დისტრიბუციალური გამოსახულება, რომელიც შეუძლებელია წარმოდგენების სიმენტიკის შესახებ გამოსახულებელია რამდენიმე ქვემოდგენების გამოსახულებელ ჩვენ დავხედავთ სიტყვების განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრებები - სიტყვების განსაკუთრებები (სიტყვებით 10.23 სიტყვებში ყველა SemEval მონაცემების განსაკუთრებით 4.84) სამუშაოდ დამატებით სამუშაო სამუშაო სი ამ მონაცემებით მოტოვირებულია, ჩვენ გამოსახულებთ სიტყვის გვექტორებით ჩვენი წერტილის ჩემს ქვემონაცემებით. ასეთი განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მონაცემები 19 განსხვავებული მონაცემების მიხედვით იმპერიკურად განსხვავებული ტექსტუალური მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომელიც იმპერიკურად უფრო მეტად მონაცემები ნეიროლური ქს', 'el': 'Οι προτάσεις είναι σημαντικές σημασιολογικές μονάδες της φυσικής γλώσσας. Μια γενική, διανεμητική αναπαράσταση των προτάσεων που μπορούν να συλλάβουν την λανθάνουσα σημασιολογία είναι επωφελής για πολλές μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές. Παρατηρούμε μια απλή γεωμετρία προτάσεων όπου οι λέξεις αναπαραστάσεις μιας δεδομένης πρότασης (κατά μέσο όρο 10.23 λέξεις σε όλα τα σύνολα δεδομένων του με τυπική απόκλιση 4.84) βρίσκονται περίπου σε ένα υποδιάστημα χαμηλής κατάταξης (περίπου, κατάταξη 4). Κινούμενοι από αυτή την παρατήρηση, αντιπροσωπεύουμε μια πρόταση από το κατώτερο υποδιαστημικό διάστημα που εκτείνεται από τους διανύσματα λέξεων του. Μια τέτοια μη επιτηρημένη αναπαράσταση επικυρώνεται εμπειρικά μέσω εργασιών σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας κειμένων σε 19 διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων, όπου ξεπερνά τα εξελιγμένα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των διανυσμάτων παραλείψεως σκέψης, κατά μέσο όρο κατά 15% .', 'hu': 'A mondatok a természetes nyelv fontos szemantikai egységei. A látens szemantikát rögzítő mondatok általános, disztribúciós ábrázolása több downstream alkalmazás számára előnyös. A mondatok egyszerű geometriáját figyeljük meg - egy adott mondat szóreprezentációja (átlagosan 10,23 szó minden SemEval adatkészletben 4,84 szórással) nagyjából egy alacsony rangú szubtérben fekszik (nagyjából 4-es rangú). Ezzel a megfigyeléssel motiválva egy mondatot képviselünk az alacsony rangú szubtérből, amelyet a szóvektorok határoznak meg. Egy ilyen felügyelet nélküli reprezentáció empirikusan validálódik 19 különböző adatkészleten lévő szemantikai szöveghasonlósági feladatok segítségével, ahol átlagosan 15%-kal felülmúlja a kifinomult neurális hálózati modelleket, beleértve a kihagyott gondolati vektorokat is.', 'kk': 'Сөздер - табиғи тілдің семантикалық бірлігі. Жалпы, үлестірілген сөйлемелердің түрі, келестірілген семантикалық түрінде бірнеше бағытталған қолданбаларға пайдалы болады. Біз сөздердің кәдімгі геометриясын қараймыз - келтірілген сөздердің түсініктемесін (барлық semiEval деректер қорларының орташа 10, 23 сөздері 4, 84 стандартты ауытқуы болып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып тұрып т Бұл бақылау бойынша жылжытылады, біз сөздің векторлары бойынша қосылған жоғары ішкі жерлерінің сөздерінің сөздерінің сөздерін көрсетедік. Бұл дұрыс емес мәлімет 19 түрлі деректер жиындарындағы семантикалық мәтіндік ұқсас тапсырмалар арқылы импирикалық түрде тексеріледі. Бұл жұмыс желік үлгілерінен жұмыс істеу үлгілерінен орташа 15% болады.', 'it': 'Le frasi sono importanti unità semantiche del linguaggio naturale. Una rappresentazione generica e distributiva di frasi in grado di catturare la semantica latente è vantaggiosa per più applicazioni a valle. Osserviamo una semplice geometria di frasi - le rappresentazioni di parole di una data frase (in media 10,23 parole in tutti i set di dati SemEval con una deviazione standard 4,84) si trovano approssimativamente in un sottospazio di basso rango (approssimativamente, rango 4). Motivati da questa osservazione, rappresentiamo una frase dal sottospazio di basso rango attraversato dai suoi vettori di parola. Tale rappresentazione non supervisionata è validata empiricamente tramite attività di somiglianza testuale semantica su 19 set di dati diversi, dove supera in media del 15% i sofisticati modelli di rete neurale, compresi i vettori saltati.', 'lt': 'Sentencijos yra svarbūs semantiniai natūralios kalbos vienetai. Bendras, platinamas sakinių, galinčių užfiksuoti latentinę semantiką, atstovavimas yra naudingas kelioms tolesnėms taikomosioms priemonėms. Mes stebime paprastą sakinių geometriją - žodžių parodymai tam tikrame sakinyje (vidutiniškai 10,23 žodžio visose SemEval duomenų rinkinyse su standartiniu nukrypimu 4,84) apytiksliai yra žemo rango (apytiksliai 4 rango) papuošalyje. Motyvuota šia pastaba, mes atstovaujame mažo rango papuošalo sakiniu, kurį apima jo žodžių vektoriai. Toks nepastebimas atstovavimas empiriniu būdu patvirtinamas atliekant semantines tekstinio panašumo užduotis 19 skirtingų duomenų rinkinių, kuriuose jis vidutiniškai 15 proc. viršija sudėtingus nervinių tinklų modelius, įskaitant nepagalvotus vektorius.', 'mk': 'Речениците се важни семантични единици на природниот јазик. A generic, distributional representation of sentences that can capture the latent semantics is beneficial to multiple downstream applications.  Набљудуваме едноставна геометрија на речениците - зборовите претставувања на одредена реченица (во просек 10,23 зборови во сите податоци на SemEval со стандардно одбивање 4,84) се наоѓаат во ниско-ранг подпростор (околу, ранг 4). Мотивирано од оваа набљудување, ние претставуваме реченица од ниско-ранг подпростор проширен од нејзините зборни вектори. Таквата ненадгледувана претстава е емпирички валидирана преку семантични текстуални задачи на сличност на 19 различни податоци, каде што ги надминува софистицираните модели на нервната мрежа, вклучувајќи ги и векторите на размислување, за просечно 15 отсто.', 'ms': 'Hukuman adalah unit semantik penting bahasa alami. Perwakilan generik, distribusi kalimat yang boleh menangkap semantik tersembunyi berguna untuk aplikasi turun berbilang. Kita memperhatikan geometri ringkas kalimat - perwakilan perkataan bagi kalimat tertentu (rata-rata 10.23 perkataan dalam semua set data SemEval dengan deviasi piawai 4.84) sekitar terletak dalam subspace rangka rendah (sekitar, rangka 4). Motivated by this observation, we represent a sentence by the low-rank subspace spanned by its word vectors. Perwakilan tidak diawasi seperti ini secara empirik dipastikan melalui tugas samaran tekstual semantik pada 19 set data berbeza, di mana ia melebihi model rangkaian saraf yang canggih, termasuk vektor-pemikiran terlepas, dengan rata-rata 15%.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക് യൂണിറ്റുകളാണ്. അടുത്ത സെമാന്റിക്സ് പിടിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ സാധാരണ, വിതരണ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഒരു ലളിതമായ ജോമിത്രി - കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d (സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളിലും സെമ്മെവാലിന്റെയും സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള ഈ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കിനെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്  Such an unsupervised representation is empirically validated via semantic textual similarity tasks on 19 different datasets, where it outperforms the sophisticated neural network models, including skip-thought vectors, by 15% on average.', 'mt': 'Is-sentenzi huma unitajiet semantiċi importanti tal-lingwa naturali. Rappreżentazzjoni ġenerika u distributtiva tas-sentenzi li tista’ taqbad is-semantika moħbija hija ta’ benefiċċju għal diversi applikazzjonijiet downstream. Aħna nżommu ġeometrija sempliċi tas-sentenzi - ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kelma ta’ sentenza partikolari (medja ta’ 10.23 kelma fis-settijiet tad-dejta kollha ta’ SemEval b’devjazzjoni standard 4.84) jinsabu bejn wieħed u ieħor f’sottospazju ta’ grad baxx (madwar, grad 4). Motivat minn din l-osservazzjoni, a ħna nirrappreżentaw sentenza mis-sottospazju ta’ grad baxx mifrux mill-vetturi tal-kelma tiegħu. Such an unsupervised representation is empirically validated via semantic textual similarity tasks on 19 different datasets, where it outperforms the sophisticated neural network models, including skip-thought vectors, by 15% on average.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгүүд бол байгалийн хэл болон семантик нэгж чухал. Сүүлийн семантикийг барьж чадах өгүүлбэрүүдийн ерөнхий, хуваарилсан үзүүлэлт нь олон доорх хэрэглэмжүүдэд ашигтай. Бид өгүүлбэрийн энгийн геометрийг харж байгаа юм: өгүүлбэрийн илэрхийлэл (дундаж 10.23 үг бүх SemEval өгөгдлийн санд стандарт 4.84 өөрчлөлт) ойролцоогоор бага хэмжээний субзайтай байдаг. Энэ ажиглалтаар хөдөлгөөнтэй, бид хэлбэрээр бага хэмжээний доорх зайнаас илэрхийлж байна. Ийм төлөвлөгөөгүй үзүүлэлт нь 19 өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн тусламжтайгаар semantic textual similarity даалгаврыг ашиглаж, харин энэ нь дундаж 15%-аар илүү нарийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загваруудыг ашигладаг.', 'no': 'Uttrykk er viktige semantiske einingar av naturspråk. Ein generiske, distribusjonell representasjon av setningar som kan henta latente semantikk er nyttig for fleire nedstrekingsprogrammer. Vi observerer ein enkel geometri av setningar – ordrepresentasjonen av eit gitt setning (gjennomsnittlig 10,23 ord i alle semiEval- datasett med ein standard avvik 4,84) ligg rundt i ein lavrank underplass (rundt, rank 4). Vi representerer eit setning av den lågare underplassen som er avslutta av ordvektorane. Denne representasjonen er empirisk validert gjennom semantiske tekstulikhetsoppgåver på 19 forskjellige datasett, der det utfører dei sofistikerte neuralnettverksmodelane, inkludert skippevektorar, med 15 % gjennomsnittlig.', 'pl': 'Zdania są ważnymi semantycznymi jednostkami języka naturalnego. Ogólna, dystrybucyjna reprezentacja zdań, które mogą uchwycić utajoną semantykę, jest korzystna dla wielu dalszych aplikacji. Obserwujemy prostą geometrię zdań, w której reprezentacje słów danego zdania (średnio 10.23 słowa we wszystkich zbiorach danych SemEval o odchyleniu standardowym 4.84) znajdują się w podprzestrzeni niskiej rangi (w przybliżeniu rang 4). Motywowani tą obserwacją reprezentujemy zdanie przez podprzestrzeń niskiej rangi rozciągnięte przez wektory słów. Taka reprezentacja bez nadzoru jest empirycznie weryfikowana za pomocą semantycznych zadań podobieństwa tekstowego na 19-ciu różnych zbiorach danych, gdzie średnio o 15% przewyższa zaawansowane modele sieci neuronowych, w tym wektory pomijania myśli.', 'ro': 'Sentințele sunt unități semantice importante ale limbajului natural. O reprezentare generică, distribuțională a propozițiilor care pot capta semantica latentă este benefică pentru mai multe aplicații din aval. Observăm o geometrie simplă a propozițiilor - reprezentările cuvintelor unei anumite propoziții (în medie 10,23 cuvinte în toate seturile de date SemEval cu o abatere standard 4,84) se află aproximativ într-un subspațiu de rang scăzut (aproximativ, rangul 4). Motivați de această observație, reprezentăm o propoziție de subspațiul de rang jos cuprins de vectorii săi de cuvânt. O astfel de reprezentare nesupravegheată este validată empiric prin sarcini de similitudine textuală semantică pe 19 seturi de date diferite, unde depășește modelele sofisticate de rețea neurală, inclusiv vectorii sări de gândire, cu 15% în medie.', 'sr': 'Kazne su važne semantičke jedinice prirodnog jezika. Obična, distribucija predstavljanja rečenica koja može uhvatiti latentnu semantiku je korisna za višestruke prijave. Pratimo jednostavnu geometriju rečenica - reč predstavljanja određene rečenice (prosjeèno 10,23 reči u svim podacima semiEval sa standardnom odstupanjem 4,84) uglavnom leži u podprostoru niskog reda (oko 4. reda). Motivirani ovim posmatranjem, predstavljamo rečenicu niskog reda podprostora koja se širi njegovim vektorima reči. Takva nepotrebna predstavljanja je empirički potvrđena putem zadataka semantičke tekstualne sličnosti na 19 različitih kompleta podataka, gde iznosi sofisticirane modele neuralne mreže, uključujući vektore preskočivanja, na prosjeku za 15%.', 'so': 'Daryeelku waa noocyo muhiim ah oo afka dabiicadda ah. Sharciyeedka qeybinta oo aasaasiga ah oo qabsan kara semantika ugu dambeeya waxaa faa’iido ah in la helo codsiga badnaanta hoose. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa joomeetiyo fudud oo kaliyadu ku qoran yahay hadalka lagu qoray (ugu badnaan 10.23 erayo ku qoran dhammaan sawirada SemEval oo ku qoran qalloocsiga standardka ah 4.84) oo ku yaala hoos darajada hoose (qiyaastii darajada 4). Dhaqdhaqaaqsan aragtidan, waxaynu ka mid nahay qeyb hoos-hoose oo ay ku qoran yihiin wadoojiyayaasha ereyga. Qoraalkaas oo kale oo aan la ilaalinayn waxaa lagu xaqiijiyey shaqooyin u eg qoraalka semantic oo kala duduwan oo ku qoran 19 macluumaad oo kala duduwan, kaas oo lagu sameeyaa modelalka shabakadda neurada ah, kuwaas oo ku jira wadooyin qurxiga ah 15% oo ka mid ah wado.', 'si': 'වාක්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවේ සැමැන්තික යුනිටික් වගේ. සාමාන්\u200dය, විකාශික ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් විතරයි, ඒකෙන් ලේටින් සෙමාන්ටික් අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් වචන අපි සාමාන්\u200dය භූමිතිකාරයක් බලන්නේ - දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ වචනය (සාමාන්\u200dය 10.23 වචනයක් සියළු සේම්වල් සේතුවක් සාමාන්\u200dය විකල්පයක් 4.84 වලින් ප්\u200dරතිච මේ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන වෙක්ටර් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. මෙච්චර ප්\u200dරතිනිස්ථාපනයක් වෙනස් දත්ත සටහන 19 වල සිමාන්තික වගේ ප්\u200dරතිනිස්ථාපනයක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Meningar är viktiga semantiska enheter av naturligt språk. En generisk, distribuerad representation av meningar som kan fånga latent semantik är fördelaktig för flera nedströms applikationer. Vi observerar en enkel geometri av meningar - ordrepresentationer av en given mening (i genomsnitt 10,23 ord i alla SemEval datauppsättningar med en standardavvikelse 4,84) ligger ungefär i ett lågt underutrymme (ungefär rang 4). Motiverat av denna observation representerar vi en mening av det låga underrymden som spänns över dess ordvektorer. En sådan oövervakad representation valideras empiriskt via semantiska textliknande uppgifter på 19 olika datauppsättningar, där den överträffar de sofistikerade neurala nätverksmodellerna, inklusive hoppande vektorer, med i genomsnitt 15%.', 'ta': 'வாக்குறுக்கள் இயல்பான மொழியின் முக்கியமான அலகுகள். பொதுவான, பங்கீட்டு வாக்குகளின் பங்கீட்டு பகிர்ந்தளிப்பு, சமீபத்திய பெம்மான்டிக்களை பிடிக்க முடியும் பொத வாக்கியங்களின் சுலபமான ஜியோமிதியை நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் - கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் பிரதிநிதிகள் (சராசரி 10. 23 வார்த்தைகளில் எல இந்த பார்வையால் இயக்கப்பட்டது, நாம் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தை குறைந்த குறைந்த குறைந்த இடைவெளியில் ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத பிரதிநிர்வாகம் 19 வித்தியாசமான தரவுத்தளங்களில் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத செயல்பாடுகள் மூலம் செலுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது சராசரியாக 15% ஆல் செயல்படுத்த', 'ur': 'فیصلے طبیعی زبان کی سیمنٹی یونیٹ ہیں۔ ایک معمولی، تقسیم کرنے والی جماعت کی تصویر جو لٹینٹ سیمانٹیکس کو پکڑ سکتی ہے، بہت سی نیچے سیمانٹریم کاروباروں کے لئے فائدہ دیتا ہے. ہم کلمات کی ایک ساده جسمٹری دیکھتے ہیں - ایک مقررہ جماعت کی کلمات کی روشنی (متوسط 10.23 کلمات تمام سیم ویل ڈیٹسٹوں میں ایک استاندارڈ ڈیٹسٹ 4.84 کے ساتھ) تقریباً ایک کم درجہ کے زیر فضا میں (تقریباً درجہ 4) ہے۔ اس نظارت کے ذریعہ چلتے ہیں، ہم ایک جماعت کو دکھاتے ہیں اس کے کلمات ویکتروں کے ذریعہ سے پھیلایا گیا ہے. ایسی غیر قابل تعلیم 19 مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر سیمانٹی ٹکسٹیول کی مثال کے ذریعہ مطالب کی جاتی ہے جہاں یہ مصنوعی نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، یعنی اسکیپ-سوچ ویکتوروں کے ذریعہ، متوسط 15 فیصد سے۔', 'uz': "Sentences are important semantic units of natural language.  Name Biz bir so'zlarning oddiy geometriyni ko'rib turamiz - bir so'zning qismlarini (oddiy 10.23 so'zlarida SemEval maʼlumotlar tarkibida standard deviation 4.84 bilan bir darajada (oddiy darajada, 4 daraja). Bu taqdimot orqali ishga tushirilgan so'zlarning so'zlar vektorlari tomonidan qo'yilgan bir so'zni taqdim qilamiz. Bu tashkilotni saqlab boʻlmaydi, 19 boshqa maʼlumotlar tarmoqdagi semantik textb xil vazifalar orqali imkoniyatli toʻgʻri haqiqiqiy beradi. Bu yerda o'z sofistikal tarmoq modellarini o'zgartiradi, o'ylab keladigan vectorlar sofistika tarmoq modellarini 15% dan boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Câu án là những đơn vị quan trọng theo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Một mô tả rộng rãi và phân phát các câu có thể nắm bắt ngữ pháp tiềm ẩn có lợi cho nhiều ứng dụng xuôi dòng. Chúng tôi quan sát hình dạng đơn giản của các câu - các biểu hiện từ của một câu đã nói (trên trung bình 10.23 từ trong tất cả các tập tin của SemEvol với một độ lệch tiêu chuẩn 4.84) xấp xỉ nằm trong con gian dưới cấp thấp (xấp xỉ, cấp 4). Động cơ từ quan sát này, chúng tôi đại diện cho câu chữ không gian thứ thấp được mở rộng bởi các cỗ máy truyền dẫn. Một sự đại diện không giám sát được xác thực bằng các công việc giống nhau văn bản theo mẫu 19, nơi nó vượt qua các mô hình mạng thần kinh tinh vi, bao gồm véc- tơ bỏ-tưởng, theo trung bình 15.', 'nl': 'Zinnen zijn belangrijke semantische eenheden van de natuurlijke taal. Een generieke, distributionele representatie van zinnen die de latente semantiek kan vastleggen, is gunstig voor meerdere downstream toepassingen. We zien een eenvoudige geometrie van zinnen waarbij de woordrepresentaties van een bepaalde zin (gemiddeld 10.23 woorden in alle SemEval datasets met een standaardafwijking 4.84) grofweg in een laagrangige subruimte liggen (ruwweg rang 4). Gemotiveerd door deze observatie, vertegenwoordigen we een zin van de laagrangige subruimte overspannen door zijn woordvectoren. Een dergelijke niet-begeleide representatie wordt empirisch gevalideerd via semantische tekstuele overeenkomsten op 19-verschillende datasets, waar het gemiddeld 15% overtreft de geavanceerde neurale netwerkmodellen, inclusief skip-thought vectoren.', 'bg': 'Изреченията са важни семантични единици на естествения език. Общото, разпределително представяне на изречения, които могат да уловят латентната семантика, е полезно за множество приложения надолу по веригата. Наблюдаваме проста геометрия на изреченията - думичните представи на дадено изречение (средно 10,23 думи във всички набори от данни със стандартно отклонение 4,84) грубо лежат в ниско ранг подпространство (грубо ранг 4). Мотивирани от това наблюдение, ние представляваме изречение от нискоранговото подпространство, обхванато от неговите словни вектори. Такова неконтролирано представяне е емпирично валидирано чрез задачи за семантична текстова сходство на 19 различни набора от данни, където надминава сложните модели на невронни мрежи, включително вектори с прескачане на мисълта, средно с 15%.', 'hr': 'Odgovori su važne semantičke jedinice prirodnog jezika. Obična, distribucija reprezentacija rečenica koja može uhvatiti latentnu semantiku korisna je za višestruke prijave. Pratimo jednostavnu geometriju rečenica - riječ predstavljanja određene rečenice (prosječno 10,23 riječi u svim podacima semiEval s standardnom odstupanjem 4,84) otprilike leži u podprostoru niskog reda (oko 4. reda). Pokrenut ovim promatranjem, predstavljamo rečenicu niskog podprostora koje se širi njegovim vektorima riječi. Takva nepotrebna predstavljanja empirički je potvrđena putem zadataka semantičke tekstualne sličnosti na 19 različitih podataka, gdje se nadmaže sofisticiranim modelima neuralne mreže, uključujući vektore preskočivanja, za prosječan 15%.', 'da': 'Sætninger er vigtige semantiske enheder af naturligt sprog. En generisk, distributionsmæssig repræsentation af sætninger, der kan fange den latente semantik, er gavnlig for flere downstream applikationer. Vi observerer en simpel geometri af sætninger - ordet repræsentationer af en given sætning (i gennemsnit 10,23 ord i alle SemEval datasæt med en standardafvigelse 4,84) ligger groft i et lavt underrum (groft rang 4). Motiveret af denne observation repræsenterer vi en sætning af det lavrangerede underrum, der spændes af dens ordvektorer. En sådan ikke-overvåget repræsentation valideres empirisk via semantiske tekstlighedsopgaver på 19 forskellige datasæt, hvor den overgår de avancerede neurale netværksmodeller, herunder skip-thought vektorer, med 15% i gennemsnit.', 'de': 'Sätze sind wichtige semantische Einheiten der natürlichen Sprache. Eine generische, verteilte Darstellung von Sätzen, die die latente Semantik erfassen kann, ist für mehrere nachgeschaltete Anwendungen von Vorteil. Wir beobachten eine einfache Geometrie von Sätzen, wobei die Wortdarstellungen eines bestimmten Satzes (durchschnittlich 10.23 Wörter in allen SemEval Datensätzen mit einer Standardabweichung 4.84) grob in einem niederrangigen Subraum liegen (ungefähr Rang 4). Motiviert durch diese Beobachtung stellen wir einen Satz des niederrangigen Subraums dar, der von seinen Wortvektoren überspannt wird. Eine solche unüberwachte Darstellung wird empirisch durch semantische Textähnlichkeitsaufgaben auf 19-verschiedenen Datensätzen validiert, wobei sie die anspruchsvollen neuronalen Netzwerkmodelle, einschließlich Skip-Thought-Vektoren, durchschnittlich um 15% übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Makosa ni viungo muhimu vya sekanti vya lugha ya asili. Uwakilishaji wa hukumu za kawaida, usambazaji unaoweza kukamata semantiki za hivi karibuni ni faida ya kupata matumizi mengi yanayotumika chini ya mto. Tunaona geometiri rahisi ya hukumu - neno linalowakilisha hukumu hiyo (kwa wastani wa maneno 10.23 katika seti za data zote za SemEval yenye kiwango cha kawaida cha kupotolewa 4.84) kwa kiasi kikubwa (takribani, rangi 4). Motivated by this observation, we represent a sentence by the low-rank subspace spanned by its word vectors.  Uwakilishaji wa aina hiyo usio na uhakika umethibitishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kupitia kazi za simu za kimapenzi katika seti 19 tofauti za data, ambapo inaonyesha mifano ya mitandao ya kijamii, ikiwa ni pamoja na vectors za kufikiriwa, kwa wastani wa asilimia 15.', 'fa': 'جمله\u200cها واحد\u200cهای سیمانتی از زبان طبیعی مهم هستند. یک نمایش عمومی، تقسیم\u200cکننده از جمله\u200cها که می\u200cتوانند سیمانتیک latent را بگیرند، برای کاربردهای متعدد پایین\u200cترین سودمند است. ما یک ژومتری ساده از جمله را مشاهده می کنیم - کلمه نمایش یک جمله داده شده (در میانگین ۱۰.۲۳ کلمه در تمام مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سیمیولی با یک تغییر استاندارد ۴.۸۴) تقریباً در یک فضای زیر درجه پایین (تقریباً درجه ۴) است. توسط این نظارت حرکت می\u200cکنیم، ما یک جمله را توسط فضای زیر درجه پایین که توسط ویکتورهای کلمه\u200cاش تغییر داده می\u200cشود نمایش می\u200cدهیم. این نمایش ناپذیری از طریق کارهای شبیه\u200cسازی متن\u200cشناسی در ۱۹ مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cای متفاوت، در حالی که مدل شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cشناسی\u200cهای متفاوت، شامل ویکتور\u200cهای فکری\u200cگذاری\u200cگذاری، با ۱۵ درصد در متوسط، تحت تاثیر قرار دارد.', 'af': "Soektog is belangrik semantiese eenhede van natuurlike taal. 'n Algemeen, verspreidisionele verteenwoordigheid van setinge wat die latente semantieke kan opneem is nuttig vir veelvuldige onderstreem toepassings. Ons observeer 'n eenvoudige geometrie van setnings - die woord verteenwoordes van 'n gegewe setning (op gemiddelde 10.23 woorde in alle semiEval datastelle met 'n standaard afwysing 4.84) is rondom in 'n lae-rank subspace (omtrent, rank 4). Gebeweging deur hierdie opsomming, verteenwoordig ons 'n seting deur die lae-rank subspace wat deur sy woord vektore uitgebreek is. Soos 'n onverondersteunde voorstelling is empiriese gelykbaar deur semantiese tekstuele gelykbaarheid opdragte op 19 verskillende datastelle, waar dit uitvoer die sofistike neuralnetwerk modele, insluitend skip-gedink vektore, deur 15% op gemiddelde.", 'id': 'Sentences are important semantic units of natural language.  A generic, distributional representation of sentences that can capture the latent semantics is beneficial to multiple downstream applications.  We observe a simple geometry of sentences - the word representations of a given sentence (on average 10.23 words in all SemEval datasets with a standard deviation 4.84) roughly lie in a low-rank subspace (roughly, rank 4).  Motivated by this observation, we represent a sentence by the low-rank subspace spanned by its word vectors.  Perwakilan tidak diawasi seperti ini secara empiris dipvalidasi melalui tugas semantis persamaan tekstual pada 19 set data yang berbeda, di mana ia melebihi model jaringan saraf sofistikasi, termasuk vektor skip-thought, dengan rata-rata 15%.', 'ko': '문장은 자연 언어의 중요한 의미 단위다.잠재적 의미를 포착할 수 있는 문장의 통용 분포는 여러 하위 응용 프로그램에 유리하다는 것을 나타낸다.우리는 간단한 문장 기하학적 구조인 문장에 주어진 단어 표시(모든 기호 데이터에 평균 10.23개의 단어가 집중되고 표준차는 4.84)가 대체로 저질자 공간(대체로 질4)에 위치한 것을 관찰했다.이 관찰 결과의 계발을 받아 우리는 저질자 공간으로 문장을 표시하는데 이 저질자 공간은 그의 어향량으로 구성된다.19개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에서 이런 무감독은 의미-텍스트 유사성 임무를 통해 경험 검증을 실시했는데 복잡한 신경 네트워크 모델(도약 사고 벡터 포함)보다 평균 15% 높았다.', 'tr': 'Sözler tebigy diliň semantik birimi möhüm. Soňky semantika alyp biljek cümlelerin umumy, daýlamak şeklinde birnäçe aşak düşürmek üçin bir faydaly döreýär. Biz cümlelerin basit bir geometri gözlemiyoruz -bir sözlerin ifadelerini gösteriyoruz (ortalama 10.23 sözlerinde tüm SemEval veri toplamları standart değerlendirilip 4.84)- Bu gözlem tarafından hareket edildi, kelime vektörleri tarafından uzanan tüm sırayla ifade ediyoruz. Bu şekilde desteklenmeyen bir gösterim, semantik teknoloji benzeri görevleri tarafından 19 farklı veri setleri üzerinde empirik olarak değerlendirildir. Bu şekilde sofistikleştirilmiş nöral ağ modellerinden ve ortalamadan 15% tarafından atlatılmış vektörler arasında geçirildir.', 'az': 'Sözlər təbiətli dilin mövcuddur. Lakin semantik yakalaya biləcək cümlələrin generiki, dağıtıcı göstəricisi çoxlu aşağılıq uyğulamalara faydalandır. Biz cümlələrin basit geometrini görürük - verilən cümlənin təşkil edilməsi (ortalama 10.23 sözlərdə bütün semiEval verilənlərin təşkil edilməsi 4.84 ilə standart təşkil edilməsi ilə təşkil edilməsi) az səviyyədə a şağı səviyyədə (yaxın səviyyədə 4 səviyyədə). Bu gözləmə vasitəsilə hərəkət edirik, sözlərinin vektörləri ilə uzaqlaşdırılmış a şağı dərəcə altı alanın bir cümləsini göstəririk. Bu müəyyən edilməyən tərzim 19 bənzər verilən qurbanlar arasında semantik textual similarity işləri vasitəsilə təsdiqlənir. Bu çox sofistikli nöral ağ modellərini, həmçinin öyrənmək vektörlərini birlikdə 15%-dən artırar.', 'sq': 'Sentences are important semantic units of natural language.  Një përfaqësim gjenerik dhe shpërndarës i fjalëve që mund të kapin semantikën e fshehtë është i dobishëm për aplikimet e shumta poshtë. Ne vëzhgojmë një gjeometri të thjeshtë të fjalëve - fjalët përfaqësime të një fjale të caktuar (mesatarisht 10.23 fjalë në të gjitha datasets SemEval me një devijim standard 4.84) gjenden në një nënhapësirë të rendit të ulët (afërsisht, rendi 4). Motivuar nga ky vëzhgim, ne përfaqësojmë një fjalë nga nënhapësira e rendit të ulët e shtrirë nga vektorët e fjalës. Një përfaqësim i tillë i pa mbikqyrur është validuar empirikisht nëpërmjet detyrave semantike të ngjashmërisë tekstuale në 19 grupe të dhënash të ndryshme, ku ajo tejkalon modelet e sofistikuara të rrjetit nervor, duke përfshirë vektorët e menduar për mungesë, me 15% mesatarisht.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ የተለየ የsemantic units ናቸው፡፡ አዲስ የውይይት አካባቢ ፕሮግራሞች ለመበዛት የሚችል የውይይት አካባቢ፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የፍርድ ግንኙነትን ቀላል እናደርጋለን - የተሰጠውን የፍርድ ቃል መልዕክት (በaverage 10.23 ቃላት በሴmEval ዳታተሮች ሁሉ የአስተዳደር ጥመት 4.84) በተመሳሳይ ቁጥጥር (በቁጥጥር 4፣ ቁመት 4). ይህንን ማየት በተደረገ፣ የቃላት መቃኛዎች በኩል የተዘጋጀውን የዝቅተኛ ደረጃን እናቆማለን፡፡ እንደዚህ ያልጠበቀው መልዕክት በ19 ልዩ ዳታተሮች ላይ የsemantic textual ብጤት ስራዎችን በማድረግ ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'ca': 'Les sentences són importants unitats semàntiques de llenguatge natural. Una representació genèrica i distribucional de frases que poden capturar la semàntica latent és beneficiosa per a moltes aplicacions avall. We observe a simple geometry of sentences - the word representations of a given sentence (on average 10.23 words in all SemEval datasets with a standard deviation 4.84) roughly lie in a low-rank subspace (roughly, rank 4).  Motivada per aquesta observació, representem una frase pel subsespai de baix rangs ampliat pels seus vectors de paraula. Una representació així no supervisada es valida empíricament a través de tasques semàntiques de similitud textual en 19 conjunts de dades diferents, on supera en mitjana els sofisticats models de xarxa neural, incloent els vectors de pensament saltat, en un 15%.', 'bn': 'Sentences are important semantic units of natural language.  A generic, distributional representation of sentences that can capture the latent semantics is beneficial to multiple downstream applications.  আমরা শাস্তির একটি সাধারণ ভূমিতি দেখতে পাচ্ছি - একটি প্রদত্ত বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্বে (সেমভাল ডাটাসেটের গড়ে ১০. এই পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করছি যা তার শব্দ ভেক্টর দ্বারা স্পেস করেছে। এই ধরনের অরক্ষিত প্রতিনিধি ১৯ ভিন্ন ডাটাসেটে সেমেন্টিক টেক্সচুয়ালের সমতামূলক কাজের মাধ্যমে বৈধ করা হয়েছে, যেখানে সাফিক্সিকেট নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল, যার মধ', 'et': 'Laused on looduskeele olulised semantilised üksused. Üldine, jaotuslik lausete esitamine, mis suudavad jäädvustada latentsemantikat, on kasulik mitmele järgnevale rakendusele. Me jälgime lausete lihtsat geomeetriat - antud lause sõnad (keskmiselt 10,23 sõna kõigis SemEvali andmekogumites standardhälvega 4,84) asuvad umbes madala astme alamruumis (umbes 4. astme). Selle vaatluse põhjal esitame lauset madala astme alamruumi poolt, mida hõlmavad selle sõnavaktorid. Sellist järelevalveta esitust valideeritakse empiiriliselt semantilise tekstisarnasuse ülesannete abil 19 erineva andmekogumi puhul, kus see on keskmiselt 15% võrra parem kui keerukad närvivõrgumudelid, sealhulgas mõtlemata vektorid.', 'hy': 'Առասությունները բնական լեզվի կարևոր սեմանտիկ միավորներ են: Պատասխանների ընդհանուր, տարածական ներկայացումը, որը կարող է վերցնել թաքնված սեմանտիկան, օգտակար է բազմաթիվ հետագա ծրագրերի համար: We observe a simple geometry of sentences - the word representations of a given sentence (on average 10.23 words in all SemEval datasets with a standard deviation 4.84) roughly lie in a low-rank subspace (roughly, rank 4).  Motivated by this observation, we represent a sentence by the low-rank subspace spanned by its word vectors.  Այսպիսի անվերահսկված ներկայացում էմպիրիկ կերպով հավասարվում է սեմանտիկ տեքստային նմանության խնդիրների միջոցով 19 տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որտեղ այն արտադրում է բարդ նյարդային ցանցի մոդելներ, ներառյալ բաց մտածող վեկտորներ, միջինում 15 տոկոսով:', 'bs': 'Kazne su važne semantičke jedinice prirodnog jezika. Obična, distribucija reprezentacija rečenica koja može uhvatiti latentnu semantiku je korisna za višestruke prijave. Pratimo jednostavnu geometriju rečenica - riječ predstavljanja određene rečenice (prosječno 10,23 riječi u svim podacima semiEval sa standardnom odstupanjem 4,84) uglavnom leži u podprostoru niskog reda (oko 4. reda). Motivirana ovim posmatranjem, predstavljamo rečenicu niskog podprostora koje se širi njegovim vektorima riječi. Takva nepotrebna predstavljanja je empirički potvrđena putem zadataka semantičke tekstualne sličnosti na 19 različitih seta podataka, gdje iznosi sofisticirane modele neuralne mreže, uključujući vektore preskočivanja, za prosječan 15%.', 'cs': 'Věty jsou důležitými sémantickými jednotkami přirozeného jazyka. Obecná, distribuční reprezentace vět, která dokáže zachytit latentní sémantiku, je výhodná pro více následných aplikací. Pozorujeme jednoduchou geometrii vět, přičemž slovní reprezentace dané věty (průměrně 10,23 slova ve všech datových sadách SemEval se směrodatnou odchylkou 4.84) leží zhruba v nízkém subprostoru (zhruba řada 4). Motivováni tímto pozorováním představujeme větu podprostoru nízké řady, která je rozpínána slovními vektory. Taková bez dozoru reprezentace je empiricky validována pomocí sémantických textových podobnostních úloh na 19.různých datových sadách, kde v průměru předčí sofistikované modely neuronových sítí, včetně přeskočených vektorů, o 15% .', 'fi': 'Lausekkeet ovat tärkeitä luonnollisen kielen semanttisia yksiköitä. Yleinen, hajautettu lauseiden esittäminen, joka voi tallentaa piilevän semantiikan, on hyödyllistä useille jatko-sovelluksille. Havaitsemme lauseiden yksinkertaisen geometrian - tietyn lauseen sanaesitykset (keskimäärin 10,23 sanaa kaikissa SemEval-aineistoissa keskihajonnalla 4,84) sijaitsevat karkeasti matalan tason aliavaruudessa (karkeasti 4. sija). Tämän havainnon motivoimana edustamme lausetta matalan tason aliavaruudesta, jota sen sanavektorit kattavat. Tällainen valvomaton esitys on empiirisesti validoitu semanttisten tekstien samankaltaisuustehtävien avulla 19 eri aineistossa, joissa se on keskimäärin 15% parempi kuin kehittyneet neuroverkkomallit, mukaan lukien skip-thought vektorit.', 'he': 'גזרים הם יחידות סמנטיות חשובות של שפה טבעית. מייצג גנרלי, פיצוי של משפטים שיכול לתפוס את הסמנטיקה הסמונית הסמונה הוא מועיל למספר שימושים למטה. אנו מתבוננים בגיאומטריה פשוטה של משפטים - מילים מייצגים של משפט מסוים (בממוצע 10.23 מילים בכל קבוצות מידע SemEval עם התנועה סטנדרטית 4.84) שוכבים בערך בתת-חלל מדרגה נמוכה (בערך, מדרגה 4). מוטיבציה על ידי התבונה הזו, אנחנו מייצגים משפט על ידי התא-חלל מדרגה נמוכה שנערך על ידי ווקטורים המילים שלו. Such an unsupervised representation is empirically validated via semantic textual similarity tasks on 19 different datasets, where it outperforms the sophisticated neural network models, including skip-thought vectors, by 15% on average.', 'ha': "Shawara masu muhimmi ne da ke cikin harshen asimi. An amfani da shirin ayukan ayuka masu yawa na ƙarami. Tuna ganin wani jometiri na sauƙi da haske - maganar macẽtanta ga birnin da aka ba (mai tsakanin 10.23 magana cikin duk data na SemEL da wata juyi na daidaita 4.84) ko da ɗabi'a yana cikin wani wuri mai ƙasƙanci (cire, daraja 4). Akwai da wannan mai gani, Munã ƙayyade maganar da ke da ƙasan-daraja wanda aka spana da shi na masu shiryuwa. Wata shirin da ba'a tsare ba na da shi ya gyãra empirically, a kan aikin littãfin na semantic, misãlai masu daidaita na danahattu na 19 daban, inda it ke tafiyar da misãlai ɗin neural masu sofi da shi, tare da shiryoyi 15% mai tsakanin skip-yi.", 'sk': 'Stavki so pomembne semantične enote naravnega jezika. Splošna, distribucijska predstavitev stavkov, ki lahko zajamejo latentno semantiko, je koristna za več aplikacij na koncu verige. Opazujemo enostavno geometrijo stavkov - besedne predstavitve danega stavka (v povprečju 10,23 besed v vseh naborih podatkov SemEval s standardnim odklonom 4,84) grobo ležijo v nizkem podprostoru (približno 4. mesto). Na podlagi tega opazovanja predstavljamo stavek nizkega ranga podprostora, ki ga raztezajo besedni vektorji. Takšna nenadzorovana predstavitev je empirično potrjena s pomočjo semantične besedilne podobnosti na 19 različnih naborih podatkov, kjer v povprečju presega prefinjene modele nevronskih omrežij, vključno z vektorji preskakovanja misli, za 15%.', 'bo': 'བྱ་ཚིག་དག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་གལ་ཆེན་ཡིན། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་རྣམས་ལ་ཚོང་ཁག་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམས་མཐུན་གྱིས་ཕན We observe a simple geometry of sentences - the word representations of a given sentence (on average 10.23 words in all SemEval datasets with a standard deviation 4.84) roughly lie in a low-rank subspace (roughly, rank 4). འདིའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་མ་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་semantic textual similarity tasks གི་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྡུད་ཚན་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་19ཡིས་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་འདྲ་བ་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན', 'jv': 'structural navigation Awak dh챕w챕, saani, iso disebarke sawar kuwi nggawe semanti sing mlatu nggawe Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntukno sistem jeogras barang kelas - awak dh챕w챕 kesempatan kanggo kelas kotak (dadi 10.22 awak dh챕w챕 ning titik dh챕w챕) Global Samsul'}
{'en': 'Improving Semantic Relevance for Sequence-to-Sequence Learning of Chinese Social Media Text Summarization', 'ar': 'تحسين الصلة الدلالية لتسلسل التعلم من تلخيص نص وسائل الإعلام الاجتماعية الصينية', 'es': 'Mejora de la relevancia semántica para el aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia del resumen de textos en las redes sociales chinas', 'fr': "Améliorer la pertinence sémantique pour l'apprentissage séquentiel de la synthèse de textes sur les réseaux sociaux chinois", 'pt': 'Melhorando a relevância semântica para o aprendizado de sequência a sequência de resumo de texto de mídia social chinesa', 'ja': '中国のソーシャルメディアテキストサマリゼーションのシーケンス間学習の意味関連性の向上', 'zh': '崇中文社交媒体文本摘要序于序学之语义相关性', 'ru': 'Улучшение семантической релевантности для последовательного обучения суммированию китайского текста в социальных сетях', 'hi': 'चीनी सामाजिक मीडिया पाठ सारांशीकरण के अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए शब्दार्थ प्रासंगिकता में सुधार', 'ga': "Ábharthacht Shéimeantach a Fheabhsú d'Fhoghlaim Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh ar Achoimriú Téacs na Meáin Shóisialta", 'hu': 'A kínai közösségi média szövegösszefoglalásának szemantikai relevanciájának javítása a szekvenciás tanulás szempontjából', 'ka': 'ჩინეთი სოციალური მედია ტექსტის კომპანიზაციის სწავლების სემენტიკური შესაბამისება', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της Σημαντικής Σχετικότητας για τη Σεξουαλική Μάθηση των Κινεζικών Κοινωνικών Μέσων Συνοψίζοντας Κείμενο', 'it': "Migliorare la rilevanza semantica per l'apprendimento sequenziale della sintesi testuale dei social media cinesi", 'lt': 'Kinijos socialinės žiniasklaidos teksto santraukos Semantinės svarbos mokymosi iš eilės į eilę gerinimas', 'kk': 'Қытай социалдық медиақтар мәтінді тұжырымдамасын оқыту үшін семантикалық қатынасын жақсарту', 'mk': 'Подобрување на семантичната релевантност за учењето по секвенција на кинеските социјални медиуми', 'ms': 'Menembangkan Relevansi Semantik untuk Pelajaran Sequence-to-Sequence of Chinese Social Media Text Summary', 'mt': 'Titjib tar-Relevanza Semantika għat-Tagħlim minn Sekwenza għal Sekwenza tas-Sommarju tat-Test tal-Midja Soċjali Ċiniża', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയുടെ പദാവലിയുടെ സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mn': 'Хятад нийгмийн медиа хэвлэлийн хэвлэлийн хэвлэлийн дарааллаар суралцах семантик хамааралтай байдлыг сайжруулах', 'no': 'Å forbetra semantisk tilsvaring for å læra sekvens til sekvens av kinesiske sosiale mediatekstsamandrag', 'pl': 'Poprawa znaczenia semantycznego dla nauki sekwencyjnej chińskich mediów społecznościowych', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea relevanței semantice pentru învățarea secvență-la-secvență a sintezeizării textelor rețelelor sociale chineze', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje semantičke povezanosti za učenje sekvence do sekvence kineskog sažetka teksta socijalnih medija', 'si': 'චීනි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම පාළුව සාමාජික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්තික සම්බන්ධතා', 'so': 'Improving Semantic Relations for Sequence-to-Sequence Learning of Chinese Social Media Text Summarization', 'sv': 'Förbättra semantisk relevans för sekvens-till-sekvensinlärning av kinesiska sociala medier textsammanfattning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'چین سوسیل میڈیا متکس جماریزو کے لئے سیمنٹی نسبت زیادہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường liên lạc giữa giai đoạn để phát hành chuỗi', 'bg': 'Подобряване на семантичната релевантност при изучаване от последователност към последователност на текста в китайските социални медии', 'nl': 'Het verbeteren van de semantische relevantie voor sequentie leren van Chinese social media tekst samenvatting', 'da': 'Forbedring af semantisk relevans for sekvens-til-sekvens læring af kinesiske sociale medier Tekst summering', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje semantičke veze za učenje sljedećih do sljedećih učenja kineskih socijalnih medija', 'id': 'Menembangkan Relevansi Semantik untuk Pelajaran Sequence-to-Sequence of Chinese Social Media Text Summarization', 'de': 'Verbesserung der semantischen Relevanz für das sequence-to-sequence Lernen chinesischer Social Media Textzusammenfassung', 'fa': 'افزایش مربوط به سطح و سطح تعلیم متن رسانه اجتماعی چین', 'ko': '중국어 소셜 미디어 텍스트 요약 서열 간 학습의 의미 관련성 향상', 'tr': 'Çinçe Sosyal Maglumaty Metin Toplaýyşy üçin Semantik Taýdalyklygyny gowlaşdyr', 'af': 'Verbeter Semantiese Relevantheid vir Sequence- to- Sequence Learning of Chinese Social Media Text Summarization', 'sw': 'Kuboresha uhusiano wa kimapenzi kwa ajili ya Kufundisha Ujumbe wa Mazungumzo ya Mitandao ya Kiraia nchini China', 'am': 'የቻይና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստի համառոտագրության սեմատիկ կարևորության բարելավումը', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i rëndësisë Semantike për Mësimin në Sekuencë të Tekstit të Medias Sociale Kineze', 'az': 'Çin sosyal Media Metni Toplaşdırma Öyrənməsi üçün Semantik İlişkinlik İşləndirici', 'bn': 'চীনা সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সট সামার্জিক সংক্রান্ত শিক্ষার জন্য সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক উন্নতি', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje semantičke povezanosti za učenje sljedećih do sljedećih učenja kineskog sažetka teksta socijalnih medija', 'ca': 'Improving Semantic Relevance for Sequence-to-Sequence Learning of Chinese Social Media Text Summarization', 'et': 'Hiina sotsiaalmeedia tekstikokkuvõtte semantilise asjakohasuse parandamine järjestusest järjestuseni õppimiseks', 'cs': 'Zlepšení sémantické relevance pro sekvenční učení čínských sociálních médií', 'fi': 'Kiinalaisen sosiaalisen median tekstitiivistelmän semanttisen merkityksen parantaminen sekvenssi-sekvenssi-oppimiseen', 'he': 'שיפור רלוונטיות סמנטית ללימודי רצף-רצף של סאמריזציה טקסטית מדיה חברתית סינית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Yuwis ngeremu nggo rerayakno semanti kanggo Sistem Tatanan sing Ngawe Menyang Petik Cetha', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje semantične relevantnosti za učenje zaporedja v zaporedje kitajskih družbenih medijev Povzetek besedila', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་མཐུན་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Current Chinese social media text summarization models are based on an encoder-decoder framework. Although its generated summaries are similar to source texts literally, they have low semantic relevance. In this work, our goal is to improve semantic relevance between source texts and summaries for Chinese social media summarization. We introduce a Semantic Relevance Based neural model to encourage high semantic similarity between texts and summaries. In our model, the source text is represented by a gated attention encoder, while the summary representation is produced by a decoder. Besides, the similarity score between the representations is maximized during training. Our experiments show that the proposed model outperforms baseline systems on a social media corpus.', 'ar': 'تستند نماذج تلخيص نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي الصينية الحالية إلى إطار عمل لوحدة فك التشفير. على الرغم من أن الملخصات التي تم إنشاؤها تشبه نصوص المصدر حرفيًا ، إلا أنها ذات صلة دلالية منخفضة. في هذا العمل ، هدفنا هو تحسين الصلة الدلالية بين النصوص المصدر والملخصات لتلخيص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي الصينية. نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا قائمًا على الصلة الدلالية لتشجيع التشابه الدلالي العالي بين النصوص والملخصات. في نموذجنا ، يتم تمثيل النص المصدر بواسطة جهاز تشفير الانتباه ، بينما يتم إنتاج التمثيل الملخص بواسطة وحدة فك ترميز. إلى جانب ذلك ، يتم تعظيم درجة التشابه بين التمثيلات أثناء التدريب. تظهر تجاربنا أن النموذج المقترح يتفوق على الأنظمة الأساسية في مجموعة وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي.', 'fr': "Les modèles actuels de synthèse de texte pour les réseaux sociaux chinois sont basés sur un framework encodeur-décodeur. Bien que les résumés générés soient littéralement similaires aux textes sources, ils ont une faible pertinence sémantique. Dans ce travail, notre objectif est d'améliorer la pertinence sémantique entre les textes sources et les résumés pour la synthèse des médias sociaux chinois. Nous introduisons un modèle neuronal basé sur la pertinence sémantique pour encourager une similitude sémantique élevée entre les textes et les résumés. Dans notre modèle, le texte source est représenté par un codeur d'attention déclenchée, tandis que la représentation récapitulative est produite par un décodeur. En outre, le score de similitude entre les représentations est maximisé pendant l'entraînement. Nos expériences montrent que le modèle proposé surpasse les systèmes de base sur un corpus de médias sociaux.", 'es': 'Los modelos actuales de resumen de textos en las redes sociales chinas se basan en un marco de codificador-decodificador. Aunque los resúmenes generados son similares literalmente a los textos fuente, tienen poca relevancia semántica. En este trabajo, nuestro objetivo es mejorar la relevancia semántica entre los textos fuente y los resúmenes para el resumen de las redes sociales chinas. Presentamos un modelo neuronal basado en la relevancia semántica para fomentar una alta similitud semántica entre textos y resúmenes. En nuestro modelo, el texto de origen se representa mediante un codificador de atención cerrada, mientras que la representación resumida se produce mediante un decodificador. Además, la puntuación de similitud entre las representaciones se maximiza durante el entrenamiento. Nuestros experimentos muestran que el modelo propuesto supera a los sistemas de referencia en un corpus de redes sociales.', 'pt': 'Os atuais modelos chineses de resumo de texto de mídia social são baseados em uma estrutura de codificador-decodificador. Embora seus resumos gerados sejam literalmente semelhantes aos textos-fonte, eles têm baixa relevância semântica. Neste trabalho, nosso objetivo é melhorar a relevância semântica entre textos-fonte e resumos para sumarização de mídias sociais chinesas. Introduzimos um modelo neural baseado em relevância semântica para encorajar alta similaridade semântica entre textos e resumos. Em nosso modelo, o texto fonte é representado por um codificador de atenção fechado, enquanto a representação sumária é produzida por um decodificador. Além disso, a pontuação de similaridade entre as representações é maximizada durante o treinamento. Nossos experimentos mostram que o modelo proposto supera os sistemas de linha de base em um corpus de mídia social.', 'ja': '現在の中国のソーシャルメディアテキストサマリゼーションモデルは、エンコーダーデコーダーフレームワークに基づいています。生成された要約は文字通りソーステキストと似ていますが、意味的な関連性は低いです。この研究では、中国のソーシャルメディアの要約のためのソーステキストと要約の間の意味的関連性を向上させることを目標としています。テキストと要約の間の高い意味的類似性を奨励するために、意味的関連性ベースのニューラルモデルを導入します。当社のモデルでは、ソーステキストはゲート付き注意エンコーダによって表され、要約表現はデコーダによって生成されます。さらに、表現間の類似性スコアは、トレーニング中に最大化されます。私たちの実験は、提案されたモデルがソーシャルメディアコーパスのベースラインシステムを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '方今中国社交媒体文本摘要模形于编码器-解码器框架。 虽其成摘要类于字面上于源文本,然其语义相关性甚下。 吾所以崇源文本、摘要之语义相关性,以行中文社交媒体摘要。 引入一语义相关性神经,以劝文摘要之语义相似性。 吾法者,文本由门控意编码器,而摘要生解码器也。 其教习之际,相似性分最大化。 臣等实验明,形于社交媒体语料库上优于基线统。', 'ru': 'Текущие модели обобщения текста в китайских социальных сетях основаны на фреймворке кодировщик-декодер. Хотя сгенерированные резюме буквально похожи на исходные тексты, они имеют низкую семантическую значимость. В этой работе наша цель заключается в улучшении семантической релевантности между исходными текстами и резюме для обобщения китайских социальных сетей. Мы вводим нейронную модель, основанную на семантической релевантности, чтобы поощрять высокое семантическое сходство между текстами и резюме. В нашей модели исходный текст представлен шлюзовым кодером внимания, а сводное представление - декодером. Кроме того, оценка сходства между представлениями максимизируется во время тренировки. Наши эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемая модель превосходит базовые системы в корпусе социальных сетей.', 'hi': 'वर्तमान चीनी सोशल मीडिया टेक्स्ट सारांशीकरण मॉडल एक एनकोडर-डिकोडर फ्रेमवर्क पर आधारित हैं। यद्यपि इसके उत्पन्न सारांश सचमुच स्रोत ग्रंथों के समान हैं, लेकिन उनकी कम शब्दार्थ प्रासंगिकता है। इस काम में, हमारा लक्ष्य चीनी सोशल मीडिया सारांशीकरण के लिए स्रोत ग्रंथों और सारांशों के बीच शब्दार्थ प्रासंगिकता में सुधार करना है। हम ग्रंथों और सारांशों के बीच उच्च शब्दार्थ समानता को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए एक शब्दार्थ प्रासंगिकता आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल पेश करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल में, स्रोत पाठ को एक गेटेड ध्यान एन्कोडर द्वारा दर्शाया जाता है, जबकि सारांश प्रतिनिधित्व एक डिकोडर द्वारा उत्पादित किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अभ्यावेदन के बीच समानता स्कोर को अधिकतम किया जाता है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक सोशल मीडिया कॉर्पस पर बेसलाइन सिस्टम को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha achomair téacs meáin shóisialta na Síne faoi láthair bunaithe ar chreat ionchódóra-díchódóra. Cé go bhfuil a hachoimrí ginte cosúil le téacsanna foinse go litriúil, tá ábharthacht shéimeantach íseal acu. San obair seo, is é an sprioc atá againn ná ábharthacht shéimeantach a fheabhsú idir téacsanna foinseacha agus achoimrí d’achoimriú meán sóisialta na Síne. Tugaimid isteach samhail néarúil Bunaithe ar Ábharthacht Shéimeantach chun cosúlacht ard shéimeantach a spreagadh idir téacsanna agus achoimrí. Inár múnla, déantar an téacs foinse a léiriú ag ionchódóir aird gated, agus is díchódóir a tháirgtear an léiriú achomair. Ina theannta sin, uasmhéadaítear an scór cosúlachta idir na huiríll le linn na hoiliúna. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta córais bonnlíne ar chorpas meán sóisialta.', 'el': 'Τα τρέχοντα κινεζικά μοντέλα σύνοψης κειμένου στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης βασίζονται σε ένα πλαίσιο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή. Αν και οι περιλήψεις που δημιουργούνται είναι παρόμοιες με τα κείμενα προέλευσης κυριολεκτικά, έχουν χαμηλή σημασιολογική συνάφεια. Σε αυτή την εργασία, στόχος μας είναι να βελτιώσουμε τη σημασιολογική συνάφεια μεταξύ των κειμένων προέλευσης και των περιλήψεων για την περίληψη των κινεζικών μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Εισάγουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο βασισμένο στη Σημαντική Σχετικότητα για να ενθαρρύνουμε την υψηλή σημασιολογική ομοιότητα μεταξύ κειμένων και περιλήψεων. Στο μοντέλο μας, το αρχικό κείμενο αντιπροσωπεύεται από έναν κλειστό κωδικοποιητή προσοχής, ενώ η συνοπτική αναπαράσταση παράγεται από έναν αποκωδικοποιητή. Εκτός αυτού, η βαθμολογία ομοιότητας μεταξύ των αναπαραστάσεων μεγιστοποιείται κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά τα βασικά συστήματα σε ένα σώμα κοινωνικών μέσων.', 'hu': 'A jelenlegi kínai közösségi média szövegösszefoglaló modellek egy kódoló-dekóder keretrendszeren alapulnak. Bár a létrehozott összefoglalók szó szerint hasonlóak a forrásszövegekhez, alacsony szemantikai relevanciájuk van. Ebben a munkában célunk a forrásszövegek és összefoglalók szemantikai relevanciájának javítása a kínai közösségi média összefoglalásához. Egy szemantikus relevancia alapú neurális modellt vezetünk be a szövegek és összefoglalók közötti nagy szemantikai hasonlóság ösztönzésére. Modellünkben a forrásszöveget egy zárt figyelemkódoló képviseli, míg az összefoglaló ábrázolást dekódoló készíti. Emellett a reprezentációk közötti hasonlósági pontszám maximalizálódik az edzés során. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell felülmúlja az alapvető rendszereket a közösségi média korpuszon.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე ჩინეთი სოციალური მედია ტექსტის რეზიუმიზაციის მოდელები კოდირების რემპორმაციის დაბაზიან. მაგრამ მისი წარმოიდგინული სიმბოლო ტექსტის განსხვავება ბულობურად, ისინი ცომანტიკური შესახებ არიან. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენი მიზეზი იყო, რომ ჩინეთი სოციალური მედიაზე გასაკეთებლად სემანტიკური მნიშვნელობა შიგნის ტექსტის და საკუნძესების შიგნის ჩვენ სემანტიკური შესაბამისი ნეიროლური მოდელს ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ ტექსტის და რეზიუმენტის გასაბამისი სემანტიკური განსხვავება. ჩვენი მოდელში, მსოფლიო ტექსტი გამოსახულებულია დაახლოებით ინფორმაციის კოდერებით, როცა რეზიუმენტის გამოსახულება დიკოდერებით გამოყენებულია. დამატებით, გამოსახულებების შორის სინამდვილეობა მაქსიმიკურებულია. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ მოდელის მოდელის გარეშე სოციალური მედიდი კორპუსში სისტემის გარეშე.', 'it': "Gli attuali modelli cinesi di sintesi dei testi sui social media si basano su un framework encoder-decoder. Sebbene i suoi riassunti generati siano letteralmente simili ai testi di origine, hanno scarsa rilevanza semantica. In questo lavoro, il nostro obiettivo è migliorare la rilevanza semantica tra testi di origine e riassunti per la sintesi dei social media cinesi. Introducemo un modello neurale basato sulla rilevanza semantica per incoraggiare un'elevata somiglianza semantica tra testi e riassunti. Nel nostro modello, il testo sorgente è rappresentato da un codificatore di attenzione gated, mentre la rappresentazione sommaria è prodotta da un decoder. Inoltre, il punteggio di somiglianza tra le rappresentazioni viene massimizzato durante l'allenamento. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il modello proposto supera i sistemi di base su un corpus di social media.", 'lt': 'Dabartiniai Kinijos socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų santraukos modeliai grindžiami kodavimo kodavimo sistema. Although its generated summaries are similar to source texts literally, they have low semantic relevance.  Šiame darbe siekiame pagerinti semantinę reikšmę tarp išorinių tekstų ir santraukų Kinijos socialinės žiniasklaidos apibendrinimui. Pateikiame Semantinio svarbos pagrindu pagrįstą neurologinį model į, kuriuo siekiama skatinti aukštą semantinį tekstų ir santraukų panašumą. In our model, the source text is represented by a gated attention encoder, while the summary representation is produced by a decoder.  Be to, mokymo metu didinamas panašumas tarp atstovų. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis viršija pagrindines sistemas socialinės žiniasklaidos korpuse.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ചൈനീസ് സാമൂഹ്യ മെഡിയയുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d ഫ അതിന്റെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് തുല്യമാണെങ്കിലും, അവയ്ക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞ സെമ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ചൈനീസ് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് വ്യത പദാവലികള്\u200dക്കും വേര്\u200dച്ചകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സെമാന്റിക്കിലുള്ള ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d, സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എക്ഡോര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, സാമ്പത്തിലെ പ്രതിനിധിയി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ഒരേ സ്കോര്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലുതാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ കോര', 'kk': 'Қазіргі қытайша социалдық медиаға жазу үлгілері кодер- декодер фрейміне негізделген. Жасалған тұжырымдамалар көзінің мәтіндеріне ұқсас болса да, олардың семантикалық маңыздылығы төмен. Бұл жұмыста, біздің мақсатымыз көзінің мәтіндері мен қытайлық социалдық медиа тұжырымдамасының арасындағы семантикалық мақсатын жақсарту. Біз Semantic Relevance Based Neural Model мәтін мен тұжырымдық арасындағы жоғары семантикалық ұқсастығын көмектесу үшін келтіреміз. Біздің үлгімізде, көзінің мәтіні декодерлерден көрсетіледі, және тұжырымдамасы декодерлерден құрылады. Қосымша, кескіндер арасындағы ұқсас нәтижесі оқыту кезінде шегіледі. Біздің тәжірибеміз ұсынылған үлгі социалдық медиа корпусының негізгі жүйелерін жасайды.', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн Хятад нийгмийн медиа хэвлэлийн хэвлэлийн хэвлэлийн загварууд кодлогч-хэвлэлийн системээр суурилсан. Хэдийгээр үүнийг бий болгосон жинхэнэ жинхэнэ нь эх үүсвэртэй адилхан ч гэсэн тэд бага зэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил дээр бидний зорилго бол Хятад нийгмийн мэдээллийн цуглуулалтын эх үүсвэрийн текст болон цуглуулалтын хоорондын үр дүнг сайжруулах юм. Бид Semantic Relevance Based Neural Model руу зураг болон жишээлүүд хоорондын өндөр semantic similarity-г дэмжихийн тулд танилцуулдаг. Бидний загвар дээр эх үүсвэрийн текст цуглуулсан анхаарлын коддоор илэрхийлэгддэг. Харин цуглуулсан илэрхийлэл нь коддоор үүсгэдэг. Үүнээс гадна илтгэлийн хоорондын адилхан тоог сургалтын үед хамгийн их байдаг. Бидний туршилтууд санал өгсөн загвар нийгмийн медиа корпус дээр суурь шугам системүүдийг ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli attwali ta’ sommarju tat-test tal-midja soċjali Ċiniża huma bbażati fuq qafas ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder. Għalkemm is-sommarji ġġenerati tagħha huma simili għat-testi tas-sors letteralment, dawn għandhom rilevanza semantika baxxa. F’din il-ħidma, l-għan tagħna huwa li tittejjeb ir-rilevanza semantika bejn it-testi tas-sors u s-sommarji għas-sommarju tal-midja soċjali Ċiniża. Aħna nintroduċu mudell newrali bbażat fuq ir-Relevanza Semantika biex inħeġġu similarità semantika għolja bejn it-testi u s-sommarji. Fil-mudell tagħna, it-test tas-sors huwa rrappreżentat minn kodifikatur tal-attenzjoni miftuħ, filwaqt li r-rappreżentanza fil-qosor hija prodotta minn kodifikatur. Barra minn hekk, il-punteġġ ta’ similarità bejn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet huwa massimizzat waqt it-taħriġ. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-mudell propost iwassal għal sistemi ta’ bażi fuq korpus tal-midja soċjali.', 'no': 'Gjeldande kinesiske sosiale mediatekstsamanseringsmodular er basert på eit koderingsrammeverk. Selv om det genererte samandrag er liknande til kjeldetekstar bokstavelig, har dei låg semantisk relevans. I dette arbeidet er målet vårt å forbetra semantisk relevans mellom kjeldetekstar og samandrag for kinesiske sosiale mediasamandringar. Vi introduserer ein semantisk relasjonsbasert neuralmodell for å oppretta høg semantisk likning mellom tekstar og samandrag. I modellen vårt vert kjeldeteksten representert av eit oppmerkskoder, mens samandrag vert laga av ein dekoder. I tillegg er det liknande poenget mellom representasjonane maksimert ved opplæring. Eksperimentane våre viser at den foreslåde modellen utfører baselinjesystemet på ein sosiale media korpus.', 'pl': 'Aktualne chińskie modele podsumowania tekstów w mediach społecznościowych oparte są na frameworku kodera-dekodera. Chociaż jego generowane podsumowania są podobne do tekstów źródłowych dosłownie, mają one niskie znaczenie semantyczne. W niniejszej pracy naszym celem jest poprawa znaczenia semantycznego między tekstami źródłowymi a streszczeniami dla chińskich mediów społecznościowych. Wprowadzamy model neuronowy oparty na znaczeniu semantycznym, aby zachęcać do wysokiego podobieństwa semantycznego między tekstami a streszczeniami. W naszym modelu tekst źródłowy reprezentowany jest przez gated attention encoder, podczas gdy podsumowanie jest produkowane przez dekoder. Poza tym wynik podobieństwa pomiędzy reprezentacjami jest maksymalizowany podczas treningu. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowany model przewyższa systemy bazowe w korpusie mediów społecznościowych.', 'ro': 'Modelele actuale chineze de sintetizare a textului social media se bazează pe un cadru codificator-decodor. Deși rezumatele generate sunt similare literalmente cu textele sursă, ele au o relevanță semantică scăzută. În această lucrare, obiectivul nostru este de a îmbunătăți relevanța semantică între textele sursă și rezumatele pentru rezumarea rețelelor sociale chineze. Introducem un model neural bazat pe relevanță semantică pentru a încuraja o mare similitudine semantică între texte și rezumate. În modelul nostru, textul sursă este reprezentat de un codificator de atenție gated, în timp ce reprezentarea sumară este produsă de un decoder. În plus, scorul de similitudine dintre reprezentări este maximizat în timpul antrenamentului. Experimentele noastre arată că modelul propus depășește sistemele de bază pe un corpus social media.', 'mk': 'Моделите за резултат на текстот на кинеските социјални медиуми се базирани на рамка за кодер- декодирање. Иако нејзините генерирани резултати се слични на изворните тексти буквално, тие имаат ниска семантична релевантност. Во оваа работа, нашата цел е да ја подобриме семантичната релевантност помеѓу изворните тексти и резултатите за резултатите на кинеските социјални медиуми. Ние претставуваме семантичен нервен модел базиран на релеванција за да охрабриме висока семантична сличност помеѓу текстите и резултатите. Во нашиот модел, изворот на текстот е претставен од кодер на привлечено внимание, додека резултатот е произведен од декодер. Покрај тоа, резултатот на сличноста помеѓу претставувањата се максимализира за време на тренингот. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека предложениот модел ги надминува основните системи на корпусот на социјалните медиуми.', 'ms': 'Model pengringkasan teks media sosial China semasa berdasarkan kerangka pengekod- dekoder. Walaupun ringkasan yang dijana sama dengan teks sumber secara harfiah, ia mempunyai relevan semantik rendah. Dalam kerja ini, tujuan kita adalah untuk meningkatkan relevan semantik antara teks sumber dan ringkasan untuk ringkasan media sosial Cina. Kami memperkenalkan model saraf berdasarkan Relevansi Semantik untuk mendorong persamaan semantik tinggi antara teks dan ringkasan. Dalam model kami, teks sumber diwakili oleh pengekod perhatian gerbang, sementara perwakilan ringkasan dihasilkan oleh pengekod. Selain itu, skor persamaan antara perwakilan dipaksimumkan semasa latihan. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan melampaui sistem dasar pada korpus media sosial.', 'si': 'දැන් චීනි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පාළුව සංශ්\u200dය වින්යාස මදුල් සංශ්\u200dයාත්මක වින්යාස කරනවා කො ඒකේ සිද්ධිත සංශ්\u200dය සංශ්\u200dය සංශ්\u200dය පිළිපත් වගේ වගේ වගේ තියෙනවත්, ඔවුන්ට සංශ්\u200dය සංශ්\u200d මේ වැඩේ අපේ අරමුණ තමයි චීනි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම සාමාජික ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සාමාජික ප්\u200dරමාණය සමඟ සාමාජික අපි සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවක් අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් ලිපිත සහ සාර්මාන්ත අපේ මොඩේල් වල, මුළු පාළුව පෙන්වන්නේ අවධානය කෝඩර් වලින්, සාර්ථක පෙන්වන්නේ ඩිකෝඩර් වලින්. ඒ වගේම, ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය අතර සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් ප්\u200dරියෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් විශාලනය කරන්නේ. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සාමාජික මිඩියාව කොර්පුස් එකේ පද්ධති පද්ධතියක් න', 'ta': 'நடப்பு சீனிய சமூக ஊடகம் உரை சுருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் குறியீடு- குறியீட்டாளர் சட்டத்தின் அடிப்படையிலாக உள இது உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்கம் மூலத்தின் உரைகளுக்கு சமமாக இருந்தாலும் அவை குறைந்த பாதிப்பு தொடர்பு உள்ளது. இந்த வேலையில், எங்கள் இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் மூலம் உரைகள் மற்றும் சீன சமூக ஊடகங்கள் சுருக்கத்திற்கு இடையே இருக்கும் பாதிப் நாம் ஒரு செமாண்டிக் தொடர்பு அடிப்படையான புதிய மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். உரைகள் மற்றும் சுருக்குகளுக்கிடையில எங்கள் மாதிரியில், மூல உரையின் குறியீட்டு கவனத்தின் குறியீட்டால் குறியீட்டு குறியீடு அதற்கும் தவிர, பங்கீடுகளுக்கு இடையே சமமான மதிப்பெண்கள் பயிற்சியில் அதிகப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரி ஒரு சமூக ஊடக குறிப்புகளில் அடிப்படையில் அமைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்துகி', 'ur': 'اوسنی چینی سوسیل میڈیا متکس ترجمہ موڈل ایک کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر فرم پر بنیاد ہیں. اگرچہ اس کے پیدا کئے گئے سراسر پیغام کے مطابق برابر ہیں، ان کے لئے کم سیمانٹی اثرات ہے. اس کام میں، ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ سورج ٹیکسٹ اور چینی سوسیل میڈیا سامنے کے لئے سیمنٹی اضافہ کا زیادہ کرنا ہے. ہم ایک سیمنٹی Relevance Based Neural Model کو معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ texts and summaries کے درمیان بلند سیمنٹی برابری کا تحریک کریں. ہمارے مدل میں، سورج ٹیکسٹ ایک گیٹ ڈھیر کوڈر کے ذریعہ نمایش کی جاتی ہے، حالانکہ ساری نمایش ایک دکوڈر کے ذریعہ پیدا کی جاتی ہے. اس کے علاوہ، نمائندوں کے درمیان برابری کا نمائندہ تعلیم کے وقت سب سے بڑھا جاتا ہے. ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل ایک سوسیل میڈیا کورپوس پر بنسلین سیستموں کو کامل کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka qoraalka koorsiga ee shabakadda bulshada ee China waxay ku saleysan yihiin qalabka codcodsiga. In kastoo ay xittaa xigaamihiisa soo saaray ay u eg yihiin qoraalaha asalka ah, waxay leeyihiin faa’iido hoos u ah. Shaqadan, goalkayagu waa in la hagaajiyo xiriir kala duduwan qoraalka asalka iyo summarinta ee jaamacadda bulshada China. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa model neurada ku saleysan isku mid ah ee qoraalka iyo xigaanka. Tusaale ahaan noogu qoran, qoraalka asalka ah waxaa lagu soo jeedaa koox aad u fiirsan karto, marka lagu soo daabaco xuquuqda xagaalka, waxaa la soo saaraa qodolk. Intaas waxaa kale oo lagu baran karaa xiliga isku mid ah xiliga waxbarashada. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in muusikada la soo jeeday ay ay ka muuqato nidaamka hoose-hoose ee shabakada shabakadda ee shabakadda bulshada.', 'sv': 'Nuvarande kinesiska sociala medier textsammanfattningsmodeller är baserade på ett encoder-dekoder ramverk. Även om dess genererade sammanfattningar bokstavligen liknar källtexter har de låg semantisk relevans. I detta arbete är vårt mål att förbättra semantisk relevans mellan källtexter och sammanfattningar för kinesiska sociala medier sammanfattning. Vi introducerar en semantisk relevansbaserad neural modell för att uppmuntra hög semantisk likhet mellan texter och sammanfattningar. I vår modell representeras källtexten av en gated attention encoder, medan sammanfattningen framställs av en avkodare. Dessutom maximeras likhetspoängen mellan representationerna under träningen. Våra experiment visar att den föreslagna modellen överträffar baseline system på en social mediekorpus.', 'sr': 'Trenutni modeli sažetanja teksta kineskih društvenih medija zasnovani su na okviru kodera-dekodera. Iako su njegovi generirani sažeti slični izvornim tekstima bukvalno, imaju nisku semantičku relevanciju. U ovom poslu, naš cilj je da poboljšamo semantičku relevantnost između tekstova izvora i sažetaka za sažetak kineskih društvenih medija. Predstavljamo semantičku povezanost na osnovu neuralnog model a kako bi ohrabrili visoke semantičke sličnosti između teksta i sažetaka. U našem modelu, izvorni tekst predstavlja prikupljeni koder pažnje, dok sažetak predstavlja dekoder. Osim toga, rezultat sličnosti između predstavljanja se maksimalizuje tokom treninga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi model iznosi početne sisteme na socijalnom medijskom korpusu.', 'uz': "Name Chunki ularning tuzuvchi qismlari aslida manba matnlariga o'xshash bo'lsa, ularda semantik muhit yoʻq. Bu ishda, bizning maqsadimiz Xitoycha jamiyat medya hisoboti uchun semantik muhimligini oshirish mumkin. Biz textlar va muhim orasidagi semantik bir xil birlashtirish uchun semantik bog'liq modelini anglatamiz. Bizning modelimizda, manba matn taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi kodlash tomonidan koʻrinadi, va kichkinagi representation kodlash tomonidan yaratiladi. Koʻrsatgich, taʼminlovchi vaqtda taʼminlovchilar orasidagi teng qiymat yoyiladi. Bizning imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, iloji qilingan model jamiyat medya kompyuterda baseline tizimini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình tóm tắt văn bản của Trung Quốc hiện tại dựa trên bộ mã hóa. Mặc dù các bản tóm tắt đã tạo ra giống các văn bản nguồn theo nghĩa đen, nhưng chúng có tầm quan trọng nhỏ. Trong công việc này, mục tiêu của chúng ta là cải thiện sự liên quan về mặt ngữ nghĩa giữa các văn bản nguồn và các bản tóm tắt cho các phương tiện xã hội Trung Quốc. Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một mô hình thần kinh Liên quan truyền đạt để khuyến khích sự giống nhau sâu sắc giữa văn bản và tóm tắt. Trong mẫu của chúng tôi, chữ nguồn được đại diện bởi một bộ mã hóa sự chú ý thông thường, trong khi đại diện tổng hợp được tạo ra bởi một bộ giải mã. Hơn nữa, điểm tương đồng giữa các đài phát biểu đạt tối đa trong suốt huấn luyện. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng mô hình này hoàn thiện hệ cơ bản trên mạng xã hội.', 'bg': 'Актуалните китайски модели за обобщаване на текстове в социалните медии са базирани на рамка за кодер-декодер. Въпреки че генерираните резюмета са подобни на изходните текстове буквално, те имат ниска семантична релевантност. В тази работа нашата цел е да подобрим семантичната релевантност между изходните текстове и резюметата за обобщаване на китайските социални медии. Въвеждаме невронен модел, базиран на семантична релевантност, за да насърчим високо семантично сходство между текстовете и резюметата. В нашия модел изходният текст е представен от затворен кодер за внимание, докато резюмето се произвежда от декодер. Освен това, оценката за сходство между представителствата е максимална по време на тренировка. Нашите експерименти показват, че предложеният модел надминава базовите системи в корпус на социалните медии.', 'da': 'Nuværende kinesiske sociale medier tekst opsummering modeller er baseret på en encoder-dekoder ramme. Selvom dens genererede resuméer bogstaveligt talt ligner kildetekster, har de lav semantisk relevans. I dette arbejde er vores mål at forbedre semantisk relevans mellem kildetekster og resuméer for kinesiske sociale medier sammenfatning. Vi introducerer en Semantic Relevance Baseret neural model for at fremme høj semantisk lighed mellem tekster og resuméer. I vores model er kildeteksten repræsenteret af en gated attention encoder, mens den summariske repræsentation produceres af en dekoder. Desuden er lighedsscoren mellem repræsentationerne maksimeret under træning. Vores eksperimenter viser, at den foreslåede model overgår baseline systemer på et socialt medie korpus.', 'hr': 'Trenutni modeli sažetke teksta kineskih društvenih medija temeljeni su na okviru kodera-dekodera. Iako su njegovi generirani sažetki slični tekstima izvora doslovno, imaju nisku semantičku relevantnost. U tom poslu, naš cilj je poboljšati semantičku relevantnost između tekstova izvora i sažetaka za sažetak kineskih društvenih medija. Predstavljamo semantičku povezanost na osnovu neuralnog model a kako bi poticali visoke semantičke sličnosti između teksta i sažetaka. U našem modelu, izvorni tekst predstavlja prikupljeni koder pažnje, dok sažetak predstavlja dekoder. Osim toga, rezultat sličnosti između predstavljanja se maksimalizira tijekom obuke. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi model iznosi početne sustave na socijalnom medijskom korpusu.', 'nl': 'Huidige Chinese social media tekstsamenvattingsmodellen zijn gebaseerd op een encoder-decoder framework. Hoewel de gegenereerde samenvattingen letterlijk lijken op bronteksten, hebben ze weinig semantische relevantie. In dit werk is ons doel om de semantische relevantie tussen bronteksten en samenvattingen voor Chinese social media samenvattingen te verbeteren. We introduceren een Semantic Relevance Based neural model om een hoge semantische gelijkenis tussen teksten en samenvattingen te bevorderen. In ons model wordt de brontekst weergegeven door een gated attention encoder, terwijl de samenvattingsweergave wordt geproduceerd door een decoder. Bovendien wordt de gelijkenisscore tussen de representaties gemaximaliseerd tijdens de training. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model beter presteert dan baseline systemen op een social media corpus.', 'id': 'Model penerangan teks media sosial Cina saat ini berdasarkan rangkaian pengekode. Meskipun ringkasan yang dihasilkannya mirip dengan teks sumber secara harfiah, mereka memiliki relevansi semantis rendah. Dalam pekerjaan ini, tujuan kita adalah meningkatkan relevansi semantis antara teks sumber dan ringkasan untuk ringkasan media sosial Cina. Kami memperkenalkan model saraf berdasarkan Relevansi Semantik untuk mendorong persamaan semantis tinggi antara teks dan ringkasan. Dalam model kami, teks sumber dipilih oleh pengekode perhatian gerbang, sementara perwakilan ringkasan diproduksi oleh pengekode. Selain itu, skor persamaan diantara representation diperkirakan selama latihan. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan melampaui sistem dasar pada korpus media sosial.', 'de': 'Aktuelle chinesische Social Media Textzusammenfassungsmodelle basieren auf einem Encoder-Decoder-Framework. Obwohl die generierten Zusammenfassungen buchstäblich Quelltexten ähneln, haben sie eine geringe semantische Relevanz. Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, die semantische Relevanz zwischen Quelltexten und Zusammenfassungen für chinesische Social Media Zusammenfassungen zu verbessern. Wir führen ein semantisches Relevanzbasiertes neuronales Modell ein, um eine hohe semantische Ähnlichkeit zwischen Texten und Zusammenfassungen zu fördern. In unserem Modell wird der Quelltext durch einen gated attention encoder dargestellt, während die summary representation durch einen Decoder erzeugt wird. Außerdem wird der Ähnlichkeitswert zwischen den Darstellungen während des Trainings maximiert. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell Basissysteme auf einem Social Media Korpus übertrifft.', 'fa': 'مدل جمع کردن متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی چین فعلی بر روی یک چهارچوب رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی است. اگرچه جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهایش به طور واقعی شبیه به متن\u200cهای منبع هستند، آنها نسبت به سنتی کم دارند. در این کار، هدف ما این است که بین متن\u200cهای منبع و جمعیت\u200cها برای جمعیت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی چین ارتباط semantic را بهتر کنیم. ما یک مدل عصبی بنیاد مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به سمانتیک را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا شبیه\u200cهای طبیعی بالا بین متن\u200cها و جمعیت\u200cها را تشویق دهیم. در مدل ما، متن منبع توسط یک رمزگر توجه جمع شده نمایش می\u200cشود، در حالی که نمایش جمع توسط یک رمزگر تولید می\u200cشود. علاوه بر این، نقاط شبیه بین نمایندگان در زمان تمرین بیشتری می\u200cشود. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که مدل پیشنهاد سیستم\u200cهای بنیادی در یک شرکت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa muhtasari wa maandishi ya mitandao ya kijamii wa China sasa unategemea mfumo wa kodi. Although its generated summaries are similar to source texts literally, they have low semantic relevance.  Katika kazi hii, lengo letu ni kuboresha umuhimu wa kimapenzi kati ya maandishi ya vyanzo na muhtasari wa muhtasari wa mitandao ya kijamii ya China. Tunawasilisha muundo wa msingi wa mahusiano ya kimapenzi wa neura wa kuhamasisha usawa wa hali ya juu kati ya maandishi na muhtasari. Katika muundo wetu, maandishi ya vyanzo yanawakilishwa na mtazamo wa ufuatiliaji, wakati uwakilishi wa muhtasari unaotengenezwa na kodi. Zaidi ya hayo, score sawa kati ya uwakilishi inaongezeka wakati wa mafunzo. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa muundo huu unapendekezwa unafanya mifumo ya msingi kwenye mashirika ya mitandao ya kijamii.', 'ko': '현재의 중국 소셜 미디어 텍스트 요약 모델은 코딩 구조를 바탕으로 한다.생성된 요약은 원문 글씨체와 비슷하지만 의미 관련성은 낮다.이 작업에서 우리의 목표는 중국어 소셜 미디어 요약의 원본 텍스트와 요약 간의 의미 관련성을 향상시키는 것이다.우리는 텍스트와 요약 간의 높은 의미 유사성을 장려하기 위해 의미 관련성을 바탕으로 하는 신경 모델을 도입했다.우리 모델에서 원본 텍스트는 문 제어 주의 인코더에 의해 표시되고 요약은 디코더에 의해 생성됩니다.또 훈련 과정에서 간의 유사성 득점을 극대화했다.우리의 실험은 이 모델이 소셜 미디어 자료 라이브러리에서의 성능이 기본 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'af': "Huidige Sjinese sosiale media opsomming modele word gebaseer op 'n enkoder- dekoder raamwerk. Alhoewel sy genereerde opsommings is gelyk aan brontekste literaal, het hulle lae semantiese relevansie. In hierdie werk is ons doel om semantiese relevansie te verbeter tussen brontekste en opsommings vir Sjinese sosiale media opsomming. Ons introduiseer 'n Semantiese Relevance Based Neural model om hoë semantiese gelykenis te bevestig tussen teks en opsommings. In ons model word die bron teks verteenwoordig deur 'n aandag enkoder, terwyl die opsomming verteenwoordiging deur 'n dekoder uitgevoer word. Buiten, die gelykheidstelling tussen die voorstellings is maksimaliseer tydens onderwerp. Ons eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde model uitvoer baselyn stelsels op 'n sosiale media korpus.", 'tr': 'Häzirki Çinçe sosyal media metin hulaýaty nusgalary kodçödler. Onuň üretilen toparynyň çeşme metinlerine meňzeş ýaly bir şekilde, semantik wajyplary düşür. Bu işde biziň maksadymyz Çinçe sosyal medýdanlaryň jemgyýetleşmesi üçin semantik metinlerin we hulamlaryň arasynda döredilmesidir. Semantik Relevance tabanlı nöral modeli metinler ve toplamlar arasında yüksek semantik benzerimlerini tasarruf etmek için tanıştırıyoruz. Biziň modelimizde, çeşme metin gatlanmış üns kodçysy tarapyndan surat edildi. Ayrıca, temsiller arasyndaky meňzeşlik notlary okuwçysynda azaltylýar. Biziň deneylerimiz teklip eden nusganyň sosial mediýa korpusynda baz sistemalary çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'am': 'Current Chinese social media text summarization models are based on an encoder-decoder framework.  ምንም እንኳን የፍጥረት ጉዳይ የኩነቶች ጽሑፎች በሚያሳዩ ቢሆንም የsemantic ግንኙነት ትንሽ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የቻይና ማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ አቀማመጥ እና በኩነቶች መካከል የsemantic ግንኙነት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በጽሑፎች እና በኩነቶች መካከል ከፍ ያለ የsemantic ብጤት ለማሳመር የሚደረገውን የሴሜንቲካዊ ግንኙነት የናውሬው ሞዴል እናሳብቃለን፡፡ በሞዴል፣ የኩነቱ ጽሑፍ የድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሆኖ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተመሳሳይ እና በሚያስተማሩበት ወቅት በጥያቄ ላይ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ኮርፓስ ላይ የሳተር ድምፅ ሲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Modelet aktuale të përmbledhjes së tekstit të medias shoqërore kineze janë bazuar në një kuadër kodues-dekoder. Although its generated summaries are similar to source texts literally, they have low semantic relevance.  Në këtë punë, qëllimi ynë është të përmirësojmë rëndësinë semantike midis teksteve burimore dhe përmbledhjeve për përmbledhjen e medias sociale kineze. Ne prezantojmë një model nervor të bazuar në rëndësi Semantike për të inkurajuar ngjashmërinë e lartë semantike midis teksteve dhe përmbledhjeve. Në modelin tonë, teksti i burimit përfaqësohet nga një kodues i vëmendjes me porta, ndërsa përfaqësimi i përmbledhur prodhohet nga një dekoder. Përveç kësaj, rezultati i ngjashmërisë midis përfaqësimeve është maksimalizuar gjatë stërvitjes. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se modeli i propozuar ekziston mbi sistemet bazë në një korpus social media.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա Չինաստանի սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստի համառոտագրման մոդելները հիմնված են կոդերի-կոդերի շրջանակի վրա: Չնայած, որ դրա ստեղծված համառոտագրությունները բառացիորեն նման են աղբյուրների տեքստներին, դրանք ցածր սեմանտիկ կարևորություն ունեն: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մեր նպատակն է բարելավել սեմանտիկ կարևորությունը չինական սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների արտադրման աղբյուրների տեքստների և համառոտագրությունների միջև: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սեմանտիկ նյարդային մոդել, որը խրախուսում է մեծ սեմանտիկ նմանությունը տեքստների և համառոտագրությունների միջև: In our model, the source text is represented by a gated attention encoder, while the summary representation is produced by a decoder.  Ավելին, ներկայացումների միջև նմանության գնահատականը մեծանում է ուսուցման ընթացքում: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը գերազանցում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հիմնական համակարգերը:', 'ca': "Current Chinese social media text summarization models are based on an encoder-decoder framework.  Tot i que els resums generats són similars als textos fonts literalment, tenen baixa pertinencia semàntica. En aquesta feina, el nostre objectiu és millorar la rellevancia semàntica entre els textos de fonts i els resums de la resumida dels mitjans socials xinesos. Introduïm un model neural basat en la pertinença semàntica per animar una gran similitud semàntica entre textos i resums. En el nostre model, el text de font està representat per un codificador d'atenció portada, mentre la representació de resum està produïda per un codificador. A més, la puntuació de similitud entre les representacions es maximitza durant l'entrenament. Els nostres experiments demostren que el model proposat supera els sistemes de base d'un cos de mitjans socials.", 'bn': 'বর্তমান চীনা সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সট সংক্ষেপের মডেল একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার ফ্রেমের উপর ভিত্তিক। যদিও তার উৎপন্ন সংক্ষেপ সংক্ষেপ সাধারণত উৎসের লেখার সাথে একই রকম, তবে তাদের মধ্যে সেমান্টিক প্রভাব কম আছে। এই কাজে আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে চীনা সোশ্যাল মিডিয়ার সারসংক্ষেপের জন্য উৎসের লেখা এবং সংক্ষেপের মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক প্রভা আমরা একটি সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল চিহ্নিত করেছি যাতে টেক্সট এবং সামারিক সংক্ষেপের মধ্যে উচ্চ সেমা আমাদের মডেলে সূত্রের লেখাটি একটি গ্যাটাডের মনোযোগ এনকোডার দ্বারা প্রতিনিধিত্বিত, যখন সার্মিক প্রতিনিধিত্বের এছাড়াও প্রশিক্ষণের সময় প্রতিনিধিদের মধ্যে একই স্কোর সর্বোচ্চ স্কোর। Our experiments show that the proposed model outperforms baseline systems on a social media corpus.', 'az': 'Hazırkı Çin sosyal media mətn qurğulama modelleri kodlayıcı-dekoder çerçivesinə dayanan. Onun yaratdığı qeydələri mənbə mətnlərinə bənzəyərsə də, onlar semantik bağlılığı düşür. Bu işdə, bizim məqsədimiz Çin sosyal media toplaması üçün mənbə mətnlərin və toplamların arasındakı semantik əlaqəsini artırmaqdır. Biz Semantik Relevance Based Neural Model ilə textlər və summaries arasında yüksək semantik similarlığı təşkil etmək üçün təşkil edirik. Bizim modelimizdə, mənbə mətnlərini dəyişdirilmiş gözləmə kodlayıcısı tarafından göstərilir, lakin yığış göstəricisi bir dekoder tarafından ürəklənir. Əksinə, göstəricilərin arasındakı similarlıq nöqtəsi təhsil sırasında böyüklənir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, bu modellərin sosyal media korpusu təcrübə sistemlərini təcrübə edir.', 'bs': 'Trenutni modeli sažetke teksta kineskih društvenih medija zasnovani su na okviru kodera-dekodera. Iako su njegovi generirani sažetki slični tekstima izvora bukvalno, imaju nisku semantičku relevanciju. U ovom poslu, naš cilj je poboljšati semantičku relevantnost između tekstova izvora i sažetaka za sažetak kineskih društvenih medija. Predstavljamo semantičku povezanost na osnovu neuralnog model a kako bi poticali visoke semantičke sličnosti između teksta i sažetaka. U našem modelu, izvorni tekst predstavlja prikupljeni koder pažnje, dok sažetak predstavlja dekoder. Osim toga, rezultat sličnosti između predstavljanja se maksimalizuje tijekom treninga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi model iznosi početne sisteme na socijalnom medijskom korpusu.', 'cs': 'Současné čínské modely shrnutí textů sociálních médií jsou založeny na rámci kodéru-dekodéru. Přestože jeho generované souhrny jsou doslova podobné zdrojovým textům, mají nízkou sémantickou relevanci. V této práci je naším cílem zlepšit sémantickou relevanci mezi zdrojovými texty a souhrny pro čínské shrnutí sociálních médií. Představujeme neuronový model založený na sémantické relevanci, který podporuje vysokou sémantickou podobnost mezi texty a souhrny. V našem modelu je zdrojový text reprezentován uzavřeným kodérem pozornosti, zatímco souhrnná reprezentace je vytvořena dekodérem. Kromě toho je skóre podobnosti mezi reprezentacemi maximalizováno během tréninku. Naše experimenty ukazují, že navržený model překonává základní systémy na korpusu sociálních médií.', 'et': 'Praegused Hiina sotsiaalmeedia teksti kokkuvõtlusmudelid põhinevad kodeerija-dekooderi raamistikul. Kuigi selle loodud kokkuvõtted on sõna otseses mõttes sarnased lähtetekstidega, on neil vähe semantilist tähtsust. Selles töös on meie eesmärk parandada semantilist olulisust lähtetekstide ja kokkuvõtete vahel Hiina sotsiaalmeedia kokkuvõtete kokkuvõtete kokkuvõtete vahel. Tutvustame semantilisel asjakohasusel põhinevat närvimudelit, et soodustada tekstide ja kokkuvõtete suurt semantilist sarnasust. Meie mudelis esitatakse lähteteksti suletud tähelepanu kodeerijana, kokkuvõtliku esituse toodab dekooder. Pealegi on esituste sarnasuse skoor treeningu ajal maksimaalne. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et kavandatud mudel on sotsiaalmeedia korpuses parem kui baassüsteemid.', 'fi': 'Kiinan sosiaalisen median tekstien yhteenvetomallit perustuvat kooderi-dekooderikehykseen. Vaikka sen tuottamat tiivistelmät muistuttavat kirjaimellisesti lähdetekstejä, niillä on vähäinen semanttinen merkitys. Tässä työssä tavoitteena on parantaa semanttista relevanssia lähdetekstien ja tiivistelmien välillä kiinalaisessa sosiaalisen median yhteenvedossa. Esittelemme Semanttiseen Relevanssiin perustuvan neuromallin, joka edistää tekstien ja tiivistelmien suurta semanttista samankaltaisuutta. Mallissamme lähdetekstiä edustaa gated attention encoder, kun taas tiivistelmän esitystä tuottaa dekooderi. Lisäksi esitysten samankaltaisuuspisteet maksimoidaan harjoittelun aikana. Kokemuksemme osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli suoriutuu sosiaalisen median korpusessa paremmin perusjärjestelmistä.', 'jv': 'Model sing ditambah gambaran text Cino komunitas kang basa digawe koder-decoder politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang gawar iki, goal punika kanggo langgar bantuan kelas semana karo resumen kelas anyar tentang karo resumen media soale Cino. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem semanti Relewance Nambah model kita, kelompok kelompok dianggo koder nggawe ateng, sampek kelompok kelompok Lah wis malah, sampeyan sing dipunangé terusane dipunangé awakdhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk wong-wong kuwi model sing supoyo nggawe sistem sing nyimpen banget nang media sotiki.', 'ha': "@ item license (short name) Kuma kõ da ƙararinsa da aka ƙãga shi, sai suna da matsayi mai sauri. Daga wannan aikin, aimaimaimakinmu ne ya improve muhimmada na semanti tsakanin littãfin da na ƙari wa muhimmada na mitandai masu jamii na China. Tuna fara wani misãlai na Semantic Relevance a Base Neural dõmin mu yi wa'amar wa sauri na semanti a tsakanin takardar da ƙari. Daga misalinmu, aka ƙayyade matsayin kwanan zuwa wani kodi ya haɗa aikin aiki, kuma a sami da ake samar da mai gaurawa na kodi. Babu, an faɗaɗa scori mai daidaita tsakanin mazaɓa a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa misalin da aka buƙata, yana samar da system-na'ura a kan karbon mitandai da jamii.", 'he': 'דוגמני מסכם התקשורת החברתית הסינית הנוכחיות מבוססים על סגרת קודד-פיקוד. למרות שהרשימות הנוצרות שלה דומות לטקסטים מקורים, יש להם רלוונטיות סמנטית נמוכה. בעבודה הזאת, המטרה שלנו היא לשפר את הרלוונטיות הסמנטית בין טקסטים מקורים וסרטים לסיוריזציה של התקשורת החברתית הסינית. אנו מציגים מודל עצבי מבוסס על רלוונציה סמנטית כדי לעודד דמיון סמנטי גבוה בין טקסטים וסורטים. במודל שלנו, טקסט המקור מייצג על ידי קודד תשומת לב שעורה, בזמן שהמייצג הסכם יוצר על ידי קודד. חוץ מזה, נקודת הדמיון בין המציגות מקסימלית במהלך האימונים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהמודל המוצע מוביל מערכות בסיסיות על קורפוס תקשורת חברתית.', 'sk': 'Trenutni kitajski modeli za povzetek besedila na družbenih omrežjih temeljijo na okviru kodirnika-dekoderja. Čeprav so njegovi ustvarjeni povzetki dobesedno podobni izvornim besedilom, imajo majhno semantično pomembnost. Naš cilj je izboljšati semantično relevantnost izvornih besedil in povzetkov za povzetek kitajskih družbenih medijev. Za spodbujanje visoke semantične podobnosti besedil in povzetkov uvajamo nevronski model, ki temelji na semantični relevanci. V našem modelu izvorno besedilo predstavlja kodirnik zaprte pozornosti, medtem ko povzetek predstavlja dekodirnik. Poleg tega se med treningom poveča podobnost med predstavitvami. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da predlagani model presega osnovne sisteme v korpusu družbenih medijev.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟའི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེའི་རྐྱེན་ཡུལ་ཐོག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྩོམ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཡིག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཐིག་ཁྲམ་དང་མཛུབ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་རྩོལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དུ་ཡར་ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་པའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་གཞི་གཞི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མིག་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་དབ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ནང་དུ་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་གེ་འདྲ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་ཏུ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཆེ་ཤོས་འཛུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རྨས་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་'}
{'en': 'Separating Facts from Fiction : Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'ar': 'فصل الحقائق عن الخيال: النماذج اللغوية لتصنيف المنشورات الإخبارية المشبوهة والموثوقة على تويتر', 'pt': 'Separando fatos de ficção: modelos linguísticos para classificar notícias suspeitas e confiáveis no Twitter', 'fr': "Séparer les faits de la fiction\xa0: modèles linguistiques pour classer les articles d'actualité suspects et fiables sur Twitter", 'es': 'Separar los hechos de la ficción: modelos lingüísticos para clasificar las publicaciones de noticias sospechosas y confiables en Twitter', 'ja': 'フィクションと事実を分ける： Twitter上の疑わしいニュース投稿と信頼できるニュース投稿を分類するための言語モデル', 'zh': '分其事与虚构,Twitter疑信新闻帖以类言模', 'hi': 'कथा से तथ्यों को अलग करना: चहचहाना पर संदिग्ध और विश्वसनीय समाचार पोस्ट को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए भाषाई मॉडल', 'ru': 'Отделение фактов от художественной литературы: лингвистические модели для классификации подозрительных и доверенных новостных постов в Twitter', 'ga': 'Fíricí a Scaradh ó Fhicsean: Samhlacha Teangeolaíocha chun Poist Nuachta Amhrasacha agus Iontaofa a Rangú ar Twitter', 'hu': 'Tények elkülönítése a fikciótól: Nyelvi modellek a gyanús és megbízható híreket osztályozzák a Twitteren', 'ka': 'ფაქტის განყოფილება ფიქციისგან: ლინგურისტიკური მოდელები კლასიფიკური და დარწმუნებული ინფორმაციის პოსტის Twitter-ში', 'kk': 'Тіркелгеннен бөлу факттері: Твиттердегі күмәлімді және сенімді жаңалық пошталарына тілім үлгілері', 'mk': 'Одделување на фактите од фикцијата: Лингвистички модели за класификување на сомнителни и доверливи вести на Твитер', 'el': 'Διαχωρίζοντας τα γεγονότα από τη φαντασία: Γλωσσολογικά μοντέλα για την ταξινόμηση ύποπτων και αξιόπιστων ειδήσεων στο Twitter', 'ml': 'ഫിഫിക്ഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്ന ഫാക്റ്റുകള്\u200d: ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d സംശയത്തിലും വിശ്വസ്തനായ വാര്\u200dത്തകളും ക്ലാസ', 'lt': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'it': 'Separare fatti dalla finzione: modelli linguistici per classificare post di notizie sospetti e attendibili su Twitter', 'no': 'Separering av faktar frå fikking: Lingvis modeller til klassifisering av dårlige og tiltrudde informasjonspost på Twitter', 'ms': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'pl': 'Oddzielenie faktów od fikcji: Modele językowe do klasyfikacji podejrzanych i zaufanych wiadomości na Twitterze', 'mn': 'Сонголтын үндсэн зүйлсийг хуваалцах: Холбоотой загваруудыг Твиттерийн Төв дээр хэлбэртэй, итгэлтэй мэдээллийн загваруудыг хуваалцах', 'ro': 'Separarea faptelor de ficțiune: Modele lingvistice pentru clasificarea posturilor de știri suspecte și de încredere pe Twitter', 'sr': 'Razdvajanje činjenica iz fikcije: Lingistički modeli na klasifikaciju sumnjivih i pouzdanih novina na Twitter-u', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isku-soocmaalka jimicsiga: Tilmaamaha Linguistic to Classify Shakila and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'mt': 'Fatti Separati mill-Fizzjoni: Mudelli Lingwistiċi għall-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Postijiet ta’ Aħbarijiet Suspettivi u Fiduċjati fuq Twitter', 'sv': 'Skilja fakta från fiktion: Språkliga modeller för att klassificera misstänkta och betrodda nyhetsinlägg på Twitter', 'ta': 'பிரிவிலிருந்து பிரித்துக் கொண்டிருக்கும் காரணிகள்:', 'ur': 'فیکسٹ سے حقیقت جدا کرتا ہے: لینگیستیک موڈل ٹویٹر پر شک و یقین کی خبریں پوسٹ کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tách biệt các phái khỏi Điều Động: Các mô hình ngôn ngữ để phân loại các tin tức đáng tin trên Twitter', 'nl': 'Feiten scheiden van fictie: Taalmodellen om verdachte en vertrouwde nieuwsberichten op Twitter te classificeren', 'bg': 'Разделяне на фактите от измислицата: лингвистични модели за класифициране на подозрителни и доверени новинарски публикации в Туитър', 'da': 'Adskillelse af fakta fra fiktion: Sprogiske modeller til at klassificere mistænkelige og pålidelige nyhedsindlæg på Twitter', 'hr': 'Razdvajanje činjenica iz fikcije: Lingistički modeli na klasifikaciju sumnjivih i pouzdanih novina na Twitter-u', 'fa': 'جدا کردن حقایق از تعیین: مدل لینگیستیکی به کلاس مظنونی و مطمئنی اخبار توئیتر', 'de': 'Fakten von Fiktion trennen: Sprachliche Modelle zur Klassifizierung verdächtiger und vertrauenswürdiger Nachrichten auf Twitter', 'ko': '사실과 허구 구분: 트위터에서 의심스럽고 신뢰할 수 있는 뉴스 게시물 분류의 언어 모델', 'tr': 'Ayrılan Faýllar', 'sw': 'Kutenganisha Facts from Fiection: Model of Linguistics to Classify Posti za Habari zinazotia mashaka na inayoaminika kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'af': 'Afdeling Fakte van Fiksie: Linguistiese Modelle na Klassifiseer Suistende en Vertroude Nuuspos op Twitter', 'id': 'Pemisahan Fakta dari Fiksi: Model Linguistik untuk Klasifikasi News Posts Tersangka dan Percaya di Twitter', 'sq': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'am': 'የመለያ ውይይቶች ከFiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'hy': 'Ֆեկցիայից բաժանված փաստերը. լեզվական մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործում են Թվիթերի վրա կասկածելի և վստահելի նորություններ դասավորելու համար', 'bn': 'ফিকেশন থেকে বিভক্ত ফ্যাক্ট: টুইটারে লিঙ্গিস্টিক মোডেল সন্দেহজনক এবং বিশ্বাসী সংবাদ পোস্ট ক্লাসিক করার', 'az': "Fiksiyadan ayrılma Faylıları: Linguistik Modellər Twitter'də şübhə edən və güvenilir Haber Postalarına", 'bs': 'Razdvajanje činjenica iz fikcije: Lingistički modeli na klasifikaciju sumnjivih i pouzdanih novina na Twitter-u', 'cs': 'Oddělení faktů od fikce: Jazykové modely pro klasifikaci podezřelých a důvěryhodných zpráv na Twitteru', 'ca': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'et': 'Faktide eraldamine ilukirjandusest: keelelised mudelid kahtlaste ja usaldusväärsete uudistepostituste klassifitseerimiseks Twitteris', 'fi': 'Faktojen erottaminen fiktiosta: Kielelliset mallit epäilyttävien ja luotettavien uutisviestien luokitteluun Twitterissä', 'jv': 'Separating Faults from FBI: Linguist Modes to CLSSY susPiPiPizza lan Trusty Haber', 'he': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter', 'sk': 'Ločevanje dejstev od fikcije: jezikovni modeli za razvrščanje sumljivih in zaupanja vrednih novic na Twitterju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Separating Facts from Fiction: Linguistic Models to Classify Suspicious and Trusted News Posts on Twitter'}
{'en': 'Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016). In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that made-up news has caused a great deal of confusion about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability. In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news   satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda. We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models. Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance. Incorporating linguistic features improves classification results, however, social interaction features are most informative for finer-grained separation between four types of suspicious news posts.', 'ar': 'تشير استطلاعات الرأي البحثية لمركز بيو إلى أن 62 بالمائة من البالغين في الولايات المتحدة يحصلون على الأخبار على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (جوتفريد وشيرر ، 2016). في استطلاع للرأي أجري في ديسمبر ، قال 64 بالمائة من البالغين في الولايات المتحدة أن "الأخبار المختلقة" تسببت في "قدر كبير من الارتباك" حول حقائق الأحداث الجارية (بارثيل وآخرون ، 2016). تساهم القصص المفبركة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، من الدعاية المتعمدة إلى الخدع والهجاء ، في هذا الالتباس بالإضافة إلى آثارها الخطيرة على الاستقرار العالمي. في هذا العمل نبني نماذج تنبؤية لتصنيف 130 ألف منشور إخباري على أنها مشبوهة أو تم التحقق منها ، ونتوقع أربعة أنواع فرعية من الأخبار المشبوهة - السخرية والخداع والنقر والدعاية. نظهر أن نماذج الشبكة العصبية المدربة على محتوى التغريدات وتفاعلات الشبكات الاجتماعية تتفوق على النماذج المعجمية. على عكس العمل السابق على اكتشاف الخداع ، وجدنا أن إضافة ميزات بناء الجملة والقواعد إلى نماذجنا لا يؤدي إلى تحسين الأداء. يؤدي دمج الميزات اللغوية إلى تحسين نتائج التصنيف ، ومع ذلك ، فإن ميزات التفاعل الاجتماعي هي الأكثر إفادة للفصل الدقيق بين أربعة أنواع من المنشورات الإخبارية المشبوهة.', 'pt': 'Pesquisas do Pew mostram que 62% dos adultos dos EUA recebem notícias nas mídias sociais (Gottfried e Shearer, 2016). Em uma pesquisa de dezembro, 64% dos adultos norte-americanos disseram que “notícias inventadas” causaram “grande confusão” sobre os fatos dos eventos atuais (Barthel et al., 2016). Histórias fabricadas nas mídias sociais, que vão de propaganda deliberada a fraudes e sátira, contribuem para essa confusão, além de ter sérios efeitos sobre a estabilidade global. Neste trabalho construímos modelos preditivos para classificar 130 mil postagens de notícias como suspeitas ou verificadas e prevemos quatro subtipos de notícias suspeitas – sátira, hoaxes, clickbait e propaganda. Mostramos que os modelos de redes neurais treinados em conteúdo de tweets e interações em redes sociais superam os modelos lexicais. Ao contrário de trabalhos anteriores sobre detecção de enganos, descobrimos que adicionar recursos de sintaxe e gramática aos nossos modelos não melhora o desempenho. A incorporação de recursos linguísticos melhora os resultados de classificação, no entanto, os recursos de interação social são mais informativos para uma separação mais refinada entre quatro tipos de postagens de notícias suspeitas.', 'fr': "Selon les sondages Pew Research, 62\xa0% des adultes américains reçoivent des nouvelles sur les réseaux sociaux (Gottfried et Shearer, 2016). Lors d'un sondage réalisé en décembre, 64\xa0% des adultes américains ont déclaré que les «\xa0nouvelles inventées\xa0» ont semé «\xa0beaucoup de confusion\xa0» au sujet des faits actuels (Barthel et al., 2016). Les articles inventés sur les réseaux sociaux, allant de la propagande délibérée aux canulars et à la satire, contribuent à cette confusion en plus d'avoir de graves effets sur la stabilité mondiale. Dans ce travail, nous construisons des modèles prédictifs pour classer 130 000 articles d'actualité comme suspects ou vérifiés, et prédire quatre sous-types de nouvelles suspectes\xa0: la satire, les canulars, le clickbait et la propagande. Nous montrons que les modèles de réseaux neuronaux formés au contenu des tweets et aux interactions sur les réseaux sociaux surpassent les modèles lexicaux. Contrairement aux travaux précédents sur la détection des tromperies, nous avons constaté que l'ajout de fonctionnalités de syntaxe et de grammaire à nos modèles n'améliore pas les performances. L'intégration de caractéristiques linguistiques améliore les résultats de classification, cependant, les fonctionnalités d'interaction sociale sont très instructives pour une séparation plus fine entre quatre types de publications d'actualités suspectes.", 'es': 'Las encuestas de investigación de Pew informan que el 62 por ciento de los adultos estadounidenses reciben noticias en las redes sociales (Gottfried y Shearer, 2016). En una encuesta de diciembre, el 64 por ciento de los adultos estadounidenses dijo que las «noticias inventadas» han causado una «gran confusión» sobre los hechos de los acontecimientos actuales (Barthel et al., 2016). Las historias inventadas en las redes sociales, que van desde la propaganda deliberada hasta los engaños y la sátira, contribuyen a esta confusión además de tener graves efectos en la estabilidad global. En este trabajo construimos modelos predictivos para clasificar 130 mil publicaciones de noticias como sospechosas o verificadas, y predecimos cuatro subtipos de noticias sospechosas: sátira, engaños, cebo de clics y propaganda. Mostramos que los modelos de redes neuronales entrenados en contenido de tuits e interacciones en redes sociales superan a los modelos léxicos. A diferencia del trabajo anterior sobre la detección de engaños, descubrimos que añadir características de sintaxis y gramática a nuestros modelos no mejora el rendimiento. La incorporación de características lingüísticas mejora los resultados de la clasificación, sin embargo, las funciones de interacción social son más informativas para una separación más precisa entre cuatro tipos de publicaciones de noticias sospechosas.', 'ja': 'ピューの調査によると、米国の成人の62 ％がソーシャルメディアでニュースを受け取っています（ Gottfried and Shearer、2016 ）。 12月の世論調査では、米国の成人の64 ％が、「メイキング・ニュース」が現在の出来事の事実について「非常に混乱している」と答えた（ Barthel et al., 2016 ）。 意図的なプロパガンダから騙しや風刺まで、ソーシャルメディアでの捏造されたストーリーは、世界の安定に深刻な影響を与えるだけでなく、この混乱を引き起こします。 この作業では、13万件のニュース投稿を疑わしいまたは検証済みに分類し、4つの疑わしいニュースのサブタイプを予測する予測モデルを構築します–風刺、詐欺、クリックベイト、プロパガンダ。 私たちは、ツイートコンテンツとソーシャルネットワークの相互作用で訓練されたニューラルネットワークモデルが、辞書モデルよりも優れていることを示しています。 欺瞞検知に関するこれまでの研究とは異なり、モデルに構文と文法の機能を追加してもパフォーマンスは向上しません。 言語機能を組み込むと分類結果が改善されますが、ソーシャルインタラクション機能は、4種類の疑わしいニュース投稿間のより細かい分離に最も役立ちます。', 'zh': '皮尤治民意调查告称,62%美国成人于社交媒体上得新闻(GottfriedShearer,2016)。 12月之民意调查,64%之美国成人,"捏造之新闻",极为大惑(Barthel等,2016)。 社交媒体上之故事,自故传之恶作剧刺,全球定之外,犹助其乱。 于此立测,将13万条新闻帖归类为可疑验之新闻,并占可疑新闻四种 - 刺,恶作剧,点击饵宣传。 明于推文社交网络之交神经网络优于词汇。 异乎前之欺检,见语法语法之不加性能。 言语可以善分,社交互动可以疑新闻帖之间细粒度离最助。', 'hi': 'प्यू शोध सर्वेक्षणों की रिपोर्ट है कि 62 प्रतिशत अमेरिकी वयस्कों को सोशल मीडिया पर समाचार मिलते हैं (गॉटफ्रीड और शियरर, 2016)। दिसंबर के एक सर्वेक्षण में, 64 प्रतिशत अमेरिकी वयस्कों ने कहा कि "मेड-अप न्यूज" ने वर्तमान घटनाओं के तथ्यों के बारे में "भ्रम का एक बड़ा सौदा" पैदा किया है (बार्थेल एट अल। सोशल मीडिया में मनगढ़ंत कहानियां, जानबूझकर प्रचार से लेकर धोखा और व्यंग्य तक, वैश्विक स्थिरता पर गंभीर प्रभाव डालने के अलावा इस भ्रम में योगदान देती हैं। इस काम में हम 130 हजार समाचार पोस्ट को संदिग्ध या सत्यापित के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल का निर्माण करते हैं, और चार उप-प्रकार के संदिग्ध समाचारों की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं - व्यंग्य, धोखा, क्लिकबेट और प्रचार। हम दिखाते हैं कि ट्वीट सामग्री और सामाजिक नेटवर्क इंटरैक्शन पर प्रशिक्षित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल लेक्सिकल मॉडल से आगे निकलते हैं। धोखे का पता लगाने पर पिछले काम के विपरीत, हम पाते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल में वाक्यविन्यास और व्याकरण सुविधाओं को जोड़ने से प्रदर्शन में सुधार नहीं होता है। भाषाई विशेषताओं को शामिल करने से वर्गीकरण परिणामों में सुधार होता है, हालांकि, सामाजिक संपर्क विशेषताएं चार प्रकार के संदिग्ध समाचार पोस्ट के बीच महीन-दाने वाले अलगाव के लिए सबसे अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण हैं।', 'ru': 'Исследования Pew сообщают, что 62 процента взрослого населения США получают новости в социальных сетях (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016). В декабрьском опросе 64 процента взрослых американцев сказали, что «выдуманные новости» вызвали «большую путаницу» в отношении фактов текущих событий (Barthel et al., 2016). Сфабрикованные в социальных сетях истории, начиная от преднамеренной пропаганды и заканчивая мистификациями и сатирой, способствуют этой путанице, а также оказывают серьезное воздействие на глобальную стабильность. В этой работе мы строим прогностические модели для классификации 130 тысяч новостных постов как подозрительных или верифицированных и прогнозируем четыре подтипа подозрительных новостей – сатира, мистификация, кликбейт и пропаганда. Мы показываем, что модели нейронных сетей, обученные контенту твитов и взаимодействию с социальными сетями, превосходят лексические модели. В отличие от предыдущей работы по обнаружению обмана, мы обнаружили, что добавление синтаксических и грамматических функций в наши модели не улучшает производительность. Включение лингвистических признаков улучшает результаты классификации, однако особенности социального взаимодействия являются наиболее информативными для более тонкого разделения между четырьмя типами подозрительных новостных сообщений.', 'ga': 'Tuairiscíonn pobalbhreith Pew research go bhfaigheann 62 faoin gcéad de dhaoine fásta na SA nuacht ar na meáin shóisialta (Gottfried agus Shearer, 2016). I vótaíocht i mí na Nollag, dúirt 64 faoin gcéad de dhaoine fásta na SA go bhfuil “nuacht déanta suas” tar éis “go leor mearbhaill” faoi fhíricí imeachtaí reatha (Barthel et al., 2016). Cuireann scéalta déanta sna meáin shóisialta, ó bholscaireacht d’aon ghnó go hoaxes agus aoir, leis an mearbhall seo chomh maith le héifeachtaí tromchúiseacha a bheith acu ar chobhsaíocht dhomhanda. San obair seo déanaimid samhlacha réamh-mheastacháin a thógáil chun 130 míle post nuachta a rangú mar phoist amhrasach nó fíoraithe, agus réamh-mheastar ceithre fho-chineál nuachta amhrasach – aoir, hoaxes, clickbait agus bolscaireacht. Léirímid go sáraíonn samhlacha néarlíonra atá oilte ar ábhar tweetanna agus idirghníomhaíochtaí líonra sóisialta samhlacha foclóireachta. Murab ionann agus obair roimhe seo ar bhrath mheabhlaireachta, feicimid nach bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht trí ghnéithe comhréire agus gramadaí a chur lenár múnlaí. Trí ghnéithe teanga a ionchorprú, feabhsaíonn sé torthaí aicmithe, áfach, is iad gnéithe idirghníomhaíochta sóisialta an fhaisnéis is mó chun deighilt níos míne a dhéanamh idir ceithre chineál post nuachta amhrasach.', 'ka': "პროცენტის შესწავლობის შესწავლობის შესწავლობის 62 პროცენტი ამერიკის მოკეთესების შესახებ სოციალური მედიაში (Gottfried და Shearer, 2016). ამერიკის წარმოდგენების 64 პროცენტი განსაკუთრებულია, რომ 'შექმნილი ნუზები' გამოიყენეთ 'ძალიან შეცდგენება' მიმდინარე მოვლენების ფაქტის შესახებ (ბარტელ et al., 2016). სოციალური მედიაში ტაბრიკური ისტორიები, რომლებიც მუშაობით პროპადანდიდან დაიწყება და სიტატირებისთვის, დამატებით ამ შეცდომის დამატებით სერიოლური ეფექტირები ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პროგრამეტური მოდელები, რომლებიც 130 000 ახალგაზონის პოსტის კლასიზაციას, რომლებიც შეიძლება ან დარწმუნება, და წინახოთ ოთხი სამუშაო ახალგაზონი - სა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები, რომლებიც ტევიტის შესახებ და სოციალური ქსელის ინტერფექციების შესახებ ლექსიკური მოდელ წინა სამუშაო მოდელში სინტაქსი და გრამატური ფუნქციები ჩვენი მოდელში არ უფრო მუშაობს. ლენგურისტიკური განსაზღვრებების შესახებ კლასიფიკაციის შედეგი უფრო ინფორმაციური განსაზღვრებისთვის, მაგრამ სოციალური ინტერფექციის განსაზღვრებისთვის უფრო ინფორმაციური განსა", 'el': 'Ερευνητικές δημοσκοπήσεις αναφέρουν 62 τοις εκατό των ενηλίκων των ΗΠΑ λαμβάνουν νέα στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης (Γκότφριντ και Σέιερ, 2016). Σε δημοσκόπηση του Δεκεμβρίου, 64 τοις εκατό των ενηλίκων των ΗΠΑ ανέφεραν ότι οι "επινοημένες ειδήσεις" έχουν προκαλέσει "μεγάλη σύγχυση" σχετικά με τα γεγονότα των σημερινών γεγονότων (κ.α., 2016). Οι κατασκευασμένες ιστορίες στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, που κυμαίνονται από σκόπιμη προπαγάνδα έως φάρσες και σάτιρα, συμβάλλουν σε αυτή τη σύγχυση, εκτός από τις σοβαρές επιπτώσεις στην παγκόσμια σταθερότητα. Σε αυτή την εργασία κατασκευάζουμε μοντέλα πρόβλεψης για να ταξινομήσουμε 130 χιλιάδες ειδησεογραφικές δημοσιεύσεις ως ύποπτες ή επαληθευμένες, και να προβλέψουμε τέσσερις υποτύπους ύποπτων ειδήσεων: σάτιρα, φάρσες, και προπαγάνδα. Δείχνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων που εκπαιδεύονται σε περιεχόμενο τουίτ και αλληλεπιδράσεις κοινωνικών δικτύων ξεπερνούν τα λεξικά μοντέλα. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με την ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η προσθήκη χαρακτηριστικών σύνταξης και γραμματικής στα μοντέλα μας δεν βελτιώνει την απόδοση. Η ενσωμάτωση γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών βελτιώνει τα αποτελέσματα ταξινόμησης, ωστόσο, τα χαρακτηριστικά κοινωνικής αλληλεπίδρασης είναι πιο ενημερωτικά για τον λεπτόκοκκο διαχωρισμό μεταξύ τεσσάρων τύπων ύποπτων δημοσιεύσεων ειδήσεων.', 'hu': 'A Pew kutatásai szerint az amerikai felnőttek 62 százaléka kapott híreket a közösségi médiában (Gottfried és Shearer, 2016). Egy decemberi felmérésben az amerikai felnőttek 64 százaléka azt mondta, hogy a "kitalált hírek" nagy zavart okoztak az aktuális események tényeivel kapcsolatban (Barthel et al., 2016). A közösségi médiában előállított történetek, amelyek a szándékos propagandától kezdve a csalásokig és a szatíriáig terjednek, hozzájárulnak ehhez a zavartsághoz, és komoly hatással vannak a globális stabilitásra. Ebben a munkában olyan prediktív modelleket építünk, amelyek segítségével 130 ezer híradót gyanúsnak vagy hitelesítettnek minősíthetünk, és a gyanús hírek négy altípusát jósoljuk meg: szatíra, átverés, kattintások és propaganda. Megmutatjuk, hogy a tweet tartalmakra és a közösségi hálózati interakciókra képzett neurális hálózati modellek felülmúlják a lexikális modelleket. A megtévesztés felismerésével kapcsolatos korábbi munkákkal ellentétben úgy találjuk, hogy a modellekhez való szintaxis és nyelvtani funkciók hozzáadása nem javítja a teljesítményt. A nyelvi tulajdonságok beépítése javítja az osztályozási eredményeket, azonban a közösségi interakciós funkciók leginkább tájékoztatóak a gyanús hírek négy típusának finomabb szemcséjű elkülönítéséhez.', 'it': 'Secondo i sondaggi Pew, il 62% degli adulti statunitensi riceve notizie sui social media (Gottfried e Shearer, 2016). In un sondaggio di dicembre, il 64% degli adulti statunitensi ha detto che le "notizie inventate" hanno causato una "grande confusione" sui fatti degli eventi attuali (Barthel et al., 2016). Le storie fabbricate nei social media, che vanno dalla propaganda deliberata alle bufale e alla satira, contribuiscono a questa confusione oltre ad avere gravi effetti sulla stabilità globale. In questo lavoro costruiamo modelli predittivi per classificare 130mila post di notizie sospette o verificate, e prediamo quattro sottotipi di notizie sospette: satira, bufala, clickbait e propaganda. Mostriamo che i modelli di rete neurale formati sui contenuti tweet e sulle interazioni dei social network superano i modelli lessicali. A differenza dei precedenti lavori sul rilevamento degli inganni, scopriamo che l\'aggiunta di sintassi e funzionalità grammaticali ai nostri modelli non migliora le prestazioni. Incorporare caratteristiche linguistiche migliora i risultati di classificazione, tuttavia, le funzionalità di interazione sociale sono più informative per una separazione più fine tra quattro tipi di post sospetti di notizie.', 'kk': 'АҚШ-тың 62 пайызын зерттеулері социаллық медиаға жаңалықтарды алады (Gottfried және Shearer, 2016). АҚШ-ның 64 пайызы қазіргі оқиғалар туралы "жаңалық жаңалықтар" деп айтты. Әлеуметтік медиақтағы жақсы оқиғалар, мәліметті пропагандадан басып жатқан және сайттарға көмектеседі, әлеуметтік стабиліктерге маңызды эффекттер жасау үшін бұл қиындығы Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз 130 мың жаңалық жіберілген немесе тексерілген жаңалық жіберілген үлгілерді құрып, төрт төрт күмкіндік жаңалық түрлерді - сайтар, жүгірткі, түрткі және пропаганда түсіндіру үші Біз тейт мазмұнына және әлеуметтік желінің интерфейстері лексикалық үлгілерден арналған неврал желінің үлгілерін көрсетедік. Біз үлгілерімізге синтаксис және грамматикалық мүмкіндіктерді қосу үлгілерімізге жақсы болмайды. Лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді құру үшін классификациялық нәтижелерін жақсартады, бірақ әлеуметтік үйлесімдік мүмкіндіктері төрт түрлі күмкіндік жаңалық жіберілген жаңалықтард', 'lt': "Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016).  In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Sukūrtos social in ės žiniasklaidos istorijos – nuo apgalvotos propagandos iki apgaulės ir satiro – taip pat prisideda prie šios painiavos ir daro rimtą poveikį pasauliniam stabilumui. Šiame darbe sukuriame prognozuojamus modelius, kad 130 tūkstančių naujienų postų būtų klasifikuojami kaip įtartinų arba patikrintų, ir prognozuojame keturis įtartinų naujienų potipius - satyrą, sukčiavimus, klikso kabiną ir propagandą. Mes rodome, kad nervinių tinklų modeliai, mokomi tweeto turiniu ir socialinio tinklo sąveika, yra didesni už leksinius modelius. Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Incorporating linguistic features improves classification results, however, social interaction features are most informative for finer-grained separation between four types of suspicious news posts.", 'mt': "L-istħarriġ dwar ir-riċerka bejn il-pari jirrapporta li 62 fil-mija tal-adulti fl-Istati Uniti jirċievu aħbarijiet dwar il-midja soċjali (Gottfried u Shearer, 2016). In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Storji manifatturati fil-midja soċjali, li jvarjaw minn propaganda deliberata sa ħżiena u satire, jikkontribwixxu għal din il-konfużjoni flimkien ma’ effetti serji fuq l-istabbiltà globali. In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Incorporating linguistic features improves classification results, however, social interaction features are most informative for finer-grained separation between four types of suspicious news posts.", 'mk': "Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016).  In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Создадените приказни во социјалните медиуми, од намерна пропаганда до измами и сатир, придонесуваат за оваа збунетост покрај тоа што имаат сериозни ефекти на глобалната стабилност. In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Incorporating linguistic features improves classification results, however, social interaction features are most informative for finer-grained separation between four types of suspicious news posts.", 'ml': "പ്യൂ ഗവേഷണത്തിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ 62 ശതമാനം മുതിര്\u200dന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയില്\u200d വിവരം കിട്ടുന്ന ഡിസംബര്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തതില്\u200d, 64 ശതമാനം മുതിര്\u200dന്നവര്\u200d പറഞ്ഞു 'ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d' ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ കാര്യത്തെപ്പറ്റി വലിയ കുഴപ് സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയിലെ കഥകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ആലോചിക്കുന്ന പ്രപഞ്ചനയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹോക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രഭാതത്തിലേക്കും മാറിയിരിക്കു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. 130,000 വാര്\u200dത്ത പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d സംശയിക്കുന്നതോ സംശയിക്കുന്നതോ എന്നോ ക്ലിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായ We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  വഞ്ചന കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് സിന്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. എങ്കിലും സാമൂഹിക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നാലു തരം സംശയാലുക്കളുടെ വാര്\u200dത", 'no': "Dette rapporterer at 62 prosent av amerikanske voksne får nyhetar på sosiale media (Gottfried og Shearer, 2016). In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabriserte historiar i sosiale medier, frå deliberate propaganda til brytingar og satir, bidrar til denne forvirkinga i tillegg til å ha alvorleg effektar på globalt stabilitet. I denne arbeida bygger vi foregåande modeller for å klassifisera 130 tusen nyhetsmeldingar som tvil eller verifisert, og foregå fire undertypar av tvil nyhetar - satir, fraksjonar, klikk og propaganda. Vi viser at neuralnettverksmodeller trengte på tweet-innhaldet og sosiale nettverksinteraksjonar utfører leksiske modeller. I motsetning til førre arbeid på oppdaging av deception, finn vi at legging til syntaks og grammatiske funksjonar til modelane våre ikkje forbetrar utviklinga. Inkorporasjon av lingviske funksjonar forbetrar klassifikasjonslinjeresultatet, men sosiale interaksjonsfunksjonar er mest informativt for finere korningar mellom fire typar suspicious news postar.", 'pl': 'Badania badawcze pew donoszą, że 62 procent dorosłych w USA otrzymuje wiadomości w mediach społecznościowych (Gottfried i Shearer, 2016). W grudniowym sondażu 64 procent osób dorosłych w USA powiedział, że "zmyślone wiadomości" spowodowały "duże zamieszanie" na temat faktów bieżących wydarzeń (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabrykowane historie w mediach społecznościowych, począwszy od celowej propagandy po oszustwa i satyrę, przyczyniają się do tego zamieszania oprócz poważnego wpływu na globalną stabilność. W niniejszej pracy budujemy modele predykcyjne klasyfikujące 130-tysiące wiadomości jako podejrzane lub zweryfikowane oraz przewidujemy cztery podtypy podejrzanych wiadomości: satyra, hoaxes, clickbait i propaganda. Pokazujemy, że modele sieci neuronowych treści tweetów i interakcji w sieciach społecznościowych przewyższają modele leksykalne. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac nad wykrywaniem oszustw, zauważamy, że dodanie funkcji składni i gramatyki do naszych modeli nie poprawia wydajności. Włączenie funkcji językowych poprawia wyniki klasyfikacji, jednak funkcje interakcji społecznej są najbardziej informacyjne dla precyzyjniejszego rozdzielenia czterech rodzajów podejrzanych postów wiadomościowych.', 'mn': 'АНУ-ын томчуудын 62 хувь нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн тухай мэдээлэл авдаг. АНУ-ын 12 сарын шалгалтын 64 хувь нь "бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээ" гэдэг нь одоогийн үйл явдлын үнэндээ "маш их алдагдал" болсон гэсэн юм. Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн сонирхолтой түүхүүд дэлхийн тогтвортой байдал дээр маш чухал нөлөө үзүүлэхээс хамаарч, сэтгэл хөдлөлт хүртэл үүсгэдэг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид 130 мянган мэдээллийн захирамжуудыг суурь ойлголттой эсвэл дүгнэж, 4 төрлийн суурь сэтгэл зүйн мэдээг таамагладаг. Бид тархины сүлжээний загваруудын тухай бичлэг болон нийгмийн сүлжээний харилцаа лексикийн загваруудыг илүүтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Өмнөх үйл ажиллагааг шийдвэрлэхэд бид синтаксис болон грамматикийн чадварыг загварт нэмэх нь үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахгүй байна. Хүмүүсийн хэлний чадварыг нэмэгдүүлэх нь хуваалцааны үр дүнг сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ нийгмийн харилцааны харилцааны чадварууд нь 4 төрлийн мэдээллийн тухай хамгийн сайжруулагддаг.', 'ro': 'Sondajele de cercetare Pew raportează că 62% dintre adulții americani primesc știri pe rețelele de socializare (Gottfried și Shearer, 2016). Într-un sondaj din decembrie, 64% dintre adulții americani au declarat că "știrile inventate" au cauzat o "mare confuzie" cu privire la faptele evenimentelor curente (Barthel et al., 2016). Poveștile fabricate în rețelele sociale, variind de la propagandă deliberată la farse și satiră, contribuie la această confuzie, pe lângă faptul că au efecte grave asupra stabilității globale. În această lucrare construim modele predictive pentru a clasifica 130 de mii de postări de știri ca suspecte sau verificate, și prezicem patru subtipuri de știri suspecte - satiră, farse, clickbait și propagandă. Aratăm că modelele de rețele neurale instruite pe conținutul tweet și interacțiunile rețelelor sociale depășesc modelele lexicale. Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare privind detectarea înșelăciunii, constatăm că adăugarea caracteristicilor sintaxei și gramaticale la modelele noastre nu îmbunătățește performanța. Integrarea caracteristicilor lingvistice îmbunătățește rezultatele clasificării, cu toate acestea, caracteristicile de interacțiune socială sunt cele mai informative pentru separarea mai fină între patru tipuri de posturi de știri suspecte.', 'sr': "Istraživačke ankete prijavljuju 62% odraslih SAD-a dobijaju vijesti o društvenim medijima (Gottfried i Shearer, 2016). U prosincu ispitivanja 64 posto odraslih SAD-a kaže da je 'izmišljena vijest' uzrokovala 'veliku zbunu' o činjenicama trenutnih događaja (Bartel et al., 2016). Fabricirane priče u društvenim medijima, od namjerne propagande do prevare i satire, doprinose ovoj zbunjenosti, dodatno da imaju ozbiljne učinke na globalnu stabilnost. U ovom poslu izgradimo predvidljive modele za klasifikaciju 130 hiljada novinskih postaja sumnjivih ili potvrđenih, i predviđamo četiri podvrste sumnjivih vijesti - satir, prevaranti, klik mamac i propaganda. Pokazujemo da modeli neuralne mreže obučeni na sadržaju tweeta i društvene mreže iznose leksičke modele. Za razliku od prethodnog rada o otkrivanju prevare, pronađemo da dodanje sintaksa i gramatičnih karakteristika našim modelima ne poboljšava performancu. Uključujući lingvističke funkcije poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije, međutim, socijalne interakcije su najinformativnije za bolje zrno razdvajanje između četiri vrste sumnjivih novinskih postaja.", 'si': "Pew Research polls report 62%. ඩිසෙම්බර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින්, අමෙරිකාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 64 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කිව්වා කියලා 'ලැබුණු වාර්තාවක්' කියලා 'ලොකු විදියට අ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාර කතාවක් තියෙනවා, සිද්ධිය ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩා වලින් සිද්ධියාවක් වලින් සිද්ධියාව මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අනුප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පොස්ටල් 130,000 කියලා සැකසුම් විදියට නැති විදියට සහ සැකසුම අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලය මොඩේල්ස් විදිහට ටිවිට් සාමාජික ජාලය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න අපිට හොයාගන්න විදියට පසුගිය වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි හොයාගන්නේ වාක්ෂාව සහ වාක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධ විදියට අපේ මො භාෂාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂය කරනවා නමුත්, සාමාජික සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ", 'so': 'Doorashooyinka baaritaanka ee pew waxay soo sheegayaan 62 boqolkiiba oo dadka waaweyn oo Mareykanka ah waxay warar ka helaan mitandada bulshada (Gottfried iyo Shearer, 2016). Doorashada 12aad 64 boqolkiiba dadka waaweyn oo Mareykanka ah ayaa sheegay in ‘news-sameynta’ ay sababtay qallooc badan oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha dhacdooyinka hadda (Barthel et al., 2016). Warqado la xiriiray oo ku saabsan shabakadda bulshada, oo ka soo baxay propagandada si qasab ah iyo faasiqyada, waxay ka qayb galaan qasnadahan, iyadoo aan saameyn weyn ku yeelanayn ku saabsan stabilnimada caalamiga. Shaqadan ayaannu ku dhisnaa qaabab la sii sheegayo si aan ugu qorno 130 kun oo warqadood oo warqad ah, sida mid shaki leh ama la xaqiijiyo, waxaana wax ka sii sheegaynaa afar nooc oo shaki ah oo ka mid ah warqada shakiyaha, faasaska, dhaqdhaqaaqa iyo propaganda. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaababka shabakadda caqliga ah lagu tababaray waxyaabaha internetka iyo Internetka shabakadda bulshada ay ka samaystaan tusaalooyin xeelad ah. Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa habboon in luqadda lagu kordhiyo uu beddelo fasalada fasaxda, habase yeeshee xiriirka bulshada ee ay u kala soocaan afarta warqadood oo shaki leh.', 'ta': 'பே ஆராய்ச்சி தேர்வுகள் 62 சதவிகிதம் அமெரிக்காவில் மிகப்பெரியவர்கள் சமூக ஊடகங்களில் செய்திகள் கிடைக்கும் (2016 கோட்ட ஒரு டிசைஸ் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பில், 64 சதவிகிதம் பெரியவர்கள் கூறினார் Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  இந்த வேலையில் நாம் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை 130,000 செய்திகளை சந்தேகமாக அல்லது உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்காக வகுப்படுத்துவதற்காகவும், சந்தேகமான நான்கு உப வக We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  தவறான கண்டுபிடிப்பில் முந்தைய வேலை மாறுபட்டால், நம் மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒத்திசைநிரல் மற்றும் கிராமான் குணங்களை சேர் மொழிக்குறிப்பு குணங்கள் வகுப்பு முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, எனினும், சமூக இடைவெளிப்பாடு குணங்கள் நான்கு வகையான செய்திகளுக்கு இடையே வ', 'ur': "پیو تحقیقات پولس ایالات متحدہ میں سے 62 فیصد بزرگ لوگ سوسیل میڈیا میں خبر حاصل کرتے ہیں (Gottfried اور Shearer, 2016). ایک ڈیسمبر پلیٹ میں، آمریکا بڑھنے والوں کے 64 فیصد نے کہا کہ 'مکمل خبریں' نے اپنا موقع کے حقیقت کے بارے میں 'بہت بڑی غلطی' بنایا ہے۔ سوسیل میڈیا میں لذت والی کہانیاں ہیں، مطلب پراپاگنڈ سے جذب اور سٹیر تک، یہ غلطی کے علاوہ گرامی ثبات پر سخت اثرات رکھنے کے لئے اضافہ کرتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے 130 ہزار اخبار پوسٹ کو شک یا تصدیق کرنے کے لئے پیش بینی موڈل بنایا ہے اور چار سو-ٹیرے شک اخبار کی پیش بینی کریں - سایٹر، غروب، کلیک بیٹ اور پروپاگنڈ۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ نورول نیٹ ورک موڈل ٹیوٹ منڈنی اور سوسیال نیٹ ورک اپنا انتقال لکسیکل موڈل سے زیادہ استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ فریب شناسی کے بارے میں اگلے کام کے مطابق، ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ہمارے مدلکوں میں سینٹکس اور گراماری فریب اضافہ کرنے کا کام بہتر نہیں ہوتا۔ زبان تعلیمات میں شامل ہونے کی تعلیمات کا نتیجہ تقسیم ہوتا ہے، لیکن سوسیال تعلیمات کی تعلیمات چار قسموں شک دار خبر پوسٹوں کے درمیان بہت اچھی دانہ تقسیم کرنے کے لئے بہت معلوم ہیں.", 'sv': 'Pew-undersökningar visar att 62 procent av de amerikanska vuxna får nyheter på sociala medier (Gottfried och Shearer, 2016). I en opinionsundersökning i december sade 64 procent av de amerikanska vuxna att "påhittade nyheter" har orsakat en "stor förvirring" om fakta om aktuella händelser (Barthel et al., 2016). Påverkade berättelser i sociala medier, allt från avsiktlig propaganda till bluff och satir, bidrar till denna förvirring förutom att ha allvarliga effekter på den globala stabiliteten. I detta arbete bygger vi prediktiva modeller för att klassificera 130 tusen nyhetsinlägg som misstänkta eller verifierade, och förutspår fyra undertyper av misstänkta nyheter - satir, bluffar, klickbait och propaganda. Vi visar att neurala nätverksmodeller utbildade på tweet innehåll och sociala nätverksinteraktioner överträffar lexikala modeller. Till skillnad från tidigare arbete med att upptäcka bedrägerier, finner vi att lägga till syntax och grammatik funktioner i våra modeller inte förbättrar prestanda. Att införliva språkliga funktioner förbättrar klassificeringsresultaten, men sociala interaktionsfunktioner är mest informativa för en finkornig separation mellan fyra typer av misstänkta nyhetsinlägg.', 'ms': "Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016).  In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Mengangkut ciri-ciri bahasa meningkatkan keputusan klasifikasi, bagaimanapun, ciri-ciri interaksi sosial adalah paling maklumat untuk pemisahan yang lebih baik-benih antara empat jenis pos berita yang mencurigakan.", 'uz': "Tasdiqlash vositalari AQSHdan 62 foiz yozuvchilar jamiyat medya haqida xabar beradi (2016 Gotfried va Shearer). Dekabi polls ichida, AQSHdan 64 foiz yozuvchilar aytganda, yangi xabar yaratilgan xabar (Barthel et al., 2016) haqida juda katta ajoyib gapiradi deb aytadi. Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  Bu ishda biz shaklga yoki haqiqiqatga 130 ming xabar postlarini tayyorlash uchun kutilgan modellarni yaramiz va to'rtta shaklga ma'lumot turlarini tezlashtiramiz - tashqi, xos, tugmalar va propaganda. Biz Twitt tarmoqning tarkibi modellari va shamol tarmoq interfektlarida o'rganishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Leksikal modellarini bajaradi. Biz modellarimizning birinchi ishni aniqlashga o'xshagan o'xshash ishni o'ylaymiz, biz modellarimizning sintaks va grammatik imkoniyatlarini qoʻshish imkoniyatini bajarishimiz mumkin. Tilni ko'paytirish imkoniyatlarini darajalashtirish natijalarini bajaradi, ammo, shaxsiy interfektning xususiyatlarini to'rt turli xabar postlariga ajratish uchun juda ko'p ma'lumot.", 'vi': 'Báo cáo của đội thăm dò Bắc Cực 62 phần trăm người lớn Hoa Kỳ có tin tức về các phương tiện xã hội (Gottfried và Shearer, Ngực). Trong một cuộc khảo sát vào tháng ba, 6m phần trăm người lớn Mỹ nói rằng "tin tưởng" đã gây ra một\'rất nhiều sự nhầm lẫn\'về các thực tế của sự kiện hiện tại (Barthel et al., giá trị). Những câu chuyện được bịa đặt trong các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội, từ tuyên truyền chủ ý tới trò lừa đảo và hài hước, góp phần gây ra sự hỗn loạn này ngoài những tác động nghiêm trọng lên sự ổn định to àn cầu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi xây dựng các mô hình dự đoán để phân loại 130 nghìn tin đồn như đáng ngờ hoặc kiểm tra, và dự đoán bốn mẫu tin đáng ngờ... mỉa mai, lừa đảo, ngôn ngữ và tuyên truyền. Chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình mạng thần kinh được huấn luyện về nội dung của tweet và các hệ thống tương tác xã hội vượt qua hệ thống ngôn ngữ. Không giống như công việc phát hiện lừa dối trước, chúng tôi thấy rằng việc thêm các tính năng cú pháp và ngữ pháp vào các mẫu không cải thiện hiệu suất. Sự nhập vào các tính chất ngôn ngữ cải thiện kết quả phân loại, tuy nhiên, các tính năng giao tiếp xã hội là rất hữu ích cho sự phân biệt sâu sắc giữa bốn loại tin tức đáng ngờ.', 'da': "Pew-undersøgelser viser, at 62 procent af de voksne i USA får nyheder på sociale medier (Gottfried og Shearer, 2016). I en meningsmåling i december sagde 64 procent af de amerikanske voksne, at 'opdigtede nyheder' har forårsaget en 'stor forvirring' om fakta om aktuelle begivenheder (Barthel et al., 2016). Fremstillede historier i sociale medier, der spænder fra bevidst propaganda til snyd og satire, bidrager til denne forvirring ud over at have alvorlige virkninger på den globale stabilitet. I dette arbejde bygger vi forudsigende modeller til at klassificere 130 tusinde nyhedsindlæg som mistænkelige eller verificerede, og forudsige fire undertyper af mistænkelige nyheder - satire, snyd, klikbait og propaganda. Vi viser, at neurale netværksmodeller, der er trænet i tweet-indhold og sociale netværksinteraktioner, overgår leksikalske modeller. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde med detektering af bedrageri finder vi, at tilføjelse af syntaks- og grammatikfunktioner til vores modeller ikke forbedrer ydeevnen. Inddragelse af sproglige funktioner forbedrer klassificeringsresultaterne, men sociale interaktionsfunktioner er mest informative for finere adskillelse mellem fire typer mistænkelige nyhedsindlæg.", 'bg': 'Проучванията показват, че 62% от възрастните в САЩ получават новини в социалните медии (Готфрид и Шиарер, 2016). В проучване през декември 64% от възрастните в САЩ заявиха, че "измислените новини" са причинили "голямо объркване" относно фактите от текущите събития (Бартел и др., 2016). Създадените истории в социалните медии, вариращи от преднамерена пропаганда до измами и сатира, допринасят за това объркване, освен че имат сериозни последици върху глобалната стабилност. В тази работа изграждаме прогнозни модели за класифициране на 130 хиляди новинарски постове като подозрителни или проверени, както и за прогнозиране на четири подтипа подозрителни новини - сатира, измами, кликбейт и пропаганда. Показваме, че моделите на невронни мрежи, обучени за съдържанието на туитове и взаимодействията в социалните мрежи, превъзхождат лексикалните модели. За разлика от предишната работа по откриване на измами, ние откриваме, че добавянето на функции за синтаксис и граматика към нашите модели не подобрява ефективността. Включването на лингвистични характеристики подобрява резултатите от класификацията, но характеристиките на социалното взаимодействие са най-информативни за по-фино разделяне между четири вида подозрителни новинарски постове.', 'nl': "Pew research polls rapporteren 62 procent van de Amerikaanse volwassenen krijgt nieuws op sociale media (Gottfried en Shearer, 2016). In een poll van december zei 64 procent van de Amerikaanse volwassenen dat 'verzonnen nieuws' een 'grote hoeveelheid verwarring' heeft veroorzaakt over de feiten van de huidige gebeurtenissen (Barthel et al., 2016). Vervangende verhalen in sociale media, variërend van opzettelijke propaganda tot hoaxes en satire, dragen bij aan deze verwarring en hebben ernstige gevolgen voor de wereldwijde stabiliteit. In dit werk bouwen we voorspellende modellen om 130-duizend nieuwsberichten te classificeren als verdacht of geverifieerd, en voorspellen we vier subtypes van verdacht nieuws: satire, hoaxes, clickbait en propaganda. We laten zien dat neurale netwerkmodellen die zijn getraind op tweet content en sociale netwerkinteracties beter presteren dan lexicale modellen. In tegenstelling tot vorig werk over misleidingsdetectie, vinden we dat het toevoegen van syntaxis- en grammaticafuncties aan onze modellen de prestaties niet verbetert. Het opnemen van taalkundige kenmerken verbetert de classificatieresultaten, maar sociale interactie functies zijn het meest informatief voor een fijnere scheiding tussen vier soorten verdachte nieuwsberichten.", 'hr': "Istraživačke ankete prijavljuju 62% odraslih SAD-a dobijaju vijesti o društvenim medijima (Gottfried i Shearer, 2016). U prosincu ispitivanja 64 posto odraslih SAD-a izjavili su da je 'izmišljena vijest' uzrokovala 'veliku zbunjenost' o činjenicama trenutnih događaja (Barthel et al., 2016). Obožavali su priče u društvenim medijima, od namjerne propagande do sakupljanja i satira, doprinose ovoj zbuni dodatno imati ozbiljne učinke na globalnu stabilnost. U ovom poslu izgradimo predvidne modele za klasifikaciju 130 tisuća vijesti kao sumnjive ili potvrđene, i predviđamo četiri podvrste sumnjivih vijesti - satire, prevare, klik mamac i propagande. Pokazujemo da modeli neuralne mreže obučeni na sadržaju tweeta i interakcijama društvene mreže iznosi leksičke modele. Za razliku od prethodnog rada na otkrivanju prevare, nalazimo da dodanje sintaksa i gramatičnih karakteristika našim modelima ne poboljšava učinkovitost. Uključujući jezičke funkcije poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije, međutim, karakteristike socijalne interakcije su najinformativnije za bolje zrno razdvajanje između četiri vrste sumnjivih novinskih postaja.", 'ko': "퓨리서치센터의 여론조사에 따르면 미국 성인의 62%가 소셜미디어에서 뉴스(Gottfried and Shearer, 2016)를 받았다.12월 한 여론조사에서 미국 성인의 64%는'픽션 뉴스'가 시사 사실에'극심한 곤혹'(Barthel 등, 2016)을 초래했다고 밝혔다.소셜미디어에서 꾸며낸 이야기는 의도적인 선전부터 악작극과 풍자까지 전 세계 안정에 심각한 영향을 미치는 것 외에 이런 혼란을 심화시켰다.이 작업에서 우리는 13만 개의 뉴스 게시물을 의심스럽거나 실증된 것으로 분류하고 네 개의 서브 유형의 의심스러운 뉴스인 풍자, 악작극, 미끼 클릭, 홍보를 예측하는 예측 모델을 세웠다.우리는 트위터 내용과 소셜네트워크서비스의 상호작용을 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크 모델이 어휘 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.이전에 사기 검측에 관한 작업과 달리 우리는 모델에 문법과 문법 특징을 첨가하면 성능을 향상시킬 수 없다는 것을 발견했다.언어 특징을 결합하면 분류 결과를 개선할 수 있지만 사교 상호작용 특징은 네 가지 의심스러운 뉴스 게시물 간의 세립도 분리에 가장 유용하다.", 'id': "Pew penelitian laporan 62 persen orang dewasa AS mendapat berita tentang media sosial (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016). Dalam penyelidikan bulan Desember, 64 persen orang dewasa AS mengatakan bahwa 'berita yang dibuat' telah menyebabkan 'banyak kebingungan' tentang fakta peristiwa saat ini (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa model jaringan saraf dilatih pada konten tweet dan interaksi jaringan sosial melebihi model lexik. Unlike previous work on deception detection, we find that adding syntax and grammar features to our models does not improve performance.  Memasukkan fitur bahasa memperbaiki hasil klasifikasi, bagaimanapun, fitur interaksi sosial adalah paling informatif untuk pemisahan yang lebih baik antara empat jenis pos berita yang mencurigakan.", 'de': 'Pew Research Umfragen berichten von 62 Prozent der US-Erwachsenen erhalten Nachrichten in sozialen Medien (Gottfried und Shearer, 2016). In einer Dezember-Umfrage sagte 64 Prozent der US-Erwachsenen, dass "erfundene Nachrichten" eine "große Menge Verwirrung" über die Fakten der aktuellen Ereignisse verursacht haben (Barthel et al., 2016). Zu dieser Verwirrung tragen erfundene Geschichten in den sozialen Medien bei, die von absichtlicher Propaganda über Hoaxes bis hin zu Satire reichen und gravierende Auswirkungen auf die globale Stabilität haben. In dieser Arbeit erstellen wir Vorhersagemodelle, um 130-tausend Nachrichten als verdächtig oder verifiziert zu klassifizieren und vier Untertypen verdächtiger Nachrichten wie Satire, Hoaxes, Clickbait und Propaganda vorherzusagen. Wir zeigen, dass neuronale Netzwerkmodelle, die auf Tweet-Inhalten und Interaktionen in sozialen Netzwerken trainiert werden, lexikalische Modelle übertreffen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten zur Täuschungserkennung stellen wir fest, dass das Hinzufügen von Syntax- und Grammatikfunktionen zu unseren Modellen die Leistung nicht verbessert. Die Einbeziehung sprachlicher Merkmale verbessert die Klassifizierungsergebnisse, jedoch sind soziale Interaktionsfunktionen am informativsten für eine feinere Trennung zwischen vier Arten verdächtiger Nachrichten.', 'sw': "Uchaguzi wa utafiti unaripoti asilimia 62 ya watu wazima wa Marekani wanapata habari kwenye mitandao ya kijamii (Gottfried na Shearer, 2016). Katika uchaguzi wa Desemba, asilimia 64 ya watu wazima wa Marekani walisema kwamba 'habari zilizotengenezwa' zimesababisha 'utata mkubwa' kuhusu ukweli wa matukio ya sasa (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  Katika kazi hii tunatengeneza mifano ya kutabiri katika kutangaza makala 130,000 za habari kama zile za mashaka au zilizothibitishwa, na kutabiri aina nne za habari zenye mashaka - uchochezi, hosi, kubonyesha baiti na propaganda. Tunaonyesha kuwa mitandao ya kijamii imefunzwa kwenye maudhui ya twita na mitandao ya kijamii yanafanya mifano ya lexico. Tofauti na kazi iliyopita kuhusu kutambua udanganyifu, tunagundua kuwa kuongeza viungo vya kodi na viungo vya grafu kwa mifano yetu haukuboresha utendaji. Tafsiri za lugha zinazozidi kuboresha matokeo ya kutangaza, hata hivyo, vipengele vya mahusiano ya kijamii ni taarifa zaidi kwa ajili ya kutenganishwa kwa vizuri kati ya aina nne ya makala za habari zinazotia mashaka.", 'tr': 'Şahsy araştyrma sapaglary ABŞ\'nyň 62%-iniň uly adamlaryň sosial mediýalarynda haberler berilýär (Gottfried we Shearer, 2016). Dekabr sapagynda, ABŞ\'nyň 64 % uly adamlaryň "täzelikler üýtgeden" häzirki bolup geçýän hadysalaryň (Bartel et al., 2016-njy) hakynda \'gaty karmaşyk\' bolandygyny a ýtdy. Sosyal medýýatlarynda iň söýgüli hekaýalar, düşünýän propaganda we alçaklardan bäri, dünýädäki stabiliýa üstünde çykyşlyk täsirler bolmagynyň üstünde bu çaşyrylyga kömekleýär. Bu işde 130 müňe täze taýýarlar ýa-da şübheli ýa-da geçirmek üçin öngörümli nusgalar inşa edýäris we dört sanly täzelikli täzelikler öngörüp bilýäris - setir, sahypalar, klikçi we propaganda. Biz týuter içerisinde bilinmeli nuýral aňlyk nuýdanlarynyň leksiýaly nuýdanlaryndan üstün tutuldygyny görkeýäris. Yalançylyk tanyşynda öňki işiň ýaly, nusgalarymyza sintaks we gramatik özelliklerimizi eklemeýändigini düşünýäris. Dil özelliklerini guralýan dört hili şübheli täzelikler arasynda dört hili şübheli täzelikler üçin sosialy etkileşim üýtgetmeli täzelikleri gowurar.', 'am': 'የፓይ ምርጫዎች የአሜሪካ ድካማዎች 62 በመቶ ዜና በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ (Gottfried እና Shearer 2016)፡፡ በዲሴምበር ጥምቀት ውስጥ 64 በመቶ የአሜሪካ ድካማዎች “የተደረገውን ዜና” ስለሁኑ ጉዳዮች ውጤቶች “ብዙን ጥላቻ” እንዳደረገ ነው አሉ፡፡ በአማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ የተሰኘ ታሪኮች፣ ከአሳማሚ ፕሮግራፓንዳን እና ማላገጫ በተለየ፣ የዓለማዊ ደጋግነት ላይ የሚያስጨንቀው ግንኙነት በማድረግ ግንኙነት አቀረበ፡፡ In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  በትዊተር ጥያቄ እና ማኅበራዊ ጥያቄ ግንኙነት ላይ የተጠቃሚ የናውስትር መረብ ዘዴዎችን ለሌክሲካዊ ሞላት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የሽንገላ ማግኘት ላይ የሚደረግ ሥራ፣ ለሞዴላዎቻችን ሲንካስብ እና የግራማ ምርጫዎችን መጨመር የራሳቸውን ስርዓት ማድረግ አይሻልም፡፡ Incorporating linguistic features improves classification results, however, social interaction features are most informative for finer-grained separation between four types of suspicious news posts.', 'sq': "Sondazhet e studimeve të Pew raportojnë se 62 përqind e të rriturve të SHBA marrin lajme mbi mediat sociale (Gottfried dhe Shearer, 2016). Në një sondazh të dhjetorit, 64 përqind e të rriturve të SHBA thanë se 'lajmet e shpikura' kanë shkaktuar një 'shumë konfuzion' rreth fakteve të ngjarjeve aktuale (Barthel et al., 2016). Historitë e prodhuara në media sociale, që shkojnë nga propaganda e qëllimshme deri në mashtrime dhe satire, kontribuojnë në këtë konfuzion përveç të kenë efekte serioze mbi stabilitetin global. In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  Ne tregojmë se modelet e rrjetit nervor të trajnuar në përmbajtjen e tweetit dhe ndërveprimet e rrjetit shoqëror mbikalojnë modelet lexike. Ndryshe nga puna e mëparshme për zbulimin e mashtrimit, ne gjejmë se shtimi i sintaksave dhe karakteristikave gramatike në modelet tona nuk përmirëson performancën. Përfshirja e karakteristikave gjuhësore përmirëson rezultatet e klasifikimit, megjithatë, karakteristikat e ndërveprimit shoqëror janë më informative për ndarje më të holla midis katër llojeve të postimeve të dyshimtë të lajmeve.", 'hy': "Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016).  In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում ստեղծված պատմությունները, սկսած խորհրդավոր պրոպագանդայից մինչև խաբկանքներ և սաթիր, ներդրում են այս խառնաշփոթի մեջ, ավելին, որ լուրջ ազդեցություններ ունեն գլոբալ կայունության վրա: Այս աշխատանքում մենք կառուցում ենք կանխատեսողական մոդելներ, որպեսզի 130 հազար նորություններ դասակարգենք որպես կասկածելի կամ ստուգելի, և կանխատեսում ենք չորս կասկածելի նորությունների ենթատեսակներ՝ սաթիր, խաբեներ, կլինիկներ և պրոպագանդա: We show that neural network models trained on tweet content and social network interactions outperform lexical models.  Ի տարբերություն նախորդ խաբեության հայտնաբերման աշխատանքին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ սինտաքսի և գրամական հատկությունների ավելացումը մեր մոդելներին չի բարելավում արդյունքը: Լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների ներառումը բարելավում է դասակարգման արդյունքները, սակայն սոցիալական փոխազդեցության առանձնահատկությունները ամենաինֆորմատիվ են ավելի լավ հատուկ բաժանման համար կասկածելի նորությունների չորս տեսակների միջև:", 'af': "Nie-ondersoek-opsies rapporteer 62 persent van die Amerikaanse oudstes nuus op sosiale media (Gottfried en Shearer, 2016). In 'n Desember poll het 64 persent van die Amerikaanse grootmense gesê dat 'gemaak nuus'  'n 'groot verdwaling' veroorsaak het oor die fakte van huidige gebeurtenis (Barthel et al., 2016). Gevorderde stories in sosiale media, vanaf die gedeeltelike propaganda tot verhoekings en satire, bydra dit aan hierdie verdwaling in bygewing tot ernstige effekte op globale stabiliteit. In hierdie werk bou ons voorspoediewe modele om 130 duisend nuuspos te klassifiseer as suspicious of bevestig, en voorskou vier sub-tipes suspicious nuuskies - satire, hoeks, kliekbaat en propaganda. Ons wys dat neuralnetwerk modele op tweet inhoud en sosiale netwerk interaksies uitvoer leksiese modele. Ongelyks soos vorige werk op verleiding beskrywing, vind ons dat byvoeg sintaks en grammatiese funksies aan ons modele nie verbeter funksies nie. Die inkorporering van lingwisiese funksies verbeter klasifikasie resultate, maar sosiale interaksie funksies is mees informatief vir finer-graad skeiding tussen vier tipes suspicious nuuspos.", 'az': 'Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016). Aralıq məlumatında, ABŞ yetişkinlərin 64%-inin "uydurma xəbərləri" a ğımdaki olaraq "çox qarışıqlıq" olaraq olduqlarını söylədi. Sosyal mediyalarda sözlü hekayələr, müzakirə propagandından qənimətlərə və satirəyə qədər, dünya sərbəst istiqamətlərinə ciddi etkisi olmaq üçün bu xəstəliyə səbəb edir. Bu işdə 130 min xəbər məlumatlarını şübhəyə və təsdiqlənmək üçün tədbir modelleri inşa edirik və dörd aşağı şübhəyə düşən xəbərlər təmin edirik - satir, sahələr, klik yem və propaganda. Biz göstəririk ki, tweet içərisində təhsil edilmiş nöral ağ modellərinin və sosial ağ bağlantılarının leksik modellərindən daha çox yüksək. Əvvəlki yalançılıq keşfini tapmaq üçün, modellərimizə sintaks və grammatik xüsusiyyətlərini əlavə etmək mümkün deyildir. Dil fəaliyyətlərini birləşdirmək klasifikasiya sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırır, amma sosial müxtəlif fəaliyyətlər dörd cür şübhə edən xəbər nöqtələri arasındakı ən yaxşı dənli ayrılıq üçün çox informativdir.', 'bn': 'পিউ গবেষণা নির্বাচনে মার্কিন যুক্তরাষ্ট্রের ৬২ শতাংশ বয়স্ক সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে সংবাদ পেয়েছে (গোট্ফ্রিদ ডিসেম্বরের একটি নির্বাচনে আমেরিকার ৬৪ শতাংশ প্রাপ্তবয়স্ক বলেছেন যে ‘তৈরি করা সংবাদ’ বর্তমান ঘটনার ঘটনা সম্পর্কে বিভ্রান্তিতে বিভ্রান্তির Fabricated stories in social media, ranging from deliberate propaganda to hoaxes and satire, contributes to this confusion in addition to having serious effects on global stability.  In this work we build predictive models to classify 130 thousand news posts as suspicious or verified, and predict four sub-types of suspicious news - satire, hoaxes, clickbait and propaganda.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল টুইটের বিষয়বস্তু এবং সামাজিক যোগাযোগ নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে প্রশিক্ষণ প প্রতারণা সন্ধানের পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, আমরা দেখতে পাই যে আমাদের মডেলের সাথে সিন ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বিষয়গুলো ক্লাসফিকেশনের ফলাফল উন্নত করে, তবে সামাজিক যোগাযোগের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী চারটি ধরনের সন্দেহী সংবাদ পোস্', 'bs': "Istraživačke ankete prijavljuju 62% odraslih SAD-a dobijaju vijesti o društvenim medijima (Gottfried i Shearer, 2016). U prosincu ispitivanja 64 posto odraslih SAD-a kaže da je 'izmišljena vijest' uzrokovala 'veliku zbunjenost' o činjenicama trenutnih događaja (Barthel et al., 2016). Fabricirane priče u društvenim medijima, od namjerne propagande do prevare i satire, doprinose ovoj zbunji, dodatno imati ozbiljne učinke na globalnu stabilnost. U ovom poslu izgradimo predvidljive modele za klasifikaciju 130 tisuća novinskih postaja kao sumnjive ili potvrđene, i predviđamo četiri podvrste sumnjivih vijesti - satir, prevaranti, klik mamac i propaganda. Pokazujemo da modeli neuralne mreže obučeni na sadržaju tweeta i interakcijama socijalne mreže iznose leksičke modele. Za razliku od prethodnog rada o otkrivanju prevare, nalazimo da dodanje sintaksa i gramatičnih karakteristika našim modelima ne poboljšava učinkovitost. Uključujući lingvističke funkcije poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije, međutim, karakteristike socijalne interakcije su najinformativnije za bolje zrno razdvajanje između četiri vrste sumnjivih novinskih postaja.", 'ca': "Pesquises de Pew diuen que el 62% dels adults dels EUA reben notícies sobre els mitjans socials (Gottfried i Shearer, 2016). In a December poll, 64 percent of U.S. adults said that 'made-up news' has caused a 'great deal of confusion' about the facts of current events (Barthel et al., 2016).  Les històries fabricades als mitjans socials, des de propaganda deliberada fins a enganys i satèries, contribueixen a aquesta confusió a més de tenir efectes seriosos sobre l'estabilitat global. En aquest treball construïm models preditius per classificar 130.000 publicacions de notícies com sospitoses o verificades, i predir quatre sub types de notícies sospitoses - satire, enganys, clickbait i propaganda. Mostrem que els models de xarxa neural entrenats en continguts de tweet i interaccions socials superen els models lèxics. A diferència de la feina anterior sobre la detecció de fraude, descobrim que afegir característiques de sintaxis i gramàtiques als nostres models no millora el rendiment. Incorporar característiques lingüístices millora els resultats de la classificació, però les característiques d'interacció social són més informatives per a separar més fins entre quatre tipus de posts sospitosos.", 'cs': 'Výzkumné průzkumy hlásí, že 62 procent dospělých v USA dostává zprávy na sociálních médiích (Gottfried a Shearer, 2016). V prosincovém průzkumu 64 procent dospělých v USA uvedlo, že "vymyšlené zprávy" způsobily "velké množství zmatku" ohledně aktuálních událostí (Barthel et al., 2016). Vymyšlené příběhy v sociálních médiích, od záměrné propagandy až po podvody a satiru, přispívají k tomuto zmatku kromě vážných dopadů na globální stabilitu. V této práci vytváříme prediktivní modely pro klasifikaci 130 tisíc zpravodajských příspěvků jako podezřelých nebo ověřených a předpovídáme čtyři podtypy podezřelých zpráv: satira, hoaxe, clickbait a propaganda. Ukazujeme, že modely neuronových sítí trénované na obsahu tweetů a interakcích sociálních sítí překonávají lexikální modely. Na rozdíl od předchozích prací na detekci klamů zjišťujeme, že přidání funkcí syntaxe a gramatiky do našich modelů nezlepšuje výkon. Začlenění jazykových funkcí zlepšuje klasifikaci výsledků, nicméně funkce sociální interakce jsou nejvíce informativní pro jemnější oddělení mezi čtyřmi typy podezřelých zpravodajských příspěvků.', 'fi': 'Pew-tutkimusten mukaan 62 prosenttia yhdysvaltalaisista aikuisista saa uutisia sosiaalisessa mediassa (Gottfried ja Shearer, 2016). Joulukuun kyselyssä 64 prosenttia yhdysvaltalaisista aikuisista sanoi, että "keksityt uutiset" ovat aiheuttaneet "paljon sekaannusta" ajankohtaisten tapahtumien tosiseikoista (Barthel et al., 2016). Sosiaalisessa mediassa tehdyt tarinat, jotka vaihtelevat tarkoituksellisesta propagandasta huijauksiin ja satiiriin, lisäävät sekaannusta sen lisäksi, että niillä on vakavia vaikutuksia maailmanlaajuiseen vakauteen. Tässä työssä rakennamme ennakoivia malleja 130 000 uutispostauksen luokitteluun epäilyttäviksi tai todennetuiksi ja ennustamme epäilyttävien uutisten neljää alatyyppiä - satiiria, huijauksia, klikkaussaittia ja propagandaa. Osoitamme, että tweet-sisältöön ja sosiaalisen verkoston vuorovaikutukseen koulutetut neuroverkkomallit suoriutuvat sanastomalleja paremmin. Toisin kuin aiemmat petoksentunnistustyöt, huomaamme, että syntaksi- ja kieliopiominaisuuksien lisääminen malleihimme ei paranna suorituskykyä. Kielellisten ominaisuuksien sisällyttäminen parantaa luokitustuloksia, mutta sosiaalisen vuorovaikutuksen ominaisuudet ovat informatiivisimpia neljän epäilyttävän uutispostauksen hienojakoisempaan erottamiseen.', 'et': 'Pew uuringute küsitluste kohaselt saab 62% USA täiskasvanutest sotsiaalmeedias uudiseid (Gottfried ja Shearer, 2016). Detsembri küsitluses ütles 64 protsenti Ameerika Ühendriikide täiskasvanutest, et "väljamõeldud uudised" on põhjustanud "suurt segadust" praeguste sündmuste faktide osas (Barthel jt., 2016). Sotsiaalmeedias loodud lood alates tahtlikust propagandast kuni pettuste ja satiirini aitavad kaasa sellele segadusele lisaks tõsisele mõjule globaalsele stabiilsusele. Selles töös ehitame prognoosivaid mudeleid 130 tuhande uudistepostituse liigitamiseks kahtlasteks või kinnitatuks ning nelja kahtlaste uudiste alamtüüpi prognoosimiseks - satiir, pettused, klõpsateid ja propaganda. Näitame, et säutsu sisu ja sotsiaalvõrgustike interaktsioonide kohta koolitatud närvivõrgumudelid ületavad leksikaalseid mudeleid. Erinevalt varasematest pettuste tuvastamise tööst leiame, et süntaksi ja grammatika funktsioonide lisamine meie mudelitele ei paranda jõudlust. Keeleliste omaduste kaasamine parandab klassifitseerimistulemusi, kuid sotsiaalse suhtluse omadused on kõige informatiivsemad nelja tüüpi kahtlaste uudistepostite täpsemaks eraldamiseks.', 'fa': 'گزارش\u200cهای تحقیقات کمی ۲۶ درصد بزرگسالان آمریکا در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی خبر می\u200cگیرند (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016). در یک امتحان دسامبر، ۶۴ درصد بزرگسالان آمریکا گفتند که «اخبار ساخته» باعث شده که حقیقت حادثه\u200cهای فعلی «آلوده\u200cای بزرگ» باشد. داستان\u200cهای مطلوب در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، از طریق تغییر\u200cاندازه\u200cای تا تغییر\u200cاندازه\u200cها و سایت\u200cها، در اضافه\u200cای که اثرات جدی بر ثبات جهانی داشته باشد، به این اختلاف کمک می\u200cکند. در این کار ما مدل پیش بینی ساختیم تا ۱۳۰ هزار پست اخبار را به عنوان شک یا تصدیق کنیم، و چهار نوع زیر نوع مظنونی را پیش بینی کنیم - سایت، تفریح، طعم و پروپاگاندا. ما نشان می دهیم که مدلهای شبکه عصبی روی محتوای توئیت و ارتباطات شبکه اجتماعی بیشتر از مدلهای لکسیکی انجام می دهند. برخلاف کارهای قبلی در مورد شناسایی فریب، پیدا می\u200cکنیم که اضافه کردن ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکس و گرامیک به مدل\u200cهای ما عملکرد را بهتر نمی\u200cکند. با این حال، ویژه\u200cهای تعامل اجتماعی بیشترین اطلاعات برای جدا کردن دانه\u200cهای بهتر بین چهار نوع از پست خبرهای مظنونی است.', 'jv': 'Poko perusahaan panjur-panjur urip 75% usan usah marino oleh pawaran utawa sak alam menyang kapan media sotiki (Gofttrid lan Chearer, 2011). Nang mbengawe Desamber, 64% n\' uwong sing ngawe mariken banget sabanjur \'kelengawe barang-bakal\' kiye mbok \'hal-hal kanggo nganggo perkaraan\' kanggo nganggo perkaraan operasi sing ngendalikke rerayano (barthol et al, 2011). Awak dhéwé éntuk ing rak sing nêmêng komunitas, sampek tanggal nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan lan ijol-ijol, dadi nambah kejahatan iki ngono nganggep sistem sing gawe nguasai sing bakal terus sabêr-sabêr global. Nang gawar iki trus menehi perbudhakan maneh kanggo Kelisa Tarjamahan kanggo ngerasah basa manut karo hal-hal ujarane, nggawe ngerasah barang apat-types apat kanggo ngerasah jutaan apat- sater, tahirke, dibujarane lan perbudhakan. Awak dhéwé menehi model alat sing ditambah gambaran tentang karo Mbalat online lan tambahan hukum sing bisa basa oleh model. Awak dhéwé éntuk barêng ngêp kuwi kesempatan pangan, kita mbukaké nambah layang seneng karo nggawe barang nggambar barang sampek model kita ora bisa nêmên ngerasakno. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': "Sauti na karatun na karatun, suna bayan, asilimiin 65 na Marekani na da mafaici suna da lãbãri a kan mitandan jamii (Gottfries da Shear, 2016). Daga kuran desembar, asilimin 64 na Marekani sun ce, 'na-up' ya zaɓa 'na'yan haske mai girma' a kan fakta na nan (Barel et al., 2016). Fabricated hadiyado a cikin mitandai da jamii, rangi daga bayani na bayani zuwa taƙaita da haske, yana ƙara wa wannan gaura da kuma yana da haske mai girma ga fassarar aminci a duniya. Daga wannan aikin, muna samar da misãlai masu basĩra 130,000 ga su zama mãsu shakka ko kuma muna yi shakka, kuma muna gabatar da wasu irin turu huɗu masu shakka - sarki, hifaƙo, danganta, kuma bayani. Tuna nũna cewa misalin taruwar neural ne wanda aka yi wa wa'anar cikin tsari na Twitter da interaction na mitandaki ya sami misãlai na leksi. Di motsi da aikin da ya gabata a kan ganin ƙarya, za mu gane cẽwa, ƙara zafi da tsarin sunanta da grammar zuwa misalinmu ba ya gyãra aikin. Ina ƙara da fassarar linguistic, sai ya improve matsalar fassarar fassara, kuma amma, masu da amfani da masu husũma na jamii, su ne mafi ƙididdigewa ga rarraba masu kifi a tsakanin nau'i huɗu-nau'i masu shakka.", 'he': 'Pew research polls report 62 percent of U.S. adults get news on social media (Gottfried and Shearer, 2016).  בסקר בדצמבר, 64 אחוזים מהמבוגרים האמריקאים אמרו ש"חדשות מצוינות" גרמו "הרבה בלבול" לגבי העובדות של האירועים הנוכחים (Barthel et al., 2016). סיפורים מובנים בתקשורת חברתית, מתרחקים מפרסמת בכוונה עד הונאות וסאטיר, תורמים לבלבול הזה בנוסף לשפיעות רציניות על יציבות גלובלית. בעבודה הזו אנו בונים דוגמנים צפויים כדי להקליף 130 אלף משימות חדשות כחשודות או מאושרות, ולצפות ארבעה סוגים של חדשות חשודות - סאטיר, הונאות, קליקביט ופרוגנדה. אנחנו מראים שמודלים רשת עצבית מאומנים על תוכן טוויט ואינטראקציות רשת חברתית יוצאים מעל מודלים לקסיים. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת על זיהוי הונאה, אנו מוצאים שההוספה של סינטקס ותחומים גרמטיים לדוגמנים שלנו לא משפר את ההופעה. הכילוי של תכונות שפתיים משפר את תוצאות הסיווג, אך תכונות אינטראקציה חברתית הן הכי מידעיות להפרידה עדינה יותר בין ארבעה סוגים של משימות חדשות חשודות.', 'sk': 'Raziskave Pew poročajo, da 62 odstotkov odraslih v ZDA prejme novice na družbenih omrežjih (Gottfried in Shearer, 2016). V decembrski anketi je 64 odstotkov odraslih v ZDA dejalo, da so "izmišljene novice" povzročile "veliko zmede" glede dejstev aktualnih dogodkov (Barthel et al., 2016). Izdelane zgodbe v družbenih omrežjih, ki segajo od namerne propagande do potegavščin in satire, prispevajo k tej zmedi poleg tega, da resno vplivajo na globalno stabilnost. V tem delu gradimo napovedne modele za razvrstitev 130 tisoč novičarskih objav kot sumljivih ali preverjenih ter napovedovanje štirih podtipov sumljivih novic - satire, potegavščine, clickbait in propaganda. Pokazali smo, da modeli nevronskih omrežij, usposobljeni za vsebino tweetov in interakcije v družbenih omrežjih, presegajo leksikalne modele. Za razliko od prejšnjega dela na področju zaznavanja prevar ugotavljamo, da dodajanje funkcij sintakse in slovnice našim modelom ne izboljša učinkovitosti. Vključitev jezikovnih značilnosti izboljšuje rezultate klasifikacije, vendar so funkcije socialne interakcije najbolj informativne za natančnejšo ločitev med štirimi vrstami sumljivih objav.', 'bo': "ཞིབ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཨ་རིའི་དབྱིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་གསར་འགོད་བྱུང་། ཨ་རིའི་འབྲུག་གི་ཕྱོགས་ཟུར་བ་ཅིག་གི་ནང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲའི་ནང་གི་དབུས་བྱ་ཚིག64ད་ལ་བཤད་ན།'གསར་འགོད་བརྡ་ཞིག་བྱུང་བ་རེད། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་རང་ཉིད་དུ་ལས་འགྱུར་བའི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་ལས་ཉར་གསོ་སྣང་དང་ལས་དུས་ཚོད་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞི འུ་ཅག་གི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་130,000 གནད་མོའི་གནས་ཡུལ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་བ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་ གསལ་བཤད་བཤེར་གྱི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་དང་མ་འདྲ་བར་ན། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཐ་སྙད་རིས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པར། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཆེས་ཤིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཤོག་བྱས་ཆེས"}
{'en': 'Recognizing Counterfactual Thinking in Social Media Texts', 'ar': 'التعرف على التفكير المضاد في نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'pt': 'Reconhecendo o pensamento contrafactual em textos de mídia social', 'es': 'Reconocimiento del pensamiento contrafáctico en los textos de las redes sociales', 'fr': 'Reconnaître la pensée contrefactuelle dans les textes des réseaux sociaux', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアテキストにおける反事実的思考の認識', 'zh': '识社交媒体文本反事实', 'hi': 'सामाजिक मीडिया ग्रंथों में प्रतिवादी सोच को पहचानना', 'ru': 'Признание контрафактивного мышления в текстах социальных сетей', 'ga': 'Smaointeoireacht Fhrithfhíorasach a Aithint i dTéacsanna Meáin Shóisialta', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση της παραποιημένης σκέψης στα κείμενα κοινωνικών μέσων', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიატექსტის ტექსტის შესახებ', 'hu': 'A hamis gondolkodás felismerése a közösségi média szövegekben', 'it': 'Riconoscere il pensiero contraffatto nei testi dei social media', 'mk': 'Признавање на лажно размислување во текстите на социјалните медиуми', 'kk': 'Социалдық медиа мәтіндерінде қарсы ойлау', 'lt': 'Faktinio mąstymo socialinėje žiniasklaidoje pripažinimas', 'ms': 'Mengenal Pemikiran palsu dalam Teks Media Sosial', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d ആലോചിക്കുന്ന കൌണ്ടെര്\u200dട്ടിക്കേറ്റ് ആലോചിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн текстүүдийн бодлогыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нь', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Ħsib Falsifiku fit-Testi tal-Midja Soċjali', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea gândirii contrafăcute în textele social media', 'no': 'Kjenner motfaktisk tenking i sosiale mediatekst', 'sr': 'Prepoznajući proizvodnju razmišljanja u tekstima socijalnih medija', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie fałszywego myślenia w tekstach mediów społecznościowych', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පාළුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරනවා', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada fikrada xisaabta ee ku saabsan qoraalka sooshalka', 'sv': 'Att känna igen falskt tänkande i sociala medier Texter', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடக உரைகளில் எண்ணிக்கையை அறிந்து கொள்வது', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا متکسٹ میں کنٹر فارغ سوچ جانا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thừa nhận suy nghĩ ngược thực trong các văn bản phương tiện xã hội', 'da': 'Genkendelse af forfalsket tænkning i tekster på sociale medier', 'nl': 'Het herkennen van namaak denken in sociale media teksten', 'bg': 'Разпознаване на фалшивото мислене в текстовете в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Prepoznajući proizvodnju razmišljanja u tekstima socijalnih medija', 'id': 'Mengenali Pikiran palsu dalam Teks Media Sosial', 'ko': '소셜 미디어 텍스트 중의 반사실적 사고를 식별하다', 'de': 'Erkennen von gefälschtem Denken in Social Media Texten', 'fa': 'شناختن فکرهای مخالف در متن رسانه اجتماعی', 'sw': 'Kutambua tafakari ya Kitaifa katika Miandishi ya Kiraia', 'tr': 'Wasp', 'af': 'Onbekende Counterfactual Thinking in Social Media Texts', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստներում կեղծ մտածելը ճանաչելը', 'az': '卯獹慬⁍즙摹즙湩渠䷉饴湬즙物渠쎜獴즙汩欠䓃볅鿃뱮淉饳楮椠瑡滄녹쒱爊', 'sq': 'Duke njohur mendimet e rreme në tekstet e medias sociale', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የቁጥጥር አሳብ በማወቅ', 'bs': 'Prepoznajući proizvodnju razmišljanja u tekstima socijalnih medija', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের টেক্সটে কাউন্টারফেক্ট চিন্তা চিনতে পারে', 'ca': 'Recognir pensar falsament en textos dels mitjans socials', 'cs': 'Rozpoznání padělaného myšlení v textech sociálních médií', 'et': 'Võltsitud mõtlemise äratundmine sotsiaalmeedia tekstides', 'fi': 'Väärennetyn ajattelun tunnistaminen sosiaalisen median teksteissä', 'jv': 'Gak nggoleki mulai kuwi nggawe barang-karang kanggo Teks Sowulan', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje ponarejenega razmišljanja v besedilih družbenih omrežij', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'זיהוי חשיבה מזויפת בטקסטים של מדיה חברתית', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཐོག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་དུ་རྩོམ་མཁན་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་'}
{'en': 'Counterfactual statements, describing events that did not occur and their consequents, have been studied in areas including problem-solving, affect management, and behavior regulation. People with more counterfactual thinking tend to perceive life events as more personally meaningful. Nevertheless, counterfactuals have not been studied in computational linguistics. We create a counterfactual tweet dataset and explore approaches for detecting counterfactuals using rule-based and supervised statistical approaches. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.', 'ar': 'تمت دراسة العبارات المضادة للواقع ، التي تصف الأحداث التي لم تحدث ونتائجها ، في مجالات تشمل حل المشكلات ، وإدارة التأثير ، وتنظيم السلوك. يميل الأشخاص ذوو التفكير المضاد إلى تصور أحداث الحياة على أنها ذات مغزى شخصي أكثر. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم دراسة المضادات في اللغويات الحاسوبية. نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات تغريدة معاكسة للواقع واستكشاف الأساليب لاكتشاف الحقائق المضادة باستخدام الأساليب الإحصائية القائمة على القواعد والتي تخضع للإشراف. أسفر النهج الإحصائي المستند إلى القواعد عن أفضل النتائج (F1 = 0.77) متفوقًا على أي من النهجين المستخدمين بمفردهما.', 'pt': 'Declarações contrafactuais, descrevendo eventos que não ocorreram e seus consequentes, foram estudadas em áreas como resolução de problemas, gestão de afetos e regulação de comportamento. Pessoas com um pensamento mais contrafactual tendem a perceber os eventos da vida como mais pessoalmente significativos. No entanto, os contrafactuais não foram estudados em linguística computacional. Criamos um conjunto de dados de tweets contrafactuais e exploramos abordagens para detectar contrafactuais usando abordagens estatísticas supervisionadas e baseadas em regras. Uma abordagem combinada baseada em regras e estatística produziu os melhores resultados (F1 = 0,77) superando qualquer abordagem usada sozinha.', 'es': 'Las declaraciones contrafácticas, que describen eventos que no ocurrieron y sus consecuencias, se han estudiado en áreas que incluyen la resolución de problemas, el manejo de los efectos y la regulación del comportamiento. Las personas con pensamientos más contrafácticos tienden a percibir los acontecimientos de la vida como más significativos a nivel personal. Sin embargo, los contrafactuales no se han estudiado en lingüística computacional. Creamos un conjunto de datos de tuits contrafácticos y exploramos enfoques para detectar contrafácticos mediante enfoques estadísticos supervisados y basados en reglas. Un enfoque combinado basado en reglas y estadístico arrojó los mejores resultados (F1 = 0,77), superando a cualquiera de los enfoques utilizados por sí solos.', 'fr': "Les déclarations contrefactuelles, décrivant des événements qui ne se sont pas produits et leurs conséquences, ont été étudiées dans des domaines tels que la résolution de problèmes, la gestion des affects et la régulation du comportement. Les personnes ayant une pensée plus contrefactuelle ont tendance à percevoir les événements de la vie comme plus significatifs sur le plan personnel. Néanmoins, les contrefactuels n'ont pas été étudiés en linguistique computationnelle. Nous créons un ensemble de données de tweets contrefactuels et explorons des approches pour détecter les contrefactuels à l'aide d'approches statistiques supervisées et basées sur des règles. Une approche combinée basée sur des règles et une approche statistique a donné les meilleurs résultats (F1 = 0,77) surpassant les deux approches utilisées seules.", 'ja': '問題解決、影響管理、行動規制などの分野で、発生しなかった事象とその結果を説明する反事実的な記述が検討されている。より反事実的な思考を持つ人々は、人生の出来事をより個人的に有意義であると捉える傾向がある。とはいえ、計算言語学では反事実は研究されていない。私たちは反事実的なツイートデータセットを作成し、ルールベースおよび監視された統計的アプローチを使用して反事実を検出するためのアプローチを探ります。ルールベースおよび統計的アプローチの組み合わせは、単独で使用したどちらのアプローチよりも優れた結果（ F 1 = 0.77 ）をもたらした。', 'zh': '述未然之事及反事陈已决,妨于治行监领之域。 多反事者,向以为生事更有意义。 然反事未究于计语言学。 创反事推文数集,并求用法监督之数以检之。 法数生(F1 = 0.77),优于独用。', 'hi': 'उन घटनाओं का वर्णन करते हुए, जो नहीं हुई थीं और उनके परिणामस्वरूप, समस्या को हल करने, प्रबंधन को प्रभावित करने और व्यवहार विनियमन सहित क्षेत्रों में अध्ययन किया गया है। अधिक प्रतिवादात्मक सोच वाले लोग जीवन की घटनाओं को अधिक व्यक्तिगत रूप से सार्थक मानते हैं। फिर भी, कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान में प्रतिवादियों का अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है। हम एक प्रतिवादात्मक ट्वीट डेटासेट बनाते हैं और नियम-आधारित और पर्यवेक्षित सांख्यिकीय दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करके प्रतिवादियों का पता लगाने के लिए दृष्टिकोणों का पता लगाते हैं। एक संयुक्त नियम-आधारित और सांख्यिकीय दृष्टिकोण ने सबसे अच्छे परिणाम (F1 = 0.77) प्राप्त किए, जो अकेले उपयोग किए जाने वाले या तो दृष्टिकोण से आगे निकल गए।', 'ru': 'Контрафактивные утверждения, описывающие события, которые не произошли, и их последствия, были изучены в таких областях, как решение проблем, управление влиянием и регулирование поведения. Люди с более контрафактным мышлением склонны воспринимать жизненные события как более личностные. Тем не менее, контрфакты не изучались в вычислительной лингвистике. Мы создаем контрфактический набор данных твитов и изучаем подходы к обнаружению контрфактов с использованием основанных на правилах и контролируемых статистических подходов. Комбинированный подход, основанный на правилах и статистике, дал наилучшие результаты (F1 = 0,77), превосходя любой из используемых подходов в отдельности.', 'ga': 'Tá staidéar déanta ar ráitis fhrithfhíorasacha, a chuireann síos ar imeachtaí nár tharla agus a n-iarmhairtí, i réimsí lena n-áirítear fadhbréiteach, bainistíocht tionchair, agus rialú iompair. Is gnách go mbreathnaíonn daoine a bhfuil smaointeoireacht fhrithfhíorasach acu ar imeachtaí an tsaoil mar rud a bhfuil brí níos pearsanta leo. Mar sin féin, ní dhearnadh staidéar ar fhrithfhíorasacha sa teangeolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil. Cruthaímid tacar sonraí tvuíte frithfhíorasacha agus déanaimid iniúchadh ar chineálacha cur chuige chun nithe frithfhíorasacha a bhrath trí úsáid a bhaint as cineálacha cur chuige staidrimh atá bunaithe ar rialacha agus faoi mhaoirseacht. Fuarthas na torthaí ab fhearr (F1 = 0.77) as cur chuige comhcheangailte bunaithe ar rialacha agus as cur chuige staidrimh a d’fheidhmigh níos fearr ná an dá chur chuige a úsáideadh amháin.', 'el': "Οι πλαστές δηλώσεις, περιγράφοντας γεγονότα που δεν συνέβησαν και τα επακόλουθά τους, έχουν μελετηθεί σε τομείς όπως η επίλυση προβλημάτων, η διαχείριση επιδράσεων και η ρύθμιση συμπεριφοράς. Οι άνθρωποι με πιο αντιφατική σκέψη τείνουν να αντιλαμβάνονται τα γεγονότα ζωής ως πιο σημαντικά προσωπικά. Παρ' όλα αυτά, δεν έχουν μελετηθεί αντιπαραγωγικά στοιχεία στην υπολογιστική γλωσσολογία. Δημιουργούμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων και εξερευνούμε προσεγγίσεις για την ανίχνευση αντικαταρκτικών δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας στατιστικές προσεγγίσεις βασισμένες σε κανόνες και εποπτευμένες. Μια συνδυασμένη προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε κανόνες και στατιστική απέδωσε τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα (F1😕0.77) πέρα από κάθε προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιήθηκε από μόνη της.", 'hu': 'A nem bekövetkezett eseményeket és azok következményeit leíró hamis állításokat olyan területeken tanulmányozták, mint a problémamegoldás, a hatásmenedzsment és a viselkedésszabályozás. Az ellentétes gondolkodással rendelkező emberek hajlamosak személyesen jelentősebbnek tekinteni az élet eseményeit. Mindazonáltal az ellentényeket nem tanulmányozták a számítástechnikai nyelvészetben. Ellentényszerű tweet adatkészletet hozunk létre, és szabályokon alapuló és felügyelt statisztikai megközelítésekkel vizsgáljuk fel az ellentényszerű adatok felderítéséhez szükséges megközelítéseket. Egy kombinált szabályalapú és statisztikai megközelítés eredményeként (F1 = 0,77) a legjobb eredményeket eredményezte, amelyek felülmúlják az önmagában alkalmazott bármelyik megközelítést.', 'ka': 'პარაფერტალური გამოსახულებები, რომელიც არ მოხდა და მისი შემდეგი მოვლენებები, გასწავლილია ადგილებში, რომლებიც პრობლემების გადაწყვეტილება, შესახებ მენეჯერო და ქცევის რე ადამიანები, რომლებიც უფრო ცხოვრებული ფიქრობით უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სიცხოვრებას. მაგრამ კომპუტაციალური ენგუნისტიკში არ მოსწავლია. ჩვენ შევქმნით განსაკუთრებული ტევიტის მონაცემები და გამოყენებული სტატისტიკური გახსენების შესაძლებლობისთვის განსაკუთრებისთვის შესაძლებლობა. კომბინეციური წესების და სტატისტიკური პროგრამის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შე', 'it': 'Le dichiarazioni contraffatte, che descrivono eventi che non si sono verificati e le loro conseguenze, sono state studiate in aree come la risoluzione dei problemi, la gestione degli effetti e la regolamentazione del comportamento. Le persone con un pensiero più controfattuale tendono a percepire gli eventi della vita come più significativi personalmente. Tuttavia, i controfatti non sono stati studiati nella linguistica computazionale. Creiamo un set di dati tweet controfattuali ed esploriamo approcci per rilevare controfattuali utilizzando approcci statistici basati su regole e supervisionati. Un approccio combinato basato su regole e statistiche ha prodotto i migliori risultati (F1 = 0,77) superando entrambi gli approcci utilizzati da soli.', 'lt': 'Faktiniai pareiškimai, aprašantys nepavykusius įvykius ir jų pasekmes, buvo tirti srityse, įskaitant problem ų sprendimą, poveikį valdymui ir elgesio reguliavimą. Žmonės, turintys daugiau priešingo mąstymo, dažniausiai laiko gyvenimo įvykius labiau asmeniškai reikšmingais. Vis dėlto priešingos aplinkybės nebuvo tirtos skaičiavimo kalba. Kuriame priešingus tweeto duomenų rinkinį ir tiriame priešingų faktų nustatymo metodus taikant taisyklėmis pagrįstus ir prižiūrimus statistinius metodus. Pagal bendrą taisyklėmis pagrįstą ir statistinį metodą buvo pasiekti geriausi rezultatai (F1 = 0,77), palyginti su vieno metodo rezultatais.', 'mk': 'Фактични изјави, опишувајќи ги настаните кои не се случиле и нивните последици, се проучени во области вклучително и решавање на проблемите, влијаат на менаџментот и регулативата на однесувањето. Луѓето со поголемо контрафактично мислење се обидуваат да ги сметаат животните настани за полично значајни. Nevertheless, counterfactuals have not been studied in computational linguistics.  We create a counterfactual tweet dataset and explore approaches for detecting counterfactuals using rule-based and supervised statistical approaches.  Комбинираниот правило-базиран и статистички пристап ги даде најдобрите резултати (F1 = 0,77) кои ги надминаа двете пристапи кои се користат сами.', 'ms': 'Pernyataan palsu, menjelaskan peristiwa yang tidak berlaku dan akibatnya, telah diuji di kawasan termasuk penyelesaian masalah, pengurusan kesan, dan peraturan perilaku. Orang-orang yang lebih berfikir bertentangan fakta cenderung untuk menyadari peristiwa kehidupan sebagai lebih berarti secara peribadi. Namun, kontrafaktal belum dipelajari dalam bahasa komputasi. Kami mencipta set data tweet palsu dan mengeksplorasi pendekatan untuk mengesan barang palsu menggunakan pendekatan statistik berdasarkan peraturan. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.', 'kk': 'Оқиғаларды түсіндіру және олардың кейінгі әрекеттерін түсіндіру, мәселелерді шешу, басқаруға және әрекеттердің тәртібіне әсер ететін аумақтарда зерттеулі. Жалғыз ойланған адамдар өмір оқиғаларын өмір оқиғаларын өзінің маңызды деп ойлайды. Бірақ қалпындықтар компьютерлік лингвистикасында оқылмаған. Біз жалғыз tweet деректер жиынын құрып, ережелерді негізделген және бақылаған статистикалық қасиеттерді анықтау үшін қасиеттерді іздейміз. Тіркелген ережелердің негізінде және статистикалық тәсілі жақсы нәтижелерді (F1 = 0, 77) бір-біріне қолданылатын тәсілінің жақсы нәтижелері болды.', 'mn': 'Үүний үр дүнг тодорхойлж буй үйл явдлыг тайлбарлаж, үр дүнг нь асуудлыг шийдэх, удирдах, үйл явдлын хөгжлийн нөлөө үзүүлэх хэсэгт судалсан. Илүү худлаа бодох хүмүүс амьдралын үйл явдлыг хувьд илүү чухал гэж боддог. Гэвч хуурамч хүмүүс компьютерийн хэлний хэлний талаар судалгаагүй. Бид хууль бодит tweet өгөгдлийн санг бий болгож, хууль бодит байдлыг ашиглан хууль бодит байдлыг олох арга замыг судалдаг. Холбоотой дүрмийн үндсэн, статистикийн арга нь ганцаараа хэрэглэгдсэн хамгийн сайн үр дүн (F1 = 0.77) болсон.', 'mt': 'Dikjarazzjonijiet foloz, li jiddeskrivu avvenimenti li ma seħħewx u l-konsegwenzi tagħhom, ġew studjati f’oqsma li jinkludu s-soluzzjoni tal-problemi, il-ġestjoni tal-effetti, u r-regolamentazzjoni tal-imġiba. Persuni b’ħsieb aktar kontrofattwali għandhom it-tendenza li jqisu l-avvenimenti tal-ħajja bħala aktar sinifikanti personali. Madankollu, kontrofattwali ma ġewx studjati fil-lingwistika komputattiva. Aħna nħolqu sett ta’ dejta kontrofattwali fuq it-twitter u nesploraw approċċi biex jinstabu kontrofattwali bl-użu ta’ approċċi statistiċi bbażati fuq ir-regoli u sorveljati. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.', 'ml': 'സംഭവിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും അതിന്റെ കാരണം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നതും പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതും, നടത്തിന്റെ നി കൂടുതല്\u200d അഭിപ്രായമുള്ള ചിന്തിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ജീവിതത്തിന്\u200dറെ സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തിപരമായി അര്\u200dത്ഥമുള്ളതാ എന്നാലും കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കണക്കിനുള്ള ഭാഷ പഠിച്ചിട്ടില്ല. നിയമത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായും പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പരിസ്ഥിതികങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചും നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെ ഒരു കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dത്ത നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായും സ്റ്റാട്ടിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നു. ഒന്ന', 'pl': 'Podrobione oświadczenia opisujące zdarzenia, które nie miały miejsca i ich konsekwencje, zostały zbadane w obszarach takich jak rozwiązywanie problemów, zarządzanie wpływem i regulacja zachowań. Ludzie z bardziej kontrfaktycznym myśleniem mają tendencję do postrzegania wydarzeń życiowych jako bardziej osobistego znaczenia. Niemniej jednak w językoznawstwie obliczeniowym nie badano kontrafaktów. Tworzymy zbiór danych dotyczących tweetów kontrafaktualnych i badamy podejścia do wykrywania kontrafaktualnych za pomocą podejść statystycznych opartych na regułach i nadzorowanych. Połączone podejście oparte na regułach i statystycznych przyniosło najlepsze wyniki (F1\u0e000.77) przewyższające każde z podejść stosowanych samodzielnie.', 'sr': 'Protivfajlova izjava, opisujući događaje koje se nisu dogodile i njihove posljedice, ispitivani su u područjima uključujući rješavanje problema, utjecaju na upravljanje i regulaciju ponašanja. Ljudi koji imaju više lažnog razmišljanja tendiraju da shvate životne događaje kao osobno značajnije. Ipak, greške nisu proučene na računalnom jeziku. Napravili smo kompletu podataka o proizvodnjim tweetom i istražujemo pristupe za otkrivanje proizvođa ča koristeći pravila i nadzorne statističke pristupe. Kombinacija pravila i statističkog pristupa donela je najbolji rezultat (F1 = 0,77) koji je nadmašio korišteni samo jedan pristup.', 'so': 'Aqooyin rasmi ah, oo ku qoraya dhacdooyinka aan soo dhicin iyo sababtoodii, waxaa lagu baray meelaha laga helo arimaha dhibaatada, saameyn ku yeelashada maamulka iyo xeerarka dhaqdhaqaalaha. Dadka aad u fiirsan karto waxay u eg yihiin dhacdooyinka nololeed inay si shakhsi ah u faa’iido badan yihiin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee lama baran luuqadaha xisaabta. Waxaynu sameynaa taariikhda Twitteetka ee ka geesta ah iyo baaritaanka si aan u ogaano qofka ka geesta ah oo isticmaalaya qaababka takhasuska ah oo la ilaaliyo. Dhaqdhaqaaq qaynuunka la isku xiran yahay oo ku qoran iyo takhasuska ayaa soo saaray midhaha ugu wanaagsan (F1 = 0.77) oo soo bandhigay dhaqdhaqaaq la isticmaalo oo kaliya.', 'ro': 'Declarațiile contrafăcute, care descriu evenimentele care nu au avut loc și consecințele acestora, au fost studiate în domenii precum rezolvarea problemelor, managementul afectelor și reglementarea comportamentului. Oamenii cu gândire mai contrafactuală tind să perceapă evenimentele vieții ca fiind mai semnificative personal. Cu toate acestea, contrafactualele nu au fost studiate în lingvistica computațională. Creăm un set de date contrafactuale pe tweet și explorăm abordări pentru detectarea contrafactualelor folosind abordări statistice bazate pe reguli și supravegheate. O abordare combinată bazată pe reguli și statistice a obținut cele mai bune rezultate (F1 = 0,77), depășind oricare dintre abordările utilizate singur.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, හා ව්\u200dයාපාර නියෝ මිනිස්සුන්ට වඩා වැරදි හිතන්න පුළුවන් ජීවිතේ සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් වැඩක් ත නමුත් විරුද්ධ භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ. අපි විරුද්ධ තවිට් දත්ත සූදානයක් නිර්මාණය සහ පරික්ෂා කරනවා නීතිය සඳහා පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරි සම්බන්ධ නීතිය සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Förfalskade uttalanden, som beskriver händelser som inte inträffade och deras följder, har studerats inom områden som problemlösning, påverkanshantering och beteendereglering. Människor med mer kontrafaktiskt tänkande tenderar att uppfatta livshändelser som mer personligt meningsfulla. Motfakta har dock inte studerats inom datalingvistik. Vi skapar en kontrafaktisk tweetdataset och utforskar metoder för att upptäcka kontrafakta med hjälp av regelbaserade och övervakade statistiska metoder. Ett kombinerat regelbaserat och statistiskt tillvägagångssätt gav de bästa resultaten (F1 = 0,77) som överträffade endera tillvägagångssättet som användes ensamt.', 'no': 'Kontreflektiv uttrykk, skildring av hendingar som ikkje skjedde og etterspåfølgjande, har blitt studiert i områda, inkludert problem-løysing, påvirke handtering og oppføringsregulasjon. Folk med meir vilkårleg tenking har tendens til å oppfatte liv-hendingar som meir personleg mening. Men vilkårleg har ikkje blitt studiert i datamaskina. Vi oppretter eit vilkårleg tweet- dataset og utforsker tilnærmingar for å finna vilkårleg ved hjelp av regelbaserte og oversikte statistiske tilnærmingar. Ein kombinasjonsbasert og statistisk tilnærming gjev det beste resultatet (F1 = 0,77) som utfører anten tilnærming som er brukt alene.', 'ta': 'எண்ணிக்கையான கூற்றுகள், நிகழ்வுகளை விவரித்து, பிரச்சினைத் தீர்வு செய்யும், நிர்வாக்கத்தை பாதிக்கும் மற்றும் நடத்தை விதிவுகள வாழ்க்கை நிகழ்வுகளைப் பார்க்கும் மக்கள் தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட அர்த்தமானதாக உணர்கிறார்கள். ஆனாலும், எதிர்காரணிகள் கணிப்பாக மொழிகளில் படிக்கப்படவில்லை. நாம் விதிமுறையான மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவரங்களை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்காக எதிர்காரணிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு எதிர்மறையான Tweet தகவல் அமைப்ப ஒரு கூட்டிணைக்கப்பட்ட விதியாசம் அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவரம் செயல்பாடு சிறந்த முடிவுகள் கொடுத்தது (F1 = 0. 7', 'ur': 'کنٹر فارغ سٹیٹمنٹ، ایسے اتفاقات کی تعریف کرتی ہے جو نہیں ہوتی اور ان کے نتیجے، مشکل حل کرنے، مدیریت اور رفتار قانون کے ساتھ مطالعہ کی گئی ہیں. زیادہ غلط فکر کرنے والے لوگ زندگی حادثوں کو شخصی طور پر مطلب سمجھتے ہیں۔ لیکن کمپیوٹریسی زبان شناسی میں مطالعہ نہیں کی گئی۔ ہم ایک مخالف ٹویٹ ڈیٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں اور روش پر اور نظارت رکھنے والی آمار طریقے کے مطابق مخالف طریقے کا تلاش کرتے ہیں۔ ایک متحدہ قانون بنیاد اور آمار طریقہ نے بہترین نتیجے (F1 = 0.77) کو ایک ہی طریقہ سے اضافہ کیا۔', 'uz': "Counterfactual statements, describing events that did not occur and their consequents, have been studied in areas including problem-solving, affect management, and behavior regulation.  Ko'pchilik fikrlarida odamlar hayotini shaxsiy narsalar deb tushunadi. Lekin, kompyuterlik tillarda foydalanuvchilar o'qib qolmadi. Biz qoidaga va taʼminlovchi statistical usullarni aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchilarni aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchilarni yaramiz. Birlashtirilgan qoidalar asosida va statistik usuli faqat ishlatilgan usulni bajarish uchun eng yaxshi natijalarni bajaradi (F1 = 0. 77).", 'vi': 'Những tuyên bố ngược dữ kiện, mô tả các sự kiện chưa xảy ra và hậu quả của chúng, đã được nghiên cứu trong lĩnh vực bao gồm giải quyết vấn đề, tác động quản lý và quy định hành vi. Những người có suy nghĩ ngược lại thường thấy sự kiện đời có ý nghĩa cá nhân hơn. Tuy nhiên, đối số chưa được nghiên cứu trong ngôn ngữ tính. Chúng tôi tạo một tập tin tweet trái với thực tế và tìm kiếm các phương pháp để phát hiện đối số bằng các phương pháp thống trị và giám sát. Một phương pháp tổng hợp dựa trên quy luật và thống kê cho thấy kết quả tốt nhất (F1).', 'nl': 'Namaakstatements, die gebeurtenissen beschrijven die niet hebben plaatsgevonden en de gevolgen daarvan, zijn bestudeerd op gebieden zoals probleemoplossing, affectmanagement en gedragsregulering. Mensen met meer contrapactisch denken hebben de neiging om levensgebeurtenissen als persoonlijker zinvol te beschouwen. Niettemin zijn contrafactieken niet bestudeerd in de computerlinguïstiek. We creëren een contrafactische tweet dataset en onderzoeken benaderingen voor het detecteren van contrafactische gegevens met behulp van regelgebaseerde en begeleide statistische benaderingen. Een gecombineerde op regels gebaseerde en statistische benadering leverde de beste resultaten op (F1,0,77) die beter presteerden dan beide benaderingen alleen.', 'da': 'Forfalskede erklæringer, der beskriver begivenheder, der ikke fandt sted, og deres følger, er blevet undersøgt inden for områder, herunder problemløsning, påvirkningsledelse og adfærdsregulering. Folk med mere kontrafaktisk tænkning har tendens til at opfatte livets begivenheder som mere personligt meningsfulde. Ikke desto mindre er kontrafaktuelle elementer ikke blevet undersøgt i beregningslingvistik. Vi skaber et kontrafaktisk tweet datasæt og undersøger tilgange til detektering af kontrafaktuelle oplysninger ved hjælp af regelbaserede og overvågede statistiske tilgange. En kombineret regelbaseret og statistisk fremgangsmåde gav de bedste resultater (F1 = 0,77), der oversteg begge de metoder, der anvendes alene.', 'bg': 'Фалшивите изявления, описващи събития, които не са се случили и техните последици, са проучени в области, включително решаване на проблеми, управление на въздействието и регулиране на поведението. Хората с по-контрафактическо мислене са склонни да възприемат житейските събития като по-лично значими. Въпреки това, контрафактите не са изследвани в компютърната лингвистика. Създаваме контрафактически туитове и проучваме подходи за откриване на контрафакти, използвайки базирани на правила и контролирани статистически подходи. Комбинираният, основан на правила и статистически подход дава най-добри резултати (F1 = 0,77), които превъзхождат всеки от използваните самостоятелно подходи.', 'hr': 'Protivfajlova izjava, opisivanje događaja koje se nisu dogodile i njihovih posljedica, ispitivano je u područjima uključujući rješavanje problema, utjecanje na upravljanje i regulaciju ponašanja. Ljudi s lažnijim razmišljanjima obično shvaćaju životne događaje kao osobno značajnije. Međutim, greške nisu ispitivane u računalnom jeziku. Napravili smo komplet podataka o proizvodnjima tviteta i istražujemo pristupe za otkrivanje proizvođa ča koristeći statističke pristupe na temelju pravila i nadzora. Kombinacija pravila i statistički pristup uzrokovala je najbolji rezultat (F1 = 0,77) koji je nadmašio korišteni samo jedan pristup.', 'id': 'pernyataan palsu, menjelaskan peristiwa yang tidak terjadi dan konsekuensinya, telah dipelajari di daerah termasuk penyelesaian masalah, mempengaruhi manajemen, dan regulasi perilaku. Orang-orang dengan pemikiran yang lebih kontrofaksi cenderung memperlihatkan peristiwa hidup sebagai lebih pribadi berarti. Namun, kontrafaktal belum dipelajari dalam bahasa komputasi. Kami menciptakan set data kontrofaksi tweet dan mengeksplorasi pendekatan untuk mendeteksi kontrofaksi menggunakan pendekatan statistik berdasarkan aturan. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.', 'de': 'Gefälschte Aussagen, die Ereignisse beschreiben, die nicht aufgetreten sind und ihre Folgen, wurden in Bereichen wie Problemlösung, Affektmanagement und Verhaltensregulation untersucht. Menschen mit kontrafaktischerem Denken neigen dazu, Lebensereignisse als persönlicher bedeutungsvoller wahrzunehmen. Trotzdem wurden kontrafaktische Faktoren in der Computerlinguistik nicht untersucht. Wir erstellen einen kontrafaktischen Tweet-Datensatz und erforschen Ansätze zur Erkennung kontrafaktischer Daten mithilfe regelbasierter und überwachter statistischer Ansätze. Ein kombinierter regelbasierter und statistischer Ansatz lieferte die besten Ergebnisse (F1,0,77), die beide Ansätze allein übertrafen.', 'fa': 'گزارش\u200cهای مخالفت، توصیف اتفاقات که اتفاق نیفتاده و نتیجه\u200cهایشان، در منطقه\u200cهای شامل حل مشکل، تأثیر مدیریت و قانون رفتار تحقیق شده\u200cاند. افراد با فکرهای دروغگویی بیشتری دارند که رویدادهای زندگی را به طور شخصی معنی بیشتری می بینند. با این حال، دروغگویان در زبان محاسبه مطالعه نشده است. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات توئیت ضعیفی را ایجاد می کنیم و روش\u200cهایی را برای کشف کردن ضعیفی با استفاده از روش\u200cهایی استفاده از قانون و تحت نظر آمار تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. یک روش قانون و آمار متحد بهترین نتیجه\u200cها (F1 = 0.77) را در نتیجه\u200cی هر روش تنها استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Tamko la ukweli, kuelezea matukio ambayo hayakutokea na matokeo yao, zimekuwa zikifundiwa katika maeneo ikiwa ni pamoja na kutatua tatizo, kuathiri utawala, na utaratibu wa tabia. Watu wenye kufikiri zaidi huwa wanaona matukio ya maisha kama yenye maana binafsi. Hata hivyo, watu wanaopinga hawajasomwa katika lugha ya kompyuta. Tunaweza kutengeneza seti ya taarifa za twita na kuchunguza mbinu za kutambua wapinzani kwa kutumia mbinu za takwimu za utawala na zinazofuatiliwa. Mtandao wa utawala wa pamoja na takwimu ulisababisha matokeo bora zaidi (F1 = 0.77) kuonyesha mbinu zote zinazotumiwa peke yake.', 'tr': 'Sahypalar çözmesi, netijesi bolmadyklary we netijesi ýagdaýlary tassyklaýan ýagdaýlarda mesele çözmesi, müdiri we davranç düzgünlerine täsirli boldy. Daha nädogry düşünýän adamlar ýaşaýyş nusgalary kişiniň aňsat bolup görünýär. Yöne hasaplar bilen kalkular dilinde öwrenmedi. Biz sahyp bir tweet veri setini döredik we sahypalary düzgün we gözlemeli statistik ýarymlary ulanyp gözlemek üçin golaýlary keşfedýäris. Birleşik kurallara daýanýan we statistik ýagdaýynyň üstünde bolan iň gowy netijeleri (F1 = 0.77) iki ýagdaýda ýeke özüne ulanan ýagdaýdan üstüne çykardy.', 'af': "Die verskeie verklaring, die beskrywing van gebeurtenis wat nie gebeur het en hulle volgorde, is ondersoek in areas insluitend problemoplossing, effekteer bestuur en gedragregulasie. Mense met meer ongelukkige gedagtes het aanvaar dat die lewende gebeurtenis as persoonlik betekende. Ongelukkiges is tog nie in rekenaarske lingwistike onderwerp nie. Ons skep 'n teenwerklike tweet-datastel en ondersoek toegange vir ontdekking van teenwerklike wat gebruik reël-gebaseerde en ondersoekte statistiese toegange. 'n Gekombinereerde reël-gebaseerde en statistiese toegang het die beste resultate (F1 = 0.77) uitgevoer van enige toegang alleen gebruik.", 'sq': 'Deklaratat e rrejshme, duke përshkruar ngjarjet që nuk ndodhën dhe pasojat e tyre, janë studiuar në fusha duke përfshirë zgjidhjen e problemeve, ndikimin e menaxhimit dhe rregullimin e sjelljes. Njerëzit me mendim më kundërfaktor kanë tendencë të perceptojnë ngjarjet e jetës si më të rëndësishme personale. Nevertheless, counterfactuals have not been studied in computational linguistics.  Ne krijojmë një grup të dhënash kontrafaktore të tweetit dhe eksplorojmë metodat për zbulimin e kontrafakteve duke përdorur metoda statistike të bazuara në rregulla dhe të mbikqyrura. Një qasje e kombinuar bazuar në rregulla dhe statistikë dha rezultatet më të mira (F1 = 0.77) që kalonin çdo qasje të përdorur vetëm.', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት፣ ያልደረገውን ጉዳይ እና ግንኙነታቸውን በማሳመር፣ የጉዳይ መፍታት፣ የመከራ አስተዳደር እና የሥርዓት ሥርዓት በተጨማሪው አገር ተማርተዋል፡፡ ብዙ አካባቢ አሳብ ያሉ ሰዎች የሕይወት ሁኔታዎችን ለራሱ አዋቂ እንደሚመስሉ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ተቃውሞ ቋንቋዎች አልተማረቡም፡፡ የሥርዓት ተሟጋቾችን እና የተጠቃሚ ተሳታፊዎችን ለመግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተጠቃሚ የሥርዓት እና የstatistical ሥርዓት ጥያቄ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን አቀረበ (F1 = 0.77)', 'hy': 'Կատար հայտարարությունները, որոնք նկարագրում են իրադարձությունները, որոնք չեն տեղի ունեցել և դրանց հետևանքները ուսումնասիրել են այնպիսի ոլորտներում, ինչպիսիք են խնդիրների լուծման, ազդեցություն կառավարման և վարքագծային կարգավորման Մարդիկ, ովքեր ավելի հակափակցիոն մտածում են, հակված են կյանքի իրադարձություններին ավելի անձնական իմաստալից ընկալել: Այնուամենայնիվ, հակափաստերը հաշվարկման լեզվաբանության ոլորտում չեն ուսումնասիրել: Մենք ստեղծում ենք հակափաստական թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգ և ուսումնասիրում ենք հակափաստական արտահայտություններ հայտնաբերելու մոտեցումներ՝ օգտագործելով կանոններով հիմնված և վերահսկված վիճակագրական մոտեցումներ: Ընդհանուր կանոններով հիմնված և վիճակագրական մոտեցումը բերեց լավագույն արդյունքները (F1 = 0.77), որոնք գերազանցեցին երկու մոտեցումը միայնակ:', 'bs': 'Proizvodnje proizvodnje, opisivanje događaja koji se nisu dogodili i njihovih posljedica, ispitivano je u područjima uključujući rješavanje problema, utjecanje na upravljanje i regulaciju ponašanja. Ljudi s lažnijim razmišljanjima obično shvataju životne događaje kao osobno značajnije. Međutim, greške nisu proučene na računalnom jeziku. Mi stvaramo kompletnu kompletu podataka za tweet i istražujemo pristupe za otkrivanje proizvođa ča koristeći pravila i nadzorne statističke pristupe. Kombinirani pristup pravila i statistički pristup donosio je najbolji rezultat (F1 = 0,77) koji je nadmašio samo korišteni pristup.', 'ko': '발생하지 않은 사건과 그 결과를 묘사하는 반사실 진술은 이미 문제 해결, 영향 관리와 행위 조절 등 분야에서 연구를 받았다.더 많은 반사실적 사고를 가진 사람들은 생활 사건이 더 개인적인 의미가 있다고 생각하는 경향이 있다.그러나 반사실은 계산언어학에서 아직 연구되지 않았다.우리는 반사실 트위터 데이터 집합을 만들고 규칙과 감독을 바탕으로 하는 통계 방법을 사용하여 반사실을 검출하는 방법을 모색했다.규칙과 통계를 결합한 방법에 근거하여 가장 좋은 결과(F1=0.77)를 얻어 단독으로 사용하는 어떤 방법보다 우수하다.', 'az': 'Başına gəlməyən və sonradan gələnləri təsdiqləyici ifadələr, problemləri çəkmək, yönetimi və davranış düzgünlüyünü dahil olan bölgelerde təhsil edilmişdir. Daha çox haqsız fikir sahibi insanlar həyat olaraqlarını kişisel olaraq daha anlamlı hiss edirlər. Halbuki, haqsızlıqlar hesap dilində təhsil edilməmişdir. Biz haqsız olaraq tweet verilənləri yaratdıq və qayda-qanunu və statistik tərzlərini istifadə edərək haqsız olaraq fikirləri keşfetdik. Birleşdirilmiş hökmlərin və statistik tərzlərinin ən yaxşı sonuçları (F1 = 0,77) ilə təkcə istifadə edilən hər ikisinin tərzindən üstün olmuşdur.', 'bn': 'কাউন্টারফেক্ট বিবৃতি, ঘটনাগুলো ব্যাখ্যা করছে যা ঘটেনি এবং এর ফলে তাদের ব্যাখ্যা করছে, যার মধ্যে সমস্যার সমাধান, ব্যবস্থাপনা এবং আচরণ নিয়ন্ত্রণ অনেক বেশী প্রকৃত চিন্তার মানুষ জীবনের ঘটনাকে ব্যক্তিগত অর্থপূর্ণ মনে করে। Nevertheless, counterfactuals have not been studied in computational linguistics.  আমরা নিয়ম ভিত্তিক এবং পরিসংখ্যান পরিসংক্রান্ত উপায় ব্যবহার করে বিরোধী টুইটের তথ্য সেট তৈরি করি এবং বিরোধীদের খুঁজে বের করার জন একটি একত্রিত নিয়ম ভিত্তিক এবং পরিসংখ্যানের ক্ষেত্রে সেরা ফলাফল প্রদান করেছে (এফ১ = 0. 77) যা কিছু একা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': "S'han estudiat declaracions falses, descrivint esdeveniments que no van ocórrer i les seves conseqüències, en àrees com la solució de problemes, la gestió d'efectes i la regulació del comportament. La gent amb pensament més contrafet tendeix a percebre els esdeveniments de vida com més significatius personalment. No obstant això, els contrafets no han estat estudiats en la lingüística computacional. Creem un conjunt de dades de tweet contrafets i explorem enfocaments per detectar contrafets fent servir enfocaments estadístics basats en regles i supervisats. Un enfocament combinat basat en regles i estadística va produir els millors resultats (F1 = 0,77) que superaven ambdós d'aquests enfocaments sols.", 'cs': 'Padělaná prohlášení popisující události, ke kterým nedošlo a jejich následky, byla studována v oblastech včetně řešení problémů, řízení vlivů a regulace chování. Lidé s kontrafaktuálnějším myšlením mají tendenci vnímat životní události jako osobně smysluplnější. Nicméně kontrafakty nebyly studovány v oblasti výpočetní lingvistiky. Vytváříme kontrafaktuální datovou sadu tweetů a zkoumáme přístupy k detekci kontrafaktuálních přístupů pomocí pravidel založených a kontrolovaných statistických přístupů. Kombinovaný přístup založený na pravidlech a statistickém přístupu přinesl nejlepší výsledky (F1,0,77) překonávající každý přístup použitý samostatně.', 'fi': 'Väärennettyjä lausuntoja, jotka kuvaavat tapahtumia, joita ei tapahtunut, ja niiden seurauksia, on tutkittu mm. ongelmanratkaisussa, vaikutushallinnassa ja käyttäytymisen sääntelyssä. Ihmiset, joilla on enemmän vastakohtaista ajattelua, näkevät elämäntapahtumat henkilökohtaisemmin merkityksellisinä. Vastafaktoja ei kuitenkaan ole tutkittu laskennallisessa kielitieteessä. Luomme vastakohtaisen tweet-aineiston ja tutkimme lähestymistapoja vastakohtaisten faktojen havaitsemiseen sääntöpohjaisten ja valvottujen tilastollisten lähestymistapojen avulla. Yhdistetty sääntöpohjainen ja tilastollinen lähestymistapa tuotti parhaat tulokset (F1 = 0,77) verrattuna jompikumpi menetelmä yksinään.', 'et': 'Võltsitud avaldusi, mis kirjeldavad sündmusi, mis ei toimunud ja nende tagajärgi, on uuritud valdkondades, sealhulgas probleemide lahendamine, mõjujuhtimine ja käitumise reguleerimine. Inimesed, kellel on rohkem vastufaktuaalset mõtlemist, kipuvad tajuma elusündmusi isiklikult tähenduslikumaks. Sellegipoolest ei ole arvutuslingvistikas vastufaktuaalseid analüüse uuritud. Loome vastufaktuaalse säutsu andmekogumi ja uurime lähenemisviise vastufaktuaalsete andmete tuvastamiseks, kasutades reeglitel põhinevaid ja järelevalvestatud statistilisi lähenemisviise. Kombineeritud reeglitel põhinev ja statistiline lähenemisviis andis parimad tulemused (F1 = 0,77), mis ületasid mõlemat üksi kasutatavat lähenemisviisi.', 'he': 'הצהרות מזויפות, מתארות אירועים שלא התרחשו והתוצאות שלהן, נבדקו באזורים כוללים פתרון בעיות, השפיעה על מנהל, והתקנות התנהגות. אנשים עם מחשבה נגד עובדה נוטים להבחין באירועים חיים כאשר הם משמעותיים אישית יותר. למרות זאת, לא למדו חומרים נגד עובדות בשפת מחשב. אנו יוצרים קבוצת מידע טוויט נגד עובדות ומחקרים גישות לגלות מידע נגד עובדות באמצעות גישות סטטיסטיות מבוססות על חוקים ומשגיחות. גישה משולבת מבוססת על חוקים וסטטיסטית הביאה את התוצאות הטובות ביותר (F1 = 0.77) שעובדה על כל גישה משתמשת לבד.', 'ha': 'An karanta statements masu ƙidãya, an bayyana ayukan ayuka da ba su fara su ba, da kuma bayanin su, a cikin wurãren kwanan an karatun su, kamar masu yin rabo-kure, masu shawara manajan aiki, da sharrin aikin. Mutãnen da ke da kafirar masu kamfani, suna ganin ayukan rãyuwa kamar yana da muhimmi wanda ke so. A lokacin da ba a karanta masu motsi ba cikin linguin lissafi. Tuna sami tsarin mutane na Twitter na motsi, kuma Muke jarraba hanyõyi dõmin ka gane masu motsi da amfani da hanyõyin statistical da aka tsare su. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.', 'sk': 'Ponarejene izjave, ki opisujejo dogodke, ki se niso zgodili, in njihove posledice, so preučevali na področjih, vključno z reševanjem problemov, upravljanjem vplivov in regulacijo vedenja. Ljudje z bolj kontrafaktualnim razmišljanjem običajno dojemajo življenjske dogodke kot osebno pomembnejše. Kljub temu v računalniškem jezikoslovju kontrafaktualnosti niso raziskovali. Ustvarjamo nabor podatkov o nasprotnih tvitih in raziskujemo pristope za odkrivanje nasprotnih dejstev z uporabo pravil temelječih in nadzorovanih statističnih pristopov. Kombinirani pristop, ki temelji na pravilih in statistični pristop, je prinesel najboljše rezultate (F1 = 0,77), ki je presegel vsak pristop, uporabljen sam.', 'jv': 'Validity Wong wong liya sing luwih apik penting nggawe luwih dumadhi kuwi mau. Nanging, kuwi sawar kuwi, lak sawar kuwi ora bisa digawe ning arep turang. Awak dhéwé nggawe netrap dataset nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar aturan karo gewis gawe barang nggawe barang-sistem lan ngawe barang-sistem dadi sing bisa basa gambar tarjamahan. Mungkin gungane rule-basic karo dadi dadi nggawe barang kelas mburu dadi (F1 = 0.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་གསལ་བརྗོད་པ། བྱ་འགུལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་མེད་པའི་གྲངས མི་མང་གི་འཚོ་བའི་བྱ་ཚིག་རང་ཉིད་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་བས་ཀྱང་། གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་སྙན་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ We create a counterfactual tweet dataset and explore approaches for detecting counterfactuals using rule-based and supervised statistical approaches. A combined rule-based and statistical approach yielded the best results (F1 = 0.77) outperforming either approach used alone.'}
{'en': 'Temporal Orientation of Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'ar': 'التوجه الزمني للتغريدات للتنبؤ بدخل المستخدمين', 'pt': 'Orientação Temporal de Tweets para Previsão de Renda de Usuários', 'es': 'Orientación temporal de los tuits para predecir los ingresos de los usuarios', 'fr': 'Orientation temporelle des tweets pour prédire les revenus des utilisateurs', 'ja': 'ユーザーの収入を予測するためのツイートの時間的オリエンテーション', 'zh': '以占用户入之推文时', 'ru': 'Временная ориентация твитов для прогнозирования доходов пользователей', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ताओं की आय की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए Tweets का अस्थायी अभिविन्यास', 'ga': 'Treoshuíomh Sealadach na dTuití chun Ioncam Úsáideoirí a Thuar', 'ka': 'Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'hu': 'Tweetek időbeli orientációja a felhasználók jövedelmének előrejelzésére', 'el': 'Χρονικός προσανατολισμός των tweets για την πρόβλεψη του εισοδήματος των χρηστών', 'it': 'Orientamento temporale dei tweet per la previsione del reddito degli utenti', 'kk': 'Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'lt': 'Laikinas naudotojų pajamų prognozavimo Tweets orientavimas', 'mk': 'Temporal Orientation of Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'ms': 'Orientasi Temporal Tweets untuk Prediksi Datang Pengguna', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ വരുത്തം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ കാലാവധി സ്ഥാനം', 'mt': 'Temporal Orientation of Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'mn': 'Tweets for Predicting Income of Users', 'no': '@ info: whatsthis', 'pl': 'Czasowa orientacja tweetów do przewidywania dochodów użytkowników', 'sr': 'Temporalna orijentacija Tweets za predviđanje prihoda korisnika', 'ro': 'Orientarea temporală a tweeturilor pentru previziunea veniturilor utilizatorilor', 'si': 'Tweets', 'so': 'Ururka ku meelgaarka ah ee Twitteetka ee u diyaarinta dakhliga isticmaalayaasha', 'sv': 'Temporal orientering av tweets för förutsägelse av användarinkomster', 'ta': 'பயன்படுத்துபவரின் வரும் முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான காலாவதியான திசையில் இருப்புகளின் தற்காலிக இடம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng dẫn thời gian cho số thu nhập của người dùng', 'bg': 'Времева ориентация на туитовете за прогнозиране на доходите на потребителите', 'da': 'Midlertidig orientering af tweets til forudsigelse af brugernes indkomst', 'hr': 'Temporalna orijentacija Tweets za predviđanje prihoda korisnika', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke oriëntatie van Tweets voor het voorspellen van inkomsten van gebruikers', 'id': 'Orientasi Temporal Tweets untuk Memprediksi Daftar Pengguna', 'sw': 'Toleo la muda wa Twita kwa ajili ya Kujiandaa Matokeo ya Watumiaji', 'de': 'Zeitliche Ausrichtung von Tweets zur Vorhersage des Einkommens von Nutzern', 'ko': '추문은 사용자 수입의 시간 취향을 예측한다', 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň Gelişi Predictan üçin Wagtlaýyn Görniş Opşenler', 'sq': 'Orientimi i përkohshëm i Tweets për parashikimin e të ardhurave të përdoruesve', 'af': 'Tweets', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'fa': 'مسیر موقتی Tweets برای پیش\u200cبینی درآمد کاربر', 'bs': 'Temporalna orijentacija Tweets za predviđanje prihoda korisnika', 'az': 'Predicting Income of Users for Temporal Orientation of Tweets', 'cs': 'Časová orientace tweetů pro predikci příjmů uživatelů', 'ca': "Orientació temporal dels Tweets per predir l'ingressos dels usuaris", 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীদের আয় প্রস্তুত করার জন্য টুইটারের দ্রুত অবস্থান', 'et': 'Tweetide ajaline orientatsioon kasutajate tulu prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Tweettien aikaorientaatio käyttäjien tulojen ennustamiseksi', 'jv': 'Orientation', 'sk': 'Časovna usmerjenost tweetov za predvidevanje dohodka uporabnikov', 'he': 'מיוון זמני של טוויטים לציון הכנסה של משתמשים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་འཛུགས་ཚུ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པའི་Tweets ཡི་གནས་སྐབས་མཚམས་གྱི་ཕྱོགས'}
{'en': 'Automatically estimating a user’s socio-economic profile from their language use in social media can significantly help social science research and various downstream applications ranging from business to politics. The current paper presents the first study where user cognitive structure is used to build a predictive model of income. In particular, we first develop a classifier using a weakly supervised learning framework to automatically time-tag tweets as past, present, or future. We quantify a user’s overall temporal orientation based on their distribution of tweets, and use it to build a predictive model of income. Our analysis uncovers a correlation between future temporal orientation and income. Finally, we measure the predictive power of future temporal orientation on income by performing regression.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يساعد التقدير التلقائي للملف الشخصي الاجتماعي والاقتصادي للمستخدم من استخدام اللغة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بشكل كبير في أبحاث العلوم الاجتماعية والتطبيقات النهائية المختلفة التي تتراوح من الأعمال إلى السياسة. تقدم الورقة الحالية الدراسة الأولى حيث يتم استخدام الهيكل المعرفي للمستخدم لبناء نموذج تنبؤي للدخل. على وجه الخصوص ، قمنا أولاً بتطوير مصنف باستخدام إطار عمل تعليمي خاضع للإشراف الضعيف لوضع علامة زمنية تلقائيًا على التغريدات في الماضي أو الحاضر أو المستقبل. نحدد الاتجاه الزمني العام للمستخدم بناءً على توزيعه للتغريدات ، ونستخدمه لبناء نموذج تنبؤي للدخل. يكشف تحليلنا عن وجود علاقة بين التوجه الزمني المستقبلي والدخل. أخيرًا ، نقيس القوة التنبؤية للتوجه الزمني المستقبلي على الدخل من خلال إجراء الانحدار.', 'pt': 'Estimar automaticamente o perfil socioeconômico de um usuário a partir de seu uso de linguagem nas mídias sociais pode ajudar significativamente a pesquisa em ciências sociais e várias aplicações posteriores, desde negócios até política. O presente artigo apresenta o primeiro estudo onde a estrutura cognitiva do usuário é usada para construir um modelo preditivo de renda. Em particular, primeiro desenvolvemos um classificador usando uma estrutura de aprendizado fracamente supervisionada para marcar automaticamente os tweets como passado, presente ou futuro. Quantificamos a orientação temporal geral de um usuário com base em sua distribuição de tweets e a usamos para construir um modelo preditivo de renda. Nossa análise revela uma correlação entre orientação temporal futura e renda. Por fim, medimos o poder preditivo da orientação temporal futura sobre a renda por meio de regressão.', 'fr': "L'estimation automatique du profil socio-économique d'un utilisateur à partir de son utilisation de la langue dans les médias sociaux peut grandement aider la recherche en sciences sociales et diverses applications en aval, allant des affaires à la politique. Le présent article présente la première étude dans laquelle la structure cognitive de l'utilisateur est utilisée pour construire un modèle prédictif du revenu. En particulier, nous développons d'abord un classificateur utilisant un framework d'apprentissage faiblement supervisé pour étiqueter automatiquement les tweets comme étant passés, présents ou futurs. Nous quantifions l'orientation temporelle globale d'un utilisateur en fonction de sa distribution de tweets, et nous l'utilisons pour créer un modèle prédictif de revenus. Notre analyse met en évidence une corrélation entre l'orientation temporelle future et le revenu. Enfin, nous mesurons le pouvoir prédictif de l'orientation temporelle future sur le revenu en effectuant une régression.", 'es': 'Estimar automáticamente el perfil socioeconómico de un usuario a partir de su uso del idioma en las redes sociales puede ayudar significativamente a la investigación en ciencias sociales y a diversas aplicaciones posteriores que van desde los negocios hasta la política. El presente artículo presenta el primer estudio en el que se utiliza la estructura cognitiva del usuario para construir un modelo predictivo de ingresos. En particular, primero desarrollamos un clasificador utilizando un marco de aprendizaje débilmente supervisado para etiquetar automáticamente los tuits como pasados, presentes o futuros. Cuantificamos la orientación temporal general de un usuario en función de su distribución de tuits y la utilizamos para crear un modelo predictivo de ingresos. Nuestro análisis revela una correlación entre la orientación temporal futura y los ingresos. Finalmente, medimos el poder predictivo de la orientación temporal futura sobre los ingresos mediante la realización de una regresión.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアでの言語使用からユーザーの社会経済プロファイルを自動的に推定することは、社会科学研究やビジネスから政治までのさまざまなダウンストリームのアプリケーションに大いに役立ちます。現在の論文では、ユーザーの認知構造が収入の予測モデルを構築するために使用される最初の研究を紹介している。特に、私たちはまず、過去、現在、または将来のようなツイートに自動的にタイムタグを付けるために、弱く監督された学習フレームワークを使用して分類子を開発します。ツイートの分布に基づいてユーザーの全体的な時間指向を定量化し、それを使用して収入の予測モデルを構築します。私たちの分析は、将来の時間的方向性と収入との間の相関関係を明らかにします。最後に、回帰を行うことにより、所得に対する将来の時間指向の予測力を測定する。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया में अपनी भाषा के उपयोग से उपयोगकर्ता के सामाजिक-आर्थिक प्रोफ़ाइल का स्वचालित रूप से अनुमान लगाने से सामाजिक विज्ञान अनुसंधान और व्यवसाय से लेकर राजनीति तक के विभिन्न डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों में काफी मदद मिल सकती है। वर्तमान पेपर पहला अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करता है जहां उपयोगकर्ता संज्ञानात्मक संरचना का उपयोग आय के एक पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल के निर्माण के लिए किया जाता है। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले एक कमजोर पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के ढांचे का उपयोग करके एक क्लासिफायर विकसित करते हैं ताकि अतीत, वर्तमान या भविष्य के रूप में स्वचालित रूप से समय-टैग ट्वीट्स को स्वचालित रूप से समय-टैग किया जा सके। हम ट्वीट्स के अपने वितरण के आधार पर एक उपयोगकर्ता के समग्र अस्थायी अभिविन्यास को मापते हैं, और इसका उपयोग आय के पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल का निर्माण करने के लिए करते हैं। हमारा विश्लेषण भविष्य के अस्थायी अभिविन्यास और आय के बीच एक सहसंबंध को उजागर करता है। अंत में, हम प्रतिगमन प्रदर्शन करके आय पर भविष्य के अस्थायी अभिविन्यास की भविष्यवाणी शक्ति को मापते हैं।', 'zh': '以用户社交媒体之言自度用户世,可大助社会科学治,与商政之下流。 本文第一项用用户认知结构以构测模形。 先用弱监学框架开一器,以自标推文为往,今或未来。 以用户之推文布量化用户时取向,因而用之。 分明未来时取向与收入相关性。 最后,我们因行回来量量来日月取向对收入的测量。', 'ru': 'Автоматическая оценка социально-экономического профиля пользователя на основе использования им языка в социальных сетях может значительно помочь в исследованиях в области социальных наук и различных последующих приложениях, начиная от бизнеса и заканчивая политикой. В настоящей работе представлено первое исследование, в котором когнитивная структура пользователя используется для построения прогностической модели дохода. В частности, мы сначала разрабатываем классификатор, используя слабо контролируемый обучающий фреймворк, чтобы автоматически помечать твиты как прошлые, настоящие или будущие. Мы количественно определяем общую временную ориентацию пользователя на основе распределения им твитов и используем ее для построения прогностической модели дохода. Наш анализ выявляет корреляцию между будущей временной ориентацией и доходами. Наконец, мы измеряем прогностическую силу будущей временной ориентации на доход, осуществляя регрессию.', 'ga': 'Má dhéantar próifíl shocheacnamaíoch úsáideora a mheas go huathoibríoch óna n-úsáid teanga ar na meáin shóisialta, is féidir cabhrú go mór le taighde ar an eolaíocht shóisialta agus le feidhmchláir éagsúla iartheachtacha ó ghnó go polaitíocht. Cuireann an páipéar reatha an chéad staidéar i láthair ina n-úsáidtear struchtúr cognaíoch úsáideora chun samhail ioncaim thuarthach a thógáil. Go háirithe, forbraímid aicmitheoir ar dtús ag baint úsáide as creat foghlama lag-mhaoirsithe chun tvuíteanna a chlibeáil go huathoibríoch mar an am atá caite, san am i láthair nó san am atá le teacht. Déanaimid cainníochtú ar threoshuíomh ama foriomlán úsáideora bunaithe ar a dháileadh tweets, agus úsáidimid é chun samhail thuarthach ioncaim a thógáil. Nochtann ár n-anailís comhghaol idir treoshuíomh ama amach anseo agus ioncam. Ar deireadh, tomhaisimid an chumhacht thuarthach a bhaineann le treoshuíomh ama amach anseo ar ioncam trí chúlchéimniú a dhéanamh.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში სოციალური მედიაში მომხმარებლის სოციო-ეკონომიკური პროფილის ავტომატურად გადაწყენება შეიძლება სოციალური მეცნიერების გასწავლება და განსხვავებული მო მიმდინარე წიგნის პირველი სწავლას, სადაც მომხმარებელი კონციგური სტრუქტურაცია გამოყენებულია მოსახულების მოდელს შექმნა. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველად კლასიფიკაციის განვითარებით, როგორც წინა, ახლა, ან მომავალეობით, სწავლად დავაკეთებული სწავლების ფრამეტრის გამოყენებით ჩვენ გამოყენებელი სამყარო ტემპალური ორიციენტის კვანტიფიკაციას გავაკეთებთ და გამოყენებთ სამყარო მოვლენების მოდელი. ჩვენი ანალიზია მომავალეთ ტემპალიური ორიზენტიაცია და მოსავლების შორის კორელეციას გახსნა. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ განვითარებით მომავალური ტემპალური ორიციაციის წარმოდგენების შესახებ რეგრესიის შესახებ.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη εκτίμηση του κοινωνικοοικονομικού προφίλ ενός χρήστη από τη χρήση γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης μπορεί να βοηθήσει σημαντικά την έρευνα των κοινωνικών επιστημών και διάφορες μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές που κυμαίνονται από τις επιχειρήσεις έως την πολιτική. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την πρώτη μελέτη όπου η γνωστική δομή του χρήστη χρησιμοποιείται για την κατασκευή ενός προβλέψιμου μοντέλου εισοδήματος. Ειδικότερα, αναπτύσσουμε πρώτα έναν ταξινομητή χρησιμοποιώντας ένα ανεπαρκώς εποπτευμένο μαθησιακό πλαίσιο για την αυτόματη χρονοσήμανση των tweets ως παρελθόν, παρόν ή μέλλον. Καταγράφουμε ποσοτικά τον συνολικό χρονικό προσανατολισμό ενός χρήστη με βάση τη διανομή των tweets του και το χρησιμοποιούμε για να χτίσουμε ένα προβλέψιμο μοντέλο εισοδήματος. Η ανάλυσή μας αποκαλύπτει συσχέτιση μεταξύ μελλοντικού χρονικού προσανατολισμού και εισοδήματος. Τέλος, μετράμε την προγνωστική δύναμη του μελλοντικού χρονικού προσανατολισμού στο εισόδημα με την εκτέλεση παλινδρόμησης.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók társadalmi-gazdasági profiljának automatikus becslése a közösségi médiában történő nyelvhasználat alapján jelentős mértékben segíthet a társadalomtudományi kutatásban és a különböző downstream alkalmazásokban, az üzleti élettől a politikáig. A jelen tanulmány bemutatja az első olyan tanulmányt, amelyben a felhasználói kognitív struktúrát használják a jövedelem prediktív modelljének kialakítására. Elsősorban egy gyengén felügyelt tanulási keretrendszer segítségével fejlesztünk ki egy osztályozót, amely automatikusan időzíti a tweeteket, mint múlt, jelen vagy jövő. Számszerűsítjük egy felhasználó általános időbeli orientációját a tweetek elosztása alapján, és arra használjuk, hogy prediktív jövedelmi modellt építsünk. Elemzésünk feltárja a jövőbeli időorientáció és a jövedelem összefüggését. Végül regresszióval mérjük a jövőbeli időbeli orientáció jövedelemre vonatkozó prediktív erejét.', 'it': "Stimare automaticamente il profilo socio-economico di un utente in base al suo uso linguistico nei social media può aiutare significativamente la ricerca di scienze sociali e varie applicazioni a valle che vanno dal business alla politica. Il presente articolo presenta il primo studio in cui la struttura cognitiva dell'utente viene utilizzata per costruire un modello predittivo di reddito. In particolare, sviluppiamo un classificatore utilizzando un framework di apprendimento debolmente supervisionato per taggare automaticamente i tweet come passati, presenti o futuri. Quantifichiamo l'orientamento temporale complessivo di un utente in base alla distribuzione dei tweet e lo utilizziamo per costruire un modello predittivo di reddito. La nostra analisi rivela una correlazione tra orientamento temporale futuro e reddito. Infine, misuriamo la potenza predittiva dell'orientamento temporale futuro sul reddito eseguendo regressione.", 'kk': 'Автоматты түрде пайдаланушылардың қолданыстағы тілдерінің социалдық медиақтарда қолданылатын социалдық ғылым зерттеулеріне және бизнесден саясатқа көмектесуге болады. Қолданыстағы қағаз, пайдаланушының көңіл құрылғысын таңдау үшін қолданылатын бірінші зерттеулерді көрсетеді. Әрине біріншіден, уақыт тегтерін өткен, қазіргі немесе болашақ қызметтерді автоматты түрде бақылайтын оқыту бағдарламасын қолдану үшін классификаторын жасаймыз. Біз пайдаланушының жалпы уақытша бағыттауын түсіндіреміз. Твиттердің үлестіріміне негізделген және оларды таңдау үшін қолданамыз. Біздің анализиямыз келесі уақытша бағыттау мен келесі мәліметтер арасындағы коррелизацияны түсіндіреді. Соңында, біз келесі уақытша бағыттау үшін келесі уақытша бағыттау күшін регрессиясын орындап өлшеміз.', 'lt': 'Automatiškai vertinant naudotojo social in į ir ekonominį pobūdį, atsižvelgiant į kalbų naudojimą socialinėje žiniasklaidoje, gali būti labai naudinga socialiniams moksliniams tyrimams ir įvairioms tolesnėms taikomosioms programoms nuo verslo iki politikos. Dabartiniame dokumente pateikiamas pirmasis tyrimas, kuriame naudotojų kognityvinė struktūra naudojama prognozuojamam pajamų modeliui sukurti. Visų pirma mes pirmiausia parengiame klasifikatorių, naudojantį silpnai prižiūrimą mokymosi sistemą, kad automatiškai laiku žymėtų tweetus kaip praeitį, dabartinį ar ateitį. Mes kiekybiškai vertiname bendrą naudotojo laiko orientaciją, pagrįstą jų tweetų platinimu, ir naudojame ją, kad sukurtume prognozuojamą pajamų model į. Mūsų analizė atskleidžia būsimos laiko orientacijos ir pajamų koreliaciją. Galiausiai vertiname būsimos laikinos orientacijos į pajamas prognozuojamąją galią vykdant regresiją.', 'mk': 'Автоматска проценка на социоекономскиот профил на корисникот од нивното употребување на јазикот во социјалните медиуми може значително да помогне во истражувањето на социјалната наука и различните понатамошни апликации кои се движат од бизнис до поли Сегашниот весник ја претставува првата студија во која корисничката когнитивна структура се користи за изградба на предвидлив модел на приход. Посебно, прво развиваме класификатор кој користи слабо надгледувана научна рамка за автоматски твитови со временски означувања како минато, сегашност или иднина. Ја квантификуваме целокупната временска ориентација на корисникот базирана на нивната дистрибуција на твитови, и ја користиме за да изградиме предвидлив модел на приход. Нашата анализа открива корелација помеѓу идната временска ориентација и приходот. Конечно, ја мериме предвидувачката моќ на идната временска ориентација на приходот со регресија.', 'ms': 'Menghargai secara automatik profil sosial-ekonomi pengguna dari penggunaan bahasa mereka dalam media sosial boleh membantu penelitian sains sosial dan pelbagai aplikasi turun berlainan dari perniagaan ke politik. Kertas semasa memperkenalkan kajian pertama di mana struktur kognitif pengguna digunakan untuk membina model pendapatan ramalan. In particular, we first develop a classifier using a weakly supervised learning framework to automatically time-tag tweets as past, present, or future.  Kita kuantifikasikan orientasi sementara umum pengguna berdasarkan distribusi tweet mereka, dan gunakannya untuk membina model pendapatan ramalan. Analisis kami menemukan korelasi antara orientasi sementara masa depan dan pendapatan. Akhirnya, kita mengukur kuasa ramalan orientasi masa depan pada pendapatan dengan melakukan regresi.', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും അവരുടെ ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യ-സാമൂഹ്യ-സാമ്പത്തിക പ്രൊഫൈല ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പഠനം കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ കോഗ്രിനിവ് ക്രമീകരണം കൊണ്ട് വരു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫ്രെയിക്കറിനെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. നേരത്തെയോ ഭാവിയെയോ സ്വയം സമയ-ട്രാക്ക് ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ മൊത്തം സമയത്തിലേക്കുള്ള തിരിച്ചറിയിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d വിതരണം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഭാവിയുടെ സമയത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും വരുന്നതിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധമാണ്. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാവിയുടെ സമയത്തേക്ക് നേരിടുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രത്യേക ശക്തി അളന്നുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വീണ്ടെടുക്', 'mt': 'L-istima awtomatika tal-profil soċjoekonomiku tal-utent mill-użu tal-lingwa tagħhom fil-midja soċjali tista’ tgħin b’mod sinifikanti fir-riċerka tax-xjenza soċjali u applikazzjonijiet varji downstream li jvarjaw minn negozju s a politika. Id-dokument attwali jippreżenta l-ewwel studju fejn l-istruttura konjittiva tal-utent tintuża biex jinbena mudell ta’ dħul prevedibbli. B’mod partikolari, l-ewwel nett niżviluppaw klassifikatur li juża qafas ta’ tag ħlim b’superviżjoni dgħajfa biex awtomatikament jitwaħħlu tweets bit-tikketti tal-ħin bħala passat, preżenti, jew futur. Aħna nikkwantifikaw l-orjentazzjoni temporali globali ta’ utent ibbażata fuq id-distribuzzjoni tagħhom ta’ tweets, u nużaha biex nibnu mudell ta’ previżjoni tad-dħul. L-analiżi tagħna tiskopri korrelazzjoni bejn l-orjentazzjoni temporali futura u d-dħul. Fl-aħħar nett, aħna nqisu s-saħħa prevedibbli tal-orjentazzjoni temporali futura fuq id-dħul billi nagħmlu rigressjoni.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээнээс өөрсдийн хэл дээр хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн эдийн засгийн талаар автоматаар үнэлэх нь нийгмийн шинжлэх ухааны судалгаа, бизнесээс улс төрийн хүртэл олон до Харин одоогийн цаас хэрэглэгчийн мэдээллийн бүтэц хэрэглэгддэг эхний судалгааг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид анхны хувьд цаг хугацааны tweets-г өмнө, өнөөдөр, ирээдүйн шиг автоматжуулахын тулд суралцах суралцах багц ашиглаж хуваалцагчийг хөгжүүлдэг. Бид хэрэглэгчийн ерөнхий цаг хугацааны загварын тоо хэмжээгээр tweets хуваарилалтын тулд тоо хэмжээгээр орлоготой загвар бүтээхэд хэрэглэдэг. Бидний шинжилгээ ирээдүйн цаг хугацааны тэнхлэг болон орлоготой хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой. Эцэст нь бид ирээдүйн цаг хугацаанд орлогын талаарх таамаглалтын хүч чадлыг хэмжиж байна.', 'no': 'Automatisk vurdering av den sosiale og økonomiske profilen av brukaren frå språkbruken sine i sosiale medier kan hjelpa sosiale vitenskap og forskjellige nedtrekksprogrammer frå virksomheten til politikk. Dette gjeldande papiret viser den første studien der brukarskjegnitivstrukturen vert brukt for å bygge eit foregåande model av inntekt. I særskilt utviklar vi først ein klassifiserer ved å bruka ein viktig oversikt læringsrammeverk for automatisk time tag-tweets som siste, present eller framtidig. Vi kvantifiserer den heile temporale orientasjonen til ein brukar basert på distribusjonen av tweeter, og bruker den for å bygge eit foregåande innteksmodul. Analysen vårt opnar ei korrelasjon mellom framtidige tidsriensing og innteken. Til slutt måler vi den foregåande krafta for framtidige tidsriensing på inntekene ved å utføra regresjon.', 'ro': 'Estimarea automată a profilului socio-economic al unui utilizator pe baza utilizării limbii lor în rețelele sociale poate ajuta în mod semnificativ cercetarea științelor sociale și diverse aplicații din aval, de la afaceri la politică. Lucrarea actuală prezintă primul studiu în care structura cognitivă a utilizatorilor este utilizată pentru a construi un model predictiv de venit. În special, dezvoltăm mai întâi un clasificator folosind un cadru de învățare slab supravegheat pentru a eticheta automat tweeturile ca trecute, prezente sau viitoare. Cuantificăm orientarea temporală generală a unui utilizator pe baza distribuției de tweet-uri și o folosim pentru a construi un model predictiv de venit. Analiza noastră descoperă o corelație între orientarea temporală viitoare și veniturile. În cele din urmă, măsurăm puterea predictivă a orientării temporale viitoare asupra veniturilor prin efectuarea regresiei.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne oszacowanie profilu społeczno-ekonomicznego użytkownika z użycia języka w mediach społecznościowych może znacząco pomóc w badaniach nauk społecznych i różnych dalszych aplikacjach, od biznesu po politykę. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono pierwsze badanie, w którym użytkownik wykorzystuje strukturę poznawczą do budowy modelu predykcyjnego dochodu. W szczególności najpierw opracowujemy klasyfikator wykorzystujący słabo nadzorowane ramy uczenia się, aby automatycznie oznaczać tweety jako przeszłość, teraźniejszość lub przyszłość. Oszacowujemy ogólną orientację czasową użytkownika na podstawie ich dystrybucji tweetów i wykorzystujemy ją do zbudowania modelu predykcyjnego dochodu. Nasza analiza odkryła korelację między przyszłą orientacją czasową a dochodem. Wreszcie mierzymy moc predykcyjną przyszłej orientacji czasowej na dochody poprzez wykonanie regresji.', 'sr': 'Automatski procjenjivanje socio-ekonomskog profila korisnika iz njihove upotrebe jezika u društvenim medijima značajno može pomoći istraživanju socijalne nauke i različitim neposrednim aplikacijama od poslovanja do politike. Trenutni papir predstavlja prvu studiju gde se korisnička kognitivna struktura koristi za izgradnju predvidnog model prihoda. Posebno, prvo razvijamo klasifikatora koristeći slabo nadgledan okvir učenja da bi automatski dobili tweets za vrijeme kao prošlost, sadašnja ili budućnost. Mi kvantificiramo ukupnu privremenu orijentaciju korisnika na temelju njihovog distribucije tweeta i koristimo ga da izgradimo predvidan model prihoda. Naša analiza otkriva korelaciju između buduće privremene orijentacije i prihoda. Konačno, mjerimo predvidnu moć buduće privremene orijentacije na prihode izvršavajući regresiju.', 'si': 'සාමාජික විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමාජික විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙක්ගේ සාමාජික විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් ප්\u200dර ප්\u200dරස්තූත පත්තිය පෙන්වන්නේ පළමු පරීක්ෂණය පාවිච්චි පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ කොහෙද භාවිතා පරී විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම විශේෂකයෙක් විශේෂ කරනවා පළවෙනි විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා දුර්වලින් පරීක් අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ සාමාන්\u200dය කාලකාලික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ට්විට් විතරයේ අධිකරණය සඳහා, ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය අනාගතයේ අනාගතයේ අවස්ථාවක් සහ අවස්ථාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධයක් විස්තර කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි, අපි අනාගතයේ අනාගතයේ අවශ්\u200dය බලය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා අනාගතයේ අවශ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka bulshada iyo dhaqaalaha ee isticmaalka luuqadooda ee isticmaalka bulshada ayaa si muhiim ah u caawinaya cilmiga bulshada iyo codsiyado kala duduwan oo ka soo baxa ganacsiga iyo siyaasadeeda. Warqadda joogtada ah wuxuu keenaa waxbarashada ugu horeysa ee uu isticmaalayo dhismaha qofka isticmaalka si uu u dhiso model la sii sheegayo dakhliga. Si gaar ah, marka hore waxaynu horumarinnaa fasax aan isticmaalno qashinka waxbarashada oo itaal dareeraya si aan u isticmaalno tweetiyada hore, haatan ama mustaqbalka. Waxaannu ku qeexaynaa qaabka wakhtiga ugu horeysa ee isticmaalaha isticmaalaha oo ku saabsan qeybinta tweetka, waxaynu isticmaalnaa in uu dhiso qaab nolosha la sii sheegayo. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujiyaa xiriir u dhexeeya xilliga wakhtiga hore iyo dakhliga. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu qiyaasaynaa xoogga la hor dhigi karo ee waqtiga hore ee dakhliga ku saabsan waxyaabaha lagu sameeyo dib u celinta.', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں استعمال کی زبان سے یوسف کے سوسی اور اقتصادی پروفائیل کی آزمائش کرنا ضروری سے سوسیل سائنس تحقیقات اور مختلف نیچے آزمائش کی مدد کر سکتا ہے۔ موجود کاغذ پہلی مطالعہ کو دکھاتا ہے جہاں کارساز کی شناخت ساختار کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے ایک پیش بینی موڈل بنانے کے لئے۔ مخصوصا، ہم پہلی بار ایک کلاسپیر کو اگلوں، حاضروں یا آیندہ کے طور پر تایمٹ ٹویٹوں کے لئے کمزور نظارت کی سیکھنے والی فرمود کے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک کارساز کے سارے ٹیوٹوں کی تقسیم پر مقدار کرتے ہیں، اور اس کا استعمال کریں کہ ایک پیش بینی ماڈل بنائے۔ ہماری تحلیل نے آیندگی موقت و رسم کے درمیان ایک تعلق کھول دیا ہے۔ آخر میں، ہم آیندہ موقت کی روشنی کی پیش بینی قوت کو اندازہ لیتے ہیں، انصاف کے ذریعہ سے.', 'ta': 'ஒரு பயனரின் சமூக- பொருளாதார விவரம் தானாகவே மதிப்பெடுக்கப்படுகிறது அவர்களுடைய மொழியிலிருந்து சமூக அறிவியல் ஆராய்ச்சியில் இருந்து தொ The current paper presents the first study where user cognitive structure is used to build a predictive model of income.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் ஒரு வகுப்பாளரை முன்பு, தற்போது, அல்லது எதிர்காலத்திற்கு தானாகவே நேரத்தை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கான ஒரு பலவ நாம் பயனரின் மொத்த நேரம் திசையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் அவற்றின் பங்கீட்டை அடிப்படையில் அவற்றை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் அதை  நம்முடைய ஆய்வு எதிர்கால நேரம் திசையில் மற்றும் வரும் இடையே ஒரு இணைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறது. இறுதியில், நாம் எதிர்காலத்தின் தற்கால நேரத்தின் திசைக்கு முன்னோக்கி சக்தியை அளந்து கொள்கிறோம் மறுக்', 'sv': 'Att automatiskt uppskatta en användares socioekonomiska profil utifrån deras språkanvändning i sociala medier kan avsevärt hjälpa samhällsvetenskaplig forskning och olika efterföljande tillämpningar, allt från företag till politik. Den aktuella uppsatsen presenterar den första studien där användarkognitiv struktur används för att bygga en prediktiv inkomstmodell. I synnerhet utvecklar vi först en klassificerare med hjälp av ett svagt övervakat lärramverk för att automatiskt tidstagga tweets som förflutna, nutida eller framtida. Vi kvantifierar en användares övergripande tidsorientering baserat på deras fördelning av tweets och använder den för att bygga en prediktiv inkomstmodell. Vår analys visar ett samband mellan framtida tidsorientering och inkomst. Slutligen mäter vi prediktionskraften i framtida tidsorientering på inkomst genom att utföra regression.', 'uz': "Name Joriy hujjatning birinchi o'qituvni koʻrsatiladi. Foydalanuvchi kognitiv structuri ishlatiladi. Ko'pchilik, biz avtomatik vaqt-tag tweetilarni avtomatik o'rganish chegarasini ishlatish uchun birinchi darajasini taʼminlaydimiz. Biz foydalanuvchining umumiy vaqt joyini Twitter tarqatish asosida aniqlash va uni ishlatish uchun kutilgan incol modelini yaratish uchun foydalanamiz. Analyzerimiz kelajak vaqt oynasi va ijodkorning orasidagi aloqalarni ko'rsatadi. Endi, biz kelajak vaqt joyini taqdimot qilish orqali oldinga kuchni o'ylaymiz.", 'vi': 'Tự động đánh giá hồ s ơ kinh tế của người dùng từ ngôn ngữ sử dụng trên các phương tiện xã hội có thể giúp nghiên cứu khoa học xã hội và nhiều ứng dụng phụ thuộc từ doanh nghiệp sang chính trị. Bài viết hiện thời đưa ra nghiên cứu đầu tiên nơi người dùng kiến trúc nhận thức được dùng để xây dựng mô hình dự đoán thu nhập. Trước tiên, chúng tôi phát triển một người phân loại sử dụng một hệ thống học được giám sát thiếu sót để tự động đánh dấu tweet như trước, hiện tại, hay tương lai. Chúng tôi định lượng phương hướng thời gian chung của người dùng dựa trên việc chia s ẻ các dòng tweet, và sử dụng nó để tạo mô hình dự đoán thu nhập. Phân tích của chúng tôi khám phá ra mối tương quan giữa định hướng thời gian và thu nhập. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi đo lường sức mạnh dự đoán của định hướng thời gian tương lai về thu nhập bằng cách thực hiện sự hồi phục.', 'nl': 'Het automatisch inschatten van het sociaal-economische profiel van een gebruiker op basis van hun taalgebruik in sociale media kan aanzienlijk bijdragen aan sociaal wetenschappelijk onderzoek en diverse downstreamtoepassingen, variërend van bedrijfsleven tot politiek. De huidige paper presenteert de eerste studie waarin de cognitieve structuur van gebruikers wordt gebruikt om een voorspellend model van inkomen te bouwen. In het bijzonder ontwikkelen we eerst een classificator met behulp van een zwak begeleid leerframework om tweets automatisch te timetag als verleden, heden of toekomst. We kwantificeren de algemene temporele oriëntatie van een gebruiker op basis van hun verspreiding van tweets, en gebruiken deze om een voorspellend model van inkomen te bouwen. Onze analyse onthult een correlatie tussen toekomstige tijdoriëntatie en inkomen. Ten slotte meten we de voorspellende kracht van toekomstige temporele oriëntatie op inkomen door regressie uit te voeren.', 'de': 'Die automatische Abschätzung des sozioökonomischen Profils eines Nutzers aus dem Sprachgebrauch in sozialen Medien kann die sozialwissenschaftliche Forschung und verschiedene nachgelagerte Anwendungen von Wirtschaft bis Politik erheblich unterstützen. Die vorliegende Arbeit stellt die erste Studie vor, in der die kognitive Struktur des Benutzers verwendet wird, um ein prädiktives Einkommensmodell zu erstellen. Insbesondere entwickeln wir zunächst einen Klassifikator, der ein schwach überwachtes Lernframework verwendet, um Tweets automatisch als Vergangenheit, Gegenwart oder Zukunft zu markieren. Wir quantifizieren die allgemeine zeitliche Orientierung eines Nutzers basierend auf seiner Verteilung von Tweets und verwenden sie, um ein prädiktives Einkommensmodell zu erstellen. Unsere Analyse zeigt einen Zusammenhang zwischen zukünftiger zeitlicher Orientierung und Einkommen. Schließlich messen wir die Vorhersagekraft der zukünftigen zeitlichen Orientierung auf das Einkommen durch Regression.', 'hr': 'Automatski procjenjivanje socio-ekonomskog profila korisnika iz uporabe jezika u društvenim medijima značajno može pomoći istraživanju socijalne nauke i raznim potpunim aplikacijama od poslovanja do politike. Trenutni papir predstavlja prvo ispitivanje gdje se korisnička kognitivna struktura koristi za izgradnju predvidnog model prihoda. Posebno, prvi put razvijemo klasifikatora koristeći slabo nadzirani okvir učenja kako bi se automatski natjecali na vrijeme kao prošlost, sadašnja ili budućnost. Mi kvantificiramo ukupnu privremenu orijentaciju korisnika na temelju njihovog distribucije tweets i koristimo ga kako bi izgradili predvidan model prihoda. Naša analiza otkriva korelaciju između buduće privremene orijentacije i prihoda. Konačno, mjerimo predviđavajuću moć buduće privremene orijentacije prihoda izvršavajući regresiju.', 'da': 'Automatisk estimering af en brugers socioøkonomiske profil ud fra deres sprogbrug i sociale medier kan hjælpe social videnskabelig forskning og forskellige downstream applikationer lige fra erhvervslivet til politik. Den nuværende artikel præsenterer den første undersøgelse, hvor brugerens kognitive struktur bruges til at opbygge en prædiktiv indkomstmodel. Især udvikler vi først og fremmest en klassificering ved hjælp af en svagt overvåget læringsramme til automatisk at tidsmærke tweets som fortid, nutid eller fremtid. Vi kvantificerer en brugers overordnede tidsorientering baseret på deres fordeling af tweets og bruger den til at opbygge en forudsigende indkomstmodel. Vores analyse afslører en sammenhæng mellem fremtidig tidsorientering og indkomst. Endelig måler vi den forudsigende kraft af fremtidig tidsorientering på indkomst ved at udføre regression.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното оценяване на социално-икономическия профил на потребителя от използването на езика в социалните медии може значително да помогне на научните изследвания в социалните науки и различни приложения надолу по веригата, вариращи от бизнес до политика. Настоящата статия представя първото проучване, при което потребителската когнитивна структура се използва за изграждане на предсказуем модел на доходите. По-конкретно, ние първо разработваме класификатор, използвайки слабо контролирана учебна рамка, за да маркираме автоматично туитовете като минало, настояще или бъдеще. Ние количествено измерваме общата времева ориентация на потребителя въз основа на разпространението на туитове и я използваме, за да изградим предсказуем модел на доходите. Нашият анализ разкрива връзка между бъдещата времева ориентация и доходите. Накрая измерваме прогнозната сила на бъдещата времева ориентация върху доходите чрез извършване на регресия.', 'ko': '사용자가 소셜 미디어에서의 언어 사용 상황에 따라 사용자의 사회 경제 상황을 자동으로 예측하면 사회 과학 연구와 상업에서 정치까지의 각종 하류 응용을 크게 도울 수 있다.본고는 첫 번째 사용자 인지 구조를 이용하여 소득 예측 모델을 구축하는 연구를 소개했다.특히 우리는 약한 감독 학습 프레임워크를 이용하여 추문을 과거, 현재 또는 미래로 자동으로 표시하는 분류기를 먼저 개발했다.우리는 사용자의 추문 분포에 따라 사용자의 전체적인 시간 취향을 계량화하고 이를 이용하여 소득 예측 모델을 구축한다.우리의 분석은 미래 시간 취향과 소득 간의 상관성을 보여 주었다.마지막으로 우리는 회귀를 통해 미래 시간 취향이 소득에 대한 예측 능력을 평가한다.', 'id': "Automatically estimating a user's socio-economic profile from their language use in social media can significantly help social science research and various downstream applications ranging from business to politics.  Kertas saat ini menunjukkan studi pertama di mana struktur kognitif pengguna digunakan untuk membangun model prediksif pendapatan. Terutama, kita pertama-tama mengembangkan klasifikasi menggunakan kerangka belajar yang terlihat lemah untuk secara otomatis time-tag tweet sebagai masa lalu, sekarang, atau masa depan. Kami mengurangi orientasi temporal umum pengguna berdasarkan distribusi tweet mereka, dan menggunakannya untuk membangun model prediksif pendapatan. Analisi kami menemukan korelasi antara orientasi temporal masa depan dan pendapatan. Akhirnya, kita mengukur kekuatan prediksi orientasi sementara masa depan pada pendapatan dengan melakukan regresi.", 'fa': 'با خودکار ارزیابی پروفایل اجتماعی و اقتصادی یک کاربر از استفاده از زبانشان در رسانه های اجتماعی می تواند به معنی تحقیقات علم اجتماعی و کاربردهای مختلف پایین از تجارت تا سیاست کمک کند. کاغذ فعلی اولین مطالعه را نشان می دهد که ساختار شناخته کاربر برای ساختن یک مدل پیش بینی درآمد استفاده می شود. مخصوصا، ما اول با استفاده از یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ما توسط تقسیم توئیت\u200cهایشان به مقدار مدل پیش\u200cبینی درآمد یک کاربر را مقدار می\u200cدهیم و از آن استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک مدل پیش\u200cبینی از درآمد بسازیم. تحلیل ما ارتباطی بین رهبری موقتی و درآمد آینده را کشف می\u200cکند. بالاخره، ما قدرت پیش\u200cبینی از رهبری موقتی آینده را با انجام بازگشت اندازه می\u200cگیریم.', 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň sosial-ekonomik profilini soýunlar medýdançasynda ulanmaklaryndan awtomatik duýgulamak sosial bilim araştyrmalaryna we dürli işlemlere biznes we syýasatdan çenli daşary kömek edip biler. Häzirki kagyzyň ilkinji öwrenmesini belli edip ularyň pikirimçi strukturyny gurmak üçin ullanýan öwrenmegi görkezýär. Aýratyn bolsa, biz ilkinji gezek wagt-tägleri geçmişi, şu wagt we gelejeki ýaly çarpyşlyk bilen klassifikatçi ullanýarys. Biz kullanıcılaryň tüm zamanlı yöntemlerini tweets dağıtımlarına dayanan şeklinde ölçüp, gelirlerin öngörümli modelini inşa etmek için kullanırız. Biziň analýusymyz gelejekde wagt yöntemleri we gelişleriň arasynda bir baglaýyşy a çar. Soňunda, gelejekde wagt orjentasynyň öngörünç güýji ölçüp regressiýa etmäge başladyk.', 'sw': 'Kukadiria binafsi taarifa za mtumiaji wa kijamii na kiuchumi kutoka kwa matumizi ya lugha yao katika mitandao ya kijamii zinaweza kusaidia utafiti wa sayansi za kijamii na matumizi mbalimbali ya mitandao yanayotokana na biashara hadi siasa. Gazeti la sasa linaonyesha utafiti wa kwanza ambapo muundo wa mtumiaji wa utambuzi unatumiwa kutengeneza muundo wa kipato unaotabiri. Kwa ujumla, kwanza tunaendelea mfanyakazi kwa kutumia mfumo wa kujifunza unaothibitishwa dhaifu kwa kutumia twiti za mara kwa mara zilizopita, sasa, au mustakabali. Tunakadiria mwelekeo wa muda kwa ujumla wa mtumiaji kwa kutumia usambazaji wa twiti, na kutumia kutengeneza muundo wa kipato unaotabiri. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha uhusiano kati ya mwelekeo wa muda mfupi na kipato. Mwisho, tunapima nguvu ya kutabiri ya mwelekeo wa muda ujao wa kipato kwa kutekeleza kandamizi.', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi automatik i profilit socio-ekonomik të përdoruesit nga përdorimi i gjuhës s ë tyre në mediat shoqërore mund të ndihmojë ndjeshëm kërkimin e shkencës sociale dhe aplikimet e ndryshme në vazhdim që shkojnë nga biznesi në politikë. Gazeta aktuale paraqet studimin e parë ku struktura kognitive e përdoruesit përdoret për të ndërtuar një model parashikues të të ardhurave. Në veçanti, ne së pari zhvillojmë një klasifikues duke përdorur një kuadër mësimi të mbikqyrur dobësisht për automatikisht të shkruajturit e kohës si të kaluarën, të tanishmen apo të ardhmen. Ne kuantifikojmë orientacionin e përgjithshëm temporal të përdoruesit bazuar në shpërndarjen e tyre të tweeteve, dhe e përdorim për të ndërtuar një model parashikues të të ardhurave. Our analysis uncovers a correlation between future temporal orientation and income.  Më në fund, ne matëm fuqinë parashikuese të orientimit të ardhshëm temporal mbi të ardhurat duke kryer regresionin.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚውን ማኅበራዊ-የኢኮኖሚ ፕሮግራም ከቋንቋቸው በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን ማኅበራዊ የሳይንስ ትምህርት እና ከንግድ ጀምሮ ወደ ፖለቲካ በተለየ የውሃ ውኃ ያሉትን ፕሮግራሞች በብርቱ ይረዳሉ፡፡ የአሁኑ ገጾች የፊተኛውን ትምህርት ማድረግ የሚጠቅመውን የውይይት ሙሉ ለመሥራት የሚጠቀሙትን ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ አስቀድመን ባለፉት፣ አሁን ወይም የቀድሞው፣ ባለፉት፣ የጦር ትዊተሮችን ለመግለጽ የሚታወቀውን ትምህርት ፍሬም በመጠቀም የሚታየውን ክፍል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጠቃሚውን በጥቅምት የጊዜው ማቀናጃ እናቆጥራለን፡፡ Analyzerቻችን የቀድሞው ሰዓት እና የውጤት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ይገልጣል፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ የመጨረሻው የዘጠኝ ወቅት ማቀናኘት ስልጣንን በመስጠት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡', 'af': "Automaties 'n gebruiker se sosiale-ekonomiese profiel van hul taal gebruik in sosiale media kan betekenlik sosiale wetensondersoek en verskillende onderstreemde toepassings help vanaf besigheid tot politiek. Die huidige papier stel die eerste studie waar gebruiker kognitiewe struktuur gebruik word om 'n voorskou model van inkom te bou. In spesifieke, ons ontwikkel eerste 'n klassifiseerder met 'n swak ondersoekte leer raamwerk om automaties tyd- etiket tweets as verlede, huidige of toekomstige te ontwikkel. Ons quantifiseer 'n gebruiker se heeltemal tydelike oriëntasie gebaseer op hul verspreiding van tweets, en gebruik dit om 'n voorskoulike model van inkom te bou. Ons analisie ontdek 'n korrelasie tussen toekomstige tydelike oriëntasie en inkomste. Eindelik maal ons die voorskoulike krag van toekomstige tydelike oriëntasie op inkoms deur regresie te doen.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একজন ব্যবহারকারীর সমাজ-অর্থনৈতিক প্রোফাইল তাদের ভাষা থেকে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করা থেকে সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানি বর্তমান পত্রিকা প্রথম গবেষণাটি উপস্থাপন করেছে যেখানে ব্যবহারকারী কোন কাঠামো ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে আয়ের ভবিষ্যৎ মডেল বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে একটি শ্রেণীবিভাগের উন্নয়ন করি দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণ শিক্ষা ফ্রেম ব্যবহার করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সময়-ট্যাগ টুইটের স আমরা টুইট বিতরণের ভিত্তিতে একজন ব্যবহারকারীর সাধারণ মাধ্যমের দিকের পরিমাণ পরিমাপ করি এবং এটি আয়ের ভবিষ্যৎ মডেল তৈরি করতে ব্যবহার করি। Our analysis uncovers a correlation between future temporal orientation and income.  অবশেষে, আমরা ভবিষ্যতের সাময়িক দিকের ভবিষ্যতের দিকের ভবিষ্যৎ ক্ষমতা পরিমাপ করি আয়ের উপর আয়ের উপর।', 'hy': "Օգտագործողի սոցիալական-տնտեսական պրոֆիլը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում օգտագործվող լեզվի միջոցով ավտոմատիկ գնահատելը կարող է նշանակալի օգնել սոցիալական գիտության հետազոտություններին և տարբեր հետագա ծրագրերին, որոնք Այսօրվա հոդվածը ներկայացնում է առաջին ուսումնասիրությունը, որտեղ օգտագործողների ճանաչողական կառուցվածքը օգտագործվում է եկամուտի կանխատեսող մոդելի կառուցելու համար: Հատկապես, մենք առաջին անգամ ստեղծում ենք դասակարգիչ՝ օգտագործելով թույլ վերահսկված ուսուցման շրջանակը, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար ժամանակի թվիթերը նշանակեն անցյալ, ներկա կամ ապագա: Մենք քանակում ենք օգտագործողի ընդհանուր ժամանակական ուղղությունը, հիմնված թվիթերի բաշխման վրա, և օգտագործում ենք այն եկամուտի կանխատեսողական մոդելի կառուցելու համար: Մեր վերլուծությունը բացահայտում է կապը ապագա ժամանակական ուղղության և եկամուտի միջև: Վերջապես, մենք չափում ենք ապագա ժամանակական ուղղության կանխատեսողական ուժը եկամուտների վրա' կատարելով ռեգրեսիա:", 'bs': 'Automatski procjenjivanje socio-ekonomskog profila korisnika iz njihove upotrebe jezika u društvenim medijima može značajno pomoći istraživanju socijalne nauke i različitim potpunim aplikacijama od poslovanja do politike. Trenutni papir predstavlja prvu studiju gdje se korisnica kognitivne strukture koristi za izgradnju predvidnog model prihoda. Posebno, prvo razvijamo klasifikatora koristeći slabo nadzirani okvir učenja kako bi automatski dobili tweets za vrijeme kao prošlost, sadašnja ili budućnost. Mi kvantificiramo ukupnu privremenu orijentaciju korisnika na temelju njihovog distribucije tweeta i koristimo ga za izgradnju predvidnog model prihoda. Naša analiza otkriva korelaciju između buduće privremene orijentacije i prihoda. Konačno, mjerimo predvidnu moć buduće privremene orijentacije na prihod izvršavajući regresiju.', 'ca': "Estimar automàticament el perfil socioeconòmic d'un usuari a partir del seu ús de llenguatge en els mitjans socials pot ajudar significativament la recerca de ciències socials i diverses aplicacions a avall, des de negocis a política. El paper actual presenta el primer estudi on s'utilitza l'estructura cognitiva de l'usuari per construir un model preditiu d'ingressos. En particular, primer desenvolupem un classificador utilitzant un marc d'aprenentatge debilment supervisat per a etiquetar automàticament els tweets com passat, present o futur. Quantifiquem l'orientació temporal general d'un usuari basada en la seva distribució de tweets, i l'utilitzem per construir un model preditiu d'ingressos. La nostra anàlisi descobre una correlació entre orientació temporal futura i ingressos. Finalment, mesurem el poder preditiu de l'orientació temporal futura als ingressos fent regressió.", 'et': 'Kasutaja sotsiaalmajandusliku profiili automaatne hindamine nende keelekasutuse alusel sotsiaalmeedias võib oluliselt aidata kaasa sotsiaalteaduste uurimisele ja erinevatele järgnevatele rakendustele, alates ärist kuni poliitikani. Käesolevas töös esitatakse esimene uuring, kus kasutaja kognitiivset struktuuri kasutatakse sissetuleku prognoosiva mudeli loomiseks. Eelkõige töötame esmalt välja klassifitseerija, mis kasutab nõrgalt juhitavat õpperaamistikku, et automaatselt ajamärgistada säutsud minevikus, olevikus või tulevikus. Me kvantifitseerime kasutaja üldise ajalise orientatsiooni nende säutsude jaotuse põhjal ja kasutame seda sissetuleku prognoosiva mudeli loomiseks. Meie analüüs näitab seost tulevase ajalise orientatsiooni ja sissetuleku vahel. Lõpuks mõõdame tulevase ajalise orientatsiooni prognoosivõimet sissetulekule regressiooni teel.', 'az': 'İstifadəçin in sosyal-ekonomik proqramlarının dillərinin istifadəsindən və sosyal mediyalarında sosyal elmi araştırmalarına və müxtəlif düşük proqramlarına kömək edə bilər. Hazırkı kağıt ilk təhsil göstərir ki, istifadəçilərin kognitiv quruluşu gəlir modeli inşa etmək üçün istifadə edilir. Özellikle, biz ilk dəfə keçmişi, həqiqəti, ya da gələcəyi kimi zamanı-etiketləri avtomatik olaraq müəyyən edilən öyrənmə framework ünü istifadə edərək bir klasifikatçı təhsil edirik. Biz bir istifadəçinin bütün vaxtlı tərəflərini twet dağıtılışına dayandırırıq və onu tədbir model inşa etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim analizimiz gələcək müddətli tərəflər və gəlirlər arasındakı bir bağlantısını a çar. Sonunda, gələcək müddətli tərəfdən gələcək müddətli tərəfdən gələcək gücünü ölçürük.', 'fi': 'Käyttäjän sosioekonomisen profiilin automaattinen arviointi kielenkäytön perusteella sosiaalisessa mediassa voi merkittävästi auttaa yhteiskuntatieteellistä tutkimusta ja erilaisia jatkojalostuksen sovelluksia liiketoiminnasta politiikkaan. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään ensimmäinen tutkimus, jossa käyttäjien kognitiivista rakennetta käytetään ennakoivan tulomallin rakentamiseen. Erityisesti kehitämme ensin luokittelijan, joka käyttää heikosti valvottua oppimiskehystä, jotta twiitit voidaan automaattisesti merkitä menneisyyteen, nykyhetkeen tai tulevaisuuteen. Määritämme käyttäjän kokonaisaikaorientaation tweettien jakautumisen perusteella ja käytämme sitä ennakoivan tulomallin rakentamiseen. Analyysimme paljastaa korrelaation tulevan ajallisen suuntautumisen ja tulojen välillä. Lopuksi mittaamme tulevan ajallisen suuntautumisen ennakoivan voiman tuloihin tekemällä regression.', 'cs': 'Automatický odhad sociálně-ekonomického profilu uživatele z jazykového používání v sociálních médiích může významně pomoci výzkumu sociálních věd a různým následným aplikacím od podnikání až po politiku. Současný článek představuje první studii, kde je uživatelská kognitivní struktura využita k vytvoření prediktivního modelu příjmu. Zejména nejprve vyvíjíme klasifikátor pomocí slabě dohlíženého učebního frameworku, který automaticky časově označuje tweety jako minulé, současné nebo budoucí. Kvantifikujeme celkovou časovou orientaci uživatele na základě distribuce tweetů a využíváme ji k vytvoření prediktivního modelu příjmů. Naše analýza odhaluje korelaci mezi budoucí časovou orientací a příjmem. Na závěr měříme prediktivní sílu budoucí časové orientace na příjmy provedením regrese.', 'jv': 'Automatically asserting a user\'s sotomo-saiki profile from their language use in media sotomo iso bantuan liyane karo dolanan saiki sotomo lan aplikasi liyane sing sampek bantuan suku negoro-politik Laptop" and "Desktop Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé iso nggawe kelas telas nang nguasai dituruti tur angel nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo tuka-tuka kuwi dituruti time-tag yo ngono padha, sadurut, lan juter. @title: group Ndeleksyone nambarang nggawe gerapakan karo perusahaan langkung sampek tarjamahan karo dolang LUTE', 'ha': "Ina iya ƙayyade kafin mai amfani da shi daga misuse da harshen su a cikin mitandan jamii, yana iya amfani da fassarar mutane da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka masu ƙaranci daga cinikin zuwa siyasa. Gaurar da ke yanzu na ƙunsa da na farkon lõkaci a inda ana yi amfani da mai amfani da matsayin kognitive dõmin ya gina wani misali na gabatar da daki. Ko da amfani da firam masu ƙaranci da aka tsare na karatun kafaffiyar ta farat-tagon-lokaci da ya gabãta, yanzu, ko gaba. Kana ƙayyade juyi na mai amfani da shi gaba ɗaya kan lokaci, ko kuma Muke amfani da shi dõmin ka sami wani misali na gabatar da daki. AnalyyinMu ya bayyana wata danganiya a tsakanin shirin zaman kashi da daki. Baƙari, Munã cika ƙarfin da ke gabatar da shirin zaman kashi a kan ijãra da za'a sami haramtar.", 'sk': 'Samodejno ocenjevanje socialno-ekonomskega profila uporabnika na podlagi uporabe jezika v družbenih omrežjih lahko pomembno pomaga raziskavam družboslovja in različnim nadaljnjim aplikacijam, od poslovanja do politike. V prispevku je predstavljena prva študija, v kateri se uporabniška kognitivna struktura uporablja za gradnjo napovednega modela dohodka. Zlasti smo najprej razvili klasifikator z uporabo šibko nadzorovanega učnega okvira za samodejno časovno označevanje tweetov kot preteklost, sedanjost ali prihodnost. Količinsko določimo splošno časovno usmerjenost uporabnika na podlagi njihove porazdelitve tweetov in jo uporabljamo za oblikovanje napovednega modela dohodka. Naša analiza odkriva korelacijo med prihodnjo časovno usmerjenostjo in dohodkom. Na koncu merimo napovedno moč prihodnje časovne orientacije na dohodek z regresijo.', 'he': 'הערכה אוטומטית של פרופיל סוציו-כלכלי של משתמש מהשימוש בשפה שלהם בתקשורת חברתית יכולה לעזור באופן משמעותי למחקר מדע חברתי ומשונים שיתופים מתקדמים מתרחשים מעסקים לפוליטיקה. הנייר הנוכחי מציג את המחקר הראשון שבו מבנה קוגניטיבי משתמש בבניין מודל חזיון של הכנסה. במיוחד, אנו מפתחים קודם קלאסיפור בשימוש בסגרת לימוד ששולטת בחולשה כדי אוטומטית טוויטים לתג זמן כעבר, הנוכחי, או עתיד. אנו מכוונים את המאוריינציה הזמנית הכללית של משתמש בהתבסס על פיצול הטוויטים שלהם, ושתמשו בו כדי לבנות מודל חזיון של הכנסה. הניתוח שלנו חושף קשר בין ההימור הזמני העתידי וההכנסה. סוף סוף, אנו ממדידים את הכוח הנחשאי של המאוריינציה הזמנית העתידית על הכנסה על ידי ביצוע regression.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་དཔལ་འབྱོར་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྲིད་དང་། ད་ལྟོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྩོལ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྩོལ་བ་དང་པོ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་བཟོ་ ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དུས་དང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དུས་མཚམས་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུད་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མ་འོངས་པར་གནས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མ་མཐུན་པས། མཇུག་རྫོགས་ན། ང་ཚོས་འབྱོར་ཐོག་མཐའ་མ་འོངས་པར་གི་སྔོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་ཞིག་ཚད་འཛིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Character-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'ar': 'توضيح الطابع العصبي الصرفي', 'pt': 'Desambiguação morfológica neural sensível ao caractere', 'fr': 'Désambiguïsation morphologique neuronale sensible au caractère', 'es': 'Desambiguación morfológica neuronal consciente de los caracteres', 'ja': '性格認識神経形態曖昧化', 'hi': 'चरित्र-जागरूक तंत्रिका रूपात्मक बहुविकल्पी', 'zh': '字符感知神经形消歧义', 'ru': 'Характерно-ориентированная нейронная морфологическая дезагрегация', 'ga': 'Dí-athbhrí Moirfeolaíocha Néaracha Feasacha ar Charachtar', 'ka': 'Character- Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'el': 'Νευρική Μορφολογική Αποκατάσταση με γνώση χαρακτήρων', 'hu': 'Karaktertudatos idegi morfológiai szétválasztás', 'it': 'Disambiguazione morfologica neurale consapevole del carattere', 'mk': 'Character-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'kk': 'Таңбаларды түсіру нейралық морфологикалық белсендіру', 'lt': 'Character-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'ms': 'Pengambiguasi Morfologi Neural Awas Aksara', 'ml': 'അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിയ്ക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d ഡിസ്മിപ്പഗ്വേഷന്\u200d', 'no': 'Teiknversjon av neirale morfologiske forsvinning', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч-мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'pl': 'Rozpraszanie neurologiczne świadome postaci', 'sr': 'Neuralna morfološka disambiguacija', 'ro': 'Dezambiguarea morfologică neurală conștientă de caracter', 'si': 'අක්ෂර- දැනගන්න නිර්මාණික මර්ෆෝලික අවස්ථාව', 'so': 'Character-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'ta': 'எழுத்து- நன்கு அறிந்த நெயுரல் மார்போலிக் குறைப்பு', 'sv': 'Karaktärsmedveten neural morfologisk nedbrytning', 'ur': 'Character-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'mt': 'Diżambigwazzjoni Morfoloġika Newrali Konxja mill-Karatteristiċi', 'uz': 'QFontDatabase', 'vi': 'Biến đổi thần kinh', 'bg': 'Неврологична морфологична дисамбигуация', 'nl': 'Karakterbewuste neurale morfologische disambiguatie', 'hr': 'Neuralna morfološka disambiguacija', 'id': 'Pengambiguasi Morfologi Neural Aware-Character', 'de': 'Charakterbewusste neuronale morphologische Disambiguation', 'da': 'Karakterbevidst Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'sw': 'Mgogoro wa Kikaratasi wenye ufahamu wa Neural Morphological', 'tr': 'Karakter-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'ko': '특징에 기초한 신경 형태학적 분열 해소', 'af': 'Character- Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'hy': 'Նեյրոլոգիական մորֆոլոգիական բացահայտությունը', 'sq': 'Disambiguacioni neurologjik i njohur me karaktere', 'az': 'Karakter-Aware Neural Morphological Disambiguation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'অক্ষর- সম্পর্কিত নিউরাল মরোফোলিক্যাল ডিসপিগুয়েশন', 'ca': 'Desambiguació neurològica conscient del caràcter', 'et': 'Märgiteadlik neuromorfoloogiline disambiguatsioon', 'fi': 'Merkkitietoinen neuromorfologinen hajoaminen', 'bs': 'Neuralna morfološka disambiguacija', 'cs': 'Neurální morfologické rozjasnění znaků', 'fa': 'ناپدید کردن مورفولوژیک عصبی', 'jv': 'Ngubah-Ngubah Karakter', 'he': 'ניתוח מופרפולוגי נוירולי מודע לכמויות', 'sk': 'Živčno-morfološko razpoznavanje znakov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་དང་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་སྐྱེལ་བ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'We develop a language-independent, deep learning-based approach to the task of morphological disambiguation. Guided by the intuition that the correct analysis should be most similar to the context, we propose dense representations for morphological analyses and surface context and a simple yet effective way of combining the two to perform disambiguation. Our approach improves on the language-dependent state of the art for two agglutinative languages (Turkish and Kazakh) and can be potentially applied to other morphologically complex languages.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتطوير نهج مستقل عن اللغة وقائم على التعلم العميق لمهمة إزالة الغموض المورفولوجي. مسترشدين بالحدس القائل بأن التحليل الصحيح يجب أن يكون "أكثر تشابهًا" مع السياق ، نقترح تمثيلات كثيفة للتحليلات المورفولوجية والسياق السطحي وطريقة بسيطة لكنها فعالة للجمع بين الاثنين لأداء توضيح. يعمل نهجنا على تحسين حالة الفن المعتمدة على اللغة لغتين مترابطتين (التركية والكازاخستانية) ويمكن تطبيقه على اللغات الأخرى المعقدة شكليًا.', 'es': 'Desarrollamos un enfoque independiente del idioma y basado en el aprendizaje profundo para la tarea de la desambiguación morfológica. Guiados por la intuición de que el análisis correcto debe ser «muy similar» al contexto, proponemos representaciones densas para los análisis morfológicos y el contexto de la superficie y una forma simple pero eficaz de combinar los dos para realizar la desambiguación. Nuestro enfoque mejora el estado del arte dependiente del idioma para dos idiomas aglutinantes (turco y kazajo) y se puede aplicar potencialmente a otros idiomas morfológicamente complejos.', 'fr': "Nous développons une approche indépendante de la langue et basée sur l'apprentissage profond de la tâche de désambiguïsation morphologique. Guidés par l'intuition que l'analyse correcte doit être «\xa0la plus proche\xa0» du contexte, nous proposons des représentations denses pour les analyses morphologiques et le contexte de surface et un moyen simple mais efficace de combiner les deux pour effectuer une désambiguïsation. Notre approche améliore l'état de l'art dépendant de la langue pour deux langues agglutinantes (le turc et le kazakh) et peut potentiellement être appliquée à d'autres langues morphologiquement complexes.", 'pt': 'Desenvolvemos uma abordagem independente de linguagem e baseada em aprendizado profundo para a tarefa de desambiguação morfológica. Guiados pela intuição de que a análise correta deve ser “mais semelhante” ao contexto, propomos representações densas para análises morfológicas e contexto de superfície e uma maneira simples, mas eficaz de combinar os dois para realizar a desambiguação. Nossa abordagem melhora o estado da arte dependente de idioma para duas línguas aglutinativas (turco e cazaque) e pode ser potencialmente aplicada a outras línguas morfologicamente complexas.', 'ja': '私たちは、形態曖昧化の課題に対する言語に依存しない、深い学習ベースのアプローチを開発します。正しい分析が文脈に「最も類似している」はずであるという直感に導かれて、我々は形態分析と表面文脈のための濃密な表現と、両者を組み合わせて曖昧さを解消するための単純で効果的な方法を提案する。私たちのアプローチは、２つの凝集性言語（トルコ語及びカザフ語）のための言語依存の最先端の状態を改善し、潜在的に他の形態学的に複雑な言語に適用することができる。', 'zh': '开独立于言语,基于深学,以决形歧义之务。 正论宜与上下文最相似之直觉,陈形析上下文之密,与一简而效者,合而行消歧义。 吾法更进二凝集性语(土耳其语与哈萨克语)语依赖性技术水平,而潜用于他形杂语。', 'ru': 'Мы разрабатываем языково-независимый, основанный на глубоком обучении подход к задаче морфологической разобщенности. Руководствуясь интуицией о том, что правильный анализ должен быть «наиболее похож» на контекст, мы предлагаем плотные представления для морфологического анализа и поверхностного контекста и простой, но эффективный способ объединения двух для выполнения дезагрегирования. Наш подход улучшает языкозависимое состояние техники для двух агглютинативных языков (турецкого и казахского) и потенциально может быть применен к другим морфологически сложным языкам.', 'hi': 'हम रूपात्मक बहुविकल्पी के कार्य के लिए एक भाषा-स्वतंत्र, गहरी सीखने-आधारित दृष्टिकोण विकसित करते हैं। अंतर्ज्ञान द्वारा निर्देशित कि सही विश्लेषण संदर्भ के लिए "सबसे समान" होना चाहिए, हम रूपात्मक विश्लेषण और सतह के संदर्भ के लिए घने प्रतिनिधित्व का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और दोनों को असंदिग्ध करने के लिए संयोजन का एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी तरीका है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण दो एग्लूटीनेटिव भाषाओं (तुर्की और कज़ाख) के लिए कला की भाषा-निर्भर स्थिति में सुधार करता है और संभावित रूप से अन्य रूपात्मक रूप से जटिल भाषाओं पर लागू किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Forbraímid cur chuige teanga-neamhspleách, domhainfhoghlaim-bhunaithe i leith tasc an dí-athbhrí moirfeolaíocha. Agus sinn á dtreorú ag an intuition gur cheart go mbeadh an anailís cheart “cosúil” leis an gcomhthéacs, molaimid léirithe dlúth le haghaidh anailísí moirfeolaíocha agus comhthéacs dromchla agus bealach simplí fós éifeachtach chun an dá cheann a chur le chéile chun dí-athbhrí a dhéanamh. Feabhsaítear ár gcur chuige ar an úrscothacht spleách ar theanga do dhá theanga glutineacha (Tuircis agus Casaicis) agus is féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm ar theangacha eile atá casta ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მპორპოლოგიური განსხვავებაზე მუშაობელი, ძალიან განსხვავებელი მიზეზი განვითარებთ. ინტეუციის მიხედვით, რომ მარტივი ანალიზია უნდა იყოს "უფრო მსგავსი" კონტექსტისთვის, ჩვენ მინდა მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზების და სამუშაო კონტექსტისთვის მხოლოდ, მაგრამ ეფექტიურ ჩვენი პროგორმაცია იქნება ხელსაწყოთა მსოფლიოლოგიურად დამუშავებული მდგომარეობაში ორი ადგლუტინატიური ენებისთვის (რუქური და კაზაკური) და შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება მო', 'el': 'Αναπτύσσουμε μια γλωσσική, βασισμένη στη βαθιά μάθηση προσέγγιση στο έργο της μορφολογικής αποσαφήνισης. Με γνώμονα τη διαίσθηση ότι η σωστή ανάλυση πρέπει να είναι "πιο παρόμοια" με το πλαίσιο, προτείνουμε πυκνές αναπαραστάσεις για μορφολογικές αναλύσεις και επιφανειακό πλαίσιο και έναν απλό αλλά αποτελεσματικό τρόπο συνδυασμού των δύο για να εκτελέσουμε αποσαφήνιση. Η προσέγγισή μας βελτιώνει τη γλωσσική κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για δύο συσσωρευτικές γλώσσες (τουρκικά και καζάκικα) και μπορεί ενδεχομένως να εφαρμοστεί σε άλλες μορφολογικά σύνθετες γλώσσες.', 'hu': 'A morfológiai egyértelműsítés feladatához nyelvfüggetlen, mélytanuláson alapuló megközelítést dolgozunk ki. Azzal az intuícióval vezérelve, hogy a helyes elemzésnek "leginkább hasonlónak" kell lennie a kontextushoz, sűrű reprezentációkat javasolunk morfológiai elemzésekhez és felületi kontextushoz, valamint egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony módon ötvözzük a kettőt, hogy egyértelművé tegyük a félreértést. Megközelítésünk javítja a két agglutinált nyelv (török és kazah) nyelvfüggő állapotát, és potenciálisan alkalmazható más morfológiailag összetett nyelvekre is.', 'kk': "Біз тілден тәуелсіз, тәуелсіз оқыту негізінде морфологиялық дисамбигуяцияның тапсырмасына тәсілді жасаймыз. Интуициялық дұрыс анализ контекстіне 'ең ұқсас' болу керек екенін, морфологиялық анализ және поверхностық контексті үшін тұрақтық таңбаларды және екеуін бұғаттау үшін біріктіру үшін қарапайым, әлі э Біздің тәсіліміміз тілде тәуелді әртүрлі күйіне екі агlutinatивті тілдерге (Түрк және Казахстан) жасайды. Басқа морфологиялық комплексті тілдерге қолданылады.", 'it': 'Sviluppiamo un approccio indipendente dal linguaggio e basato sull\'apprendimento profondo al compito della disambiguazione morfologica. Guidati dall\'intuizione che la corretta analisi dovrebbe essere "più simile" al contesto, proponiamo rappresentazioni dense per analisi morfologiche e contesto superficiale e un modo semplice ma efficace di combinare i due per eseguire la disambiguazione. Il nostro approccio migliora lo stato dell\'arte linguistico-dipendente per due lingue agglutinative (turco e kazako) e può essere potenzialmente applicato ad altre lingue morfologicamente complesse.', 'lt': 'We develop a language-independent, deep learning-based approach to the task of morphological disambiguation.  Remiantis intuicija, kad teisinga analizė turėtų būti "labiausiai panaši" į aplinkybes, siūlome intensyvią morfologinės analizės ir paviršiaus konteksto reprezentaciją ir paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą būdą derinti šias dvi priemones, kad būtų galima atlikti nedviprasmiškumą. Mūsų požiūris gerina dviejų aglutinatyvių kalbų (turkų ir kazakų) kalbos pažangą ir gali būti taikomas kitoms morfologiškai sudėtingoms kalboms.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യതയില്ലാത്ത, ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മോര്\u200dഫോളിക് ശരിയായ അന്യായം സംവിധാനത്തിന് ഏറ്റവും സമമായിരിക്കണം എന്ന് കരുതിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മേഖസംവിധാനത്തിനും നമ്മുടെ തൂക്കമുള് നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം ഭാഷ-ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ടു അഗ്ലൂട്ടിലേറ്റീവ് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും (തുര്\u200dക്കികും കസാഖിനും വേണ്ടി) മുന്നേറുന്നു. മറ്റു മ', 'mk': "We develop a language-independent, deep learning-based approach to the task of morphological disambiguation.  Guided by the intuition that the correct analysis should be 'most similar' to the context, we propose dense representations for morphological analyses and surface context and a simple yet effective way of combining the two to perform disambiguation.  Нашиот пристап се подобрува на јазикот зависната техничка состојба за два аглутинативни јазици (турски и казахски) и може потенцијално да се примени на други морфолошки комплексни јазици.", 'mn': 'Бид хэл хамааралтай, гүн гүнзгий суралцах сургалтын арга замыг морфологик хэмжээсүүдийн ажил дээр хөгжүүлдэг. Зөв шинжилгээ нь нөхцөлтэй хамгийн ижил хэмжээтэй байх ёстой гэдгийг ойлгохын тулд бид морфологик шинжилгээ, гадаргуу нөхцөл байдлыг шинжилгээ, хоёрыг хоорондоо хамтдаа амархан нэгтгэх боломжтой арга замыг сан Бидний арга барилга нь хэл дээр хамааралтай урлагийн байр суурь хоёр агlutinatив хэл (Турк, Казах) болон бусад хэл дээр ашиглаж чадна.', 'ms': "Kami mengembangkan pendekatan berbasis bahasa yang berdasarkan belajar yang mendalam untuk tugas penyelesaian morfologik. Ditunjukkan oleh intuisi bahawa analisis yang betul sepatutnya 'paling mirip' dengan konteks, kami cadangkan perwakilan padat untuk analisis morfologik dan konteks permukaan dan cara sederhana tetapi efektif untuk menyatukan kedua-dua untuk melakukan penyesalan. Pendekatan kami meningkatkan keadaan seni bergantung pada bahasa untuk dua bahasa agglutinatif (Turki dan Kazakh) dan boleh berpotensi dilaksanakan pada bahasa morfologik yang rumit lain.", 'mt': 'Aħna niżviluppaw approċċ ibbażat fuq it-tagħlim profond u indipendenti mil-lingwa għall-kompitu ta’ diżambigwazzjoni morfoloġika. Ibbażat fuq l-intwizzjoni li l-analiżi korretta għandha tkun “l-aktar simili” għall-kuntest, qed nipproponu rappreżentazzjonijiet densi għall-analiżi morfoloġika u l-kuntest tal-wiċċ u mod sempliċi iżda effettiv ta’ kombinazzjoni tat-tnejn biex titwettaq id-diżambigwazzjoni. L-approċċ tagħna jtejjeb fuq l-istat tal-aktar avvanzat dipendenti fuq il-lingwa għal żewġ lingwi agglutinattivi (it-Turkiż u l-Każak) u jista’ potenzjalment jiġi applikat għal lingwi morfoloġikament kumplessi oħra.', 'sr': "Razvijamo nezavisni jezik, duboki pristup na učenju na zadatku morfološkog disambiguacije. Upravljen intuicijom da je ispravna analiza trebala biti 'najsličnija' kontekstu, predlažemo guste predstave za morfološke analize i površine konteksta i jednostavan i yet efikasni način kombinacije dvoje kako bi izvršili disambigaciju. Naš pristup se poboljšava na državu umjetnosti ovisnosti o jeziku za dva aglutinativnog jezika (turski i kazahski) i može se potencijalno primjenjivati na druge morfološki kompleksne jezike.", 'pl': 'Opracowujemy niezależne od języka, oparte na głębokim uczeniu podejście do zadania morfologicznego dyjednoznacznego. Kierując się intuicją, że prawidłowa analiza powinna być "najbardziej podobna" do kontekstu, proponujemy gęste reprezentacje dla analiz morfologicznych i kontekstu powierzchniowego oraz prosty, ale skuteczny sposób połączenia tych dwóch w celu wykonania dyscyguacji. Nasze podejście poprawia uzależniony od języka stan wiedzy dla dwóch języków aglutynatywnych (tureckiego i kazachskiego) i może być potencjalnie stosowane do innych języków złożonych morfologicznie.', 'ro': 'Dezvoltăm o abordare independentă de limbă, bazată pe învățare profundă a sarcinii dezambiguizării morfologice. Ghidați de intuiția că analiza corectă ar trebui să fie "cel mai asemănătoare" contextului, propunem reprezentări dense pentru analizele morfologice și contextul de suprafață și o modalitate simplă, dar eficientă de a combina cele două pentru a efectua dezambiguizarea. Abordarea noastră îmbunătățește starea tehnologiei dependentă de limbă pentru două limbi aglutinative (turcă și kazahă) și poate fi aplicată potențial altor limbi complexe morfologic.', 'no': 'Vi utviklar ein språk-uavhengig, dyp læringsbasert tilnærming til oppgåva av morfologiske disambiguasjon. Gjeldande av intuisjonen at den rette analysen bør vera «mest liknande» til konteksten, fører vi tette representasjonar for morfologiske analyser og overflatekontekst og ein enkel men effektiv måte å kombinere dei to for å utføra disambiguasjon. Tilnærminga vårt er forbedra på språkkavhengig tilstand til kunsten for to agglutinativ språk (tursk og kazakh) og kan potensielt brukast til andre morfologisk komplekse språk.', 'sv': 'Vi utvecklar ett språkoberoende, djupinlärningsbaserat förhållningssätt till uppgiften med morfologisk åtskillnad. Guidad av intuitionen att den korrekta analysen ska vara "mest lik" sammanhanget föreslår vi täta representationer för morfologiska analyser och ytkontext och ett enkelt men effektivt sätt att kombinera de två för att utföra en otvetydig tolkning. Vårt tillvägagångssätt förbättrar det språkberoende teknikläget för två agglutinativa språk (turkiska och kazakiska) och kan potentiellt tillämpas på andra morfologiskt komplexa språk.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு மொழி சுதந்திரமான, ஆழமான கற்றல் அடிப்படையிலான முறையை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மொழியில் பிரிவுபாட்டு  சரியான ஆராய்ச்சி சூழலுக்கு சமமாக இருக்க வேண்டும் என்று நேர்வழி காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது, நாம் மார்போலியல் ஆராய்ச்சி மற்றும் மேற்கோள் சூழலுக்கு தூரம நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு கலைகளின் மொழியில் சார்ந்த மாநிலையை மேம்படுத்துகிறது இரண்டு துருக்கியமான மொழிகள் (துருக்கி மற்றும் காஜக்) மற்றும', 'so': 'Waxaynu horumarinaa qaabab aad u weyn oo ku saleysan barashada luuqada oo xor ah, si aan u baahnaanno qasabka farsamada. Fiirka saxda ah waxaa lagu hagaa in analyada saxda ah ay tahay mid u eg, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in loo sameeyo baaritaanka hoose ee muuqashada morfologiga iyo daboolka surface iyo hab fudud oo weli saameyn ah si ay labada u qabsadaan si ay u sameeyaan burburka. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa horumarinaya xaalada farshaxanka ee ku xiran luqada farshaxanka oo loogu talagalay laba luqadood oo af hooyo ah (Turki iyo Kazakh), waxaana suurtagal ah in lagu codsado luqado kale oo murugaysan.', 'si': 'අපි භාෂාව ස්ථාවත්වයෙන්, ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න අධාරිත්වයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විස්ත ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ හරි විශ්ලේෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ල අපේ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ විදියට වැඩ කරනවා කියලා කාසාක්ෂි භාෂාව (ටුර්කිෂ් සහ කාසාක්) දෙන්නෙක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්', 'ur': "ہم ایک زبان ناخصوصی، عمیق تعلیم کی طریقہ کی تخلیق کر رہے ہیں جو مدرفلوژیکی ناغیر تخلیق کا کام ہے۔ نظر کے ذریعے سیدھی تحلیل کی طرف سے ہدایت کی جاتی ہے کہ سیدھی تحلیل کے ساتھ 'سب سے زیادہ برابر' ہونا چاہیے، ہم مدرفلوژیکی تحلیل اور سطح کنٹنس کے لئے گہرے نمونے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقہ ہے کہ دونوں کو بغیر غیر ہمارا طریقہ دو زبانوں کے مطابق آزمائش کی زبانوں کے معاملہ میں بہتر ہوتا ہے اور اس کے مطابق دوسری موافق زبانوں پر بھی استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔", 'uz': "Biz oddiy o'rganish, o'rganish asosiy o'rganish vazifasini o'rganish uchun o'zini o'rganamiz. Bu g'oya bilan bog'liq aniqlash imkoniyatini o'zgartirish kerak, biz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun o'zgartirish mumkin va javob tarkibini ajratish uchun qiyin representations va ikkita ta'minlovchilarni birlashtirish uchun oddiy ishlayapti. Bizning fikrimiz to'g'ri tilga ishlatadigan sanat holatiga o'zgartiradi va ikkita g'alar (Turkish va Kazakh) va boshqa oddiy murakkab tilga qoʻllaniladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phát triển một phương pháp ngôn ngữ-độc lập, dựa trên việc học sâu để giải quyết quyết quyết quyết phù hợp. Dựa trên trực giác mà phân tích đúng phải được "gần giống nhất" với ngữ cảnh, chúng tôi đề xuất biểu hiện dày đặc cho các phân tích lịch sử và hoàn cảnh bề mặt và một cách đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để kết hợp hai biểu hiện biến dạng. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta cải thiện trạng thái tác động ngôn ngữ của hai ngôn ngữ đậm dội (tín đồ Thổ và Kazak) và có khả năng được áp dụng vào các ngôn ngữ khác khác.', 'bg': 'Разработваме езиков независим, базиран на дълбоко обучение подход към задачата за морфологично разграничаване. Водени от интуицията, че правилният анализ трябва да бъде "най-подобен" на контекста, ние предлагаме гъсти репрезентации за морфологични анализи и повърхностен контекст и прост, но ефективен начин за комбиниране на двете за извършване на разграничение. Нашият подход подобрява езиково зависимото състояние на изкуството за два аглутинаторни езика (турски и казански) и може потенциално да бъде приложен към други морфологично сложни езици.', 'nl': "We ontwikkelen een taal-onafhankelijke, deep learning-gebaseerde benadering van de taak van morfologische verduidelijking. Geleid door de intuïtie dat de juiste analyse 'het meest vergelijkbaar' moet zijn met de context, stellen we dichte representaties voor morfologische analyses en oppervlaktecontext en een eenvoudige maar effectieve manier voor om de twee te combineren om disambiguatie uit te voeren. Onze aanpak verbetert de taalafhankelijke stand van de techniek voor twee agglutinatieve talen (Turks en Kazachst) en kan potentieel worden toegepast op andere morfologisch complexe talen.", 'hr': "Razvijamo nezavisni jezik, duboki pristup na učenju na zadatku morfološkog disambiguacije. Upravo vodeći intuicijom da ispravna analiza treba biti 'najsličnija' kontekstu, predlažemo guste predstave za morfološke analize i kontekste površine i jednostavan i još efikasni način kombinacije dvoje kako bi izvršili disambigaciju. Naš pristup se poboljšava na stanje umjetnosti ovisno o jeziku za dva aglutinativna jezika (turski i kazahski) i može se potencijalno primjenjivati na druge morfološki složene jezike.", 'da': 'Vi udvikler en sproguafhængig, dyb læringsbaseret tilgang til opgaven med morfologisk forståelse. Guidet af intuitionen om, at den korrekte analyse bør være "mest ens" til konteksten, foreslår vi tætte repræsentationer for morfologiske analyser og overflade kontekst og en enkel, men effektiv måde at kombinere de to for at udføre forståelse. Vores tilgang forbedrer den sprogafhængige state of te art for to agglutinative sprog (tyrkisk og kasakhsisk) og kan potentielt anvendes på andre morfologisk komplekse sprog.', 'de': 'Wir entwickeln einen sprachunabhängigen, Deep Learning-basierten Ansatz zur Aufgabe der morphologischen Disambiguation. Geleitet von der Intuition, dass die korrekte Analyse dem Kontext "am ähnlichsten" sein sollte, schlagen wir dichte Repräsentationen für morphologische Analysen und Oberflächenkontexte und eine einfache, aber effektive Möglichkeit vor, beides zu kombinieren, um Disambiguation durchzuführen. Unser Ansatz verbessert den sprachabhängigen Stand der Technik für zwei agglutinative Sprachen (Türkisch und Kasachisch) und kann möglicherweise auf andere morphologisch komplexe Sprachen angewendet werden.', 'id': "Kami mengembangkan pendekatan berbasis bahasa yang bebas, berdasarkan belajar mendalam untuk tugas penyelesaian morfologis. Ditunjukkan oleh intuisi bahwa analisis yang tepat seharusnya 'paling mirip' dengan konteks, kami mengusulkan represisi padat untuk analisis morfologi dan konteks permukaan dan cara sederhana namun efektif untuk menggabungkan keduanya untuk melakukan desambiguasi. Pendekatan kami meningkatkan keadaan seni bergantung pada bahasa untuk dua bahasa agglutinatif (Turki dan Kazakh) dan dapat potensial diterapkan pada bahasa morfologis kompleks lainnya.", 'ko': "우리는 언어에 독립하고 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 형태 변조 임무를 완성하는 방법을 개발했다.정확한 분석은 언어 환경과'가장 비슷해야 한다'는 직감적인 지도 아래 우리는 형태 분석과 표면 언어 환경의 밀집된 표시, 그리고 간단하면서도 효과적인 결합을 통해 오류를 없애는 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 두 가지 접착어(터키어와 카자흐어)가 언어에 의존하는 최신 기술을 개선하고 다른 형태의 복잡한 언어에 응용될 수 있도록 개선했다.", 'fa': 'ما یک روش بسیار مستقل به زبان و عمیق یادگیری به کار ناپدید کردن مورفیک توسعه می کنیم. توسط دیدگاه هدایت شده که تحلیل درست باید "بیشتر شبیه" با محیط باشد، ما پیشنهاد نمایش\u200cهای مثبت برای تحلیل\u200cهای مورفولوژیکی و محیط سطح و راه ساده\u200cای هنوز موثرت برای ترکیب کردن آن دو تا انجام ناپدید شدن را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. روش ما بر وضعیت بستگی به زبان هنر برای دو زبان آگلوتین (ترکیه و Kazakh) بهتر می\u200cشود و می\u200cتواند به زبان\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cی مورفولوژی دیگر کاربرد شود.', 'tr': "Biz morfolojik ösümlikleriň täblisasynyň üstüne garaşsyz, derin öwrenme taýýarlanmagynyň bir nusgasyny döredýäris. Düzgün analizi kontekste 'en benzeri' olması gerektiğini düşünerek, morfolojik analizi ve yüze kontekstleri için yoğun temsilleri teklif edip, ikisini birleştirmek için basit ve etkisiz bir şekilde çarpıyoruz. Biziň ýaryşymyz, sungatyň (türkçe we kazakh) iki aglutinatçy diller üçin menden bağlanýan durumynda gelişýär we başga bir morfolojik karmaşık dillere uygulanabilir.", 'sw': 'Tunaendeleza mbinu za kujifunza kwa lugha huru, yenye msingi wa kujifunza kwa juhudi la ubaguzi wa kimaadilojia. Inaongozwa na mtazamo wa kwamba uchambuzi sahihi unapaswa kuwa ‘sawa zaidi’ na muktadha huo, tunapendekeza uwakilishi wa kina kwa uchambuzi wa kimaadilojia na muktadha wa usoni na njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kuwaunganisha wawili ili ili kufanya ubaguzi. Hatua yetu inaboresha hali ya sanaa inayotegemea lugha hii kwa lugha mbili za asili (Uturuki na Kazakh) na inaweza kutumika kwa lugha nyingine za kisiasa.', 'hy': 'Մենք զարգանում ենք լեզվից անկախ, խորը ուսուցման հիմքով մոտեցում մորֆոլոգիական բացատրության խնդիրը: Հիմնված ինտուիցիայից, որ ճիշտ վերլուծությունը պետք է "ամենանմանատիպ" լինի կոնտեքստին, մենք առաջարկում ենք մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունների և մակերևույթի կոնտեքստի խտուն ներկայացումներ և պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ միջոց, որպեսզի երկուսը միավոր Մեր մոտեցումը բարելավում է լեզվից կախված արվեստի վիճակում երկու ագլյուտինատիվ լեզուների համար (թուրք և կազախ) և կարող է պոտենցիալ կիրառվել այլ մորֆոլոգիապես բարդ լեզուների համար:', 'sq': "Ne zhvillojmë një metodë të pavarur nga gjuha, bazuar në mësim të thellë në detyrën e çambiguacionit morfologjik. Guided by the intuition that the correct analysis should be 'most similar' to the context, we propose dense representations for morphological analyses and surface context and a simple yet effective way of combining the two to perform disambiguation.  Përqasja jonë përmirësohet në gjendjen e artit të varur nga gjuha për dy gjuhë aglutinative (turke dhe kazakë) dhe mund të aplikohet potencialisht në gjuhë të tjera morfologikisht komplekse.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ነጻ፣ ጥልቅ ትምህርት የሞፎሎጂ ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል የሚችል ልማድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አስተያየት ‘በጣም የተመሳሳይ’ እንዲሆን የመራመሩ አስተያየት፣ ለሞሮፎሎጂ ትምህርት እና ለፊት ጥልቅ መልዕክቶች እና ለሁለቱም የተለየ ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Our approach improves on the language-dependent state of the art for two agglutinative languages (Turkish and Kazakh) and can be potentially applied to other morphologically complex languages.', 'af': "Ons ontwikkel 'n taal-onafhanklike, diep leer-gebaseerde toegang tot die taak van morfologiese disambiguasie. Gelei deur die intuisie dat die korrekte analisie 'mees gelykbaar' moet wees aan die konteks, ons voorstel dens voorstellings vir morfologiese analisies en oorspronklike konteks en 'n eenvoudig nog effektief manier om die twee te kombinasie om ontsamming te doen. Ons toegang verbeter op die taal-afhanklike staat van die kuns vir twee aglutinatiewe tale (Turks en Kazakh) en kan potensieel op ander morfologiese komplekse tale toewend word.", 'bn': "আমরা ভাষার স্বাধীন, গভীর শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক উপায় তৈরি করি মর্ফোলজিক বিভ্রান্তিক কাজের কাজে। দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দ্বারা পরিচালনা করা হয়েছে যে সঠিক বিশ্লেষণ এই প্রেক্ষাপটের সাথে 'সবচেয়ে সমান' হবে, আমরা মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণ এবং পৃষ্ঠার প্রতিনিধিত্বের আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া ভাষার উপর নির্ভর করা শিল্পের ব্যাপারে উন্নত হয়েছে দুই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষার (তুরস্ক এবং কাজাক) এবং সম্ভাব্য ভাষায় অন্যা", 'ca': "Desenvolvem un enfocament basat en l'aprenentatge profund i independent del llenguatge a la tasca de la desambiguació morfològica. Guided by the intuition that the correct analysis should be 'most similar' to the context, we propose dense representations for morphological analyses and surface context and a simple yet effective way of combining the two to perform disambiguation.  El nostre enfocament millora l'estat d'art dependient del llenguatge per dues llengües agglutinatives (turc i kazaque) i pot ser aplicat potencialment a altres llengües morfològicament complexes.", 'cs': 'Rozvíjíme jazykově nezávislý přístup založený na hlubokém učení k úkolu morfologického rozlišování. Vedoucí se intuicí, že správná analýza by měla být "nejvíce podobná" kontextu, navrhujeme husté reprezentace morfologických analýz a povrchového kontextu a jednoduchý, ale efektivní způsob, jak je kombinovat k provedení rozcestnění. Náš přístup zlepšuje jazykově závislý stav umění pro dva aglutinativní jazyky (turečtina a kazaština) a může být potenciálně aplikován na další morfologicky složité jazyky.', 'az': "Biz dildən bağımsız, dərin öyrənmə tərzini morfolojik disambiguasyonun işinə təşkil edirik. Düzgün analizi məlumatlara 'ən bənzər' olması lazımdır, morfolojik analizi və üzərin məlumatlarını və bu ikisini birləşdirmək üçün asanlıqla və etkili bir yol təklif edirik. Bizim tərzimiz, sanatın dilində bağlı durumu iki agglutinativ dil (Türk və Kazahlı) üçün yaxşılaşdırır və başqa morfolojik kompleks dillərə mümkün olaraq istifadə edilə bilər.", 'et': 'Me töötame välja keelesõltumatu, sügavõppepõhise lähenemisviisi morfoloogilise selgituse ülesandele. Juhtudes intuitsioonist, et õige analüüs peaks olema kontekstiga "kõige sarnasem", pakume välja tihedad representatsioonid morfoloogilisteks analüüsideks ja pinnakontekstiks ning lihtsa, kuid efektiivse viisi nende kahe kombineerimiseks selgitamiseks. Meie lähenemisviis parandab keelest sõltuvat tehnika taset kahe aglutinaatilise keele (türgi ja kasahhi keel) puhul ning seda saab potentsiaalselt rakendada teiste morfoloogiliselt keerukate keelte puhul.', 'fi': 'Kehitämme kielestä riippumattoman, syvälliseen oppimiseen perustuvan lähestymistavan morfologisen erottelun tehtävään. Perustuen intuitioon, että oikean analyysin tulisi olla "kaikkein samankaltainen" kontekstin kanssa, ehdotamme tiheitä representaatioita morfologisiin analyyseihin ja pintakontekstiin sekä yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta tapaa yhdistää nämä kaksi erottelua varten. Lähestymistapamme parantaa kahden agglutinaatin kielen (turkin ja kazakin) kieliriippuvuutta ja sitä voidaan mahdollisesti soveltaa muihin morfologisesti monimutkaisiin kieliin.', 'bs': "Razvijamo nezavisni jezik, duboki pristup na učenju na zadatku morfološkog disambiguacije. Vođen intuicijom da ispravna analiza treba biti 'najsličnija' kontekstu, predlažemo guste predstave za morfološke analize i kontekste površine i jednostavan i yet efikasni način kombinacije dvoje kako bi izvršili disambigaciju. Naš pristup se poboljšava na stanje umjetnosti ovisno o jeziku za dva aglutinativnog jezika (turski i kazahski) i može se potencijalno primjenjivati na druge morfološki kompleksne jezike.", 'jv': "Awak dhéwé nggawe luwih-jewisan kuwi wis dipun-jewisan kuwi nggawe ngupakan langgar tarjamahan. Nambah-nambah aturan sing dipunangé sampeyan luwih 'anyi sampeyan' karo kontèks, kita supoyo nggambar cara-seneng pisan kanggo diangénsesi nyong lan kontèks surat sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan gayut nguasai iki iso nggawe ngupakan Awakdhéwé éntuk nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo kelas kuwi duluran kanggo langgar sampeyan gak iki (turko karo Kasakh) lan iso nguasakno nggawe barang langgar bantuan.", 'he': 'We develop a language-independent, deep learning-based approach to the task of morphological disambiguation.  בהנחה על ידי האינטואיציה שהניתוח הנכון צריך להיות "הכי דומה" לקשר, אנו מציעים מייצגים צפופים עבור ניתוחים מורפולוגיים וקשר השטח ודרך פשוטה ועובדת הגישה שלנו משתפרת על המצב האמנותי תלוי בשפה לשתי שפות אגלוטינטיביות (טורקית וקזקאית) ויכול להיות פוטנציאלית לשפות מורפולוגיות מורכבות אחרות.', 'sk': 'Razvijamo jezikovno neodvisen, globoko učen pristop k nalogi morfološke razločitve. Ob upoštevanju intuicije, da mora biti pravilna analiza "najbolj podobna" kontekstu, predlagamo goste reprezentacije za morfološke analize in površinski kontekst ter preprost, a učinkovit način kombiniranja obeh za izvedbo razločitve. Naš pristop izboljšuje od jezika odvisno stanje tehnike za dva aglutinatorna jezika (turščina in kazahščina) in se lahko uporablja tudi za druge morfološko kompleksne jezike.', 'ha': "Tuna utoar wata hanyoyi wanda ke cikin harshen da ba'a ba, da kuma mai ƙaranci zuwa ga aikin da za'a karɓi mutfologi. Ana shiryarwa da shirin ayuka da aka ƙayyade shi yana 'mafi daidai' da mazaɓa, sai Mu ƙaddara masu motsi masu nau'i wa analyi na morfologi da mazaɓa na baka da hanyar mai amfani na haɗi biyu dõmin su cika bambanci. Mataimakinmu yana ƙara kan halin kunyar da ke daidai a cikin harshen da aka yi wa lugha biyu (turuki da Kazakh) kuma yana iya kara a karɓi kammala'in da wasu harshen mutumalogi masu kamfata.", 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་སྐད Guided by the intuition that the correct analysis should be 'most similar' to the context, we propose dense representations for morphological analyses and surface context and a simple yet effective way of combining the two to perform disambiguation. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'Character Composition Model with Convolutional Neural Networks for Dependency Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages', 'es': 'Modelo de composición de caracteres con redes neuronales convolucionales para el análisis de dependencias en lenguajes ricos morfológicamente', 'ar': 'نموذج تكوين الأحرف مع الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية لتحليل التبعية على اللغات الغنية شكليًا', 'pt': 'Modelo de composição de caracteres com redes neurais convolucionais para análise de dependência em linguagens morfologicamente ricas', 'fr': "Modèle de composition de caractères avec réseaux neuronaux convolutifs pour l'analyse des dépendances dans des langages morphologiquement riches", 'ja': '形態豊富な言語の依存関係解析のための畳み込みニューラルネットワークを備えた性格構成モデル', 'zh': '有卷积神经网络符,以资解析', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं पर निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ चरित्र संरचना मॉडल', 'ga': 'Samhail um Chomhdhéanamh Carachtair le Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite le haghaidh Parsála Spleáchais ar Theangacha atá Saibhir Moirfeolaíoch', 'ru': 'Модель состава символов с сверточными нейронными сетями для анализа зависимостей на морфологически богатых языках', 'ka': 'Character Composition Model with Convolutional Neural Networks for Dependency Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages', 'el': 'Μοντέλο Σύνθεσης Χαρακτήρα με Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα για ανάλυση εξάρτησης σε Μορφολογικά Πλούσιες Γλώσσες', 'hu': 'Karakterösszetételi modell konvolúciós neurális hálózatokkal a morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek függőségi értelmezéséhez', 'it': "Modello di composizione dei caratteri con reti neurali conveluzionali per l'analisi della dipendenza da lingue morfologicamente ricche", 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдау үшін таңбаларды құру үлгісі', 'lt': 'Character Composition Model with Convolutional Neural Networks for Dependency Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages', 'mk': 'Модел на композиција на знаци со конволуционални неурални мрежи за анализирање на зависноста на морфолошки богати јазици', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള ഭാഷകളില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчдийн нэгтгэл загвар Морфологик баян хэл дээр хамааралтай байдлын мэдрэлийн сүлжээтэй', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Kompożizzjoni tal-Karatteri b’Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza fuq Lingwi Morfoloġikament Riki', 'no': 'Teiknsettingsmodell med konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk for avhengighetstolking på morfologisk rike språk', 'pl': 'Model składu znaków z konwolucyjnymi sieciami neuronowymi do analizy zależności od języków bogatych morfologicznie', 'ro': 'Model de compoziție a caracterelor cu rețele neuronale conveluționale pentru analizarea dependenței de limbi bogate morfologic', 'ms': 'Model Komposisi Aksara dengan Rangkaian Neural Berubah untuk Menghurai Dependensi pada Bahasa yang Kaya Morfologik', 'sr': 'Model kompozicije karaktera sa konvolucionalnim neuronskim mrežama za razmatranje zavisnosti o morfološki bogatim jezicima', 'si': 'අක්ෂර සම්පූර්ණ මොඩල්', 'so': 'Model of Character Composition with Convolutional Neural Network for Dependency Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாசிட்டிற்கான எழுத்து தொகுப்பு மாதிரி மொழிகளுடன் தொடர்புடைய நெருக்கமான பிணையம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Karaktﾃ､rskompositionsmodell med konvulutionella neurala nﾃ､tverk fﾃｶr beroendetolkning av morfologiskt rika sprﾃ･k', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đơn vị ký tự với kết cấu hình thần kinh có kết quả chắc chắn', 'hr': 'Model kompozicije znakova sa konvolucionalnim neuronskim mrežama za razmatranje ovisnosti o morfološki bogatim jezicima', 'bg': 'Модел на композицията на знаците с конвелуционни неврални мрежи за анализ на зависимостта на морфологично богати езици', 'nl': 'Karaktercompositiemodel met convolutionele neurale netwerken voor afhankelijkheidsparsing op morfologisch rijke talen', 'da': 'Tegnsammensætningsmodel med konvolutiske neurale netværk til afhængighed fortolkning af morfologisk rige sprog', 'de': 'Charakterkompositionsmodell mit Convolutional Neural Networks für Dependency Parsing auf morphologisch reichen Sprachen', 'id': 'Model Komposisi Karakter dengan Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional untuk Analisis Dependensi pada Bahasa Morfologis Kaya', 'fa': 'Model Composition Characters with Convolutional Neural Networks for Dependency Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages', 'tr': 'Mazmunlik Jawanlar bilen Karakter Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Makasiliano ya Hesabu yenye Mtandao wa Neurali wa Kujitoleza kwa ajili ya Kuchapisha Uhuru katika lugha za Kimorphologically Rich', 'ko': '형태가 풍부한 언어 의존 분석의 권적 신경 네트워크 문자 합성 모델', 'af': 'Karakter Komposisie Model met Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke vir Afhanklikheidverwerking op Morphologically Rich Languages', 'sq': 'Model i përbërjes së karakterëve me rrjete nervore konvolutive për analizimin e varësisë në gjuhë të pasura morfologikisht', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ներագծերի կառուցվածքի մոդել, որը օգտագործում է կոնվոլյուցիոնալ նյարդային ցանցեր կախվածության վերլուծությանը մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներով', 'az': 'Marfoloqlı Zengin Dillər barəsində bağlılıq analizi üçün Convolutional Neural Networks ile Karakter Komposisyon Modeli', 'bs': 'Model kompozicije karaktera sa konvolucionalnim neuronskim mrežama za razmatranje zavisnosti o morfološki bogatim jezicima', 'bn': 'অক্ষর কম্পোজিশন মডেল মরোফোলজিক্যালি সমৃদ্ধ ভাষায় নির্ভরিত নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের জন্য পার্সিং দিয়েছে', 'ca': "Model de composició de caràcters amb xarxes neurals convolucionals per a l'analització de dependencies en idiomes morfològicament rics", 'cs': 'Model složení znaků s konvelučními neuronovými sítěmi pro analýzu závislosti na morfologicky bohatých jazycích', 'et': 'Märkide koosseisu mudel konvolutsiooniliste neurovõrkudega sõltuvuse parsimiseks morfoloogiliselt rikkalikest keeltest', 'fi': 'Character Composition Model with Convolutional Neural Networks for Dependency Parsing on Morfologisesti Rich Language', 'jv': 'Karakter Komplikasi model karo Konvolution Neral netwark kanggo Dehensik Parasing nang Marphologically Relative Languages', 'sk': 'Model sestave znakov s konvolucijskimi živčnimi mrežami za analizo odvisnosti od morfološko bogatih jezikov', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'מודל מורכב אותיות עם רשתות נוירוליות משתנות עבור בדיקת תלויות על שפות מורפולוגיות עשירות', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཆ་མཉམ་འབྲི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ནུས་མཐུན་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་Parsing on Morphologically Rich Languages'}
{'en': 'We present a transition-based dependency parser that uses a convolutional neural network to compose word representations from characters. The character composition model shows great improvement over the word-lookup model, especially for parsing agglutinative languages. These improvements are even better than using pre-trained word embeddings from extra data. On the SPMRL data sets, our system outperforms the previous best greedy parser (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) by a margin of 3 % on average.', 'ar': 'نقدم محلل تبعية قائم على الانتقال يستخدم شبكة عصبية تلافيفية لتكوين تمثيلات الكلمات من الأحرف. يُظهر نموذج تكوين الأحرف تحسنًا كبيرًا مقارنة بنموذج البحث عن الكلمات ، خاصةً لتحليل اللغات التراصية. تعد هذه التحسينات أفضل من استخدام عمليات دمج الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا من البيانات الإضافية. في مجموعات بيانات SPMRL ، يتفوق نظامنا على أفضل محلل جشع سابق (Ballesteros وآخرون ، 2015) بهامش 3٪ في المتوسط.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um analisador de dependência baseado em transição que usa uma rede neural convolucional para compor representações de palavras a partir de caracteres. O modelo de composição de caracteres mostra uma grande melhoria em relação ao modelo de pesquisa de palavras, especialmente para analisar linguagens aglutinativas. Essas melhorias são ainda melhores do que usar incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas a partir de dados extras. Nos conjuntos de dados SPMRL, nosso sistema supera o melhor analisador ganancioso anterior (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) por uma margem de 3% em média.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un analyseur de dépendances basé sur la transition qui utilise un réseau neuronal convolutif pour composer des représentations de mots à partir de caractères. Le modèle de composition de caractères présente une grande amélioration par rapport au modèle de recherche de mots, en particulier pour l'analyse des langues agglutinantes. Ces améliorations sont encore meilleures que l'utilisation d'intégrations de mots préentraînées à partir de données supplémentaires. Sur les ensembles de données SPMRL, notre système surpasse le meilleur analyseur gourmand précédent (Ballesteros et al., 2015) d'une marge de 3\xa0% en moyenne.", 'es': 'Presentamos un analizador de dependencias basado en transiciones que utiliza una red neuronal convolucional para componer representaciones de palabras a partir de caracteres. El modelo de composición de caracteres muestra una gran mejora con respecto al modelo de búsqueda de palabras, especialmente para analizar lenguajes aglutinantes. Estas mejoras son incluso mejores que el uso de incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas a partir de datos adicionales. En los conjuntos de datos SPMRL, nuestro sistema supera al mejor analizador codicioso anterior (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) por un margen de 3% de media.', 'ja': '我々は、畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用して文字から単語表現を構成する、遷移ベースの依存性構文解析器を提示する。文字構成モデルは、特に凝集言語を解析するために、単語ルックアップモデルよりも大きな改善を示します。これらの改善は、余分なデータから事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込みを使用するよりもさらに優れています。SPMRLデータセットでは、当社のシステムは以前の最高の貪欲なパーサー（ Ballesteros et al., 2015 ）を平均3 ％のマージンで上回っています。', 'zh': '建一赖解析器,用卷积神经网络符单词。 比之单词,字符大改,特在解析凝言。 其改进甚于用额外数据之预练者。 SPMRL数据集上,统均贪解析器(Ballesteros et al, 2015)出3%。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем основанный на переходе парсер зависимостей, который использует сверточную нейронную сеть для создания словопрезентаций из символов. Модель состава символов демонстрирует значительное улучшение по сравнению с моделью поиска слов, особенно для синтаксического анализа агглютинативных языков. Эти улучшения даже лучше, чем использование предварительно обученных вложений слов из дополнительных данных. На наборах данных SPMRL наша система превосходит предыдущий лучший жадный парсер (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) в среднем на 3%.', 'hi': 'हम एक संक्रमण-आधारित निर्भरता पार्सर प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वर्णों से शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व की रचना करने के लिए एक कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है। चरित्र संरचना मॉडल शब्द-लुकअप मॉडल पर बहुत सुधार दिखाता है, विशेष रूप से एग्लूटिनेटिव भाषाओं को पार्स करने के लिए। ये सुधार अतिरिक्त डेटा से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करने से भी बेहतर हैं। SPMRL डेटा सेट पर, हमारी प्रणाली औसतन 3% के मार्जिन से पिछले सबसे अच्छे लालची पार्सर (Ballesteros et. al. al. 2015) को मात देती है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair parsálaí spleáchais atá bunaithe ar an trasdul a úsáideann líonra néarúil comhraonta chun léiriúcháin focal ó charachtair a chumadh. Léiríonn múnla comhdhéanamh na gcarachtar feabhas mór ar mhúnla an chuardaigh focal, go háirithe maidir le teangacha comhglutineacha a pharsáil. Is fearr fós na feabhsuithe seo ná úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe focal réamhoilte ó shonraí breise. Ar na tacair sonraí SPMRL, tá feidhmíocht ár gcóras níos fearr ná an parsálaí sanntach is fearr roimhe seo (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) le corrlach de 3% ar an meán.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გავამხსენებთ გადარცენების დასაწყებელი დასაწყებელობის პანუზერი, რომელიც კონგულუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება სიტყვების რე სიმბოლოების კომპოზიციის მოდელის შესაძლებელება სიტყვების მოდელის შესახებ, განსაკუთრებით ადგლუტინატიური ენების პარალიზაციისთვის. ეს უფრო უკეთესია, ვიდრე უფრო უფრო უკეთესია, როგორც უფრო უკეთესია საკუთარი მონაცემებით გამოყენება. SPMRL მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენი სისტემა უფრო მუშაობელია წინ მუშაობელი პასუტერი (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) საშუალოდ 3%-ის მარტინზე.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση που χρησιμοποιεί ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο για να συνθέσει αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων από χαρακτήρες. Το μοντέλο σύνθεσης χαρακτήρων δείχνει μεγάλη βελτίωση σε σχέση με το μοντέλο αναζήτησης λέξεων, ειδικά για την ανάλυση συσσωρευτικών γλωσσών. Αυτές οι βελτιώσεις είναι ακόμα καλύτερες από τη χρήση προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων από επιπλέον δεδομένα. Στα σύνολα δεδομένων το σύστημά μας ξεπερνά τον προηγούμενο καλύτερο άπληστο αναλυτή (Μπαλεστερός κ.α., 2015) κατά ένα περιθώριο 3% κατά μέσο όρο.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy átmeneti alapú függőségi elemzőt, amely egy konvuluációs neurális hálózatot használ a karakterekből szóreprezentációk összeállítására. A karakterkompozíciós modell jelentős javulást mutat a szókereső modellhez képest, különösen agglutinált nyelvek elemzésénél. Ezek a fejlesztések még jobbak, mint az előre képzett szóbeágyazások használata extra adatokból. Az SPMRL adatkészletek alapján rendszerünk átlagosan 3%-kal felülmúlja az előző legjobb kapzsi elemzőt (Ballesteros et al, 2015).', 'it': "Presentiamo un parser di dipendenza basato su transizione che utilizza una rete neurale convoluzionale per comporre rappresentazioni di parole da caratteri. Il modello di composizione dei caratteri mostra un grande miglioramento rispetto al modello di ricerca delle parole, specialmente per l'analisi delle lingue agglutinative. Questi miglioramenti sono persino migliori dell'utilizzo di incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate da dati extra. Sui set di dati SPMRL, il nostro sistema supera il precedente miglior parser avido (Ballesteros et al, 2015) con un margine medio del 3%.", 'mk': 'We present a transition-based dependency parser that uses a convolutional neural network to compose word representations from characters.  Моделот за композиција на карактерите покажува големо подобрување во однос на моделот за барање зборови, особено за анализирање аглутинативни јазици. Овие подобрувања се дури и подобри отколку користење предобучени зборови внесени од дополнителни податоци. За податоците на СПМРЛ, нашиот систем го надминува претходниот најдобар алчен анализатор (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) со просечна маргина од 3 отсто.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan penghurai dependensi berasaskan-transisi yang menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolutional untuk komponen perwakilan perkataan dari aksara. Model komposisi aksara menunjukkan peningkatan besar atas model pencarian perkataan, terutama untuk hurai bahasa agglutinative. Perbaikan ini lebih baik daripada menggunakan penyelesaian perkataan terlatih sebelum data tambahan. Pada set data SPMRL, sistem kita melebihi penghurai serakah terbaik terdahulu (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) dengan margin 3% rata-rata.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome pereinamojo laikotarpio priklausomybės analizatorių, kuris naudoja konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą, kad sudarytų žodžių atstovavimus iš simbolių. Žymelių sudėties modelis rodo gerą pažangą palyginti su žodžių paieškos modeliu, ypač aglutinatyvių kalbų analizavimui. Šie patobulinimai yra dar geresni nei iš anksto parengtų žodžių įterpimas iš papildomų duomenų. Pagal SPMRL duomenų rinkinius mūsų sistema vidutiniškai 3 proc. viršija ankstesnį geriausią pilną analizatorių (Ballesteros et. al., 2015 m.).', 'kk': 'Біз ауыстыру негізінде тәуелсіздік параметрлерін таңбалардан сөздерді құру үшін қолданатын невралдық желі қолданатын. Таңбаларды құру үлгісі сөзді іздеу үлгісінде өте жақсы жақсарту көрсетеді, осымен қатар агlutinatивтік тілдерді талдау үшін. Бұл жақсартулар қосымша деректерден алдын- оқылған сөздерді ендіруден да жақсы. SPMRL деректер жинақтарында, жүйеміздің алдыңғы жақсы жақсы талдаушысы (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) орташа 3% жинақтарын жасайды.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ട്രാന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പ്രദര്\u200dശനം കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകളില വാക്ക്- നോക്കുന്ന മോഡലിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വലിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരസങ്ങളുടെ മാതൃകയാണ്. പ These improvements are even better than using pre-trained word embeddings from extra data.  SPMRL ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മുമ്പുള്ള ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ല ലോഗിയുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം (ബാലെസ്റ്ററോസ് എ. അല്\u200d,', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein oversjånadsbasert avhengighetsanalyser som brukar ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk for å lage ordrepresentasjonar frå teikn. Teiknsettingsmodellen viser stor forbedring over ordsøkingsmodellen, spesielt for tolking av agglutiv språk. Desse forbetringane er til og med bedre enn å bruka føretrainerte ordinnbygging frå ekstra data. På SPMRL-datasetta utfører system et vårt tidlegare beste grødende tolkar (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) med margin av 3% gjennomsnittlig.', 'mn': 'Бид өөрчлөлт дээр суурилсан хамааралтай хуваалцааг үзүүлдэг. Энэ нь хүмүүсээс илэрхийллийг бүтээх үг юм. Бараг бүтээгдэхүүний загвар нь үг хайх загварын хувьд маш сайн сайжруулагдсан, ялангуяа аглуутайн хэлнүүдийг шинжилэхэд илүү сайжруулагдсан. Эдгээр сайжруулалт нэмэлт мэдээллээс илүү сургалтын үгийг ашиглахаас ч илүү сайжруулдаг. SPMRL өгөгдлийн багц дээр бидний систем өмнөх хамгийн сайхан хүлээн авагч (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) нь дундаж 3%-ын зай гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy parser zależności oparty na przejściach, który wykorzystuje konwolucyjną sieć neuronową do tworzenia reprezentacji słów z znaków. Model kompozycji znaków wykazuje dużą poprawę w stosunku do modelu wyszukiwania słów, zwłaszcza w przypadku parsowania języków aglutynatywnych. Te ulepszenia są nawet lepsze niż stosowanie wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów z dodatkowych danych. W zbiorach danych SPMRL nasz system przewyższa poprzedni najlepszy parser chciwy (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) średnio o margines 3% .', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un parser de dependență bazat pe tranziție care utilizează o rețea neuronală convoluțională pentru a compune reprezentări de cuvinte din caractere. Modelul de compoziție a caracterelor prezintă o mare îmbunătățire față de modelul de căutare a cuvintelor, în special pentru analizarea limbilor aglutinative. Aceste îmbunătățiri sunt chiar mai bune decât utilizarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pre-instruite din date suplimentare. Pe seturile de date SPMRL, sistemul nostru depășește cel mai bun parser lacom anterior (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) cu o marjă de 3% în medie.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw analizzatur tad-dipendenza bbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni li juża netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali biex jikkomponi rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem minn karattri. The character composition model shows great improvement over the word-lookup model, especially for parsing agglutinative languages.  Dan it-titjib huwa saħansitra aħjar mill-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel minn dejta addizzjonali. Fis-settijiet tad-dejta SPMRL, is-sistema tagħna taqbeż l-a ħjar parser qawwi preċedenti (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) b’marġini ta’ medja ta’ 3 %.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo prelazni analizator zavisnosti koji koristi konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu da sastavi riječi predstavljanja iz likova. Model kompozicije karaktera pokazuje veliko poboljšanje nad model traženja reèi, posebno za analizu aglutinativnih jezika. Ovi poboljšanja su čak i bolji nego koristiti predobučene reèi iz dodatnih podataka. Na setovima podataka SPMRL, naš sistem iznosi prethodni najpohlepniji analizator (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) sa marginom od 3% u prosjeku.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa baaritaanka ku saabsan bedelka, kaas oo isticmaalaya shabakadda neurada oo kamid ah si ay u samaystaan qof ka mid ah xarafta. Tusaale xarunta waxaa lagu muujiyaa mid aad u bedelan qaababka raadinta ee hadalka, khusuusan barbaarinta afka hooyo. Horumarintu way ka wanaagsan yihiin isticmaalka hadalka horay loo tababaray oo laga soo diro macluumaad dheeraad ah. Xafiiska SPMRL macluumaadka, nidaamkayaga ayaa ka muuqata qiimihii hore ee ugu fiican ee greedy Parser (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) sida ugu dhexeeya 3% .', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en övergångsbaserad beroendeparser som använder ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk för att komponera ordrepresentationer från tecken. Teckensättningsmodellen visar stora förbättringar jämfört med orduppslagsmodellen, särskilt för tolkning av agglutinerande språk. Dessa förbättringar är till och med bättre än att använda färdigutbildade ordinbäddningar från extra data. På SPMRL-datauppsättningarna överträffar vårt system den tidigare bästa giriga parsern (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) med en marginal på 3% i genomsnitt.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය අධාරිත විශ්වාසයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේ අක්ෂර සංවිධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වචනය හොයාගන්න මොඩල් විශේෂය, විශේෂයෙන්ම සම්පූර්ණ භාෂ මේ වැඩසටහන් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරපු වචනය පාවිච්චි කරන්න වඩා හොඳයි. SPMRL දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට, අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා පිළිබඳ හොඳම ග්\u200dරීඩි විශ්ලේෂකය (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) පර', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு மாற்று சார்ந்த சார்பு பரிசோதனையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது ஒரு முழுமையான புதிய பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது  எழுத்து உருவாக்கும் மாதிரி வார்த்தையை தேடும் மாதிரியில் மிகப்பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் காட்டுகிறது, குறிப்பாக இந்த முன்னேற்றங்கள் கூடுதல் தரவிலிருந்து முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத்தி விட சி SPMRL தரவு அமைப்புகளில், எங்கள் கணினியில் முந்தைய சிறந்த பழுப்பு பரிசோதனையை வெளியேற்றுகிறது (பால்லஸ்டரோஸ் et. al, 2015) சராசரியான 3', 'ur': 'ہم ایک تغییر پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے اعتمادی پارچر کو پیش کریں جو شخصوں سے کلمات کی روشنی کو ترکیب کرنے کے لئے کام کرتا ہے۔ Character composition model shows great improvement over the word-lookup model, especially for parsing agglutinative languages. یہ استعمال اضافہ ڈیٹے سے پہلے تدریس کیے ہوئے لفظوں کے استعمال سے بہتر ہیں۔ SPMRL ڈاٹ سٹ پر ہماری سیستم نے اگلے سے بہترین گلڈی پارچر (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) کو متوسط 3% کی مارجینٹ سے کام لیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz bir transition asosida ishlatuvchi parametrlarni hozir qilamiz. Bu bir doim neyrol tarmoqdan foydalanadi. Name Bu yaxshi o'zgarishlar qoʻshimcha maʼlumotdan oldin o'rganilgan so'zlarni ishlatishdan яхшироқдир. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một nhà phân tích phụ thuộc, sử dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh kết nối để sáng tác các chữ tượng. Nhân vật bậc của mô hình đặc trưng cho thấy sự cải tiến lớn hơn mô hình tìm kiếm từ, đặc biệt là để phân tích ngôn ngữ đậm đặc. Những cải tiến này thậm chí còn tốt hơn việc sử dụng những từ được đào tạo từ thêm dữ liệu. Trên hệ thống dữ liệu của SPRML, hệ thống của chúng tôi thực hiện tốt hơn so với các phân tích hám tiền trước (Ballwestern et. al, 205) theo trung bình là một khoảng ba=.', 'bg': 'Представяме анализ на зависимостта, базиран на преход, който използва конволюционна невронна мрежа за съставяне на думи от символи. Моделът на композиция на знаците показва голямо подобрение спрямо модела за търсене на думи, особено за анализиране на аглутинационни езици. Тези подобрения са дори по-добри от използването на предварително обучени вграждания на думи от допълнителни данни. На наборите от данни нашата система надминава предишния най-добър алчен анализатор (Балестерос и др., 2015 г.) със средно 3%.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een overgangsgebaseerde afhankelijkheidsparser die een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk gebruikt om woordrepresentaties uit tekens samen te stellen. Het tekencompositiemodel toont grote verbeteringen ten opzichte van het woord-opzoekmodel, vooral voor het parsen van agglutinatieve talen. Deze verbeteringen zijn zelfs beter dan het gebruik van vooraf getrainde woord embeddings uit extra data. Op de SPMRL datasets overtreft ons systeem gemiddeld met een marge van 3% de vorige beste hebberige parser (Ballesteros et. al, 2015).', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en overgangsbaseret afhængighedsfortolker, der bruger et konvulutivt neuralt netværk til at komponere ordrepræsentationer fra tegn. Tegnsammensætningsmodellen viser stor forbedring i forhold til ordopslagsmodellen, især til tolkning af agglutinative sprog. Disse forbedringer er endnu bedre end at bruge forududdannede ordindlejringer fra ekstra data. På SPMRL datasættet overgår vores system den tidligere bedste grådige fortolker (Ballesteros et al., 2015) med en margin på 3% i gennemsnit.', 'de': 'Wir stellen einen Übergangsbasierten Abhängigkeitsparser vor, der ein falsches neuronales Netzwerk verwendet, um Wortdarstellungen aus Zeichen zu komponieren. Das Zeichenkompositionsmodell zeigt eine große Verbesserung gegenüber dem Wort-Lookup-Modell, insbesondere beim Parsen agglutinativer Sprachen. Diese Verbesserungen sind sogar besser als die Verwendung von vortrainierten Wort-Einbettungen aus zusätzlichen Daten. Auf den SPMRL-Datensätzen übertrifft unser System den bisherigen besten gierigen Parser (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) durchschnittlich um eine Marge von 3% .', 'ko': '우리는 권적신경 네트워크를 사용하여 문자로 단어를 구성하는 변환에 기반한 의존 해석기를 제시했다.단어 찾기 모델에 비해 문자 조합 모델이 많이 개선되었는데 특히 접착 언어를 분석할 때 그렇다.이러한 개선은 심지어 추가 데이터에서 미리 훈련된 단어를 삽입하는 것보다 낫다.SPMRL 데이터 세트에서 우리 시스템은 이전의 최고의 탐욕 해석기(Ballesteros 등, 2015년)보다 평균 3% 높다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan parser ketergantuan berdasarkan transisi yang menggunakan jaringan saraf konvolusi untuk mengumpulkan represensi kata dari karakter. Model komposisi karakter menunjukkan peningkatan besar atas model pencarian kata, terutama untuk menghurai bahasa agglutinative. Perbaikan ini bahkan lebih baik daripada menggunakan penerbangan kata-kata terlatih dari data ekstra. Pada set data SPMRL, sistem kita melebihi parser serakah terbaik sebelumnya (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) dengan margin 3% rata-rata.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo razmatrač zavisnosti na temelju prijenosa koja koristi konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu kako bi sastavila riječi predstavljanja iz karaktera. Model sastojanja karaktera pokazuje veliko poboljšanje nad model traženja riječima, posebno za analizu agglutinativnih jezika. Te poboljšanja su čak bolje nego koristiti predobučene riječi ugrađene iz dodatnih podataka. Na SPMRL podacima, naš sustav iznosi prethodni najpohlepniji analizač (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) na prosječnoj margini od 3%.', 'fa': 'ما یک بازیگر بستگی بر اساس تغییر تغییر را نشان می دهیم که از شبکه عصبی معمولی استفاده می کند تا نمایش\u200cدهندگان کلمه از شخصیت\u200cها را ترکیب کند. Model composition character shows great improvement over the word search model, especially for parsing agglutinative languages. این توسعه\u200cها حتی بهتر از استفاده از استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده از داده\u200cهای اضافه هستند. در مجموعه داده\u200cهای SPMRL، سیستم ما بهترین تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی آب\u200cآب\u200cآب\u200cآب\u200cآب\u200cآب قبلی (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) با مرز ۳% در متوسط انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutoa mchambuzi wa kutegemea kwa misingi inayotumia mtandao wa kikatili wa neura ili kutengeneza uwakilishi wa maneno kutoka kwa wahusika. Mradi wa ubunifu wa wahusika unaonyesha kuboreshwa zaidi ya muundo wa ufuatiliaji wa maneno, hasa kwa ajili ya kuchimba lugha za asili. Mabadiliko haya ni bora zaidi kuliko kutumia maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla yanayotumwa na taarifa za ziada. Katika seti za data za SPMRL, mfumo wetu unaonyesha mchambuzi wa zamani wa uchunguzi (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) kwa kiwango cha asilimia 3 kwa wastani.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n oorgang-gebaseerde afhanklikheidspanseerder wat gebruik 'n konvolusielike neuralnetwerk om woord voorstellings van karakters te stel. Die karakterkomponensie model vertoon groot verbetering oor die woordsoek model, veral vir verwerking van aglutinatiewe tale. Hierdie verbeteringe is selfs beter as die gebruik van voorafgevorderde woord inbettings van ekstra data. Op die SPMRL data stelle, ons stelsel uitvoer die vorige beste groet ontwerker (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) deur 'n lyn van 3% op gemiddelde.", 'tr': 'Biz geçiş tabanlı bağlılık ayıracağını tanıtıyoruz ki, karakterlerden kelime ifadelerini oluşturmak için kullanır. Karakter çykyş nusgasy sözleri gözlemek nusgasynda beter ýagdaýlyşy görkezýär. Özellikle de aglutinatik diller analyz edip görkezýär. Bu gelişmeler ekstra maglumatlardan öňünden eğlenen söz integrasyny ulanmakdan has gowydyr. SPMRL maglumat setirlerinde, sistemimiz öňki a çylyk üçin ýokary taýýarlandyrýar (Ballesteros et.l., 2015).', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք վերափոխման հիմնված կախվածության վերլուծում, որը օգտագործում է հակադարձ նյարդային ցանց բառերի ներկայացումների կազմակերպման համար: The character composition model shows great improvement over the word-lookup model, especially for parsing agglutinative languages.  Այս բարելավումները նույնիսկ ավելի լավ են, քան նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավումը ավելին տվյալներից: ՍպՄՌԼ տվյալների համակարգերի արդյունքում մեր համակարգը ավելի լավ ագահություն ունի քան նախորդ լավագույն վերլուծողը (Բալեստերոս և այլն, 2015 թվականին) միջինում 3 տոկոսով:', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një analizues të varësisë në tranzicion që përdor një rrjet nervor konvolutiv për të kompozuar përfaqësime fjalësh nga karakterët. Modeli i përbërjes së karakterit tregon përmirësim të madh mbi modelin e kërkimit të fjalëve, veçanërisht për analizimin e gjuhëve aglutinative. Këto përmirësime janë edhe më të mira se përdorimi i përfshirjes së fjalëve të paratrajnuara nga të dhënat shtesë. Në grupet e të dhënave SPMRL, sistemi ynë paraqet analizuesin më të mirë lakmues të mëparshëm (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) me një marxh prej 3% mesatarisht.', 'am': 'በጥምቀት የተመሳሳይ ተሟጋቾችን እናስቀራለን፡፡ የፊደል አካባቢ ምሳሌ ቃላትን ለመፈለግ ሞዴል ላይ እጅግ የበለጠ ማሻሻሻል ያሳየዋል፤ በተለይም ለቋንቋዎች ማዘጋጀት ነው፡፡ እነዚህም ተማረፊዎች ከጥቅረት ከዳታ ከመጠቀም ይሻላሉ፡፡ የSPMRL ዳታ ማዕከላዎች፣ ስርዓታችን የቀድሞውን የዋጋ ምርጫዎች (Ballesteros et. al. 2015) በመተካከለኛ 3 በመቶ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক নির্ভরশীল বিশ্লেষক উপস্থাপন করছি যা একটি নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে অক্ষর থেকে শব্দের প্রত অক্ষরের সংক্রান্ত মডেলটি শব্দ-অনুসন্ধান মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে ভালো উন্নতি দেখাচ্ছে, বিশেষ করে গ্লুগুটিশিয়ান ভা অতিরিক্ত তথ্য থেকে প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ব্যবহার করার চেয়ে এই উন্নয়নের চেয়েও ভাল। এসপিএমআরএল ডাটা সেটে আমাদের সিস্টেম পূর্ববর্তী সেরা লোগী প্যালেস্টার (বেলেস্টারোস এন. আল, ২০১৫) গড়ে ৩% মার্গিন দিয়েছ', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo razmatrač zavisnosti na temelju prijenosa koja koristi konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu kako bi sastavila riječi predstavljanja iz likova. Model kompozicije karaktera pokazuje veliko poboljšanje nad model traženja riječi, posebno za analizu aglutinativnih jezika. Ovi poboljšanja su čak i bolji nego koristiti predobučene riječi ugrađene iz dodatnih podataka. Na setima podataka SPMRL, naš sistem iznosi prethodni najpohlepniji analizator (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) sa marginom od 3% u prosjeku.', 'az': 'Biz hərəkət tərəfindən yazılmış sözləri yaratmaq üçün konvolucional nöral şəbəkəsini istifadə edir. Karakter kompozisyonu modeli sözlərin gözləmə modeli üzərində böyük uzlaşmaları göstərir, özellikle agglutinativ dilləri ayırılmaq üçün. Bu yaxşılıqlar, əlavə məlumatlardan əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözləri istifadə etməkdən daha yaxşıdır. SPMRL məlumat qurularında, sistemimiz əvvəlkilərin ən gözəl xoşbəxt ayırıcısı (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) ilə ortalama 3% dəyişdirir.', 'et': 'Esitleme üleminekupõhist sõltuvuse parser, mis kasutab konvolutsioonivõrku sõnade esitamiseks märkidest. Märgikompositsiooni mudel näitab sõna otsingu mudeliga võrreldes suurt paranemist, eriti aglutinaatsete keelte parsimisel. Need täiustused on isegi paremad kui eelõpetatud sõnade manustamine lisaandmetest. SPMRL andmekogumites ületab meie süsteem eelmise parima ahne parser (Ballesteros et al, 2015) keskmiselt 3% marginaali.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme siirtymäpohjaisen riippuvuuden jäsentäjän, joka käyttää konvolutionaalista neuroverkkoa sanaesitysten muodostamiseen merkeistä. Merkkikompositiomalli osoittaa suurta parannusta sanahakumalliin verrattuna, erityisesti agglutinaattikielten jäsentämiseen. Nämä parannukset ovat jopa parempia kuin käyttämällä ennalta koulutettuja sanaupotuksia ylimääräisistä tiedoista. SPMRL-tietosarjoissa järjestelmämme suoriutuu edellisestä parhaasta ahneesta jäsentäjästä (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) keskimäärin 3 prosentin marginaalilla.', 'ca': 'Presentam un analitzador de dependencies basat en la transició que utilitza una xarxa neural convolutiva per composir representacions de paraules a partir de caràcters. El model de composició de caràcters mostra una gran millora sobre el model de busca de paraules, especialment per analitzar llengües aglutinatives. Aquestes millors són encara millors que utilitzar integracions de paraules pré-entrenades a partir de dades extras. On the SPMRL data sets, our system outperforms the previous best greedy parser (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) by a margin of 3% on average.', 'cs': 'Představujeme parser závislostí založený na přechodu, který používá konvoluční neuronovou síť k sestavení slovních reprezentací ze znaků. Model kompozice znaků ukazuje velké zlepšení oproti modelu vyhledávání slov, zejména při analýze aglutinativních jazyků. Tato vylepšení jsou ještě lepší než použití předškolených vložení slov z dalších dat. Na datových sadách SPMRL náš systém překonává předchozí nejlepší chamtivý parser (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) v průměru o rozpětí 3% .', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da wani salon da aka dõgara a transitional, mai amfani da wani jerin neural wanda zai yi amfani da shi dõmin ya sami tsaro da magana daga takardar. Motdalin salon cikin tsari na nuna mai kyau kan motel mai nuna maganar-looketa, hususan ga yin parse da harshen agglinatinative. Waɗannan improvements ne mafiya alhẽri daga su yi amfani da magana wanda aka shigar da shi daga data mai ƙara. On the SPARL data set, system runs out of the previous best lary parser (Ballesteres et. al, 2015) by a tsakanin 3% mai girma.', 'he': 'We present a transition-based dependency parser that uses a convolutional neural network to compose word representations from characters.  מודל התבנית הדמויות מראה שיפור גדול על מודל חיפוש מילים, במיוחד עבור חקירת שפות אגלוטינטיביות. השיפורים האלה אפילו טובים יותר מאשר להשתמש באמצעות מילים מאומנות מראש ממידע נוסף. במערכת הנתונים של SPMRL, המערכת שלנו מגבירה את המחקר החמאי הטוב ביותר הקודם (Ballesteros et. al, 2015) בממוצע של 3%.', 'jv': 'text Sampeyan Karakter Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih luwih apik karo ngono perusahaan kelas-kelas kuwi bisa diangkat oleh. Nang barêt-barêt sing nêmRL kuwi, sistememu iki dadi sing paling kelas karo sing paling nggawe barang dumadhi (Ballesters et. al, 2013) nganggo terus maring 3%', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo prehodni razčlenjevalec odvisnosti, ki uporablja konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje za sestavljanje besednih predstavitev iz znakov. Model kompozicije znakov kaže veliko izboljšave v primerjavi z modelom iskanja besed, zlasti za razčlenitev aglutinatnih jezikov. Te izboljšave so še boljše kot uporaba vnaprej usposobljenih vdelav besed iz dodatnih podatkov. Pri naborih podatkov SPMRL naš sistem v povprečju presega prejšnjega najboljšega pohlepnega razčlenjevalnika (Ballesteros et. al., 2015) za 3%.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས ཡིག་འབྲུ་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྟངས་ལ་ཆེ་བའི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡར་རྒྱས་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཙམ་རེད། SPMRL ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཚུ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་དུས་འཕགས་པའི་སྔོན་མའི་ཧྲིལ་བ་མི་(Ballesteros et.al., 2015)ཕྱིར'}
{'en': 'How (not) to train a dependency parser : The curious case of jackknifing part-of-speech taggers', 'ar': 'كيف (لا) لتدريب محلل التبعية: الحالة المثيرة للفضول المتمثلة في تقطيع أدوات تحديد جزء من الكلام', 'pt': 'Como (não) treinar um analisador de dependência: o curioso caso de taggers de parte de fala', 'fr': 'Comment (ne pas) entraîner un analyseur de dépendances\xa0: le cas curieux de la mise en portefeuille de marqueurs de parties de discours', 'es': 'Cómo (no) entrenar un analizador de dependencias: el curioso caso de machacar a los etiquetadores de parte del discurso', 'ja': '依存関係パーサーのトレーニング方法（トレーニングしない） ：音声タグの一部をジャックナイフする好奇心旺盛なケース', 'zh': '何(不)训练恃解析器:饰词性异事', 'hi': 'कैसे (नहीं) एक निर्भरता पार्सर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए: जैकनाइफिंग पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगर्स का जिज्ञासु मामला', 'ru': 'Как (не) обучать синтаксический анализатор зависимостей: любопытный случай джек-ножащих тагеров части речи', 'ga': 'Conas (gan) parsálaí spleáchais a thraenáil: An cás aisteach a bhaineann le clibeálaithe cuid cainte a scianáil', 'ka': 'როგორ (არა) დამხმარებულობის პანელიზერის გასწავლობა: სიტყვის ტეგერიზერების ცნობიერი შემთხვევაName', 'el': 'Πώς (όχι) να εκπαιδεύσετε έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης: Η περίεργη περίπτωση των κωδικοποιητών τμημάτων ομιλίας', 'hu': 'Hogyan (nem) képezzünk egy függőség-elemzőt: A beszédrész-címkézők kikéselésének furcsa esete', 'lt': 'Kaip (ne) treniruoti priklausomybės analizatorių: Įdomus atvejis, kai kalbos dalies žymekliai įkišami į rankas', 'it': 'Come (non) addestrare un parser di dipendenza: Il curioso caso di jackkning di tag part-of-speech', 'mk': 'Како (не) да се обучува анализатор на зависност: Чудниот случај на jackknifing дел од говорот означувачи', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ്: The curious case of jackkning part of speech taggers', 'ms': 'Bagaimana (tidak) melatih penghurai dependensi: Kejadian penasaran bagi tag-part-of-speech jackknifing', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдаушысын қалай оқыту (жоқ): Jack knifing бөлігін сөйлесу тегжерлерінің қызықты болуы', 'mt': 'Kif (mhux) jitħarreġ analizzatur tad-dipendenza: Il-każ kurjuż ta’ jackknifing part-of-speech taggers', 'mn': 'Хэрэв хамааралтай хуваагч хэрхэн суралцах вэ?', 'no': 'Korleis (ikkje) å trenja ein avhengighetstolker: Den merkelige tilfellet av jackknifing del av talemerker', 'pl': 'Jak (nie) trenować parser zależności: Ciekawy przypadek jackknifing tagerów części mowy', 'ro': 'Cum (nu) să instruiești un parser de dependență: Cazul curios de jackknipping parte-of-speech tagers', 'sr': 'Kako (ne) trenirati razmatrač zavisnosti: zanimljiv slučaj za džeknifing deo govora', 'so': 'Sidee loo baro baaritaanka xiriirta: The curious case of jackkning part-of-speech taggers', 'si': 'කොහොමද (නැහැ) විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂකයක් කිරීමට: ජැක්නිෆ් කොටස් කොටස් කිරීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'sv': 'Hur (inte) man tränar en beroendetolkare: Det märkliga fallet med att jacka delar av tal taggare', 'ta': 'சார்பு தொகுப்பானை எப்படி பயிற்சி செய்ய (இல்லை): The curious case of jackkning part of speech taggers', 'ur': 'کس طرح (نہیں) ایک اعتمادی پارچر کی تعلیم کرنا: جکَکَکَکَن کے ایک حصہ کے ٹاگروں کا کنجکاوی کیس', 'uz': 'The curious case of jackkning part of speech taggers', 'vi': 'Làm thế nào để đào tạo một cha xứ phụ thuộc: Vụ án tò mò về các câu chuyện', 'nl': 'Hoe (niet) een afhankelijkheidsparser te trainen: Het curieuze geval van jackknifing part-of-speech taggers', 'bg': 'Как (не) да се обучава анализатор на зависимости: Любопитният случай на маркировки за част от речта', 'hr': 'Kako (ne) vježbati analizator ovisnosti: zanimljiv slučaj označavanja dijela govora', 'da': 'Hvordan (ikke) at træne en afhængighedsfortolker: Det mærkelige tilfælde af jackknipping del-of-tale taggere', 'de': 'Wie (nicht) man einen Dependency Parser trainiert: Der seltsame Fall von Jackknifing Part-of-Speech Tagger', 'id': 'Bagaimana (tidak) melatih parser dependency: Kasus penasaran dari jackknifing bagian-dari-pidato tagger', 'ko': '의존 해상도 훈련하기: jackknifing 단어성 표기기의 이상한 사례', 'fa': 'چگونه آموزش دادن یک بازیگر بستگی نیست: پرونده کنجکاوی از بازیگران قسمت سخنرانی', 'sw': 'Namna (si) kufundisha mchambuzi wa kutegemea: Masuala ya ajabu ya kuwafunza wataalamu wa mazungumzo', 'am': 'The curious case of jackkning part-of-speech taggers', 'tr': 'Möhüm tansçysyny nähili (ýok) öwretmek üçin', 'sq': 'Si (jo) të trajnojmë një analizues varësie: rasti kurioz i jackknifing pjesë të fjalës taggers', 'af': "Hoe (nie) om 'n afhanklikheidspanser te trein: Die nuuskierige geval van jackknifing deel- van- speech etiketeers", 'az': 'Nə üçün bağımlılıq ayırıcısını təhsil etmək: Jack knifing-in-part taggers', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս (ոչ) վարժեցնել կախվածություն վերլուծողը: Խոսքի մասերի բաժանման հետաքրքիր դեպքում', 'bn': 'কিভাবে (না) নির্ভরশীল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য: জ্যাককিং অফ-ভাষার ট্যাগারের বিস্ময়কর কেস', 'bs': 'Kako (ne) obučavati analizatora ovisnosti: zanimljiv slučaj "Jacknifing part-of-speech taggers"', 'cs': 'Jak (ne) trénovat parser závislostí: Zvláštní případ jackknifing tagerů části řeči', 'ca': "Com (no) treinar un analitzador de dependencies: El curios cas d'etiquetadors de part de parla", 'et': 'Kuidas (mitte) koolitada sõltuvuspartserit: Uudishimulik juhtum kõneosade sildistamisel', 'fi': 'Miten (ei) kouluttaa riippuvuuden jﾃ､sentﾃ､jﾃ､ﾃ､: Outo tapaus Jackknifing osa-of-speech taggers', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'איך (לא) לאמן מעבד תלויות: המקרה הסקרן של "jackknifing part of speech taggers"', 'sk': 'Kako (ne) usposabljati razčlenjevalnika odvisnosti: radoveden primer označevalcev delov govora', 'ha': 'The curious case of jackkick part of-language taggers', 'bo': 'ཇི་ལྟར་བཤད་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་མིན་པར།'}
{'en': 'In dependency parsing, jackknifing taggers is indiscriminately used as a simple adaptation strategy. Here, we empirically evaluate when and how (not) to use jackknifing in parsing. On 26 languages, we reveal a preference that conflicts with, and surpasses the ubiquitous ten-folding. We show no clear benefits of tagging the training data in cross-lingual parsing.', 'ar': 'في تحليل التبعية ، يتم استخدام أدوات طعن بالسكين بشكل عشوائي كإستراتيجية تكيف بسيطة. هنا ، نقيم بشكل تجريبي متى وكيف (لا) نستخدم الطعن بالرافعة في الإعراب. في 26 لغة ، نكشف عن تفضيل يتعارض مع العشرة أضعاف في كل مكان ويتجاوزها. لا نعرض أي فوائد واضحة لوضع علامات على بيانات التدريب في التحليل اللغوي متعدد اللغات.', 'pt': 'Na análise de dependência, taggers jackknifing são usados indiscriminadamente como uma estratégia de adaptação simples. Aqui, avaliamos empiricamente quando e como (não) usar jackknifing na análise. Em 26 idiomas, revelamos uma preferência que conflita e supera a onipresente decuplicação. Não mostramos benefícios claros de marcar os dados de treinamento na análise de vários idiomas.', 'fr': "Dans l'analyse des dépendances, les marqueurs de mise en portefeuille sont utilisés sans discernement comme une simple stratégie d'adaptation. Ici, nous évaluons empiriquement quand et comment (ne pas) utiliser le jackknifing dans l'analyse syntaxique. Sur 26 langues, nous révélons une préférence qui va à l'encontre de l'omniprésent décuplement et qui la surpasse. Nous ne montrons aucun avantage évident à étiqueter les données de formation dans le cadre de l'analyse multilingue.", 'es': 'En el análisis de dependencias, el jackknifing taggers se usa indiscriminadamente como una estrategia de adaptación simple. Aquí, evaluamos empíricamente cuándo y cómo (no) usar jackknifing en el análisis. En 26 idiomas, revelamos una preferencia que entra en conflicto con el omnipresente doblamiento de diez y lo supera. No mostramos beneficios claros de etiquetar los datos de entrenamiento en el análisis multilingüe.', 'ja': '依存関係解析では、ジャックナイフタガーは単純な適応戦略として無差別に使用されます。ここでは、構文解析でジャックナイフを使用するタイミングと方法を経験的に評価します。26の言語では、ユビキタスな10倍に抵触し、それを上回る好みを明らかにします。私たちは、クロスリンガル構文解析でトレーニングデータにタグを付けることの明確な利点を示していません。', 'zh': '赖解析青皂白,将标器略宜。 于此,据验评何时及(不)于解析中用jackknifing。 26种语言,十倍相冲突越。 吾无跨语解析中标记练数明益也。', 'hi': 'निर्भरता पार्सिंग में, जैकनिफिंग टैगर्स को अंधाधुंध रूप से एक सरल अनुकूलन रणनीति के रूप में उपयोग किया जाता है। यहां, हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से मूल्यांकन करते हैं कि पार्सिंग में जैकनिफिंग का उपयोग कब और कैसे (नहीं) किया जाए। 26 भाषाओं पर, हम एक वरीयता को प्रकट करते हैं जो के साथ संघर्ष करता है, और सर्वव्यापी दस-तह को पार करता है। हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल पार्सिंग में प्रशिक्षण डेटा को टैग करने का कोई स्पष्ट लाभ नहीं दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В синтаксическом анализе зависимостей в качестве простой стратегии адаптации неизбирательно используются таггеры с джек-ножницей. Здесь мы эмпирически оцениваем, когда и как (не) использовать джек-ножницы в парсинге. На 26 языках мы выявляем предпочтение, которое вступает в противоречие с вездесущим десятигранником и превосходит его. Мы не показываем явных преимуществ тегирования обучающих данных при кросс-лингвистическом синтаксическом анализе.', 'ga': 'I bparsáil spleáchais, úsáidtear clibeálaithe jackknifing gan idirdhealú mar straitéis oiriúnaithe simplí. Anseo, déanaimid meastóireacht eimpíreach ar cathain agus conas (gan) úsáid a bhaint as jackknifing i bparsáil. Ar 26 teanga, nochtaimid rogha a théann salach ar a chéile, agus a sháraíonn na deich bhfillte uileláithreach. Ní léir dúinn aon bhuntáistí soiléire a bhaineann le clibeáil na sonraí oiliúna sa pharsáil thrastheangach.', 'hu': 'A függőség elemzésében a jackknifing taggereket válogatás nélkül használják egyszerű adaptációs stratégiának. Itt empirikusan értékeljük, hogy mikor és hogyan (nem) használjuk a jackknifingot az elemzésben. 26 nyelven olyan preferenciát fedünk fel, amely ellentmond a mindenütt jelen lévő tíz-hajtással. Nem mutatunk egyértelmű előnyöket a képzési adatok címkézésének a többnyelvű elemzésben.', 'el': 'Στην ανάλυση εξάρτησης, οι ετικέτες χρησιμοποιούνται αδιακρίτως ως μια απλή στρατηγική προσαρμογής. Εδώ, αξιολογούμε εμπειρικά πότε και πώς (όχι) να χρησιμοποιήσουμε το jackknifing στην ανάλυση. Στις 26 γλώσσες, αποκαλύπτουμε μια προτίμηση που έρχεται σε σύγκρουση με και ξεπερνά την πανταχού παρούσα δεκαπτυχία. Δεν καταδεικνύουμε σαφή οφέλη από την επισήμανση των δεδομένων κατάρτισης σε γλωσσική ανάλυση.', 'ka': 'დამხმარებელობის პარაზაციაში, jackknifing taggers indiscriminately used as a simple adaptation strategy. აქ, ჩვენ ემპერიკურად გავამუშავებთ, როდესაც და როგორ (არა) გამოყენება "jackknifing" პარასუზაციაში. 26 ენაში ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ წარმოდგენება, რომელიც კონფლიქცის და გადავიდგინეთ საკუთარი 10-ჯერ. ჩვენ არ ვაჩვენებთ წარმოიდგინეთ გამოსახულებები, რომლებიც უფრო სიგრძნელური პარასტის მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'it': "Nell'analisi delle dipendenze, i taggers jackknifing sono utilizzati indiscriminatamente come una semplice strategia di adattamento. Qui, valutiamo empiricamente quando e come (non) usare il jackknifing nel parsing. Su 26 lingue, riveliamo una preferenza che contrasta e supera l'onnipresente dieci-folding. Non mostriamo chiari vantaggi di taggare i dati di allenamento nell'analisi cross-lingual.", 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдау үшін жакknifing тегжерлері қарапайым адаптациялау стратегиясы ретінде қолданылады. Мұнда біз жакknifing қазірінде және қалай пайдалануын империялық түрде бағалаймыз. 26 тілде біз қайшылық таңдауларды көрсету және оның қайшылығын өзгертуге болады. Біз тілдерді талдау үшін оқыту деректерін таңдау үшін таңдалған пайдаланушыларды көрсетпейміз.', 'mk': 'Во анализирањето на зависноста, ознаките за jackknifing се искористуваат некриминално како едноставна стратегија за адаптација. Овде, емпирички проценуваме кога и како (не) да се користи jackknifing за анализирање. На 26 јазици, откриваме преференција која се конфликтира со, и ја надминува постојаната десет пати. Не покажуваме јасни бенефиции од означувањето на податоците за обука во меѓујазичното анализирање.', 'lt': 'Atliekant priklausomybės analizę, žymenys „jackknifing“ naudojamas kaip paprasta prisitaikymo strategija. Šiuo atveju empiriniu požiūriu vertiname, kada ir kaip (ne) paruošti džikkknifing. 26 kalbomis atskleidžiame pirmenybę, kuri prieštarauja ir viršija visur esančius dešimt kartų. Mes aiškiai nenustatome naudos ženklinant mokymo duomenis tarpkalbiniame analizavime.', 'ms': 'Dalam penghuraian dependensi, tag jackknifing digunakan secara tidak jelas sebagai strategi penyesuaian sederhana. Di sini, kita secara empirik menilai bila dan bagaimana (tidak) untuk menggunakan jackknifing dalam penghuraian. Dalam 26 bahasa, kita mengungkapkan keutamaan yang berkonflik dengan, dan melebihi 10 kali lipat di mana-mana. Kami tidak menunjukkan manfaat jelas untuk menandai data latihan dalam penghuraian saling bahasa.', 'ml': 'In dependency parsing, jackknifing taggers is indiscriminately used as a simple adaptation strategy.  ഇവിടെ, പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d ജാക്ക്ക്കിംഗ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എപ്പോഴാണെന്നും എങ്ങനെയില്ലെന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രേഷ് 26 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മുന്\u200dഗണനം വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കൊണ്ട് തമ്മിലുള്ള ഒരു മുന്\u200dഗണനം കാണിക്കുന്നു.  ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ടാഗ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് വ്യക്തമായ ഉപകാരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള', 'mt': 'Fl-analiżi tad-dipendenza, it-taggers tal-jackknifing jintużaw b’mod indiskriminat bħala strateġija sempliċi ta’ adattament. Hawnhekk, aħna jevalwaw empirikament meta u kif (mhux) għandna tuża jackknifing fl-analiżi. F’26 lingwa, niżvelaw preferenza li tikkonflitti ma’, u li taqbeż l-għaxar darbiet kullimkien. Aħna ma juru l-ebda benefiċċju ċar tat-tikkettar tad-dejta tat-taħriġ fl-analiżi translingwistika.', 'no': 'I tillesing av avhengighet vert merkelappar bruka indiskriminert som enkelt adaptasjonsstrategi. Her evaluerer vi empirisk når og korleis (ikkje) jackknifing skal brukast i tolking. På 26 språk viser vi eit innstillinga som konfliktar med, og overpassar den omvendte tienfoldinga. Vi viser ingen klar fordel til å merke opplæringsdata i krysspråk tolking.', 'pl': 'W analizie zależności tagery jackknifing są bez rozróżnienia używane jako prosta strategia adaptacji. Tutaj empirycznie oceniamy, kiedy i jak (nie) użyć jackknifing w parsowaniu. W odniesieniu do 26-języków ujawniamy preferencję, która jest sprzeczna z wszechobecną dziesięciokrotnością i przewyższa ją. Nie wykazujemy wyraźnych korzyści z tagowania danych treningowych w parsowaniu wielojęzycznym.', 'ro': 'În analizarea dependențelor, etichetele jackknifing sunt folosite fără discriminare ca o strategie simplă de adaptare. Aici, evaluăm empiric când și cum (nu) să folosim jackknifing-ul în parsing. Pe 26 de limbi, dezvăluim o preferință care intră în conflict cu și depășește omniprezentul zece-pliere. Nu prezentăm beneficii clare ale etichetării datelor de formare în analizarea interlingvistică.', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай хуваалцах үед, жакканифинг тегжерлүүд энгийн адилтгалын стратеги болгон хэрэглэгддэг. Энд бид хэрхэн, хэрхэн (бус) жакknifing хэрэглэх вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлдог. 26 хэл дээр бид хоорондоо зөрчилдөөн, хаана ч 10 дахин ихэсгэдэг зүйлсийг илүү өндөртэй болгодог. Бид хэлний талаар дасгал өгөгдлийн талаар тайлбарлах боломжгүй.', 'si': 'විශේෂතාව විශ්ලේෂනයේ ජැක්නයිෆින් ටැග්ගර්ස් විශේෂයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය සැකසුම් විධානයක් විද මෙන්න, අපි කොහොමද ජැක්නිෆින්ග් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ කොහොමද? භාෂාවක් 26යි, අපි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා වගේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක අපි පැහැදිලි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ කිසිම භාෂාවික විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්තේ', 'so': "Xirfadda ku xiran baarshaha waxaa loo isticmaalaa qoraal adag oo fudud. Halkan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa goortii iyo sidaan u isticmaali karno baaritaanka. 26 luuqadood waxaan ku muujinaynaa doorasho la xiriira, waxaana ka dhaafnaa kuwa aan xaqa ahayn toban jeer. Ma tusno faa'iidooyin cad oo ku saabsan baaritaanka luuqadaha kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'I beroendeanalys används jackknifing taggers urskillningslöst som en enkel anpassningsstrategi. Här utvärderar vi empiriskt när och hur (inte) jackknifing ska användas vid tolkning. På 26 språk avslöjar vi en preferens som strider mot och överträffar den allestädes närvarande tiofoldningen. Vi visar inga tydliga fördelar med att tagga träningsdata i korsspråklig tolkning.', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த பாசிங்கில் ஜாக்கிங் ஒட்டுக்காட்டிகள் ஒரு எளிய ஒழுங்கும் திட்டமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. இங்கு, நாம் பாசிங்கிங் பயன்படுத்தும் போது எப்படி மற்றும் (இல்லை) என்று வெறுமையாக மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். 26 மொழிகளில், நாம் ஒரு முன்னுரிமையை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் அது கொண்டு குழப்பம் இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் புதிய பத நாங்கள் எந்த தெளிவான பயன்பாடுகளையும் காண்பிக்கவில்லை மொழி பாசிங்கில் பயிற்சி தரவை ஒட்டுதல்', 'sr': 'U analiziranju zavisnosti, znakovi za začepljenje se indiscriminalno koriste kao jednostavna strategija adaptacije. Evo, mi empirièki procjenjujemo kada i kako (ne) koristiti Jacknifing u analizu. Na 26 jezika otkrivamo preferenciju sa kojom se suočava i prelazi preko svih deset puta. Mi ne pokazujemo jasne koristi označavanja podataka o obuci u međujezičkom razmatranju.', 'ur': 'اعتمادی پارسینگ میں جک نائنگ ٹاگروں کو ایک سادہ اضافہ استراتژی کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. یہاں، ہم مضبوط طور پر ارزش کرتے ہیں کہ کب اور (کیسے) پارسینگ میں جک کیفینگ استعمال نہ کریں۔ 26 زبانوں میں ہم ایک ترجیح دیتے ہیں جو اس سے مخالفت کرتی ہے اور اس سے بڑھ جاتی ہے جس میں دس دفعہ نہیں ہوتی۔ ہم کئی زبان پارسینگ میں آموزش دادہ کو ٹیگ کرنے کے لئے صریح فائدہ نہیں دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Қўнғиш парламентини боғлиқликда, поччаш теггерларни осон мослаш strategiya сифатида фойдаланади. Bu yerda, biz tashkilotni o'ylaymiz, parking bo'lganda jackkning foydalanishini va qanday o'ylaymiz. 26 tillarda, biz bilan murojaat qiladigan parametrlarni ko'rsamiz va cheksiz bir necha marta ko'paymiz. Biz bir necha tillar parsing haqida taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni yozib olishni ko'rsamaymiz.", 'vi': 'Trong việc phân tích phụ thuộc, những chú sóc rừng được dùng bừa bãi như một chiến lược thích nghi đơn giản. Ở đây chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm đánh giá khi nào và bằng cách nào Trên 26, chúng tôi tiết lộ một ưu tiên xung đột và vượt qua mức gấp mười. Chúng tôi không thấy có lợi ích rõ ràng khi đánh dấu dữ liệu đào tạo trong phân tích ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'nl': 'In dependence parsing wordt jackknifing taggers willekeurig gebruikt als een eenvoudige aanpassingsstrategie. Hier evalueren we empirisch wanneer en hoe jackknifing (niet) gebruikt moet worden bij parsen. Op 26-talen onthullen we een voorkeur die strijdig is met en overtreft de alomtegenwoordige tien-vouwing. We laten geen duidelijke voordelen zien van het taggen van de trainingsgegevens in cross-lingual parsing.', 'bg': 'При анализа на зависимости, маркерите се използват безразборно като проста стратегия за адаптация. Тук емпирично оценяваме кога и как (не) да използваме джаккнинг при анализирането. На 26 езика разкриваме предпочитание, което противоречи на и надминава повсеместното десетокръване. Не показваме ясни ползи от маркирането на данните за обучение в междуезичен анализ.', 'hr': 'U analiziranju ovisnosti, oznake za začepljenje se indiscriminantno koriste kao jednostavna strategija adaptacije. Evo, empirički procjenjujemo kada i kako (ne) koristiti jackknifing u analizu. Na 26 jezika otkrivamo preferenciju koja se suočava s tim i prelazi preko svih deset puta. Mi ne pokazujemo jasne koristi označavanja podataka o obuci u međujezičkom razmatranju.', 'id': 'Dalam penghuraian dependensi, tag jackknifing tidak diskriminasi digunakan sebagai strategi adaptasi sederhana. Di sini, kita secara empiris menilai kapan dan bagaimana (tidak) menggunakan jackknifing dalam parsing. On 26 languages, we reveal a preference that conflicts with, and surpasses the ubiquitous ten-folding.  Kami tidak menunjukkan manfaat jelas untuk menandai data pelatihan dalam penghuraian saling bahasa.', 'da': 'I afhængighedsanalyse bruges jackknifing taggers uden forskel som en simpel tilpasningsstrategi. Her evaluerer vi empirisk, hvornår og hvordan (ikke) jackknifing skal bruges i parsing. På 26 sprog afslører vi en præference, der strider mod og overgår den allestedsnærværende ti-foldning. Vi viser ingen klare fordele ved at mærke træningsdata i tværsproget parsing.', 'sw': 'Kwa kutegemea uchimbaji, mabango ya mabango yanatumiwa bila uhakika kama mkakati rahisi wa kubadili. Here, we empirically evaluate when and how (not) to use jackknifing in parsing.  Kwa lugha 26, tunaonyesha kipaumbele kinachochanganyika na, na tunavuta vidole kumi. Hatuonyesha manufaa wazi ya kuweka taarifa za mafunzo katika parge ya lugha mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'در بررسی بستگی، نقاشی\u200cهای جک\u200cknifing به عنوان استراتژی ساده\u200cای استفاده می\u200cشود. در اینجا، ما به طور امپراطوری از زمانی و چگونه استفاده از جک knifing در تقسیم می کنیم. در ۲۶ زبان، ما ترجیح می\u200cدهیم که با آن مخالفت می\u200cکند، و در ۱۰ دفعه بیشتر از آن می\u200cگذرد. ما هیچ سودی واضح برای نشان دادن داده های آموزش در پردازی زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی نشون نمی\u200cدهیم.', 'tr': 'Maklumatçylyk a ýlamakda, jäkni etiketleriň taýýarlaryny aýratyndan hem basit bir adaptasyon stratejisi hökmünde ullanýar. Bu ýerde, Jamany tanyşdyrmak üçin haçan we nähili ulanmalydygyny empiriýa çykýarys. 26 dilde çalşyk we çalşyk sözlerimizi a şýarys. Biz dillerden çykyş edip bilmek maglumatyny etiketlemek üçin wajyp ýokarymyz ýok.', 'af': "In afhanklikheid verwerking is jackknifing taggers indiscriminately gebruik as 'n eenvoudige adaptasie strategie. Hier, ons is empiriese evalueer wanneer en hoe (nie) om jackknifing te gebruik in verwerking. Op 26 taal openbaar ons 'n voorkeure wat verskillig met, en verbygaan die onbeskadige tienfolding. Ons wys geen duidelike voordele om die opvoerde data te merk in kruistale verwerking nie.", 'sq': 'Në analizimin e varësisë, etiketat jackknifing përdoren pa dallim si një strategji e thjeshtë adaptimi. Here, we empirically evaluate when and how (not) to use jackknifing in parsing.  Në 26 gjuhë, ne zbulojmë një preferencë që është në konflikt me dhe mbikalon dhjetë herë më shumë. Ne nuk tregojmë përfitime të qarta të etiketave të të dhënave të trainimit në analizimin ndërgjuhësor.', 'ko': '의존항 해석에서, Jacknifing 표시는 구별하지 않고 간단한 적응 전략으로 사용된다.여기서, 우리는 경험에 따라 언제, 어떻게 해석에서 jackknifing을 사용하는지 평가한다.26개 언어에서 우리는 보편적으로 존재하는 10개 언어와 충돌하고 그들의 선호를 초월했다.우리는 다중 언어 분석에서 훈련 데이터를 표시하는 뚜렷한 장점을 보이지 않았다.', 'am': 'በተደገመ ማኅበረሰብ፣ አቅራቢያ ማፍሰስ ጦማሪያዎች እንደ ቀላል ማድረግ ጥቅምት ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ እዚህ፣ ማቼ እና እንዴት (አይደለም) በፓርቲ ማኅበረሰብ ለመጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በ26 ቋንቋ የተጨቃጨውን የፊደል ትርፍን እናሳውቃለን፣ አሥር እጥፍ እናልፋለን፡፡ በቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ማኅበረሰብ የግልጽን ዳታዎችን ማሳየት የግልጽ ጥቅሞች የለንም፡፡', 'hy': 'Ըստ կախվածության վերլուծության, jackKnfing նշանները անխիստ օգտագործվում են որպես պարզ հարմարեցման ստրատեգիա: Այստեղ մենք էմպրիկապես գնահատում ենք, թե երբ և ինչպես օգտագործել "jackKnfing"-ը վերլուծում: 26 լեզուներում մենք բացահայտում ենք նախընտրություն, որը հակամարտություն է և գերազանցում է ամենուրեք տասը անգամ: Մենք պարզ առավելություններ չենք ցույց տալիս կրթության տվյալների նշումների վրա լեզվային վերլուծում:', 'bs': 'U analiziranju ovisnosti, značke za začepljenje se indiscriminalno koriste kao jednostavna strategija adaptacije. Evo, empirički procjenjujemo kada i kako (ne) koristiti jackknifing u analizu. Na 26 jezika otkrivamo preferenciju koja se suočava s njima i prelazi preko svih deset puta. Mi ne pokazujemo jasne koristi označavanja podataka o obuci u međujezičkom razmatranju.', 'bn': 'নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং নিয়ে জ্যাককিং ট্যাগার ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে একটি সাধারণ আপেটশন কৌশল হিসেবে। এখানে, আমরা সামর্থ্যিকভাবে মূল্য দেই কি সময় এবং কিভাবে পার্জিং এ জ্যাককিং ব্যবহার করা যাবে না। ২৬ ভাষায় আমরা একটি পছন্দ প্রকাশ করি যা সংঘর্ষের সাথে সংঘর্ষ করে এবং দশ গুণিতে পারে। ক্রিভাষাভাষী পার্জিং এ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ট্যাগ করার জন্য আমরা কোন সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করি না।', 'az': 'Bağlamlıq ayırmasında, Jack knifing etiketçiləri sadəcə bir adaptasiya stratejisi olaraq istifadə edilir. Burada, çəkişmə üçün jackknifing istifadə etməyi və necə istifadə etməyi empirik olaraq değerləşdiririk. 26 dildə mübahisədə olan seçimləri göstərir və hər hansı bir on dəfə istifadə edir. Biz dillərin çoxlu ayırılmasında təhsil məlumatlarını etiketləmək üçün açıq faydalar göstərməyik.', 'ca': "En l'analització de dependencies, els etiquetadors jackknifing es fan servir indiscriminadament com una estratègia d'adaptació simple. Here, we empirically evaluate when and how (not) to use jackknifing in parsing.  En 26 llengües, revelem una preferència que està en conflicte amb, i supera els 10-plegats ubicats. No mostram cap benefici clar d'etiquetar les dades d'entrenament en l'analització translingüística.", 'cs': 'Při analýze závislostí se jackknifing tagery nerozlišně používají jako jednoduchá adaptační strategie. Zde empiricky hodnotíme, kdy a jak (ne) použít jackknifing při parsování. U 26-jazyků odhalujeme preferenci, která je v rozporu s všudypřítomným desetinásobným a překonává. Neprokazujeme žádné jasné výhody tagování tréninkových dat v cross-jazyčném parsování.', 'et': 'Sõltuvuse parsimisel kasutatakse Jackknifing siltereid valimatult lihtsa kohanemisstrateegiana. Siin hindame empiiriliselt, millal ja kuidas (mitte) parsimisel jacknifingut kasutada. 26 keeles näitame eelistust, mis on vastuolus kõikjal leviva kümnekordsusega ja ületab selle. Me ei näita selgeid eeliseid koolitusandmete märgistamisest keeleülesel parsimisel.', 'fi': 'Riippuvuusparsauksessa jaccknifing taggereita käytetään erottamattomasti yksinkertaisena sopeutumisstrategiana. Tässä arvioimme empiirisesti, milloin ja miten (ei) käyttää jackcnifingia jäsentämisessä. 26 kielellä paljastamme mieltymyksen, joka on ristiriidassa kaikkialla olevan kymmenkertaisen kanssa ja ylittää sen. Meillä ei ole selkeitä etuja harjoitustietojen merkitsemisestä kielienvälisessä jäsentämisessä.', 'de': 'Beim Dependency Parsing werden Jackknifing Tagger wahllos als einfache Anpassungsstrategie verwendet. Hier bewerten wir empirisch, wann und wie Jackknifing beim Parsen eingesetzt werden soll. Auf 26-Sprachen zeigen wir eine Präferenz, die mit der allgegenwärtigen Zehnfachung kollidiert und diese übertrifft. Wir zeigen keine klaren Vorteile der Tagging der Trainingsdaten im crosslingualen Parsing.', 'jv': 'In diphendite urip, JackneFing tagger is indeScrominely used as a Simple Adjustment policy. @title:group Nanggang 16-ngen langkung, kita ngubah perusahaan kanggo langgar sapa-perusahaan lan mulasah sing katon-katon liyane Awak dhéwé ora ono barêng-barêng nggambar kuwi tindang nggawe gerakan karo pawar.', 'ha': "Daga parse da inganci, za'a yi amfani da tagogi ɗin jackkicfing ko kuma an yi amfani da shi gabanin adadi mai sauƙi. Wannan, Munã iya ƙaddara a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da kakkifi a cikin parci. Daga harshen 26, Munã bayyana zaɓaniya wanda ke tsãge da shi, kuma yana ƙari sau-duffai gõma. Ba mu nũna wa manyan amfani da za'a taga data cikin parse-lugha guda.", 'sk': 'Pri razčlenitvi odvisnosti se označevalci Jackknifing brezsklicno uporabljajo kot preprosta strategija prilagajanja. Tukaj empirično ocenjujemo, kdaj in kako (ne) uporabiti jackcnifing pri razčlenitvi. Na 26 jezikih razkrivamo preferenco, ki je v nasprotju z vsepovsod povezanim desetletjem in presega. Nimamo jasnih prednosti označevanja podatkov o usposabljanju pri medjezičnem razčlenjevanju.', 'he': 'במחקר תלויות, תווים "ג\'ק סכין" משתמשים ללא הפרעה כאסטרטגיה פשוטה להסתגל. כאן, אנו מעריכים אמפירית מתי ואיך (לא) להשתמש בסכין ג\'ק בפרסים. ב-26 שפות, אנחנו חושפים עדיפות שמתנגדות עם, ומעברת את עשר הכפילות בכל מקום. אנחנו לא מראים שום יתרונות ברורות של תג נתוני האימונים באבחן שפוני.', 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མིག འདིར་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཇི་ལྟར་ཕྱེ་བའི་ནང་དུ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་མ་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། སྐད་རིགས་26དེ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་གདོང་འགྱུར་བའི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནང་བ་ཐད་ཀལ་ཕན་འབྲས་མི་ཤར་བ'}
{'en': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'ar': 'البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للطب الدقيق', 'fr': 'PNL pour la médecine de précision', 'es': 'PNL para medicina de precisión', 'pt': 'PNL para Medicina de Precisão', 'ja': '精密医療のためのNLP', 'hi': 'परिशुद्धता चिकित्सा के लिए एनएलपी', 'zh': '用精准医 NLP', 'ru': 'NLP для прецизионной медицины', 'ga': 'NLP do Mhíochaine Beacht', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'NLP για την ιατρική ακριβείας', 'hu': 'NLP a precíziós orvoslásra', 'it': 'PNL per la medicina di precisione', 'lt': 'NLP tiksliems vaistams', 'mk': 'NLP за прецизна медицина', 'kk': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'mt': 'NLP għal Mediċina ta’ Preċiżjoni', 'ml': 'പ്രിസിഷന്\u200d മരുന്നിനുള്ള NLP', 'ms': 'NLP untuk Ubat Tepat', 'mn': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'pl': 'NLP dla medycyny precyzyjnej', 'ro': 'PNL pentru medicina de precizie', 'no': 'NLP for presisjonsmedium', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'NLP-ga daryeelka caafimaadka', 'sr': 'NLP za medicinu preciznosti', 'sv': 'NLP för precisionsmedicin', 'ta': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'ur': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'chọc dò tủy sống chuẩn', 'hr': 'NLP za lijek točnosti', 'da': 'NLP for præcisionsmedicin', 'bg': 'НЛП за прецизна медицина', 'ko': '정확한 의학적 NLP', 'id': 'NLP untuk Medis Precision', 'sw': 'NLP kwa ajili ya matibabu ya Urazimu', 'ca': 'NLP per la medicina de precisió', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'nl': 'NLP voor precisiegeneeskunde', 'cs': 'NLP pro přesnou medicínu', 'sq': 'NLP për mjekësinë e saktë', 'tr': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'bn': 'পূর্ণ মেডিসেন্সের জন্য NLP', 'bs': 'NLP za medicinu preciznosti', 'fa': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'hy': 'Ճշգրիտ բժշկության ՆԼՊ', 'af': 'NLP vir Precision Medicine', 'de': 'NLP für Präzisionsmedizin', 'fi': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'et': 'NLP täppismeditsiini jaoks', 'az': 'NLP for Precision Medicine', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'jv': 'NLP kanggo Presision Care', 'sk': 'NLP za natančno medicino', 'he': 'NLP לרפואה מדויקת', 'bo': 'NLP for Precision Medicine'}
{'en': 'We will introduce precision medicine and showcase the vast opportunities for NLP in this burgeoning field with great societal impact. We will review pressing NLP problems, state-of-the art methods, and important applications, as well as datasets, medical resources, and practical issues. The tutorial will provide an accessible overview of biomedicine, and does not presume knowledge in biology or healthcare. The ultimate goal is to reduce the entry barrier for NLP researchers to contribute to this exciting domain.', 'ar': 'سنقدم الطب الدقيق ونعرض الفرص الهائلة للغة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في هذا المجال المزدهر مع تأثير مجتمعي كبير. سنراجع مشاكل البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الملحة ، وأحدث الأساليب والتطبيقات المهمة ، بالإضافة إلى مجموعات البيانات والموارد الطبية والقضايا العملية. سيوفر البرنامج التعليمي نظرة عامة يمكن الوصول إليها عن الطب الحيوي ، ولا يفترض المعرفة في علم الأحياء أو الرعاية الصحية. الهدف النهائي هو تقليل حاجز الدخول للباحثين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للمساهمة في هذا المجال المثير.', 'fr': "Nous présenterons la médecine de précision et présenterons les nombreuses opportunités de la PNL dans ce domaine en plein essor à fort impact sociétal. Nous passerons en revue les problèmes de PNL urgents, les méthodes de pointe et les applications importantes, ainsi que les ensembles de données, les ressources médicales et les questions pratiques. Le tutoriel fournira un aperçu accessible de la biomédecine et ne présume pas de connaissances en biologie ou en soins de santé. L'objectif ultime est de réduire la barrière d'entrée pour les chercheurs en PNL afin qu'ils puissent contribuer à ce domaine passionnant.", 'es': 'Presentaremos la medicina de precisión y mostraremos las enormes oportunidades para la PNL en este campo floreciente con un gran impacto social. Revisaremos los problemas apremiantes de la PNL, los métodos más avanzados y las aplicaciones importantes, así como los conjuntos de datos, los recursos médicos y las cuestiones prácticas. El tutorial proporcionará una visión general accesible de la biomedicina, y no presupone conocimientos en biología o atención médica. El objetivo final es reducir la barrera de entrada para que los investigadores de PNL contribuyan a este apasionante dominio.', 'pt': 'Apresentaremos a medicina de precisão e mostraremos as vastas oportunidades para a PNL neste campo florescente com grande impacto social. Analisaremos problemas urgentes de PNL, métodos de última geração e aplicações importantes, bem como conjuntos de dados, recursos médicos e questões práticas. O tutorial fornecerá uma visão geral acessível da biomedicina e não pressupõe conhecimento em biologia ou saúde. O objetivo final é reduzir a barreira de entrada para pesquisadores de PNL contribuírem para este domínio empolgante.', 'ja': '精密医療を紹介し、社会的インパクトの大きいこの急成長分野におけるNLPの膨大な機会を紹介します。緊急のNLP問題、最先端の方法、重要なアプリケーション、データセット、医療リソース、および実用的な問題をレビューします。このチュートリアルは、バイオ医学の概要を提供し、生物学または医療に関する知識を前提とするものではありません。最終的な目標は、NLP研究者がこのエキサイティングなドメインに貢献するためのエントリーバリアを減らすことです。', 'hi': 'हम सटीक चिकित्सा पेश करेंगे और महान सामाजिक प्रभाव के साथ इस बढ़ते क्षेत्र में एनएलपी के लिए विशाल अवसरों का प्रदर्शन करेंगे। हम एनएलपी समस्याओं, अत्याधुनिक तरीकों और महत्वपूर्ण अनुप्रयोगों, साथ ही डेटासेट, चिकित्सा संसाधनों और व्यावहारिक मुद्दों को दबाने की समीक्षा करेंगे। ट्यूटोरियल बायोमेडिसिन का एक सुलभ अवलोकन प्रदान करेगा, और जीव विज्ञान या स्वास्थ्य देखभाल में ज्ञान का अनुमान नहीं लगाता है। अंतिम लक्ष्य इस रोमांचक डोमेन में योगदान करने के लिए एनएलपी शोधकर्ताओं के लिए प्रवेश बाधा को कम करना है।', 'zh': '将见精准医,展示NLP新兴。 将顾急之NLP,先进之要,及数据集,医疗资实。 本教程将供生物医学者访概述,且不假生物学医疗保健。 最终目标降NLP论者为之令人兴奋域贡献入阈。', 'ru': 'Мы представим прецизионную медицину и продемонстрируем огромные возможности для NLP в этой развивающейся области с большим общественным влиянием. Мы рассмотрим актуальные проблемы NLP, современные методы и важные приложения, а также наборы данных, медицинские ресурсы и практические вопросы. Учебник предоставит доступный обзор биомедицины и не предполагает знаний в области биологии или здравоохранения. Конечная цель уменьшить входной барьер для исследователей NLP для того чтобы внести вклад в эту exciting домен.', 'ga': 'Tabharfaimid isteach leigheas beachta agus taispeánfaimid na deiseanna ollmhóra atá ann do NLP sa réimse seo atá ag teacht chun cinn agus a bhfuil tionchar mór sochaíoch aige. Déanfaimid athbhreithniú ar fhadhbanna práinneacha NLP, ar mhodhanna úrscothacha, agus ar fheidhmiúcháin thábhachtacha, chomh maith le tacair shonraí, acmhainní leighis, agus saincheisteanna praiticiúla. Soláthróidh an rang teagaisc forbhreathnú inrochtana ar bhithleighis, agus ní thoimhdítear go bhfuil eolas sa bhitheolaíocht nó sa chúram sláinte. Is é an sprioc deiridh ná an bacainn iontrála a laghdú do thaighdeoirí NLP chun cur leis an bhfearann spreagúil seo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ წესიერებული მედიცინი და გავაჩვენოთ NLP-ის დიდი შესაძლებლობა ამ ბურდონის ფეხში, რომელიც დიდი საზოგადოებო შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ NLP პრობლემების გარეშე, ხელსაწყოთა მეტები და მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემები, და მონაცემები, მედიცინური რესურსი და პრაქტიკური პრობლემები გავაკეთებ სტუტირება იქნება ბიომედიციის შესაძლებელი დანახვა, და არ იქნება ბიოლოგიაში ან ჯანმრთოში ცნობიერების შესაძლებლობა. საუკეთესო მიზეზი იყო, რომ NLP მსწავლობელებისთვის გადასრულების ბარიერის გადასრულება, რომ დამატებით ამ საკეთესო დიომინში.', 'el': 'Θα εισαγάγουμε την ιατρική ακρίβειας και θα παρουσιάσουμε τις τεράστιες ευκαιρίες για τον αναπτυσσόμενο τομέα με μεγάλο κοινωνικό αντίκτυπο. Θα εξετάσουμε πιεστικά προβλήματα, μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και σημαντικές εφαρμογές, καθώς και σύνολα δεδομένων, ιατρικούς πόρους και πρακτικά ζητήματα. Το σεμινάριο θα παρέχει μια προσιτή επισκόπηση της βιοϊατρικής, και δεν προϋποθέτει γνώσεις στη βιολογία ή την υγειονομική περίθαλψη. Ο απώτερος στόχος είναι να μειωθεί το εμπόδιο εισόδου των ερευνητών για να συμβάλουν σε αυτόν τον συναρπαστικό τομέα.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a precíziós orvoslást, és bemutatjuk az NLP hatalmas lehetőségeit ebben a virágzó, nagy társadalmi hatással bíró területen. Áttekintjük a sürgető NLP problémákat, a legkorszerűbb módszereket és fontos alkalmazásokat, valamint adatkészleteket, orvosi erőforrásokat és gyakorlati kérdéseket. Az oktató hozzáférhető áttekintést nyújt a biomedicinról, és nem feltételezi a biológiai vagy egészségügyi tudást. A végső cél az, hogy csökkentsük a belépési akadályt az NLP kutatók számára, hogy hozzájáruljanak ehhez az izgalmas területhez.', 'it': "Introdurremo la medicina di precisione e mostreremo le vaste opportunità per la PNL in questo campo fiorente con grande impatto sociale. Esamineremo problemi urgenti di PNL, metodi all'avanguardia e applicazioni importanti, così come set di dati, risorse mediche e questioni pratiche. Il tutorial fornirà una panoramica accessibile della biomedicina, e non presume conoscenze in biologia o sanità. L'obiettivo finale è quello di ridurre la barriera di ingresso per i ricercatori NLP per contribuire a questo interessante dominio.", 'lt': 'We will introduce precision medicine and showcase the vast opportunities for NLP in this burgeoning field with great societal impact.  Peržiūrėsime skubias NLP problemas, naujausius metodus ir svarbias programas, taip pat duomenų rinkinius, medicininius išteklius ir praktinius klausimus. Mokykloje bus pateikta prieinama biomedicinos apžvalga ir nenumatytos biologinės ar sveikatos priežiūros žinios. Pagrindinis tikslas – sumažinti NLP mokslininkų patekimo į šią įdomią sritį kliūtis.', 'kk': 'Біз дәл дәл медицина таңдап, NLP үшін бұл бургеоның өрісінде көп қоғамдық нәрселерді көрсетейміз. Біз NLP мәселелерін басып, суреттердің күйі және маңызды қолданбаларын, деректер жинақтарын, медицина ресурстарын және практикалық мәселелерді қараймыз. Оқытушылар биология не саулық көздерінде білім бермейді. Негізгі мақсат - NLP зерттеушілерінің жазу бариерін көшірмелеу.', 'mk': 'Ќе воведеме прецизна медицина и ќе ги покажеме огромните можности за НЛП на ова сé поголемо општествено влијание. Ние ќе ги прегледаме итните проблеми на НЛП, најсовремените методи и важните апликации, како и податоци, медицински ресурси и практични прашања. Научникот ќе обезбеди пристапен преглед на биомедицината и не претпоставува знаење во биологијата или здравствената грижа. Крајната цел е намалување на бариерата за влез за истражувачите на НЛП да придонесат во овој возбудлив домен.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന മരുന്നുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തി ഈ ബര്\u200dഗറിങ്ങ് ഫീള്\u200dഡില്\u200d NLP-ന്റെ വിശാലമായ അവസരം കാണിക്കു നമ്മള്\u200d NLP പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d അമര്\u200dത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, കലാകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ രീതി ഈ ട്യൂട്ടറിയല്\u200d ജീവിയ മരുന്നിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഒരു നിരീക്ഷണം നല്\u200dകുന്നതാണ്. ജീവിതത്തില്\u200d ജീവിതത്ത ഈ ആശ്ചര്യപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഡൊമെയിനിലേക്ക് പങ്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d NLP പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഇന്\u200dട്രിപ്പ് തടസ', 'ms': 'Kami akan memperkenalkan ubat ketepatan dan menunjukkan peluang yang luas untuk NLP dalam bidang yang berkembang ini dengan kesan masyarakat yang besar. Kami akan meninjau tekanan masalah NLP, kaedah terbaik, dan aplikasi penting, serta set data, sumber perubatan, dan masalah praktik. Tutorial akan menyediakan pandangan ringkasan yang boleh dicapai tentang biomedisin, dan tidak menganggap pengetahuan dalam biologi atau rawatan kesehatan. Tujuan utama adalah untuk mengurangi halangan masukan bagi peneliti NLP untuk menyumbangkan ke domain yang menarik ini.', 'pl': 'Przedstawimy medycynę precyzyjną i zaprezentujemy ogromne możliwości NLP w tej rozwijającej się dziedzinie o dużym wpływie społecznym. Przeglądamy pilne problemy NLP, najnowocześniejsze metody i ważne aplikacje, a także zbiory danych, zasoby medyczne i kwestie praktyczne. Poradnik zapewni dostępny przegląd biomedycyny i nie zakłada wiedzy z zakresu biologii lub opieki zdrowotnej. Ostatecznym celem jest zmniejszenie bariery wejścia dla naukowców NLP, aby przyczynić się do tej ekscytującej dziedziny.', 'mt': "Se nintroduċu mediċina preċiża u nippreżentaw l-opportunitajiet kbar għall-NLP f'dan il-qasam li qed jiżdied b'impatt soċjali kbir. Ser nirrevedu l-problemi urġenti tal-NLP, il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati, u applikazzjonijiet importanti, kif ukoll settijiet ta' dejta, riżorsi mediċi, u kwistjonijiet prattiċi. It-tutorjal se jipprovdi ħarsa ġenerali aċċessibbli lejn il-bijomediċina, u ma jippreżumix għarfien fil-bijoloġija jew fil-kura tas-saħħa. The ultimate goal is to reduce the entry barrier for NLP researchers to contribute to this exciting domain.", 'sr': 'Upoznaæemo precizne lekove i pokazati velike moguænosti NLP-a u ovom polju hamburgera sa velikim socijalnim uticajem. Pregledaćemo pritisak problema NLP-a, metode umetnosti i važne aplikacije, kao i komplete podataka, medicinske resurse i praktične probleme. Tutorija će pružiti dostupni pregled biomedicina i ne pretpostavlja znanje u biologiji ili zdravstvenoj zaštiti. Krajnji cilj je smanjiti ulaznu barijeru istraživačima NLP-a da doprinesu ovom uzbudljivom domenu.', 'ro': 'Vom introduce medicina de precizie și vom prezenta oportunitățile vaste pentru PNL în acest domeniu înfloritor cu impact social deosebit. Vom analiza problemele presante ale PNL, metodele de ultimă generație și aplicațiile importante, precum și seturile de date, resursele medicale și aspectele practice. Tutorialul va oferi o imagine de ansamblu accesibilă a biomedicinei și nu presupune cunoștințe în biologie sau sănătate. Scopul final este de a reduce bariera de intrare pentru cercetătorii PNL pentru a contribui la acest domeniu interesant.', 'no': 'Vi vil introdusera nøyaktige medikamenter og vise dei store mulighetene for NLP i denne burgeringsfeltet med stor sosial effekt. Vi vil gjennom å trykke NLP-problemer, kunstmetodane og viktige program, og datasett, medisinske ressursar og praktiske problemer. Opplæringa vil gjera ei tilgjengeleg oversikt over biomedikamen, og forventar ikkje kunnskap i biologien eller helsefargen. Det ultime målet er å redusera oppføringsbehandlinga for NLP-forskere for å bidra til denne oppmerkingsbehandlinga.', 'sv': 'Vi kommer att introducera precisionsmedicin och visa upp de stora möjligheterna för NLP inom detta växande område med stor samhällspåverkan. Vi kommer att granska angelägna NLP-problem, state-of-the-art metoder och viktiga tillämpningar, samt datauppsättningar, medicinska resurser och praktiska frågor. Handledningen kommer att ge en tillgänglig överblick av biomedicin, och förutsätter inte kunskap inom biologi eller sjukvård. Det slutliga målet är att minska inträdesbarriären för NLP-forskare att bidra till denna spännande domän.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපාරය සහ පෙන්වන්නම් NLP වෙනුවෙන් විශාල අවස්ථාවක් මේ බෝර්ගින් ක්\u200dෂේත්රයේ ලොකු සමාජ අපි NLP ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, කුලිත් විධානයක්, වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, දත්ත සෙට්, වෛද්\u200dය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ පුද්ගලික විදියට ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dයය ගැන පුළුවන් බලන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් දෙන් අන්තිම අරමුණ තමයි NLP පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ඇතුළුම් අවධානය අඩංගුවන් කරන්න.', 'so': 'Dawooyinka saxda ah ayaannu soo bandhignaynaa waxaana tusinaynaa fursado badan oo NLP ku yaala beertan aaska oo ay saameyn weyn ku leedahay bulshada. Waxaannu ka baarinaynaa dhibaatooyinka NLP, xaaladaha farshaxanka, iyo codsiyada muhiimka ah, iyo sawirada macluumaadka, hantida caafimaadka iyo arimaha caafimaadka ah. Waxbarashadu wuxuu soo bandhigi doonaa baawooyinka dhakhaatiirta, umana xisaabin karo aqoonta biology ama daryeelka caafimaadka. Ujeedka ugu dambeeyaa waa in laga hoosaysiiyo qalabka laga soo galo baaritaanka NLP si ay uga faa’iido deegaankan oo xiisaysan.', 'ur': 'ہم دقیق داروغ کو معرفی کریں گے اور NLP کے لئے بڑے فرصت دکھائیں گے اس بروگرینگ کھیل میں بہت بڑے اجتماعی اثر کے ساتھ۔ ہم NLP مشکلات پر فشار کریں گے، ایرٹی طریقے، اور اہم کاربریاں، اور ڈاٹ سٹ، پزشکی سرمایہ، اور عمدہ مسائل، اور دولت کے مسائل کی تحقیق کریں گے. تحصیلات بیولوژی یا سلامتی کے معاملہ میں علم کا ذریعہ پیش کرے گا۔ آخر کا موقع یہ ہے کہ NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے وارد بازیوں کو کم کرنا ہے کہ اس جذاب دیمین میں مدد کریں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் துல்லியமான மருத்துவமனையை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் இந்த பருபர்பிரிங் புலத்தில் NLP வாய்ப்புகளை பெரிய சமூக ப நாம் NLP பிரச்சனைகள், கலை முறைமைகள், மற்றும் முக்கியமான பயன்பாடுகள், மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்புகள், மருத்துவ மூலங்கள், மற்றும் செயல்பா புத்தகம் உயிரியல் மருத்துவமனையின் அணுகக்கூடிய கண்காணிப்பு வழங்கும், மற்றும் உயிரியல் அல்லது மருத்துவமனையில் அறி இந்த சுவாரசாலியமான களம் செயல்படுத்துவதற்காக NLP ஆராய்ச்சிப்பவர்களுக்கு உள்ளீட்டு தடையை குறைக்கவேண்டும்.', 'mn': 'Бид нарийвчлалтай эмчилгээг тайлбарлаж, НЛП-ийн хамгийн их боломжуудыг нийгмийн нөлөөтэй холбоотой байгуулах болно. Бид NLP асуудал, урлагийн төвшин, чухал хэрэглээ, өгөгдлийн сангууд, эмнэлгийн нөөц болон практикийн асуудлуудыг шинэчлэх болно. Багш нар биологийн эмчилгээ болон эрүүл мэндийн мэдлэгийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Хамгийн сүүлийн зорилго нь NLP судлаачидын оролцооны саад барилгыг багасгах нь энэ сэтгэл хөдлөлд тусалдаг.', 'uz': "Biz tashkilotni tayyorlash va bu xavfsiz sohalarda NLP uchun katta imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatamiz va juda katta jamiyat effekti bilan ko'rsatamiz. @ info: status O'qituvchi biomediyasi qo'llaniladi va biologiya yoki tibbiy tibbiyot haqida o'ylamaydi. Endi maqsadi NLP taʼminlovchilari uchun yozuvchi qismini kamaytirish mumkin, bu qiziqarli domen ga qo'shish uchun.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ tiến hành y học chính xác và phô bày những cơ hội lớn cho đài NLP trong vùng phát triển này với tác động lớn đến xã hội. Chúng tôi sẽ xem xét các vấn đề nhạy bén của ngôn ngữ chọc ngoáy, các phương pháp nghệ thuật, các ứng dụng quan trọng, các bộ dữ liệu, nguồn tài nguyên y tế, và các vấn đề thực tế. Việc huấn luyện sẽ cung cấp một hình ảnh rộng rãi về sinh học, và không học hỏi về sinh học hay chăm sóc sức khỏe. Mục tiêu cuối cùng là giảm rào cản đột nhập cho các nhà nghiên cứu New York để góp phần vào lĩnh vực hào hứng này.', 'bg': 'Ще представим прецизната медицина и ще покажем огромните възможности за НЛП в тази развиваща се област с голямо обществено въздействие. Ще разгледаме неотложните проблеми с НЛП, най-съвременните методи и важни приложения, както и набори от данни, медицински ресурси и практически въпроси. Урокът ще предостави достъпен преглед на биомедицината и не предполага знания по биология или здравеопазване. Крайната цел е да се намали входната бариера за изследователите от НЛП да допринесат за тази вълнуваща област.', 'da': 'Vi vil introducere præcisionsmedicin og vise de enorme muligheder for NLP på dette blomstrende område med stor samfundsmæssig indflydelse. Vi vil gennemgå presserende NLP problemer, state-of-the-art metoder og vigtige applikationer, såvel som datasæt, medicinske ressourcer og praktiske spørgsmål. Tutorialen vil give et tilgængeligt overblik over biomedicin, og forudsætter ikke viden inden for biologi eller sundhedspleje. Det endelige mål er at reducere adgangsbarrieren for NLP-forskere til at bidrage til dette spændende domæne.', 'hr': 'Predstavit ćemo precizne lijekove i pokazati ogromne prilike za NLP u ovom polju hamburgera s velikim društvenim utjecajem. Pregledat ćemo pritisak problema s NLP-om, metode umjetnosti i važne primjene, kao i podaci, medicinske resurse i praktične probleme. Tutorija će pružiti dostupni pregled biolijeka i ne pretpostavlja znanje u biologiji ili zdravstvenoj pomoći. Krajnji cilj je smanjiti ulaznu barijeru istraživačima NLP-a da doprinesu ovom uzbudljivom domenu.', 'de': 'Wir stellen die Präzisionsmedizin vor und zeigen die enormen Möglichkeiten für NLP in diesem aufstrebenden Feld mit großer gesellschaftlicher Wirkung. Wir werden drängende NLP-Probleme, State-of-the-Art-Methoden und wichtige Anwendungen sowie Datensätze, medizinische Ressourcen und praktische Fragen überprüfen. Das Tutorial bietet einen zugänglichen Überblick über die Biomedizin und setzt keine Kenntnisse in Biologie oder Gesundheitswesen voraus. Das ultimative Ziel ist es, die Eintrittsbarriere für NLP-Forscher zu verringern, um zu diesem spannenden Bereich beizutragen.', 'ko': '정확한 의학을 소개하고 사회적 영향력이 큰 신흥 분야에서 NLP의 커다란 기회를 보여 드리겠습니다.우리는 긴박한 NLP 문제, 가장 선진적인 방법과 중요한 응용, 그리고 데이터 집합, 의료 자원과 실제 문제를 되돌아볼 것이다.이 강좌는 생물학이나 의료 보건에 대한 지식이 없는 방문 가능한 생물의학 개술을 제공할 것이다.최종 목표는 NLP 연구자들이 이 감동적인 분야에 진출하는 데 걸림돌을 줄이는 것이다.', 'id': 'Kami akan memperkenalkan obat presisi dan menunjukkan kesempatan besar untuk NLP di lapangan yang berkembang ini dengan dampak masyarakat besar. Kami akan meninjau masalah NLP yang mendesak, metode terbaik, dan aplikasi penting, serta dataset, sumber daya medis, dan masalah praktis. Tutorial akan menyediakan pandangan panjang akses biomedisin, dan tidak menganggap pengetahuan dalam biologi atau perawatan kesehatan. Tujuan utama adalah mengurangi penghalang masuk bagi peneliti NLP untuk berkontribusi ke daerah yang menarik ini.', 'fa': 'ما داروهای دقیق را معرفی می کنیم و فرصت های بزرگی برای NLP در این میدان دزدی با تاثیر اجتماعی بزرگ را نشان می دهیم. ما مشکلات NLP فشار، روش\u200cهای هنر و کاربرد مهم، همچنین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها، منابع پزشکی و مشکلات عملی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. تحصیلات به نظر رسیده ای از بیولوژی و دانش بیولوژی یا مراقبت سلامتی پیش نمی گیرد. هدف نهایی این است که بازداشت ورودی برای محققان NLP را کاهش دهیم تا به این دامنه هیجان انگیز کمک کنند.', 'nl': 'We introduceren precisiegeneeskunde en tonen de enorme kansen voor NLP in dit opkomende veld met grote maatschappelijke impact. We bespreken dringende NLP-problemen, state-of-the-art methoden en belangrijke toepassingen, evenals datasets, medische hulpmiddelen en praktische kwesties. De tutorial geeft een toegankelijk overzicht van biogeneeskunde, en veronderstelt geen kennis in biologie of gezondheidszorg. Het uiteindelijke doel is om de toegangsbarrière voor NLP-onderzoekers te verminderen om bij te dragen aan dit spannende domein.', 'sw': 'Tutakutambulisha madawa sahihi na kuonyesha fursa kubwa kwa NLP katika eneo hili la makaburi yenye madhara makubwa ya kijamii. Tutapitia matatizo ya NLP, hali ya sanaa, na matumizi muhimu, pamoja na seti za data, rasilimali za afya na masuala ya kihalisi. Utafiti huu utatoa mtazamo wa upatikanaji wa dawa za vibio, na haidhani maarifa katika biolojia au huduma za afya. Lengo la mwisho ni kupunguza kizuizi cha kuingia kwa watafiti wa NLP kuchangia katika eneo hili la kusisimua.', 'sq': 'Do të futim mjekësinë e saktë dhe do të tregojmë mundësitë e mëdha për NLP në këtë fushë në rritje me ndikim të madh shoqëror. Ne do të shqyrtojmë problemet shtypëse të NLP-së, metodat më të larta dhe aplikimet e rëndësishme si dhe të dhënat, burimet mjekësore dhe çështjet praktike. Tutoriali do të ofrojë një përmbledhje të mundshme të biomedicines dhe nuk supozon njohuri në biologji apo kujdesin shëndetësor. Qëllimi përfundimtar është të zvogëlojë pengesën e hyrjes për kërkuesit e NLP për të kontribuar në këtë fushë emocionuese.', 'af': "Ons sal voorsien presisie medicine en wys die groot moontlikhede vir NLP in hierdie burgeringsveld met groot samelewing. Ons sal die druk van NLP probleme, staat van die kunstenmetodes en belangrike toepassings, en datastelle, mediese hulpbronne en praktiese probleme hersien. Die onderwerp sal 'n toeganklik oorskou van biomediese verskaf en nie voorwerp kennis in biologie of gesondheid nie. Die ultimate doel is om die inskrywing barier vir NLP ondersoekers te verminder om by hierdie opkomstige domein te bydra.", 'hy': 'Մենք կներկայացնենք ճշգրիտ բժշկությունը և ցույց կտանք ՆԼՊ-ի հսկայական հնարավորությունները այս զարգացող ոլորտում, որոնք մեծ հասարակական ազդեցություն ունեն: Մենք կվերանայենք ՆԼՊ-ի ճնշող խնդիրները, ամենաբարձր մեթոդները և կարևոր ծրագրերը, ինչպես նաև տվյալների համակարգերը, բժշկական ռեսուրսները և գործնական խնդիրները: Այս դասարանը կտրամադրի կենսաբժշկության հասանելի ընդհանուր պատկեր, և չի ենթադրում կենսաբանության կամ առողջապահության գիտելիքներ: Հիմնական նպատակն է նվազեցնել ՆԼՊ-ի հետազոտողների ներգրավման խոչընդոտը, որպեսզի ներդրվեն այս հետաքրքիր ոլորտում:', 'az': 'Biz məqsədilə dəqiqlik ilacı təşkil edəcəyik və NLP üçün böyük fırsatları göstərəcəyik bu burgeon sahəsində böyük sosyal təsiri ilə. NLP problemlərini, sanat metodlarını və möhüm proqramlarını, verilən qurğuları, tıbbi kaynaqları və praktik məsələləri təsdiqləyəcəyik. Bu təhsil biomedicini görünür və biologiyada və sağlamlıqda bilgi ehtiyacı olmaz. NLP araştırmacılarının giriş barəsini azaltmaq məqsədilə bu heyrətli domena katılmaq.', 'tr': 'Biz takyk dermanlary tapdyryp, NLP üçin bu burgeon sahasında örän uly jemgyýet täsiri bilen uly mümkinçilikleri görkezip bileris. NLP meselelerini basyp, sungat döwletlerini we wajyp uygulamalaryny we veri setirleri, lukmanyň çeşmelerini we praktik meselelerini barlayarys. Okuwçy biyolojik derman barada elýeterli bir nusga berer we biologiýada ýa-da saglyk bilen bilgi tapmaýar. Iň soňky maksady NLP araştyrýanlary üçin bu heýgyly domana kömekleşmek üçin girişi barijesini azaltmak.', 'bn': 'আমরা এই বার্গারিং ক্ষেত্রে এনএলপির জন্য ব্যাপক সুযোগ প্রদর্শন করবো এবং সামাজিক প্রভাব দিয়ে। আমরা এনএলপি সমস্যা, শিল্পের অবস্থা এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন, ডাটাসেট, চিকিৎসা সম্পদ এবং প্রাকৃতিক বিষয়ের উপর চাপ পুনরায় পর এই শিক্ষার্থীটি বায়োমেডিকের উপর প্রবেশিত পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদান করবে এবং বায়োবিজ্ঞান অথবা স্বাস্থ্য সেবায়ুবিজ্ঞান নি সর্বশেষ লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে এনএলপি গবেষকদের প্রবেশের বাধা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য এই চমৎকার ডোমেইনে যোগাযোগ করতে।', 'am': 'በዚህ መቃብር መሬት ውስጥ ታላቅ ማኅበራዊ ጉዳይ የNLP ስልጣን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የNLP ችግር፣ የዓላማ ሥርዓት እና ያስፈላጊ ፕሮግራሞች እና ዳታተሮች፣ መድኃኒት ሀብት እና የአስቸጋሪነት ጉዳዮች እናስባለን፡፡ ትምህርት የባይሎጂ መድኃኒት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ The ultimate goal is to reduce the entry barrier for NLP researchers to contribute to this exciting domain.', 'et': 'Tutvustame täppismeditsiini ja tutvustame uue õppekava tohutuid võimalusi selles kasvavas valdkonnas, millel on suur ühiskondlik mõju. Vaatame läbi pakilised NLP probleemid, kaasaegsed meetodid ja olulised rakendused, samuti andmekogumid, meditsiinilised ressursid ja praktilised küsimused. Õpetus annab kättesaadava ülevaate biomeditsiinist ja ei eelda teadmisi bioloogia või tervishoiu alal. Lõppeesmärk on vähendada uue arenguprogrammi teadlaste sisenemistõkkeid, et aidata kaasa sellele põnevale valdkonnale.', 'cs': 'Představíme přesnou medicínu a ukážeme obrovské příležitosti NLP v této rostoucí oblasti s velkým společenským dopadem. Přezkoumáme naléhavé problémy NLP, nejmodernější metody a důležité aplikace, stejně jako datové sady, zdravotnické zdroje a praktické otázky. Tutorial poskytne přístupný přehled o biomedicíně a nepředpokládá znalosti v biologii nebo zdravotnictví. Konečným cílem je snížit vstupní bariéru pro výzkumníky NLP, aby přispěli k této vzrušující doméně.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme täsmälääketieteen ja esittelemme uusia mahdollisuuksia tällä kasvavalla alalla, jolla on suuri yhteiskunnallinen vaikutus. Tarkastelemme ajankohtaisia NLP-ongelmia, uusimpia menetelmiä ja tärkeitä sovelluksia sekä aineistoja, lääketieteellisiä resursseja ja käytännön kysymyksiä. Opetusohjelma tarjoaa helppokäyttöisen yleiskatsauksen biolääketieteestä, eikä oleta tietämystä biologiasta tai terveydenhuollosta. Lopullisena tavoitteena on vähentää NLP:n tutkijoiden pääsyä tälle jännittävälle alalle.', 'ca': "Introduirem medicina de precisió i mostrarem les grans oportunitats per a la NLP en aquest camp creixent amb gran impacte social. Examinarem problemes urgents de la NLP, mètodes més avançats i aplicacions importants, com també conjunts de dades, recursos mèdics i problemes pràctics. El tutorial proporcionarà una visió general accessible de la biomèdica, i no presumirà coneixement en biologia o sanitat. L'objectiu final és reduir la barrera d'entrada per als investigadors del NLP per contribuir a aquest domini emocionant.", 'bs': 'Predstavit ćemo preciznu medicinu i pokazati velike mogućnosti NLP-a u ovom građevinskom polju sa velikim društvenim utjecajem. Pregledat ćemo pritisak problema NLP-a, metode umjetnosti i važne aplikacije, kao i komplete podataka, medicinske resurse i praktične probleme. Tutorija će pružiti pristupan pregled biomedicina i ne pretpostavlja znanje u biologiji ili zdravstvenoj zaštiti. Krajnji cilj je smanjiti ulaznu barijeru istraživačima NLP-a da doprinesu ovom uzbudljivom domenu.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé bakal nambahi perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar-perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar NLP iki ning acara ono sing gak bener nggawe barang resmi. Awak dhéwé baka beraksi nggawe perbudhakan NLP, durum-perbudhakan karo seni lan aplikasi sing nggawe dataset, sing beraksi lan usul sing pratike. Tutoralé wong liya nggawe ngerasakno akeh bantuan kanggo ngerasakno biyogra, lan ora ngerasakno ngerasakno ning bialogi lan susah-susah. Awak dhéwé kanggo nambah kuwi tindang pangan kanggo nambah cerêter NLP kanggo nambah kanggo nyumbang ngene keujuhé domain iki.', 'sk': 'Predstavili bomo natančno medicino in predstavili velike priložnosti za NLP na tem rastočem področju z velikim družbenim vplivom. Pregledali bomo pereče probleme NLP, najsodobnejše metode in pomembne aplikacije ter nabore podatkov, zdravstvene vire in praktična vprašanja. Vadnica bo zagotovila dostopen pregled biomedicine in ne predvideva znanja iz biologije ali zdravstvenega varstva. Končni cilj je zmanjšati vstopno oviro za raziskovalce NLP, da prispevajo k tej vznemirljivi področji.', 'ha': "Za nuna dawada na daidai kuma mu nuna fursa masu yawa wa NLP cikin wannan field mai burbur da matsayin jamii mai girma. Za mu kure zawarar da za'a ƙarfafa masu nau'in NLP, halin-na-hanyoyin kunyar, da shiryoyin ayuka masu muhimu, da sami masu daidaita data, masu rasilita da masu aiki. Matallin zai iya samar da wani matsayi mai iya amfani da akan wata na'anar dawwama, kuma bai yi zato ba da wani ilmi a cikin littafi ko a cikin darfiɗan afya. Gani ta ƙara shine ta ƙara barrin ta shiga wa watani na NLP don su ƙara zuwa wannan da ke sha'awa.", 'he': 'אנחנו נציג תרופה מדויקת ונראה את ההזדמנויות העצומות של NLP בשדה התפרצוף הזה עם השפעה חברתית גדולה. אנחנו נבדוק בעיות NLP דחופות, שיטות מוקדמות, ויישומים חשובים, וגם קבוצות נתונים, משאבים רפואיים, ונושאים מעשיים. הלימודים יספקו תצוגה גבוהה של ביולוגיה או טיפול בריאות. המטרה האולטימטיבית היא להפחית את מחסום הכניסה למחקרים של NLP לתרום לתחום המרגש הזה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་NLP ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་གྲོང་ཁྱེར་གཙང་དག་ཆེ་བ་སྤྲོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་NLP་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་། སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་། ལས་སྤྱོད་ཆས་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་དང་། ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག སྒྲ་བརྙན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་བཏུབ་པའི་དྲན་བསྐུལ་གཅིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་སྲིད། དེ་ལས་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་སྐྱེས་སྐྱོང The ultimate goal is to reduce the entry barrier for NLP researchers to contribute to this exciting domain.'}
{'en': 'Multimodal Machine Learning : Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'ar': 'تعلم الآلة متعدد الوسائط: دمج اللغة والرؤية والكلام', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de máquina multimodal: integrando linguagem, visão e fala', 'zh': '多模态机器学:集成语言、视觉、语音', 'es': 'Aprendizaje automático multimodal: integración del lenguaje, la visión y el habla', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल मशीन लर्निंग: भाषा, दृष्टि और भाषण को एकीकृत करना', 'ja': 'マルチモーダル機械学習：言語、視覚、音声の統合', 'fr': 'Apprentissage automatique multimodal\xa0: intégrer le langage, la vision et la parole', 'ga': 'Meaisín Foghlaim Ilmhódúil: Teanga, Fís agus Urlabhra a Chomhtháthú', 'ru': 'Мультимодальное машинное обучение: интеграция языка, зрения и речи', 'ka': 'Multimodal Machine Learning: Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'el': 'Πολυmodal Machine Learning: Ενσωμάτωση της γλώσσας, της όρασης και της ομιλίας', 'hu': 'Multimodális gépi tanulás: nyelv, látás és beszéd integrálása', 'it': 'Machine Learning multimodale: integrazione di linguaggio, visione e parlato', 'kk': 'Көптеген машинаның оқытуы: тіл, көрініс және сөйлеу', 'mk': 'Мултимодилно машинско учење: Интеграција на јазикот, визијата и говорот', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšis mašinų mokymasis: kalbos, vizijos ir kalbos integravimas', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Mesin Multimodal: Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'ml': 'Multimodal യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: ഭാഷ, കാഴ്ചകളും സംസാരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Multimodali tal-Magni: L-Integrazzjoni tal-Lingwa, il-Viżjoni u l-Kellem', 'mn': 'Олон модель Машин суралцах: Хол, үзэл, яриаг нэгтгэх', 'no': 'Multimodal maskinelæring: integrering av språk, syning og tale', 'pl': 'Multimodalne uczenie maszynowe: integracja języka, wizji i mowy', 'ro': 'Învățarea automată multimodală: integrarea limbii, viziunii și vorbirii', 'sr': 'Multimodalno učenje mašine: integracija jezika, vizije i govora', 'si': 'Multi-mode machine learning: Integrating language, Vision and Talk', 'sv': 'Multimodalt maskininlärning: Att integrera språk, vision och tal', 'so': 'Waxbarashada machadka kala duduwan: La qabsashada luqada, aragshada iyo hadalka', 'ta': 'பல்முறை இயந்திரம் கற்றுக் கொண்டு: மொழி, பார்வை மற்றும் பேச்சை சேர்க்க', 'ur': 'Multimodal Machine Learning: Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'vi': 'Tương truyền máy móc học: Nhận biết ngôn ngữ, Tầm nhìn và Ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Koò£proq kompyuterni oò£rganish: Tilni birlashtirish, koò£rish va gapirish', 'bg': 'Мултимодално машинно обучение: интегриране на език, зрение и реч', 'da': 'Multimodal maskinlæring: Integration af sprog, vision og tale', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Mesin Multimodal: Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'nl': 'Multimodaal Machine Learning: Integratie van taal, visie en spraak', 'hr': 'Multimodalno učenje uređaja: integracija jezika, vizije i govora', 'ko': '다중모드기계학습: 언어, 시각과 음성 통합', 'de': 'Multimodales Machine Learning: Integration von Sprache, Vision und Sprache', 'fa': 'یادگیری ماشین چندmodal: ترکیب زبان، دید و سخنرانی', 'sq': 'Mësimi multimodal i makinave: Integrimi i gjuhës, vizionit dhe fjalimit', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Makine Öwrenmek: Dili, Gözlem we Sözi', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Mashine ya Mitandao: Kujumuisha lugha, Maoni na Hotuba', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Multimodale Masjien Leer: Integrasie Taal, Besigtig en Spraak', 'az': 'Çoxlu modal Makin Öyrənməsi: Dili, Görüş və Sözü', 'hy': 'Մոլիմոդալ մեքենայի սովորելը. ինտեգրելով լեզուն, տեսողությունը և խոսքը', 'bs': 'Multimodalno učenje uređaja: integracija jezika, vizije i govora', 'bn': 'মাল্টিমোডাল মেশিন শিক্ষা: ভাষা, দৃশ্য এবং ভাষণ একত্রিত করো', 'cs': 'Multimodální strojové učení: integrace jazyka, vidění a řeči', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen koneoppiminen: kielen, näön ja puheen integrointi', 'ca': 'Aprendiment multimodal de màquines: integrar llenguatge, visió i discurs', 'et': 'Multimodaalne masinõpe: keele, nägemise ja kõne integreerimine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'למידת מכונות רבות: שילוב שפה, חזון ודיבור', 'sk': 'Multimodalno strojno učenje: povezovanje jezika, vida in govora', 'bo': 'Multimodal Machine Learning: Integrating Language, Vision and Speech', 'jv': 'Multimodal Device Learning:'}
{'en': 'Multimodal machine learning is a vibrant multi-disciplinary research field which addresses some of the original goals of artificial intelligence by integrating and modeling multiple communicative modalities, including linguistic, acoustic and visual messages. With the initial research on audio-visual speech recognition and more recently with image and video captioning projects, this research field brings some unique challenges for multimodal researchers given the heterogeneity of the data and the contingency often found between modalities. This tutorial builds upon a recent course taught at Carnegie Mellon University during the Spring 2016 semester (CMU course 11-777) and two tutorials presented at CVPR 2016 and ICMI 2016. The present tutorial will review fundamental concepts of machine learning and deep neural networks before describing the five main challenges in multimodal machine learning : (1) multimodal representation learning, (2) translation & mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodal fusion and (5) co-learning. The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer. We will also discuss the current and upcoming challenges.', 'ar': 'التعلم الآلي متعدد الوسائط هو مجال بحثي نابض بالحياة متعدد التخصصات يعالج بعض الأهداف الأصلية للذكاء الاصطناعي من خلال دمج ونمذجة طرائق تواصل متعددة ، بما في ذلك الرسائل اللغوية والصوتية والمرئية. من خلال البحث الأولي حول التعرف على الكلام السمعي البصري ومؤخرًا مع مشاريع التسميات التوضيحية للصور والفيديو ، يجلب هذا المجال البحثي بعض التحديات الفريدة للباحثين متعددي الوسائط نظرًا لعدم تجانس البيانات والحالات الطارئة التي غالبًا ما توجد بين الطرائق. تم تدريس الدورة التدريبية في جامعة كارنيجي ميلون خلال فصل الربيع 2016 (دورة CMU 11-777) ودرسان تعليميان مقدمان في CVPR 2016 و ICMI 2016. سيستعرض البرنامج التعليمي الحالي المفاهيم الأساسية للتعلم الآلي والشبكات العصبية العميقة قبل وصف التحديات الرئيسية الخمسة في التعلم الآلي متعدد الوسائط: (1) تعلم التمثيل متعدد الوسائط ، (2) الترجمة ورسم الخرائط ، (3) محاذاة الطريقة ، (4) الاندماج متعدد الوسائط ، (5) التعلم المشترك. سيقدم البرنامج التعليمي أيضًا أحدث الخوارزميات التي تم اقتراحها مؤخرًا لحل التطبيقات متعددة الوسائط مثل التعليق على الصور وأوصاف الفيديو والإجابة المرئية للأسئلة. سنناقش أيضًا التحديات الحالية والقادمة.', 'pt': 'O aprendizado de máquina multimodal é um campo de pesquisa multidisciplinar vibrante que aborda alguns dos objetivos originais da inteligência artificial, integrando e modelando várias modalidades comunicativas, incluindo mensagens linguísticas, acústicas e visuais. Com a pesquisa inicial em reconhecimento de fala audiovisual e mais recentemente com projetos de legendagem de imagem e vídeo, este campo de pesquisa traz alguns desafios únicos para pesquisadores multimodais, dada a heterogeneidade dos dados e a contingência frequentemente encontrada entre as modalidades. curso ministrado na Carnegie Mellon University durante o semestre da primavera de 2016 (curso CMU 11-777) e dois tutoriais apresentados no CVPR 2016 e ICMI 2016. O presente tutorial revisará conceitos fundamentais de aprendizado de máquina e redes neurais profundas antes de descrever os cinco principais desafios em aprendizado de máquina multimodal: (1) aprendizado de representação multimodal, (2) tradução e mapeamento, (3) alinhamento de modalidade, (4) fusão multimodal e (5) co-aprendizagem. O tutorial também apresentará algoritmos de última geração que foram propostos recentemente para resolver aplicações multimodais, como legendagem de imagens, descrições de vídeos e perguntas-respostas visuais. Também discutiremos os desafios atuais e futuros.', 'ja': 'マルチモーダル機械学習は、言語的、音響的、視覚的メッセージを含む複数のコミュニケーションモードを統合およびモデリングすることによって、人工知能の本来の目標のいくつかに対処する、活気のある多分野の研究分野です。 視聴覚音声認識に関する初期の研究と、最近では画像およびビデオのキャプション作成プロジェクトにより、この研究分野は、データの異質性と、様式間にしばしば見られる偶発性を考慮して、マルチモーダル研究者にいくつかの独自の課題をもたらします。このチュートリアルは、カーネギーメロン大学で2016年春学期に教えられた最近のコース（ CMUコース11 -777 ）と、CVPR 2016およびICMI 2016で提示された2つのチュートリアルに基づいています。 このチュートリアルでは、マルチモーダル機械学習における5つの主な課題を説明する前に、機械学習とディープニューラルネットワークの基本的な概念をレビューします。つまり、（ 1 ）マルチモーダル表現学習、（ 2 ）翻訳とマッピング、（ 3 ）モダリティアラインメント、（ 4 ）マルチモーダル融合、（ 5 ）共同学習です。 チュートリアルでは、画像のキャプション付け、ビデオの説明、視覚的な質問に対する回答などのマルチモーダルアプリケーションを解決するために最近提案された最先端のアルゴリズムも紹介します。 今後の課題についてもお話しします。', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल मशीन लर्निंग एक जीवंत बहु-अनुशासनात्मक अनुसंधान क्षेत्र है जो भाषाई, ध्वनिक और दृश्य संदेशों सहित कई संचार तौर-तरीकों को एकीकृत और मॉडलिंग करके कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता के कुछ मूल लक्ष्यों को संबोधित करता है। ऑडियो-विजुअल भाषण मान्यता पर प्रारंभिक शोध के साथ और हाल ही में छवि और वीडियो कैप्शनिंग परियोजनाओं के साथ, यह शोध क्षेत्र डेटा की विषमता और अक्सर तौर-तरीकों के बीच पाए जाने वाले आकस्मिकता को देखते हुए बहुआयामी शोधकर्ताओं के लिए कुछ अद्वितीय चुनौतियां लाता है। यह ट्यूटोरियल स्प्रिंग 2016 सेमेस्टर (सीएमयू पाठ्यक्रम 11-777) के दौरान कार्नेगी मेलन विश्वविद्यालय में पढ़ाए गए एक हालिया पाठ्यक्रम और सीवीपीआर 2016 और आईसीएमआई 2016 में प्रस्तुत दो ट्यूटोरियल पर बनाता है। वर्तमान ट्यूटोरियल मल्टीमॉडल मशीन लर्निंग में पांच मुख्य चुनौतियों का वर्णन करने से पहले मशीन लर्निंग और गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की मौलिक अवधारणाओं की समीक्षा करेगा: (1) मल्टीमॉडल प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने, (2) अनुवाद और मानचित्रण, (3) रूपरेखा संरेखण, (4) मल्टीमॉडल संलयन और (5) सह-शिक्षा। ट्यूटोरियल भी अत्याधुनिक एल्गोरिदम प्रस्तुत करेगा जो हाल ही में छवि कैप्शनिंग, वीडियो विवरण और दृश्य प्रश्न-उत्तर जैसे बहुआयामी अनुप्रयोगों को हल करने के लिए प्रस्तावित किए गए थे। हम वर्तमान और आगामी चुनौतियों पर भी चर्चा करेंगे।', 'es': 'El aprendizaje automático multimodal es un campo de investigación multidisciplinario vibrante que aborda algunos de los objetivos originales de la inteligencia artificial mediante la integración y el modelado de múltiples modalidades comunicativas, incluidos los mensajes lingüísticos, acústicos y visuales. Con la investigación inicial sobre el reconocimiento de voz audiovisual y, más recientemente, con proyectos de subtítulos de imágenes y videos, este campo de investigación presenta algunos desafíos únicos para los investigadores multimodales dada la heterogeneidad de los datos y la contingencia que a menudo se encuentra entre las modalidades. curso reciente impartido en la Universidad Carnegie Mellon durante el semestre de primavera de 2016 (curso CMU 11-777) y dos tutoriales presentados en CVPR 2016 e ICMI 2016. El presente tutorial revisará los conceptos fundamentales del aprendizaje automático y las redes neuronales profundas antes de describir los cinco desafíos principales del aprendizaje automático multimodal: (1) aprendizaje de representación multimodal, (2) traducción y mapeo, (3) alineación de modalidades, (4) fusión multimodal y (5) aprendizaje conjunto. El tutorial también presentará algoritmos de última generación que se propusieron recientemente para resolver aplicaciones multimodales, como subtítulos de imágenes, descripciones de videos y preguntas y respuestas visuales. También discutiremos los desafíos actuales y futuros.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage automatique multimodal est un domaine de recherche multidisciplinaire dynamique qui aborde certains des objectifs initiaux de l'intelligence artificielle en intégrant et en modélisant de multiples modalités de communication, y compris des messages linguistiques, acoustiques et visuels. Avec les recherches initiales sur la reconnaissance vocale audiovisuelle et, plus récemment, avec des projets de sous-titrage d'images et de vidéos, ce domaine de recherche pose des défis uniques aux chercheurs multimodaux compte tenu de l'hétérogénéité des données et de la contingence souvent observée entre les modalités.Ce tutoriel s'appuie sur un cours récent enseigné à l'Université Carnegie Mellon au cours du semestre de printemps 2016 (cours CMU 11-777) et deux tutoriels présentés au CVPR 2016 et à l'ICMI 2016. Le présent tutoriel passera en revue les concepts fondamentaux de l'apprentissage automatique et des réseaux de neurones profonds avant de décrire les cinq principaux défis de l'apprentissage automatique multimodal\xa0: (1) l'apprentissage des représentations multimodales, (2) la traduction et la cartographie, (3) l'alignement des modalités, (4) la fusion multimodale et (5) le co-apprentissage. Le tutoriel présentera également des algorithmes de pointe récemment proposés pour résoudre des applications multimodales telles que le sous-titrage d'images, les descriptions vidéo et les questions-réponses visuelles. Nous discuterons également des défis actuels et à venir.", 'ru': 'Мультимодальное машинное обучение - это динамичная многодисциплинарная область исследований, которая решает некоторые из первоначальных целей искусственного интеллекта путем интеграции и моделирования нескольких коммуникативных методов, включая лингвистические, акустические и визуальные сообщения. С начальными исследованиями по распознаванию аудиовизуальной речи и совсем недавно с проектами субтитров изображений и видео, эта область исследований приносит некоторые уникальные проблемы для мультимодальных исследователей, учитывая неоднородность данных и непредвиденные обстоятельства, часто встречающиеся между модальностями. Этот учебник основан на недавнем курсе, преподаваемом в Университете Карнеги-Меллона в течение весеннего семестра 2016 года (курс CMU 11-777) и двух учебниках, представленных на CVPR 2016 и ICMI 2016. В настоящем руководстве будут рассмотрены фундаментальные концепции машинного обучения и глубоких нейронных сетей, прежде чем описывать пять основных проблем в мультимодальном машинном обучении: (1) мультимодальное репрезентативное обучение, (2) перевод и отображение, (3) выравнивание модальностей, (4) мультимодальное слияние и (5) совместное обучение. В учебнике также будут представлены самые современные алгоритмы, которые были недавно предложены для решения мультимодальных приложений, таких как подписи к изображениям, описания видео и визуальные вопросы-ответы. Мы также обсудим текущие и предстоящие задачи.', 'ga': 'Is réimse bríomhar taighde ildisciplíneach é meaisínfhoghlaim ilmhódach a thugann aghaidh ar chuid de bhunspriocanna na hintleachta saorga trí mhódúlachtaí cumarsáide iolracha a chomhtháthú agus a shamhaltú, lena n-áirítear teachtaireachtaí teanga, fuaimiúla agus físiúla. Leis an taighde tosaigh ar aithint cainte closamhairc agus le déanaí le tionscadail fortheidealú íomhánna agus físeáin, cruthaíonn an réimse taighde seo roinnt dúshlán uathúla do thaighdeoirí ilmhódacha i bhfianaise ilchineálacht na sonraí agus an teagmhais a aimsítear go minic idir módúlachtaí. cúrsa a mhúintear in Ollscoil Carnegie Mellon le linn sheimeastar an Earraigh 2016 (cúrsa CMU 11-777) agus dhá rang teagaisc i láthair ag CVPR 2016 agus ICMI 2016. Déanfaidh an teagasc seo athbhreithniú ar choincheapa bunúsacha na foghlama meaisín agus na líonraí néaracha domhain sula ndéanfar cur síos ar na cúig phríomhdhúshlán i meaisínfhoghlaim ilmhódach: (1) foghlaim ionadaíochta ilmhódach, (2) aistriúchán & mapáil, (3) ailíniú modhúlachta, (4) comhleá ilmhódach agus (5) comhfhoghlaim. Cuirfidh an rang teagaisc i láthair freisin na halgartaim úrscothacha a moladh le déanaí chun feidhmchláir ilmhódacha a réiteach ar nós fotheidealú íomhánna, cur síos ar fhíseáin agus freagra fís-cheisteanna. Déanfaimid plé freisin ar na dúshláin reatha agus na dúshláin atá le teacht.', 'zh': '多模态机器学者,充满活力之多也学科治其域也,以集建模多方(言语,声学息)以决人工智能之始也。 随声识初及近像视频字幕目,鉴数异质性模态之间,常见偶然,当究领地为多模态人致独战。 本教程卡内基梅隆大学2016春学期近教授程(CMU程11-777)及在CVPR 2016、IMI 2016二教程。 本教程将顾机器学深神经网络之基本概念,然后言多模态机器学者五要挑战:(1)多模态示学,(2)译映,(3)模态对齐,(4)多模态融(5)共学。 其教程又以近上最先进算法,以决多式应用,如图像字幕,视频述视问答。 又将论时与将至者挑战。', 'hu': 'A multimodális gépi tanulás egy élénk multidiszciplináris kutatási terület, amely a mesterséges intelligencia néhány eredeti célját tűzi ki többféle kommunikációs módszer integrálásával és modellezésével, beleértve a nyelvi, akusztikus és vizuális üzeneteket. Az audiovizuális beszédfelismeréssel kapcsolatos kezdeti kutatásokkal, valamint a kép- és videofeliratozási projektekkel kapcsolatban a kutatási terület néhány egyedi kihívást jelent a multimodális kutatók számára, tekintettel az adatok heterogenitására és a módszerek közötti gyakran tapasztalható válságra. Ez a bemutató a Carnegie Mellon Egyetemen a 2016 tavaszi félévben tanított legutóbbi kurzusra épül (CMU kurzus 11-777), valamint két oktatóanyagra épül, amelyeket a CVPR 2016 és ICMI 2016 keretében mutattak be. A jelen oktató áttekinti a gépi tanulás és a mélyneurális hálózatok alapvető fogalmát, mielőtt leírja a multimodális gépi tanulás öt fő kihívását: (1) multimodális reprezentációs tanulás, (2) fordítás és térképezés, (3) modális összehangolás, (4) multimodális fúzió és (5) társ-tanulás. A bemutató olyan korszerű algoritmusokat is bemutat, amelyeket a közelmúltban javasoltak multimodális alkalmazások megoldására, mint például a kép feliratozása, a videó leírása és a vizuális kérdés-válasz. A jelenlegi és a közelgő kihívásokat is megvitatjuk.', 'el': 'Η πολυμodale μηχανική μάθηση είναι ένα ζωντανό πολυπιστημονικό ερευνητικό πεδίο που αντιμετωπίζει ορισμένους από τους αρχικούς στόχους της τεχνητής νοημοσύνης ενσωματώνοντας και μοντελοποιώντας πολλαπλές επικοινωνιακές μεθόδους, συμπεριλαμβανομένων γλωσσικών, ακουστικών και οπτικών μηνυμάτων. Με την αρχική έρευνα για την ακουστική-οπτική αναγνώριση ομιλίας και πιο πρόσφατα με έργα λεζάντας εικόνας και βίντεο, αυτό το ερευνητικό πεδίο φέρνει μερικές μοναδικές προκλήσεις για τους πολυμορφικούς ερευνητές, δεδομένου της ετερογένειας των δεδομένων και της έκτασης που συχνά συναντάται μεταξύ των μορφών. Αυτό το μάθημα βασίζεται σε ένα πρόσφατο μάθημα που διδάσκεται στο Πανεπιστήμιο Κάρνεγκι Μέλον κατά τη διάρκεια του εαρινού έτους 2016 (μάθημα 11-777) και δύο μαθήματα που παρουσιάζονται στο CVPR 2016 και στο ICMI 2016. Το παρόν σεμινάριο θα εξετάσει τις θεμελιώδεις έννοιες της μηχανικής μάθησης και των βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων πριν περιγράψει τις πέντε κύριες προκλήσεις στην πολυμορφική μηχανική μάθηση: (1) εκμάθηση πολυμορφικής αναπαράστασης, (2) μετάφραση, χαρτογράφηση, (3) ευθυγράμμιση των τρόπων, (4) πολυμορφική σύντηξη και (5) συν-μάθηση. Το σεμινάριο θα παρουσιάσει επίσης υπερσύγχρονους αλγόριθμους που προτάθηκαν πρόσφατα για την επίλυση πολυμορφικών εφαρμογών όπως λεζάντες εικόνας, περιγραφές βίντεο και οπτική ερώτηση-απάντηση. Θα συζητήσουμε επίσης τις τρέχουσες και τις επερχόμενες προκλήσεις.', 'ka': 'Multimodal machine learning is a vibrant multi-disciplinary research field which addresses some of the original objectives of artificial intelligence by integrating and modeling multiple communicative modalities, including linguistic, acoustic and visual messages. პირველ ვიზუალური საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო პროექტი და ვიდეო საუკეთესო პროექტის შესახებ, ეს სასწავლო ეს სტუტურაცია იქნება საკუთარი კურსში, რომელიც მასწავლა კარინგი მელლონის университетში 2016 წლის სემსტერში (CMU კურსი 11-777) და ორი სტუტურაცია, რომელიც 2016 წლის CVPR 2016 და ICMI 2016. მიმდინარე განსწავლებელი მაქინის სწავლების და ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელის ფუნდამეტური კონცექტების გადაწყვეტის ხუთი მნიშვნელი განსწავლებელი მაქინის სწავლებისთვის: სტუტორიალური შემდეგ იქნება მრავალური პროგრამების გარეშე, რომლებიც ახლა უკვე მოუნდა გარეშე მრავალური პროგრამები, როგორც გამოსახულების შესახებ, ვიდეო გამოსახულები და ვიზ ჩვენ ასევე განვისაუბრებთ მიმდინარე და მოდივარებული გამოცდილებები.', 'it': "Il machine learning multimodale è un vibrante campo di ricerca multidisciplinare che affronta alcuni degli obiettivi originali dell'intelligenza artificiale integrando e modellando molteplici modalità comunicative, tra cui messaggi linguistici, acustici e visivi. Con la ricerca iniziale sul riconoscimento audio-visivo del parlato e più recentemente con progetti di didascalia di immagini e video, questo campo di ricerca pone alcune sfide uniche per i ricercatori multimodali data l'eterogeneità dei dati e la contingenza spesso riscontrabile tra le modalità. Questo tutorial si basa su un recente corso tenuto alla Carnegie Mellon University durante il semestre primaverile 2016 (corso CMU 11-777) e su due tutorial presentati a CVPR 2016 e ICMI 2016. Il presente tutorial esaminerà i concetti fondamentali dell'apprendimento automatico e delle reti neurali profonde prima di descrivere le cinque principali sfide dell'apprendimento automatico multimodale: (1) apprendimento di rappresentazione multimodale, (2) traduzione e mappatura, (3) allineamento modale, (4) fusione multimodale e (5) co-apprendimento. Il tutorial presenterà anche algoritmi all'avanguardia che sono stati recentemente proposti per risolvere applicazioni multimodali come didascalie di immagini, descrizioni video e domanda-risposta visiva. Discuteremo anche le sfide attuali e future.", 'kk': 'Көптеген машиналық үйрену - көптеген бірнеше дисциплиналық зерттеу өрісі. Бұл бірнеше коммуникациялық әдістерді біріктіру және моделдеу арқылы, лингвистикалық, акустикалық және визуалдық хаттарды біріктіру және өзгерту ма Аудио-визуалдық сөздерді анықтау және кескінді және видео айдарының жобаларының бастапқы зерттеулерімен бұл зерттеулер өрісі көптеген мәліметтердің гетерогендиялығын және көптеген әрекеттер арасында табылады. Бұл оқушылық 2016 жылдың күні жылы (CMU course 11-777) күні Карнеги Меллон университетінде оқыту үшін жуырдағы оқушылық күйіне құрылады. 2016 жылдың CVPR 2016 және ICMI 2016 жылдың екі оқушылығы. Қолданыстағы оқыту үшін машинаны оқыту және қалыпты невралдық желілердің негізгі мәселелерін көптеген бес негізгі мәселелерді анықтау алдында қарады: (1) көптеген мәселелерді оқыту, (2) аудару және картауы, (3) модельді түзету, (4) кө Бұл оқытушы сондай-ақ бірнеше модельді қолданбаларды шешу үшін, кескіндің айдарын, видео сипаттамасын және көрінетін сұрақ- жауабын шешу алгоритмдерін көрсетеді. Біз сондай-ақ қазіргі және келесі жағдайларды талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Daugiamodalis mašinų mokymasis yra gyvybinga daugiadisciplininė mokslinių tyrimų sritis, kuria siekiama kai kurių pradinių dirbtinio žvalgybos tikslų integruojant ir modeliuojant įvairias ryšių formas, įskaitant kalbines, akustines ir vizualines žinias. With the initial research on audio-visual speech recognition and more recently with image and video captioning projects, this research field brings some unique challenges for multimodal researchers given the heterogeneity of the data and the contingency often found between modalities. Šis kursas grindžiamas neseniai Carnegie Mellon universitete 2016 m. pavasario semestro kursu (CMU kursas 11–777) ir dviem kursais, pristatytais CVPR 2016 ir ICMI 2016 m. Šiame paminėje bus peržiūrėtos pagrindinės mašininio mokymosi ir giliųjų nervų tinklų koncepcijos, prieš aprašant penkis pagrindinius daugiarūšio mašininio mokymosi uždavinius: 1) daugiarūšio mokymosi, 2) vertimo ir žemėlapių nustatymo, 3) modalinio suderinimo, 4) daugiarūšio sintezės ir 5) bendro mokymosi. Šiame mokyme taip pat bus pateikti naujausi algoritmai, kurie neseniai buvo pasiūlyti išspręsti daugiarūšio pobūdžio programas, pvz., vaizdo pavadinimus, vaizdo aprašymus ir vizualius klausimų atsakymus. Mes taip pat aptars dabartinius ir būsimus iššūkius.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran mesin berbilang modal adalah medan kajian berbilang-disiplin yang berfungsi yang menjawab beberapa tujuan asal intelijen buatan dengan mengintegrasikan dan memmodelkan modaliti komunikatif berbilang, termasuk mesej bahasa, akustik dan visual. Dengan kajian awal mengenai pengenalan ucapan audio-visual dan baru-baru ini dengan projek captioning imej dan video, medan kajian ini membawa beberapa cabaran unik untuk peneliti multimodal mengingati heterogeniti data dan kontingensi yang sering ditemui antara modaliti. Tutorial ini dibangun pada kursus baru-baru ini yang diajarkan di Universiti Carnegie Mellon semasa semester musim semi 2016 (kursus CMU 11-777) dan dua tutorial yang dihantar di CVPR 2016 dan ICMI 2016. Tutorial ini akan meninjau konsep asas pembelajaran mesin dan rangkaian saraf dalam sebelum menjelaskan lima cabaran utama dalam pembelajaran mesin multimodal: (1) pembelajaran perwakilan multimodal, (2) terjemahan & pemetaan, (3) penyesuaian modaliti, (4) fusi multimodal dan (5) belajar sama. The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  Kami juga akan membincangkan cabaran semasa dan yang akan datang.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim multimodali tal-magni huwa qasam ta’ riċerka multidixxiplinarja vibranti li jindirizza wħud mill-għanijiet oriġinali tal-intelliġenza artifiċjali billi jintegra u jimmudella modalitajiet komunikattivi multipli, inklużi messaġġi lingwistiċi, akustiċi u viżivi. Permezz tar-riċerka inizjali dwar ir-rikonoxximent tad-diskors awdjoviżiv u aktar reċentement bi proġetti ta’ captioning tal-immaġni u l-vidjo, dan il-qasam tar-riċerka jġib miegħu xi sfidi uniċi għar-riċerkaturi multimodali minħabba l-eteroġeneità tad-dejta u l-kontinġenza li spiss tinstab bejn il-modalitajiet. Dan it-tutorjal jibni fuq kors riċenti mgħallem fl-Università Carnegie Mellon matul is-semestru tar-Rebbiegħa 2016 (kors CMU 11-777) u żewġ tutorjali ppreżentati fis-CVPR 2016 u l-ICMI 2016. It-tutorjal preżenti se jirrevedi kunċetti fundamentali ta’ tagħlim bil-magni u netwerks newrali profondi qabel ma jiddeskrivi l-ħames sfidi ewlenin fit-tagħlim bil-magni multimodali: (1) tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza multimodali, (2) traduzzjoni u mmappjar, (3) allinjament tal-modalità, (4) fużjoni multimodali u (5) kotagħlim. The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  Ser niddiskutu wkoll l-isfidi attwali u li ġejjin.', 'ml': 'പല മൊട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d യന്ത്രം പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു വിബ്രാന്റ് പല ഡിസിപ്പിനിയര്\u200d ഗണ്ഡ് ആണ്. അത് കൊണ്ട് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്രിമ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഗോളുകള്\u200d ക ഓഡിയോ കാഴ്ചയുടെ സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ആദ്യമായ പരിശോധന കൊണ്ടും, അടുത്തുതന്നെ ചിത്രം, വീഡിയോ ക്യാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പ്രോജക്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും കൂ സ്പ്രിങ്ങ് 2016 സെമെസ്റ്ററില്\u200d കാര്\u200dനെഗി മെല്ലോണ്\u200d യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു അടുത്ത കോര്\u200dസില്\u200d ഈ ട്യൂട്ടറില്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. സി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുമുമ്പ് മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും ആഴത്തിലെ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുലിലുകളുടെയും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുമുമ്പാണ്: (1) പലതിമോഡല്\u200d പ The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  ഇപ്പോഴത്തെയും വരുന്ന വെല്ലുകളെയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കും.', 'mk': 'Мултимодилното машинско учење е вибрантно мултидисциплинарно истражувачко поле кое се обраќа на некои од оригиналните цели на вештачката интелигенција со интеграција и моделирање на мултимодидативни комуникациски модели, вклучувајќи ги и јазичните, акустичките Со првичното истражување за аудиовизуелното препознавање на говорот и неодамна со проектите за снимка и видео наслов, ова истражувачко поле носи некои уникатни предизвици за мултимодилните истражувачи со оглед на хетерогенетоста на податоците и контингенцијата која честопати се Овој наставник се базира на неодамнешниот курс предаван на Универзитетот Карнеги Мелон за време на семестрот на пролетта 2016 година (курсот на ЦМУ 11-777) и два наставници представени на ЦВПР 2016 и ИЦМИ 2016. Сегашниот наставник ќе ги прегледа фундаменталните концепти на машинско учење и длабоките нервни мрежи пред да ги опише петте главни предизвици во мултимодилното машинско учење: (1) мултимодилно учење на репрезентација, (2) превод и мапирање, (3) модијално пристапување, (4) мултимодилн Научникот, исто така, ќе ги претстави најновите алгоритми кои неодамна беа предложени за решавање на мултимодилните апликации како што се насловот на сликите, видео описите и визуелниот одговор на прашањата. We will also discuss the current and upcoming challenges.', 'pl': 'Multimodalne uczenie maszynowe to tętniąca życiem wielodyscyplinarna dziedzina badawcza, która realizuje niektóre z pierwotnych celów sztucznej inteligencji poprzez integrację i modelowanie wielu modalności komunikacyjnych, w tym komunikatów językowych, akustycznych i wizualnych. Wraz z początkowymi badaniami nad rozpoznawaniem mowy audiowizualnej, a ostatnio z projektami w zakresie napisów obrazów i wideo, ta dziedzina badań przynosi kilka unikalnych wyzwań dla badaczy multimodalnych, biorąc pod uwagę różnorodność danych i często występującą między modalnościami. Ten poradnik opiera się na ostatnim kursie prowadzonym na Carnegie Mellon University podczas semestru wiosennego 2016 (kurs CMU 11-777) i dwóch samouczkach prezentowanych na CVPR 2016 i ICMI 2016. W niniejszym poradniku dokonano przeglądu podstawowych koncepcji uczenia maszynowego i głębokich sieci neuronowych przed opisem pięciu głównych wyzwań w multimodalnym uczeniu maszynowym: (1) uczenie się multimodalnej reprezentacji, (2) mapowanie translacji, (3) dostosowanie modalności, (4) fuzja multimodalna i (5) współuczenie się. Poradnik przedstawi również najnowocześniejsze algorytmy, które zostały niedawno zaproponowane do rozwiązywania aplikacji multimodalnych, takich jak napisy obrazów, opisy wideo i wizualne pytania-odpowiedzi. Omówimy również aktualne i nadchodzące wyzwania.', 'ro': 'Învățarea mașină multimodală este un domeniu vibrant de cercetare multidisciplinară care abordează unele dintre obiectivele originale ale inteligenței artificiale prin integrarea și modelarea mai multor modalități comunicative, inclusiv mesaje lingvistice, acustice și vizuale. Odată cu cercetarea inițială privind recunoașterea vorbirii audio-vizuale și, mai recent, cu proiectele de subtitrare a imaginilor și video, acest domeniu de cercetare aduce unele provocări unice pentru cercetătorii multimodali, având în vedere eterogeneitatea datelor și contingența adesea găsită între modalități. Acest tutorial se bazează pe un curs recent predat la Universitatea Carnegie Mellon în timpul semestrului de primăvară 2016 (cursul CMU 11-777) și două tutoriale prezentate la CVPR 2016 și ICMI 2016. Prezentul tutorial va revizui conceptele fundamentale ale învățării automate și rețelelor neuronale profunde înainte de a descrie cele cinci provocări principale în învățarea automată multimodală: (1) învățarea reprezentării multimodale, (2) traducere și cartografiere, (3) alinierea modalității, (4) fuziune multimodală și (5) co-învățare. Tutorialul va prezenta, de asemenea, algoritmi de ultimă generație care au fost propuși recent pentru a rezolva aplicații multimodale, cum ar fi subtitrarea imaginilor, descrierile video și răspunsul vizual la întrebări. Vom discuta, de asemenea, provocările actuale și viitoare.', 'mn': 'Олон-моделийн машин суралцах нь хэлний, акустик, үзэл санаануудын зарим эхний зорилгуудыг зохион байгуулж, олон харилцааны арга замыг бүрдүүлж, загварчлах боломжтой олон хэлбэрийн судалгааны талбар юм. Аудио-видео илтгэлийн анхны судалгаагаагаар, саяхан зураг, видео хэвлэлийн төслүүдтэй хамтран, энэ судалгааны талбар нь олон загварын судлаачид өгөгдлийн эсрэг байдал болон байдлын хооронд олон дасгал асуудал гаргадаг. Энэ багш нар 2016 оны айрын зууны үед Карнеги Меллон сургуулийн сургуульд сурсан хоёр багш нар (CMU курс 11-777) болон 2016 оны CVPR болон ICMI 2016 онд сурсан. Одоогийн багш нар машины суралцах болон гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үндсэн ойлголтыг олон моделийн суралцах таван гол сорилтуудыг тайлбарлахаас өмнө шийдэх болно: (1) олон моделийн суралцах суралцах, 2) хөгжүүлэх, газрын зуралцах, 3) загвар то Багш сургуульд саяхан олон моделийн хэрэглэгчийг шийдэх боломжтой болгон урлагийн алгоритмыг илэрхийлэх болно. Бид бас одоогийн болон ирээдүйн сорилтуудыг ярилцах болно.', 'no': 'Multimodal maskinelæring er ein vibrant multidisciplinar forskningsfelt som adresserar nokre av dei opprinnelige målene til kunstiske intelligens ved å integrere og modellere fleire kommunikasjonar, inkludert lingviske, akustiske og visuelle meldingar. Med den første forskningen om gjenkjenning av lyd- visuell tale og nyleg med bilete- og video- tittelprosjektet, vil dette forskningsfeltet få nokre unike utfordringar for multimodal forskningar gjeve at data og kontingenten ofte finne mellom modaliteten. Denne opplæringa bygger på ein nyleg kurs lært på Carnegie Mellon University i Spring 2016-semesteren (CMU kurs 11-777) og to opplæringar presentert på CVPR 2016 og ICMI 2016. Denne opplæringa vil gjennomgå grunnleggjande konseptar for maskinelæring og dype neuralnettverk før du skildrar fem hovudutfordringane i multimodal maskinelæring: (1) multimodal representasjonlæring, (2) omsetjing og karting, (3) modulitelsjustering, (4) multimodal fusion og (5) samalæring. Opplæringa vil også gjere algoritme for tilstanden av kunsten som nyleg vart foreslått for å løysa fleire program som biletet, video-skildringar og visuelle spørsmål-svar. Vi vil også diskutera gjeldande og framkommende utfordringar.', 'so': "Waxbarashada machadka badan waa beer waxbarasho oo kala duduwan, kaas oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha asalka ah ee aqoonta farsamada, si uu u qabsashada iyo u sameynayo qaabab kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah luqada luuqadda, iskuulka iyo farriinka aragga. Baaritaankii bilowga ee aqoonsashada hadalka muuqashada codka iyo ugu dambeysa waxyaabaha sawir iyo fiidiyowga la qabsaday, baarkan waxbarashadu wuxuu keenaa dhibaatooyin gaar ah oo loo doortay baaritaanka kala duduwan, kuwaas oo la siiyay suurtagalnimada macluumaadka iyo xaaladda inta badan u dhexaysa noocyada. Taas waxbarashadu waxay ku dhisan yihiin kooras la barto ee ugu dambeeyey ee Carnegie Mellon University during the Spring 2016 semester (CMU course 11-777) iyo laba tutori oo la soo bandhigay CVPR 2016 iyo ICMI 2016. The present tutorial will review fundamental concepts of machine learning and deep neural networks before describing the five main challenges in multimodal machine learning: (1) multimodal representation learning, (2) translation & mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodal fusion and (5) co-learning.  Waxbarashada waxaa sidoo kale soo bandhigi kara qoraalka farshaxanka ee ugu dhowaad loo soo jeeday inay xalliyaan codsiyada kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan sawirka, qoraalka fiidiyowga iyo jawaabta su'aalaha aragtida. Waxaynu sidoo kale ka sheekeysanaynaa dhibaatooyinka soo socda iyo soo socda.", 'sr': 'Multimodalno učenje mašine je vibrantno multidisciplinarno istraživanje područje koje rješava neke od originalnih ciljeva umjetne inteligencije integracijom i modelima višestrukih komunikacijskih modaliteta, uključujući jezičke, akustičke i vizualne poruke. S početnim istraživanjem o priznanju audio-vizualnog govora i nedavno sa projektima za snimanje slika i video, ova istraživačka polja donosi neke jedinstvene izazove za multimodalne istraživačke, s obzirom na heterogenetstvo podataka i neslaganje često pronađene između modaliteta. Ovaj nastavnik se izgradi na nedavnom kursu predavanju na Univerzitetu Karnegie Mellon tokom proljeća 2016. semestra (CMU kurs 11-777) i dva nastavnika predstavljena na CVPR 2016 i ICMI 2016. Sadašnji nastavnik će pregledati osnovne koncepte učenja mašina i dubokih neuralnih mreža prije opisa pet glavnih izazova u učenju multimodalnih mašina: (1) učenje multimodalnih predstavljanja, (2) prevod i mapiranje, (3) prilagodba modalnosti, (4) multimodalna fuzija i (5) zajedničkog učenja. Tutorijalac će takođe predstaviti algoritme za stanje umjetnosti koji su nedavno predloženi da reše multimodalne aplikacije kao što su kapcija slika, video opisa i vizuelni odgovor na pitanje. Razgovarat ćemo o trenutnim i predstojećim izazovima.', 'sv': 'Multimodalt maskininlärning är ett levande tvärvetenskapligt forskningsområde som adresserar några av de ursprungliga målen för artificiell intelligens genom att integrera och modellera flera kommunikativa modaliteter, inklusive språkliga, akustiska och visuella budskap. Med den inledande forskningen om audiovisuell taligenkänning och senare med bild- och videotextningsprojekt, medför detta forskningsområde några unika utmaningar för multimodala forskare med tanke på den heterogenitet av data och den oförutsedda situation som ofta finns mellan modaliteter. Denna handledning bygger på en nyligen undervisad kurs vid Carnegie Mellon University under vårterminen 2016 (CMU kurs 11-777) och två handledningar presenterade vid CVPR 2016 och ICMI 2016. Denna handledning kommer att granska grundläggande begrepp för maskininlärning och djupa neurala nätverk innan den beskriver de fem viktigaste utmaningarna inom multimodalt maskininlärning: (1) multimodalt representationslärande, (2) översättning och kartläggning, (3) modalitetsanpassning, (4) multimodal fusion och (5) samlärande. Tutorialen kommer också att presentera state-of-the-art algoritmer som nyligen föreslagits för att lösa multimodala applikationer såsom bildtextning, videobeskrivningar och visuellt frågesvar. Vi kommer också att diskutera aktuella och kommande utmaningar.', 'si': 'Multi-mode machine learnt is a vibrant Multi-Diplomatic Research field that address a number of the starting Goals of Art Intelligence by integrating and Modeling Multi-Communicative Modes, incl. language, acoustic and Visal message. අඩියෝජිය-විද්\u200dයාසික කතා අඳුරණය සහ පින්තූරය සහ විඩියෝග් කැප්සියෝ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමය සමඟ පටන් ගත්ත පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ, මේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරදේශ ප්\u200d මේ ප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාපාරය ප්\u200dරධාන කර්නගී මෙල්ලොන් විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා කාර්නගී විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් 2016 ස්ප්\u200dරින්ටර් විද්\u200dයාපාරය මුළු ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහත් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න කලින් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප පිළිබඳින් විස්තර, විඩියෝ විස්තර සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න- ප්\u200dරශ්න- උත්තරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න- උත්තරය විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරනවා  අපි ප්\u200dරතිදේශය සහ අන්තිම අභ්\u200dයානය කතා කරන්නම්.', 'ta': 'பல மாற்று இயந்திரத்தில் கற்றுக் கொள்வது ஒரு விக்ராண்ட் பல- disciplinary research புலத்தான். அது சில மூல கோள்களை குறிக்கும் சில முதல் குறிப்புகளை சேர்க்கிறது மற்றும் பல தொடர்ப ஒலி காட்சி பேச்சு அடையாளம் மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் பிம்பம் மற்றும் வீடியோ பெறுதல் திட்டங்களுடன் ஆரம்ப ஆராய்ச்சி கொண்டு, இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி புலத்தில் சில தனிப்பட்ட ச ஸ்பிரிங் 2016 செமெஸ்டர் (CMU மார்ச்சி 11-777) மற்றும் CVPR 2016 மற்றும் ICMI 2016-ல் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட இரண்டு ஆசிரியர்கள் கார்நெகி மெல்லான் கல்வியில் ஒரு சமீபத தற்போதைய பொறிப்பாளர் கணினி கற்றல் மற்றும் ஆழமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் அடிப்படையான கருத்துக்களை பரிசோதிக்கும் முன்னர் கணினி கற்றல் மற்றும் ஆழமான பிணையத்தின் ஆழமான பிரச்சினைகளை விவரிப்பதற்க பிம்பத்தை பெறுதல், வீடியோ விவரங்கள் மற்றும் பார்வை கேள்வி விடையை போன்ற பல்வேறு பயன்பாடுகளை தீர்வு செய்ய பரிந்துரை நாம் தற்போதைய மற்றும் வரும் சவால்களையும் பேச வேண்டும்.', 'ur': 'Multimodal machine learning is a vibrant multi disciplinary research field which addresses some of the original goals of artificial intelligence by integrating and modeling multiple communicative modalities, including linguistic, acoustic and visual messages. اوڈیو-ویزیئل کلام کی پہلی تحقیق کے ساتھ اور اچھے وقت میں تصویر اور ویڈیو کاپٹینگ پروژیکوں کے ساتھ، یہ تحقیق فیلڈ چند مختلف تحقیق کرنے والوں کے لئے بہت مختلف چالیں لاتا ہے جن کے ذریعہ ڈاٹیوں کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر This tutorial builds on a recent course taught at Carnegie Mellon University during the Spring 2016 semester (CMU course 11-777) and two tutorials presented at CVPR 2016 and ICMI 2016. موجود تدریس مہینے کی تعلیم اور عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کی بنیادی تدریس کرے گی قبل اس کے کہ مہینے مہینے کی تعلیم میں پانچ اصلی چالیں بیان کرے: (1) ملتی موڈال کی تعلیم کریں, (2) ترجمہ & مہینٹ کریں, (3) موڈلی تدریج کریں, (4) ملتی موڈال تفریج اور (5)  تدریسیل بھی ایسی حالت الگوریتم کو پیش کرے گا جن کو اچھے سے پہلے بہت سی موڈال کاریالوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا گیا تھا جیسے تصویر کاپٹینگ، ویڈیو سفارش اور visual سوال-جواب کے لئے۔ ہم بھی موجود اور آگے آنے والی چالوں سے بحث کریں گے۔', 'vi': 'Việc học cỗ máy đa chiều là một lĩnh vực nghiên cứu đa kỉ luật mạnh mẽ, nhằm mục đích ban đầu của trí tuệ nhân tạo bằng cách hòa nhập và phát triển nhiều phương thức giao tiếp, kể cả thông điệp ngôn ngữ, âm học và thị giác. Với nghiên cứu ban đầu về nhận dạng giọng nói, và gần đây với các dự án đánh giá ảnh và video, khu vực nghiên cứu này mang đến một số thách thức hiếm hoi cho các nghiên cứu đa phương, vì độ khác nhau của dữ liệu và tình trạng bất ngờ thường được tìm thấy giữa các phương thức. Tập huấn này dựa trên một khóa học gần đây được dạy tại trang sức Carnegie Mellon University trong kỳ xuân diễn thẩm 66 (khóa học CMU 11-777) và hai lớp kèm được trình bày tại CFPR K6 và ICMI 206. Bài tập này sẽ xem xét các khái niệm cơ bản về việc học máy móc và mạng thần kinh sâu trước khi mô tả năm thử thách chính trong việc học về máy đa chiều: 1) học về đại biểu đồ đa phương, 2) dịch biểu đồ đồ, 3) sắp xếp phân cách, 4) tổng hợp hợp và 5) học chung. Chương trình huấn luyện cũng sẽ có thuật to án hiện đại mới được đề xuất để giải quyết các ứng dụng đa phương như phần ảnh, mô tả video và câu trả lời câu hỏi hình ảnh. Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận về những thử thách hiện tại và sắp tới.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik mashina o'rganish bir necha taʼminlov sohalari, bu bir xil tilni, acoustic va ko'plab xabarlarni bir necha xil tarjimalarni birlashtirish va modellashtirish mumkin. Audio-visual gapirishni tasdiqlash va yaqinda ko'proq rasm va video tashkilotlarini tasdiqlash loyihasi bilan birinchi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchilar uchun bir necha qiziqarli muammolarni olib tashlaydi. Agar maʼlumot tarjimalarning yetarligini va taxminan holatda ko'pincha o'xshash usullar орасида topilgan. Name Name Taʼlim esa eng yaqinda quyidagi rasm sarlavhasini, video taʼriflarini va ko'proq savol javobi kabi ko'plamlar dasturlarini aniqlashni istaydi. Hozir biz joriy va kelayotgan muammolarni boshqaramiz.", 'bg': 'Мултимодалното машинно обучение е жизнена мултидисциплинарна изследователска област, която адресира някои от първоначалните цели на изкуствения интелект чрез интегриране и моделиране на множество комуникативни модали, включително лингвистични, акустични и визуални послания. С първоначалните изследвания на аудио-визуалното разпознаване на речта и по-скоро с проекти за надпис на изображения и видео, тази изследователска област носи някои уникални предизвикателства за мултимодалните изследователи предвид хетерогенността на данните и непредвидените обстоятелства, често срещани между модалите. Този урок се основава на скорошен курс, преподаван в Университета Карнеги Мелон през пролетта на 2016 семестър (курс 11-777) и две уроци, представени на CVPR 2016 и ICMI 2016. Настоящият урок ще разгледа фундаменталните концепции за машинното обучение и дълбоките невронни мрежи, преди да опише петте основни предизвикателства в мултимодалното машинно обучение: (1) мултимодално обучение за представяне, (2) превод и картографиране, (3) подравняване на модалността, (4) мултимодално сливане и (5) съвместно обучение. В урока ще бъдат представени и най-съвременни алгоритми, които наскоро бяха предложени за решаване на мултимодални приложения като надпис на изображения, видео описания и визуален въпрос-отговор. Ще обсъдим и настоящите и предстоящите предизвикателства.', 'da': 'Multimodal maskinlæring er et levende tværfagligt forskningsfelt, der adresserer nogle af de oprindelige mål for kunstig intelligens ved at integrere og modellere flere kommunikative modaliteter, herunder sproglige, akustiske og visuelle budskaber. Med den første forskning om audiovisuel talegenkendelse og senere med billede- og videobilledtekstprojekter bringer dette forskningsfelt nogle unikke udfordringer for multimodale forskere i betragtning af den heterogenitet af dataene og den situation, der ofte findes mellem modaliteterne. Denne tutorial bygger på et nyligt kursus undervist på Carnegie Mellon University i løbet af foråret 2016 semester (CMU kursus 11-777) og to tutorials præsenteret på CVPR 2016 og ICMI 2016. Denne vejledning vil gennemgå grundlæggende begreber for maskinlæring og dybe neurale netværk, før den beskriver de fem vigtigste udfordringer i multimodal maskinlæring: (1) multimodal repræsentationslæring, (2) oversættelse og kortlægning, (3) modalitet justering, (4) multimodal fusion og (5) co-learning. Vejledningen vil også præsentere state-of-the-art algoritmer, der for nylig blev foreslået til at løse multimodale applikationer såsom billedtekster, videobeskrivelser og visuel spørgsmål-svar. Vi vil også diskutere de nuværende og kommende udfordringer.', 'de': 'Multimodales maschinelles Lernen ist ein lebendiges multidisziplinäres Forschungsfeld, das einige der ursprünglichen Ziele künstlicher Intelligenz adressiert, indem es mehrere kommunikative Modalitäten integriert und modelliert, einschließlich sprachlicher, akustischer und visueller Botschaften. Mit der anfänglichen Forschung zur audiovisuellen Spracherkennung und neuerdings mit Bild- und Video-Untertitelprojekten bringt dieses Forschungsfeld angesichts der Heterogenität der Daten und der oft auftretenden Kontingenz zwischen Modalitäten einzigartige Herausforderungen für multimodale Forscher mit sich. Dieses Tutorial baut auf einem kürzlich an der Carnegie Mellon University während des Frühjahrssemesters unterrichteten Kurs (CMU Kurs 11-777) und zwei Tutorials auf CVPR 2016 und ICMI 2016 auf. Das vorliegende Tutorial wird grundlegende Konzepte des maschinellen Lernens und der tiefen neuronalen Netze beleuchten, bevor die fünf wichtigsten Herausforderungen des multimodalen maschinellen Lernens beschrieben werden: (1) multimodales Repräsentationslernen, (2) Translation, Mapping, (3) Modalitätsausrichtung, (4) multimodale Fusion und (5) Co-Learning. Das Tutorial stellt auch modernste Algorithmen vor, die kürzlich vorgeschlagen wurden, um multimodale Anwendungen wie Bildunterschriften, Videobeschreibungen und visuelle Fragen-Antworten zu lösen. Wir werden auch die aktuellen und kommenden Herausforderungen diskutieren.', 'hr': 'Multimodalno učenje strojeva je vibrantno multidisciplinarno istraživanje područje koje rješava neke od originalnih ciljeva umjetne inteligencije integracijom i modeliranjem višestrukih komunikacijskih modaliteta, uključujući jezičke, akustičke i vizualne poruke. S početnim istraživanjem o priznanju zvukovizualnog govora i nedavno s projektima slike i video snimanja, ova istraživačka polja donosi neke jedinstvene izazove za multimodalne istraživačke s obzirom na heterogenetstvo podataka i slučajnosti često pronađene između modaliteta. Ovaj nastavnik se izgradi na nedavnom kursu predavanom na Univerzitetu Carnegie Mellon tijekom proljeća 2016. semestra (CMU kurs 11-777) i dvije nastavnice predstavljene na CVPR 2016 i ICMI 2016. Sadašnji nastavnik će pregledati temeljne koncepte učenja strojeva i dubokih neuralnih mreža prije opisa pet glavnih izazova u učenju multimodalnih strojeva: (1) učenje multimodalnih predstavljanja, (2) prevod i mapiranje, (3) prilagodba modalnosti, (4) multimodalna fuzija i (5) zajedničkog učenja. Tutorija će također predstaviti algoritme za stanje umjetnosti koji su nedavno predloženi za rješavanje multimodalnih aplikacija poput kapitala slika, video opisa i vizuelnog odgovora na pitanje. Razgovarat ćemo i o trenutnim i predstojećim izazovima.', 'nl': 'Multimodal machine learning is een levendig multidisciplinair onderzoeksveld dat enkele van de oorspronkelijke doelen van kunstmatige intelligentie aanpakt door meerdere communicatieve modaliteiten te integreren en te modelleren, waaronder taalkundige, akoestische en visuele boodschappen. Met het eerste onderzoek naar audiovisuele spraakherkenning en recenter met beeld- en video-ondertitelingsprojecten, brengt dit onderzoeksveld enkele unieke uitdagingen voor multimodale onderzoekers met zich mee, gezien de heterogeniteit van de gegevens en de contingentie die vaak tussen modaliteiten wordt aangetroffen. Deze tutorial bouwt voort op een recente cursus gegeven aan Carnegie Mellon University tijdens het Lente 2016 semester (CMU cursus 11-777) en twee tutorials gepresenteerd op CVPR 2016 en ICMI 2016. Deze tutorial zal fundamentele concepten van machine learning en diepe neurale netwerken bespreken alvorens de vijf belangrijkste uitdagingen in multimodale machine learning te beschrijven: (1) multimodale representatie learning, (2) translation, mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodale fusie en (5) co-learning. De tutorial zal ook state-of-the-art algoritmes presenteren die onlangs werden voorgesteld om multimodale toepassingen op te lossen, zoals beeldbijschriften, videobeschrijvingen en visueel vraag-antwoord. Ook bespreken we de huidige en komende uitdagingen.', 'ko': '다중모드기계학습은 활력이 넘치는 다학과 연구 분야로 다양한 교류 방식, 언어, 소리와 시각 정보를 통합하고 모델링함으로써 인공지능의 원시적인 목표를 실현한다.시청각 음성인식에 대한 초보적인 연구와 최근의 이미지와 영상 자막 프로젝트에 따라 데이터의 이질성과 모델 간의 우연성을 감안하여 이 연구 분야는 다중모드 연구원들에게 독특한 도전을 가져왔다.이 강좌는 카네기 멜론 대학의 2016년 봄학기 최신 과정(CMU 과정 11-777)과 2016년 CVPR과 2016년 ICMI의 두 강좌를 바탕으로 한다.본 강좌는 기계 학습과 심도 있는 신경 네트워크의 기본 개념을 되돌아본 다음에 다중모드 기계 학습에서의 다섯 가지 주요 도전을 묘사할 것이다. (1) 다중모드 표시 학습, (2) 번역과 시사, (3) 모드 정렬, (4) 다중모드 융합과 (5) 협동 학습이다.이 강좌는 최근에 제기된 다중모드 응용(예를 들어 이미지 자막, 영상 묘사와 시각 문답)을 해결하는 데 사용되는 최신 알고리즘도 소개한다.우리는 또 현재와 미래의 도전에 대해 토론할 것이다.', 'id': 'Pembelajaran mesin multimodal adalah bidang penelitian multidisiplin yang bergerak yang mengatasi beberapa tujuan asli intelijen buatan dengan mengintegrasi dan memmodelkan multimodalitas komunikatif, termasuk pesan bahasa, akustik dan visual. Dengan penelitian awal mengenai pengakuan pidato audio-visual dan baru-baru ini dengan proyek captioning gambar dan video, bidang penelitian ini membawa beberapa tantangan unik untuk peneliti multimodal mengingat heterogenitas data dan kontingensi yang sering ditemukan antara modalitas. Tutorial ini dibangun pada kursus baru-baru ini yang diajarkan di Universitas Carnegie Mellon selama semester musim semi 2016 (kursus CMU 11-777) dan dua tutorial yang diperkenalkan di CVPR 2016 dan ICMI 2016. Tutorial ini akan meninjau konsep dasar pembelajaran mesin dan jaringan saraf dalam sebelum menjelaskan lima tantangan utama dalam pembelajaran mesin multimodal: (1) pembelajaran representation multimodal, (2) terjemahan & peta, (3) penyesuaian modalitas, (4) fusi multimodal dan (5) belajar bersama. The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  Kita juga akan mendiskusikan tantangan saat ini dan masa depan.', 'fa': 'یادگیری ماشین چندین مدل یک منطقه تحقیقات چندین دسته\u200cای است که بعضی از هدف\u200cهای اصلی هوش\u200cهای مصنوعی را با توجه و مدل\u200cسازی مدل\u200cهای متفاوتی، شامل پیغام\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی، آکوستیک و دیدگانی درباره\u200cی برخی از هدف\u200cهای اصلی از هوش\u200c با تحقیقات اولیه در مورد شناسایی سخنرانی صوتی و بیشتر اخیرا با پروژه\u200cهای تصویر و ویدئو عنوان ویدئو، این منطقه تحقیقات چند چالش متفاوتی برای تحقیقات\u200cکننده\u200cهای چندین مدل به عنوان تفاوتی داده\u200cها و اتفاقی که اغلب بین modalities یافته این تحصیلات بر روی یک مسیر اخیر که در دانشگاه کارنیگی ملون آموزش داده شده در طول طبقه سال ۱۹۶۶ (مسیر CMU ۱۱-777) و دو مسیر آموزش در CVPR ۲۰۱۶ و ICMI ۲۰۱۶ آموزش داده شده است. تحصیلات فعلی پیش از توصیلات پنج چالش اصلی در یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای متوسطی: (۱) یادگیری نمایش\u200cهای متوسطی, (۲) ترجمه & نقشه\u200cسازی, (۳) تنظیمات modality, (۴) تنظیمات متوسطی و (۵) همکاری می\u200cکند. آموزشگاه همچنین الگوریتم\u200cهای حالت هنری را که اخیرا پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند برای حل کاربردهای چندین مدل مانند عنوان عنوان تصویر، توضیح ویدئو و پاسخ پرسش\u200cهای دیدئو را نشان می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین در مورد چالش های فعلی و آینده صحبت خواهیم کرد.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa mashine mbalimbali ni uwanja wa utafiti wa kidiplomasia ambalo hujadili baadhi ya malengo ya awali ya ufahamu wa kimapenzi kwa kuunganisha na kutengeneza njia mbalimbali za mawasiliano, ikiwa ni pamoja na lugha, na ujumbe wa kuona. With the initial research on audio-visual speech recognition and more recently with image and video captioning projects, this research field brings some unique challenges for multimodal researchers given the heterogeneity of the data and the contingency often found between modalities. Kisomo hiki kinajenga katika kipindi cha hivi karibuni kilichofundishwa katika Chuo Kikuu cha Carnegie Mellon wakati wa kipindi cha Mapinduzi 2016 (CMU course 11-777) na wataalamu wawili waliowekwa kwenye CVPR 2016 na ICMI 2016. Utomi wa sasa utapitia dhana za msingi za kujifunza mashine na mitandao ya ubongo ya ndani kabla ya kuelezea changamoto tano kubwa katika kujifunza mashine ya viumbe: (1) kujifunza kwa uwakilishi wa watu wengi, (2) tafsiri na ramani, (3) usangazaji wa hali ya usawa, (4) fujo za watu wengi na (5) kujifunza pamoja. Kisomo hicho pia kitaleta vipengele vya sanaa ambavyo hivi karibuni vilipendekezwa kutatua matumizi mengi kama vile kuchapisha picha, maelezo ya video na jibu la maswali ya kuona. Pia tutajadili changamoto za sasa na zinazokuja.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe modal maşynyň öwrenmegi örän köp-disiplinäpli araştyrma alandyr. Bu ýerde birnäçe komunikaçy modalary birleşdirmek we görnüşdürmek bilen, lingwistiki, akustik we görsel mesajlary bilen meýilleşdirýär. Ses-görsel çykyş tanamagy barada başlangyç barlama bilen, soňra surat we wideo kelläp taslamalar bilen, bu barlama sahypasy multimodal araştyrçylar üçin birnäçe döwürler we modalaryň arasynda tapan örän döwürler getirir. Bu tutorial Karnegie Mellon Uniwersiteti 2016-nji ýylyň gyz semesteri (CMU kursa 11-777) we iki tutorial başladyr. 2016-nji ýylyň CVPR we ICMI 2016-nji ýylda görkezildi. Meýdança tutumçy maşynyň öwrenmesi we derin näral şebekeleriniň beş esasy kynçylygyny multimodal maşynyň öwrenmesinde tasvir etmeden öň esasy düşünjelerini (1) multimodal terjime öwrenmesi, (2) terjime & mapping, (3) modalitet çyzygyny, (4) multimodal birleşmegi we (5) kööwrenmesi. Ýakynda Ullanyş sistemasy çözmek üçin häzirki möhüm sanat algoritmalaryny görkezilsin. Biz hem häzirki we önümüzdeki kynçylyklary hem gürrüň ederis.', 'af': "Multimodale masjien leer is 'n vibrant multi-disciplinary ondersoek veld wat sommige van die oorspronklike doels van kunstenaar inteligensie adreseer deur veelvuldige kommunikasiefasiliteite integreer en modelleer, insluitend lingvisse, akustiese en visuele boodskappe. Met die aanvanklike ondersoek oor oudio-visuele sprekking herken en meer onlangs met beeld en video-titelsprojekte, hierdie ondersoek veld bring sommige unieke uitdrukkings vir multimodale ondersoekers wat die heterogeneeit van die data en die afgeleentheid dikwels tussen modaliteite gevind het. Hierdie onderwyseling bou op 'n onlangse kurs geleer by Carnegie Mellon Universiteit gedurende die Spring 2016 semester (CMU kurs 11-777) en twee onderwyseling voorsien by CVPR 2016 en ICMI 2016. Die huidige onderwyseling sal fondamentele konsepte van masjien leer en diep neuralnetwerke hersien voordat die vyf hoofde uitdagings in multimodaal masjien leer beskrywe: (1) multimodaal voorwyseling leer, (2) vertaling en kaart, (3) modaliteite belyning, (4) multimodaal verlossing en (5) co-leer. Die onderwyseling sal ook die state-of-the-art algoritme voorsien wat onlangs voorgestel is om multimodale toepassings soos beeldtitteling, video beskrywings en visuele vraag-antwoord te los. Ons sal ook die huidige en opkommende uitdagings bespreek.", 'am': 'ብዙ ሞክራዊ መምህርት ቋንቋ፣ አካባቢ እና የዓይነቶች መልዕክቶች በተጨማሪና በተጨማሪና በተጨማሪው የፊደል የኢንተርኔት አካላቢ አካላትን በመቀበል እና በቋንቋዊ እና የራእይ መልዕክቶችን በመቀበል እና በማስተካከል የሚያስፈልገው የብልሃተኛ መረጃ መሬት ነው፡፡ የድምጽ-ራእይ ንግግር ማውቀት በመጀመሪያው ምርመራ እና በቅርብ ዘመን በምስል እና የቪዲዮ አካባቢ ፕሮጀክቶች ላይ በተመሳሳይ፣ ይህ ትምህርት መሬት የዳራዎችን ብሔራዊነት እና ግንኙነት በሥርዓቶች መካከል ብዙ ጊዜ የተገኘውን የልዩ ጥያቄዎችን ያመጣል፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት በካርnegie ሜሎን ዩንቨርስቲ በ ቅድሚያ 2016ቱ ሰሜስቴር (CMU ኮርቨርስቲ 11-777) እና በCVPR 2016 እና ICMI 2016 ውስጥ በተመለከተው ሁለት ተማሪዎችን ይሠራል፡፡ የአሁኑ ትምህርት የኮምፒዩተር ትምህርት እና የጥልቅ የናውሬዎችን መረብ በማስተማር አምስቱ የዋና ጥልቅ ጥቃት ትምህርት ከመግለጽ በፊት ያስተካክላል:(1) ብዙኃን ትምህርት ትምህርት (2) ትርጉም እና ካርተርጉም (3) ድርጅት መስኮት (4) multimodal fusion (5) በአንድ ትምህርት ትምህርት ነው፡ The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  የአሁኑን እና የመጣውን ድጋፍ እናነጋግራለን፡፡', 'bn': 'মাল্টিমোডাল মেশিন শিক্ষা হচ্ছে বহুশিক্ষিপ্ত গবেষণা ক্ষেত্র যেখানে কিছু মূল লক্ষ্যের কথা বলা হচ্ছে যার মধ্যে ভাষাগত, একাস্টিক এবং দৃশ্য বার্তা সহ বেশ কিছু  অডিও-ভিজুয়াল ভাষণের প্রথম গবেষণা নিয়ে এবং সম্প্রতি ছবি এবং ভিডিও ক্যাপ্টেশনিং প্রকল্পের সাথে এই গবেষণা ক্ষেত্রে বেশ কিছু অনন্য চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে এসেছে যা তথ্য বসন্ত ২০১৬ সালের সেমেস্টারের সময় কার্নেগি মেলোন বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ে শিক্ষা প্রদান করা একটি সাম্প্রতিক কোর্সে এই শিক্ষাবিদ্যালয় নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে এব মাল্টিমোডাল মেশিন শিক্ষার পাঁচটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ ব্যাখ্যা করার আগে মেশিন শিক্ষা এবং গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের মৌলিক ধারণা পর্যবেক্ষণ করবে: (1) বহুটিমোডাল প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা শিক্ষ এই শিক্ষার্থীরা সাম্প্রতিক প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছিল যেমন ছবি ক্যাপ্টেশন, ভিডিও বর্ণনা এবং দৃশ্য প্রশ্নের উত্তর। আমরা বর্তমান এবং আসন্ন চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে আলোচনা করব।', 'sq': 'Multimodal machine learning is a vibrant multi-disciplinary research field which addresses some of the original goals of artificial intelligence by integrating and modeling multiple communicative modalities, including linguistic, acoustic and visual messages.  Me kërkimin fillestar mbi njohjen audio-vizuale të fjalës dhe më së fundmi me projektet e regjistrimit të imazheve dhe videove, ky fushë kërkimi sjell disa sfida unike për kërkuesit multimodal duke ditur heterogenitetin e të dhënave dhe kontingjencën shpesh gjetur midis modaliteteve. Ky tutorial mbështetet në një kurs të fundit të mësuar në Universitetin Carnegie Mellon gjatë semestrit të pranverës 2016 (kursi CMU 11-777) dhe dy tutoriale të paraqitura në CVPR 2016 dhe ICMI 2016. Tutoriali i tanishëm do të shqyrtojë konceptet themelore të mësimit të makinave dhe rrjeteve të thella nervore përpara se të përshkruajë pesë sfidat kryesore në mësimin multimodal të makinave: (1) përfaqësimin multimodal të mësimit, (2) përkthimin dhe hartimin, (3) përshtatjen e modalitetit, (4) fuzionin multimodal dhe (5) bashkëmësimin. Tutoriali do të paraqesë gjithashtu algoritmet më të mëdha që u propozuan kohët e fundit për të zgjidhur aplikimet multimodale të tilla si titullimi i imazheve, përshkrimi i videove dhe përgjigja vizuale e pyetjeve. Do të diskutojmë gjithashtu sfidat aktuale dhe të ardhshme.', 'hy': 'Մոլորմոդալ մեքենայի ուսումնասիրությունը հզոր բազմագիտական հետազոտության ոլորտ է, որը վերաբերում է արհեստական ինտեգրելով և մոդելավորելով բազմաթիվ հաղորդակցման մեթոդներ, ներառյալ լեզվական, ձայնային և վիզուալ հաղորդագրությունները: Ալյուդիո-վիզուալ խոսքի ճանաչման սկզբնական հետազոտության արդյունքում և վերջերս նկարների և տեսագրության նախագծերի արդյունքում այս հետազոտության ոլորտը հանգեցնում է որոշ առանձնահատուկ մարտահրավեր multiմոդալ հետազոտողների համար, հաշվի առնելով տվյալների Այս դասարանը հիմնված է Կարնեգի Մելլոնի համալսարանում 2016 թվականի գարնանի կիսամյակի ժամանակ ուսուցանված վերջին դասարանի վրա (ԿՄՄ դասարան 11-777) և երկու դասարանի վրա, որոնք ներկայացվել են 2016 թվականին CVPR-ում և 2016 թվականին CIMI- The present tutorial will review fundamental concepts of machine learning and deep neural networks before describing the five main challenges in multimodal machine learning: (1) multimodal representation learning, (2) translation & mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodal fusion and (5) co-learning.  Այս դասարանը նաև ներկայացնում է ամենաբարձր ալգորիթմներ, որոնք վերջերս առաջարկվել են լուծելու բազմամոդալ ծրագրեր, ինչպիսիք են պատկերի վերնագրավորումները, տեսագրությունները և տեսողական հարցերի պատասխանը: Մենք նաև կքննարկենք ներկայիս և գալիք մարտահրավերները:', 'bs': 'Multimodalno učenje mašine je vibrantno multidisciplinarno istraživanje područje koje rješava neke od originalnih ciljeva umjetne inteligencije integriranjem i modeliranjem višestrukih komunikacijskih modaliteta, uključujući jezičke, akustičke i vizualne poruke. S početnim istraživanjem o priznanju audio-vizualnog govora i nedavno sa projektima slike i video snimanja, ova istraživačka polja donosi neke jedinstvene izazove za multimodalne istraživačke s obzirom na heterogenetstvo podataka i slučajnosti često pronađene između modaliteta. Ovaj nastavnik se izgradi na nedavnom kursu predavanom na Univerzitetu Carnegie Mellon tokom proljeća 2016. semestra (CMU kurs 11-777) i dva nastavnika predstavljena na CVPR 2016 i ICMI 2016. Sadašnji nastavnik će pregledati osnovne koncepte učenja strojeva i dubokih neuralnih mreža prije opisa pet glavnih izazova u učenju multimodalnih strojeva: (1) učenje multimodalnih predstavljanja, (2) prevod i mapiranje, (3) prilagodba modalnosti, (4) multimodalna fuzija i (5) zajedničkog učenja. Učitelj će također predstaviti algoritme države umjetnosti koji su nedavno predloženi za rješavanje multimodalnih aplikacija kao što su snimanje slika, video opisa i vizuelni odgovor na pitanje. Razgovarat ćemo i o trenutnim i predstojećim izazovima.', 'cs': 'Multimodální strojové učení je živý multidisciplinární výzkumný obor, který řeší některé z původních cílů umělé inteligence integrací a modelováním více komunikačních modalit, včetně jazykových, akustických a vizuálních sdělení. Díky počátečnímu výzkumu audiovizuálního rozpoznávání řeči a v poslední době i projektům pro titulky obrazů a videa přináší tato výzkumná oblast některé unikátní výzvy pro multimodální výzkumníky vzhledem k heterogenitě dat a kontingenci často nalezené mezi modalitami. Tento kurz navazuje na nedávný kurz vyučovaný na Carnegie Mellon University během jarního semestru 2016 (kurz CMU 11-777) a dva tutoriály prezentované na CVPR 2016 a ICMI 2016. Tento návod bude přezkoumat základní koncepty strojového učení a hlubokých neuronových sítí před popisem pěti hlavních výzev v multimodálním strojovém učení: (1) multimodální reprezentační učení, (2) překlad mapování, (3) modální sladění, (4) multimodální fúze a (5) co-learning. Návod také představí nejmodernější algoritmy, které byly nedávno navrženy pro řešení multimodálních aplikací, jako je popis obrázků, popis videa a vizuální odpověď na otázky. Budeme také diskutovat o aktuálních a nadcházejících výzvách.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge multimodal de màquines és un vibrant camp de recerca multidisciplinari que aborda alguns dels objectius originals de l'intel·ligència artificial integrant i modelant múltiples modalitats comunicatives, incloent missatges lingüístics, acústics i visuals. With the initial research on audio-visual speech recognition and more recently with image and video captioning projects, this research field brings some unique challenges for multimodal researchers given the heterogeneity of the data and the contingency often found between modalities. Aquest tutorial es basa en un curs recent ensenyat a la Carnegie Mellon University durant el semestre de primavera 2016 (curs CMU 11-777) i dos tutorials presentats a CVPR 2016 i ICMI 2016. The present tutorial will review fundamental concepts of machine learning and deep neural networks before describing the five main challenges in multimodal machine learning: (1) multimodal representation learning, (2) translation & mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodal fusion and (5) co-learning.  El tutorial també presentarà algoritmes més moderns que han estat proposats recentment per resoldre aplicacions multimodals com la capturació d'imatges, les descripcions de vídeo i la resposta visual a preguntes. També discutirem els reptes actuals i futurs.", 'et': 'Multimodaalne masinõpe on elav multidistsiplinaarne uurimisvaldkond, mis käsitleb tehisintellekti algseid eesmärke, integreerides ja modelleerides mitmeid suhtlusviise, sealhulgas keelelisi, akustilisi ja visuaalseid sõnumeid. Audiovisuaalse kõnetuvastuse esialgsete uuringutega ning hiljuti pildi- ja videopealdiste projektidega kaasneb see uurimisvaldkond mitmeliigilistele teadlastele ainulaadseid väljakutseid, arvestades andmete heterogeensust ja sageli esinevaid eriolukordi eri meetodite vahel. See õpetus põhineb Carnegie Melloni ülikoolis 2016. aasta kevadisel semestril õpetatud hiljutisel kursusel (CMU kursus 11-777) ja kahel CVPR 2016 ja ICMI 2016 õpetusel esitatud õpetusel. Käesolevas õpetuses vaadatakse üle masinõppe ja sügavate närvivõrkude põhikontseptsioonid, enne kui kirjeldatakse viit peamist väljakutset mitmeliigilises masinõppes: (1) mitmeliigiline esindusõpe, (2) tõlkimine ja kaardistamine, (3) modaalsuse ühtlustamine, (4) mitmeliigiline fusioon ja (5) kaasõpe. Õpetuses tutvustatakse ka kaasaegseid algoritme, mis on hiljuti välja pakutud multimodaalsete rakenduste lahendamiseks, nagu pildi pealdiste, videokirjelduste ja visuaalse küsimuse-vastuse lahendamiseks. Arutame ka praegusi ja tulevasi väljakutseid.', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen koneoppiminen on elinvoimainen monitieteinen tutkimusala, joka käsittelee tekoälyn alkuperäisiä tavoitteita integroimalla ja mallintamalla useita viestintämuotoja, mukaan lukien kielelliset, akustiset ja visuaaliset viestit. Audiovisuaalisen puheentunnistuksen alustavan tutkimuksen ja viime aikoina kuva- ja videokuvausprojektien avulla tämä tutkimusala tuo multimodaalisten tutkijoiden kannalta ainutlaatuisia haasteita, kun otetaan huomioon aineiston heterogeenisuus ja usein modaalien välillä esiintyvät kontekstit. Tämä opetusohjelma perustuu Carnegie Mellonin yliopistossa kevään 2016 lukukauden aikana opetettuun kurssiin (CMU-kurssi 11-777) ja kahteen CVPR 2016:ssä ja ICMI 2016:ssa esiteltyyn opetusohjelmaan. Tässä opetusohjelmassa tarkastellaan koneoppimisen ja syvähermoverkkojen peruskäsitteitä ennen kuin kuvataan multimodaalisen koneoppimisen viisi keskeistä haastetta: (1) multimodaalinen representaatiooppiminen, (2) kääntäminen ja kartoitus, (3) modaalisuuden yhdenmukaistaminen, (4) multimodaalinen fuusio ja (5) yhteisoppiminen. Tutoriaalissa esitellään myös uusimpia algoritmeja, joita on hiljattain ehdotettu multimodaalisten sovellusten ratkaisemiseksi, kuten kuvatekstityksen, videokuvauksen ja visuaalisen kysymys-vastauksen. Keskustelemme myös nykyisistä ja tulevista haasteista.', 'az': 'Çoxlu modal maşın öyrənməsi, dil, akustik və görsel ismarışları birləşdirən, çoxlu komunikatlı modülləri birləşdirən və modelləşdirən müxtəlif çoxlu diziplinlər araştırma sahəsidir. Bu araştırma sahəsi çoxlu modal araştırmacılara verilən məlumatların heterogeneliyi və modüllərin arasındakı müəyyən edilməsi üçün çoxlu modal araştırmacılara bəzi təcavüzlər gətirir. Bu təhsil 2016 Yazın yarısında Carnegie Mellon Universitetində öyrətilmiş bir kurs üstündə inşa edir (CMU kurs 11-777) və 2016 CVPR və ICMI 2016-də göstərilən iki təhsil. Şimdiki təhsil makinelərin öyrənməsindən əvvəl maşın öyrənməsindən və derin nöral ağlarının əsas fikirlərini təhsil edəcək: 1) çox modal təhsil öyrənməsindən əvvəl: çox modal təhsil öyrənməsindən əvvəl: Yaxınlarda çoxlu modal proqramları çəkmək üçün təklif edilmiş, görüntü başlığı, video tanımlamaları və görsel sual-cavabı kimi, həmçinin təklif edilmiş sanat algoritmi də göstərəcəkdir. Biz həmçinin ağıllı və gələcək çətinlikləri də mübahisə edəcəyik.', 'sk': 'Multimodalno strojno učenje je živahno multidisciplinarno raziskovalno področje, ki obravnava nekatere izvirne cilje umetne inteligence z integracijo in modeliranjem različnih komunikacijskih modalij, vključno z jezikovnimi, akustičnimi in vizualnimi sporočili. Z začetnimi raziskavami o avdio-vizualnem prepoznavanju govora in nedavnim s projekti slik in video napisovanja prinaša to raziskovalno področje nekaj edinstvenih izzivov za multimodalne raziskovalce glede na heterogenost podatkov in nepredvidljivost, ki se pogosto pojavljajo med modalnostmi. Ta vadnica temelji na nedavnem predmetu na univerzi Carnegie Mellon v semestru pomladi 2016 (CMU tečaj 11-777) in dveh vadnicah, predstavljenih na CVPR 2016 in ICMI 2016. Ta vadnica bo pregledala temeljne koncepte strojnega učenja in globokih nevronskih omrežij, preden bo opisala pet glavnih izzivov v multimodalnem strojnem učenju: (1) multimodalno reprezentacijsko učenje, (2) prevajanje in kartiranje, (3) usklajevanje modalnosti, (4) multimodalna fuzija in (5) soočenje. V vadnici bodo predstavljeni tudi najsodobnejši algoritmi, ki so bili pred kratkim predlagani za reševanje multimodalnih aplikacij, kot so napisovanje slik, video opisi in vizualni odgovor na vprašanje. Razpravljali bomo tudi o sedanjih in prihajajočih izzivih.', 'jv': 'Multimodal Learning Hak perbudhakan langkung sampeyan karo perusahaan langkung apakno-sualan lan sing luwih dumadhi karo perusahaan video, sak perusahaan winih iki dadi perusahaan kanggo sakjane perusahaan kanggo sampeyan akeh multimodal sing isiné perusahaan data lan sak sumelan kanggo langgar modalité. tutorial Laptop" and "Desktop tutorial Awak dhéwé mangan isih beraksi barêng-barêng iki bakal dumadhi iki luwih dumadhi.', 'he': 'למידת מכונות רב-מודלית היא שדה מחקר רב-משמעתית חיוני שמטפל בחלק מהמטרות המקוריות של אינטליגנציה מלאכותית על ידי האינטלגנציה ומודל מודליות תקשורת רבות, כולל הודעות שפתיות, אקוסטיות ויזואליות. עם המחקר הראשון על זיהוי נאום אודיו-ויזואלי ומאוחר יותר עם פרוייקטי צילום של תמונות וידאו, שדה המחקר הזה מביא איגרים מיוחדים למחקרים רבים מודליים הלימודים האלה בונים על קורס שלמד לאחרונה באוניברסיטת קרניגי מלון במהלך סמסטר האביב 2016 (קורס CMU 11-777) ושני הלימודים הוציאו ב CVPR 2016 ו ICMI 2016. הלימודים הנוכחים יבחון את הרעיונות הבסיסיים של לימוד מכונות ורשתות עצביות עמוקות לפני שתיאר את חמש האתגרים העיקריים בלימודת מכונות רבות: (1) לימוד מייצג רבות מודלית, (2) תרגום ומפה, (3) התאמה מודלית, (4) לימוד רבות מודלית (5) שיתוף משותף. The tutorial will also present state-of-the-art algorithms that were recently proposed to solve multimodal applications such as image captioning, video descriptions and visual question-answer.  אנחנו גם נדון באתגרים הנוכחיים והמתקרבים.', 'ha': "Shirin masu amfani da kwamfyutan mulki shi ne birnin fitina masu yawa wanda ke yi amfani da wasu goal na farko na masu hankali masu bashi da kuma masu motsari da misãlai masu yawa, kamar linguistic, akassiki da manzanni masu gani. Daga da farkon fitina kan ganin magana na idãnun da suka yi sauni, kuma a yanzu masu da takardar zane da video masu tsari, wannan field yana zo da wasu masu kandala na'ura wa watafiti masu multi-multi da aka bai wa hoterogenity of data da muhimmanci a ƙayyade a tsakanin motsi. This tutor houses on a newly educated kurs at Carnaiie mellon University during the Expression 2016 semeter (CMU kurs 11-777) and 2 tutor listed at CV PR 2016 and ICMI 2016. Ana iya yanzu, zai ƙididdige wa'asanin karatun masu amfani da kwamfyutan na'urar masu ƙaranci a gabãnin ka bayyana shan tarajan muhimu a cikin masu amfani da mashine masu ƙaranci: (1) sanar da masu motsi masu multi-multi, (2) fassarar da fassarar ɗin (3) juyi da tsarin, gwargwadon kwamfyuta, (4) multi-marodal fusion da (5) sami-sami. Ana nuna halin-sanar-algoritori da aka buɗe wa masu buƙata wa shiryoyin ayuka masu yawa kamar fandin zane, fassaran video da jibin-tambayi mai gani. Kayya, zã mu yi jayayya da masu gaugawa na yanzu da masu ƙarshe.", 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་ནི་རྩོལ་བ་ནི་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བས་བྱུང་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སླེབས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་དགོས་པ་ལྟར། སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་བརྗོད་ལམ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་ཐོག་མའི་རིམ་དང་བརྙན་ཐོག་ལས་འགུལ་ལྟ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྗོད་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་སྐྱེལ་བ་འདིས་མ་ཟད་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བ་དག་གི་ཁོངས This tutorial builds upon a recent course taught at Carnegie Mellon University during the Spring 2016 semester (CMU course 11-777) and two tutorials presented at CVPR 2016 and ICMI 2016. The present tutorial will review fundamental concepts of machine learning and deep neural networks before describing the five main challenges in multimodal machine learning: (1) multimodal representation learning, (2) translation & mapping, (3) modality alignment, (4) multimodal fusion and (5) co-learning. སྒྲ་བརྙན་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་བ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཆ་རྣམས་ཀྱི་འགོ་བཤད་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་འདྲི་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་གདོང་ལེན་དང་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་གདོང་ལེན་ཡང་བཤད་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Deep Learning for Dialogue Systems', 'ar': 'التعلم العميق لأنظمة الحوار', 'pt': 'Deep Learning para Sistemas de Diálogo', 'fr': 'Deep Learning pour les systèmes de dialogue', 'es': 'Aprendizaje profundo para sistemas de diálogo', 'ja': '対話システムのための深い学習', 'ru': 'Глубокое обучение для диалоговых систем', 'zh': '言系统之深学也', 'hi': 'संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए गहरी शिक्षा', 'ga': 'Foghlaim dhomhain le haghaidh Córais Idirphlé', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემებისთვის ძალიან სწავლება', 'el': 'Βαθιά μάθηση για συστήματα διαλόγου', 'hu': 'Mélytanulás párbeszédrendszerek számára', 'lt': 'Išsamus dialogo sistemų mokymasis', 'it': 'Deep Learning per i sistemi di dialogo', 'kk': 'Диалог жүйелерінің терең оқытуы', 'mk': 'Длабоко учење за системите за дијалог', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Dalam untuk Sistem Dialog', 'ml': 'Deep Learning for Dialogue Systems', 'mt': 'Deep Learning for Dialogue Systems', 'pl': 'Głębokie uczenie się systemów dialogu', 'no': 'Deep læring for dialogsystemer', 'ro': 'Învățare profundă pentru sistemele de dialog', 'mn': 'Диалог системийн гүн суралцах', 'si': 'සංවාද පද්ධතිය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම', 'sr': 'Duboko učenje za sisteme dijaloga', 'sv': 'Djupt lärande för dialogsystem', 'so': 'Waxbarashada hoose u dhexeeya nidaamka dialogka', 'ur': 'Dialog Systems کے لئے عمیق سیکھنا', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளுக்கான ஆழமான கற்றல்', 'uz': 'Dialog tizimlari uchun yoqish', 'vi': 'Học sâu cho hệ thống đối thoại', 'bg': 'Дълбоко обучение за диалогови системи', 'nl': 'Deep Learning voor dialoogsystemen', 'da': 'Deep Learning for Dialog Systems', 'de': 'Deep Learning für Dialogsysteme', 'hr': 'Duboko učenje za dijalogske sustave', 'id': 'Belajar dalam untuk Sistem Dialog', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa kina kwa Mfumo wa Dialogu', 'tr': 'Dialog sistemleri üçin gaty öwrenmek', 'ko': '대화 시스템의 심도 있는 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری عمیق برای سیستم\u200cهای دیalog', 'af': 'Deep leer vir dialoog stelsels', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'sq': 'Mësim i thellë për sistemet e dialogut', 'hy': 'Խաղաղ ուսումնասիրություն համակարգերի համար', 'bs': 'Duboko učenje za sisteme dijaloga', 'az': 'Dialoog Sisteml…ôrinin derin √∂yr…ônm…ôsi', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য গভীর শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'Deep Learning for Dialogue Systems', 'cs': 'Hluboké učení pro systémy dialogu', 'et': 'Dialoogisüsteemide sügavõpe', 'fi': 'VuoropuhelujĂ¤rjestelmien syvĂ¤oppiminen', 'jv': 'deep Learn for Dialog System', 'sk': 'Globoko učenje za sisteme dialoga', 'he': 'למידה עמוקה למערכות דיאלוגים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་མ་ལག་གི་སྤྱོད་སྐབས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་གླེང་སྣུམ'}
{'en': 'In the past decade, goal-oriented spoken dialogue systems have been the most prominent component in today’s virtual personal assistants. The classic dialogue systems have rather complex and/or modular pipelines. The advance of deep learning technologies has recently risen the applications of neural models to dialogue modeling. However, how to successfully apply deep learning based approaches to a dialogue system is still challenging. Hence, this tutorial is designed to focus on an overview of the dialogue system development while describing most recent research for building dialogue systems and summarizing the challenges, in order to allow researchers to study the potential improvements of the state-of-the-art dialogue systems. The tutorial material is available at http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ar': 'في العقد الماضي ، كانت أنظمة الحوار المنطوقة الموجهة نحو الهدف هي العنصر الأبرز في المساعدين الشخصيين الافتراضيين اليوم. تحتوي أنظمة الحوار الكلاسيكية على خطوط أنابيب معقدة و / أو معيارية إلى حد ما. أدى تقدم تقنيات التعلم العميق مؤخرًا إلى زيادة تطبيقات النماذج العصبية لنمذجة الحوار. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال كيفية تطبيق مناهج التعلم العميق لنظام الحوار أمرًا صعبًا. ومن ثم ، تم تصميم هذا البرنامج التعليمي للتركيز على نظرة عامة على تطوير نظام الحوار أثناء وصف أحدث الأبحاث لبناء أنظمة الحوار وتلخيص التحديات ، من أجل السماح للباحثين بدراسة التحسينات المحتملة للحوار الحديث. أنظمة. المواد التعليمية متاحة على http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'pt': 'Na última década, os sistemas de diálogo falado orientados a objetivos foram o componente mais proeminente nos assistentes pessoais virtuais de hoje. Os sistemas de diálogo clássicos têm pipelines bastante complexos e/ou modulares. O avanço das tecnologias de aprendizado profundo aumentou recentemente as aplicações de modelos neurais para modelagem de diálogo. No entanto, como aplicar com sucesso abordagens baseadas em aprendizado profundo a um sistema de diálogo ainda é um desafio. Portanto, este tutorial foi projetado para se concentrar em uma visão geral do desenvolvimento do sistema de diálogo, descrevendo as pesquisas mais recentes para a construção de sistemas de diálogo e resumindo os desafios, a fim de permitir que os pesquisadores estudem as possíveis melhorias do diálogo de última geração sistemas. O material tutorial está disponível em http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'fr': "Au cours de la dernière décennie, les systèmes de dialogue oral axés sur les objectifs ont été l'élément le plus important des assistants personnels virtuels d'aujourd'hui. Les systèmes de dialogue classiques ont des conduites assez complexes et/ou modulaires. Les progrès des technologies d'apprentissage profond ont récemment accru les applications des modèles neuronaux à la modélisation du dialogue. Cependant, comment appliquer avec succès des approches basées sur le deep learning à un système de dialogue reste un défi. Par conséquent, ce tutoriel est conçu pour se concentrer sur un aperçu du développement du système de dialogue tout en décrivant les recherches les plus récentes sur la construction de systèmes de dialogue et en résumant les défis, afin de permettre aux chercheurs d'étudier les améliorations potentielles des systèmes de dialogue de pointe. Le matériel didactique est disponible à l'adresse http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'es': 'En la última década, los sistemas de diálogo oral orientados a objetivos han sido el componente más destacado de los asistentes personales virtuales de hoy en día. Los sistemas de diálogo clásicos tienen canales bastante complejos y/o modulares. El avance de las tecnologías de aprendizaje profundo ha aumentado recientemente las aplicaciones de los modelos neuronales al modelado de diálogos. Sin embargo, cómo aplicar con éxito los enfoques basados en el aprendizaje profundo a un sistema de diálogo sigue siendo un desafío. Por lo tanto, este tutorial está diseñado para centrarse en una visión general del desarrollo del sistema de diálogo, al tiempo que describe la investigación más reciente para construir sistemas de diálogo y resumir los desafíos, con el fin de permitir a los investigadores estudiar las posibles mejoras de los sistemas de diálogo de última generación. El material del tutorial está disponible en http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ja': '過去10年間、目標指向の口頭対話システムは、今日のバーチャルパーソナルアシスタントで最も顕著な構成要素である。古典的なダイアログシステムは、かなり複雑なパイプラインおよび/またはモジュール化されたパイプラインを有する。ディープラーニング技術の進歩は、最近、ニューラルモデルの対話モデリングへの応用を高めている。しかし、ディープラーニングに基づくアプローチを対話システムにうまく適用する方法は、依然として困難である。したがって、このチュートリアルは、研究者が最先端の対話システムの潜在的な改善を研究できるようにするために、対話システムの開発の概要に焦点を当て、対話システムを構築するための最新の研究を説明し、課題を要約するように設計されています。チュートリアル資料はhttp://deepdialogue.miulab.twで入手できます。', 'zh': '昔十年之中,以向口语为言,直是当今虚拟助理之最者组成部分。 经言统有杂/模块化之管。 深入近增神经模在言建模中。 然则何以深学之道成,而犹有挑战性也。 是以本教程旨概述系统之重,兼述构对之最新,讲求挑战,以究最先进之对。 教程材可在 http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw。', 'ru': 'В последнее десятилетие системы целенаправленного устного диалога были наиболее заметным компонентом современных виртуальных личных помощников. Классические диалоговые системы имеют довольно сложные и/или модульные трубопроводы. Развитие технологий глубокого обучения в последнее время привело к расширению применения нейронных моделей для моделирования диалога. Однако успешное применение подходов, основанных на глубоком обучении, к системе диалога по-прежнему сопряжено с трудностями. Следовательно, этот учебник предназначен для того, чтобы сосредоточиться на обзоре развития диалоговой системы при описании самых последних исследований для построения диалоговых систем и обобщении проблем, чтобы позволить исследователям изучить потенциальные улучшения современных диалоговых систем. С учебным материалом можно ознакомиться по адресу: http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'hi': 'पिछले दशक में, लक्ष्य-उन्मुख बोली जाने वाली संवाद प्रणाली आज के आभासी व्यक्तिगत सहायकों में सबसे प्रमुख घटक रही है। क्लासिक संवाद प्रणालियों में बल्कि जटिल और / या मॉड्यूलर पाइपलाइनें हैं। गहरी सीखने की प्रौद्योगिकियों की प्रगति ने हाल ही में संवाद मॉडलिंग के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल के अनुप्रयोगों को बढ़ा दिया है। हालांकि, एक संवाद प्रणाली के लिए गहरी शिक्षा आधारित दृष्टिकोण को सफलतापूर्वक कैसे लागू किया जाए, यह अभी भी चुनौतीपूर्ण है। इसलिए, इस ट्यूटोरियल को संवाद प्रणाली के विकास के अवलोकन पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है, जबकि संवाद प्रणालियों के निर्माण और चुनौतियों को सारांशित करने के लिए सबसे हालिया शोध का वर्णन करते हुए, शोधकर्ताओं को अत्याधुनिक संवाद प्रणालियों के संभावित सुधारों का अध्ययन करने की अनुमति देने के लिए। ट्यूटोरियल सामग्री http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Le deich mbliana anuas, tá córais dialóige labhartha spriocdhírithe ar na cinn is suntasaí i gcúntóirí pearsanta fíorúla an lae inniu. Tá píblínte casta agus/nó modúlach sách casta ag na córais chomhphlé clasaiceach. Tá méadú tagtha le déanaí ar chur chun cinn na dteicneolaíochtaí domhainfhoghlama ar fheidhmiú samhlacha néaracha ar shamhaltú idirphlé. Mar sin féin, is dúshlán fós é conas cuir chuige atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim dhomhain a chur i bhfeidhm go rathúil ar chóras comhphlé. Mar sin, tá an rang teagaisc seo deartha chun díriú ar fhorbhreathnú ar fhorbairt an chórais idirphlé agus ag an am céanna cur síos ar an taighde is déanaí chun córais idirphlé a fhorbairt agus achoimre a dhéanamh ar na dúshláin, chun ligean do thaighdeoirí staidéar a dhéanamh ar na feabhsuithe féideartha ar an gcomhphlé úrscothach. córais. Tá an t-ábhar teagaisc ar fáil ag http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან ათეულობით, მიზეზების საუკეთესო დიალოგის სისტემებში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტი დღეს ვირტუალური პირველური ადგილური asistenტე კლასიკური დიალოგური სისტემები უფრო კომპლექსიკური და/ან მოდულური გარეშე. დიალოგის მოდელების პროგრამეტრები განსწავლებელი ტექნოლოგიების განმავლობა ახლა აღმოჩენა ნეიროლური მოდელების პროგრამეტრები. თუმცა, როგორ წარმატებით გავაკეთება დიალოგური სისტემისთვის ძალიან ძალიან შესაძლებელია. ამიტომ, ეს სტუტირება განსაზღვრებულია დიალოგის სისტემის განვითარების უფრო დაახლოებით, როდესაც უფრო ახალი სტუტირებულია დიალოგის სისტემის განვითარებისთვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომ მსწავლობ Name http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'el': 'Την τελευταία δεκαετία, τα στοχοθετημένα συστήματα προφορικού διαλόγου αποτέλεσαν το πιο εξέχον στοιχείο στους σημερινούς εικονικούς προσωπικούς βοηθούς. Τα κλασικά συστήματα διαλόγου έχουν μάλλον σύνθετους ή/και αρθρωτούς αγωγούς. Η πρόοδος των τεχνολογιών βαθιάς μάθησης έχει πρόσφατα αυξήσει τις εφαρμογές των νευρωνικών μοντέλων στη μοντελοποίηση διαλόγου. Ωστόσο, ο τρόπος επιτυχούς εφαρμογής προσεγγίσεων βασισμένων στη βαθιά μάθηση σε ένα σύστημα διαλόγου εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση. Ως εκ τούτου, αυτό το σεμινάριο έχει σχεδιαστεί για να επικεντρωθεί σε μια επισκόπηση της ανάπτυξης του συστήματος διαλόγου ενώ περιγράφει την πιο πρόσφατη έρευνα για την κατασκευή συστημάτων διαλόγου και συνοψίζει τις προκλήσεις, προκειμένου να επιτρέψει στους ερευνητές να μελετήσουν τις πιθανές βελτιώσεις των σύγχρονων συστημάτων διαλόγου. Το υλικό εκμάθησης διατίθεται στη διεύθυνση http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt évtizedben a célorientált beszélő párbeszédrendszerek voltak a mai virtuális személyi asszisztensek legkiemelkedőbb eleme. A klasszikus párbeszédrendszerek meglehetősen összetett és/vagy moduláris csővezetékekkel rendelkeznek. A mélytanulási technológiák fejlődése a közelmúltban növelte az idegi modellek alkalmazását a párbeszédmodellezésre. Még mindig kihívást jelent azonban, hogy miként lehet sikeresen alkalmazni a mélytanuláson alapuló megközelítéseket egy párbeszédrendszerre. Ezért a bemutató célja, hogy áttekintést nyújtson a párbeszédrendszer fejlesztéséről, miközben leírja a párbeszédrendszerek építésére irányuló legújabb kutatásokat és összefoglalja a kihívásokat, hogy a kutatók tanulmányozhassák a korszerű párbeszédrendszerek potenciális fejlődését. Az oktatóanyag a következő oldalon érhető el: http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'it': "Nell'ultimo decennio, i sistemi di dialogo parlato orientati agli obiettivi sono stati la componente più importante negli assistenti personali virtuali di oggi. I classici sistemi di dialogo hanno condotte piuttosto complesse e/o modulari. L'avanzamento delle tecnologie di deep learning ha recentemente aumentato le applicazioni dei modelli neurali alla modellazione del dialogo. Tuttavia, come applicare con successo approcci basati sul deep learning a un sistema di dialogo è ancora difficile. Pertanto, questo tutorial è stato progettato per concentrarsi su una panoramica dello sviluppo del sistema di dialogo, descrivendo le più recenti ricerche per la costruzione di sistemi di dialogo e riassumendo le sfide, al fine di consentire ai ricercatori di studiare i potenziali miglioramenti dei sistemi di dialogo all'avanguardia. Il materiale tutorial è disponibile all'indirizzo http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'kk': 'Соңғы он жылдарда, мақсат бағытталған диалог жүйелері қазіргі виртуалды жеке көмекшілердің ең маңызды компоненті болды. Классикалық диалог жүйелерінде кәдімгі және/немесе модульдердің конепциялары бар. Технологиялардың түсінік оқыту технологияларының бағдарламасы невралдық моделдердің қолданбаларын диалог модельдеріне көтерді. Бірақ диалог жүйесіне негізделген тәртіптерді қалай істеу әрекетіне жеткізу мүмкін емес. Сондықтан бұл оқыту диалог жүйесінің жасау жүйесінің көбірек зерттеу жүйесін жасау жүйесінің көбірек көрінісіне көмектесу үшін, зерттеушілер диалог жүйесінің мүмкіндік жақсартуларын зерттеу үшін жаңа зерттеу жүйесін Оқыту материалы бар http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ms': 'Dalam dekade lepas, sistem dialog berbicara yang orient tujuan telah menjadi komponen paling terkenal dalam pembantu peribadi maya hari ini. Sistem dialog klasik mempunyai baris paip yang agak kompleks dan/atau modular. Kemajuan teknologi pembelajaran mendalam baru-baru ini meningkatkan aplikasi model saraf untuk pemodelan dialog. However, how to successfully apply deep learning based approaches to a dialogue system is still challenging.  Oleh itu, tutorial ini direka untuk fokus pada paparan ringkasan pembangunan sistem dialog sambil menjelaskan kajian terbaru untuk membina sistem dialog dan ringkasan cabaran, untuk membolehkan peneliti untuk mempelajari peningkatan potensi sistem dialog-state-of-the-art. Bahan tutorial tersedia di http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'mk': 'Во изминатата деценија системите за говорен дијалог со цел беа најистакнатиот компонент во денешните виртуелни лични асистенти. Класичките дијалошки системи имаат доста комплексни и/или модуларни гасоводи. The advance of deep learning technologies has recently risen the applications of neural models to dialogue modeling.  Сепак, како успешно да се применат пристапите базирани на длабоко учење кон дијалошкиот систем сé уште се предизвикуваат. Затоа, овој наставник е дизајниран со цел да се фокусира на преглед на развојот на дијалогот на системот, опишувајќи го и најновото истражување за изградба на дијалогот системи и резимирајќи ги предизвиците, со цел да им се овозможи на истражувачите да ги проучуваат потенцијалните подобрува Научниот материјал е достапен на http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'lt': 'Per pastarąjį dešimtmetį tiksliniu požiūriu orientuotos kalbėtojo dialogo sistemos buvo svarbiausia šiandienos virtualių asmeninių padėjėjų dalis. Klasikinių dialogo sistemų vamzdynai yra gana sudėtingi ir (arba) moduliniai. Naudojant gilaus mokymosi technologijas neseniai išaugo nervinių modelių taikymas dialogui modeliuoti. Tačiau vis dar sunku sėkmingai taikyti giliavandenio mokymosi metodus dialogo sistemai. Todėl šis mokymas skirtas sutelkti dėmesį į dialogo sistemos plėtros apžvalgą, apibūdinant naujausius dialogo sistemų kūrimo mokslinius tyrimus ir apibendrinant iššūkius, kad mokslininkai galėtų ištirti galimus pažangiausių dialogo sistemų patobulinimus. Mokymo medžiaga pateikiama http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ പത്ത് കൊല്ലത്തില്\u200d, ലക്ഷ്യസംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഇന്നിന്\u200dറെ വിര്\u200dച്ച്വല്\u200d വ്യക്തിപരമായ സഹ ക്ലാസിക്ക് ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണവും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മോഡുള്\u200d പൈപ്പെലിനുകളും ഉണ് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനം അടുത്തുതന്നെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാ എങ്കിലും ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വഴികള്\u200d എങ്ങനെ പ്രയോഗിക് അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം വികസിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക് പദ്ധതിയുടെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'mt': 'Fl-aħħar għaxar snin, is-sistemi ta’ djalogu mitkellem orjentati lejn l-għanijiet kienu l-aktar komponent prominenti fl-assistenti personali virtwali tal-lum. Is-sistemi ta’ djalogu klassiku għandhom pipelines pjuttost kumplessi u/jew modulari. L-avvanz tat-teknoloġiji tat-tagħlim profond dan l-aħħar żied l-applikazzjonijiet tal-mudelli newrali għall-immudellar tad-djalogu. Madankollu, kif jiġu applikati b’suċċess approċċi bbażati fuq tagħlim profond għal sistema ta’ djalogu għadha sfida. Għalhekk, dan it-tutorjal huwa mfassal biex jiffoka fuq ħarsa ġenerali lejn l-iżvilupp tas-sistema ta’ djalogu filwaqt li jiddeskrivi r-riċerka l-aktar reċenti għall-bini ta’ sistemi ta’ djalogu u jagħti sommarju tal-isfidi, sabiex ir-riċerkaturi jkunu jistgħu jistudjaw it-titjib potenzjali tas-sistemi ta’ djalogu l-aktar avvanzati. Il-materjal tutorjali huwa disponibbli fuq http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'pl': 'W ostatniej dekadzie ukierunkowane na cel systemy dialogu mówionego były najważniejszym elementem dzisiejszych wirtualnych asystentów osobistych. Klasyczne systemy dialogu posiadają dość złożone i/lub modułowe rurociągi. Postęp technologii głębokiego uczenia zwiększył ostatnio zastosowanie modeli neuronowych do modelowania dialogu. Jednak w jaki sposób skutecznie zastosować podejście oparte na głębokim uczeniu do systemu dialogu jest nadal wyzwaniem. W związku z tym ten poradnik ma na celu skoncentrowanie się na przeglądzie rozwoju systemu dialogu, opisując jednocześnie najnowsze badania nad budową systemów dialogu i podsumowując wyzwania, aby umożliwić badaczom badanie potencjalnych ulepszeń najnowocześniejszych systemów dialogu. Materiały samouczkowe dostępne są na stronie internetowej http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste tiåret har det mest viktigste komponenten i dei virtuelle personlege assistentane i målsystemene. Klassiske dialogsystemane har ganske komplekse og/eller modulare røyr. Avansen av dype læringsteknologiar har nyleg økt programmet for neuralmodeller til dialogmodellering. Men korleis dype læringsbaserte tilnærmingar til eit dialogsystemet skal brukast er likevel vanskeleg. Denne opplæringa er derfor utvikla for å fokusera på eit oversikt over utviklinga av dialogsystemet medan du beskriver dei nyeste forskningssystemene for bygging av dialogvindauget og samansering av utfordringane, slik at forskere kan studera dei potensielle forbedringane i dialogsystemet for kunstheten. Opplæringsmaterial er tilgjengeleg på http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн арван жилийн дотор, зорилгоор дамжуулсан ярианы систем өнөөдөр виртуал хувийн тусламжтайгаас хамгийн чухал хэсэг болсон. Классик диалог системд маш нарийн болон/эсвэл модуль хоолойн шугам байдаг. Гүн гүнзгий суралцах технологи нь саяхан сэтгэл зүйн загварын хэрэглээ диалог загварын загварын тулд нэмэгдсэн. Гэхдээ хэрхэн гүн гүнзгий суралцах суралцах сургалтын тулд ярианы системд хэрхэн амжилттай ашиглах вэ гэвэл хэцүү. Иймээс энэ сургалтыг диалог системийн хөгжлийн талаар анхаарлаа хандуулахын тулд зориулагдсан бөгөөд хамгийн сүүлийн шинэ судалгааны системийг бүтээж, сорилтуудыг жинхэнэ тодорхойлох, судлаачид урлагийн диалог системийн байдлын сайжруулалтыг судлах боломж Боловсролын материал нь http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ro': 'În ultimul deceniu, sistemele de dialog vorbit orientate spre obiective au fost cea mai proeminentă componentă în asistenții personali virtuali de astăzi. Sistemele clasice de dialog au conducte destul de complexe și/sau modulare. Avansarea tehnologiilor de învățare profundă a crescut recent aplicațiile modelelor neurale pentru modelarea dialogului. Cu toate acestea, modul de a aplica cu succes abordările bazate pe învățare profundă la un sistem de dialog este încă o provocare. Prin urmare, acest tutorial este conceput pentru a se concentra pe o imagine de ansamblu asupra dezvoltării sistemului de dialog, descriind în același timp cele mai recente cercetări pentru construirea sistemelor de dialog și rezumând provocările, pentru a permite cercetătorilor să studieze potențialele îmbunătățiri ale sistemelor de dialog de ultimă generație. Materialul tutorial este disponibil la http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'sv': 'Under det senaste decenniet har målinriktade taldialogsystem varit den mest framträdande komponenten i dagens virtuella personliga assistenter. De klassiska dialogsystemen har ganska komplexa och/eller modulära rörledningar. Utvecklingen av djupinlärningstekniker har nyligen ökat användningen av neurala modeller för dialog modellering. Hur man framgångsrikt tillämpar djupinlärningsbaserade metoder i ett dialogsystem är dock fortfarande en utmaning. Därför är denna handledning utformad för att fokusera på en överblick av dialogsystemets utveckling samtidigt som den beskriver den senaste forskningen för att bygga dialogsystem och sammanfatta utmaningarna, för att möjliggöra för forskare att studera potentiella förbättringar av state-of-the-art dialogsystem. Handledningsmaterialet finns tillgängligt på http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'so': 'Tobankii la soo dhaafay, nidaamka dialogka ee la jeeday oo la jeeday waxay ahaayeen qayb ugu weyn ee caawiyayaasha dhaqaalaha ee maanta. The classic dialogue systems have rather complex and/or modular pipelines.  Horumarinta teknolojiyada aad u dheer ee waxbarashada waxaa soo baxay codsiyada modelalka neuro-ka si loo sameynayo sameynta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sida aad ugu liibaansan u codsato qaabab aad u dheer waxbarasho oo lagu saleeyo nidaamka dialogue weli waa mid adag. Taas darteed, waxbarashadan waxaa loo qoray inuu ku kalsooneeyo koritaanka nidaamka dialogka, iyadoo lagu qorayo baaritaanka ugu dambeysa ee dhisidda nidaamka dialogka iyo si loo soo jeediyo dhibaatooyinka, si ay u fasaxo baaritaanka u barashada horumarinta nidaamka farshaxanka. Waxyaabaha waxbarashada waxaa laga helaa http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'si': 'අන්තිම දහයකින්, අරමුණ විදියට කතා කරපු සංවාදය පද්ධතියේ අද වාස්තවික පෞද්ගලික උදව්වක විදියට ප්\u200dරධ සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාද පද්ධතියේ සංකේතය සහ/නැත්තම් මොඩියුලර් පායිප්ලින්ස් තියෙනවා. ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙනීමේ තාක්ෂණික විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරධාන නමුත්, කොහොමද ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්නේ අධාරිත සංවාද පද්ධතියෙන් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් සමහර විදි ඉතින්, මේ සංවාද පද්ධතිය විස්තරයේ සංවාද පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සඳහා සංවාද පද්ධතිය නිර්මාණය සහ අභ්\u200dයාදය සංවාද පද්ධතිය සඳහා අවස්ථාවක් ස Name http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'sr': 'U proteklih desetljeæa, rečeni dijalogski sistem cilja je bio najpoznatiji komponent današnjih virtualnih ličnih asistenata. Klasični dijalogski sistemi imaju prilično kompleksne i/ili modularne cijevi. Napredak dubokih tehnologija učenja nedavno je povećao aplikacije neuralnih modela na modeliranje dijaloga. Međutim, kako uspešno primjenjivati duboko učenje bazirane pristupe sistemu dijaloga još uvijek je izazovno. Stoga je ova nastavnica dizajnirana da se usredotoči na pregled razvoja dijalogskog sistema dok opisuje najnovije istraživanje za izgradnju dijalogskih sustava i sažetanje izazova, kako bi istraživači omogućili da prouče potencijalne poboljšanje državnog dijaloga. Tutorijski materijal je dostupan na http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ta': 'கடந்த பத்தாண்டில், இலக்குச் சேர்ந்த பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் இன்றைய நிகர்நிகர் தனிப்பட்ட உதவியாளர்களில் மிகவும் பெரிய பகு கிளாசிக் உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் மிகவும் சிக்கல் மற்றும்/அல்லது மாற்று பைப்பெல்கள் உள்ளன. ஆழமான கற்றல் தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் முன்னேற்றம் சமீபத்தில் புதிய மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாடு ஆனால், எப்படி வெற்றிகரமாக ஆழமான கற்றல் அடிப்படையில் செயல்படுத்தும் உரையாடல் முறைமையில் இன்னும் சவால் இர ஆகையால், இந்த பொருள் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உரையாடல் முறைமை உருவாக்கும் போது மிகவும் சமீபமான ஆராய்ச்சி உரையாடல் முறைமைகளை விவரிக்கும் போது, சவால்களை சுருக்கும் போது, ஆர பொருள் கிடைக்கும் பொருள் http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ur': 'گزشتہ دس سالوں میں، مقصد کی طرف متوجہ ہوئی گفتگو سیسٹم آج کے مجارسی شخصی مددگاروں میں سب سے زیادہ اچھا رقم ہے۔ کلاسیکی ڈیلوگر سیسٹم بہت پیچیدہ اور/یا موڈولر پیپ لین ہیں. عمیق تعلیم تکنولوژی کے آگے بڑھا گیا ہے کہ نئورل موڈل کے کاروباروں کو موڈلینگ کے لئے بڑھا گیا ہے۔ However, how to successfully apply deep learning based approaches to a dialog system is still challenging. لہٰذا، یہ تدریجی طراحی کی گئی ہے تاکہ диалог سیسٹم کی تدریجی پر تمرکز کرے جب تک نہایت اچھی تحقیقات کی تعریف کی گئی ہے اور چالوں کی تعریف کرے، تاکہ تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو تحقیق کرنے کے لئے استعمال کریں تدریس مواد موجود ہے http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'uz': "Oldingi yil ichida eng yil bilan gapiradigan muloqat tizimi bugun virtual shaxsiy yordamchilarga eng katta komponent edi. Klassika dialog tizimi juda murakkab va/yoki modulyasi pipeliner bor. Yaqinda o'rganish texnologiya taʼminotlarining oldingi oldinga neyrol modellarining dasturlarini muloqat modeli uchun oshadi. Lekin, muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish asosida muloqat tizimga murojaat qilish muvaffaqiyatlarini ishlatish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi. Shunday qilib, bu tuzuvchi muloqat taʼminlovchisi dialog tizimi taʼminlovchisi uchun eng yaqinda muloqat tizimini yaratish va muammolalarni qisqarish uchun taʼminlovchilarga qisqarish uchun tuzuvchilar imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin. Tutorial materiali mavjud emas http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'vi': 'Trong thập kỷ qua, hệ thống đối thoại ngôn ngữ hướng mục đích là yếu tố nổi bật nhất trong các trợ lý cá nhân ảo ngày nay. Các hệ thống đối thoại cổ điển có những đường ống phức tạp và/hay chuyển động. Sự tiến bộ của công nghệ học sâu đã nâng cao các ứng dụng của các mô hình thần kinh để thiết lập cuộc đối thoại. Cách sử dụng các phương pháp dựa trên học sâu vào một hệ thống đối thoại vẫn còn khó khăn. Do đó, bài tập này được thiết kế để tập trung vào một hệ thống tổng quát phát triển hệ thống đối thoại, trong khi mô tả nghiên cứu gần đây nhất về hệ thống xây dựng cuộc đối thoại và tổng hợp các thử thách, để cho phép các nhà nghiên cứu nghiên cứu khả năng cải tiến tiến hệ thống đối thoại hiện đại. Tập sư phụ có sẵn ở http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'bg': 'През последното десетилетие целенасочените системи за говорен диалог са най-видният компонент в днешните виртуални лични асистенти. Класическите диалогови системи имат доста сложни и/или модулни тръбопроводи. Напредъкът на технологиите за дълбоко учене наскоро повиши приложенията на невронните модели за моделиране на диалога. Въпреки това, как успешно да се приложат подходи, базирани на дълбоко обучение, към система за диалог все още е предизвикателство. Следователно, този урок е предназначен да се съсредоточи върху преглед на развитието на диалоговата система, като същевременно описва най-новите изследвания за изграждане на диалогови системи и обобщава предизвикателствата, за да се даде възможност на изследователите да проучат потенциалните подобрения на най-съвременните системи за диалог. Материалът за урока е достъпен на адрес: http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'da': 'I det seneste årti har målorienterede taledialogsystemer været den mest fremtrædende komponent i nutidens virtuelle personlige assistenter. De klassiske dialogsystemer har ret komplekse og/eller modulære rørledninger. Fremskridt inden for deep learning teknologier har for nylig øget anvendelsen af neurale modeller til dialog modellering. Men det er stadig en udfordring, hvordan man kan anvende dyb læring baseret på tilgange til et dialogsystem. Derfor er denne tutorial designet til at fokusere på et overblik over dialogsystemets udvikling og samtidig beskrive den seneste forskning i opbygning af dialogsystemer og opsummere udfordringerne, så forskerne kan studere potentielle forbedringer af state-of-the-art dialogsystemer. Vejledningsmaterialet er tilgængeligt på http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'nl': 'In het afgelopen decennium zijn doelgerichte gesproken dialoogsystemen het meest prominente onderdeel geweest in de virtuele persoonlijke assistenten van vandaag. De klassieke dialoogsystemen hebben vrij complexe en/of modulaire pijpleidingen. De vooruitgang van deep learning technologieën heeft onlangs de toepassingen van neurale modellen voor dialoogmodellering verhoogd. Hoe je op deep learning gebaseerde benaderingen succesvol kunt toepassen op een dialoogsysteem is echter nog steeds een uitdaging. Daarom is deze tutorial ontworpen om te focussen op een overzicht van de ontwikkeling van dialoogsystemen, terwijl het meest recente onderzoek naar het bouwen van dialoogsystemen wordt beschreven en de uitdagingen worden samengevat, zodat onderzoekers de potentiële verbeteringen van de state-of-the-art dialoogsystemen kunnen bestuderen. Het tutorial materiaal is beschikbaar op: http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'hr': 'U proteklih desetljeća, sustavi razgovora o cilju-orientiranom dijalogu bili su najpoznatiji komponent današnjih virtualnih osobnih pomoćnika. Klasični dijalogski sustavi imaju prilično kompleksne i/ili modularne cijevi. Napredak dubokog učenja tehnologija nedavno je povećao primjene neuralnih modela na modeliranje dijaloga. Međutim, kako uspješno primjenjivati duboko učenje bazirane pristupe dijalogu još uvijek je izazovno. Stoga je ova nastavnica dizajnirana kako bi se usredotočila na pregled razvoja dijalogskog sustava dok opisuje najnovije istraživanje za građenje dijalogskih sustava i zaključavanje izazova kako bi istraživači omogućili proučavanje potencijalnih poboljšanja sustava dijaloga stanja umjetnosti. Tutorijski materijal je dostupan na http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'de': 'In den vergangenen zehn Jahren waren zielgerichtete Sprachdialogsysteme der prominenteste Bestandteil heutiger virtueller persönlicher Assistenten. Die klassischen Dialogsysteme verfügen über recht komplexe und/oder modulare Pipelines. Der Fortschritt von Deep-Learning-Technologien hat in jüngster Zeit die Anwendungen neuronaler Modelle für die Dialogmodellierung erhöht. Die erfolgreiche Anwendung von Deep Learning-basierten Ansätzen auf ein Dialogsystem ist jedoch immer noch eine Herausforderung. Daher soll dieses Tutorial einen Überblick über die Entwicklung von Dialogsystemen geben, die neuesten Forschungen zum Aufbau von Dialogsystemen beschreiben und die Herausforderungen zusammenfassen, um Forschern die Möglichkeit zu geben, Verbesserungspotenziale moderner Dialogsysteme zu untersuchen. Das Tutorialmaterial ist verfügbar unter http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'id': "In the past decade, goal-oriented spoken dialogue systems have been the most prominent component in today's virtual personal assistants.  Sistem dialog klasik memiliki pipa yang agak kompleks dan/atau modular. Kemajuan teknologi belajar dalam baru-baru ini meningkatkan aplikasi model saraf untuk model dialog. Namun, bagaimana untuk berhasil menerapkan pendekatan berdasarkan belajar mendalam ke sistem dialog masih menantang. Oleh karena itu, tutorial ini direncanakan untuk fokus pada pandangan panjang dari pembangunan sistem dialog sementara menjelaskan penelitian terbaru untuk membangun sistem dialog dan mengungkapkan tantangan, untuk memungkinkan peneliti untuk mempelajari peningkatan potensial sistem dialog yang terbaik. Material tutorial tersedia di http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'fa': 'در دهه گذشته، سیستم\u200cهای صحبت صحبت با هدف\u200cها بهترین عنصر در دستیارهای شخصی مجازی امروز بودند. سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ کلاسیک خیلی پیچیده و/یا لوله\u200cهای مودیولی دارند. پیشرفت تکنولوژی های عمیق یادگیری اخیراً کاربرد مدل های عصبی را برای مدل\u200cسازی گفتگو بالا می\u200cبرد. با این حال، چگونه با موفقیت بررسی\u200cهای عمیق یادگیری به سیستم گفتگو در حال حاضر مشکل است. بنابراین، این آموزشی برای تمرکز روی نظر تطویح سیستم گفتگو طراحی شده است در حالی که اخیراً تحقیقات برای ساختن سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو و جمع کردن چالش\u200cها را توصیف می\u200cکند، تا به محققان اجازه دهند که بهترین امکانات\u200cهای سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو هنری را مطالعه کنند. مواد آموزشی در http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ko': '지난 10년 동안 목표를 향한 구어 대화 시스템은 현재 가상 개인 보조원의 가장 중요한 구성 부분이 되었다.고전적인 대화 시스템에는 상당히 복잡하고/또는 모듈화된 파이프가 있다.최근 몇 년 동안 깊이 있는 학습 기술의 발전에 따라 신경 모형은 대화 모형에서 점점 광범위하게 응용되고 있다.그러나 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 대화 시스템에 어떻게 성공적으로 적용할 것인가는 여전히 도전이다.따라서 본 강좌는 대화 시스템의 발전을 개괄하고 대화 시스템을 구축하는 최신 연구를 묘사하며 도전을 총결하여 연구원들이 가장 선진적인 대화 시스템의 잠재적인 개선을 연구하도록 하고자 한다.자습서 자료는http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'sw': 'Katika muongo uliopita, mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayoelekezwa na lengo limekuwa sehemu kubwa zaidi katika wasaidizi binafsi wa leo. Mfumo wa mazungumzo ya klassiki una vifaa vinginevyo vigumu na/au vifaa vya kiutamaduni. Maendeleo ya teknolojia ya kujifunza kwa kina hivi karibuni yameongeza matumizi ya mifano ya ubongo wa mazungumzo. However, how to successfully apply deep learning based approaches to a dialogue system is still challenging.  Kwa hiyo, somo hili linalengwa lengo la kutazama mtazamo wa maendeleo ya mazungumzo wakati akielezea utafiti wa hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mifumo ya mazungumzo na kutoa muhtasari wa changamoto, ili kuwaruhusu watafiti kutafiti uwezekano wa maendeleo ya mfumo wa mazungumzo ya sanaa. Vifaa vya ufundi kinapatikana katika http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'af': "In die verlede tiende het die doel-orienteerde gespreek dialoog stelsels die mees prominente komponent in vandag se virtuele persoonlike assistente gewees. Die klassieke dialoog stelsels het eerder kompleks en/of modulare pipelyne. Die vordering van diep leer teknologies het onlangs die toepassings van neurale modelles op die dialoog modelleer opgewek. Maar hoe om diep leer gebaseerde toegang tot 'n dialoog stelsel nog moet aanwend. Hierdie onderwyseling is daarom ontwerp om op 'n oorskou van die dialoog stelsel ontwikkeling te fokus terwyl die mees onlangse onderwyseling beskrywing vir die bou van dialoog stelsels en die opsomming van die uitdagings te beskrywe, om resekers te toelaat om die potensiele verbeteringe van die staat van die kunstens dialoog stelsels te studeer. Name http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'sq': "In the past decade, goal-oriented spoken dialogue systems have been the most prominent component in today's virtual personal assistants.  Sistemet klasike të dialogut kanë tubacione mjaft komplekse dhe/ose modulare. Përparimi i teknologjive të mësimit të thellë ka rritur kohët e fundit aplikimet e modeleve neuronale për modelimin e dialogut. Megjithatë, si të zbatohen me sukses metodat e thella të mësimit ndaj një sistemi dialogu është ende sfiduese. Kështu, ky mësim është projektuar për të përqëndruar në një përmbledhje të zhvillimit të sistemit të dialogut duke përshkruar kërkimet më të fundit për ndërtimin e sistemeve të dialogut dhe përmbledhjen e sfidave, me qëllim që kërkuesit të mund të studiojnë përmirësimet e mundshme të sistemeve të dialogut më të lartë. Materiali tutorial është në dispozicion në http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'tr': 'Geçen on ýylda, maksadyň görnüşi bolan dialog sistemalary bu gün wirtuel şahsy kömekçileriň has möhüm komponenti. Klasik dijal sistemleri karmaşık we/ýa modal pipeliniň içinde. Ýagyndaky öwrenmek teknolojileriniň öňünde näyral modelleriň uygulamalaryny dijal modellerine yükseldi. Ýöne çukur öwrenme sistemine nädip başarıylandyrylmak mümkin däldir. Şol sebäpli, bu tutorial dialogyň gelişmegi barada üns berilýär we olaryň iň soňky dialogy sistemalary gurmak we çärelerini toparlamak üçin ylşyrymlary tassyklamak üçin barlanýar. gedit elläb meýdançalar http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'am': 'ባለፉት አሥር ዓመታት፣ አጋቢ በተናገሩት የጦማሪያዎች መክፈቻዎች የዛሬ የራሳቸው የግል ድጋፍ ረዳቶች ተሟጋቾች ሆነዋል፡፡ ጥያቄ የጥልቅ ትምህርት ቴክኖሎጂ መግለጫ በቅርብ ጊዜ የኔural models ፕሮግራሙን ለመስመር ምሳሌ አቆመ፡፡ ነገር ግን እንዴት ጥልቅ ትምህርት ለመጠቀም ወደ dialog ስርዓት መቀናቀል እንኳ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም ይህ ትምህርት የጥያቄውን የጥያቄ ስርዓት መሠረት እና የጥያቄዎችን ማሳየት በተቃራኒ ጥያቄ በመጠንቀቂያው የጥያቄ ጥያቄን ለመግለጽ እና ጥያቄዎችን ለማሳመር ይደረጋል፡፡ ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ በተገኘ http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'hy': 'Անցյալ տասնամյակի ընթացքում նպատակներով ուղղված խոսակցական համակարգերը այսօրվա վիրտուալ անձնական օգնականների ամենակարևոր բաղադրիչն են եղել: Կլասիկ երկխոսային համակարգերը ունեն բավականին բարդ և (կամ) մոդուլար խողովակաշարեր: Լավ սովորելու տեխնոլոգիաների առաջընթացը վերջերս բարձրացրել է նյարդային մոդելների կիրառումը դիոլոգիաների մոդելների համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ինչպես հաջողակ կիրառել խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մոտեցումները երկխոսային համակարգին դեռևս դժվար է: Այսպիսով, այս դասարանը ձևավորված է կենտրոնանալ խոսախոսական համակարգի զարգացման ընդհանուր պատկերի վրա, ներկայացնելով վերջին հետազոտությունները խոսախոսական համակարգերի կառուցման և մարտահրավերների համառոտագրման համար, որպեսզի հետազոտողները կարողանան ուսումնասիրել ամենաբար Գործողական նյութը հասանելի է http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'az': 'Geçmiş on ildə, məqsəd tərəfindən danışmış danışma sistemləri bugünün virtual kişisel yardımçıların ən böyük komponenti idi. Klasik dijalog sistemləri çox kompleks və/ya modular bor çizgələri var. Derin öyrənmə teknolojilərin öyrənməsi son zamanlarda nöral modellərin uyğulamalarını dijalog modellərinə yüksəltdi. Lakin, dərin öyrənməsi sisteminə tətbiq edilməsi necə müvəffəqiyyətli olar? Buna görə də bu öyrənmək müəyyən edilmişdir ki, ən son dəyişiklik sistemlərini in şa etmək və çətinlikləri azaltmaq üçün araştırmaqların mümkünlüyünün mümkünlüyünü öyrənməsinlər. Öyrənmək maddəsi faydalanır http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ca': "Durant les últimes dècades, els sistemes de diàleg parlat orientats a objectius han estat el component més prominent dels assistents personals virtuals d'avui en dia. Els sistemes clàssics de diàleg tenen conductes bastant complexes i/o modulars. The advance of deep learning technologies has recently risen the applications of neural models to dialogue modeling.  Però la manera d'aplicar amb èxit els enfocaments basats en l'aprenentatge profund a un sistema de diàleg encara és difícil. Per tant, aquest tutorial està dissenyat per centrar-se en una visió general del desenvolupament del sistema de diàleg descrivint la recent recent recerca per construir sistemes de diàleg i resumir els reptes, per a que els investigadors puguin estudiar les millores potencials dels sistemes de diàleg més avançats. The tutorial material is available at  http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'cs': 'V posledních desetiletích byly cílově orientované systémy mluveného dialogu nejvýznamnější součástí dnešních virtuálních osobních asistentů. Klasické dialogové systémy mají poměrně složité a/nebo modulární potrubí. Pokrok technologií hlubokého učení v poslední době zvýšil aplikace neuronových modelů pro modelování dialogu. Nicméně, jak úspěšně aplikovat přístupy založené na hlubokém učení do systému dialogu je stále náročné. Proto je tento kurz navržen tak, aby se zaměřil na přehled vývoje dialogových systémů a zároveň popsal nejnovější výzkum pro budování dialogových systémů a shrnul výzvy, aby výzkumníci mohli studovat potenciální zlepšení nejmodernějších dialogových systémů. Výukový materiál je k dispozici na adrese http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'bn': 'গত কয়েক দশকে লক্ষ্যের মুখোমুখি কথোপকথন ব্যবস্থা আজকের ভার্চুয়াল ব্যক্তিগত সহকারীদের মধ্যে সবচেয়ে বিশাল অংশ। The classic dialogue systems have rather complex and/or modular pipelines.  গভীর শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তির অগ্রগতি সম্প্রতি নিউরেল মডেলের অ্যাপলিকেশন বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে। তবে কিভাবে গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক উপায়ের প্রয়োগ করা যায় তা এখনো চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে। তাই এই শিক্ষার্থীটির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের উন্নয়নের উপর একটি পর্যবেক্ষণের দিকে মনোযোগ দেওয়ার জন্য, যেখানে সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা ব্যাখ্যা করা হচ্ছে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম নির্ম প্রযুক্তিগত বস্তুটি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'bs': 'U proteklih desetljeća, sustavi razgovora o cilju-orientiranom dijalogu bili su najpoznatiji komponent današnjih virtualnih ličnih asistenata. Klasični dijalogski sistemi imaju prilično kompleksne i/ili modularne cijevi. Napredak dubokih tehnologija učenja nedavno je povećao primjene neuralnih modela na modeliranje dijaloga. Međutim, kako uspješno primjenjivati duboko učenje bazirane pristupe sistemu dijaloga još uvijek je izazovno. Stoga je ova nastavnica dizajnirana kako bi se usredotočila na pregled razvoja dijalogskog sistema dok opisuje najnovije istraživanje za građenje dijalogskih sustava i sažetivanje izazova, kako bi istraživači omogućili da prouče potencijalne poboljšanje državnog dijaloga. Tutorijski materijal je dostupan na http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'et': 'Viimasel kümnendil on eesmärkidele orienteeritud kõneleva dialoogi süsteemid olnud tänapäeva virtuaalsete isiklike assistentide kõige silmapaistvam komponent. Klassikalistel dialoogisüsteemidel on üsna keerukad ja/või modulaarsed torujuhtmed. Sügavõppe tehnoloogiate areng on hiljuti suurendanud närvimudelite rakendusi dialoogi modelleerimiseks. Kuid kuidas edukalt rakendada sügavõppel põhinevaid lähenemisviise dialoogisüsteemis, on endiselt keeruline. Seega on käesolev õpetus kavandatud keskenduma dialoogisüsteemi arendamise ülevaatele, kirjeldades dialoogisüsteemide ehitamise uusimaid uuringuid ja kokkuvõttes väljakutseid, et võimaldada teadlastel uurida kaasaegsete dialoogisüsteemide võimalikke täiustusi. Õppematerjal on kättesaadav aadressil http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'fi': 'Viimeisen vuosikymmenen aikana tavoitteelliset puhejärjestelmät ovat olleet tämän päivän virtuaalisten henkilökohtaisten avustajien merkittävin osa. Klassisissa vuoropuhelujärjestelmissä on melko monimutkaisia ja/tai modulaarisia putkistoja. Syväoppimisen teknologioiden kehitys on viime aikoina nostanut neuromallien sovelluksia dialogin mallintamiseen. Syväoppimiseen perustuvien lähestymistapojen soveltaminen vuoropuhelujärjestelmään on kuitenkin edelleen haastavaa. Näin ollen tämä opetusohjelma on suunniteltu keskittymään yleiskatsaukseen dialogijärjestelmän kehityksestä samalla, kun kuvataan viimeisimmät tutkimukset dialogijärjestelmien rakentamiseksi ja tiivistetään haasteita, jotta tutkijat voivat tutkia viimeisimpien dialogijärjestelmien mahdollisia parannuksia. Opetusmateriaali on saatavilla osoitteessa http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'jv': 'Nang oleh sing dumadhi, sistem sing nambah-nambah kanggo ngubah dialog sing wis kompon sing paling apik sing dumadhi kanggo ngubah persian sing kudu namuhé. Sistem pernik diangkat sing dibenalke larang karo pak/apa modul Awak dhéwé éntuk kelangan teknôlogi sing tek gawe ngrebut aplikasi dadi model alat kanggo sampek dialog. politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive tutorial_basic http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'ha': "A cikin tiẽkar da ya shige, na'urar zauren akwatin bayani wanda aka yi goani da shi, sun kasance mafi yawan abu mai girma cikin mataimaki masu basu'a na yau. @ action: button Prefĩfi na masu kwamfyuta masu karanta Technical na ƙari, na ƙari ya tãyar da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka na tsari zuwa misalin zauren akwatin bayani. However, how to successfully apply deep learning based approaches to a dialogue system is still challenging.  Aka so, wannan muhalli na ƙayyade fokus a kan rufe kwamfyutan mafarin zauren akwatin bayani na zauren zauren akwatin bayani, a lokacin da ake bayyana research mafi yanzu wa buƙatan bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani da kuma yana ƙari masu kanana, dõmin ya yarda kafaffiyata, su karanta ƙarami masu ƙaranci na tsarin bayanin-na-sanar. Babu ƙananan da aka samar da http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.", 'sk': 'V zadnjem desetletju so bili ciljno usmerjeni govorni dialogni sistemi najpomembnejši sestavni del današnjih virtualnih osebnih asistentov. Klasični sistemi dialoga imajo precej zapletene in/ali modularne cevovode. Napredek tehnologij globokega učenja je v zadnjem času povečal uporabo nevronskih modelov za modeliranje dialoga. Vendar pa je še vedno izziv, kako uspešno uporabiti pristope, ki temeljijo na globokem učenju, k sistemu dialoga. Zato je ta vadnica zasnovana tako, da se osredotoči na pregled razvoja dialognega sistema, hkrati pa opisuje najnovejše raziskave za gradnjo dialogskih sistemov in povzema izzive, da bi raziskovalcem omogočili preučevanje potencialnih izboljšav najsodobnejših dialogskih sistemov. Gradivo za vadnice je na voljo na spletni strani http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'he': 'במשך העשור האחרון, מערכות דיאלוג מדברים ממוקדות למטרה היו המרכיב הכי ברור בעוזרים האישיים וירטואליים של היום. למערכות הדיולוג הקלאסיות יש צינורות מורכבות או מודולריות. התקדמות של טכנולוגיות למידה עמוקה העלה לאחרונה את היישומים של דוגמנים עצביים לדיולוגיה דוגמנית. עם זאת, איך להפעיל בהצלחה גישות עמוקות מבוססות על למידה למערכת דיאלוג עדיין מאתגרת. לכן, הלימודים האלה מתוכננים כדי להתמקד בהסתכל על פיתוח מערכת הדיולוגים בזמן שתיאר את המחקר האחרון ביותר לבניין מערכות דיאלוגים ומסכם את האתגרים, כדי לאפשר למחקרים לחקור את השיפורים הפוטנציאליים של מערכות הדיולוגים המאודמות. חומר הלימודים זמין ב http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་བཅུ་ལྷག་གི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་སླེབས་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ལམ་ལ་ཧྲིལ་བུམ་དང་འཛིན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་རྒྱུད་དུང་མང་ཙམ་ཡོད། མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྣེ་མཐོང་གི་ལག་རྩལ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དེ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡིན་ན་ཕན་རིས་མཐོ་བྱུང་། ཡིན་ནའང་གིས་ཇི་ལྟར་སློབ་གྱི་ཟབ་གཞི་རྟེན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འདྲ་བྱེད་ན་མི་འདུག Hence, this tutorial is designed to focus on an overview of the dialog system development while describing most recent research for building dialog systems and summarizing the challenges, in order to allow researchers to study the potential improvements of the state-of-the-art dialog systems. རྩ་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་གི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ http://deepdialogue.miulab.tw.'}
{'en': 'Beyond Words : Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'ar': 'ما وراء الكلمات: التعلم العميق للتعبيرات متعددة الكلمات والارتباطات', 'pt': 'Além das Palavras: Aprendizado Profundo para Expressões e Colocações Multipalavras', 'fr': 'Beyond Words\xa0: Deep Learning pour les expressions multimots et les collocations', 'es': 'Más allá de las palabras: aprendizaje profundo para expresiones y colocaciones de varias palabras', 'ja': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expression and Collocations', 'zh': '越单词:多词表达式配深学', 'ru': 'Beyond Words: Глубокое обучение многословным выражениям и словосочетаниям', 'hi': 'शब्दों से परे: Multiword अभिव्यक्तियों और Collocations के लिए गहरी सीखना', 'ga': 'Thar Focail: Foghlaim dhomhain le haghaidh Léirithe Ilfhocail agus Comhshuíomhanna', 'ka': 'სიტყვების გარეშე: ძალიან სწავლება მრავალური გამოსახულებისთვის და კოლოკაციებისთვის', 'hu': 'A szavakon túl: Mélytanulás többszós kifejezésekhez és kollokációkhoz', 'el': 'Πέρα από τις λέξεις: Βαθιά μάθηση για τις πολυλέκτες εκφράσεις και τις συμπράξεις', 'it': 'Oltre le parole: Deep Learning per espressioni e Collocazioni Multiword', 'lt': 'Be žodžių: gilus daugiakalbių išraiškų ir susijungimų mokymasis', 'mk': 'Покрај зборовите: длабоко учење за мултизборни изрази и колокации', 'ms': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'kk': 'Сөздерден тыс: Көптеген сөздер өрнегі мен біріктіру үшін түсін оқыту', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുമുന്\u200dപ്: പലവാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'no': 'Utan ord: Deep læring for fleire ord uttrykk og samlingar', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ гадна: олон үг илэрхийлэл, хамтын дунд гүн суралцах', 'ro': 'Dincolo de cuvinte: Învățare profundă pentru expresii și colocări multiple de cuvinte', 'pl': 'Poza słowami: głębokie uczenie się dla wyrażeń i kolokacji wielu słów', 'so': 'Hadal ka sokow: Deep Learning for Multiword expressions and Collocations', 'ta': 'வார்த்தைகளுக்கு முன்னிருப்பு', 'sv': 'Bortom ord: Deep Learning för flerordsuttryck och kollokationer', 'ur': 'کلمات کے علاوہ: Multiword Expressions اور Collocations کے لئے عمیق تعلیم', 'sr': 'Izvan reči: duboko učenje za višeriječne izraze i kolekcije', 'si': 'වචන වලින් වලින්: ගොඩවචන වචන සහ සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා ගොඩවල් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'uz': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'vi': 'Không chỉ ra từ ngữ: phát triển ngôn ngữ đa từ và đa vị', 'nl': 'Meer dan woorden: Deep Learning voor veelwoorduitdrukkingen en collocaties', 'de': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning für Mehrwortausdrücke und Kollokationen', 'bg': 'Отвъд думите: задълбочено обучение за многословни изрази и колонации', 'da': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'id': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'ko': '어휘 초월: 다사 표현과 조합의 심도 있는 학습', 'sw': 'Zifuatazo la maneno: Kufundisha Kingi cha kujifunza kwa ajili ya Tamko na Mazungumzo', 'hr': 'Izvan riječi: duboko učenje za višeriječne izraze i kolekcije', 'fa': 'فراتر از کلمات: یادگیری عمیق برای تعریف\u200cهای کلمات و تعریف\u200cها', 'tr': 'Sözlerden daşary: Çoklu söz ifadeleri we birleşmeler üçin derin öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Përtej fjalëve: Mësim i thellë për shprehje dhe bashkëpunime shumë fjalësh', 'af': 'Buiter Woord: Deep Leer vir Multiword Utdrukkings en Kolokasies', 'am': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'az': 'S칬zl톛rin ard캼nca: 칂oxlu s칬z ifad톛si v톛 Collocations 칲칞칲n derin 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'ca': 'Després de les paraules: Aprendència profunda per expressions i col·locacions multiparaules', 'bn': 'অন্তর্ভুক্ত শব্দ এবং কলোস্থানের জন্য গভীর শিক্ষা', 'et': 'Beyond Words: mitmesõnaliste väljendite ja kollokatsioonide sügavõpe', 'cs': 'Kromě slov: hluboké učení pro víceslovné výrazy a kolokace', 'hy': 'Բառերից դուրս՝ խորը սովորելը բազբառերի արտահայտումների և համատեղումների համար', 'fi': 'Beyond Words: Deep Learning for Multiword Expressions and Collocations', 'bs': 'Izvan riječi: duboko učenje za višeriječne izraze i kolekcije', 'jv': 'Learn', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Beyond Words: Globoko učenje za večbesedne izraze in kolokacije', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་བརྗོད་གཞིའི་ནང་དུ། སྣ་ཚོགས་གསལ་བརྗོད་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་སྨུག་ཟབ་པ།', 'he': 'מעבר למילים: למידה עמוקה למילים רבות'}
{'en': 'Deep learning has recently shown much promise for NLP applications. Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation. There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called neural embedding or vector space representation of each word or document. The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future. Our target audience are researchers and practitioners in machine learning, parsing (syntactic and semantic) and language technology, not necessarily experts in MWEs, who are interested in tasks that involve or could benefit from considering MWEs as a pervasive phenomenon in human language and communication.', 'es': 'Recientemente, el aprendizaje profundo ha demostrado ser muy prometedor para las aplicaciones de PNL. Tradicionalmente, en la mayoría de los enfoques de PNL, los documentos u oraciones están representados por una escasa representación de bolsa de palabras. Ahora hay mucho trabajo que va más allá de esto al adoptar una representación distribuida de palabras, al construir una llamada «incrustación neuronal» o representación de espacio vectorial de cada palabra o documento. El objetivo de este tutorial es ir más allá del aprendizaje de los vectores de palabras y presentar métodos para el aprendizaje de representaciones vectoriales para expresiones multipalabras y pares de frases bilingües, todos los cuales son útiles para diversas aplicaciones de PNL. Este tutorial tiene como objetivo proporcionar a los asistentes una noción clara de características distributivas de las expresiones multipalabras (MWE), su relevancia para la intersección del aprendizaje profundo y el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, qué métodos y recursos están disponibles para apoyar su uso y qué más se podría hacer en el futuro. Nuestro público objetivo son investigadores y profesionales del aprendizaje automático, el análisis sintáctico (sintáctico y semántico) y la tecnología del lenguaje, no necesariamente expertos en MWE, que estén interesados en tareas que impliquen o puedan beneficiarse de considerar las MWE como un fenómeno generalizado en el lenguaje y la comunicación humanos.', 'fr': "Le deep learning s'est récemment révélé très prometteur pour les applications de TAL. Traditionnellement, dans la plupart des approches de PNL, les documents ou les phrases sont représentés par une représentation en sac de mots clairsemée. Il y a maintenant beaucoup de travail qui va au-delà en adoptant une représentation distribuée des mots, en construisant ce que l'on appelle une «\xa0intégration neuronale\xa0» ou une représentation spatiale vectorielle de chaque mot ou document. L'objectif de ce tutoriel est d'aller au-delà de l'apprentissage des vecteurs de mots et de présenter des méthodes d'apprentissage des représentations vectorielles pour les expressions multimots et les paires de phrases bilingues, qui sont toutes utiles pour diverses applications de PNL. Ce tutoriel vise à fournir aux participants une notion claire de la les caractéristiques distributionnelles des expressions multimots (MWE), leur pertinence pour l'intersection de l'apprentissage profond et du traitement du langage naturel, les méthodes et les ressources disponibles pour soutenir leur utilisation et ce qui pourrait être fait de plus à l'avenir. Notre public cible est constitué de chercheurs et de praticiens dans les domaines de l'apprentissage automatique, de l'analyse syntaxique et sémantique et des technologies du langage, pas nécessairement des experts en EMW, qui s'intéressent à des tâches qui impliquent ou pourraient bénéficier de la prise en compte des MWE comme un phénomène omniprésent dans le langage humain et la communication.", 'ar': 'أظهر التعلم العميق مؤخرًا الكثير من الأمل لتطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. تقليديا ، في معظم مناهج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، يتم تمثيل المستندات أو الجمل من خلال تمثيل أكياس الكلمات المتناثرة. يوجد الآن الكثير من العمل الذي يتجاوز ذلك من خلال اعتماد التمثيل الموزع للكلمات ، من خلال بناء ما يسمى "التضمين العصبي" أو تمثيل الفضاء المتجه لكل كلمة أو وثيقة. الهدف من هذا البرنامج التعليمي هو تجاوز تعلم متجهات الكلمات والطرق الحالية لتعلم تمثيلات المتجهات لتعبيرات متعددة الكلمات وأزواج العبارات ثنائية اللغة ، وكلها مفيدة لتطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المختلفة. يهدف هذا البرنامج التعليمي إلى تزويد الحضور بفكرة واضحة عن الخصائص اللغوية والتوزيعية للتعبيرات متعددة الكلمات (MWEs) ، وأهميتها لتقاطع التعلم العميق ومعالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، وما هي الأساليب والموارد المتاحة لدعم استخدامها ، وما يمكن القيام به أكثر في المستقبل. جمهورنا المستهدف هم الباحثون والممارسون في التعلم الآلي والتحليل (النحوي والدلالات) وتكنولوجيا اللغة ، وليس بالضرورة خبراء في MWE ، ممن يهتمون بالمهام التي تنطوي على أو يمكن أن تستفيد من اعتبار MWE ظاهرة منتشرة في لغة الإنسان والتواصل.', 'pt': 'O aprendizado profundo mostrou-se recentemente muito promissor para aplicativos de PNL. Tradicionalmente, na maioria das abordagens de PNL, documentos ou sentenças são representados por uma representação esparsa de um saco de palavras. Atualmente, há muito trabalho que vai além disso, adotando uma representação distribuída de palavras, construindo uma chamada “incorporação neural” ou representação em espaço vetorial de cada palavra ou documento. O objetivo deste tutorial é ir além do aprendizado de vetores de palavras e apresentar métodos para aprender representações vetoriais para Expressões Multipalavras e pares de frases bilíngues, todos úteis para várias aplicações de PNL. as características linguísticas e distributivas das Expressões Multipalavras (MWEs), sua relevância para a interseção de aprendizado profundo e processamento de linguagem natural, quais métodos e recursos estão disponíveis para apoiar seu uso e o que mais pode ser feito no futuro. Nosso público-alvo são pesquisadores e profissionais em aprendizado de máquina, análise sintática e semântica e tecnologia de linguagem, não necessariamente especialistas em MWEs, interessados em tarefas que envolvam ou possam se beneficiar de considerar MWEs como um fenômeno generalizado na linguagem e comunicação humana.', 'ja': 'ディープラーニングは、最近、NLPアプリケーションに多くの希望を示しています。 伝統的に、ほとんどのNLPアプローチでは、文書または文章はまばらな言葉の袋の表現で表現されます。 いわゆる「ニューラル埋め込み」または各単語または文書のベクトル空間表現を構築することによって、単語の分散表現を採用することによって、これを超える多くの作業が行われるようになりました。 このチュートリアルの目的は、単語ベクトルの学習を超え、多言語表現とバイリンガルフレーズペアの学習ベクトル表現のための方法を提示することです。これらはすべて、さまざまなNLPアプリケーションに役立ちます。このチュートリアルは、参加者に、多言語表現（ MWE ）の言語的および分布的特徴、ディープラーニングと自然言語処理の交差点への関連性、それらの使用をサポートするために利用可能な方法とリソース、および将来何ができるかについての明確な概念を提供することを目的としています。 私たちの対象者は、機械学習、構文解析（構文解析とセマンティック解析）、言語技術の研究者と実践者であり、必ずしもMWEの専門家ではなく、MWEを人間の言語とコミュニケーションにおける普遍的な現象と見なすことに関心があるか、またはその恩恵を受ける可能性のあるタスクに関心を持っています。', 'zh': '深度学近NLP应用大望。 古法多NLP法,文档句疏单词囊。 今事多越此者,以单词之分布式示之,以单词文档之神经嵌向量间。 本教程所以越单词向量之学,而求学多词表达式双语短语之向量,所以适NLP应用程序也。 本教程旨在多词表达式(MWE)言语、分布特征之概,其与深学、自然语言处交之相关性,其法资可用,及将来可为者。 吾之所向受众机器学、解析(句法、语义)、言语、治从业者,未必MWE之家也,其于利MWE为人言普遍现象也。', 'hi': 'डीप लर्निंग ने हाल ही में एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों के लिए बहुत वादा दिखाया है। परंपरागत रूप से, अधिकांश एनएलपी दृष्टिकोणों में, दस्तावेजों या वाक्यों को एक विरल बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स प्रतिनिधित्व द्वारा दर्शाया जाता है। अब बहुत सारे काम हैं जो शब्दों के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व को अपनाकर, प्रत्येक शब्द या दस्तावेज़ के तथाकथित "तंत्रिका एम्बेडिंग" या वेक्टर स्पेस प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण करके इससे परे जाते हैं। इस ट्यूटोरियल का उद्देश्य मल्टीवर्ड एक्सप्रेशन और द्विभाषी वाक्यांश जोड़े के लिए वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए शब्द वैक्टर और वर्तमान विधियों के सीखने से परे जाना है, जिनमें से सभी विभिन्न एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों के लिए उपयोगी हैं। इस ट्यूटोरियल का उद्देश्य मल्टीवर्ड एक्सप्रेशन (MWEs) की भाषाई और वितरण विशेषताओं की स्पष्ट धारणा के साथ उपस्थित लोगों को प्रदान करना है, गहरी शिक्षा और प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के प्रतिच्छेदन के लिए उनकी प्रासंगिकता, उनके उपयोग का समर्थन करने के लिए कौन से तरीके और संसाधन उपलब्ध हैं, और भविष्य में और क्या किया जा सकता है। हमारे लक्षित दर्शक मशीन लर्निंग, पार्सिंग (वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ) और भाषा प्रौद्योगिकी में शोधकर्ताओं और चिकित्सकों हैं, जरूरी नहीं कि MWEs में विशेषज्ञ, जो उन कार्यों में रुचि रखते हैं जो मानव भाषा और संचार में एक व्यापक घटना के रूप में MWEs पर विचार करने से शामिल हैं या लाभ उठा सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Глубокое обучение недавно показало многообещающее для применений NLP. Традиционно, в большинстве подходов NLP, документы или предложения представлены редким представлением мешка слов. Сейчас есть много работы, которая выходит за рамки этого, принимая распределенное представление слов, создавая так называемое «нейронное встраивание» или векторное представление пространства каждого слова или документа. Цель этого руководства - выйти за рамки изучения векторов слов и представить методы обучения векторным представлениям для многословных выражений и пар двуязычных фраз, которые полезны для различных приложений NLP. Это руководство призвано дать участникам четкое представление о лингвистических и дистрибутивных характеристиках многословных выражений (MWE), их актуальности для пересечения глубокого обучения и обработки естественного языка, какие методы и ресурсы доступны для поддержки их использования и что еще можно сделать в будущем. Наша целевая аудитория - это исследователи и практики в области машинного обучения, синтаксического и семантического анализа и языковых технологий, не обязательно эксперты в MWE, которые заинтересованы в задачах, которые включают или могут выиграть от рассмотрения MWE как широко распространенного явления в человеческом языке и общении.', 'ga': "Léirigh an domhainfhoghlaim le déanaí go leor gealltanais d’fheidhmchláir NLP. Go traidisiúnta, i bhformhór na gcur chuige NLP, léirítear doiciméid nó abairtí le léiriú gann de mhála focal. Tá go leor oibre á dhéanamh anois a théann níos faide ná seo trí léiriú dáilte ar fhocail a ghlacadh, trí “leabú neural” nó léiriú spás veicteora a thógáil de gach focal nó doiciméad. Is é aidhm an teagaisc seo dul níos faide ná foghlaim veicteoirí focal agus modhanna a chur i láthair chun léirithe veicteoirí a fhoghlaim le haghaidh Sloinn Ilfhocail agus péirí frásaí dátheangacha, atá úsáideach le haghaidh feidhmeanna NLP éagsúla. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an rang teagaisc seo nóisean soiléir a sholáthar don lucht freastail tréithe teangeolaíocha agus dáileacháin na n-Ilfhoclaí (MWEanna), a n-ábharthacht maidir le trasnú na foghlama domhain agus próiseála nádúrtha teanga, cad iad na modhanna agus na hacmhainní atá ar fáil chun tacú lena n-úsáid, agus cad eile a d’fhéadfaí a dhéanamh amach anseo. Is iad ár spriocghrúpa taighdeoirí agus cleachtóirí i meaisínfhoghlama, parsáil (chomhréir agus shéimeantach) agus teicneolaíocht teanga, ní gá go saineolaithe ar MWEanna, a bhfuil suim acu i dtascanna a bhaineann nó a d'fhéadfadh leas a bhaint as MWEs a mheas mar fheiniméan forleatach i dteanga daonna agus cumarsáide.", 'ka': "Name Tradicionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag of words representation. ახლა აქვს ბევრი სამუშაო, რომელიც ამის გარეშე, ყველა სიტყვის ან დოკუმენტის გარემოქმენტის გარემოქმენტის გამოიყენებით, რომელიც ასე ნაзывается 'ნეიროლური დაბრუნება' ან ამ სტუტირების მიზეზი არის სიტყვების ვისწავლების და მიმდინარე ვაკტორის გამოსწავლების გამოსწავლების გამოსწავლების გამოსწავლად მრავალი სიტყვების გამოსახულების და ორივე ფრაზის ზოგის გამოსახულების გამ ამ სტუტორიალური მიზეზია, რომ მომხმარებელი მრავალური გამოსახულების სიტყვების და განსახულების პარამეტრებების წარმოდგენა, მათი მნიშვნელობა ძალიან სწავლების და ბუნებური ენის პროცესის შესახებ, რას მეტივები და რესურსი ხელმისაწარმოდ ჩვენი მიდინარე აუდიტორია მაქსინის სწავლების, პანუსაციის (სინტაქტიული და სმენტიკური) და ენის ტექნოლოგიაში, არა მუშაობით ექსპერტები MWEs-ში, რომლებიც ინტერესურებენ მოქმედებით, რომლებიც შეგვიძლია შეიძლება MWEs-ს განსაზღვრე", 'el': 'Η βαθιά μάθηση έχει δείξει πρόσφατα πολλές υποσχέσεις για τις εφαρμογές NLP. Παραδοσιακά, στις περισσότερες προσεγγίσεις, τα έγγραφα ή οι προτάσεις αντιπροσωπεύονται από μια σπάνια τσάντα λέξεων. Υπάρχει τώρα πολλή δουλειά που πηγαίνει πέρα από αυτό υιοθετώντας μια κατανεμημένη αναπαράσταση λέξεων, κατασκευάζοντας μια λεγόμενη "νευρωνική ενσωμάτωση" ή διανυσματική διαστημική αναπαράσταση κάθε λέξης ή εγγράφου. Ο στόχος αυτού του μαθήματος είναι να προχωρήσει πέρα από την εκμάθηση των διανύσματα λέξεων και να παρουσιάσει μεθόδους για την εκμάθηση διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων για πολυλεκτικές εκφράσεις και δίγλωσσα ζεύγη φράσεων, όλες οι οποίες είναι χρήσιμες για διάφορες εφαρμογές. Αυτό το σεμινάριο στοχεύει να δώσει στους συμμετέχοντες μια σαφή εικόνα των γλωσσικών και διανεμητικών χαρακτηριστικών των εκφράσεων πολλαπλών λέξεων (ΜΣΕ), τη σημασία τους για τη διασταύρωση της βαθιάς μάθησης και της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, ποιες μέθοδοι και πόροι είναι διαθέσιμες για να υποστηρίξουν τη χρήση τους και τι περισσότερα θα μπορούσαν να γίνουν στο μέλλον. Το κοινό-στόχο μας είναι ερευνητές και επαγγελματίες της μηχανικής μάθησης, της ανάλυσης (συντακτικής και σημασιολογικής) και της γλωσσικής τεχνολογίας, όχι απαραίτητα ειδικοί σε ΜΣΕ, οι οποίοι ενδιαφέρονται για εργασίες που περιλαμβάνουν ή θα μπορούσαν να ωφεληθούν από την εξέταση των ΜΣΕ ως ένα διάχυτο φαινόμενο στην ανθρώπινη γλώσσα και επικοινωνία.', 'hu': 'A mélytanulás nemrégiben nagyon ígéretesnek bizonyult az NLP alkalmazások számára. Hagyományosan a legtöbb NLP-megközelítésben a dokumentumokat vagy mondatokat ritka szózsák ábrázolással képviselik. Most már rengeteg munka van, amely ezen túlmegy azzal, hogy elfogadja a szavak elosztott reprezentációját, úgynevezett "neurális beágyazás" vagy vektortér reprezentációját minden szó vagy dokumentum. A bemutató célja, hogy túllépjen a szóvektorok tanulásán, és bemutassa a vektoros reprezentációk tanulásának módszereit többszós kifejezések és kétnyelvű kifejezések esetében, amelyek mindegyike hasznos a különböző NLP alkalmazásokhoz. A bemutató célja, hogy a résztvevők egyértelműen megismerjék a többszós kifejezések nyelvi és disztribúciós jellemzőit, azok relevanciáját a mélytanulás és a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás metszéspontjában, milyen módszerek és erőforrások állnak rendelkezésre használatuk támogatására, valamint mit tehetnénk még a jövőben. Célközönségünk a gépi tanulás, elemzés (szintaktikus és szemantikai) és nyelvtechnológia kutatói és szakemberei, nem feltétlenül a MWE-k szakértői, akik érdeklődnek olyan feladatok iránt, amelyek magukban foglalják vagy hasznosak lehetnek abban, hogy az MWE-ket az emberi nyelv és kommunikáció átfogó jelenségének tekintik.', 'it': "Il deep learning ha recentemente mostrato molta promessa per le applicazioni NLP. Tradizionalmente, nella maggior parte degli approcci NLP, documenti o frasi sono rappresentati da una rappresentazione sparsa di parole. Ora c'è molto lavoro che va oltre questo adottando una rappresentazione distribuita delle parole, costruendo una cosiddetta 'incorporazione neurale' o rappresentazione spaziale vettoriale di ogni parola o documento. Lo scopo di questo tutorial è quello di andare oltre l'apprendimento dei vettori di parole e presentare metodi per l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni vettoriali per Espressioni Multiword e coppie di frasi bilingue, tutti utili per varie applicazioni NLP. Questo tutorial mira a fornire ai partecipanti una chiara idea delle caratteristiche linguistiche e distributive delle Espressioni Multiword (MWE), della loro rilevanza per l'intersezione tra il deep learning e l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, quali metodi e risorse sono disponibili per supportarne l'uso e cosa altro potrebbe essere fatto in futuro. Il nostro target di riferimento sono ricercatori e professionisti del machine learning, parsing (sintattico e semantico) e della tecnologia del linguaggio, non necessariamente esperti di MWE, che sono interessati a compiti che coinvolgono o potrebbero beneficiare di considerare MWE come un fenomeno pervasivo nel linguaggio e nella comunicazione umana.", 'mk': "Deep learning has recently shown much promise for NLP applications.  Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation.  There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document.  The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. Овој наставник има за цел да им обезбеди на учениците јасна идеја за јазичните и дистрибуционалните карактеристики на Мултизборните експресии (МВЕ), нивната релевантност за преминот на длабоко учење и природното обработување јазик, кои методи и ресурси се достапни за поддршка на нивната употреба и што Нашата целна публика се истражувачи и практики во машинско учење, анализирање (синтактичка и семантична) и јазичка технологија, не неопходно експерти во МВЕ, кои се заинтересирани за задачи кои вклучуваат или би можеле да имаат корист од сметањето на МВЕ за первазивен феномен во човечкиот јазик и комуни", 'kk': "NLP қолданбалары үшін ділік оқыту жақында көп әлемі көрсетілді. Әдетте, NLP көпшілігінде құжаттар немесе сөздердің көпшілігі сөздерді көрсетеді. Бірақ бұдан артық көп жұмыс бар, әрбір сөз не құжаттың 'невралдық ендіру' деп аталатын сөздерді үлестіру үшін үлестірілген сөздерді көрсету үшін. Бұл оқыту мақсаты - сөз векторларын оқыту мен көптеген сөз өрнегі мен екі тілді сөз екеуі үшін векторларды оқыту әдістерінің арқылы, барлығы NLP қолданбаларына пайдалы. Қатысушыларға көптеген сөз өрнектерінің лингвистикалық және таратылған қасиеттерін (MWEs) түсінікті түсініктерді, олардың түсінікті оқыту және табиғи тілдерді өзгерту үшін қандай әдістер мен ресурстар қолдану үшін жұмыс істеу үшін, келесіде қа Біздің мақсатты аудиториямыз машиналық оқыту, талдау (синтактикалық және семантикалық) және тіл технологиясындағы зерттеушілер және практиктер, MWEs-дің эксперттері емес, олар адамдар тілінде және коммуникациясындағы көпшіліктеріне қатынасыз еті", 'lt': 'Išsamus mokymasis neseniai parodė daug pažadų NLP programoms. Paprastai daugumoje NLP metodų dokumentai arba sakiniai yra reprezentuojami nedideliu žodžių maišeliu. Dabar yra daug darbų, kurie viršija šį klausimą priimant paskirstytą žodžių atstovavimą, sukuriant vadinamąjį "neurologinį įdėjimą" arba kiekvieno žodžio ar dokumento vektoriaus erdvės atstovavimą. The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. Šiame mokyme siekiama suteikti dalyviams aiškų supratimą apie daugiakalbių išraiškų kalbines ir paskirstymo charakteristikas (MWEs), jų svarbą gilaus mokymosi ir natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo tarpusavio sąsajoms, kokie metodai ir ištekliai gali būti naudojami jų naudojimui remti ir ką daugiau būtų galima padaryti ateityje. Mūsų tikslinė auditorija yra mokslo darbuotojai ir praktikantai mašin ų mokymosi, analizavimo (sintaksinės ir semantinės) ir kalbų technologijų srityse, nebūtinai MWEs ekspertai, kurie yra suinteresuoti užduotimis, kurios apima arba galėtų būti naudingos vertinant MWEs kaip visuotinį reiškinį žmogaus kalboje ir komunikacijoje.', 'ms': "Deep learning has recently shown much promise for NLP applications.  Secara tradisional, dalam kebanyakan pendekatan NLP, dokumen atau kalimat diwakili oleh perwakilan beg-perkataan yang sedikit. There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document.  The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future.  Penonton sasaran kami ialah peneliti dan praktek dalam pembelajaran mesin, penghuraian (sintaktik dan semantik) dan teknologi bahasa, tidak perlu pakar dalam MWEs, yang berminat dalam tugas yang melibatkan atau boleh berguna daripada mempertimbangkan MWEs sebagai fenomena luas dalam bahasa manusia dan komunikasi.", 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d NLP പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വളരെ വാക്ക് കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സാഹചര്യത്തില്\u200d, ഏറ്റവും എംഎല്\u200dപി സമീപത്തില്\u200d, രേഖകളോ വാക്കുകളോ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരു സ്പാസ് ബാഗ്- ഓഫ് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിന ഒരു വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഓരോ വാക്കോ രേഖയുടെയോ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഇപ്പോള ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളുടെയും പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധ ഈ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു വ്യക്തമായ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെയും ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും വിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും, ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും സ്വാഭ നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നവരും, പാര്\u200dജിക്കുന്നവരും, ഭാഷ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയിലുള്ള പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരും, മാന്ത്രികമായ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളും, എംവിഎസിലെ', 'mt': "Dan l-aħħar it-tagħlim fil-fond wera ħafna wegħda għall-applikazzjonijiet NLP. Tradizzjonalment, fil-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi tal-NLP, id-dokumenti jew is-sentenzi huma rappreżentati minn rappreżentazzjoni ta’ borża żgħira ta’ kliem. Issa hemm ħafna xogħol li jmur lil hinn minn dan billi tadotta rappreżentazzjoni distribwita tal-kliem, billi tibni l-hekk imsejħa 'inkorporazzjoni newrali' jew rappreżentazzjoni tal-ispazju tal-vetturi ta' kull kelma jew dokument. L-għan ta’ dan it-tutorjal huwa li jmur lil hinn mit-tagħlim tal-vetturi tal-kliem u jippreżenta metodi għat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi għall-Espressjonijiet Multikliem u l-pari tal-frażi bilingwi, li kollha huma utli għal diversi applikazzjonijiet NLP. Dan it-tutorjal għandu l-għan li jipprovdi lill-parteċipanti b’kunċett ċar tal-karatteristiċi lingwistiċi u distributtivi tal-Espressjonijiet Multikliem (MWEs), ir-rilevanza tagħhom għall-intersezzjoni tat-tagħlim profond u l-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali, liema metodi u riżorsi huma disponibbli biex jappoġġjaw l-użu tagħhom, u x’aktar jista’ jsir fil-futur. L-udjenza fil-mira tagħna huma riċerkaturi u prattikanti fit-tagħlim tal-magni, fl-analiżijiet (sintetiċi u semantiċi) u fit-teknoloġija tal-lingwi, mhux neċessarjament esperti fl-MWEs, li huma interessati f’kompiti li jinvolvu jew jistgħu jibbenefikaw mill-kunsiderazzjoni tal-MWEs bħala fenomenu mifrux fil-lingwa u l-komunikazzjoni tal-bniedem.", 'pl': 'Deep learning okazało się ostatnio wiele obiecujących dla aplikacji NLP. Tradycyjnie w większości podejść NLP dokumenty lub zdania są reprezentowane przez rzadką torbę słów. Obecnie jest dużo pracy, która wykracza poza to, przyjmując rozproszoną reprezentację słów, budując tzw. "osadzenie neuronowe" lub reprezentację przestrzeni wektorowej każdego słowa lub dokumentu. Celem tego poradnika jest wyjście poza naukę wektorów słowa i przedstawienie metod uczenia się reprezentacji wektorów dla wyrażeń wielojęzycznych i dwujęzycznych par fraz, z których wszystkie są przydatne dla różnych aplikacji NLP. Celem tego poradnika jest zapewnienie uczestnikom jasnego pojęcia o językowych i dystrybucyjnych cechach wyrażeń wielowłowych (MWE), ich znaczeniu dla przecięcia głębokiego uczenia się i przetwarzania języka naturalnego, jakie metody i zasoby są dostępne do wsparcia ich stosowania oraz co więcej można zrobić w przyszłości. Naszą grupą docelową są badacze i praktycy uczenia maszynowego, parsowania (składni i semantyczni) oraz technologia językowa, niekoniecznie eksperci MWE, którzy są zainteresowani zadaniami, które wiążą się lub mogą korzystać z uznania MWE za wszechobecne zjawisko w ludzkim języku i komunikacji.', 'ro': 'Învățarea profundă a arătat recent multă promisiune pentru aplicațiile PNL. În mod tradițional, în majoritatea abordărilor PNL, documentele sau propozițiile sunt reprezentate printr-o reprezentare rară de cuvinte. Există acum o mulțime de lucru care merge dincolo de acest lucru prin adoptarea unei reprezentări distribuite a cuvintelor, prin construirea unei așa-numite "încorporare neurală" sau reprezentare vectorială a fiecărui cuvânt sau document. Scopul acestui tutorial este de a merge dincolo de învățarea vectorilor de cuvinte și de a prezenta metode de învățare a reprezentărilor vectoriale pentru expresii multicuvinte și perechi de fraze bilingve, toate acestea fiind utile pentru diferite aplicații NLP. Acest tutorial își propune să ofere participanților o noțiune clară a caracteristicilor lingvistice și distribuționale ale expresiilor multiword (MWE), relevanța acestora pentru intersecția învățării profunde și procesarea limbajului natural, ce metode și resurse sunt disponibile pentru a sprijini utilizarea lor și ce altceva ar putea fi făcut în viitor. Publicul nostru țintă sunt cercetători și practicieni în învățarea automată, parsing (sintactică și semantică) și tehnologie lingvistică, nu neapărat experți în MWE, care sunt interesați de sarcini care implică sau ar putea beneficia de a considera MWE ca un fenomen pervasiv în limbajul uman și comunicarea.', 'sr': "Duboko učenje nedavno pokazuje mnogo obećanja za NLP aplikacije. Tradicionalno, u većini pristupa NLP, dokumenti ili rečenice predstavljaju rezervna vreća reči. Sada postoji mnogo posla koji prolazi izvan ovoga usvajanjem raspodjeljenog predstavljanja riječi, konstruiranjem takozvanog 'neuralnog ugrađenja' ili predstavljanjem svemira vektora svake riječi ili dokumenta. Cilj ovog nastavnog učenja je da pređemo preko učenja vektora riječi i prisutnih metoda učenja vektora predstavljanja za višeriječne izraze i dvojezičke parove fraze, koje su koristne za različite aplikacije NLP-a. Ovaj nastavni cilj je pružiti sudionicima jasnu ideju o jezičkim i distribucijskim karakteristikama višeriječnih izraza (MWEs), njihovoj relevantnosti za prekidanje dubokog učenja i prirodnog obrazovanja jezika, koje su metode i resurse dostupne da podrže njihovu upotrebu i što bi se moglo učiniti u budućnosti. Naša ciljna publika su istraživači i praktičnici u učenju mašina, analiziranju (sintaktične i semantične) i jezičke tehnologije, ne nužno stručnjaci u MWEs-ima, koji su zainteresovani za zadatke koje uključuju ili mogu koristiti od razmatranja MWE-a kao široki fenomen ljudskog jezika i komunikacije.", 'so': "Waxbarashada hoose ee ugu dhowaad ah waxaa muuqday ballan badan ee codsiga NLP. Inta caadiga ah, waxaa soo dhowaadaa dhaqdhaqaaq badan oo NLP ah, dukumenti ama sentences waxaa lagu soo representaa muuqasho baas oo hadal badan. Imminka waxaa jira shuqul badan oo ka shisheeya hadalka lagu kala qaybiyey, taas oo ku sameynaya qoraal aad u leedahay 'kooxo' ama mid ka mid ah wadista wadista waddanka ama warqad kasta. Ujeedada waxbarashadan waa in aad ka baxdo barashada wadiiqooyinka hadalka iyo qaababka joogta ah ee barashada wadiiqooyinka wadanka oo u eg labada af badan iyo labada luqadood, kuwaas oo dhamaantood faa’iido u leh codsiga NLP oo kala duduwan. Waxbarashadan waxaa loogu talagalay in qofka hoggaamiya hagitaan muuqasho cad ah oo ku saabsan isticmaalka luuqadaha iyo kala duduwanka (MWEs), muhiimka u ah xiliga waxbarashada mool dheer iyo baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah, qaababka iyo resources ay u heli karaan in ay kaalmeeyaan isticmaalkooda, iyo waxa kale oo la samayn karo mustaqbalka dambe. Dhagaheenna waxyaabaha la'aanta ah waa wax baarayaal ah iyo kuwa ka shaqeeya barashada machadka, baaritaanka (syntactic iyo semantic) iyo teknolojiga afka luuqada, mana aha mid qasab ah khabiir ah ee MWEs ku jira, kuwaas oo ka xiiseynaya shaqooyin ku saabsan ama faa’iido ka hela ka fiirsashada MWEs sida xaalad faro badan oo ku saabsan luqada iyo xiriirka dadka.", 'no': 'Deep læring har nyleg vist mykje læring for NLP- program. Tradisjonelt, i dei fleste NLP-tilnærmingane, vert dokument eller setningar representerte av eit spesielt ord-pakk. Det er no mykje arbeid som går over dette ved å adoptera eit distribuert representasjon av ord ved å konstruere eit så kalla « neuralinnbygging » eller vektorromrepresentasjon av kvar ord eller dokument. Målet på denne opplæringa er å gå over læringa av ordvektorar og gjeldende metodar for å lære vektorrepresentasjonar for fleire ord uttrykk og bilinguelt frase par, alle som er nyttig for ulike NLP-program. Dette opplæringsmålet er å gje deltakarane med ein klar noe om dei lingviske og distribusjonske karakteristikaren av fleire ord uttrykk (MWEs), deres relevante for avkryssinga av dypt læring og naturspråkshandtering, kva metodar og ressursar er tilgjengelege for å støtta bruken sine og kva meir kan gjerast i framtida. Målet publikumet våre er forskere og praktisere i maskinelæring, analysering (syntaktisk og semantisk) og språk-teknologi, ikkje nødvendig eksperter i MWEs, som er interesserte i oppgåver som involverer eller kunne fordel frå å å forstå MWEs som eit utvidende fenomen i menneske språk og kommunikasjon.', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах нь NLP хэрэглээнд маш их амлалтыг харуулсан. Ихэнх NLP-ын ойлголтын тулд баримт эсвэл өгүүлбэрүүдийг бага зэрэг илэрхийлэгддэг. Үүнээс гадна олон ажил байгаа бөгөөд үг эсвэл баримт бүрийн хэлбэрээр хуваагдсан хэлбэрийг ашиглан "мэдрэлийн солилцоо" эсвэл вектор орон зай бий болгож байна. Энэ сургалтын зорилго бол векторуудын суралцах, олон үгийн илэрхийлэл, хоёр хэлний хэлний хоёр хэлбэрүүдийг суралцах векторуудын тусламжтайгаас илүү ашигтай. Энэ сургалтын зорилго нь олон хэлний илэрхийллийн хэлний, тархалтын харилцааны тодорхой ойлголт, гүн гүнзгий суралцах, байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн харилцааны хамаарал, хэрхэн арга болон нөөц ашиглах боломжтой вэ, ирээдүйд юу хийх боломжтой вэ? Бидний зорилготой сонсогчид бол машин суралцах, шинжилгээ (синтактик, семантик) болон хэл технологийг судлаачид, мэргэжилтнүүд, MWEs-ийн мэргэжилтнүүд биш. Тэд MWEs-г хүний хэл болон харилцааны шинжлэх ухаан гэж бодох эсвэл ашиг авч чадна.', 'sv': 'Deep learning har nyligen visat mycket lovande för NLP-tillämpningar. Traditionellt representeras dokument eller meningar i de flesta NLP-tillvägagångssätt av en gles säck med ord representation. Det finns nu mycket arbete som går utöver detta genom att anta en distribuerad representation av ord, genom att konstruera en så kallad "neural embedding" eller vektor rymdrepresentation av varje ord eller dokument. Syftet med denna handledning är att gå bortom lärandet av ordvektorer och presentera metoder för att lära vektorrepresentationer för flerordsuttryck och tvåspråkiga fraspar, som alla är användbara för olika NLP-applikationer. Denna handledning syftar till att ge deltagarna en tydlig uppfattning om de språkliga och distributiva egenskaperna hos Multiword Expressions (MWE), deras relevans för skärningspunkten mellan djupinlärning och naturlig språkbehandling, vilka metoder och resurser som finns tillgängliga för att stödja deras användning och vad mer kan göras i framtiden. Vår målgrupp är forskare och praktiker inom maskininlärning, tolkning (syntaktisk och semantisk) och språkteknik, inte nödvändigtvis experter på MWE, som är intresserade av uppgifter som involverar eller kan dra nytta av att betrakta MWE som ett genomgripande fenomen i mänskligt språk och kommunikation.', 'ta': "ஆழமான கற்றல் அண்மையில் NLP பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு நிறைய வாக்குறுதியை காட்டியிருக்கிறது. பாரம்பரிய, பெரும்பாலான NLP நெருங்குகளில், ஆவணங்கள் அல்லது வாக்குகள் ஒரு சிறிய பாக்- வார்த்தைகளின் குறிப்பிட There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document.  இந்த பொருளின் இலக்கு சொல்ல் நெறிகள் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தற்போதைய முறைமைகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பல வார்த்தை கூறுகள் மற்றும் இரு மொழி சொற்றொடர் ஜோடிகளுக் இந்த பொருள் சேர்ந்தவர்களுக்கு ஒரு தெளிவான குறிப்புரையை அளிக்கும் பல வார்த்தை கூறுகளின் மொழி மற்றும் பங்கீட்டு பண்புகள் (MWEs), ஆழமான கற்றல் மற்றும் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட எங்கள் இலக்கு பார்வைகள் கணினி கற்றல், பாடல் (ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் பாடல்) மற்றும் மொழி தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள், மற்றும் பயிற்சியாளர்கள், எம்விஎஸில் உள்ள விஷயங்களில் சேர்க்க", 'si': 'Name සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන්, බොහෝ NLP වලින්, ලිපින් හෝ වචන් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණිත කරනවා. දැන් වැඩිය ගොඩක් වැඩක් තියෙනවා මේකට වඩා විතරයි වචනයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්චාරයක් ගන්න, හැම වචනයක්ම හැම වචනයක්ම හැම වචනයක්ම නිර්මා මේ අදහසක් තමයි වචන වෙක්ටර් වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නයි වචන වෙක්ටර් වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න වෙක්ටර් වලින් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධානය සහ දෙවිල මේ උපදේශයේ අදහස් සඳහා භාෂාවික සහ විශේෂිත විශේෂතාව (MWE), ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාව ගොඩක් ඉගැනීම සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පැහැදිලි භාෂාවිකාරී අපේ ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයේ පරීක්ෂකයෝ සහ ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ සහ භාෂා තාක්ෂණය, MWE වල භාෂාව සහ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200d', 'ur': "عمیق تعلیم نے NLP کے لئے بہت سے وعدہ دکھائی ہے۔ پیغمبر، اکثر NLP کے پاس پہنچ جاتے ہیں، دلیلیں یا جماعتوں کے ذریعہ ایک چھوٹی بات کی باتوں کی تصویر کی جاتی ہیں. اب بہت سی کام ہیں جو اس سے زیادہ گزرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کی تقسیم کرنے کے ذریعہ کلمات کی ایک توزیع کی تصویر کریں، اس طرح نامیدہ 'نیورال انڈینگ' یا ہر کلمات یا سند کی ویکتور فضا کی تصویر کریں۔ اس تعلیم کی هدف یہ ہے کہ کلمات ویکتروں کی تعلیم سے زیادہ اور موجود طریقے سکھانے کے لئے ویکتروں کی تعلیم کے لئے بہت سی کلمات مثالیں اور دو زبان کلمات جوڑوں کے لئے فائدہ اٹھائیں، جو سب مختلف NLP کاربرد کے لئے فائدہ اٹھائے جاتے یہ تدریس کا مطابق ہے کہ مشرکوں کو ایک واضح نظر ملے گا کہ ان کے مطابق بہت سی کلمات مثالیں (MWEs) کی زبان شناسی اور تقسیم کی خصوصیات کے ذریعہ، ان کی تعلیم اور طبیعی زبان پردازی کے مطابق ان کے استعمال کی مدد کرنے کے لئے کس طریقے اور منابع موجود ہیں اور آینده میں کیا بھی زیاد ہمارے مقررہ اڈیونٹر ماشین کی تعلیم، پارسی اور زبان تکنولوژی میں تحقیق کرنے والے ہیں، جو MWEs میں مطابق علم والے نہیں ہیں، جو MWEs کو انسان زبان اور ارتباط میں گھیرے ہوئے دکھائے ہوئے کاموں میں علاقہ رکھتے ہیں یا فائدہ دیتے ہیں.", 'vi': 'Việc học sâu đã đem lại nhiều hứa hẹn cho ứng dụng NLP. Theo truyền thống, trong hầu hết các phương pháp Njala, văn bản hay câu án đều được đại diện bởi một cách rõ ràng. Bây giờ có rất nhiều việc vượt qua việc này bằng cách phát triển các từ, xây dựng một sự nhúng vào thần kinh hay đại diện không gian vector của từng từ hay tài liệu. Mục đích của bài tập này là vượt xa việc học các từ véc- tơ và phương pháp hiện thời để dạy các biểu tượng vector cho các chữ phun đa từ và các cụm từ hai, tất cả đều có ích cho các ứng dụng ngôn ngữ khác. Mục đích huấn luyện này là cung cấp cho người tham dự một khái niệm rõ ràng về các tính chất ngôn ngữ và phân phát của đa Từ Biểu hiện (MWEs), về sự liên quan của chúng cho việc giao nhau của sự hiểu biết sâu và xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, về phương pháp và nguồn lực có thể sử dụng của chúng, và những gì có thể được làm trong tương lai. Đối tượng của chúng tôi là các nhà nghiên cứu và thực tập về kỹ thuật máy móc, phân tích (cú pháp và ngữ pháp) và kỹ thuật ngôn ngữ, không nhất thiết là chuyên gia ở MWEs, những người hứng thú với các công việc liên quan hoặc có thể được coi MWEs là một hiện tượng lây lan trong ngôn ngữ và giao tiếp con người.', 'uz': "Deep learning has recently shown much promise for NLP applications.  @ info Bu yerda ko'p ishlar mavjud. Bu so'zlar yoki hujjatning har bir so'z yoki vektor boʻsh joyini yaratish mumkin. Bu o'qituvchi maqsadi, so'zlar vektorlarini o'rganishdan foydalanish va ko'p so'zlar va ikki lugʻri bir so'zlarni o'rganish usullarini o'rganish uchun foydalanishi mumkin. Bu hamma narsa boshqa NLP dasturlariga foydalanadi. Bu o'qituvchi muammolar Multiword Expression (MWEs), eng yuqori o'rganish va tabiiy tillar boshqaruvi qismlari, foydalanish uchun nima metodlari va rasmlarni qoʻllash mumkin, va kelajada qanday qo'llanma oladi. Shaxsiy maqsadimizning taʼminlovchilar, mashinalar o'rganish, birlashtirish (syntactic va semantik) va tillar teknologiya taʼminlovchilarimiz emas, balki MWEsdagi ekspert emas. Bu amalgan vazifalar ham qiziqarishi yoki MWEsni inson tilda va bog'lash uchun juda katta narsalar deb hisoblash mumkin.", 'da': "Deep learning har for nylig vist meget lovende for NLP applikationer. Traditionelt er dokumenter eller sætninger i de fleste NLP-tilgange repræsenteret af en sparsom pose-of-word repræsentation. Der er nu en masse arbejde, der går videre end dette ved at vedtage en distribueret repræsentation af ord, ved at konstruere en såkaldt 'neural embedding' eller vektor rum repræsentation af hvert ord eller dokument. Formålet med denne tutorial er at gå videre end læringen af ordvektorer og præsentere metoder til at lære vektorrepræsentationer for Multiword Expressions og tosprogede sætningspar, som alle er nyttige til forskellige NLP applikationer. Denne tutorial har til formål at give deltagerne en klar idé om de sproglige og fordelingsmæssige karakteristika ved Multiword Expressions (MWE), deres relevans for krydsningen af dyb læring og naturlig sprogbehandling, hvilke metoder og ressourcer der er til rådighed for at understøtte deres brug, og hvad mere kan gøres i fremtiden. Vores målgruppe er forskere og praktikere inden for maskinlæring, parsing (syntaktisk og semantisk) og sprogteknologi, ikke nødvendigvis eksperter i MWE, der er interesserede i opgaver, der involverer eller kunne drage fordel af at betragte MWE som et gennemtrængende fænomen i menneskeligt sprog og kommunikation.", 'bg': 'Дълбокото обучение напоследък показа много обещание за приложенията за НЛП. Традиционно, в повечето подходи на НЛП, документите или изреченията са представени от рядко представяне на торба с думи. Сега има много работа, която отива отвъд това чрез приемане на разпределено представяне на думите, чрез изграждане на т.нар. "невронно вграждане" или векторно пространство представяне на всяка дума или документ. Целта на този урок е да отиде отвъд изучаването на вектори на думи и да представи методи за изучаване на векторни представи за многословни изрази и двуезични фрази двойки, всички от които са полезни за различни приложения. Този урок има за цел да предостави на участниците ясна представа за езиковите и дистрибуционните характеристики на многословните изрази (МВС), тяхното значение за пресечната точка на дълбокото учене и обработката на естествения език, какви методи и ресурси са налични за подпомагане на използването им и какво повече може да се направи в бъдеще. Нашата целева аудитория са изследователи и практикуващи в областта на машинното обучение, анализа (синтактичен и семантичен) и езиковите технологии, а не непременно експерти в МУЗ, които се интересуват от задачи, които включват или биха могли да се възползват от разглеждането на МУЗ като широко разпространено явление в човешкия език и комуникацията.', 'nl': "Deep learning heeft de laatste tijd veel beloftevol getoond voor NLP-toepassingen. Traditioneel worden documenten of zinnen in de meeste NLP-benaderingen vertegenwoordigd door een schaarse zak met woorden. Er is nu veel werk dat verder gaat door een gedistribueerde weergave van woorden aan te nemen, door een zogenaamde 'neurale embedding' of vectorruimterepresentatie van elk woord of document te construeren. Het doel van deze tutorial is om verder te gaan dan het leren van woordvectoren en methoden voor het leren van vectorrepresentaties voor meerwoordexpressies en tweetalige zinnenparen te presenteren, die allemaal nuttig zijn voor verschillende NLP-toepassingen. Deze tutorial is bedoeld om deelnemers een duidelijk beeld te geven van de taalkundige en distributionele kenmerken van Multiword Expressions (MWE's), hun relevantie voor het kruispunt van deep learning en natuurlijke taalverwerking, welke methoden en middelen beschikbaar zijn om het gebruik ervan te ondersteunen en wat er in de toekomst nog meer kan worden gedaan. Onze doelgroep zijn onderzoekers en beoefenaars in machine learning, parsing (syntactisch en semantisch) en taaltechnologie, niet noodzakelijkerwijs experts in MWE's, die geïnteresseerd zijn in taken die MWE's omvatten of zouden kunnen profiteren van het beschouwen van MWE's als een alomvattend fenomeen in menselijke taal en communicatie.", 'hr': "Duboko učenje nedavno pokazalo je mnogo obećanja za NLP aplikacije. Tradicionalno, u većini pristupa NLP-a, dokumenti ili rečenice predstavljaju rezervna vreća riječi. Sada postoji dosta posla koji ide izvan ovoga usvajanjem raspodjeljenog predstavljanja riječi, konstruiranjem takozvanog 'neuralnog ugrađenja' ili predstavljanjem svemira vektora svake riječi ili dokumenta. Cilj ove nastavnice je da se izvuče više od učenja riječi vektora i sadašnja metoda učenja vektora predstavljanja za višeriječne izraze i dvojezičke parove fraze, koje su koristne za različite primjene NLP-a. Ovaj nastavni cilj je pružiti sudionicima jasnu ideju o jezičkim i distribucijskim karakteristikama višeriječnih izraza (MWEs), njihovoj relevantnosti za prekidanje dubokog učenja i prirodnog obrazovanja jezika, koje su metode i resurse dostupne za podršku njihove uporabe i što bi se moglo učiniti u budućnosti. Naša ciljna publika su istraživači i praktičari u učenju strojeva, analiziranju (sintaktične i semantične) i jezičke tehnologije, ne nužno stručnjaci MWEs-a, koji su zainteresovani za zadatke koje uključuju ili mogu koristiti od razmatranja MWE-a kao široki fenomen u ljudskom jeziku i komunikaciji.", 'de': 'Deep Learning hat in letzter Zeit viel versprechend für NLP-Anwendungen gezeigt. Traditionell werden in den meisten NLP-Ansätzen Dokumente oder Sätze durch eine spärliche Sack-of-Wortdarstellung dargestellt. Es gibt jetzt viel Arbeit, die darüber hinaus geht, indem eine verteilte Darstellung von Wörtern übernommen wird, indem eine sogenannte "neuronale Einbettung" oder Vektorraumdarstellung jedes Wortes oder Dokuments konstruiert wird. Das Ziel dieses Tutorials ist es, über das Erlernen von Wortvektoren hinauszugehen und Methoden zum Erlernen von Vektorrepräsentationen für Mehrwortausdrücke und zweisprachige Phrasenpaare vorzustellen, die alle für verschiedene NLP-Anwendungen nützlich sind. Ziel dieses Tutorials ist es, den Teilnehmern einen klaren Überblick über die linguistischen und Verteilungsmerkmale von Multiword Expressions (MWEs), ihre Relevanz für die Schnittstelle von Deep Learning und natürlicher Sprachverarbeitung zu geben, welche Methoden und Ressourcen zur Unterstützung ihrer Verwendung zur Verfügung stehen und was in Zukunft noch mehr getan werden könnte. Unsere Zielgruppe sind Forscher und Praktiker in den Bereichen maschinelles Lernen, Parsing (syntaktisch und semantisch) und Sprachtechnologie, nicht unbedingt Experten in MWEs, die an Aufgaben interessiert sind, die MWEs als allgemeines Phänomen in der menschlichen Sprache und Kommunikation betrachten oder davon profitieren könnten.', 'fa': 'یادگیری عمیق اخیرا برای کاربردهای NLP قول زیادی را نشان داده است. معمولاً در بیشتر نزدیک\u200cهای NLP، سند\u200cها یا جمله\u200cها توسط نمایش کیف\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای کوچک نمایش می\u200cشوند. در حال حاضر کار زیادی وجود دارد که از این بیرون می رود با پذیرفتن نمایش جدایی از کلمات با ساختن یک نوع نامیدهٔ ابتدایی عصبی یا نمایش فضای ویکتور هر کلمات یا سند. هدف این تعلیم این است که بیشتر از یادگیری ویکتورهای کلمه و روش\u200cهای موجود برای یادگیری واکنش ویکتورهای متعدد کلمه\u200cها و جفت\u200cهای عبارت دو زبان باشد، همه آنها برای کاربردهای متعدد NLP مفید هستند. این هدف آموزشی برای مشتریان به عنوان یک نظر روشنی از ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cی واژه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cشناسی (MWEs) برای تقسیم آموزشی عمیق و پرداخت زبان طبیعی، چه روش\u200cها و منابع برای پشتیبانی استفاده از آنها وجود دارند و چه کاری بیشتر در آینده انجام می\u200cشود. تماشاگران هدف ما تحقیقات کنندگان و تمرین کنندگان در یادگیری ماشین، تقسیم (syntactic and semantic) و تکنولوژی زبان هستند، نه به طور ضروری متخصص در MWEs، که علاقه دارند به کار هایی که شامل یا می توانند سود دهند از نظر MWEs به عنوان یک پدیده گسترده در زبان و ارتباط انسان باشند.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda gaty öwrenmek NLP programleri üçin köp söz berdi. Adatça Bütün bunlardan ötesinde, her söz ya da senediň dağıtılan ifadelerini kabul eden çok iş var. Bu eğitim amacı, vektörler kelime öğrenmesinin ve çoklu kelime ifadeleri ve iki dil çift ifadeleri için vektör ifadelerini öğrenmek için kullanılan yöntemlerden uzaklaşmaktır. Bu tutumçy gatnaşmakçylara Multiword Expression (MWEs) dilleriniň garyp öwrenmeniň we tebigy dilleriniň işlemleriniň içinde nähili yöntemleri we resurslaryň ullanyşyny we gelejekde näme edip biljekdigini düşünmek üçin düşündirmek amaçlary. Biziň maksadatly publikamyz maşynyň öwrenmegi, çykyş(syntaktik we semantik) we dil teknolojisi, MWEs-de ukyply uzmanlary däl, MWE-lary adam dilinde we komunikaýasynda örän uly bir parça bolup bilen täsirleýän zadlary alyp bilen alyp bilen mejbur edýärler.', 'af': "Deep leer het onlangs baie belofte vertoon vir NLP toepassings. Tradisjoneel word in die meeste NLP toegang, dokumente of setnings verteenwoordig deur 'n spanseer sak van woorde-voorstelling. Daar is nou 'n baie werk wat buite hierdie gaan deur 'n verspreidige voorstelling van woorde te aanvaar deur 'n so-genoem 'neurale inbêring' of vektorruimte voorstelling van elke woord of dokument te konstrukteer. Die doel van hierdie onderwerp is om buite die leer van woord vektore en voorneemde metodes vir die leer van vektorvoorstellings vir Multiword Utdrukking en twee tale frase paar te gaan, almal wat bruikbaar is vir verskillende NLP toepassings. Hierdie onderwyseling doel om deelnaders te verskaf met 'n duidelike idee van die lingvisse en verspreidingse karakteristieke van Multiword Expressions (MWEs), hulle relevansie vir die interseksie van diep leer en natuurlike taal verwerking, wat metodes en hulpbronne beskikbaar is om hul gebruik te ondersteun, en wat meer in die toekoms kan gedoen word. Ons doel publikaat is ondersoekers en praktisers in masjien leer, verwerking (sintaktika en semantiese) en taal tegnologie, nie noodsaaklik eksperte in MWEs, wat geinteresseer word in opdragte wat die MWEs insluit of kan voordeel van te neem as 'n vaste fenomen in menslike taal en kommunikasie.", 'ko': "딥러닝은 최근 NLP 응용의 커다란 전망을 보여 준다.전통적으로 대부분의 NLP 방법에서 문서나 문장은 드문드문 한 봉지의 단어로 표시된다.현재 많은 작업들이 이 점을 초월하여 단어의 분포식 표시를 이용하여 이른바'신경 삽입'이나 모든 단어나 문서의 벡터 공간 표시를 구축한다.이 자습서의 목적은 단순히 단어의 벡터를 배우는 것이 아니라 다양한 NLP 애플리케이션에 적용되는 다중 단어 표현식과 이중 언어 쌍의 벡터 표현을 배우는 방법도 소개합니다.이 강좌는 회의 참가자들에게 다사표현(MWE)의 언어와 분포 특징에 대한 명확한 개념을 제공하고 깊이 있는 학습과 자연 언어 처리의 교차점과 관련성을 가지며 어떤 방법과 자원이 그들의 사용을 지원할 수 있는지, 그리고 미래에 무엇을 할 수 있는지를 제시하고자 한다.우리의 목표 시청자는 기계 학습, 문법 분석(문법과 의미)과 언어 기술 분야의 연구원과 실천자이다. 그들은 반드시 MWE 분야의 전문가가 아니다. 그들은 MWE를 인류의 언어와 교류에 보편적으로 존재하는 현상으로 간주하거나 이익을 얻을 수 있는 임무에 흥미를 느낀다.", 'am': "ጠለቅ ትምህርት በቅርብ ጊዜ ለNLP ፕሮግራሞች ብዙ ተስፋ ማሳየት ተገልጦአል፡፡ Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation.  There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document.  የዚህ ትምህርት ትምህርት የቃላት vector እና የአሁኑን መንገዶች ለመማር እና ለብዙ ቃላት እና ለቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና ለሁለት ዓይነቶች የሚጠቅሙ ለNLP ፕሮግራሞች ተግባር ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት ተሟጋቾችን የMultiword Expression (MWEs), ጥልቅ ትምህርት እና ፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ግንኙነት፣ የትኛው ዓይነት እና ሀብት መጠቀምን ለመደገፍ የሚችሉትን እና በምን ይችላል፣ በሚመጣው ምን ይሠራል፡፡ አካባሪዎቻችን ማስተማሪዎች፣ ማኅተም እና የቋንቋ ቴክሎጂ፣ በመስመር እና ለቋንቋ ቴክኖጂዎች ናቸው፣ በአስቸጋሪ፣ MWEs በሚያስፈልጉት ወይም በሚጠቅሙት ስርዓቶች ላይ የሚጠቅሙ ወይም የሚጠቅሙት ማህበራዊ ጉዳይ በሰው ቋንቋ እና በመግለጫዎች ላይ የሚደረጉ አካባቢዎች ናቸው፡፡", 'hy': 'Վերջերս խորը սովորելը շատ խոստումներ է ցույց տվել ՆԼՊ-ի ծրագրերի համար: Հաճախ, ՆԼՊ-ի մեծամասնության մոտեցումներում փաստաթղթերը կամ նախադասությունները ներկայացված են բառերի թեթև ներկայացման միջոցով: Հիմա շատ աշխատանք կա, որը սա դուրս է գալիս բառերի բաշխված ներկայացման ընդունելով, կառուցելով այսպես կոչված "նյարդային ներդրման" կամ վեկտոր տարածության ներկայացման յուրաքանչյուր բառի կամ փաստաթղթի համար: Այս դասարանի նպատակը բառերի վեկտորների ուսումնասիրությունից դուրս է գալ և ներկայացնել մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտակար են բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների և երկլեզու արտահայտությունների ուսումնասիրելու համար: Այս դասարանի նպատակն է պարզ հասկացություն տալ մասնակիցներին բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների լեզվաբանական և տարածական հատկանիշների մասին, նրանց կարևորությունը խորը սովորելու և բնական լեզվի վերամշակման փոխադարձման համար, թե ինչ մեթոդներ և ռեսուրսներ են հասանելի նրանց օգտագործման աջակցությանը, և թե ինչ կարող է Մեր նպատակային հանդիսատեսը մեքենային ուսումնասիրության, վերլուծության (սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ) և լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաների ուսումնասիրություններ են և մասնագետներ, որոնք անհրաժեշտ չեն MWE-ի մասնագետներ, ովքեր հետաքրքրված են այն խնդիրներով, որոնք ներառում են կամ կարող են շահույթ ունեն', 'az': "NLP uyğulamaları üçün çox böyük vəd göstərdi. Həmçin in NLP tərəfindən çox yaxınlaşırlar, belələr və cümlələr təşkil edilir. Bundan daha çox işlər var ki, hər sözün və beləliklə, dağıtılan sözlərin göstərilməsini qəbul edərək, nazil edilən 'nöral içərilməsi' və ya vektör boşluğunu inşa edərək. Bu öyrənmək məqsədi, söz vektörlərinin öyrənməsini və çoxlu söz ifadəsi və iki dil ifadəsi çift üçün vektörlərin öyrənməsini öyrənməsini və həmin metodların hamısı müxtəlif NLP proqramları üçün faydalanır. Bu öyrənmək məqsədilə, çoxlu söz ifadəsi (MWEs) dillərinin və dağıtılış özelliklərinin a çıq fikri ilə iştirakçilərinə, onların dərin öyrənməsi və təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün olan məqsədillərin, onların istifadəsini dəstəkləmək üçün nə metodlar və resurslar faydalanır və gələcəkdə nə daha çox edə bilər. Bizim məqsəd auditorimiz maşın öyrənməsində, sintaktik və semantik teknolojisində çalışanlar və dil teknolojisində çalışanlar, MWEs-lərdə mütləq ekspertlər deyildir, MWE-ləri insanlar dilində və komunikasiya vasitəsi olaraq düşünməkdən və ya fayda verə biləcək işlərə maraqlıdır.", 'sw': "Elimu ya kina hivi karibuni imeonyesha ahadi kubwa kwa matumizi ya NLP. Kwa kawaida, katika makubaliano mengi ya NLP, nyaraka au hukumu zinawakilishwa na uwakilishi wa mfuko mdogo wa maneno. Hivi sasa kuna kazi nyingi inayoendelea zaidi ya hili kwa kuchukua uwakilishi wa maneno, kwa kujenga kile kinachoitwa 'kuingia upande wa kisasa' au uwakilishi wa nafasi ya vector kwa kila neno au nyaraka. Lengo la somo hili ni kuendelea zaidi ya kujifunza vector za maneno na njia za sasa kwa ajili ya kujifunza uwakilizaji wa vector kwa ajili ya kujieleza kwa lugha nyingine na maneno ya lugha mbili, ambazo zote zimetumika kwa matumizi mbalimbali ya NLP. Elimu hii inakusudia kuwapa washiriki na wazo bayana kuhusu tabia za lugha na usambazaji wa maneno mengi (MWEs), umuhimu wao kwa upande wa ufundi wa kina na upasuaji wa lugha za asili, njia gani na rasilimali zinapatikana ili kuunga mkono matumizi yao, na kipi zaidi kinachoweza kufanyika mbeleni. Wasomaji wetu wa malengo ni watafiti na wataalamu katika kujifunza mashine, kuiparza (mkakati na semantic) na teknolojia ya lugha, si wataalam wa lazima katika MWEs, ambao wanavutiwa na kazi zinazohusisha au wanaweza kufaidika na kuangalia MWEs kama jambo kubwa la lugha na mawasiliano ya binadamu.", 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষা সম্প্রতি NLP অ্যাপলিকেশনের জন্য অনেক প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদর্শন করেছে। ঐতিহ্যগতভাবে, বেশীরভাগ এনএলপি কাছে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, নথিপত্র অথবা শাস্তি প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে একটি স্প্যাস ব্যাগ-অ বর্তমানে অনেক কাজ রয়েছে যা বিতরণ করা শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নেয়ার মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন প্রতিটি শব্দ বা নথিপত্রের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করেছে। এই শিক্ষার্থীর উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে শব্দ ভেক্টরের শিক্ষার বাইরে যাওয়া এবং মাল্টিওয়ার্ড এক্সপ্রেশনের জন্য ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা ও দুই ভাষার বাক্ এই শিক্ষার্থীর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ব্যবহারের সমর্থন করার জন্য ভাষাগত এবং বিতরণের বৈশিষ্ট্য (এমডিউএসএস), গভীর শিক্ষা এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে তাদের Our target audience are researchers and practitioners in machine learning, parsing (syntactic and semantic) and language technology, not necessarily experts in MWEs, who are interested in tasks that involve or could benefit from considering MWEs as a pervasive phenomenon in human language and communication.', 'bs': "Duboko učenje nedavno pokazuje mnogo obećanja za NLP aplikacije. Tradicionalno, u većini pristupa NLP, dokumenti ili rečenice predstavljaju rezervna vreća riječi. Sada postoji mnogo posla koji ide izvan ovoga usvajanjem raspodjeljenog predstavljanja riječi, konstruiranjem takozvanog 'neuralnog ugrađenja' ili predstavljanjem svemira vektora svake riječi ili dokumenta. Cilj ovog nastavnog učenja je da pređemo preko učenja vektora riječi i sadašnjih metoda za učenje vektora predstavljanja za Multiword Expressions i dvojezičke fraze, sve koje su korisne za različite aplikacije NLP-a. Ovaj nastavni cilj je pružiti sudionicima jasnu ideju o jezičkim i distribucijskim karakteristikama višeriječnih izraza (MWEs), njihovoj relevantnosti za prekidanje dubokog učenja i prirodnog obrazovanja jezika, koje su metode i resurse dostupne za podršku njihove uporabe i što bi se moglo učiniti u budućnosti. Naša ciljna publika su istraživači i praktičnici u učenju strojeva, analiziranju (sintaktične i semantične) i jezičke tehnologije, a ne nužno stručnjaci u MWEs-ima, koji su zainteresovani za zadatke koje uključuju ili mogu koristiti od razmatranja MWE-a kao široki fenomen ljudskog jezika i komunikacije.", 'cs': 'Hluboké učení se v poslední době ukázalo velmi slibné pro aplikace NLP. Tradičně, ve většině NLP přístupů jsou dokumenty nebo věty reprezentovány řídkou taškou slov reprezentace. V současné době je mnoho práce, která přesahuje to přijetím distribuované reprezentace slov, vytvořením tzv. "neuronového vkládání" nebo vektorového prostoru reprezentace každého slova či dokumentu. Cílem tohoto návodu je překročit výuku slovních vektorů a prezentovat metody učení se vektorových reprezentací pro víceslovní výrazy a dvojjazyčné frázové páry, z nichž všechny jsou užitečné pro různé aplikace NLP. Cílem tohoto kurzu je poskytnout účastníkům jasný představu o jazykových a distribučních charakteristikách víceslovných výrazů (MWE), jejich významu pro průsečík hlubokého učení a zpracování přirozeného jazyka, jaké metody a zdroje jsou k dispozici na podporu jejich používání a co dalšího lze udělat v budoucnu. Naší cílovou skupinou jsou výzkumníci a odborníci v oblasti strojového učení, parsing (syntaktické a sémantické) a jazykové technologie, ne nutně odborníci na MWE, kteří se zajímají o úkoly, které zahrnují nebo by mohly mít prospěch z považování MWE za všudypřítomný jev v lidském jazyce a komunikaci.', 'et': 'Sügavõpe on hiljuti näidanud palju lubadusi uue õppeprogrammi rakenduste jaoks. Traditsiooniliselt esindatakse enamikus NLP lähenemisviisides dokumente või lauseid hõreda sõnakoti esitusega. Nüüd on palju tööd, mis läheb sellest kaugemale, võttes vastu sõnade hajutatud esituse, ehitades niinimetatud "neuraalse manustamise" või vektoriruumi esituse iga sõna või dokumendi. Selle õpetuse eesmärk on minna kaugemale sõnavaktorite õppimisest ja tutvustada meetodeid vektorikujutuste õppimiseks mitmesõnaliste avaldiste ja kakskeelsete fraasipaaride jaoks, mis kõik on kasulikud erinevate NLP rakenduste jaoks. Selle õppetunni eesmärk on anda osalejatele selge arusaam mitmesõnaliste väljendite keelelistest ja levitatavatest omadustest, nende olulisusest sügavõppe ja looduskeele töötlemise ristumisel, millised meetodid ja ressursid on kättesaadavad nende kasutamise toetamiseks ja mida rohkem saaks tulevikus teha. Meie sihtrühmaks on masinõppe, parsimise (süntaktilise ja semantilise) ja keeletehnoloogia teadlased ja praktikud, mitte tingimata MWE eksperdid, kes on huvitatud ülesannetest, mis hõlmavad või võivad kasu saada MWE käsitlemisest inimkeele ja kommunikatsiooni leviva nähtusena.', 'fi': 'Syväoppiminen on viime aikoina osoittanut paljon lupaavaa NLP-sovelluksille. Perinteisesti useimmissa NLP-lähestymistavoissa asiakirjoja tai lauseita edustaa harva sanapussi. Nyt on paljon työtä, joka menee tätä pidemmälle omaksumalla hajautettu sanojen esitys, rakentamalla niin sanottu "neuroupotus" tai vektoriavaruusesitys jokaisesta sanasta tai asiakirjasta. Tämän opetusohjelman tavoitteena on mennä sanavektorien oppimista pidemmälle ja esitellä menetelmiä vektoriesitysten oppimiseen monikielisille lauseille ja kaksikielisille lausepareille, jotka kaikki ovat hyödyllisiä eri NLP-sovelluksissa. Tämän opetusohjelman tavoitteena on antaa osallistujille selkeä käsitys monikanavaisten ilmaisujen kielellisistä ja jakelullisistä ominaisuuksista, niiden merkityksestä syväoppimisen ja luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn risteyksessä, mitä menetelmiä ja resursseja on saatavilla tukemaan niiden käyttöä ja mitä enemmän voitaisiin tehdä tulevaisuudessa. Kohderyhmämme ovat koneoppimisen, jäsentämisen (syntaktisen ja semanttisen) ja kieliteknologian tutkijat ja ammattilaiset, eivät välttämättä MWE:n asiantuntijat, jotka ovat kiinnostuneita tehtävistä, jotka sisältävät tai voisivat hyötyä siitä, että MWE:t pidetään ihmisen kielen ja viestinnän yleismaailmallisena ilmiönä.', 'sq': "Mësimi i thellë ka treguar kohët e fundit shumë premtime për aplikimet NLP. Tradicionalisht, në shumicën e qasjeve të NLP, dokumentet apo fjalët janë përfaqësuar nga një përfaqësim i vogël i çantës së fjalëve. There is now a lot of work which goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document.  Qëllimi i këtij mësimi është të shkojë përtej mësimit të vektorëve të fjalëve dhe metodave të prezentuara për mësimin e përfaqësimeve të vektorëve për shprehjet shumëfjalëshe dhe çiftet e frazëve dygjuhëse, të gjitha të cilat janë të dobishme për aplikimet e ndryshme NLP. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future.  Publiku ynë synues janë kërkues dhe praktikantë në mësimin e makinave, analizimin (sintaktik dhe semantik) dhe teknologjinë gjuhësore, jo domosdoshmërisht ekspertë në MWEs, të cilët janë të interesuar në detyra që përfshijnë apo mund të përfitojnë nga konsiderimi i MWEs si një fenomen përhapës në gjuhën njerëzore dhe komunikimin.", 'id': "Deep learning has recently shown much promise for NLP applications.  Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation.  Sekarang ada banyak pekerjaan yang melampaui hal ini dengan mengadopsi perwakilan terdistribusikan kata-kata, dengan membangun yang disebut 'penyembahan saraf' atau perwakilan ruang vektor setiap kata atau dokumen. The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future.  Our target audience are researchers and practitioners in machine learning, parsing (syntactic and semantic) and language technology, not necessarily experts in MWEs, who are interested in tasks that involve or could benefit from considering MWEs as a pervasive phenomenon in human language and communication.", 'ca': "L'aprenentatge profund ha demostrat recentment molta promesa per les aplicacions del NLP. Tradicionalment, en la majoria dels enfocaments de la NLP, els documents o frases són representats per una petita representació. Ara hi ha molta feina que va més enllà d'això adoptant una representació distribuïda de paraules, construint una denominada 'incorporació neural' o representació espacial vector de cada paraula o document. L'objectiu d'aquest tutorial és anar més enllà de l'aprenentatge de vectors de paraules i presentar mètodes d'aprenentatge de representacions de vectors per expressions multiparaules i parells de frases bilingues, tots útils per diverses aplicacions NLP. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future.  Our target audience are researchers and practitioners in machine learning, parsing (syntactic and semantic) and language technology, not necessarily experts in MWEs, who are interested in tasks that involve or could benefit from considering MWEs as a pervasive phenomenon in human language and communication.", 'jv': 'deep Awak dhéwé, akeh NLP sing dikarepaké, dokumen karo pawaran langgar-ngomongke puteh sing nyimpen Genjer Raylan Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi kanggo nyenggawe partisane karo perusahaan kelangan langgunaké karo kabèh pakan ing Multiword Expressions Awak dhéwé tarjamahan kanggo langgar sampeyan karo perusahaan lan pakan-sampeyan karo pakem nggambar apat, winih (sinaksi lan semanti) lan uga teknôlogi, or a ngerasakno sing paling-perusahaan karo MTE, sing wis diputara sak nguasai perusahaan langgar sampeyan ingkang ora iso nggawe lan ijol-ijolan sing paling maneh dumadhi kapan banget lan komunikasi.', 'he': 'למידה עמוקה הראה לאחרונה הרבה הבטחה ליישומים NLP. Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation.  יש עכשיו הרבה עבודה שמעברת מעבר לזה באמצעות אימוץ מייצג מרוחק של מילים, על ידי בניית כ"כ"כ"כ "קיצוב עצבי" או מייצג חלל ווקטור של כל מילה או מסמך. המטרה של הלימודים האלה היא ללכת מעבר ללמוד של ווקטורים מילים ולהציג שיטות ללמוד מייצגים ווקטורים עבור ביטויים רבים מילים וזוגי ביטויים שתיים, כולם שימושיים עבור שימושים שונים NLP. הלימודים האלה מתכוונים לספק למשתתפים רעיון ברור של האופיינים הלשוניים והפיצועים של ביטוי מילים רבות (MWEs), הרלוונטיות שלהם לחצי הלימודים העמוקים ועבודת שפת טבעית, אילו שיטות ומשאבים זמינים לתמוך בשימוש שלהם, ומה עוד יכול להיות עשוי בעתיד. קהל המטרה שלנו הם חוקרים ומקצועים בלמדת מכונות, בדיקת (סינטקטיקה וסמנטית) וטכנולוגיה לשפה, לא בהכרח מומחים במשחקים של MWEs, שמעניינים במשימות שמעסקות או יכולות להועיל בלחשוב MWEs כתופעה פרווזיבית בשפה האנושית והתקשורת.', 'sk': 'Globoko učenje je v zadnjem času pokazalo veliko obetov za aplikacije NLP. Tradicionalno so v večini pristopov NLP dokumenti ali stavki predstavljeni z redkim predstavitvijo vrečke besed. Zdaj je veliko dela, ki presega to s sprejetjem porazdeljene reprezentacije besed, z gradnjo tako imenovane "nevronske vdelave" ali vektorske prostorske reprezentacije vsake besede ali dokumenta. Namen te vadnice je preseči učenje besednih vektorjev in predstaviti metode za učenje vektorskih predstavitev večbesednih izrazov in dvojezičnih fraznih parov, ki so uporabni za različne aplikacije NLP. Ta vadnica želi udeležencem zagotoviti jasno predstavo jezikovnih in distribucijskih značilnosti večbesednih izrazov (MWE), njihove pomembnosti za presečišče globokega učenja in obdelave naravnega jezika, katere metode in viri so na voljo za podporo njihove uporabe in kaj več bi bilo mogoče storiti v prihodnosti. Naša ciljna skupina so raziskovalci in strokovnjaki s področja strojnega učenja, razčlenjevanja (sintaktičnega in semantičnega) in jezikovne tehnologije, ne nujno strokovnjaki s področja strojnega učenja, ki jih zanimajo naloge, ki vključujejo ali bi lahko koristile obravnavanje strojnega učenja kot obsežnega pojava v človeškem jeziku in komunikaciji.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Traditionally, in most NLP approaches, documents or sentences are represented by a sparse bag-of-words representation.  Aka yanzu, akwai wani aiki mai yawa wanda ke ƙara bayan wannan da ya ɗauki wani mai rabo ga maganar, da ya gina wani mai kama da aka faɗa 'firgita neural' ko mai tsari ga matsayin hanya ko takardar. Yaurin wannan tutur na ƙari ko da aka sanar masu shiryori na magana kuma shiryoyin da ke yanzu wa masu sanar shiryori wa masu shiryuwa wa masu motsi na Kwamfyuta da lugha biyu, dukansu sunã da amfani ga shiryoyin ayukan NLP. Wannan muhalli na aimar wa ya bãyar da mazaɗaici da bayan wani noti na fassarar cikin harshen da rarrabẽwa na MWEs (MWEs), masu da muhimmanci wa intersection of learning na depth da aikin harshen na natura, mẽne metode da resource za'a iya amfani da su, da mẽne ne mafi canza za za'a aikata a gaba ɗaya. Madakatanmu masu amfani da mataimaki ne a cikin karatun masu karanta, masu parse (syntactic da semantic) da technical na harshen, bã da lazima masu amfani da masu aikin MWS, waɗanda ke cikin sha'anin aikin da ke haɗa ko sunã da amfani daga ka gane MWEs kamar wani abu mai girma a cikin harshen mutum da mawasicin.", 'bo': "NLP ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་ཉེ་ཆར་སྐྱོང་གི་ཁས་ལེན་པ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ན། NLP ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་ཡིག་ཚིག་རྣམས་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་པ There is now a lot of work that goes beyond this by adopting a distributed representation of words, by constructing a so-called 'neural embedding' or vector space representation of each word or document. The aim of this tutorial is to go beyond the learning of word vectors and present methods for learning vector representations for Multiword Expressions and bilingual phrase pairs, all of which are useful for various NLP applications. This tutorial aims to provide attendees with a clear notion of the linguistic and distributional characteristics of Multiword Expressions (MWEs), their relevance for the intersection of deep learning and natural language processing, what methods and resources are available to support their use, and what more could be done in the future. ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལྟ་བུ་ནི་མིག་རྩལ་ཞིབ་དང་ལས་རྩལ་བ་ཅན་ཚོ་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Tutorial : Making Better Use of the Crowd', 'ar': 'البرنامج التعليمي: الاستفادة بشكل أفضل من الجمهور', 'fr': 'Tutoriel\xa0: Mieux utiliser la foule', 'es': 'Tutorial: Cómo hacer un mejor uso de la multitud', 'pt': 'Tutorial: Fazendo melhor uso da multidão', 'ja': 'チュートリアル：クラウドを最大限に活用する', 'zh': '教程:利用群', 'hi': 'ट्यूटोरियल: भीड़ का बेहतर उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Учебник: Как лучше использовать толпу', 'ga': 'Teagaisc: Úsáid Níos Fearr a Bhaint as an Slua', 'hu': 'Oktatóanyag: A tömeg jobb kihasználása', 'ka': 'შესწავლება: უკეთესი გამოყენება', 'it': 'Tutorial: Fare un uso migliore della folla', 'kk': 'Мектеп беру: Қызметті жақсы қолдану', 'lt': 'Mokymas: Geresnis visuomenės naudojimas', 'mk': 'Научник: Подобро користење на народот', 'ms': 'Tutorial: Membuat Penggunaan Lebih Baik bagi Kelompok', 'el': 'Εγχειρίδιο: Κάνοντας καλύτερη χρήση του πλήθους', 'ml': 'ഉപദേശം: ക്രൂഡിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ലതാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tutorjali: L-Użu Aħjar tal-Grupp', 'no': 'Tillæring: Gjer bedre bruk av krøvda', 'mn': 'Боловсрол: Хүмүүсийн илүү сайн хэрэглээ', 'pl': 'Poradnik: Lepsze wykorzystanie tłumu', 'ro': 'Tutorial: Utilizarea mai bună a mulțimii', 'sr': 'Tutorija: Bolja upotreba krvotkinje', 'so': 'Waxbarasho: U sameynta si wanaagsan isticmaalka Crowd', 'si': 'ශාක්ෂාව: ක්\u200dරෝඩ් වලට වඩා හොඳ භාවිතා කරන්න', 'sv': 'Handledning: Att göra bättre användning av folkmassan', 'ta': 'பயிற்சி: குழுவின் பயன்பாட்டை சிறந்த உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'تعلیم: اچھا استعمال کرنا', 'uz': 'Taʼminlovchi: Kruttdan yaxshi foydalanish', 'vi': 'Quản lý: Cách sử dụng tốt hơn Đám đông', 'nl': 'Tutorial: Beter gebruik maken van de menigte', 'bg': 'Инструкция: По-добро използване на тълпата', 'da': 'Tutorial: At gøre bedre brug af folkemængden', 'de': 'Tutorial: Die Crowd besser nutzen', 'id': 'Tutorial: Membuat Penggunaan Kelompok Lebih Baik', 'ko': '교정: 사람들을 더욱 잘 이용하다', 'fa': 'آموزش: استفاده بهتر از کروود', 'sw': 'Tulimu: Kutengeneza matumizi bora ya msafara', 'af': 'Tutoriaal: Maak beter gebruik van die Kroud', 'tr': "Özgür: Pul'u gowy ulanmak", 'am': 'ትምህርት፦', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k: 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'শিক্ষার্থী', 'sq': 'Tutorial: Making Better Use of the Crowd', 'hy': 'Tutorial: Making Better Use of the Crowd', 'ca': 'Tutorial: Utilitzar millor la multitud', 'cs': 'Návod: Lepší využití davu', 'et': 'Õpetus: Rahva parem ärakasutamine', 'fi': 'Tutoriaali: Väkijoukon parempi hyödyntäminen', 'bs': 'Učivanje: bolje upotrebu krvlja', 'hr': 'Učivanje: Bolja upotreba krvarenja', 'he': 'לימוד: להשתמש בהרבה יותר', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vadnica: Boljša uporaba množice', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་བརྙན་རིམ། ཆེ་བ་ཅུང་གི་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན།', 'jv': 'Tulisan: Ngawe Perintah sing luwih apik Ketoke'}
{'en': 'Over the last decade, crowdsourcing has been used to harness the power of human computation to solve tasks that are notoriously difficult to solve with computers alone, such as determining whether or not an image contains a tree, rating the relevance of a website, or verifying the phone number of a business. The natural language processing community was early to embrace crowdsourcing as a tool for quickly and inexpensively obtaining annotated data to train NLP systems. Once this data is collected, it can be handed off to algorithms that learn to perform basic NLP tasks such as translation or parsing. Usually this handoff is where interaction with the crowd ends. The crowd provides the data, but the ultimate goal is to eventually take humans out of the loop. Are there better ways to make use of the crowd?In this tutorial, I will begin with a showcase of innovative uses of crowdsourcing that go beyond data collection and annotation. I will discuss applications to natural language processing and machine learning, hybrid intelligence or human in the loop AI systems that leverage the complementary strengths of humans and machines in order to achieve more than either could achieve alone, and large scale studies of human behavior online. I will then spend the majority of the tutorial diving into recent research aimed at understanding who crowdworkers are, how they behave, and what this should teach us about best practices for interacting with the crowd.', 'es': 'Durante la última década, el crowdsourcing se ha utilizado para aprovechar el poder de la computación humana para resolver tareas que son notoriamente difíciles de resolver solo con computadoras, como determinar si una imagen contiene un árbol o no, calificar la relevancia de un sitio web o verificar el número de teléfono de una empresa. La comunidad de procesamiento del lenguaje natural fue muy pronto para adoptar el crowdsourcing como una herramienta para obtener datos anotados de forma rápida y económica para entrenar los sistemas de PNL. Una vez que se recopilan estos datos, se pueden transferir a algoritmos que aprenden a realizar tareas básicas de PNL, como la traducción o el análisis. Por lo general, este traspaso es donde termina la interacción con la multitud. La multitud proporciona los datos, pero el objetivo final es sacar a los humanos del circuito. ¿Hay mejores maneras de hacer uso de la multitud? En este tutorial, comenzaré con una muestra de usos innovadores del crowdsourcing que van más allá de la recopilación de datos y la anotación. Hablaré sobre las aplicaciones al procesamiento del lenguaje natural y el aprendizaje automático, la inteligencia híbrida o los sistemas de IA «humanos en el bucle» que aprovechan las fortalezas complementarias de los humanos y las máquinas para lograr más de lo que cualquiera podría lograr por sí solo, y los estudios a gran escala del comportamiento humano en línea. Luego pasaré la mayor parte del tutorial sumergiéndome en investigaciones recientes destinadas a comprender quiénes son los trabajadores colectivos, cómo se comportan y qué debería enseñarnos esto sobre las mejores prácticas para interactuar con la multitud.', 'fr': "Au cours de la dernière décennie, le crowdsourcing a été utilisé pour exploiter la puissance de l'informatique humaine pour résoudre des tâches qui sont notoirement difficiles à résoudre avec des ordinateurs uniquement, comme déterminer si une image contient un arbre ou non, évaluer la pertinence d'un site Web ou vérifier le numéro de téléphone d'une entreprise. La communauté du traitement du langage naturel a très tôt adopté le crowdsourcing comme un outil permettant d'obtenir rapidement et à peu de frais des données annotées pour former les systèmes de PNL. Une fois ces données collectées, elles peuvent être transmises à des algorithmes qui apprennent à effectuer des tâches de base de la PNL, telles que la traduction ou l'analyse syntaxique. Habituellement, ce transfert est l'endroit où l'interaction avec la foule s'arrête. La foule fournit les données, mais le but ultime est de sortir les humains de la boucle. Existe-t-il de meilleurs moyens de profiter de la foule\xa0? Dans ce tutoriel, je vais commencer par une présentation des utilisations innovantes du crowdsourcing qui vont au-delà de la collecte de données et de l'annotation. Je parlerai des applications au traitement du langage naturel et à l'apprentissage automatique, de l'intelligence hybride ou des systèmes d'IA «\xa0humains en boucle\xa0» qui tirent parti des forces complémentaires des humains et des machines afin d'obtenir plus que ce que l'un ou l'autre pourrait réaliser seuls, et des études à grande échelle du comportement humain en ligne. Je passerai ensuite la majeure partie du tutoriel à me plonger dans des recherches récentes visant à comprendre qui sont les travailleurs participatifs, comment ils se comportent et ce que cela devrait nous apprendre sur les meilleures pratiques pour interagir avec la foule.", 'pt': 'Na última década, o crowdsourcing tem sido usado para aproveitar o poder da computação humana para resolver tarefas que são notoriamente difíceis de resolver apenas com computadores, como determinar se uma imagem contém ou não uma árvore, classificar a relevância de um site ou verificar o número de telefone de uma empresa. A comunidade de processamento de linguagem natural foi cedo para adotar o crowdsourcing como uma ferramenta para obter dados anotados de forma rápida e barata para treinar sistemas de PNL. Depois que esses dados são coletados, eles podem ser entregues a algoritmos que aprendem a executar tarefas básicas de PNL, como tradução ou análise. Normalmente, essa transferência é onde a interação com a multidão termina. A multidão fornece os dados, mas o objetivo final é eventualmente tirar os humanos do circuito. Existem maneiras melhores de usar a multidão? Neste tutorial, começarei com uma demonstração de usos inovadores de crowdsourcing que vão além da coleta de dados e anotação. Discutirei aplicações para processamento de linguagem natural e aprendizado de máquina, inteligência híbrida ou sistemas de IA “humanos em loop” que aproveitam os pontos fortes complementares de humanos e máquinas para alcançar mais do que qualquer um poderia alcançar sozinho e estudos em larga escala do comportamento humano conectados. Em seguida, passarei a maior parte do tutorial mergulhando em pesquisas recentes destinadas a entender quem são os crowdworkers, como eles se comportam e o que isso deve nos ensinar sobre as melhores práticas para interagir com a multidão.', 'ar': 'على مدار العقد الماضي ، تم استخدام التعهيد الجماعي لتسخير قوة الحوسبة البشرية لحل المهام التي يصعب حلها باستخدام أجهزة الكمبيوتر وحدها ، مثل تحديد ما إذا كانت الصورة تحتوي على شجرة أم لا ، أو تصنيف أهمية موقع ويب ، أو التحقق رقم هاتف النشاط التجاري. كان مجتمع معالجة اللغة الطبيعية مبكرًا في تبني التعهيد الجماعي كأداة للحصول بسرعة وبتكلفة زهيدة على البيانات المشروحة لتدريب أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. بمجرد جمع هذه البيانات ، يمكن تسليمها إلى الخوارزميات التي تتعلم أداء مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأساسية مثل الترجمة أو التحليل. عادة ما يكون هذا التسليم هو المكان الذي ينتهي فيه التفاعل مع الحشد. يوفر الحشد البيانات ، لكن الهدف النهائي هو إخراج البشر في النهاية من الحلقة. هل هناك طرق أفضل للاستفادة من الجمهور؟ في هذا البرنامج التعليمي ، سأبدأ بعرض الاستخدامات المبتكرة للتعهيد الجماعي التي تتجاوز جمع البيانات والتعليق التوضيحي. سأناقش تطبيقات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتعلم الآلي ، والذكاء الهجين أو أنظمة الذكاء الاصطناعي "البشرية في الحلقة" التي تستفيد من نقاط القوة التكميلية للبشر والآلات من أجل تحقيق أكثر مما يمكن لأي منهما تحقيقه بمفرده ، ودراسات واسعة النطاق للسلوك البشري عبر الانترنت. سأقضي بعد ذلك معظم الدرس التعليمي في الغوص في الأبحاث الحديثة التي تهدف إلى فهم من هم العمال الجماعيون ، وكيف يتصرفون ، وما يجب أن يعلمنا هذا عن أفضل الممارسات للتفاعل مع الجمهور.', 'ja': '過去10年間、クラウドソーシングは、画像に木が含まれているかどうかを判断したり、ウェブサイトの関連性を評価したり、ビジネスの電話番号を検証したりするなど、コンピュータだけでは解決することが非常に困難なタスクを解決するために、人間の計算の力を活用するために使用されてきました。 自然言語処理コミュニティは、NLPシステムをトレーニングするための注釈付きデータを迅速かつ安価に取得するためのツールとして、クラウドソーシングを受け入れるようになっていました。 このデータが収集されると、翻訳または構文解析などの基本的なNLPタスクを実行することを学習するアルゴリズムに引き継ぐことができます。 通常、このハンドオフは群衆との交流が終了する場所です。 群衆はデータを提供しますが、最終的な目標は最終的に人間をループから取り除くことです。 群衆を活用するより良い方法はありますか？このチュートリアルでは、データ収集と注釈を超えたクラウドソーシングの革新的な使用例から始めます。 自然言語処理と機械学習、人間と機械の相補的な強みを活用したハイブリッドインテリジェンスまたは「ヒューマン・イン・ザ・ループ」AIシステムへの応用、およびオンラインでの人間の行動の大規模な研究について説明します。 その後、チュートリアルの大部分を使って、クラウドワーカーが誰で、どのように振る舞っているのか、そしてクラウドワーカーとの交流のためのベストプラクティスについて何を教えるべきかを理解することを目的とした最近の研究に飛び込んでいきます。', 'zh': '昔十年之中,众包已用于用人算之力,以计算机难以解决为务,如定图象之树,评网站之相关性验企业之电话号码。 自然语言处置社区早以众包为器,可速、廉价取带注之数以练NLP统。 一集此数,传之算法,NLP学为本,若译若解析。 凡此交接,与人群互动终者也。 人群提供数据,最终目标终出循环。 有善法以用人群乎? 本教程之中,吾将首展众包之创用,其用越数收注。 吾将论自然语言治机器之学,合智与循环人工智能统之用,因其机器之互补,以成大于独行,在线大究于人行。 然后深入探讨近于本教程之间,指知群工作者,其行义,与此宜教与人群互动之最。', 'hi': 'पिछले दशक में, क्राउडसोर्सिंग का उपयोग उन कार्यों को हल करने के लिए मानव गणना की शक्ति का उपयोग करने के लिए किया गया है जो अकेले कंप्यूटर के साथ हल करने के लिए कुख्यात रूप से कठिन हैं, जैसे कि यह निर्धारित करना कि किसी छवि में एक पेड़ है या नहीं, वेबसाइट की प्रासंगिकता की रेटिंग, या व्यवसाय के फोन नंबर को सत्यापित करना। प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण समुदाय जल्दी और सस्ते में एनएलपी सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एनोटेट डेटा प्राप्त करने के लिए एक उपकरण के रूप में crowdsourcing को गले लगाने के लिए जल्दी था। एक बार जब यह डेटा एकत्र हो जाता है, तो इसे एल्गोरिदम को सौंप दिया जा सकता है जो अनुवाद या पार्सिंग जैसे बुनियादी एनएलपी कार्यों को करना सीखते हैं। आमतौर पर यह हैंडऑफ वह जगह है जहां भीड़ के साथ बातचीत समाप्त होती है। भीड़ डेटा प्रदान करती है, लेकिन अंतिम लक्ष्य अंततः मनुष्यों को लूप से बाहर निकालना है। क्या भीड़ का उपयोग करने के बेहतर तरीके हैं? इस ट्यूटोरियल में, मैं crowdsourcing के अभिनव उपयोगों के एक प्रदर्शन के साथ शुरू करूंगा जो डेटा संग्रह और एनोटेशन से परे जाते हैं। मैं प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और मशीन सीखने, हाइब्रिड इंटेलिजेंस या "लूप में मानव" एआई सिस्टम के अनुप्रयोगों पर चर्चा करूंगा जो मनुष्यों और मशीनों की पूरक शक्तियों का लाभ उठाते हैं ताकि अकेले प्राप्त करने से अधिक प्राप्त किया जा सके, और मानव व्यवहार के बड़े पैमाने पर अध्ययन ऑनलाइन। मैं तब हाल के शोध में अधिकांश ट्यूटोरियल डाइविंग खर्च करूंगा, जिसका उद्देश्य यह समझना है कि क्राउडवर्कर्स कौन हैं, वे कैसे व्यवहार करते हैं, और यह हमें भीड़ के साथ बातचीत करने के लिए सर्वोत्तम प्रथाओं के बारे में क्या सिखाना चाहिए।', 'ru': 'В течение последнего десятилетия краудсорсинг использовался для использования возможностей человеческих вычислений для решения задач, которые, как известно, трудно решить с помощью одних компьютеров, таких как определение того, содержит ли изображение дерево, оценка релевантности веб-сайта или проверка номера телефона предприятия. Сообщество, занимающееся обработкой естественного языка, было рано использовать краудсорсинг в качестве инструмента для быстрого и недорогого получения аннотированных данных для обучения NLP-систем. После того, как эти данные собраны, они могут быть переданы алгоритмам, которые учатся выполнять основные задачи NLP, такие как перевод или синтаксический анализ. Обычно это передача, где взаимодействие с толпой заканчивается. Толпа предоставляет данные, но конечная цель - в конечном итоге вывести людей из петли. Есть ли лучшие способы использовать толпу?В этом учебнике я начну с демонстрации инновационных видов использования краудсорсинга, которые выходят за рамки сбора данных и аннотаций. Я буду обсуждать приложения для обработки естественного языка и машинного обучения, гибридного интеллекта или систем искусственного интеллекта «человек в петле», которые используют взаимодополняющие сильные стороны людей и машин, чтобы достичь большего, чем любой из них мог бы достичь в одиночку, и крупномасштабные исследования человеческого поведения в Интернете. Затем я проведу большую часть учебного курса, погружаясь в недавние исследования, направленные на понимание того, кто такие краудработники, как они себя ведут и чему это должно научить нас о передовых методах взаимодействия с толпой.', 'ga': "Le deich mbliana anuas, baineadh úsáid as sluafhoinsiú chun leas a bhaint as cumhacht ríomh an duine chun tascanna a réiteach atá thar a bheith deacair a réiteach le ríomhairí amháin, mar a chinneadh an bhfuil crann in íomhá nó nach bhfuil, rátáil a dhéanamh ar ábharthacht an tsuímh Ghréasáin, nó a fhíorú. uimhir theileafóin ghnó. Bhí an pobal próiseála teanga nádúrtha go luath chun glacadh le sluafhoinsiú mar uirlis chun sonraí anótáilte a fháil go tapa agus go neamhchostasach chun córais NLP a oiliúint. Nuair a bhailítear na sonraí seo, is féidir iad a thabhairt ar láimh d'algartam a fhoghlaimíonn conas buntascanna NLP a dhéanamh ar nós aistriúcháin nó parsáil. Go hiondúil is é an handoff seo nuair a thagann deireadh leis an idirghníomhú leis an slua. Soláthraíonn an slua na sonraí, ach is é an sprioc deiridh ná daoine a thógáil amach as an lúb. An bhfuil bealaí níos fearr chun úsáid a bhaint as an slua? Sa rang teagaisc seo, tosóidh mé le taispeántas ar úsáidí nuálacha a bhaineann le sluafhoinsiú a théann níos faide ná bailiú sonraí agus nótaí. Pléifidh mé feidhmchláir ar phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha agus ar mheaisínfhoghlaim, faisnéis hibrideach nó córais AI “an duine sa lúb” a ghiaráil láidreachtaí comhlántacha daoine agus meaisíní chun níos mó a bhaint amach ná mar a d’fhéadfadh ceachtar acu a bhaint amach ina n-aonar, agus staidéir mhórscála ar iompar daonna. ar líne. Beidh mé ag caitheamh ansin an chuid is mó den teagaisc tumadóireacht a dhéanamh ar thaighde le déanaí atá dírithe ar thuiscint cé hiad na slua-oibrithe, conas iad féin a iompar, agus cad ba chóir a mhúineadh dúinn faoi na cleachtais is fearr chun idirghníomhú leis an slua.", 'el': 'Κατά τη διάρκεια της τελευταίας δεκαετίας, έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί για να αξιοποιήσει τη δύναμη του ανθρώπινου υπολογισμού για να λύσει εργασίες που είναι διαβόητα δύσκολο να επιλυθούν μόνο με υπολογιστές, όπως ο προσδιορισμός εάν μια εικόνα περιέχει ή όχι δέντρο, η αξιολόγηση της συνάφειας ενός ιστότοπου ή η επαλήθευση του αριθμού τηλεφώνου μιας επιχείρησης. Η κοινότητα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας ήταν νωρίς για να αγκαλιάσει το crowdsourcing ως εργαλείο για την γρήγορη και φθηνή απόκτηση σχολιασμένων δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση συστημάτων NLP. Μόλις συλλεχθούν αυτά τα δεδομένα, μπορούν να παραδοθούν σε αλγόριθμους που μαθαίνουν να εκτελούν βασικές εργασίες όπως μετάφραση ή ανάλυση. Συνήθως αυτή η παράδοση είναι όπου τελειώνει η αλληλεπίδραση με το πλήθος. Το πλήθος παρέχει τα δεδομένα, αλλά ο απώτερος στόχος είναι τελικά να βγάλει τους ανθρώπους από τον βρόχο. Υπάρχουν καλύτεροι τρόποι να εκμεταλλευτείς το πλήθος; Σε αυτό το σεμινάριο, θα ξεκινήσω με μια παρουσίαση καινοτόμων χρήσεων της που υπερβαίνουν τη συλλογή δεδομένων και τη σχολιασμό. Θα συζητήσω εφαρμογές σε επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας και μηχανική μάθηση, υβριδική νοημοσύνη ή συστήματα τεχνητής νοημοσύνης που αξιοποιούν τις συμπληρωματικές δυνάμεις των ανθρώπων και των μηχανών προκειμένου να επιτύχουν περισσότερα από αυτά που θα μπορούσαν να επιτύχουν μόνοι τους, και μελέτες μεγάλης κλίμακας για την ανθρώπινη συμπεριφορά στο διαδίκτυο. Στη συνέχεια, θα περάσω το μεγαλύτερο μέρος του μαθήματος βουτώντας σε πρόσφατη έρευνα με στόχο να καταλάβω ποιοι είναι οι εργάτες του πλήθους, πώς συμπεριφέρονται και τι αυτό θα πρέπει να μας διδάξει σχετικά με τις βέλτιστες πρακτικές αλληλεπίδρασης με το πλήθος.', 'ka': "ბოლოდან ათეულ წლის განმავლობაში, მუშაობა გამოყენებული ადამიანის კომპუტირების ძალიან გამოყენება, რომელიც მხოლოდ კომპუტირების განმავლობაში ძალიან ძალიან შესაძლებელია, რომელიც კომპუტირებით განმავლება, რომელიც სურათ ნაირადი ენის პროცესირების საზოგადოება იყო საწყისო, როგორც მუშაობის შესახებ სწრაფად და მუშაობელად მიიღება მონაცემები NLP სისტემების შესახებ. როდესაც ეს მონაცემები შექმნა, შეიძლება გადატანა ალგორიტემს, რომლებიც ვისწავლოთ გავაკეთოთ ბაზიური NLP დავალებები, როგორც გადატანა ან გააწყვანა. როგორც ეს დაკავშირება არის სადაც მსოფლიოს შემდეგ ინტერფექცია დასრულდება. მუშაობა მონაცემებს, მაგრამ საკუთარი მიზეზი იყო, რომ საბოლოოდ ადამიანების გადასვლა. თმა ლთ ოჲ-ეჲბპთ ნაფთნთ ეა თჱოჲლჱგაქ ოსბლთკარა? ამ სტუტორიაში, მე დავიწყებ ინონეციური გამოყენებებით, რომლებიც მონაცემების კოლექციის და ანტოციის გარეშე გადასვლენ. მე დავუბრუნე მომხმარებები თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი და მანქანის სწავლებისთვის, ჰიბრიტური ინტელექცია ან 'ადამიანი სისტემაში' AI სისტემაში, რომელიც ადამიანის და მანქანის კომპლენტური ძალადობას გამოყენებს შემდეგ მეტი სტუტურაციის ბევრი გავაკეთებ ახალი სწავლაში, მინდა გავიგოთ როგორ მუშაობლებელია, როგორ ისინი მოქმედება, და რას უნდა გვესწავლა უკეთესი პრაქტიკების შესახებ მუ", 'hu': 'Az elmúlt évtizedben a közösségi forrásokat arra használták, hogy kihasználják az emberi számítások erejét olyan feladatok megoldására, amelyeket közismerten nehéz megoldani egyedül a számítógépekkel, mint például annak meghatározása, hogy egy kép tartalmaz-e egy fát vagy sem, a weboldal relevanciájának értékelése vagy egy vállalkozás telefonszámának ellenőrzése. A természetes nyelvfeldolgozó közösség már korán elfogadta a közösségi forrásokat, mint eszközt arra, hogy gyorsan és olcsón szerezzen jegyzetelt adatokat az NLP rendszerek képzéséhez. Miután ezeket az adatokat összegyűjtöttük, átadhatjuk azokat az algoritmusoknak, amelyek megtanulják elvégezni az alapvető NLP feladatokat, például fordítást vagy elemzést. Általában ez az átadás, ahol a tömeggel való interakció véget ér. A tömeg szolgáltatja az adatokat, de a végső cél az, hogy végül kivonja az embereket a hurokból. Van jobb módja annak, hogy kihasználjuk a tömeget? Ebben a bemutatóban a közösségi források innovatív felhasználásainak bemutatójával kezdem, amelyek túlmutatnak az adatgyűjtésen és jegyzetelésen. A természetes nyelvfeldolgozásra és gépi tanulásra, a hibrid intelligenciára vagy az "emberi körben" AI rendszerekre vonatkozó alkalmazásokról fogok beszélni, amelyek kihasználják az emberek és gépek egymást kiegészítő erősségeit annak érdekében, hogy többet érjenek el, mint amit egyedül elérhetnének, valamint az emberi viselkedés nagyszabású tanulmányairól online. Ezután a bemutató nagy részét a közelmúltbeli kutatásokban fogom tölteni, amelyek célja, hogy megértsem, kik a közösségi munkások, hogyan viselkednek, és ez mit tanítson meg a tömeggel való interakció legjobb gyakorlatáról.', 'it': "Nell'ultimo decennio, il crowdsourcing è stato utilizzato per sfruttare il potere del calcolo umano per risolvere compiti notoriamente difficili da risolvere con i soli computer, come determinare se un'immagine contiene o meno un albero, valutare la rilevanza di un sito web o verificare il numero di telefono di un'azienda. La comunità di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale era presto ad abbracciare il crowdsourcing come strumento per ottenere rapidamente ed economicamente dati annotati per formare i sistemi NLP. Una volta raccolti questi dati, possono essere trasmessi ad algoritmi che imparano ad eseguire attività di base NLP come la traduzione o l'analisi. Di solito questo passaggio è dove finisce l'interazione con la folla. La folla fornisce i dati, ma l'obiettivo finale è quello di eliminare gli esseri umani. Ci sono modi migliori per sfruttare la folla? In questo tutorial, inizierò con una vetrina di usi innovativi del crowdsourcing che vanno oltre la raccolta dei dati e l'annotazione. Parlerò di applicazioni per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e l'apprendimento automatico, intelligenza ibrida o sistemi IA 'umani in the loop' che sfruttano i punti di forza complementari di esseri umani e macchine al fine di ottenere più di quanto entrambi potrebbero ottenere da soli, e studi su larga scala sul comportamento umano online. Passerò quindi la maggior parte del tutorial immergendomi nelle recenti ricerche volte a capire chi sono i crowdworker, come si comportano e cosa questo dovrebbe insegnarci sulle migliori pratiche per interagire con la folla.", 'kk': 'Соңғы он жыл бойы, компьютерлерді бір-біріне шешу үшін адамдардың есептеу күшін көпшілігін қолданылады, мысалы, кескінде ағаш бар ма, вебсайттың маңыздылығын, немесе телефон нөмірін тексеру үшін, көпшіліктерді шешу үшін көп Түзіндік тіл процессорының көпшілігі NLP жүйелерін оқыту үшін тез және келмейтін деректерді алу құралы ретінде көпшілік көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті Бұл деректер жинағанда, аудару не талдау секілді негізгі NLP тапсырмаларын үйренген алгоритмдерге беріледі. Әдетте бұл құрылғы - көпшіліктердің қатынасы аяқтайды. Көпшілік деректерді береді, бірақ соңғы мақсат - адамдарды қалпынан алып тастау. Көпшілікті қолдану үшін жақсы жолдар бар ма? Бұл оқушылықтар мен деректерді жинақтау мен жаңалықтау арқылы инновациялық қолданбалармен бастаймын. Мен табиғи тілдерді өңдеу және машинаны оқыту, гибрид интеллекті немесе онлайн істеу үшін адамдардың және машиналардың қосымша күштерін жалғастыру үшін онлайн істеу үшін адамдардың және машиналардың қосымша күштерін қолданып тұрады. Содан соңғы зерттеулердің көпшілігін жаңа зерттеулерге қалай тұратынын түсінуге, қалай тұратынын түсінуге мақсат беремін. Бұл бізге көпшіліктердің қалай тұратынын жұмыс әрекеттерді қа', 'lt': 'Per pastarąjį dešimtmetį visuomenės ištekliai buvo naudojami žmonių skaičiavimo galiai išnaudoti siekiant išspręsti užduotis, kurios yra žinomai sudėtingos išspręsti vien tik kompiuteriais, pavyzdžiui, nustatyti, ar vaizdas yra medžio, įvertinti interneto svetainės svarbą arba patikrinti verslo telefono numerį. Gamtinė kalbų apdorojimo bendruomenė anksčiau priėmė crowdsourcing kaip priemonę greitai ir brangiai gauti anotuotus duomenis NLP sistemoms treniruoti. Surinkus šiuos duomenis, juos galima perduoti algoritmams, kurie mokosi atlikti pagrindines NLP užduotis, pvz., vertimą arba analizavimą. Paprastai šis atsisakymas baigiasi sąveika su minia. Visuomenė teikia duomenis, bet galutinis tikslas yra galiausiai ištraukti žmones iš ciklo. Ar yra geresnių būdų pasinaudoti minia? Šiame mokyme pradėsiu nuo naujoviško visuomenės išteklių naudojimo, kuris viršija duomenų rinkimą ir anotaciją, parodymo. Apsvarstysiu gamtinio kalbų apdorojimo ir mašininio mokymosi, hibridinio žvalgybos ar "žmogaus tinkle" AI sistemų, kurios sutelkia papildomus žmogaus ir mašin ų stiprumus, kad būtų pasiekta daugiau nei viena, nei viena, ir didelio masto žmogaus elgesio tyrimus internete. Tada didžiąją dalį pamokų praleisiu nuotekoms į neseniai atliktus mokslinius tyrimus, kuriais siekiama suprasti, kas yra visuomenės darbuotojai, kaip jie elgiasi ir ką tai turėtų mus išmokyti apie geriausią patirtį bendraujant su visuomenės atstovais.', 'mk': 'Во текот на изминатата деценија, пулсурсирањето беше искористено за искористување на моќта на човечката компјутација за решавање на задачи кои се познато тешки за решавање само со компјутерите, како што е одредувањето дали сликата содржи дрво, оценувањето на релевантноста на веб-страницата или верификацијата на телефонскиот број на би Природната заедница за процес на јазик беше рана да го прифати пулсорсирањето како алатка за брзо и нескапо добивање на анотирани податоци за обука на НЛП системите. Откако ќе се соберат овие податоци, може да се предадат на алгоритми кои научат да извршат основни NLP задачи како што се превод или анализирање. Обично ова е крај на интеракцијата со публиката. Напубликата ги обезбедува податоците, но крајната цел е на крајот да ги извадиме луѓето од циклусот. Има ли подобри начини да се искористи публиката? Во овој наставник, ќе започнам со претстава на иновативни употреби на пулсорсирање кои одат надвор од собирање и анотација на податоци. Ќе разговарам за апликациите за природното обработување јазик и машинско учење, хибридна интелигенција или „човечки во циклусот“ системи на ИИ кои ги искористуваат комплементарните сили на луѓето и машините со цел да постигнат повеќе отколку што или може да постигнат сами, и големи студии за човечк Потоа ќе го потрошам поголемиот дел од предавањето на нуркање во неодамнешното истражување со цел да разберам кој се луѓето, како се однесуваат, и што тоа треба да не научи за најдобрите практики за интеракција со луѓето.', 'ms': "Selama dekad terakhir, crowdsourcing telah digunakan untuk menggunakan kuasa komputasi manusia untuk menyelesaikan tugas yang sangat sukar untuk diselesaikan dengan komputer sahaja, seperti menentukan sama ada imej mengandungi pokok atau tidak, mengendalikan relevansi laman web, atau mengesahkan nombor telefon bisnes. Komuniti pemprosesan bahasa semula jadi awal untuk menerima crowdsourcing sebagai alat untuk mendapatkan data yang dicatat dengan cepat dan tidak mahal untuk melatih sistem NLP. Apabila data ini dikumpulkan, ia boleh dihantar kepada algoritma yang belajar untuk melakukan tugas NLP as as seperti terjemahan atau hurai. Biasanya penghantaran ini adalah di mana interaksi dengan ramai berakhir. Penonton menyediakan data, tetapi tujuan utama adalah untuk akhirnya mengambil manusia keluar dari loop. Are there better ways to make use of the crowd? Dalam tutorial ini, saya akan mula dengan pertunjukan penggunaan inovatif crowdsourcing yang melebihi koleksi data dan anotasi. Saya akan membincangkan aplikasi untuk pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi dan pembelajaran mesin, kecerdasan hibrid atau sistem AI 'manusia dalam loop' yang menggunakan kekuatan kumplimentar manusia dan mesin untuk mencapai lebih daripada sama ada boleh mencapai sendiri, dan kajian skala besar perilaku manusia online. I will then spend the majority of the tutorial diving into recent research aimed at understanding who crowdworkers are, how they behave, and what this should teach us about best practices for interacting with the crowd.", 'ml': "കഴിഞ്ഞ കൊല്ലത്തില്\u200d, മനുഷ്യരുടെ കണക്കിന്റെ ശക്തിയുണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കമ്പ്യൂട്ടറുകളോടൊപ്പം മാത്രം പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200d മ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ സമൂഹമായിരുന്നു ജനസ്രോസ്രോക്സിനെ പെട്ടെന്നും പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കാനും വേ @ info സാധാരണ ഈ കൈകൊണ്ട് ആളുകളോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത് അവിടെയാണ്. ജനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു, പക്ഷെ അവസാനത്തെ ലക്ഷ്യം മനുഷ്യരെ ലൂപ്പില്\u200d നിന്ന് പുറത്തെടുക്കാനാണ്. ജനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d നല്ല വഴികളുണ്ടോ? ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d, ഞാന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കേസില്\u200d തുടങ്ങാം, അത് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും വിചാരപ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിനും യന്ത്രത്തിനും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയോ അലിയുടെ 'മനുഷ്യന്\u200dറെ' സിസ്റ്റമോ ഞാന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കും. മനുഷ്യരുടെ പിന്നീട് ഞാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d ചെലവഴിക്കും, കൂട്ടുകാര്\u200d ആരാണെന്ന് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതും, അവര്\u200d", 'mt': 'Matul l-a ħħar għaxar snin, il-crowdsourcing intuża biex tintuża s-saħħa tal-komputazzjoni umana biex jiġu solvuti kompiti li huma magħrufa bħala diffiċli biex jiġu solvuti bil-kompjuters waħedhom, bħad-determinazzjoni jekk immaġni fihiex siġra jew le, il-klassifikazzjoni tar-rilevanza ta’ websajt, jew il-verifika tan-numru tat-telefon ta’ negozju. Il-komunità tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali kienet kmieni biex tħaddan il-crowdsourcing bħala għodda biex tinkiseb dejta annotata malajr u b’mod mhux għali biex jitħarrġu s-sistemi NLP. Ladarba din id-dejta tinġabar, tista’ tintbagħat lil algoritmi li jitgħallmu jwettqu kompiti bażiċi tal-NLP bħat-traduzzjoni jew l-analiżi. Is-soltu dan il-handoff huwa fejn jintemm l-interazzjoni mal-folla. Il-popolazzjoni tipprovdi d-dejta, iżda l-għan aħħari huwa li eventwalment il-bnedmin jitneħħew mill-loop. Hemm modi aħjar biex tintuża l-folla? F’dan it-tutorjal se nibda b’wiri ta’ użi innovattivi ta’ crowdsourcing li jmorru lil hinn mill-ġbir tad-dejta u l-annotazzjoni. Se niddiskuti l-applikazzjonijiet għall-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi u t-tagħlim tal-magni, l-intelliġenza ibrida jew is-sistemi tal-AI “umani fil-loop” li jagħtu spinta lill-qawwiet kumplimentari tal-bnedmin u l-magni sabiex jinkisbu aktar milli jistgħu jinkisbu waħedhom, u studji fuq skala kbira tal-imġiba umana onlajn. I will then spend the majority of the tutorial diving into recent research aimed at understanding who crowdworkers are, how they behave, and what this should teach us about best practices for interacting with the crowd.', 'mn': "Өнгөрсөн арван жилийн турш хүн төрөлхтний тооцоололтын хүч чадварыг компьютерээс ганцаараа шийдэхэд хэцүү ажил шийдэхэд олон нийтийн сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулалт хэрэглэгдсэн. Яг л зураг мод агуулж, вебсайтын хамаарал, эсвэл бизнесийн утасны тооны шалгалтыг шийд Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн нийгэм нь олон нийгмийн асуудлуудыг хурдан, бусдын мэдээллийг олж авах хэрэгсэл болгон эрт хүлээж байлаа. Энэ мэдээллийг цуглуулахад, үүнийг үндсэн NLP даалгаврыг ажиллаж сурах алгоритмыг өгөх боломжтой. Олон хүмүүстэй харилцаа төгсгөл байдаг. Олон хүмүүс өгөгдлийг хандуулдаг. Гэхдээ эцсийн зорилго нь хүмүүсийг товчлоос гаргах юм. Хүмүүсийг ашиглах илүү сайн арга байгаа уу? Энэ сургалтын тухай би өгөгдлийн цуглуулалт болон сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс гадна шинэчлэлтийн хэрэглээнээс эхэлнэ. Би байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн, машин суралцах, гибрид ухаан, эсвэл 'loop дотор хүн' мэдээллийн системүүд хүн болон машинуудын нэмэлт чадварыг ашиглан ганцаараа хүргэхээс илүү их хүчтэй, хүн төрөлхтний үйлдвэрлэлийн олон хэмжээний судалгааг ашиглах болно. Дараа нь би саяхан судалгаанд сургалтын ихэнх сургалтыг хэрхэн ажилладаг, хэрхэн ажилладаг, олон нийгмийн харилцааны сайн үйл ажиллагааны тухай бидэнд юу заах ёстой вэ?", 'no': 'I løpet av det siste tiåret har crowdsourcing brukt til å køyra makten på menneskelige datamaskiner for å løse oppgåver som er notorisk vanskeleg å løse med datamaskiner alene, slik som å bestemme om eit bilete inneheld ei tre eller ikkje, å vurdere tilhøgden til ein nettstad, eller å stadfesta telefonnummeret på eit bedrift. Den naturlege språkshandteringssamfunnet var tidlegare for å beskrive crowdsourcing som eit verktøy for rask og utrygt henting av annotaterte data for å trenja NLP-systemar. Når denne dataen vert samla, kan det hentast til algoritme som lærer å utføra grunnleggjande NLP- oppgåver som omsetjing eller tolking. Vanlegvis er denne handboka der interaksjonen med folket sluttar. Folket tilbyr data, men det ultime målet er å eventuelt ta menneske ut av loopen. Er det bedre måtar å bruka folket? I denne opplæringa vil eg starta med ein visning av innovative brukar av crowdsourcing som går over datasamlinga og notasjon. Eg vil diskutera programmer til naturspråk-prosessering og maskinelæring, hybrid-intelligens eller «menneske i loopsystemet» som leverer komplementære styrkene av menneske og maskiner for å oppnå meir enn anten kunne oppnå alene, og store skala studier av menneske oppførsel på nettet. Eg vil derfor bruka dei fleste av opplæringane som går i nyleg forskning med å forstå kva folkarbeidsgiver er, korleis dei oppfører, og kva dette bør læra oss om beste praksis for interaksjon med folket.', 'ro': 'În ultimul deceniu, crowdsourcing-ul a fost folosit pentru a valorifica puterea calculului uman pentru a rezolva sarcini care sunt notoriu dificil de rezolvat numai cu computerele, cum ar fi determinarea dacă o imagine conține sau nu un copac, evaluarea relevanței unui site web sau verificarea numărului de telefon al unei afaceri. Comunitatea de procesare a limbajului natural a fost devreme să îmbrățișeze crowdsourcing ca un instrument pentru obținerea rapidă și ieftină a datelor adnotate pentru a instrui sistemele PNL. Odată ce aceste date sunt colectate, pot fi transmise algoritmilor care învață să efectueze sarcini de bază PNL, cum ar fi traducerea sau analizarea. De obicei, acest predare este locul în care interacțiunea cu mulțimea se termină. Mulțimea furnizează datele, dar scopul final este de a scoate în cele din urmă oamenii din buclă. Există modalităţi mai bune de a face uz de mulţime? În acest tutorial, voi începe cu o prezentare a utilizărilor inovatoare ale crowdsourcing-ului care depășesc colectarea și adnotarea datelor. Voi discuta aplicații pentru procesarea limbajului natural și învățarea automată, inteligența hibridă sau sistemele AI "umane în buclă" care valorifică punctele forte complementare ale oamenilor și mașinilor pentru a obține mai mult decât oricare ar putea obține singur, și studii la scară largă a comportamentului uman online. Apoi voi petrece majoritatea tutorialului scufundându-mă în cercetările recente menite să înțeleg cine sunt crowdworkerii, cum se comportă și ce ar trebui să ne învețe acest lucru despre cele mai bune practici pentru interacțiunea cu mulțimea.', 'pl': 'W ciągu ostatniej dekady crowdsourcing był wykorzystywany do wykorzystania mocy obliczeń ludzkich do rozwiązywania zadań, które są notorycznie trudne do rozwiązania za pomocą samych komputerów, takich jak określenie, czy obraz zawiera drzewo, ocena znaczenia strony internetowej czy weryfikacja numeru telefonu firmy. Społeczność przetwarzania języków naturalnych była wcześnie wcześnie, aby przyjąć crowdsourcing jako narzędzie do szybkiego i taniego uzyskania adnotacji danych do szkolenia systemów NLP. Po zebraniu tych danych można je przekazać algorytmom, które uczą się wykonywać podstawowe zadania NLP, takie jak tłumaczenie czy parsowanie. Zwykle w tym przekazaniu kończy się interakcja z tłumem. Tłum dostarcza danych, ale ostatecznym celem jest wyeliminowanie ludzi z pętli. Czy są lepsze sposoby na wykorzystanie tłumu? W tym poradniku zacznę od prezentacji innowacyjnych zastosowań crowdsourcingu, które wykraczają poza gromadzenie danych i adnotację. Omówię aplikacje do przetwarzania języków naturalnych i uczenia się maszynowego, hybrydową inteligencję lub systemy sztucznej inteligencji człowieka w pętli, które wykorzystują uzupełniające się mocne strony ludzi i maszyn w celu osiągnięcia więcej niż ktokolwiek z nich może osiągnąć sam, oraz badania na dużą skalę zachowań człowieka online. Większość poradników spędzę wtedy zanurzając się w ostatnie badania mające na celu zrozumienie kim są crowdworkerzy, jak się zachowują i czego to powinno nas nauczyć o najlepszych praktykach w interakcji z tłumem.', 'si': "අන්තිම දහස් වලින්, මිනිස්සු ගණනාකරණයේ ශක්තිය පාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පරිගණනාකරණයෙන් විසඳන්න අමාරුයි, පින්තූරයක් ගස්සක් තියෙනවද නැත් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කළ සමාජාව පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාවෙන් ඉක්මනින් සහ නිර්භාවිත විදිහට NLP පද මේ දත්ත සංගුණු කරපු වෙලාවට, ඒක අල්ගෝරිතම් වලට දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා මූලික NLP වැඩක් කරන්න හරියට පරිවර්තන න සාමාන්\u200dය විදියටම මේ හැන්ඩෝෆ් එක තමයි මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඉවරයි. මිනිස්සුන්ට දත්ත දෙන්න පුළුවන්, ඒත් අන්තිම අරමුණ අරමුණ තමයි අන්තිමේදී මිනිස්සුන්ව පු මිනිස්සුන්ට පාවිච්චි කරන්න හොඳ මාර්ගයක් තියෙනවද? මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ මම පටන් ගන්නම්, මොකක්ද දත්ත සංගීතය සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක් පටන් ගන්නේ. මම ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ මැෂින් ඉගෙනීම, හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් බුද්ධිමත් සහ 'මිනිස්' AI පද්ධතියට කතා කරනවා මිනිස්සු සහ මැෂින්සුන්ගේ සම්පූර්ණ ශ ඊට පස්සේ මම අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ගන්නම්, අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයේ අධිකරණය කරනවා කවුද කියලා තේරුම් ගන්න, කොහොමද ඔවුන් හ", 'sr': "Tokom poslednjih decenija, masovna resursa je korišćena kako bi iskoristila moć ljudskog računala kako bi rešila zadatke koje su poznato teško rešiti samim kompjuterima, kao što je rešavanje da li slika sadrži drvo ili ne, ocjenjivanje relevantnosti vebsajta ili provjeravanje broja telefona biznisa. Prirodna zajednica za obrađivanje jezika je rano prihvatila crowdsourcing kao alat za brzo i neoèekivo dobivanje annotiranih podataka za obuku NLP sistema. Kada se ove podatke skupljaju, može se predati algoritmima koji nauče da obavljaju osnovne NLP zadatke poput prevoda ili analize. Obièno je ova rukavica tamo gde interakcija sa publikom završava. Publika pruža podatke, ali konačni cilj je da na kraju izvedemo ljude iz petlja. Postoji li bolji naèin da se iskoristi gužva? U ovom nastavniku, počeću sa predstavom inovativnih korištenja crowdsourcing koji su iznad kolekcije i annotacije podataka. Razgovaraću o aplikacijama prirodnoj obradi jezika i učenju strojeva, hibridne inteligencije ili 'ljudske inteligencije u krugu' AI-sustavi koji utiču na komplementne snage ljudskih i strojeva kako bi postigli više nego što bi bilo moglo postići sam i velike proučavanje ljudskog ponašanja na internetu. Onda ću provesti većinu nastavnih ronjenja u nedavnim istraživanjima ciljem razumevanja koji su ljudi, kako se ponašaju, i šta bi nas to trebalo naučiti o najboljoj praksi za interakciju s publikom.", 'so': 'Tobankii ugu dambeeyey waxaa loo isticmaalay in lagu xambaaro awoodda xisaabinta dadka si ay ugu adag u baahan yihiin in ay kambiyuutarada oo kaliya u xajistaan, tusaale ahaan in sawirku ay ku jirto geed, si ay u qiimeyso muhiimka bogga internetka ama in uu xaqiijiyo lambarka ganacsiga. Rugta baaraandegista afka asalka ah waxay horay ugu horeysay inay u qabsadaan kooxaha dadka sida qalabka dhaqso iyo si hawlgab ah u heli karto macluumaad la taxeeyey si ay u tababarido nidaamka NLP. Marka lagu soo ururiyo macluumaadkan waxaa loo dhiibi karaa algorityo ku barta in lagu sameeyo shaqooyinka aasaasiga ah sida turjumista ama baaritaanka. Sida caadiga ah gacmahan waa meesha xiriirka dadka uu dhamaado. Dadku wuxuu bixiyaa macluumaadka, laakiin dhamaadka ugu dambeeyaa waa in dadka looga soo bixiyo boolada. Miyey jiraan jidooyin wanaagsan oo ay isticmaalaan dadku? Waxbarashadan waxaan bilaabi doonaa tusaale ka mid ah isticmaalka abuurista ee dad badan oo ka badiya ururada macluumaadka iyo dhibaatada. Waxaan kala sheekayn doonaa codsiyada baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah iyo waxbarashada maskaxda, waxyaabaha qalabka caadiga ah ama nidaamka AI ee looga baaraandegay xoogga adag ee dadka iyo mashiinadaha si aan u gaadho wax ka badan oo kaliya iyo waxbarashada dabeecada dadka oo waaweyn ee internetka. I will then spend the majority of the tutorial diving into recent research aimed at understanding who crowdworkers are, how they behave, and what this should teach us about best practices for interacting with the crowd.', 'sv': 'Under det senaste decenniet har crowdsourcing använts för att utnyttja kraften i mänsklig beräkning för att lösa uppgifter som är notoriskt svåra att lösa med datorer ensamma, såsom att avgöra om en bild innehåller ett träd eller inte, bedöma relevansen av en webbplats eller verifiera ett företags telefonnummer. Den naturliga språkbearbetningsgruppen var tidigt att anamma crowdsourcing som ett verktyg för att snabbt och billigt erhålla kommenterade data för att utbilda NLP-system. När dessa data samlas in kan de överlämnas till algoritmer som lär sig att utföra grundläggande NLP-uppgifter som översättning eller tolkning. Vanligtvis är det här överlämningen där interaktionen med publiken slutar. Publiken ger data, men det slutliga målet är att så småningom ta människor ur kretsloppet. Finns det bättre sätt att utnyttja publiken? I den här handledningen kommer jag att börja med en presentation av innovativa användningsområden för crowdsourcing som går utöver datainsamling och anteckningar. Jag kommer att diskutera tillämpningar för naturlig språkbearbetning och maskininlärning, hybrid intelligens eller "human in the loop" AI-system som utnyttjar kompletterande styrkor hos människor och maskiner för att uppnå mer än vad någon av dem skulle kunna uppnå ensam, och storskaliga studier av mänskligt beteende online. Jag kommer sedan att ägna större delen av handledningen att dyka in i den senaste forskningen som syftar till att förstå vilka crowdworkers är, hur de beter sig, och vad detta bör lära oss om bästa praxis för att interagera med publiken.', 'ur': "آخری دس سال میں، جماعت سورسینگ انسان کی کمپیوٹر کی طاقت کو حل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے جو کامپیوٹر کے ساتھ اکیلے حل کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہیں، جیسے ایک تصویر میں ایک درخت ہے یا نہ ہے، ایک ویب سائٹ کے معاملہ کا ریٹ کیا گیا ہے، یا ایک تجارت کی فون شمارہ کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے۔ طبیعی زبان پردازش کی کمونٹی پہلے جماعت سورسینگ کو سریع اور غیر منطقی سے NLP سیستموں کی آموزش کے لئے اظہار کیا گیا تھا۔ یہاں تک کہ یہ ڈاٹا جمع ہوا تو یہ الگوریتموں کو بدل سکتا ہے جو بنیادی NLP ٹاکسیوں کو عمل کرنا سکتے ہیں جیسے ترجمہ یا پارسینگ. معمولا یہ ہاندوف ہے جہاں جماعت کے ساتھ تعامل ختم ہوتی ہے۔ جماعت ڈیٹا دے رہی ہے، لیکن آخری موقع یہ ہے کہ انسانوں کو لوپ سے نکالنا ہے۔ کیا جماعت کا استعمال کرنے کے لئے بہتر طریقے ہیں؟ اس تدریس میں، میں ایک نوآوری استعمال سے شروع کروں گا جو ڈیٹا کلکسیون اور انٹوریٹ سے زیادہ گزر جاتی ہے۔ میں طبیعی زبان پردازش اور ماشین کی تعلیم، ہیبراڈ انجیل یا 'لوپ میں انسان' AI سیستموں کے لئے اضافہ قوت کا ذریعہ بحث کروں گا جو انسان اور ماشین کے اضافہ قوت کو اضافہ کریں گے تاکہ ان سے زیادہ پہنچ سکیں جو اکیلے پہنچ سکیں اور انسان کے رفتار آنلاین کے بڑے مقدار تح پھر میں اگلے تحقیقات میں بہت سی تحقیقات میں خرچ کروں گا جو سمجھنے کے لئے کون ہیں، کون عمل کرتے ہیں، کون عمل کرتے ہیں، اور یہ ہمیں بہترین تحقیقات کے بارے میں سکھائے گا جو جماعت کے ساتھ اپنا اچھا طریقہ ہے۔", 'ta': "கடந்த பத்தாவத்திற்கு முன்பு மக்கள் மூலவளைப்பு மனித கணக்கீட்டின் சக்தியை கடுமையாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, கணினிகள் மட்டும் தீர்வு செய்ய கடினமான பணிகளை தீர்வு செய்ய, பிம்பம் ஒர இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் சமூகத்தில் மக்கள் மூலத்தை விரைவாக மற்றும் விரைவாகவும் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் பெற முறைமைகளை பயிற்சி ச @ info பொதுவாக இந்த கையேடு மக்களுடன் இணைப்பு முடிந்தது எங்கே. மக்கள் தகவலை வழங்குகிறது, ஆனால் இறுதியாக முடிவு கோள் மனிதர்களை வெளியே எடுக்க வேண்டும். கூட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்த நல்ல வழிகள் இருக்கிறதா? இந்த பொருளில், நான் ஒரு புதிய புதிய பயன்பாட்டை துவங்குகிறேன். அது தரவு தொகுப்பு மற்றும் அறிவிப்புக்கும் மேற்கு  நான் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும், ஹைப்ரி புலன் புலங்கள் அல்லது 'ஏ' முறைமைகளில் மனிதர்கள் மற்றும் இயந்திரங்களின் சிக்கல் வலிமைகளை வைத் பின்னர் நான் பெரும்பாலானவர்களை அண்மையில் செலவிடுவேன், சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு செலவிடுவேன், கூட்டத்தார் யார் என்பதை புரிந்து கொள", 'uz': 'Oxirgi yil davomida, jamoatlar hisoblash qobiliyatini o\'zgartiradi, faqat kompyuterlar bilan xabar qilish juda qiyin edi. Masalan, rasm mavjud, veb- saytning muhimligini aniqlash yoki telefon raqamni tekshirish mumkin. Name @ info Odatda, bu qo\'llanmani jamoatlar bilan boshqarish tugadi. Umumiy haqida maʼlumotni beradi, lekin oxirida odamlarni qo\'yishdan chiqarish mumkin. Ko\'pchilikni ishlatish uchun yordam yoʻq? Bu o\'qituvda men maʼlumot toʻplami va taxminan bir ko\'plab ko\'rinishni boshlayman. Men tabiiy tilni boshqarish va mashinani o\'rganish, hybrid intelligence yoki "qopqo\'shish" tizimida "inson" tizimlarini ko\'rganish uchun odamlar va mashinalarning kompyuterni o\'tkazib olib kelishi uchun o\'zimni faqat o\'tkazib olib kelishi mumkin va tarmoqni o\'rganish uchun ko\'proq narsalarni o\'rganaman. Keyin mening ko\'pchiligi o\'qituvchilarni o\'rganishga qaror qilaman, jamoatlar nima harakatlarini, qanday harakat qilishni tushunaman, va bu bizni jamoatlar bilan boshqarish uchun eng yaxshi harakat haqida o\'rganaman.', 'vi': 'Trong suốt thập kỷ qua, crodsouring đã được dùng để khai thác sức mạnh của người tính to án để giải quyết những việc nổi tiếng khó giải quyết bằng máy tính một mình, như xác định hình ảnh có chứa hay không một cái cây, đánh giá sự liên quan của website, hoặc kiểm tra số điện thoại của một doanh nghiệp. Cộng đồng xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên đã sớm chấp nhận crodsouring như một công cụ để dễ dàng và không tốn tiền để lấy được dữ liệu ghi chú để huấn luyện hệ thống Njala. Một khi dữ liệu được thu thập, nó có thể được truyền cho thuật to án học thực hiện các công việc cơ bản của chọc dò tủy sống như dịch hay phân tích. Thông thường lúc trao đổi này là nơi kết thúc giao tiếp với đám đông. Đám đông cung cấp dữ liệu, nhưng mục tiêu cuối cùng là đưa con người ra khỏi vòng lặp. Có cách nào tốt hơn để tận dụng đám đông không? Trong tập huấn này, tôi sẽ bắt đầu bằng một buổi trình diễn về cách dùng cách khác nhau của chứng khoán, vượt qua việc thu thập dữ liệu và ghi chú. Tôi sẽ thảo luận về ứng dụng trong chế độ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và việc học máy móc, trí tuệ nhân tạo hay hệ thống AI "nhân tạo trong vòng thời gian"... để sử dụng sức mạnh bổ sung của con người và máy để đạt được nhiều hơn cả hai khả năng một mình, và nghiên cứu trên diện rộng về hành vi con người trên mạng. Tôi sẽ tiêu phần lớn chương trình huấn luyện lao vào những nghiên cứu gần đây nhằm tìm hiểu những người nhân công ăn năn, cách họ cư xử, và điều này sẽ dạy chúng ta về cách tốt nhất để giao tiếp với đám đông.', 'bg': 'През последното десетилетие се използва, за да се възползва силата на човешките изчисления за решаване на задачи, които са известни като трудни за решаване само с компютри, като например определяне дали изображението съдържа дърво или не, оценка на релевантността на уебсайт или проверка на телефонния номер на бизнес. Общността за обработка на естествени езици беше рано да приеме crowdsourcingа като инструмент за бързо и евтино получаване на анотирани данни за обучение на системи за НЛП. След като тези данни бъдат събрани, те могат да бъдат предадени на алгоритми, които се научават да изпълняват основни задачи като превод или анализ. Обикновено това предаване е мястото, където взаимодействието с тълпата приключва. Тълпата предоставя данните, но крайната цел е в крайна сметка да извади хората от цикъла. Има ли по-добри начини да се възползвате от тълпата? В този урок ще започна с представяне на иновативни приложения на crowdsourcing, които надхвърлят събирането на данни и анотацията. Ще обсъдя приложения за обработка на естествени езици и машинно обучение, хибриден интелект или системи с изкуствен интелект, които използват допълващите се силни страни на хората и машините, за да се постигне повече, отколкото всеки може да постигне самостоятелно, и мащабни изследвания на човешкото поведение онлайн. След това ще прекарам по-голямата част от урока, гмуркайки се в скорошни изследвания, насочени към разбиране кои са crowdworkers, как се държат и какво това трябва да ни научи за най-добрите практики за взаимодействие с тълпата.', 'nl': "De afgelopen tien jaar is crowdsourcing gebruikt om de kracht van menselijke berekening te benutten om taken op te lossen die berucht op een computer alleen moeilijk op te lossen, zoals bepalen of een afbeelding een boom bevat, beoordelen van de relevantie van een website of verifiëren van het telefoonnummer van een bedrijf. De natuurlijke taalverwerkingsgemeenschap was vroeg om crowdsourcing te omarmen als een hulpmiddel om snel en goedkoop geannoteerde gegevens te verkrijgen om NLP-systemen te trainen. Zodra deze gegevens zijn verzameld, kunnen ze worden overgedragen aan algoritmen die leren basistaken zoals vertalen of parsen uit te voeren. Meestal is deze overdracht waar interactie met de menigte eindigt. De menigte levert de data, maar het uiteindelijke doel is om uiteindelijk mensen uit de loop te halen. Zijn er betere manieren om gebruik te maken van de menigte? In deze tutorial zal ik beginnen met een showcase van innovatieve toepassingen van crowdsourcing die verder gaan dan gegevensverzameling en annotatie. Ik zal ingaan op toepassingen voor natuurlijke taalverwerking en machine learning, hybride intelligentie of 'human in the loop' AI-systemen die gebruikmaken van de complementaire krachten van mens en machine om meer te bereiken dan beide alleen kunnen, en grootschalige studies van menselijk gedrag online. Ik zal dan het grootste deel van de tutorial besteden aan recent onderzoek om te begrijpen wie crowdworkers zijn, hoe ze zich gedragen en wat dit ons moet leren over best practices voor interactie met de menigte.", 'da': "I løbet af det sidste årti er crowdsourcing blevet brugt til at udnytte kraften i menneskelige beregninger til at løse opgaver, der er notorisk vanskelige at løse med computere alene, såsom at bestemme, om et billede indeholder et træ eller ej, vurdere relevansen af et websted eller verificere telefonnummeret på en virksomhed. Det naturlige sprogbehandlingsfællesskab var tidligt til at omfavne crowdsourcing som et værktøj til hurtigt og billigt at få annoterede data til at træne NLP-systemer. Når disse data er indsamlet, kan de overdrages til algoritmer, der lærer at udføre grundlæggende NLP-opgaver som oversættelse eller parsing. Normalt er denne overdragelse, hvor interaktionen med publikum slutter. Mængden giver dataene, men det ultimative mål er til sidst at tage mennesker ud af sløjfen. Er der bedre måder at gøre brug af publikum på? I denne tutorial vil jeg begynde med en showcase af innovative anvendelser af crowdsourcing, der går ud over dataindsamling og annotation. Jeg vil diskutere applikationer til naturlig sprogbehandling og maskinlæring, hybrid intelligens eller 'human in the loop' AI-systemer, der udnytter de komplementære styrker af mennesker og maskiner for at opnå mere end begge kunne opnå alene, og storstilede undersøgelser af menneskelig adfærd online. Jeg vil derefter bruge størstedelen af vejledningen på at dykke ind i nylig forskning, der sigter mod at forstå, hvem crowdworkers er, hvordan de opfører sig, og hvad dette bør lære os om bedste praksis for at interagere med publikum.", 'de': 'In den letzten zehn Jahren wurde Crowdsourcing eingesetzt, um die Leistungsfähigkeit menschlicher Berechnungen zu nutzen, um Aufgaben zu lösen, die bekanntlich nur mit Computern zu lösen sind, wie zum Beispiel festzustellen, ob ein Bild einen Baum enthält oder nicht, die Relevanz einer Website zu bewerten oder die Telefonnummer eines Unternehmens zu verifizieren. Die natürliche Sprachverarbeitungsgemeinschaft war früh dabei, Crowdsourcing als Werkzeug zu nutzen, um schnell und kostengünstig annotierte Daten für die Schulung von NLP-Systemen zu erhalten. Sobald diese Daten gesammelt sind, können sie an Algorithmen weitergegeben werden, die lernen, grundlegende NLP-Aufgaben wie Übersetzung oder Parsing auszuführen. Normalerweise ist diese Übergabe der Punkt, an dem die Interaktion mit der Menge endet. Die Menge liefert die Daten, aber das ultimative Ziel ist es, die Menschen schließlich aus dem Kreis zu nehmen. Gibt es bessere Möglichkeiten, die Menge zu nutzen? In diesem Tutorial werde ich mit einer Präsentation innovativer Anwendungen von Crowdsourcing beginnen, die über die Datenerfassung und Annotation hinausgehen. Ich werde Anwendungen für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache und maschinelles Lernen, hybride Intelligenz oder "Human in the Loop"-KI-Systeme diskutieren, die die komplementären Stärken von Mensch und Maschine nutzen, um mehr zu erreichen, als beide allein erreichen könnten, und großangelegte Studien des menschlichen Verhaltens online. Ich werde dann den Großteil des Tutorials damit verbringen, in aktuelle Forschungen einzutauchen, die darauf abzielen zu verstehen, wer Crowdworker sind, wie sie sich verhalten und was uns dies über Best Practices für die Interaktion mit der Crowd lehren sollte.', 'ko': "지난 10년 동안 크라우드소싱은 사람들이 계산하는 힘을 이용하여 모두가 알고 있는 컴퓨터로 단독으로 해결하기 어려운 임무를 해결하는 데 사용되었다. 예를 들어 한 장의 이미지에 나무가 포함되어 있는지 확인하고, 한 사이트의 관련성을 평가하거나, 한 기업의 전화번호를 검증하는 것이다.자연 언어 처리 커뮤니티는 NLP 시스템을 교육하기 위해 주석이 달린 데이터를 신속하고 저렴하게 얻는 도구로 일찍부터 패키지를 사용했다.이 데이터를 수집하면 번역이나 해석 등 기본 NLP 작업을 수행하는 알고리즘을 학습하는 데 맡길 수 있다.보통 이런 전환은 사람들과 상호작용이 끝나는 곳이다.군중들은 데이터를 제공했지만 최종 목표는 인간을 순환시키는 것이다.사람들을 더 잘 이용할 수 있는 방법이 있나요?본 강좌에서 저는 먼저 데이터 수집과 주석을 초월한 패키지 혁신의 용도를 보여 드리겠습니다.나는 자연 언어 처리와 기계 학습, 혼합 지능 또는'인간 회로'인공지능 시스템의 응용을 논의할 것이다. 이런 시스템은 사람과 기계의 상호 보완 우위를 이용하여 어느 한 쪽도 단독으로 실현할 수 없는 목표를 실현하고 온라인에서 대규모로 사람을 연구하는 행위를 실현할 것이다.그리고 저는 이 강좌의 대부분 시간 동안 최신 연구를 깊이 연구하여 많은 노동자들이 누구인지, 그들의 행동 방식, 그리고 이것이 우리에게 사람들과 상호작용하는 가장 좋은 실천이 무엇인지를 가르쳐 줄 것입니다.", 'fa': 'در طول دهه گذشته، منابع جمعیت برای استفاده از قدرت محاسبات انسان برای حل کار های مشکلی برای حل کردن با کامپیوتر تنها استفاده شده است، مثلاً تصمیم گرفتن که آیا یک تصویر یک درخت دارد یا نه، ارزش ارزش یک وب سایت یا تصمیم گرفتن شماره تلفن یک تجارت است. جامعه پرداخت زبان طبیعی زود بود که به عنوان ابزار سریع و غیرفشار اطلاعات یادآوری برای آموزش سیستم\u200cهای NLP را به عنوان ابزار جمعیت گرفت. Once this data is collected, it can be handed to algorithms that learn to perform basic NLP tasks such as translation or parsing. معمولاً این دستگاه جایی است که تعامل با جمعیت تموم می شود. جمعیت اطلاعات را پیشنهاد می کند، اما هدف نهایت این است که در نهایت انسانها را از چرخه خارج کنید. راه هاي بهتري براي استفاده از جمعيت وجود داره؟ در این تدریس شروع می\u200cکنم با یک نمایش از استفاده\u200cهای نوآوری از سرمایه\u200cگذاری گروهی که بیشتر از جمع داده\u200cها و اخطار می\u200cکنند. من در مورد کاربردهای برای پرداخت زبان طبیعی و یادگیری ماشین، هوش هایبراد یا سیستم های AI انسان در چرخه صحبت می کنم که نیروهای کامل انسان و ماشین را برای رسیدن بیشتر از هر کدام می تواند تنها به دست آورد، و مطالعه های مقیاس بزرگی از رفتار انسان در آنلاین به دست می آورد. بعدش بیشتر آموزشی را در تحقیقات اخیر که هدف دارد بفهمم کار گروهی هستند، چگونه رفتار می کنند، و این باید به ما درباره بهترین تجربه ها آموزش دهد تا با جمعیت تعامل کنیم.', 'id': "Selama dekade terakhir, crowdsourcing telah digunakan untuk menggunakan kekuatan komputasi manusia untuk memecahkan tugas yang terkenal sulit untuk diselesaikan dengan komputer sendirian, seperti menentukan apakah sebuah gambar mengandung pohon, menilai relevansi situs, atau mengkonfirmasi nomor telepon bisnis. Komunitas pemroses bahasa alam awal untuk menerima crowdsourcing sebagai alat untuk cepat dan tidak mahal mendapatkan data anotasi untuk melatih sistem NLP. Setelah data ini dikumpulkan, dapat diserahkan kepada algoritma yang belajar untuk melakukan tugas NLP dasar seperti terjemahan atau penghuraian. Biasanya handoff ini adalah dimana interaksi dengan kerumunan berakhir. The crowd provides the data, but the ultimate goal is to eventually take humans out of the loop.  Are there better ways to make use of the crowd? In this tutorial, I will begin with a showcase of innovative uses of crowdsourcing that go beyond data collection and annotation.  Saya akan mendiskusikan aplikasi untuk proses bahasa alam dan pembelajaran mesin, intelijen hibrid atau sistem AI 'manusia dalam loop' yang menggunakan kekuatan komplimentar manusia dan mesin untuk mencapai lebih dari yang bisa mencapai sendirian, dan studi skala besar perilaku manusia online. Lalu saya akan menghabiskan sebagian besar pelajaran menyelam ke dalam penelitian baru-baru ini yang bertujuan untuk memahami siapa pekerja keramaian, bagaimana mereka berperilaku, dan apa yang harus mengajarkan kita tentang praktek terbaik untuk berinteraksi dengan keramaian.", 'sw': "Kwa muongo uliopita, vyanzo vya umma vilitumiwa kutumia nguvu ya kompyuta ya binadamu ili kutatua kazi ambazo ni vigumu sana kutatua kompyuta pekee, kama vile kuamua ikiwa picha ina mti, ikielezea umuhimu wa tovuti, au kuhakikisha idadi ya biashara ya simu. Jumuiya ya upasuaji wa lugha ya asili ilikuwa mapema ya kukubaliana na vyanzo vya watu kama nyenzo kwa haraka na bila kupata taarifa zilizotajwa ili kufundisha mfumo wa NLP. Baada ya kukusanyika taarifa hizi, inaweza kupelekwa kwenye mialgorithi ambayo wanajifunza kutekeleza kazi za msingi za NLP kama vile tafsiri au parsing. Kwa kawaida hii mikono ni pale ambapo mahusiano na umati unaishia. Watu wanatoa taarifa hizo, lakini lengo la mwisho ni kuwaondoa watu mwishoni. Je, kuna njia bora ya kutumia watu? In this tutorial, I will begin with a showcase of innovative uses of crowdsourcing that go beyond data collection and annotation.  Nitajadili matumizi ya utaratibu wa lugha za asili na kujifunza mashine ya kujifunza, maarifa ya utulivu au 'binadamu kwenye viwanja vya UKIMWI' ambazo zinatumia nguvu za kompyuta za binadamu na mashine ili kupata zaidi ya uwezekano wa kufikia peke yake, na tafiti kubwa za tabia za binadamu mtandaoni. Kisha nitatumia utafiti wa hivi karibuni kwa lengo la kuelewa ni wafanyakazi wa umma, jinsi wanavyotenda, na kile kinachopaswa kutufundisha kuhusu vitendo vyema vya kuhusiana na umma.", 'tr': "Soňky on ýyldan bäri köp adamlaryň hesaplamagyň güýji ýok işlerini çözmek üçin ýöne çözilmek üçin ullanýar. Şüphesiz bir suratyň a ğasy bolmagyny mümkin etmesi ýa-da habat saýlamagyna deňleýär ýa-da biznisiň telefon sanyny barlamagyna mümkin edýär. Doýal dil işleýän jemgyýeti NLP sistemalary öwrenmek üçin köpürleri çalt we ýuwaşlyk bilen hasaplanýan maglumatlary almak üçin irräk boldy. Bu maglumat toplanýänden soň, terjime ýa-da ayırma ýaly esasy NLP işini öwrenmek üçin algoritmalara berilip biler. Adatça bu el çykyş, kalamlar bilen etkileşim soňýar. Halk veriyi temin ediyor, fakat sonunda insanları dönüştürmek. Köwleti ulanmak gowy ýoly barmy? Bu tutumçyda, maglumat koleksiýasyndan we ýazgytlaryň öňünde ýokary taýýarlanan kalamlar ulanylaryna başlaryn. Men uygulamalary tebigy dil işlemegi we maşyny öwrenmegi, hybrid intelleksi ýa 'loop içinde ynsan we maşynlaryň complementer güçlerini ýetirmek üçin adamlaryň we maşynlaryň ýene ýetişmegi üçin ýeterlik ýetirmek üçin, ýöne adamlaryň ähli ölçekli işlemelerini online etmäge etjek. Soňra okuwçylaryň köp bölegini soňky araştyrmalara geçirjek bolaryn, köp işgärleri kim bolýandygyny, nähili hereket etýändiklerini we halka bilen ähli gowy praktika barada bize öwretmeli.", 'af': "In die laaste dekade is die skapsourcing gebruik om die krag van die menslike rekenaar te verlos om die werke wat nooit moeilik is om met rekenaars alleen te los, soos om te bepaal of 'n beeld 'n boom bevat of nie, om die relevansie van 'n webwerk te verhaal, of die foonnommer van 'n besigheid te bevestig. Die natuurlike taal verwerking gemeenskap was vroeg om skapsourcing as 'n hulpmiddel vir vinnig en onverwagtig data te kry om NLP stelsels te oefen. As hierdie data versamel word, kan dit wees handel af na algoritme wat leer na uitvoer basiese NLP taak soos vertaling of verwerking. Gewoonlik is hierdie handaf waar interaksie met die skare eindig. Die skare verskaf die data, maar die ultimate doel is om mense in einde uit die loop te neem. Is daar beter maniere om te gebruik van die skare? In hierdie onderwyseling sal ek begin met 'n wys van inovatiewe gebruike van skare wat buite data versameling en annotasie gaan. Ek sal toepassings aan natuurlike taal verwerking en masjien leer, hybride inteligensie of 'menslike in die loop' AI-stelsels bespreek wat die komplementare sterkte van mense en masjiene vervolg om meer te bereik as enteer alleen te bereik, en groot skaal studies van menslike gedrag online te bereik. Ek sal dan die meeste van die onderwyselse diving in die onlangse onderwyseling speur wat bedoel is om te verstaan wie se skakelwerkers is, hoe hulle gedrag het, en wat hierdie ons moet leer oor beste praksies vir interaksie met die skakels.", 'sq': "Gjatë dekadës së fundit, crowdsourcing është përdorur për të shfrytëzuar fuqinë e llogaritjeve njerëzore për të zgjidhur detyra që janë shumë të vështira për të zgjidhur vetëm me kompjuterë, të tillë si përcaktimi nëse një imazh përmban apo jo një pemë, vlerësimi i rëndësisë së një uebsajt apo verifikimi i numrit telefonik të një biznesi. Komuniteti natyror i procesimit të gjuhës ishte herët për të përqafuar crowdsourcing si një mjet për të marrë shpejt dhe pa shpenzim të dhënat e anotuara për të trajnuar sistemet NLP. Sapo të mbledhin këto të dhëna, mund t'u dorëzohen algoritmave që mësojnë të kryejnë detyra bazë NLP të tilla si përkthimi apo analizimi. Zakonisht ky dorëzim përfundon ndërveprimi me turmën. Turma i jep të dhënat, por qëllimi përfundimtar është të nxjerrim njerëzit nga loop. Ka mënyra më të mira për të përdorur turmën? Në këtë mësim, unë do të filloj me një shfaqje të përdorimeve inovative të crowdsourcing që shkojnë përtej mbledhjes dhe anotacionit të të dhënave. I will discuss applications to natural language processing and machine learning, hybrid intelligence or 'human in the loop' AI systems that leverage the complementary strengths of humans and machines in order to achieve more than either could achieve alone, and large scale studies of human behavior online.  Pastaj do të shpenzoj shumicën e mësimeve për zhytje në kërkime të fundit që synojnë të kuptojnë se kush janë punëtorët e turmës, si sillen dhe çfarë duhet të na mësojë kjo për praktikat më të mira për të ndërvepruar me turmën.", 'am': "Over the last decade, crowdsourcing has been used to harness the power of human computation to solve tasks that are notoriously difficult to solve with computers alone, such as determining whether or not an image contains a tree, rating the relevance of a website, or verifying the phone number of a business.  የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ማኅበረሰብ የሕዝብ sources ለመቀበል ፈጥኖ እና የNLP ስርዓቶች ለማስተማርና ለማግኘት ጥያቄ ለማግኘት ቀድሞ ነበር፡፡ ይህም ዳራዎች በተሰበሰቡ ጊዜ እንደ ትርጓሜ ወይም ማዘጋጀት የሚችሉትን የNLP ስራዎችን ለመፈጸም ለሚማሩ አጎርጂቶች ይስጡታል፡፡ ይህ እጆቹ ከሕዝቡ ጋር ግንኙነት ወደዚያ ነው፡፡ የሕዝቡ አዳራዎችን የሚሰጠው ነገር ግን የመጨረሻው ጉዳዩ ሰውን ከውጭው ማውጣት ነው፡፡ Are there better ways to make use of the crowd? በዚህ ትምህርት፣ ከዳታ ሰብስብ እና ማሰቃየት የበለጠ አዲስ ጉዳይ የሕዝብ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ እጀምራለሁ፡፡ በአዳማዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ፣ የኬብሪድ ማስተማር ወይም 'የሰው ጉዳይ' አ.አ. ስርዓቶች እና መሳሪያዎችን ለብቻውን ለማግኘት እና በመስመር ላይ የሰውን ትልቅ ትምህርት ትምህርት ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን አካባቢዎችን እና መሳሪያዎችን ለማግኘት እና በመስመር ላይ ትልቅ ትምህርት እና ትልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ ከዚህም በኋላ ብዙ ትምህርት መምህርትን ከሕዝብ ጋር ለመቀናቀል የሚያስተውሉትን፣ እንዴት እንደሆኑ እና እንዴት እንደምታስተምረን እና እንዴት እንደምታስተምረን ትምህርት ማድረግ እሰጣለሁ፡፡", 'bn': 'গত দশকের মধ্যে জনস্কোর্সিং মানুষের গণনার ক্ষমতা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে কাজ সমাধান করতে পারে যা কম্পিউটারের সাথে একা সমাধান করতে কঠিন, যেমন একটি ছবি একটি গাছের মধ্যে রয়েছে কিনা তা নির্ধা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া সম্প্রদায় এনএলপি সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য দ্রুত এবং অযোগ্য তথ্য পাওয়ার জন্য প্রকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্র যখন এই তথ্য সংগ্রহ করা হয়, তখন এটি অ্যালগরিদমের কাছে হাত দিতে পারে, যারা অনুবাদ অথবা পার্জিং এর মতো মৌলিক NLP কাজ করার শিক্ষা প্রদান সাধারণত এই হ্যান্ডআফ হচ্ছে যেখানে জনগণের সাথে যোগাযোগ শেষ হয়। জনগণ তথ্য প্রদান করে, কিন্তু শেষ লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে মানুষকে লুপ থেকে নিয়ে যাওয়া। জনগণকে ব্যবহার করতে কি ভালো উপায় আছে? এই শিক্ষার্থীতে আমি একটি সৃষ্টিশীল ব্যবহারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি শুরু করব যা তথ্য সংগ্রহ এবং বিরক্তির বাইরে যায়। আমি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং মেশিন শিক্ষা, হাইব্রিড গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বা AI সিস্টেমের সাথে আলোচনা করব যা মানুষ এবং মেশিনের সহায়তার শক্তি বাড়িয়ে দেবে যাতে তারা একাই অর্জন করতে  তারপর আমি সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণায় বেশীরভাগ শিক্ষার্থীদের গবেষণা ব্যয় করব যার লক্ষ্যে বুঝতে পারি কারা লোক শ্রমিক, কিভাবে তারা আচরণ করে, আর জনগণের সাথ', 'hy': 'Վերջին տասնամյակի ընթացքում մարդու հաշվարկների ուժը օգտագործվել է մարդկային հաշվարկների ուժի օգնությամբ, որպեսզի լուծվի այն առաջադրանքները, որոնք հայտնի է, որ դժվար են լուծվել միայն համակարգիչների հետ, ինչպիսիք են\' որոշել, թե արդյոք պատկերը ծառ ունի, գնահատել վեբ կայքի կար Բնական լեզվի վերամշակման համայնքն ավելի շուտ էր ընդունում ժողովրդի կազմակերպությունը որպես միջոց արագ և անծանր տվյալներ ստանալու համար, որպեսզի սովորեցնեն ՆԼՊ համակարգերը: Երբ այս տվյալները հավաքվում են, դրանք կարող են փոխանցվել ալգորիթմներին, որոնք սովորում են կատարել հիմնական ՆԼՊ առաջադրանքներ, ինչպիսիք են թարգմանությունը կամ վերլուծումը: Սովորաբար այս հանդիսատեսի հետ հաղորդակցվելը ավարտվում է: The crowd provides the data, but the ultimate goal is to eventually take humans out of the loop.  Արդյո՞ք ժողովրդի օգտագործման ավելի լավ միջոցներ կան: Այս դասարանում ես կսկսեմ մի նորարարական օգտագործման ցուցադրությամբ, որը գնում է ավելի շատ քան տվյալների հավաքածուն և նշումները: Ես կքննարկեմ ծրագրերը բնական լեզվի վերամշակում և մեքենայի ուսումնասիրում, հիբրիդ ինտելեկտը կամ "մարդկային շրջանակում" ԱԲ համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են մարդկանց և մեքենաների բազմազան ուժեղությունները, որպեսզի ավելի շատ, քան կամ միայնակ կարող են հասնել, և մարդկային վարքագ Այնուհետև ես կծախսեմ դասարանի մեծամասնությունը վերջին հետազոտությունների մեջ, որոնք նպատակով են հասկանալ, թե ովքեր են ժողովրդի աշխատակիցները, թե ինչպես են նրանք վարվում, և թե ինչ է դա պետք սովորեցնել մեզ ժողովրդի հետ շփվելու լավագույն գործողությունների', 'bs': "Tokom zadnjih decenija, crowdsourcing je korišćen kako bi iskoristio moć ljudskog računala kako bi riješio zadatke koje je poznato teško riješiti samim računalima, kao što je utvrđivanje da li slika sadrži drvo ili ne, ocjenjivanje relevantnosti web stranice, ili provjeravanje broja telefona biznisa. Prirodna zajednica obrađivanja jezika je bila rano prihvatiti crowdsourcing kao alat za brzo i neočekivano dobivanje annotiranih podataka za obuku NLP sistema. Kada se ove podatke skupljaju, može se predati algoritmima koji nauče izvršiti osnovne NLP zadatke poput prevoda ili analize. Obično je ova rukavica tamo gdje interakcija sa publikom završava. Publika pruža podatke, ali konačni cilj je da na kraju izvučemo ljude iz petlja. Postoji li bolji način da se koristi gužva? U ovom nastavniku, počeću sa pokazivanjem inovativnih korištenja crowdsourcing koji prođe izvan kolekcije i annotacije podataka. Razgovarat ću o aplikacijama prirodnoj obradi jezika i učenju strojeva, hibridne inteligencije ili 'ljudske inteligencije u krugu' AI sustavi koji utiču na komplementarnu snagu ljudskih i strojeva kako bi postigli više nego što bi bilo moglo postići sami, i velike skale studija ljudskog ponašanja na internetu. Onda ću potrošiti većinu nastavnih ronjenja u nedavnim istraživanjima u cilju razumijevanja tko su gužva radnici, kako se ponašaju, i šta će nas ovo naučiti o najboljoj praksi za interakciju s publikom.", 'az': "Son on ildə, insanların hesablama gücünü təkcə bilgisayarla çəkmək çətinlikləri çəkmək üçün qüvvətli istifadə edilmişdir, çünki bir surat a ğacı barəsində olub olmadığını müəyyən etmək, vebsayt vasitəsini müəyyən etmək və ya telefon sayısını təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edilmişdir. NLP sistemlərini təhsil etmək üçün növbənöv dil işləmə müddəti təhsil etmək üçün qüvvətli təhsil edilməsi üçün ilk dəfə idi. Bu məlumatlar toplanınca, çeviriş və ayırma kimi temel NLP işlərini öyrənən algoritmlərə verilir. Genelde bu əlavə insanlarla birlikdə müxtəlif işləri bitirir. Qövmün məlumatlarını təmin edir, amma sonunda insanları dönüşdən çıxartmaq. Halkı istifadə etmək üçün daha yaxşı yollar var mı? Bu öyrənməkdə, məlumatlar koleksiyonundan və məlumatlardan ötrü istifadə edilən yeni istifadələrlə başlayacağım. Mən təbiətli dil işləməsi və makinelərin öyrənməsi, hibrid istihbəti və ya 'insan in the loop' AI sistemlərinə mübahisə edəcəyəm ki, insanların və makinelərin tamamlayıcı güclərini təkrarlayıb təkrarlayıb təkrarlayıb yalnız başa çatmaq üçün daha çox və insan davranışlarının böyük dəyişikliklərini onlayna təkrarlayır. Sonra mən qeyri-qeyri işçilər kimindir, necə davranırlar, və bu bizə qövmlə birlikdə ən yaxşı işlər haqqında öyrətmək üçün ən yaxşı təcrübələr haqqında çoxluğunu yeni təcrübələrə sərf edəcəyəm.", 'ca': 'Durant les últimes dècades, la crowdsourcing s\'ha utilitzat per aprofitar el poder de la computació human a per resoldre tasques notoriament difícils de resoldre només amb ordinadors, com ara determinar si una imatge conté un arbre o no, valorar la pertinencia d\'una pàgina web o verificar el número de telèfon d\'un negoci. The natural language processing community was early to embrace crowdsourcing as a tool for quickly and inexpensively obtaining annotated data to train NLP systems.  Una vegada que es recollen aquestes dades, es poden entregar a algoritmes que aprenen a fer tasques bàsiques de NLP com la traducció o l\'analització. Normalment aquesta entrega és on acaba la interacció amb la multitud. La multitud proporciona les dades, però l\'objectiu final és treure els humans del bucle. Hi ha millors maneres d\'aprofitar la multitud? En aquest tutorial, començaré amb una mostra d\'úses innovadors de crowdsourcing que van més enllà de la col·lecció i anotació de dades. Discutiré aplicacions al processament natural de llenguatges i l\'aprenentatge màquinari, la intel·ligència híbrida o els sistemes d\'AI "humans en el bucle" que aprofiten les forces complementars dels humans i les màquines per aconseguir més del que poden aconseguir sols, i estudis a gran escala sobre el comportament humà en línia. Després gastaré la majoria de la tutoria immergint en recents investigacions mirant a entendre qui són els treballadors de multitud, com es comporten i què ens hauria d\'ensenyar sobre les millors pràctiques per interactuar amb la multitud.', 'cs': 'V posledních desetiletích byl crowdsourcing využíván k využití síly lidských výpočtů k řešení úkolů, které jsou notoricky obtížné řešit pouze počítači, jako je určení, zda obrázek obsahuje strom, hodnocení relevance webových stránek nebo ověření telefonního čísla firmy. Komunita pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka byla brzy přijata crowdsourcing jako nástroj pro rychlé a levné získávání anotovaných dat pro trénink NLP systémů. Jakmile jsou tato data shromážděna, mohou být předána algoritmům, které se naučí provádět základní úkoly NLP, jako je překlad nebo analýza. Obvykle toto předání končí interakce s davem. Dav poskytuje data, ale konečným cílem je nakonec dostat lidi ze smyčky. Existují lepší způsoby, jak využít davu? V tomto návodu začnu ukázkou inovativních využití crowdsourcingu, které přesahují sběr dat a anotace. Budu diskutovat o aplikacích pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka a strojové učení, hybridní inteligenci nebo systémech umělé inteligence "člověk ve smyčce", které využívají doplňující se silné stránky lidí a strojů, aby dosáhly více, než by mohly dosáhnout sám, a o rozsáhlých studiích lidského chování online. Poté strávím většinu výuky ponořením se do nedávného výzkumu zaměřeného na pochopení, kdo jsou crowdworkers, jak se chovají a co by nás to mělo naučit o osvědčených postupech pro interakci s davem.', 'hr': "Tijekom posljednjih desetljeća, crowdsourcing je korišteno kako bi iskoristio moć ljudskog računala kako bi riješio zadatke koje je poznato teško riješiti samim računalima, kao što je utvrđivanje da li slika sadrži drvo ili ne, ocjenjivanje relevantnosti web stranice ili provjeravanje broja telefona biznisa. Prirodna zajednica obrađivanja jezika bila je rano prihvatiti crowdsourcing kao alat za brzo i neočekivano dobivanje annotiranih podataka za obuku sustava NLP-a. Kada se ove podatke skupljaju, može se predati algoritmima koji nauče izvršiti osnovne NLP zadatke poput prevoda ili analize. Obično je ova rukavica gdje interakcija s publikom završava. Publika pruža podatke, ali konačni cilj je da na kraju izvučemo ljude iz petlja. Postoji li bolji način da se koristi publike? U ovom nastavniku počet ću s pokazivanjem inovativnih korištenja crowdsourcing koji su iznad kolekcije i annotacije podataka. Razgovarat ću o aplikacijama prirodnoj obradi jezika i učenju strojeva, hibridne inteligencije ili 'ljudske inteligencije u krugu' AI sustavi koji utječu na komplementne snage ljudskih i strojeva kako bi postigli više nego što bi bilo bilo da bi postigli sami, i velike skale ispitivanja ljudskog ponašanja na internetu. Onda ću potrošiti većinu učitelja ronjenja u nedavnim istraživanjima ciljem razumijevanja tko su gužva radnici, kako se ponašaju, i što bi nas to trebalo naučiti o najboljoj praksi za interakciju s publikom.", 'et': 'Viimase kümnendi jooksul on ühishankimist kasutatud inimarvutuste jõu ärakasutamiseks, et lahendada ülesandeid, mida on teadaolevalt raske lahendada ainult arvutitega, näiteks määrata, kas pilt sisaldab puud või mitte, hinnata veebisaidi asjakohasust või kontrollida ettevõtte telefoninumbrit. Looduskeelte töötlemise kogukond oli varakult hakanud ühishankimist kasutama vahendina, mis võimaldab kiiresti ja odavalt saada märgitud andmeid NLP süsteemide koolitamiseks. Kui need andmed on kogutud, saab need edastada algoritmidele, kes õpivad täitma põhilisi NLP ülesandeid, nagu tõlkimine või parsimine. Tavaliselt lõpeb see üleandmine rahvahulgaga. Rahvas annab andmeid, kuid lõplik eesmärk on lõpuks inimesed ringist välja viia. Kas on paremaid viise rahvast ära kasutada? Selles õpetuses alustan ühishankimise uuenduslike kasutusviiside tutvustamisega, mis ulatuvad kaugemale andmete kogumisest ja märgistamisest. Arutlen loodusliku keele töötlemise ja masinõppe rakendusi, hübriidintelligentsust või "inimese silmuses" AI süsteeme, mis kasutavad inimeste ja masinate täiendavaid tugevusi, et saavutada rohkem, kui kumbki neist üksi saaks, ning laiaulatuslikke inimeste käitumise uuringuid internetis. Seejärel veedan suurema osa õpetusest sukeldudes hiljutistesse uuringutesse, mille eesmärk on mõista, kes on ühistöötajad, kuidas nad käituvad ja mida see peaks meile õpetama rahvahulgaga suhtlemise parimate tavade kohta.', 'fi': 'Viimeisen vuosikymmenen aikana joukkoistamista on käytetty ihmisten laskennan voiman valjastamiseen sellaisten tehtävien ratkaisemiseen, joita on tunnetusti vaikea ratkaista yksin tietokoneilla, kuten sen määrittämiseen, sisältääkö kuva puun, verkkosivuston relevanssin arvioimiseen tai yrityksen puhelinnumeron tarkistamiseen. Luonnonkielen käsittelyyhteisö oli jo varhaisessa vaiheessa omaksunut joukkoistamisen työkaluksi, jonka avulla voidaan nopeasti ja edullisesti hankkia huomautuksia sisältävää dataa NLP-järjestelmien kouluttamiseksi. Kun nämä tiedot on kerätty, ne voidaan siirtää algoritmeille, jotka oppivat suorittamaan NLP-tehtäviä, kuten kääntämistä tai jäsentämistä. Yleensä tämä luovutus päättyy vuorovaikutukseen yleisön kanssa. Yleisö antaa tiedot, mutta lopullinen tavoite on lopulta ottaa ihmiset pois silmukasta. Onko olemassa parempia tapoja hyödyntää yleisöä? Tässä opetusohjelmassa aloitan esittelyllä joukkoistamisen innovatiivisista käyttötavoista, jotka ylittävät tiedonkeruun ja merkintöjen tekemisen. Keskustelen sovelluksista luonnollisen kielen prosessointiin ja koneoppimiseen, hybridi-älyyn tai "human in the loop" -tekoälyjärjestelmiin, jotka hyödyntävät ihmisten ja koneiden toisiaan täydentäviä vahvuuksia saavuttaakseen enemmän kuin kumpikaan yksin voisi saavuttaa, sekä laajamittaisista ihmisen käyttäytymisen tutkimuksista verkossa. Tämän jälkeen käytän suurimman osan tutoriaalista sukeltamalla tuoreeseen tutkimukseen, jonka tarkoituksena on ymmärtää, keitä joukkotyöntekijät ovat, miten he käyttäytyvät ja mitä tämän pitäisi opettaa meille parhaista käytännöistä vuorovaikutuksessa yleisön kanssa.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem desetletju se je množično izkoriščanje moči človeškega računalništva uporabljalo za reševanje nalog, ki jih je razvpiti težko rešiti samo z računalniki, kot so določanje, ali slika vsebuje drevo ali ne, ocenjevanje ustreznosti spletne strani ali preverjanje telefonske številke podjetja. Skupnost za obdelavo naravnih jezikov je zgodaj sprejela množično sourcing kot orodje za hitro in poceni pridobivanje označenih podatkov za usposabljanje sistemov NLP. Ko so ti podatki zbrani, jih lahko predamo algoritmom, ki se naučijo izvajati osnovna opravila NLP, kot sta prevajanje ali razčlenjevanje. Običajno se ta predaja konča interakcija z množico. Množica zagotavlja podatke, vendar je končni cilj, da sčasoma izvlečemo ljudi iz zanke. Ali obstajajo boljši načini, kako izkoristiti množico? V tej vadnici bom začel s predstavitvijo inovativnih uporab množičnega sourcinga, ki presegajo zbiranje podatkov in opombe. Razpravljal bom o aplikacijah za obdelavo naravnega jezika in strojno učenje, hibridno inteligenco ali sistemih umetne inteligence "človek v zanki", ki izkoriščajo komplementarne prednosti ljudi in strojev, da bi dosegli več, kot bi lahko dosegli sami, ter obsežne študije človeškega vedenja na spletu. Nato se bom večino vadnice potopil v nedavne raziskave, katerih cilj je razumeti, kdo so množični delavci, kako se obnašajo in kaj naj bi nas to naučilo o najboljših praksah za interakcijo z množico.', 'ha': "Ga gõma na guda ta farko, an yi amfani da manyan umarni ya ɗauki mamlakar mutane zuwa ya raba aikin da za'a zama masu buƙata masu yin sola da kwamfyutan kombuyuta kawai, kamar misãlan ka ƙaddara, ko an ƙulla zane da wata itãce, yana da muhimmanci ga wani website, ko kuma ya gaskata naman zane na wani business. Jamii'in aiki da harshen na asirta ta farko ta karɓi umarni kamar zance wa haraka da inexfanati ya sami data da aka buga wa tsarin na'urar na NLP. Idan an sami wannan data, za'a iya bãyar da shi zuwa algoritumai waɗanda ke yarda su cika aikin kwanan NLP kamar fassarar ko parse. A ɗabi'a, wannan hannayen yana a inda interaction da umarni ke ƙara. Umumin mutãne na bãyar da data, kuma amma ƙarshen jigon ta shine a ƙarshen su cire mutane daga loop. Shin, akwai wasu hanya zuwa ga ƙungiya biyu? In a fara a cikin wannan tudun, na fara wani misãlani na ƙididdige amfani na mutane da ke ƙara ƙaranci cikin jumuin data da cũtarwa. Za zan jãyayya shiryoyin ayukan ayukan da aka amfani da masu karatun ayukan asili da kafin, ma'anar mutane da 'mutum cikin shirin dukkan 'AI' wanda ke ƙarfafa ƙarfin mutane da mashinaikin da za'a sãmu ko da yawa ko kuma karatun masu ƙaranci na aikin mutane a kanan. I will then spend the majority of the tutorial diving into recent research aimed at understanding who crowdworkers are, how they behave, and what this should teach us about best practices for interacting with the crowd.", 'he': 'במהלך העשור האחרון, משתמשו במקורי קהל כדי לנצל את כוח החישוב האנושי כדי לפתור משימות שקשה לפתור במחשבים בלבד, כמו לקבוע אם תמונה מכילה עץ או לא, להעריך את הרלוונטיות של אתר, או לאמת מספר הטלפון של עסק. קהילת מעבדת השפה הטבעית היתה מוקדמת לאמץ את המקורות הקהליים ככלי להשיג מידע מהיר ולא יקר לאימון מערכות NLP. ברגע שנאספו את הנתונים האלה, אפשר להעביר אותם לאלגוריתמים שלמדו לבצע משימות NLP בסיסיות כמו תרגום או מעבדה. בדרך כלל הסידור הזה הוא שבו אינטראקציה עם הקהל מסתיימת. The crowd provides the data, but the ultimate goal is to eventually take humans out of the loop.  יש דרכים טובות יותר לנצל את הקהל? במדריך הלימודים הזה, אני אתחיל עם הצגה של שימושים חדשנים של משאבי קהל שמעבירים מעבר לאספת נתונים והציון. אני אדבר על היישומים לעבודת שפת טבעית וללמדת מכונות, אינטליגנציה היברידית או מערכות "אנושיות במעגל" ואז אבלה את רוב הלימודים לצלול למחקר האחרון שמתכוון להבין מי הם עובדי הקהל, איך הם מתנהגים, ומה זה צריך ללמד אותנו על התאמות הטובות ביותר לתקשר עם הקהל.', 'jv': "Wargeng sing dumadhi diwatahan, kawula-kamuh sing wis nggawe nguasai perbudhakan kanggo nganggo cara sing dianggap bantuan nguasai komputer sing bisa nguasai perusahaan karo sistem sing beraksi, koyo nunggo cilik sing nduwe wit, teka sing dianggap webgungan alih dadi, or a nggawe gerakan perusahaan telepongan Sampeyan perusahaan anyar ing nglanggar wigatining pasar tentang kanggo mbatalé hukum sing katêp nggawe barang kanggo ngilangno kuwi tindan ungot nggawe sistem NLP. Sampeyan ngubah akeh data sing ngregasi, iso dianggap karo Algorithm sing meh dadi NLP sisal karo terjamahan o urip. Awakdhéwé karo akeh manung iki dadi, akeh dumadhan ngono wong liyane Wong wong-wong nduwe dadi nêmên, njuk kesempatan kanggo ngerasah barang-barang uwong sing ngedolok barang. Kaya ono pilihan sing luwih apik penting wong? Name Aku bakal segala macem aplikasi kanggo nggambar luwih dumadhi aturan karo ingkang sistem sing, winih kanggo ingkang 'salang kanggo barang' AI sing bisa nguasai nggawe nguasai nggawe sistem sing kompleter kanggo awak dhéwé karo sampeyan sing bisa ngelarane sistem sing sampeyan sampeyan karo akeh dumadhi iki bakal dumadhi iki bakal dumadhi iki bakal dumadh Aku bakal kelas sing nduwé, ingkang dipulangan kelas telu, lan ijol-ijolan winih sing berarti supoyo awak dhéwé kuwi mau, piye masara awak dhéwé, lan awak dhéwé iki bakal terus awak dhéwé bakal terus kanggo ngilanggar aturan tambah sing luwih dumadhi iki.", 'bo': "In the last decade, crowdsourcing has been used to harness the power of human computation to solve tasks that are notoriously difficult to solve with computers alone. སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག Once this data is collected, it can be handed over to algorithms that learn to perform basic NLP tasks such as translation or parsing. རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ལག་འདི་ནི་མི་མང་ཆེ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། མི་མང་གི་སྐོར་ཆུང་ལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ཡང་། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་དམིགས མི་མང་གི་ཁྱད་འཕགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཧེ་མ་གྲངས་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། ངས་རྩིས་གཞུང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་དང་སྙན་གསལ་ཆས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོ་ལས་འགོ་བཙུགས་ཡོད། I will discuss applications to natural language processing and machine learning, hybrid intelligence or 'human in the loop' AI systems that leverage the complementary strengths of humans and machines in order to achieve more than either could achieve alone, and large scale studies of human behavior online. འོན་ཀྱང་། ངས་ཚང་མ་ཤེས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་འགའ་སྐྱོན་རྩིས་མེད་དུ་བཞག"}
